{'en': 'CharBERT : Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'ar': 'شاربيرت: نموذج لغة مدرّب مسبقًا على معرفة الشخصية', 'pt': 'CharBERT: modelo de linguagem pré-treinado com reconhecimento de caracteres', 'es': 'CharBert: Modelo de lenguaje preentrenado con conciencia de caracteres', 'fr': 'CharBerT\xa0: modèle de langage pré-entraîné prenant en compte les caractères', 'ja': 'CharBERT:文字認識事前訓練された言語モデル', 'zh': 'CharBERT:字符知预训语模样', 'hi': 'CharBERT: चरित्र-जागरूक पूर्व प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'CharBERT: заранее обученная языковая модель, учитывающая характер', 'ga': 'CharBERT: Múnla Teanga Réamh-oilte atá feasach ar charachtair', 'el': 'CharBERT: Προσεκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο γλώσσας με επίγνωση χαρακτήρων', 'ka': 'CharBERT: Character- aware Pre- trained Language Model', 'hu': 'CharBERT: Karaktertudatos, előképzett nyelvi modell', 'lt': 'CharBERT: Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'kk': 'CharBERT: Character- aware Pre- trained Language Model', 'it': 'CharBERT: Modello linguistico pre-addestrato consapevole del carattere', 'mk': 'CharBERT: Преобучен јазички модел свесен за знаци', 'mt': 'CharBERT: Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'ml': 'ചാര്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ട്: പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d', 'mn': 'CharBERT: Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'ms': 'CharBERT: Model Bahasa Latihan-Latihan Awas-Aksara', 'pl': 'CharBERT: Wstępnie przeszkolony model językowy', 'ro': 'CharBERT: Model lingvistic pre-instruit conștient de caracter', 'no': 'CharBERT: Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'so': 'Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'sr': 'CharBERT: Svjestan znakovi predobučeni jezik model', 'sv': 'CharBERT: Karaktärsmedveten Förtränad språkmodell', 'si': 'චාර්බෙර්ට්: අක්ෂර- දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂා මොඩේල්', 'ur': 'CharBERT: Character- aware Pre- trained Language Model', 'ta': 'எழுத்து- தெரியும் முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி', 'uz': 'KChart', 'vi': 'Bài cam kết Ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Предварително обучен езиков модел, запознат с характера', 'da': 'CharBERT: Karakterbevidst Forududdannet sprogmodel', 'nl': 'CharBERT: Karakterbewust Voorgetraind Taalmodel', 'hr': 'CharBERT: Preobučeni jezički model znakova', 'ko': 'CharBERT: 문자 감지 사전 트레이닝 언어 모델', 'de': 'CharBERT: Charakterbewusstes Vortrainiertes Sprachmodell', 'id': 'CharBERT: Model Bahasa Dipelatih Berawal', 'fa': 'charBERT: مدل زبان پیش آموزش داده شده با علامت', 'af': 'Karakter: Character- aware Pre- trained Language Model', 'tr': 'Karakter', 'sw': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sq': 'CharBERT: Modeli i gjuhës së trajnuar para-të me karakter', 'am': 'ፊደል-aware Pre-trained ቋንቋ Model', 'hy': 'Շարբերտ', 'bn': 'CharBERT: অক্ষর- সচেতন পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা মডেল', 'az': 'CharBERT: Karakter-aware Ön-təhsil Dili Modeli', 'bs': 'CharBERT: Preobučeni jezički model svestan znakovima', 'ca': 'CharBERT: Model de llenguatge pré-entrenat conscient del caràcter', 'cs': 'CharBERT: Předškolený jazykový model s vědomím znaků', 'et': 'CharBERT: iseloomuteadlik eelkoolitud keelemudel', 'fi': 'CharBERT: Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'CharBERT: Predusposobljen jezikovni model, ki se zaveda znakov', 'jv': 'Karakter-Awas Language model', 'he': 'CharBERT: מודל שפה מאומן מראש', 'bo': 'CharBERT: Character-aware Pre-trained Language Model'}
{'en': 'Most pre-trained language models (PLMs) construct word representations at subword level with Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) or its variations, by which OOV (out-of-vocab) words are almost avoidable. However, those methods split a word into subword units and make the representation incomplete and fragile. In this paper, we propose a character-aware pre-trained language model named CharBERT improving on the previous methods (such as BERT, RoBERTa) to tackle these problems. We first construct the contextual word embedding for each token from the sequential character representations, then fuse the representations of characters and the subword representations by a novel heterogeneous interaction module. We also propose a new pre-training task named NLM (Noisy LM) for unsupervised character representation learning. We evaluate our method on question answering, sequence labeling, and text classification tasks, both on the original datasets and adversarial misspelling test sets. The experimental results show that our method can significantly improve the performance and robustness of PLMs simultaneously.', 'ar': 'تقوم معظم نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا (PLM) بإنشاء تمثيلات للكلمات على مستوى الكلمات الفرعية باستخدام تشفير زوج البايت (BPE) أو أشكاله المختلفة ، والتي يمكن تجنب الكلمات OOV (خارج المفردات) تقريبًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه الطرق تقسم كلمة إلى وحدات كلمات فرعية وتجعل التمثيل غير مكتمل وهش. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا للغة مدربًا مسبقًا مدركًا للشخصية يسمى CharBERT يعمل على تحسين الطرق السابقة (مثل BERT و RoBERTa) لمعالجة هذه مشاكل. نقوم أولاً بتضمين الكلمة السياقية لكل رمز مميز من تمثيلات الأحرف المتسلسلة ، ثم نقوم بدمج تمثيلات الأحرف وتمثيلات الكلمات الفرعية بواسطة وحدة تفاعل غير متجانسة جديدة. نقترح أيضًا مهمة جديدة للتدريب المسبق تسمى NLM (Noisy LM) لتعلم تمثيل الشخصيات بدون إشراف. نقوم بتقييم طريقتنا في الإجابة على الأسئلة ، ووضع العلامات على التسلسل ، ومهام تصنيف النص ، سواء في مجموعات البيانات الأصلية أو مجموعات اختبار الخطأ الإملائي للخصم. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا يمكن أن تحسن أداء وقوة PLM بشكل كبير في وقت واحد.', 'fr': "La plupart des modèles de langage pré-entraînés (PLM) construisent des représentations de mots au niveau des sous-mots avec l'encodage par paire d'octets (BPE) ou ses variantes, ce qui permet d'éviter les mots OOV (hors vocabulaire). Cependant, ces méthodes divisent un mot en unités de sous-mots et rendent la représentation incomplète et fragile.Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle de langage pré-entraîné prenant en compte les caractères nommé CharBert améliorant les méthodes précédentes (telles que BERT, Roberta) pour résoudre ces problèmes. Nous construisons d'abord l'intégration de mots contextuels pour chaque jeton à partir des représentations de caractères séquentielles, puis fusionnons les représentations de caractères et les représentations de sous-mots par un nouveau module d'interaction hétérogène. Nous proposons également une nouvelle tâche de pré-entraînement nommée NLM (Noisy LM) pour l'apprentissage non supervisé de la représentation des personnages. Nous évaluons notre méthode sur des tâches de réponse aux questions, d'étiquetage de séquence et de classification de texte, à la fois sur les ensembles de données d'origine et sur des ensembles de tests contradictoires de fautes d'orthographe Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode peut améliorer de manière significative les performances et la robustesse des PLM simultanément.", 'pt': 'A maioria dos modelos de linguagem pré-treinados (PLMs) constrói representações de palavras em nível de subpalavra com Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) ou suas variações, pelas quais palavras OOV (fora de vocabulário) são quase evitáveis. No entanto, esses métodos dividem uma palavra em unidades de subpalavras e tornam a representação incompleta e frágil. problemas. Primeiro construímos a incorporação de palavras contextuais para cada token a partir das representações de caracteres sequenciais, depois fundimos as representações de caracteres e as representações de subpalavras por um novo módulo de interação heterogênea. Também propomos uma nova tarefa de pré-treinamento chamada NLM (Noisy LM) para aprendizado de representação de caracteres não supervisionado. Avaliamos nosso método em tarefas de resposta a perguntas, rotulagem de sequência e classificação de texto, tanto nos conjuntos de dados originais quanto nos conjuntos de teste de erros ortográficos adversários. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método pode melhorar significativamente o desempenho e a robustez dos PLMs simultaneamente.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los modelos de lenguaje preentrenados (PLM) construyen representaciones de palabras a nivel de subpalabra con la codificación de par de bytes (BPE) o sus variaciones, por lo que las palabras OOV (fuera de vocabulario) son casi evitables. Sin embargo, esos métodos dividen una palabra en unidades de subpalabras y hacen que la representación sea incompleta y frágil. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de lenguaje preentrenado y consciente de los caracteres llamado CharBert que mejora los métodos anteriores (como BERT, Roberta) para abordar estos problemas. Primero construimos la incrustación de palabras contextuales para cada ficha a partir de las representaciones secuenciales de caracteres, luego fusionamos las representaciones de caracteres y las representaciones de subpalabras mediante un nuevo módulo de interacción heterogénea. También proponemos una nueva tarea de preentrenamiento llamada NLM (Noisy LM) para el aprendizaje sin supervisión de la representación de personajes. Evaluamos nuestro método en las tareas de respuesta a preguntas, etiquetado de secuencias y clasificación de texto, tanto en los conjuntos de datos originales como en los conjuntos de pruebas de errores ortográficos contradictorios. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método puede mejorar significativamente el rendimiento y la robustez de los PLM simultáneamente.', 'ja': 'ほとんどの事前に訓練された言語モデル（ PLM ）は、バイトペアエンコーディング（ BPE ）またはそのバリエーションを使用してサブワードレベルで単語表現を構築します。これにより、OOV （ボーキャブ外）単語はほぼ回避可能です。 しかしながら、これらの方法は、単語をサブワード単位に分割し、表現を不完全かつ脆弱にします。本稿では、これらの問題に対処するために、以前の方法（ BERT、RoBERTaなど）を改善したCharBERTという名前の文字認識事前訓練言語モデルを提案します。 まず、逐次的な文字表現から各トークンの文脈的な単語埋め込みを構築し、次に新規の異種相互作用モジュールによって文字の表現とサブワード表現を融合します。 また、監督されていない文字表現学習のために、NLM （ Noisy LM ）と名付けられた新しい事前トレーニングタスクも提案します。 私たちは、元のデータセットと対立的なスペルミステストセットの両方で、質問の回答、シーケンスラベル付け、およびテキスト分類タスクに関する方法を評価します。 実験結果は、当社の方法がPLMの性能と堅牢性を同時に大幅に向上させることができることを示しています。', 'hi': 'अधिकांश पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल (पीएलएम) बाइट-पेयर एन्कोडिंग (बीपीई) या इसकी विविधताओं के साथ सबवर्ड स्तर पर शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व का निर्माण करते हैं, जिसके द्वारा ओओवी (आउट-ऑफ-वोकैब) शब्द लगभग परिहार्य होते हैं। हालांकि, वे विधियां एक शब्द को सबवर्ड इकाइयों में विभाजित करती हैं और प्रतिनिधित्व को अपूर्ण और नाजुक बनाती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम इन समस्याओं से निपटने के लिए पिछले तरीकों (जैसे BERT, RoBERTa) पर सुधार करने वाले CharBERT नामक एक चरित्र-जागरूक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम पहले अनुक्रमिक चरित्र प्रतिनिधित्व से प्रत्येक टोकन के लिए प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग का निर्माण करते हैं, फिर एक उपन्यास विषम इंटरैक्शन मॉड्यूल द्वारा वर्णों के प्रतिनिधित्व और सबवर्ड प्रतिनिधित्व को फ्यूज करते हैं। हम असुरक्षित चरित्र प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एनएलएम (शोर एलएम) नामक एक नए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण कार्य का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम मूल डेटासेट और प्रतिकूल गलत वर्तनी परीक्षण सेट दोनों पर प्रश्न उत्तर, अनुक्रम लेबलिंग और पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर हमारी विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि एक साथ पीएलएम के प्रदर्शन और मजबूती में काफी सुधार कर सकती है।', 'ru': 'Большинство предварительно обученных языковых моделей (PLMS) строят представления слов на уровне подслова с помощью кодирования пары байтов (BPE) или его вариаций, с помощью которых слова OOV (out-of-vocab) практически можно избежать. Тем не менее, эти методы разделяют слово на подфразные единицы и делают представление неполным и хрупким. В этой статье мы предлагаем заранее обученную модель языка, основанную на знаке, под названием CharBERT, улучшающую предыдущие методы (такие как BERT, RoBERTa) для решения этих проблем. Сначала мы создаем контекстное встраивание слов для каждого токена из последовательных представлений символов, затем сливаем представления символов и представления подслова с помощью нового модуля гетерогенного взаимодействия. Мы также предлагаем новую задачу предварительного обучения под названием NLM (Noisy LM) для неконтролируемого обучения представлению персонажей. Мы оцениваем наш метод по ответам на вопросы, маркировке последовательностей и задачам классификации текста, как на исходных наборах данных, так и на наборах тестов сопернической орфографии. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод может значительно улучшить производительность и устойчивость PLMS одновременно.', 'zh': '多预训语言(PLM)用字节于编码(BPE)、其变体于子词级为单词,以此单词之,OOV(声外)单词几可免也。 拆单词为子词单元,示不完脆。 于本文中,发CharBERT字符感知预训习言语模样,当模进前法(如BERTRoBERTa)以决之。 先以次字符为标构上下文词嵌,然后因新异构交互模块融合子词。 又有NLM(Noisy LM)新预训练任务,以无监字符为学。 余于原始数据集与对抗性拼写错误试集上评问答、序列标记、文本分类之法。 实验结果表明者,所以著PLM性鲁棒性也。', 'ga': 'Tógann an chuid is mó de shamhlacha teanga réamhoilte (PLManna) léiriúcháin focal ag leibhéal fofhocail le hIonchódú Byte-Pair (BPE) nó a éagsúlachtaí, trína mbíonn focail OOV (as-foclóir) beagnach inseachanta. Mar sin féin, scoilteann na modhanna sin focal ina aonaid fofhocail agus déanann siad an léiriú neamhiomlán agus leochaileach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla teanga réamh-oilte atá feasach ar charachtair darb ainm CharBERT a chuireann feabhas ar na modhanna roimhe seo (ar nós BERT, RoBERTa) chun dul i ngleic leo seo. fadhbanna. Tógaimid ar dtús an leabú focal comhthéacsúil do gach comhartha ó na huiríll carachtair seicheamhach, ansin comhleáimid léiriúcháin na gcarachtar agus na huiríll fofhocail trí mhodúl idirghníomhaíochta ilchineálach úrscéal. Molaimid freisin tasc réamh-oiliúna nua darb ainm NLM (Noisy LM) le haghaidh foghlaim ionadaíochta carachtar gan mhaoirseacht. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár modh ar fhreagraí ceisteanna, lipéadú seichimh, agus tascanna aicmithe téacs, ar na tacair shonraí bunaidh agus ar thacair thástálacha sáraíochta mílitrithe araon. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir lenár modh feabhas suntasach a chur ar fheidhmíocht agus ar stóinseacht PLManna ag an am céanna.', 'ka': 'ყველაზე უფრო მეტად განსწავლებული ენის მოდელები (PLMs) კონტრუქტურაცია სიტყვების გამოსახულებების სუბსიტყვების სიტყვების დონეში, რომელიც ბაიტე- პერი კოდირება (BPE) ან მისი გარიაციები, რო მაგრამ, ეს მეტები გაყოფილი სიტყვას სუბსიტყვანის ერთეულებში და გავაკეთეთ სამყარო და კრებილური გამოყენება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მოვეხსენებთ სიმბოლოების წინაღალდებული ენის მოდელი, რომელსაც BERT, RoBERTa, ამ პრობლემების გასაკეთება. ჩვენ პირველად კონტექსტური სიტყვა, რომელიც ყოველ სიტყვას სკენექსტური სიტყვას გამოყენებული სიტყვანის გამოყენებაზე, და შემდეგ სიტყვანის გამოყენებების და სკენექსიტყვანის გამოყ ჩვენ ასევე შეგიძლიათ ახალი პრეტექტირება დავასწავლოთ, რომელიც NLM (Noisy LM) სახელის სახელის სახელის სახელის სახელის შესწავლობა. ჩვენ ჩვენი მეთოდის შესახებ კითხვების შესახებ, წერტილებების შესახებ და ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალებების შესახებ, ორივე ორიგინალური მონაცემების შესახებ და განსახებ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მეთოდი შეუძლია მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო მეტად ახალგაზრდება PLMs-ის პროცემენტის და ძალიან', 'el': 'Τα περισσότερα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα γλωσσών (PLM) κατασκευάζουν αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων σε επίπεδο υπολέξεων με κωδικοποίηση ζεύγους Byte (BPE) ή τις παραλλαγές τους, με τις οποίες οι λέξεις εκτός λεξιλογίου είναι σχεδόν αποφεύγονται. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι μέθοδοι χωρίζουν μια λέξη σε μονάδες υπολέξεων και καθιστούν την αναπαράσταση ελλιπή και εύθραυστη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο με επίγνωση χαρακτήρων, το οποίο βελτιώνεται σε σχέση με τις προηγούμενες μεθόδους (όπως BERT, RoBERTa) για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προβλημάτων. Πρώτα κατασκευάζουμε τη λέξη που ενσωματώνει το πλαίσιο για κάθε σύμβολο από τις διαδοχικές αναπαραστάσεις χαρακτήρων, στη συνέχεια συγχωνεύουμε τις αναπαραστάσεις των χαρακτήρων και τις αναπαραστάσεις των υπολέξεων με μια νέα ενότητα ετερογενής αλληλεπίδρασης. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια νέα εργασία προεκπαίδευσης που ονομάζεται για την εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης χαρακτήρων χωρίς επίβλεψη. Αξιολογούμε τη μέθοδο μας σχετικά με την απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις, την επισήμανση ακολουθίας και τις εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένου, τόσο στα αρχικά σύνολα δεδομένων όσο και στα αντίθετα σύνολα δοκιμών ορθογραφίας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να βελτιώσει σημαντικά την απόδοση και την ανθεκτικότητα των PLM ταυτόχρονα.', 'lt': 'Dauguma iš anksto apmokytų kalbų modelių (PLM) gamina žodžių atspaudus žodžių paviršiuje su Byte-Pair kodavimu (BPE) arba jo variantais, pagal kuriuos beveik neįmanoma išvengti OOV žodžių. Tačiau šie metodai padalija žodį į subžodžių vienetus ir daro atstovavimą neišsamų ir trapų. Šiame dokumente siūlome pažymėtą iš anksto parengtą kalbos model į CharBERT, kuris pagerintų ankstesnius metodus (pvz., BERT, RoBERTa) šioms problemoms spręsti. Pirmiausia sukonstruojame kontekstinį žodį kiekvienam ženklui iš eilinių simbolių atvaizdų, tada sujungiame simbolių ir paražodžių atvaizdus nauju heterogeniniu sąveikos moduliu. Taip pat siūlome naują parengiamojo mokymo užduotį, pavadintą NLM (triukšmingas LM), kad nebūtų stebimas asmens atstovavimo mokymasis. Vertiname savo metodą atsakymo į klausimus, sekos ženklinimo ir teksto klasifikavimo užduočių atžvilgiu tiek originaliuose duomenų rinkiniuose, tiek priešingai neteisingai rašomuose bandymų rinkiniuose. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali gerokai pagerinti PLM veiksmingumą ir patikimumą tuo pačiu metu.', 'hu': 'A legtöbb előzetesen képzett nyelvi modell (PLM) szóreprezentációt készít alszó szinten bájtpáros kódolással (BPE) vagy annak variációival, amelyekkel az OOV (szókincsen kívüli) szavak szinte elkerülhetőek. Ezek a módszerek azonban alcsoportokra osztanak egy szót, és az ábrázolást hiányossá és törékennyé teszik. Ebben a tanulmányban egy CharBERT nevű, karaktertudatos, előképzett nyelvi modellt javasolunk, amely javítja a korábbi módszereket (például BERT, RoBERTa) a problémák kezelésére. Először az egyes tokenek kontextuális szóbeágyazását építjük fel a szekvenciális karakterek ábrázolásából, majd egy új heterogén interakciós modullal egyesítjük a karakterek és az alszó ábrázolását. Javasoljuk továbbá az NLM (Noisy LM) nevű új előképzési feladatot a felügyelet nélküli karakterképviseleti tanuláshoz. Módszerünket a kérdések megválaszolására, a szekvencia címkézésére és a szövegosztályozási feladatokra vonatkozóan értékeljük, mind az eredeti adatkészleteken, mind pedig az ellentétes helytelenírási tesztkészleteken. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jelentősen javíthatja a PLM teljesítményét és robusztusságát egyidejűleg.', 'it': "La maggior parte dei modelli linguistici pre-addestrati (PLM) costruisce rappresentazioni di parole a livello di sottoparola con codifica Byte-Pair (BPE) o le sue variazioni, con cui le parole OOV (out-of-vocab) sono quasi evitabili. Tuttavia, questi metodi dividono una parola in unità di sottoparola e rendono la rappresentazione incompleta e fragile. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello linguistico pre-addestrato CharBERT che migliora i metodi precedenti (come BERT, RoBERTa) per affrontare questi problemi. Costruiamo prima l'incorporazione contestuale di parole per ogni token partendo dalle rappresentazioni sequenziali dei caratteri, quindi fonderemo le rappresentazioni dei caratteri e le rappresentazioni delle sottoparole con un nuovo modulo di interazione eterogeneo. Proponiamo anche un nuovo compito di pre-formazione denominato NLM (Noisy LM) per l'apprendimento non supervisionato della rappresentazione dei personaggi. Valutiamo il nostro metodo sulle attività di risposta alle domande, etichettatura delle sequenze e classificazione del testo, sia sui set di dati originali che sui set di test di errore di ortografia avversaria. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro metodo può migliorare significativamente le prestazioni e la robustezza dei PLM contemporaneamente.", 'ms': 'Kebanyakan model bahasa terlatih (PLMs) membina perwakilan perkataan pada tahap subperkataan dengan Pengekodan Byte-Pair (BPE) atau variasinya, dengan mana perkataan OOV (luar-dari-vokal) hampir boleh dihindari. Namun, kaedah-kaedah tersebut membahagi satu perkataan kepada unit subkata dan membuat perwakilan tidak lengkap dan rapuh. In this paper, we propose a character-aware pre-trained language model named CharBERT improving on the previous methods (such as BERT, RoBERTa) to tackle these problems.  Kita pertama-tama bina perkataan kontekstual untuk setiap token dari perwakilan aksara urutan, kemudian gabungkan perwakilan aksara dan perwakilan subkata dengan modul interaksi heterogenus baru. Kami juga menyarankan tugas praselatihan baru bernama NLM (Noisy LM) untuk belajar mewakili aksara yang tidak diawasi. Kami menilai kaedah kami dalam menjawab soalan, label urutan, dan tugas klasifikasi teks, kedua-dua pada set data asal dan set ujian salah ejaan musuh. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita boleh meningkatkan prestasi dan kepekatan PLM secara konsisten.', 'kk': 'Байт- пар кодтамасы (BPE) немесе оның айнымалылығының көпшілігі тіл үлгілері (PLMs) сөздерді субсөздің деңгейінде құру үшін OOV (сөздері жоқ) сөздерінің сөздері барлығы мүмкін емес. Бірақ бұл әдістер сөзді ішкі сөздер бірлігіне бөліп, келтірілімін толық және бұзылмайды. Бұл қағазда, CharBERT деп аталатын таңбалардың алдыңғы тіл үлгісін (BERT, RoBERTa секілді) өзінің мәселелерді шешу үшін таңбалардың алдыңғы әдістерін жақсарту үшін қолданамыз. Біз біріншіден келесі таңбалардың таңбаларынан әрбір таңбалар үшін контекстуалды сөзді құрамыз, содан кейін таңбалардың таңбаларын және суб сөздерді романдық гетерогендық интерфейс модулінен біріктір Сонымен қатар, NLM (Noisy LM) деген жаңа алдын- оқыту тапсырмасын қолданып тастаймыз. Біз сұрақ жауап беру, реттеу жарлығы және мәтін шектеу тапсырмаларын, бастапқы деректер жиындарында және қарсы мәтін тексеру жиындарында тексереміз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер бірден PLMs жұмысын және құндылығын өзгертуге болады дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മുമ്പുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d (പിഎല്\u200dഎസ്) ബൈറ്റ്- പേയിര്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ (BPE) അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അതിന്\u200dറെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപവാ എങ്കിലും ആ രീതികള്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് സബ്വോര്\u200dഡ് യൂണിറ്റിലേക്ക് പിരിയുകയും, പ്രതിനിധിയെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുകയും ചെയ In this paper, we propose a character-aware pre-trained language model named CharBERT improving on the previous methods (such as BERT, RoBERTa) to tackle these problems.  ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ഓരോ അടയാളം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ പിന്നീട് പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളും ന സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പഠനത്തിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന പണിയും പ്രൊദ്ദ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സെക് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പിഎല്\u200dഎസിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിനും റോബസ്റ്റിസ്റ്റി', 'mk': 'Повеќето предобучени јазички модели (PLMs) конструираат претставувања на зборови на ниво на подзборови со кодирање на бајт пар (BPE) или нејзините варијации, со кои зборовите OOV (надвор од глас) се речиси избегнувачки. Сепак, овие методи разделуваат збор во подзборни единици и го прават претставувањето нецелосно и кревко. In this paper, we propose a character-aware pre-trained language model named CharBERT improving on the previous methods (such as BERT, RoBERTa) to tackle these problems.  Прво го конструираме контекстуалниот збор вграден за секој знак од секвенцијалните претставувања на знаците, потоа ги спојуваме претставувањата на знаците и подзборовите претставувања со нов хетерогенски модул на интеракција. Ние, исто така, предложуваме нова предобукова задача наречена НЛМ (Noisy LM) за ненадгледувано учење за претставување на карактерите. Го проценуваме нашиот метод за одговори на прашања, етикетирање на секвенца и задачи за класификација на текст, како на оригиналните датотеки, така и на противните грешни тестови. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод може значително да ја подобри перформансата и силноста на ПЛМ истовремено.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх сургалтын хэл загварууд (ПЛМ) Байт-Pair Encoding (BPE) эсвэл түүний өөрчлөлт дээр үг илэрхийллийг бүтээж байдаг. Гэвч эдгээр арга нь нэг үгийг суб үгийг нэгжүүд болгож, илэрхийллийг бүтээгдэхүүн болон эвдэмжгүй болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CharBERT гэдэг хэлний өмнөх аргыг сайжруулахын тулд харьцааны ухаантай хэлний загварыг санал болгож байна. Эхлээд бид дараагийн дүрслэл бүрийн тодорхойлолтын тусламжтай үг бүрийг бүтээж, дараа нь дүрслэлүүдийн илэрхийлэл болон дотоод үг бүрийг шинэ гетероген харилцааны модуль бий болгодог. Мөн бид NLM (Noisy LM) гэдэг нэртэй шинэ урд суралцах ажил санал болгож байна. Бид асуултын хариулт, дарааллын маркинг, мөн текст хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг эхний өгөгдлийн сангууд болон эсрэг бичлэгийн буруу бичлэгийн туршилт дээр үнэлдэг. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь ПЛМ-ын үйл ажиллагаа, хүчтэй байдлыг хамгийн чухал сайжруулж чадна.', 'mt': "Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel (PLMs) jibnu rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem fil-livell ta’ sottokliem b’Kodifikazzjoni Byte-Pair (BPE) jew il-varjazzjonijiet tagħha, li bihom il-kliem OOV (barra mill-vokabb) kważi jistgħu jiġu evitati. Madankollu, dawk il-metodi jaqsmu kelma f’unitajiet ta’ subkelma u jagħmlu r-rappreżentanza inkompleta u fraġli. In this paper, we propose a character-aware pre-trained language model named CharBERT improving on the previous methods (such as BERT, RoBERTa) to tackle these problems.  Aħna l-ewwel nibnu l-kelma kuntestwali li tinkorpora għal kull token mir-rappreżentazzjonijiet sekwenzjali tal-karattri, imbagħad inħalltu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-karattri u r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-subkelma permezz ta’ modulu ġdid ta’ interazzjoni eteroġenea. Aħna nipproponu wkoll kompitu ġdid ta' qabel it-taħriġ imsejjaħ NLM (Noisy LM) għat-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza tal-karattri mhux sorveljat. Aħna jevalwaw il-metodu tagħna dwar it-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet, it-tikkettar tas-sekwenzi, u l-kompiti tal-klassifikazzjoni tat-test, kemm fuq is-settijiet tad-dejta oriġinali kif ukoll fuq settijiet tat-test bil-miktub ħażin avversarju. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jista’ jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni u r-robustezza tal-PLMs fl-istess ħin.", 'pl': 'Większość wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych (PLM) konstruuje reprezentacje słów na poziomie podsłów z kodowaniem bajtowym (BPE) lub jego wariantami, dzięki którym słowa OOV (poza słownictwem) są prawie uniknięte. Jednak metody te dzielą słowo na jednostki podsłów i sprawiają, że reprezentacja jest niekompletna i krucha. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wstępnie przeszkolony model języka CharBERT, który ulepsza poprzednie metody (takie jak BERT, RoBERTa) w celu rozwiązania tych problemów. Najpierw konstruujemy kontekstowe osadzenie słów dla każdego tokenu z sekwencyjnych reprezentacji znaków, a następnie łączymy reprezentacje znaków i reprezentacje podsłów przez nowy, heterogeniczny moduł interakcji. Proponujemy również nowe zadanie przedszkoleniowe o nazwie NLM (Noisy LM) do nauki reprezentacji postaci bez nadzoru. Oceniamy naszą metodę dotyczącą odpowiedzi na pytania, etykietowania sekwencji i klasyfikacji tekstu, zarówno na oryginalnych zbiorach danych, jak i zestawach testowych błędów pisowni. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda może znacznie poprawić wydajność i solidność PLM jednocześnie.', 'sr': 'Većina predobučenih jezičkih modela (PLMs) konstruiraju predstave riječi na nivou podriječi sa kodiranjem Byte-Pair (BPE) ili njegovim varijacijama, zbog kojih se riječi OOV (izvan zvuka) skoro izbjegavaju. Međutim, te metode podele riječ u podriječje jedinice i čine zastupanje nepotpunom i krhkom. U ovom papiru predlažemo predobučeni jezički model koji se zove CharBERT poboljšavajući prethodne metode (kao što je BERT, RoBERTa) da riješimo te probleme. Prvo izgradimo kontekstualnu reč koja se uključuje za svaki znak iz sekvencijalnih predstavljanja karaktera, a zatim spasimo predstavljanja karaktera i podriječja predstavljanja novom heterogenetskom modulu interakcije. Takoðe predlažemo novi predobuku po imenu NLM (Noisy LM) za učenje neodređenog predstavljanja karaktera. Procjenjujemo našu metodu odgovarajući na pitanje, etiketiranje sekvencija, i zadatak klasifikacije teksta, i na originalnim setima podataka i neprijateljskim setima pogrešnog pisanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod može znatno poboljšati izvršnost i robustnost PLMs-a istovremeno.', 'ro': 'Cele mai multe modele lingvistice pre-instruite (PLM) construiesc reprezentări de cuvinte la nivel de subcuvânt cu codificare Byte-Pair (BPE) sau variațiile sale, prin care cuvintele OOV (out-of-vocab) sunt aproape evitabile. Cu toate acestea, aceste metode împart un cuvânt în unități de subcuvinte și fac reprezentarea incompletă și fragilă. În această lucrare, propunem un model lingvistic pre-instruit conștient de caracter numit CharBERT care îmbunătățește metodele anterioare (cum ar fi BERT, RoBERTa) pentru a aborda aceste probleme. Mai întâi construim încorporarea contextuală a cuvântului pentru fiecare token din reprezentările secvențiale ale caracterelor, apoi fuzionăm reprezentările caracterelor și reprezentările subcuvântului printr-un nou modul de interacțiune eterogen. De asemenea, propunem o nouă sarcină de pre-formare numită NLM (Noisy LM) pentru învățarea nesupravegheată a reprezentării personajelor. Evaluăm metoda noastră în ceea ce privește răspunsul la întrebări, etichetarea secvențelor și clasificarea textelor, atât pe seturile de date originale, cât și pe seturile de teste de ortografie greșită adversară. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră poate îmbunătăți semnificativ performanța și robustețea PLM-urilor simultan.', 'no': 'Dei fleste først trengte språk- modeller (PLMs) konstruerer ordrepresentasjonar på underordnivå med byte- Pair- koding (BPE) eller variasjonane, med dei som byte- Pair- koding (BPE) er nesten unngåande. Desse metodane deler likevel eit ord i underordeiningar og gjør representasjonen ikkje fullstendig og fragile. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit føretrained språk- modell med teikn som CharBERT, forbedring på dei førre metodane (som BERT, RoBERTa) for å løysa desse problemene. Vi konstruerer først den kontekstære ordet som innebygger for kvar teikn frå dei følgjande teiknstillingane, og så fysser representasjonane av teikn og underordrepresentasjonane av eit roman heterogenesk interaksjonsmodul. Vi foreslår også eit nytt føreøvingsoppgåve med namn NLM (Noisy LM) for å læra ikkje oppretta teikn. Vi evaluerer metoden vårt om svar på spørsmål, sekvensetiketting og tekstklassifikasjonar, både på opprinnelige datasett og negativ feilstavingstestar. Eksperimentale resultatene viser at metoden vårt kan betydelig forbedra utviklinga og kraftigheten av PLMs samtidig.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් (PlMs) වචන ප්\u200dරතිරූපය බායිට්-පායර් සංකේතනය (BPE) නැත්තම් එයාගේ වෙනස් වලින් සඳහා වචන ප්\u200dරතිරූපය සි ඒත් ඒ විදියට වචනයක් සබ්වර්ඩ් යුනිට් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න ප මේ පත්තරයේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා චාර්බෙර්ට් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිගන්න. අපි මුලින්ම සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් හැම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ව අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරනවා NLM (Noisey LM) කියලා නම් අළුත් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කාර්යයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය, ක්\u200dරමය ලේබිල් එක සහ පාළු විශේෂණ වැඩක් ගැන අපේ විධානය විශ්වාස කරනවා, ප්\u200dරධාන දත් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය විශේෂයෙන් පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ප', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் (PLMs) பைட்- பேர் குறியீடு (BPE) அல்லது அதன் மாறிகளை துணை சொல் மட்டத்தில் வார்த்தை குறியீடுகளை உருவாக்குகிறது, அதில் O ஆனால், அந்த முறைகள் ஒரு வார்த்தையை துணை வார்த்தை அலகுகளாக பிரித்து குறிப்பிடும் முழுமையாக மற்றும் ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சார்பெர்ட் பெயர் முன்பு பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி முறைமையை முன்னோக்கும் முறைமைகளில் மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு (பிERT, ரா We first construct the contextual word embedding for each token from the sequential character representations, then fuse the representations of characters and the subword representations by a novel heterogeneous interaction module.  பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத எழுத்து பிரதிநிதிப்பு கற்றத்திற்கு நாம் புதிய பயிற்சி முன் பணியைத் திருந்துகிறோம். நாம் கேள்வி பதில், வரிசையில் உள்ள அட்டவணையை மற்றும் உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் பணிகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், மூல தரவுத்தளங்களில் இருந்தும் எதிர் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது பிஎல்எம்ஸின் செயல்முறையையும் மேம்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'sv': 'De flesta pre-trained language models (PLM) konstruerar ordrepresentationer på underordsnivå med Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) eller dess variationer, genom vilka OOV (out-of-vokab) ord nästan kan undvikas. Dessa metoder delar dock upp ett ord i underordsenheter och gör representationen ofullständig och ömtålig. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en karaktärsmedveten förklädd språkmodell vid namn CharBERT som förbättrar de tidigare metoderna (såsom BERT, RoBERTa) för att hantera dessa problem. Först konstruerar vi den kontextuella ordinbäddningen för varje token från sekventiella teckensnittsrepresentationer, sedan fusionerar vi representationerna av tecken och underordsrepresentationer med en ny heterogen interaktionsmodul. Vi föreslår också en ny pre-training uppgift kallad NLM (Noisy LM) för oövervakad karaktärsrepresentation lärande. Vi utvärderar vår metod på frågesvarsuppgifter, sekvensmärkning och textklassificering, både på originaldatauppsättningar och kontradiktoriska felstavningstestuppsättningar. De experimentella resultaten visar att vår metod avsevärt kan förbättra prestanda och robusthet hos PLM samtidigt.', 'so': "Tilmaamaha luuqada ee ugu badan ee la tababaray (PLMs) waxay dhisaan hadal ka mid ah heerka hoose-word ee ay ku qoran qoraalka koordinta BPE (BPE) ama beddelkeeda, kuwaas oo ay ku qoran OOV (out-of-vocab) oo aan u dhowaan laga jeedin. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababkaas ereygu waxay u kala qeybiyaan qeybaha hoose-hadalka, waxayna ka dhigaan mid aan dhamaan oo burburin. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model afka hore oo aqoon leh oo la tababaray oo la magacaabay CharBERT oo ku horumarinaya qaababka hore (tusaale ahaan BERT, RoBERTA) si aan u tacliino dhibaatadan. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu dhisnaa hadalka joogtada ah oo ku qoran calaamad kasta oo ka soo jeeda xarafta dabadeed, kadibna waxaynu fududaynaa aragtida xarafta iyo qoraalka hoose ee noocyada isku xiriirka ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa shaqo cusub oo la magacaabay NLM (Noisy LM) in lagu barto waxbarashada aqoonta la ilaaliyo. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababka ku saabsan jawaabta su'aalaha, bandhigyada xilliga, iyo shaqooyinka fasaxa qoraalka, labada kooban macluumaadka asalka ah iyo koobaha imtixaanka khaladda ka geesta ah. Imtixaanka waxaa tusi kara in qaabkanagu aad iyo aad u hagaajin karo sameynta PLMs.", 'ur': 'زیادہ پیش آموزش کی زبان مدلز (PLMs) بات کی نمونش سابٹ ورڈ سطح کے ساتھ (BPE) یا اس کی تغییرات کے ساتھ بناتے ہیں، جس سے OOV (غیر آواز) کلمات تقریباً منع کئے جاتے ہیں. لیکن یہ طریقے ایک کلمہ زیر کلمہ یونیٹوں میں تقسیم کرتے ہیں اور نمایش ناکام اور شکستہ بناتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک شخص جانتے ہوئے پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کو پیش آموزش دیتے ہیں چارBERT کے نام سے پہلے طریقے پر (جیسے BERT, RoBERTa) ان مشکلوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم پہلی بار ہر ٹیکن کے لئے پیدا ہوا متوسط کلام بناتے ہیں، پھر پیدا ہوتے ہیں، اور پیدا ہوتے ہیں، اور پیدا ہوتے ہیں، ایک نوم متوسط متوسط موڈیل کے ذریعہ، اور سوب کلام کی نمایش. ہم نے بھی ایک نوی پیش آموزش کا کام پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جس کا نام NLM (Noisy LM) ہے، ناپاکیزہ شخصت کی تعلیم کے لئے۔ ہم سوال جواب دینے کے بارے میں اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، سطح لیبلینگ کے بارے میں، اور ٹیکسٹ کلیسی ٹیکسٹ کے بارے میں، دونوں اصلی ڈیٹ سٹ اور مخالف غلط لیبلینگ ٹیسٹ کے بارے میں. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ ایک دفعہ سے PLMs کی عملکرد اور قوت کو بہتر کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu usullar so'zni tub soʻzning bir necha bo'lgan va taqdimni toʻxtatish va qizil qiladi. Bu qogʻozda biz bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun CharBERT (BERT, RoBERTA) deb nomlangan bir taʼminlovchi tildan oldin foydalanuvchi modelini rivojlanishimizni talab qilamiz. Birinchi so'zni keyingi harfning xususiyatlaridan birinchi harfni yaratib, keyin harflarning xususiyatlarini va tub soʻzning xususiyatlarini qoʻyish. Joriy harfning boshqa interaction moduli tomonidan foydalanish. Biz qo'llanmagan belgilarni tahrirlash uchun NLM (Noisy LM) nomli yangi vazifa rivojlanamiz. @ info Tasavvur natijalari esa bizning metodimiz PLMs tashkilotlarini o'zgartirib oshirishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Hầu hết các mô hình ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện trước (PLM) xây dựng các biểu tượng chữ ở mức chữ ngầm với Bảng mã byte-pair (BPE) hoặc các biến đổi của nó, theo cách mà từ OOOV (ngoài dạng từ) hầu như có thể tránh được. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp này chia một từ ra thành đơn vị chữ phụ và làm cho vai diễn đầy đủ và dễ vỡ. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình đã được giáo dục có tính cách tên CharBERT cải tiến các phương pháp trước (như BERT, Roerbta) để giải quyết những vấn đề này. Đầu tiên chúng ta xây dựng sự nhúng chữ ngữ định cho mỗi biểu tượng từ các biểu tượng sắp xếp, sau đó kết hợp các biểu tượng của các ký tự và các biểu hiện dưới từ bằng một mô- đun khác nhau mới. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một nhiệm vụ huấn luyện mới tên là NLM (Noisy LM) để học đại diện nhân vật không giám sát. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp trả lời câu hỏi, hiệu ứng và các công việc phân loại văn bản, cả trên các tập tin dữ liệu gốc và các nhóm thử chữ sai. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể tăng hiệu quả và độ bền vững của các PLM cùng lúc.', 'nl': "De meeste voorgetrainde taalmodellen (PLM's) bouwen woordrepresentaties op subwoordniveau met Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) of zijn variaties, waardoor OOV (out-of-vocab) woorden bijna vermijdbaar zijn. Deze methoden splitsen echter een woord in subwoordeenheden en maken de weergave onvolledig en fragiel. In dit artikel stellen we een karakterbewust voorgetraind taalmodel voor, genaamd CharBERT, dat de vorige methoden (zoals BERT, RoBERTa) verbetert om deze problemen aan te pakken. We construeren eerst de contextuele woordinbedding voor elk token uit de sequentiële karakterrepresentaties, vervolgens fuseren de representaties van karakters en de subwoordrepresentaties door een nieuwe heterogene interactiemodule. We stellen ook een nieuwe pre-training taak voor met de naam NLM (Noisy LM) voor onbeheerde karakterrepresentatie leren. We evalueren onze methode op het beantwoorden van vragen, sequentie labeling en tekst classificatie taken, zowel op de originele datasets als op tegenstrijdige spelfouten testsets. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode tegelijkertijd de prestaties en robuustheid van PLM's aanzienlijk kan verbeteren.", 'da': "De fleste prætrænede sprogmodeller (PLM'er) konstruerer ordrepræsentationer på underordsniveau med Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) eller dens variationer, hvorved OOV (out-of-vocab) ord næsten kan undgås. Men disse metoder opdeler et ord i underordsenheder og gør repræsentationen ufuldstændig og skrøbelig. I denne artikel foreslår vi en karakterbevidst prætrænet sprogmodel ved navn CharBERT, der forbedrer de tidligere metoder (såsom BERT, RoBERTa) til at tackle disse problemer. Vi konstruerer først den kontekstuelle ordindlejring for hvert token ud fra de sekventielle tegn repræsentationer, og fusionerer derefter repræsentationerne af tegn og underordrepræsentationerne med et nyt heterogent interaktionsmodul. Vi foreslår også en ny præ-træningsopgave ved navn NLM (Noisy LM) til ikke-overvåget karakterrepræsentation læring. Vi evaluerer vores metode til spørgsmål besvarelse, sekvensmærkning og tekstklassifikationsopgaver, både på de oprindelige datasæt og kontradiktoriske stavefejl testsæt. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode kan forbedre ydeevnen og robustheden af PLM'er samtidig betydeligt.", 'hr': 'Većina predobučenih jezičkih modela (PLMs) konstruiraju predstave riječi na razini podriječja sa kodiranjem Byte-Pair (BPE) ili njegovim varijacijama, s kojima se riječi OOV (izvan zvuka) skoro izbjegavaju. Međutim, te metode podele riječ u podriječje jedinice i čine zastupanje nepotpunom i krhkom. U ovom papiru predlažemo predobučeni jezički model koji se zove CharBERT poboljšavajući prethodne metode (kao što je BERT, RoBERTa) kako bi se riješili ovim problemima. Prvo konstruiramo kontekstualnu riječ uključujući za svaki znak iz sekvencijalnih predstavljanja karaktera, zatim spasimo predstavljanja znakova i podriječja predstavljanja novom heterogenetskom modulu interakcije. Također predlažemo novi predobučeni zadatak po imenu NLM (Noisy LM) za učenje neodređenog predstavljanja karaktera. Procjenjujemo našu metodu odgovarajući na pitanje, označavanje sekvencije i zadatke klasifikacije teksta, kako na originalnim setima podataka, tako i na neprijateljskim setima pogrešnog pisanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod može značajno poboljšati učinkovitost i snagu PLMsa istovremeno.', 'bg': 'Повечето предварително обучени езикови модели (ПЛМ) изграждат думи на ниво поддума с байтово кодиране (БПЕ) или неговите вариации, чрез които думите са почти избегнати. Тези методи обаче разделят една дума на подсловни единици и правят представянето непълно и крехко. В настоящата статия предлагаме предварително обучен езиков модел, който да подобри предишните методи (като например BERT, RoBERTa) за справяне с тези проблеми. Първо конструираме контекстуалната дума вградена за всеки символ от последователните символни представи, след което сливаме представителствата на символите и поддумите чрез нов хетерогенен модул за взаимодействие. Предлагаме и нова предобучителна задача, наречена НЛМ (Шумна ЛМ) за обучение без надзор по представяне на герои. Ние оценяваме метода си за отговаряне на въпроси, етикетиране на последователността и класификация на текста, както на оригиналните набори от данни, така и на контролните тестове за грешка при изписване. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни може значително да подобри производителността и здравината на ПЛМ едновременно.', 'de': 'Die meisten vortrainierten Sprachmodelle (PLMs) konstruieren Wortdarstellungen auf Unterwortebene mit Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) oder deren Variationen, wodurch OOV (Out-of-Vocab) Wörter fast vermeidbar sind. Allerdings teilen diese Methoden ein Wort in Unterworteinheiten auf und machen die Darstellung unvollständig und fragil. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein charakterbewusstes vortrainiertes Sprachmodell namens CharBERT vor, das die bisherigen Methoden (wie BERT, RoBERTa) verbessert, um diese Probleme anzugehen. Zunächst konstruieren wir die kontextuelle Worteinbettung für jedes Token aus den sequentiellen Zeichendarstellungen, dann verschmelzen die Darstellungen von Zeichen und die Unterwortdarstellungen durch ein neuartiges heterogenes Interaktionsmodul. Wir schlagen auch eine neue Vorbereitungsaufgabe namens NLM (Noisy LM) für unbeaufsichtigtes Lernen der Charakterdarstellung vor. Wir evaluieren unsere Methode zu Fragebeantworter, Sequenz-Beschriftung und Textklassifikationsaufgaben, sowohl auf den Originaldatensätzen als auch auf den Testsätzen für kontroverse Rechtschreibfehler. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode die Leistung und Robustheit von PLMs gleichzeitig signifikant verbessern kann.', 'ko': '대부분의 미리 훈련된 언어모델(PLM)은 하위 단어 단계에서 바이트 인코딩(BPE)이나 변체 구조어를 사용하는데 이런 인코딩을 통해 OOV(out-of-vocab) 단어를 거의 피할 수 있다.그러나 이러한 방법은 한 단어를 하위 단어 단원으로 나누어 완전하지 않고 취약함을 나타낸다.본고에서 우리는 문자 감지의 예비 훈련 언어 모델인CharBERT를 제시했는데 이것은 이전의 방법(예를 들어 BERT, RoBERTA)을 개선하여 이런 문제들을 해결했다.우리는 먼저 서열 문자 표시에서 각 표기된 상하문 단어를 구성한 다음에 새로운 이구적 상호작용 모듈을 통해 문자 표시와 하위 단어 표시를 융합시킨다.우리는 감독이 없는 문자 표징 학습에 사용되는 새로운 훈련 전 임무인 NLM(Noised LM)도 제시했다.우리는 원시 데이터 집합과 맞춤법 오류 테스트 집합에서 문답, 서열 표기, 텍스트 분류 작업의 방법을 평가했다.실험 결과, 이 방법은 PLMs의 성능과 노봉성을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan model bahasa terlatih (PLMs) membangun representation kata di tingkat subword dengan Kodifikasi Byte-Pair (BPE) atau variasinya, dengan mana kata OOV (keluar dari suara) hampir dapat dihindari. Namun, metode-metode tersebut membagi satu kata ke unit subword dan membuat representation tidak lengkap dan rapuh. In this paper, we propose a character-aware pre-trained language model named CharBERT improving on the previous methods (such as BERT, RoBERTa) to tackle these problems.  Pertama kita membangun kata kontekstual untuk setiap token dari persendirian representation karakter, kemudian menggabungkan representation karakter dan representation subkata dengan modul interaksi heterogenus baru. Kami juga mengusulkan tugas prapelatihan baru bernama NLM (Noisy LM) untuk mempelajari representation karakter yang tidak diawasi. Kami mengevaluasi metode kami dalam menjawab pertanyaan, label urutan, dan tugas klasifikasi teks, kedua-duanya pada set data asli dan set tes yang salah tulis musuh. The experimental results show that our method can significantly improve the performance and robustness of PLMs simultaneously.', 'fa': 'بیشترین مدل\u200cهای زبانی پیش آموزش (PLMs) نمایش\u200cهای کلمه در سطح زیر کلمه با رمزبندی بایت-Pair (BPE) یا تغییرات آن ساخته می\u200cشوند، که به وسیله آن کلمه\u200cهای OOV (خارج از زبان) تقریباً قابل جلوگیری می\u200cشوند. ولی این روش\u200cها یک کلمه را به واحدهای زیر کلمه تقسیم می\u200cکنند و نمایش کامل و شکسته می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل پیش از آموزش زبانی را به عنوان CharBERT پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر روش\u200cهای قبلی (مثل BERT، RoBERTa) بهتر شود تا این مشکلات را حل کند. اولین بار کلمه متوسط را برای هر نشانه\u200cای از نمایش\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cهای بعدی ساختیم، سپس نمایش\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cها و نمایش\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cها را توسط یک مولد تفاوت\u200cهای متوسط\u200cگرایی نوم جمع کنیم. ما همچنین یک کار پیش آموزش جدید به نام NLM (Noisy LM) برای یادگیری نمایش شخصیت غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما روش خودمون رو در مورد جواب سوال، برچسب\u200cبندی\u200cهای رده\u200cبندی، و وظیفه\u200cهای فرقه\u200cبندی متن ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، هر دو در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای اصلی و مجموعه\u200cهای آزمایش اشتباه\u200cنوشتن مخالف. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که روش ما می تواند عملکرد و استعداد PLMs را به طور کلی بهتر کند.', 'af': "Die mees voorafgeleerde taal modele (PLMs) konstrukteer woord voorstellings by subwoord vlak met Byte-Pair Enkodering (BPE) of sy veranderinge, deur waarmee OOV (uit-vocab) woorde amper uitvaarbaar word. Maar daardie metodes het 'n woord in subwoord eenhede verdeel en die voorstelling onvolledige en kragtige gemaak. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n karakterbewyse taal model genaamd CharBERT wat op die vorige metodes (soos BERT, RoBERTa) verbeter word om hierdie probleme te hanteer. Ons konstrukteer eerste die contextual woord wat vir elke teken ingesluit is van die sekwensiele karakter voorstellings, dan verfuseer die voorstellings van karakters en die subwoord voorstellings deur 'n roman heterogeneese interaksie module. Ons beveel ook 'n nuwe voor-onderwerp taak genaamd NLM (Noisy LM) vir onveronderwerp karakter-voorwerp onderwerp. Ons evalueer ons metode op vraag antwoord, volgorde etiketting en teks klassifikasie taak, beide op die oorspronklike datastelle en teenwoordige misspeling toets stelle. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons metode betekenlik die prestasie en kragtigheid van PLMs kan verbeter.", 'tr': 'Iň köp öňden eğlenen dil modelleri (PLMs) Byte-Par Ködleme (BPE) ýa-da onuň üýtgeşmeleri bilen söz düzümlerni ýygnaýarlar. Olaryň ýaly OOV (sessiz däldir) sözleri golaýlaýar. Ama bu yöntemler bir kelime apar kelime birimlere bölünerek, temsilleri tam ve kırıklık yaparlar. Bu kagyzda CharBERT diýip atlandyrylan atly nusgasyny öňki täzeliklerde gelişmek üçin (mesele BERT, RoBERTa ýaly) teklip berýäris. Ilkinji gezek her token üçin sıralan karakterleriň täzeliklerinden, soňra karakterleriň täzeliklerini we sübsözüň täzeliklerini bir roman heterogenen täzelikleri bilen birleştir. Biz hem NLM (Noisy LM) adlı täze öwrenmek üçin täze öňünden öwrenmek täze bir täze öwrenmek täze bir täze teklip teklip etdik. Biz sorag jogaplary, sıralama etiketlerinde we metin klasifikasynda çykyş edýän yönümizi hem başlangyç datasetlerde hem täsirli ýalňyş ymla testinde deňleýäris Deneymeli netijeler biziň metodamyzyň PLMsiň etkinlik we güýçligini bir gezek gowurap biljekdigini görkeýär.', 'sq': 'Shumica e modeleve të gjuhës së paratrajnuar (PLMs) ndërtojnë përfaqësime fjalësh në nivelin e nënfjalëve me Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) apo variacionet e saj, me të cilat fjalët OOV (jashtë zërit) janë pothuajse të shmangshme. Megjithatë, këto metoda ndajnë një fjalë në njësi nënfjalësh dhe e bëjnë përfaqësimin jo të plotë dhe të brishtë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një model gjuhësh të trajnuar në mënyrë të vetëdijshme për karakter të quajtur CharBERT duke përmirësuar metodat e mëparshme (të tilla si BERT, RoBERTa) për të trajtuar këto probleme. Ne së pari ndërtojmë fjalën kontekstuale të përfshirë për çdo shenjë nga përfaqësimet sekuenciale të karaktereve, pastaj bashkojmë përfaqësimet e karaktereve dhe përfaqësimet e nënfjalëve nga një modul i ri heterogjenë ndërveprimi. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një detyrë të re parastërvitëse të quajtur NLM (Noisy LM) për mësimin e përfaqësimit të karakterit të pazgjidhur. Ne vlerësojmë metodën tonë për përgjigjen e pyetjeve, etiketën e sekuencës dhe detyrat e klasifikimit të tekstit, si në grupet origjinale të të dhënave dhe grupet e testit kundërshtarë të gabuara. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë mund të përmirësojë ndjeshëm performancën dhe forcën e PLM-ve në të njëjtën kohë.', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների մեծամասնությունը (PLM) բառերի ներկայացումներ կառուցում է ենթաբառերի մակարդակում բայտի-զույգ կոդավորման (BP) կամ դրա տարբերությունների միջոցով, որոնց միջոցով OOO բառերը գրեթե խուսափելի են: However, those methods split a word into subword units and make the representation incomplete and fragile. Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հերոսներով գիտակցած նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդել, որը կոչվում է Շարբերթ, որը բարելավում է նախորդ մեթոդները (ինչպիսիք են Բերթ, Ռոբերթ) այս խնդիրների լուծման համար: Սկզբում մենք կառուցում ենք կոնտեքստալ բառը, որը ներառում է յուրաքանչյուր նշան հաջորդականների ներկայացումներից, հետո միացնում ենք նշանների ներկայացումները և ենթաբառերի ներկայացումները նոր հետերոգեն փոխազդեցության մոդուլների միջոցով: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք նոր նախապատրաստ խնդիր, որը կոչվում է ՆԼՄ (Noise LM) անվերահսկված կերպարների ներկայացման սովորելու համար: Մենք գնահատում ենք հարցերի պատասխանի մեթոդը, հաջորդականության պիտակումները և տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրները, ինչպես նաև սկզբնական տվյալների համակարգերի, ինչպես նաև հակառակ սխալ փորձարկումների համակարգերի վրա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը կարող է նշանակալի բարելավել PLM-ների արտադրողականությունը և կայունությունը միաժամանակ:', 'am': 'ብዙዎቹ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች (PLMs) ቃላት በቢይት-Pair የፊደል ኮድ (BPE) ወይም የተለየ ቃላት የOOV (out-of-vocab) ቃላት ሊራቁ ይችላል፡፡ እንግዲህ እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች ቃልን ለጥብቃዊ ተካውሎ እና መልዕክቱን ፍጹም እና ጥቁር ያደርጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ቀድሞ የተማረከ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ፣ CharBERT የተባለውን ቀድሞው ሥርዓት (እንደ BERT፣ ሮብERTA) እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመቀናቀል እናስባለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ ለሁሉም ምልክቶች የሚታየውን ቃላት እናስገራለን፡፡ እና NLM (Noisy LM) የተባለው አዲስ ትምህርት ትምህርት ለመማር አዲስ ትምህርት ትምህርት እናስጀራለን፡፡ የጥያቄን መልስ፣ የግንኙነት ደብዳቤ እና የጽሑፍ መግለጫ ስራዎችን በመጀመሪያው ዳታተሮች እና በተቃዋሚ ስህተት ስርዓት ላይ እናስተምር፡፡ የፈተናው ፍሬዎች የPLMs ፍላጎታቸውን በጊዜው በማድረግ ትክክል ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Ən çox öyrənmiş dil modelləri (PLMs) Bajt-Pair Kodlaması (BPE) və ya onun dəyişiklikləri ilə, OOV sözləri az qala uzaqlaşdırılabilir. Ancaq bu metodlar bir sözü apar sözlər birliklərinə bölüşdürər və göstəricisi tamamlayıb və parçalanır. Bu kağızda, CharBERT adlı əvvəlki metodlara (BERT, RoBERTa kimi) bu problemləri çəkmək üçün caracter-aware dil modeli təklif edirik. Biz ilk dəfə hər möcüzə üçün müxtəlif sözü inşa edirik, sonra şəkillərin və apa sözünü yeni bir heterogenen müxtəlif modulu ilə birləşdiririk. Biz də NLM (Noisy LM) adlı yeni təhsil öyrənmək üçün yeni təhsil işləri təklif edirik. Biz sual cavab vermək, sıralama etiketlənmək və metin klasifikasiyası işləri ilə, həmçinin özündəki veri qurğuları və düşmənçilik yanlış imzalama sınama qurğularını değerlendiririk. Müxtəlif sonuçlar, bizim metodumuz PLMs-lərin performansını və qüvvətini bir-birindən daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər.', 'sw': 'Mifano mingi ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla (PLMs) hujenga wakiwakilisha maneno katika kiwango cha chini cha maneno na Ujumbe wa Byte-Pair (BPE) au mabadiliko yake, ambapo maneno ya OOV (isiyo na maneno) yanakaribia kuepukana. Hata hivyo, mbinu hizo zinagawanya neno kuwa viungo vya upande wa maneno na kuifanya uwakilishi usio kamili na vibaya. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza muundo wa lugha inayofahamika na maarufu wa zamani unaoitwa CharBERT kuboresha katika njia zilizopita (kama vile BERT, RoBERT) ili kupambana na matatizo haya. Kwanza tunajenga neno la kawaida linaloingizwa kwa kila ishara kutoka kwa uwakilishi wa tabia za baadae, kisha kuvuruga maoni ya wahusika na uwakilishaji wa maneno ya chini kwa kutumia kifaa cha usambazaji wa riwaya. Pia tunapendekeza kazi mpya ya mafunzo yaliyoitwa NLM (Noisy LM) kwa ajili ya kuwakilisha wahusika usio na uhakika wa kujifunza. Tutathmini mbinu yetu kuhusu majibu ya maswali, maagizo ya mfululizo, na kazi za usambazaji wa maandishi, katika seti za asili za data na seti za vibaya. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kuboresha ufanisi na ubaguzi wa PLMs wakati huo.', 'ca': "La majoria dels models de llenguatge pré-entrenats (PLM) construeixen representacions de paraules a nivell subparaules amb codificació Byte-Pair (BPE) o les seves variacions, per la qual les paraules OOV (fora de vocació) són gairebé evitables. Però aquests mètodes divideixen una paraula en unitats de subparaules i fan que la representació sigui incompleta i fràgil. En aquest paper, proposem un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat que es diu CharBERT millorant els mètodes anteriors (com BERT, RoBERTa) per abordar aquests problemes. Primer construïm la paraula contextual incorporada per cada fitxa de les representacions seqüencials de caràcters, i després fusionem les representacions de caràcters i de subparaules per un módul d'interacció heterogenea nou. També proposem una nova tasca de pré-capacitació anomenada NLM (Noisy LM) per aprendre representació de caràcters no supervisada. Evaluam el nostre mètode en resposta a preguntes, etiquetar seqüències i tasques de classificació de textos, tant en els conjunts de dades originals com en els conjunts de provas adversaris equivocats. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode pot millorar significativament el rendiment i la robustet dels PLM simultàniament.", 'bn': 'পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল (পিএলএমএস) বাইটপেয়ার এনকোডিং (বিপেই) অথবা এর ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষায় শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণ করে, যেখানে ওওভি (বাইর-ভ তবে এই পদ্ধতিগুলো একটি শব্দটি সাবওয়ার্ড ইউনিটে বিভক্ত করে এবং প্রতিনিধিত্ব সম্পূর্ণ এবং ধ্বংস করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা চার্বেরেট নামের একটি অক্ষর-পরিচিত ভাষার মডেল প্রস্তাব করি পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতিতে এই সমস্যাগুলোর মুক্তির জন্য (যেমন বিরেট, রোব প্রথমে আমরা প্রত্যেকটি অক্ষরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব থেকে প্রত্যেকটি প্রতিটি প্রতিটি প্রতিটি প্রতিটি প্রতিটি প্রতিষ্ঠান তৈরি করি, তারপর অক্ষরের প্রতিনিধি সংরক্ষিত অক্ষরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষার জন্য আমরা এনএলএম (নোসি এলএম) নামের একটি নতুন প্রশিক্ষণের কাজ প্রস্তাব করি। প্রশ্নের উত্তর, সেকেন্ড লেবেল এবং টেক্সট ক্লাস্ফিকেশন কাজের ব্যাপারে আমরা আমাদের পদ্ধতি মূল্যায়ন করি, মূল ডাটাসেট এবং বিরোধী ভু পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি একই সাথে পিএলএমএসের প্রদর্শন এবং দুর্ঘটনার উন্নতি করতে পারে।', 'bs': 'Većina predobučenih jezičkih modela (PLMs) konstruiraju predstavljanja riječi na nivou podriječja sa kodiranjem Byte-Pair (BPE) ili njegovim varijacijom, zbog kojih se riječi OOV (izvan zvuka) skoro izbjegavaju. Međutim, te metode podele riječ u podriječje jedinice i čine zastupanje nepotpunom i krhkom. U ovom papiru predlažemo predobučeni jezički model koji se zove CharBERT poboljšavajući prethodne metode (kao što je BERT, RoBERTa) za rješavanje tih problema. Prvo izgradimo kontekstualnu riječ koja se uključuje za svaki znak iz sekvencijalnih predstavljanja karaktera, a zatim spasimo predstavljanja karaktera i podriječja predstavljanja novom heterogenetskom modulu interakcije. Također predlažemo novi predobučeni zadatak po imenu NLM (Noisy LM) za učenje neodređenog predstavljanja karaktera. Procjenjujemo našu metodu odgovora na pitanje, etiketiranja sekvencija i zadatak klasifikacije teksta, i na originalnim setima podataka i na neprijateljskim setima pogrešnog pisanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod može značajno poboljšati učinkovitost i snagu PLMsa istovremeno.', 'cs': 'Většina předškolených jazykových modelů (PLM) vytváří reprezentace slov na úrovni podslov pomocí Byte-Pair Kódování (BPE) nebo jeho variací, pomocí kterých lze OOV (mimo slovní zásobu) slov téměř vyhnout. Tyto metody však rozdělí slovo na jednotky podslov a činí reprezentaci neúplným a křehkým. V tomto článku navrhujeme předškolený jazykový model s názvem CharBERT, který zlepšuje předchozí metody (např. BERT, RoBERTa) k řešení těchto problémů. Nejprve konstruujeme kontextové vložení slov pro každý token z sekvenčních znakových reprezentací, poté sloučíme reprezentace znaků a podslov reprezentace novým heterogenním interakčním modulem. Navrhujeme také nový předškolicí úkol NLM (Noisy LM) pro učení reprezentace postav bez dozoru. Naši metodu hodnotíme v oblasti odpovědí na otázky, popisování sekvencí a klasifikace textu, a to jak na původních datových sadách, tak na testovacích sadách nepravidelného pravopisu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda může výrazně zlepšit výkon a robustnost PLM současně.', 'et': 'Enamik eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudeleid (PLMs) ehitab sõnaesindusi alamsõna tasandil baidipaari kodeerimise (BPE) või selle variatsioonide abil, mille abil OOV (väljaspool sõna) sõnad on peaaegu välditavad. Kuid need meetodid jagavad sõna alamsõnaühikuteks ja muudavad esituse ebatäielikuks ja hapraks. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja iseloomuteadliku eelõpetatud keelemudeli nimega CharBERT, mis parandab varasemaid meetodeid (nagu BERT, RoBERTa) nende probleemide lahendamiseks. Esmalt konstrueerime iga märgi jaoks kontekstipõhise sõna manustamise järjestikustest märkidest, seejärel ühendame märkide ja alamsõna esitused uue heterogeense interaktsioonimooduli abil. Samuti pakume välja uue koolituseelse ülesande nimega NLM (Noisy LM) järelevalveta iseloomu esindamise õppimiseks. Hindame oma meetodit küsimustele vastamise, järjestuse märgistamise ja teksti klassifitseerimise ülesannete puhul nii algsete andmekogumite kui ka vastavate kirjavigade testide põhjal. Katsetulemused näitavad, et meie meetod suudab oluliselt parandada PLMide jõudlust ja vastupidavust samaaegselt.', 'fi': 'Useimmat ennalta koulutetut kielimallit (PLM) rakentavat sanaesityksiä alasanatasolla Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) tai sen muunnelmilla, joiden avulla OOV-sanat ovat lähes vältettävissä. Nämä menetelmät kuitenkin jakavat sanan alasanayksiköihin ja tekevät esityksestä epätäydellisen ja hauraan. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme CharBERT-nimistä hahmotietoista esikoulutettua kielimallia, joka parantaa aiempia menetelmiä (kuten BERT, RoBERTa) näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi. Ensin rakennamme kontekstuaalisen sanan upotuksen jokaiselle merkkimerkille sekvensaalisista merkkiesityksistä, sitten yhdistämme merkkien ja alasanaesitteet uudella heterogeenisella vuorovaikutusmoduulilla. Ehdotamme myös uutta esikoulutustehtävää nimeltä NLM (Noisy LM) valvomattomaan hahmojen esittämiseen. Arvioimme kyselyvastausta, sekvenssimerkintää ja tekstin luokittelua sekä alkuperäisten aineistojen että vastakohtaisten kirjoitusvirheiden testisarjojen perusteella. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme voi parantaa merkittävästi PLM:ien suorituskykyä ja kestävyyttä samanaikaisesti.', 'ha': "Babu yawa masu motsi na zaman tsari na harshen (PLM) na samar da maganar masu gaya da daraja ta bincike na Bayte-Pair kodi (BLE) ko tsofakin ayuka, da kuma za'a kusa su kange magana na OOV (out of-vokab). Kayya, kuma, waɗannan hanyõyin su gaura magana zuwa sune-sune guda kuma ya sanya shirin su cika da kuma tsohon. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlin da aka yi taƙaita ta gabã ɗaya da aka sanar da CharBERT mai kyau kan shiryoyin da suka gaba (kamar BERT, RoBERTA) dõmin su tacce masu hanyõyin wannan. Mu samun maganar da ke ƙunsa da cikin duk ãyar da ke iya cikin rubutun da ke daban, sa'an nan kuma Mu ƙora masu tsari ga tabaka da kuma abun-word da wani modulin interaction na nowaya. Tuna goyyar da wani new aikin da aka yi amfani da NLM (Noisy LM) wa karatun sharrin wakilishi da aka tsare. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyinmu a kan karɓar tambayar, mai lissafa matsayi da aikin mai fassarar matsayi, duk a kan daidaita danne-danne na farko da tsarin jarrabo masu motsi. Matarin jarrabai ke nũna cewa metodenmu yana iya canza mafarin aikin da na PLM sami ɗaya.", 'he': 'רוב דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש (PLMs) בונים מייצגים במילים ברמה תת-מילים עם קידוד בייט-זוג (BPE) או השינויים שלה, שבה מילים OOV (מחוץ לקול) כמעט ניתן להימנע. עם זאת, השיטות האלה מחלקות מילה ליחידות תת מילים ולהפוך את היציגה לא מלאה וברירירית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל שפת מוכשר מראש מודע לדמות בשם CharBERT משתפר על השיטות הקודמות (כמו BERT, RoBERTa) כדי להתמודד עם הבעיות האלה. קודם אנו בונים את המילה הקונקסטוקטיבית של כל סימן מהייצוגים של האופים הרצפיים, ואז מייצגים את הדמויות של האופים והייצוגים של הת-מילים על ידי מודול אינטראקציה heterogeneous חדש. We also propose a new pre-training task named NLM (Noisy LM) for unsupervised character representation learning.  אנו מעריכים את השיטה שלנו על תשובות לשאלות, תיקון רצף, ומשימות מסווג טקסט, גם על קבוצות המידע המקוריים וגם על קבוצות מבחנות טעות יריבים. התוצאות הניסוייות מראות ששיטתנו יכולה לשפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה והחזקה של PLMs באותו הזמן.', 'sk': 'Večina vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov (PLM) oblikuje besedne reprezentacije na ravni podbesed z bajtnim parom kodiranja (BPE) ali njenimi variacijami, s katerimi se je mogoče izogniti besedam OOV. Vendar pa te metode razdelijo besedo v podbesedne enote in naredijo predstavitev nepopolna in krhka. V tem prispevku predlagamo predhodno usposobljen jezikovni model CharBERT, ki izboljšuje prejšnje metode (kot so BERT, RoBERTa) za reševanje teh težav. Najprej zgradimo kontekstualno besedno vgradnjo za vsak žeton iz zaporednih predstavitev znakov, nato združimo predstavitve znakov in podbesednih predstavitev z novim heterogenim interakcijskim modulom. Predlagamo tudi novo predusposabljanje z imenom NLM (Noisy LM) za nenadzorovano učenje reprezentacije znakov. Našo metodo ocenjujemo pri opravilih odgovarjanja na vprašanja, označevanja zaporedja in klasifikacije besedil, tako na originalnih naborih podatkov kot tudi na konverzalnih preskusnih naborih napačnega črkovanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko naša metoda hkrati bistveno izboljša zmogljivost in robustnost PLM-jev.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak-awak dhéwé, sira-awak dhéwé ngerti apat-awak banjuré kuwi mêng gak nggawe lan ora bisa dianggap. Nang paper iki, kita supoyo model sing karcis-Awak dhéwé, ingkang karcis-Awak dhéwé cara-Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing beraksi cara-Awak dhéwé (koyo BERT, RBERT) nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi iki. Awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan kelas contextual sing ambekan kanggo saben token karo cara sing dikareparahan, tapi o nyimpen cara-cara lan ngawe barang dhéwé Awak dhéwé mulai nggawe sistem sing gawe praterus-cara nggawe NLM (Nois LM) kanggo Kemerdekaan cara-cara nggawe. Monday Rejalaké sing paling-perbudhakan anyar tentang mruput gak nggawe ngerasah tarjamahan karo hal-hal sing luwih nggawe PLMs.', 'bo': 'Most pre-trained language models (PLMs) construct word representations at subword level with Byte-Pair Encoding (BPE) or its variations, by which OOV (out-of-vocab) words are almost avoidable. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཚིག་གཅིག་གཟུགས་ཡིག་གི་སྣོད་འཛིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་པ་ལས་ཆེ་བ་མེད་པའི་སྟོན་རྟགས། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་མིང་CharBERT་དང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞི We first construct the contextual word embedding for each token from the sequential character representations, then fuse the representations of characters and the subword representations by a novel heterogeneous interaction module. ང་ཚོས་NLM (Noisy LM) མིང་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། We evaluate our method on question answering, sequence labeling, and text classification tasks, both on the original datasets and adversarial misspelling test sets. ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཅིག་གཟའ་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། PLMs་ཚོའི་སྐྱེས་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Web Question Answering', 'ar': 'تمثيل بياني للبيانات شبه المهيكلة للإجابة على أسئلة الويب', 'es': 'Representación gráfica de datos semiestructurados para la respuesta a preguntas en Internet', 'pt': 'Uma representação gráfica de dados semiestruturados para resposta a perguntas da Web', 'fr': 'Représentation graphique de données semi-structurées pour répondre aux questions sur le Web', 'zh': '以 Web 问答之半结构化图形', 'ja': 'Web質問回答のための半構造化データのグラフ表現', 'hi': 'वेब प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए अर्ध-संरचित डेटा का ग्राफ़ प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'Графическое представление полуструктурированных данных для ответа на веб-вопрос', 'ga': 'Léiriú Graf ar Shonraí Leath-struchtúrtha le haghaidh Freagra Ceist Ghréasáin', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A félstrukturált adatok grafikus ábrázolása webes kérdések megválaszolásához', 'el': 'Μια αναπαράσταση γραφήματος ημιδομημένων δεδομένων για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων ιστού', 'it': 'Rappresentazione grafica di dati semistrutturati per la risposta alle domande web', 'lt': 'Pusstrukturuotų duomenų grafikas internetiniams atsakymams', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Web Question Answering', 'mt': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Web Question Answering', 'mn': 'Веб асуулт хариултын талбайн бүтээгдэхүүний график төлөөлөл', 'pl': 'Reprezentacja wykresu półstrukturalnych danych do odpowiedzi na pytania internetowe', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea grafică a datelor semistructurate pentru răspunsul la întrebări web', 'sr': 'Predstavljanje podataka za odgovor na veb pitanja', 'no': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Question Web', 'sv': 'En grafrepresentation av semistrukturerade data för svar på webbfrågor', 'ta': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Web Question Answering', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ phát hiện dữ liệu dễ dựng cho câu hỏi mạng', 'bg': 'Графично представяне на полуструктурирани данни за отговор на уеб въпроси', 'hr': 'Predstavljanje polu-strukturiranih podataka za odgovor na web pitanje', 'da': 'En graf repræsentation af semistrukturerede data til besvarelse af webspørgsmål', 'nl': 'Een grafische weergave van semi-gestructureerde gegevens voor het beantwoorden van webvragen', 'id': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Web Question Answering', 'de': 'Eine grafische Darstellung semistrukturierter Daten für die Beantwortung von Webfragen', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '네트워크 퀴즈 중 반구조화된 데이터의 도형 표시', 'sw': 'Mwakilishi wa Graph wa Taarifa zilizotengenezwa kwa ajili ya swali la mtandao', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'A Graph Representation of Semi-structured Data for Web Question Answering', 'tr': 'Web soragy jogaplamak üçin poluktural Maglumatyň Görkezilişi', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Վեբ հարցերի պատասխանների կիսակառուցվածքային տվյալների գրաֆիկ', 'bn': 'ওয়েব প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'Predstavljanje polu-strukturiranih podataka za odgovor na web pitanje', 'ca': 'Una representació gráfica de dades semiestructurades per respondre a preguntes web', 'az': 'Web sual캼na cavab verm톛k 칲칞칲n yar캼 strukturlu veril톛r', 'cs': 'Grafická reprezentace polostrukturovaných dat pro zodpovězení webových otázek', 'fi': 'Puolirakenteisen datan graafinen esittäminen verkkokysymyksiin vastaamista varten', 'et': 'Poolstruktureeritud andmete graafiline esitamine veebiküsimustele vastamiseks', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מייצג גרף של נתונים חצי מובנים לענות על שאלות באינטרנט', 'sk': 'Grafična predstavitev polstrukturiranih podatkov za odgovarjanje na spletna vprašanja', 'jv': 'Graph representation of semi-structural data for web question responses', 'bo': 'ཡིག་རིས་འདིའི་དྲ་བ་ལ་རང་བཞིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲི་བརྗོད་པ།'}
{'en': 'The abundant semi-structured data on the Web, such as HTML-based tables and lists, provide commercial search engines a rich information source for question answering (QA). Different from plain text passages in Web documents, Web tables and lists have inherent structures, which carry semantic correlations among various elements in tables and lists. Many existing studies treat tables and lists as flat documents with pieces of text and do not make good use of semantic information hidden in structures. In this paper, we propose a novel graph representation of Web tables and lists based on a systematic categorization of the components in semi-structured data as well as their relations. We also develop pre-training and reasoning techniques on the graph model for the QA task. Extensive experiments on several real datasets collected from a commercial engine verify the effectiveness of our approach. Our method improves F1 score by 3.90 points over the state-of-the-art baselines.', 'es': 'Los abundantes datos semiestructurados de la Web, como tablas y listas basadas en HTML, proporcionan a los motores de búsqueda comerciales una rica fuente de información para responder preguntas (QA). A diferencia de los pasajes de texto sin formato de los documentos Web, las tablas y listas Web tienen estructuras inherentes, que llevan correlaciones semánticas entre varios elementos de tablas y listas. Muchos estudios existentes tratan las tablas y listas como documentos planos con fragmentos de texto y no hacen un buen uso de la información semántica oculta en las estructuras. En este artículo, proponemos una novedosa representación gráfica de tablas y listas web basada en una categorización sistemática de los componentes de los datos semiestructurados, así como sus relaciones. También desarrollamos técnicas de preentrenamiento y razonamiento en el modelo gráfico para la tarea de control de calidad. Experimentos exhaustivos en varios conjuntos de datos reales recopilados de un motor comercial verifican la eficacia de nuestro enfoque. Nuestro método mejora la puntuación de F1 en 3,90 puntos con respecto a las líneas de base de última generación.', 'ar': 'توفر البيانات شبه المهيكلة الوفيرة على الويب ، مثل الجداول والقوائم المستندة إلى HTML ، لمحركات البحث التجارية مصدرًا غنيًا للمعلومات للإجابة على الأسئلة (QA). تختلف عن مقاطع النص العادي في مستندات الويب ، فإن جداول الويب والقوائم لها هياكل متأصلة تحمل الارتباطات الدلالية بين العناصر المختلفة في الجداول والقوائم. تعامل العديد من الدراسات الحالية الجداول والقوائم على أنها مستندات مسطحة بها أجزاء من النص ولا تستفيد جيدًا من المعلومات الدلالية المخفية في الهياكل. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تمثيلًا بيانيًا جديدًا لجداول وقوائم الويب بناءً على تصنيف منهجي للمكونات في البيانات شبه المنظمة بالإضافة إلى علاقاتها. نقوم أيضًا بتطوير تقنيات التدريب المسبق والاستدلال على نموذج الرسم البياني لمهمة ضمان الجودة. تؤكد التجارب المكثفة على العديد من مجموعات البيانات الحقيقية التي تم جمعها من محرك تجاري فعالية نهجنا. تعمل طريقتنا على تحسين درجة F1 بمقدار 3.90 نقطة على أحدث خطوط الأساس.', 'fr': "Les nombreuses données semi-structurées sur le Web, telles que les tableaux et les listes HTML, fournissent aux moteurs de recherche commerciaux une source d'informations riche pour répondre aux questions (AQ). À la différence des passages de texte brut dans les documents Web, les tableaux et les listes Web ont des structures inhérentes, qui comportent des corrélations sémantiques entre les divers éléments des tableaux et des listes. De nombreuses études existantes traitent les tableaux et les listes comme des documents plats contenant des morceaux de texte et ne font pas bon usage des informations sémantiques cachées dans les structures. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle représentation graphique de tableaux et de listes Web basée sur une catégorisation systématique des composants dans les données semi-structurées ainsi que de leurs relations. Nous développons également des techniques de pré-formation et de raisonnement sur le modèle graphique pour la tâche d'assurance qualité. Des expériences approfondies sur plusieurs ensembles de données réels collectés à partir d'un moteur commercial confirment l'efficacité de notre approche. Notre méthode améliore le score F1 de 3,90 points par rapport aux bases de référence les plus récentes.", 'pt': 'Os abundantes dados semiestruturados na Web, como tabelas e listas baseadas em HTML, fornecem aos mecanismos de pesquisa comerciais uma rica fonte de informações para resposta a perguntas (QA). Diferente das passagens de texto simples em documentos da Web, as tabelas e listas da Web têm estruturas inerentes, que carregam correlações semânticas entre vários elementos em tabelas e listas. Muitos estudos existentes tratam tabelas e listas como documentos planos com pedaços de texto e não fazem bom uso de informações semânticas escondidas em estruturas. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova representação gráfica de tabelas e listas da Web com base em uma categorização sistemática dos componentes em dados semiestruturados, bem como suas relações. Também desenvolvemos técnicas de pré-treinamento e raciocínio sobre o modelo de grafo para a tarefa de controle de qualidade. Extensos experimentos em vários conjuntos de dados reais coletados de um mecanismo comercial verificam a eficácia de nossa abordagem. Nosso método melhora a pontuação da F1 em 3,90 pontos em relação às linhas de base de última geração.', 'hi': 'वेब पर प्रचुर मात्रा में अर्ध-संरचित डेटा, जैसे कि HTML-आधारित तालिकाएँ और सूचियाँ, वाणिज्यिक खोज इंजनों को प्रश्न उत्तर देने (QA) के लिए एक समृद्ध जानकारी स्रोत प्रदान करती हैं. वेब दस्तावेज़ों, वेब तालिकाओं और सूचियों में सादे पाठ मार्गों से भिन्न अंतर्निहित संरचनाएं होती हैं, जो तालिकाओं और सूचियों में विभिन्न तत्वों के बीच शब्दार्थ सहसंबंध ले जाती हैं। कई मौजूदा अध्ययन तालिकाओं और सूचियों को पाठ के टुकड़ों के साथ फ्लैट दस्तावेजों के रूप में मानते हैं और संरचनाओं में छिपी शब्दार्थ जानकारी का अच्छा उपयोग नहीं करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम अर्ध-संरचित डेटा में घटकों के व्यवस्थित वर्गीकरण के साथ-साथ उनके संबंधों के आधार पर वेब तालिकाओं और सूचियों के एक उपन्यास ग्राफ प्रतिनिधित्व का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम क्यूए कार्य के लिए ग्राफ मॉडल पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण और तर्क तकनीकों को भी विकसित करते हैं। एक वाणिज्यिक इंजन से एकत्र किए गए कई वास्तविक डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोग हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करते हैं। हमारी विधि राज्य के अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं पर 3.90 अंक से F1 स्कोर में सुधार करती है।', 'ja': 'HTMLベースのテーブルやリストなど、Web上の豊富な半構造化データは、商用検索エンジンに質問応答（ QA ）のための豊富な情報源を提供します。Webドキュメントのプレーンテキストパサージとは異なり、Webテーブルとリストには固有の構造があり、テーブルとリストのさまざまな要素間に意味相関を持ちます。多くの既存の研究では、表とリストをテキストの断片を含む平坦なドキュメントとして扱い、構造に隠された意味情報をうまく利用していません。本稿では、半構造化データの構成要素の体系的な分類とそれらの関係に基づいて、Webテーブルとリストの新規グラフ表現を提案する。また、QAタスクのグラフモデルに関する事前トレーニングと推論テクニックも開発しています。商用エンジンから収集されたいくつかの実際のデータセットに関する広範な実験は、当社のアプローチの有効性を検証します。私たちの方法は、最先端のベースラインよりもF 1スコアを3.90ポイント向上させます。', 'zh': 'Web上丰半结构化之数,若HTML之表格表,为商贾搜索引擎供问答(QA)信息源。 与 Web 文档之纯文本段落不同,Web 表有固结,其在元素之间有语义相关性。 诸见治表格列表为带文本片段平面文档,且不甚用隐在结构中语义信息。 于本文中,立对半结构化数组件系统分类Web表和列新图。 图形 QA 事,预练推理。 商引擎所集数真数实验验吾法之有效性。 吾法以F1分先先进者基线增3.90分。', 'ru': 'Многочисленные полуструктурированные данные в Интернете, такие как таблицы и списки на основе HTML, предоставляют коммерческим поисковым системам богатый источник информации для ответов на вопросы (QA). В отличие от простых текстовых отрывков в Web-документах, Web-таблицы и списки имеют присущие им структуры, которые несут в себе семантические корреляции между различными элементами в таблицах и списках. Многие существующие исследования рассматривают таблицы и списки как плоские документы с фрагментами текста и не используют семантическую информацию, скрытую в структурах. В данной работе мы предлагаем новое графическое представление веб-таблиц и списков, основанное на систематической категоризации компонентов в полуструктурированных данных, а также их соотношениях. Мы также разрабатываем методики предварительного обучения и рассуждения на графической модели для задачи QA. Обширные эксперименты на нескольких реальных наборах данных, собранных с коммерческого движка, подтверждают эффективность нашего подхода. Наш метод улучшает оценку F1 на 3,90 пункта по сравнению с современными базовыми линиями.', 'ga': "Soláthraíonn na sonraí leath-struchtúrtha flúirseach ar an nGréasán, cosúil le táblaí agus liostaí HTML-bhunaithe, foinse shaibhir faisnéise d'innill chuardaigh tráchtála chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt (QA). Difriúil ó shleachta gnáth-théacs i ndoiciméid Ghréasáin, tá struchtúir bhunúsacha ag táblaí Gréasáin agus liostaí, a iompraíonn comhghaolta shéimeantacha i measc eilimintí éagsúla i dtáblaí agus i liostaí. Déileálann go leor staidéir atá ann cheana le táblaí agus liostaí mar dhoiciméid chomhréidh le píosaí téacs agus ní bhaineann siad úsáid mhaith as faisnéis shéimeantach atá folaithe i struchtúir. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid léiriú grafach nua de tháblaí Gréasáin agus liostaí bunaithe ar chatagóiriú córasach ar na comhpháirteanna i sonraí leath-struchtúrtha chomh maith lena gcaidreamh. Forbraímid freisin teicnící réamh-oiliúna agus réasúnaíochta ar an tsamhail ghraif don tasc QA. Deimhníonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar roinnt tacar sonraí réadacha a bailíodh ó inneall tráchtála éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige. Cuireann ár modh feabhas ar scór F1 3.90 pointe thar na bunlínte úrscothacha.", 'hu': 'A bőséges, félstrukturált adatok az interneten, mint például a HTML-alapú táblázatok és listák, gazdag információforrást biztosítanak a kereskedelmi keresőmotorok számára a kérdések megválaszolásához. A webes dokumentumok egyszerű szöveges részeitől eltérően a webes táblázatok és listák eredendő struktúrákkal rendelkeznek, amelyek szemantikai összefüggéseket hordoznak a táblázatok és listák különböző elemei között. Sok meglévő tanulmány a táblázatokat és listákat lapos dokumentumként kezeli, szövegdarabokkal, és nem használja jól a struktúrákban rejtett szemantikai információkat. Jelen tanulmányban a félstrukturált adatok összetevőinek szisztematikus kategorizálása és kapcsolatai alapján javasoljuk a webes táblázatok és listák új grafikonos ábrázolását. A minősítési feladat grafikonmodelljén előkészítő és érvelési technikákat fejlesztünk ki. Számos kereskedelmi motorból gyűjtött valódi adathalmazon végzett kiterjedt kísérletek igazolják megközelítésünk hatékonyságát. Módszerünk 3,90 ponttal javítja az F1 pontszámot a legkorszerűbb alapvonalakhoz képest.', 'ka': 'საბეჭდო სახუთი სტრუქტურურაციული მონაცემები, როგორც HTML-დაბათული ცხრილები და სიტყვები, სამუშაო ძიება მოწყობილობის მოწყობილობის შესაძლებელი ინფორმაციის ფე Web დოკუმენტებში სხვა ტექსტის პასუხებიდან განსხვავებული ტექსტის პასუხებიდან, ვებ ტექსტის და სიტყვების შესაბამისი სტრუქტურები, რომლებიც სმენტიკური კორელეციები ბევრი წარმოდგენებული სწავლებები ტექსტის ნაწილი და სიტყვების შესახებ ტექსტის ნაწილი და არ გამოიყენებენ სემონტიკური ინფორმაციას სტრუქტურაში. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ გვეძლევა პრომენტური გრაფის გარეშექმნა საბოლო ცხრილის და სიტყვების სისტემატიკური კატეგორიზაციაზე, რომელიც კომპონენტების კომპონენტების სტრ ჩვენ ასევე უნდა გავაკეთებთ სამუშაო სამუშაო მოდელში სამუშაო მოდელეში სამუშაო განაკეთება და პარამენტის ტექნოგიები. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები რამდენიმე რეალური მონაცემების კომპერიმენტიდან კომპერიმენტის მოწყობილობადან დააწყებული ექსპერი ჩვენი პროცემი შესაძლებელია F1 წერტილი 3,90 წერტილებით შესაძლებელია სამყარო წერტილი.', 'el': 'Τα άφθονα ημιδομημένα δεδομένα στο διαδίκτυο, όπως πίνακες και λίστες με βάση το HTML, παρέχουν στις εμπορικές μηχανές αναζήτησης μια πλούσια πηγή πληροφοριών για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων (QA). Διαφορετικά από τα χωρία απλού κειμένου σε έγγραφα ιστού, οι πίνακες ιστού και οι λίστες έχουν εγγενείς δομές, οι οποίες φέρουν σημασιολογικούς συσχετισμούς μεταξύ διαφόρων στοιχείων σε πίνακες και λίστες. Πολλές υπάρχουσες μελέτες αντιμετωπίζουν τους πίνακες και τους καταλόγους ως επίπεδη έγγραφα με κομμάτια κειμένου και δεν κάνουν καλή χρήση σημασιολογικών πληροφοριών κρυμμένων στις δομές. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα απεικόνιση γραφικών πινάκων και καταλόγων με βάση μια συστηματική κατηγοριοποίηση των συστατικών σε ημιδομημένα δεδομένα καθώς και των σχέσεων τους. Επίσης αναπτύσσουμε τεχνικές προεκπαίδευσης και συλλογισμού στο μοντέλο γραφής για την εργασία QA. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε διάφορα πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων που συλλέγονται από μια εμπορική μηχανή επιβεβαιώνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας. Η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει το σκορ F1 κατά 3,90 πόντους πάνω από τις υπερσύγχρονες γραμμές βάσης.', 'it': "Gli abbondanti dati semi-strutturati presenti sul Web, come tabelle ed elenchi basati su HTML, forniscono ai motori di ricerca commerciali una ricca fonte di informazioni per la risposta alle domande (QA). Diversamente dai passaggi di testo semplice nei documenti Web, le tabelle Web e gli elenchi hanno strutture intrinseche, che portano correlazioni semantiche tra i vari elementi nelle tabelle e negli elenchi. Molti studi esistenti trattano tabelle ed elenchi come documenti piatti con pezzi di testo e non fanno buon uso delle informazioni semantiche nascoste nelle strutture. In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova rappresentazione grafica di tabelle e elenchi Web basata su una categorizzazione sistematica dei componenti in dati semi-strutturati e delle loro relazioni. Sviluppiamo anche tecniche di pre-formazione e ragionamento sul modello grafico per il compito QA. Esperimenti approfonditi su diversi set di dati reali raccolti da un motore commerciale verificano l'efficacia del nostro approccio. Il nostro metodo migliora il punteggio F1 di 3,90 punti rispetto alle linee di base all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Богатите поластруктурирани податоци на Интернет, како што се HTML- базираните табли и листи, обезбедуваат комерцијални пребарувачки мотори богат извор на информации за одговори на прашања (QA). Different from plain text passages in Web documents, Web tables and lists have inherent structures, which carry semantic correlations among various elements in tables and lists.  Многу постоечки студии ги третираат таблите и листите како рамни документи со парчиња текст и не користат добро семантични информации скриени во структурите. Во овој весник, предлагаме нов граф претставување на веб таблички и листи базирани на систематска категоризација на компонентите во поластруктурирани податоци, како и нивните односи. We also develop pre-training and reasoning techniques on the graph model for the QA task.  Експериментите на неколку вистински податоци собрани од комерцијален мотор ја верификуваат ефикасноста на нашиот пристап. Нашиот метод го подобрува резултатот на Ф1 за 3,90 поени над најновите бази.', 'kk': 'Интернеттегі жарты құрылған деректер, мысалы, HTML- негіздеген кестелер мен тізімдер, сұрақ жауап беру үшін коммерциялық іздеу тетігінің бағасы мәлімет көзі (QA) береді. Веб құжаттары, Веб кестелері және тізімдерде кәдімгі мәтін пароллерінен айырмашылық құрылғылар бар. Кестелердің және тізімдерінің әртүрлі элементтерінің арасында semantic Көптеген зерттеулер кестелер мен тізімдерді мәтін бөлшектері деп тұрып, құрылғыларда жасырылған семантикалық мәліметтерді жасырылмайды. Бұл қағазда, біз жарты құрылған деректерде және олардың қатынастарындағы компоненттердің жүйелік санаттарына негізделген Веб кестелерін және тізімдерін жаңа графикалық түрлендіруді ұсындық. Сонымен қатар, QA тапсырмасының график үлгісінде алдындағы оқыту және түсіндіру техникаларын жасадық. Бірнеше шын деректер жиындарының кеңейтілген тәжірибелері, коммерциялық тетігінен жинақталған тәжірибелеріміздің тәжірибесін тексеру. Біздің әдіміміз F1 нәтижесін 3,90 нәтижелеріне шектеп береді.', 'lt': 'Daugelis pusstruktūrinių interneto duomenų, pavyzdžiui, HTML lentelių ir sąrašų, suteikia komerciniams paieškos varikliams turtingą informacijos šaltinį atsakymui į klausimus (QA). Skirtingai nuo paprastų interneto dokumentų teksto dalių, interneto lentelės ir sąrašai turi savarankiškas struktūras, kurios turi semantines koreliacijas tarp įvairių lentelių ir sąrašų elementų. Daugelis esamų tyrimų lenteles ir sąrašus vertina kaip plokščius dokumentus su teksto dalimis ir nepakankamai naudojasi semantine struktūrose paslėpta informacija. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują grafiką pateikti interneto lenteles ir sąrašus, grindžiamus sistemingu komponentų suskirstymu į pusstruktūrinius duomenis ir jų santykius. Taip pat parengiame parengiamąjį mokymą ir pagrįstumo metodus, susijusius su QA užduoties grafikos modeliu. Išsamūs eksperimentai su keletu iš komercinio variklio surinktų tikrų duomenų rinkinių tikrina mūsų metodo veiksmingumą. Mūsų metodas pagerina F1 tašką 3,90 taškų virš naujausių bazinių linijų.', 'ms': 'The abundant semi-structured data on the Web, such as HTML-based tables and lists, provide commercial search engines a rich information source for question answering (QA).  Berbeza dari laluan teks biasa dalam dokumen sesawang, jadual sesawang dan senarai mempunyai struktur yang terkandung, yang membawa korelasi semantik diantara pelbagai unsur dalam jadual dan senarai. Banyak kajian yang wujud memperlakukan jadual dan senarai sebagai dokumen rata dengan potongan teks dan tidak menggunakan maklumat semantik yang tersembunyi dalam struktur. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan graf novel meja Web dan senarai berdasarkan kategorisasi sistemik komponen dalam data semi-struktur serta hubungan mereka. Kami juga mengembangkan teknik praselatihan dan reasoning pada model graf untuk tugas QA. Eksperimen luas pada beberapa set data sebenar yang dikumpulkan dari enjin komersial mengesahkan kegunaan pendekatan kita. Kaedah kami meningkatkan skor F1 dengan 3.90 titik di atas garis dasar state-of-the-art.', 'mt': 'Id-dejta abbundanti semistrutturata fuq l-Internet, bħal tabelli u listi bbażati fuq l-HTML, tipprovdi lill-magni tat-tiftix kummerċjali sors għoli ta’ informazzjoni għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA). Differenti minn passaġġi ta’ test sempliċi fid-dokumenti tal-internet, it-tabelli tal-internet u l-listi għandhom strutturi inerenti, li jġorru korrelazzjonijiet semantiċi fost diversi elementi fit-tabelli u l-listi. Ħafna studji eżistenti jittrattaw tabelli u listi bħala dokumenti ċatti b’biċċiet ta’ test u ma jagħmlux użu tajjeb minn informazzjoni semantika moħbija fl-istrutturi. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu rappreżentazzjoni ġdida ta’ grafika ta’ tabelli u listi tal-internet ibbażati fuq kategorijizzazzjoni sistematika tal-komponenti f’dejta semistrutturata kif ukoll ir-relazzjonijiet tagħhom. Aħna niżviluppaw ukoll tekniki ta’ taħriġ minn qabel u ta’ raġunament fuq il-mudell grafiku għall-kompitu QA. Esperimenti estensivi fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta reali miġbura minn magna kummerċjali jivverifikaw l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna. Our method improves F1 score by 3.90 points over the state-of-the-art baselines.', 'ml': 'വെബിലെ ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സെമി സ്ഥാപിച്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, HTML അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ടേബിളുകളും ലിസ്റ്റുകളുമായി എച്ചിനുകള്\u200d, ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കു വെബ് രേഖകളിലെ വെളുത്ത പദാവലിയുടെ പാസ്സുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, വെബ് ടേബിളുകളും ലിസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളുണ്ട്. ടേബി നിലവിലുള്ള പലതും ടേബിളുകളും ലിസ്റ്റുകളും ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളുമായി മാറ്റുന്നു. പദാവലികളുടെ തുണ്ടുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുള്ള ഫ്ലാറ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെബ് ടേബിളുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്ന നോവല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് പ്രായസ്ത്രീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റമിക്ക് വിഭാഗങ്ങളില ക്യൂഎ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് മോഡലിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനവും കാര്യങ്ങളും നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. Extensive experiments on several real datasets collected from a commercial engine verify the effectiveness of our approach.  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d 3.90 പോയിന്റ് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു... ..', 'mn': 'Веб дээрх ихэвчлэн хагас бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээлэл, жишээ нь HTML дээр суурилсан хүснэгт, жагсаалт, худалдааны хайлтын моторууд асуулт хариултын баян мэдээлэл эх үүсвэр (QA) гаргадаг. Веб баримт, Веб хүснэгт болон жагсаалт дэх загваруудаас өөр өөр төрлийн бүтэц байдаг. Энэ нь хүснэгт болон жагсаалтын төрлийн элементүүдийн семантик холбоотой байдаг. Мөн олон судалгаанууд хүснэгт болон жагсаалт бичсэн баримтууд бичсэн бөгөөд бүтээгдэхүүнд нуугдсан semantic мэдээллийг сайн ашиглахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид вэб хүснэгт болон жагсаалтын шинэ график илэрхийлэгдэхийг санал болгож байна. Мөн бид QA-ын ажлын график загварын урд сургалтын болон урд сургалтын технологи боловсруулдаг. Хэрэглээний машинаас цуглуулсан хэдэн бодит өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн туршилтууд бидний арга замын үр дүнг шалгаж байна. Бидний арга нь F1 оноо 3.90 цэгээр хөгжиж байна.', 'ro': 'Datele semi-structurate abundente de pe Web, cum ar fi tabelele și listele bazate pe HTML, oferă motoarelor de căutare comerciale o sursă bogată de informații pentru răspunsul la întrebări (QA). Diferit de pasajele de text simplu din documentele Web, tabelele Web și listele au structuri inerente, care poartă corelații semantice între diferitele elemente din tabele și liste. Multe studii existente tratează tabelele și listele ca fiind documente plate cu bucăți de text și nu utilizează bine informațiile semantice ascunse în structuri. În această lucrare, propunem o reprezentare grafică nouă a tabelelor și listelor Web bazată pe o clasificare sistematică a componentelor din date semi-structurate, precum și relațiile acestora. De asemenea, dezvoltăm tehnici de pre-training și raționament pe modelul grafic pentru sarcina QA. Experimente ample pe mai multe seturi de date reale colectate dintr-un motor comercial verifică eficiența abordării noastre. Metoda noastră îmbunătățește scorul F1 cu 3.90 puncte peste liniile de bază de ultimă generație.', 'pl': 'Obfite półstrukturalne dane w sieci Web, takie jak tabele i listy oparte na HTML, zapewniają komercyjnym wyszukiwarkom bogate źródło informacji do odpowiedzi na pytania (QA). W odróżnieniu od fragmentów tekstowych w dokumentach internetowych, tabele i listy internetowe mają nieodłączne struktury, które zawierają korelacje semantyczne między różnymi elementami tabeli i list. Wiele istniejących badań traktuje tabele i listy jako płaskie dokumenty z fragmentami tekstu i nie wykorzystuje dobrze informacji semantycznych ukrytych w strukturach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowatorską reprezentację tabeli i list internetowych w oparciu o systematyczną kategoryzację składników danych półstrukturalnych oraz ich relacji. Opracowujemy również techniki przedszkoleniowe i rozumowania na modelu graficznym dla zadania QA. Obszerne eksperymenty na kilku rzeczywistych zbiorach danych zebranych z komercyjnego silnika weryfikują skuteczność naszego podejścia. Nasza metoda poprawia wynik F1 o 3,90 punkty nad najnowocześniejszymi liniami bazowymi.', 'sr': 'Mnogo polu-strukturovanih podataka na internetu, kao što su tablice i listi na HTML-u, pružaju komercijalne pretraživačke motore bogati izvor informacija za odgovor na pitanje (QA). Drugačije od običnih tekstskih prolaza u web dokumentima, Web tablica i listi imaju inherentne strukture, koje nose semantičke korelacije među različitim elementima u tablama i listama. Mnogi postojeći ispitivanja tretiraju tablice i liste kao ravne dokumente sa delovima teksta i ne koriste dobro semantičke informacije skrivene u strukturama. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi grafik predstavljanja internetskih stolova i listova na temelju sistematske kategorije komponenta u polu strukturiranim podacima, kao i njihovim odnosima. Takoðe razvijamo tehnike predobuke i razmatranja na grafičkom modelu za QA zadatak. Eksperimenti na nekoliko pravih podataka okupljenih iz komercijalnog motora proveravaju učinkovitost našeg pristupa. Naša metoda poboljšava rezultat F1 za 3,90 bodova na osnovnoj liniji stanja umjetnosti.', 'no': 'Den store halvstrukturerte data på nettet, som HTML-baserte tabeller og lister, gir kommersielle søkjemotorar ein rikk informasjonskjelde for spørsmålssvar (QA). Forskjellig frå vanleg tekstpassar i nettdokument, netttabeller og lister har innhaldne strukturar, som innebærar semantiske korrelasjonar blant ulike element i tabeller og lister. Mange eksisterande studier behandler tabeller og lister som flate dokument med tekststykker og ikkje gjer godt bruk av semantiske informasjon gøymd i strukturar. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt graf representasjon av netttabeller og lister basert på eit systematisk kategorisering av komponentane i halvstrukturerte data og deres relasjonar. Vi utviklar også føreøvingsteknikk og rasjonssteknikk på grafmodellen for QA-oppgåva. Ekstra eksperimenter på fleire faktiske datasett samla frå eit kommersiell motor kontrollerer effektiviteten av tilnærminga vår. Metoden vårt forbetrar F1- poeng med 3,90 punkt over kunstbaselinjene.', 'sv': 'De rikliga semistrukturerade data på webben, såsom HTML-baserade tabeller och listor, ger kommersiella sökmotorer en rik informationskälla för frågesvar (QA). Till skillnad från vanliga textavsnitt i webbdokument har webbtabeller och listor inneboende strukturer, som bär semantiska korrelationer mellan olika element i tabeller och listor. Många befintliga studier behandlar tabeller och listor som platta dokument med textbitar och utnyttjar inte korrekt semantisk information dold i strukturer. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny grafrepresentation av webbtabeller och listor baserat på en systematisk kategorisering av komponenterna i semistrukturerade data samt deras relationer. Vi utvecklar även förberedande och resonerande tekniker på grafmodellen för QA-uppgiften. Omfattande experiment på flera riktiga datauppsättningar insamlade från en kommersiell motor verifierar effektiviteten i vårt tillvägagångssätt. Vår metod förbättrar F1 poäng med 3,90 poäng över de senaste baslinjerna.', 'so': 'QA Meel ka duwan baasabooyinka saxda ah ee macluumaadka internetka, miisaska internetka iyo listyadu waxay leeyihiin dhismo hoos u ah, taasoo ku xiriira isku xirka kala duduwan miisaska iyo liiska. Waxbarashooyin badan oo joogta ah ayaa looxyada iyo liiska looga maamulaa dukumentiyada bannaan oo ay ku yaalaan qeybo qoraal ah, mana isticmaalaan macluumaad sawir ah oo ku qarsoon dhismaha. Warqaddan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa warqad warqad warqad ah oo ku qoran miisaska Webiga iyo liiska ku saleysan kooxa habboon oo ku qoran macluumaadka halka la dhisay iyo xiriirkooda. We also develop pre-training and reasoning techniques on the graph model for the QA task.  Imtixaan dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan mashiinka ganacsiga laga soo ururiyey si ay u xaqiijiyaan waxyaabaha qaabilsan. Midabkayaga ayaa horumarinaya kooxda F1 oo ku qoran 3.90 barxad oo ku qoran asalka farshaxanka.', 'si': 'ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ලැයිස්තුවක් වගේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා  වෙබ් ලේඛනය, වෙබ් ලේඛනය සහ ලැයිස්තුවට සාමාන්ත පාසල් පාසල් වලින් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ඉන්නවා, ඒ වගේම සැමාන්තික සම්බන් ගොඩක් තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ අධ්\u200dයානයට ටේස්ට් සහ ලැයිස්තුව ලැයිස්තුවක් ලැයිස්තුවක් විදියට පත්තර කොටස් ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙබ් පැත්තක් සහ ලැයිස්තුවක් සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ සංවිධානය සම්පූර්ණ දත්තේ අ අපි QA වැඩේ ග්\u200dරාෆ් මෝඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරධානය සහ හ හිතාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. ව්\u200dයාපාරික එංජින් එකෙන් සම්බන්ධ වුනු ඇත්ත දත්ත සෙට් වලින් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝ අපේ පද්ධතිය F1 ස්කෝර් 3.90 පින්තුවන් විශේෂය කරනවා කියලා.', 'ur': 'ویب پر بہت سی سام سامان ساختہ ڈیٹا، جیسے HTML بنیادی ٹیبلز اور لیست، سوال جواب کے لئے (QA) ایک ثروت معلومات سورج کے ذریعے تجارتی جگہ انجینٹوں کو پیش کرتا ہے. ویب دفتروں میں، ویب ٹیبلز اور لیستروں میں مختلف ساختار ہیں، جو ٹیبل اور لیستروں میں مختلف مختلف اتمام کے درمیان سیمانٹی تعلقات لاتے ہیں. بہت سے موجود تحقیقات ٹیبلوں اور لکھوں کو متن کے ٹکڑے کے ساتھ پلٹ دکھانے کے طور پر سمجھتے ہیں اور ساختاروں میں چھپائے سیمانٹی معلومات کا اچھا استعمال نہیں کرتے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ویب ٹیبلوں اور لیستوں کی ایک نئی گراف کی نمونش کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو نصف ساختہ ڈیٹوں اور ان کے ارتباطوں میں سیستماتیک قسم کی بنیاد رکھی ہے. ہم نے بھی QA تابع کے لئے گراف موڈل کے لئے پیش آموزش اور منطقی تکنیکیاں ایجاد کریں۔ بہت سی حقیقی ڈاٹ سٹ پر مہربانی انجینٹ سے جمع کئے گئے ہیں کہ ہمارے تقریبا کی عمدگی کی تصدیق کریں۔ ہمارا طریقہ 3.90 پوینٹوں کے ذریعہ F1 اسکو سیدھا کرتا ہے', 'ta': 'இணையத்தில் உள்ள பெரும்பாலான அரை அமைப்பு தகவல்கள், HTML அடிப்படைகள் மற்றும் பட்டியல்கள், வணிக தேடுதல் இயந்திரங்கள் கேள்வி பதில் (QA) க்கு பணக இணைய ஆவணங்களில் வெறுமையான உரை கடவுச்சொல்கள், இணைய அட்டவணைகள் மற்றும் பட்டியல்களில் உள்ளடக்க அமைப்புகள் உள்ளன, இது அட்டவணைகள் மற்றும் பட்டியலில்  பல இருக்கும் பட்டியல்கள் அட்டவணைகள் மற்றும் பட்டியல் இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் இணைய அட்டவணைகளின் புதிய வரைபடத்தை குறிப்பிடுவதை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மற்றும் பட்டியலில் பாதி அமைப்பு தரவுகளின் பொ கியூஏ பணிக்கான வரைப்படம் மாதிரியில் முன் பயிற்சி மற்றும் குறிப்பான தொழில்நுட்பத்தை உருவாக்கு ஒரு வணிக பொறியிலிருந்து ஒன்று சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட பல உண்மையான தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் விரிவான சோதனைகளை எங்கள் செயல்பாட்ட எங்கள் முறைமையில் F1 புள்ளிகளை 3.90 புள்ளிகளால் மேம்படுத்துகிறது மாநிலை- கலை அடிப்படை கோடுகளில்.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Koʻpchilik mavjud tizimlar jadvalni va roʻyxatlarni matn qismlari bilan bog'liq hujjatlarga qoʻllanmagan va quyidagi semantik maʼlumot yordamida yaxshi ishlatilmaydi. Bu hujjatda, biz Web jadvalning taqdimotini taqdimot qilamiz va taxminan tarkibdagi komponentlarning tizim kategoriga ega bo'lgan va ularning murakkablariga ega bo'lgan bog'lamalar roʻyxatini talab qilamiz. Biz QA vazifasi uchun grafik modeli modelini oldin o'rganish va g'oyalar texnologiyani hozirganamiz. Bir tashkilotdagi haqiqiqiy maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kengaytirish muvaffaqiyatlarimizni tasdiqlash. Bizning usuli F1 qiymatni 3.90 nuqta bilan boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'The abundant semi-structure data on the Web, such as HTML-based tables and lists, cung cấp các động cơ tìm kiếm thương mại một nguồn thông tin dồi dào for question answer (QA). Khác với những đoạn đơn trong các văn bản trên Web documents, Web tables and lists have integrated structures, which carry the semantics tương đương between various elements in tables and lists. Nhiều nghiên cứu hiện tại coi bàn và danh sách như những giấy tờ bằng các mảnh chữ và không sử dụng thông tin ngữ pháp ẩn giấu trong các cấu trúc tốt. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một đại diện đồ thị mới về các bảng Mạng và danh sách dựa trên một phân loại các thành phần trong dữ liệu được sắp xếp lại, cũng như quan hệ của chúng. Chúng tôi cũng phát triển kỹ thuật huấn luyện trước và lý luận về mô hình đồ thị cho nhiệm vụ QA. Các thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên nhiều bộ dữ liệu thật sự được thu thập từ động cơ thương mại xác thực hiệu quả của phương pháp này. Cách chúng ta dùng để cải thiện điểm F1 bằng 3.90 so với nền tảng thời đại.', 'bg': 'Изобилите от полуструктурирани данни в интернет, като таблици и списъци, осигуряват на търговските търсачки богат източник на информация за отговор на въпроси. Различни от пасажите с обикновен текст в уеб документи, уеб таблиците и списъците имат присъщи структури, които носят семантични корелации между различните елементи в таблиците и списъците. Много съществуващи проучвания третират таблиците и списъците като плоски документи с парчета текст и не използват добре семантичната информация, скрита в структурите. В настоящата статия предлагаме ново графично представяне на уеб таблици и списъци въз основа на систематична категоризация на компонентите в полуструктурирани данни, както и техните взаимоотношения. Разработваме и техники за предварителна подготовка и разсъждаване на графикния модел за задачата за осигуряване на качеството. Обширни експерименти върху няколко реални набора от данни, събрани от търговски двигател, потвърждават ефективността на нашия подход. Нашият метод подобрява резултата с 3,90 точки над най-съвременните базови линии.', 'nl': 'De overvloedige semi-gestructureerde gegevens op het web, zoals HTML-gebaseerde tabellen en lijsten, bieden commerciële zoekmachines een rijke informatiebron voor het beantwoorden van vragen (QA). Anders dan gewone tekstpassages in webdocumenten, hebben webtabellen en lijsten inherente structuren, die semantische correlaties tussen verschillende elementen in tabellen en lijsten bevatten. Veel bestaande studies behandelen tabellen en lijsten als platte documenten met stukjes tekst en maken geen goed gebruik van semantische informatie verborgen in structuren. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe grafische weergave voor van webtabellen en lijsten op basis van een systematische categorisering van de componenten in semi-gestructureerde gegevens en hun relaties. We ontwikkelen ook pre-training en redenering technieken op het grafiekmodel voor de QA taak. Uitgebreide experimenten met verschillende reële datasets verzameld uit een commerciële engine bevestigen de effectiviteit van onze aanpak. Onze methode verbetert F1 score met 3,90 punten over de state-of-the-art baselines.', 'da': 'De rigelige semi-strukturerede data på nettet, såsom HTML-baserede tabeller og lister, giver kommercielle søgemaskiner en rig informationskilde til spørgsmål besvarelse (QA). Forskellig fra almindelige tekstpassager i webdokumenter, Web tabeller og lister har iboende strukturer, der bærer semantiske korrelationer mellem forskellige elementer i tabeller og lister. Mange eksisterende undersøgelser behandler tabeller og lister som flade dokumenter med stykker tekst og gør ikke god brug af semantisk information skjult i strukturer. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny grafrepræsentation af webtabeller og lister baseret på en systematisk kategorisering af komponenterne i semistrukturerede data samt deres relationer. Vi udvikler også forudgående trænings- og ræsonnementsteknikker på grafmodellen til QA-opgaven. Omfattende eksperimenter på flere rigtige datasæt indsamlet fra en kommerciel motor bekræfter effektiviteten af vores tilgang. Vores metode forbedrer F1 score med 3,90 point over de avancerede basislinjer.', 'hr': 'Mnogi polu-strukturovani podaci na internetu, poput tablica i popisa na HTML-u, pružaju komercijalne pretraživačke motore bogati izvor informacija za odgovor na pitanje (QA). Drugačije od običnih tekstskih prolaza u internetskim dokumentima, internetskim tablama i listima imaju sadržene strukture, koje nose semantičke korelacije među različitim elementima u tablama i listama. Mnogo postojećih ispitivanja liječi tablice i popis kao ravne dokumente s djelovima teksta i ne koriste dobro semantičke informacije skrivene u strukturi. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi grafik predstavljanja internetskih tablica i listova na temelju sistematske kategorije komponenta u polu strukturiranim podacima, kao i njihovim odnosima. Također razvijamo tehnike predobuke i razmatranja na grafičkom modelu za QA zadatak. Prošireni eksperimenti na nekoliko pravih podataka skupljenih iz komercijalnog motora provjeravaju učinkovitost našeg pristupa. Naša metoda poboljšava rezultat F1 za 3,90 bodova na početnim linijama stanja umjetnosti.', 'id': 'Data semi-struktur yang banyak di Web, seperti tabel dan daftar berdasarkan HTML, menyediakan mesin pencarian komersial sumber informasi yang kaya untuk menjawab pertanyaan (QA). Berbeda dari kalimat teks biasa dalam dokumen Web, tabel Web dan daftar memiliki struktur yang inherent, yang membawa korelasi semantis antara berbagai elemen dalam tabel dan daftar. Banyak studi yang ada memperlakukan tabel dan daftar sebagai dokumen rata dengan potongan teks dan tidak menggunakan dengan baik informasi semantis tersembunyi dalam struktur. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah representasi grafik novel dari tabel dan daftar Web berdasarkan kategorisasi sistematis komponen dalam data semi-struktur serta hubungan mereka. We also develop pre-training and reasoning techniques on the graph model for the QA task.  Eksperimen ekstensif pada beberapa set data yang sebenarnya dikumpulkan dari mesin komersial verifikasi efektivitas pendekatan kita. Metode kami memperbaiki skor F1 dengan 3,90 poin di atas garis dasar state-of-the-art.', 'ko': '인터넷상의 풍부한 반구조화된 데이터, 예를 들어 HTML 기반의 표와 목록은 상업 검색엔진에 풍부한 문답 정보원을 제공한다.웹 문서의 순수한 텍스트 단락과 달리 웹 표와 목록은 고유의 구조를 가지고 표와 목록의 각 요소 사이에 의미와 관련이 있다.많은 기존 연구들은 표와 목록을 텍스트 세션이 있는 평면 문서로 보고 구조에 숨겨진 의미 정보를 충분히 활용하지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 반구조화된 데이터 중의 구성 요소와 그 관계를 바탕으로 하는 새로운 네트워크 테이블과 목록의 도형 표시 방법을 제시했다.우리는 QA 미션을 위해 도형 모형의 예비 훈련과 추리 기술도 개발했다.상업 엔진에서 수집한 몇 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서 진행된 대량의 실험은 우리 방법의 유효성을 검증했다.우리의 방법은 가장 선진적인 기선보다 F1 점수가 3.90점 높아졌다.', 'sw': 'Takwimu nyingi zilizotengenezwa na sekondari kwenye mtandao wa intaneti, kama vile meza na orodha za kibiashara, zinatoa mbinu za kutafuta kibiashara chanzo cha taarifa za kujibu maswali (QA). Tofauti na njia za simu za mkononi katika nyaraka za mtandaoni, meza na orodha za mtandaoni zina miundombinu yenye asili, ambayo hubeba mahusiano ya kimapenzi miongoni mwa vipengele tofauti katika meza na orodha. Tafiti nyingi zinazopo zinatumia meza na orodha kama nyaraka za bure zenye vipande vya maandishi na hawafanyi matumizi mazuri ya taarifa za kimapenzi zilizofichikana katika miundombinu. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuonyesha picha ya riwaya ya meza za mtandaoni na orodha inayohusiana na makundi ya mfumo katika takwimu zilizotengenezwa nusu pamoja na mahusiano yao. Tunaendeleza mbinu za mafunzo na yenye maana juu ya mifano ya picha kwa kazi ya QA. Extensive experiments on several real datasets collected from a commercial engine verify the effectiveness of our approach.  Utawala wetu unaboresha vipimo vya F1 kwa pointi 3.90 juu ya misingi ya hali ya sanaa.', 'fa': 'اطلاعات نصف ساخته شده بسیار زیادی روی وب، مثل میز و لیست\u200cهای HTML، موتورهای جستجو تجاری یک منبع اطلاعات ثروتمند برای جواب سوال (QA) را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. متفاوت از مسیرهای متن ساده در سند وب، میز وب و لیستها ساختارهای متنوعی دارند که در میان عنصرهای متفاوتی در میز و لیستها ارتباطات semantic را حمل می کنند. بسیاری از مطالعه\u200cهای موجود میز و لیست\u200cها را به عنوان سند ساده با قطعه\u200cهای متن درمان می\u200cکنند و از اطلاعات semantic مخفی در ساختارها استفاده نکنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک نمایش گراف نوی از میز وب و لیستها را پیشنهاد می کنیم که بر اساس یک دسته سیستماتی از بخش\u200cها در داده\u200cهای نصف ساخته شده و رابطه\u200cهایشان بنیاد دارد. ما همچنین تکنیک های پیش آموزش و منطقی را روی مدل گرافیک برای کار QA توسعه می کنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای روی چندین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای واقعی که از یک موتور تجاری جمع شده\u200cاند، فعالیت دسترسی ما را ثابت می\u200cکند. روش ما امتياز F1 را با 3.90 نقطه بر اساس پايگاه هنر بهتر مي کند.', 'tr': 'Web sahypasynda örän gaty strukturlyk maglumatlar, HTML tabanly täblikler we listler ýaly, komersiýaly gözlemek motorlary soragy jogaplamak üçin baý maglumat çeşmesini temin edýär. Web senediň, Web täbliklerinde we listlerde düz metin geçirişlerinden beýleki düzümler bar. Bu semantik düzümler täbliklerde we listlerde düzümler arasynda süýtgeşmeler taýýarlar. Birnäçe bar öwrenmeler täblisaň we listleri metin parçalary bilen düz sened diýip barlaýar we semantik maglumaty strukturalarda gizlenýän işlemeýärler. Bu kagyzda, biz Web täblikleriniň we listleriniň sistematik ýarym strukturlyk maglumatyň we ilişkileriniň sistematik bir kategoriýasyna daýanýan bir roman grafisini teklip edip görýäris. Biz hem QA zady üçin öňünden öňünden okuwçy we razylyg tekniklerini grafik nusgasynda döredýäris. Komerciýa motordan toplanýan birnäçe hakyky datajyk düzümlerinde örän çarpyş deneyler biziň golaýymyzyň etkinliýetini barlaýarlar. Biziň ýagdaýymyz, F1 अ 3,90 puç şeklinde ýakynlaşdyrylýar.', 'de': 'Die reichhaltigen semi-strukturierten Daten im Web, wie HTML-basierte Tabellen und Listen, bieten kommerziellen Suchmaschinen eine reichhaltige Informationsquelle für die Beantwortung von Fragen (QA). Anders als Klartextpassagen in Webdokumenten haben Webtabellen und Listen inhärente Strukturen, die semantische Korrelationen zwischen verschiedenen Elementen in Tabellen und Listen aufweisen. Viele existierende Studien behandeln Tabellen und Listen als flache Dokumente mit Textstücken und nutzen in Strukturen versteckte semantische Informationen nicht gut. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neuartige grafische Darstellung von Web-Tabellen und -Listen vor, die auf einer systematischen Kategorisierung der Komponenten in semistrukturierten Daten sowie ihrer Beziehungen basiert. Außerdem entwickeln wir Vortrainings- und Argumentationstechniken am Graphenmodell für die QA-Aufgabe. Umfangreiche Experimente an mehreren realen Datensätzen, die von einer kommerziellen Engine gesammelt wurden, bestätigen die Wirksamkeit unseres Ansatzes. Unsere Methode verbessert die F1-Punktzahl um 3,90 Punkte gegenüber den hochmodernen Baselines.', 'af': "Die groot semistruktureerde data op die Web, soos HTML-gebaseerde tabelle en lyste, verskaf kommersiele soektog masjiene 'n ryk inligting bron vir vraag antwoord (QA). Verskillende van eenvoudige teks wagte in webdokumente, webtabelle en lyste het inherende strukture, wat semantiese korrelasies onder verskillende elemente in tabelle en lyste dra. Baie bestaande studies behandel tabelle en lyste as plat dokumente met stukke teks en maak nie goeie gebruik van semantiese inligting versteek in strukture nie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe graaf voorstelling van webtabelle en lyste gebaseer op 'n sistematiese kategorisasie van die komponente in semistruktureerde data en ook hul relasies. Ons ontwikkel ook voor-oefening en redekeningsteknike op die graafmodeel vir die QA taak. Name Ons metode verbeter F1 telling deur 3.90 punte oor die staat van die kuns basisline.", 'sq': 'The abundant semi-structured data on the Web, such as HTML-based tables and lists, provide commercial search engines a rich information source for question answering (QA).  Ndryshe nga kalimet e thjeshta të tekstit në dokumentet e internetit, tabelat dhe listat e internetit kanë struktura natyrore, të cilat mbajnë korrelacione semantike midis elementeve të ndryshme në tabela dhe lista. Many existing studies treat tables and lists as flat documents with pieces of text and do not make good use of semantic information hidden in structures.  Në këtë letër, propozojmë një përfaqësim grafik të ri të tabelave dhe listave të internetit bazuar në një kategorizim sistematik të komponenteve në të dhënat gjysmë-strukturuara si dhe marrëdhëniet e tyre. Ne gjithashtu zhvillojmë teknika paratrajnimi dhe arsyetimi në modelin e grafikut për detyrën QA. Eksperimente të gjera në disa grupe të dhënash të vërteta të mbledhura nga një motor komercial verifikojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë. Metoda jonë përmirëson rezultatin F1 me 3.90 pikë mbi linjat bazë më të larta.', 'am': 'የኢሜይል ገበታዎች እና ዝርዝሮች፣ የንግድ መረጃዎች የንግድ መረጃዎችን ለመጠያየቅ መልስ ሀብታም የሀብት መረጃ ምንጭ ሰጥተዋል፡፡ የተለየ የጽሑፍ ፋይሎች በመረጃ ሰነዶች፣ ገበታዎች እና ዝርዝሮች ያሉ መሠረቶች ይኖራሉ፤ እነርሱም በተለያዩ አካላት እና ዝርዝሮች መካከል የተሰናከሉ ግንኙነት ይሸከማሉ። ብዙዎች የሚኖሩት ተርሚቶች ገበታዎች እና ዝርዝሮች በጽሑፍ ክፍል የተሰራረቡ ሰነዱን በመቀበል ይጠቅማሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የዌብ ገበታዎች ማዕከላዎች እና የስርዓት ክፍተቶችን እና ግንኙነታቸውን በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ ክፍተቶችን በተመሳሳይ እና ዝርዝሮች ላይ የመረጃ ጉዳይ እና ዝርዝር እናደርጋለን፡፡ እና የQA ስራ መሠረት የፊደል ትምህርት እና ማስታወቂያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከንግድ ሚንኪን የተሰበሰቡት ብዙ የዳታ ተፈተናዎች የልግስናችን ውጤት እንዲያረጋግጡ ያረጋግጣሉ፡፡ የ.', 'hy': 'Համացանցի բազմաթիվ կիսակառուցված տվյալները, ինչպիսիք են HTML-ի հիմնված աղյուսակները և ցուցակները, տրամադրում են առևտրային որոնման շարժիչներին հարուստ տեղեկատվական աղբյուր հարցերի պատասխանելու համար: Different from plain text passages in Web documents, Web tables and lists have inherent structures, which carry semantic correlations among various elements in tables and lists.  Շատ գոյություն ունեցող ուսումնասիրություններ աղյուսակները և ցուցակները վերաբերում են հեռավոր փաստաթղթերին տեքստի կտորներով և չեն օգտագործում սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվությունը, որը թաքնված է կառուցվածքն In this paper, we propose a novel graph representation of Web tables and lists based on a systematic categorization of the components in semi-structured data as well as their relations.  Մենք նաև զարգանում ենք նախապատրաստման և մտածողական տեխնիկաներ QA-ի վերաբերյալ գծագրային մոդելի վրա: Մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը ստուգում են առևտրային շարժիչից հավաքված բազմաթիվ իրական տվյալների փորձարկումները: Մեր մեթոդը բարելավում է F1 գնահատականը 3.90 միավորով ամենաբարձր հիմնական գծերի վրա:', 'az': 'HTML tabanlńĪ tabletler v…ô listel…ôr kimi, ńįnternett…ô √ßox yarńĪ strukturlu veril…ôr, sual cavabńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn z…ôngin m…ôlumat m…ônb…ôsini t…ômin edir. Web bel…ôl…ôrind…ô, Web tabletlerind…ô v…ô listl…ôrd…ô m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôtn ke√ßiŇül…ôrind…ôn m√ľxt…ôlif quruluŇülar vardńĪr ki, √ßubuqlarda v…ô listl…ôrd…ô m√ľxt…ôlif elementl…ôr arasńĪnda semantik bańülantńĪlar daŇüńĪyar. H…ôqiq…ôt…ôn, bir √ßox m√∂vcud t…ôhsil tabletleri v…ô listl…ôri m…ôtn par√ßalarńĪ il…ô d√ľz bel…ôl…ôri kimi t…ôhsil edir v…ô strukturlarda gizl…ônmiŇü semantik m…ôlumatlarńĪ yaxŇüńĪ istifad…ô etm…ôyin. Bu kańüńĪzda, yarńĪ strukturlńĪ m…ôlumatlarńĪn v…ô iliŇükil…ôrin sistematik kategoriyasńĪna dayanan ńįnternet tabloslarńĪnńĪn v…ô listel…ôrinin yeni grafik g√∂st…ôricisini t…ôklif edirik. Biz d…ô QA iŇül…ôrinin grafik modeli √ľz…ôrind…ô …ôvv…ôl t…ôhsil v…ô razńĪlaŇüma teknikl…ôrini t…ôhsil edirik. T…ôr…ôf…ôli motordan toplanmńĪŇü bir ne√ß…ô h…ôqiq…ôt veril…ôn qurńüular √ľz…ôrind…ô geniŇü eksperimentl…ôr bizim yaxńĪnlńĪńüńĪmńĪzńĪn etkinlińüini t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Bizim metodumuz F1 n√∂qt…ôsini 3.90 n√∂qt…ôsin…ô q…ôd…ôr art ńĪq s…ôhif…ôl…ôrind…ô yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr.', 'bn': 'ওয়েবে বেশীর ভিত্তিক তথ্য, যেমন এইচটিএমএল ভিত্তিক টেবিল এবং তালিকা, বাণিজ্যিক অনুসন্ধান ইঞ্জিন প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য সমৃদ্ধ তথ্ Different from plain text passages in Web documents, Web tables and lists have inherent structures, which carry semantic correlations among various elements in tables and lists.  অনেক বিদ্যমান গবেষণা ট্যাব এবং তালিকাকে টেবিলের ফ্ল্যাট ডকুমেন্ট হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করে এবং তারা কাঠামোর মধ্যে লুকি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ওয়েব টেবিলের প্রতিনিধিত্বের একটি নভেল গ্রাফ প্রস্তাব করি এবং তালিকার তালিকা প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে সেমি কাঠামো ডাটা এবং তাদে আমরা কিউএ কাজের জন্য গ্রাফ মডেলের উপর পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ ও কৌশল তৈরি করি। বাণিজ্যিক ইঞ্জিন থেকে সংগ্রহ করা বেশ কয়েকটি বাস্তব তথ্যের পরীক্ষা আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার কার্যকর পরীক্ষা নি আমাদের পদ্ধতি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বেসেলাইনে ৩.', 'ca': "Les abondants dades semiestructurades de la Web, com les taules i llistes basades en HTML, proporcionen als motors de cerca comercials una font d'informació rica per respondre a preguntes (QA). Diferent de les passacions de text senzill en documents web, les taules web i les llistes tenen estructures inherents, que porten correlacions semàntiques entre diversos elements en taules i llistes. Molts estudis existents tracten taules i llistes com documents plans amb trossos de text i no utilitzen bé la informació semàntica amagada en estructures. En aquest paper, proposem una nova representació del gràfic de les taules i llistes web basades en una categorització sistemàtica dels components de les dades semiestructuradas i les seves relacions. We also develop pre-training and reasoning techniques on the graph model for the QA task.  Els extensos experiments en diversos conjunts de dades reals recollits d'un motor comercial verifiquen l'eficacia del nostre enfocament. El nostre mètode millora la puntuació F1 en 3,90 punts sobre les línies de base més avançades.", 'cs': 'Bohatá polostrukturovaná data na webu, jako jsou tabulky a seznamy založené na HTML, poskytují komerčním vyhledávačům bohatý informační zdroj pro odpověď na otázky (QA). Odlišně od prostých textových pasáží ve webových dokumentech mají webové tabulky a seznamy inherentní struktury, které nesou sémantické korelace mezi různými prvky v tabulkách a seznamech. Mnohé stávající studie považují tabulky a seznamy za ploché dokumenty s kusy textu a nevyužívají dobře sémantické informace skryté ve strukturách. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou grafovou reprezentaci webových tabulek a seznamů založenou na systematické kategorizaci komponent polostrukturovaných dat a jejich vztahů. Rovněž vyvíjíme techniky předškolení a uvažování na grafovém modelu pro úlohu QA. Rozsáhlé experimenty na několika reálných datových sadách shromážděných z komerčního motoru ověřují efektivitu našeho přístupu. Naše metoda zlepšuje skóre F1 o 3,90 body nad nejmodernějšími základními liniemi.', 'bs': 'Puno polu-strukturovanih podataka na internetu, poput tablica i lista na HTML-u, pružaju komercijalne pretraživačke motore bogati izvor informacija za odgovor na pitanje (QA). Drugačije od običnih tekstskih prolaza u internetskim dokumentima, internetskim tablama i listama imaju sadržene strukture, koje nose semantičke korelacije među različitim elementima u tablama i listama. Mnogi postojeći ispitivanja tretiraju tablice i liste kao ravne dokumente s komadima teksta i ne koriste dobro semantičke informacije skrivene u strukturama. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi grafik predstavljanja internetskih stolova i listova na temelju sistematske kategorije komponenta u polu strukturiranim podacima, kao i njihovim odnosima. Također razvijamo tehnike predobuke i razmatranja na grafičkom modelu za QA zadatak. Eksperimenti na nekoliko pravih podataka koji su skupljeni iz komercijalnog motora provjeravaju učinkovitost našeg pristupa. Naša metoda poboljšava rezultat F1 za 3,90 bodova iznad početnih linija umjetnosti.', 'et': 'Veebis leiduvad rikkalikud poolstruktureeritud andmed, näiteks HTML-põhised tabelid ja loendid, pakuvad äriotsingumootoritele rikkaliku teabeallika küsimustele vastamiseks. Erinevalt veebidokumentide lihttekstilõikudest on veebitabelitel ja loenditel oma struktuurid, mis kannavad tabelite ja loendite erinevate elementide semantilisi korrelatsioone. Paljudes olemasolevates uuringutes käsitletakse tabeleid ja loendeid kui tekstitükke sisaldavaid lamedaid dokumente ega kasuta hästi struktuuridesse peidetud semantilist teavet. Käesolevas töös pakume välja veebitabelite ja loendite uudse graafilise esituse, mis põhineb poolstruktureeritud andmete komponentide süstemaatilisel kategoorial ning nende seostel. Samuti töötame välja kvaliteedi tagamise ülesande graafilise mudeli eelkoolitus- ja arutlustehnikad. Meie lähenemisviisi tõhusust kinnitavad ulatuslikud eksperimendid mitmete kommertsmootorilt kogutud reaalsete andmekogumitega. Meie meetod parandab F1 skoori 3,90 punkti võrra võrreldes kaasaegsete lähtejoontega.', 'fi': 'Internetin runsaat puolistrukturoidut tiedot, kuten HTML-pohjaiset taulukot ja luettelot, tarjoavat kaupallisille hakukoneille monipuolisen tietolähteen kysymyksiin vastaamiseen (QA). Web-dokumenttien yksinkertaisesta tekstistä poiketen WWW-taulukoilla ja luetteloilla on luontaisia rakenteita, jotka kantavat semanttisia korrelaatioita taulukoiden ja luetteloiden eri elementtien välillä. Monet olemassa olevat tutkimukset käsittelevät taulukoita ja luetteloita litteinä asiakirjoina, joissa on tekstipalasia, eivätkä ne hyödynnä rakenteisiin piilotettua semanttista tietoa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta graafista esitystä web-taulukoista ja -listoista, jotka perustuvat systemaattiseen luokitteluun komponenteista puolistrukturoituun aineistoon sekä niiden suhteisiin. Kehitämme myös laadunvarmistustehtävän graafisen mallin esikoulutus- ja päättelytekniikoita. Laajat kokeilut useista kaupallisista koneista kerätyistä todellisista aineistoista vahvistavat lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden. Menetelmämme parantaa F1-pisteitä 3,90 pisteellä verrattuna viimeisimpiin perusviivoihin.', 'sk': 'Veliko polstrukturiranih podatkov na spletu, kot so tabele in seznami na podlagi HTML, zagotavljajo komercialnim iskalnikom bogat vir informacij za odgovore na vprašanja (QA). Spletne tabele in seznami, ki se razlikujejo od odlomkov z navadnim besedilom v spletnih dokumentih, imajo neločljive strukture, ki nosijo semantične korelacije med različnimi elementi v tabelah in seznamih. Številne obstoječe študije obravnavajo tabele in sezname kot ploske dokumente z deli besedila in ne uporabljajo dobro semantičnih informacij, skritih v strukturah. V prispevku predlagamo novo grafično predstavitev spletnih tabel in seznamov, ki temelji na sistematični kategorizaciji komponent v polstrukturiranih podatkih in njihovih relacijah. Razvijamo tudi predusposabljanje in razmišljanje o grafičnem modelu za nalogo kakovosti. Obsežni eksperimenti na več resničnih naborih podatkov, zbranih iz komercialnega motorja, preverjajo učinkovitost našega pristopa. Naša metoda izboljša rezultat F1 za 3,90 točke v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi osnovnimi črtami.', 'ha': "QA @ info: whatsthis Da yawa masu ƙidãya da za'a iya amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane kuma jerin kamar takardar aiki na rubutu kuma ba su yi amfani da amfani da zane-mutane da aka ɓõye cikin tsarin. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wani grafi na gaya wa abubuwan Web, kuma jerin ana samu a kan wani categori na'urar ƙanshi na ƙanshi cikin data da aka daidaita da shi da kuma mazauninsu. Kayya, Munã buɗe mafarin da masu kula a kan misalin grafi wa aikin QA. Akwai jarrabo masu ƙaranci a kan data masu gaskiya da aka samun daga mashine mai shagala, suna gaskata mafiya amfani da hanyarmu. Tsarinmu ya improve F1 score na 3.90 points kan halin-the-art.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ere kalah-kalah sing mengko gambar Text nang dokumen web, Tabel web lan listahan ulih dumateng structural navigation Laptop" and "Desktop Nang peurén iki, kita mudhaya un graf kanggo nyengkap anyar tentang karo Tabel web lan nganggo sistematik sing basa karo kategorisi sistematik sing komponénter karo data semi-structural dan kaya ngono alam-alam kuwi. Awakdhéwé éntuk nglebokake luwih-luwih lan tambah teknik nggawe barang nggawe model nang nggawe barang nggawe barang. Name Perintah sing dipunangé F1 ditambah sing 3.9 punti, dadi-sanga-sanga kuwi diagonalan', 'he': 'המידע המפורסם חצי מובנה ברשת, כמו שולחנות ומבוססים על HTML, מספקים מנועי חיפוש מסחריים מקור מידע עשיר לענות על שאלות (QA). שונה ממעברים טקסטים פשוטים במסמכים האינטרנטים, לוחות האינטרנט ורשימות יש מבנים נפרדים, אשר נושאים קשרים סמנטיים בין אלמנטים שונים בלוחות ורשימות. Many existing studies treat tables and lists as flat documents with pieces of text and do not make good use of semantic information hidden in structures.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מייצג גרף חדש של שולחנות ורשימות באינטרנט המבוססים על הקטגוריזציה מערכתית של המרכיבים במידע חצי-מבנה כמו גם מערכות היחסים שלהם. אנחנו מפתחים גם טכניקות התאמנות והגיון על מודל הגרף למשימה QA. ניסויים רחבים על מספר קבוצות נתונים אמיתיים שנאספו מנוע מסחרי מאשרים את היעילות של הגישה שלנו. השיטה שלנו משפר את נקודת F1 ב-3.90 נקודות מעל קווי הבסיס המאוחרים.', 'bo': 'The abundant semi-structured data on the Web, such as HTML-based tables and lists, provide commercial search engines a rich information source for question answering (QA). Different from plain text passages in Web documents, Web tables and lists have inherent structures, which carry semantic correlations among various elements in tables and lists. Many existing studies treat tables and lists as flat documents with pieces of text and do not make good use of semantic information hidden in structures. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་བ་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་ཝེབ་ཤོག་བྱང་དང་ཐོ་འགོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚན་དང་ཁོང ང་ཚོས་QA ལས་ཀ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཀྱང་མཐོང་བ། རྒྱལ་སྤྱིའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ཞིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་བརྙན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བསྡུར་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་འཐབ་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་༡།'}
{'en': 'Is Killed More Significant than Fled? A Contextual Model for Salient Event Detection', 'ar': 'هل قتل أخطر من هرب؟ نموذج سياقي لاكتشاف الأحداث البارزة', 'fr': 'Le fait de tuer est-il plus important que de fuir\xa0? Un modèle contextuel pour la détection des événements marquants', 'pt': 'A morte é mais significativa do que a fuga? Um modelo contextual para detecção de eventos salientes', 'es': '¿Matar es más importante que huir? Un modelo contextual para la detección de eventos destacados', 'ja': '殺されることは逃げることよりも有意義ですか？顕著なイベント検出のためのコンテキストモデル', 'zh': '杀重于亡乎? 所以显检者上下文模', 'hi': 'क्या मारे गए भाग की तुलना में अधिक महत्वपूर्ण हैं? मुख्य घटना का पता लगाने के लिए एक प्रासंगिक मॉडल', 'ru': 'Является ли убийство более значительным, чем бегство? Контекстная модель для обнаружения явного события', 'ga': 'An bhfuil Maraíodh Níos Suntasaí ná a Theith? Samhail Chomhthéacsúil le hAghaidh Ócáidí Soiléire', 'ka': 'სბთვნ ლთ ვ ოჲ-გაზნჲ ჲრ ტლვე? კონტექსტური მოდელი სილიენტის მოვლენების განახლებისთვის', 'el': 'Ο θάνατος είναι πιο σημαντικός από τον Φλεντ; Ένα μοντέλο περιβάλλοντος για την ανίχνευση σημαντικών συμβάντων', 'hu': 'A megölés jelentősebb, mint Fled? Kontextuális modell a sós események felismerésére', 'it': 'Uccidere è più significativo di fuggire? Un modello contestuale per la rilevazione di eventi salienti', 'kk': 'Өтірілсін бе? Салиент оқиғаны анықтау үшін контексті модель', 'lt': 'Is Killed More Significant than Fled?  Kontekstinis saldžių įvykių nustatymo modelis', 'mk': 'Is Killed More Significant than Fled?  A Contextual Model for Salient Event Detection', 'ml': 'Is Killed More Significant than Fled?  സാഹചര്യത്തിന്റെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉള്ളിലുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Jinqatlu Aktar Sinifikanti minn Fuq? Mudell Kuntest għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Avvenimenti Saljenti', 'mn': 'Флайдаас илүү чухал уу? Салиент үйл явдал ойлгохын тулд контекст загвар', 'ms': 'Adakah terbunuh lebih penting daripada melarikan diri? Model Konteksual untuk Pengesanan Peristiwa Salient', 'no': 'Er sletta meir signifikant enn flett? Name', 'pl': 'Czy śmierć jest ważniejsza od ucieczki? Model kontekstowy wykrywania wyraźnych zdarzeń', 'ro': 'Uciderea e mai importantă decât Fled? Un model contextual pentru detectarea evenimentelor saline', 'si': 'මැරුණාද ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ? සාලයින් සිද්ධ වෙන්න සොයාගන්න සම්බන්ධ මොඩේල්Name', 'sv': 'Är dödad viktigare än flydde? En sammanhangsmodell för identifiering av saliga händelser', 'so': 'Ma la dilaa Significant ka badan Flying? A Contextual Model for Salient Event Detection', 'sr': 'Da li je ubijen važniji od Fleda? Kontekstni model za otkrivanje izloženog događaja', 'ta': 'பறக்கப்பட்டதை விட அதிகமாக கொல்லப்பட்டுள்ளதா? Name', 'ur': 'بھلا بھاگ سے بڑھ کر مارے گئے ہیں؟ سلینٹ ایڈینٹ شناسایی کے لئے ایک کنٹکسٹیول موڈل', 'uz': 'Name @ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Giết có quan trọng hơn Fled không? Mô hình tương ứng để phát hiện sự kiện', 'bg': 'Убитият по-значим ли е от избягал? Контекст модел за откриване на важни събития', 'da': 'Er dræbt vigtigere end flygtet? En kontekstuel model til detektion af salthændelser', 'nl': 'Is gedood belangrijker dan gevlucht? Een contextueel model voor detectie van opvallende gebeurtenissen', 'hr': 'Je li ubijen važniji od Fleda? Kontekstni model za otkrivanje liječnih događaja', 'de': 'Ist der Tod bedeutsamer als geflohen? Ein Kontextmodell für die Erkennung von auffälligen Ereignissen', 'ko': '도망치는 것보다 죽음이 더 중요합니까?현저한 이벤트 검측의 상하문 모델', 'fa': 'آیا بیشتر از پرواز کشته شده؟ Name', 'id': 'Apakah terbunuh lebih signifikan daripada melarikan diri? Model Konteksual untuk Deteksi Kejadian Salient', 'sq': 'A është vrarë më e rëndësishme se i arratisur? A Contextual Model for Salient Event Detection', 'af': 'Is gedood meer belangrik as vlieg? Name', 'sw': 'Je, imeuawa zaidi kuliko ndege? Modeli ya Context kwa ajili ya Kugundua Tukio', 'tr': 'Öldirilen Flesden has möhüm barmy? Ýabşyrma modi', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք սպանվել ավելի նշանակալի է, քան փախչել: Comment', 'az': "Məgər Fled'dən daha möhtərəmi öldürülmü? Səflətli vaxt keşif üçün Kontekst Modeli", 'am': 'ከFlying ይልቅ የተጨማሪው ይገድላልን? አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'bn': 'উড়িয়ে যাওয়ার চেয়ে বেশী স্বাক্ষর কি মারা গেছে? Name', 'et': 'Kas tapetud on tähtsam kui põgenenud? Sündmuste tuvastamise kontekstimudel', 'ca': "Is Killed More Significant than Fled?  Un model contextual de detecció d'events saludables", 'cs': 'Je zabití významnější než útěk? Kontextový model pro detekci výrazných událostí', 'bs': 'Da li je ubijen važniji od Fleda? Kontekstni model za otkrivanje izloženog događaja', 'fi': 'Onko tapettu tärkeämpää kuin pakentu? Merkittävien tapahtumien havaitsemisen kontekstuaalinen malli', 'jv': "Opo malah luwih apik liyane layang nek padha ? Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'Is Killed More Significant than Fled?  Name', 'bo': 'དུས་མེད་འདི་Fled་ལས་གལ་ཅན་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཏེ་ཡིན་ནམ། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བྱ་འགུལ་བཙལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མ་དབྱིབས', 'ha': 'Shin, an kashe Za Baƙaitacce ko Fara? @ action', 'sk': 'Je umor pomembnejši od pobega? Kontekstualni model za zaznavanje slanih dogodkov'}
{'en': 'Identifying the key events in a document is critical to holistically understanding its important information. Although measuring the salience of events is highly contextual, most previous work has used a limited representation of events that omits essential information. In this work, we propose a highly contextual model of event salience that uses a rich representation of events, incorporates document-level information and allows for interactions between latent event encodings. Our experimental results on an event salience dataset demonstrate that our model improves over previous work by an absolute 2-4 % on standard metrics, establishing a new state-of-the-art performance for the task. We also propose a new evaluation metric that addresses flaws in previous evaluation methodologies. Finally, we discuss the importance of salient event detection for the downstream task of summarization.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد الأحداث الرئيسية في المستند أمرًا بالغ الأهمية لفهم معلوماته المهمة بشكل شامل. على الرغم من أن قياس بروز الأحداث هو سياقي للغاية ، إلا أن معظم الأعمال السابقة قد استخدمت تمثيلًا محدودًا للأحداث التي تغفل المعلومات الأساسية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا سياقيًا للغاية لروعة الأحداث يستخدم تمثيلًا ثريًا للأحداث ، ويتضمن معلومات على مستوى المستند ويسمح بالتفاعل بين ترميزات الأحداث الكامنة. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية على مجموعة بيانات الحدث البارزة أن نموذجنا يتحسن عن العمل السابق بنسبة 2-4٪ على المقاييس القياسية ، مما يؤدي إلى إنشاء أداء متطور جديد للمهمة. نقترح أيضًا مقياس تقييم جديدًا يعالج أوجه القصور في منهجيات التقييم السابقة. أخيرًا ، نناقش أهمية الكشف عن الأحداث البارزة لمهمة التلخيص النهائية.', 'fr': "L'identification des événements clés d'un document est essentielle pour comprendre de manière holistique ses informations importantes. Bien que la mesure de la prépondérance des événements soit hautement contextuelle, la plupart des travaux précédents ont utilisé une représentation limitée des événements qui omettent des informations essentielles. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un modèle hautement contextuel de saillance des événements qui utilise une représentation riche des événements, intègre des informations au niveau du document et permet des interactions entre les encodages d'événements latents. Nos résultats expérimentaux sur un ensemble de données de saillance d'événement démontrent que notre modèle s'améliore par rapport aux travaux précédents de 2 à 4\xa0% absolus par rapport aux mesures standard, établissant ainsi une nouvelle performance de pointe pour la tâche. Nous proposons également une nouvelle mesure d'évaluation qui corrige les failles des méthodologies d'évaluation précédentes. Enfin, nous discutons de l'importance de la détection des événements saillants pour la tâche de synthèse en aval.", 'pt': 'Identificar os principais eventos em um documento é fundamental para compreender holisticamente suas informações importantes. Embora medir a relevância de eventos seja altamente contextual, a maioria dos trabalhos anteriores usou uma representação limitada de eventos que omite informações essenciais. Neste trabalho, propomos um modelo altamente contextual de saliência de eventos que usa uma rica representação de eventos, incorpora informações em nível de documento e permite interações entre codificações de eventos latentes. Nossos resultados experimentais em um conjunto de dados de saliência de eventos demonstram que nosso modelo melhora em relação ao trabalho anterior em absolutos 2-4% nas métricas padrão, estabelecendo um novo desempenho de última geração para a tarefa. Também propomos uma nova métrica de avaliação que aborda falhas em metodologias de avaliação anteriores. Finalmente, discutimos a importância da detecção de eventos salientes para a tarefa posterior de sumarização.', 'es': 'La identificación de los eventos clave de un documento es fundamental para comprender de manera integral su información importante. Si bien la medición de la prominencia de los eventos es altamente contextual, la mayoría de los trabajos anteriores han utilizado una representación limitada de eventos que omite información esencial. En este trabajo, proponemos un modelo altamente contextual de prominencia de eventos que utiliza una rica representación de eventos, incorpora información a nivel de documento y permite interacciones entre codificaciones de eventos latentes. Nuestros resultados experimentales en un conjunto de datos de relevancia de eventos demuestran que nuestro modelo mejora con respecto al trabajo anterior en un 2-4% absoluto con respecto a las métricas estándar, lo que establece un nuevo rendimiento de vanguardia para la tarea. También proponemos una nueva métrica de evaluación que aborde los defectos de las metodologías de evaluación anteriores. Finalmente, discutimos la importancia de la detección de eventos destacados para la tarea posterior de resumir.', 'ja': '文書内の重要なイベントを特定することは、その重要な情報を全体的に理解するために重要です。事象の顕著さを測定することは非常に文脈的であるが、以前のほとんどの仕事では、本質的な情報を省略した事象の限定的な表現を使用してきた。この研究では、イベントの豊富な表現を使用し、ドキュメントレベルの情報を組み込み、潜在的なイベントエンコーディング間の相互作用を可能にする、非常にコンテキスト性の高いイベント顕著性のモデルを提案します。イベントの顕著性データセットの実験結果は、当社のモデルがこれまでの作業よりも標準的な指標で絶対的に2 ～ 4 ％向上し、タスクの新しい最先端のパフォーマンスを確立していることを示しています。また、以前の評価方法論の欠陥に対処する新しい評価指標も提案しています。最後に、要約の下流タスクのための顕著なイベント検出の重要性について説明します。', 'zh': '知文档之要,于周知其要。 虽量事之显著性,高上下文也,然多前事有限,略其信息。 于是建一上下文之事显著性,宜其丰衍,并文档信息,许潜编码之交。 吾于事显著性数集上之实验结果表明,吾形于格指标,绝于前2-4%,为务立先进之性。 又立新评指标,以决前法之缺陷。 最后,我们讨论了显事检测下流汇总的重要。', 'hi': 'किसी दस्तावेज़ में प्रमुख घटनाओं की पहचान करना इसकी महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी को समग्र रूप से समझने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। यद्यपि घटनाओं की विशिष्टता को मापना अत्यधिक प्रासंगिक है, अधिकांश पिछले काम ने उन घटनाओं के सीमित प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग किया है जो आवश्यक जानकारी को छोड़ देते हैं। इस काम में, हम घटना के एक अत्यधिक प्रासंगिक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो घटनाओं के समृद्ध प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करता है, दस्तावेज़-स्तर की जानकारी को शामिल करता है और अव्यक्त घटना एन्कोडिंग के बीच बातचीत की अनुमति देता है। एक घटना डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल मानक मैट्रिक्स पर एक पूर्ण 2-4% द्वारा पिछले काम पर सुधार करता है, कार्य के लिए एक नया अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन स्थापित करता है। हम एक नया मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक भी प्रस्तावित करते हैं जो पिछले मूल्यांकन पद्धतियों में खामियों को संबोधित करता है। अंत में, हम सारांशीकरण के डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य के लिए मुख्य घटना का पता लगाने के महत्व पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Выявление ключевых событий в документе имеет решающее значение для целостного понимания его важной информации. Хотя измерение значимости событий носит весьма контекстуальный характер, в большинстве предыдущих работ использовалось ограниченное представление событий, в котором отсутствует существенная информация. В этой работе мы предлагаем высококонтекстную модель выраженности событий, которая использует богатое представление событий, включает информацию на уровне документа и позволяет взаимодействовать между кодировками скрытых событий. Наши экспериментальные результаты по набору данных о выраженности событий показывают, что наша модель улучшается по сравнению с предыдущей работой на абсолютные 2-4% по стандартным метрикам, создавая новую современную производительность для задачи. Мы также предлагаем новый показатель оценки, который учитывает недостатки в предыдущих методологиях оценки. Наконец, мы обсуждаем важность обнаружения существенных событий для задачи обобщения.', 'ga': 'Tá sé ríthábhachtach na príomhimeachtaí i ndoiciméad a aithint chun a fhaisnéis thábhachtach a thuiscint go hiomlánaíoch. Cé gur fíor-chomhthéacs é sainiúlacht na n-imeachtaí a thomhas, bhain formhór na hoibre a rinneadh roimhe seo úsáid as léiriú teoranta ar imeachtaí a fhágann faisnéis riachtanach ar lár. San obair seo, molaimid múnla an-chomhthéacsúil de shuntas imeachtaí a úsáideann léiriú saibhir imeachtaí, a ionchorpraíonn faisnéis ar leibhéal doiciméad agus a cheadaíonn idirghníomhaíochtaí idir ionchóduithe teagmhas folaigh. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha ar thacar sonraí suntasachta imeachtaí go dtagann feabhas iomlán 2-4% ar ár samhail ar obair roimhe seo ar mhéadracht chaighdeánach, ag bunú feidhmíochta nua den scoth don tasc. Molaimid freisin méadrach meastóireachta nua a théann i ngleic le lochtanna i modheolaíochtaí meastóireachta roimhe seo. Ar deireadh, pléifimid an tábhacht a bhaineann le heachtraí suntasacha a bhrath do thasc iartheachtacha an achoimre.', 'el': 'Ο προσδιορισμός των βασικών γεγονότων σε ένα έγγραφο είναι κρίσιμος για την ολιστική κατανόηση των σημαντικών πληροφοριών του. Αν και η μέτρηση της σημασίας των γεγονότων είναι ιδιαίτερα συναφής, οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν χρησιμοποιήσει μια περιορισμένη αναπαράσταση των γεγονότων που παραλείπει βασικές πληροφορίες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο υψηλής περιεκτικότητας της σημασίας συμβάντων που χρησιμοποιεί μια πλούσια αναπαράσταση συμβάντων, ενσωματώνει πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο εγγράφου και επιτρέπει αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ λανθάνουσας κωδικοποίησης συμβάντων. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς γεγονότων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας βελτιώνεται σε σχέση με την προηγούμενη εργασία κατά ένα απόλυτο 2-4% σε τυποποιημένες μετρήσεις, δημιουργώντας μια νέα απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την εργασία. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια νέα μετρική αξιολόγηση που αντιμετωπίζει ελαττώματα σε προηγούμενες μεθοδολογίες αξιολόγησης. Τέλος, συζητάμε τη σημασία της ανίχνευσης σημαντικών συμβάντων για το μεταγενέστερο έργο της συνοψίας.', 'hu': 'A dokumentum kulcsfontosságú eseményeinek azonosítása kulcsfontosságú a fontos információk holisztikus megértéséhez. Bár az események jelentőségének mérése rendkívül kontextuális, a legtöbb korábbi munka korlátozott mértékű események ábrázolását használta, amelyek kihagyják az alapvető információkat. Ebben a munkában egy rendkívül kontextuális eseményjellemző modellt javasolunk, amely az események gazdag ábrázolását használja, dokumentumszintű információkat tartalmaz és lehetővé teszi a látens eseménykódolások közötti interakciókat. Egy eseményjelentőségi adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy modellünk a korábbi munkákhoz képest abszolút 2-4%-kal javul a standard mérőszámokhoz képest, ezzel új, korszerű teljesítményt teremtve a feladathoz. Javasoljuk továbbá egy új értékelési metrikát, amely kezeli a korábbi értékelési módszerek hibáit. Végül megvitatjuk a kiemelkedő események felismerésének fontosságát a downstream összefoglalási feladat szempontjából.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის გასაკუთარი მოვლენების განსაცნობა კრიტიკურია, რომ გასაკუთარი ინფორმაციის გასაკუთარი გასაკეთება. თუმცა მოვლენების სილექცია უფრო კონტექსტურია, უფრო წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო გამოყენება განსაზღვრებული მოვლენების გამოყენება, რომელიც უფრო ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მოგვეყვებით ძალიან კონტექსტური მოდელ მოვლენების სლიენციის, რომელიც გამოყენებს ბედნიერი მოვლენების გამოსაყენება, კონკუმენტის დონე ინფორმაცია და შე ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების შესაძლებლობად ჩვენი მოდელი წინა სამუშაო მუშაო 2-4%-ით სტანდარტული მეტრიკის შესაძლებლობად, ახალი სამუშ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი განსაზღვრება მეტრიკა, რომელიც წინა განსაზღვრებული მეტოდოლოგიების შეცდომის მიხედვით. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ განსაკუთრებით გასანიშვნელოვანი მოვლენების განსაკუთრების გასანიშვნელოვანი საკუთრებისა.', 'lt': 'Pagrindinių įvykių identifikavimas dokumente yra labai svarbus siekiant visapusiškai suprasti jo svarbią informaciją. Nors renginių svarbos matavimas yra labai kontekstinis, dauguma ankstesnių darbų naudojo ribotą renginių, kurie nepateikia esminės informacijos, atstovavimą. Šiame darbe siūlome labai kontekstinį renginių švelninimo model į, kuris naudoja daug renginių atstovavimo, apima dokumentų lygmens informaciją ir leidžia sąveikauti tarp latentinių renginių kodavimo. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai renginių rūgštingumo duomenų rinkinyje rodo, kad mūsų modelis, palyginti su ankstesniu darbu, pagerėja absoliučiai 2-4 % standartinių metrinių rodiklių, nustatant naują pažangiausią užduoties rezultatą. Mes taip pat siūlome naują vertinimo rodiklį, kuriuo sprendžiami ankstesnių vertinimo metodų trūkumai. Galiausiai diskutuojame apie svarbių įvykių aptikimo svarbą tolesniam apibendrinimo uždaviniui.', 'it': "Identificare gli eventi chiave in un documento è fondamentale per comprendere olisticamente le sue informazioni importanti. Sebbene misurare la salienza degli eventi sia altamente contestuale, la maggior parte dei lavori precedenti ha utilizzato una rappresentazione limitata di eventi che omette informazioni essenziali. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un modello altamente contestuale di salienza degli eventi che utilizza una ricca rappresentazione degli eventi, incorpora informazioni a livello di documento e consente interazioni tra codifica di eventi latenti. I nostri risultati sperimentali su un set di dati di salience di eventi dimostrano che il nostro modello migliora rispetto ai lavori precedenti di un assoluto 2-4% sulle metriche standard, stabilendo una nuova performance all'avanguardia per l'attività. Proponiamo anche una nuova metrica di valutazione che affronti i difetti delle metodologie di valutazione precedenti. Infine, discutiamo l'importanza del rilevamento di eventi salienti per il compito a valle di sintesi.", 'kk': 'Құжаттағы кілт оқиғаларды анықтау өзінің маңызды мәліметін түсініктеу үшін тәуелді. Оқиғалардың тәртіпсіздігін өлшемі көп контексті болса да, алдыңғы жұмыс маңызды мәліметті шектелген оқиғалардың шектелігін қолданады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, оқиғалардың бағасы көрсетілетін, құжаттың деңгейінің мәліметін қосу және соңғы оқиғалардың кодтамасының арасындағы әрқашамдылығын қолданатын оқиғалардың баға Оқиғалардың тесперименттік нәтижелеріміз оқиғалардың бағытты деректер жиынының алдыңғы жұмысын стандартты метрикадағы абсолюттік 2-4% арқылы жақсартып, тапсырманың жаңа күй- жайындағы жағда Мұндай-ақ біз алдыңғы оқу методологияларында жаңа оқу метрикалығын таңдаймыз. Соңғы сәтте, жазылу тапсырмасының төменгі тапсырмасының бағытты оқиғаларды анықтау маңыздысын талқыладық.', 'mk': 'Identifying the key events in a document is critical to holistically understanding its important information.  Иако мерењето на значењето на настаните е високо контекстно, повеќето претходни работи користат ограничено претставување на настаните кои ги пропуштаат суштинските информации. Во оваа работа, предложуваме високо контекстен модел на славност на настаните кој користи богато претставување на настаните, вклучува информации на документно ниво и овозможува интеракции помеѓу лантните кодирања на настаните. Нашите експериментални резултати на податоците за состојба на настаните покажуваат дека нашиот модел се подобрува во однос на претходната работа со апсолутно 2-4 отсто на стандардната метрика, воспоставувајќи нова најнова изведба за задачата. Ние, исто така, предложуваме нова метрика за евалуација која ги решава недостатоците во претходните методологии за евалуација. Конечно, разговараме за важноста на значајното детекција на настаните за понатамошната задача на резултатирањето.', 'mt': 'Identifying the key events in a document is critical to holistically understanding its important information.  Għalkemm il-kejl tal-importanza tal-avvenimenti huwa kuntestwali ħafna, il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti uża rappreżentanza limitata ta’ avvenimenti li ma jagħtux informazzjoni essenzjali. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu mudell kuntestwali ħafna ta’ sensittività ta’ avvenimenti li juża rappreżentazzjoni rikka ta’ avvenimenti, jinkorpora informazzjoni fil-livell tad-dokument u jippermetti interazzjonijiet bejn l-ikkodifikar ta’ avvenimenti moħbija. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta dwar is-salienza tal-avvenimenti juru li l-mudell tagħna jtejjeb fuq ix-xogħol preċedenti b’assolut ta’ 2-4 % fuq il-metriċi standard, li jistabbilixxi prestazzjoni ġdida tal-a ħħar għall-kompitu. Nipproponu wkoll metrika ġdida ta’ evalwazzjoni li tindirizza nuqqasijiet fil-metodoloġiji ta’ evalwazzjoni preċedenti. Fl-aħħar nett, niddiskutu l-importanza tas-sejba ta’ avvenimenti importanti għall-kompitu downstream tas-sommarju.', 'ml': 'ഒരു രേഖയിലെ താക്കോലുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതി സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ വ്യാപാരം അളന്നാലും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രവൃത്തിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്ന സാഹചര്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലുള്ള ഒരു ഉത്തമമാതൃകയാണ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്. അവസ്ഥ സംഭവി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സെനഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന We also propose a new evaluation metric that addresses flaws in previous evaluation methodologies.  അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d സാഹചര്യം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ് സംസാരിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti peristiwa kunci dalam dokumen adalah penting untuk memahami maklumat pentingnya secara holistik. Walaupun mengukur kelebihan peristiwa adalah sangat kontekstual, kebanyakan kerja sebelumnya telah menggunakan perwakilan terhad peristiwa yang melewatkan maklumat penting. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan model kontekstual yang sangat penting peristiwa yang menggunakan perwakilan yang kaya peristiwa, memasukkan maklumat aras dokumen dan membolehkan interaksi antara pengekodan peristiwa tersembunyi. Hasil percubaan kami pada set data salience peristiwa menunjukkan bahawa model kami meningkat lebih daripada kerja sebelumnya dengan 2-4% mutlak pada metrik piawai, menetapkan prestasi baru-state-of-the-art untuk tugas. Kami juga melamar metrik penilaian baru yang mengatasi kesalahan dalam metodologi penilaian terdahulu. Akhirnya, kita membincangkan penting pengesan peristiwa yang penting untuk tugas turun ringkasan.', 'mn': 'Документын чухал үйл явдлыг тайлбарлах нь хамгийн чухал мэдээллийг бүрэн ойлгохын тулд чухал. Хэдийгээр үйл явдлын цэвэрлэлийг хэмжих нь маш өндөр нөхцөл байдалтай ч, ихэнх өмнөх ажил нь чухал мэдээллийг алдагдах үйл явдлын хязгаарлалтыг ашиглаж байна. Энэ ажил дээр бид үйл явдлын баян төлөвлөгөөг ашиглаж, баримт түвшинд мэдээллийг бүрдүүлж, сүүлийн үйл явдлын кодлогын хоорондын харилцаа холбогдох боломжтой өндөр нөхцөл байдлын загварыг санал бол Бидний туршилтын үр дүн нь үйл явдлын шингээлийн өгөгдлийн багц дээр бидний загвар өмнөх ажлын хувьд стандарт метрик дээр 2-4%-аар сайжруулж, ажлын шинэ урлагийн үйл явдал үүсгэдэг. Мөн бид өмнөх үнэлгээний метрологид буруу зүйлсийг тайлбарладаг шинэ үнэлгээний метрик санал болгож байна. Эцэст нь бид жинхэнэ үйл явдлын хамгийн чухал талаар ярьдаг.', 'ro': 'Identificarea evenimentelor cheie dintr-un document este esențială pentru înțelegerea holistică a informațiilor sale importante. Deși măsurarea importanței evenimentelor este foarte contextuală, majoritatea lucrărilor anterioare au folosit o reprezentare limitată a evenimentelor care omite informațiile esențiale. În această lucrare, propunem un model extrem de contextual de saliență a evenimentelor care utilizează o reprezentare bogată a evenimentelor, încorporează informații la nivel de document și permite interacțiuni între codările de evenimente latente. Rezultatele experimentale ale unui set de date de importanță a evenimentelor demonstrează că modelul nostru se îmbunătățește față de lucrările anterioare cu un nivel absolut de 2-4% față de măsurătorile standard, stabilind o performanță nouă de ultimă generație pentru sarcină. De asemenea, propunem o nouă metrică de evaluare care abordează defectele metodologiilor de evaluare anterioare. În cele din urmă, discutăm importanța detectării evenimentelor importante pentru sarcina din aval de rezumare.', 'no': 'Å identifisera nøkkelhendingane i eit dokument er kritisk for å heilt forstå sin viktige informasjon. Selv om det er svært kontekstisk å måla saliensjonen av hendingar, har det meste tidlegare arbeidet brukt ein begrenset representasjon av hendingar som ikkje gjer viktige informasjon. I denne arbeida foreslår vi ein høg kontekst- modell for hendingar som brukar ein rikt representasjon av hendingar, inkluderer dokumentnivåinformasjon og tillater interaksjonar mellom latente hendingskodingar. Eksperimentale resultatet våre på ei datasett for utslipp av hendingar viser at modellen vårt forbedrar over tidlegare arbeid med ein absolutt 2-4% på standardmetrikn, og oppretter ein ny status-of-the-art performance for oppgåva. Vi foreslår også ein ny evalueringsmetrik som adresserar feil i førre evalueringsmetodar. I slutt diskuterer vi om viktigheten for oppdaging av salient hendingar for nedtrekkoppgåva for sammendraging.', 'sr': 'Identifikacija ključnih događaja u dokumentu je kritična za prazno razumevanje svojih važnih informacija. Iako je mjerenje salijencije događaja veoma kontekstualno, većina prethodnog rada koristila je ograničenu predstavu događaja koji odbacuje važne informacije. U ovom poslu predlažemo visoko kontekstualni model salicije događaja koji koristi bogatu predstavu događaja, uključuje informacije na nivou dokumenta i omogućava interakciju između latentnih kodiranja događaja. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o saliciji događaja pokazuju da se naš model poboljšava preko prethodnog rada sa apsolutnom 2-4% na standardnim metrikama, uspostavljajući novi postupak umjetnosti za zadatak. Takoðe predlažemo novu metriku za procjenu koja rešava nedostatke u prethodnim metodama procjene. Konačno, razgovaramo o važnosti otkrivanja saliènih događaja za potpuni zadatak sažete.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada dhacdooyinka muhiimka ah ee dukumentiga waa muhiim in aad si quduus ah u fahanto macluumaadkiisa muhiimka ah. In kastoo ay qiyaasto dhamaadka dhacdooyinku waa mid aad u adag, shaqada ugu horeeyay ayaa u isticmaalay wakiilada dhacdooyinka oo ka taga macluumaadka muhiimka ah. In this work, we propose a highly contextual model of event salience that uses a rich representation of events, incorporates document-level information and allows for interactions between latent event encodings.  Imtixaankayada ku saabsan danbiyada dhacdooyinka ayaa muujiya in qaababkayagu uu horumarinayo shaqada hore oo ka hormaray 2-4% oo ku qoran metricada caadiga ah, kaasoo dhisaya tababar-farshaxanka cusub ee shaqada. Sidoo kale waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab cusub oo qiimeynta ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka hore. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu sheekeysanaynaa muhiimka la xiriira baahida dhacdooyinka gadashada ee shaqada xiliga hoose-hoose.', 'si': 'දස්තාවෙන් ඇතුලේ යතුරු අවස්ථාවක් අඳුරගන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන්. අවස්ථාවන්ගේ සිලියාන්සිය අවස්ථාවක් ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ගොඩක් කලින් අවස්ථාවන්ගේ සී මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා සිද්ධ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, සිද්ධ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝ අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් 2-4%  අපි අලුත් විශ්ලේෂණ මෙට්\u200dරික් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම කලින් විශ්ලේෂණ විධාන අන්තිමේදි, අපි කතා කරනවා සුරකුණු සාර්ථක සොයාගන්න අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ගැන.', 'sv': 'Att identifiera de viktigaste händelserna i ett dokument är avgörande för att holistiskt förstå dess viktiga information. Även om mätningen av händelsernas framträdande är mycket kontextuell, har de flesta tidigare arbeten använt en begränsad representation av händelser som utelämnar väsentlig information. I detta arbete föreslår vi en mycket kontextuell modell av händelsesaliens som använder en rik representation av händelser, införlivar dokumentnivå information och möjliggör interaktioner mellan latenta händelsekodningar. Våra experimentella resultat på en händelsesaliens datauppsättning visar att vår modell förbättras med absolut 2-4% jämfört med tidigare arbete, vilket skapar en ny toppmodern prestanda för uppgiften. Vi föreslår också ett nytt utvärderingsmått som åtgärdar brister i tidigare utvärderingsmetoder. Slutligen diskuterar vi betydelsen av framträdande händelsedetektering för nedströmsuppgiften för sammanfattningen.', 'ta': 'ஆவணத்தில் உள்ள விசையான நிகழ்வுகளை அடையாளம் முக்கியமானது அதன் முக்கியமான தகவலை புரிந்து கொள்ள. நிகழ்வுகளின் விற்பனையை அளவிட்டாலும் மிகவும் கடினமாக இருக்கும், முந்தைய வேலை மிகவும் குறைந்த நிகழ்வுகளின் குறிப்பிட் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு மிகவும் தற்போதைய நிகழ்வு விற்பனையின் மாதிரி முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது நிகழ்வுகளின் பெரும் பாதிப்பு, ஆவ நிகழ்வு விற்பனை தகவல் அமைப்பில் எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது முந்தைய வேலையில் எங்கள் மாதிரி முழுவதும் 2-4% முறையாக மேம்படுகிறது  நாம் முந்தைய மதிப்பு முறைமையில் தவறுகளை குறிக்கும் புதிய மதிப்பு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இறுதியில், நாம் விற்பனையான நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதின் முக்கியமானதை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் சுருக்கம் செய்ய', 'ur': 'ایک سندмент میں کلی ایڈیونٹوں کی شناسایی کرنا اس کے اہم معلومات کو سمجھنے کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ اگرچہ اتفاقات کے سائل کا اندازہ بہت زیادہ متوسط ہے، بہت سے اگلے کام نے اتفاقات کی ایک محدودہ نمایش استعمال کی ہے جو ضروری معلومات کو چھوڑ دیتی ہے. ہم اس کام میں ایک بہت متوسط موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جو ایڈیونٹ سیلینس کے مطابق بہترین نمونڈ استعمال کرتا ہے، دکھانے-سطح معلومات میں شامل کرتا ہے اور لٹینٹ ایڈیونٹ ایڈیونڈ کے درمیان اپنا اپنا ہمارے آزمائش کے نتائج ایک ایمینٹ سیلینس ڈیٹ سٹ پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا مدل پہلے کام پر مطلق 2-4% کے ذریعہ استاندارڈ میٹریک کے ذریعہ بہتر ہوتا ہے، اور اس کام کے لئے ایک نئی حالت کی آهنت کی پرورش مقرر کرتا ہے. ہم نے بھی ایک نئی ارزیابی متریک کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو پہلے ارزیابی methodologies میں فساد کا مشکل کرتا ہے. بالآخر، ہم نے سائل ایڈینٹ شناسیٹ کی اہم بات کرتی ہے کہ سائنٹریم کام کے لئے نازل ہونے کے لئے۔', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja kluczowych wydarzeń w dokumencie ma kluczowe znaczenie dla całościowego zrozumienia jego ważnych informacji. Chociaż pomiar znaczenia wydarzeń jest bardzo kontekstowy, większość poprzednich prac wykorzystuje ograniczoną reprezentację zdarzeń, która pomija istotne informacje. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy wysoce kontekstowy model saliencji zdarzeń, który wykorzystuje bogatą reprezentację zdarzeń, uwzględnia informacje na poziomie dokumentu i pozwala na interakcje między utajonymi kodowaniami zdarzeń. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne na zbiorze danych dotyczących saliencji zdarzeń pokazują, że nasz model poprawia się w porównaniu z poprzednimi pracami o bezwzględny 2-4% standardowych wskaźników, ustanawiając nowy state-of-the-art wydajność dla tego zadania. Proponujemy również nową metrykę oceny, która uwzględnia wady w poprzednich metodologiach oceny. Na koniec omawiamy znaczenie wykrywania istotnych zdarzeń dla dalszego zadania podsumowania.', 'uz': "Name Agar hodisalar soni ko'paytirish juda katta davomida bo'lsa, ko'pchilik vazifa muhim maʼlumotni saqlab qoladi. Bu vazifanda, hodisa foydalanuvchi taxminan foydalanuvchi hodisa foydalanuvchi, hujjatning darajasi haqida maʼlumotni qoʻshish va yangi hodisa kodlash usullari orasidagi interfektlar imkoniyatlariga ruxsat beramiz. Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz esa muvaffaqiyatli taʼminotlar tarkibini ko'rsatadi, bizning modelimiz oldingi ishni o'zgartiradi, oddiy metriklarga 2-4% darajada o'zgartiradi, vazifa uchun yangi sanat bajarish holatini yaratadi. Biz avval qiymatlar usulida xatolarini boshqaruvchi yangi qiymatni rivojlanish metrikini davom etishimiz. Endi, biz tahrirlash vazifasini ajratish muhim haqida javob beramiz.", 'vi': 'Việc xác định các sự kiện chính trong một tài liệu là rất quan trọng để hiểu các thông tin quan trọng. Dù đo được sự nổi bật của các sự kiện là đánh giá kịch bản cao, nhưng hầu hết các công việc trước đây đã sử dụng một sự kiện nhỏ mà không cung cấp thông tin cần thiết. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình ngữ cảnh cao cao độ chứa đựng các sự kiện giàu có, thông tin về mức tài liệu và cho phép tương tác giữa các mã số các sự kiện tiềm ẩn. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta trên một tập tin chứa độ nổi sự kiện cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta cải thiện hơn các công trình trước bằng 2-4=.* tuyệt đối về âm lượng chuẩn, tạo ra một trình độ mới nhất nghệ thuật cho nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi cũng đề xuất một hệ thống đánh giá mới nhằm giải quyết sai sót trong phương pháp đánh giá trước. Cuối cùng, chúng ta thảo luận về tầm quan trọng của việc phát hiện sự kiện nổi bật cho việc tóm tắt xuôi dòng.', 'bg': 'Идентифицирането на ключовите събития в даден документ е от решаващо значение за цялостното разбиране на неговата важна информация. Въпреки че измерването на значимостта на събитията е силно контекстуално, повечето предишни работи използват ограничено представяне на събитията, което пропуска съществена информация. В тази работа предлагаме висококонтекстуален модел на явление на събития, който използва богато представяне на събития, включва информация на ниво документ и позволява взаимодействия между латентни кодировки на събития. Експерименталните ни резултати върху набор от данни за видимост на събитието показват, че моделът ни се подобрява с абсолютно 2-4% спрямо стандартните показатели, създавайки ново ниво на изпълнение за задачата. Предлагаме и нов показател за оценка, който отстранява недостатъците в предишните методологии за оценка. Накрая, обсъждаме важността на откриването на явни събития за задачата надолу по веригата за обобщаване.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje ključnih događaja u dokumentu je kritično za holistički razumijevanje svojih važnih informacija. Iako je mjerenje salijencije događaja vrlo kontekstualno, većina prethodnog rada koristila je ograničenu predstavu događaja koji odbacuju temeljne informacije. U ovom poslu predlažemo visokocontextualni model salicije događaja koji koristi bogat predstavljanje događaja, uključuje informacije o nivou dokumenta i omogućava interakcije između latentnih kodiranja događaja. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o saliciji događaja pokazuju da se naš model poboljšava preko prethodnog rada od apsolutnog 2-4% na standardnoj metrici, uspostavljajući novi postupak umjetnosti za zadatak. Također predlažemo novu procjenu metriku koja rješava nedostatke u prethodnim metodama procjene. Konačno, razgovaramo o važnosti otkrivanja salijanih događaja za potpuni zadatak sažete.', 'da': 'At identificere de vigtigste begivenheder i et dokument er afgørende for en holistisk forståelse af dets vigtige oplysninger. Selvom målingen af begivenhedernes fremtræden er meget kontekstuel, har de fleste tidligere arbejder brugt en begrænset repræsentation af begivenheder, der udelader væsentlige oplysninger. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en meget kontekstuel model af begivenhedsfremstilling, der bruger en rig repræsentation af begivenheder, indarbejder dokumentniveau information og muliggør interaktioner mellem latente begivenhedskodninger. Vores eksperimentelle resultater på et datasæt af hændelsessalience viser, at vores model forbedres i forhold til tidligere arbejde med absolut 2-4% på standard metrics, hvilket skaber en ny state-of-the-art performance til opgaven. Vi foreslår også en ny evalueringsmetric, der løser fejl i tidligere evalueringsmetoder. Endelig diskuterer vi vigtigheden af fremtrædende hændelsesdetektion for downstream opgaven med opsummering.', 'nl': 'Het identificeren van de belangrijkste gebeurtenissen in een document is cruciaal om de belangrijke informatie ervan holistisch te begrijpen. Hoewel het meten van de relevantie van gebeurtenissen zeer contextueel is, heeft het meeste eerdere werk een beperkte weergave van gebeurtenissen gebruikt die essentiële informatie weglaat. In dit werk stellen we een zeer contextueel model voor van event salience dat een rijke representatie van gebeurtenissen gebruikt, informatie op documentniveau bevat en interacties tussen latente gebeurteniscoderingen mogelijk maakt. Onze experimentele resultaten op een event salience dataset tonen aan dat ons model ten opzichte van vorig werk met een absolute 2-4% op standaard metrics verbetert, waardoor een nieuwe state-of-the-art prestatie voor de taak wordt gecreëerd. We stellen ook een nieuwe evaluatiemetric voor die fouten in eerdere evaluatiemethodologieën aanpakt. Tot slot bespreken we het belang van detectie van opvallende gebeurtenissen voor de downstream taak van samenvatting.', 'de': 'Die Identifizierung der wichtigsten Ereignisse in einem Dokument ist entscheidend, um seine wichtigen Informationen ganzheitlich zu verstehen. Obwohl die Messung der Bedeutung von Ereignissen sehr kontextbezogen ist, wurde in den meisten früheren Arbeiten eine begrenzte Darstellung von Ereignissen verwendet, die wesentliche Informationen weglässt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein hochkontextuelles Modell der Ereignissalienz vor, das eine reichhaltige Darstellung von Ereignissen verwendet, Informationen auf Dokumentenebene integriert und Interaktionen zwischen latenten Ereigniscodierungen ermöglicht. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse an einem Event Salience Datensatz zeigen, dass sich unser Modell gegenüber früheren Arbeiten um absolute 2-4% an Standardmetriken verbessert und eine neue State-of-the-Art Performance für die Aufgabe etabliert. Wir schlagen auch eine neue Bewertungsmetrik vor, die Fehler in früheren Bewertungsmethoden adressiert. Abschließend diskutieren wir die Bedeutung der Erkennung von auffälligen Ereignissen für die nachgelagerte Aufgabe der Zusammenfassung.', 'id': 'Identifikasi peristiwa kunci dalam dokumen adalah kritis untuk memahami secara holistik informasi pentingnya. Meskipun mengukur penting peristiwa sangat kontekstual, kebanyakan pekerjaan sebelumnya telah menggunakan representation terbatas peristiwa yang melewatkan informasi penting. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan model kontekstual yang sangat penting peristiwa yang menggunakan representation yang kaya peristiwa, mengangkut informasi tingkat dokumen dan memungkinkan interaksi antara pengekodan peristiwa yang tersembunyi. Hasil percobaan kami pada set data saliensi peristiwa menunjukkan bahwa model kami meningkat lebih dari pekerjaan sebelumnya dengan 2-4% absolut pada metrik standar, menetapkan prestasi baru-state-of-the-art untuk tugas. Kami juga mengusulkan metrik evaluasi baru yang mengatasi kesalahan dalam metodologi evaluasi sebelumnya. Akhirnya, kita mendiskusikan pentingnya deteksi peristiwa penting untuk tugas turun dari ringkasan.', 'sw': 'Kutambua matukio muhimu katika nyaraka ni muhimu kuelewa taarifa zake muhimu. Ingawa akipima hadhira ya matukio ni wakati mkubwa, kazi nyingi iliyopita imetumia uwakilishi wa matukio mengi yanayoacha taarifa muhimu. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfano wa hadhira ya tukio ambalo hutumia uwakilishi mkubwa wa matukio, inajumuisha taarifa za nyaraka na kuruhusu mahusiano kati ya matukio ya hivi karibuni. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio kwenye taarifa za hadhira yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaboresha zaidi ya kazi zilizopita kwa asilimia 2-4 kwenye mitindo ya kawaida, kutengeneza hali mpya ya sanaa kwa kazi hiyo. Pia tunapendekeza mbinu mpya ya uchunguzi ambazo hujadili makosa katika njia za tathmini zilizopita. Mwisho, tunajadili umuhimu wa uchunguzi wa matukio ya mauzi kwa kazi ya muhtasari wa uchunguzi.', 'ko': '문서의 관건적인 사건을 식별하는 것은 그 중요한 정보를 전면적으로 이해하는 데 매우 중요하다.측정 사건의 현저성은 고도로 어경화되었지만 대부분의 이전 작업은 유한한 사건 표현법을 사용하고 중요한 정보를 소홀히 했다.이 작업에서 우리는 고도의 상하 문화의 사건 현저성 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 사건의 풍부한 표현을 사용하고 문서급 정보를 포함하며 잠재적인 사건 인코딩 간의 상호작용을 허용한다.우리가 이벤트 현저성 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 표준 지표에서 이전의 작업보다 절대 2-4% 향상되었고 임무를 위해 새로운 최첨단 성능을 세웠다.우리는 또한 이전의 평가 방법의 결함을 해결하기 위해 새로운 평가 지표를 제시했다.마지막으로 우리는 현저한 사건 검측이 후속 요약 임무에 대한 중요성을 토론했다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی اتفاقات کلیدی در یک سند برای فهمیدن اطلاعات مهمی آن مهم است. اگرچه اندازه\u200cگیری صفات رویداد بسیار متوسط است، بیشتر کارهای قبلی از رویداد\u200cهای محدود استفاده می\u200cکند که اطلاعات اصلی را از دست می\u200cدهد. در این کار، ما یک مدل بسیار متقابل تفاوت رویداد را پیشنهاد می کنیم که از نمایش ثروتمند رویداد استفاده می کند، اطلاعات سطح سند را جمع می کند و اجازه می دهد برای تفاوت بین رمزگذارهای رویداد اخیر. نتایج آزمایشی ما در یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای استفاده از رویداد\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما در کار قبلی با 2-4 درصد کامل در متریک استاندارد بهتر می\u200cشود، و یک عملکرد موقعیت هنری جدید برای این کار را ایجاد می\u200cکند. ما همچنین یک متریک ارزیابی جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در روش ارزیابی قبلی به تخلیق\u200cها مشکل می\u200cدهد. بالاخره، ما در مورد اهمیت شناسایی اتفاقات پایین و پایین عملکرد صحبت می کنیم.', 'af': "Die identifiseer van die sleutel gebeurtenis in 'n dokument is kritiese om sy belangrike inligting te verstaan. Alhoewel die salienskap van gebeurtenis gemeet is baie contextual, is die meeste vorige werk gebruik het 'n beperkte voorstelling van gebeurtenis wat onbehoeftige inligting verlaat word. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n baie contextual model van gebeurtenis saliens wat gebruik 'n ryk voorstelling van gebeurtenis, inkorporeer dokument-vlak inligting en laat toe vir interaksies tussen latente gebeurtenis kodering. Ons eksperimentale resultate op 'n gebeurtenis salienset datastel wys dat ons model verbeter oor vorige werk deur 'n absoluut 2-4% op standaard metries, met die opstelling van 'n nuwe state-of-the-art-performance vir die taak. Ons voorstel ook 'n nuwe evalueringsmetriek wat foute in vorige evalueringsmetodologies adreseer. Eindelik, ons bespreek die belangrikheid van salient gebeurtenis beskrywing vir die onderstreem taak van opsomming.", 'tr': 'Senediň a ç wajyplaryny tanyşdyrmak esbap olaryň wajyp maglumatyny düşünmek üçin wajyp däldir. Vaqialaryň çözümlerini örenmek örän tesadüf bolsa hem öňki işiň kän bir şekilde wajyp bilgi boýunça boýunça ylalaşýar. Bu işde, biz çykyşlaryň baý suratyny ulanan örän contextual nusgasyny teklip edip, dokument derejesi maglumatlary birleştirir we soňky terjime ködlemeleri arasynda täsirleşenler üçin rugsat berýäris. Biziň experimental netijelerimiz çykyş salinsiýa veri setinde nusgasymyz öňki işiň üstünde 2-4% degişli metriklerde döredilýändigini görkez, täze bir möhüm taýýarlanmasy üçin taýýarlanýar. Biz hem täze deňlenme metriklerini öňki deňlenme methodologiýasynda hat çözmesini teklip edip görýäris. Soňunda, indiki jemgyýet täzelikleriniň esasy taýýarlanmagynyň wajyplygyny gürrüň edýäris.', 'am': 'በሰነድ ውስጥ የቁልፎች ጉዳዮች ማግኘት የግልጹን መረጃ ለመግለጽ አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የሁኔታ ጉዳይ በተለየ ቁጥጥር ቢሆን፣ የቀድሞው ሥራ የጠቅላላ መረጃዎችን የሚተወው የጉዳይ ግንኙነት ጥቅሟል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የሁኔታ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤታችን በሁኔታ አዳራሲ ዳታተር ላይ መተላለፊያውን በሙሉ ሁለት-4 በመቶ ስርዓት ላይ አዲስ የ-አርእስት ስርዓት ስርዓት ማድረግ የሚያሳውቀው ነው፡፡ አዲስ ማስታወቂያ ማተሚያ ሚትሪክ የቀድሞው ማስታወቂያው ማሰናከል እናስጀራለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም አዋቂውን የጎዳና ጉዳይ ማግኘት የሚያስፈልገውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i ngjarjeve kryesore në një dokument është kritik për të kuptuar në mënyrë holistike informacionin e tij të rëndësishëm. Although measuring the salience of events is highly contextual, most previous work has used a limited representation of events that omits essential information.  Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një model shumë kontekstual të shfaqjes së ngjarjeve që përdor një përfaqësim të pasur të ngjarjeve, përfshin informacion në nivel dokumenti dhe lejon për ndërveprime midis kodifikimeve të ngjarjeve të fshehta. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale në një sërë të dhënash të ngjarjeve tregojnë se modeli ynë përmirësohet mbi punën e mëparshme me një absolut 2-4% mbi metrikat standarde, duke ngritur një shfaqje të re më të lartë për detyrën. Ne gjithashtu propozojmë një metrik të ri vlerësimi që trajton gabimet në metodologjitë e vlerësimit të mëparshëm. Finally, we discuss the importance of salient event detection for the downstream task of summarization.', 'hy': 'Հիմնական իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերումը փաստաթղթի մեջ կարևոր է նրա կարևոր տեղեկատվության ամբողջական հասկանալու համար: Չնայած, որ իրադարձությունների կարևորությունը չափելը բարձր կոնտեքստալ է, նախորդ աշխատանքի մեծ մասը օգտագործել է իրադարձությունների սահմանափակ ներկայացում, որոնք բաց են թողնում կարևոր տեղեկատվությունը: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք իրադարձությունների արտահայտության բարձր կոնտեքստալ մոդել, որը օգտագործում է իրադարձությունների հարուստ ներկայացումը, ներառում է փաստաթղթի մակարդակի տեղեկատվություն և հնարավորություն է տալիս բացահայտված իրադարձությունների կոդավոր Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները իրադարձությունների արտացոլության տվյալների համակարգի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը բարելավվում է նախորդ աշխատանքի վրա բացարձակ 2-4 տոկոսով ստանդարտ մետրիկայի վրա, որովհետև առաջադրանքի համար նոր բարձրագույն արդյունք Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք նոր գնահատման մետրիկ, որը վերլուծում է նախորդ գնահատման մեթոդոլոգիաների թերությունները: Finally, we discuss the importance of salient event detection for the downstream task of summarization.', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্টের মূল ঘটনাকে পরিচয় করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য বুঝতে গিয়েছে। যদিও অনুষ্ঠানের বিক্রেতা অত্যন্ত প্রাকৃতিক পরিমাপের পরিমাপ করা হয়, তবে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ অনুষ্ঠানের একটি সীমিত প্রতিনিধিত্ব এই কাজে আমরা অনুষ্ঠানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে অনুষ্ঠানের প্রযোজ্য মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা অনুষ্ঠানের সমৃদ্ধ প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব ব্যবহার করে, নথিপত আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল পূর্ববর্তী কাজের মাধ্যমে স্ট্যান্ডার্ট মেট্রিকে ২-৪% উন্নত করে দিয়েছে, কাজের জন্য নতুন রাষ্ট্ আমরা একটি নতুন মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক প্রস্তাব করি যা পূর্বের মূল্যায়নের পদ্ধতিতে ভুলের সাথে কথা বলে। Finally, we discuss the importance of salient event detection for the downstream task of summarization.', 'az': 'Dökümənin anahtar vaxtlarını təsdiqləmək mühüm məlumatlarını təmizləmək münasibdir. Əvvəlki işlər çox müxtəlif olaraq çəkilməyə baxmayaraq, əvvəlki işlər əsas məlumatları tərk etməyən vaxtlardan qurğulu tərzdə istifadə etdilər. Bu işdə, çox müxtəlif bir modal olaraq istifadə edirik ki, olaraq baxışların zəngin göstərilməsini istifadə edir, belə səviyyədə məlumatları birləşdirir və latent olaraq kodlamaların arasındakı müxtəlif şəkildə istifadə edir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz təcrübə salınması verilənlər qutusunda göstərir ki, modelimiz əvvəlki işlərdə standart metriklərdə 2-4%-dən tamamilə yaxşılaşdırır, bu işin yeni təcrübəsini quraşdırır. Biz də əvvəlki değerlendirmə metodologiyalarında fəsad çəkən yeni değerlendirmə metrik təklif edirik. Sonunda, təkrarlama işlərinin düşürülməsi üçün süslü olaraq keşfinin vacibətini mübahisə edirik.', 'cs': 'Identifikace klíčových událostí v dokumentu je klíčová pro holistické pochopení jeho důležitých informací. Ačkoli měření významnosti událostí je vysoce kontextové, většina předchozích prácí používala omezenou reprezentaci událostí, která opomíjí základní informace. V této práci navrhujeme vysoce kontextový model salience událostí, který využívá bohatou reprezentaci událostí, zahrnuje informace na úrovni dokumentů a umožňuje interakce mezi latentními kódováními událostí. Naše experimentální výsledky na datové sadě událostí ukazují, že náš model se oproti předchozí práci zlepšuje o absolutní 2-4% standardních metrik, což vytváří nový nejmodernější výkon pro daný úkol. Navrhujeme také novou hodnotící metriku, která řeší chyby v předchozích hodnotících metodikách. Na závěr diskutujeme význam detekce významných událostí pro následnou úlohu shrnutí.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje ključnih događaja u dokumentu je kritično za holistički razumijevanje svojih važnih informacija. Iako je mjerenje salijencije događaja vrlo kontekstualno, većina prethodnog rada koristila je ograničenu predstavu događaja koji izbjegavaju temeljne informacije. U ovom poslu predlažemo visokocontextualni model salicije događaja koji koristi bogatu predstavu događaja, uključuje informacije na nivou dokumenta i omogućava interakciju između latentnih kodiranja događaja. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o saliciji događaja pokazuju da se naš model poboljšava preko prethodnog rada sa apsolutnom 2-4% na standardnoj metrici, uspostavljajući novi postupak umjetnosti za zadatak. Također predlažemo novu metriku za procjenu koja rješava nedostatke u prethodnim metodama procjene. Konačno, razgovaramo o važnosti otkrivanja salientnih događaja za potpuni zadatak sažete.', 'et': 'Dokumendi oluliste sündmuste kindlakstegemine on olulise tähtsusega selle olulise teabe terviklikuks mõistmiseks. Kuigi sündmuste silmapaistvuse mõõtmine on väga kontekstiline, on enamikus varasematest töödest kasutatud piiratud sündmuste esitamist, mis jätab olulise teabe välja. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kõrge kontekstilise sündmuste esiletõstmise mudeli, mis kasutab sündmuste rikkalikku esitust, sisaldab dokumenditasemel teavet ja võimaldab interaktsioone latentsete sündmuste kodeeringute vahel. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel paraneb võrreldes varasemate töödega standardsete mõõdikutega absoluutselt 2-4%, luues ülesandele uue tehnoloogilise jõudluse. Samuti pakume välja uue hindamismeetodika, mis käsitleb varasemate hindamismeetodite puudusi. Lõpuks arutame oluliste sündmuste tuvastamise tähtsust kokkuvõtliku ülesande jaoks.', 'ca': "Identifying the key events in a document is critical to holistically understanding its important information.  Malgrat que mesurar la saliència dels esdeveniments és molt contextual, la majoria dels treballs anteriors ha utilitzat una representació limitada dels esdeveniments que omiten la informació essencial. En aquesta feina, proposem un model molt contextual de saliència d'esdeveniments que utilitza una representació rica d'esdeveniments, incorpora informació a nivell documental i permet interaccions entre codificacions latents d'esdeveniments. Els nostres resultats experimentals d'un conjunt de dades de saliència d'esdeveniments demostren que el nostre model millora amb el treball anterior un 2-4% absolut en les mètriques estándar, establient un nou rendiment d'última generació de la tasca. També proposem una nova mesura d'evaluació que abordi els defectes de les metodologies d'evaluació anteriors. Finalment, parlem de l'importància de la detecció d'esdeveniments importants per a la tasca de resum a avall.", 'fi': 'Asiakirjan keskeisten tapahtumien tunnistaminen on ratkaisevan tärkeää sen tärkeän tiedon kokonaisvaltaiselle ymmärtämiselle. Vaikka tapahtumien näkyvyyden mittaaminen on erittäin kontekstuaalista, useimmissa aikaisemmissa tutkimuksissa on käytetty rajallista tapahtumien esitystä, joka jättää olennaista tietoa pois. Tässä työssä ehdotamme erittäin kontekstuaalista tapahtumasalienssimallia, joka käyttää runsaasti tapahtumien esitystä, sisältää dokumenttitason tietoa ja mahdollistaa vuorovaikutuksen latenttien tapahtumakoodausten välillä. Kokeelliset tulokset tapahtumasalience-aineistosta osoittavat, että mallimme paranee edelliseen työhön verrattuna absoluuttisesti 2-4% standardimittareissa luoden tehtävän uuden huipputason suorituskyvyn. Ehdotamme myös uutta arviointimittaria, joka korjaa aiempien arviointimenetelmien puutteita. Lopuksi keskustelemme merkittävien tapahtumien havaitsemisen tärkeydestä loppupään yhteenvetotehtävän kannalta.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo akeh model contextual sing berarti sawêng langgar entaraning winih R Awak dhéwé ngerasah nuné beraksi barêng-barêng nêmêr sing nêmên karo hal-barêng nêmên. Eremu, kita diwurung ngomong cara nggawe barang nggawe hasar alih dumadhi kanggo nggawe hasar nggawe', 'he': 'זיהוי האירועים המפתחים במסמך הוא קריטי כדי להבין באופן כוליסטי את המידע החשוב שלו. למרות שמדידה את מרכז האירועים הוא קונטוקטואלי מאוד, רוב העבודה הקודמת השתמשה במייצג מוגבל של אירועים שמעלם מידע חיוני. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מודל קונטקסטי גבוה של מילוי אירועים שמשתמש ביצוע עשיר של אירועים, מכיל מידע רמה מסמכים ומאפשר לאינטראקציות בין קודורי אירועים מוסתרים. התוצאות הניסוייות שלנו על קבוצת מידע מילוי אירועים מראות שמודל שלנו משתפר מעל עבודה קודמת על ידי 2-4% מוחלט על מטריקה סטנדרטית We also propose a new evaluation metric that addresses flaws in previous evaluation methodologies.  סוף סוף, אנחנו מדברים על חשיבות זיהוי אירועים מפורסמים למשימה המאוחרת של הסכם.', 'ha': "Idan an gane abu na maɓallin cikin wani takardar, yanzu na muhimu a gane bayani da yanzu muhimu. Kuma kõ da ya ƙaddara salon-ayukan ayuka mai girma, sai mafi yawan aikin da suka gabata sun yi amfani da wani gwargwadon shirin ayuka da ke bari information muhimu. In this work, we propose a highly contextual model of event salience that uses a rich representation of events, incorporates document-level information and allows for interactions between latent event encodings.  Matarinmu na sami a kan danne na aikin da aka samu shi ya nuna cewa misalinmu ya fi ƙara wa aikin da ya gabãni na sami 2-4% a kan taƙaitaccen, kuma ya sami wani halin-na-sanar wa aikin. Tuna goyyar da wani metriki na ƙidãya, wanda ke addressa misãlai cikin metoden kewayi. Haƙĩƙa, Munã jãyayya muhimu da za'a gane wa mai salo wa aikin da ke ƙaranci.", 'sk': 'Opredelitev ključnih dogodkov v dokumentu je ključnega pomena za celovito razumevanje njegovih pomembnih informacij. Čeprav je merjenje pomembnosti dogodkov zelo kontekstualno, je večina predhodnih del uporabljala omejeno predstavitev dogodkov, ki izpušča bistvene informacije. V tem delu predlagamo visoko kontekstualni model izpostavljenosti dogodkov, ki uporablja bogato predstavitev dogodkov, vključuje informacije na ravni dokumenta in omogoča interakcijo med latentnimi kodiranji dogodkov. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati na naboru podatkov o izpostavljenosti dogodka kažejo, da se naš model v primerjavi s prejšnjim delom izboljša za absolutno 2-4% pri standardnih metrikah, kar vzpostavlja novo vrhunsko uspešnost naloge. Predlagamo tudi novo merilo ocenjevanja, ki obravnava pomanjkljivosti v prejšnjih metodologijah ocenjevanja. Na koncu razpravljamo o pomenu odkrivanja pomembnih dogodkov pri nadaljnji nalogi povzetka.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་གི་གཙོ་བྱ་འགུལ་ངོ་འཛིན་བྱེད་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཆེན་ཡིན་ཏེ། འོན་ཀྱང་། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་འཇིག་རིམ་ཚད་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཆེ་ཤོས་དེ་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག Our experimental results on an event salience dataset demonstrate that our model improves over previous work by an absolute 2-4% on standard metrics, establishing a new state-of-the-art performance for the task. ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་མ་རྙེད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཇུག་རྫོགས་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཡར་བསྡུས་བྱ་ཚིག་རྟོགས་པའི་གལ་ཆེ་བ་དེ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ།'}
{'en': 'Appraisal Theories for Emotion Classification in Text', 'pt': 'Teorias de avaliação para classificação de emoções em texto', 'ar': 'نظريات التقييم لتصنيف المشاعر في النص', 'es': 'Teorías de evaluación para la clasificación de emociones en el texto', 'fr': "Théories d'évaluation pour la classification des émotions dans le", 'ja': 'テキストにおける感情分類のための鑑定理論', 'zh': '文本情分类之论', 'hi': 'पाठ में भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए मूल्यांकन सिद्धांत', 'ru': 'Теории оценки для классификации эмоций в тексте', 'ga': 'Teoiricí Measúnaithe maidir le hAicmiú Mothúcháin sa Téacs', 'ka': 'ტექსტის ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციისთვის შესაბამისი ტეორიები', 'hu': 'Értékelési elméletek az érzelmi osztályozáshoz a szövegben', 'el': 'Θεωρίες εκτίμησης για την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων στο κείμενο', 'kk': 'Мәтіндегі көңіл күйін классификациялау теориясы', 'it': 'Teorie di valutazione per la classificazione delle emozioni nel testo', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയിലുള്ള ഇമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d ക്ലാസികേഷനുള്ള പ്രമാണങ്ങള്\u200d', 'lt': 'Emocijų klasifikavimo tekste vertinimo teorijos', 'mk': 'Теории за оценка за класификација на емоции во текст', 'ms': 'Appraisal Theories for Emotion Classification in Text', 'mt': 'Teoriji ta’ Valutazzjoni għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Emozzjoni fit-Test', 'pl': 'Teorie oceny klasyfikacji emocji w tekście', 'ro': 'Teorii de evaluare pentru clasificarea emoțiilor în text', 'no': 'Tilpass teorier for emosjonsklassifikasjon i tekst', 'mn': 'Текст дээрх мэдрэмжүүдийн классификацийн талаар', 'so': 'Tiyaatarka koritaanka', 'sv': 'Utvärderingsteorier för känsloklassificering i text', 'si': 'පාළුවේ Emotion ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න තේරණය', 'sr': 'Prihvatljive teorije za klasifikaciju emocija u tekstu', 'ta': 'Appraisal Theories for Emotion Classification in Text', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹ میں ایموٹیون کلاسیفٹ کے لئے تقریبا تئوری', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định lý cảm xúc trong văn bản', 'bg': 'Теории за оценка на емоционалната класификация в текста', 'nl': 'Waarderingstheorieën voor emotionele classificatie in tekst', 'hr': 'Prihvatljive teorije za klasifikaciju emocija u tekstu', 'da': 'Vurderingsteorier for følelsesmæssig klassificering i tekst', 'de': 'Evaluationstheorien für die emotionale Klassifizierung im Text', 'id': 'Teori Penghargaan untuk Klasifikasi Emosi dalam Teks', 'ko': '텍스트 감정 분류의 평가 이론', 'fa': 'تئوری\u200cهای تقریبا برای کلاس\u200cشناسی احساسات در متن', 'sw': 'Appraisal Theories for Emotion Classification in Text', 'af': 'Aanvoudige teoriee vir emosie klassifisering in Teks', 'tr': 'Emoýunlar sözleşmesi üçin nusgala teoriýasy', 'sq': 'Teoriat e vlerësimit për klasifikimin e emocioneve në tekst', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Metind…Щ Emotion Klasifikasyonu Teoril…Щri', 'bn': 'টেক্সটে ইমোটেশন ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য অ্যাপ্রেসিডাল থিওরি', 'ca': "Teories d'evaluació de la classificació de l'emoció en text", 'cs': 'Teorie hodnocení pro klasifikaci emocí v textu', 'bs': 'Prihvatljive teorije za klasifikaciju emocija u tekstu', 'fi': 'Tekstin tunteiden luokittelun arviointiteoriat', 'et': 'Emotsioonide klassifitseerimise hindamise teooriad tekstis', 'sk': 'Ocenjevalne teorije za klasifikacijo čustev v besedilu', 'jv': 'Sugeng-theores kanggo kelas semotor Ketok', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Appraisal Theories for Emotion Classification in Text', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་Emotion སྒེར་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་།'}
{'en': 'Automatic emotion categorization has been predominantly formulated as text classification in which textual units are assigned to an emotion from a predefined inventory, for instance following the fundamental emotion classes proposed by Paul Ekman (fear, joy, anger, disgust, sadness, surprise) or Robert Plutchik (adding trust, anticipation). This approach ignores existing psychological theories to some degree, which provide explanations regarding the perception of events. For instance, the description that somebody discovers a snake is associated with fear, based on the appraisal as being an unpleasant and non-controllable situation. This emotion reconstruction is even possible without having access to explicit reports of a subjective feeling (for instance expressing this with the words I am afraid.). Automatic classification approaches therefore need to learn properties of events as latent variables (for instance that the uncertainty and the mental or physical effort associated with the encounter of a snake leads to fear). With this paper, we propose to make such interpretations of events explicit, following theories of cognitive appraisal of events, and show their potential for emotion classification when being encoded in classification models. Our results show that high quality appraisal dimension assignments in event descriptions lead to an improvement in the classification of discrete emotion categories. We make our corpus of appraisal-annotated emotion-associated event descriptions publicly available.', 'ar': 'تمت صياغة التصنيف التلقائي للعاطفة في الغالب كتصنيف للنص يتم فيه تخصيص الوحدات النصية لعاطفة من قائمة محددة مسبقًا ، على سبيل المثال اتباع فئات المشاعر الأساسية التي اقترحها بول إيكمان (الخوف ، الفرح ، الغضب ، الاشمئزاز ، الحزن ، المفاجأة) أو روبرت بلوتشيك (إضافة الثقة والترقب). يتجاهل هذا النهج النظريات النفسية الموجودة إلى حد ما ، والتي تقدم تفسيرات فيما يتعلق بإدراك الأحداث. على سبيل المثال ، الوصف الذي يكتشفه شخص ما ثعبانًا يرتبط بالخوف ، بناءً على التقييم باعتباره موقفًا غير سار ولا يمكن التحكم فيه. إعادة بناء المشاعر هذه ممكنة حتى بدون الوصول إلى تقارير صريحة عن شعور شخصي (على سبيل المثال ، التعبير عن هذا بعبارة "أنا خائف"). لذلك تحتاج مناهج التصنيف التلقائي إلى تعلم خصائص الأحداث كمتغيرات كامنة (على سبيل المثال أن عدم اليقين والجهد العقلي أو البدني المرتبط بمواجهة الثعبان يؤدي إلى الخوف). من خلال هذه الورقة ، نقترح جعل مثل هذه التفسيرات للأحداث صريحة ، باتباع نظريات التقييم المعرفي للأحداث ، وإظهار إمكاناتها لتصنيف المشاعر عند تشفيرها في نماذج التصنيف. تظهر نتائجنا أن تعيينات أبعاد التقييم عالية الجودة في أوصاف الأحداث تؤدي إلى تحسين تصنيف فئات المشاعر المنفصلة. نحن نصنع مجموعة من التعليقات التوضيحية المرتبطة بالتقييم\nأوصاف الحدث متاحة للجمهور.', 'fr': "La catégorisation automatique des émotions a été principalement formulée comme une classification textuelle dans laquelle des unités textuelles sont attribuées à une émotion à partir d'un inventaire prédéfini, par exemple en suivant les classes d'émotions fondamentales proposées par Paul Ekman (peur, joie, colère, dégoût, tristesse, surprise) ou Robert Plutchik ( ajouter de la confiance, de l'anticipation). Cette approche ignore dans une certaine mesure les théories psychologiques existantes, qui fournissent des explications concernant la perception des événements. Par exemple, la description selon laquelle quelqu'un découvre un serpent est associée à la peur, basée sur l'évaluation comme étant une situation désagréable et incontrôlable. Cette reconstruction d'émotions est même possible sans avoir accès à des rapports explicites d'un sentiment subjectif (par exemple en l'exprimant par les mots «\xa0J'ai peur\xa0»). Les approches de classification automatique doivent donc apprendre les propriétés des événements en tant que variables latentes (par exemple, le fait que l'incertitude et l'effort mental ou physique associés à la rencontre d'un serpent entraînent la peur). Avec cet article, nous proposons de rendre explicites de telles interprétations d'événements, en suivant les théories de l'évaluation cognitive des événements, et de montrer leur potentiel pour la classification des émotions lorsqu'ils sont codés dans des modèles de classification. Nos résultats montrent que les affectations de dimension d'évaluation de haute qualité dans les descriptions d'événements conduisent à une amélioration de la classification des catégories d'émotions discrètes. Nous créons notre corpus d'évaluations annotées par des émotions associées\ndes descriptions d'événements accessibles au public.", 'ja': '自動感情分類は、テキスト単位が事前定義された目録から感情に割り当てられるテキスト分類として主に定式化されており、例えば、ポール・エクマン（恐怖、喜び、怒り、嫌悪、悲しみ、驚き）またはロバート・プルーチク（信頼、期待の追加）によって提案された基本的な感情クラスに従う。 このアプローチは、事象の知覚に関する説明を提供する既存の心理学的理論をある程度無視する。 たとえば、誰かがヘビを発見したという記述は、不快で制御不能な状況であるとの評価に基づいて、恐怖と関連付けられています。 この感情の再構築は、主観的な感情の明確な報告にアクセスすることなく可能です（たとえば、「恐れ入ります」という言葉でこれを表現します）。 したがって、自動分類アプローチは、潜在的な変数としての事象の特性を学習する必要がある（例えば、不確実性と、ヘビの遭遇に関連する精神的または身体的努力が恐怖につながること）。 本稿では，事象の認知鑑定の理論に従った事象の明示的な解釈を行い，分類モデルに符号化した場合の感情分類の可能性を示すことを提案する． 我々の結果は、事象記述における質の高い評価次元の割り当てが、離散的な感情カテゴリの分類の改善につながることを示している。 私たちは、感情に関連した鑑定のコーパスを作ります\n一般に公開されているイベントの説明。', 'es': 'La categorización automática de emociones se ha formulado predominantemente como clasificación de texto en la que las unidades textuales se asignan a una emoción de un inventario predefinido, por ejemplo, siguiendo las clases de emociones fundamentales propuestas por Paul Ekman (miedo, alegría, enfado, disgusto, tristeza, sorpresa) o Robert Plutchik ( añadir confianza, anticipación). Este enfoque ignora hasta cierto punto las teorías psicológicas existentes, que proporcionan explicaciones sobre la percepción de los eventos. Por ejemplo, la descripción de que alguien descubre una serpiente se asocia con el miedo, basándose en la valoración de que es una situación desagradable e incontrolable. Esta reconstrucción de emociones es posible incluso sin tener acceso a informes explícitos de un sentimiento subjetivo (por ejemplo, expresarlo con las palabras «Tengo miedo»). Por lo tanto, los enfoques de clasificación automática necesitan aprender las propiedades de los eventos como variables latentes (por ejemplo, que la incertidumbre y el esfuerzo mental o físico asociados con el encuentro de una serpiente conducen al miedo). Con este artículo, proponemos hacer explícitas tales interpretaciones de los eventos, siguiendo las teorías de evaluación cognitiva de los eventos, y mostrar su potencial para la clasificación de emociones cuando se codifican en modelos de clasificación. Nuestros resultados muestran que las asignaciones de dimensiones de evaluación de alta calidad en las descripciones de eventos conducen a una mejora en la clasificación de las categorías de emociones discretas. Hacemos que nuestro corpus de valoración con anotaciones se asocie a emociones\ndescripciones de eventos disponibles públicamente.', 'pt': 'A categorização automática de emoções tem sido predominantemente formulada como classificação de texto em que unidades textuais são atribuídas a uma emoção a partir de um inventário predefinido, por exemplo, seguindo as classes fundamentais de emoção propostas por Paul Ekman (medo, alegria, raiva, desgosto, tristeza, surpresa) ou Robert Plutchik (adicionando confiança, antecipação). Essa abordagem ignora até certo ponto as teorias psicológicas existentes, que fornecem explicações sobre a percepção dos eventos. Por exemplo, a descrição de que alguém descobre uma cobra está associada ao medo, com base na avaliação como sendo uma situação desagradável e incontrolável. Essa reconstrução da emoção é possível mesmo sem ter acesso a relatos explícitos de um sentimento subjetivo (por exemplo, expressá-lo com as palavras “tenho medo”). As abordagens de classificação automática, portanto, precisam aprender as propriedades dos eventos como variáveis latentes (por exemplo, que a incerteza e o esforço mental ou físico associado ao encontro de uma cobra leva ao medo). Com este artigo, propomos explicitar tais interpretações de eventos, seguindo teorias de avaliação cognitiva de eventos, e mostrar seu potencial de classificação de emoções ao serem codificados em modelos de classificação. Nossos resultados mostram que atribuições de dimensão de avaliação de alta qualidade em descrições de eventos levam a uma melhoria na classificação de categorias de emoções discretas. Nós fazemos nosso corpus de avaliação-anotada de emoção-associada\ndescrições de eventos publicamente disponíveis.', 'zh': '自情类主文本,其文本单从预定义单中分之,如循Paul Ekman(恐惧,喜怒厌恶,惊)Robert Plutchik(益信,期)本情。 忽于某种程度之心理学论,备感知之说。 如某见蛇之述与恐惧者,盖不快不可控也。 此情重建可也,不须得主观明确报告(如以"我畏"为)。 是故自分类者,学事为潜变量之性(如蛇之遇不确定性神体力劳动则恐惧)。 于本文,臣等建议循事识评,明为此说,并于分类编码时见其情类之力。 臣等之的结果表明,事叙高质量评维度分可改离散情绪类。 评估语料库与注情相关\n明可用之事。', 'ru': 'Автоматическая категоризация эмоций была преимущественно сформулирована как классификация текста, в которой текстовые единицы присваиваются эмоции из предопределенной инвентаризации, например, следуя фундаментальным классам эмоций, предложенным Полом Экманом (страх, радость, гнев, отвращение, печаль, сюрприз) или Робертом Плутчиком (добавление доверия, предвидение). Такой подход до некоторой степени игнорирует существующие психологические теории, которые дают объяснения относительно восприятия событий. Например, описание того, что кто-то обнаруживает змею, связано со страхом, основанным на оценке как неприятная и неконтролируемая ситуация. Эта реконструкция эмоций возможна даже без доступа к явным отчетам о субъективном чувстве (например, выражая это словами «Я боюсь».). Поэтому автоматические подходы к классификации должны изучать свойства событий как скрытые переменные (например, что неопределенность и умственные или физические усилия, связанные со столкновением со змеей, приводят к страху). С помощью данной статьи мы предлагаем сделать такие интерпретации событий явными, следуя теориям когнитивной оценки событий, и показать их потенциал для классификации эмоций при кодировании в классификационных моделях. Наши результаты показывают, что высококачественные оценочные группировки в описаниях событий приводят к улучшению классификации дискретных категорий эмоций. Мы делаем наше тело оценки-аннотированных эмоций-ассоциированных\nописания событий, общедоступные.', 'hi': 'स्वचालित भावना वर्गीकरण को मुख्य रूप से पाठ वर्गीकरण के रूप में तैयार किया गया है जिसमें पाठ्य इकाइयों को एक पूर्वनिर्धारित सूची से एक भावना को सौंपा जाता है, उदाहरण के लिए पॉल एकमैन (भय, खुशी, क्रोध, घृणा, उदासी, आश्चर्य) या रॉबर्ट प्लुचिक (विश्वास, प्रत्याशा जोड़ना) द्वारा प्रस्तावित मौलिक भावना वर्गों का पालन करना। यह दृष्टिकोण कुछ हद तक मौजूदा मनोवैज्ञानिक सिद्धांतों को अनदेखा करता है, जो घटनाओं की धारणा के बारे में स्पष्टीकरण प्रदान करते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, वर्णन है कि किसी को एक सांप की खोज करता है डर के साथ जुड़ा हुआ है, एक अप्रिय और गैर-नियंत्रणीय स्थिति होने के रूप में मूल्यांकन के आधार पर। यह भावना पुनर्निर्माण एक व्यक्तिपरक भावना की स्पष्ट रिपोर्टों तक पहुंच के बिना भी संभव है (उदाहरण के लिए इसे "मुझे डर है" शब्दों के साथ व्यक्त करना)। इसलिए स्वचालित वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोणों को अव्यक्त चर के रूप में घटनाओं के गुणों को सीखने की आवश्यकता होती है (उदाहरण के लिए कि अनिश्चितता और सांप की मुठभेड़ से जुड़े मानसिक या शारीरिक प्रयास डर की ओर जाता है)। इस पेपर के साथ, हम घटनाओं की ऐसी व्याख्याओं को स्पष्ट करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, घटनाओं के संज्ञानात्मक मूल्यांकन के सिद्धांतों का पालन करते हैं, और वर्गीकरण मॉडल में एन्कोड किए जाने पर भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए उनकी क्षमता दिखाते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि घटना विवरण में उच्च गुणवत्ता मूल्यांकन आयाम असाइनमेंट असतत भावना श्रेणियों के वर्गीकरण में सुधार की ओर ले जाते हैं। हम मूल्यांकन-एनोटेटेड भावना-संबद्ध के हमारे कॉर्पस बनाते हैं\nघटना विवरण सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध है।', 'ga': 'Tá catagóiriú mothúcháin uathoibríoch ceaptha go príomha mar aicmiú téacs ina sanntar aonaid théacsacha do mhothúchán ó fhardal réamhshainithe, mar shampla tar éis na ranganna mothúcháin bhunúsacha a mhol Paul Ekman (eagla, áthas, fearg, náire, brón, iontas) nó Robert. Plutchik (ag cur muinín, oirchill). Déanann an cur chuige seo neamhaird go pointe áirithe ar theoiricí síceolaíochta atá ann cheana féin, a thugann mínithe maidir le dearcadh na n-imeachtaí. Mar shampla, tá baint ag an gcur síos a fhaigheann duine ar nathair le eagla, bunaithe ar an measúnú mar chás míthaitneamhach agus neamh-rialaithe. Tá an t-athchruthú mothúcháin seo indéanta fiú gan rochtain a bheith agat ar thuarascálacha follasacha ar mhothúchán suibiachtúil (mar shampla é seo a chur in iúl leis na focail “Tá eagla orm.”). Mar sin is gá go bhfoghlaimíonn cineálacha cur chuige aicmithe uathoibríocha airíonna imeachtaí mar athróga folaigh (mar shampla go mbíonn eagla mar thoradh ar an éiginnteacht agus an iarracht mheabhrach nó fhisiciúil a bhaineann le teagmháil nathair). Leis an bpáipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn léirmhínithe den sórt sin ar imeachtaí a dhéanamh follasach, tar éis teoiricí breithmheas cognaíoch ar imeachtaí, agus a n-acmhainneacht le haghaidh aicmiú mothúchán a thaispeáint agus iad á n-ionchódú i múnlaí aicmithe. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go dtagann feabhas ar rangú na gcatagóirí mothúcháin scoite as sannacháin ardcháilíochta breithmheasa i gcur síos ar imeachtaí. Déanaimid ár gcorpas de mhothúchán-anótáilte measúnaithe a bhaineann le hábhar\ncur síos ar imeachtaí ar fáil go poiblí.', 'it': 'descrizioni degli eventi accessibili al pubblico.', 'kk': 'Оқиға сипаттамасы жалпы болады.', 'ka': 'მოვლენების გამოსახულება.', 'hu': 'az eseményleírások nyilvánosan hozzáférhetők.', 'el': 'περιγραφές γεγονότων διαθέσιμες στο κοινό.', 'mk': 'event descriptions publicly available.', 'ms': 'deskripsi peristiwa tersedia secara awam.', 'ml': 'അവസ്ഥ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു.', 'mn': 'үйл явдлын тайлбар олон нийтэд тайлбарлах боломжтой.', 'no': 'hendingskildringar offentlig tilgjengeleg.', 'lt': 'renginių aprašymai viešai prieinami.', 'sr': 'Описање проблема публично доступно.', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha dhacdooyinka waxaad si bayaan ah u heli kartaa.', 'mt': 'deskrizzjonijiet tal-avvenimenti disponibbli pubblikament.', 'sv': 'Händelsebeskrivelser som är allmänt tillgängliga.', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு விவரங்கள் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'pl': 'opisy zdarzeń publicznie dostępne.', 'ro': 'descrierile evenimentelor disponibile publicului.', 'ur': 'حادثہ کی توصیف ظاہر طور پر موجود ہے.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරණය ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'mô tả sự kiện công khai.', 'bg': 'описанията на събитията са публично достъпни.', 'de': 'Veranstaltungsbeschreibungen öffentlich zugänglich.', 'hr': 'objašnjenje događaja javno dostupno.', 'da': 'beskrivelser af begivenheder, der er offentligt tilgængelige.', 'nl': 'beschrijvingen van evenementen openbaar beschikbaar.', 'id': 'deskripsi peristiwa tersedia publik.', 'fa': 'توضیح\u200cهای رویداد به طور عمومی موجود است.', 'sw': 'Maelezo ya tukio yanapatikana hadharani.', 'ko': '이벤트 설명을 공개적으로 얻을 수 있습니다.', 'tr': 'janlaýyş tassymlary publika mejbur.', 'af': '@ info: whatsthis', 'sq': 'përshkrimi i ngjarjeve në dispozicion publik.', 'bn': 'অনুষ্ঠানের বর্ণনা প্রকাশ্যে উপস্থিত।', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'az': 'vaxt tərzlərini açıq-aşkar mövcud edir.', 'hy': 'իրադարձությունների նկարագրությունները հանրային հասանելի են:', 'ca': "descripcions d'esdeveniments disponibles al públic.", 'bs': 'Objašnjenje događaja javno dostupno.', 'fi': 'tapahtumakuvaukset ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'et': 'sündmuste kirjeldused on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'cs': 'popisy událostí veřejně dostupné.', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'event descriptions publicly available.', 'sk': 'opisi dogodkov so javno dostopni.', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ', 'he': 'תיאור אירועים זמין לציבור.'}
{'en': 'A Symmetric Local Search Network for Emotion-Cause Pair Extraction', 'ar': 'شبكة بحث محلية متماثلة لاستخراج أزواج العاطفة', 'es': 'Una red de búsqueda local simétrica para la extracción de pares emoción-causa', 'fr': "Un réseau de recherche local symétrique pour l'extraction de paires émotion-cause", 'pt': 'Uma rede de busca local simétrica para extração de pares de causas emocionais', 'ja': '感情-原因ペア抽出のための対称ローカル検索ネットワーク', 'zh': '所以情者,谓本地搜网络', 'hi': 'भावना-कारण जोड़ी निष्कर्षण के लिए एक सममित स्थानीय खोज नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Симметричная локальная поисковая сеть для извлечения пар эмоциональных причин', 'ga': 'Líonra Cuardach Áitiúil Siméadrach le haghaidh Eastóscadh Péire Mothúchán-Cúis', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Szimmetrikus helyi keresőhálózat az érzelmi-ok pár kivonásához', 'el': 'Ένα συμμετρικό τοπικό δίκτυο αναζήτησης για την εξαγωγή ζευγαριών συναισθημάτων-αιτίας', 'it': "Una rete di ricerca locale simmetrica per l'estrazione della coppia Emozione-Causa", 'kk': 'Көңіл- себептердің симметриялық жергілікті іздеу желіName', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Comment', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'എമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d - കാരണം പേയിര്\u200d എക്സ്ട്രേക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള സിമിറ്ററിക്ക് ലോക്കല്\u200d തെരച്ച', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Tfittxija Lokali Simmetriku għall-Estrazzjoni ta’ Pawġi kkawżati minn Emożizzjoni', 'mn': 'Emotion-Cause Pair Extraction Symmetric Local Search Network', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Symmetryczna lokalna sieć wyszukiwania dla ekstrakcji par emocjonalnych', 'ro': 'O rețea de căutare locală simetrică pentru extragerea perechilor emoționale-cauză', 'sr': 'Simetrična lokalna potražna mreža za ekstrakciju emocija-uzroka', 'si': 'Emotion- cause Pair Extraction සඳහා සිම්මෙට්\u200dරික ස්ථානික පරීක්ෂණ ජාලය', 'so': 'Shabakada raadinta deegaanka ee xafiiska xasuusta', 'sv': 'Ett symmetriskt lokalt söknätverk för Emotion-Cause Par Extraktion', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Emotion-Cause Pair Extraction کے لئے سیمیٹریک محلی تلاش نیٹورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một mạng tìm kiếm cho đồng cảm gây ra đôi', 'da': 'Et symmetrisk lokalt søgenetværk for følelsesmæssig-årsag par udtrækning', 'nl': 'Een symmetrisch lokaal zoeknetwerk voor Emotie-Oorzaak Pair Extraction', 'hr': 'Simetrična lokalna potražna mreža za ekstrakciju emocija-uzroka', 'de': 'Ein symmetrisches lokales Suchnetzwerk für Emotion-Cause Pair Extraction', 'ko': '정서적 원인 추출에 사용되는 대칭 국부 검색 네트워크', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Utafiti wa Jiji la Ndani kwa ajili ya Kutengwa kwa sababu ya Uhisia', 'tr': 'Emotion-Cause çift açmak için simetrik bir yerel Arama A ğını', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një rrjet simmetrik i kërkimit lokal për nxjerrjen e çifteve të shkaktuara nga emocionet', 'bg': 'Симетрична локална мрежа за търсене за извличане на двойка емоции и причини', 'hy': 'Comment', 'id': 'Jaringan Pencarian Lokal Simmetrik untuk Ekstraksi Pasangan Sebab Emosi', 'az': 'Emotion-Cause İki Çıqış üçün simetrik Yerli Arama A ğığı', 'bs': 'Simetrična lokalna potražna mreža za ekstrakciju emocija-uzroka', 'ca': 'Una xarxa simètrica de cerca local per extracció de parells causats per emocions', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'fi': 'Symmetrinen paikallinen hakuverkosto tunteiden ja syiden parien poistoon', 'bn': 'Emotion-reason Pair Extraction জন্য সিম্রিক স্থানীয় অনুসন্ধান নেটওয়ার্ক', 'et': 'Sümmeetriline kohalik otsinguvõrgustik emotsioonide ja põhjuste paari väljavõtmiseks', 'cs': 'Symmetrická lokální vyhledávací síť pro extrakci párů emocí a příčin', 'jv': 'Workspace " and "Desktop', 'sk': 'Simetrično lokalno iskalno omrežje za ekstrakcijo parov čustev in vzrokov', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་རང་ཁུལ་ལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་པ'}
{'en': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) is a new task which aims at extracting the potential clause pairs of emotions and corresponding causes in a document. To tackle this task, a two-step method was proposed by previous study which first extracted emotion clauses and cause clauses individually, then paired the emotion and cause clauses, and filtered out the pairs without causality. Different from this method that separated the detection and the matching of emotion and cause into two steps, we propose a Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) model to perform the detection and matching simultaneously by local search. SLSN consists of two symmetric subnetworks, namely the emotion subnetwork and the cause subnetwork. Each subnetwork is composed of a clause representation learner and a local pair searcher. The local pair searcher is a specially-designed cross-subnetwork component which can extract the local emotion-cause pairs. Experimental results on the ECPE corpus demonstrate the superiority of our SLSN over existing state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'الاستخراج الزوجي للسبب العاطفي (ECPE) هو مهمة جديدة تهدف إلى استخراج أزواج الجملة المحتملة من المشاعر والأسباب المقابلة في المستند. لمعالجة هذه المهمة ، تم اقتراح طريقة من خطوتين من خلال دراسة سابقة والتي استخرجت أولاً جمل العاطفة وتسبب في جمل بشكل فردي ، ثم اقترن العاطفة وعبارات السبب ، وتصفية الأزواج دون علاقة سببية. تختلف عن هذه الطريقة التي فصلت الاكتشاف ومطابقة المشاعر والسبب إلى خطوتين ، نقترح نموذج شبكة البحث المحلي المتماثل (SLSN) لإجراء الاكتشاف والمطابقة في وقت واحد عن طريق البحث المحلي. يتكون SLSN من شبكتين فرعيتين متماثلتين ، وهما الشبكة الفرعية للعاطفة والشبكة الفرعية للسبب. تتكون كل شبكة فرعية من متعلم لتمثيل الجملة وباحث زوج محلي. الباحث عن الزوج المحلي عبارة عن مكون عبر شبكة فرعية مصمم خصيصًا يمكنه استخراج أزواج سبب العاطفة المحلية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة ECPE تفوق SLSN لدينا على أحدث الأساليب الحالية.', 'fr': "L'extraction de paires émotion-cause (ECPE) est une nouvelle tâche qui vise à extraire les paires de clauses potentielles d'émotions et les causes correspondantes dans un document. Pour s'attaquer à cette tâche, une méthode en deux étapes a été proposée par une étude précédente qui extrayait d'abord les clauses d'émotion et les clauses de cause individuellement, puis jumelait les clauses d'émotion et de cause, et filtrait les paires sans causalité. Différent de cette méthode qui séparait la détection et la mise en correspondance de l'émotion et de la cause en deux étapes, nous proposons un modèle de réseau de recherche local symétrique (SLSN) pour effectuer la détection et la mise en correspondance simultanément par recherche locale. Le SLSN est constitué de deux sous-réseaux symétriques, à savoir le sous-réseau d'émotion et le sous-réseau de cause. Chaque sous-réseau est composé d'un apprenant de représentation de clause et d'un chercheur de paires locales. Le chercheur de paires locales est un composant inter-sous-réseau spécialement conçu qui peut extraire les paires émotion-cause locales. Les résultats expérimentaux sur le corpus ECPE démontrent la supériorité de notre SLSN par rapport aux méthodes de pointe existantes.", 'es': 'La extracción de pares de causas emocionales (ECPE) es una nueva tarea que tiene como objetivo extraer los posibles pares de emociones de la cláusula y las causas correspondientes en un documento. Para abordar esta tarea, un estudio anterior propuso un método de dos pasos que primero extraía las cláusulas de emoción y causa individualmente, luego combinaba las cláusulas de emoción y causa y filtraba las parejas sin causalidad. A diferencia de este método que separaba la detección y el emparejamiento de emoción y causa en dos pasos, proponemos un modelo de red de búsqueda local simétrica (SLSN) para realizar la detección y el emparejamiento simultáneamente mediante búsqueda local. El SLSN consta de dos subredes simétricas, a saber, la subred de emoción y la subred de causa. Cada subred está compuesta por un alumno de representación de cláusulas y un buscador de pares local. El buscador de pares locales es un componente de subred cruzado especialmente diseñado que puede extraer los pares emoción-causa locales. Los resultados experimentales en el corpus de ECPE demuestran la superioridad de nuestro SLSN sobre los métodos de vanguardia existentes.', 'pt': 'A extração de pares de emoções e causas (ECPE) é uma nova tarefa que visa extrair os potenciais pares de orações de emoções e causas correspondentes em um documento. Para resolver esta tarefa, um método de duas etapas foi proposto por estudo anterior que primeiro extraiu as cláusulas de emoção e cláusulas de causa individualmente, depois emparelhou as cláusulas de emoção e causa e filtrou os pares sem causalidade. Diferentemente deste método que separou a detecção e o casamento de emoção e causa em duas etapas, propomos um modelo de Rede de Busca Local Simétrica (SLSN) para realizar a detecção e o casamento simultaneamente por busca local. O SLSN consiste em duas sub-redes simétricas, ou seja, a sub-rede de emoção e a sub-rede de causa. Cada sub-rede é composta por um aprendiz de representação de cláusula e um buscador de pares local. O localizador de pares local é um componente de sub-rede cruzada especialmente projetado que pode extrair os pares locais de emoção-causa. Resultados experimentais no corpus ECPE demonstram a superioridade do nosso SLSN sobre os métodos existentes de última geração.', 'ja': '感情-原因ペア抽出（ ECPE ）は、文書内の感情と対応する原因の潜在的な条項ペアを抽出することを目的とした新しいタスクです。 この課題に取り組むために、2段階の方法が以前の研究によって提案されました。最初に感情節と原因節を個別に抽出し、次に感情節と原因節をペアリングし、因果関係のないペアをフィルタリングしました。 感情と原因の検出とマッチングを2つのステップに分離したこの方法とは異なり、ローカル検索によって検出とマッチングを同時に実行する対称ローカル検索ネットワーク（ SLSN ）モデルを提案します。 SLSNは、感情サブネットワークと原因サブネットワークの2つの対称サブネットワークで構成されています。 各サブネットワークは、条項表現学習者とローカルペアサーチャーで構成されています。 ローカルペアサーチャーは、ローカル感情-原因ペアを抽出することができる特別に設計されたクロスサブネットワークコンポーネントです。 ECPEコーパスの実験結果は、当社のSLSNが既存の最先端の方法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '情者-所以取(ECPE)者,一新也;指取文档者,所以应者也。 为此一事,前论二步法,先各取情子句故子句,然后配对其情,漉其无因果关系。 与将情故的检测和匹配分为两个步骤的方法不同,我们发出一种对称本地搜索网络(SLSN)模样,本地搜索同时检测匹配。 SLSN 两对称子网,情子网故也。 子网一子句,学习器一搜索器也。 本地对搜索器者,专计之跨子网组件,可以取本地之情是也。 ECPE语料库之实验结果表明,吾SLSN优于今最先进之法。', 'hi': 'भावना-कारण जोड़ी निष्कर्षण (ईसीपीई) एक नया कार्य है जिसका उद्देश्य किसी दस्तावेज़ में भावनाओं और संबंधित कारणों के संभावित खंड जोड़े को निकालना है। इस कार्य से निपटने के लिए, पिछले अध्ययन द्वारा एक दो-चरणीय विधि प्रस्तावित की गई थी, जिसने पहले भावना खंडों को निकाला और व्यक्तिगत रूप से खंडों का कारण बनाया, फिर भावनाओं को जोड़ा और क्लॉज का कारण बनाया, और बिना किसी कारण के जोड़े को फ़िल्टर किया। इस विधि से अलग है कि पता लगाने और भावना और कारण के मिलान दो चरणों में अलग, हम एक सममित स्थानीय खोज नेटवर्क (SLSN) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करने के लिए पता लगाने और स्थानीय खोज द्वारा एक साथ मिलान करने के लिए. SLSN में दो सममित उप-नेटवर्क होते हैं, अर्थात् भावना उपनेटवर्क और कारण सबनेटवर्क। प्रत्येक उप-नेटवर्क एक खंड प्रतिनिधित्व शिक्षार्थी और एक स्थानीय जोड़ी खोजकर्ता से बना होता है। स्थानीय जोड़ी खोजकर्ता एक विशेष रूप से डिज़ाइन किया गया क्रॉस-सबनेटवर्क घटक है जो स्थानीय भावना-कारण जोड़े को निकाल सकता है। ईसीपीई कॉर्पस पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम मौजूदा अत्याधुनिक तरीकों पर हमारे एसएलएसएन की श्रेष्ठता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Извлечение пары эмоционально-причинная (ECPE) является новой задачей, которая направлена на извлечение потенциальных пар эмоций клаузулы и соответствующих причин в документе. Для решения этой задачи в предыдущем исследовании был предложен двухэтапный метод, который сначала извлекал положения об эмоциях и вызывал положения по отдельности, затем спаривал положения об эмоциях и причинах и отфильтровывал пары без причинно-следственной связи. В отличие от этого метода, который разделяет обнаружение и сопоставление эмоций и вызывает в два этапа, мы предлагаем модель симметричной локальной поисковой сети (SLSN) для одновременного обнаружения и сопоставления с помощью локального поиска. SLSN состоит из двух симметричных подсетей, а именно подсети эмоций и подсети причин. Каждая подсеть состоит из обучающегося по представлению предложений и локального поисковика пар. Локальный поисковик пар - это специально разработанный кросс-подсетевой компонент, который может извлекать локальные пары эмоций-причин. Экспериментальные результаты на корпусе ECPE демонстрируют превосходство нашего SLSN над существующими современными методами.', 'ga': 'Is tasc nua é eastóscadh péirí mothúcháin-chúis (ECPE) a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige na péirí clásail féideartha de mhothúcháin agus na cúiseanna comhfhreagracha a bhaint i ndoiciméad. Chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, moladh modh dhá-chéim i staidéar roimhe seo a bhain an chéad chlásail mhothúcháin agus clásail chúise ina n-aonar, ansin péireáil na clásail mhothúcháin agus cúise, agus a rinne scagadh ar na péirí gan chúis. Difriúil ón modh seo a scar an braite agus an meaitseáil mothúcháin agus cúis ina dhá chéim, molaimid samhail de Líonra Cuardaigh Áitiúil Siméadrach (SLSN) chun an bhrath agus an meaitseáil a dhéanamh ag an am céanna trí chuardach áitiúil. Tá SLSN comhdhéanta de dhá fholíonra siméadracha, is iad sin an fo-líonra mothúcháin agus an fo-líonra cúise. Tá gach folíonra comhdhéanta d’fhoghlaimeoir ionadaíochta clásail agus cuardaitheoir péire áitiúil. Is comhpháirt tras-folíonra saindeartha é an cuardaitheoir péire áitiúil ar féidir leis na péirí áitiúla mothúcháin a bhaint as. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar chorpas an ECPE sármhaitheas ár SLSN thar mhodhanna úrscothacha atá ann cheana féin.', 'ka': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) არის ახალი რაოდენობა, რომელიც მინდომარებულია პოტენციალური კლასოზის ზოგი ემოციების და კომპორციალური მიზეზების გამოყენება დოკუმენტში. ამ დავალების გასაკეთებლად, წინა სწავლად ორ-კვადრატური მეტი იყო, რომელიც პირველად ემოციონის კლასების გამოყენება და კლასების გამოყენება individuულად, შემდეგ ემოციონის და კლასების გამოყენება და მიზ ამ მეტიდან განსხვავებულია, რომელიც ემოციონის განსხვავებას და თავისხვავებას და ემოციონის შესაბამისათვის, ჩვენ მუშაობით სიმტერული ლოკალური ძიება ქსელის (SLSN) მოდელს, რომელსაც ლოკალური ძიებაზე გან SLSN იყოს ორი სიმტერტიკური სბექსელი, რომელიც ემოციონის სბექსელი და სბექსელი. ყოველ საფექსელი საფექსელი იქნება კლასოს გამოსახულების სწავლებელი და ლოკალური საფექსელი. ლოკალური ორივე ძიება არის სპეციალურად განაზღვრებული კრისტქერის კომპონენტერი, რომელიც შესაძლებელია ლოკალური ემოციონის მიზეზი ზოგების გამოკლებ ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრართ ნა ECPE კჲპოსჟ ევმჲჟრპანრთპარ ნაქთჲრ SLSN ოჲ-დჲლწმჲჟრ ჱა ჟვჟრაღთრვ მვრჲეთ.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή ζευγαριού συναισθημάτων-αιτίας (ECPE) είναι μια νέα εργασία που στοχεύει στην εξαγωγή των πιθανών ζευγαριών των συναισθημάτων και των αντίστοιχων αιτιών σε ένα έγγραφο. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έργο, προτάθηκε μια μέθοδος δύο βημάτων από προηγούμενη μελέτη η οποία πρώτα εξάγει ρήτρες συναισθημάτων και ρήτρες αιτίας μεμονωμένα, στη συνέχεια ζευγαρώνει τις ρήτρες συναισθημάτων και αιτίας και φιλτράρει τα ζεύγη χωρίς αιτιώδη σχέση. Διαφορετικά από αυτή τη μέθοδο που διαχωρίζει την ανίχνευση και την αντιστοίχιση συναισθημάτων και αιτίας σε δύο βήματα, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο Symetric Local Search Network (για να εκτελέσει την ανίχνευση και αντιστοίχιση ταυτόχρονα με τοπική αναζήτηση. Το SLSN αποτελείται από δύο συμμετρικά υποδίκτυα, δηλαδή το υποδίκτυο συναισθημάτων και το υποδίκτυο αιτίας. Κάθε δευτερεύον δίκτυο αποτελείται από έναν μαθητή αναπαράστασης ρήτρας και έναν τοπικό αναζητητή ζευγαριού. Η αναζήτηση τοπικών ζευγαριών είναι ένα ειδικά σχεδιασμένο στοιχείο διασταυρούμενου υποδικτύου που μπορεί να εξαγάγει τα τοπικά ζεύγη συναισθημάτων-αιτίας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο σώμα αποδεικνύουν την υπεροχή του SLSN μας έναντι των υφιστάμενων σύγχρονων μεθόδων.', 'hu': 'Az érzelem-ok pár extrakció (ECPE) egy új feladat, amelynek célja, hogy kivonja az érzelmek potenciális záradékpárjait és a megfelelő okait egy dokumentumban. Ennek a feladatnak a megoldására az előző tanulmány egy kétlépcsős módszert javasolt, amely először külön-külön vonta ki az érzelmi záradékokat és okozáradékokat, majd párosította az érzelmi és ok záradékokat, és szűrte ki a párokat okozási összefüggés nélkül. Ezen módszertől eltérően, amely két lépésbe különválasztotta az érzelmek és okok felismerését és összehangolását, javasoljuk egy Szimmetrikus Helyi Kereső Hálózat (SLSN) modellt, amely egyidejűleg végrehajtja a felismerést és a megfelelő egyezést helyi kereséssel. Az SLSN két szimmetrikus alhálózatból áll, nevezetesen az érzelmi alhálózatból és az ok alhálózatból. Minden alhálózat egy záradék-ábrázoló tanulóból és egy helyi párkeresőből áll. A helyi párkereső egy speciálisan kialakított cross-subnetwork komponens, amely képes kivonni a helyi érzelem-ok párokat. Az ECPE korpuszon végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy SLSN-ünk felsőbbrendű a meglévő korszerű módszerekkel szemben.', 'it': "L'estrazione della coppia Emozione-Causa (ECPE) è un nuovo compito che mira ad estrarre le potenziali coppie di clausole di emozioni e cause corrispondenti in un documento. Per affrontare questo compito, uno studio precedente ha proposto un metodo in due fasi che prima estraeva le clausole emotive e le clausole causali individualmente, poi associava le clausole emotive e causali e filtrava le coppie senza causalità. Diverso da questo metodo che ha separato il rilevamento e l'abbinamento di emozione e causa in due passaggi, proponiamo un modello di Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) per eseguire il rilevamento e la corrispondenza simultaneamente tramite ricerca locale. SLSN è costituito da due sottoreti simmetriche, vale a dire la sottorete emotiva e la sottorete causa. Ogni sottorete è composta da un discente rappresentante delle clausole e da un cercatore di coppia locale. Il cercatore di coppia locale è un componente cross-subnetwork appositamente progettato che può estrarre le coppie emotive locali-causa. I risultati sperimentali sul corpus ECPE dimostrano la superiorità del nostro SLSN rispetto ai metodi esistenti all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Емоционална пар екстракција (ЕЦПЕ) е нова задача која има за цел екстракција на потенцијалните клаузули пар емоции и соодветни причини во документот. За да се справи со оваа задача, двачекорен метод беше предложен од претходната студија која прво ги извади емоционалните клаузули и предизвика клаузули индивидуално, потоа ги парираше емоциите и предизвика клаузулите, и ги филтрираше паровите без причина. Different from this method that separated the detection and the matching of emotion and cause into two steps, we propose a Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) model to perform the detection and matching simultaneously by local search.  SLSN се состои од две симетрични подмрежи, а тоа е емоционалната подмрежа и причината на подмрежата. Секоја подмрежа е составена од ученик за претставување на клаузулите и локален пребарувач на парови. Локалниот пребарувач на парови е специјално дизајниран компонент на крсто-подмрежа кој може да ги извади локалните парови од емоции. Експерименталните резултати на корпусот на ЕЦПЕ ја покажуваат супериорноста на нашиот СЛСН над постојните најсовремени методи.', 'lt': 'Emocijų priežasčių porų ekstrahavimas (ECPE) yra nauja užduotis, kuria siekiama dokumente ištraukti galimas emocijų ir atitinkamų priežasčių porų išlygas. Siekiant išspręsti šią užduotį, ankstesniame tyrime buvo pasiūlytas dviejų etapų metodas, pagal kurį pirmą kartą ištrauktos emocijos išlygos ir atskirai sukeltos išlygos, vėliau susiejamos emocijos ir priežasties išlygos ir filtruojamos pora be priežastinio ryšio. Skirtingai nuo šio metodo, kuris atskyrė emocijų aptikimą ir suderinimą ir sukelia dviem etapais, mes siūlome simmetrinio vietos paieškos tinklo (SLSN) model į, kuris tuo pačiu metu atliktų aptikimą ir suderinimą vietos paieškos būdu. SLSN sudaro du simetriniai posistemiai, būtent emocinis posistemis ir priežasties posistemis. Each subnetwork is composed of a clause representation learner and a local pair searcher.  Vietinis poros paieškos įrenginys yra specialiai suprojektuotas tarptinklinis komponentas, kuris gali ištraukti vietines emocijas sukeliančias poras. Eksperimentiniai ECPE korpuso rezultatai rodo mūsų SLSN viršenybę esamiems moderniausiems metodams.', 'kk': 'Эмоциялық себептердің екі тарқатуы (ECPE) деген жаңа тапсырма - мәліметтердің көпшіліктерінің екеуін тарқату мен құжаттағы сәйкес себептерін тапсырмалайтын тапсырмасы. Бұл тапсырманы шешу үшін алдыңғы зерттеу арқылы екі қадам әдісін ұсынды. Алдыңғы эмоциялық клаузын түсіру және клаузын бір-біріне түсіру арқылы, содан кейін емоцияларды біріктіріп, клаузын се Емоцияларды табу мен сәйкестігін бөліп, екі қадам ретінде, біз симметрикалық жергілікті іздеу желінің (SLSN) моделін жергілікті іздеу және сәйкестігін бірдей жергілікті іздеу үшін қолданатын симметрикал SLSN екі симметриялық субжелінен тұрады, мәселені эмоциялық субжелінің және субжелінің себебі. Әрбір ішкі желі клауз көрсету оқытушысынан және жергілікті екі іздеушінен құрылады. Жергілікті екі іздеуші - өзгертілген жұмыс ішкі желі компонент. Бұл жергілікті емоциялық себептердің екеуін тарқатып алады. ECPE корпусының эксперименталдық нәтижелері SLSN-тың күйінде бар әртүрлі әдістер арқылы көбіректігін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi pasangan penyebab emosi (ECPE) adalah tugas baru yang bermaksud mengekstrak pasangan emosi yang berpotensi dan penyebab yang sepadan dalam dokumen. Untuk menangani tugas ini, satu kaedah dua langkah telah diusulkan oleh kajian sebelumnya yang pertama mengekstrak klawsul emosi dan menyebabkan klawsul secara individu, kemudian pasang emosi dan menyebabkan klawsul, dan menapis keluar pasangan tanpa penyebab. Berbeza dari kaedah ini yang memisahkan pengesan dan persamaan emosi dan menyebabkan ke dua langkah, kami melamar model Rangkaian Gelintar Setempat Simmetrik (SLSN) untuk melakukan pengesan dan persamaan secara bersamaan dengan gelintar setempat. SLSN terdiri dari dua subrangkaian simetrik, iaitu subrangkaian emosi dan subrangkaian penyebab. Setiap subrangkaian terdiri dari pelajar mewakili klausul dan pencari pasangan setempat. Pencari pasangan setempat adalah komponen salib-subrangkaian yang dirancang secara khusus yang boleh mengekstrak pasangan emosi-menyebabkan setempat. Experimental results on the ECPE corpus demonstrate the superiority of our SLSN over existing state-of-the-art methods.', 'ml': 'ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d കാരണമായ ജോടി പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് (ECPE) ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലിയാണ്. ഒരു രേഖയില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ജോഡികള്\u200d പുറത്ത To tackle this task, a two-step method was proposed by previous study which first extracted emotion clauses and cause clauses individually, then paired the emotion and cause clauses, and filtered out the pairs without causality.  ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെയും വികാരങ്ങളുടെ പൊരുത്തത്തെയും രണ്ടു പടികളിലേക്ക് കാണിക്കുന്നതിനെയും വ്യത്യസ്തമായി സിമ്പ്രിക്കല്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d ത SLSN രണ്ട് സിമ്പ്രിക്കല്\u200d സബ്വര്\u200dക്കെര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ളതാണ്, പേരിലുള്ള സബ്വര്\u200dക്കെറ്റും കാരണം സബ്വര്\u200dക്കെറ എല്ലാ സബ്വര്\u200dക്കെര്\u200dക്കും ഒരു ക്ലൌസ് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന പഠനിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ലോക്കല്\u200d ജോട്ടി തെരയുന് പ്രാദേശിക ജോടി തെരച്ചില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഡിസൈനിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്രിസ്റ്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് പ്രാദേശികമായ ഒരു സംഘടിയാ ECPE കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ SLSN-ന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200dനോട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രത', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni ta’ par ta’ kawżi emozzjonali (ECPE) hija kompitu ġdid li għandu l-għan li jestra l-klawżola potenzjali ta’ par ta’ emozzjonijiet u kawżi korrispondenti f’dokument. Biex jiġi indirizzat dan il-kompitu, ġie propost metodu ta’ żewġ stadji permezz ta’ studju preċedenti li l-ewwel estratta klawżoli emozzjonali u kkawża klawżoli individwalment, imbagħad ipparagunat l-emozzjonijiet u jikkawża klawżoli, u ffiltra l-pari mingħajr kawżalità. B’differenza minn dan il-metodu li sseparat id-detezzjoni u t-tqabbil tal-emozzjoni u jikkawża f’żewġ passi, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ Netwerk ta’ Tfittxija Lokali Simmetriku (SLSN) biex jitwettaq id-detezzjoni u t-tqabbil simultanjament permezz ta’ tiftix lokali. SLSN tikkonsisti f’żewġ sottonetwerks simetriċi, jiġifieri s-sottonetwerk emozzjonali u s-sottonetwerk tal-kawża. Kull sottonetwerk huwa magħmul minn persuna li titgħallem ir-rappreżentanza tal-klawżola u minn persuna li tfittex pari lokali. It-tiftix tal-pari lokali huwa komponent cross-network iddisinjat apposta li jista’ jastrezzjona l-pari lokali li jikkawżaw emozzjonijiet. Riżultati esperimentali fuq l-ECPE corpus juru s-superjorità tal-SLSN tagħna fuq il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati eżistenti.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шалтгаан хоёр гаргах (ECPE) нь шинэ үйл ажиллагаа юм. Энэ нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хоёр сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хоёр шалтгаануудыг баримт бичээд харилца Энэ үйлдлийг зохицуулахын тулд өмнөх судалгаагаар хоёр давхар аргыг санал болгосон. Эхлээд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шалтгаан гаргаж, хувийн шалтгааны шалтгаан гаргаж, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг хоорондоо хоорондоо холбогдож, шалтгаа Энэ арга нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэмжүүдийг олох, хоёр алхам руу хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хооронд SLSN нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн суб сүлжээнд хоёр төрлийн суб сүлжээнд байдаг. Гурван сүлжээний бүрт сурагчид болон орон нутгийн хоёр хайгчид бүрдсэн. Орон нутгийн хоёр хайгчид нь өөрийн төлөвлөгөө бүтээгдэхүүнтэй холбоотой хоёр сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шалтгааныг гаргаж чадна. ECPE корпус дээрх туршилтын үр дүнд бидний SLSN-ын өндөр байдал дээр орших урлагийн арга замыг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja pary emocji-przyczyn (ECPE) to nowe zadanie, którego celem jest wyodrębnienie potencjalnych par emocji i odpowiadających im przyczyn w dokumencie. Aby sprostać temu zadaniu, w poprzednich badaniach zaproponowano metodę dwuetapową, która najpierw wydobywała klauzule emocji i przyczyny indywidualnie, następnie sparowała klauzule emocji i przyczyny, a następnie wyfiltrowała pary bez związku przyczynowego. W odróżnieniu od tej metody, która rozdzieliła wykrywanie i dopasowanie emocji i przyczyny na dwa etapy, proponujemy model Symmetrycznej Sieci Lokalnej Wyszukiwania (SLSN), aby wykonać wykrywanie i dopasowanie jednocześnie za pomocą lokalnego wyszukiwania. SLSN składa się z dwóch symetrycznych podsieci, a mianowicie podsieci emocji i podsieci przyczyn. Każda podsieć składa się z uczącego się z klauzuli reprezentacyjnej i lokalnego wyszukiwarki par. Lokalny wyszukiwarka par jest specjalnie zaprojektowanym komponentem cross-sub-network, który może wyodrębnić lokalne pary emocji-przyczyny. Wyniki eksperymentalne na korpusie ECPE pokazują przewagę naszego SLSN nad istniejącymi najnowocześniejszymi metodami.', 'ro': 'Extracția perechilor emoțional-cauză (ECPE) este o nouă sarcină care vizează extragerea potențialelor perechi de clauze de emoții și cauze corespunzătoare dintr-un document. Pentru a aborda această sarcină, o metodă în două etape a fost propusă de studiul anterior, care a extras mai întâi clauzele emoționale și de cauză individual, apoi a asociat clauzele emoționale și cauză și a filtrat perechile fără cauzalitate. Diferit de această metodă care a separat detectarea și potrivirea emoțiilor și cauzelor în doi pași, propunem un model Simmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) pentru a efectua detectarea și potrivirea simultan prin căutare locală. SLSN constă din două subrețele simetrice, și anume subrețeaua emoțională și subrețeaua cauzei. Fiecare subrețea este compusă dintr-un elev reprezentând clauze și un căutător local de perechi. Căutătorul local de perechi este o componentă special concepută cross-subrețea care poate extrage perechile locale emoții-cauză. Rezultatele experimentale asupra corpului ECPE demonstrează superioritatea SLSN-ului nostru față de metodele de ultimă generație existente.', 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av emosjonsårsaker er ein ny oppgåve som mål å pakka ut dei potensielle klauspar av emosjonar og tilsvarande grunnane i eit dokument. For å løse denne oppgåva, vart det førehandsvis ein to-steg metode av førre studie som først ekstraherer emosjonsklausar og fører til klausar individuelt, så parerte emosjonen og forårsaker klausar, og filtererte ut par utan grunnlag. Forskjellig frå denne metoden som skildra oppdaginga og samsvar med emosjonar og fører til to steg, fører vi ein symmetrisk lokal søkjetekst (SLSN) modell for å utføra oppdaginga og samsvar med lokale søk. SLSN består av to simetriske undernettverk, som er undernettverket for emosjonar og undernettverket. Kvart undernettverk er lagt av ein lærar for representasjon av klausur og ein lokal par søkjer. Lokal par søkjer er ein spesielt utforma kryss- undernettverk- komponent som kan pakka ut dei lokale emosjonsgrunnslane par. Eksperimentale resultat på ECPE-korpusen viser overhøgden av SLSN vårt over eksisterande metodar for kunsten.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija par emocija (ECPE) je novi zadatak koji je cilj izvlačenja potencijalnih parova emocija i odgovarajućih uzroka u dokumentu. Da bi se riješio ovaj zadatak, predložio je prethodna studija koja je prvi put izvukala klauzule emocija i uzrokovala klauzule individualno, zatim je povezala emocije i uzrokovala klauzule i filtrirala par bez uzrokovanja. Drugačiji od ovog metoda koji je razdvojio otkrivanje i odgovaranje emocija i uzrokovalo dva koraka, predlažemo simetričnu lokalnu potragu mrežu (SLSN) za izvršavanje otkrivanja i odgovaranja istovremeno lokalnom potragu. SLSN se sastoji od dve simetričke podmreže, a to je podmreža emocija i podmreža uzroka. Svaka podmreža je sastavljena od učitelja predstave klauzule i lokalnog pretraživača par. Lokalni pretraživač par je specijalno dizajniran prekretni komponent koji može izvući lokalne parove zbog emocija. Eksperimentalni rezultati ECPE korpusa pokazuju superiornost našeg SLSN na postojećim metodama umjetnosti.', 'si': 'Emotion-cause double extraction (ECPE) is a new job that seeks to extract the chances of clause and compare cause in a file. මේ වැඩක් විස්තර කරන්න, පැත්තක් දෙකක් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පළවෙනි විස්තර විදියට, මුලින් හැඟීමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අරගෙන,  මේ විධානයෙන් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් හොයාගන්න හා හැඟීමේ සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පැත්තක් දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි සිම්මෙට්\u200dරික් ස්ථාන SLSN එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය සබ්ජාලය දෙකක් තියෙනවා, තමයි හැඟීම සබ්ජාලය සහ සබ්ජාලය. හැම උපජාලයේ සම්පූර්ණ ජාලය සහ ස්ථානික ජාලය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්ගෙන් සංවිධානය කරනවා. ස්ථානික ජෝඩි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන්ම විශේෂයෙන් සැකසුම් සබ්ජාලය සම්බන්ධයක් වෙන්න පු ECPE කෝර්පුස් එකේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නවා අපේ SLSN එකේ විශේෂතාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තිය', 'so': "Dhaqaalaha labada labo oo isxaajoodka ah (ECPE) waa shaqo cusub oo ku talo gala in uu ka soo bixiyo isqabashada labada ismood iyo sababo ku haboon dukumentiga. Si loo qabsado shuqulkaas, waxaa loo soo jeeday waxbarasho hore oo ay marka hore ka soo bixisay bandhigyo xujada islamarkaasna ay u sababto fasaxyo kali ah, markaasna ay isku qabsadaan xisaabta, sababtoodiina waxay ka dhigaan fasaxyo, waxayna filterayeen labada labood sabab la'aan. Midabkan oo kala duwan u kala soocay garsoorida iyo isku mid ahaanshaha islamarkaasna waxaynu soo jeedaynaa noocyada raadinta ee shabakadda deegaanka (SLSN) si aan u sameyno baaritaanka islamarkaasna u egno raadinta deegaanka. SLSN waxaa ka mid ah labo shabakado shabakad, taas oo ah shabakadda maandooriyaha iyo sababta shabakadda. Each subnetwork is composed of a clause representation learner and a local pair searcher.  Baaraandegista labada nooc waa qeyb gaar ah oo lagu qoray shabakadda iskuulka ah, kaasoo ka soo bixi kara labada ismood sabab ah ee degmada. Imtixaanka ku saabsan korpuska ECPE waxay muujiyaan sarkaalkii SLSN ee ku saabsan qaababka ay jiraan xaaladda farshaxanka.", 'ta': 'உணர்வு காரணத்தால் ஜோடி வெளியேறுதல் (ECPE) ஒரு புதிய செயலாகும் அது ஆவணத்தில் சாத்தியமான குறிப்பு ஜோடி உணர்வுகளை வெளியேற்றுவதற் இந்த செயலை எதிர்பார்க்க, முந்தைய ஆய்வு முறையாக ஒரு இரண்டு படி முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டது, அது முதலில் உணர்வு குறிப்புகளை வெளியேற்றி தனியாக @ info SLSN இரண்டு symmetric subnetworks, அதாவது உணர்வு துணை வலைப்பிணையம் மற்றும் அதனால் துணை வலைப்பிணையம். @ info உள்ளமைப்பு ஜோடி தேடுதல் ஒரு சிறப்பு வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட முறை துணை வலைப்பின்னல் பகுதி ECPE கோர்ப்ஸ் மீது சோதனை முடிவு', 'sv': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) är en ny uppgift som syftar till att extrahera potentiella klausulpar av känslor och motsvarande orsaker i ett dokument. För att hantera denna uppgift föreslogs en tvåstegsmetod i tidigare studie som först extraherade känsloklausuler och orsakklausuler individuellt, sedan parade känsloklausulerna och orsakklausulerna, och filtrerade ut paren utan orsakssamband. Olika från denna metod som separerade detektering och matchning av känslor och orsak i två steg, föreslår vi en Symmetrisk Local Search Network (SLSN) modell för att utföra detektering och matchning samtidigt genom lokal sökning. SLSN består av två symmetriska undernätverk, nämligen känsloundernätverket och orsakundernätverket. Varje undernätverk består av en elev som representerar satser och en lokal parsökare. Den lokala parsökaren är en speciellt utformad komponent över undernätverk som kan extrahera de lokala känsloorsaksparen. Experimentella resultat på ECPE-korpusen visar att vårt SLSN är överlägset över befintliga toppmoderna metoder.', 'ur': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) ایک نئی تابع ہے جس کا ارادہ ہے کہ احساسات کے امکانات کے جوڑوں کو نکالنا اور ایک دکھانے میں مطابق مناسب دلیلوں کو اضافہ کرنا۔ اس کام کا حل کرنے کے لئے، ایک دو قدم کا طریقہ پہلے کی تحقیق سے پیش کیا گیا تھا جو پہلے احساسات کا کلاس اٹھایا گیا تھا اور ایک طریقے سے کلاس اٹھایا گیا تھا، پھر احساسات کو جوڑا دیا اور کلاس کی وجہ سے جوڑا دیا گیا تھا، اور جفت کو بغیر دلیل کے فیلت اس طریقہ سے متفاوت ہے جو پہچان اور احساسات کا مطابق جدا کرتا ہے اور دو قدموں میں موجود ہوتا ہے، ہم ایک سیمیٹریک محلی جگہ نیٹ ورک (SLSN) موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ جگہ پہچان اور مطابق محلی جگہ کے ذریعہ ایک دوسرے سے ملے۔ SLSN دو سیمیٹریک سوب نیٹ نیٹ ورک میں ہے، یعنی احساسات سوب نیٹ ورک اور سبک نیٹ ورک میں۔ ہر سوب نیٹ نیٹ ورک ایک کلاس نمایش کی تعلیم یاد کرنے والے اور ایک محلی جفت جفت کا تلاش کرنے والے سے بنایا گیا ہے. محلی جوڑا جڑ لکھنے والا ایک مخصوص طراحی کرس-سوب-نیٹ ورک komponent ہے جو محلی احساسات کے باعث جوڑوں کو اٹھا سکتا ہے. ECPE کورپوس کے تجربے کے نتیجے ہمارے SLSN کی زیادتی کو موجود حالت آرتی طریقے پر دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "ECPE (ECPE) hisoboti uchun ikki xil ajratish yangi vazifa. Hujjatdagi muhimi bir xil hisoblarni ajratishga ega bo'ladi. Bu vazifani boshqarish uchun oldingi o'qituvdan ikki qadam usuli, birinchi o'qituvchi hissiyotning xususiyatlarini ko'rsatadi va boshqalarga qo'yish va hissiyotni qo'yish va qo'llashni sabablar'lmaydi, qo'llarni filterlab chiqaradi. Name Name @ info Name Name", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác cặp cảm xúc (ECPE) là một nhiệm vụ mới nhằm mục đích khai thác các điều khoản cảm xúc tiềm năng và nguyên nhân tương ứng trong một tài liệu. Để giải quyết nhiệm vụ này, một phương pháp hai bước được đề xuất từ một nghiên cứu trước, thứ đã sử dụng các nguyên tắc cảm xúc và nguyên nhân, sau đó kết hợp các cảm xúc và nguyên nhân, và lọc ra các cặp không có nhân quả. Khác với phương pháp đã phân cách phát hiện và kết hợp cảm xúc và gây ra thành hai bước, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình Tìm kiếm cục bộ Đối xứng (SLSN) để thực hiện phát hiện và kết hợp đồng thời bằng cách tìm kiếm cục bộ. Vớ vẩn gồm hai mạng lưới phân tử đối xứng, đó là mạng lưới phân động cảm xúc và mạng phụ nguyên nhân. Mỗi mạng lưới phụ bao gồm một điều khoản người học lái và một nhà tìm kiếm đôi địa phương. The local pair searcher là một thành phần lai mạng được thiết kế đặc biệt, có thể tách ra các cặp cảm xúc xung quanh. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên tập thể ECPE đã chứng minh khả năng vượt trội của họ so với các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Екстракцията на двойката емоция-причина (ЕКПЕ) е нова задача, която има за цел извличане на потенциалните клаузи двойки емоции и съответните причини в документа. За да се справи с тази задача, в предишно проучване е предложен двустъпен метод, който първо извлича емоционалните клаузи и предизвиква клаузи поотделно, след това сдвоява емоционалните и причинните клаузи и филтрира двойките без причинно-следствена връзка. За разлика от този метод, който разделя откриването и съвпадението на емоцията и причината на две стъпки, предлагаме модел Симетрична локална мрежа за търсене (СЛСН) за извършване на откриването и съвпадението едновременно чрез локално търсене. СЛСН се състои от две симетрични подмрежи, а именно емоционалната подмрежа и причинната подмрежа. Всяка подмрежа се състои от учащ се с представяне на клаузи и локален търсач по двойки. Локалният търсач на двойки е специално проектиран компонент на кръстосана подмрежа, който може да извлече локалните двойки емоции-причини. Експерименталните резултати на корпуса показват превъзходството на нашия СЛСН спрямо съществуващите съвременни методи.', 'da': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) er en ny opgave, der har til formål at udtrække de potentielle klausulpar af følelser og tilsvarende årsager i et dokument. For at løse denne opgave blev en todrinsmetode foreslået af tidligere undersøgelse, som først ekstraherede følelsesklausuler og årsagsklausuler individuelt, derefter parrede følelsesklausuler og årsagsklausuler og filtrerede parrene uden årsagssammenhæng. Forskellig fra denne metode, der adskilte detektion og matchning af følelser og årsag i to trin, foreslår vi en Symmetrisk Local Search Network (SLSN) model til at udføre detektion og matchning samtidig ved lokal søgning. SLSN består af to symmetriske undernetværk, nemlig følelses undernetværket og årsagsundernetværket. Hvert undernetværk består af en sætningsrepræsentationselev og en lokal parsøger. Den lokale par søger er en specielt designet cross-subnetværk komponent, der kan udtrække de lokale følelses-årsag par. Eksperimentelle resultater på ECPE corpus viser vores SLSN overlegenhed i forhold til eksisterende state-of-the-art metoder.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija par emocija-uzroka (ECPE) je novi zadatak koji je cilj izvlačenja potencijalnih parova emocija i odgovarajućih uzroka u dokumentu. Za rješavanje ovog zadatka, predložila je prethodna ispitivanja koja je prvo izvukala klauzule emocija i uzrokovala klauzule individualno, zatim je povezala emocije i uzrokovala klauzule i filtrirala par bez uzrokovanja. Drugačiji od ovog metoda koji je razdvojio otkrivanje i odgovaranje emocija i uzrokovao dvije korake, predlažemo simetričnu lokalnu potragu mrežu (SLSN) kako bi se istovremeno otkrila i odgovarala lokalnom potragu. SLSN se sastoji od dvije simetričke podmreže, a to je podmreža emocija i podmreža uzroka. Svaka podmreža sastoji se od učitelja predstave klauzule i lokalnog pretraživača par. Lokalni pretraživač par je specijalno dizajniran komponent prekretne mreže koji može izvući lokalne parove zbog emocija. Eksperimentalni rezultati ECPE korpusa pokazuju nadvišenost našeg SLSN zbog postojećih metoda umjetnosti.', 'nl': 'Emotie-cause pair extraction (ECPE) is een nieuwe taak die gericht is op het extraheren van de potentiële clausule paren van emoties en bijbehorende oorzaken in een document. Om deze taak aan te pakken, werd een tweestapsmethode voorgesteld door eerdere studie die eerst emotieclausules en oorzakeclausules afzonderlijk extraheerde, vervolgens de emotie- en oorzakeclausules koppelde en de paren zonder causaliteit filterde. Anders dan deze methode die de detectie en het matchen van emotie en oorzaak scheidde in twee stappen, stellen we een Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) model voor om de detectie en matching gelijktijdig uit te voeren door lokaal zoeken. SLSN bestaat uit twee symmetrische subnetwerken, namelijk het emotie subnetwerk en het oorzaak subnetwerk. Elk subnetwerk bestaat uit een leerling voor clausulerepresentatie en een lokale koppelzoeker. De lokale pair searcher is een speciaal ontworpen cross-subnetwerk component die de lokale emotie-oorzaak paren kan extraheren. Experimentele resultaten op het ECPE corpus tonen de superioriteit van onze SLSN ten opzichte van bestaande state-of-the-art methoden aan.', 'ko': '감정적 원인 추출(ECPE)은 문서에 잠재되어 있는 감정의 자구와 그에 대응하는 원인을 추출하는 새로운 임무이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 이전의 연구는 두 가지 방법을 제시했다. 먼저 감정종구와 원인종구를 각각 추출한 다음에 감정종구와 원인종구를 배합한 다음에 인과관계가 없는 배합을 필터했다.감정과 원인의 검측과 정합을 두 단계로 나누는 이런 방법과 달리 우리는 대칭 국부 검색 네트워크(SLSN) 모델을 제시하여 국부 검색을 통해 검측과 정합을 동시에 진행한다.SLSN은 감정 서브넷과 원인 서브넷이라는 두 개의 대칭 서브넷으로 구성됩니다.모든 서브네트워크는 서브문장 표시 학습기와 국부 검색기로 구성되어 있다.국부 짝짓기 검색기는 전문적으로 설계된 크로스 서브넷 구성 요소로 국부 감정 짝짓기를 추출할 수 있다.ECPE 자료 라이브러리에서의 실험 결과, 우리의 SLSN 방법은 기존의 최신 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있습니다.', 'de': 'Emotion-Cause Pair Extraction (ECPE) ist eine neue Aufgabe, die darauf abzielt, die möglichen Satzpaare von Emotionen und entsprechenden Ursachen in einem Dokument zu extrahieren. Um diese Aufgabe anzugehen, wurde eine zweistufige Methode vorgeschlagen, die zunächst Emotions- und Cause-Sätze einzeln extrahierte, dann Emotions- und Cause-Sätze paarte und die Paare ohne Kausalität herausfilterte. Anders als bei dieser Methode, die die Erkennung und das Matching von Emotion und Ursache in zwei Schritte trennte, schlagen wir ein Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) Modell vor, um die Erkennung und das Matching gleichzeitig durch lokale Suche durchzuführen. SLSN besteht aus zwei symmetrischen Subnetzwerken, nämlich dem Emotion Subnetzwerk und dem Ursache Subnetzwerk. Jedes Unternetzwerk besteht aus einem Lerner für Klauseln und einem lokalen Paarsucher. Der Local Pair Search ist eine speziell entwickelte Cross-Sub-Netzwerk-Komponente, die die lokalen Emotion-Ursache-Paare extrahieren kann. Experimentelle Ergebnisse am ECPE-Korpus belegen die Überlegenheit unseres SLSN gegenüber bestehenden State-of-the-Art-Methoden.', 'sw': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) is a new task which aims at extracting the potential clause pairs of emotions and corresponding causes in a document.  Ili kukabiliana na kazi hii, njia ya hatua mbili ilipendekezwa na utafiti uliopita ambao mara ya kwanza ilitoa vipengele vya hisia na kusababisha vipengele vya watu binafsi, kisha kuunganisha hisia na kusababisha clarifa, na kuchuja vidole vya wanaume bila sababu. Tofauti na mbinu hii inayotenganisha uchunguzi na kuunganisha hisia na kusababisha hatua mbili, tunapendekeza modeli ya Search Network ya Ndani (SLSN) ili kutekeleza uchunguzi na kupambana na kutafuta kwa wakati mmoja. SLSN ina mitandao miwili ya mfumo, yaani mtandao wa hisia na sababu ya mtandao wa chini. Kila mtandao wa chini unaundwa na mwandishi wa uwakilishi wa clause na mtafuaji wa wawili wa ndani. Mtangazaji wawili wa eneo hilo ni sehemu maalum iliyobuniwa na mtandao wa kupitia mtandao ambao unaweza kuondoa wanandoa wa hisia-sababu za eneo hilo. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na makampuni ya ECPE yanaonyesha ukubwa wa SLSN kwa njia zilizopo kwenye hali ya sanaa.', 'fa': 'اخراج جفت\u200cهای احساسات (ECPE) یک کار جدید است که هدف گرفتن جفت\u200cهای احساسات و دلایل\u200cهای متفاوت در یک سند است. برای حل این کار، یک روش دو مرحله توسط مطالعه قبلی پیشنهاد شد که اول کلاس احساسات را اخراج می\u200cکند و به فرد فرد برمی\u200cآورد، سپس احساسات را جفت می\u200cکند و باعث کلاس\u200cها می\u200cشود، و جفت\u200cها را بدون دلایل فیلتر می\u200cکند. متفاوت از این روش که کشف و هماهنگ احساسات را جدا کرد و به دو قدم باعث شد، یک شبکه جستجوی محلی سیمتریک (SLSN) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا کشف و هماهنگ با جستجوی محلی انجام دهد. SLSN consists of two symmetric subnetworks, namely the emotion subnetwork and the cause subnetwork. هر زیر شبکه از یک دانش شناسایی کلاس و جفت جفت محلی ساخته شده است. جفت جفت محلی یک بخش مخصوص طراحی شده از زیر شبکه است که می تواند جفت احساسات محلی را خارج کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی کورپوس ECPE بر روی روش\u200cهای هنر موجود بالاترین SLSN ما نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Duýgy-sebäpli çift a çmak (ECPE) täze bir göreldir. Bu senede potensial duýgularyň çift sanyny açmak we täsirli sebäplerini açmak amalydyr. Bu işi çözmek üçin, öňki duýgular klausuny ilkinji gezek ýitirýän, duýgularyň çarpmasyndan soňra duýgularyň bir iki adım ýüzüni baglaşdyryp, çarpyşmalaryň üçin bir nusgasyny çykar we bir sebäpsiz çizildi. Bu döwürden üýtgeşik tapylmak we duýgularyň eşleşmesini we iki adıma bölmek üçin bir simetrik ýerli Arama Network (SLSN) modelini ýerleşken arama tarapyndan tapylmak we eşleşmesini saýlamak üçin teklip edýäris. SLSN, duýgularyň subşebeki we sebäbi şebekleriň iki simetrik şebeklerden bar. Her alt şebeke bir klas namaýyşçysynyň we ýerleşki çift gözatçisinden bejer. Ýerli çift gözatçisi özellikle tasarlanýan cross-subnetwork komponenti. Bu ýerleri duýgym sebäbi çift a çyp biler. ECPE korpusynyň azykly netijeleri SLSN'iň üstünligini bar ýaly sungat döwletlerinde görkezilýär.", 'id': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) is a new task which aims at extracting the potential clause pairs of emotions and corresponding causes in a document.  Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, sebuah metode dua langkah diusulkan oleh studi sebelumnya yang pertama mengekstrak klawsul emosi dan menyebabkan klawsul secara individu, kemudian pasang emosi dan menyebabkan klawsul, dan menyusun pasangan tanpa penyebab. Different from this method that separated the detection and the matching of emotion and cause into two steps, we propose a Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) model to perform the detection and matching simultaneously by local search.  SLSN consists of two symmetric subnetworks, namely the emotion subnetwork and the cause subnetwork.  Setiap subjaringan terdiri dari pelajar representation klausul dan pencari pasangan lokal. Pencari pasangan lokal adalah komponen cross-network yang dirancang khusus yang dapat mengekstraksi pasangan emosi lokal. Hasil eksperimen pada ECPE corpus menunjukkan superioritas SLSN kita atas metode yang ada.', 'af': "Emotion-oorsaak paar uitpakking (ECPE) is 'n nuwe taak wat doel om die potensiele klause paar van emosies te uitpak en ooreenstemmende oorsaak in 'n dokument. Om hierdie taak te trek, was 'n twee-stap metode voorgestel deur vorige studie wat eerste emosie klauses uitgevoer het en klauses individueel veroorsaak, dan het die emosie en klauses veroorsaak en die paar sonder oorsaaklikheid uitgefiltreer. Verskillende van hierdie metode wat die oppdaging en die ooreenstemming van emosie en veroorsaak in twee stappe, ons voorstel 'n Simetriese Plaaslike Soektog Netwerk (SLSN) model na uitvoer die oppdaging en ooreenstemming simultaan deur plaaslike soektog. SLSN bestaan van twee simetriese subnetwerke, naamlik die emosie subnetwerk en die oorsaak subnetwerk. Elke subnetwerk is gemaak van 'n klaus voorstelling leerder en 'n plaaslike paar soektog. Die plaaslike paar soektog is 'n spesiaal-ontwerp kruisnetwerk komponent wat die plaaslike emosie-oorsaak paar kan uitpak. Eksperimentale resultate op die ECPE corpus vertoon die hoogheid van ons SLSN oor bestaande state-of-the-art metodes.", 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i çifteve të shkaktuara nga emocionet (ECPE) është një detyrë e re që synon të nxjerrë çiftet e mundshme të çifteve të emocioneve dhe shkaqet korrespondente në një dokument. Për të trajtuar këtë detyrë, një metodë dy-hapësh u propozua nga studimi i mëparshëm i cili së pari nxori klauzula emocionale dhe shkaktoi klauzula individualisht, pastaj i bashkoi emocionet dhe shkaktoi klauzula, dhe i filtroi çiftet pa shkak. Different from this method that separated the detection and the matching of emotion and cause into two steps, we propose a Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) model to perform the detection and matching simultaneously by local search.  SLSN përbëhet nga dy nënrrjete simetrike, veçanërisht nënrrjeti emocional dhe nënrrjeti shkak. Çdo nënrrjet përbëhet nga një mësues përfaqësimi i klauzulave dhe një kërkues i çifteve lokale. Kërkuesi i çifteve lokale është një komponent i ndërrrjetit të dizajnuar posaçërisht që mund të nxjerrë çiftet lokale të shkaktuara nga emocionet. Rezultatet eksperimentale në ECPE korpus demonstrojnë superioritetin e SLSN-së tonë ndaj metodave ekzistuese të moderne.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመቀናቀል፣ የቀድሞው ትምህርት፣ አስቀድሞ የስሜት ግልጾች እና ግልጾችን ለብቻው እና ግንኙነቱን ለብቻው አቀረበ፣ እናም አስተያየትን አጋራረበ እና ጉዳይ እና ሁለቶችን ያለ ምክንያት አጣራ፡፡ ከዚህ method የተለየ እና የአሳብ ግንኙነትን እና ለሁለት ደረጃዎች የሚገናኙ የሲምቲክኛ ውስጥ መረብ መረብ (SLSN) ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን እና በመስጠት እና በመስጠት በመስጠት ይተካክላሉ፡፡ SLSN የስሜትሪክ አካባቢ መረብ እና የመስመር መረብ የሚቆጠሩ ሁለት የሲምትርክ ደብተር መረብ ነው፡፡ ሁሉም ደብዳቤ ማረፊያውን እና የአገር ሁለትን ፈለጊ ጥያቄ ይደረጋል፡፡ ሁኔታ በECPE ኮርፓስ ላይ የፍሬት ውጤቶች በአገኘው የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ላይ የSLSN ክፍልፍላቸውን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների պատճառի զույգերի վերացումը (ԷԿՊ) նոր խնդիր է, որը նպատակում է վերացնել զգացմունքների և համապատասխան պատճառների պոտենցիալ բառերը փաստաթղթի մեջ: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար նախորդ ուսումնասիրության արդյունքում առաջարկել է երկու քայլ մեթոդ, որը առաջին անգամ հանեց զգացմունքների պայմաններն ու առաջարկեց պայմաններն առանձին, հետո միավորեց զգացմունքները և առաջարկեց պայմանները, և ֆիլտրեց զույգերը առանց պատ Ի տարբերություն այս մեթոդից, որը բաժանեց զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը և համապատասխանումը և առաջարկում է երկու քայլեր, մենք առաջարկում ենք համաչափ տեղական որոնման ցանցի (ՍԼՍՆ) մոդել, որը միաժամանակ կատարի հայտնաբերումը և համապատասխանումը տեղական որոնման միջոցով: ՍԼՍն կազմում է երկու սիմետրիկ ենթացանց, հատկապես զգացմունքների ենթացանց և պատճառի ենթացանց: Յուրաքանչյուր ենթացանց կազմված է դասությունների ներկայացման ուսանողից և տեղական զույգ որոնողից: Տեղական զույգերի փնտրողը հատուկ նախագծված հատվածային ենթացանցի բաղադրիչ է, որը կարող է հանել տեղական զգացմունքների պատճառ ունեցող զույգերը: ԵԿՊ-ի կորպոսի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր ՍԼՍՆ-ի գերազանցությունը գոյություն ունեցող ամենաբարձր մեթոդների նկատմամբ:', 'az': "Emotion-cause çift çıxarma (ECPE) yeni bir işdir ki, potensial duyguların çift hissəsini və məlumatlarını belə bir dəstədə çıxartmaq istəyir. Bu işi çəkmək üçün, əvvəlki təhsil təhsil edilmişdi ki, ilk dəfə duygusal clausu çıxartdı və clausu indi təhsil etdi, sonra duygusallıqları birləşdirdi və clausu yaratdı və cütləri təhsil olmadan filtrlədi. Bu metodlardan fərqli keşif, duyguların eşitməsini və iki adımlara səbəb olan, yerli arama ilə birlikdə keşif və eşitməsini təmin edirik. SLSN iki simetrik altı ağlardan olub, həmçinin emosyon altı ağlası və olaraq altı ağlasıdır. Hər alt şəbəkə clause representation öyrənən və yerli çift axtarıcıdan olub. Yerli çift axtarıcısı özlərinə müəyyən edilmiş qarşılaşdırılmış şəbəkə komponentdir ki, yerli emosiyalar üçün çiftlər çıxara bilər. ECPE korpusunun təcrübə sonuçları bizim SLSN'imizin üstünlüyünü mövcuddur sanat metodlarının üstünlüyünü göstərir.", 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija par emocija (ECPE) je novi zadatak koji je cilj izvlačenja potencijalnih parova emocija i odgovarajućih uzroka u dokumentu. Da bi se riješila ovaj zadatak, predložila je prethodna studija koja je prvi put izvukala klauzule emocija i uzrokovala klauzule individualno, zatim je povezala emocije i uzrokovala klauzule i filtrirala par bez uzrokovanja. Drugačiji od ovog metoda koji je razdvojio otkrivanje i odgovaranje emocija i uzrokovalo dva koraka, predlažemo simetričnu lokalnu potragu mrežu (SLSN) za izvršavanje otkrivanja i odgovaranja istovremeno lokalnom potragu. SLSN se sastoji od dve simetričke podmreže, a to je podmreža emocija i podmreža uzroka. Svaka podmreža je sastavljena od učitelja predstave klauzule i lokalnog pretraživača par. Lokalni pretraživač par je specijalno dizajniran prekretni komponent koji može izvući lokalne parove zbog emocija. Eksperimentalni rezultati ECPE korpusa pokazuju nadvišenost našeg SLSN-a zbog postojećih metoda umjetnosti.', 'bn': 'ইমোটেশনের কারণে জোড়া বিনিময় (ECPE) একটি নতুন কাজ যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সম্ভাব্য ক্লাউস জোড়া আবেগ এবং একটি নথিতে সংশ্লিষ্ট কারণ বের করা। এই কাজের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণার প্রস্তাব দুই পদক্ষেপ প প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছিল যা প্রথম আবেগের ক্লাস বের করে নিয়েছিল এবং ব্যক্তিগত ক্ এই পদ্ধতি থেকে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, যা আবেগ এবং অনুভূতির ম্যাচ বিভিন্ন এবং দুই পদক্ষেপে প্রস্তাব করে, আমরা সিম্পেম্রিক স্থানীয় অনুসন্ধান নেটওয়ার্ক (এসএলএ SLSN দুই সিমিট্রিক সাবনেটওয়ার্কের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে অনুভূতি সাবনেটওয়ার্ক এবং সাবনেটওয়ার্কের কারণে। প্রত্যেক সাবনেটওয়ার্ক একটি ক্লাউস প্রতিনিধিত্বের শিক্ষক এবং স্থানীয় জোড়া অনুসন্ধানকারীর মধ্যে তৈর স্থানীয় জোড়া অনুসন্ধান হচ্ছে একটি বিশেষ ডিজাইন করা ক্রস- সাবনেটওয়ার্কের অংশ যা স্থানীয় আবেগ-কারণ জোড়া বের করতে পারে। ECPE কোর্পাসের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল বিদ্যমান রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতির উপর আমাদের এসএলএনএনের শ্রেষ্ঠত্ব প্রদর্শন করে।', 'cs': 'Extrakce emočně-příčinových párů (ECPE) je nový úkol, jehož cílem je extrahovat potenciální klauzule emocí a odpovídající příčiny v dokumentu. Pro řešení tohoto úkolu byla v předchozí studii navržena dvoustupňová metoda, která nejprve extrahovala emoční věty a příčinové věty individuálně, pak spárovala emoční a příčinové věty a vyfiltrovala páry bez kauzality. Na rozdíl od této metody, která rozdělila detekci a shodu emocí a příčiny do dvou kroků, navrhujeme model symetrické lokální vyhledávací sítě (SLSN), který provádí detekci a shodu současně lokálním vyhledáváním. SLSN se skládá ze dvou symetrických podsítí, konkrétně emoční podsítě a podsítě příčiny. Každá podsíť se skládá ze studenta reprezentace klauzule a místního vyhledávače párů. Lokální vyhledávač párů je speciálně navržená komponenta cross-subsíť, která může extrahovat lokální páry emocí a příčinou. Experimentální výsledky na korpusu ECPE ukazují nadřazenost našeho SLSN nad stávajícími nejmodernějšími metodami.', 'et': 'Emotsiooni-põhjuse paari ekstraheerimine (ECPE) on uus ülesanne, mille eesmärk on ekstraheerida dokumendist potentsiaalsed emotsioonide klauslipaarid ja vastavad põhjused. Selle ülesande lahendamiseks pakuti eelmises uuringus välja kaheastmeline meetod, milles esmalt eraldati emotsiooniklauslid ja põhjusklaused eraldi, seejärel paariti emotsiooniklauslid ja filtreeriti paarid ilma põhjusliku seoseta. Erinevalt sellest meetodist, mis eraldas emotsioonide ja põhjuste tuvastamise ja sobitamise kaheks etapiks, pakume välja sümmeetrilise kohaliku otsinguvõrgu (SLSN) mudeli tuvastamise ja sobitamise samaaegselt kohaliku otsingu abil. SLSN koosneb kahest sümmeetrilisest alamvõrgust, nimelt emotsioonide alamvõrgust ja põhjuse alamvõrgust. Iga alamvõrk koosneb klausli esitamise õppijast ja kohalikust paari otsijast. Kohaliku paari otsija on spetsiaalselt disainitud ristvõrgu komponent, mis võib ekstraheerida kohalikke emotsioonide ja põhjuste paare. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused ECPE korpuse kohta näitavad meie SLSNi paremust olemasolevate kaasaegsete meetoditega võrreldes.', 'ca': "L'extracció de parells emocionals (ECPE) és una nova tasca que mira a extrair les clàusules potencials parells d'emocions i causes corresponents en un document. Per abordar aquesta tasca, un mètode de dos passos va ser proposat per estudi anterior que primer va extreure clàusules emocionals i causar clàusules individualment, després va parar les emocions i causar clàusules, i va filtrar els parells sense causalitat. Diferent d'aquest mètode que separava la detecció i l'ajustament de l'emoció i causava en dos passos, proposem un model de Rede de Gueta Local Simètrica (SLSN) per a fer la detecció i l'ajustament simultàniament a través de la cerca local. L'SLSN consisteix en dues subxarxes simètriques, a saber, la subxarxa emocional i la subxarxa causal. Each subnetwork is composed of a clause representation learner and a local pair searcher.  El buscador de parelles locals és un component de subxarxa dissenyat especialment que pot extrair els parells emocionals locals. Experimental results on the ECPE corpus demonstrate the superiority of our SLSN over existing state-of-the-art methods.", 'fi': 'Emotion-cause pair extraction (ECPE) on uusi tehtävä, jonka tavoitteena on poistaa dokumentista mahdolliset lauseparit tunteista ja vastaavista syistä. Tämän tehtävän hoitamiseksi edellisessä tutkimuksessa ehdotettiin kaksivaiheista menetelmää, jossa ensin erotettiin tunne- ja syy-lausekkeet erikseen, sitten yhdistettiin tunne- ja syy-lausekkeet pariksi ja suodatettiin parit ilman syy-yhteyttä. Toisin kuin tämä menetelmä, joka erotti tunteen ja syyn havaitsemisen ja vastaavuuden kahteen vaiheeseen, ehdotamme Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) -mallia, joka suorittaa havainnoinnin ja vastaavuuden samanaikaisesti paikallisella haulla. SLSN koostuu kahdesta symmetrisestä aliverkosta, nimittäin tunne-aliverkosta ja syy-aliverkosta. Kukin aliverkko koostuu lauseen esittävästä oppijasta ja paikallisesta parihaun tekijästä. Paikallinen parihaku on erityisesti suunniteltu cross-aliverkko komponentti, joka voi erottaa paikalliset tunteet ja syyt parit. Kokeelliset tulokset ECPE-korpusesta osoittavat SLSN:n ylivoimaisuuden nykyisiin viimeisimpiin menetelmiin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Awak-asai macem olèhku nggawe sistem sing gak penting nggawe sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan karo ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan nêmêr. Ngubah nambah iki, kelompok iki bakal kelompok supoyo nggawe basa luwih apik lan kelompok alam sing dumadhi iki bakal kelompok nggawe kesalaman dhéwé, njuk kesempatan sampeyan karo kelompok, njuk saiki iki bakal kelompok ngono cah-cah apik lan ijol-ijolan winih. MyUserName on freenode SLS Sampeyan mbutugi gambar apat-tambahan simbêr, nambah apat-tambah duwé karo perusahaan tambah. Sapa Subnetwork dumateng Pango FindOK Rasalih sing perusahaan ning baho perusahaan ?"', 'ha': "Zaɓi sau biyu na fara ido (ECPA) shi ne wani aiki na daban, yana aimar ya fitar da ma'anar jama'a biyu masu mutane da saba'ar da ke daidaita cikin takardar. To, in haɗi da wannan aikin, an buƙata wata hanyor biyu ta farko da aka fitina, wanda ya farkon ta fitar faƙata masu hisia kuma ya zaɓi karatun, sa'an nan kuma ya haɗi hisãbin da kuma ya zaɓe kafaffiyata, kuma ya filter nau'in biyu, bã da wani sababi. Diffi daga wannan metode da ya rara gano da mai daidaita hisãbi da za'a sanya shi cikin hanyõyi biyu, za'a buƙata misãlai na SLSN'in da za'a yi amfani da kwamfyuta mai lokal filin da ke samu'a. @ info: whatsthis Kila shawara mai ƙunsa na sami daga wani mai tsaron sharuya da mai tsaron aiki da wani abu mai lokaci. @ info: tooltip Matarin jarrabãwa na kanan ECPA ya nuna kyauta na SLSN a kan halin-state-of-the-art.", 'sk': 'Ekstrakcija par čustev-vzrokov (ECPE) je nova naloga, katere cilj je izvleči potencialne klavzule par čustev in ustreznih vzrokov v dokumentu. Za reševanje te naloge je bila v prejšnji študiji predlagana dvostopenjska metoda, ki je najprej izvlekla čustvene klavzule in povzročila klavzule posamezno, nato pa združila čustvene in vzrokne klavzule ter filtrirala pare brez vzročne povezanosti. Drugače od te metode, ki je ločila zaznavanje in ujemanje čustev in vzroka v dva koraka, predlagamo model simetričnega lokalnega iskalnega omrežja (SLSN), ki bo hkrati opravil zaznavanje in ujemanje z lokalnim iskanjem. SLSN sestavljata dve simetrični podomrežji, in sicer čustveno podomrežje in vzrokno podomrežje. Vsako podomrežje je sestavljeno iz učenca za predstavitev klavzul in lokalnega iskalca pare. Lokalni iskalec parov je posebej zasnovana komponenta medomrežja, ki lahko izvleče lokalne pare čustev in vzrokov. Eksperimentalni rezultati ECPE korpusa kažejo, da je naš SLSN boljši od obstoječih najsodobnejših metod.', 'he': 'חולץ זוג בגלל רגשות (ECPE) הוא משימה חדשה שמתכוונת לחלץ את הפוטנציאל פוטנציאלי זוג רגשות והסיבות המתאימות במסמך. כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת, שיטה בשתי שלבים הוצעה על ידי מחקר קודם שהוציא קודם פסקי רגשות ומגרם פסקי רגשות באופן אישי, ואז הזוג את הרגשות וגורם פסקים, והסינן את הזוגים ללא סיבה. שונה מהשיטה הזו שהפרדה את הגילוי וההתאמה של רגשות ולגרום לשני צעדים, אנו מציעים מודל רשת חיפוש מקומי סימטרית (SLSN) כדי לבצע את הגילוי וההתאמה באותו זמן על ידי חיפוש מקומי. SLSN מורכב משני רשתות תת-רשת סימטריות, כלומר רשת הת-רשת הרגשות והתחת-רשת הסיבה. כל תחת-רשת מורכבת ממלומדת מייצגת פסק ומחפשת זוג מקומית. מחפש זוגות מקומיים הוא רכיב צלב-רשת מעוצב במיוחד שיכול לחלץ זוגות רגשות מקומיים. תוצאות ניסויים על הקורפוס של ECPE מראות את העליון של SLSN שלנו על שיטות מצוינות.', 'bo': 'Emotion-cause extraction pair (ECPE)is a new task that aims to extract the potential clause of emotions and corresponding causes in a document. བྱས་ཙང་འདི་ལྟ་བྱེད་པར། བཟོ་རྣམ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གོ་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ཏེ། Different from this method that separated the detection and the matching of emotions and cause into two steps, we propose a Symmetric Local Search Network (SLSN) model to perform the detection and matching simultaneously by local search. SLSN དེ་ལས་སྦྱོར་མཐུད་ཡོད་པ་གཉིས་ཡིན་པས། མ་དེབ་ཀྱིས་སེམས་ཚོར་མཐུད་དང་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཡོད། སྒྲ་བརྙན་མ་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་དང་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་མཁན་ཡོད་པ ས་གནས་ཀྱི་ཟུང་གཉིས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནི་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་རེད། ECPE དབུས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་ལས་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་SLSN་གི་མཐོ་རྣམ་གནས་སྟངས་དང་གནས་སྟངས་བཀོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'METNet : A Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'METNet: شبكة التحول المعزز المتبادل لتحليل المشاعر القائم على الجانب', 'es': 'MetNet: una red de transformación mejorada mutua para el análisis de sentimientos basado en aspectos', 'pt': 'METNet: Uma Rede de Transformação Aprimorada Mútua para Análise de Sentimentos Baseada em Aspectos', 'fr': "MetNet\xa0: un réseau de transformation mutuelle amélioré pour l'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects", 'ja': 'METNet ：アスペクトベースの感情分析のための相互強化された変換ネットワーク', 'hi': 'METNet: पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण के लिए एक पारस्परिक एन्हांस्ड ट्रांस्फ़ॉर्मेशन नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'METNet: Взаимная Улучшенная Сеть Трансформации для Аспект-основанного Анализа Отношений', 'zh': 'METNetжӣ°:д»Ҙжғ…жһҗиҖ…жҳ“зҪ‘з»ң', 'ga': "METNet: Líonra Athchóirithe Frithpháirteach d'Anailís Mothúchán Bunaithe ar Ghné", 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα αμοιβαίο ενισχυμένο δίκτυο μετασχηματισμού για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση τις πτυχές', 'hu': 'METNet: Egy kölcsönös továbbfejlesztett transzformációs hálózat az Aspect-alapú érzelmek elemzéséhez', 'it': "METNet: una rete di trasformazione migliorata reciproca per l'analisi dei sentimenti basata sugli aspetti", 'kk': 'METNet: Aspect- негіздеген Sentiment анализ үшін біріктірілген түрлендіру желі', 'lt': 'METNet: abipusio sustiprintos transformacijos tinklas, skirtas aspektais grindžiamai jautrumo analizei', 'mk': 'METNet: Мрежа на взаемно подобрена трансформација за анализа на чувства базирана на аспекти', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'മെറ്റ്\u200cനെറ്റ്: ആസ്പെക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം', 'mt': 'METNet: Netwerk ta’ Trasformazzjoni Mtejba Reċiproka għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment ibbażata fuq l-Aspetti', 'mn': 'METNet: A Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'no': 'METNet: Eit mutuell forbetra transformasjonssnettverk for aspektbasert sentimentanalyser', 'pl': 'METNet: Wzajemna, ulepszona sieć transformacji dla analizy sentymentów opartych na aspektach', 'sr': 'METNet: Međusobna povećana mreža transformacije za analizu sentimenta na aspektu', 'so': 'METNet: A mutual enhanced transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'sv': 'METNet: Ett ömsesidigt förbättrat transformationsnätverk för aspektbaserad känsloanalys', 'ro': 'METNet: O rețea de transformare reciprocă îmbunătățită pentru analiza sentimentelor bazată pe aspecte', 'ta': 'METNet: Aspect- based Sentiment Analysis', 'ur': 'METNet: Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis کے لئے ایک متوسل زیادہ تغییرات نیٹورک', 'si': 'Name', 'vi': 'METNet: một Hệ thống biến hình cải tiến tiến gần nhau cho phiên bản phân tích nhân tạo.', 'uz': 'METNet: A Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'bg': 'Мрежа за взаимно подобрена трансформация за анализ на сентимента, базиран на аспекти', 'da': 'METNet: Et gensidigt forbedret transformationsnetværk til aspektbaseret følelsesanalyse', 'hr': 'METNet: Međusobna povećana mreža transformacije za analizu sentimenta na aspektu', 'nl': 'METNet: Een wederzijds verbeterd transformatienetwerk voor aspect-based sentiment analyse', 'de': 'METNet: Ein gegenseitig verbessertes Transformationsnetzwerk für aspektbasierte Stimmungsanalyse', 'id': 'METNet: Jaringan Transformasi Diperkembangkan Bersama-sama untuk Analisi Sentimen Berdasarkan Aspek', 'ko': 'METNet: 측면 정서 분석을 바탕으로 상호 강화된 전환 네트워크', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'METNet: Mtandao wa Ubadilishaji Kuboreshwa kwa ajili ya Uchambuzi wa Wakati wa Seneti anayeishi Matazamo', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'METNet: A Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'sq': 'METNet: Një rrjet i përmirësuar të ndërsjelltë për analizën e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'ՄԵԹՆԹ. Միաքին բարելավված վերաձևակերպման ցանց հարցերով հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար', 'az': 'METNet: Aspect-tabanlı Sentiment Analizi üçün Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network', 'bn': 'METNet: Aspect-ভিত্তিক সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য মাউটুয়াল উন্নত পরিবর্তন নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'METNet: Međusobna povećana mreža transformacije za analizu sentimenta na aspektu', 'ca': "METNet: Una xarxa de transformació mutuament millorada per a l'anàlisi del sentiment basat en aspectes", 'cs': 'METNet: Vzájemně vylepšená transformační síť pro aspektovou analýzu sentimentů', 'et': 'METNet: vastastikune tĂ€iustatud transformatsioonivĂ”rgustik aspektipĂ”hiseks tunnete analĂŒĂŒsiks', 'fi': 'METNet: Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'METNet: Vzajemna izboljšana mreža transformacij za analizo čustva, ki temelji na vidikih', 'he': 'METNet: A Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'jv': 'MET: A Mutual enahanted Transformation Network for Aspect-supported Sentiment Test', 'bo': 'METNet: A Mutual Enhanced Transformation Network for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis'}
{'en': 'Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) aims to determine the sentiment polarity of each specific aspect in a given sentence. Existing researches have realized the importance of the aspect for the ABSA task and have derived many interactive learning methods that model context based on specific aspect. However, current interaction mechanisms are ill-equipped to learn complex sentences with multiple aspects, and these methods underestimate the representation learning of the aspect. In order to solve the two problems, we propose a mutual enhanced transformation network (METNet) for the ABSA task. First, the aspect enhancement module in METNet improves the representation learning of the aspect with contextual semantic features, which gives the aspect more abundant information. Second, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which enhances the representations of aspect and context iteratively. Experimental results on SemEval 2014 Datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of METNet, and we further prove that METNet is outstanding in multi-aspect scenarios.', 'ar': 'يهدف تحليل المشاعر القائم على الجانب (ABSA) إلى تحديد قطبية المشاعر لكل جانب محدد في جملة معينة. لقد أدركت الأبحاث الحالية أهمية الجانب لمهمة ABSA واشتقت العديد من طرق التعلم التفاعلية التي تشكل السياق بناءً على جانب معين. ومع ذلك ، فإن آليات التفاعل الحالية غير مجهزة لتعلم الجمل المعقدة ذات الجوانب المتعددة ، وهذه الأساليب تقلل من شأن التعلم التمثيلي للجانب. من أجل حل المشكلتين ، نقترح شبكة تحويل معززة متبادلة (METNet) لمهمة ABSA. أولاً ، تعمل وحدة تحسين العرض في METNet على تحسين التعلم التمثيلي للجانب بسمات دلالية سياقية ، مما يمنح الجانب معلومات أكثر وفرة. ثانيًا ، تصمم METNet وتنفذ هيكلًا هرميًا ، مما يعزز تمثيلات الجانب والسياق بشكل متكرر. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات بيانات SemEval 2014 فعالية METNet ، ونثبت كذلك أن METNet متميز في سيناريوهات متعددة الجوانب.', 'es': 'El análisis de sentimiento basado en aspectos (ABSA) tiene como objetivo determinar la polaridad del sentimiento de cada aspecto específico en una oración determinada. Las investigaciones existentes se han dado cuenta de la importancia del aspecto para la tarea de ABSA y han derivado muchos métodos de aprendizaje interactivos que modelan el contexto en función de un aspecto específico. Sin embargo, los mecanismos de interacción actuales están mal equipados para aprender oraciones complejas con múltiples aspectos, y estos métodos subestiman el aprendizaje de representación del aspecto. Para resolver los dos problemas, proponemos una red de transformación mejorada mutua (MetNet) para la tarea ABSA. En primer lugar, el módulo de mejora de aspecto de MetNet mejora el aprendizaje de representación del aspecto con características semánticas contextuales, lo que proporciona al aspecto información más abundante. En segundo lugar, MetNet diseña e implementa una estructura jerárquica, que mejora las representaciones de aspecto y contexto de forma iterativa. Los resultados experimentales de los conjuntos de datos de SemEval 2014 demuestran la eficacia de MetNet y, además, demostramos que MetNet es sobresaliente en escenarios multifacéticos.', 'pt': 'A análise de sentimento baseada em aspectos (ABSA) visa determinar a polaridade de sentimento de cada aspecto específico em uma determinada frase. As pesquisas existentes perceberam a importância do aspecto para a tarefa ABSA e derivaram muitos métodos interativos de aprendizagem que modelam o contexto com base em um aspecto específico. No entanto, os mecanismos de interação atuais estão mal equipados para aprender sentenças complexas com múltiplos aspectos, e esses métodos subestimam a aprendizagem de representação do aspecto. Para resolver os dois problemas, propomos uma rede de transformação aprimorada mútua (METNet) para a tarefa ABSA. Primeiro, o módulo de aprimoramento de aspecto no METNet melhora o aprendizado da representação do aspecto com recursos semânticos contextuais, o que fornece ao aspecto informações mais abundantes. Em segundo lugar, o METNet projeta e implementa uma estrutura hierárquica, que aprimora as representações de aspecto e contexto de forma iterativa. Os resultados experimentais nos conjuntos de dados do SemEval 2014 demonstram a eficácia do METNet e provamos ainda que o METNet é excelente em cenários de vários aspectos.', 'fr': "L'analyse du sentiment basée sur l'aspect (ABSA) vise à déterminer la polarité du sentiment de chaque aspect spécifique d'une phrase donnée. Les recherches existantes ont pris conscience de l'importance de l'aspect pour la tâche ABSA et ont dérivé de nombreuses méthodes d'apprentissage interactives qui modélisent le contexte en fonction d'un aspect spécifique. Cependant, les mécanismes d'interaction actuels sont mal équipés pour apprendre des phrases complexes comportant de multiples aspects, et ces méthodes sous-estiment l'apprentissage de la représentation de l'aspect. Afin de résoudre ces deux problèmes, nous proposons un réseau de transformation mutuelle améliorée (MetNet) pour la tâche ABSA. Tout d'abord, le module d'amélioration d'aspect de MetNet améliore l'apprentissage de la représentation de l'aspect avec des caractéristiques sémantiques contextuelles, ce qui donne à l'aspect des informations plus abondantes. Ensuite, MetNet conçoit et met en œuvre une structure hiérarchique, qui améliore les représentations de l'aspect et du contexte de manière itérative. Les résultats expérimentaux sur les ensembles de données SemEval 2014 démontrent l'efficacité de MetNet, et nous prouvons également que MetNet est exceptionnel dans les scénarios multi-aspects.", 'ja': 'アスペクトベースの感情分析（ ABSA ）は、与えられた文章の各特定のアスペクトの感情の極性を決定することを目的としている。 既存の研究は、ABSA課題の側面の重要性に気付き、特定の側面に基づいて文脈をモデル化する多くのインタラクティブな学習方法を導き出してきた。 しかしながら、現在の相互作用メカニズムは、複数の態様を伴う複雑な文章を学習するための設備が不十分であり、これらの方法は、態様の表現学習を過小評価する。 2つの問題を解決するために、ABSAタスクのための相互強化変換ネットワーク（ METNet ）を提案します。 まず、METNetのアスペクト強化モジュールは、コンテキストセマンティック特徴を備えたアスペクトの表現学習を改善し、アスペクトにより豊富な情報を提供する。 第二に、METNetは、アスペクトとコンテキストの表現を反復的に強化する階層構造を設計し、実装する。 SemEval 2014データセットの実験結果は、METNetの有効性を示し、METNetがマルチアスペクトシナリオで優れていることをさらに証明します。', 'zh': '盖情析(ABSA)旨定给定句特定情极性。 今论已意ABSA任之要,而衍生特定之上下文交互式学之法。 然机制不足以学杂句,低估其法也。 为此二者,ABSA为一转型网络(METNet)。 先METNet而强模块因上下文语义而学之,以给息焉。 其次,METNet设而成之,迭代以益上下文。 SemEval 2014数集实验验METNet之有效性,益明METNet多方之突出表现。', 'hi': 'पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण (ABSA) का उद्देश्य किसी दिए गए वाक्य में प्रत्येक विशिष्ट पहलू की भावना ध्रुवीयता को निर्धारित करना है। मौजूदा शोधों ने एबीएसए कार्य के लिए पहलू के महत्व को महसूस किया है और कई इंटरैक्टिव सीखने के तरीकों को व्युत्पन्न किया है जो विशिष्ट पहलू के आधार पर संदर्भ को मॉडल करते हैं। हालांकि, वर्तमान इंटरैक्शन तंत्र कई पहलुओं के साथ जटिल वाक्यों को सीखने के लिए बीमार-सुसज्जित हैं, और ये तरीके पहलू के प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने को कम आंकते हैं। दो समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए, हम ABSA कार्य के लिए एक पारस्परिक एन्हांस्ड ट्रांसफॉर्मेशन नेटवर्क (METNet) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। सबसे पहले, METNet में पहलू वृद्धि मॉड्यूल प्रासंगिक शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं के साथ पहलू के प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने में सुधार करता है, जो पहलू को अधिक प्रचुर मात्रा में जानकारी देता है। दूसरा, METNet डिजाइन और एक पदानुक्रमित संरचना है, जो पहलू और संदर्भ पुनरावृत्ति के प्रतिनिधित्व को बढ़ाता है लागू करता है. SemEval 2014 डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम METNet की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और हम आगे साबित करते हैं कि METNet बहु-पहलू परिदृश्यों में बकाया है।', 'ru': 'Анализ настроений на основе аспектов (ABSA) направлен на определение полярности настроений каждого конкретного аспекта в данном предложении. Существующие исследования осознали важность данного аспекта для задачи ABSA и вывели множество интерактивных методов обучения, которые моделируют контекст на основе конкретного аспекта. Тем не менее, нынешние механизмы взаимодействия плохо приспособлены для изучения сложных предложений с несколькими аспектами, и эти методы недооценивают изучение представления аспекта. Для решения этих двух проблем мы предлагаем создать сеть взаимных расширенных преобразований (METNet) для решения задачи АБСА. Во-первых, модуль улучшения аспекта в METNet улучшает репрезентативное обучение аспекта с контекстными семантическими особенностями, что дает аспекту более обширную информацию. Во-вторых, METNet разрабатывает и внедряет иерархическую структуру, которая итеративно улучшает представление аспекта и контекста. Экспериментальные результаты по SemEval 2014 Datasets демонстрируют эффективность METNet, и мы далее доказываем, что METNet выдающийся в многоаспектных сценариях.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag anailís sentiment bunaithe ar ghnéithe (ABSA) polaraíocht meon gach gné ar leith in abairt ar leith a chinneadh. Is léir ó thaighde atá ann cheana féin tábhacht na gné don tasc ABSA agus tá go leor modhanna foghlama idirghníomhacha faighte acu a mhúnlaíonn comhthéacs bunaithe ar ghné ar leith. Mar sin féin, níl meicníochtaí idirghníomhaíochta reatha an-fheistithe chun abairtí casta a fhoghlaim a bhfuil gnéithe iolracha acu, agus déanann na modhanna seo neamhaird ar fhoghlaim ionadaíochta na gné. Chun an dá fhadhb a réiteach, molaimid gréasán claochlaithe feabhsaithe frithpháirteach (METNet) do thasc ABSA. Ar an gcéad dul síos, cuireann an modúl feabhsaithe gné i METNet feabhas ar fhoghlaim ionadaíochta na gné le gnéithe comhthéacsúla shéimeantacha, rud a thugann faisnéis níos flúirseach don ghné. Ar an dara dul síos, déanann METNet struchtúr ordlathach a dhearadh agus a chur i bhfeidhm, a fheabhsaíonn léiriú gné agus comhthéacs go atriallach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar Thacair Sonraí SemEval 2014 éifeachtacht METNet, agus cruthaítear freisin go bhfuil METNet gan íoc i gcásanna ilghnéitheacha.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση τις πτυχές (ΑΒΣΑ) στοχεύει στον προσδιορισμό της πολικότητας συναισθημάτων κάθε συγκεκριμένης πτυχής σε μια δεδομένη πρόταση. Οι υπάρχουσες έρευνες έχουν συνειδητοποιήσει τη σημασία της πτυχής για το έργο και έχουν παραγάγει πολλές διαδραστικές μεθόδους μάθησης που μοντελοποιούν το πλαίσιο με βάση συγκεκριμένη πτυχή. Ωστόσο, οι σημερινοί μηχανισμοί αλληλεπίδρασης δεν είναι επαρκείς για να μάθουν σύνθετες προτάσεις με πολλαπλές πτυχές, και αυτές οι μέθοδοι υποτιμούν την εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης της πτυχής. Προκειμένου να επιλυθούν τα δύο προβλήματα, προτείνουμε ένα αμοιβαίο ενισχυμένο δίκτυο μετασχηματισμού (METNet) για το έργο της ABSA. Πρώτον, η ενότητα ενίσχυσης πτυχών στο βελτιώνει την εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης της πτυχής με σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά που δίνουν στην πτυχή πιο άφθονες πληροφορίες. Δεύτερον, σχεδιάζει και εφαρμόζει μια ιεραρχική δομή, η οποία ενισχύει επαναλαμβανόμενα τις αναπαραστάσεις της πτυχής και του πλαισίου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στα σύνολα δεδομένων αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του και αποδεικνύουμε περαιτέρω ότι το METNet είναι εξαιρετικό σε σενάρια πολλαπλών πτυχών.', 'ka': 'აპექტიკური სენტიმენტის ანალიზაცია (ABSA) უნდა განსაზღვრება ყველა განსაზღვრებული აპექტიკური აპექტიკური სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის განსაზღვრება. Existing researchers have realized the importance of the aspect of the ABSA task and have derived many interactive learning methods that model context based on specific aspect. მაგრამ, მიმდინარე ინტერფექციის მექანსიები არაფერად გამოყენებულია კომპლექციური სიტყვების სწავლებისთვის, და ეს მექანები არაფერად გადაუმუშავებენ აპე ორი პრობლემების გარეშე, ჩვენ ჩვენ ABSA დავამუშავებთ ერთადერთი უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო გარემოქმედება ქსელი. პირველად, METNet-ში აპექტიკური მეტირების მოდულია აპექტიკური სიმენტიკური ფუნქციებისთვის გამოსახულება, რომელიც აპექტიკური უფრო დიდი ინფორმაცია მოეცემს. მეორე, METNet განაზღვრება და იმპლექტირება იერაქტიკალური სტრუქტურაცია, რომელიც აპექტიკალური და კონტექსტის განაზღვრებას თეტრატიურად გაუფ ექსპერიმენტიური პროცემები semiEval 2014 მონაცემების მონაცემები METNet-ის ეფექტიურობას აჩვენებენ, და ჩვენ უფრო მეტად გამოწვებენ, რომ METNet-ი მრავალ აპექტიკური ს', 'hu': 'Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) célja, hogy meghatározza az adott mondat minden egyes aspektusának sentiment polaritását. A már meglévő kutatások felismerték a szempont fontosságát az ABSA feladat szempontjából, és számos interaktív tanulási módszert eredményeztek, amelyek konkrét aspektusok alapján modellezik a kontextust. A jelenlegi interakciós mechanizmusok azonban nem készültek fel a több szempontból összetett mondatok tanulására, és ezek a módszerek alábecsülik az aspektus reprezentációs tanulását. A két probléma megoldása érdekében az ABSA feladathoz kölcsönösen fejlesztett transzformációs hálózatot (METNet) javasolunk. Először is a METNet aspect enhancement modulja kontextuális szemantikai jellemzőkkel javítja az aspect reprezentációs tanulását, ami bőségesebb információt ad a aspektusnak. Másodszor, a METNet olyan hierarchikus struktúrát tervez és hajt végre, amely iteratívan javítja az aspektus és a kontextus ábrázolását. A SemEval 2014 adatkészletekkel kapcsolatos kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják a METNet hatékonyságát, továbbá bizonyítjuk, hogy a METNet kiemelkedő a többszempontú forgatókönyvekben.', 'kk': 'Аспективтің негіздеген сезімдер анализациясы (ABSA) келтірілген сұлбадағы әрбір белгілі бөлшектердің сезімдердің полярдығын анықтау мақсаты. Бар зерттеулері ABSA тапсырмасының аспектінің маңыздылығын түсіндіреді және өзгертілген аспектерге негізделген контексті үлгілейтін интерактивті оқыту әдістерін түсіндіреді. Бірақ қазіргі үйрену механизмтері бірнеше аспекті арқылы комплекс сөздерді үйрену үшін дұрыс емес, және бұл әдістер аспекті үйренуді бағалайды. Екі мәселелерді шешу үшін, ABSA тапсырмасының бір-бірінші түрлендіру желі (METNet) жұмысына ұсынамыз. Біріншіден, METNet- дегі аспектті жақсарту модулі мәзірлікті семантикалық мүмкіндіктермен, бұл аспекттің көптеген мәліметті көрсетуді жақсартады. Екіншіден, METNet дизайны және иерархиялық құрылғыны орындайды, бұл аспекті және контексті қайталап көрсетуді көтереді. МЕТНЕТ және МЕТНЕТ және МЕТНЕТ көптеген сценарияларында МЕТНЕТ көптеген екенін көрсетеді.', 'it': "Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) mira a determinare la polarità sentimentale di ogni aspetto specifico in una data frase. Le ricerche esistenti hanno compreso l'importanza dell'aspetto per il compito ABSA e hanno derivato molti metodi di apprendimento interattivi che modellano il contesto in base ad aspetti specifici. Tuttavia, gli attuali meccanismi di interazione non sono attrezzati per imparare frasi complesse con molteplici aspetti, e questi metodi sottovalutano l'apprendimento della rappresentazione dell'aspetto. Per risolvere i due problemi, proponiamo una rete di trasformazione rafforzata reciproca (METNet) per il compito ABSA. In primo luogo, il modulo di valorizzazione degli aspetti in METNet migliora l'apprendimento della rappresentazione dell'aspetto con caratteristiche semantiche contestuali, che danno all'aspetto informazioni più abbondanti. In secondo luogo, METNet progetta e implementa una struttura gerarchica, che migliora le rappresentazioni di aspetto e contesto iterativamente. I risultati sperimentali sui dataset SemEval 2014 dimostrano l'efficacia di METNet e dimostriamo inoltre che METNet è eccezionale in scenari multi-aspetto.", 'lt': 'Aspektais pagrįsta jausmų analizė (ABSA) siekiama nustatyti kiekvieno konkretaus aspekto jausmų poliarumą konkrečiame sakinyje. Esami moksliniai tyrimai suprato ABSA užduoties aspekto svarbą ir parengė daug interaktyvių mokymosi metodų, kurie modeliuoja konkrečiu aspektu grindžiamą kontekstą. Tačiau dabartiniai sąveikos mechanizmai yra nepakankamai pajėgūs mokytis sudėtingų sakinių su įvairiais aspektais, ir šie metodai nepakankamai įvertina šio aspekto reprezentacinį mokymąsi. Siekiant išspręsti šias dvi problemas, siūlome ABSA užduoties tarpusavyje sustiprintą pertvarkymo tinklą (METNet). Pirma, METNet aspektų gerinimo modulis pagerina aspekto mokymąsi su kontekstinėmis semantinėmis savybėmis, o tai suteikia daugiau informacijos. Antra, METNet sukuria ir įgyvendina hierarchinę struktūrą, kuri nuolat gerina aspektų ir konteksto aprašymą. Experimental results on SemEval 2014 Datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of METNet, and we further prove that METNet is outstanding in multi-aspect scenarios.', 'mk': 'Анализата на сентиментите базирана на аспекти (АБСА) има за цел да ја одреди сентименталната поларитет на секој специфичен аспект во одредена реченица. Постојаните истражувања сфатија важноста на аспектот за задачата на АБСА и изведоа многу интерактивни методи на учење кои го моделуваат контекстот базиран на специфичен аспект. However, current interaction mechanisms are ill-equipped to learn complex sentences with multiple aspects, and these methods underestimate the representation learning of the aspect.  За да ги решиме двата проблеми, предлагаме взаемна подобрена мрежа за трансформација (METNet) за задачата на АБСА. Прво, модулот за подобрување на аспектот во METNet го подобрува претставувањето на учењето на аспектот со контекстни семантични карактеристики, што му дава на аспектот пообучни информации. Второ, METNet дизајнира и имплементира хиерархична структура, која ги подобрува претставувањата на аспектот и контекстот итеративно. Експерименталните резултати на податоците SemEval 2014 ја покажуваат ефикасноста на METNet и понатаму докажуваме дека METNet е извонреден во мултиаспектните сценарија.', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan berdasarkan aspek (ABSA) bermaksud menentukan polariti perasaan setiap aspek khusus dalam kalimat tertentu. Penelitian yang ada telah sedar penting aspek untuk tugas ABSA dan telah menghasilkan banyak kaedah belajar interaktif yang model berdasarkan aspek tertentu. However, current interaction mechanisms are ill-equipped to learn complex sentences with multiple aspects, and these methods underestimate the representation learning of the aspect.  Untuk menyelesaikan kedua-dua masalah, kami melaporkan rangkaian penukaran berkembang (METNet) untuk tugas ABSA. Pertama, modul peningkatan aspek dalam METNet meningkatkan pembelajaran mewakili aspek dengan ciri semantik kontekstual, yang memberikan aspek maklumat yang lebih banyak. Kedua, METNet merancang dan melaksanakan struktur hierarkis, yang meningkatkan perwakilan aspek dan konteks secara berulang-ulang. Keputusan percubaan pada Set Data SemEval 2014 menunjukkan keefektivitas METNet, dan kami membuktikan lebih lanjut bahawa METNet adalah luar biasa dalam skenario berbilang-aspek.', 'ml': 'ആസ്പെക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അനുഭവവിശേഷവും (ABSA) കൊടുത്ത വാക്കിലുള്ള ഓരോ പ്രത്യേക വിഭാഗത്തിലുള്ള ഓരോ വികാരത്തിന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ABSA ജോലിയുടെ പ്രധാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്ന് മനസ്സിലാക്കിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ഇടപെടുത്തുന്ന വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d പല ഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയില്ല, പ്രതിനിധി ഈ രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരസ്പര പരം മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കേഷന്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കുന്നു. ABSA ജ ആദ്യം, മെട്ടെന്\u200dറിലെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഘടകം കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പഠന Second, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which enhances the representations of aspect and context iteratively.  സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2014 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മെറ്റ് നെറ്റിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മെറ്റ് നെറ്റ് പല ഭാഗങ', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq l-aspetti (ABSA) għandha l-għan li tiddetermina l-polarità tas-sentimenti ta’ kull aspett speċifiku f’sentenza partikolari. Ir-riċerki eżistenti għarfu l-importanza tal-aspett għall-kompitu tal-ABSA u dderivaw ħafna metodi ta’ tagħlim interattivi li jimmudellaw il-kuntest ibbażat fuq aspett speċifiku. Madankollu, il-mekkaniżmi attwali ta’ interazzjoni mhumiex mgħammra tajjeb biex jitgħallmu sentenzi kumplessi b’diversi aspetti, u dawn il-metodi jissottovalutaw ir-rappreżentazzjoni tat-tagħlim tal-aspett. Sabiex isolvu ż-żewġ problemi, nipproponu netwerk ta’ trasformazzjoni msaħħa ħ reċiproku (METNet) għall-kompitu tal-ABSA. L-ewwel nett, il-modulu għat-titjib tal-aspetti f’METNet itejjeb ir-rappreżentazzjoni tat-tagħlim tal-aspett b’karatteristiċi semantiċi kuntestwali, li jagħti lill-aspett informazzjoni aktar abbundanti. It-tieni nett, METNet tfassal u timplimenta struttura ġerarkika, li ttejjeb ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-aspett u l-kuntest b’mod iterattiv. Riżultati esperimentali dwar is-SemEval 2014 Datasets juru l-effettività tal-METNet, u aħna nipprovaw ukoll li l-METNet hija eċċellenti f’xenarji b’diversi aspetti.', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ (ABSA) гэдэг нь тодорхой хэлбэрийн мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Existing researchers have realized the importance of the aspect of the ABSA task and have derived many interactive learning methods that model context based on specific aspects. Гэвч одоогийн харилцааны механизм нь олон талаар комплекс өгүүлбэрийг сурахад муу бөгөөд эдгээр арга нь харилцааны сургалтыг багасгаж байна. Хоёр асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид ABSA-ын ажлын хувьд харилцааны улам өндөр шилжүүлэх сүлжээний хувьд (METNet) зааж өгдөг. Эхлээд, METNet-ын асуудлын нэмэгдүүлэлтийн модуль нөхцөл байдлын тухай ойлголтын суралцлагын талаар илүү олон мэдээлэл өгдөг. Хоёрдугаар, METNet-ын загвар бүтээгдэхүүний төлөвлөгөөг дахин дахин нэмэгдүүлдэг. 2014 оны SemEval өгөгдлийн санаануудын туршилтын үр дүнг METNet-ын үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулж байна. МЕТНЕТ олон талын хувилбарт гайхалтай гэдгийг баталж байна.', 'no': 'Aspektbasert sentimentanalyse (ABSA) mål å bestemme sentiment- polariteten for kvar spesifikke aspekt i eit gitt setning. Det eksisterande forskningar har oppdaga viktigheten på aspekten for ABSA-oppgåva og har fått opp mange interaktive læringsmetodar som modellen er basert på spesifikke aspekt. Dette er imidlertid gjeldande interaksjonsmekanismåtar feil for å lære komplekse setningar med fleire aspektar, og desse metodane undervurder representasjonslæringa av aspekten. For å løse dei to problema, foreslår vi eit delvis forbetra transformasjonssnettverk (METNet) for ABSA-oppgåva. Først, modulen for å forbetra aspektforbetringa i METNet forbedrar å lære representasjonen av aspekten med kontekstlege semantiske funksjonar, som gjev aspekten meir store informasjon. Andre, METNet utformar og implementerer ein hierarkisk struktur, som forbetrar representasjonane av aspekt og kontekst gjentakast. Eksperimentale resultat på semiEval 2014-databaser viser effektiviteten av METNet, og vi viser meir at METNet er utgåande i fleire aspektscenarior.', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów oparta na aspektach (ABSA) ma na celu określenie polaryzacji sentymentów każdego konkretnego aspektu w danym zdaniu. Istniejące badania uświadomiły sobie znaczenie tego aspektu dla zadania ABSA i wyprowadziły wiele interaktywnych metod uczenia się, które modelują kontekst w oparciu o konkretny aspekt. Jednak obecne mechanizmy interakcji są źle przygotowane do nauki złożonych zdań o wielu aspektach, a metody te nie doceniają uczenia się reprezentacji tego aspektu. W celu rozwiązania tych dwóch problemów proponujemy wzajemną wzmocnioną sieć transformacji (METNet) dla zadania ABSA. Po pierwsze, moduł wzmacniania aspektów w METNet usprawnia naukę reprezentacji aspektu za pomocą kontekstowych cech semantycznych, co daje aspektowi bardziej bogatą informację. Po drugie METNet projektuje i wdraża strukturę hierarchiczną, która iteracyjnie wzmacnia reprezentacje aspektów i kontekstu. Wyniki eksperymentalnych zestawów danych SemEval 2014 pokazują skuteczność METNet, a także udowadniamy, że METNet wyróżnia się w wieloaspektowych scenariuszach.', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentului bazată pe aspect (ABSA) are ca scop determinarea polarității sentimentului fiecărui aspect specific într-o anumită propoziție. Cercetările existente au realizat importanța aspectului pentru activitatea ABSA și au derivat multe metode interactive de învățare care modelează contextul pe baza unui aspect specific. Cu toate acestea, mecanismele actuale de interacțiune nu sunt echipate pentru a învăța propoziții complexe cu mai multe aspecte, iar aceste metode subestimează învățarea reprezentării aspectului. Pentru a rezolva cele două probleme, propunem o rețea de transformare îmbunătățită reciprocă (METNet) pentru sarcina ABSA. În primul rând, modulul de îmbunătățire a aspectului din METNet îmbunătățește învățarea reprezentării aspectului cu caracteristici semantice contextuale, ceea ce conferă aspectului informații mai abundente. În al doilea rând, METNet proiectează și implementează o structură ierarhică, care îmbunătățește reprezentările aspectului și contextului iterativ. Rezultatele experimentale ale seturilor de date SemEval 2014 demonstrează eficacitatea METNet și demonstrăm în continuare că METNet este remarcabilă în scenarii multi-aspect.', 'sr': 'Analiza sentiment a na osnovu aspekta (ABSA) cilja je da utvrdi polarnost sentimenta svakog specifičnog aspekta u određenoj rečenici. Postoje istraživanja shvatile su važnost aspekta za zadatak ABSA-e i proizveli su mnoge interaktivne metode učenja koje su modeli kontekst baziran na specifičnom aspektu. Međutim, trenutni mehanizmi interakcije su loše opremljeni za naučenje kompleksnih rečenica sa višestrukim aspektima, a te metode podcjenjuju učenje predstavljanja aspekta. Da bi riješili dva problema, predlažemo zajedničku povećanu mrežu transformacije (METNet) za zadatak ABSA-e. Prvo, modul poboljšanja aspekta u METNetu poboljšava učenje zastupanja aspekta sa kontekstualnim semantičnim karakteristikama, koji daje aspektu mnogo informacija. Drugo, METNet dizajnira i implementira hijerarhičku strukturu, koja ponovno povećava predstavljanje aspekta i konteksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati podataka za semiEval 2014 pokazuju učinkovitost METNet-a, a dalje dokazujemo da je METNet izvanredan u multiaspektskim scenarijama.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தில் ஒவ்வொரு குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதியின் உணர்வு தீவிரத்தை தீர்மானிக்க வேண்டும். தற்போதைய ஆய்வுகள் ABSA செயல்பாட்டின் முக்கியத்தைப் புரிந்து கொண்டுள்ளார்கள் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதியை அடிப்படையில் ம ஆனால், தற்போதைய இணைப்பு முறைமைகள் பல பக்கங்களுடன் சிக்கலான வாக்கியங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு குறைவாக உள்ளன, மற்றும் இந்த முறைகள் பிரதிநி In order to solve the two problems, we propose a mutual enhanced transformation network (METNet) for the ABSA task.  முதலில், METNet யில் உள்ள விளிம்ப மேம்படுத்தும் கூறு Second, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which enhances the representations of the aspect and context iteratively. செம்வால் 2014 தரவு அமைப்புகளின் விளைவை METNet வெளியீட்டை காண்பிக்கிறது, மேலும் நாம் மேலும் தெரிவிக்கிறோம் METNet பல-பகுதிகள் காட்ச', 'si': 'Aspect-based Sentimental විශ්ලේෂණය (ABSA) ලක්ෂණයෙන් තියෙන්නේ හැම විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙක්ම ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයේ  ඉතින් ඉතින් පරීක්ෂණාගාරයෝ ABSA වැඩේ ගැන අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් තේරුම් ගත්තා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් අ නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූතිය සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට සංකේත වචනය ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි උපකරණය, ඒ වගේම මේ වි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් විසඳන්න, අපි ABSA වැඩකට සමාන්\u200dය විසඳන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. මුලින්, METNet වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩි වැඩි මොඩියුල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ දෙවෙනි විදියට, METNet නිර්මාණය කරනවා සහ පරිස්සම් සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ පරිස්සම් ස සෙම්වල් 2014 දත්ත පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් METNet ගැන ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි තව ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා METNet ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරති', 'so': 'Analyska fikrada (ABSA) wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu go’aan ku caddeeyo dhinac kasta oo gaar ah oo uu ku qoro go’aan. Baaritaanka joogta ayaa gartay muhiimka u ah arrimaha ABSA, waxayna heleen qaabab badan oo iskuul ah oo sameynta qaababka ku saleysan dhinaca gaar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, meymisyada iskaashatada haatan waa kuwa aan qalbi lahayn inay bartaan hadallada adag oo ay ku jiraan dhinacyo badan, qaababkan ayaa qiimeynaya barashada cilmiga. Si aan u xallino labada dhibaatooyin, waxaynu u soo jeedinnaa shabakadda beddelka ee wadajirka ah (METNet) ee ABSA. Marka ugu horeysa, qalabka horumarinta ee METNet ayaa kordhiya barbaarinta aqoonta dhinaca lagu barto xiliga xiliga ah, kaas oo ku siinaya macluumaad badan. Second, METNet ayaa qoraya, wuxuuna sameeyaa dhismo hierarchical ah, kaas oo ku kordhiya representations of aspect and context in si rasmi ah. Imtixaanka ku saabsan SemEval 2014 Datasets waxay muujiyaan shaqaalaha METNet, waxaynu sii caddaynaynaa in METNet uu ku soconayo aragtida kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) syftar till att fastställa sentimentpolariteten för varje specifik aspekt i en given mening. Befintliga undersökningar har insett betydelsen av aspekten för ABSA-uppgiften och har härledt många interaktiva inlärningsmetoder som modellerar kontext baserat på specifika aspekter. Nuvarande interaktionsmekanismer är dock dåligt rustade för att lära sig komplexa meningar med flera aspekter, och dessa metoder underskattar representationslärandet av aspekten. För att lösa de två problemen föreslår vi ett ömsesidigt förbättrat transformationsnätverk (METNet) för ABSA-uppdraget. För det första förbättrar modulen för aspektförbättring i METNet representationslärandet av aspekten med kontextuella semantiska funktioner, vilket ger aspekten mer riklig information. För det andra utformar och implementerar METNet en hierarkisk struktur, som förbättrar representationen av aspekt och sammanhang iterativt. Experimentella resultat på SemEval 2014 dataset visar på effektiviteten hos METNet, och vi bevisar vidare att METNet är enastående i scenarier med flera aspekter.', 'ur': 'آسپٹ بنیادی sentiment analysis (ABSA) کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ہر مخصوص منظور کے احساسات مضبوط ہونے کا ذریعہ مقرر کرے۔ Existing researchers have realized the aspect of the ABSA task and have derived many interactive learning methods that model context based on specific aspects. حالانکہ موجود تعاملات مکانیزوں کو بہت سی قسمت کے مطابق پیچیدہ جماعت کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے برا آمادہ ہیں، اور یہ طریقے اس قسمت کی تعلیم کی کم قدرت رکھتے ہیں. دو مشکلوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے ہم ABSA کے کام کے لئے ایک دوسرے سے زیادہ تغییر نیٹ ورک (METNet) پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ پہلے، METNet میں منظور زیادہ زیادہ مہربانی موڈیل نے منظور کی تصویر کی تعلیم کو زیادہ زیادہ معلومات دے رکھا ہے۔ دوسرا، METNet ایک حیراتیکل ساختار کی طراحی کرتا ہے اور عملہ کرتا ہے، جس نے منظور اور منظور کی تصویر کو دوبارہ زیادہ کرتا ہے. SemEval 2014 Datasets کے تجربے کے نتائج METNet کے اثرات کو دکھاتے ہیں، اور ہم اس کے بعد ثابت کرتے ہیں کہ METNet بہت سی منظور سیناریوں میں بہت اثر ہے.', 'uz': "Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) aims to determine the sentiment polarity of each specific aspect in a given sentence.  Mavjud taʼminlovlar ABSA vazifaning muhimligini aniqlaydi va bu model muhim darajada asosida yaratilgan ko'p interaktiv o'rganish usullarini aniqlaydi. Lekin, joriy interaction mechanislari bir necha dhinaclar bilan murakkab so'zlarni o'rganish uchun juda narsa yomon, va bu usullar qo'shimcha o'rganishni qiymatga qaror qiladi. Ikki muammolarni solish uchun, ABSA vazifasi uchun bir birinchi o'zgartirish tarmoqni (METNet) rivojlanamiz. Birinchi marta, METNetdagi darajani oshirish moduli taʼminlovchi darajadagi semantik xususiyatlarini o'rganishni bajaradi. Bu darajada ko'proq maʼlumot beradi. Ikkinchi marta, METNet dizayni yaratish va hierarchik struktureni ishga tushirish va bu qoʻllanmalarning tashkilotlarini kattalashtirish mumkin. Comment", 'vi': 'Phân tích tình cảm dựa trên khía cạnh (ABSA) nhằm xác định độ đa cảm của mỗi khía cạnh cụ thể trong một câu. Đã có các nghiên cứu tồn tại đã nhận ra tầm quan trọng của vai trò này đối với công việc ABC và có nhiều phương pháp học tương tác dựa trên ngữ cảnh cụ thể. Tuy nhiên, các cơ chế giao tiếp hiện tại không đủ khả năng để học những câu phức tạp với nhiều khía cạnh, và các phương pháp này đánh giá thấp sự phân biệt về khía cạnh. Để giải quyết hai vấn đề, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới cải tạo cải tạo lẫn nhau (METNet) cho nhiệm vụ ABSA. Thứ nhất, mô- đun cải tiến hình thể trong METNet cải thiện việc phân biệt các khía cạnh bằng các tính chất ngữ pháp ngữ định, nó cung cấp cho khía cạnh thông tin nhiều hơn. Thứ hai, METNet thiết kế và thực hiện một cấu trúc thứ tự, nó củng cố các biểu tượng theo khía cạnh và ngữ cảnh theo lề. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên trung hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hoàn hảo chứng minh tầm ảnh hưởng của METNet, và chúng tôi chứng minh rằng METNet vượt trội.', 'bg': 'Анализът на сентимента, базиран на аспекти, има за цел да определи полярността на сентимента на всеки конкретен аспект в дадено изречение. Съществуващите изследвания са осъзнали значението на аспекта за задачата на АБСА и са извели много интерактивни методи за обучение, които моделират контекста въз основа на специфичен аспект. Въпреки това, сегашните механизми за взаимодействие не са добре подготвени за изучаване на сложни изречения с множество аспекти и тези методи подценяват изучаването на представянето на аспекта. За решаване на двата проблема предлагаме взаимно подобрена трансформационна мрежа (МЕТНЕТ) за задачата на АБСА. Първо, модулът за подобряване на аспекта в МЕТНЕТ подобрява изучаването на представянето на аспекта с контекстуални семантични характеристики, което дава на аспекта по-изобилна информация. Второ, проектира и внедрява йерархична структура, която подобрява представянето на аспекта и контекста итеративно. Експерименталните резултати на наборите от данни демонстрират ефективността на МЕТНЕТ и освен това доказваме, че МЕТНЕТ е изключителен в многоаспектни сценарии.', 'da': 'Aspect-based sentiment analyse (ABSA) har til formål at bestemme sentiment polaritet af hvert specifikt aspekt i en given sætning. Eksisterende undersøgelser har indset betydningen af aspektet for ABSA opgaven og har afledt mange interaktive læringsmetoder, der modellerer kontekst baseret på specifikke aspekter. Men de nuværende interaktionsmekanismer er dårligt rustet til at lære komplekse sætninger med flere aspekter, og disse metoder undervurderer repræsentationslæringen af aspektet. For at løse de to problemer foreslår vi et gensidigt forbedret transformationsnetværk (METNet) til ABSA-opgaven. For det første forbedrer aspektforbedringsmodulet i METNet repræsentationslæringen af aspektet med kontekstuelle semantiske funktioner, hvilket giver aspektet mere rigelig information. For det andet designer og implementerer METNet en hierarkisk struktur, der forbedrer repræsentationen af aspekt og kontekst iterativt. Eksperimentelle resultater på SemEval 2014 datasæt viser effektiviteten af METNet, og vi beviser yderligere, at METNet er fremragende i multi-aspect scenarier.', 'de': 'Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) zielt darauf ab, die Sentiment Polarität jedes spezifischen Aspekts in einem bestimmten Satz zu bestimmen. Bestehende Forschungen haben die Bedeutung des Aspekts für die ABSA-Aufgabe erkannt und viele interaktive Lernmethoden abgeleitet, die Kontext basierend auf bestimmten Aspekten modellieren. Allerdings sind die gegenwärtigen Interaktionsmechanismen schlecht gerüstet, um komplexe Sätze mit mehreren Aspekten zu lernen, und diese Methoden unterschätzen das Darstellungslernen des Aspekts. Um die beiden Probleme zu lösen, schlagen wir ein gegenseitiges erweitertes Transformationsnetzwerk (METNet) für die ABSA-Aufgabe vor. Erstens verbessert das Aspect Enhancement Modul in METNet das Darstellungslernen des Aspekts mit kontextuellen semantischen Merkmalen, was dem Aspekt umfangreichere Informationen gibt. Zweitens entwirft und implementiert METNet eine hierarchische Struktur, die die Darstellung von Aspekten und Kontext iterativ verbessert. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an SemEval 2014 Datensätzen belegen die Effektivität von METNet, und wir beweisen, dass METNet in Multiaspektszenarien hervorragend ist.', 'nl': "Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) heeft als doel de sentimentpolariteit van elk specifiek aspect in een bepaalde zin te bepalen. Bestaande onderzoeken hebben het belang van het aspect voor de ABSA-taak gerealiseerd en hebben veel interactieve leermethoden afgeleid die context modelleren op basis van specifiek aspect. De huidige interactiemechanismen zijn echter slecht uitgerust om complexe zinnen met meerdere aspecten te leren, en deze methoden onderschatten het leren van representatie van het aspect. Om deze twee problemen op te lossen, stellen we een wederzijds versterkt transformatienetwerk (METNet) voor voor de ABSA-taak. Ten eerste verbetert de module aspect enhancement in METNet het leren van representatie van het aspect met contextuele semantische kenmerken, waardoor het aspect overvloediger informatie krijgt. Ten tweede ontwerpt en implementeert METNet een hiërarchische structuur, die de representaties van aspect en context iteratief verbetert. Experimentele resultaten op SemEval 2014 Datasets tonen de effectiviteit van METNet aan en we bewijzen verder dat METNet uitstekend is in multi-aspect scenario's.", 'hr': 'Analiza osjećaja na osnovu aspekta (ABSA) cilja je utvrditi polarnost osjećaja svakog specifičnog aspekta u određenoj rečenici. Postoje istraživanja shvatile su važnost aspekta za zadatak ABSA-a i proizveli su mnoge interaktivne metode učenja koje su modelni kontekst baziran na specifičnom aspektu. Međutim, trenutni mehanizami interakcije su loše opremljeni za učenje kompleksnih rečenica s višestrukim aspektima, te te metode podcjenjuju učenje predstavljanja aspekta. Da bi riješili dva problema, predlažemo zajedničku povećanu mrežu transformacije (METNet) za zadatak ABSA-e. Prvo, modul poboljšanja aspekta u METNet-u poboljšava učenje zastupanja aspekta s kontekstualnim semantičnim karakteristikama, koji daje aspektu mnogo informacija. Drugo, METNet dizajnira i provodi hijerarhičku strukturu, koja ponovno povećava zastupanje aspekta i konteksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati podataka za semiEval 2014 pokazuju učinkovitost METNet-a, a dalje dokazujemo da je METNet izvanredan u multiaspektskim scenarijama.', 'id': 'Analisi sentimen berdasarkan aspek (ABSA) bermaksud menentukan polaritas sentimen setiap aspek spesifik dalam kalimat tertentu. Penelitian yang ada telah menyadari penting aspek untuk tugas ABSA dan telah menghasilkan banyak metode belajar interaktif bahwa konteks model berdasarkan aspek spesifik. Namun, mekanisme interaksi saat ini tidak cocok untuk belajar kalimat kompleks dengan berbagai aspek, dan metode-metode ini meremehkan pembelajaran representation aspek. Untuk memecahkan dua masalah, kami mengusulkan jaringan transformasi yang diperbaiki (METNet) untuk tugas ABSA. First, the aspect enhancement module in METNet improves the representation learning of the aspect with contextual semantic features, which gives the aspect more abundant information.  Second, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which enhances the representations of aspect and context iteratively.  Hasil percobaan pada SemEval 2014 Datasets menunjukkan efektif METNet, dan kami lebih membuktikan bahwa METNet luar biasa dalam skenario multi-aspek.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa hisia kwa mtazamo (ABSA) unakusudia kuamua hisia za uchaguzi wa kila upande maalum katika hukumu fulani. Utafiti unaoendelea umegundua umuhimu wa suala la kazi ya ABSA na wamepata mbinu nyingi za kujifunza zinazohusiana na muktadha huo kwa msingi maalum. Hata hivyo, mfumo wa usambazaji wa sasa hauna vifaa vya kujifunza sentensi tata kwa upande mwingine, na njia hizi zinakadiria uwakilishi kujifunza suala hili. Ili kutatua matatizo hayo mawili, tunapendekeza mtandao wa mabadiliko (METNet) kwa ajili ya kazi ya ABSA. Kwanza, kituo cha kuongezeka kwa Mtandao wa METNet kinaboresha uwakilishaji wa kujifunza suala hilo kwa vipengele vya sekunde vya kawaida, ambacho kinatoa taarifa nyingi zaidi. Pili, METNet imeunda na kutekeleza muundo wa mipango, ambao unaongeza maoni ya mtazamo na muktadha kwa ujumla. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na SemEval 2014 Datasets yanaonyesha ufanisi wa Mtandao wa METNet, na tunathibitisha zaidi kuwa Mtandao wa Mataifa unaendelea katika hali mbalimbali.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات (ABSA) بر روی نظر، هدف می\u200cگیرد که قطعیت احساسات هر نقطه\u200cای خاص در یک جمله معلوم باشد. تحقیقات موجود موجود اهمیت منطقه برای کار ABSA متوجه شدند و بسیاری از روش یادگیری های متفاوتی را که مدل محیط بر روی منطقه خاصی بنیاد می\u200cآورند. با این حال، مکانیسم\u200cهای تفاوت فعلی برای یاد گرفتن جمله\u200cهای پیچیده با چندین نقطه\u200cها بد آموزش دارند، و این روش\u200cها یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی نقطه\u200cای را کم ارزش می\u200cدهند. برای حل این دو مشکل، یک شبکه تغییرات (METNet) را برای کار ABSA پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. اول، مولد افزایش منطقه در METNet، یادگیری نمایش منطقه را با ویژه\u200cهای semantic متصل می\u200cکند، که اطلاعات بیشتری را به عنوان منطقه می\u200cدهد. دوم، METNet طراحی می\u200cکند و یک ساختار معماری را اجرای می\u200cکند که نمایش\u200cهای منطقه و محیط را به طور تکرار می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cگری در پایگاه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای SemEval 2014 موثرت METNet را نشان می\u200cدهند، و ما اضافه\u200cتر ثابت می\u200cکنیم که METNet در سناریو\u200cهای مختلف است.', 'tr': "Görnüş tabanly duýgular analyzasyny (ABSA) berilen sözlemde her hili aspektiň polaritlygyny bejermek amasyna edýär. Existen araştyrmalar ABSA zadynyň aspektiniň wajypyny çykypdyr we munyň belli aspekte daýanýan örän etkileşimli öwrenme yöntemlerini çykypdyr. Ýöne şu wagt teşkil mekanizmalary birnäçe aspekt bilen karmaşık sözleri öwrenmek üçin ýaman taýýarlanmadyr, we bu yöntemler aspektiň öwrenmesini küçümsedir. Iki meseleni çözmek üçin, ABSA zady üçin bir araşykal gelişmiş terjime netegi (METNet) teklip etmek üçin. Ilkinji, METNet'deki aspektler gelişmek moduli aspektiň öwrenmesini tespit edilen semantik özellikleri bilen geliştirir. Bu aspekti köpräk bilgi berer. Ikinjisi, METNet bir hijerarşik strukturuny tasarlar we implement, bu şekilde aspektiň we kontekstiň temsillerini tekrarlyk bilen geliştirir. SemEval 2014 sany maglumatlaryň netijesi METNet'iň etkinliýetini görkezýär we biz indi METNet'iň birnäçe aspekt senaryýasynda ýok bolandygyny kanıtlaýarys.", 'af': "Aspekte-gebaseerde sentimentanalisie (ABSA) doel om die sentiment polarisie van elke spesifieke aspek in 'n gegewe seting te bepaal. Bestaande ondersoekte het die belangrikheid van die aspekt vir die ABSA taak gekry en baie interaktiewe ondersoekte metodes afgelei wat model konteks gebaseer op spesifieke aspekt. Maar die huidige interaksie mekanisme is sleg beskikbaar om komplekse setnings met veelvuldige aspekte te leer, en hierdie metodes ondersteun die verskyning leer van die aspekt. In order to solve the two problems, we propose a mutual enhanced transformation network (METNet) for the ABSA task. Eerste, die aspekt verbetering module in METNet verbeter die voorstelling leer van die aspekt met contextual semantiese funksies, wat die aspekt meer oorvloedige inligting gee. Tweede, METNet ontwerp en implementeer 'n hierarkies struktuur, wat die voorstellings van aspek en konteks iteratief verbeter. Eksperimentale resultate op SemEval 2014 Datatasse vertoon die effektiviteit van METNet, en ons verder bevestig dat METNet in multiaspekte scenarios uitgegaan is.", 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte (ABSA) synon të përcaktojë polaritetin e ndjenjave të çdo aspekti specifik në një fjalim të caktuar. Kërkimet ekzistuese kanë kuptuar rëndësinë e aspektit për detyrën e ABSA dhe kanë nxjerrë shumë metoda interaktive mësimi që modelojnë kontekstin bazuar në aspektin specifik. Megjithatë, mekanizmat aktuale të ndërveprimit janë të paaftë për të mësuar fjalë komplekse me aspekte të shumta dhe këto metoda nënvlerësojnë përfaqësimin e mësimit të aspektit. In order to solve the two problems, we propose a mutual enhanced transformation network (METNet) for the ABSA task.  Së pari, moduli i përmirësimit të aspektit në METNet përmirëson përfaqësimin e mësimit të aspektit me karakteristika kontekstuale semantike, që i jep aspektit informacion më të madh. Second, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which enhances the representations of aspect and context iteratively.  Rezultatet eksperimentale në SemEval 2014 Datasets demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e METNet dhe ne dëshmojmë më tej se METNet është i jashtëzakonshëm në skenarë shumëaspektore.', 'am': 'በተመሳሳይ የአፍሪካዊ አስተያየት (ABSA) በተወሰነ ፍርድ ውስጥ የሁሉን የአስማተኝነቱን ምርጥ ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ የአሁኑ ምርመራዎች የአBSA ስራ ግንኙነትን የሚያስፈልገውን አግኝተዋል፡፡ በተለያዩ ጉዳይ ላይ የተመሳሰለውን የመተማር ዘዴዎች አግኝተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ የግንኙነት አካባቢዎች በተጨማሪው ጉዳይ እውቀትን ለመማር አይቻሉም፣ እነዚህም ሥርዓቶች የግንኙነትን ትምህርት በማስተማር ይጎድላሉ፡፡ የሁለቱን ጉዳዮች ለመፍታት፣ የአፍሪካ ስራ የተጠቃሚ የለውጥ መረብ (METNet) ለመፍታት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ የሜትኔት ማድረግ ጠቅላላ ማድረግ በተጨማሪው የውይይት ምርጫዎችን ማድረግ ይሻላል፡፡ Second, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which will enhance the aspects and context by increasing. በሴmEval 2014 ዳታ ተሟጋቾች የሜትኔት ጥቅም ያሳያል፡፡ እናም ማቴትኔት በብዙ ጉዳይ ላይ እንደተሻለ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սպեկտի հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը (ABSA) նպատակն է որոշել որոշ նախադասության յուրաքանչյուր կոնկրետ ասպեկտի զգացմունքների կողմնականությունը: Գոյություն ունեցող հետազոտությունները հասկացան ԱԲՍԱ-ի խնդրի ասպեկտի կարևորությունը և ստացել են շատ ինտերակտիվ ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ, որոնք կառուցվում են կոնտեքստի մոդելներով, հիմնված որո Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս փոխազդեցության մեխանիզմները չեն կարող բազմաթիվ ասպեկտներով բարդ նախադասություններ սովորել, և այս մեթոդները թերագնահատում են այս ասպեկտի ներկայացման ուսումնասիրությունը: Երկու խնդիրները լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք փոխադարձ բարելավված վերափոխման ցանց (ՄեԹՆԹ) ABSA-ի համար: Առաջինը, ասպեկտների բարելավման մոդուլը ՄեԹՆԹ-ում բարելավում է ասպեկտների ուսումնասիրությունը կոնտեքստոնալ սեմանտիկ հատկություններով, ինչը տալիս է ասպեկտներին ավելի բավարար տեղեկատվություն: Երկրորդ, ՄեԹՆԹ-ը ստեղծում է և իրականացնում հիերարխիկ կառուցվածք, որը զարգանում է էպեկտների և կոնտեքստի պատկերացումները կրկնօրինակ: 2014 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս "Մետենթ"-ի արդյունավետությունը, և մենք նաև ապացուցուցում ենք, որ "Մետենթ"-ը բազմաասպեկտ սցենարներում հրաշալի է:', 'az': "Aspect-tabanlńĪ hissl…ôr analizi (ABSA) bel…ô bir c√ľml…ôd…ô h…ôr k…ôsin hissl…ôrinin polarisini tanńĪmmaq m…ôqs…ôdil…ôdir. Existing araŇütńĪrmalar ABSA iŇüinin aspektinin vacib…ôtini anladńĪlar v…ô bir √ßox interaktif √∂yr…ônm…ô metodlarńĪnńĪ yaratdńĪlar ki, modell…ôrin m…ôxluqatńĪ m√ľ…ôyy…ôn bir aspekt…ô dayanńĪlńĪr. Ancaq, Ňüimdiki m√ľxt…ôlif m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôkt…ôb…ôl…ôr √ßoxlu aspektl…ôr il…ô kompleks s√∂zl…ôri √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn x…ôst…ôlik m…ôkt…ôb…ôl…ôridir, v…ô bu metodlar aspekt √∂yr…ônm…ôsini d…ôyiŇüdirirl…ôr. ńįki problemi √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn ABSA iŇül…ôri √ľ√ß√ľn bir-birimiz…ô daha yaxŇüńĪ transformasiya a ńü (METNet) t…ôklif edirik. ńįlk d…ôf…ô, METNet'deki aspekti artńĪrmaq modulu, aspekt √∂yr…ônm…ôsini m√ľxt…ôlif semantik √∂zellikl…ôri il…ô yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr, ki bu aspekti daha √ßox m…ôlumat verir. ńįkincisi, METNet bir hiyerarŇüik quruluŇüu t…ôyin edir v…ô bu, aspektl…ôrin v…ô kontekstl…ôrin g√∂st…ôriŇül…ôrini yenid…ôn artńĪrar. SemEval 2014 veril…ônl…ôrin t…ôcr√ľb…ô sonu√ßlarńĪ METNet'in etkinlińüini g√∂st…ôrir, v…ô biz daha da METNet'in √ßoxlu aspekt senaryoylarńĪnda √ßox g√∂z…ôl olduńüunu kanńĪtlayńĪq.", 'bn': 'প্রত্যেক নির্দিষ্ট প্রতিটি বিশেষ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি বিশ্লেষণের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি শাস্তিতে প্রত্যেক বিশেষ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির মনোভ বিদ্যমান গবেষণা এবিএসএ কাজের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বুঝতে পেরেছে এবং তারা অনেক ইন্টারনেটিভ শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি পেয়েছে যা মডেলের প্রেক্ষা তবে বর্তমান আন্তর্জাতিক ব্যবস্থা বিভিন্ন দিকের সাথে জটিল বাক্য শিখার জন্য অসুস্থ, এবং এই পদ্ধতি প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক এই দুটি সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য আমরা এক বিএসএসএ কাজের জন্য এক সাধারণ উন্নত পরিবর্তন নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি। প্রথমত, মেটিনেটের প্রান্ত বৃদ্ধি মডিউলটি প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের শিক্ষা বাড়িয়ে দেয়, যা প্রাক্তন সেম্যান্টিক বৈশি দ্বিতীয়, মেটেন্ট ডিজাইন এবং একটি হায়েরার্কিক কাঠামো বাস্তবায়িত করে, যা দৃশ্য এবং প্রেক্ষাপটের প্রতিনিধি বৃদ্ধি করে। সেমইভাল ২০১৪ ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল মেট নেটওয়ার্কের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে এবং আমরা আরো প্রমাণ করি যে মেটিনেট বহুদৃশ্যের দৃশ্যে চমৎকার', 'ca': "L'anàlisi del sentiment basat en aspectes (ABSA) mira a determinar la polaritat del sentiment de cada aspecte específic d'una frase dada. Existing researches have realized the importance of the aspect for the ABSA task and have derived many interactive learning methods that model context based on specific aspect.  Però els mecanismes d'interacció actuals no estan dotats d'aprendre frases complexes amb múltiples aspectes, i aquests mètodes subestiman l'aprenentatge representatiu del aspecte. Per resoldre els dos problemes, proposem una xarxa de transformació mutua millorada (METNet) per a la tasca ABSA. En primer lloc, el módul de millor aspecte de METNet millora l'aprenentatge de representació de l'aspecte amb característiques semàntiques contextuals, que dóna al aspecte informació més abundant. Segon, METNet dissenya i implementa una estructura jeràrquica, que millora les representacions del aspecte i el context iterativament. Els resultats experimentals dels Estats de dades SemEval 2014 demostren l'eficacia de METNet, i demostrem que METNet és excepcional en escenaris multiaspectes.", 'bs': 'Analiza osjećaja na osnovu aspekta (ABSA) cilja je utvrditi polarnost osjećaja svakog specifičnog aspekta u određenoj rečenici. Postoje istraživanja shvatile su važnost aspekta za zadatak ABSA-a i proizveli su mnoge interaktivne metode učenja koje su modeli kontekst baziran na specifičnom aspektu. Međutim, trenutni mehanizami interakcije su loše opremljeni za učenje kompleksnih rečenica sa višestrukim aspektima, a te metode podcjenjuju učenje predstavljanja aspekta. Da bismo riješili dva problema, predlažemo zajedničku povećanu mrežu transformacije (METNet) za zadatak ABSA-e. Prvo, modul poboljšanja aspekta u METNet-u poboljšava učenje predstavljanja aspekta sa kontekstualnim semantičnim karakteristikama, koji daje aspektu mnogo informacija. Drugo, METNet dizajnira i implementira hijerarhičku strukturu, koja ponovno povećava predstavljanje aspekta i konteksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati podataka za semiEval 2014 pokazuju učinkovitost METNet-a, a dalje dokazujemo da je METNet izvanredan u multiaspektskim scenarijama.', 'cs': 'Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) má za cíl určit sentimentovou polaritu každého konkrétního aspektu v dané větě. Stávající výzkumy si uvědomily význam tohoto aspektu pro úkol ABSA a odvodily mnoho interaktivních učebních metod, které modelují kontext na základě konkrétního aspektu. Současné interakční mechanismy jsou však špatně vybaveny k učení složitých vět s více aspekty a tyto metody podceňují reprezentační učení aspektu. Pro řešení obou problémů navrhujeme vzájemně rozšířenou transformační síť (METNet) pro úkol ABSA. Za prvé, modul vylepšení aspektu v METNet zlepšuje učení reprezentace aspektu s kontextovými sémantickými rysy, což poskytuje aspekt bohatší informace. Za druhé METNet navrhuje a implementuje hierarchickou strukturu, která iterativně zlepšuje reprezentaci aspektu a kontextu. Experimentální výsledky na datových sadách SemEval 2014 demonstrují efektivitu METNet a dále dokazujeme, že METNet je vynikající v multiaspektových scénářích.', 'et': 'Aspektipõhise sentimentaalüüsi (ABSA) eesmärk on määrata kindlaks iga konkreetse aspekti sentimentaalsus antud lauses. Olemasolevad uuringud on mõistnud aspekti tähtsust ABSA ülesande jaoks ja on välja toonud palju interaktiivseid õppemeetodeid, mis modelleerivad konteksti konkreetse aspekti põhjal. Praegused interaktsioonimehhanismid on aga halvasti varustatud mitme aspektiga keerukate lausete õppimiseks ja need meetodid alahindavad aspekti representatsiooniõppimist. Kahe probleemi lahendamiseks pakume ABSA ülesandeks välja vastastikuse täiustatud transformatsioonivõrgu (METNet). Esiteks parandab METNeti aspekti täiustamise moodul aspekti esindamise õppimist kontekstuaalsete semantiliste omadustega, mis annab aspektile rohkem informatsiooni. Teiseks kujundab ja rakendab METNet hierarhilist struktuuri, mis parandab aspekti ja konteksti esitusi iteratiivselt. SemEval 2014 andmekogumite eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad METNeti efektiivsust ning tõestame veel, et METNet on suurepärane mitmeaspektilistes stsenaariumides.', 'fi': 'Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) pyrkii määrittämään kunkin yksittäisen aspektin tunteen polariteettia tietyssä lauseessa. Olemassa olevat tutkimukset ovat havainneet näkökulman merkityksen ABSA-tehtävän kannalta ja johtaneet monia interaktiivisia oppimismenetelmiä, jotka mallintavat kontekstia tiettyyn näkökulmaan perustuen. Nykyaikaiset vuorovaikutusmekanismit ovat kuitenkin huonosti varustautuneita monimutkaisten lauseiden oppimiseen, ja nämä menetelmät aliarvioivat näkökulman representaatiooppimista. Näiden kahden ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme ABSA-tehtävään keskinäistä tehostettua transformaatioverkostoa (METNet). Ensinnäkin METNetin aspektiparannusmoduuli parantaa aspektin representaatiooppimista kontekstuaalisilla semanttisilla ominaisuuksilla, mikä antaa aspektille runsaamman tiedon. Toiseksi METNet suunnittelee ja toteuttaa hierarkkisen rakenteen, joka parantaa näkökulman ja kontekstin esitystä iteratiivisesti. Kokeelliset tulokset SemEval 2014 -tietokannoista osoittavat METNetin tehokkuuden ja todistamme lisäksi, että METNet on erinomainen moniulotteisissa skenaarioissa.', 'ko': '측면에 기초한 정서분석(ABSA)은 주어진 문장의 각 특정한 측면에 대한 정서의 극성을 확정하는 데 목적을 둔다.기존의 연구는 ABSA 임무에 대한 측면의 중요성을 인식하고 특정한 측면을 바탕으로 하는 상호작용 학습 방법을 많이 파생시켰다.그러나 기존의 상호작용 메커니즘은 여러 방면의 복잡한 문장을 배우기에 부족하고 이런 방법은 방면의 표징 학습을 과소평가했다.이 두 가지 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 ABSA 임무에 사용되는 상호증강변환망(METNet)을 제시했다.먼저, METNet의 체증강 모듈은 상하문 의미 특징을 가진 체의 표현 학습을 개선하여 체에 더욱 풍부한 정보를 제공하였다.그 다음으로 METNet은 방면과 상하문의 표현을 교체하는 방식으로 강화하는 차원 구조를 설계하고 실현했다.Sem Eval 2014 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과는 METNet의 유효성을 증명했고 우리는 METNet이 다방면의 장면에서 뛰어난 활약을 했다는 것을 증명했다.', 'jv': 'Aspect-basic Sensitive Ngubah barêng-barêng saiki wis rangko nggawe barang nggawe Aspek kanggo nggawe aksi ARS lan nganggo akeh modo sing takon interactive yang sampek model sing basa ning titik dhéwé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mbok ditambah sing beraksi gambar durung, kita supoyo sistem sing luwih akeh gunakake transformasi (MET-et) kanggo nggawe barang ASA. Awak dhéwé, module sing ngconvolusi nggawe barang nggawe MET lan nggawe ngubah cara-cara sing titik semanti nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe informasi sing apik dhéwé. Ndoleh, MET nggawe lan ngetik nggawe akeh akeh sistem, sing bisa ngubah cara-cara perusahaan karo sekondirno ngono nggawe barang kelas Rasalih sing paling maneh lan seminval 2013 Daftar Puwek isine efek nggawe MET, lan ampuhi awak dhéwé nggawe barang MET kuwi mau gak dhéwé, nik sak efek daftar neng sampek karo akeh sing paling apik.', 'sk': 'Analiza sentimenta na podlagi vidikov (ABSA) je namenjena določitvi sentimentalne polarnosti posameznega vidika v danem stavku. Obstoječe raziskave so spoznale pomen vidika za nalogo ABSA in izpeljale številne interaktivne metode učenja, ki modelirajo kontekst na podlagi specifičnega vidika. Vendar pa so sedanji mehanizmi interakcije slabo opremljeni za učenje kompleksnih stavkov z več vidiki in te metode podcenjujejo učenje reprezentacije vidika. Za rešitev obeh problemov predlagamo medsebojno izboljšano transformacijsko mrežo (METNet) za nalogo ABSA. Prvič, modul za izboljšanje vidika v METNetu izboljšuje učenje reprezentacije vidika z kontekstualnimi semantičnimi značilnostmi, kar daje vidiku več informacij. Drugič, METNet oblikuje in izvaja hierarhično strukturo, ki iterativno izboljšuje predstavitve vidika in konteksta. Eksperimentalni rezultati podatkovnih nizov SemEval 2014 dokazujejo učinkovitost METNet, poleg tega pa dokazujemo, da je METNet izjemen v več-vidikovnih scenarijih.', 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות מבוסס באפקט (ABSA) מטרה לקבוע את קוטביות הרגשות של כל אפקט ספציפי במשפט מסוים. מחקרים קיימים הבינו את חשיבותו של האפקט למשימה של ABSA והוצאו שיטות לימוד אינטראקטיביות רבות בכל אופן, מנגנוני אינטראקציה הנוכחים לא מוכשרים בכדי ללמוד משפטים מורכבים עם היבטים רבים, ושיטות אלה מעריכות את לימוד היציגה של היבט. כדי לפתור את שתי הבעיות, אנו מציעים רשת שינוי משותפת משותפת משותפת (METNet) למשימה של ABSA. ראשית, מודול שיפור האפקטים ב-METNet משפר את לימוד הייצגות של האפקט עם תכונות סמנטיות קונטקסטיות, מה שנותן לאפקט מידע רבה יותר. שנית, METNet מעצב וממשיך מבנה היררכי, שמגביר את הייצגות של האפקט והקשר באופן חוזר. Experimental results on SemEval 2014 Datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of METNet, and we further prove that METNet is outstanding in multi-aspect scenarios.', 'ha': "Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) aims to determine the sentiment polarity of each specific aspect in a given sentence.  Ana gane muhimu wa aikin ABSA kuma sun sami shiryoyin masu amfani da yin amfani da masu husũma masu husũma da misalin mazaɓa a kan haske. A lokacin da, ma'anar interaction yanzu yana da nau'in zartar da za'a sanar da cewa masu husũma masu adadi da bakin fili masu yawa, kuma waɗannan hanyoyi yana ƙaranci sanar da halartar da ke faɗin. To, dõmin ya raba masu cikin matabbata biyu, sai mu buƙata wata targo mai ƙaranci mai canza transformation (METNet) wa aikin ABSA. First, modulin korya cikin METNet na ƙara shirin mai nuna wa matsayin da tsarin masu hushi, da kuma yana ƙara masu ƙaranci ga mazaɓa. Dukkan, METNet na zaɓi kuma yana tafiyar da wata hiterarchical layin, wanda yana ƙara masĩfar aspects and context itenci. Matarin jarrabo na SemEal 2014 Dataset na nuna nufi'ar METNet, kuma za mu iya ƙara gaskata cewa METNet za'a samar da masu cikin masu motsi masu yawa.", 'bo': 'Aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) aims to determine the sentiment polarity of each specific aspect in a sentence. Existing research have realized the importance of the aspect of the ABSA task and have derived many interactive learning methods that model context based on specific aspects. ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་ནང འུ་ཅག་གིས་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་མོས་མཐུན་གྱི་དོན་ལྟར་རྒྱས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། First, the aspect enhancement module in METNet improves the representation learning of the aspect with contextual semantic features, which gives the aspect more abundant information. Secondly, METNet designs and implements a hierarchical structure, which enhances the representations of aspect and context iteratively. METNet ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་ཐོག་པའི་བརྗོད་ཆེན་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་ཉེན་མཁན་གྱི་གྲངས་སུ་མངོན་གསལ་བཀོད་བྱེད། འོང་ནི་METNet་ཡི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་མང་ཙམ་མེད'}
{'en': 'Affective and Contextual Embedding for Sarcasm Detection', 'ar': 'التضمين العاطفي والسياقي لاكتشاف السخرية', 'es': 'Incorporación afectiva y contextual para la detección de sarcasmo', 'fr': 'Intégration affective et contextuelle pour la détection du sarcasme', 'pt': 'Incorporação afetiva e contextual para detecção de sarcasmo', 'ja': '皮肉検出のための情動的および文脈的埋め込み', 'zh': '以刺检之情,与上下文嵌之', 'hi': 'व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए भावात्मक और प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Аффективное и контекстное встраивание для обнаружения сарказма', 'ga': 'Leabú Éifeachtach agus Comhthéacsúil chun Sarcasm a Bhrath', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Επιθετική και περιεκτική ενσωμάτωση για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού', 'hu': 'Érintett és kontextuális beágyazás a szarkazmus felismeréséhez', 'kk': 'Саркассм анықтау үшін эффективні және контексті ендіру', 'it': 'Embedding affettivo e contestuale per la rilevazione del sarcasmo', 'mk': 'Affective and Contextual Embedding for Sarcasm Detection', 'ml': 'സർക്കാസം ഡിറ്ററിക്റ്റീവിനുള്ള ആഫ്കിക്റ്റീവും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള എംബെഡിങ്ങിങ്ങ്', 'lt': 'Poveikinis ir kontekstinis įdėjimas sarkazmui nustatyti', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni affetttiva u kuntestwali għad-Detezzjoni tas-Sarkazmu', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Sarkasm', 'no': 'Comment', 'mn': 'Саркассмын нээлттэй нөлөөтэй, нөлөөтэй байдал', 'pl': 'Efektywne i kontekstowe osadzenie dla wykrywania sarkazmu', 'ro': 'Încorporarea afectivă și contextuală pentru detectarea sarcasmului', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Efektivno i kontekstno uključenje za detekciju sarkasma', 'so': 'Affective and Context Embedding for Sarcasm', 'sv': 'Effektiv och kontextuell inbäddning för upptäckt av sarkasm', 'ur': 'Sarcasm Detection کے لئے اثرات اور کنٹکسٹیوال ایمبڈینگ', 'ta': 'Sarcasm கண்டுபிடிப்புக்கான தாக்கும் மற்றும் உள்ளமைப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra tình hình và tình hình', 'bg': 'Афективно и контекстно вграждане за откриване на сарказъм', 'nl': 'Affectieve en contextuele embedding voor sarcasmedetectie', 'da': 'Effektiv og kontekstuel indlejring til detektion af sarkasme', 'hr': 'Efektivno i kontekstno uključenje za otkrivanje sarkasma', 'de': 'Affektive und kontextuelle Einbettung für Sarkasmus-Erkennung', 'fa': 'وارد شدن اثر و محیط برای بازرسی سارکاسم', 'sw': 'Nchini ya Kuchunguza Kikosi', 'tr': 'Sarkasm Aňlamak üçin Etkinlik we Kontekst Girişi', 'ko': '풍자 검출에 사용되는 감정과 언어 환경의 삽입', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Përfshirja afektive dhe kontekstuale për zbulimin e sarkazmit', 'az': 'Sarkasm keşif üçün Etkileyici və Kontekst İşlənməsi', 'bn': 'সার্কাস্ম ডিটেক্টরের জন্য সক্রিয় এবং বিদ্যমান এমবেডিং', 'hy': 'Սարկազմի հայտնաբերման աֆեկտիվ և կոնտեքստային ներգրավումը', 'id': 'Pendekatan Afektif dan Konteksual untuk Deteksi Sarkasme', 'bs': 'Efektivno i kontekstno uključenje za detekciju sarkasma', 'ca': 'Incorporació afectada i contextual per la detecció del sarcasme', 'cs': 'Affektivní a kontextové vložení pro detekci sarkasmu', 'et': 'Sarkasmi tuvastamiseks mõjutav ja kontekstiline manustamine', 'fi': 'Afektiivinen ja kontekstuaalinen upotus sarkasmin havaitsemista varten', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Afektivna in kontekstualna vdelava za zaznavanje sarkazma', 'he': 'התקנה משפיעה וקונקסטלית לגילוי סרקזם', 'bo': 'སྦུང་རྟགས་བཙལ་བ་དང་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Automatic sarcasm detection from text is an important classification task that can help identify the actual sentiment in user-generated data, such as reviews or tweets. Despite its usefulness, sarcasm detection remains a challenging task, due to a lack of any vocal intonation or facial gestures in textual data. To date, most of the approaches to addressing the problem have relied on hand-crafted affect features, or pre-trained models of non-contextual word embeddings, such as Word2vec. However, these models inherit limitations that render them inadequate for the task of sarcasm detection. In this paper, we propose two novel deep neural network models for sarcasm detection, namely ACE 1 and ACE 2. Given as input a text passage, the models predict whether it is sarcastic (or not). Our models extend the architecture of BERT by incorporating both affective and contextual features. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first attempt to directly alter BERT’s architecture and train it from scratch to build a sarcasm classifier. Extensive experiments on different datasets demonstrate that the proposed models outperform state-of-the-art models for sarcasm detection with significant margins.', 'ar': 'يعد الاكتشاف التلقائي للسخرية من النص مهمة تصنيف مهمة يمكن أن تساعد في تحديد المشاعر الفعلية في البيانات التي ينشئها المستخدم ، مثل المراجعات أو التغريدات. على الرغم من فائدته ، لا يزال اكتشاف السخرية مهمة صعبة ، بسبب عدم وجود أي نغمة صوتية أو إيماءات وجهية في البيانات النصية. حتى الآن ، اعتمدت معظم الأساليب لمعالجة المشكلة على ميزات التأثير المصنوعة يدويًا ، أو النماذج المدربة مسبقًا لتضمينات الكلمات غير السياقية ، مثل Word2vec. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه النماذج ترث قيودًا تجعلها غير مناسبة لمهمة كشف السخرية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح نموذجين جديدين للشبكة العصبية العميقة لاكتشاف السخرية ، وهما ACE 1 و ACE 2. بالنظر إلى إدخال مقطع نصي ، تتنبأ النماذج بما إذا كانت ساخرة (أم لا). تعمل نماذجنا على توسيع بنية BERT من خلال دمج الميزات العاطفية والسياقية. على حد علمنا ، هذه هي المحاولة الأولى لتغيير بنية BERT مباشرة وتدريبها من الصفر لبناء مصنف سخرية. توضح التجارب المكثفة على مجموعات البيانات المختلفة أن النماذج المقترحة تتفوق في الأداء على أحدث النماذج لاكتشاف السخرية بهوامش كبيرة.', 'es': 'La detección automática de sarcasmo a partir del texto es una tarea de clasificación importante que puede ayudar a identificar el sentimiento real en los datos generados por los usuarios, como reseñas o tuits. A pesar de su utilidad, la detección del sarcasmo sigue siendo una tarea difícil, debido a la falta de entonación vocal o gestos faciales en los datos textuales. Hasta la fecha, la mayoría de los enfoques para abordar el problema se han basado en características de afecto elaboradas a mano o modelos previamente entrenados de incrustaciones de palabras no contextuales, como Word2vec. Sin embargo, estos modelos heredan limitaciones que los hacen inadecuados para la tarea de detección del sarcasmo. En este artículo, proponemos dos modelos novedosos de redes neuronales profundas para la detección del sarcasmo, a saber, ACE 1 y ACE 2. Dado como entrada un pasaje de texto, los modelos predicen si es sarcástico (o no). Nuestros modelos amplían la arquitectura de BERT incorporando características tanto afectivas como contextuales. Hasta donde sabemos, este es el primer intento de alterar directamente la arquitectura de BERT y entrenarla desde cero para construir un clasificador de sarcasmo. Experimentos exhaustivos en diferentes conjuntos de datos demuestran que los modelos propuestos superan a los modelos más avanzados para la detección del sarcasmo con márgenes significativos.', 'ja': 'テキストからの自動皮肉検出は、レビューやツイートなどのユーザー生成データの実際の感情を識別するのに役立つ重要な分類タスクです。 その有用性にもかかわらず、皮肉検出は、テキストデータにおける声のイントネーションまたは顔のジェスチャーの欠如により、依然として困難な課題である。 これまで、問題に対処するためのアプローチのほとんどは、手作業で作成された影響機能、またはWord 2 vecなどの非コンテキストワード埋め込みの事前にトレーニングされたモデルに依存してきました。 しかしながら、これらのモデルは、皮肉検出のタスクに不十分になる制限を継承する。 本稿では、皮肉検出のための新規の深層ニューラルネットワークモデル、すなわち、ACE 1とACE 2の2つを提案する。 テキストの一節として入力を考えると、モデルはそれが皮肉かどうかを予測する。 私たちのモデルは、情意的特徴と文脈的特徴の両方を組み込むことで、BERTのアーキテクチャを拡張します。 私たちの知る限りでは、これはBERTのアーキテクチャを直接変更し、皮肉の分類器を構築するためにゼロから訓練する最初の試みです。 異なるデータセットに関する広範な実験は、提案されたモデルが、顕著なマージンで皮肉検出のための最先端モデルを上回ることを実証している。', 'pt': 'A detecção automática de sarcasmo de texto é uma importante tarefa de classificação que pode ajudar a identificar o sentimento real em dados gerados pelo usuário, como avaliações ou tweets. Apesar de sua utilidade, a detecção de sarcasmo continua sendo uma tarefa desafiadora, devido à falta de qualquer entonação vocal ou gestos faciais em dados textuais. Até o momento, a maioria das abordagens para resolver o problema baseou-se em recursos de efeito artesanais ou modelos pré-treinados de incorporação de palavras não contextuais, como o Word2vec. No entanto, esses modelos herdam limitações que os tornam inadequados para a tarefa de detecção de sarcasmo. Neste artigo, propomos dois novos modelos de redes neurais profundas para detecção de sarcasmo, a saber, ACE 1 e ACE 2. Dada como entrada uma passagem de texto, os modelos prevêem se é sarcástico (ou não). Nossos modelos estendem a arquitetura do BERT incorporando recursos afetivos e contextuais. Até onde sabemos, esta é a primeira tentativa de alterar diretamente a arquitetura do BERT e treiná-lo do zero para construir um classificador de sarcasmo. Extensos experimentos em diferentes conjuntos de dados demonstram que os modelos propostos superam os modelos de última geração para detecção de sarcasmo com margens significativas.', 'fr': "La détection automatique des sarcasmes dans le texte est une tâche de classification importante qui peut aider à identifier le sentiment réel dans les données générées par les utilisateurs, telles que les avis ou les tweets. Malgré son utilité, la détection des sarcasmes reste une tâche difficile, en raison de l'absence d'intonation vocale ou de gestes faciaux dans les données textuelles. À ce jour, la plupart des approches pour résoudre le problème reposaient sur des caractéristiques d'effet fabriquées à la main ou sur des modèles pré-entraînés d'intégration de mots non contextuels, tels que Word2vec. Cependant, ces modèles héritent de limitations qui les rendent inadaptés à la tâche de détection du sarcasme. Dans cet article, nous proposons deux nouveaux modèles de réseaux neuronaux profonds pour la détection du sarcasme, à savoir ACE 1 et ACE 2. En saisissant un passage de texte, les modèles prédisent s'il est sarcastique (ou non). Nos modèles étendent l'architecture du BERT en intégrant des caractéristiques à la fois affectives et contextuelles. À notre connaissance, il s'agit de la première tentative de modifier directement l'architecture du BERT et de l'entraîner à partir de zéro pour construire un classificateur de sarcasmes. Des expériences approfondies sur différents ensembles de données démontrent que les modèles proposés surpassent les modèles de pointe pour la détection des sarcasmes avec des marges significatives.", 'zh': '从文本自动检测刺为要务,可以助知用户成之数(如论推文)之情。 虽有实用性,刺检一挑战性,文本数乏声色也。 迄今为止,多依工作,或预练者非上下文词嵌模,如Word2vec。 然继以规模,使不足以行刺检。 本文二刺新型深神经网络模则ACE 1ACE 2。 给定文本段落为输,模形测其有讽刺性(或非讽刺性)否。 合情上下文以广BERT架构。 以吾所知,此乃初试直变BERT之架构,而练之以立刺分类器也。 博实验异数,优于先进之刺,著于余量。', 'hi': 'पाठ से स्वचालित व्यंग्य का पता लगाना एक महत्वपूर्ण वर्गीकरण कार्य है जो उपयोगकर्ता-जनित डेटा में वास्तविक भावना की पहचान करने में मदद कर सकता है, जैसे कि समीक्षाएं या ट्वीट्स। इसकी उपयोगिता के बावजूद, व्यंग्य का पता लगाना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य बना हुआ है, जो पाठ्य डेटा में किसी भी मुखर इंटोनेशन या चेहरे के इशारों की कमी के कारण है। आज तक, समस्या को संबोधित करने के लिए अधिकांश दृष्टिकोणों ने हाथ से तैयार की गई प्रभावित सुविधाओं, या गैर-प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग के पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल, जैसे कि Word2vec पर भरोसा किया है। हालांकि, इन मॉडलों को उन सीमाओं को विरासत में मिलता है जो उन्हें व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए अपर्याप्त प्रदान करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए दो उपन्यास गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अर्थात् एसीई 1 और एसीई 2। इनपुट एक पाठ मार्ग के रूप में दिया गया है, मॉडल भविष्यवाणी करते हैं कि यह व्यंग्यात्मक है (या नहीं)। हमारे मॉडल दोनों भावात्मक और प्रासंगिक सुविधाओं को शामिल करके BERT की वास्तुकला का विस्तार करते हैं। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह सीधे BERT की वास्तुकला को बदलने और एक व्यंग्य क्लासिफायर बनाने के लिए खरोंच से इसे प्रशिक्षित करने का पहला प्रयास है। विभिन्न डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल महत्वपूर्ण मार्जिन के साथ व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए अत्याधुनिक मॉडल से आगे निकलते हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение сарказма из текста является важной задачей классификации, которая может помочь определить фактические настроения в пользовательских данных, таких как обзоры или твиты. Несмотря на свою полезность, обнаружение сарказма остается сложной задачей из-за отсутствия голосовой интонации или жестов лица в текстовых данных. На сегодняшний день большинство подходов к решению проблемы опираются на ручные функции влияния или предварительно обученные модели неконтекстных вложений слов, такие как Word2vec. Однако эти модели наследуют ограничения, которые делают их неадекватными для задачи обнаружения сарказма. В этой статье мы предлагаем две новые модели глубоких нейронных сетей для обнаружения сарказма, а именно Ace 1 и Ace 2. Учитывая в качестве входных данных текстовый отрывок, модели предсказывают, является ли он саркастическим (или нет). Наши модели расширяют архитектуру BERT, включая как аффективные, так и контекстные функции. Насколько нам известно, это первая попытка напрямую изменить архитектуру БЕРТА и обучить его с нуля, чтобы построить классификатор сарказма. Обширные эксперименты с различными наборами данных показывают, что предлагаемые модели превосходят современные модели для обнаружения сарказма со значительными пределами.', 'ga': 'Is tasc aicmithe tábhachtach é braite uathbhásmhaireachta ó théacs a chuideoidh leis an meon iarbhír i sonraí a ghineann úsáideoirí a aithint, amhail léirmheasanna nó tvuíteanna. In ainneoin a úsáidí atá sé, is tasc dúshlánach fós an searbhas a bhrath, mar gheall ar easpa tuin chainte nó gothaí gnúise i sonraí téacsúla. Go dtí seo, bhí an chuid is mó de na cuir chuige chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb ag brath ar ghnéithe tionchair lámhdhéanta, nó ar mhúnlaí réamh-oilte de leabú focal neamhchomhthéacsúil, mar Word2vec. Mar sin féin, tá teorainneacha le hoidhreacht ó na samhlacha seo a fhágann nach leor iad chun an searbhas a bhrath. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid dhá shamhail núíosacha líonra néaracha dhomhain le haghaidh braite searbhas, is iad sin ACE 1 agus ACE 2. Ós rud é gur ionchur téacs iad, déanann na samhlacha a thuar cé acu an bhfuil sé searbhasach (nó nach bhfuil). Leathnaíonn ár múnlaí ailtireacht BERT trí ghnéithe mothaitheacha agus comhthéacsúla araon a ionchorprú. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é seo an chéad iarracht chun ailtireacht BERT a athrú go díreach agus é a oiliúint ón tús chun aicmitheoir searbhas a thógáil. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar thacair shonraí éagsúla go sáraíonn na samhlacha molta na samhlacha úrscothacha chun searbhas a bhrath le corrlaigh shuntasacha.', 'ka': 'ტექსტიდან ავტომატური საპკასმის განახლება არის მნიშვნელოვანი კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობა, რომელიც შეუძლია გამოიყენებული მონაცემების რეალური სინტემინტის განახლება, როგორც გან მას სამყაროებელობას მაგრამ, საპკასმის განახლება უფრო საშუალებელი რაოდენობა დარჩენა, რადგან არაფერი სიტყვალური ინტონაციის ან სახელური გესტები ტექსტულ მონაცე ახლა, ბევრი პრობლემას შესახებ შესახებ პრობლემაზე გადარწმუნდება პრობლემაზე გამოყენებული გამოსახულების ფუნქციებზე, ან უკეთესტური სიტყვების მოდელი, როგორც Word2vec. მაგრამ, ეს მოდელები მივიღეთ ზომილებები, რომლებიც ისინი არაფექციელია საპკასმის განახლების საქმე. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ მუშაობთ ორი პრომენური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები საპკასმის განახლებისთვის, ანუ ACE 1 და ACE 2. როგორც ტექსტის გადატანა, მოდელები წარმოიდგინენ თუ არა არა. ჩვენი მოდელები BERT-ის აქტიქტურაციას გაფართებენ, რომლებიც აღმოჩენებული და კონტექსტური ფუნქტურებები შექმნა. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ეს არის პირველი პირველი მოცდილობა BERT-ის აქტიქტიქტურის შეცვლა და გასწავლობა საპკასმის კლასიფიკაციაზე. განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავებული მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ მონაცემები მოდელები გავამუშავებენ სურაციის მოდელების განსხვავებას, რომლებიც სა', 'hu': 'Az automatikus szarkazmus felismerése a szövegből fontos osztályozási feladat, amely segíthet azonosítani a felhasználók által létrehozott adatokban, például értékelésekben vagy tweetekben a tényleges hangulatot. Hasznossága ellenére a szarkazmus felismerése továbbra is kihívást jelentő feladat, mivel a szöveges adatokban nincs semmilyen hanghang vagy arcmozdulat. A mai napig a probléma megoldásának legtöbb megközelítése a kézzel készített hatáskörök funkciókra vagy a nem kontextuális szóbeágyazások előre képzett modelljeire támaszkodott, például a Word2vecre. Ezek a modellek azonban olyan korlátokat örökölnek, amelyek alkalmatlanná teszik őket a szarkazmus felismeréséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban két új mélyneurális hálózati modellt javasolunk a szarkazmus detektálására, nevezetesen ACE 1 és ACE 2. A modellek bemeneti szövegrészeként megjósolják, hogy szarkasztikus-e (vagy sem). Modelljeink kibővítik a BERT architektúráját az affektív és kontextuális jellemzők bevonásával. Legjobb tudásunk szerint ez az első kísérlet arra, hogy közvetlenül megváltoztassuk a BERT architektúráját, és a semmiből kiképezzük egy szarkazmus osztályozó létrehozására. A különböző adatkészleteken végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modellek jelentős margókkal felülmúlják a legkorszerűbb modelleket a szarkazmus felismerésére.', 'el': "Η αυτόματη ανίχνευση σαρκασμού από κείμενο είναι μια σημαντική εργασία ταξινόμησης που μπορεί να βοηθήσει στον προσδιορισμό του πραγματικού συναισθήματος σε δεδομένα που παράγονται από τους χρήστες, όπως κριτικές ή tweets. Παρά τη χρησιμότητά του, η ανίχνευση σαρκασμού παραμένει ένα δύσκολο έργο, λόγω έλλειψης φωνητικού τόνου ή χειρονομίας προσώπου στα κειμενικά δεδομένα. Μέχρι σήμερα, οι περισσότερες από τις προσεγγίσεις για την αντιμετώπιση του προβλήματος βασίστηκαν σε χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά εφέ ή προενταξιακά μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων χωρίς περιεχόμενο, όπως το Word2vec. Ωστόσο, αυτά τα μοντέλα κληρονομούν περιορισμούς που τα καθιστούν ανεπαρκή για το έργο της ανίχνευσης σαρκασμού. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε δύο νέα μοντέλα βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού, συγκεκριμένα ACE 1 και ACE 2. Λαμβάνοντας ως εισαγωγή ένα απόσπασμα κειμένου, τα μοντέλα προβλέπουν αν είναι σαρκαστικό (ή όχι). Τα μοντέλα μας επεκτείνουν την αρχιτεκτονική του ενσωματώνοντας τόσο συναισθηματικά όσο και συναφή χαρακτηριστικά. Απ' όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτή είναι η πρώτη προσπάθεια να αλλάξει άμεσα η αρχιτεκτονική του BERT και να την εκπαιδεύσει από το μηδέν για να χτίσει έναν ταξινομητή σαρκασμού. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων αποδεικνύουν ότι τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα ξεπερνούν τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα ανίχνευσης σαρκασμού με σημαντικά περιθώρια.", 'it': "Il rilevamento automatico del sarcasmo dal testo è un'importante attività di classificazione che può aiutare a identificare il sentiment effettivo nei dati generati dagli utenti, come recensioni o tweet. Nonostante la sua utilità, la rilevazione del sarcasmo rimane un compito impegnativo, a causa della mancanza di intonazione vocale o gesti facciali nei dati testuali. Ad oggi, la maggior parte degli approcci per affrontare il problema si è basata su funzionalità di effetto artigianali o modelli pre-addestrati di incorporazioni di parole non contestuali, come Word2vec. Tuttavia, questi modelli ereditano limitazioni che li rendono inadeguati per il compito di rilevazione del sarcasmo. In questo articolo, proponiamo due nuovi modelli di rete neurale profonda per il rilevamento del sarcasmo, vale a dire ACE 1 e ACE 2. Dato come input un passaggio di testo, i modelli predicono se è sarcastico (o meno). I nostri modelli ampliano l'architettura di BERT incorporando caratteristiche affettive e contestuali. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questo è il primo tentativo di modificare direttamente l'architettura di BERT e addestrarla da zero a costruire un classificatore di sarcasmo. Esperimenti approfonditi su diversi set di dati dimostrano che i modelli proposti superano i modelli all'avanguardia per la rilevazione del sarcasmo con margini significativi.", 'kk': 'Мәтіннен автоматты саркассмды анықтау - пайдаланушының құрылған деректерінің шын сезімін анықтауға көмектесетін маңызды классификациялау тапсырмасы. Мысалы, қарау не tweets секілді. Қолданыстығына қарамастан, саркассмды анықтау мәтіндік деректерінде бір дыбыс интонтациясы немесе мәліметтің белсендігі жоқ себебі әсер ететін тапсырма болады. Қазір, мәселені шешу үшін көпшілігі Word2vec секілді қолмен құрылған қасиеттеріне көмектеседі, немесе мәселен емес сөздерді ендіру үлгілерін алдын- ала оқылған үлгілеріне көмектеседі. Бірақ бұл үлгілер сарказм тапсырмасының тапсырмасына жеткілікті болатын шектеулерді орындайды. Бұл қағазда, біз сарказмды анықтау үшін екі романдық невралдық желі үлгілерін ұсынамыз - ACE 1 және ACE 2. Мәтін пассажасын келтіру үшін, үлгілер саркастикалық (немесе емес) болып табылады. Өзіміздің үлгілеріміз BERT архитектурасын әсер ететін және контекстік мүмкіндіктерді қосып жатыр. Біздің біліміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, бұл бірінші BERT архитектурасын өзгерту және сарказм классификаторын құру үшін оқыту әрекеті. Басқа деректер қорларындағы кеңейтілген тәжірибелер үлгілерді саркассм анықтау үшін маңызды шектері арқылы орындау үлгілерін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Автоматското детекција на сарказам од текст е важна класификациска задача која може да помогне во идентификувањето на вистинскиот чувство во податоците генерирани од корисникот, како рецензии или твитови. И покрај неговата корисност, детекцијата на сарказмот останува предизвикувачка задача, поради недостатокот на било каква гласна интонација или личен гест во текстуалните податоци. To date, most of the approaches to addressing the problem have relied on hand-crafted affect features, or pre-trained models of non-contextual word embeddings, such as Word2vec.  Сепак, овие модели наследуваат ограничувања кои ги прават несоодветни за задачата на детекција на сарказам. Во овој весник предложуваме два нови модели на длабока нервна мрежа за детекција на сарказам, а тоа АЦЕ 1 и АЦЕ 2. Со оглед на влезот на текст, моделите предвидуваат дали е саркастично (или не). Нашите модели ја прошируваат архитектурата на БЕРТ со вклучуваое на и afeктивни, и контекстни карактеристики. Според нашето знаење, ова е првиот обид директно да ја промени архитектурата на Берт и да ја тренира од нула за да изгради класификатор на сарказам. Експериментите на различни податоци покажуваат дека предложените модели ги надминуваат најсовремените модели за детекција на сарказам со значителни маргини.', 'lt': 'Automatinis sarkazmo nustatymas iš teksto yra svarbi klasifikavimo užduotis, kuri gali padėti nustatyti tikrąjį jausmą naudotojų sukurtuose duomenise, pavyzdžiui, peržiūrose ar tweetuose. Nepaisant jo naudingumo, sarkazmo aptikimas tebėra sunkus uždavinys, nes tekstiniuose duomenise nėra jokių balso intonacijų ar veido gestų. Iki šiol dauguma problemos sprendimo būdų buvo grindžiami rankiniu būdu sukurtais poveikio požymiais arba iš anksto parengtais nekontekstinių žodžių įterpimo modeliais, pvz., Word2vec. Tačiau šie modeliai paveldi apribojimus, dėl kurių jie nepakankami sarkazmo aptikimui atlikti. Šiame dokumente siūlome du naujus gilaus nervų tinklo modelius sarkazmui nustatyti, būtent ACE 1 ir ACE 2. Atsižvelgiant į teksto įvedimą, modeliai numato, ar jis sarkastinis (arba ne). Mūsų modeliai išplečia BERT architektūrą įtraukiant ir įtakingas, ir kontekstines savybes. Geriausiai žinome, kad tai pirmasis bandymas tiesiogiai pakeisti BERT architektūrą ir iš pradžių ją treniruoti kurti sarkazmo klasifikatorių. Išsamūs įvairių duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomi modeliai viršija pažangiausius sarkazmo nustatymo modelius su dideliais skirtumais.', 'ml': 'Automatic sarcasm detection from text is an important classification task that can help identify the actual sentiment in user-generated data, such as reviews or tweets.  അതിന്റെ ഉപകാരമാണെങ്കിലും സർക്കസം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയാണ്. വാക്കുകളില്ലാത്തതിന്റെയോ മുഖത്തില പ്രശ്നം സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള മിക്കവും, കൈകൈകാര്യം ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d  എന്നാലും, ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അവകാശപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പരിധികള്\u200d അവകാശപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സർക്കാസം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന് മതി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു നോവല്\u200d ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റാല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന ഒരു പദാവലിയുടെ പാസ്സ് എന്ന പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, അത് സർക്കാസിക് ആണോ അല്ലെങ്കിലോ മോഡലു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിനെ വിശാലമാക്കുന്നു. പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതും നിലവിലുള്ള വിശേഷ നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിന് ഇതാണ് നേരിട്ട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറി മാറ്റാന്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ ശ്രമിക്കുന്നത്. ഒരു സർക്കാസം ക്ല വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാര്\u200dട്ടിലെ കലാകാസം കണ്', 'mt': 'L-individwazzjoni awtomatika tas-sarkazmu mit-test hija kompitu importanti ta’ klassifikazzjoni li jista’ jgħin biex jiġi identifikat is-sensazzjoni attwali fid-dejta ġġenerata mill-utent, bħal reviżjonijiet jew tweets. Minkejja l-utilità tiegħu, id-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu tibqa’ kompitu ta’ sfida, minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ kwalunkwe intonazzjoni vokali jew ġesti tal-wiċċ fid-dejta testwali. Sal-lum, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi biex tiġi indirizzata l-problema kienu jiddependu fuq karatteristiċi ta’ affettwazzjoni maħduma bl-idejn, jew mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem mhux kuntestwali, bħal Word2vec. Madankollu, dawn il-mudelli jinterrgħu limitazzjonijiet li jagħmluhom inadegwati għall-kompitu tad-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu żewġ mudelli ġodda ta’ netwerk newrali profond għad-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu, jiġifieri ACE 1 u ACE 2. Minħabba passaġġ tat-test bħala input, il-mudelli jipprevedu jekk huwiex sarkastiku (jew le). Il-mudelli tagħna jestendu l-arkitettura tal-BERT billi jinkorporaw karatteristiċi kemm affetttivi kif ukoll kuntestwali. Għall-a ħjar għarfien tagħna, dan huwa l-ewwel tentattiv biex tinbidel direttament l-arkitettura tal-BERT u titħarreġha mill-bidu għall-bini ta’ klassifikatur tas-sarkasmu. Extensive experiments on different datasets demonstrate that the proposed models outperform state-of-the-art models for sarcasm detection with significant margins.', 'mn': 'Текстээс автоматтын саркассмын оношлол бол хэрэглэгчийн гаргасан өгөгдлийн бодит мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлж чадах чухал хэлбэртэй ажил юм. Үнэндээ хэрэглэгдэхгүй ч, сэтгэл хөдлөл мэдээллээр ямар ч дуу сэтгэл санаа, нүүр хөдөлгөөн байхгүйгээр хэцүү ажил байдаг. Өнөөдөр асуудлын тухай бодох арга барилгын ихэнх нь гар бүтээгдэхүүний нөлөөлөлт, эсвэл Word2vec гэх мэт орчин үг биш боловсруулагдсан загваруудын аль боловсруулагдсан загваруудыг хамгаалдаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр загварууд саркассмын мэдээллийн даалгавраас бусад хэмжээсүүдийг үнэлдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид саркассмын мэдрэмжтэй хоёр шинэ шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг санал болгож байна. ACE 1 болон ACE 2. Текст хугацаанд орж ирсэн учраас, загвар нь саркаст эсэхийг тодорхойлдог. Бидний загварууд БЕРТ-ын архитектурыг нөлөөлөх болон нөлөөлөх чадваруудыг хоёулаад нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бидний хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй хувьд энэ бол BERT-ын архитектурыг шууд өөрчлөхөд саркассмын классификацийг бүтээх анхны хичээл юм. Өөр өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн олон туршилтууд санал өгсөн загварууд саркассмыг олох үед маш чухал загвартай загваруудыг дамжуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan sarkasme automatik dari teks adalah tugas klasifikasi yang penting yang boleh membantu mengenalpasti perasaan sebenar dalam data yang dijana oleh pengguna, seperti ulasan atau tweet. Walaupun ia berguna, pengesan sarkasma tetap tugas yang mencabar, disebabkan kekurangan mana-mana intonasi suara atau gerakan wajah dalam data teks. Sehingga kini, kebanyakan pendekatan untuk mengatasi masalah telah bergantung pada ciri-ciri pengaruh yang dibuat-tangan, atau model terlatih-awal bagi penyambungan perkataan bukan-kontekstual, seperti Word2vec. Namun, model ini mewarisi keterangan yang membuat mereka tidak cukup untuk tugas pengesan sarkasme. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan dua model rangkaian saraf dalam novel untuk pengesan sarkasma, iaitu ACE 1 dan ACE 2. Given as input a text passage, the models predict whether it is sarcastic (or not).  Model kami memperluas arkitektur BERT dengan memasukkan kedua-dua ciri-ciri affectif dan kontekstual. Menurut pengetahuan kita, ini adalah percubaan pertama untuk mengubah secara langsung arsitektur BERT dan melatihnya dari awal untuk membina klasifikasi sarkasme. Eksperimen luas pada set data yang berbeza menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan melampaui model-state-of-the-art untuk pengesan sarkasme dengan margin yang signifikan.', 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging av sarkasm frå tekst er ein viktig klassifikasjonsprogram som kan hjelpa til å identifisera den aktuelle sentimenten i brukargrende data, som gjennomsikt eller tweeter. Til tross av nyttigheten, oppdaging av sarkasm blir eit vanskeleg oppgåve på grunn av mangling av nokon vokal-intonasjon eller ansiktige gestar i tekstdata. Til dag har dei fleste tilnærmingane til å adressa problemet dependerte på funksjonar som er håndkrevet, eller før- trengte modeller av ikkje- kontekstiske ordinnbygging, som Word2vec. Desse modelane får imidlertid avgrensingar som gjer dei ikkje tilgjengelege for oppgåva for oppdaging av sarkasm. I denne papiret foreslår vi to novelle dype neuralnettverksmodeller for oppdaging av sarkasm, som er ACE 1 og ACE 2. Gjennomsikt som skriv inn eit tekstpassasjon, forventar modelane om det er sarkastisk (eller ikkje). Modellene våre utvidar BERT-arkitekturen ved å inkludere både påvirkande og kontekstske funksjonar. Dette er det første forsøket å endra BERT- arkitekturen direkte og trenga det frå skrap for å bygge ein sarkasm- klassifiserer. Ekstra eksperimenter på ulike datasett viser at dei foreslåde modelane utfører tilstandsmodulane for å oppdaga sarkasma med signifikante marginar.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie sarkazmu z tekstu jest ważnym zadaniem klasyfikacji, które może pomóc zidentyfikować rzeczywiste sentymenty w danych generowanych przez użytkownika, takich jak recenzje czy tweety. Pomimo swojej przydatności wykrywanie sarkazmu pozostaje trudnym zadaniem ze względu na brak intonacji wokalnej lub gestów twarzy w danych tekstowych. Do tej pory większość podejść do rozwiązania problemu opierała się na ręcznie tworzonych funkcjach efektów lub wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach niekontekstowych osadzeń słów, takich jak Word2vec. Jednak modele te dziedziczą ograniczenia, które czynią je nieodpowiednimi do wykrywania sarkazmu. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy dwa nowe modele głębokiej sieci neuronowej do wykrywania sarkazmu, a mianowicie ACE 1 i ACE 2. Podając jako wejście fragment tekstowy, modele przewidują, czy jest on sarkastyczny (czy nie). Nasze modele rozszerzają architekturę BERT, uwzględniając zarówno cechy afektywne, jak i kontekstowe. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy jest to pierwsza próba bezpośredniej zmiany architektury BERT i przeszkolenia jej od zera w celu zbudowania klasyfikatora sarkazmu. Obszerne eksperymenty na różnych zbiorach danych pokazują, że proponowane modele przewyższają najnowocześniejsze modele wykrywania sarkazmu o znacznych marginesach.', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a sarcasmului din text este o sarcină importantă de clasificare care poate ajuta la identificarea sentimentului real în datele generate de utilizatori, cum ar fi recenziile sau tweeturile. În ciuda utilității sale, detectarea sarcasmului rămâne o sarcină dificilă, datorită lipsei oricărei intonații vocale sau gesturi faciale în datele textuale. Până în prezent, majoritatea abordărilor pentru abordarea problemei s-au bazat pe caracteristici de afectare realizate manual sau pe modele pre-instruite de încorporări de cuvinte non-contextuale, cum ar fi Word2vec. Cu toate acestea, aceste modele moștenesc limitări care le fac inadecvate pentru sarcasmul detectării. În această lucrare, propunem două modele noi de rețele neuronale profunde pentru detectarea sarcasmului, și anume ACE 1 și ACE 2. Dat ca intrare un pasaj text, modelele prezic dacă este sarcastic (sau nu). Modelele noastre extind arhitectura BERT prin încorporarea atât a caracteristicilor afective, cât și a celor contextuale. Din câte ştim, aceasta este prima încercare de a modifica direct arhitectura BERT şi de a o instrui de la zero pentru a construi un clasificator de sarcasm. Experimente ample pe diferite seturi de date demonstrează că modelele propuse depășesc modelele de ultimă generație pentru detectarea sarcasmului cu marje semnificative.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje automatskog sarkazma iz teksta je važan zadatak klasifikacije koji može pomoći da identifikuje stvarnu osjećaj u podacima proizvedenim korisnicima, kao što su pregledi ili tweets. Uprkos njegovoj korisnosti, detekcija sarkazma ostaje izazovan zadatak, zbog nedostatka glasnog intonacije ili gesta lica u tekstualnim podacima. Do sada, većina pristupa rješavanju problema se oslanjala na karakteristike koje su napravljene rukama, ili predobučene modele neprekontekstualnih reči, poput Word2veca. Međutim, ovi modeli naslijeđuju ograničenja koje ih čine nedovoljnim za zadatak otkrivanja sarkazma. U ovom papiru predlažemo dva novog duboka neuralna mreža modela za detekciju sarkazma, a to je ACE 1 i ACE 2. S obzirom na ulaz teksta, modeli predviđaju da li je sarkastično (ili ne). Naši modeli prošire arhitekturu BERT uključujući i uticajne i kontekstne karakteristike. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi pokušaj da direktno promijenimo BERT arhitekturu i treniramo ga od ogrebotine da izgradimo klasifikator sarkazma. Eksperimenti na različitim setima podataka pokazuju da predloženi modeli izvršavaju modele stanja umjetnosti za detekciju sarkazma sa značajnim marginama.', 'so': "Shaqooyin baaraandegista sarcasm ah oo aad ka hesho macluumaad muhiim ah, kaas oo caawinaya in la caddeeyo fikradda rasmiga ah oo ku qoran macluumaadka isticmaalayaasha, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka ama tweetka. Inkastoo ay faa'iido u leedahay, baaritaanka qasarku waa mid adag, sababtoo ah u baahan dhamaanshaha codka ama qalabka afka ee taariikhda. To date, most of the approaches to addressing the problem have relied on hand-crafted affect features, or pre-trained models of non-contextual word embeddings, such as Word2vec.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee modelladan waxay dhaxlaan xuduudaha ka dhiga inay ku filan shaqo baaritaanka sarcaska. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa laba samooyin oo shabakad aad u dheer oo naxaad ah oo lagu soo ogaado sarcasm, tusaale ahaan ACE 1 iyo ACE 2. Sida lagu sameeyo baasaboor qoraal ah, modellada ayaa wax sheegaya inay tahay sarcastic (ama aysan ahayn). Tusaalooyinkayagu waxay ku fidiyaan dhismaha BERT, waxayna ku qoran yihiin faa'iido saameyn leh iyo xilli-joogta ah. Marka ugu wanaagsan aqoonteenna, taasi waa isku dayada ugu horraysa in si toos u beddelo dhismaha BERT iyo in loo baro si loo dhiso fasax sarcasm ah. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku qoran sawirada kala duduwan waxay muujiyaan in tusaalaha la soo jeeday ay ay ka muujiyaan tusaale-qaabka farshaxanka oo lagu soo ogaado baaritaanka sarcaska oo aad u weyn.", 'sv': 'Automatisk sarkasm detektering från text är en viktig klassificeringsuppgift som kan hjälpa till att identifiera den faktiska känslan i användargenererade data, till exempel recensioner eller tweets. Trots dess användbarhet är det fortfarande en utmanande uppgift att upptäcka sarkasm på grund av avsaknad av röstintonation eller ansiktsgester i textdata. Hittills har de flesta tillvägagångssätt för att lösa problemet förlitat sig på handgjorda påverkandefunktioner eller förkunskaperade modeller av icke kontextuella ordinbäddningar, till exempel Word2vec. Men dessa modeller ärver begränsningar som gör dem otillräckliga för uppgiften att upptäcka sarkasm. I denna uppsats föreslår vi två nya djupa neurala nätverksmodeller för sarkasm detektering, nämligen ACE 1 och ACE 2. Som inmatning av en textpassage förutspår modellerna om det är sarkastiskt (eller inte). Våra modeller utökar BERT:s arkitektur genom att integrera både affektiva och kontextuella egenskaper. Så vitt vi vet är detta det första försöket att direkt förändra BERT:s arkitektur och träna den från grunden för att bygga en sarkasm klassificering. Omfattande experiment på olika datauppsättningar visar att de föreslagna modellerna överträffar de senaste modellerna för sarkasm detektering med betydande marginaler.', 'si': 'පාළුවෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වැදගත් විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාවක් තමයි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් නිර්මාණ එයාගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැත්තම්, සර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරයි, කිසිම කතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය විද අවසානයෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ අත් කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් න නමුත්, මේ මෝඩේල්ස් සීමාවල් වලට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ඒවා සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න වැඩක් වෙනුව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න, ACE 1 සහ ACE 2. පාළ පාස් එකක් ඇතුළත් විදියට, මොඩේල් සැර්කාසික් කියලා හිතන්න. අපේ මොඩේල් BERT ගේ ස්ථාපනය විස්තර කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ කර අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දේවල්, මේක තමයි පළමු උත්සහ BERT ගේ විස්තාරය වෙනස් කරන්න, ඒක සැර්කාස්ම් විශේෂකයක් හදන්න. වෙනස් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩේ', 'ta': 'உரையிலிருந்து தானாகவே sarcasm கண்டுபிடிப்பது ஒரு முக்கியமான வகைப்படுத்தல் செயலாகும். இது பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தகவலில் உள்ள உண்மையான உணர்வ அது பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டாலும், ஆராய்ச்சி கண்டுபிடிப்பு சவாலிக்கும் பணியாக இருக்கிறது, எந்த ஒலிக்காட்சி அல்லது முகத்தில் தகவலில்  இந்த நேரத்திற்கு பெரும்பாலான வழிகாட்டியால் பிரச்சினையை நிர்வகிக்கும் பொருள் கையில் கையாளும் பண்புகளை பாதிக்கும், அல்லது தற்காலிக சொல் ஆயினும், இந்த மாதிரிகள் எல்லைகளை வாரிசாக்குகின்றன, அது அவர்களை பரிசுத்தமான கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு போதுமானதாக ஆக இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இரண்டு புதிய ஆழமான புதிய பிணையத்தின் மாதிரிகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ஏசி 1 மற்றும் ACE 2. உள்ளீட்டு உரை கடவுச்சொல்லாமல் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள், மாதிரிகள் அது சட்டத்திற்கு (அல்லது இல்லை) என்பதை மு எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் பிரெட்டின் கட்டுப்பாட்டை விரிவாக்குகிறது பாக்கியமுள்ள மற்றும் தற்காலிக தன்மைகளை சேர்த எங்கள் அறிவின் சிறந்த முயற்சி இது பிரெட்டின் கட்டுப்பாட்டை நேரடியாக மாற்ற முயற்சி மற்றும் அதை சுட்டி ஒரு பரிமாற்று வகுப்பாளரை உருவ வேறு தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள விரிவான சோதனைகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் ச', 'ur': 'پیغام سے اپنا سارکاسم ڈیٹ شناسایی ایک اہم کلاسیفون ٹاکس ہے جو کارساز کے پیدا کئے ہوئے ڈیٹوں میں واقعی احساسات کی شناسایی کی مدد کرسکتا ہے، جیسے رسی یا ٹویٹ. اپنا فائدہ اٹھانے کے باوجود، سارکاسم کا اظہار ایک مشکل کام رہتا ہے، کیونکہ کسی آواز کی غفلت یا چہرے کی جستجو ٹکسٹیل ڈیٹے میں ہے. یہاں تک، مشکل کے بارے میں بہت سی طریقے ہیں جو ہاتھ بنائے ہوئے اثرات پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں، یا غیر کنٹکسٹیوال کلمات ابڈینگ کی پیش آموزش کی نمونے، جیسے Word2vec. لیکن یہ نمونے ان حدود کے وارث ہوتے ہیں جو ان کو sarcasm detection کے کام کے لئے ناپاکیزہ بناتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم دو نومین عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں، یعنی ACE 1 اور ACE 2. ایک ٹیکسٹ پھیج کے طور پر داخل کیا گیا ہے، مدل پیش آتے ہیں کہ یہ سارکاسٹ ہے یا نہیں۔ ہمارے مدل BERT کے معمار کو پھیلاتے ہیں کہ ان کے علائم اور منظور کے علائم شامل کریں۔ ہمارے بہترین علم کے لئے یہ سب سے پہلی کوشش ہے کہ BERT کی معماری تغییر کریں اور اسے ایک سارکاسم کلاسیر بنائیں۔ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر پھیرے ہوئے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی مدلکوں معلوم مرزے کے ساتھ سارکاسم شناسایی کے لئے استعمال کرتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Ko'rib chiqqan foydalanishi mumkin, sarkasm aniqlashni tasavvur qiladi, bu tugmalar tarkibi maʼlumotda hech qanday tovush qo'shish yoki qo'l qo'llanmagan sababda. Bu yerda muammolarni boshqarish uchun ko'pchilik murakkablarini qoʻllab qo'llab qo'llash xususiyatlariga ishlatadi, yoki bir marta qoʻllanmagan soʻzni boshqarishdan oldin modellarga ishlatiladi, kama Word2vec kabi. However, these models inherit limitations that render them inadequate for the task of sarcasm detection.  Bu hujjatda, biz sarkasmni aniqlash uchun ikkita novel neyrol modellarini rivojlanamiz, ACE 1 va ACE 2. Matn maxfiy soʻzni kiritish sifatida koʻrsatiladi, modellar sarkastik (yoki emas) deb koʻrsatiladi. Bizning modellarimiz BERT'ning arxituvchisini o'zgartirish va doim xususiyatlarni birlashtiradi. Bu bizning eng yaxshi aniqligimizga, bu BERT strukturesini to ʻgʻri o'zgartirish uchun birinchi jarayon va uni sarkasm darajasini yaratishdan o'rganish. Har xil maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kengaytirish imtiyozlarini koʻrsatish mumkin, ilova qilingan modellar sarkasm aniqlashning holati holatini o'zgartirish uchun juda muhim qismi.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện mỉa mai tự động từ văn bản là một nhiệm vụ phân loại quan trọng có thể giúp nhận diện cảm xúc thực sự trong dữ liệu được tạo ra bởi người dùng, như đánh giá hoặc tweet. Mặc cho nó hữu dụng, việc phát hiện mỉa mai vẫn là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn, vì thiếu chất giọng hay cử chỉ khuôn mặt trong dữ liệu kết cấu. Đến giờ, hầu hết các phương pháp để giải quyết vấn đề đã dựa trên các tính năng tác động tay tạo, hoặc các mô hình đã được rèn luyện về những từ không định ngữ, như Word2vec. Tuy nhiên, những mô hình này thừa hưởng những giới hạn làm cho chúng không đủ khả năng khám phá mỉa mai. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất hai mô hình mạng thần kinh sâu mới để phát hiện mỉa mai, là ACE 1 và ACE 2. Dựa vào việc nhập đoạn văn bản, các mô hình sẽ dự đoán nó có mỉa mai hay không. Các mô hình của chúng tôi mở rộng kiến trúc của BERT bằng cách trộn các tính cách cảm và lặp đi. Theo những gì chúng tôi biết, đây là nỗ lực đầu tiên để thay đổi trực tiếp kiến trúc của BERT và huấn luyện nó từ đầu đến sau đó để tạo ra một người phân loại xỉa xói. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau chứng minh rằng các mẫu đề xuất vượt trội các mô hình hiện đại để dò tìm mỉa mai với một số dư lớn.', 'da': "Automatisk opdagelse af sarkasme fra tekst er en vigtig klassifikationsopgave, der kan hjælpe med at identificere den faktiske følelse i brugergenererede data, såsom anmeldelser eller tweets. På trods af dens anvendelighed, sarkasme detektering forbliver en udfordrende opgave, på grund af manglen på vokal intonation eller ansigtsbevægelser i tekstdata. Til dato har de fleste tilgange til at løse problemet baseret sig på håndlavede påvirkningsfunktioner eller forududdannede modeller af ikke-kontekstuelle ordindlejringer, såsom Word2vec. Men disse modeller arver begrænsninger, der gør dem utilstrækkelige til opgaven med sarkasme detektion. I denne artikel foreslår vi to nye dybe neurale netværksmodeller til detektion af sarkasme, nemlig ACE 1 og ACE 2. Givet som input en tekstpassage, forudsiger modellerne, om det er sarkastisk (eller ej). Vores modeller udvider BERT's arkitektur ved at indarbejde både affektive og kontekstuelle træk. Så vidt vi ved, er dette det første forsøg på direkte at ændre BERT's arkitektur og træne den fra bunden til at bygge en sarkasme klassificering. Omfattende eksperimenter på forskellige datasæt viser, at de foreslåede modeller overgår state-of-the-art modeller til sarkasme detektion med betydelige marginer.", 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje sarkazma iz teksta je važan zadatak klasifikacije koji može pomoći identificirati stvarnu osjećaj u podacima proizvedenim korisnicima, poput pregledi ili tweets. Unatoč njenoj korisnosti, otkrivanje sarkazma ostaje izazovan zadatak zbog nedostatka glasnog intonacije ili gesta lica u tekstualnim podacima. Do sada, većina pristupa rješavanju problema oslanjala se na karakteristike utjecaja na ruke napravljene ili predobučene modele neprekontekstualnih riječi, poput Word2vec. Međutim, ovi modeli naslijeđuju ograničenja koje ih čine nedovoljnim za zadatak otkrivanja sarkazma. U ovom papiru predlažemo dva novog duboka neuralna mreža modela za detekciju sarkazma, a to je ACE 1 i ACE 2. S obzirom na ulaz teksta, modeli predviđaju je li sarkastično (ili ne). Naši modeli prošire arhitekturu BERT-a uključujući i utjecajne i contextualne funkcije. Najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi pokušaj da direktno promijenimo BERT arhitekturu i treniramo ga od ogrebotine da izgradimo klasifikator sarkazma. Prošireni eksperimenti na različitim podacima pokazuju da su predloženi modeli iznosili modele stanja umjetnosti za otkrivanje sarkazma sa značajnim marginama.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното откриване на сарказъм от текст е важна задача за класификация, която може да помогне за идентифициране на действителните настроения в генерирани от потребителя данни, като рецензии или туитове. Въпреки полезността си, откриването на сарказъм остава трудна задача поради липсата на вокална интонация или лицеви жестове в текстовите данни. Към днешна дата повечето от подходите за решаване на проблема са разчитали на ръчно изработени ефекти или предварително обучени модели на неконтекстуални вграждания на думи, като например Word2vec. Въпреки това, тези модели наследяват ограничения, които ги правят неадекватни за задачата за откриване на сарказъм. В настоящата статия предлагаме два нови модела на дълбока невронна мрежа за откриване на сарказъм, а именно АСЕ 1 и АСЕ 2. Като въведен текстов пасаж, моделите предвиждат дали е саркастичен (или не). Нашите модели разширяват архитектурата на БЕРТ чрез включване както на афективни, така и на контекстни характеристики. Доколкото знаем, това е първият опит директно да променим архитектурата на BERT и да я обучим от нулата, за да изградим класификатор за сарказъм. Обширни експерименти с различни набори от данни показват, че предложените модели превъзхождат най-съвременните модели за откриване на сарказъм със значителни граници.', 'nl': "Automatische sarcasme detectie op basis van tekst is een belangrijke classificatietaak die kan helpen bij het identificeren van het werkelijke sentiment in door gebruikers gegenereerde gegevens, zoals beoordelingen of tweets. Ondanks zijn nut blijft sarcasme detectie een uitdagende taak, vanwege een gebrek aan vocale intonatie of gelaatsgebaren in tekstuele gegevens. Tot op heden zijn de meeste benaderingen om het probleem aan te pakken gebaseerd op handgemaakte affectfuncties of vooraf getrainde modellen van niet-contextuele woordinsluitingen, zoals Word2vec. Deze modellen erven echter beperkingen die ze ontoereikend maken voor de taak van sarcasme detectie. In dit artikel stellen we twee nieuwe diepe neurale netwerkmodellen voor voor sarcasme detectie, namelijk ACE 1 en ACE 2. Als invoer een tekstpassage wordt gegeven, voorspellen de modellen of deze sarcastisch is (of niet). Onze modellen breiden de architectuur van BERT uit door zowel affectieve als contextuele kenmerken op te nemen. Voor zover wij weten is dit de eerste poging om BERT's architectuur direct te veranderen en te trainen om een sarcasme classificator te bouwen. Uitgebreide experimenten met verschillende datasets tonen aan dat de voorgestelde modellen beter presteren dan state-of-the-art modellen voor sarcasme detectie met significante marges.", 'de': 'Die automatische Sarkasmus-Erkennung von Texten ist eine wichtige Klassifizierungsaufgabe, die helfen kann, die tatsächliche Stimmung in nutzergenerierten Daten wie Rezensionen oder Tweets zu identifizieren. Trotz seiner Nützlichkeit bleibt die Sarkasmus-Erkennung eine herausfordernde Aufgabe, da in Textdaten keine Stimmintonation oder Gesichtsgesten vorhanden sind. Bisher stützten sich die meisten Ansätze zur Lösung des Problems auf handgefertigte Affektfunktionen oder vortrainierte Modelle von nicht-kontextuellen Worteinbettungen wie Word2vec. Diese Modelle besitzen jedoch Einschränkungen, die sie für die Aufgabe der Sarkasmus-Erkennung unzureichend machen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir zwei neuartige Modelle für den Sarkasmus vor, nämlich ACE 1 und ACE 2. Wird als Eingabe eine Textpassage angegeben, sagen die Modelle voraus, ob sie sarkastisch ist (oder nicht). Unsere Modelle erweitern die Architektur von BERT um affektive und kontextuelle Merkmale. Nach bestem Wissen ist dies der erste Versuch, die Architektur von BERT direkt zu verändern und sie von Grund auf zu trainieren, um einen Sarkasmus-Klassifikator zu bauen. Umfangreiche Experimente an verschiedenen Datensätzen zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Modelle bei der Sarkasmus-Detektion mit signifikanten Margen die aktuellen Modelle übertreffen.', 'id': 'Deteksi sarkasme otomatis dari teks adalah tugas klasifikasi yang penting yang dapat membantu mengidentifikasi sentimen sebenarnya dalam data yang dibuat oleh pengguna, seperti ulasan atau tweet. Meskipun berguna, deteksi sarkasme tetap tugas yang menantang, karena kekurangan intonasi suara atau gerakan wajah dalam data teks. Sehingga saat ini, kebanyakan pendekatan untuk mengatasi masalah telah bergantung pada karakteristik efek yang dibuat tangan, atau model yang dilatih-dilatih dari pembenaman kata tidak-kontekstual, seperti Word2vec. Namun, model ini mewarisi batasan yang membuat mereka tidak cukup untuk tugas deteksi sarkasme. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan dua model jaringan saraf dalam novel untuk deteksi sarkasme, yaitu ACE 1 dan ACE 2. Diberikan sebagai masukan bagian teks, model memprediksi apakah itu sarkastik (atau tidak). Model kami memperluas arsitektur BERT dengan memasukkan fitur affectif dan kontekstual. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah percobaan pertama untuk langsung mengubah arsitektur BERT dan melatihnya dari nol untuk membangun klasifikasi sarkasme. Eksperimen luas pada set data yang berbeda menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan melampaui model terbaik untuk deteksi sarkasme dengan margin yang signifikan.', 'fa': 'شناسایی خودکار سارکاسم از متن یک کار جدید مهمی است که می تواند به شناسایی احساسات واقعی در داده های تولید شده از کاربر کمک کند، مانند تحقیقات یا توئیت. با وجود استفاده از آن، شناسایی سارکاسم یک کار سخت\u200cکننده باقی مانده است، به دلیل ناتوانی از هر جستجویی صدا یا چهره\u200cای در داده\u200cهای متن. تا الان، بیشتر دستیابی برای حل کردن مشکل بر ویژه\u200cهای تأثیر دست\u200cسازی یا مدل پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cای از استفاده\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای غیر متوسط، مانند Word2vec، اعتماد دارند. با این حال، این مدل ها محدودیت را وارث می کنند که آنها را برای کاری شناسایی سارکاسم کافی نمی کنند. در این کاغذ، ما دو مدل شبکه عصبی عمیق را برای شناسایی سارکاسم پیشنهاد می کنیم، یعنی ACE 1 و ACE 2. با توجه به عنوان ورود یک مسیر متن، مدل پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند که آیا سارکاستیک است یا نه. مدل\u200cهای ما معماری BERT را گسترش می\u200cدهند با توجه به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای تاثیر و موضوع. برای بهترین دانش ما، این اولین تلاش است که مستقیماً معماری BERT را تغییر دهیم و آن را از گسترش آموزش دهیم تا یک محرمانه سارکاسم بسازیم. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد مدل\u200cهای هنری برای شناسایی سارکاسم با محدوده\u200cهای مهم بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa kejeli binafsi kutoka kwenye maandishi ni kazi muhimu ya kutangaza hisia halisi katika taarifa zilizotengenezwa kwa watumiaji, kama vile maoni au twiti. Pamoja na matumizi yake, kutambua kemikali bado ni kazi yenye changamoto, kutokana na ukosefu wa uvumilivu wa sauti au matukio ya uso katika takwimu za msingi. Mpaka sasa, mbinu nyingi za kukabiliana na tatizo zimekuwa zikitegemea vipengele vya mikono vilivyo mikononi, au mifano ya vifaa vilivyojifunza vizuri vya neno lisilo la kawaida, kama vile Word2vec. Hata hivyo, mifano hii inarithi vikwazo ambavyo vinawafanya kuwa hazina kutosha kwa kazi ya kutambua kemikali. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mifano miwili ya mtandao wa kijeshi kwa ajili ya kutambua kejeli, ikiwa ni ACE 1 na ACE 2. Kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maandishi, mifano inatabiri kama ni kejeli (au la). Mifano yetu inaongezea ujenzi wa BERT kwa kuunganisha vipengele vya madhara na viwili vya kawaida. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, hii ni jaribio la kwanza la kubadilisha ujenzi wa BERT moja kwa moja na kufundisha kuanzia vizuri ili kutengeneza mchanganyiko wa kejeli. Majaribio mengi katika seti mbalimbali za taarifa zinaonyesha kuwa mifano ya mapendekezo yanatoa mifano ya hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kutambua kemikali yenye viwanja vikubwa.', 'tr': 'Test Kullanjyklygyna rağmen, sarkasm deteksiyony tekst maglumatynda gaty kynçylyk taýýarlanmasyna ýok. Şu wagt, mesele çözmek üçin esaplaryň köp görnüşi el üçin elimden gelen täsirlere ynanýar, ýada Word2vec ýaly öňünden eğitilmiş söz integrasyň modellerine ynanýar. Fakat bu modeller, sarkasm tanımının görevi için yeterli olmayan sınırları miras alar. Bu kagyzda, sarkasm deteksiyonu üçin iki roman derinlikli näyral şebeke modellerini teklip edip görýäris ACE 1 we ACE 2. Metin geçişi görkezilýän bolsa, nusgalar sarkastik bolmadygyny çaklaýar. Biziň modellerimiz BERT arhitektegi hem täsirli hem contextual özelliklerini daşartyp geçirilýär. Bilgimiziň iň gowy görä, bu ilkinji BERT arhitekteginy düzeden üýtgetmek we sarkasm klasifikatyny gurmak üçin öwrenmek synanyşdyr. Farklı veri setirlerinde döwletli deneyler, teklip eden nusgalaryň sarkasm deteksiyony üçin möhüm gabdalyk ýok taýýarlandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Outomatiese sarkasme beskrywing van teks is 'n belangrike klassifikasie taak wat kan help identifiseer die werklike sentiment in gebruiker genereerde data, soos hersiening of tweets. Terwyl sy gebruikerheid, bly sarkasme-opdekking 'n pragtige taak, vanweë 'n ontbreek van enige stemmige intonasie of aangesig gesture in tekstuele data. Op dag het die meeste van die toegange om die probleem te adres het op hand- crafted effektieffekte funksies geloof, of vooraf- gevorderde modele van nie- contextual woord inbettings, soos Word2vec. Maar hierdie modele beperk beperkinge wat hulle onvoldoende maak vir die taak van sarkasme-opkenning. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel twee novele diep neuralnetwerk modele vir sarkasme opdekking, bedoel ACE 1 en ACE 2. Gegewe as invoer 'n teks wagwoord, die modele voorskou of dit sarkasies is (of nie). Ons modele uitbrei die arkitektuur van BERT deur beide effektief en contextual funksies te inkorporeer. Tot die beste van ons kennis, is dit die eerste probeer om direk BERT se arkitektuur te verander en dit te trein van skoot om 'n sarkasme klassifiseerder te bou. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op verskillende datastelle bevestig dat die voorgestelde modele uitvoer state-of-the-art modele vir sarkasme-opdekking met betekende marge.", 'sq': 'Zbulimi automatik i sarkazmit nga teksti është një detyrë e rëndësishme klasifikimi që mund të ndihmojë identifikimin e ndjenjave reale në të dhënat e gjeneruara nga përdoruesit, të tilla si shqyrtimet apo tweetet. Megjithë dobësinë e saj, zbulimi i sarkazmit mbetet një detyrë sfiduese, për shkak të mungesës së ndonjë intonacioni zëror apo gjeste fytyrore në të dhënat tekstuale. Deri tani, shumica e qasjeve për trajtimin e problemit janë mbështetur në funksionet e ndikimit të ndërtuar me dorë apo modelet e paratrajnuara të përfshirjeve jo-kontekstuale të fjalëve, të tilla si Word2vec. Megjithatë, këto modele trashëgojnë kufizime që i bëjnë të papërshtatshëm për detyrën e zbulimit të sarkazmit. Në këtë letër, propozojmë dy modele të reja të rrjetit nervor të thellë për zbulimin e sarkazmit, veçanërisht ACE 1 dhe ACE 2. Duke u dhënë si hyrje një kalim teksti, modelet parashikojnë nëse është sarkastik (apo jo). Our models extend the architecture of BERT by incorporating both affective and contextual features.  Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, kjo është përpjekja e parë për të ndryshuar drejtpërdrejt arkitekturën e BERT-it dhe për ta trajnuar nga zero për të ndërtuar një klasifikues sarkazmi. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme demonstrojnë se modelet e propozuara mbizotërojnë modelet më të larta për zbulimin e sarkazmit me margje të rëndësishme.', 'am': 'Automatic sarcasm detection from text is an important classification task that can help identify the actual sentiment in user-generated data, such as reviews or tweets.  ምንም ጥቅም ቢሆንም፣ የፌስቡክ ድምፅ አካባቢ ወይም የፊት አካባቢ ድምፅ ማድረግ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ የጭንቀት መግለጫ፣ ብዙዎቹ ችግሮች በhand-እጁ በኩል በሚያስጨንቁበት ምርጫዎች ወይም እንደWord2vec፣ እንደተፈጸመ የግል ቃላት መግለጫ ያላቸውን ሞዴላዎች ታመነዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች ለሳርካሲ ስራ የሚያስፈልገውን ግንኙነት ይወርሳሉ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት ውስጥ የጠለቀ የኔትራዊ የጥልቅ መረብ ሞዴላዎችን ለመግለጥ እና ACE 1 እና ACE 2 እና እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ መግቢያ እንደሚያስፈልግ፣ ሞዴሎቹ (አይስካሪክ) መሆኑን ያስታውቃሉ፡፡ ሞዴሎቻችን የBERT መሠረት መሠረት እና የባሕላዊ እና የአሁኑን ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም ይዘረጋሉ፡፡ ይህ የBERT መሠረት ለመቀናቀል የመጀመሪያ ሞከረች ነው፡፡ በተለየ ዳታተሮች ላይ ብዙ ፈተናዎች የተዘጋጀው ዓይነቶች የ-የ-የ-art ዓይነቶች አካባቢ አካባቢ ማረፊያዎችን እንዲያሳዩ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': "Metindən avtomatik sarkasm keşfetməsi möhüm bir klasifikasiya görevi, istifadəçi təşkil edilmiş məlumatlarda həqiqət duyguları tanıma yardım edə bilər, məlumatlar kimi görüntülər və tweets kimi. Yaxşılıqlarına baxmayaraq, sarkasm tanıması textual məlumatlarda heç bir səs intonasyonu və üz gestiləri yoxdur. Şimdiye qədər, problemi çəkmək üçün çox təsirlərin əl yaratdığı təsirlərin və ya Word2vec kimi təhsil edilməyən təhsil olmayan sözlərin modellərinə təvəkkül edilmişdir. Ancaq bu modellər sarkasm keçməsi üçün kifayət olmayan sınırları varis edirlər. Bu kağızda, sarkasm keşfetməsi üçün iki yeni nürol ağ modeli təklif edirik ki, ACE 1 və ACE 2. Mətn keçisi olaraq, modellər sarkastik olub olmadığını tahmin edirlər. Bizim modellərimiz BERT arhitektüsünü təsirli və müxtəlif fəaliyyətlərlə birlikdə genişləyir. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşıs ına gəldikdə, bu, BERT'nin arhitektarını dəyişdirmək və sarkasm klasifikasını inşa etmək üçün ilk çalışma idi. Müxtəlif veri qurularında çox geniş eksperimentlər təklif edilmiş modellərin sarkasm tanıması üçün möhkəm dərəcələrlə müəyyən edilmiş modellərin istifadə etdiyini göstərir.", 'bn': 'টেক্সট থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিদ্রূপ সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ শ্রেণীবিভাগ কাজ যা ব্যবহারকারী তৈরি করা তথ্যের মধ্যে ব তার কার্যকলাপ সত্ত্বেও বিদ্রোহী সন্ধানের কাজ এখনো একটি চ্যালেঞ্জিক কর্মসূচী, যার ফলে কোন ভোটের প্রত্যাখ্যানের অভাব ব অথবা কৌশ এখন পর্যন্ত সমস্যা নিয়ে যাওয়ার বেশীরভাগ উপায় হাতে ক্ষমতার বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করেছে, অথবা প্রাক্তন প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল, যেমন ওয়ার্ড২ভেক। তবে এই মডেলগুলো সীমাবদ্ধতার উত্তরাধিকার করছে যা তাদের বিদ্রোহের কাজের জন্য যথেষ্ট নয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা দুই নভেলের গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি বিদ্রোহ সনাক্ত করার জন্য, যেমন ACE 1 এবং ACE 2। টেক্সট পাসেজ হিসেবে প্রদান করা হয়, মডেলগুলো ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে এটি বিদ্রোহীত (বা না)। আমাদের মডেল বিবেরেটের স্থাপত্য বিস্তৃতি বিস্তৃত করে প্রভাবিত এবং প্রাক্তন বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে যোগ দিয়ে। আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোর জন্য, এটাই প্রথম প্রচেষ্টা বিবের্টের স্থাপত্য পরিবর্তন করার প্রচেষ্টা এবং এটাকে ক্লাচ থেকে প্রশিক্ষণ করে ব বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটের বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বিদ্রূপের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে বিদ্রোহীদের পরিচালনার জন', 'hy': "Տեքստից ավտոմատիկ սարկազմի հայտնաբերումը կարևոր դասակարգման առաջադրանք է, որը կարող է օգնել հայտնաբերել օգտագործողի կողմից ստեղծված տվյալների իրական զգացմունքը, ինչպիսիք են վերլուծությունները կամ թվիթերը: Չնայած դրանց օգտակարությանը, սարկազմի հայտնաբերումը դեռևս դժվար խնդիր է, քանի որ ոչ մի ձայնային ներկում կամ դեմքի շարժումներ չկան տեքստային տվյալներում: Այսօր խնդրի լուծման մոտեցումների մեծ մասը հիմնված է ձեռագործ ազդեցության առանձնահատկությունների վրա կամ ոչ կոնտեքստալ բառերի ներդրման նախապատրաստված մոդելների վրա, ինչպիսիք են Word2veքը: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելները ժառանգում են սահմանափակումներ, որոնք դարձնում են դրանք անբավարար սարկազմի հայտնաբերման խնդրի համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու նոր խորը նյարդային ցանցի մոդել սարկազմի հայտնաբերման համար, հատկապես ACE 1 և ACE 2: Տեքստային հատվածի ներմուծման համար մոդելները կանխատեսում են, արդյոք սարկաստական է (թե ոչ): Մեր մոդելները ընդլայնում են BERT-ի ճարտարապետությունը՝ ներառելով սիրտը և կոնտեքստոնալ հատկությունները: To the best of our knowledge, this is the first attempt to directly alter BERT's architecture and train it from scratch to build a sarcasm classifier.  Տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի ընդլայնված փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մոդելները գերազանցում են սարկազմի հայտնաբերման ամենահետաքրքիր մոդելներին նշանակալի մակարդակներով:", 'cs': 'Automatická detekce sarkasmu z textu je důležitým úkolem klasifikace, který může pomoci identifikovat skutečné sentimenty v uživatelsky generovaných datech, jako jsou recenze nebo tweety. Navzdory své užitečnosti zůstává detekce sarkasmu náročným úkolem, vzhledem k nedostatku vokální intonace nebo gest obličeje v textových datech. Dosud se většina přístupů k řešení problému spoléhala na ručně vytvořené funkce efektů nebo předem trénované modely nekontextuálních vložení slov, jako je Word2vec. Tyto modely však zdědí omezení, která je činí nevhodnými pro úkol detekce sarkasmu. V tomto článku navrhujeme dva nové modely hluboké neuronové sítě pro detekci sarkasmu, a to ACE 1 a ACE 2. Při vstupu textové pasáže modely předpovídají, zda je sarkastická (či nikoliv). Naše modely rozšiřují architekturu BERT o efektivní i kontextové prvky. Podle našeho nejlepšího vědomí je to první pokus přímo změnit architekturu BERT a trénovat ji od začátku k vytvoření klasifikátoru sarkasmu. Rozsáhlé experimenty na různých datových sadách ukazují, že navrhované modely překonávají moderní modely pro detekci sarkasmu s významnými okraji.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje automatskog sarkazma iz teksta je važan zadatak klasifikacije koji može pomoći da identificira stvarnu osjećaj u podacima proizvedenim korisnicima, poput pregleda ili tweeta. Unatoč njenoj korisnosti, detekcija sarkazma ostaje izazovan zadatak, zbog nedostatka glasnog intonacije ili gesta lica u tekstualnim podacima. Do sada, većina pristupa rješavanju problema se oslanjala na karakteristike utjecaja koji su napravljeni na ruke, ili na predobučene modele neprekontekstualnih reči, poput Word2vec. Međutim, ovi modeli naslijeđuju ograničenja koje ih čine nedovoljnim za zadatak otkrivanja sarkazma. U ovom papiru predlažemo dva novog duboka neuralna mreža modela za detekciju sarkazma, a to je ACE 1 i ACE 2. S obzirom na ulaz teksta, modeli predviđaju je li sarkastično (ili ne). Naši modeli prošire arhitekturu BERT-a uključujući i utjecajne i contextualne karakteristike. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi pokušaj da direktno promijenimo BERT arhitekturu i treniramo ga od ogrebotine da izgradimo klasifikator sarkazma. Eksperimenti na različitim podacima pokazuju da predloženi modeli iznosi stanje umjetnosti modele za otkrivanje sarkazma sa značajnim marginama.', 'et': 'Automaatne sarkasmi tuvastamine tekstist on oluline klassifitseerimis羹lesanne, mis aitab tuvastada kasutaja loodud andmete, n瓣iteks 羹levaatete v繭i s瓣utsude tegelikku tunnetust. Vaatamata oma kasulikkusele on sarkasmi avastamine j瓣tkuvalt keeruline 羹lesanne, kuna tekstiandmetes puuduvad h瓣瓣ltentonatsioonid v繭i n瓣o鱉estid. Praeguseks on enamik probleemi lahendamise l瓣henemisviise tuginenud k瓣sitsi loodud m繭jufunktsioonidele v繭i kontekstivastaste s繭nade manustamise eelnevalt v瓣lja繭petatud mudelitele, n瓣iteks Word2vec. Need mudelid p瓣rivad siiski piiranguid, mis muudavad need sarkasmi tuvastamiseks ebapiisavaks. K瓣esolevas t繹繹s pakume v瓣lja kaks uut s羹gava n瓣rviv繭rgu mudelit sarkasmi tuvastamiseks, nimelt ACE 1 ja ACE 2. Arvestades sisendina tekstil繭iku, prognoosivad mudelid, kas see on sarkastiline (v繭i mitte). Meie mudelid laiendavad BERTi arhitektuuri, sisaldades nii afektiivseid kui kontekstilisi omadusi. Meie teadmiste kohaselt on see esimene katse BERTi arhitektuuri otseselt muuta ja seda nullist harjutada sarkasmi klassifitseerija ehitamiseks. Ulatuslikud katsed erinevate andmekogumitega n瓣itavad, et kavandatud mudelid on sarkasmi tuvastamiseks oluliste marginaalidega paremad kui kaasaegsed mudelid.', 'ko': '텍스트에서 풍자를 자동으로 감지하는 것은 중요한 분류 작업으로 사용자가 생성한 데이터(예를 들어 평론이나 추문)의 실제 정서를 식별하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.비록 풍자 검출은 매우 유용하지만, 텍스트 데이터에 어떠한 성조나 얼굴 제스처도 부족하기 때문에, 그것은 여전히 도전적인 임무이다.지금까지 이 문제를 해결하는 대부분의 방법은 수공으로 만든 감정 특징에 의존하거나 미리 훈련된 비상문 단어 삽입 모델, 예를 들어Word2vec에 의존했다.그러나 이 모델들은 일부 한계를 계승하여 풍자 검측의 임무를 완수하기에 부족하다.본고에서 우리는 풍자 검출에 사용되는 심층 신경 네트워크 모델인 ACE 1과 ACE 2 두 가지를 제시했다.한 단락의 텍스트를 입력으로 하면 모델은 그것이 풍자적 의미를 가지고 있는지 예측할 수 있다.우리의 모델은 감정과 상하문 특징을 결합시켜 BERT의 체계 구조를 확장시켰다.버트의 구조를 직접 바꾸고 풍자 분류기를 구축하기 위한 훈련을 처음부터 시작한 것은 이번이 처음인 것으로 알려졌다.서로 다른 데이터 집합에서의 대량의 실험은 제시된 모델이 풍자 검측 방면에서 가장 선진적인 모델보다 우수하고 현저한 우위를 가진다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fi': 'Automaattinen sarkasmin tunnistus tekstistä on tärkeä luokittelutehtävä, joka voi auttaa tunnistamaan todellisen tunteen käyttäjien luomista tiedoista, kuten arvosteluista tai tweeteistä. Hyödyllisyydestään huolimatta sarkasmin havaitseminen on edelleen haastava tehtävä, koska tekstiaineistossa ei ole ääniintonaatiota tai kasvojen eleitä. Tähän mennessä useimmat lähestymistavat ongelman ratkaisemiseen ovat perustuneet käsintehtyihin efektiominaisuuksiin tai ennalta koulutettuihin malleihin, jotka eivät liity kontekstiin, kuten Word2vec. Nämä mallit kuitenkin perivät rajoituksia, jotka tekevät niistä riittämättömiä sarkasmin havaitsemiseen. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kahta uutta syvähermoverkkomallia sarkasmin havaitsemiseen, ACE 1 ja ACE 2. Kun syötteenä on tekstipätkä, mallit ennustavat, onko se sarkastinen (vai ei). Mallimme laajentavat BERT:n arkkitehtuuria yhdistämällä sekä affektiivisiä että kontekstuaalisia ominaisuuksia. Tietojemme mukaan tämä on ensimmäinen yritys muuttaa suoraan BERTin arkkitehtuuria ja kouluttaa sitä tyhjästä sarkasmin luokittelijan rakentamiseksi. Laajat kokeet eri aineistoilla osoittavat, että ehdotetut mallit ylittävät sarkasmin havaitsemisen huipputason mallit merkittävillä marginaaleilla.', 'ca': "La detecció automàtica del sarcasme a partir del text és una tasca de classificació important que pot ajudar a identificar el sentiment real en les dades generades per l'usuari, com revisions o tweets. Malgrat la seva utilitat, la detecció del sarcasme encara és una tasca difícil, degut a la falta d'intonació vocal o de gestos facials en les dades textuals. Fins ara, la majoria dels enfocaments per abordar el problema s'han basat en característiques d'afecte artificials o models pré-entrenats d'incorporació de paraules no contextuals, com Word2vec. No obstant això, aquests models hereten limitacions que els fan inadequats per a la tasca de detecció del sarcasme. En aquest article, proposem dos noves models de xarxa neuronal profunda per a la detecció del sarcasme, a saber ACE 1 i ACE 2. Given as input a text passage, the models predict whether it is sarcastic (or not).  Our models extend the architecture of BERT by incorporating both affective and contextual features.  To the best of our knowledge, this is the first attempt to directly alter BERT's architecture and train it from scratch to build a sarcasm classifier.  Els extensos experiments en diversos conjunts de dades demostren que els models proposats superen els models més avançats per a la detecció del sarcasme amb marxes significatius.", 'ha': "Automatic sarcasm detection from text is an important classification task that can help identify the actual sentiment in user-generated data, such as reviews or tweets.  Babu da amfani da shi, sai ganin sarki yana da wani aikin mai zartar da shi, sabo da kuma bãbu ƙaranci ga wata na'ura ko musamma cikin data na musamman. Ga yanzu, mafi yawansu masu shiryarwa ga matalauta sun ƙayyade masu hushi da hannayen hannayen hannuwansu, ko misãlai masu yin amfani da zaman tsari wa masu cikin maganar da ba'a haɗa shi ba, kamar word2vc. A lokacin da, waɗannan misalin sun gãji grensa da za ta bã da daidai ga aikin na gane sarki. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata misãlai biyu na nowaya mai ƙaranci ga ganin sarkasm, kamar ACE 1 da ACE 2. Gida aka shigar da wata takafiya matsayi, motsalan za'a yi amfani da shi a kan sarcasti (ko kuma ba). Modalilinmu na shimfiɗa matsayin BERT da za'a haɗa duk masu hushi da masu hushi. Ga mafi kyaun sanyinmu, wannan ne jarrabi na farkon ya musanya matsayin BERT ko kuma ya sanar da shi daga taɓe zuwa ya sami wani sarkasmi. Citiɗi masu shimfiɗaɗãwa kan tsarin database guda sun nuna cewa misãlai da aka buƙata zaɓa-mazaɓa wa-halin-sanar wa zane-gane sarki mai girma.", 'he': 'גילוי סרקזם אוטומטי מהטקסט הוא משימה קליфікаציה חשובה שיכולה לעזור לזהות את ההרגשה האמיתית במידע שנוצר מהמשתמש, כמו ביקורות או טוויטים. למרות שימושיתו, זיהוי הסרקזם נשאר משימה מאתגרת, בגלל חוסר כל תוקף קולי או מחוות פנים במידע טקסטלי. עד היום, רוב הגישויים להתמודד עם הבעיה הסמכו על תכונות השפעה בידיים, או מודלים מאומנים מראש של מילים לא קונטקסטיים, כמו Word2vec. בכל אופן, הדוגמנים האלה יורשות מגבלות שגורמות להם לא מתאימים למשימה של זיהוי סרקזם. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שני דוגמנים חדשים לרשת עצבית עמוקה לזהות סרקזם, כלומר ACE 1 ו ACE 2. בהתחשב בתכנית מעבר טקסט, הדוגמנים חושפים אם זה סרקסטי (או לא). הדוגמנים שלנו מרחיקים את הארכיטקטורה של BERT על ידי הכילוי גם תכונות חיוביות וקונטקטיות. למיטב הידע שלנו, זו הניסיון הראשון לשנות ישירות את הארכיטקטורה של BERT ולאימון אותו מאפס לבנות קלאסיפור סרקזם. ניסויים רחבים על קבוצות נתונים שונות מראים שהמודלים המוצעים יוצאים מעל מודלים חדשים לגילוי סרקזם עם שווים משמעותיים.', 'jv': 'section Nanging kabeh nyatakakno, dadi sarkasm dumadhi kapan nggak buwis nggak bener, kaya mbok saiki or a ono sesilno dadi textual. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, model iki dadi ono limitisan sing ditambah akeh apakno kanggo nggawe sarkasm detection apakno. Nanging kuwi iki, kita mbukakipo model sing apik nyebute nggo kuwi sarkasm detection, nambah: AE 1 lan AE 2. text-box-mode model kita ngubah architecture of BERT dumadhi iki dadi bagian affect and contextual parameters. Awakdhéwé ning awak dhéwé, iki wis ngubah perusahaan tanggal nggawe architecture BERT karo nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng pisan sarkasm. OU = VeriSign Trust Network', 'sk': 'Samodejno zaznavanje sarkazma iz besedila je pomembno opravilo klasifikacije, ki lahko pomaga prepoznati dejansko občutke v uporabniških podatkih, kot so pregledi ali tweeti. Odkrivanje sarkazma kljub svoji uporabnosti ostaja zahtevna naloga zaradi pomanjkanja glasovne intonacije ali obraznih gest v besedilnih podatkih. Do danes se je večina pristopov k reševanju problema opirala na ročno izdelane funkcije učinka ali vnaprej usposobljene modele vgradnje besed, ki niso kontekstualne, kot je Word2vec. Vendar pa ti modeli podedujejo omejitve, zaradi katerih niso primerni za nalogo odkrivanja sarkazma. V prispevku predlagamo dva nova modela globokega živčnega omrežja za odkrivanje sarkazma, in sicer ACE 1 in ACE 2. Modeli predvidevajo, ali je sarkastičen (ali ne). Naši modeli razširijo arhitekturo BERT z vključevanjem afektivnih in kontekstualnih značilnosti. Kolikor vemo, je to prvi poskus neposredne spremembe arhitekture BERT in usposabljanja iz nič za izgradnjo sarkazmskega klasifikatorja. Obsežni eksperimenti na različnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da predlagani modeli s pomembnimi robovi presegajo najsodobnejše modele za odkrivanje sarkazma.', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱི་sarcasm detection from text is an important classification task that can help identify the actual sentiment in user-generated data, such as reviews or tweets. ལག་ལེན་པ་དེ་ཡིན་ནའང་སྒོ་འབྱེད་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི། བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐད་ཚོར་ཞིང་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ ད་ལྟ་མིན་ན་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་གམ། ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚོགས་དང་ ACE 1 ve ACE 2་ཆོག་ཉུང་བའི་དཔེ་གཞི་གཉིས་སྤྲོད་ད འོད་ཀྱིས་ཡི་གེའི་བརྒྱུད་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་མིང་དཔེ་གཏོང་དགོས་མིན་ཅིག་ཡིན་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་མི་དབྱིབས་གཞུང་གིས་BERT ཡི་བཟོ་བཀོད་པ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཆེད་དུ་འཕགས་པ་ཤེས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ནི། འདི་ནི་སྔོན་གྱི་དཔའ་བཅད་ནི་BERT ཡི་བཟོ་བཀོད་དང་། སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ལག་ལེན་འཚོལ་བ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས'}
{'en': 'Understanding Pre-trained BERT for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'فهم BERT المدربة مسبقًا لتحليل المشاعر القائم على الجانب', 'pt': 'Entendendo o BERT pré-treinado para análise de sentimento baseada em aspectos', 'fr': "Comprendre le BERT pré-formé pour l'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects", 'es': 'Comprensión de BERT preentrenado para el análisis de sentimientos basado en aspectos', 'ja': 'アスペクトベースの感情分析のための事前トレーニング済みBERTの理解', 'zh': '知所以为者,知所以为 BERT', 'hi': 'पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BERT को समझना', 'ru': 'Понимание предварительно обученного BERT для анализа настроений на основе аспектов', 'ga': 'Tuiscint a fháil ar BERT Réamh-oilte le haghaidh Anailíse Mothúcháin Bunaithe ar Ghné', 'ka': 'ამოცექტური განსაზღვრებული BERT-ის განსაზღვრება სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Előre képzett BERT megértése aspektus-alapú érzelmek elemzéséhez', 'el': 'Κατανόηση του προ-εκπαιδευμένου BERT για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση τις πτυχές', 'it': "Comprendere BERT pre-addestrato per l'analisi dei sentimenti basata sugli aspetti", 'mk': 'Разбирање на предобучениот BERT за анализа на чувства базирана на аспекти', 'ms': 'Memahami BERT Latihan-Pra untuk Analisi Sentimen Berasas Aspek', 'kk': 'Аспекттің негіздеген Sentiment анализиясы', 'lt': 'Supranti iš anksto apmokytą jautrumo analizės BERT aspektais analizei', 'ml': 'ആസ്പെക്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം', 'mt': 'Il-fehim ta’ BERT imħarreġ minn qabel għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment ibbażata fuq l-Aspett', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын БЕРТ-г ойлгохын тулд', 'no': 'Forståking føreøvinga BERT for føreøvingsanalyser på aspektbasert', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie wstępnie przeszkolonego BERT do analizy sentymentów opartej na aspektach', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea BERT pre-instruit pentru analiza sentimentelor bazată pe aspecte', 'sr': 'Razumevanje predobučenog BERT za analizu sentimenta na aspektu', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ BERT සඳහා තේරුම්ගන්න', 'ta': 'Understanding Pre-trained BERT for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'so': 'Waxgarashada BERT-ka horeysa lagu baray', 'sv': 'Förstå Förutbildad BERT för aspektbaserad känselanalys', 'ur': 'آسپٹ بنیادی سنٹیمنٹ تحلیل کے لئے پیش آموزش کی BERT کو سمجھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hiểu thiếu sót sót sót trước khi phân tích.', 'bg': 'Разбиране на предварително обучен BERT за анализ на сентимента въз основа на аспекти', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje predobučenog BERT za analizu osjetljivosti na aspektu', 'da': 'Forståelse af forududdannet BERT til aspektbaseret følelsesanalyse', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide BERT voor aspect-based sentiment analyse begrijpen', 'de': 'Vortrainiertes BERT für aspektbasierte Stimmungsanalyse verstehen', 'fa': 'درک BERT پیش آموزش برای تحلیل احساسات بر اساس نظر', 'ko': '예훈련의 기초적인 정서 분석을 이해하다', 'id': 'Mengerti BERT terlatih-terlatih untuk Analisi Sentimen Berdasarkan Aspek', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i BERT-it të stërvitur për Analizën e Sentimenteve bazuar në aspekte', 'sw': 'Kuelewa BERT kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa Seneti anayeishi Aspect', 'tr': 'Aspekt tabanly Sentiment Taýramçylygy üçin öňünden eğlenen BERT düşünmek', 'af': 'Verstaan vooraf onderwerp BERT vir Aspekte-gebaseerde Sentiment Analyseer', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'bn': 'ভিত্তিক সেন্টেমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত BERT বুঝতে পারে', 'az': 'Aspect-based Sentiment Analizi üçün öyrənmiş BERT anlama', 'hy': 'Արժեքներով հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության նախապատրաստված BER-ի հասկանալը', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje predobučenog BERT za analizu osjetljivosti na aspektu', 'ca': "Entendre BERT pré-entrenat per a l'anàlisi de sentiments basat en aspectes", 'cs': 'Porozumění předškolenému BERT pro aspektovou analýzu sentimentů', 'et': 'Eelnevalt koolitatud BERT aspektipõhise tunnete analüüsi jaoks', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetun BERT:n ymmärtäminen aspektipohjaiseen tunneanalyysiin', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'STANDARED BERT kanggo Aspect-basa Sentiment Test', 'he': 'להבין BERT מאומן מראש לניתוח רגשות מבוסס באפקטים', 'sk': 'Razumevanje predhodno usposobljenega BERT za analizo čustva na podlagi vidikov', 'bo': 'Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'This paper analyzes the pre-trained hidden representations learned from reviews on BERT for tasks in aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). Our work is motivated by the recent progress in BERT-based language models for ABSA. However, it is not clear how the general proxy task of (masked) language model trained on unlabeled corpus without annotations of aspects or opinions can provide important features for downstream tasks in ABSA. By leveraging the annotated datasets in ABSA, we investigate both the attentions and the learned representations of BERT pre-trained on reviews. We found that BERT uses very few self-attention heads to encode context words (such as prepositions or pronouns that indicating an aspect) and opinion words for an aspect. Most features in the representation of an aspect are dedicated to the fine-grained semantics of the domain (or product category) and the aspect itself, instead of carrying summarized opinions from its context. We hope this investigation can help future research in improving self-supervised learning, unsupervised learning and fine-tuning for ABSA. The pre-trained model and code can be found at https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ar': 'تحلل هذه الورقة التمثيلات الخفية المدربة مسبقًا المستفادة من المراجعات على BERT للمهام في تحليل المشاعر القائمة على الجانب (ABSA). يحفز عملنا التقدم الأخير في نماذج اللغة القائمة على BERT لـ ABSA. ومع ذلك ، ليس من الواضح كيف يمكن لمهمة الوكيل العامة لنموذج اللغة (المقنع) المدربة على مجموعة غير مصنفة بدون تعليقات توضيحية للجوانب أو الآراء أن توفر ميزات مهمة للمهام النهائية في ABSA. من خلال الاستفادة من مجموعات البيانات المشروحة في ABSA ، فإننا نحقق في كل من الانتباه والتمثيلات المكتسبة من BERT المدربة مسبقًا على المراجعات. وجدنا أن BERT يستخدم عددًا قليلاً جدًا من رؤوس الانتباه الذاتي لتشفير كلمات السياق (مثل حروف الجر أو الضمائر التي تشير إلى جانب) وكلمات الرأي لأحد الجوانب. يتم تخصيص معظم الميزات في تمثيل الجانب للدلالات الدقيقة للمجال (أو فئة المنتج) والجانب نفسه ، بدلاً من نقل آراء ملخصة من سياقها. نأمل أن يساعد هذا التحقيق البحث المستقبلي في تحسين التعلم تحت الإشراف الذاتي والتعلم غير الخاضع للإشراف والضبط الدقيق لـ ABSA. يمكن العثور على النموذج والكود المدربين مسبقًا على https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'pt': 'Este artigo analisa as representações ocultas pré-treinadas aprendidas de revisões no BERT para tarefas em análise de sentimento baseada em aspectos (ABSA). Nosso trabalho é motivado pelo recente progresso em modelos de linguagem baseados em BERT para ABSA. No entanto, não está claro como a tarefa geral de proxy do modelo de linguagem (mascarado) treinado em corpus não rotulado sem anotações de aspectos ou opiniões pode fornecer recursos importantes para tarefas downstream no ABSA. Ao alavancar os conjuntos de dados anotados no ABSA, investigamos tanto as atenções quanto as representações aprendidas do BERT pré-treinadas em revisões. Descobrimos que o BERT usa muito poucas cabeças de autoatenção para codificar palavras de contexto (como preposições ou pronomes que indicam um aspecto) e palavras de opinião para um aspecto. A maioria dos recursos na representação de um aspecto é dedicada à semântica refinada do domínio (ou categoria de produto) e do aspecto em si, em vez de carregar opiniões resumidas de seu contexto. Esperamos que esta investigação possa ajudar pesquisas futuras para melhorar o aprendizado autossupervisionado, o aprendizado não supervisionado e o ajuste fino do ABSA. O modelo e o código pré-treinados podem ser encontrados em https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'es': 'Este artículo analiza las representaciones ocultas previamente entrenadas aprendidas de las revisiones en BERT para tareas en el análisis de sentimientos basado en aspectos (ABSA). Nuestro trabajo está motivado por el progreso reciente en los modelos lingüísticos basados en BERT para ABSA. Sin embargo, no está claro cómo la tarea de proxy general del modelo de lenguaje (enmascarado) entrenado en corpus sin etiquetas sin anotaciones de aspectos u opiniones puede proporcionar características importantes para las tareas posteriores en ABSA. Al aprovechar los conjuntos de datos anotados en ABSA, investigamos tanto las atenciones como las representaciones aprendidas de BERT previamente entrenado en revisiones. Descubrimos que BERT utiliza muy pocas cabezas de autoatención para codificar palabras de contexto (como preposiciones o pronombres que indican un aspecto) y palabras de opinión para un aspecto. La mayoría de las funciones en la representación de un aspecto están dedicadas a la semántica detallada del dominio (o categoría de producto) y el aspecto en sí, en lugar de llevar opiniones resumidas de su contexto. Esperamos que esta investigación pueda ayudar a futuras investigaciones para mejorar el aprendizaje autosupervisado, el aprendizaje no supervisado y el ajuste para ABSA. El modelo y el código previamente entrenados se pueden encontrar en https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'fr': "Cet article analyse les représentations cachées pré-entraînées apprises à partir de revues sur BERT pour des tâches dans l'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects (ABSA). Notre travail est motivé par les récents progrès réalisés dans les modèles linguistiques basés sur BERT pour ABSA. Cependant, il n'est pas clair comment la tâche mandataire générale d'un modèle de langage (masqué) formé sur un corpus non étiqueté sans annotations d'aspects ou d'opinions peut fournir des caractéristiques importantes pour les tâches en aval dans ABSA. En exploitant les ensembles de données annotés dans ABSA, nous étudions à la fois les attentions et les représentations apprises du BERT pré-formé sur les revues. Nous avons constaté que BERT utilise très peu de têtes d'attention personnelle pour coder des mots contextuels (tels que des prépositions ou des pronoms indiquant un aspect) et des mots d'opinion pour un aspect. La plupart des fonctionnalités de la représentation d'un aspect sont consacrées à la sémantique fine du domaine (ou de la catégorie de produit) et de l'aspect lui-même, au lieu de présenter des opinions résumées à partir de son contexte. Nous espérons que cette étude pourra aider les recherches futures visant à améliorer l'apprentissage auto-supervisé, l'apprentissage non supervisé et le réglage fin de l'ABSA. Le modèle et le code pré-entraînés peuvent être consultés à l'adresse https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'ja': '本論文では、アスペクトベース感情分析（ ABSA ）のタスクについて、BERTに関するレビューから学んだ事前訓練された隠れた表現を分析する。 私たちの仕事は、ABSAのBERTベースの言語モデルの最近の進歩に動機づけられています。 しかしながら、アスペクトまたは意見の注釈なしに、未標識コーパスでトレーニングされた（マスクされた）言語モデルの一般的なプロキシタスクが、ABSAのダウンストリームタスクに重要な機能を提供することができるかどうかは明らかではない。 ABSAの注釈付きデータセットを活用することで、レビューで事前にトレーニングを受けたBERTの注意と学習した表現の両方を調査します。 私たちは、BERTがコンテキスト単語（ある側面を示す前置詞や代名詞など）とある側面の意見単語をエンコードするために、自己注目ヘッドをごくわずかに使用していることを発見しました。 ある側面の表現におけるほとんどの機能は、そのコンテキストから要約された意見を伝える代わりに、ドメイン（または製品カテゴリ）の細かいセマンティクスとその側面自体に特化されています。 今回の調査は、ABSAの自主監督型学習、無監督型学習、微調整を改善するための今後の研究に役立つことを願っています。 事前にトレーニングを受けたモデルとコードは、https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSAにあります。', 'zh': '本文析情析(ABSA)BERT论学豫藏。 吾事ABSA于BERT言之最新进展也。 然未详于未然之意见注释,习于未言之语料库(屏蔽)言形之任,供ABSA之下流。 因ABSA中带注数集,臣等考其先BERT注意习得。 臣等见BERT希用自注之端编码上下文单词(如介词代词)、某意见词。 大抵专用于域(产品类别)与细粒度语义,不从其上下文携摘要议也。 愿此勘可助来者讲改善ABSA者自督学,无督学微调。 可于 https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA 得豫训模代码。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण (ABSA) में कार्यों के लिए BERT पर समीक्षाओं से सीखे गए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित छिपे हुए अभ्यावेदन का विश्लेषण करता है। हमारा काम ABSA के लिए BERT-आधारित भाषा मॉडल में हाल ही में हुई प्रगति से प्रेरित है। हालांकि, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि पहलुओं या राय के एनोटेशन के बिना अनलेबल कॉर्पस पर प्रशिक्षित (नकाबपोश) भाषा मॉडल का सामान्य प्रॉक्सी कार्य एबीएसए में डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए महत्वपूर्ण विशेषताएं प्रदान कर सकता है। ABSA में एनोटेट किए गए डेटासेट का लाभ उठाकर, हम समीक्षाओं पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BERT के ध्यान और सीखे गए अभ्यावेदन दोनों की जांच करते हैं। हमने पाया कि BERT संदर्भ शब्दों को एन्कोड करने के लिए बहुत कम आत्म-ध्यान प्रमुखों का उपयोग करता है (जैसे कि prepositions या सर्वनाम जो एक पहलू का संकेत देते हैं) और एक पहलू के लिए राय शब्द। एक पहलू के प्रतिनिधित्व में अधिकांश विशेषताएं डोमेन (या उत्पाद श्रेणी) के ठीक-ठीक शब्दार्थ और पहलू के लिए समर्पित हैं, बजाय इसके संदर्भ से संक्षेप में राय ले जाने के। हमें उम्मीद है कि यह जांच एबीएसए के लिए स्व-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने, असुरक्षित सीखने और ठीक-ट्यूनिंग में सुधार करने में भविष्य के शोध में मदद कर सकती है। पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल और कोड https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA पर पाया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье анализируются предварительно подготовленные скрытые представления, извлеченные из обзоров по BERT для задач в анализе настроений на основе аспектов (ABSA). Наша работа мотивирована недавним прогрессом в языковых моделях на основе BERT для ABSA. Тем не менее, неясно, как общая задача прокси (маскированной) языковой модели, обученной на немеченом корпусе без аннотаций аспектов или мнений, может обеспечить важные функции для последующих задач в ABSA. Используя аннотированные наборы данных в ABSA, мы исследуем как внимание, так и усвоенные представления BERT, предварительно обученные по отзывам. Мы обнаружили, что БЕРТ использует очень мало голов самовнимания для кодирования контекстных слов (таких как предлоги или местоимения, указывающие на аспект) и слов мнения для аспекта. Большинство функций в представлении аспекта посвящены мелкозернистой семантике домена (или категории продукта) и самому аспекту, вместо того, чтобы выносить обобщенные мнения из его контекста. Мы надеемся, что это исследование может помочь будущим исследованиям в улучшении самостоятельного обучения, неконтролируемого обучения и тонкой настройки для ABSA. Предварительно обученную модель и код можно найти по ссылке https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo anailís ar na huiríll folaithe réamhoilte a foghlaimíodh ó athbhreithnithe ar CRET do thascanna in anailís aireachtála bunaithe ar ghnéithe (ABSA). Tá ár gcuid oibre spreagtha ag an dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí ar mhúnlaí teanga bunaithe ar BERT do ABSA. Níl sé soiléir, áfach, conas is féidir leis an tseachfhreastalaí ginearálta de mhúnla teanga (maslach) atá oilte ar chorpas gan lipéad gan nótaí gnéithe nó tuairimí gnéithe tábhachtacha a sholáthar do thascanna iartheachtacha in ABSA. Trí ghiaráil a dhéanamh ar na tacair shonraí anótáilte in ABSA, déanaimid imscrúdú ar aird agus ar uiríll foghlamtha BERT réamhoilte ar athbhreithnithe. Fuaireamar amach gur fíorbheagán cloigeann féinairde a úsáideann BET chun focail chomhthéacs a ionchódú (amhail réamhfhocail nó forainmneacha a chuireann gné in iúl) agus focail thuairime le haghaidh gné. Tá formhór na ngnéithe i léiriú gné tiomnaithe do shéimeantaic mhíneálta an fhearainn (nó an chatagóir táirge) agus an ghné féin, in ionad tuairimí achoimre a iompar óna chomhthéacs. Tá súil againn go gcuideoidh an t-imscrúdú seo le taighde amach anseo maidir le feabhas a chur ar fhoghlaim fhéin-mhaoirsithe, ar fhoghlaim gan mhaoirseacht agus ar mhionchoigeartú do ABSA. Is féidir an tsamhail agus an cód réamhoilte a fháil ag https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის ანალიზაცია წინასწარმოადგენებული დახმარებული რესპეცენტაციები, რომლებიც BERT-ის რესუმენტაციებიდან აღმოჩენა აპექტიმენტის ანალიზაციაში ჩვენი სამუშაო მოტივირებულია ბერტიკური ენის მოდელების ბერტიკური პროგრესიდან ABSA-ს. მაგრამ არ არის წარმოიდგინე, როგორ (მაქსირებული) ენის მოდელის საერთო პროქსი დავალება, როგორ აპექტირების ანოტაციების ანოტაციების შესაძლებლობად ABSA-ში გასაკეთებელი მოქმედებისთვის გასანი ABSA-ში ანოტირებული მონაცემების კონტაქტების გამოყენებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ორივე მონაცემები და მონაცემული გამოყენებების BERT-ს წინ განსხვავებული განსხვავებაში. ჩვენ მივიღეთ, რომ BERT გამოყენებს ძალიან რამდენიმე თავიდარჩენებული თავიდარჩენებული თავიდარჩენებული თავიდარჩენებული სიტყვები კონტექსტური სიტყვებისთვის (როგორც prepositions ან გამ აპექტის უფრო დიომენტის (ან პროექტის კატეგორია) განსაზღვრებაში უფრო დიომენტიკური სენმანტიკებისთვის განსაზღვრებულია და სენაპექტიკური აპექტიკური განსაზღვრებულებების მც ჩვენ იმედით, რომ ეს შესწავლობა შეუძლია მომავალეთ შესწავლობას შესაძლებელია მომავალეთ შესწავლობაში საუკეთესებელი სწავლობაში, საუკეთესებელი სწავლობა წინ შესწავლილი მოდელი და კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αναλύει τις προ-εκπαιδευμένες κρυφές αναπαραστάσεις που έμαθαν από τις αναθεωρήσεις για τις εργασίες στην ανάλυση συναισθημάτων βάσει πτυχών (ABSA). Το έργο μας υποκινείται από την πρόσφατη πρόοδο στα γλωσσικά μοντέλα που βασίζονται στο BERT για την ABSA. Ωστόσο, δεν είναι σαφές πώς το γενικό καθήκον πληρεξούσιου του (συγκαλυμμένου) γλωσσικού μοντέλου εκπαιδευμένου σε σώμα χωρίς επισήμανση χωρίς σχόλια πτυχών ή γνωμοδοτήσεων μπορεί να παρέχει σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες στην ABSA. Αξιοποιώντας τα σχολιασμένα σύνολα δεδομένων στην ABSA, ερευνούμε τόσο την προσοχή όσο και τις διδαγμένες αναπαραστάσεις του BERT προεκπαίδευσης σε αξιολογήσεις. Διαπιστώσαμε ότι ο BERT χρησιμοποιεί πολύ λίγες κεφαλές αυτοπροσοχής για να κωδικοποιήσει λέξεις περιβάλλοντος (όπως προθέσεις ή αντωνυμίες που υποδηλώνουν μια πτυχή) και λέξεις γνώμης για μια πτυχή. Τα περισσότερα χαρακτηριστικά στην αναπαράσταση μιας πτυχής είναι αφιερωμένα στη λεπτή σημασιολογία του τομέα (ή της κατηγορίας προϊόντων) και της ίδιας της πτυχής, αντί να μεταφέρουν συνοπτικές απόψεις από το πλαίσιο της. Ελπίζουμε ότι αυτή η έρευνα μπορεί να βοηθήσει τη μελλοντική έρευνα για τη βελτίωση της αυτοεποπτικής μάθησης, της ανεξέλεγκτης μάθησης και του συντονισμού για την ABSA. Το προσχεδιασμένο μοντέλο και ο κώδικας μπορείτε να βρείτε στο https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány elemzi a BERT felülvizsgálatából származó, előre képzett rejtett reprezentációkat az aspect-based sentiment elemzés (ABSA) feladataira vonatkozóan. Munkánkat az ABSA BERT alapú nyelvi modelljeinek közelmúltbeli fejlődése motiválja. Nem világos azonban, hogy a címke nélküli korpuszon képzett (maszkos) nyelvi modell általános proxy feladata szempontok vagy vélemények megjegyzése nélkül hogyan szolgálhat fontos jellemzőkkel az ABSA downstream feladataihoz. Az ABSA jegyzetelt adatkészleteinek kihasználásával vizsgáljuk a BERT figyelmét és tanult ábrázolásait, amelyeket előre kiképzett a felülvizsgálatokon. Megállapítottuk, hogy a BERT nagyon kevés önfigyelő fejet használ a kontextusszavak (például előpozíciók vagy névmások, amelyek jeleznek egy szempontot) és a vélemény szavak kódolására egy szempontot. Egy szempont ábrázolásának legtöbb jellemzője a tartomány (vagy termékkategória) finomszemcsés szemantikájának és magának az aspektusnak szentelt, ahelyett, hogy összefoglalt véleményeket hordana a kontextusából. Reméljük, hogy ez a vizsgálat segíthet a jövőbeni kutatásoknak az önfelügyelet nélküli tanulás, a felügyelet nélküli tanulás és az ABSA finomhangolásának javításában. Az előkészített modell és kód a következő oldalon található: https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'it': "Questo articolo analizza le rappresentazioni nascoste pre-addestrate apprese dalle recensioni su BERT per i compiti nell'analisi del sentiment basato sugli aspetti (ABSA). Il nostro lavoro è motivato dai recenti progressi nei modelli linguistici basati su BERT per ABSA. Tuttavia, non è chiaro come il compito di proxy generale del modello linguistico (mascherato) formato su corpus non etichettati senza annotazioni di aspetti o opinioni possa fornire caratteristiche importanti per le attività a valle in ABSA. Sfruttando i dataset annotati in ABSA, analizziamo sia le attenzioni che le rappresentazioni apprese di BERT pre-addestrate sulle recensioni. Abbiamo scoperto che BERT usa pochissime teste di auto-attenzione per codificare parole di contesto (come preposizioni o pronomi che indicano un aspetto) e parole di opinione per un aspetto. La maggior parte delle caratteristiche nella rappresentazione di un aspetto sono dedicate alla semantica fine del dominio (o categoria di prodotto) e dell'aspetto stesso, invece di portare opinioni riassunte dal suo contesto. Speriamo che questa indagine possa aiutare la ricerca futura nel migliorare l'apprendimento auto-supervisionato, l'apprendimento non supervisionato e la messa a punto per ABSA. Il modello pre-addestrato e il codice possono essere trovati a https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз BERT туралы тапсырмаларды қарау үшін алдын- ала оқылған жасырын көрсеткіштерді анализ етеді (ABSA). Біздің жұмысымыз ABSA үшін BERT негіздеген тіл үлгілерінде жаңа жағдайда мотивацияланады. Бірақ ABSA дегенде келесі тапсырмалар үшін маңызды мәліметтерді таңдауға болмаса (қалқалаған) тіл үлгісінің (қалқалаған) жалпы мәліметтер үлгісінің (қалқалаған) жалпы мәліметтері көрсетіл ABSA дегенде белгіленген деректер қорларын қолдану арқылы, біз BERT бақылау арқылы алдын- ала оқылған тәртіптерінің қатынасын және оқылған тәртіптерін зерттейміз. Біз BERT контексттік сөздерді кодтау үшін өзіңіздің бағыттарын (мәліметтер немесе белгілерді көрсету үшін) және мәліметтің сөздерін бағыттау үшін бірнеше қызықты қолданады. Бір аспекттің көрсетілуінің көпшілігі доменнің (немесе продукттың санаттарының) және өзінің аспектінің көпшілігі өзінің жазылған мәліметтерін өзінің контекстерінен таңдау орнына болады. Біз бұл зерттеулердің болашақ зерттеулеріне өзімізді бақылайтын оқытуға, өзімізді бақылайтын оқытуға және ABSA үшін дұрыс түзетуге көмектесетін деп үмі Алдын- ала оқылған модель мен код табылады https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente analizuojami iš anksto apmokyti paslėpti atstovai, įgyti iš BERT peržiūrų atliekant aspektais pagrįstos jausmų analizės (ABSA) užduotis. Mūsų darbą motyvuoja pastarojo meto pažanga ABSA kalbų modeliuose, grindžiamuose BERT. Vis dėlto neaišku, kaip bendroji (paslėpto) kalbos modelio užduotis, apmokyta be žymėjimo korpuso, be aspektų ar nuomonių anotacijų, gali suteikti svarbių ABSA tolesnių užduočių ypatumų. By leveraging the annotated datasets in ABSA, we investigate both the attentions and the learned representations of BERT pre-trained on reviews.  We found that BERT uses very few self-attention heads to encode context words (such as prepositions or pronouns that indicating an aspect) and opinion words for an aspect.  Dauguma aspekto aprašymo ypatybių yra skirtos srities (arba produktų kategorijos) ir paties aspekto smulkiai grūdintai semantikai, o ne apibendrintoms nuomonėms iš jo konteksto. Tikimės, kad šis tyrimas gali padėti ateityje atlikti mokslinius tyrimus, kuriais siekiama pagerinti savarankišką mokymąsi, nepastebimą mokymąsi ir ABSA patobulinimą. Išankstinio mokymo modelis ir kodas pateikiami https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'mk': 'Овој документ ги анализира предобучените скриени претставници научени од рецензиите на БЕРТ за задачи во аспектна анализа на чувствата (АБСА). Our work is motivated by the recent progress in BERT-based language models for ABSA.  Сепак, не е јасно како општата прокси задача на (маскираниот) јазички модел обучен на неозначен корпус без анотации на аспекти или мислења може да обезбеди важни карактеристики за понатамошните задачи во АБСА. Со искористување на анотираните податоци во АБСА, ги истражуваме вниманието и научените претставувања на БЕРТ предобучени на рецензии. Најдовме дека БЕРТ користи многу малку глави за себе-внимание за кодирање на контекстни зборови (како што се препозиции или изрази кои индицираат аспект) и зборови за мислење за аспект. Повеќето карактеристики во претставувањето на еден аспект се посветени на фината семантика на доменот (или категоријата на производите) и самиот аспект, наместо да носат резимирани мислења од неговиот контекст. Се надеваме дека оваа истрага може да помогне во идното истражување во подобрувањето на самонадгледуваното учење, ненадгледуваното учење и подобрувањето на АБСА. Преобучениот модел и кодот се наоѓаат на https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menganalisis perwakilan tersembunyi yang dilatih-terlatih belajar dari ulasan pada BERT untuk tugas dalam analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek (ABSA). Kerja kami diputar oleh kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam model bahasa berasaskan BERT untuk ABSA. Namun, tidak jelas bagaimana tugas proksi umum bagi model bahasa (bertopeng) dilatih pada korpus tidak ditandai tanpa anotasi aspek atau pendapat boleh menyediakan ciri-ciri penting untuk tugas turun dalam ABSA. Dengan menggunakan set data yang dicatat di ABSA, kami menyelidiki kedua-dua perhatian dan perwakilan belajar BERT dilatih-dilatih pada ulasan. Kami mendapati bahawa BERT menggunakan sedikit kepala perhatian diri untuk mengekodkan perkataan konteks (seperti predosisi atau pronun yang menunjukkan aspek) dan perkataan pendapat untuk aspek. Kebanyakan ciri-ciri dalam perwakilan aspek didedikasikan kepada semantik-benih baik domain (atau kategori produk) dan aspek sendiri, daripada membawa pendapat ringkasan dari konteks. Kami harap penyelidikan ini boleh membantu penyelidikan masa depan untuk meningkatkan pembelajaran yang diawasi diri sendiri, pembelajaran yang tidak diawasi dan penyesuaian untuk ABSA. Model dan kod pra-dilatih boleh ditemui di https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь BERT-ын талаарх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээний ажил дээр сурсан аль хэдийн сургалтын нууцлагдсан үзүүлэлтийг шинжилдэг. Бидний ажил БЕРТ-д суурилсан хэл загварын саяхан хөгжлийн урам зориулсан. Гэхдээ хэл загварын ерөнхий прокси үйл ажиллагаа хэрхэн АБСА-д багасгах үйл ажиллагаанд хэрхэн боловсруулж чадахгүй корпус дээр сургалтын загвар нь тодорхой биш. АБСА-д анзаарсан өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан бид БЕРТ-ын анзаарлын талаар сургалтын үзүүлэлт болон сургалтын үзүүлэлтийг судалж байна. Бид БЕРТ өөрийгөө анхаарлаа хандуулахын тулд маш бага анхаарлаа ашиглаж байдаг. Түүнчлэн тодорхойлолтын үг (жишээ нь анхаарлаа, хэлбэрийг харуулж буй хэлбэрүүд) болон бодолын үгүүд нь нэг Эдгээр асуудлын үзүүлэлтийн ихэнх чадварууд нь холбоотой (эсвэл бүтээгдэхүүн категори) болон өөрийнхөө асуудлын тухай тодорхойлолтой ойлголтыг авч үзэх оронд тодорхойлогдож байна. Бид энэ судалгаа ирээдүйн судалгаагаар өөрийгөө удирдах суралцах, суралцах болон АБСА-д сайн зохицуулах боломжтой гэж найдаж байна. Өмнөх сургалтын загвар болон кодыг олж болно. https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument janalizza r-rappreżentazzjonijiet moħbija mħarrġa minn qabel imgħallma mir-reviżjonijiet dwar il-BERT għal kompiti fl-analiżi tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq aspetti (ABSA). Ix-xogħol tagħna huwa motivat mill-progress reċenti fil-mudelli lingwistiċi bbażati fuq il-BERT għal ABSA. Madankollu, mhuwiex ċar kif il-kompitu ġenerali ta’ proxy ta’ mudell lingwistiku (maskrat) imħarreġ fuq corpus mingħajr tikketta mingħajr annotazzjonijiet ta’ aspetti jew opinjonijiet jista’ jipprovdi karatteristiċi importanti għal kompiti downstream fl-ABSA. Billi ninvestigaw is-settijiet tad-dejta annotati fl-ABSA, ninvestigaw kemm l-attenzjoni kif ukoll ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet miksuba tal-BERT imħarrġa minn qabel fir-reviżjonijiet. Instabna li l-BERT juża ftit li xejn kap ta’ awtonomija biex jikkodifika kliem ta’ kuntest (bħal preżunzjonijiet jew dikjarazzjonijiet li jindikaw aspett) u kliem ta’ opinjoni għal aspett. Most features in the representation of an aspect are dedicated to the fine-grained semantics of the domain (or product category) and the aspect itself, instead of carrying summarized opinions from its context.  Nittamaw li din l-investigazzjoni tista’ tgħin lir-riċerka futura fit-titjib tat-tagħlim awtosorveljat, it-tagħlim mhux sorveljat u t-titjib għall-ABSA. Il-mudell u l-kodiċi mħarrġa minn qabel jinsabu fuq https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിര നമ്മുടെ ജോലി ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അടുത്ത പ്രക്രോഗത്തിലാണ്. എങ്കിലും വ്യക്തമായിട്ടില്ല എങ്ങനെയാണ് അബിഎസിലെ താഴ്വരയിലെ പ്രോക്സിയുടെ (മുഖം മുഖം ചെയ്ത) ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ പൊതുവായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന ABSA-ലെ വിചാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതും ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ പഠിച്ച പ്രതിനിധികള ബെര്\u200dട്ടി സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കുറച്ചു പേരാണെന്ന് നമുക്ക് കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു (പ്രിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കി ഒരു വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലുള്ള ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200dറെ (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പ്രതിഫല വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ) സിമാന്റിക്കുകള്\u200d നമുക്ക് പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു ഈ അന്വേഷണം ഭാവിയുടെ ഗവേഷണം സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന പഠനത്തിനും, സംരക്ഷിതമായ വിദ്യാഭ് മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന മോഡലും കോഡും കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'no': 'Denne papiret analyserer dei først trengte skjulte representasjonane lærte frå gjennomgang av BERT for oppgåver i aspektbasert sentimentanalyse (ABSA). Arbeidet vårt er motivert av den siste framgang i BERT-baserte språk-modeller for ABSA. Det er imidlertid ikkje klart korleis den generelle mellomtenarmodellen av (maskerte) språkkmodellen trengte på ugjennomsiktige korpus utan merking av aspektar eller opinionar kan gje viktige funksjonar for nedstrekkoppgåver i ABSA. Ved å levera dei merkte datasetta i ABSA, så undersøker vi både oppmerksomhetene og lærte representasjonane av BERT først treng på gjennomgang. Vi fann at BERT bruker svært få selvmerksomhetskopter for å koda kontekstord (som preposition eller uttrykk som indikerer eit aspekt) og synleg ord for eit aspekt. Dei fleste funksjonane i representasjonen av eit aspekt er spesifiserte til dei fine-grained semantikkane i domenet (eller produktkategorien) og aspekten seg sjølv, i staden for å henta samanserte meningar frå konteksten. Vi håper at denne undersøkinga kan hjelpa framtidige forskning i å forbetra selvoversikt læring, ukjend læring og finnstilling for ABSA. Førehandsvis modell og kode finn på https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare analizează reprezentările ascunse pre-instruite învățate din recenziile BERT pentru sarcini în analiza sentimentului bazată pe aspecte (ABSA). Activitatea noastră este motivată de progresele recente în modelele lingvistice bazate pe BERT pentru ABSA. Cu toate acestea, nu este clar modul în care sarcina generală de proxy a modelului lingvistic (mascat) instruit pe corpuri fără etichetare fără adnotări de aspecte sau opinii poate oferi caracteristici importante pentru sarcinile din aval în ABSA. Prin utilizarea seturilor de date adnotate din ABSA, investigăm atât atenția, cât și reprezentările învățate ale BERT pre-instruit pe recenzii. Am descoperit că BERT folosește foarte puține capete de auto-atenție pentru a codifica cuvinte contextuale (cum ar fi prepoziții sau pronume care indică un aspect) și cuvinte de opinie pentru un aspect. Cele mai multe caracteristici ale reprezentării unui aspect sunt dedicate semanticii fine a domeniului (sau categoriei de produse) și aspectului în sine, în loc să poarte opinii rezumate din contextul său. Sperăm că această investigație poate ajuta cercetarea viitoare în îmbunătățirea învățării auto-supravegheate, a învățării nesupravegheate și a reglajării fine pentru ABSA. Modelul și codul pre-instruit pot fi găsite la https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł analizuje wstępnie przeszkolone ukryte reprezentacje wyciągnięte z recenzji na temat BERT dla zadań w aspektowej analizie sentymentów (ABSA). Naszą pracę motywują ostatnie postępy w zakresie modeli językowych opartych na BERT dla ABSA. Nie jest jednak jasne, w jaki sposób ogólne zadanie proxy modelu języka (maskowanego) trenowane na nieoznakowanym korpusie bez adnotacji aspektów lub opinii może zapewnić ważne cechy dla dalszych zadań w ABSA. Wykorzystując anotowane zbiory danych w ABSA, badamy zarówno uwagę, jak i nauczone reprezentacje BERT wstępnie przeszkolone na recenzjach. Odkryliśmy, że BERT używa bardzo niewielu główek uwagi do kodowania słów kontekstowych (takich jak przyimki lub zaimki wskazujące aspekt) i słów opinii dla danego aspektu. Większość cech w reprezentacji aspektu jest dedykowana drobnoziarnistej semantyce domeny (lub kategorii produktu) i samego aspektu, zamiast nosić streszczone opinie z kontekstu. Mamy nadzieję, że badanie to może pomóc w przyszłych badaniach w zakresie poprawy samodzielnego uczenia się, uczenia się bez nadzoru i dostosowania ABSA. Wstępnie przeszkolony model i kod można znaleźć na stronie internetowej https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir analizira predobučene skrivene predstave naučene od preglede o BERT za zadatke u analizi sentimenta na aspektu (ABSA). Naš rad je motivisan nedavnim napretkom u modelima jezika na BERT-u za ABSA. Međutim, nije jasno kako opći proksični zadatak (maskiranog) jezičkog modela obučen na nezabeliranom korpusu bez annotacije aspekta ili mišljenja može pružiti važne karakteristike za smanjene zadatake u ABSA-u. Uzimajući annotirane podatke u ABSA-u, istražujemo i pažnju i naučene predstave BERT-a predobučene na preglede. Pronašli smo da BERT koristi vrlo malo samopouzdanja glave za kodiranje kontekstskih reèi (poput prepoznavanja ili progovora koji ukazuju na aspekt) i mišljenja reèi za aspekt. Većina karakteristika predstavljanja aspekta posvećena su finogromnoj semantici domena (ili kategoriji proizvoda) i samom aspektu, umjesto da nosi sažete mišljenje iz svog konteksta. Nadamo se da će ova istraga pomoći budućim istraživanjima u poboljšanju samopouzdanog učenja, neodređenog učenja i ispravljanju ABSA-e. Pre obučeni model i kod se nalaze na https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා BERT ගැන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධා අපේ වැඩේ ABSA වෙනුවෙන් බෙර්ට් අධාරිත භාෂා මෝඩේල් එකේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරභාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා ඒත් ඒක පැහැදිලි නැහැ කොහොමද ABSA වලින් විශේෂ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරොක්සි ක්\u200dරියාව (මාස්ක් කරපු ) භාෂා මොඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු කොර් ABSA වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු දත්ත සේට් වලින් අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා BERT වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක අපි හොයාගත්තා BERT ගොඩක් ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා සංවේදනය වචන සංවේදනය කරන්න (හරියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිශ අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා මේ පරීක්ෂණය අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණයට උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් අනාගතයේ ඉගෙනගන්න, ABSA වෙනුවෙන් අව ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ කේතය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu ku sawiraa qeybaha qarsoon ee horay laga baray baaritaanka BERT ee shaqooyinka lagu sameeyo baaritaanka kaleemeyska fikirka (ABSA). Shaqadeena waxaa lagu hagaajiyaa horumarinta ugu dambeeyey ee ABSA-da ku saleysan BERT. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ma cad karo sida qaabka caadiga ah ee qaabka afka (masked) ee lagu baray qofka aan la aqoon karin, iyadoo aan sharaf laheyn ama aragtida, waxay ABSA ka heli karaan tayooyin muhiim ah oo loo qaban karo shuqullada hoose ee ABSA. Marka aan soo dirno sawirada aqooneed ee ABSA, waxaynu baaraynaa labada taxadirka iyo wadamada bartay ee BERT horay loo tababaray baaritaanka. Waxaynu helnay in BERT uu u isticmaalaa madaxyo aad u yar oo iskuul ah si uu u qoro hadallada qoraalka (tusaale ahaan horumarinta ama naadiyaha ku qoran dhinaca) iyo hadallada aragtida. Qof badan oo ku saabsan dhinaca waxaa loo daahiriyey dabeecada deegaanka (ama qeybta midhaha) iyo dhinaca qudheeda, taas oo aan ka beddelin aragtida kooxaha lagu soo qoray. Waxaan rajaynaynaa in baaritaanku uu caawinayo baaritaanka mustaqbalka ah oo uu horumarinayo barashada iskuulka, waxbarashada aan la ilaalinayn iyo hagitaanka fiican ee ABSA. Tusaale-tababar-horaadka iyo codsiga waxaa laga heli karaa https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட முன் மறைந்த பிரிவுகளை பிரெட்டின் மீது படிக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடுகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக் க BERT-அடிப்படையான மொழி மாதிரிகளில் எங்கள் வேலை ABSA-க்கு சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றத்தினால் ஊக்கப்படுகிறது. ஆனால், ABSA இல் குறிப்புகள் அல்லது கருத்துகள் இல்லாமல் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி மாதிரியில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பொதுவான பதிலாள் பணியை எப்படி தெளிவாக்க முடியாத ABSA யில் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகளை அனுப்புவதற்காக, நாம் பெர்ட் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட முன் பயிற்சியின் கவனத்தையும் கற்ற BERT மிகவும் சில தன்னையே கவனம் தலைவர்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறார்கள் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடித்தோம் ஒரு பக்கத்திற்கும் குறியீட்டு சொல்லும ஒரு புள்ளியின் குறிப்பிட்ட பெரும்பாலான குணங்கள் களம் (அல்லது தயாரிப்பு வகையில்) மற்றும் புள்ளியின் குறிப்பிட்ட கருத்துக்களை அதன் சூழலிலி நாங்கள் நம்புகிறோம் இந்த ஆய்வு எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சியை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்று நம்புகிறோம் ABSA க்கு தானே கண்காணிக முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரி மற்றும் குறியீடு கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats analyserar de förklädda dolda representationer som lärts från utvärderingar av BERT för uppgifter i aspektbaserad sentimentalanalys (ABSA). Vårt arbete motiveras av de senaste framstegen inom BERT-baserade språkmodeller för ABSA. Det är dock inte klart hur den allmänna proxy-uppgiften för (maskerad) språkmodell som utbildats på omärkt korpus utan kommentarer av aspekter eller åsikter kan ge viktiga funktioner för nedströmsuppgifter i ABSA. Genom att utnyttja de kommenterade datauppsättningarna i ABSA undersöker vi både uppmärksamheten och de lärda representationerna av BERT som tränats på granskningar. Vi fann att BERT använder väldigt få självuppmärksamhetshuvud för att koda sammanhangsord (till exempel prepositioner eller pronomen som indikerar en aspekt) och åsiktsord för en aspekt. De flesta funktioner i representationen av en aspekt är dedikerade till den finkorniga semantiken för domänen (eller produktkategorin) och själva aspekten, istället för att bära sammanfattade åsikter från sitt sammanhang. Vi hoppas att denna undersökning kan hjälpa framtida forskning för att förbättra självövervakat lärande, oövervakat lärande och finjustering för ABSA. Den färdigutbildade modellen och koden finns på https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ BERT کے بارے میں روشن کرنے سے پہلے پڑھے ہوئے مخفی نمونات کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں۔ ہمارا کام ABSA کے لئے BERT بنیاد زبان مدل کے اگلے پیشرفت کے ذریعہ منفجر کیا گیا ہے۔ However, it is not clear how the general proxy task of (masked) language model trained on unlabeled corpus without annotations of aspects or opinions can provide important features for downstream tasks in ABSA. ABSA میں مضبوط ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ سے ہم دیکھتے ہیں اور BERT کی سیکھی مضبوطی کے بارے میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے دیکھا کہ BERT بہت کم اپنا رغبت سر استعمال کرتا ہے کہ متوسط کلمات کو (جیسے رغبت یا رغبت کا ذریعہ دکھاتے ہیں) اور ایک الگو کے لئے رغبت کا کلمات استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ڈومین (یا محصولات کاٹی) کی بہت سی سیمانٹیکوں کے لئے (یا محصولات کاٹی) اور اس کی مخالفت کے علاوہ بہت سی سیمانٹیکوں کی تعریف کی جاتی ہے۔ ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ یہ تحقیقات آینده تحقیقات کی مدد کرے گا کہ اپنے آپ کو نظارت کی تعلیم، غیرقابل تعلیم اور ABSA کے لئے بہترین ترکیب کرنے کے لئے۔ پیش آموزش کی موڈل اور کوڈ کو پا سکتا ہے https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz ABSA (ABSA) bilan birinchi o'rganilgan BERT tashkilotlaridan o'rganishdan oldin bekitilgan representalarni aniqlanadi. Bizning ishimiz ABSA uchun eng yaqinda BERT asosiy tilning modellari bilan harakat qiladi. Шундай қилиб, ABSA (ABSA) томонидан баҳраманд бўлмаган қонун бажарилган proksi вазифаси тўғрисида бажарилган фойдали эмас. ABSAdagi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini yordam berish orqali biz bir taʼminlovchi BERT ta'minlovchi taʼminlovchilarni va o'rganishdan oldin o'rganishni o'rganamiz. Biz bildikki, BERT bir necha o'zim boshqaruvchidan foydalanishini ko'rsatganimiz mumkin, huddi bir necha so'zlarni kodlash uchun (masalan joylashtirish yoki qiymatni anglatadi) va fikr so'zlarini anglatadi. Ko'pchilik darajadagi xususiyatlar domen (yoki produkt kategoriga) va o'zida o'zgarishga qisqarli fikrlarni yuborishdan oldin. Bu uchrashuv kelajakda o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganishni, saqlab qolmagan o'rganishni va yaxshi o'rganishni oshirish mumkin deb umid qilamiz. Oldindan foydalanilgan model va kodlash mumkin https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này phân tích các biểu tượng ẩn được rèn luyện trước từ các bài kiểm tra về BERT cho các công việc phân tích cảm xúc nhân tạo (ABSA). Sự nghiệp của chúng tôi được thúc đẩy bởi sự tiến bộ gần đây trong các mô hình ngôn ngữ SASA. Tuy nhiên, không rõ làm thế nào nhiệm vụ ủy nhiệm chung của mô hình ngôn ngữ (đeo mặt nạ) được huấn luyện trên một tập thể chưa có hiệu chỉnh các khía cạnh hay ý kiến có thể cung cấp các yếu tố quan trọng cho các công việc xuôi dòng tại ABSA. Bằng cách sử dụng các tập tin đã ghi chú tại ABA, chúng tôi cũng điều tra sự chú ý và các diễn viên được dạy dỗ bởi thiếu tá sót. Chúng tôi phát hiện được rằng BERT sử dụng rất ít đầu óc tự giác để mã hóa các từ ngữ ngữ ngữ cảnh (như Giới thiệu hay những từ chỉ ra một khía cạnh) và những từ quan điểm cho một khía cạnh. Phần lớn các yếu tố trong việc mô tả một khía cạnh là dành cho ngữ pháp tôn trọng của miền (hay phân loại sản phẩm) và các khía cạnh đó, thay vì mang theo những ý kiến tổng hợp từ ngữ cảnh của nó. Chúng tôi hy vọng cuộc điều tra này có thể giúp nghiên cứu tương lai cải thiện học tập tự giám sát, học không giám sát và cải thiện ABSA. The pre-educated model và code is found at https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия анализира предварително обучените скрити представяния, научени от прегледите на BERT за задачи в анализ на сентимента въз основа на аспекти (АБСА). Работата ни е мотивирана от скорошния напредък в езиковите модели на АБСА. Не е ясно обаче как общата задача за прокси на (маскиран) езиков модел, обучен върху немаркиран корпус без анотации на аспекти или мнения, може да осигури важни характеристики за задачите надолу по веригата в ABSA. Използвайки анотираните набори от данни в АБСА, ние изследваме както вниманието, така и наученото представяне на BERT, предварително обучени за прегледи. Установихме, че използва много малко глави за самовнимание, за да кодира контекстни думи (като предозиции или местоимения, които показват даден аспект) и мнения думи за даден аспект. Повечето функции в представянето на даден аспект са посветени на фината семантика на домейна (или продуктовата категория) и самия аспект, вместо да носят обобщени мнения от контекста му. Надяваме се, че това разследване може да помогне за бъдещи изследвания за подобряване на самостоятелно обучение, обучение без надзор и фина настройка за АБСА. Предварително обученият модел и код можете да намерите на адрес: https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'da': 'Denne artikel analyserer de prætrænede skjulte repræsentationer, der er lært fra anmeldelser af BERT for opgaver i aspektbaseret sentiment analyse (ABSA). Vores arbejde er motiveret af de seneste fremskridt i BERT-baserede sprogmodeller for ABSA. Det er imidlertid ikke klart, hvordan den generelle proxy-opgave for (maskeret) sprogmodel, der er uddannet på ikke-mærket korpus uden noteringer af aspekter eller meninger, kan give vigtige funktioner til downstream-opgaver i ABSA. Ved at udnytte de annoterede datasæt i ABSA undersøger vi både opmærksomheden og de lærte repræsentationer af BERT, der er forudtrænet på anmeldelser. Vi fandt ud af, at BERT bruger meget få hoveder til selvopmærksomhed til at kode kontekstord (såsom prepositioner eller pronomen, der angiver et aspekt) og meningsord for et aspekt. De fleste funktioner i repræsentationen af et aspekt er dedikeret til den finkornede semantik af domænet (eller produktkategorien) og aspektet selv, i stedet for at bære opsummerede meninger fra sin kontekst. Vi håber, at denne undersøgelse kan hjælpe fremtidig forskning i forbedring af selvovervåget læring, uovervåget læring og finjustering for ABSA. Den prætrænede model og kode kan findes på https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel analyseert de vooraf getrainde verborgen representaties die geleerd zijn uit beoordelingen over BERT voor taken in aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). Ons werk is gemotiveerd door de recente vooruitgang in BERT-gebaseerde taalmodellen voor ABSA. Het is echter niet duidelijk hoe de algemene proxy-taak van (gemaskerd) taalmodel getraind op ongelabeld corpus zonder annotaties van aspecten of meningen belangrijke kenmerken kan bieden voor downstream taken in ABSA. Door gebruik te maken van de geannoteerde datasets in ABSA, onderzoeken we zowel de aandacht als de geleerde representaties van BERT voorgetraind op reviews. We ontdekten dat BERT zeer weinig zelfattentiekoppen gebruikt om contextwoorden (zoals voorzetsels of voornaamwoorden die een aspect aangeven) en opiniewoorden voor een aspect te coderen. De meeste kenmerken in de representatie van een aspect zijn gewijd aan de fijnkorrelige semantiek van het domein (of productcategorie) en het aspect zelf, in plaats van samengevatte meningen uit de context te dragen. We hopen dat dit onderzoek kan helpen bij toekomstig onderzoek naar het verbeteren van zelfbegeleid leren, onbeheerd leren en fine-tuning voor ABSA. Het voorgetrainde model en de code zijn te vinden op https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir analizira predobučene skrivene predstave koje su naučene iz preglede o BERT-u za zadatke u analizi osjećaja na aspektu (ABSA). Naš rad je motiviran nedavnim napretkom u modelima jezika na BERT-u za ABSA. Međutim, nije jasno kako opći proksični zadatak (maskiranog) jezičkog modela obučen na nezabeliranom korpusu bez annotacija aspekta ili mišljenja može pružiti važne karakteristike za donjeg zadataka u ABSA-u. Uzimajući navedene podatke u ABSA-u, istražujemo i pažnju i naučene predstave BERT-a predobučene na preglede. Pronašli smo da BERT koristi vrlo malo samopouzdanja glave za kodiranje kontekstskih riječi (poput prepoznavanja ili progovora koji ukazuju na aspekt) i mišljenja riječi za aspekt. Većina karakteristika predstavljanja aspekta posvećena su finogromnoj semantici domena (ili kategoriji proizvoda) i samom aspektu umjesto da nosi sažete mišljenje iz svog konteksta. Nadamo se da će ova istraga pomoći budućim istraživanjima u poboljšanju samopouzdanog učenja, neodređenog učenja i dobro određivanja ABSA-e. Preobučeni model i kod se nalaze na https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag analysiert die vortrainierten versteckten Repräsentationen, die aus Reviews zu BERT für Aufgaben in der aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA) gelernt wurden. Unsere Arbeit ist motiviert durch die jüngsten Fortschritte bei BERT-basierten Sprachmodellen für ABSA. Es ist jedoch nicht klar, wie die allgemeine Proxy-Aufgabe eines (maskierten) Sprachmodells, das auf unbeschriftetem Korpus ohne Anmerkungen von Aspekten oder Meinungen trainiert wird, wichtige Merkmale für nachgelagerte Aufgaben in ABSA liefern kann. Durch die Nutzung der annotierten Datensätze in ABSA untersuchen wir sowohl die Aufmerksamkeit als auch die erlernten Repräsentationen von BERT, die auf Reviews vortrainiert wurden. Wir fanden heraus, dass BERT sehr wenige Selbstaufmerksamkeitsköpfe verwendet, um Kontextwörter (wie Präpositionen oder Pronomen, die einen Aspekt angeben) und Meinungswörter für einen Aspekt zu kodieren. Die meisten Merkmale in der Darstellung eines Aspekts sind der feinkörnigen Semantik der Domäne (oder Produktkategorie) und des Aspekts selbst gewidmet, anstatt zusammengefasste Meinungen aus seinem Kontext zu tragen. Wir hoffen, dass diese Untersuchung zukünftige Forschungen zur Verbesserung des selbstüberwachten Lernens, des unbeaufsichtigten Lernens und der Feinabstimmung für ABSA unterstützen kann. Das vortrainierte Modell und Code finden Sie unter https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menganalisis persembahan tersembunyi yang dilatih-dilatih belajar dari penelitian di BERT untuk tugas dalam analisis sentimen berbasis aspek (ABSA). Pekerjaan kami disebabkan kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam model bahasa berdasarkan BERT untuk ABSA. Namun, tidak jelas bagaimana tugas proksi umum dari model bahasa (bertopeng) dilatih pada corpus tidak ditandai tanpa anotasi aspek atau pendapat dapat menyediakan fitur penting untuk tugas turun di ABSA. Dengan menggunakan set data yang dicatat di ABSA, kami menyelidiki perhatian dan perwakilan belajar dari BERT yang terlatih di ulasan. Kami menemukan bahwa BERT menggunakan sedikit kepala perhatian diri untuk mengkode kata-kata konteks (seperti predosisi atau pronon yang menunjukkan aspek) dan kata-kata pendapat untuk aspek. Kebanyakan ciri-ciri dalam perwakilan aspek didedikasikan untuk semantik gandum domain (atau kategori produk) dan aspek sendiri, daripada membawa pendapat tersingkat dari konteks. Kami berharap penyelidikan ini bisa membantu penelitian masa depan dalam meningkatkan belajar yang diawasi sendiri, belajar yang tidak diawasi dan memperbaiki ABSA. Model dan kode pra-terlatih dapat ditemukan di https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ko': '본고는 측면에 기초한 정서분석(ABSA) 임무에서 BERT에 대한 논평에서 배운 사전 훈련의 숨겨진 표현을 분석했다.우리의 업무는 ABSA가 버트 언어 모델을 바탕으로 한 최신 진전의 추진을 받았다.그러나 표기되지 않은 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련된 (복면) 언어 모델의 일반 에이전트 임무(proxy task of)가 ABSA 내 하위 임무에 중요한 특징을 어떻게 제공하는지는 알려지지 않았다.ABSA의 주석 데이터 집합을 이용하여 우리는 평론에서 미리 훈련한 버트의 주의와 학습 표현을 연구했다.우리는 BERT가 어경어(예를 들어 표현방면의 개사나 대명사)와 관점어를 인코딩하는 데 자기주의 헤더를 거의 사용하지 않는다는 것을 발견했다.측에서 말한 대부분의 기능은 분야(또는 제품 유형)와 방면 자체의 세립도 의미에 주력하는 것이지 상하문에서 총괄적인 관점을 가지고 있는 것이 아니다.우리는 이 연구가 ABSA의 자율 감독 학습, 무감독 학습, 미세 조정을 개선하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있기를 바란다.미리 훈련된 모델과 코드는https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ نمایش\u200cهای مخفی پیش آموزش داده شده را تحلیل می\u200cکند که از بررسی\u200cهای BERT برای کارهای تحلیل احساسات بر اساس نقطه (ABSA) یاد گرفته شده است. کارمون توسط پیشرفت اخیر در مدل زبان بوسیله BERT برای ABSA تحریک شده است. ولی مشخص نیست که چگونه کار عمومی پروکسی از مدل زبان (ماسک) آموزش یافته شده در مورد کورپوس غیرقابل نوشته شده بدون نوشته\u200cهای منظور یا نظر می\u200cتواند ویژه\u200cهای مهم برای کارهای پایین\u200cترین در ABSA پیشنهاد کند. با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای یادآوری در ABSA، هر دو توجه و نمایش\u200cهای یادآوری BERT را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما فهمیدیم که BERT خیلی کم از سرهای خود توجه را برای رمزگذاری کلمات محیط استفاده می کند (مثل تشخیص یا تعریف\u200cها که نشان می\u200cدهند یک منطقه) و کلمات فکری برای یک منطقه. بیشتر ویژه\u200cهای نمایش یک منطقه به سیمانتیک\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای از دامنه (یا نوع محصولات) و خود منطقه، به جای حمل نظریه\u200cهای جمع\u200cشده از محصولات آن خاص شده\u200cاند. امیدواریم این تحقیقات بتواند تحقیقات آینده را کمک کند در بهترین یادگیری که خود را کنترل می\u200cکند، یادگیری غیرقابل تحقیق و تنظیم برای ABSA. مدل پیش آموزش و کد می\u200cتواند در https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linachambua maoni yaliyojifunzwa kabla yaliyojifunza yaliyojifunza kutokana na tatizo la BERT kwa ajili ya kazi katika uchambuzi wa hisia zilizoko kwa kawaida (ABSA). Kazi yetu imehamasishwa na maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika mifano ya lugha yenye msingi wa BERT kwa ABSA. Hata hivyo, si wazi jinsi jukumu la utambulisho mkuu wa mtindo wa lugha uliomfundishwa kwenye makazi yasiyoeleweka bila kutangaza masuala au maoni yanaweza kutoa vipengele muhimu kwa kazi za mitaani nchini ABSA. Kwa kutumia seti za taarifa zilizotajwa huko ABSA, tunachunguza hatua hizo pamoja na wawakilishi wa mafunzo ya BERT kwa kutafiti. Tumegundua kwamba BERT hutumia vichwa vichache vya kujitegemea kwa ajili ya kuandika maneno (kama vile nafasi au kutangaza kinachoonyesha upande) na maneno ya maoni kwa upande mmoja. Tamko nyingi katika uwakilishaji wa suala hili zimetumika kwa mifano yenye vizuri ya ndani (au makundi ya bidhaa) na upande wake wenyewe, badala ya kubeba maoni ya muhtasari kutoka kwenye muktadha wake. Tunatumaini uchunguzi huu unaweza kusaidia tafiti za baadaye katika kuboresha elimu yenyewe kujitazama, elimu isiyo na mafunzo mazuri kwa ABSA. Mfano na sheria ya zamani unaweza kupatikana katika https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz BERT hakynda görnüşler üçin öňünden öňünden öňünden gizlenen suratlaryny analyzýar. Biziň işimiz BERT tabanly dil nusgalarynda ABSA üçin ýakyn ösümligimiz tarapyndan motive edildi. Ýöne ABSA\'da aşak täsirler üçin (masked) dil nusgasynda bilinmeyen korpusda bilinmeyen proksi nusgasynyň nähili aýratyn däldir. ABSA\'da ýazyklanan veri setirlerini etmäge kömekleýän bolsa, biz BERT\'yň dykgynyň hem dykgynyň, hem dykgynyň öňünden öwrenmegi bardyk. BERT\'i kontekst sözlerini ködlemek üçin azajyk özüne üns berýän kellämizi tapdyk (görnüş ýa-da görnüş görkeýän aýdymlar ýaly) we pikir sözlerini bir aspekt üçin ködlemek üçin ulandyk. Aspectyň üýtgediginde köp üýtgedikleri domeniň fin-grain semantiklerine (ýa-da produkt kategoriýasy) we mesleksynyň özini görkezmek yerine gyzykly düşünjeleri taýýarlar. Bu barlagyň gelejekde gözleýän öwrenmeleri gowurarak, özüni goramaýan öwrenmeleri we ABSA üçin gowurarak barlagyna kömek edip biler diýip umyt edýäris. "%s" faýly açylyp başarmady çünki ol beter ullakan. https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'af': "Hierdie papier analyseer die voorafgeleerde verborge voorstellings geleer van hersiening op BERT vir opdragte in aspektgebaseerde sentimentanalisie (ABSA). Ons werk is motiveer deur die onlangse vordering in BERT-gebaseerde taal modele vir ABSA. Maar dit is nie duidelik hoe die algemene volmag-opdrag van (maskeerde) taal-model op ongeabelde korpus opgelei word sonder opmerking van aspekte of besonderhede belangrike funksies kan verskaf vir onderstreem taak in ABSA. Deur die aanmerkte datastelle in ABSA te verwyder, ondersoek ons beide die aandag en die geleerde voorstellings van BERT voor-opgelei op hersiening. Ons het gevind dat BERT baie paar self-aandag koppe gebruik om kontekswoorde te kodeer (soos preposeesie of verkondigings wat 'n aspekt indiek) en opisiewoorde vir 'n aspekt. Die meeste funksies in die verteenwoordigheid van 'n aspekt is geassosieer aan die fyn-graad semantieke van die domein (of produktkategorie) en die aspekt self, in plaas van die dra van samekomstige besonderhede van sy konteks. Ons hoop dat hierdie ondersoek toekomstige ondersoek kan help in die verbetering van self-ondersoekte leer, onondersoekte leer en fin-tuning vir ABSA. Die voorafgelei model en kode kan gevind word by https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument analizon përfaqësimet e fshehta të paratrajnuara të mësuara nga shqyrtimet në BERT për detyra në analizën e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte (ABSA). Puna jonë është e motivuar nga përparimi i fundit në modelet e gjuhës bazuar në BERT për ABSA. Megjithatë, nuk është e qartë se si detyra e përgjithshme e proxy e model it gjuhësor (të maskuar) të trajnuar në korpus pa etiketë pa anotacione të aspekteve apo opinioneve mund të ofrojë karakteristika të rëndësishme për detyrat më poshtë në ABSA. Duke shfrytëzuar grupet e të dhënave të anotuara në ABSA, ne hetojmë si vëmendjen dhe përfaqësimet e mësuara të BERT të paratrajnuar në analiza. Kemi gjetur se BERT përdor shumë pak koka vetë-vëmendje për të koduar fjalë konteksti (të tilla si paragjykimet apo shprehjet që tregojnë një aspekt) dhe fjalë opinioni për një aspekt. Shumica e karakteristikave në përfaqësimin e një aspekti janë dedikuar semantikës së hollësishme të domenisë (ose kategorisë së prodhimeve) dhe aspektit vetë, në vend që të mbajnë opinione të përmbledhura nga konteksti i saj. Shpresojmë se ky hetim mund të ndihmojë kërkimin e ardhshëm në përmirësimin e mësimit të vetë-mbikqyrur, mësimit të pa-mbikqyrur dhe rregullimit për ABSA. Modeli dhe kodi i paratrajnuar mund të gjendet në https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የፊተኛውን የተሰወረውን የBERT ሥርዓት በማድረግ ላይ የተማሩትን ትክክለኛዎችን ያስተምራል፡፡ ሥራችን በBERT-based የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በአBSA ላይ የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በአካባቢው ክሮፓስ ላይ በተማረ የቋንቋ ሞዴል የጠቅላላ ፕሮክሲ ስራ፣ ጉዳዩ ወይም አስተያየት ሳይኖር በአቢአዛር ውስጥ ለታችኞቹ ስርዓቶች የሚያስፈልገውን የግልፅ ስርዓት ማድረግ አይችልም፡፡ By leveraging the annotated datasets in ABSA, we investigate both the attentions and the learned representations of BERT pre-trained on reviews.  BERT በአካባቢው ቃላት (እንደምሳሌ ቦታዎች ወይም ጉዳዩ እና የዓይነት ቃላት የሚያሳውቅ) እና በአካባቢው ቃል የሚጠቅመው ጥቂት የራሳቸውን ራስ እንዲጠቀሙ አግኝተናል፡፡ በአካባቢው መልዕክት ብዙዎቹም በአካባቢው አካባቢ (ወይም የፍሬት ክፍል) እና ጉዳዩ ራሱ የተለየ ነው፡፡ ይህች ምርመራ ለቀድሞው ምርመራ ለABSA ራሳቸውን የተጠበቀውን ትምህርት፣ የማይጠበቀውን ትምህርት እና የመልካም ትምህርት ማድረግ እንዲችል ተስፋ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ምርጫዎች https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը վերլուծում է BER-ի վերլուծություններից սովորված նախապատրաստված թաքնված ներկայացումները սպեկտներով հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության (ABSA) խնդիրների համար: Մեր աշխատանքը խթանում է ABSA-ի վերջին առաջընթացը BERT-ի լեզվի մոդելներում: Այնուամենայնիվ, պարզ չէ, թե ինչպես (ծածկված) լեզվի մոդելի ընդհանուր պրոքսի առաջադրանքը, որն ուսուցանվում է անգծված կորպոսի վրա առանց ասպեկտների կամ կարծիքների նշումների, կարող է ABSA-ի հետագա առաջադրանքների համար կարևոր հատկու ԱԲՍԱ-ում գրված տվյալների համակարգերի օգնությամբ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք BER-ի նախապատրաստված վերլուծությունների ուշադրությունը և սովոր ներկայացումները: Մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ BER-ը օգտագործում է շատ քիչ ինքնաուշադրություն գլխավոր մասեր կոնտեքստի բառերի (ինչպիսիք են նախադրությունները կամ արտահայտությունները, որոնք ցույց են տալիս մի ասպեկտ) և կարծիքի բառերի համար: Ապտեքստի ներկայացման առանձնահատկությունների մեծ մասը նվիրված է տիեզերքի (կամ արտադրանքի կատեգորիայի) գեղեցիկ սեմանտիկային և ինքն ասպեկտը, իր կոնտեքստից համընդհանուր կարծիքներ վերցնելու փոխարեն: We hope this investigation can help future research in improving self-supervised learning, unsupervised learning and fine-tuning for ABSA.  Նախապատրաստված մոդելը և կոդը կարող են գտնել https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'az': "Bu kağıt BERT barəsində öyrəndiyi gizli göstəriciləri, aspekt-tabanlı hisslər analizi (ABSA) ilə öyrəndiyi işlərdən analizir. Bizim işimiz ABSA üçün BERT tabanlı dil modellərində yeni tədbir tədbir edir. Ancaq ABSA'da əsas işləri üçün çox möhkəm xüsusiyyətlər təhsil edilmədən korpus üzərində təhsil edilmiş (masked) dil model in in genel proksisi işləri necə təhsil edilir? ABSA'da bildirilmiş verilənlər qurğularını təmin edərək, BERT'nin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş nümunələrini də incidirik. Belə gördük ki, BERT tərəfindən kodlamaq üçün çox az self-attention başlıqlarını istifadə edir. Aspectin göstərilməsindəki ən çox xüsusiyyətlər domeinin (ya da produkt kategoriyasının) fine-grained semantiklərinə və özünün hissəsini daşımaq yerinə yığışdırılmış fikirləri daşıyırlar. Biz ümid edirik ki, bu xəbərdarlıq ABSA üçün gələcək araştırmaların özünü gözləyir öyrənməsini yaxşılaşdırmağa, təmizlənməyən öyrənməsinə və təmizləməsinə yardım edər. Ön təhsil edilmiş modeli və kodu tapıla bilər https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা বিশ্লেষণ করে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত লুকিয়ে রাখা প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিদের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণ (ABSA) ক আমাদের কাজ এবিএসএ-এর জন্য সাম্প্রতিক ভিত্তিক ভাষার মডেল দ্বারা উদ্যোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। কিন্তু এটা পরিষ্কার নয় কিভাবে (মুখোশিত) ভাষার মডেলের সাধারণ প্রক্সি কাজ কিভাবে অল্প কোর্পাসে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে কিংবা মতামতের বিষয়গুলোর বিষ এবিএসএ-এ বিরক্তিকর ডাটাসেট পাঠানোর মাধ্যমে আমরা বিবের্টের পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের প্রতিনিধিদের উভয়কে তদন্ত করি। আমরা আবিষ্কার করেছি যে বেরেটি বেশ কয়েকটি আত্মমনোযোগের মাধ্যমে ব্যবহার করে কন্টেক্সটেক্সট শব্দ (যেমন অবস্থান অথবা প্রত্যাখ্যান করে য প্রতিনিধিত্বের বেশীরভাগ বৈশিষ্ট্য ডোমেইনের (অথবা প্রযুক্তি বিভাগ) সুনির্দিষ্ট সেমেন্টিক (বা প্রযুক্তি বিভাগ) এবং প্রেক্ষাপটের প্রত আমরা আশা করি এই তদন্ত ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণা সাহায্য করতে পারে আত্মপরায়ণতা শিক্ষা বাড়িয়ে দেওয়া, সংরক্ষিত শিক্ষা এবং সুরক্ষিত শিক্ষা এব পূর্বপ্রশিক্ষিত মডেল এবং কোড পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir analizira predobučene skrivene predstave naučene od preglede o BERT za zadatke u analizi osjećanja na aspektu (ABSA). Naš rad je motivisan nedavnim napretkom u modelima jezika na BERT-u za ABSA. Međutim, nije jasno kako opći proksični zadatak (maskiranog) jezičkog modela obučen na neizbiljnom korpusu bez annotacija aspekta ili mišljenja može pružiti važne karakteristike za donošenje zadataka u ABSA-u. Ubrzavajući annotirane podatke u ABSA-u, istražujemo i pažnju i naučene predstave BERT-a predobučene na preglede. Pronašli smo da BERT koristi vrlo malo samopouzdanja glave za kodiranje kontekstskih riječi (poput prepoznavanja ili progovora koji ukazuju na aspekt) i mišljenja riječi za aspekt. Većina karakteristika predstavljanja aspekta posvećena su finogromnoj semantici domena (ili kategoriji proizvoda) i samom aspektu, umjesto da nosi sažete mišljenje iz svog konteksta. Nadamo se da će ova istraga pomoći budućim istraživanjima u poboljšanju samopouzdanog učenja, neodređenog učenja i finaliziranja za ABSA. Preobučeni model i kod se nalaze na https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ca': "Aquest paper analitza les representacions ocultes pré-entrenades aprengutes de recenses sobre BERT per a tasques en l'anàlisi de sentiments basat en aspectes (ABSA). La nostra feina està motivada pel progrés recent en els models lingüístics basats en BERT per ABSA. No obstant això, no és clar com la tasca general de proxy del model de llenguatge (mascat) entrenat en corpus sense marca sense anotacions d'aspectes o opinions pot proporcionar característiques importants per a tasques avall a ABSA. Utilitzant els conjunts de dades anotats d'ABSA, investigam les atencions i les representacions aprengutes de BERT pré-entrenats en revisions. We found that BERT uses very few self-attention heads to encode context words (such as prepositions or pronouns that indicating an aspect) and opinion words for an aspect.  Most features in the representation of an aspect are dedicated to the fine-grained semantics of the domain (or product category) and the aspect itself, instead of carrying summarized opinions from its context.  Esperem que aquesta investigació pugui ajudar a la recerca futura en millorar l'aprenentatge autosupervisat, l'aprenentatge sense supervisió i l'ajustament de l'ABSA. El model i codi pré-entrenats es poden trobar a https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'cs': 'Tento článek analyzuje předškolené skryté reprezentace získané z recenzí BERT pro úkoly v aspektové sentimentové analýze (ABSA). Naše práce je motivována nedávným pokrokem v oblasti jazykových modelů založených na BERT pro ABSA. Není však jasné, jak může obecná proxy úloha (maskovaného) jazykového modelu trénovaná na neoznačeném korpusu bez anotací aspektů nebo názorů poskytnout důležité vlastnosti pro následné úlohy v ABSA. Využitím anotovaných datových sad v ABSA zkoumáme jak pozornost, tak naučené reprezentace BERT předškolené na recenzích. Zjistili jsme, že BERT používá velmi málo hlav sebe-pozornosti k kódování kontextových slov (jako jsou předložky nebo zájmena, která ukazují aspekt) a názorových slov pro aspekt. Většina prvků v reprezentaci aspektu je věnována jemné sémantice domény (nebo produktové kategorie) a samotného aspektu, namísto toho, aby nesla shrnuté názory z jeho kontextu. Doufáme, že toto šetření může pomoci budoucímu výzkumu v oblasti zlepšení učení pod vlastním dohledem, učení bez dohledu a jemného ladění pro ABSA. Předškolený model a kód naleznete na adrese https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis analüüsitakse BERT-i ülevaatetest saadud varjatud esitusi aspektipõhise sentimentaalüüsi (ABSA) ülesannete jaoks. Meie tööd motiveerivad hiljutised edusammud ABSA BERT-põhistes keelemudelites. Siiski ei ole selge, kuidas märgistamata korpusel koolitatud (maskeeritud) keelemudeli üldine volitamisülesanne ilma aspektide või arvamuste märkusteta võib pakkuda olulisi tunnuseid ABSA järgmise etapi ülesannetele. ABSA märgitud andmekogumite kasutamise abil uurime nii BERTi tähelepanu kui ka õppinud esitusi, mis olid läbivaatamisel eelnevalt koolitatud. Leidsime, et BERT kasutab väga vähe enesetähelepanu peasid kontekstisõnade kodeerimiseks (näiteks ettepanekud või asendid, mis viitavad aspektile) ja arvamussõnade kohta aspekti. Enamik aspekti esitamise funktsioone on pühendatud domeeni (või tootekategooria) ja aspekti enda peenrahalisele semantikale, selle asemel et kanda kokkuvõtlikke arvamusi selle kontekstist. Loodame, et see uurimine võib aidata tulevastel uuringutel parandada enesejärelevalve all toimuvat õppimist, järelevalveta õppimist ja ABSA täpsustamist. Eelkoolitud mudel ja kood leiate aadressilt https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa analysoidaan BERT:n arvosteluista saatuja ennalta koulutettuja piilotettuja representaatioita aspektipohjaisen sentimentaalianalyysin (ABSA) tehtävissä. Työtämme motivoi ABSA:n BERT-pohjaisten kielimallien viimeaikainen kehitys. Ei kuitenkaan ole selvää, miten merkitsemättömään korpuseen koulutetun (peitetyn) kielimallin yleinen proxy-tehtävä ilman huomautuksia näkökohdista tai mielipiteistä voi tarjota tärkeitä ominaisuuksia ABSA:n loppupään tehtäviin. Hyödyntämällä ABSA:n annotoituja aineistoja tutkimme sekä BERT:n huomiota että opittuja esityksiä, jotka on koulutettu ennakkoarviointeihin. Huomasimme, että BERT käyttää hyvin vähän itsetarkkaavaisuuspäätä koodaamaan kontekstisanoja (kuten prepositioita tai pronomeja, jotka osoittavat näkökohtaa) ja mielipidevanoja tiettyyn näkökohtaan. Useimmat aspektin esittämisen ominaisuudet on omistettu toimialueen (tai tuoteluokan) ja itse aspektin hienojakoiselle semantiikalle sen sijaan, että niissä olisi tiivistettyjä mielipiteitä sen kontekstista. Toivomme, että tämä tutkimus voi auttaa tulevaa tutkimusta itseohjatun oppimisen, valvomattoman oppimisen ja ABSA:n hienosäädön parantamisessa. Esikoulutettu malli ja koodi löytyvät osoitteesta https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dipunangé awakdhéwé éntuk mulasar seneng pisan neng dipunangé nggawe barang nggawe barang BERT kanggo nggawe barang langgambar barang seneng nggawe barang langgambar (ASS). Nyong barêng-barêng sing paling nggawe barang nggawe balêng nggawe ning model sing saben nggawe BERT dumadhi kanggo ASS. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mungkin nggawe dataset sing dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang mabi, awak dhéwé ujian karo hal-ujian sing cara nggawe BERT seneng dipunangé barang resmi. Awak dhéwé luwih nggambar BERT iso nggambar kelas telu-atang kanggo koder kontext gambarang (koyo cara-nong obanursuan lan nggambar barang nggambar tarjamahan) lan kelas menehi kanggo langgar. mester parameters in the representation of an Aspect are given to the Fin-cered semanti of the domain Awak dhéwé nglanggar keujuhé iki iso nglanggar aturan kanggo ngilanggar nglanggar aturan sing beraksi kanggo ngilanggar sapa-enep kuwi mau, kuwi mau ngerasai lan ijol-ijolan sing beraksi kanggo ngilanggar Deba. Strikethrough https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מנתח את התצגות המסתורות המואמנות מראש שנלמדו מהביקורות על BERT עבור משימות בניתוח רגשות מבוסס באפקטים (ABSA). העבודה שלנו מוטיבציה על ידי התקדמות האחרונה בדוגמני שפה מבוססים על BERT עבור ABSA. However, it is not clear how the general proxy task of (masked) language model trained on unlabeled corpus without annotations of aspects or opinions can provide important features for downstream tasks in ABSA.  על ידי השימוש במערכות הנתונים המכתבות באבי-אסה, אנחנו חוקרים את תשומת הלב והייצוגים המלמדים של BERT מאומנים מראש על ביקורות. מצאנו שברט משתמשים במעט ראשי תשומת לב עצמית כדי לקוד מילים קונטקסט (כמו התערבות או ביטויים שמציינים איזושהי) ומילים דעה על איזושהי היבט. רוב המאפיינים בהצגה של אפקט מוקדשים לסמנטיקה של התחום (או הקטגוריה של מוצרים) והאפקט עצמו, במקום לשאת דעות מסוממות מהקשר שלה. אנו מקווים שהחקירה הזו יכולה לעזור למחקר עתיד בשיפור הלימודים המבוטחים בעצמו, ללימודים בלתי ממבוטחים, ולהתדרגות עבור ABSA. המודל והקוד המואמנים מראש יכולים למצוא ב https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'ha': "Wannan littafin yana analyza the former-Training Repositori waɗanda aka sanar daga taƙaita kan BERT wa aikin yin analyza a bakin-aspected hisia (ABSA). Kayan aikinmu na motsi da na ƙari a cikin misalin harshen BERT-asanin ABSA. Haƙĩƙa, ba shi da bayyana yadda mai gaura aikin proksi wa misalin harshen (rufe) wanda aka yi wa shirin a kan nau'in rubutun da ba'a rubutu ba, kuma bã da kunnufi ga masu sakan da aka rubũta shi ba, kan ka bãyar da wasu mistakati na muhimu wa aikin da ke cikin ABSA. Ga a sambawa da aka sanar da data masu cikin ABSA, munã ƙidãya masu aikin da aka sanar masu aikin BERT da masu tsarin da aka yi bayani a kan kure. Ba mu gane cewa BERT yana amfani da masu kaɗan na kansa ga kodi maganar muhimmanci (kamar misali da misãlai da magana wanda ke faɗa wani aspecti) da maganar sharuya zuwa wani aspecti. Babu yawa masu amfani da masu cikin sha'an in wani aspecti ana ƙayyade zuwa masu kyakkyawan bakwai na guda (ko kuma ma'anar matsayi) da bakin sigarin kansa, musamman da ya ɗauki kalmõmi da aka ƙayyade daga muhallinsa. Tuna tsammãni da wannan shirin zartarwa zai iya taimake research a gaba ɗaya a kan improve learning mai tsaron kansa, da lissafa da mai tsare wa ABSA. The pre-trained model and code can be found at  https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek analizira predhodno usposobljene skrite predstavitve, pridobljene iz pregledov BERT za naloge v analizi sentimenta na podlagi vidikov (ABSA). Naše delo motivira nedavni napredek pri jezikovnih modelih ABSA, ki temeljijo na BERT. Vendar ni jasno, kako lahko splošna naloga posrednika (maskiranega) jezikovnega modela, usposobljenega na neoznačenem korpusu brez opomb vidikov ali mnenj, zagotovi pomembne značilnosti za nadaljnje naloge v ABSA. Z izkoriščanjem označenih naborov podatkov v ABSA raziskujemo tako pozornost kot pridobljene predstavitve BERT-a, ki so bile predhodno usposobljene za preglede. Ugotovili smo, da BERT uporablja zelo malo glav samopozornosti za kodiranje kontekstnih besed (kot so predlogi ali zaimki, ki označujejo vidik) in mnenjskih besed za vidik. Večina značilnosti pri predstavitvi vidika je namenjenih drobnozrnati semantiki domene (ali kategorije izdelka) in vidika samega, namesto da nosi povzeta mnenja iz njenega konteksta. Upamo, da bo ta preiskava lahko pomagala pri prihodnjih raziskavah pri izboljšanju samonadzorovanega učenja, nenadzorovanega učenja in natančnih nastavitvah za ABSA. Predhodno usposobljeni model in kodo lahko najdete na spletni strani https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.', 'bo': 'This paper analyzes the pre-trained hidden representations learned from reviews on BERT for tasks in aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་BERT(BERT)ནང་ལ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁག་གི་མ་མཐུན་ཁག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཚབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔྱད་ཡོད་མེད་པའི་མཐུན་སྣང་མེད་པར་བཤད་པ་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏ ABSA ནང་དུ་annotated data sets་ལ་སྤྲོད་མ་ཐུབ་པར། ང་ཚོས་BERT་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་སྔོན་གྱི་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཐོག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ ང་ཚོས་BERT་ལྟ་བུའི་རང་ཉིད་ཡོད་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་དག་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། སྒྲུང་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་དག་ཙམ Most features in the representation of an aspect are dedicated to the fine-grained semantics of the domain (or product category) and the aspect itself, instead of carrying summarized opinions from its context. ང་ཚོས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདིས་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་རེད། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་དང་ཨང་རིགས་འདི་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/howardhsu/BERT-for-RRC-ABSA.'}
{'en': 'Integrating External Event Knowledge for Script Learning', 'ar': 'دمج معرفة الأحداث الخارجية لتعلم البرنامج النصي', 'fr': "Intégrer les connaissances sur les événements externes pour l'apprentissage", 'pt': 'Integrando o Conhecimento de Eventos Externos para Aprendizado de Script', 'es': 'Integración del conocimiento de eventos externos para el aprendizaje de scripts', 'ja': 'スクリプト学習のための外部イベント知識の統合', 'zh': '集成外事以脚本学', 'hi': 'स्क्रिप्ट लर्निंग के लिए बाहरी घटना ज्ञान को एकीकृत करना', 'ga': "Eolas Imeachtaí Seachtracha a Chomhtháthú d'Fhoghlaim Scripte", 'ru': 'Интеграция знаний о внешних событиях для обучения скриптам', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση της γνώσης εξωτερικών συμβάντων για τη μάθηση σεναρίων', 'hu': 'Külső eseményismeretek integrálása a szkriptek tanulásához', 'lt': 'Išorės įvykių žinių apie scenarijų mokymąsi integravimas', 'mk': 'Integrating External Event Knowledge for Script Learning', 'it': "Integrazione della conoscenza di eventi esterni per l'apprendimento degli script", 'mt': 'Integrating External Event Knowledge for Script Learning', 'kk': 'Скриптті оқу үшін сыртқы оқиға білімін біріктіру', 'mn': 'Скрипт суралцахын тулд гадаад үйл явдал мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх', 'ml': 'സ്ക്രിപ്റ്റ് പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള അവസ്ഥ അറിവ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Integrasikan Pengetahuan Peristiwa Luar untuk Pembelajaran Skrip', 'pl': 'Integrowanie wiedzy o zdarzeniach zewnętrznych dla uczenia się skryptów', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Integracija znanja vanjskih događaja za učenje skripta', 'ro': 'Integrarea cunoștințelor de evenimente externe pentru învățarea scripturilor', 'so': 'Isku qabsashada aqoonta dhacdooyinka dibadda ee waxbarashada skrifta', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Integrera kunskap om externa händelser för skriptinlärning', 'ta': 'சிறுநிரல் கற்றுக்கான வெளி நிகழ்வு அறிவை சேர்க்கிறது', 'ur': 'اسکریپٹ سیکھنے کے لئے بیرونی ایڈینٹ جاننے کی اطلاعات', 'uz': 'Skriptni oò£rganish uchun tashqi maò¥lumot qoò£yish', 'vi': 'Nhận thức sự kiện đối diện cho việc học Văn lệnh', 'hr': 'Integracija znanja vanjskih događaja za učenje skripta', 'da': 'Integrering af ekstern hændelsesviden til scriptlæring', 'bg': 'Интегриране на знания за външни събития за изучаване на скриптове', 'nl': 'Externe gebeurteniskennis integreren voor scriptleren', 'id': 'Integrating External Event Knowledge for Script Learning', 'fa': 'جمع کردن اطلاعات حادثه خارجی برای یادگیری اسکریپت', 'ko': '외부 이벤트 지식 통합 스크립트 학습', 'de': 'Integration externer Ereigniskenntnisse für Script Learning', 'tr': 'Skript öwrenmek üçin daşaryk bolup bilgi baglaýyşlar', 'af': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha ufahamu wa matukio ya nje kwa ajili ya kujifunza Script', 'sq': 'Integrimi i njohurive të jashtme të ngjarjeve për mësimin e skriptit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Skript öyrənməsi üçün Dışarı Vaxt Bilməsi Integration for External Event Knowledge', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'bn': 'স্ক্রিপ্ট শিখার জন্য বাইরে অনুষ্ঠানের তথ্য যুক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Integracija znanja vanjskih događaja za učenje skripta', 'cs': 'Integrace znalostí externích událostí pro učení skriptů', 'ca': "Integrar Conexus Externs d'Events per l'Aprendiment d'Escritures", 'et': 'Väliste sündmuste teadmiste integreerimine skriptide õppeks', 'fi': 'Ulkoisen tapahtumatiedon integrointi komentosarjojen oppimista varten', 'sk': 'Vključevanje znanja o zunanjih dogodkih za učenje skriptov', 'he': 'שילוב מידע אירועים חיצוניים ללמוד תיעוד', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་ཡིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་གྱི་ཕྱིར་འགྱུར་བ་ཤེས་ཚད', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness'}
{'en': 'Script learning aims to predict the subsequent event according to the existing event chain. Recent studies focus on event co-occurrence to solve this problem. However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem. With our observations, external event knowledge can provide additional knowledge like temporal or causal knowledge for understanding event chain better and predicting the right subsequent event. In this work, we integrate event knowledge from ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations) knowledge base to help predict the next event. We propose a new approach consisting of knowledge retrieval stage and knowledge integration stage. In the knowledge retrieval stage, we select relevant external event knowledge from ASER. In the knowledge integration stage, we propose three methods to integrate external knowledge into our model and infer final answers. Experiments on the widely-used Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.', 'ar': 'يهدف تعلم النص إلى توقع الحدث اللاحق وفقًا لسلسلة الأحداث الحالية. تركز الدراسات الحديثة على التواجد المشترك للحدث لحل هذه المشكلة. ومع ذلك ، فإن القليل من الدراسات تدمج معرفة الأحداث الخارجية لحل هذه المشكلة. من خلال ملاحظاتنا ، يمكن أن توفر معرفة الأحداث الخارجية معرفة إضافية مثل المعرفة الزمنية أو السببية لفهم سلسلة الأحداث بشكل أفضل والتنبؤ بالحدث اللاحق الصحيح. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بدمج المعرفة الخاصة بالأحداث من قاعدة المعرفة ASER (الأنشطة والدول والأحداث والعلاقات الخاصة بهم) للمساعدة في التنبؤ بالحدث التالي. نقترح نهجا جديدا يتكون من مرحلة استرجاع المعرفة ومرحلة تكامل المعرفة. في مرحلة استرجاع المعرفة ، نختار معرفة الأحداث الخارجية ذات الصلة من ASER. في مرحلة تكامل المعرفة ، نقترح ثلاث طرق لدمج المعرفة الخارجية في نموذجنا واستنتاج الإجابات النهائية. تُظهر التجارب على مهمة اختفاء السرد متعدد الخيارات (MCNC) المستخدمة على نطاق واسع أن نهجنا يحقق أداءً متطورًا مقارنة بالطرق الأخرى.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage par script vise à prédire l'événement suivant en fonction de la chaîne d'événements existante. Des études récentes se concentrent sur la co-occurrence d'événements pour résoudre ce problème. Cependant, peu d'études intègrent la connaissance des événements externes pour résoudre ce problème. Grâce à nos observations, la connaissance des événements externes peut fournir des connaissances supplémentaires, telles que des connaissances temporelles ou causales, pour mieux comprendre la chaîne d'événements et prévoir le bon événement ultérieur. Dans ce travail, nous intégrons les connaissances sur les événements de la base de connaissances ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations) pour aider à prédire le prochain événement. Nous proposons une nouvelle approche comprenant une étape de récupération des connaissances et une étape d'intégration des connaissances. Au stade de la récupération des connaissances, nous sélectionnons les connaissances pertinentes relatives aux événements externes à partir d'ASER. Au stade de l'intégration des connaissances, nous proposons trois méthodes pour intégrer les connaissances externes dans notre modèle et déduire les réponses finales. Les expériences sur la tâche de cloze narratif à choix multiples (MCNC) largement utilisée montrent que notre approche atteint des performances de pointe par rapport aux autres méthodes.", 'es': 'El aprendizaje de guiones tiene como objetivo predecir el evento posterior de acuerdo con la cadena de eventos existente. Estudios recientes se centran en la coocurrencia de eventos para resolver este problema. Sin embargo, pocos estudios integran el conocimiento de eventos externos para resolver este problema. Con nuestras observaciones, el conocimiento de eventos externos puede proporcionar conocimientos adicionales, como conocimiento temporal o causal, para comprender mejor la cadena de eventos y predecir el evento posterior correcto. En este trabajo, integramos el conocimiento de eventos de la base de conocimientos de ASER (Actividades, Estados, Eventos y sus Relaciones) para ayudar a predecir el próximo evento. Proponemos un nuevo enfoque que consiste en la etapa de recuperación de conocimientos y la etapa de integración del conocimiento. En la etapa de recuperación de conocimientos, seleccionamos el conocimiento relevante de eventos externos de ASER. En la etapa de integración del conocimiento, proponemos tres métodos para integrar el conocimiento externo en nuestro modelo e inferir las respuestas finales. Los experimentos en la tarea ampliamente utilizada de Cloze narrativo de opción múltiple (MCNC) muestran que nuestro enfoque logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en comparación con otros métodos.', 'pt': 'O aprendizado de script visa prever o evento subsequente de acordo com a cadeia de eventos existente. Estudos recentes focam na co-ocorrência de eventos para resolver este problema. No entanto, poucos estudos integram o conhecimento de eventos externos para resolver este problema. Com nossas observações, o conhecimento de eventos externos pode fornecer conhecimento adicional, como conhecimento temporal ou causal, para entender melhor a cadeia de eventos e prever o evento subsequente correto. Neste trabalho, integramos o conhecimento de eventos da base de conhecimento ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations) para ajudar a prever o próximo evento. Propomos uma nova abordagem que consiste na etapa de recuperação do conhecimento e na etapa de integração do conhecimento. Na etapa de recuperação de conhecimento, selecionamos o conhecimento de eventos externos relevantes do ASER. Na etapa de integração do conhecimento, propomos três métodos para integrar o conhecimento externo ao nosso modelo e inferir as respostas finais. Experimentos na tarefa Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) amplamente utilizada mostram que nossa abordagem alcança desempenho de última geração em comparação com outros métodos.', 'zh': '脚本学旨在据见事后事。 近者研集事起,以决其事。 然少究整合外事以决之。 以吾观之,外事可以资外,若时若因果,以善知事而卜后事。 于是整合ASER(事)知识库,以助占候。 发一以检整合新法也。 于知识检索,于 ASER 中择外事。 于知识整合,三术整合外,推断出终报。 博用之多择叙事Cloze(MCNC)事之实验明,比诸他术,吾道最先进矣。', 'ja': 'スクリプト学習は、既存のイベントチェーンに従ってその後のイベントを予測することを目的としています。 最近の研究は、この問題を解決するための事象の共起に焦点を当てている。 しかし、この問題を解決するために外部事象知識を統合する研究はほとんどない。 当社の観察では、外部事象知識は、事象チェーンをよりよく理解し、適切な後続事象を予測するための時間的または因果的知識などの追加の知識を提供することができます。 この作業では、次のイベントを予測するのに役立つAser （ Activity、State、Events and their Relations ）ナレッジベースからのイベントナレッジを統合します。 知識検索段階と知識統合段階からなる新しいアプローチを提案します。 ナレッジ検索段階では、ASERから関連する外部イベントナレッジを選択します。 知識統合の段階では、外部知識をモデルに統合し、最終的な回答を推論するための3つの方法を提案します。 広く使用されているMulti - Choice Narrative Cloze （ MCNC ）タスクの実験では、私たちのアプローチが他の方法と比較して最先端のパフォーマンスを達成していることが示されています。', 'hi': 'स्क्रिप्ट सीखने का उद्देश्य मौजूदा घटना श्रृंखला के अनुसार बाद की घटना की भविष्यवाणी करना है। हाल के अध्ययन इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए घटना सह-घटना पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, कुछ अध्ययन इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए बाहरी घटना ज्ञान को एकीकृत करते हैं। हमारी टिप्पणियों के साथ, बाहरी घटना ज्ञान घटना श्रृंखला को बेहतर ढंग से समझने और सही बाद की घटना की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए अस्थायी या कारण ज्ञान जैसे अतिरिक्त ज्ञान प्रदान कर सकता है। इस काम में, हम एएसईआर (गतिविधियों, राज्यों, घटनाओं और उनके संबंधों) ज्ञान के आधार से घटना ज्ञान को एकीकृत करते हैं ताकि अगली घटना की भविष्यवाणी करने में मदद मिल सके। हम एक नए दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें ज्ञान पुनर्प्राप्ति चरण और ज्ञान एकीकरण चरण शामिल हैं। ज्ञान पुनर्प्राप्ति चरण में, हम ASER से प्रासंगिक बाहरी घटना ज्ञान का चयन करते हैं। ज्ञान एकीकरण चरण में, हम अपने मॉडल में बाहरी ज्ञान को एकीकृत करने और अंतिम उत्तरों का अनुमान लगाने के लिए तीन तरीकों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले बहु-विकल्प कथा क्लोज़ (MCNC) कार्य पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण अन्य तरीकों की तुलना में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Обучение скриптам направлено на прогнозирование последующего события в соответствии с существующей цепочкой событий. Недавние исследования сосредоточены на совместном возникновении событий для решения этой проблемы. Однако лишь немногие исследования включают знания о внешних событиях для решения этой проблемы. Благодаря нашим наблюдениям, знания о внешних событиях могут предоставить дополнительные знания, такие как временные или причинные знания, для лучшего понимания цепочки событий и прогнозирования правильного последующего события. В этой работе мы интегрируем знания о событиях из базы знаний ASER (Activity, States, Events and their Relations), чтобы помочь предсказать следующее событие. Мы предлагаем новый подход, состоящий из этапа извлечения знаний и этапа интеграции знаний. На этапе извлечения знаний мы выбираем соответствующие знания о внешних событиях из ASER. На этапе интеграции знаний мы предлагаем три метода интеграции внешних знаний в нашу модель и получения окончательных ответов. Эксперименты по широко используемой задаче Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) показывают, что наш подход достигает самой современной производительности по сравнению с другими методами.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag foghlaim scripte an t-imeacht ina dhiaidh sin a thuar de réir an tslabhra imeachtaí atá ann cheana féin. Díríonn staidéir le déanaí ar chomhtharlú imeachtaí chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach. Mar sin féin, is beag staidéar a chomhtháthaíonn eolas imeachtaí seachtracha chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach. Lenár gcuid tuairimí, is féidir le heolas ar imeachtaí seachtracha eolas breise a sholáthar mar eolas ama nó cúiseach chun slabhra na n-imeachtaí a thuiscint níos fearr agus an t-imeacht ceart ina dhiaidh sin a thuar. San obair seo, comhtháthaimid eolas imeachtaí ó bhunachar eolais ASER (Gníomhaíochtaí, Stáit, Imeachtaí agus a gCaidrimh) chun cuidiú leis an gcéad imeacht eile a thuar. Molaimid cur chuige nua a chuimseoidh an chéim aisghabhála eolais agus céim chomhtháthaithe an eolais. Sa chéim aisghabhála eolais, roghnaímid eolas imeachta seachtrach ábhartha ó ASER. Sa chéim chomhtháthaithe eolais, molaimid trí mhodh chun eolas seachtrach a chomhtháthú inár múnla agus tátail deiridh againn. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar an tasc a úsáidtear go forleathan Ilroghnacha Narrative Narative Cloze (MCNC) go mbaineann ár gcur chuige feidhmíocht den scoth amach i gcomparáid le modhanna eile.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση σεναρίων στοχεύει στην πρόβλεψη του επόμενου γεγονότος σύμφωνα με την υπάρχουσα αλυσίδα γεγονότων. Πρόσφατες μελέτες επικεντρώνονται στη συνύπαρξη συμβάντων για την επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος. Ωστόσο, λίγες μελέτες ενσωματώνουν τη γνώση εξωτερικών γεγονότων για να επιλύσουν αυτό το πρόβλημα. Με τις παρατηρήσεις μας, η γνώση εξωτερικών γεγονότων μπορεί να παρέχει πρόσθετες γνώσεις όπως χρονική ή αιτιώδη γνώση για την καλύτερη κατανόηση της αλυσίδας γεγονότων και την πρόβλεψη του σωστού επόμενου γεγονότος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, ενσωματώνουμε τη γνώση γεγονότων από τη βάση γνώσεων της για να βοηθήσουμε στην πρόβλεψη του επόμενου γεγονότος. Προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση που αποτελείται από στάδιο ανάκτησης γνώσης και στάδιο ολοκλήρωσης της γνώσης. Στο στάδιο ανάκτησης γνώσεων, επιλέγουμε σχετικές εξωτερικές γνώσεις γεγονότων από το ASER. Στο στάδιο ολοκλήρωσης της γνώσης, προτείνουμε τρεις μεθόδους για την ενσωμάτωση της εξωτερικής γνώσης στο μοντέλο μας και την εξαγωγή τελικών απαντήσεων. Τα πειράματα σχετικά με την ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενη εργασία αφήγησης πολλαπλών επιλογών δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε σύγκριση με άλλες μεθόδους.', 'hu': 'A szkript tanulás célja a következő esemény előrejelzése a meglévő eseménylánc szerint. A legutóbbi tanulmányok a probléma megoldása érdekében az események együttes előfordulására összpontosítanak. A probléma megoldásához azonban kevés tanulmány integrálja a külső eseményismereteket. Megfigyeléseink segítségével a külső eseményismeretek további tudást nyújthatnak, mint például időbeli vagy okozati ismeretek az eseménylánc jobb megértéséhez és a megfelelő későbbi esemény előrejelzéséhez. Ebben a munkában integráljuk az ASER (Tevékenységek, Államok, Események és Kapcsolataik) tudásbázisából származó eseményismereteket, hogy segítsünk előrejelezni a következő eseményt. Új megközelítést javasolunk, amely a tudás visszakeresési szakaszából és a tudás integrációjából áll. A tudáskeresés szakaszában az ASER-től kiválasztjuk a releváns külső eseményismereteket. A tudásintegrációs szakaszban három módszert javasolunk a külső tudás modellünkbe integrálására és a végső válaszok levonására. A széles körben használt Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) feladat kísérletei azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el más módszerekhez képest.', 'ka': 'სკრიპტის სწავლების მიზეზია შემდეგი მოვლენის შემდეგი მოვლენაზე, რომელიც არსებობს მოვლენაციის წერტილის შესახებ. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვება. მაგრამ, რამდენიმე კვლევები ამ პრობლემას გარეშე გარეშე მოვლენის ცნობილების ინტერგურაცია. ჩვენი მონაცემებით, გარეშე მოვლენების ცნობილებით შეუძლიათ დამატებული ცნობილება, როგორც ცნობილი ან წარმოადგენების ცნობილება მოვლენების წერტილის უფრო მეტი ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ASER-ის (აქტივიტებით, ქვეყნებით, მოვლენები და შესახებით) ცნობიერების ბაზის ინტერგურაციას შემდეგი მოვლენის წინახოთ. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი პროგორმა, რომელიც ცნობიერების მიღება და ცნობიერების ინტერგურაციის ფაეზით. მეცნიერების მიღება ფაეზში, ჩვენ ASER-დან შესაბამისი გარეშე მოვლენების ცნობიერება არჩევით. მეცნიერების ინტერგურაციის სტაციაში, ჩვენ სამი მეთოდის გარეშე მეცნიერების ინტერგურაციას ჩვენი მოდელში და დასაწყებას. გამოიყენება მრავალური გამოყენებული მრავალური მონიშნული ბრძანების (MCNC) რაოდენობის გამოყენებაში ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა გავაკეთება სხვა მეტისთან შედგომარებას.', 'it': "Lo script learning mira a prevedere l'evento successivo in base alla catena di eventi esistente. Studi recenti si concentrano sulla co-occorrenza di eventi per risolvere questo problema. Tuttavia, pochi studi integrano la conoscenza di eventi esterni per risolvere questo problema. Con le nostre osservazioni, la conoscenza degli eventi esterni può fornire ulteriori conoscenze come conoscenze temporali o causali per comprendere meglio la catena degli eventi e prevedere il giusto evento successivo. In questo lavoro, integriamo la conoscenza degli eventi dalla base di conoscenza ASER (Attività, Stati, Eventi e loro Relazioni) per aiutare a prevedere il prossimo evento. Proponiamo un nuovo approccio che consiste nella fase di recupero della conoscenza e nella fase di integrazione della conoscenza. Nella fase di recupero delle conoscenze, selezioniamo le conoscenze relative agli eventi esterni da ASER. Nella fase di integrazione della conoscenza, proponiamo tre metodi per integrare la conoscenza esterna nel nostro modello e dedurre le risposte finali. Esperimenti sull'ampiamente utilizzato compito Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) mostrano che il nostro approccio raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia rispetto ad altri metodi.", 'kk': 'Скрипттің оқиғаны бар оқиғалар тізбегіне сәйкес келесі оқиғаны таңдау үшін мақсатты. Жуырдағы зерттеулері осы мәселеді шешу үшін оқиғаларды біріктіру үшін көздеген. Бірақ бірнеше зерттеулер осы мәселеді шешу үшін сыртқы оқиға білімін біріктіреді. Оқиғаларымызды қарау үшін, сыртқы оқиғалардың біліміміз уақытша немесе себепті біліміміз, оқиғалардың тізбегін түсінуге жақсы және кейінгі оқиға Бұл жұмыста ASER (белсенділіктер, елдер, оқиғалар және олардың қатынастары) білім мәліметін біріктіру үшін келесі оқиғаны таңдау үшін көмектесеміз. Біз білім алу және білім интеграциялау сәйкестігінің жаңа қатынасын ұсынамыз. Білім алу кезегінде ASER- ден сыртқы оқиға мәліметін таңдаймыз. Бұл білім интеграциясында, сыртқы білімдерді моделімізге ендіру және соңғы жауаптарды төмендету үш әдістерді ұсынамыз. Көпшілікті қолданылатын көптеген таңдау наративті жабыс (MCNC) тапсырмасының тәжірибелері біздің тәжірибемізді басқа тәжірибелерімен салыстырып, әртүрлік күйінің', 'lt': 'Skripto mokymosi tikslas – numatyti tolesnį įvykį pagal esamą įvykių grandinę. Neseniai atliktuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama bendram įvykiui, siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą. Vis dėlto šiek tiek tyrimų apima išorės renginių žinias, kad būtų išspręsta ši problema. Mūsų stebėjimais išor ės renginių žinios gali suteikti papildomų žinių, pavyzdžiui, laikinųjų ar priežastinių žinių, kad būtų geriau suprantama renginių grandinė ir numatoma tinkama vėlesnė įvykis. Šiame darbe integruojame renginių žinias iš ASER (veiklos, valstybių, renginių ir jų santykių) žinių bazės, kad padėtume prognozuoti kitą renginį. Siūlome naują požiūrį, kurį sudaro žinių atkūrimo etapas ir žinių integracijos etapas. Žinių atkūrimo etape iš ASER pasirinksime atitinkamas išorines renginių žinias. Žinių integracijos etape siūlome tris metodus išorės žinioms integruoti į mūsų model į ir nustatyti galutinius atsakymus. Experiments on the widely-used Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.', 'mk': 'Научењето на сценарија има за цел предвидување на следниот настан според постојниот ланец на настани. Неодамнешните студии се фокусираат на соопштите настани за решавање на овој проблем. Сепак, неколку студии го интегрираат знаењето за надворешните настани за решавање на овој проблем. Со нашите набљудувања, надворешното знаење на настаните може да обезбеди дополнително знаење како што е временското или причинското знаење за подобро разбирање на ланецот на настаните и предвидување на вистинскиот следен настан. Во оваа работа, го интегрираме знаењето на настаните од АСЕР (Активности, Држави, настани и нивните односи) за да помогнеме во предвидувањето на следниот настан. Предложуваме нов пристап кој ќе се состои од фаза на преземање на знаењето и фаза на интеграција на знаењето. Во фазата на преземање на знаење, избираме релевантно надворешно знаење за настаните од АСЕР. In the knowledge integration stage, we propose three methods to integrate external knowledge into our model and infer final answers.  Experiments on the widely-used Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tal-iskripti għandu l-għan li jipprevedi l-avveniment sussegwenti skont il-katina tal-avvenimenti eżistenti. Studji reċenti jiffukaw fuq l-okkorrenza konġunta ta’ avvenimenti biex isolvu din il-problema. However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem.  Bl-osservazzjonijiet tagħna, l-għarfien estern tal-avvenimenti jista’ jipprovdi għarfien addizzjonali bħall-għarfien temporali jew kawżali għall-fehim aħjar tal-katina tal-avvenimenti u t-tbassir tal-avveniment sussegwenti t-tajjeb. F’dan ix-xogħol, nintegraw l-għarfien tal-avvenimenti mill-bażi tal-għarfien ASER (Attivitajiet, Stati, Avvenimenti u r-Relazzjonijiet tagħhom) biex jgħinu jipprevedu l-avveniment li jmiss. Aħna nipproponu approċċ ġdid li jikkonsisti fl-istadju tal-irkupru tal-għarfien u l-istadju tal-integrazzjoni tal-għarfien. Fl-istadju tal-ġbir tal-għarfien, aħna nagħżlu għarfien estern rilevanti tal-avvenimenti mill-ASER. In the knowledge integration stage, we propose three methods to integrate external knowledge into our model and infer final answers.  L-esperimenti dwar il-kompitu ta’ Għeluq Narrattiv Multigħażlu (MCNC) użat ħafna juru li l-approċċ tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata meta mqabbel ma’ metodi oħra.', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran skrip bermaksud meramalkan peristiwa berikutnya mengikut rantai peristiwa yang ada. kajian baru-baru ini fokus pada kejadian sambungan untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini. Namun, beberapa kajian mengintegrasikan pengetahuan peristiwa luar untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini. Dengan pengamatan kita, pengetahuan peristiwa luar boleh menyediakan pengetahuan tambahan seperti pengetahuan sementara atau penyebab untuk memahami rantai peristiwa lebih baik dan meramalkan peristiwa berikutnya yang betul. Dalam kerja ini, kami mengintegrasikan pengetahuan peristiwa dari dasar pengetahuan ASER (Aktiviti, Negeri, Peristiwa dan Hubungan mereka) untuk membantu meramalkan peristiwa berikutnya. Kami cadangkan pendekatan baru yang mengandungi tahap pemulihan pengetahuan dan tahap integrasi pengetahuan. Dalam tahap pemulihan pengetahuan, kita memilih pengetahuan peristiwa luar yang relevan dari ASER. Dalam tahap integrasi pengetahuan, kami cadangkan tiga kaedah untuk mengintegrasikan pengetahuan luar ke dalam model kami dan menyimpulkan jawapan akhir. Eksperimen pada tugas Cloze Narrative Multi-Choice (MCNC) yang digunakan secara luas menunjukkan pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dibandingkan dengan kaedah lain.', 'ml': 'സ്ക്രിപ്റ്റ് പഠിക്കുന്നത് നിലവിലുള്ള സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ ചങ്ങലപ്രകാരം പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള ലക ഈ പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കു എന്നാലും കുറച്ച് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നം പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d പുറത്തുള്ള സംഭവത്തിന്റെ അറിവ് ഒരുമിച്ചു നമ്മുടെ നോക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, പുറത്തുള്ള സംഭവത്തിന്റെ അറിവ് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d അറിവുകള്\u200d കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് സമയത്തിനോ കാ In this work, we integrate event knowledge from ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations) knowledge base to help predict the next event.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അറിവ് തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേജും അറിവ ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സ്റ്റേജില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അസേരില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട് ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവ് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിലേക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടാന്\u200d മൂന്നു രീതികള്\u200d നാം പ്ര വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല- തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന നാററിവ് ക്ലോസിന്\u200dറെ (MCNC) ജോലിയിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മറ്', 'pl': 'Uczenie się skryptów ma na celu przewidywanie kolejnego zdarzenia zgodnie z istniejącym łańcuchem zdarzeń. Ostatnie badania skupiają się na współwystępowaniu zdarzeń w celu rozwiązania tego problemu. Jednak niewiele badań integruje zewnętrzną wiedzę o zdarzeniach, aby rozwiązać ten problem. Dzięki naszym obserwacjom zewnętrzna wiedza o zdarzeniach może dostarczyć dodatkowej wiedzy, takiej jak wiedza czasowa lub przyczynowa, aby lepiej zrozumieć łańcuch zdarzeń i przewidywać właściwe kolejne zdarzenie. W tej pracy integrujemy wiedzę o wydarzeniach z bazy wiedzy ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations), aby pomóc przewidzieć kolejne zdarzenie. Proponujemy nowe podejście składające się z etapu pozyskiwania wiedzy i etapu integracji wiedzy. Na etapie pozyskiwania wiedzy wybieramy odpowiednią wiedzę zewnętrzną z ASER. Na etapie integracji wiedzy proponujemy trzy metody integracji wiedzy zewnętrznej z naszym modelem i wnioskowania ostatecznych odpowiedzi. Eksperymenty na szeroko stosowanym zadaniu Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) pokazują, że nasze podejście osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność w porównaniu z innymi metodami.', 'mn': 'Скрипт суралцах нь дараагийн үйл явдлыг суралцах үйл явдлын хэлхээнд таамаглах зорилго юм. Саяхан судалгаанууд энэ асуудлыг шийдэхэд үйл явдлын хамтдаа анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Гэхдээ хэд хэдэн судалгаа энэ асуудлыг шийдэхэд гадаад үйл явдлын мэдлэгийг нэгтгэдэг. Бидний ажигласнаар гадаад үйл явдлын мэдлэг нь үйл явдлын хэлхээ илүү сайн ойлгох болон дараагийн үйл явдлыг тодорхойлж чадна. Энэ ажлын тулд бид ASER-ын (үйл явдал, үйл явдал, үйл явдал, харилцаа) мэдлэгийг дараагийн үйл явдлыг таамаглах тулд нэгтгэдэг. Бид мэдлэгийг авах шатан, мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх шатан бүрдүүлдэг шинэ арга зам санал болгож байна. Мэдлэгийг авах шатанд бид ASER-ээс хамааралтай гадаад үйл явдлын мэдлэг сонгож байна. Мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх шатанд бид гадаад мэдлэгийг загвар руу нэгтгэх, төгсгөл хариултыг нийлүүлэх гурван арга загварыг сануулдаг. Мэдээж хэрэглэгдсэн олон сонголтын халдварлалтын (MCNC) даалгаварын туршилт нь бидний арга замыг бусад арга замыг харьцуулахад урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Skriptlæring må forhåndsvisa den følgjande hendinga etter den eksisterande hendingskjelden. Nyleg brukte studier fokuserer på samtidig hendingar for å løysa dette problemet. Men få studier integrerer eksterne hendingskvitning for å løysa dette problemet. Med observasjonane våre kan eksterne hendingskvitning gje tilleggsinnstillingar som tidsstyrre eller grunnleggjande kunnskap for å forstå hendingskkjede bedre og forventa det rette følgjande hendinga. I denne arbeiden integrerer vi hendingskvitning frå ASER (aktivitet, stat, hendingar og hendingar sine relasjonar) for å hjelpa å foregå neste hendinga. Vi foreslår ein ny tilnærming som inneheld av kunnskapsetasjon og kunnskapsetasjon. I staden for henting av kunnskap, vel vi relevant eksterne hendingskvitning frå ASER. I kunnskapsintegrateringsstaden foreslår vi tre metodar for å integrere eksterne kunnskaps i modellen våre og innføre endelige svar. Eksperimentane på det breidde brukte fleire valet narrative klokka (MCNC) oppgåva viser at tilnærminga vårt gjer tilstand til kunsten i sammenligning med andre metodar.', 'ro': 'Învățarea scripturilor își propune să prezică evenimentul ulterior în funcție de lanțul de evenimente existent. Studiile recente se concentrează pe evenimente comune pentru a rezolva această problemă. Cu toate acestea, puține studii integrează cunoștințele despre evenimente externe pentru a rezolva această problemă. Cu observațiile noastre, cunoașterea evenimentelor externe poate furniza cunoștințe suplimentare, cum ar fi cunoștințe temporale sau cauzale pentru a înțelege mai bine lanțul evenimentelor și pentru a anticipa evenimentul ulterior corect. În această lucrare, integrăm cunoștințele evenimentelor din baza de cunoștințe ASER (Activități, state, evenimente și relațiile lor) pentru a ajuta la prezicerea următorului eveniment. Propunem o nouă abordare constând în etapa de recuperare a cunoștințelor și etapa de integrare a cunoștințelor. În etapa de recuperare a cunoștințelor, selectăm cunoștințele relevante de evenimente externe de la ASER. În etapa de integrare a cunoștințelor, propunem trei metode de integrare a cunoștințelor externe în modelul nostru și de deducere a răspunsurilor finale. Experimentele efectuate pe scară largă în cadrul activității Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) arată că abordarea noastră obține performanțe de ultimă generație comparativ cu alte metode.', 'sr': 'Učenje skripta cilja je predviđati sljedeći događaj prema postojećem lancu događaja. Nedavno ispitivanje se fokusiralo na spojenost događaja kako bi rešio ovaj problem. Međutim, nekoliko studija integriše znanje vanjskih događaja kako bi riješilo ovaj problem. Uz naše primedbe, znanje vanjskih događaja može pružiti dodatne znanja kao temporalno ili uzrokovano znanje za bolje razumevanje lanca događaja i predviđanje pravog poslednjeg događaja. U ovom poslu integriramo znanje događaja iz ASER (aktivnosti, države, događaja i njihove odnose) baze znanja kako bi pomogli predvidjeti sledeći događaj. Predlažemo novi pristup koji se sastoji od faze povratka znanja i integracije znanja. U fazi povratka znanja, odaberemo relevantne znanje vanjskih događaja iz ASER-a. U fazi integracije znanja, predlažemo tri metode da integrišemo vanjske znanje u naš model i uvodimo konačne odgovore. Eksperimenti o široko korištenom zadatku mnogobrojnog narrativnog ključa (MCNC) pokazuju da naš pristup postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u usporedbi s drugim metodama.', 'si': 'ස්ක්\u200dරිප්ට් ඉගෙනගන්න අදහස් කරනවා පස්සේ සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ සිද්ධ වෙන්න සිද්ධ විදියට පස්සේ ස මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න අවස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන අවස්ථානය කරන්න. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න පුළුවන් අභ්\u200dයාස කිහිපයක් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විසඳන්න පුළු අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සමඟ, පුරුද්ගලික අවස්ථානය දන්න පුළුවන් අවස්ථාවක් නැති අවස්ථාවක් නැති අවස්ථාවක් වගේ අ මේ වැඩේදී, අපි ASER (ක්\u200dරියාත්මක, රාජ්\u200dය, අවස්ථාවක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක්) දැනගන්න අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුව අපි අලුත් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා දැනගන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය හා දැනගන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධ දැනගන්න පිළිගන්න ස්ථානයේදී, අපි ASER වලින් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතියෝජනය තේරුම් ගන්නවා. දැනගන්න ස්ථානයේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශය තුනක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක සහ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් අන්ත විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක්- තෝරාගැනීමක් නැරේටිව ක්\u200dලෝස් (MCNC) වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න අපේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරය', 'so': 'Waxbarashada qoraalka waxaa loogu talagalay inuu horumariyo dhacdooyinka soo socda sida silsilada dhacda oo kale. Waxbarashada soo dhowaaday waxay ku focus yihiin dhacdooyinka isla socda si ay u xalliyaan dhibaatadan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, wax yar oo waxbarasho ah ayaa waxay ku qabsadaan aqoonta dhacdooyinka dibadda si ay u xalliyaan dhibaatadan. Aragteenna, aqoonta dhacdooyinka dibadda waxay heli karaan aqoon dheeraad ah, sida waqti ama sabab u ah aqoonta waxgarashada dhacdooyinka ka wanaagsan iyo ka hor dhigi karaan dhacdooyinka saxda ah ee ugu dambeeya. Markaas waxan ayaannu aqoonta dhacdooyinka ka qabsanaynaa aasaaska aqoonta ee ASER (Activities, States, Events iyo xiriirkooda) si aynu uga caawinno horay u sii sheegno dhacdooyinka soo socda. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab cusub oo ka mid ah koritaanka aqoonta iyo heer la qabsashada aqoonta. Xaalada aqoonta la soo qabsado, waxaynu ka dooranaynaa aqoonta dhacdooyinka dibadda ee ASER. Xaalada la qabsashada aqoonta, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa saddex qaab oo aan aqoonta dibadda u dhigno modellkayaga iyo jawaabaha ugu dambeeya. Imtixaan ku saabsan shaqada kala duduwan ee loo isticmaalay (MCNC) waxay muujiyaan qaababkayaga uu sameynayo xaaladda farshaxanta, iyadoo la barbarbarata qaababka kale.', 'sv': 'Script learning syftar till att förutsäga den efterföljande händelsen enligt den befintliga händelsekedjan. Nyligen genomförda studier fokuserar på samtidig händelse för att lösa detta problem. Men få studier integrerar externa händelsekunskaper för att lösa detta problem. Med våra observationer kan kunskap om yttre händelser ge ytterligare kunskap såsom tids- eller orsakskunskap för att bättre förstå händelsekedjan och förutsäga rätt efterföljande händelse. I detta arbete integrerar vi händelsekunskap från ASER (Aktiviteter, stater, evenemang och deras relationer) kunskapsbas för att hjälpa till att förutsäga nästa händelse. Vi föreslår ett nytt tillvägagångssätt som består av kunskapsåtervinningsstadiet och kunskapsintegrationsstadiet. I kunskapshämtningsstadiet väljer vi relevant extern händelsekunskap från ASER. I kunskapsintegrationsstadiet föreslår vi tre metoder för att integrera extern kunskap i vår modell och härleda slutgiltiga svar. Experiment på den ofta använda funktionen Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår toppmoderna prestanda jämfört med andra metoder.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய நிகழ்வு சங்கிலியை பொருத்தி பின்வரும் நிகழ்வை முன்னோக்குவதற்கு குறுநிரல் கற்றுக் கொண் சமீபத்தில் படிப்புகள் இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய நிகழ்வுடன் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. ஆனால், சில ஆய்வுகள் இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய வெளி நிகழ்வு அறிவை ஒன்றாக்குகின்றன. எங்கள் பார்வைகளுடன், வெளி நிகழ்வு அறிவு கூடுதல் அறிவு கொடுக்க முடியும் நிகழ்வு சங்கிலியில் நல்லது புரிந்து கொள்ளும் கார இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ASER (செயல்பாடு நாம் அறிவு மீட்டெடுப்பு நிலையில் மற்றும் அறிவு ஒருங்கிணைப்பு முறையில் ஒரு புதிய முறையை பரிந்த அறிவு மீட்டெடுக்கும் நிலையில், நாம் ASER யில் இருந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வெளி நிகழ்வு அறிவை தேர அறிவு ஒருங்கிணைப்பு முறையில், நாம் மூன்று முறைகளை நம் மாதிரியில் உள்ள வெளி அறிவை ஒன்றிணைக்க முடியும் மற்றும அகலமாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பல- தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'اسکریپٹ کی تعلیم کا ارادہ ہے کہ موجود ہونے کے زنجیر کے مطابق اس کے بعد حادثہ کو پیش بینی کرے. اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے اخری مطالعہ کے ذریعہ منتظر ہونے کے لئے۔ However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem. ہماری نظر سے بیرونی حادثہ کا علم اس طرح اضافہ علم کرسکتا ہے جیسے موقت یا دلیل علم حادثہ زنجیر کو بہتر سمجھ سکتا ہے اور اس کے بعد درست حادثہ کی پیش بینی کرسکتا ہے. اس کام میں ہم ASER (فعالیتوں, ایالات متحدوں اور ان کے ارتباط) علم بنیاد سے اتنا علم کو جمع کررہے ہیں کہ اس کے بعد اتنا پیش آنے کی مدد کریں۔ ہم نے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو علم حاصل کرنے والی مرحلہ اور علم واصل کرنے والی مرحلہ میں ہے علم پھیرنے کی مرحلہ میں، ہم ASER سے معاملہ خارج حادثہ علم کو انتخاب کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اپنے ماڈل میں خارج علم کو جمع کرنے کے لئے تین طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں اور آخری جواب کے ذریعہ ذخیره کرنے کے لئے۔ اکثر سے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے بہت سی انتخاب ناراریٹی کلوز (MCNC) کے کام پر آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری تقریبا دوسری طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں موجود ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info Lekin, bir nechta o'qituvchilar bu muammolarni o'zgartirish uchun tashqi hodisa ta'limni birlashtiradi. Bizning taqdimotimiz bilan, tashqi hodisa ta'lim bilan, vaqt yoki sababni tushunish uchun qo'shimcha maʼlumot yordam beradi va keyingi hodisa yaxshi ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu ishda, biz keyingi hodisani oldin oldinga foydalanish uchun ASER (aktiviyatlar, davlatlar, hodisalar va bilan aloqalarni birlashtiramiz. Biz ilmiy olish darajasi va ilmiy ta'lim birlashtirish darajada yangi yo'l qilamiz. Faylni olish davomida, biz ASERdan muhim tashqi hodisa haqida tanlanamiz. Aʼlum birlashtirish darajada, biz uchta usulni modelmizga birlashtirish va oxirgi javoblarga kamaytirish uchun so'raymiz. Experiments on the widely-used Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.", 'vi': 'Văn bản học nhằm dự đoán sự kiện sau đó dựa theo chuỗi sự kiện đã có. Các nghiên cứu gần đây tập trung vào sự kiện xảy ra để giải quyết vấn đề này. Tuy nhiên, ít nghiên cứu hòa nhập kiến thức sự kiện bên ngoài để giải quyết vấn đề này. Với các quan sát của chúng tôi, kiến thức về sự kiện bên ngoài có thể cung cấp thêm kiến thức về thời gian hay hệ quả để hiểu rõ chuỗi sự kiện và dự đoán sự kiện sau đúng. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nhận thức các sự kiện từ ASER (các hoạt động, bang, sự kiện và hệ thống giao tiếp) để dự đoán các sự kiện tiếp theo. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới gồm giai đoạn thu thập tri thức và giai đoạn nhập kiến thức. Trong giai đoạn tìm kiếm kiến thức, chúng tôi chọn kiến thức về sự kiện bên ngoài liên quan từ ASER. Trong giai đoạn xây dựng kiến thức, chúng tôi đề xuất ba phương pháp hoà nhập kiến thức bên ngoài vào mẫu của chúng tôi và kết luận ra câu trả lời cuối cùng. Các thí nghiệm về công việc pha chế nhiều loại đa số sử dụng vượt trội (MCNC) cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được hiệu suất tối tân so với các phương pháp khác.', 'bg': 'Ученето на скриптове има за цел да предвиди следващото събитие според съществуващата верига събития. Последните проучвания се фокусират върху съвместното събитие за решаване на този проблем. Въпреки това, малко изследвания интегрират външни знания за събития за решаване на този проблем. С нашите наблюдения познанията за външни събития могат да предоставят допълнителни знания като времево или причинно-следствено знание за по-добро разбиране на веригата събития и предвиждане на правилното последващо събитие. В тази работа ние интегрираме знания за събития от базата знания на АСЕР (Дейности, държави, събития и техните отношения), за да спомогнем за предвиждането на следващото събитие. Предлагаме нов подход, състоящ се от етап на извличане на знания и етап на интеграция на знанията. В етапа на извличане на знания ние избираме съответните външни знания за събития от АСЕР. В етапа на интеграция на знанията предлагаме три метода за интегриране на външни знания в нашия модел и извеждане на окончателни отговори. Експериментите по широко използваната задача за многократен избор за разказване показват, че нашият подход постига най-съвременни резултати в сравнение с други методи.', 'nl': 'Script learning heeft als doel de volgende gebeurtenis te voorspellen volgens de bestaande gebeurtenisketen. Recente studies richten zich op incident co-incident om dit probleem op te lossen. Echter, weinig studies integreren externe event kennis om dit probleem op te lossen. Met onze waarnemingen kan externe gebeurteniskennis aanvullende kennis verschaffen, zoals temporele of causale kennis om gebeurtenisketen beter te begrijpen en de juiste volgende gebeurtenis te voorspellen. In dit werk integreren we evenementkennis uit ASER (Activiteiten, Staten, Evenementen en hun Relaties) kennisbasis om te helpen voorspellen welke gebeurtenis er volgt. We stellen een nieuwe aanpak voor bestaande uit kennisterugwinningsfase en kennisintegratiefase. In de kennisterugwinningsfase selecteren we relevante externe event kennis van ASER. In de kennisintegratiefase stellen we drie methoden voor om externe kennis in ons model te integreren en definitieve antwoorden uit te voeren. Experimenten met de veelgebruikte Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) taak tonen aan dat onze aanpak state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt in vergelijking met andere methoden.', 'da': 'Script learning har til formål at forudsige den efterfølgende begivenhed i henhold til den eksisterende begivenhedskæde. Nylige undersøgelser fokuserer på hændelse co-forekomst for at løse dette problem. Men få undersøgelser integrerer ekstern begivenhedskendskab for at løse dette problem. Med vores observationer kan viden om eksterne hændelser give ekstra viden som tidsmæssig eller årsagsmæssig viden til bedre at forstå hændelseskæden og forudsige den rigtige efterfølgende hændelse. I dette arbejde integrerer vi eventviden fra ASER (Aktiviteter, stater, begivenheder og deres relationer) vidensbase for at hjælpe med at forudsige den næste begivenhed. Vi foreslår en ny tilgang bestående af videnshentningsfase og videnintegrationsfase. I videnshentningsfasen udvælger vi relevant ekstern eventviden fra ASER. I videnintegrationsfasen foreslår vi tre metoder til at integrere ekstern viden i vores model og udlede endelige svar. Eksperimenter med den bredt anvendte Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) opgave viser, at vores tilgang opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne sammenlignet med andre metoder.', 'hr': 'Učenje skripta cilja je predvidjeti sljedeći događaj prema postojećem lancu događaja. U nedavnim ispitivanjima se fokusiraju na istodobnu pojavu događaja kako bi riješili ovaj problem. Međutim, nekoliko ispitivanja uključuju znanje vanjskih događaja za rješavanje ovog problema. Uz naše promatranje, znanje vanjskih događaja mogu pružiti dodatne znanja poput privremenog ili uzročnog znanja za bolje razumijevanje lanca događaja i predviđanje pravog sljedećeg događaja. U tom poslu integriramo znanje događaja iz ASER (aktivnosti, države, događaja i njihove odnose) baze znanja kako bi pomogli predvidjeti sljedeći događaj. Predlažemo novi pristup koji se sastoji od faze povratka znanja i integracije znanja. U fazi povratka znanja, odaberemo relevantne znanje vanjskih događaja iz ASER-a. U fazi integracije znanja predlažemo tri metode za integraciju vanjskih znanja u naš model i završne odgovore. Eksperimenti o široko korištenom zadatku mnogobrojnog narrativnog zatvora (MCNC) pokazuju da naš pristup postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u usporedbi s drugim metodama.', 'de': 'Script Learning zielt darauf ab, das nachfolgende Ereignis entsprechend der bestehenden Ereigniskette vorherzusagen. Aktuelle Studien konzentrieren sich auf das Zusammentreten von Ereignissen, um dieses Problem zu lösen. Nur wenige Studien integrieren externes Ereigniswissen, um dieses Problem zu lösen. Mit unseren Beobachtungen kann externes Ereigniswissen zusätzliches Wissen wie zeitliches oder kausales Wissen liefern, um Ereigniskette besser zu verstehen und das richtige Folgereignis vorherzusagen. In dieser Arbeit integrieren wir Veranstaltungswissen aus der ASER-Wissensdatenbank (Aktivitäten, Staaten, Veranstaltungen und ihre Beziehungen), um das nächste Ereignis vorherzusagen. Wir schlagen einen neuen Ansatz vor, der aus der Phase der Wissensgewinnung und der Phase der Wissensintegration besteht. In der Knowledge Retrieval Phase wählen wir relevantes externes Eventwissen aus ASER aus. In der Phase der Wissensintegration schlagen wir drei Methoden vor, um externes Wissen in unser Modell zu integrieren und daraus endgültige Antworten abzuleiten. Experimente an der weit verbreiteten Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) Aufgabe zeigen, dass unser Ansatz im Vergleich zu anderen Methoden State-of-the-Art Leistung erzielt.', 'id': 'Pelajaran skrip bermaksud untuk memprediksi peristiwa berikutnya menurut rantai peristiwa yang ada. Studi baru-baru ini fokus pada kejadian yang sama untuk memecahkan masalah ini. Namun, beberapa studi mengintegrasikan pengetahuan peristiwa luar untuk memecahkan masalah ini. Dengan pengamatan kami, pengetahuan peristiwa luar dapat menyediakan pengetahuan tambahan seperti pengetahuan temporal atau penyebab untuk memahami rantai peristiwa lebih baik dan memprediksi peristiwa berikutnya yang benar. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengintegrasikan pengetahuan peristiwa dari ASER (Aktivitas, Negara, Peristiwa dan Hubungan mereka) dasar pengetahuan untuk membantu memprediksi peristiwa berikutnya. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru yang terdiri dari tahap penemuan pengetahuan dan tahap integrasi pengetahuan. Dalam tahap penemuan pengetahuan, kita memilih pengetahuan peristiwa luar relevan dari ASER. Dalam tahap integrasi pengetahuan, kami mengusulkan tiga metode untuk mengintegrasi pengetahuan luar ke model kami dan menyimpulkan jawaban akhir. Experiments on the widely-used Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.', 'fa': 'یادگیری اسکریپت هدف دارد که رویداد بعدی را بر اساس زنجیر رویداد موجود پیش بینی کند. مطالعات اخیرا روی اتفاق همکاری رویداد برای حل این مشکل تمرکز می\u200cکند. با این حال، چند مطالعه\u200cهای خارجی دانش حادثه خارجی را برای حل این مشکل جمع می\u200cکند. با مشاهده\u200cهای ما، دانش حادثه خارجی می\u200cتواند دانش بیشتری را مثل دانش موقتی یا باعث دلایل برای فهم زنجیر حادثه بهتر و پیش\u200cبینی حادثه\u200cی سپس درست بدهد. در این کار، ما دانش حادثه را از بنیاد علمی ASER (فعالیت، ایالات متحده، حادثه و ارتباط آنها) برای پیش بینی حادثه بعدی تغییر می\u200cدهیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک دستور جدید که از مرحله\u200cای که از مرحله\u200cی بازیابی علم و جمع علم است. در مرحله گیری علم، ما دانش حادثه خارجی را از ASER انتخاب می کنیم. در مرحله جمع علم، ما سه روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا علم خارجی را در مدل خود جمع کنیم و پاسخ نهایی را کم کنیم. تجربه\u200cهایی در مورد مطالعه بسیاری از گزینه\u200cهای مختلف (MCNC) استفاده می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهد که طریقه\u200cی ما در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای دیگر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '스크립트 학습의 목적은 기존의 이벤트 체인에 따라 후속 이벤트를 예측하는 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 최근의 연구는 사건 공현에 집중되었다.그러나 외부 사건 지식을 통합시켜 이 문제를 해결하는 연구는 드물다.우리의 관찰을 통해 외부 사건 지식은 시간이나 인과 지식과 같은 추가 지식을 제공하여 사건 체인을 더욱 잘 이해하고 정확한 후속 사건을 예측할 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 ASER(활동, 상태, 사건과 그 관계) 지식 라이브러리의 사건 지식을 통합시켜 다음 사건을 예측하는 데 도움을 주었다.우리는 지식 검색 단계와 지식 집적 단계를 포함한 새로운 방법을 제시했다.지식 검색 단계에서 ASER에서 관련 외부 이벤트 지식을 선택합니다.지식 통합 단계에서 우리는 외부 지식을 우리의 모델에 통합시키고 최종 답안을 추론하는 세 가지 방법을 제시했다.광범위하게 사용되는 여러 가지 선택 서사완형충공(MCNC) 임무에서의 실험은 다른 방법에 비해 우리의 방법이 가장 선진적인 성능에 이르렀다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa script unakusudia kutabiri tukio hilo linalofuata kwa mujibu wa mfungwa wa tukio hilo. Tafiti za hivi karibuni zinajikita kwenye tukio la pamoja ili kutatua tatizo hili. However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem.  Kwa mtazamo wetu, maarifa ya tukio la nje yanaweza kutoa maarifa zaidi kama vile wakati wa muda au kwa sababu ya ufahamu wa matukio bora zaidi na kutabiri tukio sahihi la baadae. Katika kazi hii, tunaunganisha maarifa ya tukio kutoka ASER (Shughuli, Marekani, Matukio na uhusiano wao) ili kusaidia kutabiri tukio ijayo. Tunazipendekeza hatua mpya inayojumuisha jukwaa la kutafuta maarifa na jukwaa la kuunganisha maarifa. Katika jukwaa la kupata maarifa, tunachagua maarifa yanayohusiana na matukio ya nje kutoka ASER. Katika jukwaa la kuunganisha maarifa, tunapendekeza njia tatu za kuunganisha maarifa ya nje katika mifano yetu na majibu ya mwisho isiyo ya chini. Majaribio yanayotumika sana kwenye kundi la Uchaguzi wa Kimbalimbali (MCNC) zinaonyesha mbinu zetu zinafanikiwa hali ya utendaji wa sanaa ukilinganishwa na njia nyingine.', 'tr': "Skript öwrenmegi bolup geçýän hadysynyň yzyndaky hadysyny bar. Ýakynda öňki öwrenmeler şu meseleni çözmek üçin hasaplanýar. Ýöne az sany çözmek üçin daşaryk bolup bilmeleri çözmekde birleşdirýär. Görnüşlerimiz bilen daşarydaky bolup geçýän hadysalar bilen wagt ýaly ýöne sebäbi bilgileri bolup geçýän hadysalaryň zincirini gowy düşünmek we dogry yzyndaky bolup geçýän hadysalary öňe getirip biler. Bu işde, ASER-dan gelen bilim sistemasyny bilgi paýlaşyp bilgi paýlaşýarys. Bilim almak we bilim integrasy sahypasynda täze bir golf teklip edýäris. Bilim almak sahypasynda, ASER'dan daşarydaky hatlaryň bilgi saýlaýrys. Bilim birleşme sahnesinde, dışarıdaki bilimleri modelimize ve son cevaplarımıza dahil etmek üç yöntemi teklif ediyoruz. Ullanyş ulanylýan Multi-Saýlaw Narratiwny Cloze (MCNC) zadynyň bardygyny görüşýär. Biziň ýaryşymyz başga yönlere görä durum-sanat eserini ýeterleýär.", 'sq': 'Mësimi i skriptit synon të parashikojë ngjarjen e ardhshme sipas zinxhirit ekzistues të ngjarjeve. Studimet e fundit përqëndrohen në bashkëndodhjen e ngjarjeve për të zgjidhur këtë problem. However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem.  Me vëzhgimet tona, njohuritë e ngjarjeve të jashtme mund të ofrojnë njohuri shtesë si njohuritë e përkohshme apo shkakuese për kuptimin më të mirë të zinxhirit të ngjarjeve dhe parashikimin e ngjarjes së duhur më pas. Në këtë punë, ne integrojmë njohuritë e ngjarjeve nga baza e njohurive ASER për të ndihmuar parashikimin e ngjarjes tjetër. Ne propozojmë një qasje të re që përbëhet nga faza e marrjes së njohurive dhe faza e integrimit të njohurive. Në fazën e marrjes së njohurive, zgjedhim njohuritë e jashtme të ngjarjeve nga ASER. Në fazën e integrimit të njohurive, propozojmë tre metoda për të integruar njohuritë e jashtme në modelin tonë dhe për të përfshirë përgjigjet përfundimtare. Eksperimentet në detyrën e mbylljes së përdorur gjerësisht me zgjedhje të shumta narrative (MCNC) tregojnë se qasja jonë arrin shfaqjen më të lartë krahasuar me metodat e tjera.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ Recent studies focus on event co-occurrence to solve this problem.  ነገር ግን ጥቂቶች ትምህርት የውጭ ጉዳይ እውቀትን ለመፍታት ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ በተመለከትን የውጭ ጉዳይ እውቀት እንደ ሰዓት ወይም ምክንያት ለማስተዋል ሰንሰለት የሚሻል እና የመጨረሻው ቅንነት እውቀት እንዲቀበል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የሚቀጥለውን ጉዳይ ለመቀጠል እውቀትን ከASER (ተግባር፣ የአገራት፣ ሁኔታዎች እና ግንኙነታቸው) እናሳድጋለን፡፡ እውቀት ለማግኘት ደረጃ እና እውቀት ማሰናከል እና አዲስ ደረጃን እናሳስባለን፡፡ እውቀት ለማግኘት ደረጃዎች ውስጥ የውጭ ጉዳይ እውቀት ከASER ተመርጠናል፡፡ እውቀት ማሰናከል፣ የውጭ እውቀትን ወደ ሞዴል እና የመጨረሻውን መልስ ለመቀላቀል ሦስት መንገዶች እናሳስባለን፡፡ የብዙ ምርጫ ቀለሞች (MCNC) ስራ ማድረግ ላይ የሚጠቀሙትን ፈተናዎች ልማድ ከሌሎች ልማዶች ጋር ይደረጋል፡፡', 'af': "Skrip leer doel om die volgende gebeurtenis te voorskou volgens die bestaande gebeurtenis ketting. Onlangse studie fokus op gebeurtenis saam- voorkoms om hierdie probleem te los. Maar sommige studie integreer eksterne gebeurtenis kennis om hierdie probleem te los. Met ons opmerking kan eksterne gebeurtenis kennis byvoorskaf eksterne kennis soos tydelike of oorsaaklike kennis vir verstaan gebeurtenis ketting beter en die regte volgende gebeurtenis voorskou. In hierdie werk integreer ons gebeurtenis kennis van ASER (Aktiwiteite, Staties, Events en hul Relasies) kennisbasis om die volgende gebeurtenis te voorskou. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe toegang wat bestaan van kennis ontvang stadium en kennis integrasie stadium. In die kennis ontvang stadium, kies ons relevante eksterne gebeurtenis kennis van ASER. In die kennis integrasie stadium, voorstel ons drie metodes om eksterne kennis in ons model te integreer en die eindelike antwoordes te bring. Experiments on the widely-used Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.", 'bn': 'স্ক্রিপ্ট শিক্ষা বিদ্যমান অনুষ্ঠানের অনুসারে পরবর্তী অনুষ্ঠানের প্রতি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার লক্ষ্য রয়েছ সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য অনুষ্ঠানের সাথে সংঘটিত ঘটনার উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem.  আমাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি নিয়ে বাইরের অনুষ্ঠানের জ্ঞান বা সাময়িক বা কারণের কারণে জ্ঞান প্রদান করতে পারে যেমন অনুষ্ঠানের শিকলের ভা এই কাজে আমরা আসার (কার্যক্রম, রাষ্ট্র, ঘটনা এবং তাদের সম্পর্ক) থেকে অনুষ্ঠানের জ্ঞান একত্রিত করি পরবর্তী অনুষ্ঠানের ভবিষ্যতের জন আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে জ্ঞান পুনরুদ্ধার স্তর এবং জ্ঞান সম্পূর্ণ পর্যায়ে। জ্ঞান পুনরুদ্ধারের পর্যায়ে আমরা বাইরের বিভিন্ন অনুষ্ঠানের জ্ঞান নির্বাচন করি। জ্ঞানের একত্রিত পর্যায়ে আমরা তিনটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি আমাদের মডেলে বাইরের জ্ঞান একত্রিত করার এবং চূড়ান্ত শেষ উত্তরের ব্যবহৃত বহুবিশেষ ন্যারেটিভ ক্লোজ (এমসিএনসি) কাজের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ অন্যান্য পদ্ধতির তুলনায় আমাদের প্রক্রিয়া', 'hy': 'Սգիպտային ուսումնասիրությունը նպատակում է կանխատեսել հետագա իրադարձությունները ըստ գոյություն ունեցող իրադարձությունների շղթայի: Վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները կենտրոնանում են այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար իրադարձությունների համապատասխանատվության վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, մի քանի ուսումնասիրություններ ինտեգրում են արտաքին իրադարձությունների գիտելիքները այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Մեր հետազոտությունների միջոցով արտաքին իրադարձությունների գիտելիքները կարող են ապահովել ավելին գիտելիքներ, ինչպիսիք են ժամանակական կամ պատճառային գիտելիքները, որպեսզի ավելի լավ հասկանանք իրադարձությունների շղթան և կանխատեսենք ճի Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ինտեգրում ենք իրադարձությունների գիտելիքները ASER-ից (Ակտիվություններ, Նահանգներ, իրադարձություններ և նրանց հարաբերություններ) գիտելիքների հիմքում, որպեսզի օգնենք կանխատեսել հաջորդ իրադարձությունները: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոտեցում, որը կազմված է գիտելիքների վերադարձման և գիտելիքների ինտեգրացման փուլում: Գիտերի վերադարձման փուլում մենք ASER-ից ընտրում ենք արտաքին իրադարձությունների տեղեկությունը: In the knowledge integration stage, we propose three methods to integrate external knowledge into our model and infer final answers.  Մեր մոտեցումը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին համեմատած այլ մեթոդների հետ:', 'az': 'Skript öyrənməsi, həmin vaxt zinciri ilə sonrakı olaraq gələni təmin etmək istəyir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün son təhsil işləri olaraq təhsil edilməyə başlayır. Lakin bu problemi çəkmək üçün çox az təhsil istifadə edir. Gözlərimiz ilə, dış olaraq bilgi zamanla və ya səbəb bilgi kimi istifadə etmək üçün daha yaxşı və sonradan doğru olaraq tədbir edə bilər. Bu işdə, sonraki olaraq öyrənməyə yardım etmək üçün ASER (Etkinlik, Eyalet, Vaqialar və İlişkilərin) elmi tərəfindən olaraq olaraq bilgi birləşdiririk. Biz elm alması və elm integrasyonu tərəfindən olan yeni bir tərəfə təklif edirik. Bilim alma sahəsində, ASER-dən bağlı dış olaraq bilgi seçirik. Bilim integrasiya səviyyəsində, çətin bilgilərimizi modellərimizə birləşdirmək və son cavablarımıza qatmaq üçün üç yol təklif edirik. Çoxlu-seçilmiş çoxlu Narrativ Cloze (MCNC) təcrübələrinin təcrübələri bizim təcrübəmizin başqa metodlarına salınması ilə müxtəlif təcrübələrimizi göstərir.', 'bs': 'Učenje skripta cilja je predvidjeti sljedeći događaj prema postojećem lancu događaja. U nedavnim ispitivanjima se fokusiraju na spojenu događaja kako bi riješili ovaj problem. Međutim, nekoliko studija integriraju znanje vanjskih događaja kako bi riješilo ovaj problem. Uz naše primedbe, znanje vanjskih događaja može pružiti dodatne znanja poput privremenog ili uzrokovanog znanja za bolje razumijevanje lanca događaja i predviđanje pravog sljedećeg događaja. U ovom poslu integriramo znanje događaja iz ASER (aktivnosti, države, događaja i njihove odnose) baze znanja kako bi pomogli predvidjeti sljedeći događaj. Predlažemo novi pristup koji se sastoji od faze povratka znanja i integracije znanja. U fazi povratka znanja, odaberemo relevantne znanje vanjskih događaja iz ASER-a. U fazi integracije znanja predlažemo tri metode za integraciju vanjskih znanja u naš model i završne odgovore. Eksperimenti o široko korištenom zadatku mnogobrojnog narkotičnog zatvora (MCNC) pokazuju da naš pristup postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u usporedbi s drugim metodama.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge d'escriptures té l'objectiu de predir l'esdeveniment segons la cadena d'esdeveniments existent. Els estudis recents es centren en la coincidència d'events per resoldre aquest problema. Però pocs estudis integran coneixements externs per resoldre aquest problema. Amb les nostres observacions, el coneixement extern d'events pot proporcionar coneixements adicionals com el coneixement temporal o causal per a entendre millor la cadena d'events i predir l'evento posterior correcte. En aquesta feina, integram el coneixement dels events de la base de coneixements ASER (Activitats, Estats, Events i les seves Relacions) per ajudar a predir el següent evento. We propose a new approach consisting of knowledge retrieval stage and knowledge integration stage.  A l'etapa de recuperació del coneixement, seleccionem coneixements externs pertinents de l'ASER. En l'etapa d'integració del coneixement, proposem tres mètodes per integrar el coneixement extern en el nostre model i inferir respostes finals. Els experiments sobre la tasca Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) utilitzada mostran que el nostre enfocament aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat comparat amb altres mètodes.", 'cs': 'Cílem učení skriptů je předpovědět následnou událost podle stávajícího řetězce událostí. Nedávné studie se zaměřují na současný výskyt událostí k řešení tohoto problému. Nicméně málo studií integruje externí znalosti událostí k řešení tohoto problému. Díky našim pozorováním mohou znalosti externích událostí poskytnout další znalosti, jako jsou časové nebo kauzální znalosti pro lepší porozumění řetězce událostí a předpověď správné následné události. V této práci integrujeme znalosti o událostech ze znalostní báze ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations), abychom pomohli předpovědět další událost. Navrhujeme nový přístup sestávající z fáze vyhledávání znalostí a fáze integrace znalostí. Ve fázi vyhledávání znalostí vybíráme relevantní externí znalosti z ASER. Ve fázi integrace znalostí navrhujeme tři metody pro integraci externích znalostí do našeho modelu a odvození konečných odpovědí. Experimenty na široce používaném úkolu Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) ukazují, že náš přístup dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů ve srovnání s jinými metodami.', 'et': 'Skriptide õppe eesmärk on ennustada järgnevat sündmust vastavalt olemasolevale sündmuste ahelale. Hiljutised uuringud keskenduvad sündmuste koosesinemisele selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Kuid vähesed uuringud integreerivad väliseid sündmuste teadmisi selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Meie tähelepanekutega võivad välised sündmuste teadmised anda täiendavaid teadmisi nagu ajalised või põhjuslikud teadmised sündmuste ahela paremaks mõistmiseks ja õige järgneva sündmuse prognoosimiseks. Selles töös integreerime ASERi (tegevused, riigid, sündmused ja nende suhted) teadmistebaasi ürituste teadmised, et aidata prognoosida järgmist sündmust. Pakume välja uue lähenemisviisi, mis hõlmab teadmiste hankimise etappi ja teadmiste integreerimise etappi. Teadmiste hankimise etapis valime ASERi asjakohased välised sündmuste teadmised. Teadmiste integreerimise etapis pakume välja kolm meetodit välisteadmiste integreerimiseks meie mudelisse ja lõplike vastuste järeldamiseks. Laialdaselt kasutatava Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) ülesande eksperimendid näitavad, et meie lähenemine saavutab teiste meetoditega võrreldes kaasaegse jõudluse.', 'fi': 'Skriptioppimisen tavoitteena on ennustaa seuraava tapahtuma olemassa olevan tapahtumaketjun mukaan. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset keskittyvät tapahtumien rinnakkaisesiintymiseen ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Kuitenkin harvat tutkimukset yhdistävät ulkoista tapahtumatietoa ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Havaintojemme avulla ulkoinen tapahtumatieto voi tarjota lisätietoa, kuten ajallista tai kausaalista tietoa tapahtumaketjun ymmärtämiseksi paremmin ja oikean myöhemmän tapahtuman ennustamiseksi. Tässä työssä integroimme ASER (Activities, States, Events and their Relations) -tietopohjan tapahtumatiedot seuraavan tapahtuman ennakoimiseksi. Ehdotamme uutta lähestymistapaa, joka koostuu tiedonhakuvaiheesta ja tiedon integroinnista. Tiedonhaun vaiheessa valitsemme ASERin ulkopuolisen tapahtumatiedon. Osaamisen integrointivaiheessa ehdotamme kolmea menetelmää ulkoisen tiedon integroimiseksi malliimme ja lopullisten vastausten löytämiseksi. Kokeet laajasti käytetyssä Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) -tehtävässä osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn muihin menetelmiin verrattuna.', 'sk': 'Cilj učenja skripta je napovedati naslednji dogodek glede na obstoječo verigo dogodkov. Nedavne študije se osredotočajo na soobstoj dogodkov za reševanje tega problema. Vendar pa le malo študij vključuje zunanje znanje o dogodkih za reševanje tega problema. Z našimi opazovanji lahko zunanje znanje o dogodkih zagotovi dodatno znanje, kot je časovno ali vzročno znanje za boljše razumevanje verige dogodkov in napovedovanje pravega naslednjega dogodka. V tem delu vključujemo znanje o dogodkih iz baze znanja ASER (Aktivnosti, države, dogodki in njihovi odnosi), da pomagamo napovedati naslednji dogodek. Predlagamo nov pristop, ki ga sestavljata faza pridobivanja znanja in faza integracije znanja. V fazi pridobivanja znanja izberemo relevantno zunanje znanje o dogodkih iz ASER. V fazi integracije znanja predlagamo tri metode za integracijo zunanjega znanja v naš model in sklepanje končnih odgovorov. Eksperimenti na široko uporabljeni nalogi Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) kažejo, da naš pristop dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti v primerjavi z drugimi metodami.', 'ha': "Suna karanta littafin shine yana ƙayyade ka gabatar da jigon wani abu wanda ke gaba da buƙata. Recent studies focus on event co-occurrence to solve this problem.  A lokacin da, karatun kaɗan sun haɗa ma'ani na baka zuwa solar wannan muammo. Ga gannainmu, sanin nan bakin tana iya ƙara da ilmi kamar zaman kashi ko sababin sanin da za'a yi fahimta wani biryoyi ta fi alhẽri kuma ya yi bayani ga halin bayan. Daga wannan aikin, muna haɗa da ilmi na al'amarin daga AsER (Active, Countries, Houmai da Links da Relatikinsu) dõmin mu yi taimako da ka gabani ga birnin nan ƙarshe. Munã goyya da wata hanyoyi na samun ta samun ta sami cikin jarrabi na ilmi. Kuma a cikin juyin ta samu'a ga ilmi, za mu zãɓe ilmi na bakin da ke da muhimmi daga ANER. Ga juyin ta haɗi da ilmi, Munã buɗa hanyõyi uku dõmin su haɗi ilmi bakin zuwa misalinmu da masu ƙaranci. Tajararin da aka yi amfani da wa aikin ƙwarai Narrative Kwamfyuta mai yawa (MCNC) za'a nuna hanyarmu zuwa halin-art da sami'a da wasu hanyõyi.", 'jv': 'Common tab politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Gambar Kemerdekaan anyar, bongkin nglanggar Kemerdekaan dianggap luwih hayo Gambar Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné beraksi akèh saben nêmên dengané karo ASAR (Aksi, Stadiun, Aksi lan Gambaran) kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno eventung nêmên. Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem anyar sing sumulakno ning awak dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang awak dhéwé. Slackfree Awak dhéwé éntuk entekaké awak dhéwé, ning ngerasai telu method kanggo nyebuté kesempatan karo model karo ingkang sampek mulai. Ombudhakan langgambar sistem sing gambar nggawe Multi-Select Narratve Close (XMNK) nggawe bener ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno state-of-the-arts seneng pisan karo pertama sing wis ngerasakno.', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་ཡིག ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཆ་བཀལ་བ་འདི་ཆ་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཕྱི་རིག་གནས་ཚུལ་ཉུང་ཉུང་མཉམ་དུ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། With our observations, external event knowledge can provide additional knowledge like temporal or causal knowledge for understanding event chain better and predicting the right subsequent event. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ASER(བྱ་འགུལ་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ནས་ཤེས་པའི་རྐྱེན་ཆ་ར ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚད་ལྷན་ཁང་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་གསརཔ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In the knowledge retrieval stage, we select relevant external event knowledge from ASER. ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསུམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། widely used Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC)task(experiments) on the widely used Multi-Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC)task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.', 'he': 'Script learning aims to predict the subsequent event according to the existing event chain.  מחקרים האחרונים מתמקדים באירועים שיתופים כדי לפתור את הבעיה הזאת. However, few studies integrate external event knowledge to solve this problem.  עם העקבות שלנו, ידע אירועים חיצוניים יכול לספק ידע נוסף כמו ידע זמני או גורמי להבין את שרשרת אירועים טוב יותר ולחזות את האירוע הנכון לאחר מכן. בעבודה הזאת, אנו משתלבים ידע אירועים מ ASER (פעילות, ארצות הברית, אירועים ומערכת היחסים שלהם) בסיס ידע כדי לעזור לחזות את האירוע הבא. אנו מציעים גישה חדשה שמכילה בשלב ההחזרה של ידע ובשלב האינטגרציה של ידע. בשלב ההחזרה של הידע, אנחנו בוחרים מידע חיצוני רלוונטי מאיזר. בשלב האינטגרציה של הידע, אנו מציעים שלוש שיטות להשתלב הידע החיצוני למודל שלנו ולהוצאת תשובות סופיות. Experiments on the widely-used Multi- Choice Narrative Cloze (MCNC) task show our approach achieves state-of-the-art performance compared to other methods.'}
{'en': 'Heterogeneous Graph Neural Networks to Predict What Happen Next', 'ar': 'الشبكات العصبية غير المتجانسة للرسم البياني للتنبؤ بما سيحدث بعد ذلك', 'fr': 'Réseaux de neurones à graphes hétérogènes pour prévoir ce qui se passera ensuite', 'es': 'Redes neuronales de gráficos heterogéneos para predecir qué sucederá después', 'pt': 'Redes neurais de gráficos heterogêneos para prever o que acontecerá a seguir', 'ja': '次に起こることを予測する異種グラフニューラルネットワーク', 'ru': 'Нейронные сети гетерогенного графа для предсказания того, что произойдет дальше', 'zh': '异构图神经网络占接之', 'hi': 'विषम ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए क्या आगे होता है', 'ga': 'Líonraí Néaracha Grafa Ilchineálacha le Tuar Cad a Tharlaíonn Eile', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Heterogén grafikus neurális hálózatok, hogy megjósolják, mi történik a következő', 'el': 'Ετερογενή γραφήματα Νευρικά Δίκτυα για να προβλέψουν τι θα συμβεί στη συνέχεια', 'it': 'Reti neurali eterogene del grafico per prevedere cosa accadrà dopo', 'kk': 'Келесіден болғанын таңдау үшін Heterogeneous Graph Neural Networks', 'mk': 'Хетерогенски графски неврални мрежи за предвидување на она што ќе се случи следно', 'lt': 'Heterogeniniai grafiniai neurologiniai tinklai prognozuoti tolesnį įvykį', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Neural Graf Heterogeneus untuk meramalkan apa yang berlaku selanjutnya', 'ml': 'പിന്നീട് എന്താണ് തുറക്കുന്നതെന്ന് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാനുള്ള ഹെറോജെന്നിയുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് നെയുറല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Netwerks newrali eteroġeniċi ta’ Grafika biex jipprevedu x’iseħħ wara', 'mn': 'Хетероген график сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээлүүд дараагийн юу болсон бэ гэхэд', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Heterogeniji graf neuronske mreže da predvidi šta se desilo sledeće', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale heterogene grafice pentru a anticipa ce se întâmplă în continuare', 'si': 'හෙට්\u200dරෝජෙනියෝස් ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලවාර්ක්ස් වලට මොකක්ද ඊළඟ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ?', 'pl': 'Heterogenny wykres sieci neuronowych, aby przewidzieć, co się stanie dalej', 'sv': 'Heterogena grafneurala nätverk för att förutsäga vad som händer härnäst', 'so': 'Internetka Neural ee Heterogeneous Graph Neural to Predict What Happen Next', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'اگلے کیا ہوا؟', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Nam tính dị sắc tính mạng thần kinh cho việc xảy ra tiếp theo', 'bg': 'Хетерогенни графични неврални мрежи, за да се предскаже какво ще се случи след това', 'nl': 'Heterogene Grafische Neurale Netwerken om te voorspellen wat er daarna gebeurt', 'da': 'Heterogene graf neurale netværk til at forudsige, hvad der sker næste', 'hr': 'Heterogenija grafa neurone mreže za predviđanje što se dogodilo sljedeće', 'ko': '이류도 신경 네트워크는 앞으로 무슨 일이 일어날지 예측한다', 'id': 'Heterogeneous Graph Neural Networks to Predict What Happen Next', 'de': 'Heterogene Graphen Neuronale Netzwerke zur Vorhersage des nächsten Geschehens', 'tr': 'Sonraki', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی گراف هترogeneous Graph برای پیش\u200cبینی چه اتفاقی بعد افتاد', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Neural wa Graph', 'hy': 'Հետրոգեն գրաֆիկ նեյրոնային ցանցեր, որոնք պատկերացնում են, թե ինչ է տեղի ունենում հետո,', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Daha sonra n톛y톛 g톛ldiyini 칬yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n Heterogeneous Graf N칬ral Netikl톛ri', 'sq': 'Rrjete neuronale heterogjene per te parashikuar cfare ndodhi me pas', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'Heterogeneous Graph Neural Networks to Predict What Happen Next', 'bs': 'Heterogeniji graf neuronske mreže da predvidi šta se desilo sljedeće', 'ca': 'Heterogeneous Graph Neural Networks to Predict What Happen Next', 'fi': 'Heterogeeniset graafiset hermoverkot ennustamaan mitä tapahtuu seuraavaksi', 'cs': 'Heterogenní graf neuronové sítě k předpovědi, co se stane dál', 'et': 'Heterogeensed graafilised neurovõrgud, et ennustada, mis juhtub järgmisena', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'רשתות נוירוליות גרפיות היטרוגניות כדי לחזות מה קרה הבאה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Heterogenega grafičnega živčnega omrežja za napoved, kaj se bo zgodilo naslednje', 'bo': 'Heterogeneous Graph Neural Networks to Predict What Happen Next'}
{'en': 'Given an incomplete event chain, script learning aims to predict the missing event, which can support a series of NLP applications. Existing work can not well represent the heterogeneous relations and capture the discontinuous event segments that are common in the event chain. To address these issues, we introduce a heterogeneous-event (HeterEvent) graph network. In particular, we employ each unique word and individual event as nodes in the graph, and explore three kinds of edges based on realistic relations (e.g., the relations of word-and-word, word-and-event, event-and-event). We also design a message passing process to realize information interactions among homo or heterogeneous nodes. And the discontinuous event segments could be explicitly modeled by finding the specific path between corresponding nodes in the graph. The experimental results on one-step and multi-step inference tasks demonstrate that our ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E ] can outperform existing baselines.', 'ar': 'نظرًا لسلسلة الأحداث غير المكتملة ، يهدف تعلم البرنامج النصي إلى التنبؤ بالحدث المفقود ، والذي يمكن أن يدعم سلسلة من تطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. لا يمكن أن يمثل العمل الحالي العلاقات غير المتجانسة جيدًا ويلتقط مقاطع الأحداث غير المستمرة الشائعة في سلسلة الحدث. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقدم شبكة رسم بياني ذات أحداث غير متجانسة (HeterEvent). على وجه الخصوص ، نستخدم كل كلمة فريدة وحدث فردي كعقد في الرسم البياني ، ونستكشف ثلاثة أنواع من الحواف بناءً على العلاقات الواقعية (على سبيل المثال ، العلاقات بين الكلمة والكلمة والكلمة والحدث والحدث والحدث ). نقوم أيضًا بتصميم عملية تمرير الرسائل لتحقيق تفاعلات المعلومات بين العقد المتجانسة أو غير المتجانسة. ويمكن نمذجة مقاطع الأحداث غير المستمرة بشكل صريح من خلال إيجاد المسار المحدد بين العقد المقابلة في الرسم البياني. توضح النتائج التجريبية لمهام الاستدلال ذات الخطوة الواحدة والمتعددة الخطوات أن نموذج المجموعة الخاص بنا HeterEvent [W + E] يمكن أن يتفوق على خطوط الأساس الحالية.', 'es': 'Dada una cadena de eventos incompleta, el aprendizaje de guiones tiene como objetivo predecir el evento faltante, lo que puede admitir una serie de aplicaciones de PNL. El trabajo existente no puede representar bien las relaciones heterogéneas y capturar los segmentos de eventos discontinuos que son comunes en la cadena de eventos. Para abordar estos problemas, presentamos una red de gráficos de eventos heterogéneos (HeterEvent). En particular, empleamos cada palabra única y cada evento individual como nodos en el gráfico, y exploramos tres tipos de bordes basados en relaciones realistas (por ejemplo, las relaciones de palabra y palabra, palabra y evento, evento y evento). También diseñamos un proceso de transmisión de mensajes para realizar interacciones de información entre nodos homo o heterogéneos. Y los segmentos de eventos discontinuos podrían modelarse explícitamente encontrando la ruta específica entre los nodos correspondientes en el gráfico. Los resultados experimentales de las tareas de inferencia de uno y varios pasos demuestran que nuestro modelo de conjunto HeterEvent [W+E] puede superar a las líneas de base existentes.', 'fr': "Compte tenu d'une chaîne d'événements incomplète, l'apprentissage des scripts vise à prédire l'événement manquant, ce qui peut prendre en charge une série d'applications de PNL. Les travaux existants ne peuvent pas bien représenter les relations hétérogènes et capturer les segments d'événements discontinus qui sont courants dans la chaîne d'événements. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous introduisons un réseau de graphes d'événements hétérogènes (HeterEvent). En particulier, nous utilisons chaque mot unique et chaque événement individuel comme nœuds dans le graphique, et nous explorons trois types d'arêtes en fonction de relations réalistes (par exemple, les relations mot-mot, mot-événement, événement-événement). Nous concevons également un processus de transmission de messages pour réaliser des interactions d'informations entre des nœuds homo ou hétérogènes. Les segments d'événements discontinus peuvent être modélisés de manière explicite en trouvant le chemin spécifique entre les nœuds correspondants dans le graphique. Les résultats expérimentaux sur les tâches d'inférence en une étape et en plusieurs étapes démontrent que notre modèle d'ensemble HeterEvent [W+E] peut surpasser les niveaux de référence existants.", 'pt': 'Dada uma cadeia de eventos incompleta, o aprendizado de script visa prever o evento ausente, o que pode dar suporte a uma série de aplicativos de NLP. O trabalho existente não pode representar bem as relações heterogêneas e capturar os segmentos de eventos descontínuos que são comuns na cadeia de eventos. Para resolver esses problemas, apresentamos uma rede de grafos de eventos heterogêneos (HeterEvent). Em particular, empregamos cada palavra única e cada evento individual como nós no grafo e exploramos três tipos de arestas com base em relações realistas (por exemplo, as relações de palavra-e-palavra, palavra-e-evento, evento-e-evento). ). Também projetamos um processo de passagem de mensagens para realizar interações de informações entre nós homo ou heterogêneos. E os segmentos de eventos descontínuos podem ser modelados explicitamente encontrando o caminho específico entre os nós correspondentes no gráfico. Os resultados experimentais em tarefas de inferência de uma etapa e várias etapas demonstram que nosso modelo de conjunto HeterEvent[W+E] pode superar as linhas de base existentes.', 'ja': '不完全なイベントチェーンを考えると、スクリプト学習は、一連のNLPアプリケーションをサポートできる欠落イベントを予測することを目的としています。既存の作業は、異種の関係をうまく表現し、イベントチェーンで一般的な不連続なイベントセグメントを取り込むことはできません。これらの問題に対処するために、異種イベント（ HeterEvent ）グラフネットワークを導入します。特に、各固有の単語および個々のイベントをグラフのノードとして使用し、現実的な関係（例えば、単語と単語の関係、単語とイベント、イベントとイベントの関係）に基づいて3種類のエッジを探索します。また、ホモノードまたは異種ノード間の情報相互作用を実現するためのメッセージパッシングプロセスも設計しています。そして、不連続なイベントセグメントは、グラフ内の対応するノード間の特定の経路を見つけることによって明示的にモデル化することができる。ワンステップおよびマルチステップ推論タスクの実験結果は、当社のアンサンブルモデルHeterEvent [W + E]が既存のベースラインを上回ることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '给定一不完之事,脚本学旨在占阙,可以支一系NLP应用程序。 今事无以善异构而捕事链中常见者不连事。 为此一异构事(HeterEvent)图网络。 唯一之单词,与一事之节点,以今(之,单词与单词,单词与事,事与事)求三边。 设一消息,以成同构异构节点之信。 不连事可寻节点特定径来显式建模。 一步一实验结果表明,合为模样HeterEvent[W+E]可以优现基线。', 'hi': 'एक अपूर्ण घटना श्रृंखला को देखते हुए, स्क्रिप्ट लर्निंग का उद्देश्य लापता घटना की भविष्यवाणी करना है, जो एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों की एक श्रृंखला का समर्थन कर सकता है। मौजूदा कार्य विषम संबंधों का अच्छी तरह से प्रतिनिधित्व नहीं कर सकता है और घटना श्रृंखला में आम असंतत घटना खंडों को कैप्चर नहीं कर सकता है। इन समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए, हम एक विषम-घटना (HeterEvent) ग्राफ नेटवर्क पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम ग्राफ में नोड्स के रूप में प्रत्येक अद्वितीय शब्द और व्यक्तिगत घटना को नियोजित करते हैं, और यथार्थवादी संबंधों के आधार पर तीन प्रकार के किनारों का पता लगाते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, शब्द-और-शब्द, शब्द-और-घटना, घटना-और-घटना के संबंध)। हम होमो या विषम नोड्स के बीच जानकारी इंटरैक्शन का एहसास करने के लिए एक संदेश पारित करने की प्रक्रिया भी डिज़ाइन करते हैं। और असंतत घटना खंडों को ग्राफ में संबंधित नोड्स के बीच विशिष्ट पथ खोजकर स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडलिंग की जा सकती है। एक-चरणीय और बहु-चरणीय अनुमान कार्यों पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा पहनावा मॉडल हेटरएवेंट [डब्ल्यू + ई] मौजूदा बेसलाइन को मात दे सकता है।', 'ru': 'Учитывая неполную цепочку событий, обучение скриптов направлено на то, чтобы предсказать недостающее событие, которое может поддерживать ряд приложений NLP. Существующая работа не может хорошо представлять гетерогенные отношения и фиксировать прерывистые сегменты событий, которые являются общими в цепочке событий. Для решения этих проблем мы вводим сеть графов с разнородными событиями (HeterEvent). В частности, мы используем каждое уникальное слово и отдельное событие в качестве узлов в графе и исследуем три вида ребер на основе реалистичных отношений (например, отношения слова и слова, слова и события, события и события). Мы также разрабатываем процесс передачи сообщений для реализации информационных взаимодействий между гомо- или гетерогенными узлами. И прерывистые сегменты событий могут быть явно смоделированы путем нахождения конкретного пути между соответствующими узлами в графе. Экспериментальные результаты по одношаговым и многошаговым задачам вывода показывают, что наша ансамблевая модель HeterEvent [W+E] может превосходить существующие базовые линии.', 'ga': 'I bhfianaise slabhra imeachtaí neamhiomlán, tá sé mar aidhm ag foghlaim scripte an t-imeacht atá ar iarraidh a thuar, ar féidir leis tacú le sraith feidhmchlár NLP. Ní féidir leis an obair atá ann cheana féin an caidreamh ilchineálach a léiriú go maith agus na codanna neamhleanúnacha teagmhais atá coitianta sa slabhra imeachtaí a ghabháil. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na saincheisteanna seo, tugaimid isteach líonra graif um imeacht ilchineálach (HeterEvent). Go háirithe, bainimid úsáid as gach focal uathúil agus imeacht ar leith mar nóid sa ghraf, agus déanaimid iniúchadh ar thrí chineál imill bunaithe ar chaidreamh réalaíoch (m.sh., caidreamh focal-agus-focal, focal-agus-imeacht, imeacht-agus-imeacht). ). Dearaimid freisin próiseas seolta teachtaireachta chun idirghníomhaíochtaí faisnéise i measc nóid homa nó ilchineálach a fhíorú. Agus d’fhéadfaí na codanna teagmhas neamhleanúnacha a shamhaltú go sainráite tríd an gcosán sonrach a aimsiú idir na nóid chomhfhreagracha sa ghraf. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar thascanna tátal aonchéime agus ilchéime gur féidir lenár samhail ensemble HeterEvent[W+E] sárobair a dhéanamh ar na bunlínte atá ann cheana féin.', 'ka': 'სკრიპტის სწავლების მიხედვით, რომელიც შეიძლება NLP პროგრამების სერვერის დამხმარება. არსებობს სამუშაო მუშაოდ არ შეიძლება ჰეტეროგენური შესახებ და გადატანოთ გადარჩენებელი მოვლენების ჟეგმენტები, რომელიც მოვლენების წერტილის შესახებ უ ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ ჰეტერეგენეროგიური მოვლენების (HeterEvent) გრაფიკური ქსელის ჩვენებთ. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ყველა უნიკალური სიტყვა და ინდიველური მოვლენაციას როგორც გრაფიკში კონდეები გამოყენებთ, და სამი ტიპი კონდეები რეალური შესახებ (მაგალითად, სიტყვა-და-სიტყვა, სიტყვა- ჩვენ ასევე შეტყობინება, რომელიც გადავიწყებთ ინფორმაციის ინტერფექცია ჰომო ან ჰეტეროგენი კონდის შორის. და გადარჩენებული მოვლენტის სეგმენტები შეიძლება გამოიყენება განსაკუთრებული გეგმენტების შესახებ განსაკუთრებული გეგმენტების შორის. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ერთ-დონე და მრავალ-დონე ინფრენციის მოქმედებისთვის გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელ HeterEvent[W+E] შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ მსგავსი ფესტ', 'hu': 'A hiányos eseménylánc miatt a script tanulás célja a hiányzó esemény előrejelzése, amely számos NLP alkalmazást támogat. A meglévő munka nem képviselheti jól a heterogén kapcsolatokat és megragadhatja az eseményláncban gyakori szakaszos eseményszegmenseket. E kérdések megoldására heterogén események (HeterEvent) gráf hálózatot vezetünk be. Különösen minden egyes egyedi szót és eseményt csomópontként alkalmazunk a grafikonban, és háromféle éleket fedezünk fel reális kapcsolatok alapján (pl. a szó-és-szó, szó-és-esemény, esemény-és-esemény kapcsolatai). Emellett olyan üzenetátadási folyamatot is tervezünk, amely homo vagy heterogén csomópontok közötti információs interakciókat valósít meg. A szakaszos eseményszegmenseket pedig kifejezetten modellezhetjük úgy, hogy megtaláljuk a megfelelő csomópontok közötti specifikus útvonalat a grafikonban. Az egylépéses és többlépéses következtetési feladatok kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy együttesmodellünk HeterEvent[W+E] felülmúlja a meglévő alapvető teljesítményt.', 'it': "Data una catena di eventi incompleta, l'apprendimento degli script mira a prevedere l'evento mancante, che può supportare una serie di applicazioni NLP. Il lavoro esistente non può rappresentare bene le relazioni eterogenee e catturare i segmenti di evento discontinui che sono comuni nella catena degli eventi. Per affrontare questi problemi, introduciamo una rete grafica eterogenea di eventi (HeterEvent). In particolare, utilizziamo ogni singola parola e singolo evento come nodi nel grafico ed esploriamo tre tipi di bordi basati su relazioni realistiche (ad esempio, le relazioni di parola e parola, parola e evento, evento e evento). Progettiamo anche un processo di passaggio del messaggio per realizzare interazioni informative tra nodi omogeni o eterogenei. E i segmenti di evento discontinui potrebbero essere esplicitamente modellati trovando il percorso specifico tra i nodi corrispondenti nel grafico. I risultati sperimentali sulle attività di inferenza in uno e più passaggi dimostrano che il nostro modello di ensemble HeterEvent[W+E] può superare le linee di base esistenti.", 'el': 'Δεδομένου μιας ελλιπούς αλυσίδας γεγονότων, η εκμάθηση σεναρίων στοχεύει στην πρόβλεψη του γεγονότος που λείπει, το οποίο μπορεί να υποστηρίξει μια σειρά εφαρμογών. Η υπάρχουσα εργασία δεν μπορεί να αντιπροσωπεύει καλά τις ετερογενείς σχέσεις και να συλλάβει τα ασυνεχή τμήματα γεγονότων που είναι κοινά στην αλυσίδα γεγονότων. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, εισάγουμε ένα δίκτυο γραφήματος ετερογενών γεγονότων (HeterEvent). Ειδικότερα, χρησιμοποιούμε κάθε μοναδική λέξη και μεμονωμένο γεγονός ως κόμβους στο γράφημα, και εξερευνούμε τρία είδη άκρων με βάση ρεαλιστικές σχέσεις (π.χ., τις σχέσεις λέξης-λέξης, λέξης-γεγονότος, συμβάντος-γεγονότος). Σχεδιάζουμε επίσης μια διαδικασία διαβίβασης μηνυμάτων για την πραγματοποίηση αλληλεπιδράσεων πληροφοριών μεταξύ ομογενών ή ετερογενών κόμβων. Και τα ασυνεχή τμήματα συμβάντων θα μπορούσαν να μοντελοποιηθούν ρητά βρίσκοντας τη συγκεκριμένη διαδρομή μεταξύ αντίστοιχων κόμβων στο γράφημα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε εργασίες συμπερασμάτων ενός και πολλών βημάτων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο του συνόλου μπορεί να ξεπεράσει τις υπάρχουσες γραμμές βάσης.', 'kk': 'Оқиғалар тізбегін толық емес болса, скрипттің оқиғаны таңдау үшін, NLP бағдарламалардың бірнеше тізбегін қолдануға болады. Бар жұмыс істеген гетероген қатынастарды жақсы көрсетуге болмайды және оқиға тізбегінде жалпы болатын кездескен оқиға сегменттерін алып тастауға болмайды. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін біз гетероген оқиғалар (HeterEvent) графикалық желін таңдаймыз. Мысалы, біз графиктегі әрбір сөз мен әрбір оқиға түрлері ретінде қолданып, реалистикалық қатынастарына негізделген үш түрлі шектерді зерттейміз (мысалы сөз мен сөз, сөз мен оқиға, оқиға мен оқиға қатынастарының қаты Мұндай-ақ біз гетероген топтардың арасындағы мәліметтің қатынасын түсінуге арналған хабарламаны құрамыз. Оқиға бұрақ сегменттері графиктің сәйкес түрлерінің арасындағы нақты жолын табуға арналған болуы мүмкін. Бір қадам және көп қадам инференциялық тапсырмалардың тәжірибелі нәтижелері біздің HeterEvent [W+E] үлгісіміз бар негізгі сызықтардан тыс болады деп көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഒരു സംഭവത്തിന്റെ ചങ്ങല കൊണ്ട്, അപ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെട്ട സംഭവം പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം എ Existing work cannot well represent the heterogeneous relations and capture the discontinuous event segments that are common in the event chain.  ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹെറ്റര്\u200dവെന്\u200dറ് സംഭവം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തും. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഓരോ വാക്കും വ്യക്തിപരമായ സംഭവവും ഗ്രാഫിലെ നോഡുകളായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി മൂന്നു തരം വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പര ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സന്ദേശം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രക്രിയയും സംവിധാനിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഹോമോ ഹോട്ടോജെന്റ പിന്നെ നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന സംഭവത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ് ഗ്രാഫിലെ പ്രത്യേക പാത്രം കണ്ടെത്തു ഒരു പടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മറ്റൊരു പടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും അപകടത്തിന്റെ ജോലികളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഏകന്\u200dസ് മോഡല', 'lt': 'Given an incomplete event chain, script learning aims to predict the missing event, which can support a series of NLP applications.  Dabartinis darbas negali gerai atspindėti heterogeniškų santykių ir apibūdinti nenutrūkstamų renginių segmentus, kurie yra įprasti renginių grandinėje. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos klausimus, sukuriame heterogeniško įvykio (HeterEvent) grafikos tinklą. Visų pirma mes naudojame kiekvieną unikalų žodį ir atskirą įvykį kaip mazgus grafikoje ir tiriame tris kraštus, pagrįstus realistiniais santykiais (pvz., žodžio ir žodžio, žodžio ir įvykio, įvykio ir įvykio santykius). Mes taip pat parengiame pranešimų perdavimo procesą, kad užtikrintume informacijos sąveiką tarp homogeninių arba heterogeninių mazgų. Ir nenutrūkstamų įvykių segmentai galėtų būti aiškiai modeliuojami nustatant specifinį kelią tarp atitinkamų mazgų grafikoje. Eksperimentiniai vieno etapo ir kelių etapų išvadų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų komplekso modelis HeterEvent[W+E] gali viršyti esamas bazines linijas.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на нецелосниот ланец на настани, учењето на сценарија има за цел предвидување на исчезнатиот настан, кој може да поддржи серија на апликации на НЛП. Existing work cannot well represent the heterogeneous relations and capture the discontinuous event segments that are common in the event chain.  За да ги решиме овие прашања, воведуваме хетерогенска мрежа на графички настани (HeterEvent). Особено, ние ги користиме секој единствен збор и индивидуален настан како јазли во графот, и истражуваме три видови раб базирани на реални односи (на пример односите на зборот и зборот, збор и настан, настан и настан). Ние, исто така, дизајнираме процес на пренесување на пораки за да ги оствариме информациските интеракции меѓу хомо или хетерогенски јазли. И престанатите сегменти на настаните би можеле да бидат експлицитно моделирани со наоѓање на специфичната патека помеѓу соодветните јазли во графот. Експерименталните резултати на едночекорните и мултичекорните инференциски задачи покажуваат дека нашиот ансемблен модел HeterEvent[W+E] може да ги надмине постојните бази линии.', 'ms': 'Mengingat rantai peristiwa tidak lengkap, pembelajaran skrip bermaksud meramalkan peristiwa hilang, yang boleh menyokong siri aplikasi NLP. Kerja yang wujud tidak dapat mewakili hubungan heterogeni dan menangkap segmen peristiwa yang berhenti yang biasa dalam rantai peristiwa. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami memperkenalkan rangkaian graf peristiwa-heterogeneous (HeterEvent). Secara khususnya, kita menggunakan setiap perkataan unik dan peristiwa individu sebagai nod dalam graf, dan mengeksplorasi tiga jenis pinggir berdasarkan hubungan realistik (cth., hubungan perkataan-dan-perkataan, perkataan-dan-peristiwa, peristiwa-dan-peristiwa). Kami juga merancang proses melalui mesej untuk menyadari interaksi maklumat antara nod homo atau heterogene. Segmen peristiwa yang tidak berhenti boleh secara eksplicit dipodelkan dengan mencari laluan spesifik antara nod yang sepadan dalam graf. Hasil percubaan pada satu langkah dan tugas kesimpulan berbilang langkah menunjukkan bahawa model ensemble HeterEvent[W+E] boleh melampaui garis dasar yang wujud.', 'mt': 'Minħabba katina ta’ avvenimenti mhux kompluta, it-tagħlim tal-iskripti għandu l-għan li jipprevedi l-avveniment nieqes, li jista’ jappoġġja serje ta’ applikazzjonijiet NLP. Ix-xogħol eżistenti ma jistax jirrappreżenta tajjeb ir-relazzjonijiet eteroġeniċi u jaqbad is-segmenti tal-avvenimenti li ma jitħallewx jintużaw li huma komuni fil-katina tal-avvenimenti. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, a ħna nintroduċu netwerk ta’ grafika ta’ avvenimenti eteroġeni (HeterEvent). In particular, we employ each unique word and individual event as nodes in the graph, and explore three kinds of edges based on realistic relations (e.g., the relations of word-and-word, word-and-event, event-and-event).  Aħna niddisinjaw ukoll proċess ta’ trasmissjoni ta’ messaġġi biex irrializzaw interazzjonijiet ta’ informazzjoni fost nodi omoġenji jew eteroġeni. U s-segmenti tal-avvenimenti kontinwi jistgħu jiġu mmudellati b’mod espliċitu billi jinstab il-passaġġ speċifiku bejn in-nodi korrispondenti fil-graff. The experimental results on one-step and multi-step inference tasks demonstrate that our ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E] can outperform existing baselines.', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktig ein ufullstendig hendingskjelde mål skriptlæring å foregå det manglande hendinga, som kan støtta ei serie NLP- program. Det eksisterande arbeidet kan ikkje representera heterogenene forhold og henta dei avslutta hendingsgelementane som er vanlege i hendingskkjeden. For å handtera desse problemene, introduserer vi eit heterogenesk hendingslinjenettverk (HeterEvent). I særskilt bruker vi kvar unikt ord og individuell hending som noder i grafen, og utforsk tre slags kantar basert på realistiske forhold (f.eks. forhold til ordet og ordet, ordet og hendingar, hendingar og hendingar). Vi design også ein meldingsprosess som passar til å oppfylle informasjonsinteraksjonar mellom homo eller heterogeneske noder. Og avsluttande hendingsssegmentane kunne eksplisisert modelerast ved å finna den spesifikke banen mellom tilsvarande noder i grafen. Eksperimentale resultatene på ein steg og fleirsteg infeksjonsprogrammet viser at vår ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E] kan utføre eksisterande baselinjer.', 'pl': 'Biorąc pod uwagę niekompletny łańcuch zdarzeń, uczenie się skryptów ma na celu przewidzenie brakującego zdarzenia, które może obsługiwać serię aplikacji NLP. Istniejące prace nie mogą dobrze reprezentować heterogenicznych relacji i uchwycić nieciągłych segmentów zdarzeń, które są powszechne w łańcuchu zdarzeń. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, wprowadzamy sieć wykresów heterogenicznych zdarzeń (HeterEvent). W szczególności używamy każdego unikalnego słowa i indywidualnego zdarzenia jako węzłów na wykresie i badamy trzy rodzaje krawędzi opartych na relacjach realistycznych (np. relacje słowa-słowa, słowa-zdarzenie, zdarzenie-zdarzenie). Projektujemy również proces przekazywania wiadomości w celu realizacji interakcji informacyjnych między węzłami homo lub heterogenicznymi. A nieciągłe segmenty zdarzeń mogą być wyraźnie modelowane poprzez znalezienie konkretnej ścieżki między odpowiednimi węzłami na wykresie. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące jednostopniowych i wieloetapowych zadań wnioskowania pokazują, że nasz zespół HeterEvent[W+E] może przewyższyć istniejące linie bazowe.', 'mn': 'Бүтэн үйл явдлын хэлхээ учраас, скриптын суралцах нь алдагдаг үйл явдлыг таамаглах зорилго юм. Энэ нь NLP програмыг дэмжиж чадна. Ингээд байгаа ажил нь heterogeneous харилцаа илэрхийлж чадахгүй ба үйл явдлын хэлхэнд нийтлэг зохион үйл явдлын загваруудыг барьж чадахгүй. Эдгээр асуудлыг олохын тулд бид heterogeneous-event (HeterEvent) график сүлжээг танилцуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид график дээрх нэг үг болон нэг үйл явдал бүрийг үндсэн хэлбэрээр ашиглаж, бодит харилцаанд үндсэн гурван хэлбэрийг судалж (жишээ нь үг, үг, үйл явдал, үйл явдал, үйл явдал, үйл явдал, үйл явдал, үйл явдал,  Бид мөн гетерогены хоорондоо мэдээллийн харилцааны тухай ойлгохын тулд мэдээллийн харилцааныг дамжуулах процессийг зохион бүтээж байна. Графикийн харьцангуй цогцуудын хоорондын тодорхой замыг олоход тодорхой хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхой загварчлах боломжтой. Нэг алхам болон олон алхам халдварын даалгаварын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний хадгалагдсан HeterEvent[W+E] загварын суурь шулуунуудыг гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Având în vedere un lanț de evenimente incomplet, învățarea script-ului își propune să prezică evenimentul lipsă, care poate susține o serie de aplicații PNL. Munca existentă nu poate reprezenta bine relațiile eterogene și surprinde segmentele de evenimente discontinue care sunt comune în lanțul de evenimente. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, introducem o rețea grafică heterEvent (HeterEvent). În special, folosim fiecare cuvânt unic și eveniment individual ca noduri în grafic și explorăm trei tipuri de margini bazate pe relații realiste (de exemplu, relațiile dintre cuvânt și cuvânt, cuvânt și eveniment, eveniment și eveniment). De asemenea, proiectăm un proces de transmitere a mesajelor pentru a realiza interacțiuni informaționale între noduri homo sau heterogene. Iar segmentele de evenimente discontinue ar putea fi modelate explicit prin găsirea traseului specific între nodurile corespunzătoare în grafic. Rezultatele experimentale privind sarcinile de inferență într-un singur pas și mai multe etape demonstrează că modelul nostru de ansamblu HeterEvent[W+E] poate depăși valorile de bază existente.', 'so': "Sida uu helo silsilad dhac a an dhamaan, waxbarashada karraanigu wuxuu aimaa in uu horumariyo dhacdooyinka la'aanta, kaas oo kaalmeyn kara codsiga NLP oo kala duduwan. Shaqo joogista si wanaagsan uma jeedi karo xiriirka kala duwan iyo qabsashada qaybaha dhacdooyinka la joojiyo oo caadiga ah. Si aan uga sheekeyno arimahan, waxaan soo bandhignaa shabakadda xarunta jimicsiga (HeterEvent). Si gaar ah, waxaynu u shaqeynaa hadal kasta oo gaar ah iyo dhacdooyin shakhsi ah sida noocyo sawir ah, waxaana baaraynaa saddex nooc oo kala duduwan oo ku saleysan xiriirka runta ah (tusaale ahaan xiriirka hadalka iyo hadalka, hadalka iyo dhacdooyinka, dhacdooyinka iyo dhacdooyinka). Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka warqada soo socda si aan u ogaano macluumaad xiriir ku dhexaysa jimicsiga ama hiwaayadaha kala duwan. Xiriirka dhacdooyinka la joojin karo waxaa si cad looga sameyn karaa si aad u hesho waddo gaar ah oo ku saabsan sawirada. Imtixaanka waxaa ku dhaca shaqooyinka baahida ee hal qad ah iyo jaranjaro badan oo ay muujiyaan in modelkeenu uu sameeyo heeterEvent[W+E]", 'sr': 'S obzirom na nepotpun lanac događaja, učenje skripta je cilj predvidjeti nestanak događaja, koji može podržati niz NLP aplikacija. Postojeći rad ne može dobro predstavljati heterogenene odnose i uhvatiti prekinute segmente događaja koji su zajednički u lancu događaja. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predstavljamo mrežu heterogeneznog događaja (HeterEvent). Posebno, upotrebimo svaku jedinstvenu reč i pojedinačnu događaj kao čvorove u grafiku i istražujemo tri vrste ivica na osnovu realističkih odnosa (npr. odnosa riječi i reči, reči i događaja, događaja i događaja). Takoðe dizajniramo proces prolaznog poruke da shvatimo informativne interakcije izmeðu homogeneznih ili heterogeneznih čvorova. I prekinuti segmenti događaja mogu biti isključivo modelirani naći specifični put između odgovarajućih čvorova u grafiku. Eksperimentalni rezultati na jednokorak i više koraka infekcije pokazuju da naš model HeterEvent[W+E] može izvršiti postojeće osnovne linije.', 'ta': '@ info இருக்கும் வேலை சிறந்த தொடர்புகளை குறிப்பிட முடியாது மற்றும் நிகழ்வு பிரிவுகளை பிடிக்க முடியாது நிகழ்வு சங்கில இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை விளக்க, நாம் ஒரு வெற்றிகரமான நிகழ்வை (ஹெட்டர் நிகழ்வு) வரைப்படத்தின் வலைப்பின்னலை குறி குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒவ்வொரு தனிப்பட்ட வார்த்தையும் தனிப்பட்ட நிகழ்வையும் வரைப்படத்தில் உள்ள நுடுகளாக வேலை செய்கிறோம், மூன்று வகையான விளிம்புகளை உண்மை நாங்கள் ஒரு செய்தி அனுப்பும் செயலை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் தகவல் இடைவெளி செயல்பாடுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும நிறுத்தப்படாத நிகழ்வு பிரிவுகள் வரைபடத்தில் ஒத்திருக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பாதை ஒரு படி மற்றும் பல படி பாதிப்பு செயல்களின் முடிவு முடிவு', 'si': 'ස්ක්\u200dරිප්ට් ඉගෙනගන්න අනුපූර්ණ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ විදියට, ස්ක්\u200dරිප්ට් ඉගෙනගන්නේ අතුරුදන් වෙනුවෙන් අ ඉතින් වැඩේ හොඳින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න බැරි වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න, අපි හෙට්රෝජන් සිද්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (HeterItem) ග්\u200dරාෆ් ජාලයෙක් පෙන විශේෂයෙන්, අපි හැම විශේෂ වචනයක්ම සහ ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියක්ම ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකේ නෝඩ් වලින් භාවිත කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඇත්තම සම්බන්ධ වලින් තුනක් වගේ ප්\u200dර අපි පණිවිඩයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධයක් හෝ හෙටෙරෝජෙන් නෝඩ් වල තේරුම් ගන්න. ඒ වගේම අවස්ථාවක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වාර්ත පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් එක-පැත්ත සහ විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Med tanke på en ofullständig händelsekedja syftar skriptinlärning till att förutsäga den saknade händelsen, vilket kan stödja en serie NLP-applikationer. Befintligt arbete kan inte väl representera de heterogena relationerna och fånga upp de diskontinuösa händelsesegment som är vanliga i händelsekedjan. För att ta itu med dessa frågor introducerar vi ett heterogent händelsenätverk (HeterEvent). I synnerhet använder vi varje unikt ord och enskild händelse som noder i grafen, och utforskar tre typer av kanter baserade på realistiska relationer (t.ex. relationerna mellan ord och ord, ord och händelse, händelse och händelse). Vi utformar också en meddelandeöverföringsprocess för att realisera informationsinteraktioner mellan homo eller heterogena noder. Och de diskontinuösa händelsesegmenten kunde uttryckligen modelleras genom att hitta den specifika banan mellan motsvarande noder i grafen. Experimentella resultat på ett- och flerstegs inferensuppgifter visar att vår ensemblemodell HeterEvent[W+E] kan överträffa befintliga baslinjer.', 'ur': "ایک غلطی ایڈینٹ زنجیر کے ذریعہ، اسکریپٹ سیکھنے کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ گم ہونے والی ایڈینٹ کی پیش بینی کرے، جو NLP کاریالوں کے ایک سری کی مدد کرسکتی ہے. Existing work can't well represent the heterogeneous relationships and capture the discontinuation event segments that are common in the event chain. ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں ہم ایک غیر غیر غیر غیر حادثہ (HeterEvent) گراف نیٹ ورک کو معرفی کرتے ہیں۔ مخصوصاً ہم ہر ایک واحد لفظ اور واحد حادثہ کو گراف میں نوڈ کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں، اور تین قسم کے کناروں کو حقیقی رابطہ پر متوجہ کرتے ہیں ہم نے ایک پیغام طراحی کر دی ہے جو ہمو یا غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ اور قطع ہونے والی ایڈینٹ سپٹوں کو گراف میں مطابق نوڈوں کے درمیان خاص مسیر تلاش کرنے کے ذریعہ صریح طور پر نمادہ کر سکتے ہیں ایک سپے اور بہت سی سپے سفارش کے کاموں پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے انامبل موڈل HeterEvent[W+E] موجود بنسس لینوں سے زیادہ کام کر سکتا ہے.", 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Mavjud vazifani ajratib boʻlmaydi va hodisa shaxsiyatda umumiy bo'lgan hodisa qismlarini qabul qiladi. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun, biz heterEvent (HeterEvent) grafik tarmoqni ishlatimiz. Hullas, biz har bir uning so'z va bir shaxsiy hodisa grafikdagi nod sifatida ishlayapmiz, va bu haqiqiqiy munosabatlarning asosida uch turini aniqlamiz (масалан so'z va so'zlar, so'z va hodisa, hodisa va hodisa). Bu yerda, biz homo yoki hech narsa yordamida maʼlumot interfeyslarini aniqlash uchun xabar qilamiz. Va kutilmagan hodisa qismlari grafikdagi mos keladigan yoʻlni topish mumkin. Bir qadam va bir necha darajada bir necha qadam kasallik vazifalarning natijalari hozir, bizning umumiy modelimiz HeterEvent[W+E] mavjud asboblarni bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': "Do một chuỗi các sự kiện chưa hoàn chỉnh, chương trình học văn bản nhằm dự đoán sự kiện bị mất tích, có thể hỗ trợ một loạt các ứng dụng NLP. Việc tồn tại không thể đại diện cho mối quan hệ khác nhau và nắm bắt các khu vực sự kiện ngẫu nhiên phổ biến trong chuỗi sự kiện. Để giải quyết các vấn đề này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mạng đồ thị dị tính. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi sử dụng mỗi từ và sự kiện độc đáo như các nút trong đồ thị, và khám phá ba loại cạnh dựa trên quan hệ thực tế (v.v. quan hệ giữa từ và từ, từ và sự kiện, sự kiện và sự kiện). Chúng tôi cũng thiết kế một tiến trình truyền thông để thực hiện giao tiếp thông tin giữa các nút đồng tính hay khác nhau. Và đoạn các trường dòng có thể được mô hình trực tiếp bằng cách tìm ra đường dẫn cụ thể giữa các nút tương ứng trong đồ thị. Các kết quả thử nghiệm của các công việc phủ nhận một bước và nhiều bước cho thấy mô hình dị biến dị dạng'W+E'của chúng ta có thể vượt trội các bản mẫu tồn tại.", 'nl': 'Gezien een onvolledige gebeurtenisketen is scriptleren bedoeld om de ontbrekende gebeurtenis te voorspellen, die een reeks NLP-toepassingen kan ondersteunen. Bestaand werk kan niet goed de heterogene relaties weergeven en de discontinuierlijke gebeurtenissegmenten vastleggen die gebruikelijk zijn in de gebeurtenisketen. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, introduceren we een heterogene-event (HeterEvent) grafieknetwerk. In het bijzonder gebruiken we elk uniek woord en individuele gebeurtenis als knooppunten in de grafiek, en verkennen we drie soorten randen gebaseerd op realistische relaties (bijvoorbeeld de relaties van woord-en-woord, woord-en-gebeurtenis, gebeurtenis-en-gebeurtenis). We ontwerpen ook een bericht doorgeven proces om informatie interacties tussen homo of heterogene knooppunten te realiseren. En de discontinuous event segmenten kunnen expliciet gemodelleerd worden door het specifieke pad tussen corresponderende knooppunten in de grafiek te vinden. De experimentele resultaten van een- en meerstaps inferentietaken tonen aan dat ons ensemblemodel HeterEvent[W+E] bestaande basislijnen kan overtreffen.', 'bg': 'Предвид непълната верига от събития, обучението по скрипт има за цел да предскаже липсващото събитие, което може да поддържа серия от приложения за НЛП. Съществуващата работа не може добре да представи хетерогенните отношения и да обхване прекъснатите сегменти на събития, които са често срещани във веригата на събития. За да се справим с тези проблеми, въвеждаме графична мрежа с хетерогенни събития (ХетерEvent). По-специално, ние използваме всяка уникална дума и индивидуално събитие като възли в графиката и изследваме три вида ръбове въз основа на реалистични отношения (напр. отношенията дума-дума, дума-събитие, събитие-събитие). Ние също така проектираме процес на предаване на съобщения за реализиране на информационни взаимодействия между хомо или хетерогенни възли. И прекъснатите сегменти на събития могат да бъдат изрично моделирани чрез намиране на специфичния път между съответните възли в графиката. Експерименталните резултати по едностъпални и многостъпални задачи показват, че нашият ансамбъл модел може да надмине съществуващите базови линии.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na nepotpuni lanac događaja, učenje skripta je cilj predvidjeti nestanak događaja, koji može podržati niz NLP aplikacija. Postojeći rad ne može dobro predstaviti heterogenene odnose i uhvatiti prekinute segmente događaja koji su česti u lancu događaja. Za rješavanje tih pitanja, predstavljamo mrežu heterogeneznog događaja (HeterEvent). Posebno, upotrebljavamo svaku jedinstvenu riječ i pojedinačnu događaj kao čvorove u grafiku i istražujemo tri vrste ivica na temelju realističkih odnosa (npr. odnose riječi i riječi, riječi i događaja, događaja i događaja). Također dizajniramo proces prolazeći poruku kako bi shvatili informativne interakcije između homogeneznih ili heterogeneznih čvorova. I prekinuti segmenti događaja mogu biti isključivo modelirani pronalaženjem specifičnog puta između odgovarajućih čvorova u grafiku. Eksperimentalni rezultati na jednokorak i više koraka infekcije pokazuju da naš model za obezbeđenje HeterEvent[W+E] može izvršiti postojeće osnovne linije.', 'da': 'I betragtning af en ufuldstændig begivenhedskæde sigter scriptlæring mod at forudsige den manglende begivenhed, som kan understøtte en række NLP-applikationer. Eksisterende arbejde kan ikke godt repræsentere de heterogene relationer og fange de diskontinuelle begivenhedssegmenter, der er almindelige i begivenhedskæden. For at løse disse problemer introducerer vi et heterogen-event (HeterEvent) grafnetværk. Især anvender vi hvert enestående ord og individuel begivenhed som knudepunkter i grafen, og udforsker tre slags kanter baseret på realistiske relationer (f.eks. relationerne mellem ord og ord, ord og begivenhed, begivenhed og begivenhed). Vi designer også en budskabsoverførselsproces for at realisere informationsinteraktioner mellem homo eller heterogene knuder. Og de diskontinuelle begivenhedssegmenter kunne eksplicit modelleres ved at finde den specifikke sti mellem tilsvarende knuder i grafen. De eksperimentelle resultater på et-trins og flertrins inference opgaver viser, at vores ensemblemodel HeterEvent[W+E] kan overgå eksisterende baselines.', 'de': 'Angesichts einer unvollständigen Ereigniskette zielt das Skriptlernen darauf ab, das fehlende Ereignis vorherzusagen, was eine Reihe von NLP-Anwendungen unterstützen kann. Bestehende Arbeiten können die heterogenen Beziehungen nicht gut darstellen und die diskontinuierlichen Ereignissegmente erfassen, die in der Ereigniskette häufig vorkommen. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, führen wir ein heterogenes Event (HeterEvent) Graphennetzwerk ein. Insbesondere verwenden wir jedes einzelne Wort und jedes einzelne Ereignis als Knoten im Diagramm und untersuchen drei Arten von Kanten basierend auf realistischen Beziehungen (z.B. die Beziehungen von Wort-und-Wort, Wort-und-Ereignis, Ereignis-und-Ereignis). Wir konzipieren auch einen Nachrichtenübergangsprozess, um Informationsinteraktionen zwischen homo- oder heterogenen Knoten zu realisieren. Und die diskontinuierlichen Ereignissegmente könnten explizit modelliert werden, indem man den spezifischen Pfad zwischen den entsprechenden Knoten im Graphen findet. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse an ein- und mehrstufigen Inferenz-Aufgaben zeigen, dass unser Ensemblemodell HeterEvent[W+E] bestehende Baselines übertreffen kann.', 'id': 'Mengingat rantai peristiwa yang tidak lengkap, pembelajaran skrip bermaksud untuk memprediksi peristiwa yang hilang, yang dapat mendukung serangkaian aplikasi NLP. Pekerjaan yang ada tidak dapat mewakili hubungan heterogene dan menangkap segmen peristiwa yang berhenti yang umum dalam rantai peristiwa. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami memperkenalkan jaringan grafik peristiwa heterogene (HeterEvent). Terutama, kita menggunakan setiap kata unik dan peristiwa individu sebagai node di grafik, dan mengeksplorasi tiga jenis pinggir berdasarkan hubungan realistis (contohnya, hubungan kata-kata, kata-dan-peristiwa, peristiwa-dan-peristiwa). We also design a message passing process to realize information interactions among homo or heterogeneous nodes.  Dan segmen peristiwa yang berhenti dapat secara eksplicit dipodelkan dengan menemukan jalur spesifik antara node yang cocok di grafik. Hasil eksperimen pada satu langkah dan multilangkah tugas inferensi menunjukkan bahwa model ensemble HeterEvent[W+E] dapat melampaui garis dasar yang ada.', 'ko': '스크립트 학습은 누락된 이벤트를 예측하기 위한 불완전한 이벤트 체인을 지정합니다. 이것은 일련의 NLP 응용 프로그램을 지원할 수 있습니다.기존의 작업은 이구적 관계를 잘 나타낼 수 없고 사건 체인에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 불연속 사건 구간을 포착할 수 없다.이러한 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 이구 이벤트(Heter Event) 그림 네트워크를 도입했다.특히 우리는 모든 유일한 단어와 하나의 사건을 그림의 노드로 삼고 현실 관계(예를 들어 단어와 단어의 관계, 단어와 사건, 사건과 사건)를 바탕으로 세 가지 측면을 탐색한다.우리는 또한 동질이나 이구 노드 간의 정보 상호작용을 실현하기 위해 메시지 전달 과정을 설계했다.그림에서 상응하는 노드 사이의 특정한 경로를 찾으면 불연속 이벤트 세그먼트를 현저하게 모델링할 수 있다.1단계와 다단계 추리 임무에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 집적 모델인 HeterEvent[W+E]의 성능은 기존의 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'با توجه به زنجیر اتفاق غیر کامل، یادگیری اسکریپت هدف دارد که رویداد گمشده را پیش بینی کند، که می تواند یک سری از کاربردهای NLP را پشتیبانی کند. کار موجود نمی\u200cتواند رابطه\u200cهای متفاوتی را نشان دهد و بخش\u200cهای اتفاق متوقف را که در زنجیر اتفاق مشترک هستند بگیرد. برای حل این مسائل، یک شبکه گراف\u200cهای غیرعادی (HeterEvent) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. در خصوص، ما هر کلمه متفاوتی و رویداد متفاوتی را به عنوان گراف در گراف استفاده می کنیم، و سه نوع لبه\u200cها را بر اساس رابطه\u200cهای واقعی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم (مثلا رابطه\u200cهای کلمه و کلمه، کلمه و رویداد، رویداد و رویداد). ما همچنین یک پیام را طراحی می\u200cکنیم که فرصت گذاری را برای فهمیدن تعاملات اطلاعات بین گره\u200cهای همجنس یا متفاوت طراحی می\u200cکنیم. و بخش\u200cهای رویداد متوقف می\u200cتوانند با پیدا کردن مسیر خاص بین بخش\u200cهای متوقف در گراف به طور کامل نموده شوند. نتیجه آزمایشی روی یک مرحله و کارهای آلودگی چندین مرحله نشان می دهد که مدل آلودگی HeterEvent[W+E] ما می تواند از خطوط پایین\u200cهای موجود فراتر کند.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na mfumo wa tukio lisilo kamili, elimu ya script inakusudia kutabiri tukio hilo, ambalo linaweza kuunga mkono mfululizo wa matumizi ya NLP. Kazi zilizopo haiwezi kuwakilisha mahusiano ya kijinsia na kuwakamata sehemu za matukio yasiyo ya kusitisha ambayo ni kawaida katika mfuko wa tukio hilo. Ili kuzungumzia masuala haya, tunaonyesha mtandao wa picha ya matukio yanayotokana na jinsia (HeterEvent). Kwa hakika, tunatumia kila neno la kipekee na tukio binafsi kama nodes katika picha hiyo, na kutafuta aina tatu ya mahusiano halisi (yaani uhusiano wa maneno na maneno, maneno na matukio, tukio na tukio). Tunaweza pia kutengeneza mchakato wa ujumbe unaotumia kutambua mazingira ya habari kati ya mashoga au vipande vya kijinsia. Na vipengele vya tukio visivyo vya kusitisha vinaweza kuonyeshwa kwa kutafuta njia maalum kati ya vipande vinavyohusiana na picha hiyo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na majukumu ya hatua moja na hatua mbalimbali yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu wa upinzani wa HeterEvent[W+E] unaweza kutekeleza misingi yanayopo.', 'sq': 'Duke pasur parasysh një zinxhir të pakompletuar ngjarjesh, mësimi i script synon të parashikojë ngjarjen e humbur, e cila mund të mbështesë një seri aplikimesh NLP. Puna ekzistuese nuk mund të përfaqësojë mirë marrëdhëniet heterogjene dhe të kapë segmentet e ngjarjeve të ndërprera që janë të zakonshme në zinxhirin e ngjarjeve. Për të trajtuar këto çështje, ne prezantojmë një rrjet grafik të ngjarjeve heterogjene (HeterEvent). In particular, we employ each unique word and individual event as nodes in the graph, and explore three kinds of edges based on realistic relations (e.g., the relations of word-and-word, word-and-event, event-and-event).  Ne gjithashtu dizajnojmë një proces të kalimit të mesazhit për të realizuar ndërveprimet e informacionit midis nyjeve homo apo heterogjene. Dhe segmentet e ngjarjeve të ndaluara mund të modelohen eksplicitalisht duke gjetur rrugën specifike midis nyjeve korrespondente në grafik. Rezultatet eksperimentale në një hap dhe shumë hapa përfundimi tregojnë se modeli ynë ensemble HeterEvent[W+E] mund të kalojë linjat bazë ekzistuese.', 'hy': 'Եթե հաշվի առնենք անամբողջական իրադարձությունների շղթան, սցեպտերի ուսումնասիրությունը նպատակում է կանխատեսել բացակայած իրադարձությունները, որոնք կարող են աջակցել մի շարք ՆԼՊ ծրագրեր: Գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքը չի կարող ճիշտ ներկայացնել հետրոգեն հարաբերությունները և վերցնել անընդհատ իրադարձությունների սեգմերները, որոնք տարածված են իրադարձությունների շղթայում: Այս հարցերին լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք Heter-իրադարձությունների գծագրային ցանց: Մենք հատկապես օգտագործում ենք գրաֆիկի յուրաքանչյուր յուրահատուկ բառ և անհատական իրադարձություն որպես կետեր և ուսումնասիրում ենք իրական հարաբերությունների վրա հիմնված երեք տեսակի եզրեր (օրինակ բառի և բառի հարաբերությունները, բառի և իրադարձության, իրադարձության և իրադարձության հարա We also design a message passing process to realize information interactions among homo or heterogeneous nodes.  Եվ անընդհատ իրադարձությունների սեգմերները կարող են բացահայտորեն մոդելավորվել գծագրում գտնվող հատուկ ուղին գտնելով: Մեկ քայլ և բազմաքայլ հետևանքների վերաբերյալ փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր էնսեմբուլ մոդելը HeTER[W+E] կարող է գերազանցել գոյություն ունեցող հիմնական գծերը:', 'az': 'Əlbəttə gələn zəncirlərə görə, skriptlər öyrənməsi zəncirlənməyə niyyət edir ki, NLP proqramlarını dəstəkləyə bilər. Existing işlər heterogenel ilişkileri gözəl göstərə bilməz və olaraq zincirdə ortaq olan sonrakı olaraq parçaları tuta bilməz. Bu məsələləri çəkmək üçün, heterogeneous-event (HeterEvent) grafik a ğını tanıyırıq. Özellikle, biz hər kəlmə və təkcə olaraq grafikdə düyüm kimi istifadə edirik, və realistik əlaqələrə dayanan üç çe şit çöpü keşfetiririk (məsələn, söz-və-olaraq, olaraq-və-olaraq əlaqələrin, əlaqələrin və-olaraq). Biz həmçinin homo və heterogenel düyünün arasında məlumat bağlantısını anlamaq üçün istifadə edirik. Bütün olaraq əlaqədar segmentləri grafikdə müəyyən düyünün arasındakı müəyyən yolu tapıb açıq-aydın modelləşdirə bilər. Bir adım və çoxlu adım aşağılıq işlərinin təcrübə sonuçları, həmin modelimiz HeterEvent[W+E] mövcuddur baz çətinliklərdən üstün olaraq göstərir.', 'af': "Gien 'n onvolledige gebeurtenis ketting, die skrip leer doel om die ontbrekende gebeurtenis te voorskou, wat kan ondersteun 'n reeks van NLP toepassings. Bestaande werk kan nie goed verteenwoordig die heterogeneese relasies en neem die afstand gebeurtenis segmente wat gemeenskap is in die gebeurtenis ketting. Om hierdie probleem te adres, introduseer ons 'n heterogenee-gebeurtenis (HeterEvent) grafnetwerk. In spesifieke gebruik ons elke unieke woord en individuele gebeurtenis as nodes in die graf, en uitsoek drie soorte rande gebaseer op realistiese verwantings (bv. die verwantings van woord-en-woord, woord-en-gebeurtenis, gebeurtenis-en-gebeurtenis). Ons ontwerp ook 'n boodskap wat deurgaan proses om inligting interaksies onder homo of heterogenee nodes te besig. En die afstandige gebeurtenis segmente kon eksplisief modelleer word deur die spesifieke pad tussen ooreenstemmende nodes in die graaf te vind. Die eksperimentale resultate op een-stap en multi-stap inferensie-opdragte bevestig dat ons ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E] kan uitvoer bestaande basisline.", 'am': 'Given an incomplete event chain, script learning aims to predict the missing event, which can support a series of NLP applications.  የአሁኑ ሥራ የውይይት ግንኙነትን በመልካም ማሳየት አይችልም እና በጉዳዩ ሰንሰለት የተቀናቀሉትን የሚቆጠሩ የሁኔታ ክፍሎች ማቀናቀል አይችሉም። እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመጠየቅ፣ የውይይት ጉዳይ (HeterEvent) የመረጃ መረብ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ሁሉንም የተለየ ቃላት እና የግንኙነቱን ጉዳይ እንደ ኖሮ እናስገድዳለን፡፡ እና የመልእክት ፕሮጀክት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ And the discontinuous event segments could be explicitly modeled by finding the specific path between corresponding nodes in the graph.  የፈተናው ፍጻሜ በአንድ ደረጃ እና በብዙ ደረጃዎች የሚነካ ስራዎችን የሚያሳየው የዓይነታችን ሞዴል ሐቴርEvent[W+E] የአሁኑን መሠረት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'ca': "Tenint en compte una cadena d'esdeveniments incompleta, l'aprenentatge d'escriptures té l'objectiu de predir l'esdeveniment que falta, que pot suportar una sèrie d'aplicacions NLP. Existing work cannot well represent the heterogeneous relations and capture the discontinuous event segments that are common in the event chain.  To address these issues, we introduce a heterogeneous-event (HeterEvent) graph network.  En particular, utilitzem cada paraula única i cada esdeveniment individual com nodos del gràfic, i explorem tres tipus de bords basats en relacions realistes (per exemple, les relacions de paraula i paraula, paraula i esdeveniment, esdeveniment i esdeveniment). També dissenyem un procés de passatge de missatges per adonar-nos de les interaccions d'informació entre nodes homo o heterogenes. I els segments d'esdeveniments discontinus podrien ser modelats explícitament trobant el camí específic entre els nodes correspondents del gràfic. The experimental results on one-step and multi-step inference tasks demonstrate that our ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E] can outperform existing baselines.", 'cs': 'Vzhledem k neúplnému řetězci událostí se učení skriptů snaží předpovědět chybějící událost, která může podporovat řadu aplikací NLP. Stávající práce nemůže dobře reprezentovat heterogenní vztahy a zachytit diskontinuální segmenty událostí, které jsou běžné v řetězci událostí. Pro řešení těchto problémů představujeme heterogenní-event (HeterEvent) grafovou síť. Konkrétně používáme každé jedinečné slovo a jednotlivé události jako uzly v grafu a zkoumáme tři druhy hran založené na reálných vztazích (např. vztahy slova a slova, slova a události, události a události). Navrhujeme také proces předávání zpráv pro realizaci informačních interakcí mezi homo nebo heterogenními uzly. A diskontinuální segmenty událostí mohou být explicitně modelovány hledáním specifické cesty mezi odpovídajícími uzly v grafu. Experimentální výsledky na jednostupňových a vícestupňových inferenčních úlohách ukazují, že náš souborový model HeterEvent[W+E] dokáže překonat existující základní linie.', 'et': 'Arvestades mittetäielikku sündmuste ahela, on skriptide õppe eesmärk ennustada puuduvat sündmust, mis võib toetada mitmeid NLP rakendusi. Olemasolevad tööd ei suuda hästi esindada heterogeenseid suhteid ja hõlmata katkematuid sündmuste segmente, mis on sündmuste ahelas tavalised. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks tutvustame heterogeensete sündmuste (HeterEvent) graafikuvõrgustikku. Eelkõige kasutame iga ainulaadset sõna ja üksiksündmust graafiku sõlmedena ning uurime kolme tüüpi servasid, mis põhinevad realistlikel suhetel (nt sõna-sõna, sündmus-sündmus seosed). Samuti kujundame sõnumi edastamise protsessi, et realiseerida homo- või heterogeensete sõlmede vahelisi infointeraktsioone. Ja katkematuid sündmuste segmente saaks selgesõnaliselt modelleerida, leides graafikul vastavate sõlmede vahelise spetsiifilise tee. Ühe- ja mitmeastmeliste järeldustööde eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie ansambli mudel HeterEvent[W+E] suudab olemasolevaid lähtejooni ületada.', 'bn': 'একটি সম্পূর্ণ অনুষ্ঠানের চেইন দিয়ে স্ক্রিপ্ট শিক্ষার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে নিখোঁজ অনুষ্ঠানের ভবিষ্যতের লক্ষ্য, যা এনএলপি অ্যাপ বিদ্যমান কাজ ভালোভাবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করতে পারে না এবং অনুষ্ঠানের শেইনে সাধারণত অনুষ্ঠানের বিভিন্ন অংশ গ্রহণ করতে পারে। এই সমস্ত বিষয়গুলোকে নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি জাতীয় অনুষ্ঠানের (হেটার ইভেন্ট) নেটওয়ার্ক নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে পর বিশেষ করে, আমরা গ্রাফের নোড হিসেবে প্রত্যেকটি অনন্য শব্দ এবং ব্যক্তিগত অনুষ্ঠান চালাই এবং বাস্তবতা সম্পর্কের ভিত্তিতে তিনটি ধরনের পার্শ্ব খুঁজে বের করি (উদাহরণ আমরা একই সাথে একটি বার্তা পাশ করার প্রক্রিয়াও নকশা করি সমকামী অথবা উজ্জ্বল নোডের মধ্যে তথ্য প্রক্রিয়া বুঝতে। And the discontinuous event segments could be explicitly modeled by finding the specific path between corresponding nodes in the graph.  The experimental results on one-step and multi-step inference tasks demonstrate that our ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E] can outperform existing baselines.', 'bs': 'S obzirom na nepotpun lanac događaja, učenje skripta je cilj predvidjeti nestanak događaja, koji može podržati niz NLP aplikacija. Postojeći rad ne može dobro predstavljati heterogenene odnose i uhvatiti prekinute segmente događaja koji su česti u lancu događaja. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predstavljamo mrežu heterogeneznog događaja (HeterEvent). Posebno, zapošljavamo svaku jedinstvenu riječ i pojedinačnu događaj kao čvorove u grafiku, i istražujemo tri vrste ivica na temelju realističkih odnosa (npr. odnosa riječi i riječi, riječi i događaja, događaja i događaja). Također dizajniramo proces prolazeći poruku kako bi shvatili informativne interakcije između homo ili heterogenenih čvorova. I prekinuti segmenti događaja mogu biti isključivo modelirani naći specifični put između odgovarajućih čvorova u grafiku. Eksperimentalni rezultati na jednokorak i više koraka infekcije pokazuju da naš model za obezbeđenje HeterEvent[W+E] može izvršiti postojeće osnovne linije.', 'fi': 'Koska tapahtumaketju on epätäydellinen, käsikirjoitusoppimisen tavoitteena on ennustaa puuttuva tapahtuma, joka voi tukea useita NLP-sovelluksia. Olemassa oleva työ ei voi hyvin kuvata heterogeenisiä suhteita ja kuvata tapahtumaketjussa yleisiä epäjatkuvia tapahtumasegmenttejä. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi esittelemme heterogeenisen tapahtumaverkoston (HeterEvent). Erityisesti käytämme jokaista yksittäistä sanaa ja yksittäistä tapahtumaa solmukohtana kaaviossa ja tutkimme kolmenlaisia reunoja, jotka perustuvat realistisiin suhteisiin (esim. sana-ja-sana, sana-ja-tapahtuma, tapahtuma-ja-tapahtuma). Suunnittelemme myös viestinsiirtoprosessin homo- tai heterogeenisten solmujen informaatiovuorovaikutuksen toteuttamiseksi. Ja epäjatkuvia tapahtumasegmenttejä voitaisiin nimenomaisesti mallintaa etsimällä spesifinen polku vastaavien solmujen välillä kaaviosta. Kokeelliset tulokset yhden- ja monivaiheisista päättelytehtävistä osoittavat, että ryhmämallimme HeterEvent[W+E] pystyy ylittämään olemassa olevat perusviivat.', 'tr': 'Edilmedik bolup geçýän terjime görä, skript öwrenmek üçin ýitilmeýän bolup geçýän terjime etmek niýeti, bu NLP programleriniň bir dizini destekleýändir. Öň bar işi heterogenen ilişkileri gowy görkezip bilmeýär we olaryň ýüzünde orta bolan çykyş böleklerini yakalayyp bilmeýär. Bu meseleleri çözmek üçin, birnäçe döwürelik(HeterEvent) grafik a ňyna girişdirýäris. We özellikle, grafikdeki her tär kelime we olaryň esasy çöplüklerini ulanýarys we realistik ilişkilere daýanýan üç çe şit çöplükleri keşfetýäris Biz hem homo ýa-da heterogenen düğümler arasynda bilgi etkileşimlerini çözmek üçin bir mesaj geçirip geçirip durduk. Ve sonraki olar segmentleri grafikte uygun düğümler arasynda belli yol bularak açıklayabilir. Bir adım we köp-adım aşyk täzeliklerinde denetim netijesi, biziň takyk nusgymyzyň HeterEvent[W+E] hem bolan temel hatlaryndan çykyp biljekdigini kanıtlaýar.', 'jv': 'Tenggang kuwi nggawe ketemut ora nggawe, seneng nggawe Perintah sing wis ngawe Perintah sing ora bisa supokot akeh aplikasi NLP Baling Mbok nganggo perusahaan iki, kita ngubah netengan mat-perusahaan (Heterevents). Genjer-Genjer Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi batir perusahaan nggawe informasi interaksi gambaran omo karo perusahaan nodes Global Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'בהתחשב בשרשרת אירועים לא מושלמת, לימוד תסריטים מתכוון לחזות את האירוע הנעדר, שיכול לתמוך בסדרה של תכניות NLP. העבודה הנוכחית לא יכולה לייצג היטב את היחסים ההטרוגניים ולתפוס את חלקי האירועים הפסיקים שהם נפוצים בשרשרת האירועים. To address these issues, we introduce a heterogeneous-event (HeterEvent) graph network.  במיוחד, אנו משתמשים בכל מילה ייחודית ואירוע נפרד כצבעים בגרף, וחקרים שלושה סוגים של קצה מבוססים על יחסים מציאותיים (למשל יחסים של מילה ומילה, מילה ואירוע, אירוע ואירוע). אנחנו גם מעצבים תהליך מעביר מסר כדי להבין אינטראקציות מידע בין קשרים הומו או heterogeneous. ולחלקי האירועים המעצרים יכולים להיות מודלים באופן ברור על ידי למצוא את הנתיב המסופי בין קשרים מתאימים בגרף. התוצאות הניסיוניות על משימות ההנחה במהלך צעד אחד ומספר צעדים מראות שהמודל האנסמבל שלנו HeterEvent[W+E] יכול להעביר את קווי הבסיס קיימים.', 'ha': "Gida wani jerin da ba'a cika ba, scriptun da ake karanta yana aimar ya gabatar da shirin ayukan da aka sava, wannan yana iya ƙarfafa wasu shiryoyin ayuka na NLP. Yin aiki da ke gaba, bã zai iya wakilisha mazaɓa na mutane ba kuma a kãma rabunan da ake sãɓa wa halin da ke cikin sarƙoƙi. Ga mu bayyana wa wannan masu husũma, za'a gaurar da shirin jigon-jigon (hetherevent). Kayya, Munã aiki kõwane magana da alama guda kamar node cikin grafi, kuma Munã jarraba nau'i-nau'i uku ne a kan danganta masu gaskiya (misali, mazaunin maganar da magana, da-event, da-event). Kayya, Muke ƙayyade wani jarraba da ake gudãna zuwa gane masu samun mutane ko cire-daban. Kuma za'a sami surori da an goge da shirin ayuka da za'a iya sami hanya mai ƙayyade tsakanin node mai daidai cikin grafi. Matarin jarrabai ne a kan aikin aiki guda da ƙõfõfi masu ƙaranci dabam-dabam, sun nuna cewa misalin ayuka da ke iya samar da bakwai.", 'sk': 'Glede na nepopolno verigo dogodkov je cilj učenja scenarijev napovedati manjkajoči dogodek, ki lahko podpira vrsto aplikacij NLP. Obstoječe delo ne more dobro predstavljati heterogenih odnosov in zajeti prekinjenih segmentov dogodkov, ki so pogosti v verigi dogodkov. Za reševanje teh vprašanj uvajamo heterogeno-dogodkovno mrežo (HeterEvent). Zlasti uporabljamo vsako edinstveno besedo in posamezni dogodek kot vozlišča v grafu in raziskujemo tri vrste robov, ki temeljijo na realnih relacijah (npr. relacije besede in beseda, beseda in dogodek, dogodek in dogodek). Prav tako oblikujemo proces prenosa sporočil za uresničevanje informacijskih interakcij med homo ali heterogenimi vozlišči. In neprekinjene segmente dogodkov bi lahko izrecno modelirali z iskanjem specifične poti med ustreznimi vozlišči v grafu. Eksperimentalni rezultati enokoračnih in večkoračnih sklepnih nalog kažejo, da lahko naš ansambelni model HeterEvent[W+E] presega obstoječe osnovne linije.', 'bo': "Given an incomplete event chain, script learning aims to predict the missing event, which can support a series of NLP applications. Existing work can't well represent the heterogeneous relations and capture the discontinue event segments that are common in the event chain. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དག་ལ་བསླབ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་དྲ་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་བྱས་པ་མ་འདུག དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་རེ་རེའི་ནང་གི་གྲལ་ཐིག་ཅིག་གཞན་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་བྱ་ཚིག་རེ་བསམ་བཤེར་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་མ་འདུག། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཞིག་དག་གི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་དེ་ལྟར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིན་མཉམ་དུ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ། མཐུན་སྣང་གི་བྱུང་ལས་དྲན་ཚོར་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པས། The experimental results on one-step and multi-step inference tasks demonstrate that our ensemble model HeterEvent[W+E] can outperform existing baselines."}
{'en': 'Predicting Stance Change Using Modular Architectures', 'ar': 'التنبؤ بتغيير الموقف باستخدام البنى المعيارية', 'fr': "Prévoir le changement de position à l'aide d'architectures", 'pt': 'Prevendo a mudança de postura usando arquiteturas modulares', 'es': 'Predicción del cambio de postura mediante arquitecturas modulares', 'ja': 'モジュール式アーキテクチャを使用したスタンスの変化の予測', 'zh': '用模块化架构测立场', 'hi': 'मॉड्यूलर आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग कर रुख बदलें की भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование изменения положения с использованием модульных архитектур', 'ga': 'Athrú Seasaimh a Thuar Ag Úsáid Ailtirí Modúlach', 'ka': 'მოდულიური აქტიქტურების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Προβλεπόμενη αλλαγή στάσης χρησιμοποιώντας μορφωματικές αρχιτεκτονικές', 'hu': 'A helyzet változásának előrejelzése moduláris architektúrák segítségével', 'kk': 'Модульді архитектураларды қолданатын станция өзгерістерін таңдау', 'lt': 'Numatomi padėties pokyčiai naudojant modulines architektūras', 'mk': 'Предвидување на промена на статусот користејќи модуларни архитектури', 'it': 'Prevedere il cambiamento di posizione utilizzando architetture modulari', 'ms': 'Menunjukkan Perubahan Stans Mengguna Arkitektur Modular', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേന്\u200dസ് മാറ്റം മോഡൂളാര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിറ്ററുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tbassir ta’ Bidla fl-Istanza bl-Użu ta’ Arkitetturi Modulari', 'mn': 'Стэнц өөрчлөлт хэрэглэх модуль архитектурууд', 'ro': 'Prevederea schimbării stării utilizând arhitecturi modulare', 'no': 'Forventar stadsendringar ved bruk av modulararkitekturar', 'sr': 'Predviðavajuæi promenu stanica koristeæi modularne arhitekture', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie zmian stanowiska przy użyciu architektur modułowych', 'so': 'Horumarinta isbedelka isbedelka isticmaalka muusikada', 'si': 'මොඩියුලර් විස්තාරය භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් ස්ටැන්ස් වෙනස් කරන්න', 'sv': 'Förutsäge av Stansförändring med hjälp av modulära arkitekturer', 'ur': 'استنس تغییر کی پیش بینی کی جاتی ہے', 'ta': 'நிலையை மாற்றுதல் கூற்று உருவாக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định trước thay đổi trạng thái dùng cấu trúc rung', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на промяна на позицията с помощта на модулни архитектури', 'hr': 'Predviđavajući promjenu stanica korištenje modularnih arhitektura', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af stillingsændringer ved hjælp af modulære arkitekturer', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van standverandering met behulp van modulaire architecturen', 'ko': '모듈화 구조를 사용하여 자세 변화를 예측하다', 'de': 'Vorhersage von Stanzänderungen mithilfe modularer Architekturen', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی تغییر استاندازی با استفاده از معمارهای مدول', 'id': 'Memprediksi Perubahan Stans Menggunakan Arkitektur Modular', 'sw': 'Kujiandaa mabadiliko ya msimamo kwa kutumia vitabu vya Modular', 'tr': 'Modular arhitektura ullanýan Stansiň üýtgewleri', 'af': 'Voorskou Stensil Verandering', 'az': 'M칲xt톛lif Arhitekt칲rl톛r', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Ստենսի փոփոխության կանխատեսումը՝ օգտագործելով մոդուլյար արխեկտուրներ', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i ndryshimit të qëndrimit duke përdorur arkitektura modulare', 'cs': 'Predikce změny postoje pomocí modulárních architektur', 'bn': 'মডুলার আর্কিটেক্টর ব্যবহার করে স্ট্যান্স পরিবর্তন প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Predviđavajući promjenu stanica koristeći modularne arhitekture', 'ca': 'Predir el canvi de postura amb arquitectures módulars', 'fi': 'Asennon muutoksen ennustaminen modulaaristen arkkitehtuurien avulla', 'et': 'Stantsi muutuse prognoosimine moodularhitektuuride abil', 'jv': 'Gak Ngubah Layaran paten', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje spremembe stanja z uporabo modularnih arhitektur', 'he': 'צפוי שינוי עמדה באמצעות ארכיטקטורות מודולריות', 'ha': 'Predicting Stance Change Using Modular Architectures', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་ཚད་འཛིན་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'The ability to change a person’s mind on a given issue depends both on the arguments they are presented with and on their underlying perspectives and biases on that issue. Predicting stance changes require characterizing both aspects and the interaction between them, especially in realistic settings in which stance changes are very rare. In this paper, we suggest a modular learning approach, which decomposes the task into multiple modules, focusing on different aspects of the interaction between users, their beliefs, and the arguments they are exposed to. Our experiments show that our modular approach archives significantly better results compared to the end-to-end approach using BERT over the same inputs.', 'ar': 'تعتمد القدرة على تغيير رأي الشخص بشأن قضية معينة على الحجج المقدمة معه وعلى وجهات نظره وتحيزاته الأساسية بشأن هذه القضية. يتطلب التنبؤ بتغييرات الموقف وصف كلا الجانبين والتفاعل بينهما ، خاصة في المواقف الواقعية التي تكون فيها تغييرات الموقف نادرة جدًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهج التعلم المعياري ، والذي يقسم المهمة إلى وحدات متعددة ، مع التركيز على جوانب مختلفة من التفاعل بين المستخدمين ومعتقداتهم والحجج التي يتعرضون لها. تُظهر تجاربنا أن نهجنا المعياري يحفظ نتائج أفضل بكثير مقارنة بالنهج الشامل باستخدام BERT على نفس المدخلات.', 'pt': 'A capacidade de mudar a opinião de uma pessoa sobre um determinado assunto depende tanto dos argumentos com os quais são apresentados quanto de suas perspectivas e preconceitos subjacentes sobre esse assunto. Prever mudanças de postura requer caracterizar ambos os aspectos e a interação entre eles, especialmente em cenários realistas em que as mudanças de postura são muito raras. Neste artigo, sugerimos uma abordagem de aprendizagem modular, que decompõe a tarefa em vários módulos, focando em diferentes aspectos da interação entre os usuários, suas crenças e os argumentos aos quais são expostos. Nossos experimentos mostram que nossa abordagem modular arquiva resultados significativamente melhores em comparação com a abordagem de ponta a ponta usando BERT nas mesmas entradas.', 'fr': "La capacité d'une personne à changer d'avis sur une question donnée dépend à la fois des arguments qui lui sont présentés et de ses points de vue et préjugés sous-jacents sur cette question. La prédiction des changements de posture nécessite de caractériser les deux aspects et l'interaction entre eux, en particulier dans des contextes réalistes où les changements de position sont très rares. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche d'apprentissage modulaire, qui décompose la tâche en plusieurs modules, en se concentrant sur différents aspects de l'interaction entre les utilisateurs, leurs croyances et les arguments auxquels ils sont exposés. Nos expériences montrent que notre approche modulaire archive des résultats nettement meilleurs par rapport à l'approche de bout en bout utilisant BERT sur les mêmes entrées.", 'es': 'La capacidad de cambiar la opinión de una persona sobre un tema determinado depende tanto de los argumentos que se le presenten como de sus perspectivas y prejuicios subyacentes sobre ese tema. Predecir los cambios de postura requiere caracterizar ambos aspectos y la interacción entre ellos, especialmente en entornos realistas en los que los cambios de postura son muy raros. En este artículo, sugerimos un enfoque de aprendizaje modular, que descompone la tarea en múltiples módulos, centrándose en diferentes aspectos de la interacción entre los usuarios, sus creencias y los argumentos a los que están expuestos. Nuestros experimentos muestran que nuestro enfoque modular archiva resultados significativamente mejores en comparación con el enfoque integral que utiliza BERT en las mismas entradas.', 'hi': 'किसी दिए गए मुद्दे पर किसी व्यक्ति के दिमाग को बदलने की क्षमता उन तर्कों पर निर्भर करती है जो उनके साथ प्रस्तुत किए जाते हैं और उस मुद्दे पर उनके अंतर्निहित दृष्टिकोण और पूर्वाग्रहों पर। रुख परिवर्तनों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए दोनों पहलुओं और उनके बीच बातचीत की विशेषता की आवश्यकता होती है, खासकर यथार्थवादी सेटिंग्स में जिसमें रुख परिवर्तन बहुत दुर्लभ हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक मॉड्यूलर सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का सुझाव देते हैं, जो कार्य को कई मॉड्यूल में विघटित करता है, उपयोगकर्ताओं, उनके विश्वासों और उन तर्कों के बीच बातचीत के विभिन्न पहलुओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है जो वे उजागर होते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे मॉड्यूलर दृष्टिकोण एक ही इनपुट पर BERT का उपयोग करके एंड-टू-एंड दृष्टिकोण की तुलना में काफी बेहतर परिणामों को अभिलेखागार करते हैं।', 'ja': '特定の問題に対する人の考えを変える能力は、提示される議論と、その問題に関する根底にある視点とバイアスの両方に依存します。スタンスの変化を予測するには、特にスタンスの変化が非常に稀な現実的な場面で、両方の側面とそれらの間の相互作用を特徴付ける必要がある。この論文では、ユーザー間の相互作用のさまざまな側面、ユーザーの信念、およびユーザーが遭遇する議論に焦点を当て、タスクを複数のモジュールに分解するモジュール式学習アプローチを提案する。私たちの実験は、同じ入力に対してBERTを使用したエンドツーエンドのアプローチと比較して、モジュラーアプローチが有意に良い結果をアーカイブすることを示しています。', 'zh': '变特定之能,在乎其所言,在乎其所见。 测曰:二者,势之相用也,尤在奇境。 本文有模块化学术,分职为模块,重用户交异,其信念及其所接之论。 臣等实验明,与同输用BERT之端相比,吾模块化法存档明愈。', 'ru': 'Способность изменить мнение того или иного лица по тому или иному вопросу зависит как от аргументов, которые ему выдвигаются, так и от его основополагающих взглядов и предубеждений по этому вопросу. Прогнозирование изменений позиции требует характеристики обоих аспектов и взаимодействия между ними, особенно в реалистичных условиях, в которых изменения позиции очень редки. В этой статье мы предлагаем модульный подход к обучению, который декомпозирует задачу на несколько модулей, фокусируясь на различных аспектах взаимодействия между пользователями, их убеждениях и аргументах, которым они подвергаются. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наши архивы модульного подхода значительно улучшают результаты по сравнению с сквозным подходом с использованием BERT по сравнению с теми же исходными данными.', 'ga': 'Braitheann an cumas chun meon duine a athrú ar cheist ar leith ar na hargóintí a chuirtear i láthair dóibh agus ar a bpeirspictíochtaí agus ar a gclaofachtaí bunúsacha ar an tsaincheist sin. Chun athruithe seasaimh a thuar is gá an dá ghné agus an t-idirghníomhú eatarthu a thréithriú, go háirithe i suíomhanna réalaíocha ina mbíonn athruithe ar sheasamh an-annamh. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige modúlach foghlama, a dhianscaoileann an tasc ina il-mhodúil, ag díriú ar ghnéithe éagsúla den idirghníomhaíocht idir úsáideoirí, a gcreideamh, agus na hargóintí a nochtar dóibh. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go cartlannaíonn ár gcur chuige modúlach torthaí i bhfad níos fearr i gcomparáid leis an gcur chuige ceann go ceann ag baint úsáide as BERT thar na hionchuir chéanna.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის შესაძლებლობა ცვლილება განსაზღვრებული პრობლემენტის შესაძლებლობა განსაზღვრებული პრობლემენტის შესახებ ორივე განსაზღვრებული არგორმენტის შესახებ, რომელიც ისინი პროცექტის შეცვლების განსაზღვრება უნდა განსაზღვრება ესპექტიკურება და ესპექტიკურება, განსაზღვრებით რეალური პარამეტრებში, რომელიც სტანტიკური ცვლილებები ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ მოდულური სწავლების მიღება, რომელიც რაოდენობას მრავალური მოდულებში გადაწყენებს, რომელიც გამოიყენებელი, მისი წარმოდულებების განსხვავებული განსხვავებულ აპექტი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდულილური მიღება არქიმები ძალიან უკეთესი შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი დასწორებული მიღება BE', 'el': 'Η ικανότητα να αλλάξει τη γνώμη ενός ατόμου σε ένα δεδομένο ζήτημα εξαρτάται τόσο από τα επιχειρήματα που παρουσιάζονται όσο και από τις υποκείμενες προοπτικές και προκαταλήψεις του σχετικά με αυτό το ζήτημα. Η πρόβλεψη αλλαγών στάσης απαιτεί τον χαρακτηρισμό και των δύο πτυχών και της αλληλεπίδρασης μεταξύ τους, ειδικά σε ρεαλιστικές ρυθμίσεις στις οποίες οι αλλαγές στάσης είναι πολύ σπάνιες. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια αρθρωτή προσέγγιση μάθησης, η οποία διαχωρίζει το έργο σε πολλαπλές ενότητες, εστιάζοντας σε διαφορετικές πτυχές της αλληλεπίδρασης μεταξύ των χρηστών, των πεποιθήσεων τους και των επιχειρημάτων στα οποία εκτίθενται. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η αρθρωτή προσέγγιση μας αρχειοθετεί σημαντικά καλύτερα αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με την ολοκληρωμένη προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιεί BERT πάνω από τις ίδιες εισόδους.', 'hu': 'Az a képesség, hogy megváltoztassa az ember véleményét egy adott kérdésben, mind azon érvektől függ, amelyekkel bemutatják őket, mind azok mögöttes perspektíváitól és elfogultságaitól. Az álláspontváltozások előrejelzése mindkét aspektus jellemzését és kölcsönhatását igényli, különösen olyan reális környezetekben, ahol az álláspontváltozások nagyon ritkák. Ebben a tanulmányban egy moduláris tanulási megközelítést javasolunk, amely több modulra bontja a feladatot, fókuszálva a felhasználók közötti interakció különböző aspektusaira, hitükre és érvekre, amelyeknek ki vannak téve. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy moduláris megközelítésünk jelentősen jobb eredményeket archivál, mint a BERT azonos bemenetek mellett.', 'kk': 'Келтірілген мәселеге адамның ойын өзгерту мүмкіндігі, олардың көрсетілген аргументтеріне және олардың негізгі қарауларына және қарауларына тәуелді. Қазір өзгерістерін таңдау үшін олардың арасындағы аспекттер мен әрқашамдылығын таңдау керек, осымен қатар өзгерістерінің реалистикалық параметрлерінде өзгерістері өте қатт Бұл қағазда, біз тапсырманы бірнеше модульдерге бөліп, пайдаланушылар, сенімдері мен аргументтері арасындағы әртүрлі аспектеріне назар аударады. Біздің тәжірибелеріміз модульдердің архивіміздің соңғы-соңғы тәжірибесіне сәйкес келесі жақсы нәтижелерін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Способноста да се промени мислењето на личноста во врска со одредено прашање зависи и од аргументите со кои се претставени, и од нивните основни перспективи и предрасуди во врска со тоа прашање. Предвидувањето на промените на ставот бара карактеризација на двата аспекти и интеракција помеѓу нив, особено во реални услови во кои промените на ставот се многу ретки. Во овој документ, предлагаме модуларен пристап на учење, кој ја разделува задачата во повеќе модули, фокусирајќи се на различни аспекти на интеракцијата помеѓу корисниците, нивните верувања и аргументите на кои се изложени. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека нашиот модуларен пристап архивира значително подобри резултати во споредба со пристапот од крај до крај користејќи BERT за истите внесувања.', 'it': "La capacità di cambiare idea su una determinata questione dipende sia dagli argomenti con cui viene presentata, sia dalle loro prospettive e pregiudizi sottostanti su quella questione. Prevedere i cambiamenti di posizione richiede caratterizzare entrambi gli aspetti e l'interazione tra di loro, specialmente in contesti realistici in cui i cambiamenti di posizione sono molto rari. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio di apprendimento modulare, che scompone il compito in più moduli, concentrandosi su diversi aspetti dell'interazione tra gli utenti, le loro convinzioni e gli argomenti a cui sono esposti. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro approccio modulare archivia risultati significativamente migliori rispetto all'approccio end-to-end che utilizza BERT sugli stessi input.", 'lt': 'Galimybė keisti asmens nuomonę konkrečiu klausimu priklauso tiek nuo jų pateiktų argumentų, tiek nuo jų pagrindinės perspektyvos ir s ąžiningumo šiuo klausimu. Siekiant prognozuoti pozicijos pokyčius, reikia apibūdinti tiek aspektus, tiek tarpusavio sąveiką, ypač realiose aplinkybėse, kuriose pozicijos pokyčiai yra labai reti. Šiame dokumente siūlome modulinį mokymosi metodą, kuriuo užduotis suskirstoma į kelis modulius, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant skirtingiems vartotojų sąveikos aspektams, jų įsitikinimams ir argumentams, su kuriais jie susiduria. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modulinis požiūris archyvuoja gerokai geresnius rezultatus, palyginti su požiūriu nuo pabaigos iki pabaigos, naudojant BERT tais pačiais duomenimis.', 'ms': 'Kemampuan untuk mengubah fikiran seseorang pada isu tertentu bergantung pada argumen yang mereka hadapi dan pada perspektif dan biases mereka pada isu itu. Menunjukkan perubahan kedudukan memerlukan mengukur kedua-dua aspek dan interaksi diantaranya, terutama dalam tetapan realistik di mana perubahan kedudukan sangat jarang. In this paper, we suggest a modular learning approach, which decomposes the task into multiple modules, focusing on different aspects of the interaction between users, their beliefs, and the arguments they are exposed to.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan modular kita arkib hasil yang lebih baik berbanding pendekatan akhir-akhir menggunakan BERT melalui input yang sama.', 'mt': 'Il-kapaċità li tinbidel fehma ta’ persuna dwar kwistjoni partikolari tiddependi kemm fuq l-argumenti li huma ppreżentati magħhom kif ukoll fuq il-perspettivi u l-preġudizzji sottostanti tagħhom dwar dik il-kwistjoni. It-tbassir ta’ bidliet fil-pożizzjoni jeħtieġ li jiġu kkaratterizzati kemm l-aspetti kif ukoll l-interazzjoni bejniethom, speċjalment f’ambjenti realistiċi li fihom il-bidliet fil-pożizzjoni huma rari ħafna. F’dan id-dokument, issuġġerixxu approċċ ta’ tagħlim modulari, li jiddekomponi l-kompitu f’diversi moduli, li jiffoka fuq aspetti differenti tal-interazzjoni bejn l-utenti, it-twemmin tagħhom, u l-argumenti li huma esposti għalihom. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-approċċ modulari tagħna jarċipa riżultati ferm aħjar meta mqabbel mal-approċċ minn tarf sa tarf bl-użu tal-BERT fuq l-istess inputs.', 'ml': 'ഒരു കൊടുത്ത കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഒരാളുടെ മനസ്സ് മാറ്റാനുള്ള കഴിവ് അവയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലും അവരുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള കാഴ്ചകളിലും പിഴവുകളില സ്ഥിതിയുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളും അവയ്ക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും പ്രത്യേകിച ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രായോഗ്യം പരാമര്\u200dശിക്കുന്നു. അത് ജോലിയെ പല ഘടകങ്ങളിലേക്ക് കുറവാക്കുന്നു. ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കും വിശ് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡ്യൂളില്\u200d നടക്കുന്നത് ആര്\u200dക്കൈവുകളില്\u200d മികച്ച ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ലതാണെന്ന്. ബെര്\u200dട്ട', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний бодлыг өгөгдсөн асуудалд өөрчилж чадах чадвар нь тэдний харуулсан аргументаас хоёуланг, үндсэн үзэл, хариу үзэл, асуудал дээр хамаарна. Өөрчлөлтийн өөрчлөлт нь тэдний хоорондын харилцааны харилцааны харилцааныг харуулах хэрэгтэй. Ялангуяа бодит байдалд нөхцөл өөрчлөлт маш ховор байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ажлыг олон модуль руу хувааж, хэрэглэгчид, итгэлтэй, тэдний харилцааны өөр талаар анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг модуль суралцах арга зам зааж байна. Бидний туршилтууд бидний модуль архивуудын архивууд нь төгсгөл-төгсгөл архивуудын харьцуулахад бидний төгсгөл архивуудын үр дүнтэй илүү сайн байна.', 'ro': 'Abilitatea de a schimba mintea unei persoane cu privire la o anumită problemă depinde atât de argumentele cu care sunt prezentate, cât și de perspectivele și prejudecățile lor fundamentale cu privire la această problemă. Prevederea schimbărilor de poziție necesită caracterizarea ambelor aspecte și interacțiunea dintre ele, în special în cadrul unor setări realiste în care schimbările de poziție sunt foarte rare. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare modulară de învățare, care descompune sarcina în mai multe module, concentrându-se pe diferite aspecte ale interacțiunii dintre utilizatori, convingerile lor și argumentele la care sunt expuși. Experimentele noastre arată că abordarea noastră modulară arhivează rezultate semnificativ mai bune comparativ cu abordarea end-to-end folosind BERT pe aceleași intrări.', 'pl': 'Zdolność do zmiany zdania danej osoby w danej kwestii zależy zarówno od argumentów, jak i ich podstawowych perspektyw i uprzedzeń w tej kwestii. Przewidywanie zmian stanowiska wymaga charakteryzowania obu aspektów i interakcji między nimi, zwłaszcza w realistycznych warunkach, w których zmiany stanowiska są bardzo rzadkie. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy modułowe podejście do uczenia się, które rozkłada zadanie na wiele modułów, koncentrując się na różnych aspektach interakcji między użytkownikami, ich przekonaniach i argumentach, na które są narażeni. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasze modułowe podejście archiwizuje znacznie lepsze wyniki w porównaniu z podejściem end-to-end stosującym BERT na tych samych wejściach.', 'no': 'Kvaliteten for å endra personens tanke på eit oppgjeven problem avhengig av begge argumentene dei er presentert med og på sine underliggende perspektiv og framsyningar på det problemet. Førehandsvising av stasjonsendringar krev å karakterisera både aspektar og interaksjonen mellom dei, spesielt i realistiske innstillingar der stasjonsendringane er svært sjeldne. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein modular læringstilnærming, som dekomprimerer oppgåva i fleire modular, fokuserer på ulike aspektar av interaksjonen mellom brukarar, sine troff og argument dei er eksponerte til. Våre eksperimenter viser at våre modulare tilnærming-arkiv er betydelig bedre resultat samanlikna med ende-til-slutttilnærming med BERT over samme inndata.', 'sr': 'Sposobnost promijeniti mišljenje osobe na određenom pitanju ovisi o argumentima kojima se predstavljaju i o svojim temeljnim perspektivama i predrasudama na tom pitanju. Predviđavajuće promjene stanja zahtevaju karakteriziranje aspekta i interakcije između njih, posebno u realističkim postavkama u kojima su promjene stanja vrlo rijetke. U ovom papiru predlažemo modularni pristup učenja, koji raspoređuje zadatak u višestruke module, fokusirajući se na različite aspekte interakcije između korisnika, njihovih verovanja i argumenata na koje su izloženi. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naši modularni arhivi pristupa značajno bolji rezultati u usporedbi sa pristupom kraja do kraja koristeći BERT iznad iste ulaznice.', 'sv': 'Förmågan att ändra en persons uppfattning i en viss fråga beror både på de argument de presenteras med och på deras underliggande perspektiv och fördomar i den frågan. Att förutse ställningsförändringar kräver att båda aspekterna karaktäriseras och samspelet mellan dem, särskilt i realistiska miljöer där ställningsförändringar är mycket sällsynta. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett modulärt lärande tillvägagångssätt, som delar upp uppgiften i flera moduler, med fokus på olika aspekter av interaktionen mellan användare, deras övertygelser och de argument de utsätts för. Våra experiment visar att vårt modulära tillvägagångssätt arkiverar betydligt bättre resultat jämfört med det end-to-end tillvägagångssättet med BERT över samma ingångar.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන්ගේ මනස වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඔවුන්ගේ අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සම්බන්ධයක් අතර, විශේෂයෙන් මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මොඩියුලර් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, මොඩියුලර් වලට කාර්යය පැහැදිලි කරනවා, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ අතර වෙනස් ප්\u200d අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩියුලර් ආර්කායිව් වලට විශේෂයෙන් හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප', 'so': "The ability to change a person's mind on a given issue depends both on the arguments they are presented with and on their underlying perspectives and biases on that issue.  Isbedelka isbedelka ah waxaa loo baahan yahay in la isku xiriiro labada dhinac iyo xiriirka dhexdooda, khusuusan marka lagu beddelo isbedelka xaaladaha ah aad u yaraan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka jeedaynaa qaab cilmi ah, kaas oo shaqada u bedeshaa noocyo kala duduwan, kaas oo ku kalsoonaadaya dhinacyo kala duduwan oo iskutallada u dhexeeya isticmaalayaasha, aaminsadaada iyo waxyaabaha ay ka muuqanayaan. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in arkiyadayada qaabilsan lagu soo jeedo ay ugu wanaagsan yihiin, isbarbarbardhig isticmaalka BERT waxyaabaha isku mid ah.", 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட விஷயத்தில் ஒருவருடைய மனதை மாற்ற முடியும் ஆற்றல் அவர்கள் கொண்டு இருக்கும் வார்த்தைகளையும் அவர்களுடைய அடிப்படை Predicting stance changes require characterizing both aspects and the interaction between them, especially in realistic settings in which stance changes are very rare.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு மாறாக கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது பணியை பல கூறுகளாக குறைக்கும், பயனர்கள், நம்பிக்கைகள் மற்றும் அளபுர எங்கள் சோதனைகள் பிரெட் மீது அதே உள்ளீடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி முடிவுகளை ஒப்பிட முடிவுகளில் மிகவும் நல்ல முடிவு', 'ur': 'ایک شخص کے ذهن کو ایک معاملہ پر بدل دینے کی طاقت دونوں معاملہ پر اور ان کے نیچے معاملہ پر اور ان کے نیچے معاملہ پر معلوم ہے. تغییرات کی تغییرات کی ضرورت ہے کہ ان کے درمیان دونوں منظور اور ان کے درمیان تغییرات کی تعریف کریں، مخصوصاً حقیقی تنظیمات میں جہاں موقعیت کی تغییرات بہت نادر ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک موڈولر سیکھنے کی طرح پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو کام کو بہت سی موڈولوں میں تقسیم کرتا ہے، کارساز، ایمانداروں اور ان کے معاملات کے درمیان مختلف طریقوں پر تمرکز کرتا ہے. ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارے موڈولر تقریبا آرکیوٹوں کے مقابلے میں بہترین نتائج ہیں BERT کے استعمال سے ایک ہی اثناء پر.', 'uz': "Ko'rsatilgan muammo haqida odamni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish mumkin ular bilan keladigan argumentlarga va asosiy ko'rinishiga va shu muammolar haqida o'zgartirish mumkin. Boshqa oʻzgarishlarni tayyorlash va ularning орасидаги ўзгаришларни аломатлаш лозим. Hullas, унда ҳолат ўзгартиришлар juda qisqa. Bu qogʻozda, vazifani bir necha modulga ko'proq qiladi, foydalanuvchilar, ishlatuvchilar, imaniylarining orasidagi qismlariga qaror qiladi, va ularning qiymatlariga ko'proq qiymatlarini ko'rsatadi. Bizning imtiyozlarimizning modulyasi harakatlarimiz arxivlarimiz bir narsa bilan BERT yordamida qo'shish muvaffaqiyatsiz juda yaxshi natijalarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Khả năng thay đổi suy nghĩ của một người về một vấn đề cụ thể phụ thuộc cả vào những lý lẽ họ đưa ra, và vào những quan điểm và giả lập về vấn đề đó. Thay đổi quan điểm xác định trước cần phải mô tả cả hai khía cạnh và tương tác giữa chúng, đặc biệt là trong những trường hợp thực tế mà thay đổi quan điểm là rất hiếm. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp học tập trung theo chế độ, nó phân hủy các nhiệm vụ thành nhiều mô-đun, tập trung vào các khía cạnh khác nhau của sự giao tiếp giữa người dùng, tín ngưỡng của họ, và các lý luận mà họ tiếp xúc. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy các tài liệu theo cách tiếp cận theo lệ thường của chúng ta đạt kết quả tốt hơn so với kết thúc bằng BERT sử dụng cùng các tài liệu nội dung.', 'bg': 'Способността да промените мнението на човек по даден въпрос зависи както от аргументите, с които са представени, така и от основните им перспективи и пристрастия по този въпрос. Прогнозирането на промените в стойката изисква характеризиране и на двата аспекта и взаимодействието между тях, особено в реалистични условия, в които промените в стойката са много редки. В настоящата статия предлагаме модулен подход за обучение, който разгражда задачата на множество модули, като се фокусира върху различни аспекти на взаимодействието между потребителите, техните вярвания и аргументите, на които са изложени. Нашите експерименти показват, че модулният ни подход архивира значително по-добри резултати в сравнение с подхода от край до край, използващ BERT върху същите входове.', 'da': 'Evnen til at ændre mening på et givet emne afhænger både af de argumenter, de præsenteres for, og af deres underliggende perspektiver og fordomme på dette emne. Forudsigelse af holdningsændringer kræver karakterisering af begge aspekter og samspillet mellem dem, især i realistiske omgivelser, hvor holdningsændringer er meget sjældne. I denne artikel foreslår vi en modulær læringstilgang, der opdeler opgaven i flere moduler med fokus på forskellige aspekter af interaktionen mellem brugere, deres overbevisninger og de argumenter, de er udsat for. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores modulære tilgang arkiverer betydeligt bedre resultater sammenlignet med end-to-end tilgang med BERT over de samme input.', 'nl': 'Het vermogen om iemand van gedachten te veranderen over een bepaald onderwerp hangt zowel af van de argumenten waarmee hij wordt gepresenteerd als van zijn onderliggende perspectieven en vooroordelen over dat onderwerp. Het voorspellen van standwisselingen vereist het karakteriseren van beide aspecten en de interactie tussen hen, vooral in realistische omgevingen waarin standwisselingen zeer zeldzaam zijn. In dit artikel stellen we een modulaire leerbenadering voor, die de taak opsplitst in meerdere modules, gericht op verschillende aspecten van de interactie tussen gebruikers, hun overtuigingen en de argumenten waaraan ze worden blootgesteld. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat onze modulaire aanpak significant betere resultaten archiveert in vergelijking met de end-to-end aanpak waarbij BERT over dezelfde inputs wordt gebruikt.', 'hr': 'Sposobnost promijeniti mišljenje osobe na određenom pitanju ovisi o argumentima s kojima se predstavljaju i o svojim temeljnim perspektivama i predrasudama na tom pitanju. Predviđavajuće promjene stanja zahtijevaju karakteriziranje aspekta i interakcije između njih, posebno u realističkim postavkama u kojima su promjene stanja vrlo rijetke. U ovom papiru predlažemo modularni pristup učenja, koji raspoređuje zadatak u višestruke module, fokusirajući se na različite aspekte interakcije između korisnika, njihovih vjerovanja i argumenata na koje su izloženi. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su naši modularni arhivi pristupa značajno bolji rezultati u usporedbi s pristupom kraja do kraja koristeći BERT u istim ulazima.', 'de': 'Die Fähigkeit, die Meinung einer Person zu einem bestimmten Thema zu ändern, hängt sowohl von den Argumenten ab, mit denen sie präsentiert wird, als auch von ihren zugrunde liegenden Perspektiven und Vorurteilen in diesem Thema. Die Vorhersage von Haltungsänderungen erfordert die Charakterisierung beider Aspekte und deren Interaktion, insbesondere in realistischen Settings, in denen Haltungsänderungen sehr selten sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen modularen Lernansatz vor, der die Aufgabe in mehrere Module zerlegt, wobei der Fokus auf verschiedene Aspekte der Interaktion zwischen Benutzern, ihren Überzeugungen und den Argumenten liegt, denen sie ausgesetzt sind. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unser modularer Ansatz deutlich bessere Ergebnisse archiviert als der End-to-End-Ansatz mit BERT über die gleichen Eingaben.', 'id': "The ability to change a person's mind on a given issue depends both on the arguments they are presented with and on their underlying perspectives and biases on that issue.  Menunjukkan perubahan posisi membutuhkan karakterisasi kedua aspek dan interaksi antara mereka, terutama dalam pengaturan realistis di mana perubahan posisi sangat jarang. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyarankan pendekatan pembelajaran modular, yang menghancurkan tugas menjadi beberapa modul, fokus pada aspek yang berbeda dari interaksi antara pengguna, kepercayaan mereka, dan argumen yang mereka terkena. Our experiments show that our modular approach archives significantly better results compared to the end-to-end approach using BERT over the same inputs.", 'fa': 'توانایی تغییر نظر یک نفر از یک مسئله به عنوان یک مسئله داده بستگی دارد هر دو از ارائه\u200cهایی که به آن نشان داده می\u200cشوند و بر روی نقشه\u200cهایشان و نقشه\u200cهایشان بر آن مسئله بستگی دارد. تغییرات موقعیت پیش\u200cبینی نیاز دارد که هر دو قسمت و تعامل بین آنها را تشکیل دهند، مخصوصا در تنظیمات واقعی که تغییرات موقعیت خیلی نادر است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش یادگیری مدیول، که این کار را به مدیول\u200cهای متعدد تغییر می\u200cدهد، روی نقطه\u200cهای متفاوتی از تعامل بین کاربران، باورهایشان، و ارائه\u200cهایی که به آن نشان می\u200cدهند. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که آرژانس\u200cهای مودیولی ما نتایج بسیار بهتر در مقایسه با طریق پایان و پایان با استفاده از BERT بر روی یک ورودی.', 'sw': 'Uwezo wa kubadilisha akili ya mtu kwenye suala hilo linategemea mijadala yao na mitazamo yao ya msingi na upendeleo kuhusu suala hilo. Mabadiliko ya msimamo yanahitaji kuhalalisha upande wote na mahusiano kati yao, hususani katika mazingira halisi ambayo mabadiliko ya msimamo ni nadra sana. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za kujifunza za za kawaida, ambazo huzungusha kazi katika vifaa vingi, kwa lengo la namna mbalimbali za mahusiano kati ya watumiaji, imani zao, na hoja ambazo zinaonyeshwa. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu zetu za kiutamaduni zilikuwa na matokeo mazuri zaidi ukilinganisha na mbinu za mwisho kwa kutumia BERT juu ya matokeo hayo.', 'ko': '어떤 문제에서 한 사람의 생각을 바꾸는 능력은 그들이 제기한 논점에 달려 있을 뿐만 아니라, 그들이 이 문제에 대한 잠재적인 관점과 편견에도 달려 있다.자세 변화를 예측하려면 이 두 가지 측면과 그들 간의 상호작용을 묘사해야 한다. 특히 자세 변화가 매우 보기 드문 현실 환경에서 그렇다.본고에서 우리는 모듈화 학습 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 임무를 여러 모듈로 분해하고 사용자 간의 상호작용의 다양한 측면, 그들의 신념과 그들이 직면한 논쟁에 중점을 두었다.우리의 실험은 동일한 입력 조건에서 BERT의 끝에서 끝까지의 방법을 사용하는 것보다 모듈화 방법으로 보관한 결과가 현저히 좋다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'af': "Die moontlik om 'n persoon se gedagte te verander op 'n gegewe aandag afhang beide van die argumente waarmee hulle voorgestel word en op hul ondersteunde perspeksies en voorspoedies op daardie aandag. Voorskou staanse veranderinge benodig om beide aspekte en die interaksie tussen hulle te karakteriseer, veral in realistiese instellings waarin staanse veranderinge baie rare is. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n modulare leer toegang, wat die taak in veelvuldige modules ontkoppel, fokus op verskillende aspekte van die interaksie tussen gebruikers, hulle geloof en die argumente waarmee hulle uitgevoer word. Ons eksperimente wys dat ons modulare toegang argiewe beter resultate vergelyk het met die einde-tot-einde toegang gebruik BERT oor dieselfde inputs.", 'tr': 'Bir adamyň pikirini berilen meselede üýtgetmegiň başarylygy hem olaryň görkezilýän argumentleriň hem olaryň ünsli perspektivleriniň we biaslarynyň üstüne degişlidir. Durumyň üýtgewleri öň berilýän çykyşlaryň her iki aspektini we olaryň arasynyň täsirini takyklaşdyrmak gerek, ýöne-de bu durum üýtgewleri örän nadir. Bu kagyzda, biz modüler öwrenme metodasyny maslahat berýäris, bu zady birnäçe modülere bölýär, ullançylaryň, ynamlaryň we olaryň görünýän argumlaryna üns berýäris. Biziň deneylerimiz modüler arşiwlerimiz şol ýagdaýda BERT we soňky ýagdaýynyň üstünde bolan ýagdaýynyň has gowy netijesi görýär.', 'hy': 'Մարդու կարծիքը փոխելու կարողությունը որոշ խնդիրների վրա կախված է նրանց ներկայացված բանավեճերից և դրանց հիմնական տեսանկյուններից և կողմնականություններից: Predicting stance changes require characterizing both aspects and the interaction between them, especially in realistic settings in which stance changes are very rare.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մոդուլյար ուսուցման մոտեցում, որը բաժանում է խնդիրը բազմաթիվ մոդուլների, կենտրոնանալով օգտագործողների, նրանց համոզմունքների և բանավեճերի միջև փոխազդեցության տարբեր ասպեկտների վրա: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդուլյար մոտեցումը արխիվներ ունի ավելի լավ արդյունքներ, համեմատած վերջ-վերջ մոտեցումը BER-ի օգնությամբ նույն ներմուծների մեջ:', 'am': "The ability to change a person's mind on a given issue depends both on the arguments they are presented with and on their underlying perspectives and biases on that issue.  ሁኔታ ማቀናቀል፣ ሁኔታ እና በመካከላቸው ግንኙነት እና ግንኙነት ማቀናቀል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ስራውን በብዙ ሞኮሎችን ያሳድዳል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የፊደል ሥርዓት መካነታችን አካባቢ ፍሬዎችን በአንድ ጥያቄ ላይ BERT በተደረገ መጨረሻ ይሻላል፡፡", 'az': 'İnsanın fikrini belə bir məs ələdə dəyişdirmə bacarılığı hər ikisi də bu məsələdə göstərilən argumentlərə və onların əs a s perspektivlərinə və təsirlərinə bağlı olur. Durum dəyişikliklərinin tədbir edilməsi hər ikisinin və onların arasındakı müxtəlif şəkildə müxtəlif dəyişikliklərin çox nadir olduğu şəkildə təsbir edilməsi lazımdır. Bu kağızda, işləri çoxlu modullərə parçalayıb, istifadəçilərin, inançlarının və onların göstərilən argumentlərin arasındakı müxtəlif tərəflərinə odaqlanan modul öyrənmə metodlarını təklif edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz modular ımızın arşivlerinin sonun-sonun approach ilə birlikdə BERT vasitəsilə istifadə edilən təcrübələrimizin daha yaxşı sonuçlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'নির্দিষ্ট বিষয়ে কোন ব্যক্তির মন পরিবর্তনের ক্ষমতা নির্ভর করে তাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং তাদের ভূতপূর্ণ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং প্রতারণ অবস্থানের প্রস্তুতি প্রস্তুত করার জন্য প্রয়োজন উভয় দিক এবং তাদের মধ্যে যুক্তির পরিবর্তন, বিশেষ করে বাস্তবতার বৈশিষ্ট্যিক ব এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মডিউলেল শিক্ষার উপায় পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি, যা কাজ বেশ কয়েকটি মডিউলে পরিণত করে, ব্যবহারকারীদের, তাদের বিশ্বাস এবং যুক্তি তাদের প্রকাশ করা  Our experiments show that our modular approach archives significantly better results compared to the end-to-end approach using BERT over the same inputs.', 'bs': 'Sposobnost promijeniti mišljenje osobe na određenom pitanju ovisi o argumentima kojima se predstavljaju i o svojim temeljnim perspektivama i predrasudama na tom pitanju. Predviđavajuće promjene stava zahtijevaju karakteriziranje aspekta i interakcije između njih, posebno u realističkim postavkama u kojima su promjene stava vrlo rijetke. U ovom papiru predlažemo modularni pristup učenja, koji raspoređuje zadatak u višestruke module, fokusirajući se na različite aspekte interakcije između korisnika, njihovih vjerovanja i argumenata na koje su izloženi. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su naši modularni arhivi pristupa značajno bolji rezultati u usporedbi s pristupom kraja do kraja koristeći BERT u istim ulazima.', 'ca': "L'habilitat de canviar la ment d'una person a en un tema determinat depèn tant dels arguments amb els quals es presenta com de les seves perspectives i tendències subjacentes en aquest tema. Predicting stance changes require characterizing both aspects and the interaction between them, especially in realistic settings in which stance changes are very rare.  En aquest paper, suggerem un enfocament d'aprenentatge modular, que descomposa la tasca en múltiples móduls, centrant-nos en diferents aspectes de la interacció entre els usuaris, les seves creences i els arguments a què estan exposats. Els nostres experiments demostren que el nostre enfocament modular arquiva resultats significativament millors en comparació amb l'enfocament final a final utilitzant BERT sobre les mateixes entrades.", 'et': 'Võime muuta inimese meelt konkreetses küsimuses sõltub nii argumentidest, millega nad esitatakse, kui ka nende aluseks olevatest perspektiividest ja eelarvamustest selles küsimuses. Hoiakumuutuste prognoosimine nõuab mõlema aspekti iseloomustamist ja nendevahelist koostoimet, eriti realistlikes tingimustes, kus hoiakumuutused on väga harva. Käesolevas töös pakume välja moodulõppe lähenemisviisi, mis jagab ülesande mitmeks mooduliks, keskendudes kasutajate vahelise suhtluse erinevatele aspektidele, nende uskumustele ja argumentidele, millega nad kokku puutuvad. Meie katsed näitavad, et meie modulaarne lähenemine arhiveerib märkimisväärselt paremaid tulemusi võrreldes BERT-i kasutamisega samadel sisenditel.', 'cs': 'Schopnost změnit názor člověka na danou otázku závisí jak na argumentech, které jsou prezentovány, tak na jejich základních perspektivách a zaujatostech v této otázce. Předpověď změn postoje vyžaduje charakterizovat oba aspekty a interakci mezi nimi, zejména v realistických prostředích, kde jsou změny postojů velmi vzácné. V tomto článku navrhujeme modulární učební přístup, který rozloží úkol na několik modulů, se zaměřením na různé aspekty interakce mezi uživateli, jejich přesvědčení a argumenty, kterým jsou vystaveni. Naše experimenty ukazují, že náš modulární přístup archivuje výrazně lepší výsledky ve srovnání s end-to-end přístupem používajícím BERT na stejných vstupech.', 'fi': 'Kyky muuttaa henkilön mieli tietyssä asiassa riippuu sekä argumenteista, joita hän esittää, että hänen taustalla olevista näkökulmista ja ennakkoluuloista tässä asiassa. Asennusmuutosten ennakoiminen edellyttää molempien näkökohtien ja niiden välisen vuorovaikutuksen luonnehtimista erityisesti realistisissa olosuhteissa, joissa asennonmuutokset ovat hyvin harvinaisia. Tässä työssä ehdotamme modulaarista oppimista, joka jakaa tehtävän useisiin moduuleihin keskittyen eri näkökulmiin käyttäjien vuorovaikutuksessa, heidän uskomuksissaan ja argumenteissaan, joille he altistuvat. Kokeemme osoittavat, että modulaarinen lähestymistapamme arkistoi huomattavasti parempia tuloksia verrattuna end-to-end -lähestymistapaan, jossa käytetään BERT-menetelmää samoilla syötteillä.', 'sq': 'Aftësia për të ndryshuar mendjen e një personi në një çështje të caktuar varet si nga argumentet me të cilat janë paraqitur, ashtu edhe nga perspektivat dhe paragjykimet themelore të tyre në këtë çështje. Predicting stance changes require characterizing both aspects and the interaction between them, especially in realistic settings in which stance changes are very rare.  Në këtë letër, sugjerojmë një metodë modulare mësimi, e cila e shkëput detyrën në module të shumta, duke u përqëndruar në aspekte të ndryshme të ndërveprimit midis përdoruesve, besimeve të tyre dhe argumenteve që ekspozohen. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se metoda jonë modulare arkivon rezultate më të mira në mënyrë të konsiderueshme krahasuar me metodën e fundit në fund duke përdorur BERT mbi të njëjtat inputs.', 'sk': 'Sposobnost spreminjanja mnenja osebe glede določenega vprašanja je odvisna tako od argumentov, s katerimi so predstavljeni, kot tudi od njihovih osnovnih perspektiv in pristranskosti glede tega vprašanja. Predvidevanje sprememb položaja zahteva opredelitev obeh vidikov in interakcije med njima, zlasti v realnih okoljih, v katerih so spremembe položaja zelo redke. V prispevku predlagamo modularni pristop učenja, ki nalogo razdeli na več modulov in se osredotoča na različne vidike interakcije med uporabniki, njihova prepričanja in argumente, ki so jim izpostavljeni. Naši poskusi kažejo, da naš modularni pristop arhivira bistveno boljše rezultate v primerjavi s pristopom od konca do konca, ki uporablja BERT pri istih vhodih.', 'jv': 'Gawe ngubah perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai winih ning kana dianggap, dipunduh dianggap karo mentiyé sing bisa dianggap karo perspektur nggo dianggap karo perbudhakan kanggo dianggap. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pewiir iki, kita suggeremu akeh modul kanggo kelas modul, dadi nambah task gawe modul sing tinimpen, ingkang sampeyan karo perusahaan interaksi, nggunakake karo perusahaan lan spikening Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasah sistem modul sing gak adhasar ditambah luwih apik dadi, mengko iso nggawe gerarané BERT ngono input sampek lho.', 'ha': "Manzon ya musanya ma'azar mutum a kan wani al'amarin da aka bã shi yana dõgara ga jãyayyen da aka bã su da, kuma a kan wurãren kwanciyarsu da keɓantarsu a kan wannan masu. @ info: whatsthis In this paper, we suggest a modular learning approach, which decomposes the task into multiple modules, focusing on different aspects of the interaction between users, their beliefs, and the arguments they are exposed to.  Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa filayenmu masu matsayin modulunci yana da mafiya alhẽri ga matsayi sami da amfani da BERT kan duk matsayin da ke ƙarami.", 'he': "The ability to change a person's mind on a given issue depends both on the arguments they are presented with and on their underlying perspectives and biases on that issue.  לנחש שינויים של עמדה דורשים לתייצב את שני היבטים והאינטראקציה ביניהם, במיוחד במסגרות מציאותיות שבהן שינויים של עמדה נדירים מאוד. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה למידה מודולרית, שמפרקת את המשימה למודולים רבים, מתמקדת באינטראקציה שונה בין המשתמשים, האמונות שלהם, והטיעונים שהם חשופים אליהם. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהגישה המודולרית שלנו מארכיבת תוצאות טובות יותר באופן משמעותי בהשוואה לגישה סוף-סוף באמצעות BERT על אותם הכניסות.", 'bo': 'གང་ཟག་ཀྱི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གཅིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣེ་དང་མཐོ གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འདྲ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་བ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་མི་དབྱེ་བཟོ་གི་ཡིག་མཛོད་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་པ་'}
{'en': 'Multimodal Review Generation with Privacy and Fairness Awareness', 'ar': 'جيل مراجعة متعدد الوسائط مع الوعي بالخصوصية والإنصاف', 'fr': "Génération d'avis multimodaux avec prise en compte de la confidentialité", 'pt': 'Geração de revisão multimodal com consciência de privacidade e justiça', 'es': 'Generación de revisiones multimodales con conciencia de privacidad y equidad', 'ja': 'プライバシーと公平性を意識したマルチモーダルレビュー生成', 'hi': 'गोपनीयता और निष्पक्षता जागरूकता के साथ बहुआयामी समीक्षा पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Поколение мультимодальных обзоров с конфиденциальностью и осведомленностью о справедливости', 'zh': '有私平意者多模样审成', 'ga': 'Giniúint Athbhreithnithe Ilmhódúil le Feasacht Príobháideachta agus Cothroime', 'el': 'Δημιουργία πολυμέσων αναθεωρήσεων με ευαισθητοποίηση περί απορρήτου και δικαιοσύνης', 'hu': 'Multimodális felülvizsgálatok generálása adatvédelmi és tisztességes tudatossággal', 'ka': 'Multimodal Review Generation with Privacy and Fairness Awareness', 'lt': 'Daugiatransporto apžvalgos generacija, kuria informuojama apie privatumą ir sąžiningumą', 'it': "Generazione di recensioni multimodali con consapevolezza sulla privacy e l'equità", 'mk': 'Генерација на мултимодилни ревизии со свесност за приватноста и правдата', 'kk': 'Қосымшалық және қауіпсіздік туралы көптеген қарау құрылғысы', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Reviżjoni Multimodali b’Kunxjenza dwar il-Privatezza u l-Ġustizzja', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Pemeriksaan Multimodal dengan Awas Peribadi dan Keadilan', 'ml': 'സ്വകാര്യത്തിലും വിശ്വസ്തതയില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുമായി പല മൊളിമോഡല്\u200d നോക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രജനനം', 'mn': 'Мөн олон загварын хувилбар, сэтгэл зүйн мэдрэмжтэй олон судалгааны бүтээл', 'no': 'Generering av fleire modular overvåking med privat og feilsikt', 'pl': 'Generowanie multimodalnych przeglądów ze świadomością prywatności i uczciwości', 'ro': 'Generarea recenziilor multimodale cu conștientizarea confidențialității și corectitudinii', 'si': 'පුද්ගලිකතාවය සහ නිර්භාවතාවය සඳහා ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය', 'sv': 'Multimodal granskning generation med sekretess och rättvisa medvetenhet', 'so': 'Muuqashada aragtida badan oo gaarka loo leeyahay iyo aqoonta daacadnimada', 'sr': 'Generacija multimodalnog pregleda sa svijesti privatnosti i nepravednosti', 'ur': 'مخصوصی اور سفارشی آگاہ کے ساتھ بہت سی موڈال ریویڈ نسل', 'ta': 'Comment', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Truyền thông đa phương với sự bảo mật và công bằng', 'hr': 'Generacija multimodalnog pregleda sa svijesti privatnosti i nepravednosti', 'bg': 'Създаване на мултимодални прегледи с информираност за поверителността и справедливостта', 'nl': 'Multimodale review generatie met privacy en eerlijkheid bewustzijn', 'da': 'Generation af multimodale anmeldelser med beskyttelse af personlige oplysninger og retfærdighed', 'id': 'Generasi Review Multimodal dengan Kepribadian dan Awal Keadilan', 'de': 'Multimodale Review Generation mit Datenschutz und Fairness Bewusstsein', 'fa': 'نسل بازرسی چندmodal با آگاهی خصوصی و عدالت', 'ko': '프라이버시와 공평의식을 갖춘 다중모드 심사 생성', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa Mapitio ya Pili na Ujuzi wa Sikukuu', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Görniş Gizlikli we Duýdursyzlyk Bildirişi bilen döredildi', 'af': 'Multimodaal Aansig Generasie met Privateit en Verwaarsheid Bevestiging', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i shqyrtimit multimodal me vetëdijen për privatësinë dhe drejtësinë', 'hy': 'Մոլորմոդալ վերանայման սերունդը գաղտնիության և արդարության գիտակցության հետ', 'az': 'X칲susiyy톛t v톛 톛dal톛tsizlik Bilinm톛si il톛 칞oxlu modal Review n톛z톛riyy톛ti', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিগত এবং বিশ্বাসঘাতকতার সাথে মাল্টিমোডাল রিভিউ প্রজন্ম', 'bs': 'Generacija multimodalnog pregleda sa svijesti privatnosti i nepravednosti', 'ca': 'La generació de revisió multimodal amb la privacitat i la consciència de la justesa', 'cs': 'Multimodální generace recenzí s povědomím o soukromí a spravedlnosti', 'et': 'Multimodaalse ülevaate loomine privaatsuse ja õigluse teadlikkusega', 'fi': 'Multimodaalisen arvostelun luominen yksityisyyden ja oikeudenmukaisuuden tietoisuuden avulla', 'jv': 'Generasi Multimodal Report Generasi karo Pribadi lan Kebebasan Gambar', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྒེར་དབང་དང་སྐྱོན་རྟོགས་མེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་འདུག', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje multimodalnih pregledov z zasebnostjo in ozaveščanjem o pravičnosti', 'he': 'דנרציה של שיקול רב-מודלי עם מודעות לפרטיות וההוגנות'}
{'en': 'Users express their opinions towards entities (e.g., restaurants) via online reviews which can be in diverse forms such as text, ratings, and images. Modeling reviews are advantageous for user behavior understanding which, in turn, supports various user-oriented tasks such as recommendation, sentiment analysis, and review generation. In this paper, we propose MG-PriFair, a multimodal neural-based framework, which generates personalized reviews with privacy and fairness awareness. Motivated by the fact that reviews might contain personal information and sentiment bias, we propose a novel differentially private (dp)-embedding model for training privacy guaranteed embeddings and an evaluation approach for sentiment fairness in the food-review domain. Experiments on our novel review dataset show that MG-PriFair is capable of generating plausibly long reviews while controlling the amount of exploited user data and using the least sentiment biased word embeddings. To the best of our knowledge, we are the first to bring user privacy and sentiment fairness into the review generation task. The dataset and source codes are available at https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'pt': 'Os usuários expressam suas opiniões em relação a entidades (por exemplo, restaurantes) por meio de avaliações on-line que podem ser de diversas formas, como texto, avaliações e imagens. As revisões de modelagem são vantajosas para a compreensão do comportamento do usuário que, por sua vez, suporta várias tarefas orientadas ao usuário, como recomendação, análise de sentimento e geração de revisão. Neste artigo, propomos o MG-PriFair, um framework multimodal baseado em neural, que gera avaliações personalizadas com consciência de privacidade e justiça. Motivados pelo fato de que as revisões podem conter informações pessoais e viés de sentimento, propomos um novo modelo de incorporação diferencialmente privado (dp) para treinamento de incorporação garantida de privacidade e uma abordagem de avaliação para justiça de sentimento no domínio de revisão de alimentos. Experimentos em nosso novo conjunto de dados de revisão mostram que o MG-PriFair é capaz de gerar revisões plausivelmente longas enquanto controla a quantidade de dados de usuários explorados e usa as incorporações de palavras menos tendenciosas de sentimento. Até onde sabemos, somos os primeiros a trazer a privacidade do usuário e a justiça de sentimentos para a tarefa de geração de avaliações. O conjunto de dados e os códigos-fonte estão disponíveis em https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ar': 'يعبر المستخدمون عن آرائهم تجاه الكيانات (مثل المطاعم) من خلال المراجعات عبر الإنترنت والتي يمكن أن تكون بأشكال متنوعة مثل النصوص والتقييمات والصور. تعد مراجعات النمذجة مفيدة لفهم سلوك المستخدم والتي بدورها تدعم المهام المختلفة الموجهة للمستخدم مثل التوصية وتحليل المشاعر وإنشاء المراجعة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح MG-PriFair ، وهو إطار عصبي متعدد الوسائط يقوم بإنشاء مراجعات شخصية مع وعي بالخصوصية والإنصاف. بدافع من حقيقة أن المراجعات قد تحتوي على معلومات شخصية وتحيزًا للمشاعر ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا خاصًا للتضمين التفاضلي (dp) لتدريب حفلات الزفاف المضمونة بالخصوصية ونهج تقييم لعدالة المشاعر في مجال مراجعة الطعام. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعة بيانات المراجعة الجديدة الخاصة بنا أن MG-PriFair قادرة على إنشاء مراجعات طويلة بشكل معقول مع التحكم في كمية بيانات المستخدم المستغلة واستخدام أقل قدر من التحيز العاطفي للكلمات. على حد علمنا ، نحن أول من أدخل خصوصية المستخدم وعدالة المشاعر في مهمة إنشاء المراجعة. تتوفر مجموعة البيانات وأكواد المصدر على https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'es': 'Los usuarios expresan sus opiniones hacia las entidades (por ejemplo, restaurantes) a través de reseñas en línea que pueden presentarse en diversas formas, como texto, calificaciones e imágenes. Las revisiones de modelos son ventajosas para la comprensión del comportamiento del usuario, lo que, a su vez, admite varias tareas orientadas al usuario, como la recomendación, el análisis de opiniones y la generación de reseñas. En este artículo, proponemos MG-Prifair, un marco multimodal basado en neuronas, que genera revisiones personalizadas con conciencia de privacidad y equidad. Motivados por el hecho de que las reseñas pueden contener información personal y sesgo de opinión, proponemos un modelo novedoso de integración diferencialmente privada (dp) para capacitar incorporaciones garantizadas de privacidad y un enfoque de evaluación para la equidad de los sentimientos en el dominio de la revisión de alimentos. Experimentos en nuestro novedoso conjunto de datos de reseñas muestran que MG-Prifair es capaz de generar revisiones plausiblemente largas mientras controla la cantidad de datos de usuarios explotados y utiliza las incrustaciones de palabras menos sesgadas por el sentimiento. Hasta donde sabemos, somos los primeros en incorporar la privacidad del usuario y la equidad de opinión en la tarea de generación de reseñas. El conjunto de datos y los códigos fuente están disponibles en https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'fr': "Les utilisateurs expriment leurs opinions envers les entités (par exemple, les restaurants) via des avis en ligne qui peuvent prendre diverses formes telles que du texte, des évaluations et des images. Les revues de modélisation sont avantageuses pour comprendre le comportement des utilisateurs qui, à leur tour, prennent en charge diverses tâches orientées vers l'utilisateur, telles que la recommandation, l'analyse des sentiments et la génération d'avis. Dans cet article, nous proposons MG-Prifair, un cadre neuronal multimodal, qui génère des évaluations personnalisées avec une prise en compte de la confidentialité et de l'équité. Motivés par le fait que les avis peuvent contenir des informations personnelles et des préjugés d'opinion, nous proposons un nouveau modèle d'intégration différentially private (dp) pour la formation des intégrations garanties de confidentialité et une approche d'évaluation pour l'équité des sentiments dans le domaine de l'évaluation des aliments. Des expériences sur notre nouveau jeu de données d'avis montrent que MG-Prifair est capable de générer des critiques plausiblement longues tout en contrôlant la quantité de données utilisateur exploitées et en utilisant les intégrations de mots les moins biaisées par le sentiment. À notre connaissance, nous sommes les premiers à intégrer la confidentialité des utilisateurs et l'équité des sentiments dans la tâche de génération d'avis. L'ensemble de données et les codes sources sont disponibles à l'adresse https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'zh': '用户以在线论见其实体(如餐厅)之议,可以杂见,如文本,评级象。 建模论利于用户行,而用户行知反于面向用户,若推情析论而成。 本文发MG-PriFair,盖多模态神经之框架,生成私平之个性化论。 论包个人信息情偏见,设一新异(dp)嵌模形,以练隐保,及食论平。 新论数据集之实验,MG-PriFair成理之长论,兼制用之用户数据量,而用至情之词。 以吾所知,首纳用户私情公平性公司。 数据集和源代码可在 https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair。', 'ja': 'ユーザーは、テキスト、評価、画像などの多様な形式で表示されるオンラインレビューを通じて、エンティティ(レストランなど)に対して意見を述べます。 モデリングレビューは、ユーザーの行動を理解するのに有利であり、推奨、感情分析、レビュー生成などのさまざまなユーザー指向のタスクをサポートします。 本稿では、プライバシーと公平性を意識したパーソナライズされたレビューを生成する、マルチモーダルニューラルベースのフレームワークであるMG - PriFairを提案する。 レビューには個人情報と感情の偏見が含まれている可能性があるという事実に動機づけられており、プライバシー保証の埋め込みのためのトレーニングのための斬新な差別的プライベート（ dp ）埋め込みモデルと、フードレビュードメインの感情の公平性のための評価アプローチを提案しています。 当社の新規レビューデータセットの実験では、MG - PriFairは、利用されたユーザーデータの量を制御し、センチメントの偏りの少ない単語の埋め込みを使用しながら、かなり長いレビューを生成することができることが示されています。 私たちの知る限りでは、レビュー生成タスクにユーザーのプライバシーと感情の公平性をもたらすのは私たちが最初です。 データセットとソースコードは、https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFairで入手できます。', 'ru': 'Пользователи выражают свое мнение по отношению к организациям (например, ресторанам) через онлайн-обзоры, которые могут быть в различных формах, таких как текст, рейтинги и изображения. Моделирование отзывов выгодно для понимания поведения пользователей, что, в свою очередь, поддерживает различные пользовательские задачи, такие как рекомендации, анализ настроений и генерация отзывов. В этой статье мы предлагаем MG-PriFair, мультимодальный нейронный фреймворк, который генерирует персонализированные отзывы с конфиденциальностью и осведомленностью о справедливости. Основываясь на том факте, что отзывы могут содержать личную информацию и предвзятость настроений, мы предлагаем новую дифференцированно частную (dp) модель встраивания для обучения гарантированным вложениям конфиденциальности и подход к оценке справедливости настроений в области обзора продуктов питания. Эксперименты на нашем новом наборе данных отзывов показывают, что MG-PriFair способна генерировать правдоподобно длинные отзывы, контролируя количество эксплуатируемых пользовательских данных и используя вложения слов с наименьшей предвзятостью. Насколько нам известно, мы первыми привнесли конфиденциальность пользователей и справедливость настроений в задачу генерации отзывов. Набор данных и исходные коды доступны по адресу https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ता ऑनलाइन समीक्षाओं के माध्यम से संस्थाओं (जैसे, रेस्तरां) के प्रति अपनी राय व्यक्त करते हैं जो पाठ, रेटिंग और छवियों जैसे विभिन्न रूपों में हो सकते हैं। मॉडलिंग समीक्षाएं उपयोगकर्ता व्यवहार की समझ के लिए फायदेमंद हैं, जो बदले में, सिफारिश, भावना विश्लेषण और समीक्षा पीढ़ी जैसे विभिन्न उपयोगकर्ता-उन्मुख कार्यों का समर्थन करती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम MG-PriFair, एक बहुआयामी तंत्रिका-आधारित ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो गोपनीयता और निष्पक्षता जागरूकता के साथ व्यक्तिगत समीक्षा उत्पन्न करता है। इस तथ्य से प्रेरित है कि समीक्षाओं में व्यक्तिगत जानकारी और भावना पूर्वाग्रह हो सकता है, हम प्रशिक्षण गोपनीयता गारंटीकृत एम्बेडिंग के लिए एक उपन्यास विभेदक रूप से निजी (डीपी) -एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और खाद्य-समीक्षा डोमेन में भावना निष्पक्षता के लिए एक मूल्यांकन दृष्टिकोण। हमारे उपन्यास समीक्षा डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि MG-PriFair शोषित उपयोगकर्ता डेटा की मात्रा को नियंत्रित करते हुए और कम से कम भावना पक्षपाती शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हुए plausibly लंबी समीक्षा उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम है। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, हम समीक्षा पीढ़ी के कार्य में उपयोगकर्ता गोपनीयता और भावना निष्पक्षता लाने के लिए पहले हैं। डेटासेट और स्रोत कोड https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuireann úsáideoirí a dtuairimí in iúl i leith aonáin (m.sh., bialanna) trí léirmheasanna ar líne ar féidir leo a bheith i bhfoirmeacha éagsúla cosúil le téacs, rátálacha, agus íomhánna. Tá buntáiste ag baint le hathbhreithnithe samhaltaithe chun iompar úsáideoirí a thuiscint, rud a thacaíonn, ar a seal, le tascanna éagsúla atá dírithe ar an úsáideoir, mar shampla moladh, anailís meoin agus giniúint athbhreithnithe. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid MG-PriFair, creat ilmhódach néar-bhunaithe, a ghineann athbhreithnithe pearsantaithe le feasacht príobháideachta agus cothroime. Arna spreagadh ag an bhfíric go bhféadfadh faisnéis phearsanta agus laofacht sentiment a bheith sna hathbhreithnithe, molaimid múnla nua um leabú difreálach príobháideach (dp) chun leabú faoi ráthaíocht príobháideachta a oiliúint agus cur chuige meastóireachta maidir le cothroime meon sa réimse athbhreithnithe bia. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar ár dtacar sonraí athbhreithnithe úrnua go bhfuil MG-PriFair in ann léirmheasanna atá inchreidte fada a ghiniúint agus ag an am céanna an méid sonraí úsáideoirí a shaothraítear a rialú agus ag baint úsáide as an leabú focal is lú meon atá claonta. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is muidne an chéad duine a thug príobháideacht úsáideoirí agus cothroime meoin isteach sa tasc giniúna athbhreithnithe. Tá an tacar sonraí agus na cóid foinse ar fáil ag https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'hu': 'A felhasználók online értékeléseken keresztül fejezik ki véleményüket szervezetekkel (pl. éttermekkel) szemben, amelyek különböző formákban, mint például szöveg, értékelés és képek. Az értékelések modellezése előnyös a felhasználói viselkedés megértése szempontjából, amely viszont különböző felhasználóorientált feladatokat támogat, mint például az ajánlás, a hangulatelemzés és a felülvizsgálat generálása. Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk az MG-PriFair-t, egy multimodális neurális alapú keretrendszert, amely személyre szabott értékeléseket hoz létre az adatvédelmi és tisztességes tudatossággal. Az a tény, hogy az értékelések személyes információkat és érzelmek elfogultságát tartalmazhatják, egy új, differenciálisan privát (dp)-beágyazási modellt javasolunk az adatvédelmi garantált beágyazások képzésére, valamint egy értékelési megközelítést az élelmiszer-értékelés területén. Új értékelési adatkészletünkön végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az MG-PriFair képes valószínűleg hosszú értékeléseket generálni, miközben ellenőrzi a kihasznált felhasználói adatok mennyiségét, és a legkevésbé érzelmes szóbeágyazásokat használja. Legjobb tudásunk szerint mi vagyunk az elsők, akik a felhasználók adatvédelmét és érzelmi tisztességét hozzák a felülvizsgálatok generálásához. Az adatkészlet és a forráskódok az alábbi címen érhetők el: https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი განსაზღვრებას ინტერნეტიების (მაგალითად, რესტორანების) ხელსაწყობით, რომელიც შეიძლება იყოს განსხვავებული ფორმებში, როგორც ტექსტი, რეტინგი და გამოსახულების მოდელურება გამოყენებელი ქცევის შესახებისთვის გამოიყენებელი გასაგებისთვის, რომელიც გამოყენებელი მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ MG-PriFair-ს, მულტიმოდიალური ნეიროლური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც პროგრამიზებულია პროგრამიზებული რეზიუმენტები პროგრამიზებული პროგრამიზება პროგრამი მოტივირებულია ფაქტის შესაძლებელია პირადი ინფორმაცია და sentiment bias, ჩვენ პრომენტის განსხვავებულად პირადი (dp) მოდელის შემწყვება პირადი (dp) მოდელის შემწყვება პირადი ინფორმაციის დარწმუნებული ინფორმაცია და გავამწ ჩვენი პრომენტის განახლების მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოცემების გამოცემების შესაძლებელია MG-PriFair-ის შესაძლებელია წარმოიქმნა ძალიან დიდი განახლებების შესაძლებლობა, როდესაც კონტროლირება გამო ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ჩვენ ვართ პირველი, რომელიც მომხმარებელი პირველი საკუთარი სიგრძნობა და სენტიმენტების საკუთარი საკუთარი დავატანოთ მონაცემების შესახებ და მიმხმარების კოდეები https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'el': 'Οι χρήστες εκφράζουν τις απόψεις τους προς οντότητες (π.χ. εστιατόρια) μέσω διαδικτυακών αξιολογήσεων οι οποίες μπορούν να είναι σε διάφορες μορφές όπως κείμενο, αξιολογήσεις και εικόνες. Η μοντελοποίηση αξιολογήσεων είναι επωφελής για την κατανόηση της συμπεριφοράς των χρηστών, η οποία με τη σειρά της υποστηρίζει διάφορες εργασίες προσανατολισμένες στο χρήστη, όπως συστάσεις, ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και δημιουργία κριτικών. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα πολυμορφικό νευρωνικό πλαίσιο, το οποίο παράγει εξατομικευμένες αξιολογήσεις με επίγνωση της ιδιωτικότητας και της δικαιοσύνης. Με κίνητρο το γεγονός ότι οι κριτικές ενδέχεται να περιέχουν προσωπικές πληροφορίες και προκατάληψη συναισθημάτων, προτείνουμε ένα νέο διαφοροποιημένα ιδιωτικό μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης για την εκπαίδευση εγγυημένων ενσωμάτωσης της ιδιωτικής ζωής και μια προσέγγιση αξιολόγησης για τη δικαιοσύνη συναισθημάτων στον τομέα της αναθεώρησης τροφίμων. Τα πειράματα στο νέο μας σύνολο δεδομένων ανασκόπησης δείχνουν ότι το είναι ικανό να παράγει αξιόπιστα μακροχρόνιες αναθεωρήσεις, ενώ παράλληλα ελέγχει την ποσότητα των δεδομένων των χρηστών που εκμεταλλεύονται και χρησιμοποιεί τις λιγότερο προκατειλημμένες ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, είμαστε οι πρώτοι που φέρνουν την ιδιωτικότητα των χρηστών και τη δικαιοσύνη των συναισθημάτων στο έργο δημιουργίας κριτικών. Το σύνολο δεδομένων και οι πηγαίοι κωδικοί διατίθενται στη διεύθυνση https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'it': "Gli utenti esprimono le loro opinioni nei confronti delle entità (ad esempio, ristoranti) tramite recensioni online che possono essere in forme diverse come testo, valutazioni e immagini. La modellazione delle recensioni è vantaggiosa per la comprensione del comportamento degli utenti che, a sua volta, supporta varie attività orientate all'utente come raccomandazione, analisi sentiment e generazione di recensioni. In questo articolo proponiamo MG-PriFair, un framework multimodale basato su neurali, che genera recensioni personalizzate con consapevolezza di privacy e correttezza. Motivati dal fatto che le recensioni potrebbero contenere informazioni personali e pregiudizi di sentiment, proponiamo un nuovo modello di incorporazione differenzialmente privato (dp)-per la formazione di incorporamenti garantiti sulla privacy e un approccio di valutazione per l'equità del sentiment nel dominio delle recensioni alimentari. Esperimenti sul nostro nuovo set di dati di recensioni mostrano che MG-PriFair è in grado di generare recensioni plausibilmente lunghe, controllando la quantità di dati degli utenti sfruttati e utilizzando le incorporazioni di parole meno pregiudizievoli. Per quanto ne sappiamo, siamo i primi a portare la privacy degli utenti e la correttezza dei sentimenti nel compito di generazione delle recensioni. Il set di dati e i codici sorgente sono disponibili all'indirizzo https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушылар мәтін, рейтинг және кескіндер секілді әртүрлі пішімдерде болатын онлайн қарау арқылы (мысалы, ресторантар) мүмкіндіктеріне қатынасын көрсетеді. Редакцияларды түсіну үшін пайдаланушылардың тәртібін түсіну үшін пайдаланушылардың қасиеттері керек. Бұл тапсырмалар, сезімдік анализ және қарау құрылымын қолдайды. Бұл қағазда, МG-PriFair дегенді, көптеген невралдық негіздеген, жеке тәуелсіздік және дұрыс түсініктермен өзгертілген сұрақтарды жасайды. Жеке мәліметтерді және сезімдердің қатынасы бар болуы мүмкін, біз жалғыз мәліметтердің қатынасы және қатынасы бар болуы үшін жалғыз жеке түрлі (dp) құрылғы үлгісін жасаймыз. Жеке мәліметтердің қатынасы және қатынасы ж Роман қарау деректер жиынындағы тәжірибелеріміз MG- PriFair пайдаланушылардың деректерін бақылау және ең кіші сезімді сөздерді ендіру мүмкіндігін жасау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, біз пайдаланушылардың жеке тәртіпсіздігін және сезіміздің ақиқаттылығын қарау тапсырмасына Деректер жиыны мен көзі кодтары бар https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'lt': 'Naudotojai pareiškia savo nuomonę subjektams (pvz., restoranams) per internetines peržiūras, kurios gali būti įvairiomis formomis, pavyzdžiui, tekstas, reitingai ir vaizdai. Modeliavimo peržiūros yra naudingos vartotojų elgesio supratimui, kuris savo ruožtu remia įvairias vartotojams skirtas užduotis, pvz., rekomendacijas, jausmų analizę ir peržiūros kūrimą. Šiame dokumente siūlome MG-PriFair, daugiarūšio pobūdžio neurologinę sistemą, kuria rengiamos individualios peržiūros su privatumu ir sąžiningumu. Atsižvelgdami į tai, kad peržiūrose gali būti pateikiama asmeninė informacija ir jausmų pusiausvyra, siūlome naują skirtingai privatų (dp) įterpimo model į, skirtą mokymui, užtikrinamam privatumui, ir jausmų teisingumo vertinimo metodą maisto peržiūros srityje. Experiments on our novel review dataset show that MG-PriFair is capable of generating plausibly long reviews while controlling the amount of exploited user data and using the least sentiment biased word embeddings.  Geriausiai žinome, kad mes pirmieji įtraukiame vartotojų privatumą ir sąžiningumą į peržiūros kartos užduotį. Duomenų rinkinys ir šaltinio kodai pateikiami https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'mk': 'Корисниците ги изразуваат своите мислења кон ентитетите (на пример рестораните) преку онлајн рецензии кои можат да бидат во различни форми како што се текст, рејтинг и слики. Моделирањето на рецензиите е предност за разбирање на однесувањето на корисникот, кое, од своја страна, ги поддржува различните задачи ориентирани на корисникот како препорака, анализа на чувствата и генерација на рецензии. Во овој весник, предложуваме МГ-PriFair, мултимедална нервна рамка, која генерира персонализирани рецензии со приватност и свесност за правдата. Мотивиран од фактот дека рецензиите може да содржат лични информации и пристрасност на чувствата, предложуваме нов диференцијално приватен (dp)-модел за обука на приватноста гарантирани вградувања и евалуирачки пристап за праведност на чувствата во доменот на прегледот на храната. Експериментите на нашиот нов набор на податоци покажуваат дека MG-PriFair е способен да генерира веројатно долги рецензии и да го контролира количината на искористени кориснички податоци и да ги користи најмалку чувствително пристрасните зборови вградени. За најдобро од нашето знаење, ние сме првите што ја внесуваме приватноста на корисникот и правдата на чувствата во задачата на генерацијата на преглед. Податоците и изворните кодови се достапни на https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ms': 'Pengguna mengekspresikan pendapat mereka kepada entiti (cth., restoran) melalui ulasan online yang boleh berada dalam bentuk berbeza seperti teks, nilai, dan imej. Pemodelan ulasan adalah keuntungan untuk pemahaman perilaku pengguna yang, pada gilirannya, menyokong pelbagai tugas oriented pengguna seperti rekomendasi, analisis perasaan, dan generasi ulasan. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar MG-PriFair, kerangka berasaskan saraf multimodal, yang menghasilkan ulasan peribadi dengan privasi dan kesadaran keadilan. Motivated by the fact that reviews might contain personal information and sentiment bias, we propose a novel differentially private (dp)-embedding model for training privacy guaranteed embeddings and an evaluation approach for sentiment fairness in the food-review domain.  Eksperimen pada set data ulasan novel kami menunjukkan bahawa MG-PriFair mampu menghasilkan ulasan yang mungkin panjang sambil mengawal jumlah data pengguna yang dieksploitasikan dan menggunakan penyelesaian perkataan biased kurang perasaan. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, kita adalah orang pertama yang membawa privasi pengguna dan keadilan perasaan ke dalam tugas generasi ulasan. Set data dan kod sumber tersedia di https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'mt': 'L-utenti jesprimu l-opinjonijiet tagħhom lejn entitajiet (pereżempju ristoranti) permezz ta’ reviżjonijiet onlajn li jistgħu jkunu f’forom differenti bħat-test, il-klassifikazzjonijiet, u l-immaġni. L-immudellar tar-reviżjonijiet huwa vantaġġuż għall-fehim tal-imġiba tal-utent li, min-naħa tiegħu, jappoġġja diversi kompiti orjentati lejn l-utent bħar-rakkomandazzjoni, l-analiżi tas-sentimenti, u l-ġenerazzjoni tar-reviżjoni. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu MG-PriFair, qafas multimodali bbażat fuq in-newrali, li jiġġenera reviżjonijiet personalizzati b’kuxjenza dwar il-privatezza u l-ġustizzja. Motivat mill-fatt li r-reviżjonijiet jista’ jkun fihom informazzjoni personali u preġudizzju għas-sentimenti, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ inkorporazzjoni differenzjalment privata (dp)-għat-taħriġ ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet garantiti għall-privatezza u approċċ ta’ evalwazzjoni għall-ġustizzja tas-sentimenti fil-qasam tar-reviżjoni tal-ikel. L-esperimenti fuq is-sett ta’ dejta tar-reviżjoni l-ġdid tagħna juru li l-MG-PriFair huwa kapaċi jiġġenera reviżjonijiet plawżibbilment twal filwaqt li jikkontrolla l-ammont ta’ dejta tal-utent sfruttata u juża l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem bl-inqas sensazzjoni preġudikati. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, aħna l-ewwel li nġibu l-privatezza tal-utenti u l-ġustizzja tas-sentimenti fil-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tar-reviżjoni. Is-sett tad-dejta u l-kodiċijiet tas-sors huma disponibbli fuq https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d വിവിധ രീതികളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി (ഉദാഹരണമായ റെസ്റ്റോറന്\u200dസ്) വ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലിങ്ങ് പരിശോധന, ശ്രദ്ധ അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും പരിശോധന തലമുറയുടെ പോലെ  In this paper, we propose MG-PriFair, a multimodal neural-based framework, which generates personalized reviews with privacy and fairness awareness.  വ്യക്തിപരമായ വിവരങ്ങളും വിചാരകങ്ങളും കൂടിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെന്ന കാര്യത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സ്വകാര്യത്തില്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സ്വകാര്യം പരിശീലിക്കുന നമ്മുടെ നോവല്\u200d പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് എംജി- പ്രിഫീര്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നീണ നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിന് ഞങ്ങളാണ് ആദ്യം ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സ്വകാര്യത്തിലും തീരുമാനത്തിലും നീതിയും കൊണ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും ഉറവിട കോഡുകളും ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчид биетүүдийг (жишээ нь, ресторанууд) онлайн шинжилгээгээр илэрхийлж чадна. Энэ нь текст, рейтинг, зураг зэрэг олон хэлбэрээр байж болно. Хэрэглэгчийн дасгал хөдлөлийг загварчлах нь хэрэглэгчийн дасгал хөдлөлийг ойлгохын тулд хэрэглэгчийн дасгал хөдлөл ашигладаг. Энэ нь зөвлөлт, сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ, шинжилгээний ү Энэ цаасан дээр бид MG-PriFair-г олон төрлийн мэдрэлийн үндсэн хэмжээний санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хувийн амьдралыг, шударга байдлыг мэдрэмжтэй хувийн судалгааг үүсгэдэг. Шинжлэх нь хувийн мэдээлэл, сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй байж болно гэсэн үг. Бид өөр өөр өөр хувийн (dp) загварын загвар зохион байгуулахын тулд хувийн амьдралын тусламж болон хүнсний шүүмжлэх зорилготой сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шударга байдлыг шалгах арга загварыг Шинэ шалгалтын өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь MG-PriFair нь хэрэглэгчийн өгөгдлийг удирдаж, хамгийн бага сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй үгийг ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь бид хэрэглэгчдийн хувийн, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шударга байдлыг шинэчлэлтийн үеийн ажил руу оруулах анхны хүн юм. Өгөгдлийн сангууд болон эх үүсвэрийн код https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'no': 'Brukarar uttrykker sine meningar mot einingar (f.eks. restaurantar) via nettverksområde som kan vera i ulike formar som tekst, rating og bilete. Modelering av gjennomsyningar er nyttig for forståking av brukarhandlingar som i tillegg støttar ulike brukarorienterte oppgåver som anbefaling, sentimentanalyse og gjennomsyning. I denne papiret foreslår vi MG-PriFair, eit multimodal neuralbasert rammeverk, som lagar personaliserte gjennomgang med privat og rettferdighet. Forskyving av det faktum at gjennomgang kan innehalda personlege informasjon og sentimentsforskyvning, fører vi ein novel forskjellig privat (dp)-innebyggingsmodell for opplæring av privat garantert innbygging og ein evalueringstilnærming for følelsefølgje rett i mattskyvningsdomenet. Eksperimentar på datasettet vårt for roman gjennomsikt viser at MG-PriFair er i stand til å laga uttrykkelig lang gjennomsikt medan du kontrollerer kor mange ekspluaterte brukardata og brukar minste følelsesette ordinnbygging. For det beste av våre kunnskap, er vi den første som får brukaren privat og sentiment ær rettighet inn i oppgåva for å laga gjennomsikt. Datasettet og kjeldekodane er tilgjengelege på https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ro': 'Utilizatorii își exprimă opiniile față de entități (de exemplu, restaurante) prin intermediul recenziilor online care pot fi sub diverse forme, cum ar fi text, evaluări și imagini. Modelarea recenziilor este avantajoasă pentru înțelegerea comportamentului utilizatorului, care, la rândul său, susține diverse sarcini orientate spre utilizator, cum ar fi recomandări, analiza sentimentului și generarea recenziilor. În această lucrare, propunem MG-PriFair, un cadru multimodal bazat pe neuroni, care generează recenzii personalizate cu conștientizarea confidențialității și corectitudinii. Motivați de faptul că recenziile ar putea conține informații personale și părtinire sentimentală, propunem un nou model de încorporare diferențial privat (dp)-pentru formarea integrărilor garantate de confidențialitate și o abordare de evaluare pentru echitatea sentimentală în domeniul revizuirii alimentelor. Experimentele efectuate pe setul nostru de date nou de recenzii arată că MG-PriFair este capabilă să genereze recenzii plauzibil de lungi, controlând în același timp cantitatea de date exploatate de utilizatori și utilizând încorporări de cuvinte cel mai puțin părtinitoare sentiment. Din câte știm, suntem primii care aduc confidențialitatea utilizatorilor și echitatea sentimentului în sarcina de generare a revizuirii. Setul de date și codurile sursă sunt disponibile la adresa https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'pl': 'Użytkownicy wyrażają swoje opinie wobec podmiotów (np. restauracji) poprzez recenzje online, które mogą mieć różne formy, takie jak tekst, oceny i obrazy. Modelowanie recenzji jest korzystne dla zrozumienia zachowań użytkowników, co z kolei obsługuje różne zadania zorientowane na użytkownika, takie jak rekomendacja, analiza sentymentów i generowanie recenzji. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy MG-PriFair, multimodalny system oparty na neuronach, który generuje spersonalizowane recenzje ze świadomością prywatności i uczciwości. Motywowani faktem, że recenzje mogą zawierać dane osobowe i stronnicze sentymentów, proponujemy nowy model integracji różnicowo prywatnej (dp)-dla szkolenia gwarantowanych osadzeń prywatności oraz podejście do oceny uczciwości sentymentów w dziedzinie przeglądu żywności. Eksperymenty na naszym nowym zbiorze danych recenzyjnym pokazują, że MG-PriFair jest w stanie generować wiarygodnie długie recenzje, kontrolując jednocześnie ilość wykorzystywanych danych użytkowników i wykorzystując jak najmniej stronnicze osadzenia słów. Z naszej najlepszej wiedzy jesteśmy pierwszymi, którzy wprowadzają prywatność użytkowników i uczciwość sentymentów do zadania generowania recenzji. Zestaw danych i kody źródłowe są dostępne na stronie internetowej https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'sr': 'Korisnici izražavaju svoje mišljenje prema entitetima (npr. restoranima) preko internetskih pregleda koje mogu biti u raznim oblicima poput teksta, ocjena i slika. Modeliranje pregleda je od koristi za razumevanje ponašanja korisnika koji, u turn, podržava različite zadatke orijentirane na korisnike poput preporuke, analize sentimenta i generacije pregleda. U ovom papiru predlažemo MG-PriFair, multimodalni neuralni okvir, koji stvara personalizovane preglede sa svijesti privatnosti i pravednosti. Pod motivacijom činjenice da bi preglede mogle da sadrže lične informacije i predrasude sentiment a, predlažemo novi diferencijalno privatni (dp) model za obuku garantovane integracije privatnosti i procjenu pristupa pravednosti sentimenta u domenu preglede hrane. Eksperimenti na našoj seriji novog pregleda podataka pokazuju da je MG-PriFair sposoban da proizvede uvjerljivo duge preglede dok kontroliše količinu eksplozivnih podataka korisnika i koristi najmanje predrasude reči. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, mi smo prvi koji dovede privatnost korisnika i poštenost osjećanja u zadatak generacije revizije. Podaci i izvorni kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'sv': 'Användare uttrycker sina åsikter mot enheter (t.ex. restauranger) via onlinerecensioner som kan vara i olika former som text, betyg och bilder. Modellering av recensioner är fördelaktigt för användarbeteendeförståelse, vilket i sin tur stöder olika användarorienterade uppgifter såsom rekommendation, sentimentalys och granskning generering. I denna uppsats föreslår vi MG-PriFair, ett multimodalt neuralt ramverk, som genererar personliga recensioner med integritet och rättvisa medvetenhet. Motiverade av det faktum att recensioner kan innehålla personlig information och sentiment bias, föreslår vi en ny differentialt privat (dp)-inbäddningsmodell för utbildning av integritetsskyddade inbäddningar och en utvärderingsmetod för sentiment fairness inom food-review domänen. Experiment på vårt nya granskningsdataset visar att MG-PriFair kan generera rimligt långa recensioner samtidigt som man kontrollerar mängden utnyttjad användardata och använder minst sentimentpartisk ordinbäddning. Så vitt vi vet är vi först med att föra in användarnas integritet och rättvisa känslor i granskningsprocessen. Datauppsättningen och källkoderna finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ ඔවුන්ගේ විශ්වාසය (උදාහරණය, රෙස්ටෝරෑන්ස්) අන්ලයින් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ඔවුන්ගේ විශ්වාසය ප්\u200dරකාරය පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වැඩසටහන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා විවිධ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි MG-PriFair ගැන ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, විශේෂ නිර්මාණය සහ සාධාරණය සඳහා පුද්ගලික පරීක්ෂණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. Motiveed by the case that Revises may have personally data and sensistic bios, we preach a new book Diffensively Privy (d)-Embding Model for Training Privy Guaantied Embdings and an evalution approach for Sentment fairness in the Feed-Revise domain. පරීක්ෂණය අපේ කොතුමක් පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක පෙන්වන්නේ MG-PriFair ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු පරීක්ෂණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙ අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දැනගන්න, අපි පළමුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ පුද්ගලිකතාවය සහ හ හැඟීම් සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය ප්\u200dරති දත්ත සැට් සහ මූල කෝඩ් අවස්ථාවයි. https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaashu waxay ka muuqan karaan aragtidooda bogga internetka (tusaale ahaan restaurants) oo ku qoran qaab kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan qoraal, qeyb, iyo sawirro. Baaritaanka horumarintu waxey faa’iido u leedahay garashada tababarka ee isticmaalayaasha, kaas oo ku caawinaya shaqooyin kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan talo-bixinta, baaritaanka xisaabta iyo ka fiirsashada qarniga. Kanu warqaddan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa MG-PriFair, kaas oo ku saleysan kooxaha neurada oo kala duduwan, kaas oo soo bandhigaa baaritaanka gaarka ah iyo garashada caddaaladda. Waxan dhaqdhaqaaqsan karnaa in baaritaanka ay ku jirto macluumaadka shakhsiga ah iyo tababarka fikrada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa noocyo si si kala duwan oo gaar ah (dp) oo loo qorayo tusaale ku qorayo waxbarashada si gaarka ah loo yaqaan barbaarinta barbaarinta gaarka loo leeyahay iyo qaab qiimeynta ku saabsan garsooridda. Imtixaan ku saabsan baaritaanka macluumaadkayaga saxda ah waxay muujin kartaa in MG-PriFair uu awoodo inuu sameeyo baaritaanka dhaadheer waqtiga uu maamulo tirada macluumaadka isticmaalka iyo isticmaalka hadalka ugu yaraan ee la khilaafay. Tan ugu wanaagsan aqoonteenna, waxaynu nahay ugu horraynta in aynu isticmaalnee gaar ahaanshaha iyo sinnaanta ugu keenno arimaha baaritaanka. Kaararka macluumaadka iyo kaararka nolosha waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ta': 'பயன்படுத்துபவர்கள் இணைய முறைமைகளின் மூலம் பொருள்களுக்கு தங்கள் கருத்துகளை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறார்கள். உரைகள், விகிதத்துகள், பிம்பங்கள் ப மாதிரி முன்னோட்டமைப்புகள் பயனர் நடத்தைப் புரிந்து கொள்ள பயனுள்ளது இது பரிந்துரைப்பு, உணர்வு ஆய்வு மற்றும் முன்னோட்டம் உருவாக் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் MG-PriFair, ஒரு பல்வேறு புதிய நரம்பு அடிப்படையிலான சட்டம், அது தனிப்பட்ட பரிசோதனையை உருவாக்குகிறது தனிப்பட்ட முன்னே முன்பார்வைகள் தனிப்பட்ட தகவல் மற்றும் உணர்வு பிரச்சனைகள் இருக்கும் என்பது உண்மையால் இயக்கப்பட்டது, நாம் ஒரு புதிய வித்தியாசமாக தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரியை பயிற்சி தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட எங்கள் புதிய பரிசோதனை தகவல் அமைப்பில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது MG- PriFair பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பயனர் தரவை கட்டுப்படுத்தும் போது நீண்ட நீண்ட முடிவு உருவாக்கும் போ எங்கள் அறிவின் மிக சிறந்ததாக, நாங்கள் பயனர் தனியார்ந்த மற்றும் உணர்வு நீதியை முன்னால் கொண்டுவருகிறோம் முதல் தரவு அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் மூல குறியீடுகள் கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ur': 'کارساز ان کی نظریں (جیسے رستورانٹ) آنلاین رستورانٹوں کے ذریعہ ان کی نظریں کھول رہے ہیں جو مختلف فرموں میں شامل ہو سکتے ہیں جیسے متن، ریٹنگ اور تصاویروں میں۔ نمادل رسانیوں کو سمجھنے کے لئے فائدہ دیتا ہے کہ ان کے ساتھ مختلف کارساز کی مدد کرتا ہے جیسے سفارش, احساسات تحلیل اور رسانیوں کی نسل. اس کاغذ میں ہم MG-PriFair کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک multimodal neural-based Framework، جو شخصی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے رسانے کو خصوصیت اور عدالت کی خبر کے ساتھ پیدا کرتا ہے. اس حقیقت کے ذریعہ منتقل کئے جاتے ہیں کہ انجیل شخصی معلومات اور احساسات کی مخالفت میں شامل ہو سکتے ہیں، ہم ایک نوم مختلف طرح خصوصی (dp)-ایمبڈینگ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں غیر خصوصی کی تعلیم کے لئے غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہماری روزنامہ ریویڈ ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ MG-PriFair بہت زیادہ ریویڈ پیدا کرنے کے قابل ہے جبکہ استعمال کیا گیا کارساز ڈیٹ کا مقدار کنٹرول کرتا ہے اور بہت کم احساسات غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے پہلے ہی ہیں جو سویر کی خفیت اور احساسات انصاف کے کام میں لے آئیں۔ ڈاٹ سٹ اور سراسر کوڈ موجود ہیں https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu qogʻozda, biz multimodal neyrol asosida MG-PriFair (MG-PriFair) rivojlanishimizni talab qilamiz. Bu shaxsiy va haqiqida ta'sirlik bilan ta'minlovchilar yaratadi. Ko'rib chiqish mumkin, shaxsiy maʼlumot va hissiyotlar bizda ega bo'lishi mumkin, biz boshqa narsalar (dp) bilan boshqa shaklga o'xshash modelini o'rganish imkoniyatlarini saqlash uchun qo'llanmalar va qiymatni o'zgartirish qoidasidagi foydalanuvchining haqida o'xshash usuli. Name Biz haqida eng yaxshi bilganimiz uchun biz foydalanuvchi shaxsiy va hissiyotni tahrirlash vazifani o'rganish uchun birinchi bo'lsiz. Maʼlumot bazasi va manba kodlari mavjud https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'vi': 'Người dùng thể hiện ý kiến với thực thể (v.d. các nhà hàng) qua các bản đánh giá trực tuyến có thể có dạng khác nhau như văn bản, đánh giá và hình ảnh. Những đánh giá mẫu là thuận lợi cho sự hiểu biết hành vi của người dùng, hỗ trợ nhiều nhiệm vụ dựa trên người dùng, như kiến nghị, phân tích cảm xúc, và thế hệ xem xét. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị MGM-PriFair, một hệ thống thần kinh đa phương, tạo ra các cuộc phỏng vấn riêng tư và sự công bằng. Nguyên nhân bởi việc đánh giá có thể chứa thông tin cá nhân và khuynh hướng tình cảm, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình riêng biệt riêng tư (dv) mới để đào tạo sự nhúng chàm cho bảo mật mật mật, và một phương pháp đánh giá sự công bằng cảm xúc trong lĩnh vực kiểm tra thực phẩm. Thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu mới của chúng ta cho thấy MG-PriFair có khả năng tạo ra những đánh giá dài hợp lý trong khi kiểm soát lượng dữ liệu sử dụng được khai thác sử dụng và sử dụng những từ nhúng vào ít có cảm xúc nhất. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất của chúng tôi, chúng tôi là những người đầu tiên mang tính riêng tư và tính trung bình của người dùng vào nhiệm vụ sản xuất đánh giá. Bộ dữ liệu và mã nguồn có sẵn ở https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'hr': 'Korisnici izražavaju svoje mišljenje prema entitetima (npr. restoranima) preko internetskih pregleda koje mogu biti u raznim oblicima poput teksta, ocjena i slika. Modeliranje pregleda prednosti su za razumijevanje ponašanja korisnika koji, u turn, podržava različite zadatke orientirane na korisnike poput preporuke, analize osjećaja i generacije pregleda. U ovom papiru predlažemo MG-PriFair, multimodalni neuralni okvir, koji stvara personalizovane preglede sa svijesti privatnosti i pravednosti. Pod motivacijom činjenice da bi preglede mogle sadržati osobne informacije i pristrasnost osjećaja, predlažemo novi različito privatni model (dp)-ugrađeni za obuku garantiranog ugrađenog privatnosti i procjenu pristupa pravednosti osjećaja u domenu preglede hrane. Iskusi na našem novom pregledu podataka pokazuju da je MG-PriFair sposoban proizvesti uvjerljivo duge preglede dok kontrolira količinu iskorištenih podataka korisnika i koristi najmanje predrasude riječi. Najbolje od našeg znanja, mi smo prvi koji dovede privatnost i poštenost osjećaja korisnika u zadatak generacije revizije. Kodovi podataka i izvora su dostupni na https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'da': 'Brugere udtrykker deres mening over for enheder (f.eks. restauranter) via online anmeldelser, som kan være i forskellige former såsom tekst, bedømmelser og billeder. Modellering af anmeldelser er en fordel for forståelse af brugeradfærd, som igen understøtter forskellige brugerorienterede opgaver som anbefaling, sentimentalanalyse og gennemgang. I denne artikel foreslår vi MG-PriFair, en multimodal neural-baseret ramme, der genererer personlige anmeldelser med privatliv og retfærdighed bevidsthed. Motiveret af det faktum, at anmeldelser kan indeholde personlige oplysninger og sentiment bias, foreslår vi en ny differentialt privat (dp)-indlejringsmodel til træning af privatlivsgaranterede integreringer og en evalueringstilgang til sentiment fairness i fødevare-review domænet. Eksperimenter med vores nye anmeldelsedatasæt viser, at MG-PriFair er i stand til at generere sandsynligt lange anmeldelser, samtidig med at man kontrollerer mængden af udnyttede brugerdata og bruger de mindst sentiment partised word embeddings. Så vidt vi ved, er vi de første til at bringe brugernes privatliv og følelsesmæssighed i anmeldelsegenerationsopgaven. Datasættet og kildekoderne er tilgængelige på https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'bg': 'Потребителите изразяват мнението си към субекти (например ресторанти) чрез онлайн рецензии, които могат да бъдат в различни форми като текст, оценки и изображения. Моделирането на прегледите е изгодно за разбиране на поведението на потребителя, което от своя страна поддържа различни ориентирани към потребителя задачи като препоръки, анализ на сентименти и генериране на прегледи. В настоящата статия предлагаме мултимодална нервно-базирана рамка, която генерира персонализирани прегледи с конфиденциалност и справедливост. Мотивирани от факта, че отзивите могат да съдържат лична информация и пристрастия към сантименталността, ние предлагаме нов диференциално частен модел за вграждане за обучение на гарантирани вграждания за неприкосновеност на личния живот и подход за оценка на справедливостта на сантименталността в областта на прегледа на храните. Експериментите на нашия нов набор от данни от рецензии показват, че е способна да генерира правдоподобно дълги рецензии, като същевременно контролира количеството експлоатирани потребителски данни и използва най-малко пристрастни думи вградени. Доколкото знаем, ние сме първите, които въвеждат поверителността на потребителите и справедливостта на чувствата в задачата за генериране на прегледи. Наборът от данни и изходните кодове са достъпни на адрес: https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'nl': 'Gebruikers uiten hun mening ten opzichte van entiteiten (bijvoorbeeld restaurants) via online reviews die in verschillende vormen kunnen zijn, zoals tekst, beoordelingen en afbeeldingen. Het modelleren van reviews is voordelig voor het begrijpen van gebruikersgedrag, wat op zijn beurt verschillende gebruikersgerichte taken ondersteunt, zoals aanbeveling, sentimentanalyse en het genereren van beoordelingen. In dit artikel stellen we MG-PriFair voor, een multimodaal neural-based framework, dat gepersonaliseerde beoordelingen genereert met privacy en eerlijkheid bewustzijn. Gemotiveerd door het feit dat reviews persoonlijke informatie en sentiment bias kunnen bevatten, stellen we een nieuw differential private (dp)-embedding model voor training privacy gegarandeerde embeddings en een evaluatiebenadering voor sentiment fairness in het food-review domein voor. Experimenten op onze nieuwe review dataset tonen aan dat MG-PriFair in staat is om plausibel lange reviews te genereren terwijl de hoeveelheid geëxploiteerde gebruikersgegevens wordt gecontroleerd en de minst sentiment biased word embeddings wordt gebruikt. Voor zover wij weten, zijn wij de eerste die privacy en sentiment van gebruikers in de review generatie taak brengen. De dataset en broncodes zijn beschikbaar op: https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'de': 'Benutzer äußern ihre Meinung gegenüber Unternehmen (z.B. Restaurants) über Online-Bewertungen, die in verschiedenen Formen wie Text, Bewertungen und Bilder sein können. Die Modellierung von Reviews ist für das Verständnis des Nutzerverhaltens von Vorteil, was wiederum verschiedene nutzerorientierte Aufgaben wie Empfehlung, Stimmungsanalyse und Bewertungsgenerierung unterstützt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir MG-PriFair vor, ein multimodales neuronal-basiertes Framework, das personalisierte Bewertungen mit Datenschutz- und Fairness-Bewusstsein generiert. Motiviert durch die Tatsache, dass Bewertungen persönliche Informationen und Sentiment Bias enthalten können, schlagen wir ein neuartiges differenziell privates (dp)-Einbettungsmodell für Schulungen mit garantierter Privatsphäre und einen Bewertungsansatz für Sentiment Fairness im Food-Review-Bereich vor. Experimente an unserem neuartigen Review-Datensatz zeigen, dass MG-PriFair in der Lage ist, plausibel lange Bewertungen zu generieren, während gleichzeitig die Menge der genutzten Benutzerdaten kontrolliert und die am wenigsten sentiment verzerrten Worteinbettungen verwendet werden. Nach bestem Wissen sind wir die Ersten, die die Privatsphäre und Sentiment Fairness der Nutzer in die Bewertungsgenerierungsaufgabe einbringen. Der Datensatz und die Quellcodes sind verfügbar unter https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'id': 'Pengguna mengekspresikan pendapat mereka terhadap entitas (misalnya restoran) melalui penelitian online yang dapat dalam bentuk berbeda seperti teks, nilai, dan gambar. Revisi model adalah keuntungan untuk pemahaman perilaku pengguna yang, pada gilirannya, mendukung berbagai tugas orientasi pengguna seperti rekomendasi, analisis sentimen, dan generasi revisi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan MG-PriFair, kerangka berbasis saraf multimodal, yang menghasilkan resensi pribadi dengan privasi dan kesadaran keadilan. Motivated by the fact that reviews might contain personal information and sentiment bias, we propose a novel differentially private (dp)-embedding model for training privacy guaranteed embeddings and an evaluation approach for sentiment fairness in the food-review domain. Experiments on our novel review dataset show that MG-PriFair is capable of generating plausibly long reviews while controlling the amount of exploited user data and using the least sentiment biased word embeddings.  To the best of our knowledge, we are the first to bring user privacy and sentiment fairness into the review generation task.  Set data dan kode sumber tersedia di https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'fa': 'کاربران نظر خودشان را به عنوان شرکتها (مثلا رستوران) با طریق تحقیقات آنلاین نشان می\u200cدهند که می\u200cتوانند در شکل\u200cهای مختلف مثل متن، امتیاز و تصاویر باشند. نمونه\u200cسازی تحقیقات برای درک رفتاری کاربر سودمندانه است که در عوض، کار\u200cهای مختلف مورد توصیف، تحلیل احساسات و نسل تحقیقات را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما MG-PriFair را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ توسط این حقیقت که تحقیقات ممکن است اطلاعات شخصی و احساسات را شامل کند، ما یک مدل تغییر شخصی (dp) را برای آموزش خصوصی تضمین داده شده و یک طریق تحقیقات برای عدالت احساسات در حوزه تحقیقات غذا پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه داده\u200cهای تحقیقات نویس ما نشان می\u200cدهند که MG-PriFair قادر است در حال کنترل مقدار داده\u200cهای کاربر استفاده می\u200cشود و با استفاده از کوچکترین احساسات در ابتدایی کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت است. برای بهترین دانش ما، ما اولین کسانی هستیم که خصوصی و احساسات از کاربر را به وظیفه نسل بازرسی وارد کنیم. مجموعه داده\u200cها و کدهای منبع در دسترسی دارند https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ko': '사용자는 온라인 평론을 통해 실체(예를 들어 식당)에 대한 의견을 표현하는데 온라인 평론은 텍스트, 등급 평가와 이미지 등 여러 가지 형식이 될 수 있다.평론을 모델링하는 것은 사용자의 행위를 이해하는 데 유리하고 사용자를 대상으로 하는 각종 임무, 예를 들어 추천, 정서 분석과 평론 생성을 지원한다.본고에서 우리는 MG PriFair를 제시했는데 이것은 다중모드적 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 구조로 프라이버시와 공평한 의식을 가진 개성화된 평론을 생성할 수 있다.평론이 개인 정보와 감정 편견을 포함할 수 있다는 사실을 바탕으로 우리는 새로운 차이 프라이버시(dp) 삽입 모델을 제시하여 프라이버시 보증 삽입을 훈련시키고 식품 평론 분야의 감정 공평성을 평가하는 방법을 제시했다.MG PriFair는 길게 보이는 리뷰를 생성하는 동시에 이용된 사용자의 데이터 양을 제어하고 최소한의 감정 편향어를 사용하여 삽입할 수 있다는 새로운 리뷰 데이터 세트의 실험을 통해 밝혀졌습니다.사용자의 프라이버시와 감정의 공평함을 논평 생성 임무에 포함시킨 최초의 회사로 알고 있습니다.데이터 세트와 소스 코드는https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'sw': 'Watumiaji walitoa maoni yao kwa vyombo (kama vile migahawa) kupitia mtazamo wa mtandaoni ambao unaweza kuwa katika namna mbalimbali kama vile maandishi, ratiba na picha. Tafiti za kudhibiti ni faida kwa kuelewa tabia za watumiaji ambao, kwa upande mwingine, inaunga mkono kazi mbalimbali za watumiaji kama vile mapendekezo, uchambuzi wa hisia na kutazama kizazi. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza MG-PriFair, mfumo wa mifumo yenye msingi wa neura mbalimbali, unaotengeneza tathmini binafsi na uelewa wa haki. Kutokana na ukweli kwamba tathmini zinaweza kuwa na taarifa binafsi na upendeleo wa hisia, tunapendekeza mtindo wa riwaya kwa tofauti wa binafsi (dp) kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya faragha yanayohakikishwa na namna ya kutathmini usawa wa hisia katika eneo la kutathmini chakula. Majaribio kwenye seti ya taarifa za hivi karibuni zinaonyesha kuwa MG-PriFair ana uwezo wa kutengeneza mtazamo wa muda mrefu wakati wa kudhibiti kiasi cha taarifa za watumiaji wanaotumia na kutumia ujumbe mdogo wa hisia unaoendelea. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, sisi ni wa kwanza kuwaleta faragha na hisia za haki katika kazi ya kizazi kinachopitia. seti na kanuni za vyanzo https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'tr': "Ullançylar öz pikirlerini (meselm. restoranlar) internet pārskatlary bilen metin, reňklikler we suratlar ýaly dürli şeklinde bolup biljek nusgalaryny g örkeýärler. Ýardamçylyklary nusgala alyp biljek hereketleriň düşünmesi üçin has gowydyr. Şol sebäpli ullançylar üçin näçe görnüşler, duýumçylyk analyzasy we çykyşlygyny golaýlaýar. Bu kağıtda, MG-PriFair'i, çok modal nöral tabanlı bir çerçeve teklif ediyoruz. Bu kişisel gizlilik ve adalatlık duyguları ile kişisel çözümler üretir. Gözlemler şahsy maglumatlar we duýgular biasy bolmagynyň bardygyny görkezilýän faktyna görä, biz şahsy maglumatlar we görkezme domynda duýgular adalatlygy üçin bir nusga üýtgedýäris. Biziň roman pārskatlamak maglumatymyzyň denminatlarymyzda MG-PriFair ullanýan ulanylaryň maglumatynyň haýsysyny kontrol eden we iň kiçi duýulyk sözleri girişinde üýtgedip bilýär. En iyi bilgimize göre, kullanıcılarımızın özgürlüğünü ve duygularını pārskatlama görevine ulaşan ilk kişiyiz. Maglumat setirini we çeşme ködlemeleri bar https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'sq': 'Përdoruesit shprehin opinionet e tyre ndaj njësive (për shembull restauranteve) nëpërmjet shqyrtimeve online që mund të jenë në forme të ndryshme të tilla si teksti, vlerësimet dhe imazhet. Modelimi i shqyrtimeve është i dobishëm për kuptimin e sjelljes së përdoruesve që nga ana e tyre mbështet detyra të ndryshme të orientuara ndaj përdoruesve të tilla si rekomandimi, analiza e ndjenjave dhe gjenerata e shqyrtimit. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë MG-PriFair, një kuadër multimodal me bazë nervore, i cili gjeneron shqyrtime personalizuara me privatësi dhe ndërgjegjësim të drejtësisë. Motivuar nga fakti se shqyrtimet mund të përmbajnë informacion personal dhe paragjykim të ndjenjave, ne propozojmë një model të ri ndryshe private (dp)-të përfshirë për trainimin e përfshirjes së privatësisë të garantuar dhe një qasje vlerësimi për drejtësinë e ndjenjave në fushën e shqyrtimit të ushqimit. Experiments on our novel review dataset show that MG-PriFair is capable of generating plausibly long reviews while controlling the amount of exploited user data and using the least sentiment biased word embeddings.  Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, ne jemi të parët që sjellim privatësinë e përdoruesve dhe drejtësinë e ndjenjave në detyrën e shqyrtimit të gjeneratës. Të dhënat dhe kodet burimi janë në dispozicion në https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'af': "Gebruikers uitdruk hulle besonderhede teen entiteite (bv. restaurante) deur aanlyn hersiening wat in verskeie vorms kan wees soos teks, reitings en beelde. Modelering van hersienings is voordeel vir gebruiker gedrag verstanding wat, in turn, ondersteun verskeie gebruikerorienteerde taak soos aanbeveling, sentimentanalisie en hersiening. In hierdie papier voorstel ons MG-PriFair, 'n multimodaal neurale-gebaseerde raamwerk, wat persoonlike hersiening genereer met privateit en regverdigheid awareness. Gemotiveer deur die feit dat die hersienings persoonlike inligting en sentimente-bias kan bevat, voorstel ons 'n novel verskillende privaat (dp)-inbêding model vir die onderwerp van privaat gegaranteerde inbêdings en 'n evalueringstoegang vir sentiment regverdigheid in die kos-hersiening domein. Eksperimente op ons romaniese hersieningsdata vertoon dat MG-PriFair is in staat om plaasbaar lanke hersienings te genereer terwyl die hoeveelheid van gebruikte gebruikerdata beheer en die minste sentimente gewys word inbettings te gebruik. Op die beste van ons kennis is ons die eerste om gebruiker privateit en sentimenteerheid te bring in die oorskou generasietaak. Die datastel en bronkodes is beskikbaar by https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'hy': 'Օգտագործողները արտահայտում են իրենց կարծիքը կազմակերպությունների նկատմամբ (օրինակ ռեստորաններ) առցանց վերլուծությունների միջոցով, որոնք կարող են տարբեր տեսակներով լինել, ինչպիսիք են տեքստը, գնահատականները և պատկերները: Մոդելավորման վերլուծումները օգտակար են օգտագործողների վարքագիծը հասկանալու համար, որը իր հերթին աջակցում է տարբեր օգտագործողների ուղղությամբ գտնվող խնդիրներ, ինչպիսիք են խորհուրդը, զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք MG-PreFer-ը, մի բազմամոդալ նյարդային հիմքում, որը ստեղծում է անձնական վերլուծություններ առանձնահատկության և արդարության գիտակցության հետ: Հրաշարժված այն փաստով, որ վերլուծությունները կարող են պարունակել անձնական տեղեկատվություն և զգացմունքների կողմնականություն, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր տարբերականորեն մասնավոր (PD) ներառող մոդել, որն օգտագործում է մասնավորության վարժեցման համար, որն ապահովում է ներառումներ և զգացմունքների արդարության գնահ Մեր նոր վերանայման տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ MG-PreFer-ը ունի հնարավորություն ստեղծել հավանաբար երկար վերանայման, միաժամանակ վերահսկելով օգտագործողի տվյալների քանակը և օգտագործելով ամենաքիչ զգացմունքային կողմնակի բառ To the best of our knowledge, we are the first to bring user privacy and sentiment fairness into the review generation task.  Տվյալների համակարգը և աղբյուր կոդները հասանելի են https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীরা অনলাইন পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন ধরনের মাধ্যমে ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রতি তাদের মতামত প্রকাশ করেছেন (যেমন রেস্তুরেন্ট) য মডেলিং পর্যবেক্ষণ ব্যবহারকারীর আচরণ বুঝার জন্য উপকার রয়েছে, যার পরিবর্তে বিভিন্ন ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রাপ্ত কাজ, যেমন পরামর্শ, আবেগ বিশ্লে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মাল্টিমোডাল নিউরেল ভিত্তিক কাঠামো এমজি-প্রিফার প্রস্তাব করি, যা ব্যক্তিগত পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং ন্যায়বিচারের সচেতনতা দি এই বাস্তবতা দ্বারা প্রতিক্রিয়া সম্ভবত ব্যক্তিগত তথ্য এবং আবেগের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে প্রশিক্ষণের মডেল (ডিপি) প্রস্তাব করেছি যে খাদ্য-পরিবেশভা আমাদের উপন্যাস পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এমজি-প্রিফেয়ার ব্যবহারকারীদের তথ্য নিয়ন্ত্রণ করার পরিমাণ ব্যবহারকারীর তথ্য নিয়ন্ত্রণ এবং কমপক্ষের বি আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোভাবে আমরা প্রথমে ব্যবহারকারীদের গোপনীয়তা এবং আবেগের ন্যায়বিচার প্রজন্মের কাজে নিয়ে  ডাটাসেট এবং উৎস কোড উপস্থিত https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'am': "Users express their opinions towards entities (e.g., restaurants) via online reviews which can be in diverse forms such as text, ratings, and images.  የሞዴል መልዕክቶች ለተጠቃሚዎች የአግባብ ማስተዋል ይጠቅማል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ እንደምታስተባብል፣ አስተያየት እና የመፍጠር ትውልድ፣ እንደተጨማሪ፣ የመስመር እና እንደምትመለከት የሚደረጉትን የተጠቃሚ ስራዎችን ይረዳል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሬዝዳንት የብልሃት እና የክፍለ ብሔራዊ እና የፍርድ ግንኙነት እና የብሔራዊ ግንኙነት የሚያፈጥረው የብሔራዊ ግንኙነት እና የፍርድ ግንኙነት የሚያደርገውን የብሔራዊ ግንኙነት አፈጣጠር፡፡ የፊደል መረጃዎች እና የስሜት ውይይት እንዲኖር በተለየ የራሳቸውን ጉዳይ (dp)-የግልኙነት የግልፅ ግንኙነትን ለማስተማር እና የአስተማሪነቱን ትክክክል ማድረግ ማሰናከል እና በአምላካዊ ድረ ገጾችን ለመጠየቅ አስተያየት ማሰቃየት የሚችል አዋጅ እና የአስተዋይ ልውጤት ማድረግ መዘርጋት የአሁኑን ተመልካች ዳታ ማድረጊያውን የሚያሳየው የMG-PriFair የጠቅላላ ተጠቃሚው ዳራዎችን በመግለጽ እና የስሜት የተጠቃሚ ቃላትን በመጠቀም የሚችል የረጅም ጉዳይ ማፍሰስ ይችላል፡፡ ለተሻለው እውቀታችን፣ የግልኙነት እና የአሳብን ፍርድን ወደ ትውልድ ትውልድ ስራ እናመጣ ዘንድ መጀመሪያ ነን፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'az': "İstifadəçilər, məktub, qiymətlər və şəkillər kimi növbənöv şəkillərdə olaraq onlayn tərzlərindən istifadə edirlər. Gözləri modelleşdirmək istifadəçi davranışları anlama üçün faydalandır. Buna görə də istifadəçilərin təsiri, hisslər analizi və nəsilləri kimi müxtəlif işləri dəstəkləyir. Bu kağızda, MG-PriFair'i, çoxlu modal nöral sistemi təklif edirik ki, bu kişilik təhsil və ədalətli xəbərdarlığı ilə kişilik təhsil edilmiş görünüş yaradır. Gözləmələrin kişisel məlumatları və hisslərin tərzlərini daxil edə biləcəyi təhsil ilə dəyişdirilmişdir. Biz, yemək-sınama domain içində hisslərin ədaləti üçün təhsil edilən gizli təhsil təhsil etmək üçün yeni məlumatları təhsil edirik. Yeni təcrübəmiz verilən verilənlərin sınaqları göstərir ki, MG-PriFair, istifadə edilmiş istifadəçilərin verilənlərin dəyişini kontrol edərkən və ən az hiss edilmiş sözlərin istifadə edərkən çox uzun təcrübələr yarada bilər. Bizim elmimiz ən yaxşısına görə, biz qullanıcıların gizli və duygularını yenidən nəsil işinə gətirən ilk kişiyik. Verici qurğuları və mənbə kodları faydalanır https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'bs': 'Korisnici izražavaju svoje mišljenje prema entitetima (npr. restoranima) preko internetskih pregleda koje mogu biti u raznim oblicima poput teksta, ocjena i slika. Modeliranje pregleda prednosti su za razumijevanje ponašanja korisnika koji, u turn, podržava različite zadatke orientirane na korisnike poput preporuke, analize osjećanja i generacije pregleda. U ovom papiru predlažemo MG-PriFair, multimodalni neuralni okvir, koji stvara personalizovane preglede sa svijesti privatnosti i pravednosti. Pod motivacijom činjenice da bi preglede mogle sadržati lične informacije i predrasude sentiment a, predlažemo novi diferencijalno privatni (dp) model za obuku garantiranog ugrađenog privatnosti i procjenu pristupa pravednosti osjećanja u domenu preglede hrane. Eksperimenti o našem kompletu datoteka novog pregleda pokazuju da je MG-PriFair sposoban da proizvede uvjerljivo duge preglede dok kontroliše količinu eksplozivnih podataka korisnika i koristi najmanje predrasude riječi. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, mi smo prvi koji dovede privatnost korisnika i poštenost osjećanja u zadatak generacije revizije. Kodovi podataka i izvora su dostupni na https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ca': "Els usuaris expressen les seves opinions cap a entitats (per exemple, restaurants) a través de revisions on-line que poden ser en diverses formes com text, valoracions i imatges. Les revisions de modelació són avantatges per a la comprensió del comportament dels usuaris que, a la vegada, suporta diverses tasques orientades a l'usuari, com la recomendació, l'anàlisi de sentiments i la generació de revisions. En aquest article, proposem MG-PriFair, un marc neuronal multimodal, que genera revisions personalitzades amb la privacitat i la consciència de la justesa. Motivat pel fet que les revisions pot contenir informació personal i bias sentimental, proposem un nou model d'incorporació diferencialment privada (dp) per formar incorporacions garantides en la privacitat i un enfocament d'evaluació de la justesa sentimental en el domini de revisió alimentari. Els experiments de la nostra nova revisió demostren que MG-PriFair és capaç de generar revisions plausiblement llargues mentre controla la quantitat de dades d'usuari explotades i utilitza l'incorporació de paraules menys bias. Per millor del nostre coneixement, som els primers a portar la privacitat dels usuaris i la justesa del sentiment a la tasca de generació de revisió. The dataset and source codes are available at  https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'cs': 'Uživatelé vyjadřují své názory na subjekty (např. restaurace) prostřednictvím on-line recenzí, které mohou být v různých formách, jako je text, hodnocení a obrázky. Modelování recenzí je výhodné pro porozumění chování uživatelů, které podporuje různé uživatelsky orientované úkoly, jako je doporučení, analýza sentimentů a generování recenzí. V tomto článku navrhujeme MG-PriFair, multimodální neuronový rámec, který generuje personalizované recenze s povědomím o soukromí a spravedlivosti. Motivováni skutečností, že recenze mohou obsahovat osobní informace a sentimentální zaujatosti, navrhujeme nový diferenciálně privátní (dp)-embeding model pro trénink zaručených vložení soukromí a hodnotící přístup pro spravedlnost sentimentu v oblasti recenze potravin. Experimenty na našem novém datovém souboru recenzí ukazují, že MG-PriFair je schopen generovat věrohodně dlouhé recenze při kontrole množství využívaných dat uživatelů a použít co nejméně sentimentově zaujaté vložení slov. Podle našeho nejlepšího vědomí jsme první, kdo přináší soukromí uživatelů a spravedlivost sentimentu do úkolu generování recenzí. Soubor dat a zdrojové kódy jsou k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'et': 'Kasutajad avaldavad oma arvamust üksuste (nt restoranide) suhtes veebipõhiste ülevaadete kaudu, mis võivad olla erinevates vormides, nagu tekst, hinnangud ja pildid. Arvustuste modelleerimine on kasulik kasutaja käitumise mõistmiseks, mis omakorda toetab erinevaid kasutajale orienteeritud ülesandeid, nagu soovitus, sentimentaalüüs ja ülevaate genereerimine. Käesolevas töös pakume välja MG-PriFair, mitmeliigiline neuraalpõhine raamistik, mis genereerib isikupärastatud ülevaateid privaatsuse ja õigluse teadlikkusega. Motiveerituna asjaolule, et ülevaated võivad sisaldada isikuandmeid ja tundeid, pakume välja uudse diferentsiaalselt privaatse (dp) manustamismudeli privaatsuse tagatud koolituste koolitamiseks ja hindamisviisi tundeid õiglaseks toiduainete hindamise valdkonnas. Uudsete ülevaadete andmekogumi eksperimendid näitavad, et MG-PriFair suudab luua usutavalt pikki ülevaateid, kontrollides samas kasutajate andmete hulka ja kasutades kõige vähem sentimentaalseid erapooletuid sõnade manustamist. Meie parimate teadmiste kohaselt oleme esimesed, kes toovad ülevaate genereerimise ülesandesse kasutajate privaatsuse ja tundete õigluse. Andmekogum ja lähtekoodid on kättesaadavad aadressil https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'fi': 'Käyttäjät ilmaisevat mielipiteensä yhteisöistä (esim. ravintoloista) online-arvosteluilla, jotka voivat olla erilaisia, kuten teksteissä, arvosteluissa ja kuvissa. Arviointien mallintaminen on hyödyllistä käyttäjien käyttäytymisen ymmärtämiselle, mikä puolestaan tukee erilaisia käyttäjälähtöisiä tehtäviä, kuten suositusta, tunteiden analysointia ja arvosteluiden luomista. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme MG-PriFairia, multimodaalista neuropohjaista kehystä, joka tuottaa yksilöllisiä arvosteluja yksityisyyden ja oikeudenmukaisuuden tietoisuuden kera. Perustuen siihen, että arvioinnit voivat sisältää henkilökohtaisia tietoja ja tunteiden vääristymiä, ehdotamme uutta erilaisesti yksityistä (dp)-upotusmallia yksityisyyden takaamien upotusten kouluttamiseen ja arviointimenetelmää tunteiden oikeudenmukaisuuden arvioimiseksi elintarvikearviointialalla. Uusilla arvosteluaineistoillamme tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että MG-PriFair pystyy tuottamaan uskottavan pitkiä arvosteluja samalla kun hallitsee hyödynnetyn käyttäjätiedon määrää ja käyttää vähiten tunteisiin kohdistuneita sanaupotuksia. Tietojemme mukaan olemme ensimmäisiä, jotka tuovat käyttäjien yksityisyyden ja tunteiden oikeudenmukaisuuden arvostelun tuottamiseen. Aineisto ja lähdekoodit ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé mengko nglanggar langgar sampek akeh Entèni (adil, restoran) nganggo resmi online sing bisa diapakan karo akeh luwih-luwih dumadhi sing dikarolan teks, disenyong lan gambar. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe MG-PriFer, sistem sing wis ana dadi multimodal, sing ngejaraké perusahaan karo perusahaan kanggo awak dhéwé. Motyabat karo perusahaan karo hal-hal penting isa karo informasi pribadi lan bias, kita supoyo un barêng nggawe pribadi yang segala (tp) Name Awak dhéwé sing paling awak dhéwé, kita uwis perusahaan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan pengguna karo hal-hal kuwi tindakan nguasai nggawe nguasai perusahaan winih. dataset karo kelompok https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'ha': "Yin amfani da suka nuna mataimakonsu zuwa masu nau'a (misali restaurants) don a iya samu'aw masu iya cikin tsari daban-daban kamar misãlan matsayi, rabo da zane. Cire juyin motsi na amfani ne ga fahimtar aikin mai amfani da, wanda, a lokacin da, yana ƙarfafa wasu aikin mãsu amfani da shi masu shiryuwa kamar shawarar da aka yi, analyi na hisia, kuma yana ƙarani da ƙori. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãtar da MG-PriFair, wata firam mai multi-rubutun neura, wanda ke iya samun karatun mutane da farat ɗaya da masu fahimta da ãdalci. Aka motsar da musamman za'a ƙunsa da maɓallin mutane da abincin hisani, za'a buƙata wani salon na daban-daban a danne (dp) da misãlin mai nuna wa tsarin farat ɗaya da za'a tsare marubuta da wani takwara wa'anar gaskiyar siga da za'a ƙudura kafin da za'a yi ãdalci a cikin shekaran rabon abinci. Tajararin da ke kanana dandaman nan yanzu ke nuna cewa MG-PriFair yana iya iya ƙiƙiro matsayin da aka faɗaɗa lokaci da kuma ana kanana girmar data da aka amfani da kuma ana yi amfani da da da daidai da maganar da aka faɗaɗa. Ga mafi kyãwon saninmu, mũ ne farkon mu zo da abincin na fara da hisia da ãdalci zuwa wani aikin mai rajewa. QXml https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.", 'he': 'משתמשים מבטיחים את דעתם כלפי יחידות (למשל מסעדות) באמצעות ביקורות באינטרנט שאפשר להיות בצורות מגוונות כמו טקסט, ריטינג ותמונות. ביקורות דוגמניות הן יתרונות להבנה של התנהגות המשתמשת אשר, בתור, תומכת במשימות שונות ממוקדות משתמש כמו המלצה, ניתוח רגשות, ודור ביקור. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים MG-PriFair, מסגרת עצבית רבות מודלית, שמוצרת ביקורות אישיות עם פרטיות ויודעת הוגנות. מוטיבציה על ידי העובדה שאולי ביקורות יכולות לכלול מידע אישי ומתמודדות רגשות, אנו מציעים מודל חדש בהכניסה פרטית (dp) ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים של הבדיקה הרומנית שלנו מראים ש MG-PriFair מסוגל ליצור ביקורות ארוכות בהתאם לשלוט בכמות של נתונים משתמשים ניצלים ושימוש במילים המיוחדות הכי פחות רגשות. למיטב הידע שלנו, אנחנו הראשונים להביא פרטיות משתמשים וצדקות רגשות למשימה של דור הביקור. קבוצת המידע וקודי המקור זמינים ב https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'sk': 'Uporabniki svoja mnenja do subjektov (npr. restavracij) izražajo prek spletnih pregledov, ki so lahko v različnih oblikah, kot so besedilo, ocene in slike. Modeliranje pregledov je koristno za razumevanje vedenja uporabnikov, kar pa podpira različna uporabniško usmerjena opravila, kot so priporočila, analiza čustev in ustvarjanje pregledov. V prispevku predlagamo MG-PriFair, multimodalni nevronski okvir, ki ustvarja osebne preglede z zasebnostjo in poštenostjo. Na podlagi dejstva, da ocene lahko vsebujejo osebne podatke in pristranskost občutkov, predlagamo nov model diferencialno zasebnega (dp) vključevanja za usposabljanje vključitev zasebnosti in pristop vrednotenja za pravičnost občutkov na področju pregleda hrane. Eksperimenti na našem novem naboru podatkov o pregledih kažejo, da je MG-PriFair sposoben ustvariti verjetno dolge preglede, hkrati pa nadzirati količino izkoriščenih uporabniških podatkov in uporabiti najmanj pristranske besede. Kolikor vemo, smo prvi, ki v nalogo ustvarjanja pregledov vključujemo zasebnost uporabnikov in pravičnost občutkov. Zbirka podatkov in izvorne kode so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མིང་ཚོའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་དབུགས་ཆ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། Modeling reviews are advantageous for user behavior understanding which, in turn, supports various user-oriented tasks such as recommendation, sentiment analysis, and review generation. འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་MG-PriFair(MG-PriFair)སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཕན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། དེ་ནི་སྒེར་ཚུལ་དང་དྲང་ཆེན་ Motivated by the fact that reviews might contain personal information and sentiment bias, we propose a novel differentially private (dp)-embedding model for training privacy guaranteed embeddings and an evaluation approach for sentiment fairness in the food-review domain. Experiments on our novel review dataset show that MG-PriFair is capable of generating plausibly long reviews while controlling the amount of exploited user data and using the least sentiment biased word embeddings. ང་ཚོའི་ཆེད་དུ་འཕགས་པ་ཤེས་མཁན་དུ་ང་ཚོ་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མི་སྒེར་ཚུགས་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་ཆེད་དུ་འཕགས་ཞིབ་འཇུ སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཚར་ཡོད་པ https://github.com/ReML-AI/MG-PriFair.'}
{'en': 'Improving Abstractive Dialogue Summarization with Graph Structures and Topic Words', 'ar': 'تحسين تلخيص الحوار التجريدي باستخدام هياكل الرسم البياني وكلمات الموضوع', 'fr': "Amélioration de la synthèse des dialogues abstraits à l'aide de structures graphiques et de mots thématiques", 'es': 'Mejora de la síntesis de diálogos abstractivos con estructuras gráficas y palabras temáticas', 'pt': 'Melhorando a sumarização de diálogos abstratos com estruturas gráficas e palavras de tópicos', 'ja': 'グラフ構造とトピックワードによる抽象的な対話の要約の改善', 'zh': '用图形结构和主题词改进抽象对话摘要', 'ru': 'Совершенствование абстрактного обобщения диалогов с помощью графических структур и тематических слов', 'hi': 'ग्राफ संरचनाओं और विषय शब्दों के साथ अमूर्त संवाद सारांशीकरण में सुधार', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar Idirphlé Teibí a Fheabhsú le Struchtúir Ghraif agus Focail Ábhair', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της συνοψίας του αφηρημένου διαλόγου με δομές γραφήματος και λέξεις θεμάτων', 'hu': 'Az absztrakt párbeszéd összefoglalásának javítása grafikonstruktúrákkal és témaszavakkal', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიგური დიალოგის კომპანიზაცია გრაფიკური სტრუქტურებით და ტემიკური სიტყვებით', 'kk': 'Графикалық құрылғылар мен нақышты сөздермен абстрактивтік диалогтың тұжырымдамасын жақсарту', 'it': 'Migliorare la sintesi del dialogo astratto con strutture grafiche e parole tematiche', 'lt': 'Gerinti abstraktiško dialogo santrauką su grafikų struktūromis ir teminiais žodžiais', 'mk': 'Подобрување на резултатот на апстрактивниот дијалог со структурите на графикот и темските зборови', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് സ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്ററുകളും വാക്കുകളും', 'mn': 'График бүтэц болон сэдэв үгнүүдтэй Абстрактив Диалог дээр', 'mt': 'Titjib fis-Sommarju tad-Djalogu Abstrattiv bl-Istrutturi tal-Grafiki u l-Kliem Tematiċi', 'ms': 'Menembangkan Ringkasan Dialog Abstraktif dengan Struktur Graf dan Kata Topik', 'no': 'Forbetra samandrag av abstraktive dialogvindauge med grafikkstrukturer og emne', 'pl': 'Poprawa streszczenia dialogów abstrakcyjnych za pomocą struktur wykresów i słów tematycznych', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea rezumatului dialogului abstract cu structuri grafice și cuvinte tematice', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ් සැකසුම් සහ විශේෂ වචන සමග සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාදය වැඩ කරන්න', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje sažetka abstraktivnog dijaloga sa strukturama grafika i temskim rečima', 'so': 'Improving Abstractive Dialog summarization with Graph Structures and Topic Words', 'sv': 'Förbättra sammanfattningen av abstrakta dialoger med grafstrukturer och ämnesord', 'ur': 'گراف ساختاروں اور موضوع کلمات کے ساتھ آب تراکٹیو ڈالیلوگ جمع کرنا بہتر کر رہا ہے', 'ta': 'Improving Abstractive Dialogue Summarization with Graph Structures and Topic Words', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường tỷ lệ thu âm với cấu trúc đồ họa và các từ chủ đề', 'bg': 'Подобряване на обобщението на абстрактния диалог с графични структури и тематични думи', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje sažetka abstraktivnog dijaloga s strukturama grafika i temskim riječima', 'nl': 'Verbetering van abstracte dialoogsamenvatting met grafiekstructuren en topic words', 'ko': '도형 구조와 주제어로 추상적 대화 요약 개선', 'fa': 'بهتر کردن جمع کردن محاورۀ محاورۀ ابزار با ساختارهای گراف و کلمات موضوع', 'id': 'Menembangkan Ringkasan Dialog Abstraktif dengan Struktur Graf dan Kata Topik', 'da': 'Forbedring af den abstrakte dialogopsummering med grafstrukturer og emneord', 'de': 'Verbesserung der abstrakten Dialogzusammenfassung mit Graphstrukturen und Themenwörtern', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler we Meýdançalar bilen Abstraktiw Dialog Toplaýyşyny gowlaşdyr', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Ujumbe wa Ujumbe wa Dialogu ya Abstractive kwa Miundombinu na Matambo', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'af': 'Verbeter Abstraktiewe Dialoog Opsomming met Grafikstrukture en onderwerpe Woorde', 'hy': 'Գրաֆի կառուցվածքների և թեմային բառերի միջոցով բարելավելը', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i përmbledhjes së dialogut abstraktiv me strukturat e grafikut dhe fjalët tematike', 'az': '䝲慦楫⁙慰쒱污狄넠盉餠䵥発甠參뙺泉饲椠楬즙⁁扳瑲慫瑩瘠䑩慬潧⁔潰污얟擄녲浡珄넊', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ কাঠামো এবং বিষয়বস্তু শব্দের সামারিজেশন ব্যবহার করে আবত্ত্রিক ডায়ালগ', 'ca': 'Improving Abstractive Dialogue Summarization with Graph Structures and Topic Words', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje sažetka abstraktivnog dijaloga sa grafskim strukturama i temskim riječima', 'cs': 'Zlepšení abstrakčního shrnutí dialogů s grafovými strukturami a tématickými slovy', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtliku dialoogi kokkuvõtte parandamine graafiliste struktuuride ja teemasõnadega', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmävuoropuhelun tiivistelmän parantaminen graafisten rakenteiden ja aihesanojen avulla', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngubah Ukumbarasan Dialog Tatanan karo structural karo Gambar Gambar', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje povzetka povzetka pogovora z grafičnimi strukturami in tematskimi besedami', 'he': 'שיפור סדרת השיחה המתמשכת עם מבנים גרפים ומילים נושאיות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Improving Abstractive Dialog Summarization with Graph Structures and Topic Words'}
{'en': 'Recently, people have been beginning paying more attention to the abstractive dialogue summarization task. Since the information flows are exchanged between at least two interlocutors and key elements about a certain event are often spanned across multiple utterances, it is necessary for researchers to explore the inherent relations and structures of dialogue contents. However, the existing approaches often process the dialogue with sequence-based models, which are hard to capture long-distance inter-sentence relations. In this paper, we propose a Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) network to model the dialogue as an interaction graph according to the topic word information. A masked graph self-attention mechanism is used to integrate cross-sentence information flows and focus more on the related utterances, which makes it better to understand the dialogue. Moreover, the topic word features are introduced to assist the decoding process. We evaluate our model on the SAMSum Corpus and Automobile Master Corpus. The experimental results show that our method outperforms most of the baselines.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، بدأ الناس في إيلاء المزيد من الاهتمام لمهمة تلخيص الحوار المجرد. نظرًا لأن تدفقات المعلومات يتم تبادلها بين اثنين على الأقل من المحاورين والعناصر الرئيسية حول حدث معين غالبًا ما تمتد عبر أقوال متعددة ، فمن الضروري للباحثين استكشاف العلاقات والبنى المتأصلة لمحتويات الحوار. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأساليب الحالية غالبًا ما تعالج الحوار باستخدام نماذج قائمة على التسلسل ، والتي يصعب التقاط العلاقات بين الجمل لمسافات طويلة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح شبكة الاهتمام بالرسم البياني للحوار الإرشادي (TGDGA) لكلمة موضوع لنمذجة الحوار كرسم بياني تفاعلي وفقًا لمعلومات كلمة الموضوع. يتم استخدام آلية الانتباه الذاتي للرسم البياني المقنع لدمج تدفقات المعلومات عبر الجمل والتركيز أكثر على الأقوال ذات الصلة ، مما يجعل فهم الحوار أفضل. علاوة على ذلك ، يتم تقديم ميزات كلمة الموضوع للمساعدة في عملية فك التشفير. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا على SAMSum Corpus و Automobile Master Corpus. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على معظم الخطوط الأساسية.', 'es': 'Recientemente, la gente ha empezado a prestar más atención a la tarea de resumir diálogos abstractivos. Dado que los flujos de información se intercambian entre al menos dos interlocutores y los elementos clave sobre un determinado evento a menudo se extienden a través de múltiples enunciados, es necesario que los investigadores exploren las relaciones y estructuras inherentes a los contenidos del diálogo. Sin embargo, los enfoques existentes a menudo procesan el diálogo con modelos basados en secuencias, que son difíciles de captar relaciones entre frases a larga distancia. En este artículo, proponemos una red de Atención Gráfica de Diálogo Guiada por Palabras Temáticas (TGDGA) para modelar el diálogo como un gráfico de interacción de acuerdo con la información de las palabras del tema. Se utiliza un mecanismo de autoatención de gráficos enmascarados para integrar los flujos de información entre frases y centrarse más en los enunciados relacionados, lo que hace que sea mejor entender el diálogo. Además, las características de las palabras temáticas se introducen para ayudar al proceso de decodificación. Evaluamos nuestro modelo en el SamSum Corpus y Automobile Master Corpus. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método supera a la mayoría de las líneas de base.', 'fr': "Récemment, les gens ont commencé à accorder plus d'attention à la tâche de synthèse du dialogue abstrait. Étant donné que les flux d'informations sont échangés entre au moins deux interlocuteurs et que les éléments clés concernant un événement donné sont souvent répartis entre plusieurs énoncés, il est nécessaire que les chercheurs explorent les relations et les structures inhérentes aux contenus de dialogue. Cependant, les approches existantes traitent souvent le dialogue avec des modèles basés sur des séquences, qui sont difficiles à saisir des relations interphrases à distance. Dans cet article, nous proposons un réseau TGDGA (Topic-Word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention) pour modéliser le dialogue sous la forme d'un graphique d'interaction en fonction des informations sur les mots du sujet. Un mécanisme d'auto-attention graphique masqué est utilisé pour intégrer les flux d'informations entre phrases et se concentrer davantage sur les énoncés associés, ce qui permet de mieux comprendre le dialogue. De plus, les fonctionnalités de mots thématiques sont introduites pour faciliter le processus de décodage. Nous évaluons notre modèle sur le SamSum Corpus et le Corpus Master Automobile. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode surpasse la plupart des valeurs de base.", 'pt': 'Recentemente, as pessoas começaram a prestar mais atenção à tarefa de sumarização de diálogos abstrativos. Uma vez que os fluxos de informação são trocados entre pelo menos dois interlocutores e elementos-chave sobre um determinado evento são muitas vezes atravessados por múltiplos enunciados, é necessário que os pesquisadores explorem as relações e estruturas inerentes aos conteúdos do diálogo. No entanto, as abordagens existentes muitas vezes processam o diálogo com modelos baseados em sequência, que são difíceis de capturar relações intersentenciais de longa distância. Neste artigo, propomos uma rede de atenção de gráfico de diálogo guiado por palavra-tópico (TGDGA) para modelar o diálogo como um grafo de interação de acordo com a informação da palavra-tópico. Um mecanismo de autoatenção de grafo mascarado é usado para integrar fluxos de informações entre frases e focar mais nos enunciados relacionados, o que facilita a compreensão do diálogo. Além disso, os recursos da palavra de tópico são introduzidos para auxiliar o processo de decodificação. Avaliamos nosso modelo no SAMSum Corpus e Automobile Master Corpus. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método supera a maioria das linhas de base.', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, लोग अमूर्त संवाद सारांशीकरण कार्य पर अधिक ध्यान देना शुरू कर रहे हैं। चूंकि सूचना प्रवाह का आदान-प्रदान कम से कम दो वार्ताकारों के बीच किया जाता है और एक निश्चित घटना के बारे में प्रमुख तत्वअक्सर कई कथनों में फैले होते हैं, इसलिए शोधकर्ताओं के लिए संवाद सामग्री के अंतर्निहित संबंधों और संरचनाओं का पता लगाना आवश्यक है। हालांकि, मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण अक्सर अनुक्रम-आधारित मॉडल के साथ बातचीत को संसाधित करते हैं, जो लंबी दूरी के अंतर-वाक्य संबंधों को कैप्चर करना मुश्किल होता है। इस पेपर में, हम विषय शब्द की जानकारी के अनुसार बातचीत को एक इंटरैक्शन ग्राफ के रूप में मॉडल करने के लिए एक विषय-शब्द निर्देशित संवाद ग्राफ अटेंशन (टीजीडीजीए) नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक नकाबपोश ग्राफ आत्म-ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग क्रॉस-वाक्य सूचना प्रवाह को एकीकृत करने और संबंधित कथनों पर अधिक ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए किया जाता है, जो संवाद को समझने के लिए बेहतर बनाता है। इसके अलावा, विषय शब्द सुविधाओं को डिकोडिंग प्रक्रिया की सहायता के लिए पेश किया जाता है। हम SAMSum कॉर्पस और ऑटोमोबाइल मास्टर कॉर्पस पर हमारे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि अधिकांश बेसलाइन को मात देती है।', 'ja': '最近では、抽象的な対話のまとめ作業に注目し始めている。 情報の流れは、少なくとも2人の対話者の間で交換され、特定の事象に関する重要な要素はしばしば複数の発話にまたがるため、研究者は対話内容の固有の関係と構造を探求する必要がある。 しかし、既存のアプローチは、長距離の文間関係を取り込むのが難しいシーケンスベースのモデルとの対話を処理することが多い。 この論文では、トピック単語情報に従って対話をインタラクショングラフとしてモデル化するためのトピック単語ガイド付き対話グラフアテンション（ TGDGA ）ネットワークを提案します。 マスクされたグラフの自己注目メカニズムを使用して、文章間の情報フローを統合し、関連する発話により焦点を当てることで、対話をよりよく理解することができます。 さらに、トピックの単語特徴は、復号化プロセスを支援するために導入される。 SAMSum CorpusとAutomobile Master Corpusでモデルを評価します。 実験結果は、私たちの方法がほとんどのベースラインを上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '近者,人始益注象之对总结任务。 以信息流易于至少两对话者之间,而事机常越数语,故论者有必究其情理者。 然今法常以序对,难得长距离句。 本文中,发一主题词引对图注意(TGDGA)网络,据主题词信息建模为交互图。 用蒙面图自注意机制,整合跨句信息流,更关语,益解对。 引入主题词功以助解码。 SAMSum Corpus与Automotive Master Corpus评模样。 实验结果表明,吾道优于多基线。', 'ru': 'В последнее время люди стали уделять больше внимания задаче абстрактного обобщения диалога. Поскольку информационные потоки обмениваются между по крайней мере двумя собеседниками и ключевые элементы о том или ином событии часто охватывают несколько высказываний, исследователям необходимо исследовать присущие отношения и структуры содержания диалога. Тем не менее, существующие подходы часто обрабатывают диалог с помощью моделей, основанных на последовательности, которые трудно охватить отношениями между предложениями на расстоянии. В этой статье мы предлагаем сеть TGDGA (Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention) для моделирования диалога в виде графика взаимодействия в соответствии с информацией о тематическом слове. Механизм самовнимания маскированного графа используется для интеграции потоков информации с перекрестными предложениями и сосредоточения большего внимания на соответствующих высказываниях, что позволяет лучше понять диалог. Кроме того, для облегчения процесса декодирования вводятся функции тематических слов. Мы оцениваем нашу модель на SAMSum Corpus и Automobile Master Corpus. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод превосходит большинство базовых линий.', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, tá daoine ag tabhairt aird níos mó ar an tasc achoimrithe idirphlé teibí. Ós rud é go malartaítear na sreafaí faisnéise idir dhá idirghabhálaí ar a laghad agus gur minic a shíneann príomheilimintí faoi imeacht áirithe trasna ar chainteanna iolracha, ní mór do thaighdeoirí iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar chaidreamh dúchasach agus ar struchtúir ábhar an chomhphlé. Mar sin féin, is minic a phróiseálann na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana an t-idirphlé le samhlacha seicheamh-bhunaithe, ar deacair iad a ghabháil le caidreamh fadraoin idir abairtí. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid gréasán d’aird a thabhairt ar Chomhphlé Treoraithe ar Thopaicí Focal (TGDGA) chun an t-idirphlé a shamhaltú mar ghraf idirghníomhaíochta de réir na faisnéise topaice focal. Úsáidtear meicníocht féin-aird ar ghraif chumhdaithe chun sreafaí faisnéise tras-abairte a chomhtháthú agus chun díriú níos mó ar na cainteanna gaolmhara, rud a fhágann gur fearr an t-idirphlé a thuiscint. Ina theannta sin, tugtar isteach na gnéithe focal topaicí chun cabhrú leis an bpróiseas díchódaithe. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár múnla ar an SAMSum Corpus agus ar an Máistir-Chorp Gluaisteán. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár modh an chuid is mó de na bonnlínte.', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ ადამიანები უფრო მეტი აბსტრაქტიგური დიალოგის საუკუძებაზე დააწყებენ. იმიტომ, რომ ინფორმაციის წესები გადაცვლილებიან უნდომი ორი ინტერლექტორი და კი ელემენტები განსაკუთრებული მოვლენების შესახებ ზოგიერთად მრავალ სიტყვებზე, სწორედ განსაკუთრებულია განსაკუთრებულ მაგრამ მხოლოდ, მსოფლიო დახმარებების გარეშე დიალოგის გარეშე მოდელებით, რომლებიც ძალიან ძალიან გარეშე განსხვავებული სიტყვების შესახებ. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მინდომარებით ტემიკური სიტყვების მინდომარებული დიალოგის გეგურაცია (TGDGA) ქსელის მოდელედ დიალოგის შესახებ ინტერფექციის გრაფიკაში. მასკური გრაფიკური თავიდარჩენის მექანსი გამოყენება, რომელიც დიალოგის შესახებ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო გავიგეთ. დამატებით, თემენტის სიტყვების ფუნქციები შეიყვანენ, რომ დახმარება რეკოდირების პროცესის. ჩვენ მოდელის შესახებ SAMSum Corpus და ავტომობილური მასტერი Corpus. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მეთოდის გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'Az utóbbi időben az emberek kezdtek nagyobb figyelmet fordítani az absztrakt párbeszéd összefoglalási feladatra. Mivel az információáramlásokat legalább két beszélgető fél között cserélik, és egy bizonyos esemény kulcsfontosságú elemei gyakran többféle kifejezésre terjednek ki, a kutatóknak fel kell vizsgálniuk a párbeszéd tartalmának eredendő kapcsolatait és struktúráit. A meglévő megközelítések azonban gyakran folytatják a párbeszédet szekvencia alapú modellekkel, amelyek nehezen rögzíthetők a hosszú távú mondatközi kapcsolatok. Jelen tanulmányban egy Téma-szó Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) hálózatot javasolunk, amely interakciós grafikként modellezi a téma szó információinak megfelelően. Egy maszkos grafikon önfigyelő mechanizmust használnak a keresztmondatok információáramlásainak integrálására és a kapcsolódó kifejezésekre összpontosítására, ami jobban megérti a párbeszédet. Ezenkívül a téma szó funkcióit vezetik be, hogy segítsék a dekódolás folyamatát. Modellünket a SAMSum Corpus és az Automobile Master Corpus alapján értékeljük. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a módszerünk a legtöbb alapvető értéket felülmúlja.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα, οι άνθρωποι αρχίζουν να δίνουν περισσότερη προσοχή στην εργασία συνοψίας του αφηρημένου διαλόγου. Δεδομένου ότι οι ροές πληροφοριών ανταλλάσσονται μεταξύ τουλάχιστον δύο συνομιλητών και τα βασικά στοιχεία για ένα συγκεκριμένο γεγονός συχνά εκτείνονται σε πολλαπλές εκφράσεις, είναι απαραίτητο οι ερευνητές να διερευνήσουν τις εγγενείς σχέσεις και τις δομές του περιεχομένου διαλόγου. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις συχνά επεξεργάζονται τον διάλογο με μοντέλα βασισμένα σε ακολουθίες, τα οποία είναι δύσκολο να συλληφθούν μακροχρόνιες σχέσεις μεταξύ των προτάσεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα δίκτυο Προσοχής Γραφείου Καθοδηγούμενου Διαλόγου θέματος-λέξης (για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τον διάλογο ως γράφημα αλληλεπίδρασης σύμφωνα με τις πληροφορίες λέξεων του θέματος. Ένας μηχανισμός αυτοπροσοχής προσωποποιημένου γραφήματος χρησιμοποιείται για να ενσωματώσει τις διατεθειμένες ροές πληροφοριών και να επικεντρωθεί περισσότερο στις σχετικές εκφράσεις, γεγονός που καθιστά καλύτερη την κατανόηση του διαλόγου. Επιπλέον, τα χαρακτηριστικά των λέξεων του θέματος εισάγονται για να βοηθήσουν τη διαδικασία αποκωδικοποίησης. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας στο Σώμα SAMSum και το Ανώτατο Σώμα Αυτοκινήτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις περισσότερες γραμμές βάσης.', 'it': 'Recentemente, le persone hanno iniziato a prestare maggiore attenzione al compito di sintesi del dialogo astratto. Poiché i flussi di informazioni sono scambiati tra almeno due interlocutori e gli elementi chiave di un determinato evento sono spesso articolati in molteplici espressioni, è necessario che i ricercatori esplorino le relazioni e le strutture intrinseche dei contenuti del dialogo. Tuttavia, gli approcci esistenti spesso elaborano il dialogo con modelli sequenziali, che sono difficili da catturare relazioni interfrasi a lunga distanza. In questo articolo, proponiamo una rete TGDGA (Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention) per modellare il dialogo come grafico di interazione in base alle informazioni della parola argomento. Un meccanismo di auto-attenzione del grafico mascherato viene utilizzato per integrare flussi di informazioni cross-frase e concentrarsi maggiormente sulle espressioni correlate, il che rende meglio comprendere il dialogo. Inoltre, le caratteristiche della parola argomento sono introdotte per aiutare il processo di decodifica. Valutiamo il nostro modello su SAMSum Corpus e Automobile Master Corpus. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo supera la maggior parte delle linee di base.', 'lt': 'Neseniai žmonės pradėjo skirti daugiau dėmesio abstrakčiam dialogo santraukų uždaviniui. Since the information flows are exchanged between at least two interlocutors and key elements about a certain event are often spanned across multiple utterances, it is necessary for researchers to explore the inherent relations and structures of dialogue contents.  Tačiau dabartiniais metodais dažnai vyksta dialogas su sekos modeliais, kurie sunku užfiksuoti ilgalaikius santykius tarp sakinių. Šiame dokumente siūlome teminio žodžio orientuoto dialogo grafinio dėmesio (TGDGA) tinklą, kuris modeliuotų dialogą kaip sąveikos grafiką pagal teminę žodžio informaciją. Siekiant integruoti įvairių sakinių informacinius srautus ir labiau sutelkti dėmesį į susijusius žodžius, naudojamas maskuotas grafiko savarankiškumo mechanizmas, kuris pagerina dialogo supratimą. Be to, siekiant padėti dekodifikuoti procesą įvedamos teminės žodžio savybės. Vertiname SAMSum Corpus ir Automobile Master Corpus model į. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas viršija daugumą bazinių linijų.', 'mk': 'Неодамна луѓето почнаа да обрнуваат поголемо внимание на апстрактивната задача за резултатирање на дијалогот. Бидејќи протоковите на информации се разменуваат помеѓу најмалку двајца интерлокатори и клучните елементи во врска со одреден настан честопати се прошируваат низ повеќе изрази, потребно е истражувачите да ги истражуваат природните односи и структурите на содржината на дијалогот. Сепак, постојните пристапи честопати го процесираат дијалогот со модели базирани на секвенца, кои се тешки за зафатување на односите меѓу речениците на далечина. Во овој весник, предложуваме мрежа за внимание на дијалогот со тематични зборови (TGDGA) за моделирање на дијалогот како граф за интеракција според информациите за тематичните зборови. Механизам за самовнимание на маскираниот граф се користи за интегрирање на тековите на информации од меѓу речениците и фокусирање повеќе на поврзаните изрази, што го прави подобро да се разбере дијалогот. Покрај тоа, се воведени карактеристики на темата за зборови за помош во процесот на декодирање. Го проценуваме нашиот модел на SAMSum Corpus и Automobile Master Corpus. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод го надминува поголемиот дел од основните линии.', 'ms': 'Baru-baru ini, orang telah mula memperhatikan tugas pengringkasan dialog abstraktif. Oleh kerana aliran maklumat ditukar antara sekurang-kurangnya dua interlocutor dan unsur-unsur utama mengenai peristiwa tertentu sering ditempatkan melalui berbilang ucapan, diperlukan bagi penyelidik untuk mengeksplorasi hubungan dan struktur kandungan dialog. Namun, pendekatan yang ada sering memproses dialog dengan model berasaskan urutan, yang sukar untuk menangkap hubungan antara kalimat jarak jauh. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian Perhatian Graf Dialog Dipandang (TGDGA) untuk model dialog sebagai graf interaksi menurut maklumat perkataan topik. Mekanisme perhatian-diri graf bertopeng digunakan untuk mengintegrasikan aliran maklumat kalimat-salib dan fokus lebih pada ungkapan berkaitan, yang membuat ia lebih baik untuk memahami dialog. Moreover, the topic word features are introduced to assist the decoding process.  Kami menilai model kami pada SAMSum Corpus dan Automobile Master Corpus. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melebihi kebanyakan garis dasar.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ ആളുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d തുടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു ഒരു സംഭവത്തെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള രണ്ടു ഇന്റര്\u200dലോക്ടൂട്ടറുകള്\u200dക്കും കീ മൂലകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പല വാക്കുകളിലും പലപ്പോഴും വിതരണം ചെയ് However, the existing approaches often process the dialogue with sequence-based models, which are hard to capture long-distance inter-sentence relations.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ടോപ്പിക്ക് വാര്\u200dഡ് വഴികാട്ടിയ ഡയലോഗ് ഗ്രാഫ് ശ്രദ്ധ (ടിജിജിജിഎ) നെറ്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനവാ ഒരു മുഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഗ്രാഫ് സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെനിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ക്രിസ്റ്റ് വാക്കുകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച പിന്നീട്, വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഡികോഡിങ് പ്രക്രിയയെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d SAMSum കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെയും ഓട്ടോമോബൈല്\u200d മാസ്റ്റര്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്സിനെയും നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു കൊണ്ട പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d പെട്ടെന്നാണ്.', 'mt': 'Dan l-aħħar, in-nies bdew jagħtu aktar attenzjoni lill-kompitu ta’ sommarju tad-djalogu astrattiv. Peress li l-flussi ta’ informazzjoni huma skambjati bejn mill-inqas żewġ interlokuturi u l-elementi ewlenin dwar ċertu avveniment ta’ spiss huma mifruxa f’diversi dikjarazzjonijiet, huwa meħtieġ li r-riċerkaturi jesploraw ir-relazzjonijiet u l-istrutturi inerenti tal-kontenut tad-djalogu. Madankollu, l-approċċi eżistenti spiss jipproċessaw id-djalogu ma’ mudelli bbażati fuq sekwenzi, li huma diffiċli biex jinqabdu relazzjonijiet bejn sentenzi fuq distanza twila. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu netwerk ta’ Attenzjoni Grafika ta’ Djalogu Gwida b’kelma Tematika (TGDGA) biex jimmudellaw id-djalogu bħala grafika ta’ interazzjoni skont l-informazzjoni dwar il-kelma tematika. Mekkaniżmu maskrat ta’ awtonomija tal-graff jintuża biex jintegra l-flussi ta’ informazzjoni transsentenzjali u jiffoka aktar fuq l-espressjonijiet relatati, li jagħmilha aħjar biex wieħed jifhem id-djalogu. Barra minn hekk, il-karatteristiċi tal-kelma tematiċi huma introdotti biex jgħinu l-proċess tad-dekodifikazzjoni. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell tagħna dwar is-SAMSum Corpus u l-Automobile Master Corpus. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż il-biċċa l-kbira tal-linji bażi.', 'kk': 'Жуырда адамдар абстрактивті диалогтың жазылу тапсырмасына көбірек болып жатқан. Мәлімет ақпараттары кемінде екі тіркесімді және бір оқиға туралы кілт элементтер арасында ауыстырылатын себебі, бірнеше сөздерге ауыстырылады, зерттеушілер диалог мазмұнының қасиеттерін және құрылымын зе Бірақ бар жағдайлардың көпшілігі реттеу негіздеген үлгілер диалогын жасайды. Бұл сөздер арасындағы ұзындық қатынасын түсіру қиын. Бұл қағазда, нақышты сөз мәліметіне сәйкес түрде диалогты түсіндіру (TGDGA) сәйкес графикасының түсіндіру үшін, тақырыпты сөз мәліметіне сәйкес түрде диалогты түсіндіру үші Қалқалаған график өзіңіздің мазмұның ақпараттарын біріктіру үшін қолданылады. Бұл диалогты түсіндіру үшін қолданылады. Қосымша, тақырыпты сөз мүмкіндіктері декодтау процесіне көмектесу үшін келтіріледі. Біз SAMSum корпус мен автомобильді мастер Корпус үлгімізді бағалаймыз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер біздің әдіміміз негізгі жолдардың көпшілігін жасайды.', 'ro': 'Recent, oamenii au început să acorde mai multă atenție sarcinii de sintetizare a dialogului abstract. Deoarece fluxurile de informații sunt schimbate între cel puțin doi interlocutori și elementele cheie legate de un anumit eveniment sunt adesea cuprinse în mai multe declarații, este necesar ca cercetătorii să exploreze relațiile și structurile inerente conținutului dialogului. Cu toate acestea, abordările existente procesează adesea dialogul cu modele bazate pe secvențe, care sunt greu de captat relațiile interfraze la distanță lungă. În această lucrare, vă propunem o rețea TGDGA (Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention) pentru a modela dialogul ca un grafic de interacțiune în funcție de informațiile cuvântului subiectului. Un mecanism mascat de auto-atenție grafică este folosit pentru a integra fluxurile de informații încrucișate de fraze și pentru a se concentra mai mult pe expresiile aferente, ceea ce face mai bine să înțeleagă dialogul. Mai mult decât atât, caracteristicile cuvântului subiect sunt introduse pentru a ajuta procesul de decodare. Evaluăm modelul nostru pe SAMSum Corpus și Automobile Master Corpus. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră depășește majoritatea liniilor de bază.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio ludzie zaczynają zwracać większą uwagę na abstrakcyjne podsumowanie dialogu. Ponieważ przepływy informacji są wymieniane między co najmniej dwoma rozmówcami, a kluczowe elementy dotyczące pewnego zdarzenia są często rozciągane na wiele wypowiedzi, konieczne jest, aby badacze zbadali nieodłączne relacje i struktury treści dialogu. Jednak istniejące podejścia często przetwarzają dialog z modelami opartymi na sekwencji, które trudno uchwycić relacje między zdaniami na odległość. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy sieć uwagi na temat-słowo Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) w celu modelowania dialogu jako wykresu interakcji według informacji o temacie słowa. Zamaskowany wykres automatycznej uwagi służy do integracji przepływów informacji krzyżowych i skupienia się bardziej na powiązanych z nimi wypowiedziach, co ułatwia zrozumienie dialogu. Ponadto wprowadzono funkcje słowa tematyczne, aby wspomóc proces dekodowania. Nasz model oceniamy na SAMSum Corpus oraz Automobile Master Corpus. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda przewyższa większość linii bazowych.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед хүмүүс харьцуулахын тулд илүү анхаарал хандуулж эхэлсэн. Мэдээллийн урсгал нь хамгийн бага зэрэг хоёр хуваалцагч болон тодорхой үйл явцын тухай чухал элементүүдийн хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хо Гэвч суурилсан арга барилгууд дарааллаар суурилсан загвартай диалог хийдэг. Энэ нь урт зай хоорондын өгүүлбэрийн харилцаа барих хэцүү. Энэ цаасан дээр бид сэдвийн үг мэдээллээр харилцааны график хэлбэрээр яриаг загварчлахын тулд сэдвийн үг дээрх загвар өгүүлсэн диалог график (TGDGA) сүлжээ загварчлах гэсэн санал өгдөг. График өөрийгөө анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм нь хэлбэрийн мэдээллийн урсгалыг нэгтгэхэд, харилцааны хэлбэрээс илүү төвлөрүүлэхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь диалогыг илүү ойлгох боломжтой. Үүнээс гайхалтай сэдвийн үг боловсруулалт нь шийдвэрлэх процессийг тусалдаг. Бид SAMSum Corpus болон Automobile Master Corpus-ын загварыг үнэлдэг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь ихэнх суурь шугам дээр ажилладаг.', 'no': 'Nyleg har folk begynte å velja meir oppmerksomheten til oppgåva for abstraktiv dialogvindauge. Sidan informasjonsflyttane vert byttet mellom minst to interlocutorar og nøkkelelementa om ein viss hending ofte vert byttet over fleire uttrykk, er det nødvendig for forskere å utforska dei innhaldne forhold og strukturene i dialoginnhaldet. Den eksisterande tilnærminga kan imidlertid ofte handterast dialogen med rekkjefølgjande modeller, som er vanskeleg å henta langavstanden mellomsetjingsbehandlingar. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nettverk med temaordhjelpetekst (TGDGA) for å modellere dialogen som eit interaksjonsgraf etter emneformasjonen. Ein maskerte graf-selvmerkingsmekanismekanismekanismekanismen vert brukt for å integrera kryssetningsinformasjonsprøym og fokusera meir på dei relaterte uttalene, som gjer det bedre å forstå dialogen. I tillegg vert temaordfunksjonane introduserte for å hjelpa dekodingsprosessen. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt på SAMSum Corpus og Automobile Master Corpus. Eksperimentale resultatene viser at metoden vårt utfører dei fleste baselinjene.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන් අවස්ථාවක් සංවාදය සම්පූර්ණ වැඩකට වඩා අවධානය කරනවා. තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශය අඩුම අඩුම දෙකක් සහ සැකසුම් සඳහා සැකසුම් ගැන සැකසුම් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් වෙ නමුත්, වෙන්න තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථානය සමග සංවාදය සමග සංවාදය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා, ඒක ලොකු දුරක්ෂාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් අ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්-වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවාදය ග්\u200dරාෆ් අවධානය (TGDGA) ජාලයේ සංවාදය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි මුකුණු ග්\u200dරාෆ් ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරධානයක් ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරධානයක් භාවිත වෙනවා ක්\u200dරිස්ප්\u200dරධානයක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශය සම්බන තවත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නය වචන විශේෂ වචන විශේෂතාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඩිකොඩ් පරීක්ෂණයට උදව් කරන්න අපි SAMSum කෝර්පුස් සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය මාස්ටර් කොර්පුස් වල අපේ මොඩල් විශ්වාස කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නෙ අපේ විදිහට අධාර්ථ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ගොඩක්', 'so': 'Dhab ahaantii dadka waxay bilaabeen inay u dhegaystaan macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ay u dhegaystaan arrimaha diyaarinta ee aan la joojin karin. Sida darteed ubaxa macluumaadka waxaa loo bedelaa ugu yaraan labo macluumaad oo ku saabsan dhacdooyin cayiman, waxaa loo baahan yahay baaritaanka baaritaanka xiriirka dhexe iyo dhismaha ku qoran dialogka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, qaababka joogtada ah inta badan ayaa sameynaya dialogue ku saabsan tusaalooyin kala duduwan, kuwaas oo aad u adag in la qabsado xiriir aad u fog. Waxaan warqaddan ka soo jeedaynaa shabakad la hago Dialog Graph Attention (TGDGA) si a an u sameynno dialogue sida xaraf interaction oo macluumaad ku qoran. A masked graph self-attention mechanism is used to integrate cross-sentence information flows and focus more on the related utterances, which makes it better to understand the dialogue.  Sidoo kale waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa hadalka la xiriira in lagu caawiyo baaritaanka deynta. Tusaalka aan ku qiimeynaynaa Korpus SAMSum iyo Macallinka Korpus ee Automobile. resultinta imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayagu ay ka muuqato meelaha ugu badan.', 'sv': 'På senare tid har människor börjat ägna mer uppmärksamhet åt den abstrakta dialogsammanfattningsuppgiften. Eftersom informationsflödena utbyts mellan minst två samtalspartner och viktiga inslag om en viss händelse ofta spänner över flera yttranden, är det nödvändigt för forskare att utforska inneboende relationer och strukturer i dialoginnehållet. De befintliga tillvägagångssätten bearbetar dock ofta dialogen med sekvensbaserade modeller, som är svåra att fånga upp långa meningsrelationer. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi ett nätverk för ämnesord Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) för att modellera dialogen som en interaktionsgraf enligt ämnesordsinformation. En maskerad graf självuppmärksamhetsmekanism används för att integrera korsmeningsinformationsflöden och fokusera mer på relaterade uttalanden, vilket gör det bättre att förstå dialogen. Dessutom introduceras ämnesordsfunktioner för att underlätta avkodningsprocessen. Vi utvärderar vår modell på SAMSum Corpus och Automobile Master Corpus. De experimentella resultaten visar att vår metod överträffar de flesta av baslinjerna.', 'sr': 'Nedavno su ljudi počeli obraćati više pažnje na zadatak sažetanja apstraktivnog dijaloga. Budući da se informativni toki razmenjaju između najmanje dvije interlocutore i ključnih elementa o određenom događaju često šire preko višestrukih govora, potrebno je da istraživači istražuju inherentne odnose i strukture sadržaja dijaloga. Međutim, postojeći pristupi često procesiraju dijalog sa modelima baziranim na sekvenciji, koji su teško uhvatiti odnose međurečenicima iz daleke udaljenosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo mrežu o pozornosti grafika grafika (TGDGA) na tematske reči da modeliramo dijalog kao grafik interakcije prema informacijama o tematskoj reči. Maskirani grafički mehanizam samopouzdanja se koristi za integraciju toka informacija o krsnoj rečenici i fokusiranje više na povezane rečenice, što je bolje razumeti dijalog. Osim toga, karakteristike teme riječi uvedene su kako bi pomogli procesu dekodiranja. Procjenjujemo naš model SAMSum Corpus i Automobilni Master Corpus. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi većinu osnovnih linija.', 'ur': 'اچھے وقت، لوگوں نے اچھی طرح سے زیادہ توجه کی بات کرنا شروع کیا ہے. اس وجہ سے کہ معلومات کی جریان کم کم دو مخلوقات اور کئی عنصروں کے درمیان تغییر کی جاتی ہیں کہ ایک ایسے واقعہ کے بارے میں بہت سی کلمات میں پھیلائے جاتے ہیں، اس لئے تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے ضرورت ہے کہ دریافت کی اصلی رابطہ اور صحبت کی ساختیاں اچھی طرح لیکن موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہوتے ہیں کثرت وقت سطح پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے موڈل کے ساتھ دائیلوگ کی پردازی کرتی ہیں، جو طویل دور کی دور کی تعداد کے معاملہ میں مشکل ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک ٹیپ-لکھی ڈیلوگ گراف اظہارت (TGDGA) نیٹ ورک کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے تابع لکھی معلومات کے مطابق ایک اضطراری گراف کے طور پر ڈیلوگ کا نمادل کرنا۔ ایک ماسک گراف کی self-attention مکانیزی کروس-sentence معلومات فوجوں کو متصل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے اور ارتباط کے کلمات پر زیادہ تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے، اور یہ بات سمجھنے کے لئے بہتر ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، ٹیپٹ ویڈ ویٹیوں کو ڈیکڈ پرسس کی مدد کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم SAMSum Corpus اور Automobile Master Corpus پر ہماری مدل کا ارزش کرتے ہیں. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ بہت سی بنیادی لینوں سے کام لیتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், மக்கள் செயல்படாத உரையாடல் சுருக்கம் செய்யும் செயலை மேலும் கவனம் செலுத்த ஆரம்பிக்கிறார்கள். @ info இருக்கும் முன்னேற்றங்கள் பெரும்பாலும் பின்வரும் மாதிரிகளுடன் உரையாடலை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, அது தூரத்திற்கு இடைவெளி தொடர இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு தலைப்பு- வார்த்தை வழி காட்டப்பட்ட உரையாடல் வரைகலை கவனிப்பு (TGDGA) வலைப்பின்னலை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் தலைப்பு வார Name மேலும், தலைப்பு சொல்லின் குணங்கள் குறியீட்டு செயல்பாட்டை உதவுகிறது. நாங்கள் SAMSum கார்புஸ் மற்றும் தானாக்கியம் மாஸ்டர் கார்புஸ் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். சோதனை முடிவு', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik muloqat tahrirlash vazifasini qo'shishga qaramaydi. @ info Lekin, mavjud murakkablar ko'p paydo bo'lgan muloqat bilan muloqat bilan boshlaydi, bu soʻzning orasidan uzoq munosabatlarni qabul qilish juda qiyin. Bu hujjatda, biz mavzu mavzu mavzu maʼlumoti yordamida muloqat taʼminotini yaratish uchun mavzu muloqat taʼminoti sifatida foydalanish uchun mavzu muloqat taʼminlovchisi. Name Kodlash jarayonini yordam qilish uchun mavzu xossalari. Biz SAMSum Corpus va Avto- mobil boshqaruvchiga modelimizni qiymatimiz. Sinov natijalari esa bizning usuli ko'pchilik asboblarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Gần đây, mọi người bắt đầu chú ý nhiều hơn tới nhiệm vụ tổng kết cuộc đối thoại thu hút. Bởi vì các thông tin được trao đổi giữa ít nhất hai đối tác và các yếu tố chủ chốt về một sự kiện nhất định thường được trải qua nhiều lời phát biểu, nên các nhà nghiên cứu cần phải tìm hiểu nội dung và cấu trúc của nội dung cuộc đối thoại. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp hiện tại thường xử lý cuộc đối thoại với các mô hình lập trình, khó có thể nắm bắt được quan hệ liên kết lâu dài. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới đồ nội dung của các đối tượng truy tìm theo các từ điển (TGDG) để mô hình cuộc đối thoại như đồ thị giao tiếp theo các từ chủ đề thông. Một cơ chế được chú ý đồ đồ đồ đồ đồ đeo mặt được dùng để hoà nhập các dòng thông tin hình chữ thập và tập trung nhiều hơn vào những lời nói liên quan, điều đó làm cho cuộc đối thoại dễ hiểu hơn. Hơn nữa, các chức năng từ ngữ chủ đề được nhập để hỗ trợ quá trình giải mã. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi trên tập đoàn Sam Sum và Cơ đốc xe điện thoại. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội hầu hết các tầng hầm.', 'bg': 'Наскоро хората започнаха да обръщат повече внимание на абстрактната задача за обобщаване на диалога. Тъй като информационните потоци се обменят между поне двама събеседници и ключовите елементи за дадено събитие често са обхванати от множество изказвания, е необходимо изследователите да проучат присъщите отношения и структури на съдържанието на диалога. Съществуващите подходи обаче често обработват диалога с модели, базирани на последователност, които трудно улавят междуизреченията на дълги разстояния. В настоящата статия предлагаме мрежа Тема-дума за ръководен диалог Граф Внимание (ТГГА), която да моделира диалога като диаграма за взаимодействие според темата дума информация. Маскиран механизъм за самовнимание на графиката се използва за интегриране на информационните потоци между изреченията и фокусиране повече върху свързаните изказвания, което прави по-добре разбирането на диалога. Освен това, тематичните думи функции са въведени, за да подпомогне процеса на декодиране. Ние оценяваме нашия модел на корпуса и автомобилния майстор корпус. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни превъзхожда повечето базови линии.', 'da': 'For nylig er folk begyndt at være mere opmærksomme på den abstrakte dialog opsummering opgave. Da informationsstrømmene udveksles mellem mindst to samtalepartnere, og centrale elementer om en bestemt begivenhed ofte spænder over flere udtalelser, er det nødvendigt for forskerne at undersøge de iboende relationer og strukturer i dialogens indhold. De eksisterende tilgange behandler imidlertid ofte dialogen med sekvensbaserede modeller, som er svære at indfange langdistanceforhold mellem sætninger. I denne artikel foreslår vi et netværk af emneord Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) til at modellere dialogen som en interaktionsgraf i henhold til emneord information. En maskeret graf selvopmærksomhedsmekanisme bruges til at integrere tværsætnings informationsstrømme og fokusere mere på de relaterede udtalelser, hvilket gør det bedre at forstå dialogen. Desuden indføres emneordets funktioner for at hjælpe afkodningsprocessen. Vi evaluerer vores model på SAMSum Corpus og Automobile Master Corpus. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode overgår de fleste basislinjer.', 'nl': 'Sinds kort gaan mensen meer aandacht besteden aan de abstracte dialoogsamenvattingstaak. Aangezien de informatiestromen tussen ten minste twee gesprekspartners worden uitgewisseld en belangrijke elementen over een bepaalde gebeurtenis vaak over meerdere uitspraken zijn gespreid, is het noodzakelijk dat onderzoekers de inherente relaties en structuren van dialooginhoud onderzoeken. De bestaande benaderingen verwerken echter vaak de dialoog met sequentiemodellen, die moeilijk te vangen zijn op lange afstand relaties tussen zinnen. In dit artikel stellen we een Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) netwerk voor om de dialoog te modelleren als een interactiegrafiek volgens de topic word informatie. Een gemaskeerd grafiek zelfaandacht mechanisme wordt gebruikt om zinsoverschrijdende informatiestromen te integreren en zich meer te concentreren op de gerelateerde uitspraken, waardoor het beter wordt om de dialoog te begrijpen. Bovendien worden de onderwerpen woord functies geïntroduceerd om het decoderingsproces te ondersteunen. We evalueren ons model op het SAMSum Corpus en Automobile Master Corpus. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode de meeste basislijnen overtreft.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit haben die Menschen begonnen, der abstraktiven Zusammenfassungsaufgabe des Dialogs mehr Aufmerksamkeit zu schenken. Da die Informationsflüsse zwischen mindestens zwei Gesprächspartnern ausgetauscht werden und Schlüsselelemente zu einem bestimmten Ereignis oft über mehrere Äußerungen verteilt sind, ist es für Forscher notwendig, die inhärenten Zusammenhänge und Strukturen von Dialoginhalten zu erforschen. Die bestehenden Ansätze verarbeiten jedoch häufig den Dialog mit sequenzbasierten Modellen, die sich nur schwer über lange Distanzen zwischensätzliche Beziehungen erfassen lassen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein Topic-Word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) Netzwerk vor, um den Dialog als Interaktionsgraph entsprechend der Themenwortinformation zu modellieren. Ein maskierter Graph-Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus wird verwendet, um satzübergreifende Informationsflüsse zu integrieren und sich stärker auf die zugehörigen Äußerungen zu konzentrieren, wodurch es besser wird, den Dialog zu verstehen. Darüber hinaus wird das Thema Wortfeatures eingeführt, um den Dekodierungsprozess zu unterstützen. Wir evaluieren unser Modell am SAMSum Corpus und Automobile Master Corpus. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode die meisten Baselines übertrifft.', 'hr': 'Nedavno su ljudi počeli obraćati više pažnje na zadatak za sažetak apstraktivnog dijaloga. Budući da se informativni toki razmjenjuju između najmanje dvije interlocutore i ključnih elementa o određenom događaju često šire preko višestrukih izraza, potrebno je istraživačima istražiti inherentne odnose i strukture sadržaja dijaloga. Međutim, postojeći pristupi često obrađuju dijalog s modelima baziranim na sekvenciji, koji su teško uhvatiti odnose međurečenicima iz daleke udaljenosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo mrežu o pozornosti grafika grafika (TGDGA) s temskim riječima da modeliramo dijalog kao grafik interakcije u skladu s informacijama o temskim riječima. Maskirani grafički mehanizam samopouzdanja se koristi kako bi integrirali tokove informacija o krstorečenju i fokusirali se više na povezane riječi, što bi bolje razumijelo dijalog. Osim toga, predstavljaju se osobine teme riječi kako bi pomogli procesu dekodiranja. Procjenjujemo naš model SAMSum Corpus i Automobilni Master Corpus. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi većinu osnovnih linija.', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, orang-orang telah mulai memperhatikan tugas penglihatan dialog abstraktif. Karena aliran informasi ditukar antara sekurang-kurangnya dua interlokutor dan elemen kunci tentang peristiwa tertentu sering ditempatkan melalui berbilang ucapan, diperlukan para peneliti untuk mengeksplorasi hubungan dan struktur konten dialog. Namun, pendekatan yang ada sering memproses dialog dengan model berdasarkan urutan, yang sulit untuk menangkap hubungan antara kalimat jarak jauh. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan Perhatian Graf Dialog Dipandang (TGDGA) untuk model dialog sebagai grafik interaksi menurut informasi kata topik. Mekanisme perhatian diri grafik bertopeng digunakan untuk mengintegrasi aliran informasi kalimat-salib dan fokus lebih pada ucapan yang berhubungan, yang membuat lebih baik untuk memahami dialog. Moreover, the topic word features are introduced to assist the decoding process.  Kami mengevaluasi model kami pada SAMSum Corpus dan Automobile Master Corpus. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi kebanyakan garis dasar.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, watu wameanza kuangalia zaidi kuhusu jukumu la muhtasari wa mazungumzo yasiyo na maana. Kwa kuwa mafua ya taarifa yanabadilishwa kati ya wateja wawili wa ndani na vipengele muhimu kuhusu tukio fulani mara nyingi hupangwa katika lugha mbalimbali, ni muhimu kwa watafiti kutafuta mahusiano na miundombinu ya yaliyomo katika mazungumzo. Hata hivyo, mbinu zinazopo mara nyingi hufanya mazungumzo na mifano yenye msingi wa mfululizo, ambazo ni vigumu kupata mahusiano ya mbali ya hukumu. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mtandao wa Tamko la Dialogu inayoongozwa na maneno (TGDGA) ili kutengeneza mazungumzo kama picha ya mahusiano kwa mujibu wa taarifa za maneno. Mfumo wa kujitegemea wa picha unatumiwa kuunganisha maendeleo ya taarifa za kupitia hukumu na kujikita zaidi kwenye maneno yanayohusiana, ambayo inafanya vizuri kuelewa mazungumzo hayo. Zaidi ya hayo, mada hii imeanzishwa ili kusaidia mchakato wa uchunguzi. Tunatathmini mtindo wetu kwenye Corpus ya SAMSum na Mkuu wa Simu za Kifaransa. The experimental results show that our method outperforms most of the baselines.', 'fa': 'اخیراً مردم شروع به توجه بیشتری به وظیفه جمع کردن محاورۀ محاورۀ مصاحبه می کنند. از آنجا که جریان اطلاعات بین حداقل دو متصل کننده و عناصر کلید در مورد یک رویداد معین اغلب در کلمات چندین متصل می شوند، برای محققان نیاز است که رابطه\u200cها و ساختارهای متصل محتویات گفتگو را تحقیق کنند. با این حال، نزدیک\u200cهای موجود اغلب با مدل\u200cهای مرحله\u200cای که بر اساس مرحله\u200cهای مرحله\u200cی دور و فاصله\u200cای از جمله\u200cهای طولانی سخت است. در این کاغذ، ما یک شبکه با توجه به عنوان یک گراف توجه به عنوان یک گراف توجه به عنوان یک گراف توجه بر اساس اطلاعات کلمه موضوع را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. یک مکانیسم توجه خود را ماسک کرده برای تغییر جریان اطلاعات مختلف جمله و بیشتر روی کلمات ارتباط تمرکز می\u200cکند، که باعث می\u200cشود بهتر درک گفتگو باشد. علاوه بر این، ویژگی\u200cهای کلمه موضوع برای کمک به فرایند دکوندن معرفی می\u200cشوند. ما مدل خودمون رو در مورد کورپوس SAMSum و استاد اتوموبايل کورپوس ارزيابي ميکنيم نتیجه آزمایشی نشان می دهد که روش ما بیشتر خطوط پایین را انجام می دهد.', 'tr': 'Soňky wagtlar, adamlar abstraktiw dialogyň jemgyýetişligine köp üns berýärler. Bu maglumat aklanyşynyň iň azyndan iki golowçy we belli bir äpişgär hakynda esasy elementler arasynda köplenç bir gürrüň sözleri bilen baglanýandygyndan soňra, syýahçylaryň diýolg maglumatynyň daşary baglanyşyny we düzümlerini gözlemegi üçin gerekli. Ýöne bolan ýakynlaşyklar köplenç terjime tabanly modeller bilen dialogy proses edip otyrýarlar. Bu sözleriň arasynda uzak aralygy almak kyn. Bu kagyzda, tema sözlerine görä tertiblemek üçin bir tema kelime görkezilýän dialogy görkezip Maskeldirilen grafik özüne üns meýdançasyny çatlaşdyrmak üçin ullanýar we daşlyk sözlerine köp üns bermek üçin ullanýar, bu da dijalogy düşünmek üçin has gowy görýär. Mundan soňra, tema sözleri kodlemek prosesini kömek etmek üçin girişdirler. SAMSum Korpus we Otomatik Mazmunlar Korpusda modelimizi çözýäris Deneymeli netijeler biziň metodamyzyň esasy hatlaryň köpüsini çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 사람들은 추상적인 대화 요약 임무에 더욱 관심을 가지기 시작했다.정보 흐름은 적어도 두 명의 대화자 간에 교환되고 특정한 사건에 관한 관건적인 요소가 여러 개의 언어를 뛰어넘기 때문에 연구원들은 대화 내용의 내재적인 관계와 구조를 탐색할 필요가 있다.그러나 기존의 방법은 종종 서열을 바탕으로 하는 모델을 이용하여 대화를 처리하는데 이것은 장거리의 문장 간의 관계를 포착하기 어렵다.본고에서 우리는 주제어가 안내하는 대화도 주의(TGDGA) 네트워크를 제시했고 주제어 정보에 따라 대화를 상호작용도로 모델링했다.엄폐도 자기주의 메커니즘을 이용하여 크로스 문장 정보 흐름을 통합시켜 관련 언어에 더욱 집중시켜 대화를 잘 이해하도록 한다.이 밖에 주제어 특징을 도입하여 디코딩 과정을 보조했다.우리는 SAMsum 자료 라이브러리와 Automobile Master 자료 라이브러리에서 우리의 모델을 평가했다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 대부분의 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'am': 'በቅርቢቱ ዘመን ሰዎች አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ማኅበረሰቢያ አድራጊውን እየተጨነቁ ጀመሩ፡፡ የመረጃ አቀማመጥ በተለወጠ ጊዜ በሁለት የኢንተርኔት እና በቁልፍ አካላቢዎች መካከል በተለወጠ ጊዜ በብዙ ንግግር በተለየ ቁልፎች ይለወጥተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ብዙ ጊዜ በተጨማሪው ሥርዓት መካከል ግንኙነት ለመያዝ የሚችሉትን መስኮት በሥርዓት ተመሳሳይ እና ምሳሌዎችን በመስጠት ይችላሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጦማር ቃላት የመራቀሚያ መዝገብ መዝገብ ዝርዝር (TGDGA) መርበብ አካባቢ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የመስመር ግንኙነት የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን ለመቀነስ እና በተገኘው ንግግር ላይ አብዛኛውን ለመጠቀም የሚጠቅምበት የግንኙነት ቃላት እና በመስመር ማወቅ ይሻላል፡፡ Moreover, the topic word features are introduced to assist the decoding process.  በSAMS ኮርፓስ እና በራሜያል መምህር ቆርፓስ ላይ ሞዴላዎቻችንን እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ የሞከሩ ውጤቶች የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት ብዙውን መሳሪያ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'af': "Onlangs het mense begin meer aandag aan die abstraktiewe dialoog opsomming taak. Omdat die inligting vloei tussen ten minste twee interlocutors en sleutel elemente oor 'n sekere gebeurtenis dikwels deur veelvuldige uitspraak verbind word, is dit nodig vir ondersoekers om die inherende relasies en strukture van dialoog inhoud te uitsoek. Maar die bestaande toegang het dikwels die dialoog met volgorde-gebaseerde modele proses, wat is moeilik om lank-afstand inter-sentence relasies te vang. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n onderwerp- woord geduidde dialoog Dialoog Aangaande (TGDGA) netwerk om die dialoog as 'n interaksie graf te model volgens die onderwerp woord inligting. 'n Maskeerde graaf self-aandag mekanisme word gebruik om kruisseting inligting vloei te integreer en meer fokus op die verwante uitdrukkings, wat dit beter maak om die dialoog te verstaan. Verder word die onderwerp woord funksies ingestel om die dekoderproses te help. Ons evalueer ons model op die SAMSum Corpus en Automobile Master Corpus. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons metode meeste van die basilyne uitvoer.", 'hy': 'Վերջերս մարդիկ սկսում են ավելի շատ ուշադրություն դարձնել վերացական հաղորդակցման խնդրին: Քանի որ ինֆորմացիայի հոսքերը փոխանակվում են առնվազն երկու միջև և որոշ իրադարձությունների մասին գլխավոր տարրերի միջև հաճախ տարածվում են բազմաթիվ արտահայտություններով, հետազոտողների համար անհրաժեշտ է ուսումնասիրել երկխոսային պարունակությունների բնորոշ Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները հաճախ խմբավորում են հաջորդականությամբ հիմնված մոդելների հետ, որոնց դժվար է վերցնել երկար հեռավորությունների միջև նախադասությունների հարաբերությունները: In this paper, we propose a Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) network to model the dialogue as an interaction graph according to the topic word information.  Մաշված գծագրի ինքնաուշադրության մեխանիզմ օգտագործվում է ինտեգրելու միջնադասությունների տեղեկատվության հոսքերը և կենտրոնանալու ավելի շատ կապված արտահայտությունների վրա, ինչը դարձնում է ավելի լավ հասկանալ երկխոսությունը: Ավելին, բառի թեմային հատկությունները ներկայացվում են, որպեսզի օգնեն կոդավորման գործընթացին: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը ՍԱՄՍՕմ Կորպուսի և Ատոմոբյեյլ Մոստեր Կորպուսի վրա: The experimental results show that our method outperforms most of the baselines.', 'sq': "Kohët e fundit, njerëzit kanë filluar t'i kushtojnë më shumë vëmendje detyrës abstraktive të përmbledhjes së dialogut. Meqenëse rrjedhat e informacionit shkëmbejnë midis së paku dy interlokutuesve dhe elementeve kryesorë rreth një ngjarje të caktuar shpesh janë përhapur nëpër shprehje të shumta, është e nevojshme që kërkuesit të eksplorojnë marrëdhëniet dhe strukturat e brendshme të përmbajtjeve të dialogut. Megjithatë, qasjet ekzistuese shpesh procesojnë dialogun me modele të bazuara në sekuencë, të cilat janë të vështira për të kapur marrëdhëniet e distancës së gjatë ndër-fjalët. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një rrjet të vëmendjes së dialogut të udhëzuar me fjalë tematike (TGDGA) për të modeluar dialogun si një grafik ndërveprimi sipas informacionit të fjalës tematike. Një mekanizëm i maskuar i vetëvëmendjes së grafikut përdoret për të integruar rrjedhjet e informacionit ndër-fjalim dhe përqëndruar më shumë në shprehjet e lidhura, që e bën më të mirë të kuptohet dialogu. Moreover, the topic word features are introduced to assist the decoding process.  Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë në SAMSum Corpus dhe Automobile Master Corpus. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë kalon shumicën e linjave bazë.", 'bn': 'Recently, people have been beginning paying more attention to the abstractive dialogue summarization task.  যেহেতু তথ্য ফুল কমপক্ষে দুই ইন্টারনেক্টর এবং একটি নির্দিষ্ট অনুষ্ঠান সম্পর্কে মূল উপাদানের মধ্যে বিনিময় করা হয়েছে প্রায়শ বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় ব তবে বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি প্রায়শই সেকেন্স ভিত্তিক মডেলের সাথে ডায়ালগ প্রক্রিয়া করে, যা দীর্ঘ দূরবর্তী বাক্যের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক গ্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিষয়টির তথ্য অনুসারে ডায়ালগ গ্রাফ গ্রাফ মনোযোগ (টিজিডিজিএ) নেটওয়ার্কের প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে ডায়ালগ মডেল করার জন্য একটি ইন্টার্ একটি মুখোশিত গ্রাফ আত্মমনোযোগের মাধ্যম ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে ক্রাশের তথ্য প্রবাহিত করার জন্য এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষণের উপর আরো মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করে, যা  এছাড়াও, বিষয়টির বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রক্রিয়াকে সাহায্য করার জন্য চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে। আমরা সাম্প্যান কোর্পাস এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় মাস্টার কোর্পাসে আমাদের মডেল মূল্যায়ন করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বেশিরভাগ বেসেলাইনের কাজ করে।', 'ca': "Recentment, la gent ha començat a prestar més atenció a la tasca de resum del diàleg abstracte. Since the information flows are exchanged between at least two interlocutors and key elements about a certain event are often spanned across multiple utterances, it is necessary for researchers to explore the inherent relations and structures of dialogue contents.  No obstant això, els enfocaments existents sovint processen el diàleg amb models basats en seqüències, que són difícils de capturar relacions entre frases a llarga distància. En aquest article, proposem una xarxa d'atenció al gràfic de diàleg orientat (TGDGA) per a modelar el diàleg com a gràfic d'interacció segons la informació de la paraula del tema. A masked graph self-attention mechanism is used to integrate cross-sentence information flows and focus more on the related utterances, which makes it better to understand the dialogue.  A més, s'introdueixen les característiques de paraules temàtiques per ajudar el procés de decodificació. Evaluam el nostre model del SAMSum Corpus i Automobile Master Corpus. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode supera la majoria de les línies de base.", 'az': "Son zamanlarda insanlar abstraktiv dijalog toplama işinə daha çox dikkat edirlər. Malümat akışları ən azından iki istifadəçi və bəzi olaraq anahtar elementlərin arasında dəyişdirilməsindən sonra çoxlu sözlər arasında yayılır, araştırmacıların müxtəlif ilişkileri və diyal məzmunlarının quruluşlarını keşfetməsi lazımdır. Halbuki mövcuddur tərzlərin çox uzaq məsafələr arasındakı məsafələri almaq çətindir. Bu kağızda, məsələn söz məlumatlarına görə məlumat olaraq məlumat olaraq məlumatları məlumatları məlumatlarına görə məlumat sözlərini göstərmək üçün TGDGA şəklinə təklif edirik. Maskilə grafik özünün dikkatini məktəbinə çox cümləli məlumat akışlarını birləşdirmək üçün istifadə edilir və məlumat sözlərinə daha çox dikkatini daxil etmək üçün istifadə edir. Daha sonra, məsələn söz xüsusiyyətləri kodlama procesinə kömək etmək üçün tanındırılır. Bizim modelimizi SAMSum Corpus və Automobil Master Corpus'da değerlendiririk. Müxtəlif sonuçlar bizim metodumuzun ən çox səhifələri artırdığını göstərir.", 'cs': 'V poslední době se lidé začínají věnovat více pozornosti úkolu abstraktivního shrnutí dialogu. Vzhledem k tomu, že informační toky jsou vyměňovány mezi nejméně dvěma partnery a klíčové prvky o určité události jsou často rozšířeny napříč několika projevy, je nutné, aby výzkumníci prozkoumali inherentní vztahy a struktury obsahu dialogu. Stávající přístupy však často zpracovávají dialog s modely založenými na sekvenci, které jsou obtížné zachytit vztahy mezi větami na dálku. V tomto článku navrhujeme síť Téma-slovo Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) pro modelování dialogu jako interakčního grafu podle informací o tématu slova. Mechanismus sebepozornosti maskovaného grafu slouží k integraci informačních toků mezi větami a více zaměření se na související výroky, což umožňuje lépe porozumět dialogu. Kromě toho jsou představeny funkce tématu slova, které pomáhají dekódování procesu. Náš model hodnotíme na SAMSum Corpus a Automobile Master Corpus. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda překonává většinu základních linií.', 'bs': 'Nedavno su ljudi počeli obraćati više pažnje na zadatak sažetanja apstraktivnog dijaloga. Budući da se informativni toki razmjenjuju između najmanje dva interlocutora i ključnih elementa o određenom događaju često šire u višestrukim govorima, potrebno je da istraživači istražuju inherentne odnose i strukture sadržaja dijaloga. Međutim, postojeći pristupi često obrađuju dijalog s modelima baziranim na sekvenciji, koji su teško uhvatiti odnose međurečenice u dalekoj udaljenosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo mrežu o pozornosti grafika (TGDGA) na temičnim riječima da modeliramo dijalog kao grafik interakcije prema informacijama o temičnim riječima. Maskirani grafički mehanizam samopouzdanja se koristi za integraciju toka informacija o krsnom rečenicama i fokusiranje više na povezane rečenice, što je bolje razumjeti dijalog. Osim toga, karakteristike teme riječi su uvedene kako bi pomogli procesu dekodiranja. Procjenjujemo model SAMSum Corpus i Automobilni Master Corpus. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi većinu osnovnih linija.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina on alettu kiinnittää enemmän huomiota abstraktin dialogin yhteenvetotehtävään. Koska tietovirrat vaihtuvat vähintään kahden keskustelukumppanin kesken ja tietyn tapahtuman keskeiset elementit jakautuvat usein useaan lauseeseen, tutkijan on tutkittava dialogin sisällön luontaisia suhteita ja rakenteita. Nykyiset lähestymistavat kuitenkin usein käsittelevät vuoropuhelua sekvenssipohjaisilla malleilla, joita on vaikea kuvata lauseiden välisiä pitkän matkan suhteita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) -verkostoa, joka mallintaa dialogin vuorovaikutuskaaviona aiheen sanatiedon mukaan. Piilotettua graafista itsehuomiomekanismia käytetään yhdistämään lauseiden välisiä tietovirtoja ja keskittymään enemmän niihin liittyviin lauseisiin, mikä helpottaa vuoropuhelun ymmärtämistä. Lisäksi teemasanaominaisuuksia esitellään helpottamaan dekoodausprosessia. Arvioimme mallimme SAMSum Corpus- ja Automobile Master Corpus -malleilla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme suoriutuu paremmin kuin useimmat perusviivoista.', 'et': 'Hiljuti on inimesed hakanud pöörama rohkem tähelepanu abstraktsele dialoogi kokkuvõtlikule ülesandele. Kuna teabevood vahetatakse vähemalt kahe vestluspartneri vahel ja teatud sündmuse põhielemendid hõlmavad sageli mitut sõnavõttu, on teadlastel vaja uurida dialoogi sisu omaseid seoseid ja struktuure. Siiski töötlevad olemasolevad lähenemisviisid sageli dialoogi jadapõhiste mudelitega, mida on raske tabada lausevahelisi pikamaa suhteid. Käesolevas töös pakume välja teema-sõna juhendatud dialoogi graafiku tähelepanu (TGDGA) võrgustiku, et modelleerida dialoogi kui interaktsioonigraafiku vastavalt teema sõna informatsioonile. Maskeeritud graafiku enesetähelepanu mehhanismi kasutatakse lausetevaheliste infovoogude integreerimiseks ja sellega seotud väljenditele keskendumiseks, mis muudab dialoogi paremaks arusaamiseks. Lisaks tutvustatakse teemasõna funktsioone, et aidata dekodeerida protsessi. Hindame oma mudelit SAMSum Corpusel ja Automobile Master Corpusel. Katsetulemused näitavad, et meie meetod ületab enamiku lähtejooni.', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času ljudje več pozornosti posvečajo abstraktivni nalogi povzetka dialoga. Ker se tokovi informacij izmenjujejo med vsaj dvema sogovornikoma, ključni elementi določenega dogodka pa so pogosto razširjeni v več izjavah, je potrebno, da raziskovalci raziskujejo neločljive odnose in strukture vsebine dialoga. Vendar pa obstoječi pristopi pogosto obdelujejo dialog z modeli, ki temeljijo na zaporedju, ki jih je težko zajeti medstavki na dolgih razdaljah. V prispevku predlagamo mrežo Topic-word Guided Dialogue Graph Attention (TGDGA) za modeliranje dialoga kot interakcijskega grafa glede na informacije o tematski besedi. Za povezovanje informacijskih tokov v križnih stavkih in bolj osredotočanje na povezane izjave se uporablja mehanizem maskirane grafske samopozornosti, kar omogoča boljše razumevanje dialoga. Poleg tega so predstavljene značilnosti tematske besede, ki pomagajo pri procesu dekodiranja. Naš model ocenjujemo na SAMSum Corpus in Automobile Master Corpus. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda presega večino izhodišč.', 'ha': "Recently, people have been beginning paying more attention to the abstractive dialogue summarization task.  Dõmin an buɗe masu amfani da shirin information tsakanin lokalogi biyu da ƙanshi na maɓallin abubuwa game da wani abu na ƙayyade a bakin bayani-bayani masu yawa, don haka, ana buƙata wa watafiti su canza tsarin da ke cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayani. Kayya, da amfani da ake kai yana tafiyar da zauren akwatin bayani na daban-daban, wanda yana da nau'i dõmin ka kãma danganta masu tsawo mai nĩsa. Daga cikin wannan takardan, muna goyyade wani jerin Gãrogi na shiryarwa na Dialog (TGDGA) don mu motsa zauren akwatin bayanin akwatin bayani kamar shirin interaction da tsarin maganar maɓalli. An yi amfani da aminci na rufe jigon kansa don ya haɗa kowace masu motsi na cire-takarda kuma ya yi zura ido a kan ayukan da aka yi danganta, don ya kasa fahimta zauren akwatin bayanin. Fura, an introduce haske na maɓalli dõmin ya taimake cẽfen kodi. Kana ƙaddara misalinmu a kan Corbas na SAM da Maɓallin Hanyar Gabilka. Matarin jarrabai na nũna cewa metodenmu yana samar mafi yawansu.", 'jv': 'mudyane Dino sampek akeh informasi sing dipambanggo waenganggo sampek durung karo perusahaan karo perusahaan winih Nanging, sampeyan kang dianggap saiki dipepos dialog nganggo model sing basa sekondir, sing diranggawe nguasai kapan inter-kapan barang Nang mapun iki, kita mudhaya ngajar tema-word Gjenengan Dialog Attention (TIGNGI) netelg nganggo dialog nganggo gambar kelas perantah interaksi sing saboh kelas informasi temu. Una Masked Graf sing dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntukno model nyeneng sawar-sawar nang Samsum corpus karo automobil User corpus. Rejalaké sing paling apik bukane dadi, nik awak dhéwé iso nggawe barang pancen.', 'he': 'לאחרונה, אנשים התחילו לשים יותר תשומת לב למשימת המסכם המסוגרת של הדיולוג. מאחר שזרימי המידע מתחלפים בין לפחות שני אינטרלוקוטורים ואלימנטים מפתחיים בנוגע לאירוע מסוים הם לעתים קרובות נרחבים בין מילים רבים, זה הכרחי עבור מחקרים לחקור את מערכות היחסים והמבנים הנכונים של תוכן דיאלוג. בכל אופן, גישות קיימות לעתים קרובות מעבדות את הדיולוג עם דוגמנים מבוססים על רצף, שקשה לתפוס יחסים בין משפטים במרחק ארוך. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים רשת תשומת לב לדיולוג מודרכת (TGDGA) כדי לדוגמא את הדיולוג כגרף אינטראקציה לפי מידע מילה הנושא. מנגנון תשומת לב עצמית של גרף מסוכן משתמש בכדי לשלוט זרימות מידע בין משפטים ולהתמקד יותר על המילים הקשורים, מה שעושה את זה יותר טוב להבין את הדיולוג. חוץ מזה, מילים הנושא מוצגים כדי לסייע לתהליך הפענוח. אנחנו מעריכים את המודל שלנו על SAMSum Corpus ואטומוביל Master Corpus. The experimental results show that our method outperforms most of the baselines.', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གིས་འཕགས་རིས་མི་མཐོང་བའི་ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་མང་ཙམ་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་འདྲེན་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཉུང་མཐའ་ནས་མཐུད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གཉིས་དང་གཙོ་རིམ་དག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཤས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མང་ཙམ་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡུལ་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་རིམ། In this paper, we propose a Topic-word Guided Dialog Graph Attention (TGDGA) network to model the dialog as an interaction graph according to the topic word information. A masked graph self-attention mechanism is used to integrate cross-sentence information flows and focus more on the related utterances, which makes it better to understand the dialog. ད་དུང་། གནད་དོན་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་ཆ་རྣམས་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་གི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་རོགས ང་ཚོས་SAMSum Corpus དང་རང་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གནད་སྡུད་དག་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་རྨས་གཞི་ཆེ་ཤོས་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': 'Recent Neural Methods on Slot Filling and Intent Classification for Task-Oriented Dialogue Systems : A Survey', 'ar': 'الأساليب العصبية الحديثة لملء الفتحات وتصنيف النية لأنظمة الحوار الموجهة نحو المهام: مسح', 'es': 'Métodos neuronales recientes sobre el llenado de espacios y la clasificación de intenciones para sistemas de diálogo orientados a tareas: una encuesta', 'fr': 'Méthodes neuronales récentes sur le remplissage des créneaux et la classification des intentions pour les systèmes de dialogue orientés tâches\xa0: une enquête', 'pt': 'Métodos neurais recentes sobre preenchimento de slots e classificação de intenção para sistemas de diálogo orientado a tarefas: uma pesquisa', 'ja': 'タスク指向対話システムのスロット充填と意図分類に関する最近のニューラルメソッド：調査', 'hi': 'कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए स्लॉट भरने और इरादा वर्गीकरण पर हाल के तंत्रिका तरीके: एक सर्वेक्षण', 'zh': '向事对话系统槽填充意图分类最新神经法:勘', 'ru': 'Недавние нейронные методы заполнения щелей и классификации намерений для ориентированных на задачи диалоговых систем: обследование', 'ga': 'Modhanna Néaracha le Déanaí ar Líonadh Sliotán agus Aicmiú Intinne do Chórais Agallaimh atá Dírithe ar Thasc: Suirbhé', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Legutóbbi neurális módszerek a rések kitöltésére és a feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerek szándékos osztályozására: felmérés', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες Νευρικές Μεθόδους για την πλήρωση αυλακώσεων και την ταξινόμηση προθέσεων για συστήματα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένα στην εργασία: Μια έρευνα', 'it': 'Recenti metodi neurali sul riempimento delle fessure e classificazione di intenti per sistemi di dialogo orientati alle attività: un sondaggio', 'kk': 'Слотты толтыру және тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог жүйелерінің ең жаңа невралдық әдістері: A Survey', 'lt': 'Naujausi su užduotimis susijusių dialogo sistemų neurologiniai laiko užpildymo ir ketinimo klasifikavimo metodai: apklausa', 'mk': 'Recent Neural Methods on Slot Filling and Intent Classification for Task-Oriented Dialogue Systems: A Survey', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Metodi Newrali reċenti dwar il-Mili tas-Slots u l-Klassifikazzjoni Intentiva għal Sistemi ta’ Djalogu Orientati lejn ix-Xogħol: Stħarriġ', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റംകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അടുത്തുള്ള സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ക്ലാസ', 'mn': 'Слот дүүрэн болон зориулсан диалог системийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн арга зам:', 'no': 'Nyleg neirale metodar på slotfilting og intensiv klassifikasjon for oppgåveorienterte dialogsystemer: Ein undersøking', 'pl': 'Najnowsze metody neuronalne wypełniania slotów i klasyfikacja intencji dla systemów dialogu zorientowanego na zadania: badanie', 'ro': 'Metode neurale recente privind umplerea sloturilor și clasificarea intențională a sistemelor de dialog orientate spre sarcini: un sondaj', 'sr': 'Недавни неврални методи за напълнение слота и интересну класификацију за системе диалога ориентиране на задачи: Обследване', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isticmaalka diyaarinta shaqada ee ugu dhowaad ah ee ku buuxinta saxda iyo baaritaanka gudaha ah:', 'sv': 'Senaste neurala metoder för fyllning av kortplatser och avsiktsklassificering för uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystem: En undersökning', 'ta': 'செயல் திருத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு சமீபத்தில் சாளரத்தை நிரப்பும் மற்றும் உள்ளார்ந்த வகைப்படுத்தல் முறைமை', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Qidirish', 'vi': 'Các biện pháp thần kinh gần đây về tỷ lệ đệm đĩa và định cấp cho hệ thống đối thoại hướng dẫn nhiệm vụ: A Survey.', 'bg': 'Последни неврални методи за запълване на слотове и класификация на намеренията за системи за диалог, ориентирани към задачите: проучване', 'nl': 'Recente neurale methoden voor het vullen van slots en intentieclassificatie voor taakgerichte dialoogsystemen: een enquête', 'hr': 'Nedavni neuronski metodi za ispunjavanje slota i intenzivnu klasifikaciju sustava dijaloga s orijentiranim zadacima: istraživanje', 'id': 'Metode Neural Baru-Baru pada Penisi Slot dan Klasifikasi Intentional untuk Sistem Dialog Berorientasi Tugas: A Survey', 'de': 'Neueste neuronale Methoden zur Slot-Füllung und Intent-Klassifizierung für aufgabenorientierte Dialogsysteme: Ein Überblick', 'ko': '임무를 위한 대화 시스템에서 틈새 충전과 의도 분류의 최신 신경 방법에 대한 종합 서술', 'da': 'Seneste neurale metoder til fyldning af pladser og hensigtsklassificering for opgaveorienterede dialogsystemer: En undersøgelse', 'sw': 'Tamko za hivi karibuni juu ya Jalala la Kujaza na Usalama wa Intaneti kwa Mfumo wa Dialogu ya Kazi: Tafiti', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای عصبی اخیرا در سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ مشخص\u200cشده\u200cی مطالعه\u200cهای پر کردن Slot و کلاس\u200cسازی عمده\u200cای: یک تحقیق', 'af': 'Nuwe Neurale Metodes op Slot Opvulling en Intent Klassifikasie vir Opdrag- Orienteerde Dialoog Stelsels: A Survey', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'sq': 'Metodat e fundit neuronale mbi mbushjen e intervaleve dhe klasifikimin me qëllim për sistemet e dialogut të orientuar në detyra: A Survey', 'az': 'Yax캼nl캼q doldurulma v톛 캻stiqam톛t Dialoog Sisteml톛rinin son N칬ral Metodolar캼: A Survey', 'bs': 'Nedavni Neuralni metodi za ispunjavanje slota i intenzivnu klasifikaciju za sisteme dijaloga s orijentacijom zadataka: istraživanje', 'bn': 'স্লোট ফোল্ডার এবং ইন্টেন্ট ক্লাসিকেশনের সম্প্রতি নিউরেল মাধ্যম: একটি জরিপ', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler: A Survey', 'hy': 'A Survey', 'cs': 'Nedávné neuronové metody výplnění slotů a klasifikace záměru pro úlohově orientované dialogové systémy: průzkum', 'et': 'Hiljutised neuraalsed meetodid teenindusaegade täitmise ja ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemide kavatsuste klassifitseerimise kohta: uuring', 'fi': 'Ty철paikkojen t채ytt철채 ja teht채v채l채ht철isten vuoropuheluj채rjestelmien aikomusten luokittelua koskevat viimeaikaiset hermomenetelm채t: A Survey', 'ca': "Métodes neuronals recents sobre el rellenç d'intervals i la classificació d'intenció dels sistemes de diàleg orientats a les tasques: Una encuesta", 'he': 'שיטות נוירוליות לאחרונה על מילוי תאריכים וקlassifikaציה בכוונה למערכות שיחות דיאלוג מסורות למשימות: A Survey', 'jv': 'tab-style', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Nedavne nevralne metode za polnjenje rež in klasifikacijo namenov za sisteme dialoga, usmerjene v naloge: raziskava', 'bo': 'Recent Neural Methods on Slot Filling and Intent Classification for Task-Oriented Dialogue Systems: A Survey'}
{'en': 'In recent years, fostered by deep learning technologies and by the high demand for conversational AI, various approaches have been proposed that address the capacity to elicit and understand user’s needs in task-oriented dialogue systems. We focus on two core tasks, slot filling (SF) and intent classification (IC), and survey how neural based models have rapidly evolved to address natural language understanding in dialogue systems. We introduce three neural architectures : independent models, which model SF and IC separately, joint models, which exploit the mutual benefit of the two tasks simultaneously, and transfer learning models, that scale the model to new domains. We discuss the current state of the research in SF and IC, and highlight challenges that still require attention.', 'ar': 'في السنوات الأخيرة ، وبدعم من تقنيات التعلم العميق وبسبب الطلب المتزايد على الذكاء الاصطناعي للمحادثة ، تم اقتراح العديد من الأساليب التي تعالج القدرة على استنباط وفهم احتياجات المستخدم في أنظمة الحوار الموجهة نحو المهام. نحن نركز على مهمتين أساسيتين ، ملء الفتحات (SF) وتصنيف النية (IC) ، ومسح كيف تطورت النماذج القائمة على العصبية بسرعة لمعالجة فهم اللغة الطبيعية في أنظمة الحوار. نقدم ثلاث بنيات عصبية: النماذج المستقلة ، التي تشكل نموذجًا لـ SF و IC بشكل منفصل ، ونماذج مشتركة ، تستغل المنفعة المتبادلة للمهمتين في وقت واحد ، وتنقل نماذج التعلم ، التي تعمل على توسيع نطاق النموذج إلى مجالات جديدة. نناقش الوضع الحالي للبحث في SF و IC ، ونسلط الضوء على التحديات التي لا تزال تتطلب الاهتمام.', 'es': 'En los últimos años, fomentados por las tecnologías de aprendizaje profundo y por la gran demanda de IA conversacional, se han propuesto varios enfoques que abordan la capacidad de provocar y comprender las necesidades de los usuarios en los sistemas de diálogo orientados a tareas. Nos centramos en dos tareas principales, el llenado de espacios (SF) y la clasificación de intenciones (CI), y analizamos cómo los modelos basados en neuronas han evolucionado rápidamente para abordar la comprensión del lenguaje natural en los sistemas de diálogo. Presentamos tres arquitecturas neuronales: modelos independientes, que modelan SF e IC por separado, modelos conjuntos, que explotan el beneficio mutuo de las dos tareas simultáneamente, y modelos de aprendizaje de transferencia, que escalan el modelo a nuevos dominios. Discutimos el estado actual de la investigación en SF e IC, y destacamos los desafíos que aún requieren atención.', 'fr': "Au cours des dernières années, favorisées par les technologies d'apprentissage profond et par la forte demande d'IA conversationnelle, diverses approches ont été proposées pour répondre à la capacité d'obtenir et de comprendre les besoins des utilisateurs dans les systèmes de dialogue orientés tâches. Nous nous concentrons sur deux tâches principales, le remplissage des créneaux (SF) et la classification des intentions (IC), et étudions comment les modèles neuronaux ont rapidement évolué pour aborder la compréhension du langage naturel dans les systèmes de dialogue. Nous introduisons trois architectures neuronales\xa0: des modèles indépendants, qui modélisent le SF et le CI séparément, des modèles conjoints, qui exploitent simultanément les avantages mutuels des deux tâches, et des modèles d'apprentissage de transfert, qui adaptent le modèle à de nouveaux domaines. Nous discutons de l'état actuel de la recherche en SF et IC, et soulignons les défis qui nécessitent encore une attention particulière.", 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, fomentadas por tecnologias de aprendizado profundo e pela alta demanda por IA conversacional, várias abordagens foram propostas que abordam a capacidade de eliciar e entender as necessidades do usuário em sistemas de diálogo orientados a tarefas. Nós nos concentramos em duas tarefas principais, preenchimento de slot (SF) e classificação de intenção (IC), e pesquisamos como os modelos baseados em neurônios evoluíram rapidamente para abordar a compreensão da linguagem natural em sistemas de diálogo. Apresentamos três arquiteturas neurais: modelos independentes, que modelam SF e IC separadamente, modelos conjuntos, que exploram o benefício mútuo das duas tarefas simultaneamente, e modelos de transferência de aprendizado, que dimensionam o modelo para novos domínios. Discutimos o estado atual da pesquisa em FS e CI e destacamos desafios que ainda requerem atenção.', 'ja': '近年，ディープラーニング技術と会話型AIの需要の高さによって，タスク指向の対話システムでユーザーのニーズを引き出し理解する能力に対処するための様々なアプローチが提案されている。私たちは、スロット充填（ SF ）とインテント分類（ IC ）の2つのコアタスクに焦点を当て、ニューラルベースのモデルが対話システムの自然言語理解にどのように迅速に進化したかを調査します。SFとICを別々にモデル化する独立モデル、2つのタスクの相互利益を同時に利用する共同モデル、モデルを新しいドメインにスケーリングする学習モデルの3つのニューラルアーキテクチャを導入します。SFとICの研究の現状について議論し、まだ注意が必要な課題を強調しています。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में, गहरी सीखने की प्रौद्योगिकियों द्वारा और संवादी एआई की उच्च मांग द्वारा बढ़ावा दिया गया है, विभिन्न दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं जो कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणालियों में उपयोगकर्ता की जरूरतों को प्राप्त करने और समझने की क्षमता को संबोधित करते हैं। हम दो मुख्य कार्यों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, स्लॉट भरने (एसएफ) और इरादा वर्गीकरण (आईसी), और सर्वेक्षण करते हैं कि संवाद प्रणालियों में प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ को संबोधित करने के लिए तंत्रिका आधारित मॉडल तेजी से कैसे विकसित हुए हैं। हम तीन तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर पेश करते हैं: स्वतंत्र मॉडल, जो एसएफ और आईसी को अलग-अलग मॉडल करते हैं, संयुक्त मॉडल, जो एक साथ दो कार्यों के पारस्परिक लाभ का शोषण करते हैं, और सीखने के मॉडल को स्थानांतरित करते हैं, जो मॉडल को नए डोमेन में स्केल करते हैं। हम एसएफ और आईसी में अनुसंधान की वर्तमान स्थिति पर चर्चा करते हैं, और उन चुनौतियों को उजागर करते हैं जिन पर अभी भी ध्यान देने की आवश्यकता है।', 'zh': '近年以来,推术对会话AI之高者,已陈其方术以解用户求之力矣。 注两心之任,插槽充(SF)意之(IC),察神经之形势,以决自然语言解。 引入三神经架构:独立,建模于SF、IC,合之于两互利,及其迁学,广于新域。 论SF与IC,犹须挑战。', 'ru': 'В последние годы, опираясь на технологии глубокого обучения и высокий спрос на разговорный ИИ, были предложены различные подходы, которые учитывают способность выявлять и понимать потребности пользователей в системах целенаправленного диалога. Мы фокусируемся на двух основных задачах, заполнении слотов (SF) и классификации намерений (IC), и исследуем, как нейронные модели быстро эволюционировали для решения естественного понимания языка в диалоговых системах. Мы вводим три нейронные архитектуры: независимые модели, которые моделируют SF и IC отдельно, совместные модели, которые используют взаимную выгоду двух задач одновременно, и модели обучения, которые масштабируют модель на новые области. Мы обсуждаем текущее состояние исследований в SF и IC, и выделяем проблемы, которые все еще требуют внимания.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, arna chothú ag teicneolaíochtaí domhainfhoghlama agus ag an éileamh ard ar AI comhrá, tá cineálacha cur chuige éagsúla molta a thugann aghaidh ar an gcumas riachtanais úsáideoirí a fháil agus a thuiscint i gcórais idirphlé tasc-dhírithe. Dírímid ar dhá thasc lárnacha, líonadh sliotán (SF) agus aicmiú rún (IC), agus déanaimid suirbhé ar an gcaoi a bhfuil samhlacha néarbhunaithe tar éis teacht chun cinn go tapa chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar thuiscint teanga nádúrtha i gcórais idirphlé. Tugaimid isteach trí ailtireacht néaracha: samhlacha neamhspleácha, a mhúnlaíonn SF agus IC ar leithligh, samhlacha comhpháirteacha, a bhaineann leas as comhleas an dá thasc ag an am céanna, agus a aistríonn samhlacha foghlama, a scálaíonn an tsamhail go fearainn nua. Pléimid staid reatha an taighde in SF agus IC, agus leagaimid béim ar dhúshláin a dteastaíonn aird fós orthu.', 'ka': 'ბოლო წლის შემდეგ, ძალიან სწავლის ტექნოლოგიებით და კონტრაციოლური AI-ის მეტი შესაძლებლობით, განსხვავებული შესაძლებლობები იყენება, რომ საკუთარი შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობა გადასწავლა და გა ჩვენ ორი მნიშვნელოვანი დავალებისთვის კონუქტურებთ, სიტყვების დაყენებას (SF) და მინდომის კლასიფიკაციას (IC) და შევხედავთ თუ როგორ ნეიროლური დაბათი მოდელები ძალიან განვითა ჩვენ სამი ნეიროლური აქტიქტიკურები ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ: საკუთარი მოდელები, რომელიც სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მოდელები, რომელიც ერთადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ განსხვავებთ მიმდინარე სტრიქონის და IC-ის განსხვავებას, და განსხვავებთ განსხვავებები, რომლებიც უნდა დააჭიროთ გონიერება.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, που προωθούνται από τις τεχνολογίες βαθιάς μάθησης και από την υψηλή ζήτηση για νοητική νοημοσύνη συνομιλίας, έχουν προταθεί διάφορες προσεγγίσεις που καλύπτουν την ικανότητα εξεύρεσης και κατανόησης των αναγκών των χρηστών σε συστήματα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένα στα καθήκοντα. Εστιάζουμε σε δύο βασικές εργασίες, την πλήρωση αυλακώσεων (ΣΦ) και την ταξινόμηση προθέσεων (ΣΔ), και ερευνούμε πώς τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα έχουν εξελιχθεί γρήγορα για να αντιμετωπίσουν την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας στα συστήματα διαλόγου. Παρουσιάζουμε τρεις νευρωνικές αρχιτεκτονικές: ανεξάρτητα μοντέλα, τα οποία μοντελοποιούν χωριστά SF και IC, κοινά μοντέλα, τα οποία εκμεταλλεύονται ταυτόχρονα το αμοιβαίο όφελος των δύο εργασιών και μεταφέρουν μοντέλα μάθησης, που κλιμακώνουν το μοντέλο σε νέους τομείς. Συζητούμε την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της έρευνας σε SF και IC, και επισημαίνουμε προκλήσεις που εξακολουθούν να απαιτούν προσοχή.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni, favoriti dalle tecnologie di deep learning e dall'elevata domanda di intelligenza artificiale conversazionale, sono stati proposti diversi approcci che affrontano la capacità di suscitare e comprendere le esigenze degli utenti nei sistemi di dialogo orientati alle attività. Ci concentriamo su due compiti fondamentali, il riempimento degli slot (SF) e la classificazione degli intenti (IC), e analizziamo come i modelli basati su neurali si siano rapidamente evoluti per affrontare la comprensione del linguaggio naturale nei sistemi di dialogo. Introdurremo tre architetture neurali: modelli indipendenti, che modellano SF e IC separatamente, modelli congiunti, che sfruttano il reciproco beneficio dei due compiti contemporaneamente, e trasferire modelli di apprendimento, che scala il modello a nuovi domini. Discutiamo lo stato attuale della ricerca in SF e IC, e evidenziamo sfide che richiedono ancora attenzione.", 'lt': "In recent years, fostered by deep learning technologies and by the high demand for conversational AI, various approaches have been proposed that address the capacity to elicit and understand user's needs in task-oriented dialogue systems.  Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame dviem pagrindinėms užduotims: laiko tarpsnių užpildymui (SF) ir ketinimų klasifikacijai (IC) ir apklausiame, kaip greitai vystėsi neurologiniai modeliai, kad dialogo sistemose būtų sprendžiamas natūralaus kalbos supratimo klausimas. Įdiegiame tris neurologines architektūras: nepriklausomus modelius, kurie modeliuoja atskirai SF ir IC, bendrus modelius, kurie tuo pačiu metu naudoja abipusę abiejų užduočių naudą, ir perkelia mokymosi modelius, kurie model į apima naujas sritis. We discuss the current state of the research in SF and IC, and highlight challenges that still require attention.", 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдар бойынша, түсінікті оқу технологиялары және қатынасыз AI үшін жоғары талап көмектеседі, тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог жүйелерінде пайдаланушының қажеттігін түсініп, түсінікті көме Біз екі негізгі тапсырма, слотты толтыру (SF) және мақсатты классификациясы (IC) және невралдық негізгі моделдердің диалог жүйелерінде тәуелді тілді түсініктемелерді қалай тез өзгертілг Біз үш невралдық архитектураларды таңдаймыз: тәуелсіз үлгілер, SF және IC үлгілері бөлек, біріктірілген үлгілер, екі тапсырманың біріктірімінің пайдалануын және оқыту үлгілерін алу үлгілерін жаңа до Біз SF және IC зерттеулердің қазіргі күйінде талқылап, әлі қазіргі қызықтығын талап ететін мәселелерді таңдап көрдік.', 'ms': 'Selama bertahun-tahun terakhir, didorong oleh teknologi belajar dalam dan permintaan tinggi untuk AI perbualan, pelbagai pendekatan telah diusulkan yang mengatasi kapasitas untuk mengakibatkan dan memahami keperluan pengguna dalam sistem dialog bertujuan tugas. Kami fokus pada dua tugas utama, penuhian slot (SF) dan klasifikasi niat (IC), dan periksa bagaimana model berasaskan saraf telah berevolusi dengan cepat untuk mengatasi pemahaman bahasa alam dalam sistem dialog. Kami memperkenalkan tiga arkitektur saraf: model independen, yang model SF dan IC secara terpisah, model kongsi, yang mengeksploitasi keuntungan bersama-sama dua tugas secara bersamaan, dan memindahkan model belajar, yang skalakan model ke domain baru. Kami membincangkan keadaan penyelidikan semasa dalam SF dan IC, dan menyatakan cabaran yang masih memerlukan perhatian.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത കൊല്ലങ്ങളില്\u200d, ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ആവശ്യം കൊണ്ടും, സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന് ഉയര We focus on two core tasks, slot filling (SF) and intent classification (IC), and survey how neural based models have rapidly evolved to address natural language understanding in dialogue systems.  സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ മോഡല്\u200d എസ്എഫിനെയും ഐസിയെയും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും മൂന്ന് പുതിയ ജോലികളുടെ പരസ്പര ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പഠിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകങ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എസ്എഫിലെയും ഐസിയിലെയും നിലവിലെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയെക്കുറിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. ശ്രദ്ധ ആവശ്', 'mk': 'Во последниве години, поттикнати од технологиите за длабоко учење и од високата побарувачка за конверзационални ВИ, се предложени различни пристапи кои се однесуваат на капацитетот за предизвикање и разбирање на потребите на корисникот во системите на дијалог ориентирани на задач Ние се фокусираме на две основни задачи, исполнување на слотови (SF) и класификација на намерите (IC), и истражуваме како нервните модели брзо еволуираа за решавање на природното разбирање на јазикот во дијалошките системи. Ние воведуваме три нервни архитектури: независни модели, кои модели SF и IC одделно, заеднички модели, кои ја искористуваат взаемната корист од двете задачи истовремено, и трансферираат модели на учење, кои го скалираат моделот на нови домени. Разговараме за сегашната состојба на истражувањето во СФ и ИК и ги истакнуваме предизвиците кои сé уште бараат внимание.', 'mt': 'F’dawn l-aħħar snin, imħeġġa minn teknoloġiji ta’ tagħlim profond u mid-domanda għolja għal AI konverżjonali, ġew proposti diversi approċċi li jindirizzaw il-kapaċità li joħolqu u jifhmu l-ħtiġijiet tal-utent f’sistemi ta’ djalogu orjentati lejn ix-xogħol. Aħna niffokaw fuq żewġ kompiti ewlenin, il-mili tas-slots (SF) u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-intenzjoni (IC), u nistħarrġu kif mudelli bbażati fuq in-newrali evolvew malajr biex jindirizzaw il-fehim tal-lingwa naturali fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu. Aħna nintroduċu tliet arkitetturi newrali: mudelli indipendenti, li jimmudellaw SF u IC separatament, mudelli konġunti, li jisfruttaw il-benefiċċju reċiproku taż-żewġ kompiti simultanjament, u jittrasferixxu mudelli ta’ tagħlim, li jkabbru l-mudell għal dominji ġodda. Aħna niddiskutu l-istat attwali tar-riċerka fl-SF u l-IC, u ninfasizzaw l-isfidi li għadhom jeħtieġu attenzjoni.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években a mélytanulási technológiák és a beszélgető mesterséges intelligencia iránti nagy igény támogatásával különböző megközelítéseket javasoltak, amelyek a feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerekben a felhasználók igényeinek kiváltására és megértésére irányuló képességgel foglalkoznak. Két alapvető feladatra összpontosítunk, a slot filling (SF) és a szándék osztályozására (IC), és felmérjük, hogy az idegi modellek hogyan fejlődtek gyorsan a természetes nyelv megértésére a párbeszédrendszerekben. Három neurális architektúrát vezetünk be: független modelleket, amelyek külön modellezik SF és IC modelleket, közös modelleket, amelyek egyidejűleg kihasználják a két feladat kölcsönös előnyeit, valamint olyan tanulási modelleket, amelyek új területekre skálázzák a modellt. Megvitatjuk az SF és IC kutatásainak jelenlegi állapotát, és kiemeljük azokat a kihívásokat, amelyek még mindig figyelmet igényelnek.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд, гүн гүнзгий суралцах технологиуд болон ярилцлагын AI-ын хүсэлтэй өндөр хүсэлтээр дэмжигдсэн олон арга зам нь ажлын талаар ярилцлагын системд хэрэглэгчдийн хэрэгцээг боловсруулж, ойлгох боломжтой байдлыг Бид хоёр үндсэн ажил, слотын дүүргэх (SF) болон зорилготой хуваалцаа (IC) дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж, мэдрэлийн суурь загварууд ярианы системд байгалийн хэл ойлголтыг хэрхэн хурдан хөгжүүлсэн бэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Бид 3 мэдрэлийн архитектуруудыг танилцуулж байна: хамааралтай загвар, SF болон IC загварын загвар, холбоотой загваруудын хоорондын ашиг ашиглаж, суралцах загваруудыг шинэ загвар руу шилжүүлдэг. Бид СФ болон ИК-ын судалгааны орчин үеийн тухай ярьж, анхаарал шаардлагатай сорилтуудыг тодорхойлдог.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, încurajate de tehnologiile de învățare profundă și de cererea ridicată de IA conversațională, au fost propuse diverse abordări care abordează capacitatea de a provoca și de a înțelege nevoile utilizatorilor în sistemele de dialog orientate spre sarcini. Ne concentrăm pe două sarcini de bază, umplerea sloturilor (SF) și clasificarea intențiilor (IC), și analizăm modul în care modelele bazate pe neuroni au evoluat rapid pentru a aborda înțelegerea limbajului natural în sistemele de dialog. Introducem trei arhitecturi neurale: modele independente, care modelează SF și IC separat, modele comune, care exploatează beneficiul reciproc al celor două sarcini simultan și transferă modele de învățare, care scalează modelul la noi domenii. Discutăm starea actuală a cercetării în SF și IC și evidențiem provocările care necesită încă atenție.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach, wspierane przez technologie głębokiego uczenia i duże zapotrzebowanie na sztuczną inteligencję konwersacyjną, zaproponowano różne podejścia, które uwzględniają zdolność do wywoływania i zrozumienia potrzeb użytkowników w systemach dialogu zorientowanego na zadania. Skupiamy się na dwóch podstawowych zadaniach, wypełnianiu slotów (SF) i klasyfikacji intencji (IC), oraz badamy, w jaki sposób modele neuronowe szybko ewoluowały, aby zająć się zrozumieniem języka naturalnego w systemach dialogu. Wprowadzamy trzy architektury neuronowe: niezależne modele, które modelują SF i IC oddzielnie, wspólne modele, które wykorzystują wzajemne korzyści z dwóch zadań jednocześnie, oraz modele uczenia się, które skalują model do nowych dziedzin. Omawiamy aktualny stan badań w zakresie SF i IC oraz podkreślamy wyzwania, które nadal wymagają uwagi.', 'no': 'I læringsteknologiar i læringstidspunktet i læringstidspunktet i læringstidspunktet og den høge etterspørselen for konvertasjonale AI har blitt foreslått forskjellige tilnærmingar for å adressa kapasiteten til å elisitera og forstå brukaren trenga i oppgåveorienterte dialogsystemet. Vi fokuserer på to kjerneoppgåver, plassfiltering (SF) og utforming av klassifikasjon (IC) og undersøker korleis neuralbaserte modeller har raskt utvikla for å handtera naturspråk-forståelse i dialogsystemet. Vi introduserer tre neuralarkitekturar: uavhengige modeller, som modeller SF og IC separately, joint modeller, som eksploderer dei to oppgåva samtidig, og overfører læringsmodeller, som skalerer modellen til nye domene. Vi diskuterer gjeldande tilstand til forskningen i SF og IC, og markerer utfordringar som fortsatt krev oppmerksomhet.', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu dambeeyey, waxaa la soo jeeday qaabab kala duduwan oo ku saabsan awoodda koritaanka iyo garashada u baahan isticmaalaha nidaamka diyaarinta shaqada. Waxaan ku kalsoonaynaa laba shaqooyin oo asal ah, jadwalka buuxinta (SF) iyo fasalka si qasab ah (IC), waxaana baaraynaa siduu u bedelay qaababka neurada si dhaqso ah si aan ugu hadalno garashada afka dabiicadda ee nidaamka dialogka. We introduce three neural architectures: independent models, which model SF and IC separately, joint models, which exploit the mutual benefit of the two tasks simultaneously, and transfer learning models, that scale the model to new domains.  Waxaannu kala sheekeynaynaa xaaladda baaritaanka ee joogta ah ee SF iyo IC, waxaynu soo bandhigaynaa dhibaatooyin ay weli u baahan yihiin inay digtoonaato.', 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har olika tillvägagångssätt föreslagits som syftar till att stimulera och förstå användarnas behov i uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystem. Vi fokuserar på två kärnuppgifter, kortfyllning (SF) och avsiktsklassificering (IC), och undersöker hur neuralbaserade modeller snabbt har utvecklats för att hantera förståelsen av naturligt språk i dialogsystem. Vi introducerar tre neurala arkitekturer: oberoende modeller, som modellerar SF och IC separat, gemensamma modeller, som utnyttjar den ömsesidiga nyttan av de två uppgifterna samtidigt, och överför inlärningsmodeller, som skalar modellen till nya domäner. Vi diskuterar det aktuella läget för forskningen inom SF och IC och lyfter fram utmaningar som fortfarande kräver uppmärksamhet.', 'sr': 'Za poslednje godine, podržavane tehnologijama dubokog učenja i visokim zahtevom za razgovorni AI, predloženo je različite pristupe da se obrađuju kapacitetu da se izvuče i razume potrebe korisnika u sistemima dijaloga na cilju zadataka. Fokusiramo se na dva temeljna zadatka, ispunjavanje slota i klasifikaciju namjera (IC), i istražujemo kako su neurološki modeli brzo evoluirali kako bi se obratili prirodno razumevanje jezika u dijalogskim sistemima. Predstavljamo tri neuralne arhitekture: nezavisni modeli, koji su modeli SF i IC odvojeni, zajednički modeli, koji iskorištavaju zajedničku korist dva zadatka istovremeno, i prebacuju modele učenja, koji između modela na nove domene. Razgovaramo o trenutnom stanju istraživanja u SF i IC-u, i oslanjamo izazove koje još uvek zahtevaju pažnju.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුද්දේවල්, ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න තාක්ෂණිකාවල් සහ වාර්තාවික AI ගැන උන් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට, වෙනස් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා  අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩක් දෙකක්, ස්ලෝට් පුරවන්න (SF) සහ අදහස් විශ්වාසය (IC) සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද න්\u200dයුරල් අධාරිත මොඩේල්  අපි න්\u200dයුරෝල් ස්ථාපනය තුන්දෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා: ස්වයංගත මොඩේල්, මොඩේල් SF සහ IC වෙනුවෙන්, සම්බන්ධ මොඩේල්, සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් වැඩ දෙ අපි SF සහ IC වල පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරස්තූත ස්ථානය කතා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අවධානය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න තාමත් අවශ්\u200dය අ', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், ஆழமான கற்றல் தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் வளர்ச்சி மற்றும் பேச்சு AI க்கு உயர்ந்த த தேவையால், பல முறைகள் திருந்திக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பணிமுறைப்படுத்தி உர நாம் இரண்டு மூல செயல்கள், செருகுவாய் நிரப்பப்பட்டுள்ளது (SF) மற்றும் நோக்கி வகுப்பு (IC) மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். பாதுகாப்பு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள நாம் மூன்று புதிய புள்ளியியல் உருவாக்கங்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம்: சுதந்திரமான மாதிரிகள், அது SF மற்றும் IC தனியாக மாதிரியும், இணைய மாதிரிகள், அது இரண்டு பணிகளின் தனி நாம் SF மற்றும் IC-ல் தற்போதைய ஆய்வு நிலையைப் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்து, இன்னும் கவனம் தேவை', 'ur': 'اگلوں سالوں میں، عمیق تعلیم تکنولوژی کے ذریعہ اور مکالمانی AI کے لئے بہت زیادہ درخواست کے ذریعہ، مختلف طریقے کی پیشنهاد کی گئی ہیں کہ کارساز کی ضرورت کو استعمال کرنے اور سمجھنے کے لئے استعمال کرنے کے لئے استعمال کریں. ہم دو core tasks، slot filling (SF) اور intent classification (IC) پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں، اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ نیورال بنیاد مدل کس طرح طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے سریع تکامل کی گئی ہے۔ ہم تین نئورل معماری معماری پیش کریں گے: سفارشی موڈل، جو ماڈل SF اور IC مختلف ہیں، جولنٹ موڈل، جو دو کاموں کے ایک دوسرے فائدہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور یادگاری موڈل کو انتقال کرتا ہے، جو مدل کو نئی ڈومین کی طرف ماڈل کرتا ہے. ہم نے SF اور IC میں تحقیقات کی موجود موقع کی موجود موقعیت کی بحث کی، اور اچھی چالوں کو ہلاک کریں جو اب بھی توجه کی ضرورت رکھتے ہیں.', 'uz': "In recent years, fostered by deep learning technologies and by the high demand for conversational AI, various approaches have been proposed that address the capacity to elicit and understand user's needs in task-oriented dialogue systems.  Biz ikkita miya vazifalarni, slot (SF) to ʻldirish va darajalashtirish (IC) bilan foydalanamiz va muloqat tizimlarida qanday neyron asosiy modellari tez o'zgarishga tez tarqatish mumkin. Biz uchta neyrolik arxituvlarini anglatamiz: shaxsiy modellar, SF va IC modeli alohida, bir nechta modellar, bu ikkita vazifalarning ikkita vazifalarning bir xil foydalanishini bir xil foydalanadi, va ta'lim modellarini o'rganish modellarini o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu modelni yangi domenega qarang. Biz SF va IC'dagi taʼminlovchi holatini javob beramiz va hamma paytlar kerak bo'lgan muammolarni ko'rsatumiz.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, được thúc đẩy bởi các công nghệ học s âu và nhờ lượng lớn nhu cầu về AI đối thoại, đã có những phương pháp khác nhau được đề xuất để thu hút và hiểu nhu cầu của người dùng trong các hệ thống đối thoại hướng nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi tập trung vào hai nhiệm vụ cốt lõi, lấp lỗ hổng (SF) và phân loại mục đích (IC) và khảo sát cách các mô hình dựa vào thần kinh đã tiến hóa nhanh chóng để giải quyết hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong hệ thống đối thoại. Chúng tôi giới thiệu ba kiến trúc thần kinh: các mô hình độc lập, mô hình SF và IC riêng, các mô hình ghép đôi, sử dụng lợi ích lẫn nhau của hai công việc đồng thời, và chuyển các mô hình học, áp dụng mô hình thành những miền mới. Chúng ta thảo luận về tình hình hiện thời của nghiên cứu ở SF và IC, và nhấn mạnh những thử thách vẫn cần phải chú ý.', 'bg': 'През последните години, насърчавани от технологиите за дълбоко обучение и от голямото търсене на разговорен изкуствен интелект, бяха предложени различни подходи, които адресират капацитета за предизвикване и разбиране на потребностите на потребителите в системите за диалог, ориентирани към задачите. Фокусираме се върху две основни задачи, запълване на слотове (СФ) и класификация на намеренията (ИК), и изследваме как невронно базираните модели бързо са еволюирали, за да се справят с разбирането на естествения език в диалоговите системи. Представяме три невронни архитектури: независими модели, които моделират отделно СФ и ИК, съвместни модели, които експлоатират взаимната полза от двете задачи едновременно, и трансферни модели на обучение, които мащабират модела до нови области. Обсъждаме текущото състояние на изследванията в СФ и ИК и подчертаваме предизвикателствата, които все още изискват внимание.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren zijn verschillende benaderingen voorgesteld die gericht zijn op het vermogen om de behoeften van gebruikers in taakgerichte dialoogsystemen te ontlokken en te begrijpen, gestimuleerd door deep learning technologieën en de grote vraag naar conversationele AI. We richten ons op twee kerntaken, slot filling (SF) en intent classification (IC), en onderzoeken hoe neurale modellen snel zijn geëvolueerd om het begrip van natuurlijke taal in dialoogsystemen aan te pakken. We introduceren drie neurale architecturen: onafhankelijke modellen, die SF en IC afzonderlijk modelleren, gezamenlijke modellen, die het wederzijdse voordeel van de twee taken tegelijkertijd benutten, en overdragen leermodellen, die het model schalen naar nieuwe domeinen. We bespreken de huidige stand van het onderzoek in SF en IC en belichten uitdagingen die nog aandacht vragen.', 'hr': 'Za posljednje godine, podržavane dubokim tehnologijama učenja i visokim zahtjevima za razgovorni AI-om, predloženo je različite pristupe kako bi se rješavalo kapacitet ispunjavanja i razumijevanja potreba korisnika u sustavima dijaloga usmjerenim na zadatke. Fokusiramo se na dva temeljna zadatka, ispunjavanje slota (SF) i klasifikaciju namjera (IC), i istražujemo kako su se modeli na neuralnom temelju brzo razvili kako bi se riješili prirodno razumijevanje jezika u dijalogskim sustavima. Predstavljamo tri neuralne arhitekture: nezavisni modeli, koji su modeli SF i IC odvojeni, zajednički modeli, koji koriste zajedničku korist dva zadatka istovremeno i prebacuju modele učenja, koji šire model na nove domene. Razgovaramo o trenutnom stanju istraživanja u SF-u i IC-u i istaknemo izazove koje još uvijek zahtijevaju pažnju.', 'da': 'I de seneste år er der blevet foreslået forskellige tilgange, der tager højde for kapaciteten til at fremkalde og forstå brugernes behov i opgaveorienterede dialogsystemer, fremmet af deep learning teknologier og den høje efterspørgsel efter conversational AI. Vi fokuserer på to kerneopgaver, slot filling (SF) og intent klassifikation (IC), og undersøger, hvordan neurale baserede modeller hurtigt har udviklet sig til at håndtere naturlig sprogforståelse i dialogsystemer. Vi introducerer tre neurale arkitekturer: uafhængige modeller, der modellerer SF og IC separat, fælles modeller, der udnytter den gensidige fordel af de to opgaver samtidigt, og overfører læringsmodeller, der skalerer modellen til nye domæner. Vi diskuterer den aktuelle tilstand for forskningen i SF og IC og fremhæver udfordringer, der stadig kræver opmærksomhed.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 깊이 있는 학습 기술과 대화 인공지능에 대한 높은 수요의 추진 아래 사람들은 임무를 대상으로 하는 대화 시스템에서 사용자의 수요를 자극하고 이해하는 능력을 해결하기 위해 각종 방법을 제시했다.우리는 두 가지 핵심 임무인 실시간 틈새 충전(SF)과 의도 분류(IC)를 주목하고 신경 기반 모델이 어떻게 대화 시스템의 자연 언어 이해를 해결하기 위해 신속하게 진화했는지 조사한다.우리는 세 가지 신경 구조를 소개했다. 그것이 바로 SF와 IC 모델링의 독립 모델, 두 가지 임무를 동시에 이용하는 호혜적인 연합 모델, 그리고 모델을 새로운 영역으로 확장하는 전이 학습 모델이다.우리는 SF와 IC의 연구 현황을 토론하고 여전히 주목해야 할 도전을 강조했다.', 'id': 'Selama bertahun-tahun terakhir, didorong oleh teknologi belajar dalam dan permintaan tinggi untuk AI konversasi, berbagai pendekatan telah diusulkan yang mengatasi kapasitas untuk mengakibatkan dan memahami kebutuhan pengguna dalam sistem dialog orientasi tugas. Kami fokus pada dua tugas utama, penuhian slot (SF) dan klasifikasi niat (IC), dan penyelidikan bagaimana model berbasis saraf telah berevolusi dengan cepat untuk mengatasi pemahaman bahasa alam dalam sistem dialog. Kami memperkenalkan tiga arsitektur saraf: model independen, yang model SF dan IC secara terpisah, model kongsi, yang mengeksploitasi keuntungan bersama dari dua tugas secara bersamaan, dan memindahkan model belajar, yang skala model ke domain baru. Kami mendiskusikan keadaan penelitian saat ini di SF dan IC, dan menyatakan tantangan yang masih membutuhkan perhatian.', 'tr': 'Soňky ýyllar içinde, derin öwrenme tehnologiýalary we taryşma AI üçin ýokary islegi tarapyndan gelinýän, birnäçe golaýlary gören işe görkezilýän dijalog sistemlerinde ukyplary çözmek we düşünmek üçin ukyplaryň çözmesini teklip edildi. Biz iki esasy zada, slot dolduran (SF) we maksady klasifikasynda (IC) konsantre edýäris we nähili nähili nähili neutral modelleriň diniň sistemlerinde tebigy dil düşünmesini çözmek üçin ýüze gelişmişdir. Biz üç näral arhitekturmalaryny tanyşdyrýarys: seresap nusgalar, bu nusgalar SF we IC nusgalarynyň ayrı-ayrı, birleşik nusgalarynyň bu iki zadyň hemişe bir ýerini ulanýar we öwrenme nusgalaryny terjime edip, nusgalaryny täze alana ölçekleýär. SF we IC araşdyrmalaryň häzirki durumyny we heniz üns gerek kynçylygy ýagtylaşdyryp bilen gürrüň edýäris.', 'fa': 'در سالهای اخیر، توسط تکنولوژی های عمیق یادگیری و نیازی بالا برای AI مکالمه، روش های مختلف پیشنهاد شده است که توانایی برای استفاده کردن و بفهمید نیازهای کاربر در سیستم\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cهای راهنمایی به وظیفه\u200cی کار. ما روی دو کار مرکزی تمرکز می کنیم، پر کردن slot (SF) و گروه\u200cبندی هدف (IC) و تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که چگونه مدل\u200cهای بنیاد عصبی به سرعت تغییر داده شده\u200cاند تا درک زبان طبیعی در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو را دریافت کند. ما سه معماری عصبی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم: مدل مستقل، که مدل SF و IC جدا، مدل\u200cهای مشترک، که سود مشترک دو کار را در همزمان استفاده می\u200cکند، و مدل یادگیری را انتقال می\u200cدهد، که مدل را به دامنهای جدید مقیاس می\u200cکند. ما در مورد وضعیت فعلی تحقیقات در SF و IC صحبت می کنیم، و چالش هایی را که هنوز به توجه نیاز دارند روشن می کنیم.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren wurden verschiedene Ansätze vorgeschlagen, die durch Deep Learning-Technologien und die hohe Nachfrage nach konversativer KI gefördert werden, um die Bedürfnisse der Nutzer in aufgabenorientierten Dialogsystemen zu erkennen und zu verstehen. Wir konzentrieren uns auf zwei Kernaufgaben, Slot Filling (SF) und Intent Classification (IC), und untersuchen, wie neuronale Modelle sich schnell entwickelt haben, um das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache in Dialogsystemen zu adressieren. Wir stellen drei neuronale Architekturen vor: unabhängige Modelle, die SF und IC getrennt modellieren, gemeinsame Modelle, die den gegenseitigen Nutzen der beiden Aufgaben gleichzeitig ausnutzen, und Lernmodelle, die das Modell auf neue Domänen skalieren. Wir diskutieren den aktuellen Stand der Forschung in SF und IC und beleuchten Herausforderungen, die noch Aufmerksamkeit erfordern.', 'sw': 'Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, iliyoanzishwa na teknolojia ya kujifunza kwa kina na kwa mahitaji makubwa ya UKI ya mazungumzo, mbinu mbalimbali zimependekezwa kuwa huzungumzia uwezo wa kuonyesha na kuelewa mahitaji ya watumiaji katika mfumo wa mazungumzo yanayoelekea kazi. Tunakatiza kazi mbili za msingi, mistari inayojaza lugha za asili (SF) na kutazama namna mifano yenye msingi wa kiserikali yameendelea kwa haraka ili kuzungumzia uelewa wa lugha ya asili katika mfumo wa mazungumzo. Tunawasilisha majengo matatu ya neurali: mifano huru, ambayo ni mifano ya SF na IC tofauti, mifano ya pamoja, ambayo hutumia faida ya kibiashara ya kazi hizo mbili kwa wakati mmoja, na kuhamisha mifano ya kujifunza, ambayo inafanana kwa mifano ya ndani mpya. Tunajadili hali ya sasa ya utafiti katika SF na IC, na tunaonyesha changamoto ambazo bado zinahitaji kusikiliza.', 'am': 'ባለፈው ዓመታት፣ የጥልቅ ትምህርት ቴክኖጂ እና የአ.আই-ን በሚያስተማርበት ከፍተኛ ጥያቄ፣ የተጠቃሚውን የሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እና የሥርዓት ማቀናኘት የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች በሥርዓት ስርዓት ስርዓት ውስጥ ለመግለጥ እና ለማስተዋል የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች ተዘጋ በሁለት የሆድ አድራጊዎች፣ ስሎት (SF) እና መፍጠር (IC) እና የጠቅላላ ምሳሌዎችን እንዴት ፈጥኖ እንደተለወጠ ለመስኮት ቋንቋዎች ማስተዋል እንዴት እንደተለወጠ እናንጠይቃለን፡፡ We introduce three neural architectures: independent models, which model SF and IC separately, joint models, which exploit the mutual benefit of the two tasks simultaneously, and transfer learning models, that scale the model to new domains.  የአሁኑን ትምህርት ሁኔታ በSF እና IC እናስነጋግራለን፣ እና አሁንም የሚያስጨንቁትን ጥያቄዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': 'Son illərdə, derin öyrənmə teknolojilərindən və müzakirçi AI-nin yüksək talebi ilə təşkil edilmişdir. Müxtəlif təsirlər təşkil edilmişdir ki, istifadəçilərin istifadəçilərinin istifadəçilik sistemlərində istifadə etmək və çəkinmək üçün istifadəçilərin ehtiyaçlarını çəkmək və Biz iki temel iş, slot doldurulması və niyyətli klasifikasiya (IC) üzərində odaklanırıq və nürol modellərin necə təbii olaraq dəyişiklik sistemlərində təbii dil anlayışını çəkmək üçün necə dəyişiklik gəldiyini gözləyirik. Biz üç nöral arhitektarları təşkil edirik: bağımsız modellər, SF və IC modelləri ayrı-ayrı, birləşdirilmiş modelləri təşkil edir, bu iki işin bir-birinin faydasını istifadə edir, öyrənmə modellərini yeni domenalara təşkil edir. SF və IC araştırmalarının şimdiki durumunu mübahisə edirik və hələ də gözləmə ehtiyacı olan çətinlikləri işıqlandırırıq.', 'af': 'In onlangse jaar het versterk deur diep leer teknologies en deur die hoë versoek vir gesprekslys AI, verskeie toegange is voorgestel dat die kapasiteit om gebruiker se behoeftes te verlos en verstaan in die taak orienteerde dialoog stelsels te adres. Ons fokus op twee kjerne taak, slot opvulling (SF) en doel klasifikasie (IC) en ondersoek hoe neurale gebaseerde modele vinnig gewikkel het om natuurlike taal verstanding in dialoog stelsels te adres. Ons introduseer drie neurale arkitekturke: Onafhanklike modele, wat model SF en IC skiedens, saamste modele, wat die gemeenskaplike voordeel van die twee taak saamstig uitgebruik, en onderwerp onderwerp modele, wat die model na nuwe domeine skaleer. Ons bespreek die huidige staat van die ondersoek in SF en IC en verlig uitdagings wat nog aandag nodig het.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে গভীর শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি এবং আলোচনার চাহিদার দ্বারা বিভিন্ন উপায় প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে যে কাজের দিকে ব্যবহারকারীর প্রয়োজন বুঝতে এবং বুঝ We focus on two core tasks, slot filling (SF) and intent classification (IC), and survey how neural based models have rapidly evolved to address natural language understanding in dialogue systems.  আমরা তিনটি নিউরেল প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি: স্বাধীন মডেল, যার মডেল এসএফ এবং আইসিসি আলাদা, যৌথ মডেল, যারা এই দুটি কাজের মধ্যে সাধারণ সুবিধা ব্যবহার করে এবং শ আমরা এসএফ এবং আইসিকে গবেষণার বর্তমান অবস্থা নিয়ে আলোচনা করছি এবং এখনও মনোযোগ প্রয়োজনীয় চ্যালেঞ্জ তুলে ধরি।', 'hy': "Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում, խրախուսելով խորը ուսումնասիրության տեխնոլոգիաների և խոսակցական ԱԲ-ի բարձր պահանջի միջոցով, առաջարկել են տարբեր մոտեցումներ, որոնք լուծեն օգտագործողների կարիքները առաջացնելու և հասկանալու ունակությունը խնդիրների վրա Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք երկու հիմնական առաջադրանքների վրա, վայրերի լրացումների (SF) և նպատակային դասակարգումների վրա, և հետազոտում ենք, թե ինչպես են նյարդային հիմնված մոդելները արագ զարգացել, որպեսզի հաղթահարեն բնական լեզվի Մենք ներկայացնում ենք երեք նյարդային ճարտարապետություն' անկախ մոդելներ, որոնք առանձին SF և IQ մոդելներ են, միասին մոդելներ, որոնք միաժամանակ օգտագործում են երկու խնդիրների փոխադարձ շահույթը, և փոխանցում են ուսուցման մոդելներ, որոնք մոդելը ըն Մենք քննարկում ենք ՍՖ և ԻԿ ուսումնասիրության ներկայիս վիճակը և նշենք մարտահրավերները, որոնք դեռ ուշադրություն են պահանջում:", 'sq': "In recent years, fostered by deep learning technologies and by the high demand for conversational AI, various approaches have been proposed that address the capacity to elicit and understand user's needs in task-oriented dialogue systems.  We focus on two core tasks, slot filling (SF) and intent classification (IC), and survey how neural based models have rapidly evolved to address natural language understanding in dialogue systems.  Ne futim tre arkitektura neuronale: modele të pavarur, të cilat modelin SF dhe IC veçanërisht, modele të përbashkëta, që shfrytëzojnë përfitimin e ndërsjelltë të dy detyrave në të njëjtën kohë, dhe transferojnë modele mësimi, që shkallojnë modelin në fusha të reja. Ne diskutojmë gjendjen aktuale të kërkimit në SF dhe IC dhe theksojmë sfidat që ende kërkojnë vëmendje.", 'cs': 'V posledních letech, podporovaných technologiemi hlubokého učení a vysokou poptávkou po konverzační umělé inteligenci, byly navrženy různé přístupy, které řeší schopnost vyvolávat a porozumět potřebám uživatelů v dialogových systémech orientovaných na úkoly. Zaměřujeme se na dva základní úkoly, slot filling (SF) a intent classification (IC) a zkoumáme, jak se neuronové modely rychle vyvíjely tak, aby řešily porozumění přirozenému jazyku v dialogových systémech. Představujeme tři neuronové architektury: nezávislé modely, které modelují SF a IC odděleně, společné modely, které využívají vzájemného přínosu obou úkolů současně a přenášejí učební modely, které model škálí do nových domén. Diskutujeme současný stav výzkumu v oblasti SF a IC a upozorňujeme na výzvy, které stále vyžadují pozornost.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel, mida toetavad sügavõppe tehnoloogiad ja suur nõudlus vestlusliku tehisintellekti järele, on pakutud välja erinevad lähenemisviisid, mis käsitlevad suutlikkust tekitada ja mõista kasutajate vajadusi ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemides. Me keskendume kahele põhiülesandele, pesade täitmisele (SF) ja kavatsuste klassifikatsioonile (IC), ning uurime, kuidas närvipõhised mudelid on kiiresti arenenud, et käsitleda loodusliku keele mõistmist dialoogisüsteemides. Tutvustame kolme neuroarhitektuuri: sõltumatud mudelid, mis modelleerivad SF ja IC eraldi, ühismudelid, mis kasutavad ära kahe ülesande vastastikust kasu samaaegselt, ja ülekandemudelid, mis skaleerivad mudelit uutesse valdkondadesse. Arutame SF ja IC uuringute hetkeseisu ning toome esile probleeme, mis vajavad veel tähelepanu.', 'ca': "En els últims anys, impulsats per tecnologies d'aprenentatge profund i la gran demanda d'AI conversacional, s'han proposat diversos enfocaments que abordin la capacitat d'aixecar i entendre les necessitats dels usuaris en sistemes de diàleg orientats a les tasques. Ens centrem en dues tasques principals, el rellenç de slots (SF) i la classificació d'intencions (IC), i estudiem com els models basats en neurones han evolucionat ràpidament per abordar la comprensió natural del llenguatge en els sistemes de diàleg. Introduïm tres arquitectures neuronals: models independents, que modelen SF i IC separadament, models conjunts, que expliquen el benefici mútuo de les dues tasques simultàneament, i transfereixen models d'aprenentatge, que escalen el model a nous dominis. Discutem sobre l'estat actual de la recerca en SF i IC i destaquem els reptes que encara necessiten atenció.", 'fi': 'Viime vuosina syväoppimisen teknologioiden ja keskustelevan tekoälyn suuren kysynnän kannustamana on ehdotettu erilaisia lähestymistapoja, jotka käsittelevät kykyä saada ja ymmärtää käyttäjien tarpeita tehtävälähtöisissä vuoropuhelujärjestelmissä. Keskitymme kahteen ydintehtävään, slot filling (SF) ja intent classification (IC), ja tutkimme, miten neuropohjaiset mallit ovat nopeasti kehittyneet käsittelemään luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämistä dialogijärjestelmissä. Esittelemme kolme neuroarkkitehtuuria: itsenäiset mallit, jotka mallintavat SF:tä ja IC:tä erikseen, yhteiset mallit, jotka hyödyntävät molempien tehtävien keskinäistä hyötyä samanaikaisesti, ja siirtooppimismallit, jotka skaalaavat mallia uusille toimialoille. Keskustelemme SF:n ja IC:n tutkimuksen nykytilasta ja korostamme haasteita, jotka vaativat vielä huomiota.', 'bs': 'Za poslednje godine, podržavane tehnologijama dubokog učenja i visokim zahtjevima za razgovorni AI, predloženo je različite pristupe da se obraćaju kapacitetu za ispunjavanje i razumijevanje potreba korisnika u sistemima dijaloga na cilju zadataka. Fokusiramo se na dva temeljna zadatka, ispunjavanje slota i klasifikaciju namjera (IC), i istražujemo kako su se neurološki modeli brzo razvili kako bi se riješili prirodno razumijevanje jezika u dijalogskim sistemima. Predstavljamo tri neuralne arhitekture: nezavisni modeli, koji su modeli SF i IC odvojeni, zajednički modeli, koji koriste zajedničku korist dva zadatka istovremeno, i prebacuju modele učenja, koji šire model na nove domene. Razgovaramo o trenutnom stanju istraživanja u SF i IC-u, i oslanjamo izazove koje još uvijek zahtijevaju pažnju.', 'ha': "A cikin shekara na farko, an ƙarfafa mafunzo na masu kwaɗayi wa masu karanta technical da kuma a buƙata da hayan da ake yi wa AI, an buƙata wasu hanyoyin dabam-daban wanda ke nuna abincin da za'a fahimta da hajan mai amfani da shi a cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayanin da ke shirya. Tuna kiyãye taskõkin biyu masu ƙaranci, filin slot (SF) da shirin rabo (IC), kuma Mu juya yadda misãlai masu bincike na neura suka buɗe kwamfyutan don su yi magana ga fahimta masu cikin zauren zauren akwatin bayanin zauren akwatin bayani. Tuna ƙara kayan aikin neura uku: misãlai masu da ba'a daidaita, masu motsi na SF da IC, da ɗayan, misãlai masu haɗi, wanda ke amfani da amfani da ɗayan amfani ga wannan aikin biyu sami biyu, da kuma za'a shige misãlai da za'a sami, wanda ke kamata misalin su zuwa sauri. Munã jãyayya hali da ke yanzu a cikin Shirin da ake cikin SF da IC, kuma tuna haske masu kanzu da muhimmada wanda kake so.", 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih, ki jih spodbujajo tehnologije globokega učenja in veliko povpraševanje po pogovorni umetni inteligenci, so bili predlagani različni pristopi, ki obravnavajo sposobnost spodbujanja in razumevanja potreb uporabnikov v sistemih dialoga, usmerjenih v naloge. Osredotočamo se na dve ključni nalogi, polnjenje rež (SF) in klasifikacijo namenov (IC), ter raziskujemo, kako so se nevronski modeli hitro razvili za obravnavanje razumevanja naravnega jezika v dialognih sistemih. Predstavljamo tri nevronske arhitekture: neodvisne modele, ki posebej modelirajo SF in IC, skupne modele, ki hkrati izkoriščajo obojestransko korist obeh nalog, in prenosne modele učenja, ki model razširijo na nove domene. Razpravljamo o trenutnem stanju raziskav SF in IC ter izpostavljamo izzive, ki še vedno zahtevajo pozornost.', 'jv': 'Jagad sing dibutun, nglanggar sampeyan karo teknêlogi sing luwih ingkang nggawe AI conversationbar Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem iki dadi nggawe barang, slot filling (sF) lan nggunakaé klawisalasi (CI), lan ujaran piye soko model sing basa Neral kuwi nggawe nguasai sistem sing dadi kapan tanggal kuwi tindakan. Awak dhéwé nyenggawe sistem telu alat-alat: model sing wis dipunangé, sampek model, sampek sampek, model sing nggawe sampek, sing nyimpen iki sampek sebelah iki dadi sampek, lan mbukak model sing takon nggawe model. Awak dhéwé pisan negoro perusahaan kanggo resmi kanggo sabanjuré iki luwih kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo ngerasakno', 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות, שמעודדות על ידי טכנולוגיות למידה עמוקה ועל ידי הדריש הגבוה לאי.אי השיחה, הציעו גישות שונות אנו מתמקדים בשני משימות בעיקרית, מילוי מקומות (SF) וסיפור הכוונה (IC), וסקרים איך דוגמנים מבוססים עצביים התפתחו במהירות כדי להתמודד עם הבנה טבעית בשפה במערכות דיאלוג. אנחנו מכירים שלושה ארכיטקטורות עצביות: דוגמנים עצמאיים, שמדוגמנים SF ו IC בנפרד, דוגמנים משותפים, שמניצלים את היתרון המשותף של שתי המשימות באותו הזמן, ומעבירים דוגמנים למידה, שמדריכים את הדוגמנים לתחומים חדשים. אנחנו מדברים על המצב הנוכחי של המחקר בסי-פי-איי, ומדגישים אתגרים שעדיין דורשים תשומת לב.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་ལོ་ཚིགས་ལ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན།slot filling (SF) and intent classification (IC), and survey how neural based models have rapidly evolved to address natural language understanding in dialog systems ང་ཚོས་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་གཞུང་གསུམ་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག། མ་དཔེ་གཞི་SF དང་IC གཉིས་དབུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་མཐུན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་དབུས་བྱ་བ་གཉིས་དབར་ག ང་ཚོས་SF དང་IC ནང་ཡོད་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ'}
{'en': 'Re-framing Incremental Deep Language Models for Dialogue Processing with Multi-task Learning', 'ar': 'إعادة صياغة نماذج اللغة العميقة المتزايدة لمعالجة الحوار باستخدام التعلم متعدد المهام', 'es': 'Reformulación de los modelos incrementales de lenguaje profundo para el procesamiento de diálogos con el aprendizaje multitarea', 'pt': 'Reestruturando Modelos Incrementais de Linguagem Profunda para Processamento de Diálogo com Aprendizado Multitarefa', 'fr': "Redéfinition des modèles de langage profond incrémentiels pour le traitement du dialogue avec l'apprentissage multitâche", 'ja': 'マルチタスク学習による対話処理のための増分深層言語モデルの再構築', 'zh': '因多任务学重构以对者增量深言模样', 'hi': 'बहु-कार्य सीखने के साथ संवाद प्रसंस्करण के लिए वृद्धिशील गहरी भाषा मॉडल को फिर से तैयार करना', 'ru': 'Перефрейминг инкрементных глубинных языковых моделей для обработки диалога с многозадачным обучением', 'ga': 'Múnlaí Doimhneacha Incriminteacha a Athfhrámú le haghaidh Próiseáil Idirphlé le Foghlaim Ilthasc', 'el': 'Επαναπλαισίωση των αναλογικών μοντέλων βαθιάς γλώσσας για επεξεργασία διαλόγου με εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'hu': 'Inkrementális mélynyelvi modellek átkeretezése párbeszédfeldolgozáshoz többfeladatos tanulással', 'ka': 'დიალოგის პროცესისთვის მრავალური სამუშაო დასწავლების შესაძლებელი გადასრულება', 'it': "Riframing di modelli di linguaggio profondo incrementale per l'elaborazione dei dialoghi con apprendimento multi-task", 'lt': 'Re-framing Incremental Deep Language Models for Dialogue Processing with Multi-task Learning', 'mk': 'Рерамирање на екстрементални модели на длабок јазик за процес на дијалог со учење со повеќе задачи', 'kk': 'Көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту диалогының өңдеу үшін көптеген терең тіл үлгілерін қайта фреймдеу', 'ms': 'Membingkai Semula Model Bahasa Dalam Tambahan untuk Pemprosesan Dialog dengan Pembelajaran Berbanyak-Tugas', 'ml': 'Re-framing Incremental Deep Language Models for Dialogue Processing with Multi-task Learning', 'mn': 'Олон-үйл ажлын суралцах диалог боловсруулах боломжтой нэмэлт гүнзгий хэл загваруудыг дахин хэлбэрлэх', 'mt': 'It-tfassil mill-ġdid ta’ mudelli ta’ lingwi aktar profondi għall-ipproċessar ta’ djalogu ma’ Tagħlim Multikompiti', 'pl': 'Przekształcanie przyrostowych modeli głębokiego języka dla przetwarzania dialogów za pomocą wielozadaniowego uczenia się', 'no': 'Oppdatering av aukande språk- modeller for dialoghandsaming med fleire oppgåver', 'ro': 'Re-încadrarea modelelor incrementale de limbaj profund pentru procesarea dialogurilor cu învățarea multifuncțională', 'sr': 'Preokretanje povećanih dubokih jezičkih modela za procesiranje dijaloga sa učenjem više zadataka', 'si': 'ගොඩක් කාර්ය ඉගෙනීම සඳහා සංවාදය ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කරන්න සංවාදය සඳහා ගොඩක් ගොඩක් භාෂා මොඩේල්ස්', 'so': 'Tusaalada afka hoose ee mool u dheer ee loo soo bandhigay si loo isticmaalo shaqo badan', 'sv': 'Omrama inkrementella djupa språkmodeller för dialogbehandling med flerfunktionsinlärning', 'ta': 'பல பணி கற்றுக்கொண்டு உரையாடல் செயல்பாட்டிற்கான மாதிரியான ஆழமான மொழி முறைமைகளை மீண்டும் பின்வரும்', 'ur': 'Multi-task Learning کے ساتھ ڈالیلوگ پردازی کے لئے افزایش عمیق زبان موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sắp xếp lại các mô hình ngôn ngữ sâu phức tạp để xử lý đối thoại với giáo dục đa nhiệm vụ', 'hr': 'Preokretanje povećanih dubokih jezičkih modela za procesiranje dijaloga s učenjem više zadataka', 'nl': 'Incrementele Deep Language Modellen opnieuw framen voor dialoogverwerking met multitask Learning', 'bg': 'Преоформяне на разширени дълбоки езикови модели за обработка на диалози с многофункционално обучение', 'da': 'Omindramning af inkrementelle dybe sprogmodeller til dialogbehandling med flere opgaver', 'id': 'Membingkai ulang Model Bahasa Dalam Tingkat untuk Proses Dialog dengan Belajar Multi-Tugas', 'de': 'Umformung inkrementeller Deep Language Modelle für Dialogverarbeitung mit Multi-Task Learning', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Lugha Kuzidi Kingi cha Kuongezeka kwa ajili ya Kuendesha Mjadala kwa Kufunza kazi nyingi', 'tr': '횉oklu-t채blisa흫 철wrenmek 체챌in Dialog i힊lemek 체챌in K철dleme Derje Dili nusgala', 'af': 'Herramming Incremental Deep Taal Models vir Dialoog Verwerking met Multi-Task Leer', 'ko': '다중 임무 학습 기반의 대화 처리 증량 심층 언어 모델 재구성', 'fa': 'مدل عمیق زبان عمیق بیشتری برای پرداخت محاوره با یادگیری چندین کار', 'sq': 'Riformimi i modeleve të gjuhës në thellësi për procesimin e dialogut me mësimin e shumëdetyrave', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Հաճող խորը լեզվի մոդելների վերաձևավորումը բազմախնդիրների սովորելու համար', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য অনেক গভীর ভাষা মোডেল', 'bs': 'Preokretanje povećanih dubokih jezičkih modela za proces dijaloga s učenjem multitask', 'cs': 'Přepracování inkrementálních modelů hlubokého jazyka pro zpracování dialogů pomocí víceúlohového učení', 'et': 'Täiendavate sügavate keelemudelite ümberkujundamine dialoogi töötlemiseks mitme ülesandega õppimisega', 'fi': 'Syvien kielimallien uudelleenkehystäminen vuoropuhelun käsittelyyn monitehtäväoppimisen avulla', 'az': 'Multi-task Öyrənməsi ilə Dialoog İşləməsi üçün Əlavə Əlavə Dili Modelləri', 'ca': 'Reformar models incrementals de llenguatge profund per processar diàleg amb aprenentatge multitascat', 'jv': 'Ngulang-Ngulang Mulai Sistem Daftar Language model kanggo Daftar Ngubah Multi-task Learning', 'ha': 'Modella na Ƙasar da aka Ƙasa na Ƙasa wa Fara Ƙasa wa Kwamfyuta wa Tafiyar da Kwanan Farawa da Farawa', 'sk': 'Ponovno oblikovanje postopnih globokih jezikovnih modelov za obdelavo dialoga z večopravilnim učenjem', 'he': 'מחדש מסגרת דוגמני שפה עמוקה נוספים לעבודת דיאלוג עם לימוד משימות רבות', 'bo': 'Re-framing Incremental Deep Language Models for Dialogue Processing with Multi-task Learning'}
{'en': 'We present a multi-task learning framework to enable the training of one universal incremental dialogue processing model with four tasks of disfluency detection, language modelling, part-of-speech tagging and utterance segmentation in a simple deep recurrent setting. We show that these tasks provide positive inductive biases to each other with optimal contribution of each one relying on the severity of the noise from the task. Our live multi-task model outperforms similar individual tasks, delivers competitive performance and is beneficial for future use in conversational agents in psychiatric treatment.', 'ar': 'نقدم إطارًا تعليميًا متعدد المهام لتمكين تدريب نموذج معالجة حوار تزايدي عالمي واحد مع أربع مهام هي اكتشاف عدم الطلاقة ونمذجة اللغة ووضع علامات على جزء من الكلام وتجزئة الكلام في إعداد بسيط متكرر عميق. نوضح أن هذه المهام توفر تحيزات استقرائية إيجابية لبعضها البعض مع المساهمة المثلى لكل واحدة اعتمادًا على شدة الضوضاء من المهمة. يتفوق نموذجنا المباشر متعدد المهام على المهام الفردية المماثلة ، ويقدم أداءً تنافسيًا ومفيدًا للاستخدام المستقبلي في وكلاء المحادثة في العلاج النفسي.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa para permitir o treinamento de um modelo de processamento de diálogo incremental universal com quatro tarefas de detecção de disfluência, modelagem de linguagem, marcação de parte da fala e segmentação de enunciado em uma configuração recorrente profunda simples. Mostramos que essas tarefas fornecem vieses indutivos positivos entre si com contribuição ótima de cada uma dependendo da gravidade do ruído da tarefa. Nosso modelo multitarefa ao vivo supera tarefas individuais semelhantes, oferece desempenho competitivo e é benéfico para uso futuro em agentes de conversação em tratamento psiquiátrico.', 'es': 'Presentamos un marco de aprendizaje multitarea para permitir la capacitación de un modelo universal de procesamiento de diálogos incrementales con cuatro tareas de detección de disfluencias, modelado del lenguaje, etiquetado de partes del habla y segmentación de enunciados en un entorno simple y profundo y recurrente. Demostramos que estas tareas proporcionan sesgos inductivos positivos entre sí con una contribución óptima de cada una dependiendo de la gravedad del ruido de la tarea. Nuestro modelo multitarea en vivo supera las tareas individuales similares, ofrece un rendimiento competitivo y es beneficioso para su uso futuro en agentes conversacionales en el tratamiento psiquiátrico.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un cadre d'apprentissage multitâche pour permettre la formation d'un modèle de traitement de dialogue incrémentiel universel avec quatre tâches de détection de disfluence, de modélisation du langage, de marquage d'une partie du discours et de segmentation d'énoncé dans un contexte récurrent simple et profond. Nous montrons que ces tâches fournissent des biais inductifs positifs les uns aux autres avec une contribution optimale de chacune en fonction de la gravité du bruit produit par la tâche. Notre modèle multitâche en direct surpasse les tâches individuelles similaires, offre des performances compétitives et est bénéfique pour une utilisation future chez les agents conversationnels en traitement psychiatrique.", 'zh': '立一多任务学框架,以练一通增量对以处四务,不流检,言语建模,词性标语分。 臣等明其归纳偏劣,而每务赖噪声之最。 吾实时多任务优于类,资有竞争力之性,而利于精神病治之会话摄也。', 'hi': 'हम एक बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे को प्रस्तुत करते हैं ताकि एक सार्वभौमिक वृद्धिशील संवाद प्रसंस्करण मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण को सक्षम किया जा सके, जिसमें एक सरल गहरी आवर्तक सेटिंग में अस्पष्टता का पता लगाने, भाषा मॉडलिंग, पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग और उच्चारण विभाजन के चार कार्यों के साथ। हम दिखाते हैं कि ये कार्य कार्य से शोर की गंभीरता पर निर्भर करते हुए प्रत्येक के इष्टतम योगदान के साथ एक-दूसरे को सकारात्मक आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रह प्रदान करते हैं। हमारा लाइव मल्टी-टास्क मॉडल समान व्यक्तिगत कार्यों को मात देता है, प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्रदान करता है और मनोवैज्ञानिक उपचार में संवादी एजेंटों में भविष्य के उपयोग के लिए फायदेमंद है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем многозадачную учебную структуру, позволяющую обучать одну универсальную модель обработки инкрементного диалога с четырьмя задачами обнаружения дисфлюэнтности, моделирования языка, тегирования части речи и сегментации речи в простой глубокой рекуррентной обстановке. Показано, что эти задачи обеспечивают положительные индуктивные смещения друг к другу с оптимальным вкладом каждого из них, опираясь на тяжесть шума от задачи. Наша живая многозадачная модель превосходит аналогичные индивидуальные задачи, обеспечивает конкурентоспособную производительность и полезна для будущего использования в разговорных агентах в психиатрическом лечении.', 'ja': '私たちは、1つのユニバーサル増分対話処理モデルのトレーニングを可能にするマルチタスク学習フレームワークを提示し、単純で深い繰り返しの設定で、不流動性検出、言語モデリング、音声の一部タグ付け、発話セグメンテーションの4つのタスクを提供します。私たちは、これらのタスクが、タスクからのノイズの重大度に依存して、それぞれの最適な貢献を伴い、互いに肯定的な帰納的バイアスを提供することを示しています。当社のライブマルチタスクモデルは、類似した個々のタスクを上回り、競争力のあるパフォーマンスを提供し、精神科治療における会話エージェントでの将来の使用に有益です。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair creat foghlama il-tasc chun oiliúint a chur ar mhúnla próiseála comhphlé incriminteach uilechoiteann amháin ina mbeidh ceithre thasc, mar atá idirdhealú a bhrath, samhaltú teanga, clibeáil pháirteach cainte agus deighilt cainte i suíomh simplí athfhillteach domhain. Léirímid go soláthraíonn na tascanna seo laofachtaí ionduchtaithe dearfacha dá chéile agus an rannchuidiú optamach gach ceann acu ag brath ar dhéine an torainn ón tasc. Is fearr lenár múnla beo il-tasc ná tascanna aonair comhchosúla, seachadann sé feidhmíocht iomaíoch agus tá sé tairbheach le húsáid sa todhchaí i ngníomhairí comhrá i gcóireáil shíciatrach.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მრავალური დავასწავლის ფრამეტრის გამოყენება, რომ ერთი უნივერსალური კრემონემენტური დიალოგის პროცესი მოდელის განახლებას შეუძლებელია, ოთხი დავასწავლის განახლებას, ენის მოდელირება, სიტყვის ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს დავალებები ერთმანეთისთვის პოტიფიური ინდიქტური წარმოდგენება ერთმანეთისთვის, რომელიც ერთმანეთისთვის პოტიმალური დამატებით, რომელიც მიერ და ჩვენი ცხოვრებული მრავალური დავალების მოდელი გავაკეთება სხვადასხვა ინდიველური დავალებები, კონკრენტებური გამოყენება და მომავალური გამოყენებაში კონტაქციო ადვნენტებში ფსიქ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μαθησιακό πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών που θα επιτρέψει την εκπαίδευση ενός καθολικού μοντέλου επε&εργασίας κλιμακωτικού διαλόγου με τέσσερις εργασίες ανίχνευσης δυσρευστότητας, μοντελοποίησης γλώσσας, επισήμανσης τμημάτων ομιλίας και τμηματοποίησης εκφρασμού σε ένα απλό βαθύ επαναλαμβανόμενο περιβάλλον. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτές οι εργασίες παρέχουν θετικές επαγωγικές προκατάληψη μεταξύ τους με τη βέλτιστη συμβολή του καθενός από αυτά που βασίζονται στη σοβαρότητα του θορύβου από την εργασία. Το ζωντανό μοντέλο πολλαπλών εργασιών ξεπερνά παρόμοιες μεμονωμένες εργασίες, παρέχει ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις και είναι ευεργετικό για μελλοντική χρήση σε παράγοντες συνομιλίας στην ψυχιατρική θεραπεία.', 'hu': 'Egy többfeladatos tanulási keretrendszert mutatunk be, amely lehetővé teszi egy univerzális inkrementális párbeszédfeldolgozási modell képzését, négy feladattal: diszfluencia detektálás, nyelvmodellezés, beszédrész címkézés és beszédszegmentálás egyszerű, mély visszatérő környezetben. Megmutatjuk, hogy ezek a feladatok pozitív induktív előítéleteket biztosítanak egymás számára, mindegyik optimális hozzájárulásával a feladat zajának súlyosságától függően. Az élő, többfeladatos modellünk felülmúlja a hasonló egyéni feladatokat, versenyképes teljesítményt nyújt, és előnyös a pszichiátriai kezelésben részt vevő beszélgető szerek jövőbeni használata szempontjából.', 'it': "Presentiamo un framework di apprendimento multi-task per consentire la formazione di un modello universale di elaborazione incrementale del dialogo con quattro compiti di rilevamento della disfluenza, modellazione del linguaggio, tag part-of-speech e segmentazione dell'espressione in un semplice e profondo ambiente ricorrente. Mostriamo che questi compiti forniscono pregiudizi induttivi positivi l'uno all'altro con il contributo ottimale di ciascuno basandosi sulla gravità del rumore dal compito. Il nostro modello multi-task live supera compiti individuali simili, offre prestazioni competitive ed è vantaggioso per l'uso futuro in agenti conversazionali nel trattamento psichiatrico.", 'kk': 'Біз көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту фреймін көрсету үшін бір әлемдік көптеген диалог өңдеу үлгісін төрт тапсырмаларды анықтауға, тілдерді моделдеу, сөздің бөлігін тегжеу және сөздерді шектеу үшін қарапайы Біз бұл тапсырмалар тапсырманың дыбыс қанықтығына көмектесетін әрбірінің оптималы қатынасын бір-біріне көмектеседі. Біздің көп тапсырмалар үлгісіміз бұл жеке тапсырмаларды жасайды, конкурентті істеу және психиатриялық лекциясындағы конвертациялық агенттерде болашақ қолдану үшін пайдалы.', 'mk': 'Презентираме мултизадачна рамка за учење за овозможување на обуката на еден универзален модел за процес на инекстрементален дијалог со четири задачи за детекција на неуспешност, моделирање на јазикот, регистрирање на дел од говорот и сегментација на изразот во едноставно длабоко реци Ние покажуваме дека овие задачи обезбедуваат позитивни индуктивни предрасуди меѓусебно со оптимален придонес на секој од нив, зависен од сериозноста на шумата од задачата. Нашиот жив мултизадачен модел ги надминува сличните индивидуални задачи, обезбедува конкурентни резултати и е корисен за идната употреба на разговарачките агенти во психијатрискиот третман.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame daugiafunkcinę mokymosi sistemą, kad būtų galima parengti vieną universal ų palaipsnio dialogo procesavimo model į su keturiomis užduotimis: trūkumų nustatymas, kalbų modeliavimas, kalbos dalies žymėjimas ir žodžių segmentavimas paprasčiausiai giliai pasikartojant. Mes parodome, kad šios užduotys suteikia viena kitai teigiamus skatinamuosius nukrypimus, kiekviena iš jų turi optimal ų indėlį, priklausantį nuo užduoties triukšmo sunkumo. Mūsų gyvas daugelio užduočių model is atlieka panašias atskiras užduotis, užtikrina konkurencinius rezultatus ir naudingas būsimam pokalbio agentų naudojimui psichiatriniame gydyme.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan kerangka pembelajaran berbilang-tugas untuk membolehkan latihan satu model pemprosesan dialog incremental universal dengan empat tugas pengesan ketidaksempurnaan, pemodelan bahasa, tag-bahagian-ucapan dan segmentasi utterance dalam tetapan yang berulang dalam sederhana. Kami menunjukkan bahawa tugas-tugas ini menyediakan bias induktif positif satu sama lain dengan kontribusi optimal masing-masing bergantung pada keras bunyi dari tugas. Our live multi-task model outperforms similar individual tasks, delivers competitive performance and is beneficial for future use in conversational agents in psychiatric treatment.', 'ml': 'We present a multi-task learning framework to enable the training of one universal incremental dialogue processing model with four tasks of disfluency detection, language modelling, part-of-speech tagging and utterance segmentation in a simple deep recurrent setting.  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു ഈ ജോലികള്\u200d പരസ്പരം സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ശബ്ദത്തിന്റ നമ്മുടെ ജീവിതത്തിലുള്ള പല്ലിക്കാരുടെ മോഡല്\u200d അതുപോലെ വ്യക്തിപരമായ ജോലികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw qafas ta’ tagħlim b’diversi kompiti biex jippermetti t-taħriġ ta’ mudell ta’ pproċessar ta’ djalogu inkrementali universali wieħed b’erba’ kompiti ta’ identifikazzjoni ta’ diskrepanza, mudell tal-lingwi, tikkettar ta’ parti mid-diskors u segmentazzjoni ta’ espressjoni f’ambjent rikorrenti sempliċi u profond. Aħna nuru li dawn il-kompiti jipprovdu preġudizzji induttivi pożittivi lil xulxin b’kontribuzzjoni ottimali minn kull wieħed li jiddependi fuq is-severità tal-istorbju mill-kompitu. Il-mudell ta’ diversi kompiti ħajjin tagħna jwettaq kompiti individwali simili, jagħti prestazzjoni kompetittiva u huwa ta’ benefiċċju għall-użu futur fl-aġenti ta’ konverżjoni fit-trattament psikjatriku.', 'mn': 'Бид олон ажлын суралцах үйл ажиллагааны нэг универсал нэмэлт диалогын үйл ажиллагааны дасгал хөгжүүлэх загварын дасгал хөгжүүлэх боломжтой болгон, хэл загварын загвар, хэл загварын хэсэг, хэл загварын хэсэг болон хэлэлц Бид эдгээр үйл ажиллагаанууд ажлын дуу чимээгүй хэцүү байдлыг хүлээж буй хүн бүрт эерэг сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлыг харуулж байна. Бидний амьдралын олон ажлын загварын загвар нь нэг төрлийн ажил, өрсөлдөөн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, сэтгэл зүйн эмчилгээнд ярилцлагын агентуудын ирээдүйн хэрэглээнд ашигтай.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wielozadaniowe ramy uczenia się umożliwiające szkolenie jednego uniwersalnego modelu przetwarzania dialogu przyrostowego z czterema zadaniami: wykrywanie braku płynności, modelowanie języka, tagowanie części mowy i segmentacja wypowiedzi w prostym, głębokim powtarzającym się ustawieniu. Pokazujemy, że zadania te zapewniają sobie nawzajem pozytywne indukcyjne uprzedzenia z optymalnym wkładem każdego z nich opierając się na nasileniu hałasu z danego zadania. Nasz model wielozadaniowy na żywo przewyższa podobne indywidualne zadania, zapewnia konkurencyjną wydajność i jest korzystny dla przyszłego zastosowania w środkach konwersacyjnych w leczeniu psychiatrycznym.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un cadru de învățare multi-task pentru a permite formarea unui model universal de procesare incrementală a dialogului cu patru sarcini de detectare a disfluenței, modelare a limbii, etichetare parțială de vorbire și segmentare a rostirii într-un cadru recurent simplu și profund. Arătăm că aceste sarcini oferă prejudecăți inductive pozitive reciproce cu contribuția optimă a fiecăreia bazându-se pe severitatea zgomotului din sarcină. Modelul nostru live multi-task depășește sarcini individuale similare, oferă performanțe competitive și este benefic pentru utilizarea viitoare în agenții conversaționali în tratamentul psihiatric.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo višezadatačni okvir učenja kako bi omogućili obuku jednog univerzalnog incrementalnog model a obrade dijaloga sa četiri zadatka otkrivanja nestabilnosti, jezičkog modela, dijelogovornog oznake i segmentacije govora u jednostavnom dubokom ponovnom postavljanju. Pokazujemo da ove zadatke pružaju pozitivne induktivne predrasude jedno drugom optimalno doprinos svakog koji se oslanja na težinu buke iz zadatka. Naš živi multizadatačni model iznosi slične individualne zadatke, ispunjava konkurentne funkcije i koristi je za buduću upotrebu razgovornih agenata psihijatrijskog tretmana.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit fleire oppgåver-læringsrammeverk for å slå på opplæring av ein universelt inkrementalt dialoghandsamingsmodell med fire oppgåver med oppdaging av forskjellighet, språk-modellering, del av talemerking og uttalesegmentering i eit enkelt gjentakelig oppsett. Vi viser at desse oppgåvene gjev positiv induktive forvirkningar til kvarandre med optimalt bidrag av kvart som tilhøyrer støyet frå oppgåva. Vårt leve multioppgåvemodell utfører liknande individuelle oppgåver, gjer konkurransa utvikling og er nyttig for framtidige bruk i samtaleagentar i psykiatriske behandling.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ සංවාදය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ සංවාදය පරීක්ෂණය,  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ වැඩක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා හැමෝම වැඩක අපේ ජීවත් විශාල වැඩිය වැඩිය මදුල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළ', 'so': 'Waxaannu qabannaa koob waxbarasho badan oo shaqo badan, si aan u awoodno in lagu tababariyo model baaritaanka labaad ee caalamiga ah, taasoo leh afar shaqo oo ku saabsan baaritaanka, tusaale ahaan afka, qeyb ka mid ah tagsiga hadalka iyo qeyb ka dhigashada hadalka oo aad u fudud. Waxaynu muujinnaa in shaqaalahaas qaarkood midka kale u fidiyaa khilaafka waxqabadka suurtagalka ah, kaas oo ku kalsoonaya daryeelka codka shaqada. Tusaale shaqo badan oo nool wuxuu sameeyaa shaqooyin la mid ah oo isku mid ah, wuxuu bixiyaa tababar iskutar ah, waxaana faa’iido u leh isticmaalka mustaqbalka ah ee dawooyinka macaamilooyinka dhimirka.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett ramverk för lärande med flera uppgifter för att möjliggöra utbildning av en universell inkrementell dialogbehandlingsmodell med fyra uppgifter för att upptäcka avvikelser, språkmodellering, taggning av del av tal och uttalssegmentering i en enkel djupåterkommande miljö. Vi visar att dessa uppgifter ger positiva induktiva fördomar till varandra med optimalt bidrag från var och en beroende på svårighetsgraden av bullret från uppgiften. Vår live multi-task-modell överträffar liknande individuella uppgifter, levererar konkurrenskraftig prestanda och är fördelaktig för framtida användning i samtalsämnen inom psykiatrisk behandling.', 'ta': 'ஒரு பொதுவான அதிகரிப்பு உரையாடல் செயல்பாடு மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சட்டத்தை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம். சுலபமான திரும்ப அமைப்பில் நான் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த பணிகள் நேர்மையான தொழில்நுட்பமான பிரச்சனைகளை ஒருவருக்கொருவர் செய்ய வேண்டும் என்று ஒருவருக் எங்கள் வாழ்க்கை பல பணி மாதிரி அதே தனிப்பட்ட பணிகளை செய்கிறது, போராடியான செயலை வழங்குகிறது மற்றும் எதிர்கால பயன்படுத்தும் பேசும் முகவர', 'ur': 'ہم ایک عمومی اضافہ دیالوگ کی آموزش کے لئے ایک بہت سی تابع سیکھنے کا فرم پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک عمومی اضافہ دیالوگ کی آموزش کو چار تابع کے ساتھ غلطی شناسایی، زبان نمڈلینگ، زبان کا ٹاگ اور کلام سیگنٹ کرے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ کام ایک دوسرے کے لئے مثبت اثر دینے والی رغبت دیتے ہیں ہر ایک کے لئے اچھی رغبت دینے والی رغبت دیتے ہیں ہماری زندگی بہت سی دنیا کی موڈل ایسی شخصی دنیا کے مطابق کام کرتا ہے، رقابت کی عملکرد ادا کرتا ہے اور روانشنی درمانی کے مطابق مکالمانی اگنٹوں کے مطابق استعمال کے لئے فائدہ اٹھاتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống học đa nhiệm vụ để có thể đào tạo một mô hình phát triển cuộc đối thoại phức tạp chung với bốn công việc tìm ra thói quen, mô phỏng ngôn ngữ, mô tả phần ngôn ngữ và phân biệt ngôn ngữ trong một môi trường thường lệ đơn giản. Chúng tôi cho thấy những nhiệm vụ này cung cấp cho nhau các thói quen dẫn đầu tích cực, với sự đóng góp tối ưu của mỗi người dựa vào độ nặng của nhiễu từ nhiệm vụ. Người mẫu đa nhiệm trực tiếp của chúng ta hoàn thành các công việc tương tự, có hiệu quả cạnh tranh và có lợi cho việc sử dụng đối tác trong điều trị tâm thần.', 'uz': "Biz bir ko'plab vazifa o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz, bir umumiy muloqat muloqat taʼminlovchi muloqat oyna boshqarish modelini o'rganish uchun foydalanamiz va to'rt vazifani aniqlash, tilning modelli, gapirish qismlarini yopish va gapirish qismlarini oddiy davom etish mumkin. Biz shu vazifalar vazifalarning vazifasidagi tovush kuchini ishlash uchun bir-бирларига optik yordam beradi. Bizning bir necha vazifa modelimiz bir xil vazifalarni bajaradi, rivojlanish natijasini bajaradi va kelajakdagi muloqat tajribalarda foydalanish uchun foydalanadi.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en multi-task læringsramme for at muliggøre træning af en universel inkrementel dialog behandlingsmodel med fire opgaver med disfluency detektion, sprogmodellering, del-of-speech tagging og talesegmentering i en enkel dyb tilbagevendende indstilling. Vi viser, at disse opgaver giver positive induktive fordomme til hinanden med optimalt bidrag fra hver enkelt afhængig af sværhedsgraden af støjen fra opgaven. Vores live multi-task model udfører lignende individuelle opgaver, leverer konkurrencedygtig præstation og er gavnlig for fremtidig brug i samtaleagenter i psykiatrisk behandling.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een multi-task leerkader om de training van één universeel incrementele dialoogverwerkingsmodel mogelijk te maken met vier taken van disfluencedetectie, taalmodellering, part-of-spraak tagging en uitsprekingssegmentatie in een eenvoudige diepe terugkerende omgeving. We laten zien dat deze taken positieve inductieve biases aan elkaar leveren met een optimale bijdrage van elke taak afhankelijk van de ernst van het lawaai van de taak. Ons live multi-task model overtreft vergelijkbare individuele taken, levert concurrerende prestaties en is gunstig voor toekomstig gebruik in gespreksmiddelen in psychiatrische behandelingen.', 'bg': 'Представяме рамка за обучение с множество задачи, която дава възможност за обучение на универсален модел за обработка на диалога с четири задачи за откриване на дисфлийнс, езиково моделиране, маркиране на част от речта и сегментация на речта в проста дълбоко повтаряща се обстановка. Показваме, че тези задачи осигуряват положителни индуктивни отклонения помежду си с оптимален принос на всяка от тях, разчитайки на тежестта на шума от задачата. Нашият модел на живо многозадачи надминава подобни индивидуални задачи, осигурява конкурентни резултати и е полезен за бъдеща употреба в разговорни агенти в психиатричното лечение.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo višezadatačni okvir učenja kako bi omogućili obuku jednog univerzalnog incrementalnog model a obrađivanja dijaloga s četiri zadatka otkrivanja nedostatka, jezičkog modela, dijelogovornog označavanja i segmentacije govora u jednostavnom dubokom ponovnom postavljanju. Pokazujemo da ovi zadaci pružaju pozitivne induktivne predrasude jedni drugima optimalno doprinos svakog koji se oslanja na težinu buke iz zadatka. Naš živi multizadatačni model iznosi slične individualne zadatke, pruža konkurentne funkcije i koristi za buduću uporabu u razgovornim agentima psihijatrijskom liječenju.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan rangkaian pembelajaran multi-tugas untuk memungkinkan pelatihan satu model proses dialog incremental universal dengan empat tugas deteksi gangguan, modeling bahasa, tagging bagian dari pidato dan segmentasi utterance dalam seting sederhana yang berulang. We show that these tasks provide positive inductive biases to each other with optimal contribution of each one relying on the severity of the noise from the task.  Model multitugas hidup kita melaksanakan tugas individu yang sama, memberikan prestasi kompetitif dan berguna untuk penggunaan masa depan dalam agen konversasi dalam perawatan psikiatri.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein Multi-Task-Lernframework, das das Training eines universellen inkrementellen Dialogverarbeitungsmodells mit vier Aufgaben der Erkennung von Unflüssigkeit, Sprachmodellierung, Tagging von Sprachteilen und Äußerungssegmentierung in einer einfachen, wiederkehrenden Umgebung ermöglicht. Wir zeigen, dass diese Aufgaben positive induktive Verzerrungen zueinander mit optimalem Beitrag jeder einzelnen abhängig von der Schwere des Rauschens aus der Aufgabe liefern. Unser Live-Multi-Task-Modell übertrifft ähnliche Einzelaufgaben, liefert wettbewerbsfähige Leistung und ist vorteilhaft für den zukünftigen Einsatz in Gesprächsmitteln in der psychiatrischen Behandlung.', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe taýdan öwrenmek üçin bir uniwersal günahlat diýoly işlemek üçin 4 netijesi boýunça tanyş, dil modellendirmek, sözleriniň bir parçasyny taglamak we sözleriniň segmentasyny basit bir nusgada gaýtalamak üçin ullanýarys. Biz bu zadaklaryň bir-birimize pozitif täsirli ýerleşdirişleri işiň ýigrenlişligine güýçli ýerleşýän, beýleki adamlaryň optimaly täsirli täsirini berýäris diýip görkeýäris. Biziň ýaşaýşymyz köp-täbli nusgalarymyz ýaly adamlary beýleki zadymyzdan çykyp gidýär, ýaryşykly ukyplarymyzy saýlaýar we gelejek nusgalarymyz psikiýat terapiýasynda gürrüňleýän ajamlarymyzda faydaly', 'ko': '우리는 간단한 심도 순환 환경에서 통용되는 증량 대화 처리 모델을 훈련할 수 있는 다중 임무 학습 구조를 제시했다. 이 모델은 네 가지 임무를 포함하는데 그것이 바로 유창성 검사, 언어 모델링, 단어성 표시와 언어 구분이다.우리는 이러한 임무들이 서로 긍정적인 감응 편차를 제공하고 모든 임무의 가장 좋은 공헌은 임무 소음의 심각성에 달려 있다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 실시간 다중 임무 모델은 유사한 개인 임무보다 우수하고 경쟁력 있는 성능을 제공하며 미래에 정신병 치료의 세션 에이전트에서 사용하기에 유리하다.', 'fa': 'ما یک چهارچوب یادگیری بسیاری از کار را برای فعال کردن آموزش یک مدل پرداخت گفتگوی بیشتر جهانی با چهار وظیفه شناسایی ناپذیری، مدل کردن زبان، قسمتی از گفتگو و جدایی سخنرانی در یک تنظیمات عمیق تکرار کننده است. ما نشان می دهیم که این وظیفه\u200cها به یکدیگر پیشرفت\u200cهای مثبتی به یکدیگر می\u200cدهند، با توجه optimal از هر یک که بر سنگین صدا از این وظیفه اعتماد دارد. مدل چند کاری زندگی ما بیشتر از وظیفه\u200cهای شخصی مشابه می\u200cکند، عملکرد رقابتی را می\u200cرساند و برای استفاده از آینده در ماموران مکالمات در درمان روانپزشکی منافع است.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mfumo wa kujifunza kazi nyingi ili kuwezesha mafunzo ya mjadala mmoja wa ukuaji wa mazungumzo ya dunia yenye kazi nne za kugundua ukosefu wa ufahamu, mifano ya lugha, sehemu ya kuchapisha maneno na sekta ya hotuba katika mazingira rahisi yanayoendelea. Tunaonyesha kuwa kazi hizi zinatoa upendeleo chanya wa viwanda kwa mchango mzuri wa kila mmoja akitegemea ukatili wa sauti kutoka kazi hiyo. Mfano wetu wa moja kwa moja katika kazi nyingi unafanya kazi kama hizo za watu binafsi, hutoa ufanisi wa ushindani na una faida kwa matumizi ya baadaye katika maafisa wa mazungumzo katika matibabu ya kisaikolojia.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմախնդիր ուսումնասիրության շրջանակ, որպեսզի հնարավորություն ունենանք մի համաշխարհային ավելացրային խմբագրման մոդելի ուսումնասիրությունը, որտեղ կան չորս խնդիրներ՝ անհնարավորություն հայտնաբերելու, լեզվի մոդելների, խոսքի մասի նշանների և ար Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս խնդիրները դրական ինդուկտիվ կողմնականություններ են տալիս միմյանց համար, յուրաքանչյուրի օպտիմալ ներդրումը կախված է խնդիրների աղմուկի ծանրության վրա: Մեր կենդանի բազմախնդիրների մոդելը կատարում է նմանատիպ անհատական առաջադրանքներ, առաջացնում է մրցակցության արդյունք և օգտակար է ապագայում հաղորդակցման գործիչների օգտագործման համար հոգեբուժման մեջ:', 'af': "Ons stel 'n multi-taak leer raamwerk om die oefening van een universele inkremensiele dialoog-verwerking model te aktiveer met vier taak van onvloeienheid-beskrywing, taal modellering, deel-van-woord-etiketing en uitspraak-segmentasie in 'n eenvoudige diep herhaalde opstelling te maak. Ons wys dat hierdie opdragte positiewe induktiewe voorspoedings vir mekaar verskaf met optimale bydrang van elkeen wat op die grootheid van die geluid van die taak vertrou. Ons lewe multi-taak model uitvoer gelyke individuele taak, laat rekenaardige prestasie en is nuttig vir toekomstige gebruik in konversasionale agente in psykiatrieke behandeling.", 'sq': 'We present a multi-task learning framework to enable the training of one universal incremental dialogue processing model with four tasks of disfluency detection, language modelling, part-of-speech tagging and utterance segmentation in a simple deep recurrent setting.  Ne tregojmë se këto detyra ofrojnë paragjykime pozitive për njëri-tjetrin me kontribut optimal të secilit që mbështetet në rëndësinë e zhurmës nga detyra. Modeli ynë i gjallë me shumë detyra kryen detyra të ngjashme individuale, ofron performancë konkurruese dhe është i dobishëm për përdorimin e ardhshëm në agjentët bisedimorë në trajtimin psikiatrik.', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu iş öyrənmə framework ünü təhsil etmək üçün bir üniversal artımlı dijaloğu işləmə model in in təhsil edilməsini sağlamaq üçün dörd fərqli tanıtma, dil modelləməsi, sözlərin bir parçası etiketi və sözlərin segmentasiyasını basit bir dərin təhsil etməsi üçün təhsil edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, bu işlər hər birinin səsinin ağırlığına təvəkkül edir. Bizim canlı çoxlu işlər modeliyimiz bənzər işləri təşkil edir, müəllif işləri təşkil edir və psikiyatriq tedavisində müzakirçi ajanların gələcək istifadəsinə fayda verər.', 'am': 'የአንድ አቀማመጥ ጥያቄ ስራዎችን ለማስተማር፣ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ፣ የንግግር ማተማር እና የንግግር ክፍል እና በጥልቅ መቆጣጠር ማሰናከል እና የንግግር ክፍል ማስተማርን ማስተማርን እናስችላለን፡፡ እነዚህም ስራዎች የስራ ድምፅ ድምፅ ኃይለኛ የሚታመኑ የአካባቢ ተቃውሞ እርስ በርሳቸው እንዲያሳዩ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የብዙ ስራ ዓይነታችን ብጤያቸውን ስራዎችን ያሳድጋል፣ ተቃዋሚውን ያሳድዳል እናም ለፊት የሚጠቅመው በተቃዋሚ ተሟጋቾች በpsychiatric treatment ውስጥ የሚጠቅመው ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo višezadatačni okvir učenja kako bi omogućili obuku jednog univerzalnog incrementalnog model a obrade dijaloga s četiri zadatka otkrivanja nestabilnosti, jezičkog modela, dijelogovornog oznake i segmentacije govora u jednostavnom dubokom ponovnom nastavku. Pokazujemo da ovi zadaci pružaju pozitivne induktivne predrasude jedni drugima optimalno doprinos svakog koji se oslanja na težinu buke iz zadatka. Naš živi multizadatačni model iznosi slične individualne zadatke, ispunjava konkurentne funkcije i koristi je za buduću uporabu u razgovornim agentima psihijatrijskom tretmanu.', 'ca': "Presentam un marc d'aprenentatge multitasca que permet formar un model universal de processament de diàleg incremental amb quatre tasques de detecció de disfluència, modelació de llenguatges, etiqueta part-of-speech i segmentació de expressió en un senzill entorn recurrent i profund. Ens mostren que aquestes tasques proporcionen bias inductius positius entre elles amb una contribució óptima de cada una depenent de la gravetat del soroll de la tasca. El nostre model de múltiples tasques en viu supera tasques individuals similars, proporciona rendiment competitiu i és beneficiós per l'ús futur en els agents de conversació en tractament psiquiàtric.", 'bn': 'আমরা একটি মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা ফ্রেম উপস্থাপন করছি যাতে একটি বিশ্বব্যাপী উন্নয়নশীল ডায়ালগ প্রক্রিয়ার মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ সক্রিয় করার জন্য, যার ফলে চারটি কাজ, ভাষার মডেল আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই কাজগুলো একে অপরের কাছে ইতিবাচক ক্রিয়াকর্মীদের বিরুদ্ধে প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদান করে যারা কাজের কঠোর আওয়াজে আমাদের লাইভ মাল্টিক কাজের মডেল একই ধরনের ব্যক্তিগত কাজ করে, প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করে এবং ভবিষ্যতের ব্যবহারের জন্য সুবিধাজনক।', 'cs': 'Představujeme víceúkolový učební rámec, který umožňuje školení jednoho univerzálního inkrementálního modelu zpracování dialogu se čtyřmi úkoly detekce neslušnosti, modelování jazyka, tagování části řeči a segmentace výroku v jednoduchém hlubokém opakovaném nastavení. Ukazujeme, že tyto úkoly navzájem poskytují pozitivní indukční předsudky s optimálním přínosem jednotlivých úkolů spoléhajících na závažnost hluku z úkolu. Náš živý multi-úkolový model překonává podobné individuální úkoly, poskytuje konkurenční výkon a je přínosný pro budoucí použití v konverzačních agentech v psychiatrické léčbě.', 'et': 'Esitleme mitmeülesandelise õpperaamistiku, mis võimaldab koolitada ühe universaalse dialoogi protsessi mudeli nelja ülesandega: disfluentsuse tuvastamine, keele modelleerimine, kõneosa märgistamine ja kõnede segmenteerimine lihtsas sügavas korduvas keskkonnas. Näitame, et need ülesanded annavad üksteisele positiivseid induktiivseid kallakusi, kusjuures igaüks aitab optimaalselt kaasa ülesandest tuleneva müra tõsidusele. Meie reaalajas mitmeülesandeline mudel ületab sarnaseid individuaalseid ülesandeid, pakub konkurentsivõimelist tulemust ja on kasulik edaspidiseks kasutamiseks psühhiaatrilise ravi vestlusvahendites.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme monitehtäväoppimisen viitekehyksen, jonka avulla voidaan kouluttaa yksi universaali inkrementaalinen dialogin käsittelymalli, jossa on neljä tehtävää disfluenssin havaitseminen, kielimallinnus, osa-puheen tagging ja lauseen segmentointi yksinkertaisessa syvätoistuvassa ympäristössä. Osoitamme, että nämä tehtävät tuottavat positiivisia induktiivisia vääristymiä toisilleen siten, että kukin vaikuttaa optimaalisesti tehtävän melun vakavuuteen. Live-monitehtävämallimme suoriutuu paremmin kuin vastaavat yksittäiset tehtävät, tuottaa kilpailukykyistä suorituskykyä ja on hyödyllinen tulevalle käytölle psykiatrisessa hoidossa.', 'jv': 'Kita menehi akeh multi-task Learn frame kanggo ngabagakake sistem atuaman kanggo ngilangno sistem universal Incretual dialog Awak dhéwé nglanggar nganggo cah-cah sing luwih dumadhi, nik akeh iso nguasai percoyo awak dhéwé kuwi mau Panjenengan model sing paling-task multi-task gawe ngupakan langgar task mengko, njaluk akeh njaluk sing berarti batasan lan ijol-ijol sing nggawe barang dhéwé ngerasakno iki bakal terus lanjut cara-lanjut sing apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מסגרת לימוד רבות משימות כדי לאפשר את האימונים של דוגמא עיבוד דיאלוג אוניברסלי נוספי אחד עם ארבעה משימות של זיהוי חסרות השפעה, דוגמאת שפות, תגירת חלק מהנאום וסגמאציה ביטוי בסביבה עמוקה ומחוזרת פשוטה. אנחנו מראים שהמשימות האלה מספקות חיוביות מונעות אחד לשני עם התרומה אופטימלית של כל אחד תלוי ברצינות הרעש מהמשימה. המודל החי שלנו במשימות רבות מוביל משימות בודדות דומות, מספק ביצועים תחרותיים והוא מועיל לשימוש בעתיד בסוכנים שיחה בטיפול פסיכיאטרי.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo večopravilni učni okvir, ki omogoča usposabljanje univerzalnega modela procesiranja dialoga s štirimi nalogami odkrivanja disfluentnosti, jezikovnega modeliranja, označevanja dela govora in segmentacije izgovorov v preprostem globokem ponavljajočem se okolju. Pokazali smo, da ti nalogi med seboj zagotavljajo pozitivne induktivne pristranskosti z optimalnim prispevkom vsakega, ki se zanaša na resnost hrupa iz naloge. Naš večopravilni model v živo presega podobne individualne naloge, zagotavlja konkurenčno uspešnost in je koristen za prihodnjo uporabo pri pogovornih agentih v psihiatričnem zdravljenju.', 'ha': "We present a multi-task learning framework to enable the training of one universal incremental dialogue processing model with four tasks of disfluency detection, language modelling, part-of-speech tagging and utterance segmentation in a simple deep recurrent setting.  Munã nũna cewa waɗannan aikin su bãyar da firgita masu da aikin ƙwarai zuwa ga sãshe, yana dõgara ga girgiyar sauri daga aikin. Misalinmu masu ƙaranci na mulki ya sami aikin kwamfyutan wanda ke da kami, yana da rabo ga aikin da za'a yi gauraya, kuma yana da amfani ga amfani da mataimaki masu cikin mazaɓa na aikin akiki.", 'bo': 'We present a multi-task learning framework to enable the training of one universal incremental dialog processing model with four tasks of disfluency detection, language modelling, part-of-speech tagging and utterance segmentation in a simple deep recurrent setting. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་དག་གིས་བཀོད་སྟངས་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་ཕྱོགས་ནི་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནད་དོན་བྱས་པ་རེ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་མི་ཚོགས་ལས་ཀྱི་མ་དབུགས་སྣ་མང་ལས་ཀ་ནི་སྒེར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོང་བ་ཡིན་པས། མ་འོངས་'}
{'en': 'TIMBERT : Toponym Identifier For The Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'ar': 'TIMBERT: معرف الأسماء الجغرافية للمجال الطبي بناءً على BERT', 'pt': 'TIMBERT: identificador de topônimo para o domínio médico baseado em BERT', 'fr': 'TIMBERT\xa0: identifiant de toponyme pour le domaine médical basé sur BERT', 'es': 'TIMBERT: identificador de topónimo para el dominio médico basado en BERT', 'zh': 'TIMBERT曰:BERT之名标识符', 'ja': 'TIMBERT ： BERTに基づく医療ドメインの地名識別子', 'hi': 'TIMBERT: BERT के आधार पर चिकित्सा डोमेन के लिए Toponym पहचानकर्ता', 'ru': 'TIMBERT: Идентификатор топонима для медицинской области на основе BERT', 'ga': 'TIMBERT: Aitheantóir Toponym Don Fhearann Míochaine Bunaithe ar CRET', 'ka': 'ტაიმბერტი: მედიციო დემონის ტომონიმის იდენტიფიკატორი BERT', 'el': 'ΤΙΜΒΕΡΤ: Αναγνωριστής τοπωνύμου για τον ιατρικό τομέα με βάση τον BERT', 'hu': 'TIMBERT: Az orvosi terület toponimazonosítója BERT alapján', 'it': 'TIMBERT: Identificatore toponico per il dominio medico basato su BERT', 'kk': 'ТИМБЕРТ: BERT негізіндегі медицина доменінің Toponym идентификаторы', 'lt': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier For The Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'mk': 'Идентификатор на топонимот за медицинскиот домен базиран на BERT', 'ms': 'TIMBERT: Pengenalpasti Toponim untuk Domain Perubatan berdasarkan BERT', 'ml': 'ടിമ്പെര്\u200dട്ട്: ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200dറെ ടോപോണിമ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു', 'mn': 'ТИМБЕРТ: БЕРТ-д суурилсан эмнэлгийн домаар дээрх Toponym Identifier', 'mt': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier For The Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'no': 'TIMBERT: Toponym- identifikator for The Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'ro': 'TIMBERT: Identificator de toponim pentru domeniul medical bazat pe BERT', 'sr': 'Toponim identifikator za medicinsku domenu baziran na BERT-u', 'pl': 'TIMBERT: Identyfikator toponymu dla domeny medycznej oparty na BERT', 'si': 'ටිම්බෙර්ට්: BERT විදිහට ආධාරිත වෛද්\u200dය ඩොමේන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ පරික්ෂකය', 'so': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier For the Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'sv': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifierare för den medicinska domänen baserad på BERT', 'ta': 'TIMBERT: BERT அடிப்படையிலான மருத்துவ களத்திற்கான Toponym Identifier for the Medical Domain', 'ur': 'TIMBERT: BERT پر بنیاد پزشکی ڈومین کے لئے Toponym Identifier', 'uz': "TIMBERT: BERT asosida yaratilgan Toponym ID'iyasi", 'vi': 'Tim mê thân cho lĩnh vực Y khoa Dựa trên BERT.', 'bg': 'Тимбърт: Топоним идентификатор за медицинския домейн въз основа на BERT', 'da': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier for det medicinske domæne baseret på BERT', 'hr': 'TIMBERT: Toponim identifikator za medicinsku domenu baziran na BERT-u', 'nl': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier voor het medische domein gebaseerd op BERT', 'de': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier für den medizinischen Bereich basierend auf BERT', 'id': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier For The Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'ko': 'TIMBERT: BERT 기반 의학 분야 지명 식별자', 'fa': 'شناسایی توپونیم برای دامنه پزشکی بر اساس BERT', 'sw': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier For The Medical Domain Based on BERT', 'tr': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sq': 'Identifikues i toponimit për domenin mjekësor bazuar në BERT', 'am': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier for the Medical Domain based on BERT', 'hy': 'Բժշկական բժշկական ոլորտի վերնագիր հիմնված BER-ի վրա', 'bn': 'টিম্বেরেট: বার্ট ভিত্তিক মেডিকেল ডোমেইনের জন্য টোপোনিম পরিচিতি', 'az': 'TİMBİRT: BERT Üstündə TİBİR DÖMÜNİ DÖMÜNİ İZNI', 'ca': 'TIMBERT: Identificador de topònims per al domini mèdic basat en BERT', 'bs': 'Toponim identifikator za medicinsku domenu baziran na BERT-u', 'cs': 'TIMBERT: Identifikátor toponymu pro lékařskou oblast založený na BERT', 'et': 'TIMBERT: Toponüümi identifikaator meditsiinilise domeeni jaoks, mis põhineb BERT-il', 'fi': 'TIMBERT: Toponym-tunniste lääketieteelliselle verkkotunnukselle BERT:n perusteella', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'TIMBERT: Toponimski identifikator za medicinsko domeno na podlagi BERT', 'jv': '1', 'he': 'זיהוי טופונים לתחום הרפואי מבוסס על BERT', 'bo': 'TIMBERT: Toponym Identifier For The Medical Domain Based on BERT'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose an approach to automate the process of place name detection in the medical domain to enable epidemiologists to better study and model the spread of viruses. We created a family of Toponym Identification Models based on BERT (TIMBERT), in order to learn in an end-to-end fashion the mapping from an input sentence to the associated sentence labeled with toponyms. When evaluated with the SemEval 2019 task 12 test set (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), our best TIMBERT model achieves an F1 score of 90.85 %, a significant improvement compared to the state-of-the-art of 89.13 % (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا لأتمتة عملية اكتشاف اسم المكان في المجال الطبي لتمكين علماء الأوبئة من دراسة ونمذجة انتشار الفيروسات بشكل أفضل. لقد أنشأنا عائلة من نماذج تحديد أسماء المواقع الجغرافية استنادًا إلى BERT (TIMBERT) ، من أجل التعلم بطريقة شاملة ، التعيين من جملة الإدخال إلى الجملة المرتبطة المصنفة بأسماء المواقع الجغرافية. عند تقييمه باستخدام مجموعة الاختبارات 12 للمهمة SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al. ، 2019) ، فإن أفضل نموذج TIMBERT لدينا يحقق درجة F1 بنسبة 90.85٪ ، وهو تحسن كبير مقارنة بأحدث ما توصل إليه العلم عند 89.13٪ (Wang et آل ، 2019).', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque para automatizar el proceso de detección de nombres de lugares en el dominio médico para permitir a los epidemiólogos estudiar y modelar mejor la propagación de virus. Creamos una familia de modelos de identificación de topónimos basados en BERT (TIMBERT), para aprender de manera integral el mapeo de una oración de entrada a la oración asociada etiquetada con topónimos. Cuando se evalúa con el conjunto de pruebas de la tarea 12 de SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), nuestro mejor modelo TIMBERT logra una puntuación F1 del 90,85%, una mejora significativa en comparación con el estado de la técnica del 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche pour automatiser le processus de détection des noms de lieux dans le domaine médical afin de permettre aux épidémiologistes de mieux étudier et modéliser la propagation des virus. Nous avons créé une famille de modèles d'identification de toponymes basés sur BERT (TIMBERT), afin d'apprendre de bout en bout le mappage entre une phrase saisie et la phrase associée étiquetée avec des toponymes. Lorsqu'il est évalué avec l'ensemble de tests SemEval 2019 task 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), notre meilleur modèle TIMBERT obtient un score F1 de 90,85\xa0%, une amélioration significative par rapport à la technologie de pointe de 89,13\xa0% (Wang et al., 2019).", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem para automatizar o processo de detecção de nomes de lugares no domínio médico para permitir que os epidemiologistas estudem e modelem melhor a disseminação de vírus. Criamos uma família de Modelos de Identificação de Topônimos baseados no BERT (TIMBERT), com o objetivo de aprender de forma ponta a ponta o mapeamento de uma sentença de entrada para a sentença associada rotulada com topônimos. Quando avaliado com o conjunto de testes SemEval 2019 task 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), nosso melhor modelo TIMBERT alcança uma pontuação F1 de 90,85%, uma melhora significativa em comparação com o estado da arte de 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ja': '本稿では、疫学者がウイルスの拡散をよりよく研究し、モデル化することを可能にするために、医療領域における地名検出のプロセスを自動化するアプローチを提案する。入力文から地名でラベル付けされた関連する文へのマッピングをエンドツーエンドで学習するために、BERT （ TIMBERT ）に基づいて地名識別モデルのファミリーを作成しました。SemEval 2019タスク12テストセット（ Weissenbacher et al., 2019 ）で評価した場合、当社の最良のTIMBERTモデルは、F 1スコア90.85%を達成し、89.13%の最先端と比較して大幅に改善します（ Wang et al., 2019 ）。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы предлагаем подход к автоматизации процесса определения названия места в медицинской сфере, чтобы позволить эпидемиологам лучше изучать и моделировать распространение вирусов. Мы создали семейство моделей идентификации топонимов на основе BERT (TIMBERT), чтобы изучать сквозным образом отображение от входного предложения к связанному предложению, помеченному топонимами. При оценке с помощью тестового набора задачи 12 SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) наша лучшая модель TIMBERT достигает балла F1 90,85%, что является значительным улучшением по сравнению с современным набором 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम चिकित्सा डोमेन में जगह के नाम का पता लगाने की प्रक्रिया को स्वचालित करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि महामारीविदों को वायरस के प्रसार का बेहतर अध्ययन और मॉडल करने में सक्षम बनाया जा सके। हमने BERT (TIMBERT) के आधार पर Toponym Identification Models का एक परिवार बनाया है, ताकि एक इनपुट वाक्य से मानचित्रण को एक इनपुट वाक्य से toponyms के साथ लेबल किए गए संबंधित वाक्य तक सीखने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड फैशन में सीखा जा सके। जब SemEval 2019 कार्य 12 परीक्षण सेट (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) के साथ मूल्यांकन किया जाता है, तो हमारा सबसे अच्छा TIMBERT मॉडल 90.85% का F1 स्कोर प्राप्त करता है, जो 89.13% (वांग एट अल।', 'zh': '于本文中,发一自动化法于医学领域,使流行病学家得究拟病毒之传。 创BERT(TIMBERT)地名识模系列,以端到端学自输句到标有关句射。 当用SemEval 2019务12试集(Weissenbacher等,2019)为评估,以至TIMBERT模致90.85%之F1得分,比先进之89.13%,显进(Wang等,2019)。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige chun an próiseas braite logainmneacha sa réimse leighis a uathoibriú chun cur ar chumas eipidéimeolaithe staidéar níos fearr a dhéanamh ar scaipeadh víreas agus samhaltú a dhéanamh air. Chruthaíomar teaghlach de Mhúnlaí Aitheantais Toponym bunaithe ar BERT (TIMBERT), chun an léarscáiliú ó abairt ionchuir go dtí an abairt ghaolmhar lipéadaithe le hainmfhocail a fhoghlaim ar bhealach ceann go ceann. Nuair a dhéantar meastóireacht air le tacar tástála tasc 12 SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), éiríonn lenár múnla TIMBERT is fearr scór F1 de 90.85%, feabhas suntasach i gcomparáid leis an stát is déanaí de 89.13% (Wang et al. al., 2019).', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan megközelítést javasolunk, amely automatizálja a helynév felismerésének folyamatát az orvosi területen, hogy az epidemiológusok jobban tanulmányozhassák és modellezhessék a vírusok terjedését. A BERT (TIMBERT) alapján létrehoztuk a Toponym azonosító modellek családját annak érdekében, hogy teljes körűen megismerjük a feltérképezést egy beviteli mondattól a toponymokkal ellátott mondatig. A SemEval 2019 feladat 12 tesztkészlettel (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) értékelve a legjobb TIMBERT modellünk 90,85%-os F1 pontszámot ér el, ami jelentős javulás a legkorszerűbb 89,13%-hoz képest (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომებით აღმოჩნეთ მოხმარება, რომელიც ავტომატურად სახელის განვიხმარების პროცესი მედიციონალური დიომინში, რომ ეპიდემილოგები უფრო უფრო მე ჩვენ შევქმნით ტეონომის იდენტიფიკაციის მოდელების ოჯახი BERT (TIMBERT) დაბაზეული, რომ დასწავლათ საბოლოო დასრულებული ფორმაში მარტიფიკაციას, რომელიც ტეონომისთან დასრულებული სიტყვების შესახებ როცა SemEval 2019-ის ტესტის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი მოდელი (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), ჩვენი ყველაზე საუკეთესო TIMBERT მოდელი მიიღება 90,85%-ის F1 მოდელი, რაც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση για την αυτοματοποίηση της διαδικασίας ανίχνευσης τοπωνύμων στον ιατρικό τομέα, ώστε να δοθεί η δυνατότητα στους επιδημιολόγους να μελετήσουν και να μοντελοποιήσουν καλύτερα την εξάπλωση των ιών. Δημιουργήσαμε μια οικογένεια μοντέλων ταυτοποίησης τοπωνύμων με βάση το προκειμένου να μάθουμε με τρόπο ολοκληρωμένο τη χαρτογράφηση από μια πρόταση εισόδου στην αντίστοιχη πρόταση με τοπωνύμια. Όταν αξιολογείται με το σύνολο δοκιμών εργασίας 2019 (κ.α., 2019), το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει βαθμολογία F1 90,85%, σημαντική βελτίωση σε σύγκριση με την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio per automatizzare il processo di rilevamento dei nomi dei luoghi nel settore medico per consentire agli epidemiologi di studiare e modellare meglio la diffusione dei virus. Abbiamo creato una famiglia di modelli di identificazione toponima basati su BERT (TIMBERT), al fine di imparare in modo end-to-end la mappatura da una frase di input alla frase associata etichettata con toponimi. Valutato con il set di test SemEval 2019 task 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), il nostro miglior modello TIMBERT raggiunge un punteggio F1 del 90,85%, un miglioramento significativo rispetto allo stato dell'arte dell'89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).", 'mk': 'Во овој весник предложуваме пристап за автоматизација на процесот на детекција на името на местото во медицинската област за да им овозможиме на епидемиолозите подобро да студираат и да моделираат ширење на вируси. Ние создадовме семејство на модели за идентификација на топонимот базирани на BERT (TIMBERT), со цел да научиме од крај до крај мапирање од вводна реченица до поврзаната реченица означена со топонимови. Кога ќе биде проценет со тестот 12 на SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher и ал., 2019), нашиот најдобар модел ТИМБЕРТ постигнува оценка Ф1 од 90,85 отсто, значително подобрување во споредба со најсовремените 89,13 отсто (Wang и ал., 2019).', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз медицина доменінде атау табу процесін автоматты түрде ауыстыру үшін эпидемиологиялықтарды жақсы зерттеу және вирус таратуды үлгілеу үшін арқылы ұсындық. Біз BERT (TIMBERT) негізінде топонимді идентификациялау үлгілерінің отбасын құрдық. Соңғы соңғы мәліметі бойынша топонимді жазылған келтірілген сөйлемеге сәйкес келтірілген сәйкес келтірілген сә SemEval 2019 тапсырманың 12 сынақтарын бағалағанда (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), ең жақсы TIMBERT моделіміз 90,85% деген F1 нәтижесін жеткізеді, 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome metodą automatizuoti vietos pavadinimų nustatymo procesą medicinos srityje, kad epidemiologai galėtų geriau tirti ir modeliuoti virusų plitimą. Sukūrėme toponimų identifikavimo modelių šeimą, pagrįstą BERT (TIMBERT), kad galų gale išmoktume žemėlapius nuo įvadinio sakinio iki susijusio sakinio, pažymėto toponimais. Vertindami pagal SemEval 2019 m. 12 užduoties bandymų rinkinį (Weissenbacher et al., 2019 m.), geriausias mūsų TIMBERT modelis pasiekia F1 rezultatą 90,85 %, reikšmingą pagerėjimą, palyginti su 89,13 % (Wang et al., 2019 m.).', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan untuk automatisikan proses pengesan nama tempat dalam domain perubatan untuk membolehkan epidemiolog untuk mempelajari dan model penyebaran virus lebih baik. Kami mencipta sebuah keluarga Model Identifikasi Toponym berdasarkan BERT (TIMBERT), untuk belajar dengan cara akhir-akhir petakan dari kalimat input ke kalimat berkaitan yang ditabel dengan toponym. Apabila diteliti dengan set ujian 12 tugas SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), model TIMBERT terbaik kita mencapai skor F1 90,85%, peningkatan yang signifikan dibandingkan dengan keadaan-state-of-the-art 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ biex jiġi awtomatizzat il-proċess ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-isem tal-post fid-dominju mediku sabiex l-epidemjologi jkunu jistgħu jistudjaw u jimmudellaw aħjar it-tixrid tal-virus. Ħolmuna familja ta’ Mudelli ta’ Identifikazzjoni tat-Toponimi bbażati fuq BERT (TIMBERT), sabiex nitgħallmu b’mod minn tarf sa tarf l-immappjar minn sentenza ta’ input għas-sentenza assoċjata ttikkettata bit-toponimi. Meta evalwat bis-sett tat-test 12 tal-kompitu SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), l-a ħjar mudell tagħna TIMBERT jilħaq punteġġ F1 ta’ 90.85%, titjib sinifikanti meta mqabbel mal-aktar avvanzat ta’ 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид эпидемиологийн судлаачид вирусын тархалтыг сайн судалж, загварчлах боломжийг автоматжуулах арга зам зааж байна. Бид BERT (TIMBERT) дээр үндсэн Toponym Identification Models гэр бүл бүтээсэн. Эцэст нь төгсгөл аргаар суралцахын тулд топонимд нэрлэгдсэн өгүүлбэрээс газрын зураг зураг бий болгосон. SemEval 2019-н ажлын 12 шалгалтын багш (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), бидний хамгийн шилдэг TIMBERT загварын багш нь 90.85%-ын тоо гарч ирсэн бөгөөд 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനിലെ പേര് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയെ സ്വയമാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വഴി പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി (ടിമെര്\u200dട്ടി) അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ടോപോണിമിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള മോഡലുകളുടെ ഒരു കുടുംബത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചു. അവസാന വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും ടോപ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റ് സെറ്റ് സെറ്റ് (വെയിസെന്\u200dബാച്ചര്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d, 2019) നിരീക്ഷിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ടിമെബെര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡല്\u200d 90.85% നേടുന്ന ഒരു F1 സ്കോര്\u200d നേ', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein tilnærming til å automatisera prosessen for oppdaging av namn på plass i medisinsk domenet for å slå på epidemiologisten til å bedre studier og modellere spreidinga av virusa. Vi oppretta ein familie av toponym- identifikasjonsmodular basert på BERT (TIMBERT), for å lære mapping a frå ein innsetjing til den tilknytte setninga med toponymmer i ein sluttmodus. Når det er evaluert med testsettet «SemEval 2019» (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), har vårt beste TIMBERT-modellen nådd eit F1-poeng med 90,85%, eit signifikante forbedring samanlikna med kunsttilstanden til 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o abordare pentru automatizarea procesului de detectare a numelui locului în domeniul medical pentru a permite epidemiologilor să studieze mai bine și să modeleze răspândirea virușilor. Am creat o familie de modele de identificare toponimă bazate pe BERT (TIMBERT), pentru a învăța într-un mod end-to-end cartografierea de la o propoziție de intrare la propoziția asociată etichetată cu toponime. Atunci când este evaluat cu setul de testare SemEval 2019 task 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), cel mai bun model TIMBERT al nostru obține un scor F1 de 90,85%, o îmbunătățire semnificativă în comparație cu starea de ultimă generație de 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy podejście do automatyzacji procesu wykrywania nazw miejscowych w dziedzinie medycznej, aby umożliwić epidemiologom lepsze badanie i modelowanie rozprzestrzeniania się wirusów. Stworzyliśmy rodzinę modeli identyfikacji toponymów opartych na BERT (TIMBERT), aby nauczyć się w sposób end-to-end mapowania ze zdania wejściowego do zdania związanego z nim oznaczonego toponimem. Po ocenie zestawu testowego SemEval 2019 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), nasz najlepszy model TIMBERT osiąga wynik F1 90,85%, znaczącą poprawę w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszym stanem techniki 89.13% (Wang i al., 2019).', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාප අපි BERT (TIMBERT) විසින් අධාරිත විශාල පවුලක් නිර්මාණය කළා, ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වාක්යෙන් ඇතුළත් වාක්යෙන්  සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණා සැටිය 12 (Weissenbacer et al., 2019), අපේ හොඳම TIMBERT මොඩේල් එක 90.85% වල F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා, 89.13% වල ස්ථානයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වි', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo jeedaynaa qaabab aan automatino baaritaanka magaca goobta caafimaadka, si ay u fududeeyaan dhakhtarka cudurada si ay u bartaan oo u sameyn karto barashada virusiyada. Waxaan ku abuurnay qoys ka mid ah qoyska aqoonsiga Toponym, taasoo ku saleysan BERT (TIMBERT), si a an ugu dambaysta u barto qorniinka sawirada laga soo galo xafiiska la xiriiray oo la xiriiray jaamacadda. Markii lagu qiimeeyo shuqulka 12-jirka ee SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan ee TIMBERT wuxuu gaadhaa koox F1 oo 90.85%, hagaajinta aad u weyn sameynaysa dowladda-sanadda 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup automatskom otkrivanju imena u medicinskom domenu kako bi epidemiolozi omogućili da bolje prouče i modele širenje virusa. Stvorili smo porodicu Toponima identifikacijskih modela na osnovu BERT (TIMBERT), kako bi naučili na kraju do kraja mapiranje od unutarnje rečenice do povezane rečenice označene toponima. Kada je procenjeno sa 12 testova za posao semiEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), naš najbolji TIMBERT model postiže rezultat F1 od 90,85%, značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi sa stanjem umjetnosti 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett tillvägagångssätt för att automatisera processen för platsnamnsdetektion inom den medicinska domänen för att möjliggöra epidemiologer att bättre studera och modellera spridningen av virus. Vi skapade en familj av toponym identifieringsmodeller baserade på BERT (TIMBERT), för att på ett heltäckande sätt lära oss kartläggningen från en inmatningssats till den associerade meningen märkt med toponymer. Vid utvärdering med SemEval 2019 task 12 testset (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) uppnår vår bästa TIMBERT-modell en F1-poäng på 90,85%, en signifikant förbättring jämfört med toppmodern 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மருத்துவ களத்தில் பெயர் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை தானாகவே பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நோயாளிகள் சிறந்த படி BERT (TIMBERT) அடிப்படையில் நாம் டோபானிம் அடிப்படையில் ஒரு குடும்பம் உருவாக்கினோம், தலைப்புகளுடன் குறிப்பிட்ட இணைய வாக்கியத்தில் இருந்து வரைபடத்தை ம SemEval 2019 செயல் 12 சோதனை அமைப்புடன் மதிப்பெடுக்கப்பட்டது', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ دکترین ڈومین میں جگہ کا نام شناسایے کا پروسس اٹوکیٹ کرے کہ اپیڈمیلوگروں کو اچھی طریقہ پڑھنے اور ویروس کے پھیلانے کی مدل کریں۔ ہم نے BERT (TIMBERT) پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے توپونیم شناسایی موڈل کے خاندان کو پیدا کیا ہے تاکہ ایک انتہائی انتہائی صورت میں سیکھ سکیں جبکہ سمیوئل 2019 ٹیسٹ 12 ٹیسٹ سٹ (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) کے ساتھ ارزش کیا گیا تھا، ہمارے سب سے بہترین TIMBERT موڈل 90.85% سے F1 سکوٹ پہنچ جاتا ہے، 89.13% کی حالت کے مقابلہ میں ایک بڑی اضافہ ہے (Wang et al., 2019).', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz tibbiy domenadagi joylarning nomini aniqlash jarayonini avtomatik rivojlanishini anglatamiz va epidemiologilarni yaxshi o'rganish va virus tarmoqni modellashga yordam beramiz. Biz BERT (TIMBERT) asosida Toponym Identization Modellarini yaratdik, toponam bilan bogʻliq bir so'zlar bilan bogʻliq gaplamdan bir oxiriga qartasini o'rganish uchun tugmalar tartibi. SemEval 2019 vazifa 12 tizimi bilan qiymatiga (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), bizning eng yuqori TIMBERT modeli 90.85 foizga ega bo'ladi, 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019) davridagi davlatdan juda muhim yaxshi darajaga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tự động hoá hoá tiến trình phát hiện tên nơi ở trong lĩnh vực y học để cho các nhà dịch bệnh có thể nghiên cứu tốt hơn và mô hình lây lan của vi-rút. Chúng tôi đã tạo ra một gia đình các kiểu nhận diện Toponym dựa trên BERT (TIM BERT) để học theo cách kết thúc-cuối cùng cách tạo bản đồ từ câu khai nhập đến câu nói liên kết với các loại địa hình. Khi đánh giá với bộ thử nghiệm hoàn hảo tại SemEvl 209 (Weissenbacher et al., 2009), theo kiểu TIM BERT tốt nhất đạt được một số F1 của 905=, một tiến bộ đáng kể so với Vương tinh tối tân của 89.13= (et al., 209).', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме подход за автоматизиране на процеса на откриване на имена на място в областта на медицината, за да се даде възможност на епидемиолозите да изследват и моделират по-добре разпространението на вируси. Създадохме семейство топонимни идентификационни модели, базирани на БРТ (ТИМБЕРТ), за да научим по един начин от край до край картографирането от входно изречение към свързаното изречение, етикетирано с топоними. Когато се оценява с тестовия комплект задача 12 (Вайсенбахер и др., 2019), нашият най-добър модел постига резултат от 90,85%, значително подобрение в сравнение с най-съвременните 89,13% (Уанг и др., 2019).', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup automatskom otkrivanju imena u medicinskom domenu kako bi epidemiolozi omogućili bolje proučavanje i model širenja virusa. Stvorili smo obitelj Toponim identifikacijskih modela na temelju BERT (TIMBERT), kako bismo naučili na kraju do kraja mapiranje od unutarnje rečenice do povezane rečenice označene toponima. Kada je procijenjeno sa 12 testova zadataka za SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), naš najbolji model TIMBERT postigao je rezultat F1 od 90,85%, značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi s stanjem umjetnosti 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en tilgang til automatisering af processen med stednavn detektering på det medicinske domæne for at gøre epidemiologer i stand til bedre at studere og modellere spredningen af virus. Vi skabte en familie af Toponym Identification Models baseret på BERT (TIMBERT), for at lære på en end-to-end måde kortlægningen fra en input sætning til den tilhørende sætning mærket med toponymer. Ved vurdering med SemEval 2019 opgave 12 testsæt (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) opnår vores bedste TIMBERT model en F1 score på 90,85%, en betydelig forbedring i forhold til state-of-the-art på 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen Ansatz vor, um den Prozess der Ortsnamenerkennung im medizinischen Bereich zu automatisieren, damit Epidemiologen die Ausbreitung von Viren besser untersuchen und modellieren können. Wir haben eine Familie von Toponym Identification Models erstellt, die auf BERT (TIMBERT) basieren, um die Zuordnung von einem Eingabesatz zum zugehörigen Satz mit Toponymen zu erlernen. Bei der Auswertung mit dem SemEval 2019 Task 12 Testset (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) erreicht unser bestes TIMBERT-Modell eine F1-Punktzahl von 90,85%, eine deutliche Verbesserung gegenüber dem Stand der Technik 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که فرایند شناسایی نام جایگاهی را در دامنه پزشکی اتوماتیک کنیم تا به افتیدمیولوژست\u200cها توان تحقیق بهتر و مدل گسترش ویروس\u200cها را بهتر کند. ما خانواده\u200cای از مدل شناسایی توپونیم را بر اساس BERT (TIMBERT) ایجاد کردیم تا در یک شکل پایان یاد گیریم نقشه\u200cبندی از یک جمله ورودی به جمله\u200cای که با توپونیم مشترک شده است. وقتی با مجموعه آزمایش ۱۲ کار نیمه ۲۰۱۹ (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) ارزیابی شد، بهترین مدل TIMBERT ما یک امتیاز F1 در حدود ۹۰.۸۵ درصد رسیده است، بهترین پیشرفت بزرگی در مقایسه با حالت هنر 89.۳ درصد (Wang et al., 2019).', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan untuk otomatisasi proses deteksi nama tempat di daerah medis untuk memungkinkan epidemiolog untuk mempelajari dan model penyebaran virus lebih baik. Kami menciptakan sebuah keluarga dari Model Identifikasi Toponym berdasarkan BERT (TIMBERT), untuk belajar dengan cara akhir-akhir peta dari kalimat masukan ke kalimat terkait yang ditabel dengan toponym. Ketika diteliti dengan tugas SemEval 2019 12 set tes (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), model TIMBERT terbaik kami mencapai skor F1 90,85%, peningkatan yang signifikan dibandingkan dengan state-of-the-art 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 자동화 의학 분야의 지명 검출 과정의 방법을 제시하여 유행병학자들이 바이러스의 전파를 더욱 잘 연구하고 모의할 수 있도록 했다.우리는 입력 문장에서 지명이 표시된 관련 문장에 이르기까지 일련의 버트 기반의 지명 식별 모델을 만들었다.SemEval 2019 task 12 테스트세트(Weissenbacher 등, 2019)를 사용해 평가할 때 우리의 베스트 TIMBERT 모델의 F1은 90.85%로 현재의 89.13%(Wang 등, 2019)에 비해 현저하게 개선됐다.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za kutetea mchakato wa kutambua jina la ndani ya matibabu ili kuwawezesha wanamgonjwa wa ugonjwa wa magonjwa kujifunza vizuri na kutengeneza sambamba ya virusi. Tumetengeneza familia ya Modeli ya Utambulizi wa Toponym yenye msingi wa BERT (TIMBERT), ili kujifunza kwa njia ya mwisho ya ramani kutoka kwenye hukumu ya input hadi hukumu inayohusiana na mada. Wakati ulipopitiwa na juhudi la SemEval 2019 la jaribio la 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), model yetu bora ya TIMBERT inafanikiwa score ya F1 ya asilimia 90.85, maboresho makubwa yanalinganisha na hali ya sanaa 89.13 (Wang et al., 2019).', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n toegang om die proses van plek naam beskrywing in die mediese domein te automatiseer om epidemiologiese te aktiveer om beter studie en model te versprei van viruses. Ons het 'n familie van Toponym Identifikasie Models gebaseer op BERT (TIMBERT), om in 'n einde- na- einde modus te leer die kaart van' n invoer seting na die geassosieerde seting wat met toponyms gemerk is. Wanneer met die SemEval 2019 taak 12 toets stel (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), ons beste TIMBERT model bereik 'n F1 aantal van 90,85%, 'n betaling verbetering vergelyk met die staat-van-kuns van 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).", 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een aanpak voor om het proces van plaatsnaamdetectie in het medische domein te automatiseren, zodat epidemiologen de verspreiding van virussen beter kunnen bestuderen en modelleren. We creëerden een familie van Toponym Identification Models gebaseerd op BERT (TIMBERT), om op een end-to-end manier de toewijzing van een invoerzin naar de bijbehorende zin gelabeld met toponiemen te leren. Wanneer geëvalueerd met de SemEval 2019 task 12 testset (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), behaalt ons beste TIMBERT model een F1 score van 90,85%, een significante verbetering ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art van 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një qasje për të automatizuar procesin e zbulimit të emrit të vendit në fushën mjekësore për të mundësuar epidemiologët të studiojnë më mirë dhe të modelojnë përhapjen e virusve. We created a family of Toponym Identification Models based on BERT (TIMBERT), in order to learn in an end-to-end fashion the mapping from an input sentence to the associated sentence labeled with toponyms.  When evaluated with the SemEval 2019 task 12 test set (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), our best TIMBERT model achieves an F1 score of 90.85%, a significant improvement compared to the state-of-the-art of 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz lukmanyň adyny tapmak prosesini otomatik etmek üçin epidemiologlaryň gowy öwrenmesini we wiruslaryň yayılmasyny mümkin etmegi we nusgasyny teklip edýäris. BERT (TIMBERT) tarapyna daýan ýan Toponym Kimlik Modelleriniň bir maşgalasyny bejerdik. Soňunda soňunda toponymlar bilen etilen sözleriň mappasyny öwrenmek üçin bir şekilde ýöredik. SemEval 2019 täzim 12-nji test seti bilen deňlendirildikde (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), biziň iň gowy TIMBERT nusgasymyz 90.85% derejesinde bir F1 अंतर gazanýar, 89.13%-nji sungatyň durumyna görä möhüm gelişmesi bolar (Wang et al., 2019).', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የድምፅ ስም ማግኘት በጥምቀት ውስጥ ያሉትን የአፍሪካ ድምፅ መግለጫ እና የቪሮሽን መተማርና መዘርጋት ማድረግ እናስችላለን፡፡ BERT (TIMBERT) በመሠረት የToponym Identification Models ቤተሰብ ፈጠርነው፤ በፍጻሜ ወደ መጨረሻ ክፍል ማረጃ ከጥያቄ ክፍል ወደ ቶፓኒም ክፍል በተለየ ግንኙነት የተደረገውን ክፍል ለመማር ነው፡፡ በSemEval 2019 ሥርዓት 12 ፈተና ሰርቨር (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) በተለየ ጊዜ የተሻለፈው የTIMBERT ሞዴል 90.85 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոտեցում բժշկական ոլորտում տեղային անունների հայտնաբերման գործընթացի ավտոմատիկացնելու համար, որպեսզի համաճարաբանները ավելի լավ ուսումնասիրեն և մոդելավորեն վիրուսների տարածումը: Մենք ստեղծեցինք Թոպոնիմի ինքնության մոդելների ընտանիք, որը հիմնված է BERT (TIMBERT) վրա, որպեսզի վերջ-վերջ ձևով սովորեցնենք քարտեզագրությունը ներմուծի նախադասությունից մինչև կապված նախադասությունը, որը պիտակում է թոպոնիմներով: Երբ մեր լավագույն TIMBERT մոդելը գնահատվում է 2019 թվականի 12-րդ թեստերի միջոցով (Վեյսենբայքեր և այլն., 2019 թվականը), մեր լավագույն TIMBERT մոդելը հասնում է F1 գնահատականի 90.85 տոկոսի, որը նշանակալի բարելավում է, համեմատած 89.13 տոկոսի լավագույն տեխնոլոգի', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, epidemioloqların daha yaxşı təhsil etməsini və virüslərin yayılmasını sağlamaq üçün təhsil edirik. Biz BERT (TIMBERT) vasitəsilə Toponym Kimlik Modellərinin ailəsini yaratdıq, sona-sona gələn cümlədən toponymla etiketlənmiş cümlələrə bağlı bir cümlədən maplandırmağı öyrənmək üçün. SemEval 2019 task 12 test seti ilə değerlendirildikdə (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), bizim ən yaxşı TIMBERT modelimiz 90,85%-dən F1 dəqiqəsini qəbul edir, 89,13%-in mövcuddur (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament per automatitzar el procés de detecció del nom de lloc en el domini mèdic per a que els epidèmiologistes puguin estudiar i modelar millor la difusió de virus. We created a family of Toponym Identification Models based on BERT (TIMBERT), in order to learn in an end-to-end fashion the mapping from an input sentence to the associated sentence labeled with toponyms.  Quan es va evaluar amb la tasca 12 de SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), el nostre millor model TIMBERT aconsegueix una puntuació F1 del 90,85%, una millora significativa comparada amb l'última de 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা চিকিৎসার ডোমেইনে নাম সনাক্ত করার প্রক্রিয়াকে স্বয়ংক্রিয় করার একটি উপায় প্রস্তাব করেছি যাতে পরিস্থিতি বিদ্যালয়েরা  বেরেট (টিম্বার্ট) ভিত্তিক একটি টোপোনিম পরিচিতি মডেলের একটি পরিবার তৈরি করেছি যাতে শেষ পর্যন্ত মানচিত্রের মানচিত্র শিখতে পারে যে বিষয়বস্তুর সাথে য সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের ১২ টেস্ট সেট (উইসেনব্যাচারেট আল, ২০১৯), আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভাল টিম্বারেট মডেল ৯০. ৮৫%, ৮৯.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme přístup k automatizaci procesu detekce místních jmen v lékařské oblasti s cílem umožnit epidemiologům lépe studovat a modelovat šíření virů. Vytvořili jsme rodinu toponymových identifikačních modelů založených na BERT (TIMBERT), abychom se naučili komplexně mapovat ze vstupní věty k přidružené větě označené toponymy. Při hodnocení pomocí testovací sady SemEval 2019 úkolů 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019) dosahuje náš nejlepší model TIMBERT skóre F1 90,85%, což je významné zlepšení ve srovnání s nejmodernějším modelem 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup automatskom otkrivanju imena u medicinskom domenu kako bi epidemiolozi omogućili bolje proučavanje i modelu širenja virusa. Stvorili smo porodicu Toponim identifikacijskih modela na osnovu BERT (TIMBERT), kako bi naučili na kraju do kraja mapiranje od unutarnje rečenice do povezane rečenice označene toponima. Kada je procijenjeno sa setom ispitivanja 12 zadataka za SemEval 2019 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), naš najbolji model TIMBERT postigao je rezultat F1 od 90,85%, značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi s stanjem umjetnosti 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja lähenemisviisi kohanimede tuvastamise protsessi automatiseerimiseks meditsiinivaldkonnas, et epidemioloogid saaksid viiruste levikut paremini uurida ja modelleerida. Lõime BERT-il (TIMBERT) põhineva toponüümi identifitseerimismudelite perekonna, et õppida lõpuni kaardistamist sisendlausest toponüümidega märgistatud lauseni. Kui hinnatakse SemEval 2019 ülesande 12 testikomplektiga (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), saavutab meie parim TIMBERT mudel F1 skoori 90,85%, mis on oluline paranemine võrreldes kaasaegse 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme lähestymistapaa paikannimien tunnistamisen automatisointiin lääketieteen alalla, jotta epidemiologit voisivat paremmin tutkia ja mallintaa virusten leviämistä. Luomme BERT:iin (TIMBERT) perustuvien toponymien tunnistusmallien perheen, jotta opimme alusta loppuun kartoituksen syöttölauseesta siihen liittyvään toponyymillä merkittyyn lauseeseen. Kun testiä arvioidaan SemEval 2019 -tehtävällä 12 (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), paras TIMBERT-mallimme saavuttaa F1-pisteet 90,85%, mikä on merkittävä parannus verrattuna uusimpaan 89,13%:iin (Wang et al., 2019).', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo pristop k avtomatizaciji procesa odkrivanja krajevnih imen v medicinski domeni, da bi epidemiologi lahko bolje preučevali in modelirali širjenje virusov. Ustvarili smo družino toponimskih identifikacijskih modelov, ki temeljijo na BERT (TIMBERT), da bi se na način naučili kartiranja iz vhodnega stavka do povezanega stavka, označenega s toponimi. Naš najboljši model TIMBERT doseže rezultat F1 90,85%, kar je pomembno izboljšanje v primerjavi z najsodobnejšim 89,13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Muke bukãtar da wani matsayi zuwa farat-farat zartar da surar sunan a wurin a cikin dawarin da za'a yi amfani da wajen karatun agolojiya ta zama mafi kyaun karatun kuma za'a sami misalin ayuka. Kuma Mun halitta wani gidan Famili na Tapponym, an a ƙayyade BERT (TIMEERT), dõmin a sanar da shi cikin shirin ƙarshen dawwama kartoni daga wani cewa da aka yi na da shi na haɗi da cewa na toponium. A lokacin da aka evaluce shi da aikin Semeval 2019 na sami-jarraba 12 (Weissenbachen et al., 2019), wato mafi kyaun shirin TIMEERT yana sami wata F1 score na 90.85%, mai girma sami da the state-of-art of 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).", 'jv': 'In this paper, we proposal an method to Automate the operation of name detection in the therapist domain to Enable Epidaelogists to install and model the expand of biruse. We create a Awakdhéwé énêrsêni cara-cara sing nambah karo seminval 2011 sampek 12 uwong nggawe test (Wess nbacer et al, 2011), model sing paling dhéwé parang TIMBENT kuwi nggawe roti F1 sing katêr, sing wis dipolet nggawe gerarané karo perusahaan-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה לאוטומטיקה את תהליך זיהוי שמות מקום בתחום הרפואי כדי לאפשר לאפידמיולוגים ללמוד טוב יותר ולדגם את התפשטות של וירוסים. יצרנו משפחה של דוגמני זיהוי טופונים מבוססים על BERT (TIMBERT), כדי ללמוד באופן סוף-סוף את המפה משפט הכניסה למשפט הקשור עם טופונימים. When evaluated with the SemEval 2019 task 12 test set (Weissenbacher et al., 2019), our best TIMBERT model achieves an F1 score of 90.85%, a significant improvement compared to the state-of-the-art of 89.13% (Wang et al., 2019).', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྒེར་གྱི་མིང་རྟོགས་བཤེར་སྒོ་སྒྲིག་དང་། We created a family of Toponym Identification Models based on BERT (TIMBERT), in order to learn in an end-to-end fashion the mapping from an input sentence to the associated sentence labeled with toponyms. SemEval 2019ལྟ་བ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན། ཝེ་ssenbacher et al., 2019), ང་ཚོའི་ཆེས་མཐའ་ TIMBERT མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་མཁན་ནི་90.85% རིམ་པ་ཞིག་འབྲི་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་མཉམ་མཁན'}
{'en': 'Identifying Depressive Symptoms from Tweets : Figurative Language Enabled Multitask Learning Framework', 'ar': 'تحديد أعراض الاكتئاب من التغريدات: إطار عمل تعلم متعدد المهام يدعم اللغة التصويرية', 'pt': 'Identificando sintomas depressivos de tweets: estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa habilitada para linguagem figurativa', 'es': 'Identificación de síntomas depresivos a partir de tuits: marco de aprendizaje multitarea habilitado para el lenguaje figurativo', 'fr': "Identifier les symptômes dépressifs à partir de tweets\xa0: cadre d'apprentissage multitâche basé sur le langage figuratif", 'ja': 'ツイートから抑うつ症状を特定する：比喩的言語対応マルチタスク学習フレームワーク', 'hi': 'Tweets से अवसादग्रस्तता लक्षणों की पहचान: आलंकारिक भाषा सक्षम Multitask लर्निंग फ्रेमवर्क', 'zh': '以推文识抑郁症状:赞言语之多任务学框架', 'ru': 'Выявление депрессивных симптомов из твитов: многозадачная учебная программа с поддержкой переносного языка', 'ga': 'Comharthaí Dúlagair a Aithint ó Tweets: Creat Foghlama Iltascanna Cumasaithe le Teanga Fhíoracha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός καταθλιπτικών συμπτωμάτων από τα Τουίτερ: Πλαίσιο εκμάθησης με δυνατότητα εικονιστικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Depresszív tünetek felismerése Tweetekből: Figurative Language Enabled Multitask Learning Framework', 'it': 'Identificare i sintomi depressivi dai tweet: Quadro di apprendimento multitask abilitato per il linguaggio figurativo', 'kk': 'Твиттерден депрессивні симптомдарды анықтау: Фигуративті тіл көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту фреймі рұқсат етілген', 'lt': 'Nustatyti depresinius simptomus iš dviejų tinklų: skaitmeninė kalba įjungta daugiafunkcinio mokymosi sistema', 'mk': 'Идентификување на депресивни симптоми од Твитови: Фигуративен јазик овозможи рамка за учење на мултизадачи', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Simptom Depresif dari Tweets: Bahasa Figuratif Dibenarkan Sempadan Belajar Bertugas', 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുക: ഫിഗ്രാജിറ്റ് ഭാഷ സജ്ജീവമാക്കിയ മറ്റു പണ', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tas-Sintomi Depressivi mit-Tweets: Qafas ta’ Tagħlim Multikompiti Permezz tal-Lingwa Figurattiva', 'mn': 'Tweets-ээс хязгаарлагдмал символдуудыг тайлбарлах', 'ro': 'Identificarea simptomelor depresive din tweets: Cadru de învățare multiplă activat pentru limbajul figurativ', 'pl': 'Identyfikowanie objawów depresyjnych z tweetów: Wielozadaniowe ramy uczenia się języka obrazowego', 'no': 'Identifiserer depressive simptome frå tweets: Figurativ språk slått på multioppgåver- læringsrammeverk', 'sr': 'Identifikacija depresivnih simptoma iz Tweets: Figurativni jezik omogućen okvir učenja multitask', 'so': 'Isticmaalka deegaanka ee Tweetka: Luqada Figuratiyadu', 'si': 'Tweets වලින් ප්\u200dරතිශීල සිම්ප්ටම් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න: ප්\u200dරතිශීල භාෂා', 'sv': 'Identifiera depressiva symptom frĂ¥n tweets: Figurativt sprĂ¥k aktiverat flerfunktionsinlĂ¤rningsram', 'ta': 'இருந்து ஆழமான குறிப்புகளை அடையாளம்:', 'ur': 'ٹویٹ سے دھوپ سیمٹوموں کی شناسایی کرتی ہے: تصویر زبان فعال کی Multitask Learning Framework', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Xác định các triệu chứng trầm cảm từ Tweet: bộ khung phát biểu ngôn ngữ cho khả năng phát triển đa nhiệm vụ', 'nl': 'Depressieve symptomen identificeren uit Tweets: Figurative Language Enabled Multitask Learning Framework', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на депресивни симптоми от туитове: Рамка за многофункционално обучение с възможност за фигуративен език', 'da': 'Identificering af depressive symptomer fra tweets: Figurative Language Enabled Multitask Learning Framework', 'hr': 'Identifikacija depresivnih simptoma iz Tweets: Figurativni jezik omogućen okvir učenja multitask', 'de': 'Identifizieren depressiver Symptome aus Tweets: Figurative Language Enabled Multitask Learning Framework', 'id': 'Identifikasi Sintome Depresif dari Tweets: Bahasa Figuratif Dibenarkan Berdasar Belajar Berbanyak Tugas', 'ko': '추문에서 우울증상 식별: 이미지 언어가 지원하는 다중 임무 학습 프레임워크', 'fa': 'شناسایی نشانه\u200cهای خطرناک از Tweets: زبان تصویر قابل یادگیری چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار', 'tr': 'Tweets', 'sw': 'Kutambua Sympts Depressing from Twita: Lugha ya Takwimu Imetumika Ufunzi wa Multiplication', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i simptomeve depresive nga Tweets: Gjuha figurative aktivizohet kuadri i mësimit të shumëdetyrave', 'am': 'áŠ¨Tweets', 'az': 'Tweetl…ôrd…ôn Depressiv SimptomlarńĪ tanńĪma: Figurativ Dil QabilleŇütirilmiŇü Multitask √Ėyr…ônm…ô Framework', 'bn': 'টুইট থেকে ডিপ্রেসিটিভ প্রতীক চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে: ফিগারেটিভ ভ ভাষা সক্রিয় করা হয়েছে বহুকাজ শিক্ষা ফ্রেম', 'hy': 'Թվիթերից ստացված դեպրեսիվ ախտանիշներ հայտնաբերելը. ֆիզիգատիվ լեզուն օգտագործում է բազմախնդիրներ սովորելու շրջանակը', 'bs': 'Identifikacija depresivnih simptoma iz Tweets: Figurativni jezik omogućen okvir učenja multitask', 'ca': "Identificar Símptomes Depressius de Tweets: Quadro d'Aprendiment Multitasca Activat en Llingua Figurativa", 'cs': 'Identifikace depresivních příznaků z tweetů: Víceúkolový rámec pro výuku obrazového jazyka', 'et': 'Depressiivsete sümptomite tuvastamine tweetide abil: kujunduskeel lubatud mitmetülesandelise õppe raamistik', 'fi': 'Masennusoireiden tunnistaminen tweeteistä: Figuratiivinen kieli mahdollistaa monitehtävän oppimisen puitteet', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'זיהוי תסמינים מדכאים מטוויטים', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje depresivnih simptomov iz tweetov: večopravilni učni okvir, ki omogoča figurativni jezik', 'bo': 'Tweets ་ལས་འཕགས་རིས་མཚོན་རྟགས་འདི་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ：རྣམ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནུས་ཡོད་སྒྱུར་བ multitask Learning Framework'}
{'en': 'Existing studies on using social media for deriving mental health status of users focus on the depression detection task. However, for case management and referral to psychiatrists, health-care workers require practical and scalable depressive disorder screening and triage system. This study aims to design and evaluate a decision support system (DSS) to reliably determine the depressive triage level by capturing fine-grained depressive symptoms expressed in user tweets through the emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) that is routinely used in clinical practice. The reliable detection of depressive symptoms from tweets is challenging because the 280-character limit on tweets incentivizes the use of creative artifacts in the utterances and figurative usage contributes to effective expression. We propose a novel BERT based robust multi-task learning framework to accurately identify the depressive symptoms using the auxiliary task of figurative usage detection. Specifically, our proposed novel task sharing mechanism, co-task aware attention, enables automatic selection of optimal information across the BERT lay-ers and tasks by soft-sharing of parameters. Our results show that modeling figurative usage can demonstrably improve the model’s robustness and reliability for distinguishing the depression symptoms.', 'pt': 'Os estudos existentes sobre o uso de mídias sociais para derivar o estado de saúde mental dos usuários concentram-se na tarefa de detecção de depressão. No entanto, para o gerenciamento de casos e encaminhamento para psiquiatras, os profissionais de saúde precisam de um sistema de triagem e triagem de transtorno depressivo prático e escalável. Este estudo tem como objetivo projetar e avaliar um sistema de apoio à decisão (DSS) para determinar de forma confiável o nível de triagem depressiva, capturando sintomas depressivos refinados expressos em tweets de usuários por meio da emulação do Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) que é rotineiramente utilizado na prática clínica. A detecção confiável de sintomas depressivos a partir de tweets é um desafio porque o limite de 280 caracteres nos tweets incentiva o uso de artefatos criativos nos enunciados e o uso figurativo contribui para a expressão efetiva. Propomos uma nova estrutura robusta de aprendizado multitarefa baseada em BERT para identificar com precisão os sintomas depressivos usando a tarefa auxiliar de detecção de uso figurativo. Especificamente, nosso novo mecanismo de compartilhamento de tarefas proposto, atenção consciente de co-tarefa, permite a seleção automática de informações ideais nas camadas e tarefas do BERT por meio do compartilhamento suave de parâmetros. Nossos resultados mostram que o uso figurativo da modelagem pode melhorar comprovadamente a robustez e a confiabilidade do modelo para distinguir os sintomas de depressão.', 'es': 'Los estudios existentes sobre el uso de las redes sociales para obtener el estado de salud mental de los usuarios se centran en la tarea de detección de la depresión. Sin embargo, para el manejo de casos y la remisión a psiquiatras, los trabajadores de la salud requieren un sistema de evaluación y clasificación del trastorno depresivo práctico y escalable. Este estudio tiene como objetivo diseñar y evaluar un sistema de apoyo a la decisión (DSS) para determinar de manera confiable el nivel de triaje depresivo mediante la captura de los síntomas depresivos detallados expresados en los tuits de los usuarios a través de la emulación del Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) que se usa de forma rutinaria en la práctica clínica. La detección confiable de los síntomas depresivos en los tuits es un desafío porque el límite de 280 caracteres en los tuits incentiva el uso de artefactos creativos en las declaraciones y el uso figurativo contribuye a una expresión efectiva. Proponemos un novedoso marco de aprendizaje multitarea robusto basado en BERT para identificar con precisión los síntomas depresivos mediante la tarea auxiliar de detección de uso figurativo. Específicamente, nuestro novedoso mecanismo de intercambio de tareas propuesto, la atención consciente de las tareas conjuntas, permite la selección automática de información óptima en todas las capas y tareas del BERT mediante el intercambio suave de parámetros. Nuestros resultados muestran que modelar el uso figurativo puede mejorar de manera demostrable la robustez y confiabilidad del modelo para distinguir los síntomas de la depresión.', 'fr': "Les études existantes sur l'utilisation des médias sociaux pour déterminer l'état de santé mentale des utilisateurs se concentrent sur la tâche de détection de la dépression. Toutefois, pour la prise en charge des cas et l'orientation vers des psychiatres, les agents de santé ont besoin d'un système pratique et évolutif de dépistage et de triage des troubles dépressifs. Cette étude vise à concevoir et à évaluer un système d'aide à la décision (DSS) pour déterminer de manière fiable le niveau de triage dépressif en capturant les symptômes dépressifs à grain fin exprimés dans les tweets des utilisateurs grâce à l'émulation du Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) qui est couramment utilisé dans la pratique clinique. La détection fiable des symptômes dépressifs dans les tweets est difficile car la limite de 280 caractères sur les tweets encourage l'utilisation d'artefacts créatifs dans les énoncés et l'utilisation figurative contribue à une expression efficace. Nous proposons un nouveau cadre d'apprentissage multitâche robuste basé sur BERT pour identifier avec précision les symptômes dépressifs à l'aide de la tâche auxiliaire de détection figurative de l'utilisation. Plus précisément, notre nouveau mécanisme de partage de tâches proposé, une attention consciente des co-tâches, permet la sélection automatique d'informations optimales entre les couches et les tâches BERT par un partage souple des paramètres. Nos résultats montrent que la modélisation de l'utilisation figurative peut manifestement améliorer la robustesse et la fiabilité du modèle pour distinguer les symptômes de la dépression.", 'ar': 'تركز الدراسات الحالية حول استخدام وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي لاشتقاق حالة الصحة العقلية للمستخدمين على مهمة الكشف عن الاكتئاب. ومع ذلك ، لإدارة الحالات والإحالة إلى الأطباء النفسيين ، يحتاج العاملون في مجال الرعاية الصحية إلى نظام فرز وفرز عملي وقابل للتطوير لاضطراب الاكتئاب. تهدف هذه الدراسة إلى تصميم وتقييم نظام دعم القرار (DSS) لتحديد مستوى الفرز الاكتئابي بشكل موثوق من خلال التقاط أعراض الاكتئاب الدقيقة المعبر عنها في تغريدات المستخدم من خلال محاكاة استبيان صحة المريض 9 (PHQ-9) الذي يتم بشكل روتيني. تستخدم في الممارسة السريرية. يعد الاكتشاف الموثوق لأعراض الاكتئاب من التغريدات أمرًا صعبًا لأن حد 280 حرفًا على التغريدات يحفز استخدام المصنوعات الإبداعية في الكلام والاستخدام المجازي يساهم في التعبير الفعال. نقترح إطار عمل تعليميًا قويًا متعدد المهام قائم على BERT لتحديد أعراض الاكتئاب بدقة باستخدام المهمة المساعدة للكشف عن الاستخدام المجازي. على وجه التحديد ، تتيح آلية مشاركة المهام الجديدة المقترحة لدينا ، والاهتمام المدرك للمهام المشتركة ، الاختيار التلقائي للمعلومات المثلى عبر طبقات BERT والمهام من خلال المشاركة الناعمة للمعلمات. تظهر نتائجنا أن استخدام النمذجة التصويرية يمكن أن يحسن بشكل واضح من متانة النموذج وموثوقيته لتمييز أعراض الاكتئاب.', 'ja': '利用者のメンタルヘルスステータスを導き出すためのソーシャルメディアの使用に関する既存の研究は、うつ病検出タスクに焦点を当てている。 しかし、症例管理と精神科医への紹介のために、医療従事者は実用的でスケーラブルな抑うつ性障害のスクリーニングとトリアージシステムを必要とする。 本研究は、臨床で日常的に使用されている患者の健康に関する質問票-9 （ PHQ -9 ）のエミュレーションを通じて、ユーザーのツイートに表現された細かいうつ症状を捕捉することにより、うつ病のトリアージレベルを確実に決定するための意思決定支援システム（ DSS ）を設計および評価することを目的としている。 ツイートからの抑うつ症状の確実な検出は困難である。なぜなら、ツイートの280文字の制限は、発話における創造的なアーティファクトの使用を奨励し、比喩的な使用は効果的な表現に寄与するからである。 私たちは、比喩的使用検出の補助的なタスクを使用して、抑うつ症状を正確に識別するための新規のBERTベースの堅牢なマルチタスク学習フレームワークを提案します。 具体的には、提案された新規のタスク共有メカニズム、共同タスクに注意を払い、パラメータのソフトシェアリングによって、BERTレイヤーとタスク全体で最適な情報の自動選択を可能にします。 私たちの結果は、比喩的な使用法をモデリングすることで、うつ症状を区別するためのモデルの堅牢性と信頼性を明らかに向上させることができることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Существующие исследования по использованию социальных сетей для определения состояния психического здоровья пользователей сосредоточены на задаче обнаружения депрессии. Однако для ведения дел и направления к психиатрам медицинские работники нуждаются в практической и масштабируемой системе скрининга и сортировки депрессивных расстройств. Это исследование направлено на разработку и оценку системы поддержки принятия решений (DSS) для надежного определения уровня депрессивной сортировки путем фиксации мелкозернистых депрессивных симптомов, выраженных в пользовательских твитах, посредством эмуляции Анкеты здоровья пациента-9 (PHQ-9), которая обычно используется в клинической практике. Надежное обнаружение депрессивных симптомов из твитов является сложной задачей, поскольку 280-символьное ограничение на твиты стимулирует использование творческих артефактов в высказываниях, а образное использование способствует эффективной экспрессии. Мы предлагаем новую надежную МНОГОЗАДАЧНУЮ систему обучения на основе BERT для точного выявления депрессивных симптомов с использованием вспомогательной задачи обнаружения образного использования. В частности, предлагаемый нами новый механизм разделения задач, внимание, осознаваемое совместно с другими задачами, позволяет автоматически выбирать оптимальную информацию по прокладкам и задачам BERT путем мягкого разделения параметров. Наши результаты показывают, что моделирование символического использования может наглядно улучшить устойчивость и надежность модели для различения симптомов депрессии.', 'zh': '夫以社交媒体推用户心理健康,今研集抑郁症检。 然于病例管转诊与精神科医,卫生保健工作者须实用而可扩抑郁障筛查与分诊系统。 本论意料支持系统(DSS),拟临床实践常患者康强问卷-9(PHQ-9),获用户推文之细粒度抑郁症状,以定抑郁分诊平。 推文以检抑有挑战性,推文280个字符之限激于言创造性之工件,而比喻用法有效也。 举BERT之鲁棒性多任务学框架,以喻性检之正知抑郁症状。 凡新型务共机,共同任务知注意,参数软共之,能自择BERT外行之最。 吾之的结果表明,建模喻用法以明显提高鲁棒性可靠性,以别抑郁。', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ताओं की मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थिति प्राप्त करने के लिए सोशल मीडिया का उपयोग करने पर मौजूदा अध्ययन अवसाद का पता लगाने के कार्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, मनोचिकित्सकों के लिए मामले के प्रबंधन और रेफरल के लिए, स्वास्थ्य देखभाल श्रमिकों को व्यावहारिक और स्केलेबल अवसादग्रस्तता विकार स्क्रीनिंग और ट्राइएज सिस्टम की आवश्यकता होती है। इस अध्ययन का उद्देश्य रोगी स्वास्थ्य प्रश्नावली -9 (पीएचक्यू -9) के अनुकरण के माध्यम से उपयोगकर्ता ट्वीट्स में व्यक्त किए गए ठीक-दाने वाले अवसादग्रस्तता लक्षणों को कैप्चर करके अवसादग्रस्तता ट्राइएज स्तर को मज़बूती से निर्धारित करने के लिए एक निर्णय समर्थन प्रणाली (डीएसएस) का डिजाइन और मूल्यांकन करना है जो नियमित रूप से नैदानिक अभ्यास में उपयोग किया जाता है। ट्वीट्स से अवसादग्रस्तता के लक्षणों का विश्वसनीय पता लगाना चुनौतीपूर्ण है क्योंकि ट्वीट्स पर 280-चरित्र सीमा कथनों में रचनात्मक कलाकृतियों के उपयोग को प्रोत्साहित करती है और आलंकारिक उपयोग प्रभावी अभिव्यक्ति में योगदान देता है। हम आलंकारिक उपयोग का पता लगाने के सहायक कार्य का उपयोग करके अवसादग्रस्तता के लक्षणों की सही पहचान करने के लिए एक उपन्यास BERT आधारित मजबूत बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हमारे प्रस्तावित उपन्यास कार्य साझाकरण तंत्र, सह-कार्य जागरूक ध्यान, BERT ले-र्स और पैरामीटर के नरम-साझाकरण द्वारा कार्यों में इष्टतम जानकारी के स्वचालित चयन को सक्षम बनाता है। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि मॉडलिंग आलंकारिक उपयोग अवसाद के लक्षणों को अलग करने के लिए मॉडल की मजबूती और विश्वसनीयता में सुधार कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Díríonn staidéir atá ann faoi láthair ar úsáid a bhaint as na meáin shóisialta chun stádas meabhairshláinte na n-úsáideoirí a fháil ar an tasc chun dúlagar a bhrath. Mar sin féin, le haghaidh bainistíochta cásanna agus tarchur chuig síciatraithe, teastaíonn ó oibrithe cúram sláinte córas scagthástála agus triáise atá praiticiúil agus inscálaithe maidir le neamhord dúlagair. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an staidéar seo córas tacaíochta cinntí (DSS) a dhearadh agus a mheas chun an leibhéal triáise depressive a chinneadh go hiontaofa trí na hairíonna mínghlana dúlagair a chuirtear in iúl i dtvuíteanna úsáideoirí a ghabháil trí aithris a dhéanamh ar Cheistneoir Sláinte Othar-9 (PHQ-9) a dhéantar go rialta. a úsáidtear i gcleachtas cliniciúil. Tá sé dúshlánach comharthaí dúlagair ó thítí a bhrath go hiontaofa toisc go spreagann an teorainn 280-charachtar ar thíteanna úsáid a bhaint as déantúsáin chruthaitheacha sna cainteanna agus cuidíonn úsáid fhíorach le léiriú éifeachtach. Molaimid creat foghlama láidir ilthasc úr bunaithe ar CRET chun na hairíonna dúlagair a shainaithint go beacht trí úsáid a bhaint as an tasc cúnta a bhaineann le húsáid fhíorach a bhrath. Go sonrach, cumasaíonn ár meicníocht núíosach comhroinnte tascanna atá beartaithe, aird chomhfheasach ar thasc, an fhaisnéis is fearr is féidir a roghnú go huathoibríoch thar sraitheanna agus tascanna CRET trí pharaiméadair a roinnt go bog. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí gur féidir le samhaltú úsáid fhigiúrach feabhas a chur ar stóinseacht agus iontaofacht an mhúnla chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar na hairíonna dúlagair.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედია გამოყენებაზე გამოყენებული სოციალური სისტემასტის სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტუკურება გამოყენებაზე. მაგრამ, პექსიკიატრისთვის მართლად და განსაზღვრებისთვის, საჯანმრთელო მუშაობელი მუშაობელი პრაქტიკური და მაგალითვის ევპრესიური განსხვავებების შესახებ და სა ამ სწავლის მიზეზია, რომ პოციენტის ჯანმრთელობის კითხვა-9 (PHQ-9) ემულაციაზე, რომელიც კლინიკურად გამოყენებული კლინიკური პრაქტიკში გამოიყენებულია, დეპრესიური სამიზეზის დონე განსაზღვრება და განსაზღვრება. ევპრესიგური სიმპტომების შესაძლებლობელი განახვა შესაძლებელია, რადგან 280 სიმპტომების სიმპტომების განახვა შესაძლებლობელია, რადგან რვიტებში 280 სიმპტომების სიმპრეტი ინტექტიგურებს კრეატიგური არტი ჩვენ პრომენტის ბერტის ბაზაცია ძალიან ძალიან მრავალური დასწავლების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც დავაკეთებთ ევპრესიური სიმპტომები, რომელიც გამოიყენებთ ფიგურატიური გამოყენების დახმარებ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი პრომენტური საქმენტის გაყოფილი მექანსი,კომრაქმენტური დაახლოებით ინფორმაციას, შეუძლია ავტომატურად ამოირჩევა ოპტიმალური ინფორმაციას BERT პრომენტრის ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგაარ, ფვ მჲევლთპაŒვ ნა ტთდპართგნთჲრ თჱოჲლჱგანვ მჲზვ ეა ოჲეჲბპთ მჲევლჲრ ნა ჟთდსპნჲჟრ თ ჟთდსპნჲჟრ ნა მჲევლჲრ ჱა პაჱლთ', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες μελέτες σχετικά με τη χρήση των κοινωνικών μέσων για την εξαγωγή της ψυχικής κατάστασης των χρηστών επικεντρώνονται στην εργασία ανίχνευσης κατάθλιψης. Ωστόσο, για τη διαχείριση περιπτώσεων και την παραπομπή σε ψυχίατρους, οι εργαζόμενοι υγείας απαιτούν πρακτικό και κλιμακωτό σύστημα διαλογής και διαλογής καταθλιπτικών διαταραχών. Σκοπός της παρούσας μελέτης είναι να σχεδιάσει και να αξιολογήσει ένα σύστημα υποστήριξης αποφάσεων (για τον αξιόπιστο προσδιορισμό του επιπέδου καταθλιπτικής διαλογής συλλαμβάνοντας λεπτόκοκκα καταθλιπτικά συμπτώματα που εκφράζονται σε τουίτ χρηστών μέσω της προσομοίωσης του Ερωτηματολογίου Υγείας Ασθενών-9 (που χρησιμοποιείται συνήθως στην κλινική πρακτική. Η αξιόπιστη ανίχνευση των καταθλιπτικών συμπτωμάτων από τα tweets είναι πρόκληση επειδή το 280-χαρακτήρων όριο στα tweets ενθαρρύνει τη χρήση δημιουργικών τεχνουργημάτων στις εκφράσεις και η εικονιστική χρήση συμβάλλει στην αποτελεσματική έκφραση. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο βασισμένο στιβαρό μαθησιακό πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών για τον ακριβή προσδιορισμό των καταθλιπτικών συμπτωμάτων χρησιμοποιώντας το βοηθητικό έργο της απεικονιστικής ανίχνευσης χρήσης. Ειδικότερα, ο προτεινόμενος νέος μηχανισμός κατανομής εργασιών, η συνειδητοποιημένη προσοχή συν-εργασίας, επιτρέπει την αυτόματη επιλογή βέλτιστων πληροφοριών μεταξύ των φορέων και των καθηκόντων του BERT μέσω της ήπιας κατανομής παραμέτρων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η μοντελοποίηση της εικονικής χρήσης μπορεί να βελτιώσει εμφανώς την ανθεκτικότητα και την αξιοπιστία του μοντέλου για τη διάκριση των συμπτωμάτων κατάθλιψης.', 'hu': 'A felhasználók mentális egészségi állapotának megállapítására szolgáló közösségi média használatáról szóló meglévő tanulmányok a depresszió felismerésére összpontosítanak. Az esetkezeléshez és a pszichiáterekhez történő utaláshoz azonban az egészségügyi dolgozók gyakorlati és skálázható depressziós zavar szűrőrendszert és triage rendszert igényelnek. A tanulmány célja egy olyan döntéstámogató rendszer (DSS) kialakítása és értékelése, amely megbízhatóan meghatározza a depressziós triage szintjét a felhasználói tweetekben kifejezett finomszemcsés depressziós tünetek rögzítésével a beteg egészségügyi kérdőív-9 (PHQ-9) emulációján keresztül, amelyet rutinszerűen használnak a klinikai gyakorlatban. A depressziós tünetek megbízható felismerése a tweetekből kihívást jelent, mert a tweetekre vonatkozó 280 karakteres korlátozás ösztönzi a kreatív műtárgyak használatát a kimondásokban és a figuratív használat hozzájárul a hatékony kifejezéshez. Egy új BERT alapú, robusztus, többfeladatos tanulási keretrendszert javasolunk a depressziós tünetek pontos azonosítására a figuratív használat felismerésének segédfeladata segítségével. Különösen a javasolt új feladatmegosztási mechanizmusunk, az együttműködés tudatos figyelem, lehetővé teszi az optimális információk automatikus kiválasztását a BERT fektetői és feladatok között a paraméterek puha megosztásával. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a figuratív használat modellezése bizonyíthatóan javíthatja a modell robusztusságát és megbízhatóságát a depressziós tünetek megkülönböztetésében.', 'it': "Gli studi esistenti sull'utilizzo dei social media per determinare lo stato di salute mentale degli utenti si concentrano sul compito di rilevazione della depressione. Tuttavia, per la gestione dei casi e il rinvio agli psichiatri, gli operatori sanitari richiedono un sistema pratico e scalabile di screening e triage del disturbo depressivo. Questo studio mira a progettare e valutare un sistema di supporto alle decisioni (DSS) per determinare in modo affidabile il livello di triage depressivo catturando i sintomi depressivi a grana fine espressi nei tweet dell'utente attraverso l'emulazione del questionario sulla salute del paziente-9 (PHQ-9) che viene abitualmente utilizzato nella pratica clinica. La rilevazione affidabile dei sintomi depressivi dai tweet è impegnativa perché il limite di 280 caratteri sui tweet incentiva l'uso di artefatti creativi nelle espressioni e l'uso figurativo contribuisce ad un'espressione efficace. Proponiamo un nuovo robusto framework di apprendimento multi-task basato su BERT per identificare con precisione i sintomi depressivi utilizzando il compito ausiliario del rilevamento figurativo dell'uso. In particolare, il nostro nuovo meccanismo di condivisione delle attività proposto, l'attenzione consapevole del co-task, consente la selezione automatica delle informazioni ottimali tra i posatori BERT e le attività attraverso la condivisione dei parametri. I nostri risultati mostrano che la modellazione dell'uso figurativo può migliorare in modo dimostrabile la robustezza e l'affidabilità del modello per distinguere i sintomi della depressione.", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушылардың психикалық саулық күйіне көмектесу үшін социалдық медиақтарын қолданатын зерттеулері депрессия тапсырмасына көмектеседі. Бірақ психиатрлерді басқару және сілтемелер үшін саулық медицина жұмысаушыларының практикалық және масштабтау депрессиялық ауруларының жүйесі жұмыс істеу жүйесі керек. Бұл зерттеу мақсатты клиникалық практикада пациенттің саулық сұрақ-9 (PHQ-9) эмуляциясы арқылы пайдаланушылардың твиттерінде белгіленген депрессивні триаж деңгейінің депрессивні деңгейінің деңгейінің деңгейінің деңгейінің деңгейінде анықтау жүйесін (DSS) қ Твиттердің депрессивні симптомдарын табу үшін 280 таңбалардың шегі сөздерде және фигурациялық қолданудың пайдалануын көмектеседі. Біз РОМЕРТ негіздеген көп тапсырмаларды оқыту фрейміне депрессивні симптомдарды дұрыс анықтау үшін көмектесу тапсырмасының көмектесілік тапсырмасын қолдану үшін жалпы көме Әдетте, біздің жаңа тапсырмаларды ортақтастыру механизміміз, бір тапсырмаларды біріктіруге болады, параметрлерді бағдарламалы ортақтастыру арқылы BERT лейтерінің және тапсырмаларды автоматты түрде таңдау мү Біздің нәтижелеріміз, пішімдік пайдаланушының моделі депрессия симптомдарын таңдау үшін үлгісінің құндылығын және сенімдігін өзгертуге болады.', 'lt': 'Dabartiniai socialinių žiniasklaidos naudojimo vartotojų psichikos sveikatos būklei gauti tyrimai daugiausia dėmesio skiria depresijos nustatymo uždaviniui. Tačiau, norint valdyti atvejus ir kreiptis į psichiatris, sveikatos priežiūros darbuotojams reikia praktinio ir skaliuojamo depresinio sutrikimo tikrinimo ir triažo sistemos. Šiuo tyrimu siekiama sukurti ir įvertinti sprendimų priėmimo palaikymo sistemą (DSS), kad būtų patikimai nustatytas depresijos trijų lygis, gaunant smulkių grūdų depresijos simptomus, išreikštus vartotojo tweetuose, emuliuojant paciento sveikatos klausimyną-9 (PHQ-9), kuris įprastai naudojamas klinikinėje praktikoje. Patikimas depresinių simptomų nustatymas iš tweetų yra sudėtingas, nes 280 ženklų tweetų riba skatina kūrybinių dirbinių naudojimą žodžiuose ir vaizdiniuose naudojimuose prisideda prie veiksmingos išraiškos. We propose a novel BERT based robust multi-task learning framework to accurately identify the depressive symptoms using the auxiliary task of figurative usage detection.  Konkrečiai, mūsų pasiūlytas naujas dalijimosi užduotimis mechanizmas, bendras dėmesys, suteikia galimybę automatiškai atrinkti optimalią informaciją tarp BERT teikėjų ir užduočių pasidalijant parametrais. Mūs ų rezultatai rodo, kad modeliuojant vaizdinį naudojimą galima akivaizdžiai pagerinti modelio patikimumą ir patikimumą išskiriant depresijos simptomus.', 'mk': 'Постојаните студии за користење на социјалните медиуми за добивање на статусот на ментално здравје на корисниците се фокусираат на задачата за детекција на депресија. Сепак, за менаџментот на случаите и поврзувањето со психијатрите, здравствените работници бараат практичен и размерлив систем за проверка на депресивни проблеми и тријаж. This study aims to design and evaluate a decision support system (DSS) to reliably determine the depressive triage level by capturing fine-grained depressive symptoms expressed in user tweets through the emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) that is routinely used in clinical practice.  Веројатното откривање на депресивни симптоми од твитовите е предизвикувачко бидејќи ограничувањето на 280 ликови на твитовите го охрабрува употребата на креативните артефакти во изразите и фигуративната употреба придонесува за ефикасно изразување. Ние предложуваме нова, заснована на БЕРТ, силна рамка за учење на мултизадачи за прецизно идентификување на депресивните симптоми користејќи помошна задача за детекција на фигуративна употреба. Специфично, нашиот предложен нов механизам за споделување на задачи, внимание на соработката со задачите, овозможува автоматски избор на оптимални информации низ поставувачите на BERT и задачите со меко споделување на параметрите. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека моделирањето на фигуративната употреба може да ја подобри силноста и доверливоста на моделот за разликување на симптомите на депресија.', 'ms': 'kajian yang wujud mengenai menggunakan media sosial untuk mendapatkan status kesehatan mental pengguna fokus pada tugas pengesan depresi. Bagaimanapun, untuk pengurusan kes dan rujukan kepada psikiater, pekerja rawatan kesehatan memerlukan penyelidikan gangguan depresi praktik dan boleh skala dan sistem triage. Ujian ini bermaksud merancang dan menilai sistem sokongan keputusan (DSS) untuk menentukan secara pasti aras segitiga depresi dengan menangkap gejala depresi yang sempurna yang diungkap dalam tweet pengguna melalui emulasi Pertanyaan Kesehatan Pasien-9 (PHQ-9) yang biasa digunakan dalam latihan klinik. Pengesanan yang boleh dipercayai simptom depresi dari tweet adalah menantang kerana had 280-aksara pada tweet mendorong penggunaan artefak kreatif dalam ungkapan dan penggunaan figuratif menyumbang kepada ungkapan yang efektif. Kami cadangkan rangkaian pembelajaran berbilang-tugas berasaskan BERT baru untuk mengenalpasti dengan tepat gejala depresi menggunakan tugas bantuan pengesan penggunaan figuratif. Secara khusus, mekanisme berkongsi tugas baru kami direncanakan, perhatian sambungan tugas, membolehkan pemilihan automatik maklumat optimal di seluruh pemain BERT dan tugas dengan berkongsi lembut parameter. Keputusan kami menunjukkan bahawa penggunaan figuratif model boleh jelas meningkatkan kepekatan dan kepercayaan model untuk membedakan gejala depresi.', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ മാനസിക ആരോഗ്യ സ്ഥിതി ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനായി സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് എന്നാലും, കേസ് മാനേജ്മെന്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും സൈക്കിയേറ്റര്\u200dക്കും വിവരിക്കുന്നതിനും വേണ്ടി ആവശ്യമുണ്ടെങ്കിലും ആശ്വാസ സിക ഈ പഠനത്തിന് ഒരു തീരുമാനത്തിന്റെ പിന്തുണയുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ഡിസൈന്യൂട്ട് ചെയ്യുവാനും വിശ്വസ്തമായി തീരുമാനിക്കുവാനും ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് സാധാരണ ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവി വിശ്വസ്തതയുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിലപിക്കുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുന്നു. കാരണം ടൂട്ടുകളിലെ 280 അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ പരിധികള്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d സൃ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമായി റോബ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് പല-ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അതി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട നോവല്\u200d ജോലി പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന മെക്കിനിമയം, കൂട്ടുകാര്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കാണിച്ചു തരുന്നത് ഡിഗ്രാഫിക്റ്റീവ് ഉപയോഗം മോഡലിന്റെ വസ്ത്രവും വിശ്വസ്തതയും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും എന്', 'pl': 'Istniejące badania dotyczące wykorzystania mediów społecznościowych do określenia stanu zdrowia psychicznego użytkowników koncentrują się na zadaniu wykrywania depresji. Jednakże w przypadku zarządzania przypadkami i skierowania do psychiatrów pracownicy służby zdrowia wymagają praktycznego i skalowalnego systemu przesiewu i triage zaburzeń depresyjnych. Celem niniejszego badania jest zaprojektowanie i ocena systemu wspomagania decyzji (DSS) w celu wiarygodnego określenia poziomu triage depresyjnego poprzez wychwytywanie drobnoziarnistych objawów depresyjnych wyrażonych w tweetach użytkowników poprzez emulację Kwestionariusza Zdrowia Pacjenta-9 (PHQ-9), który jest rutynowo stosowany w praktyce klinicznej. Niezawodne wykrywanie objawów depresyjnych z tweetów jest wyzwaniem, ponieważ 280-znakowy limit tweetów zachęca do wykorzystania twórczych artefaktów w wypowiedziach, a użycie figuratywne przyczynia się do efektywnej ekspresji. Proponujemy nowe, solidne, wielozadaniowe ramy uczenia się oparte na BERT, aby dokładnie zidentyfikować objawy depresyjne za pomocą pomocniczego zadania wykrywania użytkowania figuratywnego. W szczególności, proponowany przez nas nowy mechanizm dzielenia się zadaniami, co-task świadoma uwaga, umożliwia automatyczny wybór optymalnych informacji wśród użytkowników BERT i zadań poprzez miękkie dzielenie się parametrami. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że modelowanie użycia figuratywnego może wykazać się solidnością i niezawodnością modelu w odróżnianiu objawów depresji.', 'mt': 'L-istudji eżistenti dwar l-użu tal-midja soċjali biex jinkiseb l-istatus tas-saħħa mentali tal-utenti jiffukaw fuq il-kompitu ta’ identifikazzjoni tad-depressjoni. Madankollu, għall-immaniġġjar tal-każijiet u r-riferiment lill-psikjatriċi, il-ħaddiema fil-kura tas-saħħa jeħtieġu skrinjar prattiku u skalabbli ta’ disturbi depressivi u sistema ta’ trijaġġ. Dan l-istudju għandu l-għan li jfassal u jevalwa sistema ta’ appoġġ għad-deċiżjonijiet (DSS) biex jiddetermina b’mod affidabbli l-livell tat-trijaġġ depressiv billi jinqabdu sintomi depressivi ta’ ħbub fin espressi fit-tweets tal-utent permezz tal-emulazzjoni tal-Kwestjonarju tas-Saħħa tal-Pazjent-9 (PHQ-9) li jintuża b’mod regolari fil-prattika klinika. Is-sejba affidabbli ta’ sintomi depressivi mit-tweets hija sfida għaliex il-limitu ta’ 280 karattru fuq it-tweets jinċentiva l-użu ta’ artifatti kreattivi fil-frażijiet u l-użu figurattiv jikkontribwixxi għal espressjoni effettiva. Aħna nipproponu qafas ġdid ta’ tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti bbażat fuq BERT biex jiġu identifikati b’mod preċiż is-sintomi depressivi bl-użu tal-kompitu awżiljarju ta’ individwazzjoni tal-użu figurattiv. B’mod speċifiku, il-mekkaniżmu ta’ qsim ta’ kompiti ġdid propost tagħna, attenzjoni konxja mill-kompiti, jippermetti l-għażla awtomatika ta’ informazzjoni ottimali madwar il-fornituri tal-BERT u kompiti permezz ta’ qsim mhux vinkolanti ta’ parametri. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-immudellar tal-użu figurattiv jista’ b’mod dimostrattiv itejjeb ir-robustezza u l-affidabbiltà tal-mudell għad-distinzjoni tas-sintomi tad-depressjoni.', 'no': 'Existende studier om å bruka sosiale medier for å avhenda mentale helsestatus av brukarar fokuserer på depresjonsoppgåva. For å handtere og referere til psykiatrar krev helsehandsamarbeidarar praktiske og skalerbare depressive forstyringsstyringsstyringsstyringsstyringsstyringsstyringsstyringsstyringssystem. Dette studiet må utforma og evaluera eit beslutningsstøtte-system (DSS) for å sikkert bestemme depresiv triangsnivå ved å henta fin-korne depresiv simptom uttrykt i brukaren-twetter gjennom emulasjonen av Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) som er vanleg brukt i klinisk praksis. Tiltruleg oppdaging av depresivne simptomer frå tweets er vanskeleg fordi den 280-teiknene på tweets stimulerer bruken av kreative artifaktar i uttalene og figurativ bruk bidrar til effektivt uttrykk. Vi foreslår eit nytt BERT-basert robust multioppgåve-læringsrammeverk for å nøyaktig identifisera depresivne simptomer med hjelpeoppgåva for å finna figurativt bruk. Spesielt, vår foreslått nytt oppgåvedelingsmekanisme, saman oppgåve kjem oppmerksomhet, kan automatisk utvalet av optimal informasjon gjennom BERT- låsare og oppgåver ved å dele saman parametrar. Resultatet våre viser at modellering av figurativ bruk kan demonstrarte forbedra modellen kraftighet og tiltrudd for å distisera depressingssimptomene.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн байдал дээр ажиллаж байгаа судалгаа юм. Гэхдээ сэтгэл зүйчдийн удирдлага болон сэтгэл зүйчдийн тухай ярилцах үед эрүүл мэндийн эрүүл мэндийн ажилтнуудын хувьд практикийн, хэмжээтэй депрессивны эмгэгийг шалгах болон гурвалжинг Энэ судалгааны зорилго нь өвчтөн эрүүл мэндийн асуулт-9 (PHQ-9) дээр эмнэлгийн дасгал дээр хэрэглэгчдийн tweets дээр илэрхийлж байгаа эмгэгтэй депрессивний хэмжээсүүдийг эмгэгтэй хэмжээнд тогтоох хэмжээсүүдийн тусламжтайгаар шийдвэрлэлтийн тусламжтайгаар дүрслэх Tweets-ийн депрессивны шинж тэмдэгүүдийн итгэлтэй байдал нь хэцүү, учир нь tweets-ийн 280 дүрсийн хязгаар нь бүтээлч уран бүтээгдэхүүний хэрэглээ илэрхийлэлтэй болгодог. Бид БЕРТ-ийн шинэ зохиолын үндсэн маш олон ажлын суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааны тусламжтай ажиллагааг ашиглан депрессив симптомуудыг тодорхойлж чадна. Ялангуяа бидний шинэ ажлын хуваалцах механизм, хамтран ажлын анхаарлын төвлөрөмж, BERT-ын дамжуулагчид болон ажлын тухай автоматжуулалттай мэдээллийг автоматжуулах боломжтой болгодог. Бидний үр дүнд хэлбэрийн хэрэглээ загварын загварын хүчтэй байдал болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинж тэмдэгтийг тодорхойлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Studiile existente privind utilizarea rețelelor sociale pentru determinarea stării de sănătate mintală a utilizatorilor se concentrează pe sarcina de detectare a depresiei. Cu toate acestea, pentru gestionarea cazurilor și trimiterea la psihiatri, lucrătorii din domeniul sănătății necesită un sistem practic și scalabil de screening și triaj al tulburărilor depresive. Acest studiu își propune să proiecteze și să evalueze un sistem de suport decizional (DSS) pentru a determina în mod fiabil nivelul triajului depresiv prin captarea simptomelor depresive cu granulație fină exprimate în tweeturile utilizatorilor prin emularea chestionarului de sănătate a pacientului-9 (PHQ-9), care este utilizat în mod obișnuit în practica clinică. Detectarea fiabilă a simptomelor depresive din tweet-uri este o provocare deoarece limita de 280 de caractere a tweet-urilor stimulează utilizarea artefactelor creative în pronunțări și utilizarea figurativă contribuie la exprimarea eficientă. Propunem un nou cadru de învățare multifuncțional bazat pe BERT pentru identificarea cu precizie a simptomelor depresive folosind sarcina auxiliară de detectare a utilizării figurative. Mai exact, noul nostru mecanism de partajare a sarcinilor propus, atenția conștientă de co-sarcini, permite selectarea automată a informațiilor optime în cadrul depozitelor BERT și sarcinilor prin partajarea ușoară a parametrilor. Rezultatele noastre arată că modelarea utilizării figurative poate îmbunătăți în mod evident robustețea și fiabilitatea modelului pentru distingerea simptomelor depresiei.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ මානසික ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය ස්ථිතිය අවස්ථාවක නමුත්, විදියට ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ප්\u200dරධානය විදියට, ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය සුවස්ථාවක් වැඩකරුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ සැකසුම් ව This study is seeking to Design and evalute a resolution assistive system (DSS) to faithfully determine the depressive triage level by Capting Fine-Graned Depressive Symptoms expressed in user tweets by the Emination of the Patience Health Query-9 (PHQ-9) that is routine use in climatic Practics. The tical Detection of Depressive Symptoms from tweets is challenging, as the 280-character Limit on tweets stimtivises the use of the Kreative Artist Factors in the Words and figure use has assistive expressions. අපි පණිවිඩයක් BERT අධාරිත විශාල විශාල විශාල වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල සංකේතයක් සඳහ විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් පද්ධතිය, සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් අවධානය අවධානය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක තොරත අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩිල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා මොඩිල්ගේ ශක්ති', 'so': "Waxbarashada joogta ah oo ku saabsan isticmaalka shabakada bulshada si uu u helo daryeelka caafimaadka dhimirka ee isticmaalayaasha, waxay focus ugu leeyihiin qasabka daryeelka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee maamulka xaaladaha iyo wargelinta dhakhtarka dhimirka ah waxaa loo baahan yahay shaqaalaha daryeelka caafimaadka si caafimaad ah oo aad u baahan karto cudurada baaritaanka iyo baaritaanka jirrabka. Waxbarashadan waxaa loola jeedaa in uu ku qoro iyo qiimeeyo nidaamka kaalmada go'aanka (DSS) si aamin ah ugu caddeeyo heerka safarka aad u depressa, si aad u qabsato calaamado deeqsi ah oo ku saabsan Twitteetka adeega oo ku qoran qaabilaada daryeelka caafimaadka bukaanka (PHQ-9). Markii la aamin karo calaamadaha khatarka ah ee Twitteetka ka timid way dhibaataysan tahay, sababtoo ah xadhigga tweetka ee 280-ku qoran waxay ku caawineysaa isticmaalka waxyaabaha abuurka ah ee hadalka iyo isticmaalka sawirada ah waxay ka faa’iidaysaa expression faa’iido leh. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal ah oo ku saleysan BERT oo ah koob waxbarasho badan si aad ugu sahlan u caddeyno calaamadaha deegaanka ee isticmaalka isticmaalka sawirka ah. Si gaar ah, qasabkayaga la soo jeeday ee la wadaajiyo, iskuul-taqaan, wuxuu suurtogal u yeelan karaa xuquuqda macluumaadka optimiska ah oo ku qoran BERT-lay ers iyo shaqooyin ku saabsan barxad-sharing parameters. Abaalkayaga waxaa tusin kara in isticmaalka tusaale ahaan si muuqata ah bayaan u kordhin karo qalabka iyo aaminshaha tusaalka si ay u kala soocaan calaamadaha muranka.", 'sv': 'Befintliga studier om användning av sociala medier för att härleda användarnas psykiska hälsostatus fokuserar på uppgiften att upptäcka depression. För ärendehantering och remiss till psykiatriker kräver dock vårdpersonal praktiskt och skalbart screening- och triagesystem för depressiv störning. Denna studie syftar till att utforma och utvärdera ett beslutsstödsystem (DSS) för att tillförlitligt bestämma nivån för depressiv triage genom att fånga finkorniga depressiva symtom uttryckta i användartweets genom emulering av Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) som rutinmässigt används i klinisk praxis. Pålitlig upptäckt av depressiva symtom från tweets är utmanande eftersom gränsen på 280 tecken på tweets stimulerar användningen av kreativa artefakter i yttrandena och bildlig användning bidrar till ett effektivt uttryck. Vi föreslår en ny BERT-baserad robust multi-task inlärningsram för att exakt identifiera depressiva symtom med hjälp av hjälpuppgiften för bildlig användningsdetektering. Specifikt möjliggör vår föreslagna nya mekanism för uppgiftsdelning, gemensam uppmärksamhet, automatiskt val av optimal information för BERT-läggare och uppgifter genom mjuk delning av parametrar. Våra resultat visar att modellering av figurativ användning kan påvisbart förbättra modellens robusthet och tillförlitlighet för att särskilja depressionssymtomen.', 'sr': 'Postoje studije o upotrebi društvenih medija za otkrivanje mentalnog zdravlja korisnika fokusirane su na zadatak otkrivanja depresije. Međutim, za upravljanje slučajevima i odnos na psihijatra, radnici zdravstvenog zdravlja zahtevaju praktični i skalabilni sistem pregleda depresivnih poremećaja i triaža. U ovom ispitivanju je cilj da dizajniraju i proceni sistem potpore odluke (DSS) da se pouzdano odredi nivo depresivnog triaža hvatanjem finog zrncanog depresivnog simptoma izraženih u tweetima korisnika kroz emulaciju pitanja na bolničkom zdravlju-9 (PHQ-9) koja se uobičajeno koristi u kliničkoj praksi. Povjerljivo otkrivanje depresivnih simptoma iz tweets je izazovno jer ograničenje 280 karaktera na tweets stimulira korištenje kreativnih artifakta u rečenicama i figurativnom korištenju doprinosi efikasnom izrazu. Predlažemo novi okvir za učenje mnogo zadataka na osnovu BERT-a da precizno identifikuje depresivne simptome koristeći pomoćni zadatak otkrivanja figurativnog korištenja. Posebno, naš predloženi mehanizam dijeljenja novih zadataka, pozornost kozadataka, omogućava automatsku selekciju optimalnih informacija širom BERT-ovog predstavnika i zadataka mekom dijeljenjem parametara. Naši rezultati pokazuju da modeliranje figurativnog korištenja može demonstrativno poboljšati robustnost i pouzdanost modela za razliku simptoma depresije.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய ஆய்வுகள் பயன்படுத்தும் சமூக ஊடகங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பயன்படுத்துவதற்காக பயனீட்டாளர்களின் மருத்துவ கண்டுபிடி ஆனால், விஷயங்கள் நிர்வாகம் மற்றும் நிறுவனம் முறைந்தவர்களுக்கு குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு, சுகாப்பு பராமரிப்பு வேலையாளர்கள் செயல்படுத்த இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி ஒரு தீர்ப்பு ஆதரவு அமைப்பை வடிவமைக்க மற்றும் மதிப்பீடு செய்ய நம்பிக்கையாக தீர்மானிக்க வேண்டும். வழக்கமாக பயன்படுத்தப்படும் சிகிச்சைக்கு முறையில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் நோயா தொடர்களில் இருந்து ஆழமான குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் நம்பிக்கையான கண்டுபிடிப்பது சவாலாகும் ஏனென்றால் 280 எழுத்து வரம்பு இருந்தால் இருந்து குறி நாம் பெர்ட் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சட்டத்தை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் சரியாக ஆழமான குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் போது சர குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட புதிய செயல் பங்கிடும் முறைமையான அளபுருக்கள் மூலம் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ள, கூட்டு செயல் கவனம், பெருக்கல் கவனம நம்முடைய முடிவு', 'ur': 'موجود مطالعہ موجود موجود میڈیا کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے موجود مذہنی سلامتی موقعیت کاروبار کے ذریعے افسردگی شناسایی کے کام پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے. However, for case management and referral to psychiatrists, health care workers require practical and scalable depressive disorder screening and triage system. This study aims to design and evaluate a decision support system (DSS) to reliably determine the depressive triage level by capturing fine-grained depressive symptoms expressed in user tweets through the emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) that is usually used in clinical practice. ٹیوٹوں سے ڈراس کرنے والی علائم کا یقین ہے کہ ٹیوٹوں کے 280 علائم کی محدودیت باتوں اور تصویر کے استعمال کی استعمال کے ذریعہ مثبت کرتی ہے ہم ایک نوم BERT کی بنیاد پر قابل multi-task learning frameworks کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ تصویر کارشناس کے مطابق مضبوط کام کے مطابق دکھانے کے لئے افسردہ نشانیاں معلوم کریں. مخصوص طور پر، ہماری پیشنهاد کی نوی تابع شریک مکانیسم،شریک تابع کی توجه، BERT lay-ers اور تابع کے اندر نرم شریک کرنے کے ذریعہ آگاہ کرتا ہے. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ نمائندگی انجیر کا استعمال شیطان کے طور پر نمائندہ کی قوت اور اعتمادی کو افسردگی نشانیوں کو جدا کرنے کے لئے بہتر کر سکتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Các nghiên cứu đang tồn tại về việc sử dụng phương tiện xã hội để lấy lợi thế sức khỏe tâm thần của người dùng tập trung vào nhiệm vụ phát hiện trầm cảm. Tuy nhiên, đối với việc quản lý các trường hợp và giới thiệu cho bác sĩ tâm thần, công nhân chăm sóc y tế cần kiểm tra và hệ thống phân loại rối loạn. Nghiên cứu này nhằm thiết kế và đánh giá một hệ thống hỗ trợ quyết định (DSS) để xác định đáng tin cậy cấp ba giảm đau bằng cách bắt giữ các triệu chứng trầm cảm tốt xuất hiện trên tweet của người dùng qua mô phỏng của "Bệnh nhân sức khỏe tra vấn-9 (PHQ-9) thường được sử dụng trong thực tế lâm sàng. Sự phát hiện đáng tin cậy của các triệu chứng trầm cảm từ tweet là một thử thách bởi vì giới hạn hai ký tự trên tweet kích thích việc sử dụng các đồ tạo tác trong tiếng nói và sử dụng hình ảnh có thể gây ra hiệu quả. Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở nghiên cứu đầy đủ các nhiệm vụ của BERT mới để xác định chính xác các triệu chứng trầm cảm nhờ công tác phụ của việc tìm ra sử dụng bóng hình. Cụ thể, cơ chế chia sẻ nhiệm vụ mới, phối hợp chú ý, cho phép tự động chọn thông tin tối ưu cho tất cả các nhà làm việc của BERT bằng việc chia nhẹ các tham số. Kết quả cho thấy việc s ử dụng tượng mẫu có thể hiển nhiên cải thiện sức mạnh và độ tin cậy của mô hình để phân biệt các triệu chứng trầm cảm.', 'uz': "Foydalanuvchilarning mental tibbiy holatini olib tashlash uchun, muvaffaqiyatlarni o'zgartirish vazifasini foydalanish uchun, bulshadan medyaya foydalanish uchun mavjud o'rganishlar. Lekin, masalan boshqaruvchi va psychiatristlarga murakkab qilish uchun, tibbiy qobiliyat ishlatuvchilari esa foydalanuvchi va cheksiz qo'llanmalarni ko'rib chiqarish va taqdimlik tizimi kerak. Bu ta'lim tizimni dizayn va qiymatlash uchun, oddiy tizimni foydalanuvchi Twitterda qo'llangan qo'llanmalarni qo'llash uchun qo'shimcha tizimni aniqlash va qiymatlashga ishlatish mumkin. Bu foydalanuvchi soʻrov soʻrov 9 (PHQ-9) davomida odatda qo'llangan qo'llangan tizimni aniqlash mumkin. Twitterdan tashkilotlarni ishlatishga ishonchining ishonchini qiyin qilishi mumkin, chunki Twitterdan 280 character chegarasi so'zlarda ijodkorlik narsalarning foydalanishini va foydalanuvchi foydalanishini ishlab chiqaradi. Biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish qandaydigan BERT asosida bir novel o'rganishni tasavvur qilamiz, bu tashqi foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi muhim vazifani aniqlash uchun qo'shimcha belgilarni aniqlashni istaysiz. Ko'rsatilgan, yaxshilangan novel vazifa mechanisiyatlarimiz, bir vazifa taʼminlovchi, BERT qoʻllanmalar va parametrlarni moslash orqali avtomatik optimal maʼlumotni tanlashga imkoniyat beradi. Bizning natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, modellik foydalanishi modelini o'zgartirish uchun o'xshash va ishlaylikni ko'rsatadi.", 'bg': 'Съществуващите проучвания за използването на социалните медии за извличане на психичното здраве на потребителите се фокусират върху задачата за откриване на депресия. Въпреки това, за управление на случаите и насочване към психиатри, здравните работници изискват практическа и мащабируема система за скрининг и триаж на депресивно разстройство. Това проучване има за цел да разработи и оцени система за подкрепа на вземането на решения (ДСС) за надеждно определяне на нивото на депресивна триаж чрез улавяне на фините депресивни симптоми, изразени в потребителски туитове, чрез емулация на въпросника за здравето на пациента-9 (който рутинно се използва в клиничната практика. Надеждното откриване на депресивни симптоми от туитове е предизвикателство, тъй като ограничението от 280 знака върху туитовете стимулира използването на творчески артефакти в изказванията и фигуративната употреба допринася за ефективното изразяване. Предлагаме нова базирана на базата на стабилна многозадача учебна рамка за точно идентифициране на депресивните симптоми, използвайки спомагателната задача за откриване на фигуративно използване. По-конкретно, нашият предложен нов механизъм за споделяне на задачи, внимание на съвместните задачи, позволява автоматичен избор на оптимална информация в рамките на полагащите и задачите чрез меко споделяне на параметри. Нашите резултати показват, че моделирането на фигуративната употреба може демонстрирано да подобри здравината и надеждността на модела за разграничаване на симптомите на депресия.', 'hr': 'Postoje ispitivanja o upotrebi društvenih medija za otkrivanje mentalnog zdravlja korisnika usredotočene na zadatak otkrivanja depresije. Međutim, za upravljanje slučajevima i odnos na psihijatra, radnici zdravstvene pomoći zahtijevaju praktični i skalabilni sustav pregleda depresivnih poremećaja i ispitivanja. U ovom ispitivanju je cilj dizajnirati i procijeniti sustav potpore odluke (DSS) da se pouzdano utvrdi razina depresivnog ispitivanja hvatanjem zgodnih depresivnih simptoma izraženih u tweetima korisnika kroz emulaciju pitanja na bolničkom zdravlju-9 (PHQ-9) koja se uobičajeno koristi u kliničkoj praksi. Povjerljivo otkrivanje depresivnih simptoma iz tweets je izazovno jer ograničenje 280 karaktera na tweets stimulira uporabu kreativnih artifakta u izrazima i figurativnoj uporabi doprinosi učinkovitom izrazu. Predlažemo nov okvir za učenje multizadataka na temelju BERT-a kako bi precizno identificirali depresivne simptome koristeći pomoćni zadatak otkrivanja figurativnog korištenja. Posebno, naš predloženi mehanizam dijeljenja novih zadataka, pozornost zajedničkog zadatka omogućava automatski izbor optimalnih informacija širom BERT-ovog predstavnika i zadataka mekom dijeljenjem parametara. Naši rezultati pokazuju da modeliranje figurativne primjene može demonstrativno poboljšati robustnost i pouzdanost modela za razliku simptoma depresije.', 'nl': 'Bestaande studies over het gebruik van sociale media voor het afleiden van de geestelijke gezondheidsstatus van gebruikers richten zich op de depressiedetectie taak. Voor case management en doorverwijzing naar psychiaters vereisen gezondheidswerkers echter een praktisch en schaalbaar screening- en triagesysteem voor depressieve stoornissen. Deze studie beoogt het ontwerpen en evalueren van een decision support system (DSS) om het depressieve triage niveau betrouwbaar te bepalen door fijnkorrelige depressieve symptomen te vangen die in gebruikerstweets worden uitgedrukt door middel van de emulatie van de Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) die routinematig wordt gebruikt in de klinische praktijk. De betrouwbare detectie van depressieve symptomen van tweets is uitdagend omdat de 280-karakterlimiet op tweets het gebruik van creatieve artefacten in de uitingen stimuleert en figuratief gebruik bijdraagt aan effectieve expressie. We stellen een nieuw BERT gebaseerd robuust multi-task leerframework voor om de depressieve symptomen nauwkeurig te identificeren met behulp van de hulptaak van figuratieve gebruiksdetectie. Met name maakt ons voorgestelde nieuwe mechanisme voor taakverdeling, co-task bewuste aandacht, automatische selectie van optimale informatie tussen de BERT-leggers en taken mogelijk door soft-sharing van parameters. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het modelleren van figuratief gebruik aantoonbaar de robuustheid en betrouwbaarheid van het model voor het onderscheiden van depressiesymptomen kan verbeteren.', 'da': 'Eksisterende undersøgelser af brugen af sociale medier til at udlede brugernes psykiske sundhedsstatus fokuserer på depressionsdetektionsopgaven. Til sagsbehandling og henvisning til psykiatere kræver sundhedspersonale imidlertid praktisk og skalerbar screening og triage system for depressiv lidelse. Denne undersøgelse har til formål at designe og evaluere et beslutningsstøttesystem (DSS) til pålideligt at bestemme det depressive triage niveau ved at fange finkornede depressive symptomer udtrykt i brugertweets gennem emuleringen af Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9), der rutinemæssigt anvendes i klinisk praksis. Pålidelig påvisning af depressive symptomer fra tweets er udfordrende, fordi grænsen på 280 tegn på tweets stimulerer brugen af kreative artefakter i udtalelserne og figurativ brug bidrager til et effektivt udtryk. Vi foreslår en ny BERT-baseret robust multi-task læringsramme til nøjagtigt at identificere de depressive symptomer ved hjælp af den hjælpeopgave med figurativ brugsdetektion. Konkret muliggør vores foreslåede nye opgavefordelingsmekanisme, opmærksomhed om co-opgaver, automatisk udvælgelse af optimale oplysninger på tværs af BERT-læggere og opgaver ved soft-deling af parametre. Vores resultater viser, at modellering figurativ brug påviseligt kan forbedre modellens robusthed og pålidelighed til at skelne depressionssymptomer.', 'de': 'Bestehende Studien zur Nutzung sozialer Medien zur Ableitung des psychischen Gesundheitszustandes von Nutzern konzentrieren sich auf die Depressionserkennung. Für das Fallmanagement und die Überweisung an Psychiater benötigen Gesundheitsarbeiter jedoch ein praktisches und skalierbares Screening und Triage-System für depressive Störungen. Diese Studie zielt darauf ab, ein Entscheidungsunterstützungssystem (DSS) zu entwerfen und zu evaluieren, um das depressive Triage-Niveau zuverlässig zu bestimmen, indem feinkörnige depressive Symptome erfasst werden, die in User Tweets ausgedrückt werden, durch die Emulation des Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9), der routinemäßig in der klinischen Praxis verwendet wird. Die zuverlässige Erkennung depressiver Symptome von Tweets ist eine Herausforderung, da die 280-Zeichen-Grenze für Tweets die Verwendung kreativer Artefakte in den Äußerungen anregt und die figurative Verwendung zu effektivem Ausdruck beiträgt. Wir schlagen ein neuartiges BERT-basiertes robustes Multi-Task-Lernframework vor, um die depressiven Symptome mithilfe der Hilfsaufgabe der figurativen Nutzungserkennung genau zu identifizieren. Insbesondere ermöglicht unser vorgeschlagener neuartiger Aufgabenteilungsmechanismus, Co-Task Awarent Attention, die automatische Auswahl optimaler Informationen über die BERT-Laien und Aufgaben durch Soft-Sharing von Parametern. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Modellierung der figurativen Nutzung nachweislich die Robustheit und Zuverlässigkeit des Modells zur Unterscheidung der Depressionssymptome verbessern kann.', 'id': 'Studi yang ada tentang menggunakan media sosial untuk mendapatkan status kesehatan mental pengguna fokus pada tugas deteksi depresi. Namun, untuk manajemen kasus dan referensi ke psikiater, pekerja perawatan kesehatan membutuhkan penyelidikan penyakit depresi praktis dan dapat diperiksa dan sistem triage. Studi ini bertujuan untuk merancang dan mengevaluasi sistem dukungan keputusan (DSS) untuk menentukan secara kreatif tingkat triaj depresi dengan menangkap gejala depresi yang mirip terbentuk dalam tweet pengguna melalui emulasi Pertanyaan Kesehatan Pasien-9 (PHQ-9) yang rutin digunakan dalam praktek klinis. Deteksi yang dapat dipercaya dari gejala depressif dari tweet adalah tantangan karena batas 280 karakter pada tweet mendorong penggunaan artefak kreatif dalam ungkapan dan penggunaan figuratif berkontribusi ke ekspresi efektif. Kami mengusulkan sebuah pembelajaran berbasis BERT yang kuat berbagai tugas untuk mengidentifikasi dengan akurat gejala depresi menggunakan tugas bantuan deteksi penggunaan figuratif. Secara spesifik, mekanisme pembagian tugas baru kami yang diusulkan, perhatian menyadari kerja sama, memungkinkan seleksi otomatis informasi optimal di seluruh pembuat BERT dan tugas dengan pembagian lembut parameter. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa pemodelan penggunaan figuratif dapat jelas meningkatkan kepekatan dan kepercayaan model untuk membedakan gejala depresi.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어를 이용해 사용자의 심리 건강 상태를 추정하는 기존 연구는 주로 우울증 검사 임무에 집중됐다.그러나 병례 관리와 정신과 의사의 진료에 있어 의료진은 실용적이고 확장 가능한 우울증 검사와 분진 시스템이 필요하다.본 연구는 임상실험에서 자주 사용하는 환자 건강 설문지-9(PHQ-9)를 모의하여 사용자 트윗에 나타난 세립도 우울증상을 포착하여 우울 분류 수준을 믿을 수 있도록 의사결정 지원 시스템(DSS)을 설계하고 평가하고자 한다.추문에서 우울증을 확실하게 검출하는 것은 도전이다. 추문에서 280글자의 제한은 말에서 창조적인 인공제품을 사용하도록 장려하고 비유의 사용은 효과적인 표현에 도움이 되기 때문이다.우리는 새로운 BERT 기반의 루팡 다중 임무 학습 구조를 제시했고 비유법 검측의 보조 임무를 이용하여 우울증상을 정확하게 식별했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리가 제시한 새로운 임무 공유 메커니즘은 임무 감지와 주의를 협동하여 파라미터의 소프트 공유를 통해 크로스와 임무의 가장 좋은 정보를 자동으로 선택할 수 있다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 모델 비유의 사용은 모델이 우울증상을 구분하는 데 있어 안정성과 신뢰성을 뚜렷하게 높일 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مطالعه\u200cهای موجود در مورد استفاده از رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی برای تولید وضعیت سلامتی روانی از کاربران روی کار شناسایی افسردگی تمرکز می\u200cکنند. ولی برای مدیریت پرونده\u200cها و مربوط به روانپزشکان، کارگران مراقبت سلامتی نیاز دارند که سیستم تجربه\u200cی بیماری\u200cهای آمیزشی و اندازه\u200cگیری و تراژ\u200cها را انجام دهند. این مطالعه هدف دارد سیستم پشتیبانی تصمیم (DSS) را طراحی و ارزیابی کند تا به یقین سطح تلاش افسرده را با دستگیر نشانه\u200cهای افسرده\u200cای پاکیزه\u200cای که در تویت\u200cهای کاربر توضیح داده می\u200cشود با emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) که معمولاً در تمرین کلینیک استفاده می\u200cشود تعیین کند. کشف قابل اعتماد علائم\u200cهای افسرده از تویتها سخت\u200cگیری است، زیرا حدود 280 شخصیت\u200cهای تویتها استفاده از هنری\u200cهای خلاقی در کلمات\u200cها و استفاده\u200cهای تصویر به عبارت موثر می\u200cدهد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها مخصوصا، مکانیسم مشترک وظیفه\u200cی جدید پیشنهاد ما، توجه همکاری، انتخاب اطلاعات مثبتی را از طریق تقسیم\u200cکنندگان BERT و وظیفه\u200cهای نرم\u200cترین پارامتر توان می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که نمونه\u200cسازی استفاده از نمونه\u200cهای تصویر می\u200cتواند به صورت نشانه\u200cهای قوی و اطمینان مدل را برای جدا کردن علائم\u200cهای افسردگی بهبود دهد.', 'sw': 'Utafiti unaoendelea kuhusu kutumia mitandao ya kijamii kwa ajili ya kupata hali ya afya ya kiakili ya watumiaji wanajikita kwenye kazi ya kutambua mawazo. Hata hivyo, kwa utawala wa kesi na kuwaelezea wanasaikolojia, wafanyakazi wa afya wanahitaji ugonjwa wa kimaadili na unaohitaji mabaya ya kuthibiti na mfumo wa utoaji wa afya. Utafiti huu unalenga kutengeneza na kutathmini mfumo wa kuunga mkono uamuzi (DSS) ili kwa uhakika kuamua kiwango cha kuangalia vizuri kwa kuchukua ishara za kina za kisasa zilizoonyeshwa katika twiti za mtumiaji kupitia utekelezaji wa swali la Afya Ngonjwa-9 (PHQ-9) ambalo mara nyingi hutumika katika mazoea ya kliniki. Kugundua uthibitisho wa ishara za depression kutoka kwenye twita unachangamoto kwa sababu ukomo wa tabia 280 kwenye twiti unasisitiza matumizi ya viumbe ubunifu katika maneno na matumizi ya takwimu yanachangia ufanisi wa kujieleza. Tunazipendekeza riwaya yenye msingi wa BERT kuchochea mfumo wa kujifunza kazi nyingi ili kutambua ishara za kina za kisasa kwa kutumia kazi ya upatikanaji wa matumizi ya takwimu. Kwa hakika, juhudi letu lililopendekezwa la riwaya la kushirikiana mfumo wa ushirikiano wa kazi pamoja, linawezesha kujichagua taarifa za kimapenzi katika viwanja vya BERT na kazi kwa kushirikiana kwa vipimo vya mafanikio. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa matumizi ya mifano yanaweza kuongeza wazi ubaguzi wa mifano na uaminifu wa kutofautisha ishara za mawazo.', 'tr': 'Ullançylaryň mental saglygynyň durumyny çykarmak üçin sosial mediýalary ulanmagy barada öň bar öwrenmeler depresiýa tanyşynyň işine üns berýärler. Bu şekilde, psikiyatristlere görkezilmek üçin sağlık sağlamy hizmetçileriniň praktik we ölçeklenmegi bozmylyklarynyň derejesi we çözümlenmeleri gerek. Bu araşdyrma maksady bolup, hasta Saýlaw Soragy-9 (PHQ-9) klinikiýa praktikada ulanan çykyş sistemasy (DSS) içinde näme üçin depresiýa süýtgeşik derejesini çykarmak we çözümlenmek üçin nusgalandyr. Tweetlerden çykyş hasaplanyň güýçli tanamak çykyş bolýar, sebäbi tweetlerde 280-karakter hadysy döredijili suratlaryň sözlerinde döredijili suratlaryň ullanyşyny we figurativ ullanyşynyň etkinleşen ifade etmäge kömekleýär. Biz BERT romanynda gaty möhüm bir multi-täbli öwrenmek framyny çykarýarys. figurativ arşiw tanyşynyň kömeklik zadyny ulanmak üçin esasy wajyplary takyklaýarys. Adatça, biziň täze taýýarlama meýdançasyny paýlamak meýdançasyny,birleşişik üns bermek üçin, BERT oýun paýlamak bilen optimal maglumatyň otomatik saýlamagyny BERT oýun gaýşartýarlaryň we zadlaryny yumuş paýlamak bilen mümkin edýär Biziň netijelerimiz figurativ ulanymyz nusgasyny çykarmak nusgasynyň güýçli we ynamlylyklaryny tapawutlamak üçin örän gowurap biler.', 'sq': 'Studimet ekzistuese mbi përdorimin e medias sociale për marrjen e statusit të shëndetit psikologjik të përdoruesve përqëndrohen në detyrën e zbulimit të depresionit. Megjithatë, për menaxhimin e rasteve dhe referimin ndaj psikiatrit, punonjësit e kujdesit shëndetësor kërkojnë shqyrtim praktik dhe të shkallëzueshëm të sëmundjeve depresive dhe sistem triage. This study aims to design and evaluate a decision support system (DSS) to reliably determine the depressive triage level by capturing fine-grained depressive symptoms expressed in user tweets through the emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) that is routinely used in clinical practice.  Gjetja e besueshme e simptomeve depresive nga tweetet është sfiduese sepse kufiri prej 280 karakterësh në tweetet inkurajon përdorimin e artefakteve krijuese në shprehjet dhe përdorimin figurativ kontribuon në shprehjen efektive. Ne propozojmë një kuadër të fortë mësimi me shumë detyra të bazuar në BERT për të identifikuar saktësisht simptomet depresive duke përdorur detyrën ndihmëse të zbulimit figurativ të përdorimit. Veçanërisht, mekanizmi ynë i ri i propozuar për ndarjen e detyrave, vëmendja e bashkëpunimit të detyrave, lejon zgjedhjen automatike të informacionit optimal nëpërmjet vendosësve dhe detyrave të BERT-it nga ndarja e lehtë e parametrave. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se modelimi i përdorimit figurativ mund të përmirësojë në mënyrë të qartë fuqinë dhe besueshmërinë e modelit për dallimin e simptomeve të depresionit.', 'am': 'የአገኘው ማኅበራዊ አውታር ማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ አውታር የሲካዊ ጤናዊ ሁኔታ ለማግኘት ተጠቃሚዎች የድምፅ አካባቢ አድራጊ ስራትን በመጠቀም ላይ ትምህርት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ለጉዳዩ ማቀናጃ እና ለኪኪና ተሟጋቾች፣ የጤና ፈቃድ ሠራተኞች ስክሪን እና የድፍረት ግጭት ግጭት የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት የፍርድ ድጋፍ ስርዓት (DSS) በመጠቀም በተጠቃሚው ትዊተሮች ላይ በመጠቀም በጥቅምት የተገኘውን ጥሩ አዋቂ ምሳሌዎችን በመያዝ እና በማስተዋል፡፡ ከTwitter የሚታመቀው የአስቸጋሪ ምልክቶች ማግኘት አዋቂ ነው፤ ስለዚህም የ280-ፊደል ግንኙነቱ በንግግር እና በአካባቢ ተጠቃሚ የፍጥረት አካላትን በመጠቀም እና በአካባቢ ተጠቃሚ ትርጉም ለማድረግ ያሳስፋል፡፡ ብኤርቴን የተመሳሳይ የብዙ ስራ ትምህርት መሠረት ፍሬም ለመፍጠር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የተዘጋጀው የአሁኑን አሜሪካ ስራችን ማጋራየት፣ የስራ ማወቅ፣ በBERT-አካባቢዎች እና ስራዎችን በመቀነስ አካባቢ ማሳየት እና በሥርዓት ማሳየት ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ምሳሌዎችን የሚጠቀሙት የሞዴል ልብስ እና መደጋገሚያ እና የድምፅ ምሳሌዎችን ለመለየት የሚችል መሆኑን ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Bestaande studies oor die gebruik van sosiale media vir die afgelei van menslike gesondheid status van gebruikers fokus op die depresiÃ« opdekking taak. Maar vir geval bestuurder en verwysing tot psykiatrisse, die gesondsers-werkers benodig praktiese en skalbare depressiewe dissonderskerm en triagsstelsel. Hierdie studie bepaal om 'n besluit ondersteuning stelsel (DSS) te ontwerp en evalueer om vertroulik die depressiewe triage vlak te bepaal deur die opvang van fyn-graan depressiewe simptome wat in gebruiker tweets uitgevoer word deur die emulaasie van die Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) wat gewoonlik gebruik word in kliniese praksie. Die betroubare opdekking van depressiewe simptome van tweets is aanvaardig omdat die 280-karakterbeperk op tweets die gebruik van kreatiewe kunstenaars in die uitdrukkings en figuratiewe gebruik bydra tot effektief uitdrukking. Ons voorstel 'n roman BERT gebaseerde kragtige multi-taak leer raamwerk om die depressiewe simptome presies te identifiseer deur te gebruik die hulpbrek taak van figuratiewe gebruik beskrywing. Spesifieke, ons voorgestelde nuwe taak gedeel mekanisme, co-taak bekend aandag, maak automaties kies van optimale inligting oor die BERT lay-ers en taak deur sagte-deling van parameters te aktiveer. Ons resultate wys dat die modellering van figuratiewe gebruik kan demonstraal die model se kragtigheid en betroubaarheid verbeter om die depressie simptome te verskille.", 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীদের মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য পরিস্থিতি উদ্ভাবনের জন্য সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম ব্যবহার করে বিদ্যমান গবেষণা করছ তবে মানসিক ব্যবস্থাপনা এবং মনোযোগীদের কাছে উল্লেখ করার জন্য, স্বাস্থ্য সেবা কর্মীদের ব্যবস্থা পর্দা ও ত্রিয়েজ ব্যবস্থা প্রয This study aims to design and evaluate a decision support system (DSS) to reliably determine the depressive triage level by capturing fine-grained depressive symptoms expressed in user tweets through the emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) that is routinely used in clinical practice.  টুইট থেকে দুর্দশালী সংক্রান্ত বিশ্বস্ত সংক্রান্ত বিষয়টি চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে কারণ টুইটে টুইট করা ২৮০ চরিত্রের সীমাবদ্ধ কারণ শব্দ এবং পরিমাণ ব্যবহারের ক্ষমত আমরা বেরেট ভিত্তিক একটি উপন্যাসের প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে সংখ্যাত পরিসংখ্যাত ব্যবহারকারী সনাক্তি ব্যবহারের প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবহারের ব্যবহারের অনুম বিশেষ করে, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত উপন্যাস কাজ শেয়ার করা মেনিস্টেম, কোম্পানির দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি সচেতনতা, বিবেরেটি লেয়ার এবং কাজের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্ আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মডেলিং ডিগারেটিভ ব্যবহারের মোডেলের রাস্তা এবং বিশ্বাসযোগ্যতা প্রকাশ করে দেখাতে পারে যে দুর্দশ', 'bs': 'Postoje studije o upotrebi socijalnih medija za otkrivanje mentalnog zdravlja korisnika fokusirane su na zadatak otkrivanja depresije. Međutim, za upravljanje slučajevima i odnos na psihijatra, radnici zdravstvene pomoći zahtijevaju praktični i mjerljivi sistem pregleda depresivnih poremećaja i triaža. U ovom ispitivanju se cilja dizajnirati i procijeniti sistem potpore odluke (DSS) da se pouzdano utvrdi nivo depresivnog ispitivanja hvatanjem zgodnih depresivnih simptoma izraženih u tweetima korisnika kroz emulaciju pitanja na bolničkom zdravlju-9 (PHQ-9) koja se uobičajeno koristi u kliničkoj praksi. Povjerljivo otkrivanje depresivnih simptoma iz tweets je izazovno jer ograničenje 280 karaktera na tweets stimulira korištenje kreativnih artifakta u rečenicama i figurativnom korištenju doprinosi učinkovitom izrazom. Predlažemo novi okvir za učenje na osnovu BERT-a, jak multizadatak, da precizno identifikuje depresivne simptome koristeći pomoćni zadatak otkrivanja figurativnog korištenja. Posebno, naš predloženi mehanizam dijeljenja novih zadataka, pozornost kozadataka, omogućava automatsku selekciju optimalnih informacija širom BERT-ovog predstavljača i zadataka mekim dijelom parametara. Naši rezultati pokazuju da modeliranje figurativne upotrebe može demonstrativno poboljšati robustnost i pouzdanost modela za razliku simptoma depresije.', 'az': 'İstifadəçilərin ruhsal sağlamlıq vəziyyətini depresiyanın keşfetməsi üçün sosyal media istifadə etmək barəsindəki təhsil işləri. Halbuki, psikiyatristlərə müvəffəq etmək və məlumatlarına danışmaq üçün sağlamlıq məlumatlarının praktik və ölçülü depresif fərqlənməsi və triaj sistemi lazımdır. Bu araşdırma məqsədilə, kliniki praksidə istifadə edilən hasta Sağlığı Soruşturma-9 (PHQ-9) imülasyonu vasitəsilə istifadəçilərində ifadə edilən depresifik simptomları müəyyən edilən depresifik dəyişiklik səviyyəsini təyin etmək və təmin etmək üçün karar vermək sistemini təyin etmək və değerlənmək istəyir. Tövetlərin depresifik simptomların güvenilir təşkil edilməsi çətindir, çünki twetlərin 280 karakter limiti sözlərdə yaradıcı sanatçıların istifadəsini və figurativ istifadəsi effektiv ifadə edər. Biz yeni BERT-in çoxlu işlər öyrənməsi sistemini təklif edirik ki, figurativ istifadə edilməsinin istifadə edilməsi üçün depresifik simptomları təsdiqləyirik. Özellikle, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz yeni iş paylaşma mehānismimiz, co-task-aware ünvanı, BERT lay ers və işlərimiz arasında, yumuşaq paylaşıb optimal məlumatların avtomatik seçimini sağlar. Sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, modellərin figurativ istifadəsi modellərin güclülüyünü və təvəkküllüyünü depresiyanın simptomlarını ayırmaq üçün daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər.', 'cs': 'Stávající studie o využití sociálních médií pro odvození duševního zdravotního stavu uživatelů se zaměřují na úlohu detekce deprese. Nicméně pro řízení případů a odkaz na psychiatry, zdravotní pracovníci vyžadují praktický a škálovatelný systém screeningu a třídění depresivních poruch. Cílem této studie je navrhnout a zhodnotit systém podpory rozhodování (DSS), který spolehlivě stanoví úroveň depresivní triáže zachycením jemnozrnných depresivních symptomů vyjádřených v uživatelských tweetech prostřednictvím emulace dotazníku zdraví pacientů-9 (PHQ-9), který je běžně používán v klinické praxi. Spolehlivá detekce depresivních příznaků z tweetů je náročná, protože 280-znakový limit tweetů motivuje k použití kreativních artefaktů v projevech a figurativní použití přispívá k efektivnímu vyjádření. Navrhujeme nový robustní víceúlohový učební rámec založený na BERT, který přesně identifikuje depresivní symptomy pomocí pomocné úlohy detekce figurativního využití. Konkrétně, náš navržený nový mechanismus sdílení úkolů,co-task aware pozornost, umožňuje automatický výběr optimálních informací napříč pracovníky BERT a úkoly prostřednictvím měkkého sdílení parametrů. Naše výsledky ukazují, že modelování figurativního využití může prokazatelně zlepšit robustnost a spolehlivost modelu pro rozlišení příznaků deprese.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad uuringud sotsiaalmeedia kasutamise kohta kasutajate vaimse tervise seisundi tuvastamiseks keskenduvad depressiooni tuvastamise ülesandele. Kuid juhtumite juhtimiseks ja psühhiaatrite juurde suunamiseks vajavad tervishoiutöötajad praktilist ja skaleeritavat depressiivse häire sõelumise ja triaažisüsteemi. Selle uuringu eesmärk on kujundada ja hinnata otsustamist toetav süsteem (DSS), et usaldusväärselt määrata depressiooni triaaži tase, jäädvustades kasutaja säutsides väljendatud peeneteralised depressioonisümptomid kliinilises praktikas tavapäraselt kasutatava patsiendi tervise küsimustiku 9 (PHQ-9) emuleerimise kaudu. Depressiivsete sümptomite usaldusväärne tuvastamine säutsudest on keeruline, sest 280-täheline piirmäär säutsudele stimuleerib loominguliste esemete kasutamist väljendustes ja kujunduslik kasutamine aitab kaasa efektiivsele väljendusele. Pakume välja uudse BERT-põhise tugeva mitmeülesandelise õpperaamistiku depressioonisümptomite täpseks tuvastamiseks, kasutades kujundusliku kasutuse tuvastamise abiülesannet. Täpsemalt võimaldab meie kavandatud uus ülesannete jagamise mehhanism, kaasülesannete teadlik tähelepanu, automaatselt valida optimaalset teavet BERTi paigaldajate ja ülesannete vahel parameetrite pehme jagamise teel. Meie tulemused näitavad, et kujundusliku kasutamise modelleerimine võib tõestatavalt parandada mudeli tugevust ja usaldusväärsust depressiooni sümptomite eristamisel.', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat tutkimukset sosiaalisen median käytöstä käyttäjien mielenterveystilanteen selvittämiseen keskittyvät masennuksen havaitsemiseen. Terveydenhuollon työntekijät tarvitsevat kuitenkin käytännön ja skaalautuvan masennushäiriön seulonta- ja triaažijärjestelmän tapausten hallintaan ja psykiatrille ohjaamiseen. Tämän tutkimuksen tavoitteena on suunnitella ja arvioida päätöksenteon tukijärjestelmä (DSS), jonka avulla voidaan luotettavasti määrittää masennuksen triaasitaso taltioimalla käyttäjän tweeteissä ilmaistuja hienorakeisia masennuksen oireita emuloimalla Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9), jota käytetään rutiininomaisesti kliinisessä käytännössä. Masennusoireiden luotettava havaitseminen tweeteistä on haastavaa, koska tweettien 280 merkin raja kannustaa luovien artefaktien käyttöä lauseissa ja figuratiivinen käyttö edistää tehokasta ilmaisua. Ehdotamme uutta BERT-pohjaista vankkaa monitehtäväoppimiskehystä, jonka avulla masennusoireet voidaan tunnistaa tarkasti kuvaavan käytön havaitsemisen aputehtävän avulla. Erityisesti ehdotettu uusi tehtäväjakomekanismimme, yhteistehtävätietoinen huomio, mahdollistaa optimaalisen tiedon automaattisen valinnan BERT-asettelijoiden ja tehtävien välillä parametrien pehmeän jakamisen avulla. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että kuviollisen käytön mallintaminen voi osoittaa parantavan mallin kestävyyttä ja luotettavuutta masennusoireiden tunnistamisessa.', 'hy': "Existing studies on using social media for deriving mental health status of users focus on the depression detection task.  Այնուամենայնիվ, դեպքերի ղեկավարման և հոգեբույժների մոտ խորհուրդ տալու համար առողջապահության աշխատակիցները պահանջում են պրակտիկ և ընդլայնելի դեպրեսիվ խանգարումների ստուգելու և ընտրության համակարգի: Այս ուսումնասիրության նպատակն է նախագծել և գնահատել որոշումների աջակցության համակարգը (DSS), որպեսզի վստահելի կերպով որոշենք դեպրեսիվ տրամադրության մակարդակը՝ բռնելով օգտագործողների թվիթերում արտահայտված գեղեցիկ դեպրեսիվ ախտանիշներ' հիվանդի առողջապահության 9 (PHQ-9)  Թվիթերի դեպրեսիվ ախտանիշների վստահելի հայտնաբերումը դժվար է, որովհետև թվիթերի 280-ական սահմանափակումը խրախուսում է ստեղծագործական արտահայտությունների օգտագործումը արտահայտություններում և ֆիգուրային օգտագործումներում աջակցում է արդյունավետ արտա Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր BER-ի հիմնված ուժեղ բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության շրջանակ ճշգրիտ հայտնաբերելու համար դեպրեսիվ ախտանիշները օգտագործելով ֆիգերատիվ օգտագործման օգտագործման օգտակար խնդիրը: Հատկապես, մեր առաջարկած նոր առաջադրանքների կիսման մեխանիզմը, համագործակցած գիտակցական ուշադրությունը, հնարավորություն է տալիս ավտոմատիկ ընտրել լավագույն տեղեկատվությունը BER-ի խաղացողների և առաջադրանքների միջոցով: Our results show that modeling figurative usage can demonstrably improve the model's robustness and reliability for distinguishing the depression symptoms.", 'ca': "Els estudis existents sobre l'ús dels mitjans socials per obtenir l'estatus de salut mental dels usuaris es centren en la tasca de detecció de depressió. Però, per a la gestió de casos i la referència a psiquiatras, els treballadors sanitaris necessiten un sistema pràctic i escalable de detecció i triatge de trastorns depressius. Aquest estudi té l'objectiu de dissenyar i evaluar un sistema de suport a la decisió (DSS) per determinar de manera fiable el nivell de triatge depressiu capturant símptomes depressius fins grains expresss en els tweets dels usuaris a través de l'emulació del Questionàriu de Saúde del Pacient-9 (PHQ-9) que s'utilitza rutinàriament en la pràctica clínica. The reliable detection of depressive symptoms from tweets is challenging because the 280-character limit on tweets incentivizes the use of creative artifacts in the utterances and figurative usage contributes to effective expression.  Proposem un nou marc d'aprenentatge multitascat basat en BERT per identificar amb precisió els símptomes depressius utilitzant la tasca auxiliar de detecció de l'ús figuratiu. Concretament, el nostre nou mecanisme de compartir tasques proposat, atenció conscient de la co-tasca, permet la selecció automàtica de la informació óptima entre els programadors de BERT i tasques compartint els paràmetres de forma suau. Els nostres resultats demostren que modelar l'ús figuratiu pot millorar demostrablement la robustet i fiabilitat del model per distingir els s ímptomes de depressió.", 'ha': "Ana da karatun masu amfani da mitandai da jamii dõmin ya sami halin zartar da mazaɓa wa masu amfani da shi, sai ya yi makini ga aikin muhimmanci. A lokacin da ake kama da masu shawara da misalin mutane, sai aikin zartar da afya sun ƙayyade wani taƙaitacce da taƙaitacce mai taƙaita taƙaitacce na taƙaitacce da taƙaitãwa. Wannan littãfi na aimar a designe da evaluate tsarin bayani na zartar da umarni (DSS) dõmin a iya ƙayyade daraja ta depressive game da ka kãma ãyõyi masu fifi-grafi na depressive wanda aka nuna cikin mawadãci na amfani da shi, a bayan anayyar da wa'anar-9 (PHQ-9). Ina iya aminci da alama masu depressive daga Twitter yana mai zartar da haske, kwani grensa na rubutun 280 na kan Twitter yana ƙara wa matuƙar masu kifi cikin hotuba da amfani da misãlai na ƙara ga mutane masu fasahan. Munã buɗa wani bango na BERT da aka baka firam mai sanar aiki masu yawa dõmin ya gane ãyõyi masu depressive da amfani da aikin da za'a iya lissafa wa masu amfani da fasarin. A ƙayyade, shirin aikin nan da aka buƙata wajen sharing mekanin yanzu-yanzu, masu fahimta ga aikin aiki da ke iya amfani da shiryarwa, yana yarda da shiryoyin shirin parameters farat ɗaya. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa amfani da misãlai za ta iya ƙara bayani ga tufãfinin misalin da aminci na da rarraba ayukan raɗabi.", 'jv': 'Sayensi politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sayensi Awak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan anyar sing dibutuhke gampang ning tutis kuwi kalem nggawe lanjut ning 2-layar mbut kuwi 2-layar tentang kanggo bitawak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan artika sing paling-kreatif sing ngwalikno tambah bantuan tambah nggawe nguasai layar neng akeh nyong. Awak dhéwé nggunakake batir BERT batir akèh lan akeh multi-task öyenung nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Kebebasan sembarang apik dhéwé Juk-Juk, kita supoyo nggawe romi task sharing mehanimis,co-task-awake atensi, iso nggawe auto-pilihan informasi yang bebasan kanggo ngilangno BERT Layer-er karo task-sharing software-sharing parameters. Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono akeh model iso nggawe diuwisan ngono nggawe barang apik dhéwé kuwi tindakan ngono nggawe barang apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'מחקרים קיימים על השימוש בתקשורת חברתית כדי להשיג סטטוס בריאות נפשית של המשתמשים להתמקד במשימת גילוי הדיכאון. בכל אופן, עבור ניהול תיקים ותייחס לפסיכיאטרים, עובדי טיפול בריאות דורשים בדיקת הפרעות מדכאות מעשית ומקבלת. המחקר הזה מכוון לעצב ולעריך מערכת תמיכת החלטות (DSS) כדי לקבוע באופן אמין את רמת המשולש הדכאי על ידי תפיסת תסמינים מדכאים מוצפים בטיוויטים משתמשים דרך האימולציה של השאלון הבריאות של החולה-9 (PHQ-9) שמשתמש rutinely באימונים קליניים. גילוי האמין של תסמינים מדכאים מתוך טוויטים הוא מאתגר כי הגבול של 280 אופים על טוויטים מעודד את השימוש של חפצים יצירתיים במילים ושימוש דמוי תורם לבטא יעיל. אנו מציעים מסגרת לימוד מוצקה ומבוססת על BERT חדשה עם מספר משימות כדי לזהות בדיוק את הסימפטומים הדכאונים באמצעות המשימה העוזרת של זיהוי שימוש דמוי. במיוחד, מנגנון שיתוף המשימה החדש המוצע שלנו, תשומת לב מודעת לשותף משימה, מאפשר לבחור אוטומטי של מידע אופטימלי ברחבי משחקי BERT ומשימות על ידי שיתוף רכה של פרמטרים. התוצאות שלנו מראות ששימוש דגמני אפשרי לשפר באופן ברור את חזקותו והאמינות של הדוגמנית להבחין את תסמינים הדיכאון.', 'sk': 'Obstoječe študije o uporabi družbenih medijev za ugotavljanje stanja duševnega zdravja uporabnikov se osredotočajo na nalogo odkrivanja depresije. Za upravljanje primerov in napotitev k psihiatru pa zdravstveni delavci potrebujejo praktičen in razširljiv sistem presejanja in triaže depresivnih motenj. Cilj te študije je oblikovati in oceniti sistem za podporo odločanju (DSS) za zanesljivo določanje ravni depresivne triaže z zajemanjem drobnozrnatih depresivnih simptomov, izraženih v uporabniških tweetih z emulacijo vprašalnika za zdravje pacientov-9 (PHQ-9), ki se rutinsko uporablja v klinični praksi. Zanesljivo odkrivanje depresivnih simptomov iz tweetov je zahtevno, saj omejitev 280 znakov na tweetih spodbuja uporabo ustvarjalnih artefaktov v izgovorih, figurativna uporaba pa prispeva k učinkovitemu izražanju. Predlagamo nov robustni večopravilni učni okvir, ki temelji na BERT, za natančno prepoznavanje depresivnih simptomov s pomožno nalogo figurativnega zaznavanja uporabe. Natančneje, naš predlagani novi mehanizem za delitev nalog, ozaveščenost o soodločitvi, omogoča samodejno izbiro optimalnih informacij v BERT-ovih postaviteljih in nalogah z mehko delitvijo parametrov. Naši rezultati kažejo, da lahko modeliranje figurativne uporabe dokazno izboljša robustnost in zanesljivost modela pri razlikovanju simptomov depresije.', 'bo': 'གནས ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལྟ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ་དང་། སྐྱེས་བའི་ནད་མེད་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཕྱོགས་ནུས་པ་སྨན་ཞབས་ཏོག This study aims to design and evaluate a decision support system (DSS) to reliably determine the depressive triage level by capturing fine-grained depressive symptoms expressed in user tweets through the emulation of the Patient Health Questionnaire-9 (PHQ-9) that is routinely used in clinical practice. Tweets ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱིས་ཡོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་རྟོགས་རྩོལ་བ་དག་གི་ཚད་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་BERT གསར་གཏོང་ཞིག་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཡོད་པའི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་རྩོམ་བ་སྣེ་མང་ཆོས་རྩོམ་གཏོང་གི་མཐུན་རྟགས་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་ཚོར་བ་དག་ Specifically, our proposed novel task sharing mechanism,co-task aware attention, enables automatic selection of optimal information across the BERT lay-ers and tasks by soft-sharing of parameters. ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་མ་དབྱིབས་རིག་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ལམ་གྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་དང་མཐུན'}
{'en': 'Probing Multimodal Embeddings for Linguistic Properties : the Visual-Semantic Case', 'fr': 'Sondage des intégrations multimodales à la recherche de propriétés linguistiques\xa0: le cas visuel-sémantique', 'ar': 'سبر تطريز متعدد الوسائط للخصائص اللغوية: الحالة المرئية الدلالية', 'es': 'Sondeo de incrustaciones multimodales para propiedades lingüísticas: el caso visual-semántico', 'pt': 'Provando Embeddings Multimodais para Propriedades Linguísticas: o Caso Visual-Semântico', 'ru': 'Зондирование мультимодальных вложений для лингвистических свойств: визуально-семантический случай', 'ja': '言語的性質のためのマルチモーダル埋め込みのプローブ：視覚的-意味的ケース', 'zh': '探语属性者多模态嵌:视觉语义例', 'hi': 'भाषाई गुणों के लिए मल्टीमॉडल एम्बेडिंग की जांच: दृश्य-शब्दार्थ मामला', 'ga': 'Leabú Ilmhódúil a Scrúdú le haghaidh Airíonna Teangeolaíocha: an Tuiseal Amharcshéimeantach', 'ka': 'ლინგისტიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის მულტიმედიალური ინბედირებების შემოწმება: ვიზუალური- სემანტიკური სიმბეჭი', 'hu': 'Multimodális beágyazások vizsgálata nyelvi tulajdonságokhoz: a vizuális-szemantikus eset', 'el': 'Δοκιμή πολυμέσων ενσωμάτωσης για γλωσσικές ιδιότητες: η οπτική-σημαντική περίπτωση', 'it': 'Sondare gli embedding multimodali per le proprietà linguistiche: il caso visivo-semantico', 'kk': 'Лингистикалық қасиеттердің көптеген ендірулерін тексеру: the Visual- Semantic Case', 'mk': 'Истражување на мултимодилни вградувања за јазични сопствености: визуелно-семантичен случај', 'ms': 'Mencoba Penjelmaan Multimodal untuk Ciri-ciri Bahasa: Kasus Semantik-Visual', 'ml': 'ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മള്\u200dമോഡല്\u200d എംബെഡിങുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു: the Visual- Semantic Case', 'mt': 'Probing Multimodal Embeddings for Linguistic Properties: the Visual-Semantic Case', 'mn': 'Холбооны шинжлэх ухааныг олон моделийн нэвтрүүлэлтийг судалж: харагдах-Semantic Case', 'no': 'Prøver fleire modular innbygging for lingistiske eigenskapar: Visuelt- semiansk bokstavar', 'pl': 'Badanie multimodalnych osadzeń dla właściwości językowych: przypadek wizualno-semantyczny', 'ro': 'Proiectarea încorporărilor multimodale pentru proprietățile lingvistice: cazul vizual-semantic', 'sr': 'Proba multimodalne integracije za lingvističke vlasništvo: vizualni semantički slučaj', 'si': 'ලින්ග්යුසිස්ටික විශේෂතාව සඳහා ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් ඇම්බෙඩ්ජින් පරීක්ෂණය: the Visal- semantic case', 'so': 'Isticmaalka qalabka kala duduwan ee luuqadaha ku qoran: The Visual-Semantic Case', 'lt': 'Linguistinių savybių daugiarūšio įrenginio bandymas: vizualinis-semantinis atvejis', 'sv': 'Undersöka multimodala inbäddningar för språkliga egenskaper: det visuella-semantiska fallet', 'ur': 'Linguistic PropertyName', 'ta': 'Linguistic Properties for Multimodal Embeddings: the Visual- Semantic Case', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định vị môi trường đa phương cho tính chất ngôn ngữ: vụ án ảo', 'bg': 'Проучване на мултимодални вграждания за лингвистични свойства: визуално-семантичен случай', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af multimodale indlejringer til sproglige egenskaber: den visuelle-semantiske sag', 'nl': 'Multimodale embeddings testen op taalkundige eigenschappen: het visueel-semantische geval', 'hr': 'Proba multimodalnih uključenja za lingvističke vlasništvo: vizualni semantički slučaj', 'de': 'Untersuchung multimodaler Einbettungen auf linguistische Eigenschaften: der visuell-semantische Fall', 'id': 'Mencoba Penampilan Multimodal untuk Properti Bahasa: Kasus Visual-Semantik', 'fa': 'تحقیق پیوند\u200cبندی\u200cهای چندmodal برای ویژگی\u200cهای لینگیستیک: پرونده\u200cی ویژه\u200cهای سیمانتیک', 'sw': 'Kujaribu Mazungumzo ya Vifaa vya Kilinguistic: The Visual-Semantic Case', 'ko': '언어 속성의 다중모드 삽입 연구: 시각적 의미 사례', 'sq': 'Probimi i përfshirjeve multimodale për pronësitë gjuhësore: rasti vizual-Semantik', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Çizgisel Häsiýetleri üçin Çoklumodal Ködlemeler denemek: the Visual-Semantic Case', 'af': 'Probeer Multimodale Inbêding vir Linguistiese Eienskappe: the Visual- Semantic Case', 'hy': 'Լեզվային առանձնահատկությունների բազմամոդալ ներգրավումների փորձում. տեսողական-սեմանտիկ դեպք', 'az': 'Linguistik x칲susiyy톛tl톛r 칲칞칲n 칞oxlu modal 캻fad톛l톛ri s캼namaq: the Visual-Semantic Case', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর জন্য বহুমোডাল এমবেডিং প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে: the View- Semandic Case', 'cs': 'Snímání multimodálních vložení pro jazykové vlastnosti: vizuálně-sémantický případ', 'bs': 'Proba multimodalne integracije za lingvističke vlasništvo: vizuelni semantički slučaj', 'et': 'Keeleliste omaduste multimodaalsete manustamiste uurimine: visuaalsemantiline juhtum', 'ca': 'Probing Multimodal Embeddings for Linguistic Properties: the Visual-Semantic Case', 'fi': 'Multimodaalisten sulautusten kartoittaminen kielisten ominaisuuksien osalta: visuaalis-semanttinen tapaus', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Preverjanje večmodalnih vgradnj jezikovnih lastnosti: vizualno-semantični primer', 'he': 'ניסיון התקפות רבות מודליות עבור תכונות לינגליות: תיק ויזואלי-סמנטי', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ངོ་བོར་ལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཁ་བསྡམས་ནང་དུ་ཚོད་ལྟ་བྱེད：མཐོང་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་'}
{'en': 'Semantic embeddings have advanced the state of the art for countless natural language processing tasks, and various extensions to multimodal domains, such as visual-semantic embeddings, have been proposed. While the power of visual-semantic embeddings comes from the distillation and enrichment of information through machine learning, their inner workings are poorly understood and there is a shortage of analysis tools. To address this problem, we generalize the notion ofprobing tasks to the visual-semantic case. To this end, we (i) discuss the formalization of probing tasks for embeddings of image-caption pairs, (ii) define three concrete probing tasks within our general framework, (iii) train classifiers to probe for those properties, and (iv) compare various state-of-the-art embeddings under the lens of the proposed probing tasks. Our experiments reveal an up to 16 % increase in accuracy on visual-semantic embeddings compared to the corresponding unimodal embeddings, which suggest that the text and image dimensions represented in the former do complement each other.', 'ar': 'طورت حفلات الزفاف الدلالية أحدث ما توصلت إليه مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية التي لا تعد ولا تحصى ، وتم اقتراح امتدادات مختلفة للمجالات متعددة الوسائط ، مثل حفلات الزفاف المرئية الدلالية. في حين أن قوة الزخارف المرئية الدلالية تأتي من تقطير وإثراء المعلومات من خلال التعلم الآلي ، فإن أعمالهم الداخلية غير مفهومة جيدًا وهناك نقص في أدوات التحليل. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقوم بتعميم فكرة تجريب المهام على الحالة الدلالية المرئية. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نحن (1) نناقش إضفاء الطابع الرسمي على مهام التحقيق لتضمين أزواج التعليقات التوضيحية للصور ، (2) تحديد ثلاث مهام تحقيق ملموسة في إطارنا العام ، (3) تدريب المصنفات على التحقيق في تلك الخصائص ، و (4) قارن بين مختلف حفلات الزفاف الحديثة تحت عدسة مهام التحقيق المقترحة. تكشف تجاربنا عن زيادة تصل إلى 16٪ في الدقة على حفلات الزفاف المرئية الدلالية مقارنةً بحفلات الزفاف أحادية النسق المقابلة ، مما يشير إلى أن أبعاد النص والصورة الممثلة في الأول تكمل بعضها البعض.', 'ja': 'セマンティック埋め込みは、無数の自然言語処理タスクのための最先端を進歩させ、視覚的セマンティック埋め込みなどのマルチモーダルドメインへの様々な拡張が提案されている。 視覚的-セマンティックな埋め込みの力は、機械学習を通じて情報を蒸留して豊かにすることに由来しますが、それらの内部機能はあまり理解されておらず、分析ツールが不足しています。 この問題に対処するために、タスクを探索するという概念を視覚的-セマンティックケースに一般化します。 この目的のために、私たちは（ i ）画像キャプションペアの埋め込みのためのプロービングタスクの形式化について議論し、（ ii ）私たちの一般的な枠組みの中で3つの具体的なプロービングタスクを定義し、（ iii ）それらの特性をプロービングするために分類子を訓練し、（ iv ）提案されたプロービングタスクのレンズの下で様々な最先端の埋め込みを比較します。 当社の実験では、対応する単式埋め込みと比較して、ビジュアル-セマンティック埋め込みの精度が最大16 ％向上していることが明らかになりました。これは、前者で表されるテキストと画像の寸法が互いに補完し合っていることを示唆しています。', 'es': 'Las incorporaciones semánticas han avanzado el estado del arte para innumerables tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, y se han propuesto varias extensiones a los dominios multimodales, como las incrustaciones visual-semánticas. Si bien el poder de las incrustaciones visual-semánticas proviene de la destilación y el enriquecimiento de la información a través del aprendizaje automático, su funcionamiento interno no se comprende bien y hay escasez de herramientas de análisis. Para abordar este problema, generalizamos la noción de tareas de sondeo al caso visual-semántico. Con este fin, (i) discutimos la formalización de las tareas de sondeo para incrustaciones de pares de imágenes y subtítulos, (ii) definimos tres tareas de sondeo concretas dentro de nuestro marco general, (iii) entrenamos clasificadores para sondear esas propiedades, y (iv) comparamos varias incrustaciones de última generación bajo la lente de la propuesta tareas de sondeo. Nuestros experimentos revelan un aumento de hasta un 16% en la precisión de las incrustaciones visual-semánticas en comparación con las incrustaciones unimodales correspondientes, lo que sugiere que las dimensiones del texto y la imagen representadas en la primera se complementan entre sí.', 'pt': 'Embeddings semânticos avançaram o estado da arte para inúmeras tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, e várias extensões para domínios multimodais, como embeddings semântico-visuais, foram propostas. Embora o poder das incorporações visual-semânticas venha da destilação e do enriquecimento de informações por meio do aprendizado de máquina, seu funcionamento interno é pouco compreendido e há uma escassez de ferramentas de análise. Para resolver este problema, generalizamos a noção de tarefas de sondagem para o caso visual-semântico. Para este fim, nós (i) discutimos a formalização de tarefas de sondagem para a incorporação de pares de legendas de imagem, (ii) definimos três tarefas de sondagem concretas dentro de nossa estrutura geral, (iii) treinamos classificadores para sondar essas propriedades e (iv) comparar várias incorporações de última geração sob a lente das tarefas de sondagem propostas. Nossos experimentos revelam um aumento de até 16% na precisão dos embeddings visual-semânticos em comparação com os embeddings unimodais correspondentes, o que sugere que as dimensões de texto e imagem representadas no primeiro se complementam.', 'fr': "Les intégrations sémantiques ont fait progresser l'état de l'art pour d'innombrables tâches de traitement du langage naturel, et diverses extensions de domaines multimodaux, telles que les intégrations visuo-sémantiques, ont été proposées. Alors que la puissance des intégrations visuo-sémantiques provient de la distillation et de l'enrichissement de l'information par le biais de l'apprentissage automatique, leur fonctionnement interne est mal compris et les outils d'analyse manquent. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous généralisons la notion de tâches de sondage au cas visuo-sémantique. À cette fin, nous (i) discutons de la formalisation des tâches de sondage pour l'intégration de paires image-légende, (ii) définissons trois tâches de sondage concrètes dans notre cadre général, (iii) formons des classificateurs à sonder ces propriétés, et (iv) comparons divers enrobages de pointe dans le cadre du projet tâches de sondage. Nos expériences révèlent une augmentation de 16\xa0% de la précision des intégrations visuo-sémantiques par rapport aux intégrations unimodales correspondantes, ce qui suggère que les dimensions du texte et de l'image représentées dans les premiers se complètent.", 'zh': '语义嵌无数自然语言供最先进之术,且已开模态域诸广,如视觉语义嵌。 虽视语义之力,由机器学之富,而内理知之甚少,而乏析具。 推其大概于视觉语义例。 是以 (i) 议嵌象之形式化,(ii) 于吾众框架之内定义三事之探,(iii) 练分类器以测其性,及 (iv) 于建议之镜头,较诸先进之嵌。 臣等实验显,比其单模嵌,视语义嵌准确性增16%,明前文尺寸实相补也。', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक एम्बेडिंग ने अनगिनत प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों के लिए कला की स्थिति को उन्नत किया है, और मल्टीमॉडल डोमेन के विभिन्न एक्सटेंशन, जैसे कि दृश्य-शब्दार्थ एम्बेडिंग, प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं। जबकि दृश्य-शब्दार्थ एम्बेडिंग की शक्ति मशीन लर्निंग के माध्यम से जानकारी के आसवन और संवर्धन से आती है, उनके आंतरिक कामकाज को खराब तरीके से समझा जाता है और विश्लेषण उपकरणों की कमी होती है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम दृश्य-शब्दार्थ मामले में कार्यों को प्रस्तुत करने की धारणा को सामान्यीकृत करते हैं। इस अंत तक, हम (i) छवि-कैप्शन जोड़े के एम्बेडिंग के लिए जांच कार्यों की औपचारिकता पर चर्चा करते हैं, (ii) हमारे सामान्य ढांचे के भीतर तीन ठोस जांच कार्यों को परिभाषित करते हैं, (iii) उन गुणों के लिए जांच करने के लिए क्लासिफायरों को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, और (iv) प्रस्तावित जांच कार्यों के लेंस के तहत विभिन्न अत्याधुनिक एम्बेडिंग की तुलना करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि संबंधित यूनिमोडल एम्बेडिंग की तुलना में दृश्य-शब्दार्थ एम्बेडिंग पर सटीकता में 16% तक की वृद्धि हुई है, जो सुझाव देते हैं कि पूर्व में प्रतिनिधित्व किए गए पाठ और छवि आयाम एक-दूसरे के पूरक हैं।', 'ru': 'Семантические вложения продвинули современный уровень для бесчисленных задач обработки естественного языка, и были предложены различные расширения мультимодальных доменов, такие как визуально-семантические вложения. В то время как сила визуально-семантических вложений исходит от дистилляции и обогащения информации посредством машинного обучения, их внутренние работы плохо поняты и существует нехватка инструментов анализа. Для решения этой проблемы мы обобщаем понятие зондированиязадач к визуально-семантическому случаю. С этой целью мы (i) обсуждаем формализацию задач зондирования для вложений пар изображение-каптирование, (ii) определяем три конкретные задачи зондирования в наших общих рамках, (iii) обучаем классификаторы зондировать эти свойства, и (iv) сравниваем различные современные вложения под линзой предлагаемых задач зондирования. Наши эксперименты выявляют увеличение точности на визуально-семантических вложениях до 16% по сравнению с соответствующими унимодальными вложениями, которые предполагают, что представленные в них размеры текста и изображения дополняют друг друга.', 'ga': 'Chuir leabaithe shéimeantacha an úrscothacht chun cinn do thascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha iomadúla, agus tá síntí éagsúla molta ar réimsí ilmhódacha, amhail leabú amhairc-shéimeantach. Cé go dtagann cumhacht an leabaithe amhairc-shéimeantach ó dhriogadh agus saibhriú faisnéise trí mheaisín-fhoghlaim, ní thuigtear go dona a gcuid oibre laistigh agus tá ganntanas uirlisí anailíse ann. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo, déanaimid ginearálú ar an nóisean de thascanna a scrúdú chuig an gcás amhairc-shéimeantach. Chuige sin, déanaimid (i) plé ar fhoirmiú na dtascanna fiosrúcháin chun péirí le fotheideal íomhánna a leabú, (ii) trí thasc iniúchta nithiúla a shainiú laistigh dár gcreat ginearálta, (iii) aicmitheoirí a oiliúint chun na hairíonna sin a iniúchadh, agus (iv) comparáid a dhéanamh idir leabaithe úrscothacha éagsúla faoi lionsa na dtascanna fiosrúcháin atá beartaithe. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh méadú suas le 16% ar chruinneas na leabaithe amhairc-shéimeantacha i gcomparáid leis na leabaithe aonmhódúla comhfhreagracha, a thugann le tuiscint go gcomhlánaíonn na toisí téacs agus íomhá a léirítear sa chéad cheann a chéile.', 'ka': 'Semantic embedding has advanced the state of the art for countless natural language processing tasks, and various extensions to multimodal domains, such as visual-semantic embeddings, have been proposed. თუმცა ვიზუალური-სემონტიკური ინფორმაციის სისწავლის განმავლობაზე და განმავლობაზე იქნება ინფორმაციის სისწავლის ძალიან, მათი ინტერესო სამუშაო სამუშაო დაუცნობა და ანალიზის ხე ამ პრობლემას გარეშე, ჩვენ ვიზუალურად ვიზუალურ-სენმანტიკური შემთხვევაში დავაკეთებთ დავაკეთება. ამ მიზეზით, ჩვენ (i) განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით სამი კონკრეტური განსაკუთრებით ჩვენი საერთო ფრამეტში, i ii) განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით, და iv) განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩნდება 16% უფრო მეტი სიზუსალურ-სმენტიკური დამატებით, რომლებიც აღმოჩნდება, რომ ტექსტი და გამოსახულების განზომილებები, რომლებიც პირველში გამოსახულებული იყოს ერთმანეთს', 'hu': 'A szemantikus beágyazások számtalan természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladathoz fejlesztették a technológia korszerűségét, és a multimodális tartományok különböző kiterjesztéseit, például vizuális-szemantikai beágyazásokat javasolták. Míg a vizuális-szemantikai beágyazások ereje az információ gépi tanulással történő desztillálásából és gazdagításából származik, belső működésük rosszul érthető és elemzési eszközök hiánya van. A probléma megoldására a vizuális-szemantikai esetre általánosítjuk a vizsgálati feladatok fogalmát. Ennek érdekében (i) megvitatjuk a kép-felirat párok beágyazásához szükséges mérési feladatok formalizálását, (ii) három konkrét mérési feladatot határozunk meg általános keretünkön belül, (iii) osztályozókat képezzünk e tulajdonságok vizsgálatára, és (iv) összehasonlítjuk a javasolt mérési feladatok lencséje alatt különböző korszerű beágyazásokat. Kísérleteink a vizuális-szemantikai beágyazások pontosságának akár 16%-os növekedését mutatják a megfelelő unimodális beágyazásokhoz képest, ami arra utal, hogy az előbbiekben képviselt szöveg és kép dimenziók kiegészítik egymást.', 'el': 'Οι σημασιολογικές ενσωματώσεις έχουν προωθήσει την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για αμέτρητες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, και έχουν προταθεί διάφορες επεκτάσεις σε πολυμορφικούς τομείς, όπως οπτικές-σημασιολογικές ενσωματώσεις. Ενώ η δύναμη της οπτικής-σημασιολογικής ενσωμάτωσης προέρχεται από την απόσταξη και τον εμπλουτισμό της πληροφορίας μέσω της μηχανικής μάθησης, η εσωτερική τους λειτουργία δεν είναι κατανοητή και υπάρχει έλλειψη εργαλείων ανάλυσης. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, γενικεύουμε την έννοια της διερεύνησης εργασιών στην οπτική-σημασιολογική περίπτωση. Για το σκοπό αυτό, συζητάμε (i) την τυποποίηση των εργασιών ανίχνευσης για ενσωμάτωση ζευγαριών εικόνων-λεζάντας, (ii) καθορίζουμε τρεις συγκεκριμένες εργασίες ανίχνευσης στο γενικό μας πλαίσιο, (iii) εκπαιδεύουμε τους ταξινομητές για την ανίχνευση αυτών των ιδιοτήτων, και (iv) συγκρίνουμε διάφορες σύγχρονες ενσωματώσεις κάτω από το φακό των προτεινόμενων εργασιών ανίχνευσης. Τα πειράματά μας αποκαλύπτουν έως 16% αύξηση της ακρίβειας των οπτικών-σημασιολογικών ενσωματώσεων σε σύγκριση με τις αντίστοιχες μονοτροπικές ενσωματώσεις, γεγονός που υποδηλώνει ότι οι διαστάσεις κειμένου και εικόνας που αντιπροσωπεύονται στην πρώτη αλληλοσυμπληρώνονται.', 'it': "Gli embedding semantici hanno avanzato lo stato dell'arte per innumerevoli attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e sono state proposte varie estensioni a domini multimodali, come gli embedding visual-semantic. Mentre il potere delle incorporazioni visual-semantic deriva dalla distillazione e dall'arricchimento delle informazioni attraverso il machine learning, il loro funzionamento interno è scarsamente compreso e c'è una carenza di strumenti di analisi. Per affrontare questo problema, generalizziamo la nozione di compiti di sonda al caso visivo-semantico. A tal fine (i) discutiamo la formalizzazione dei compiti di sondaggio per incorporazioni di coppie di immagini-didascalie, (ii) definiamo tre compiti concreti di sondaggio all'interno del nostro quadro generale, (iii) addestriamo i classificatori per sondare tali proprietà e (iv) confrontiamo vari incorporamenti all'avanguardia sotto la lente dei compiti di sondaggio proposti. I nostri esperimenti rivelano un aumento fino al 16% di accuratezza sugli embedding visual-semantic rispetto ai corrispondenti embedding unimodali, il che suggerisce che le dimensioni del testo e dell'immagine rappresentate nel primo si completano a vicenda.", 'kk': 'Semantic embedding has advanced the art state for countless natural language processing tasks, and various extensions to multimodal domains, such as visual- semantic embedding, are proposed. Көрініс- семантикалық ендірудің күші машиналық оқыту арқылы мәліметті дислилациялаудан және күштеу арқылы келеді, ішкі жұмыс істемелері дұрыс түсініп, анализ құралдарының жоғары Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, тапсырмаларды көрініс-семантикалық үшін тексеру жағдайын жалпы болады. Бұл үшін біз (i) кескін айдарының қосқаларының пішімдеу тапсырмаларын официализациялауын, ii) біздің жалпы фреймімізде үш конкретті проб тапсырмаларын анықтап, iii) осы қасиеттерді зерттеу үшін жұмыс классификациялары және iv) келтірілген проб тапсырмаларының линзи Біздің тәжірибелеріміз көрініс- семантикалық ендірулердің дұрыстығын 16% деп көрсетеді. Бұл мәтін мен кескіндің өлшемдері бір-біріне қосылған деп ойлайды.', 'lt': 'Semantiniai įterpimai padėjo tobulinti pažangą daugeliui gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduočių ir pasiūlyta įvairių sričių, pavyzdžiui, vizualinių ir semantinių įterpimų, taikymo srityse. Nors vaizdo ir semantinio įterpimo galia kyla iš informacijos distiliavimo ir praturtinimo naudojant mašinų mokymąsi, jų vidinis veikimas yra prastai suprantamas ir trūksta analizės priemonių. Siekdami išspręsti šią problem ą, visuotinai išbandome vizualinės semantinės problemos užduotis. Šiuo tikslu mes i) diskutuojame apie bandymo užduoči ų formalizavimą įdėjant vaizdo įrašų porą, ii) apibrėžiame tris konkrečias bandymo užduotis pagal mūsų bendrąją sistemą, iii) traukinių klasifikatoriai, kad bandytų šias savybes, ir iv) palyginame įvairias naujausias bandymo užduotis pagal siūlomų bandymo užduočių sklaidytuvą. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo iki 16 proc. didesnį vizualinio ir semantinio įterpimo tikslumą, palyginti su atitinkamais vienmodaliniais įterpimais, kurie rodo, kad teksto ir vaizdo matmenys, nurodyti pirmiau, vienas kitą papildo.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് മുന്നോട്ടുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള കലാകാര്യത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന മെഷിന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സമ്പന്നതയും വരുന്ന സമയത്ത്, അവരുടെ ഉള്ളിലെ പണികള്\u200d വളരെ കുറച്ച് മനസ്സിലാക് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലികളെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കാഴ്ചകളിലേക്കാണ്. To this end, we (i) discuss the formalization of probing tasks for embeddings of image-caption pairs, (ii) define three concrete probing tasks within our general framework, (iii) train classifiers to probe for those properties, and (iv) compare various state-of-the-art embeddings under the lens of the proposed probing tasks.  നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണാന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് പ്രവേശനങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d 16% കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വൃദ്ധിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. യൂണിമോഡാല്\u200d അകത്ത', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet semantiċi avvanzaw l-aktar l-aħħar għal għadd ta’ kompiti ta’ pproċessar naturali tal-lingwi, u ġew proposti estensjonijiet varji għal dominji multimodali, bħall-inkorporazzjonijiet semantiċi viżwali. Filwaqt li l-qawwa tal-inkorporazzjonijiet viżwali-semantiċi tiġi mid-distillazzjoni u l-arrikkiment tal-informazzjoni permezz tat-tagħlim tal-magni, il-ħidmiet interni tagħhom mhumiex mifhuma sew u hemm nuqqas ta’ għodod ta’ analiżi. Biex nindirizzaw din il-problema, niġeneralizzaw il-kunċett ta’ sondaġġ tal-kompiti għall-każ viżwali-semantiku. Għal dan il-għan, aħna (i) niddiskutu l-formalizzazzjoni tal-kompiti ta’ sondaġġ għall-inkorporazzjoni ta’ par ta’ immaġni-caption, (ii) niddefinixxu tliet kompiti konkreti ta’ sondaġġ fi ħdan il-qafas ġenerali tagħna, (iii) il-klassifikaturi tal-ferroviji biex sondaġġ għal dawk il-proprjetajiet, u (iv) inqabblu diversi inkorporazzjonijiet l-aktar avvanzati taħt il-lenti tal-kompiti ta’ sondaġġ proposti. L-esperimenti tagħna juru żieda sa 16 % fil-preċiżjoni tal-inkorporazzjonijiet viżwali-semantiċi meta mqabbla mal-inkorporazzjonijiet unimodali korrispondenti, li jissuġġerixxu li d-dimensjonijiet tat-test u tal-immaġni rappreżentati fl-ewwel jikkomplementaw lil xulxin.', 'no': 'Semantiske innbygging har avansert kunstået for ulike naturspråkprocessingar, og forskjellige utvidingar til multimodale domene, slik som visualsemantiske innbygging, er foreslått. Mens kraft på visualsemantiske innbygging kjem frå destilasjonen og forstørring av informasjon gjennom maskinelæring, vert dei innere arbeida slik forstått, og det er ein kort mange analyserverktøy. For å setja opp dette problemet, generelliserer vi oppgåva om å prøva oppgåver til det visuelle semantiske tilfellet. I denne slutten diskuterer vi om formalisering av proberingsoppgåver for innbygging av biletet-tittelpar, i i) definerer tre beton-proberingsoppgåver i vår generelle rammeverket, iii) trenklassifiseringar som skal prøve for dei eigenskapane, og iv) samanliknar ulike innbygging av kunsten under lensen av dei foreslåtte proberingsoppgåva. Eksperimentane våre viser opp til 16% økning i nøyaktighet på visuellesemantiske innbygging sammenlignet med dei tilsvarande unimodale innbygginga, som tyder på at teksten og biletmeiningane som er representerte i tidlegare er komplement hverandre.', 'mk': 'Семантичките вградувања ја унапредија техничката состојба за безброј природни задачи за обработување јазици, и се предложени различни проширувања на мултимодилните домени, како што се визуелно-семантичките вградувања. Додека моќта на визуелно-семантичните вградувања доаѓа од дестилација и богатство на информациите преку машинско учење, нивното внатрешно работење е лошо разбрано и постои недостаток на алатки за анализа. За да го решиме овој проблем, ја генерализираме идејата за проверка на задачите во визуелно-семантичниот случај. За оваа цел, ние (i) разговараме за формализацијата на задачите за истражување за вложување на парови слики-наслов, (ii) дефинираме три конкретни задачи за истражување во нашата генерална рамка, (iii) тренираме класификатори за истражување за овие сопствености и (iv) споредуваме различни најсовремени вложувања под очилото на предложените истражувачки зад Нашите експерименти откриваат зголемување на прецизноста од 16 отсто на визуелно-семантичните внесувања во споредба со соодветните унимодални внесувања, што покажува дека текстовите и димензиите на сликите претставени во првите се комплиментираат меѓусебно.', 'pl': 'Semantyczne osadzenia zaawansowały stan techniki w niezliczonych zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego, a zaproponowano różne rozszerzenia do domen multimodalnych, takich jak osadzenia wizualno-semantyczne. Podczas gdy moc wizualno-semantycznych osadzeń pochodzi z destylacji i wzbogacania informacji poprzez uczenie maszynowe, ich wewnętrzne działanie jest słabo zrozumiane i brakuje narzędzi analitycznych. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, uogólniamy pojęcie sondowania zadań do przypadku wizualno-semantycznego. W tym celu (i) omawiamy formalizację zadań sondowania dla osadzeń par obrazu-podpisów, (ii) definiujemy trzy konkretne zadania sondowania w naszych ogólnych ramach, (iii) szkolimy klasyfikatory do badania tych właściwości, oraz (iv) porównujemy różne najnowocześniejsze osadzenia pod soczewką proponowanych zadań sondowania. Nasze eksperymenty ujawniają do 16% wzrost dokładności osadzeń wizualno-semantycznych w porównaniu z odpowiednimi osadzeniami unimodalnymi, co sugeruje, że reprezentowane w pierwszych wymiary tekstu i obrazu uzupełniają się nawzajem.', 'ro': 'Încorporările semantice au avansat stadiul tehnologiei pentru nenumărate sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural și au fost propuse diverse extensii ale domeniilor multimodale, cum ar fi încorporările vizual-semantice. În timp ce puterea încorporărilor vizual-semantice provine din distilarea și îmbogățirea informației prin învățarea automată, funcționarea lor interioară este slab înțeleasă și există o lipsă de instrumente de analiză. Pentru a aborda această problemă, generalizăm noțiunea de sarcini de sondare la cazul vizual-semantic. În acest scop, vom (i) discuta formalizarea sarcinilor de sondare pentru încorporarea perechilor imagine-captură, (ii) definirea a trei sarcini concrete de sondare în cadrul nostru general, (iii) instruirea clasificatorilor pentru a verifica aceste proprietăți și (iv) compararea diferitelor încorporări de ultimă generație sub lentilele sarcinilor de sondare propuse. Experimentele noastre arată o creștere cu până la 16% a acurateții încorporărilor vizual-semantice comparativ cu încorporările unimodale corespunzătoare, ceea ce sugerează că dimensiunile textului și imaginii reprezentate în primul rând se completează reciproc.', 'mn': 'Semantic embedding has advanced the art of the countless natural language processing tasks, and various extensions to multimodal domains, such as visual-semantic embedding, are proposed. Хэдийгээр дүрслэл-semantic нэвтрүүлэлтийн хүч машины сургалтын аргаар мэдээллийг сайжруулан багасгах болон багасгах боловч дотоод ажиллах нь зөвхөн ойлгомжтой, шинжилгээний хэрэгсэл багасгах боломжтой. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид ажиллагааны туршилтын тухай ерөнхийдөө харагдаж байна. Ийм төгсгөлд бид (i) зураг дүрслэлийн хоорондоо шалгах даалгаварын официализацийг ярьж, ii) бидний ерөнхий хэмжээнд 3 конкретний шалгах даалгаварыг тодорхойлж, iii) тэдгээр чанарыг шалгахын тулд tren classifiers, iv) олон төрлийн урлагийн дүрслэлүүдийг шалгах даалгаварын доор харьцуулдаг. Бидний туршилтууд харагдаж буй нэг хэмжээсүүдтэй харьцуулахад харьцуулсан харьцуулалтын зөв хэмжээсүүд болон зураг хэмжээсүүд нь өмнө нь дүрслэгдсэн текст болон зураг хэмжээсүүд бие биенээ нэмэгдүүлдэг гэсэн үг.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් ඇන්බෙන්ඩින්ග් විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සඳහා විශේෂ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සඳහා විශේෂ භාෂාව සඳහා විශේෂ වි ප්\u200dරදේශ-සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුළත් වැඩක් තේරෙනවා නමුත් ඔවුන්ගේ ඇතුළත් වැඩ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට වැඩක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. මේ අවසානයට, අපි (i) කතා කරන්නේ පින්තූර පින්තූර පින්තූර පින්තූර පින්තූර පින්තූර පින්තූර පින්තූරණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200d අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ 16% වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ', 'sr': 'Semantički integraciji su napredovali stanje umetnosti za bezbrojne prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika, a predloženo je različite proširenje multimodalnih domena, poput vizualne semantičke integracije. Iako moć vizuelnih semantičkih ugrađenja dolazi iz destilacije i bogatstva informacija kroz mašinsko učenje, njihovi unutrašnji rad se loše razumiju i nedostaje analiziranih alata. Da bi se riješili ovog problema, generalizujemo ideju o ispitivanju zadataka na vizualni semantički slučaj. Za taj cilj, mi (i) razgovaramo o formalizaciji istraživanja zadataka za ugrađenje parova slika, ii) definišemo tri konkretna istraživanja u našem općem okviru, iii) klasifikatore vlaka za istraživanje tih vlasništva, i iv) uspoređujemo različite stanje umjetnosti ugrađenja pod lensom predloženih istraživanja zadataka. Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju povećanje to čnosti na vizualno-semantičkim ugrađenjima do 16%, u usporedbi sa odgovarajućim unimodalnim ugrađenjima, što ukazuje na to da tekst i dimenzije slika predstavljene u prethodnom predstavljaju jedni druge.', 'so': 'Xaaladaha galmada ayaa hormariyey xaalada farshaxanka ee shaqaalaha baaritaanka afka kala duduwan, iyo meelo kala duduwan oo u gaaraya meelaha kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan qalabka aragtida. Markii xoogga muuqashada aragtidu ay ka timaado kala soocmaalka iyo hodantinimada macluumaadka lagu baranayo machine, shaqaalahooda hoose waxaa si xun looga gartaa, waxaana jira gaaban qalabka wax baaritaanka. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, waxaynu u sameynaa fikrada ku baaritaanka shaqaalaha arimaha aragtida semantika ah. Taas darteed (i) waxaynu ka sheekeysanaynaa sameynta shaqaalaha sawirka labo ah, (ii) ayaynu qoraynaa saddex shaqooyin oo ku saabsan sameynta firaaqadeena guud, (iii) tababarida fasaxyada si ay u imtixaamaan hantida, iyo (iv) waxaannu isbarbareynaynaa noocyada farshaxanka ah oo ka hooseeya shuqullada la soo jeeday. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa kordhiska saxda ah 16% oo korodhsan kordhiska koritaanka aragtida oo la barbardhiga habka midowga ee midowga ah, taasoo ka jeeda in kooxaha qoraalka iyo sawirku ay ka tirsanaayeen ay isku dhamaystaan.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran semantik telah maju keadaan seni untuk banyak tugas pemprosesan bahasa alam, dan pelbagai sambungan ke domain multimodal, seperti penyampilan semantik-visual, telah diusulkan. Sementara kuasa penerbangan visual-semantik berasal dari penapisan dan pengkaya maklumat melalui pembelajaran mesin, kerja dalaman mereka tidak faham dengan baik dan terdapat kekurangan alat analisis. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kita menyeluruhkan idea penyelidikan tugas ke kes visual-semantik. Untuk tujuan ini, kami (i) membincangkan formalisasi tugas penyelidikan untuk penyelesaian pasangan imej-tajuk, (ii) takrifkan tiga tugas penyelidikan konkrit dalam kerangka umum kami, (iii) pelatih kelas untuk penyelidikan ciri-ciri tersebut, dan (iv) membandingkan pelbagai penyelidikan state-of-the-art di bawah lensa tugas penyelidikan yang direncanakan. Eksperimen kami mengungkapkan hingga 16% peningkatan ketepatan pada penyambungan visual-semantik dibandingkan dengan penyambungan unimodal yang sepadan, yang menyarankan bahawa dimensi teks dan imej yang mewakili di sebelumnya saling berkumplimen.', 'sv': 'Semantiska inbäddningar har avancerat den senaste tekniken för otaliga naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter, och olika tillägg till multimodala domäner, såsom visuell-semantisk inbäddning, har föreslagits. Medan kraften i visuell-semantiska inbäddningar kommer från destillation och berikning av information genom maskininlärning, är deras inre funktion dåligt förstått och det finns brist på analysverktyg. För att lösa detta problem generaliserar vi begreppet sonderingsuppgifter till det visuella-semantiska fallet. För detta ändamål diskuterar vi (i) formaliseringen av probningsuppgifter för inbäddningar av bildtextpar, (ii) definierar tre konkreta probningsuppgifter inom vår allmänna ram, (iii) utbildar klassificerare att sondera för dessa egenskaper, och (iv) jämför olika state-of-the-art inbäddningar under linsen för de föreslagna probningsuppgifterna. Våra experiment avslöjar en upp till 16% ökad noggrannhet på visuell-semantiska inbäddningar jämfört med motsvarande unimodala inbäddningar, vilket tyder på att text- och bilddimensionerna representerade i det förra kompletterar varandra.', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی ایمبینڈنگ نے آرتی کی حالت بڑھی گئی ہے بے شمار طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں کے لئے، اور بہت سی مدل ڈومین کے لئے مختلف اضافہ، جیسے visual-semantic embeddings، پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے. حالانکہ visual-semantic embeddings کی طاقت ماشین تعلیم کے ذریعہ سے پھیلانے اور اطلاعات کی ثروت سے آتی ہے، ان کے داخلی کارکنوں کو برا سمجھا جاتا ہے اور تحلیل ابزار کی کمی ہے. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں مشکلات کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ کو عمومی کر رہے ہیں۔ اس لئے ہم (i) تصویر-کپشن جوڑوں کے مطابق تحقیق کے کاموں کی فرمولی کی تعریف کرتے ہیں (ii) تین کنکریٹ تحقیق کے کاموں کو ہمارے عمومی فرمول میں تعریف کرتے ہیں (iii) کلاسفار کو تحقیق کرنے کے لئے ترین کریں اور (iv) طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کی تحقیق کے کاموں کے نیچے مطابق کریں۔ ہماری آزمائش 16% تک دقیق اضافہ کرتی ہے visual-semantic embeddings کے مقابلہ میں ایک دوسرے کو ایک دوسرے پر اضافہ کرتی ہے جو ایک دوسرے کی تعداد کے مطابق متن اور تصویر کے اندازے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'செமான்டிக் பொருள்கள் எண்ணிக்கையான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளுக்கான கலைப்பாட்டின் நிலையை மேம்படுத்தி இருக்கிறது, மற்றும் பல விரிவாக்கங்கள்  பார்வையான பார்வையின் சக்தி இயந்திரம் கற்றல் மூலம் பிரித்து தகவல் வளர்ச்சியிலிருந்து வரும் போது, அவர்களுடைய உள்ளே வேலைகள் குறைவாக புரிந்து  இந்த பிரச்சனையை முடிக்க, பணிகளை முன்னோக்குவதின் கருத்தை பொதுவாக்குகிறோம். இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் (i) பிம்பத்தின் தலைப்பு ஜோடிகள் உள்ளடக்கிய செயல்களை வடிவமைப்பதை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் , (ii) நம் பொதுவான விளையாட்டில் மூன்று கூட்டிய செயல்களை வரையறுக்கிறது, ஐ) அந்த பணிகளுக்காக பயிற்சி வகு Our experiments reveal an up to 16% increase in accuracy on visual-semantic embeddings compared to the corresponding unimodal embeddings, which suggest that the text and image dimensions represented in the former do complement each other.', 'uz': "Name Ko'rinadigan semantik foydalanuvchilarning kuchi mashina o'rganish orqali ma'lumotni ajratish va ta'limni yozilishidan keladi, ularning ichki ishlari juda yomon o'zini tushunadi va analyzer asboblarning qisqacha mavjud emas. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun vazifalarni ko'rinish va semantik holatiga qarang. Shunday qilib, biz rasm sarlavhasini o'zgartirish vazifalarini formatlash bilan javob beramiz, (i i) bizning umumiy jadvaldagi uchta xabarlarni aniqlash va (i) bu xususiyatlarni sinab ko'rib turish uchun taʼminlovchilarni tahrirlash va (iv) talab qilingan vazifalar bilan bir xil holatning boshqaruvchilarini o'rganadi. Bizning tajribalarimiz esa 16% ko'payishimizni ko'rinish semantik embedlariga aniqlash imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Bu bir necha unimodal embedlariga qisqarli matn va rasm chegaralarini bir-бирларига murakkab qiladi.", 'vi': 'Những sự tác nghiệp hoá kỳ diệu đã nâng cao trạng thái nghệ thuật cho vô số các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, và rất nhiều sự mở rộng cho các miền đa phương, như sự tác cài ghép hình///////////////////////////////////////////////// Trong khi sức mạnh của sự gắn kết hình ảnh///////////////nghĩa) đến từ việc chưng cất và làm giàu thông tin qua việc học máy móc, các hoạt động bên trong của chúng không được rõ lắm và thiếu các công cụ phân tích. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi tổng hợp khái niệm liên quan đến các nhiệm vụ theo ngữ pháp hình thức. Để đạt được mục đích, chúng ta thảo luận việc thủ tục các công việc thăm dò cho sự nhúng tay của các cặp ảnh (2) xác định ba công việc thăm dò cụ thể trong cơ sở chung, III phân loại giáo huấn để thăm dò các đặc tính đó, và Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy có một độ chính xác cao hơn trên tính tỷ lệ hình ảnh so với sự tham ô tương ứng giữa các đơn phương, cho thấy văn bản và các kích thước ảnh đại diện ở phương diện trước hoàn thành nhau.', 'da': 'Semantiske indlejringer har avanceret den nyeste teknologi til utallige natursprogbehandlingsopgaver, og forskellige udvidelser til multimodale domæner, såsom visuel-semantiske indlejringer, er blevet foreslået. Mens kraften i visuel-semantiske indlejringer kommer fra destillation og berigelse af information gennem maskinlæring, er deres indre arbejde dårligt forstået, og der er mangel på analyseværktøjer. For at løse dette problem generaliserer vi begrebet sondeopgaver til det visuel-semantiske tilfælde. Til dette formål drøfter vi (i) formaliseringen af sondeopgaver til indlejringer af billedtekstpar, (ii) definerer tre konkrete sondeopgaver inden for vores generelle rammer, (iii) træner klassificerere til at undersøge disse egenskaber, og (iv) sammenligner forskellige state-of-the-art indlejringer under linsen af de foreslåede sondeopgaver. Vores eksperimenter afslører en op til 16% stigning i nøjagtigheden på visuel-semantiske indlejringer sammenlignet med de tilsvarende unimodale indlejringer, hvilket tyder på, at tekst- og billeddimensionerne repræsenteret i førstnævnte komplementerer hinanden.', 'bg': 'Семантичните вграждания са напреднали в най-съвременните технологии за безброй задачи по обработка на естествени езици и са предложени различни разширения на мултимодални домейни, като визуално-семантични вграждания. Докато силата на визуално-семантичните вграждания идва от дестилацията и обогатяването на информацията чрез машинно обучение, вътрешната им работа е слабо разбрана и има недостиг на инструменти за анализ. За да се справим с този проблем, обобщаваме понятието за сондиране на задачи към визуално-семантичния случай. За тази цел ние (i) обсъждаме формализирането на задачите за сондиране за вграждане на двойки изображение-надпис, (ii) дефинираме три конкретни задачи за сондиране в нашата обща рамка, (iii) обучаваме класификатори да сондират за тези свойства и (iv) сравняваме различни съвременни вграждания под обектива на предложените задачи за сондиране. Нашите експерименти показват до 16% увеличение на точността на визуално-семантичните вграждания в сравнение със съответните унимодални вграждания, което предполага, че размерите на текста и изображението, представени в първото, се допълват взаимно.', 'nl': 'Semantische embeddings hebben de stand van de techniek voor talloze natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken verbeterd en verschillende uitbreidingen voor multimodale domeinen, zoals visual-semantische embeddings, zijn voorgesteld. Terwijl de kracht van visueel-semantische embeddings voortkomt uit de distillatie en verrijking van informatie door middel van machine learning, zijn hun innerlijke werking slecht begrepen en is er een tekort aan analysetools. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, veralgemenen we het begrip tastende taken tot het visueel-semantische geval. Hiertoe bespreken we (i) de formalisering van sondeingstaken voor embeddingen van beeldonderschriftparen, (ii) definiëren drie concrete sondeingstaken binnen ons algemene kader, (iii) trainen classificatoren om deze eigenschappen te onderzoeken, en (iv) vergelijken verschillende state-of-the-art embeddings onder de lens van de voorgestelde sondeingstaken. Onze experimenten tonen een toename van de nauwkeurigheid van visueel-semantische embeddings tot 16% in vergelijking met de overeenkomstige unimodale embeddings, wat suggereert dat de tekst- en beelddimensies die in de eerste worden vertegenwoordigd, elkaar aanvullen.', 'hr': 'Semantički integraciji su napredovali stanje umjetnosti za bezbrojne prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika, te su predloženi različiti proširenje multimodalnih domena, poput vizualne semantičke integracije. Iako moć vizuelnih semantičkih ugrađenja dolazi iz destilacije i bogatstva informacija kroz učenje strojeva, njihova unutrašnja radna djela je loše shvaćena i nedostaje analiziranih alata. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, generalizirali smo pojam provjere zadataka na vizualni semantički slučaj. Za taj cilj, mi (i) razgovaramo o formalizaciji istraživanja zadataka za ugrađenje parova slika, ii) definiramo tri konkretna istraživanja u našem općem okviru, iii) klasifikatore vlaka za istraživanje tih vlasništva, i iv) uspoređujemo različite stave-umjetnosti ugrađenja pod lensom predloženih istraživanja zadataka. Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju povećanje to čnosti na vizualne-semantičke integracije do 16%, u usporedbi s odgovarajućim unimodalnim integracijama, što ukazuje na to da tekst i dimenzije slika predstavljene u prethodnom dijelu dopunjavaju jedni druge.', 'de': 'Semantische Einbettungen haben den Stand der Technik für unzählige natürliche Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben weiterentwickelt und verschiedene Erweiterungen multimodaler Domänen, wie visuell-semantische Einbettungen, wurden vorgeschlagen. Während die Kraft visuell-semantischer Einbettungen aus der Destillation und Anreicherung von Informationen durch maschinelles Lernen resultiert, sind ihre inneren Abläufe schlecht verstanden und es fehlt an Analysewerkzeugen. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, verallgemeinern wir den Begriff der Probenaufgaben auf den visuell-semantischen Fall. Zu diesem Zweck diskutieren wir (i) die Formalisierung von Sondierungsaufgaben für Einbettungen von Bild-Beschriftungspaaren, (ii) definieren drei konkrete Sondierungsaufgaben innerhalb unseres allgemeinen Rahmens, (iii) trainieren Klassifikatoren, diese Eigenschaften zu untersuchen, und (iv) vergleichen verschiedene State-of-the-Art Einbettungen unter der Linse der vorgeschlagenen Sondierungsaufgaben. Unsere Experimente zeigen eine bis zu 16% höhere Genauigkeit bei visuell-semantischen Einbettungen im Vergleich zu den entsprechenden unimodalen Einbettungen, was darauf hindeutet, dass sich die dargestellten Text- und Bilddimensionen gegenseitig ergänzen.', 'id': 'Pencampuran semantis telah meningkatkan state of the art untuk banyak tugas proses bahasa alam, dan berbagai ekstensi ke domain multimodal, seperti penyampilan visual-semantis, telah diusulkan. Sementara kekuatan penerbangan visual-semantis berasal dari destilasi dan memperkaya informasi melalui pembelajaran mesin, pekerjaan dalam mereka tidak mengerti dengan baik dan ada kekurangan alat analisis. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kita menyebarkan gagasan penyelidikan tugas ke kasus visual-semantis. Untuk tujuan ini, kami (i) mendiskusikan formalisasi tugas penyelesaian untuk penyelesaian pasangan gambar-caption, (ii) mendefinisikan tiga tugas penyelesaian konkrit di dalam kerangka umum kami, (iii) klasifikasi kereta untuk penyelesaian properti tersebut, dan (iv) membandingkan berbagai penyelesaian state-of-the-art di bawah lensa tugas penyelesaian yang diusulkan. Our experiments reveal an up to 16% increase in accuracy on visual-semantic embeddings compared to the corresponding unimodal embeddings, which suggest that the text and image dimensions represented in the former do complement each other.', 'tr': 'Semantik ködlemeler, sanat dili işlemek üçin täsir edilmedik täblikler üçin sungatyň durumyny öňündürdi we görsel-semantik gaýşartmaklary ýaly multimodal alanlara öňündürdi. Görsel-semantik gabdalyklaryň güýji maşynyň öwrenmesi bilen informasiýalary bejermek we zenginleşendirmekden bäri, içi işleriniň ýok düşünmesi ýaly ýok bolýar we analiz araçlaryň puç bolýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, görevleri görsel-semantik şekilde barlamak düşünmesini generalize ederis. Bu soňra biz (i) surat-käpşer çipleriniñ integrasy üçin synaglama zadynyň formaliziýasyny taryşýarys, (ii) biziň umumy çeräbimizde üç konkret synaglama zadyny tanyşdyrýarys, (iii) şu häsiýetleri üçin synaglamak üçin otly klasifikatçylaryny we (iv) teklip eden synaglama zadynyň lensleriniň astynda görkezilişi. Biziň deneylerimiz görsel-semantik integralaryň dogrylygyny ýagdaýynda 16%-a ýokary düşürmegini aýdýar. Bu mesele we surat ölçüleriniň öňki dünýäde edilen metin we surat ölçüleriniň bir-birini tamamlaýandygyny kabul edip bilýär.', 'ko': '의미 삽입은 수많은 자연 언어 처리 임무의 기술 수준을 향상시켰고 다중모드 분야에 대한 다양한 확장, 예를 들어 시각적 의미 삽입을 제시했다.시각적 의미가 박힌 힘은 기계 학습을 통해 정보를 추출하고 풍부하게 하는 데서 비롯되지만 내부 작업 메커니즘에 대한 이해가 적고 분석 도구가 부족하다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 선행 임무의 개념을 시각적 의미 상황까지 보급할 것이다.이를 위해 우리는 (i) 이미지 자막이 삽입 탐지 임무에 대한 형식화를 논의하고, (ii)는 우리의 전체 구조에서 세 가지 구체적인 탐지 임무를 정의하며, (iii) 트레이닝 분류기는 이러한 속성을 탐지하고, (iv)는 탐지 임무를 제안하는 시각에서 각종 가장 선진적인 삽입을 비교한다.우리의 실험에 의하면 상응하는 단봉삽입에 비해 시각적 의미삽입의 정확도가 16% 높아졌다. 이것은 전자가 대표하는 텍스트와 이미지 차원이 서로 보완되고 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'انجمن\u200cسازی\u200cهای سیماتیک، موقعیت هنر برای کار\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی بی\u200cشمار پیشرفت شده\u200cاند، و انجمن\u200cهای مختلف به دامنهای چندین مدل، مانند انجمن\u200cسازی\u200cهای بینایی-سیماتیک، پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند. در حالی که قدرت ابزارهای بینایی-semantic از تفریح و گشایش اطلاعات از طریق یادگیری ماشین می آید، کارهای داخلی آنها بد درک می کنند و کمی از ابزارهای تحلیل وجود دارد. تا این مشکل را حل کنیم، ما نظر عمومی را در مورد تحقیق کار به پرونده بینایی-semantic می\u200cکنیم. برای این قسمت، ما (i) در مورد رسمی\u200cسازی کار\u200cهای تحقیق در جفت\u200cهای عنوان تصویر مطابق می\u200cکنیم, (ii) سه کار تحقیق کنترل در چهارچوب عمومی\u200cمان تعریف می\u200cکنیم, (iii) کلی\u200cکننده\u200cها را برای تحقیق این ویژه\u200cها تعریف می\u200cکنیم و (iv) مختلف وضعیت\u200cهای هنری را در زیر چهارچوب\u200cهای پیشنهاد تحقیق می\u200cکنند. آزمایشات ما به حد ۱۶ درصد افزایش دقیقیت روی انجمن\u200cهای دیده\u200cسیمانتیک در مقایسه با انجمن\u200cهای متفاوت متفاوت متفاوت و تصویر را نشان می\u200cدهند، که پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که متن و اندازه\u200cهای تصویر که در قبل نمایش داده می\u200cشوند همدیگر را تعمل می', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo ya kimapenzi yamependekeza hali ya sanaa kwa kazi zisizo na utaratibu wa lugha asili, na maendeleo mbalimbali kwa maeneo mengi, kama vile matumizi ya kisasa yanayoonekana, yamependekezwa. Wakati nguvu ya mabomu ya kuona yanatokana na utofauti na utajiri wa taarifa kupitia kujifunza mashine, kazi za ndani zinaelewa vibaya na kuna upungufu wa zana za uchambuzi. Kuhusu tatizo hili, tunatengeneza dhana ya kutangaza kazi kwa kesi ya sekunde ya kuona. Kwa mwisho huu (i) tunajadili kutengeneza kazi za kuchuja kwa ajili ya kuweka viwili vya picha, (ii) kuelezea kazi tatu za kuthibitisha ndani ya mfumo wetu wa ujumla, (iii) mafunzo ya wataalamu kuwajaribu utamaduni huo, na (iv) kuwalinganisha hali mbalimbali ya sanaa chini ya mistari ya kazi zilizopendekezwa. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuongezeka kwa asilimia 16 kwa kiwango cha kuonekana kwa maendeleo ya sekondari yanayofanana na mabomu ya kiungo, ambayo inapendekeza kuwa kiwango cha maandishi na picha kilichowakilishwa katika maeneo ya zamani yanafanikiwa.', 'sq': 'Ndërtesat Semantike kanë përparuar gjendjen e fundit për detyra të numëruara të procesimit natyror të gjuhës dhe janë propozuar zgjerime të ndryshme në domenet multimodale, të tilla si përfshirje vizuale-semantike. Ndërsa fuqia e përfshirjeve vizuale-semantike vjen nga distillacioni dhe pasurimi i informacionit nëpërmjet mësimit të makinave, punët e tyre të brendshme janë të keqkuptuara dhe ka mungesë të mjeteve analitike. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne gjeneralizojmë konceptin e hetimit të detyrave në rastin vizual-semantik. Për këtë qëllim, ne (i) diskutojmë formalizimin e detyrave të vëzhgimit për përfshirjen e çifteve të imazhit-titullit, (ii) përcaktojmë tre detyra konkrete të vëzhgimit brenda kuadrit tonë të përgjithshëm, (iii) klasifikuesit e trenit për të vëzhguar për këto prona dhe (iv) krahasojmë përfshirje të ndryshme më të larta nën lentën e detyrave të propozuara të vëzhgimit. Eksperimentet tona zbulojnë një rritje deri në 16% në saktësinë e përfshirjeve vizuale-semantike krahasuar me përfshirjet e përkatshme unimodale, të cilat sugjerojnë se dimensionet e tekstit dhe imazhit të përfaqësuar në të parën komplementojnë njëri-tjetrin.', 'af': "Semantiese inbêdings het die staat van die kuns gevorderd vir getal natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte, en verskillende uitbreidings na multimodale domeine, soos visuele-semantiese inbêdings, is voorgestel. Alhoewel die krag van visuele-semantiese inbêding kom van die destilasie en verrykking van inligting deur masjien leer, word hulle binneste werke verkeerd verstaan en daar is 'n kortpad van analisie nutsprogramme. Om hierdie probleem te besluit, generelliseer ons die nodiging om taak te probeer na die visuele-semantiese geval. Op hierdie einde, ons (i) bespreek die formalisasie van probeer opdragte vir inbêding van beeld-kapsie paar, (ii) definieer drie beteken probeer opdragte binne ons algemene raamwerk, (iii) trein klassifiseerders om te probeer vir dié eienskappe, en (iv) vergelyk verskillende staat-van-kuns inbêding onder die lense van die voorgestelde probeer opdragte. Ons eksperimente openbaar 'n tot 16% verhoog in presisiteit op visuele-semantiese inbêdings vergelyk met die ooreenstemmende unimodale inbêdings, wat voorstel dat die teks en beelddimensies wat in die voorbeeld verteenwoordig is, in die voorbeeld complementeer mekaar.", 'az': 'Semantik inbingləri saysız təbiətli dil işləmə işləri üçün sanatın durumunu art ırdılar. Görüş-semantik inbingləri kimi çoxlu modal domenalara müxtəlif uzaqlaşdırmalar təbliğ edilmişdir. Görüş-semantik inbinglərin gücü maşın öyrənməsi vasitəsilə məlumatların destilyasından və genişlənməsindən gəlirsə, iç işləri zəif anlaşılır və analiz vasitələrinin azlığı vardır. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, bu işləri görünüş-semantik davasına təşkil etmək fikrini generalizə edirik. Bu səbəbdə, biz (i) surat-başlıq çiftlərinin imzalaması üçün imzalamaq məqsədilərinin formaliziyasını danışırıq, (ii) üç konkrete imzalamaq məqsədilərini, iii) bu xüsusiyyətlər üçün imzalamaq üçün tren klasifikatorları danışırıq, iv) təklif edilmiş imzalamaq məqsədilərin lensi altında müxtəlif müxtəlif vəziyyətlər ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bizim təcrübələrimiz vizuali-semantik inbinglərin do ğruluğuna 16%-dən artığını göstərir, bu təcrübələrimiz əvvəlkilərdə göstərilən mətn və surat ölçülərinin bir-birini tamamlayır.', 'am': 'የሴማኒካዊ አካባቢዎች የዐርላዊ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ሥርዓቶችን ለማድረግ አካባቢ አካባቢዎች፣ እና የዓይነ ስሜታዊ አካባቢ፣ ለብዙዎቹ አካባቢዎች የሚደረጉት የጦማሪያዎች አካባቢዎች ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ የሳያዊ አካባቢዎች ኃይል ከመለየት እና የመረጃ ትምህርት ሀብት ሲመጣ፣ የውስጠኛው ሥራ በጣም የተሳሳተ ነው እናም የመረመሩ መሣሪያዎች ጎድነት አለ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ ስራዎችን ለመፈለግ ለራእዩ-semantic ጉዳይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት (i) የምስል አካባቢ-አካባቢ ሁለትን እናሳውቃለን፣ (ii) በሙሉ ፍሬማችን ውስጥ ሦስቱን ክፍል የሚያስፈልገውን ክፍሎች እናሳውቃለን፣ (iii) ለዚህ ምርጫዎች እንዲፈተና አስተማሪ እና (iv) በተዘጋጀው አካባቢ ስራዎችን ከታች ክፍለ ሥርዓት በታች የሚተካክሉ ሁኔታ አካባቢዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ለቀድሞው የጽሑፍ እና የምስል መልዕክቶች እርስ በርሳቸው እንዲጨምሩ በሚያሳየው የራእይ ስሜናዊ አካባቢዎች ላይ የሚጨመር የአስር መቶ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ ներդրումները զարգացրել են արվեստի բարձրացումը անթիվ բնական լեզվի վերամշակման խնդիրների համար, և բազմաթիվ տարբեր ընդլայնումներ են առաջարկվել, ինչպես օրինակ վիզուալ-սեմանտիկ ներդրումները: Մինչդեռ տեսողական-սեմանտիկ ներդրումների ուժը գալիս է մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության միջոցով տեղեկատվության դիսլիլացիայից և հարստացման արդյունքից, նրանց ներքին գործողությունները վատ են հասկանում և վերլուծության գործիքների պակաս կա: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ընդհանուր ենք ընդհանուր մասնագետների ուսումնասիրելու գաղափարը տեսողական-սեմանտիկ դեպքում: To this end, we (i) discuss the formalization of probing tasks for embeddings of image-caption pairs, (ii) define three concrete probing tasks within our general framework, (iii) train classifiers to probe for those properties, and (iv) compare various state-of-the-art embeddings under the lens of the proposed probing tasks.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մինչև 16 տոկոսով ճշգրտության աճը տեսողական-սեմանտիկ ներդրումների հետ համեմատած համապատասխան միամոդալ ներդրումների հետ, ինչը նշանակում է, որ նախկինում ներկայացված տեքստի և պատկերի չափերը միմյանց փոխարեն են:', 'bs': 'Semantički integraciji su napredovali stanje umjetnosti za bezbrojne prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika, a predloženo je različite proširenje multimodalnih domena, poput vizualne semantičke integracije. Iako moć vizuelnih semantičkih ugrađenja dolazi iz destilacije i bogatstva informacija kroz učenje strojeva, njihovi unutrašnji radovi su loše shvaćeni i nedostaje analiziranih alata. Da bismo riješili ovaj problem, generalizirali smo ideju o ispitivanju zadataka na vizualni semantički slučaj. Za taj cilj, mi (i) razgovaramo o formalizaciji istraživanja zadataka za ugrađenje parova slika, ii) definišemo tri konkretna istraživanja u našem općem okviru, iii) klasifikatore vlaka za istraživanje tih vlasnika, i iv) uspoređujemo različite stanje umjetnosti ugrađenja u okviru predloženih istraživanja zadataka. Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju povećanje to čnosti na 16% u usporedbi s odgovarajućim unimodalnim integracijama, što ukazuje na to da tekst i dimenzije slika predstavljene u prethodnim dijelovima dopunjavaju jedni druge.', 'et': 'Semantilised manustamised on arendanud tehnikat lugematute looduskeelte töötlemise ülesannete jaoks ning mitmesuguseid laiendusi multimodaalsetele valdkondadele, nagu visuaalsemantilised manustamised, on välja pakutud. Kuigi visuaalsemantilise manustamise jõud tuleneb teabe destilleerimisest ja rikastamisest masinõppe kaudu, on nende sisemine töö halvasti mõistetud ja analüüsivahenditest on puudus. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks üldistame ülesannete proovimise mõiste visuaalsemantilisele juhtumile. Sel eesmärgil (i) arutame pildi-pildi paaride manustamiseks proovimisülesannete formaliseerimist, (ii) määratleme üldises raamistikus kolm konkreetset proovimisülesannet, (iii) koolitame klassifitseerijaid nende omaduste uurimiseks ja (iv) võrdleme erinevaid kaasaegseid proovimisülesandeid kavandatud proovimisülesannete läätse all. Meie eksperimendid näitavad kuni 16% suuremat täpsust visuaalsemantiliste manustamiste puhul võrreldes vastavate unimodaalsete manustamistega, mis viitavad sellele, et esimeses esitatud teksti- ja pildimensioonid täiendavad teineteist.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের জন্য সেম্যান্টিক বিভিন্ন প্রস্তাব প্রদান করা শিল্পের অবস্থা উন্নত করেছে এবং বহুবিধ ডোমেনের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন মেশিন শিক্ষার মাধ্যমে দৃশ্য-সেম্যান্টিক বিদ্যমান এবং তথ্য সমৃদ্ধির ক্ষমতা থেকে এসেছে, তাদের ভিতরের কাজ খুব কম বুঝতে পারে এবং বিশ্লেষণ যন্ত এই সমস্যাটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য আমরা দৃশ্যমান-সেম্যান্টিক কেসের ক্ষেত্রে কাজ প্রমাণ করার ধারণা সাধারণ করি। এই কারণে আমরা (ই) ছবির শিরোনামের জোড়ার জন্য প্রকাশিত কাজের বৈশিষ্ট্য নিয়ে আলোচনা করি, (২) আমাদের সাধারণ কার্যক্রমের মধ্যে তিনটি ক্রিয়েট প্রকাশ করার কাজ নির্ধারণ করেছে, (আই) এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য প্রশিক্ষকদের প্রশিক আমাদের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে দৃশ্য-সেম্যান্টিক বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন সংশ্লিষ্ট ইউনিমোডাল বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্বের তুলনায় ১৬% বৃদ্ধি প', 'ca': "Les incorporacions semàntiques han avançat l'estat d'última generació per a innumerables tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals, i han estat proposades diverses extensions a dominis multimodals, com les incorporacions visual-semàntiques. Mentre que el poder de l'incorporació visual-semàntica prové de la distillació i l'enriqueciment de la informació a través de l'aprenentatge automàtic, els seus treballs interns són mal entenduts i hi ha falta d'eines d'anàlisi. To address this problem, we generalize the notion ofprobing tasks to the visual-semantic case.  A aquest efecte, discutem i) la formalització de les tasques de sondagem per incorporar parelles de captió-imatge, ii) definim tres tasques de sondagem en concret dins el nostre marc general, iii) classificadors de tren per sondar aquestes propietats, i iv) comparam diverses incorporacions d'última generació sota la lente de les tasques de sondagem proposades. Els nostres experiments revelen un increment de la precisió del 16% en les incorporacions visual-semàntiques en comparació amb les incorporacions unimodals correspondents, que suggereixen que les dimensions de text i imatge representades en la primera s'complement an entre elles.", 'cs': 'Sémantické vkládání pokročilo nejmodernější stav techniky pro nesčetné úlohy zpracování přirozeného jazyka a byla navržena různá rozšíření multimodálních domén, jako jsou vizuálně-sémantické vkládání. Zatímco síla vizuálně-sémantických vložení pochází z destilace a obohacování informací prostřednictvím strojového učení, jejich vnitřní fungování je špatně chápáno a nedostatek analytických nástrojů. Pro řešení tohoto problému zobecňujeme pojem sondování úloh na vizuálně-sémantický případ. Za tímto účelem (i) diskutujeme formalizaci sondovacích úloh pro vložení párů obrazových popisků, (ii) definujeme tři konkrétní sondovací úlohy v rámci našeho obecného rámce, (iii) trénujeme klasifikátory na zkoumání těchto vlastností a (iv) porovnáváme různé nejmodernější vkládání pod objektivem navrhovaných sondovacích úloh. Naše experimenty odhalují až 16% zvýšení přesnosti vizuálně-sémantických vložení ve srovnání s odpovídajícími unimodálními vloženími, což naznačuje, že rozměry textu a obrazu zastoupené v prvním se navzájem doplňují.', 'fi': 'Semanttiset upotukset ovat edistyneet viimeisintä tekniikkaa lukemattomissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä, ja multimodaalisiin toimialoihin on ehdotettu erilaisia laajennuksia, kuten visuaalis-semanttisia upotuksia. Vaikka visuaalis-semanttisten upotusten voima tulee tiedon tislauksesta ja rikastamisesta koneoppimisen avulla, niiden sisäistä toimintaa ymmärretään huonosti ja analyysityökaluista on pulaa. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi yleistämme luotavien tehtävien käsitteen visuaalis-semanttiseen tapaukseen. Tätä varten (i) keskustelemme kuvan ja kuvatekstin parien upottamiseen liittyvien luotaustehtävien virallistamisesta, (ii) määrittelemme kolme konkreettista luotaustehtävää yleisessä kehyksessämme, (iii) koulutamme luokittelijoita tutkimaan näitä ominaisuuksia ja (iv) vertaamme erilaisia huippuluokan upotuksia ehdotettujen luotaustehtävien linssin alla. Kokeemme osoittavat, että visuaalis-semanttisten upotusten tarkkuus on jopa 16% suurempi kuin vastaavien unimodaalisten upotusten tarkkuus, mikä viittaa siihen, että ensimmäisessä esitetyt teksti- ja kuvaulottuvuudet täydentävät toisiaan.', 'sk': 'Semantne vdelave so napredovale pri neštetih nalogah obdelave naravnega jezika in predlagane so različne razširitve multimodalnih domen, kot so vizualno-semantične vdelave. Medtem ko moč vizualno-semantičnih vdelav izhaja iz destilacije in obogatitve informacij s strojnim učenjem, je njihovo notranje delovanje slabo razumljeno in pomanjkanje orodij za analizo. Za reševanje tega problema posplošimo pojem sondiranja nalog v vizualno-semantični primer. V ta namen (i) razpravljamo o formalizaciji nalog sondiranja za vdelavo slike-napisov, (ii) opredelimo tri konkretne naloge sondiranja znotraj našega splošnega okvira, (iii) usposobimo klasifikatorje za iskanje teh lastnosti in (iv) primerjamo različne najsodobnejše vdelave pod lečo predlaganih nalog sondiranja. Naši eksperimenti razkrivajo do 16% večjo natančnost vizualno-semantičnih vdelav v primerjavi z ustreznimi unimodalnimi vdelavami, kar kaže, da se besedilne in slikovne dimenzije, predstavljene v prvem, dopolnjujejo.', 'jv': 'embedding Nanging ketoke nggawe sistem Visual-semanti sing dumadhi winih lan nggawe informasi ning manut karo ingkang sampeyan, lan winih dhéwé kuwi ora ngerasah apik lan ora ono sing ngenaé ciptaaken winih. Ngawe ngerasakno perbudhakan iki, kita ngupakan ngerasakno dadi seneng nggawe Kase Visual-semanti. To this end, we (i) debuted the formalization of likely tasks for embedding of image-caption paras, Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntuk 16% nggawé, nik awak dhéwé kesempatan karo perusahaan unimodal', 'he': 'תוכניות סמנטיות התקדמו במצב האומנות עבור משימות מעבדת שפת טבעיות ללא ספור, והצעו תוספות שונות לתחומים רבים מודליים, כמו תוכניות ויזואליות-סמנטיות. בעוד הכוח של תוכניות ויזואליות-סמנטיות מגיע מהמשקה והעשירה של מידע דרך לימוד מכונות, העבודה הפנימית שלהם לא מובנת היטב ויש חסר כלי ניתוח. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, אנו מגדילים את הרעיון של חקירת משימות למקרה ויזואלי-סמנטי. למטרה זו, אנחנו (i) מדברים על הפורמליזציה של משימות חקירה עבור קישורים של זוגות תמונות-כותר, (ii) מגדירים שלושה משימות חקירה מבטונות בתוך המסגרת הכללית שלנו, (iii) מסגרי הרכבת כדי לחקור את הנכונות הללו, ו (iv) לשוות שונים של קישורים חדשים מתחת לעדשה של המשימות הבדיקה המוצעות. הניסויים שלנו חושפים עד 16% הגידול בדיוק על תוכניות ויזואליות-סמנטיות בהשוואה לתכניות חד-מודליות המתאימות, מה שמצייע שהמימדי הטקסט והתמונה המייצגים בעבר משלמים אחד את השני.', 'ha': "An buƙata masu gabatar da halin sanar wa aikin aiki na fassarar harshen na asali, kuma an buƙata masu yawa ga saurãren Domen masu multi-mutane, kamar da masu ƙaranci-semantic. A lokacin da ƙarfin filin da ake gani ya zo daga rarrabe da rikitarwa wa information na mafarin kwamfyutan, za'a fahimta aikin bayani na aikin bayani, kuma there are ƙaranci na aikin analyza. Domin da za'a yi amfani da wannan mataimaki, za'a ƙididdige fikon yin jarraba aikin zuwa sakin mai gani-semantic. To, sabõda wannan, Munã jãyayya wa firam masu yin jarraba wa masu cikin sunan-zane, (i i) suna bayyana aikin su sau uku cikin firam guda a ƙarƙashin mu, kuma (i) suna kõre fassaran su dõmin su jarraba wa wannan properties, kuma (v) su sami wasu halin-sanannin da ke ƙarƙashin aikin da ake ƙayyade. Kayan jarrabõnmu suka nuna up ga asilimi 16an kori da taƙaitacce a kan filin da ke iya gani sami da saurin da ke daidai da girgijen unimodal, mai yiwuwa, yana madaidaita cewa girmar rubutu da zanen da aka sanar da shi a gabanin, za su cika jũna.", 'bo': 'Semantic embedding has advanced the state of the art for countless natural language processing tasks, and various extensions to multimodal domains, such as visual-semantic embedding, have been proposed. མཐོང་ནུས་semantic གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནུས་པ་དེ་ལས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིན་ནའང་ལག་ཆས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ནང་འཁོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྲིམས་མེད་དུ་རྐྱེ དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་མཐོང་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ མཐའ་མར་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་(i) པར་རིས་གཟུགས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཞིབ་བྱས་ནས། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་སྣང་ཆེན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བ་སྐྱེད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་16བར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Aspect-Category based Sentiment Analysis with Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network', 'ar': 'تحليل المشاعر القائم على فئة العرض مع الشبكة التلافيفية للرسم البياني الهرمي', 'es': 'Análisis de sentimiento basado en categorías de aspecto con red convolucional de gráfico jerárquico', 'pt': 'Análise de sentimento baseada em categoria de aspecto com rede convolucional de gráfico hierárquico', 'fr': 'Analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects et les catégories avec réseau convolutif de graphes hiérarchiques', 'ja': '階層グラフ畳み込みネットワークを使用したアスペクトカテゴリーベースのセンチメント分析', 'zh': '盖方面之分图卷积网络情析也', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क के साथ पहलू-श्रेणी आधारित भावना विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Анализ настроений на основе категории аспектов со сверточной сетью иерархического графа', 'ga': 'Anailís Mothúchán Bunaithe ar Ghné-Catagóir le Líonra Comhtháite Ghraf Ordlathach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Aspekt-kategória alapú érzelmek elemzése hierarchikus grafikon konvolúciós hálózattal', 'el': 'Ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση την κατηγορία πτυχών με Ιεραρχικό Σύγκλητο Δίκτυο Γραφημάτων', 'lt': 'Sentimento analizė pagal aspektų kategorijas su hierarchiniu grafiko konvoliuciniu tinklu', 'mk': 'Анализа на чувства базирана на аспект- категорија со хиерархиска графска конволуционална мрежа', 'it': 'Analisi del sentimento basata su categorie di aspetti con rete conveluzionale del grafico gerarchico', 'kk': 'Аспективті санатты негіздеген гиерархикалық графикалық желімен Sentiment анализ', 'mn': 'Аспект-Категорийн үндсэн Sentiment Analysis with Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network', 'ml': 'ഹിയരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അന്വേഷണം', 'no': 'Sentimentanalyser basert på aspektkategori med hierarkisk graf- konvolusjonell nettverk', 'mt': 'Analiżi tas-Sentiment ibbażata fuq il-Kategorija tal-Aspetti bin-Netwerk Konveoluzzjonali tal-Grafiki Erarkiċi', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor bazată pe categorii de aspect cu rețeaua conveluțională grafică ierarhică', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów oparta na kategoriach aspektów z hierarchiczną siecią konwolucyjną wykresu', 'sr': 'Analiza sentimenta na osnovu aspekta kategorije sa hijerarhičkom grafičkom konvolucionalnom mrežom', 'ms': 'Analisi Sentimen Berasas Kategori-Aspect dengan Rangkaian Berkonvolusi Graf Hierarkikal', 'si': 'Aspect- Category ආධාරිත Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය සමග හිරාර්චික ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය ජාලය', 'so': 'Aspect-Category based Sentiment Analysis with Hierarchical Graph Convolution Network', 'ta': 'பார்வை - வகை', 'sv': 'Aspektkategoribaserad känsloanalys med hierarkisk graf konvulutivt nätverk', 'ur': 'آسپٹ-کاٹی بنیاد سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل حیرارشیک گراف کنویلوٹ نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hình học phân loại nhân tạo với mạng lưới hình thức', 'bg': 'Анализ на сентимента с йерархична графика Конволюционна мрежа', 'da': 'Aspect-Category baseret følelsesanalyse med hierarkisk graf konvulutivt netværk', 'nl': 'Aspect-Category gebaseerde sentimentanalyse met hiërarchische grafiek Convolutional Network', 'hr': 'Analiza sentimenta na osnovu aspekta kategorije s hijerarhičkom grafičkom konvolucionalnom mrežom', 'de': 'Aspect-Category basierte Sentiment Analyse mit hierarchischem Graphen Convolutional Network', 'ko': '방면 유형을 바탕으로 하는 차원 도권적 네트워크 감정 분석', 'fa': 'تحلیل مجموعه با شبکه\u200cهای معمولی گراف\u200cهای معمولی', 'id': 'Analisi Sentimen Berdasarkan Kategori-Aspect dengan Jaringan Konvelusi Graf Hierarkis', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Sentiment based with Hierarchical Graph Convolution Network', 'tr': 'Aspekt-kategoriýasynda Sentiment Taýramy Hijerarşik Grafik Maýyp Aýry bilen Taýýarlama', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave bazuar në kategori-Aspect me rrjetin konvolutiv të grafikut hierarkik', 'az': 'Hiyerarşik Grafik Konvolucional Ağı ilə Aspect-Kategoriya tabanlı Sentiment Analizi', 'hy': 'Aspect-Category based Sentiment Analysis with Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network', 'bs': 'Analiza sentimenta na osnovu aspekta kategorije sa hijerarškom grafičkom konvolucionalnom mrežom', 'ca': "Anàlisi de sentiments basat en categories d'aspecte amb xarxa de conversió de gràfics hieràrquics", 'cs': 'Aspect-Category založená analýza sentimentů s hierarchickou grafovou konveluční sítí', 'bn': 'হিয়ারার্কিক্যাল গ্রাফ কনভোলোশনেশন নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে ভিত্তিক সেনিটেমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ', 'et': 'Aspekti kategooriapõhine sentimentaalüüs hierarhilise graafika konvolutsioonivõrguga', 'fi': 'Aspekti-kategoriapohjainen tunteiden analysointi hierarkisella kaaviolla Konvolutional Network', 'jv': 'Aspect-kategori wis digawe Sentiment Test karo Jearahak Graph convolution Network', 'he': 'Analysis of Sentiment Based on Aspect- Category with Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network', 'ha': 'Analyze na Hiirarchical Graf Conlosion NetworkManager', 'sk': 'Analiza čustev na podlagi kategorij vidikov s konvolucijskim omrežjem hierarhičnega grafika', 'bo': 'Aspect-Category based Sentiment Analysis with Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network'}
{'en': 'Most of the aspect based sentiment analysis research aims at identifying the sentiment polarities toward some explicit aspect terms while ignores implicit aspects in text. To capture both explicit and implicit aspects, we focus on aspect-category based sentiment analysis, which involves joint aspect category detection and category-oriented sentiment classification. However, currently only a few simple studies have focused on this problem. The shortcomings in the way they defined the task make their approaches difficult to effectively learn the inner-relations between categories and the inter-relations between categories and sentiments. In this work, we re-formalize the task as a category-sentiment hierarchy prediction problem, which contains a hierarchy output structure to first identify multiple aspect categories in a piece of text, and then predict the sentiment for each of the identified categories. Specifically, we propose a Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN), where a lower-level GCN is to model the inner-relations among multiple categories, and the higher-level GCN is to capture the inter-relations between aspect categories and sentiments. Extensive evaluations demonstrate that our hierarchy output structure is superior over existing ones, and the Hier-GCN model can consistently achieve the best results on four benchmarks.', 'ar': 'تهدف معظم أبحاث تحليل المشاعر القائمة على الجانب إلى تحديد استقطاب المشاعر تجاه بعض المصطلحات الواضحة بينما تتجاهل الجوانب الضمنية في النص. لالتقاط كل من الجوانب الصريحة والضمنية ، نركز على تحليل المشاعر القائم على فئة العرض ، والذي يتضمن الكشف المشترك عن فئة الجانب وتصنيف المشاعر الموجه نحو الفئة. ومع ذلك ، في الوقت الحالي ، ركزت بعض الدراسات البسيطة فقط على هذه المشكلة. تجعل أوجه القصور في الطريقة التي حددوا بها المهمة مناهجهم صعبة التعلم الفعال للعلاقات الداخلية بين الفئات والعلاقات بين الفئات والمشاعر. في هذا العمل ، نعيد صياغة المهمة كمشكلة توقع هرمي للفئة والمشاعر ، والتي تحتوي على هيكل إخراج هرمي للتعرف أولاً على فئات جوانب متعددة في جزء من النص ، ثم توقع المشاعر لكل فئة من الفئات المحددة. على وجه التحديد ، نقترح شبكة تلافيفية للرسم البياني الهرمي (Hier-GCN) ، حيث تقوم GCN ذات المستوى الأدنى بنمذجة العلاقات الداخلية بين الفئات المتعددة ، ويكون GCN ذي المستوى الأعلى هو التقاط العلاقات بين فئات الجانب والمشاعر . تُظهر التقييمات المكثفة أن هيكل مخرجات التسلسل الهرمي لدينا متفوق على الموجود ، ويمكن لنموذج Hier-GCN أن يحقق باستمرار أفضل النتائج على أربعة معايير.', 'pt': 'A maior parte da pesquisa de análise de sentimento baseada em aspectos visa identificar as polaridades de sentimento em relação a alguns termos de aspecto explícitos, enquanto ignora aspectos implícitos no texto. Para capturar aspectos explícitos e implícitos, focamos na análise de sentimento baseada em categoria de aspecto, que envolve detecção conjunta de categoria de aspecto e classificação de sentimento orientada por categoria. No entanto, atualmente, apenas alguns estudos simples se concentraram nesse problema. As deficiências na forma como eles definiram a tarefa dificultam suas abordagens para aprender efetivamente as relações internas entre categorias e as inter-relações entre categorias e sentimentos. Neste trabalho, reformulamos a tarefa como um problema de previsão de hierarquia de sentimento de categoria, que contém uma estrutura de saída de hierarquia para primeiro identificar várias categorias de aspecto em um pedaço de texto e, em seguida, prever o sentimento para cada uma das categorias identificadas. Especificamente, propomos uma Rede Convolucional de Grafos Hierárquicos (Hier-GCN), onde um GCN de nível inferior é para modelar as relações internas entre várias categorias, e o GCN de nível superior é para capturar as inter-relações entre categorias de aspecto e sentimentos . Avaliações extensas demonstram que nossa estrutura de saída hierárquica é superior às existentes, e o modelo Hier-GCN pode alcançar consistentemente os melhores resultados em quatro benchmarks.', 'fr': "La plupart des recherches d'analyse des sentiments basées sur les aspects visent à identifier les polarités du sentiment par rapport à certains termes explicites d'aspect tout en ignorant les aspects implicites dans le texte. Pour saisir les aspects explicites et implicites, nous nous concentrons sur l'analyse des sentiments basée sur les catégories d'aspects, qui implique la détection conjointe des catégories d'aspects et la classification des sentiments axée sur les catégories. Cependant, seules quelques études simples se sont concentrées sur ce problème. Les lacunes dans la façon dont ils ont défini la tâche rendent leur approche difficile pour apprendre efficacement les relations internes entre les catégories et les relations entre les catégories et les sentiments. Dans ce travail, nous reformalisons la tâche en tant que problème de prédiction de hiérarchie catégorie-sentiment, qui contient une structure de sortie hiérarchique permettant d'identifier d'abord plusieurs catégories d'aspects dans un morceau de texte, puis de prédire le sentiment pour chacune des catégories identifiées. Plus précisément, nous proposons un réseau convolutionnel de graphe hiérarchique (Hier-GCN), dans lequel un GCN de niveau inférieur est destiné à modéliser les relations internes entre plusieurs catégories, et le GCN de niveau supérieur est de capturer les relations entre les catégories d'aspect et les sentiments. Des évaluations approfondies démontrent que notre structure hiérarchique de sortie est supérieure aux structures existantes, et que le modèle Hier-GCN peut toujours obtenir les meilleurs résultats sur quatre points de référence.", 'es': 'La mayoría de las investigaciones de análisis de sentimientos basados en aspectos tienen como objetivo identificar las polaridades de los sentimientos hacia algunos términos de aspecto explícitos, mientras que ignora los aspectos implícitos en el texto. Para capturar tanto los aspectos explícitos como los implícitos, nos centramos en el análisis de opinión basado en la categoría de aspecto, que implica la detección conjunta de la categoría de aspecto y la clasificación de opinión orientada a las categorías. Sin embargo, actualmente solo unos pocos estudios simples se han centrado en este problema. Las deficiencias en la forma en que definieron la tarea hacen que sus enfoques sean difíciles de aprender eficazmente las relaciones internas entre las categorías y las interrelaciones entre las categorías y los sentimientos. En este trabajo, reformalizamos la tarea como un problema de predicción de jerarquía de opinión de categorías, que contiene una estructura de salida jerárquica para identificar primero múltiples categorías de aspecto en un fragmento de texto y, a continuación, predecir la opinión para cada una de las categorías identificadas. Específicamente, proponemos una Red Convolucional de Gráfico Jerárquico (Hier-GCN), donde un GCN de nivel inferior modelará las relaciones internas entre múltiples categorías, y el GCN de nivel superior capturará las interrelaciones entre las categorías de aspecto y los sentimientos. Las evaluaciones exhaustivas demuestran que nuestra estructura jerárquica de resultados es superior a las existentes, y el modelo Hier-GCN puede lograr consistentemente los mejores resultados en cuatro puntos de referencia.', 'ja': 'アスペクトに基づく感情分析研究のほとんどは、テキストの暗黙の側面を無視しながら、いくつかの明示的なアスペクト用語に対する感情の極性を特定することを目的としている。 明示的な側面と暗黙的な側面の両方を取り込むために、私たちはアスペクトカテゴリに基づく感情分析に焦点を当てます。これには、共同のアスペクトカテゴリ検出とカテゴリ指向の感情分類が含まれます。 しかし、現在この問題に焦点を当てた単純な研究はわずかである。 彼らが課題を定義した方法の欠点により、彼らのアプローチはカテゴリー間の内在関係とカテゴリーと感情間の相互関係を効果的に学ぶことが困難になる。 この作業では、タスクをカテゴリ感情階層予測問題として再形式化し、まずテキストの複数のアスペクトカテゴリを識別し、次に識別された各カテゴリの感情を予測するための階層出力構造を含みます。 具体的には、階層グラフ畳み込みネットワーク（ Ｈｉｅｒ － ＧＣＮ ）を提案し、低レベルのＧＣＮは複数のカテゴリ間の内関係をモデル化し、高レベルのＧＣＮはアスペクトカテゴリと感情間の相互関係をキャプチャする。 広範な評価は、当社の階層出力構造が既存のものよりも優れており、Hier - GCNモデルは4つのベンチマークで一貫して最高の結果を達成することができることを示しています。', 'zh': '大抵情析意显性术语情极性,略文隐性。 为显性隐性者,专于类情,合类检类。 然而,只有少数简的研究集在这件事上。 其义之病,使难学类,与情相关。 于此之事,重形式化为情层次结构占,包层次结构输构,所以先识文本之多端,然后知情之别也。 凡此诸图卷积网络(Hier-GCN),其小GCN拟于内,而高级别GCN于情。 广评明,层次结构输优于今,Hier-GCN四试而终获得最佳。', 'hi': 'पहलू आधारित भावना विश्लेषण अनुसंधान के अधिकांश का उद्देश्य कुछ स्पष्ट पहलू शब्दों की ओर भावना polarities की पहचान करना है, जबकि पाठ में निहित पहलुओं को अनदेखा करता है। दोनों स्पष्ट और निहित पहलुओं को पकड़ने के लिए, हम पहलू-श्रेणी आधारित भावना विश्लेषण पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जिसमें संयुक्त पहलू श्रेणी का पता लगाना और श्रेणी-उन्मुख भावना वर्गीकरण शामिल है। हालांकि, वर्तमान में केवल कुछ सरल अध्ययनों ने इस समस्या पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। जिस तरह से उन्होंने कार्य को परिभाषित किया है, उसमें कमियां उनके दृष्टिकोण को श्रेणियों के बीच आंतरिक संबंधों और श्रेणियों और भावनाओं के बीच अंतर-संबंधों को प्रभावी ढंग से सीखना मुश्किल बनाती हैं। इस कार्य में, हम कार्य को श्रेणी-भावना पदानुक्रम पूर्वानुमान समस्या के रूप में फिर से औपचारिक रूप देते हैं, जिसमें पहले पाठ के एक टुकड़े में कई पहलू श्रेणियों की पहचान करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रम आउटपुट संरचना होती है, और फिर पहचानी गई श्रेणियों में से प्रत्येक के लिए भावना की भविष्यवाणी की जाती है। विशेष रूप से, हम एक पदानुक्रमित ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क (हाइर-जीसीएन) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जहां एक निचले स्तर का जीसीएन कई श्रेणियों के बीच आंतरिक संबंधों को मॉडल करना है, और उच्च-स्तरीय जीसीएन पहलू श्रेणियों और भावनाओं के बीच अंतर-संबंधों को कैप्चर करना है। व्यापक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारी पदानुक्रम आउटपुट संरचना मौजूदा लोगों की तुलना में बेहतर है, और हाइर-जीसीएन मॉडल लगातार चार बेंचमार्क पर सर्वोत्तम परिणाम प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Большинство исследований по анализу настроений, основанных на аспекте, направлены на выявление полярностей настроений по отношению к некоторым явным терминам аспекта, в то время как неявные аспекты в тексте игнорируются. Чтобы охватить как явные, так и неявные аспекты, мы фокусируемся на анализе настроений на основе категории аспекта, который включает совместное обнаружение категории аспекта и классификацию настроений, ориентированную на категорию. Однако в настоящее время эта проблема затрагивается лишь в нескольких простых исследованиях. Недостатки в том, как они определили задачу, затрудняют их подходы к эффективному изучению внутренних связей между категориями и взаимосвязей между категориями и чувствами. В этой работе мы переформатируем задачу как задачу предсказания иерархии категорий, которая содержит структуру вывода иерархии, чтобы сначала идентифицировать несколько категорий аспектов в фрагменте текста, а затем предсказать настроения для каждой из идентифицированных категорий. В частности, мы предлагаем иерархическую конволюционную сеть графов (Hier-GCN), где GCN нижнего уровня моделирует внутренние отношения между несколькими категориями, а GCN верхнего уровня фиксирует взаимосвязи между категориями аспектов и настроениями. Обширные оценки показывают, что наша иерархическая структура выпуска превосходит существующие, и модель Hier-GCN может последовательно достигать наилучших результатов по четырем контрольным показателям.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag an gcuid is mó den taighde anailíse meon bunaithe ar ghnéithe na polaraíochtaí meon a aithint i dtreo roinnt téarmaí sainiúla gné agus neamhaird á dhéanamh ar ghnéithe intuigthe sa téacs. Chun gnéithe follasacha agus intuigthe araon a ghabháil, dírímid ar anailís dhearcadh atá bunaithe ar ghnéithe de réir catagóire, a bhaineann le comhbhrath catagóirí gné agus le haicmiú meoin atá dírithe ar chatagóirí. Mar sin féin, faoi láthair níl ach cúpla staidéar simplí dírithe ar an bhfadhb seo. De bharr na n-easnaimh ar an mbealach a shainigh siad an tasc is deacair a gcur chuige a fhoghlaim go héifeachtach an caidreamh inmheánach idir catagóirí agus na hidirghaolta idir catagóirí agus mothúcháin. San obair seo, déanaimid an tasc a athfhoirmliú mar fhadhb tuar ordlathais chatagóir-meontaí, ina bhfuil struchtúr aschuir ordlathais chun catagóirí ilghnéitheacha a shainaithint ar dtús i bpíosa téacs, agus ansin an meon do gach ceann de na catagóirí sainaitheanta a thuar. Go sonrach, molaimid Gréasán Comhdhlúite Graf Ordlathach (Hier-GCN), áit a bhfuil GCN ar leibhéal níos ísle chun na caidrimh istigh i measc na gcatagóirí iolracha a shamhaltú, agus is é an GCN ardleibhéil ná na hidirghaolta idir catagóirí gné agus mothúcháin a ghabháil. . Léiríonn meastóireachtaí fairsinge go bhfuil ár n-ordlathas struchtúr aschuir níos fearr ná na cinn atá ann cheana féin, agus is féidir leis an tsamhail Hier-GCN na torthaí is fearr a bhaint amach go comhsheasmhach ar cheithre thagarmharc.', 'ka': 'აპექტიმენტის უფრო მეტი სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის განსხვავება მიზეზიან, რომ სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის განსხვავება რამდენიმე განსხვავებული აპექტიმენტის განსხვავებას, როცა ტე რომელიც განსხვავებული და იმპლიციტიური აპექტირების შესახებ, ჩვენ აპექტირებული კატეგორია განსხვავებული სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის კონუქტირებულია, რომელიც ერთადერთი აპექტირების მაგრამ ახლა მხოლოდ რამდენიმე მარტივი კვლევები ამ პრობლემაზე კონუქტირებულია. არაფერი, როგორც ისინი განსაზღვრებული რაოდენობას, მათი წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრება შეუძლებელია, რომ ეფექტიურად ისწავლოთ კატეგორიების და კატეგორიების და სენტიმენტების შორის ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ სამუშაო სამუშაო როგორც კატეგორია-სენტიმენტის თერაქტის პრობლემა, რომელიც აქვს თერაქტიის გამოსახულების სტრუქტურაცია, რომელიც პირველი ტექსტის რაოდენობის განსახულ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ მინდომა ჰიერარიქული გრაფის კონტულუციონალური ქსელი (Hier-GCN), სადაც GCN-ს კონტუალური დონე არის მოდელურება მრავალური კატეგორიების შორის შესახებ, და GCN-ს უფრო მეტი დონე არის აპექ განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი იერაქტიური გამოყენების სტრუქტურაცია უფრო მეტია არსებობს, და Hier-GCN მოდელი შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ ყველაზე საუკეთესი შედეგი', 'el': 'Το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της έρευνας ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων με βάση τις πτυχές στοχεύει στον προσδιορισμό των πολικότητας συναισθημάτων προς ορισμένους ρητούς όρους πτυχής ενώ αγνοεί τις έμμεσες πτυχές στο κείμενο. Για να συλλάβουμε τόσο ρητές όσο και έμμεσες πτυχές, εστιάζουμε στην ανάλυση συναισθημάτων βασισμένη στην κατηγορία πτυχών, η οποία περιλαμβάνει κοινή ανίχνευση κατηγοριών πτυχών και κατηγοριοποιημένη ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων. Ωστόσο, επί του παρόντος μόνο λίγες απλές μελέτες έχουν επικεντρωθεί σε αυτό το πρόβλημα. Οι ελλείψεις στον τρόπο που καθόρισαν το έργο δυσκολεύουν τις προσεγγίσεις τους να μάθουν αποτελεσματικά τις εσωτερικές σχέσεις μεταξύ κατηγοριών και των σχέσεων μεταξύ κατηγοριών και συναισθημάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επανατυποποιούμε την εργασία ως πρόβλημα πρόβλεψης ιεραρχίας κατηγοριών-συναισθημάτων, το οποίο περιέχει μια δομή παραγωγής ιεραρχίας για να εντοπίσουμε πρώτα πολλαπλές κατηγορίες πτυχών σε ένα κομμάτι κειμένου και στη συνέχεια να προβλέψουμε το συναίσθημα για κάθε μία από τις προσδιορισμένες κατηγορίες. Συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε ένα Ιεραρχικό Δίκτυο Σύγκλισης Γραφημάτων (Hier-GCN), όπου ένα χαμηλότερο επίπεδο GCN είναι να μοντελοποιήσει τις εσωτερικές σχέσεις μεταξύ πολλών κατηγοριών, και το ανώτερο επίπεδο GCN είναι να συλλάβει τις σχέσεις μεταξύ κατηγοριών πτυχών και συναισθημάτων. Εκτεταμένες αξιολογήσεις αποδεικνύουν ότι η δομή παραγωγής ιεραρχίας μας είναι ανώτερη από τις υπάρχουσες και το μοντέλο μπορεί να επιτύχει σταθερά τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα σε τέσσερις δείκτες αναφοράς.', 'it': "La maggior parte della ricerca di analisi del sentiment basata sugli aspetti mira ad identificare le polarità del sentiment verso alcuni termini di aspetto espliciti mentre ignora aspetti impliciti nel testo. Per catturare sia gli aspetti espliciti che impliciti, ci concentriamo sull'analisi del sentiment basato sulle categorie di aspetto, che comporta il rilevamento congiunto delle categorie di aspetto e la classificazione del sentiment orientata alle categorie. Tuttavia, attualmente solo pochi semplici studi si sono concentrati su questo problema. Le carenze nel modo in cui hanno definito il compito rendono difficile ai loro approcci apprendere efficacemente le relazioni interne tra categorie e le interrelazioni tra categorie e sentimenti. In questo lavoro, formalizziamo l'attività come un problema di previsione gerarchica categoria-sentiment, che contiene una struttura di output gerarchico per identificare prima più categorie di aspetto in un pezzo di testo, e quindi prevedere il sentiment per ciascuna delle categorie identificate. Nello specifico, proponiamo una Rete Convoluzionale del Grafico Gerarchico (Hier-GCN), dove un GCN di livello inferiore deve modellare le relazioni interne tra più categorie, e il GCN di livello superiore deve catturare le interrelazioni tra categorie di aspetto e sentimenti. Valutazioni approfondite dimostrano che la nostra struttura di output gerarchico è superiore a quelle esistenti e che il modello Hier-GCN può ottenere costantemente i migliori risultati su quattro parametri di riferimento.", 'hu': 'A legtöbb aspektus alapú sentimental elemzési kutatás célja, hogy azonosítsa az sentimental polaritásokat néhány explicit aspektus kifejezéssel szemben, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyja a szöveg implicit aspektusait. Az explicit és implicit szempontok megragadása érdekében az aspektkategória alapú érzelmek elemzésére összpontosítunk, amely magában foglalja a közös aspektkategória-felismerést és a kategória-orientált érzelmek osztályozását. Jelenleg azonban csak néhány egyszerű tanulmány koncentrált erre a problémára. A feladat meghatározásának hiányosságai miatt megközelítésük megnehezíti a kategóriák közötti belső kapcsolatokat, valamint a kategóriák és érzelmek közötti kapcsolatokat. Ebben a munkában újra formalizáljuk a feladatot, mint egy kategória-hangulat hierarchia előrejelzési probléma, amely tartalmaz egy hierarchia kimeneti struktúrát, amely először több aspektkategóriát azonosít egy darab szövegben, majd előrejelzi az egyes azonosított kategóriák hangulatát. Konkrétan javasoljuk a Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN), ahol az alacsonyabb szintű GCN modellezi a több kategória belső kapcsolatait, a magasabb szintű GCN pedig az aspektkategóriák és érzelmek közötti kapcsolatokat. A kiterjedt értékelések azt mutatják, hogy hierarchia kimeneti struktúránk jobb a meglévőkkel szemben, és a Hier-GCN modell következetesen a legjobb eredményeket tudja elérni négy referenciaértéken.', 'lt': 'Daugumos aspektais pagrįstų jausmų analizės mokslinių tyrimų tikslas – nustatyti jausmų poliarumą tam tikrų aiškių aspektų sąvokų at žvilgiu ir ignoruoti netiesioginius teksto aspektus. Siekiant išnagrinėti ir aiškius, ir netiesioginius aspektus, daugiausia dėmesio skiriame aspektų kategorija grindžiamai jautrumo analizei, kuri apima bendrą aspektų kategorijos nustatymą ir kategorijai orientuotą jautrumo klasifikaciją. Tačiau šiuo metu šioje problemoje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama tik keliems paprastiems tyrimams. Dėl jų užduoties apibrėžimo trūkumų sunku veiksmingai išsiaiškinti kategorijų vidaus santykius ir kategorijų ir jausmų tarpusavio santykius. Šiame darbe iš naujo formalizuojame užduotį kaip kategorijų jausmų hierarchijos prognozavimo problem ą, kurioje yra hierarchijos išėjimo struktūra, kad pirmiausia būtų galima nustatyti kelių aspektų kategorijas tekste, o vėliau prognozuoti kiekvienos iš nustatytų kategorijų jausmą. Konkrečiai siūlome Hierarchinio grafiko konvoliucinio tinklo (Hier-GCN), kuriame žemesnio lygio GCN turi modeliuoti įvairių kategorijų vidinius santykius, o aukštesnio lygio GCN turi nustatyti aspektų kategorijų ir sentimentų tarpusavio santykius. Išsamūs vertinimai rodo, kad mūsų hierarchinė išėjimo struktūra yra geresnė nei esama, o Hier-GCN model is nuosekliai gali pasiekti geriausius rezultatus pagal keturis kriterijus.', 'mk': 'Повеќето истражувања за анализа на чувствата базирани на аспектот имаат за цел идентификување на поларитетите на чувствата кон некои експлицитни термини на аспектот, иако ги игнорираат имплицитните аспекти во текстот. За да ги фатиме експлицитните и имплицитните аспекти, се фокусираме на анализата на чувствата базирана на аспект-категорија, која вклучува детекција на заеднички аспект-категорија и класификација на чувства ориентирана на категорија Сепак, моментално само неколку едноставни студии се фокусираа на овој проблем. Недостатоците на начинот на кој тие ја дефинираа задачата ги прави нивните пристапи тешки за ефикасно да ги научат внатрешните односи меѓу категориите и меѓуодносите меѓу категориите и чувствата. Во оваа работа, ја реформализираме задачата како проблем со предвидување на хиерархијата на чувствата на категоријата, кој содржи хиерархија на излезната структура за прво да ги идентификуваме многуте категории на аспекти во дел од текстот, а потоа да го предвидеме чувството за секоја идентификувана катег Специфично, предложуваме хиерархиска графска конволуционална мрежа (Hier-GCN), каде што ниското ниво на GCN е да ги моделира внатрешните односи меѓу повеќето категории, а високото ниво на GCN е да ги зафати интеродносите меѓу категориите на аспекти и чувствата. Екстензивните евалуации покажуваат дека нашата хиерархиска излезна структура е супериорна од постоечките, а моделот Хир-ГНК може константно да ги постигне најдобрите резултати на четири референтни оценки.', 'kk': 'Бөлшектердің көпшілігі көпшілігі сенімдерді анализ зерттеулері мәтіндегі көпшілік аспекттерді анықтау үшін мәтіндегі көпшілік аспекттерді елемейді. Екі түсінікті және басқа аспекттерді алу үшін біз аспекттер санаттарының санаттарының анализациясына көздейміз. Бұл аспекттер санаттарын анықтау мен санаттарының бағытталған сезімдер санаттарының санаттарын Бірақ қазір бұл мәселеге тек бірнеше қарапайым зерттеулерді көңіл береді. Олардың тапсырманы анықтау жолындағы жеткіліктері, санаттар мен сезімдер арасындағы қатынастар мен ішкі қатынастарын оқыту үшін өзінің қатынастарын қиын көмектеседі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, тапсырманы санаттарлық сезімдердің иерархиясының алдында бірнеше аспект санаттарын анықтау үшін иерархиялық шығару құрылымы болады. Содан кейін әрбір анықталған санаттардың сезімдерін таңдап алдындай аламыз. Ескерілікті, біз хиерархикалық графикалық құрылғы желі (Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN), жерде төменгі деңгейі GCN бірнеше санаттардың ішкі қатынасын үлгілеу үшін, және жоғары деңгейі GCN аспекттер санаттары мен сезімдер арасындағы қа Кеңейтілген оқиғалар біздің иерархиялық шығыс құрылымыз барлық құрылымыздың үстінен артық, және Hier-GCN үлгісі төрт бағдарламалардың ең жақсы нәтижелерін жеткізе алады.', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka dwar l-analiżi tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq l-aspetti għandha l-għan li tidentifika l-polaritajiet tas-sentimenti lejn xi termini espliċiti tal-aspetti filwaqt li tinjora aspetti impliċiti fit-test. Biex inqabdu kemm aspetti espliċiti kif ukoll impliċiti, niffokaw fuq analiżi tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq il-kategorija tal-aspetti, li tinvolvi detezzjoni konġunta tal-kategorija tal-aspetti u klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti orjentata lejn il-kategorija. However, currently only a few simple studies have focused on this problem.  In-nuqqasijiet fil-mod kif iddefinixxew il-kompitu jagħmlu l-approċċi tagħhom diffiċli biex jitgħallmu b’mod effettiv ir-relazzjonijiet interni bejn il-kategoriji u l-inter-relazzjonijiet bejn il-kategoriji u s-sentimenti. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nifformalizzaw mill-ġdid il-kompitu bħala problem a ta’ tbassir tal-ġerarkija tas-sentimenti tal-kategorija, li fiha struttura ta’ produzzjoni ġerarkija biex l-ewwel jiġu identifikati kategoriji ta’ aspetti multipli f’biċċa ta’ test, u mbagħad imbassru s-sentiment għal kull waħda mill-kategoriji identifikati. B’mod speċifiku, qed nipproponu Netwerk Konveoluzzjonali tal-Grafiki Erarkiċi (Hier-GCN), fejn GCN ta’ livell aktar baxx għandu jimmudella r-relazzjonijiet interni fost diversi kategoriji, u l-GCN ta’ livell ogħla għandu jaqbad l-interrelazzjonijiet bejn il-kategoriji tal-aspetti u s-sentimenti. Evalwazzjonijiet estensivi juru li l-istruttura tal-output ġerarkija tagħna hija superjuri fuq dawk eżistenti, u l-mudell Hier-GCN jista’ b’mod konsistenti jikseb l-aħjar riżultati fuq erba’ punti ta’ riferiment.', 'no': 'Dei fleste aspektbaserte sentimentanaliseringane måtar å identifisera sentiment- polarisiteten mot nokre eksplisitt aspektuttrykk mens ignorerer implisitte aspektar i tekst. For å henta både eksplisitt og implisitt aspekt, fokuserer vi på aspektkategoribasert sentimentanalyse, som involverer joint aspektkategorioppdaging og kategoriorientert sentimentklassifikasjon. Dette er imidlertid berre noen enkle studiar fokusert på dette problemet. Manglar på måten dei definerte oppgåva gjer tilnærmingane sine vanskeleg for å lære innhaldene mellom kategoriar og interrelasjonane mellom kategoriar og sentimentar. I denne arbeida formaliserer vi oppgåva på nytt som eit problem for forhåndsvising av kategorisentiment, som inneheld eit hierarkisk utdatastruktur for å først identifisera fleire aspektkategoriar i eit tekststykke, og så forhåndsvisa sentimenten for kvar av dei identifiserte kategoriane. Dette er spesielt at vi foreslår eit hierarkisk graf-konvolusjonell nettverk (Hier-GCN), der ein lågare nivå GCN er å modellere innhaldene mellom fleire kategoriar, og den høgare nivået GCN er å henta interrelasjonane mellom aspektkategoriar og sentimentar. Ekstra evalueringar viser at hierarkiske utdatastrukturen vårt er over eksisterande, og hierarkiske GCN-modellen kan konsekvent oppnå dei beste resultatene på fire benchmarker.', 'ms': 'Most of the aspect based sentiment analysis research aims at identifying the sentiment polarities toward some explicit aspect terms while ignores implicit aspects in text.  Untuk menangkap kedua-dua aspek eksplicit dan implicit, kita fokus pada analisis sentimen berdasarkan kategori-aspek, yang melibatkan pengesan kategori aspek kongsi dan klasifikasi sentimen-orient kategori. Namun, kini hanya beberapa kajian sederhana telah fokus pada masalah ini. Gagal dalam cara mereka menentukan tugas membuat pendekatan mereka sukar untuk mempelajari hubungan dalaman antara kategori dan hubungan antara kategori dan perasaan. Dalam kerja ini, kita formalisasi semula tugas sebagai masalah ramalan hierarki perasaan-kategori, yang mengandungi struktur output hierarki untuk pertama mengenalpasti kategori aspek berbilang dalam sepotong teks, dan kemudian meramalkan perasaan untuk setiap kategori yang dikenalpasti. Secara khusus, kami cadangkan rangkaian konvolusi Graf Hierarkikal (Hier-GCN), di mana GCN aras bawah adalah untuk model hubungan dalaman diantara kategori berbilang, dan GCN aras tinggi adalah untuk menangkap hubungan antara kategori aspek dan sentimen. Evaluasi luas menunjukkan bahawa struktur output hierarki kita lebih tinggi daripada yang ada, dan model Hier-GCN boleh secara konsisten mencapai keputusan terbaik pada empat tanda referensi.', 'ml': 'ബാക്കിയുള്ള ഭാഗത്തിലേറെപ്പേരും വിചാരകശ്വാസം പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം വ്യക്തമായ ചില വിഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്കുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരി To capture both explicit and implicit aspects, we focus on aspect-category based sentiment analysis, which involves joint aspect category detection and category-oriented sentiment classification.  എന്നാലും, ഇപ്പോള്\u200d കുറച്ചു എളുപ്പമുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ ഈ പ്രവൃത്തിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലി വീണ്ടും ഫോര്\u200dമാറ്റി ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഒരു വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ ഹീറാര്\u200dക്ടി പ്രവചനങ്ങളായി പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമാണ്. അതില്\u200d ആദ്യം പല ഭാഗങ്ങളു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് (ഹിയെര്\u200d-ജിസിനി) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഒരു ചില വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ബന്ധ വിശാലമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, നിലവിലുള്ളതിനെക്കാള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഹീയറാര്\u200dക്കി പുറപ്പെട്ട അടിസ്ഥാനമാണെന്ന്, ഹിയര്\u200d-', 'mn': 'Үүний ихэнх асуудлын мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний судалгаа нь мэдрэмжтэй байдлыг зарим тодорхой асуудлыг тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Текст дээрх үндсэн асуудлыг тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Яг тодорхой болон тодорхой асуудлыг авахын тулд бид асуудлын хэлбэрийн үндсэн мэдрэмжүүдийн шинжилгээнд анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Энэ нь хамтдаа асуудлын хэлбэрийн мэдрэмжүүдийг олох болон хэлбэртэй мэдрэмжүү Гэхдээ одоо зөвхөн хэдэн энгийн судалгаа энэ асуудлыг анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Тэдний ажлыг тодорхойлж байгаа алдаа боломжууд нь хүмүүсийн дотоод хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хо Энэ ажлын хувьд бид үүнийг анхны хэсэгт олон асуудлыг тодорхойлох, дараа нь тодорхойлогдсон хэсэгт мэдрэмжүүдийн тухай мэдрэмжүүдийг дахин хэлбэрээр дахин тодорхойлдог. Ялангуяа, бид Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN) гэж санал болгож байна. Гэхдээ бага түвшинд GCN нь олон категорийн дотоод харилцааны загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын төлөвлөгөө, өндөр түвшинд GCN нь аспектийн категори болон мэдрэмжүүди Өнгөрсөн оюутнууд нь бидний хичээл бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүний илүү өндөр байдаг. Харин Hier-GCN загвар нь үргэлж дөрвөн тооны хамгийн сайн үр дүн гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea cercetărilor de analiză a sentimentului bazate pe aspecte vizează identificarea polarităților sentimentului față de anumiți termeni expliciți, în timp ce ignoră aspectele implicite din text. Pentru a surprinde atât aspecte explicite, cât și implicite, ne concentrăm pe analiza sentimentului bazată pe categorii de aspecte, care implică detectarea comună a categoriilor de aspecte și clasificarea sentimentului orientată pe categorii. Cu toate acestea, în prezent doar câteva studii simple s-au concentrat pe această problemă. Deficiențele în modul în care au definit sarcina fac dificilă abordările lor de a învăța eficient relațiile interioare dintre categorii și inter-relațiile dintre categorii și sentimente. În această lucrare, re-formalizăm sarcina ca o problemă de predicție a ierarhiei categoriilor-sentiment, care conține o structură de ieșire ierarhică pentru a identifica mai întâi mai multe categorii de aspect într-o bucată de text, apoi prezice sentimentul pentru fiecare dintre categoriile identificate. Mai exact, propunem o Rețea Convoluțională Hier-GCN (Hier-GCN), în care un GCN de nivel inferior este de a modela relațiile interioare dintre mai multe categorii, iar GCN de nivel superior este de a capta inter-relațiile dintre categoriile de aspect și sentimentele. Evaluările extinse demonstrează că structura noastră de ieșire ierarhică este superioară față de cele existente, iar modelul Hier-GCN poate obține în mod constant cele mai bune rezultate pe patru criterii de referință.', 'pl': 'Większość badań analizy sentymentów opartych na aspektach ma na celu zidentyfikowanie polaryzacji sentymentów wobec niektórych wyraźnych terminów aspektów, ignorując aspekty domyślne w tekście. Aby uchwycić zarówno aspekty wyraźne, jak i domyślne, skupiamy się na analizie sentymentów opartej na aspektach kategorii, która obejmuje wspólne wykrywanie kategorii aspektów i klasyfikację sentymentów zorientowaną na kategorię. Jednak obecnie tylko kilka prostych badań skupiło się na tym problemie. Braki w sposobie zdefiniowania zadania utrudniają ich podejście do skutecznego poznania wewnętrznych relacji pomiędzy kategoriami oraz relacji między kategoriami i sentymentami. W niniejszej pracy ponownie sformalizujemy zadanie jako problem predykcyjny hierarchii kategorii-sentymentów, który zawiera strukturę wyjściową hierarchii, aby najpierw zidentyfikować wiele kategorii aspektów w fragmencie tekstu, a następnie przewidzieć sentyment dla każdej z zidentyfikowanych kategorii. W szczególności proponujemy hierarchiczną sieć konwolucyjną wykresów (Hier-GCN), gdzie niższy poziom GCN ma modelować relacje wewnętrzne między wieloma kategoriami, a wyższy poziom GCN ma uchwycić relacje między kategoriami aspektów a sentymentami. Obszerne oceny pokazują, że nasza hierarchiczna struktura wyjściowa jest lepsza niż istniejące, a model Hier-GCN może konsekwentnie osiągać najlepsze wyniki na czterech wskaźnikach odniesienia.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka fikrada ee dhanka badan waxaa loola jeedaa in ay aqoonsadaan cadaaladaha aragtida qaarkood oo cad, iyadoo uu ka jeedo dhinaca la xiriira qoraalka. Si aan u qabsado labada dhinac oo cad iyo si cad, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa baaritaanka aragtida oo ku saleysan qeybta, taasoo ku saabsan baaritaanka qeybta wadajirka ah iyo qeybta kaleemeysan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, hadda waxaa cusboonaysiiyey dhibaatadan in yar oo fudud. Qofka gaaban ee loo yaqaan qaababka shaqada ayaa si adag u adag in ay si fiican u barto xiriirka gudaha iyo xiriirka kala dhexeeya kooxo iyo fekerka. In this work, we re-formalize the task as a category-sentiment hierarchy prediction problem, which contains a hierarchy output structure to first identify multiple aspect categories in a piece of text, and then predict the sentiment for each of the identified categories.  Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda ku saabsan Hier-GCN (Hier-GCN), meesha hoose-level GCN waa in uu sameyno xiriirka hoose ee kooxo kala duduwan, oo heerka sare GCN waa in la qabsado xiriirka u dhexeeya kooxo iyo xisaabta. Qiimeynta dheer waxay caddaysaa in dhismaha dibadda ee hierarkii ay ka sarreeyaan kuwa joogta, modelka Hier-GCN wuxuu si joogto ah u heli karaa ugu fiican resultada afarta bangiyada.', 'sr': 'Većina istraživanja analize sentimenta baziranih na aspektu cilja je da identifikuje polaritije sentimenta prema nekim pojasnim uslovima aspekta, dok ignorira implicitne aspekte teksta. Da bi uhvatili objektivne i implicitne aspekte, fokusirali smo se na analizu sentimenta osnovane na kategoriji aspekta, koja uključuje zajedničku detekciju kategorije aspekta i klasifikaciju sentimenta orijentirane na kategoriju. Međutim, trenutno se fokusiralo samo nekoliko jednostavnih studija na ovaj problem. Nedostajenja na način na koji su definisali zadatak čine svojim pristupima teškom da uče unutrašnje odnose između kategorija i međuodnosa između kategorija i osjećaja. U ovom poslu, ponovno formaliziramo zadatak kao problem predviđanja kategorije sentiment a, koja sadrži hijerarhijsku strukturu izlaza da prvo identifikuje kategoriju višestrukih aspekta u tekstu, a zatim predviđamo osjećaj za svaku od identificiranih kategorija. Posebno, predlažemo hijerarhičku konvolucionnu mrežu grafika (Hier-GCN), gdje je GCN na nižem nivou da modelira unutrašnje odnose među višem kategorijama, a GCN na višem nivou je da uhvati međuodnose između kategorija aspekta i osjećanja. Ekstensivne procjene pokazuju da je naša hijerarhijska struktura izvedena nad postojećim, a model Hier-GCN može konstantno ostvariti najbolji rezultat na četiri kriterija.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான உணர்வு ஆய்வு ஆராய்ச்சி உரையில் உள்ள பொருள்களை புறக்கணிக்கும் போது சில வெளிப்படையான பகுதிகளின் உணர்வு தேர்வுகளை  வெளிப்படையான மற்றும் வெளிப்படையான பாகங்களையும் பிடிப்பதற்கு, நாம் விளைவு வகையில் சார்ந்த உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சியின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். அது இண However, currently only a few simple studies have focused on this problem.  இந்த செயலை வரையறுக்கும் வழியில் குறைப்பிட்ட குறைப்புகள் அவர்களுடைய அணுகுகளை வெளிப்படையாக கற்றுக் கொள்ள கடுமையாக்குகிறது வகுப்பு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பணியை வகையான உணர்வு முன்னோட்டம் பிரச்சனையாக மீண்டும் வடிவமைக்கிறோம், அதில் முதலில் ஒரு வெளியீட்டு உரையில் பல பகுதிகளை முதலில் கண்டுபிடிக்க, பின்னர்  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு உயர்நிலையான வரைகலை தொகுப்பு வலைப்பின்னலை (Hier-GCN), அங்கு ஒரு குறைந்த நிலை GCN பல வகுப்புகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள தொடர்புகளை மாதிரிக்க வேண்டும், அதிக நிலை GCN விரிவான மதிப்புகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நான்கு குறிப்புகளில் உள்ள வெளியீட்டு அமைப்பு மேலானதாக இருக்கும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් අභිවෘත විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සැකසුම් ලක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විසිද්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අනුප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නම් අල්ලගන්න, අපි අනුප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක නමුත්, දැන් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි සරල අධ්\u200dයානයක් විතරයි. විදියට එයාලා කාර්යය විශ්වාස කරපු විදියට අඩු වෙලා තියෙන්නේ එයාලගේ අඩු විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න ඇතුළු සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක මේ වැඩේදී, අපි කාර්යය ආපහු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පැත්තක් කො විශේෂයෙන්, අපි හියාර්චිකල් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය ජාලය (හියාර්-GCN), කියලා පහළ ස්ථානයක් GCN තමයි විශේෂ වර්ගයෙන් ඇතුළු සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සමඟ විස්තර අවශ්\u200dයය පෙන්වන්නයි අපේ විස්තර ප්\u200dරවෘතිය ප්\u200dරවෘතිය ප්\u200dරවෘතියේ තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙනවා කියලා, හියර්-GCN මදුල', 'sv': 'De flesta av den aspektbaserade sentimentanalysforskningen syftar till att identifiera sentimentpolariteter mot vissa explicita aspekttermer samtidigt som de ignorerar implicita aspekter i text. För att fånga både explicita och implicita aspekter fokuserar vi på aspektkategoribaserad sentimentalanalys, vilket innebär gemensam aspektkategoriidentifiering och kategoriorienterad sentimentalklassificering. För närvarande har dock bara ett fåtal enkla studier fokuserat på detta problem. Bristerna i hur de definierar uppgiften gör det svårt för dem att effektivt lära sig de inre relationerna mellan kategorier och relationerna mellan kategorier och känslor. I det här arbetet formaliserar vi uppgiften som ett kategori-sentimenthierarki förutsägelseproblem, som innehåller en hierarkisk outputstruktur för att först identifiera flera aspektkategorier i en text, och sedan förutsäga sentiment för var och en av de identifierade kategorierna. Specifikt föreslår vi ett kongolutionellt Hier-GCN-nätverk (Hier-GCN), där ett GCN på lägre nivå ska modellera de inre relationerna mellan flera kategorier, och GCN på högre nivå ska fånga relationerna mellan aspektkategorier och känslor. Omfattande utvärderingar visar att vår hierarkiska outputstruktur är överlägsen jämfört med befintliga, och Hier-GCN-modellen kan konsekvent uppnå bästa resultat på fyra riktmärken.', 'ur': 'اکثر منظور پر بنیاد احساسات تحقیقات کا مطابق ہے کہ احساسات پالوریٹی کو کس طرح واضح منظور کی شرایطوں کی طرف پہچان کرنا چاہتا ہے حالانکہ متن میں مشکل منظور کو غفلت کرتا ہے. ہم صریح اور مثالی الگوں کو پکڑنا چاہتے ہیں، ہم منظور کائٹیوں پر احساسات تحلیل پر تمرکز کریں گے، جس میں joint aspect category detection اور category oriented sentiment classification شامل ہے. لیکن اب صرف تھوڑے ساده تحقیقات اس مسئلہ پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ ان کے کام کی تعریف کے طریقے کی ناکامی ان کے درمیان کائٹیوں اور احساسات کے درمیان بین رابطہ کی تعریف کرنے کے لئے ان کی تقریبیں مشکل ہوتی ہیں. اس کام میں ہم نے اس کام کو ایک کاٹی-sentiment-احساس کی پیش بینی مسئلہ کے طور پر دوبارہ فرمول کیا ہے جس میں پہلی بار ایک کاٹ کے ٹکڑے میں بہت سی منبع کاٹیوں کو پہچان سکتا ہے اور پھر ہر مقررہ کاٹیوں کے لئے احساس کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے. خاص طور پر، ہم ایک حیرارشیک گراف کنویروشن نیٹ ورک (Hier-GCN) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جہاں نیچے سطح GCN بہت سی کاٹیوں کے درمیان داخلی رابطہ کا موڈل کرنا ہے، اور بلند سطح GCN یہ ہے کہ آسپٹ کاٹیوں اور احساسات کے درمیان بین رابطہ کا پکڑنا ہے. اکسٹنسیوں کی ارزش دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ ہماری آئرررشی آئٹ پیٹ ساختار موجود لوگوں پر زیادہ زیادہ ہے، اور Hier-GCN موڈل ہمیشہ چار بنچم مارک کے سب سے بہترین نتائج پہنچ سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Most of the aspect based sentiment analysis research aims at identifying the sentiment polarities toward some explicit aspect terms while ignores implicit aspects in text.  Ko'pchilik va ma'lumotni tasavvur qilish uchun, biz qismning qismlariga asoslangan hisob-aniqlariga foydalanamiz. Bu bir birlashtirilgan kategori qismni aniqlash va kategoriga ega hisoblash mumkin. Lekin hozirda faqat bir necha oddiy o'rganishlar bu muammoga foydalanadi. Vazifani aniqlashga muvaffaqiyatlar ularning murakkablarini foydalanish juda qiyin qiladi, guruhlar va hissiyotlar orasidagi munosabatlarning ichki munosabatlarini o'rganish mumkin. Bu ishda vazifani qayta formatlash uchun kategori-sentiment hierarchiya hisoblash muammosi deb hisoblashimiz mumkin. Bu muammolada, bu yerda birinchi qismlarni matn qismida bir necha qismlarni aniqlash mumkin, va keyin uning har bir qismlarda hisobni koʻrsatish. Ko'rsatilgan, biz Hier-GCN (Hier-GCN) bilan bir nechta guruhning ichi munosabatlarini modellash uchun eng yuqori grafik hisoblanuvchi tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz, va eng darajada GCN murojaat turlari va hissiyotlar orasidagi aloqalarni qabul qilish uchun. Koʻproq qiymatlar hozirga chiqarish tuzuvlarimiz mavjud bo'lgan narsalardan yuqori, va Hier-GCN modeli to'rtta parametrlarda eng yaxshi natijalarini topishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phần lớn các nghiên cứu phân tích ủy mị dựa trên các khía cạnh nhằm xác định các quan điểm lệch lạc về các thuật ngữ rõ ràng, trong khi bỏ qua khía cạnh ngầm trong văn bản. Để ghi lại các khía cạnh rõ ràng và ngầm, chúng tôi tập trung vào các phân tích cảm xúc về các khía cạnh, gồm việc khám phá các khía cạnh chung và phân loại cảm xúc. Hiện tại chỉ có vài nghiên cứu đơn giản về vấn đề này. Sự thiếu sót trong cách họ xác định nhiệm vụ khiến cách tiếp cận của họ trở nên khó khăn để hiểu được mối quan hệ nội bộ giữa các phân loại và tình cảm. Trong công việc này, chúng ta tái thiết hoá nhiệm vụ như một vấn đề dự đoán phân cấp tính phân cấp phân loại, chứa một cấu trúc xuất cấp bậc bậc bậc, để đầu tiên xác định các phân loại hình thể đa dạng trong một phần văn bản, và sau đó dự đoán cảm nghĩ về mỗi phân loại đã xác định. Cụ thể, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới hình đồ hộ tâm lý Hieratical (Hier-GCN), nơi một GCN cấp thấp sẽ mô tả các quan hệ nội bộ giữa nhiều phân loại, và GCN cấp cao sẽ thu thập các mối liên hệ giữa các phân loại hình thể và tình cảm. Bản đánh giá bao quát cho thấy cấu trúc xuất cấp bậc của chúng ta vượt trội hơn cấu trúc hiện tại, và kiểu Hier-GCN luôn có thể đạt được kết quả tốt nhất trên bốn điểm hẹn.', 'bg': 'Повечето от изследванията за анализ на сентимента, базирани на аспекти, имат за цел да идентифицират сентименталните полярности към някои изрични аспектни термини, като същевременно игнорират имплицитните аспекти в текста. За да уловим както изричните, така и имплицитните аспекти, ние се фокусираме върху анализ на сентимента въз основа на аспектите, който включва съвместно откриване на категории аспекти и класификация на сентимента, ориентирана към категориите. Понастоящем обаче само няколко прости проучвания са фокусирани върху този проблем. Недостатъците в начина, по който те определят задачата, затрудняват подходите им ефективно да научат вътрешните отношения между категориите и взаимоотношенията между категориите и чувствата. В тази работа ние преформализираме задачата като задача за прогнозиране на йерархията категории-сантименти, която съдържа йерархична изходна структура, за да идентифицира първо няколко аспектни категории в парче текст и след това да предскаже сантимента за всяка от идентифицираните категории. По-конкретно, ние предлагаме Йерархична Графична Конволюционна Мрежа (ЙЕР-ГН), където по-ниско ниво ГН е да моделира вътрешните отношения между множество категории, а по-високо ниво ГН е да улавя взаимоотношенията между аспектните категории и сентименти. Обширните оценки показват, че нашата йерархична изходна структура е по-добра от съществуващите, а моделът може последователно да постигне най-добри резултати по четири показатели.', 'da': 'De fleste af den aspektbaserede sentiment analyse forskning sigter mod at identificere sentiment polariteter mod nogle eksplicitte aspekt termer, mens de ignorerer implicitte aspekter i tekst. For at fange både eksplicitte og implicitte aspekter fokuserer vi på aspektkategoribaseret sentimentalanalyse, som involverer fælles aspektkategoridetektion og kategoriorienteret sentimentalklassificering. Men i øjeblikket har kun nogle få enkle undersøgelser fokuseret på dette problem. Manglerne i den måde, hvorpå de definerede opgaven på, gør deres tilgange vanskelige at lære effektivt de indre relationer mellem kategorier og de indbyrdes forhold mellem kategorier og følelser. I dette arbejde genformaliserer vi opgaven som et kategori-sentiment hierarki forudsigelsesproblem, som indeholder en hierarkisk outputstruktur til først at identificere flere aspektkategorier i et stykke tekst, og derefter forudsige sentiment for hver af de identificerede kategorier. Specielt foreslår vi et Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN), hvor et GCN på lavere niveau skal modellere de indre relationer mellem flere kategorier, og det højere niveau GCN er at fange de indbyrdes relationer mellem aspektkategorier og følelser. Omfattende evalueringer viser, at vores hierarkiske output struktur er overlegen i forhold til eksisterende, og Hier-GCN modellen konsekvent kan opnå de bedste resultater på fire benchmarks.', 'nl': 'Het grootste deel van het aspect based sentiment analysis onderzoek is gericht op het identificeren van de sentimentpolariteiten ten opzichte van sommige expliciete aspect termen, terwijl impliciete aspecten in tekst worden genegeerd. Om zowel expliciete als impliciete aspecten vast te leggen, richten we ons op aspect-category based sentiment analyse, die gezamenlijke aspect category detectie en category georiënteerde sentiment classificatie omvat. Momenteel zijn echter slechts enkele eenvoudige studies gericht op dit probleem. De tekortkomingen in de manier waarop zij de taak definiëren, maken hun benaderingen moeilijk om effectief de innerlijke relaties tussen categorieën en de onderlinge relaties tussen categorieën en sentimenten te leren. In dit werk herformuleren we de taak als een categorie-sentiment hiërarchie voorspellingsprobleem, dat een hiërarchie uitvoerstructuur bevat om eerst meerdere aspect categorieën in een stuk tekst te identificeren en vervolgens het sentiment voor elk van de geïdentificeerde categorieën te voorspellen. Specifiek stellen we een Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN) voor, waarbij een lagere GCN is om de innerlijke relaties tussen meerdere categorieën te modelleren, en de hogere GCN is om de onderlinge relaties tussen aspect categorieën en sentimenten vast te leggen. Uitgebreide evaluaties tonen aan dat onze hiërarchieoutputstructuur superieur is ten opzichte van bestaande, en dat het Hier-GCN-model consistent de beste resultaten kan behalen op vier benchmarks.', 'hr': 'Većina istraživanja analize osjećaja temeljenih na aspektu cilja je identificirati polaritije osjećaja prema nekim pojasnim uvjetima aspekta, dok ne ignorira implicitne aspekte teksta. Da bi uhvatili objektivne i implicitne aspekte, usredotočili smo se na analizu osjećaja na kategoriji aspekta, koja uključuje zajedničku detekciju kategorije aspekta i klasifikaciju osjećaja na kategoriju. Međutim, trenutno se fokusiralo samo nekoliko jednostavnih ispitivanja na ovaj problem. Nedostajenja na način na koji su definirali zadatak čine svojim pristupima teškom učiti učinkovito unutrašnje odnose između kategorija i međuodnosa između kategorija i osjećaja. U ovom poslu, ponovno formaliziramo zadatak kao problem predviđanja kategorijskih osjećaja, koji sadrži hijerarhijsku strukturu izlaza kako bi prvo identificirali kategorije višestrukih aspekta u tekstu, a zatim predviđali osjećaj za svaku od identificiranih kategorija. Posebno, predlažemo hijerarsku konvolucionnu mrežu grafika (Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN), gdje je niži nivo GCN da modelira unutrašnje odnose među višem kategorijama, a viši nivo GCN je da uhvati međuodnose između kategorija aspekta i osjećaja. Proširene procjene pokazuju da je naša struktura proizlaza hijerarhije nad postojećim, a model Hier-GCN može konsekventno postići najbolji rezultat na četiri kriterija.', 'de': 'Die meisten aspektbasierten Sentiment-Analysen zielen darauf ab, die Sentiment-Polaritäten gegenüber einigen expliziten Aspektbegriffen zu identifizieren, während implizite Aspekte im Text ignoriert werden. Um sowohl explizite als auch implizite Aspekte zu erfassen, konzentrieren wir uns auf aspekt-category-basierte Sentiment-Analyse, die gemeinsame Erkennung von Aspekten und kategorieorientierte Sentiment-Klassifizierung umfasst. Derzeit haben sich jedoch nur wenige einfache Studien auf dieses Problem konzentriert. Die Defizite in der Art und Weise, wie sie die Aufgabe definiert haben, erschweren ihre Ansätze, die inneren Beziehungen zwischen Kategorien und Gefühlen effektiv zu erlernen. In dieser Arbeit formalisieren wir die Aufgabe als Vorhersageproblem der Kategorie-Sentiment-Hierarchie, das eine Hierarchie-Ausgabestruktur enthält, um zuerst mehrere Aspektkategorien in einem Textstück zu identifizieren und dann die Stimmung für jede der identifizierten Kategorien vorherzusagen. Insbesondere schlagen wir ein Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN) vor, in dem ein niederer GCN die inneren Beziehungen zwischen mehreren Kategorien modelliert und der übergeordnete GCN die Wechselbeziehungen zwischen Aspektkategorien und Sentiments erfasst. Umfangreiche Auswertungen zeigen, dass unsere Hierarchie-Output-Struktur gegenüber bestehenden überlegen ist und das Hier-GCN-Modell konsistent die besten Ergebnisse auf vier Benchmarks erzielen kann.', 'id': 'Sebagian besar penelitian analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek bermaksud untuk mengidentifikasi polaritas sentimen menuju beberapa istilah aspek eksplicit sementara mengabaikan aspek implicit dalam teks. Untuk menangkap aspek eksplicit dan implicit, kami fokus pada analisis sentimen berbasis kategori aspek, yang melibatkan deteksi kategori aspek kongsi dan klasifikasi sentimen berbasis kategori. Namun, saat ini hanya beberapa studi sederhana telah fokus pada masalah ini. The shortcomings in the way they defined the task make their approaches difficult to effectively learn the inner-relations between categories and the inter-relations between categories and sentiments.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita formalisasi ulang tugas sebagai masalah prediksi hierarki sentimen kategori, yang mengandung struktur output hierarki untuk pertama-tama mengidentifikasi kategori aspek berbilang dalam sepotong teks, dan kemudian prediksi sentimen untuk setiap kategori yang dikenal. Secara spesifik, kami mengusulkan jaringan konvolusi Graf Hierarkis (Hier-GCN), di mana GCN tingkat rendah adalah untuk model hubungan dalam antara banyak kategori, dan GCN tingkat tinggi adalah untuk menangkap hubungan antara kategori aspek dan sentimen. Evaluasi ekstensif menunjukkan bahwa struktur output hierarki kita lebih baik dari struktur yang ada, dan model Hier-GCN secara konsisten dapat mencapai hasil terbaik pada empat benchmark.', 'ko': '대부분의 측면을 바탕으로 하는 감정 분석 연구는 텍스트 중의 일부 현저한 측면의 감정의 극성을 식별하는 데 목적을 두고 텍스트 중의 은밀한 측면을 소홀히 한다.현성과 은성을 포획하기 위해 우리는 분야별 정서 분석을 바탕으로 연합방면별 검측과 분야별 정서 분류를 포함한 분야별 정서 분석을 중점적으로 연구했다.그러나 현재 단지 소수의 간단한 연구만이 이 문제에 집중되어 있다.그들이 임무를 정의하는 방식에 결함이 존재하기 때문에 그들의 방법은 유형 간의 내재 관계와 유형과 정서 간의 상호 관계를 효과적으로 이해하기 어렵다.이 작업에서 우리는 임무를 하나의 유형의 감정 차원 예측 문제로 다시 형식화할 것이다. 이 문제는 하나의 차원 출력 구조를 포함하고 먼저 텍스트 중의 여러 방면의 유형을 식별한 다음에 각 식별된 유형의 감정을 예측한다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 차원 그래프 볼륨 네트워크(Hier-GCN)를 제기했다. 그 중에서 낮은 등급의 GCN은 여러 가지 유형 간의 내부 관계를 모델링하는 데 사용되고 높은 등급의 GCN은 측면 유형과 정서 간의 상호 관계를 포획하는 데 사용된다.광범위한 평가에 의하면 우리의 등급 수출 구조는 기존의 것보다 우수하고 Hier GCN 모델은 네 가지 기준에서 시종일관 최상의 결과를 실현할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'اکثر تحقیقات تحقیقات احساسات بر اساس مرحله\u200cها هدف می\u200cگیرد که قطعات احساسات را به سمت بعضی شرایط منظره\u200cای مشخص شناسایی کند، در حالی که نقطه\u200cهای منظره\u200cای در متن را نادیده بگیرد. برای capture both aspects explicitly and implicitly, we focus on aspect-based sentiment analysis, which involves joint aspect detection and category-oriented sentiment classification. ولی در حال حاضر فقط چند مطالعه ساده روی این مشکل تمرکز شده است. فایده\u200cهایی که این وظیفه را تعریف می\u200cکردند، نزدیک\u200cهایشان را سخت می\u200cسازند تا موثرت رابطه\u200cهای داخلی بین برخه\u200cها و رابطه\u200cهای بین برخه\u200cها و احساسات را یاد بگیرند. در این کار، ما این کار را به عنوان یک مشکل پیش\u200cبینی از احساسات\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cای از مجموعه\u200cهای مجموعه دوباره رسمی\u200cسازیم، که یک ساختار نتیجه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cای برای اول شناسایی مجموعه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cای در یک قسمت متن وجود دارد، و بعد احساسات را برای هر قسمت شناسایی مخصوصاً ما یک شبکه متعادلانه گراف طبیعی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک سطح پایین GCN برای مدل رابطه\u200cهای داخلی بین گونه\u200cهای متعدد است، و سطح بالاتر GCN برای گرفتن رابطه\u200cهای بین گونه\u200cها و احساسات است. ارزیابی گسترده\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که ساختار خروجی دایره\u200cهای ما بیشتر از موجودات موجود است، و مدل دائمی-GCN می\u200cتواند بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای چهار برچسب را به دست آورد.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa hisia unaoanzishwa zaidi unalenga kutambua hisia za uchaguzi kwa baadhi ya vipengele vya wazi wakati hupuuza vipengele vya maandishi. Ili kukamata vipengele vya wazi na vinginevyo vibaya, tunajikita kwenye uchambuzi wa hisia uliofanywa, ambao unahusisha kutambua vipengele vya pamoja na kutangazwa kwa hisia zilizoko kwenye makundi. Hata hivyo, kwa sasa tafiti chache rahisi zimeendelea lengo la tatizo hili. Mapungua ya namna walivyoelezea kazi hiyo yanafanya mbinu zao vigumu kujifunza kwa ufanisi mkubwa wa mahusiano ya ndani kati ya makundi na uhusiano baina ya makundi na hisia. Katika kazi hii, tunatengeneza juhudi kama tatizo la kutabiri kwa hisia za kigaidi, ambalo lina muundo wa utoaji wa hierarchy ili kwanza kutambua makundi kadhaa katika kipande cha maandishi, na kisha kutabiri hisia kwa kila kundi lililotambuliwa. Kwa hakika, tunapendekeza Mtandao wa Kujitoleza Graph ya Hier-GCN (Hier-GCN), ambapo kiwango cha chini cha GCN ni kuonyesha mahusiano ya ndani kati ya makundi kadhaa, na kiwango kikubwa cha GCN ni kukamata mahusiano baina ya makundi na hisia. Tathmini za ziada zinaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu wa uzalishaji wa ubunifu ni bora kuliko zile zilizopo, na mtindo wa Hier-GCN unaweza kufanikisha matokeo bora zaidi kwenye bendera nne.', 'tr': 'Görnüş tabanly duýgular analýşiniň köpüsi duýgular polaritetlerini metin içindeki nähili aspektler garaşyp tanyşmaga maksady edýär. Açık we netijeli aspektleri çekmek üçin, aspekt kategoriýasynda duýgular analiziýasyna üns berýäris, bu ikisi aspekt kategoriýasyny tanyşdyrmak we kategoriýasynda görkezilen duýgular klasifikasyyna mejbur. Yöne şu wagt diňe birnäçe basit öwrenmeler bu meselä üns berdi. Bu zadyň tanyşdyrýan ýaly azatlary kategoriýalar we duýgular arasyndaky iç düşmeleriň derejesini öwrenmek üçin kynlaşdyrýar. Bu işde, bu zady kategoriýa-duýgular iýerarhiýasynyň öňünden geçirmek meselesi hökmünde, bu ýerde bir iýerarhiýa çykyş strukturuny ilkinji gezek metin böleginde birnäçe aspekt kategoriýany tanamak üçin tanyşdyrylýar, we soňra tanyş kategoriýalaryň her biri üçin duýgularyny öňden geç Adatça, biz Hierarhiýal Grafik Birleşik Jawany (Hier-GCN), iň a şak derejesi GCN birnäçe kategoriýalaryň arasyndaky daşarky baglaýyşlaryny düzenlemek üçin teklip edýäris we iň yüksek derejesi GCN aspekt kategoriýasy we duýgular arasyndaky baglaýyşlaryny taýýarlamak üçin bar. Ýerinarhiýa çykyşlarymyz bar we ýerleşýän çykyş strukturymyzyň üstünde ýokary we Ýer-GCN modeli dört sany çykyşlaryň iň gowy netijesini ýetip biler.', 'sq': 'Shumica e analizave të ndjenjave të bazuara në aspekte kërkimi synon të identifikojë polaritetet e ndjenjave drejt disa termave të qarta aspekti ndërsa injoron aspektet implicite në tekst. To capture both explicit and implicit aspects, we focus on aspect-category based sentiment analysis, which involves joint aspect category detection and category-oriented sentiment classification.  Megjithatë, aktualisht vetëm disa studime të thjeshta janë përqëndruar në këtë problem. Mungesat në mënyrën se si ata e përcaktuan detyrën e bëjnë qasjet e tyre të vështira për të mësuar efektivisht marrëdhëniet e brendshme midis kategorive dhe marrëdhënieve ndërmjet kategorive dhe ndjenjave. Në këtë punë, ne riformalizojmë detyrën si një problem parashikimi të hierarkisë së ndjenjave të kategorisë, i cili përmban një strukturë të daljes së hierarkisë për të identifikuar së pari kategoritë e aspekteve të shumta në një pjesë teksti, dhe pastaj parashikojmë ndjenjat për secilën nga kategoritë e identifikuara. Veçanërisht, ne propozojmë një rrjet konvolutiv grafik hierarkik (Hier-GCN), ku një nivel më i ulët GCN është për të modeluar marrëdhëniet e brendshme midis kategorive të shumta dhe niveli më i lartë GCN është për të kapur marrëdhëniet midis kategorive aspektore dhe ndjenjave. Vlerësimet e zgjeruara tregojnë se struktura jonë e daljes hierarkike është më e lartë se ato ekzistuese dhe modeli Hier-GCN mund të arrijë vazhdimisht rezultatet më të mira në katër pika referimi.', 'af': "Die meeste van die aspekt gebaseerde sentimentanaliseerde ondersoek doel om die sentimente polarisiteit te identifiseer na sommige eksplisiese aspekte terme terwyl geignoreer inplisite aspekte in teks. Om eksklusiete en implisiete aspekte te vang, fokus ons op aspektkategorie gebaseerde sentimentanalisie, wat insluit joint aspektkategorie-opdekking en kategorie-orienteerde sentimente-klasifikasie. Maar huidiglik het net 'n paar eenvoudige studie op hierdie probleem fokuseer. Die kortpad op die manier wat hulle die taak gedefinieer het, maak hulle toegang moeilik om die binneste verwante tussen kategorie en die inter-verwante tussen kategorie en sentimente te leer. In hierdie werk, ons reeformeer die taak as 'n kategorie-sentiment hierarkie voorskou probleem, wat bevat 'n hierarkie uitvoer struktuur om eerste veelvuldige aspektkategorie in 'n stuk teks te identifiseer, en dan voorskou die sentiment vir elke van die identifiseerde kategorie. Spesifieke, ons voorstel 'n Hierariese Graaf Konvolusionele Netwerk (Hier-GCN), waar 'n laer vlak GCN is om die binneste verwantings onder veelvuldige kategorie te model, en die hoër vlak GCN is om die interrelasies tussen aspektkategorie en sentimente te vang. Ekstensiewe evaluasies wys dat ons hierarkie uitset struktuur superior is oor bestaande, en die Hier-GCN model kan konsistentlik die beste resultate op vier benchmarke bereik.", 'hy': 'Սպեկտի վերլուծության հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունների մեծ մասը նպատակն է նշել զգացմունքների կողմնականությունը որոշ բացատրական ասպեկտի տերմինների նկատմամբ, չնայած տեքստի ենթադրական ասպեկտներին: Որպեսզի ընդունենք բացատրական և ենթարկված ասպեկտները, մենք կենտրոնանում ենք ասպեկտեգորիայի հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության վրա, որը ներառում է ընդհանուր ասպեկտեգորիայի հայտնաբերման և կատեգորիայի հիմն Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայումս միայն մի քանի պարզ ուսումնասիրություններ կենտրոնացել են այս խնդիրը: Նրանց առաջադրանքի սահմանման թերությունները դժվարանում են նրանց մոտեցումները արդյունավետ սովորելու կատեգորիաների և կատեգորիաների և զգացմունքների միջև ներքին հարաբերությունները: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք վերաձևավորում ենք խնդիրը որպես կատեգորիայի-զգացմունքների հիերարխիայի կանխատեսման խնդիր, որը պարունակում է հիերարխիայի արտադրման կառուցվածք, որպեսզի առաջին անգամ բազմաթիվ ասպեկտների բազմաթիվ կատեգորիաներ հայտն Հատկապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք Հիերարքիկական Գրաֆի հակադրական ցանց, որտեղ ավելի ցածր մակարդակի ԳԳՆ-ն է մոդելավորելու բազմաթիվ կատեգորիաների ներքին հարաբերությունները, իսկ ավելի բարձր մակարդակի ԳԳՆ-ը կազմակերպությունների և զգացմունքների միջև փոխհարաբերությունները: Մեծացող գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր հիերարխիայի արտադրման կառուցվածքը գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող կառուցվածքների նկատմամբ, և Հիերգ-ԳՆԹ մոդելը կարող է համընդհատ հասնել լավագույն արդյունք', 'az': 'Aspectl…ôrin …ôks…ôriyy…ôti hissl…ôr analizi araŇütńĪrmalarńĪnńĪn m…ôlumatda hissl…ôrin polaritisini b…ôzi a√ßńĪq aspekt ŇüartlarńĪna t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôsini ist…ôyir. ńįkisi a√ßńĪq v…ô imkanlńĪ aspektl…ôri tutmaq √ľ√ß√ľn, aspekt kategoriyasńĪndakńĪ hissl…ôr analizi √ľz…ôrind…ô odaqlanńĪrńĪq, bu da birlikd…ô aspekt kategoriyasńĪnńĪ tanńĪyńĪr v…ô kategoriyasńĪndakńĪ hissl…ôr klasifikasyonu i√ß…ôridir. Ancaq bu problem …ô √ßox asanlńĪq t…ôhsil etdi. OnlarńĪn bu iŇüi bel…ô tanńĪmadńĪqlarńĪ z…ôifl…ôr, kategoriyalar v…ô hissl…ôr arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪlar arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪlarńĪ √ßox √ß…ôtin √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn onlarńĪn yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪnńĪ √ß…ôtin ed…ôr. Bu iŇüd…ô, biz bu iŇüi kategoriya-sentiment hiyerarhiya t…ôdbir problemi kimi yenid…ôn formaliz…ô edirik. Bu, bir m…ôtn par√ßas ńĪnda √ßoxlu aspekt kategoriyalarńĪnńĪ ilk d…ôf…ô tanńĪtmaq √ľ√ß√ľn hiyerarhiya √ßńĪxńĪŇü strukturudur, sonra da tanńĪdńĪqlarńĪ kategoriyalarńĪn h…ôr birin…ô hiss…ôsini t…ôsbir edirik. √Ėzellikle, biz Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN) t…ôklif edirik, ki, a ŇüańüńĪ s…ôviyy…ôd…ô GCN √ßoxlu kategoriya arasńĪndakńĪ i√ß iliŇükileri modell…ôŇüdirm…ôkdir, v…ô y√ľks…ôk s…ôviyy…ôd…ô GCN-nin aspekt kategoriyalarńĪ v…ô hissl…ôr arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükileri almaq. ∆Źlav…ô deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôr hiyerarŇüimizin √ßńĪxńĪŇü strukturumuz mevcut olanlardan √ľst√ľn olduńüunu g√∂st…ôrir v…ô Hier-GCN modeli d√∂rd benchmarkl…ôrin …ôn yaxŇüńĪ sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ s√ľr…ôkl…ô baŇüa √ßata bil…ôr.', 'am': 'በተመሳሳይ የስሜት ትምህርት ትምህርት መምረጫዎች በጽሑፉ ውስጥ ጥሩ ጉዳዮችን ሲሳወቅ የሚታወቅ የአሳማሚ ምርጫዎችን ለማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ግልጽን እና ውጤቶችን ለመያዝ፣ በክፍለ ክፍለ ክፍል ላይ የተመሳሳይ አስተያየት እና የክፍለ ክፍለ ክፍል ማሳየትን እና የክፍለ አካባቢ ክፍል መፍጠርን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ነገር ግን አሁን ጥቂት ቀላል ትምህርት ብቻ የዚህን ጉዳይ ላይ ተማክረዋል፡፡ ሥርዓቱን በሚያረጋግጡበት መንገድ ግንኙነታቸውን በክፍል እና በክፍሎች መካከል መካከል የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በማስተማር አካባቢ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ስራውን እንደ ክፍተት-አዳራሲ መፍጠር መሆኑን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ ጉዳዩ የኤራርክሲ ውጤት አካባቢ አካባቢ ክፍል በመጀመሪያ በጽሑፍ ክፍል እና በሁሉም ለተታወቁት ክፍሎች የሚታወቅ እውቀት ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ የHier-GCN (Hier-GCN) የውይይት ግንኙነት በብዛት ክፍሎች መካከል ማሳመር እና ከፍተኛ ደረጃው GCN በክፍለ ክፍሎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመያዝ ነው፡፡ የስፋት ምርጫዎች የሀይራርክ ውጤት ግንኙነታችን ከዚህ በላይ እንዲሻል እና የሀይር-GCN ሞዴል በአራቱ benchmark ላይ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያገኝ ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'বেশীর ভিত্তিক অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের গবেষণার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে যে কিছু প্রকাশ্য দিকের দিকে আবেগের নির্বাচন চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে এবং লেখায় প্ দুটো বিষয়গুলোকে গ্রেফতার করার জন্য আমরা প্রাক্তন বিভাগের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি বিশ্লেষণের উপর, যার মধ্যে যৌথ অংশের বিভাগের গ্রেফতার এবং শ্রেণীবিভাগের অন তবে বর্তমানে কিছু সাধারণ গবেষণা এই সমস্যার উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। তারা কাজের সংক্রান্ত ক্ষেত্রে তাদের কাছে আসতে কঠিন করে কার্যকর করে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন গ্রাহক এবং অনুভূতির মধ্যে যে সম্পর্কে এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা এই কাজটিকে পুনরায় বিন্যাস করি একটি শ্রেণীবিভাগ-অনুভূতি প্রত্যেকটি বিভাগের প্রত্যেকটি বিভাগের অনুভূতি হিয়ারার্কি আউটপুট কাঠামো হিসেবে, যার মধ্যে প্রথম বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি হিয়ারার্কিয়াল গ্রাফ কনভোলিয়েশন নেটওয়ার্ক (হিয়ার-জিসিনি) প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে একটি নীচের স্তরে জিসিনি বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভাগের মধ্যে আভ্যন্তরীণ সম্পর্ক মড বিস্তারিত মূল্য দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের হিয়ারার্কি আউটপুট কাঠামো বিদ্যমান বিষয়গুলোর চেয়ে বেশী ভালো আর হিয়ার-জিসিন মডেল চারটি বেনমা', 'bs': 'Većina istraživanja analize sentimenta baziranih na aspektu je cilj identifikacije polaritija sentimenta prema nekim pojasnim uvjetima aspekta dok ignorira implicitne aspekte teksta. Da bi uhvatili objektivne i implicitne aspekte, usredotočili smo se na analizu osjećanja osnovane na kategoriji aspekta, koja uključuje zajedničku detekciju kategorije aspekta i klasifikaciju osjećanja usmjerenih na kategoriju. Međutim, trenutno se fokusiralo samo nekoliko jednostavnih ispitivanja na ovaj problem. Nedostajenja na način na koji su definirali zadatak čine svojim pristupima teškom učiti unutrašnje odnose između kategorija i međuodnosa između kategorija i osjećaja. U ovom poslu, ponovno formaliziramo zadatak kao problem predviđanja hierarhije kategorije sentiment a, koja sadrži strukturu izvade hierarhije da prvo identificira kategorije višestrukih aspekta u tekstu, a zatim predviđamo osjećaj za svaku od identificiranih kategorija. Posebno, predlažemo hijeraršku konvolucionnu mrežu grafika (Hier-GCN), gdje je GCN na nižem nivou da modelira unutrašnje odnose među višem kategorijama, a GCN na višem nivou je da uhvati međuodnose između kategorija aspekta i osjećanja. Provećajne procjene pokazuju da je naša struktura proizlaza hijerarhije nad postojećim, a model Hier-GCN može konsekventno postići najbolji rezultat na četiri kriterija.', 'cs': 'Většina aspektové analýzy sentimentů se zaměřuje na identifikaci polarity sentimentů vůči některým explicitním aspektovým termínům, zatímco ignoruje implicitní aspekty v textu. Pro zachycení explicitních i implicitních aspektů se zaměřujeme na analýzu sentimentů založenou na aspektech kategorií, která zahrnuje společnou detekci kategorií aspektů a klasifikaci sentimentů orientovaných na kategorie. V současné době se však na tento problém zaměřuje pouze několik jednoduchých studií. Nedostatky ve způsobu definování úkolu ztěžují jejich přístupy efektivně poznat vnitřní vztahy mezi kategoriemi a vzájemné vztahy mezi kategoriemi a sentimenty. V této práci přeformalizujeme úlohu jako problém predikce hierarchie kategorií-sentimentů, který obsahuje hierarchickou výstupní strukturu, která nejprve identifikuje více kategorií aspektů v textu a poté předpovídá sentiment pro každou z identifikovaných kategorií. Konkrétně navrhujeme hierarchickou grafovou konveluční síť (Hier-GCN), kde nižší GCN má modelovat vnitřní vztahy mezi více kategorií a GCN vyšší úrovně je zachytit vzájemné vztahy mezi aspektovými kategoriemi a sentimenty. Rozsáhlá hodnocení ukazují, že naše hierarchická výstupní struktura je lepší než stávající a Hier-GCN model může důsledně dosáhnout nejlepších výsledků na čtyřech benchmarkech.', 'et': 'Enamik aspektipõhistest sentimentaalüüsi uuringutest on suunatud sentimentaalsete polariteetide tuvastamisele mõnede selgete aspektiterminite suhtes, ignoreerides samas tekstis kaudseid aspekte. Nii otsesete kui ka kaudsete aspektide hõlmamiseks keskendume aspektikategooriapõhisele sentimentaalüüsile, mis hõlmab ühist aspektikategooriate tuvastamist ja kategooriapõhist sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni. Kuid praegu on sellele probleemile keskendunud vaid mõned lihtsad uuringud. Puudused ülesande määratlemisel raskendavad nende lähenemisviise tõhusalt õppida kategooriate sisesuhteid ning kategooriate ja tunnete vastastikuseid suhteid. Selles töös vormistame ülesande uuesti kategooria-sentimentide hierarhia prognoosimise probleemina, mis sisaldab hierarhia väljundstruktuuri, et esmalt tuvastada tekstitükis mitu aspektikategooriat ja seejärel ennustada sentimenti iga tuvastatud kategooria kohta. Konkreetselt pakume välja hierarhilise graafika konvolutsioonivõrgustiku (Hier-GCN), kus madalama taseme GCN on modelleerida sisemiseid suhteid mitme kategooria vahel ja kõrgema taseme GCN on jäädvustada omavahelised suhted aspektikategooriate ja tunnetuste vahel. Põhjalikud hinnangud näitavad, et meie hierarhia väljundstruktuur on olemasolevatest parem ja Hier-GCN mudel suudab järjepidevalt saavutada parimaid tulemusi nelja võrdlusaluse puhul.', 'fi': 'Suurin osa aspektipohjaisesta tunteiden analyysitutkimuksesta pyrkii tunnistamaan tunteiden polariteetit tiettyihin eksplisiittisiin aspektitermeihin nähden jättäen huomiotta tekstin implisiittiset näkökohdat. Sekä eksplisiittisten että implisiittisten näkökulmien kuvaamiseksi keskitymme aspektikategorioihin perustuvaan tunteiden analysointiin, johon kuuluu yhteinen aspektikategorioiden tunnistus ja kategorialähtöinen tunteiden luokittelu. Tällä hetkellä tähän ongelmaan on kuitenkin keskittynyt vain muutamassa yksinkertaisessa tutkimuksessa. Tehtävän määrittelyn puutteet vaikeuttavat lähestymistapojen tehokasta oppimista luokkien välisissä sisäisissä suhteissa sekä luokkien ja tunteiden välisissä suhteissa. Tässä työssä formalisoimme tehtävän uudelleen kategoria-tunteiden hierarkian ennustusongelmaksi, joka sisältää hierarkian tulosrakenteen, jonka avulla voidaan ensin tunnistaa useita aspektiluokkia tekstissä ja sitten ennustaa tunteita jokaiselle tunnistetulle luokalle. Ehdotamme erityisesti Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN), jossa alemman tason GCN mallintaa useiden luokkien välisiä sisäisiä suhteita ja ylemmän tason GCN:ää kuvaamaan aspektiluokkien ja tunteiden välisiä suhteita. Laajat arvioinnit osoittavat, että hierarkian tuotosrakenteemme on parempi kuin olemassa olevat, ja Hier-GCN-malli voi johdonmukaisesti saavuttaa parhaat tulokset neljällä vertailuarvolla.', 'ca': "La majoria de l'anàlisi sentimental basada en aspectes mira a identificar les polaritats sentimentals cap a alguns termes explícits mentre ignora aspectes implícits en el text. To capture both explicit and implicit aspects, we focus on aspect-category based sentiment analysis, which involves joint aspect category detection and category-oriented sentiment classification.  However, currently only a few simple studies have focused on this problem.  Les deficiències de la manera en què van definir la tasca dificulten els seus enfocaments d'aprendre efectivament les relacions interiors entre categories i les interrelacions entre categories i sentiments. En aquesta feina, reeformalitzem la tasca com un problem a de predicció de la jerarquia de sentiments de categoria, que conté una estructura de sortida de jerarquia per identificar primer múltiples categories d'aspecte en un tros de text, i després predir el sentiment per cada una de les categories identificades. Concretament, proposem una xarxa de conversió del gràfic hieràrquic (Hier-GCN), on un GCN de nivell inferior és modelar les relacions interiors entre múltiples categories, i el GCN de nivell superior és capturar les interrelacions entre les categories d'aspecte i els sentiments. Evaluacions extenses demostren que la nostra estructura de producció de jerarquia és superior a la existent, i el model Hier-GCN pot aconseguir consistentment els millors resultats en quatre punts de referència.", 'sk': 'Večina raziskav analize sentimenta, ki temelji na vidikih, je namenjena prepoznavanju sentimentalnih polarnosti do nekaterih eksplicitnih vidikov, pri čemer ignorira implicitne vidike v besedilu. Za zajem eksplicitnih in implicitnih vidikov se osredotočamo na analizo sentimenta na podlagi kategorij vidikov, ki vključuje skupno odkrivanje kategorij vidikov in kategorijsko usmerjeno klasifikacijo sentimenta. Vendar pa je trenutno le nekaj preprostih študij osredotočenih na to težavo. Zaradi pomanjkljivosti v načinu opredelitve naloge njihovi pristopi otežujejo učinkovito učenje notranjih odnosov med kategorijami in medsebojnih odnosov med kategorijami in čustvi. V tem delu ponovno formaliziramo opravilo kot problem napovedovanja hierarhije kategorij-sentimentov, ki vsebuje hierarhijsko izhodno strukturo za najprej identificiranje več kategorij vidikov v delu besedila, nato pa napovedujemo sentiment za vsako od identificiranih kategorij. Natančneje predlagamo hierarhično grafično konvolucijsko omrežje (Hier-GCN), kjer naj bi nižja raven GCN modelirala notranje odnose med več kategorijami, višja raven GCN pa zajemala medsebojne odnose med kategorijami vidikov in občutki. Obsežne ocene kažejo, da je naša hierarhijska izhodna struktura boljša od obstoječih, model Hier-GCN pa lahko dosledno doseže najboljše rezultate na štirih referenčnih merilih.', 'jv': 'Piye karo hal-hal karo hal-hal penting sampeyan karo penting nggawe nguasai pertualisan sing nyimpen winih dhéwé To Capte and Capte Nanging, saiki uwis saiki dadi piye akeh basa sing wis ana ing panjenengan kanggo kelas kuwi iki. shortcut Nang gawar iki, kita mulai-formalizasi nggawe kelompok iki bakal kelompok nggawe kategori-Sensitif Juk-Juk, awak dhéwé ngerasakno akeh Graph convolution Network Rasane sing perusahaan maneh da banjuré awak dhéwé sistem sing katêpakan karo bendhêr, lan model Hyer-GN iso nguasai akeh dhéwé, dadi sing paling dhéwé operasi alam sing katêpakan karo bendhêr.', 'ha': "Babu mafi yawansu, fitina na na danganta a kan ƙananan hisãbi yana aimar ka gane surori zuwa ga wasu kalmõmi masu bayyani da kuma ana ƙyale masu cikin matsayin. To, dõmin ka kãma duk abu mai bayyanãwa da wanda ke cikin sha'anin, sai mu yi maki a kan anarwa na-category, wanda ke ƙunsa da gane wa category na haɗi da kuma mai category-na'ura. A lokacin da, a yanzu, karatun kaɗan ne masu sauƙi sun zura makini ga wannan mataimaki. QScriptBreakpointsModel Daga wannan aikin, muna fara-formani aikin kamar wata mataimaki na hiera-hisani, wanda yana da wani matsayi na fitarwa na hirarci, don ya iya kwanza ka gane categories masu yawa cikin wani rubutu na rubutu, kuma ka yi bayani ga hisani na kõwane category da aka sani. A ƙayyade, Munã ƙayyade wata Cikakken Narrafi na Hier-GC (Hier-GC), a inda wani daraja mafi ƙasƙanci na GCR yana samo danne-danne a cikin wasu categories, kuma da daraja mafi girma GCC is to kãma interlinks between categories da hisãbi. Ana ƙaddara masu yawa sun nuna cewa matsayinmu na hierrrchy ne mafi girma daga masu jira, kuma misalin Hier-GC yana iya iya ƙari mafi kyaun matsala a kan bangon fire.", 'he': 'רוב מחקר ניתוח הרגשות המבוסס על האפקטים מכוון לזהות את קוטביות הרגשות כלפי מונחי האפקטים המפורסמים כדי לתפוס את היבטים המפורקים והישירים, אנחנו מתמקדים בניתוח רגשות מבוסס בקטגוריה האפקטגורית, שכולל זיהוי קטגוריה האפקטגורית המשותפת וקטגוריה של רגשות מבוססת בקטגוריה. עם זאת, כרגע רק כמה מחקרים פשוטים התמקדו בבעיה הזאת. החסרונות בדרך שבה הם הגדירו את המשימה גורמות לגישותיהם קשות ללמוד את היחסים הפנימיים בין הקטגוריות ובין היחסים בין הקטגוריות ובין הרגשות. בעבודה הזו, אנו פורמלים מחדש את המשימה בתור בעיית חיזוי הייררכיה של רגשות-קטגוריה, אשר מכילה מבנה יציאה הייררכיה במיוחד, אנו מציעים רשת שינוי גרפים היררכית (Hier-GCN), שבה GCN רמה נמוכה יותר היא לדוגמא את היחסים הפנימיים בין הקטגוריות רבות, והGCN רמה גבוהה יותר היא לתפוס את היחסים בין הקטגוריות האפקטים והרגשות. הערכות רחבות מראות כי מבנה הייררכיה הייציאה שלנו הוא עדיף על אחד קיים, והמודל Hier-GCN יכול להשיג באופן קבוע את התוצאות הטובות ביותר על ארבעה נקודות.', 'bo': 'Most of the aspect based sentiment analysis research aims to identify the sentiment polarities toward some explicit aspect terms while ignores implicit aspects in text. To capture both explicit and implicit aspects, we focus on aspect-category based sentiment analysis, which involves joint aspect category detection and category-oriented sentiment classification. ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་བརྗོད་དོན་དག་ལས་སླ་བོ་ཞིག་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དག་བློ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། དབྱེ་རིག་དང་བྱ་རིམ་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱས་པ་དེ་གིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གནད་དོན་ཐག་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་ In this work, we re-formalize the task as a category-sentiment hierarchy prediction problem, which contains a hierarchy output structure to first identify multiple aspect categories in a piece of text, and then predict the sentiment for each of the identified categories. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་Hierarchical Graph Convolutional Network (Hier-GCN)ཞིག་འཆར་འདོད་པ་དེ་ནི་lower-level GCN འདིས་དབྱེ་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མཐུན Extensive evaluations demonstrate that our hierarchy output structure is superior over existing ones, and the Hier-GCN model can consistently achieve the best results on four benchmarks.'}
{'en': 'Constituency Lattice Encoding for Aspect Term Extraction', 'ar': 'ترميز شعرية الدائرة الانتخابية لاستخراج مدة الجانب', 'fr': "Codage de réseau de constituants pour l'extraction de termes d'aspect", 'pt': 'Codificação de Malha de Constituinte para Extração de Termo de Aspecto', 'es': 'Codificación de red de circunscripciones para la extracción de términos de aspecto', 'ja': 'アスペクト項抽出の選挙区格子符号化', 'zh': '用方面项提取的选区格编码', 'ru': 'Кодирование решетки избирательного округа для извлечения термина аспекта', 'hi': 'पहलू शब्द निष्कर्षण के लिए निर्वाचन क्षेत्र जाली एन्कोडिंग', 'ga': 'Ionchódú Laitíse Comhdhála le haghaidh Eastóscadh Téarma Gné', 'ka': 'კონსტისტუტენტის ლატტიკის კონფიგურაცია', 'el': 'Κωδικοποίηση πλέγματος συστατικοτήτων για εξαγωγή όρων πτυχών', 'hu': 'Választókerületi hálókódolás aspektkifejezések kivonásához', 'it': "Codifica reticolo di circoscrizione per l'estrazione di termini di aspetto", 'kk': 'Аспекттік термин тарқату үшін конституциялық латтық кодтамасы', 'lt': 'Sudedamosios dalies raidės kodavimas, skirtas ištraukti aspekto terminą', 'mk': 'Constituency Lattice Encoding for Aspect Term Extraction', 'ml': 'പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ടെര്\u200dമി പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആധിപത്യം ലാറ്റിക്സ് കോഡിങ്ങ്', 'mn': 'Аспектив термин хадгалахын тулд байрлал латтикийн кодлог', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Latik Kebenaran untuk Ekstraksi Terma Aspek', 'mt': 'Kodifikazzjoni tal-Lattika tal-Kostituzzjoni għall-Estrazzjoni tat-Terminu Aspett', 'no': 'Konstitusjonskodekoding for aspektterminutpakking', 'ro': 'Codarea rețelelor electorale pentru extragerea termenului aspect', 'pl': 'Kodowanie siatki Constituency dla ekstrakcji terminów aspect', 'sr': 'Konstitucija Lattice kodiranje za ekstrakciju aspekta termina', 'si': 'Aspect Terminal Extraction', 'so': 'Kodeynta dhamaanka shaqada', 'sv': 'Valkretsgitterkodning för extraktion av aspekttermer', 'ta': 'பார்க்கப்பட்ட காலத்தை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கான தொகுதி குறியீடு', 'ur': 'آسپٹ ٹرمن اکسٹرک کے لئے منظور لاٹیک اکنوڈینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kí hiệu cuối cùng cho nhiệt độ Hạt nhân', 'bg': 'Кодиране на решетката на съставния състав за извличане на аспект', 'hr': 'Konstitucija Lattice kodiranje za izvlačenje aspekta termina', 'da': 'Valgkreds gitterkodning til aspekttermekstraktion', 'nl': 'Constituency Lattice Encoding voor Aspect Term Extraction', 'de': 'Constituency Gittercodierung für Aspect Term Extraction', 'id': 'Pengekodan Latik Konstitusi untuk Ekstraksi Terma Aspekt', 'ko': '특징 항목 추출을 위한 선택 칸 인코딩', 'fa': 'Encoding Lattice Constituency for Aspect Term Extraction', 'sw': 'Kufunguliwa kwa ajili ya kuondolewa kwa muda unaotarajiwa', 'tr': 'Durum Açmak üçin Zat Ködleme', 'af': 'Konstansie Latiese Enkodering vir Aspekte Term Uitpakking', 'sq': 'Kodimi i gjerësisë së kushtetutës për nxjerrjen e termit në aspekt', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Aspect Termi Çıqışı', 'bn': 'প্রত্যাশিত টার্ম এক্সট্র্যাকশনের জন্য সংবিধান ল্যাটিকেস এনকোডিং', 'bs': 'Konstitucija Lattice kodiranje za ekstrakciju aspekta termina', 'cs': 'Kódování mřížky Constituency pro extrakci pojmů aspektů', 'et': 'Kompositsiooni võre kodeering aspekti termini ekstraheerimiseks', 'fi': 'Vaarallisten termien erottamista varten muodostettavan rakennepiirin ristikon koodaus', 'ca': "Codificació latítica de la Constituència per l'extracció del terme aspecte", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Kodiranje mreže sestavne enote za ekstrakcijo izrazov aspekta', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Constituency Lattice Encoding for Aspect Term Extraction', 'bo': 'ཆེ་ཆུང་དུས་འཚམས་ཕྱིར་འདྲེན་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཚད་ལྡོག་སྒྲིག་ཀློག་འཇུག'}
{'en': 'One of the remaining challenges for aspect term extraction in sentiment analysis resides in the extraction of phrase-level aspect terms, which is non-trivial to determine the boundaries of such terms. In this paper, we aim to address this issue by incorporating the span annotations of constituents of a sentence to leverage the syntactic information in neural network models. To this end, we first construct a constituency lattice structure based on the constituents of a constituency tree. Then, we present two approaches to encoding the constituency lattice using BiLSTM-CRF and BERT as the base models, respectively. We experimented on two benchmark datasets to evaluate the two models, and the results confirm their superiority with respective 3.17 and 1.35 points gained in F1-Measure over the current state of the art. The improvements justify the effectiveness of the constituency lattice for aspect term extraction.', 'ar': 'يكمن أحد التحديات المتبقية لاستخراج المصطلح الجانبي في تحليل المشاعر في استخراج المصطلحات على مستوى العبارة ، وهو أمر غير مهم لتحديد حدود هذه المصطلحات. في هذه الورقة ، نهدف إلى معالجة هذه المشكلة من خلال دمج التعليقات التوضيحية الممتدة لمكونات الجملة للاستفادة من المعلومات النحوية في نماذج الشبكة العصبية. لتحقيق هذه الغاية ، نقوم أولاً ببناء هيكل شبكي للدائرة الانتخابية بناءً على مكونات شجرة الدائرة الانتخابية. بعد ذلك ، نقدم طريقتين لتشفير شبكة الدائرة الانتخابية باستخدام BiLSTM-CRF و BERT كنماذج أساسية ، على التوالي. لقد جربنا مجموعتي بيانات معياريتين لتقييم النموذجين ، وتؤكد النتائج تفوقهما مع 3.17 و 1.35 نقطة مُكتسبة في F1-Measure على الحالة الحالية للفن. تبرر التحسينات فعالية شبكة الدائرة الانتخابية لاستخراج المصطلح الجانبي.', 'fr': "L'un des défis restants pour l'extraction des termes d'aspect dans l'analyse des sentiments réside dans l'extraction des termes d'aspect au niveau de la phrase, ce qui n'est pas anodin pour déterminer les limites de ces termes. Dans cet article, nous visons à résoudre ce problème en incorporant les annotations de portée des constituants d'une phrase afin de tirer parti des informations syntaxiques dans les modèles de réseaux neuronaux. À cette fin, nous construisons d'abord une structure de réseau de constituants basée sur les constituants d'un arbre de constituants. Ensuite, nous présentons deux approches pour coder le réseau de constituants en utilisant BILSTM-CRF et BERT comme modèles de base, respectivement. Nous avons expérimenté deux ensembles de données de référence pour évaluer les deux modèles, et les résultats confirment leur supériorité avec 3,17 et 1,35 points respectivement gagnés dans F1-Measure par rapport à l'état actuel de la technique. Les améliorations justifient l'efficacité du réseau de constituants pour l'extraction du terme d'aspect.", 'es': 'Uno de los desafíos pendientes para la extracción de términos de aspecto en el análisis de sentimientos reside en la extracción de términos de aspecto a nivel de frase, que no es trivial para determinar los límites de dichos términos. En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es abordar este problema incorporando las anotaciones de intervalo de los componentes de una oración para aprovechar la información sintáctica en los modelos de redes neuronales. Con este fin, primero construimos una estructura reticular de circunscripciones basada en los componentes de un árbol de circunscripciones. A continuación, presentamos dos enfoques para codificar la red de circunscripciones utilizando BILSTM-CRF y BERT como modelos base, respectivamente. Experimentamos en dos conjuntos de datos de referencia para evaluar los dos modelos, y los resultados confirman su superioridad con los respectivos 3.17 y 1.35 puntos ganados en F1-Measure sobre el estado actual de la técnica. Las mejoras justifican la eficacia de la red de circunscripciones para la extracción de términos de aspecto.', 'pt': 'Um dos desafios restantes para a extração de termos de aspecto na análise de sentimento reside na extração de termos de aspecto em nível de frase, que não é trivial para determinar os limites de tais termos. Neste artigo, pretendemos abordar esse problema incorporando as anotações de span de constituintes de uma frase para alavancar as informações sintáticas em modelos de redes neurais. Para este fim, primeiro construímos uma estrutura de rede de constituintes com base nos constituintes de uma árvore de constituintes. Em seguida, apresentamos duas abordagens para codificar a rede de constituintes usando BiLSTM-CRF e BERT como modelos base, respectivamente. Experimentamos dois conjuntos de dados de referência para avaliar os dois modelos, e os resultados confirmam sua superioridade com os respectivos 3,17 e 1,35 pontos ganhos no F1-Measure sobre o estado da arte atual. As melhorias justificam a eficácia da rede de constituintes para a extração de termos de aspecto.', 'ja': 'センチメント分析における態様用語抽出の残りの課題の1つは、フレーズレベルの態様用語の抽出にあり、そのような用語の境界を決定するために重要ではない。本稿では，ニューラルネットワークモデルにおける構文情報を活用するために，文章の構成要素のスパン注釈を取り入れることで，この問題に対処することを目指す．そのために、まず、選挙区ツリーの構成要素に基づいて選挙区格子構造を構築します。次に、ＢｉＬＳＴＭ － ＣＲＦ及びＢＥＲＴをそれぞれベースモデルとして用いて、選挙区格子を符号化するための２つのアプローチを提示する。我々は、２つのモデルを評価するために２つのベンチマークデータセットを実験し、その結果は、Ｆ１ － Ｍｅｓｔｕｒｅで得られたそれぞれの３ ． １ ７及び１ ． ３ ５ポイントで、現在の最先端の状態よりも優れていることを確認した。これらの改善は、アスペクト項抽出のための選挙区格子の有効性を正当化する。', 'hi': 'भावना विश्लेषण में पहलू शब्द निष्कर्षण के लिए शेष चुनौतियों में से एक वाक्यांश-स्तर के पहलू शब्दों के निष्कर्षण में रहता है, जो इस तरह के शब्दों की सीमाओं को निर्धारित करने के लिए गैर-तुच्छ है। इस पेपर में, हम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल में वाक्यात्मक जानकारी का लाभ उठाने के लिए एक वाक्य के घटकों के स्पैन एनोटेशन को शामिल करके इस मुद्दे को संबोधित करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। इस अंत के लिए, हम पहले एक निर्वाचन क्षेत्र के पेड़ के घटकों के आधार पर एक निर्वाचन क्षेत्र जाली संरचना का निर्माण करते हैं। फिर, हम क्रमशः आधार मॉडल के रूप में BiLSTM-CRF और BERT का उपयोग करके निर्वाचन क्षेत्र जाली को एन्कोडिंग करने के लिए दो दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमने दो मॉडलों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए दो बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोग किया, और परिणाम कला की वर्तमान स्थिति पर एफ 1-माप में प्राप्त संबंधित 3.17 और 1.35 अंकों के साथ उनकी श्रेष्ठता की पुष्टि करते हैं। सुधार पहलू शब्द निष्कर्षण के लिए निर्वाचन क्षेत्र जाली की प्रभावशीलता को सही ठहराते हैं।', 'zh': '情之所析,术语取余力,在于短语级术语取之,此定术语之界并非易事。 本文者,所以合句组成部分跨度注以用神经网络形之句法信也。 为此,我们先基于选区树的成分构造选区格结构。 然后各举 BiLSTM-CRF BERT 以为编码法。 余于两准集上行实验,以质二模,实其F1-Measure中各得3.171.35之优越性。 此改证区格之有效性也。', 'ru': 'Одна из остающихся проблем для извлечения аспектных терминов в анализе настроений заключается в извлечении аспектных терминов на уровне фраз, что является нетривиальным для определения границ таких терминов. В этой статье мы стремимся решить эту проблему путем включения аннотаций диапазона составляющих предложения для использования синтаксической информации в моделях нейронных сетей. С этой целью мы сначала строим решетчатую структуру избирательных округов, основанную на составляющих дерева избирательных округов. Затем мы представляем два подхода к кодированию избирательной решетки с использованием BiLSTM-CRF и BERT в качестве базовых моделей, соответственно. Мы экспериментировали на двух эталонных наборах данных для оценки двух моделей, и результаты подтверждают их превосходство с соответствующими 3,17 и 1,35 баллами, полученными в F1-Measure по сравнению с текущим уровнем техники. Улучшения оправдывают эффективность решетки избирательного округа для извлечения аспектного члена.', 'ga': "Is é ceann de na dúshláin atá fágtha maidir le hastarraingt téarmaí gné san anailís aireachtála ná asbhaint téarmaí gné-leibhéal frása, rud nach bhfuil fánach chun teorainneacha téarmaí den sórt sin a chinneadh. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo trí nótaí réise chomhábhair na habairte a ionchorprú chun an fhaisnéis chomhréire a ghiaráil i samhlacha líonraí néaracha. Chuige sin, déanaimid ar dtús struchtúr laitíse toghlaigh a thógáil bunaithe ar chomhábhair chrainn dáilcheantair. Ansin, cuirimid dhá chur chuige i láthair chun an laitíse toghcheantair a ionchódú trí úsáid a bhaint as BiLSTM-CRF agus BERT mar na samhlacha bunúsacha, faoi seach. Rinneamar turgnamh ar dhá thacar sonraí tagarmhairc chun an dá mhúnla a mheas, agus deimhníonn na torthaí a fheabhas le pointí 3.17 agus 1.35 faoi seach a gnóthaíodh i mBeart F1 thar an staid reatha is déanaí. Tugann na feabhsuithe údar maith d'éifeachtacht an laitíse toghlaigh maidir le hasbhaint téarmaíochta gné.", 'el': 'Μια από τις εναπομείναντες προκλήσεις για την εξαγωγή όρων πτυχών στην ανάλυση συναισθημάτων έγκειται στην εξαγωγή όρων πτυχών επιπέδου φράσεων, η οποία δεν είναι ασήμαντη για τον προσδιορισμό των ορίων αυτών όρων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, στοχεύουμε να αντιμετωπίσουμε αυτό το ζήτημα ενσωματώνοντας τις σχολιάσεις του διαστήματος των συστατικών μιας πρότασης για να αξιοποιήσουμε τις συντακτικές πληροφορίες σε μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων. Για το σκοπό αυτό, κατασκευάζουμε πρώτα μια δομή πλέγματος εκλογικής περιφέρειας βασισμένη στα συστατικά ενός δέντρου εκλογικής περιφέρειας. Στη συνέχεια, παρουσιάζουμε δύο προσεγγίσεις για την κωδικοποίηση του πλέγματος εκλογικής περιφέρειας χρησιμοποιώντας BiLSTM-CRF και BERT ως βασικά μοντέλα αντίστοιχα. Πειραματιστήκαμε σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς για την αξιολόγηση των δύο μοντέλων, και τα αποτελέσματα επιβεβαιώνουν την υπεροχή τους με αντίστοιχα 3.17 και 1.35 σημεία που αποκτήθηκαν στο F1-Μέτρο έναντι της τρέχουσας κατάστασης της τεχνολογίας. Οι βελτιώσεις δικαιολογούν την αποτελεσματικότητα του πλέγματος εκλογικής περιφέρειας για την εξαγωγή του όρου πτυχής.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek elemzésében az aspektumkifejezések kivonásának egyik fennmaradó kihívása a kifejezésszintű aspektumkifejezések kivonása, ami nem triviális az ilyen kifejezések határainak meghatározásában. Ebben a tanulmányban arra törekszünk, hogy ezzel a kérdéssel foglalkozzunk azzal, hogy beépítjük a mondat alkotóelemeinek span jegyzeteit, hogy felhasználjuk a szintaktikus információt neurális hálózati modellekben. Ennek érdekében először egy választókerületi rácsszerkezetet építünk ki, amely egy választókerületi fa választóelemein alapul. Ezt követően két megközelítést mutatunk be a választókerületi hálózat kódolására a BiLSTM-CRF és a BERT alapmodellként. Két benchmark adatkészleten kísérleteztünk a két modell értékeléséhez, és az eredmények megerősítik, hogy az F1-Measure során 3,17 és 1,35 pontot szerzett a technika jelenlegi állásával szemben. A fejlesztések indokolják a választókerületi háló hatékonyságát az aspektus kivonás tekintetében.', 'ka': 'სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციაში ერთი მარცხოვრებული გამოცდილებების განმავლობაში სენტიმენტის განმავლობაში დარჩენა ფრაზების განმავლობაში, რომელიც არ არის ტრივიალური განმავლობაში, რომ განსაზღვრება ამ სიტყ ჩვენ მინდომით ამ პრობლემას გადაწყენოთ, რომელიც სინტექტიკური ინფორმაციას ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელში ჩატვირთოთ სინტექტიკური ინფორმაციას. ჩვენ პირველად კონსტუტიური ლატისტუტიური სტრუქტურაციას, რომელიც კონსტუტიური ხელის კონსტუტენტებზე დაბაზიან. შემდეგ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ორი პროგორმა კონსტიუციური ლატიკის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას BiLSTM-CRF და BERT როგორც ბაზის მოდელები. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით ორი მოდელის განსაზღვრებისთვის ექსპერიმენტირებით გავაკეთეთ, და შემდეგი შემდეგი განსაზღვრებით მათი უფრო მეტი 3.17 და 1.35 წერტილებით, რომლებიც F1-მაზაცი ოჲ-ეჲბპვრთრვ ჲოპაგწრ ევტვკრთგნჲჟრრა ნა ლართკჟ ჱა აოჟვკრვპმთნრ ვკჟრპაკუთწ.', 'it': "Una delle sfide rimanenti per l'estrazione di termini di aspetto nell'analisi del sentiment risiede nell'estrazione di termini di aspetto a livello di frase, che non è banale per determinare i confini di tali termini. In questo articolo, miriamo ad affrontare questo problema incorporando le annotazioni span dei costituenti di una frase per sfruttare le informazioni sintattiche nei modelli di rete neurale. A tal fine, per prima cosa costruiamo una struttura a reticolo elettorale basata sui costituenti di un albero di circoscrizione. Quindi, presentiamo due approcci per codificare il reticolo elettorale utilizzando BiLSTM-CRF e BERT come modelli base, rispettivamente. Abbiamo sperimentato due set di dati benchmark per valutare i due modelli, e i risultati confermano la loro superiorità rispetto ai rispettivi 3,17 e 1,35 punti ottenuti in F1-Measure rispetto allo stato attuale dell'arte. I miglioramenti giustificano l'efficacia del reticolo elettorale per l'estrazione a termine.", 'lt': 'Vienas iš likusių iššūkių, susijusių su aspekto sąvokos išgavimu atliekant jautrumo analizę, yra frazės lygio aspekto sąvokų išgavimas, kuris nėra trivialus tokių sąvokų ribų nustatymui. Šiame dokumente siekiame išspręsti šį klausimą įtraukdami sakinio sudedamųjų dalių apimties anotacijas, kad sutelktume sintaksinę informaciją į nervinių tinklų modelius. Šiuo tikslu pirmiausia sukuriame rinkimų apygardos konstrukciją, grindžiamą rinkimų apygardos medžio sudedamosiomis dalimis. Tuomet pristatysime du būdus rinkimų apygardos plokštelės kodavimui, naudojant BiLSTM-CRF ir BERT kaip bazinius modelius. Eksperimentavome su dviem lyginamosiomis duomenų rinkiniais, kad įvertintume šiuos du modelius, ir rezultatai patvirtina jų viršenybę atitinkamais 3,17 ir 1,35 punktais, įgytais F1-Measure, palyginti su dabartine pažangiąja pažanga. Šie patobulinimai pateisina rinkimų apygardos plokštelės efektyvumą, skirtą išgavimui pagal aspektus.', 'kk': 'Бұл сөздердің шектерін анықтау үшін аспекттік терминді тарқату үшін қалдырып тұрған жағдайлардың бірі сөздер деңгейіндегі аспекттің шарттарын тарқату үшін қалды. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл мәселеді невралдық желі моделдеріне синтактикалық мәліметті құру үшін сөйлеменің кеңістіктерінің жазуын қосуға мақсатымыз. Бұл соңында біріншіден кеңістік құрылымыз кеңістік құрылымыз, кеңістік ағашының құрылымына негізделген. Содан кейін, BiLSTM-CRF және BERT дегенді негізгі үлгілер ретінде кодтамыз үшін екі арқылы келтіреміз. Біз екі үлгілерді бағалау үшін екі бағдарламалық деректер қорларында тәжірибедік, және нәтижелер өзінің жоғарылығын 3,17 және 1,35 бағдарламалық бұрыштың қазіргі уақытта F1- өлшемінде алған. Бұл жақсартулар аспекттік терминді тарқату үшін кеңістіктерінің эффектілігін түсіндіреді.', 'mk': 'Еден од преостанатите предизвици за екстракција на спективниот термин во анализата на чувствата се наоѓа во екстракцијата на термините на спективното ниво на фразите, што не е тривијално за одредување на границите на ваквите термини. Во овој документ, ние имаме за цел да го решиме ова прашање со вклучување на анатациите за растојание на составниците на реченица за искористување на синтактичките информации во моделите на нервната мрежа. За ова, прво ќе изградиме структура на електронски округ базирана на електронските составници на електронското дрво. Потоа, претставуваме два пристапи за кодирање на електронскиот округ користејќи BiLSTM-CRF и BERT како основни модели, односно. Експериментиравме на два бази на податоци за проценка на двата модели, и резултатите ја потврдуваат нивната супериорност со соодветни 3,17 и 1,35 поени добиени во F1-Measure во однос на сегашната техничка состојба. Подобрувањата ја оправдуваат ефикасноста на електронскиот округ за екстракција на аспектот.', 'ms': 'Salah satu cabaran yang tersisa untuk ekstraksi terma aspek dalam analisis sentimen terdapat dalam ekstraksi terma aspek aras-frasa, yang bukan-trivial untuk menentukan sempadan terma tersebut. Dalam kertas ini, kami bertujuan untuk mengatasi isu ini dengan memasukkan anotasi jangkauan bagi konstitusi kalimat untuk menggunakan maklumat sintaktik dalam model rangkaian saraf. Untuk tujuan ini, kita pertama-tama membina struktur lattice kawasan berdasarkan pembina pokok kawasan kawasan. Kemudian, kita memperkenalkan dua pendekatan untuk mengekodkan lattik kawasan-kawasan menggunakan BiLSTM-CRF dan BERT sebagai model as as, berdasarkan. Kami eksperimen pada dua set data benchmark untuk menilai kedua-dua model, dan hasil mengesahkan ketinggian mereka dengan 3.17 dan 1.35 titik yang diperoleh dalam F1-Measure atas keadaan sekarang. Perbaikan membenarkan keefektivitas lattice constituency untuk ekstraksi terma aspek.', 'mt': 'Waħda mill-isfidi li għad fadal għall-estrazzjoni tat-terminu tal-aspett fl-analiżi tas-sentimenti tirriżulta fl-estrazzjoni tat-termini tal-aspett fil-livell tal-frażi, li mhuwiex trivjali biex jiġu ddeterminati l-limiti ta’ termini bħal dawn. F’dan id-dokument, għandna l-għan li nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni billi ninkorporaw l-annotazzjonijiet tal-firxa tal-kostitwenti ta’ sentenza biex in ħeġġu l-informazzjoni sintattika fil-mudelli tan-netwerk newrali. To this end, we first construct a constituency lattice structure based on the constituents of a constituency tree.  Imbagħad, qed nippreżentaw żewġ approċċi għall-kodifikazzjoni tal-lattika tal-kostitwenza bl-użu tal-BiLSTM-CRF u l-BERT bħala mudelli bażiċi, rispettivament. Esperimentajna fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta referenzjarji biex jevalwaw iż-żewġ mudelli, u r-riżultati jikkonfermaw is-superjorità tagħhom bi 3.17 u 1.35 punti rispettivi miksuba f’F1-Measure fuq l-istat attwali tal-aħħar. It-titjib jiġġustifika l-effettività tal-lattika tal-kostitwenza għall-estrazzjoni tat-terminu tal-aspett.', 'ml': 'One of the remaining challenges for aspect term extraction in sentiment analysis resides in the extraction of phrase-level aspect terms, which is non-trivial to determine the boundaries of such terms.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുയല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലില്\u200d സംസാര ഈ അവസാനത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സംസ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലാറ്റിക്സ് സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഎം സിരിഫിനെയും ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെയും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സംസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ലാറ്റിസിനെക്കുറിച്ച് രണ്ട്  ഈ രണ്ടു മോഡലുകളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d രണ്ട് ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചു. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d എഫ്1.  സംസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ലാറ്റിക്സിന്റെ പ്രകൃതിയെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മുന്നറിയിപ്പുണ്ട്.', 'mn': 'Боловсролын шинжилгээнд бусад асуудлын нэг асуудал нь хэлбэрийн хэмжээний хэмжээний хязгаарыг тодорхойлох нь бага зэрэг биш. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлыг шийдэх зорилго нь мэдрэлийн сэтгэл сүлжээний загвар дээр синтактик мэдээллийг ашиглах гэсэн үг юм. Энэ төгсгөлд бид анхны дараа хэмжээний модны тогтмол дээр байгууллага бүтээж байна. Дараа нь бид BiLSTM-CRF болон BERT-г суурь загвар болгон кодлох хоёр арга зам өгсөн. Бид хоёр загварыг үнэлэхэд хоёр багц өгөгдлийн санг туршиж үзсэн. Үүний үр дүнд урлагийн орчин дахь 3.17 болон 1.35 цэгүүдийг F1-хэмжээнд авсан байна. Хамгийн сайжруулалт нь сайжруулалт нь харьцуулахын тулд загварын латизын үр дүнг зөвшөөрүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Ein av dei gjenstandane utfordringane for aspektuttrykk i sentimentanalysen står i uttrykket av aspektuttrykk på frøknivå, som er ikkje trivial for å bestemme grensene på slike uttrykk. I denne papiret må vi handsama dette problemet ved å inkludere spennnotasjonane til komponentane av eit setning for å levera syntaksiske informasjon i neiralnettverksmodeller. I denne slutten konstruerer vi først ein konstitusjonslattice- struktur basert på konstitusjonane av ein konstitusjonstrå. Så presenterer vi to tilnærmingar til å koda konstitusjonslattice med BiLSTM-CRF og BERT som grunnmodeller. Vi eksperimenterte på to benchmarkdatasett for å evaluera dei to modelane, og resultatet stadfestar overhøgda sine med 3,17 og 1,35 punkt i F1-måling over den gjeldande tilstanden av kunsten. Forbedringane justerer effektiviteten av konstitusjonslattice for utpakking av aspektuttrykk.', 'ro': 'Una dintre provocările rămase pentru extragerea termenilor de aspect în analiza sentimentului constă în extragerea termenilor de aspect la nivel de frază, ceea ce nu este trivial pentru a determina limitele acestor termeni. În această lucrare, ne propunem să abordăm această problemă prin încorporarea adnotărilor de span ale constituenților unei propoziții pentru a valorifica informația sintactică în modelele de rețea neurală. În acest scop, construim mai întâi o structură de reţea electorală bazată pe constituitorii unui arbore de circumscripţie. Apoi, prezentăm două abordări pentru codificarea reţelei electorale folosind BiLSTM-CRF şi, respectiv, BERT ca modele de bază. Am experimentat pe două seturi de date de referință pentru a evalua cele două modele, iar rezultatele confirmă superioritatea acestora cu respectivele 3,17 și 1,35 puncte obținute în F1-Measure față de starea actuală a tehnologiei. Îmbunătățirile justifică eficiența rețelei circumscripționale pentru extragerea termenului aspect.', 'sr': 'Jedan od ostalih izazova za ekstrakciju aspekta termina u analizi sentimenta ostaje u ekstrakciji uvjeta aspekta na nivou fraze, koji nije trivialni za određivanje granica takvih uvjeta. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da se riješimo ovom pitanju uključujući raznovrsne annotacije sastavnika rečenice kako bi uticali na sintaktične informacije u modele neuralne mreže. Za taj cilj, prvo smo izgradili konstrukciju lattice predstava na osnovu sastavnika drveta predstava. Onda predstavljamo dva pristupa kodiranju lattice predstavnika koristeći BiLSTM-CRF i BERT kao bazne modele. Mi smo eksperimentirali na dva standardna seta podataka kako bi procenili dva modela, a rezultati potvrđuju njihovu nadmoć sa odgovarajućim 3.17 i 1.35 bodova dobijenih u F1-mjeri iznad trenutnog stanja umetnosti. Poboljšanja opravdava učinkovitost lattice predstava za ekstrakciju aspekta termina.', 'pl': 'Jednym z pozostałych wyzwań dla ekstrakcji terminów aspektowych w analizie sentymentów jest ekstrakcja terminów aspektowych na poziomie fraz, co nie jest trywialne w określeniu granic takich terminów. Celem niniejszego artykułu jest rozwiązanie tego problemu poprzez włączenie adnotacji rozpiętości składników zdania w celu wykorzystania informacji składniowych w modelach sieci neuronowych. W tym celu najpierw budujemy strukturę siatki okręgowej opartą na składnikach drzewa okręgowego. Następnie przedstawiamy dwa podejścia do kodowania siatki okręgowej przy użyciu odpowiednio BiLSTM-CRF i BERT jako modeli bazowych. Eksperymentowaliśmy na dwóch zestawach danych referencyjnych w celu oceny dwóch modeli, a wyniki potwierdzają ich wyższość z odpowiednimi punktami 3.17 i 1.35 zdobytymi w F1-Measure nad aktualnym stanem techniki. Usprawnienia te uzasadniają skuteczność siatki okręgowej dla ekstrakcji terminów aspektowych.', 'so': 'Mid ka mid ah dhibaatooyin ka hadha kaloo ka soo baxa baaritaanka xisaabta fikradu waxay ku jirtaa ka soo baxa qaybaha heerka, taas oo aan ahayn mid aan u baahnayn xuduudaha caynkaas ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qoraynaa warqaddan si aan u soo dirno macluumaadka sameynta sameynta shabakadda neurada. Tan darteed marka ugu horeysa waxaynu dhisaynaa dhismo baabuur ah oo ku saleysan dhismaha geedka xuduudaha. Markaas waxaan keenaynaa laba qaab oo loo koobi karo qalabka dabiicadda ah ee lagu isticmaalayo BiLSTM-CRF iyo BERT sida qaabka asalka ah. Waxaan ku imtixaamaynay labada takhasuska ee bangiga si aan ugu qiimeyno labada model, resultiyaduna waxay ku xaqiijineysaa in ay ka sarreeyaan sharaftooda 3.17 iyo 1.35 points ka helay F1-qiyaastii xaaladda hore. Horumarinta ayaa xaq u yeelan kara saameynta doorashada ee la soo bixinayo xiliga.', 'sv': 'En av de återstående utmaningarna för aspekttermutvinning i sentimentalanalys ligger i utvinningen av frasnivå aspekttermer, vilket är icke-trivialt att bestämma gränserna för sådana termer. I denna uppsats syftar vi till att ta itu med denna fråga genom att införliva span annotationer av beståndsdelar i en mening för att utnyttja syntaktisk information i neurala nätverksmodeller. För detta ändamål bygger vi först en valkretsstruktur baserad på väljarna i ett valkretsträd. Därefter presenterar vi två metoder för kodning av valkretsnätet med hjälp av BiLSTM-CRF respektive BERT som basmodeller. Vi experimenterade på två benchmark datauppsättningar för att utvärdera de två modellerna, och resultaten bekräftar deras överlägsenhet med respektive 3,17 och 1,35 poäng som erhållits i F1-Measure jämfört med nuvarande state of the art. Förbättringarna motiverar valkretsnätets effektivitet för extraktion av aspekttermer.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් ඉන්න තියෙන අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් ඉන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර මේ පත්තරේ අපි අදහස් කරනවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා වාක්යේ සංකේතික තොරත මේ අවසානයට, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලැටිස් ස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරධානයක් ගස්සක් වල ඊට පස්සේ, අපි බිල්ස්ටිම්-CRF සහ BERT විශේෂයෙන් මොඩේල් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් දෙකක් පිළිගන්නවා. අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කළා මොඩේල් දෙකක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂතාවය 3.17 සහ 1. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්ධාරිත කරනවා.', 'ta': 'உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சியில் மீதிய வாக்கியத்தின் பெருக்கும் சவால்களில் ஒன்று சொற்றொடர் மட்டத்தின் விளிம்புகளை வெளியேற்றுவதில் இருக்கிறது,  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்க வேண்டும் புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரிகளில் ஒத்திசைவு தகவலை ஒத்திசைவு செ இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் முதலில் நிறுவனம் மரத்தின் கூட்டத்திற்கு அடிப்படையான ஒரு பொருள் லாட்டிஸ் கட்டமைப்பை உருவா பில்எஸ்டி-CRF மற்றும் பிரெட்டை அடிப்படை மாதிரிகளாக குறியீட்டிற்கு இரண்டு முறைகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். இந்த இரண்டு மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பதற்காக நாம் இரண்டு பெங்குப்பெட்டி தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனை செய்தோம், மற்றும் முடிவு முன்னேற்றங்கள் விளைவுகளின் விளைவுகளை நிர்ணயிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'احساس تحقیقات میں باقی رہنے والی چالیں میں سے ایک ہے کہ احساس تحقیقات کے مطابق فیصلہ سطح کے مطابق شرایط کے اٹھانے میں رہتا ہے، جو ایسی شرایط کی حدیں مقرر کرنے کے لئے غیر اچھی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کا ارادہ کیا ہے کہ ایک جماعت کے منحصروں کی مثالیں جمع کریں کہ نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل میں سینٹکتیک معلومات کو استعمال کریں۔ اس کے لئے ہم پہلے ایک قائم رہنے والی لاتیس ساختار بناتے ہیں جو ایک قائم رہنے والی درخت کے قائم رہنے والی ہیں. پھر ہم دو طریقے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ BiLSTM-CRF اور BERT کے مطابق بنیاد نمڈل کے طور پر بنیاد نمڈل کے طور پر کڈینسٹ لاتیس کے لئے کوڈیکس کریں. ہم نے دو بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کی کہ دو نمڈل کا ارزش کریں، اور نتیجے ان کی اوپر ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں 3.17 اور 1.35 پوینٹ کے ساتھ جو ف1-Measure میں موجود موجود موجود موجود ہے. مصلحت کی تعداد کی تاکید کے مطابق فیصلہ کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Foydalanuvchining chegarasining chegarasini aniqlash uchun eng oxirgi qiymatlar biri keladi. Bu hujjatda, biz bu muammolarni nazar tarmoqning modelidagi sintaktik maʼlumotini qo'shish uchun gapning taʼminotlarini qo'yish mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz birinchi tashkilotli daraxtning tashkilotlari asosida qurilamiz. Keyin biz quyidagi ikkita murakkablar bilan biLSTM-CRF va BERT asosiy modeli sifatida kodlash mumkin. Biz ikkita modelni qiymatlashga ikkita benchmark maʼlumot tarkibini tekshirib ko'rdik va natijalari roʻyxatning joriy holatida F1- 17 va 1.35 pochta olinganligini tasdiqlaydi. Bu yaxshi ko'paytuvchilar taqdim soʻzni ajratishga qo'shiladi.", 'vi': 'Một trong những thử thách còn lại cho việc trích xuất về các khía cạnh trong phân tích cảm xúc nằm trong việc trích các thuật ngữ về các cụm từ, mà không hề tầm thường để quyết định ranh giới của các từ đó. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi muốn giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách nhập vào lịch sử thời gian các cử tri của các cử động của câu nói để sử dụng thông tin cú pháp trong các mô hình mạng thần kinh. Để đạt được mục đích đầu tiên, chúng ta sẽ xây dựng một tổ chức bầu cử nào đó dựa trên cử tri của một cây bầu cử. Sau đó, chúng tôi giới thiệu hai phương pháp sắp xếp lại hệ thống bầu cử nhờ hai cử BiLSTM-CRF và BERT làm mẫu căn cứ cho nhau. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn để đánh giá hai mẫu, và kết quả xác nhận họ ưu thế hơn so với điểm 3.17 và 1.35 thu được trong F1-tạ về trạng thái hiện thời của nghệ thuật. Sự cải tiến này bào chữa cho hiệu quả của dự luật bầu cử về việc khai thác hình thể.', 'bg': 'Едно от оставащите предизвикателства за извличане на аспектни термини в сентименталния анализ се крие в извличането на аспектни термини на ниво фраза, което е нетривиално за определяне на границите на такива термини. В настоящата статия се стремим да разгледаме този въпрос чрез включване на анотациите за обхват на съставките на изречение, за да използваме синтактичната информация в моделите на невронните мрежи. За тази цел първо изграждаме решетка на избирателния район въз основа на съставните елементи на дърво на избирателния район. След това представяме два подхода за кодиране на решетката на избирателния район, използвайки съответно като базови модели BiLSTM-CRF и BERT. Експериментирахме върху два базови набора данни, за да оценим двата модела, а резултатите потвърждават тяхното превъзходство със съответните 3.17 и 1.35 точки, спечелени в Мярка спрямо текущото състояние на техниката. Подобренията оправдават ефективността на решетката на избирателния район за извличане на аспектни термини.', 'da': 'En af de resterende udfordringer for aspektudtrækning i sentimentalanalyse ligger i udtrækningen af aspektudtryk på sætningsniveau, hvilket er ikke-trivielt at bestemme grænserne for sådanne udtryk. I denne artikel har vi til formål at behandle dette problem ved at indarbejde span annotationer af bestanddele af en sætning for at udnytte den syntaktiske information i neurale netværksmodeller. Til dette formål konstruerer vi først en valgkredsstruktur baseret på vælgerne i et valgkredsstræ. Derefter præsenterer vi to metoder til kodning af valgkredsnettet ved hjælp af henholdsvis BiLSTM-CRF og BERT som grundmodeller. Vi eksperimenterede med to benchmark datasæt for at evaluere de to modeller, og resultaterne bekræfter deres overlegenhed med respektive 3,17 og 1,35 point opnået i F1-Measure i forhold til den aktuelle state of te art. Forbedringerne retfærdiggør effektiviteten af valgkredsnettet til udtrækning af aspekttermer.', 'nl': 'Een van de resterende uitdagingen voor aspect term extractie in sentimentanalyse ligt in het extraheren van aspect termen op frase-niveau, wat niet-triviaal is om de grenzen van dergelijke termen te bepalen. In dit artikel willen we dit probleem aanpakken door de span annotaties van bestanddelen van een zin op te nemen om de syntactische informatie in neurale netwerkmodellen te gebruiken. Hiervoor bouwen we eerst een kiesdistrictroosterstructuur op basis van de bestanddelen van een kiesdistrictboom. Vervolgens presenteren we twee benaderingen om het kiesdistrict te coderen met respectievelijk BiLSTM-CRF en BERT als basismodellen. We experimenteerden met twee benchmark datasets om de twee modellen te evalueren, en de resultaten bevestigen hun superioriteit met respectievelijke 3.17 en 1.35 punten behaald in F1-Measure ten opzichte van de huidige stand van de techniek. De verbeteringen rechtvaardigen de effectiviteit van het kiesdistrict-rooster voor aspect term extractie.', 'hr': 'Jedan od ostalih izazova za ekstrakciju aspekta izraza u analizi osjećaja ostaje u izvlačenju uvjeta aspekta na razini fraza, što je neprobojno odrediti granice takvih uvjeta. U ovom papiru imamo cilj rješavanja ovog pitanja uključujući raznovrsne annotacije sastavnika kazne kako bi utjecali na sintaktičke informacije u modele neuralne mreže. Za taj cilj, prvo smo izgradili konstrukciju lattice područja na osnovu komponenta drveta područja. Onda predstavljamo dva pristupa kodiranju lattice predstavljanja koristeći BiLSTM-CRF i BERT kao bazne modele. Eksperimentirali smo na dva standardna seta podataka kako bi procijenili dva modela, a rezultati potvrđuju njihovu nadmoć s odgovarajućim 3.17 i 1.35 to čkama dobivenih u F1-mjeri iznad trenutnog stanja umjetnosti. Poboljšanja opravdava učinkovitost lattice područja za ekstrakciju aspekta.', 'de': 'Eine der verbleibenden Herausforderungen für die Extraktion von Aspekten in der Sentimentanalyse liegt in der Extraktion von Aspekten auf Phrasenebene, was nicht trivial ist, um die Grenzen solcher Begriffe zu bestimmen. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir dieses Problem adressieren, indem wir die Spannannotationen von Satzbestandteilen integrieren, um die syntaktischen Informationen in neuronalen Netzwerkmodellen zu nutzen. Dazu konstruieren wir zunächst eine Kreisgitterstruktur basierend auf den Bestandteilen eines Kreisbaums. Anschließend stellen wir zwei Ansätze zur Kodierung des Wahlkreisgitters unter Verwendung von BiLSTM-CRF bzw. BERT als Basismodelle vor. Wir experimentierten mit zwei Benchmark-Datensätzen, um die beiden Modelle zu bewerten, und die Ergebnisse bestätigen ihre Überlegenheit mit entsprechenden 3,17- und 1,35-Punkten, die in F1-Measure gewonnen wurden, gegenüber dem aktuellen Stand der Technik. Die Verbesserungen rechtfertigen die Wirksamkeit des Wahlkreisgitters für die Aspekttermextraktion.', 'ko': '감정 분석에서 방면 용어 추출의 잉여 도전 중 하나는 단어급 방면 용어 추출에 있는데 이것은 이런 용어의 경계를 확정하는 데 매우 중요하다.본고에서 우리의 목표는 문장 성분의 경계 주석을 결합시켜 신경 네트워크 모델 중의 문법 정보를 이용하여 이 문제를 해결하는 것이다.이를 위해 우리는 우선 선택 트리의 성분을 바탕으로 선택 격자 구조를 구축한다.그리고 BilSTM CRF와 BERT를 각각 기본 모델로 사용하는 두 가지 선택 격자 인코딩 방법을 제시했다.우리는 두 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행하여 이 두 모델을 평가한 결과 그들의 우월성을 증명하였으며 현재의 기술 수준에 비해 F1측량은 각각 3.17점과 1.35점을 얻었다.이러한 개선은 항목 추출에 사용할 선택 영역의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'id': 'Salah satu tantangan yang tersisa untuk ekstraksi istilah aspek dalam analisis sentimen adalah ekstraksi istilah aspek tingkat frasa, yang bukan trivial untuk menentukan batas istilah tersebut. Dalam kertas ini, kami bermaksud untuk mengatasi masalah ini dengan memasukkan anotasi span dari konstitusi kalimat untuk menggunakan informasi sintaksi dalam model jaringan saraf. Untuk tujuan ini, kita pertama-tama membangun struktur lapis konstitusi berdasarkan konstitusi pohon konstitusi. Kemudian, kami mempersembahkan dua pendekatan untuk mengkode lattice konstitusi menggunakan BiLSTM-CRF dan BERT sebagai model dasar, sesuai. Kami eksperimen pada dua set data benchmark untuk mengevaluasi dua model, dan hasilnya mengkonfirmasi ketinggian mereka dengan 3,17 dan 1,35 poin yang diperoleh dalam F1-Measure atas keadaan sekarang. Perbaikan yang membenarkan efektivitas laptik konstitusi untuk ekstraksi istilah aspek.', 'sw': 'Moja ya changamoto zilizobaki kwa kuchaguliwa kwa muhula katika uchambuzi wa hisia unabaki katika utekelezaji wa vipengele vya msemo, ambavyo si vigumu kuelezea mipaka ya aina hiyo. In this paper, we aim to address this issue by incorporating the span annotations of constituents of a sentence to leverage the syntactic information in neural network models.  Kwa mwisho huu, kwa mara ya kwanza tunajenga muundo wa vifaa vya jimbo kwa kutumia mabango ya mti wa jimbo. Kisha, tunaweka mbili mbili za kutangaza utaratibu wa jimbo kwa kutumia BiLSTM-CRF na BERT kama mifano ya msingi. Tulijaribu katika takwimu mbili za bendera ili kutathmini mifano hizo mbili, na matokeo hayo yanathibitisha ubora wao kwa asilimia 3.17 na 1.35 zilizopata katika F1-Measure kwa hali ya sasa ya sanaa. Maboresho yanahalalisha ufanisi wa kitendo cha uchaguzi kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa muhula.', 'af': "Een van die oorblyfstandige uitdagings vir aspekt term uittrekking in sentimentanalisie bly in die uittrekking van frase-vlak aspekt bedrywe, wat is nie-triviaal om die grense van sodanige bedrywe te bepaal. In hierdie papier, ons doen doel om hierdie probleem te adres deur die span-notasies van 'n seting te inkorporeer om die sintaktieke inligting in neuralnetwerk modele te verwyder. Op hierdie einde, ons stel eerste 'n konstituency lattice struktuur gebaseer op die konstituency van 'n konstituency boom. Dan, ons stel twee toegang voor om die enkodering van die konstituency lattice te gebruik BiLSTM-CRF en BERT as die basis modele, respektief. Ons het eksperimenteer op twee benchmarkdatastel om die twee modele te evalueer, en die resultate bevestig hulle hoogheid met respektief 3.17 en 1.35 punte wat in F1-Maat gevang het oor die huidige staat van die kuns. Die verbeteringe regverdig die effektiviteit van die konstituency lattice vir aspekt term uittrekking.", 'fa': 'یکی از چالش\u200cهای باقی مانده\u200cای برای استخراج term منظور در تحلیل احساسات در استخراج شرایط نقطه\u200cی مرحله\u200cی عبارت باقی مانده است که برای تعیین مرحله\u200cهای چنین شرایط غیر منطقی است. در این کاغذ، ما هدف داریم که این مسئله را حل کنیم با توجه به نوشته\u200cهای طولانی از جمله\u200cهای یک جمله برای تأثیر اطلاعات سنتاکتیک در مدل شبکه عصبی. برای این قسمت، اولین بار یک ساختار لاتیس محیط را بر اساس محیط های درخت محیط ساختیم. بعدش، ما دو دستور برای رمزبندی لاتیس محیطه را با استفاده از BiLSTM-CRF و BERT به عنوان مدل بنیادی نشان می دهیم. ما در دو مجموعه اطلاعات صندوق آزمایش کردیم تا دو مدل را ارزیابی کند، و نتیجه\u200cها بالاترین آن\u200cها را با 3.17 و 1.35 نقطه\u200cهای مختلف در F1-Measure در حالت فعلی هنر ثابت می\u200cکند. توسعه\u200cها ثابت می\u200cکنند فعالیت لاتیس محیطه برای اخراج کردن مدت منطقه.', 'sq': 'Një nga sfidat e mbetura për nxjerrjen e termit të aspektit në analizën e ndjenjave qëndron në nxjerrjen e termave të aspektit të nivelit të frazës, e cila nuk është e vogël për të përcaktuar kufijtë e termave të tilla. Në këtë letër, ne synojmë të trajtojmë këtë çështje duke përfshirë anotacionet e përbërësve të një fjalie për të përdorur informacionin sintaktik në modelet e rrjetit nervor. Për këtë qëllim, ne së pari ndërtojmë një strukturë të qarkut zgjedhor bazuar në përbërësit e një druri zgjedhor. Pastaj, ne paraqesim dy metoda për kodimin e qarkut zgjedhor duke përdorur respektivisht BiLSTM-CRF dhe BERT si modele bazë. Eksperimentuam në dy baza të dhënash për të vlerësuar dy modelet dhe rezultatet konfirmojnë superioritetin e tyre me 3.17 dhe 1.35 pikë të fituara në F1-Measure mbi gjendjen aktuale të artit. Përmirësimet justifikojnë efektshmërinë e pjekurisë së qarkut zgjedhor për nxjerrjen e termit aspektor.', 'tr': 'Duýgular çykarmak üçin kalan kynçylyklaryň biri Sensiýa çykarmak üçin fraz derejesi aspekt şartlarynyň çykarmagynda ýaşaýar, bu şekilde çykarmak üçin kynçylyk däldir. Bu kağıtda, bu meseleyi näral a ğ modellerinde sintaktik bilgileri etkinleştirmek üçin bir sözlerin konstituntlerinin yayınlamasını amaçladık. Şuny üçin birinji gezek, konstituency agajynyň esaslaryna tabanly bir lattice konstituency gururup barýarys. Sonra diňe, biz lattikyň BiLSTM-CRF we BERT ködlemelerini basa nusgalar hökmünde iki goll açýarys. Iki nusgany deňlemek üçin iki etiket sanatynda synanyşdyrdyk we netijede öz üstünliklerini 3.17 we 1.35 sanatyň häzirki durumynda F1-Ölçüsi bilen gazanýan noktalary tassyklady. Gelişmeler geçmişi diňe bir gabdalyk çykarmak üçin ýeterlik ýerini dogrylaşdyrýar.', 'am': 'በአሳማሚ አስተያየት ውስጥ የቀረውን የንግግር ግንኙነት ለመውጣት የሚቀርበው አንዱ የንግግር-ደረጃ ግንኙነት ለመውጣት ይኖራል፡፡ ይህም የደረጃ ግንኙነቶችን ለማረጋገጥ የማይፈቅድ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ይህ ጉዳዩን እናስቸጋጅላለን በኔural network model ውስጥ የተቃውሞ የፍርድ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት በመጀመሪያ የምንሠራው የአካባቢው ዛፍ ግንኙነት በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የግንኙነት አካባቢ መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በኋላም፣ በአካባቢው የቢልSTM-CRF እና BERT የመሠረት ሞዴላዎችን ለመቀበል ሁለት ደረጃዎች እናቀርባለን፡፡ በሁለቱ ምሳሌዎች እንዲያስተምሩ በሁለት የbenchmark ዳታዎች ላይ ፈተናነው፤ ፍሬዎቹም በአሁኑ በዐርብ ክፍል ላይ በ3.17 እና 1.35 ነጥቦች ላይ በF1-Measure እንዲያገኙ ያረጋግጣሉ፡፡ አካባቢው የአካባቢው አካባቢ በጥቅምት አካባቢ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների վերլուծության ասպեկտի տերմինի վերացման դեռևս մնացած մարտահրավերներից մեկն այն է, որ արտահայտում են արտահայտության մակարդակի ասպեկտի տերմինները, որոնք նման տերմինների սահմանները որոշելու համար անփոքրիկ են: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք լուծել այս խնդիրը ներառելով նախադասության բաղադրիչների բազմաթիվ նշումները, որպեսզի օգտագործենք սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվությունը նյարդային ցանցի մոդելներում: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջին անգամ կառուցում ենք ընտրական շրջանի կառուցվածք, որը հիմնված է ընտրական շրջանի ծառի ընտրողների վրա: Հետո մենք ներկայացնում ենք երկու մոտեցում ընտրական շրջանի լատիկի կոդավորման համար, օգտագործելով ԲիLSԹՄ-ԿՌՖ և ԲԵՌՏ-ը որպես հիմնական մոդելներ: Մենք փորձեցինք երկու համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որպեսզի գնահատենք երկու մոդելները, և արդյունքները հաստատում են, որ դրանք գերազանցություն են 3.17 և 1.35 միավորով, որոնք ստացվել են F1-Միտումներում ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիայի դեպքում: Այս բարելավումները արդարացնում են ընտրական շրջանի լատիկի արդյունավետությունը ասպեկտի տերմին վերացման համար:', 'bn': 'অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের বিশ্লেষণের বাকি মেয়াদ বের করার একটি চ্যালেঞ্জের মধ্যে রয়েছে বাক্য-স্তরের বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বের করার জন্য, যা এই ধরনের শর্তের স এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই বিষয়টিকে আলোচনা করতে চাই নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলগুলোতে সাধারণ প্রতিনিধিদের স্প্যানের বিবৃতি তুলে ধরার মাধ্যমে। এই পর্যন্ত আমরা প্রথমে একটি সংসদ গাছের নির্বাচনের ভিত্তিতে একটি প্রতিনিধি ল্যাটিস কাঠামো তৈরি করি। তারপর আমরা বিএলস্টিএম-সিরিএফ এবং বিরেট বেস মডেল হিসেবে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মোডেল হিসেবে ব্যবহার করে সংসদীয় ল্যাট্টিকেস এ আমরা দুটি মডেলের মানানোর জন্য দুটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করেছি এবং ফলাফল তাদের শ্রেণীর বর্তমান অবস্থার পরিমাপে এফ১. ১৭ এবং ১. এই উন্নয়নগুলো প্রতিবেদনের কার্যক্রমের কার্যক্রমের যুক্তি প্রদান করে।', 'ca': "Un dels reptes restants per l'extracció del terme aspecte en l'anàlisi del sentiment resideix en l'extracció del terme aspecte de nivell de frases, que no és trivial per determinar els límits d'aquests termes. En aquest paper, busquem abordar aquesta qüestió incorporant les anotacions d'amplitud dels components d'una frase per aprofitar la informació sinàctica en models de xarxa neural. Per això, primer construïm una estructura de lattics del circuit electoral basada en els constituents d'un arbre del circuit electoral. Després, presentem dos enfocaments per codificar la lattica electoral utilitzant BiLSTM-CRF i BERT com models de base, respectivament. Hem experimentat en dos conjunts de dades de referència per avaluar els dos models, i els resultats confirmen la seva superioritat amb els respectius 3,17 i 1,35 punts guanyats en F1-Measure sobre l'estat actual d'art. Les millors justifiquen l'efectivitat de la lattica electoral per l'extracció de termes aspectes.", 'az': "Bütün bu şartların sınırlarını belə təsdiqləmək üçün hiss analizi içərisində qalan aspekt termini çıxarmaq üçün geridə qalan çətinliklərdən biri fraz seviyyəti aspekti şartların çıxarılmasında oturur. Bu kağızda, bu məsələni nöral a ğ modellərində sintaktik məlumatları yaratmaq üçün bir cümlənin müəyyən edilənlərin istifadəsi ilə çəkmək istəyirik. Bu səbəbdə ilk dəfə bir məclis a ğacının müəyyənləşdirilməsi üzərində bir lattice müəyyənləşdiririk. Sonra, BiLSTM-CRF və BERT vasitəsilə birləşdirilmək üçün iki yol göstəririk. Biz iki modeli değerləşdirmək üçün iki benchmark veri qutusunda imtahana çəkdik, və sonuçlar sanatın ağıllığını 3.17 və 1.35 nöqtələrində F1-Ölçüsü ilə təsdiqləyir. İşləşmələr aspekt sürümünün çıxarılması üçün satışlıq lattice'in etkinliğini təsdiqləyir.", 'cs': 'Jednou ze zbývajících výzev pro extrakci aspektových termínů v sentimentové analýze spočívá v extrakci aspektových termínů na úrovni fráze, což je netriviální pro určení hranic těchto termínů. Cílem tohoto článku je řešit tuto problematiku začleněním anotací rozpětí složek věty pro využití syntaktických informací v modelech neuronových sítí. Za tímto účelem nejprve vytvoříme volební mřížkovou strukturu založenou na složkách volebního stromu. Dále představujeme dva přístupy kódování volební mřížky pomocí BiLSTM-CRF a BERT jako základních modelů. Experimentovali jsme na dvou referenčních datových sadách pro vyhodnocení obou modelů a výsledky potvrzují jejich nadřazenost s příslušnými 3.17 a 1.35 body získanými v F1-Measure nad současným stavem techniky. Tato zlepšení ospravedlňují efektivitu volební mřížky pro extrakci aspektových termínů.', 'et': "Üks ülejäänud väljakutseid aspektiterminite ekstraheerimisel sentimentaalüüsis seisneb fraasitasemel aspektiterminite ekstraheerimises, mis on mittetribviaalne selliste terminite piiride kindlaksmääramisel. Käesolevas töös püüame selle probleemi lahendada, lisades lause koostisosade span annotatsioonid, et kasutada süntaktilist informatsiooni neurovõrgumudelites. Selleks ehitame esmalt valimisringkonna võre struktuuri, mis põhineb valimisringkonna puu koostisosadel. Seejärel esitame kaks lähenemisviisi valimisringkonna võre kodeerimiseks, kasutades alusmudelitena vastavalt BiLSTM-CRF ja BERT. Kahe mudeli hindamiseks katsetasime kahte võrdlusandmekogumit ning tulemused kinnitavad nende paremust vastavate 3,17 ja 1,35 punktiga, mis saavutati F1-Measure'is praeguse tehnika tasemega võrreldes. Parandused õigustavad valimisringkonna võre tõhusust aspektide ekstraheerimisel.", 'fi': 'Tunteanalyysissä aspektitermien poimimisen yksi jäljellä olevista haasteista on fraasitason aspektitermien poimiminen, mikä ei ole triviaalia tällaisten termien rajojen määrittämiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme käsittelemään tätä ongelmaa sisällyttämällä lauseen osatekijöiden span-annotaatiot syntaktisen tiedon hyödyntämiseksi neuroverkkomalleissa. Tätä varten rakennamme ensin vaalipiirin ristikkorakenteen, joka perustuu vaalipiiripuun osatekijöihin. Tämän jälkeen esittelemme kaksi lähestymistapaa vaalipiirin ristikon koodaamiseen käyttäen perusmalleina BiLSTM-CRF ja BERT. Kokeilimme kahta vertailuaineistoa näiden kahden mallin arvioimiseksi, ja tulokset vahvistavat niiden paremmuuden F1-Measuressa saavutetuilla 3,17 ja 1,35 pisteellä nykytekniikkaan verrattuna. Parannukset oikeuttavat vaalipiirin ristikon tehokkuuden aspektitermien uuttamisessa.', 'bs': 'Jedan od ostalih izazova za ekstrakciju aspektualnog termina u analizi osjećaja ostaje u izvlačenju uvjeta aspekta na razini fraza, koji je neizbježno odrediti granice takvih uvjeta. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da se riješimo ovom pitanju uključujući prodavne annotacije sastavnika rečenice kako bi uticali na sintaktičke informacije u modele neuralne mreže. Za taj cilj, prvo smo izgradili konstrukciju lattice područja na osnovu komponenta drveta područja. Onda predstavljamo dva pristupa kodiranju lattice predstavnika koristeći BiLSTM-CRF i BERT kao bazne modele. Eksperimentirali smo na dva standardna seta podataka kako bi procijenili dva modela, a rezultati potvrđuju njihovu nadmoć s odgovarajućim 3.17 i 1.35 bodova dobivenih u F1-mjeri iznad trenutnog stanja umjetnosti. Poboljšanja opravdava učinkovitost lattice područja za ekstrakciju aspekta termina.', 'jv': 'Sing barêng-barêng wong sing paling ngéwé kanggo kelas tanggal Nang pemilih iki, kita dadi nggalakno iki dadi iki dadi apik dadi tanggal nggawe Ngubah tanggal nggawe barang kanggo nggawe informasi sistem sing ngawe modèl alat ni alat. Saiki iki, kita sampeyan kelas shadow Nanging, kita sampeyan mruput duwe aksi kanggo kode nggo Ketok aturan mruput BiLA-CF lan BERT kuwi model sing ditambah. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk sistem sing perusahaan bendhèk kuwi nggawe model sing duwé, lan ngono nggawe barang dhéwé kuwi nggawe geraksi perusahaan karo 3.7 lan 1.34 punika sing gawe lan F1-Mesure kuwi nggawe perusahaan langgar sampeyan uné. Ngucap', 'ha': "Babu wani mai muramman da ya baka wa zãɓen kalma baka cikin anaƙatan hisani na baka yana cikin cire masu buƙata-daraja, da kuma bã ya yin ƙunci dõmin ya ƙayyade grensa na wannan. Ga wannan takardan, Munã aimar mu haɗa wannan masu al'amarin da za'a shigar da kunnuwan span na cikin cikin salon da aka bada ma'abũcin maganar ta zuwa ga su sami takardar da kuma a cikin misalin jerin neura. Daga wannan, Muke samar da wani matsayi mai laptori a kan salon da ke cikin wata itãce. Sa'an nan kuma, Muna gaura kodi biyu zuwa ga kodi mai salon da ke amfani da BiLStM-CRF da BERT kamar misãlai bakin. Mun jarraba bayani biyu na-bangon ayuka dõmin su evaluate misalin biyu, kuma matsala na gaskata su da sifanci a respective 3.17 da 1.35 points wanda ya samu da F1-Measure a kan halin nan na kunyar. Zarin da za'a halatar da alama na mataimaki wa masu cire-zafi.", 'sk': 'Eden od preostalih izzivov za ekstrakcijo aspektnih izrazov v analizi sentimentalnih izrazov je ekstrakcija aspektnih izrazov na ravni fraze, kar ni trivialno za določanje meja takih izrazov. V prispevku želimo obravnavati to vprašanje z vključitvijo obsežnih opomb sestavnih delov stavka, da bi izkoristili sintaktične informacije v modelih nevronskih omrežij. V ta namen najprej gradimo strukturo rešetk volilnega okrožja, ki temelji na sestavinah drevesa volilnega okrožja. Nato predstavljamo dva pristopa k kodiranju mreže volilnega okrožja z uporabo BiLSTM-CRF in BERT kot osnovnega modela. Za vrednotenje obeh modelov smo eksperimentirali na dveh referenčnih naborih podatkov, rezultati pa potrjujejo njihovo superiornost z ustreznimi 3,17 in 1,35 točkami, pridobljenimi v F1-Measure v primerjavi s trenutnim stanjem tehnike. Izboljšave upravičujejo učinkovitost mreže volilnega okrožja za ekstrakcijo vidikov.', 'he': 'אחד האתגרים הנותרים לחילוץ מונח האפקט בניתוח הרגשות נמצאים בחילוץ מונחי האפקט ברמה המשפטים, שהוא לא טריוויאלי כדי לקבוע את הגבולות של המונחים כאלה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתכוונים להתמודד עם הנושא הזה בכך שאנו מכילים את הערות של המרכיבים של משפט כדי להשתמש במידע הסינטקטי בדוגמנים של רשת עצבית. למטרה זו, קודם נבנה מבנה של מחוז הבחירות שמבוסס על המבנים של עץ מחוז הבחירות. ואז, אנחנו מציגים שתי גישות לקוד את המחוז הבחירי באמצעות BiLSTM-CRF ו-BERT כדוגמנים בסיסיים, בהתאם. ניסינו על שני קבוצות נתונים בנסיון כדי להעריך את שני הדוגמנים, והתוצאות מאשרות את העליון שלהם עם 3.17 ו-1.35 נקודות המתאימות ב-F1-Measure על המצב הנוכחי של האמנות. השיפורים מצדיקים את יעילותו של מחוז הבחירות לחלץ מונח מבט.', 'bo': 'སེམས་ཚོར་བརྟན་པར་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཚུར་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་ཚོར་ཚུལ་མཐུན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་འཆར འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཚང་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པ་དང་། མཐའ་མ་དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོས་ནས་ངེས་ཚོང་མཐའ་དབུགས་རྩིས་བ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་constituency་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་BiLSTM-CRF་དང་། BERT ལ་རྨས་གཞི་མིག་དཔེ་བར་སྤྱོད་པའི་approaches གཉིས་འཆར་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཟིན་བྱང་གི་གཟུགས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ནང་ལས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ཡར་རྒྱས་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་ཚད་ཕྱིར་བསྒྲགས་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་ཉེན་སྒྲིག་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'A Dataset and Evaluation Framework for Complex Geographical Description Parsing', 'ar': 'مجموعة بيانات وإطار تقييم لتحليل الوصف الجغرافي المعقد', 'pt': 'Um conjunto de dados e estrutura de avaliação para análise de descrição geográfica complexa', 'es': 'Un marco de evaluación y conjunto de datos para el análisis de descripciones geográficas complejas', 'fr': "Un ensemble de données et un cadre d'évaluation pour l'analyse de descriptions géographiques complexes", 'ja': '複雑な地理的説明の解析のためのデータセットと評価フレームワーク', 'zh': '杂地理描述解析数集评框架', 'hi': 'जटिल भौगोलिक विवरण पार्सिंग के लिए एक डेटासेट और मूल्यांकन फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'Набор данных и система оценки для анализа сложных географических описаний', 'ga': 'Tacar Sonraí agus Creat Meastóireachta le haghaidh Parsáil Cur Síos Geografach Coimpléascach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Adatkészlet és értékelési keret a komplex földrajzi leírások értelmezéséhez', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων και πλαίσιο αξιολόγησης για την ανάλυση σύνθετων γεωγραφικών περιγραφών', 'kk': 'Комплекс географиялық сипаттамасын талдау үшін деректер қорлары мен оқу фрейміName', 'it': "Un dataset e un quadro di valutazione per l'analisi di descrizioni geografiche complesse", 'lt': 'Kompleksinio geografinio aprašymo analizavimo duomenų rinkinys ir vertinimo sistema', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'കോമ്പ്ലെക്സ് ജിയോഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റും വിവരണം', 'mt': 'Sett ta’ Dejta u Qafas ta’ Evalwazzjoni għall-Analiżi Komplessa tad-Deskrizzjoni Ġeografika', 'mn': 'Комплекс Географик тодорхойлолтын өгөгдлийн сан болон үнэлэх хэлбэр', 'ro': 'Un set de date și un cadru de evaluare pentru analizarea descrierii geografice complexe', 'pl': 'Zestaw danych i ramy oceny złożonego opisu geograficznego', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Pregled kompleksnog geografskog opisa podataka i procjene', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En datauppsättning och utvärderingsram för komplex geografisk beskrivning tolkning', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Barsing', 'ta': 'Name', 'mk': 'A Dataset and Evaluation Framework for Complex Geographical Description Parsing', 'vi': 'Mô tả địa lý phức tạp phân tích mô tả', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Een dataset en evaluatiekader voor complexe geografische beschrijvingen', 'bg': 'Набор от данни и рамка за оценка на комплексното географско описание', 'da': 'Et datasæt og evalueringsramme for kompleks geografisk beskrivelse Parsing', 'id': 'A Dataset and Evaluation Framework for Complex Geographical Description Parsing', 'hr': 'Pregled kompleksnog geografskog opisa podataka i procjene', 'de': 'Ein Datensatz und Evaluierungsrahmen für komplexe geografische Beschreibung Parsing', 'sw': 'Miundombi ya Maelezo na Uthibitisho kwa ajili ya Maelezo ya Geografia ya Komplex', 'ko': '복잡한 지리 묘사 해석 데이터 집합과 평가 프레임워크', 'tr': 'Complex Geografik Wasp Parlamak üçin Maglumat we Taýýarlama Framesi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një bazë të dhënash dhe kuadri vlerësimi për analizimin e përshkrimit gjeografik kompleks', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Komplex Geografik T…ôfsil…ôndirm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn Verici QurńüularńĪ v…ô Q…ôrcl…ôm…ô Framework', 'fa': 'Name', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': "Un marc de dades i d'evaluació per a l'analització geogràfica complexa de descripció", 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'bs': 'Pregled kompleksnog geografskog opisa podataka i procjene', 'cs': 'Dataset a hodnotící rámec pro komplexní analýzu geografického popisu', 'et': 'Keerulise geograafilise kirjelduse parsimise andmekogum ja hindamisraamistik', 'fi': 'Monimutkaisen maantieteellisen kuvauksen analysoinnin tietojoukko- ja arviointikehys', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'מסגר נתונים ומערכת עבור מערכת תיאור גאוגרפי מורכבת', 'sk': 'Zbirka podatkov in okvir ocenjevanja kompleksnih geografskih opisov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Complex Geographical Description Parsing'}
{'en': 'Much previous work on geoparsing has focused on identifying and resolving individual toponyms in text like Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia or Catania. However, geographical locations occur not only as individual toponyms, but also as compositions of reference geolocations joined and modified by connectives, e.g.,. between the towns of Adrano and S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometres northwest of Catania. Ideally, a geoparser should be able to take such text, and the geographical shapes of the toponyms referenced within it, and parse these into a geographical shape, formed by a set of coordinates, that represents the location described. But creating a dataset for this complex geoparsing task is difficult and, if done manually, would require a huge amount of effort to annotate the geographical shapes of not only the geolocation described but also the reference toponyms. We present an approach that automates most of the process by combining Wikipedia and OpenStreetMap. As a result, we have gathered a collection of 360,187 uncurated complex geolocation descriptions, from which we have manually curated 1,000 examples intended to be used as a test set. To accompany the data, we define a new geoparsing evaluation framework along with a scoring methodology and a set of baselines.', 'fr': "De nombreux travaux antérieurs sur le géoparsing se sont concentrés sur l'identification et la résolution de toponymes individuels dans des textes tels que Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ou Catania. Cependant, les emplacements géographiques apparaissent non seulement en tant que toponymes individuels, mais également en tant que compositions de géolocalisations de référence jointes et modifiées par des liens, par exemple «... entre les villes d'Adrano et de S.Maria di Licodia, à 32 kilomètres au nord-ouest de Catane\xa0». Idéalement, un géoparseur devrait être capable de prendre ce texte et les formes géographiques des toponymes référencés dans celui-ci, et de les analyser en une forme géographique, formée par un ensemble de coordonnées, qui représente l'emplacement décrit. Mais la création d'un jeu de données pour cette tâche complexe de géoanalyse est difficile et, si elle est effectuée manuellement, cela demanderait un effort énorme pour annoter les formes géographiques non seulement de la géolocalisation décrite, mais également des toponymes de référence. Nous présentons une approche qui automatise la plupart du processus en combinant Wikipédia et OpenStreetMap. En conséquence, nous avons rassemblé une collection de 360 187 descriptions de géolocalisation complexes non sélectionnées, à partir desquelles nous avons sélectionné manuellement 1 000 exemples destinés à être utilisés comme ensemble de test. Pour accompagner les données, nous définissons un nouveau cadre d'évaluation de géoanalyse ainsi qu'une méthodologie de notation et un ensemble de références.", 'ar': 'ركز الكثير من العمل السابق على الجغرافيا على تحديد وحل الأسماء الجغرافية الفردية في نص مثل Adrano أو S.Maria di Licodia أو Catania. ومع ذلك ، فإن المواقع الجغرافية لا تحدث فقط كأسماء جغرافية فردية ، ولكن أيضًا كتراكيب من المواقع الجغرافية المرجعية التي تم ربطها وتعديلها بواسطة الوصلات ، على سبيل المثال ، ". . . بين مدينتي Adrano و S.Maria di Licodia ، على بعد 32 كيلومترًا شمال غرب كاتانيا ". من الناحية المثالية ، يجب أن يكون خبير الجغرافيا قادرًا على أخذ مثل هذا النص والأشكال الجغرافية للأسماء الجغرافية المشار إليها بداخله ، وتحليلها في شكل جغرافي ، مكون من مجموعة من الإحداثيات ، والتي تمثل الموقع الموصوف. لكن إنشاء مجموعة بيانات لهذه المهمة الجغرافية المعقدة أمر صعب ، وإذا تم إجراؤه يدويًا ، فسوف يتطلب قدرًا كبيرًا من الجهد لتوضيح الأشكال الجغرافية ليس فقط للموقع الجغرافي الموصوف ولكن أيضًا للأسماء الجغرافية المرجعية. نقدم نهجًا يعمل على أتمتة معظم العملية من خلال الجمع بين Wikipedia و OpenStreetMap. نتيجة لذلك ، قمنا بتجميع مجموعة من 360،187 أوصافًا معقدة لتحديد الموقع الجغرافي غير المشبعة ، والتي قمنا من خلالها برعاية 1000 مثال يدويًا بغرض استخدامها كمجموعة اختبار. لمرافقة البيانات ، نحدد إطارًا جديدًا لتقييم الجغرافيا جنبًا إلى جنب مع منهجية تسجيل النقاط ومجموعة من الخطوط الأساسية.', 'es': 'Gran parte del trabajo anterior sobre geoanálisis se ha centrado en identificar y resolver topónimos individuales en textos como Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia o Catania. Sin embargo, las ubicaciones geográficas se presentan no solo como topónimos individuales, sino también como composiciones de geolocalizaciones de referencia unidas y modificadas por conectivos, por ejemplo, «.. entre las ciudades de Adrano y S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilómetros al noroeste de Catania». Idealmente, un geoanalizador debería ser capaz de tomar dicho texto, y las formas geográficas de los topónimos a los que se hace referencia en él, y analizarlos en una forma geográfica, formada por un conjunto de coordenadas, que represente la ubicación descrita. Pero crear un conjunto de datos para esta compleja tarea de geoanálisis es difícil y, si se hace manualmente, requeriría un gran esfuerzo para anotar las formas geográficas no solo de la geolocalización descrita sino también de los topónimos de referencia. Presentamos un enfoque que automatiza la mayor parte del proceso al combinar Wikipedia y OpenStreetMap. Como resultado, hemos recopilado una colección de 360,187 descripciones de geolocalización complejas sin seleccionar, de las cuales hemos seleccionado manualmente 1000 ejemplos destinados a usarse como conjunto de pruebas. Para acompañar los datos, definimos un nuevo marco de evaluación de geoanálisis junto con una metodología de puntuación y un conjunto de líneas de base.', 'pt': 'Muitos trabalhos anteriores sobre geoanálise se concentraram na identificação e resolução de topônimos individuais em texto como Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ou Catania. No entanto, as localizações geográficas ocorrem não apenas como topônimos individuais, mas também como composições de geolocalizações de referência unidas e modificadas por conectivos, por exemplo, “. . . entre as cidades de Adrano e S.Maria di Licodia, 32 quilômetros a noroeste de Catania”. Idealmente, um geoparser deve ser capaz de pegar tal texto, e as formas geográficas dos topônimos referenciados dentro dele, e analisá-los em uma forma geográfica, formada por um conjunto de coordenadas, que representa o local descrito. Mas criar um conjunto de dados para essa complexa tarefa de geoanálise é difícil e, se feito manualmente, exigiria um grande esforço para anotar as formas geográficas não apenas da geolocalização descrita, mas também dos topônimos de referência. Apresentamos uma abordagem que automatiza a maior parte do processo combinando Wikipedia e OpenStreetMap. Como resultado, reunimos uma coleção de 360.187 descrições de geolocalização complexas não curadas, das quais selecionamos manualmente 1.000 exemplos destinados a serem usados como um conjunto de teste. Para acompanhar os dados, definimos uma nova estrutura de avaliação de geoanálise juntamente com uma metodologia de pontuação e um conjunto de linhas de base.', 'ja': 'ジオパーシングに関するこれまでの研究の多くは、Adrano、S.Maria di Licodia、Cataniaのようなテキスト内の個々の地名を特定し、解決することに焦点を当てています。 しかし、地理的位置は、個々の地名としてだけでなく、「カターニアの北西32キロにあるアドラーノとS.Maria di Licodiaの町の間」などの接続によって結合され、変更された基準地理位置の構成としても発生します。 理想的には、ジオパーサは、そのようなテキスト、およびその中で参照される地名の地理的形状を取り出し、説明された場所を表す座標の集合によって形成される地理的形状にそれらを解析することができるはずである。 しかし、この複雑な地理解析タスクのためのデータセットを作成するのは困難であり、手動で行うと、説明されている地理的位置だけでなく、参照地名の地理的形状に注釈を付けるのに多大な労力が必要になります。 WikipediaとOpenStreetMapを組み合わせることで、ほとんどのプロセスを自動化するアプローチを提示しています。 その結果、360,187件の未キュレーションの複雑な地理的位置情報の説明のコレクションを収集し、そこからテストセットとして使用することを意図した1,000件の例を手動でキュレーションしました。 データに付随して、スコアリング方法論と一連のベースラインとともに、新しい地理解析評価フレームワークを定義します。', 'zh': '前地理分析多集识解单名,如Adrano,S.Maria di LicodiaCatania。 然则地位非特别名也,且为连接词连改之参定,如"...... 在卡塔尼亚西北32公里阿德拉诺镇、圣玛丽亚迪利科迪亚镇之间"。 地理分析员当得此文本及所引地名地理形状,并以其解析为坐标形,状为位。 然杂地理分析创数集甚难,若手动成,不惟多事注地形,又须注参地形。 建一法,合维基百科OpenStreetMap以自动化其大者。 是以收拾360,187未经cued杂,手动谋1,000旨以测试集示例。 合数定义地理分析评框架及评分法与一组基线。', 'hi': 'Geoparsing पर बहुत पिछले काम की पहचान और Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia या Catania जैसे पाठ में व्यक्तिगत toponyms को हल करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है. हालांकि, भौगोलिक स्थान न केवल व्यक्तिगत टोपोनिम के रूप में होते हैं, बल्कि संदर्भ जियोलोकेशन की रचनाओं के रूप में भी होते हैं और संयोजी द्वारा संशोधित किए जाते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, "। Adrano और S.Maria di Licodia के शहरों के बीच, Catania के उत्तर-पश्चिम में 32 किलोमीटर की दूरी पर"। आदर्श रूप से, एक जियोपर्सर को इस तरह के पाठ को लेने में सक्षम होना चाहिए, और इसके भीतर संदर्भित टोपोनिम्स के भौगोलिक आकार, और इन्हें एक भौगोलिक आकार में पार्स करना चाहिए, जो निर्देशांक के एक सेट द्वारा गठित होता है, जो वर्णित स्थान का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। लेकिन इस जटिल जियोपार्सिंग कार्य के लिए एक डेटासेट बनाना मुश्किल है और, यदि मैन्युअल रूप से किया जाता है, तो न केवल वर्णित जियोलोकेशन के भौगोलिक आकारों को एनोटेट करने के लिए बड़ी मात्रा में प्रयास की आवश्यकता होगी, बल्कि संदर्भ टोपोनिम भी। हम एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो विकिपीडिया और OpenStreetMap के संयोजन से अधिकांश प्रक्रिया को स्वचालित करता है। नतीजतन, हमने 360,187 अनक्यूरेटेड जटिल जियोलोकेशन विवरणों का एक संग्रह एकत्र किया है, जिसमें से हमने मैन्युअल रूप से 1,000 उदाहरणों को एक परीक्षण सेट के रूप में उपयोग करने का इरादा किया है। डेटा के साथ जाने के लिए, हम एक स्कोरिंग पद्धति और बेसलाइन के एक सेट के साथ एक नए जियोपार्सिंग मूल्यांकन ढांचे को परिभाषित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Большая часть предыдущей работы по геопарсингу была сосредоточена на идентификации и разрешении отдельных топонимов в тексте, таких как Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia или Catania. Однако географические местоположения встречаются не только в виде отдельных топонимов, но и в виде композиций опорных геолокаций, соединенных и модифицированных связующими элементами, например, «... между городами Адрано и С.Мария-ди-Ликодия, в 32 км к северо-западу от Катании». В идеале, геопарсер должен быть в состоянии взять такой текст и географические формы топонимов, на которые он ссылается, и проанализировать их в географическую форму, образованную набором координат, который представляет описанное местоположение. Но создать набор данных для этой сложной задачи геопарсинга сложно и, если сделать это вручную, потребует огромных усилий, чтобы аннотировать географические фигуры не только описанной геолокации, но и эталонных топонимов. Мы представляем подход, который автоматизирует большую часть процесса, объединив Википедию и OpenStreetMap. В результате мы собрали коллекцию из 360 187 непроверенных сложных описаний геолокации, из которых мы вручную собрали 1000 примеров, предназначенных для использования в качестве тестового набора. Для сопровождения данных мы определяем новую систему оценки геопарсинга наряду с методологией подсчета баллов и набором исходных данных.', 'ga': 'Dhírigh go leor oibre roimhe seo ar gheopharsáil ar thopainmneacha aonair i dtéacs mar Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia nó Catania a aithint agus a réiteach. Mar sin féin, tarlaíonn suíomhanna geografacha ní hamháin mar thopainmneacha aonair, ach freisin mar chomhdhéanamh geoshuímh tagartha a nascann naisc agus a modhnaítear iad, m.sh., “. . . idir bailte Adrano agus S.Maria di Licodia, 32 ciliméadar siar ó thuaidh ó Catania”. Go hidéalach, ba cheart go mbeadh geoparsálaí in ann téacs den sórt sin, agus cruthanna geografacha na n-ainmneacha atá luaite ann, a ghlacadh agus iad a pharsáil i gcruth geografach, arna fhoirmiú ag sraith comhordanáidí, a sheasann don suíomh a gcuirtear síos air. Ach tá sé deacair tacar sonraí a chruthú don tasc casta geoparsála seo agus, dá ndéanfaí é de láimh, bheadh gá le hiarracht ollmhór chun cruthanna geografacha ní amháin ar an ngeoshuíomh a gcuirtear síos air ach ar na toponyms tagartha a chur in iúl freisin. Cuirimid cur chuige i láthair a uathoibríonn an chuid is mó den phróiseas trí Vicipéid agus OpenStreetMap a chomhcheangal. Mar thoradh air sin, tá bailiúchán de 360,187 cur síos geolocation casta neamhchoimeádta bailithe againn, as a ndearnamar coimeád de láimh ar 1,000 sampla a bheartaítear a úsáid mar thacar tástála. Le dul leis na sonraí, sainímid creatlach meastóireachta geoparsála nua mar aon le modheolaíocht scórála agus sraith bonnlínte.', 'el': 'Πολλές προηγούμενες εργασίες για τη γεωχαρτογράφηση έχουν επικεντρωθεί στον εντοπισμό και την επίλυση μεμονωμένων τοπωνύμων σε κείμενα όπως Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ή Κατάνια. Ωστόσο, οι γεωγραφικές τοποθεσίες εμφανίζονται όχι μόνο ως μεμονωμένα τοπωνύμια, αλλά και ως συνθέσεις γεωτοποθεσιών αναφοράς που ενώνονται και τροποποιούνται από συνδετικά στοιχεία, π.χ. ".... μεταξύ των πόλεων Adrano και S.Maria di Licodia, 32 χιλιόμετρα βορειοδυτικά της Κατάνης". Ιδανικά, ένας γεωχαρτογράφος θα πρέπει να είναι σε θέση να λάβει τέτοιο κείμενο, και τα γεωγραφικά σχήματα των τοπωνύμων που αναφέρονται μέσα σε αυτό, και να τα αναλύσει σε ένα γεωγραφικό σχήμα, το οποίο σχηματίζεται από ένα σύνολο συντεταγμένων, που αντιπροσωπεύει την τοποθεσία που περιγράφεται. Αλλά η δημιουργία ενός συνόλου δεδομένων για αυτό το πολύπλοκο έργο γεωχαρτογράφησης είναι δύσκολη και, αν γίνει χειροκίνητα, θα απαιτούσε τεράστια προσπάθεια για να σχολιαστούν τα γεωγραφικά σχήματα όχι μόνο της περιγραφόμενης γεωθέσης αλλά και των τοπονόμων αναφοράς. Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση που αυτοματοποιεί το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της διαδικασίας συνδυάζοντας Βικιπαίδεια και OpenStreetMap. Ως αποτέλεσμα, έχουμε συγκεντρώσει μια συλλογή από 360.187 ακόρεστες σύνθετες περιγραφές γεωθέσης, από τις οποίες έχουμε επιμελέσει χειροκίνητα 1.000 παραδείγματα που προορίζονται να χρησιμοποιηθούν ως δοκιμαστικό σύνολο. Για να συνοδεύσουμε τα δεδομένα, καθορίζουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο αξιολόγησης γεωχαρτογράφησης μαζί με μια μεθοδολογία βαθμολόγησης και ένα σύνολο βασικών γραμμών.', 'ka': 'ძალიან წინა მუშაობა ჯეოპასუზაციის განსაზღვრებისთვის და განსაზღვრებისთვის ტექსტის განსაზღვრებისთვის, როგორც Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ან Catania. მაგრამ გეგოფიკალური ადგილდება არა მხოლოდ როგორც ინდივეტური ტოპონიმები, მაგრამ როგორც რეფერენტური გეოლოკაციების კომპონიციები, როგორც დაკავშირებული და შეცვლებული კ ადრანოს და S.მარია დი ლიკოდიაში, 32 კილომეტრი ჩრდილო დასავლეთ კატანიაში. Ideally, a geoparser should be able to take such text, and the geographical shapes of the toponyms referenced within it, and parse these into a geographical form, formed by a set of coordinates, which represents the location described. მაგრამ ამ კომპლექსიკური გეოპასტირების მონაცემების შექმნა ძალიან რთულია და თუ ხელსახულად გავაკეთებული, შესაძლებელია ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გამოსახულება, რომელი ჩვენ გაჩვენებთ პროცესის უფრო მეტის ავტომატურება ვიკიპედია და OpenStreetMap. შემდეგ, ჩვენ 360 187 კომპლექსიკოლექსიკოლექსიკოლექსიკოლექციის გამოსახულებების კოლექციაციას დავყენეთ, რომლიდან ჩვენ ხელსახურად აკეთებული 1000 მაგალითი მაგალითები მონაცემების დამატებისთვის, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით ახალი გეოპასუზაციის განსაზღვრების ფრამეტრი დამატებით მონაცემების მეტოლოგია და ბაზონული ხაზები.', 'hu': 'A korábbi geopárzással foglalkozó sok munka az egyes toponómok azonosítására és feloldására összpontosított szövegekben, mint Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia vagy Catania. A földrajzi elhelyezkedések azonban nem csak egyedi toponímként jelennek meg, hanem a kapcsolódók által összekapcsolt és módosított referencia-földrajzi helyek összetételének is, pl.: "... Adrano és S.Maria di Licodia városai között, Cataniától 32 kilométerre északnyugatra". Ideális esetben egy geopárosnak képesnek kell lennie az ilyen szöveget és a benne hivatkozott toponómok földrajzi alakjait felvenni, és ezeket egy koordináták halmazából álló földrajzi alakzatba elemezni, amely a leírt helyet jelenti. De ehhez az összetett geopárzási feladathoz egy adatkészlet létrehozása nehéz, és ha manuálisan végezzük el, óriási erőfeszítést igényelne ahhoz, hogy ne csak a leírt földrajzi helyszín, hanem a referencia toponímek földrajzi formáit is jegyzeteljük. Olyan megközelítést mutatunk be, amely automatizálja a folyamat nagy részét a Wikipédia és az OpenStreetMap kombinációjával. Ennek eredményeképpen összegyűjtöttünk egy 360 187 telítetlen komplex földrajzi helymeghatározás leírásából álló gyűjteményt, amelyből 1000 tesztkészletként szánt példát manuálisan kurátoroztunk. Az adatok kiegészítéséhez új geopárzási értékelési keretet határozunk meg, pontszámítási módszert és egy sor alapkészletet.', 'lt': 'Daugelis ankstesnių geoanalizės darbų sutelkė dėmesį į atskirų toponimų nustatymą ir sprendimą tokiose tekstuose kaip Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia arba Catania. Tačiau geografinės vietos yra ne tik atskiri toponimai, bet ir etaloninių geovietų, jungiamų ir modifikuotų jungtimis, sudėtys, pvz., \'. . tarp Adrano ir S.Maria di Licodia miestų, 32 km į šiaurės vakarus nuo Katanijos". Idealiai, geoanalizatorius turėtų turėti galimybę priimti tokį tekstą ir jame nurodytų toponimų geografines formas ir juos išanalizuoti į geografinę formą, kurią sudaro koordinačių rinkinys, atitinkantis aprašytą vietą. Tačiau sudėtinga sukurti duomenų rinkinį šiai sudėtingai geoanalizei atlikti ir, jei tai būtų daroma rankiniu būdu, būtų reikalingos didelės pastangos ne tik apibūdintos geolokacijos, bet ir referencinių toponimų geografinėms formoms anotuoti. Mes pristatome metodą, kuris automatizuoja daugumą proceso derinant Wikipedia ir OpenStreetMap. Todėl surinkėme 360 187 netikslių sudėtingų geolokacijos aprašymų rinkinį, iš kurio rankiniu būdu surinkėme 1 000 pavyzdžių, skirtų naudoti kaip bandymų rinkinį. Kartu su duomenimis apibrėžiame naują geoanalizavimo vertinimo sistemą kartu su vertinimo metodika ir bazinių linijų rinkiniu.', 'it': 'Molto lavoro precedente sul geoparsing si è concentrato sull\'identificazione e la risoluzione di singoli toponimi in testi come Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia o Catania. Tuttavia, le posizioni geografiche si presentano non solo come toponimi individuali, ma anche come composizioni di geolocalizzazioni di riferimento unite e modificate da connettivi, ad esempio: "... Tra le località di Adrano e S.Maria di Licodia, 32 chilometri a nord ovest di Catania". Idealmente, un geoparser dovrebbe essere in grado di prendere tale testo, e le forme geografiche dei toponimi cui si fa riferimento al suo interno, e analizzarli in una forma geografica, formata da un insieme di coordinate, che rappresenta la posizione descritta. Ma creare un dataset per questo complesso compito di geoparsing è difficile e, se fatto manualmente, richiederebbe un enorme sforzo per annotare le forme geografiche non solo della geolocalizzazione descritta ma anche dei toponimi di riferimento. Presentiamo un approccio che automatizza la maggior parte del processo combinando Wikipedia e OpenStreetMap. Di conseguenza, abbiamo raccolto una raccolta di 360.187 descrizioni di geolocalizzazione complesse non sature, da cui abbiamo curato manualmente 1.000 esempi destinati ad essere utilizzati come set di test. Per accompagnare i dati, definiamo un nuovo framework di valutazione del geoparsing insieme a una metodologia di punteggio e una serie di linee di riferimento.', 'ms': "Banyak kerja sebelumnya dalam penghuraian geo telah fokus pada pengenalan dan penyelesaian toponym individu dalam teks seperti Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia atau Catania. Namun, lokasi geografik berlaku bukan sahaja sebagai toponym individu, tetapi juga sebagai komposisi lokasi geolokasi rujukan bergabung dan diubahsuai oleh sambungan, misalnya, '. . . antara bandar Adrano dan S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer barat laut Catania '. Idealnya, penghurai geo patut mampu mengambil teks tersebut, dan bentuk geografik toponym yang direferensikan di dalamnya, dan hurai ke bentuk geografik, bentuk oleh set koordinat, yang mewakili lokasi yang diterangkan. Tetapi mencipta set data untuk tugas penghuraian geo kompleks ini adalah sukar dan, jika dilakukan secara manual, akan memerlukan banyak usaha untuk anotasi bentuk geografi bukan sahaja geolokasi yang diterangkan tetapi juga toponym rujukan. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan yang automatisikan sebahagian besar proses dengan menggabungkan Wikipedia dan OpenStreetMap. Sebagai hasilnya, kami telah mengumpulkan koleksi 360,187 deskripsi geolokasi kompleks yang tidak ditetapkan, dari mana kami telah mengumpulkan secara manual 1,000 contoh yang dimaksudkan untuk digunakan sebagai set ujian. Untuk menyertai data, kami takrifkan rangkaian penghuraian geo baru bersama metodologi penghuraian dan set garis dasar.", 'ml': 'ഭൂപാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വളരെ മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയുണ്ടായി എങ്കിലും ഭൂഗ്രാഗ്രാഫിക സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്നത് വ്യക്തിപരമായ ടോപോണിമുകള്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല, മറ്റുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്ന് മാറ്റിയി അഡ്രാനോയും എസ്മാരിയ ഡി ലികോഡിയ, കാട്ടാനിയയുടെ വടക്ക് 32 കിലോമീറ്റര്\u200d ഒരു ജോഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഇത്തരം പദാവലിയും അതിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d വിവരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ടോപ്പോണിമുകളുടെ ഭൂഗ്രാഗ്രാഫിക രൂപത്തിലേക്ക് പാര പക്ഷെ ഈ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ജോപാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ്. കൈയ്യൂക്ക് ചെയ്താല്\u200d, വിവരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഭൂമിയ വിക്കിപിഡിയയെയും ഓപ്പോണ്\u200dസ്ട്രീറ്റ് മാപ്പിനെയും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dത്ത് കൊണ്ട് പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും സ് അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 360,187 പ്രശ്നമില്ലാത്ത സ്ഥല വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു സംഘത്തെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d നിന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരീക വിവരങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഒരു പുതിയ ജോപ്പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ വില വിലയ്ക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നാം നിര്\u200dണയി', 'mt': "Ħafna ħidmiet preċedenti dwar il-ġeopartizzazzjoni ffukaw fuq l-identifikazzjoni u r-riżoluzzjoni ta’ toponimi individwali f’test bħal Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia jew Catania. Madankollu, il-postijiet ġeografiċi jseħħu mhux biss bħala toponimi individwali, iżda wkoll bħala kompożizzjonijiet ta’ ġeolokazzjonijiet ta’ referenza magħquda u modifikati minn konnettivi, pereżempju, '. . . bejn l-ibliet ta’ Adrano u S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometru fit-tramuntana ta’ Catania”. Ideally, a geoparser should be able to take such text, and the geographical shapes of the toponyms referenced within it, and parse these into a geographical shape, formed by a set of coordinates, that represents the location described.  Iżda l-ħolqien ta’ sett ta’ dejta għal dan il-kompitu kumpless ta’ ġeopartizzazzjoni huwa diffiċli u, jekk isir manwalment, ikun jeħtieġ ammont kbir ta’ sforz biex jiġu annotati l-forom ġeografiċi mhux biss tal-ġeolokazzjoni deskritta iżda wkoll tat-toponimi ta’ referenza. Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ li jawtomatizza l-biċċa l-kbira tal-proċess billi nikkombinaw il-Wikipedia u l-OpenStreetMap. B’riżultat ta’ dan, ġabrejna ġabra ta’ 360 187 deskrizzjoni kumplessa mhux ikkurata tal-ġeolokazzjoni, li minnha kkurati b’mod manwali 1,000 eżempju maħsuba biex jintużaw bħala sett ta’ testijiet. Biex takkumpanja d-dejta, niddefinixxu qafas ġdid ta’ evalwazzjoni tal-ġeopartizzazzjoni flimkien ma’ metodoloġija ta’ punteġġ u sett ta’ linji bażi.", 'mk': "Much previous work on geoparsing has focused on identifying and resolving individual toponyms in text like Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia or Catania.  Сепак, географските локации се појавуваат не само како индивидуални топоними, туку и како композиции на референциските геолокации кои се приклучени и модификувани од врски, на пример, '. . помеѓу градовите Адрано и С.Марија ди Ликодија, 32 километри северозападно од Катанија“. Идеално, геоператорот треба да може да го земе ваков текст, и географските облики на топонимовите кои се референцираат во него, и да ги анализира во географска форма, формирана од сет координати, која ја претставува опишаната локација. Но, создавањето на набор на податоци за оваа комплексна геоперативна задача е тешко и, ако се направи рачно, ќе бара огромно напори за да се анотираат географските облики не само на опишаната геолокација, туку и на референтните топоними. Презентираме пристап кој автоматизира повеќето од процесот со комбинација на Википедија и OpenStreetMap. Како резултат на тоа, собравме колекција од 360.187 непрочистени комплексни геолокациски описи, од кои рачно куриравме 1.000 примери наменети да се користат како тест сет. To accompany the data, we define a new geoparsing evaluation framework along with a scoring methodology and a set of baselines.", 'no': 'Mange førre arbeid på geoanalysering har fokusert på identifisering og løysing av individuelle toponymmer i teksten som Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia eller Catania. Den geografiske staden gjer imidlertid ikkje berre som individuelle toponymmer, men også som samlingar av referanse geolokasjonar som er tilkopla og endra av tilkoplingar, f.eks. « . » . mellom byene i Adrano og S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer nordvest av Katania. Ideelt må ein geoanalyser kunna ta slik tekst, og dei geografiske formane av toponymmene som er refererte inni det, og tolka desse inn i eit geografisk form, som er formert av eit sett koordinata, som representerer adressa som er beskriven. Men å laga ein dataset for denne komplekse geoanalyseringsoppgåva er vanskeleg, og dersom det er gjort manuelt, vil kreve ein stor mykje forsøk for å oppmerka geografiske formar av ikkje berre geoplasseringa som er beskriven, men også referanstoponymmene. Vi presenterer ein tilnærming som automatiserer dei fleste av prosessen ved å kombinere Wikipedia og OpenStreetMap. I resultatet har vi samla eit samling av 360 187 ukryrte komplekse geoplasseringar, frå som vi har manuelt korrigert 1000 eksemplar som skal brukast som testsett. For å komme til data, definerer vi eit nytt geoanalyseringsevalueringsrammeverk saman med ein scoring-metodologi og eit sett baselinjer.', 'pl': 'Wiele wcześniejszych prac nad geoparsingiem skupiało się na identyfikacji i rozwiązywaniu poszczególnych toponimów w tekście takim jak Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia czy Katania. Położenia geograficzne występują jednak nie tylko jako poszczególne toponimy, ale także jako składy geolokalizacji referencyjnych połączonych i modyfikowanych za pomocą łączników, np. "... między miastami Adrano i S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometry na północny zachód od Katanii". Idealnie, geoparser powinien być w stanie przyjąć taki tekst i kształty geograficzne toponimów, do których się odwołuje, i przeanalizować je w kształt geograficzny, utworzony przez zestaw współrzędnych, reprezentujący opisaną lokalizację. Jednak stworzenie zbioru danych dla tego złożonego zadania geoparsingowego jest trudne i, jeśli wykonane ręcznie, wymagałoby ogromnego wysiłku, aby adnotacja kształtów geograficznych nie tylko opisanej geolokalizacji, ale także toponimów referencyjnych. Prezentujemy podejście, które automatyzuje większość procesu poprzez połączenie Wikipedii i OpenStreetMap. W rezultacie zebraliśmy kolekcję 360.187 nienasyconych złożonych opisów geolokalizacji, z których ręcznie kuratorowaliśmy 1.000 przykładów przeznaczonych do wykorzystania jako zestaw testowy. Aby towarzyszyć danym, definiujemy nowe ramy oceny geoparsingowej wraz z metodologią punktowania i zestawem linii bazowych.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх геоперализацийн олон ажил Адрано, S.Maria di Licodia эсвэл Катания зэрэг хэн нэгнийг тодорхойлж, шийдвэрлэхэд төвлөрсөн. Гэвч географик байр нь зөвхөн ганц топоним шиг биш, мөн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой, өөрчлөгдсөн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой хо Адрано болон С.Мариа ди Ликодиас хоорондын хооронд 32 километр Катаниас хойд байна. Одоо хэлбэл геоператор ийм текст болон түүний дотор холбогдсон топонимуудын газрын хэлбэрийг ашиглаж, эдгээрийг газрын хэлбэрт хуваалцаж, тодорхойлж буй газрын хэлбэрээр бүтээсэн координатуудын хэлбэрээр дүрсл Гэхдээ энэ комплекс географийн ажил дээр өгөгдлийн санг бүтээх нь хэцүү. Хэрвээ гараар хийсэн бол зөвхөн географийн хэлбэрүүдийн газрын хэлбэрүүдийг тайлбарлахын тулд маш их хүч хэрэгтэй. Бид Википедиа болон OpenStreetMap холбоотой ихэнх үйл явцыг автоматжуулдаг арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүнээс бид 360 187 төвөгтэй географийн тодорхойлолтуудыг цуглуулсан бөгөөд үүнээс гараараа 1000 жишээг шалгалт хэмжээнд хэрэглэгдэх хэрэгтэй. Бид өгөгдлийн хамт ажиллахын тулд шинэ геоперационы үнэлгээ дүгнэх хэмжээсүүдийг scoring methodology болон суурь шулуунуудыг тодорхойлдог.', 'kk': "Геопализацияның бірнеше өткен жұмыс адрано, S. Maria di Licodia немесе Катания секілді мәтіндегі топонимдерді анықтау мен шешу үшін көптеген. Бірақ географиялық орналасуы тек жеке топонимдер ретінде емес, сондай-ақ сілтемелер географиялық орналасуын қосып, қосылымдардан өзгертілген, мысалы, '. . . Адрано мен С.Мария ди Ликодия қалаларының арасында 32 километр солтүстік батыс Катанияның ортасында. Идеялық, геопарзер мәтінді және оның ішінде сілтейтін топонимдердің географиялық пішіндерін алып, оларды географиялық пішінде талдап, анықталған орналасқан координаттар жиынынан құрылады. Бірақ осы комплекс геопализациялау тапсырмасының деректер қорын құру қиын. Егер қолмен жасалған болса, оның географиялық пішіндері тек анықталған географиялық түрінде емес, сондай-ақ сілтеме топонимдеріне қара Біз Википедия мен OpenStreetMap және процестің көпшілігін автоматты түрде біріктіреді. Сонымен біз 360 187 комплекс географиялық түрлендірілмеген жинақтарын жинақтадық. Бұдан қолмен 1000 мысалдарды сынақтар жинағы ретінде қолданылатын. Мәліметтерді қолдану үшін, біз жұмыс методологиясы мен негізгі жолдардың жаңа геопализациялау бағдарламасын анықтаймыз.", 'ro': 'Multe lucrări anterioare privind geoparsing s-au concentrat pe identificarea și rezolvarea toponimelor individuale în text precum Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia sau Catania. Cu toate acestea, locațiile geografice apar nu numai ca toponime individuale, ci și ca compoziții de geolocații de referință unite și modificate de conective, de exemplu, "... între orașele Adrano și S.Maria di Licodia, la 32 km nord-vest de Catania". În mod ideal, un geoparser ar trebui să fie capabil să ia astfel de text, și formele geografice ale toponimelor la care se face referire în interiorul acestuia, și să le analizeze într-o formă geografică, formată dintr-un set de coordonate, care reprezintă locația descrisă. Dar crearea unui set de date pentru această sarcină complexă de geoparsare este dificilă și, dacă se face manual, ar necesita un efort uriaș pentru a adnota formele geografice nu numai ale localizării descrise, ci și ale toponimelor de referință. Vă prezentăm o abordare care automatizează cea mai mare parte a procesului prin combinarea Wikipedia și OpenStreetMap. Ca rezultat, am adunat o colecție de 360.187 de descrieri complexe de geolocalizare necurate, din care am curățat manual 1.000 de exemple menite să fie utilizate ca set de testare. Pentru a însoți datele, definim un nou cadru de evaluare a geoparsării, împreună cu o metodologie de scoring și un set de linii de referință.', 'sr': "Mnogo prethodnog rada o geoparsiranju fokusiralo se na identifikaciju i rešavanju pojedinih toponima u tekstu kao Adrano, S.Maria di Likodija ili Katanija. Međutim, geografske lokacije se dešavaju ne samo kao individualni toponim, nego i kao sastave referentnih geolokacija koje su pridružile i modifikovali vezama, npr. '. . između gradova Adrana i S.Maria di Likodije, 32 kilometara sjeverozapadnog od Katanije. Idealno, geoanalizator bi trebao biti u stanju da uzme takav tekst, i geografske oblike toponima koje su referencirane unutar nje, i analizira ih u geografski oblik, formiran grupom koordinata, koja predstavlja opisanu lokaciju. Ali stvaranje podataka za ovaj kompleksni geoparsing zadatak je teško i, ako se ručno uradi, zahteva ogromnu količinu napora za annotaciju geografskih oblika ne samo opisanog geolokacije, nego i referentnih toponima. Predstavljamo pristup koji automatski uključuje većinu procesa kombinacijom Wikipedia i OpenStreetMapa. Kao rezultat toga, skupili smo kolekciju od 360.187 neizbeđenih kompleksnih opisa geolokacije, od kojih smo manuelno iskrivili 1000 primjera koji su nameravani da se koriste kao test set a. Da bismo pratili podatke, definirali smo novi okvir za procjenu geoparsing a zajedno sa metodologijom izviđanja i setom osnovnih linija.", 'sv': 'Mycket tidigare arbete med geoparsering har fokuserat på att identifiera och lösa enskilda toponymer i text som Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia eller Catania. Geografiska platser förekommer dock inte bara som enskilda toponymer, utan också som sammansättningar av referensgeografiska platser förenade och modifierade av kopplingar, t.ex. " mellan städerna Adrano och S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer nordväst om Catania". Helst bör en geoparsör kunna ta sådan text, och de geografiska formerna av toponymer som refereras i den, och tolka dessa till en geografisk form, som bildas av en uppsättning koordinater, som representerar den beskrivna platsen. Men att skapa en datauppsättning för denna komplexa geoparseringsuppgift är svårt och, om det görs manuellt, skulle kräva en enorm mängd ansträngning för att kommentera geografiska former inte bara den beskrivna geografiska platsen utan också referenstoponymerna. Vi presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt som automatiserar det mesta av processen genom att kombinera Wikipedia och OpenStreetMap. Som ett resultat har vi samlat en samling av 360 187 omättade komplexa geolokaliseringsbeskrivningar, från vilka vi manuellt har kuraterat 1 000 exempel avsedda att användas som testset. För att komplettera data definierar vi ett nytt ramverk för utvärdering av geoparsing tillsammans med en poängmetod och en uppsättning baslinjer.', 'ur': "جیوپارسینگ کے بارے میں بہت سے پہلے کام آدرانا، س.ماریا دی لیکوڈیا یا کاتانیا کی طرح ایک شخصی ٹوپونیم کی شناسایی اور حل پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ However, geographical locations not only as individual toponyms, but also as compositions of reference geolocations joined and modified by connectives, e.g., '. . . آدرانا اور س.ماریا دی لیکوڈیا کے شہروں کے درمیان، کاتانیا کے شمال غربی 32 کیلومتر۔ نظریہ سے، ایک جغرافیٹر ایسی پیغام لے سکتا ہے، اور اس کے درمیان تفسیر کی جغرافی شکل، اور ان کو جغرافی شکل میں تقسیم کرنا چاہیے، جو ایک مجموعہ کی تصویر سے بنایا گیا ہے، جو مفصل کی جغرافی شکل ہے۔ لیکن اس پیچیدہ جئوپارسینگ کام کے لئے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ پیدا کرنا مشکل ہے اور اگر ہاتھ سے کام لیا جائے تو بہت بڑی کوشش کی ضرورت ہوگی کہ ان جغرافی صورتوں کو اظہار کریں نہ صرف جئوپارسینگ کی جگہ سے بیان کیا گیا ہے بلکہ روشن ٹوپونیم ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو ویکیپیڈیا اور اوپنسٹریٹ مپ کے ساتھ اکثر پروسس کو اتوماٹ کرتا ہے۔ اس کے نتیجے میں ہم نے 360,187 مضبوط جغرافیل کی تعریف کی ایک مجموعہ جمع کر دی ہے جس سے ہم نے 1000 مثالیں آزمائش سٹ کے طور پر استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں۔ ڈاٹا کے ساتھ، ہم نے ایک نوی جئوپارسینگ ارزیابی فرم کی تعریف کی ہے، ایک اسکورنگ طریقہ اور ایک مجموعہ بنیاس لین کے ساتھ۔", 'ta': 'ஜியோபார்சிங் மீது முந்தைய வேலை கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது Adrano, S. Maria di லிகோடியா அல்லது காட்டேனியா போன்ற உரையில் உள்ள தனித் ஆயினும், புவியியல் இடங்கள் தனிப்பட்ட தலைப்புகள் மட்டும் மட்டுமல்ல, மற்றும் குறிப்புப் பூமியின் சேர்ந்து மற்றும் மாற்றப்பட்ட இணைப் அட்ரானோ மற்றும் எஸ்.மேரியா டி லிகோடியாவின் மத்தியில், காட்டானியாவின் வடக்கு 32 கிலோமீட்டர். ஒரு புவியியல் பரிசுத்தி இவ்வாறு உரையை எடுக்க முடியும், அதன் உள்ளே குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தலைப்புகளின் புவியியல் வடிவங்கள் மற்றும் இதை புவியியல் வடிவத்தால் பார்க்க ம ஆனால் இந்த சிக்கல் பூமியாக்கும் பணிக்கான தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குதல் கடினமானது மற்றும் கைமுறையாக செய்யப்பட்டால், விவரிக்கப்பட்ட புவியியல் வடிவங்களை மட்டும விகிபிடியா மற்றும் ஓபன்ஸ்ட்ரீட் வரைப்படத்தை ஒன்று சேர்த்து செயல்பாட்டில் பெரும்பாலான தானாக்கி  முடிவுக்கு, நாங்கள் 360,187 சிக்கல் சிக்கல் இடத்தின் விவரிப்புகளை ஒன்று சேகரித்தோம், அதிலிருந்து நாம் ஒரு சோதனை அமைப்பாக பயன்படுத்த வேண்ட தரவுகளுடன் சேர்க்க, நாம் புதிய புதிய பூவியோப்பு மதிப்பின் சட்டத்தை வரையறு', 'so': "Shaqo badan oo hore oo ku saabsan geoparisation wuxuu ku kalsoonaaday inuu aqoonsado iyo go’aan u gaaro qoraal ah sida Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ama Kataniya. Si kastaba ha ahaatee goobaha jiografiga ah uma dhaco sida goob gaar ah oo keliya, laakiin waxaa kaloo ka mid ah kooxaha meelaha laga soo jeedo oo lagu isku beddelo xiriirka, tusaale ahaan, '... u dhexeeya magaalooyinka Adrano iyo S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer xagga woqooyi ee Katania. Sidoo kale waxaa waajib ah in geoparaser uu qaadan karo qoraalkaas oo kale iyo noocyada jaografiga ah oo lagu qoray gudaheeda, oo uu ku koobi karo qaab geographical ah oo ku qoran koox koox ah, kaas oo ka mid ah meesha lagu qoray. Laakiin sameynta sawir macluumaad oo u adag shaqo sameynta qallafsan waa adag, haddii uu si gacan ah u sameeyo, wuxuu u baahan lahaa in aad u baahan karto noocyada geographical oo keliya ee lagu qoray, laakiin sidoo kale ku habboon tijaamacada reference. We present an approach that automates most of the process by combining Wikipedia and OpenStreetMap.  Sababtaas darteed waxaynu soo urursannay qoraalka meesha ay ku qoran yihiin 360,187 oo aan ku qornayn qoraal qallafsan, kaas oo aynu ku qornay tusaalo 1000 oo loogu talagalay in loo isticmaalo sida tijaabada. Si aan u raacno macluumaadka, waxaynu u qoraynaa frame cusub oo qiimeynta lagu qiimeeyo, waxayna ku qoran yihiin qaabab la qiimeeyo iyo heer kooban.", 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරපු වැඩේ ඇඩ්\u200dරානෝ, S.Maria di LiCoda හෝ Catania වගේ ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ විශ්වාස කරනවා. නමුත්, භූතික තැන ස්ථානය විතරක් විතරක් විතරක් විතරක් නෙවෙයි, නමුත් ප්\u200dරතිකාර භූතික තැන සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ස ඇඩ්\u200dරානෝ සහ S.Maria di LiCoda වල අතර, කිලෝමිටර් 32 උතුරු පස්සට කැටානියාව. අදහස් විදියටම, භූමිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරිකාරික නමුත් මේ සංශ්\u200dය භාවිශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා දත්ත සෙට් නිර්මාණය කරන්න අමාරුයි ඒ වගේම, අත්තර්ගයෙන් කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති භාවිශ්\u200dය ස අපි විකිපිඩියා සහ OpenStreetMap එකතු කරලා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. ඉතින්, අපි 360,187 සංග්\u200dරහණය සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථානය විස්තරයක් සම්පූර්ණ කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වලින් අපි පරීක්ෂණ සූදානයක් විදිහට දත්ත සමඟින්, අපි අළුත් භාවිකාශ විශ්ලේෂණ ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයක් සමඟ ස්කෝරින් විධානය සහ අධාරණ ප්\u200dර', 'vi': 'Rất nhiều việc trước về phân tích địa lý đã tập trung vào việc xác định và giải quyết các địa hình cá nhân trong văn bản như Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia hoặc Catania. Tuy nhiên, địa điểm địa lý không chỉ xuất hiện như các địa hình cá nhân, mà còn là các cấu trúc các địa điểm tham khảo kết hợp và được sửa bởi các kết nối, v.d.\'. giữa các thị trấn Adrano và S.Maria di Licodia, 32-km về phía tây bắc Catania". Lý tưởng nhất là một nhà phân tích nên có khả năng nhận dạng chữ này, và các hình dạng địa lý của các địa hình được nhắc bên trong nó, và phân tích chúng theo hình dạng địa lý, được hình thành bởi một bộ tọa độ, đại diện cho địa điểm được miêu tả. Nhưng việc tạo ra một tập tin cho nhiệm vụ phân tích địa lý phức tạp này rất khó khăn và nếu làm bằng tay, sẽ cần rất nhiều nỗ lực để ghi chú các hình địa lý không chỉ địa điểm được miêu tả, mà còn cả các địa hình tham khảo. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp tự động phần lớn của tiến trình bằng cách kết hợp Wikipedia và OpenstreetMap. Kết quả là chúng tôi đã thu thập một bộ sưu tập của loại 360,187 các mô tả địa vị phức tạp chưa được sửa xong, từ đó chúng tôi đã tự quản lý một ví dụ 1,000 để được dùng làm bộ thử. Để hỗ trợ dữ liệu, chúng tôi xác định một cơ sở đánh giá địa vị mới cùng với một phương pháp đánh dấu và một bộ đường cơ bản.', 'uz': "Geparing uchun bir nechta ishni Adrano, S. Maria di Likodi yoki Kataniya kabi bir nechta taʼminlov toponasini aniqlash va aniqlash uchun fokus qiladi. Lekin, geographical manzillar faqat aloqa toponalari sifatida emas, balki bogʻlamalar bilan birlashtirilgan va oʻzgarishga ega boʻlishi mumkin. Adrano va S.Maria di Likodi, Kataniya kaskazining 32 kilometer borligini o'rtasida. Hullas, geographical parameter bu matnni qabul qilishi kerak, va uning ichida koʻrsatilgan topografik shakllarini olib tashlashi mumkin, va ularni geografi shaklida ajratish mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan manzilni koʻrsatish mumkin. Lekin bu murakkab geoparing vazifasi uchun maʼlumot set yaratish qiyin, va agar qoʻlbola qilingan boʻlsa, faqat taʼminlovchi geographical shakllarni taʼminlashtirish uchun juda ko'p harakat kerak, balki homiy toponam. Biz Wikipedia va OpenStreetMap bilan birlashtirish orqali ko'pchilikni avtomatik o'zgartiradik. Va natijada biz 360,187 tashkilotga murakkab geometrlar taʼriflarini birlashtirdik. Bu yerda biz sinov sohasida foydalanish uchun 1,000 misollarni qoʻllanmagan. Maʼlumotlar bilan birlashtirish uchun yangi geoparing qiymatning chegarasini qiymati usuli va bir necha satrlar bilan aniqlash.", 'bg': 'Голяма част от предишната работа по геопаркирането е фокусирана върху идентифицирането и решаването на отделни топоними в текстове като Адрано, С.Мария ди Ликодия или Катания. Географските местоположения обаче се срещат не само като отделни топоними, но и като композиции от референтни геолокации, съединени и модифицирани от съединителни елементи, напр. " между градовете Adrano и S.Maria di Licodia, 32 километра северозападно от Catania". В идеалния случай геоанализаторът трябва да може да вземе такъв текст и географските форми на топонимите, посочени в него, и да ги анализира в географска форма, формирана от набор от координати, които представляват описаното местоположение. Но създаването на набор от данни за тази сложна задача за геопардиране е трудно и ако бъде направено ръчно, ще изисква огромни усилия за анотиране на географските форми не само на описаната геолокация, но и на референтните топоними. Представяме подход, който автоматизира по-голямата част от процеса чрез комбиниране на Уикипедия и OpenStreetMap. В резултат на това събрахме колекция от 360 187 неизчистени комплексни геолокационни описания, от които ръчно подбрахме 1000 примера, предназначени да бъдат използвани като тестов комплект. За да придружим данните, ние дефинираме нова рамка за оценка на геопаркирането заедно с методология за оценка и набор от базови линии.', 'nl': 'Veel eerdere werkzaamheden over geoparsing hebben zich gericht op het identificeren en oplossen van individuele toponiemen in tekst zoals Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia of Catania. Geografische locaties komen echter niet alleen voor als individuele toponiemen, maar ook als samenstellingen van referentie-geolocaties die verbonden en gewijzigd worden door verbindingen, bijv. \'.. tussen de steden Adrano en S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer ten noordwesten van Catania". Idealiter zou een geoparser in staat moeten zijn om dergelijke tekst en de geografische vormen van de toponiemen waarnaar wordt verwezen, te verwerken in een geografische vorm, gevormd door een set coördinaten, die de beschreven locatie vertegenwoordigt. Maar het maken van een dataset voor deze complexe geoparsing taak is moeilijk en, indien handmatig gedaan, zou een enorme hoeveelheid moeite vergen om de geografische vormen van niet alleen de beschreven geolocatie, maar ook de referentietoponiemen te annoteren. We presenteren een aanpak die het grootste deel van het proces automatiseert door Wikipedia en OpenStreetMap te combineren. Als resultaat hebben we een verzameling 360.187 ongecurateerde complexe geolocatiebeschrijvingen verzameld, waaruit we handmatig 1.000 voorbeelden hebben samengesteld die bedoeld zijn om als testset te worden gebruikt. Om de gegevens te begeleiden, definiëren we een nieuw geoparsing evaluatiekader samen met een scoremethodologie en een set basislijnen.', 'hr': "Mnogo prethodnog rada o geoparsiranju usredotočilo se na identifikaciju i rješavanje pojedinih toponima u tekstu poput Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ili Catania. Međutim, geografske lokacije se pojavljuju ne samo kao individualni toponim, nego i kao sastavke referentnih geolokacija pridružene i modificirane povezanjem, npr. '. . . između gradova Adrano i S.Maria di Likodije, 32 kilometara sjeverozapadnog od Katanije. Idealno, geoanalizator bi trebao biti u mogućnosti uzeti takav tekst, i geografske oblike toponima koje su navedene unutar njega, te analizirati ih u geografski oblik, formiran grupom koordinata, koja predstavlja opisanu lokaciju. Međutim, stvaranje podataka za ovaj kompleksni zadatak geoparsiranja je teško i, ako se ručno učini, zahtijevalo bi ogromnu količinu napora za annotaciju geografskih oblika ne samo opisanog geolokacije, već i referentnih toponima. Predstavljamo pristup koji automatski proizvodi većinu procesa kombiniranjem Wikipedia i OpenStreetMapa. Kao rezultat toga, skupili smo skupljanje od 360.187 neobliženih kompleksnih opisa geolokacije, iz kojih smo rukno izliječili 1000 primjera koji se namjeravaju koristiti kao test set. Da bismo pratili podatke, definirali smo novi okvir za procjenu geoparsiranja zajedno s metodologijom izvlačenja i skupom osnovnih linija.", 'da': 'Meget tidligere arbejde med geoparsering har fokuseret på at identificere og løse individuelle toponymer i tekst som Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia eller Catania. Geografiske placeringer forekommer imidlertid ikke kun som individuelle toponymer, men også som sammensætninger af referencegeografiske placeringer, der er forenet og ændret ved hjælp af forbindelser, f.eks. " mellem byerne Adrano og S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer nordvest for Catania". Ideelt set bør en geoparser være i stand til at tage en sådan tekst, og de geografiske former af de toponymer, der refereres i den, og fortolke disse til en geografisk form, dannet af et sæt koordinater, der repræsenterer den beskrevne placering. Men at skabe et datasæt til denne komplekse geoparseringsopgave er vanskeligt, og hvis det gøres manuelt, ville det kræve en enorm indsats for at annotere de geografiske former for ikke blot den beskrevne geografiske placering, men også referencetononymerne. Vi præsenterer en tilgang, der automatiserer det meste af processen ved at kombinere Wikipedia og OpenStreetMap. Som følge heraf har vi samlet en samling af 360.187 umættede komplekse geolocationsbeskrivelser, hvorfra vi manuelt har kurateret 1.000 eksempler, der skal bruges som testsæt. Til at ledsage dataene definerer vi en ny ramme for geoparsing evaluering sammen med en scoring metode og et sæt basislinjer.', 'id': "Banyak pekerjaan sebelumnya tentang geoparsing telah fokus pada mengidentifikasi dan memecahkan toponym individu dalam teks seperti Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia atau Catania. Namun, lokasi geografi terjadi bukan hanya sebagai toponym individu, tetapi juga sebagai komposisi geolokasi referensi bergabung dan diubah oleh konektif, misalnya, '. . . antara kota Adrano dan S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometer barat laut Catania '. Idealnya, geoparser seharusnya dapat mengambil teks seperti itu, dan bentuk geografi toponym yang direferensikan di dalamnya, dan menghurai ini menjadi bentuk geografi, terbentuk oleh set koordinat, yang mewakili lokasi yang diterangkan. Namun menciptakan set data untuk tugas geoparsing kompleks ini sulit dan, jika dilakukan secara manual, akan membutuhkan banyak usaha untuk anotasi bentuk geografi bukan hanya geolokasi yang diterangkan tetapi juga toponym referensi. Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan yang mengautomatisasi sebagian besar proses dengan menggabungkan Wikipedia dan OpenStreetMap. Sebagai hasilnya, kami telah mengumpulkan koleksi 360.187 deskripsi geolokasi kompleks yang tidak diukur, dari mana kami telah mengumpulkan secara manual 1.000 contoh yang dimaksud untuk digunakan sebagai set tes. To accompany the data, we define a new geoparsing evaluation framework along with a scoring methodology and a set of baselines.", 'ko': "이전에 많은 지질 탐사에 관한 작업은 아델라노(Adrano), 세인트마리아 딜리코디아(S.Maria di Licodia)나 카타니아(Catania) 등 텍스트의 각 지명을 식별하고 해석하는 데 집중되었다.그러나 지리적 위치는 단일 지명뿐만 아니라 연결어를 연결하고 수정하는 참고 지리적 위치의 구성 형태로 나타난다. 예를 들어''카타니아에서 북서쪽으로 32km 떨어진 아델라노 마을과 세인트마리아 딜리코디아 마을 사이.이상적인 상황에서 지질 탐사원은 이런 텍스트와 그 중에서 인용된 지명의 지리적 형상을 얻어 하나의 지리적 형상으로 해석할 수 있어야 한다. 이 형상은 하나의 좌표로 구성되어 묘사된 위치를 표시한다.그러나 이 복잡한 지리 탐사 임무를 위해 데이터 집합을 만드는 것은 어렵다. 수동으로 완성하면 묘사된 지리적 위치에 대한 주석이 필요할 뿐만 아니라 참고 지명에 대한 주석도 필요하다.우리는 위키백과와 OpenStreetMap을 결합시켜 대부분의 과정을 자동화하는 방법을 제시했다.따라서 우리는 처리되지 않은 360187개의 복잡한 지리적 위치 설명을 수집하고 그 중에서 1000개의 예시를 수동으로 정리하여 테스트 집합으로 사용하였다.이러한 데이터에 맞추기 위해 우리는 새로운 지질 탐사 평가 구조와 평가 방법과 기선을 정의했다.", 'sw': "Kazi nyingi zilizopita kuhusu kupambana kwa geoparing imejikita kwenye kutambua na kutatua mada binafsi katika maandishi kama Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia au Catania. Hata hivyo, maeneo ya kijiografia yanatokea si tu kama mada binafsi, bali pia kama makusanyiko ya maeneo ya maoni yaliyojiunga na kubadilishwa na viungo vya mawasiliano, kwa mfano, '... kati ya miji ya Adrano na S.Maria di Licodia, kilometa 32 kaskazini mwa Katania'. Kadhalika, geoparser anapaswa kuwa na uwezo wa kuchukua ujumbe wa aina hiyo, na sura ya geographical ya mada zinazotajwa ndani yake, na kuingiza hizi katika sura ya geographical, iliyoandaliwa na mfumo wa uratibu, ambayo inawakilisha maeneo yanayoelezwa. Lakini kutengeneza seti ya taarifa kwa juhudi hili tatizo la kutengeneza mazingira ni vigumu na, kama imefanya kwa mikononi, ingehitaji jitihada kubwa za kutangaza sura za geographical si tu kwenye eneo linaloelezwa lakini pia mada ya maoni. Tunaonyesha mbinu ambazo zinajitenga mchakato mwingi kwa kuunganisha Wikipedia na OpenStreetMap. Matokeo yake, tumekusanya mkusanyiko wa maelezo ya eneo hilo 360,187 yasiyokuwa na uhakika, ambapo tumetumia mifano 1,000 zilizokusudiwa kutumiwa kama seti ya jaribio. To accompany the data, we define a new geoparsing evaluation framework along with a scoring methodology and a set of baselines.", 'de': 'Viele frühere Arbeiten zum Geoarsing konzentrierten sich auf die Identifizierung und Auflösung einzelner Toponyme in Texten wie Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia oder Catania. Geographische Standorte treten jedoch nicht nur als einzelne Toponyme auf, sondern auch als Zusammensetzungen von Referenzgeostandorten, die durch Verbindungselemente verbunden und modifiziert werden, z.B. ".... zwischen den Städten Adrano und S.Maria di Licodia, 32 km nordwestlich von Catania". Idealerweise sollte ein Geoarser in der Lage sein, diesen Text und die geographischen Formen der darin referenzierten Toponyme in eine geographische Form zu parsen, die aus einer Reihe von Koordinaten gebildet wird, die den beschriebenen Ort repräsentiert. Die Erstellung eines Datensatzes für diese komplexe Geokartierungsaufgabe ist jedoch schwierig und würde, wenn manuell durchgeführt, einen enormen Aufwand erfordern, um nicht nur die geographischen Formen der beschriebenen Geolokalisierung, sondern auch die Referenztoponyme zu kommentieren. Wir präsentieren einen Ansatz, der den Großteil des Prozesses automatisiert, indem Wikipedia und OpenStreetMap kombiniert werden. Als Ergebnis haben wir eine Sammlung von 360.187 ungesättigten komplexen Geolocation Beschreibungen gesammelt, aus denen wir manuell 1.000 Beispiele zusammengestellt haben, die als Testset verwendet werden sollen. Um die Daten zu begleiten, definieren wir ein neues Framework für die geoparsing-Bewertung zusammen mit einer Scoring-Methodik und einer Reihe von Basislinien.', 'tr': 'Öňki janlaşdyrma işlerinde birnäçe toponymlary Adrano, S.Maria di Likoda ýa-da Cataniýa ýaly metin bejermek we çözmek üçin ünsüni guruldy. Ýöne geografiki ýerler diňe birer toponym ýaly däl, ýöne birleşip üýtgedilen we çarpyşler bilen üýtgedilen ýerler ýaly degişleýär. Adrano we S.Maria di Likoda şäheriň arasynda, 32 kilometre demirgazyk-günbatar Kataniýanyň. Düşünüşe göre, bir geowasör bu şekilde bir metin alıp biler, ve içindeki toponymların geografik şekillerini çözümlemeli ve bu şekilleri geografik bir şekilde çözümlemeli, tanımlanmış ýeri tarafından oluşturulan koordinatlar tarafından tanımlanabilir. Emma bu karmaşık geoparseýän zadyň üçin maglumat setirini bejermek kyn. we eger ol elimde edilse, diňe suratlandyran geografiki biçimlerini çaklamak üçin gaty kyn çabalar gerek. Biz Wikipediýa we OpenStreetMap bilen işleýän işleýäniň köpüsini awtomatik eden bir nusga görkeýäris. Sonuçta 360.187 sany çykyş geýolaryň tassymlaryny ýygnadyk. Şonuň üçin elimizden 1.000 eser çykdyk. Maglumatlary accompany etmek üçin, biz gol methodologiýasy we basehatlaryň bir toparynda täze bir geoparsiyon çykyş çerçevesini tassyklanýarys.', 'af': "Baie vorige werk op geoparsing het gefokus op individuele toponime in teks soos Adrano, S.Maria di Likodia of Catania te identifiseer en oplos. Maar geografiese liggings word nie alleen as individuele toponime nie, maar ook as opstellings van verwysing geoliggings aangevoeg en verander deur verbindings, bv., '. . . tussen die dorpe van Adrano en S.Maria di Likodia, 32 kilometers noordewest van Katanië. Ideële moet 'n geoanalyseer so teks neem, en die geografiese vorms van die toponime wat binne dit verwys is, en hierdie in 'n geografiese vorm verwerp, gevorm deur 'n stel koordinate wat die ligging beskrywe is. Maar die skep van 'n datastel vir hierdie kompleks geoparsing taak is moeilik en, indien hand gedoen is, sou 'n groot hoeveelheid versoek nodig om die geografiese vorms van nie slegs die geoligging beskrywe nie, maar ook die verwysing toponyms te annoteer nie. Ons stel 'n toegang wat die meeste van die proses automateer deur Wikipedia en OpenStreetMap te kombinerer. As 'n resultaat het ons 'n versameling van 360,187 onbekende kompleks geoligging beskrywings versamel, waarvan ons manueel gemaak het 1000 voorbeelde wat bedoel word om gebruik te word as 'n toets stel. Om die data te volg, definieer ons 'n nuwe geoparsing evalueringsraamwerk saam met 'n skoring metodologie en 'n stel basisline.", 'hy': "Շատ նախորդ աշխատանք երկրաչափության վրա կենտրոնացել է անհատական թոպոնիմների հայտնաբերման և լուծման վրա այնպիսի տեքստում, ինչպիսիք են Ադրանոնը, Ս.Մարիա դի Լիկոդիան կամ Կատանիան: Այնուամենայնիվ, գերագրական տեղադրությունները տեղի են ունենում ոչ միայն որպես անհատական թոպոնիմներ, այլ նաև որպես հաղորդակցման երկրատեղադրությունների կառուցվածքներ, որոնք միացվում են և փոխվում են կապերի միջոցով, օրինակ, '... Ադրանոյի և Ս.Մարիա դի Լիկոդիայի քաղաքների միջև՝ Կատանիայի հյուսիսային արևմտյան 32 կմ: Իրականում, երկրաչափուչիչը պետք է կարողանա վերցնել այնպիսի տեքստ և դրա մեջ նշված թոպոնիմների երկրաչափական ձևերը և վերլուծել դրանք երկրաչափական ձևով, որը կազմված է կոորդինատների մի շարք, որոնք ներկայացնում են նկարագրված վայրը: But creating a dataset for this complex geoparsing task is difficult and, if done manually, would require a huge amount of effort to annotate the geographical shapes of not only the geolocation described but also the reference toponyms.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոտեցում, որը ավտոմատիացնում է գործընթացի մեծ մասը միավորելով Wikipedia և OpenStreet Map: Արդյունքում մենք հավաքեցինք 360,187 անճշգրիտ բարդ երկրագծի նկարագրությունների հավաքածու, որից մենք ձեռքով հավաքեցինք 1,000 օրինակ, որոնց նպատակն էր օգտագործվել որպես փորձարկումներ: Տվյալների հետ միասին մենք սահմանում ենք նոր երկրաչափումների գնահատման շրջանակ, միասին գնահատման մեթոդոլոգիայի և հիմնական գծերի մի շարք:", 'az': "Geyoparsing haqqńĪnda √ßox …ôvv…ôlki iŇül…ôr Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia v…ô Catania kimi m…ôtnl…ôrd…ô individual toponymlarńĪ tanńĪma v…ô √ß…ôkm…ôy…ô odaqlanńĪr. Lakin ń£eogrńĀfiski m…ôqamlar yalnńĪz indir toponym kimi deyildir, lakin h…ôm√ßinin bańülantńĪlar il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü v…ô d…ôyiŇüdirilmiŇü referens geolocations kimi deyildir. Adrano v…ô S.Maria di Likodiya Ňü…ôh…ôrl…ôrinin arasńĪnda 32 kilometr kuzeybatńĪ KataniyanńĪn. Ideal olaraq, bir geoparser b√∂y√ľk metin alńĪb, i√ßind…ô etibarlńĪ toponymunlarńĪn geografik Ňü…ôkl…ôri alńĪb onlarńĪ geografik Ňü…ôkl…ô ayńĪrd edir, tanńĪmlanmńĪŇü m…ôqamńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôr…ôn koordinatlar t…ôr…ôfind…ôn yaratdńĪrńĪlar. Lakin bu kompleks geoparsing iŇüi √ľ√ß√ľn veril…ôn quruluŇü yaratmasńĪ √ß…ôtin v…ô, …ôlind…ô edils…ô, √ßox b√∂y√ľk √ßabalar lazńĪmdńĪr ki, t…ôsbiq edilmiŇü geolokasyonun, h…ôm√ßinin d…ô referens toponymlarńĪnńĪn geografik Ňü…ôkill…ôrini bildirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox √ß…ôtin olar. Biz Wikipedia v…ô OpenStreetMap'i birl…ôŇüdir…ôn proses √ßoxunu avtomatik edir. Sonu√ßta 360.187 kompleks geolokasyon t…ôrzl…ôrini topladńĪq, bunlardan elimizd…ôn 1000 n√ľmun…ôl…ôri test seti olaraq istifad…ô edil…ôc…ôk. M…ôlumatlarńĪ birlikd…ô t…ôŇükil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn yeni geoparsing deńüerlendirm…ô framework √ľn√ľ scoring metodolojisi v…ô baz √ß…ôtinl…ôrini t…ôŇükil edirik.", 'bn': 'ভৌপার্জিং নিয়ে অনেক আগের কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে আড্রানো, এস. মারিয়া দি লিকোডিয়া বা ক্যাটানিয়ার মত ব্যক্তিগত বিষয়বস্তুকে চিহ তবে ভূমিকাল অবস্থান শুধুমাত্র ব্যক্তিগত বিষয়বস্তু হিসেবে বিভিন্ন স্থান ঘটছে না, বরং সংযোগের সাথে যোগ দিয়েছে এবং পরিবর্তন করেছে যেমন সং আদ্রানো এবং S.মারিয়া দি লিকোডিয়া, ক্যাটানিয়ার উত্তরের ৩২ কিলোমিটার। Ideally, a geoparser should be able to take such text, and the geographical shapes of the toponyms referenced within it, and parse these into a geographical shape, formed by a set of coordinates, that represents the location described.  কিন্তু এই জটিল ভূমিপার্জিং কাজের জন্য একটি ডাটাসেট তৈরি করা কঠিন এবং যদি হাতে করা হয়, তাহলে বিশাল পরিমাণ প্রচেষ্টার প্রয়োজন হবে যা বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে শুধুমাত্র ভ উইকিপিডিয়া এবং ওপেন্স্ট্রিট ম্যাপের মাধ্যমে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রক্রিয়াকে স্বয়ংক্রিয় করে আমরা একটি উপা As a result, we have gathered a collection of 360,187 uncurated complex geolocation descriptions, from which we have manually curated 1,000 examples intended to be used as a test set.  তথ্যের সাথে যোগাযোগ করার জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ভূপার্সিং মূল্যায়নের ফ্রেম নির্ধারণ করি একটি স্কোরিং পদ্ধতি এবং একটি সেটি বেসার', 'sq': "Puna shumë e mëparshme në gjeografikimin është përqëndruar në identifikimin dhe zgjidhjen e toponimeve individuale në tekst si Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia apo Catania. Megjithatë, vendet gjeografike ndodhin jo vetëm si toponime individual e, por gjithashtu si kompozita e gjeolokacioneve referenciale të bashkuara dhe të modifikuara nga lidhjet, për shembull, '. . midis qyteteve Adrano dhe S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometra në veriperëndim të Katanisë'. Idealisht, një geoparser duhet të jetë në gjendje të marrë një tekst të tillë, dhe forma gjeografike të toponimeve të referuara brenda tij, dhe të analizojë a to në një formë gjeografike, formuar nga një sërë koordinata, që përfaqëson vendin e përshkruar. But creating a dataset for this complex geoparsing task is difficult and, if done manually, would require a huge amount of effort to annotate the geographical shapes of not only the geolocation described but also the reference toponyms.  We present an approach that automates most of the process by combining Wikipedia and OpenStreetMap.  Si rezultat, ne kemi mbledhur një koleksion prej 360,187 përshkrimesh gjeologjie komplekse të papërcaktuara, nga të cilat ne kemi kuruar manualisht 1,000 shembuj që synojnë të përdoren si një set testimi. Për të shoqëruar të dhënat, ne përcaktojmë një kuadër të ri për vlerësimin gjeografik së bashku me një metodologji pikërimi dhe një sërë linjash bazë.", 'am': "ብዙ አስቀድሞ የዮፓርስ ስራ በአድራኖ፣ ማርያ ዲ ሊኮዲያ ወይም ካታንያ በሚመስል የግንኙነቱን ድምፅ ማረጋገጥ እና ለማፍረስ ላይ ተማክሮአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የgeographical ቦታዎች ግን እንደ ብሔራዊ ጦማሪያዎች ብቻ አይደለም፣ ነገር ግን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም በተቃራኒዎች የተጠቃሚ ቦታዎች እንዲደረጉ ነው፡፡ between the towns of Adrano and S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometres northwest of Catania'.  በአሳብ፣ የgeographical ተሳታፊ እንደዚህ ጽሑፍ መያዝ እና በውስጧ የተገኘውን የኢዮግራፊ መልክ ሊወስድ ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን ለዚህ አካባቢ geoparsing አድራሻ ዳታማሲ መፍጠር አስቸጋሪ ነው፣ በእጅነትም ቢደረግ፣ በተለየው የgeographical ፎቶማዎች ብቻ ሳይሆን፣ የreference toponyሙን ደግሞ ማሳየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Wikipedia እና OpenStreetMap በመጠቀም የፕሮጀክቱን አብዛኛውን የሚያሳውቃትን ሥርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይሄንን ምክንያት 360,187 በተጨማሪው የቦታ ጽሑፎችን ሰብሰብን፤ ከዚህም በሞክራዊ ተቃውሞ ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን 1000 ምሳሌዎች እጃችን አቀረብን፡፡ ከዳታዎቹም ጋር አዲስ የኢዮአፓርቲ ምርጫዎችን እና የመቆጣጠር ማህበረሰቢያ እና የመስመር ደረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡", 'ca': "Molts treballs anteriors en la geoanalització s'han centrat en identificar i resoldre topònims individuals en text com Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia o Catania. No obstant això, les ubicacions geogràfics es produeixen no només com topònims individuals, sinó també com composicions de geollocacions de referència unides i modificades per connectius, per exemple, '. . entre les ciutats d'Adrano i S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilòmetres al nord-oest de Catania'. Idealment, un geoanalitzador hauria de poder agafar aquest text, i les formes geogràfiques dels topònims que es refereixen dins ell, i analitzar-los en una forma geogràfica, formada per un conjunt de coordenades, que representen la ubicació descrita. But creating a dataset for this complex geoparsing task is difficult and, if done manually, would require a huge amount of effort to annotate the geographical shapes of not only the geolocation described but also the reference toponyms.  Presentam un enfocament que automatitza la majoria del procés combinant Wikipedia i OpenStreetMap. Com a resultat, hem recollit una col·lecció de 360.187 descripcions complexes de geolocalització, de les quals hem recollit manualment 1.000 exemples destinats a ser utilitzats com un conjunt de proves. Per acompanyar les dades, definim un nou marc d'evaluació geoanalitzant juntament amb una metodologia de puntuació i un conjunt de línies de base.", 'et': 'Paljud varasemad geoparsimistööd on keskendunud individuaalsete toponüümide tuvastamisele ja lahendamisele tekstides nagu Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia või Catania. Geograafilised asukohad ei esine siiski mitte ainult üksikute toponüümidena, vaid ka võrdlusgeolokatsioonide koostistena, mida ühendavad ja mida muudavad sidemed, nt .... Adrano ja S.Maria di Licodia linnade vahel, Cataniast 32 kilomeetrit loodes". Ideaaljuhul peaks geoanalüüsija suutma võtta sellise teksti ja selles viidatud toponüümide geograafilised kujundid ning parsida need geograafiliseks kujuks, mis moodustab koordinaatide kogumi, mis esindab kirjeldatud asukohta. Kuid andmekogumi loomine selle keerulise geoparsimise ülesande jaoks on keeruline ja käsitsi teostamisel nõuaks tohutult pingutusi, et märkida mitte ainult kirjeldatud geograafilise asukoha geograafilised kujundid, vaid ka viitetoponüümid. Esitame lähenemisviisi, mis automatiseerib enamiku protsessi, kombineerides Wikipedia ja OpenStreetMap. Selle tulemusena oleme kogunud 360 187 kuriseerimata keerulise geolokaadi kirjelduse kogumi, millest oleme käsitsi kureerinud 1000 näidet, mis on mõeldud kasutamiseks katsekomplektina. Andmetele lisamiseks määratleme uue geoparsimise hindamise raamistiku koos hindamismeetodi ja lähtejoonedega.', 'cs': 'Mnoho předchozích prací na geoparsingu se zaměřilo na identifikaci a řešení jednotlivých toponymů v textech jako Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia nebo Catania. Geografická poloha se však vyskytují nejen jako jednotlivá toponyma, ale také jako složení referenčních geolokací spojených a upravených konektivy, např. ... mezi městy Adrano a S.Maria di Licodia, 32kilometry severozápadně od Catania". V ideálním případě by geoparser měl být schopen vzít takový text a geografické tvary toponymů v něm odkazovaných, a analyzovat je do geografického tvaru, vytvořeného sadou souřadnic, která představuje popsané místo. Vytvoření datové sady pro tento složitý geoparsing úkol je však obtížné a pokud by bylo provedeno ručně, vyžadovalo by obrovské množství úsilí k anotaci geografických tvarů nejen popsané geolokace, ale i referenčních toponymů. Představujeme přístup, který automatizuje většinu procesu kombinací Wikipedie a OpenStreetMap. V důsledku toho jsme shromáždili sbírku 360.187 neposycených komplexních geolokačních popisů, ze kterých jsme ručně vytvořili 1.000 příkladů určených k použití jako testovací sada. K doprovodu dat definujeme nový rámec hodnocení geoparsingu spolu s metodologií bodování a sadou základních linek.', 'fi': 'Monet aikaisemmat geokartoitustyöt ovat keskittyneet yksilöiden toponyymien tunnistamiseen ja ratkaisemiseen esimerkiksi Adranossa, S.Maria di Licodiassa tai Cataniassa. Maantieteelliset sijainnit eivät kuitenkaan ilmene vain yksittäisinä toponyyminä, vaan myös viitegeolokaatioiden koostumuksina, joita yhdistävät ja muokkaavat liitokset, esim. "... Adranon ja S.Maria di Licodian kaupunkien välillä, 32 kilometriä Cataniasta luoteeseen". Ihanteellisessa tapauksessa geotutkijan pitäisi pystyä ottamaan tällainen teksti ja siinä viitatut toponyymien maantieteelliset muodot ja jäsentämään ne maantieteelliseen muotoon, joka muodostuu koordinaattien joukosta, joka edustaa kuvattua sijaintia. Mutta tietoaineiston luominen tätä monimutkaista geokartoitusta varten on vaikeaa, ja manuaalisesti tehtävä se vaatisi valtavasti työtä, jotta maantieteelliset muodot voidaan merkitä paitsi kuvattu maantieteellinen sijainti myös referenssitoponyymit. Esittelemme lähestymistavan, joka automatisoi suurimman osan prosessista yhdistämällä Wikipedian ja OpenStreetMapin. Tämän tuloksena olemme keränneet kokoelman 360 187 kuristamatonta monimutkaista geolokaatiokuvausta, joista olemme keränneet manuaalisesti 1 000 esimerkkiä, jotka on tarkoitettu käytettäväksi testisarjana. Aineiston lisäksi määrittelemme uuden geokartoituksen arviointikehyksen sekä pisteytysmenetelmän ja joukon lähtökohtia.', 'bs': "Mnogo prethodnog rada o geoparsiranju usredotočilo se na identifikaciju i rješavanje individualnih toponima u tekstu poput Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ili Catania. Međutim, geografske lokacije se dešavaju ne samo kao individualni toponim, nego i kao sastavke referentnih geolokacija pridružene i modificirane povezanjem, npr. '. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . između gradova Adrano i S.Maria di Likodije, 32 kilometara sjeverozapadnog od Katanije. Idealno, geoparsor bi trebao biti u mogućnosti uzeti takav tekst, i geografske oblike toponima koje su referencirane unutar njega, i analizirati ih u geografski oblik, formiran grupom koordinata, koja predstavlja opisanu lokaciju. Ali stvaranje podataka za ovaj kompleksni posao geoparsiranja je teško i, ako se ručno učini, zahtijevalo bi ogromnu količinu napora za annotaciju geografskih oblika ne samo opisanog geolokacije, već i referentnih toponima. Predstavljamo pristup koji automatski uključuje većinu procesa kombinacijom Wikipedia i OpenStreetMapa. Kao rezultat toga, skupili smo kolekciju od 360.187 neizbeđenih kompleksnih opisa geolokacije, iz kojih smo manuelno iskrivili 1000 primjera koji su namjeravali biti korišteni kao test set. Da bismo pratili podatke, definirali smo novi okvir za procjenu geoparsing a zajedno s metodologijom izvlačenja i setom osnovnih linija.", 'fa': 'بسیاری از کارهای قبلی در جغرافی تمرکز به شناسایی و حل توپونیم\u200cهای شخصی در متن مانند آدرانو، اسماریا دی لیکودیا یا کاتانیا است. ولی محل جغرافی نه تنها به عنوان توپونیم\u200cهای شخصی اتفاق می\u200cافتد، بلکه همچنین به عنوان محل\u200cهای جغرافی متصل شده و تغییر داده می\u200cشوند، مثال ،» . بین شهرهای آدرانو و اسماریا دی لیکودیا، ۳۲ کیلومتر شمال غربی از کاتانیا. به نظر نظر، یک جغرافی باید قادر به این متن بگیرد، و شکل جغرافی جغرافی توپونیم\u200cهایی که در آن ارتباط شده\u200cاند، و این\u200cها را به شکل جغرافی بررسی کند، که توسط مجموعه\u200cای از نقطه\u200cها صورت می\u200cدهد، که جایگاه توصیف می\u200c اما ساختن یک مجموعه داده\u200cها برای این کار جغرافی پیچیده سخت است و اگر به دستی انجام شود، نیاز به اندازه\u200cی تلاش بسیار بزرگی برای نشان دادن شکل جغرافی که نه تنها محل جغرافی توصیف شده، بلکه توپونیم\u200cهای مربوط است. ما طریقی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بیشتر فرایند را با ترکیب ویکیپدید و OpenStreetMap اتوماتیک می\u200cکند. به نتیجه، ما یک مجموعه از توضیح جغرافی پیچیده\u200cای 360.187 را جمع کرده\u200cایم که از آن ۱۰۰۰ مثال را به دست حل کرده\u200cایم که به عنوان مجموعه آزمایش استفاده می\u200cشود. برای همراه داده ها، ما یک چهارچوب ارزیابی جدید جغرافی را با یک روش آزمایش و یک مجموعه از خطوط پایین تعریف می کنیم.', 'ha': 'Kirin aiki mai da ya gabata a kan geoparing yã fokus a kan gane da solve wasu toponim cikin littãfin kamar Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ko Catania. Amma, wurãren geographical za\'a ci-gaba ba kamar duk toponim guda kawai, kuma amma kamar composition na wurãren mazaɓa da aka haɗa da kuma aka modify da shirin da aka haɗa, misali, \'... tsakanin alƙaryar Adrano da S.Maria di Licodia, kilometa 320 kaskazin gabas ga Katania." Ideally, a geoparser should be able to take such text, and the geographical shapes of the toponyms referenced within it, and parse these into a geographical shape, formed by a set of coordinates, that represents the location described.  Amma, ƙiƙiri wani tsari na danganta wa wannan aikin geoparing mai tsanani ne kuma idan an aikata shi da hannun, za ya ƙayyade aikin babba, dõmin ya sanar da shi tsarin geographical, kuma ba ta zama kawai wurin da aka faɗa, kuma amma toponim na fassara. Tuna gabatar da wani hanyor wanda ke farata mafiya yawan aikin da ke haɗa Wikimedia da Open TraetMap. Kayya, mun samu samun takardar misãlai 360,187 wanda ba\'a samu ba da mazaɓa na mazaɓa, daga gare shi, mun sami misãlai 1000 da aka yi amfani da shi a kan jarraba. Dõmin Mu sami da data, muna ƙayyade wata new frame of evaluation ga geoparing sami da shiryoyin kwamfyuta mai motsi da wasu salo.', 'he': "עבודה רבה קודמת על גיאופרסינג התמקדה בזיהוי ופתרון טופונימים בודדים בטקסט כמו אדראנו, סמריה די ליקודיה או קטניה. However, geographical locations occur not only as individual toponyms, but also as compositions of reference geolocations joined and modified by connectives, e.g., '. . .  בין הערים אדראנו וס.מריה די ליקודיה, 32 קילומטרים צפון מערבית קטניה. באופן אידיאלי, הגיאופרסר צריך להיות מסוגל לקחת טקסט כזה, והצורות הגיאופוניות של הטופונימים המתונים בתוכו, ולבדוק אותם לתוך צורה גיאוגרפית, שנוצרה על ידי קבוצת קוורדינטות, שמייצגת את המיקום התואר. But creating a dataset for this complex geoparsing task is difficult and, if done manually, would require a huge amount of effort to annotate the geographical shapes of not only the geolocation described but also the reference toponyms.  We present an approach that automates most of the process by combining Wikipedia and OpenStreetMap.  As a result, we have gathered a collection of 360,187 uncurated complex geolocation descriptions, from which we have manually curated 1,000 examples intended to be used as a test set.  כדי ללוות את הנתונים, אנחנו מגדירים מסגרת עריכה גיאופריסטית חדשה יחד עם מטדולוגיה של ציונים וקבוצה של קווים בסיסיים.", 'sk': 'Veliko prejšnjih delov na področju geoparkiranja se je osredotočilo na identifikacijo in reševanje posameznih toponimov v besedilu, kot so Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia ali Catania. Vendar pa se geografske lokacije ne pojavljajo le kot posamezni toponimi, temveč tudi kot sestave referenčnih geolokacij, ki jih povezujejo in spreminjajo povezovalci, npr. " med mestoma Adrano in S.Maria di Licodia, 32 kilometrov severozahodno od Catania". V idealnem primeru bi moral biti geopoizvajalec sposoben vzeti takšno besedilo in geografske oblike toponimov, ki se nanašajo v njem, in jih razčleniti v geografsko obliko, ki jo oblikuje niz koordinat, ki predstavlja opisano lokacijo. Toda ustvarjanje nabora podatkov za to zapleteno nalogo geoarziranja je težko in, če bi bilo izvedeno ročno, bi zahtevalo veliko truda za označevanje geografskih oblik ne le opisane geolokacije, temveč tudi referenčnih toponimov. Predstavljamo pristop, ki avtomatizira večino procesa s kombinacijo Wikipedije in OpenStreetMap. Kot rezultat smo zbrali zbirko 360.187 nekuriranih kompleksnih geolokacijskih opisov, iz katerih smo ročno kurirali 1000 primerov, namenjenih uporabi kot testni komplet. Za spremljanje podatkov določimo nov okvir za ocenjevanje geoparsing skupaj z metodologijo ocenjevanja in nizom osnovnih linij.', 'jv': 'Much previous job on GEPASSing has been centered on ID and Resoluting individual top Ones in text like Address, S.Mary di Likoda or Catania. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness awak dhéwé ning barang Address karo S.Mary di Likoda, 32 kilometer buk Kasambaran Catania . In this context, the object represents the position descripted Name Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing sampeyan kanggo sabanjuré akeh penggunaké ténêr iki nggawe Wokipedia karo Open StrietMap. I dadi, kita kowe ngregawe nyimpen manut karo 3.7 ulih operasi dadi, dadi 1.000 ulih sing nyimpen kanggo ngerayakno tentang. So that\'s the first argument', 'bo': "Much previous work on geoparsing has focused on identifying and resolving individual toponyms in text like Adrano, S.Maria di Licodia or Catania. However, geographical locations occur not only as individual toponyms, but also as compositions of reference geolocations joined and modified by connectives, e.g., '. . . ཨ་ཌིར་ནོ་དང་སི་ མེ་རི་ཡ་ ལི་ཀོ་ཌི་ཡ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་སྲོང་ཁྱེར་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་བར་བྱུང་། Ideally, a geoparser should be able to take such text, and the geographical shapes of the toponyms referenced within it, and parse these into a geographical shape, formed by a set of coordinates, that represents the location described. But creating a dataset for this complex geoparsing task is difficult and, if done manually, would require a huge amount of effort to annotate the geographical shapes of not only the geolocation described but also the reference toponyms. ང་ཚོས་Wikipedia དང OpenStreetMap་ཚོར་མཉམ་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། As a result, we have gathered a collection of 360,187 uncurated complex geolocation descriptions, from which we have manually curated 1,000 examples intended to be used as a test set. To accompany the data, we define a new geoparsing evaluation framework along with a scoring methodology and a set of baselines."}
{'en': 'DocBank : A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'ar': 'DocBank: مجموعة بيانات معيارية لتحليل تخطيط المستند', 'pt': 'DocBank: um conjunto de dados de referência para análise de layout de documentos', 'fr': "DocBank\xa0: un jeu de données de référence pour l'analyse de mise en page", 'es': 'DocBank: un conjunto de datos de referencia para el análisis del diseño de', 'ja': 'DocBank:ドキュメントレイアウト分析のためのベンチマークデータセット', 'zh': 'DocBank:文档布局,数集', 'hi': 'DocBank: दस्तावेज़ लेआउट विश्लेषण के लिए एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट', 'ru': 'DocBank: Набор контрольных данных для анализа макета документа', 'ga': 'DocBank: Tacar Sonraí Tagarmharcála le haghaidh Anailís ar Leagan Amach Doiciméad', 'ka': 'DocBank: დოკუმენტის სოექტის ანალიზაციისთვის ბანქმერის მონაცემები', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς για την ανάλυση διάταξης εγγράφων', 'hu': 'DocBank: Referenciaadatkészlet a dokumentum elrendezésének elemzéséhez', 'it': "DocBank: un set di dati di riferimento per l'analisi del layout dei documenti", 'kk': 'DocBank: Құжат сәйкестігін анализиялау үшін банкмарк деректер бағдарламасы', 'lt': 'DocBank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'mk': 'DocBank: Папка на податоци за споредба за анализа на распоредот на документот', 'ms': 'DocBank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'ml': 'ഡോക്ക് ബാങ്ക്: രേഖയുടെ പദ്ധതിയുടെ അന്യായം', 'mn': 'DocBank: Документын сүүлийн шинжилгээний банкомарк өгөгдлийн сан', 'mt': 'DocBank: Sett ta’ Data ta’ Benchmark għall-Analiżi tat-Tfassil tad-Dokument', 'no': 'DocBank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'pl': 'DocBank: Zestaw danych referencyjnych dla analizy układu dokumentów', 'sr': 'DocBank: baza podataka za analizu rasporeda dokumenta', 'ro': 'DocBank: un set de date de referință pentru analiza aspectului documentelor', 'si': 'DocBank: විස්තර විශාලනය සඳහා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැකසුම්', 'so': 'Docbank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'sv': 'DocBank: Ett referensdataset för analys av dokumentlayouter', 'ta': 'DocBank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'ur': 'ڈاک بنک: ڈوکومٹ لیاؤٹ تحلیل کے لئے ایک بنچم مارک ڈاتس', 'vi': 'Tài liệu: A tiêu chuẩn dữ liệu cho phân tích bố trí Tài liệu', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'ДокБанк: сравнителен набор от данни за анализ на оформлението на документи', 'nl': 'DocBank: Een Benchmark Dataset voor Document Layout Analyse', 'da': 'DocBank: Et benchmark datasæt til analyse af dokumentlayout', 'hr': 'DocBank: baza podataka za analizu rasporeda dokumenta', 'ko': 'DocBank: 문서 레이아웃 분석에 사용되는 데이텀 데이터 세트', 'de': 'DocBank: Ein Benchmark Dataset für die Dokumentenlayoutanalyse', 'fa': 'DocBank: یک پایگاه اطلاعات بندی برای تحلیل طراحی سند', 'sw': 'DocBank: Uchambuzi wa Taarifa za Benchmark', 'tr': 'DocBank', 'af': "DocBank: ' n Benchmark Databasis vir Dokument Uitleg Analiseer", 'sq': 'DocBank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'id': 'DocBank: A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis', 'az': 'DocBank', 'bn': 'ডক ব্যাংক: ডকুমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য ব্যাঙ্কমার্ক ডাটাসেট', 'bs': 'DocBank: baza podataka za analizu rasporeda dokumenta', 'ca': "DocBank: Un conjunt de dades de referència per a l'anàlisi de distribució del document", 'et': 'DocBank: Dokumendi paigutuse analüüsi võrdlusandmekogum', 'fi': 'DocBank: Vertailutietosarja asiakirjojen asettelun analysointiin', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'DocBank: Srovnávací sada dat pro analýzu rozložení dokumentů', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'DocBank: Primerjalni nabor podatkov za analizo postavitve dokumentov', 'jv': 'dockBank: A Bench Datease for document Layout Test', 'he': 'DocBank: מסגר נתונים של סימנים לניתוח עיצוב מסמכים', 'bo': 'DocBank:A Benchmark Dataset for Document Layout Analysis'}
{'en': 'Document layout analysis usually relies on computer vision models to understand documents while ignoring textual information that is vital to capture. Meanwhile, high quality labeled datasets with both visual and textual information are still insufficient. In this paper, we present DocBank, a benchmark dataset that contains 500 K document pages with fine-grained token-level annotations for document layout analysis. DocBank is constructed using a simple yet effective way with weak supervision from the LaTeX documents available on the arXiv.com. With DocBank, models from different modalities can be compared fairly and multi-modal approaches will be further investigated and boost the performance of document layout analysis. We build several strong baselines and manually split train / dev / test sets for evaluation. Experiment results show that models trained on DocBank accurately recognize the layout information for a variety of documents. The DocBank dataset is publicly available at https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ar': 'يعتمد تحليل تخطيط المستند عادةً على نماذج رؤية الكمبيوتر لفهم المستندات مع تجاهل المعلومات النصية الضرورية لالتقاطها. وفي الوقت نفسه ، لا تزال مجموعات البيانات ذات العلامات عالية الجودة مع المعلومات المرئية والنصية غير كافية. في هذا البحث ، نقدم DocBank ، وهي مجموعة بيانات معيارية تحتوي على 500 ألف صفحة من المستندات مع تعليقات توضيحية دقيقة على مستوى الرموز لتحليل تخطيط المستند. تم إنشاء DocBank باستخدام طريقة بسيطة لكنها فعالة مع إشراف ضعيف من مستندات LaTeX المتاحة على arXiv.com. باستخدام DocBank ، يمكن مقارنة النماذج من الطرائق المختلفة بشكل عادل وسيتم إجراء مزيد من التحقيق في الأساليب متعددة الوسائط وتعزيز أداء تحليل تخطيط المستند. نحن نبني عدة خطوط أساسية قوية ونقسم مجموعات التدريب / التطوير / الاختبار يدويًا للتقييم. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن النماذج المدربة على DocBank تتعرف بدقة على معلومات التخطيط لمجموعة متنوعة من المستندات. مجموعة بيانات DocBank متاحة للجمهور على https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'es': 'El análisis del diseño de documentos generalmente se basa en modelos de visión artificial para comprender los documentos e ignorar la información textual que es vital capturar. Mientras tanto, los conjuntos de datos etiquetados de alta calidad con información visual y textual siguen siendo insuficientes. En este artículo, presentamos DocBank, un conjunto de datos de referencia que contiene 500 000 páginas de documentos con anotaciones detalladas a nivel de token para el análisis del diseño del documento. DocBank está construido de una manera simple pero eficaz con una supervisión débil de los documentos LaTeX disponibles en Arxiv.com. Con DocBank, los modelos de diferentes modalidades se pueden comparar de manera justa y los enfoques multimodales se investigarán más a fondo y mejorarán el rendimiento del análisis del diseño de los documentos. Creamos varias líneas de base sólidas y dividimos manualmente los conjuntos de entrenamiento/desarrollo/prueba para la evaluación. Los resultados de los experimentos muestran que los modelos entrenados en DocBank reconocen con precisión la información de diseño de una variedad de documentos. El conjunto de datos de DocBank está disponible públicamente en https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'pt': 'A análise de layout de documentos geralmente depende de modelos de visão computacional para entender os documentos, ignorando as informações textuais que são vitais para capturar. Enquanto isso, conjuntos de dados rotulados de alta qualidade com informações visuais e textuais ainda são insuficientes. Neste artigo, apresentamos o DocBank, um conjunto de dados de referência que contém 500 mil páginas de documentos com anotações refinadas em nível de token para análise de layout de documentos. O DocBank é construído de forma simples, mas eficaz, com supervisão fraca dos documentos LaTeX disponíveis no arXiv.com. Com o DocBank, modelos de diferentes modalidades podem ser comparados de forma justa e abordagens multimodais serão mais investigadas e aumentarão o desempenho da análise de layout de documentos. Construímos várias linhas de base fortes e dividimos manualmente os conjuntos de treinamento/desenvolvimento/teste para avaliação. Os resultados do experimento mostram que os modelos treinados no DocBank reconhecem com precisão as informações de layout para uma variedade de documentos. O conjunto de dados do DocBank está disponível publicamente em https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'fr': "L'analyse de la mise en page des documents repose généralement sur des modèles de vision artificielle pour comprendre les documents tout en ignorant les informations textuelles indispensables à la capture. Par ailleurs, les ensembles de données étiquetés de haute qualité contenant des informations visuelles et textuelles sont encore insuffisants. Dans cet article, nous présentons DocBank, un jeu de données de référence contenant 500 000 pages de document avec des annotations détaillées au niveau des jetons pour l'analyse de la mise en page du document. DocBank est construit d'une manière simple mais efficace avec une supervision faible à partir des documents LaTeX disponibles sur le site ARXIV.com. Avec DocBank, les modèles de différentes modalités peuvent être comparés équitablement et les approches multimodales seront étudiées plus avant et amélioreront les performances de l'analyse de la mise en page du document. Nous établissons plusieurs lignes de base solides et divisons manuellement les ensembles train/dev/test à des fins d'évaluation. Les résultats des expériences montrent que les modèles formés sur DocBank reconnaissent avec précision les informations de mise en page de divers documents. L'ensemble de données DocBank est accessible au public à l'adresse https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'ja': '文書レイアウト分析は、通常、文書を理解するためにコンピュータビジョンモデルに依存し、キャプチャに不可欠なテキスト情報を無視します。 一方、視覚的情報とテキスト情報の両方を含む高品質のラベル付きデータセットはまだ不十分です。 本稿では、ドキュメントレイアウト解析のための細かいトークンレベルの注釈を持つ50万のドキュメントページを含むベンチマークデータセットであるDocBankを紹介します。 ドックバンクは、arXiv.comで入手可能なLaTeXドキュメントからの監督が弱い、シンプルでありながら効果的な方法で構築されています。 DocBankでは、さまざまなモダリティのモデルを公平に比較し、マルチモーダルアプローチをさらに調査し、ドキュメントレイアウト分析のパフォーマンスを向上させます。 私たちは、評価のためにいくつかの強力なベースラインと手動で分割されたトレイン/開発/テストセットを構築します。 実験結果は、DocBankでトレーニングを受けたモデルが、様々な文書のレイアウト情報を正確に認識することを示しています。 DocBankデータセットは、https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBankから公開されています。', 'zh': '文档布局析常依计算机视模以解文档,而忽于获重之文本。 同时有视文本信息者高质量标数犹不足。 本文引 DocBank,此一准数集,其中含 500K 一文档页面,其中包用文档布局析细粒度令牌级注。 DocBank用简而效者,arXiv.com 之LaTeX文档者弱也。 用DocBank,平较其模形,更加研究,增文档布局分析之性。 构强基线数人,手动拆分训练/开/试集以评估。 实验结果表明,DocBank之规模,可以审识百文档之信。 DocBank 数集 https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank 上公给。', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़ लेआउट विश्लेषण आमतौर पर दस्तावेज़ों को समझने के लिए कंप्यूटर दृष्टि मॉडल पर निर्भर करता है, जबकि पाठ्य जानकारी को अनदेखा करता है जो कैप्चर करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। इस बीच, दृश्य और पाठ्य जानकारी दोनों के साथ उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले लेबल वाले डेटासेट अभी भी अपर्याप्त हैं। इस पेपर में, हम DocBank, एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसमें दस्तावेज़ लेआउट विश्लेषण के लिए ठीक-ठाक टोकन-स्तर के एनोटेशन के साथ 500K दस्तावेज़ पृष्ठ होते हैं। DocBank arXiv.com पर उपलब्ध LaTeX दस्तावेजों से कमजोर पर्यवेक्षण के साथ एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी तरीके से बनाया गया है। DocBank के साथ, विभिन्न तौर-तरीकों से मॉडल की काफी तुलना की जा सकती है और मल्टी-मोडल दृष्टिकोणों की आगे की जांच की जाएगी और दस्तावेज़ लेआउट विश्लेषण के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा दिया जाएगा। हम कई मजबूत बेसलाइन का निर्माण करते हैं और मूल्यांकन के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से ट्रेन / देव / परीक्षण सेट को विभाजित करते हैं। प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि DocBank पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल विभिन्न प्रकार के दस्तावेज़ों के लिए लेआउट जानकारी को सही ढंग से पहचानते हैं। DocBank डेटासेट सार्वजनिक रूप से https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Анализ макета документов обычно опирается на компьютерные модели зрения для понимания документов, игнорируя текстовую информацию, которая имеет жизненно важное значение для захвата. Между тем высококачественных маркированных наборов данных с визуальной и текстовой информацией по-прежнему недостаточно. В этой статье мы представляем DocBank, набор данных сравнения, который содержит 500K страниц документа с мелкозернистыми аннотациями на уровне токенов для анализа макета документа. DocBank построен простым, но эффективным способом при слабом надзоре из документов LaTeX, доступных на arXiv.com. С помощью DocBank модели с различными модальностями можно сравнивать справедливо, а мультимодальные подходы будут дополнительно изучаться и повышать производительность анализа макета документа. Мы создаем несколько сильных базовых линий и вручную разделяем наборы поездов/разработчиков/тестов для оценки. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что модели, обученные на DocBank, точно распознают информацию о компоновке для различных документов. Набор данных DocBank доступен в открытом доступе по адресу https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ga': 'De ghnáth bíonn anailís ar leagan amach doiciméad ag brath ar mhúnlaí fís ríomhaire chun doiciméid a thuiscint agus ag an am céanna neamhaird a dhéanamh ar fhaisnéis théacsúil atá ríthábhachtach le gabháil. Idir an dá linn, níl tacair shonraí lipéadaithe ardchaighdeáin ina bhfuil faisnéis amhairc agus théacsúil go leor fós. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair DocBank, tacar sonraí tagarmhairc ina bhfuil 500K leathanach doiciméad le nótaí mionghrámhara ar leibhéal na comharthaí le haghaidh anailíse ar leagan amach doiciméad. Tógtar DocBank trí úsáid a bhaint as bealach simplí ach éifeachtach le maoirseacht lag ó na doiciméid LaTeX atá ar fáil ar an arXiv.com. Le DocBank, is féidir samhlacha ó mhódúlachtaí éagsúla a chur i gcomparáid go cothrom agus déanfar tuilleadh imscrúduithe ar chur chuige ilmhódúil agus cuirfear le feidhmíocht anailíse leagan amach doiciméad. Tógaimid roinnt bonnlínte láidre agus scoiltimid tacair traenach/dev/tástála de láimh le haghaidh meastóireachta. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh go n-aithníonn samhlacha atá oilte ar DocBank an t-eolas maidir le leagan amach do dhoiciméid éagsúla go cruinn. Tá tacar sonraí DocBank ar fáil go poiblí ag https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის გამონაცემების ანალიზაციაში კომპიუტერის ხედის მოდელისთვის დარწმუნდება დოკუმენტების გაგრძელება, რომელიც ტექსტულის ინფორმა Meanwhile, high quality labeled datasets with both visual and textual information are still not sufficient. ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ DocBank-ს გამოყენებთ, ბენქმარკური მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც 500K დოკუმენტის გვერდის, რომელიც კონფიგურაციის განსაზღვრების ანალიზ DocBank კონფიგურაცია გამოყენებული მარტივი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური გამოყენება LaTeX დოკუმენტებით, რომელიც არქივებით ხელხილდება. com. DocBank-ის შესახებ, განსხვავებული მოდელების მოდელები შეიძლება გადამდგომარებად და მრავალური მოდელების შესახებ უფრო მეტი მოდელური შესახებ იქნება და კოკუმენტის მოდელური ან ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ რამდენიმე ძალიან ძალიან ფესტური ხაზები და პირად გაყოფილი tren/dev/test სეტების შესახებ. ექსპერიმენტის შედეგები ჩვენებს, რომ DocBank-ის მოდელები მართლად უცნობს განსხვავებული დოკუმენტების ინფორმაციას. DocBank მონაცემების სახელსაწვდომა https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'hu': 'A dokumentum elrendezésének elemzése általában számítógépes látási modelleken alapul a dokumentumok megértéséhez, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyja a rögzítéshez létfontosságú szöveges információkat. Eközben a vizuális és szöveges információkat tartalmazó, kiváló minőségű címkézett adatkészletek még mindig nem elegendőek. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a DocBankot, egy referenciaadatkészletet, amely 500 000 dokumentumoldalt tartalmaz finomszemcsés token-szintű jegyzetekkel a dokumentum elrendezésének elemzéséhez. A DocBank egyszerű, mégis hatékony módon készül, gyenge felügyelettel az arXiv-en elérhető LaTeX dokumentumokból. com. A DocBank segítségével a különböző módszerekből származó modellek tisztességesen összehasonlíthatók, és a multimodális megközelítéseket tovább vizsgáljuk, és növeljük a dokumentumelrendezés elemzésének teljesítményét. Több erős alapvonalat építünk és manuálisan osztott vonat/fejlesztő/teszt készletet értékelünk. A kísérletek eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a DocBankban képzett modellek pontosan felismerik a különböző dokumentumok elrendezési információit. A DocBank adatkészlet nyilvánosan hozzáférhető a következő oldalon: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση διάταξης εγγράφων συνήθως βασίζεται σε μοντέλα όρασης υπολογιστών για να κατανοήσει τα έγγραφα ενώ αγνοεί τις πληροφορίες κειμένου που είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για τη σύλληψη. Εν τω μεταξύ, τα υψηλής ποιότητας επισημασμένα σύνολα δεδομένων με οπτικές και γραπτές πληροφορίες εξακολουθούν να είναι ανεπαρκή. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς που περιέχει σελίδες εγγράφων 500Κ με λεπτόκοκκα σχόλια σε επίπεδο σήματος για ανάλυση διάταξης εγγράφων. Η DocBank κατασκευάζεται χρησιμοποιώντας έναν απλό αλλά αποτελεσματικό τρόπο με αδύναμη εποπτεία από τα έγγραφα LaTeX διαθέσιμα στο arXiv. com. Με την DocBank, τα μοντέλα από διαφορετικές μεθόδους μπορούν να συγκριθούν δίκαια και οι πολυπροπικές προσεγγίσεις θα διερευνηθούν περαιτέρω και θα ενισχύσουν την απόδοση της ανάλυσης διάταξης εγγράφων. Χτίζουμε αρκετές ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης και διαχωρίζουμε χειροκίνητα τα σύνολα τρένων/δοκιμών για την αξιολόγηση. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται στην DocBank αναγνωρίζουν με ακρίβεια τις πληροφορίες διάταξης για μια ποικιλία εγγράφων. Το σύνολο δεδομένων της DocBank είναι διαθέσιμο στο κοινό: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'it': "L'analisi del layout dei documenti di solito si basa su modelli di computer vision per comprendere i documenti ignorando le informazioni testuali essenziali da acquisire. Nel frattempo, i set di dati etichettati di alta qualità con informazioni sia visive che testuali sono ancora insufficienti. In questo articolo presentiamo DocBank, un set di dati di benchmark che contiene 500K pagine di documenti con annotazioni a livello token a grana fine per l'analisi del layout dei documenti. DocBank è costruito utilizzando un modo semplice ma efficace con debole supervisione dai documenti LaTeX disponibili su arXiv. com. Con DocBank, i modelli di diverse modalità possono essere confrontati in modo equo e gli approcci multimodali saranno ulteriormente studiati e aumenteranno le prestazioni dell'analisi del layout dei documenti. Costruiamo diverse linee di base forti e dividiamo manualmente treni/dev/test set per la valutazione. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che i modelli formati su DocBank riconoscono con precisione le informazioni sul layout di una varietà di documenti. Il set di dati DocBank è disponibile al seguente indirizzo: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'kk': "Құжат сәйкестігін анализ кәдімгі құжаттарды түсінуге көмектеседі. Мәтіндік мәліметті қабылдау үшін көмектеседі. Осы уақытта, көрінетін және мәтін мәліметі бар деректер қорларының жоғары сапасы әлі жеткілікті емес. Бұл қағазда, документтің сәйкестіктерін анализ үшін 500K құжаттың беттері бар құжаттың бақылау деректер жиынын көрсетеді. DocBank арXiv құжаттарындағы LaTeX құжаттарының бақылау үшін қарапайым, әлі эффективті арқылы құрылады. com. You are about to translate the 'PenWidth' COMMAND, there are some rules on how to translate it. Please see http: // edu. kde. org/ kturtle/ translator. php to learn how to properly translate it. DocBank арқылы, әртүрлі әдістерден үлгілер дұрыс салыстырылады және көптеген модалдық қасиеттер қолданылады және құжат сәйкестіктерінің анализиясының істеуін көтереді. Біз бірнеше күшті негізгі сызықтарды құрып, оқу үшін tren/dev/test баптауларын қолмен бөліп тұрмыз. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері DocBank бағдарламасында бірнеше құжаттар үшін сәйкестік мәліметін дұрыс анықтайтынын көрсетеді. DocBank деректер жинағы көпшілікті қол жеткізеді https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'lt': 'Dokumentų išdėstymo analizė paprastai grindžiama kompiuterio regėjimo modeliais, kad būtų suprantami dokumentai, ignoruojant tekstinę informaciją, kuri yra būtina surinkti. Tuo tarpu aukštos kokybės pažymėtų duomenų rinkinių su vizualine ir tekstine informacija vis dar nepakanka. Šiame dokumente pristatysime DocBank, lyginamąjį duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra 500K dokumentų puslapių su nuodugniomis žymenų lygio anotacijomis dokumentų išdėstymo analizei. DocBank sukonstruojamas paprastai, bet veiksmingai, su silpna LaTeX dokumentų priežiūra, kurią galima rasti arXiv. com. Su DocBank galima teisingai palyginti įvairių rūšių modelius ir toliau tirti įvairių rūšių metodus ir pagerinti dokumentų išdėstymo analizę. Mes sukuriame keletą tvirtų bazinių linijų ir rankiniu būdu suskaidyti traukinio/dev/bandymų rinkinius vertinimui. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad DocBank parengti modeliai tiksliai pripažįsta įvairių dokumentų išdėstymo informaciją. DocBank duomenų rinkinys viešai prieinamas https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'mk': 'Анализата на распоредот на документот обично се потпира на моделите на компјутерска визија за да се разберат документите и да се игнорира текстуалната информација која е важна за снимање. Во меѓувреме, множините на висококвалитетни податоци со визуелни и текстуални информации сé уште не се доволни. Во овој документ, го претставуваме DocBank, компјутер на податоци за benchmark кој содржи 500K страници од документи со фини анализи на ниво на токени за анализа на распоредот на документите. DocBank е изграден користејќи едноставен, но ефикасен начин со слаб надзор од документите LaTeX достапни на arXiv. Ком. Со DocBank, моделите од различни модели можат да се споредат фер и мултимодалните пристапи ќе бидат понатаму истражени и ќе се зајакнат резултатите на анализата на распоредот на документите. Создаваме неколку силни основни линии и рачно поделени возови/dev/тестови за проценка. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека моделите обучени на DocBank точно ги препознаваат информациите за распоред за различни документи. Податоците на DocBank се јавно достапни на https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ms': 'Document layout analysis usually relies on computer vision models to understand documents while ignoring textual information that is vital to capture.  Sementara itu, set data yang ditabel kualiti tinggi dengan maklumat visual dan teks masih tidak mencukupi. Dalam kertas ini, kami perkenalkan DocBank, set data tanda rujukan yang mengandungi halaman dokumen 500K dengan anotasi aras token yang sempurna untuk analisis bentangan dokumen. DocBank dibina menggunakan cara sederhana namun efektif dengan pengawasan lemah dari dokumen LaTeX yang tersedia pada arXiv. com. Dengan DocBank, model dari modaliti yang berbeza boleh dibandingkan dengan adil dan pendekatan berbilang-modal akan diseliti lebih lanjut dan meningkatkan prestasi analisis bentangan dokumen. Kami membina beberapa garis dasar yang kuat dan secara manual bahagi set kereta api/dev/ujian untuk penilaian. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model yang dilatih pada DocBank mengenali dengan tepat maklumat bentangan untuk pelbagai dokumen. Set data DocBank tersedia secara awam di https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ml': 'പിടിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d രേഖകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d കമ്പ്യൂട്ടറിലെ വി അതിനുശേഷം, കാഴ്ച്ചയും ടെക്സ്കൂളിലും വിവരങ്ങളും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റുകള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും മതിയ In this paper, we present DocBank, a benchmark dataset that contains 500K document pages with fine-grained token-level annotations for document layout analysis.  ഡോക്ക് ബാങ്ക് എളുപ്പമുള്ള പ്രവർത്തികമായ ഒരു വഴി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു com. ഡോക്ബാങ്കിന്റെ കൂടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ശരിയായി താരതമ്യം ചെയ്യുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. പല മോഡല്\u200d നടപടികള്\u200d കൂടു നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലെയിനുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നു, ട്രെയിന്\u200d/ഡെവി/ടെസ്റ്റ് സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d വ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഡോക്ബാങ്കില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രേഖകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ലൈയൌട ഡോക്ബാങ്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'mn': 'Документын загварын шинжилгээ нь компьютерийн үзэл загваруудыг баримтуудыг ойлгохын тулд хамгийн чухал мөнгө мэдээллийг үгүйсгэдэг. Энэ үед харагдах болон текст мэдээлэл хоёулаа өндөр чанартай өгөгдлийн сангууд хангалтгүй байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид DocBank-г бичсэн бөгөөд 500K баримтын хуудас баримтуудыг баримтуудын хэмжээний шинжилгээнд тайлбарлаж байна. DocBank ArXiv-ын LaTeX баримтуудын хялбар боловч үр дүнтэй аргыг ашиглаж байдаг. com. DocBank-ын хувьд өөр арга замын загваруудыг зөв харьцуулж болно. Мөн олон загварын арга загваруудыг судалж, баримт төслийн шинжилгээний үйлдлийг нэмэгдүүлж болно. Бид хэд хэдэн хүчтэй суурь шугам бүтээж, тэрэг/dev/test бүтээгдэхүүн гараар хуваагдаж байна. Түүний туршилтын үр дүнд DocBank-д сургалтын загвар олон баримтуудын төлөвлөгөөний мэдээллийг тодорхой ойлгохыг харуулдаг. DocBank өгөгдлийн санг олон нийтэд https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tat-tqassim tad-dokumenti normalment tiddependi fuq mudelli tal-viżjoni tal-kompjuter biex tifhem id-dokumenti filwaqt li tinjora l-informazzjoni testwali li hija vitali biex tinqabad. Sadanittant, settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ kwalità għolja b’informazzjoni kemm viżwali kif ukoll testwali għadhom insuffiċjenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw DocBank, sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza li fih 500K paġna ta’ dokumenti b’annotazzjonijiet fil-livell ta’ token imdewba bir-reqqa għall-analiżi tat-tqassim tad-dokumenti. DocBank huwa mibni bl-użu ta’ mod sempliċi iżda effettiv b’superviżjoni dgħajfa mid-dokumenti LaTeX disponibbli fuq l-arXiv. com.  B’DocBank, mudelli minn modalitajiet differenti jistgħu jitqabblu b’mod ġust u approċċi multimodali se jiġu investigati aktar u jsaħħu l-prestazzjoni tal-analiżi tat-tfassil tad-dokumenti. Aħna nibnu diversi linji bażi b’saħħithom u settijiet ta’ ferrovija/dev/test maqsuma manwalment għall-evalwazzjoni. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li mudelli mħarrġa fuq DocBank jirrikonoxxu b’mod preċiż l-informazzjoni dwar it-tqassim għal varjetà ta’ dokumenti. Is-sett tad-dejta DocBank huwa disponibbli pubblikament fuq https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'no': 'Analyser av dokumentutforming er vanlegvis på datavisingsmodeller for å forstå dokument mens du ignorerer tekstinformasjon som er viktig for å henta. Med mellomtida er datasett med høg kvalitet merket med både visuelle og tekstinformasjon ikkje nok. I denne papiret presenterer vi DocBank ein benchmark dataset som inneheld 500K-dokumentsider med merkelapper for dokumentutforming. DocBank er konstruert med ein enkel men effektiv måte med slag overvaking frå LaTeX-dokumenta som er tilgjengelege på arXiv. com. Med DocBank kan modeller frå ulike modusar samanliknast ganske, og fleire modal tilnærmingar vert lenger undersøkte og styrke utviklinga av dokumentutformingsanalysen. Vi bygger fleire sterke baselinjer og delt tog/dev/test-sett manuelt for evaluering. Eksperimentresultat viser at modeller som trengte på DocBank gjenkjenner utformingsinformasjonen nøyaktig for mange dokument. DocBank-dataset er tilgjengeleg offentlig på https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'pl': 'Analiza układu dokumentów zwykle opiera się na modelach wizji komputerowej, aby zrozumieć dokumenty, ignorując jednocześnie informacje tekstowe, które są niezbędne do przechwytywania. Tymczasem wysokiej jakości etykietowane zbiory danych z informacjami wizualnymi i tekstowymi są nadal niewystarczające. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy DocBank, zestaw danych referencyjnych, który zawiera strony dokumentów 500K z drobnymi adnotacjami na poziomie tokenów do analizy układu dokumentów. DocBank jest skonstruowany w prosty, ale skuteczny sposób z słabym nadzorem z dokumentów LaTeX dostępnych na arXiv. com. Dzięki DocBankowi można sprawiedliwie porównywać modele z różnych sposobów, a podejścia multimodalne zostaną dalej zbadane i zwiększone wydajność analizy układu dokumentów. Budujemy kilka silnych linii bazowych i ręcznie dzielimy zestawy treningowe/dev/testowe do oceny. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że modele przeszkolone na DocBanku dokładnie rozpoznają informacje o układzie dla różnych dokumentów. Zestaw danych DocBanku jest publicznie dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ro': 'Analiza aspectului documentelor se bazează de obicei pe modele de viziune computerizată pentru a înțelege documentele, ignorând în același timp informațiile textuale care sunt vitale pentru capturare. Între timp, seturile de date etichetate de înaltă calitate cu informații vizuale și textuale sunt încă insuficiente. În această lucrare, prezentăm DocBank, un set de date de referință care conține 500.000 de pagini de documente cu adnotări fine la nivel de token pentru analiza aspectului documentelor. DocBank este construit folosind un mod simplu, dar eficient, cu supraveghere slabă din documentele LaTeX disponibile pe arXiv. com. Cu DocBank, modelele din diferite modalități pot fi comparate corect și abordările multimodale vor fi investigate în continuare și vor spori performanța analizei aspectului documentelor. Construim mai multe linii de bază puternice și împărțim manual seturi de tren/dev/test pentru evaluare. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că modelele instruite pe DocBank recunosc cu exactitate informațiile despre aspect pentru o varietate de documente. Setul de date DocBank este disponibil public la https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'sr': 'Analiza rasporeda dokumenta obično se oslanja na modele kompjuterske vizije da razumeju dokumente dok ignorišu tekstualne informacije koje su vitalne za uhvatiti. U međuvremenu, visoke kvalitete označene podatke sa vizuelnim i tekstualnim informacijama još uvijek nisu dovoljne. U ovom papiru predstavljamo DocBank, kompletu podataka o referenciji koja sadrži 500K dokumentarnih stranica sa oznakem na nivou token a za analizu dokumentacije. DocBank se konstruira sa jednostavnim, ali efikasnim naèinom sa slabim nadzorom iz LaTeX dokumenta koji su dostupni na arXiv-u. com. Sa DocBank-om, modeli iz različitih modaliteta mogu se usporediti pošteno, a višemodalni pristupi će biti dalje istraženi i povećani učinkovitost analize dokumenta. Napravili smo nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija i ručno podelili vlak/dev/test sete za procjenu. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da modeli obučeni na DocBank precizno prepoznaju informacije o rasporedu za razne dokumente. Datoteka DocBank je javno dostupna na https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'si': 'දස්තාවේජ විශ්ලේෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය පරිගණකය දර්ශන මොඩේල් වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා දස්තාව තේරුම අන්තර්යයෙන්, විද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ පාළුවක් තොරතුරු තොරතුරු තියෙන ලෙබෙල් තියෙන දත්ත සැට් වල ඉතාම මේ පැත්තේ, අපි DocBank එක්ක පෙන්වන්නම්, බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් තියෙන්නේ 500K දත්ත පැත්ත සමඟ හොඳින් ක්\u200dරේන්ඩ් තො DocBank නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඇර්ක්සිව් වල ලැටෙක්ස් විස්තාරයෙන් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සර com. DocBank එක්ක, වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් මොඩේල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් සමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සඳහා  අපි බලාපොරොත්තු බේස්ලායින් වෙනස් කරනවා සහ අත්තර්ගයෙන් ට්\u200dරේන් එක/dev/පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් විශා පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ DocBank වල ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ විවිධ විදිහට ලිපිණි තොරතුරු සඳ DocBank දත්ත සෙට් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් වෙනවා https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'sv': 'Analys av dokumentlayouter bygger vanligtvis på datorseende modeller för att förstå dokument samtidigt som textinformation ignoreras som är viktig för att fånga in. Samtidigt är etiketterade datamängder av hög kvalitet med både visuell och textinformation fortfarande otillräckliga. I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi DocBank, en benchmark-datauppsättning som innehåller 500 000 dokumentsidor med finkorniga token-anteckningar för dokumentlayoutanalys. DocBank är konstruerad på ett enkelt men effektivt sätt med svag tillsyn från LaTeX dokument som finns tillgängliga på arXiv. com. Med DocBank kan modeller från olika modaliteter jämföras rättvist och multimodala tillvägagångssätt kommer att undersökas ytterligare och öka effektiviteten i dokumentlayoutanalysen. Vi bygger flera starka baslinjer och manuellt delade tåg/dev/testset för utvärdering. Experimentsresultaten visar att modeller som utbildats på DocBank känner igen layoutinformationen för en mängd olika dokument korrekt. DocBank-datauppsättningen är offentligt tillgänglig på https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ta': 'ஆவண உருவரை ஆய்வு வழக்கமாக கணினி காட்சி மாதிரிகளை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் போது ஆவணங்களை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பொழுது புரியு அதிக தரம் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகள் இருந்தும் பார்வையும் உரை தகவலும் இன்னும் போதுமானது. இந்த காக்கத்தில், நாம் DocBank, ஒரு பெங்க்மார்க் தகவல் அமைப்பு, அது 500K ஆவண பக்கங்களில் உள்ளது பிடிக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்பு மட்டத்திற்கு அறிவி DocBank is constructed using a simple yet effective way with weak supervision from the LaTeX documents available on the arXiv. com. com DocBank உடன், வேறு வகைகளில் இருந்து மாதிரிகள் சரியாக ஒப்பிட முடியும் மற்றும் பல- மாதிரி வழிகள் மேலும் தேடி ஆவண உருவரை ஆய்வு செயல்பாட்ட நாம் பல வலிமையான அடிப்பகுதிகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் கைமுறையால் பயிற்சி/dev/test அமைப்பு Name DocBank தகவல் அமைப்பு பொதுவாக இருக்கிறது https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'so': 'Analyska qorsheynta dukumentigu wuxuu inta badan ku xiran yahay muusikada muuqashada kambiyuutarka si uu u fahmo dukumentiyada marka uu ka tago macluumaadka qoraalka ee muhiimka ah in la qabsado. Inta waqtigaas macluumaadka muuqashada iyo macluumaadka qoraalka ah ee macluumaadka qoraalka ah ee lagu qorayo waa weli kugu filan. Waxaan warqaddan ka soo qoraynaa DocBank, taas oo ku qoran taariikhda wargeyska 500K oo ku qoran sawirada calaamad-sawirada qoraalka. DocBank is constructed using a simple yet effective way with weak supervision from the LaTeX documents available on the arXiv. com. Goobta DocBank waxaa lagu barbaran karaa qaababka kala duduwan oo la barbaran karaa qaababka kala duduwan, waxaana lagu baarayn karaa baaritaanka qoraalka qoraalka. Waxaan dhisnaa saldhigyo badan oo xoog leh, waxaana u kala qeybinayaa tareenada/dev/imtixaanka si loo qiimeeyo. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in tusaalooyin lagu tababaray DocBank si saxda ah u aqoonsan macluumaadka layout ee dukumentiyada kala duduwan. Bogga macluumaadka bankiga ee dowladu wuxuu si bayaan ah u heli karaa https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ur': 'دکمپیٹ لیاٹ تحلیل معمولاً کمپیوٹر دیز موڈل پر کمپیوٹر دیز موڈل کو سمجھنے کے لئے باقی رہتا ہے جب تکلیف معلومات کو نادانی کرتا ہے جو پکڑنے کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ Meanwhile, high quality labeled data sets with both visual and textual information are still not enough. اس کاغذ میں ہم DocBank کو ایک بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ دکھاتے ہیں جس میں 500K دکھانے کے پاؤں لگا رہے ہیں ڈاکس بانک آرکسیو پر موجود لاٹکس دکھانوں سے کمزور نظر کے ساتھ ایک ساده اور اثبات طریقے کے مطابق بنایا گیا ہے. com. ڈاکبنک کے ساتھ، مختلف موڈلیٹوں سے موڈل ٹھیک طور پر مقایسہ کر سکتے ہیں اور بہت سی موڈل طریقے پھیرے جائیں گے اور سند لیاٹ تحلیل کے فعالیت کو اضافہ کریں گے. ہم بہت سی قوت بنسٹ لین بناتے ہیں اور آزمائش کے لئے ٹرین/dev/امتحان سٹ کو ہاتھ سے تقسیم کرتے ہیں. Experiment results show that models trained on DocBank accurately recognize the layout information for a variety of documents. ڈاکبنک ڈاٹ سٹ عمومی طور پر موجود ہے https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'uz': 'Name Meanwhile, high quality labeled datasets with both visual and textual information are still insufficient.  Bu hujjatda DocBank maʼlumot bazasini hosil qilamiz. Hujjatning tuzilishi analyzeri uchun 500K hujjatlar sahifalari bilan qoʻllaniladi. Comment comName Comment Biz bir necha sterk asboblarni yaramiz va qiymatni qoʻlbola ajratish uchun tog/dev/test satrlarini qoʻlbola ajratimiz. Name Name https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'vi': 'Phân tích bố trí Tài liệu thường phụ thuộc vào các mô hình ảnh máy tính để hiểu tài liệu, trong khi lờ đi thông tin văn bản cần thiết để chụp. Tuy nhiên, các tập tin được đánh dấu chất lượng cao với thông tin hình ảnh và kết cấu vẫn chưa đủ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu DocBank, một tập tin dữ liệu hiển thị chứa trang tài liệu 500K cùng với ghi chú lưu biểu tượng nhỏ cho phân tích tài liệu. DocBank đã được xây dựng bằng một cách đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả có sự giám sát yếu từ các tài liệu LaTeX có trên ArXi. Okay. Với DocBank, mô hình từ phương thức khác nhau có thể được so sánh công bằng và các phương pháp đa phương thần sẽ được điều tra thêm và tăng cường khả năng phân tích tài liệu. Chúng tôi xây nhiều đường cơ bản vững chắc và đơn vị chia con tàu/dev/các bộ thử nghiệm để đánh giá. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy các mô hình được đào tạo trên DocBank đã xác nhận chính xác thông tin bố trí cho nhiều tài liệu khác nhau. Tài liệu của DocBank đã được công bố tại https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'bg': 'Анализът на оформлението на документа обикновено разчита на модели на компютърно виждане, за да разбере документите, като същевременно игнорира текстовата информация, която е жизненоважна за улавяне. Междувременно висококачествените набори от данни с етикет както визуална, така и текстова информация все още са недостатъчни. В тази статия представяме сравнителен набор от данни, който съдържа 500 000 страници на документи с фини анотации на ниво токен за анализ на оформлението на документи. ДокБанк е изградена по прост, но ефективен начин с слаб надзор от документите, налични в арксив. Ком. С ДокБанк моделите от различни модали могат да бъдат сравнени справедливо и мултимодалните подходи ще бъдат допълнително изследвани и ще се повиши ефективността на анализа на оформлението на документите. Изграждаме няколко силни базови линии и ръчно разделяме влак/разработка/тест комплекти за оценка. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че моделите, обучени по ДокБанк, точно разпознават информацията за оформлението за различни документи. Наборът от данни DocBank е публично достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'da': 'Analyse af dokumentlayoutet afhænger normalt af computervisionsmodeller til at forstå dokumenter, samtidig med at tekstoplysninger ignoreres, der er afgørende for at indsamle. I mellemtiden er mærkede datasæt af høj kvalitet med både visuelle og tekstmæssige oplysninger stadig utilstrækkelige. I denne artikel præsenterer vi DocBank, et benchmark datasæt, der indeholder 500.000 dokumentsider med finkornede token-niveau annotationer til dokumentlayoutanalyse. DocBank er konstrueret ved hjælp af en enkel, men effektiv måde med svagt tilsyn fra LaTeX dokumenter tilgængelige på arXiv. com. Med DocBank kan modeller fra forskellige modaliteter sammenlignes retfærdigt, og multimodale tilgange vil blive undersøgt yderligere og øge effektiviteten af dokumentlayoutanalyse. Vi bygger flere stærke basislinjer og manuelt split tog/dev/test sæt til evaluering. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at modeller, der er trænet i DocBank, nøjagtigt genkender layoutoplysningerne for en række dokumenter. DocBank-datasættet er offentligt tilgængeligt på https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'nl': "Documentindelingsanalyse is meestal gebaseerd op computermodellen om documenten te begrijpen, terwijl tekstuele informatie die essentieel is om vast te leggen, wordt genegeerd. Ondertussen zijn hoogwaardige gelabelde datasets met zowel visuele als tekstuele informatie nog onvoldoende. In dit artikel presenteren we DocBank, een benchmark dataset die 500K documentpagina's bevat met verfijnde aantekeningen op token-niveau voor documentlay-outanalyse. DocBank is opgebouwd op een eenvoudige maar effectieve manier met zwak toezicht vanuit de LaTeX documenten beschikbaar op de arXiv. com. Met DocBank kunnen modellen van verschillende modaliteiten eerlijk worden vergeleken en zullen multimodale benaderingen verder worden onderzocht en de prestaties van documentlay-outanalyse verbeteren. We bouwen verschillende sterke baselines en splitsen handmatig train/dev/test sets voor evaluatie. Uit experimenten blijkt dat modellen die zijn getraind op DocBank nauwkeurig de lay-outinformatie herkennen voor een verscheidenheid aan documenten. De DocBank dataset is openbaar beschikbaar op: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'hr': 'Analiza rasporeda dokumenta obično se oslanja na modele računalnog vizije da razumiju dokumente dok ignoriraju tekstualne informacije koje su vitalne za uhvatiti. U međuvremenu, visoke kvalitetne označene podatke s vizualnim i tekstualnim informacijama još uvijek nisu dovoljne. U ovom papiru predstavljamo DocBank, komplet podataka o referenciji koji sadrži 500K stranica dokumenta sa oznakem na razini znakova za analizu rasporeda dokumenta. DocBank se konstruira s jednostavnim i učinkovitim načinom s slabim nadzorom iz LaTeX dokumenta dostupnih na arXiv-u. com. Sa DocBank-om, modeli iz različitih načina mogu se usporediti ispravno, a višemodalni pristupi će se dalje istražiti i povećati učinkovitost analize rasporeda dokumenta. Napravili smo nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija i ručno podijelili vlak/dev/test sete za procjenu. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da modeli obučeni na DocBank precizno prepoznaju informacije o rasporedu za razne dokumente. Podaci DocBank javno su dostupni na https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'de': 'Die Dokumentenlayoutanalyse basiert in der Regel auf Computerbildmodellen, um Dokumente zu verstehen, während Textinformationen ignoriert werden, die für die Erfassung unerlässlich sind. Inzwischen sind qualitativ hochwertige beschriftete Datensätze mit visuellen und textuellen Informationen immer noch unzureichend. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir DocBank vor, einen Benchmark-Datensatz, der 500K-Dokumentseiten mit detaillierten Anmerkungen auf Tokenebene für die Analyse des Dokumentlayouts enthält. DocBank wird auf einfache, aber effektive Weise mit schwacher Aufsicht aus den LaTeX-Dokumenten erstellt, die auf dem arXiv verfügbar sind. com. Mit DocBank können Modelle verschiedener Modalitäten fair verglichen werden und multimodale Ansätze werden weiter untersucht und die Leistung der Dokumentenlayoutanalyse gesteigert. Wir bauen mehrere starke Baselines auf und teilen Train/Dev/Test Sets manuell zur Auswertung auf. Experimente zeigen, dass auf DocBank trainierte Modelle die Layoutinformationen für eine Vielzahl von Dokumenten genau erkennen. Der Datensatz der DocBank ist öffentlich verfügbar unter https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ko': '문서 레이아웃 분석은 일반적으로 컴퓨터 시각 모델에 의존하여 문서를 이해하지만, 중요한 텍스트 정보를 포획하는 것을 소홀히 한다.이 동시에 시각과 텍스트 정보를 가진 고품질 표기 데이터 집합은 여전히 부족하다.본고에서 우리는 DocBank를 소개했는데 이것은 500K개의 문서 페이지를 포함하고 세분화된 표지급 주석을 가지고 문서 레이아웃 분석에 사용된다.DocBank는 간단하지만 효과적인 방법으로 구축되었고arXiv에서 사용할 수 있는 LaTex 파일의 감독은 매우 약하다.일반 도메인 이름 형식.DocBank를 통해 서로 다른 모델의 모델을 공평하게 비교하고 다중 모델 방법을 더욱 연구하여 문서 레이아웃 분석의 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.우리는 몇 가지 강력한 기선을 세우고 훈련/개발/테스트집을 수동으로 분할하여 평가한다.실험 결과 DocBank에서 훈련된 모델은 각종 문서의 레이아웃 정보를 정확하게 식별할 수 있었다.DocBank 데이터 세트는https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'fa': 'تحلیل برنامه\u200cهای سند معمولاً بر مدل\u200cهای دید کامپیوتر وابسته می\u200cشود تا سند\u200cها را درک کنند در حالی که اطلاعات متن را نادیده بگیرد که برای گرفتن مهم است. در ضمن، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بالا با اطلاعات دیده و متن هنوز کافی نیستند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات صندوق DocBank را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که شامل صفحه\u200cهای سند ۵۰۰ کیلومتری است که با توضیح\u200cهای سطح ثبت\u200cشده\u200cای برای تحلیل برنامه\u200cهای سند است. DocBank با استفاده از روش ساده و تاثیر با نظارت ضعیف از مدارک LaTeX موجود در ارکسیو ساخته شده است. com. با دکتر بانک، مدل\u200cها از روش\u200cهای مختلف می\u200cتوانند به عدالت مقایسه شوند و روش\u200cهای متعددی بیشتر تحقیق می\u200cکنند و فعالیت تحلیل برنامه\u200cهای سند را افزایش می\u200cدهند. ما چند خط پایین قوی بسازیم و با دستی قطار/dev/test را برای ارزیابی تقسیم می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل\u200cهای آموزش داده شده در DocBank دقیقا اطلاعات طراحی برای نوشته\u200cهای مختلف را می\u200cشناسند. مجموعه داده\u200cهای DocBank به طور عمومی در https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'id': 'Analisi layout dokumen biasanya bergantung pada model penglihatan komputer untuk memahami dokumen sementara mengabaikan informasi teks yang penting untuk ditangkap. Sementara itu, set data berkualitas tinggi dengan informasi visual dan teks masih tidak cukup. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan DocBank, set data benchmark yang mengandung 500K halaman dokumen dengan anotasi tingkat token yang baik untuk analisis layout dokumen. DocBank dibangun dengan cara sederhana namun efektif dengan pengawasan lemah dari dokumen LaTeX yang tersedia di arXiv. com. Dengan DocBank, model dari modalitas yang berbeda dapat dibandingkan dengan adil dan pendekatan multi-modal akan diselidiki lebih lanjut dan meningkatkan prestasi analisis layout dokumen. Kami membangun beberapa garis dasar yang kuat dan secara manual berbagi kereta/dev/tes set untuk evaluasi. Experiment results show that models trained on DocBank accurately recognize the layout information for a variety of documents.  Set data DocBank tersedia publik di https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa nyaraka mara nyingi hutegemea mifano ya maono ya kompyuta ili kuelewa nyaraka wakati wakiacha taarifa za msingi ambazo ni muhimu kushika. Wakati huo huo, seti za takwimu za kiwango kikubwa zinazoonyeshwa na taarifa za kuona na uhalisia bado hazina kutosha. Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha DocBank, seti ya taarifa za benchmark ambazo ina kurasa za nyaraka 500K zenye matangazo ya kiwango cha alama kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa maudhui ya nyaraka. DocBank imejengwa kwa kutumia njia rahisi lakini yenye ufuatiliaji dhaifu kutoka kwenye nyaraka za LaTeX zinazopatikana kwenye arXiv. com.  Huku DocBank, mifano kutoka katika namna tofauti inaweza kulinganishwa kwa haki na mbinu za namna nyingi za mifano itachunguzwa zaidi na kuongeza utendaji wa uchambuzi wa kompyuta. Tunajenga mistari kadhaa yenye nguvu na kutenganisha treni/dev/test kwa mkono ili kutathmini. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yaliyofundishwa kwenye kituo cha DocBank kinatambua taarifa za kuandaa kwa ajili ya nyaraka mbalimbali. Seti ya taarifa za DocBank inapatikana hadharani katika https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'tr': "Sened tizili analizi köplenç senedi düşünmek üçin kompýuter görnüş nusgalaryna ynanýar. Bu arada, görsel we metin maglumaty bilen ýokarky kwalitet etilen maglumat setirleri heniz ýeterli däl. Bu kagyzda, biz DocBank'i, 500K sened sahypalarynda, süýtgeli token düzeydeki duşurmeler üçin bir benchmark veri setirini görkezip DocBank arXiv'da ýerleşýän LaTeX senetlerinden azajyk nadirim bilen ýeňil we etkinlik bir ýol ullanýar. com. DocBank bilen, dürli modlerden örnekler adalat we köp modal nusgalary diňlemek we sened tiziliminiň eserlerini köpräk edip biler. Biz birnäçe güýçli esaslar çyzgylyny we el-de üýtgeden otly/dev/test düzenini çykarýarys. Testler netijesi DocBank'da eğitilen nusgalaryň birnäçe sened üçin düzüm maglumatyny dogry tanaýandygyny görkezýär. DocBank maglumaty halkara ýerleşýär https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'af': "Name Name In hierdie papier, laat ons DocBank voorsien, 'n benchmark datastel wat bevat 500K dokumentbladsye met fyn-koring token-vlak annotasies vir dokument uitleg analiseer. DocBank is gebruik met 'n eenvoudige nog effektief manier met swak supervisie van die LaTeX-dokumente wat beskikbaar is op die arXiv. com. Met DocBank kan modele van verskillende modaliteite regverdig vergelyk word en multimodale toegange verder ondersoek word en die prestasie van dokumentuitleganalisie vergroot word. Ons bou verskeie sterke basisline en handelik deel trein/dev/test stelle vir evaluering. Eksperiment resultate vertoon dat modele wat op DocBank opgelei is, presies die uitleg inligting vir 'n verskeie dokumente herken. Die DocBank datastel is openlik beskikbaar by https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'am': 'የሰነዱ ጥያቄ ማሳተሚያ በተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ በኮምፒዩተር ራእይ ዓይነቶች ላይ ሰነዱን ለማስተዋል በተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ መረጃ ማሳየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም፣ የራእይ እና የጽሑፍ መረጃ ጋር ከፍተኛ ጥያቄ የመረጃ መረጃዎች ገና አይጠቅሙም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አዲስ ባንክ፣ 500 ሺሕ ሰነድ ገጾች የሚያስፈልገውን የሰነድ ጥያቄ-ደረጃ አቀማመጥ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ዶ ባንክ በአርክሲብ ላይ የተገኘው የLaTeX ሰነዶች ላይ የተሰኘውን ቀላል ነገር ግን የሚያስተባብል መንገድ ይሠራል፡፡ com.  ከዶ ባንክ ጋር የተለየ ዓይነቶች በተለየ አካላቢዎች ይተካከላሉ እና የብዙ ዓይነቶች ሥርዓቶች ደግሞ ይመረመራሉ እናም የሰነዱን የአካባቢ ግንኙነት ያበረታሉ፡፡ ብዙ ብርቱ መሠረቶች እና የtrain/dev/ፈተና መስመር እንዲያሰናከል በእጃችን እንሠራለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች በዶክባክ ላይ የተማሩት ሞዴላዎችን ለልዩ ዓይነቶች የመስመር መረጃዎችን እንዲያስታውቁ ያሳያል፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'sq': 'Analiza e përcaktimit të dokumenteve zakonisht mbështetet në modelet e vizionit kompjuterik për të kuptuar dokumentet duke injoruar informacionin tekstual që është thelbësor për të kapur. Ndërkohë, grupet e të dhënave me cilësi të lartë me informacion vizual dhe tekstual janë ende të pamjaftueshme. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim DocBank, një grup të dhënash që përmban 500K faqe dokumenti me anotacione të hollësishme të nivelit të token për analizën e layout dokumenti. DocBank is constructed using a simple yet effective way with weak supervision from the LaTeX documents available on the arXiv. Komu. Me DocBank, modelet nga modalitete të ndryshme mund të krahasohen në mënyrë të drejtë dhe metodat multimodale do të hetohen më tej dhe do të rriten paraqitjen e analizës së përcaktimit të dokumenteve. Ne ndërtojmë disa linja bazë të forta dhe grupe të ndara manualisht treni/dev/test për vlerësim. Rezultatet e eksperimentit tregojnë se modelet e trajnuar në DocBank njohin saktësisht informacionin e përcaktimit për një shumëllojshmëri dokumentesh. Grupi i të dhënave DocBank është në dispozicion publik në https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'hy': 'Թղթերի դիզայնի վերլուծությունը սովորաբար հիմնված է համակարգչային տեսողության մոդելների վրա, որպեսզի հասկանան փաստաթղթերը, անտեսելով այն տեքստային տեղեկատվությունը, որը կարևոր է վերցնելու համար: Միևնույն ժամանակ, տեսողական և տեքստային տեղեկատվություն ունեցող բարձր որակի տվյալների համակարգերը դեռևս բավարար չեն: In this paper, we present DocBank, a benchmark dataset that contains 500K document pages with fine-grained token-level annotations for document layout analysis.  DocBank-ը կառուցվում է օգտագործելով պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ միջոց, որն ունի թույլ վերահսկողություն LATEX փաստաթղթերից, որոնք հասանելի են ARXV-ում: com. DocBank-ի հետ տարբեր միջոցների մոդելները կարող են արդար համեմատել, և բազմամոդելային մոտեցումները ավելի շատ կուսումնասիրեն և կբարձրացնեն փաստաթղթերի կառուցվածքի վերլուծության արդյունավետությունը: Մենք կառուցում ենք որոշ ուժեղ հիմնական գծեր և ձեռքով բաժանել գնացքի, դիվի և թեստերի համակարգերը գնահատելու համար: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ DocBank-ում վարժեցված մոդելները ճշգրիտ ճանաչում են տարբեր փաստաթղթերի դիզայնի տեղեկատվությունը: DocBank-ի տվյալների համակարգը հասանելի է https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্ট বিন্যাস সাধারণত কম্পিউটার ভিশন মডেলের উপর নির্ভর করে টেক্সচুয়াল তথ্য উপেক্ষা করার সময় নথিপত্র বুঝতে পারে যা গ এদিকে, দৃশ্যমান এবং টেক্সচুয়াল তথ্যের সাথে উচ্চ মান লেবেলেটের ডাটাসেট এখনো যথেষ্ট নয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডক ব্যাংকের উপস্থাপন করছি একটি বেঞ্চমার্ক ডাটাসেট, যার মধ্যে ৫০০০ কারো ডকুমেন্ট পাতা আছে যা ডকুমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের ডক ব্যাংক একটি সহজ এবং কার্যকর উপায় ব্যবহার করে তৈরি করা হয়েছে আর্কিভের উপর লেটেক্স নথিপত্র থেকে দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণের সাথে। কম ডক ব্যাংকের সাথে বিভিন্ন ধরনের মডেলের তুলনা করা যাবে এবং বহুমোডাল পদ্ধতির তুলনায় আরো তদন্ত করা হবে এবং ডকুমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের প্রদর্শনের আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি শক্তিশালী বেসেলাইন তৈরি করি এবং হাতে ট্রেন/ডেভি/টেস্ট সেট বিভক্ত করি মূল্যের জন্য। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ডক ব্যাংকে প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল সঠিকভাবে বিভিন্ন নথিপত্রের বিন্যাসের তথ্য স্বীক ডক ব্যাংক ডাটাসেট প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'az': "Dökümət şəkilləri analizi genellikle bilgisayar görünüş modellerinə təvəkkül edir ki, məktubları məlumatlarını almaq üçün mövcuddur. Bu arada, görsel və tekst məlumatları ilə yüksək kaliteli etiket edilmiş veri qurğuları hələ də kifayət deyildir. Bu kağızda, DocBank'ı, 500K belədi səhifələri ilə dolu token seviyyəsi yazılmış bir benchmark veri quruluşu göstəririk. DocBank arXiv vasitəsindəki LaTeX belələrindən zəif gözləmə vasitəsilə asanlıqla və etkili bir yol vasitəsilə inşa edilir. com. DocBank ilə, müxtəlif modalardan modellər ədalətli hörmətli olar və çoxlu modal tərəflər daha çox xəbərdar ediləcək və döküm tərəflərin analizisini artıracaq. Biz bir çox qüvvətli sətir inşa edirik və müqayisədə üçün tren/dev/test setlərini əllə parçalayırıq. Experiment sonuçları DocBank'da təhsil edilmiş modellərin müxtəlif təhsil məlumatının müxtəlif təhsil məlumatını tanıdığını göstərir. DocBank veri qurğuları açıq-aşkar mövcuddur https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'ca': "Document layout analysis usually relies on computer vision models to understand documents while ignoring textual information that is vital to capture.  Mentrestant, els conjunts de dades etiquetats d'alta qualitat amb informació visual i textual encara són insuficients. En aquest paper, presentem DocBank, un conjunt de dades de referència que conté 500K pàgines de documentos amb anotacions fins a nivell de fitxes per a l'anàlisi de disposició de documentos. DocBank es construeix fent servir una manera simple però efectiva amb una supervisió dèbil dels documents LaTeX disponibles a l'arXiv. com. Amb DocBank, els models de diferents modalitats es poden comparar de manera justa i els enfocaments multimodals s'investigaran més i augmentaran el rendiment de l'anàlisi de disposició de documents. Construim diverses línies de base fortes i conjunts de prova tren/dev/separats manualment per a l'evaluació. Els resultats d'experiments mostren que els models entrenats a DocBank reconeixen exactament la informació de distribució d'una varietat de documents. El conjunt de dades DocBank està a disposició pública https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'cs': 'Analýza rozložení dokumentů se obvykle spoléhá na modely počítačového vidění, aby porozuměla dokumentům a ignorovala textové informace, které jsou důležité pro zachycení. Mezitím jsou vysoce kvalitní označené datové sady s vizuálními i textovými informacemi stále nedostatečné. V tomto článku představujeme DocBank, referenční datovou sadu obsahující 500K stránky dokumentů s jemnými anotacemi na úrovni tokenů pro analýzu rozložení dokumentů. DocBank je konstruována jednoduchým, ale efektivním způsobem se slabým dohledem z dokumentů LaTeX dostupných na arXiv. com. Pomocí DocBank lze modely z různých modalit spravedlivě porovnat a multimodální přístupy budou dále zkoumány a zvýšeny výkonnost analýzy uspořádání dokumentů. Vytváříme několik silných základních linek a ručně rozdělíme train/dev/testovací sady pro vyhodnocení. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že modely trénované na DocBank přesně rozpoznávají informace o rozložení různých dokumentů. Soubor dat DocBank je veřejně dostupný na adrese: https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'bs': 'Analiza rasporeda dokumenta obično se oslanja na modele kompjuterske vizije da razumiju dokumente dok ignoriraju tekstualne informacije koje su vitalne za uhvatiti. U međuvremenu, visoke kvalitete označene podatke sa vizuelnim i tekstualnim informacijama još uvijek nisu dovoljne. U ovom papiru predstavljamo DocBank, komplet podataka o referenciji koji sadrži 500K stranica dokumenta sa oznakem na nivou token a za analizu rasporeda dokumenta. DocBank se konstruira koristeći jednostavan, ali efikasan način sa slabom nadzorom iz LaTeX dokumenta dostupnog na arXiv-u. com. Sa DocBank-om, modeli iz različitih modaliteta mogu se usporediti ispravno, a višemodalni pristupi će biti dalje istraženi i poboljšati učinkovitost analize rasporeda dokumenta. Napravili smo nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija i ručno podelili vlak/dev/test sete za procjenu. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da modeli obučeni na DocBank precizno prepoznaju informacije o rasporedu za razne dokumente. Datoteka DocBank je javno dostupna na https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'et': "Dokumentide paigutuse analüüs tugineb tavaliselt arvutinägemise mudelitele, et mõista dokumente, ignoreerides samas teksti teavet, mis on oluline jäädvustada. Samal ajal on nii visuaalse kui ka tekstilise teabega märgistatud kvaliteetsed andmekogumid endiselt ebapiisavad. Käesolevas töös tutvustame DocBank'i, võrdlusandmekogumit, mis sisaldab 500 000 dokumendilehte, millel on peened märgitasemed dokumendipaigutuse analüüsimiseks. DocBank on ehitatud lihtsalt, kuid tõhusalt, nõrga järelevalvega LaTeXi dokumentidest arXiv. com. DocBanki abil saab erinevate meetodite mudeleid õiglaselt võrrelda ning mitmeliigilisi lähenemisviise uuritakse edasi ja parandatakse dokumentide paigutuse analüüsi tulemuslikkust. Ehitame mitmeid tugevaid lähtejooni ja jagame käsitsi rongi/arenduse/katsekomplekte hindamiseks. Eksperimentide tulemused näitavad, et DocBankis koolitatud mudelid tunnevad täpselt ära erinevate dokumentide paigutusteabe. DocBanki andmekogum on avalikult kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'fi': 'Asiakirjojen asettelun analysointi perustuu yleensä tietokonenäkömalleihin dokumenttien ymmärtämiseksi unohtamatta tekstitietoja, jotka ovat elintärkeitä taltioida. Laadukkaat, sekä visuaalista että tekstillistä tietoa sisältävät tietoaineistot ovat kuitenkin edelleen riittämättömiä. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään DocBank, vertailuaineisto, joka sisältää 500 000 asiakirjasivua, joissa on hienojakoisia token-tason merkintöjä asiakirjan asettelun analysointia varten. DocBank on rakennettu yksinkertaisella mutta tehokkaalla tavalla, ja sen valvonta on heikkoa arXivin LaTeX-dokumenteista. com. DocBankin avulla eri toimintamallien malleja voidaan vertailla oikeudenmukaisesti ja multimodaalisia lähestymistapoja tutkitaan edelleen ja dokumenttien asettelun analysointia tehostetaan. Rakennamme useita vahvoja peruslinjoja ja jaamme manuaalisesti juna/kehitys/testisarjat arviointia varten. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että DocBankiin koulutetut mallit tunnistavat tarkasti erilaisten asiakirjojen asettelutiedot. DocBankin aineisto on julkisesti saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'jv': 'Ndeleng pengen dokumen kang dipunangé supoyo urip model de perspekn komputer kanggo kuwi nggunakake dokumen sampeyan kelangan textual informasi sing isih barang nggawe politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pempet iki, kita sadakan dock, bench dataset sing ngawe lompok 500 K dokumen pagjine karo ditambah sing dibenalke token-evel nggo langgambar tekan token dock nggawe nguwe sistem sing paling apik maneh sing apik tenan karo bebas nang seneng katimbang nggawe dokumen LaTekX kang arXv. com Ngo Dok Bank, model sing paling modalité sampeyan agerung kayané sampeyan karo akeh modal karo sampeyan multi-modal bakal terus nyosesi lanjut karo sekolahan akeh lanjut sampeyan dokumen. Awak dhéwé nggawe akeh podho sing nggawe lan manut sepatu vlah/Dev/test tentang kanggo kuwi nggawe. Laptop" and "Desktop Daftar durung dock https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'ha': "Ana ƙayyade layin takardar aiki na ɗadi, yana dõgara a kan misãlai na ganin kwamfyuta don su fahimta takardun, idan ana ƙyale maɓallin littãfi da za'a da amfani da shi. A lokacin da, tsari masu da aka rubũta maɓallin tsari da duk zane da matsalan ba ta isa ba. Ga wannan takardan, munã halatar da DocBank, an daidaita danne-bangon da ke ƙunsa da wasu takardar dokumenta 5,000 wanda ke da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane cikin tsarin ayuka. An gina DocBank da wani hanya mai sauƙi ko da mai amfani, mai rauni daga takardar LaTeX wanda ke iya samar da kan arXive. KCharselect unicode block name Idan an sami DocBank, za'a sami misãlai daga wasu shiryoyin ayuka daba-daban, kuma za'a iya ƙara yin ƙidãya masu motsi masu yawa kuma za'a ƙara aikin Ana yi fasarin takardar layin. Tuna samar da wasu salo masu ƙarfi kuma muna raba togi/Dev/jarrabo da hannayen su yi ƙidãya. Matarin jarrabawa ya nuna misãlai waɗanda aka yi wa shirin DocBank, suna gane maɓallin shirin ayuka wa wasu takardun aiki. An sami tsarin bayani da DocBank https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.", 'sk': 'Analiza postavitve dokumentov običajno temelji na modelih računalniškega vida za razumevanje dokumentov, pri čemer ignorira besedilne informacije, ki so bistvene za zajem. Medtem pa so visokokakovostni nabori podatkov z vizualnimi in besedilnimi informacijami še vedno nezadostni. V tem prispevku predstavljamo DocBank, referenčni nabor podatkov, ki vsebuje 500.000 strani dokumentov z natančnimi opombami na ravni žetonov za analizo postavitve dokumenta. DocBank je zgrajen na preprost, vendar učinkovit način s šibkim nadzorom iz LaTeX dokumentov, ki so na voljo na arXiv. com. Z DocBank je mogoče pravično primerjati modele iz različnih modalnih metod in nadalje preučiti multimodalne pristope ter povečati učinkovitost analize postavitve dokumentov. Izdelujemo več močnih osnovnih linij in ročno razdelimo vlak/razvoj/preskusne sklope za ocenjevanje. Rezultati poskusov kažejo, da modeli, usposobljeni za DocBank, natančno prepoznajo podatke o postavitvi različnih dokumentov. Zbirka podatkov DocBank je javno dostopna na spletni strani https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'he': 'ניתוח מיזוג המסמכים בדרך כלל סומך על דוגמני חזון מחשב כדי להבין מסמכים בזמן להתעלם מידע טקסטלי שחשוב לתפוס. בינתיים, קבוצות מידע איכות גבוהה עם מידע ויזואלי וגם טקסטלי עדיין לא מספיקות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים את DocBank, קבוצת נתונים רמז שמכילה 500 אלף עמודי מסמכים DocBank בנוי באמצעות דרך פשוטה אך יעילה עם פיקוח חלש ממסמכי LaTeX זמינים על arXiv. קום. עם דוקבנק, דוגמנים ממונדיות שונות יכולים להשוות בצורה הוגנת והגישות רבות מודליות יהיו חקירות נוספות ולהגביר את ביצועי ניתוח המסמכים. אנחנו בונים מספר קווי בסיס חזקים ומחלקים יד רכבת/dev/מבחן להערכה. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שדוגמנים מאומנים על DocBank מזהה בדיוק את מידע המרכז למגוון מסמכים. קבוצת הנתונים של DocBank זמינה לציבור ב https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.', 'bo': 'ཡིག Meanwhile, high quality labeled datasets with both visual and textual information are still insufficient. In this paper, we present DocBank, a benchmark dataset that contains 500K document pages with fine-grain token-level annotations for document layout analysis. DocBank འདི་སྒྲུང་ཐོག་ཏུ་འཇུག་པའི་LaTeX ཡིག་ཆ་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་སྟབས་བདེ་བ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་འདུག com. DocBank དང་བརྗོད་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བདེ་འཇགས་དང་འདྲ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་རྨང་གཞི་གཞི་རྩིས་འཁོར་ལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་མ་ལག་ནས་གནད་སྡུད་མེ Experiment results show that models trained on DocBank accurately recognize the layout information for a variety of documents. DocBank སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དོན་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/doc-analysis/DocBank.'}
{'en': 'A High Precision Pipeline for Financial Knowledge Graph Construction', 'ar': 'خط أنابيب عالي الدقة لإنشاء الرسم البياني للمعرفة المالية', 'pt': 'Um pipeline de alta precisão para a construção do gráfico de conhecimento financeiro', 'es': 'Una canalización de alta precisión para la construcción de gráficos de conocimiento financiero', 'fr': 'Un pipeline de haute précision pour la construction de graphes de connaissances financières', 'ja': '財務知識グラフ構築のための高精度パイプライン', 'zh': '金融知图谱构高精度管道', 'hi': 'वित्तीय ज्ञान ग्राफ निर्माण के लिए एक उच्च परिशुद्धता पाइपलाइन', 'ru': 'Высокоточный трубопровод для построения графа финансовых знаний', 'ga': 'Píblíne Ardchruinneas le haghaidh Tógáil Grafa Faisnéise Airgeadais', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένας αγωγός υψηλής ακρίβειας για την κατασκευή γραφικών οικονομικών γνώσεων', 'hu': 'Nagy pontosságú csővezeték a pénzügyi tudásgraf építéséhez', 'it': 'Una pipeline ad alta precisione per la costruzione di grafici di conoscenza finanziaria', 'kk': 'Қаржылық білім графикалық құрылғының жоғары дұрыстығы', 'lt': 'Didelio tikslumo vamzdynas, skirtas finansinės žinios grafiko kūrimui', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Financial Knowledge Graph Construction', 'mn': 'Санхүүгийн мэдлэг график бүтээмж', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Pipeline ta’ Preċiżjoni Għolja għall-Kostruzzjoni tal-Grafika tal-Għarfien Finanzjarju', 'pl': 'Wysoko precyzyjny rurociąg do budowy wykresu wiedzy finansowej', 'ro': 'O conductă de înaltă precizie pentru construcția graficului de cunoștințe financiare', 'sr': 'Visoka tačnost za izgradnju grafika financijskih znanja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Pipeline for Construction Graph of Aqoonta dhaqaale', 'sv': 'En pipeline med hög precision för konstruktion av finansiell kunskapsgraf', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'தொழில்நுட்பம் அறிவு வரைகலை கட்டமைப்பிற்கான ஒரு உயர் துல்லியமைப்பு கோப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một ống dẫn chính xác cao cho công trình đồ họa về tài chính', 'bg': 'Висококачествен тръбопровод за изграждане на графика за финансово знание', 'hr': 'Visoka točnost za izgradnju grafika financijskih znanja', 'nl': 'Een hoge precisiepijpleiding voor de bouw van financiële kennisgrafieken', 'da': 'En høj præcision rørledning til finansiel viden graf konstruktion', 'de': 'Eine hochpräzise Pipeline für den Bau von Finanzwissen Graphen', 'id': 'Sebuah Pipeline Precision Tinggi untuk Konstruksi Graf Pengetahuan Keuangan', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '금융 지식도 구축에 사용되는 고정밀 유수선', 'sw': 'Pili ya Uwezekano Mkuu kwa ajili ya Miundombinu ya Ujuzi wa Fedha', 'tr': 'Financial Knowledge Graph Construction', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një tub i saktësisë së lartë për ndërtimin e grafikut të njohurive financiare', 'hy': 'A High Precision Pipeline for Financial Knowledge Graph Construction', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Financial Knowledge Graph Construction for High Precision Pipeline', 'bn': 'অর্থনৈতিক জ্ঞানী গ্রাফ নির্মাণের জন্য একটি উচ্চ সমালোচনা পাইপেলাইন', 'bs': 'Visoka točnost za izgradnju grafika financijskih znanja', 'ca': "Un tub d'alta precisió per a la construcció del gràfic del coneixement financer", 'cs': 'Vysoce přesné potrubí pro výstavbu grafů finančních znalostí', 'et': 'Kõrge täpsusega torustik finantsteadmiste graafiku ehitamiseks', 'fi': 'Korkean tarkkuuden putki taloudellisen tietämyksen graafien rakentamiseen', 'jv': 'A Free Presision Pipeine for FinknownGraph Learning', 'sk': 'Visoko natančen cevovod za gradnjo grafikona finančnega znanja', 'ha': 'A High Precision Pipeline for Financial Knowledge Graph Construction', 'he': 'צינור מדויק גבוה לבניית גרף מידע פיננסי', 'bo': 'A High Precision Pipeline for Financial Knowledge Graph Construction'}
{'en': 'Motivated by applications such as question answering, fact checking, and data integration, there is significant interest in constructing knowledge graphs by extracting information from unstructured information sources, particularly text documents. Knowledge graphs have emerged as a standard for structured knowledge representation, whereby entities and their inter-relations are represented and conveniently stored as (subject, predicate, object) triples in a graph that can be used to power various downstream applications. The proliferation of financial news sources reporting on companies, markets, currencies, and stocks presents an opportunity for extracting valuable knowledge about this crucial domain. In this paper, we focus on constructing a knowledge graph automatically by information extraction from a large corpus of financial news articles. For that purpose, we develop a high precision knowledge extraction pipeline tailored for the financial domain. This pipeline combines multiple information extraction techniques with a financial dictionary that we built, all working together to produce over 342,000 compact extractions from over 288,000 financial news articles, with a precision of 78 % at the top-100 extractions. The extracted triples are stored in a knowledge graph making them readily available for use in downstream applications.', 'ar': 'بدافع من تطبيقات مثل الإجابة على الأسئلة ، والتحقق من الحقائق ، وتكامل البيانات ، هناك اهتمام كبير في إنشاء الرسوم البيانية المعرفية من خلال استخراج المعلومات من مصادر المعلومات غير المنظمة ، وخاصة المستندات النصية. ظهرت الرسوم البيانية المعرفية كمعيار لتمثيل المعرفة المهيكلة ، حيث يتم تمثيل الكيانات وعلاقاتها البينية وتخزينها بشكل ملائم على شكل ثلاث مرات (موضوع ، مسند ، كائن) في رسم بياني يمكن استخدامه لتشغيل العديد من التطبيقات النهائية. يمثل انتشار مصادر الأخبار المالية التي تقدم تقارير عن الشركات والأسواق والعملات والأسهم فرصة لاستخراج معرفة قيمة حول هذا المجال المهم. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على إنشاء رسم بياني معرفي تلقائيًا عن طريق استخراج المعلومات من مجموعة كبيرة من المقالات الإخبارية المالية. لهذا الغرض ، نقوم بتطوير خط أنابيب عالي الدقة لاستخراج المعرفة مصمم للمجال المالي. يجمع خط الأنابيب هذا بين تقنيات استخلاص المعلومات المتعددة والقاموس المالي الذي أنشأناه ، وكلها تعمل معًا لإنتاج أكثر من 342.000 عملية استخراج مدمجة من أكثر من 288000 مقالة إخبارية مالية ، بدقة تصل إلى 78٪ في أفضل 100 عملية استخراج. رسم بياني معرفي يجعلها متاحة بسهولة للاستخدام في تطبيقات المصب.', 'es': 'Motivado por aplicaciones como la respuesta a preguntas, la verificación de datos y la integración de datos, hay un gran interés en construir gráficos de conocimiento mediante la extracción de información de fuentes de información no estructuradas, en particular documentos de texto. Los gráficos de conocimiento se han convertido en un estándar para la representación estructurada del conocimiento, mediante el cual las entidades y sus interrelaciones se representan y almacenan convenientemente como triples (sujeto, predicado, objeto) en un gráfico que se puede utilizar para impulsar varias aplicaciones posteriores. La proliferación de fuentes de noticias financieras que informan sobre empresas, mercados, divisas y acciones presenta una oportunidad para extraer conocimientos valiosos sobre este dominio crucial. En este artículo, nos centramos en construir un gráfico de conocimiento automáticamente mediante la extracción de información de un gran corpus de artículos de noticias financieras. Para ello, desarrollamos un canal de extracción de conocimiento de alta precisión adaptado al dominio financiero. Este canal combina múltiples técnicas de extracción de información con un diccionario financiero que creamos, trabajando todos juntos para producir más de 342 000 extracciones compactas de más de 288 000 artículos de noticias financieras, con una precisión del 78% en las 100 extracciones principales. gráfico de conocimiento que los hace fácilmente disponibles para su uso en aplicaciones posteriores.', 'fr': "Motivés par des applications telles que la réponse aux questions, la vérification des faits et l'intégration de données, la construction de graphes de connaissances en extrayant des informations à partir de sources d'informations non structurées, en particulier de documents texte, suscite un intérêt considérable Les graphes de connaissances sont devenus une norme pour la représentation structurée des connaissances, dans laquelle les entités et leurs interrelations sont représentées et stockées de manière pratique sous forme de triplets (sujet, prédicat, objet) dans un graphique qui peut être utilisé pour alimenter diverses applications en aval. La prolifération des sources d'information financière traitant des entreprises, des marchés, des devises et des actions offre l'occasion d'extraire des connaissances précieuses sur ce domaine crucial. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur la construction automatique d'un graphe de connaissances par extraction d'informations à partir d'un vaste corpus d'articles d'actualité financière. À cette fin, nous développons un pipeline d'extraction de connaissances de haute précision adapté au domaine financier. Ce pipeline combine plusieurs techniques d'extraction d'informations avec un dictionnaire financier que nous avons créé, toutes travaillant ensemble pour produire plus de 342 000 extractions compactes à partir de plus de 288 000 articles d'actualité financière, avec une précision de 78\xa0% dans les 100 premières extractions.Les triplets extraits sont stockés dans un un graphe de connaissances les rendant facilement disponibles pour une utilisation dans des applications en aval.", 'pt': 'Motivado por aplicativos como resposta a perguntas, verificação de fatos e integração de dados, há um interesse significativo em construir gráficos de conhecimento extraindo informações de fontes de informações não estruturadas, principalmente documentos de texto. Os gráficos de conhecimento surgiram como um padrão para representação estruturada de conhecimento, em que as entidades e suas inter-relações são representadas e convenientemente armazenadas como triplos (sujeito, predicado, objeto) em um gráfico que pode ser usado para alimentar várias aplicações downstream. A proliferação de fontes de notícias financeiras informando sobre empresas, mercados, moedas e ações apresenta uma oportunidade para extrair conhecimento valioso sobre esse domínio crucial. Neste artigo, nos concentramos na construção de um gráfico de conhecimento automaticamente pela extração de informações de um grande corpus de artigos de notícias financeiras. Para isso, desenvolvemos um pipeline de extração de conhecimento de alta precisão sob medida para o domínio financeiro. Este pipeline combina várias técnicas de extração de informações com um dicionário financeiro que construímos, todos trabalhando juntos para produzir mais de 342.000 extrações compactas de mais de 288.000 artigos de notícias financeiras, com uma precisão de 78% nas 100 principais extrações. um gráfico de conhecimento tornando-os prontamente disponíveis para uso em aplicativos downstream.', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर, तथ्यों की जांच और डेटा एकीकरण जैसे अनुप्रयोगों से प्रेरित होकर, असंरचित जानकारी स्रोतों, विशेष रूप से पाठ दस्तावेजों से जानकारी निकालकर ज्ञान ग्राफ़ के निर्माण में महत्वपूर्ण रुचि है। ज्ञान रेखांकन संरचित ज्ञान प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए एक मानक के रूप में उभरा है, जिससे संस्थाओं और उनके अंतर-संबंधों का प्रतिनिधित्व किया जाता है और आसानी से एक ग्राफ में (विषय, विधेय, वस्तु) ट्रिपल के रूप में संग्रहीत किया जाता है जिसका उपयोग विभिन्न डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोगों को शक्ति देने के लिए किया जा सकता है। कंपनियों, बाजारों, मुद्राओं और शेयरों पर रिपोर्टिंग करने वाले वित्तीय समाचार स्रोतों का प्रसार इस महत्वपूर्ण डोमेन के बारे में मूल्यवान ज्ञान निकालने का अवसर प्रस्तुत करता है। इस पेपर में, हम वित्तीय समाचार लेखों के एक बड़े कॉर्पस से जानकारी निष्कर्षण द्वारा स्वचालित रूप से एक ज्ञान ग्राफ के निर्माण पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। उस उद्देश्य के लिए, हम वित्तीय डोमेन के लिए एक उच्च परिशुद्धता ज्ञान निष्कर्षण पाइपलाइन विकसित करते हैं। यह पाइपलाइन हमारे द्वारा बनाए गए वित्तीय शब्दकोश के साथ कई सूचना निष्कर्षण तकनीकों को जोड़ती है, सभी 288,000 से अधिक वित्तीय समाचार लेखों से 342,000 से अधिक कॉम्पैक्ट निष्कर्षण का उत्पादन करने के लिए एक साथ काम कर रहे हैं, शीर्ष -100 निष्कर्षणों पर 78% की सटीकता के साथ। निकाले गए ट्रिपल को एक ज्ञान ग्राफ में संग्रहीत किया जाता है जिससे उन्हें डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोगों में उपयोग के लिए आसानी से उपलब्ध कराया जाता है।', 'ru': 'На основе таких приложений, как ответы на вопросы, проверка фактов и интеграция данных, существует значительный интерес к построению графиков знаний путем извлечения информации из неструктурированных источников информации, в частности текстовых документов. Графики знаний стали стандартом для структурированного представления знаний, в соответствии с которым сущности и их взаимосвязи представлены и удобно хранятся в виде (предмет,предикат,объект) тройки в графике, который может быть использован для питания различных последующих приложений. Распространение источников финансовых новостей, сообщающих о компаниях, рынках, валютах и акциях, предоставляет возможность извлечь ценные знания об этой важной области. В этой статье мы сосредоточимся на построении графа знаний автоматически путем извлечения информации из большого объема статей финансовых новостей. С этой целью мы разрабатываем высокоточный канал извлечения знаний, предназначенный для финансовой сферы. Этот конвейер сочетает в себе несколько методов извлечения информации с финансовым словарем, который мы построили, все работая вместе, чтобы произвести более 342 000 компактных извлечений из более чем 288 000 статей финансовых новостей, с точностью 78% в топ-100 извлечений. Извлеченные тройки хранятся в графике знаний, что делает их легко доступными для использования в последующих приложениях.', 'zh': '于问答、事实检查和数据集成等应用程序推动,人于从非结构化信息源(尤为文本档)中提取信息以构图谱感趣。 知图谱已为结构化法,其实体与便宜储为(主语,谓词,所)三元组在图中,可施于下流应用程序。 报道公司,市肆货股票之财经新闻来源激增为取要领之宝。 于本文中,专注财经新闻文库提信以自结图谱。 为此开金融域量身高精度提管道。 凡诸信息,与吾结构之金融词典合,凡诸同功,过于288,000篇财经新闻文成过于342,000凑者取之,前100取者为78%。 提取三元组存储于知识图谱中,使随时施于下流。', 'ja': '質問応答、ファクトチェック、データ統合などのアプリケーションを動機とし、非構造化情報源、特に文書から情報を抽出して知識グラフを構築することに大きな関心があります。 ナレッジグラフは、構造化された知識表現の標準として登場しており、それによって、エンティティとその相互関係は、様々なダウンストリームアプリケーションに電力を供給するために使用することができるグラフの（主題、述語、オブジェクト）トリプルとして表現され、便利に保存されている。 企業、市場、通貨、株式に関する金融ニュースソースの拡散は、この重要な領域に関する貴重な知識を引き出す機会を提供します。 本稿では、金融ニュース記事の大規模なコーパスからの情報抽出により、ナレッジグラフを自動的に構築することに焦点を当てる。 そのために、金融領域に合わせた高精度な知識抽出パイプラインを開発しています。 このパイプラインは、複数の情報抽出テクニックと、私たちが構築した財務辞書を組み合わせて、288,000以上の財務ニュース記事から342,000以上のコンパクト抽出を作成しています。抽出されたトリプルはナレッジグラフに保存され、ダウンストリームアプリケーションですぐに使用できます。', 'ga': 'Spreagtha ag feidhmeanna mar fhreagairt ceisteanna, seiceáil fíricí, agus comhtháthú sonraí, tá suim shuntasach i graif eolais a chruthú trí fhaisnéis a bhaint as foinsí faisnéise neamhstruchtúrtha, go háirithe doiciméid téacs. Tá graif eolais tagtha chun cinn mar chaighdeán chun eolas struchtúrtha a léiriú, ina ndéantar aonáin agus a n-idirghaolta a léiriú agus a stóráil go háisiúil mar thriarach (ábhar, tuar, réad) i ngraf ar féidir a úsáid chun feidhmeanna éagsúla iartheachtacha a chumhachtú. Tugann an t-iomadú foinsí nuachta airgeadais a thuairiscíonn ar chuideachtaí, margaí, airgeadraí agus stoic deis chun eolas luachmhar a fháil faoin bhfearann ríthábhachtach seo. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar ghraf eolais a chruthú go huathoibríoch trí fhaisnéis a bhaint as corpas mór alt nuachta airgeadais. Chun na críche sin, forbraímid píblíne eastósctha eolais ardbheachtais atá oiriúnaithe don réimse airgeadais. Nascann an píblíne seo teicníochtaí il-eastósctha faisnéise le foclóir airgeadais a thógamar, iad go léir ag obair le chéile chun níos mó ná 342,000 eastóscadh dlúth a tháirgeadh ó níos mó ná 288,000 alt nuachta airgeadais, le beachtas 78% ag an 100 eastóscadh is fearr. graf eolais a chuireann ar fáil go héasca iad le húsáid i bhfeidhmchláir iartheachtacha.', 'ka': 'მოტივირული პროგრამებით, როგორც კითხვების პასუხი, ფაქტის შემოწმება და მონაცემების ინტერგურაცია, არის მნიშვნელოვანი ინტერესტი ცნობიერების გრაფიკის კონქტურაციაში, ინფორმაციის გამ მეცნიერების გრაფიკები იქნება როგორც სტრუქტურული მეცნიერების გამოსახულებისთვის სტანდარტუქტურება, რომელიც ინტერტიკები და მათი შორის შესახებ გამოსახულებულია და შესაძლებელია სამჯერ სამჯერ სამჯერ სამჯერ ფინანსური ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება, რომელიც კომპანიები, მარკეტები, валют და კონფინსური გამოსახულებების შესაძლებლობა ამ მნიშვნელოვანი დიომინის შესახებ გამოსახულებლად ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ავტომატურად ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქციაზე ინფორმაციის გარეშე ფინანსური ინფორმაციების კოპუსისგან დავყენებთ. ამ მიზეზისთვის, ჩვენ განვითარებთ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მეცნიერების ექსტრაქციის ფესტური ფესტური ფესტური, რომელიც ფესტური დემო ეს ფეხლინი გამოყენებს მრავალ ინფორმაციის გამოყენების ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც ჩვენ დავყენეთ ფინასური სიტყვებით, ყველაფერი ერთად მუშაობით 342 000 კომპექტური გამოყენების გამოყენება 288 000 ფინასურ გამოყენებული სამჯერად იყენება ცნობილის გრაფიში, რომელიც ისინი ძალიან ხელსახურებელია გამოყენებაში.', 'it': "Motivato da applicazioni come la risposta alle domande, il controllo dei fatti e l'integrazione dei dati, vi è un interesse significativo nella costruzione di grafici della conoscenza estraendo informazioni da fonti di informazione non strutturate, in particolare documenti di testo. I grafici della conoscenza sono emersi come standard per la rappresentazione strutturata della conoscenza, in cui le entità e le loro interrelazioni sono rappresentate e comodamente memorizzate come (soggetto, predicato, oggetto) triple in un grafico che può essere utilizzato per alimentare varie applicazioni a valle. La proliferazione di fonti di notizie finanziarie che riportano informazioni su aziende, mercati, valute e azioni rappresenta un'opportunità per estrarre preziose conoscenze su questo settore cruciale. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo sulla costruzione automatica di un grafico della conoscenza mediante estrazione di informazioni da un ampio corpus di articoli di notizie finanziarie. A tal fine, sviluppiamo una pipeline di estrazione della conoscenza ad alta precisione su misura per il settore finanziario. Questa pipeline combina molteplici tecniche di estrazione delle informazioni con un dizionario finanziario che abbiamo costruito, tutti lavorando insieme per produrre oltre 342.000 estrazioni compatte da oltre 288.000 articoli di notizie finanziarie, con una precisione del 78% nelle prime 100 estrazioni. I tripli estratti sono memorizzati in un grafico di conoscenza che li rende facilmente disponibili per l'uso in applicazioni a valle.", 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру, тексеру және деректерді интеграциялау секілді қолданбалар көмегімен құрылмаған мәлімет көзінен мәліметті, әдетте мәтін құжаттардан, мәліметті құрып, мәліметті құр Білім графиктері құрылған білім деңгейінің стандартты болды. Бұл графикте бірліктер мен оның қатынастарының қатынастары көрсетіліп (тақырыпты, предикатты, нысандары) үш рет сақталады. Бұл графикте әртүрлі бағытталған қолданбаларды қуа Компаниялар, маркеттер, ақшалар және акциялар туралы жаңалық жаңалық көздерін жаңарту мүмкіндігі осы маңызды домен туралы маңызды біліктерді тарқату мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Бұл қағазында білім графикасын автоматты түрде мәліметті бөлім жаңалық мақалалардың көп корпус арқылы құру үшін көмектесеміз. Бұл мақсат үшін, біз денежні доменге өзгертілген дәл дәл дәл мәліметтің шығару жолын құрамыз. Бұл құрылғы бірнеше мәлімет тарқату техникаларын біріктіреді. Біз құрылған финансовы сөздік менен, барлық біріктіріп, 288 000 денежні жаңалық мақалалардан артық 342 000 компакт тарқату үшін бірге жұмыс істейді. 78% деген Көрсетілген үш рет білім графикасында сақталады, оларды төменгі қолданбаларда қолдануға оңай жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Motyvuota tokiomis paraiškomis kaip atsakymas į klausimus, faktų tikrinimas ir duomenų integracija, yra didelis susidomėjimas kurti žinių grafiką, gaunant informaciją iš nesustruktūruotų informacijos šaltinių, ypač tekstinių dokumentų. Žinių grafikai atsirado kaip struktūrizuoto žinių atstovavimo standartas, pagal kurį subjektai ir jų tarpusavio santykiai yra atstovaujami ir patogiai saugomi kaip (objektas, predikatas, objektas) trigubai grafikoje, kuris gali būti naudojamas įvairioms tolesnėms taikomosioms programoms įdiegti. Finansinių naujienų šaltinių, apie kuriuos pranešama apie bendroves, rinkas, valiutas ir atsargas, platinimas suteikia galimybę gauti vertingas žinias apie šią svarbią sritį. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame žinių grafikos kūrimui automatiškai išimant informaciją iš didelių finansinių naujienų straipsnių. Tuo tikslu plėtojame aukšto tikslumo žinių gavybos vamzdyną, pritaikytą finansų sričiai. Šis vamzdynas derina kelis informacijos gavimo metodus su finansiniu žodynu, kurį sukūrėme, ir visi dirba kartu, kad būtų pagaminta daugiau kaip 342 000 kompaktinių gavybų iš daugiau kaip 288 000 finansinių naujienų straipsnių, tiksliai 78 proc. geriausių 100 gavybų. Išgauti trigubai laikomi žinių grafikoje, leidžiančiame juos lengvai naudoti tolesnėse programose.', 'mk': 'Мотивирани од апликациите како што се одговорите на прашањата, проверката на фактите и интеграцијата на податоците, постои значителен интерес за изградба на графики на знаење со извлекување информации од неструктурирани извори на информации, особено текстови документи. Графиците за знаење се појавија како стандард за структурирано претставување на знаење, со кој ентитетите и нивните меѓуодноси се претставени и комфортно складирани како (субјект, предикат, објект) трипати во графикот кој може да се користи за поттикнување на различни понатамошни апликации. Проширувањето на изворите на финансиски вести за претпријатија, пазари, валути и акции претставува можност за извлекување вредно знаење за овој клучен домен. Во овој весник, се фокусираме на изградба на график на знаење автоматски со извлекување информации од голем корпус финансиски вести. За таа цел, развиваме нафтовод за извлекување висока прецизност на знаење соодветен за финансискиот домен. Овој гасовод комбинира повеќе техники за извлекување информации со финансиски речник кој го изградивме, сите кои работат заедно за да произведат над 342.000 компактни извлекувања од над 288.000 финансиски вести, со прецизност од 78 отсто на највисоките 100 извлекувања. Изизвадените тројни се чуваат во график на знаење што ги прави лесно достапни за употреба во понатамошните апликации.', 'el': 'Κινούμενοι από εφαρμογές όπως η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις, ο έλεγχος γεγονότων και η ενσωμάτωση δεδομένων, υπάρχει σημαντικό ενδιαφέρον για την κατασκευή γραφικών γνώσεων με την εξαγωγή πληροφοριών από μη δομημένες πηγές πληροφοριών, ιδίως έγγραφα κειμένου. Τα γραφήματα γνώσης έχουν αναδειχθεί ως πρότυπο για τη δομημένη αναπαράσταση της γνώσης, όπου οι οντότητες και οι αλληλεπιδράσεις τους αντιπροσωπεύονται και αποθηκεύονται βολικά ως τριπλάσια (υποκείμενο, προδιάγραφο, αντικείμενο) σε ένα γράφημα που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για να τροφοδοτήσει διάφορες μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές. Ο πολλαπλασιασμός των πηγών χρηματοοικονομικών ειδήσεων που αναφέρουν εταιρείες, αγορές, νομίσματα και μετοχές αποτελεί μια ευκαιρία για την εξαγωγή πολύτιμων γνώσεων σχετικά με αυτόν τον κρίσιμο τομέα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στην κατασκευή ενός γραφήματος γνώσης αυτόματα με εξαγωγή πληροφοριών από ένα μεγάλο σώμα άρθρων χρηματοοικονομικών ειδήσεων. Για το σκοπό αυτό, αναπτύσσουμε έναν αγωγό εξαγωγής γνώσης υψηλής ακρίβειας προσαρμοσμένο στον οικονομικό τομέα. Αυτός ο αγωγός συνδυάζει πολλαπλές τεχνικές εξαγωγής πληροφοριών με ένα οικονομικό λεξικό που κατασκευάσαμε, όλοι δουλεύοντας μαζί για να παράγουν πάνω από 342.000 συμπαγείς εξαγωγές από πάνω από 288.000 οικονομικά άρθρα ειδήσεων, με ακρίβεια 78% στις εξαγωγές κορυφής-100. Τα αποσπασμένα τριπλή αποθηκεύονται σε ένα γράφημα γνώσης καθιστώντας τα εύκολα διαθέσιμα για χρήση σε μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές.', 'hu': 'Az olyan alkalmazások motiválják, mint a kérdések megválaszolása, a tények ellenőrzése és az adatintegráció, jelentős érdeklődés mutatkozik a tudásdiagramok kialakításában, amelyek strukturálatlan információforrásokból, különösen a szöveges dokumentumokból származnak információk. A tudásdiagramok a strukturált tudás ábrázolásának szabványaként jöttek létre, amelynek során az entitások és kapcsolataik kényelmesen (tárgy, predikátum, objektum) háromszorosként jelennek meg és kényelmesen tárolhatók egy grafikonban, amely különböző downstream alkalmazások támogatására használható. A vállalatokról, piacokról, valutákról és részvényekről szóló pénzügyi hírforrások elterjedése lehetőséget kínál arra, hogy értékes ismereteket szerezzünk erről a kulcsfontosságú területről. Ebben a tanulmányban egy tudásdiagram automatikus létrehozására összpontosítunk, amelyet a pénzügyi hírek nagy korpuszából származó információkinyeréssel végeztünk. Ebből a célból a pénzügyi területre szabott, nagy pontosságú tudás kitermelési csővezetéket fejlesztünk ki. Ez a csővezeték többféle információkinyerési technikát ötvöz egy pénzügyi szótárral, amelyet mi építettünk össze, együtt dolgozva több mint 342 000 kompakt kinyerést készítve több mint 288 000 pénzügyi hírekből, 78%-os pontossággal a top 100 kinyerésnél. Az extrahált háromszorokat egy tudásgrafban tárolják, amely könnyen elérhetővé teszi őket a downstream alkalmazásokban való felhasználásra.', 'ms': 'Motivat oleh aplikasi seperti jawapan soalan, pemeriksaan fakta, dan integrasi data, terdapat minat yang signifikan dalam membina graf pengetahuan dengan mengekstrak maklumat dari sumber maklumat tidak terstruktur, terutama dokumen teks. Graf pengetahuan telah muncul sebagai piawai untuk mewakili pengetahuan struktur, dimana entiti dan hubungan antarabangnya mewakili dan disimpan dengan selesa sebagai (subjek,predikat,objek) tiga kali dalam graf yang boleh digunakan untuk menyalakan pelbagai aplikasi turun. Penjelasan sumber berita keuangan melaporkan tentang syarikat, pasar, valuta, dan stok memberikan peluang untuk mengekstrak pengetahuan yang berharga tentang bidang penting ini. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus pada membina graf pengetahuan secara automatik dengan pengekstrakan maklumat dari banyak artikel berita keuangan. Untuk tujuan itu, kami mengembangkan saluran paip ekstraksi pengetahuan ketepatan tinggi yang disesuaikan untuk domain keuangan. Saluran paip ini menggabungkan teknik ekstraksi maklumat berbilang dengan kamus keuangan yang kami bina, semua bekerja sama untuk menghasilkan lebih 342,000 ekstraksi kompak dari lebih 288,000 artikel berita keuangan, dengan ketepatan 78% pada ekstraksi top-100. Tiga-tiga ekstrak disimpan dalam graf pengetahuan yang menjadikannya mudah untuk digunakan dalam aplikasi turun.', 'mt': 'Motivat minn applikazzjonijiet bħat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, il-verifika tal-fatti, u l-integrazzjoni tad-dejta, hemm interess sinifikanti fil-bini ta’ grafiċi tal-għarfien billi tiġi estratta informazzjoni minn sorsi ta’ informazzjoni mhux strutturati, b’mod partikolari dokumenti tat-test. Grafiki tal-għarfien ħarġu bħala standard għar-rappreżentanza strutturata tal-għarfien, fejn l-entitajiet u l-inter-relazzjonijiet tagħhom huma rappreżentati u maħżuna b’mod konvenjenti bħala (suġġett, predikat, oġġett) tripli fi grafika li tista’ tintuża għall-enerġija ta’ diversi applikazzjonijiet downstream. Il-proliferazzjoni ta’ sorsi ta’ aħbarijiet finanzjarji li jirrapportaw dwar kumpaniji, swieq, muniti u stokkijiet tippreżenta opportunità għall-estrazzjoni ta’ għarfien siewi dwar dan l-qasam kruċjali. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw fuq il-bini awtomatiku ta’ grafika tal-għarfien permezz tal-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni minn korpus kbir ta’ artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet finanzjarji. Għal dak il-għan, niżviluppaw pipeline ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ għarfien ta’ preċiżjoni għolja mfassal għall-qasam finanzjarju. Dan il-pipeline jikkombina tekniki multipli ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni ma’ dikjararju finanzjarju li bnijna, kollha jaħdmu flimkien biex jipproduċu aktar minn 342,000 estrazzjoni kompatta minn aktar minn 288,000 artikolu ta’ a ħbarijiet finanzjarji, bi preċiżjoni ta’ 78 % fl-ogħla 100 estrazzjoni. It-tripli estratti jinħa żnu fi grafika tal-għarfien li tagħmilhom disponibbli faċilment għall-użu f’applikazzjonijiet downstream.', 'no': 'Flytt av program som svarar på spørsmål, faktisk kontroll og dataintegrering, er det signifikante interesse for å konstruere kunnskapsgrafen ved å pakka ut informasjon frå ikkje strukturerte informasjonskjelder, spesielt tekstdokument. Kjenningsgrafar har oppstått som standard for strukturerte kunnskapsrepresentasjon, slik at einingar og sine interrelasjonane vert representerte og korrekt lagra som tre gonger (emne,predikat,objekt) i eit graf som kan brukast for å styra ulike nedstrekingsprogrammer. Utvidelsen av finansielle informasjonskjelder som rapporterer om selskaper, markeder, valutar og stokkar gjer ein mulighet for å utpakke verdileg kunnskap om denne viktige domenet. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på å konstruera eit kunnskapsgraf automatisk ved å ekstrahera informasjon frå ein stor korpus av finansielle nyttikler. For det målet utviklar vi ein høg nøyaktig kunnskap utpakking av røyr som er tilpassa for den finansielle domenet. Denne røyrlinja kombinerer fleire informasjonsekstraksjonstekk med ein finansiell ordbok vi bygge, alle arbeider saman for å produsere over 342 000 kompakt utpakking frå over 288 000 finansielle nyttikler, med ein presisjon av 78% på de øvre 100 utpakkingane. Dei ekstraherte tredjegradane er lagra i eit kunnskapsgraf og gjer dei lett tilgjengelege for bruk i nedstrømmeprograma.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം, സത്യ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതും ഡേറ്റാ ഒരുമിച്ചും പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ച അറിവ് പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു സ്ഥാനമായി പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുവഴി വസ്തുക്കളും ബന്ധങ്ങളും പ്രതിനിധികളാക്കുന ഈ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡോമെയിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിലയേറ്റ അറിവുകള്\u200d പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സാമ്പത്തിക വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ വിവര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് സ്വയം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വലിയ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതി അതിനു വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് സാമ്പത്തിക ഡോമെയിനുവേണ്ടിയാണ്. ഈ പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പണിതിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാമ്പത്തിക നിഘണ്ടിയുമായി പല വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പുറത്തുകൂട്ടുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. മുകളി പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട മ്രീപ്പുകള്\u200d അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫില്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഡൌണ്\u200dസ്ട്രീമിലെ', 'mn': 'Ингээд асуулт хариулт, үнэндээ шалгах, өгөгдлийн нэгтгэл, мэдлэг графикийг бүтээхэд мэдээллийг бүтээх нь маш чухал сонирхолтой. Мэдлэгийн график нь бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэг илэрхийлэлийн стандарт болсон. Иймээс бүтэц болон тэдний хоорондын харилцааны хоорондын харилцааны хэлбэрээр дүрслэгдэж (сурагч, сурагч, объект) график дээр гурав дахин хадгалагдана. Энэ график дээр олон Компаниуд, зах, мөнгө болон хөрөнгө оруулсан санхүүгийн мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэх нь энэ чухал хүрээний талаар үнэ цэнэтэй мэдлэг гаргах боломж олгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдийн засгийн мэдээллийн баримтуудаас маш их хэмжээний мэдээллээс автоматаар мэдээллийн график бүтээхэд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ зорилгоор бид эдийн засгийн газрын тодорхой мэдлэг хадгалах хоолойн шугам хөгжүүлдэг. Энэ хоолойн шугам бидний бүтээсэн олон мэдээллийн гаргах техникуудыг 288 000 гаруй санхүүгийн мэдээллийн баримт 342,000 гаруй компакт гаргахад хамтдаа нийлүүлдэг. Энэ нь бидний бүтээсэн санхүүгийн үеэр 78% байна. Гурван гурван удаа мэдлэг график дээр хадгалагдаж байгаа бөгөөд эдгээрийг доорх хэрэглэмжүүд дээр амархан ашиглах боломжтой болгодог.', 'pl': 'Motywowane aplikacjami takimi jak odpowiadanie na pytania, sprawdzanie faktów i integracja danych, istnieje duże zainteresowanie tworzeniem wykresów wiedzy poprzez ekstrakcję informacji z nieustrukturyzowanych źródeł informacji, w szczególności dokumentów tekstowych. Wykresy wiedzy pojawiły się jako standard dla ustrukturyzowanej reprezentacji wiedzy, dzięki czemu podmioty i ich relacje wzajemne są reprezentowane i wygodnie przechowywane jako (podmiot, predykat, obiekt) potrójne w wykresie, który może być używany do zasilania różnych dalszych aplikacji. Rozprzestrzenianie się źródeł informacji finansowych na temat firm, rynków, walut i akcji stanowi okazję do pozyskania cennej wiedzy na temat tej kluczowej dziedziny. W artykule skupiamy się na automatycznym budowaniu wykresu wiedzy poprzez ekstrakcję informacji z dużego korpusu artykułów finansowych. W tym celu opracowujemy wysoce precyzyjny rurociąg ekstrakcji wiedzy dostosowany do domeny finansowej. Ten rurociąg łączy wiele technik ekstrakcji informacji z zbudowanym przez nas słownikiem finansowym, wszystkie współpracujące, aby produkować ponad 342.000 kompaktowe ekstrakcje z ponad 288.000 artykułów finansowych, z precyzją 78% na najwyższym poziomie 100. Wydobyte trójkąty są przechowywane w wykresie wiedzy, dzięki czemu są łatwo dostępne do stosowania w dalszych aplikacjach.', 'ro': 'Motivat de aplicații precum răspunsul la întrebări, verificarea faptelor și integrarea datelor, există un interes semnificativ în construirea graficilor cunoștințelor prin extragerea informațiilor din surse de informații nestructurate, în special din documente text. Graficele cunoștințelor au apărut ca standard pentru reprezentarea structurată a cunoașterii, prin care entitățile și interacțiunile lor sunt reprezentate și stocate convenabil ca (subiect, predicat, obiect) triple într-un grafic care poate fi folosit pentru a alimenta diferite aplicații din aval. Proliferarea surselor de știri financiare care raportează companii, piețe, valute și acțiuni reprezintă o oportunitate de a extrage cunoștințe valoroase despre acest domeniu crucial. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe construirea automată a unui grafic de cunoștințe prin extragerea informațiilor dintr-un corpus larg de articole de știri financiare. În acest scop, dezvoltăm o conductă de extragere a cunoștințelor de înaltă precizie adaptată domeniului financiar. Această conductă combină mai multe tehnici de extragere a informațiilor cu un dicționar financiar pe care l-am construit, toate lucrând împreună pentru a produce peste 342.000 de extracții compacte din peste 288.000 de articole de știri financiare, cu o precizie de 78% la primele 100 extracții. Triplele extrase sunt stocate într-un grafic de cunoștințe, făcându-le ușor disponibile pentru utilizare în aplicații din aval.', 'sr': 'Motivirani aplikacijom kao što su odgovori na pitanje, provjere činjenica i integracija podataka, postoji značajan interes za konstrukciju grafika znanja izvlačenjem informacija iz neostrukturiranih izvora informacija, posebno tekstualnih dokumenta. Grafiji znanja pojavili su se kao standard za strukturiranu zastupanje znanja, zbog kojih se entiteti i njihovi međuodnosi predstavljaju i prikladno čuvaju kao trojke (subjekta, predikat, objekt) u grafiku koji se mogu koristiti za energiju različitih prijava. Proširenje finansijskih izvora novina koji prijavljuju o kompanijama, tržištima, valutama i akcijama predstavlja priliku za izvlačenje vrijednog znanja o ovom ključnom domenu. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na izgradnju znanja grafika automatski izvlačenjem informacija iz velikog korpusa financijskih novinskih članaka. Za tu svrhu, razvijamo visoke precizne znanje izvlačene cijevine za finansijsku domenu. Ova kanalizacija kombinira višestruke tehnike izvlačenja informacija sa finansijskim rečnikom koji smo izgradili, svi zajedno radeći kako bi proizveli preko 342.000 kompaktnih izvlačenja iz preko 288.000 finansijskih novinskih članaka, sa preciznošću 78% na najvišem 100 izvlačenja. Izvukli su trostruko skladišteni u grafiku znanja koji ih spremno dostavlja za korištenje u potpunim aplikacijama.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය, ඇත්ත පරීක්ෂණය, දත්ත සංවිධානය සහ දත්ත සංවිධානය සඳහා භාවිත වැඩසටහන් වලින් සංවිධානය කරන්න ව දන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදිහට සංවිධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන් ඉන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ඉන්තිත්වය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අන්තර්ජාතික සම්බ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ආර්ථික ආර්ථික ආර්ථික ආර්ථික ආරක්ෂාවක් සමාගම, ව්\u200dයාපාරය, සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ස්ටොක්ස් වලින් අවස මේ පත්තරේ අපි දැනගැනීම් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් තොරතුරු පිළිබඳින් ලො ඒ අදහසට, අපි හොඳ විශේෂ දන්නවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පායිප්ලින් එකක් විස්තර කරනවා. මේ පායිප්ලායින් විශේෂ තොරතුරු නිර්මාණ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අපි නිර්මාණ කතාවක් එක්ක, හැමෝම එකට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ පිළිගන්න තුනක් තුනක් තියෙන්නේ දන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් තියෙන්නේ. ඔවුන්ව පාවිච්චි කරන්න ලේසියෙන්', 'sv': 'Motiverat av applikationer som frågesvar, faktakontroll och dataintegration finns det ett stort intresse för att bygga kunskapsgrafer genom att extrahera information från ostrukturerade informationskällor, särskilt textdokument. Kunskapsgrafer har framkommit som en standard för strukturerad kunskapsrepresentation, där entiteter och deras relationer representeras och bekvämt lagras som (ämne, predikat, objekt) tredubblingar i en graf som kan användas för att driva olika nedströmsapplikationer. Spridningen av finansiella nyhetskällor som rapporterar om företag, marknader, valutor och aktier utgör en möjlighet att utvinna värdefull kunskap om denna viktiga domän. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi på att konstruera en kunskapsgraf automatiskt genom informationsutvinning från en stor samling finansiella nyhetsartiklar. För detta ändamål utvecklar vi en högprecisionspipeline för kunskapsutvinning skräddarsydd för finansområdet. Denna pipeline kombinerar flera informationsutvinningstekniker med en finansiell ordbok som vi byggt, alla arbetar tillsammans för att producera över 342 000 kompakta utvinningar från över 288 000 finansiella nyhetsartiklar, med en precision på 78% vid topp 100 utvinningar. De extraherade trippelen lagras i en kunskapsgraf vilket gör dem lätt tillgängliga för användning i nedströms applikationer.', 'ta': 'கேள்வி பதில், உண்மை தேர்ந்தெடுத்தல் மற்றும் தரவு ஒன்றுசேர்ப்பு போன்ற பயன்பாடுகளால் இயக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, உருவாக்கப்படாத தகவல் மூலத்திலிருந்து தகவல் ப அறிவு வரைபடங்கள் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட அறிவிப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட ஒரு இயல்பாக வரைபடமாக வரையப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதனால் பொருள்கள் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய இணைப்புகள் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளன மற்றும்  நிறுவனங்கள், சந்தைகள், பணம் மற்றும் நிறுவனங்கள் மீது அறிவிப்பு நிதிய செய்தி மூலம் வளர்ச்சி இந்த முக்கியமான தளம் பற்றி மதிப்புரிய அறிவை வெ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தானாகவே ஒரு அறிவு வரைப்படத்தை உருவாக்குவதை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். பெரிய நிதி செய்தி கட்டுரைகளி அந்த காரணத்திற்கு, நாம் ஒரு அதிக துல்லியமான அறிவு வெளியீட்டு பைப்ளைன் உருவாக்குகிறோம் நிதியாயமான களம்  இந்த கைப்பேலின் பல தகவல் பிரிப்பு தொழில்நுட்பத்தை நாம் உருவாக்கிய நிதிய அகராதியுடன் ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறது, அனைத்தும் மேல் 288,000 க்கு மேற்பட்ட நிதி செய்தி கட்ட வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட மூன்று முயற்சிகள் அறிவு வரைபடத்தில் சேமிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அவற்றை எளிதாக பயன்படுத்துவதற்காக கி', 'so': "Waxqabashada codsiga sida jawaabta su'aalaha, baaritaanka runta ah iyo la-qabsashada macluumaadka waxaa muhiim u ah in aad sawir aqoonta ka soo baxdo macluumaadka aan la dhisin, khusuusan dukumentiyada qoraalka. Shaqooyinka aqoontu waxay u soo baxeen sida standard u eg qaabilaada aqoonta la hagaajiyey, kaas oo ay dhamaantooda iyo xiriirkoodu u representaan oo ay si fiican ugu wareegsan yihiin (madam,predicate,object) tribaarrada xarunta oo lagu isticmaali karo in lagu xoogeeyo codsiga hoose-u-socda oo kala duduwan. Koritaanka macluumaadka dhaqaalaha ee wargelinta shirkadaha, suuqa, qasnadaha iyo sokorta ayaa bixiya fursado la soo saaro aqoonta qiimaha ah ee ku saabsan deegaankan muhiimka ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa dhismaha sawir aqoonta si automatic ah oo macluumaadka laga soo bixiyo kooxo badan oo warqado dhaqaale ah. Sababtaas darteed waxaynu horumarinaa heer aqoonta aad u sahlan oo la soo saaro oo lagu qoray deegaanka dhaqaalaha. Kanu wuxuu ku kooban karaa qalabka soo saaridda macluumaadka kala duduwan oo ku qoran luqada dhaqaalaha ee aan dhisnay, dhammaantoodna waxay u wada shaqeyn jireen inuu soo bixiyo wax ka badan 342,000 oo shirkad oo laga soo saaray qoraalada warqadaha dhaqaalaha ee 288,000, wuxuuna ku qoray qiyaastii 78% ka korreeya 100. Imtixaanka la soo saaray waxaa lagu kaydiyey xarunta aqoonta, taasoo si fudud loogu isticmaali karo codsiga hoose-socota.", 'ur': 'ایسے کاربریوں کے ذریعہ سوال جواب دینے، حقیقت چک کرنے، اور ڈیٹ انٹرنیج کے ذریعہ اضافہ کی جاتی ہے، علم گراف بنانے کے لئے اضافہ ہے، غیر ساختہ معلومات سرسوسوں سے معلومات اٹھانے کے ذریعہ، مخصوصاً ٹی علم گراف ساختہ علم کی نمایش کے لئے استاندارڈ کے طور پر ظاہر ہوگئے ہیں، اس کے ذریعہ ایک گراف میں تین بار (subject,predicate,object) کی نمایش کی جاتی ہیں جو مختلف نیچے درجے کے کاروباروں کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ کمپنیوں, مارکیٹوں, مینچ اور سٹوک کے بارے میں روپورت کرنے والی مالی خبروں کے سوسوسوں کی گھیر پھیلانے کی فرصت یہ ضروری دار ڈومین کے بارے میں مقدار علم اٹھانے کے لئے ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک علم گراف بنانے پر اپنا منتظر رکھتے ہیں مالی خبریوں کے بہت بڑے مقدار سے معلومات اٹھانے کے ذریعہ۔ اس کے لئے ہم ایک عالی مضبوط علم اٹھانے والی پائیپ لین کو ایجاد کرتے ہیں جو مالی دامنی کے لئے تدبیر کی گئی ہے. یہ پائپ لین بہت سی معلومات اخراج ٹیکنیک کو ہم نے بنایا ہے ایک مالی دی اکشنوی کے ساتھ جو ہم نے بنایا ہے، سب ایک دوسرے سے 342,000 کمپٹ اخراج کرنے کے لئے 288,000 مالی اخراج معلومات سے کام کررہے ہیں، اس کے ساتھ 78% بالا 100 اخراج کے مطابق ہے۔ اخراج کئے گئے تین ٹکڑے ایک علم گراف میں ذخیره کئے جاتے ہیں کہ ان کو نیچے سیارے کاروبار میں استعمال کرنے کے لئے آسان بناتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Knowledge graphs have emerged as a standard for structured knowledge representation, whereby entities and their inter-relations are represented and conveniently stored as (subject,predicate,object) triples in a graph that can be used to power various downstream applications.  Bu muhim domain haqida qiymatni ajratish imkoniyatlarini anglatadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz qo'shilgan juda katta ta'lim maqolalardan foydalanuvchi maʼlumot grafikni avtomatik yaratishga foydalanamiz. Bu sababda, biz financiy domen uchun qo'llangan bir zo'lchami aniqlikni yaratib boramiz. Bu pipelining bir necha maʼlumot qismlash tugmalarini qo'yish uchun, biz yaratgan pul lugʻat bilan birlashtirish mumkin, hamma narsa 288,000 dan ortiq xabarlardan 342,000 qo'shish uchun ishlayapti, va eng yuqori 100 ta'minlovchiga 78% davom etishga ishlayapdi. Tanlangan uchrashuvlar maʼlumot grafikda saqlanmoqda, ularni tezlashtirish uchun oddiy foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Nguyên nhân bởi những ứng dụng như câu hỏi, kiểm tra thực tế, và việc lắp ráp dữ liệu, có một mối quan tâm lớn tới việc xây dựng biểu đồ kiến thức bằng cách lấy thông tin từ những nguồn tin không xây dựng, đặc biệt là những văn bản. Biểu đồ về tri thức xuất hiện như một tiêu chuẩn cho sự đại diện kiến thức cấu trúc, nhờ đó các thực thể và liên hệ của họ được đại diện và thuận tiện lưu giữ như là (chủ thể, tình trạng khó khăn, vật thể) máy tính trong một đồ thị có thể được dùng để vận hành các ứng dụng xuôi dòng khác nhau. Sự phát triển của các nguồn tin tài chính báo cáo về các công ty, thị trường, tiền tệ và cổ phiếu là cơ hội khai thác những kiến thức đáng giá về lĩnh vực này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc xây dựng một đồ thị kiến thức tự động bằng cách moi thông tin từ một tập hợp các bài báo tài chính. Để đạt được mục đích đó, chúng tôi sẽ phát triển một ống dẫn chuyên biệt về lĩnh vực tài chính. Đường ống này kết hợp nhiều kỹ thuật khai thác thông tin với một từ điển tài chính chúng tôi đã xây dựng, tất cả làm việc cùng nhau để sản xuất ra ngoài 342,000 khai thác gọn từ các bài báo tài chính trên nóc Các tế bào chiết xuất được lưu trong một đồ thị kiến thức làm cho chúng dễ sử dụng trong các ứng dụng xuôi dòng.', 'da': 'Motiveret af applikationer som spørgsmål besvarelse, faktakuntrol og dataintegration er der stor interesse i at opbygge vidensgrafer ved at udtrække oplysninger fra ustrukturerede informationskilder, især tekstdokumenter. Vidensgrafer er fremkommet som en standard for struktureret vidensrepræsentation, hvor enheder og deres indbyrdes relationer repræsenteres og gemmes bekvemt som (emne, prædikat, objekt) tredobler i en graf, der kan bruges til at drive forskellige downstream applikationer. Spredningen af finansielle nyhedskilder, der rapporterer om virksomheder, markeder, valutaer og aktier, giver mulighed for at udvinde værdifuld viden om dette afgørende område. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på at opbygge en vidensgraf automatisk ved at udtrække information fra et stort korpus af finansielle nyhedsartikler. Til det formål udvikler vi en rørledning med høj præcision, der er skræddersyet til det finansielle område. Denne pipeline kombinerer flere informationsudvindingsteknikker med en finansiel ordbog, som vi har bygget, og alle arbejder sammen om at producere over 342.000 kompakte udvindinger fra over 288.000 finansielle nyhedsartikler, med en præcision på 78% ved top-100 udvindinger. De ekstraherede tredobler gemmes i en vidensgraf, hvilket gør dem let tilgængelige til brug i downstream applikationer.', 'hr': 'Pokrenuti primjenama poput odgovora na pitanje, provjere činjenica i integracije podataka, postoji značajan interes za konstrukciju grafika znanja izvlačenjem informacija iz neostrukturnih izvora informacija, posebno tekstnih dokumenta. Grafiji znanja pojavili su se kao standard za strukturirano zastupanje znanja, s kojim se entiteti i njihovi međuodnosi predstavljaju i prikladno čuvaju kao trostruki (subjekt, predikat, objekt) u grafiku koji se mogu koristiti za energiju različitih nuspojava. Proširenje financijskih izvora novina koji prijavljuju o tvrtkama, tržištima, valutama i akcijama predstavlja priliku izvlačenja vrijednog znanja o ovom ključnom domenu. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na izgradnju znanja grafika automatski izvlačenjem informacija iz velikog korpusa financijskih novinskih članaka. Za tu svrhu razvijemo visok precizni znanstveni izvlačeni cijev za financijsku domenu. Ova cijevina kombinira višestruke tehnike izvlačenja informacija sa financijskim rečnikom koji smo izgradili, svi zajedno radeći kako bi proizveli preko 342.000 kompaktnih izvlačenja iz preko 288.000 financijskih novinskih članaka, sa preciznošću 78% na iznosu od najviših 100 ekstrakcija. Izvučene trostruke su skladištene u grafiku znanja, čime ih je lako dostupno za upotrebu u potpunim aplikacijama.', 'nl': "Gemotiveerd door toepassingen zoals het beantwoorden van vragen, fact checking en data integratie, is er grote interesse in het maken van kennisgrafieken door informatie uit ongestructureerde informatiebronnen, met name tekstdocumenten, te extraheren. Kennisgrafieken zijn ontstaan als een standaard voor gestructureerde kennisrepresentatie, waarbij entiteiten en hun onderlinge relaties worden weergegeven en gemakkelijk worden opgeslagen als (subject, predicaat, object) driedubbele in een grafiek die kan worden gebruikt om verschillende downstream toepassingen van stroom te voorzien. De proliferatie van financiële nieuwsbronnen die rapporteren over bedrijven, markten, valuta's en aandelen biedt een kans om waardevolle kennis over dit cruciale domein te halen. In dit artikel richten we ons op het automatisch opbouwen van een kennisgrafiek door informatieextractie uit een groot corpus financiële nieuwsberichten. Hiervoor ontwikkelen we een zeer nauwkeurige kennisextractiepipeline op maat van het financiële domein. Deze pijplijn combineert meerdere informatie extractie technieken met een financieel woordenboek dat we hebben gebouwd, allemaal samen om meer dan 342.000 compacte extracties uit meer dan 288.000 financiële nieuwsberichten te produceren, met een precisie van 78% bij de top-100 extracties. De geëxtraheerde triples worden opgeslagen in een kennisgrafiek waardoor ze gemakkelijk beschikbaar zijn voor gebruik in downstream toepassingen.", 'bg': 'Мотивирани от приложения като отговор на въпроси, проверка на факти и интеграция на данни, съществува значителен интерес от изграждането на графики на знанието чрез извличане на информация от неструктурирани източници на информация, особено текстови документи. Графите на знанието са се появили като стандарт за структурирано представяне на знанието, при което същностите и техните взаимоотношения са представени и удобно съхранявани като (субект, предикат, обект) тройни в графика, която може да се използва за захранване на различни приложения надолу по веригата. Разпространението на източници на финансови новини, отчитащи компании, пазари, валути и акции, представлява възможност за извличане на ценни знания за тази ключова област. В настоящата статия се фокусираме върху изграждането на графика на знанието автоматично чрез извличане на информация от голям корпус от финансови новини статии. За тази цел разработваме високопрецизен тръбопровод за извличане на знания, съобразен с финансовата сфера. Този тръбопровод съчетава множество техники за извличане на информация с финансов речник, който изградихме, всички работещи заедно, за да произвеждат над 342 000 компактни извличания от над 288 000 финансови новинарски статии, с точност 78% в топ 100 извличания. Извлечените тройки се съхраняват в графика на знанието, което ги прави лесно достъпни за използване в приложения надолу по веригата.', 'id': 'Dimotifkan oleh aplikasi seperti menjawab pertanyaan, pemeriksaan fakta, dan integrasi data, ada minat yang signifikan dalam membangun grafik pengetahuan dengan mengekstraksi informasi dari sumber informasi tidak terstruktur, terutama dokumen teks. Grafik pengetahuan telah muncul sebagai standar untuk persembahan pengetahuan strukturasi, dimana entitas dan hubungan antar mereka diwakili dan disimpan dengan nyaman sebagai (subjek,predikat,objek) tiga kali lipat dalam grafik yang dapat digunakan untuk menyalakan berbagai aplikasi turun. Penjelasan sumber berita keuangan melaporkan tentang perusahaan, pasar, valuta, dan saham memberikan kesempatan untuk mengekstraksi pengetahuan berharga tentang bidang penting ini. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada membangun grafik pengetahuan secara otomatis dengan ekstraksi informasi dari banyak artikel berita keuangan. Untuk tujuan itu, kami mengembangkan sebuah pipa ekstraksi pengetahuan presisi tinggi yang disesuaikan untuk domain keuangan. Pipeline ini menggabungkan teknik ekstraksi informasi berbilang dengan kamus keuangan yang kami bina, semua bekerja sama untuk menghasilkan lebih dari 342.000 ekstraksi kompakt dari lebih dari 288.000 artikel berita keuangan, dengan presisi 78% pada 100 ekstraksi terbaik. triple ekstraksi disimpan dalam grafik pengetahuan yang membuat mereka mudah tersedia untuk digunakan dalam aplikasi downstream.', 'de': 'Motiviert durch Anwendungen wie Fragebeantwortung, Faktenüberprüfung und Datenintegration besteht großes Interesse an der Erstellung von Wissensgraphen durch Extraktion von Informationen aus unstrukturierten Informationsquellen, insbesondere Textdokumenten. Wissensgraphen haben sich als Standard für strukturierte Wissensrepräsentation herausgebildet, wobei Entitäten und ihre Wechselbeziehungen dargestellt und bequem als (Subjekt, Prädikat, Objekt) Dreifache in einem Diagramm gespeichert werden, das zur Stromversorgung verschiedener nachgelagerter Anwendungen verwendet werden kann. Die Verbreitung von Finanznachrichtenquellen, die über Unternehmen, Märkte, Währungen und Aktien berichten, bietet eine Gelegenheit, wertvolles Wissen über diesen wichtigen Bereich zu gewinnen. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf die automatische Erstellung eines Wissensgraphen durch Extraktion von Informationen aus einem großen Korpus von Finanznachrichten. Dazu entwickeln wir eine hochpräzise Wissensextraktionspipeline, zugeschnitten auf den Finanzbereich. Diese Pipeline kombiniert mehrere Informationsextraktionstechniken mit einem Finanzwörterbuch, das wir erstellt haben. Alle arbeiten zusammen, um über 342.000 kompakte Extraktionen aus über 288.000 Finanznachrichten zu produzieren, mit einer Präzision von 78% an den Top-100 Extraktionen. Die extrahierten Triple werden in einem Wissensdiagramm gespeichert und sind somit für den Einsatz in nachgelagerten Anwendungen leicht verfügbar.', 'ko': '문답, 사실 검사와 데이터 집적 등 응용의 추진을 받아 비구조화된 정보원(특히 텍스트 문서)에서 정보를 추출하여 지식도를 구축하는 것이 사람들의 큰 흥미가 되었다.지식 도면은 이미 구조화된 지식 표시의 표준이 되었고 실체와 그 상호 관계는 (주어, 술어, 목적어) 도면의 삼원조로 표시되고 편리하게 저장되어 각종 하류 응용 프로그램을 지원하는 데 사용된다.회사, 시장, 화폐, 주식을 보도하는 금융 뉴스의 출처가 급증하면서 이 관건적인 분야에 관한 귀중한 지식을 얻는 기회를 제공했다.본고에서 우리는 대량의 금융 뉴스 기사에서 정보를 추출하여 자동으로 지식도를 구축하는 데 주력한다.이를 위해 우리는 금융 분야에 대한 고정밀 지식 추출 파이프라인을 개발했다.이 파이프라인은 다양한 정보 추출 기술을 우리가 구축한 금융 사전과 결합시켜 공동으로 작업했다. 28.8만여 편의 금융 뉴스 기사에서 342000편이 넘는 치밀한 발췌문을 생성했고 100편의 발췌문에서 정확도는 78% 였다.추출한 삼원조는 하위 응용 프로그램에서 사용할 수 있도록 지식도에 저장됩니다.', 'fa': 'توسط کاربردهای مانند جواب سوال، چک کردن حقیقت و ترکیب داده\u200cها، علاقه\u200cای بزرگی در ساختن گرافهای علمی با استخراج اطلاعات از منابع اطلاعات غیرساخته، مخصوصاً سند متن وجود دارد. گرافیک دانش به عنوان استاندارد برای نمایش علمی ساخته شده است، که با آن شرکتها و ارتباطهای بین آنها نمایش داده می\u200cشوند و به راحتی در یک گراف سه نفر (subject,predicate,object) ذخیره می\u200cشوند که می\u200cتوانند برای برق کاربردهای پایین\u200cترین استفاده می\u200cشوند. گسترش منابع اخبار مالی که در مورد شرکتها، بازارها، پول ها و ذخیره ها گزارش داده می شود فرصت برای خروج دانش ارزشمند در مورد این دامنی مهم است. در این کاغذ، ما روی ساختن یک گراف دانش به طور خودکار توسط اخراج اطلاعات از یک مجموعه بزرگ از مجموعه های اخبار مالی تمرکز می کنیم. برای این هدف، ما یک لوله\u200cی اخراج دانش دقیق بالا را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که برای دامنه مالی تغییر داده شده است. این لوله تکنیک\u200cهای اخراج چندین اطلاعات را با یک لغوی مالی که ما ساختیم، همگی با هم کار می\u200cکنند تا بیش از 342.000 اخراج\u200cهای پیوند از بیش از 288.000 مطالعه\u200cهای خبری مالی تولید کند، با دقیق 78 درصد در اخراج\u200cهای بالا ۱۰۰۰. سه نفر خارج شده در یک گراف دانش ذخیره می\u200cشود که آنها را برای استفاده از کاربردهای پایین\u200cترین دسترسی آسان می\u200cسازد.', 'tr': 'Programlerde sorag jogap bermek, hakyky barlamak we maglumat integrasy ýaly sistemlerden çykmak bilem grafiklerinden maglumat çekmek üçin wajyp gyzyklanýar. Bilim grafikleri strukturly bilim temsili üçin standart bolup görünýär. Şol sebäpli birnäçe görnüş programalary güýçlendirmek üçin ullanylabilir we olaryň arasyndaky baglaýyşlary (meýdança,öň-öňe,zady) grafikde üç gezek düzülýär. Maliýe täzelikler kanunlaryň känişlerini kompaniýa, bazarlar, maliýa we tasarlar barada ýazyp oturanlary bu möhüm domaý barada değerli bilgi açmak üçin bir mümkin döredir. Bu kagyzda, mali täzelikler barada bilgi grafyny awtomatik taýýarlamak üçin üns berýäris. Bu amaç için, mali domuzun için yüksek derecede bilgi çıkarma pipelini geliştirdik. Bu pipeline biziň inşa etdiğimiz mali sözlük bilen birnäçe informasiýa çykarma tekniklerini 288,000 mali täbli makalasyndan üst tutmak üçin birleşýär. Bu pipeline biziň inşa etdiğimiz mali sözlük bilen birleşýär. Hemme iş birleşýär 288,000 sanat makalasyndan üst tutmak üçin 78%  Açmak üç gezek bilim grafisinde gaýd edilýär, olary a şak programlerde ulanmak üçin oňat ulagatlaýar.', 'af': "Gebeweging deur toepassings soos vraag antwoord, feitkontrole en data integrasie, is daar betaling belang in die konstruksie van kennis grafieke deur inligting uit onstruktureerde inligting bronne uitpak, spesiaal teksdokumente. Kenningsgrafieke het voorgekom as 'n standaard vir struktureerde kennis voorstelling, waarmee entiteite en hul interrelasies verteenwoordig word en gemaklik gestoor word as (onderwerp,predikaat,voorwerp) tripels in 'n graf wat kan gebruik word om verskillende onderstreem toepassings te krag. Die uitbreiding van finansiële nuusbronne wat op maatskappye, markte, geld en stoeke rapporteer, stel 'n geleentheid vir uittrek waardelik kennis oor hierdie kruisbare domein. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op die konstruksie van 'n kennis graf outomaties deur inligting uittrek van 'n groot korpus van finansiële nuus artikels. Vir dié doel ontwikkel ons 'n hoë presisie kennis uittrekking pyplyn wat vir die finansiÃ«le domein aangestel is. Hierdie pyplyn kombinieer veelvuldige inligting uittrekking teknike met 'n finansiële woordeboek wat ons gebou het, almal saam werk om oor 342,000 kompakte uittrekkings te produseer van oor 288,000 finansiële nuus artikels, met 'n presisie van 78% by die top-100 uittrekkings. Die uitgevoerde drieëls word gestoor in 'n kennis graaf wat hulle leeg beskikbaar word vir gebruik in onderstreem toepassings.", 'sq': 'Motivuar nga aplikacione të tilla si përgjigja e pyetjeve, kontrollimi i fakteve dhe integrimi i të dhënave, ka interes të rëndësishëm në ndërtimin e grafikave të njohurive duke nxjerrë informacionin nga burimet e informacionit të pastrukturuar, veçanërisht nga dokumentet e tekstit. Grafiket e njohurive janë shfaqur si një standard për përfaqësimin e njohurive të strukturuara, me të cilin njësitë dhe marrëdhëniet e tyre ndërmjet tyre janë përfaqësuar dhe ruajtur në mënyrë të përshtatshme si (subjekt, predikat, objekt) tre herë në një grafik që mund të përdoret për të energjizuar aplikime të ndryshme poshtë rrjedhës. Përhapja e burimeve të lajmeve financiare që raportojnë mbi kompanitë, tregjet, monedhat dhe aksionet paraqet një mundësi për nxjerrjen e njohurive të vlefshme rreth kësaj fushe vendimtare. In this paper, we focus on constructing a knowledge graph automatically by information extraction from a large corpus of financial news articles.  Për këtë qëllim, ne zhvillojmë një tubacion të nxjerrjes së njohurive të sakta të përshtatshme për fushën financiare. Ky tubacion kombinon teknika të shumta të nxjerrjes së informacionit me një fjalor financiar që ndërtuam, të gjithë duke punuar së bashku për të prodhuar mbi 342,000 nxjerrje kompakte nga mbi 288,000 artikuj të lajmeve financiare, me një saktësi prej 78% në 100 nxjerrjet më të larta. Trefishat e nxjerra janë ruajtur në një grafik të njohurive që i bën ato të lehtë të disponueshme për përdorim në aplikimet e poshtme.', 'sw': 'Utumiaji uliotolewa na majibu kama vile jibu la swali, utafiti wa ukweli, na usangazaji wa taarifa, kuna maslahi makubwa ya kujenga picha za maarifa kwa kutengeneza taarifa kutoka vyanzo vya habari ambazo hazijenga, hususani nyaraka za maandishi. Takwimu za maarifa zimetokea kama kiwango cha uwakilishi wa maarifa, ambapo vitengo na mahusiano yao yanawakilishwa na kubakiwa kwa urahisi kama (mada, predicted, object) tatu katika picha ambazo zinaweza kutumika ili kuwezesha matumizi mbalimbali ya mitandao ya chini. Kuongezeka kwa vyanzo vya habari vya kifedha vinavyoripoti kuhusu makampuni, masoko, fedha na maduka yanatoa fursa ya kuongeza maarifa muhimu kuhusu eneo hili muhimu. Katika gazeti hili, tunalenga kutengeneza picha ya maarifa ya kujitegemea kwa kutumia taarifa kutoka kwenye makala makubwa ya habari za kifedha. Kwa lengo hilo, tunaendelea pipeli ya maarifa yenye ufahamu wa ufahamu unaoongozwa kwa ajili ya maeneo ya kifedha. Pili hii inaunganisha mbinu mbalimbali za utekelezaji wa taarifa kwa lugha ya kifedha tuliyojenga, wote wakifanya kazi kwa ajili ya kutengeneza uzoefu wa kompyuta 342,000 kutoka makala za kifedha za zaidi ya 288,000, ikiwa ni sahihi ya asilimia 78 kwenye maelezo ya juu-100. Majaribio yaliyotolewa yanahifadhiwa kwenye picha ya maarifa yanayoweza kupatikana kwa urahisi kwa matumizi katika matumizi ya mito ya chini.', 'am': 'እንደጠያቂው መልስ፣ እውነትን መምረጥ እና ዳታ ማሰናከል በተደረገ መረጃዎች፣ በተለይም የጽሑፍ ሰነዶች መረጃዎችን ከመግኘት የውቀት ግንኙነትን በመግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ እውቀት ግንኙነት አካባቢዎች እና የግንኙነታቸው ግንኙነት በተለየ (ጉዳዩ፣ ጉዳዩ፣ አካባቢ) ሦስት በgraph ውስጥ በተለየ የውይይት ፕሮግራሞች ላይ ለመቻል የሚችል ነው፡፡ የሀብት ዜና ምንጮች በኮምፒታል፣ ገበያዎች፣ ጉዳይ እና ግንቦች ላይ ስለዚህ አስቸጋሪ ውይይትን ለማውጣት የሞላዊ እውቀት ማሳየትን ያስችላል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የሀብት ዜና አካላት በተለጠፈ መረጃዎችን በመሠረት ላይ እናስከትናለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት የሀብት ውይይት የተጠቃሚ የውቀት ጥቅልቅ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይህ ፕላንፔን በብዙ የመረጃ ውጤት ማውጣት ሀብት መዝገብ እና በሠራንበት የሀብት መዝገብ መዝገብ እና ሁሉም ከ288,000 በላይ የሀብት ዜና አርእስቶች የሚጨምር 342,000 የተጨማሪውን ቁጥጥር ለማድረግ እየተሰበሰቡ ነው፡፡ የውጤት ሦስት ተሞክራዎች በአውቀት ቋንቋ ውስጥ ለመጠቀም በአስቸጋሪ ውጤት እንዲያቀናቅሉ ይጠብቃሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর, বাস্তবতা পরীক্ষা এবং তথ্য একত্রিত হওয়ার মতো অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের মাধ্যমে প্রচারিত হয়েছে, অক্ষুনির্মিত তথ্য উৎস থেকে তথ্য নির্মাণ করা জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ তৈরি করা জ্ঞানের প্রতিনিধিত্বের একটি স্বাভাবিক হিসেবে প্রকাশিত হয়েছে, যার মাধ্যমে বস্তু এবং তাদের পরস্পরের সম্পর্ক প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে এবং সুবিধাজন কোম্পানী, বাজার, মুদ্রান্ত এবং স্টক সম্পর্কে অর্থনৈতিক সংবাদ উৎসের বৃদ্ধির সংবাদ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে এই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ডোমেইন সম্পর্কে  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ নির্মাণের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি অর্থনৈতিক সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের বিশা এই উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য আমরা অর্থনৈতিক ডোমেইনের জন্য একটি উচ্চ পরিসূচিত জ্ঞান বিনিময়ের পাইপেলাইন উন্নয়ন করি। এই পাইপেলাইন বেশ কিছু তথ্য বের করার প্রযুক্তির সাথে আমরা বানিয়েছি অর্থনৈতিক অভিধানের সাথে একত্রিত করে, সবাই ২৮৮,০০০ বেশী অর্থনৈতিক সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ থেকে ৩৪২,০ বেরিয়ে যাওয়া ত্রিপগুলো একটি জ্ঞান গ্রাফে সংরক্ষণ করা হয়েছে যা তাদের সহজে ব্যবহার করতে পারে।', 'az': 'Söylə cavab vermək, həqiqət təşkil etmək və məlumat integrasiyası kimi proqramlar tərəfindən hərəkət edilir, müxtəlif məlumat məlumatlarından məlumat almaq üçün elm grafiklərini in şa etmək məqsədilə mövcuddur. Bilim grafikləri strukturlu elm göstəricisi üçün standart olaraq ortaya çıxdı, bu olaraq entitələri və ilişkiləri müxtəlif tərzimlərə gücü verə biləcək grafikdə üç dəfə (subjekt, predicate, object) olaraq təhrif edilir. Mali xəbər kaynaqlarının genişlənməsi, şirketlər, bazarlar, malik və xaçpərəstlər haqqında münasibətli məlumatlar haqqında çox qiymətli bilgi əldə etmək üçün fərqiyyət göstərir. Bu kağızda, mali xəbər məktullarının böyük korpusdan bilgi grafını avtomatik olaraq inşa etməyə odaqlanırıq. Bu məqsədilə, malik domenası üçün müəyyən edilmiş yüksək nöqsanlıq bilgi ekstraksiyası pipeline təhsil edirik. Bu pipeline bizim inşa etdiyimiz malik sözlüklə çoxlu məlumat çıxarma tekniklərini birləşdirir. Hamısı 288.000 malik xəbər məlumatlarından 342.000 kompakt çıxartmaq üçün birlikdə çalışırlar. En yüksək 100 çıxarmalarda 78% dəyişiklikdir. Çıkarılmış üç dəfə bilgi grafında saxlanılır ki, onları a şağıdaki proqramlarda istifadə etmək üçün asanlıqla faydalanır.', 'bs': 'Motivirani aplikacijom kao što su odgovori na pitanje, provjere činjenica i integracija podataka, postoji značajan interes za konstrukciju grafika znanja izvlačenjem informacija iz neostrukturiranih izvora informacija, posebno tekstualnih dokumenta. Grafovi znanja pojavili su se kao standard za strukturiranu zastupanje znanja, s kojim se entiteti i njihovi međuodnosi predstavljaju i prikladno čuvaju kao trojke (subjekta, predikat, objekt) u grafiku koji se mogu koristiti za energiju različitih prizemnih aplikacija. Proširenje finansijskih izvora novina koji izvještavaju o kompanijama, tržištima, valutama i akcijama predstavlja priliku izvlačenja vrijednog znanja o ovom ključnom domenu. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na izgradnju znanja grafika automatski izvlačenjem informacija iz velikog korpusa financijskih novinskih članaka. Za tu svrhu, razvijamo visoke precizne znanje izvlačene cijevine za financijsku domenu. Ova cijevina kombinira višestruke tehnike izvlačenja informacija sa finansijskim rečnikom koji smo sagradili, svi zajedno radeći kako bi proizveli preko 342.000 kompaktnih izvlačenja iz preko 288.000 financijskih novinskih članaka, sa preciznošću 78% na najvišim 100 izvlačenja. Izvučeni trostruki su skladišteni u grafiku znanja, čime ih je lako dostupno za upotrebu u potpunim aplikacijama.', 'ca': "Motivada per aplicacions com resposta a preguntes, verificació de fets i integració de dades, hi ha un interès significatiu en construir gràfics de coneixement extraint informació de fonts d'informació no estructuradas, particularment de textos. Els gràfics del coneixement han sorgit com un estàndard per a la representació estructurada del coneixement, en el qual les entitats i les seves interrelacions són representades i emmagatzemats convenientment com a triples (sujet, predicat, objecte) en un gràfic que pot ser utilitzat per alimentar diverses aplicacions avall. La proliferació de fonts de notícies financeres que informen sobre empreses, mercats, monedes i accions ofereix l'oportunitat d'extrair valorós coneixements sobre aquest domini crucial. En aquest article ens centrem en construir un gràfic del coneixement automàticament extraint informació d'un gran cos d'articles de notícies financeres. Per això, desenvolupem un tub d'extracció de coneixements d'alta precisió adaptat al domini financer. This pipeline combines multiple information extraction techniques with a financial dictionary that we built, all working together to produce over 342,000 compact extractions from over 288,000 financial news articles, with a precision of 78% at the top-100 extractions. Els triples extraits estan emmagatzemats en un gràfic de coneixement que els permet utilitzar fàcilment en aplicacions avall.", 'cs': 'Motivováni aplikacemi jako je odpověď na otázky, kontrola faktů a integrace dat, existuje významný zájem o vytváření znalostních grafů extrahováním informací z nestrukturovaných informačních zdrojů, zejména textových dokumentů. Znalostní grafy se objevily jako standard pro strukturovanou reprezentaci znalostí, kdy entity a jejich vzájemné vztahy jsou reprezentovány a pohodlně uloženy jako (subjekt, predikát, objekt) trojnásobné v grafu, který lze použít k napájení různých následných aplikací. Šíření finančních zdrojů zpravodajství informujících o společnostech, trzích, měnách a akciích představuje příležitost získat cenné znalosti o této klíčové oblasti. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na automatickou konstrukci znalostního grafu extrakcí informací z velkého korpusu finančních zpravodajských článků. Za tímto účelem vyvíjíme vysoce přesný potrubí extrakce znalostí na míru pro finanční oblast. Tento potrubí kombinuje několik technik extrakce informací s finančním slovníkem, který jsme vytvořili, všichni spolupracují na výrobě více než 342.000 kompaktních extrakcí z více než 288.000 finančních zpravodajských článků, s přesností 78% na nejvyšší sto extrakcí. Extrahované trojice jsou uloženy do znalostního grafu, čímž jsou snadno dostupné pro použití v následných aplikacích.', 'hy': 'Պատրաստվում են այնպիսի ծրագրերի միջոցով, ինչպիսիք են հարցերի պատասխանը, փաստերի ստուգումը և տվյալների ինտեգրացիան, կարևոր հետաքրքրություն կառուցել գիտելիքի գրաֆիկներ՝ հանելով տեղեկատվությունը անկառուցված տեղեկատվական աղբյուրներից Knowledge graphs have emerged as a standard for structured knowledge representation, whereby entities and their inter-relations are represented and conveniently stored as (subject,predicate,object) triples in a graph that can be used to power various downstream applications.  Ֆինանսական նորությունների աղբյուրների բազմազանությունը, որոնք տեղեկացվում են ընկերությունների, շուկայների, արժեքների և արժեքների մասին, հնարավորություն է տալիս այս կարևոր ոլորտի մասին արժեքավոր գիտելիքներ ստանալու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի կառուցման վրա, ինքնաբերաբար տեղեկատվություն ստանալով ֆինանսական նորությունների մեծ մարմնից: Այդ նպատակով մենք զարգանում ենք բարձր ճշգրիտ գիտելիքների հանման խողովակաշար, որը պատրաստված է ֆինանսական ոլորտում: This pipeline combines multiple information extraction techniques with a financial dictionary that we built, all working together to produce over 342,000 compact extractions from over 288,000 financial news articles, with a precision of 78% at the top-100 extractions. Վերցված երեք անգամ պահպանվում են գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի մեջ, որը նրանց հեշտությամբ հասանելի է օգտագործելու հետագա ծրագրերում:', 'et': 'Selliste rakenduste põhjal nagu küsimustele vastamine, faktide kontroll ja andmete integreerimine, on märkimisväärne huvi teadmiste graafikute koostamise vastu, võttes teavet struktureerimata teabeallikatest, eelkõige tekstidokumentidest. Teadmisgraafikud on kujunenud struktureeritud teadmiste esitamise standardiks, mille kohaselt olemid ja nende omavahelised suhted on esitatud ja mugavalt salvestatud (subjekt, predikaat, objekt) kolmekordsete graafikutena, mida saab kasutada erinevate järgnevate rakenduste toitmiseks. Ettevõtete, turgude, valuutade ja aktsiatega seotud finantsabiallikate levik annab võimaluse hankida väärtuslikke teadmisi selle olulise valdkonna kohta. Käesolevas töös keskendume teadmiste graafiku automaatsele koostamisele, võttes teavet suurtest finantsauudiste artiklitest. Selleks töötame välja finantsvaldkonna jaoks kohandatud ülitäpse teadmiste kaevandamise toru. See torujuhe ühendab mitmeid informatsiooni kaevandamise tehnikaid finantssõnastikuga, mille me ehitasime, töötades kõik koos, et toota üle 342 000 kompaktse kaevandamise üle 288 000 finantsõnastiku, täpsusega 78% 100 parima kaevandamise juures. Ekstrateeritud kolmikud salvestatakse teadmiste graafikul, mis teeb need hõlpsasti kättesaadavaks kasutamiseks järgmise etapi rakendustes.', 'fi': 'Kysymyksiin vastaamisen, faktojen tarkistamisen ja tietojen integroinnin kaltaisten sovellusten motivoimana on huomattava kiinnostus tietograafien rakentamiseen hyödyntämällä tietoa strukturoimattomista tietolähteistä, erityisesti tekstiasiakirjoista. Tietograafit ovat nousseet standardiksi strukturoidulle tiedon esittämiselle, jossa entiteetit ja niiden keskinäiset suhteet esitetään ja tallennetaan kätevästi kolminkertaisina kaaviossa, jota voidaan käyttää erilaisten jatko-sovellusten virtaan. Yrityksistä, markkinoista, valuutoista ja osakkeista raportoivien taloudellisten uutislähteiden lisääntyminen tarjoaa mahdollisuuden hankkia arvokasta tietoa tästä tärkeästä alueesta. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme tietograafin rakentamiseen automaattisesti keräämällä tietoa suuresta talousuutisista. Tätä varten kehitämme rahoitusalalle räätälöidyn erittäin tarkan tiedon hankintaputken. Tämä putki yhdistää useita tiedonhankintatekniikoita rakentamiimme taloussanakirjaan, jotka kaikki yhdessä tuottavat yli 342 000 kompaktia uuttoa yli 288 000 talousuutisesta, 78% tarkkuudella 100 parhaan uutteen joukossa. Uutetut kolminkertaiset tallennetaan tietokaavioon, jonka avulla ne ovat helposti käytettävissä jatkojalostuksen sovelluksissa.', 'ha': "Ana motsar da shiryoyin ayuka kamar jibar da tambayi, mai jarraba gaskiya, da kuma shirin haɗiya da data, yana da amfani da mai girma wa ka samun graphogi na ilmi da ka sami information daga sourcen information wanda ba'a tsare ba, kuma, hususan takardar mistakardar matsayi. Grafyutan ilmi sun fito kamar wata takarda wa mai tsari da ilmi wanda aka samar, da shi aka nuna abubuwa da kuma masu haɗuwa da su da kuma aka tsare su da ɗan daidaici kamar (masu amfani da,abun), Kifo-faɗin sourcen lãbãri na kiwuniya da ke gaya wa makampuni, sokiki, na'ura da na'ura, na bãyar da fursa ga za'a fitar da ilmi mai kima a a kan wannan wuri na muhimu. Daga wannan takardan, munã fokusar mu samun karatun kungita farat ɗaya da za'a sami takarda na takardar lãbãri daga makampuni mai girma na takarda na takarda. Ga wannan, Munã ƙara kokafin da aka ƙayyade ma'abũcin da aka samu zuwa ga mataimaki. Wannan pipipilin yana koma da wasu masu kashewa masu labanci da wata dictionary na ƙanshi wanda muka gina, dukansu sunã aiki a gabatar da kowaci 342,000 za'a zartar da wasu matsayi na rubutu daga rubutun da suka fi duk 288,000 na rubutu, da ƙayyade 78% a saman-100. Ana adana wasu jarrabo da aka samu cikin graphi na ilmi, don ya iya amfani da su sauri da sauƙi cikin shiryoyin ayuka da ke ƙarami.", 'he': 'מוניע על ידי היישומים כמו תשובת שאלות, בדיקת עובדות ואינטגרציה של נתונים, יש עניין משמעותי בניית גרפים ידע על ידי חולץ מידע ממקורות מידע לא מבושלים, במיוחד מסמכים טקסטים. גרפי ידע הופיעו כסטנדרט לייצגת ידע מבוסקת, שבה יחסים וביחסים ביניהם מייצגים ומחסנים באופן נוח כ (נושא, predicate, אובייקט) שלישיים בגרף שיכול להשתמש בכדי להפעיל שימושים שונים למטה. התרבות של מקורות חדשות פיננסיות מדווחות על חברות, שוקים, מטבעות ומניות מציגה הזדמנות להוציא ידע ערך על התחום הקריטי הזה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמקדים בבניית גרף ידע באופן אוטומטי על ידי חיפוש מידע מגוף גדול של מאמרים חדשות פיננסיות. למטרה הזאת, אנחנו מפתחים צינור חיפוש ידע מדויק גבוה שמתאים לתחום הפיננסי. צינור זה משלב טכניקות חטיפת מידע מרובות עם מילון פיננסי שבנינו, כולם עובדים יחד כדי לייצר מעל 342,000 חטיפים חוקים מעל 288,000 מאמרים חדשות פיננסיות, עם מדויקה של 78% ב-100 החטיפים הטובים ביותר. השלישיות המווצאות מאוחסנות בגרף ידע שהופך אותן זמינות בקלות לשימוש בתוכניות מתחתיות.', 'sk': 'Motivirana z aplikacijami, kot so odgovarjanje na vprašanja, preverjanje dejstev in integracija podatkov, obstaja veliko zanimanje za oblikovanje grafikonov znanja z pridobivanjem informacij iz nestrukturiranih informacijskih virov, zlasti besedilnih dokumentov. Grafi znanja so se pojavili kot standard za strukturirano predstavitev znanja, pri čemer so entitete in njihove medsebojne odnose predstavljene in udobno shranjene kot (subjekt, predikat, objekt) trojniki v grafu, ki se lahko uporabljajo za napajanje različnih aplikacij v nadaljnji verigi. Širjenje virov finančnih novic, ki poročajo o podjetjih, trgih, valutah in delnicah, predstavlja priložnost za pridobivanje dragocenega znanja o tem ključnem področju. V prispevku se osredotočamo na samodejno izdelavo grafikona znanja s pridobivanjem informacij iz velikega korpusa finančnih novic. V ta namen razvijamo visoko natančen cevovod za pridobivanje znanja, prilagojen finančnemu področju. Ta cevovod združuje več tehnik pridobivanja informacij s finančnim slovarjem, ki smo ga zgradili, in vsi skupaj delajo za izdelavo več kot 342.000 kompaktnih izvlečkov iz več kot 288.000 člankov o finančnih novicah, z natančnostjo 78% na najboljših 100 izvlečkov. Izvlečeni trojniki so shranjeni v grafu znanja, zaradi česar so lahko na voljo za uporabo v nadaljnjih aplikacijah.', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngupakan karo aplikasi sing lagi cejane mbubati, nggunakake barêng-barêng, lan entegator dadi sing bakal bantuan kanggo nggawe graphs ilèhan seneng nggawe informasi ning susahe informasi sing ora bisa nggawe informasi sing paling-stik, supoyo dokumen teks graphs Bilih al diagram diagram nyimpen kelas Standard kanggo awak dhéwé éntuk sampeyan karo perusahaan-sampeyan karo hal-sampeyan siji-sampeyan gawe ngubah cara-sampeyan gawe ngubah(temu,isara-sampeyan,object) lan uga sampeyan graf iki iso dianggap iki dadi diagram sing iso nggawe ngubah akeh dumateng. Daerah sing nggawe barang pengaturan tambah pirsak wihhita alam-pirsak ning kompanie, tindah, dolanan, lan nggawe barang sistem kuwi nggawe akeh nyimpen kanggo ngerasah jutaan pirsak dhéwé nggawe barang langkung dianggap Nang pember iki, kita ngubungko nggawe barang nggawe barang awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang akeh basa banjur Saiki, kita nggawe sistem kang butas barang pengguna luwih dumadhi kanggo nganggo barang panjur Ngawe Gosoko durung-toro sing nyimpen nang ingkang dipateng.', 'bo': 'Motivated by applications such as question answering, fact checking, and data integration, there is significant interest in constructing knowledge graphs by extracting information from unstructured information sources, particularly text documents. དབྱིན་གྲངས་རིས་གཟུགས་འབྲི་རིས་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཅན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་གྱི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་དག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཁབ་གཙོ་གླིང་དང་། དཔལ་འབྱོར། མ་མང་དང་ཆེ་དག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཤེས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་ For that purpose, we develop a high precision knowledge extraction pipeline tailored for the financial domain. This pipeline combines multiple information extraction techniques with a financial dictionary that we built, all working together to produce over 342,000 compact extractions from over 288,000 financial news articles, with a precision of 78% at the top-100 extractions. Extracted triples are stored in a knowledge graph and make them readily available for use in downstream applications.'}
{'en': 'Automatic Charge Identification from Facts : A Few Sentence-Level Charge Annotations is All You Need', 'ar': 'تحديد المصاريف تلقائيًا من الحقائق: القليل من التعليقات التوضيحية الخاصة بالرسوم على مستوى الجملة هي كل ما تحتاجه', 'fr': "Identification automatique de l'accusation à partir des faits\xa0: quelques annotations d'accusation au niveau de la phrase sont tout ce dont vous avez besoin", 'pt': 'Identificação automática de cobrança a partir de fatos: algumas anotações de cobrança em nível de sentença são tudo o que você precisa', 'es': 'Identificación automática de cargos a partir de hechos: solo necesita unas pocas anotaciones de cargos a nivel de oración', 'ja': '事実からの自動チャージ識別：少しの文章レベルのチャージ注釈が必要です', 'zh': '事实自动识别费:君但须数句', 'hi': 'तथ्यों से स्वचालित चार्ज पहचान: कुछ वाक्य-स्तर चार्ज एनोटेशन आपको सभी की आवश्यकता है', 'ru': 'Автоматическая идентификация заряда по фактам: аннотации о заряде на уровне нескольких предложений - это все, что вам нужно', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Muirear Uathoibríoch ó Fhíricí: Is beag anótáil Táir ar Leibhéal Pianbhreithe Gach Rud a Theastaíonn Agat', 'ka': 'Comment', 'it': 'Identificazione automatica della carica dai fatti: poche annotazioni di carica a livello di frase sono tutto ciò di cui hai bisogno', 'lt': 'Automatinis apmokestinimo identifikavimas iš faktų: A few sentence-level charge annotations is all you need', 'hu': 'Automatikus töltési azonosítás a tények alapján: Néhány mondatszintű töltési jegyzék minden, amire szüksége van', 'el': 'Αυτόματη αναγνώριση χρέωσης από γεγονότα: Λίγες σημειώσεις χρέωσης επιπέδου ποινής είναι το μόνο που χρειάζεστε', 'mk': 'Автоматска идентификација на напад од факти: Неколку реченици на ниво на напад се што ви треба', 'kk': 'Факттерден автоматты түрде жүктеу идентификациясы: Кейбір сөз- деңгейі жүктеу жазбалары', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Akaun Automatik Dari Fakta: Anotasi Akaun Aras-Huraian Sedikit adalah Yang Anda perlukan', 'ml': 'ഫാക്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വയം ചര്\u200dജ്ജ് തിരിച്ചറിയുക: ഒരു കുറച്ച് ശിക്ഷ- നില അക്രമം എല്ലാം നിങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni Awtomatika tat-Tariffa mill-Fatti: Annotazzjonijiet ta’ Tariffa b’Livell ta’ Sentenza Ftit huma dak kollu li teħtieġ', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ автоматтын шаардлагын тодорхойлолт: Жишээ хэмжээний шаардлагын тодорхойлолт бол Танд хэрэгтэй зүйл', 'no': 'Automatisk lastingsidentifisering frå faktar: Ein få teikningsnivå- lastingar er alt du treng', 'pl': 'Automatyczna identyfikacja opłat na podstawie faktów: Kilka komentarzy o opłatę na poziomie zdania to wszystko, czego potrzebujesz', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය චාර්ජ් පරීක්ෂණය අවශ්\u200dය: වාර්තාව- ස්තූති චාර්ජ් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඔබට අවශ්\u200dය හැම', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga sharciga fara-dhaqdhaqaaqa ah ee ka soo baxa Facts: A few Sentence-Level Charge Annotations are All You need', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம்- மட்டத்தின் எழுத்து அறிவிப்புகள் அனைத்தும் தேவைப்படுகிறது', 'ro': 'Identificarea automată a încărcării din fapte: Câteva adnotări de încărcare la nivel de sentință este tot ce aveți nevoie', 'sr': 'Automatska identifikacija optužnice iz èinjenica: Malo optužnice na nivou kazne je sve što trebate', 'sv': 'Automatisk laddning identifiering från fakta: Några meningsnivå avgifter anmärkningar är allt du behöver', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tự động nhận diện đơn giản: một vài công cụ đơn giản đơn đơn là tất cả những gì bạn cần.', 'bg': 'Автоматично идентифициране на обвинението от факти: Няколко анотации за обвинение на ниво присъда са всичко, от което се нуждаете', 'nl': 'Automatische Charge Identificatie op basis van feiten: een paar zinnen-niveau Charge Annotaties is alles wat u nodig hebt', 'da': 'Automatisk opladningsidentifikation ud fra fakta: Et par sætningsniveau opladninger er alt, hvad du behøver', 'hr': 'Automatska identifikacija opterećenja iz činjenica: Malo opterećenja na razini kazne je sve što trebate', 'ko': '사실에 따라 자동으로 비용을 식별: 문장급 비용 주석 몇 개만 있으면', 'id': 'Automatic Charge Identification from Facts: A Few Sentence-Level Charge Annotations is All You Need', 'de': 'Automatische Charge-Identifikation anhand von Fakten: Ein paar Satz-Level-Charge-Anmerkungen sind alles, was Sie brauchen', 'fa': 'شناسایی بارگیری خودکار از حقیقت: نشانه\u200cهای بارگیری سطح\u200cهای جمله کمی تنها چیزی است که نیاز دارید', 'tr': '彂䅒弊', 'af': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Tambulisho la kujitegemea kutoka Ukweli: Tamko Chama Chache cha Hukumu', 'sq': 'Identifikimi automatik i ngarkimit nga faktet: A Few Sense-Level Charge Annotations is All You Need', 'am': 'Automatic Charge Identification from Facts: A Few Sentence-Level Charge Annotations is All You Need', 'hy': 'Automatic Charge Identification from Facts: A Few Sentence-Level Charge Annotations is All You Need', 'az': 'Fayllardan Avtomatik Şarj Kimliği: Nə az Sözü-Seviye Şarj Nöqtələridir', 'bn': 'ফ্যাক্ট থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চার্জ পরিচয়: একটি কয়েকটি শাস্তি- স্তরের চার্জের বিজ্ঞাপন', 'bs': 'Automatska identifikacija optužnice iz činjenica: Malo optužnice na nivou kazne je sve što trebate', 'ca': 'Identificació automàtica de càrrega a partir de fets: Només necessites anotacions de càrrega amb poces frases', 'cs': 'Automatická identifikace poplatků na základě faktů: Několik poznámek poplatků na úrovni věty je vše, co potřebujete', 'fi': 'Automaattinen lataustunnistus tosiasioista: Muutama lausetason lataushuomautus on kaikki mitä tarvitset', 'et': 'Automaatne laengu identifitseerimine faktidest: mõned lausetaseme laengu märkused on kõik, mida vajate', 'sk': 'Samodejna identifikacija stroškov iz dejstev: nekaj opomb stroškov na ravni kazni je vse, kar potrebujete', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'זיהוי טעון אוטומטי מהעובדות: הערות על רמת הטעון של מעט גזרים זה כל מה שאתה צריך', 'jv': 'drawable-action', 'bo': 'དངོས་ཐོག་ལས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་སྐབས། ཚིག་ཕྱོགས་ཉུང་བའི་གནས་རིམ་ལ་བསྒྲུབ་སྐབས་ཁྱོད་ལ་དགོས'}
{'en': 'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) is the task of identifying the relevant charges given the facts of a situation and the statutory laws that define these charges, and is a crucial aspect of the judicial process. Existing works focus on learning charge-side representations by modeling relationships between the charges, but not much effort has been made in improving fact-side representations. We observe that only a small fraction of sentences in the facts actually indicates the charges. We show that by using a very small subset (3 %) of fact descriptions annotated with sentence-level charges, we can achieve an improvement across a range of different ACI models, as compared to modeling just the main document-level task on a much larger dataset. Additionally, we propose a novel model that utilizes sentence-level charge labels as an auxiliary task, coupled with the main task of document-level charge identification in a multi-task learning framework. The proposed model comprehensively outperforms a large number of recent baselines for ACI. The improvement in performance is particularly noticeable for the rare charges which are known to be especially challenging to identify.', 'ar': 'تحديد الاتهام التلقائي (ACI) هو مهمة تحديد الاتهامات ذات الصلة بالنظر إلى وقائع الموقف والقوانين التشريعية التي تحدد هذه الاتهامات ، وهو جانب حاسم في العملية القضائية. تركز الأعمال الحالية على تعلم تمثيلات جانب الشحن من خلال نمذجة العلاقات بين الرسوم ، ولكن لم يتم بذل الكثير من الجهد في تحسين تمثيلات جانب الحقائق. نلاحظ أن جزءًا صغيرًا فقط من الجمل الواردة في الحقائق تشير في الواقع إلى الاتهامات. نوضح أنه باستخدام مجموعة فرعية صغيرة جدًا (3٪) من أوصاف الحقائق المشروحة برسوم على مستوى الجملة ، يمكننا تحقيق تحسين عبر مجموعة من نماذج ACI المختلفة ، مقارنةً بنمذجة مهمة مستوى المستند الرئيسية فقط على قدر كبير مجموعة بيانات أكبر. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا يستخدم تسميات الشحن على مستوى الجملة كمهمة مساعدة ، إلى جانب المهمة الرئيسية لتحديد الرسوم على مستوى المستند في إطار عمل تعليمي متعدد المهام. يتفوق النموذج المقترح بشكل شامل على عدد كبير من خطوط الأساس الحديثة لـ ACI. يُلاحظ التحسن في الأداء بشكل خاص بالنسبة للشحنات النادرة التي يصعب تحديدها بشكل خاص.', 'pt': 'A Identificação Automática de Cobrança (ACI) é a tarefa de identificar as cobranças relevantes, considerando os fatos de uma situação e as leis estatutárias que definem essas cobranças, e é um aspecto crucial do processo judicial. Os trabalhos existentes se concentram em aprender as representações do lado da cobrança modelando as relações entre as cobranças, mas pouco esforço foi feito para melhorar as representações do lado do fato. Observamos que apenas uma pequena fração de sentenças nos fatos realmente indica as acusações. Mostramos que, usando um subconjunto muito pequeno (3%) de descrições de fatos anotadas com acusações em nível de sentença, podemos obter uma melhoria em vários modelos de ACI diferentes, em comparação com a modelagem apenas da tarefa principal em nível de documento em um conjunto de dados maior. Além disso, propomos um novo modelo que utiliza rótulos de carga em nível de sentença como uma tarefa auxiliar, juntamente com a tarefa principal de identificação de carga em nível de documento em uma estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa. O modelo proposto supera de forma abrangente um grande número de linhas de base recentes para ACI. A melhoria no desempenho é particularmente notável para as cargas raras que são especialmente difíceis de identificar.', 'fr': "L'identification automatique des charges (ACI) est la tâche d'identifier les charges pertinentes compte tenu des faits d'une situation et des lois statutaires qui définissent ces charges, et constitue un aspect crucial du processus judiciaire. Les travaux existants se concentrent sur l'apprentissage des représentations côté charge en modélisant les relations entre les charges, mais peu d'efforts ont été faits pour améliorer les représentations côté faits. Nous observons que seule une petite fraction des condamnations dans les faits indique réellement les chefs d'accusation. Nous montrons qu'en utilisant un très petit sous-ensemble (3\xa0%) de descriptions de faits annotées avec des accusations au niveau de la peine, nous pouvons obtenir une amélioration dans une gamme de modèles ACI différents, par rapport à la modélisation de la tâche principale au niveau du document sur un ensemble de données beaucoup plus vaste. De plus, nous proposons un nouveau modèle qui utilise des étiquettes d'accusation au niveau de la phrase comme tâche auxiliaire, associée à la tâche principale d'identification des accusations au niveau du document dans un cadre d'apprentissage multitâche. Le modèle proposé surpasse largement un grand nombre de niveaux de référence récents pour l'IPEC. L'amélioration des performances est particulièrement perceptible pour les rares charges connues pour être particulièrement difficiles à identifier.", 'es': 'La identificación automática de cargos (ACI) es la tarea de identificar los cargos relevantes dados los hechos de una situación y las leyes legales que definen estos cargos, y es un aspecto crucial del proceso judicial. Los trabajos existentes se centran en aprender las representaciones del lado de los cargos mediante el modelado de las relaciones entre los cargos, pero no se ha hecho mucho esfuerzo para mejorar las representaciones del lado de los hechos. Observamos que solo una pequeña fracción de las sentencias de los hechos indica realmente los cargos. Demostramos que al usar un subconjunto muy pequeño (3%) de descripciones de hechos anotadas con cargos a nivel de oración, podemos lograr una mejora en una gama de diferentes modelos de ACI, en comparación con modelar solo la tarea principal a nivel de documento en un conjunto de datos mucho más grande. Además, proponemos un modelo novedoso que utiliza etiquetas de cargos a nivel de oración como tarea auxiliar, junto con la tarea principal de identificación de cargos a nivel de documento en un marco de aprendizaje multitarea. El modelo propuesto supera ampliamente a un gran número de líneas de base recientes para ACI. La mejora en el rendimiento es particularmente notable por los cargos poco frecuentes que se sabe que son especialmente difíciles de identificar.', 'ja': '自動請求識別（ ACI ）は、状況の事実とこれらの請求を定義する成文法を考慮して、関連する請求を識別するタスクであり、司法手続きの重要な側面です。 既存の研究は、電荷間の関係をモデル化することによって電荷側の表現を学習することに焦点を当てているが、事実側の表現を改善するための努力はあまり行われていない。 私たちは、実際に告発を示すのは、事実のわずかな部分に過ぎないと観察します。 文レベルの電荷で注釈された事実説明の非常に小さなサブセット(3%)を使用することで、より大きなデータセット上でメインのドキュメントレベルのタスクをモデリングするのと比較して、さまざまなACIモデル全体で改善を達成できることを示しています。 さらに、マルチタスク学習フレームワークにおける文書レベルの電荷識別の主なタスクとともに、補助タスクとして文レベルの電荷ラベルを利用する新規モデルを提案する。 提案されたモデルは、ACIの最近の多数のベースラインを包括的に上回っています。 パフォーマンスの向上は、識別することが特に困難であることが知られている希少な電荷に対して特に顕著である。', 'zh': '自言知(ACI)者,据事定义之成文法也,而司法程序之一机也。 今侧重于因对电荷之际建模以学电荷方,而改进之事,未为多力。 臣等察之,事惟小决而实明之。 臣谨按句级费注小事述子集(3%),可以列ACI改进,非大数也集上惟建模大文档级任务。 若新造模样,句级电荷标为辅佐,并于多任务学框架中合文档电荷识之大体。 所言模形全优于ACI者,近期基线。 于已知特难识之奇费,性能之高尤明。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित प्रभार पहचान (एसीआई) किसी स्थिति के तथ्यों और इन आरोपों को परिभाषित करने वाले वैधानिक कानूनों को देखते हुए प्रासंगिक आरोपों की पहचान करने का कार्य है, और न्यायिक प्रक्रिया का एक महत्वपूर्ण पहलू है। मौजूदा कार्य आरोपों के बीच संबंधों को मॉडलिंग करके चार्ज-साइड अभ्यावेदन सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, लेकिन तथ्य-पक्ष प्रतिनिधित्व में सुधार करने में बहुत अधिक प्रयास नहीं किए गए हैं। हम देखते हैं कि तथ्यों में वाक्यों का केवल एक छोटा सा अंश वास्तव में आरोपों को इंगित करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि वाक्य-स्तर के आरोपों के साथ एनोटेट किए गए तथ्य विवरणों के एक बहुत छोटे सबसेट (3%) का उपयोग करके, हम विभिन्न एसीआई मॉडलों की एक श्रृंखला में सुधार प्राप्त कर सकते हैं, जैसा कि एक बहुत बड़े डेटासेट पर मुख्य दस्तावेज़-स्तर के कार्य को मॉडलिंग करने की तुलना में। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम एक उपन्यास मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक सहायक कार्य के रूप में वाक्य-स्तरीय चार्ज लेबल का उपयोग करता है, जो एक बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे में दस्तावेज़-स्तर की चार्ज पहचान के मुख्य कार्य के साथ युग्मित होता है। प्रस्तावित मॉडल व्यापक रूप से एसीआई के लिए हाल ही में आधार रेखाओं की एक बड़ी संख्या को मात देता है। प्रदर्शन में सुधार दुर्लभ शुल्कों के लिए विशेष रूप से ध्यान देने योग्य है जो पहचानने के लिए विशेष रूप से चुनौतीपूर्ण होने के लिए जाने जाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматическая идентификация обвинений (ACI) является задачей выявления соответствующих обвинений с учетом фактов ситуации и законов, которые определяют эти обвинения, и является одним из важнейших аспектов судебного процесса. Существующие работы сосредоточены на изучении представлений на стороне заряда путем моделирования отношений между зарядами, но не было приложено много усилий для улучшения представлений на стороне факта. Мы отмечаем, что лишь небольшая часть предложений в фактах фактически указывает на обвинения. Мы показываем, что с помощью очень небольшого подмножества ( 3%) описаний фактов, аннотированных с обвинениями на уровне предложений, мы можем достичь улучшения в диапазоне различных моделей ACI, по сравнению с моделированием только основной задачи на уровне документов на гораздо большем наборе данных. Кроме того, мы предлагаем новую модель, которая использует ярлыки заряда на уровне предложения в качестве вспомогательной задачи, в сочетании с основной задачей идентификации заряда на уровне документа в многозадачном обучающем фреймворке. Предлагаемая модель в целом превосходит большое число недавних исходных условий для ACI. Улучшение производительности особенно заметно для редких сборов, которые, как известно, особенно трудно идентифицировать.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le hAithint Muirear Uathoibríoch (ACI) na cúisimh ábhartha a aithint i bhfianaise fíricí an cháis agus na dlíthe reachtúla a shainíonn na muirir seo, agus is gné ríthábhachtach den phróiseas breithiúnach é. Díríonn na hoibreacha atá ann faoi láthair ar léiriú ar thaobh na dtáillí a fhoghlaim trí chaidrimh idir na táillí a shamhaltú, ach ní dhearnadh mórán iarracht ar léiriú ar thaobh na bhfíoras a fheabhsú. Tugaimid faoi deara nach léiríonn ach codán beag abairtí sna fíricí na táillí. Léirímid, trí úsáid a bhaint as fothacar an-bheag (3%) de chur síos fíorais atá anótáilte le táillí ar leibhéal na habairte, gur féidir linn feabhsú a bhaint amach thar raon de shamhlacha éagsúla ACI, i gcomparáid le samhaltú ach an príomhthasc ar leibhéal an doiciméid ar mhórán. tacar sonraí níos mó. Ina theannta sin, molaimid múnla nua a úsáideann lipéid muirir ar leibhéal na habairte mar thasc cúnta, in éineacht leis an bpríomhthasc maidir le muirear ar leibhéal na doiciméid a shainaithint i gcreat foghlama il-tasc. Sáraíonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe go cuimsitheach líon mór bonnlínte le déanaí don ACI. Tá an feabhas ar fheidhmíocht le sonrú go háirithe maidir leis na táillí neamhchoitianta is eol a bheith an-dúshlánach a aithint.', 'ka': 'ავტომატური გადატვირთვა იდენტიფიკაცია (ACI) არის შესაბამისი გადატვირთვა სიტაციის ფაქტების და სტატისტური закონების, რომლებიც ამ გადატვირთვას განსაზღვრებენ, და არის ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პროც მსგავსი სამუშაო სამუშაო დასწავლობისთვის გამოსახულებების შესახებ მოდელურების შესახებ, მაგრამ არ უფრო მუშაობელი დასწავლობულია ფაქტიური გამოსახულებები ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ მხოლოდ პატარა წერტილების წერტილი ფაქტებში მართლაც აღწერება. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მარტივი პატარა სესესეტის გამოყენებით (3%) ფაქტის აღწერების განსაზღვრებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ განსხვავებული ACI მოდელების განსაზღვრება, როგორც მარტივი დოკუმენტის დოკუმე დამატებით, ჩვენ მინდა პრომენტის მოდელს, რომელიც გამოყენებს სიტყვების ნაწილის ლაბეჭები როგორც დახმარებელი დავალება, რომელიც კოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის ნაწილის ინდიდინტიფიკაციის მნიშ პროგრამების მოდელი ყველაფერად უფრო დიდი რაოდენობა ACI-ისთვის. ოჲ-ეჲბპვნთვრჲ ნა ოპაგთრვლჟრგჲრჲ ვ ჲჟჲბვნჲ ჱა პვეკთრვ ჲბგთნვნთწ, კჲთრჲ ჟვ ჱნაწრ, ფვ ჟა ჲჟჲბვნჲ რპსენთ ეა თევნრთპარ.', 'el': 'Ο αυτόματος προσδιορισμός επιβαρύνσεων είναι το καθήκον του εντοπισμού των σχετικών επιβαρύνσεων δεδομένων των πραγματικών περιστατικών και των νόμων που καθορίζουν αυτές τις επιβαρύνσεις, και αποτελεί κρίσιμη πτυχή της δικαστικής διαδικασίας. Τα υπάρχοντα έργα επικεντρώνονται στην εκμάθηση αναπαραστάσεων από την πλευρά του φορτίου με τη μοντελοποίηση σχέσεων μεταξύ των φορτίων, αλλά δεν έχει γίνει μεγάλη προσπάθεια για τη βελτίωση των αναπαραστάσεων από την πλευρά των γεγονότων. Παρατηρούμε ότι μόνο ένα μικρό κλάσμα των ποινών στα γεγονότα δείχνει πραγματικά τις κατηγορίες. Δείχνουμε ότι χρησιμοποιώντας ένα πολύ μικρό υποσύνολο περιγραφών γεγονότων που σχολιάζονται με χρεώσεις σε επίπεδο ποινής, μπορούμε να επιτύχουμε μια βελτίωση σε μια σειρά διαφορετικών μοντέλων σε σύγκριση με τη μοντελοποίηση μόνο της κύριας εργασίας σε επίπεδο εγγράφου σε ένα πολύ μεγαλύτερο σύνολο δεδομένων. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο που χρησιμοποιεί ετικέτες φόρτισης σε επίπεδο ποινής ως βοηθητική εργασία, σε συνδυασμό με το κύριο καθήκον της αναγνώρισης φόρτισης σε επίπεδο εγγράφου σε ένα πλαίσιο μάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά σε μεγάλο βαθμό έναν μεγάλο αριθμό πρόσφατων βασικών γραμμών για την ACI. Η βελτίωση της απόδοσης είναι ιδιαίτερα αισθητή για τα σπάνια φορτία που είναι γνωστό ότι είναι ιδιαίτερα δύσκολο να εντοπιστούν.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus vádazonosítás (ACI) a vonatkozó vádak azonosításának feladata, tekintettel a helyzet tényeire és az ezeket a vádakat meghatározó törvényi jogszabályokra, és ez a bírósági eljárás kulcsfontosságú eleme. A meglévő munkák a töltés oldali reprezentációk tanulására összpontosítanak a töltések közötti kapcsolatok modellezésével, de nem sok erőfeszítést tettek a tény oldali reprezentációk javítására. Megfigyeljük, hogy a tényekben a mondatok csak kis töredéke jelzi a vádakat. Megmutatjuk, hogy a mondatszintű díjakkal megjegyzett tényleírások nagyon kis részhalmazának (3%) használatával több ACI modellben javulást érhetünk el, mint a fő dokumentum szintű feladat modellezése egy sokkal nagyobb adatkészleten. Továbbá olyan új modellt javasolunk, amely a mondatszintű töltéscímkéket használja kiegészítő feladatként, valamint a dokumentumszintű töltések azonosításának fő feladatával együtt egy többfeladatos tanulási keretrendszerben. A javasolt modell átfogóan felülmúlja az ACI számos közelmúltbeli alapvető értékét. A teljesítmény javulása különösen észrevehető a ritka töltések esetében, amelyeket ismert, hogy különösen nehéz azonosítani.', 'it': "L'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) è il compito di identificare le accuse rilevanti, tenuto conto dei fatti di una situazione e delle leggi legali che definiscono tali accuse, ed è un aspetto cruciale del processo giudiziario. I lavori esistenti si concentrano sull'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni lato carica modellando le relazioni tra le cariche, ma non è stato fatto molto sforzo per migliorare le rappresentazioni lato fatto. Osserviamo che solo una piccola frazione di frasi nei fatti indica effettivamente le accuse. Mostriamo che utilizzando un sottoinsieme molto piccolo (3%) di descrizioni dei fatti annotate con addebiti a livello di frase, possiamo ottenere un miglioramento su una gamma di diversi modelli ACI, rispetto alla modellazione solo dell'attività principale a livello di documento su un set di dati molto più ampio. Inoltre, proponiamo un nuovo modello che utilizza etichette di carica a livello di frase come attività ausiliaria, insieme al compito principale di identificazione della carica a livello di documento in un quadro di apprendimento multi-task. Il modello proposto supera ampiamente un gran numero di linee di base recenti per l'ACI. Il miglioramento delle prestazioni è particolarmente evidente per le rare cariche che sono note per essere particolarmente difficili da identificare.", 'lt': 'Automatinis mokesčių identifikavimas (angl. Automatic Charge Identification – ACI) yra užduotis nustatyti atitinkamus mokesčius atsižvelgiant į situacijos faktus ir įstatymus, kuriais apibrėžiami šie mokesčiai, ir yra esminis teismo proceso aspektas. Dabartiniuose darbuose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama mokymosi mokesčių atstovavimui modeliuojant mokesčių santykius, tačiau nepadėta daug pastangų gerinant faktų atstovavimą. Mes pastebime, kad tik nedidelė dalimi faktų sakinių faktiškai nurodo kaltinimus. Mes parodome, kad naudojant labai mažą faktų aprašymų pogrupį (3 %), užrašytą sakinių lygio mokesčiais, mes galime pasiekti pagerėjimą įvairiuose ACI modeliuose, palyginti su modeliavimu tik pagrindinę dokumentų lygio užduotį daug didesniame duomenų rinkinyje. Be to, siūlome naują model į, kuriuo kaip pagalbinę užduotį naudojami sakinių lygio mokesčių ženklai, kartu su pagrindine dokumentų lygio mokesčių nustatymo užduotimi daugiafunkciniame mokymosi sistemoje. Siūlomas modelis visapusiškai viršija daugelį naujausių ACI bazinių linijų. Ypač pastebimas rezultatų pagerėjimas retais mokesčiais, kurie, žinoma, yra ypač sunkūs nustatyti.', 'kk': 'Автоматты жүктеу идентификациясы (ACI) бұл жағдайды жағдайды, бұл жүктеулерді анықтайтын заңдықтарды анықтау тапсырмасы, және бұл жағдайды жағдайдың маңызды бөлігі. Бар жұмыстар жұмыс істеу үшін жұмыс істеу жағындағы заттардың қатынасын моделдеу арқылы оқытуға көмектеседі, бірақ факт жағындағы таңбаларды жақсарту үшін көп жұмыс істеме Біз тек сөздердің кішкентай бөлшегін көрсетедік. Біз сөз деңгейіндегі жүктеулермен белгіленген ең кішкентай (3%) бөлігін қолдануға болады. Біз бірнеше ACI моделдерінің арасында жақсартуға болады. Бұл үлкен деректер жиынындағы негізгі құжат деңгейіндегі тапсырманы мо Қосымша, біз көп тапсырма оқыту фреймінде құжат деңгейінің негізгі тапсырмасының анықтамасына қосылған жаңа үлгілерін қолданатын романдық үлгісін таңдаймыз. Келтірілген үлгі ACI үшін ең жаңа негізгі жолдардың көп нәтижесін шектеп береді. Жұмыс істеу жақсартылығы өзгертілмейді. Бұл таңдау үшін өзгертілмейді.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Muat Automatik (ACI) adalah tugas untuk mengenalpasti tuduhan yang berkaitan dengan fakta situasi dan undang-undang statutori yang menentukan tuduhan ini, dan adalah aspek penting proses mahkamah. Kerja yang wujud fokus pada pembelajaran perwakilan sisi muatan dengan memmodelkan hubungan antara muatan, tetapi tidak banyak usaha telah dilakukan untuk meningkatkan perwakilan sisi fakta. Kami memperhatikan bahawa hanya sebahagian kecil kalimat dalam fakta sebenarnya menunjukkan tuduhan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dengan menggunakan subkumpulan kecil ( 3%) deskripsi fakta yang dicatat dengan biaya tahap kalimat, kita boleh mencapai peningkatan melalui julat model ACI yang berbeza, dibandingkan dengan model hanya tugas aras dokumen utama pada set data yang jauh lebih besar. Lagipun, kami cadangkan model baru yang menggunakan label muatan tahap kalimat sebagai tugas bantuan, serta tugas utama pengenalan muatan tahap dokumen dalam kerangka pembelajaran berbilang tugas. Model diusulkan secara keseluruhan melebihi bilangan besar baris dasar baru-baru ini untuk ACI. Perbaikan prestasi adalah terutama dapat dilihat untuk tuntutan langka yang diketahui adalah khusus mencabar untuk dikenali.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ചാര്\u200dജ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് (ACI) ഈ ചാര്\u200dജുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങളുടെയും സത്യത്തിന്റെയും നിയമപരിധികളുടെയും കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയ നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലികള്\u200d ചാര്\u200dജ് ഭാഗത്തുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ചാര്\u200dജ്ജുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ ബന്ധങ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തിലെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ വിധികള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണുന്നുള്ളൂ. വാക്ക്-നില ചാര്\u200dജ്ജുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വളരെ ചെറിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തില്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊണ്ട്, വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലെ ACI മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മെ കൂടാതെ, വാക്ക്-നില ചാര്\u200dജ് ചേര്\u200dജ്ജ് ലേബറില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു പല പണിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും എക്സിയുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ വലിയ സംഖ്യതലകള്\u200d പ്രവര പ്രകടനത്തിലെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്ന ചുമത്തുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേ', 'mk': 'Автоматска идентификација на обвиненијата (АЦИ) е задача да се идентификуваат релевантните обвиненија со оглед на фактите за ситуација и законите кои ги дефинираат овие обвиненија, и е клучен аспект на судскиот процес. Постојаните дела се фокусираат на учењето на претставувањата на страната на товарот со моделирање на односите помеѓу товарот, но не се вложени многу напори за подобрување на претставувањата на страната на фактите. We observe that only a small fraction of sentences in the facts actually indicates the charges.  Ние покажуваме дека со користење на многу мал подгруп ( 3 %) на фактични описи анотирани со товари на ниво на реченици, можеме да постигнеме подобрување преку различни модели на ACI, во споредба со моделирање на само главната задача на ниво на документ на многу поголем податок. Покрај тоа, предложуваме нов модел кој ги користи етикетите за наплата на нивото на речениците како помошна задача, заедно со главната задача за идентификација на наплата на нивото на документот во рамка за учење на повеќе задачи. Предложениот модел сеопфатно го надминува големиот број неодамнешни бази за ACI. Подобрувањето на резултатите е особено забележувачко за ретките обвиненија кои се познати како особено тешки за идентификување.', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-imposti (ACI) hija l-kompitu li jiġu identifikati l-imposti rilevanti fid-dawl tal-fatti ta’ sitwazzjoni u l-liġijiet statutorji li jiddefinixxu dawn l-imposti, u hija aspett kruċjali tal-proċess ġudizzjarju. Ix-xogħlijiet eżistenti jiffukaw fuq ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tagħlim fuq in-naħa tal-imposti billi jimmudellaw ir-relazzjonijiet bejn l-imposti, iżda ma sarux ħafna sforzi fit-titjib tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet fuq in-naħa tal-fatti. Aħna ninservaw li frazzjoni żgħira biss tas-sentenzi fil-fatti fil-fatt tindika l-akkużi. Aħna nuru li bl-użu ta’ sottosett żgħir ħafna ( 3%) ta’ deskrizzjonijiet tal-fatti annotati b’imposti fuq il-livell tas-sentenza, nistgħu niksbu titjib f’firxa ta’ mudelli differenti tal-ACI, meta mqabbla mal-immudellar biss tal-kompitu prinċipali fuq il-livell tad-dokument fuq sett ta’ dejta ferm akbar. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid li juża t-tikketti tal-imposti fil-livell tas-sentenza bħala kompitu awżiljarju, flimkien mal-kompitu ewlieni tal-identifikazzjoni tal-imposti fil-livell tad-dokument f’qafas ta’ tagħlim multikompitu. Il-mudell propost jaqbeż b’mod komprensiv għadd kbir ta’ linji bażi riċenti għall-ACI. It-titjib fil-prestazzjoni huwa partikolarment notevoli għall-ħlasijiet rari li huma magħrufa li huma partikolarment diffiċli biex jiġu identifikati.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna identyfikacja opłat (ACI) jest zadaniem identyfikacji odpowiednich opłat biorąc pod uwagę fakty sytuacji i ustawowe ustawy określające te opłaty i stanowi kluczowy aspekt procesu sądowego. Istniejące prace koncentrują się na nauce reprezentacji po stronie ładunku poprzez modelowanie relacji między ładunkami, ale nie poczyniono dużego wysiłku w ulepszaniu reprezentacji po stronie faktów. Zauważamy, że tylko niewielki ułamek wyroków w faktach faktycznie wskazuje na zarzuty. Pokazujemy, że dzięki zastosowaniu bardzo małego podzbioru opisów faktów z adnotacją opłat na poziomie zdania, możemy osiągnąć poprawę w zakresie różnych modeli ACI, w porównaniu z modelowaniem tylko głównego zadania na poziomie dokumentu na znacznie większym zbiorze danych. Ponadto proponujemy nowatorski model, który wykorzystuje etykiety ładunków na poziomie zdania jako zadanie pomocnicze, w połączeniu z głównym zadaniem identyfikacji opłat na poziomie dokumentu w ramach wielozadaniowego uczenia się. Proponowany model kompleksowo przewyższa dużą liczbę ostatnich linii bazowych dla ACI. Poprawa wydajności jest szczególnie zauważalna w przypadku rzadkich ładunków, o których wiadomo, że są szczególnie trudne do zidentyfikowania.', 'no': 'Automatisk ladingsidentifisering (ACI) er oppgåva for å identifisera dei relevante ladningane som er gitt fakta av ein situasjon og den lovgivnadene som definerer desse ladningane, og er eit viktig aspekt av den rettsstudige prosessen. Det eksisterande arbeidet er fokusert på å lære opplysningar på læringsside ved å modellere forholdet mellom ladningane, men ikkje mykje påvirkning er gjort i å forbetra representasjonar på faktorside. Vi observerer at berre ein liten brøk av setningar i faktanen viser faktisk ladningane. Vi viser at ved å bruka ein svært liten subgruppe (3%) av faktiske skildringar merkt med setningsnivå, kan vi oppnå eit forbedring i eit rekkjefølgje av ulike ACI-modeller, sammenlignet med å modelera bare hovudoppgåva for dokumentnivå på mykje større datasett. I tillegg foreslår vi eit nytt modell som brukar etikettar for setningsnivå som eit hjelpeoppgåve, kopla med hovudoppgåva for identifikasjon av dokumentnivå-lasting i eit fleire oppgåver-læringsrammeverk. Det foreslåde modellet utfører ein stor tal nyleg baselinjer for ACI. Forbetringa i utviklinga er spesielt merkelig for dei rare ladningane som er kjent til å vera spesielt vanskeleg å identifisera.', 'mn': 'Автоматикийн шагналын тодорхойлолт (ACI) гэдэг нь нөхцөл байдал болон эдгээр шагналыг тодорхойлж буй хууль зүйлсийг тодорхойлж, шүүхийн үйл явцын чухал асуудал юм. Ингээд оршиж байгаа ажлын тухай хэрэглээний харилцааны загвараар суралцах чадваруудыг анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Гэхдээ жинхэнэ талын загваруудыг сайжруулахад маш их хичээл хийгдсэн. Бид зөвхөн жижиг хэсэг өгүүлбэрийг үнэндээ шаардлагатай гэдгийг анзаарлаа. Бид нэг жижиг хэсэг (3%) хэрэглэхэд өгүүлбэр-түвшинд тайлбарласан тодорхойлолтуудыг ашиглаж, бид олон янз бүрийн ACI загваруудыг сайжруулж чадна. Мөн бид өгүүлбэр-түвшинд шаардлагатай загваруудыг тусламжтай ажил болгон ашигладаг шинэ загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Бид олон ажлын суралцах үйл ажиллагаанд баримт-түвшинд шаардлагатай анхны ажил холбогдсон. Саяхан санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар нь ACI-ын олон саяхан суурь шугам гаргадаг. Ингээд үйл ажиллагааны сайжруулалт нь ялангуяа ховор шагналыг тодорхойлж чадна.', 'ro': 'Identificarea automată a taxelor (ACI) este sarcina de a identifica acuzațiile relevante având în vedere faptele unei situații și legile legale care definesc aceste acuzații și este un aspect crucial al procesului judiciar. Lucrările existente se concentrează pe învățarea reprezentărilor din partea sarcinii prin modelarea relațiilor dintre sarcini, dar nu s-a făcut prea mult efort în îmbunătățirea reprezentărilor din partea faptelor. Observăm că doar o mică fracțiune din propoziții din fapte indică de fapt acuzațiile. Aratăm că folosind un subset foarte mic (3%) de descrieri de fapt adnotate cu taxe la nivel de propoziție, putem obține o îmbunătățire pe o gamă de modele ACI diferite, în comparație cu modelarea doar a sarcinii principale la nivel de document pe un set de date mult mai mare. În plus, propunem un model nou care utilizează etichetele de taxare la nivel de frază ca sarcină auxiliară, cuplată cu sarcina principală de identificare a taxelor la nivel de document într-un cadru de învățare multi-sarcină. Modelul propus depășește în mod cuprinzător un număr mare de linii de referință recente pentru ACI. Îmbunătățirea performanței este deosebit de vizibilă pentru sarcinile rare care sunt cunoscute a fi deosebit de dificile de identificat.', 'sr': 'Automatska identifikacija optužbe (ACI) je zadatak identifikacije odgovarajućih optužbi s obzirom na činjenice situacije i zakona o zakonima koji definiraju te optužbe, i to je ključni aspekt sudskog procesa. Postojeći radovi se fokusiraju na predstavljanje optužnice modeliranjem odnosa između optužnice, ali ne napravljeno je mnogo napora u poboljšanju predstavljanja na strani činjenica. Primećujemo da samo mali deo rečenica u činjenicama pokazuje optužbe. Pokazujemo da koristeći veoma mali podsekt (3%) opisa činjenica navedenih optužbama na nivou rečenica, možemo postići poboljšanje u razini različitih modela ACI, u usporedbi sa modelima samo glavnog zadatka na nivou dokumenta na mnogo većem setu podataka. Osim toga, predlažemo novi model koji koristi etikete optužbe na nivou rečenica kao pomoćni zadatak, povezan sa glavnim zadatak identifikacije optužbe na nivou dokumenta u multi task učenjskom okviru. Predloženi model sveobuhvatno iznosi veliki broj nedavnih osnovnih linija za ACI. Poboljšanje provedbe je posebno primijetljivo za rijetke optužbe koje su poznate da su posebno izazovne za identifikaciju.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය චාර්ජ් පරීක්ෂණය (ACI) කියන්නේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන වැඩේ ස්ථානයක් සහ සාධාරණ නීතියක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරති ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් වැඩ කරන්නේ චාර්ජ් පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, චාර්ජ් අතර සම්බන්ධයක් විසින් සිද්ධ ව අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා කියලා වාක්ය පොඩි කොටසක් විතරයි ඇත්තටම බලාපොරොත්තු වෙන්නේ. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි (3%) ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි, අපිට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනස් ACI මොඩේල් වල විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි,  තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වාක්ෂාවක් ලේබල් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වාක්ෂාව ප ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ACI වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු සංඛ්යාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ වැඩියුම විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga iskaa ah (ACI) waa shaqada aqoonsashada lacagta la xiriira ee la siiyo xaqiiqyada xaaladda iyo sharciyada sharciga sharciga ku qoran lacagahan, waana dhinac muhiim ah ee baaritaanka xukunka. Shaqooyinka joogtada ah waxay ku focus yihiin barashada dhinaca lacagta ah, si loo sameynayo xiriirka lambarka, laakiin waxaa la sameeyay hawl aad u badan in la horumariyo wakiilada runta ah. Waxaynu aragnaa in qeyb yar oo ka mid ah xukunka runta ah ay ku muuqataa lacagta. We show that by using a very small subset ( 3%) of fact descriptions annotated with sentence-level charges, we can achieve an improvement across a range of different ACI models, as compared to modeling just the main document-level task on a much larger dataset.  Sidoo kale waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model warqad ah oo lagu isticmaalaa calaamadaha lacagta heerka ee dhamaadka ah oo shaqo ku habboon, waxaana lagu soo bandhigayaa shaqo ugu horeeya aqoonsiga lacagta dhamaadka ee warqada ah oo ku qoran shahaado waxbarasho badan. Tusaale la soo jeeday wuxuu si buuxa ah u soo saaraa qoraal badan oo ugu dambeeyay ee ACI. Horumarinta sameynta waxaa si gaar ah loo ogolaadaa lacagta qaaliga ah oo loo yaqaan inay si gaar ah u dhibaataysan in la aqoonso.', 'sv': 'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) är uppgiften att identifiera de relevanta anklagelserna med tanke på omständigheterna i en situation och de lagstadgade lagar som definierar dessa anklagelser, och är en avgörande aspekt av den rättsliga processen. Befintliga arbeten fokuserar på att lära sig charge-side representationer genom att modellera relationer mellan laddningarna, men inte mycket arbete har gjorts för att förbättra fakta-side representationer. Vi konstaterar att endast en liten bråkdel av meningarna i fakta faktiskt anger anklagelserna. Vi visar att genom att använda en mycket liten delmängd (3%) faktableskrivningar kommenterade med satser kan vi uppnå en förbättring över en rad olika ACI-modeller, jämfört med att modellera bara huvuduppgiften på dokumentnivå på en mycket större datamängd. Dessutom föreslår vi en ny modell som använder meningsnivå laddningsetiketter som en hjälpuppgift, tillsammans med huvuduppgiften för dokumentnivå avgiftsidentifiering i ett flerfunktionslärande ramverk. Den föreslagna modellen överträffar totalt ett stort antal nya baslinjer för ACI. Förbättringen av prestanda är särskilt märkbar för de sällsynta laddningar som är kända för att vara särskilt svåra att identifiera.', 'ur': 'آٹوٹی چارج شناسایی (ACI) ایک موقعیت کی حقیقت اور قانون قوانین کی تعریف کرنے کی کوشش ہے، اور یہ قانون کی پردازش کا اہم حصہ ہے. موجودہ کام چارڈ جانب کی نمونات کی تعلیم پر موجود ہیں چارڈ کے درمیان رابطہ نمونڈ کرنے کے ذریعہ، لیکن حقیقت جانب کی نمونات کی اصلاح کرنے میں بہت زیادہ کوشش نہیں کی گئی ہے. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ صرف ایک چھوٹی قسم کی جماعت حقیقت میں شارژوں کو دکھاتی ہے۔ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایک بہت چھوٹے سپسٹ (3%) کے مطابق فیصلہ کے لائق چورڈ کے ذریعہ مفصل کے مطابق ہم بہت بڑے ڈاٹ سٹ پر مطابق دکھانے کے مطابق مختلف ACI موڈلوں میں بہت اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں۔ اور اضافہ، ہم ایک نئی موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو sentence-level چارچ لیبل کو ایک مددگار کام کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے، جو ایک multi task learning framework میں دکمان-level چارچ شناسایی کی اصلی کام کے ساتھ جوڑا ہوا ہے. پیشنهاد کی موڈل اکثر سے زیادہ بہت اچھی سی آی کے لئے بہت سی بنسٹ لینڈ کرتا ہے۔ عملکرد کی تدبیر مخصوص طور پر مشاهده ہے ان کمزور چاروں کے لئے جن کو معلوم ہے کہ مخصوص مشکل پہچان کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے.', 'ta': 'தானியக்க வரை அடையாளம் (ACI) என்பது ஒரு நிலையின் உண்மையை கொடுத்துள்ள குறிப்புகளைக் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் செயல் தற்போதைய வேலைகள் சுற்றங்களுக்கிடையில் மாதிரியும் தொடர்புகளை மாற்றி கற்றுக் கொள்வது மூலம் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது, ஆனால் உண்மை உண்மையில் ஒரு சிறிய வாக்கியங்களில் மட்டும் ஒரு சிறிய பின்னம் மட்டும் நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் என்று நாம வாக்கு- மட்டத்தின் சுற்றங்களுடன் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட விவரங்களை மிகவும் சிறிய துணுக்கு (3%) பயன்படுத்தி நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். வேறு வித்தியாசமான ACI மாதிரிகளுக்கு ம கூடுதலாக, நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரி முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தும் வாக்கு- நிலை சுமத்து சுட்டி சிட்டைகளை ஒரு கூட்டுதலாக பயன்படுத்துகிறது, பல- பணி கற்றுக் கொள் The proposed model comprehensively outperforms a large number of recent baselines for ACI. செயல்பாட்டின் மேம்படுத்தல் குறிப்பாக கவனிக்கப்படுகிறது குறிப்பாக சுற்றங்களுக்கு அது குறிப்பாக அறியப்படுக', 'uz': "@ info Mavjud vazifalar davlatlar orasidagi munosabatlarni o'rganish uchun foydalanadi, lekin faqat qo'llanmalarni o'zgartirishda ko'p harakat qilmaydi. Biz shunday ko'rib turamiz, faqat to'g'ri so'zlarning kichkina bir qismini ko'rsatumiz. Biz shunday ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, sentence darajasi davomida qisqarilgan qismni (3%) yordamida ko'p katta maʼlumotlar tizimidagi asosiy hujjat darajasining vazifasini moslash mumkin. Koʻrsatgich, biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish qatorida gapir-darajali sarlavhasining tugmasini qoʻllashni qoʻllash mumkin. Name The improvement in performance is particularly noticeable for the rare charges which are known to be especially challenging to identify.", 'vi': 'Nhận diện tự động tội lỗi (ACI) là nhiệm vụ xác định các cáo buộc liên quan dựa trên sự kiện tình huống và luật pháp xác định các cáo buộc, và là một khía cạnh quan trọng trong quá trình xét xử. Các công trình đang tồn tại tập trung vào các diễn xuất phụ trách học bằng cách tạo mối quan hệ giữa các cáo buộc, nhưng đã không có nhiều nỗ lực để cải thiện các biểu hiện thực. Chúng tôi quan sát rằng chỉ một phần nhỏ các câu trong sự kiện thực sự chỉ ra các lời buộc tội. Chúng tôi cho thấy, sử dụng một bộ dạng rất nhỏ (3=) của mô tả sự kiện được ghi chú bằng giá mức án, chúng tôi có thể tiến bộ hơn nhiều mô hình ACI khác nhau, so với việc mô hình một tập tin chính trên một bộ dữ liệu lớn hơn. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mới sử dụng nhãn giá trị mức án hình thành một nhiệm vụ phụ trợ, kết hợp với nhiệm vụ chính của việc nhận diện mức giá tài liệu trong một cơ sở học đa nhiệm vụ. The proposed model hoàn toàn vượt trội một số lượng lớn các nền tảng gần đây dành cho ACI. Sự cải tiến tiến độ suất rất đáng chú ý đối với những giá hiếm có, mà rõ ràng là khó xác định.', 'bg': 'Автоматичната идентификация на таксите е задачата за идентифициране на съответните такси предвид фактите на дадена ситуация и законовите закони, които определят тези такси, и е от решаващо значение за съдебния процес. Съществуващите творби се фокусират върху изучаването на презентации от страна на заряда чрез моделиране на взаимоотношенията между зарядите, но не са положени много усилия за подобряване на презентациите от страна на фактите. Наблюдаваме, че само малка част от изреченията във фактите всъщност показват обвиненията. Показваме, че като използваме много малка подгрупа (3%) от описанията на фактите, анотирани с обвинения на ниво изречение, можем да постигнем подобрение в редица различни модели в сравнение с моделирането само на основната задача на ниво документ върху много по-голям набор от данни. Освен това предлагаме нов модел, който използва етикети на заряд на ниво изречение като допълнителна задача, съчетана с основната задача за идентифициране на заряд на ниво документ в рамка за обучение с множество задачи. Предложеният модел изчерпателно превъзхожда голям брой скорошни базови линии за АКИ. Подобряването на производителността е особено забележимо за редките такси, за които е известно, че са особено трудни за идентифициране.', 'da': 'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) er opgaven med at identificere de relevante anklager i betragtning af omstændighederne i en situation og de lovbestemte love, der definerer disse anklager, og er et afgørende aspekt af retssagen. Eksisterende værker fokuserer på at lære ladningsside repræsentationer ved at modellere relationer mellem ladningerne, men der er ikke gjort meget for at forbedre fakta-side repræsentationer. Vi bemærker, at kun en lille brøkdel af sætningerne i kendsgerningerne faktisk angiver anklagerne. Vi viser, at ved at bruge en meget lille delmængde (3%) faktableskrivelser kommenteret med sætningsniveau afgifter, kan vi opnå en forbedring på tværs af en række forskellige ACI modeller, sammenlignet med at modellere blot den vigtigste dokumentniveau opgave på et meget større datasæt. Derudover foreslår vi en ny model, der bruger sætningsniveau gebyr etiketter som en hjælpeopgave, kombineret med hovedopgaven med dokumentniveau gebyr identifikation i en multi-opgave læring ramme. Den foreslåede model overstiger i vidt omfang en lang række nylige basislinjer for ACI. Forbedringen i ydeevnen er især mærkbar for de sjældne ladninger, som er kendt for at være særlig udfordrende at identificere.', 'nl': 'Automatische Charge Identificatie (ACI) is de taak om de relevante kosten te identificeren gezien de feiten van een situatie en de wettelijke wetten die deze kosten definiëren, en is een cruciaal aspect van de gerechtelijke procedure. Bestaande werken richten zich op het leren van charge-side representaties door relaties tussen de charges te modelleren, maar er is niet veel moeite gedaan om fact-side representaties te verbeteren. We constateren dat slechts een klein deel van de zinnen in de feiten daadwerkelijk de aanklacht aangeeft. We laten zien dat door gebruik te maken van een zeer kleine subset van feitenbeschrijvingen met aantekeningen op zinsniveau, we een verbetering kunnen bereiken in een reeks verschillende ACI-modellen, in vergelijking met het modelleren van alleen de belangrijkste taak op documentniveau op een veel grotere dataset. Daarnaast stellen we een nieuw model voor dat laadlabels op zinnenniveau gebruikt als hulptaak, gekoppeld aan de belangrijkste taak van identificatie van ladingen op documentniveau in een multi-task leerkader. Het voorgestelde model overtreft een groot aantal recente baselines voor ACI. De verbetering van de prestaties is vooral merkbaar voor de zeldzame ladingen waarvan bekend is dat ze bijzonder moeilijk te identificeren zijn.', 'hr': 'Autonomska identifikacija optužbe (ACI) je zadatak identifikacije relevantnih optužbi s obzirom na činjenice situacije i zakona o zakonima koji definiraju te optužbe te su ključni aspekt sudskog procesa. Postojeći radovi usredotočili su se na predstavljanje optužbe na strani učenja modeliranjem odnosa između optužbi, ali nije mnogo napora u poboljšanju predstavljanja na strani činjenica. Primijetimo da samo mali dio kazne u činjenicama pokazuje optužbe. Pokazujemo da koristeći vrlo mali podskup ( 3%) opisa činjenica navedenih optužbama na razini kazne, možemo postići poboljšanje u razini različitih modela ACI-a, u usporedbi s modelima samo glavnog zadatka na razini dokumenta na mnogo većem setu podataka. Osim toga, predlažemo novi model koji koristi etikete optužbe na razini kazne kao pomoćni zadatak, povezan s glavnim zadatak identifikacije optužbe na razini dokumenta u višestrukom okviru učenja. Predloženi model sveobuhvatno iznosi veliki broj nedavnih osnovnih linija za ACI. Poboljšanje učinka posebno je primjetljivo za rijetke optužbe koje su poznate posebno izazovne za identifikaciju.', 'id': 'Identifikasi Anggung Otomatis (ACI) adalah tugas untuk mengidentifikasi tuntutan relevan mengingat fakta situasi dan hukum hukum yang mendefinisikan tuntutan ini, dan adalah aspek penting dari proses hukum. Pekerjaan yang ada fokus pada belajar representation sisi biaya dengan memmodelir hubungan antara biaya, tetapi tidak banyak usaha telah dilakukan untuk meningkatkan representation sisi fakta. Kami memperhatikan bahwa hanya sedikit kalimat dalam fakta sebenarnya menunjukkan tuduhan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dengan menggunakan subset fakta yang sangat kecil ( 3%) deskripsi yang anotasi dengan biaya tingkat kalimat, kita dapat mencapai peningkatan di seluruh jangkauan model ACI yang berbeda, dibandingkan dengan model hanya tugas tingkat dokumen utama pada set data yang jauh lebih besar. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan model baru yang menggunakan label muatan tingkat kalimat sebagai tugas bantuan, ditambah dengan tugas utama identifikasi muatan tingkat dokumen dalam rangka belajar multi-tugas. Model yang diusulkan secara keseluruhan melebihi jumlah besar garis dasar baru-baru ini untuk ACI. Perbaikan dalam prestasi khusus terlihat untuk tuntutan langka yang dikenal khusus mencabar untuk mengidentifikasi.', 'de': 'Automatische Charge Identification (ACI) ist die Aufgabe, die relevanten Gebühren unter Berücksichtigung der Tatsachen einer Situation und der gesetzlichen Gesetze, die diese Gebühren definieren, zu identifizieren und ist ein entscheidender Aspekt des gerichtlichen Prozesses. Bestehende Arbeiten konzentrieren sich auf das Erlernen von ladungsseitigen Darstellungen durch Modellierung von Beziehungen zwischen den Ladungen, aber es wurde nicht viel Aufwand unternommen, um faktenseitige Darstellungen zu verbessern. Wir beobachten, dass nur ein kleiner Bruchteil der Sätze in den Tatsachen tatsächlich die Anklage anzeigt. Wir zeigen, dass wir durch die Verwendung einer sehr kleinen Teilmenge von Faktenbeschreibungen mit Anmerkungen auf Satzlebene eine Verbesserung über eine Reihe verschiedener ACI-Modelle erreichen können, im Vergleich zur Modellierung nur der Hauptaufgabe auf Dokumentenebene auf einem viel größeren Datensatz. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir ein neuartiges Modell vor, das Ladungsetiketten auf Satzlebene als Hilfsaufgabe verwendet, gekoppelt mit der Hauptaufgabe der Ladungsidentifikation auf Dokumentenebene in einem Multi-Task-Lernframework. Das vorgeschlagene Modell übertrifft eine große Anzahl aktueller Basislinien für ACI umfassend. Die Leistungssteigerung macht sich besonders bei den seltenen Ladungen bemerkbar, die als besonders schwierig zu identifizieren sind.', 'ko': '자동 고발 식별(ACI)의 임무는 상황의 사실과 이를 정의하는 성문법에 따라 관련 고발을 식별하는 것이 사법 절차의 관건적인 부분이다.기존의 연구는 아날로그 전하 간의 관계를 통해 전하단 표징을 배우는 데 중심을 두었지만 사실단 표징을 개선하는 데는 많은 노력을 하지 않았다.우리는 사실상 고소를 표명한 문장의 일부분만 관찰했다.우리는 더 큰 데이터 집합에서 주요 문서급 작업 모델링만 하는 것보다 문장급 비용 주석이 있는 사실 묘사가 있는 아주 작은 서브집합(3%)을 사용하면 일련의 서로 다른 ACI모델에서 개선할 수 있음을 나타낸다.그 밖에 우리는 새로운 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 문장급 비용 라벨을 보조 임무로 하고 다중 임무 학습 구조에서 문서급 비용 식별의 주요 임무를 결합시킨다.이 모델의 종합 성능은 최근 ACI의 많은 베이스라인보다 우수합니다.특히 식별하기 어려운 희귀 전하로 알려진 성능 개선은 특히 뚜렷하다.', 'sw': 'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) is the task of identifying the relevant charges given the facts of a situation and the statutory laws that define these charges, and is a crucial aspect of the judicial process.  Kazi zilizopo zinalenga kujifunza uwakilishi wa mashabiki kwa kuunda mahusiano kati ya mashitaka hayo, lakini hakuna juhudi kubwa katika kuboresha uwakilishi wa ukweli. Tunaona kuwa sehemu ndogo tu ya hukumu katika ukweli unaonyesha mashitaka hayo. Tunaonyesha kwamba kwa kutumia viungo vidogo (asilimia 3) vya ukweli vinavyoelezwa na mashitaka ya kiwango cha hukumu, tunaweza kupata maboresho katika maeneo mbalimbali ya mifano ya ACI, kama ilivyolinganisha na kutengeneza jukumu la kiwango kikuu la nyaraka kwenye seti kubwa zaidi ya data. Kwa nyongeza, tunapendekeza muundo wa riwaya unaotumia alama za mashitaka ya kiwango cha sentence kama juhudi la ushirikiano, ikiwa ni pamoja na kazi kuu ya utambulisho wa mashitaka ya dokumentari katika mfumo wa kujifunza kazi nyingi. Mfano wa pendekezo unaonyesha mistari mengi ya hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya ACI. Maboresho ya utendaji ni ya kutambuliwa hasa kwa mashitaka nadra ambayo yanafahamika kuwa ni changamoto hasa ya kutambua.', 'tr': 'Otomatik Charge Kimlik (ACI) şu suçlamalary tespit eden möhüm soraglary tespit etmek üçin görevidir. Bu soraglary tespit eden kanunlar we adalat prosesiniň has möhüm aspektidir. Öň bar işleriň suçlamalar arasyndaky ilişkileri modelleýän öwrenmelerine üns berilýär, ýöne aslyndaky suratlary gowulaşdyrmak üçin kän çaba ýok edilmedi. Biz sözlerin bir bölegi hakykatdanam günahlary görkezýäris diňe garaşýarys. Biz sözlem derejesinde ýazylan ufak bir toparyň ( 3%) ullanyp görkezilýän hasaplamalaryň üstünde birnäçe dürli ACI modellerinden gelişmegi başaryp bileris, diňe esasy sened derejesinde birnäçe uly terjime eden hasaplamalaryň derejesi ýaly. Hemmäpli, biz sözlem derejesi taýýarlama etiketlerini kömek taýýarlayan bir roman nusgasyny teklip edip, birnäçe-täbli öwrenme çerçevesinde sened sevijesi taýýarlamanyň esasy zadyny bilen birleştirip barýarys. Mazmunlar nusgasy ACI üçin gaty bir topar üýtgedir. Görniş etmäniň gelişmesi aňsatlyk bilen tanyşdyrmak üçin aňsat täsirli täsirli täsirler üçin aňsatlyk bar.', 'af': "Outomatiese Laaiïdentifikasie (ACI) is die taak van identifiseer van die relevante gelades wat gegee is die fakte van 'n situasie en die wette wat hierdie gelades definieer, en is 'n kruisbare aspek van die regverdige proses. Die bestaande werke fokus op die leer van die laai-kant voorstellings deur die modellering van verhoudinge tussen die laai, maar nie baie versoek is gemaak in die verbetering van feit-kant voorstellings. Ons observeer dat slegs 'n klein breuk van setnings in die fakte eintlik die gelades indiek. Ons wys dat deur gebruik van 'n baie klein subartikel ( 3%) van feit beskrywings aangeteken met sentence-vlak gelades, ons kan 'n verbetering tot 'n reek van verskillende AKI modele bereik, as vergelyk tot modellering net die hoofde dokumentvlak taak op 'n baie groter datastel. In addition, we propose a novel model that utilizes sentence-level charge labels as an auxiliary task, combined with the main task of document-level charge identification in a multi-task learning framework. Die voorgestelde model is kompleks uitgevoer 'n groot aantal nuutste basisline vir ACI. Die verbetering in prestasie is besonderlik aanmerkbaar vir die selfde gelades wat bekend is besonderlik moeilik om te identifiseer.", 'sq': 'Identifikimi automatik i akuzave (ACI) është detyra e identifikimit të akuzave të rëndësishme duke marrë parasysh faktet e një gjendjeje dhe ligjet statutore që përcaktojnë këto akuza dhe është një aspekt vendimtar i procesit gjyqësor. Punët ekzistuese përqëndrohen në mësimin e përfaqësimeve nga ana e akuzave duke modeluar marrëdhëniet midis akuzave, por nuk është bërë shumë përpjekje në përmirësimin e përfaqësimeve nga ana e fakteve. Ne vëzhgojmë se vetëm një pjesë e vogël e fjalëve në fakte tregon akuzat. Ne tregojmë se duke përdorur një nëngrup shumë të vogël ( 3%) të përshkrimeve të fakteve të anotuar me akuza të nivelit të fjalëve, ne mund të arrijmë një përmirësim në një gamë modelesh të ndryshëm ACI, krahasuar me modelimin e vetëm detyrës kryesore të nivelit të dokumentit në një grup shumë më të madh të të dhënash. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një model të ri që përdorë etiketat e ngarkimit të nivelit të fjalëve si një detyrë ndihmëse, të bashkuar me detyrën kryesore të identifikimit të ngarkimit të nivelit të dokumentit në një kuadër mësimi me shumë detyra. Modeli i propozuar përfshin plotësisht një numër të madh linjash bazë të fundit për ACI. Përmirësimi në performancë është veçanërisht i dukshëm për akuzat e rralla që janë të njohura të jenë veçanërisht të vështira për të identifikuar.', 'fa': 'شناسایی تاخیر خودکار (ACI) وظیفه شناسایی اتهام مربوط به حقیقت موقعیت و قوانین قانونی که این اتهام را تعریف می\u200cکنند و یک نقطه مهمی از فرایند دادگاهی است. کارهای موجود روی نمایش\u200cهایی از طرف بار یادگیری با نمونه\u200cسازی رابطه بین بار\u200cها تمرکز می\u200cکند، ولی تلاش زیادی در بهتر نمایش\u200cهایی از طرف حقیقت انجام نشده است. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که فقط یک قسمت کوچک از جمله\u200cها در حقیقت تاوان را نشان می\u200cدهد. ما نشان می دهیم که با استفاده از یک زیرزمین کوچک (۳%) از توضیح\u200cهای حقیقی که با بارهای سطح جمله\u200cها مشخص شده\u200cاند، می\u200cتوانیم در یک سری مدل\u200cهای ACI متفاوت بهبود برسونیم، در مقایسه با مدل\u200cسازی فقط کار سطح سند اصلی در یک مجموع داده\u200cهای بسیار بزرگ. به اضافه، ما یک مدل نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از نقاشی\u200cهای بار سطح جمله\u200cها به عنوان یک کار کمک استفاده می\u200cکند، همراه با وظیفه اصلی شناسایی بار سطح سند در یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها مدل پیشنهاد کاملاً بیشتر از تعداد زیادی از خطوط بنیادی اخیر برای ACI انجام می دهد. توسعه عملکرد مخصوصاً مشاهده\u200cای برای اتهام نادر است که می\u200cدانند مخصوصاً مشکل شناسایی هستند.', 'am': 'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) is the task of identifying the relevant charges given the facts of a situation and the statutory laws that define these charges, and is a crucial aspect of the judicial process.  የአሁኑ ሥራ በክስሶቹ መካከል ግንኙነት በማስተማርና የሸክም ግንኙነት በማስተማር ላይ ትኩረት ነው፤ ነገር ግን የእውነት-side መልዕክቶች በማሻሻል ብዙ ድጋፍ አልደረሰም፡፡ ከውነቱ ጥቂት የፍርድ ክስ ብቻ መሆኑን እናየዋለን፡፡ በክፍለ ደረጃ ክስ በተለየ ውይይት (3 በመቶ) የተለየ ትንሽ (3 በመቶ) ትክክለኛዎችን በመጠቀም እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተለየ የACI ዓይነቶች በተለየ ትልቁ የሥልጣን ሰነድ-ደረጃ ስራ በተደረገው እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሥርዓት-ደረጃ charge ምልክቶችን እንደ ተጨማሪ ስራ የሚጠቅመውን አዲስ ዶላር እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በአካባቢው የቅርብ የመጀመሪያው የአካል ደረጃዎች በሙሉ ያሳያል፡፡ የሥርዓት ማድረግ በተለየ ትንሽ ክስ ለማግኘት የሚታወቁት አካባቢ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চার্জ পরিচয়পত্র (ACI) হচ্ছে একটি পরিস্থিতি এবং আইনী আইনের তথ্য যা এই অভিযোগের সুনির্দিষ্ট করা হয়েছে তা পরিচয় করার কাজ এবং বিচার প্রক্রিয়া অভিযোগের মধ্যে মোডেলিং সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে বিদ্যমান চার্জ-পাশের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা দিয়ে বিদ্যমান কাজের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে,  আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে সত্যিকারে বাস্তবতার একটু সংখ্যা শুধুমাত্র অভিযোগ নির্দেশ করছে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কারাদণ্ড-স্তরের অভিযোগে ব্যাখ্যা করা একটি খুব ছোট (৩%) বাস্তবতা ব্যবহার করে আমরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের ACI মডেলের মাধ্যমে উন্নতি পেতে পারি, যেখানে আমরা বেশী ব এছাড়াও আমরা একটি নোভেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা বাক্য-স্তরের চার্জ ট্যাবেল ব্যবহার করে অনুগ্রহের ক্ষেত্রে ডকুমেন্ট-পর্যায়ের চার্ড চিহ্নের প্রধান কা প্রস্তাবিত মডেল সম্পূর্ণ ভাবে ACI-এর জন্য সাম্প্রতিক সংখ্যার বেসাইন প্রদর্শন করে। প্রদর্শনের উন্নয়ন বিশেষ করে দেখা যাচ্ছে বিশেষ করে দুর্লম্ব অভিযোগের জন্য যারা বিশেষ করে চ্যালেঞ্জের চ্যালে', 'hy': 'Automatic Charge Identification (ACI) is the task of identifying the relevant charges given the facts of a situation and the statutory laws that define these charges, and is a crucial aspect of the judicial process.  Գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքները կենտրոնանում են վճարի կողմից ներկայացված ուսումնասիրության վրա՝ վճարի միջև հարաբերությունների մոդելավորման միջոցով, բայց ոչ շատ ջանքեր են արվել փաստերի կողմից ներկայացված ներկայացումների բարելավման համար Մենք նկատում ենք, որ փաստերի մեջ միայն մի փոքրիկ նախադասությունների մասը ցույց է տալիս մեղադրանքները: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ օգտագործելով նախադասության մակարդակի մեջ գրված փաստացի նկարագրությունների շատ փոքր ենթախումբ (3 տոկոս), մենք կարող ենք բարելավել տարբեր ACI մոդելների շրջանակներում, համեմատելով փաստաթղթի մակարդակի հիմնական խնդիրը շատ ավելի մեծ տվյալների խումբում: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոդել, որը օգտագործում է նախադասության մակարդակի բեռնման պիտակները որպես օգնական խնդիր, միասին փաստաթղթի մակարդակի բեռնման հայտնաբերման հիմնական խնդիրը բազմախնդիր սովորելու շրջանակում: The proposed model comprehensively outperforms a large number of recent baselines for ACI.  Արդյունքի բարելավումը հատկապես նկարագրելի է հազվադեպ մեղադրանքների համար, որոնք հատկապես դժվար են բացահայտել:', 'az': 'Bu suçları təsdiqləyən və təsdiqləyən qanunların əlaqəsiz suçları təsdiqlənmək məqsədilə təsdiqlənmək məqsədilədir. Bütün işlər yüklərin arasındakı ilişkileri modelləşdirməklə öyrənməyə başlayır, amma fakt tərəfindən təsirlərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün çox çabalar deyildir. Biz gördük ki, faktlarda yalnız kiçik cümlələrin bir parçası yüklərini göstərir. Biz göstəririk ki, cümlələr-səviyyə yükləri ilə bildirilmiş çox kiçik bir subgrup ( 3%) istifadə edərək, çox böyük bir veri qurmasında başqa bir dəyişiklik ACI modellərində daha yaxşılaşdıra bilərik. Əksinə, biz bir yeni modeli təklif edirik ki, cümlələr-seviyyəti yük etiketlərini çoxlu iş öyrənməsi fərqləməsində belə istifadə edir. Təksihət modeli çox yeni ACI üçün çox səviyyəni artırar. Müvəffəqiyyətlərin yaxşılaşdırması özlərinə tanıtmaq üçün bəzi yüklərə görə münasibdir.', 'ca': "La identificació automàtica de càrregues (ACI) és la tasca d'identificar les càrregues pertinents tenint en compte els fets d'una situació i les lleis legals que defineixen aquestes càrregues, i és un aspecte crucial del procés judicial. Les obres existents es centren en l'aprenentatge de representacions de càrrega modelant les relacions entre càrregues, però no s'ha fet gaire esforç per millorar les representacions de càrrega. Observem que només una petita fracció de frases en els fets indica els càrrecs. Mostrem que utilitzant un petit subconjunt (3%) de descripcions de fets anotats amb càrregues de nivell de frases, podem aconseguir una millora a través d'una gama de diferents models ACI, comparat amb modelar només la tasca principal a nivell de documents en un conjunt de dades molt més gran. A més, proposem un nou model que utilitza etiquetes de càrrega a nivell de frases com a tasca auxiliar, juntament amb la tasca principal d'identificació de càrrega a nivell de document en un marc d'aprenentatge multitasca. El model proposat supera globalment un gran nombre de línies de base recents per a l'ACI. La millora del rendiment és particularment notable per a les càrregues rares que es coneix que són especialment difícils d'identificar.", 'cs': 'Automatická identifikace poplatků (ACI) je úkolem identifikace příslušných poplatků vzhledem ke skutečnosti situace a zákonným zákonům, které tyto poplatky definují, a je klíčovým aspektem soudního řízení. Stávající práce se zaměřují na učení se reprezentací na straně náboje modelováním vztahů mezi náboji, ale nebylo vynaloženo mnoho úsilí o zlepšení reprezentace na straně faktů. Pozorujeme, že jen malý zlomek trestů ve skutečnosti ukazuje na obvinění. Ukazujeme, že použitím velmi malé podmnožiny popisů faktů anotovaných poplatky na úrovni věty můžeme dosáhnout zlepšení napříč řadou různých modelů ACI ve srovnání s modelováním pouze hlavního úkolu na úrovni dokumentu na mnohem větší sadě dat. Navíc navrhujeme nový model, který využívá označení poplatků na úrovni věty jako pomocný úkol spojený s hlavním úkolem identifikace poplatků na úrovni dokumentů v rámci víceúkolového učení. Navržený model komplexně překonává velké množství nedávných základních linek pro ACI. Zlepšení výkonu je zvláště patrné u vzácných nábojů, o nichž je známo, že je obzvláště náročné identifikovat.', 'bs': 'Automatska identifikacija optužbe (ACI) je zadatak identifikacije relevantnih optužbi s obzirom na činjenice situacije i zakona o zakonima koji definiraju te optužbe, i to je ključni aspekt sudskog procesa. Postojeći radovi se fokusiraju na predstavljanje optužbe na strani učenja modeliranjem odnosa između optužbi, ali nije naporan mnogo truda u poboljšanju predstavljanja na strani činjenica. Primijetimo da samo mali dio rečenica u činjenicama pokazuje optužbe. Pokazujemo da koristeći veoma mali podsekt (3%) opisa činjenica navedenih optužbama na nivou kazne, možemo postići poboljšanje u razini različitih modela ACI, u usporedbi s modelima samo glavnog zadatka na nivou dokumenta na mnogo većem setu podataka. Osim toga, predlažemo novi model koji koristi etikete optužbe na nivou kazne kao pomoćni zadatak, povezan s glavnim zadatak identifikacije optužbe na nivou dokumenta u multi task učenjskom okviru. Predloženi model sveobuhvatno iznosi veliki broj nedavnih osnovnih linija za ACI. Poboljšanje provedbe je posebno primjetljivo za rijetke optužbe koje se poznaju posebno izazovnim za identifikaciju.', 'et': 'Automaatne tasude identifitseerimine (ACI) on asjakohaste süüdistuste tuvastamise ülesanne, arvestades olukorra fakte ja seadusandlikke õigusakte, millega need süüdistused määratletakse, ning on kohtumenetluse oluline aspekt. Olemasolevad tööd keskenduvad laengupoole esituste õppimisele, modelleerides laengute vahelisi suhteid, kuid faktidepoole esituste parandamiseks ei ole tehtud palju jõupingutusi. Me täheldame, et vaid väike osa lausetest faktides viitab tegelikult süüdistustele. Näitame, et kasutades väga väikest alamhulka (3%) faktikirjeldustest, mis on märgitud lausetaseme süüdistustega, saame saavutada täiustuse erinevate ACI mudelite puhul, võrreldes lihtsalt peamise dokumenditaseme ülesande modelleerimisega palju suurema andmekogumi puhul. Lisaks pakume välja uuendusliku mudeli, mis kasutab lisaülesandena lausetaseme laadimismärke koos dokumenditaseme laadimise tuvastamise põhiülesandega mitmeülesandelises õpperaamistikus. Kavandatud mudel on ulatuslikult suurem kui paljud hiljutised ACI lähtetasemed. Tõhususe paranemine on eriti märgatav haruldaste tasude puhul, mida on teadaolevalt eriti keeruline tuvastada.', 'fi': 'Automaattinen maksujen tunnistus (ACI) on tehtävä tunnistaa asiaankuuluvat syytteet ottaen huomioon tilanteen tosiasiat ja lakisääteiset lait, jotka määrittävät nämä syytteet, ja se on olennainen osa oikeusprosessia. Olemassa olevat teokset keskittyvät latauspuolen representaatioiden oppimiseen mallintamalla latausten välisiä suhteita, mutta tosiasiapuolen representaatioiden parantamiseen ei ole juurikaan panostettu. Huomautamme, että vain pieni murto-osa tosiseikkojen tuomioista osoittaa syytteet. Osoitamme, että käyttämällä hyvin pientä (3%) tosiasiakuvausten osajoukkoa, johon on lisätty lausetason syytteitä, voimme saavuttaa parannuksen useissa eri ACI-malleissa verrattuna pelkästään dokumenttitason tärkeimpien tehtävien mallintamiseen paljon suuremmassa aineistossa. Lisäksi ehdotamme uudenlaista mallia, joka hyödyntää lausetason latausmerkintöjä aputehtävässä yhdistettynä dokumenttitason latauksen tunnistamisen päätehtävään monitehtäväoppimisessa. Ehdotettu malli on kattavasti parempi kuin monet viimeaikaiset ACI-kriteerit. Suorituskyvyn paraneminen on erityisen havaittavissa harvinaisten maksujen vuoksi, joiden tiedetään olevan erityisen haastavia tunnistaa.', 'sk': 'Avtomatska identifikacija stroškov (ACI) je naloga ugotavljanja ustreznih obtožb glede na dejstva situacije in zakonske zakone, ki opredeljujejo te obtožbe, in je ključni vidik sodnega postopka. Obstoječa dela se osredotočajo na učenje reprezentacij na strani naboja z modeliranjem razmerij med naboji, vendar ni bilo veliko truda za izboljšanje reprezentacij na strani dejstev. Ugotavljamo, da le majhen del stavkov v dejstvih dejansko kaže na obtožbe. Pokazali smo, da lahko z uporabo zelo majhne podmnožice (3%) opisov dejstev z oznakami na ravni stavka dosežemo izboljšanje v različnih modelih ACI v primerjavi z modeliranjem samo glavne naloge na ravni dokumenta na veliko večjem naboru podatkov. Poleg tega predlagamo nov model, ki kot pomožno nalogo uporablja oznake nabojev stavka, skupaj z glavno nalogo identifikacije nabojev na ravni dokumenta v okviru večopravilnega učenja. Predlagani model celovito presega veliko število nedavnih izhodišč za ACI. Izboljšanje učinkovitosti je še posebej opazno zaradi redkih stroškov, za katere je znano, da jih je še posebej težko prepoznati.', 'he': 'זיהוי האישום האוטומטי (ACI) הוא המשימה לזהות את האישומים הרלוונטיים בהתחשב בעובדות מצב וחוקי החוק שמגדרים את האישומים האלה, והוא חלק קריטי של תהליך המשפטי. עבודות קיימות מתמקדות על לימוד מייצגים בצד האשמה על ידי דוגמנית מערכות יחסים בין האשמות, אבל לא הרבה מאמץ נעשה בשיפור מייצגים בצד העובדות. אנו רואים שרק חלק קטן משפטים בעובדות מצביע על האשמות. אנו מראים כי על ידי השימוש בספורט קטן מאוד ( 3%) של תיאורים עובדות שנעטפו באשמות רמת המשפטים, אנחנו יכולים להשיג שיפור ברחבי מגוון של דוגמנים ACI שונים, בהשוואה לדוגמנים רק משימה רמת המסמכים הראשית על קבוצת נתונים הרבה יותר גדולה. בנוסף, אנו מציעים מודל חדש שמשתמש בתוויות חיבוק רמת המשפטים כמשימה עזרית, במשותף למשימה העיקרית של זיהוי חיבוק רמת המסמכים במסגרת לימוד רב משימות. המודל המוצע מגביר באופן כללי מספר גדול של קווי בסיס לאחרונה עבור ACI. שיפור ביצועים מופיע במיוחד עבור האישומים הנדרדים שהם ידועים להיות מאתגרים במיוחד לזהות.', 'ha': "Shaidar Jayyar Farawa na farat ɗaya (AI) yana da aikin ka gane masu husũma a bayan masu gaskiyar a cikin halin da sharciyar da za'a bayyana wannan tugada, kuma yana da muhimu ga aikin mahakamar. Yin aiki da ke gaba yana fokus a kan karatun masu tsarin masu tsari da kuma ana sami danganta a tsakanin mashukin, kuma amma ba a aikata aikin ƙwarai da wakilishi-side gaskiya. Muna ganin cewa kaɗan daga matsayin da ke cikin gaskiya yana gaya mashtaka. Tuna nũna cewa, da amfani da misalin takardar aiki mai ƙarami (3%) da aka sanar da shi ga masharrar-daraja, za'a iya sami gyãra a cikin wasu misãlai masu cikin shirin AI-daban, kamar misalin ka sami-motsi kawai ga aikin takardar-daraja na girma a kan zane-zane-zane. Additionally, we propose a novel model that utilizes sentence-level charge labels as an auxiliary task, coupled with the main task of document-level charge identification in a multi-task learning framework.  @ info: whatsthis Bayyarin performanci na ƙayyade mafiya sauki da aka gane su a kan gane su masu hususann a gane su.", 'jv': 'Automatically Lo nganggo cah-cah sing paling dong nêmên langgambar apa gambar cara-cara Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh durung-akeh mburu kuwi tindah kuwi nggawe barang Awak dhéwé éngawe ngubah akeh menyang sampeyan (3 %) sing paling nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas-kaling, kita iso dianggap banjuré sistem sing perusahaan karo model sing di alam sing paling-perusahaan, dadine nyong padang tengahan dumadhi model dumadhi akhir barang dumadhi ditambah akeh dumadhi. Additionly, we proposal a new model that used the words-evel char label as an help task, together with the primary task of document-evel char ID in a multi-task Learning frame. model sing dibutuhke Awak dhéwé éntuk kanggo nggawe sawar kuwi dianggap kanggo kelas kuwi butuh tentang kanggo dianggap sing gak bênêr dilakon kanggo ngilangno.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ངོས་འཛིན་སྟོན་པ(ACI) ནི་ཁྲིམས་ལུགས་ཀྱི་འཇུག་ལས་གལ་ཆེན་དག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་དགོས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་སྲོལ་རྗེས་འདི་དག་ Existing works focused on learning charge-side representations by modeling the relationships between the charges, but not much of effort has been made in improving the fact-side representations. ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚོའི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ཆུང་གཅིག་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་འདོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ན། Additionally, we propose a novel model that utilizes sentence-level charge labels as an auxiliary task, coupled with the main task of document-level charge identification in a multi-task learning framework. གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབུགས་དེ་གིས་ACI ལ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་གཞི་རྩིས་ཆེ་ཤིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་གྱི་ལས་འཕར་རིས་གཞན་ལས་ཕར་རིས་གཞན་ལས་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པར་མཐོང་ཆོས་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Context-Aware Text Normalisation for Historical Dialects', 'ar': 'تطبيع النص الواعي بالسياق لللهجات التاريخية', 'pt': 'Normalização de texto sensível ao contexto para dialetos históricos', 'fr': 'Normalisation de texte sensible au contexte pour les dialectes historiques', 'es': 'Normalización de textos sensible al contexto para dialectos históricos', 'ja': '歴史的な方言の文脈認識テキストの正規化', 'zh': '方言之上下文感知文本规范化', 'hi': 'ऐतिहासिक बोलियों के लिए संदर्भ-जागरूक पाठ सामान्यीकरण', 'ru': 'Контекстно-зависимая нормализация текста для исторических диалектов', 'ga': 'Normalú Téacs atá Feasach ar Chomhthéacs le haghaidh Canúintí Stairiúla', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Κανονικοποίηση κειμένου με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος για ιστορικούς διαλέκτες', 'hu': 'Környezettudatos szövegnormalizálás történelmi tárcsákhoz', 'kk': 'Журналды диалогтар үшін контексті таңдау мәтін нормализациясы', 'it': 'Normalizzazione del testo consapevole del contesto per i dialetti storici', 'lt': 'Comment', 'mk': 'Нормализација на текстот свесен за контекст за историски дијалекти', 'ml': 'ചരിത്രത്തിലുള്ള ഡയലക്ടറുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പദാവലിയുടെ സാധാരണ', 'ms': 'Normalisasi Teks Sedia-Konteks untuk Dialeksi Sejarah', 'mt': 'Normalizzazzjoni tat-test konxju tal-kuntest għad-Dijaletti Storiċi', 'mn': 'Түүхэн диалогуудын төлөвлөгөө-мэдээлэл текст нормализацийг', 'no': 'Normalisering av tekst for historiske dialogvindauge', 'ro': 'Normalizarea textului conștient de context pentru dialectele istorice', 'pl': 'Kontekstowa normalizacja tekstu dla dialektów historycznych', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධතාව- දැනගැනීම් පාළුව සාමාන්\u200dය සංවේදනය', 'sr': 'Normalizacija teksta za istorijske dijalekte', 'so': 'Text Normalisation for Historical Dialects', 'sv': 'Kontextmedveten textnormalisering för historiska dialekter', 'ta': 'வரலாற்று உரையாடலுக்கான உள்ளடக்கம் அறியப்பட்ட உரை சீராக்கம்', 'ur': 'تاریخی ڈیلٹ کے لئے کنٹکس-Aware Text Normalization', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tính giá trị văn bản', 'da': 'Kontekstbevidst tekstnormalisering for historiske dialekter', 'nl': 'Contextbewuste tekstnormalisatie voor historische dialecten', 'bg': 'Нормализиране на текста за исторически диалекти', 'hr': 'Normalizacija teksta za povijesne dijalekte', 'de': 'Kontextbasierte Textnormalisierung für historische Dialekte', 'id': 'Context-Aware Text Normalisation for Historical Dialects', 'ko': '역사 방언의 상하문 감지 텍스트 규범화', 'fa': 'نمایش متن آگاهی متن برای انتخاب تاریخی', 'sw': 'Udhalilishaji wa Maandishi ya Kitaarifa', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Geçmiş Dialeksy üçin Mazmunlar', 'sq': 'Normalizimi i tekstit të njohur në kontekst për dialektet historike', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'tab-style', 'az': 'Tarihi Dialektlar üçün Context-Aware Metin Normalizatı', 'bn': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Normalizacija teksta za istorijske dijalekte', 'cs': 'Kontextová normalizace textu pro historické dialekty', 'et': 'Ajalooliste dialektide kontekstiteadlik teksti normaliseerimine', 'ca': 'Normalització del text conscient del contest per a les diàlectes històriques', 'fi': 'Historiallisten puhelujen kontekstitietoinen tekstin normalisointi', 'jv': 'context-Awake', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Normalizacija besedila glede na kontekst za zgodovinske klice', 'he': 'נורמליזציה טקסטית מודעת לקונקסט עבור דיאלקטים היסטוריים', 'bo': 'Context-Aware Text Normalisation for Historical Dialects'}
{'en': 'Context-aware historical text normalisation is a severely under-researched area. To fill the gap we propose a context-aware normalisation approach that relies on the state-of-the-art methods in neural machine translation and transfer learning. We propose a multidialect normaliser with a context-aware reranking of the candidates. The reranker relies on a word-level n-gram language model that is applied to the five best normalisation candidates. The results are evaluated on the historical multidialect datasets of German, Spanish, Portuguese and Slovene. We show that incorporating dialectal information into the training leads to an accuracy improvement on all the datasets. The context-aware reranking gives further improvement over the baseline. For three out of six datasets, we reach a significantly higher accuracy than reported in the previous studies. The other three results are comparable with the current state-of-the-art. The code for the reranker is published as open-source.', 'ar': 'يعتبر تطبيع النص التاريخي الواعي بالسياق منطقة لا تخضع للبحث بشكل كبير. لسد الفجوة ، نقترح نهج تطبيع واعي بالسياق يعتمد على أحدث الأساليب في الترجمة الآلية العصبية ونقل التعلم. نقترح مطيعًا متعدد الجوانب مع إعادة تنظيم مع مراعاة السياق للمرشحين. يعتمد Reranker على نموذج لغة n-gram على مستوى الكلمة والذي يتم تطبيقه على أفضل خمسة مرشحين للتطبيع. تم تقييم النتائج على أساس مجموعات البيانات التاريخية متعددة الجوانب للألمانية والإسبانية والبرتغالية والسلوفينية. نظهر أن دمج المعلومات اللهجة في التدريب يؤدي إلى تحسين الدقة في جميع مجموعات البيانات. يوفر إعادة التصنيف مع مراعاة السياق مزيدًا من التحسينات على خط الأساس. لثلاث مجموعات بيانات من أصل ست ، نصل إلى دقة أعلى بكثير مما ورد في الدراسات السابقة. النتائج الثلاثة الأخرى قابلة للمقارنة مع الحالة الحالية من الفن. تم نشر رمز reranker كمصدر مفتوح.', 'pt': 'A normalização de texto histórico sensível ao contexto é uma área severamente pouco pesquisada. Para preencher a lacuna, propomos uma abordagem de normalização sensível ao contexto que se baseia nos métodos de última geração em tradução automática neural e aprendizado de transferência. Propomos um normalizador multidialeto com uma reclassificação contextual dos candidatos. O reclassificador conta com um modelo de linguagem n-gram em nível de palavra que é aplicado aos cinco melhores candidatos à normalização. Os resultados são avaliados nos conjuntos de dados históricos multidialetos de alemão, espanhol, português e esloveno. Mostramos que a incorporação de informações dialetais no treinamento leva a uma melhoria da precisão em todos os conjuntos de dados. A reclassificação sensível ao contexto oferece melhorias adicionais em relação à linha de base. Para três dos seis conjuntos de dados, alcançamos uma precisão significativamente maior do que a relatada nos estudos anteriores. Os outros três resultados são comparáveis com o estado da arte atual. O código para o reranker é publicado como código aberto.', 'es': 'La normalización de textos históricos sensible al contexto es un área muy poco investigada. Para llenar este vacío, proponemos un enfoque de normalización sensible al contexto que se basa en los métodos más avanzados de traducción automática neuronal y aprendizaje por transferencia. Proponemos un normalizador multidialecto con una reorganización de los candidatos sensible al contexto. El reclasificador se basa en un modelo de lenguaje n-gram a nivel de palabras que se aplica a los cinco mejores candidatos de normalización. Los resultados se evalúan en los conjuntos de datos históricos multidialectales del alemán, el español, el portugués y el esloveno. Demostramos que la incorporación de información dialectal en el entrenamiento conduce a una mejora de la precisión en todos los conjuntos de datos. El cambio de clasificación sensible al contexto proporciona una mejora adicional con respecto a la línea de base. Para tres de los seis conjuntos de datos, alcanzamos una precisión significativamente mayor que la informada en los estudios anteriores. Los otros tres resultados son comparables con el estado actual de la técnica. El código del reclasificador se publica como código abierto.', 'fr': "La normalisation de textes historiques tenant compte du contexte est un domaine largement sous-étudié. Pour combler cette lacune, nous proposons une approche de normalisation sensible au contexte qui repose sur les méthodes de pointe en matière de traduction automatique neuronale et d'apprentissage par transfert. Nous proposons un normaliseur multidialectal avec un reclassement sensible au contexte des candidats. Le reclassement repose sur un modèle de langage n-gram au niveau du mot qui est appliqué aux cinq meilleurs candidats à la normalisation. Les résultats sont évalués sur les ensembles de données multidialectes historiques de l'allemand, de l'espagnol, du portugais et du slovène. Nous montrons que l'intégration d'informations dialectales dans la formation permet d'améliorer la précision de tous les ensembles de données. Le nouveau classement sensible au contexte apporte une amélioration supplémentaire par rapport à la base de référence. Pour trois ensembles de données sur six, nous atteignons une précision nettement supérieure à celle rapportée dans les études précédentes. Les trois autres résultats sont comparables à ceux de l'état actuel de la technique. Le code du reranker est publié en tant que code source ouvert.", 'zh': '上下文所感规范化一大究不足之域也。 补此空白,上下文知规范化法,赖神经机器翻译迁学之最先进者。 多方言规范化器,上下文识重排名。 重排者赖五最佳规范化候选者单词级n-gram言模形。 德语、西班牙语、葡萄牙语、斯洛文尼亚语之史,多方言数集上而质之。 明纳方言信息训练,以崇数集之准确性。 上下文感者复排名比基线有更进者。 其六集之三,吾准确性明高于前言之准确性。 其三者,与最先进相当。 复排名器代码以开源文行。', 'hi': 'संदर्भ-जागरूक ऐतिहासिक पाठ सामान्यीकरण एक गंभीर रूप से कम शोधित क्षेत्र है। अंतर को भरने के लिए हम एक संदर्भ-जागरूक सामान्यीकरण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद और स्थानांतरण सीखने में अत्याधुनिक तरीकों पर निर्भर करता है। हम उम्मीदवारों के संदर्भ-जागरूक reranking के साथ एक multidialect normaliser का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। Reranker एक शब्द-स्तरीय n-ग्राम भाषा मॉडल पर निर्भर करता है जो पांच सर्वश्रेष्ठ सामान्यीकरण उम्मीदवारों पर लागू होता है। परिणामों का मूल्यांकन जर्मन, स्पेनिश, पुर्तगाली और स्लोवेन के ऐतिहासिक मल्टीडायलेक्ट डेटासेट पर किया जाता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रशिक्षण में बोलचाल की जानकारी को शामिल करने से सभी डेटासेट पर सटीकता में सुधार होता है। संदर्भ-जागरूक reranking आधार रेखा पर और सुधार देता है। छह डेटासेट में से तीन के लिए, हम पिछले अध्ययनों में रिपोर्ट की तुलना में काफी अधिक सटीकता तक पहुंचते हैं। अन्य तीन परिणाम वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक के साथ तुलनीय हैं। Reranker के लिए कोड ओपन-सोर्स के रूप में प्रकाशित किया गया है।', 'ru': 'Нормализация исторического текста с учетом контекста - это область, которая серьезно недооценена. Чтобы заполнить этот пробел, мы предлагаем подход к нормализации, основанный на понимании контекста, который опирается на современные методы в нейронном машинном переводе и обучении передаче. Мы предлагаем мультидиалектный нормализатор с контекстно-ориентированной перестановкой кандидатов. Ретранкер полагается на языковую модель n-грамм на уровне слова, которая применяется к пяти лучшим кандидатам на нормализацию. Результаты оцениваются по историческим мультидиалектным наборам данных немецкого, испанского, португальского и словенского языков. Мы показываем, что включение диалектической информации в обучение приводит к повышению точности всех наборов данных. Контекстно-ориентированная перегруппировка дает дальнейшее улучшение по сравнению с базовым уровнем. Для трех из шести наборов данных мы достигаем значительно более высокой точности, чем сообщалось в предыдущих исследованиях. Остальные три результата сопоставимы с текущим состоянием дел. Код для реранкера публикуется в формате open-source.', 'ja': '文脈認識の歴史的テキストの正規化は、研究不足が深刻な領域です。このギャップを埋めるために、私たちはニューラル機械翻訳と転送学習における最先端の方法に依存する文脈認識正規化アプローチを提案します。候補者のコンテキストを意識した再ランキングを備えた多方言正規化器を提案します。再ランカーは、5つの最良の正規化候補に適用される単語レベルのn - gram言語モデルに依存します。結果は、ドイツ語、スペイン語、ポルトガル語、スロベニア語の歴史的な多方言データセットで評価されます。方言情報をトレーニングに組み込むことは、すべてのデータセットの精度向上につながることを示しています。コンテキストを意識した再ランキングは、ベースラインよりもさらに改善されます。6つのデータセットのうち3つについては、以前の研究で報告されたよりも有意に高い精度に達しています。他の3つの結果は、現在の最先端のものと同等です。リランカーのコードはオープンソースとして公開されています。', 'ga': 'Is réimse tearc-thaighde é normalú téacs stairiúil atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs. Chun an bhearna a líonadh molaimid cur chuige normalaithe atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs a bhraitheann ar na modhanna úrscothacha maidir le haistriú meaisín néar agus foghlaim aistrithe. Molaimid normalaitheoir ilchanúnach a mbeidh athrangú feasach ar an gcomhthéacs aige ar na hiarrthóirí. Braitheann an t-athrangóir ar mhúnla teanga n-gram leibhéal focal a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar na cúig iarrthóirí normalaithe is fearr. Déantar na torthaí a mheas ar thacair sonraí ilchanúintí stairiúla na Gearmáine, na Spáinne, na Portaingéile agus na Slóivéine. Léirímid go dtiocfaidh feabhas ar chruinneas na dtacar sonraí go léir as ionchorprú faisnéis chanúintí san oiliúint. Tugann an t-athrangú atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs tuilleadh feabhais thar an mbunlíne. I gcás trí cinn as sé thacar sonraí, sroicheann muid cruinneas i bhfad níos airde ná mar a tuairiscíodh sna staidéir roimhe seo. Tá na trí thorthaí eile inchomparáide leis an staid reatha is déanaí. Foilsítear an cód don athrangóir mar fhoinse oscailte.', 'hu': 'A kontextustudatos történelmi szövegnormalizáció súlyosan alulkutatott terület. A hiány kitöltése érdekében egy kontextustudatos normalizációs megközelítést javasolunk, amely a neurális gépi fordítás és a transzfer tanulás korszerű módszereire támaszkodik. Javasolunk egy multidialektus normalizálót, amely a jelöltek kontextustudatos rangsorolásával rendelkezik. Az átrendező egy szószintű n-gramm nyelvi modellre támaszkodik, amelyet az öt legjobb normalizációs jelöltre alkalmaznak. Az eredményeket német, spanyol, portugál és szlovén történelmi multidialektus adathalmazokból értékeljük. Megmutatjuk, hogy a dialektuális információk beépítése a képzésbe való pontosság javításához vezet. A kontextustudatos átrendezés további javulást eredményez a kiindulási értékhez képest. Hat adatkészlet közül három esetében jelentősen nagyobb pontosságot érünk el, mint a korábbi vizsgálatokban jelentettek. A másik három eredmény összehasonlítható a jelenlegi korszerűséggel. Az átirányító kódja nyílt forráskódú.', 'el': 'Η εξομάλυνση ιστορικών κειμένων με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος είναι μια περιοχή που δεν έχει ερευνηθεί σοβαρά. Για να καλύψουμε το κενό προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση ομαλοποίησης με γνώμονα το περιβάλλον που βασίζεται στις σύγχρονες μεθόδους στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση και τη μάθηση μεταφοράς. Προτείνουμε έναν πολυδιαλεκτικό ομαλοποιητή με μια συνειδητή επανακατάταξη των υποψηφίων. Ο επανακριτής βασίζεται σε ένα μοντέλο γλώσσας σε επίπεδο λέξεων που εφαρμόζεται στους πέντε καλύτερους υποψηφίους ομαλοποίησης. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολογούνται στα ιστορικά πολυδιαλεκτικά σύνολα δεδομένων της γερμανικής, ισπανικής, πορτογαλικής και σλοβενικής. Δείχνουμε ότι η ενσωμάτωση διαλεκτικών πληροφοριών στην εκπαίδευση οδηγεί σε βελτίωση της ακρίβειας σε όλα τα σύνολα δεδομένων. Η επανακατάταξη βάσει του πλαισίου δίνει περαιτέρω βελτίωση έναντι της βάσης. Για τρία από τα έξι σύνολα δεδομένων, επιτυγχάνουμε μια σημαντικά υψηλότερη ακρίβεια από ό, τι αναφέρθηκε στις προηγούμενες μελέτες. Τα άλλα τρία αποτελέσματα είναι συγκρίσιμα με την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Ο κώδικας για την επανεκκίνηση δημοσιεύεται ως ανοιχτού κώδικα.', 'ka': 'კონტექსტის შესახებ ისტორიური ტექსტის ნორმალიზაცია ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენებული არხი. ჩვენ კონტექსტური ნორმალიზაციის მიღება, რომელიც დარწმუნება ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაში და გაგრძელებაში მსგავსი განსხვავებაში. ჩვენ მრავალეთალექტის ნორმალიზაციას, რომელიც კონტექსტური შეცდომა კანდიდენტების გადატანა. პერანკერი დახმარებულია n-გრამის სიტყვების მოდელზე, რომელიც ხუთი საუკეთესო ნორმალიზაციის კანდიდენტებისთვის გამოყენებულია. წარმოდგენები იმუშაობენ გერმანეთის, სპანელის, პორტეგური და სლოვანის მეტიეთალექტის მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ დიალექტალური ინფორმაციის შეყვარება განსწავლებაში მიიღება ყველა დიალექტალური ინფორმაციის შესაძლებლობა ყველა დიალექტალურ კონტექსტურის შეცდომა შეცდომა უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად. შვიდი მონაცემების სამი სექტიდან, ჩვენ ძალიან უფრო მეტი მარტივის მივიღეთ, ვიდრე წინა სწავლებში. მეორე სამი წარმოდგენები შემდგენებელია მიმდინარე წარმოდგენებით. რერენქერის კოდის გამოსახულება როგორც გახსნა ფორმა.', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes, istorinis teksto normalizavimas yra labai nepakankamai ištirta sritis. Siekiant užpildyti trūkumą, siūlome kontekste suprantamą normalizavimo metodą, kuris grindžiamas naujausiais metodais nervinių mašin ų vertimo ir perdavimo mokymosi srityje. Siūlome normalizuoti daugelio dialektų sistemą su kontekste suprantamu kandidatų persvarstymu. Perankeris remiasi žodžio lygio n gramo kalbos modeliu, kuris taikomas penkiems geriausiems normalizacijos kandidatams. Rezultatai vertinami remiantis istoriniais daugelio dialektų Vokietijos, Ispanijos, Portugalijos ir Slovėnijos duomenų rinkiniais. Mes rodome, kad įtraukiant dialektinę informaciją į mokymą bus pagerintas visų duomenų rinkinių tikslumas. Atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes persvarstytas vertinimas dar labiau pagerėja palyginti su pradiniu vertinimu. For three out of six datasets, we reach a significantly higher accuracy than reported in the previous studies.  Kiti trys rezultatai yra panašūs į dabartinę pažangą. Perankerio kodas skelbiamas kaip atvirasis kodas.', 'it': "La normalizzazione del testo storico consapevole del contesto è un'area fortemente sottosviluppata. Per colmare il gap proponiamo un approccio di normalizzazione contestuale che si basa sui metodi all'avanguardia nella traduzione automatica neurale e nell'apprendimento del trasferimento. Proponiamo un normalizzatore multidialetto con una ricalcolazione consapevole del contesto dei candidati. Il ricalcolatore si basa su un modello di linguaggio n-gram a livello di parola che viene applicato ai cinque migliori candidati alla normalizzazione. I risultati sono valutati su set di dati storici multidialetti di tedesco, spagnolo, portoghese e sloveno. Dimostriamo che incorporare informazioni dialettali nella formazione porta ad un miglioramento dell'accuratezza di tutti i set di dati. Il riallineamento contestuale fornisce un ulteriore miglioramento rispetto al basale. Per tre set di dati su sei, raggiungiamo una precisione significativamente superiore a quella riportata negli studi precedenti. Gli altri tre risultati sono paragonabili all'attuale stato dell'arte. Il codice per il resenker è pubblicato come open source.", 'kk': 'Контексті түсіндіру тарихый мәтін нормализациясы - зерттеу аумағының астында. Орындауын толтыру үшін, невралдық компьютердің аудару және аудару оқытуының күйіне тәуелді контексті түсінікті нормализациялау әдісін қолданамыз. Біз көптеген диалекттік нормализаторды кандидаттарды қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қайта қалады. Қайталаушы бес ең жақсы нормализациялау кандидаттарына қолданылатын n- грамм тіл үлгісіне тәуелді. Нәтижелер неміс, Испан, Португалия және Словендің көп диалекттік деректер жиындарында бағалады. Біз диалектикалық мәліметті оқытуға ендіру барлық деректер жиындарының дұрыс жақсартуын көрсетедік. Контексті түсініктерді қайта жасау негізгі жолда жақсы жасау береді. Алты деректер қорларының үшін біз алдыңғы зерттеулерінде хабарлаған тәртібінен артық деңгейіне жеткіземіз. Басқа үш нәтижелер назардағы суреттің күйіне салыстырылады. Қайталаушының коды ашық көзі ретінде шығарылды.', 'mk': 'Нормализацијата на историскиот текст со свесност за контекст е сериозно подистражена област. За да ја пополниме празнината предлагаме нормализациски пристап кој е свесен за контекст, кој се потпира на најсовремените методи во преводот на невропските машини и преводот на учењето. Предложуваме мултидијалектен нормализач со контекстно повторно разгледување на кандидатите. Реанкерот се потпира на модел на јазик на зборово ниво n-грам кој се применува на петте најдобри кандидати за нормализација. Резултатите се проценуваат на историските мултидијалектни податоци на германски, шпански, португалски и словенски. Покажуваме дека вклучувањето на дијалектални информации во обуката води до прецизно подобрување на сите податоци. Повторното разгледување на контекстот дава понатамошно подобрување во однос на основата. За три од шест податоци, достигнуваме значително повисока точност отколку што се пријави во претходните студии. The other three results are comparable with the current state-of-the-art.  Кодот за реанкерот е објавен како отворен код.', 'ms': 'Normalisasi teks sejarah yang sedar-konteks adalah kawasan yang amat bawah kajian. Untuk mengisi ruang kosong, kami cadangkan pendekatan normalisasi yang sedar-konteks yang bergantung pada kaedah-kaedah terbaik dalam penerjemah mesin saraf dan pembelajaran pemindahan. Kami cadangkan pengubah berbilang dialekt dengan pengubahan konteks-sedar calon. Pemancar semula bergantung pada model bahasa n-gram aras perkataan yang dilaksanakan pada lima calon normalisasi terbaik. The results are evaluated on the historical multidialect datasets of German, Spanish, Portuguese and Slovene.  We show that incorporating dialectal information into the training leads to an accuracy improvement on all the datasets.  Pemindahan semula yang sedar-konteks memberikan peningkatan lebih lanjut daripada asas. Untuk tiga daripada enam set data, kita mencapai ketepatan yang jauh lebih tinggi daripada yang dilaporkan dalam kajian sebelumnya. Tiga keputusan yang lain boleh dibandingkan dengan kemajuan semasa. Kod untuk pemancar semula diterbitkan sebagai sumber terbuka.', 'mt': 'In-normalizzazzjoni tat-test storiku li huwa konxju mill-kuntest hija żona li mhijiex riċerkata b’mod serju. Biex timtela d-distakk nipproponu approċċ ta’ normalizzazzjoni konxju mill-kuntest li jiddependi fuq il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati fit-traduzzjoni u t-tagħlim tat-trasferiment tal-magni newrali. Aħna nipproponu normalizzatur multidijalettiku b’analiżi mill-ġdid tal-kandidati li tkun konxja mill-kuntest. L-anker mill-ġdid jiddependi fuq mudell lingwistiku b’livell ta’ kliem n-gramma li jiġi applikat għall-ħames l-a ħjar kandidati għan-normalizzazzjoni. Ir-riżultati huma evalwati fuq settijiet ta’ dejta storiċi multidijalettiċi tal-Ġermaniż, Spanjol, Portugiż u Sloven. Aħna nuru li l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni dijalettika fit-taħriġ twassal għal titjib fil-preċiżjoni tas-settijiet tad-dejta kollha. L-analiżi mill-ġdid konxja mill-kuntest tagħti aktar titjib fuq il-linja bażi. Għal tlieta minn kull sitt settijiet ta’ dejta, nilħqu preċiżjoni ogħla b’mod sinifikanti minn dik irrappurtata fl-istudji preċedenti. It-tliet riżultati l-oħra huma komparabbli mal-aħħar avvanzati attwali. Il-kodiċi għall-anker mill-ġdid huwa ppubblikat bħala sors miftuħ.', 'ml': 'എക്സ്റ്റന്റ് അറിയുന്ന ചരിത്രത്തിലെ പദാവലിയുടെ സാധാരണ പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗമാണ്. ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d - ആര്\u200dട്ട് രീതിയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായി  പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നവരുടെ വീണ്ടും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മുള്\u200dട്ടിഡയലിക്ക്  വീണ്ടും പിന്തുടരുന്ന ഒരു വാക്ക് നില N-ഗ്രാം ഭാഷ മോഡലിനെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. അത് അഞ്ച് മികച്ച സ്വാഭാവിക പ്രാര്\u200dത ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d, സ്പാനിഷ്, പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീസ്, സ്ലോവെനിന്റെയും ചരിത്രത്തിലെ ചരിത്രത്തിലെ പല്ലിഡിയേക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, ട്രെയിനിനിലേക്ക് ഡയലക്ടല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് എല്ലാ ഡാറ്റാസറ് കെന്\u200dസ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറ് സൂക്ഷ്മമുള്ള വീണ്ടും മുന്നോട്ട് വരുത്തുന്നു ആറു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d മൂന്ന് പേര്\u200d മറ്റുള്ള മൂന്നു ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്ഥിതിയോട് തുല്യമാണ്. തുറന്ന സ്രോതസ്സായി പ്രസിദ്ധിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Normalisering av historisk tekst med kontekst er ein stort undersøkt område. For å fylle mellomrommet, foreslår vi ein tilnærming for normalisering som er kjent på tilstanden til kunsten i omsetjing og overføring av nøyralmaskinen. Vi foreslår ein multidialektnormalisering med ein kontekst-oppmerking av kandidatene. Den gjenoppretten dependerer på eit ordnivå n-gram språkkmodel som vert brukt til fem beste normaliseringsskandidatane. Resultatet blir evaluert på historiske multidialekte datasett av tysk, spansk, portugisk og Slovensk. Vi viser at inkludering av dialektiske informasjon i opplæringa fører til eit nøyaktig forbedring på alle datasetta. Kontekst-oppmerkinga gjev meir forbedringar over grunnlinja. For tre av seks datasett når vi ein betydelig høgare nøyaktighet enn rapportert i dei førre studiane. Dei andre tre resultata er sammenlignbar med den gjeldande kunsttilstanden. Koden for tilbakeankeren er publisert som opna kjelde.', 'mn': 'Түүхний түүхийн хэмжээсүүд нь судалгааны доор маш их хэмжээсүүд юм. Хувьслыг дүүргэхийн тулд бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн нормализацийн арга зам нь мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулах болон шилжүүлэх сургалтын тулд хамаарна. Бид олон диалект нормализагчийг санал дэвшүүлэгчдийг дахин ойлгох боломжтой. Реранкер нь N-грамм хэлний хэл загвараас хамгийн сайн хэмжээний удирдагч таван шилдэг хэмжээний загвараар ашигладаг. Үүний үр дүнг Герман, Испан, Португали, Словенийн түүхийн олон диалект өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр үнэлдэг. Бид диалектикийн мэдээллийг сургалтын тухай нэгтгэх нь бүх өгөгдлийн сан дээр зөв сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Байгаль ойлголтын дахин дахин сайжруулах нь суурь шугам дээр илүү сайжруулдаг. 6 өгөгдлийн сангийн 3 дахь нь бид өмнөх судалгаанаас илүү нарийвчлалтай хүрч чадна. Өөр гурван үр дүн нь одоогийн урлагийн байдалтай харьцуулагддаг. Реранкерийн код нээлттэй эх үүсвэр гэж хэвлэгдсэн.', 'ro': 'Normalizarea textului istoric conștient de context este un domeniu grav subcercetat. Pentru a umple golul propunem o abordare de normalizare conștientă de context, care se bazează pe metodele de ultimă generație în traducerea automată neurală și învățarea transferului. Propunem un normalizator multidialect cu o re-ranking conștientă de context a candidaților. Refinanciarul se bazează pe un model de limbaj n-gram la nivel de cuvânt care este aplicat celor mai buni cinci candidați la normalizare. Rezultatele sunt evaluate pe baza seturilor de date multidialecte istorice din germană, spaniolă, portugheză și slovenă. Noi arătăm că încorporarea informațiilor dialectale în formare duce la o îmbunătățire a acurateții tuturor seturilor de date. Refinanțarea conștientă de context oferă o îmbunătățire suplimentară față de valoarea de referință. Pentru trei din șase seturi de date, atingem o precizie semnificativ mai mare decât cea raportată în studiile anterioare. Celelalte trei rezultate sunt comparabile cu cele mai recente tehnologii. Codul pentru resenker este publicat ca open-source.', 'pl': 'Kontekstowa normalizacja tekstów historycznych jest poważnie niezbadanym obszarem. Aby wypełnić lukę proponujemy kontekstowe podejście normalizacyjne, które opiera się na najnowocześniejszych metodach neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego i uczenia się transferowego. Proponujemy multidialektowy normalizator z kontekstową zmianą rankingu kandydatów. Reranker opiera się na modelu języka n-gram na poziomie słowa, który jest stosowany do pięciu najlepszych kandydatów normalizacji. Wyniki oceniane są na podstawie historycznych wielodiektowych zbiorów danych niemieckiego, hiszpańskiego, portugalskiego i słoweńskiego. Pokazujemy, że włączenie informacji dialektycznych do treningu prowadzi do poprawy dokładności wszystkich zbiorów danych. Kontekstowe zmiany rankingu dają dalszą poprawę w stosunku do linii bazowej. W przypadku trzech na sześć zbiorów danych osiągamy znacznie większą dokładność niż opisano w poprzednich badaniach. Pozostałe trzy wyniki są porównywalne z aktualnym stanem techniki. Kod do ponownego rankera jest publikowany jako open source.', 'sr': 'Normalizacija istorijskog teksta na kontekstu je teško pod istraživanjem područja. Da napunimo prazninu predlažemo pristup normalizaciji sa kontekstom koji se oslanja na državne metode umjetnosti u prevodu i učenju prijenosa neuralnih mašin a. Predlažemo višedijalektnom normalizatoru sa svesnim kontekstom preokrenutom kandidata. Prebacitelj se oslanja n a model jezika na reči nivou n grama koji se primjenjuje na pet najboljih kandidata za normalizaciju. Rezultati se procjenjuju na istorijskim multidijalektnim podacima njemačkih, španjolskih, portugalskih i slovenih. Pokazujemo da uključujući dijalektne informacije u obuku vodi do poboljšanja tačnosti na svim podacima. Preokretanje konteksta predstavlja daljnje poboljšanje na početnoj liniji. Za tri od šest podataka dostižemo značajno veću tačnost nego što je prijavljeno u prethodnim ispitivanjima. Ostala tri rezultata su usporedna sa trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti. Šifra za ponovno otvaranje objavljena je kao otvoreni izvor.', 'so': 'Qoraalka taariikhda ah ee la aqoon yahay waa goob aad u baahan. Si aan u buuxino gafafka aan u soo jeedno qaab caadi ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka farshaxanka iyo tarjumaadda barashada neurada. We propose a multidialect normaliser with a context-aware reranking of the candidates.  Qofka dib u soo socda wuxuu ku xiran yahay muusikada luqada n-gram oo lagu codsan yahay shantii kandidada ugu fiican ee caadi ah. Midhihiisa waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa taariikhda macluumaadka kala duduwan ee Jarmal, Isbanish, Burtuqiis iyo Slovene. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in macluumaadka macluumaadka la xiriira waxbarashada lagu koobi karo waxay ku leedahay hagaajinta saxda ah ee sameynta macluumaadka oo dhan. Dib-socoshada hoose-u-socoshada ayaa horumarinta ugu sii kordhiya qoraalka hoose. Sadex ka mid ah lix macluumaad, waxaynu gaadhnaa saxda aad u sareeya si ka sii sareeya waxbarashadii hore. Saddexda resultiyada kale waa u eg xaaladda hore. Qoidaha dib u soo guuraha waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa sida asal furan oo kale.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය අතිහාසික පාළුව සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණයක් ගොඩක් අඩු පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් පූර්ණ කරගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒක න්\u200dයූරාල් යන්ත්\u200dරය පරිවර්තනය සහ අපි ගොඩක් ඩායලෙක්ට් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙක්ට ප්\u200dරතිචාරකය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ප්\u200dරතිච The re anker is on a word-level n-gram language Model that is Application for the five good Normallization Candy. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිකාරය ජර්මාන්, ස්පැනිස්, පොර්තුතිස් හා ස්ලෝවින් වල ඉතිහාසික වර්ත අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඩායිලෙක්ටල් තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානයට ඇතුළත් තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණත්වයෙන් ස සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය අවස්ථාව පුන්වර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාලනය වෙන්න පුළුවන්. දත්ත සෙට් හතරයින් තුනක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පිළිගත්ත අධ්\u200dයානයට වඩා විශේෂයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප රිවර්න්කර්ගේ කෝඩ් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ.', 'sv': 'Kontextmedveten historisk textnormalisering är ett allvarligt underforskat område. För att fylla luckan föreslår vi en kontextmedveten normaliseringsstrategi som bygger på de senaste metoderna inom neural maskinöversättning och transfer learning. Vi föreslår en multidialekt normalisering med en kontextmedveten omräkning av kandidaterna. Omrankaren förlitar sig på en språkmodell på ordnivå n-gram som tillämpas på de fem bästa normaliseringskandidaterna. Resultaten utvärderas på de historiska multidialektiska datauppsättningarna på tyska, spanska, portugisiska och slovenska. Vi visar att införlivandet av dialektisk information i utbildningen leder till en noggrannhetsförbättring av alla datauppsättningar. Den kontextmedvetna omräkningen ger ytterligare förbättringar jämfört med baslinjen. För tre av sex datauppsättningar uppnår vi en signifikant högre noggrannhet än vad som rapporterats i tidigare studier. De övriga tre resultaten är jämförbara med dagens toppmoderna resultat. Koden för återförankaren publiceras som öppen källkod.', 'ta': 'உள்ளடக்கத்தில் அறியப்படும் வரலாறு உரை இயல்பாக்கம் ஒரு கடுமையான ஆராய்ந்த பரப்பு. இந்த இடைவெளியை நிரப்ப நாம் ஒரு சூழல் உணர்ந்து கொள்ளும் சாதாரண முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிமாற நாம் ஒரு பல்வேறு வழக்கமான இயல்பாக்கியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் ஒரு சூழ்நிலைப்படுத்தி அறிந்து கொண்டு. The reranker relies on a word-level n-gram language model that is applied to the five best normalisation candidates.  முடிவுகள் ஜெர்மன், ஸ்பானிஷ், போர்த்துகீசி மற்றும் ஸ்லோவென் பயிற்சியில் உள்ள விவரங்களை சேர்த்து செலுத்துவதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் என்று அனைத்து தரவுத் தளங்களிலும்  சூழல் அறிந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் மீண்டும் மேலும் முன்னேற்றம் கொடுக்கிறது. ஆறு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் மூன்று வரை, முந்தைய படிப்புகளில் அறிவிக்கப்பட்டதை விட மிக அதிக சரியானத்தை அடையும். மற்ற மூன்று முடிவுகள் தற்போதைய நிலையில்- கலைக்கு ஒப்பிடும். மீண்டும் பின்னணி குறியீடு திறந்த மூலத்தாக வெளியிடப்படுகிறது.', 'ur': 'کنٹکسٹ جانے والی تاریخی ٹیکسٹ نورمیزی ایک سخت تحقیق کی منطقه ہے. ہم نے اس گھاٹ کو بھر جانے کے لئے ایک کنٹکس-conscious normalization approach پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو نئورل ماشین ترجمہ اور ترجمہ سیکھنے کے موقعیت پر اعتماد رکھتا ہے. ہم ایک multidialect عامل کرنے والے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ کاندینٹوں کے بارے میں دوبارہ آگاہ ہونے کے ساتھ۔ ایک لفظ n-گرم زبان کی مدل پر اعتماد کرتا ہے جو پانچ بہترین عاملی کاندینٹ پر لازم کیا جاتا ہے. نتیجے جرمن, اسپانیایی, پورتوگل اور اسلووین کی تاریخی multidialect ڈاٹ سٹوں پر ارزش کیا جاتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ڈائیلکتل معلومات کی تعلیم میں شامل کرنا تمام ڈاٹ سٹوں پر دقیق ترقیق کی پیش کرتا ہے. پانی سمجھنے والی دوبارہ پیدا کرنا بنیاس لین پر زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ چھ ڈاٹ سٹ میں سے تین سے ہم پہلے کی تحقیقات سے بہت زیادہ دقیق پہنچ رہے ہیں۔ اور دوسرے تین نتیجے موجود هنر کی حالت سے برابر ہیں۔ ریرنکر کے لئے کوڈ کھلی سورس کے طور پر منتشر کیا گیا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu gapni toʻldirish uchun biz taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi qoidalarni o'rganish va o'rganishni o'rganish holatiga ishlatadi. Biz kandidalarning taxminan taxminan o'zgarishni qaytadan qo'shishni tasavvur qilamiz. Keyingi keyingi keladigan soʻzning n-gram modeliga ishlatadi. 5 yaxshi qoʻllanilgan kandidalar uchun ishlatadi. @ info: status Biz o'rganishga dialektal maʼlumotni qo'shish hamma maʼlumotlar sohasida aniqlashni ko'rsatamiz. Ikkinchi darajada taʼminlovchi narsalarni asosiy satrlarda koʻpaytirish mumkin. Oldingi o'rganishlar davomida uchta maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi uchta ta ta'limga ega bo'ladik. Boshqa uchta natijalar joriy sananing holatiga mos keladi. The code for the reranker is published as open-source.", 'vi': 'Tính đột biến giai đoạn lịch sử là một khu vực thiếu nghiên cứu. Để lấp đầy khoảng trống, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp phục hồi tỉnh ngữ cảnh dựa trên phương pháp truyền dịch cỗ máy thần kinh và học chuyển tiếp. Chúng tôi đề xuất một tiêu chuẩn đa năng với việc kiểm tra lại các ứng viên. Câu trả lại dựa trên một mô hình ngôn ngữ n-gram được áp dụng cho n ăm ứng viên bình thường giỏi nhất. Kết quả được đánh giá dựa trên các dữ liệu đa chiều lịch sử của Đức, Tây Ban Nha, Bồ Đào Nha và Xlôven. Chúng tôi cho rằng việc giải thoát trị trong cuộc huấn luyện, cũng giúp chúng tôi giải quyết sự chúng tôi Việc lặp lại ngữ cảnh cho thấy cải thiện hơn so với cơ sở. Với ba trong sáu tập tin, độ chính xác cao hơn so với những nghiên cứu trước. Ba kết quả khác có thể so sánh với thời đại hiện nay. Mã cho chế độ lưu trữ được xuất bản như nguồn mở.', 'bg': 'Нормализирането на историческите текстове, осъзнаващо контекста, е сериозно недостатъчно изследвана област. За да запълним празнината, предлагаме подход за нормализиране, съобразен с контекста, който разчита на най-съвременните методи в невронния машинен превод и трансферното обучение. Предлагаме мултидиалектичен нормализатор с контекстно пренареждане на кандидатите. Преанкерът разчита на езиков модел на ниво дума, който се прилага към петте най-добри кандидати за нормализиране. Резултатите са оценени на исторически многодиалектни масиви от данни на немски, испански, португалски и словенски. Показваме, че включването на диалектална информация в обучението води до подобряване на точността на всички набори от данни. Преизчисляването, съобразено с контекста, дава допълнително подобрение спрямо базовата база. За три от шест набора данни достигаме значително по-висока точност от докладваната в предишните проучвания. Останалите три резултата са сравними с настоящото състояние на техниката. Кодът за преанкера се публикува като отворен код.', 'da': 'Kontekstbevidst historisk tekst normalisering er et alvorligt underundersøgt område. For at udfylde hullet foreslår vi en kontekstbevidst normaliseringstilgang, der er afhængig af state-of-the-art metoder inden for neural maskinoversættelse og transfer learning. Vi foreslår en multidialekt normaliser med en kontekstbevidst omlægning af kandidaterne. Refankeren er afhængig af en ordniveau n-gram sprogmodel, der anvendes på de fem bedste normaliseringskandidater. Resultaterne er evalueret på de historiske multidialekt datasæt af tysk, spansk, portugisisk og slovensk. Vi viser, at indarbejdelse af dialektisk information i træningen fører til en nøjagtighedsforbedring af alle datasæt. Den kontekstbevidste omlægning giver yderligere forbedringer i forhold til baseline. For tre ud af seks datasæt opnår vi en betydeligt højere nøjagtighed end rapporteret i de tidligere undersøgelser. De øvrige tre resultater er sammenlignelige med den aktuelle state-of-the-art. Koden til genrangeren offentliggøres som open source.', 'hr': 'Normalizacija istorijskog teksta svjesnog konteksta je teško pod istraživanjem područja. Za ispunjavanje praznina predlažemo pristup normalizaciji konteksta koji se oslanja na metode stanja umjetnosti u prevodu i učenju prijenosa neuronskih strojeva. Predlažemo višedijalektnom normalizatoru sa predstavljanjem svjesnog konteksta kandidata. Prebacitelj se oslanja n a model jezika na riječi nivou n grama koji se primjenjuje na pet najboljih kandidata za normalizaciju. Rezultati se procjenjuju na povijesnim multidijalektnim podacima njemačkih, španjolskih, portugalskih i slovenih. Pokazujemo da uključujući dijalektne informacije u obuku vodi do poboljšanja to čnosti na svim podacima. Preokretanje konteksta pruža daljnje poboljšanje na početnoj liniji. Za tri od šest podataka dostignemo značajno veću tačnost nego što je prijavljeno u prethodnim ispitivanjima. Ostala tri rezultata su usporedna s trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti. Šifra za ponovno otvaranje objavljena je kao otvoreni izvor.', 'nl': 'Contextbewuste historische tekstnormalisatie is een ernstig onderzocht gebied. Om de kloof op te vullen stellen we een contextbewuste normalisatieaanpak voor die gebaseerd is op de state-of-the-art methoden in neurale machine translation en transfer learning. We stellen een multidialect normaliser voor met een contextbewuste herschikking van de kandidaten. De herinker vertrouwt op een n-gram taalmodel op woordniveau dat wordt toegepast op de vijf beste normalisatiekandidaten. De resultaten worden geëvalueerd op de historische multidialect datasets van Duits, Spaans, Portugees en Sloveens. We laten zien dat het opnemen van dialectische informatie in de training leidt tot een verbetering van de nauwkeurigheid van alle datasets. De contextbewuste herschikking geeft verdere verbetering ten opzichte van de baseline. Voor drie van de zes datasets bereiken we een significant hogere nauwkeurigheid dan in eerdere studies werd gerapporteerd. De andere drie resultaten zijn vergelijkbaar met de huidige stand-of-the-art. De code voor de reranker wordt gepubliceerd als open source.', 'de': 'Die kontextbewusste historische Textnormalisierung ist ein stark unterforschtes Gebiet. Um diese Lücke zu schließen, schlagen wir einen kontextbewussten Normalisierungsansatz vor, der auf modernsten Methoden der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung und des Transferlernens basiert. Wir schlagen einen multidialekten Normalisator mit einer kontextbewussten Neurangierung der Kandidaten vor. Der Reranker stützt sich auf ein N-Gramm-Sprachmodell auf Wortebene, das auf die fünf besten Normalisierungskandidaten angewendet wird. Die Ergebnisse werden auf den historischen Multidialektdatensätzen Deutsch, Spanisch, Portugiesisch und Slowenisch ausgewertet. Wir zeigen, dass die Einbeziehung dialekter Informationen in das Training zu einer Verbesserung der Genauigkeit aller Datensätze führt. Die kontextbewusste Neurangierung verbessert die Baseline weiter. Für drei von sechs Datensätzen erreichen wir eine deutlich höhere Genauigkeit als in den vorangegangenen Studien berichtet. Die anderen drei Ergebnisse sind mit dem aktuellen Stand der Technik vergleichbar. Der Code für den Reranker wird als Open Source veröffentlicht.', 'id': 'Context-aware historical text normalisation is a severely under-researched area.  Untuk mengisi celah kita mengusulkan pendekatan normalisasi yang menyadari konteks yang bergantung pada metode terbaik dalam penerjemah mesin saraf dan penerjemah belajar. Kami mengusulkan normaliser multidialekt dengan pemikiran konteks-sadar ulang kandidat. Reanker bergantung pada model bahasa n-gram tingkat kata yang diterapkan pada lima kandidat normalisasi terbaik. Hasilnya diteliti pada dataset multidialek sejarah Jerman, Spanyol, Portugis dan Slovene. Kami menunjukkan bahwa memasukkan informasi dialektal ke dalam pelatihan mengarah ke peningkatan akurasi pada semua set data. Pemikiran konteks yang menyadari kembali memberikan perkembangan lebih lanjut dibanding dasar. Untuk tiga dari enam set data, kita mencapai akurasi yang jauh lebih tinggi dari yang dilaporkan dalam studi sebelumnya. Tiga hasil lainnya bisa dibandingkan dengan state-of-the-art saat ini. Kode untuk reranker diterbitkan sebagai sumber terbuka.', 'fa': 'متن\u200cهای تاریخی را با اطلاعات محیط می\u200cداند، یک منطقه زیر تحقیق است. برای پر کردن فاصله، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش عامل\u200cسازی با آگاهی محیط که بر روش وضعیت هنر توسط ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین\u200cهای عصبی و یادگیری\u200cهای انتقال بستگی دارد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک عادت\u200cکننده\u200cی چندین دیالکت با بازگرداندن کاندیده\u200cها را آگاه کند. بازگرداننده بر یک مدل زبان n گرم کلمه بستگی دارد که به پنج نفر بهترین کاندیدای نورمیزی کاربرد می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متعددی\u200cالکت تاریخی آلمان، اسپانیایی، پورتوژیک و اسلووین ارزیابی می\u200cشوند. ما نشان می دهیم که شامل اطلاعات دیالکتی در آموزش به سوی بهترین دقیق در تمام مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها می\u200cرسد. بازگرداندن آگاهی از محیط بیشتری بر اساس خط پایین می\u200cدهد. برای سه از شش مجموعه داده ها، ما به دقیق بسیار بالاتر از گزارش داده شده در تحقیقات قبلی رسیدیم. سه نتیجه دیگر با وضعیت هنر فعلی مقایسه می\u200cکنند. رمز بازگرداننده به عنوان منبع باز منتشر شده است.', 'ko': '상하문이 감지하는 역사 텍스트의 규범화는 연구가 심각하게 부족한 분야이다.이 공백을 메우기 위해 우리는 신경기계 번역과 이동 학습에서 가장 선진적인 방법을 바탕으로 하는 상하문 감지 규범화 방법을 제시했다.우리는 후보어에 대해 상하문 감지의 재배열을 할 수 있는 다방언 규범화기를 제시했다.다섯 개의 최적 표준화 후보어에 적용되는 단어급 n-gram 언어 모델에 다시 등급을 나눈다.그 결과 독일어, 스페인어, 포르투갈어, 슬로베니아어의 역사 다방언 데이터집에서 평가됐다.우리는 사투리 정보를 훈련에 포함시키면 모든 데이터 집합의 정확성을 높일 수 있다고 밝혔다.기선에 비해 상하문 감지의 재배열은 진일보한 개선을 제공했다.6분의 3의 데이터 집합에 대해 우리의 정확도는 이전의 연구 보고서보다 훨씬 높다.기타 세 가지 결과는 현재의 최신 수준과 비슷하다.다시 랭킹된 코드는 소스 오픈 형식으로 발표됩니다.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa taarifa za kihistoria unaofahamika na maudhui ni eneo lisilo na utafiti. Ili kutimiza mapambano tunapendekeza mbinu za usawa wa mazingira inayofahamika na hali inayotegemea njia za sanaa katika tafsiri ya mashine na kuhamisha kujifunza. Tunawapendekeza mwandishi wa kawaida wa kidunia wenye mtazamo wa kuvumbua wagombea. Mpinduzi huyo anategemea mtazamo wa lugha ya neno linalotumiwa kwa wagombea watano bora wa kawaida. Matokeo hayo yanapitiwa katika seti za taarifa za kihistoria za Kijerumani, Kihispania, Kireno na Slovenia. Tunaonyesha kuwa kuingiza taarifa za lugha katika mafunzo yanapelekea maendeleo sahihi kwenye seti zote za taarifa. Maelezo yanayofahamika yanaleta maendeleo zaidi ya msingi. Kwa seti tatu kati ya takwimu sita, tunafikia uhakika mkubwa kuliko ilivyoripotiwa katika tafiti zilizopita. Matokeo mengine matatu yanafanana na hali ya sasa ya sanaa. The code for the reranker is published as open-source.', 'af': "Konteks bewys historiese teks normalisering is 'n groot ondersoekte area. Om die gap te vul, voorstel ons 'n konteks-bevestig normalisering toegang wat op die staat-van-die-kunstenmetodes in neurale masjien vertaling en oordrag onderwerp. Ons voorstel 'n multidialekte normaliseerder met 'n konteks-bevestig heranking van die kandidate. Die heranker verlig op 'n woord-vlak n-gram taal model wat aan die vyf beste normaliseerde kandidate aangepas word. Die resultate word uitgewerk op die historiese multidialekte dataset van Duits, Spaanse, Portugees en Slovenië. Ons wys dat die inkorporering van dialektiese inligting in die oefening lei na 'n presies verbetering op alle datastelle. Die konteks-bekende heranking gee verdere verbetering oor die basilyn. Vir drie van ses datastelle, kom ons 'n betekeurige hoër presisie as in die vorige studie. Die ander drie resultate is vergelykbaar met die huidige staat van die kuns. Die kode vir die heranker is gepubliseer as open-source.", 'tr': 'Kontekst bilen tanyş geçmiş metin normaliziýasy çykyş edilen ýerlerde. Bu boşluky doldurmak üçin, neuro maşynyň terjime we transfers öwrenmesine mümkin bir kontekst bilen habarlaşyrylan normalizasyon approach teklip edýäris. Biz kandidýalary ýene-täzeden beýleki dialektler şeklinde düzenlemegi teklip edýäris. Tekrar taýýarlançy 5 iň gowy kadalama kandidyna uygulanan söz derejesinde n-gram dil nusgasyna ynanýar. Netijiler Alman, Ispanýol, Portugalça we Sloweniň taryhy multidialekt sanlarynda deňlenýär. Biz dialektal maglumaty okuw taýýarlamak üçin hemme datasetlerde dogrylyk gelişmelere ýok edip görkeýäris. Kontekst bilen tekrar gaýtalanmak baz çyzygynda köpräk gelişmeler bar. Alty sanatdan üç sany üçin, öňki çalışmalarda bildirilen üçin has dogrylyklara ulaşýarys. Diňe üç netijeler häzirki möhüm möhüm-möhüm möhüm bilen karşılaşýar. Ködlemeler üçin kody açyk-çeşme hökmünde terjime edildi.', 'sq': 'Normalizimi i tekstit historik i vetëdijshëm për kontekstin është një fushë e rëndë nënkërkuar. Për të mbushur boshllëkun ne propozojmë një qasje normalizimi në lidhje me kontekstin që mbështetet në metodat më të larta në përkthimin dhe transferimin e mësimit të makinave nervore. Ne propozojmë një normalizues multidialekti me një rishikim të kandidatëve në lidhje me kontekstin. Riankeri mbështetet n ë një model gjuhësh në nivelin e fjalëve n-gram që aplikohet për pesë kandidatët më të mirë të normalizimit. The results are evaluated on the historical multidialect datasets of German, Spanish, Portuguese and Slovene.  Ne tregojmë se përfshirja e informacionit dialektal në trajnim çon në një përmirësim të saktësisë në të gjitha të dhënat. Rregullimi i vetëdijshëm për kontekstin jep përmirësim të mëtejshëm ndaj bazës. Për tre nga gjashtë grupe të dhënash, arrijmë një saktësi më të lartë se raportuar në studimet e mëparshme. Tre rezultatet e tjera janë të krahasueshme me gjendjen aktuale. Kodi i ri-ankerit publikohet si burim i hapur.', 'am': "የውይይት ታሪካዊ ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል በተመረጠው ቦታ ነው፡፡ የግንኙነቱን መፍታት ለመሞላ እና በናውሬው መሳሳይ ትርጓሜ እና ትምህርትን ለመለስ የሚታመን የሀብት-የ-art ሥርዓቶችን ለመደገፍ እና ለመቀናቀል እናስመሳሰል፡፡ የአካባቢው ተቃውሞ የሚቆጠሩ ምናዳሪዎችን ለመቀበል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ አዲስ ደረጃ በ-ደረጃ n-gram ቋንቋ model በአምስቱ መልካሙን የተመሳሳይ ተቃዋሚዎች ላይ ይደገፋል፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ የጀርመን፣ ስፓኒሽ፣ ፖርቱጋልኛ እና ስሎቪን ባለው ታሪክ ብዙኃዊ ዳታተር ማድረግ ነው፡፡ We show that incorporating dialectal information into the training leads to an accuracy improvement on all the datasets.  የሥርዓት ግንኙነት አቀማመጥ ማድረግ የበዛ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ከስድስት ዳታዎች ሦስት፣ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ውስጥ ካለፉት ትምህርት የበለጠ እርግጠኛ ይደርሳል፡፡ ሌሎቹ ሦስቱ ውጤቶች በአሁኑ ሁኔታ ላይ-art ይተያያያል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Kontekstdən xəbərdar tarihi metin normalizasyonu a ğır bir araştırma alanı. Boşluqları doldurmaq üçün, nöral maşına çevirib öyrənmək və təkrar öyrənmək üçün təsirli bir nörüməl normalizasyon approach təklif edirik. Biz çoxlu dialekt normalizacını təklif edirik. Kandidatların yenidən fərqlənməsini təklif edirik. Pəranker beş ən yaxşı normalizasyon kandidātların a uyğulanan n-gram dil modeli ilə təvəkkül edir. Sonuçlar Alman, İspanyol, Portugal və Slovenin tarixi çoxlu dialekt veri qurularında değerlendirilir. Biz göstəririk ki, təcrübəyə dialektal məlumatları daxil etmək bütün verilən qurğuların doğruluğuna yol açar. Kontekst-bilikli yenidən tərzdə tərzdə daha yaxşılıq verir. Altı verilənlərdən üç nəfər üçün əvvəlki təhsillərdə xəbər verilənlərdən çox yüksək doğruluğa çatdıq. Diğer üç nəticələr hökmdəki sanatın durumu ilə qarşılaşdırılır. Re-anker kodu açıq-kaynaq olaraq yayınlanar.', 'hy': 'Կոնտեքստի գիտակցած պատմական տեքստի նորմալիզացիան լուրջ թերհետազոտություն է: Որպեսզի լրացնենք բացը, մենք առաջարկում ենք կոնտեքստի գիտակցած նորմալիզացիայի մոտեցում, որը հիմնված է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման և փոխանցման ամենաբարձր մեթոդների վրա: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմադիալեկտային նորմալիզացիչ, որն ունի թեկնածուների կոնտեքստի գիտակցությունը: Վերադառնալը հիմնված է բառի մակարդակի n-գրամ լեզվի մոդելի վրա, որը կիրառվում է հինգ լավագույն նորմալիզացիայի թեկնածուների վրա: Արդյունքները գնահատվում են գերմանացի, իսպաներենի, պորտուգալերենի և սլովենի պատմական բազմադիալեկտ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ դիալեկտալ ինֆորմացիայի ներառումը ուսուցման մեջ հանգեցնում է բոլոր տվյալների ճշգրիտ բարելավման: Կոնտեքստի գիտակցության վերադառնալը ավելի լավ է զարգացնում հիմնական տարբերակում: Վեց տվյալներից երեք հատվածի համար մենք հասնում ենք ավելի ճշգրիտ, քան նախորդ ուսումնասիրություններում հայտարարված: Մյուս երեք արդյունքները համեմատուկ են ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիայի հետ: The code for the reranker is published as open-source.', 'bn': 'বিষয়বস্তুর পরিচিত ঐতিহাসিক টেক্সট স্বাভাবিকভাবে গবেষণার একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এলাকা। এই বিভ্রান্তি পূরণ করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি এক পরিসংক্রান্ত স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক পদ্ধতি যা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং শিক্ষা পরিবর্ আমরা প্রার্থীদের পুনরায় স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক প্রস্তাব করি। পুনরায় নির্ভর করে একটি শব্দ-স্তরের n-গ্রাম ভাষার মডেলের উপর যা পাঁচটি স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক প্রার্থীদের প্রতি প্ এই ফলাফল জার্মান, স্প্যানিশ, পর্তুগীজ এবং স্লোভেনের ঐতিহাসিক মাল্টিডায়েক্ট ডাটাসেটে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রশিক্ষণের মধ্যে ডায়ালেক্টাল তথ্য যোগাযোগ করা হচ্ছে তা সকল তথ্যের সুস্পষ্ট উন্নতির কারণে  এই প্রকৃতির পরিচিতি পুনরুদ্ধারের বিষয়টি বেসারে উন্নতি প্রদান করে। পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণায় প্রতিবেদনের চেয়ে তিনটি ডাটাসেটের জন্য আমরা প্রায় বেশী সঠিকভাবে পৌঁছাই। অন্য তিনটি ফলাফল বর্তমান অবস্থার সাথে সমান। The code for the reranker is published as open-source.', 'bs': 'Normalizacija istorijskog teksta svjesnog konteksta je teško pod istraživanjem područja. Za ispunjavanje praznina predlažemo pristup normalizaciji sa kontekstom koji se oslanja na metode stanja umjetnosti u prevodu i učenju prijenosa neuronskih strojeva. Predlažemo višedijalektnom normalizatoru sa preusmjerenjem kandidata u kontekstu. Prebacitelj se oslanja n a model jezika na riječi nivou n grama koji se primjenjuje na pet najboljih kandidata za normalizaciju. Rezultati se procjenjuju na istorijskim multidijalektnim podacima njemačkih, španjolskih, portugalskih i slovenih. Pokazujemo da uključujući dijalektne informacije u obuku vodi do poboljšanja tačnosti na svim podacima. Preokretanje konteksta predstavlja daljnje poboljšanje na početnoj liniji. Za tri od šest podataka dostignemo značajno veću tačnost nego što je prijavljeno u prethodnim ispitivanjima. Ostala tri rezultata su usporedna sa trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti. Kod za ponovnog kretanja objavljen je kao otvoreni izvor.', 'cs': 'Kontextová normalizace historických textů je výrazně nedostatečně zkoumaná oblast. Abychom tuto mezeru vyplnili, navrhujeme kontextový normalizační přístup, který se opírá o nejmodernější metody neuronového strojového překladu a transferového učení. Navrhujeme multidialektní normalizátor s kontextově orientovaným přehodnocením kandidátů. Reranker se opírá o jazykový model na úrovni slova, který je aplikován na pět nejlepších normalizačních kandidátů. Výsledky jsou hodnoceny na historických multidialektních datových sadách němčiny, španělštiny, portugalštiny a slovinštiny. Ukazujeme, že začlenění dialektálních informací do školení vede ke zlepšení přesnosti všech datových sad. Kontextově orientované změně řazení umožňuje další zlepšení oproti základní hodnotě. U tří ze šesti datových sad dosahujeme výrazně vyšší přesnosti, než bylo uvedeno v předchozích studiích. Ostatní tři výsledky jsou srovnatelné se současným stavem techniky. Kód pro reranker je publikován jako open source.', 'ca': "La normalització històrica del text conscient del context és una àrea molt poc investigada. Per omplir la diferència proposem un enfocament de normalització conscient del context que es basa en els mètodes més avançats en la traducció neuromàtica i l'aprenentatge de transfer ència. Proposem un normalitzador multidialecte amb una revisió del context conscient dels candidats. El rebanxador es basa en un model de llenguatge n-gram de nivell de paraules aplicat als cinc millors candidats a normalització. Els resultats s'evaluen en els conjunts històrics de dades multidialectes alemanès, espanyol, portuguès i slovenès. We show that incorporating dialectal information into the training leads to an accuracy improvement on all the datasets.  El reconsiderament conscient del context dóna millora més respecto de la base. For three out of six datasets, we reach a significantly higher accuracy than reported in the previous studies.  Els altres tres resultats són comparables amb l'actualitat. El codi de l'autoranker es publica com a codi obert.", 'et': 'Kontekstiteadlik ajaloolise teksti normaliseerimine on tõsiselt alauuritud valdkond. Lünka täitmiseks pakume välja kontekstiteadliku normaliseerimise lähenemisviisi, mis tugineb neuromasintõlke ja siirdeõppe tipptasemel meetoditele. Pakume välja mitmedialektilise normaliseerija kontekstiteadliku kandidaatide ümberjaotamisega. Ümberjaotaja tugineb sõnatasemel n-grammi keelemudelile, mida rakendatakse viiele parimale normaliseerimise kandidaadile. Tulemusi hinnatakse saksa, hispaania, portugali ja sloveeni ajalooliste mitmedialektiliste andmekogumite põhjal. Näitame, et dialektilise informatsiooni lisamine koolitusse toob kaasa kõigi andmekogumite täpsuse parandamise. Kontekstiteadlik ümberpankimine parandab võrreldes lähtetasemega veelgi. Kolme kuuest andmekogumist saavutame oluliselt suurema täpsuse kui eelmistes uuringutes kirjeldatud. Ülejäänud kolm tulemust on võrreldavad praeguse tehnika tasemega. Ümberpankeri kood avaldatakse avatud lähtekoodina.', 'fi': 'Kontekstitietoista historiallisen tekstin normalisointia ei ole tutkittu riittävästi. Tämän aukon täyttämiseksi ehdotamme kontekstitietoista normalisointia, joka perustuu viimeisimpiin neurokonekäännöksen ja siirtooppimisen menetelmiin. Ehdotamme monimurteellista normalisointia, jossa ehdokkaat asetetaan asiayhteyteen tietoisesti uudelleen. Uudelleenlaskentaja perustuu sanatason n-gramman kielimalliin, jota sovelletaan viiteen parhaaseen normalisointiehdokkaaseen. Tuloksia arvioidaan saksan, espanjan, portugalin ja sloveenin historiallisista monimurteisista aineistoista. Osoitamme, että dialektisen tiedon sisällyttäminen koulutukseen parantaa kaikkien aineistojen tarkkuutta. Kontekstitietoinen uudelleenjärjestely parantaa entisestään lähtötilanteeseen verrattuna. Kolmella kuudesta aineistosta saavutamme huomattavasti paremman tarkkuuden kuin aiemmissa tutkimuksissa. Kolme muuta tulosta ovat vertailukelpoisia nykytekniikan kanssa. Uudelleenkäyttäjän koodi julkaistaan avoimena lähdekoodina.', 'ha': "Juyin littãfin na mai ƙididdigewa na guda, yana da wani fili mai ƙaranci. Dõmin cika gaura da Muke buƙata wata hanyor mai shiryarwa na context-notified wanda ke dõgara ga halin-the-art cikin fassarar maɓallin neural da za'a shige learning. Tuna goyya da wani mai shiryarwa na multi-multi da ke sami mai taɓa wa kandidani. The reranker relies on a word-level n-gram language model that is applied to the five best normalisation candidates.  Ana ƙidãya matsalan bayanin da aka sanar da shi na zamani multiyyaki na jeruman, Isbanish, Portugal da Sulvon. Tuna nũna cewa, ta shigar da takardar cikin shirin ayuka, yana ƙara mafiya tsari a kan kowane danne-danne. An ƙara muhimmanci masu fahimta cikin muhimmanci, yana ƙaranci kodi kan layin. Ga uku daga sitan taki, za mu isa ga halinsa mai girma ko da aka sanar a cikin karatun farko. Bayan matsala uku sunan daidaita da halin-kuni yanzu. Ana nuna kodi wa mai sake-gabatar da shi kamar kilowa mai buɗe.", 'he': 'נורמליזציה של טקסט היסטורי מודעת לקונקסט היא אזור תחת מחקר רציני. כדי למלא את הפער אנו מציעים גישה נורמליזציה מודעת לקונקסט שמבוססת על השיטות המאודמות בתרגום מכונות עצביות ותעברת לימוד. אנו מציעים נורמליזר multidialect עם מחדש רמז מודע לקונקסט של המועמדים. הקרקע מחדש סומך על מודל שפה ברמה מילים n-גרם שמשתמש על חמש מועמדים לנורמליזציה הטובים ביותר. התוצאות מוערכות על קבוצות נתונים היסטוריות של גרמנים, ספרדים, פורטוגזים וסלובלינים. אנחנו מראים שהשילוב מידע דיאלקטלי לאימון מוביל לשיפור מדויק בכל קבוצת המידע. הקונקסט-מודע לשיקול מחדש נותן שיפור נוסף מעל הבסיס. עבור שלושה מתוך שש קבוצות נתונים, אנחנו מגיעים מדויקת גבוהה יותר משדווחות במחקרים הקודמים. שלושת התוצאות האחרות שוואות למצב המאומנות הנוכחי. הקוד של הקרסול מחדש פורסם כמקור פתוח.', 'jv': 'text-tool-action Ngubah sing nggap, kita supoyo nganggep sistem Normal Normal kuwi suku piye cara-suku langgar tarjamahan karo perusahaan Neral karo ingkang dipolerans Awak dhéwé ngerasah dialectu multi-dialectu bener sing nguasai nggawe barang kandidé. Ngucap Rejalaké koyok barang tarjamahan kanggo dadi multidialectu kuwi alaman, Kasal, Putuk lan slowene. Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi nggawe informasi dialectal sing ngentambah nggawe gerakan kelas perusahaan langkung di antara awak dhéwé. Learn Mode Sampeyan tanggal telu sa sesih dataset, kita wis asèhku kanggo awak dhéwé, dadi sing luwih apik sing kakéwé ning acara sabanjuré. Laptop" and "Desktop Ngubah nggo reranker kuwi paling Open-source', 'sk': 'Normalizacija zgodovinskega besedila, ki se zaveda konteksta, je zelo premalo raziskano področje. Za zapolnitev vrzeli predlagamo kontekstno ozaveščen pristop normalizacije, ki temelji na najsodobnejših metodah v nevronskem strojnem prevajanju in transfernem učenju. Predlagamo večnarečni normalizator s kontekstnim prerazporejanjem kandidatov. Ponovni anker temelji na besednem nivoju n-gramskega jezikovnega modela, ki se uporablja za pet najboljših kandidatov za normalizacijo. Rezultati so ocenjeni na podlagi zgodovinskih večnarečnih podatkovnih naborov nemščine, španske, portugalske in slovenske jezike. Pokazujemo, da vključitev dialektičnih informacij v usposabljanje vodi k izboljšanju natančnosti vseh naborov podatkov. Prerazporejanje, ki se zaveda konteksta, omogoča nadaljnje izboljšanje glede na izhodišče. Pri treh od šestih naborov podatkov dosežemo bistveno višjo natančnost kot v prejšnjih študijah. Drugi trije rezultati so primerljivi s sedanjim stanjem tehnike. Koda ponovnega bankerja je objavljena kot odprtokodna.', 'bo': 'རྗེས་ཐོའི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་ཁོངས To fill the gap we propose a context-aware normalization approach that relies on the state-of-the-art methods in neural machine translation and transfer learning. ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པ་ཚོའི་མི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཅན་གྱི་རྒྱུན་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ། རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིའི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་n-ཚད་ཀྱི་སྔ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྣམས་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་དག་གི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་སྣ་མང་ཆོས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཤིག་བྱེད་ཡོད། འུ་ཚོས་གླེང་སྡོམ་གྱི་བརྡ་དོན་དག་སྒྲིག་ཐད་གནང་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་གནད་སྡུད་ཚང་མ་དང་བདེན་སྐྱོང་ཚད་ལ་ཡ སྐབས་ཡུལ་དྲན་བསྐུལ་གྱི་ཡར་རྒྱས་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་རེད། ཟིན་བྲིས་འདི་༦་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་གྱི་བརྗོད་སྒྲུབ་ནང་གི་ཐོག་ནས་གསལ་བ་ཞི གྲུབ་འབྲས་གཞན་གསུམ་འདི་ཚོ་ད་ལྟོའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཡོད། བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་སྤྱོད་ཨང་རྩིས་ཁུངས་དང་ཁུངས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ལ་བསྒྲགས་བྱས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Exploring Amharic Sentiment Analysis from Social Media Texts : Building Annotation Tools and Classification Models', 'ar': 'استكشاف تحليل المشاعر الأمهرية من نصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي: بناء أدوات الشرح ونماذج التصنيف', 'pt': 'Explorando a análise de sentimentos amáricos a partir de textos de mídia social: construindo ferramentas de anotação e modelos de classificação', 'fr': "Exploration de l'analyse des sentiments en amharique à partir de textes de réseaux sociaux\xa0: création d'outils d'annotation et", 'es': 'Explorando el análisis del sentimiento amárico a partir de textos de redes sociales: creación de herramientas de anotación y modelos de clasificación', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアテキストからのアムハラ語感情分析の探求：注釈ツールと分類モデルの構築', 'zh': '寻社交媒体文本阿姆哈拉情析注释', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया ग्रंथों से अम्हारिक भावना विश्लेषण की खोज: एनोटेशन उपकरण और वर्गीकरण मॉडल का निर्माण', 'ru': 'Изучение анализа амхарских настроений из текстов социальных сетей: создание инструментов аннотирования и моделей классификации', 'ga': 'Anailís Mothúchán Amáireach ó Théacsanna Meáin Shóisialta a Iniúchadh: Uirlisí Anóíochta a Thógáil agus Múnlaí Aicmithe', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედია ტექსტიდან ამჰარიური სისტემისტის ანალიზაციის გამოყენება: ანალიზაციის ხელსაწყოთა და კლასიფიკაციის მოდელების შექმნა', 'hu': 'Amharikus érzelmek elemzése közösségi média szövegekből: Építési jegyzékek és osztályozási modellek', 'el': 'Εξερευνώντας την ανάλυση αμχαρικών συναισθημάτων από κείμενα κοινωνικών μέσων: Κατασκευή εργαλείων σχολιασμού και μοντέλων ταξινόμησης', 'it': "Esplorare l'analisi dei sentimenti amarici dai testi dei social media: strumenti di annotazione edilizia e modelli di classificazione", 'kk': 'Америкалық медиа мәтіндерінен амхарлық сезімдер талдауы: Аңдату құралы мен классификациялау үлгілерін құру', 'mk': 'Истражување на анализа на амхарските чувства од текстите на социјалните медиуми: градење алатки за анотација и модели за класификација', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstų Amharinio jautrumo analizės tyrimas: pastatų anotacijos įrankiai ir klasifikavimo modeliai', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн медиа текстүүдийн амхарик мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээг судлах: Ангилалтын хэрэгсэл болон классификацийн загваруудыг бүтээх', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അമാരിക് സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം', 'ms': 'Menjelaskan Analisi Sensan Amharik dari Teks Media Sosial: Alat Annotasi Bina dan Model Klasifikasi', 'mt': 'L-Esplorazzjoni tal-Analiżi tas-Sentiment Amhariku mit-Testi tal-Midja Soċjali: Għodod ta’ Annotazzjoni tal-Bini u Mudelli ta’ Klassifikazzjoni', 'no': 'Utforskar amharisk sentralanalyse frå sosiale mediatekstar: Bygg merkingsverktøy og klassifikasjonsmodular', 'pl': 'Badanie analizy sentymentów amharycznych z tekstów mediów społecznościowych: budowanie narzędzi anotacyjnych i modeli klasyfikacyjnych', 'ro': 'Explorarea analizei sentimentelor amharice din textele rețelelor de socializare: Instrumente de adnotare și modele de clasificare', 'so': 'Analysis from Social Media Texts: Building Tools and Classification Models', 'si': 'සමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම පාළුවන් වලින් ඇම්හාරික් සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය විස්තර කරනවා: නිර්මාණය සහ', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடக உரைகளிலிருந்து அமாரிக் உணர்வு விளக்கம்: அறிவிப்பு கருவிகள் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் முறைமைகளை உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا متکسٹ سے امهاریک سنٹیمینٹ تحقیقات کی تحقیق کی جاتی ہے: اپنا انٹوریٹ تولیس اور کلاسیٹ موڈل بنانے', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući analizu amharskih sentimenta iz teksta socijalnih medija: izgradnja alata za annotaciju i modela klasifikacije', 'sv': 'Att utforska amharisk känsloanalys från sociala medier: Bygganteckningsverktyg och klassificeringsmodeller', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khám phá Bước phân tích cảm xúc từ các bản thảo phương tiện xã hội:', 'nl': 'Het verkennen van Amharische Sentiment Analysis vanuit sociale media teksten: het bouwen van annotatietools en classificatiemodellen', 'da': 'Udforsk amharisk følelsesanalyse fra tekster på sociale medier: Bygningsannotationsværktøjer og klassifikationsmodeller', 'bg': 'Изследване на амхаричния анализ на сентимента от текстове в социалните медии: изграждане на инструменти за анотация и класификационни модели', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje Amharičke analize sentimenta iz teksta socijalnih medija: izgradnja alata za oznake i modela klasifikacije', 'id': 'Menjelaskan Analisi Sentimen Amharik dari Teks Media Sosial: Menbangun Alat Annotasi dan Model Klasifikasi', 'ko': '소셜 미디어 텍스트에서 암하라어의 감정 분석을 탐색: 주석 도구와 분류 모델 구축', 'de': 'Erforschung der amharischen Stimmungsanalyse aus Social Media Texten: Erstellung von Annotations-Tools und Klassifikationsmodellen', 'fa': 'تحقیق تحلیل احساسات آماریک از متن رسانه اجتماعی', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Seneti ya Kiamhari kutoka Makala ya Mitandao ya Kijamii: Kujenga Vifaa vya Tamko na Vikwaa vya Kuhitimisha', 'af': 'Ondersoek van Amhariese Sentiment Analyseer vanaf sosiale mediatekste: bou Notasie Nutsprogramme en Klassifikasie Modelle', 'sq': 'Shqyrtimi i Analizës së Sentimenteve Amharike nga Tekstet e Mediave Sociale: Ndërtimi i instrumenteve të anotacionit dhe modeleve klasifikimi', 'tr': 'Exploring Amharic Sentiment Analysis from Social Media Texts: Building Annotation Tools and Classification Models', 'az': 'Sosyal M…ôdy…ônin M…ôtnl…ôrin Amharic Sentiment Analizisini t…ôŇükil edir: Annotation Tools and Classification Models Building', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստներից արտահայտված ամհարական զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը. կառուցել նատորական գործիքներ և դասակարգման մոդելներ', 'bn': 'সামাজিক মিডিয়া টেক্সট থেকে আমাহারিক সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ: অ্যানোটেশন টুল নির্মাণ করা এবং বিশ্লেষণ মডেল', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući analizu amharskih sentimenta iz teksta socijalnih medija: izgradnja alata za annotaciju i modela klasifikacije', 'ca': "Explorar l'anàlisi del sentiment amàric a partir de textos dels mitjans socials: Construir eines d'anotació i models de classificació", 'fi': 'Amharisen sentimenttianalyysin tutkiminen sosiaalisen median teksteistä: Annotointityökalujen ja luokitusmallien rakentaminen', 'et': 'Amhariliku sentimendi analüüsi uurimine sotsiaalmeedia tekstidest: annotatsioonivahendite ja klassifitseerimismudelite ehitamine', 'cs': 'Analýza amharických sentimentů z textů sociálních médií: budování anotací a klasifikačních modelů', 'jv': 'Gambar Ketoke Sentiment', 'ha': 'Analyze from social Media Text: Buning Annonation tools and Classification Models', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje amharične analize čustev iz besedil družbenih medijev: gradnja orodij za opombe in klasifikacijskih modelov', 'he': 'חקירת ניתוח רגשות אמהריים מתוך טקסטים של מדיה חברתית: בניית כלי העיתונים ומודלים מסווג', 'bo': 'Exploring Amharic Sentiment Analysis from Social Media Texts: Building Annotation Tools and Classification Models'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the study of sentiment analysis for Amharic social media texts. As the number of social media users is ever-increasing, social media platforms would like to understand the latent meaning and sentiments of a text to enhance decision-making procedures. However, low-resource languages such as Amharic have received less attention due to several reasons such as lack of well-annotated datasets, unavailability of computing resources, and fewer or no expert researchers in the area. This research addresses three main research questions. We first explore the suitability of existing tools for the sentiment analysis task. Annotation tools are scarce to support large-scale annotation tasks in Amharic. Also, the existing crowdsourcing platforms do not support Amharic text annotation. Hence, we build a social-network-friendly annotation tool called ‘ASAB’ using the Telegram bot. We collect 9.4k tweets, where each tweet is annotated by three Telegram users. Moreover, we explore the suitability of machine learning approaches for Amharic sentiment analysis. The FLAIR deep learning text classifier, based on network embeddings that are computed from a distributional thesaurus, outperforms other supervised classifiers. We further investigate the challenges in building a sentiment analysis system for Amharic and we found that the widespread usage of sarcasm and figurative speech are the main issues in dealing with the problem. To advance the sentiment analysis research in Amharic and other related low-resource languages, we release the dataset, the annotation tool, source code, and models publicly under a permissive.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة دراسة تحليل المشاعر لنصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي الأمهرية. نظرًا لأن عدد مستخدمي الوسائط الاجتماعية يتزايد باستمرار ، فإن منصات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ترغب في فهم المعنى والمشاعر الكامنة للنص لتعزيز إجراءات اتخاذ القرار. ومع ذلك ، فقد حظيت اللغات منخفضة الموارد مثل الأمهرية باهتمام أقل نظرًا لعدة أسباب مثل عدم وجود مجموعات بيانات مشروحة جيدًا ، وعدم توفر موارد الحوسبة ، وقلة الباحثين الخبراء أو عدم وجودهم في المنطقة. يتناول هذا البحث ثلاثة أسئلة بحثية رئيسية. نستكشف أولاً مدى ملاءمة الأدوات الحالية لمهمة تحليل المشاعر. أدوات التعليقات التوضيحية نادرة لدعم مهام التعليقات التوضيحية واسعة النطاق باللغة الأمهرية. كما أن منصات التعهيد الجماعي الحالية لا تدعم التعليقات التوضيحية للنص الأمهرية. ومن ثم ، فإننا نبني أداة تعليقات توضيحية ملائمة للشبكات الاجتماعية تسمى "ASAB" باستخدام روبوت Telegram. نقوم بجمع 9.4k تغريدة ، حيث يتم تعليق كل تغريدة بواسطة ثلاثة مستخدمين Telegram. علاوة على ذلك ، نستكشف مدى ملاءمة مناهج التعلم الآلي لتحليل المشاعر الأمهرية. يتفوق مصنف نصوص التعلم العميق FLAIR ، استنادًا إلى حفلات الزفاف الشبكية المحسوبة من قاموس المرادفات التوزيعي ، على المصنفات الأخرى الخاضعة للإشراف. قمنا أيضًا بالتحقيق في التحديات في بناء نظام لتحليل المشاعر للغة الأمهرية ووجدنا أن الاستخدام الواسع النطاق للسخرية والخطاب المجازي هما القضيتان الرئيسيتان في التعامل مع المشكلة. للنهوض ببحوث تحليل المشاعر في\nالأمهرية واللغات الأخرى منخفضة الموارد ذات الصلة ، نصدر مجموعة البيانات وأداة التعليق التوضيحي وكود المصدر والنماذج للجمهور بموجب السماح.', 'fr': "Cet article présente l'étude de l'analyse des sentiments pour les textes de médias sociaux amhariques. Alors que le nombre d'utilisateurs des réseaux sociaux ne cesse d'augmenter, les plateformes de réseaux sociaux aimeraient comprendre le sens et les sentiments latents d'un texte afin d'améliorer les procédures décisionnelles. Cependant, les langues à faibles ressources, comme l'amharique, ont reçu moins d'attention pour plusieurs raisons, notamment le manque de jeux de données bien annotés, l'indisponibilité des ressources informatiques et la diminution ou l'absence de chercheurs experts dans le domaine. Cette recherche répond à trois questions de recherche principales. Nous examinons d'abord la pertinence des outils existants pour la tâche d'analyse des sentiments. Les outils d'annotation sont rares pour prendre en charge les tâches d'annotation à grande échelle en amharique. De plus, les plateformes de crowdsourcing existantes ne prennent pas en charge l'annotation de texte amharique. Par conséquent, nous créons un outil d'annotation adapté aux réseaux sociaux appelé «\xa0ASAB\xa0» à l'aide du bot Telegram. Nous collectons 9,4 000 tweets, chaque tweet étant annoté par trois utilisateurs de Telegram. De plus, nous explorons la pertinence des approches d'apprentissage automatique pour l'analyse des sentiments amhariques. Le classificateur de texte FLAIR Deep Learning, basé sur des intégrations réseau calculées à partir d'un thésaurus distributionnel, surpasse les autres classificateurs supervisés. Nous étudions plus en détail les défis liés à la création d'un système d'analyse des sentiments pour l'amharique et nous avons constaté que l'utilisation généralisée du sarcasme et du langage figuratif est le principal problème pour traiter ce problème. Pour faire progresser la recherche sur l'analyse des sentiments dans\nAmharique et d'autres langages connexes à faible ressource, nous publions le jeu de données, l'outil d'annotation, le code source et les modèles publiquement sous une forme permissive.", 'pt': "Este artigo apresenta o estudo da análise de sentimentos para textos de mídia social amárico. Como o número de usuários de mídia social é cada vez maior, as plataformas de mídia social gostariam de entender o significado e os sentimentos latentes de um texto para aprimorar os procedimentos de tomada de decisão. No entanto, linguagens de poucos recursos, como o amárico, receberam menos atenção devido a vários motivos, como falta de conjuntos de dados bem anotados, indisponibilidade de recursos de computação e menos ou nenhum pesquisador especializado na área. Esta pesquisa aborda três questões principais de pesquisa. Primeiro exploramos a adequação das ferramentas existentes para a tarefa de análise de sentimentos. As ferramentas de anotação são escassas para suportar tarefas de anotação em larga escala em amárico. Além disso, as plataformas de crowdsourcing existentes não suportam anotação de texto amárico. Por isso, criamos uma ferramenta de anotação amigável para redes sociais chamada 'ASAB' usando o bot do Telegram. Coletamos 9,4 mil tweets, onde cada tweet é anotado por três usuários do Telegram. Além disso, exploramos a adequação das abordagens de aprendizado de máquina para a análise de sentimentos amáricos. O classificador de texto de aprendizado profundo FLAIR, baseado em embeddings de rede que são calculados a partir de um dicionário de sinônimos de distribuição, supera outros classificadores supervisionados. Investigamos ainda mais os desafios na construção de um sistema de análise de sentimentos para o amárico e descobrimos que o uso generalizado do sarcasmo e da fala figurativa são os principais problemas para lidar com o problema. Para avançar na pesquisa de análise de sentimentos em\nAmárico e outras linguagens de poucos recursos relacionadas, lançamos o conjunto de dados, a ferramenta de anotação, o código-fonte e os modelos publicamente sob uma permissão.", 'es': "Este artículo presenta el estudio del análisis de sentimientos para los textos amáricos de las redes sociales. Como el número de usuarios de redes sociales aumenta constantemente, a las plataformas de redes sociales les gustaría entender el significado latente y los sentimientos de un texto para mejorar los procedimientos de toma de decisiones. Sin embargo, los idiomas de bajos recursos, como el amhárico, han recibido menos atención debido a varias razones, como la falta de conjuntos de datos bien anotados, la falta de disponibilidad de recursos informáticos y la falta o ausencia de investigadores expertos en el área. Esta investigación aborda tres cuestiones principales de investigación. Primero exploramos la idoneidad de las herramientas existentes para la tarea de análisis de opiniones. Las herramientas de anotación son escasas para admitir tareas de anotación a gran escala en amhárico. Además, las plataformas de crowdsourcing existentes no admiten la anotación de texto en amhárico. Por lo tanto, creamos una herramienta de anotación amigable con las redes sociales llamada `ASAB' utilizando el bot de Telegram. Recopilamos 9,4 000 tuits, en los que tres usuarios de Telegram comentan cada tuit. Además, exploramos la idoneidad de los enfoques de aprendizaje automático para el análisis de la opinión amárica. El clasificador de texto de aprendizaje profundo de FLAIR, basado en incrustaciones de red que se calculan a partir de un tesauro distributivo, supera a otros clasificadores supervisados. Investigamos más a fondo los desafíos en la construcción de un sistema de análisis de sentimientos para el amhárico y descubrimos que el uso generalizado del sarcasmo y el discurso figurativo son los principales problemas para abordar el problema. Para avanzar en la investigación de análisis de sentimientos en\nAmárico y otros lenguajes relacionados de bajos recursos, publicamos el conjunto de datos, la herramienta de anotación, el código fuente y los modelos públicamente bajo un permiso.", 'ja': '本稿では、アムハラ語のソーシャルメディアテキストに対する感情分析の研究を紹介する。 ソーシャルメディアユーザーの数が増えているため、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームは意思決定手順を強化するためにテキストの潜在的な意味と感情を理解したいと考えています。 しかし、アムハラ語などの低資源言語は、よく注釈されたデータセットがない、コンピューティングリソースが利用できない、この分野の専門家研究者が少ない、またはいないなどのいくつかの理由により、あまり注目されていない。 この研究では、3つの主要な研究課題に取り組んでいます。 まず、センチメント分析タスクに対する既存のツールの適合性を探ります。 アノテーションツールは、アムハラ語の大規模なアノテーションタスクをサポートするために乏しい。 また、既存のクラウドソーシングプラットフォームはアムハラ語のテキスト注釈をサポートしていません。 そのため、Telegramボットを使用して「ASAB」と呼ばれるソーシャルネットワークフレンドリーなアノテーションツールを構築します。 私たちは9.4kのツイートを収集し、各ツイートにはTelegramの3人のユーザーによる注釈が付けられています。 さらに、アムハラ語の感情分析に対する機械学習アプローチの適合性を探る。 分布シソーラスから計算されたネットワーク埋め込みに基づいたFLAIRディープラーニングテキスト分類子は、他の監視下の分類子よりも優れている。 さらに、アムハラ語の感情分析システム構築の課題を調査したところ、皮肉と比喩的発話の広範な使用が、この問題に対処する上での主な課題であることがわかりました。 日本におけるセンチメント分析研究を進めるため\nAmharicやその他の関連する低リソース言語では、データセット、アノテーションツール、ソースコード、およびモデルを許容範囲で公開しています。', 'zh': '本文引阿姆哈拉语社交媒体文本之情析而究之。 随社交媒体用户数量增益,社交媒体台冀知文本潜在义情,以增决策程序。 然以乏注良数,乏计算资源及当域专家治人少、无专家治人等多故,诸如阿姆哈拉语等低资源言语所关注者少。 本究三要。 先论见具宜情事。 阿姆哈拉语大注记注记器少。 此外,见众包平台不支阿姆哈拉语文本注。 故以Telegram机器人为ASAB社交网络好注具。 收拾9.4k推文,每条推文三Telegram用户注释。 此外讨论机器学术阿姆哈拉情析之适用性。 FLAIR 深习文本分类器基于分布词库计网络嵌之,其性优于他监分类器。 吾更考阿姆哈拉语立情析统,见刺喻性语言博用者,治之大体也。 推情析理\n阿姆哈拉语与其他相关低资源语,许下公行数集,注释器用,源代码与模形。', 'hi': "यह पेपर अम्हारिक सोशल मीडिया ग्रंथों के लिए भावना विश्लेषण का अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करता है। जैसा कि सोशल मीडिया उपयोगकर्ताओं की संख्या लगातार बढ़ रही है, सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफॉर्म निर्णय लेने की प्रक्रियाओं को बढ़ाने के लिए एक पाठ के अव्यक्त अर्थ और भावनाओं को समझना चाहते हैं। हालांकि, कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं जैसे कि अम्हारिक को कई कारणों से कम ध्यान दिया गया है जैसे कि अच्छी तरह से एनोटेट किए गए डेटासेट की कमी, कंप्यूटिंग संसाधनों की अनुपलब्धता, और क्षेत्र में कम या कोई विशेषज्ञ शोधकर्ता नहीं। यह शोध तीन मुख्य शोध प्रश्नों को संबोधित करता है। हम पहले भावना विश्लेषण कार्य के लिए मौजूदा उपकरणों की उपयुक्तता का पता लगाते हैं। एनोटेशन उपकरण Amharic में बड़े पैमाने पर एनोटेशन कार्यों का समर्थन करने के लिए दुर्लभ हैं। इसके अलावा, मौजूदा क्राउडसोर्सिंग प्लेटफ़ॉर्म Amharic पाठ एनोटेशन का समर्थन नहीं करते हैं। इसलिए, हम टेलीग्राम बॉट का उपयोग करके 'एएसएबी' नामक एक सामाजिक-नेटवर्क-अनुकूल एनोटेशन टूल का निर्माण करते हैं। हम 9.4k tweets एकत्र करते हैं, जहां प्रत्येक ट्वीट को तीन टेलीग्राम उपयोगकर्ताओं द्वारा एनोटेट किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, हम अम्हारिक भावना विश्लेषण के लिए मशीन सीखने के दृष्टिकोण की उपयुक्तता का पता लगाते हैं। फ्लेयर डीप लर्निंग टेक्स्ट क्लासिफायर, नेटवर्क एम्बेडिंग पर आधारित है जो एक वितरण थिसॉरस से गणना की जाती है, अन्य पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायरों को मात देता है। हम आगे अम्हारिक के लिए एक भावना विश्लेषण प्रणाली के निर्माण में चुनौतियों की जांच करते हैं और हमने पाया कि व्यंग्य और आलंकारिक भाषण का व्यापक उपयोग समस्या से निपटने में मुख्य मुद्दे हैं। में भावना विश्लेषण अनुसंधान को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए\nAmharic और अन्य संबंधित कम संसाधन भाषाओं, हम डेटासेट, एनोटेशन उपकरण, स्रोत कोड, और एक अनुमेय के तहत सार्वजनिक रूप से मॉडल जारी करते हैं।", 'ru': 'В данной статье представлено исследование анализа настроений для текстов в социальных сетях на амхарском языке. Поскольку число пользователей социальных сетей постоянно растет, платформы социальных сетей хотели бы понять скрытый смысл и настроения текста для улучшения процедур принятия решений. Однако языкам с ограниченными ресурсами, таким как амхарский язык, уделяется меньше внимания по ряду причин, таких как отсутствие хорошо аннотированных наборов данных, отсутствие вычислительных ресурсов и меньшее число или отсутствие экспертов-исследователей в этой области. Это исследование затрагивает три основных вопроса исследования. Сначала мы исследуем пригодность существующих инструментов для задачи анализа настроений. Инструментов для аннотирования недостаточно для поддержки крупномасштабных задач аннотирования на амхарском языке. Кроме того, существующие краудсорсинговые платформы не поддерживают текстовую аннотацию на амхарском языке. Поэтому с помощью Telegram-бота мы создаем удобный для социальных сетей инструмент аннотирования под названием ASAB. Мы собираем 9,4 тыс. твитов, где каждый твит аннотируется тремя пользователями Telegram. Кроме того, мы исследуем пригодность подходов машинного обучения для анализа амхарских настроений. Классификатор текста глубокого обучения Flair, основанный на сетевых вложениях, которые вычисляются из дистрибьюторского тезауруса, превосходит другие контролируемые классификаторы. Мы продолжаем исследовать проблемы в создании системы анализа настроений для амхарского языка и обнаружили, что широкое использование сарказма и образной речи являются основными проблемами в решении этой проблемы. Продвижение исследования анализа настроений в\nАмхарский и другие родственные языки с низким уровнем ресурсов, мы выпускаем набор данных, инструмент аннотации, исходный код и модели публично под разрешительным знаком.', 'ga': "Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair an staidéar ar anailís sentiment do théacsanna meáin shóisialta Amáiris. Toisc go bhfuil méadú ag teacht ar líon na n-úsáideoirí meán sóisialta de shíor, ba mhaith le hardáin na meán sóisialta brí agus mothúcháin fholaigh téacs a thuiscint chun nósanna imeachta cinnteoireachta a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, is lú an aird a tugadh ar theangacha íseal-acmhainne ar nós Amáiris mar gheall ar go leor cúiseanna ar nós easpa tacair shonraí dea-anótáilte, gan a bheith ar fáil d’acmhainní ríomhaireachta, agus níos lú taighdeoirí saineolacha nó gan aon taighdeoirí sa réimse. Tugann an taighde seo aghaidh ar thrí phríomhcheist taighde. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar dtús ar oiriúnacht na n-uirlisí atá ann cheana féin don tasc anailíse meon. Tá uirlisí anótála gann chun tacú le tascanna anótála ar mhórscála san Amáiris. Chomh maith leis sin, ní thacaíonn na hardáin sluafhoinsithe atá ann faoi láthair le nótáil téacs Amarais. Mar sin, tógaimid uirlis nótaí atá cairdiúil don líonra sóisialta ar a dtugtar `ASAB' ag baint úsáide as an bot Telegram. Bailímid 9.4k tweets, áit a bhfuil gach tweet anótáilte ag triúr úsáideoir Telegram. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid iniúchadh ar oiriúnacht na gcur chuige meaisínfhoghlama le haghaidh anailíse ar dhearcadh Amáireach. Feidhmíonn an t-aicmitheoir téacs domhainfhoghlama FLAIR, atá bunaithe ar leabaithe líonra a ríomhtar ó theasáras dáileacháin, níos fearr ná aicmitheoirí eile faoi mhaoirseacht. Déanaimid imscrúdú breise ar na dúshláin a bhaineann le córas anailíse meon a thógáil don Amáireach agus fuaireamar amach gurb iad úsáid fhorleathan searbhas agus urlabhra fhíoraíoch na príomhcheisteanna chun déileáil leis an bhfadhb. Chun an taighde anailíse sentiment a chur chun cinn i\nAmarach agus teangacha eile a bhaineann le hacmhainní ísle, eisímid an tacar sonraí, an uirlis nótaí, an cód foinse agus na samhlacha go poiblí faoi cheadúnas.", 'hu': "Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az amári közösségi média szövegek érzelmi elemzésének tanulmányát. Mivel a közösségi média felhasználók száma egyre növekszik, a közösségi média platformok szeretnék megérteni a szöveg rejtett jelentését és érzelmeit, hogy javítsák a döntéshozatali eljárásokat. Azonban az alacsony erőforrású nyelvek, mint például az amharic, kevesebb figyelmet kaptak számos ok miatt, mint például a jól megjegyzett adatkészletek hiánya, a számítástechnikai erőforrások hiánya, és kevesebb vagy egyetlen szakértő kutató a területen. A kutatás három fő kutatási kérdéssel foglalkozik. Először a meglévő eszközök alkalmasságát vizsgáljuk az érzelmek elemzésére. A jegyzetelési eszközök ritkán támogatják a nagyszabású jegyzetelési feladatokat amharic nyelven. Továbbá a meglévő közösségi források platformjai nem támogatják az amhari szövegjegyzéseket. Ezért építünk egy közösségi hálózat-barát jegyzetfelvételi eszközt `ASAB' a Telegram bot használatával. 9,4 ezer tweetet gyűjtünk, ahol minden tweetet három Telegram felhasználó jegyzeteli. Ezenkívül megvizsgáljuk a gépi tanulási megközelítések alkalmasságát az amári érzelmek elemzésére. A FLAIR mélytanulási szövegosztályozó, amely disztribúciós tezauruszból számított hálózati beágyazásokon alapul, felülmúlja a többi felügyelt osztályozót. Tovább vizsgáljuk az amári érzelmi elemző rendszer kiépítésének kihívásait, és megállapítottuk, hogy a probléma kezelésében a szarkazmus és a figuratív beszéd széles körű használata a legfontosabb kérdés. A szentimentális elemzés kutatásának előmozdítása\nAmhár és más kapcsolódó alacsony erőforrású nyelvek, az adatkészletet, a jegyzetelő eszközt, a forráskódot és a modelleket nyilvánosan engedélyezett módon adjuk ki.", 'it': "Questo articolo presenta lo studio dell'analisi del sentiment per i testi dei social media amharici. Poiché il numero di utenti dei social media è in costante aumento, le piattaforme di social media vorrebbero comprendere il significato latente e i sentimenti di un testo per migliorare le procedure decisionali. Tuttavia, linguaggi a basso contenuto di risorse come l'amharico hanno ricevuto meno attenzione a causa di diversi motivi come la mancanza di set di dati ben annotati, l'indisponibilità di risorse informatiche e meno o meno ricercatori esperti nel settore. Questa ricerca affronta tre principali questioni di ricerca. Esaminiamo innanzitutto l'idoneità degli strumenti esistenti per il compito di analisi del sentiment. Gli strumenti di annotazione sono scarsi per supportare attività di annotazione su larga scala in amarico. Inoltre, le piattaforme di crowdsourcing esistenti non supportano l'annotazione di testo amharica. Quindi, costruiamo uno strumento di annotazione adatto ai social network chiamato `ASAB' utilizzando il bot Telegram. Raccogliamo 9.4k tweet, dove ogni tweet è annotato da tre utenti di Telegram. Inoltre, esploriamo l'idoneità degli approcci di machine learning per l'analisi del sentiment amharico. Il classificatore di testi di deep learning FLAIR, basato su incorporazioni di rete calcolate da un thesaurus distributivo, supera gli altri classificatori supervisionati. Esaminiamo ulteriormente le sfide nella costruzione di un sistema di analisi sentimentale per l'amharico e abbiamo scoperto che l'uso diffuso del sarcasmo e del discorso figurativo sono i principali problemi nell'affrontare il problema. Avanzare la ricerca di analisi sentimentale in\nAmharici e altri linguaggi correlati a basso contenuto di risorse, rilasciamo pubblicamente il set di dati, lo strumento di annotazione, il codice sorgente e i modelli in modo permissivo.", 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის შესწავლება ამჰარიური სოციალური მედია ტექსტის. როგორც სოციალური მედია მომხმარებლის რაოდენობა უფრო მეტივს, სოციალური მედია პლატატურები მინდა გავიგოთ ტექსტის სიტყვა და სენტიმენტები, რომელიც უფრო მეტივს მაგრამ, მაგრამ აღარიური ენები, როგორც აღარიური, აღარიური უფრო აღმოჩენა რამდენიმე მიზეზებით, როგორც ძალიან აღმოჩენილი მონაცემების კომპიუტერის შესაძლებლობა, კომპიუტერის ეს შესწავლობა სამი მნიშვნელოვანი კითხვების შესახებ. ჩვენ პირველად გავაკეთებთ სექსენტიმენტის ანალიზის დავალებისთვის სექსენტიური ხელსაწყობილობას. ანოტაციის ხელსაწყობილობი არაფერიან, რომ ამჰარიკში დიდი მაგალითი ანოტაციის მომხმარება. მხოლოდ, მუშაობაში მუშაობაში მუშაობაში ტექსტის ანოტაციას არ დაეხმარებს. ამიტომ, ჩვენ სოციალური ქსელის მეგობრებელი ანოტაციის ხელსაწყო, რომელიც სახელია `ASAB' ტელექსელი ბოტის გამოყენებით. ჩვენ 9.4k ტივიტები შევქმნით, სადაც ყოველ ტივიტები სამი ტელექტორის გამოყენებელი დაბრუნდება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ მანქანის სწავლების შესაძლებლობა ამჰარიური სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის. FLAIR კლასიფიკაცია ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც ქსელის ინბედინგიდან დაბაზეულია, რომელიც დისტრიბუციონალური ტესასურისგან გამომუშავებულია, უფრო გავაკეთება ს ჩვენ უკვე ამჰარიკის სენტიმენტის ანალიზის სისტემის შექმნა გამოყენება და ჩვენ აღმოვაჩინეთ, რომ საპკაზმის და ფიგურატიური საუკუნოს გამოყენება ყველაფერი პრობლემების გასაკეთებ სენტიმენტის ანალიზიზიის განვითარება\nამჰარიური და სხვა შესაბამისი ცოტა რესურსების ენაზები, ჩვენ მონაცემების სექტი, ანოტაციის ხელსაწყო, ფუნქციური კოდი და მოდელები საშუალოდ დავხსნა", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τη μελέτη της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων για κείμενα των αμχαρικών μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Καθώς ο αριθμός των χρηστών των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης αυξάνεται συνεχώς, οι πλατφόρμες κοινωνικής δικτύωσης θα ήθελαν να κατανοήσουν το λανθάνον νόημα και τα συναισθήματα ενός κειμένου για να βελτιώσουν τις διαδικασίες λήψης αποφάσεων. Ωστόσο, γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους όπως τα αμχαρικά έχουν λάβει λιγότερη προσοχή λόγω αρκετών λόγων, όπως η έλλειψη καλά σχολιασμένων συνόλων δεδομένων, η μη διαθεσιμότητα υπολογιστικών πόρων και λιγότεροι ή καθόλου εμπειρογνώμονες στην περιοχή. Η έρευνα αυτή αφορά τρία κύρια ερευνητικά ερωτήματα. Αρχικά διερευνούμε την καταλληλότητα των υφιστάμενων εργαλείων για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Τα εργαλεία σχολιασμού είναι σπάνια για να υποστηρίξουν εργασίες σχολιασμού μεγάλης κλίμακας στα Αμχάριτς. Επίσης, οι υπάρχουσες πλατφόρμες δεν υποστηρίζουν την επισήμανση αμχαρικού κειμένου. Ως εκ τούτου, χτίζουμε ένα φιλικό προς το κοινωνικό δίκτυο εργαλείο σχολιασμού που ονομάζεται χρησιμοποιώντας το ρομπότ τηλεγραφήματος. Συλλέγουμε 9.4όπου κάθε tweet σχολιάζεται από τρεις χρήστες του τηλεγραφήματος. Επιπλέον, διερευνούμε την καταλληλότητα των προσεγγίσεων μηχανικής μάθησης για την ανάλυση αμχαρικών συναισθημάτων. Ο ταξινομητής κειμένου βαθιάς μάθησης, βασισμένος σε ενσωματώσεις δικτύων που υπολογίζονται από έναν διανομικό θησαυρό, ξεπερνά τους άλλους εποπτευόμενους ταξινομητές. Ερευνούμε περαιτέρω τις προκλήσεις στην οικοδόμηση ενός συστήματος ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων για το Αμχάρικ και διαπιστώσαμε ότι η ευρεία χρήση του σαρκασμού και της εικονιστικής ομιλίας είναι τα κύρια ζητήματα για την αντιμετώπιση του προβλήματος. Για να προωθήσει την έρευνα ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων στην\nΑμχαρικές και άλλες σχετικές γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου, απελευθερώνουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων, το εργαλείο σχολιασμού, τον πηγαίο κώδικα και τα μοντέλα δημοσίως υπό μια επιτρεπτή.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomas Amharos socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstų jausmų analizės tyrimas. Kadangi socialinės žiniasklaidos naudotojų skaičius vis didėja, socialinės žiniasklaidos platformos norėtų suprasti paslėptą teksto reikšmę ir jausmus sprendimų priėmimo procedūroms gerinti. Tačiau mažai išteklių turinčios kalbos, pavyzdžiui, Amharika, buvo mažiau dėmesio skiriamos dėl kelių priežas čių, pavyzdžiui, gerai pažymėtų duomenų rinkinių trūkumo, skaičiavimo išteklių nepakankamumo ir mažiau arba jokių ekspertų šioje srityje. Šiuose tyrimuose nagrinėjami trys pagrindiniai mokslinių tyrimų klausimai. Pirmiausia tiriame esamų priemonių tinkamumą jautrumo analizės užduotims atlikti. Anotacijos priemonių, skirtų didelio masto anotacijos Amharikoje užduotims remti, yra nedaug. Also, the existing crowdsourcing platforms do not support Amharic text annotation.  Taigi, naudodami Telegram robotą, sukuriame socialiniam tinklui palankią anotacijos priemonę, vadinamą ASAB. Mes renkame 9,4k tweetus, kuriuose kiekvieną tweet ą anotuoja trys telegramų naudotojai. Be to, mes tiriame mašininio mokymosi metodų tinkamumą Amharijos jausmų analizei. FLAIR gilaus mokymosi teksto klasifikatorius, grindžiamas tinklo įdėjimais, apskaičiuotais iš platinimo tezauro, yra didesnis už kitus prižiūrimus klasifikatorius. We further investigate the challenges in building a sentiment analysis system for Amharic and we found that the widespread usage of sarcasm and figurative speech are the main issues in dealing with the problem.  Padidinti jautrumo analizės mokslinius tyrimus\nAmharinės ir kitos susijusios mažai išteklių turinčios kalbos skelbia duomenų rinkinį, anotacijos priemonę, šaltinio kodą ir modelius viešai pagal leidimą.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ја претставува студијата на анализа на чувствата за текстите на амхарските социјални медиуми. Бидејќи бројот на корисниците на социјалните медиуми се зголемува, платформите на социјалните медиуми би сакале да го разберат тајното значење и чувствата на текст за подобрување на процедурите на донесување одлуки. However, low-resource languages such as Amharic have received less attention due to several reasons such as lack of well-annotated datasets, unavailability of computing resources, and fewer or no expert researchers in the area.  Овие истражувања се обраќаат на три главни истражувачки прашања. Прво ја истражуваме соодветноста на постојните алатки за задачата за анализа на чувствата. Инструментите за анотација се ретки за поддршка на големи задачи за анотација во Амхариќ. Исто така, постојните платформи за пулсурсирање не ја поддржуваат анотацијата на амхарскиот текст. Затоа, градиме алатка за анотација пријателска со социјалната мрежа наречена „ ASAB “ користејќи го роботот Телеграма. Земаме 9,4k твитови, каде што секој твит е анотиран од тројца корисници на Телеграми. Moreover, we explore the suitability of machine learning approaches for Amharic sentiment analysis.  Класификаторот на текст за длабоко учење на FLAIR, базиран на мрежни вградувања кои се компјутирани од дистрибуционален тезаурус, ги надминува другите надгледувани класификатори. Понатаму ги истражуваме предизвиците во изградбата на систем на анализа на чувствата за Амхариќ и откривме дека широката употреба на сарказмот и фигуративниот говор се главните прашања во решавањето на проблемот. Да го напредуваме истражувањето на анализата на чувствата во\nАмарички и други поврзани јазици со ниски ресурси, го ослободуваме наборот на податоци, алатката за анотација, изворниот код и моделите јавно под дозвола.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Амхариялық социаллық медиа мәтіндерінің сезімдерді анализ зерттеуді көрсетеді. Социалдық медиа пайдаланушыларының саны көтеріп жатқанда, социалдық медиа платформалары шешімдеу процедурлерін көтеру үшін мәтіннің соңғы мазмұнын мен сезімдерін түсіну қалады. Бірақ Амхарик секілді төменгі ресурс тілдері бірнеше себептерінің себебі, жақсы белгілі деректер жиындары жоқ, есептеу ресурстарының мүмкіндігі жоқ және осы аумақтағы эксперттер зерттеушілері жоқ. Бұл зерттеу үш негізгі зерттеу сұрақтарын жасайды. Біз біріншіден сезімді анализ тапсырмасының барлық құралдарының әдімгісін зерттейміз. Амхариялық жазбалардың үлкен масштабтау тапсырмаларын қолдауға келмейді. Сонымен қатар, барлық көпшілік көпшілік платформалар Амхариялық мәтін жазбаларын қолдамайды. Сондықтан, біз "ASAB" деп аталатын қоғамдық желінің жаңалық құрылғысын Telegram боттарын қолданып құрамыз. Біз 9.4k tweets жинап, әрбір tweet үш Telegram пайдаланушылары жазылады. Қосымша, біз Амхариялық сезімдерді анализ үшін машинаны оқыту мүмкіндігін зерттейміз. FLAIR терең оқыту мәтін классификаторы, үлестірілген тесаурдан есептелген желінің ендіріміне негізделген, басқа басқа қарау классификаторларынан шығарылады. Біз Амхарик үшін сезімдік анализ жүйесін құру үшін мәселелерді зерттеп, сарказм және фигурациялық сөйлеменің көпшілігі - мәселелердің негізгі мәселелері. Сөздікті анализ зерттеулерін өзгерту үшін\nАмхариялық және басқа қатынасыз көп ресурс тілдері, деректер жиынын, жазбалар құралы, көз кодын және үлгілерді көпшілікті рұқсат етілген.', 'ms': "Kertas ini memperkenalkan kajian analisis perasaan untuk teks media sosial Amharic. Bila jumlah pengguna media sosial semakin meningkat, platform media sosial ingin memahami makna dan perasaan tertutup teks untuk meningkatkan prosedur keputusan. Namun, bahasa sumber rendah seperti Amharic telah menerima kurang perhatian kerana beberapa alasan seperti kekurangan set data yang dicatat dengan baik, tidak tersedia sumber komputer, dan kurang atau tiada penyelidik pakar di kawasan ini. Penelitian ini mengatasi tiga soalan penelitian utama. Kita pertama-tama mengeksplorasi kemampuan alat yang ada untuk tugas analisis perasaan. Alat anotasi jarang menyokong tugas anotasi skala besar dalam Amharic. Juga, platforma crowdsourcing yang ada tidak menyokong anotasi teks Amharic. Hence, we build a social-network-friendly annotation tool called `ASAB' using the Telegram bot.  We collect 9.4k tweets, where each tweet is annotated by three Telegram users.  Selain itu, kami mengeksplorasi kemampuan pendekatan pembelajaran mesin untuk analisis perasaan Amharic. Pengklasifikasi teks belajar dalam FLAIR, berdasarkan penyembedding rangkaian yang dikira dari tesaur distribusi, melebihi pengklasifikasi yang dikendalikan lain. Kami menyelidiki lebih lanjut cabaran dalam membina sistem analisis perasaan untuk Amharic dan kami mendapati bahawa penggunaan luas sarkasm dan ucapan figuratif adalah isu utama dalam menghadapi masalah. Untuk melanjutkan kajian analisis perasaan dalam\nBahasa amharik dan bahasa sumber rendah yang berkaitan lain, kami melepaskan set data, alat anotasi, kod sumber, dan model secara awam di bawah kebenaran.", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-istudju tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti għat-testi tal-midja soċjali Amharika. Peress li n-numru ta’ utenti tal-midja soċjali qed jiżdied dejjem aktar, il-pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali jixtiequ jifhmu t-tifsira u s-sentimenti moħbija ta’ test biex itejbu l-proċeduri tat-teħid tad-deċiżjonijiet. Madankollu, lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi bħall-Amharic irċevew inqas attenzjoni minħabba diversi raġunijiet bħan-nuqqas ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta annotati sew, in-nuqqas ta’ disponibbiltà tar-riżorsi tal-kompjuter, u inqas jew l-ebda riċerkatur espert fil-qasam. Din ir-riċerka tindirizza tliet mistoqsijiet ewlenin ta’ riċerka. L-ewwel nistudjaw l-adegwatezza tal-għodod eżistenti għall-kompitu tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti. Annotation tools are scarce to support large-scale annotation tasks in Amharic.  Barra minn hekk, il-pjattaformi eżistenti ta’ crowdsourcing ma jappoġġjawx l-annotazzjoni tat-test Amharic. Għalhekk, a ħna nibnu għodda ta' annotazzjoni favur in-netwerk soċjali msejħa 'ASAB' bl-użu tal-robot Telegram. We collect 9.4k tweets, where each tweet is annotated by three Telegram users.  Barra minn hekk, nesploraw l-adegwatezza tal-approċċi tat-tagħlim tal-magni għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti Amhariċi. Il-klassifikatur tat-test tat-tagħlim profond FLAIR, ibbażat fuq l-inkorporazzjonijiet tan-netwerk li huma kkalkulati minn tesauru ta’ distribuzzjoni, jaqbeż klassifikaturi superviżi oħra. Aħna ninvestigaw aktar l-isfidi fil-bini ta’ sistema ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti għall-Amharic u sabu li l-użu mifrux tas-sarkasmu u d-diskors figurattiv huma l-kwistjonijiet ewlenin biex tiġi indirizzata l-problem a. Biex titmexxa 'l quddiem ir-riċerka dwar l-analiżi tas-sentimenti f'\nLingwi ammariċi u lingwi oħra relatati b’riżorsi baxxi, nirrilaxxaw is-sett tad-dejta, l-għodda ta’ annotazzjoni, il-kodiċi tas-sors, u mudelli pubblikament taħt permess.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ആമാരിക്ക് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വികാരണവിശ്വാസം കാണിക്കുന സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ എണ്ണം കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു ടെക എന്നാലും അമാരിക്ക് പോലുള്ള കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷകള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ശ്രദ്ധ കൈക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. നല്ല വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d, കണക്കൂട്ടുനോക്കുന്നത ഈ ഗവേഷണം മൂന്നു പ്രധാന പരിശോധന ചോദ്യങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം നിലവിലുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അമാരിക്കിലെ വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി അറിയിപ്പുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് കുറച്ചുപ ഇപ്പോഴും നിലവിലുള്ള പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200d ആമാരിക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് അറിവ് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നില്ല. അതുകൊണ്ട്, ടെലിഗ്രാം ബോട്ട് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് 'ASAB' എന്ന് പേരുള്ള ഒരു സാമൂഹ്യ-നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് സുഹൃത്തുക്കളായ വി നമ്മള്\u200d 9.4k ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഓരോ ടെലിഗ്രാം ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d വിഷമിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മള്\u200d യന്ത്ര പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ആഗ്രഹം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടിയാണ്. നെറ്റര്\u200dനെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും കണക്ക് ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കണക്ക് ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആ നമ്മള്\u200d ആമാരിക്കിനുള്ള ഒരു വികാരശ്രദ്ധ സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണത്തിന്റെ പഠനത്തിലേക്ക് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടാന്\u200d\nആമാരിക്കും മറ്റുള്ള കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെയും ഭാഷകളും, ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ്, അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ ഉപകരണവും, സോര്\u200dസ് കോഡും മോഡ", 'pl': "W artykule przedstawiono badanie analizy sentymentów dla amharickich tekstów mediów społecznościowych. Ponieważ liczba użytkowników mediów społecznościowych stale rosną, platformy mediów społecznościowych chciałyby zrozumieć ukryte znaczenie i sentymenty tekstu, aby usprawnić procedury podejmowania decyzji. Jednakże języki o niskich zasobach, takie jak amharic, otrzymały mniejszą uwagę z kilku powodów, takich jak brak dobrze adnotacyjnych zbiorów danych, brak dostępności zasobów obliczeniowych i mniej lub brak ekspertów w tej dziedzinie. Badania te dotyczą trzech głównych pytań badawczych. Najpierw badamy przydatność istniejących narzędzi do analizy sentymentów. Narzędzia do adnotacji są rzadkie, aby obsługiwać duże zadania adnotacji w Amharic. Ponadto istniejące platformy crowdsourcingowe nie obsługują adnotacji tekstowych Amharic. Stąd budujemy przyjazne dla sieci społecznościowej narzędzie do adnotacji o nazwie `ASAB' za pomocą bota Telegram. Zbieramy 9.4k tweety, gdzie każdy tweet jest adnotatowany przez trzech użytkowników Telegramu. Ponadto badamy przydatność metod uczenia maszynowego do analizy sentymentów amharicznych. Klasyfikator tekstu głębokiego uczenia FLAIR, oparty na osadzeniach sieciowych obliczanych na podstawie tezaura dystrybucyjnego, przewyższa inne nadzorowane klasyfikatory. Dalej badamy wyzwania związane z budowaniem systemu analizy sentymentów dla Amharic i stwierdziliśmy, że powszechne stosowanie sarkazmu i mowy figuratywnej są głównymi zagadnieniami w rozwiązywaniu problemu. Aby rozwijać badania analizy sentymentów w\nAmharic i inne powiązane języki niskiego zasobu, publikujemy zbiór danych, narzędzie adnotacyjne, kod źródłowy i modele publicznie w ramach permissive.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Амхарийн нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээний судалгааг харуулдаг. Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчийн тоо ихэвчлэн нэмэгддэг учраас, нийгмийн мэдээллийн платформ шийдвэр гаргах процедурыг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд текст болон мэдрэмж ойлгохыг хүсч байна. Гэхдээ Амхарик шиг бага ресурсов хэлнүүд маш бага анхаарлыг олон шалтгаанаас илүү анхаарлаа авч ирсэн. Мэдээж өгөгдлийн сангууд байхгүй, тооцоолж чадахгүй байх болон энэ талаарх мэргэжилтэн судлаачид бага эсвэл бага. Энэ судалгаанд 3 үндсэн судалгааны асуултыг харуулдаг. Эхлээд бид сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээний ажил дээр сууж байгаа хэрэгслүүдийг судалж байна. Амхарик дахь том хэмжээний анзаарлын ажил дэмжих нь хэцүү. Мөн олон нийгмийн асуудлын платформ нь Амхарийн текст анзаарлыг дэмждэггүй. Тиймээс бид "ASAB" гэдэг нийгмийн сүлжээний найзуудтай анзаарах хэрэгсэл бүтээж байна. Бид 9.4k tweets цуглуулдаг. Твитт бүр 3 Telegram хэрэглэгчид анзаарагддаг. Мөн бид амхар сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд машин суралцах хэрэгтэй талаар судалж байна. FLAIR-ын гүн гүнзгий суралцах текст хуваарилагч, хуваарилагч тезаураас тооцоолж байгаа сүлжээний нэвтрүүлэг дээр багтаж бусад удирдлагатай хуваарилагчдаас гарч ирдэг. Бид Амхарикийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээний системийг бүтээх сорилтуудыг судалж байлаа. Бид асуудалтай хамгийн чухал асуудал гэдгийг ойлгосон. Сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээний судалгааг\nАмхар болон бусад хамааралтай бага нөөцийн хэлнүүд бид өгөгдлийн санг, анзаарах хэрэгсэл, эх үүсвэрийн код болон загварууд нийтэд зөвшөөрөх боломжтой.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser studien av sentimentanalisering for amharske sosiale media-tekstar. Som talet på sosiale mediabrukarar er aldri aukande, vil sosiale mediaplattformar forstå den latere meningen og sentimentane av ein tekst for å forbetra avgjøringsprosedyrar. Men låg ressursspråk som Amharisk har fått mindre oppmerksomhet på grunn av fleire grunnar som mangling av velmerket datasett, ikkje tilgjengeleg dataressursar og feir eller ingen ekspertforskere i området. Denne forskninga adresserer tre hovudforskningsspørsmål. Vi undersøker først korleis det finst for eksisterande verktøy for oppgåva for sentimentanalisering. Merknadsverktøya er lite for å støtta store oppgåver for merking i Amharisk. Dei eksisterande crowdsourcing- plattformene støttar ikkje amharisk tekstnotasjon. Derfor bygger vi eit sosialt nettverksvennlig annotasjonsverktøy kalla « ASAB » med Telegram-boten. Vi samler 9,4k-tweet, der kvar tweet er notat av tre Telegram-brukarar. I tillegg undersøker vi tilpassigheten til å lære maskinenærmingar for amhariske sentimentanalyse. FLAIR- klassifiseringen for dypt læring av tekst, basert på nettverksinnbygging som vert rekna ut frå ein distribusjonal teorus, utfører andre oversikte klassifiserar. Vi undersøker framover utfordringane i å bygge eit sentimentanalysesystem for Amharisk, og vi fann at det breidde bruken av sarkasm og figurativt tale er dei viktigste problemene i å handtera problemet. For å forstå sentimentanalysen i\nAmharisk og andre relaterte låg ressursspråk, vi løyser datasettet, annotasjonsverktøyet, kjeldekode og modeller offentlig under ein tillat.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa lagu qoraa baaritaanka kaleemeyska shahaadada daryeelka bulshada ee Amharika. Sida ay tirada isticmaalayaasha mitandada bulshada ayaa sii kordhaya, jarayooyinka shabakada bulshada ayaa doonaya inay fahamaan micnaha ugu dambeeya iyo fikrada qoraalka si ay u kordhiso go’aanka go’aanka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee luqadaha hoose ee rasmi ah, tusaale ahaan Amharic, waxay u haysteen dhawr sababo ah, tusaale ahaan baahida taariikhda oo aad u baahan, waajibaadka xisaabinta, iyo kuwa yar ama aan aheyn cilmi-baarayaasha gaarka ah ee dalkaas. Baaritaankaas waxaa loola hadlaa saddex su'aalo oo baaritaanka muhiimka ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu baarinaynaa habboonaanta qalabka joogta oo loo sameynayo shaqada baaritaanta fikrada. Qalabka wargelintu waa adag tahay in ay kaalmeeyaan shaqooyinka caawimaadda oo waaweyn ee Amharic. Sidoo kale platformada ay jiraan kooxo-sourceed oo dadka ka mid ah ma caawinayaan warqada qoraalka Amharinka. Taas darteed waxaynu dhisnaa qalabka caawimaadda shabakadda bulshada ee la yidhaahdo 'ASAB' isticmaalka xarunta Telegram. Waxaynu soo kulminaynaa 9.4k tweeti, kaas oo Twitteet walba lagu dhibaateeyo saddex isticmaalayaal oo Telegram ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu baarinaynaa habboonaanta waxbarashada machadka ee loo baaraandegayo baaritaanka fikrada Amharik. The FLAIR deep learning text classifier, based on network embeddings that are computed from a distributional thesaurus, outperforms other supervised classifiers.  Waxaynu sii baaraynaa dhibaatooyinka dhisidda nidaamka kaleemeysiga Amharik, waxaana ognahay isticmaalka sarkaalka iyo hadalka sawirida ah waa arimaha ugu muhiimsan ee la xiriira dhibaatada. si loo horumariyo baaritaanka fikrada\nLuqadaha Amharika iyo luuqadaha kale oo la xidhiidha nooc-hoose ee noocyada, waxaynu daaqsad u siinaa sawirada, qalabka wax lagu sheego, kooxda sourceeda iyo modellada.", 'sr': "Ovaj papir predstavlja studiju sentimentalne analize za tekstove Amharskih društvenih medija. Pošto se broj korisnika društvenih medija uvek povećava, platforme društvenih medija žele da razumeju latentno značenje i osjećaje teksta kako bi poboljšali postupke donošenja odluka. Međutim, jezici niskih resursa poput Amharića dobili su manje pažnje zbog nekoliko razloga poput nedostatka dobre notacije podataka, nedostupnosti računalnih resursa i manje ili nikakvih ekspertnih istraživača u tom području. Ova istraživanja rješava tri glavna istraživanja. Prvo istražujemo odgovarajućnost postojećih alata za zadatak analize sentimenta. Alati za annotaciju nisu teški da podrže velike obaveze za annotaciju u Amharicu. Takoðe, postojeæe platforme za crowdsourcing ne podržavaju Amharski tekst annotaciju. Stoga smo izgradili društveno-mrežno prijateljski annotacijski alat nazvan 'ASAB' koristeći Telegram robot. Skupljamo 9,4k tweets, gde svaki tweet annotiraju tri korisnika Telegram. Osim toga, istražujemo odgovarajuće pristupe mašinskog učenja za analizu osjećanja. FLAIR duboko učenje klasifikatora teksta, zasnovana na integraciji mreže koji se računaju iz distribucijskog thesaurus a, iznosi druge nadzorne klasifikatore. Dalje istražujemo izazove u izgradnji sistema analize sentiment a za Amharski i otkrili smo da su široko šireni korištenje sarkazma i figurativnog govora glavni problem u rješavanju problema. Da unaprijedimo istraživanje sentimentalne analize u\nAmharički i drugi povezani jezici niskih resursa, oslobađamo set podataka, alat za annotaciju, izvorni kod i modele javno pod dozvolom.", 'sv': "Denna uppsats presenterar studien av sentimentalanalys för amhariska sociala medier texter. Eftersom antalet användare av sociala medier ständigt ökar vill sociala medieplattformar förstå den latenta innebörden och känslorna i en text för att förbättra beslutsprocessen. Men lågresursspråk som amhariska har fått mindre uppmärksamhet på grund av flera orsaker som brist på väl kommenterade datauppsättningar, otillgänglighet av datorresurser och färre eller inga expertforskare inom området. Denna forskning behandlar tre huvudsakliga forskningsfrågor. Först undersöker vi lämpligheten hos befintliga verktyg för sentimentalanalysen. Noteringsverktyg är knappa för att stödja storskaliga noteringsuppgifter på amhariska. De befintliga crowdsourcingplattformarna stöder inte amhariska textanteckningar. Därför bygger vi ett socialt nätverksvänligt anteckningsverktyg som heter `ASAB' med hjälp av Telegram-roboten. Vi samlar in 9.4k tweets, där varje tweet kommenteras av tre Telegram användare. Dessutom undersöker vi lämpligheten av maskininlärningsmetoder för amharisk sentimentalanalys. FLAIR-textklassificeraren för djupinlärning, baserad på nätverksinbäddningar som beräknas från en distribuerad tesaurus, presterar bättre än andra övervakade klassificerare. Vi undersöker vidare utmaningarna med att bygga ett sentimentalitetsanalyssystem för amhariska och fann att den utbredda användningen av sarkasm och figurativt tal är huvudfrågorna i hanteringen av problemet. Att främja sentimental analysforskning i\nAmhariska och andra relaterade lågresursspråk släpper vi datauppsättningen, anteckningsverktyget, källkoden och modellerna offentligt under en tillåtande.", 'si': "මේ පත්තර පෙනුවන් අම්හාරික් සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම පාළුවන්ගේ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විදිහ සාමාජික මිඩියාව ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ සංඛ්යා හැමවෙලේම වැඩියෙන් වැඩියි, සාමාජික මිඩියාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් කැමතියි තේර නමුත්, අම්හාරික් වගේ අඩු සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවල් අඩු අවධානයක් ලැබුනා හේතුවක් නිසා හොඳ අවධානයක් නැති නිසා, පරිගණනය සම්බන්ධතාවක මේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් තියෙනවා. අපි මුලින්ම පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා දැනුම් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ වැඩකට තියෙන්න තියෙන අයිති උප ඇම්හාරික් වල ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා විශාල වැඩක් සහය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි. ඒවගේම, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය අම්හාරික් පාළුවක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සහය නො ඉතින්, අපි සාමාජික ජාලය යාළුවෙන්-යාළුවෙන් 'ASAB' කියලා තියෙන්නේ ටෙල්බර් බොට් එක භාවිත කරන්න අපි 9.4k ට්විට් එකතු කරනවා, හැම ට්විට් එක්කෙනෙක්ම ටිව්ට් එක්කෙනෙක්ම ටිව්ට් එකතු කරනවා ටිව්ට් එක තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අම්හාරික් සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්. Name අපි අම්හාරික් විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන අභ්\u200dයානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපි හොයාගත්තා කියලා සාර්කාස්ම විශේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණය කරගන්න\nඅම්හාරික් සහ අනිත් සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක්, අපි දත්ත සෙට් විස්තර කරනවා, ප්\u200dරදේශ කෝඩ, සහ ප්\u200dරදේශය සම්බන්ධ විස්ත", 'ur': "یہ کاغذ امهاریک سوسیل میڈیا ٹیکسٹ کے لئے احساسات تحلیل کے تحلیل کو پیش کرتا ہے. جس طرح سوسیل میڈیا کارساز کی تعداد کبھی زیادہ بڑھتی ہے، سوسیل میڈیا پٹرومٹ سمجھنا چاہتا ہے کہ ایک ٹیکسٹ کا معنی اور احساسات فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے زیادہ کرنا چاہے. However, low-resource languages such as Amharic have received less attention due to several reasons such as lack of annotated data sets, unavailable computing resources, and less or no expert researchers in the area. یہ تحقیق تین اصلی تحقیق سوال کے بارے میں دریافت کرتا ہے۔ ہم پہلی بار احساس تحلیل کے کام کے لئے موجود ابزار کا مناسب تعقیب کریں۔ انٹوریٹ ابزار امهاریک میں زیادہ استعمال کے کاموں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے کم ہیں. اور اس سے بھی، موجود جمع سورنگ پٹرومٹ امهاریک ٹیکسٹ نوٹ کی مدد نہیں کرتی۔ لہٰذا ہم نے ٹیلٹ بوٹ کے مطابق `ASAB' کے نام سے ایک سوسیال-نیٹ ورک-دوستی اپنا انٹوریٹ تولیل بنایا ہے. ہم 9.4k ٹویٹ جمع کرتے ہیں، جہاں ہر ٹویٹ تین ٹیلٹ کارساز نے اظہار کی ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم ماشین تعلیم کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق کررہے ہیں. FLAIR عمیق سیکھنے کے متن کلاسیر، نیٹورک ایمبڈینگ پر بنیاد ہے جو ایک تقسیم ٹیسوروس سے کامپیوتر کیا جاتا ہے، اور دوسرے سرپرست کلاسیر سے کامپیوتر کیا جاتا ہے. ہم اس سے زیادہ مشکلات کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ امهاریک کے لئے ایک احساس تحقیق سیستم بنانے کے لئے اور ہم نے دیکھا کہ سارکاسم اور تصویر کی بات کا وسیع استعمال مشکل کے بارے میں سب سے بڑا مشکل ہے۔ احساسات تحقیقات کی تحقیقات کو آگے بڑھنے کے لئے\nامهاریک اور دوسری رابطہ دار کم رسسور کی زبانیں، ہم ڈاٹ سٹ، انٹوریٹ تولیل، سورس کوڈ، اور نمڈل عمومی طور پر اجازت دینے والے ہیں.", 'ta': "This paper presents the study of sentiment analysis for Amharic social media texts.  சமூக ஊடகங்களின் எண்ணிக்கையில் இன்னும் அதிகரிக்கும் போது, சமூக ஊடகங்கள் தளங்கள் சமீபத்தில் உரையின் அர்த்தம் மற்றும் உணர்வுகளை புரிந்து க ஆனால், ஆமாரிக் போன்ற குறைந்த மூலங்கள் சில காரணங்களினாலும் கவனத்தை குறைவாக பெற்றுள்ளார்கள், நன்றாக அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளங்கள் இல்லை, கணக்கீடு வளங இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி மூன்று முக்கிய ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகளை குறிக்கிறது. நாம் முதலில் ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் கருவிகளின் பொருத்தமான தேவையை கண்டறிகிறோம். அமாரிக்கில் பெரிய அளவு அறிவிப்பு பணிகளை ஆதரிக்க குறைவாக உள்ளது. மேலும், இருக்கும் கூட்டத்தின் மூலங்களை அமாரிக் உரை அறிவிப்பை ஆதரிக்காது. அதனால், நாங்கள் தொலைக்காம் பெட்டியை பயன்படுத்தி 'ASAB' என்று அழைக்கப்படும் ஒரு சமூக- வலைப்பின்னல்-நண்பர் அறிவிப்ப நாம் 9.4k tweets சேகரிக்கிறோம், ஒவ்வொரு Tweet என்பது மூன்று தொலைகேள்வி பயனர்களால் குறிப்பிடப்படுகிறது. மேலும், நாங்கள் ஆமாரிக் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் அணுகும் பொருத்தமான தேவை Name நாங்கள் அமாரிக்கான ஒரு உணர்வு ஆய்வு அமைப்பை உருவாக்கும் சவால்களை மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம் பிரச்சனையைக் கொண்டு பிரச்சனையி உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சியை முன்னேற்ற\nஆமாரிக் மற்றும் மற்றும் தொடர்புடைய குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகள், நாம் அனுமதிக்கு கீழ் தரவு அமைப்பு, அறிவிப்பு கருவி, மூல கு", 'ro': "Această lucrare prezintă studiul analizei sentimentelor pentru textele amharice de social media. Pe măsură ce numărul utilizatorilor rețelelor de socializare este în continuă creștere, platformele de socializare ar dori să înțeleagă sensul latent și sentimentele unui text pentru a îmbunătăți procedurile de luare a deciziilor. Cu toate acestea, limbile cu resurse scăzute, cum ar fi amharicul, au primit mai puțină atenție din mai multe motive, cum ar fi lipsa seturilor de date bine adnotate, indisponibilitatea resurselor de calcul și mai puțini sau deloc cercetători experți în domeniu. Această cercetare abordează trei întrebări principale de cercetare. Mai întâi explorăm adecvarea instrumentelor existente pentru sarcina de analiză a sentimentului. Instrumentele de adnotare sunt rare pentru a susține sarcini de adnotare la scară largă în amharic. De asemenea, platformele de crowdsourcing existente nu acceptă adnotări text amharice. Prin urmare, construim un instrument de adnotare prietenos rețelelor sociale numit `ASAB' folosind robotul Telegram. Colectăm 9.4k tweet-uri, unde fiecare tweet este adnotat de trei utilizatori Telegram. Mai mult decât atât, explorăm adecvarea abordărilor de învățare automată pentru analiza sentimentului amharic. Clasificatorul de text de învățare profundă FLAIR, bazat pe încorporări de rețea care sunt calculate dintr-un tezaur distribuțional, depășește alți clasificatori supravegheați. Investigăm în continuare provocările construirii unui sistem de analiză a sentimentelor pentru amharic și am constatat că utilizarea pe scară largă a sarcasmului și a vorbirii figurative sunt principalele probleme în abordarea problemei. Pentru a avansa cercetarea analizei sentimentelor in\nAmharice și alte limbi conexe cu resurse reduse, eliberăm setul de date, instrumentul de adnotare, codul sursă și modelele public sub un permisiv.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz Amharik jamiyat medya matnlari uchun hissiyot analyzerini tahrirlaydi. Jami media foydalanuvchilar soni ko'paytirishda, jamiyat media platformlari yaqinda ma'nosini va hisoblashni o'rganishni xohlaydi. Xukum qilish jarayonlarini oshirish uchun matnning eng muhimi ma'nosini va hisoblashni xohlaydi. Ammo, Amharik kabi bir necha sabablarga juda kichik rasm tillari juda ham murakkab beradi. Bu yerda ko'p ko'proq taʼminlovchi foydalanuvchilar emas. Bu ta'qituvchi uchta asosiy o'qituvchi savollarni boshqaradi. We first explore the suitability of existing tools for the sentiment analysis task.  Name Aks holda, mavjud jamoatlar platformlari Amharik matn taʼminlovchisini qoʻllamaydi. Ho'sh, biz Telegram bot yordamida `ASAB' degan jamiyat tarmoq bilan bog'liq taʼminlovchi asbobi yaratimiz. Biz 9.4k xabarlarni olib tashlamiz, har bir xabarga uchta Telegram foydalanuvchiga taqdim. Ko'pchilik, biz Amharik hissiyotni aniqlash uchun mashina o'rganishning qismini o'rganamiz. Name Biz Amharik uchun hissiyotni aniqlash tizimini boshqarishga murakkablarini boshqaramiz va sarkasm va fikrlik tilidan katta foydalanish muammolarning asosiy muammolari. hissiyot analytikini o'rganish uchun\nAmharik va boshqa bogʻ'liq rasm tillari uchun maʼlumot set, taʼrif vositasi, manba kodi va modellar ruxsat bilan ochilamiz.", 'vi': "Bài báo này giới thiệu nghiên cứu về phân tích đa cảm cho các văn bản truyền thông. Khi số lượng người dùng mạng xã hội đang tăng dần, các nền truyền thông xã hội muốn hiểu ý nghĩa tiềm ẩn và tình cảm của một văn bản để nâng cao các thủ tục đưa ra quyết định. Tuy nhiên, ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên như Amharic đã nhận được ít chú ý hơn bởi nhiều lý do như là thiếu các bộ dữ liệu được ghi chú cẩn thận, không có nguồn tính to án, và ít hay không có nhà nghiên cứu chuyên gia trong khu vực. Nghiên cứu này đề cập đến ba vấn đề nghiên cứu chính. Trước tiên, chúng ta sẽ tìm hiểu khả năng của các công cụ hiện thời cho nhiệm vụ phân tích cảm xúc. Công cụ chú giải rất hiếm để hỗ trợ các công việc chú thích quy mô lớn ở Amharic. Thêm vào đó, các giàn xếp xếp xếp Quốc khánh hiện tại không hỗ trợ chú thích văn bản Amharic. Do đó, chúng tôi xây dựng một công cụ ghi chú xã hội, gọi là'ASAB'nhờ nhờ bot Telegram. Chúng tôi sưu tầm 9.4k tweeter, nơi mỗi tweet được ghi chú bởi ba người dùng điện tín. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi khám phá phương pháp học thiết bị cho phân tích cảm xúc Amharic. Người phân loại văn bản in dược giọng sâu học, dựa trên sự nhúng vào mạng được tính toán từ từ bộ phát thanh, vượt qua các phân loại được giám sát khác. Chúng tôi còn điều tra thử thách về việc xây dựng một hệ thống phân tích cảm xúc cho Amharic và chúng tôi phát hiện ra rằng cách sử dụng ưa thích mỉa mai và ngôn ngữ hình ảnh là vấn đề chính trong việc giải quyết vấn đề. Để tiến hành nghiên cứu phân tích đa cảm\nAmharic và những ngôn ngữ có liên quan tới ít nguồn, chúng tôi công bố bộ dữ liệu, công cụ ghi chú, mã nguồn, và các mô hình công khai dưới quyền hạn.", 'nl': "Dit artikel presenteert de studie van sentimentanalyse voor Amharische social media teksten. Aangezien het aantal gebruikers van sociale media steeds groter wordt, willen sociale media platforms graag de latente betekenis en gevoelens van een tekst begrijpen om de besluitvormingsprocedures te verbeteren. Echter, low-resource talen zoals Amharisch hebben minder aandacht gekregen vanwege verschillende redenen, zoals gebrek aan goed geannoteerde datasets, onbeschikbaarheid van computerbronnen en minder of geen deskundige onderzoekers in het gebied. Dit onderzoek behandelt drie belangrijke onderzoeksvragen. We onderzoeken eerst de geschiktheid van bestaande tools voor de sentimentanalyse. Annotatietools zijn schaars om grootschalige annotatietaken in Amharic te ondersteunen. Ook ondersteunen de bestaande crowdsourcing platforms geen Amharische tekst annotatie. Daarom bouwen we een sociaal netwerk-vriendelijke annotatie tool genaamd `ASAB' met behulp van de Telegram bot. We verzamelen 9.4k tweets, waarbij elke tweet geannoteerd wordt door drie Telegram gebruikers. Daarnaast onderzoeken we de geschiktheid van machine learning benaderingen voor Amharische sentimentanalyse. De FLAIR deep learning tekstclassificator, gebaseerd op netwerkinsluitingen die worden berekend uit een distributiethesaurus, presteert beter dan andere begeleide classificatoren. We onderzoeken verder de uitdagingen bij het bouwen van een sentiment analyse systeem voor Amharic en we ontdekten dat het wijdverbreide gebruik van sarcasme en figuratieve spraak de belangrijkste kwesties zijn bij het omgaan met het probleem. Om het sentimentanalyse onderzoek te bevorderen in\nAmharisch en andere gerelateerde low-resource talen, geven we de dataset, de annotatie tool, broncode en modellen openbaar onder een permissieve.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt die Studie der Sentimentanalyse für amharische Social Media Texte vor. Da die Anzahl der Social-Media-Nutzer stetig steigt, möchten Social-Media-Plattformen die latente Bedeutung und Stimmung eines Textes verstehen, um Entscheidungsprozesse zu verbessern. Allerdings haben ressourcenarme Sprachen wie Amharisch aufgrund mehrerer Gründe, wie Mangel an gut kommentierten Datensätzen, Nichtverfügbarkeit von Rechenressourcen und weniger oder keine Experten in diesem Bereich, weniger Aufmerksamkeit erhalten. Diese Forschung befasst sich mit drei zentralen Forschungsfragen. Zunächst untersuchen wir die Eignung bestehender Tools für die Stimmungsanalyse. Anmerkungswerkzeuge sind selten, um große Annotationsaufgaben in Amharic zu unterstützen. Außerdem unterstützen die bestehenden Crowdsourcing-Plattformen keine Amharic-Textannotation. Daher bauen wir mit dem Telegram Bot ein sozialnetzwerkfreundliches Annotationstool namens ASAB. Wir sammeln 9.4k Tweets, wobei jeder Tweet von drei Telegram-Nutzern kommentiert wird. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir die Eignung von Machine Learning Ansätzen für die Amharische Sentiment Analyse. Der FLAIR Deep Learning Textklassifikator, der auf Netzwerkeinbettungen basiert, die aus einem Verteilungsthesaurus berechnet werden, übertrifft andere überwachte Klassifikatoren. Wir untersuchen weiter die Herausforderungen beim Aufbau eines Sentiment-Analysesystems für Amharic und fanden heraus, dass die weit verbreitete Verwendung von Sarkasmus und figurativer Sprache die Hauptprobleme im Umgang mit dem Problem sind. Um die Sentiment Analyse Forschung in\nAmharisch und andere verwandte ressourcenarme Sprachen, veröffentlichen wir den Datensatz, das Annotationswerkzeug, Quellcode und Modelle öffentlich unter einer Erlaubnis.', 'hr': "Ovaj papir predstavlja ispitivanje analize osjećaja za tekstove Amharskih društvenih medija. Pošto se broj korisnika društvenih medija uvijek povećava, platforme društvenih medija žele razumjeti latentno značenje i osjećaje teksta kako bi poboljšali postupke donošenja odluka. Međutim, jezici niskih resursa poput Amharića dobili su manju pažnju zbog nekoliko razloga poput nedostatka dobro annotiranih podataka, nedostupnosti računalnih resursa i manje ili nikakvih stručnih istraživača u tom području. Ova istraživanja rješava tri glavna istraživanja. Prvo istražujemo odgovarajućnost postojećih alata za zadatak analize osjećaja. Njihovi alati za oznake nisu teško podržavati velike optužbe za oznake u Amharicu. Također, postojeće platforme crowdsourcing ne podržavaju Amharičku tekstsku annotaciju. Stoga smo izgradili društveno-mrežni annotacijski alat nazvan 'ASAB' koristeći Telegram robot. Skupljamo 9,4k tweets, gdje svaki tweet annotiraju tri Telegram korisnika. Osim toga, istražujemo odgovarajuće pristupe mašinskog učenja za analizu osjećanja. FLAIR klasifikator dubokog učenja teksta, zasnovan na integraciji mreže koje se računaju iz distribucijskog thesaurus a, iznosi druge nadzorne klasifikatore. Dalje istražujemo izazove u izgradnji sustava analize osjećaja za Amharić i otkrili smo da su široka upotreba sarkazma i figurativnog govora glavni problem u rješavanju problem a. Da unaprijedimo istraživanje sentimentalne analize u\nAmharički i drugi povezani jezici niskih resursa, otpuštamo set podataka, alat za annotaciju, izvorni kod i modele javno pod dozvolom.", 'da': "Denne artikel præsenterer undersøgelsen af sentimentalanalyse for amhariske tekster på sociale medier. Efterhånden som antallet af brugere af sociale medier er stadig stigende, vil de sociale medieplatforme gerne forstå den latente betydning og følelser af en tekst for at forbedre beslutningsprocedurerne. Men lav-ressource sprog som amharisk har fået mindre opmærksomhed på grund af flere årsager, såsom mangel på velkommenterede datasæt, utilgængelighed af computerressourcer og færre eller ingen ekspertforskere på området. Denne forskning omhandler tre hovedspørgsmål. Vi undersøger først egnetheden af eksisterende værktøjer til sentimentalanalyseopgaven. Anmærkningsværktøjer er knappe til at understøtte store anmærkningsopgaver på amharisk. Desuden understøtter de eksisterende crowdsourcing-platforme ikke amhariske tekstannoteringer. Derfor bygger vi et socialt netværk-venligt annoteringsværktøj kaldet `ASAB' ved hjælp af Telegram bot. Vi indsamler 9.4k tweets, hvor hver tweet er kommenteret af tre Telegram brugere. Desuden undersøger vi egnetheden af machine learning tilgange til amharisk sentiment analyse. FLAIR deep learning tekst klassificering baseret på netværksindlejringer, der beregnes ud fra en distributionsszaurus, overgår andre overvågede klassificeringer. Vi undersøger yderligere udfordringerne i opbygningen af et følelsesanalysesystem for amharisk, og vi fandt ud af, at den udbredte brug af sarkasme og figurativ tale er de vigtigste spørgsmål i håndteringen af problemet. At fremskynde sentimental analyse forskningen i\nAmhariske og andre relaterede lav-ressource sprog, vi frigiver datasættet, annotationsværktøjet, kildekoden og modellerne offentligt under en tilladelse.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя проучването на сентименталния анализ за амхарски текстове в социалните медии. Тъй като броят на потребителите на социалните медии непрекъснато нараства, платформите на социалните медии биха искали да разберат латентното значение и чувствата на текста, за да подобрят процедурите за вземане на решения. Въпреки това, езиците с нисък ресурс като амхарийския са получили по-малко внимание поради няколко причини като липсата на добре анотирани набори от данни, липсата на компютърни ресурси и по-малко или никакво експертни изследователи в областта. Това изследване разглежда три основни изследователски въпроса. Първо изследваме пригодността на съществуващите инструменти за задачата за анализ на сентимента. Инструментите за анотация са оскъдни за подпомагане на мащабни задачи за анотация в амхарик. Също така съществуващите платформи за crowdsourcing не поддържат амхарски текстови анотации. Ето защо, ние изграждаме инструмент за анотация, удобен за социалните мрежи, наречен "АСАБ", използвайки бота Телеграм. Събираме 9,4 хиляди туитове, където всеки туит е анотиран от трима потребители на Телеграм. Освен това изследваме пригодността на подходите за машинно обучение за анализ на амхарските сентименти. Текстовият класификатор за дълбоко обучение, базиран на вграждания в мрежата, които се изчисляват от дистрибуционен речник, превъзхожда други контролирани класификатори. По-нататък изследваме предизвикателствата при изграждането на система за анализ на сентимента за Амхарич и установихме, че широко разпространеното използване на сарказъм и фигуративна реч са основните проблеми при справянето с проблема. За да напредне изследването на сентименталния анализ в\nАмхарски и други свързани езици с нисък ресурс, ние публикуваме набора от данни, инструмента за анотация, изходния код и моделите публично под позволение.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحقیق تحلیل احساسات برای متن رسانه های اجتماعی آمهاریک را نشان می دهد. همانطور که تعداد کاربران رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی همیشه افزایش می\u200cکند، پلاکارهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی می\u200cخواهند معنی و احساسات تاریخی از یک متن را درک کنند تا پرداختهای تصمیم گیری را افزایش دهند. ولی زبانهای کم منابع مانند آمهاریک به دلایل چند دلیل کمتر توجه یافته اند، مانند ناتوانی از منابع کامپیوتر و کمتر یا هیچ تحقیقات متخصص در این منطقه. این تحقیقات سه سوال تحقیقات اصلی را درباره می\u200cگیرد. اول ما مناسب ابزارهای موجود برای کار تحلیل احساسات را تحقیق می کنیم. ابزارهای یادآوری کمی برای پشتیبانی کار های یادآوری بزرگ در آمهاریک است. همچنین، پلیتفم\u200cهای جامعه\u200cای که در حال حاضر هستند، نشانه\u200cهای متن آمهاریک را پشتیبانی نمی\u200cکنند. بنابراین، ما یک ابزار آشنایی با شبکه\u200cهای اجتماعی به عنوان «ASAB» را با استفاده از ربات تلفن ساختیم. ما تويت\u200cهاي 9.4ک را جمع مي\u200cکنيم، جايي که هر تويت توسط سه کاربر تلفن آشنا ميشه. به علاوه، ما مناسب آموزش دستگاه برای تحلیل احساسات آمهاریک را تحقیق می کنیم. کلیسار متن یادگیری عمیق FLAIR، بر اساس رابطه\u200cبندی\u200cهای شبکه\u200cای که از یک تزاورس جدایی محاسبه می\u200cشوند، بیشتر از کلیسار\u200cهای دیگر تحت نظر قرار می\u200cدهد. ما در حال ساختن یک سیستم تحلیل احساسات برای آمهاریک تحقیق می\u200cکنیم و فهمیدیم که استفاده از سارکاسم و سخنرانی تصویر گسترده\u200cای از مشکلات اصلی است. برای پیشرفت تحقیقات تحلیل احساسات در\nزبان\u200cهای امهاریک و دیگر مربوط به منابع کم، ما مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها، ابزار یادآوری، کد منبع، و مدل\u200cهای عمومی زیر یک اجازه\u200cدهنده آزاد می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha utafiti wa uchambuzi wa hisia kwa maandishi ya mitandao ya kijamii ya Amhariki. Wakati idadi ya watumiaji wa mitandao ya kijamii wanaongezeka, majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii yatapenda kuelewa maana ya hivi karibuni na hisia za maandishi ya ujumbe wa kuongeza mchakato wa uamuzi. Hata hivyo, lugha ndogo kama vile Amharic imepokea hisia ndogo kutokana na sababu kadhaa kama vile kutokuwepo kwa vikosi vya taarifa vizuri, ukosefu wa rasilimali za kompyuta, na wachache au hakuna watafiti wataalam katika eneo hilo. Utafiti huu unahusisha maswali matatu ya utafiti. Kwanza tunachunguza uwezo wa vifaa vilivyopo kwa kazi ya uchambuzi wa hisia. Vifaa vya matangazo vina vigumu kuunga mkono kazi za kuchangaza kwa kiasi kikubwa nchini Amhariki. Pia, jukwaa ambalo limekuwa na vyanzo vya umma haviunga mkono taarifa za maneno ya Kiamhariki. Kwa hiyo, tunajenga chombo cha uchunguzi wa mitandao ya kijamii kinachoitwa ‘ASAB’ kwa kutumia boti ya Telegram. Tunakusanya twiti 9.4k, ambapo kila twiti inasumbuliwa na watumiaji watatu wa Telegram. Zaidi ya hayo, tunagundua uwezekano wa kujifunza mashine mbinu za uchambuzi wa hisia za Kiamhariki. Mfanuzi wa kujifunza vizuri wa maandishi, kwa kutumia mtandao wa intaneti unaohesabiwa na utafiti wa usambazaji, unaonyesha wataalamu wengine wanaothibitiwa. Tunajadili changamoto zaidi katika kutengeneza mfumo wa uchambuzi wa hisia kwa Kiamhariki na tuligundua kuwa matumizi makubwa ya kejeli na hotuba ya takwimu ni masuala muhimu yanayohusu tatizo hilo. Ili kuongeza utafiti wa hisia katika\nLugha za Kiamhariki na lugha nyingine zinazohusiana na rasilimali duni, tunatoa taarifa za taarifa, zana za kutangaza, kanuni za vyanzo, na mifano kwa umma chini ya ruhusa.', 'id': "Kertas ini menunjukkan studi analisis sentimen untuk teks media sosial Amharic. Bila jumlah pengguna media sosial semakin meningkat, platform media sosial ingin memahami arti dan perasaan rahasia dari teks untuk meningkatkan prosedur keputusan. Namun, bahasa sumber daya rendah seperti Amharic telah menerima kurang perhatian karena beberapa alasan seperti kekurangan set data yang dicatat dengan baik, tidak tersedia sumber daya komputer, dan kurang atau tidak ada peneliti ahli di daerah ini. Penelitian ini mengatasi tiga pertanyaan penelitian utama. Kita pertama-tama mengeksplorasi kemampuan peralatan yang ada untuk tugas analisis sentimen. Alat anotasi jarang mendukung tugas anotasi skala besar di Amharic. Juga, platform crowdsourcing yang ada tidak mendukung anotasi teks Amharic. Oleh karena itu, kami membangun alat anotasi sosial-jaringan-friendly bernama `ASAB' menggunakan robot Telegram. Kami mengumpulkan tweet 9.4k, dimana setiap tweet dicatat oleh tiga pengguna Telegram. Selain itu, kami mengeksplorasi kemampuan pendekatan belajar mesin untuk analisis sentimen Amharic. Klasifikator teks belajar dalam FLAIR, berdasarkan pembangunan jaringan yang dihitung dari tesaur distribusi, melebihi klasifikator yang diawasi lainnya. Kami menyelidiki lebih lanjut tantangan dalam membangun sistem analisis sentimen untuk Amharic dan kami menemukan bahwa penggunaan yang luas dari sarkasme dan pidato figuratif adalah masalah utama dalam menghadapi masalah. Untuk melanjutkan penelitian analisis sentimen di\nBahasa amharik dan bahasa sumber daya rendah lainnya, kami melepaskan set data, alat anotasi, kode sumber, dan model secara publik di bawah izin.", 'ko': "본고는 암하라어 소셜미디어 텍스트의 감정 분석을 연구한다.소셜미디어 사용자 수가 끊임없이 증가함에 따라 소셜미디어 플랫폼은 텍스트의 잠재적 의미와 감정을 이해하고 의사결정 절차를 강화하기를 바란다.그러나 주석이 좋은 데이터 집합이 부족하고 계산 자원이 사용할 수 없으며 이 분야의 전문가 연구원이 적거나 없거나 암하라어 등 저자원 언어에 대한 관심이 적다.이 연구는 세 가지 주요 연구 문제를 해결했다.우리는 먼저 정서 분석 임무 중 기존 도구의 적용성을 탐구한다.주석 도구는 암하라어의 대규모 주석 작업을 지원하지 않습니다.이 밖에 기존의 패키지 플랫폼은 암하라어 텍스트 주석을 지원하지 않는다.그래서 우리는 텔레그램 로봇을 이용해'ASAB'라는 소셜네트워크 친선 주석 도구를 구축했다.우리는 9.4k의 추문을 수집했는데, 추문마다 세 명의 전보 사용자의 주석이 있다.이 밖에 우리는 기계 학습 방법이 암하라어 정서 분석에서의 적용성을 탐구했다.FLAIR 딥러닝 텍스트 분류기는 분산 동의어 테이블에서 계산된 네트워크를 기반으로 하여 다른 감독 분류기보다 우수합니다.우리는 암하라어 정서 분석 시스템을 구축하는 도전을 한층 더 조사한 결과 풍자와 비유의 광범위한 사용이 이 문제를 해결하는 주요한 문제라는 것을 발견했다.정서 분석 연구를 추진하다\n암하라어와 관련된 저자원 언어는 허용된 허가 아래 데이터 집합, 주석 도구, 원본 코드와 모델을 공개적으로 발표합니다.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Amharik sosyal medýdanlaryň metinleri üçin duýgular analyzasyny çykýar. Sosyal medýdan ullançylaryň sany hemişe artýar bolýand a, sosyal medýdançalaryň platformalary karar bermek isleýärler. Ýöne, Amharik ýaly azajyk köpüs diller bolan ýaly daşary nähili sebäplerinde, hasaplamak resurslaryň tapylmadygy we az ýa-da uzynly ylgaşçylar ýok sebäplerinde hiç hili üns berilmeýärler. Bu ylmy üç esasy ylmy soraglary barýar. Biz ilkinji gezek duýgular analyzasynda bar ähli guramlaryň ýerlikhetini keşfetýäris. Ýagtylamak esbaplar, Amharik dilinde Ullakan Ýagtylamak täzeliklerini desteklemek üçin az. Yýene-de, bar kalam meýdançasynyň platformlary Amharik metin duýdurmasyny desteklemeýär. Şol sebäpli, biz Telegram botyny ulanan sosially-şebeke dosty duýdurma atlamak aralygyny inşa edýäris. Biz 9.4k tweet toplaýarrys, her tweet üç Telegram Ullançy tarapyndan duýýar. Munuň üçin biz maşynyň öwrenmek ukyplarynyň Amharik duýgular analizi üçin golaýlaşygyny gözləýäris. FLAIR derin öwrenmek üçin metin klasifikatçy, daýratyn tesaurusdan hasaplanýan şebek kömeklere dayanýar Biz Amharik üçin duýgular analyzasy sistemasyny gurmakda kynçylyklary ýüze çykýardyk we biz esasy çykyş we çykyş çykyş etmek üçin esasy meselelerdir. Duýgular analyzasyny öňünden geçirmek üçin\nAmharça we beýleki kaynakly düşük diller, veri setini, duýgulama aralygyny, çeşme kody we nusgalary mümkin edip bilýäris.', 'sq': "Ky dokument paraqet studimin e analizës së ndjenjave për tekstet e medias shoqërore të Amharic ës. Ndërsa numri i përdoruesve të medias sociale po rritet gjithmonë, platformet e medias sociale do të donin të kuptonin kuptimin dhe ndjenjat e fshehta të një teksti për të përmirësuar procedurat e vendimit. However, low-resource languages such as Amharic have received less attention due to several reasons such as lack of well-annotated datasets, unavailability of computing resources, and fewer or no expert researchers in the area.  Këto kërkime trajtojnë tre pyetje kryesore kërkimi. We first explore the suitability of existing tools for the sentiment analysis task.  Mjet e anotacionit janë të pakta për të mbështetur detyrat e anotacionit në shkallë të madhe në Amhariç. Gjithashtu, platformet ekzistuese të crowdsourcing nuk mbështesin anotacionin e tekstit amharik. Kështu, ne ndërtojmë një mjet anotacioni shoqëror-rrjeti të quajtur `ASAB' duke përdorur robotin Telegram. Ne mbledhim 9.4k tweets, ku secili tweet është shënuar nga tre përdorues të Telegrameve. Përveç kësaj, ne eksplorojmë aftësinë e metodave të mësimit të makinave për analizën e ndjenjave amharike. Klasifikuesi i tekstit të mësimit të thellë FLAIR, bazuar në përfshirjet e rrjetit që janë llogaritur nga një thesaur shpërndarës, ekziston mbi klasifikuesit e tjerë të mbikqyrur. Ne hetojmë më tej sfidat në ndërtimin e një sistemi analize të ndjenjave për Amhariçin dhe gjetëm se përdorimi i gjerë i sarkazmit dhe fjalimit figurativ janë çështjet kryesore në trajtimin e problemit. Për të përparuar kërkimin e analizës së ndjenjave në\nAmharic and other related low-resource languages, we release the dataset, the annotation tool, source code, and models publicly under a permissive.", 'af': "Hierdie papier stel die studie van sentimentanalisie vir Amhariese sosiale media teks voorsien. Soos die aantal sosiale media gebruikers altyd vergroei word, sal sosiale media platforme wil die latente betekening en sentimente van 'n teks verstaan om besluit-saming prosedure te verbeter. Maar die lae hulpbron tale soos Amharic het minder aandag ontvang vanweë verskeie rede soos die ontbreek van goed-annotateerde datastelle, onbeskikbaarheid van rekenaar hulpbronne en minder of geen ekspertiese resekers in die area nie. Hierdie ondersoek adres drie hoof ondersoek vrae. Ons exploreer eerste die geskikheid van bestaande nutsprogramme vir die sentimentanaliseerde taak. Name Ook, die bestaande skakelvorming platforme ondersteun nie Amhariese teks notasie nie. Daarom bou ons 'n sosiale-netwerk-vriendelike annotasie hulpmiddel wat genoem word 'ASAB' gebruik die Telegram-bot. Ons versamel 9.4k tweets, waar elke tweet deur drie Telegram gebruikers annoteer word. Ook, ons ondersoek die geskikheid van masjien leer toegang vir Amhariese sentimentanaliseer. Name Ons verder ondersoek die uitdrukkings in die bou van 'n sentimentanalisiese stelsel vir Amharies en ons het gevind dat die breeduitbreidige gebruik van sarkasm en figuratiewe spreek die hoofde probleem is om met die probleem te behandel. Om die sentimentanalisie ondersoek te vordering in\nAmhariese en ander verwante lae-hulpbron tale, verlos ons die datastel, die annotasie nutsprogram, bronkode en modele openlik onder 'n toestemming.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাহারিক সামাজিক মিডিয়া টেক্সটের আবেগ বিশ্লেষণের গবেষণা উপস্থাপন করেছে। যেহেতু সামাজিক মিডিয়া ব্যবহারকারীর সংখ্যা বাড়ছে, সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্লাটফর্ম বুঝতে চায় সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণের প্রক্রিয় তবে আমাহারিকের মতো কম সম্পদ ভাষা বেশ কিছু কারণের কারণে মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে, যেমন ভাল বিরক্তিকর তথ্য সেটের অভাব, সম্পদ হিসেবে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে না, এবং এই এলাকার কম বিশেষ এই গবেষণা তিনটি প্রধান গবেষণা প্রশ্নের সাথে কথা বলে। We first explore the suitability of existing tools for the sentiment analysis task.  অ্যামারিকে বিশাল পরিমাণ বিজ্ঞাপনের কাজ সমর্থন করার জন্য বিজ্ঞাপন টুল কষ্ট নয়। এছাড়াও বিদ্যমান জনসোর্সিং প্ল্যাটফর্ম আমাহারিক টেক্সটের ঘোষণা সমর্থন করে না। তাই, আমরা টেলিগ্রাম বোট ব্যবহার করে একটি সামাজিক-নেটওয়ার্ক-বন্ধুত্বের বিষয়টি বানাই। আমরা ৯.৪ক টুইট সংগ্রহ করি, যেখানে প্রত্যেক টুইট টেলিগ্রাম ব্যবহারকারীরা তিন টুইটের বিরক্তিকর। এছাড়াও, আমরা মেশিন শিক্ষা বিশ্লেষণের জন্য মেশিন শিক্ষার সুযোগ প্রদান করি। নেটওয়ার্ক বিতরণ থিউজার থেকে গভীর ভিত্তিতে ফ্লায়ারের গভীর শিক্ষার্থীদের অন্যান্য পর্যবেক্ষক শ্রেণীদের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে অন আমরা আমাহারিকের জন্য একটি আবেগ বিশ্লেষণ ব্যবস্থা নির্মাণের চ্যালেঞ্জের উপর আরো তদন্ত করি এবং আমরা আবিষ্কার করি যে বিদ্রোহ এবং পরিসংখ্যাত বক্তৃতা ব অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের গবেষণার জন্য\nআমারিক এবং অন্যান্য সম্পর্কিত কম-সম্পদ ভাষা, আমরা অনুমতিক্রমে ডাটাসেট, বিজ্ঞাপন টুল, সোর্স কোড এবং মডেল মুক্তি দেই।', 'bs': "Ovaj papir predstavlja studiju analize sentimenta za tekstove Amharskih društvenih medija. Pošto se broj korisnika društvenih medija uvek povećava, platforme društvenih medija žele razumjeti latentno značenje i osjećaje teksta kako bi poboljšali postupke donošenja odluka. Međutim, jezici niskih resursa poput Amharića dobili su manju pažnju zbog nekoliko razloga poput nedostatka dobro annotiranih podataka, nedostupnosti računalnih resursa i manje ili nikakvih stručnih istraživača u tom području. Ova istraživanja rješava tri glavna istraživanja. Prvo istražujemo odgovarajućnost postojećih alata za zadatak analize osjećanja. Alati za annotaciju nisu teško podržavati velike obaveze za annotaciju u Amharicu. Također, postojeće platforme crowdsourcing ne podržavaju annotaciju Amharičkog teksta. Stoga smo izgradili društveno-mrežno prijateljski annotacijski alat nazvan 'ASAB' koristeći Telegram robot. Skupljamo 9,4k tweets, gdje svaki tweet annotiraju tri Telegram korisnika. Osim toga, istražujemo odgovarajuće pristupe mašinskog učenja za analizu osjećanja. FLAIR klasifikator dubokog učenja teksta, zasnovan na integraciji mreže koji se računaju iz distribucijskog thesaurus a, nadmaže drugim nadzornim klasifikatorima. Dalje istražujemo izazove u izgradnji sistema analize sentiment a za Amharski i otkrili smo da su široka korištenja sarkazma i figurativnog govora glavni problem u rješavanju problema. Da unaprijedimo istraživanje sentimentalne analize u\nAmharički i drugi povezani jezici niskih resursa, otpuštamo set podataka, alat za annotaciju, izvorni kod i modele javno pod dozvolom.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ամհարական սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստերի զգացմունքների վերլուծության ուսումնասիրությունը: Քանի որ սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների օգտագործողների թիվը միշտ աճում է, սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պլատֆորմերը ցանկանում են հասկանալ տեքստի թաքնված իմաստը և զգացմունքները որոշումներ կայացնելու գործընթացների Այնուամենայնիվ, այնպիսի ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուներ, ինչպիսիք են Ամարիկը, ավելի քիչ ուշադրություն են ստացել մի քանի պատճառների պատճառով, ինչպիսիք են լավ նկարագրված տվյալների բացակայությունը, համակարգչային ռեսուրսների բացակայությունը և այս ոլորտում ավելի քիչ կամ ոչ մի Այս հետազոտությունը լուծում է երեք հիմնական հետազոտության հարցեր: We first explore the suitability of existing tools for the sentiment analysis task.  Անոտացիայի գործիքները հազվադեպ են, որպեսզի աջակցեն ամհարիկի մեծ մասշտաբով նոտացիայի խնդիրները: Նույնպես, գոյություն ունեցող բազմաթիվ հարթակները չեն աջակցում ամհարական տեքստի նոտացիաները: Այդ պատճառով մենք կառուցում ենք սոցիալական ցանցերից ընդունակ նոտացիայի գործիք, որը կոչվում է «ASAB», օգտագործելով հեռագրամ ռոբոտը: Մենք հավաքում ենք 9.4k թվիթեր, որտեղ յուրաքանչյուր թվիթեր գրում են երեք տելեգրամ օգտագործողներ: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մեքենային ուսումնասիրության հարմարությունը ամհարական զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար: FlAIR-ի խորը ուսումնասիրության տեքստի դասակարգիչը, հիմնված ցանցի ներդրումների վրա, որոնք հաշվարկվում են բաշխման թեզավրուսից, գերազանցում է այլ վերահսկված դասակարգիչներին: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք մարտահրավերները, որոնք առաջանում են Ամարիկայի զգացմունքների վերլուծության համակարգի կառուցվածքում, և հայտնաբերեցինք, որ սարկազմի և ֆիգերատիվ խոսքի տարածված օգտագործումը խնդրի լուծման հիմնական խնդիրներն Զգացմունքների վերլուծության ուսումնասիրությունը\nԱմարիկ և այլ կապված ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուներ մենք հրապարակում ենք տվյալների համակարգը, annoտացիայի գործիքը, աղբյուր կոդը և մոդելները հանրային առումով թույլատրելի տակ:', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta l'estudi de l'anàlisi de sentiments dels textos dels mitjans socials amàrics. Com el nombre d'usuaris dels mitjans socials està creixent, les plataformes dels mitjans socials volien entendre el sentit latent d'un text per millorar els procediments de prendre decisions. Però les llengües amb baix recursos com Amàric han rebut menys atenció per diverses raons, com la falta de conjunts de dades ben anotats, la falta de recursos informàtics i menys o cap investigador expert en la zona. Aquesta recerca aborda tres preguntes principals de recerca. We first explore the suitability of existing tools for the sentiment analysis task.  Les eines d'anotació són escases per suportar tasques d'anotació a gran escala a Amàric. També les plataformes de crowdsourcing existents no donen suport a l'anotació de text amàric. Per tant, construïm una eina d'anotació amigable a la xarxa social anomenada 'ASAB' utilitzant el robot Telegram. Recollim 9,4k de tweets, on tres usuaris de Telegram anoten cada tweet. A més, explorem l'adequació dels enfocaments d'aprenentatge màquinari per a l'anàlisi del sentiment amàric. El classificador de text d'aprenentatge profund FLAIR, basat en incorporacions de xarxa computades a partir d'un tesaure de distribució, supera altres classificadors supervisats. Investiguem més enllà els reptes de construir un sistema d'anàlisi de sentiments per a Amàric i vam descobrir que l'ús generalitzat del sarcasme i el discurs figuratiu són els principals problemes en tractar el problema. Per avançar la recerca d'anàlisi de sentiments en\nAmharic and other related low-resource languages, we release the dataset, the annotation tool, source code, and models publicly under a permissive.", 'am': 'This paper presents the study of sentiment analysis for Amharic social media texts.  የማኅበራዊ አውታር ተጠቃሚዎች ቁጥር ሲጨምሩ፣ የማኅበራዊ አውታር መድረኮች የጽሑፉን አነስተኛና የፍርድ ሥርዓት ለማድረግ የሚችሉትን የጽሑፍ አእምሮዎች ለማስተዋል ይፈልጋሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን እንደ አማሪካ የሚመስሉ የጎደለው የድምጽ ቋንቋዎች፣ የድጋፍ ክፍተት፣ የአሜሪካ ፍጥረት ምርታተኞች፣ ትንሽ ወይም ትንሽ ባይኖሩ ብዙ ምክንያቶች የጎደለውን አነስተዋል፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት ሦስት የዋና ምርመራ ጥያቄዎችን ያቆማል፡፡ አስቀድመን የአሁኑን የመረጃ ማሳየት ስራትን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን መሣሪያዎች እንፈልጋለን፡፡ የአሜሪካ ትልቅ ትልቅ ማስታወቂያ ስራዎችን ለመደገፍ አይችልም፡፡ ደግሞም የአማሪካ ጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያ አይደገፍም፡፡ ስለዚህም ቴሌግራም በመጠቀም ‹ASAB› የሚባልን የማኅበራዊ መረብ-ወዳጅ አካባቢ መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የትዊተር ሁሉ በሦስት ቴሌግሪግራም ተጠቃሚዎች የሚያስጨንቁበትን 9.4k ትዊተሮችን እንሰበስባለን፡፡ ደግሞም የሐሳብን መምህርት መግለጫ የአማሪካዊ ስሜት መፍጠርን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ የFLAIR ጥልቅ ትምህርት ትምህርት መግለጫ ከሀብት ታዛዥ የተቆጠሩ የመረጃ ጥናት በመሠረት ላይ የተመሠረተ ሌሎችን ተማሪ ክፍተቶችን ያሳያል፡፡ የአማሪካን የስሜት አስተያየት ስርዓት መግለጫ እና የሳርካሲም እና የመስመር ንግግር በተሰፋው የፍጥረት ንግግር መሆኑን አግኝተናል፡፡ የስሜት ትምህርት ትምህርት ለማድረግ\nአሜሪካዊ እና ሌሎች የዝግጅት የኩነቶች ቋንቋዎች፣ ዳታዎችን፣ ማስታወቂያውን፣ የኩነቶች ኮድ እና ሞዴላዎችን በተፈቅድ እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje studii sentimentové analýzy pro amharické texty sociálních médií. Vzhledem k tomu, že počet uživatelů sociálních médií stále roste, platformy sociálních médií by rády porozuměly latentnímu významu a citům textu, aby zlepšily rozhodovací postupy. Nicméně jazykům s nízkými zdroji, jako je amharština, se věnovala menší pozornost z několika důvodů, jako je nedostatek dobře anotovaných datových sad, nedostupnost výpočetních zdrojů a méně či žádný odborný výzkum v této oblasti. Tento výzkum se zabývá třemi hlavními výzkumnými otázkami. Nejprve zkoumáme vhodnost stávajících nástrojů pro úlohu analýzy sentimentů. Anotace nástroje jsou vzácné, aby podporovaly rozsáhlé anotace úlohy v Amharic. Stávající crowdsourcingové platformy rovněž nepodporují amharické textové anotace. Proto jsme vytvořili anotaci přátelský pro sociální sítě s názvem ASAB pomocí bota Telegram. Shromažďujeme 9.4k tweety, kde každý tweet je anotován třemi uživateli Telegramu. Kromě toho zkoumáme vhodnost přístupů strojového učení pro analýzu amharických sentimentů. Klasifikátor textu hlubokého učení FLAIR, založený na síťových vloženích, které jsou vypočítány z distribučního tezauru, překonává ostatní sledované klasifikátory. Dále zkoumáme výzvy při budování systému analýzy sentimentů pro Amharic a zjistili jsme, že hlavními problémy při řešení problému jsou rozšířené používání sarkasmu a figurativní řeči. Pokročit výzkum analýzy sentimentů v\nAmharický a další související jazyky s nízkými zdroji, vydáváme datovou sadu, anotaci nástroj, zdrojový kód a modely veřejně pod permissivní.', 'az': "Bu kağıt Amharic sosyal media textləri üçün hiss analizi təhsil edir. Sosyal media istifadəçilərinin sayı artırdığı kimi, sosyal media platformları karar vermək prosedürlərini artırmaq üçün bir mətn anlamasını və hisslərini anlamaq istəyirlər. Amma Amharic kimi düşük ressurs dillərinin çoxlu səbəbi ilə çoxlu məlumatların yoxdur, hesablama resurslarının faydalanması və bu bölgedə daha az və ya heç bir müxtəlif araştırmacıların yoxdur. Bu araştırma üç ana araştırma suallarını çəkir. Biz ilk dəfə sentiment analizi işi üçün mövcuddur vasitələrin uyğunluğunu keşfetirik. Amharic vasitələrində böyük ölçülü məlumatları dəstəkləmək üçün çox çətin deyildir. Ayrıca, mevcut crowdsourcing platformları Amharic metin notlamasını dəstəkləmirlər. Beləliklə, biz telegram botunu istifadə edərək `ASAB' adlı sosyal-şəbəkə dostu bir məlumat vasitəsini inşa edirik. Biz 9.4k twet toplayırıq, hər tweet üç Telegram istifadəçiləri təbliğ edir. Daha sonra, Amharic duyguları analizi üçün maşın öyrənməsinin uyğunluğunu keşfetirik. FLAIR a ğı öyrənən mətn klasifikatçısı, dağıtım tezorundan hesablanmış şəbəkə inbinglərinə dayanan, başqa nəzarətli klasifikatçılardan üstün gəlir. Biz Amharic üçün sentiment analizi sistemini in şa etmək üçün çətinliklərini daha çox incidirik və bu problemlə çəkilmək üçün çox geniş sarkasm və figurativ sözlərin istifadəsi olduğunu gördük. Duyguları analizi araşdırmaq üçün\nAmharic və digər istifadə edilən düşük ressurs dillərini yayındırırıq, verilən qurğuları, məlumatlar vasitəsini, mənbə kodu və modelləri a çıq-aşkar tərzdə yayındırırıq.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse amharia sotsiaalmeedia tekstide sentimentaalüüsi uuringut. Kuna sotsiaalmeedia kasutajate arv kasvab üha enam, sooviksid sotsiaalmeedia platvormid mõista teksti varjatud tähendust ja tundeid, et parandada otsustusprotseduure. Siiski on vähese ressursiga keeltele, nagu amhari keel, pööratud vähem tähelepanu mitmete põhjuste tõttu, nagu hästi märgitud andmekogumite puudumine, arvutiressursside puudumine ja valdkonna ekspertteadlaste vähem või puudub see. Käesolev uuring käsitleb kolme peamist uurimisküsimust. Esmalt uurime olemasolevate vahendite sobivust sentimentaalüüsi ülesandeks. Annotatsioonitööriistad on vähe suuremahuliste annotatsiooniülesannete toetamiseks amharic. Samuti ei toeta olemasolevad ühishankimise platvormid amharia tekstimärgistust. Seega ehitame Telegrami boti abil sotsiaalvõrgustiku sõbraliku annotatsioonitööriista nimega ASAB. Kogume 9,4 tuhat säutsu, kus iga säutsu märgib kolm Telegrami kasutajat. Lisaks uurime masinõppe lähenemisviiside sobivust amhariliku sentimentaalüüsi jaoks. FLAIR sügavõppe tekstiklassifikaator, mis põhineb distributsioonitesaurusest arvutatud võrgupõimimistel, on parem kui teised järelevalve all olevad klassifikaatorid. Lisaks uurime väljakutseid Amharic sentimentaalüüsi süsteemi ehitamisel ning leidsime, et probleemi lahendamisel on peamised probleemid sarkasmi ja kujundusliku kõne laialdane kasutamine. Et edendada tundeanalüüsi uurimist\nAmharia ja muud sellega seotud madala ressursiga keeled avaldame andmekogumi, annoteerimise tööriista, lähtekoodi ja mudelid avalikult loa alusel.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään amharilaisten sosiaalisen median tekstien tunneanalyysin tutkimus. Sosiaalisen median käyttäjien määrän kasvaessa sosiaalisen median alustat haluaisivat ymmärtää tekstin piilevän merkityksen ja tunteet päätöksenteon tehostamiseksi. Vähävaraisiin kieliin, kuten amhariin, on kuitenkin kiinnitetty vähemmän huomiota useista syistä, kuten hyvin merkittyjen aineistojen puutteesta, laskentaresurssien saatavuudesta ja alan asiantuntijatutkijoiden vähäisestä määrästä tai olemattomasta määrästä johtuen. Tässä tutkimuksessa käsitellään kolmea tutkimuskysymystä. Ensin tutkimme olemassa olevien työkalujen soveltuvuutta tunteiden analysointiin. Annotointityökalut ovat niukkoja tukemaan laajamittaisia annotointitehtäviä amharikissa. Myöskään olemassa olevat joukkoistamisen alustat eivät tue amharilaisia tekstimerkintöjä. Näin ollen rakennamme sosiaaliseen verkostoon soveltuvan huomautustyökalun nimeltä ASAB Telegram botin avulla. Keräämme 9,4 tuhatta twiittiä, joissa jokainen twiitti on merkitty kolmen Telegramin käyttäjän toimesta. Lisäksi tutkimme koneoppimisen lähestymistapojen soveltuvuutta amharilaiseen tunneanalyysiin. FLAIR-syväoppimisen tekstiluokitus, joka perustuu jakelusanastosta laskettuihin verkkoupotuksiin, on parempi kuin muut valvotut luokittelijat. Tutkimme edelleen Amharicin tunteiden analyysijärjestelmän rakentamisen haasteita ja havaitsimme, että sarkasmin ja figuratiivisen puheen laajamittainen käyttö ovat keskeisiä ongelmia ongelman käsittelyssä. Edistää tunteiden analyysin tutkimusta\nAmharic ja muut siihen liittyvät vähävaraiset kielet, julkaisemme aineiston, huomautustyökalun, lähdekoodin ja mallit julkisesti sallivalla tavalla.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki bakal ngewehh ujaran kanggo ngerasahan seneng pisan empil kanggo textil media sotiki. Taning kantor sing perusahaan media sotiné sampek luwih nggawe, sistem media sotiné kabèh basa sing luwih nêmên kuwi mau ngerasah sistem sing luwih nêmên karo perusahaan sing bisa nggawe gerakan sampek dadi. politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Penderolèh iki dadi saben telu pangusikno. Awak dhéwé isih perusahaan nggawe barang kanggo dianggap perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang seneng nggawe Name Nanging, mbok saiki wis rampung lan tambah kuwi nggawe Kemerdekaan Kaya, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing nganggo netulé-tambah sing nganggo \'ASASASAR\' nggawe bot telegram. Awak dhéwé ngékokke 9.4k tuwit, nêng saben tuwit wis adulok karo telu pengguna telegram. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno karo hal-hal layang kelas Amari. FLAIR deep Learning text Awak dhéwé luwih beraksi perbudhakan kanggo nggawe sistem anjelajah luwih dumadhi winih kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi mau ngono nggawe barang sarkasm lan gewisan irunggu kuwi nggawe mung njaluké sing berarti kuwi nggawe perusahaan seneng nggawe gerakan sak omongé. Ngubah penting nggo rerampungan winih penting kelas\nAmarok lan barêng-barêng langgambar sing nêmên pengguna anyar, kéné ngubah dataset, alat kanggo entuk dhéwé, kode perusahaan lan model sing ngendalikno sak perusahaan.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na bãyar da karatun na analyza na hisia wa littafan mitandaki na Amhariki. Ko da yawan mãsu amfani da mitandai na jamii ke ƙara, zan so zan fahimta fassaran na ƙara da ma'anar matsayi da hisia'ani na matsayin da za'a ƙara zaɓaniyar masu yin hukunci. A lokacin da, harshen wuri-wuri kamar Amharic sun motsa ƙaranci sabõda manyan saba'a masu rauni da tsari masu ciki, kuma bã ya kasancẽwa ga misalin mutane da ke cikin wannan. Wannan littafin yana da su tambayi uku masu muhimma. Kayya, Munã jarraba abincin kayan aiki da ke jira wa aikin analyza. @ info: tooltip Also, the existing crowdsourcing platforms do not support Amharic text annotation.  Saboda haka, muna samar da wani zane-zane-zane-zane-zane na jami da sunan `AB' da ake amfani da telegram bot. Tuna samun Twitter 9.4k, inda kõwane Twitter ke cũtar da watumishi uku na telegram. Kayya, Munã jarraba abincin da za'a karɓi karatun mashinaki zuwa anarwa na Amhariki. KCharselect unicode block name Tuna sakan bayani a kan ka gina wani na'urar analyki na Amharic, kuma muka gane cẽwa matuƙar na yi amfani da sarsarki da hotuna na fasihi masu muhimmin masu husũma a cikin masu husũma. Ko gabatar da rabo na fasihi a cikin\nKCharselect unicode block name", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena študija sentimentalne analize za amharska besedila na družbenih omrežjih. Ker število uporabnikov družbenih omrežij vedno narašča, bi platforme družbenih omrežij želele razumeti latentni pomen in občutke besedila, da bi izboljšale postopke odločanja. Vendar pa so jeziki z nizkimi viri, kot je amhariščina, manj pozornosti namenili zaradi več razlogov, kot so pomanjkanje dobro označenih naborov podatkov, nedostopnost računalniških virov in manj strokovnih raziskovalcev na tem področju ali nič. Ta raziskava obravnava tri glavna raziskovalna vprašanja. Najprej raziskujemo primernost obstoječih orodij za nalogo analize sentimenta. Orodja za označevanje je malo za podporo obsežnih nalog označevanja v amharičnem jeziku. Tudi obstoječe platforme množičnega nabora ne podpirajo amharske besedilne opombe. Zato s pomočjo Telegramskega bota zgradimo socialnemu omrežju prijazno orodje za označevanje z imenom ASAB. Zbiramo 9,4 tisoč tweetov, kjer vsak tweet označijo trije uporabniki Telegrama. Poleg tega raziskujemo primernost pristopov strojnega učenja za analizo amharskega sentimenta. Klasifikator besedila za globoko učenje FLAIR, ki temelji na omrežnih vdelavah, ki se izračunajo iz distribucijskega tezavra, presega druge nadzorovane klasifikatorje. Nadalje raziskujemo izzive pri izgradnji sistema za analizo sentimenta za Amharič in ugotovili, da sta razširjena uporaba sarkazma in figurativnega govora glavna vprašanja pri reševanju problema. Za napredovanje raziskav analize sentimenta v\nAmharični in drugi sorodni jeziki z nizkimi viri objavljamo nabor podatkov, orodje za opombe, izvorno kodo in modele pod dovoljenjem.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את המחקר של ניתוח רגשות לטקסטים של התקשורת החברתית האמהרית. כיוון שמספר משתמשים בתקשורת החברתית מגדל תמיד, פלטפורמות התקשורת החברתית רוצות להבין את המשמעות והרגשות המוסתרות של טקסט כדי לשפר את הליך החלטה. עם זאת, שפות משאבים נמוכות כמו אמהריק קיבלו פחות תשומת לב בגלל מספר סיבות כמו חוסר קבוצות נתונים מוצבעות היטב, לא זמינות משאבים מחשבים, ולא פחות או שום מחקרים מומחים באזור. This research addresses three main research questions.  ראשית אנחנו חוקרים את היכולת של כלים קיימים למשימת ניתוח הרגשות. כלי הערות נדירים כדי לתמוך במשימות הערות בקנה מידה גדולה באמהרית. Also, the existing crowdsourcing platforms do not support Amharic text annotation.  לכן, אנחנו בונים כלי הערות חברי לרשת חברתית שנקרא "ASAB" באמצעות בוט טלגרם. אנחנו אוספים טוויטים של 9.4k, שבו כל טוויטים מוציאים על ידי שלושה משתמשים בטלגרמים. חוץ מזה, אנו חוקרים את היכולת של גישות ללמוד מכונות לניתוח רגשות אמהריים. מסגרת טקסט ללמוד עמוק FLAIR, מבוססת על תוספות רשת שמחשובות מתזאורוס פיצוח, מובילה מעל מסגרים אחרים ששולטים. אנו חוקרים יותר את האתגרים בניית מערכת ניתוח רגשות לאמהריק ומצאנו שהשימוש המפורסם של סרקזם ונאום דמוי הם הבעיות העיקריות בתמודדות עם הבעיה. כדי לקדם את מחקר ניתוח הרגשות\nשפות אמהריות ועוד שפות משאבים נמוכות, אנחנו משחררים את קבוצת המידע, כלי הערות, קוד מקור, ודוגמנים בפומבי תחת רשות.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཨ་མར་རིའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་ལ སྤྱི་ཚོགས འོན་ཀྱང་། ཨ་མར་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདིས་རྩ་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གསུམ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་སེམས་ཚོར་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ལག་ཆ་གི་འཇུག་སྟངས་དང་ཉེན་རྟོགས་ཞིབ་བྱས། ཡིག་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་སྟངས་ནི་ཨ་མ་ར་ཡུལ་གྱི་འགྲེལ་སྐུལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པ། ད་དུང་། གནས་ཡོད་པའི་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་དུ་ཨ་མར་རི་ཡི་གེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་Telegram bot སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འདྲ་བའི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་དམངས་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་འགོད་ཐེངས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཨ་མར་རི་ལ་སྐད་ཆ་བཤད་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད། The FLAIR deep learning text classifier, based on network embeddings that are computed from a distributional thesaurus, outperforms other supervised classifiers. ང་ཚོས་ཨ་མར་རི་ལ་རང་ཉིད་སྟོན་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་གི་མ་ལག་ཚད་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ན། བྱ་ཚིག་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་བྱ་ཚུལ་དེ་ སེམས་ཚོར་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཕྱོགས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་པར།\nཨ་མར་རི་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Effective Few-Shot Classification with Transfer Learning', 'ar': 'تصنيف فعال بلقطات قليلة مع نقل التعلم', 'fr': "Classification efficace en quelques coups grâce à l'apprentissage par transfert", 'pt': 'Classificação Eficaz de Poucos Tiros com Aprendizagem por Transferência', 'es': 'Clasificación eficaz de pocos disparos con aprendizaje por transferencia', 'ja': '転移学習による効果的な少ないショット分類', 'zh': '迁学有效者少镜头类', 'hi': 'स्थानांतरण सीखने के साथ प्रभावी कुछ शॉट वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Эффективная небольшая классификация с передачей обучения', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Éifeachtach Cúpla Urchar le Foghlaim Aistrithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματική ταξινόμηση με μάθηση μεταφοράς', 'hu': 'Hatékony néhány lövéses osztályozás a transzfer tanulással', 'it': 'Classificazione efficace a pochi colpi con Transfer Learning', 'lt': 'Veiksmingas nedidelių nuotraukų klasifikavimas su perkėlimo mokymu', 'kk': 'Жинақтау оқыту үшін эффективті кішкентай шектеу классификациясы', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Beberapa Tembakan Efektif dengan Pembelajaran Pemindahan', 'ml': 'Transfer Learning ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് കുറച്ച് ചെറിയ ഷോട്ട് ക്ലാസിഷനേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni Effettiva ta’ Qtugħ Ftit b’Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment', 'mn': 'Трансфер суралцах эффектив бага зэрэгцээ классификаци', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Clasificarea eficientă a câtorva lovituri cu învățarea prin transfer', 'pl': 'Skuteczna klasyfikacja niewielu strzałów z uczeniem się transferowym', 'sr': 'Efektivna klasifikacija manjih pucnjava sa učenjem prijenosa', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Effektiv klassificering av några skott med överföring av lärande', 'so': 'Isticmaalka iskuulka ganacsiga ee Effective Few-Shot', 'ta': 'மாற்று கற்றுக்கொண்டு விளைவான குறைந்தபட்ச வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thông tin ảnh hưởng đến truyền đạt', 'nl': 'Effectieve Few-Shot Classificatie met Transfer Learning', 'hr': 'Efektivna klasifikacija malog pogodaka s učenjem prijenosa', 'de': 'Effektive Few-Shot Klassifizierung mit Transfer Learning', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Beberapa Tembakan Efektif dengan Belajar Transfer', 'da': 'Effektiv Few-Shot Klassificering med Transfer Learning', 'bg': 'Ефективна класификация на няколко снимки с трансферно обучение', 'sw': 'Usafirishaji wa Chama Chache kwa Kujifunza Uhamiaji', 'tr': 'Transfer öwrenmek bilen etkinlik ýetişdirim', 'ko': '이동 학습 기반의 효과적인 소렌즈 분류', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi efektiv i pak-shtënave me mësimin e transferimit', 'fa': 'کلاس\u200cبندی\u200cهای کمی فعال با یادگیری انتقال', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Comment', 'az': 'Transfer √∂yr…ônm…ôsi il…ô effektiv az vuruŇü KlasifikasńĪ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফারার শিক্ষা দিয়ে কার্যকর কয়েকটি শুট ক্লাসিফিকেশন', 'et': 'Efektiivne vähese löögi klassifitseerimine koos siirdeõppega', 'bs': 'Efektivna klasifikacija manjih pucnjava sa učenjem prijenosa', 'ca': 'Effective Few-Shot Classification with Transfer Learning', 'cs': 'Efektivní klasifikace několika záběrů s transferovým učením', 'fi': 'Tehokas muutaman kuvan luokitus siirtooppimisella', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'sk': 'Učinkovita klasifikacija nekaj posnetkov s prenosnim učenjem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་གཏོང་ནུས་ཅན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་ཉུང་བའི་ཚོད་རིམ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས', 'he': 'שיעור פעיל של יריות קטנות עם לימוד העברה'}
{'en': 'Few-shot learning addresses the the problem of learning based on a small amount of training data. Although more well-studied in the domain of computer vision, recent work has adapted the Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) text dataset for use in the few-shot setting. In this work, we use the ARSC dataset to study a simple application of transfer learning approaches to few-shot classification. We train a single binary classifier to learn all few-shot classes jointly by prefixing class identifiers to the input text. Given the text and class, the model then makes a binary prediction for that text / class pair. Our results show that this simple approach can outperform most published results on this dataset. Surprisingly, we also show that including domain information as part of the task definition only leads to a modest improvement in model accuracy, and zero-shot classification, without further fine-tuning on few-shot domains, performs equivalently to few-shot classification. These results suggest that the classes in the ARSC few-shot task, which are defined by the intersection of domain and rating, are actually very similar to each other, and that a more suitable dataset is needed for the study of few-shot text classification.', 'ar': 'يعالج التعلم بجرعات قليلة مشكلة التعلم بناءً على كمية صغيرة من بيانات التدريب. على الرغم من أنه تمت دراستها جيدًا في مجال رؤية الكمبيوتر ، إلا أن العمل الأخير قام بتكييف مجموعة البيانات النصية لتصنيف آراء Amazon (ARSC) لاستخدامها في إعداد عدد قليل من اللقطات. في هذا العمل ، نستخدم مجموعة بيانات ARSC لدراسة تطبيق بسيط لنقل مناهج التعلم إلى تصنيف قليل اللقطات. نحن ندرب مصنفًا ثنائيًا واحدًا لتعلم جميع الفصول ذات اللقطات القليلة بشكل مشترك عن طريق إضافة معرّفات الفئة إلى نص الإدخال. بالنظر إلى النص والفئة ، يقوم النموذج بعد ذلك بعمل تنبؤ ثنائي لهذا النص / الزوج. تظهر نتائجنا أن هذا النهج البسيط يمكن أن يتفوق على معظم النتائج المنشورة في مجموعة البيانات هذه. والمثير للدهشة أننا أظهرنا أيضًا أن تضمين معلومات المجال كجزء من تعريف المهمة يؤدي فقط إلى تحسن متواضع في دقة النموذج ، وتصنيف اللقطة الصفرية ، دون مزيد من الضبط الدقيق على مجالات قليلة اللقطات ، يؤدي بشكل مكافئ لتصنيف عدد قليل من اللقطات. تشير هذه النتائج إلى أن الفئات في مهمة ARSC ذات اللقطات القليلة ، والتي يتم تحديدها من خلال تقاطع المجال والتصنيف ، هي في الواقع متشابهة جدًا مع بعضها البعض ، وأن هناك حاجة إلى مجموعة بيانات أكثر ملاءمة لدراسة تصنيف نص قليل اللقطات .', 'pt': 'O aprendizado de poucos tiros aborda o problema do aprendizado com base em uma pequena quantidade de dados de treinamento. Embora mais bem estudado no domínio da visão computacional, um trabalho recente adaptou o conjunto de dados de texto Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) para uso na configuração de poucos disparos. Neste trabalho, usamos o conjunto de dados ARSC para estudar uma aplicação simples de abordagens de aprendizado de transferência para classificação de poucos tiros. Treinamos um único classificador binário para aprender todas as classes de poucos tiros conjuntamente prefixando os identificadores de classe no texto de entrada. Dado o texto e a classe, o modelo faz uma previsão binária para esse par texto/classe. Nossos resultados mostram que essa abordagem simples pode superar a maioria dos resultados publicados neste conjunto de dados. Surpreendentemente, também mostramos que incluir informações de domínio como parte da definição da tarefa leva apenas a uma melhoria modesta na precisão do modelo, e a classificação zero-shot, sem ajustes adicionais em domínios de poucos-shots, tem um desempenho equivalente à classificação de poucos-shots. Esses resultados sugerem que as classes na tarefa ARSC de poucos tiros, que são definidas pela interseção de domínio e classificação, são realmente muito semelhantes entre si, e que um conjunto de dados mais adequado é necessário para o estudo de classificação de texto de poucos tiros .', 'es': 'El aprendizaje de pocos intentos aborda el problema del aprendizaje basándose en una pequeña cantidad de datos de entrenamiento. Aunque se ha estudiado mejor en el campo de la visión artificial, un trabajo reciente ha adaptado el conjunto de datos de texto Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) para su uso en el entorno de pocos disparos. En este trabajo, utilizamos el conjunto de datos ARSC para estudiar una aplicación simple de los enfoques de aprendizaje por transferencia a la clasificación de pocos disparos. Entrenamos un solo clasificador binario para que aprenda todas las clases de pocos disparos de forma conjunta al anteponer los identificadores de clase al texto de entrada. Dado el texto y la clase, el modelo realiza una predicción binaria para ese par texto/clase. Nuestros resultados muestran que este enfoque simple puede superar a la mayoría de los resultados publicados en este conjunto de datos. Sorprendentemente, también mostramos que la inclusión de la información de dominio como parte de la definición de la tarea solo conduce a una mejora modesta en la precisión del modelo, y la clasificación de tiro cero, sin ajustes adicionales en los dominios de pocos disparos, tiene un rendimiento equivalente a la clasificación de pocos disparos. Estos resultados sugieren que las clases de la tarea de pocos disparos de ARSC, que se definen por la intersección de dominio y calificación, son en realidad muy similares entre sí, y que se necesita un conjunto de datos más adecuado para el estudio de la clasificación de textos de pocos disparos.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage en petit nombre permet de résoudre le problème de l'apprentissage sur la base d'une petite quantité de données d'entraînement. Bien que plus étudié dans le domaine de la vision par ordinateur, des travaux récents ont adapté le jeu de données texte Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) pour une utilisation dans le cadre de quelques clichés. Dans ce travail, nous utilisons l'ensemble de données de l'ARSC pour étudier une application simple des approches d'apprentissage par transfert à la classification en quelques coups. Nous entraînons un classificateur binaire unique pour qu'il apprenne toutes les classes de quelques plans conjointement en préfixant les identificateurs de classe au texte d'entrée. En fonction du texte et de la classe, le modèle effectue ensuite une prédiction binaire pour cette paire texte/classe. Nos résultats montrent que cette approche simple peut surpasser la plupart des résultats publiés sur cet ensemble de données. De manière surprenante, nous montrons également que l'inclusion d'informations de domaine dans la définition de la tâche ne conduit qu'à une amélioration modeste de la précision du modèle, et que la classification de tir zéro, sans réglage plus précis sur les domaines à quelques plans, fonctionne de manière équivalente à la classification à faible dose. Ces résultats suggèrent que les classes de la tâche FEW-Shot ARSC, qui sont définies par l'intersection du domaine et de l'évaluation, sont en fait très similaires les unes aux autres, et qu'un ensemble de données plus approprié est nécessaire pour l'étude de la classification de texte en quelques plans.", 'ja': 'わずかなトレーニングデータに基づいて学習の問題に対処するショット学習は少ない。 コンピュータビジョンの分野ではよりよく研究されていますが、最近の研究では、数ショット設定で使用するためにAmazon Review Sentiment Classification （ ARSC ）テキストデータセットを適応させました。 この研究では、ARSCデータセットを使用して、数ショット分類への転送学習アプローチの単純な応用を研究します。 単一のバイナリ分類子を訓練し、入力テキストにクラス識別子をプレフィックスすることで、すべての数ショットクラスを共同で学習します。 テキストとクラスを考慮すると、モデルはそのテキスト/クラスのペアのバイナリ予測を行います。 私たちの結果は、この単純なアプローチが、このデータセットで公開されているほとんどの結果を上回ることができることを示しています。 驚くべきことに、私たちはまた、タスク定義の一部としてドメイン情報を含めることは、モデルの精度のわずかな改善にしかつながらず、ゼロショット分類は、ほとんどのショットドメインでさらに微調整することなく、ほとんどのショット分類と同等に実行されることを示しています。 これらの結果は、ドメインと重要度の交差によって定義されるARSCの幾つかのショットタスクのクラスが、実際には互いに非常に類似しており、幾つかのショットのテキスト分類の研究には、より適切なデータセットが必要であることを示唆している。', 'zh': '小镜头学,少习数也。 虽计算机域深究,而近事已将亚马逊论情类(ARSC)文本数集改为少数镜头置之。 于此,吾用ARSC数集来讲迁学之法于少镜头类之中者简而用之。 训练单二进制分类器,因输文本标识符前缀以共学寡类。 给定文与类,模然后二进制/。 吾之的结果表明,其法胜其数集上多已发者。 所讶者,犹明将域信以为务,适足以为准确性,而零次分类(无以加少量触发域)同于少分也。 此结果表明,ARSC中由域与评级之交集定义之类实相似,且须更得其数集来研究少镜头文本分类。', 'hi': 'कुछ-शॉट लर्निंग प्रशिक्षण डेटा की एक छोटी राशि के आधार पर सीखने की समस्या को संबोधित करता है। हालांकि कंप्यूटर दृष्टि के डोमेन में अधिक अच्छी तरह से अध्ययन किया गया है, हाल के काम ने कुछ-शॉट सेटिंग में उपयोग के लिए अमेज़ॅन रिव्यू सेंटीमेंट क्लासिफिकेशन (एआरएससी) टेक्स्ट डेटासेट को अनुकूलित किया है। इस काम में, हम एआरएससी डेटासेट का उपयोग कुछ-शॉट वर्गीकरण के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के एक सरल अनुप्रयोग का अध्ययन करने के लिए करते हैं। हम इनपुट टेक्स्ट के लिए क्लास आइडेंटिफ़ायर को उपसर्ग करके संयुक्त रूप से सभी कुछ-शॉट कक्षाओं को सीखने के लिए एक एकल बाइनरी क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। पाठ और वर्ग को देखते हुए, मॉडल तब उस पाठ / वर्ग जोड़ी के लिए एक बाइनरी भविष्यवाणी करता है। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि यह सरल दृष्टिकोण इस डेटासेट पर अधिकांश प्रकाशित परिणामों को बेहतर बना सकता है। हैरानी की बात है, हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि कार्य परिभाषा के हिस्से के रूप में डोमेन जानकारी को शामिल करने से केवल मॉडल सटीकता में मामूली सुधार होता है, और शून्य-शॉट वर्गीकरण, कुछ-शॉट डोमेन पर आगे ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के बिना, कुछ-शॉट वर्गीकरण के बराबर प्रदर्शन करता है। इन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि एआरएससी कुछ-शॉट कार्य में कक्षाएं, जिन्हें डोमेन और रेटिंग के प्रतिच्छेदन द्वारा परिभाषित किया गया है, वास्तव में एक-दूसरे के समान हैं, और यह कि कुछ-शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण के अध्ययन के लिए अधिक उपयुक्त डेटासेट की आवश्यकता है।', 'ru': 'Обучение по методу "нескольких выстрелов" решает проблему обучения на основе небольшого объема данных о профессиональной подготовке. Несмотря на более хорошо изученную область компьютерного зрения, недавняя работа адаптировала набор текстовых данных Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) для использования в настройках с несколькими снимками. В этой работе мы используем набор данных ARSC для изучения простого применения подходов к обучению переносу к классификации с небольшим количеством выстрелов. Мы обучаем один двоичный классификатор, чтобы совместно изучать все классы с несколькими выстрелами, префиксуя идентификаторы классов к входному тексту. Учитывая текст и класс, модель затем делает двоичное предсказание для этой пары текст/класс. Наши результаты показывают, что этот простой подход может превзойти большинство опубликованных результатов в этом наборе данных. Удивительно, но мы также показываем, что включение информации о домене в качестве части определения задачи приводит лишь к скромному улучшению точности модели, а классификация с нулевым выстрелом без дальнейшей точной настройки на доменах с малым выстрелом работает эквивалентно классификации с малым выстрелом. Эти результаты свидетельствуют о том, что классы в задаче ARSC с несколькими выстрелами, которые определяются пересечением области и рейтинга, на самом деле очень похожи друг на друга, и что для изучения классификации текста с несколькими выстрелами необходим более подходящий набор данных.', 'ga': 'Tugann an fhoghlaim bheagáin aghaidh ar fhadhb na foghlama bunaithe ar líon beag sonraí oiliúna. Cé go ndéantar staidéar níos fearr air i réimse an fhís ríomhaire, tá obair le déanaí tar éis tacar sonraí téacs Aicmiú Mothúcháin Athbhreithnithe Amazon (ARSC) a oiriúnú le húsáid sa suíomh cúpla lámhaigh. San obair seo, bainimid úsáid as tacar sonraí ARSC chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar chur i bhfeidhm simplí de chur chuige foghlama aistrithe maidir le haicmiú cúpla seat. Cuirimid oiliúint ar aicmitheoir dénártha amháin chun gach rang cúpla seat a fhoghlaim i gcomhpháirt trí aitheantóirí ranga a réamhshocrú don téacs ionchuir. Agus an téacs agus an rang á gcur san áireamh, déanann an tsamhail tuar dhénártha don phéire ranga/téacs sin. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí gur féidir leis an gcur chuige simplí seo feidhmiú níos fearr ná na torthaí is mó a foilsíodh ar an tacar sonraí seo. Is ionadh é, léirímid freisin nach dtagann feabhas beag ar chruinneas na samhla dá n-áiritear faisnéis fearainn mar chuid de shainiú taisc, agus go bhfeidhmíonn aicmiú nialasaigh, gan mionchoigeartú breise ar fhearainn cúpla lámhaigh, ar chomhchéim le haicmiú cúpla lámhaigh. Tugann na torthaí seo le tuiscint go bhfuil na haicmí sa tasc cúpla lámhaigh ARSC, atá sainmhínithe ag crosbhealach fearainn agus rátála, an-chosúil lena chéile i ndáiríre, agus go bhfuil gá le tacar sonraí níos oiriúnaí chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar aicmiú téacs cúpla lámhaigh. .', 'hu': 'A néhány lövéses tanulás kis mennyiségű képzési adat alapján kezeli a tanulás problémáját. Bár jól tanulmányozták a számítógépes látás területén, a közelmúltbeli munkák átalakították az Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) szövegadatkészletet a kevés felvételes beállításokban való használatra. Ebben a munkában az ARSC adatkészletet használjuk arra, hogy tanulmányozzuk a transzfer tanulási megközelítések egyszerű alkalmazását a néhány lövés osztályozására. Egyetlen bináris osztályozót képezünk arra, hogy közösen tanulja meg az összes néhány lövéses osztályt, az osztályazonosítókat előzetesen a bemeneti szöveghez. A szöveg és osztály alapján a modell készít egy bináris előrejelzést az adott szöveg/osztály párra. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy ez az egyszerű megközelítés felülmúlhatja a legtöbb közzétett eredményt ebben az adatkészletben. Meglepő módon azt is megmutatjuk, hogy a domain információk feladatdefiníció részeként történő beépítése csak szerény javulást eredményez a modell pontosságának, és a zero-shot osztályozás – a kevés-shot tartományok további finomhangolása nélkül – megegyezik a kevés-shot osztályozással. Ezek az eredmények arra utalnak, hogy az ARSC néhány lövéses feladat osztályai, amelyeket a domain és a minősítés metszéspontja határoz meg, valójában nagyon hasonlóak egymáshoz, és hogy a néhány lövéses szöveg osztályozásának tanulmányozásához megfelelőbb adatkészletre van szükség.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση με λίγα πλάνα αντιμετωπίζει το πρόβλημα της μάθησης με βάση ένα μικρό ποσό δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Αν και πιο καλά μελετημένος στον τομέα της οπτικής υπολογιστών, πρόσφατες εργασίες έχουν προσαρμόσει το σύνολο δεδομένων κειμένου ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων του Amazon Review Classification (ARSC) για χρήση στο περιβάλλον λίγων πλάνων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε το σύνολο δεδομένων για να μελετήσουμε μια απλή εφαρμογή προσεγγίσεων μάθησης μεταφοράς στην ταξινόμηση λίγων πυροβολισμών. Εκπαιδεύουμε έναν ενιαίο δυαδικό ταξινομητή για να μαθαίνουμε όλες τις λίγων-πυροβολισμών τάξεις από κοινού, βάζοντας τα αναγνωριστικά κλάσης στο κείμενο εισαγωγής. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη το κείμενο και την τάξη, το μοντέλο στη συνέχεια κάνει μια δυαδική πρόβλεψη για αυτό το ζεύγος κειμένου/τάξης. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι αυτή η απλή προσέγγιση μπορεί να ξεπεράσει τα περισσότερα δημοσιευμένα αποτελέσματα σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων. Παραδόξως, αποδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι η συμπερίληψη πληροφοριών τομέα ως μέρος του ορισμού εργασίας οδηγεί μόνο σε μια μέτρια βελτίωση της ακρίβειας του μοντέλου, και η ταξινόμηση μηδενικού πυροβολισμού, χωρίς περαιτέρω Feinabstimmung σε τομείς λίγων πυροβολισμών, αποδίδει ισοδύναμα με την ταξινόμηση λίγων πυροβολισμών. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά υποδηλώνουν ότι οι τάξεις στην εργασία ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών ARSC, οι οποίες καθορίζονται από τη τομή τομέα και βαθμολογίας, στην πραγματικότητα είναι πολύ παρόμοιες μεταξύ τους, και ότι ένα πιο κατάλληλο σύνολο δεδομένων απαιτείται για τη μελέτη της ταξινόμησης ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών κειμένου.', 'ka': 'პატარა სწავლის მისამართება მასწავლის პრობლემა, რომელიც მასწავლის მარტივი მონაცემების განმავლობაზე ბაზიან. თუმცა კომპიუტერის ხედვის დემონიში უფრო მსგავსი შესწავლია, ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) ტექსტის მონაცემების კლასიფიკაცია (ტექსტი) ტექს ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ARSC მონაცემების კლასიფიკაციისთვის გამოყენებთ საუკეთესო პროგრამის გასწავლების გადასწავლების მიღება. ჩვენ ერთი ბინარი კლასიფიკაციას გავისწავლით ყველა პატარა კლასის შესახებ კლასის ინდიდენტექსტის პრეფიქსირებით. ტექსტის და კლასის შესახებ, მოდელის შემდეგ ამ ტექსტის/კლასის ზოგის ბინარი წარმოდგენა. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ ეს უკეთესი პროგრამა შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ უფრო გამოსახულებული წარმოდგენები ამ მონაცემების შე სხვადასხვა, ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ დემომინის ინფორმაცია როგორც საქმე განსაზღვრების ნაწილი იქნება მხოლოდ მარტივი მოდელური წარმოდგენებაში და ნულ-სტარტის კლასიფიკაციაში, რამდენიმე სტარტის დიომენზე უფ ამ შედეგი შემდეგი იტყვის, რომ ARSC-ის პატარა სტარა რაოდენობის კლასები, რომელიც დიომინის და რეტექსიკონფიკაციის შემთხვევაში განსაზღვრებულია, მხოლოდ ერთმანეთისთვის მსგავსი, და რომ უფრო საჭირო მონაც', 'it': "L'apprendimento di pochi colpi affronta il problema dell'apprendimento basato su una piccola quantità di dati di formazione. Anche se più ben studiato nel campo della computer vision, recenti lavori hanno adattato il set di dati di testo ARSC (Amazon Review Sentiment Classification) per l'uso nell'impostazione di pochi scatti. In questo lavoro, utilizziamo il dataset ARSC per studiare una semplice applicazione degli approcci di apprendimento del trasferimento alla classificazione a pochi colpi. Formiamo un singolo classificatore binario per imparare tutte le classi a pochi colpi insieme prefificando gli identificatori di classe al testo di input. Dato il testo e la classe, il modello fa quindi una previsione binaria per quella coppia testo/classe. I nostri risultati mostrano che questo semplice approccio può superare la maggior parte dei risultati pubblicati su questo set di dati. Sorprendentemente, mostriamo anche che l'inclusione delle informazioni sul dominio come parte della definizione delle attività porta solo ad un modesto miglioramento della precisione del modello, e la classificazione a scatto zero, senza ulteriori regolazioni sui domini a scatto ridotto, esegue in modo equivalente alla classificazione a scatto ridotto. Questi risultati suggeriscono che le classi del task pochi scatti ARSC, definite dall'intersezione tra dominio e rating, sono in realtà molto simili tra loro, e che è necessario un set di dati più adatto per lo studio della classificazione dei testi pochi scatti.", 'lt': 'Mažas mokymasis sprendžia mokymosi problem ą, pagrįstą nedideliu mokymo duomenų kiekiu. Nors kompiuterio regėjimo srityje buvo geriau ištirta, neseniai atliktas darbas pritaikė Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) teksto duomenų rinkinį, skirtą naudoti mažai nuotraukų. Šiame darbe mes naudojame ARSC duomenų rinkinį, kad išnagrinėtume paprastą perkėlimo mokymosi metodų taikymą kelių nuotraukų klasifikacijai. Mes mokome vieną dvišalį klasifikatorių, kad kartu mokytume visas keletą fotografinių klasių nustatydami klasės identifikatorius į įvestą tekstą. Atsižvelgiant į tekstą ir klasę, modelis daro dvigubą šios teksto ir klasės poros prognozę. Our results show that this simple approach can outperform most published results on this dataset.  Įspūdinga, mes taip pat rodome, kad įtraukiant domeno informaciją kaip užduočių apibrėžties dalį tik nedidelis modelio tikslumo pagerėjimas ir nulinės nuotraukos klasifikacija, be tolesnio patobulinimo keliuose nuotraukos domenuose, atlieka lygiavertį kelių nuotraukų klasifikacijai. Šie rezultatai rodo, kad ARSC kelių nuotraukų užduoties klasės, apibrėžtos domeno ir reitingo tarpsniu, iš tikrųjų yra labai panašios viena kitai, ir kad kelių nuotraukų teksto klasifikacijai atlikti reikia tinkamesnio duomenų rinkinio.', 'kk': 'Кішкене оқыту мәселесін бір кішкене оқыту мәселесіне негізделген. Компьютер көрінісінің доменінде жақсы оқу үшін, жаңа жұмыс Amazon Review Sentiment классификациясы (ARSC) мәтін деректер жинағын кейбір түрлендіру параметрлерінде қолданылатын. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, ARSC деректер қорларын бірнеше шарлығына аудару үшін қарапайым бағдарламасын зерттеу үшін қолданамыз. Біз бір бинарлық классификациясын келтірілген мәтініне префикс ету үшін бір-бірінші кеңістік классификациясын үйрену үшін оқыдық. Мәтін және класы болса, үлгісі кейін мәтін/ клас екі үшін бинарлық алдын алады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз бұл қарапайым тәсілі деректер жинағында ең жарияланған нәтижелерді жасай алады. Біз сондай-ақ домен мәліметін тапсырманың анықтамасының бір бөлігі ретінде біз тек үлгісінің дұрыстығын түзетуге арналған және нөл шоу классификациясы, кейбір шоу домендеріне жақсы түзетуге болмай, бірнеше шарт классификаци Бұл нәтижелер ARSC тапсырмасының бір-біріне ұқсас болып, доменнің және оқиғаларының бір-біріне анықталған бір-біріне ұқсас болып, бірнеше мәтін классификациясының зерттеу үшін қолданылатын деректер жиының бапт', 'ml': 'കുറച്ചു ഷോട്ട് പഠിക്കുന്നത് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ച് ട്ര കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്റെ ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, അടുത്ത ജോലി അമാസണ്\u200d റിവിവ്യൂ ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200dറ് സെന്\u200dട്രൈവ് ക് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ARSC ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, സാധാരണ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ലളിതമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബൈനരി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ കുറച്ച് ഷോട്ട് ക്ലാസുകളും ഒന്നിച്ച് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d  Given the text and class, the model then makes a binary prediction for that text/class pair.  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ ലളിതമായ നടപടി ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രസിദ്ധമായ അത്ഭുതപ്പെടുന്നു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത്, ജോലിയുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗമായി ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് മാത്രമാണ്, മോഡലിന്റെ വിശേഷതയില്\u200d  ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ആർഎസ്സിയിലെ കുറച്ച് ഷോട്ട് ജോലിയിലുള്ള ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, ഡൊമെയിനിന്റെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെയും റേജിങ്ങിന്റെയും ക്ലാസുകള', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim żgħir jindirizza l-problem a tat-tagħlim ibbażat fuq ammont żgħir ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ. Although more well-studied in the domain of computer vision, recent work has adapted the Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) text dataset for use in the few-shot setting.  In this work, we use the ARSC dataset to study a simple application of transfer learning approaches to few-shot classification.  Aħna nħarrġu klassifikatur binarju wieħed biex jitgħallmu l-klassijiet kollha bi ftit fotografiji b’mod konġunt billi jiġu prefixxati l-identifikaturi tal-klassi għat-test tad-dħul. Minħabba t-test u l-klassi, il-mudell imbagħad jagħmel tbassir binarju għal dak il-par tat-test/klassi. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li dan l-approċċ sempliċi jista’ jaqbeż il-biċċa l-kbira tar-riżultati ppubblikati fuq dan is-sett ta’ dejta. Bħala sorpriża, nuru wkoll li l-inklużjoni tal-informazzjoni dwar id-dominju bħala parti mid-definizzjoni tal-kompitu twassal biss għal titjib modest fil-preċiżjoni tal-mudell, u l-klassifikazzjoni b’żero shot, mingħajr a ġġustament ulterjuri fuq dominji b’ftit shot, twettaq b’mod ekwivalenti għal klassifikazzjoni b’ftit shot. Dawn ir-riżultati jissuġġerixxu li l-klassijiet fil-kompitu ARSC bi ftit fotografiji, li huma definiti mill-intersezzjoni tad-dominju u l-klassifikazzjoni, fil-fatt huma simili ħafna għal xulxin, u li hemm bżonn ta’ sett ta’ dejta aktar adattat għall-istudju tal-klassifikazzjoni tat-test bi ftit fotografiji.', 'mn': 'Бага зэрэг суралцах нь суралцах асуудлыг бага хэмжээний суралцах өгөгдлийн үндсэн. Компьютерийн харагдах хэмжээнд илүү сайн судалсан ч, саяхан ажил нь Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) текст өгөгдлийн санг хэдэн зурагт хэрэглэх боломжтой болгон загварчлалтай болсон. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид ARSC өгөгдлийн санг ашиглаж суралцах хэрэглээний энгийн хэрэглээнийг хэдэн зурагт хуваалцах хэрэглээнд судалдаг. Бид нэг хоёр дахь ангийнхээ хувьд бүх хэдэн удаа суралцах хичээлийг орхих текст руу шилжүүлэхэд суралцаж байна. Текст болон хичээлийн хувьд загвар нь тэр текст/хичээлийн хооронд хоёр давхар таамаглалт хийдэг. Манай үр дүнд энэ энгийн арга баримт энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн олон нийтлэгдсэн үр дүнг гаргаж чадна. Гайхалтай нь бид мөн ажлын тодорхойлолтын нэг хэсэг болгон холбоотой мэдээлэл нь зөвхөн загварын тодорхойлолтын зөвхөн бага зөвхөн загварын тодорхойлолтын бага зөвшөөрөх боломжтой, цэг шофт хуваалцаагүй хэд хэдэн шофт хува Эдгээр үр дүнд ARSC-ын хэдэн зурагтай ажлын хичээл нь холбоотой, өргөн хэсэгт тодорхойлж буй холбоотой хэсэгт ижил төстэй, хэдэн зурагтай текст хуваалцааны судалгаанд илүү зөв өгөгдлийн сан хэрэгтэй.', 'no': 'Feil læringsadresser er problemet med læring basert på ein liten mengd opplæringsdata. Selv om det er meir godt studiert i domenet for datavising, har det siste arbeidet tilpassa tekstinnstillingane for Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) for bruk i få bilete. I denne arbeida bruker vi ARSC-datasettet for å studera eit enkelt program for å lære overføringar tilnærmar til få-bilete klassifikasjon. Vi treng ei enkelt binærklassifiserer for å lære alle få-skjortklassar saman ved å prefiksera klassifiseringar til inndata-teksten. Gjennomsikt teksten og klassen, gjer modellen så ein binær forhåndsvising for den tekst/klassespar. Resultatet våre viser at denne enkle tilnærminga kan utføra dei mest utgjevne resultata på denne datasettet. I surpris viser vi også at, inkludert domeneinformasjon som del av oppgåvedefinisjonen, fører berre til ein modellig forbedring i nøyaktighet for modellen, og nullstiltklassifikasjon, utan meir finnstilling på få-filmdomene, utfører tilsvarande klassifikasjon med få-shot. Desse resultatene tyder på at klassene i ARSC-oppgåva som er definert av avsnittet av domenet og rating, er faktisk svært liknande kvarandre, og at ei meir passande datasett treng for å studiera få bilete tekstklassifikasjon.', 'pl': 'Mało-strzałowe uczenie się rozwiązuje problem uczenia się w oparciu o niewielką ilość danych szkoleniowych. Chociaż bardziej dobrze zbadane w dziedzinie wizji komputerowej, ostatnie prace dostosowały zestaw danych Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) do wykorzystania w ustawieniu kilku ujęć. W niniejszej pracy wykorzystujemy zbiór danych ARSC do badania prostego zastosowania metod uczenia się transferowego do klasyfikacji kilku strzałów. Trenujemy pojedynczy binarny klasyfikator, aby uczyć się wszystkich kilku klas wspólnie poprzez prefiksowanie identyfikatorów klasy do tekstu wejściowego. Biorąc pod uwagę tekst i klasę, model dokonuje przewidywania binarnego dla tej pary tekst/klasa. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że to proste podejście może przewyższyć większość opublikowanych wyników na tym zbiorze danych. Co zaskakujące, pokazujemy również, że uwzględnienie informacji o domenie jako części definicji zadań prowadzi tylko do niewielkiej poprawy dokładności modelu, a klasyfikacja zerowa, bez dalszego dostrajania na domenach kilku strzałów, działa równoważnie do klasyfikacji kilku strzałów. Wyniki te sugerują, że klasy w zadaniu kilku strzałów ARSC, które są definiowane przez przecięcie domeny i ratingu, są do siebie w rzeczywistości bardzo podobne i że do badania klasyfikacji tekstu kilku strzałów potrzebny jest bardziej odpowiedni zbiór danych.', 'ro': 'Învățarea cu câteva împușcături abordează problema învățării bazată pe o cantitate mică de date de formare. Deși mai bine studiată în domeniul viziunii pe calculator, lucrările recente au adaptat setul de date de text Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) pentru utilizarea în setările cu câteva fotografii. În această lucrare, folosim setul de date ARSC pentru a studia o aplicare simplă a abordărilor de transfer de învățare pentru clasificarea cu câteva lovituri. Antrenăm un singur clasificator binar pentru a învăța toate clasele cu câteva împușcături împreună prin prefixarea identificatorilor de clasă la textul de intrare. Având în vedere textul și clasa, modelul face apoi o predicție binară pentru acea pereche text/clasă. Rezultatele noastre arată că această abordare simplă poate depăși majoritatea rezultatelor publicate pe acest set de date. În mod surprinzător, arătăm, de asemenea, că includerea informațiilor de domeniu ca parte a definiției sarcinii duce doar la o îmbunătățire modestă a acurateții modelului, iar clasificarea zero-shot, fără ajustarea ulterioară a domeniilor cu câteva fotografii, efectuează echivalent clasificării cu câteva fotografii. Aceste rezultate sugerează că clasele din activitatea ARSC cu câteva împușcături, care sunt definite de intersecția domeniului și ratingului, sunt de fapt foarte similare unul cu celălalt și că este necesar un set de date mai potrivit pentru studiul clasificării textelor cu câteva împușcături.', 'sr': 'Malo pucnjave na učenju rješava problem učenja na osnovu malih količina podataka o obuci. Iako je bolje proučeno u domenu kompjuterske vizije, nedavni rad se prilagodio tekstualnoj klasifikaciji Amazon Review Sentiment klasifikacije (ARSC) za upotrebu na nekoliko snimaka. U ovom poslu, koristimo ARSC podatke da proučimo jednostavnu aplikaciju pristupa prebacivanja prema klasifikaciji nekoliko metaka. Vježbamo jednog binarnog klasifikatora da nauèimo sve klase sa nekoliko metaka zajedno, predstavljajuæi identifikatore klase na tekst ulaska. S obzirom na tekst i klasu, model onda pravi binarnu predviđanju za taj par teksta/klase. Naši rezultati pokazuju da ovaj jednostavan pristup može izvršiti većinu objavljenih rezultata na ovom setu podataka. Iznenaðeno, takoðe pokazujemo da ukljuèujuæi domenu informacije kao deo definicije zadataka dovodi do skromnog poboljšanja taènosti model a i klasifikacije nula pucnjave, bez daljnjeg isprave na nekoliko pucnjava, izvršava ekvivalentno klasifikaciji nekoliko pucnjava. Ovi rezultati sugeriraju da su klase u zadatku ARSC-a koji su definisani prekidanjem domena i ocjena, zapravo veoma slične jedni drugima, i da je potrebna odgovarajuća seta podataka za ispitivanje klasifikacije teksta sa nekoliko snimaka.', 'mk': 'Малку снимки на учењето го решаваат проблемот на учењето базирано на мала количина податоци за обука. Although more well-studied in the domain of computer vision, recent work has adapted the Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) text dataset for use in the few-shot setting.  In this work, we use the ARSC dataset to study a simple application of transfer learning approaches to few-shot classification.  Тренираме еден бинарен класификатор за да ги научиме сите класи со неколку снимки заедно со префиксирање на идентификаторите на класата на внатрешниот текст. Со оглед на текстот и класата, моделот потоа прави бинарно предвидување за тој пар текст/класа. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека овој едноставен пристап може да ги надмине најобјавените резултати на овој податок. Surprisingly, we also show that including domain information as part of the task definition only leads to a modest improvement in model accuracy, and zero-shot classification, without further fine-tuning on few-shot domains, performs equivalently to few-shot classification.  Овие резултати укажуваат на тоа дека класите во АРСК неколку снимки, кои се дефинирани од преминот на доменот и рејтингот, всушност се многу слични меѓусебно, и дека е потребен посоодветен податок за студијата на неколку снимки класификација на текст.', 'si': 'පොඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා පොඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. පරිගණක දර්ශනය සඳහා වැඩිය හොඳින් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, අලුත් වැඩේ අමසේන්ස් පරීක්ෂණය සංවේදනය (ARSC) පාළුවන මේ වැඩේ අපි ARSC දත්ත සූදානයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා සරල ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. අපි එක්ක බායිනාරි විශේෂකයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න සියළු විශේෂ කිහිපයක් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂකයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පු පාළ සහ ප්\u200dරදේශය දැනුනොත්, මොඩේල් එක පස්සේ පාළ සහ ප්\u200dරදේශ වර්ගය සඳහා බායිනාරි විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් මේ දත්ත සැට වලින් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය විශ්වාසයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඩොමේන් තොරතුරු විශ්වාසයේ කොටසක් විදිහට තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් හරියට වැඩි වැඩි කරනවා, සහ ශූන් තොරතුරු විශ්වාසයෙන්  මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran beberapa tembakan mengatasi masalah pembelajaran berdasarkan jumlah kecil data latihan. Walaupun lebih belajar dengan baik dalam domain visi komputer, kerja baru-baru ini telah menyesuaikan set data teks Klasifikasi Sentiment Amazon Review (ARSC) untuk digunakan dalam tetapan beberapa-shot. Dalam kerja ini, kami menggunakan set data ARSC untuk mempelajari aplikasi sederhana pendekatan pembelajaran pemindahan kepada kelasukan beberapa tembakan. Kami melatih pengklasifikasi binari tunggal untuk belajar semua kelas beberapa tembakan bersama-sama dengan menyatakan pengenalpasti kelas ke teks input. Mengingat teks dan kelas, model kemudian membuat ramalan binari untuk pasangan teks/kelas itu. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan sederhana ini boleh melampaui kebanyakan hasil yang diterbitkan pada set data ini. Surprisingly, we also show that including domain information as part of the task definition only leads to a modest improvement in model accuracy, and zero-shot classification, without further fine-tuning on few-shot domains, performs equivalently to few-shot classification.  Hasil ini menunjukkan bahawa kelas dalam tugas ARSC beberapa tembakan, yang ditakrif oleh persimpangan domain dan rating, sebenarnya sangat mirip satu sama lain, dan bahawa set data yang lebih sesuai diperlukan untuk kajian kelasukan teks beberapa tembakan.', 'sv': 'Få-shot lärande behandlar problemet med lärande baserat på en liten mängd träningsdata. Även om det är mer välstuderat inom datorseende, har det senaste arbetet anpassat Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) textdatauppsättningen för användning i fåtalsinställningen. I det här arbetet använder vi ARSC-datauppsättningen för att studera en enkel tillämpning av överföringsinlärningsmetoder för få skott klassificering. Vi tränar en enda binär klassificerare för att lära sig alla få-skott klasser gemensamt genom att prefixera klass identifierare till indata text. Med tanke på text och klass gör modellen sedan en binär förutsägelse för det text/klass paret. Våra resultat visar att detta enkla tillvägagångssätt kan överträffa de flesta publicerade resultaten på denna dataset. Överraskande nog visar vi också att inkluderandet av domäninformation som en del av uppgiftsdefinitionen endast leder till en blygsam förbättring av modellnoggrannheten, och noll-shot klassificering, utan ytterligare finjustering på några-shot domäner, presterar likvärdigt med några-shot klassificering. Dessa resultat tyder på att klasserna i ARSC:s fåtal skott-uppgift, som definieras av skärningspunkten mellan domän och rating, faktiskt är mycket lika varandra, och att en mer lämplig datauppsättning behövs för att studera fåtal textklassificeringar.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada wax yar ayaa ku habboonaya dhibaatada waxbarashada ku saleysan waxbarashada in tiro yar oo waxbarasho ah. In kastoo aad si fiican looga barto gudaha muuqashada kambiyuutarka, shaqada ugu dambeysay wuxuu hagaajiyey fasaxa sameynta ee Amazon Review Sentiment (ARSC) macluumaadka qoraalka si loo isticmaalo xarunta sawirada. Shaqadaas waxaynu u isticmaalnaa ARSC-ka-bandhigga si aan u baranno codsi fudud ah oo lagu soo wareejiyo waxbarashada iskuulka. Waxaannu ku tababarinnaa fasalka labaad oo kaliya si aan u barno fasalka oo dhan si wada jir ah, si aan u horumarinno qofka aqoonsiga fasalka u qorayo qoraalka gudaha. Markii la siiyo qoraalka iyo fasalka, modelku wuxuu ka dhigaa wax ku sii sheegi karo labada labood ee qoraalka/fasalka. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqan karaan in qaababkan fudud ay ka samaysan karto resultiyada ugu badan ee la soo daabacay sawiradan. Surprisingly, we also show that including domain information as part of the task definition only leads to a modest improvement in model accuracy, and zero-shot classification, without further fine-tuning on few-shot domains, performs equivalently to few-shot classification.  Arrimahaan waxay ka jeedaan in fasalka arimaha ARSC ee ay ku qoran yihiin qeybta gudaha iyo qiimeynta, ay isku mid yihiin qaarkood, waxayna u baahan yihiin koorasyo macluumaad ku habboon in lagu barayo fasalka qoraalka qoraalka.', 'ta': 'சிறிய பயிற்சி தரவை அடிப்படையிலான கற்றல் பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்கிறது. கணினியின் காட்சியின் களத்தில் மேலும் படிக்கப்பட்டாலும், சமீபத்தில் அமாசான் முன்னோட்டு காட்சி செயல்பாட்டு முடிவு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது சி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ARSC தரவுத்தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றும் கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு எளிய பயன்பாட்டை படிக்க பயன்படுத்துகிற நாம் ஒரு இருமுறை வகுப்பாளரை பயிற்சி செய்து அனைத்து சில ஷாட் வகுப்புகளையும் ஒன்றாக முன்னோட்டு வகுப்பு அடையாளம் உள் Given the text and class, the model then makes a binary prediction for that text/class pair.  நம் முடிவுகள் இந்த சுலபமான வழிமுறையை இந்த தகவல் அமைப்பில் மிக வெளிப்படையான முடிவுகளை செய்ய முடியு ஆச்சரியமாக, நாம் வேலை வரையறையில் உள்ள களம் தகவல்கள் ஒரு பகுதியாக இருக்கும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம். மாதிரி சரியான முன்னேற்றத்தை மட்டும் மாதிரி சரியாக முன்னேற்றும், ப இந்த முடிவுகள் அர்எஸ்சி சில செய்தி பணியில் உள்ள வகுப்புகள் மற்றும் விகிதத்தின் இடைவெளியில் வரையறுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, உண்மையில் ஒருவர் மற்றொருவருக்கும் போன்ற', 'ur': 'کم شٹ کی تعلیم آدرس کی تعلیم کے مسئلہ کو ایک چھوٹی مقدار کی تعلیم دادہ پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے. اگرچہ کمپیوٹر ویزین کے ڈومین میں زیادہ اچھا پڑھا گیا ہے، اچھا کام کمپیوٹر ویزین میں استعمال کے لئے Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) ٹیکسٹ ڈاٹ سٹ کو اضافہ کر دیا گیا ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم ARSC ڈاٹ سٹ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک سادھی استعمال کی تعلیم کم شٹ کلاسپیٹ کے لئے آسانی تلاش کریں۔ ہم ایک دوئناری کلیسٹر کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں کہ ہر کم شٹ کلیسٹ کو ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ سکھائیں، کلاس پہچان کرنے والوں کو اینپیٹ ٹیکسٹ میں پیش فریکس کریں۔ متن اور کلاس کے ذریعہ، موڈل اس کے بعد اس متن/کلاس جوڑے کے لئے ایک دوئی پیش بینی کرتا ہے. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ساده طریقہ اس ڈیٹ سٹ پر بہترین نتیجے ظاہر کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم بھی نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ڈومین معلومات کو تابع کی تعریف کے حصہ میں شامل کرنا صرف موڈل دقیق کے ذریعہ ذریعہ سے بہتر ہوتا ہے اور صفر-شٹ کلاسیفوں کے بغیر کم شٹ ڈومین پر اضافہ کرنا، کم شٹ کلاسیفوں کے برابر عمل کرتا ہے. یہ نتیجے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ARSC کے کم-شٹ کام میں کلاس، جو ڈومین اور ریٹینگ کے پیچھے سے منظور ہیں، ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ بہت برابر ہیں، اور یہ کہ کم-شٹ ٹیکسٹ کلاسی کے مطالعہ کے لئے بہت مناسب ڈاٹ سٹ کی ضرورت ہے.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik o'rganishni o'rganish muammolarini o'rganish muammolariga raqam qiladi. Kompyuter koʻrinishining domain'idagi ko'proq o'qindilar qutisi boʻlsa, yangi ishni bir nechta saqlash uchun Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) matn maʼlumotlarini oʻzgartiradi. Bu ishda, biz ARSC maʼlumot tarkibini foydalanamiz, o'rganish o'rganish uchun oddiy dasturni o'rganish uchun bir necha shakllar darajasiga o'rganamiz. Biz bir necha marta sinfni bir necha marta sinfni o'rganish uchun bir necha sinfni o'rganamiz. Kiritish matnni birinchi darajadagi sinfning identifikalarini birinchi marta o'rganamiz. Matn va sinfga qaragan model keyin bu matn/sinfning ikki ikki marta ishlatiladi. Bizning natijalarimiz shu oddiy usul bu maʼlumot sohasida ko'pchilik natijalarini bajarishi mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz shunday vazifaning qismlari sifatida domen maʼlumoti yordamida faqat modelning aniqligiga o'xshash o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi, va nuqta sifatida qo'shimcha darajaga qo'shilmaydi, bir nechta qo'llangan domenada bir necha shakl darajaga bajariladi. Ushbu natijalar tarkibi domen tarkibi va rating tarkibi aniqlangan ARSC orqali bir necha marta oʻxshash jarayonlarini anglatadi. Bu natijalar faqat bir necha marta oʻxshash va bir bir bir bir bir xil maʼlumot tizimini qidirish kerak.", 'vi': 'Ít trường hợp học chỉ giải quyết vấn đề học dựa trên một lượng nhỏ các dữ liệu về huấn luyện. Mặc dù nghiên cứu kỹ hơn về lĩnh vực nhìn trên máy tính, công việc gần đây đã thích nghi các tập tin văn bản thuộc Hồ sơ Đọc Amazon (ARSC) được sử dụng trong thiết lập ít ảnh. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi sử dụng bộ dữ liệu ARSC để nghiên cứu một ứng dụng đơn giản về phương pháp học cách phân loại ít phát. Chúng tôi đào tạo một phân loại nhị phân đơn để học tất cả các lớp ít shot cùng nhau bằng cách in dấu hiệu lớp vào đoạn nhập. Dựa vào chữ và hạng, theo mẫu, thì dự đoán nhị phân cho cặp chữ và hạng đó. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp đơn giản này có thể cung cấp kết quả được công bố nhiều nhất. Thật ngạc nhiên, chúng tôi cũng cho thấy rằng việc bao gồm thông tin miền trong phần của nhiệm vụ chỉ dẫn tới một cải tiến khiêm tốn trong độ chính xác của mô hình, và phân loại bằng không, mà không cần cải thiện thêm các khu vực ít bắn, được phân loại ít phát. Những kết quả này cho thấy các lớp trong tập trận ARSC, được xác định bởi giao miền và đánh giá, thực sự rất giống nhau, và rằng cần một tập tin phù hợp hơn để nghiên cứu về mức độ văn bản ít bắn.', 'bg': 'Малко обучение решава проблема с ученето въз основа на малко количество данни за обучение. Въпреки че е по-добре проучен в областта на компютърното зрение, последните разработки адаптират текстовия набор от данни за класификация на сентимента за използване в настройката за няколко снимки. В тази работа използваме набор от данни за изучаване на просто приложение на подходи за трансферно обучение към класификация с няколко изстрела. Обучаваме един двоичен класификатор, който да учи всички няколко класове заедно, като предфиксира идентификатори на класа към входния текст. Като се има предвид текста и класа, моделът прави двоична прогноза за тази двойка текст/клас. Нашите резултати показват, че този прост подход може да надмине повечето публикувани резултати в този набор от данни. Изненадващо, ние също така показваме, че включването на информация за домейните като част от дефиницията на задачата води само до скромно подобрение на точността на модела, а класификацията с нулеви изстрели, без допълнително фино настройване на домейните с няколко изстрела, изпълнява равностойно на класификацията с няколко изстрела. Тези резултати предполагат, че класовете в задачата с няколко изстрела, които се определят от пресичането на домейн и рейтинг, всъщност са много сходни помежду си и че е необходим по-подходящ набор от данни за изучаването на класификацията на няколко изстрела текста.', 'da': 'Få-skud læring løser problemet med læring baseret på en lille mængde træningsdata. Selvom det seneste arbejde er mere velundersøgt inden for computersyn, har det seneste arbejde tilpasset Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) tekstdatasæt til brug i få skud-indstillingen. I dette arbejde bruger vi ARSC datasættet til at studere en enkel anvendelse af transfer learning tilgange til få skud klassificering. Vi træner en enkelt binær klassificering til at lære alle få-skud klasser i fællesskab ved at præfikse klasse identifikatorer til input tekst. Med teksten og klassen laver modellen derefter en binær forudsigelse for det tekst/klassepar. Vores resultater viser, at denne enkle tilgang kan overgå de fleste offentliggjorte resultater på dette datasæt. Overraskende nok viser vi også, at medtagelse af domæneoplysninger som en del af opgavedefinitionen kun fører til en beskeden forbedring i modelnøjagtigheden, og nulskud klassificering, uden yderligere finjustering på få skud domæner, udfører svarende til få skud klassificering. Disse resultater tyder på, at klasserne i ARSC nogle skud opgaven, som defineres ved krydsningen af domæne og rating, faktisk ligner hinanden meget, og at der er behov for et mere passende datasæt til undersøgelsen af nogle skud tekst klassifikation.', 'nl': 'Few-shot learning richt zich op het probleem van leren op basis van een kleine hoeveelheid trainingsgegevens. Hoewel beter bestudeerd op het gebied van computervisie, heeft recent werk de Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) tekstdataset aangepast voor gebruik in de few-shot setting. In dit werk gebruiken we de ARSC dataset om een eenvoudige toepassing van transfer learning benaderingen op few-shot classificatie te bestuderen. We trainen een enkele binaire classificator om alle few-shot klassen gezamenlijk te leren door class identifiers voor te voegen aan de invoertekst. Gezien de tekst en klasse, maakt het model dan een binaire voorspelling voor dat tekst/klasse paar. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat deze eenvoudige aanpak de meeste gepubliceerde resultaten op deze dataset kan overtreffen. Verrassend genoeg tonen we ook aan dat het opnemen van domeininformatie als onderdeel van de taakdefinitie slechts leidt tot een bescheiden verbetering van de modellnauwkeurigheid, en zero-shot classificatie, zonder verdere finetuning op few-shot domeinen, gelijkwaardig presteert aan few-shot classificatie. Deze resultaten suggereren dat de klassen in de ARSC-few-shot taak, die worden gedefinieerd door de kruising van domein en rating, eigenlijk erg op elkaar lijken, en dat een geschiktere dataset nodig is voor het bestuderen van few-shot tekstclassificatie.', 'de': 'Weniger-Schuss-Lernen adressiert das Problem des Lernens auf der Grundlage einer geringen Menge an Trainingsdaten. Obwohl sie im Bereich der Computer Vision besser studiert wurden, haben jüngste Arbeiten den Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) Textdatensatz für die Verwendung in wenigen Aufnahmen angepasst. In dieser Arbeit verwenden wir den ARSC Datensatz, um eine einfache Anwendung von Transferlernansätzen auf die Weniger-Schuss-Klassifizierung zu untersuchen. Wir trainieren einen einzelnen binären Klassifikator, um alle Few-Shot-Klassen gemeinsam zu lernen, indem dem Eingabetext Klassenkennungen vorangestellt werden. Ausgehend von Text und Klasse macht das Modell dann eine binäre Vorhersage für dieses Text/Klasse Paar. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass dieser einfache Ansatz die meisten veröffentlichten Ergebnisse in diesem Datensatz übertreffen kann. Überraschenderweise zeigen wir auch, dass die Einbeziehung von Domäneninformationen in die Aufgabendefinition nur zu einer bescheidenen Verbesserung der Modellgenauigkeit führt und die Null-Schuss-Klassifizierung ohne weitere Feinabstimmung auf wenigen Schuss-Domänen gleichwertig zur Weniger-Schuss-Klassifizierung funktioniert. Diese Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass die Klassen in der ARSC-Few-Shot-Aufgabe, die durch den Schnittpunkt von Domäne und Rating definiert werden, tatsächlich sehr ähnlich sind und dass ein geeigneterer Datensatz für die Untersuchung der Few-Shot-Textklassifikation benötigt wird.', 'ko': '소량의 훈련 데이터를 바탕으로 하는 학습 문제를 해결하는 렌즈 학습은 드물다.컴퓨터 시각 분야의 연구가 더욱 깊어졌음에도 불구하고 최근의 작업은 아마존 리뷰 정서분류(ARSC) 텍스트 데이터 집합을 소수의 렌즈 설정에 응용했다.이 작업에서 우리는 ARSC 데이터 집합을 이용하여 이동 학습 방법이 소수의 렌즈 분류에서의 간단한 응용을 연구한다.우리는 텍스트를 입력하기 전에 클래스 식별자를 붙여서 모든 몇 개의 렌즈 클래스를 연합하여 학습하는 단일한 2진 분류기를 훈련한다.텍스트와 클래스를 정하고 모델을 지정한 다음에 이 텍스트/클래스에 대해 이진 예측을 한다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면, 이런 간단한 방법은 이 데이터 집합에서 발표된 대부분의 결과보다 더 좋을 수 있다.놀랍게도 영역 정보를 임무 정의의 일부로 삼는 것은 모델의 정밀도를 적당히 높일 뿐이며, 제로 렌즈 분류는 소수 렌즈 영역을 더 이상 조정하지 않은 상황에서 소수 렌즈 분류의 성능과 비슷하다.이러한 결과에 따르면 ARSC 소렌즈 작업에서 역과 등급의 교차로 정의된 클래스는 실제적으로 매우 비슷하기 때문에 소렌즈 텍스트의 분류를 연구하기 위해 더욱 적합한 데이터 집합이 필요하다.', 'fa': 'آدرس یادگیری کمی به مشکل یادگیری بر اساس یک مقدار کمی داده آموزش را نشان می دهد. اگرچه در حوزه دید کامپیوتر خوب مطالعه می\u200cشود، کارهای اخیراً مجموعه داده\u200cهای متن آزمایشگاهی (ARSC) را برای استفاده در تنظیمات چند تصاویر آمازون تغییر داده است. در این کار، ما از مجموعه داده\u200cهای ARSC استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک کاربرد ساده\u200cای از آموزش آموزش\u200cهای انتقال به محرمانه\u200cی چند شلیک مطالعه کنیم. ما یک راهنمایی دویینی را آموزش می\u200cدهیم تا همه کلاس\u200cهای چند شلیک را به همراه یاد بگیریم با پیشنهاد شناسایی کلاس به متن ورودی. با توجه به متن و کلاس، مدل بعدش برای جفت متن/کلاس یک پیش بینی دوگانی می\u200cسازد. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش ساده می\u200cتواند بیشترین نتیجه\u200cهای منتشر شده در این مجموعه داده\u200cها انجام دهد. تعجب کننده است، ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که شامل اطلاعات دامین به عنوان بخشی از تعریف کار فقط به یک کمترین بهترین توجه دقیق مدل می\u200cکند، و کلیسازی صفر تیر، بدون توجه بیشتری در دامین\u200cهای چند شلیک، همانند کلیسازی چند شلیک انجام می\u200cدهد. این نتیجه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که کلاس\u200cها در کار کمی شلیک ARSC، که توسط قطعه\u200cای از دومین و امتیاز تعریف می\u200cشوند، در واقع با یکدیگر بسیار شبیه هستند، و یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مناسب\u200cتر برای مطالعه\u200cی گروه\u200cهای متن کمی شلیک نیاز دارد.', 'hr': 'Malo pucnjave učenja rješava problem učenja na temelju malih količina podataka o obuci. Iako je bolje proučeno u domenu računalnog vizije, nedavni rad prilagodio je tekst podataka o klasifikaciji sentimentalnog klasifikacije Amazon Review (ARSC) za upotrebu u postavljanju nekoliko snimaka. U ovom poslu, koristimo ARSC podatke za proučavanje jednostavne primjene pristupa prijenosnog učenja u klasifikaciju nekoliko snimaka. Uvježbamo jednog binarnog klasifikatora da uči sve klase sa nekoliko snimanja zajedno pripremajući identifikatore klase na tekst ulaska. S obzirom na tekst i klasu, model onda čini binarnu predviđanju za taj par teksta/klase. Naši rezultati pokazuju da ovaj jednostavan pristup može izvršiti većinu objavljenih rezultata na ovom setu podataka. Iznenađujuće, također pokazujemo da uključujući domenijske informacije kao dio definicije zadatka dovodi do skromnog poboljšanja tačnosti model a i klasifikacije nul-pucnjave bez daljnjeg ispravljanja na nekoliko pucnjava, čini jednako klasifikaciji nekoliko pucnjava. Ovi rezultati sugeriraju da su klase u zadatku ARSC-a koji su definirani prekidanjem domena i ocjena, zapravo vrlo slične jedni drugima, i da je potrebna odgovarajuća seta podataka za ispitivanje klasifikacije teksta s malo snimanja.', 'id': 'Pelajaran sedikit mengatasi masalah belajar berdasarkan jumlah kecil data pelatihan. Meskipun lebih belajar dengan baik dalam domain visi komputer, pekerjaan baru-baru ini telah menyesuaikan dataset teks Klasifikasi Sentiment Amazon Review (ARSC) untuk digunakan dalam seting beberapa gambar. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menggunakan dataset ARSC untuk mempelajari aplikasi sederhana dari pendekatan belajar transfer ke klasifikasi beberapa tembakan. Kami melatih satu klasifikasi binari untuk belajar semua kelas beberapa tembakan bersama dengan memprefiksi identifikasi kelas ke teks masukan. Mengingat teks dan kelas, model kemudian membuat prediksi binari untuk pasangan teks/kelas itu. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan sederhana ini dapat melampaui hasil yang paling diterbitkan pada set data ini. Yang mengejutkan, kami juga menunjukkan bahwa termasuk informasi domain sebagai bagian dari definisi tugas hanya membawa ke peningkatan sederhana dalam akurasi model, dan klasifikasi zero-shot, tanpa penentuan lebih lanjut pada beberapa domain-shot, melakukan sama dengan klasifikasi beberapa-shot. Hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa kelas dalam tugas ARSC beberapa tembakan, yang didefinisikan oleh persimpangan domain dan rating, sebenarnya sangat mirip satu sama lain, dan bahwa set data yang lebih cocok diperlukan untuk mempelajari klasifikasi teks beberapa tembakan.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa picha wachache hujadili tatizo la kujifunza kwa kutumia kiasi kidogo cha taarifa za mafunzo. Ingawa imesomwa vizuri zaidi katika maeneo ya maonyesho ya kompyuta, kazi ya hivi karibuni imebadilisha taarifa za taarifa za maandishi ya Makala ya Mapitio ya Amazon (ARSC) kwa ajili ya kutumia katika mazingira machache yanayopigwa risasi. Katika kazi hii, tunatumia taarifa za ARSC ili kusoma matumizi rahisi ya kujifunza yanayoingia kwenye darasa chache zilizopigwa. Tunamfundisha mwandishi mmoja wa aina mbili ili kujifunza darasa zote chache zilizopigwa risasi pamoja kwa kuweka utambulisho wa darasa hilo kwa ujumbe wa maandishi ya input. Kutokana na maandishi na darasa, mwelekeo unafanya utabiri wa pili kwa ajili ya viwili vya maandishi/darasa. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii rahisi inaweza kufanya matokeo mengi yaliyochapishwa kwenye seti hii ya taarifa. Inashangaza, pia tunaonyesha kuwa, ikiwa ni pamoja na taarifa za ndani kama sehemu ya ufafanuzi wa kazi pekee unapelekea maendeleo mazuri katika uhakika wa mifano, na kutangazwa kwa sifa zisizo na risasi, bila kutangaza vizuri zaidi katika maeneo machache yanayopigwa risasi, hufanya kazi sawa na kutangazwa kwa viwango vichache. These results suggest that the classes in the ARSC few-shot task, which are defined by the intersection of domain and rating, are actually very similar to each other, and that a more suitable dataset is needed for the study of few-shot text classification.', 'am': 'የጥቂት መስፈሪያ ትምህርት በተጨማሪው ጥቂት የድምፅ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የመማር ችግርን አድራጊ ነው፡፡ ከኮምፒውተር ራእይ ውስጥ ምንም እንኳ በመጠንቀቅ የተማረከ ቢሆንም እንኳ የቀኑ ስራ የአማዞን ተመልከት ስናይማት ክፍተት (ARSC) የጽሑፍ ዳታ ማተሚያ በጥቂት-shot ማዘጋጀት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ አርስክሲ ዳታተር የተቀናቀል ትምህርት መግለጫ ለጥቂት ደረጃዎች መግለጫ እንዲያስተምር ነው፡፡ በጥያቄው ጽሑፍ ለመግለጽ አንድ ብናዊ ክፍላፊዎችን ለመማር እናስተምራለን፡፡ ጽሑፉን እና ክፍለ ክፍል በተሰጠ ጊዜ ሞዴላው ለጽሑፍ/ክፍለ ሁለተኛውን ትንቢት ያደርጋል፡፡ ፍጥረታችን ይህ ቀላል ልግስና በዚህ ዳታተር ላይ የበለጠውን ፍሬዎችን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ በተደናቂው፣ የዶሜን መረጃዎች በሥርዓት ግንኙነት ማሳየት በሞዴል እርግጠኛ እና በክፍለ ክፍል እና በጥቂት ወታደሮች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ክፍል፣ ለጥቂት የተነሳ ክፍለ ክፍል ማድረግ ብቻ ነው፡፡ እነዚህ ፍጥረቶች በዶሜን ክፍል እና በክፍለ ክፍል የተዘረጉት የአርSC ጥቂት የደረጃ ክፍሎች እርስ በርሳቸው በጣም የተመሰሉ ናቸው፡፡', 'tr': 'Küçük sany öwrenmek üçin kiçi sany okuw maglumatyna daýanýar. Kompýuter görnüşinde has gowy öwrenmeli bolsa hem soňky işi Amazon Review Sentiment Klassifikasiýasy (ARSC) metin datu setirini kiçi-resim düzümlerinde ullanýar. Bu işde ARSC veri setirini birnäçe atly klasifikasyna gollanmak üçin basit bir uygulama öwrenmek üçin ullanýarys. Biz bir baýlyk klasifikatçysyny girdi metinä öwrenmek üçin bir baýlyk klasifikatçysyny çalýarys. Metin we synpda görkezilýän bolsa, nusga üçin ol metin/synp çifti üçin bir baýramçy önüme getirir. Biziň netijelerimiz bu basit ýagdaýyň bu data setinde esasy netijeleri çykaryp biljekdigini görkez. Gürünç bir şekilde, biz hem işin definisyonunun bir parças ı olarak domena bilgi hem de bu şekilde görkezildik. Sadece modellerin dogrudylygy we sıfır-atlı klasifikasynda, birkaç atly sahypa düzümlenmeden, birkaç atly sahypa eşit bir şekilde etýär. Bu netijeler ARSC birnäçe atly täzimindeki toparlaryň, domeniň we derejlenmegiň kesişikleri tarapyndan tanaýanýandygyny maslahat berýär we birnäçe birnäçe birnäçe meňzeş we birnäçe-birnäçe meňzeş veri setiriniň birnäçe atly metin klasifikasynda biraz daha', 'af': "Sommige skoot leer adresse die probleem van leer gebaseer op 'n klein hoeveelheid onderwerp data. Alhoewel meer goed studieer in die domein van rekenaar sien, het onlangse werk die Amazon Review Sentiment Klassifikasie (ARSC) teks datastel aangepas vir gebruik in die paar- skoot instelling. In hierdie werk gebruik ons die ARSC datastel om 'n eenvoudige toepassing van oordrag leer toegang te ondersoek na paar-skoot klasifikasie. Ons trein 'n enkele binêre klassifiseerder om alle paar skoot klasse te leer saamstig deur voorafiks van klas identifiseerders na die invoer teks te maak. Gien die teks en klas, maak die model dan 'n binêre voorskou vir daardie teks/klaspaar. Ons resultate wys dat hierdie eenvoudige toegang mees gepubliseerde resultate op hierdie datastel kan uitvoer. Ons vertoon ook verbaasbaar dat, insluitend domein inligting as deel van die taak definisie, slegs lei na 'n meeste verbetering in model presies, en nul-skoot klasifikasie, sonder verdere fin-tuning op paar-skoot domeine, doen gelykbaar aan paar-skoot klasifikasie. Hierdie resultate voorstel dat die klasse in die ARSC paar-skoot taak, wat deur die interseksie van domein en rating gedefinieer word, is eintlik baie gelykbaar aan mekaar, en dat 'n meer geskikte datastel benodig is vir die studie van paar-skoot teks klasifikasie.", 'az': "Biraz təhsil öyrənmək məlumatlarına dayanan öyrənmək problemlərinə baxır. Kompjuter görünüşünün domeinində daha yaxşı təhsil edilməsə də, son işlər Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) mə'lumat qurması üçün istifadə edilən mə'lumat qurmasını uyğunlaşdırdı. Bu işdə, ARSC verilənlərin quruluğunu birkaç dəfə şəkildə istifadə etmək üçün asanlıq öyrənmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz bir bina klasifikatçısını təhsil edirik ki, bir-birinə sıxıntılı sınıfları öyrənmək üçün sıxıntılı kimlikləri giriş metinə təhsil edirik. Metin və sınıf sayəsində, model sonra o metin/sınıf çift üçün ikili tədbir edir. Sonuçlarımız bu basit tərzim bu verilənlərin ən çox yayınlanan sonuçlarını aşkar edə bilər. Həmçin in biz də göstəririk ki, işlərin tanımasının bir parças ı olaraq domeinin məlumatının daxilində yalnızca modellərin doğruluğu və sıfır-shot klasifikasiyasının düzəltməsinə bənzəyir, bir neçə-vurulmuş domeinlərdə daha yaxşı düzəltməsinə bənzəyir. Bu sonuçlar ARSC küçük-vuruş işlərində dəyişiklik və dəyişiklik parçası ilə tanımlanan dəyişikliklərin bir-birinə çox bənzəyir və çox daha uyğun veri qurğuları az-vuruş metin klasifikasyonu təhsil etmək üçün lazımdır.", 'sq': 'Mësimi i vogël trajton problemin e mësimit bazuar në një sasi të vogël të dhënash të trajnimit. Megjithëse më mirë studiuar në fushën e vizionit të kompjuterit, puna e fundit ka përshtatur të dhënat e tekstit të klasifikimit të ndjenjave të Amazon Review (ARSC) për përdorim në rregullimin e disa fotografive. Në këtë punë, ne përdorim grupin e të dhënave ARSC për të studiuar një aplikim të thjeshtë të metodave të transferimit të mësimit për klasifikimin e disa fotografive. We train a single binary classifier to learn all few-shot classes jointly by prefixing class identifiers to the input text.  Duke marrë parasysh tekstin dhe klasën, modeli pastaj bën një parashikim binar për atë çift teksti/klase. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se kjo qasje e thjeshtë mund të kalojë rezultatet më të shumta të botuara në këtë set të dhënash. Surprisingly, we also show that including domain information as part of the task definition only leads to a modest improvement in model accuracy, and zero-shot classification, without further fine-tuning on few-shot domains, performs equivalently to few-shot classification.  Këto rezultate sugjerojnë se klasat në detyrën me pak fotografi të ARSC, të cilat janë të përcaktuara nga ndërprerja e domenit dhe vlerësimit, janë në fakt shumë të ngjashme me njëri-tjetrin dhe se është e nevojshme një grup më i përshtatshëm të të dhënave për studimin e klasifikimit të tekstit me pak fotografi.', 'bs': 'Malo pucnjave učenja rješava problem učenja na osnovu malih količina podataka o obuci. Iako je bolje proučeno u domenu kompjuterske vizije, nedavno je rad prilagodio tekstualnu klasifikaciju Amazon Review Sentimentne klasifikacije (ARSC) podataka za korištenje u postavljanju nekoliko snimaka. U ovom poslu, koristimo ARSC podatke kako bi proučili jednostavnu aplikaciju pristupa prijenosnog učenja u klasifikaciju nekoliko pucnjava. Uvježbamo jednog binarnog klasifikatora da uči sve klase sa nekoliko snimanja zajedno pripremajući identifikatore klase na tekst ulaska. S obzirom na tekst i klasu, model onda čini binarnu predviđanju za taj par teksta/klase. Naši rezultati pokazuju da ovaj jednostavan pristup može izvršiti većinu objavljenih rezultata na ovom setu podataka. Iznenađujuće, također pokazujemo da uključujući domenu informacije kao deo definicije zadataka dovodi do skromnog poboljšanja tačnosti model a i klasifikacije nula pucnjave, bez daljnjeg ispravljanja na nekoliko snimljenih domena, čini jednako klasifikaciji nekoliko pucnjava. Ovi rezultati sugeriraju da su klase u zadatku ARSC-a koji su definirani prekidanjem domena i ocjena, zapravo vrlo slične jedni drugima, i da je potrebna odgovarajuća seta podataka za ispitivanje klasifikacije teksta sa malo snimanja.', 'hy': 'Մի քիչ կրթություն սովորելը լուծում է սովորելու խնդիրը, որը հիմնված է փոքր քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալների վրա: Although more well-studied in the domain of computer vision, recent work has adapted the Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) text dataset for use in the few-shot setting.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք օգտագործում ենք ARCS տվյալների համակարգը, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության պարզ մոտեցումները մի քանի նկարների դասակարգում: Մենք վարժեցնում ենք մեկ երկու դասակարգիչ, որպեսզի միասին սովորենք բոլոր մի քանի դասեր՝ դասակարգի անվանումները ներմուծի տեքստին նախադասավորելով: Given the text and class, the model then makes a binary prediction for that text/class pair.  Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս պարզ մոտեցումը կարող է գերազանցել տվյալների համակարգի հրատարակված արդյունքների մեծ մասը: Զարմանալի է, որ մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ներառելով տիեզերական ինֆորմացիան որպես աշխատանքի սահմանման մաս միայն մեզ հանգեցնում է մոդելի ճշգրտության մի քիչ բարելավման և զրո-նկարի դասակարգում, առանց ավելի լավ հարմարեցման մի քանի տիեզերական տիեզերքում, կատարվում է հավասար մի քի Այս արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ARCS-ի մի քանի նկարների առաջադրանքի դասերը, որոնք սահմանվում են տիեզերքի և գնահատականների խաչը, իրականում շատ նման են միմյանց, և որ ավելի համապատասխան տվյալների համակարգ է անհրաժեշտ մի քանի նկարների տեքստի դասակարգման ուսումնասիրելու', 'cs': 'Málo-shot učení řeší problém učení založený na malém množství údajů o tréninku. Přestože jsou více studovány v oblasti počítačového vidění, nedávná práce upravila textovou sadu Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) pro použití v několika záběrech. V této práci používáme datovou sadu ARSC ke studiu jednoduché aplikace přístupů transferového učení na klasifikaci několika záběrů. Trénujeme jeden binární klasifikátor, aby se učil všechny několik tříd společně tím, že předvoláme identifikátory třídy vstupnímu textu. Vzhledem k textu a třídě pak model provede binární predikci pro tento pár text/třída. Naše výsledky ukazují, že tento jednoduchý přístup může překonat většinu publikovaných výsledků v této datové sadě. Překvapivě také ukazujeme, že zahrnutí doménových informací jako součást definice úkolu vede pouze k mírnému zlepšení přesnosti modelu a klasifikace nulových výstřelů bez dalšího doladění na několika výstřelů provádí ekvivalentní klasifikaci několika výstřelů. Tyto výsledky naznačují, že třídy v ARSC few-shot úloze, které jsou definovány průsečíkem domény a ratingu, jsou ve skutečnosti velmi podobné a že pro studium několika záběrů je nutná vhodnější datová sada.', 'bn': 'সামান্য শিক্ষা শিক্ষার ব্যাপারে সামান্য পরিমাণ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে শিক্ষা নিয় যদিও কম্পিউটার ভিশনের ডোমেইনে আরো ভালো গবেষণা করা হয়েছে, তবুও সাম্প্রতিক কাজ আমাজোন রিভিউ সেন্টাইমেন্ট ক্লাসিকেশন (ARSC) টেক্সটের ডেটাসেট ব্ এই কাজে আমরা আর্এসসি ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করি একটি সহজ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন পড়ার জন্য যে কিছু গুলি শিক্ষার্থীর ক্লাসাফিকেশনের ক্ষ আমরা একটি বাইনারি শ্রেণীকে প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি যাতে আমরা সকল কয়েকটি গুলি শ্রেণীকে একত্রে শিখতে পারি ইনপুট ট টেক্সটের প্রা টেক্সট এবং ক্লাস দিয়ে মডেল তারপর টেক্সট/ক্লাস জোড়ার জন্য বাইনারি ভবিষ্যৎবাণী করে। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই সহজ উপায় এই ডাটাসেটে বেশী প্রকাশিত ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করতে পারে। বিস্ময়কর ভাবে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কাজের একটি অংশ হিসেবে ডোমেইন তথ্যের মধ্যে রয়েছে কেবল মডেলের সঠিকভাবে উন্নতি এবং শুধুমাত্র গুলি শ্রেণীবিভাগের ক্ষেত্রে আরো সুন্দর এই ফলাফল পরামর্শ প্রদান করে যে আরএসসির কয়েকটি গুলি কাজ, যা ডোমেইনের বিভাগ এবং রেজিং দ্বারা নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে, তারা একে অপরের অন্যের সাথে অনেকের মত, এবং যে কয়েকটি গুলি ল', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge amb poques fotos aborda el problem a de l'aprenentatge basat en una petita quantitat de dades d'entrenament. Although more well-studied in the domain of computer vision, recent work has adapted the Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) text dataset for use in the few-shot setting.  En aquest treball, utilitzem el conjunt de dades ARSC per estudiar una aplicació senzilla d'enfocaments d'aprenentatge de transfer ència a la classificació de poques fotos. Ensenyem un únic classificador binari per aprendre les classes de poques fotos juntament prefixant identificadors de classe al text d'entrada. Tenint en compte el text i la classe, el model fa una predicció binaria per aquest parell de text/classe. Els nostres resultats mostren que aquest enfocament senzill pot superar la majoria dels resultats publicats en aquest conjunt de dades. Sorprenentment, també demostrem que incloure la informació de domini com part de la definició de tasca només porta a una modesta millora en la precisió del model, i la classificació de fotografies zero, sense més ajustes en dominis de fotografies pocs, fa igual a la classificació de fotografies pocs. Aquests resultats suggereixen que les classes de la tasca ARSC amb poques fotografies, que es defineixen per la intersecció de domini i valoració, són realment molt semblants entre elles, i que es necessita un conjunt de dades més adequat per estudiar la classificació de text amb poques fotografies.", 'et': 'Vähese võimalusega õppimine lahendab õppimise probleemi väikeste koolitusandmete põhjal. Kuigi arvutinägemise valdkonnas on rohkem uuritud, on hiljutised tööd kohandanud Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) tekstiandmekogumit kasutamiseks vähese pildi seadetes. Käesolevas töös kasutame ARSC andmekogumit selleks, et uurida siirdeõppe lähenemisviiside lihtsat rakendamist vähese lasuga klassifitseerimisele. Me koolitame ühte binaarset klassifikaatorit õppima kõiki mõned klassid ühiselt, lisades sisendtekstile klassi identifikaatorid. Arvestades teksti ja klassi, teeb mudel selle teksti/klassi paari binaarse prognoosi. Meie tulemused näitavad, et see lihtne lähenemisviis võib ületada enamiku avaldatud tulemusi selles andmekogumis. Üllataval kombel näitame ka seda, et domeeniinfo lisamine ülesande määratlusse toob kaasa vaid mõõduka mudeli täpsuse paranemise ning null-shot klassifikatsioon, ilma edasise peenhäälestuseta mõned-shot domeenid, toimib samaväärselt vähese-shot klassifikatsiooniga. Need tulemused viitavad sellele, et ARSC mõne lasuga ülesande klassid, mis on määratletud domeeni ja reitingu ristumise järgi, on tegelikult üksteisega väga sarnased ning et vähese lasuga teksti klassifikatsiooni uurimiseks on vaja sobivamat andmekogumit.', 'fi': 'Harvinainen oppiminen käsittelee oppimisen ongelmaa pienen määrän koulutustietoa pohjalta. Vaikka tietokonenäköalalla on tutkittu enemmän, viimeaikaiset työt ovat mukauttaneet Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) -tekstiaineistoa käytettäväksi muutamassa kuvassa. Tässä työssä tutkimme ARSC-aineiston avulla siirtooppimismenetelmien yksinkertaista soveltamista muutaman laukauksen luokitteluun. Koulutamme yhden binääriluokituksen oppimaan kaikki muutaman laukauksen luokat yhdessä liittämällä luokkatunnisteet syöttötekstiin. Kun otetaan huomioon teksti ja luokka, malli tekee binääriennusteen kyseiselle teksti/luokka parille. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että tämä yksinkertainen lähestymistapa voi päihittää useimmat julkaistut tulokset tässä aineistossa. Yllättäen osoitamme myös, että verkkotunnustietojen sisällyttäminen tehtävämäärittelyyn johtaa vain vähäiseen parannukseen mallin tarkkuudessa, ja nolla-laukaus-luokitus, ilman lisähienosäätöä muutaman laukauksen verkkotunnuksilla, toimii yhtä hyvin kuin muutama laukaus-luokitus. Tulokset viittaavat siihen, että ARSC muutaman laukauksen tehtävän luokat, jotka määritellään toimialueen ja luokituksen risteyksessä, ovat itse asiassa hyvin samankaltaisia keskenään ja että muutaman laukauksen tekstin luokitteluun tarvitaan sopivampi aineisto.', 'jv': 'name Candy Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gambar dataset ARS kanggo sabên aplikasi sampeyan kanggo ngerasakno nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas-kotang. Genjer Attribute Reuniversi nambarang iki dadi akeh seneng pisan kanggo ngerasakno dadi iki banget sursurprescally, we awso show that include domain information as parts of the task define only puts to a modest advancement in model charged, and 0-shot CLASS, not additional Fine-tuning on some-shot domain, tasks same as some-shot CLASS. Perintah sing dipunanggunian karo kelas sing kelas nang ARsc kelas-pung task gak, iki dadi wis dipunanggap tarjamahan karo domain lan ngregan, kuwi wis aswih akeh sampeyan ngon sampeyan, lan akeh dataset sing bisa ngedapiye dhéwé kanggo kelas-pung titimbal kelas-kotang teks.', 'ha': "QScriptBreakpointsModel Ingawa da aka sanar da mafi kyauta cikin ƙaramin gani na kwamfyuta, aiki na kusa ya gyara tsarin matsayin na tsari da aka yi amfani da cikin tsarin masu yiwun-shot. Daga wannan aikin, munã amfani da tsarin ARSC don mu karanta wani shirin shiryoyin ayuka da aka shige ta zuwa darafyutan masu kaɗan. Kana kõre wani mai daraja guda zuwa matsayin inputi. Idan an gaskata matsayin da daraja, shirin sa'an nan yana sanya wani bayani na nau'in biyu wa wannan matsayi/daraja. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa wannan hanyarwa mai sauƙi yana iya ƙarfafa mafi fassarar da aka bayyana a kan wannan dataset. Ana yi mãmãki, ko da haka, munã nuna cewa, idan an haɗa bayan lãbãri na guda kamar wani rabin aikin, yana ƙara wa mafiya kyau a cikin tsarin misalin ayuka kawai, kuma da sifori sifuri na sifilawa sifuri, kuma bã da wani gyara wanda aka samar da shi a kan sauri masu kaɗan, yana aiki daidai da sifori masu sauya. Haƙĩƙa, matsala na shawarar da aka sanar da nau'in aikin ANSC masu kaɗan, wanda aka bayyana shi na tsakanin guda da yin rabo, na gaskata, masu daidaita ga ɗayan, kuma ana ƙayyade wani matsayi mai daidai ga karatun fasalin matsayin da aka sautar da.", 'sk': 'Poučno učenje obravnava problem učenja na podlagi majhne količine podatkov o usposabljanju. Čeprav so bile bolj dobro raziskane na področju računalniškega vida, so nedavno delo prilagodilo besedilni nabor podatkov Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) za uporabo v nastavitvi nekaj posnetkov. V tem delu uporabljamo nabor podatkov ARSC za proučevanje preproste uporabe pristopov transfernega učenja k klasifikaciji nekaj strelov. Enega binarnega razvrščevalca usposabljamo, da se skupaj nauči vseh razredov z nekaj posnetki, tako da dodajamo identifikatorjev razreda na vhodno besedilo. Glede na besedilo in razred model nato naredi binarno napoved za ta par besedila/razred. Naši rezultati kažejo, da lahko ta preprost pristop presega večino objavljenih rezultatov na tem naboru podatkov. Presenetljivo je tudi, da vključitev informacij o domeni kot del opredelitve opravil vodi le do skromnega izboljšanja natančnosti modela, klasifikacija ničelnega strela, brez nadaljnjega natančnega nastavitve na domenih nekaj strelov, pa deluje enakovredno klasifikaciji nekaj strelov. Ti rezultati kažejo, da so razredi v nalogi ARSC nekaj posnetkov, ki so opredeljeni s presečiščem domene in ocene, dejansko zelo podobni drug drugemu in da je za študij klasifikacije besedila nekaj posnetkov potreben bolj primeren nabor podatkov.', 'he': 'למידה קטנה מתייחסת לבעיה של למידה מבוססת על כמות קטנה של נתוני אימון. למרות שלמדו היטב יותר בתחום חזון המחשב, העבודה האחרונה התאימה את קבוצת מידע הטקסט של מערכת התחשבות של אמאזון (ARSC) לשימוש במערכת צילומים קטנות. בעבודה הזו, אנו משתמשים במערכת נתונים ARSC כדי ללמוד שימוש פשוט של גישות לימוד העברה לקליפסיה של כמה יריות. אנו מאמן מסגר בינרי אחד כדי ללמוד את כל שיעורי הצילומים ביחד על ידי זיהוי כיתה מראש לטקסט הכניסה. בהתחשב בטקסט והכיתה, הדוגמא אז עושה חזיון בינרי לזוג הטקסט/כיתה. Our results show that this simple approach can outperform most published results on this dataset.  באופן מפתיע, אנחנו גם מראים שכולל מידע שטח כחלק מההגדרה של המשימה מוביל רק לשיפור צנוע בדיקת מודל, וסיפור של אפס יריות, ללא התאים נוסף על שטחי כמה יריות, מוביל באופן שווה לסיפור של כמה יריות. התוצאות האלה מצביעות על כך שהשיעורים במשימה של ארס.סי.אס, שמגדרים על ידי הקטע של שטח וקריינג, הם בעצם מאוד דומים אחד לשני, ושקבוצת נתונים מתאימה יותר נדרשת למחקר של שיעור טקסט עם כמה צילומים.', 'bo': 'ཆག་པ་ཆུང་ལྷན་ན་འཇུག་སའི་བྱ་བ་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་སྤྲོ་བ་དེ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Although more well-studied in the domain of computer vision, recent work has adapted the Amazon Review Sentiment Classification (ARSC) text dataset for use in the few-shot setting. ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ARSC གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཅིག་གནད ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་དབྱེ་བ་གཅིག་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཆ་ཤས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་རྩོལ་གྱི་འཛིན་གྲངས་དང་མཐུན ཡི་གེ་དང་འཛིན་གྲྭར་བ་གཉིས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མིན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་མིན་གྲྭར་གྱི་གཉིས་པ་ཞིག་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ Surprisingly, we also show that including domain information as part of the task definition only leads to a modest improvement in model accuracy, and zero-shot classification, without further fine-tuning on few-shot domains, performs equivalently to few-shot classification. These results suggest that the classes in the ARSC few-shot task, which are defined by the intersection of domain and rating, are actually very similar to each other, and that a more suitable dataset is needed for the study of few-shot text classification.'}
{'en': 'Meet Changes with Constancy : Learning Invariance in Multi-Source Translation', 'ar': 'قابل التغييرات مع الثبات: ثبات التعلم في الترجمة متعددة المصادر', 'es': 'Conozca los cambios con constancia: la invariancia del aprendizaje en la traducción de múltiples fuentes', 'pt': 'Atenda às mudanças com constância: invariância de aprendizado na tradução de várias fontes', 'fr': "Faites face aux changements avec constance\xa0: l'invariance d'apprentissage dans la traduction multisource", 'ja': 'コンスタントに変化に出会う：マルチソース翻訳の不変性を学ぶ', 'zh': '足恒定性变:学多源译中不变性', 'hi': 'स्थिरता के साथ परिवर्तनों को पूरा करें: बहु-स्रोत अनुवाद में Invariance सीखना', 'ru': 'Встречайте изменения с постоянством: обучающаяся инвариантность в многоисточнике перевода', 'ga': 'Athruithe le Seasamh a Chomhlíonadh: Éagsúlacht Foghlama san Aistriúchán Ilfhoinse', 'ka': 'შეცვლების შეცვლების შეცვლების შემდეგ: მეტი წიგნის შეცვლების შესწავლება', 'el': 'Γνωρίστε τις αλλαγές με τη Σταθερότητα: Μάθηση της Ανεξαρτησίας στη Μετάφραση πολλαπλών πηγών', 'hu': 'Ismerje meg a változásokat az állandósággal: Invariance tanulása a többforrásos fordításban', 'lt': 'Susipažinti su nuolatiniais pokyčiais: mokymasis įvairių šaltinių vertimo būdu', 'it': "Incontra i cambiamenti con la costanza: imparare l'invarianza nella traduzione multi-sorgente", 'kk': 'Тұрақты өзгерістерді табу: Көп көзінің аудармасында оқыту инвалиациясы', 'mk': 'Соочи ги промените со константноста: Научи непријатност во преводот од повеќе извори', 'ml': 'സഹസ്ഥാനത്തോടൊപ്പം മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുമുട്ടുക: പലസ്രോതസ്സോര്\u200dസ്സ് പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റ', 'mt': 'Laqgħa mat-Tibdiliet mal-Kostanza: L-Invarjanza tat-Tagħlim fit-Traduzzjoni b’Sorsi Multi', 'ms': 'Temui Perubahan dengan Kepastian: Belajar Kecerobohan dalam Terjemahan Berberapa Sumber', 'mn': 'Үзэгдлийн өөрчлөлтийг олон эх үүсвэрийн орчуулалт сурах', 'pl': 'Poznaj zmiany dzięki stałości: uczenie się niezmienności w tłumaczeniu wielu źródeł', 'no': 'Møte endringar med konstanten: Læring Invarians i fleire kjeldeomsetjingar', 'ro': 'Faceți cunoștință cu schimbările cu constanța: Invarianța în traducerea multi-sursă', 'sr': 'Upoznajte izmjene sa stalnošću: Učenje Invariacije u multiizvornom prevodu', 'si': 'ස්ථිර වෙනස් එක්ක වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න: ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරදේශ භාවිතයේ ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Meet Changes with Constancy: Learning Invariance in Multi-Source Translation', 'sv': 'Möt förändringar med konstans: Att lära sig invarians i översättning med flera källor', 'ta': 'மூலத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் மாற்றங்களை சந்திக்கவும்:', 'ur': 'موقعیت کے ساتھ بدلوں کو ملاقات کریں: Multi-Source Translation میں غیرقابل تعلیم سکھنا', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Gặp thay đổi với Constance: Học xâm lược trong dịch đa nguồn', 'bg': 'Запознайте се с промените с постоянството: изучаване на инвалидност в многоизточника превод', 'hr': 'Upoznajte izmjene sa stalnošću: Učenje Invariacije u multiizvornom prevodu', 'nl': 'Veranderingen ontmoeten met constantheid: Invariantie leren in Multi-Source Vertaling', 'da': 'Mød ændringer med konstant: Læring Invariance i multi-source oversættelse', 'de': 'Veränderungen mit Konstanz begegnen: Lernen von Invarianz in Multi-Source-Übersetzungen', 'ko': '변하지 않는 변화 맞이: 다원 번역 중의 학습 불변성', 'fa': 'تغییرات با ثابت ملاقات کنید: یاد گرفتن اختلاف در ترجمه\u200cهای متعدد منبع', 'sw': 'Kutana na Mabadiliko na Mawazo: Kufundisha Uchaguzi katika Tafsiri ya vyanzo vingi', 'tr': 'Durjalyk bilen üýtgewleri bilen tansa et: Çoklu-çeşme terjiminde okamak', 'af': 'Voeg by Veranderinge met Konstansie: Leer Invarians in Multi-Bron Vertaling', 'sq': 'Përballo ndryshimet me vazhdueshmërinë: Mësimi i përndryshimit në përkthimin e shumëburimeve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հանդիպել փոփոխությունները կայունության հետ. բազմա աղբյուրների թարգմանման մեջ անտարբերություն սովորել', 'az': 'Daxiliyy…ôtli d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrl…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇü: √áoxlu Kaynaqlar √á…ôrcl…ôm…ôsind…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন সূত্র অনুবাদের শিক্ষা অনুবাদে পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Upoznajte izmjene sa stalnošću: Učenje Invariacije u multiizvornom prevodu', 'ca': "Conèixer els canvis amb la constantitat: Aprendre l'invariació en la traducció de múltiples fonts", 'id': 'Pertemuan Perubahan dengan Konstanti: Belajar Invariasi dalam Terjemahan Multi-Sumber', 'et': 'Kohtu muutustega pidevusega: mitmeallilise tõlke ebatavalisuse õppimine', 'cs': 'Seznamte se se změnami s konstancí: Učení se invariance v překladu více zdrojů', 'fi': 'Tapaa muutokset jatkuvassa käännöksessä: Oppii invarianssia monilähdekäännöksessä', 'he': 'פגוש שינויים עם קבילות: ללמוד שונה בתרגום ממקורים רבים', 'sk': 'Spoznajte spremembe s stalnostjo: učenje invariance v večvirnem prevajanju', 'jv': 'buddy', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་རིམ་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་པ། རྩ་འབྲེལ་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཆ་འབྱུང་རྐྱེན་ལ་བསླབ་པའི་འགྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Multi-source neural machine translation aims to translate from parallel sources of information (e.g. languages, images, etc.) to a single target language, which has shown better performance than most one-to-one systems. Despite the remarkable success of existing models, they usually neglect the fact that multiple source inputs may have inconsistencies. Such differences might bring noise to the task and limit the performance of existing multi-source NMT approaches due to their indiscriminate usage of input sources for target word predictions. In this paper, we attempt to leverage the potential complementary information among distinct sources and alleviate the occasional conflicts of them. To accomplish that, we propose a source invariance network to learn the invariant information of parallel sources. Such network can be easily integrated with multi-encoder based multi-source NMT methods (e.g. multi-encoder RNN and transformer) to enhance the translation results. Extensive experiments on two multi-source translation tasks demonstrate that the proposed approach not only achieves clear gains in translation quality but also captures implicit invariance between different sources.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal de múltiples fuentes tiene como objetivo traducir de fuentes de información paralelas (por ejemplo, idiomas, imágenes, etc.) a un único idioma de destino, que ha demostrado un mejor rendimiento que la mayoría de los sistemas uno a uno. A pesar del notable éxito de los modelos existentes, por lo general ignoran el hecho de que las entradas de múltiples fuentes pueden tener inconsistencias. Tales diferencias podrían provocar ruido en la tarea y limitar el rendimiento de los enfoques de NMT de múltiples fuentes existentes debido a su uso indiscriminado de fuentes de entrada para predicciones de palabras objetivo. En este artículo, intentamos aprovechar la posible información complementaria entre distintas fuentes y aliviar los conflictos ocasionales de las mismas. Para lograrlo, proponemos una red de invarianza de fuentes para aprender la información invariante de fuentes paralelas. Dicha red se puede integrar fácilmente con métodos de NMT de múltiples fuentes basados en múltiples codificadores (por ejemplo, RNN de múltiples codificadores y transformadores) para mejorar los resultados de la traducción. Los extensos experimentos en dos tareas de traducción de múltiples fuentes demuestran que el enfoque propuesto no solo logra ganancias claras en la calidad de la traducción, sino que también captura la invariancia implícita entre las diferentes fuentes.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale multi-sources vise à traduire des sources d'information parallèles (par exemple, des langues, des images, etc.) vers une langue cible unique, qui a montré de meilleures performances que la plupart des systèmes individuels. Malgré le succès remarquable des modèles existants, ils négligent généralement le fait que les entrées de sources multiples peuvent présenter des incohérences. De telles différences peuvent créer du bruit dans la tâche et limiter les performances des approches NMT multi-sources existantes en raison de leur utilisation aveugle des sources d'entrée pour les prédictions de mots cibles. Dans cet article, nous tentons de tirer parti des informations complémentaires potentielles parmi des sources distinctes et d'atténuer les conflits occasionnels entre elles. Pour ce faire, nous proposons un réseau d'invariance de source pour apprendre les informations invariantes de sources parallèles. Un tel réseau peut être facilement intégré avec des méthodes NMT multi-sources basées sur des codeurs multiples (par exemple RNN et transformateur multi-codeurs) pour améliorer les résultats de traduction. Des expériences approfondies sur deux tâches de traduction multi-sources démontrent que l'approche proposée permet non seulement d'obtenir des gains nets en termes de qualité de traduction, mais également de saisir l'invariance implicite entre les différentes sources.", 'ar': 'تهدف الترجمة الآلية العصبية متعددة المصادر إلى الترجمة من مصادر المعلومات المتوازية (مثل اللغات والصور وما إلى ذلك) إلى لغة هدف واحدة ، والتي أظهرت أداءً أفضل من معظم الأنظمة الفردية. على الرغم من النجاح الملحوظ للنماذج الحالية ، فإنها عادة ما تتجاهل حقيقة أن مدخلات المصادر المتعددة قد تحتوي على تناقضات. قد تؤدي هذه الاختلافات إلى إحداث ضوضاء للمهمة وتحد من أداء مناهج NMT الحالية متعددة المصادر بسبب استخدامها العشوائي لمصادر الإدخال لتنبؤات الكلمات المستهدفة. في هذه الورقة ، نحاول الاستفادة من المعلومات التكميلية المحتملة بين مصادر مختلفة وتخفيف النزاعات العرضية منها. لتحقيق ذلك ، نقترح شبكة ثوابت المصدر لتعلم المعلومات الثابتة للمصادر المتوازية. يمكن دمج هذه الشبكة بسهولة مع أساليب NMT متعددة المصادر القائمة على التشفير المتعدد (مثل RNN متعدد التشفير والمحول) لتحسين نتائج الترجمة. توضح التجارب المكثفة على مهمتي ترجمة متعددة المصادر أن النهج المقترح لا يحقق مكاسب واضحة في جودة الترجمة فحسب ، بل يلتقط أيضًا الثبات الضمني بين المصادر المختلفة.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural de várias fontes visa traduzir de fontes paralelas de informação (por exemplo, idiomas, imagens, etc.) Apesar do notável sucesso dos modelos existentes, eles geralmente negligenciam o fato de que entradas de múltiplas fontes podem ter inconsistências. Tais diferenças podem trazer ruído para a tarefa e limitar o desempenho das abordagens NMT multi-fonte existentes devido ao uso indiscriminado de fontes de entrada para previsões de palavras-alvo. Neste artigo, tentamos alavancar as informações complementares potenciais entre fontes distintas e aliviar os conflitos ocasionais das mesmas. Para isso, propomos uma rede de invariância de fontes para aprender as informações invariantes de fontes paralelas. Essa rede pode ser facilmente integrada com métodos NMT multi-fonte baseados em multi-codificador (por exemplo, RNN multi-codificador e transformador) para melhorar os resultados da tradução. Extensos experimentos em duas tarefas de tradução de várias fontes demonstram que a abordagem proposta não apenas alcança ganhos claros na qualidade da tradução, mas também captura a invariância implícita entre diferentes fontes.', 'hi': 'बहु-स्रोत तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद का उद्देश्य जानकारी के समानांतर स्रोतों (जैसे भाषाओं, छवियों, आदि) से एक एकल लक्ष्य भाषा में अनुवाद करना है, जिसने अधिकांश एक-से-एक प्रणालियों की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन दिखाया है। मौजूदा मॉडल की उल्लेखनीय सफलता के बावजूद, वे आमतौर पर इस तथ्य की उपेक्षा करते हैं कि कई स्रोत इनपुट में विसंगतियां हो सकती हैं। इस तरह के अंतर कार्य में शोर ला सकते हैं और लक्ष्य शब्द भविष्यवाणियों के लिए इनपुट स्रोतों के अंधाधुंध उपयोग के कारण मौजूदा बहु-स्रोत एनएमटी दृष्टिकोणों के प्रदर्शन को सीमित कर सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम अलग-अलग स्रोतों के बीच संभावित पूरक जानकारी का लाभ उठाने और उनके कभी-कभी संघर्षों को कम करने का प्रयास करते हैं। इसे पूरा करने के लिए, हम समानांतर स्रोतों की अपरिवर्तनीय जानकारी सीखने के लिए एक स्रोत अपरिवर्तनीय नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस तरह के नेटवर्क को अनुवाद परिणामों को बढ़ाने के लिए बहु-एनकोडर आधारित बहु-स्रोत एनएमटी विधियों (जैसे मल्टी-एनकोडर आरएनएन और ट्रांसफॉर्मर) के साथ आसानी से एकीकृत किया जा सकता है। दो बहु-स्रोत अनुवाद कार्यों पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण न केवल अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में स्पष्ट लाभ प्राप्त करता है, बल्कि विभिन्न स्रोतों के बीच अंतर्निहित विचलन को भी कैप्चर करता है।', 'zh': '多源神经机器翻译旨在并行信息源(如语言,图像等)转为单一的语言,其性优于多一对一系统。 虽有模形著成,常忽数源,或有不一之实。 其差或噪音于务,而限见多源NMT之性,以其不择地用输源单词占也。 于本文中,试用异端潜在互补信息,并缓其偶然冲突。 为此一源不变性网络,以学行源。 此网络可以易与多编码器之多源NMT法(如多编码器RNN变压器)集成,以增转易也。 两多源译职之广实验明,其法不特明于译质,而又获异端之隐式不变性。', 'ja': 'マルチソースのニューラル機械翻訳は、並行する情報源（例えば、言語、画像など）から単一のターゲット言語に翻訳することを目的としており、ほとんどの1対1のシステムよりも優れたパフォーマンスを示している。 既存のモデルの顕著な成功にもかかわらず、それらは通常、複数のソース入力に矛盾がある可能性があるという事実を無視します。 そのような差異は、ターゲット単語予測のための入力ソースの無差別使用のために、タスクにノイズをもたらし、既存のマルチソースＮＭＴアプローチのパフォーマンスを制限する可能性がある。 本稿では、異なるソース間の潜在的な補完情報を活用し、それらの間の時折の衝突を軽減しようと試みる。 そのために、並列ソースの不変情報を学習するソース不変性ネットワークを提案します。 そのようなネットワークは、マルチエンコーダベースのマルチソースＮＭＴ法（例えば、マルチエンコーダＲＮＮ及びトランス）と容易に統合されて、変換結果を強化することができる。 2つのマルチソース翻訳タスクの広範な実験は、提案されたアプローチが翻訳品質の明確な向上を達成するだけでなく、異なるソース間の暗黙の不変性を捉えることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Многоисточниковый нейронный машинный перевод предназначен для перевода из параллельных источников информации (например, языков, изображений и т. д.) на один целевой язык, который показал лучшую производительность, чем большинство систем один к одному. Несмотря на замечательный успех существующих моделей, они, как правило, игнорируют тот факт, что входные данные из нескольких источников могут иметь несоответствия. Такие различия могут создать помехи для решения этой задачи и ограничить эффективность существующих подходов, основанных на использовании нескольких источников НБМ, в связи с их неизбирательным использованием источников входных данных для прогнозирования целевых слов. В настоящем документе мы пытаемся использовать потенциальную взаимодополняющую информацию между отдельными источниками и смягчать время от времени возникающие между ними конфликты. Для этого мы предлагаем сеть инвариантности источника для изучения инвариантной информации параллельных источников. Такая сеть может быть легко интегрирована с многокодирующими методами на основе многоисточника NMT (например, мультикодировщик RNN и трансформатор) для улучшения результатов трансляции. Широкие эксперименты над двумя задачами перевода из нескольких источников показывают, что предлагаемый подход не только обеспечивает явное повышение качества перевода, но и отражает неявную неизменность между различными источниками.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag meaisínaistriúchán néarfhoinse ilfhoinse aistriú ó fhoinsí comhthreomhara faisnéise (m.sh. teangacha, íomhánna, etc.) go sprioctheanga amháin, a bhfuil feidhmíocht níos fearr léirithe aici ná an chuid is mó de na córais duine le duine. In ainneoin rath iontach na múnlaí atá ann cheana féin, is gnách go ndéanann siad faillí sa chaoi is go bhféadfadh neamhréireachtaí a bheith ag ionchuir fhoinse iolracha. D’fhéadfadh difríochtaí den sórt sin torann a thabhairt don tasc agus teorainn a chur le feidhmíocht na gcur chuige NMT ilfhoinsí atá ann cheana mar gheall ar a n-úsáid neamh-idirdhealaitheach foinsí ionchuir le haghaidh réamh-mheastacháin na sprice focal. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iarracht an fhaisnéis chomhlántach fhéideartha a ghiaráil i measc foinsí ar leith agus na coinbhleachtaí a bhíonn ann ó am go chéile a mhaolú. Chun é sin a bhaint amach, molaimid líonra inathraitheachta foinse chun faisnéis athraitheach foinsí comhthreomhara a fhoghlaim. Is féidir líonra den sórt sin a chomhtháthú go héasca le modhanna NMT ilfhoinse bunaithe ar ionchódóirí (m.sh. il-ionchódóir RNN agus claochladán) chun torthaí an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar dhá thasc aistriúcháin ilfhoinse go mbaineann an cur chuige atá beartaithe ní hamháin gnóthachain shoiléire amach i gcaighdeán an aistriúcháin ach go n-aimsíonn sé éagsúlacht intuigthe idir foinsí éagsúla.', 'ka': 'მრავალფერი ნეიროლური მაქსინის გაგრძელების მიზეზი იყო ინფორმაციის პარალელური მსოფლიოდან (მაგალითად, ენები, გამოსახულები, ან.) ერთი მიზეზი ენაში, რომელიც უკეთესი მსოფლი არსებობს მოდელების შესაძლებლობელი წარმატებით, ისინი უმრავლედ არ უნდა იცოდნენ, რომ მრავლედ გამოყენება შეიძლება არსებობს. ასეთი განსხვავებები შეიძლება დავატანოთ საქაღალდე და განსხვავება მრავალური მსხვავებული NMT წარმოდგენების გამოყენებას, რადგან მათი განსხვავებული მონაცემების გამოყენება მისაწყის ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ ვცდილობთ, რომ პოტენტიალური კომპლენტური ინფორმაციას განსხვავებული ფონტურების შორის გამოყენება და შემდეგ კონტლიქტების გამოყენება. ამის გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ მინდომებით წიგნის გავაკეთებელი ინფორმაცია პარალელური წიგნის შესახებ. ასეთი ქსელი შეიძლება ადვილად ინტერგურაცია მრავალ კოდერის მრავალ გამოსახულებული NMT მეტოვებით (მაგალითად მრავალ კოდერის RNN და ტრანფორმებით) განვითარებას შესაძლებელად. გაფართლებული ექსპერიმენტები ორი მრავალფორმეტური გაგრძელების საქმე მოდენსებულია, რომ პროგრამა არა მხოლოდ წარმოიდგინდება წარმოიდგინული წარმოიდგინება განსაგრძელები', 'el': 'Η νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση πολλαπλών πηγών αποσκοπεί στη μετάφραση από παράλληλες πηγές πληροφοριών (π.χ. γλώσσες, εικόνες κ.λπ.) σε μια ενιαία γλώσσα-στόχο, η οποία έχει δείξει καλύτερη απόδοση από τα περισσότερα συστήματα ένα προς ένα. Παρά την αξιοσημείωτη επιτυχία των υφιστάμενων μοντέλων, συνήθως παραμελούν το γεγονός ότι οι πολλαπλές εισόδοι πηγής μπορεί να έχουν ασυνέπειες. Τέτοιες διαφορές ενδέχεται να προκαλέσουν θόρυβο στο έργο και να περιορίσουν την απόδοση των υφιστάμενων προσεγγίσεων NMT πολλαπλών πηγών λόγω της αδιάκριτης χρήσης πηγών εισόδου για προβλέψεις λέξεων-στόχων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, επιχειρούμε να αξιοποιήσουμε τις πιθανές συμπληρωματικές πληροφορίες μεταξύ διαφορετικών πηγών και να μετριάσουμε τις περιστασιακές συγκρούσεις αυτών. Για να επιτευχθεί αυτό, προτείνουμε ένα δίκτυο αμετάβλητων πηγών για να μάθετε τις αμετάβλητες πληροφορίες των παράλληλων πηγών. Ένα τέτοιο δίκτυο μπορεί εύκολα να ενσωματωθεί με μεθόδους πολλαπλών κωδικοποιητών βασισμένες σε πολλαπλές πηγές (π.χ. πολλαπλός κωδικοποιητής και μετασχηματιστής) για να ενισχύσει τα αποτελέσματα της μετάφρασης. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε δύο μεταφραστικές εργασίες πολλαπλών πηγών καταδεικνύουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση όχι μόνο επιτυγχάνει σαφή κέρδη στην ποιότητα της μετάφρασης, αλλά και καταγράφει έμμεση αμετάβλητη μεταξύ διαφορετικών πηγών.', 'hu': 'A többforrású neurális gépi fordítás célja, hogy párhuzamos információforrásokból (például nyelvek, képek stb.) fordítson egyetlen célnyelvre, amely jobb teljesítményt mutatott, mint a legtöbb egy-egy rendszer. A meglévő modellek figyelemreméltó sikere ellenére általában figyelmen kívül hagyják azt a tényt, hogy a több forrás bemenetének következetlenségei lehetnek. Ezek a különbségek zajt hozhatnak a feladatra, és korlátozhatják a meglévő többforrásból álló NMT-megközelítések teljesítményét, mivel válogatás nélkül használják a bemeneti forrásokat célszó előrejelzésekhez. Ebben a tanulmányban megpróbáljuk kihasználni a potenciális kiegészítő információkat a különböző források között, és enyhíteni azok esetleges konfliktusait. Ennek érdekében egy forrás invariáns hálózatot javasolunk a párhuzamos források invariáns információinak megismerésére. Az ilyen hálózat könnyen integrálható több kódoló alapú többforrású NMT módszerekkel (pl. több kódoló RNN és transzformátor) a fordítási eredmények javítása érdekében. Két többforrásból álló fordítási feladaton végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés nemcsak a fordítási minőség egyértelmű javulását eredményezi, hanem a különböző források közötti implicit invarianciát is figyelembe veszi.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica neurale multi-source mira a tradurre da fonti parallele di informazioni (ad esempio lingue, immagini, ecc.) ad un'unica lingua di destinazione, che ha mostrato prestazioni migliori rispetto alla maggior parte dei sistemi one-to-one. Nonostante il notevole successo dei modelli esistenti, di solito trascurano il fatto che input multipli di sorgenti possono avere incoerenze. Tali differenze potrebbero portare rumore al compito e limitare le prestazioni degli approcci NMT multi-source esistenti a causa del loro uso indiscriminato di fonti di input per predizioni di parole target. In questo articolo, cerchiamo di sfruttare le informazioni complementari potenziali tra fonti distinte e alleviare i conflitti occasionali di esse. Per ottenere questo, proponiamo una rete di invarianza sorgente per imparare le informazioni invarianti di fonti parallele. Tale rete può essere facilmente integrata con metodi NMT multi-sorgente basati su multi-encoder (ad esempio multi-encoder RNN e trasformatore) per migliorare i risultati della traduzione. Esperimenti approfonditi su due compiti di traduzione multi-source dimostrano che l'approccio proposto non solo raggiunge chiari miglioramenti nella qualità della traduzione, ma cattura anche l'invarianza implicita tra diverse fonti.", 'kk': 'Көп көздегі невралдық компьютердің аудармасы, параллелді мәліметтердің көзінен (мысалы, тілдерден, кескіндерден, т. б.) бір мақсатты тіліне аударуға мақсат береді. Бұл бір- бір жүйелерд Бар үлгілердің белгілі сәттілігіне қарамастан, олар кәдімгі бірнеше көзінің келтірілігінің бірнеше бағдарламалардың сәтсіздіктері болуы мүмкін. Бұл айырмашылықтар тапсырмаға дыбыс береді және NMT көп көпкөздерінің қатынасын шектеуге мүмкін, олардың келтірілген сөздерді таңдау үшін кіріс көзінің қолдануын шектеуге болады Бұл қағазда, біз бөлек көзгерістер арасында қосымша мәліметті көмектесу және олардың кейбір қайшылықтарын көмектесу үшін әсер етеді. Бұны орындау үшін, біз параллель көзінің мәліметті үйрену үшін көзгертілмеген желімізді ұсынамыз. Бұл желі бірнеше кодер негіздеген көп көпкөзді NMT әдістерімен (мысалы, көп кодер RNN және түрлендіруші) аудармалардың нәтижелерін көтеру үшін оңай біріктіре алады. Екі көп көзгертілген аудармалар тапсырмасының кеңейтілген тәжірибелері тек аудармалардың сапасында тәуелді көзгертілген жетістіктері емес, сондай-ақ әртүрлі көзгертілген к', 'mk': 'Мултиизворен нервен машински превод има за цел превод од паралелни извори на информации (на пример јазици, слики итн.) во еден јазик на целта, кој покажа подобра резултатност од повеќето системи од еден до еден. И покрај извонредниот успех на постојните модели, тие обично го забораваат фактот дека многуте изворни внесувања може да имаат несогласувања. Таквите разлики би можеле да доведат до бучава на задачата и да го ограничат изведувањето на постоечките пристапи од мултиизвори на НМТ поради нивното некриминално употребување на изворите за внесување за предвидување на зборовите на целта. Во овој документ, се обидуваме да ги искористиме потенцијалните комплементарни информации меѓу различните извори и да ги олесниме понекогаш конфликтите со нив. За да го постигнеме тоа, предлагаме мрежа за инваријантност од извори за да ја научиме инваријантната информација од паралелни извори. Таквата мрежа може лесно да се интегрира со мултикодерски методи на Мултикодерски НМТ (на пример мултикодерски РНН и трансформатор) за подобрување на резултатите на преводот. Експериментите на две мултиизворни преводни задачи покажуваат дека предложениот пристап не само што постигнува јасни добивки во квалитетот на преводот, туку и имплицитна инваријанција помеѓу различните извори.', 'lt': 'Daugiašaltinio nervinių mašinų vertimo tikslas – išversti iš lygiagrečių informacijos šaltinių (pvz., kalbų, vaizdų ir t. t.) į vieną tikslinę kalbą, kuri parodė geresnius rezultatus nei dauguma vienos sistemos. Nepaisant pastebimos esamų modelių sėkmės, jie paprastai neatsižvelgia į tai, kad įvairių šaltinių duomenys gali būti nesuderinami. Tokie skirtumai gali sukelti triukšmą uždaviniui ir apriboti esamų daugialypių NMT metodų veiksmingumą dėl to, kad jie neatskiriamai naudoja įvesties šaltinius tiksliniams žodžių prognozėms. In this paper, we attempt to leverage the potential complementary information among distinct sources and alleviate the occasional conflicts of them.  Kad tai būtų pasiekta, mes siūlome tinklą, kuriame būtų sukurtas neatsiejamas šaltinis, kad būtų mokoma neatsiejama informacija apie lygiagrečius šaltinius. Toks tinklas gali būti lengvai integruotas su daugiakodifikatoriumi pagrįstais daugiakodifikatoriumi pagrįstais NMT metodais (pvz., daugiakodifikatoriumi pagrįstais RNN ir transformatoriumi), kad būtų pagerinti vertimo rezultatai. Išsamūs eksperimentai, atliekami atliekant dvi daugialypes vertimo užduotis, rodo, kad siūlomas metodas ne tik aiškiai padidina vertimo kokybę, bet ir apima netiesioginį skirtingų šaltinių skirtumą.', 'ml': 'പല-സ്രോതസ്സുകളുടെ നെയൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരേ ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയിലേക്ക് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകളുടെ അത്ഭുതകരമായ വിജയം എങ്കിലും പല സോര്\u200dസ് ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിജയങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അസാധാരണമായി അവരറിയ ഈ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിയിലേക്ക് ശബ്ദമുണ്ടാക്കുകയും നിലവിലുള്ള പല-സ്രോതസ്സുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിധിയിലാക്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ  അത് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സിന്റെ അinvariance network പ്രാദ്ധ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പാരാണല്\u200d സ്രോതസ് ഇതുപോലുള്ള ശൃംഖലം പല- കോഡെര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള multi- source NMT രീതികളുമായി ഒരുമിച്ചുചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമാകുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d പരിഭാഷഫല രണ്ടു പല-സ്രോതസ്സുകളുടെ പരിഭാഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധ്', 'mn': 'Ихэнх эх үүсвэрийн мэдээллийн параллел эх үүсвэрээс (жишээ нь хэл, зураг, т.д.) нэг зорилготой хэл руу хөгжүүлэх зорилготой. Энэ нь нэг-нэг системээс илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг харуулсан. Хэдийгээр орших загварын гайхалтай амжилтыг хүртэл олон эх үүсвэрийн ирээдүйн бус байж магадгүй гэдгийг ойлгосон. Ийм өөрчлөлт нь ажил дээр чимээгүй болгож, олон эх үүсвэрийн NMT ойлголтын ажиллагааг хязгаарлах боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөр өөр эх үүсвэрээс нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой мэдээллийг ашиглаж, заримдаа тэдний зөрчилдөөнийг багасгах гэж хичээдэг. Үүнийг хийхэд бид параллель эх үүсвэрийн үндсэн мэдээллийг сурахын тулд эх үүсвэрийн хүчирхийлэлтэй сүлжээ сургаж байна. Ийм сүлжээн олон коддор суурилсан олон эх үүсвэрийн NMT аргыг (жишээ нь олон коддогч RNN болон шилжүүлэгч) хөгжүүлэхэд амархан нэгтгэгдэж болно. Хоёр олон эх үүсвэрийн орчуулалтын даалгаварын олон туршилтын туршилт нь зөвхөн орчуулалтын чанарын тодорхой ашиг гаргаж чадахгүй, мөн өөр эх үүсвэрийн хоорондох шалтгаан холбоотой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf berbilang sumber bertujuan untuk terjemahan dari sumber maklumat selari (cth. bahasa, imej, dll.) ke bahasa sasaran tunggal, yang telah menunjukkan prestasi yang lebih baik daripada kebanyakan sistem satu-ke-satu. Walaupun sukses yang luar biasa bagi model yang wujud, mereka biasanya mengabaikan fakta bahawa input sumber berbilang mungkin mempunyai ketidakkonsistensi. Perbezaan tersebut mungkin membawa bunyi ke tugas dan hadapi prestasi pendekatan NMT berbilang sumber yang wujud kerana penggunaan sumber input yang tidak jelas untuk ramalan perkataan sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kita cuba untuk menggunakan maklumat berkumplimentar potensi di antara sumber yang berbeza dan mengurangi konflik kadang-kadang mereka. Untuk menyelesaikannya, kami cadangkan rangkaian penentang sumber untuk belajar maklumat penentang sumber selari. Rangkaian tersebut boleh mudah disertai dengan kaedah NMT berasaskan-sumber berbilang (cth. RNN dan pengubah-pengkod berbilang) untuk meningkatkan keputusan terjemahan. Eksperimen luas pada dua tugas terjemahan berbilang-sumber menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang diusulkan tidak hanya mencapai keuntungan jelas dalam kualiti terjemahan tetapi juga menangkap invarians implicit antara sumber berbeza.', 'no': 'Fleikkjelde neuralmaskinsomsetjingar må omsetja frå parallelle kjelder av informasjon (f.eks. språk, bilete osv.) til ei enkelt målspråk, som har vist betre utviklinga enn dei fleste systema med ein til ein. Til tross den merkelige suksessen av eksisterande modeller, vil dei vanlegvis negrere faktum at fleire kjeldeinndata kan ha inkonsistensingar. Desse ulike forskjeller kan føre støy til oppgåva og avgrensa utviklinga av dei eksisterande multikildekjelde NMT-tilnærmingane på grunn av deres indiskriminert bruk av inndatakjelder for målkjelde forhåndsvising. I denne papiret prøver vi å levera den potensielle komplementære informasjonen mellom ulike kjelder og redusera dei tilfeldige konfliktene. For å fullføra det, foreslår vi ein kjeldeinvariansnettverk for å lære invariant informasjon om parallelle kjelder. Dette nettverket kan enkelt integrerast med fleire koder basert fleire kjeldemetodar for NMT (f.eks. fleire koder RNN og transformerer) for å forbetra omsetjingslingsresultatene. Utvida eksperimenter på to fleire kjeldeomsetjingsprogrammer viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga ikkje berre når det gjer klare inngåve i omsetjingskvalitet, men også hentar implisitt invarians mellom ulike kjelder.', 'pl': 'Multi-source neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe ma na celu tłumaczenie z równoległych źródeł informacji (np. języków, obrazów itp.) na jeden język docelowy, który wykazał lepszą wydajność niż większość systemów indywidualnych. Pomimo niezwykłego sukcesu istniejących modeli, zwykle zaniedbują one fakt, że wiele wejść źródłowych może mieć niespójność. Takie różnice mogą doprowadzić do szumu do zadania i ograniczyć wydajność istniejących metod NMT z wielu źródeł ze względu na ich nieodrębne wykorzystanie źródeł wejściowych do prognozowania słów docelowych. W niniejszym artykule staramy się wykorzystać potencjalną informację uzupełniającą pomiędzy różnymi źródłami i złagodzić okazjonalne konflikty z nich. Aby to osiągnąć, proponujemy sieć inwariancji źródeł, aby poznać informacje inwariancyjne źródeł równoległych. Taką sieć można łatwo zintegrować z wielokodorowymi metodami NMT opartymi na wielokodorowych metodach (np. wielokodorowy RNN i transformator) w celu poprawy wyników tłumaczenia. Obszerne eksperymenty na dwóch zadaniach tłumaczeniowych wielu źródeł pokazują, że proponowane podejście nie tylko osiąga wyraźny wzrost jakości tłumaczenia, ale również uwzględnia domyślną niezmienność między różnymi źródłami.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală multi-sursă își propune să traducă din surse paralele de informații (de exemplu limbi, imagini etc.) într-o singură limbă țintă, care a demonstrat performanțe mai bune decât majoritatea sistemelor unu-la-unu. În ciuda succesului remarcabil al modelelor existente, acestea neglijează de obicei faptul că intrările multiple surse pot avea inconsecvențe. Astfel de diferențe ar putea aduce zgomot activității și ar putea limita performanța abordărilor NMT existente cu mai multe surse datorită utilizării nediscriminate a surselor de intrare pentru previziunile cuvintelor țintă. În această lucrare, încercăm să valorificăm informațiile complementare potențiale între surse distincte și să atenuăm conflictele ocazionale dintre acestea. Pentru a realiza acest lucru, propunem o rețea de invarianță sursă pentru a învăța informațiile invariante ale surselor paralele. O astfel de rețea poate fi ușor integrată cu metode NMT multi-encoder bazate pe mai multe surse (de exemplu, RNN multi-encoder și transformator) pentru a îmbunătăți rezultatele traducerii. Experimentele extinse asupra a două sarcini de traducere multi-sursă demonstrează că abordarea propusă nu numai că obține câștiguri clare în ceea ce privește calitatea traducerii, ci și capturează invarianța implicită între diferite surse.', 'sr': 'Višeizvorski prevod neuralne mašine je cilj prevoditi od paralelnih izvora informacija (npr. jezika, slika, itd.) na jednog ciljnog jezika, koji pokazuje bolje provedbe nego većina jednog na jednom sistemu. Uprkos izvanrednim uspjehom postojećih modela, oni obično zanemaruju činjenicu da više izvora ulaganja može imati nesklade. Takve razlike bi mogle dovesti buku na zadatak i ograničiti učinkovitost postojećih multiizvorskih pristupa NMT zbog njihovog indiscriminiranog korištenja izvora ulaza za predviđanje ciljnih reči. U ovom papiru pokušavamo uticati na potencijalne dodatne informacije među različitim izvorima i olakšati povremene sukobe njih. Da bi to ostvarili, predlažemo izvornu invariantnu mrežu da nauèimo invariantne informacije o paralelnim izvorima. Takva mreža može biti lako integrisana sa multikoderskim metodama NMT-a (npr. multikoderskim RNN i transformatorom) kako bi poboljšala rezultate prevoda. Prošireni eksperimenti na dva višeizvornog prevodnog zadatka pokazuju da predloženi pristup ne samo postiže jasni dobitak kvalitete prevoda, nego takođe uhvata implicitnu invariaciju između različitih izvora.', 'so': "Turjumista machine neural badan wuxuu aims to translate from parallel sources of information (e.g. languages, images, etc.) to a single language, which has shown better performance than most of one-to-one systems. Inta kastoo ay guulaysan tahay tusaalooyin jiraan, sida caadiga ah way ka jeedaan in laga helo inputo badan oo laga soo galay mid aan is-khatar lahayn. Kalooshooyinkaas waxaa laga yaabaa inay cod u qaadaan shaqada iyo xadi karaan sameynta horumarinta ay jiraan noocyada badan ee NMT sababtoo ah isticmaalkooda diidmada laga isticmaali karo sourceoyinka input ee wax loogu talagalay hadal sii sheegid. Qoraalkan waxaan isku dayaynaa in aan soo dirno macluumaadka kaamilka ah ee suurtagalka ah oo kala duduwan islamarkaasna aan u fududayno dagaalladaha qaarkood. Si aan taas u dhamaado, waxaynu horumarinaynaa shabakadda weerarka kirada ah si aan u barno macluumaadka kirada ee noocyada isbedelka ah. Shabakadan waxaa si fudud loogu wada qabsan karaa qaababka tarjumaadka oo ku saleysan multi-source NMT (e.g. multi-encoder RNN iyo transformer) si loo kordhiyo midhaha turjumaadda. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku qoran labo shaqooyin turjuman oo kala duduwan waxay muujiyaan in dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday ayadoo keliya heli karo faa'iido cad oo ku saabsan faa'iidada turjumaadda, laakiin sidoo kale wuxuu qabsadaa in lagu soo galo weerarka kala duduwan.", 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය අදහස් කරනවා තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරමාණය (උදාහරණය, භාෂා, පින්තූර, ඉතින්) පරිවර්තනය කරන් ඉතින් මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්තම්, ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවස්ථාවෙන්නේ ඇත්තට වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්න ඒ වගේ වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වැඩක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සමහර වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සහ අ මේ පත්තරේ අපි උත්සාහ කරනවා විශේෂ පත්තර වලින් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණ තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ස ඒක අවස්ථාවන් කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරභාවක් අවශ්\u200dය ජාලයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සමා මෙම ජාලය සමහර විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය කරන්න බො විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරභාවිත ව්\u200dයාපෘති වැඩක් දෙකට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂයෙන් පැහැදිලි', 'sv': 'Multi-source neural maskinöversättning syftar till att översätta från parallella informationskällor (t.ex. språk, bilder, etc.) till ett enda målspråk, vilket har visat bättre prestanda än de flesta one-to-one system. Trots den anmärkningsvärda framgången med befintliga modeller försummar de vanligtvis det faktum att flera källingångar kan ha inkonsekvenser. Sådana skillnader kan leda till buller i uppgiften och begränsa prestandan hos befintliga NMT-metoder med flera källor på grund av deras urskillningslösa användning av inmatningskällor för förutsägelser av målord. I denna uppsats försöker vi utnyttja den potentiella kompletterande informationen bland olika källor och lindra de tillfälliga konflikterna mellan dem. För att uppnå detta föreslår vi ett källinvariansnätverk för att lära sig invariant information från parallella källor. Ett sådant nätverk kan enkelt integreras med multi-encoder baserade multi-source NMT metoder (t.ex. multi-encoder RNN och transformator) för att förbättra översättningsresultaten. Omfattande experiment på två översättningsuppgifter med flera källor visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet inte bara ger tydliga förbättringar i översättningskvaliteten utan också fångar implicit invarians mellan olika källor.', 'ur': 'Multi-source neural machine translation aims to translate from parallel sources of information (e.g. languages, images, etc.) to a single target language, which has shown better performance than most one to one system. موجود موجود موڈلوں کے معرفی کامیابی کے بغیر، یہ معمولاً اس حقیقت کو غافل کرتے ہیں کہ بہت سی سراسروں اینپوٹ کے ساتھ مختلف ہو سکتے ہیں. یہ اختلاف اس کام میں آواز لے سکتے ہیں اور موجود multi-source NMT کے مطابق موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود مطابق کے مطابق محدود کر سکتے ہیں کہ ان کے مطابق موجود بات کی پیش بینی کے لئے ان کے مطابق غیر محدود است ہم اس کاغذ میں مشکل اضافہ کی اطلاعات کو مختلف منبعوں کے درمیان آسان کرنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں اور ان کے بعض مخالفت کو کم کر دیتے ہیں. یہ کام کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک سراسر غیرقابل نیٹورک کی پیشنهاد کریں کہ parallel sources کے غیرقابل معلومات کو سیکھیں. یہ نیٹورک آسان کر سکتا ہے کہ multi-encoder based multi-source NMT methodologies (e.g. multi-encoder RNN and transformer) کے ساتھ ترجمہ نتائج اضافہ کرے۔ دو متعدد سورج ترجمہ ٹاکنٹ ٹاکنٹ ٹاکنٹ ٹاکنٹ ٹاکنٹ کے بارے میں زیادہ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا صرف ترجمہ کیفیت میں واضح فائدہ پہنچاتی ہے بلکہ مختلف سورجوں کے درمیان مشکل غ', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali b’diversi sorsi g ħandha l-għan li tittraduċi minn sorsi paralleli ta’ informazzjoni (pereżempju lingwi, immaġni, e ċċ.) għal lingwa waħda fil-mira, li wriet prestazzjoni a ħjar mill-biċċa l-kbira tas-sistemi waħda għal waħda. Minkejja s-suċċess notevoli tal-mudelli eżistenti, dawn normalment jinjoraw il-fatt li inputs minn sorsi multipli jista’ jkollhom inkonsistenzi. Such differences might bring noise to the task and limit the performance of existing multi-source NMT approaches due to their indiscriminate usage of input sources for target word predictions.  F’dan id-dokument, nippruvaw inqabdu l-informazzjoni kumplimentari potenzjali fost sorsi distinti u nnaqqsu l-kunflitti okkażjonali tagħhom. Biex niksbu dan, nipproponu netwerk ta’ invarjanza tas-sorsi biex nitgħallmu l-informazzjoni invarjanti ta’ sorsi paralleli. Netwerk bħal dan jista’ jiġi integrat faċilment ma’ metodi NMT b’diversi sorsi bbażati fuq diversi kodifikaturi (pereżempju RNN b’diversi kodifikaturi u trasformatur) biex jittejbu r-riżultati tat-traduzzjoni. Esperimenti estensivi fuq żewġ kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni b’diversi sorsi juru li l-approċċ propost mhux biss jikseb kisbiet ċari fil-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni iżda wkoll jaqbad invarjanza impliċita bejn sorsi differenti.', 'ta': 'பல- மூலத்தின் புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு குறிப்பிடுதல் இணைய தகவல் மூலங்களிலிருந்து (உ. ம். மொழிகள், images, etc.) மொழிக்கு மொழிக்கு மொழியில் மொழியை ம Despite the remarkable success of existing models, they usually neglect the fact that multiple source inputs may have inconsistencies.  இத்தகைய வேறுபாடுகள் பணிக்கு ஒலியை கொண்டு வரும் மற்றும் தற்போதைய பல மூலத்திற்கு NMT செயல்பாட்டை வரையறுக்கலாம் காரணத்தால் அவர்கள் உள்ளீடு மூ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சாத்தியமான சிக்கல் தகவல்களை வெளிப்படுத்த முயற்சிக்கிறோம் வேறு மூலங்களுக்கிடையே மற்றும் நி இதை நிறைவேற்ற, நாம் ஒரு மூல பிணையத்திற்கு முன்னேறுதல் பிணையத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் இணைய மூலங்களின் செல் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்த இந்த பிணையத்தில் பல- குறியீட்டால் ஒருங்கிணைக்கலாம். இரண்டு மூல மொழிமாற்றி பணிகளில் உள்ள விரிவான சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மொழிமாற்று தரத்தில் தெளிவான செலுத்துதல் மட்டும் பெறு', 'uz': "@ info Mavjud modellarning ajoyib muvaffaqiyatli bo'lsa, ular odatda bir nechta manba input ichida muvaffaqiyatli bo'lishi mumkin. Bu yerda o'ylab o'zgarishlar vazifani o'zgartiradi va mavjud bir manba NMT yozuvlarini chegara qilishi mumkin. Bu so'zlar qanday so'z oldingan soʻzning foydalanishi sababda. Bu qogʻozda, biz har xil manbalar bilan murakkablik haqida qo'shishni harakat qilamiz va har doim murammalarni ko'paytirishni harakat qilamiz. Buni bajarish uchun, biz parallel manbalar haqiqiqiy maʼlumotni o'rganish uchun manbasiga kiritish tarmoqni talab qilamiz. Such network can be easily integrated with multi-encoder based multi-source NMT methods (e.g. multi-encoder RNN and transformer) to enhance the translation results.  Bir necha manba tarjima vazifalarda kengaytirish imtiyozlarini koʻrsatish mumkin, ilova qilingan usulning tarjima sifatida faqat yaxshi muvaffaqiyatlarni topishi mumkin, balki boshqa manbalar orasidagi yoʻlni qabul qiladi.", 'vi': 'Dịch từ máy thần kinh đa nguồn dự án nhằm phiên dịch từ các nguồn tin song song (v. d. ngôn ngữ, ảnh, v. d. tới một ngôn ngữ đích duy nhất, đã cho thấy hiệu quả tốt hơn hầu hết các hệ thống. Mặc cho sự thành công đáng chú ý của các mô hình hiện tại, họ thường bỏ qua sự thật rằng nhiều nguồn nhập có thể có mâu thuẫn. Sự khác biệt này có thể gây nhiễu trong công việc và giới hạn khả năng ứng dụng của các phương pháp NMT đa nguồn hiện tại do sử dụng bừa bãi của nguồn nhập để dự đoán từ đích. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cố gắng thu hút các thông tin bổ sung tiềm năng giữa các nguồn khác nhau và giảm thiểu các xung đột đột. Để đạt được điều đó, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng lưới xâm lược nguồn để học thông tin bất thường của các nguồn tin song song. Một mạng lưới có thể dễ dàng được hợp nhất với các phương pháp NMT đa nguồn (v. d. đa mã hóa RNN và máy biến hình) để phát triển kết quả dịch. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ về hai công việc dịch chuyển nhiều nguồn chứng minh rằng phương pháp đề xuất không chỉ đạt được sự tăng vọt trong chất lượng dịch chuyển mà còn nắm bắt sự xâm lược ngầm giữa các nguồn khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Многоизточников невронен машинен превод има за цел да преведе от паралелни източници на информация (например езици, изображения и т.н.) на един целеви език, който е показал по-добра производителност от повечето системи един към един. Въпреки забележителния успех на съществуващите модели, те обикновено пренебрегват факта, че множество входящи източници могат да имат несъответствия. Такива разлики могат да доведат до шум в задачата и да ограничат ефективността на съществуващите подходи с множество източници на НМТ поради безразборното им използване на входни източници за предсказване на целеви думи. В настоящата статия се опитваме да използваме потенциалната допълваща информация между отделните източници и да облекчим случайните конфликти между тях. За да постигнем това, предлагаме мрежа за инвариация на източника, за да научим инвариантната информация на паралелни източници. Такава мрежа може лесно да бъде интегрирана с мулти-кодер базирани мулти-източник НМТ методи (напр. мулти-кодер RNN и трансформатор), за да се подобрят резултатите от превода. Обширни експерименти с две задачи за превод с множество източници показват, че предложеният подход не само постига ясни подобрения в качеството на превода, но и улавя имплицитна инвариация между различните източници.', 'nl': 'Multi-source neural machine translation is bedoeld om te vertalen van parallelle informatiebronnen (bijv. talen, afbeeldingen, enz.) naar een enkele doeltaal, die betere prestaties heeft laten zien dan de meeste één-op-één systemen. Ondanks het opmerkelijke succes van bestaande modellen, verwaarlozen ze meestal het feit dat meerdere broninvoer inconsistenties kunnen hebben. Dergelijke verschillen kunnen ruis veroorzaken bij de taak en de prestaties van bestaande multi-source NMT-benaderingen beperken vanwege hun willekeurig gebruik van invoerbronnen voor doelwoordvoorspellingen. In dit artikel proberen we de potentiële complementaire informatie tussen verschillende bronnen te benutten en de incidentele conflicten ervan te verlichten. Om dat te bereiken, stellen we een broninvariantie netwerk voor om de invariante informatie van parallelle bronnen te leren. Een dergelijk netwerk kan gemakkelijk worden geïntegreerd met multi-encoder gebaseerde multi-source NMT methoden (bijv. multi-encoder RNN en transformator) om de vertaalresultaten te verbeteren. Uitgebreide experimenten met twee vertaaltaken uit meerdere bronnen tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak niet alleen duidelijke winsten in vertaalkwaliteit bereikt, maar ook impliciete invariantie tussen verschillende bronnen vastlegt.', 'da': 'Multi-source neural maskinoversættelse sigter mod at oversætte fra parallelle informationskilder (f.eks. sprog, billeder osv.) til et enkelt målsprog, som har vist bedre ydeevne end de fleste one-to-one systemer. På trods af den bemærkelsesværdige succes af eksisterende modeller, forsømmer de normalt det faktum, at flere kildeindgange kan have uoverensstemmelser. Sådanne forskelle kan medføre støj til opgaven og begrænse ydeevnen af eksisterende multi-source NMT-metoder på grund af deres vilkårlige brug af inputkilder til målordsforudsigelser. I denne artikel forsøger vi at udnytte den potentielle supplerende information blandt forskellige kilder og afhjælpe de lejlighedsvise konflikter mellem dem. For at opnå dette, foreslår vi et kilde invariance netværk til at lære invariant information af parallelle kilder. Et sådant netværk kan nemt integreres med multi-encoder baserede multi-source NMT metoder (f.eks. multi-encoder RNN og transformer) for at forbedre oversættelsesresultaterne. Omfattende eksperimenter med to multi-source oversættelsesopgaver viser, at den foreslåede fremgangsmåde ikke blot opnår klare gevinster i oversættelseskvaliteten, men også opfanger implicit invarians mellem forskellige kilder.', 'hr': 'Višeizvorski prevod neuralnih strojeva cilja je prevoditi iz paralelnih izvora informacija (npr. jezika, slika itd.) na jednog ciljnog jezika, koji je pokazao bolju učinku nego većinu jednog na jednog sustava. Uprkos izvanrednim uspjehom postojećih modela, oni obično zanemaruju činjenicu da više izvora ulaganja može imati nesklade. Takve razlike bi mogle dovesti buku na zadatak i ograničiti učinkovitost postojećih multiizvorskih pristupa NMT-a zbog njihovog nediskriminiranog korištenja izvora ulaza za ciljne riječi predviđanja. U ovom papiru pokušavamo utjecati na potencijalne dodatne informacije među različitim izvorima i olakšati povremene sukobe njih. Da bi to ostvarili, predlažemo izvornu invariantnu mrežu da naučimo invariantne informacije o paralelnim izvorima. Takva mreža se može lako integrirati s multikoderskim metodama NMT-a (npr. multikoderskim RNN i transformatorom) kako bi poboljšala rezultate prevoda. Prošireni eksperimenti na dva višeizvornog prevodnog zadatka pokazuju da predloženi pristup ne samo postiže jasni dobitak kvalitete prevoda, nego također uključuje implicitnu invariaciju između različitih izvora.', 'de': 'Multi-Source neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung zielt darauf ab, von parallelen Informationsquellen (z.B. Sprachen, Bilder usw.) in eine einzige Zielsprache zu übersetzen, die eine bessere Leistung als die meisten Eins-zu-Eins-Systeme gezeigt hat. Trotz des bemerkenswerten Erfolgs bestehender Modelle vernachlässigen sie in der Regel die Tatsache, dass mehrere Quelleingänge Inkonsistenzen aufweisen können. Solche Unterschiede könnten Rauschen in die Aufgabe bringen und die Leistung bestehender Multi-Source-NMT-Ansätze aufgrund ihrer wahllosen Verwendung von Eingabequellen für Zielwortvorhersagen einschränken. In diesem Beitrag versuchen wir, die potenziellen komplementären Informationen zwischen verschiedenen Quellen zu nutzen und gelegentliche Konflikte zu lindern. Um dies zu erreichen, schlagen wir ein Quelleninvarianznetzwerk vor, um die invarianten Informationen paralleler Quellen zu lernen. Ein solches Netzwerk kann leicht mit Multi-Encoder basierten Multi-Source-NMT-Methoden (z.B. Multi-Encoder RNN und Transformator) integriert werden, um die Übersetzungsergebnisse zu verbessern. Umfangreiche Experimente an zwei Übersetzungsaufgaben aus mehreren Quellen zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz nicht nur deutliche Verbesserungen in der Übersetzungsqualität erzielt, sondern auch implizite Invarianzen zwischen verschiedenen Quellen erfasst.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf multisumber bertujuan untuk menerjemahkan dari sumber informasi paralel (contohnya bahasa, gambar, dll.) ke bahasa sasaran tunggal, yang telah menunjukkan prestasi yang lebih baik dari kebanyakan sistem satu ke satu. Meskipun sukses luar biasa dari model yang ada, mereka biasanya mengabaikan fakta bahwa masukan sumber berbilang mungkin memiliki ketidakkonsistensi. Perbedaan seperti ini mungkin membawa kebisingan untuk tugas dan membatasi prestasi pendekatan NMT multisumber yang ada karena penggunaan mereka tidak diskriminasi sumber input untuk prediksi kata sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kami mencoba untuk menggunakan informasi komplementari potensi di antara sumber yang berbeda dan mengurangi konflik-konflik yang kadang-kadang mereka. Untuk menyelesaikannya, kami mengusulkan jaringan invarians sumber untuk mempelajari informasi invarians sumber paralel. Jaringan tersebut dapat mudah diintegrasikan dengan metode NMT berbasis multi-sumber (contohnya RNN dan transformer multikoder) untuk meningkatkan hasil terjemahan. Eksperimen luas pada dua tugas terjemahan multisumber menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan tidak hanya mencapai keuntungan jelas dalam kualitas terjemahan tetapi juga menangkap invarian implicit antara sumber yang berbeda.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی چند منبع را هدف می\u200cدهد که از منابع متفاوتی اطلاعات (مثلا زبان، تصاویر و غیر از آن) به زبان یک هدف ترجمه کند، که عملکرد بهتر از بیشتر سیستم\u200cهای یک به یک نشان داده است. با وجود موفقیت فوق العاده مدل موجود، آنها معمولاً این حقیقت را فراموش می کنند که ورودهای متعدد منبع ممکن است مخالفت داشته باشد. این تفاوتها ممکن است صدا را به وظیفه برساند و عملکرد نزدیک NMT چند منبع موجود محدود کند به دلیل استفاده از منبع ورودی برای پیش بینی کردن کلمه هدف را نازل کنند. در این کاغذ، ما سعی می کنیم که اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای پتانسیل را در میان منابع مختلف تحریک کنیم و مبارزه\u200cهایشان را کمتر کنیم. تا این کار را انجام دهیم، ما یک شبکه ناتوانی منبع را پیشنهاد می کنیم تا اطلاعات ناتوانی از منابع متفاوتی را یاد بگیریم. این شبکه می\u200cتواند به راحتی با روش\u200cهای NMT multi source based multi-encoder (مثال multi-encoder RNN and transformer) برای افزایش نتیجه\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cسازی باشد. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده در دو تابع ترجمه\u200cهای منبع متعدد نشان می\u200cدهد که این روش پیشنهاد نه تنها پیروزی روشن در کیفیت ترجمه می\u200cرسد، بلکه همچنین تغییر معنی بین منبع متفاوت را می\u200cگیرد.', 'ko': '다원신경기계번역은 평행 정보원(예를 들어 언어, 이미지 등)을 단일 목표 언어로 번역하는 데 목적을 둔다. 그 성능은 대부분의 일대일 시스템보다 우수하다.비록 기존 모델이 현저한 성공을 거두었지만, 그들은 보통 여러 개의 원본 입력이 일치하지 않을 수 있다는 사실을 무시한다.이런 차이는 임무에 소음을 가져오고 기존의 다원적 NMT 방법의 성능을 제한할 수 있다. 왜냐하면 그들은 다짜고짜로 입력원을 사용하여 목표어를 예측하기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 서로 다른 출처 간의 잠재적인 상호 보완 정보를 이용하여 간혹 충돌을 완화시키려고 한다.이를 실현하기 위해 우리는 원불변성 네트워크를 이용하여 병행원의 불변성 정보를 학습하는 것을 제기했다.이런 네트워크는 다중 인코더를 기반으로 하는 다원적 NMT 방법(예를 들어 다중 인코더 RNN과transformer)과 쉽게 통합되어 번역 결과를 강화할 수 있다.두 개의 다원적 번역 임무에 대한 대량의 실험을 통해 이 방법은 번역의 질에 있어 뚜렷한 향상을 얻었을 뿐만 아니라 동원 간의 은식 불변성도 포착했다.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine yenye chanzo kikubwa inalenga kutafsiri kutoka vyanzo vya habari vinavyofanana (kama vile lugha, picha, etc.) hadi lugha moja yenye lengo, ambayo imeonyesha utendaji mzuri zaidi ya mfumo mmoja hadi moja. Pamoja na mafanikio makubwa ya mifano yaliyopo, mara nyingi hupuuza ukweli kwamba input wa vyanzo vingi vinaweza kuwa na ukosefu wa kutokuwepo. tofauti hizo zinaweza kusababisha sauti kwa kazi na kuzuia ufanisi wa vyanzo vingi vya NMT vilivyopo kwa sababu ya matumizi ya vyanzo vya input kwa ajili ya kutabiri maneno. Katika karatasi hii, tunajaribu kutumia taarifa zinazowezekana za uungaji kati ya vyanzo tofauti na kupunguza migogoro ya wakati. Ili kufanikisha hilo, tunapendekeza mtandao wa uvamizi wa vyanzo vya habari vinavyofanana. Mtandao huu unaweza kuunganishwa kwa urahisi na njia mbalimbali za NMT yenye asili ya vyanzo vingi vya NMT (kwa mfano, kodi nyingi RNN na mabadiliko) ili kuongeza matokeo ya tafsiri. Majaribio mengi katika kazi mbili za tafsiri za vyanzo vinaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa siyo tu kupata mafanikio ya wazi kwa kiwango cha kutafsiri lakini pia inachukua uvamizi unaoonesha kati ya vyanzo tofauti.', 'tr': 'Köp-çe şmeli näyral maşynyň terjimesine parallel malümatyň çeşmelerinden (meselâ, dillerden, suratlardan, etc.) ýekeje maksady diline terjime etmek üçin amap edýär. Bu sistemleriň birden-birden gowy täsirlemegini g örkezilýär. Öň bar nusgalaryň täsirli başarnygyndan rağmen, birnäçe çeşme girişi bolmagynyň täsirsizligini ýok edip biler. Bütin üýtgeşmeler görevi gürrüňi getirip biler we meýilleşdirýän köp-çeşme NMT golaýarlarynyň gaýd etmeli kitaplaryň ulanmasynyň üçin barlap biler. Bu kagyzda biz özümiziň bellenen çeşmeleriň arasynda mümkin täzelikçi maglumatlaryny etmäge synanyşýarys we olaryň çagalaryny azaltmak üçin synanyşýarys. Bunu başarmak üçin, parallel çeşmeleriniň iň daş malümatyny öwrenmek üçin çeşme maşgalasyny maslahat berýäris. Bärde aňsat ködleme multi-ködleme NMT metodlary bilen aňsatlyk bilen birleşip biler (meselâ, multi-ködleme RNN we üýtgewçi) terjime netijesini geliştirmek üçin. Iki köp-çeşme terjime täbliklerinde döwletler görkezilýän çözümler diňe terjime täbliklerinde boýunça gazanýandygyny görkezýär ýöne farklı çeşmeler arasynda täsirli syýasaty çekýär.', 'af': "Mehrbron neural e masjien vertaling doen doel om van parallele bronne van inligting te vertaling (bv. tale, beelde, ensfh.) na 'n enkele doel taal, wat beter doel te vertoon as meeste een na een stelsels. Onthou die merkelike sukses van bestaande modele, verwerp hulle gewoonlik die feit dat veelvuldige bron inputs dalk nie inkonsistensies het nie. Hierdie verskille mag geluid na die taak bring en beperk die prestasie van bestaande multibronne NMT toegang vanweë hulle ongeskryfbare gebruik van invoer bronne vir doel woord voorskou. In hierdie papier, ons probeer om die potensiele komplementaar inligting onder verskillende bronne te verwyder en die tydelike konflikte van hulle te verminder. Om dit te voldoen, voorstel ons 'n bron invarians netwerk om die invariant inligting van parallele bronne te leer. Soos netwerk kan maklik integreer word met multi-encoder gebaseerde multi-bronne NMT metodes (bv. multi-encoder RNN en transformer) om die vertalingsresultate te verbeter. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op twee veelvuldige oorsettingstaak bevestig dat die voorgestelde toegang nie slegs duidelike verskaffings in oorsettingskwaliteit bereik nie, maar ook inplisite ongelukking tussen verskillende bronne bereik.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi nervor me shumë burime ka për qëllim përkthimin nga burime paralele të informacionit (për shembull gjuhë, imazhe, etj.) në një gjuhë të vetme objektive, e cila ka treguar performancë më të mirë se shumica e sistemeve një në një. Megjithë suksesin e jashtëzakonshëm të modeleve ekzistuese, ata zakonisht harrojnë faktin se inputs shumë burime mund të kenë moskonsistencë. Ndryshimet e tilla mund të sjellin zhurmë në detyrë dhe të kufizojnë performancën e metodave ekzistuese të NMT me shumë burime për shkak të përdorimit të tyre të paqartë të burimeve të hyrjes për parashikimet e fjalëve objektiv. Në këtë letër, ne përpiqemi të përdorim informacionin e mundshëm komplementar midis burimeve të veçanta dhe të lehtësojmë konfliktet rastësore të tyre. Për ta arritur këtë, ne propozojmë një rrjet përçarjeje burimi për të mësuar informacionin përçarës të burimeve paralele. Rrjeti i tillë mund të integrohet lehtë me metoda NMT me shumë burime bazuar në shumë kodues (për shembull RNN me shumë kodues dhe transformues) për të përmirësuar rezultatet e përkthimit. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në dy detyra përkthimi me shumë burime demonstrojnë se metoda e propozuar jo vetëm arrin fitime të qarta në cilësinë e përkthimit por përfshin gjithashtu invariancën implicitete midis burimeve të ndryshme.', 'am': 'Multi-source neural machine translation aims to translate from parallel sources of information (e.g. language, images, etc.) to a single target language, which has shown better performance than one-to-one systems. ምንም እንኳን የአሁኑ ዓይነቶች ፍላጎት ቢሆንም፣ ብዙዎች የኩነቶች ውስጥ ጥቃት ሊኖሩ ይችላል፡፡ Such differences might bring noise to the task and limit the performance of existing multi-source NMT approaches due to their indiscriminate usage of input sources for target word predictions.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተለያዩ መልዕክቶች መካከል የቻላቸውን የአካባቢ መረጃዎችን ልናሳድድ እና የጊዜውን ግጭት ማሳየትን እንሞክራለን፡፡ ይህንን ለማድረግ የኩነቶች የውጤት መረብ ለመማር እናስጀጋለን፡፡ ይሄንን መረብ በብዙ-source NMT methods (e.g. multi-encoder RNN እና transformer) ለመግለጫ ትርጉም results እንዲያበዛ ይቀላል። በሁለት ልዩ-ምንጭ ትርጉም አድራጊዎች ላይ የረጅም ፈተናዎች በተዘጋጀው ግንኙነት በተርጉም ጥሩ ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን በተለዩ ምንጮች መካከል የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Շատ աղբյուրներ ունեցող նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը նպատակում է տեղեկատվության զուգահեռ աղբյուրներից (օրինակ լեզուներից, պատկերներից և այլն) թարգմանել մեկ նպատակային լեզու, որը ցույց է տալիս ավելի լավ արդյունք, քան մեկ-մեկ Չնայած գոյություն ունեցող մոդելների զարմանալի հաջողությանը, նրանք սովորաբար անտեսում են այն փաստը, որ բազմաթիվ աղբյուրների ներմուծները կարող են ունենալ անհամապատասխանություններ: Այսպիսի տարբերությունները կարող են աղմուկ բերել խնդիրը և սահմանափակել գոյություն ունեցող բազմա աղբյուրների NMT մոտեցումների արտադրողությունը, քանի որ դրանք անտարբեր աղբյուրների օգտագործումն են նպատակային բառերի կանխատեսման համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք փորձում ենք օգտագործել բազմազան տեղեկատվությունը տարբեր աղբյուրների միջև և նվազեցնել դրանց ժամանակական հակամարտությունները: Դա իրականացնելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք աղբյուրների անընդհատ ցանց, որպեսզի սովորենք զուգահեռ աղբյուրների անընդհատ տեղեկատվությունը: Այս ցանցը հեշտությամբ կարող է ինտեգրվել բազմակոդերների հիմնված բազմակոդերների NMT մեթոդների հետ (օրինակ բազմակոդերների ՌՆԹ և վերափոխողների միջոցով) թարգմանման արդյունքների բարելավման համար: Երկու բազմա աղբյուրների թարգմանման խնդիրների ընդլայնված փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը ոչ միայն հասնում է թարգմանման որակի պարզ զարգացումներին, այլ նաև ներառում է տարբեր աղբյուրների միջև աննշանակալի', 'az': 'Çoxlu mənbə nöral mašin tərcüməsi məlumatların paralel mənbələrindən (məsələn, dillərin, suratların, etc.) tək məqsəd dilinə çevirmək məqsədildir. Bu sistemin çoxundan daha xeyirli performans g östərir. Müxtəlif modellərin mükəmməl başarısına rağmen, çoxlu mənbə inputlərinin müqayisədə olmasını unutdular. Bütün fərqləşmələr işə səs gətirə bilər və məqsəd sözlərin tədbirlərinin istifadəsi üçün çoxlu mənbə NMT yaxınlıqlarının müəyyən edilməsini müəyyən edə bilər. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif mənbələr arasında potensial papildu məlumatları istifadə etməyə çalışırıq və onların müxtəlif münafiqlərini əskiltməyə çalışırıq. Bunu yerinə yetirmək üçün, paralel kaynaqların istifadəçi məlumatlarını öyrənmək üçün bir mənbə istifadəçilik a ğını təklif edirik. Bu şəbəkə çoxlu kodlayıcı çoxlu mənbə NMT metodları (çoxlu kodlayıcı RNN və transformer) ilə asanlaşdırıla bilər. İki çoxlu mənbə çeviri işlərində geniş eksperimentlər təklif edilən metodların sadəcə çeviri kalitetində açıq qənimətlərə nail olmadığını göstərir, lakin də müxtəlif mənbələr arasındakı imkansız səhvi tutar.', 'bn': 'বহুসূত্র নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে প্যারালেলেল উৎস (উদাহরণস্বরূপ ভাষা, ছবি, ইত্যাদি) থেকে একটি লক্ষ্য ভাষায় অনুবাদ করা যায়, যা বেশীর ভাগ বিদ্যমান মডেলের চমৎকার সফলতা সত্ত্বেও তারা সাধারণত বাস্তবতা উপেক্ষা করে যে বেশ কিছু উৎস ইনপুট সম্ভবত অসম্পূর্ণ। এই ধরনের পার্থক্য তাদের লক্ষ্য শব্দের ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর কারণে বিদ্যমান বহুস্থ সোর্স এনএমটির প্রাপ্তি সীমাবদ্ধ করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন সূত্রের মধ্যে সম্ভাব্য জটিল তথ্য প্রদান করার চেষ্টা করছি এবং তাদের মাঝে মাঝে সংঘর্ষের কমিয়ে দে এটা সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য আমরা একটি উৎস আক্রমণের নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি প্যারালেল উৎসের তথ্য শিখার জন্য। অনুবাদের ফলাফল বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য এই ধরনের নেটওয়ার্ক সহজে মাল্টিক কোডার ভিত্তিক এনএমটি পদ্ধতি সহজে একত্রিত হতে পারে। দুটি বহুসূত্র অনুবাদ কাজের উপর বিশাল পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র অনুবাদের মানে পরিষ্কার অর্জন পাওয়া যায় না, কিন', 'cs': 'Cílem multizdrojového neuronového strojového překladu je překlad z paralelních zdrojů informací (např. jazyků, obrázků apod.) do jednoho cílového jazyka, který vykazuje lepší výkon než většina systémů jeden na jednoho. Navzdory pozoruhodnému úspěchu stávajících modelů obvykle zanedbávají skutečnost, že více zdrojových vstupů může mít nesrovnalost. Tyto rozdíly by mohly přinést šum k úkolu a omezit výkon stávajících multi-source NMT přístupů kvůli jejich nerozlišitelnému použití vstupních zdrojů pro predikci cílových slov. V tomto článku se snažíme využít potenciální doplňkové informace mezi různými zdroji a zmírnit příležitostné konflikty. Abychom toho dosáhli, navrhujeme zdrojovou invarianční síť, abychom se naučili invariantní informace paralelních zdrojů. Takovou síť lze snadno integrovat s multi-encodery založenými multi-source NMT metodami (např. multi-encoder RNN a transformátor) pro zlepšení výsledků překladu. Rozsáhlé experimenty na dvou více zdrojových překladatelských úlohách ukazují, že navržený přístup nejen dosahuje jasných zisků v kvalitě překladu, ale také zachycuje implicitní invarianci mezi různými zdroji.', 'bs': 'Višeizvorski prevod neuralnih strojeva cilja je prevoditi iz paralelnih izvora informacija (npr. jezika, slika, itd.) na jednog ciljnog jezika, koji pokazuje bolje izvođenje nego većina jednog na jednom sistemu. Uprkos izvanrednim uspjehom postojećih modela, oni obično zanemaruju činjenicu da višestruki izvorski ulaz može imati nesklade. Takve razlike bi mogle dovesti buku na zadatak i ograničiti učinkovitost postojećih multiizvorskih pristupa NMT-a zbog njihovog nediskriminiranog korištenja izvora ulaza za predviđanje ciljnih riječi. U ovom papiru pokušavamo utjecati na potencijalne dodatne informacije među različitim izvorima i olakšati povremene sukobe njih. Da bi to ostvarili, predlažemo izvornu invariantnu mrežu da naučimo invariantne informacije o paralelnim izvorima. Takva mreža može biti lako integrisana s multikoderskim metodama NMT-a (npr. multikoderskim RNN i transformatorom) kako bi poboljšala rezultate prevoda. Prošireni eksperimenti na dva višeizvornog prevodnog zadatka pokazuju da predloženi pristup ne samo postiže jasni dobitak kvalitete prevoda, nego također uhvati implicitnu invaziju između različitih izvora.', 'et': 'Mitme allika neuromasintõlke eesmärk on tõlkida paralleelsetest teabeallikatest (nt keeled, pildid jne) ühte sihtkeelde, mis on näidanud paremat jõudlust kui enamik üks-ühele süsteeme. Vaatamata olemasolevate mudelite märkimisväärsele edule jätavad nad tavaliselt tähelepanuta asjaolu, et mitme allika sisendi puhul võib olla vastuolusid. Sellised erinevused võivad tuua ülesandesse müra ja piirata olemasolevate mitmealliliste NMT meetodite toimimist, kuna sisendallikaid kasutatakse sihtsõna ennustamiseks valimatult. Käesolevas dokumendis püüame kasutada võimalikku täiendavat teavet erinevate allikate vahel ja leevendada nende juhuslikke konflikte. Selle saavutamiseks pakume välja allika invariance võrgustiku, et õppida invariant informatsiooni paralleelsetest allikatest. Sellist võrku saab hõlpsasti integreerida mitme kodeerijaga põhinevate mitme allika NMT meetoditega (nt mitme kodeerijaga RNN ja trafo), et parandada tõlketulemusi. Põhjalikud katsed kahe mitmeallilise tõlke ülesandega näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ei saavuta mitte ainult selget tõlkekvaliteeti, vaid kajastab ka kaudset invariantsust eri allikate vahel.', 'fi': 'Monen lähdekoodin neurokonekäännöksen tavoitteena on kääntää rinnakkaisista tietolähteistä (esim. kielistä, kuvista jne.) yhdelle kohdekielelle, joka on osoittautunut paremmaksi kuin useimmat yksitellen käytettävät järjestelmät. Huolimatta olemassa olevien mallien huomattavasta menestyksestä niissä yleensä laiminlyödään se tosiasia, että usealla lähteellä saattaa olla epäjohdonmukaisuuksia. Tällaiset erot saattavat aiheuttaa melua tehtävään ja rajoittaa olemassa olevien monilähteisten NMT-lähestymistapojen suorituskykyä, koska niissä käytetään summittaisesti syöttölähteitä kohdesanojen ennustamiseen. Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme hyödyntämään mahdollisia täydentäviä tietoja eri lähteistä ja lievittämään niiden satunnaisia ristiriitoja. Tämän saavuttamiseksi ehdotamme lähdeinvarianssiverkkoa oppiaksemme invarianssitiedon rinnakkaisista lähteistä. Tällainen verkko voidaan helposti integroida monikooderipohjaisiin monikooderipohjaisiin NMT-menetelmiin (esim. monikooderi RNN ja muuntaja) käännöstuloksen parantamiseksi. Laajat kokeet kahdesta monilähdekäännöstehtävästä osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa ei ainoastaan saavuta selkeitä parannuksia käännöslaadussa, vaan myös havaitsee implisiittisen invarianssin eri lähteiden välillä.', 'ca': "La traducció de màquines neurals de múltiples fonts té l'objectiu de traduir des de fonts paralleles d'informació (per exemple llengües, imatges, etc.) a un llenguatge d'objectiu únic, que ha mostrat millor rendiment que la majoria dels sistemes d'un a un. Malgrat l'èxit notable dels models existents, normalment ignoren el fet que les entrades de múltiples fonts pot tenir inconsistencies. Such differences might bring noise to the task and limit the performance of existing multi-source NMT approaches due to their indiscriminate usage of input sources for target word predictions.  En aquest paper intentem aprofitar la informació complementar potencial entre fonts diferents i aliviar els conflictes ocasionals d'elles. To accomplish that, we propose a source invariance network to learn the invariant information of parallel sources.  Aquesta xarxa es pot integrar fàcilment amb mètodes NMT multicodificadors (per exemple RNN multicodificador i transformador) per millorar els resultats de la traducció. Els extensos experiments en dues tasques de traducció de múltiples fonts demostren que l'enfocament proposat no només aconsegueix avanços clars en la qualitat de traducció, sinó també captura una invariació implícita entre diverses fonts.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ing berlak sistem sing paling perbudhakan karo model sing ana, dadi piye nganggep kuwi mau Dibernate Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé saiki nggawe informasi luwih-luwih éntuk karo pernik apakno lan nganggo nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe nguasai iki. Rasané awak dhéwé, kita mbukakipun ajeng-ajeng penggunaké tambah kanggo ngerasah informasi ambarasan karo penjelajah sing bakal tambah. Dijejer-jejer netong iso diandelak ngomong sampeyan karo multi-koder sing basa gambar NMT supoyo multi-source Ombudhakan neng alih sing beraksi kanggo langgar sampeyan karo akeh multi-source sing bisalahan nguasai supoyo supoyo nggawe geranggap ora ono limo perusahaan kanggo ngerasai kapan tarjamahan ngangge ujaran cara-ujaran sing wis nguasai cara-ujaran cara-ujaran', 'sk': 'Cilj več virov nevronskega strojnega prevajanja je prevajanje iz vzporednih virov informacij (npr. jezikov, slik itd.) v en sam ciljni jezik, ki je pokazal boljšo učinkovitost kot večina sistemov enega na enega. Kljub izjemnemu uspehu obstoječih modelov običajno zanemarjajo dejstvo, da imajo lahko več vhodnih virov nedoslednosti. Takšne razlike bi lahko povzročile hrup v nalogo in omejile učinkovitost obstoječih pristopov NMT z več viri zaradi njihove neodvisne uporabe vhodnih virov za napovedovanje ciljnih besed. V tem prispevku poskušamo izkoristiti morebitne dopolnilne informacije med različnimi viri in ublažiti občasne konflikte med njimi. Da bi to dosegli, predlagamo omrežje invariance vira za učenje invariantnih informacij vzporednih virov. Takšno omrežje je mogoče enostavno integrirati z več kodirnimi metodami NMT (npr. multi-kodirni RNN in transformator) za izboljšanje rezultatov prevajanja. Obsežni eksperimenti na dveh nalogah prevajanja več virov kažejo, da predlagani pristop ne dosega le jasnega povečanja kakovosti prevajanja, temveč zajema tudi implicitno invarianco med različnimi viri.', 'ha': "translation Babu da cin nasara mai girma wa misãlai da ke gaba, ko da yawa, sai su manta da gaskiya cewa inputin wasu sources za'a da ɓarna. Waccan gaɓanci masu yiwuwa zai iya ƙara sauti zuwa aikin kuma yana ƙunsa da cikakken shirin da ke kai yanzu masu tsohon NMT masu buƙata, saboda haka da amfani da su na tsari wa sourcen inputi wa misalin maganar da aka yi amfani da. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba mu samun bayani masu iya ƙaranci a tsakanin sourcen dabam-daban kuma Muke sauƙaƙara murayen da suka kasance a lokacin. Ga ku cika wannan, Munã buɗa wani shirin kirayi na source, dõmin ya sanar da kima mai gaske wa sourcen parallel. @ info: whatsthis Cijaroyi masu ƙaranci a kan aikin fassarar biyu masu multi-source sun nuna cewa hanyor da aka ƙayyade, bã zai iya sãmu kowa da bayani kawai cikin tsarin fassarar, kuma amma yana kãma suriyar da kuma ba ta shiga a tsakanin sourcen daban.", 'he': 'תורגם על ידי מכונת עצבית ממקורים רבים מכוונה לתרגם ממקורים מקבילים של מידע (למשל שפות, תמונות וכו.) לשפה מטרה אחת, אשר הראה ביצועים טובים יותר מרוב מערכות אחת לאחד. למרות ההצלחה המדהימה של דוגמנים קיימים, הם בדרך כלל מזהירים את העובדה שלכניסות מקורות רבות עשויות להיות לא תואמות. Such differences might bring noise to the task and limit the performance of existing multi-source NMT approaches due to their indiscriminate usage of input sources for target word predictions.  In this paper, we attempt to leverage the potential complementary information among distinct sources and alleviate the occasional conflicts of them.  כדי להשיג את זה, אנו מציעים רשת פריצות מקור ללמוד את המידע הפולנסי של מקורות מקבילים. רשת כזו יכולה להיות מושלמת בקלות עם שיטות NMT רבות מקורות מבוססות על קודם רב (למשל RNN רבות קודם ומעבר) כדי לשפר את תוצאות התרגום. ניסויים רחבים על שתי משימות תרגום ממקורים רבים מראים שהגישה המוצעת לא רק משיגה רווחות ברורות באיכות התרגום, אלא גם משיגה פריצה מוחלטת בין מקורות שונים.', 'bo': 'Multi-source neural machine translation aims to translate from parallel sources of information (e.g. languages, images, etc.) to a single target language, which has shown better performance than most one-to-one systems. Similar to གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་མིག འོན་ཀྱང་། ཁྱད་པར་འདི་དག་གི་བྱ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཁྱད་པར་གྱི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཁྱད་པར་ཆོས་ཉིད་དུ་རྐྱེན་ཏུ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་མཐར་སྡུད་དགོས་པ་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བའི་རྐྱེན་དྲ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། Such network can be easily integrated with multi-encoder based multi-source NMT methods (e.g. multi-encoder RNN and transformer) to enhance the translation results. རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རྒྱས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད'}
{'en': 'How Relevant Are Selectional Preferences for Transformer-based Language Models?', 'ar': 'ما مدى ملاءمة التفضيلات الاختيارية لنماذج اللغة القائمة على المحولات؟', 'pt': 'Quão relevantes são as preferências de seleção para modelos de linguagem baseados em transformador?', 'fr': 'Quelle est la pertinence des préférences de sélection pour les modèles de langage basés sur Transformer\xa0?', 'es': '¿Qué importancia tienen las preferencias de selección para los modelos de lenguaje basados en transformadores?', 'ja': 'トランスフォーマーベースの言語モデルの選択設定はどの程度関連していますか？', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित भाषा मॉडल के लिए चयन प्राथमिकताएं कितनी प्रासंगिक हैं?', 'zh': '择偏好与转换器言语模样者相关性何如?', 'ru': 'Насколько актуальны выборочные предпочтения для языковых моделей на основе трансформаторов?', 'ga': 'Cé chomh Ábhartha is atá na Roghanna Roghnacha do Mhúnlaí Teanga atá Bunaithe ar Chlaochladán?', 'ka': 'როგორ შესაძლებელია მონიშნული პარამეტრებები ტრანფორმების ენის მოდელებისთვის?', 'hu': 'Mennyire relevánsak a transzformátor alapú nyelvi modellek kiválasztási beállításai?', 'el': 'Πόσο σχετικές είναι οι επιλεκτικές προτιμήσεις για γλωσσικά μοντέλα που βασίζονται στον μετασχηματιστή;', 'it': 'Quanto sono rilevanti le preferenze di selezione per i modelli linguistici basati su trasformatori?', 'ms': 'Bagaimana Relevan Keutamaan Pemilihan untuk Model Bahasa Berasas-Transformer?', 'mk': 'Колку се релевантни изборните преференции за јазичните модели базирани на трансформи?', 'lt': 'How Relevant Are Selectional Preferences for Transformer-based Language Models?', 'mt': 'Kif Relevanti huma l-Preferenzi Selettivi għal Mudelli Lingwistiċi bbażati fuq it-Trasformaturi?', 'no': 'Korleis tilhøyrande er utvalsinnstillingar for språk- modeller basert på transformerer?', 'pl': 'Jak istotne są preferencje wyboru modeli językowych opartych na transformatorze?', 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dഫര്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കല്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണന മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ്?', 'sr': 'Koliko su relevantni izborne preferencije za jezičke modele na transformeru?', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн хэл загварын сонголтын сонголтууд хэрхэн хамааралтай вэ?', 'si': 'කොච්චර සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව අධාරිත භාෂාව මඩෝල් වෙනුවෙන් තෝරාගන්න තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200d', 'so': 'Sidee muhiimka ah ee loo doortay noocyada afka hore?', 'ro': 'Cât de relevante sunt preferințele selecționale pentru modelele lingvistice bazate pe transformator?', 'sv': 'Hur relevanta är valinställningar för transformatorbaserade språkmodeller?', 'ur': 'تبدیل کرنے والی زبان موڈل کے لئے انتخابات کی ترجیح کی ترجیح کس طرح برابر ہے؟', 'ta': 'மாற்றியமைப்பு மொழி மாற்றங்களுக்கு எவ்வாறு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு விருப்பங்கள் இருக்கிறது?', 'kk': 'Түрлендіруші тіл үлгілерінің таңдау параметрлері қанша жақсы?', 'vi': 'Giá trị ưa thích ứng chọn cho mô phỏng ngôn ngữ biến hình?', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'da': 'Hvor relevante er valgpræferencer for Transformer-baserede sprogmodeller?', 'bg': 'Колко подходящи са селекционните предпочитания за езикови модели, базирани на трансформатори?', 'nl': 'Hoe relevant zijn selectievoorkeuren voor op Transformer gebaseerde taalmodellen?', 'ko': 'Transformer 기반 언어 모델의 선택 기본 설정의 상관성은 어떻습니까?', 'hr': 'Kako su relevantne izborne preferencije za jezičke modele na transformeru?', 'id': 'Seberapa Relevan Apakah Preferensi Pemilihan untuk Model Bahasa Berdasar Transformer?', 'de': 'Wie relevant sind Selektionseinstellungen für Transformer-basierte Sprachmodelle?', 'sw': 'How Relevant Are Selectional Preferences for Transformer-based Language Models?', 'af': 'Hoe Relevant Is Keuse Voorkeure vir Transformer-gebaseerde Taal Modelle?', 'tr': 'Transformer Dili nusgala üçin Saýlaw Seçenekleri nähili Görniş Opşenler?', 'fa': 'چگونه ترجیح\u200cهای انتخابی برای مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cها مربوط است؟', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Sa të rëndësishme janë preferimet zgjedhore për modelet e gjuhës me bazë në transformues?', 'hy': 'Ինչքա՞ն կարևոր են վերափոխման հիմնված լեզվի մոդելների ընտրական նախընտրությունները:', 'az': 'Transformer dil modell…ôrinin se√ßiml…ôri nec…ô uyƒüun?', 'ca': 'How Relevant Are Selectional Preferences for Transformer-based Language Models?', 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফার্নার ভিত্তিক ভাষার মোডেলের জন্য কিভাবে সম্পর্কিত পছন্দ?', 'bs': 'Koliko su relevantne izborne preferencije za jezičke modele na transformeru?', 'cs': 'Jak relevantní jsou výběrové předvolby pro jazykové modely založené na transformátoru?', 'fi': 'Kuinka merkityksellisiä ovat muuntajapohjaisten kielimallien valinnaiset asetukset?', 'et': 'Kui olulised on transformaatoril põhinevate keelemudelite valikueelistused?', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'כמה רלוונטים העדיפות הבחירה למודלים שפות מבוססים על מעבר?', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Kako pomembne so izbirne nastavitve za jezikovne modele, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih?', 'bo': 'འགྱུར་སྲོལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས་ལ་གདམ་པར་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅི་འདྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'Selectional preference is defined as the tendency of a predicate to favor particular arguments within a certain linguistic context, and likewise, reject others that result in conflicting or implausible meanings. The stellar success of contextual word embedding models such as BERT in NLP tasks has led many to question whether these models have learned linguistic information, but up till now, most research has focused on syntactic information. We investigate whether Bert contains information on the selectional preferences of words, by examining the probability it assigns to the dependent word given the presence of a head word in a sentence. We are using word pairs of head-dependent words in five different syntactic relations from the SP-10 K corpus of selectional preference (Zhang et al., 2019b), in sentences from the ukWaC corpus, and we are calculating the correlation of the plausibility score (from SP-10 K) and the model probabilities. Our results show that overall, there is no strong positive or negative correlation in any syntactic relation, but we do find that certain head words have a strong correlation and that masking all words but the head word yields the most positive correlations in most scenarios which indicates that the semantics of the predicate is indeed an integral and influential factor for the selection of the argument.', 'ar': 'يتم تعريف التفضيل الانتقائي على أنه ميل المسند إلى تفضيل حجج معينة ضمن سياق لغوي معين ، وبالمثل ، رفض الآخرين التي ينتج عنها معاني متضاربة أو غير معقولة. أدى النجاح الرائع لنماذج تضمين الكلمات السياقية مثل BERT في مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية إلى جعل الكثيرين يتساءلون عما إذا كانت هذه النماذج قد تعلمت معلومات لغوية ، ولكن حتى الآن ، ركزت معظم الأبحاث على المعلومات النحوية. نتحرى ما إذا كان Bert يحتوي على معلومات حول التفضيلات الانتقائية للكلمات ، من خلال فحص الاحتمال الذي يعينه للكلمة التابعة نظرًا لوجود كلمة رئيسية في الجملة. نحن نستخدم أزواج الكلمات من الكلمات المعتمدة على الرأس في خمسة علاقات نحوية مختلفة من مجموعة SP-10K للتفضيل الانتقائي (Zhang et al. ، 2019b) ، في جمل من مجموعة ukWaC ، ونحسب الارتباط بين درجة المعقولية (من SP-10K) واحتمالات النموذج. تظهر نتائجنا أنه بشكل عام ، لا يوجد ارتباط إيجابي أو سلبي قوي في أي علاقة نحوية ، لكننا نجد أن كلمات رئيسية معينة لها ارتباط قوي وأن إخفاء جميع الكلمات باستثناء الكلمة الرئيسية ينتج عنه الارتباطات الأكثر إيجابية في معظم السيناريوهات - والتي يشير إلى أن دلالات المسند هي بالفعل عامل أساسي ومؤثر في اختيار الحجة.', 'pt': 'A preferência selecional é definida como a tendência de um predicado de favorecer argumentos particulares dentro de um determinado contexto linguístico e, da mesma forma, rejeitar outros que resultem em significados conflitantes ou implausíveis. O sucesso estelar de modelos de incorporação de palavras contextuais, como BERT em tarefas de PNL, levou muitos a questionar se esses modelos aprenderam informações linguísticas, mas até agora, a maioria das pesquisas se concentrou em informações sintáticas. Investigamos se Bert contém informações sobre as preferências de seleção de palavras, examinando a probabilidade que ele atribui à palavra dependente dada a presença de uma palavra principal em uma sentença. Estamos usando pares de palavras dependentes da cabeça em cinco relações sintáticas diferentes do corpus SP-10K de preferência seletiva (Zhang et al., 2019b), em sentenças do corpus ukWaC, e estamos calculando a correlação da pontuação de plausibilidade (do SP-10K) e as probabilidades do modelo. Nossos resultados mostram que, em geral, não há forte correlação positiva ou negativa em qualquer relação sintática, mas descobrimos que certas palavras principais têm uma correlação forte e que mascarar todas as palavras, exceto a palavra principal, produz as correlações mais positivas na maioria dos cenários - o que indica que a semântica do predicado é de fato um fator integrante e influente para a seleção do argumento.', 'fr': "La préférence sélective est définie comme la tendance d'un prédicat à privilégier des arguments particuliers dans un certain contexte linguistique, et à rejeter d'autres arguments qui donnent lieu à des significations contradictoires ou invraisemblables. Le succès remarquable des modèles d'intégration de mots contextuels tels que BERT dans les tâches de PNL a conduit beaucoup de personnes à se demander si ces modèles ont appris des informations linguistiques, mais jusqu'à présent, la plupart des recherches se sont concentrées sur les informations syntaxiques. Nous cherchons à savoir si Bert contient des informations sur les préférences de sélection des mots, en examinant la probabilité qu'il attribue au mot dépendant compte tenu de la présence d'un mot principal dans une phrase. Nous utilisons des paires de mots de mots dépendants de la tête dans cinq relations syntaxiques différentes du corpus SP-10K de préférence sélective (Zhang et al., 2019b), dans des phrases du corpus ukWAC, et nous calculons la corrélation entre le score de plausibilité (à partir de SP-10K) et les probabilités du modèle. Nos résultats montrent que dans l'ensemble, il n'y a pas de forte corrélation positive ou négative dans aucune relation syntaxique, mais nous trouvons que certains mots principaux présentent une forte corrélation et que le masquage de tous les mots sauf le mot principal produit les corrélations les plus positives dans la plupart des scénarios, ce qui indique que la sémantique de le prédicat est en effet un facteur intégral et influent pour le choix de l'argument.", 'es': 'La preferencia selectiva se define como la tendencia de un predicado a favorecer argumentos particulares dentro de un determinado contexto lingüístico y, de la misma manera, rechazar otros que resulten en significados contradictorios o inverosímiles. El éxito estelar de los modelos de incrustación de palabras contextuales como BERT en las tareas de PNL ha llevado a muchos a preguntarse si estos modelos han aprendido información lingüística, pero hasta ahora, la mayoría de las investigaciones se han centrado en la información sintáctica. Investigamos si Bert contiene información sobre las preferencias de selección de las palabras, examinando la probabilidad que asigna a la palabra dependiente dada la presencia de una palabra principal en una oración. Estamos utilizando pares de palabras dependientes de la cabeza en cinco relaciones sintácticas diferentes del corpus SP-10K de preferencia selectiva (Zhang et al., 2019b), en oraciones del corpus de UKWac, y estamos calculando la correlación de la puntuación de plausibilidad (de SP-10K) y las probabilidades del modelo. Nuestros resultados muestran que, en general, no hay una fuerte correlación positiva o negativa en ninguna relación sintáctica, pero sí encontramos que ciertas palabras principales tienen una fuerte correlación y que enmascarar todas las palabras excepto la palabra principal produce las correlaciones más positivas en la mayoría de los escenarios, lo que indica que la semántica de el predicado es, de hecho, un factor integral e influyente para la selección del argumento.', 'ja': '選択的嗜好は、特定の言語的文脈内で特定の論点を好み、同様に、矛盾したまたは不可解な意味をもたらす他の論点を拒否する述語の傾向として定義される。 NLPタスクにおけるBERTのような文脈的な単語埋め込みモデルの素晴らしい成功は、これらのモデルが言語情報を学習したかどうかを疑問視する多くの人々を導いてきたが、これまでほとんどの研究は構文情報に焦点を当ててきた。 BERTが単語の選択的嗜好に関する情報を含んでいるかどうかを調べるために、文中に語頭があることを考慮して、それが依存語に割り当てられる確率を調べます。 我々は、選択嗜好のSP -10 Kコーパス（ Zhang et al., 2019 b ）からの5つの異なる構文関係で、ukWaCコーパスからの文章で頭依存の単語ペアを使用しており、（ SP -10 Kからの）妥当性スコアとモデル確率の相関を計算しています。 私たちの結果は、全体的に、どの構文関係にも強い正または負の相関はないことを示していますが、特定の語頭には強い相関があり、語頭を除くすべての語をマスキングすると、ほとんどのシナリオで最も正の相関が得られることを発見しました。これは、述語の意味論が、引数の選択のための統合的で影響力のある要素であることを示しています。', 'hi': 'चयनात्मक वरीयता को एक निश्चित भाषाई संदर्भ के भीतर विशेष तर्कों का पक्ष लेने के लिए एक विधेय की प्रवृत्ति के रूप में परिभाषित किया गया है, और इसी तरह, दूसरों को अस्वीकार करते हैं जिनके परिणामस्वरूप परस्पर विरोधी या अकल्पनीय अर्थ होते हैं। एनएलपी कार्यों में BERT जैसे प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल की तारकीय सफलता ने कई लोगों को यह सवाल करने के लिए प्रेरित किया है कि क्या इन मॉडलों ने भाषाई जानकारी सीखी है, लेकिन अब तक, अधिकांश शोध ने वाक्यात्मक जानकारी पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या बर्ट में शब्दों की चयनात्मक प्राथमिकताओं के बारे में जानकारी है, एक वाक्य में एक सिर शब्द की उपस्थिति को देखते हुए निर्भर शब्द को असाइन करने की संभावना की जांच करके। हम चयनात्मक वरीयता के एसपी -10के कॉर्पस (झांग एट अल. 2019 बी) से पांच अलग-अलग वाक्यात्मक संबंधों में सिर-निर्भर शब्दों के शब्द जोड़े का उपयोग कर रहे हैं, यूकेडब्ल्यूएसी कॉर्पस से वाक्यों में, और हम plausibility स्कोर (एसपी -10K से) और मॉडल संभावनाओं के सहसंबंध की गणना कर रहे हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि कुल मिलाकर, किसी भी वाक्यात्मक संबंध में कोई मजबूत सकारात्मक या नकारात्मक सहसंबंध नहीं है, लेकिन हम पाते हैं कि कुछ सिर के शब्दों में एक मजबूत सहसंबंध है और यह कि सभी शब्दों को मुखौटा करना लेकिन सिर शब्द अधिकांश परिदृश्यों में सबसे सकारात्मक सहसंबंध उत्पन्न करता है - जो इंगित करता है कि विधेय का शब्दार्थ वास्तव में तर्क के चयन के लिए एक अभिन्न और प्रभावशाली कारक है।', 'zh': '择偏好定义为谓词向特定言语上下文中持特定论,并拒冲突、不可信者。 上下文词嵌模型(如BERT)NLP事成功致多质疑者,已习言语信息,至于目前为止,多集句法息。 检Bert句中有头单词,分付凭单词概率Bert含单词择偏信。 吾于择偏SP-10K语料库(Zhang等,2019b)五者句法用头赖词之单词,于ukWaC语料库之句,吾方计合理性分数(SP-10K)与模形概率之相关性。 吾之的结果表明,总体而言无强句法负相关,然吾实见头单词之强相关性,而众多者,自头单词之外,掩单词而生至正 - 明谓词之语义,诚择其一体而染其素也。', 'ru': 'Селективное предпочтение определяется как склонность предиката отдавать предпочтение определенным аргументам в определенном лингвистическом контексте, а также отвергать другие, которые приводят к противоречивым или неправдоподобным значениям. Звездный успех моделей контекстного встраивания слов, таких как BERT в задачах NLP, заставил многих задаться вопросом, изучили ли эти модели лингвистическую информацию, но до сих пор большинство исследований было сосредоточено на синтаксической информации. Мы исследуем, содержит ли Берт информацию о выборочных предпочтениях слов, изучая вероятность, которую он присваивает зависимому слову, учитывая наличие в предложении главного слова. Мы используем пары слов, зависящих от головы, в пяти различных синтаксических отношениях из корпуса избирательных предпочтений SP-10K (Zhang et al., 2019b), в предложениях из корпуса ukWaC, и рассчитываем корреляцию оценки правдоподобия (из SP-10K) и вероятностей модели. Наши результаты показывают, что в целом нет сильной положительной или отрицательной корреляции в каком-либо синтаксическом отношении, но мы обнаруживаем, что определенные слова в начале имеют сильную корреляцию и что маскировка всех слов, кроме слова в начале, дает наиболее положительные корреляции в большинстве сценариев, что указывает на то, что семантика предиката действительно является неотъемлемым и влиятельным фактором для выбора аргумента.', 'ga': 'Sainmhínítear tosaíocht roghnach mar an claonadh atá ag tuar i bhfabhar argóintí ar leith laistigh de chomhthéacs áirithe teanga, agus mar an gcéanna, diúltú do chinn eile a mbíonn bríonna contrártha nó dochloíte mar thoradh orthu. Mar gheall ar an rath a bhí ar mhúnlaí leabú comhthéacsúla focal ar nós BERT i dtascanna NLP, tá go leor daoine ag ceistiú an bhfuil eolas teanga foghlamtha ag na samhlacha seo, ach go dtí seo, dhírigh an chuid is mó den taighde ar fhaisnéis chomhréire. Fiosróimid an bhfuil faisnéis ag Bert ar roghanna roghnaithe focal, trí scrúdú a dhéanamh ar an dóchúlacht a sannann sé don fhocal spleách nuair a thugtar ceannfhocal in abairt. Táimid ag baint úsáide as péirí focal focal ceannspleách i gcúig chaidreamh comhréire difriúla ó chorpas tosaíochta an SP-10K (Zhang et al., 2019b), in abairtí ó chorpas ukWaC, agus táimid ag ríomh comhghaolú an scór sochreidteachta. (ó SP-10K) agus na dóchúlachtaí múnla. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí, ar an iomlán, nach bhfuil aon chomhghaol láidir dearfach nó diúltach in aon choibhneas comhréire, ach feicimid go bhfuil comhghaol láidir ag ceannfhocail áirithe agus go dtagann na comhghaolta is dearfaí sa chuid is mó de chásanna trí gach focal a cheilt ach an ceannfhocal – a léiríonn sé go bhfuil séimeantaic an tuar ina fhachtóir lárnach agus tionchar i roghnú na hargóine.', 'el': 'Επιλεκτική προτίμηση ορίζεται ως η τάση ενός προδιάγματος να ευνοεί συγκεκριμένα επιχειρήματα μέσα σε ένα συγκεκριμένο γλωσσικό πλαίσιο και, επίσης, να απορρίπτει άλλα που έχουν ως αποτέλεσμα αντικρουόμενες ή απίθανες έννοιες. Η αστρική επιτυχία των μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων στο πλαίσιο, όπως το BERT σε εργασίες έχει οδηγήσει πολλούς να αναρωτηθούν αν αυτά τα μοντέλα έχουν μάθει γλωσσικές πληροφορίες, αλλά μέχρι τώρα, η περισσότερη έρευνα έχει επικεντρωθεί στις συντακτικές πληροφορίες. Ερευνούμε αν ο Μπερτ περιέχει πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις επιλεκτικές προτιμήσεις των λέξεων, εξετάζοντας την πιθανότητα που αποδίδει στην εξαρτώμενη λέξη δεδομένης της παρουσίας μιας επικεφαλής λέξης σε μια πρόταση. Χρησιμοποιούμε ζεύγη λέξεων εξαρτημένων από το κεφάλι λέξεων σε πέντε διαφορετικές συντακτικές σχέσεις από το σώμα επιλεκτικής προτίμησης SP-10Κ (κ.α., 2019β), σε προτάσεις από το σώμα και υπολογίζουμε τη συσχέτιση της βαθμολογίας αξιοπιστίας (από το SP-10Κ) και των πιθανοτήτων μοντέλου. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι συνολικά, δεν υπάρχει ισχυρή θετική ή αρνητική συσχέτιση σε οποιαδήποτε συντακτική σχέση, Αλλά διαπιστώνουμε ότι ορισμένες κεφαλαιακές λέξεις έχουν ισχυρή συσχέτιση και ότι η απόκρυψη όλων των λέξεων αλλά η κεφαλαιακή λέξη δίνει τους πιο θετικούς συσχετισμούς στα περισσότερα σενάρια -γεγονός που δείχνει ότι η σημασιολογία του προδιάγματος είναι πράγματι ένας ακέραιος και σημαντικός παράγοντας για την επιλογή του επιχειρήματος.', 'ka': 'მონიშნული მონიშნულება განსაზღვრებულია როგორც პრედიკატის რენდენცია განსაზღვრებული არგუმენტების გასაკეთებლად განსაზღვრებული ენგუმენტიკური კონტექსტში, და ასე იგივეა, რომ სხვები, რომლებ კონტექსტური სიტყვების წარმატები, როგორც BERT NLP დავალებში, უფრო დიდი მოდელეები გაუკითხვა თუ ეს მოდელეები ინფორმაციის შესწავლია თუ არა, მაგრამ ახლა უფრო მეტი შესწავლია სინტაქტიული ჩვენ განსხვავებთ თუ ბერტის სიტყვების მონიშვნების შესახებ ინფორმაციის შესახებ, რომელიც შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც დააყენებს დამხოლოდ სიტყვების შესახებ, რომელიც საკუთარი სი ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სიტყვების კომპუსი ukWaC კომპუსის სიტყვების კომპუსი SP-10K კომპუსის განსხვავებული სინტაქტიკური შესახებ (Zhang et al., 2019b), და ჩვენ გამოყენებთ კომპუსის კომპუსის შესახებ და მოდელური შესაძლებლობების კორელეციას ჩვენი წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ საუკეთესოდ არ არის ძალიან პოტიფიკაციური ან negatifური კორელაციაში, მაგრამ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ განსაკუთრებული სიტყვები აქვს ძალიან კორელაცია და მაქსირება ყველა სიტყვები, მაგრამ დლავის სიტყვები უფრო პოციტური კორელაციების უფრო დიდი სინარიოში იქნება, რომელიც მინდა, რომ პრედიკატის სი', 'hu': 'A szelekciós preferenciát úgy határozzák meg, hogy egy predikátum egy bizonyos nyelvi kontextusban előnyben részesít bizonyos érveket, és hasonlóképpen elutasít másokat, amelyek ellentmondásos vagy valószínűtlen jelentéseket eredményeznek. Az olyan kontextuális szavak beágyazásának csillagos sikere, mint a BERT az NLP feladatokba, sokan arra kérdezték, hogy ezek a modellek tanultak-e nyelvi információkat, de eddig a legtöbb kutatás a szintaktikus információra összpontosított. Megvizsgáljuk, hogy Bert tartalmaz-e információt a szavak kiválasztási preferenciáiról, megvizsgálva, milyen valószínűséggel rendelkezik a függő szóhoz, tekintettel arra, hogy egy mondatban egy fejszó jelenlétére. Fejfüggő szavak szópárjait használjuk az SP-10K szelekciós preferencia korpuszából (Zhang et al., 2019b) öt különböző szintaktikai kapcsolatban, az ukWac korpuszból származó mondatokban, és kiszámítjuk a valószínűségi pontszám (SP-10K) és a modell valószínűségeinek korrelációját. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy összességében nincs erős pozitív vagy negatív korreláció semmilyen szintaktikus kapcsolatban, De azt találjuk, hogy bizonyos fejszavak erős korrelációval rendelkeznek, és hogy a fejszó kivételével a legtöbb forgatókönyvben a legpozitívabb korrelációt eredményezi - ami azt jelzi, hogy a predikátus szemantikája valóban integrált és befolyásos tényező az érv kiválasztásában.', 'it': "La preferenza selettiva è definita come la tendenza di un predicato a favorire argomenti particolari all'interno di un determinato contesto linguistico, e allo stesso modo, rifiutare altri che sfociano in significati contrastanti o implausibili. Il successo stellare di modelli contestuali di incorporazione di parole come BERT nelle attività NLP ha portato molti a chiedersi se questi modelli abbiano imparato informazioni linguistiche, ma finora la maggior parte della ricerca si è concentrata sull'informazione sintattica. Investighiamo se Bert contiene informazioni sulle preferenze selettive delle parole, esaminando la probabilità che assegna alla parola dipendente data la presenza di una parola principale in una frase. Stiamo usando coppie di parole dipendenti dalla testa in cinque diverse relazioni sintattiche dal corpus SP-10K di preferenza selettiva (Zhang et al., 2019b), in frasi dal corpus ukWac, e stiamo calcolando la correlazione tra il punteggio di plausibilità (da SP-10K) e le probabilità del modello. I nostri risultati mostrano che nel complesso, non c'è una forte correlazione positiva o negativa in qualsiasi relazione sintattica, Ma troviamo che certe parole principali hanno una forte correlazione e che mascherare tutte le parole tranne la parola principale produce le correlazioni più positive nella maggior parte degli scenari -che indica che la semantica del predicato è effettivamente un fattore integrale e influente per la selezione dell'argomento.", 'lt': 'Selectional preference is defined as the tendency of a predicate to favor particular arguments within a certain linguistic context, and likewise, reject others that result in conflicting or implausible meanings.  Didžioji kontekstinių žodžių įtraukimo modelių, pavyzdžiui, BERT, sėkmė NLP užduotyse paskatino daugelį abejoti, ar šie modeliai išmoko kalbinę informaciją, tačiau iki šiol dauguma mokslinių tyrimų daugiausia dėmesio skiria sintetinei informacijai. We investigate whether Bert contains information on the selectional preferences of words, by examining the probability it assigns to the dependent word given the presence of a head word in a sentence.  Naudojame žodžių poras nuo galvos priklausančių žodžių penkiuose skirtinguose sintaktiniuose santykiuose nuo selektyvinio pirmenybės SP-10K korpuso (Zhang et al., 2019b), sakiniuose iš ukWaC corpus, ir apskaičiuojame patikimumo rezultato (iš SP-10K) ir modelio tikimybės koreliaciją. Our results show that overall, there is no strong positive or negative correlation in any syntactic relation, Tačiau mes suprantame, kad kai kurie galvos žodžiai turi tvirtą koreliaciją ir kad maskuojant visus žodžius, bet galvos žodis duoda teigiamiausias koreliacijas daugelyje scenarijų - tai rodo, kad predikato semantika iš tiesų yra neatsiejamas ir įtakingas veiksnys pasirinkant argument ą.', 'ms': 'Keutamaan pemilihan ditakrif sebagai kecenderungan predikat untuk menyokong argumen tertentu dalam konteks bahasa tertentu, dan juga, menolak yang lain yang mengakibatkan makna yang berkonflik atau tidak boleh dipercayai. Keberjalan bintang bagi model penyembelihan perkataan kontekstual seperti BERT dalam tugas NLP telah membawa ramai untuk bertanya-tanya sama ada model ini telah belajar maklumat bahasa, tetapi sehingga sekarang, kebanyakan kajian telah fokus pada maklumat sintaktik. Kami menyelidiki sama ada Bert mengandungi maklumat mengenai keutamaan pemilihan perkataan, dengan memeriksa kemungkinan ia ditugaskan kepada perkataan bergantung diberikan kehadiran perkataan kepala dalam satu kalimat. Kami menggunakan perkataan pasangan perkataan bergantung kepala dalam lima hubungan sintaktik berbeza dari SP-10K corpus keutamaan pemilihan (Zhang et al., 2019b), dalam kalimat dari ukWaC corpus, dan kami menghitung korelasi skor kemungkinan (dari SP-10K) dan kemungkinan model. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa secara keseluruhan, tiada korelasi positif atau negatif kuat dalam mana-mana hubungan sintaktik, Tetapi kita mendapati bahawa kata-kata kepala tertentu mempunyai korelasi yang kuat dan bahawa topeng semua perkataan tetapi perkataan kepala memberikan korelasi yang paling positif dalam kebanyakan skenario - yang menunjukkan bahawa semantik predikat adalah benar-benar faktor integral dan pengaruh untuk pemilihan argumen.', 'mk': 'Селекционалната преференција е дефинирана како тенденција на предикатот да се поддржува одредени аргументи во одреден јазички контекст, и исто така, да се отфрлат други кои резултираат со конфликтни или неверојатни значења. The stellar success of contextual word embedding models such as BERT in NLP tasks has led many to question whether these models have learned linguistic information, but up till now, most research has focused on syntactic information.  Истражуваме дали Берт содржи информации за селекционалните преференции на зборовите, со испитување на веројатноста што ја доделува на зависниот збор со оглед на присуството на главниот збор во реченица. We are using word pairs of head-dependent words in five different syntactic relations from the SP-10K corpus of selectional preference (Zhang et al., 2019b), in sentences from the ukWaC corpus, and we are calculating the correlation of the plausibility score (from SP-10K) and the model probabilities.  Нашите резултати покажуваат дека целосно, нема силна позитивна или негативна корелација во било која синтактичка врска, Но откриваме дека одредени главни зборови имаат силна корелација и дека маскирањето на сите зборови но главниот збор дава најпозитивни корелации во повеќето сценарија - што индицира дека семантиката на предикатот е навистина интегрален и влијателен фактор за изборот на аргументот.', 'mt': 'Il-preferenza selettiva hija ddefinita bħala t-tendenza ta’ predikat li jiffavorixxi argumenti partikolari f’ċertu kuntest lingwistiku, u bl-istess mod, jirrifjuta oħrajn li jirriżultaw f’tifsiriet konfliġġenti jew mhux affidabbli. Is-suċċess stellari tal-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem kuntestwali bħall-BERT fil-kompiti tal-NLP wassal għal ħafna dubji dwar jekk dawn il-mudelli għallux informazzjoni lingwistika, iżda s’issa, il-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka ffukat fuq informazzjoni sintattika. Aħna ninvestigaw jekk Bert għandux informazzjoni dwar il-preferenzi selettivi tal-kliem, billi teżamina l-probabbiltà li tassenja lill-kelma dipendenti minħabba l-preżenza ta’ kelma ewlenija f’sentenza. Qed nużaw pari ta’ kliem dipendenti fuq ir-ras f’ħames relazzjonijiet sintattiċi differenti mill-SP-10K corpus ta’ preferenza selettiva (Zhang et al., 2019b), f’sentenzi mill-ukWaC corpus, u qegħdin nikkalkulaw il-korrelazzjoni tal-punteġġ tal-plawżibbiltà (minn SP-10K) u l-probabbiltà tal-mudell. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li b’mod ġenerali, ma hemm l-ebda korrelazzjoni pożittiva jew negattiva qawwija fi kwalunkwe relazzjoni sintattika, Iżda jsibu li ċerti kliem tar-ras għandhom korrelazzjoni qawwija u li l-għassa tal-kliem kollu iżda l-kelma tar-ras tagħti l-aktar korrelazzjonijiet pożittivi fil-biċċa l-kbira tax-xenarji - li jindika li s-semantika tal-predikat hija tabilħaqq fattur integrali u influwenti għall-għa żla tal-argument.', 'ml': 'തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dഗണന വ്യക്തമായ ഒരു ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രേരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ സ്വഭാവം എന്നാണ് വ്യക്തമാക് NLP ജോലികളിലെ BERT പോലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്റ്റെല്ലാ വിജയത്തിന്റെ സ്റ്റെല്ലാ വിജയത്തിന്റെ വിജയത്തിലാണ് ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിച്ചത്, പക് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ വാക്കുകളുടെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടോ എന്ന് നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കില ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എസ്പി-10K വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മുന്\u200dഗണന കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും അഞ്ച് വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. യുക്വാസി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും വിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും സം നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു എന്തെങ്കിലും സാങ്കേതിക ബന്ധത്തില്\u200d ശക്തമായ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d നേ പക്ഷെ ചില വാക്കുകള്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ബന്ധമുണ്ടെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. എന്നാല്\u200d എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളെയും മുഖം മൂടുന്നു. പക്ഷെ തലയുടെ വാക്ക് മിക്കവാറുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും സാധാരണ ബന്ധങ', 'pl': 'Preferencja selekcyjna definiowana jest jako tendencja predykatu do faworyzowania konkretnych argumentów w określonym kontekście językowym, a także odrzucenia innych, które skutkują sprzecznymi lub niewiarygodnymi znaczeniami. Gwiezdny sukces kontekstowych modeli osadzania słów, takich jak BERT w zadaniach NLP, doprowadził wielu do kwestii, czy te modele nauczyły się informacji językowych, ale do tej pory większość badań skupiała się na informacjach składniowych. Badamy, czy Bert zawiera informacje o preferencjach selekcyjnych słów, badając prawdopodobieństwo, jakie przypisuje słowu zależnemu, biorąc pod uwagę obecność słowa głównego w zdaniu. Używamy par słownych słów zależnych od głowy w pięciu różnych relacjach składniowych z korpusu preferencji selekcyjnych SP-10K (Zhang et al., 2019b), w zdaniach z korpusu ukWaC oraz obliczamy korelację wyniku wiarygodności (od SP-10K) i prawdopodobieństw modelu. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że ogólnie rzecz biorąc, nie ma silnej pozytywnej lub negatywnej korelacji w jakiejkolwiek relacji składni, Ale okazujemy się, że niektóre słowa główne mają silną korelację i że maskowanie wszystkich słów, ale słowo główne daje najbardziej pozytywne korelacje w większości scenariuszy -co wskazuje, że semantyka predykatu jest rzeczywiście integralnym i wpływowym czynnikiem dla wyboru argumentu.', 'ro': 'Preferința selecțională este definită ca tendința unui predicat de a favoriza anumite argumente într-un anumit context lingvistic și, de asemenea, de a respinge alte argumente care duc la înțelesuri contradictorii sau implauzibile. Succesul stelar al modelelor contextuale de încorporare a cuvintelor, cum ar fi BERT în sarcinile PNL, i-a determinat pe mulți să se întrebe dacă aceste modele au învățat informații lingvistice, dar până în prezent, majoritatea cercetărilor s-au concentrat pe informații sintactice. Investigăm dacă Bert conține informații despre preferințele selecționale ale cuvintelor, examinând probabilitatea atribuită cuvântului dependent având în vedere prezența unui cuvânt cap într-o propoziție. Folosim perechi de cuvinte de cuvinte dependente de cap în cinci relații sintactice diferite din corpul SP-10K de preferință selecțională (Zhang et al., 2019b), în propoziții din corpul ukWac și calculăm corelația scorului de plauzibilitate (din SP-10K) și probabilitățile modelului. Rezultatele noastre arată că, în general, nu există o corelație puternică pozitivă sau negativă în nicio relație sintactică, Dar descoperim că anumite cuvinte cap au o corelație puternică și că mascarea tuturor cuvintelor dar cuvântul cap produce cele mai pozitive corelații în majoritatea scenariilor -ceea ce indică faptul că semantica predicatului este într-adevăr un factor integral și influent pentru selectarea argumentului.', 'sr': 'Izabračna preferencija je definisana kao tendencija predikata za uslugu određenih argumenata u određenom lingvističkom kontekstu, i is to tako odbacuje druge koji rezultuju sukobe ili neplašnim smislama. Zvezdani uspeh kontekstualnih reči uključujući modele kao što su BERT u NLP zadatke doveli do pitanja da li su ovi modeli naučili jezičke informacije, ali do sada većina istraživanja se fokusirala na sintaktičke informacije. Istražujemo da li Bert sadrži informacije o selektivnim preferencijama reči, pregledajući verovatnoću koju daje zavisnoj reči s obzirom na prisustvo glavne reči u rečenici. Koristimo riječi par riječi ovisnih o glavi u pet različitih sintaktičkih odnosa od korpusa SP-10K selektivne preferencije (Zhang et al., 2019b), u rečenicama od korpusa ukWaC, i izračunamo korelaciju rezultata uvjerljivosti (od SP-10K) i modelnih verovatnosti. Naši rezultati pokazuju da uopšte nema jake pozitivne ili negativne korelacije u bilo kojoj sintaktičkoj vezi, Ali našli smo da određene glavne reči imaju jaku korelaciju i da maskiraju sve reči, ali glavna reč daje najpozitivnije korelacije u većini scenarija, što ukazuje na to da je semantika predikata zaista integralna i utjecajna faktora za izbor argument a.', 'kk': 'Таңдау параметрлері бір лингвистикалық контексті аргументтердің көбірек аргументтеріне көбірек аргументтердің тенденциясы ретінде анықталды, сондай-ақ басқаларды қайшылық немесе бұл аргументтердің көбірек болуын қа NLP тапсырмаларында BERT секілді контекстуалды сөздерді ендіру үлгілерінің жұлдыздық сәттілігі, бұл үлгілер лингвистикалық мәліметті үйренген пе, бірақ қазірше көпшілігі зерттеу синтактикалық Біз Берт сөздердің таңдау параметрлері туралы мәліметті тексеріп, сөздердің басы сөздерінің барлығын тексеріп тұрып тұрған маңыздылығын тексеріп береміз. Біз таңдау қасиеттерінің SP-10K корпус (Zhang et al., 2019b) бес әртүрлі синтактикалық қатынастарында сөздердің екі сөзді қолданып тұрамыз. Біз ukWaC корпус сөздерінің бес әртүрлі синтактикалық қатынастарын (SP-10K) және үлгі ықтималдықтарын есептеп тұрмыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз жалпы синтактикалық қатынасда күшті оң не негативті қатынас жоқ дегенді көрсетеді. Бірақ біз басындағы сөздердің көбірек қатынасы бар деп ойлаймыз. Бұл сөздердің барлық сөздерін қалқалау және басындағы сөздердің көбірек сценарияларындағы ең оң жақсы қатынасы бар деп ойлаймыз. Бұл аргументтің таңдау үшін симантикалық', 'so': 'Horumarinta doorashada waxaa loo yaqaan dabeecada qofka la doortay inuu ku raadiyo arrimaha gaarka ah oo ku qoran qoraalka luuqadaha, sidoo kale ka diido kuwa kale oo sababto warqadda ama waxyaabaha aan la fali karin. Liibadii guud ee hadalka ku qoran modellada sida BERT-ka shaqooyinka NLP waxaa sababtay kuwo badan inay wax weydiinaan in modelladan ay barteen macluumaadka luuqadda, laakiin tan iyo hada, wax badan baaritaankoodu waxay focus ku leedahay macluumaad la xiriira. Waxaynu baaraynaa in Bert ku jirto macluumaad ku saabsan doorashada hadallada, baaritaanka suurtagalka uu u dhiganayo hadalka ku xiran ee uu ku qorayo hadal madax ah. Waxaynu isticmaalaynaa hadal labo ah oo madax ku xiran ah shan xiriir oo kala duduwan oo SP-10K korpus doorashada (Zhang et al., 2019b), xukunka ka soo baxay korpuska UWaC, waxaana xisaabnaynaa xiriirka kooxda saxda dulsaarka (SP-10K) iyo suurtagalka modelka. Our results show that overall, there is no strong positive or negative correlation in any syntactic relation, laakin waxaan helnaa in erayo qaarkood ay leeyihiin xiriir xoog leh iyo in uu baroorto hadal oo dhan, laakiin hadalka madaxu wuxuu keenaa xiriir aad u wanaagsan oo ka mid ah xukunka xaaladaha badan - taasoo caddaynaya in qofka la doorto ay tahay mid saamayn oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Selektiv preferens definieras som en predikats tendens att gynna särskilda argument inom en viss språklig kontext, och likaså avvisa andra som resulterar i motstridiga eller osannolika betydelser. Den stora framgången med kontextuella ordinbäddningsmodeller som BERT i NLP-uppgifter har lett många till att ifrågasätta om dessa modeller har lärt sig språklig information, men hittills har den mesta forskningen fokuserat på syntaktisk information. Vi undersöker om Bert innehåller information om ordens selektiva preferenser genom att undersöka sannolikheten det tilldelar det beroende ordet med tanke på förekomsten av ett huvudord i en mening. Vi använder ordpar av huvud-beroende ord i fem olika syntaktiska relationer från SP-10K korpus av selektiv preferens (Zhang et al., 2019b), i meningar från ukWac korpus, och vi beräknar korrelationen mellan sannolikhetspoäng (från SP-10K) och modellsannolikheter. Våra resultat visar att det totalt sett inte finns någon stark positiv eller negativ korrelation i någon syntaktisk relation, men vi finner att vissa huvudord har en stark korrelation och att maskering av alla ord men huvudordet ger de mest positiva korrelationerna i de flesta scenarier -vilket indikerar att semantiken i predikatet verkligen är en integrerad och inflytelserik faktor för valet av argument.', 'ta': 'தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட முன்னுரிமை ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிக்கூற்றில் குறிப்பிட்ட துருப்புகளை ஆதரிக்கும் முன்னேற்றத்தின் வித NLP பணிகளில் BERT போன்ற தற்போதைய வார்த்தையில் உள்ள மாதிரியின் வெற்றிகரமான வெற்றி பெர்ட் வாக்கியத்தில் ஒரு தலைப்பு வார்த்தையின் இருப்பது சார்ந்த சார்ந்த சார்ந்த சார்ந்த வார்த்தையை பரிசோதிக்கிறோமா என் நாங்கள் வார்த்தை ஜோடி சார்ந்த சொல்லை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் SP-10K வித்தியாசமான தேர்வுகளில் இருந்து தேர்வு முன்னுரிமையில் இருந்து (Zhang et al., 2019b) வாக்கியங்களில் இருந்து, நாம் வாக்கியங்களி Our results show that overall, there is no strong positive or negative correlation in any syntactic relation, ஆனால் சில தலைப்பு வார்த்தைகள் ஒரு வலிமையான இணைப்பு இருக்கிறது மற்றும் அனைத்து வார்த்தைகளையும் மூடுவது என்று நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். ஆனால் தலைப்பு சொல்லில் அதிக நேர்', 'no': 'Veljarleg innstillingar er definert som tendensen til ein predikat for å gjera spesielle argumenter i ein viss lingvisk kontekst, og likevel avviser andre som resulterer i konflikt eller ikkje-klarleg meningar. Det stjerne suksessen av kontekstiske ord innebyggende modeller, som BERT i NLP- oppgåver, har ført mange til å spørja om desse modelane har lært lingvisk informasjon, men opp til nå har de fleste forskningar fokusert på syntaktiske informasjon. Vi undersøker om Bert inneheld informasjon om utvalsinnstillingane for ord, ved å undersøke sannsynligheten han tilbyr til den avhengige ordet gjeven at det finst ei hovudord i eit setning. Vi bruker ordpar med hovudavhengige ord i fem ulike syntaktiske forhold frå SP-10K-korpusen av selektive innstillingar (Zhang et al., 2019b), i setningar frå ukWaC-korpusen, og vi reknar ut korrelasjonen av opplysningspoeng (frå SP-10K) og sannsynlege modellen. Resultatet våre viser at overalt det er ingen sterk positiv eller negativ korrelasjon i nokon syntaksisk relasjon, Men vi finn at nokre hovudord har ein sterk korrelasjon og at maskerer alle ord, men hovudordet gir dei mest positivste korrelasjonane i dei fleste scenarioane. Dette viser at semantikkane av predikaten er faktisk ein integral og påvirkande faktor for utvalet av argument.', 'ur': 'انتخاب کی ترجیح ایک مختلف دلیل کے لئے ایک مختلف دلیل کے مطابق مقرر کیا گیا ہے اور اسی طرح دوسرے لوگوں کو جھگڑنے یا ناپسندیدہ معنی کے نتیجہ سے انکار کرتے ہیں۔ ان کی مطابقتوں میں BERT کی مطابقتوں میں بہت سی موڈل سے سوال کرنے کے لئے سبب ہے کہ یہ موڈل زبان شناسی معلومات کی تعلیم لے چکے ہیں، لیکن اب تک اکثر تحقیق سینٹکتیک معلومات پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے. ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ برٹ کلمات کے منتخب ترجیح کے بارے میں اطلاعات رکھتی ہے، اس کی امید کی تحقیق کرتی ہے کہ اس نے ایک کلمات میں ایک سر کلمات کی موجود ہوتی ہے۔ ہم کلمات کے جوڑوں کو استعمال کر رہے ہیں ان کے پینچ مختلف سینٹکتیک ارتباط میں جو SP-10K کی کرپوس سے گزینے کی ترجیح کے (Zhang et al., 2019b) کے کلمات میں اکوک کی کورپوس کے مطابق ہیں، اور ہم یقین کرنے والی اسکور (SP-10K سے) اور موڈل کی امکانات کا ارتباط حساب کر رہے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ کل، کسی سینٹکتیک ارتباط میں کوئی قوی مثبت یا منفی ارتباط نہیں ہے، لیکن ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ بعض سر کلمات مضبوط تعلق ہے اور یہ تمام کلمات کو پوشیدہ کرتا ہے لیکن سر کلمات کی تعلق بہت سی سیناریوں میں بہت مثبت تعلق دیتا ہے جو نشان دیتا ہے کہ مخلوقات کی تعلق یقیناً ایک اثبات اور اثبات تعلق ہے', 'mn': 'Шинэ сонголтын сонголт нь тодорхой хэлний тухайд тодорхой аргументуудыг дэмжихийн тулд тодорхой аргументуудыг тодорхойлж чаддаг. Мөн адилхан, зөрчилдөөн эсвэл тодорхойлж чаддаггүй аргументуудыг бусад хүмүүс НЛП даалгаврын BERT мэт орчин үеийн оддын амжилт нь олон загварууд хэлний мэдээлэл суралцаж байгааг асуудаг. Гэхдээ одоо хүртэл ихэнх судалгаа синтактик мэдээлэл дээр төвлөрсөн. Бид Берт үгийн сонголтын сонголтын сонголтын тухай мэдээллийг агуулж байгаа эсэхийг судалж өгүүлбэл, үүнийх магадлалтай үгийг шалгаж өгсөн. Бид сонголтын сонголтын сонголтын SP-10K корпус (Zhang et al., 2019b) дээрх таван өөр синтактикийн харилцаанд толгойд хамааралтай үгнүүдийг ашиглаж байна. Бид УкВАК корпус дахь өгүүлбэрээр итгэлтэй тооны харилцааныг (SP-10K) болон загварын магадлалыг тооцож байна. Бидний үр дүнд ямар ч синтактик харилцаанд эерэг эсвэл сөрөг харилцаа байхгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бид зарим толгой үгнүүд хүчтэй холбоотой гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Гэхдээ толгой үг нь ихэнх хувилбарт хамгийн эерэг холбоотой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь аргументын сонголтын үр дүнг нь үнэндээ бүрэн, нөлөөлдөг хүчин зүйл юм.', 'si': 'විශේෂ භාෂාවික සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ ව සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් වලින් BERT වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙනවා මේ මොඩේල් භාෂාවික තොරතුරු ඉගෙන ගත්ත අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා බෙර්ට්ට් වචනයේ තෝරාගන්න තොරතුරු තියෙන්නේ නැද්ද කියලා, වචනයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වචනය පරීක්ෂණ අපි වෙනස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වචන වචනය පාවිච්චි කරනවා SP-10K කෝර්පුස් වලින් වෙනස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වලින් වචන වචනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා (Zang et al., 2019b), ukWaC කෝර්පුස් වලින් වචන වචන වචන අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධයක් නැහැ කියලා, ඒත් අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වචනයක් තියෙනවා සම්බන්ධ වචනයක් සම්බන්ධ වචනයක් තියෙනවා ඒත් ඔළුවන් වචනයක් හැම වචනයක්ම සිද්ධ විශේෂ වචනයක්ම සාම', 'vi': 'Sự ưu tiên chọn được định nghĩa là xu hướng của người nào đó nghiêng về những lý lẽ cụ thể trong một ngữ pháp nhất định, và cũng thế, từ chối những điều khác dẫn đến sự mâu thuẫn hoặc vô lý. Sự thành công sáng chói của các mô hình tổ hợp chữ như BERT trong các công việc sục sạo khiến nhiều người đặt câu hỏi liệu các mô hình này có học được thông tin ngôn ngữ không, nhưng cho tới nay, hầu hết các nghiên cứu đã tập trung vào thông tin cú pháp. Chúng tôi tìm hiểu nếu Bert có thông tin về gợi trị đoạn của từ nó, bằng cách kiểm tra sự sẵn sàng của nó với từ nghỉ khi có một từ đầu trong câu Chúng tôi sử dụng các chữ đôi chủ động trong năm mối quan hệ pháp thuật khác nhau giữa hai loại như SP-10K như hệ thống ưu tiên chọn lựa (Zhang et al., 99b), trong các câu từ ukWaC Corpus, và chúng tôi đang tính tương quan điểm hợp lý (từ SP-10K) và khả năng mô hình. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy, không có mối tương quan tích cực hay tiêu cực mạnh nào trong các mối quan hệ cú pháp, Nhưng chúng tôi thấy rằng những từ ngữ đầu có mối tương quan mạnh mẽ và rằng che giấu mọi từ nhưng từ đầu mang lại mối tương quan tích cực nhất trong hầu hết các viễn cảnh. Điều đó cho thấy rằng ngữ pháp của vị bác sĩ tình hình thực sự là một yếu tố bền bỉ và có ảnh hưởng cho việc chọn các chủ đề.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name Biz bir so'zlarning tanlangan parametrlar haqida maʼlumot maʼlumotni tekshirimiz. Bu so'zda bir so'zning bir maxfiy soʻzni qoʻshishga ishonchining imkoniyatini tekshirish mumkin. Biz UWaC corpusining bir so'zlaridan (SP-10K) boshqa bir xil munosabatlaridan (Zhang et al., 2019b) so'zlar bilan boshqa so'zlardan foydalanyapmiz, va biz muvaffaqiyatli qiymatni (SP-10K) va modeldagi bog'liqni hisoblaymiz. Bizning natijalarimiz shunday ko'rsatadi, hech qanday tasavvur munosabatlarida hech qanday yaxshi yoki negativ bog'liq emas,  but we do find that certain head words have a strong correlation and that masking all words but the head word yields the most positive correlations in most scenarios -which indicates that the semantics of the predicate is indeed an integral and influential factor for the selection of the argument.", 'da': 'Selektiv præference defineres som en prædikats tendens til at favorisere bestemte argumenter inden for en bestemt sproglig kontekst, og ligeledes afvise andre, der resulterer i modstridende eller usandsynlige betydninger. Den stjernede succes med kontekstuelle ordindlejringsmodeller som BERT i NLP-opgaver har fået mange til at sætte spørgsmålstegn ved, om disse modeller har lært sproglig information, men indtil nu har de fleste undersøgelser fokuseret på syntaktisk information. Vi undersøger, om Bert indeholder oplysninger om de valgte præferencer af ord, ved at undersøge sandsynligheden for, at det tildeler det afhængige ord i betragtning af tilstedeværelsen af et hovedord i en sætning. Vi bruger ordpar af hovedafhængige ord i fem forskellige syntaktiske relationer fra SP-10K korpus af selektiv præference (Zhang et al., 2019b), i sætninger fra ukWac korpus, og vi beregner korrelationen mellem sandsynlighed score (fra SP-10K) og model sandsynligheder. Vores resultater viser, at der generelt ikke er nogen stærk positiv eller negativ korrelation i nogen syntaktisk relation, Men vi finder, at visse hovedord har en stærk korrelation, og at maskering af alle ord, men hovedordet giver de mest positive korrelationer i de fleste scenarier - hvilket indikerer, at semantikken af prædikatet faktisk er en integreret og indflydelsesrig faktor for udvælgelsen af argumentet.', 'bg': 'Селективното предпочитание се определя като тенденцията на предикат да благоприятства определени аргументи в определен лингвистичен контекст и също така да отхвърли други, които водят до противоречиви или неразбираеми значения. Звездният успех на контекстуалните модели за вграждане на думи като BERT в задачите на НЛП накара мнозина да се запитат дали тези модели са научили лингвистична информация, но досега повечето изследвания са се фокусирали върху синтактичната информация. Проучваме дали Берт съдържа информация за селекционните предпочитания на думите, като изследваме вероятността, която той приписва на зависимата дума при наличието на главна дума в изречение. Използваме думични двойки главо-зависими думи в пет различни синтактични отношения от корпуса на селективно предпочитание SP-10К (Zhang et al., 2019б), в изречения от корпуса и изчисляваме корелацията на оценката за правдоподобност (от SP-10К) и вероятностите на модела. Нашите резултати показват, че като цяло няма силна положителна или отрицателна корелация в нито една синтактична връзка, Но откриваме, че някои главни думи имат силна корелация и че маскирането на всички думи, но главната дума дава най-положителни корелации в повечето сценарии - което показва, че семантиката на предиката наистина е интегрален и влиятелен фактор за избора на аргумента.', 'nl': "Selectieve voorkeur wordt gedefinieerd als de neiging van een predicaat om bepaalde argumenten binnen een bepaalde taalkundige context te bevoordelen, en eveneens andere te verwerpen die resulteren in tegenstrijdige of onwaarschijnlijke betekenissen. Het stellaire succes van contextuele woordinbeddingsmodellen zoals BERT in NLP-taken heeft velen ertoe gebracht zich af te vragen of deze modellen linguïstische informatie hebben geleerd, maar tot nu toe heeft het meeste onderzoek zich gericht op syntactische informatie. We onderzoeken of Bert informatie bevat over de selectieve voorkeuren van woorden, door te kijken naar de waarschijnlijkheid die het toekent aan het afhankelijke woord gezien de aanwezigheid van een hoofdwoord in een zin. We gebruiken woordparen van hoofdafhankelijke woorden in vijf verschillende syntactische relaties uit het SP-10K corpus van selectieve voorkeur (Zhang et al., 2019b), in zinnen uit het ukWaC corpus, en we berekenen de correlatie van de plausibiliteitsscore (van SP-10K) en de modelwaarscheinlichheden. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat er over het algemeen geen sterke positieve of negatieve correlatie is in enige syntactische relatie, Maar we vinden dat bepaalde hoofdwoorden een sterke correlatie hebben en dat het maskeren van alle woorden maar het hoofdwoord de meest positieve correlaties oplevert in de meeste scenario's -wat aangeeft dat de semantiek van het predicaat inderdaad een integrale en invloedrijke factor is voor de selectie van het argument.", 'hr': 'Izabračna preferencija je definirana kao tendencija predikata za uslugu određenih argumenata u određenom jezičkom kontekstu, kao i odbacivanje drugih koji rezultiraju sukobenim ili neplažnim smislama. Zvjezdani uspjeh kontekstualnih riječi uključujući modele kao što su BERT u NLP zadatke dovodio je mnoge do pitanja da li su ovi modeli naučili jezičke informacije, ali do sada većina istraživanja usredotočila se na sintaktičke informacije. Istražujemo da li Bert sadrži informacije o selektivnim preferencijama riječi, provjeravajući vjerojatnost koju dodaje zavisnoj riječi s obzirom na prisustvo glavne riječi u rečenici. Koristimo riječi par riječi ovisnih o glavi u pet različitih sintaktičkih odnosa iz korpusa SP-10K selektivne preferencije (Zhang et al., 2019b), u rečenicama ukWaC korpusa, i izračunamo korelaciju rezultata uvjerljivosti (od SP-10K) i modelnih vjerojatnosti. Naši rezultati pokazuju da uopće nema jake pozitivne ili negativne korelacije u bilo kojoj sintaktičkoj vezi, Ali pronalazimo da određene glavne riječi imaju jaku korelaciju i da maskiraju sve riječi, ali glavna riječ daje najpozitivnije korelacije u većini scenarija, što ukazuje na to da je semantika predikata zaista integralna i utjecajna faktora za izbor argument a.', 'de': 'Selektive Präferenz ist definiert als die Tendenz eines Prädikats, bestimmte Argumente innerhalb eines bestimmten sprachlichen Kontextes zu bevorzugen und ebenfalls andere abzulehnen, die zu widersprüchlichen oder unplausiblen Bedeutungen führen. Der stellare Erfolg von kontextuellen Wort-Einbettungsmodellen wie BERT in NLP-Aufgaben hat viele zu der Frage geführt, ob diese Modelle linguistische Informationen gelernt haben, aber bisher konzentriert sich die Forschung auf syntaktische Informationen. Wir untersuchen, ob Bert Informationen über die Selektionspräferenzen von Wörtern enthält, indem wir die Wahrscheinlichkeit untersuchen, die es dem abhängigen Wort bei Vorhandensein eines Kopfwortes in einem Satz zuweist. Wir verwenden Wortpaare von kopfabhängigen Wörtern in fünf verschiedenen syntaktischen Beziehungen aus dem SP-10K Korpus der selektiven Präferenz (Zhang et al., 2019b), in Sätzen aus dem ukWaC Korpus, und wir berechnen die Korrelation des Plausibilitätsscores (von SP-10K) und der Modellwahrscheinlichkeiten. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass es insgesamt keine starke positive oder negative Korrelation in irgendeiner syntaktischen Beziehung gibt, Aber wir finden, dass bestimmte Kopfwörter eine starke Korrelation haben und dass das Maskieren aller Wörter, aber des Kopfworts, in den meisten Szenarien die positivsten Korrelationen ergibt -was darauf hinweist, dass die Semantik des Prädikats tatsächlich ein integraler und einflussreicher Faktor für die Auswahl des Arguments ist.', 'ko': '선호는 술어로 정의되고 특정한 언어 환경에서 특정한 논점을 지지하는 경향이 있다. 마찬가지로 충돌을 초래하거나 믿을 수 없는 다른 논점을 거부한다.BERT와 같은 상하문 단어 삽입 모델은 자연 언어 처리 임무에서 큰 성공을 거두었고 많은 사람들이 이 모델들이 언어 정보를 배웠는지 의문을 제기했지만 지금까지 대부분의 연구는 문법 정보에 집중되었다.우리는 문장에 주어가 있는 상황에서 베트가 종속어에 부여할 확률을 고찰함으로써 베트가 단어의 선택에 대한 선호 정보를 포함하는지 연구한다.우리는 ukWAC 자료 라이브러리의 문장에서 SP-10K에서 선호 자료 라이브러리(Zhang et al., 2019b)를 선택한 다섯 가지 서로 다른 문법 관계에서 머리 관련 단어의 쌍을 사용하고 유사성 득점(SP-10K)과 모델 확률의 상관성을 계산한다.우리의 결과는 전체적으로 어떤 문법 관계에서도 강한 정관계나 음관계가 존재하지 않는다는 것을 보여준다.그러나 우리는 일부 중심어가 매우 강한 관련성을 가진다는 것을 확실히 발견했다. 대다수 상황에서 중심어를 제외한 모든 단어를 덮으면 가장 정확한 관련성이 생길 수 있다. 이것은 술어의 의미가 논점을 선택하는 완전하고 영향을 미치는 요소임을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'گزینه\u200cهای انتخاب به عنوان نقطه\u200cای از پیشدیک برای لطف ارائه\u200cهای خاص در یک محیط زبان\u200cشناسی تعریف می\u200cشود، و همچنین دیگران را که به عنوان معنی\u200cهای مخالفت یا غیرقابل توجه می\u200cکنند رد می\u200cکنند. موفقیت ستاره\u200cای از کلمه\u200cهای متوسطی مانند BERT در وظیفه\u200cهای NLP بسیاری را به سوال می\u200cرساند که آیا این مدل\u200cها اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی یاد گرفته\u200cاند، اما تا الان بیشتر تحقیقات روی اطلاعات سنتاکتیک تمرکز شده است. ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که آیا برت اطلاعات در مورد ترجیح گزینه\u200cهای کلمات را دارد، با تحقیق احتمال آن به کلمات بستگی که در یک جمله وجود یک کلمه سر دارد. ما از کلمه\u200cهای کلمه بستگی سر در پنج رابطه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک متفاوت از شرکت SP-10K از ترجیح\u200cهای انتخابی (Zhang et al., 2019b) استفاده می\u200cکنیم، در جمله\u200cها از شرکت ukWaC، و ما ارتباط امتیاز قابلیت (از SP-10K) و احتمال مدل را محاسبه می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که در کل، هیچ ارتباطی مثبتی یا منفی قوی در هر ارتباطی سنتاکتیک وجود ندارد، اما ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که کلمات سر\u200cها ارتباط قوی دارند و کلمات\u200cها را ماسک می\u200cکنند اما کلمات سر ارتباط\u200cهای مثبت\u200cترین در بیشترین سناریو می\u200cدهد که نشان می\u200cدهد که semantics of the predicate واقعاً یک faktor integral and influential برای انتخاب این ارتباط است.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa uchaguzi unaelezwa kama tabia ya mtazamo wa kuboresha hoja maalum katika muktadha fulani wa lugha, na kadhalika, kukataa wengine ambao wanasababisha migogoro au maana yasiyoeleweka. Mafanikio makubwa ya maneno ya sasa yanayoweka mifano kama vile BERT katika kazi za NLP yamesababisha wengi kuuliza ikiwa mifano hii imejifunza taarifa za lugha, lakini mpaka sasa, utafiti wengi umejikita kwenye taarifa za pamoja. We investigate whether Bert contains information on the selectional preferences of words, by examining the probability it assigns to the dependent word given the presence of a head word in a sentence.  Tunatumia maneno yanayotegemea wakuu katika mahusiano matano tofauti ya ushirikiano kutoka kwenye viungo vya SP-10K vya upendeleo wa uchaguzi (Zhang et al., 2019b), katika hukumu kutoka kwenye makampuni ya ukWaC, na tunahesabu uhusiano wa vipindi vya usawa (kutoka SP-10K) na uwezekano wa model. Our results show that overall, there is no strong positive or negative correlation in any syntactic relation, Lakini tunagundua kwamba maneno fulani ya kichwa yana uhusiano mkubwa na kuangalia maneno yote lakini neno la kichwa kinaleta mahusiano chanya zaidi katika mitazamo mengi - ambayo inaonyesha kwamba mifano ya utangulizi kwa hakika ni sababu ya moja na yenye ushawishi kwa uchaguzi wa mazungumzo hayo.', 'id': 'Keutamaan seleksi didefinisikan sebagai cenderung dari predikat untuk mendukung argumen tertentu dalam konteks bahasa tertentu, dan juga, menolak yang lain yang menyebabkan makna konflik atau tidak dapat dipercaya. The stellar success of contextual word embedding models such as BERT in NLP tasks has led many to question whether these models have learned linguistic information, but up till now, most research has focused on syntactic information.  Kami menyelidiki apakah Bert mengandung informasi tentang keutamaan selektif kata-kata, dengan memeriksa kemungkinan yang ditugaskan kepada kata tergantung diberikan kehadiran kata kepala dalam kalimat. We are using word pairs of head-dependent words in five different syntactic relations from the SP-10K corpus of selectional preference (Zhang et al., 2019b), in sentences from the ukWaC corpus, and we are calculating the correlation of the plausibility score (from SP-10K) and the model probabilities.  Hasil kita menunjukkan bahwa secara umum, tidak ada korelasi positif atau negatif dalam hubungan sintaks apapun, Tapi kita menemukan bahwa kata-kata kepala tertentu memiliki korelasi yang kuat dan bahwa menutupi semua kata tetapi kata kepala memberikan korelasi yang paling positif dalam kebanyakan skenario - yang menunjukkan bahwa semantik predikat adalah benar-benar faktor integral dan pengaruh untuk pemilihan argumen.', 'af': "Kies voorkeure is gedefinieerd as die tendensie van 'n predikaat om bepaalde argumente te guns binne 'n sekere lingvisiese konteks, en ook, verwerp ander wat resultaat in konfliksies of onverloënbaar betekenings. Die stellare sukses van contextual woord inbetering modele soos BERT in NLP taak het baie gelei om te vra of hierdie modele lingwisiese inligting geleer het, maar op tot nou toe, die meeste ondersoek het gefokus op sintaktieke inligting. Ons ondersoek of Bert inligting bevat oor die seleksionale voorkeure van woorde, deur die waarskynlikheid wat dit aan die afhanklike woord toewys, gegee het die voorkoms van 'n kopwoord in 'n seting. Ons gebruik woord paar van kopafhanklike woorde in vyf verskillende sintaktiske verwantings van die SP-10K korpus van seleksiese voorkeure (Zhang et al., 2019b), in setings van die ukWaC korpus, en ons bereken die korrelasie van die verligbaarheidsverklaring (van SP-10K) en die model waarskynlikheite. Ons resultate wys dat totaal, daar is geen sterk positiewe of negatiewe korrelasie in enige sintaktiewe verhouding nie, Maar ons vind dat sekere kopwoorde 'n sterk korrelasie het en dat die maskering van alle woorde maar die kopwoord gee die mees positiewe korrelasies in mees scenarios - wat wys dat die semantieke van die predikaat werklik 'n integraal en influensielike faktor is vir die keuse van die argument.", 'tr': 'Saýlaw tercihleri adatça bir dil kontekstinde häsiýetlere golaýlaşmak üçin ön bellenen arzanlaryň täsiri diýip tanyşdyrylýar, we munuň ýaly başgalaryny garşjaňlaşyp ýa-da boýunjaňlaşyp netijesini ret edip bilmeýär. NLP işinde BERT ýaly contextual sözlerin ýoldaşylyk nusgalarynyň kän köpüsi bu nusgalaryň lingwistiki maglumatlary öwrendigini soramaga başladyr, ýöne şu wagtlara çenli köp araştyrma syntaktik maglumatlara üns berildi. Bertiň seçgi sözleriniň seçenekleri barada maglumatlary bardygyny barlaýarys, sözleýän kelläň bar bolmagynyň mümkinçiligini barlap. SP-10K köpüsinden saýlaw tercihleri (Zhang et al., 2019b.), ukWaC köpüsinden sözler bilen kelli baglanyşyk sözleriniň bäş dürli sintaktik baglaýyşlaryna ulanýarys we olaryň köpüsüni (SP-10K-den) we nusga mümkinçiliklerini hasaplýarys. netijelerimiz ýagdaýda syntaktik baglaýyşynda güýçli pozitif ýa-da negatif bir baglaýyş ýok. Emma kellämiziň belli kellämiziň güýçli ylalaşygy bar we hemme kellämizi maskarap ýöne kellämiziň köp senaryýalarda iň pozitiv ylalaşygy täsir edýändigini görkeýäris -bu predikanyň semantikleri hakykatdanam argümiň saýlamasynyň bir integral we täsirli faktorudyr.', 'az': 'Seçimlər seçimləri müəyyən bir dil məsələsində bəzi argumentlərə mərhəmət göstərmək üçün predikat tərzi kimi tanımlanır və buna görə də mübahisədə və ya imkansız anlama gələn başqalarını inkar edirlər. NLP işlərində BERT kimi müxtəlif sözlərin başarısızlığı, bu modellərin dil məlumatlarını öyrəndiyini soruşmaq üçün çoxlarına yol göstərdi, amma şimdiye qədər çoxları araştırma sintaktik məlumatlarına odaqlandı. Biz Bert in sözlərin seçimləri haqqında məlumatları barəsində, sözlərin başlı sözlərin varlığı ilə bağlı sözlərə verilən mümkünlüyü təsdiqləyici olaraq təyin edirik. Biz bu sözləri ukWaC korpusunun sözləri ilə, SP-10K korpusundan beş müxtəlif sintaktik ilişkilərdə istifadə edirik. Və biz inanılmaz nöqtəsinin (SP-10K-dən) və modeli ehtimalların bağlantısını hesablayıq. Sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, hər hansı sintaktik ilişkisində güclü pozitif və negatif ilişkisi yoxdur. Lakin biz bəzi baş sözlərinin möhkəm bir bağlantısı olduğunu görürük və bütün sözləri gizlətmək, lakin baş sözlərinin çox scenariolarda ən pozitif bağlantısı verir ki, prediklərin semantikləri mütləq dəyişiklik seçmək üçün çox təsirli və təsirli faktördür.', 'sq': 'Preferimi zgjedhor përcaktohet si prirja e një predikati për të favorizuar argumente të veçanta brenda një konteksti të caktuar gjuhësor dhe, në të njëjtën mënyrë, për të kundërshtuar të tjerët që rezultojnë në kuptime konfliktuese apo të pabesueshme. Suksesi yjor i modeleve kontekstuale të përfshirjes së fjalëve të tilla si BERT në detyrat NLP ka çuar shumë në pyetje nëse këto modele kanë mësuar informacion gjuhësor, por deri tani, shumica e kërkimeve janë përqëndruar në informacionin sintaktik. We investigate whether Bert contains information on the selectional preferences of words, by examining the probability it assigns to the dependent word given the presence of a head word in a sentence.  Ne po përdorim fjalë dy fjalë të varura nga koka në pesë marrëdhënie sintaktike të ndryshme nga korpusi SP-10K i preferimit selektiv (Zhang et al., 2019b), në fjalë nga korpusi ukWaC, dhe po llogarisim korrelacionin e rezultatit të besueshmërisë (nga SP-10K) dhe probabilitetet e modelit. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se përgjithësisht, nuk ka korrelacion pozitiv apo negativ të fortë në ndonjë lidhje sintaktike, Por ne gjejmë se disa fjalë koke kanë një korrelacion të fortë dhe se maskimi i të gjitha fjalëve por fjala koke sjell korrelacionet më pozitive në shumicën e skenarëve - që tregon se semantika e predikatës është në të vërtetë një faktor integral dhe ndikues për zgjedhjen e argumentit.', 'bn': 'নির্বাচনের পছন্দ একটি নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার প্রেক্ষাপটে বিশেষ যুক্তিগুলোকে পছন্দ করার প্রচণ্ড হিসেবে নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে, আর তাছাড়াও অন্য The stellar success of contextual word embedding models such as BERT in NLP tasks has led many to question whether these models have learned linguistic information, but up till now, most research has focused on syntactic information.  আমরা অনুসন্ধান করি বার্ট শব্দের নির্বাচিত পছন্দের ব্যাপারে তথ্য আছে কিনা, বাক্যের মধ্যে একটি মাথার শব্দের উপস্থিতি দেয়া সম্ভাবনা পরী ইউকোয়াসি কর্পাসের কারাদণ্ড থেকে পাঁচ বিভিন্ন সিন্ট্যাক্টিক সম্পর্কে আমরা শব্দ ব্যবহার করছি যা এসপি-১০কে নির্বাচিত সম্পর্কের (জাং-এ আল, ২০১৯বি), এবং আমরা বিশ্বাসযোগ্য স্কোর (এসপি-১০কে) এবং ম আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে সাধারণত, কোন সাথে কোনো কৌশলীয় সম্পর্কে কোনো শক্তিশালী বা নেতিবাচক সম্পর্ক নেই, কিন্তু আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে কিছু কিছু মাথার কথা একটি শক্তিশালী সম্পর্ক আছে এবং যে সব শব্দ মুখোশ করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু মাথার শব্দ বেশীর ভাগ দৃশ্যের সবচেয়ে ইতিবাচক সম্পর্ক প্রদান করে- য', 'am': 'ምርጫ ምርጫዎች በተለያዩ ቋንቋዊ ክፍል ውስጥ የተለየ አጋራዎችን ለመፈለግ የሚታወቀው ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በNLP-ስራ BERT የሚደረገው የግንኙነት ቃላት አቅራቢያ ሞዴላዎችን የሚያስቀናው ብዙዎች የቋንቋዊ መረጃ ማወቅ እንደሆነ ይጠይቃሉ፤ ነገር ግን እስከ አሁን ድረስ ብዙዎቹ ምርጫዎች የድምፅ መረጃዎችን በመጠየቅ ያስተማራሉ፡፡ በቤርት የተመረጠው የቃላት ምርጫዎች መረጃ ቢኖር እናምርዋለን፡፡ በዩዋኤ ኮርፓስ (Zhang et al., 2019b) በተለየ የአምስት መልዕክቶች የራስ-ታዋቂነት ቃላት እና የስፖር-10K ክሮፕስ (ከSP-10K) እና የሞዴል ግንኙነት (ከSP-10K) እናስቆጥራለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን በሙሉ ያሳየናል፣ በአካባቢ ወይም ነቀኛ ግንኙነት ማንኛውም የስብሰባዊ ግንኙነት የለውም፡፡ ነገር ግን አንዳንድ የራስ ቃላት ኃይለኛ ግንኙነት እንዳለው እና ቃሎችን ሁሉ ማሳየት እና የራስ ቃላት ግን በብዛቱ ስናይናዊ ግንኙነት እንዲሰጥ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Izabračna preferencija je definisana kao tendencija predikata za uslugu određenih argumenata u određenom lingvističkom kontekstu, kao i odbacivanje drugih koji rezultuju u sukobe ili neprihvatljivim smislama. Zvezdani uspjeh kontekstualnih riječi uključujući modele kao što su BERT u NLP zadatke dovelo do pitanja da li su ovi modeli naučili jezičke informacije, ali do sada većina istraživanja se fokusirala na sintaktičke informacije. Istražujemo da li Bert sadrži informacije o selektivnim preferencijama riječi, pregledajući vjerojatnost koju daje zavisnoj riječi s obzirom na prisustvo glavne riječi u rečenici. Koristimo riječi par riječi zavisnih od glave u pet različitih sintaktičkih odnosa od korpusa SP-10K selektivne preferencije (Zhang et al., 2019b), u rečenicama ukWaC korpusa, i izračunamo korelaciju rezultata uvjerljivosti (od SP-10K) i modelnih verovatnosti. Naši rezultati pokazuju da uopšte nema jake pozitivne ili negativne korelacije u bilo kojoj sintaktičkoj vezi, Ali mi smatramo da određene glavne riječi imaju jaku korelaciju i da maskiraju sve riječi, ali glavna riječ daje najpozitivnije korelacije u većini scenarija, što ukazuje na to da je semantika predikata zaista integralna i utjecajna faktora za izbor argument a.', 'ca': "La preferència seleccional és definida com la tendència d'un predicat a favor d'arguments específics dins un cert context lingüístic, i també rebutjar altres que provoquen significats conflictius o implausibles. L'èxit estelar dels models contextuals d'incorporació de paraules com BERT en tasques NLP ha fet molts dubtar si aquests models han après informació lingüística, però fins ara, la majoria de recerca s'ha centrat en informació sinàctica. Investiguem si Bert conté informació sobre les preferències selectives de paraules, examinant la probabilitat que atribueix a la paraula dependent dada la presença d'una paraula cap en una frase. Estem utilitzant paraules parells de paraules dependents del cap en cinc relacions sinàctiques diferents del corpus SP-10K de preferència selectiva (Zhang et al., 2019b), en frases del corpus ukWaC, i estem calculant la correlació entre la puntuació de plausibilitat (de SP-10K) i les probabilitats del model. Els nostres resultats demostren que, en general, no hi ha una forta correlació positiva o negativa en cap relació sinàctica, però descobrim que certes paraules del cap tenen una forta correlació i que mascarar totes les paraules però la paraula del cap produeix les correlacions més positives en la majoria dels escenaris - que indica que la semàntica del predicat és realment un factor integral i influent per a la selecció de l'argumentu.", 'cs': 'Selekční preference je definována jako tendence predikátu upřednostňovat konkrétní argumenty v určitém jazykovém kontextu a podobně odmítat ostatní, které vedou k konfliktním nebo nepravděpodobným významům. Hvězdný úspěch kontextových modelů vkládání slov, jako je BERT v NLP úlohách, vedl mnoho z nich k otázce, zda se tyto modely naučily jazykové informace, avšak dosud se většina výzkumů zaměřila na syntaktické informace. Zkoumáme, zda Bert obsahuje informace o selektivních preferencích slov, zkoumáme pravděpodobnost, kterou přiřazuje závislému slovu vzhledem k přítomnosti hlavního slova ve větě. Používáme slovní páry slov závislých na hlavě v pěti různých syntaktických vztazích z korpusu selektivní preference SP-10K (Zhang et al., 2019b), ve větách z korpusu ukWaC a vypočítáme korelaci věrohodnosti (od SP-10K) a pravděpodobností modelu. Naše výsledky ukazují, že celkově neexistuje žádná silná pozitivní nebo negativní korelace v žádném syntaktickém vztahu, ale zjišťujeme, že některá hlavní slova mají silnou korelaci a že maskování všech slov, avšak hlavní slovo, ve většině scénářů přináší nejpříznivější korelace, což naznačuje, že sémantika predikátu je skutečně integrálním a vlivným faktorem pro výběr argumentu.', 'et': 'Selektiivne eelistus on defineeritud kui predikaadi kalduvus eelistada teatud keelelises kontekstis konkreetseid argumente ning samuti keelata tagasi teisi, mis põhjustavad vastuolulisi või ebausutavaid tähendusi. Kontextuaalsete sõnade põimimise mudelite, nagu BERT, suur edu NLP ülesannetes, on pannud paljud kahtlema, kas need mudelid on õppinud keelelist informatsiooni, kuid seni on enamik uuringuid keskendunud süntaktilisele informatsioonile. Me uurime, kas Bert sisaldab teavet valikuliste eelistuste sõnade, uurides tõenäosust, mida ta omistab sõltuvale sõnale arvestades peasõna olemasolu lauses. Me kasutame peast sõltuvate sõnade paare viies erinevas süntaktilises seoses SP-10K valikulise eelistuse korpusest (Zhang et al., 2019b) ukWaC korpusest ning arvutame usutavuskoori (SP-10K) ja mudeli tõenäosuste korrelatsiooni. Meie tulemused näitavad, et üldiselt puudub tugev positiivne või negatiivne korrelatsioon üheski süntaktilises seoses, Kuid me leiame, et teatud peasõnadel on tugev korrelatsioon ja et varjates kõiki sõnu, kuid peasõna annab kõige positiivsemad korrelatsioonid enamikus stsenaariumides - mis näitab, et semantika predikaadi on tõepoolest lahutamatu ja mõjukas tegur valimisel argument.', 'fi': 'Valinnainen mieltymys määritellään predikaatin taipumukseksi suosia tiettyjä argumentteja tietyssä kielellisessä kontekstissa ja hylätä myös muita, jotka johtavat ristiriitaisiin tai epätodennäköisiin merkityksiin. BERT:n kaltaisten kontekstuaalisten sanaupotusmallien suuri menestys NLP-tehtävissä on saanut monet pohtimaan, ovatko nämä mallit oppineet kielellistä tietoa, mutta tähän mennessä suurin osa tutkimuksista on keskittynyt syntaktiseen tietoon. Tutkimme, sisältääkö Bert tietoa sanojen valinnaisista mieltymyksistä tutkimalla todennäköisyyttä, jonka se antaa riippuvaiselle sanalle ottaen huomioon pääsanan läsnäolon lauseessa. Käytämme pääriippuvaisten sanojen sanapareja viidessä eri syntaktisessa suhteessa SP-10K-selektiivisen preferenssin korpusesta (Zhang et al., 2019b) ukWaC-korpusesta ja laskemme uskottavuuspisteen (SP-10K) ja mallitodennäköisyyksien korrelaation. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että syntaktisessa suhteessa ei ole vahvaa positiivista tai negatiivista korrelaatiota. Mutta huomaamme, että tietyillä pääsanoilla on vahva korrelaatio ja että kaikkien sanojen peittäminen, mutta pääsana tuottaa positiivisimmat korrelaatiot useimmissa skenaarioissa - mikä osoittaa, että predikaatin semantiikka on todellakin integraali ja vaikutusvaltainen tekijä argumentin valinnassa.', 'hy': 'Ընտրական նախընտրությունը սահմանվում է որպես նախադասության հակվածություն որոշակի բանավեճերի օգնությամբ որոշակի լեզվաբանական կոնտեքստում և նույնպես ուրիշներին մերժել, որոնք հանգեցնում են հակամարտություն կամ անհավատալի իմաստով: The stellar success of contextual word embedding models such as BERT in NLP tasks has led many to question whether these models have learned linguistic information, but up till now, most research has focused on syntactic information.  We investigate whether Bert contains information on the selectional preferences of words, by examining the probability it assigns to the dependent word given the presence of a head word in a sentence.  We are using word pairs of head-dependent words in five different syntactic relations from the SP-10K corpus of selectional preference (Zhang et al., 2019b), in sentences from the ukWaC corpus, and we are calculating the correlation of the plausibility score (from SP-10K) and the model probabilities.  Our results show that overall, there is no strong positive or negative correlation in any syntactic relation,  but we do find that certain head words have a strong correlation and that masking all words but the head word yields the most positive correlations in most scenarios -which indicates that the semantics of the predicate is indeed an integral and influential factor for the selection of the argument.', 'jv': 'Pilihan langgar dipunangg챕 punika dipunangg챕 ning acara awakdh챕w챕 karo perusahaan ingkang dipunangg챕, lan padha apik, ngrebut oleh liyane sing beraksi bar챗ng-bar챗ng. Suara sing perbudhakan karo model sing dikarepak챕 kelas BERT ing NLP Within Awak dh챕w챕 wis nggambar kelas kuwi nggambar luwih-nglanggar aturan sing dimulatan winih sing gak sing perusahaan seneng ngregani sing wis dipune nggawe Rejalak챕 awak dh챕w챕 ngomong nik kab챔h, ora ono nggawe gerakan luwih-luwih karo perusahaan seneng pisan seneng pisan, Ning awak dh챕w챕 ng챗n챗m챗n ngerti, kelompok sing beraksi luwih n챗m챗n lan m챗n챗m챗n kuwi ng챗n챗m챗n, dar kedhah챕 awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk kelompok sing gak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk dh챕w챕 챕ntuk perusahaan langgar-wong liyan챕 -sing ngomong ngerti sematik dh챕w챕 sing beraksi sing bakal terus in 챗m챗n', 'ha': "An bayyana zaɓen zaɓen kamar wata na'urar da ya ƙayyade wa'urar da wasu argument cikin muhalli na harshen, kuma kamar haka, ka kange wasu wanda ke ƙara cikin fassarar da tsohon ko ma'anin wanda bã ya iya amfani da shi. An sami babban rabon maganar da ke cikin misãlai da aka shigar da shi kamar BERT cikin aikin NLP ya ƙãga wasu su tambayi ko waɗannan misãlai sun sanar da takardar linguistic, kuma amma har zuwa yanzu, ko mafi yawansa karatun yana fanati kan information na haɗatiki. Babu jarraba ko Bert yana da information kan zaɓen zaɓani na maganar, a lokacin da za'a iya ƙayyade shi ga maganar da aka ƙayyade a cikin cewa. Tuna yi amfani da maganar nau'i biyu masu da inganci daga shawarar SP-10K na dabam-dabam na zahang et al., 2019b, a cikin cire daga nau'in ukWaC, kuma tuna ƙidãyar muhallin na musamman nau'in plausibility (daga SP-10K) da misãlai masu yiwuwa. MatamayinMu na nũna cẽwa, a jumla, bãbu wani mai ƙarfi ko nega cikin wani mahusi na haɗi, @ label", 'sk': 'Selekcijska preferenca je opredeljena kot težnja predikata, da daje prednost določenim argumentom znotraj določenega jezikovnega konteksta in prav tako zavrne druge, ki imajo za posledico nasprotujoče ali neverjetne pomene. Zvezdni uspeh kontekstualnih modelov vključevanja besed, kot je BERT v naloge NLP, je mnogi spraševali, ali so se ti modeli naučili jezikovnih informacij, vendar se je do zdaj večina raziskav osredotočila na sintaktične informacije. Preučujemo, ali Bert vsebuje informacije o selekcijskih preferencah besed, tako da preučimo verjetnost, ki jo dodeli odvisni besedi glede na prisotnost glavne besede v stavku. Uporabljamo besedne pare glave odvisnih besed v petih različnih sintaktičnih relacijah iz korpusa selekcijske preference SP-10K (Zhang et al., 2019b), v stavkih korpusa ukWaC in izračunamo korelacijo ocene verodostojnosti (iz SP-10K) in verjetnosti modela. Naši rezultati kažejo, da na splošno ni močne pozitivne ali negativne korelacije v nobenem sintaktičnem odnosu, Vendar pa ugotovimo, da imajo nekatere glavne besede močno korelacijo in da prikrivanje vseh besed, vendar glavna beseda prinaša najbolj pozitivne korelacije v večini scenarijev - kar kaže, da je semantika predikata resnično celovit in vpliven dejavnik za izbor argumenta.', 'he': 'ההעדפות הבחירה מוגדרת כהנטיה של קונדיקט להעדיף טיעונים מסויימים בתוך הקשר לשוני מסוים, וכמו, לדחות אחרים שמובילים במשורות מתנגדות או בלתי אמיתיות. ההצלחה הכוכבים של מודלים של מילים קונטקסטיים כמו BERT במשימות NLP הובילה רבים לשאול אם המודלים הללו למדו מידע שפתי, אבל עד עכשיו, רוב המחקרים התמקדו במידע סינטקטי. אנו חוקרים אם ברט מכיל מידע על ההעדפות הבחירות של מילים, על ידי לבדוק את הסבירות שהוא מחזיק למילה תלויה בהתחשב בנוכחות של מילה ראשית במשפט. אנו משתמשים במילים זוגות של מילים תלויות בראש בחמש יחסים סינטקטיים שונים מ-SP-10K קורפוס של העדיפות הבחירה (Zhang et al., 2019b), במשפטים מ-ukWaC קורפוס, ואנחנו מחשבים את התשובה של נקודת האמינות (מ-SP-10K) והסבירות המודל. התוצאות שלנו מראות שאין שום קשר חיובי או שלילי חזק בכל קשר סינטקטי, אבל אנחנו מוצאים שלמילים ראשיות מסוימות יש קשר חזק ושמסיכת כל המילים אבל המילה ראשית מובילה את הקשר החיובי ביותר ברוב התרחישים -', 'bo': 'སེལ་འཐུ་བྱས་པར་གདམ་ཁ་ཚུལ་ཞིག་དག་གི་སྔོན་ཅིག་གི་ཐུག་སྙད་ཅིག་ནང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག The stellar success of contextual word embedding models such as BERT in NLP tasks has led many to question whether these models have learned linguistic information, but up to now, most research has focused on syntactic information. ང་ཚོས་Bert ཡི་ནང་གི་གདམ་ཁ་ཡིག་གི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཚིག་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན། ང་ཚོས་SP-10K་ནང་གི་སྲོལ་སྒྲིག་གི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལས་ མགོ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིང་རྩིས་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་བཤད་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་མཐུན་སྐྱེལ་བ་དང་ཚད་ལྡན་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གང་ཡང་མིན་འདུག We do find that certain head words have a strong correlation and that masking all words but the head word yields the most positive correlations in most scenarios -which indicates that the semantics of the predicate is indeed an integral and influential factor for the selection of the argument.'}
{'en': 'A Retrofitting Model for Incorporating Semantic Relations into Word Embeddings', 'fr': 'Un modèle de mise à niveau pour intégrer des relations sémantiques dans des intégrations de mots', 'ar': 'نموذج التعديل التحديثي لدمج العلاقات الدلالية في حفلات الزفاف', 'pt': 'Um modelo de retrofit para incorporar relações semânticas em Word Embeddings', 'es': 'Un modelo de modernización para incorporar relaciones semánticas en la incrustación de palabras', 'ja': 'ワード埋め込みにセマンティックリレーションを組み込むための改造モデル', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग में शब्दार्थ संबंधों को शामिल करने के लिए एक रेट्रोफिटिंग मॉडल', 'zh': '一以语义入词嵌者为模形', 'ru': 'Модель модернизации для включения семантических отношений во вставки слов', 'ga': 'Samhail Iarfheistithe chun Caidreamh Séimeantach a Ionchorprú i Leabú Focal', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A szemantikus kapcsolatok beépítésének utólagos modellje a szóbeágyazásokba', 'el': 'Ένα μοντέλο αναπροσαρμογής για την ενσωμάτωση σημασιολογικών σχέσεων σε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'it': 'Un modello di retrofit per incorporare relazioni semantiche nelle incorporazioni di parole', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру үшін семантикалық қатынастарды қайта келтіру үлгісіName', 'lt': 'Atnaujinantis Semantinių santykių įtraukimo į žodžių įtraukimą modelis', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Riprofitt għall-Inkorporazzjoni ta’ Relazzjonijiet Semantiċi fl-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Сөвхөн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой нэгтгэх загвар', 'pl': 'Model modernizacji włączania relacji semantycznych do osadzeń słowa', 'ro': 'Un model de modernizare pentru încorporarea relațiilor semantice în încorporarea cuvintelor', 'sr': 'Retrofitting Model for Incorporating Semantic Relations into Word Embeddings', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En eftermonteringsmodell för att införliva semantiska relationer i Word Embeddings', 'so': 'Model for Incorporating Semantic Relations into Word Embedding', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một mô hình nối lại của kết hợp môi trường trung thành môi trường từ.', 'bg': 'Модел за модернизиране на семантичните отношения в вграждането на думи', 'hr': 'Model za uključenje semantičkih odnosa u uključenje riječi', 'da': 'En eftermonteringsmodel til indarbejdelse af semantiske relationer i Word Embeddings', 'nl': 'Een retrofitting model voor het opnemen van semantische relaties in Word Embeddings', 'de': 'Ein Retrofit-Modell zur Einbindung von semantischen Beziehungen in Word Embeddings', 'ko': '의미 관계를 단어에 융합시키는 개선 모델', 'id': 'A Retrofitting Model for Incorporating Semantic Relations into Word Embeddings', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kituo cha Upya cha Kuboresha Mawasiliano ya Kijinsia katika Mipango ya Kireno', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Semantik Baglaýyşlary Keçirmek üçin Taýdalanýan nusga', 'am': 'Name', 'az': 'Semantik Ä°liÅŸkilÉ™ri SĂ¶zlĂ¼k Ä°Ă§indÉ™ QÄ±dÄ±rma Modeli', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Model za uključenje semantičkih odnosa u uključenje riječi', 'ca': "Un model retrofitor per incorporar les relacions Semàtiques a l'incorporació de paraules", 'cs': 'Model modernizace pro začlenění sémantických vztahů do slovních vložení', 'et': 'Semantiliste suhete kaasamise mudel sõnasõnadesse', 'fi': 'Jälleenmittamismalli semanttisten suhteiden sisällyttämiseksi sanaupotuksiin', 'sq': 'Një model për përfshirjen e marrëdhënieve Semantike në përfshirjen e fjalëve', 'hy': 'Comment', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Model za dopolnitev vključevanja semantičnih odnosov v besedila', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལྡོག་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚོར་མཚུངས་པའི་སྔོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དག་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན', 'he': 'Name'}
{'en': 'We present a novel retrofitting model that can leverage relational knowledge available in a knowledge resource to improve word embeddings. The knowledge is captured in terms of relation inequality constraints that compare similarity of related and unrelated entities in the context of an anchor entity. These constraints are used as training data to learn a non-linear transformation function that maps original word vectors to a vector space respecting these constraints. The transformation function is learned in a similarity metric learning setting using Triplet network architecture. We applied our model to synonymy, antonymy and hypernymy relations in WordNet and observed large gains in performance over original distributional models as well as other retrofitting approaches on word similarity task and significant overall improvement on lexical entailment detection task.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذج تعديل تحديثي جديد يمكنه الاستفادة من المعرفة العلائقية المتاحة في مورد المعرفة لتحسين عمليات دمج الكلمات. يتم التقاط المعرفة من حيث قيود عدم المساواة في العلاقات التي تقارن التشابه بين الكيانات ذات الصلة وغير ذات الصلة في سياق كيان مرساة. تُستخدم هذه القيود كبيانات تدريب لتعلم وظيفة التحويل غير الخطية التي تحدد متجهات الكلمات الأصلية لمساحة متجه تحترم هذه القيود. يتم تعلم وظيفة التحويل في إعداد التعلم المتري للتشابه باستخدام هندسة الشبكة الثلاثية. طبقنا نموذجنا على علاقات المرادفات والتضاد والارتباك المفرط في WordNet ولاحظنا مكاسب كبيرة في الأداء مقارنة بنماذج التوزيع الأصلية بالإضافة إلى مناهج التعديل التحديثي الأخرى في مهمة تشابه الكلمات وتحسين شامل كبير في مهمة الكشف المعجمي.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un nouveau modèle de mise à niveau qui peut tirer parti des connaissances relationnelles disponibles dans une ressource de connaissances afin d'améliorer l'intégration de mots. Les connaissances sont capturées en termes de contraintes d'inégalité de relation qui comparent la similitude d'entités liées et non liées dans le contexte d'une entité d'ancrage. Ces contraintes sont utilisées comme données d'apprentissage pour apprendre une fonction de transformation non linéaire qui met en correspondance des vecteurs de mots originaux avec un espace vectoriel respectant ces contraintes. La fonction de transformation est apprise dans un environnement d'apprentissage de métrique de similarité utilisant l'architecture réseau Triplet. Nous avons appliqué notre modèle aux relations de synonymie, d'antonymie et d'hypernymie dans WordNet et avons observé des gains de performance importants par rapport aux modèles de distribution originaux ainsi que d'autres approches de mise à niveau sur la tâche de similarité de mots et une amélioration globale significative de la tâche de détection d'implication lexicale.", 'es': 'Presentamos un novedoso modelo de adaptación que puede aprovechar el conocimiento relacional disponible en un recurso de conocimiento para mejorar la incrustación de palabras. El conocimiento se captura en términos de restricciones de desigualdad de relación que comparan la similitud de entidades relacionadas y no relacionadas en el contexto de una entidad ancla. Estas restricciones se utilizan como datos de entrenamiento para aprender una función de transformación no lineal que mapea vectores de palabras originales a un espacio vectorial respetando estas restricciones. La función de transformación se aprende en un entorno de aprendizaje de métricas de similitud mediante la arquitectura de red Triplet. Aplicamos nuestro modelo a las relaciones de sinonimia, antonimia e hipernima en WordNet y observamos grandes ganancias en el rendimiento con respecto a los modelos de distribución originales, así como otros enfoques de adaptación en la tarea de similitud de palabras y una mejora general significativa en la tarea de detección de implicación léxica.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo modelo de adaptação que pode alavancar o conhecimento relacional disponível em um recurso de conhecimento para melhorar a incorporação de palavras. O conhecimento é capturado em termos de restrições de desigualdade de relação que comparam a similaridade de entidades relacionadas e não relacionadas no contexto de uma entidade âncora. Essas restrições são usadas como dados de treinamento para aprender uma função de transformação não linear que mapeia vetores de palavras originais para um espaço vetorial respeitando essas restrições. A função de transformação é aprendida em uma configuração de aprendizado de métrica de similaridade usando a arquitetura de rede Triplet. Aplicamos nosso modelo a relações de sinonímia, antonímia e hipernímia no WordNet e observamos grandes ganhos no desempenho em relação aos modelos de distribuição originais, bem como outras abordagens de retrofit na tarefa de similaridade de palavras e melhora geral significativa na tarefa de detecção de vinculação lexical.', 'ja': '私たちは、知識リソースで利用可能な関係知識を活用して、単語の埋め込みを改善することができる新しい改造モデルを提示します。知識は、アンカーエンティティの文脈における関連エンティティと非関連エンティティの類似性を比較する関係不平等制約の観点から取り込まれる。これらの制約は、これらの制約を尊重して元の単語ベクトルをベクトル空間にマッピングする非線形変換関数を学習するための訓練データとして使用される。変換関数は、Tripletネットワークアーキテクチャを使用した類似性メトリック学習設定で学習されます。私たちは、私たちのモデルをWordNetの代名詞、反代名詞、超代名詞の関係に適用し、元の分布モデル、および単語類似性タスクの他の改造アプローチよりも大きなパフォーマンスの向上を観察し、辞書的巻き込み検出タスクの大幅な全体的な改善を観察しました。', 'hi': 'हम एक उपन्यास रेट्रोफिटिंग मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो शब्द एम्बेडिंग में सुधार करने के लिए ज्ञान संसाधन में उपलब्ध संबंधपरक ज्ञान का लाभ उठा सकता है। ज्ञान को संबंध असमानता बाधाओं के संदर्भ में कैप्चर किया जाता है जो एक लंगर इकाई के संदर्भ में संबंधित और असंबंधित संस्थाओं की समानता की तुलना करते हैं। इन बाधाओं का उपयोग एक गैर-रैखिक परिवर्तन फ़ंक्शन सीखने के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा के रूप में किया जाता है जो इन बाधाओं का सम्मान करने वाले वेक्टर स्पेस में मूल शब्द वैक्टर को मैप करता है। परिवर्तन फ़ंक्शन ट्रिपल नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करके एक समानता मीट्रिक लर्निंग सेटिंग में सीखा जाता है। हमने वर्डनेट में समानार्थक शब्द, विलोम और हाइपरनिमी संबंधों के लिए अपने मॉडल को लागू किया और मूल वितरण मॉडल के साथ-साथ शब्द समानता कार्य पर अन्य रेट्रोफिटिंग दृष्टिकोणों पर प्रदर्शन में बड़े लाभ देखे और लेक्सिकल अनिवार्यता का पता लगाने के कार्य पर महत्वपूर्ण समग्र सुधार किया।', 'zh': '我们建造一种新颖的模样,可以用知识资源中可用的关系改进词嵌入。 知以不等式约得之,其约束在锚上下文之中,较之不相关相似性。 此以练数学非线性易函数,当函数将原始词向量映射循向量间。 转换函数用 Triplet 网络体系结构相似度量学设中学者也。 宜用于 WordNet 之同义词、反义词、超义,而观其始之分布模型,单词相似性有改造之性大幅进,词汇蕴涵检而显改之。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новую модель модернизации, которая может использовать реляционные знания, доступные в ресурсе знаний, для улучшения вложений слов. Знания фиксируются в терминах ограничений неравенства отношений, которые сравнивают сходство связанных и несвязанных сущностей в контексте базовой сущности. Эти ограничения используются в качестве обучающих данных для изучения функции нелинейного преобразования, которая отображает исходные векторы слов в векторное пространство с учетом этих ограничений. Функция преобразования изучается в настройке обучения метрики подобия с использованием архитектуры триплетной сети. Мы применили нашу модель к синонимам, антонимам и гипернимическим отношениям в WordNet и наблюдали значительный рост производительности по сравнению с оригинальными дистрибутивными моделями, а также другие подходы к модернизации задачи сходства слов и значительное общее улучшение задачи обнаружения лексических последствий.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid múnla nua iarfheistithe i láthair ar féidir leis an eolas gaolmhar atá ar fáil in acmhainn eolais a ghiaráil chun leabú focal a fheabhsú. Gabhtar an t-eolas i dtéarmaí srianta éagothroime caidrimh a dhéanann comparáid idir cosúlachtaí eintiteas gaolmhar agus neamhghaolmhar i gcomhthéacs aonáin ancaire. Úsáidtear na srianta seo mar shonraí oiliúna chun feidhm chlaochlaithe neamhlíneach a fhoghlaim a mhapálann veicteoirí na bhfocal bunaidh go spás veicteora ag urramú na srianta sin. Foghlaimítear an fheidhm chlaochlaithe i suíomh foghlama méadrach cosúlachta ag baint úsáide as ailtireacht líonra Triplet. Chuireamar ár múnla i bhfeidhm ar chomhchiallaigh, ar fhrithchiallta agus ar chaidrimh hipirinimiceacha in WordNet agus chonaiceamar gnóthachain mhóra i bhfeidhmíocht thar na múnlaí dáileacháin bhunaidh chomh maith le cuir chuige iarfheistithe eile ar thasc cosúlachta focal agus feabhsú foriomlán suntasach ar thasc braite earcaíochta foclóireachta.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის რეტროფიცირების მოდელი, რომელიც შეუძლია გამოიყენება შესაძლებელი კონფიციონალური ცნობილებები, რომელიც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ ცნ ცნობიერება შეიძლება განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებების განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც შემდგომარებული და დაკავშირებული განსხვავებების განსხვავება კონტექსტში. ეს ზომილებები გამოყენებულია როგორც მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის, რომ გასწავლათ ნელინური ტრანფიგურაციის ფუნქცია, რომელიც ორიგინალური სიტყვის გვექტორის გაცე ტრანფიგურაციის ფუნქცია სწავლილია სწორეობის მეტრიკური სწავლის შესაძლებელად სამყარო ქსელის აქტიქტიკურაში. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის შესახებ სინონიმის, ანტონიმის და ჰიპერნიმის შესახებ WordNet-ში და ჩვენ დაახლოებით დიდი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობას პირველ დისტრიბუციალური მოდელის შესახებ, და სხვა განახლოების შესახებ სიტყვების სიტყვე', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy új utólagos beépítési modellt, amely képes kihasználni a tudásforrásokban elérhető kapcsolati ismereteket a szóbeágyazások javítására. A tudás olyan kapcsolati egyenlőtlenségi korlátozásokban szerepel, amelyek összehasonlítják a kapcsolódó és független entitások hasonlóságát egy horgony entitás kontextusában. Ezeket a korlátozásokat képzési adatként használják fel egy nemlineáris transzformációs függvény megtanulására, amely az eredeti szóvektorokat leképezi egy vektortérbe, figyelembe véve ezeket a korlátozásokat. A transzformációs függvényt hasonlósági metrikus tanulási beállítással tanuljuk meg a Triplet hálózati architektúrával. Modellünket a WordNet-ben alkalmaztuk a szinonimákra, antonimiára és hipernímiára vonatkozó kapcsolatokra, és jelentős teljesítménynövekedést figyeltünk meg az eredeti disztribúciós modellekhez képest, valamint a szóhasonlósági feladatokra vonatkozó egyéb utólagos megközelítésekhez képest, valamint a lexikai vonatkozások felismerésére vonatkozó feladatok jelentős általános javulását.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο αναπροσαρμογής που μπορεί να αξιοποιήσει τη σχετική γνώση διαθέσιμη σε έναν πόρο γνώσης για να βελτιώσει την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Η γνώση αποτυπώνεται με όρους περιορισμών ανισότητας σχέσεων που συγκρίνουν την ομοιότητα συνδεδεμένων και μη συνδεδεμένων οντοτήτων στο πλαίσιο μιας οντότητας αγκύρωσης. Αυτοί οι περιορισμοί χρησιμοποιούνται ως δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης για να μάθουν μια μη γραμμική συνάρτηση μετασχηματισμού που χαρτογραφεί τα αρχικά διανύσματα λέξεων σε ένα διανυσματικό χώρο που σέβεται αυτούς τους περιορισμούς. Η συνάρτηση μετασχηματισμού μαθαίνεται σε μια μετρική ρύθμιση μάθησης ομοιότητας χρησιμοποιώντας την αρχιτεκτονική δικτύου Τριπλό. Εφαρμόσαμε το μοντέλο μας στις σχέσεις συνώνυμης, αντωνυμίας και υπερνυμίας στο και παρατηρήσαμε μεγάλα κέρδη στην απόδοση σε σχέση με τα πρωτότυπα μοντέλα διανομής καθώς και άλλες προσεγγίσεις αναδόμησης στην εργασία ομοιότητας λέξεων και σημαντική συνολική βελτίωση στην εργασία ανίχνευσης λεξιλογικών συνεπειών.', 'it': "Presentiamo un nuovo modello di retrofit che può sfruttare le conoscenze relazionali disponibili in una risorsa di conoscenza per migliorare l'embedding di parole. La conoscenza è catturata in termini di vincoli di disuguaglianza di relazione che confrontano la somiglianza di entità correlate e non correlate nel contesto di un'entità di ancoraggio. Questi vincoli vengono utilizzati come dati di formazione per imparare una funzione di trasformazione non lineare che mappa i vettori di parole originali a uno spazio vettoriale rispettando questi vincoli. La funzione di trasformazione viene appresa in un'impostazione di apprendimento metrico di somiglianza utilizzando l'architettura di rete Triplet. Abbiamo applicato il nostro modello alle relazioni di sinonimia, antonimia e ipernimia in WordNet e abbiamo osservato grandi miglioramenti nelle prestazioni rispetto ai modelli distributivi originali, nonché altri approcci di retrofit sul compito di somiglianza delle parole e un significativo miglioramento complessivo sul compito di rilevamento dei implicamenti lessicali.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame naują modernizavimo model į, kuris gali sutelkti santykines žinias, turimas žinių ištekliuose, siekiant pagerinti žodžių įtraukimą. Žinios gaunamos atsižvelgiant į santykių nelygybės apribojimus, kurie lygina susijusių ir nesusijusių subjektų panašumą tvirtinimo subjekto kontekste. Šie apribojimai naudojami kaip mokymo duomenys, siekiant išsiaiškinti nelinijinės transformacijos funkciją, kuri nukreipia originalius žodžio vektorius į vektorių erdvę, atitinkančią šiuos apribojimus. Perkėlimo funkcija mokoma panašumo metrinio mokymosi aplinkoje naudojant Triplet tinklo architektūrą. Mes pritaikėme savo model į WordNet sinonimijos, antonimijos ir hipernimos santykiams ir pastebėjome didelį rezultatų pagerėjimą, palyginti su pradiniais platinimo modeliais, taip pat kitus metodus, taikomus žodžių panašumo užduotims ir reikšmingą bendrą lexinio įtraukimo nustatymo užduoties pagerėjimą.', 'kk': 'Біз сөздерді ендіру үшін білім ресурсында қатынастық білімдерді көмектесетін романдық қайта қалпына келтіру үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл білім сәйкестік шектеулерінің қатынасыз шектеулері, сәйкестік және сәйкестік емес бірліктердің ұқсастығын сәйкестік береді. Бұл шектеулер сызық емес түрлендіру функциясын оқыту үшін өзгертілген деректер ретінде қолданылады. Бұл шектеулерге сәйкес келетін вектор бос орынға сәйкес келетін сөздер Түрлендіру функциясы Triplet желі архитектурасын қолданатын метрикалық оқыту баптауында үйреніледі. Біз үлгімізді WordNet-де синонимиялық, антонимиялық және гипернимдік қатынастарына қолдандық және бастапқы үлгілер үшін жұмыс істеу үшін, сондай-ақ сөздердің ұқсас тапсырмасын қайта жасау және лексикалық қатынау тапсырмасының жал', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов модел за рестрофикација кој може да го искористи релативното знаење достапно во ресурс на знаење за подобрување на вградувањето на зборовите. Знаењето се фаќа во однос на ограничувањата на нееднаквоста кои ја споредуваат сличноста на поврзаните и неповрзаните ентитети во контекст на ентитетот на основа. Овие ограничувања се користат како податоци за обука за научување на нелинијарна функција на трансформација која ги мапира оригиналните вектори на зборови во векторен простор кој ги почитува овие ограничувања. The transformation function is learned in a similarity metric learning setting using Triplet network architecture.  Го применивме нашиот модел на синонимијата, анонимијата и хипернимиските односи во WordNet и забележавме големи зголемувања во перформансата во врска со оригиналните дистрибуционални модели, како и други ретрофигурирачки пристапи во задачата за сличност на зборовите и значително целокупно подобрување во задач', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model baru yang boleh menggunakan pengetahuan relatif yang tersedia dalam sumber pengetahuan untuk meningkatkan penerbangan perkataan. Pengetahuan ditangkap dalam terma keterangan ketidaksamaan hubungan yang membandingkan persamaan entiti berkaitan dan tidak berkaitan dalam konteks entiti penyancar. Hadangan ini digunakan sebagai data latihan untuk belajar fungsi pengubahan bukan-linear yang memetakan vektor perkataan asal ke ruang vektor yang menghormati halangan ini. Fungsi pengubahan belajar dalam tetapan pembelajaran metrik yang sama menggunakan arkitektur rangkaian Triplet. Kami melaksanakan model kami untuk hubungan sinonimi, antonimi dan hipernimi dalam WordNet dan mengamati keuntungan besar dalam prestasi atas model distribusi asal serta pendekatan retrofitting lain pada tugas persamaan perkataan dan peningkatan keseluruhan yang signifikan dalam tugas pengesan entailment leksikal.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പിന്തിരിച്ചുനിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് അറിവുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ലഭ്യമായ ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ  ഒരു ആങ്കോര്\u200d വസ്തുവിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ബന്ധമില്ലാത്ത ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരിധികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അറിവ് പിടിച്ച ഈ നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഈ നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങളെ ബഹുമാനിക്കുന്ന വെക്ടര്\u200d വെക് ട്രിപ്ളെറ്റ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു തുല്യമായ മെട്രിക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്ന മെറ വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റിലെ സിനോനിമി, ആന്റോനിമി, ഹൈപ്രെനിമി ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചു. ആദ്യമായ വിതരണ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് മീതെ വലിയ സമ്പത്തും നോക്കിയിരുന്നു. വാക്കിന', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw mudell ġdid ta’ retrofitting li jista’ jtejjeb l-għarfien relattiv disponibbli f’riżorsa ta’ għarfien biex itejjeb l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. L-għarfien jinqabad f’termini ta’ restrizzjonijiet fuq l-inugwaljanza fir-relazzjoni li jqabblu s-similarità ta’ entitajiet relatati u mhux relatati fil-kuntest ta’ entità ankrata. These constraints are used as training data to learn a non-linear transformation function that maps original word vectors to a vector space respecting these constraints.  Il-funzjoni ta’ trasformazzjoni titgħallem f’ambjent ta’ tagħlim metriku ta’ similarità bl-użu tal-arkitettura tan-netwerk Triplet. Applikajna l-mudell tagħna għar-relazzjonijiet sinonimiċi, antonimiċi u ipernimiċi f’WordNet u osservajna kisbiet kbar fil-prestazzjoni fuq mudelli ta’ distribuzzjoni oriġinali kif ukoll approċċi oħra ta’ retrofitting fuq kompitu ta’ similarità tal-kelma u titjib globali sinifikanti fuq kompitu ta’ individwazzjoni ta’ involviment lexiku.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit roman gjenopprettingsmodul som kan levera relasjonell kunnskap tilgjengeleg i ei kjenneressurs for å forbetra ordinnbygging. Kvitninga vert henta i forhold av ulikhetsbegrensningar for relasjon som sammenliknar liknande og ulevende einingar i konteksten av ein ankereentitet. Desse begrensene vert brukte som opplæringsdata for å lære ein ikkje-lineær transformasjonsfunksjon som karterer opprinnelege ordvektorar til ein vektorplass som respekterer desse begrensene. Transformeringsfunksjonen blir lært i eit ulikhetsmetrisk læring ved bruk av Triplet- nettverksarkitektur. Vi brukte modellen vårt til synonyme, antonyme og hypernymrelasjonar i WordNet og observerte store forskjeller i utføring over originale distribusjonsmodeller, og andre tilnærmingar på ordsimilaritet- oppgåve og signifikante overalt forbedringar på oppgåve for oppdaging av tekstinnstillingar.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowy model modernizacji, który może wykorzystać wiedzę relacyjną dostępną w zasobie wiedzy do poprawy osadzania słów. Wiedza ta jest uchwycona w kategoriach ograniczeń nierówności relacji, które porównują podobieństwo podmiotów powiązanych i niepowiązanych w kontekście jednostki kotwicącej. Ograniczenia te są używane jako dane treningowe do nauki nieliniowej funkcji transformacji, która mapuje oryginalne wektory słowa do przestrzeni wektorowej z uwzględnieniem tych ograniczeń. Funkcja transformacji uczy się w ustawieniu uczenia się metryki podobieństwa przy użyciu architektury sieciowej Triplet. Zastosowaliśmy nasz model do relacji synonimii, antonimii i hipernimii w WordNet i obserwowaliśmy duży wzrost wydajności w porównaniu z oryginalnymi modelami dystrybucyjnymi, jak również innymi podejściami modernizacyjnymi dotyczącymi zadania podobieństwa słów oraz znaczącą ogólną poprawę zadania wykrywania implikacji leksykalnej.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдлэгтэй баялаг дээр харилцааны мэдлэгийг ашиглах зохиолын дахин сэргээх загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Эдгээр мэдлэг нь холбоотой, холбоотой байгууллагуудын тухай харьцангуй тэгш байдалтай холбоотой байгууллагуудыг харьцуулдаг. Эдгээр хязгаарлууд нь шугам биш шугам шилжүүлэлтийн функцийг сурах боломжтой болгон хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ хязгаарлуудыг харах векторын орон зайд эхний үг векторын орон зайд газрын зураг зура Триплет сүлжээний архитектурыг ашиглан төстэй метрик суралцах хэмжээнд сурсан. Бид өөрсдийн загварыг WordNet-ийн синоним, антоним, гиперним харилцаанд ашиглаж, эхний хуваарилцааны загварын талаар ажиллагааны тулд олон ашиг гаргаж, мөн адилхан үйл ажиллагааны талаар бусад дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин шинэчлэх арга загварыг харсан.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un nou model de modernizare care poate valorifica cunoștințele relaționale disponibile într-o resursă de cunoaștere pentru a îmbunătăți încorporarea cuvintelor. Cunoștințele sunt capturate în termeni de constrângeri de inegalitate a relațiilor care compară similaritatea entităților conexe și neafiliate în contextul unei entități ancore. Aceste constrângeri sunt folosite ca date de instruire pentru a învăța o funcție de transformare non-liniară care cartografiază vectorii de cuvinte originale la un spațiu vectorial respectând aceste constrângeri. Funcția de transformare este învățată într-o setare de învățare metrică de similitudine folosind arhitectura rețelei Triplet. Am aplicat modelul nostru relațiilor de sinonimie, antonimie și hipernimie în WordNet și am observat câștiguri mari în performanță față de modelele distribuționale originale, precum și alte abordări de modernizare a sarcinilor de similitudine cu cuvinte și îmbunătățiri semnificative generale a sarcinii de detectare a implicărilor lexicale.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novi model za ponovno obnovivanje koji može uticati na odnose znanja dostupno u resursu znanja kako bi poboljšali uključenje reči. Znanje je uhvaćeno u smislu ograničenja veze sa jednakošću koja uspoređuje sličnost povezanih i nepovezanih entitata u kontekstu sidra. Ove ograničenja se koriste kao podaci za obuku kako bi naučili neolinearnu transformaciju funkciju koja mapira originalne rečne vektore na vektorski prostor poštujući ove ograničenja. Funkcija transformacije je naučena u podobnoj metričkoj nastavi učenja koristeći arhitekturu mreže Triplet a. Primijenili smo naš model na sinonimu, antonimiju i hipernimske odnose u WordNetu i posmatrali velike dobitke uspeha u izvođenju pored originalnih distribucijskih modela, kao i druge ponovne pristupe rečima o zadatku sličnosti i značajnom ukupnom poboljšanju na zadatku otkrivanja leksičkih želja.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදේශයක් පුළුවන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ දන්නවක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වචන දන්නවය සම්බන්ධතාවක් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් වලින් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සම්බන්ධ මේ සීමාව භාවිත කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරධානයක් නොලිනියර් වෙනස් වීක්ටර් වලට මුලින් වචන වෙක ත්\u200dරිප්ලෙට් ජාලය සංවිධානය භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සාමාන්\u200dයතාවක් මෙට්\u200dරික් සිද්ධානයක් ඉ අපි WordNet වල අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය, ඇන්ටෝනිමි සහ හිපර්නිමි සම්බන්ධතාවන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අනිත් ආපහු ප්\u200dර', 'so': "Waxaynu keennaa qaab sameynta warqada dib u qaadashada, kaas oo ku sameyn kara aqoonta xiriirka ee lagu helo nolosha aqoonta si uu u hagaajiyo hadalka kordhinta. Aqoonta waxaa lagu qaadaa xaduudaha aan sinnaanta lahayn ee isbarbardhiga alaabta la xiriira islamarkaasna aan la sharciyeeyn, marka ay ku jirto hay'adda bannaanta. These constraints are used as training data to learn a non-linear transformation function that maps original word vectors to a vector space respecting these constraints.  Shaqoyinka beddelka waxaa lagu bartaa wax u eg barashada tacliinta oo la isticmaalayo dhismaha shabakadda Triplet. Tusaale ahaan ayaannu u isticmaalnay sameynta iyo xiriirka qoyska ee WordNet, waxaynu aragnay faa'iido badan oo ku saabsan tusaalayaasha asalka ah, sidoo kale qaabilyo kale oo ku saabsan sameynta arimaha siman ee hadalka iyo hagaajinta shaqada aqoonta lexicka.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny eftermonteringsmodell som kan utnyttja relationell kunskap som finns tillgänglig i en kunskapsresurs för att förbättra ordinbäddningar. Kunskapen fångas in i termer av relations ojämlikhet begränsningar som jämför likhet mellan relaterade och icke-relaterade enheter i kontexten av en ankareenhet. Dessa begränsningar används som träningsdata för att lära sig en icke-linjär transformationsfunktion som kartlägger ursprungliga ordvektorer till ett vektorutrymme med respekt för dessa begränsningar. Transformationsfunktionen lär sig i en inlärningsinställning för likhetsmässig inlärning med hjälp av Triplet nätverksarkitektur. Vi tillämpade vår modell på synonym-, antonymi- och hypernymymrelationer i WordNet och observerade stora prestandaförbättringar jämfört med ursprungliga distributionsmodeller samt andra efteranpassningsmetoder på ordliknande uppgifter och betydande övergripande förbättring av lexikala involveringsdetekteringsuppgifter.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய பின்பற்ற மாதிரி கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது அறிவு மூலத்தில் தொடர்பு அறிவு கிடைக்கும். தொடர்பு சமமில்லாத கட்டுப்பாடுகளில் அறிவு பிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது தொடர்புடைய மற்றும் தீர்க்கப்படாத பொருளின் ஒப்பிடும இந்த கட்டுப்பாடு Name நாங்கள் வார்ட்நெட்டில் ஒத்திசைவு, ஒத்திசைநிலை மற்றும் மின்னணி தொடர்புகளை பயன்படுத்தினோம் மற்றும் முதல் பங்கீட்டு மாதிரிகளில் பெரிய விருப்பங்களை பார்த்தோம்', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نویس پھیرنے کی مدل پیش کرتا ہے جو ایک علم منبع میں حاصل ہونے والی معلومات کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ اس علم کی نسبت نابرابری کی محدودیت کے مطابق پکڑی جاتی ہے جو ایک لنگر انٹیٹی کے بارے میں رابطہ دار اور غیر رابطہ دار انٹیٹیوں کی برابری کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں. یہ محدودیت ڈیٹا کی تربیت کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ ان محدودیتوں کے بارے میں ایک غیر لینیاری تغییر فنقش کو سیکھنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں۔ تغییر فنس ایک مثالی میٹریک سیکھنے کے مطابق تیرپلٹ نیٹ ورک معماری کے استعمال سے سیکھا جاتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے مدل کو WordNet میں سینونیمی، آنٹنی اور ہیرنیمی رابطہ پر استعمال کیا اور اصلی تقسیم مدلکوں پر بہت بڑی فائدہ دیکھی اور دوسری باتوں کی سینونیتی کے کام پر دوبارہ تقسیم کرنے والی طریقے اور لکسیکی پیدا کرنے والی کام پر بہت اضافہ کیا۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình sửa đổi mới có thể sử dụng kiến thức liên quan trong một nguồn hiểu biết để cải thiện sự gắn bó từ. Sự hiểu biết được ghi về các giới hạn về sự thiếu hụt tương quan so sánh giống nhau giữa các thực thể liên quan và không liên quan trong trường hợp chủ chốt. Những giới hạn này được dùng làm dữ liệu huấn luyện để học một hàm chuyển đổi không tuyến mà vẽ đường cong từ gốc lên một không gian vector, tôn trọng các thiết bị này. Dịch vụ chuyển đổi được học trong một môi trường học mét tương tự nhờ cấu trúc ba mạng. Chúng tôi đã áp dụng phương pháp của chúng tôi cho các mối quan hệ đồng nghĩa, antonymy và hyperdonyy ở WordNet và quan sát sự tăng vọt trong khả năng của chúng tôi trên các mô hình phân phối gốc cũng như các phương pháp sửa đổi về công việc nét giống nhau từ và cải tiến quan trọng trong việc phát hiện thuyết trình.', 'uz': "Biz ma'lumot manbalarda bogʻ'liq maʼlumotni bajarish mumkin va so'zlarni bajarish mumkin. Bu haqida maʼlumot bogʻ'liqning balandligi bilan bog'liq va ma'lumot mavzularga bogʻ'liq maʼlumotni anchor quyidagi mavzuda kamaytirish mumkin. Ushbu tarkiblar maʼlumotni o'rganish uchun ishlatiladi. Ushbu tartiblarning asl so'zlar vectorlarini vector boʻsh joy bilan murojaat qilish uchun. Comment Biz OrdNetdagi synonymi, antonymi va hypernymi aloqalarini qo'llab keldik va asl tarqatish modellari bilan bajarish uchun katta muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rib chiqardik, va soʻzning bir xil vazifasi va leksikal ilmiy aniqlash vazifasida juda muhim muvaffaqiyatli yaxshi ko'rsatganmiz.", 'bg': 'Представяме нов модел за модернизиране, който може да използва релационните знания, налични в ресурс на знанието, за да подобри вграждането на думи. Познанията се улавят от гледна точка на ограниченията на отношението неравенство, които сравняват сходството на свързани и несвързани субекти в контекста на водещо същество. Тези ограничения се използват като тренировъчни данни за изучаване на нелинейна трансформационна функция, която картографира оригиналните вектори на думи към векторно пространство, спазвайки тези ограничения. Функцията за трансформация се научава в настройка за сходство метрично обучение с помощта на мрежова архитектура Триплет. Приложихме нашия модел към синонимните, антонимните и хипернимичните връзки в WordNet и наблюдавахме големи печалби в представянето спрямо оригиналните дистрибуционни модели, както и други подходи за модернизиране на задачата за сходство на думи и значително цялостно подобрение в задачата за откриване на лексикални обвързвания.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny eftermonteringsmodel, der kan udnytte relationel viden tilgængelig i en videnressource til at forbedre ordindlejringer. Viden indfanges i form af relationer ulighed begrænsninger, der sammenligner lighed mellem relaterede og ikke-relaterede enheder i sammenhæng med en anker enhed. Disse begrænsninger bruges som træningsdata til at lære en ikke-lineær transformationsfunktion, der kortlægger oprindelige ordvektorer til et vektorrum, der respekterer disse begrænsninger. Transformationsfunktionen læres i en lignende metrisk indstilling ved hjælp af Triplet netværksarkitektur. Vi anvendte vores model på synonym-, antonymi- og hypernymyforhold i WordNet og observerede store gevinster i ydeevne i forhold til originale distributionsmodeller samt andre eftermonteringstilgange på ordlighedsopgave og betydelig samlet forbedring af leksikalsk involveringsopgave.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo nov model obnovljivanja koji može utjecati na odnose znanja dostupno u resursu znanja kako bi poboljšali uključenje riječi. Znanja se uhvaćaju u smislu ograničenja veze s nejednakošću koja uspoređuje sličnost povezanih i nesavezanih subjekta u kontekstu čvorskog subjekta. Ove ograničenja se koriste kao podaci obuke kako bi naučili funkciju neolinearne transformacije koja mapira originalne riječne vektore u vektorskom prostoru s poštovanjem ovih ograničenja. Funkcija transformacije je naučena u podobnoj metričkoj nastavi učenja koristeći arhitekturu mreže Triplet. Primijenili smo naš model na sinonimu, antonimiju i hipernimu odnose na WordNet-u i posmatrali velike dobitke učinkovitosti nad originalnim distribucijskim modelima, kao i drugim ponovnim pristupima na zadatak sličnosti riječima i značajno ukupno poboljšanje zadataka za otkrivanje leksičkog želja.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuw retrofitting model dat relationele kennis die beschikbaar is in een kennisbron kan benutten om woordinbeddingen te verbeteren. De kennis wordt vastgelegd in termen van relatieongelijkheidsbeperkingen die overeenkomsten van verwante en niet-verwante entiteiten vergelijken in de context van een ankerentiteit. Deze beperkingen worden gebruikt als trainingsgegevens om een niet-lineaire transformatiefunctie te leren die originele woordvectoren toewijst aan een vectorruimte die deze beperkingen respecteert. De transformatiefunctie wordt geleerd in een vergelijkbare metrische leerinstelling met behulp van de Triplet-netwerkarchitectuur. We pasten ons model toe op synoniem-, antoniem- en hyperniemierelaties in WordNet en observeerden grote winsten in prestaties ten opzichte van originele distributiemodellen, evenals andere retrofittingbenaderingen op woordvergelijkingstaak en significante algemene verbetering op lexicale implicatiedetectietaak.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein neuartiges Retrofit-Modell, das relationales Wissen, das in einer Wissensressource verfügbar ist, nutzen kann, um Worteinbettungen zu verbessern. Das Wissen wird in Bezug auf Relationsungleichheitsbeschränkungen erfasst, die Ähnlichkeiten von verwandten und nicht verwandten Entitäten im Kontext einer Anker-Entität vergleichen. Diese Einschränkungen werden als Trainingsdaten verwendet, um eine nichtlineare Transformationsfunktion zu erlernen, die ursprüngliche Wortvektoren einem Vektorraum zuordnet, der diese Einschränkungen respektiert. Die Transformationsfunktion wird in einer ähnlichen metrischen Lernumgebung unter Verwendung der Triplet-Netzwerkarchitektur erlernt. Wir wandten unser Modell auf Synonymie-, Antonymie- und Hypernymiebeziehungen in WordNet an und beobachteten große Leistungszuwächse gegenüber originalen Verteilungsmodellen sowie andere Retrofitting-Ansätze für Wortähnlichkeitsaufgaben und signifikante Verbesserungen bei lexikalischen Implikationsdetektionsaufgaben.', 'ko': '우리는 지식 자원에서 사용할 수 있는 관계 지식을 이용하여 단어의 삽입을 개선할 수 있는 새로운 개선 모델을 제시했다.관계의 부등식 제약에 따라 지식을 얻는데 이런 제약은 닻실체 상하문에서 관련 실체와 상관없는 실체의 유사성을 비교한다.이러한 제약은 훈련 데이터로 비선형 변환 함수를 학습하는데 이 함수는 원시 단어의 벡터를 이러한 제약과 관련된 벡터 공간에 비추는 데 사용된다.변환 함수는 삼중 네트워크 구조의 유사성 도량 학습 환경에서 학습한다.우리는 우리의 모델을 WordNet의 동의어, 반의어와 초의어 관계에 응용하고 원시 분포 모델과 다른 개선 방법에 비해 이 모델이 단어 유사성 임무에서의 성능이 크게 향상되었고 어휘 내포 검측 임무에 현저한 전체적인 개선이 있음을 관찰했다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mtindo wa riwaya unaoweza kutumia maarifa yanayopatikana katika rasilimali ya maarifa ili kuboresha ujumbe wa maneno. Ufahamu unachukuliwa kwa sababu ya vikwazo vya usawa wa uhusiano unaohusiana na viungo vinavyofananisha sawa na vyombo vinavyohusiana na visivyo na ukweli katika mukhtadha wa taasisi ya mtaa. Uzuizi huu unatumiwa kama taarifa za mafunzo ili kujifunza funzo la mabadiliko yasiyo na msingi ambalo linaramani vectors asili kwenye nafasi ya vector kuheshimu vikwazo hivi. Funzo la mabadiliko linajifunza katika njia sawa ya kujifunza kwa kutumia ujenzi wa mitandao ya Triplet. Tulitumia muundo wetu kwa ajili ya ushirikiano, utangazaji na mahusiano ya umeme katika WordNet na kuona mafanikio makubwa katika kutekeleza mifano ya asili ya usambazaji, pamoja na namna nyingine za kurudisha upatikanaji wa maneno yanayofanana na kuboreshwa kwa ujumla juu ya kazi ya kutambua maarifa ya lexico.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل بازسازی رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند دانش رابطه\u200cای را در منابع دانش برای بهبود کردن کلمات تحویل دهد. این دانش به عنوان محدودیت نابرابری ارتباط گرفته می\u200cشود که شبیه مانند ارتباط\u200cهای ارتباط و ارتباط\u200cای در محیط یک ارتباط لنگر مقایسه می\u200cکند. این محدودیت به عنوان اطلاعات آموزش برای یاد گرفتن یک فعالیت تغییر غیر خطی استفاده می\u200cشود که ویکتورهای کلمه اصلی را به فضای ویکتوری با احترام این محدودیت نقشه می\u200cدهد. عملکرد تغییر دادن در یک تنظیم آموزش متریکی شبیه با استفاده از معماری شبکه تریپلت یاد گرفته می شود. ما مدل خود را به رابطه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cشناسی، آنتونی و هیپر\u200cنیمی در WordNet برخورد می\u200cکردیم، و برخورد بزرگی در اجرای مدل\u200cهای جدایی اصلی را در نظر گرفتیم، همچنین برخورد های دیگری که بر روی وظیفه شبیه\u200cشناسی کلمات، و بهترین عمومی در مورد وظیفه\u200cی شناسایی حرفه\u200cای بزرگ', 'tr': "Biz bir kitap taýýarlama nusgasyny görkezip edýäris ki, bilim resursy içinde ulamlyk bilgileri täsirleştirebilir. Bilim çykyş hasaplanýar we baglanmaýan guramlaryň barlagyny görä görä çykyş hasaplanýar. Bu şartlar lineer değişiklik fonksiyonu öğrenmek için eğitim verileri olarak kullanılır. Bu şartlar, orijinal kelime vektörleri bu şartlara saygı değerlendiren vektör uzayına harit ediyor. Triplet şebeke arhitekturyny ulanan bir metrik öwrenmek düzeninde üýtgedildi. Biz öz nusgymyzy WordNet'de synonymy, antonymy we hipernimi baglaýyşlara uygulapdyk we başlangyç daýlamak nusgalarynyň üstünde uly gazanlygyny we beýleki sözleriň meňzeşlikli zadynda ýene-de golaýlaşyklary we leksik taýýarlama täblisasynda örän köpräk gelişmeleri gözledik.", 'af': "Ons stel 'n roman herstelling model wat verwantlike kennis kan verwyder in 'n kennis hulpbron om woord inbetering te verbeter. Die kennis is ingevolge verhouding van ongelykheid beperking wat vergelyk gelykenis van verwante en onverwante entiteite in die konteks van 'n anker entiteit. Hierdie beheinings word gebruik as onderwerp data om 'n non- lineêre transformasie funksie te leer wat oorspronklike woord vektore na' n vektor spasie met respekteer van hierdie beheinings. Die transformasie funksie is geleer in 'n gelykenis metriese leer instelling gebruik Triplet netwerk arkitektuur. Ons het ons model aangepas na sinoniem, antonymie en hipernieme relasies in WordNet en groot verskaffings in uitvoering aangesien oor oorspronklike verspreidingsmodele en ander terugraffing toegang op woord gelykenis taak en betekeurige oorspronklike verbetering op leksiese opskrif opdrag.", 'sq': 'We present a novel retrofitting model that can leverage relational knowledge available in a knowledge resource to improve word embeddings.  Njohja kapet në lidhje me kufizimet e pabarazisë lidhur me marrëdhëniet që krahasojnë ngjashmërinë e njësive të lidhura dhe të pa lidhura në kontekstin e njësisë ankore. Këto kufizime përdoren si të dhëna të trajnimit për të mësuar një funksion transformimi jo-linear që harton vektorët origjinal të fjalës në një hapësirë vektori që respekton këto kufizime. The transformation function is learned in a similarity metric learning setting using Triplet network architecture.  We applied our model to synonymy, antonymy and hypernymy relations in WordNet and observed large gains in performance over original distributional models as well as other retrofitting approaches on word similarity task and significant overall improvement on lexical entailment detection task.', 'am': 'የአውቀት ዕውቀትን ለማሻሻል የሚችሉትን የግንኙነት እውቀት ለማድረግ የሚችለውን የረኀብ አዳራሽ ምሳሌ እናቀርባለን፡፡ The knowledge is captured in terms of relation inequality constraints that compare similarity of related and unrelated entities in the context of an anchor entity.  እነዚህ ግንኙነቶች በአዲስ ቃላት vectors ወደ vector ቦታ ለመማር የተጠቃሚ ዳታዎችን ለመማር ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ የውጤት መልዕክት በተስተካከለ ሚትሪክ ትምህርት በተጠቃሚ ትርጓሜ የመረጃ መሠረት ይማራል፡፡ በWordNet ውስጥ ሲንኒንያ፣ እና አፍሪሜ ግንኙነታችንን ለመጠየቅ እና በመጀመሪያው አካባቢ ሞዴላዎችን እና በንግግር በሚያስተካከል ስራ እና በሚያስተካከል ስራ ላይ ሌሎችን አካባቢ ስርዓት እና በሊክሲካዊ አዋቂነት የሚያሳውቀውን ስራ ለመጠቀም ትልቅ ሀብትን አየን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি উপন্যাস পুনরায় নির্বাচনী মডেল উপস্থাপন করেছি যা একটি জ্ঞানের সম্পর্কের জ্ঞানের মাধ্যমে পাওয়া যায়, যা শব্দ প্রবেশ সম্পর্কের সম্পর্কের বৈষম্য নিয়ন্ত্রণের মাধ্যমে জ্ঞান গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে যা সংশ্লিষ্ট এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট বস্তুর সমতুল্যের সাথে তুলনা কর এই নিয়ম প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে একটি অলাইনিয়ার পরিবর্তনের ফাংশন শিখতে যা মূল শব্দ ভেক্টরের মানচিত্র ভেক্টরের এই ন ট্রিপলেট নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে একই ধরনের মেট্রিক শিক্ষা বৈশিষ্ট্যে পরিবর্তনের ফাংশন শিখা হয়েছে। আমরা ওয়ার্ডনেটে সিনোনিমি, আন্তোনিমি এবং হাইপারেনিমি সম্পর্কের জন্য আমাদের মডেল প্রয়োগ করেছি এবং মূল বিতরণ মডেলের উপর বিশাল অর্জন দেখেছি এবং শব্দের একই ধরনের কাজের বিষয়ে অন্যান্য', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր վերամշակման մոդել, որը կարող է օգտագործել գիտելիքների միջոցով հասանելի հարաբերական գիտելիքները բառերի ներգրավման բարելավման համար: Գիտությունը գրանցվում է անհավասարության հարաբերության սահմանափակումների տեսքով, որոնք համեմատում են կապված և անկապված կազմակերպությունների նմանությունը կապված կազմակերպության կոնտեքստում: Այս սահմանափակումները օգտագործվում են որպես ուսումնասիրելու տվյալներ ոչ գծային վերափոխման ֆունկցիայի սովորելու համար, որը քարտեզագրում է սկզբնական բառերի վեկտորները այս սահմանափակումներին հարգեցող վեկտորի տարածքում: The transformation function is learned in a similarity metric learning setting using Triplet network architecture.  Մենք կիրառեցինք մեր մոդելը WordNet-ի սինոնիմիայի, անտոնիմիայի և հիպերնիմիայի հարաբերությունների համար և հետազոտեցինք արտադրողականության մեծ բարձրացումներ սկզբնական դիսփիլիզացիոն մոդելների վերաբերյալ, ինչպես նաև բառի նմանության խնդիրների վերափոխման այլ մոտեցումների և լե', 'az': "Biz bir yeni yenidən yenidən yenidən yenidən yenidən yenidən yenidən yenilənmək modelini göstəririk ki, elm qüdrətində əlaqəli bilgiləri fayda verə bilər, sözləri yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edə bilər. Bilim, müxtəlif müxtəlif müəyyənləşdirilməsi ilə əlaqədar və əlaqədar olmayan müəyyənləşdirilməsi ilə alınır. Bu müəyyənləşdirilmələr, bu müəyyənləşdirilmələrə baxmayan, linear olmayan transformasyon funksiyasını öyrənmək üçün təhsil məlumatları olaraq işlədilər. Transformasyon funksiyası Triplet a ğ arhitektarını kullanan metrik öyrənmə quruluşunda öyrənir. Bizim modelimizi WordNet'deki sinonimi, antonimi və hipernimi ilişkilərə uyguladıq və orijinal dağıtım modellərin üstündə böyük qazanışları gördük, bənzər sözlərin işləri ilə başqa tərzlərini yenidən dəyişdirmək və leksik tərzlərin keşfetməsi işində böyük tərzlərini göstərdik.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novi model za ponovno obnovljivanje koji može uticati na raspoloženje odnosanih znanja u resursu znanja kako bi poboljšali uključenje riječi. Znanja se uhvaćaju u smislu ograničenja veze s nejednakošću koja uspoređuje sličnost povezanih i nesavezanih entitata u kontekstu čvorskog entiteta. Ove ograničenja se koriste kao podaci za obuku kako bi naučili funkciju neolinearne transformacije koja mapira originalne rečne vektore u vektorskom prostoru s poštovanjem ovih ograničenja. Funkcija transformacije je naučena u području metričkog učenja koristeći arhitekturu mreže Triplet a. Primijenili smo naš model na sinonimu, antonimiju i hipernimu odnose na WordNet-u i posmatrali velike dobitke u učinkovitosti nad originalnim distribucijskim modelima, kao i drugim ponovnim pristupima na zadatak sličnosti riječima i značajno ukupno poboljšanje na zadatak otkrivanja leksičkih želja.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model retrofitting baru yang dapat menggunakan pengetahuan relatif yang tersedia dalam sumber pengetahuan untuk meningkatkan penerbangan kata. Pengetahuan ini ditangkap dalam terma hubungan ketidaksamaan batas yang membandingkan persamaan dari entitas yang berhubungan dan tidak berhubungan dalam konteks entitas jangkar. Kebatasan ini digunakan sebagai data latihan untuk belajar fungsi transformasi bukan linear yang memetakan vektor kata asli ke ruang vektor yang menghormati kebatasan ini. Fungsi transformasi dipelajari dalam pengaturan belajar metrik yang sama menggunakan arsitektur jaringan Triplet. We applied our model to synonymy, antonymy and hypernymy relations in WordNet and observed large gains in performance over original distributional models as well as other retrofitting approaches on word similarity task and significant overall improvement on lexical entailment detection task.', 'cs': 'Představujeme nový model modernizace, který může využít relační znalosti dostupné ve znalostním zdroji ke zlepšení vložení slov. Znalosti jsou zachyceny z hlediska omezení nerovnosti vztahů, které porovnávají podobnost příbuzných a nesouvisejících entit v kontextu kotevní entity. Tato omezení se používají jako tréninková data k naučení nelineární transformační funkce, která mapuje původní slovní vektory do vektorového prostoru, který respektuje tato omezení. Transformační funkce se naučí v učebním nastavení metriky podobnosti pomocí síťové architektury Triplet. Aplikovali jsme náš model na synonymické, antonymické a hypernymické vztahy ve WordNetu a pozorovali jsme velké zvýšení výkonu oproti originálním distribučním modelům a dalším retrofitingovým přístupům na úlohu podobnosti slov a výrazné celkové zlepšení lexikální úlohy detekce implikace.', 'ca': "We present a novel retrofitting model that can leverage relational knowledge available in a knowledge resource to improve word embeddings.  El coneixement es captura en termes de restriccions de desigualtat de relació que comparan la similitud d'entitats relacionades i no relacionades en el context d'una entitat anclada. These constraints are used as training data to learn a non-linear transformation function that maps original word vectors to a vector space respecting these constraints.  La funció de transformació s'aprene en un entorn d'aprenentatge mètric de similitud amb l'arquitectura de la xarxa Triplet. Vam aplicar el nostre model a les relacions de sinonimia, antonimia i hipernimia a WordNet i vam observar grans guanys en el rendiment sobre els models de distribució originals, com també altres enfocaments de retrofitament en la tasca de similitud de paraules i una millora significativa global en la tasca de detecció d'involucració lexical.", 'et': 'Esitleme uudset moderniseerimismudelit, mis võimaldab kasutada teadmiste ressursis kättesaadavaid suhtelisi teadmisi sõnade manustamise parandamiseks. Teadmised kogutakse seoste ebavõrdsuse piirangute põhjal, mis võrdlevad seotud ja sõltumatute üksuste sarnasust ankurüksuse kontekstis. Neid piiranguid kasutatakse koolitusandmetena mittelineaarse muundamise funktsiooni õppimiseks, mis kaardistab originaalsed sõnavaktorid vektoriruumi vastavalt nendele piirangutele. Ümberkujundamisfunktsiooni õppitakse sarnasuse meetrika õppeseadetes, kasutades Triplet võrguarhitektuuri. Rakendasime oma mudelit WordNetis sünonüümia-, antonüümia- ja hüpernüümiasuhetele ning täheldasime suurt tulemuslikkust võrreldes originaalsete distributsioonimudelitega, samuti teiste sõnassarnasuse ülesannete moderniseerimise lähenemisviisidega ning märkimisväärset üldist paranemist leksikaalse kaasamise tuvastamise ülesandes.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden jälkiasennusmallin, joka voi hyödyntää tietoresurssissa olevaa relaatiotietoa sanaupotusten parantamiseksi. Tieto kerätään suhteessa epätasa-arvon rajoituksina, jotka vertaavat toisiinsa liittyvien ja liittymättömien entiteettien samankaltaisuutta ankkurientiteetin kontekstissa. Näitä rajoituksia käytetään harjoitusdatana epälineaarisen muunnosfunktion oppimiseen, joka kartoittaa alkuperäiset sanavektorit vektoriavaruuteen näiden rajoitusten mukaisesti. Muutostoiminto opetetaan samankaltaisuusmetrisessä oppimisympäristössä käyttäen Triplet-verkkoarkkitehtuuria. Sovellimme malliamme synonyymi-, antonyymi- ja hypernyymisuhteisiin WordNetissä ja havaitsimme suuria parannuksia suorituskykyyn verrattuna alkuperäisiin jakelumalleihin sekä muihin jälkiasennusmenetelmiin sanasimilariteettitehtävässä ja merkittävää yleistä parannusta leksikaalisen osallisuuden tunnistustehtävään.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov model naknadne opreme, ki lahko izkoristi relacijsko znanje, ki je na voljo v viru znanja za izboljšanje vključevanja besed. Znanje je zajeto v smislu omejitev neenakosti odnosov, ki primerjajo podobnost povezanih in nepovezanih subjektov v kontekstu sidrnega subjekta. Te omejitve se uporabljajo kot podatki o usposabljanju za učenje nelinearne funkcije transformacije, ki mapira izvirne besedne vektorje v vektorski prostor ob upoštevanju teh omejitev. Funkcija transformacije se nauči v nastavitvi učenja podobnosti metričnega učenja z uporabo omrežne arhitekture Triplet. Naš model smo uporabili za sinonimske, antonimske in hipernimske relacije v WordNetu in opazili veliko povečanje učinkovitosti v primerjavi z originalnimi distribucijskimi modeli ter drugimi pristopi za naknadno opravljanje nalog podobnosti besed in znatno splošno izboljšanje naloge odkrivanja leksikalnih posledic.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani misali da za'a iya samar da fassarar da ilmi wanda ke iya samar da maganar da aka sani. An kãma wani ilmi cikin masu tsari da inganci na mazaɓa, wanda ke sammenliki da abubuwa masu hususan da kuma bã da haƙƙi a cikin mazan abun anchori. Wannan ƙuduran za'a yi amfani da su kamar data masu yin amfani da dõmin a sanar da wani aikin canza za'a-line, wanda yana karya shiryoyi na farko zuwa wani filin mai gaura da suka tsari wannan tsarin. An sanar da shirin canza cikin wani metric mai amfani da matric tsari na tsarin tsarin jerin Tebur. Mun amfani da misalinmu zuwa sunonini, antonimi da mazaɓa da surori a cikin `Net' kuma muka ga mafarinta mai girma a cikin mafarin misalin farko da sami masu motsi da wasu hanyoyin yin misalin na daidaita a kalma da kuma, ana sami babban gyãra a kan aikin kunnufi na fassarar kwamfyutan da aka sani na leksi.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk ing modèl nyebuti nggawe kelas kuwi tindakan cerêngconatan ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan kelas barang. Bilih string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Transformation Awak dhéwé wis aplikno model nambak karo sinanyomi, antanymi karo ipernyèm barêng nêmên karo word nete kuwi nggawe ndherek dhéwé gawe nguasai perusahaan anyar sampek iso nggawe tarjamahan tanggal nggawe nguasai winih dhéwé maburèh dumadhi kuwi tindakan layakno sampek lan akeh bantêr suarané nggawe gerakan wi', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་ཅིག་ལྟ་ཀློག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཁང་ཅིག་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་མཐུན་སྐྱེན The knowledge is captured in terms of relation to inequality constraints that compare comparison of related entities and unrelated entities in the context of an anchor entity. These constraints are used as training data to learn a non-linear transformation function that maps original word vectors to a vector space respecting these constraints. The transformation function is learned in a similarity metric learning setting using Triplet network architecture. We applied our model to synonymy, antonymy and hypernymy relations in WordNet and observed large gains in performance over original distributional models as well as other retrofitting approaches on word similarity task and significant overall improvement on lexical entailment detection task.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים מודל מחדש חדש שיכול להשתמש בידע מערכתי זמין במשאב ידע כדי לשפר את המילים. The knowledge is captured in terms of relation inequality constraints that compare similarity of related and unrelated entities in the context of an anchor entity.  ההגבלות האלה משתמשות בתור נתונים אימונים כדי ללמוד פונקציית שינוי לא לינרית שמאפה ווקטורים מילים מקוריים לחלל ווקטורים שמכבד את ההגבלות האלה. הפונקציה של השינוי נלמדת באמצעות סדרת לימוד מטרית דומה באמצעות ארכיטקטורת רשת טריפלט. שימשנו את המודל שלנו למערכת יחסים סינונימיה, אנטונימיה וההיפרנימיה בוורדנט והצפינו בהצלחה גדולה על מודלים פיצועים מקוריים, כמו גם גישות אחרות על משימה דומה למילים ושיפור כללי משמעותי על משימת זיהוי התערבות הלקסית.'}
{'en': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'تعدين العلاقات المعجمية في حفلات الزفاف العصبية', 'fr': 'Exploration des relations lexicales dans les intégrations de mots neuronaux', 'es': 'Minería de relaciones léxicas en incrustaciones de palabras neuronales', 'pt': 'Mineração de relações léxicas em incorporações de palavras neurais', 'ja': '神経ワード埋め込みにおける語彙関係マイニング', 'zh': '神经词嵌中词法关掘', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग में लेक्सिकल संबंध खनन', 'ru': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'ga': 'Mianadóireacht an Chaidrimh Fhoclóra i Leabú Focal Néarach', 'hu': 'Lexikus kapcsolat bányászat idegi szóbeágyazásokban', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εξόρυξη Λεξικών Σχέσεων σε Ενσωματώσεις Νευρικών Λέξεων', 'it': 'Mining di relazione lessica in embeddings di parole neurali', 'kk': 'Нейралық сөз ендірімінде лексикалық қатынас бағалау', 'lt': 'Lexical Relations Mining in Neural Word Embedding', 'mk': 'Менување на лексикални односи во вградувањата на неврални зборови', 'ms': 'Pertambangan Hubungan Leksikal dalam Penjelmaan Kata Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്', 'mt': 'Minjieri b’Relazzjoni Lessika f’Embeddings ta’ Kliem Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл үг нэвтрүүлэхэд сэтгэл харилцаа багасгах', 'no': 'Leksiske relasjonsmining i nøyrale ordinnbygging', 'pl': 'Wydobywanie relacji leksykalnych w osadzaniu słów neuronowych', 'ro': 'Mining de relații lexicale în încorporarea cuvintelor neurale', 'sr': 'Leksičko rudarstvo odnosa u neuralne reči', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Lexical Relations Mining in Neural Word Emails', 'sv': 'Mining av Lexical Relation i Neural Word Embeddings', 'ur': 'نئرل ورڈ انڈینگ میں لکسیکس رابطہ مینینگ', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ khai thác ngôn ngữ thần kinh', 'bg': 'Пробиване на лексикални взаимоотношения в неврални слова', 'da': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'hr': 'Leksičko rudarstvo odnosa u neuralne riječi', 'nl': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'de': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'id': 'Pertambangan Hubungan Lexik dalam Pencampuran Kata Neural', 'ko': '신경어 삽입 중의 어휘 관계 발굴', 'fa': 'ذخیره رابطه\u200cهای درمانی در جمع کلمات عصبی', 'sw': 'Kuhusiana na Kilexico', 'tr': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sq': 'Marrëdhënie Lexike Mining në Embedding Words Neural', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Name', 'hy': 'Նյարդային բառերի ներգրավման մեջ լեքսիկական հարաբերությունների քանդումը', 'az': 'N√∂ral Kelimin ńįfad…ôl…ôrind…ô ńįliŇüki ńįliŇükil…ôri', 'bn': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'bs': 'Leksičko rudarstvo odnosa u neuralne riječi', 'ca': "La mineria de relacions lècsiques en l'incorporació de paraules neuronals", 'cs': 'Lexické dolování vztahů v vložení neuronových slov', 'et': 'Lexikaalsete suhete kaevandamine neurosõnade manustamises', 'fi': 'Lexical Relation Mining in Neural Word Embeddings', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Rudarjenje leksičnih odnosov v nevralnih besedilih', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་རྐྱེན་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་', 'he': 'מינוי יחסים לקסיים בתכנית מילים נוירות', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink'}
{'en': 'Work with neural word embeddings and lexical relations has largely focused on confirmatory experiments which use human-curated examples of semantic and syntactic relations to validate against. In this paper, we explore the degree to which lexical relations, such as those found in popular validation sets, can be derived and extended from a variety of neural embeddings using classical clustering methods. We show that the Word2Vec space of word-pairs (i.e., offset vectors) significantly outperforms other more contemporary methods, even in the presence of a large number of noisy offsets. Moreover, we show that via a simple nearest neighbor approach in the offset space, new examples of known relations can be discovered. Our results speak to the amenability of offset vectors from non-contextual neural embeddings to find semantically coherent clusters. This simple approach has implications for the exploration of emergent regularities and their examples, such as emerging trends on social media and their related posts.', 'es': 'El trabajo con incrustaciones de palabras neuronales y relaciones léxicas se ha centrado en gran medida en experimentos confirmatorios que utilizan ejemplos curados por humanos de relaciones semánticas y sintácticas para validar. En este artículo, exploramos el grado en que las relaciones léxicas, como las que se encuentran en los conjuntos de validación populares, se pueden derivar y extender a partir de una variedad de incrustaciones neuronales utilizando métodos clásicos de agrupamiento. Mostramos que el espacio Word2Vec de pares de palabras (es decir, vectores de desplazamiento) supera significativamente a otros métodos más contemporáneos, incluso en presencia de un gran número de desplazamientos ruidosos. Además, mostramos que a través de un enfoque simple de vecino más cercano en el espacio desplazado, se pueden descubrir nuevos ejemplos de relaciones conocidas. Nuestros resultados hablan de la facilidad de los vectores de compensación de incrustaciones neuronales no contextuales para encontrar clústeres semánticamente coherentes. Este enfoque simple tiene implicaciones para la exploración de las regularidades emergentes y sus ejemplos, como las tendencias emergentes en las redes sociales y sus publicaciones relacionadas.', 'fr': "Le travail avec les intégrations de mots neuronaux et les relations lexicales s'est largement concentré sur des expériences de confirmation qui utilisent des exemples de relations sémantiques et syntaxiques sélectionnés par l'homme pour valider par rapport à. Dans cet article, nous explorons la mesure dans laquelle les relations lexicales, telles que celles que l'on trouve dans les ensembles de validation courants, peuvent être dérivées et étendues à partir d'une variété d'intégrations neuronales à l'aide de méthodes classiques de clustering. Nous montrons que l'espace Word2Vec des paires de mots (c.-à-d. vecteurs de décalage) surpasse de manière significative les autres méthodes plus contemporaines, même en présence d'un grand nombre de décalages bruités. De plus, nous montrons que via une simple approche du plus proche voisin dans l'espace décalé, de nouveaux exemples de relations connues peuvent être découverts. Nos résultats parlent de l'aptitude des vecteurs de décalage à partir d'intégrations neuronales non contextuelles pour trouver des agrégats sémantiquement cohérents. Cette approche simple a des implications pour l'exploration des régularités émergentes et de leurs exemples, tels que les tendances émergentes sur les réseaux sociaux et leurs publications connexes.", 'ar': 'ركز العمل مع تضمين الكلمات العصبية والعلاقات المعجمية إلى حد كبير على التجارب التأكيدية التي تستخدم أمثلة برعاية الإنسان للعلاقات الدلالية والنحوية للتحقق من صحتها. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف الدرجة التي يمكن عندها اشتقاق العلاقات المعجمية ، مثل تلك الموجودة في مجموعات التحقق من الصحة الشائعة ، وتوسيع نطاقها من مجموعة متنوعة من التضمينات العصبية باستخدام طرق التجميع الكلاسيكية. نوضح أن مساحة Word2Vec لأزواج الكلمات (أي متجهات الإزاحة) تتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب الأخرى الأكثر حداثة ، حتى في وجود عدد كبير من الإزاحات الصاخبة. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أنه من خلال نهج بسيط أقرب الجار في مساحة الإزاحة ، يمكن اكتشاف أمثلة جديدة للعلاقات المعروفة. تتحدث نتائجنا عن قابلية نواقل الإزاحة من الزخارف العصبية غير السياقية للعثور على مجموعات متماسكة لغويًا. هذا النهج البسيط له آثار على استكشاف الانتظامات الناشئة وأمثلةها ، مثل الاتجاهات الناشئة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي والمنشورات ذات الصلة.', 'pt': 'O trabalho com incorporações de palavras neurais e relações lexicais se concentrou amplamente em experimentos confirmatórios que usam exemplos curados por humanos de relações semânticas e sintáticas para validar. Neste artigo, exploramos o grau em que as relações lexicais, como as encontradas em conjuntos de validação populares, podem ser derivadas e estendidas de uma variedade de embeddings neurais usando métodos clássicos de agrupamento. Mostramos que o espaço Word2Vec de pares de palavras (ou seja, vetores de deslocamento) supera significativamente outros métodos mais contemporâneos, mesmo na presença de um grande número de deslocamentos ruidosos. Além disso, mostramos que, por meio de uma abordagem simples do vizinho mais próximo no espaço de deslocamento, novos exemplos de relações conhecidas podem ser descobertos. Nossos resultados falam sobre a capacidade de vetores de deslocamento de incorporações neurais não contextuais para encontrar clusters semanticamente coerentes. Essa abordagem simples tem implicações para a exploração de regularidades emergentes e seus exemplos, como tendências emergentes nas mídias sociais e seus posts relacionados.', 'ja': 'ニューラルワード埋め込みと語彙関係の研究は、人間が開発した意味論的および構文論的関係の例を使用して検証する確認実験に主に焦点を当ててきた。 本稿では、古典的なクラスタリング手法を用いて、一般的な検証セットに見られるような語彙関係が、様々なニューラル埋め込みから導き出され、拡張できる程度を探る。 我々は、ワードペア（すなわち、オフセットベクトル）のWord 2 Vec空間が、多数のノイズのあるオフセットが存在しても、他のより現代的な方法よりも著しく優れていることを示している。 さらに、オフセット空間における単純な最寄りの隣接アプローチを介して、既知の関係の新しい例を発見することができることを示している。 私たちの結果は、意味的にコヒーレントなクラスタを見つけるための非文脈的な神経埋め込みからのオフセットベクトルの安定性を示しています。 この単純なアプローチは、ソーシャルメディア上の新たな傾向や関連する投稿など、緊急の規則性とその例の探求に影響を与えます。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग और लेक्सिकल संबंधों के साथ काम ने काफी हद तक पुष्टित्मक प्रयोगों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है जो के खिलाफ मान्य करने के लिए शब्दार्थ और वाक्यात्मक संबंधों के मानव-क्यूरेटेड उदाहरणों का उपयोग करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम उस डिग्री का पता लगाते हैं, जिस पर लेक्सिकल संबंध, जैसे कि लोकप्रिय सत्यापन सेट में पाए जाने वाले, शास्त्रीय क्लस्टरिंग विधियों का उपयोग करके विभिन्न प्रकार के तंत्रिका एम्बेडिंग से व्युत्पन्न और विस्तारित किए जा सकते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि शब्द-जोड़े (यानी, ऑफसेट वैक्टर) का Word2Vec स्थान अन्य अधिक समकालीन तरीकों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है, यहां तक कि बड़ी संख्या में शोर ऑफसेट की उपस्थिति में भी। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि ऑफसेट स्पेस में एक सरल निकटतम पड़ोसी दृष्टिकोण के माध्यम से, ज्ञात संबंधों के नए उदाहरणों की खोज की जा सकती है। हमारे परिणाम गैर-प्रासंगिक तंत्रिका एम्बेडिंग से ऑफसेट वैक्टर की amenability से बात करने के लिए शब्दार्थ सुसंगत समूहों को खोजने के लिए. इस सरल दृष्टिकोण में आकस्मिक नियमितताओं और उनके उदाहरणों की खोज के लिए निहितार्थ हैं, जैसे कि सोशल मीडिया और उनके संबंधित पदों पर उभरते रुझान।', 'zh': '神经词嵌词汇之事,在于实验,实验用人之语义句法示例验之。 本文之中,讨论用经聚类法从诸神经嵌中导出与广词法相关(如流行之验集见词法)。 吾言字对Word2Vec空间(即偏移量)显优于他更现代之法,虽有大噪声偏移亦然。 又明偏移间近邻之法,见已知之新示例。 究其非上下文神经嵌偏移向量之适应性,以得语义贯之集群。 其法有急道,示例有大义,社交媒体关帖上之新兴也。', 'ru': 'Работа с нейронными вложениями слов и лексическими отношениями в значительной степени сосредоточена на подтверждающих экспериментах, в которых используются человеческие примеры семантических и синтаксических отношений для проверки против. В этой статье мы исследуем степень, в которой лексические отношения, такие как те, которые встречаются в популярных наборах валидации, могут быть выведены и расширены из различных нейронных вложений с использованием классических методов кластеризации. Показано, что пространство словесных пар Word2Vec (т.е. векторов смещения) значительно превосходит другие более современные методы, даже при наличии большого количества шумных смещений. Более того, мы показываем, что с помощью простого подхода ближайшего соседа в офсетном пространстве могут быть обнаружены новые примеры известных отношений. Наши результаты говорят об удобстве смещения векторов от неконтекстуальных нейронных вложений для нахождения семантически когерентных кластеров. Этот простой подход имеет последствия для изучения возникающих закономерностей и их примеров, таких как формирующиеся тенденции в социальных сетях и связанные с ними посты.', 'ga': 'Dhírigh obair le neadú focal néarach agus caidreamh foclóireachta den chuid is mó ar thurgnaimh dheimhniúcháin a úsáideann samplaí daonna-choimeádaithe de chaidreamh séimeantach agus comhréire chun a bhailíochtú. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar a mhéid is féidir caidreamh foclóireachta, cosúil leis na cinn a fhaightear i dtacar bailíochtaithe a bhfuil móréilimh orthu, a dhíorthú agus a leathnú ó éagsúlacht de leabú néarúil ag baint úsáide as modhanna cnuasaithe clasaiceacha. Léirímid go sáraíonn spás Word2Vec de phéirí focal (i.e., veicteoirí fritháireamh) modhanna eile níos comhaimseartha go mór, fiú agus líon mór fritháirimh fhuaimiúla i láthair. Ina theannta sin, léirímid, trí chur chuige simplí comharsan is gaire sa spás fritháirimh, gur féidir teacht ar shamplaí nua de chaidreamh aitheanta. Labhraíonn ár dtorthaí le taitneamhacht veicteoirí fhritháireamh ó leabaithe néaracha neamhchomhthéacsúla chun braislí atá comhleanúnach go séimeantach a aimsiú. Tá impleachtaí ag an gcur chuige simplí seo maidir le hiniúchadh a dhéanamh ar rialtachtaí éiritheacha agus a gcuid samplaí, mar threochtaí atá ag teacht chun cinn ar na meáin shóisialta agus na poist a bhaineann leo.', 'ka': 'სამუშაო ნეიროლური სიტყვებით დაყენება და ლექსიკალური შესახებით მნიშვნელოვანი ექსპერიმენტებით, რომლებიც ადამიანის გაკეთებული სიმპანტიკური და სინტაქტიკური შესახებ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვაკვირდებით რამდენიმე ლექსიკალური შესახებ, როგორც პოლიპური გადაწყვეტილების კოლექტირებში, შეგვიძლია განვითარება და გავარგება განსხვავებული ნეიროლური შესახებ კ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ Word2Vec სიტყვების სამყარო (მაგალითად, offset vektorების) უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სხვა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მეტოვები, მაგრამ უფრო დიდი სიტყვების მომავლობაში. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ უფრო მხოლოდ დაბრუნებული საზოგადო დახმარებით, ახალი გამოცნობების მაგალითები შეიძლება აღმოჩენა. ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა უფრო კონტექსტური ნეიროლური ინბიდნეციებისგან, რომლებიც სენმანტიკურად კონტექსტური კლასტერისგან შესაძლებელია ეს მარტივი პროგორმაცია აქვს შემდეგ განსხვავებას და მათი მაგალითების განსხვავებას, როგორც საზოგადო მედიაში და მათი დაკავშირებული პროგორმაციების განსხვავებას.', 'el': 'Η εργασία με την ενσωμάτωση νευρωνικών λέξεων και λεξικών σχέσεων έχει επικεντρωθεί σε μεγάλο βαθμό σε επιβεβαιωτικά πειράματα που χρησιμοποιούν παραδείγματα σημασιολογικών και συντακτικών σχέσεων από τον άνθρωπο για να επικυρωθούν. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε τον βαθμό στον οποίο οι λεξικές σχέσεις, όπως αυτές που βρίσκονται σε δημοφιλή σύνολα επικύρωσης, μπορούν να αντληθούν και να επεκταθούν από μια ποικιλία νευρικών ενσωμάτωσης χρησιμοποιώντας κλασικές μεθόδους ομαδοποίησης. Δείχνουμε ότι ο χώρος των ζευγαριών λέξεων (δηλαδή των διανυσμάτων μετατόπισης) ξεπερνά σημαντικά άλλες πιο σύγχρονες μεθόδους, ακόμη και με την παρουσία μεγάλου αριθμού θορυβωδών μετατόπισης. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι μέσω μιας απλής προσέγγισης πλησιέστερου γείτονα στον χώρο μετατόπισης, μπορούν να ανακαλυφθούν νέα παραδείγματα γνωστών σχέσεων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας μιλούν για τη δυνατότητα των διανυσμάτων μετατόπισης από μη-περιεκτικές νευρωνικές ενσωματώσεις για την εύρεση σημασιολογικά συνεκτικών σμήνων. Αυτή η απλή προσέγγιση έχει επιπτώσεις στην εξερεύνηση των αναδυόμενων τακτικών καταστάσεων και των παραδειγμάτων τους, όπως οι αναδυόμενες τάσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και τις σχετικές δημοσιεύσεις τους.', 'hu': 'A neurális szóbeágyazásokkal és lexikális kapcsolatokkal végzett munka nagyrészt a megerősítő kísérletekre összpontosított, amelyek a szemantikai és szintaktikus kapcsolatok emberi példáit használják fel a validáláshoz. Ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy milyen mértékben lehet lexikai kapcsolatokat származtatni és kiterjeszteni különböző idegi beágyazásokból klasszikus klaszterezési módszerekkel. Megmutatjuk, hogy a szópárok Word2Vec tére (azaz offset vektorok) jelentősen felülmúlja más kortárs módszereket, még nagy számú zajos offset jelenlétében is. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy egy egyszerű legközelebbi szomszédos megközelítéssel az eltolódási térben új példákat fedezhetünk fel ismert kapcsolatokra. Eredményeink arra utalnak, hogy a nem kontextuális neurális beágyazásokból származó offset vektorok képesek szemantikailag koherens klasztereket találni. Ennek az egyszerű megközelítésnek következményei vannak a felmerülő rendszerességek és azok példáinak feltárására, mint például a közösségi médiában megjelenő trendek és a kapcsolódó posztok.', 'it': "Il lavoro con incorporazioni neurali di parole e relazioni lessicali si è concentrato in gran parte su esperimenti di conferma che utilizzano esempi umani di relazioni semantiche e sintattiche per convalidare contro. In questo articolo, esploriamo il grado in cui le relazioni lessicali, come quelle trovate nei set di convalida popolari, possono essere derivate ed estese da una varietà di incorporazioni neurali utilizzando metodi di clustering classici. Mostriamo che lo spazio Word2Vec delle coppie di parole (cioè vettori offset) supera significativamente altri metodi più contemporanei, anche in presenza di un gran numero di offset rumorosi. Inoltre, mostriamo che attraverso un semplice approccio vicino più vicino nello spazio offset, si possono scoprire nuovi esempi di relazioni conosciute. I nostri risultati parlano della disponibilità di vettori offset da incorporazioni neurali non contestuali per trovare cluster semanticamente coerenti. Questo semplice approccio ha implicazioni per l'esplorazione delle regolarità emergenti e dei loro esempi, come le tendenze emergenti sui social media e i loro post correlati.", 'kk': 'Невралды сөздерді ендіру және лексикалық қатынастармен жұмыс істеу үшін адамның синтактикалық қатынастарының мәселелерін қолдану үшін құптау тәжірибелеріне көбірек көмектеседі. Бұл қағазда, біз лексикалық қатынастарды зерттеп, мысалы, көпшілікті тексеру баптауларында табылған, классикалық кластерлік әдістерімен түрлі невралдық ендіру әдістерінен шығарылады. Біз Word2Vec сөздердің екі бос орын (т.е. офсет векторлары) басқа қазіргі әдістерді бірнеше көп дыбыс офсеттер болып тұрады деп көрсетедік. Сонымен қатар, біз оффистік орындағы ең жақын қосымшалар арқылы жаңа мәселелер табылады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз симантикалық соғысты кластерді табу үшін контекстуалды невралдық ендіру векторларының ауыстыру мүмкіндігімен сөйлейді. Бұл қарапайым тәртібі, социалдық медиақтардың және оның қатынастығы жаңа тәртіптерін зерттеу үшін әсер етеді.', 'lt': 'Darbas su nerviniais žodžiais ir leksiniais santykiais daugiausia sutelkė dėmesį į patvirtinamuosius eksperimentus, kurie naudoja žmogaus gydytus semantinių ir sintaksinių santykių pavyzdžius, kad būtų patvirtinti prieš juos. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame, kokiu mastu lexiniai santykiai, kaip antai tie, kurie yra populiariuose patvirtinimo rinkiniuose, gali būti gaunami ir išplėsti iš įvairių nervų įterpimų taikant klasikinius klasifikavimo metodus. We show that the Word2Vec space of word-pairs (i.e., offset vectors) significantly outperforms other more contemporary methods, even in the presence of a large number of noisy offsets.  Be to, mes rodome, kad taikant paprastą artimiausią kaimyninį požiūrį kompensacinėje erdvėje galima rasti naujų žinomų santykių pavyzdžių. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad kompensaciniai vektoriai, gaunami iš nekonsekcinių nervų įterpimų, yra lengvi rasti semantiškai nuoseklius grupes. Šis paprastas požiūris turi įtakos išnagrinėjant atsirandančius reguliarumo atvejus ir jų pavyzdžius, pavyzdžiui, atsirandančias socialinės žiniasklaidos tendencijas ir susijusias pareigas.', 'mk': 'Работата со нервните зборови и лексикалните односи се фокусираше во голема мера на конфирмативните експерименти кои користат примери од семантични и синтактички односи за да се потврдат против. Во овој весник, го истражуваме степенот до кој лексикалните односи, како што се оние што се најдени во популарните валидациски сети, можат да бидат изведени и проширени од различни нервни вградувања користејќи класични методи на групирање. Ние покажуваме дека Word2Vec просторот на зборови парови (т.е., отстранети вектори) значително надминува други посовремени методи, дури и во присуство на голем број гласни отстранувања. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека преку едноставен најблиски соседски пристап во надворешниот простор, може да се откријат нови примери на познати односи. Нашите резултати зборуваат за способноста на отстранувачките вектори од неконтекстни нервни вградувања за да најдеме семантички коерентни кластери. Овој едноставен пристап има импликации за истражувањето на појавните регуларности и нивните примери, како што се појавните трендови на социјалните медиуми и нивните поврзани места.', 'ms': 'Bekerja dengan penyambungan perkataan saraf dan hubungan leksikal telah fokus pada percubaan pengesahan yang menggunakan contoh-contoh manusia-curated hubungan semantik dan sintaktik untuk sahkan terhadap. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi darjah hubungan leksik, seperti yang ditemui dalam set pengesahihan populer, boleh dihimpunkan dan diperluaskan dari berbagai pelbagai bentuk saraf menggunakan kaedah kelasukan klasik. We show that the Word2Vec space of word-pairs (i.e., offset vectors) significantly outperforms other more contemporary methods, even in the presence of a large number of noisy offsets.  Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bahawa melalui pendekatan tetangga yang paling sederhana dalam ruang ofset, contoh baru hubungan yang diketahui boleh ditemui. Hasil kita bercakap dengan kemampuan vektor ofset dari penyambungan saraf bukan-kontekstual untuk mencari kumpulan semantik yang konsisten. Pendekatan sederhana ini mempunyai implikasi untuk mengeksplorasi regularitas yang muncul dan contoh-contoh mereka, seperti trends muncul pada media sosial dan pos yang berkaitan mereka.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങളുമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് മിക്കവാറായി ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ സെറ്റുകളില്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയവര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പുരുഷ വാര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്കിന്റെ വാര്\u200dഡ്-ജോട്ടുകളുടെ (ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെ ഓഫ്സറ്റ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200dസ്) മറ്റു നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തു അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഓഫ്സെറ്റ് സ്ഥലത്ത് അടുത്ത അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ അടുത്ത അടുത്ത അടുത്ത സമ്മാനം മുഖേന,  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് നിലവിലില്ലാത്ത നെയൂറല്\u200d അകത്തുനിന്നുള്ള വെക്ടറുകളുടെ അസാധ്യതയോടെയാണ്. ഈ എളുപ്പമുള്ള നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും അവയുടെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പ്രശ്നമുണ്ട്, സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയില്\u200d നിന്നും അവരുടെ ബന്', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл зүй үгнээс хамтран ажиллах нь хүн төрөлхтний шинжлэх ухаан болон синтактикийн харилцааны жишээг ашиглах зэрэг тодорхойлдог туршилтууд дээр ихэвчлэн төвлөрсөн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэдэн лексикийн харилцааны талаар судалж, олон хүн төрөлхтний шинжлэх ухаанд олсон хүмүүс олон төрлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлөөс нэмэгдүүлж чадна. Бид Word2Vec хэлбэрийн орон зай (яг одоогийн офсет векторууд) өөр орчин үеийн аргыг илүү олон чимээгүй офсет байхдаа илүү чухал болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид оффис орон зайд хамгийн ойрхон хөрш ойлголтын аргаар мэддэг харилцааны шинэ жишээ нээлттэй болно. Бидний үр дүнд нөхцөл байдлын биш байдлын мэдрэлийн солилцооны векторуудын тусламжтай ярьдаг. Энэ энгийн арга баримтууд нийгмийн хэвлэл болон харилцааны хувилбаруудын судалгаанд нөлөөлдөг.', 'mt': 'Il-ħidma bl-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem newrali u r-relazzjonijiet lexiċi ffukat fil-biċċa l-kbira fuq esperimenti konfermatorji li jużaw eżempji kkurati mill-bniedem ta’ relazzjonijiet semantiċi u sintattiċi biex jivvalidaw kontra. F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw sa liema punt ir-relazzjonijiet lexiċi, bħal dawk li jinsabu f’settijiet ta’ validazzjoni popolari, jistgħu jiġu derivati u estiżi minn varjetà ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet newrali bl-użu ta’ metodi klassiċi ta’ raggruppament. Aħna nuru li l-ispazju Word2Vec ta’ pari ta’ kliem (jiġifieri, vetturi ta’ offset) huwa sinifikattivament akbar minn metodi oħra aktar kontemporanji, anke fil-preżenza ta’ għadd kbir ta’ offsets storbjużi. Barra minn hekk, nuru li permezz ta’ approċċ sempliċi tal-viċin l-eqreb fl-ispazju ta’ kumpens, jistgħu jiġu skoperti eżempji ġodda ta’ relazzjonijiet magħrufa. Ir-riżultati tagħna jitkellmu dwar l-affidabbiltà ta’ vetturi ta’ kumpens minn inkorporazzjonijiet newrali mhux kuntestwali biex jinstabu raggruppamenti semantikament koerenti. Dan l-approċċ sempliċi għandu implikazzjonijiet għall-esplorazzjoni tar-regolaritajiet emerġenti u l-eżempji tagħhom, bħal xejriet emerġenti fil-midja soċjali u l-karigi relatati tagħhom.', 'no': 'Arbeid med nøyrale ordinnbygging og leksiske relasjonar har hovudsakelig fokusert på bekreftelige eksperimenter som brukar eksemplar av semantiske og syntaktiske relasjonar for å validera mot menneskelige opplysningar. I denne papiret kan vi utforske kor grad leksiske relasjonar, slik som dei funne i populære valideringssett, kunne deriverast og utvideast frå mange neuralinnbygging med klassiske klassiske klassiske klassiske klassiske klassiske metodar. Vi viser at Word2Vec-plassen av ordpar (t.d. forskyvingsvektorar) utfører mykje andre meir samtidige metodar, sjølv i tilstand til mange støyforskyvingar. I tillegg viser vi at gjennom ein enkelt næraste naboetilnærming i forskyvingsrommet kan nye eksemplar av kjente forhold oppdagast. Resultatet våre snakker til å gjera omsetjingsvectorar frå ikkje-kontekstiske neuralinnbygging for å finna semantisk koherent klassar. Denne enkle tilnærming har implikasjonar for utforsking av gjennomsiktige regulæritet og eksemplane sine, som gjennomsiktige trender på sosiale media og deres relaterte postar.', 'pl': 'Praca z osadzeniami słów neuronowych i relacjami leksykalnymi koncentrowała się w dużej mierze na eksperymentach potwierdzających wykorzystanie przez człowieka przykładów relacji semantycznych i składniowych do weryfikacji. W niniejszym artykule badamy stopień, w jakim relacje leksykalne, takie jak te występujące w popularnych zestawach walidacji, mogą być wywodzone i rozszerzane z różnych osadzeń neuronowych przy użyciu klastrów. Pokazujemy, że przestrzeń par słów Word2Vec (tj. wektorów offsetowych) znacznie przewyższa inne bardziej współczesne metody, nawet w obecności dużej liczby szumownych offsetów. Ponadto pokazujemy, że poprzez proste podejście najbliższego sąsiada w przestrzeni offsetowej można odkryć nowe przykłady znanych relacji. Nasze wyniki mówią o możliwości posunięcia wektorów z niekontekstowych osadzeń neuronowych do znalezienia spójnych semantycznie klastrów. To proste podejście ma implikacje dla badania nadchodzących regularności i ich przykładów, takich jak pojawiające się trendy w mediach społecznościowych i powiązane z nimi posty.', 'sr': 'Rad sa neuralnim rečima ugrađenjem i leksičkim odnosima uglavnom se fokusirao na potvrđujuće eksperimente koji koriste ljudski primjere semantičkih i sintaktičkih odnosa kako bi se potvrdili protiv njih. U ovom papiru istražujemo diplomu na kojoj se leksički odnosi, poput onih koji su pronađeni u popularnim setima validacije, mogu proizvesti i proširiti iz raznih neuralnih integracija koristeći klasične metode skusteringa. Pokazujemo da Word2Vec prostor riječi-par (i.e. vektori offset) značajno iznosi druge savremenije metode, čak i u prisustvu velikog broja buknih offset a. Osim toga, pokazujemo da putem jednostavnog bliskog susjedskog pristupa u offset svemiru mogu otkriti nove primjere poznatih odnosa. Naši rezultati govore o prilagodbi vektora offset iz nekontekstualnih neuralnih integracija da bi pronašli semantički koherentne skupine. Ovaj jednostavan pristup ima implikacije za istraživanje nove regularnosti i njihovih primjera, kao što su nove trendove na društvenim medijima i njihovim povezanim postima.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය වචනය සහ ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධතාවන් සමග වැඩියෙන් විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සාමාන්තික සම්බන්ධතාවන් ස මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද ලෙක්සිකාලි සම්බන්ධතාවක්, වගේම ප්\u200dරජාතික විශ්ලේෂණ සෙට් වල හොයාගෙන ඉන්න පුළුවන් විදිහ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ Word2Vec අවසානය (i.e. ඔෆ්සෙට් වෙක්ටර්) විශේෂයෙන් අනිත් අවසානය විද්\u200dයාවක් විතරයි, සමහර විශාල සංඛ්යාවක් අව තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය සම්පූර්ණ අයිතුරුවක් විදිහට අෆ්සෙට් කාමරයේ අලුත් උදාහරණයක් හොයාගන අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති මේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ උදාහරණය සඳ', 'ro': 'Lucrarea cu încorporările neuronale de cuvinte și relațiile lexicale s-a concentrat în mare măsură pe experimente de confirmare care utilizează exemple de relații semantice și sintactice curatoriate de om pentru a valida împotriva. În această lucrare, explorăm gradul în care relațiile lexicale, cum ar fi cele găsite în seturile populare de validare, pot fi derivate și extinse dintr-o varietate de încorporări neurale folosind metode clasice de clusterizare. Aratăm că spațiul Word2Vec al perechilor de cuvinte (adică vectorii offset) depășește semnificativ alte metode mai contemporane, chiar și în prezența unui număr mare de offset zgomotos. Mai mult decât atât, arătăm că printr-o abordare simplă a celui mai apropiat vecin în spațiul offset, se pot descoperi noi exemple de relații cunoscute. Rezultatele noastre vorbesc despre posibilitatea vectorilor offset din încorporări neurale non-contextuale pentru a găsi clustere semantic coerente. Această abordare simplă are implicații pentru explorarea regularităților emergente și a exemplelor acestora, cum ar fi tendințele emergente pe rețelele de socializare și posturile aferente acestora.', 'so': 'Shaqo ku saabsan hadal neural ah oo ku dhex nool iyo xiriir leksikal ah ayaa si weyn ugu kalsoonaaday jirrabaadka xaqiijiya, kuwaas oo isticmaalaya tusaalaha dadka la kooban karo oo ka mid ah xiriirka semantika iyo syntactic si uu u xaqiijiyo. Warqadan waxaynu ka baaraynaa shahaadada xiriirka leksiga ah, tusaale ahaan kuwa laga helay qoraalka xaqiijiyada ee popular ah, waxaa laga soo saari karaa oo laga sii fidin karaa qalabka neuro kala duduwan oo isticmaalaya qaababka kooxaha ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in goobta Word2Vec e e word-labo (i.e. offset vectors) ay si muhiim ah u muuqataa qaabab kale oo ku saabsan, xataa haddii ay joogto cod badan. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in waxaa laga heli karaa tusaalooyin cusub oo la yaqaan xiriirka. Abaalkayaga waxaa la hadlayaa suurtagal ah in ay ka soo baxdo wadooyin aan soo socon karin, si ay u helaan kooxo xilliga ah. Xaaladahan fudud waxay saameyn ku leedahay baaritaanka qaynuunnada degdega ah iyo tusaalayaashooyinkooda, tusaale ahaan baalalka soo baxa shabakada bulshada iyo bandhigyadooda la xiriira.', 'sv': 'Arbetet med neurala ordinbäddningar och lexikala relationer har till stor del fokuserat på konfirmatoriska experiment som använder humankuraterade exempel på semantiska och syntaktiska relationer för att validera mot. I denna uppsats undersöker vi i vilken grad lexikala relationer, såsom de som finns i populära valideringsuppsättningar, kan härledas och utvidgas från en mängd olika neurala inbäddningar med hjälp av klassiska klustermetoder. Vi visar att Word2Vec-rymden för ordpar (dvs offset vektorer) avsevärt överträffar andra mer moderna metoder, även i närvaro av ett stort antal bullriga offset. Dessutom visar vi att genom en enkel närmaste granne ansats i offset rymden kan nya exempel på kända relationer upptäckas. Våra resultat talar om möjligheten hos offset vektorer från icke-kontextuella neurala inbäddningar att hitta semantiskt sammanhängande kluster. Detta enkla tillvägagångssätt har konsekvenser för utforskandet av framväxande regelbundenhet och deras exempel, såsom framväxande trender på sociala medier och relaterade inlägg.', 'ta': 'புதிய வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கும் மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் தொடர்புகளுடனும் வேலை பெரும்பாலாகவே கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது மனித சுருக்கும் உ இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் எந்த தொடர்புகளில் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், பிரபராச சியமான செலுத்தல் அமைப்புகளில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளவர்கள் என்பதை தேடுகிறோ Word2Vec இடைவெளியை காட்டுகிறோம் என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் , அதாவது, வார்த்தை ஜோடிகள் (அதாவது, வெக்டார்கள்) மற்றும் தற்போதைய முறைகளை வெளியேற் மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் ஒரு சுலபமான அண்டை நெருக்கமான நெருங்கும் வழியாக, தெரியும் தொடர்புகளின் புதி எங்கள் முடிவுகள் பேசுகிறார்கள் தற்போதைய நரம்பு உடையிலிருந்து வெக்டர்களின் பாதுகாப்பு பேசுகிறார்கள். இந்த எளிய முறையில் அவசரப்பட்ட விதிமுறைகளையும் அவர்களுடைய உதாரணங்களையும் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு பாதிப்புகள் உள்ளது, சமூக ஊடகங', 'ur': 'نیورال کلمات کے ساتھ کام کرنا اور لکسیکی رابطہ کا بہت بڑا مضبوط آزمائش پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے جو انسان کے ذریعہ مثالیں استعمال کرتی ہیں جن کے بارے میں سنٹکتی رابطہ ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم اس درجہ کا تحقیق کریں گے جس کے لئے لکسیکی رابطہ، جیسے وہ لوگ جنہوں نے محبوب validation سٹوں میں پایا ہے، کلاسیک کلسٹرینگ طریقوں کے مطابق مختلف نورول ایمبڈینگ سے پھیلایا جائے گا اور پھیلایا جائے گا۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ Word2Vec جگہ (یعنی offset vectors) بہت زیادہ موجود طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، اگرچہ بہت زیادہ آواز نافس کے حضور۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک ساده نزدیک مسابقه کے ذریعہ آفاسٹ جگہ میں ایک نئی مثالیں معلوم ہوئی رشتہ داروں کی تلاش کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے نافسٹ ویکتروں کے معاملہ سے بات کرتے ہیں جو غیر متوسط نائرول انڈینگ میں سے ہیں کہ سیمنٹی طور پر متوسط کلسٹر پیدا کریں۔ یہ سادہ طریقے کی تعقیب کے لئے اثرات اور ان کی مثالیں ہیں، جیسے سوسیل میڈیا اور ان کے مرتبہ پوسٹوں میں اثرات ہوتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz faqat taʼminlovchi bog'liqlarni o'rganamiz, masalan popular tasdiqlarni o'rganish mumkin va klassik klisterlik usullari yordamida ko'p neyrol ichidagi darajadagi narsalarni ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz Word2Vec joy so'zlar (m.g. offset vectorlari) bilan boshqa vaqt usullarni ko'p ko'plab keladi. Ko'rib, biz o'sha ko'rsatganimizda, ofset boʻyicha qo'shimcha murakkablarining orqali yangi aloqalarni aniqlash mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz davomida neyron emblemlaridan o'zgartirilgan vektorlarning imkoniyatlariga aytganligimiz mumkin. Bu oddiy usul esa, shaxsiy qoidalarni qidirish va misollarining misollariga, balki jamiyat medya va ular bilan bog'liq postlari kabi narsalarni o'rganish uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Việc làm việc với sự nhúng ghép từ thần kinh và quan hệ ngôn ngữ có chủ đích tập trung vào thí nghiệm xác thực, sử dụng các thí nghiệm hóa chất của người để xác nhận quan hệ theo ngữ pháp và cú pháp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi khám phá mức độ các mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ, như các mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ được tìm thấy trong các bộ hợp đồng nổi tiếng, có thể bắt nguồn và được mở rộng từ các phương pháp cấy ghép thần kinh khác nhau. Chúng tôi cho thấy không gian Word2Vec của Từ-pairs (v.e., thuật công kích) thực hiện tốt hơn nhiều phương pháp hiện đại hơn, ngay cả khi có nhiều sự cắt đi ện. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy qua phương pháp hàng xóm gần nhất trong khu vực đối diện, có thể tìm ra những ví dụ mới về mối quan hệ đã biết. Kết quả của chúng ta nói về sự mở rộng của các sinh vật phản ứng từ những cài ghép thần kinh không định ngữ pháp để tìm ra các khối kết hợp/ Cách tiếp cận đơn giản này có tác động đến việc khám phá những quy tắc đang xảy ra và ví dụ của nó, như các xu hướng phát triển trên các phương tiện xã hội và các địa điểm liên quan.', 'hr': 'Rad sa neuralnim riječima ugrađenjem i leksičkim odnosima u velikoj mjeri fokusirao se na potvrđujuće eksperimente koji koriste primjere semantičkih i sintaktičkih odnosa na ljudskom izloženom primjeru za potvrđenje. U ovom papiru istražujemo stupanj na koji se leksički odnosi, poput onih koji su pronađeni u popularnim postavima validacije, mogu proizvesti i proširiti iz raznih neuralnih integracija koristeći klasične metode skupljanja. Pokazujemo da Word2Vec prostor riječi-pare (tj. offset vektori) značajno iznosi druge savremenije metode, čak i u prisustvu velikog broja buknih offset a. Osim toga, pokazujemo da putem jednostavnog bliskog susjedskog pristupa u offset prostoru mogu otkriti nove primjere poznatih odnosa. Naši rezultati govore o prilagodbi vektora offset iz nekontekstualnih neuralnih integracija kako bi pronašli semantički koherentne skupine. Ovaj jednostavan pristup ima utjecaje na istraživanje nove redovitosti i njihovih primjera, kao što su nove trendove na društvenim medijima i njihovim povezanim postima.', 'bg': 'Работата с неврални словесни вграждания и лексикални връзки до голяма степен се фокусира върху потвърждаващи експерименти, които използват курирани от човека примери за семантични и синтактични отношения, за да се валидират срещу тях. В тази статия изследваме степента, до която лексикалните взаимоотношения, като тези, намерени в популярните набори за валидиране, могат да бъдат извлечени и разширени от различни невронни вграждания, използвайки класически методи за клъстериране. Показваме, че пространството на двойки думи (т.е. офсетни вектори) значително надминава други по-съвременни методи, дори и при наличие на голям брой шумни компенсации. Освен това показваме, че чрез прост подход на най-близкия съсед в офсетното пространство могат да бъдат открити нови примери за известни отношения. Нашите резултати говорят за възможността на офсетните вектори от неконтекстуални невронни вграждания да намерят семантично съгласувани клъстери. Този прост подход има последици за проучването на възникващите редовности и техните примери, като например възникващи тенденции в социалните медии и свързаните с тях публикации.', 'nl': 'Het werk met neurale woordinbeddingen en lexicale relaties heeft zich grotendeels gericht op confirmatory experiments die gebruik maken van door mensen gecureerde voorbeelden van semantische en syntactische relaties om tegen te valideren. In dit artikel onderzoeken we de mate waarin lexicale relaties, zoals die gevonden worden in populaire validatiesets, kunnen worden afgeleid en uitgebreid uit een verscheidenheid van neurale embeddingen met behulp van klassieke clustering methoden. We laten zien dat de Word2Vec ruimte van woordparen (d.w.z. offsetvectoren) significant overtreft andere meer hedendaagse methoden, zelfs in de aanwezigheid van een groot aantal noise offsets. Bovendien laten we zien dat via een eenvoudige benadering van de dichtstbijzijnde buurman in de offset ruimte nieuwe voorbeelden van bekende relaties kunnen worden ontdekt. Onze resultaten spreken over de bruikbaarheid van offset vectoren van niet-contextuele neurale embeddingen om semantisch coherente clusters te vinden. Deze eenvoudige aanpak heeft implicaties voor de verkenning van opkomende regelmatigheden en hun voorbeelden, zoals opkomende trends op sociale media en de bijbehorende posts.', 'da': 'Arbejdet med neurale ordindlejringer og leksikale relationer har i høj grad fokuseret på bekræftende eksperimenter, der bruger menneskelige kuraterede eksempler på semantiske og syntaktiske relationer til at validere imod. I denne artikel undersøger vi i hvilken grad lexikale relationer, såsom dem, der findes i populære valideringssæt, kan udledes og udvides fra en række neurale indlejringer ved hjælp af klassiske klyngemetoder. Vi viser, at Word2Vec-rummet af ordpar (dvs. offset vektorer) betydeligt overgår andre mere moderne metoder, selv i tilstedeværelse af et stort antal støjende offsets. Desuden viser vi, at via en simpel nærmeste nabo tilgang i offset rummet, nye eksempler på kendte relationer kan opdages. Vores resultater taler om muligheden for offset vektorer fra ikke-kontekstuelle neurale indlejringer til at finde semantisk sammenhængende klynger. Denne enkle tilgang har konsekvenser for udforskning af nye regelmæssigheder og deres eksempler, såsom nye tendenser på sociale medier og deres relaterede indlæg.', 'ko': '신경 단어의 삽입과 어휘 관계에 대한 연구는 주로 검증적 실험에 집중되고 이런 실험은 인류가 기획한 의미와 문법 관계의 예를 이용하여 검증한다.이 논문에서 우리는 어휘 관계를 연구했다. 예를 들어 유행하는 검증에서 집중적으로 발견된 어휘 관계는 어느 정도에 고전적인 분류 방법을 사용하여 각종 신경 삽입에서 도출하고 확장할 수 있는지를 연구했다.우리는 대량의 소음 편이가 존재하는 상황에서도 단어가 맞는Word2Vec 공간(즉 편이 벡터)이 다른 현대적인 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.또한 편향 공간에서의 간단한 최근 인접 방법을 통해 이미 알고 있는 관계의 새로운 예를 발견할 수 있음을 보여준다.우리의 결과는 상하문 신경이 삽입되지 않은 편이향량은 의미가 일치하는 집합을 찾을 수 있다는 것을 보여 준다.이런 간단한 방법은 새로운 규칙과 예시, 예를 들어 소셜 미디어와 관련 게시물의 새로운 추세를 탐색하는 데 도움이 된다.', 'id': 'Bekerja dengan penerbangan kata saraf dan hubungan leksik telah fokus pada percobaan konfirmasi yang menggunakan contoh-contoh manusia dari hubungan semantis dan sintaksi untuk menentang. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi tingkat hubungan leksik, seperti yang ditemukan dalam set validasi populer, dapat diproduksi dan diperluaskan dari berbagai bentuk saraf menggunakan metode klasik clustering. Kami menunjukkan bahwa ruang Word2Vec dari pasangan kata (i.e., vektor ofset) jauh lebih melebihi metode yang lain yang lebih kontempor, bahkan dalam kehadiran sejumlah besar ofset suara. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa melalui pendekatan tetangga terdekat sederhana di ruang offset, contoh baru dari hubungan yang dikenal dapat ditemukan. Hasil kita berbicara dengan kemampuan vektor offset dari pembangunan saraf non-kontekstual untuk menemukan kumpulan semantis konsisten. pendekatan sederhana ini memiliki implikasi untuk eksplorasi regularitas muncul dan contoh-contoh mereka, seperti trends muncul di media sosial dan pos-pos yang berhubungan mereka.', 'de': 'Die Arbeit mit neuronalen Worteinbettungen und lexikalischen Beziehungen konzentriert sich weitgehend auf Bestätigungsexperimente, die human-kuratierte Beispiele semantischer und syntaktischer Beziehungen verwenden, um sie zu validieren. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, inwieweit lexikalische Beziehungen, wie sie in populären Validierungssätzen vorkommen, mit Hilfe klassischer Clustering-Methoden aus einer Vielzahl neuronaler Einbettungen abgeleitet und erweitert werden können. Wir zeigen, dass der Word2Vec-Raum von Wortpaaren (d.h. Offsetvektoren) andere zeitgenössischere Methoden deutlich übertrifft, selbst wenn eine große Anzahl von rauschenden Offsets vorhanden ist. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass durch einen einfachen Nearest-Neighbor-Ansatz im Offset-Raum neue Beispiele bekannter Zusammenhänge entdeckt werden können. Unsere Ergebnisse sprechen für die Fähigkeit von Offsetvektoren aus nicht-kontextuellen neuronalen Einbettungen, semantisch kohärente Cluster zu finden. Dieser einfache Ansatz hat Auswirkungen auf die Erforschung emergenter Regelmäßigkeiten und deren Beispiele, wie aufkommende Trends in sozialen Medien und deren zugehörigen Posts.', 'fa': 'با استفاده کردن کلمه عصبی و رابطه\u200cهای زبان بیشتر روی آزمایش\u200cهای تصدیق کننده تمرکز کرده است که از مثال\u200cهایی که از رابطه\u200cهای semantic و syntactic برای تصدیق کردن علیه انسان استفاده می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما درجه تحقیق می کنیم که رابطه\u200cهای زبانی، مانند کسانی که در مجموعه\u200cهای تصدیق\u200cکننده\u200cی محبوب یافته\u200cاند، می\u200cتوانند از طریق مختلف انجمن\u200cهای عصبی با استفاده از روش\u200cهای کلاسیک کلاسیک تولید شوند و گسترش داده شو ما نشان می دهیم که فضای Word2Vec از جفت\u200cهای کلمه (یعنی ویکتورهای offset) به معنی دیگر روش\u200cهای جامعه\u200cای بیشتری را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد، حتی در حضور تعداد زیادی از افتفات\u200cهای صوتی. در ضمن، ما نشان می دهیم که با طریق یک نزدیکترین همسایه ساده\u200cای در فضای افتس، نمونه\u200cهای جدید از رابطه\u200cهای معلوم می\u200cتوانند کشف شوند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما با تغییر قابلیت ویکتورهای نافسیت از داخل عصبی غیر متفاوتی صحبت می\u200cکنند تا کلاس\u200cهای متفاوتی را پیدا کنند. این روش ساده برای تحقیق قانونی و مثالهایشان تاثیر می\u200cدهد، مثل رشد\u200cهای پیشرفت در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و نقطه\u200cهای مربوط به آنها.', 'sw': 'Kazini na neno la kawaida na mahusiano ya kisaikolojia imejikita zaidi kwenye majaribio ya kuthibitisha ambayo hutumia mifano ya mifano ya mahusiano ya kimapenzi na ushirikiano ili kuhakikisha dhidi yake. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza kiwango ambacho mahusiano ya kisaikolojia, kama vile wale waliopatikana kwenye seti za uhakika maarufu, wanaweza kutengenezwa na kuongezeka kutoka kwenye viwanja vingi vya neura kwa kutumia njia za kuunganisha klasi. Tunaonyesha kuwa nafasi ya Word2Vec ya majina ya wanandoa (yaani, vectors zilizotengenezwa) inaonyesha njia nyingine za sasa, hata katika kuwepo kwa matumizi makubwa ya sauti. Zaidi, tunaonyesha kwamba kupitia mbinu rahisi za jirani za karibu katika nafasi ya eneo hilo, mifano mpya ya mahusiano yanayoweza kutambuliwa. Our results speak to the amenability of offset vectors from non-contextual neural embeddings to find semantically coherent clusters.  Hatua hii rahisi inahusisha uchunguzi wa sheria za dharura na mifano yao, kama vile maendeleo yanayotokea kwenye mitandao ya kijamii na makala zao zinazohusiana na.', 'tr': 'Näyral söz gabdalyklary we leksiýaly baglaýyşlar bilen işleýän adamlaryň semantik we sintaktik baglaýyşlarynyň üstüne garşy barlamak üçin döredilmelere üns berilýär. Bu kagyzda, biz esasy takyklama düzümlerinde tapylan lektik baglaýyşlary, klasik klasik clustering döwletlerinden döwletlere golaýlaşyp biler we uzatlaşyp bileris. Biz Word2Vec çiftler arasynda (i.e. offset vektörleri) diğer modern yönlerde gaty bir şekilde daha yüksek şekilde çözer, hatta birçok gürültü süpürler bolup görmüş kanlaryny görkeýäris. Munuň üçin, biz görkezilýän ýeňil agşamlyk bir goňşunyň golaýy bilen, bilinen baglaşyklaryň täze myslleri tapylyp bileris. Sonuçlarımız, semantik olarak koherentli klasterler bulmak için, konseksiyon olmayan nöral içerimlerinden gelen vektörlerin amenliği ile konuşur. Bu basit ýagdaý çykyş düzgünliklerini we örneklerini, sosyal medýýatlarynda täzeden aýratyn we ýagdaýyndaky meýdançalarynyň keşfedilmesine täsirleýär.', 'am': 'የነጥብ ቃላት በኩል እና የሊክሲካዊ ግንኙነት ላይ የሚሠራ አካባቢ ተፈተና ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የውይይት ግንኙነት እንደዚህ በብዛት አካባቢ ውስጥ የተገኙት፣ ከክላሲካዊ ጉዳይ እውቀት የተጠቀሙትን የነጥብ አካባቢዎች እና መዘርጋት ይችላል፡፡ የWord2Vec ቦታ የቃላት-ሁለት (ምናልባት የዌብ መቃብር) በተለየ ሁኔታ እናሳየዋለን፣ ብዙ ድምፅ ጥምቀት በተደረገ እንኳን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ነገር ግን አዲስ ግንኙነት የሚታወቀው አዲስ ምሳሌ በሚገኘው በአገር ጎረቤት ማቀናቀል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ከቀድሞው የደዌብ አካባቢዎች የነጥብ ነጥቦችን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን እናገራለን፡፡ ይህ ቀላል ሥርዓት የአስቸኳይ ሥርዓቶች እና ምሳሌዎቻቸውን ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች እና የተገኘ ጽሑፎቻቸውን ለመፍጠር ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Puna me përfshirjet e fjalëve nervore dhe marrëdhëniet lexike është përqëndruar kryesisht në eksperimentet konfirmuese që përdorin shembuj të kuruar nga njerëzit të marrëdhënieve semantike dhe sintaktike për të validuar kundër. Në këtë letër, ne eksplorojmë shkallën në të cilën marrëdhëniet lexike, të tilla si a to të gjetura në grupet e vlerësimit popullor, mund të nxirren dhe të zgjerohen nga një shumëllojshmëri përfshirjesh nervore duke përdorur metoda klasike të grupimit. Ne tregojmë se hapësira Word2Vec e çifteve të fjalëve (i.e., vektorëve të offset) mbizotëron ndjeshëm metodat e tjera më bashkëkohore, edhe në praninë e një numri të madh të offsets zhurmshëm. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se nëpërmjet një qasje të thjeshtë fqinjë më të afërt në hapësirën offset, mund të zbulohen shembuj të rinj të marrëdhënieve të njohura. Rezultatet tona flasin me aftësinë e vektorëve offset nga përfshirjet neurale jo-kontekstuale për të gjetur grupe semantikisht koherente. Ky qasje i thjeshtë ka pasoja për eksplorimin e rregullaliteteve të shfaqura dhe shembujve të tyre, të tillë si prirjet e shfaqura në mediat shoqërore dhe vendet e tyre të lidhura.', 'af': "Werk met neurale woord inbettings en leksiese relasies het groot gefokus op bevestiging eksperimente wat mens-uitgevoerde voorbeelde van semantiese en sintaksiese relasies gebruik om teen te bevestig. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek die grad waarmee leksiese verwantings, soos die wat in populêre geldigheidstelle gevind is, kan afgelei word en uitgebrei word van 'n verskillende neurale inbêding deur klassieke clustering metodes. Ons wys dat die Word2Vec spasie van woorde-paar (i.e. offset vektores) betekeurig ander meer vandaglike metodes uitvoer, selfs in die voorsiening van 'n groot aantal geluide offset. Ook, ons wys dat deur 'n eenvoudige nabygeste nabygegang in die offset spasie, nuwe voorbeelde van bekende verwantings kan ontdek word. Ons resultate praat met die veranderbaarheid van offset vektores van non- contextual neurale inbettings om semantiese koerende klassters te vind. Hierdie eenvoudige toegang het implikasies vir die uitvoering van uitkomstige regulariteite en hulle voorbeelde, soos opkomstige trende op sosiale media en hulle verwante pos.", 'az': 'Nöral sözlərlə birlikdə çalışma və leksik əlaqələri çox təsdiqləyici təcrübələr üzərində təsdiqləyici təcrübə edir ki, insanların semantik və sintaktik əlaqələrini təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edirlər. Bu kağızda, kimin məşhur təsdiqləmə qurğularında bulunan leksik əlaqələrini keşfetmişik, klasik clustering metodlarını istifadə edərək, müxtəlif nöral inbinglərindən uzaqlaşdırılabilir. Biz söz cütlərinin Word2Vec alanı (i.e. offset vektörlərinin) daha çox müddətli metodlarından daha çox üstün olduğunu göstəririk, hətta çox səslü offset olmasına rağmen. Daha sonra, biz göstəririk ki, offset alanında ən yaxın bir qonşu vasitəsilə, bilinmiş əlaqələrin yeni məsəlləri keçirilə bilər. Sonuçlarımız, semantik olaraq müxtəlif nöral inşallarından çoxlu vektörlərin müəyyən edilməsi ilə danışır. Bu basit tərzim, sosyal medya və qohumluq məlumatlarında yenilənmiş trendlərin keşfetməsi və məsəllərinin təşkil edilməsi üçün təsirlər var.', 'bs': 'Rad sa neuralnim riječima ugrađenjem i leksičkim odnosima uglavnom je usredotočen na potvrđujuće eksperimente koji koriste ljudski primjere semantičkih i sintaktičkih odnosa za potvrđenje protiv. U ovom papiru istražujemo diplomu na kojoj se leksički odnosi, poput onih koji su pronađeni u popularnim setima validacije, mogu proizvesti i proširiti iz raznih neuralnih ugrađenja koristeći klasične metode skusteringa. Pokazujemo da Word2Vec prostor riječnih pare (tj. offset vektori) značajno iznosi druge savremenije metode, čak i u prisustvu velikog broja buknih offset a. Osim toga, pokazujemo da putem jednostavnog bliskog susjedskog pristupa u offset prostoru mogu otkriti nove primjere poznatih odnosa. Naši rezultati govore o izmjenljivosti vektora offset iz nekontekstualnih neuralnih integracija da bi pronašli semantički koherentne skupine. Ovaj jednostavan pristup ima utjecaje na istraživanje nove redovitosti i njihovih primjera, kao što su nove trendove na društvenim medijima i njihovim povezanim postima.', 'hy': 'Աշխատելը նյարդային բառերի ներդրման և լեքսիկական հարաբերությունների հետ հիմնականում կենտրոնացել է հավասարման փորձարկումների վրա, որոնք օգտագործում են մարդկային կորտերացված սեմանտիկ և սինտակտիկ հարաբերությունների օրինակներ, որպես Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով կարող են լեքսիկական հարաբերությունները, ինչպիսիք են հայտնաբերվում հայտնի հավասարման համակարգերում, վերածվել և ընդլայնվել նյարդային ներդրումներից, օգտագործելով դասական խմբագրման մեթոդներ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ Word2vec-ի բառերի զույգերի տարածքը (այսինքն, օֆսեթ-վեկտորները) նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է այլ ավելի ժամանակակից մեթոդներ, նույնիսկ ձայնային օֆսեթների բազմաթիվ դեպքում: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ օֆեյսթ տարածության ամենամեծ հարևանի միջոցով կարող ենք հայտնաբերել հայտնի հարաբերությունների նոր օրինակներ: Մեր արդյունքները խոսում են ոչ կոնտեքստալ նյարդային ներդրումներից բազմապատկած վեկտորների օգտակարության հետ, որպեսզի գտնենք սեմանտիկ կոնտեկտիկ խմբեր: Այս պարզ մոտեցումը հետևանքներ ունի զարգացող օրինակությունների ուսումնասիրելու համար, ինչպիսիք են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների զարգացող միտումները և դրանց կապված պաշտոնները:', 'ca': "Traballar amb integració neuronal de paraules i relacions lècsiques s'ha centrat en experiments confirmatoris que utilitzen exemples de relacions semàntiques i sinàctiques curats per a validar contra. En aquest article, explorem el grau en què les relacions lècsiques, com les que es troben en conjunts populars de validació, es poden derivar i estendre d'una varietat d'incorporacions neuronals utilitzant mètodes clàssics d'agrupament. Mostrem que l'espai Word2Vec de parelles de paraules (és a dir, vetors de compensació) supera significativament altres mètodes més contemporanis, fins i tot en presencia d'un gran nombre de compensacions ruidosos. A més, demostram que a través d'un simple enfocament veí més proper a l'espai offset, es poden descobrir nous exemples de relacions conegudes. Our results speak to the amenability of offset vectors from non-contextual neural embeddings to find semantically coherent clusters.  Aquest enfocament senzill té implicacions per l'exploració de regularitats emergents i els seus exemples, com les tendències emergents dels mitjans socials i els seus posts relacionats.", 'bn': 'নিউরেল শব্দের প্রবেশ এবং লেক্সিক্যাল সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে কাজ করা বিশেষ করে নিশ্চিত পরীক্ষার উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে যারা বিরুদ্ধে বৈধ করার জন্য ম এই কাগজটিতে আমরা লেক্সিক সম্পর্কের ডিগ্রি খুঁজে বের করি, যেমন জনপ্রিয় বৈধ সেটে পাওয়া যায়, তারা ক্লাসিক্যাল ক্লাস্টারিং পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন নি আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শব্দ-জোড়ার (যেমন অফ-সেট ভেক্টর) আরো বর্তমান পদ্ধতি প্রকাশ করে, এমনকি বিশাল কণ্ঠসংখ্যার আওয়াজের উপস্থিতিতে। এছাড়াও আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে অফ-সেট স্থানে কাছাকাছি প্রতিবেশীর কাছাকাছি প্রতিবেশী কাছাকাছি প্রতিযোগিতার মা আমাদের ফলাফল তাদের সাথে কথা বলে যাচ্ছে যে বিদ্যমান নিউরেল বিভিন্ন ভেক্টরের অসম্ভবতা নিয়ে যাচ্ছে যেন তারা সামান্যিকভাবে এক এই সহজ পদ্ধতি জরুরী নিয়ম এবং তাদের উদাহরণের জন্য প্রভাবিত, যেমন সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম এবং তাদের সংশ্লিষ্ট পোস্টগুলোর প্র', 'et': 'Töö neuraalsete sõnade manustamise ja leksikaalsete suhetega on suures osas keskendunud kinnitavatele eksperimentidele, kus kasutatakse inimese poolt kureeritud semantiliste ja süntaktiliste suhete näiteid valideerimiseks. Käesolevas töös uurime, mil määral saab leksikaalseid suhteid, nagu näiteks neid, mis leiduvad populaarsetes valideerimiskomplektides, tuletada ja laiendada erinevatest neuraalsetest manustamistest, kasutades klastrite moodustamise meetodeid. Näitame, et Word2Veci sõnapaaride ruum (st offset vektorid) ületab märkimisväärselt teisi kaasaegsemaid meetodeid, isegi kui esineb suur hulk mürakaid nihkeid. Lisaks näitame, et lihtsa lähima naabri lähenemise kaudu offset ruumis on võimalik avastada uusi näiteid teadaolevatest suhetest. Meie tulemused räägivad mittekontekstuaalsetest neuraalsete manustamiste nihkevektorite võimalikkusest leida semantiliselt sidusaid klastreid. See lihtne lähenemisviis mõjutab esilekerkivate regulaarsuste ja nende näidete uurimist, näiteks sotsiaalmeedias tekkivaid suundumusi ja nendega seotud postitusi.', 'cs': 'Práce s neuronovými vloženími slov a lexikálními vztahy se do značné míry zaměřila na potvrzující experimenty, které využívají lidskými příklady sémantických a syntaktických vztahů k ověření. V tomto článku zkoumáme, do jaké míry lze lexikální vztahy, jako jsou ty nalezené v populárních validačních sadách, odvodit a rozšířit z různých neuronových vložení pomocí klasických clusterových metod. Ukazujeme, že Word2Vec prostor slovních párů (tzn. offsetových vektorů) výrazně předčí jiné modernější metody, a to i v přítomnosti velkého počtu šumových offsetů. Dále ukazujeme, že prostřednictvím jednoduchého přístupu nejbližšího souseda v offsetovém prostoru lze objevit nové příklady známých vztahů. Naše výsledky hovoří o možnosti offsetových vektorů z nekontextuálních neuronových vložení k nalezení sémanticky koherentních clusterů. Tento jednoduchý přístup má důsledky pro zkoumání vznikajících pravidelností a jejich příkladů, jako jsou vznikající trendy na sociálních médiích a jejich související příspěvky.', 'fi': 'Neuraalisten sanaupotusten ja leksikaalisten suhteiden parissa työskentely on keskittynyt pitkälti vahvistaviin kokeisiin, joissa käytetään ihmisen kuratoimia esimerkkejä semanttisista ja syntaktisista suhteista validointiin. Tässä työssä selvitämme, missä määrin lexikaalisia suhteita, kuten suosittuja validointijoukkoja, voidaan johtaa ja laajentaa erilaisista neuroupotuksista klassisia klusterimenetelmiä käyttäen. Todistamme, että Word2Vec-tila sanapareista (offset vektorit) on huomattavasti parempi kuin muut nykyaikaisemmat menetelmät, jopa suuren määrän meluisia offsetit. Lisäksi osoitamme, että yksinkertaisella lähimmän naapurin lähestymistavalla offset-tilassa voidaan löytää uusia esimerkkejä tunnetuista suhteista. Tuloksemme kertovat siitä, miten epäkontekstuaalisista neuroupotuksista saatavat offset-vektorit pystyvät löytämään semanttisesti koherentteja klustereita. Tällä yksinkertaisella lähestymistavalla on vaikutuksia uusien sääntöjenvastaisuuksien ja niiden esimerkkien tutkimiseen, kuten sosiaalisen median ja niihin liittyvien julkaisujen kehittyviin suuntauksiin.', 'jv': 'Wurung barêng-barêng beraksi sing gambar luwih karo akeh basa luwih lanjut tentang kanggo ngerasai winih sing nguasai perbudhakan karo semanti karo sinaksi sing berarti ujaran. Nang paper iki, kéné isiha diguli sing nggawe aturan luwih karo perusahaan langgar, koyo ngono sing dumadhan karo perusahaan winih dhéwé, iso disebarke lan katêpakan karo sakjane sampeyan pangan Neral sing sampeyan gambar uwong. word-vector Nambah, awak dhéwé mungkin yèng akeh barang kelas nang tatag anyar tentang kanggo nguasai winih, balik dhéwé sing ngerasakno karo akeh barang kedhahé. Rejecting Digawe iki sampeyan sing mengkane nggawe aturan mrograh iki banget kanggo ngerasakno biasane, karo hal-hal sing nguasakno tambah lan cendelo perkaraan sak sabên.', 'he': 'Work with neural word embeddings and lexical relations has largely focused on confirmatory experiments which use human-curated examples of semantic and syntactic relations to validate against.  בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים את המידה שבה מערכות יחסים לקסיות, כמו אלה שנמצאים בתוכניות אישור פופולריות, יכולות להיות מורכבות ומארוכות מגוון של תוכניות עצביות בשימוש שיטות קבוצה קלאסיות. אנו מראים שהמרחב Word2Vec של זוגות מילים (כלומר, ווקטורי התנועה) יוצא משמעותי יותר משיטות נוספות יותר contemporary, אפילו בנוכחות של מספר גדול של התנועות רעשים. חוץ מזה, אנו מראים שבדרך גישה שכנה פשוטה קרובה ביותר בחלל הפרסום, אפשר לגלות דוגמאות חדשות של יחסים ידועים. התוצאות שלנו מדברות עם הנוחות של ווקטורים הפרסומים ממערכות עצביות לא קונטקסטיות למצוא קבועות סמנטית. הגישה הפשוטה הזו יש השלכות לחקירה של חוקיות נוצרות ודוגמאות שלהם, כמו טנדרציות נוצרות בתקשורת חברתית והתפקידים הקשורים שלהם.', 'ha': "Yin aiki da tsarin maganar neural da aka embedded da kuma mazaunin leksisi sun yi makini cikin jarrabo masu tabbatarwa da za'a yi amfani da misãlai ga mutane-curated na semantic and syntactic links to inganci against. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba darajõji da za'a sami da danganta na leksiya, kamar waɗanda aka samu cikin tsarin masu inganci, za'a sami da kuma za'a shimfiɗa daga wasu matsayin neural da ke yi amfani da shiryoyin mai fassarwa. Tuna nũna cewa maganar 2V space of word-par (misali, offset traces) mai significant outperforms wasu metode masu sãbuwa, kõ kuwa idan an presence da wasu masu yawa na saurare offset. Kayya, Munã nuna cewa, za'a iya gane misãlai na danganta da aka sani, a sami mutane na kusa cikin filin da aka sitar ta. MatamayinMu na faɗi na'anar mataimaki da za'a iya samun matabbata daga kowace neura da ke samu'in da za'a sami mataimaki. Wannan shiryarwa mai saukarwa yana da amfani da kwamfyuta ta samu'ar ta samu'a da misãlai masu kashewa, kamar misãlai masu emergi a cikin mitandan jamii da makala masu husũma.", 'sk': 'Delo z nevronskimi besednimi vdelavami in leksikalnimi relacijami se je v veliki meri osredotočilo na potrditvene eksperimente, ki uporabljajo primere semantičnih in sintaktičnih relacij, ki jih je pripravil človek. V tem prispevku raziskujemo stopnjo, v kateri meri lahko leksikalne relacije, kot so tiste, ki jih najdemo v popularnih naborih validacij, izpeljemo in razširimo iz različnih nevronskih vdelav z uporabo klasičnih metod gručenja. Pokazali smo, da Word2Vec prostor besednih parov (tj. offset vektorjev) bistveno presega druge sodobnejše metode, tudi v prisotnosti velikega števila hrupnih zamenjav. Poleg tega pokažemo, da lahko s preprostim pristopom najbližjega soseda v offset prostoru odkrijemo nove primere znanih relacij. Naši rezultati govorijo o prilagodljivosti offset vektorjev iz nekontekstualnih nevronskih vdelav za iskanje semantično koherentnih grozdov. Ta preprost pristop vpliva na raziskovanje nastajajočih pravilnosti in njihovih primerov, kot so nastajajoči trendi na družbenih omrežjih in z njimi povezane objave.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་པའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་དང་ཉམས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གང་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལྡན་དང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གི་བར་སྟོང་(i.e. offset vectors)དེ་ཚོ་ཡང་དུས་མཉམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལས་ཕར་སྟོན་བྱེད་འདུག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་offset་སྟོང་ནང་གི་ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པ་ཞིག་གི་མཐུན་སྣེ་གསལ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་དཔེ་བརྗོད་བྱས། ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་ཚོ་མཚམས་སུ་མཐོ་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་གི་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐོང་ཚུགས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་བ་སྐྱེན་ཚ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། དཔེར་ན། འཕེལ་རིམ་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་། དཔེར་ན། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གནས'}
{'en': 'BERT-based Cohesion Analysis of Japanese Texts', 'ar': 'تحليل التماسك المستند إلى BERT للنصوص اليابانية', 'es': 'Análisis de cohesión de textos japoneses basado en Bert', 'fr': 'Analyse de cohésion de textes japonais basée sur Bert', 'pt': 'Análise de Coesão de Textos Japoneses baseada em BERT', 'ja': 'BERTベースの日本語テキストのまとまり分析', 'zh': '盖BERT之日语文本内聚力析也', 'ru': 'Анализ когезии японских текстов на основе BERT', 'hi': 'जापानी ग्रंथों के BERT-आधारित सामंजस्य विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís Chomhtháthaithe bunaithe ar BERT ar Théacsanna na Seapáine', 'ka': 'BERT-დაბათი კოჰეზიანის ტექსტის ანალიზაცია', 'hu': 'BERT-alapú kohéziós elemzés japán szövegekről', 'el': 'Ανάλυση συνοχής ιαπωνικών κειμένων με βάση το BERT', 'it': 'Analisi di coesione dei testi giapponesi basata su BERT', 'lt': 'BERT pagrįsta Japonijos tekstų sanglaudos analizė', 'mk': 'Анализа на кохезија на јапонски текст базирана на BERT', 'kk': 'BERT- негіздеген жапон мәтіндерінің кохезиялық талдауы', 'mt': 'BERT-based Cohesion Analysis of Japanese Texts', 'ml': 'ജപ്പാനീസ് ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളിലെ ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ കോഹെസ്ഷന്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുക', 'ms': 'BERT-based Cohesion Analysis of Japanese Texts', 'mn': 'BERT-д суурилсан Согласов Японы текстүүдийн шинжилгээ', 'no': 'BERT-basert kohasjonanalyser av japanske tekstar', 'ro': 'Analiza coeziunii bazată pe BERT a textelor japoneze', 'pl': 'Analiza spójności tekstów japońskich oparta na BERT', 'sr': 'BERT-bazirana kohezijska analiza japanskih tekstova', 'si': 'BERT- ආධාරිත සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය ජාපාන් පාළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණය', 'sv': 'BERT-baserad sammanhållningsanalys av japanska texter', 'so': 'Analyse of Japanese Texts', 'ur': 'BERT-based Cohesion Analysis of Japanese Texts', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết quả phân tích mã hóa Nhật Bản', 'bg': 'Базиран на BERT анализ на сближаването на японски текстове', 'nl': 'Cohesieanalyse van Japanse teksten op basis van BERT', 'hr': 'Analiza kohezije na BERT-u Japanskih tekstova', 'da': 'BERT-baseret samhørighedsanalyse af japanske tekster', 'fa': 'تحلیل هماهنگی بنیاد BERT از متن ژاپنی', 'ko': 'BERT 기반의 일본어 문장 연결 분석', 'de': 'BERT-basierte Kohäsionsanalyse japanischer Texte', 'af': 'BERT-gebaseerde Koestesiëanaliseer van Japanse Tekste', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Matambo ya Kijapani yenye msingi wa BERT', 'sq': 'Analiza e kohezionit të teksteve japoneze bazuar në BERT', 'tr': 'BERT tabanly Ýapon Metinlerin Haýsy çözümlemesi', 'am': 'BERT-based Cohesion Analysis of Japanese Texts', 'hy': 'BERT-based Cohesion Analysis of Japanese Texts', 'az': 'BERT tabanlı Yaponca Metinlərin Kohēzij Analizi', 'bn': 'জাপানি টেক্সটের বাইরেট ভিত্তিক কোহিসেশন বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'BERT-bazirana kohezija analiza japanskih tekstova', 'ca': 'Anàlisi de cohesió dels textos japonès basat en BERT', 'cs': 'Analýza soudržnosti japonských textů založená na BERT', 'et': 'BERT-põhine jaapani tekstide ühtekuuluvusanalüüs', 'fi': 'BERT-pohjainen japanilaisten tekstien koheesioanalyysi', 'id': 'Analisi Kohesi Berdasar BERT Teks Jepang', 'ha': 'Analyza na KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'BERT-basa Kohêsiyen Taralasi Teks Japoni', 'sk': 'Kohezijska analiza japonskih besedil na podlagi BERT', 'he': 'ניתוח התשוקה מבוסס על BERT של טקסטים יפנים', 'bo': 'BERT-གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཇུས་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཆོག་ཐམ།'}
{'en': 'The meaning of natural language text is supported by cohesion among various kinds of entities, including coreference relations, predicate-argument structures, and bridging anaphora relations. However, predicate-argument structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses have been still very difficult. Recent advances in neural networks, in particular, self training-based language models including BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), have significantly improved many natural language processing tasks, making it possible to dive into the study on analysis of cohesion in the whole text. In this study, we tackle an integrated analysis of cohesion in Japanese texts. Our results significantly outperformed existing studies in each task, especially about 10 to 20 point improvement both for zero anaphora and coreference resolution. Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.', 'ar': 'يتم دعم معنى نص اللغة الطبيعية من خلال التماسك بين أنواع مختلفة من الكيانات ، بما في ذلك العلاقات المرجعية ، وهياكل الحجة الأصلية ، وعلاقات الجسور. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم دراسة هياكل الحجة المسند للمسندات الاسمية وربط العلاقات بين الجناس بشكل جيد ، ولا تزال تحليلاتهم صعبة للغاية. أدت التطورات الحديثة في الشبكات العصبية ، ولا سيما نماذج اللغة القائمة على التدريب الذاتي بما في ذلك BERT (Devlin et al. ، 2019) ، إلى تحسين العديد من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية بشكل كبير ، مما جعل من الممكن الغوص في دراسة تحليل التماسك ككل. نص. في هذه الدراسة ، نتناول تحليلًا متكاملًا للتماسك في النصوص اليابانية. تفوقت نتائجنا بشكل كبير على الدراسات الحالية في كل مهمة ، خاصةً تحسين حوالي 10 إلى 20 نقطة لكل من الجاذبية الصفرية ودقة المرجع. علاوة على ذلك ، أظهرنا أيضًا أن دقة المرجع تختلف في طبيعتها عن المهام الأخرى ويجب التعامل معها بشكل خاص.', 'es': 'El significado del texto en lenguaje natural está respaldado por la cohesión entre varios tipos de entidades, incluidas las relaciones de correferencia, las estructuras de predicado-argumento y la unión de las relaciones anáforas. Sin embargo, las estructuras predicado-argumento para los predicados nominales y las relaciones anáforas puente no se han estudiado bien, y sus análisis siguen siendo muy difíciles. Los avances recientes en las redes neuronales, en particular, los modelos lingüísticos basados en el autoaprendizaje, incluido BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), han mejorado significativamente muchas tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, lo que permite sumergirse en el estudio sobre el análisis de la cohesión en todo el texto. En este estudio, abordamos un análisis integrado de la cohesión en los textos japoneses. Nuestros resultados superaron significativamente los estudios existentes en cada tarea, especialmente una mejora de 10 a 20 puntos para la resolución de cero anáforas y correferencias. Además, también demostramos que la resolución de correferencias tiene una naturaleza diferente de las demás tareas y debe tratarse de manera especial.', 'pt': 'O significado do texto em linguagem natural é sustentado pela coesão entre vários tipos de entidades, incluindo relações de correferência, estruturas predicado-argumento e relações anáforas de ponte. No entanto, estruturas predicado-argumento para predicados nominais e relações anáforas em ponte não foram bem estudadas, e suas análises ainda são muito difíceis. Avanços recentes em redes neurais, em particular, modelos de linguagem baseados em autotreinamento, incluindo BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), melhoraram significativamente muitas tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, possibilitando mergulhar no estudo sobre análise de coesão em todo o texto. Neste estudo, abordamos uma análise integrada da coesão em textos japoneses. Nossos resultados superaram significativamente os estudos existentes em cada tarefa, especialmente cerca de 10 a 20 pontos de melhoria tanto para anáfora zero quanto para resolução de correferência. Além disso, também mostramos que a resolução de correferência é de natureza diferente das outras tarefas e deve ser tratada de forma especial.', 'fr': "La signification du texte en langage naturel est soutenue par la cohésion entre divers types d'entités, y compris les relations de coréférence, les structures prédicat-argument et les relations d'anaphore pontantes. Cependant, les structures prédicat-argument pour les prédicats nominaux et les relations anaphores pontantes n'ont pas été bien étudiées, et leurs analyses restent très difficiles. Les récents progrès dans les réseaux de neurones, en particulier les modèles de langage basés sur l'auto-apprentissage, y compris BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), ont considérablement amélioré de nombreuses tâches de traitement du langage naturel, ce qui a permis de plonger dans l'étude sur l'analyse de la cohésion dans l'ensemble du texte. Dans cette étude, nous abordons une analyse intégrée de la cohésion dans les textes japonais. Nos résultats ont largement dépassé les études existantes dans chaque tâche, en particulier une amélioration d'environ 10 à 20 points à la fois pour l'anaphore nulle et la résolution de coréférence. En outre, nous avons également montré que la résolution de coréférence est de nature différente des autres tâches et devrait être traitée de manière particulière.", 'ja': '自然言語テキストの意味は、コアリファレンス関係、述語-引数構造、およびアナフォラ関係の橋渡しを含む、さまざまな種類のエンティティ間の結束によってサポートされています。 しかしながら、名詞述語の述語論証構造と橋渡しアナフォラ関係は十分に研究されておらず、それらの分析は依然として非常に困難であった。 ニューラルネットワークの最近の進歩、特にBERTを含む自己訓練ベースの言語モデル（ Devlin et al., 2019 ）は、多くの自然言語処理タスクを大幅に改善し、テキスト全体のまとまりの分析に関する研究に飛び込むことが可能になった。 本研究では、日本語テキストにおけるまとまりの統合分析に取り組む。 私たちの結果は、各タスクの既存の研究を大幅に上回り、特にゼロアナフォラとコアリファレンス解決の両方で約10〜20ポイント改善しました。 さらに、コアリファレンスの解像度は他のタスクとは性質が異なり、特別に扱われるべきであることも示した。', 'zh': '自然语言文本者,众体之内聚力也,共指者,谓词 - 参数结构桥接anaphora也。 然名词谓词桥接反义之谓词论结未究,其析犹难。 神经网络之最新进展,尤在自练之言体,至于BERT(Devlin等,2019),已显改诸自然语言,使深究全文之内聚力析而为可也。 当以日语文本中之凝聚力综析之。 臣等每项务,显优于今,特于零无差速、共指分辨率增约10至于20。 此外明共配分辨率异务,宜特处分。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ का अर्थ विभिन्न प्रकार की संस्थाओं के बीच सामंजस्य द्वारा समर्थित है, जिसमें सह-सम्मेलन संबंध, विधेय-तर्क संरचनाएं और एनाफोरा संबंधों को पाटना शामिल है। हालांकि, नाममात्र विधेय और ब्रिजिंग एनाफोरा संबंधों के लिए विधेय-तर्क संरचनाओं का अच्छी तरह से अध्ययन नहीं किया गया है, और उनके विश्लेषण अभी भी बहुत मुश्किल रहे हैं। तंत्रिका नेटवर्क में हाल की प्रगति, विशेष रूप से, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) सहित स्व-प्रशिक्षण-आधारित भाषा मॉडल ने कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों में काफी सुधार किया है, जिससे पूरे पाठ में सामंजस्य के विश्लेषण पर अध्ययन में गोता लगाना संभव हो जाता है। इस अध्ययन में, हम जापानी ग्रंथों में सामंजस्य के एक एकीकृत विश्लेषण से निपटते हैं। हमारे परिणामों ने प्रत्येक कार्य में मौजूदा अध्ययनों को काफी हद तक पछाड़ दिया, विशेष रूप से शून्य एनाफोरा और कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन दोनों के लिए लगभग 10 से 20 अंक सुधार। इसके अलावा, हमने यह भी दिखाया कि कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन अन्य कार्यों से प्रकृति में अलग है और विशेष रूप से इलाज किया जाना चाहिए।', 'ru': 'Значение текста на естественном языке подкрепляется сплоченностью между различными видами сущностей, включая основные отношения, предикатные-аргументарные структуры и мостовые отношения анафоры. Однако структуры предикат-аргумент для номинальных предикатов и связующих анафорных отношений не были хорошо изучены, и их анализ все еще был очень трудным. Недавние достижения в нейронных сетях, в частности, в языковых моделях на основе самообучения, включая BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), значительно улучшили многие задачи по обработке естественного языка, что позволило погрузиться в исследование по анализу сплоченности во всем тексте. В этом исследовании мы рассмотрим комплексный анализ сплоченности в японских текстах. Наши результаты значительно превосходят существующие исследования в каждой задаче, особенно при улучшении от 10 до 20 баллов как для нулевой анафоры, так и для разрешения ядра. Кроме того, мы также показали, что ключевое разрешение отличается по своему характеру от других задач и должно рассматриваться специально.', 'ga': 'Tacaíonn comhtháthú idir cineálacha éagsúla eintiteas le brí téacs teanga nádúrtha, lena n-áirítear caidreamh croí-chomhdhála, struchtúir argóinte réamhaithrise, agus caidreamh idirlinne anafóra. Mar sin féin, ní dhearnadh staidéar maith ar struchtúir argóinte réamhaithrise maidir le réamhaithrisí ainmniúla agus caidreamh idirlinne anafóra, agus bhí a n-anailísí fós thar a bheith deacair. Tá feabhas suntasach tagtha ar go leor tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha mar gheall ar dhul chun cinn le déanaí i líonraí néaracha, go háirithe samhlacha teanga féin-oiliúint-bhunaithe lena n-áirítear BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), rud a fhágann gur féidir tumadh isteach sa staidéar ar anailís ar chomhtháthú san iomlán. téacs. Sa staidéar seo, téimid i ngleic le hanailís chomhtháite ar chomhtháthú i dtéacsanna na Seapáine. D’fheidhmigh ár dtorthaí go suntasach níos fearr ná na staidéir reatha i ngach tasc, go háirithe feabhsúchán idir 10 agus 20 pointe maidir le hanafóir nialasach agus réiteach croí-chomhdhála. Ina theannta sin, léirigh muid freisin go bhfuil réiteach na croíchomhdhála difriúil ó thaobh nádúr de ó na tascanna eile agus gur cheart déileáil go speisialta leis.', 'el': 'Η έννοια του κειμένου της φυσικής γλώσσας υποστηρίζεται από τη συνοχή μεταξύ διαφόρων ειδών οντοτήτων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των σχέσεων συναίρεσης, των δομών προδικαστικών επιχειρημάτων και της γεφύρωσης αναφορών. Ωστόσο, οι δομές προδιάθεσης-επιχειρήματος για ονομαστικά προδιάγματα και τις σχέσεις γεφύρωσης αναφορών δεν έχουν μελετηθεί καλά και οι αναλύσεις τους εξακολουθούν να είναι πολύ δύσκολες. Οι πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στα νευρωνικά δίκτυα, ιδίως τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα που βασίζονται στην αυτοκατάρτιση, συμπεριλαμβανομένων του κ.α., έχουν βελτιώσει σημαντικά πολλά καθήκοντα επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, καθιστώντας δυνατή τη διερεύνηση της μελέτης για την ανάλυση της συνοχής σε ολόκληρο το κείμενο. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, εξετάζουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη ανάλυση της συνοχής στα ιαπωνικά κείμενα. Τα αποτελέσματά μας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις υπάρχουσες μελέτες σε κάθε εργασία, ειδικά τη βελτίωση περίπου 10 έως 20 σημείων τόσο για μηδενική ανάφωση όσο και για την ανάλυση της συνάφειας. Εξάλλου, αποδείξαμε επίσης ότι η επίλυση της συναπόφασης είναι διαφορετική από τα άλλα καθήκοντα και πρέπει να αντιμετωπιστεί ειδικά.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvű szöveg jelentését a különböző entitások közötti kohézió támogatja, beleértve a coreferencia kapcsolatokat, a predikátus-argumentum struktúrákat és az anafóra kapcsolatokat. A nominális predikátok és anafóra kapcsolatok áthidalásának predikát-argumentum struktúráit azonban nem tanulmányozták jól, és elemzésük még mindig nagyon nehéz volt. A neurális hálózatok közelmúltbeli fejlődése, különösen az önképzésen alapuló nyelvi modellek, beleértve a BERT-t (Devlin et al., 2019), jelentősen javították a természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokat, lehetővé téve a teljes szöveg kohéziójának elemzésére irányuló tanulmányba való merülést. Ebben a tanulmányban a japán szövegek kohéziójának integrált elemzésével foglalkozunk. Eredményeink minden feladatban jelentősen meghaladták a meglévő vizsgálatokat, különösen 10-20 pontos javulást mind a nulla anafóra, mind a coreferencia felbontás tekintetében. Ezenkívül azt is megmutattuk, hogy a coreferencia felbontás természetében különbözik a többi feladattól, és különösen kezelni kell.', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური ენის ტექსტის ნიშნავსი მხოლოდ განსხვავებული განსხვავებულ განსხვავებების შესახებ, შესახებ სხვადასხვა განსხვავებულ განსხვავებების შესახებ, პროდიკრატიული არგუმე მაგრამ, პროდიკატიკური არგუმენტის სტრუქტურები ნომინალური პრედიკატებისთვის და ანაფორის შესახებისთვის შესახებ არ უკეთებულია, და მათი ანალიზები უკვე ძ შემდეგ ნეიროლური ქსელებში, განსაკუთრებით, მუშაობით, მუშაობით მუშაობით ბერტი (Devlin et al., 2019) მსგავსი ბევრი ენერგიის პროცესი დავამუშაობით, რაც შეუძლებელია ყველა ტექსტის კოჰესიის ან ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ წაპონეთის ტექსტში ინტერგურაციული ანალიზია. ჩვენი შედეგი მნიშვნელოვანია, ყოველ რაოდენობაში, განსაკუთრებით 10-20 წერტილის გაუკეთესება, როგორც ნულ ანაფორა და სწორესების გაუკეთესება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენეთ, რომ სხვა საქმედების განსხვავება მისწორედ სხვა საქმედების განსხვავებულია და უნდა იყოს სპეციალურად.', 'it': "Il significato del testo del linguaggio naturale è supportato dalla coesione tra vari tipi di entità, tra cui relazioni di coreferenza, strutture predicato-argomento e relazioni di collegamento anafora. Tuttavia, le strutture predicato-argomento per i predicati nominali e le relazioni di ponte anafora non sono state studiate bene e le loro analisi sono state ancora molto difficili. I recenti progressi nelle reti neurali, in particolare i modelli linguistici basati sull'autoapprendimento tra cui BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), hanno migliorato significativamente molti compiti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, rendendo possibile immergersi nello studio sull'analisi della coesione nell'intero testo. In questo studio affrontiamo un'analisi integrata della coesione nei testi giapponesi. I nostri risultati hanno superato significativamente gli studi esistenti in ogni compito, in particolare circa 10-20 punti di miglioramento sia per la risoluzione di anafora zero che di coreferenza. Inoltre, abbiamo anche dimostrato che la risoluzione della coreferenza è diversa per natura dagli altri compiti e dovrebbe essere trattata in modo speciale.", 'kk': 'Табиғи тіл мәтінінің мазмұнын бірнеше түрлі құрылғылар арасында біріктіру қолданылады, сондай-ақ қатынастар, аргументтік құрылғылар, анафора қатынастарын біріктіру қолданылады. Бірақ, номиналдық предикаттар мен анафора қатынастарының аргументтері дұрыс оқылмаған, олардың анализациялары әлі қатты. Жуырдағы невралды желілерде, осылай қатар, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) тіл моделдерінде, өзінің оқыту үлгілері, көп табиғи тілдерді өзгерту тапсырмаларын өзгертіп, мәтіндегі солизацияның анализациясын зерттеу мүмкінді Бұл зерттеулерде жапон мәтіндерінде біріктірілген анализ жасайды. Біздің нәтижелеріміз әрбір тапсырмада бар зерттеулердің көбірек болып жатқан, осылай қатар 10-20 нүкте жақсартылып жатқан нөл анафора мен мәселелердің шешімі Сонымен қатар, біз басқа тапсырмалардың тапсырмаларының тапсырмасынан әртүрлі айырмашылығын көрсеттік.', 'mk': 'Значителството на текстот на природниот јазик е поддржано од кохезијата помеѓу различните видови на ентитети, вклучувајќи ги и односите на соодветност, структурите на предикат-аргумент и преместувањето на односите на анафората. Сепак, структурите на предикати-аргументи за номиналните предикати и преместувањето на анафорските односи не се добро проучени, а нивните анализи сé уште се многу тешки. Неодамнешните напредоци во неуралните мрежи, особено на јазичните модели базирани на самообука, вклучително и БЕРТ (Devlin et al., 2019), значително ги подобрија многу природни задачи за процес на јазик, овозможувајќи да се нурне во студијата за анализа на кохезијата во Во оваа студија, ние се справуваме со интегрирана анализа на кохезијата во јапонските тексти. Нашите резултати значително ги надминаа постоечките студии во секоја задача, особено околу 10 до 20 поени подобрување за нула анафора и резолуција на соодветност. Покрај тоа, исто така покажавме дека резолуцијата на соодветноста е различна од другите задачи и треба да се третира посебно.', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos teksto reikšmę remia įvairių rūšių subjektų sanglauda, įskaitant santykius su sąžiningumu, argumentavimo struktūras ir anaforos santykių tarpusavio susiejimą. Vis dėlto nominaliųjų predikatų ir santykių su anaforos jungtimi struktūros nepakankamai ištirtos ir jų analizė vis dar buvo labai sudėtinga. Neseniai padaryta pažanga nervų tinkluose, visų pirma savitarpio mokymu grindžiamuose kalbų modeliuose, įskaitant BERT (Devlin et al., 2019 m.), gerokai pagerino daugelį gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduočių, sudarant galimybę įsitraukti į sanglaudos analizės tyrimą visame tekste. Šiame tyrime nagrinėjame integruotą sanglaudos analizę Japonijos tekstuose. Mūsų rezultatai gerokai viršijo esamus kiekvienos užduoties tyrimus, ypač apie 10–20 taškų pagerėjimą tiek dėl nulinės anaforos, tiek dėl koreferencijos. Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം വ്യത്യസ്ത വസ്തുക്കളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു. കോര്\u200dഫനെന്\u200dസ് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d, ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറ് കൂ എന്നിട്ടും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടും അനാഫോറാ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും നിശ്ചയിക്കാനുള്ള ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറ് അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല വിവരങ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്ററുകളിലെ അടുത്തുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി (ഡെവെല്\u200dലിന്\u200d എല്\u200d., 2019), സ്വയം പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രകൃ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ജപ്പാനീസ് ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്ന ഒരു അന്വേഷണം നമ്മള്\u200d നോക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഓരോ ജോലിയിലും നിലവിലുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പൂജ്യത്തിനും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200d Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.', 'ms': 'Maknanya teks bahasa semulajadi disokong oleh persatuan diantara berbagai jenis entiti, termasuk hubungan persatuan, struktur predikat-argumen, dan menyambung hubungan anafora. Namun, struktur argumen-predikat untuk predikat nominal dan hubungan anafora menyatukan belum dipelajari dengan baik, dan analisis mereka masih sangat sukar. Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam rangkaian saraf, terutamanya, model bahasa berdasarkan latihan diri termasuk BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), telah meningkatkan banyak tugas pemprosesan bahasa alam, yang memungkinkan untuk menyelam ke dalam kajian analisis kohesi dalam seluruh teks. Dalam kajian ini, kita menghadapi analisis terkait persatuan dalam teks Jepun. Hasil kami jauh lebih melampaui kajian yang wujud dalam setiap tugas, terutama kira-kira 10 hingga 20 titik peningkatan kedua-dua untuk tiada anafora dan resolusi persamaan. Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.', 'no': 'Senninga av naturspråksteksten er støtta av kohesisjon mellom ulike typar einingar, inkludert koreferanserte forhold, predikate argument-strukturer og bryting av anaforrelasjonar. Dette er imidlertid ikkje studiert noko godt predikativ argument-strukturer for nominale predikatar og brytinga av anaforrelasjonar, og deres analyser er fortsatt svært vanskeleg. Nyleg utviklingar i neuralnettverk, særleg selvøvingsbaserte språk-modeller, inkludert BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), har betydelig forbedra mange naturspråk-handteringsoppgåver, slik at det er mogleg å delta inn i studien om analysen av kohesisjon i hele teksten. I denne studien løyser vi ein integrert analyse av kohesisjon i japanske tekstar. Resultatet våre utførte betydelig eksisterande studiar i kvar oppgåve, spesielt omtrent 10 til 20 punktforbetringar både for null anafora og koreferanse oppløysing. I tillegg viste vi også at koreferanse oppløysing er ulike i naturen frå dei andre oppgåva og bør behandleast spesielt.', 'pl': 'Znaczenie tekstu językowego naturalnego wspiera spójność różnego rodzaju podmiotów, w tym relacje współreferencyjne, struktury predykatów-argumentów, a także relacje anaforyczne. Jednak struktury predykatów-argumentów dla predykatów nominalnych i relacji anaforycznych nie zostały zbadane dobrze, a ich analizy nadal były bardzo trudne. Ostatnie postępy w sieciach neuronowych, w szczególności modele językowe oparte na samokształceniu, w tym BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), znacznie poprawiły wiele zadań związanych z przetwarzaniem języka naturalnego, umożliwiając zanurzenie się w badanie analizy spójności w całym tekście. W niniejszym opracowaniu zajmujemy się zintegrowaną analizą spójności tekstów japońskich. Nasze wyniki znacząco przewyższyły istniejące badania w każdym zadaniu, zwłaszcza około 10-20 punktowe poprawy zarówno dla zerowej anafory, jak i rozdzielczości współdziałania. Ponadto pokazaliśmy również, że rozwiązywanie współdziałalności różni się od innych zadań i powinno być traktowane specjalnie.', 'mt': 'It-tifsira tat-test tal-lingwa naturali hija appoġġjata mill-koeżjoni fost diversi tipi ta’ entitajiet, inklużi r-relazzjonijiet ta’ koreferenza, l-istrutturi predikati-argumenti, u t-tlaqqigħ tar-relazzjonijiet tal-anafora. Madankollu, l-istrutturi predikati-argumenti għall-predikati nominali u r-relazzjonijiet bejn l-anafora ma ġewx studjati tajjeb, u l-analiżi tagħhom għadha diffiċli ħafna. L-avvanzi reċenti fin-netwerks newrali, b’mod partikolari mudelli lingwistiċi bbażati fuq it-taħriġ awtonomu inklużi BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), tejbu b’mod sinifikanti ħafna kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali, u b’hekk ippermettew li wieħed jidħol fl-istudju dwar l-analiżi tal-koeżjoni fit-test kollu. F’dan l-istudju, nindirizzaw analiżi integrata tal-koeżjoni fit-testi Ġappuniżi. Ir-riżultati tagħna qabżu b’mod sinifikanti l-istudji eżistenti f’kull kompitu, speċjalment titjib ta’ madwar 10 sa 20 punt kemm għal anafora żero kif ukoll għal riżoluzzjoni ta’ korreferenza. Barra minn hekk, urejna wkoll li r-riżoluzzjoni ta’ koreferenza hija differenti fin-natura mill-kompiti l-oħra u għandha tiġi ttrattata b’mod speċjali.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэлний текст гэсэн утгыг олон төрлийн бүлгүүдийн хоорондоо хамааралтай байгууллагууд дэмжигддэг. Гэхдээ нэр дэвшүүлэгч, анафора холбоотой аргументын бүтэц сайн судалгаагүй, тэдний шинжилгээ нь хэцүү байсан. Сүүлийн үеийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд, ялангуяа, өөртөө сургалтын үндсэн хэл загварууд нь BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) болон ихэнх байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлүүд маш их сайжруулсан бөгөөд бүх текст бүх нийгэмшлийн шинжилгээ судалж болох болом Энэ судалгаанд бид Японы текстүүдэд нийлүүлэлтийн нэгтгэл шинжилгээг зохион байгуулдаг. Бидний үр дүн нь ажил бүрт байгаа судалгааны үр дүнд үнэхээр үр дүнтэй болсон. Ялангуяа 10-20 цэг нь анафора болон зэрэгцээний шийдвэрлэлт хоёуланг сайжруулсан. Мөн бид зөвхөн зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэл бусад үйл ажиллагаанаас ялгаатай байдаг гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'ro': 'Semnificația textului limbajului natural este susținută de coeziunea dintre diferite tipuri de entități, inclusiv relațiile de corefență, structurile predicat-argument și relațiile anaforice. Cu toate acestea, structurile predicat-argument pentru predicatele nominale și relațiile anaforice de legătură nu au fost studiate bine, iar analizele lor au fost încă foarte dificile. Progresele recente în rețelele neuronale, în special modelele lingvistice bazate pe auto-instruire, inclusiv BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), au îmbunătățit semnificativ multe sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural, făcând posibilă scufundarea în studiul privind analiza coeziunii în întregul text. În acest studiu abordăm o analiză integrată a coeziunii în textele japoneze. Rezultatele noastre au depășit semnificativ studiile existente în fiecare sarcină, în special îmbunătățirea de aproximativ 10 până la 20 de puncte atât pentru rezoluția anaforei zero, cât și coreferenței. Mai mult, am arătat, de asemenea, că rezoluția corefenței este diferită ca natură de celelalte sarcini și ar trebui tratată special.', 'sr': 'Smatranje teksta prirodnog jezika podržava kohezija među različitim vrstama entitata, uključujući odnose o pristojnosti, predikatne strukture argumenta i premeštanje anaforskih odnosa. Međutim, predikatne argumentske strukture za nominalne predikate i premeštanje anaforskih odnosa nisu dobro proučene, a njihove analize su još uvek bile veoma teške. Nedavni napredak u neuralnim mrežama, posebno, modeli jezika koji se oslanjaju na sebi, uključujući BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), značajno su poboljšali mnoge prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika, omogućavajući da se zaronimo u studiju o analizi kohezije u cjelom tekstu. U ovom istraživanju, riješimo integriranu analizu kohezije u japanskim tekstima. Naši rezultati su značajno iznosili postojeće ispitivanje u svakom zadatku, posebno poboljšanje od 10 do 20 tačka i za nulu anaforu i rezoluciju korisnosti. Osim toga, takođe smo pokazali da je rezolucija pristojnosti drugačija u prirodi od drugih zadataka i treba se posebno tretirati.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පාළුවේ තේරුම සහය විවිධ වර්ගයක් සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ස නමුත්, නාමිකල් ප්\u200dරීඩිකේට්ස් සහ අනාෆෝරා සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සඳහා ප්\u200d අලුත් ප්\u200dරධානයක් න්යුරෝල් ජාලයේ, විශේෂයෙන්ම, ස්වයෝ ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා භාෂා මොඩේල් වල BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), ගොඩක් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරධානය ක මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි ජාපාන් පාට්ස් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දේවල් විශේෂයෙන් හැම වැඩේ තියෙන අභ්\u200dයාසයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරලා තියෙන තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අනිත් වැඩක් වලින් ප්\u200dරාකෘතිය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා.', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان کی معنی مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف موجودات کے ذریعہ سے مدد کی جاتی ہے، شامل کرم کے ارتباط، مختلف دلیل کی ساختاری، اور انفاورا رابطہ کے مطابق مطابق کرنا However, predicate arguments structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses are still very difficult. نیورل نیٹورک میں اچھی پیشرفت، مخصوصاً BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) کے شامل اپنی تدریس کی زبان کی مدلکوں میں بہت سی طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں کو بڑھا دیا گیا ہے، اور اسے پورے ٹکسٹ میں کثرت کے تحقیق کے بارے میں داخل کرنا امکان دیا گیا ہے. اس مطالعہ میں ہم جاپانی ٹیکسٹوں میں ایک تفریق کی تفریق کریں گے۔ ہمارے نتائج ہر کام میں موجود مطالعہ سے زیادہ اضافہ ہوگئے، مخصوصاً 10-20 پوینٹ کے لئے صفر انفور اور مہربانی رخصت کے لئے بھی اضافہ ہوگئے۔ اور ہم نے بھی دکھایا کہ مہربانی رضامندی رضامندی کے ساتھ دوسرے کاموں سے مختلف ہے اور ویسی ہی طرح عمل کرنا چاہیے۔', 'sv': 'Betydelsen av naturlig språktext stöds av sammanhållning mellan olika typer av entiteter, inklusive coreferencerelationer, predikat-argumentstrukturer och överbryggande anaforarelationer. Men predikat-argumentstrukturer för nominella predikater och överbryggande anaforarelationer har inte studerats väl, och deras analyser har fortfarande varit mycket svåra. De senaste framstegen inom neurala nätverk, särskilt självträningsbaserade språkmodeller inklusive BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), har avsevärt förbättrat många naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter, vilket gör det möjligt att dyka in i studien om analys av sammanhållning i hela texten. I denna studie behandlar vi en integrerad analys av sammanhållning i japanska texter. Våra resultat överträffade signifikant befintliga studier i varje uppgift, särskilt cirka 10 till 20 punkter förbättring både för noll anafora och coreference upplösning. Dessutom visade vi att coreferencelolution skiljer sig från de andra uppgifterna och bör behandlas speciellt.', 'so': "Macluumaadka afka dabiiciga ah waxaa lagu caawiyaa isku xiriir, kuwaas oo ka mid ah xiriir kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan dhismaha muran, iyo xiriir anafo ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee lama baran si wanaagsan, baaritaankooduna weli aad buu u adag yahay. Horumarinta ee shabakada neurada, khusuusan modellada afka iskuulka ah, including BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), waxay ku hagaajiyeen shaqooyin kala baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah, waxaana suurtagal in lagu beddelo waxbarashada ku saabsan baaritaanka isku xirashada ee buuxda. In this study, we tackle an integrated analysis of cohesion in Japanese texts.  Sababyadayadii waxay si weyn u sameyn jireen waxbarasho joogta ah oo shaqo walba, khusuusan in lagu beddelo qiyaastii 10-20 barbaar bedelka ah iyo sidoo kale go'aanka nuurka iyo sawirada. Sidoo kale waxaan sidoo kale muujinnay in go’aanka qeybta ah dabiicadda uu ka duwan yahay shaqada kale waana in loo dhaqdhaqaaqo si gaar ah.", 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உரையின் அர்த்தம் பலவித வகையான பொருள்களுக்கு இணைப்புடன் ஆதரிக்கப்படுகிறது, குறிப்பிட்ட தொடர்புகள், முன்னிருப்பு வார எனினும், புதிய குறிப்பிடும் மற்றும் பிரிட்டிக்ரா தொடர்புகளுக்கு முன்னிருப்பு வாய்ப்பு உருவம் தற்போதைய புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களில் முன்னேற்றம் செய்துள்ளது, குறிப்பாக, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) உடன் தன்னியக்க பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரிகளில் பெரும்பாலான இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் ஒரு முழுமையான ஆய்வு செய்யும் ஜப்பானிய உரைகளில் ஒன்றுசேர்க்கப்பட்டது. ஒவ்வொரு பணியில் இருக்கும் படிப்பு மேலும், நாம் குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் மற்ற பணிகளிலிருந்து வேறு இயற்கையில் இருந்து மாறுபட்டுள்ளது மற்றும்', 'uz': "Natalik til matnning ma'nosi, bir xil xil narsalar bilan birlashtirish qoʻllaniladi, murakkab munosabatlarni, predicating argumentlar structurlarini va anafora munosabatlarini birlashtirish mumkin. Lekin, taqdimotlar uchun qo'llanmalar va birlashtirish anafora munosabatlarini yaxshi o'rganib qolmadi va ularning analytiklari juda qiyin edi. Recent advances in neural networks, in particular, self training-based language models including BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), have significantly improved many natural language processing tasks, making it possible to dive into the study on analysis of cohesion in the whole text.  Bu o'qituvda, biz Yaponiya matnlarida bir bir bir bir narsalarni o'rganamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz har bir vazifa ichida mavjud ta'lim o'qituvchilarini bajardi, hususiyati 10-20 nuqt o'zgartiradi, nuqta va murakkablik o'zgartirish uchun. Ko'rsatganda, biz murakkablik asosida boshqa vazifalardan o'zgarishdir va maxsus qilish kerak.", 'vi': 'Ý nghĩa của văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên được ủng hộ bởi sự liên kết giữa các loại thực thể khác nhau, bao gồm các quan hệ hạn chế, cấu trúc khó khăn và kết nối quan hệ Anaphora. Tuy nhiên, cấu trúc khó khăn đối với tình trạng khó khăn biểu tượng và kết nối quan hệ Anaphora vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu kỹ, và phân tích của chúng vẫn rất khó khăn. Những tiến bộ gần đây trong hệ thần kinh, đặc biệt, về các mô hình ngôn ngữ dựa trên tự đào tạo, bao gồm cả BERT (Devlin et al., 99), đã cải thiện đáng kể nhiều công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, làm cho phép nghiên cứu phân tích sự kết hợp trong to àn bộ văn bản. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng ta phải giải quyết một cuộc phân tích hoà hợp trong văn bản Nhật Bản. Kết quả của chúng ta đã hoàn thành những nghiên cứu hiện tại trong mỗi nhiệm vụ, đặc biệt là tiến bộ khoảng 10-20 về việc cải tiến không Anaphora và Corteefrence solution. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cũng đã cho thấy có quyết định hạn hẹp khác với các nhiệm vụ khác và nên được đối xử đặc biệt.', 'nl': 'De betekenis van natuurtaaltekst wordt ondersteund door cohesie tussen verschillende soorten entiteiten, waaronder coreference relaties, predicaat-argument structuren en overbruggende anafora relaties. Echter, predicaat-argument structuren voor nominale predicaten en overbruggende anafora relaties zijn niet goed bestudeerd, en hun analyses zijn nog steeds zeer moeilijk geweest. Recente vooruitgang in neurale netwerken, met name op zelftraining gebaseerde taalmodellen waaronder BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), hebben veel natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken aanzienlijk verbeterd, waardoor het mogelijk is om te duiken in de studie naar analyse van cohesie in de hele tekst. In deze studie behandelen we een geïntegreerde analyse van samenhang in Japanse teksten. Onze resultaten overtroffen significant bestaande studies in elke taak, vooral ongeveer 10 tot 20-puntverbetering zowel voor nul anafora als coreferentie resolutie. Bovendien hebben we ook laten zien dat de coferentieresolutie van aard verschilt van de andere taken en speciaal moet worden behandeld.', 'bg': 'Значението на текста на естествения език се подкрепя от сближаване между различни видове субекти, включително кореферентни отношения, предикатно-аргументни структури и свързващи анафорни отношения. Структурите на предикат-аргументите за номинални предикати и свързващите анафорни отношения обаче не са добре проучени и техните анализи все още са много трудни. Неотдавнашният напредък в невронните мрежи, по-специално езиковите модели, базирани на самостоятелно обучение, включително и БРТ (Девлин и др., 2019), значително подобри много задачи по обработка на естествения език, което дава възможност да се потопи в проучването на анализа на сближаването в целия текст. В това проучване се занимаваме с интегриран анализ на сближаването в японските текстове. Нашите резултати значително надминават съществуващите проучвания във всяка задача, особено подобрение с около 10 до 20 точки както за нулева анафора, така и за резолюция на кореференцията. Освен това показахме, че резолюцията на съвместната референция е различна по природа от другите задачи и трябва да се третира специално.', 'da': 'Betydningen af naturligt sprog tekst understøttes af samhørighed mellem forskellige former for enheder, herunder coreference relationer, prædikat-argumentstrukturer og brobyggende anaphora relationer. Men prædikat-argumentstrukturer for nominelle prædikater og broforbindelser er ikke blevet undersøgt godt, og deres analyser har stadig været meget vanskelige. De seneste fremskridt inden for neurale netværk, især selvtræningsbaserede sprogmodeller, herunder BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), har forbedret mange natursprogbehandlingsopgaver betydeligt, hvilket gør det muligt at dykke ned i undersøgelsen af samhørighedsanalyse i hele teksten. I denne undersøgelse behandler vi en integreret analyse af samhørigheden i japanske tekster. Vores resultater overgik betydeligt eksisterende undersøgelser i hver opgave, især omkring 10 til 20 point forbedring både for nul anaphora og coreference opløsning. Desuden viste vi også, at coreference resolution er forskellig i karakter fra de øvrige opgaver og bør behandles specielt.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje teksta prirodnog jezika podržava kohezija među različitim vrstama entitata, uključujući odnose o pristojnosti, strukture predikata argumenta, te prebacivanje anaforskih odnosa. Međutim, predikatne strukture argumentacija za nominalne predikate i premeštanje anaforskih odnosa nisu dobro ispitivane, a njihove analize još uvijek su bile veoma teške. Nedavni napredak u neuronskim mrežama, posebno, modeli jezika koji se temelji na sebi obuku uključujući BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), značajno su poboljšali mnoge prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika, omogućavajući se zaroniti u ispitivanje o analizi kohezije u cjelom tekstu. U ovom ispitivanju rješavamo integriranu analizu kohezije u japanskim tekstima. Naši rezultati su značajno iznosili postojeće ispitivanje u svakom zadatku, posebno poboljšanje od 10 do 20 bodova kako za nulu anaforu i rezoluciju liječenja. Osim toga, također smo pokazali da je rješenje pristojnosti različita u prirodi od drugih zadataka i treba se posebno tretirati.', 'de': 'Die Bedeutung von natursprachlichem Text wird durch Kohäsion zwischen verschiedenen Arten von Entitäten unterstützt, einschließlich Coreferenz-Beziehungen, Prädikat-Argument-Strukturen und überbrückende Anaphora-Beziehungen. Prädikat-Argument-Strukturen für nominale Prädikate und überbrückende Anaphora-Beziehungen wurden jedoch nicht gut untersucht und ihre Analysen waren immer noch sehr schwierig. Jüngste Fortschritte in neuronalen Netzen, insbesondere selbsttrainingsbasierte Sprachmodelle einschließlich BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), haben viele Aufgaben der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache deutlich verbessert und es ermöglicht, in die Studie zur Analyse der Kohäsion im gesamten Text einzutauchen. In dieser Studie beschäftigen wir uns mit einer integrierten Kohäsionsanalyse in japanischen Texten. Unsere Ergebnisse übertrafen signifikant bestehende Studien in jeder Aufgabe, insbesondere etwa 10- bis 20-Punkte-Verbesserung sowohl bei Null-Anaphora- als auch bei Coreferenzauflösung. Darüber hinaus haben wir auch gezeigt, dass die Coreferenzauflösung sich von den anderen Aufgaben unterscheidet und speziell behandelt werden sollte.', 'ko': '자연 언어 텍스트의 의미는 각종 실체 간의 연결이 지지하는 것으로 공지 관계, 술어-논원 구조와 다리 접반지 관계를 포함한다.그러나 명사성 술어의 술어인 논원 구조와 연결 반지의 관계는 좋은 연구를 받지 못했고 그들의 분석은 여전히 매우 어렵다.신경 네트워크의 최신 진전, 특히 자기 훈련을 바탕으로 하는 언어 모델, BERT(Devlin et al., 2019)를 포함하여 많은 자연 언어 처리 임무를 현저하게 개선하여 우리는 전체 텍스트의 연결 분석을 깊이 연구할 수 있다.본 연구에서 우리는 일본어 문장의 연결을 종합적으로 분석했다.우리의 결과는 모든 임무에서 기존의 연구보다 현저히 우수한데, 특히 0회지와 공지의 해소 방면에서 10~20퍼센트 포인트 높아졌다.또 공지해소는 다른 임무와는 본질적으로 다르기 때문에 특별히 대처해야 한다고 밝혔다.', 'sw': 'Inamaana ya maandishi ya lugha ya asili inaungwa mkono na ushirikiano kati ya aina mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na mahusiano ya msingi, miundombinu ya mahusiano, na kuhusiana na mahusiano yanayofanana. Hata hivyo, miundombinu yenye hoja ya utabiri na mahusiano ya kijinsia hayajafunzwa vizuri, na uchambuzi wao bado umekuwa vigumu. Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika mitandao ya kijamii, hususani mifano ya lugha yenyewe ya kujifunza ikiwa ni pamoja na BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), imeboresha kazi nyingi za mchakato wa lugha za asili, na hivyo inawezekana kuingia katika utafiti kuhusu uchambuzi wa ushirikiano katika ujumbe huu wote. Katika utafiti huu, tunakabiliana na uchambuzi wa ushirikiano katika ujumbe wa ujumbe wa Kijapani. Matokeo yetu yalifanyika kwa kiasi kikubwa na utafiti ulioendelea katika kila kazi, hususani takribani maendeleo ya pointi 10 hadi 20 kwa ajili ya utambulisho wa sifuri na uhakika. Zaidi ya hayo, tulionyesha kwamba suluhisho la msingi ni tofauti katika asili ya kazi nyingine na inapaswa kutekelezwa maalum.', 'id': 'Arti dari teks bahasa alami didukung oleh kohesi antara berbagai jenis entitas, termasuk hubungan koreferensi, struktur predikat-argumen, dan menyambung hubungan anafora. Namun, struktur argumen-predikat untuk predikat nominal dan hubungan anafora bridge belum dipelajari dengan baik, dan analisis mereka masih sangat sulit. Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam jaringan saraf, terutama, model bahasa berdasarkan pelatihan diri termasuk BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), telah meningkatkan banyak tugas proses bahasa alam, memungkinkan untuk menyelam ke dalam studi tentang analisis kohesi dalam seluruh teks. Dalam penelitian ini, kami mengatasi analisis integral kohesi dalam teks Jepang. Our results significantly outperformed existing studies in each task, especially about 10 to 20 point improvement both for zero anaphora and coreference resolution.  Selain itu, kami juga menunjukkan bahwa resolusi koreferensi berbeda dalam alam dari tugas lain dan seharusnya diperlakukan secara khusus.', 'sq': 'Dënimi i tekstit të gjuhës natyrore mbështetet nga kohezioni midis llojeve të ndryshme të njësive, duke përfshirë marrëdhëniet koreference, strukturat predicate-argument dhe lidhjet e anaforës. However, predicate-argument structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses have been still very difficult.  Përparimet e fundit në rrjetet neurale, veçanërisht modelet e gjuhës me bazë në vetëtrajnimin duke përfshirë BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), kanë përmirësuar ndjeshëm shumë detyra natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës, duke e bërë të mundur zhytjen në studimin mbi analizën e kohezionit në të gjithë tekstin. Në këtë studim, ne trajtojmë një analizë të integruar të kohezionit në tekstet japoneze. Rezultatet tona tejkaluan ndjeshëm studimet ekzistuese në çdo detyrë, veçanërisht rreth 10 deri 20 pikë përmirësim si për anaforën zero dhe zgjidhjen e koreferencës. Përveç kësaj, ne treguam gjithashtu se rezoluta e koreferencës është ndryshe në natyrë nga detyrat e tjera dhe duhet trajtuar veçanërisht.', 'af': "Die betekening van natuurlike taal teks word ondersteun deur kohesie onder verskillende soorte entiteite, insluitend koreferensie verhouding, predikaat-argument strukture en bruiding van anaforrelasies. Maar predikaat-argumentstrukture vir nominale predikate en bruiding van anaforrelasies is nie goed ondersoek nie, en hulle analisies is nog baie moeilik. Onlangse vorderings in neuralnetwerke, spesifieke, selfoefening-gebaseerde taal modele insluitend BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), het baie natuurlike taal-verwerking-opdragte beter, maak dit moontlik om in die studie oor analisie van kohesie in die hele teks te trek. In hierdie studie het ons 'n integreerde analisie van kohesie in Japanse teks opgesluit. Ons resultate het betekenlik uitgevoer bestaande studies in elke taak, veral omtrent 10 tot 20 punt verbetering beide vir nul anafora en koreferensieresolusie. Ook het ons ook wys dat die goederheidsoplossing in die natuur verskillend is van die ander opdragte en spesiaal behandel moet word.", 'fa': 'معنی متن زبان طبیعی توسط هماهنگی بین نوع متفاوت، شامل رابطه\u200cهای هماهنگی، ساختارهای مختلف حجت و ارتباطات آنفورا، پشتیبانی می\u200cشود. با این حال، ساختارهای مختلف دلیل برای پیشنهاد های نومیل و ارتباط های نافورا خوب مطالعه نشده و تحلیل آنها هنوز بسیار سخت است. پیشرفت های اخیر در شبکه های عصبی، مخصوصا، مدل های زبانی بر اساس خودآموزش خود، شامل BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) بسیاری از کارهای پردازش زبانی طبیعی را به طور معنی بهتر کرده اند، و به این دلیل ممکن است در مطالعه درباره تحلیل تعلق در کل متن بپردازید. در این مطالعه، ما با تحلیل متصل در متن ژاپنی تحلیل می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما در هر کاری تحقیقات موجود بیشتر از حدود ۱۰ تا ۲۰ نقطه پیشرفت می\u200cکردند، و مخصوصا برای تغییر تغییر صفر و تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر علاوه بر این، ما همچنین نشان دادیم که در طبیعت از کارهای دیگر متفاوت است و به طور مخصوص باید درمان شود.', 'tr': 'Täbiýal dil metiniň maksady dürli birnäçe milletler arasynda kohösiýa tarapyndan desteklenýär, näçe görnöşiklik baglaşyklary we anafora baglaşyklary bilen birleştirilýär. Ýöne, nominal predikat we anafora baglaýyşlary üçin öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden geçirilmedi we olaryň analýşileri entägem kyn. Ýakyndaky neural şebekelerde, özlerine tabanly dil nusgalarynda BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), tebigy dillerin işlemesi täzeliklerini örän gowuraşdyryp, bir topar metin içinde kohesiýanlygyň analizi barlamagy mümkin edip biler. Bu okuwda biz Japonça tekstlerde kohösiýasynyň integral analyzasyny çykýarys. Biziň netijelerimiz her täzimde bolan öýtgewlerimizi örän çözdi, ýöne 10-20 nokatlar hem nähili anafora we taýýarlyk çözümleri üçin gowy boldy. Mundan soňra, biz hem özümizde ýüregiň çözümleşmegi tebigatda başga zadylaryň üýtgeşik bolandygyny görkezdik we özümiziň aňsatlyk bilen tedavi edilmelidigini görkezdik.', 'hy': 'The meaning of natural language text is supported by cohesion among various kinds of entities, including coreference relations, predicate-argument structures, and bridging anaphora relations.  However, predicate-argument structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses have been still very difficult.  Նյարդային ցանցերի վերջին զարգացումները, հատկապես ինքնավարժման հիմնված լեզվի մոդելները, ներառյալ BER-ը (Devin et al., 2019), շատ բնական լեզվի վերամշակման խնդիրներ են նշանակալի բարելավել, ինչը հնարավորություն է տալիս ներխուժվել ամբողջ տեքստում կոնցե Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք դիտարկում ենք ճապոնացի տեքստերում կոնցենսիայի ինտեգրված վերլուծությունը: Մեր արդյունքները նշանակալիորեն գերազանցեցին յուրաքանչյուր խնդրի ընթացքում գոյություն ունեցող ուսումնասիրությունները, հատկապես մոտ 10-20 միավորի բարելավումը՝ ոչ թե զրոյական անաֆորայի, այլ նաև կոր Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.', 'am': 'የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ጽሑፍ በተለያዩ ዓይነት አካባቢዎች፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ እና የአናፎራ ግንኙነት እና ግንኙነት በመቀላቀል ይረዳል፡፡ However, predicate-argument structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses have been still very difficult.  በናውራዊ መረብ ውስጥ የሚደረጉ ቅድሚያ፣ በተለይም የራሳቸውን ትምህርት የቋንቋ ሞዴላዎች፣ BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) የተባለው ብዙዎችን የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ስርዓቶች በሙሉ ጽሑፉ ውስጥ ማስታወቂያውን በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የጃፓንኛ ጽሑፎች የጥያቄ ማስታወቂያውን እናቆማለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን በሁሉም ስራ ውስጥ የሚኖረውን ትምህርት በማድረግ፣ በተለየ አሥር ወደ 20 ነጥብ ማድረግ እና የክፍለ ትምህርት ማስታወቂያውን በማድረግ አግኝቷል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የግንኙነት መልስ ከሌሎቹ ስራ የተለየ እንደሆነ እና በተለየን ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil məlumatının anlamı müxtəlif məlumatların arasında birləşməsi ilə dəstəklənir, mərhəmətli məlumatlar, predikat arqümat quruluşları və anafora ilişkilerini birləşdirən. Ancaq nominal predikat və anafora ilişkisi üçün predikat arqüd quruları yaxşı təhsil edilməmişdir və onların analizi hələ də çox çətindir. Nəyral ağlarında, özlərinə də, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) dahil olaraq, özünün təhsil edilən dil modellərinin çoxluğunu təbii dil işləməsi üçün çoxluğunu daha yaxşı təhsil etdi və bütün mətnlərin birləşməsi analizi barəsində təhsil etməyi mümkün etdi. Bu təhsil içində, Japonca mətnlərdə birləşdirilmiş bir analizi çəkirik. Sonuçlarımız hər iş içində mövcuddur təhsil edilən təhsil işləri çox üstün etdi, özellikle 10-20 nöqtədə də sıfır anafora və mərhəmət çözünürləri üçün daha yaxşı təhsil etdi. Daha sonra, biz də göstərdik ki, mərhəmət çözünürləri təbiətində digər işlərdən fərqli olduğunu və özlərinə müəyyən edilməlidir.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ধরনের বস্তুর মধ্যে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার লেখার মানে সমর্থন প্রদান করা হয়, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্ক, যুক্তিগত যুক্তির স তবে নোনামিনাল প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং ব্রিফোরা সম্পর্কের জন্য যুক্তির কাঠামো বিশেষ করা হয় নি, আর তাদের বিশ্লেষণ এখনো খুব কঠিন। সাম্প্রতিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কে উন্নয়ন, বিশেষ করে বিবেরেট (ডেভেলিনেট আল, ২০১৯) সহ নিজের প্রশিক্ষণের ভাষার মডেল, অনেক প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের উন্নতি  এই গবেষণায় আমরা জাপানি লেখাগুলোতে একত্রিত এক বিশ্লেষণের মুখোমুখি হয়েছি। Our results significantly outperformed existing studies in each task, especially about 10 to 20 point improvement both for zero anaphora and coreference resolution.  Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.', 'bs': 'Smatranje teksta prirodnog jezika podržava kohezija među različitim vrstama entitata, uključujući odnose o pristojnosti, predikatne strukture argumenta i premještanje anaforskih odnosa. Međutim, strukture predikata argumentacija za nominalne predikate i premeštanje anaforskih odnosa nisu dobro proučene, a njihove analize su još uvijek bile veoma teške. Nedavni napredak u neuronskim mrežama, posebno, modeli jezika koji se temelji na sebi obuku uključujući BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), značajno su poboljšali mnoge prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika, omogućavajući da se zaronimo u ispitivanje o analizi kohezije u cjelom tekstu. U ovom istraživanju, riješimo integriranu analizu kohezije u japanskim tekstima. Naši rezultati su značajno iznosili postojeće ispitivanje u svakom zadatku, posebno poboljšanje od 10 do 20 tačka i za nulu anaforu i rezoluciju dobrote. Osim toga, također smo pokazali da je rješenje pristojnosti drugačija od drugih zadataka i treba se posebno tretirati.', 'ca': "The meaning of natural language text is supported by cohesion among various kinds of entities, including coreference relations, predicate-argument structures, and bridging anaphora relations.  However, predicate-argument structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses have been still very difficult.  Els avanços recents en les xarxes neurals, en particular, els models de llenguatge basats en l'autocapacitació, incloent BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), han millorat significativament moltes tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges, fent possible immersions en l'estudi sobre l'anàlisi de la cohesió en tot el text. In this study, we tackle an integrated analysis of cohesion in Japanese texts.  Els nostres resultats van superar significativament els estudis existents en cada tasca, especialment entre 10 i 20 punts d'millora tant per a la resolució de l'anàfora zero com de la coreferència. Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.", 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen tekstin merkitystä tukee erilaisten entiteettien välinen yhteenkuuluvuus, mukaan lukien koreferenssisuhteet, predikaatti-argumenttirakenteet ja sillalliset anaforasohteet. Nimellisten predikaattien predikaatti-argumenttirakenteita ja siltanaforasuhteita ei kuitenkaan ole tutkittu hyvin, ja niiden analysointi on ollut edelleen hyvin vaikeaa. Neuroverkkojen viimeaikainen kehitys, erityisesti itsekoulutukseen perustuvat kielimallit mukaan lukien BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), on merkittävästi parantanut monia luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtäviä, minkä ansiosta on mahdollista sukeltaa koko tekstin koheesioanalyysiin. Tässä tutkimuksessa käsittelemme japanilaisten tekstien yhtenäistä koheesioanalyysia. Tuloksemme ylittivät merkittävästi olemassa olevat tutkimukset kussakin tehtävässä, erityisesti noin 10–20 pisteen parannus sekä nollaanaforan että koreferenssin resoluution suhteen. Lisäksi osoitimme, että yhteispäätösratkaisu on luonteeltaan erilainen kuin muut tehtävät ja että sitä tulisi käsitellä erityisesti.', 'cs': 'Význam textu přirozeného jazyka je podporován soudržností mezi různými druhy entit, včetně koreferenčních vztahů, predikátovo-argumentních struktur a překlenujících anaforických vztahů. Nicméně predikát-argument struktury pro nominální predikáty a překlenující anaforické vztahy nebyly dobře studovány a jejich analýzy jsou stále velmi obtížné. Nedávné pokroky v neuronových sítích, zejména jazykové modely založené na samotném tréninku včetně BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), výrazně zlepšily mnoho úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka, což umožnilo ponořit se do studie o analýze soudržnosti v celém textu. V této studii se zabýváme integrovanou analýzou soudržnosti japonských textů. Naše výsledky výrazně překonaly existující studie v každém úkolu, zejména asi 10 až 20 bodové zlepšení jak pro nulovou anaforu, tak pro rozlišení koreference. Kromě toho jsme také ukázali, že řešení koreferencí se liší povahou od ostatních úkolů a mělo by být zacházeno speciálně.', 'et': 'Looduskeelse teksti tähendust toetab mitmesuguste üksuste ühtekuuluvus, sealhulgas korefitseerimissuhted, predikaadi-argumendi struktuurid ja anafoorsed sidemed. Siiski ei ole nominaalsete predikaatide ja anafoorsete suhete predikaatide argumentide struktuure hästi uuritud ning nende analüüsid on olnud veel väga keerulised. Hiljutised edusammud närvivõrkudes, eelkõige isekoolitusel põhinevates keelemudelites, sealhulgas BERT (Devlin jt., 2019), on oluliselt parandanud paljusid looduskeele töötlemise ülesandeid, võimaldades sukelduda uuringusse, mis käsitleb ühtekuuluvuse analüüsi kogu tekstis. Käesolevas uuringus käsitleme jaapani tekstides ühtekuuluvuse integreeritud analüüsi. Meie tulemused ületasid oluliselt olemasolevaid uuringuid igas ülesandes, eriti umbes 10 kuni 20 punkti paranemist nii null anafoori kui ka koreferentsuse resolutsiooni osas. Lisaks näitasime, et kaasviidete lahendamine erineb oma olemuselt teistest ülesannetest ja seda tuleks eriliselt käsitleda.', 'ha': "Yakunan littãfin harshen na natura yana ƙarfafa da koshi a tsakanin nau'i-nau'i cikin nau'i daban-nau'i, kamar ma'anar mutane, bakwai-argument, da sami haɗi na anafora. However, predicate-argument structures for nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analyses have been still very difficult.  Ga taɓa masu ƙaranci a cikin garwayan neural, da haske misãlai masu yin wa'azi da harshen na kanzu, kamar BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), sun kyautata aiki mãsu yawa na fassarar harshen aiki na natura, har ya iya amfani da shi a cikin fitina kan anayyar lissafi cikin dukkan littãfi. A cikin wannan littãfin nan, Munã haɗa anayyar da ko da aka samu cikin littattafani na japane. MatamayinMu na sami karatun masu jira a cikin kowace aikin, hususan kada ya kyautata kowace pointi 10 zuwa 20 dõmin rabo na sifira da rabo. Da haka, muka nũna cewa, rabon sararin mafiya yana dabam daga aikin nan dabam kuma ana kamata a yi musu ƙayyadadde.", 'sk': 'Pomen besedila naravnega jezika podpira kohezija med različnimi vrstami entitet, vključno s koreferenčnimi relacijami, predikatno-argumentnimi strukturami in premostitvenimi anaforskimi relacijami. Vendar pa strukture predikatov-argumentov za nominalne predikate in premostitvene anaforske relacije niso dobro raziskane, njihove analize pa so še vedno zelo težke. Nedavni napredek na področju nevronskih omrežij, zlasti jezikovnih modelov, ki temeljijo na samousposabljanju, vključno z BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), je bistveno izboljšal številne naloge obdelave naravnega jezika, kar omogoča potopitev v študijo analize kohezije v celotnem besedilu. V tej študiji se ukvarjamo z integrirano analizo kohezije v japonskih besedilih. Naši rezultati so bistveno presegli obstoječe študije pri vsaki nalogi, še posebej približno 10 do 20 točk izboljšanja tako pri ničelni anafori kot koreferenčni ločljivosti. Poleg tega smo pokazali tudi, da je reševanje koreference po naravi drugačno od drugih nalog in jo je treba obravnavati posebej.', 'jv': 'Seneng perusahaan langkung pawang dadi nglanggar sampek ning cah-sampek karo koyo ngono cah-sampek sing kalah-sampek, gambar nggawe barang sampek karo perusahaan, sampek-sampek karo iso nggawe gerang sampek karo ibuh anaphora. Nanging, sampeyan karo sistem pangan-argument kanggo kelas pangan kelas karo hal-hal nganggo cara anaphora sing ora bisa digurahan luwih, lan dipenesisan karo hal-hal susah apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngéwé éntuk ing netwisan Neral, sing ngomong, model sing wis basa nggawe barang pengguna kuwi nglarang BERT (Devline et al, 2011), kang dipoleh bantuan luwih apik sing nggawe perusahaan langkung sampeyan, iso nggawe ngubah dhéwé iso nggawe basa banjuré beraksi sak sekolahan kanggo nglanggar sampey Nang barêng-barêng iki, awake awake awake gedhéwé éngleki nggambar tarjamahan kanggo texti japané. Rejection Nanging, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono kuwi kesempatan karo aturan sing wis dipil karo perusahaan kanggo kalaman sing wis ana sakjane kanggo nggawe', 'bo': 'The meaning of natural language text is supported by cohesion among various kinds of entities, including coreference relations, predicate-argument structures, and bridging anaphora relations. རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི། nominal predicates and bridging anaphora relations have not been studied well, and their analysis have been very difficult. འཕེལ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན་ ཁྱད་པར་རང་ཉིད་གཙོ་རིམ་ལ་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཆ་རྣམས་ནང་དུ་BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), སྤྱི་ཚོ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱས་པར་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱས་པར་དབྱིན་གྱིས་བྱ་རིམ་གཞན་དང་ཁྱད་པར་སྐྱོན་རུང་བ་ཡིན་པས།', 'he': 'המשמעות של טקסט שפת טבעית תומכת על ידי התשוקה בין סוגים שונים של יחסים, כולל יחסים משותפים, מבנים קודם-טיעון, וגשר יחסי אנפורה. בכל אופן, מבנים-טיעון מוקדים למקדיקטים נומימליים ולמערכת יחסים של אנפורה לא למדו היטב, והניתוחים שלהם עדיין היו קשים מאוד. התקדמות האחרונות ברשתות עצביות, במיוחד דוגמני שפת מבוססים על אימון עצמי, כולל BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), שיתפרו באופן משמעותי משימות רבות לעבוד שפת טבעית, מה שאפשר לצלול למחקר על ניתוח התשוקה בכל הטקסט. במחקר הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם ניתוח מושלם של התשוקה בטקסטים יפנים. התוצאות שלנו עברו במידה משמעותית על מחקרים קיימים בכל משימה, במיוחד בערך 10 עד 20 נקודות שיפור גם לאפס אנפורה וגם לפתרון היחסים. Furthermore, we also showed that coreference resolution is different in nature from the other tasks and should be treated specially.'}
{'en': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'ar': 'المنطق الدلالي الواعي للمخطط لتفسير استعلامات اللغة الطبيعية في إعدادات المؤسسة', 'pt': 'Raciocínio semântico com reconhecimento de esquema para interpretar consultas de linguagem natural em configurações corporativas', 'es': 'Razonamiento semántico consciente del esquema para interpretar consultas de lenguaje natural en entornos empresariales', 'fr': "Raisonnement sémantique sensible aux schémas pour l'interprétation des requêtes en langage naturel dans les environnements d'entreprise", 'ja': 'エンタープライズ設定での自然言語クエリの解釈のためのスキーマ認識セマンティック推論', 'ru': 'Семантическое обоснование интерпретации запросов на естественном языке в настройках предприятия с учетом схемы', 'hi': 'एंटरप्राइज़ सेटिंग्स में प्राकृतिक भाषा क्वेरीज़ की व्याख्या करने के लिए स्कीमा जागरूक सिमेंटिक रीजनिंग', 'zh': '于企业置解释自然语言询者架构感知语义推理', 'ga': 'Réasúnaíocht Shéimeantach Feasachta Scéimre chun Ceisteanna Teanga Nádúrtha a Léirmhíniú i Socruithe Fiontair', 'el': 'Σημαντικός λόγος διερμηνείας ερωτήσεων φυσικής γλώσσας σε εταιρικές ρυθμίσεις', 'ka': 'სქემა ცნობიერი სემანტიკური მიზეზი ინტერპორტირება სახელის კითხვების ინტერპორტირებაში', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvi lekérdezések értelmezésének sématudatos szemantikus indoka a vállalati beállításokban', 'it': 'Ragione semantica consapevole dello schema per interpretare le query di linguaggio naturale nelle impostazioni aziendali', 'kk': 'Сұлба Enterprise параметрлерінде негізгі тіл сұраныстарын интерпретациялау semantiкалық себептері', 'mk': 'Свесно семантично причинување за интерпретација на прашањата за природен јазик во поставувањата на претпријатието', 'lt': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'ms': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'mt': 'Skema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'ml': 'സ്കീമാ അറിയുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് വായിക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എന്\u200dട്രെര്\u200dപ്രൈസ് സജ്ജീകരണങ', 'mn': 'Энтерпрейс тохиолдолд байгалийн хэл Queries-г илэрхийлж чадахын тулд Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'pl': 'Schema Aware Semantyczne powody interpretowania zapytań języka naturalnego w ustawieniach przedsiębiorstwa', 'no': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'ro': 'Motivarea semantică conștientă a schemei pentru interpretarea interogărilor de limbaj natural în setările întreprinderii', 'sr': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'si': 'ස්කීමා ප්\u200dරදේශ සැමැන්තික හේතුව සඳහා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැකසුම් සඳහා', 'so': 'Isemada ogeysiisa sababo turjumista afka asalka ah ee ku saabsan xarunta ganacsiga', 'sv': 'Schemamässig semantisk resonemang för tolkning av naturliga språkfrågor i företagsinställningar', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி கேள்விகளை தொழில்வு அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'انٹرپرائز سٹینٹ میں طبیعی زبان کوریزوں کی تعلیم کے لئے سیمنٹی کی دلیل آگاہ کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phương pháp giải thích tinh thần giải thích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong thiết lập Enterprise', 'bg': 'Семантична мотивация за тълкуване на заявки за естествен език в корпоративните настройки', 'hr': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'nl': "Schema Aware Semantische Redenen voor het interpreteren van Natural Language Query's in Enterprise Settings", 'da': 'Schemabevidst semantisk årsag til fortolkning af natursprogforespørgsler i virksomhedsindstillinger', 'de': 'Schema-bewusste semantische Gründe für die Interpretation natürlicher Sprachabfragen in Unternehmenseinstellungen', 'id': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'ko': '기업 환경에서 자연 언어 조회의 모델 감지 의미 추리를 해석하다', 'fa': 'برنامه\u200cای از دلایل\u200cهای سیمانتیک برای تفسیر سوال\u200cهای زبان طبیعی در تنظیمات شرکت', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Mpango wa Kutafsiri Maswali ya Lugha ya asili katika Vituo vya Biashara', 'tr': 'Natal dil sözlerini Enterprise Ayarlarynda terjime etmek üçin semantik sebäplikler', 'af': 'Skema Aware Semantiese Reasoning vir Interpreting Natuurlike Taal Vroeg in Enterprise Instellings', 'sq': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'am': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'hy': 'Ստեման գիտակցում է բնական լեզվի հարցերի թարգմանման սեմատիկ պատճառը ընկերության սահմանափակումներում', 'az': 'Enterprise Ayarlar캼nda T톛bi톛tli Dil S톛ng톛rl톛rini 캻nterpretl톛ndirm톛k 칲칞칲n Semantik Reason', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা অনুবাদ করার জন্য স্কীমা সচেতন সেম্যান্টিক প্রস্তুতি সম্পর্কিত', 'bs': 'Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning for Interpreting Natural Language Queries in Enterprise Settings', 'ca': 'Un esquema conscient de raonament semàntic per interpretar les preguntes de llenguatge natural en la configuració de les empreses', 'cs': 'Sémantické důvody pro interpretaci dotazů v přirozeném jazyce v podnikovém nastavení', 'et': 'Skeemi teadlik semantiline põhjendus looduskeele päringute tõlgendamiseks ettevõtte sätetes', 'fi': 'Schema Aware Semanttinen peruste luonnollisten kielikyselyjen tulkinnalle yrityksen asetuksissa', 'he': 'הסיבה סמנטית מודעת לשימושים טבעיים', 'sk': 'Semantni razlog za tolmačenje poizvedb v naravnem jeziku v nastavitvah podjetja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འཆར་གཞུང་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ནང་དུ་རང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐད་ཡིག་འདྲི་ཚིག་ཚོར་ཕན་ཚོར་མཁན་ལ་རྒྱུ་མཚན་', 'jv': 'Sumangkat Kemerdekaan semanti Pangan kanggo Tulungan Ubah Saasar'}
{'en': 'Natural Language Query interfaces allow the end-users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage, or schema details. Even with the recent advances in NLP research space, the state-of-the-art QA systems fall short of understanding implicit intents of real-world Business Intelligence (BI) queries in enterprise systems, since Natural Language Understanding still remains an AI-hard problem. We posit that deploying ontology reasoning over domain semantics can help in achieving better natural language understanding for QA systems. In this paper, we specifically focus on building a Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework that translates natural language interpretation as a sequence of solvable tasks by an ontology reasoner. We apply our framework on top of an ontology based, state-of-the-art natural language question-answering system ATHENA, and experiment with 4 benchmarks focused on BI queries. Our experimental numbers empirically show that the Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning indeed helps in achieving significantly better results for handling BI queries with an average accuracy improvement of ~30 %', 'fr': "Les interfaces de requête en langage naturel permettent aux utilisateurs finaux d'accéder aux informations souhaitées sans avoir besoin de connaître un langage de requête spécialisé, un stockage de données ou des détails de schéma. Malgré les récentes avancées dans le domaine de la recherche sur la PNL, les systèmes d'assurance qualité de pointe ne permettent pas de comprendre les intentions implicites des requêtes de Business Intelligence (BI) du monde réel dans les systèmes d'entreprise, car la compréhension du langage naturel reste un problème difficile pour l'IA. Nous sommes d'avis que le déploiement du raisonnement ontologique sur la sémantique de domaine peut aider à améliorer la compréhension du langage naturel pour les systèmes d'assurance qualité. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons spécifiquement sur la création d'un cadre de raisonnement sémantique sensible au schéma qui traduit l'interprétation du langage naturel en une séquence de tâches pouvant être résolues par un raisonneur d'ontologie. Nous appliquons notre framework sur un système de réponse aux questions en langage naturel ATHENA à la pointe de la technologie basé sur l'ontologie, et testons 4 benchmarks axés sur les requêtes BI. Nos chiffres expérimentaux montrent empiriquement que le raisonnement sémantique sensible au schéma aide en effet à obtenir de meilleurs résultats pour le traitement des requêtes BI avec une amélioration moyenne de la précision d'environ 30\xa0%", 'pt': 'As interfaces de consulta de linguagem natural permitem que os usuários finais acessem as informações desejadas sem a necessidade de conhecer qualquer linguagem de consulta especializada, armazenamento de dados ou detalhes de esquema. Mesmo com os recentes avanços no espaço de pesquisa em PNL, os sistemas de controle de qualidade de última geração não conseguem entender as intenções implícitas das consultas de Business Intelligence (BI) do mundo real em sistemas corporativos, uma vez que o entendimento de linguagem natural ainda continua sendo uma tarefa difícil de IA. problema. Nós postulamos que a implantação do raciocínio da ontologia sobre a semântica do domínio pode ajudar a alcançar uma melhor compreensão da linguagem natural para sistemas de controle de qualidade. Neste artigo, focamos especificamente na construção de um Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework que traduz a interpretação de linguagem natural como uma sequência de tarefas solucionáveis por um raciocinador de ontologias. Aplicamos nossa estrutura em cima de um sistema de resposta a perguntas de linguagem natural de última geração baseado em ontologia, o ATHENA, e experimentamos 4 benchmarks focados em consultas de BI. Nossos números experimentais mostram empiricamente que o Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning realmente ajuda a alcançar resultados significativamente melhores para lidar com consultas de BI com uma melhoria média de precisão de ~ 30%', 'ar': 'تسمح واجهات استعلام اللغة الطبيعية للمستخدمين النهائيين بالوصول إلى المعلومات المطلوبة دون الحاجة إلى معرفة أي لغة استعلام متخصصة أو تخزين البيانات أو تفاصيل المخطط. حتى مع التطورات الحديثة في مجال أبحاث البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، فإن أنظمة ضمان الجودة الحديثة لا تفي بالنوايا الضمنية لاستعلامات ذكاء الأعمال (BI) في العالم الحقيقي في أنظمة المؤسسات ، نظرًا لأن فهم اللغة الطبيعية لا يزال صعبًا على الذكاء الاصطناعي مشكلة. نحن نفترض أن نشر التفكير الوجودي على دلالات المجال يمكن أن يساعد في تحقيق فهم أفضل للغة الطبيعية لأنظمة ضمان الجودة. في هذه الورقة ، نركز بشكل خاص على بناء إطار عمل التفكير الدلالي المدرك للمخطط الذي يترجم تفسير اللغة الطبيعية كسلسلة من المهام القابلة للحل بواسطة مسبب علم الوجود. نحن نطبق إطار عملنا بالإضافة إلى نظام ATHENA للإجابة على الأسئلة باللغة الطبيعية القائم على الأنطولوجيا ، ونجرب 4 معايير تركز على استفسارات ذكاء الأعمال. تُظهر أرقامنا التجريبية بشكل تجريبي أن الاستدلال الدلالي للمخطط يساعد بالفعل في تحقيق نتائج أفضل بكثير للتعامل مع استعلامات ذكاء الأعمال بمتوسط تحسين الدقة بنسبة 30٪ تقريبًا', 'es': 'Las interfaces de consulta de lenguaje natural permiten a los usuarios finales acceder a la información deseada sin necesidad de conocer ningún lenguaje de consulta especializado, almacenamiento de datos o detalles del esquema. Incluso con los recientes avances en el espacio de investigación de PNL, los sistemas de control de calidad de última generación no comprenden las intenciones implícitas de las consultas de Business Intelligence (BI) del mundo real en los sistemas empresariales, ya que la comprensión del lenguaje natural sigue siendo un problema difícil para la IA. Apostamos que implementar el razonamiento ontológico sobre la semántica de dominio puede ayudar a lograr una mejor comprensión del lenguaje natural para los sistemas de control de calidad. En este artículo, nos centramos específicamente en la creación de un Marco de Razonamiento Semántico con Conocimiento de Esquemas que traduzca la interpretación del lenguaje natural como una secuencia de tareas solucionables por parte de un razonador ontológico. Aplicamos nuestro marco sobre un sistema de respuesta a preguntas y respuestas de lenguaje natural de última generación basado en ontología ATHENA, y experimentamos con 4 puntos de referencia centrados en consultas de BI. Nuestros números experimentales muestran empíricamente que el razonamiento semántico sensible al esquema ayuda a lograr resultados significativamente mejores en el manejo de consultas de BI con una mejora de precisión promedio de ~ 30%', 'ja': 'Natural Language Queryインターフェースを使用すると、エンドユーザーは、専用のクエリ言語、データストレージ、またはスキーマの詳細を知る必要なく、目的の情報にアクセスできます。 NLP研究領域の最近の進歩にもかかわらず、最先端のQAシステムは、自然言語理解は依然としてAIにとって困難な問題であるため、エンタープライズシステムにおける現実のビジネスインテリジェンス（ BI ）クエリの暗黙の意図の理解には欠けている。 私たちは、オントロジー推論をドメインセマンティクスに展開することで、QAシステムのためのより良い自然言語理解を達成するのに役立つと考えています。 本稿では特に、オントロジー推論者による一連の解決可能なタスクとしての自然言語解釈を翻訳するスキーマ認識セマンティック推論フレームワークの構築に焦点を当てる。 私たちは、オントロジーに基づく最先端の自然言語の質問応答システムATHENAの上にフレームワークを適用し、BIクエリに焦点を当てた4つのベンチマークを実験します。 私たちの実験的な数値は、スキーマ認識セマンティック推論が、BIクエリを処理するための有意に優れた結果を達成するのに役立ち、平均精度が約30%向上することを経験的に示しています。', 'zh': '自然语言询接口许最终用户访问所需信息,而无所知专询语言、数据存储架构详细信息。 虽随NLP究领域之最新进展,最先进之QA系统不解企业统中世界商业智能(BI)询隐意,自然语言解犹一AI难题也。 臣愚以为在域语义上部署本体推理可以助QA系统之自然语言。 于本文中,特关构一模样语义推理框架,当框架将自然语言解转为本体推理器可解之任序。 吾辈框架用于本体者,最先进自然语言问答系统ATHENA之上,并试4专注BI询之基准。 臣等实验数以明之,式感语义推理诚有助于理BI询取明效,均准确性崇约30%', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा क्वेरी इंटरफ़ेस अंत-उपयोगकर्ताओं को किसी भी विशेष क्वेरी भाषा, डेटा संग्रहण, या स्कीमा विवरण को जानने की आवश्यकता के बिना वांछित जानकारी तक पहुंचने की अनुमति देते हैं। यहां तक कि एनएलपी अनुसंधान अंतरिक्ष में हाल की प्रगति के साथ, अत्याधुनिक क्यूए सिस्टम उद्यम प्रणालियों में वास्तविक दुनिया के बिजनेस इंटेलिजेंस (बीआई) प्रश्नों के अंतर्निहित इरादों को समझने से कम हो जाते हैं, क्योंकि प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ अभी भी एक एआई-कठिन समस्या बनी हुई है। हम मानते हैं कि डोमेन शब्दार्थ पर ऑन्टोलॉजी तर्क को तैनात करने से क्यूए सिस्टम के लिए बेहतर प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ प्राप्त करने में मदद मिल सकती है। इस पेपर में, हम विशेष रूप से एक स्कीमा अवेयर सिमेंटिक रीजनिंग फ्रेमवर्क बनाने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जो एक आंटोलॉजी तर्ककर्ता द्वारा हल करने योग्य कार्यों के अनुक्रम के रूप में प्राकृतिक भाषा व्याख्या का अनुवाद करता है। हम एक आंटोलॉजी आधारित, अत्याधुनिक प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रश्न-उत्तर देने वाली प्रणाली एथेना के शीर्ष पर अपने ढांचे को लागू करते हैं, और बीआई प्रश्नों पर केंद्रित 4 बेंचमार्क के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। हमारी प्रयोगात्मक संख्याएं अनुभवजन्य रूप से दिखाती हैं कि स्कीमा अवेयर सिमेंटिक रीजनिंग वास्तव में ~ 30% की औसत सटीकता सुधार के साथ बीआई प्रश्नों को संभालने के लिए काफी बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करने में मदद करता है', 'ru': 'Интерфейсы запросов на естественном языке позволяют конечным пользователям получать доступ к требуемой информации без необходимости знать какой-либо специализированный язык запросов, хранение данных или детали схемы. Даже с последними достижениями в исследовательском пространстве NLP, современные системы обеспечения качества не понимают неявных намерений запросов бизнес-аналитики (BI) в корпоративных системах, поскольку понимание естественного языка по-прежнему остается сложной проблемой ИИ. Мы полагаем, что развертывание онтологического мышления над семантикой домена может помочь в достижении лучшего понимания естественного языка для систем обеспечения качества. В этой статье мы уделяем особое внимание созданию семантической основы мышления, основанной на знании схемы, которая переводит интерпретацию естественного языка как последовательность решаемых задач онтологическим аргументатором. Мы применяем наш фреймворк поверх онтологической, современной системы ответов на вопросы на естественном языке ATHENA и экспериментируем с 4 эталонами, ориентированными на запросы бизнес-аналитики. Наши экспериментальные цифры эмпирически показывают, что семантическое мышление, учитывающее схему, действительно помогает в достижении значительно лучших результатов для обработки запросов BI со средним улучшением точности ~30%', 'ga': 'Ligeann comhéadain Fiosrúcháin Teanga Nádúrtha do na húsáideoirí deiridh rochtain a fháil ar an bhfaisnéis atá ag teastáil gan aon ghá a bheith ar eolas ag aon teanga fiosrúcháin speisialaithe, stóráil sonraí nó sonraí scéimre. Fiú amháin leis an dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí i spás taighde NLP, níl na córais QA úrscothach in ann tuiscint a fháil ar chuspóirí intuigthe fiosrúcháin Fhíordhomhanda Faisnéise Gnó (BI) i gcórais fiontraíochta, ós rud é go bhfuil Tuiscint Teanga Nádúrtha fós ina AI-chrua. fadhb. Dearbhaímid gur féidir le réasúnaíocht ontology a úsáid thar shéimeantaic fearainn cabhrú le tuiscint níos fearr ar theanga nádúrtha a bhaint amach do chórais QA. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid go sonrach ar Chreat Réasúnuithe Séimeantach Feasacht Scéimre a thógáil a aistríonn léirmhíniú teanga nádúrtha mar sheicheamh tascanna intuaslagtha ag réasúnóir ontology. Cuirimid ár gcreat i bhfeidhm ar bharr córas freagartha ceisteanna teanga nádúrtha den chéad scoth ATHENA atá bunaithe ar ontology, agus déanaimid tástáil le 4 thagarmharc atá dírithe ar cheisteanna BI. Léiríonn ár n-uimhreacha turgnamhacha go heimpíreach go gcuidíonn an Scéimre Aware Séimeantach Réasúnú go deimhin le torthaí i bhfad níos fearr a bhaint amach maidir le láimhseáil fiosrúcháin BI le meánfheabhsú cruinnis de ~30%', 'el': 'Οι διεπαφές ερωτήματος φυσικής γλώσσας επιτρέπουν στους τελικούς χρήστες να έχουν πρόσβαση στις επιθυμητές πληροφορίες χωρίς να χρειάζεται να γνωρίζουν οποιαδήποτε εξειδικευμένη γλώσσα ερωτήματος, αποθήκευση δεδομένων ή λεπτομέρειες σχήματος. Ακόμα και με τις πρόσφατες προόδους στον ερευνητικό χώρο, τα υπερσύγχρονα συστήματα QA δεν κατανοούν τις σιωπηρές προθέσεις των ερωτήσεων της πραγματικής επιχειρηματικής νοημοσύνης (BI) σε επιχειρηματικά συστήματα, δεδομένου ότι η κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας εξακολουθεί να παραμένει ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα για την τεχνητή νοημοσύνη. Υποθέτουμε ότι η ανάπτυξη οντολογικής συλλογισμού πάνω από τη σημασιολογία του τομέα μπορεί να βοηθήσει στην επίτευξη καλύτερης κατανόησης της φυσικής γλώσσας για τα συστήματα QA. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε συγκεκριμένα στην οικοδόμηση ενός Συστήματος Συνειδητοποιημένου Σημαντικού Λογιστικού Πλαισίου που μεταφράζει την ερμηνεία της φυσικής γλώσσας ως ακολουθία επιλύσιμων εργασιών από έναν οντολόγο. Εφαρμόζουμε το πλαίσιο μας πάνω σε ένα σύστημα απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις φυσικής γλώσσας με βάση την οντολογία και πειραματιζόμαστε με τέσσερα σημεία αναφοράς που επικεντρώνονται σε ερωτήματα BI. Οι πειραματικοί αριθμοί μας δείχνουν εμπειρικά ότι η Σημαντική Αιτιολόγηση Σχήματος πράγματι βοηθά στην επίτευξη σημαντικά καλύτερων αποτελεσμάτων για τον χειρισμό ερωτημάτων με μέση βελτίωση ακρίβειας ~30%', 'hu': 'A Natural Language Query interfészek lehetővé teszik a végfelhasználók számára, hogy hozzáférjenek a kívánt információkhoz anélkül, hogy speciális lekérdezési nyelvet, adattárolást vagy séma részleteit ismernék. Még az NLP kutatási területének közelmúltbeli előrelépései mellett is a legkorszerűbb minőségbiztosítási rendszerek nem értik meg a valós Business Intelligence (BI) lekérdezések implicit szándékait a vállalati rendszerekben, mivel a természetes nyelv megértése továbbra is egy AI-nehéz probléma. Feltételezzük, hogy az ontológiai érvelés alkalmazása a domain szemantikával segíthet a minőségbiztosítási rendszerek jobb természetes nyelvmegértésében. Ebben a tanulmányban kifejezetten egy Schema Aware Szemantikus Észlelési Keretrendszer kialakítására összpontosítunk, amely a természetes nyelv értelmezését egy ontológiai észlelő által megoldható feladatok sorozatként fordítja le. Keretrendszerünket egy ontológiai alapú, korszerű természetes nyelvű kérdésre válaszoló rendszer tetején alkalmazzuk, és 4, BI lekérdezésre összpontosító referenciamérővel kísérletezünk. Kísérleti számaink empirikusan azt mutatják, hogy a Schema Aware Szemantikus Észlelés valóban segít jelentősen jobb eredményeket elérni a BI lekérdezések kezelésében ~30%-os átlagos pontossági javulással', 'ka': 'Name NLP სწავლობის სივრცეში უკვე წინასწავლობის პროგრამებით, QA სისტემების სივრცემები არაფერდება, როგორც რეალური მსოფლიო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო ინტელექტი ინტელექტის კ ჩვენ დავწერეთ, რომ ანტოლოგიის რეზიცია დიომენტიკის სმენტიკის გარეშე შეუძლია დახმარება QA სისტემებისთვის უფრო მეტად ნახვადასხვადასხვადასხვად. ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულად სქემას დავიწყებთ სემენტიკური გამოსახულების პარამეტრებში, რომელსაც ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულად ტრანგურაცია ენერგიის ინტერპუქციას, რომელიც განტოლოგიის აზრისტების ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ჩვენი ფრამეტრი ანტოლოგიის ზემო, სახელსაწარმოდგენისთვის სახელსაწარმოდგენისთვის სისტემა ATHENA და ექსპერიმენტი, რომელიც 4 ბენქმარკებით BI კითხვების შესახებ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური რიცხვი ემპერიკურად გამოჩვენება, რომ სქემა ცნობიერი სემენტიური მიზეზების შესაძლებელად უფრო უკეთესი შესაძლებელება BI კითხვების შესახებ ~30%', 'it': "Le interfacce Natural Language Query consentono agli utenti finali di accedere alle informazioni desiderate senza la necessità di conoscere alcun linguaggio di query specializzato, archiviazione dati o dettagli dello schema. Anche con i recenti progressi nello spazio di ricerca NLP, i sistemi di QA all'avanguardia non riescono a comprendere gli intenti impliciti delle query di Business Intelligence (BI) del mondo reale nei sistemi aziendali, dal momento che la comprensione del linguaggio naturale rimane ancora un problema difficile da IA. Poniamo che l'implementazione del ragionamento ontologico sulla semantica del dominio può aiutare a raggiungere una migliore comprensione del linguaggio naturale per i sistemi di QA. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo specificamente sulla costruzione di un Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework che traduce l'interpretazione del linguaggio naturale come una sequenza di compiti risolvibili da parte di un ragionatore ontologico. Applichiamo il nostro framework in cima a un sistema di risposta alle domande in linguaggio naturale all'avanguardia basato sull'ontologia ATHENA, e sperimentiamo con 4 benchmark focalizzati sulle query BI. I nostri numeri sperimentali dimostrano empiricamente che il Ragionamento Semantic Consapevole dello Schema aiuta effettivamente a ottenere risultati significativamente migliori per la gestione delle query BI con un miglioramento di precisione medio di ~30%", 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos užklausos sąsajos leidžia galutiniams vartotojams susipažinti su pageidaujama informacija nereikalaujant žinoti jokios specialios užklausos kalbos, duomenų saugojimo arba schemos detalių. Net neseniai pasiekus pažangą NLP mokslinių tyrimų erdvėje, naujausios QA sistemos nesupranta netiesioginių tikrojo pasaulio verslo žvalgybos (BI) klausimų verslo sistemose ketinimų, nes gamtos kalbų supratimas vis dar yra sunki AI problema. Mes darome prielaidą, kad ontologinių motyvų diegimas dominuojančioje semantikoje gali padėti pasiekti geresnį natūralaus kalbų supratimą QA sistemoms. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame sąmoningo Semantinio pagrįstumo sistemos kūrimui, kuris natūralią kalbos aiškinimą paverčia kaip ontologinio pagrįstojo išspręstinų užduočių seką. Mes taikome savo sistemą virš ontologijos pagrįstos naujausios natūralios kalbos klausimų atsakymo sistemos ATHENA ir eksperimentuojame su keturiais kriterijais, sutelktais į BI klausimus. Mūsų eksperimentiniai skaičiai empiriškai rodo, kad „Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning“ iš tiesų padeda pasiekti gerokai geresnių rezultatų, susijusių su BI klausimų tvarkymu, o vidutinis tikslumo pagerėjimas yra ~30 %.', 'mk': 'Природни интерфејси за барање на јазик им овозможуваат на крајните корисници да пристапат до желбите информации без потреба да знаат каков било специјализиран јазик за барање, складирање на податоци или детали за шемата. Дури и со неодамнешните напредоци во истражувачкиот простор на НЛП, најсовремените системи на QA не ги разбираат имплицитните намери на прашањата за бизнис интелигенција во реалниот свет (БИ) во претпријатиеските системи, бидејќи разбирањето на природниот јазик сé уште е тежок проблем со ИА. Претпоставуваме дека распоредувањето на онтологиското размислување во врска со семантиката на домените може да помогне во постигнувањето подобро разбирање на природниот јазик за системите на QA. Во овој весник, специфично се фокусираме на изградбата на схема свесна семантичка рамка за размислување која ја преведува природната интерпретација на јазикот како секвенца на решливи задачи од онтологиски размислувач. Ние ја применуваме нашата рамка на врвот на онтологија базиран, најсовремен систем на одговор на прашања на природниот јазик АТЕНА, и експеримент со четири референтни значки фокусирани на прашања на БИ. Нашите експериментални броеви емпирички покажуваат дека семантичното размислување на Схемата навистина помага во постигнувањето значително подобри резултати за решавање на прашањата за БИ со просечно подобрување на точноста од ~30%', 'kk': 'Табиғи тіл сұраныс интерфейстері соңғы пайдаланушыларға керек мәліметті білуге мүмкіндік береді. Сұраныс тілі, деректер сақтау не сұлбаның егжей- тегжейін білмей қажет ете NLP зерттеу орындағы жаңа жағдайлардың алдындағы жұмыс істеу кезінде де QA жүйелері шын әлемдегі бизнес интеллекті (BI) жүйелерінде сұрақтарды түсініп тұрған мақсаттарын білмейді, өйткені Natural Language Understanding әлі қатты мәселе бол Біз доменге онтологиялық семантикалық тәжірибелерді жақсы тілді QA жүйелерінде түсініктіру үшін көмектесе аламыз. Бұл қағазда, онтологиялық түсініктіруші бойынша тапсырманы түсініктіретін семантикалық түсініктерді құру сұлбасына көздейміз. Біз онтологияның негіздеген, өзіміздің табиғи тіл жауап беру жүйесіне ATHENA қолданып, BI сұрақтарына көздеген 4 кеңістік тәжірибелерімен тәжірибелеміз. Біздің тәжірибелі нөмірлеріміз эмпирикалық түрде, сұлбаның семантикалық себептері дұрыс түрде BI сұрақтарын орташа дұрыс жақсартуға көмектеседі.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്സുകള്\u200dക്ക് ആവശ്യമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലാതെ അവസാനം ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അറി NLP പരിശോധന സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പോലും, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റം കുറച്ച് ബിഐ വ്യവസ്ഥയുടെ യഥാര്\u200dത് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്സിനെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള അന്ത്യജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ കാര്യങ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഒരു സ്കീമാ അറിയുന്ന സെമാന്റിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അത് സ്വാഭാവി നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് ബിഐ ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ATHENA, നാ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന നമ്പര്\u200dക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ശാന്തികമായി കാണിക്കുന്നു സിമാന്റിക്ക് അറിയുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിക്കും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ', 'ms': 'Natural Language Query interfaces allow the end-users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage, or schema details.  Walaupun dengan kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam ruang penyelidikan NLP, sistem QA yang paling terkini kurang memahami niat implicit untuk pertanyaan Intelligence Bisnes (BI) di dunia nyata dalam sistem syarikat, kerana Pemahaman Bahasa Semulajadi masih masalah AI-sukar. Kami menyatakan bahawa menggunakan alasan ontologi melalui semantik domain boleh membantu untuk mencapai pemahaman bahasa alam yang lebih baik untuk sistem QA. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus secara khusus pada membina Skema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework yang menerjemahkan interpretasi bahasa semulajadi sebagai urutan tugas yang boleh diselesaikan oleh penyebab ontologi. Kami melaksanakan kerangka kami di atas sistem yang berdasarkan ontologi, sistem yang terbaik untuk menjawab soalan bahasa alam ATHENA, dan eksperimen dengan 4 tanda referensi yang fokus pada pertanyaan BI. Bilangan percubaan kami secara empirik menunjukkan bahawa Pemalasan Semantik Awas Skema benar-benar membantu mencapai keputusan yang lebih baik untuk mengendalikan pertanyaan BI dengan peningkatan akurat rata-rata ~30%', 'mt': 'L-interfaċċji tat-Talba tal-Lingwa Naturali jippermettu lill-utenti finali jaċċessaw l-informazzjoni mixtieqa mingħajr il-ħtieġa li jkunu jafu l-lingwa speċjalizzata tal-mistoqsija, il-ħżin tad-dejta, jew id-dettalji tal-iskema. Anki bl-avvanzi riċenti fl-ispazju tar-riċerka tal-NLP, is-sistemi tal-QA l-aktar avvanzati ma jifhmux l-intenzjonijiet impliċiti ta’ mistoqsijiet dwar l-Intelliġenza tan-Negozju (BI) fid-dinja reali fis-sistemi tal-intrapriżi, peress li l-Ftehim tal-Lingwa Naturali għadu problema diffiċli għall-AI. Aħna nippreżentaw li l-użu tar-raġunament ontoloġiku fuq is-semantika tad-dominju jista’ jgħin biex jinkiseb fehim aħjar tal-lingwa naturali għas-sistemi QA. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw b’mod speċifiku fuq il-bini ta’ Qafas ta’ Raġunar Semantiku Konxju tal-Iskema li jittraduċi l-interpretazzjoni tal-lingwa naturali bħala sekwenza ta’ kompiti li jistgħu jiġu solvuti minn raġunatur ontoloġiku. Aħna napplikaw il-qafas tagħna fuq sistema ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet tal-lingwi naturali avvanzata bbażata fuq l-ontoloġija ATHENA, u nagħmlu esperimenti b’erba’ punti ta’ riferiment iffukati fuq mistoqsijiet tal-BI. Our experimental numbers empirically show that the Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning indeed helps in achieving significantly better results for handling BI queries with an average accuracy improvement of ~30%', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл Кверийн интерфейсүүд төгсгөл хэрэглэгчид ямар нэгэн специалист кверийн хэл, өгөгдлийн хадгаламж, эсвэл схемын нарийвчлалуудыг мэдэхгүй хүсэлтэй мэдээллийг хүлээн зөвшөөр NLP судалгааны орон зайд саяхан хөгжлийн давхар боловч, урлагийн QA систем нь бодит ертөнцийн бизнес оюун ухаан (BI) системийн хувьд асуудлыг ойлгохын тулд бага зэрэг ойлгохгүй байдаг. Бид онтологийн урьдчилгааг зохион байгуулах нь QA системийн сайхан байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд туслах боломжтой гэж боддог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид тодорхой антлогикийн урьдчилан шийдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагааны дарааллаар байгалийн хэл хэлний илтгэлийг шийдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагааг бүтээхэд анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид онтологийн үндсэн, урлагийн байгалийн хэл асуулт хариултын системийг АТЕНА дээр ашиглаж, Би-ийн кверитүүд дээр төвлөрсөн 4 салбарын туршилтыг хийсэн. Бидний туршилтын тоонууд үнэндээ Сchema Aware Semantic Reasoning нь үнэндээ BI queries-г удирдах дундаж нарийвчлалтай ~30%ийн сайжруулахад тусалдаг.', 'no': 'Name Selv med de siste avanserte utviklingane i NLP-forskningsrommet, er QA-systemet tilstanden kort for å forstå implisitte utviklingar av verkeleg Business Intelligence (BI) spørjingar i virksomhetssystemet, sidan naturspråk-forståelse fortsatt er ein problem med AI-hardt. Vi bestemmer at utviklinga av ontologisk rasjon over domenesemantikk kan hjelpa i å nå bedre naturspråk for QA-systemet. I denne papiret fokuserer vi spesielt på å bygge eit Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework som translaterer naturleg språk-tolking som rekkjefølgje av løysbare oppgåver av ein ontologisk motivator. Vi bruker rammeverket vårt på toppen av ein ontologisk basert, tilstanden av kunsten naturleg språk-svaringssystem ATHENA, og eksperimenter med 4 benchmarker fokusert på BI-spørjingar. Våre eksperimentale tal viser empirisk at Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning verkeleg hjelper til å nå betydelig bedre resultat for handtering av BI-spørjingar med gjennomsnittlig nøyaktig forbedring av ~30%', 'pl': 'Interfejsy Natural Language Query umożliwiają użytkownikom końcowym dostęp do żądanych informacji bez konieczności znajomości specjalistycznego języka zapytań, przechowywania danych lub szczegółów schematu. Nawet z ostatnimi postępami w przestrzeni badawczej NLP, najnowocześniejsze systemy jakości nie zrozumieją ukrytych intencji realnych zapytań Business Intelligence (BI) w systemach przedsiębiorstw, ponieważ zrozumienie języka naturalnego nadal pozostaje problemem trudnym dla sztucznej inteligencji. Zakładamy, że wdrażanie rozumowania ontologicznego nad semantyką domeny może pomóc w osiągnięciu lepszego zrozumienia języka naturalnego dla systemów QA. W niniejszym artykule skupiamy się szczególnie na budowaniu Schema Aware Semantycznego Rozumowania Framework, który przekłada interpretację języka naturalnego jako sekwencję rozwiązywalnych zadań przez reasonera ontologii. Nasz framework stosujemy na bazie ontologicznego, najnowocześniejszego systemu odpowiedzi na pytania języka naturalnego ATHENA i eksperymentujemy z czterema referencjami skupionymi na zapytaniach BI. Nasze liczby eksperymentalne empirycznie pokazują, że Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning rzeczywiście pomaga w osiągnięciu znacznie lepszych wyników obsługi zapytań BI o średniej poprawie dokładności ~30%', 'ro': 'Interfațele Natural Language Query permit utilizatorilor finali să acceseze informațiile dorite fără a fi nevoie să cunoască limbajul de interogare specializat, stocarea datelor sau detaliile schemei. Chiar și cu progresele recente în spațiul de cercetare PNL, sistemele de calitate de ultimă generație nu înțeleg intențiile implicite ale interogărilor din lumea reală de Business Intelligence (BI) în sistemele de întreprinderi, deoarece înțelegerea limbajului natural rămâne încă o problemă dificilă AI. Considerăm că implementarea raționamentului ontologic asupra semanticii domeniului poate ajuta la obținerea unei mai bune înțelegeri a limbajului natural pentru sistemele QA. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm în mod specific pe construirea unui Schema Aware Semantic Rating Framework care traduce interpretarea limbajului natural ca o secvență de sarcini rezolvabile de către un raționant ontologic. Aplicăm cadrul nostru pe partea de sus a unui sistem de răspuns la întrebări bazat pe ontologie, de ultimă generație, ATHENA, și experimentăm cu 4 criterii de referință axate pe interogări BI. Numerele noastre experimentale arată empiric că raționamentul semantic Schema Aware contribuie într-adevăr la obținerea de rezultate semnificativ mai bune pentru gestionarea interogărilor BI cu o îmbunătățire medie a acurateții de ~30%', 'sr': 'Prirodne interfejse za pitanje jezika omogućavaju krajnjim korisnicima da pristupe željenim informacijama bez potrebe da saznaju bilo kakve specijalizovane pitanja jezika, skladište podataka ili detalje šeme. Čak i sa nedavnim napredovima u istraživanju NLP-a, sistemi države umjetnosti QA-a nisu razumeli implicitne namere stvarne svjetske poslovne obaveštajne informacije (BI) ispitivanja u poduzetničkim sistemima, jer razumevanje prirodnog jezika još uvijek ostaje problem sa AI-om. Postavljamo da raspoređivanje ontologijskog razgovora preko semantika domena može pomoći u ostvarivanju boljeg razumevanja prirodnog jezika za QA sisteme. U ovom papiru, posebno se fokusiramo na izgradnju semantičkog okvira za razumevanje shme koja prevodi prirodnu interpretaciju jezika kao sekvencu rješavalih zadataka od strane ontologije razumnika. Primjenjujemo naš okvir na vrhu ontologije baziranog na stanju prirodnog jezika ATHENA, i eksperiment sa 4 kriterija fokusiran na pitanja BI-a. Naši eksperimentalni brojevi empirički pokazuju da šema poznaje semantički razlog stvarno pomaže u ostvarivanju značajno boljih rezultata za rješavanje ispitivanja BI-a s prosječnim poboljšanjem tačnosti od ~30%', 'so': "Interfacyada wargelinta afka asalka ah waxay isticmaalayaasha ugu dambaysta ah u ogolaanshaa in uu helo macluumaad aad dooneyso iyadoon u baahnayn in uu ogaado luuqad la xiriiro, wareejinta macluumaadka ama warbixinta qoraalka. Even with the recent advances in NLP research space, the state-of-the-art QA systems fall short of understanding implicit intents of real-world Business Intelligence (BI) queries in enterprise systems, since Natural Language Understanding still remains an AI-hard problem.  Waxaynu leenahay in la soo saaro sababta cilmiga ku saabsan habka deegaanka ayaa caawinaya in la gaadho garashada afka asalka ah ee nidaamka QA. Qoraalkan, waxaynu si gaar ah ugu kalsoonaynaa dhisidda Schemada aqoonsan Semantic Reading Framework, kaas oo turjumaya turjumidda afka asalka ah sida xilli ka mid ah shaqooyin ay ku xalaalaan karto, waana sabab cilmi ah. Waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa sawirkayada afka dabiicadda ah ATHENA iyo baaritaanka ku qoran 4 sawir oo ku qoran qoraalaha BI. Lambarkayaga tijaabada ayaa si fiican u muujiya in saymadda aqoonta Semantic uu dhabtii caawinayo in uu gaadho resultooyin aad u wanaagsan oo lagu sameynayo su'aalaha BI, si rasmi ah loo kordhiyo saxda ~30%", 'sv': 'Gränssnitten Natural Language Query gör det möjligt för slutanvändarna att komma åt önskad information utan att behöva känna till några specialiserade frågespråk, datalagring eller schemadetaljer. Även med de senaste framstegen inom forskning inom NLP saknar de toppmoderna QA-systemen förståelse för implicita avsikter med verkliga Business Intelligence-frågor i företagssystem, eftersom Natural Language Understanding fortfarande är ett AI-svårt problem. Vi utgår från att införa ontologiska resonemang över domänsemantik kan hjälpa till att uppnå bättre förståelse av naturligt språk för QA-system. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi specifikt på att bygga ett Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework som översätter naturligt språktolkning som en sekvens av lösbara uppgifter av en ontologisk resonant. Vi tillämpar vårt ramverk ovanpå ett ontologibaserat, toppmodernt frågesvarssystem för naturligt språk Athena, och experimenterar med 4 riktmärken fokuserade på BI-frågor. Våra experimentella siffror visar empiriskt att Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning verkligen hjälper till att uppnå betydligt bättre resultat för hantering av BI-frågor med en genomsnittlig noggrannhetsförbättring på ~30%', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්න අන්තිම භාෂාව භාෂාව, දත්ත සංරක්ෂණය, හෝ ස්කීමා විස්තර දැනගන්න අවශ්\u200dය තොරත NLP පරීක්ෂණ අවස්ථාවයේ අලුත් විදියට තියෙන්නේ නැති විදියට තියෙන්නේ QA පද්ධතිය, ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරශ්නය (BI) ප්\u200dරශ්නය පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ් අපි ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරනවා අන්තිත්වාද්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් QA පද්ධතිය සඳහා හොඳ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරු මේ පැත්තේ, අපි විශේෂයෙන්ම ස්කීමා අවස්ථාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සෙමැන්ටික් සාමාන්තික සාමාන්තික සාමාන්තික සාමාන්තික සාමාන අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ATHENA පද්ධතියේ අන්තර්ජාතික විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත ව අපේ පරීක්ෂණ අංක අංක අංක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්කීමා අවස්ථාවක් සෙමැන්ටික් කාරණය ඇත්තටම උදව් කරනවා කියලා ~30%', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி கேள்வி முகப்புகள் NLP ஆராய்ச்சி இடைவெளியில் சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றங்களுடன் கூட, சாதாரண மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் QA அமைப்புகள் உண்மையான உலக வியாபார விளையாட்டு அறிவிப்புகளின் க கியூஏ முறைமைகளுக்கு சிறந்த இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் சிறந்த இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பொர இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் குறிப்பாக திட்டம் அறிந்து கொள்ளும் செமாண்டிக் காரணங்களை உருவாக்கும் சட்டத்தில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம்.  நாம் தொழில்நுட்பம் அடிப்படையில், நிலையில், இயல்பான மொழி கேள்வி பதில் அமைப்பு ATHENA மேல் எங்கள் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், மற்றும் 4 பெங் Our experimental numbers empirically show that the Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning indeed helps in achieving significantly better results for handling BI queries with an average accuracy improvement of ~30%', 'ur': 'Name NLP تحقیقات فضا میں اچھی پیشرفت کے ساتھ بھی، اچھی طرح کے قابل تحقیقات کی سیستموں کو حقیقی دنیا کے تجارت اطلاعات (BI) کے معاملہ میں سوال کرنے کے مطابق کم سمجھ رہے ہیں، کیونکہ طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی ابھی بھی AI-سخت مشکل ہے. ہم مضبوط کر رہے ہیں کہ ڈومین سیمانٹیکوں کے ذریعے آنٹولوژی بحث کا استعمال کرنا QA سیستم کے لئے بہتر طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی مدد کرسکتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم مخصوصاً ایک اسکیم آگاہ سیمنٹی رایسونینگ فرمیورک بنانے پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں جو طبیعی زبان کی تعبیر کو ایک کنٹولوژی منطقی کے ذریعہ سے حل کرنے والی کاموں کی سطح کے طور پر ترجمہ کرتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے فرمود کو ایک آنٹولوژی کے اوپر لازم کیا ہے، ایٹیٹ کی طبیعی زبان سؤال دینے کی سؤال دینے کی سیستم ATHENA، اور چار بنچم مارک کے ساتھ آزمائش کی جو BI سؤال پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ ہماری آزمائش تعداد مضبوط طور پر دکھاتی ہے کہ اسکیم آگاہ سیمنٹی کیونگ واقعی بہترین نتائج پہنچانے کے لئے بہترین نتائج کی مدد کرتی ہے ~30% کے متوسط دقیق سفارش کے ساتھ ~30%', 'uz': "Natural Language Query interfaces allow the end-users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage, or schema details.  NLP taʼminlovchi darajadagi eng yaqinda taʼminlovchi darajalar bilan davlat QA tizimlarining holati juda qiziqarli dunyodagi tizimlarning haqiqiqiy tizimini o'rganish imkoniyatini tushunmaydi, chunki tabiiy tilni o'rganish hamda juda qiyin muammolar. Biz o'ylaymiz, Domen semantika haqida ontologiy sababni o'rganish mumkin, QA tizimlari uchun yaxshi tilni o'rganishga yordam beradi. Bu qogʻozda biz foydalanuvchi asosiy tillarning tarjima qilishini o'zgartiradi va oddiy vazifalar bilan o'zgartiradi. Biz ontologiy asosida, tabiiy soʻrov soʻrov tizimi ATHENA asosida asosiy soʻrov holatimizni qo'llayapmiz, va to'rtta qiymatlar bilan boshlanamiz. Bizning tajriba raqamlarimizni o'xshash ko'rsatish mumkin, Schemat Semantik sabablari haqiqida juda yaxshi natijalarni bajarish mumkin. Bu ~30 dan foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Giao diện Hỏi bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho phép người dùng kết thúc truy cập thông tin cần thiết mà không cần phải biết bất kỳ ngôn ngữ truy vấn chuyên biệt, lưu dữ liệu, hay chi tiết giản đồ. Ngay cả với những bước tiến gần đây trong lĩnh vực nghiên cứu của ngôn ngữ Chọc gia, hệ thống QA hiện đại vẫn chưa hiểu thấu được tiềm năng của các câu hỏi của Hệ thống tình báo kinh doanh (BIA) trong thế giới thực, vì Bản hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên vẫn là một vấn đề khó khăn của AI. Chúng tôi cho rằng nếu sử dụng phương pháp khảo cổ trên ngữ pháp miền có thể giúp đạt được sự hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên tốt hơn cho hệ thống QA. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đặc biệt tập trung vào việc xây dựng một bộ khung Lý lẽ Trung học Schema dịch dịch giải ngôn ngữ tự nhiên như một chuỗi các công việc có thể phá được bởi một bộ nghiên cứu khảo cổ. Chúng tôi áp dụng cơ sở phụ thuộc vào hệ thống kiểm tra ngôn ngữ tự nhiên theo dạng duy nhất ATHENA, và thử nghiệm với 4 tiêu chuẩn tập trung vào các cuộc truy vấn tự nhiên. Những con số thử nghiệm của chúng tôi có thể cho thấy rằng Sự lý lẽ trung học của Schema Nhận thức kỳ diệu thực sự có thể giúp đạt kết quả tốt hơn đáng kể để xử lý các yêu cầu BIA với độ chính xác trung bình', 'bg': 'Интерфейсите за заявки на естествен език позволяват на крайните потребители достъп до желаната информация, без да е необходимо да знаят специализиран език за заявки, съхранение на данни или подробности за схемата. Дори с неотдавнашния напредък в изследователското пространство на НЛП, най-съвременните системи за контрол на качеството не разбират имплицитните намерения на заявки в реалния свят за бизнес интелигентност (БИ) в корпоративните системи, тъй като разбирането на естествения език все още остава труден проблем за ИИ. Ние смятаме, че разгръщането на онтологични разсъждения върху семантиката на домейна може да помогне за постигането на по-добро разбиране на естествения език за системите за контрол на качеството. В тази статия специално се фокусираме върху изграждането на рамка за семантично разсъждаване, която превежда интерпретацията на естествения език като поредица от решаващи задачи от онтологичен разсъждавач. Ние прилагаме нашата рамка върху онтологична, най-съвременна система за отговор на въпроси с естествен език и експериментираме с 4 референтни показатели, фокусирани върху запитвания. Нашите експериментални числа емпирично показват, че Семантичното Разбиране със Схемата наистина помага за постигането на значително по-добри резултати за обработка на заявки със средно подобрение на точността от ~ 30%', 'nl': "Met Natural Language Query-interfaces kunnen eindgebruikers toegang krijgen tot de gewenste informatie zonder dat ze een gespecialiseerde querytaal, gegevensopslag of schema-details hoeven te kennen. Zelfs met de recente vooruitgang op het gebied van NLP-onderzoeksruimte, begrijpen de state-of-the-art QA-systemen niet impliciete intenties van real-world Business Intelligence (BI) query's in bedrijfssystemen, aangezien Natural Language Understanding nog steeds een AI-hard probleem blijft. We gaan ervan uit dat het inzetten van ontologie redeneren boven domeinsemantiek kan helpen bij het bereiken van een beter natuurlijk taalbegrip voor QA-systemen. In dit artikel richten we ons specifiek op het bouwen van een Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework dat natuurlijke taalinterpretatie vertaalt als een opeenvolging van oplosbare taken door een ontologie redeneraar. We passen ons framework toe op een ontologie gebaseerd, state-of-the-art natuurlijke taal vragenantwoordsysteem ATHENA, en experimenteren met vier benchmarks gericht op BI-query's. Onze experimentele cijfers tonen empirisch aan dat de Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning inderdaad helpt om significant betere resultaten te bereiken voor het afhandelen van BI-query's met een gemiddelde nauwkeurigheidsverbetering van ~30%", 'da': 'Natural Language Forespørgselsgrænseflader giver slutbrugerne adgang til de ønskede oplysninger uden at behøve at kende specialiserede forespørgselssprog, datalagring eller skemadetaljer. Selv med de seneste fremskridt inden for NLP forskningsrum, er de avancerede QA-systemer ikke i stand til at forstå implicitte hensigter med virkelige Business Intelligence (BI) forespørgsler i virksomhedssystemer, da Natural Language Understanding stadig er et AI-hårdt problem. Vi mener, at implementering af ontologiske ræsonnementer over domænesemantik kan hjælpe med at opnå bedre naturlig sprogforståelse for QA-systemer. I denne artikel fokuserer vi specifikt på at opbygge en Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework, der oversætter naturligt sprog fortolkning som en række løselige opgaver af en ontologi reasoner. Vi anvender vores rammer oven i et ontologibaseret, state-of-the-art naturligt sprog spørgsmål besvarelsessystem Athena, og eksperimenterer med 4 benchmarks fokuseret på BI forespørgsler. Vores eksperimentelle tal viser empirisk, at Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning faktisk hjælper med at opnå betydeligt bedre resultater til håndtering af BI-forespørgsler med en gennemsnitlig nøjagtighedsforbedring på ~30%', 'hr': 'Prirodne interfejse za pitanje jezika omogućavaju krajnjim korisnicima pristupiti željenim informacijama bez potrebe da saznaju bilo kakve specijalizirane pitanja jezika, skladište podataka ili detalje o šemi. Čak i s nedavnim napredovima u istraživačkom prostoru NLP-a, sustavi stanja umjetnosti QA-a nisu razumjeli implicitne namjere stvarne svijetske poslovne inteligencije (BI) ispitivanja u poduzetničkim sustavima, jer razumijevanje prirodnog jezika još uvijek ostaje problem s AI-om. Postavljamo da raspoređivanje ontologijskog razgovora preko semantika domena može pomoći u ostvarivanju boljeg razumijevanja prirodnog jezika za QA sustave. U ovom papiru, posebno se fokusiramo na izgradnju semantičkog okvira za razumijevanje shme koja prevodi prirodnu interpretaciju jezika kao sekvencu rješavajućih zadataka od strane ontologije razumnika. Primjenjujemo naš okvir na vrhu ontologije baziranog, stanja prirodnog jezika odgovarajućeg sustava pitanja ATHENA, i eksperiment s 4 kriterija usredotočen na pitanja BI-a. Naši eksperimentalni brojevi empirički pokazuju da šema poznaje semantički razlog stvarno pomaže u postizanju značajno boljih rezultata za rješavanje ispitivanja BI-a s prosječnim poboljšanjem točnosti od ~30%', 'de': 'Natural Language Abfrageschnittstellen ermöglichen es den Endbenutzern, auf die gewünschten Informationen zuzugreifen, ohne dass sie eine spezielle Abfragesprache, Datenspeicherung oder Schemadetails kennen müssen. Selbst mit den jüngsten Fortschritten im NLP-Forschungsraum sind die hochmodernen QA-Systeme nicht in der Lage, implizite Absichten realer Business Intelligence (BI)-Abfragen in Unternehmenssystemen zu verstehen, da Natural Language Understanding nach wie vor ein KI-hartes Problem bleibt. Wir gehen davon aus, dass der Einsatz von ontologischem Denken über Domänensemantik dazu beitragen kann, ein besseres natürliches Sprachverständnis für QA-Systeme zu erreichen. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns speziell auf den Aufbau eines Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Frameworks, das natürliche Sprachinterpretation als eine Sequenz lösbarer Aufgaben durch einen Ontologie Reasoner übersetzt. Wir wenden unser Framework auf ein ontologiebasiertes, hochmodernes Fragebeantworungssystem in natürlicher Sprache ATHENA an und experimentieren mit vier Benchmarks, die sich auf BI-Abfragen konzentrieren. Unsere experimentellen Zahlen zeigen empirisch, dass das Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning tatsächlich dazu beiträgt, signifikant bessere Ergebnisse bei der Handhabung von BI-Abfragen mit einer durchschnittlichen Genauigkeitsverbesserung von ~30%zu erzielen', 'id': 'Natural Language Query interfaces allow the end-users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage, or schema details.  Bahkan dengan kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam ruang penelitian NLP, sistem QA yang terbaik gagal memahami niat implicit dari pertanyaan Business Intelligence (BI) di dunia nyata dalam sistem perusahaan, karena Natural Language Understanding masih masalah yang sulit AI. Kami menganggap bahwa menggunakan alasan ontologi melalui semantik domain dapat membantu dalam mencapai pemahaman bahasa alam yang lebih baik untuk sistem QA. Dalam kertas ini, kita secara spesifik fokus pada membangun Skema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework yang menerjemahkan interpretasi bahasa alam sebagai urutan tugas yang dapat diselesaikan oleh pemikir ontologi. Kami menerapkan cadangan kami di atas sebuah ontologi berdasarkan, sistem terbaik bahasa alam yang menjawab pertanyaan ATHENA, dan eksperimen dengan 4 benchmarks fokus pada pertanyaan BI. Nomor percobaan kami secara empirik menunjukkan bahwa Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning benar-benar membantu dalam mencapai hasil yang jauh lebih baik untuk menangani pertanyaan BI dengan peningkatan akurasi rata-rata ~30%', 'fa': 'interfaces Natural Language Query allow the end- users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage or schema details. حتی با پیشرفتهای اخیر در فضای تحقیقات NLP، سیستم های ایالت هنری QA به اندازه\u200cی تعریف هدف\u200cهای معمولی از اطلاعات تجارت دنیای واقعی (BI) در سیستم\u200cهای شرکت، از آنجا که درک زبان طبیعی هنوز یک مشکل سخت است. ما مطمئن می\u200cکنیم که استفاده کردن دلیل\u200cهای آنتونولوژی بر روی سیمانتیک\u200cهای دامنی می\u200cتواند به رسیدن درک زبان طبیعی بهتر برای سیستم\u200cهای QA کمک کند. در این کاغذ، ما مخصوصاً روی ساختن یک برنامهٔ ساختن یک برنامهٔ دلیل سازی سیمانتی که تعبیر زبان طبیعی را به عنوان برنامهٔ کارهای حل قابل حل توسط یک دلیل\u200cکننده\u200cی آنتونولوژی ترجمه می\u200cکند. ما چهارچوب\u200cمون رو روی یک اونتولوژی بر اساس یک سیستم سوال\u200cجواب زبان طبیعی ATHENA، و آزمایش با چهار نقطه\u200cای که روی سوال\u200cهای BI تمرکز شده\u200cاند، انجام می\u200cدهیم. شماره\u200cهای آزمایشی ما به صورت عمومی نشان می\u200cدهند که برنامه\u200cای از دلایل\u200cهای سیمانتیک آگاهی را به حقیقت کمک می\u200cکند تا نتایج\u200cهای خیلی بهتری را برای کنترل سوال\u200cهای BI با توسعه دقیق متوسط ~30%', 'ko': '자연 언어 조회 인터페이스는 최종 사용자가 필요한 정보를 방문할 수 있도록 하고, 전문적인 조회 언어, 데이터 저장, 패턴 세부 사항을 이해할 필요가 없다.NLP 연구 분야의 최신 진전에 따라 최첨단 QA시스템도 기업 시스템에서 진실세계상업지능(BI) 조회의 은밀한 의도를 이해할 수 없다. 자연언어 이해는 여전히 인공지능의 난제이기 때문이다.우리는 영역의 의미에 본체 추리를 배치하는 것이 QA시스템의 자연 언어를 더욱 잘 이해하는 데 도움이 된다고 생각한다.본고에서 우리는 지원 모델의 의미 추리 구조를 구축하는 데 특히 관심을 가진다. 이 구조는 본체 추리기를 통해 자연 언어 해석을 일련의 풀 수 있는 임무로 전환시킨다.우리는 본체를 바탕으로 하는 가장 선진적인 자연 언어 퀴즈 시스템인 ATHENA에 우리의 구조를 응용하고 BI 조회에 전념하는 4개의 기준 테스트로 실험을 진행했다.우리의 실험 데이터 경험에 의하면 패턴 감지 의미 추리는 BI 조회를 처리할 때 현저하고 좋은 결과를 얻는 데 도움이 되고 평균 정확도가 약 30% 높아진다고 한다.', 'sw': 'Katika maswali ya lugha ya asili huruhusu watumiaji wa mwisho kupata taarifa zinazohitajika bila haja ya kujua lugha yoyote maalum ya utafiti, kuhifadhia taarifa za taarifa au taarifa za schema. Even with the recent advances in NLP research space, the state-of-the-art QA systems fall short of understanding implicit intents of real-world Business Intelligence (BI) queries in enterprise systems, since Natural Language Understanding still remains an AI-hard problem.  Tunaweza kusema kuwa kutumia maelezo ya utaalamu kuhusu mifumo ya ndani inaweza kusaidia kupata ufahamu bora wa lugha za asili kwa mifumo ya QA. Katika gazeti hili, tunalenga hasa kwenye kujenga Mpango wa Kujifunza Msimu unaoelewa na Mfumo wa Matokeo ya Kimataifa ambao unatafsiri tafsiri ya lugha ya asili kama mfululizo wa kazi za ufumbuzi na sababu ya utambulisho. Tunatumia mfumo wetu juu ya utafiti wa hali ya asili, mfumo wa majibu ya maswali ya asili ya lugha ATHENA, na majaribio yetu kwa misingi minne yanayolenga kwenye maswali ya BI. Idadi yetu ya majaribio inaonyesha kwa makini kwamba Msimamo wa Mpango wa Kufahamu wa Kiuchumi unasaidia kutekeleza matokeo bora zaidi kwa kudhibiti maswali ya BI kwa kiwango cha wastani wa kuboreshwa kwa ~30%', 'tr': "Natal dil sorag interfejleri ahyry Ullançylara isleýän maglumaty hiç hili spesialized sorag dilini, maglumat maýynlamasy ýa-da şema maglumaty bilen berilmegine mümkin edýär. NLP araştyrma alanynda soňky öňki gelişmeler bilen hem, sungat sistemalary QA sistemalarynda düşünmek üçin Gerçek dünýäde biznes intelleksiýasynyň (BI) sistemalarynda soraglarynyň iň az maksadyny ýok bolup geçýär, sebäbi natural dil düşünmesi häli hem-de AI-kyn meselädir. Biz ontologiýanyň razylygyny domain semantiklerinden göçürmegini QA sistemleri üçin gowy tebigat dillerini düşünmek üçin kömek edip biler diýip pikir edýäris. Bu kagyzda, biz öz bellenenlerde Semantik sebäpli çözümleme çerçewçiligi täze dil terjimeleri ontologiýa razumçysy tarapyndan çözebilir zadlaryň dizini terjime edip otyrýarys. Biz ontologiýa daýan ýan, sanat-taýýarlyk tebigy diliň jogap sistemasyna ATHENA üýtget we 4 benchmarklaryň üstünde BI soraglaryna üns berýäris. Deneysel sayılarımız empirik olarak Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning'ın aslında BI sorularını ortalama derecede ~30% oranın düzeltmesi için daha iyi sonuçlarını elde etmeye yardım ediyor.", 'am': 'የተለመደው ቋንቋ ጠይቃዎች የፊደል ተጠቃሚዎች የጠየቁትን መረጃ ማግኘት ያልፈቀደ ቋንቋ፣ የዳታ አቀማመጥ ወይም የschema ዝርዝሮች ማውቅ ያስፈልጋል። በNLP ትምህርት ቦታ ውስጥ ባለፉት ግንኙነት ምንም እንኳ፣ የዓለም የንግድ ኢንተርኔት (BI) ጥያቄን ለማስተዋል የቅርብ ግንኙነት አነስተኛዊ ግንኙነት የዓለም የንግድ ኢንተርኔት (BI) ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ሲቀረበ እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ግን አ-አዲስ ችግር ነው፡፡ የዶሜን አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን በመፍጠር የኢንትዮሎጂ ምክንያት መፍጠር የQA ስርዓቶች ለመግለጥ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተለይም የስምናኒክ አካባቢ የፍሬም አካባቢ ትርጓሜን በአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ መተርጓሜ በተለየ ስራዎችን በተመለከተ አካባቢ ምክንያት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-መልስ ሲስተማርን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የፈተናው ቁጥር በሙሉ የሚያሳውቅ የስምዓራዊ አካባቢ አካሄዱን በመተካከለኛ ማስታወቂያ የቢ ጥያቄዎችን በመስጠት ይረዳል፡፡', 'sq': 'Natural Language Query interfaces allow the end-users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage, or schema details.  Edhe me përparimet e kohëve të fundit në hapësirën e kërkimit të NLP, sistemet më të larta të QA nuk kuptojnë qëllimet implicite të pyetjeve të botës reale të Inteligjencës së Biznesit (BI) në sistemet e ndërmarrjeve, pasi kuptimi i gjuhës natyrore mbetet ende një problem i vështirë për AI. Ne vendosim se vendosja e arsyetimit ontologjik mbi semantikën e domenit mund të ndihmojë në arritjen e kuptimit më të mirë të gjuhës natyrore për sistemet QA. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi veçan ërisht në ndërtimin e një kuadri të arsyetimit Semantik të njohur që përkthen interpretimin natyror të gjuhës si një sekuencë detyrash të zgjidhura nga një arsyetari ontologjik. Ne aplikojmë kuadrin tonë në krye të një sistemi të përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të gjuhës natyrore me bazë ontologjie, më të lartë në gjuhën natyrore ATHENA, dhe eksperimentojmë me 4 pika të përqëndruara në pyetjet e BI. Numrat tonë eksperimental empirikisht tregojnë se arsyetimi Semantik i Kujtueshëm i Shemës me të vërtetë ndihmon në arritjen e rezultateve më të mira në mënyrë të konsiderueshme për trajtimin e pyetjeve BI me një përmirësim mesatar të saktësisë prej ~30%', 'af': "Natuurlike taal navraag koppelvlakke laat toe die einde- gebruikers om toegang te kry tot die verwagte inligting sonder die benodig om enige spesialiseerde navraag taal, data stooring, of skema details te ken. Selfs met die onlangse vorderings in NLP-reseksruimte, die staat-van-die-kuns QA-stelsels word kort van verstanding inplisite doels van reël-wêreld besigheidsinligting (BI) vrae in bedryfstelsels, omdat Natuurlike Taal Verstanding nog steeds 'n AI-harde probleem bly. Ons positeer dat ontologie-redening oor domein semantieke kan help in beskikking van beter natuurlike taal verstanding vir QA stelsels. In hierdie papier, ons spesifieke fokus op die bou van 'n Skema Aware Semantic Reasoning Raamwerk wat die natuurlike taal uitlegging as 'n volgorde van oplosbare taak deur 'n ontologie redekenaar vertaling. Ons toewend ons raamwerk op bo van 'n ontologie gebaseer, state-of-the-art natuurlike taal-vraag-antwoord stelsel ATHENA, en eksperiment met 4 benchmarke gefokus op BI vraag. Ons eksperimentele nommers empiriese wys dat die Skema Aware Semantiese Reasoning werklik hulp in beter resultate te bereik vir die handling van BI vraag met 'n gemiddelde presies verbetering van ~30%", 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի հարցերի ինտերֆեյսները թույլ են տալիս վերջնական օգտագործողներին հասնել ցանկացած ինֆորմացիային առանց որևէ հատուկ հարցերի լեզվի, տվյալների պահպանման կամ սխեմայի մանրամասնությունների կարիքի: Նույնիսկ ՆԼՊ-ի հետազոտության տարածության վերջին զարգացումների դեպքում, ամենաբարձր QA համակարգերը բացակայում են իրական աշխարհի բիզնես ինտելեգենցիայի (ԲԻ) հարցերի ենթարկված նպատակները ընկերական համակարգերում, քանի որ բնական լեզվի հասկանալը դեռևս դժվար խնդիր է: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ գոնտոլոգիական մտածելակերպի կիրառումը տիեզերական սեմանտիկայի վրա կարող է օգնել հասնել ավելի լավ բնական լեզվի հասկանալու QA համակարգերի համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք հատկապես կենտրոնանում ենք Ստեմայի գիտակցած սեմանտիկ մտածողական շրջանակի կառուցման վրա, որը թարգմանում է բնական լեզվի թարգմանությունը որպես լուծելի խնդիրների հաջորդականություն օնտալոգիական մտածող Մենք կիրառում ենք մեր կառուցվածքը օնտոլոգիայի վրա հիմնված, ամենաբարձր բնական լեզվի հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգի Աթենայի վրա և փորձում ենք 4 համեմատական նպատակներով, որոնք կենտրոնացված են ԲԻ հարցերին: Մեր փորձարկման թվերը էմպիրիկապես ցույց են տալիս, որ Ստեմայի գիտակցական սեմանտիկ պատասխանատվությունը իսկապես օգնում է ավելի լավ արդյունքներ ձեռք բերել ԲԻ հարցերի վերաբերյալ՝ միջին ճշգրտության բարելավումով ~30', 'az': "T…ôbi…ôtli dil soruŇüma interfeysl…ôri sonlarńĪnda istifad…ô√ßil…ôrin ist…ôdiyi m…ôlumatlara istifad…ô etm…ôy…ô ehtiyacńĪ yoxdur. He√ß bir m…ôlumat dili, m…ôlumat deposu v…ô ya schema m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ bilm…ôd…ôn istifad…ô etm…ôy…ô imkan verir. NLP araŇütńĪrma alanńĪndakńĪ son √∂y√ľd-n…ôsih…ôtl…ôr…ô istisna olmaqla, QA sisteml…ôri h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn d√ľnyanńĪn Business Intelligence (BI) sisteml…ôrind…ô sorńüu-suallarńĪnńĪn d…ôyiŇüiklik niyy…ôtl…ôrini anlamaq m…ôqs…ôdil…ô …ôsla yoxdur, √ß√ľnki T…ôbi…ôtli Dil anlama h…ôl…ô d…ô AI-d…ô √ß…ôtin problemdir. QA sisteml…ôri √ľ√ß√ľn daha yaxŇüńĪ t…ôbi…ôtli dil anlaŇüńĪlmasńĪna k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôr. Bu kańüńĪzda, bir ontoloji razńĪl√ßńĪsńĪ tarafńĪndan t…ôbi…ôtli dil yorumluluńüunu √ß√∂z√ľbil…ôc…ôk iŇül…ôrin se√ßgisi olaraq t…ôhsil edil…ôn bir Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework inŇüa etm…ôy…ô t…ôhsil edirik. Biz ontoloji t…ôbi…ôtli dil cavab verm…ôk sistemini ATHENA'nńĪn √ľst√ľnd…ô v…ô BI soruŇümalarńĪna odaklanan 4 benchmarkl…ô t…ôcr√ľb…ô edirik. Bizim t…ôcr√ľb…ômiz sayńĪlarńĪmńĪz empirik olaraq g√∂st…ôrir ki, Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn, BI soruŇümalarńĪnńĪn ortalama dońüruluńüu il…ô ~30% t…ôcr√ľb…ôsinin daha xeyirli sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etm…ôy…ô k√∂m…ôk edir.", 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার কোন বিশেষ প্রশ্ন ভাষা, তথ্য সংরক্ষণ অথবা স্কীমা বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত তথ্য ব্যবহার করার প্রয়োজন ছাড়া শেষ- ব্যবহা এনএলপি গবেষণা স্থানে সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতির সাথেও রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প কিউএ সিস্টেম ব্যবসা ব্যবসা ব্যবসা বিজ্ঞাপনের (বিআই) প্রশ্নের লক্ষ্য কমে যায়, কারণ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষ আমরা জানি যে ডোমেইন সেম্যান্টিক্সের বিষয়টির ব্যাপারে অনটলোজি প্রদান করা যায় তা কিউএ সিস্টেমের জন্য ভালো প্রাক এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিশেষ করে একটি স্কীমা পরিচিত সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিক্রিয়ার ফ্রেম নির্মাণের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি যা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ব্যাখ্য We apply our framework on top of an ontology based, state-of-the-art natural language question-answering system ATHENA, and experiment with 4 benchmarks focused on BI queries.  আমাদের পরীক্ষার সংখ্যা ক্ষমতার সাথে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সিমা সচেতন সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিক্রিয়া সত্যিই সাহায্য করছে যে বিআই প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে গড়ে ৩০', 'bs': 'Prirodne interfejse za pitanje jezika omogućavaju krajnjim korisnicima pristupiti željenim informacijama bez potrebe da znaju bilo kakve specijalizirane jezike pitanja, skladište podataka ili detalje šeme. Čak i sa nedavnim napredovima u istraživačkom prostoru NLP-a, sistemi države umjetnosti QA-a nisu razumjeli implicitne namjere stvarne svijetske poslovne obavještajne (BI) pitanja u poduzetničkim sistemima, jer razumijevanje prirodnog jezika još uvijek ostaje problem sa AI-om. Postavljamo da raspoređivanje ontologijskog razgovora preko semantika domena može pomoći u ostvarivanju boljeg razumijevanja prirodnog jezika za QA sisteme. U ovom papiru, posebno se fokusiramo na izgradnju semantičkog okvira razumijevanja Scheme koja prevodi prirodnu interpretaciju jezika kao sekvencu rješavalih zadataka od strane ontologije razumnika. Primjenjujemo naš okvir na vrhu ontologije baziranog na stanju prirodnog jezika ATHENA, i eksperiment sa 4 kriterija usredotočen na pitanja BI-a. Naši eksperimentalni brojevi empirički pokazuju da šema poznaje semantički razlog stvarno pomaže u postizanju značajno boljih rezultata za rješavanje ispitivanja BI-a s prosječnim poboljšanjem tačnosti od ~30%', 'cs': 'Rozhraní dotazů přirozeného jazyka umožňují koncovým uživatelům přístup k požadovaným informacím bez nutnosti znát jakýkoli specializovaný jazyk dotazů, ukládání dat nebo podrobnosti o schématu. Dokonce i s nedávnými pokroky ve výzkumném prostoru NLP nedokážou moderní systémy kvality porozumět implicitním záměrům dotazů z reálného světa Business Intelligence (BI) v podnikových systémech, protože porozumění přirozenému jazyku stále zůstává problémem tvrdým umělou inteligencí. Předpokládáme, že nasazení ontologického uvažování nad doménovou sémantikou může pomoci k dosažení lepšího porozumění přirozenému jazyku pro QA systémy. V tomto článku se konkrétně zaměřujeme na vytvoření Schema Aware Sémantic Reasoning Framework, který překládá interpretaci přirozeného jazyka jako sekvenci řešitelných úloh ontologickým reasonerem. Náš framework aplikujeme na ontologický, nejmodernější systém pro odpovědi na otázky v přírodním jazyce ATHENA a experimentujeme se čtyřmi benchmarky zaměřenými na BI dotazy. Naše experimentální čísla empiricky ukazují, že Schema Aware Sémantic Reasoning skutečně pomáhá dosáhnout výrazně lepších výsledků pro zpracování BI dotazů s průměrným zlepšením přesnosti o ~30%', 'et': 'Looduskeele päringuliidesed võimaldavad lõppkasutajatel juurdepääsu soovitud teabele, ilma et oleks vaja teada spetsiaalset päringukeelt, andmesalvestust või skeemi üksikasju. Isegi uue tööprogrammi uurimisruumi hiljutiste edusammudega ei mõista tipptasemel kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemid ettevõtlussüsteemides reaalsete äriintelligentsi (BI) päringute kaudseid kavatsusi, kuna looduskeele mõistmine on endiselt tehisintellekti raske probleem. Oleme seisukohal, et ontoloogilise arutluse kasutamine domeenisemantika üle võib aidata saavutada paremat looduskeele arusaamist kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemides. Käesolevas töös keskendume spetsiaalselt skeemiteadliku semantilise mõtlemise raamistiku loomisele, mis tõlgib looduskeele tõlgendamist ontoloogia mõtleja poolt lahendatavate ülesannete jadana. Rakendame oma raamistikku ontoloogiapõhise kaasaegse looduskeele küsimustele vastamise süsteemi ATHENA peale ning eksperimenteerime nelja BI päringutele keskendunud võrdluskriteeriumiga. Meie eksperimentaalsed numbrid näitavad empiiriliselt, et skeemiteadlik semantiline mõistmine aitab tõepoolest saavutada oluliselt paremaid tulemusi BI päringute käsitlemisel keskmise täpsuse paranemisega ~30%', 'ca': "Les interfaces de consulta natural permeten als usuaris finals accedir a la informació desitjada sense la necessitat de saber cap llenguatge especialitzat de consulta, emmagatzematge de dades o detalls del esquema. Fins i tot amb els avanços recents en l'espai de recerca de la NLP, els sistemes QA d'última generació no entenen les intencions implícites d'investigacions d'intel·ligència empresarial del món real, ja que l'enteniment de llenguatge natural encara és un problema difícil de l'AI. We posit that deploying ontology reasoning over domain semantics can help in achieving better natural language understanding for QA systems.  En aquest article, ens centrem específicament en construir un marc de raonament Semàtic conscient d'esquema que traduis l'interpretació del llenguatge natural com una seqüència de tasques solubles per un raonador ontològic. We apply our framework on top of an ontology based, state-of-the-art natural language question-answering system ATHENA, and experiment with 4 benchmarks focused on BI queries.  Els nostres nombres experimentals demostren empíricament que la raonació Semàtica conscient de l'esquema ajuda a aconseguir resultats significativament millors per gestionar preguntes BI amb una millora de precisió mitjana de ~30%", 'fi': 'Luonnollisen kielen kyselyrajapintojen avulla loppukäyttäjät voivat käyttää haluttuja tietoja tarvitsematta tietää mitään erikoistunutta kyselykieltä, tietojen tallennusta tai kaavion yksityiskohtia. NLP-tutkimusalueen viimeaikaisista edistysaskeleista huolimatta uusimmat laadunvarmistusjärjestelmät eivät ymmärrä yritysjärjestelmissä reaalimaailman Business Intelligence (BI) -kyselyjen implisiittisiä tarkoituksia, koska Natural Language Understanding on edelleen tekoälyn kova ongelma. Oletamme, että ontologisen päättelyn käyttöönotto toimialueen semantiikan sijaan voi auttaa saavuttamaan paremman luonnollisen kielen ymmärryksen laadunvarmistusjärjestelmille. Tässä työssä keskitytään erityisesti Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework -mallin rakentamiseen, joka kääntää luonnollisen kielen tulkinnan ontologian päättelijän ratkaistavien tehtävien sarjana. Sovellamme viitekehyksiämme ontologiapohjaisen, uusimman luonnollisen kielen kysymysjärjestelmän ATHENA päälle ja kokeilemme neljää BI-kyselyihin keskittyvää vertailuarvoa. Kokeelliset lukumme osoittavat empiirisesti, että Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning auttaa saavuttamaan huomattavasti parempia tuloksia BI-kyselyjen käsittelyssä keskimäärin ~30% tarkkuuden parantuessa.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Candidaturan karo perusahaan kelas telas nang NLP NdLP pirsasahan, sistem-perusahaan-perusahaan yang pakan kelas kuwi tindakan yen perusahaan sugitirat kanggo ala Mungkin Biwisan Awal (BI) kang sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo ala macem depurasi layanan, dadi Awal Terusahaan langkung isih perusahaan AI-susahe bot. We position that depdepicting ontlogies rationing about domain semanti can help in detecting the right language compromise for qA sistems. Nan pepulan iki, kita ngomong dipun ngomong mungkur nggawe scheme Awar semanti responsing frame nambah dumateng pribadhaka dilangan tuwih dumateng sumelang egal akun ngerimisi layar suaraning layar di ontlogi ratior. Awak dhéwé ngerti nggawe barang mulasar tentang karo ontlogi sing basa, stad-of-the-arts pribadhakan langgambar aturan suaraning sistem ATHENI, lan surutan karo 4 bench-marks sing dipontrolasi ning BI seneng nggunian. Nomoro sing perbudhakan maneh dumadhi uwong kelas keleasar tentang Sema Awar semanti kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas maneh dumadhi kanggo nggawe sawetara sistem sing luwih dumadhi iki dadi sing bisa dianggap BI karo nganggo perusahaan langkung wih-siyuh sing apik dhéwé ©30%', 'ha': "Sauya masu tambayi na Luuya na Natural, ya yarda su iya samun maɓallin wanda ake amfani da shi na ƙarami idan ba da haja ya san wani zane wa zaman tambayar da aka ƙayyade, tsarin data, ko kuma buƙatan kayan da aka ƙayyade. Hata da da yakawa na ƙaranci cikin filin research na NLP, tsarin-state-of-the-art QA na ƙara ƙaranci kasa fahimta ma'anar gaskiyar al'amarin na gaskiyar-world Businesce Inteligence Tuna mataimaki cẽwa, za'a sakar da ontoloji a kan mutane na Dominiki yana iya taimako da su sami mafiya alhẽri ga fahimtar harshen asili na QA. Daga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade fokus a kan ka gina wani Schema Mai Yawa na Semantic Resning Frame wanda ke fassarar fassarar harshen da bakwai kamar wata sequence of taskõkin da za'a solve su da wani mataimaki na ontoloji. We apply our framework on top of an ontology based, state-of-the-art natural language question-answering system ATHENA, and experiment with 4 benchmarks focused on BI queries.  NambayinMu na jarrabi game da faransa na nuna cewa, Ganukiya na sani na Zamantic na ƙarami ya ƙara matsala mai kyau wa kudai tambayar BI da an ƙara taƙaitacce na `30%", 'sk': 'Vmesniki poizvedbe naravnega jezika končnim uporabnikom omogočajo dostop do želenih informacij, ne da bi morali poznati specializiranega jezika poizvedbe, shranjevanja podatkov ali podrobnosti sheme. Tudi z nedavnim napredkom v raziskovalnem prostoru NLP najsodobnejši sistemi za zagotavljanje kakovosti ne razumejo implicitnih namenov poizvedb v realnem svetu Business Intelligence (BI) v poslovnih sistemih, saj razumevanje naravnega jezika še vedno ostaja težka težava z umetno inteligenco. Predvidevamo, da lahko uporaba ontološkega razmišljanja preko domenske semantike pomaga doseči boljše razumevanje naravnega jezika za sisteme za zagotavljanje kakovosti. V prispevku se posebej osredotočamo na izgradnjo okvira semantičnega razumevanja, ki prevaja interpretacijo naravnega jezika kot zaporedje rešljivih nalog s strani ontološkega razumevalca. Naš okvir uporabljamo na vrhu ontologijskega, najsodobnejšega sistema za odgovarjanje na vprašanja v naravnem jeziku ATHENA in eksperimentiramo s štirimi referenčnimi vrednostmi, osredotočenimi na BI poizvedbe. Naše eksperimentalne številke empirično kažejo, da semantično razumevanje sheme resnično pomaga doseči bistveno boljše rezultate za obravnavanje poizvedb BI s povprečnim izboljšanjem natančnosti za ~30%', 'he': 'משקפי ביקור לשפה טבעיים מאפשרים למשתמשים הסופיים לגשת למידע הנרצח ללא הצורך לדעת שום שפת ביקור מיוחדת, אחסון נתונים או פרטי רשת. אפילו עם התקדמות האחרונות במרחב המחקר של NLP, מערכות QA המאודמות נמצאות מחסרות להבין כוונות משמעותיות של חקירות מודיעין עסקי בעולם האמיתי (BI) במערכות עסקים, מאחר שההבנה בשפה הטבעית עדיין בעיה קשה AI. אנו מניחים שהשימוש בהיגיון אונטולוגי על סמנטיקה בתחום יכול לעזור להשיג הבנה טבעית טובה יותר למערכות QA. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמקדים במיוחד בניית סגרת הגיון סמנטית מודעת שמתרגמת פרשנות שפה טבעית כרצף של משימות פתרונות על ידי סגרת אונטולוגיה. אנו משתמשים במסגרת שלנו על מערכת תשובת השפה הטבעית המבוססת על אונטולוגיה, המאוחרת ביותר, ATHENA, וניסוי עם 4 נקודות רמז ממוקדות על שאלות BI. מספרי הניסויים שלנו מראים באמפריה שההגיון סמנטי מודע לשימוש המערכת באמת עוזר להשיג תוצאות טובות יותר משמעותיות', 'bo': 'Natural Language Query interfaces allow the end-users to access the desired information without the need to know any specialized query language, data storage, or schema details. Even with the recent advances in NLP research space, the state-of-the-art QA systems fall short of understanding implicit intents of real-world Business Intelligence (BI) queries in enterprise systems, since Natural Language Understanding still remains an AI-hard problem. ང་ཚོས་རང་རིག་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་ལ་རང་རིག་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པར་Schema Aware Semantic Reasoning Framework་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་ཡོད། We apply our framework on top of an ontology based, state-of-the-art natural language question-answering system ATHENA, and experiment with 4 benchmarks focused on BI queries. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་ཨང་ཀི'}
{'en': 'What Can We Learn from Noun Substitutions in Revision Histories?', 'fr': 'Que pouvons-nous apprendre des substitutions de noms dans les historiques de révision\xa0?', 'es': '¿Qué podemos aprender de las sustituciones de sustantivos en los historiales de revisiones?', 'ar': 'ما الذي يمكن أن نتعلمه من بدائل الأسماء في تاريخ المراجعة؟', 'pt': 'O que podemos aprender com substituições de substantivos em históricos de revisões?', 'zh': '我们可以从修订史书中的名词替换中学到什么?', 'ja': '改訂履歴の名詞置換から何を学ぶことができますか？', 'hi': 'संशोधन इतिहास में संज्ञा प्रतिस्थापन से हम क्या सीख सकते हैं?', 'ru': 'Чему мы можем научиться из замещений существительных в истории редакций?', 'ga': 'Cad is Féidir Linn a Fhoghlaim ó Ionadaithe Ainmfhocal i Staireanna Athbhreithnithe?', 'ka': 'კაკგჲ მჲზვმ ეა ნასფთმ ჲრ ჟვდა?', 'el': 'Τι μπορούμε να μάθουμε από τις υποκαταστάσεις ουσιαστικών στα ιστορικά αναθεώρησης;', 'hu': 'Mit tanulhatunk a főnevek helyettesítéséből a reviziótörténetekben?', 'it': 'Cosa possiamo imparare dalle sostituzioni di sostantivi nelle storie di revisione?', 'ms': 'Apa yang kita boleh belajar dari penggantian nama dalam sejarah revisi?', 'kk': 'Қайталау журналында жаңа ауыстырулардан не үйрене аламыз?', 'mk': 'Што можеме да научиме од именичките замени во историјата на ревизијата?', 'mt': 'X’nistgħu nitgħallmu minn Noun Substitutions in Revision Histories?', 'ml': 'റിവിസിഷന്\u200d ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d നൂന്\u200d ഉത്തരവാദിത്വങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമുക്കെന്ത് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും?', 'pl': 'Czego możemy się nauczyć od substytucji rzeczowników w historiach rewizji?', 'mn': 'Бид шинэчлэлийн түүхийн шинэ орлуулалтаас юу сурах вэ?', 'no': 'Kva kan vi lære frå nytt substitusjonar i revisjonsgistorien?', 'ro': 'Ce putem învăța din substituțiile substantivelor din istoriile reviziilor?', 'lt': 'Ką galime išmokti iš pavadinimų peržiūros istorijoje?', 'sr': 'Šta možemo naučiti od trenutnih zamjena u istoriji revizije?', 'so': 'What Can We Learn from Noun Substitutions in Revision Histories?', 'sv': 'Vad kan vi lära oss av substantiv substitutioner i revisionshistoriker?', 'si': 'අපිට මොකක්ද පුළුවන් ආපහු ආතිහාසයෙන් ආයුධ විස්තරයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න?', 'ta': 'திரும்ப திரும்ப வரலாறுகளில் நாம் என்ன கற்றலாம்?', 'ur': 'اور ہم کیا جانتے ہیں تاریخیوں میں جو تغییر کرتے ہیں', 'uz': "Tahrirlash tarixida nima o'rganamiz mumkin?", 'vi': '"Có thể học được gì từ các thế hệ ngầm trong câu chuyện Revision?', 'bg': 'Какво можем да научим от заместването на съществителни в историята на ревизиите?', 'nl': 'Wat kunnen we leren van substituties in revisiegeschiedenis?', 'hr': 'Što možemo naučiti od trenutnih zamjena u povijesti revizije?', 'da': 'Hvad kan vi lære af substitutioner af navneord i revisionshistorier?', 'de': 'Was können wir von Substitutionen in Revisionsgeschichten lernen?', 'id': 'What Can We Learn from Noun Substitutions in Revision Histories?', 'ko': '우리는 역사를 수정하는 명사 교체에서 무엇을 배울 수 있습니까?', 'fa': 'آیا می\u200cتوانیم از جایگزینی\u200cهای جدید در تاریخ\u200cهای بازرسی چه یاد بگیریم؟', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kujifunza nini kutokana na matatizo yasiyo na maana katika Historia za Mapinduzi?', 'tr': 'Revisiýa Geçmişinde Waz Üýtgewlerden Näme öwrenip bileris?', 'sq': 'Çfarë mund të mësojmë nga përmirësimet e emrave në historitë e revisionit?', 'af': 'Wat kan ons leer van Nou Substitutions in Revision Histories?', 'am': 'በአዲስ ታሪክ ውስጥ ከNoun Subtitles ምን እናስተማር ይችላል?', 'az': 'Biz yeni d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrd…ôn n…ôyi √∂yr…ônirik?', 'hy': 'Ի՞նչ կարող ենք սովորել վերլուծության պատմություններում անվանումների փոխարինումներից:', 'bn': 'আমরা কি শিখতে পারি রিভিশন ইতিহাসে নুন বিষয়বস্তু থেকে?', 'bs': 'Šta možemo naučiti od trenutnih zamjena u povijesti revizije?', 'ca': 'Què podem aprendre de les substitucions de nou a les històries de revisió?', 'cs': 'Co se můžeme naučit od substitucí v historii revizí?', 'et': 'Mida me saame õppida substantiivsetest asendustest versiooniajaloos?', 'fi': 'Mitä voimme oppia substantiivikorvauksista tarkistushistoriassa?', 'jv': 'Iso awak dhéwé ngerti apa-apa kanggo nyelarani apa-apa kanggo nyelarani urip?', 'sk': 'Kaj se lahko naučimo iz nadomestil samostalnikov v zgodovini revizij?', 'ha': 'Mẽne ne zã Mu sanar da shi daga littattafai?', 'he': 'What Can We Learn from Noun Substitutions in Revision Histories?', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བསྐྱར་གསོ་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་མ་ཐུབ་པ་ག་རེ་ཤེས་དགོས་སམ།'}
{'en': 'In community-edited resources such as wikiHow, sentences are subject to revisions on a daily basis. Recent work has shown that resulting improvements over time can be modelled computationally, assuming that each revision contributes to the improvement. We take a closer look at a subset of such revisions, for which we attempt to improve a computational model and validate in how far the assumption that ‘revised means better’ actually holds. The subset of revisions considered here are noun substitutions, which often involve interesting semantic relations, including synonymy, antonymy and hypernymy. Despite the high semantic relatedness, we find that a supervised classifier can distinguish the revised version of a sentence from an original version with an accuracy close to 70 %, when taking context into account. In a human annotation study, we observe that annotators identify the revised sentence as the ‘better version’ with similar performance. Our analysis reveals a fair agreement among annotators when a revision improves fluency. In contrast, noun substitutions that involve other lexical-semantic relationships are often perceived as being equally good or tend to cause disagreements. While these findings are also reflected in classification scores, a comparison of results shows that our model fails in cases where humans can resort to factual knowledge or intuitions about the required level of specificity.', 'fr': "Dans les ressources éditées par la communauté telles que WikiHow, les phrases sont sujettes à des révisions quotidiennes. Des travaux récents ont montré que les améliorations qui en résultent au fil du temps peuvent être modélisées par calcul, en supposant que chaque révision contribue à l'amélioration. Nous examinons de plus près un sous-ensemble de ces révisions, pour lesquelles nous tentons d'améliorer un modèle informatique et de valider dans quelle mesure l'hypothèse selon laquelle «\xa0révisé signifie mieux\xa0» est réellement valable. Le sous-ensemble de révisions considéré ici est constitué de substitutions de noms, qui impliquent souvent des relations sémantiques intéressantes, y compris la synonymie, l'antonymie et l'hypernymie. Malgré la forte relation sémantique, nous constatons qu'un classificateur supervisé peut distinguer la version révisée d'une phrase d'une version originale avec une précision proche de 70\xa0%, en tenant compte du contexte. Dans une étude d'annotation humaine, nous observons que les annotateurs identifient la phrase révisée comme étant la «\xa0meilleure version\xa0» avec des performances similaires. Notre analyse révèle un bon accord entre les annotateurs lorsqu'une révision améliore la fluidité. En revanche, les substitutions de nom qui impliquent d'autres relations lexico-sémantiques sont souvent perçues comme étant également bonnes ou ont tendance à provoquer des désaccords. Bien que ces résultats se reflètent également dans les scores de classification, une comparaison des résultats montre que notre modèle échoue dans les cas où les humains peuvent avoir recours à des connaissances factuelles ou à des intuitions concernant le niveau de spécificité requis.", 'pt': "Em recursos editados pela comunidade, como o wikiHow, as frases estão sujeitas a revisões diariamente. Trabalhos recentes mostraram que melhorias resultantes ao longo do tempo podem ser modeladas computacionalmente, assumindo que cada revisão contribui para a melhoria. Examinamos mais de perto um subconjunto de tais revisões, para as quais tentamos melhorar um modelo computacional e validar até que ponto a suposição de que 'revisado significa melhor' realmente se sustenta. O subconjunto de revisões considerado aqui são substituições de substantivos, que muitas vezes envolvem relações semânticas interessantes, incluindo sinonímia, antonímia e hipernímia. Apesar da alta relação semântica, descobrimos que um classificador supervisionado pode distinguir a versão revisada de uma frase de uma versão original com uma precisão próxima a 70%, ao levar em conta o contexto. Em um estudo de anotação humana, observamos que os anotadores identificam a sentença revisada como a 'melhor versão' com desempenho semelhante. Nossa análise revela um acordo justo entre os anotadores quando uma revisão melhora a fluência. Em contraste, substituições de substantivos que envolvem outras relações léxico-semânticas são muitas vezes percebidas como igualmente boas ou tendem a causar desacordos. Embora essas descobertas também se reflitam nas pontuações de classificação, uma comparação dos resultados mostra que nosso modelo falha nos casos em que os humanos podem recorrer ao conhecimento factual ou intuições sobre o nível de especificidade exigido.", 'ar': 'في الموارد التي يحررها المجتمع مثل wikiHow ، تخضع الجمل للمراجعات على أساس يومي. أظهر العمل الأخير أنه يمكن نمذجة التحسينات الناتجة بمرور الوقت حسابيًا ، بافتراض أن كل مراجعة تساهم في التحسين. نلقي نظرة فاحصة على مجموعة فرعية من هذه المراجعات ، والتي نحاول من أجلها تحسين نموذج حسابي والتحقق من مدى صحة الافتراض القائل بأن "المراجعة تعني الأفضل". المجموعة الفرعية من المراجعات التي تم أخذها في الاعتبار هنا هي بدائل الأسماء ، والتي غالبًا ما تتضمن علاقات دلالية مثيرة للاهتمام ، بما في ذلك المرادفات ، والتضاد ، و hypernymy. على الرغم من الارتباط الدلالي العالي ، نجد أن المصنف الخاضع للإشراف يمكنه التمييز بين النسخة المنقحة من الجملة والنسخة الأصلية بدقة تقترب من 70٪ ، عند أخذ السياق في الاعتبار. في دراسة التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية ، لاحظنا أن المعلقين يحددون الجملة المنقحة على أنها "نسخة أفضل" ذات أداء مشابه. يكشف تحليلنا عن اتفاق عادل بين المعلقين عندما تحسن المراجعة الطلاقة. في المقابل ، غالبًا ما يُنظر إلى بدائل الأسماء التي تتضمن علاقات معجمية دلالية أخرى على أنها جيدة بنفس القدر أو تميل إلى التسبب في خلافات. بينما تنعكس هذه النتائج أيضًا في درجات التصنيف ، تظهر مقارنة النتائج أن نموذجنا فشل في الحالات التي يمكن فيها للبشر اللجوء إلى المعرفة الواقعية أو الحدس حول المستوى المطلوب من الخصوصية.', 'es': 'En los recursos editados por la comunidad, como wikiHow, las oraciones están sujetas a revisiones diarias. Trabajos recientes han demostrado que las mejoras resultantes a lo largo del tiempo se pueden modelar computacionalmente, suponiendo que cada revisión contribuya a la mejora. Analizamos más de cerca un subconjunto de tales revisiones, para lo cual tratamos de mejorar un modelo computacional y validar hasta qué punto se mantiene realmente el supuesto de que «revisado significa mejor». El subconjunto de revisiones consideradas aquí son las sustituciones de sustantivos, que a menudo implican relaciones semánticas interesantes, incluyendo sinonimia, antonimia e hipernemia. A pesar de la alta relación semántica, encontramos que un clasificador supervisado puede distinguir la versión revisada de una oración de una versión original con una precisión cercana al 70%, teniendo en cuenta el contexto. En un estudio de anotación en humanos, observamos que los anotadores identifican la oración revisada como la «versión mejor» con un rendimiento similar. Nuestro análisis revela un acuerdo justo entre los anotadores cuando una revisión mejora la fluidez. Por el contrario, las sustituciones de sustantivos que involucran otras relaciones léxico-semánticas a menudo se perciben como igualmente buenas o tienden a causar desacuerdos. Si bien estos hallazgos también se reflejan en las puntuaciones de clasificación, una comparación de los resultados muestra que nuestro modelo falla en los casos en que los humanos pueden recurrir al conocimiento fáctico o a las intuiciones sobre el nivel de especificidad requerido.', 'zh': '社区辑之资(如wikiHow)中,句日改。 近者研明,随时推移,终于改建模,假设每修,皆有助于改进。 考之子集,为之计形,而验于多大程度之上。 其修定子集名词,常关趣语义,包括同义词,反义词与超义词。 虽语义相关性高,思之上下文,督分类器,别句本,准确率近70%。 〔一0〕类聚作"善本"。 臣等之分析表明,当修崇流畅性,注释之间,遂成平一致意见。 比之以下,词汇- 语义及名词,代常以为同好易异。 虽在分数之中,比较表明人可以言特异性水平之实,直觉之形败矣。', 'ja': 'WikiHowなどのコミュニティ編集リソースでは、文章は毎日改訂される場合があります。 最近の研究では、各改訂が改善に貢献すると仮定して、時間の経過とともにもたらされる改善を計算モデル化することができることが示されている。 このような改訂のサブセットを詳しく見て、計算モデルを改善し、「改訂はより良い意味を意味する」という仮定が実際にどの程度保持されているかを検証しようとします。 ここで考慮される改訂のサブセットは名詞置換であり、多くの場合、同義語、対義語、超名詞を含む興味深い意味関係が含まれます。 セマンティック関連性が高いにもかかわらず、監督下の分類子は、文脈を考慮すると、70%近い精度で文の改訂版をオリジナル版と区別できることがわかります。 人間による注釈研究では、注釈者が改訂された文章を同様のパフォーマンスを持つ「より良いバージョン」と識別することが観察されます。 当社の分析によると、改訂により流暢性が向上した場合、注釈者の間で公平な合意が得られることが明らかになりました。 対照的に、他の語彙-意味関係を伴う名詞置換は、しばしば同等に良いと認識されるか、または異論を引き起こす傾向がある。 これらの知見は分類スコアにも反映されていますが、結果の比較は、人間が必要なレベルの特異性について事実上の知識または直観を利用できる場合に、私たちのモデルが失敗することを示しています。', 'hi': "WikiHow जैसे समुदाय-संपादित संसाधनों में, वाक्य दैनिक आधार पर संशोधन के अधीन हैं। हाल के काम से पता चला है कि समय के साथ परिणामी सुधारों को कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से मॉडलकिया जा सकता है, यह मानते हुए कि प्रत्येक संशोधन सुधार में योगदान देता है। हम इस तरह के संशोधनों के सबसेट पर करीब से नज़र डालते हैं, जिसके लिए हम एक कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल में सुधार करने का प्रयास करते हैं और यह सत्यापित करते हैं कि यह धारणा कितनी दूर है कि 'संशोधित का मतलब बेहतर है' वास्तव में रखता है। यहां विचार किए गए संशोधनों का सबसेट संज्ञा प्रतिस्थापन हैं, जिसमें अक्सर दिलचस्प शब्दार्थ संबंध शामिल होते हैं, जिसमें पर्यायवाची, विलोम और हाइपरनीमी शामिल होते हैं। उच्च शब्दार्थ संबद्धता के बावजूद, हम पाते हैं कि एक पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर एक वाक्य के संशोधित संस्करण को मूल संस्करण से 70% के करीब सटीकता के साथ अलग कर सकता है, जब संदर्भ को ध्यान में रखते हुए। एक मानव एनोटेशन अध्ययन में, हम देखते हैं कि एनोटेटर संशोधित वाक्य को समान प्रदर्शन के साथ 'बेहतर संस्करण' के रूप में पहचानते हैं। हमारे विश्लेषण annotators के बीच एक निष्पक्ष समझौते से पता चलता है जब एक संशोधन प्रवाह में सुधार करता है. इसके विपरीत, संज्ञा प्रतिस्थापन जो अन्य लेक्सिकल-शब्दार्थ संबंधों को शामिल करते हैं, उन्हें अक्सर समान रूप से अच्छा माना जाता है या असहमति का कारण बनता है। हालांकि ये निष्कर्ष वर्गीकरण स्कोर में भी परिलक्षित होते हैं, परिणामों की तुलना से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल उन मामलों में विफल रहता है जहां मनुष्य विशिष्टता के आवश्यक स्तर के बारे में तथ्यात्मक ज्ञान या अंतर्ज्ञान का सहारा ले सकते हैं।", 'ru': 'В редактируемых сообществом ресурсах, таких как wikiHow, предложения ежедневно пересматриваются. Недавняя работа показала, что результирующие улучшения с течением времени могут быть смоделированы с помощью вычислительных средств, если предположить, что каждый пересмотр способствует улучшению. Мы более внимательно рассмотрим подмножество таких пересмотров, для чего мы попытаемся улучшить вычислительную модель и проверить, в какой степени предположение о том, что «пересмотренный означает лучше», на самом деле сохраняется. Рассматриваемое здесь подмножество ревизий - это существительные-замены, которые часто включают интересные семантические отношения, в том числе синонимию, антонимию и гипернимию. Несмотря на высокую семантическую взаимосвязь, мы обнаруживаем, что поднадзорный классификатор может отличить пересмотренный вариант предложения от оригинального варианта с точностью, близкой к 70%, при учете контекста. В исследовании человеческих аннотаций мы наблюдаем, что аннотаторы идентифицируют пересмотренное предложение как «лучшую версию» с аналогичной производительностью. Наш анализ показывает справедливое согласие между аннотаторами, когда пересмотр улучшает беглость. Напротив, замены существительных, которые связаны с другими лексико-семантическими отношениями, часто воспринимаются как одинаково хорошие или, как правило, вызывают разногласия. Хотя эти результаты также отражены в баллах классификации, сравнение результатов показывает, что наша модель терпит неудачу в тех случаях, когда люди могут прибегнуть к фактическим знаниям или интуициям о требуемом уровне специфичности.', 'ga': "In acmhainní arna gcur in eagar ag an bpobal ar nós wikiHow, bíonn na habairtí faoi réir athbhreithnithe ar bhonn laethúil. Tá sé léirithe ag obair a rinneadh le déanaí gur féidir na feabhsuithe a eascraíonn as seo le himeacht ama a mhúnlú go ríomhaireachtúil, ag glacadh leis go gcuidíonn gach athbhreithniú leis an bhfeabhsúchán. Breathnaímid níos géire ar fho-thacar d'athbhreithnithe dá leithéid, a ndéanaimid iarracht samhail ríomhaireachtúil a fheabhsú ina leith agus bailíochtú a dhéanamh ar cé chomh fada is atá an toimhde go bhfuil `athbhreithniú níos fearr'. Is éard is fo-thacar na n-athbhreithnithe a bhreathnaítear anseo orthu ná ionadaigh ainmfhocail, a mbíonn caidreamh shéimeantach spéisiúil i gceist leo go minic, lena n-áirítear comhchiall, comhchiallaigh agus hipearainmneacha. In ainneoin an chomhghaolmhaireachta ard shéimeantach, feicimid gur féidir le haicmitheoir maoirsithe idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir leagan athbhreithnithe na habairte agus bunleagan le cruinneas gar do 70%, agus an comhthéacs á chur san áireamh. I staidéar anótála daonna, tugaimid faoi deara go n-aithníonn anótálaithe an abairt athbhreithnithe mar an `leagan níos fearr' le feidhmíocht chomhchosúil. Nochtann ár n-anailís comhaontú cothrom i measc na nótaíoirí nuair a fheabhsaíonn athbhreithniú líofacht. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, is minic go mbreathnaítear ar ionadaí ainmfhocail a mbíonn gaolta foclóireachta-séimeantacha eile i gceist leo mar chomh maith céanna nó go mbíonn siad ina gcúis le heasaontas. Cé go léirítear na torthaí seo freisin sna scóir aicmithe, léiríonn comparáid idir na torthaí go dteipeann ar ár múnla i gcásanna inar féidir le daoine dul i muinín eolas fíorasach nó intuition faoin leibhéal sainiúlachta a theastaíonn.", 'hu': 'A közösség által szerkesztett erőforrásokban, mint például a wikiHow, a mondatokat naponta módosítják. A közelmúltbeli munkák azt mutatták, hogy az eredményekből eredő fejlesztések idővel számítástechnikailag modellezhetők, feltételezve, hogy minden felülvizsgálat hozzájárul a fejlesztéshez. Közelebbről megvizsgáljuk az ilyen módosítások egy részhalmazát, amelyekhez megpróbáljuk javítani a számítástechnikai modellt, és igazoljuk, hogy milyen mértékben áll fenn az a feltételezés, hogy a "módosított jelentés jobb". Az itt vizsgált revíziók alcsoportja főnévhelyettesítések, amelyek gyakran érdekes szemantikai kapcsolatokat tartalmaznak, beleértve a szinonimát, az antonimiát és a hipernímiát. A magas szemantikai kapcsolat ellenére úgy találjuk, hogy egy felügyelt osztályozó 70%-os pontossággal megkülönbözteti a mondat módosított változatát az eredeti változattól. Egy emberi jegyzetelési tanulmányban megfigyeljük, hogy a jegyzetelők a módosított mondatot hasonló teljesítményű "jobb változatként" azonosítják. Elemzésünk igazságos megállapodást mutat a kommentátorok között, amikor a felülvizsgálat folyékonyságát javítja. Ezzel szemben az egyéb lexikai-szemantikai kapcsolatokat magában foglaló főnévhelyettesítéseket gyakran ugyanolyan jónak tekintik, vagy hajlamosak nézeteltérést okozni. Bár ezek az eredmények a besorolási pontszámokban is tükröződnek, az eredmények összehasonlítása azt mutatja, hogy modellünk nem sikerül abban az esetben, amikor az emberek tényleges ismeretekhez vagy intuíciókhoz fordulhatnak a specifikus szintről.', 'el': 'Σε πόρους που επεξεργάζονται από την κοινότητα, όπως οι προτάσεις υπόκεινται σε αναθεωρήσεις σε καθημερινή βάση. Πρόσφατες εργασίες έχουν δείξει ότι οι βελτιώσεις που προκύπτουν με την πάροδο του χρόνου μπορούν να μοντελοποιηθούν υπολογιστικά, υποθέτοντας ότι κάθε αναθεώρηση συμβάλλει στη βελτίωση. Ρίχνουμε μια πιο προσεκτική ματιά σε ένα υποσύνολο τέτοιων αναθεωρήσεων, για το οποίο προσπαθούμε να βελτιώσουμε ένα υπολογιστικό μοντέλο και να επικυρώσουμε σε ποιο βαθμό ισχύει η υπόθεση ότι "αναθεωρημένη σημαίνει καλύτερο". Το υποσύνολο των αναθεωρήσεων που εξετάζονται εδώ είναι υποκαταστάσεις ουσιαστικών, οι οποίες συχνά περιλαμβάνουν ενδιαφέρουσες σημασιολογικές σχέσεις, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της συνώνυμης, της αντωνυμίας και της υπερνυμίας. Παρά την υψηλή σημασιολογική συσχέτιση, διαπιστώνουμε ότι ένας εποπτευόμενος ταξινομητής μπορεί να διακρίνει την αναθεωρημένη έκδοση μιας πρότασης από μια αρχική έκδοση με ακρίβεια κοντά στα 70%, λαμβάνοντας υπόψη το πλαίσιο. Σε μια ανθρώπινη μελέτη σχολιασμού, παρατηρούμε ότι οι σχολιαστές αναγνωρίζουν την αναθεωρημένη πρόταση ως την "καλύτερη έκδοση" με παρόμοια απόδοση. Η ανάλυσή μας αποκαλύπτει μια δίκαιη συμφωνία μεταξύ των σχολιαστών όταν μια αναθεώρηση βελτιώνει την ευχέρεια. Αντίθετα, οι υποκαταστάσεις ουσιαστικών που περιλαμβάνουν άλλες λεξικές-σημασιολογικές σχέσεις συχνά θεωρούνται εξίσου καλές ή τείνουν να προκαλούν διαφωνίες. Ενώ αυτά τα ευρήματα αντικατοπτρίζονται και στις βαθμολογίες ταξινόμησης, μια σύγκριση των αποτελεσμάτων δείχνει ότι το μοντέλο μας αποτυγχάνει σε περιπτώσεις όπου οι άνθρωποι μπορούν να καταφύγουν σε πραγματικές γνώσεις ή διαίσθηση σχετικά με το απαιτούμενο επίπεδο εξειδίκευσης.', 'ka': "საზოგადოებო რედაქტირებულ რესურსებში, როგორც wikiHow, წესები ყოველდღედ რედაქტირებულია. ახლა სამუშაო სამუშაო დამუშაობა, რომ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინება დროს შეიძლება მოდელურად იყოს კომპუტაციალურად, რომელიც ყოველ რედაქ ჩვენ უფრო კიდევ ვხედავთ ასეთი რედაქტირების სპესტეტი, რომელიც ჩვენ ვცდილობთ კომპუტაციალური მოდელის გაუკეთესოთ და გავაკეთესოთ თუ რამდენი განსაზღვრება, რომელიც `რედა აღმოჩნეთ რედაქტირების სპესტეტი აქ არის სახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახე ჩვენ ვიღებთ, რომ სემონტიკური კლასიფიკაცია შეუძლია განსხვავება სიტყვების რედაქტირებული ვერსიაზე, როდესაც 70%-ის გადარჩენა, როდესაც კონტექსტის შესახებ. ადამიანის ამოცანების სწავლაში, ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ ამოცანები განცნობენ რედაქტირებული სიტყვას როგორც `უკეთესი ვერსია' სწორესი გამოცნობით. ჩვენი ანალიზაცია აღმოჩნდება მარტივი შედგომარება, როდესაც რედაქტირება უფრო უფრო ფუნქცია. კონტრასტურად, სახელის შეცვლები, რომლებიც სხვა ლექსიკალური-სმენტიკური პირობების შეცვლების შეცვლები, ხშირად აღმოჩნდება, როგორც იგივეა კარგი, ან უნდა თუმცა ეს მონაცემები კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემებში გამოყენებულია, მონაცემების შემდგომარება ჩვენი მოდელის შეუძლებელია, თუმცა ადამიანები შეუძლებელია ფაქტური ცნობილებისთვის ან ინტეუ", 'it': 'Nelle risorse modificate dalla comunità come wikiHow, le frasi sono soggette a revisioni su base giornaliera. Recenti lavori hanno dimostrato che i miglioramenti risultanti nel tempo possono essere modellati computazionalmente, supponendo che ogni revisione contribuisca al miglioramento. Diamo un\'occhiata più da vicino a un sottoinsieme di tali revisioni, per le quali cerchiamo di migliorare un modello computazionale e convalidare in che misura l\'ipotesi che `rivisto significa meglio\' effettivamente regge. Il sottoinsieme delle revisioni qui considerate sono sostituzioni di sostantivi, che spesso coinvolgono interessanti relazioni semantiche, tra cui sinonimia, antonimia e ipernimia. Nonostante l\'elevata relazione semantica, troviamo che un classificatore supervisionato può distinguere la versione rivista di una frase da una versione originale con una precisione vicina al 70%, tenendo conto del contesto. In uno studio sull\'annotazione umana, osserviamo che gli annotatori identificano la frase rivista come la "versione migliore" con prestazioni simili. La nostra analisi rivela un accordo equo tra gli annotatori quando una revisione migliora la fluidità. Al contrario, le sostituzioni di sostantivi che coinvolgono altre relazioni lessico-semantiche sono spesso percepite come altrettanto buone o tendono a causare disaccordi. Mentre questi risultati si riflettono anche nei punteggi di classificazione, un confronto dei risultati mostra che il nostro modello fallisce nei casi in cui gli esseri umani possono ricorrere a conoscenze fattuali o intuizioni circa il livello richiesto di specificità.', 'ms': "In community-edited resources such as wikiHow, sentences are subject to revisions on a daily basis.  Kerja baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa peningkatan yang berasal dari masa boleh dipodelkan secara komputer, menganggap setiap revisi berkontribusi kepada peningkatan. Kami melihat lebih dekat pada subset revisi seperti ini, untuk yang kami cuba untuk meningkatkan model pengiraan dan sahkan berapa jauh asumsi bahawa `revisi bermakna lebih baik' sebenarnya memegang. The subset of revisions considered here are noun substitutions, which often involve interesting semantic relations, including synonymy, antonymy and hypernymy.  Walaupun hubungan semantik yang tinggi, kami mendapati bahawa pengklasifikasi yang diawasi boleh membezakan versi diubah kalimat dari versi asal dengan ketepatan yang dekat dengan 70%, apabila mempertimbangkan konteks. Dalam kajian anotasi manusia, kami memperhatikan bahawa annotator mengenalpasti kalimat yang diubah sebagai 'versi yang lebih baik' dengan prestasi yang sama. Analisis kami mengungkapkan perjanjian yang adil di antara pengannotator apabila revisi meningkatkan keseluruhan. Sebaliknya, penggantian nama yang melibatkan hubungan leksikal-semantik lain sering dianggap sebagai sama baik atau cenderung menyebabkan ketidaksetujuan. Sementara penemuan ini juga diperlihatkan dalam skor klasifikasi, perbandingan hasil menunjukkan bahawa model kita gagal dalam kes dimana manusia boleh menggunakan pengetahuan fakta atau intuisi mengenai tahap spesifik yang diperlukan.", 'lt': 'Bendrijos redakcijos ištekliuose, pvz., wikiHow, sakiniai kasdien persvarstomi. Neseniai atliktas darbas parodė, kad su tuo susiję patobulinimai laikui bėgant gali būti modeliuojami skaičiavimu, darant prielaidą, kad kiekviena peržiūra prisideda prie patobulinimo. Mes atidžiau pažvelgiame į tokių persvarstymų pogrupį, kuriame bandome patobulinti skaičiavimo model į ir patvirtinti, kiek iš tikrųjų galioja prielaida, kad persvarstytas reiškia geresnį. Šiuo atveju svarstomi peržiūrų pogrupiai yra pavadinimų pakeitimai, kurie dažnai apima įdomius semantinius santykius, įskaitant sinonimiją, antonimiją ir hipernimiją. Nepaisant didelio semantinio ryšio, manome, kad prižiūrimas klasifikatorius, atsižvelgdamas į aplinkybes, gali atskirti peržiūrėtą sakinio versiją nuo pradinės versijos, kurios tikslumas beveik 70 %. Žmogaus anotacijos tyrime pastebime, kad anotatoriai pažymi persvarstytą sakinį kaip "geresnę versiją" su panašiais rezultatais. Mūsų analizė atskleidžia teisingą anotatorių susitarimą, kai peržiūra pagerina lankstumą. Priešingai, pavadinimai, kurie apima kitus leksikalis-semantinius santykius, dažnai laikomi lygiai gerais arba gali sukelti nesutarimus. While these findings are also reflected in classification scores, a comparison of results shows that our model fails in cases where humans can resort to factual knowledge or intuitions about the required level of specificity.', 'mk': "Во ресурсите изменети од заедницата како wikiHow, речениците се предмет на ревизии секојдневно. Неодамнешната работа покажа дека резултатите на подобрувањата со текот на времето може да се моделираат со компјутација, претпоставувајќи дека секоја ревизија придонесува за подобрувањето. We take a closer look at a subset of such revisions, for which we attempt to improve a computational model and validate in how far the assumption that `revised means better' actually holds.  Подгрупата на ревизии кои се разгледани овде се заменици на именици, кои честопати вклучуваат интересни семантични односи, вклучувајќи синонимија, анонимија и хипернимија. И покрај високата семантична поврзаност, откриваме дека надгледуваниот класификатор може да ја разликува ревидираната верзија на реченицата од оригиналната верзија со точност близу 70 отсто, кога се зема во предвид контекст. In a human annotation study, we observe that annotators identify the revised sentence as the `better version' with similar performance.  Нашата анализа открива фер договор меѓу анотаторите кога ревизијата ја подобрува течноста. За разлика од тоа, замените на именици кои вклучуваат други лексикално-семантични односи честопати се сметаат за еднакво добри или имаат тенденција да предизвикаат несогласувања. И покрај тоа што овие откритија се рефлектирани и во оценките на класификацијата, споредбата на резултатите покажува дека нашиот модел не успева во случаите кога луѓето можат да користат фактично знаење или интуиции за потребното ниво на специфичност.", 'kk': 'wikiHow секілді қоғамдық өңдеу ресурстарда сөйлемелер күнделікті өзгертулерге тұрады. Жуырдағы жұмыс уақыт бойынша жақсартуларды есептеу үшін модельді өзгертуге болады. Әрбір редакциясы жақсарту үшін көмектесетін деп ойлап тұрады. Біз бұл редакциялардың бөлшегін жақын қарап көреміз. Бұл үшін компьютерлік үлгісін жақсарту және "редакциялау" деген үлгісінің қаншалығын жақсарту үшін қаншалығын тексеру әрекетін көр Мұнда қарайтын редакциялардың бөлігі - атау алмастырылуы. Бұл көбінде қызықты семантикалық қатынастар бар, синонимия, антоними және гипернима. Жоғары семантикалық қатынастығына қарай, бақылау классификаторы сұлбаның қайталанған нұсқасын 70% жақын жақсы нұсқасынан, есептеу үшін, түрінде сұлбаның қайталанған нұсқасын түсіндіре алады. Адам жаңарту зерттеулерінде, жаңартушылар жаңарту сөзді ұқсас істеу үшін "жақсы нұсқасы" деп анықтайды. Біздің анализиямыз жаңалықтарды жаңалықтардың арасындағы дұрыс түсініктемесін көрсетеді. Осылайша, басқа лексикалық-семантикалық қатынастар қатынастарының атауларының алмастырылуы көбінде жақсы деп ойлайды, немесе қатынастарының көбінде қатынастары болады. Бұл тапсырмалар және классификациялық нәтижелерінде көрсетілген болса, нәтижелерді салыстыру үшін, адамдардың тек білім не интузиялық деңгейінде қажетті мәліметтерге қарай алады.', 'mn': 'wikiHow гэх мэт нийгмийн өөрчлөгдсөн нөөц баялаг дээр өгүүлбэр өдөр тутамд шинэчлэл хийгддэг. Саяхан ажил нь цаг хугацаанд сайжруулсан сайжруулалт нь тооцоолон төлөвлөх боломжтой гэдгийг харуулсан. Бид эдгээр шинэчлэлүүдийн давхаргыг илүү ойролцоогоор харцгаая. Энэ нь тооцоололтын загварыг сайжруулж, харин "шинэчлэлтийн утгыг илүү сайн" гэдэг утгыг хэр хол шалгаж байна вэ? Энд бодож байгаа шинэчлэлүүдийн хэсэг нь нэр төрлийн шинэчлэлүүд юм. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн сонирхолтой семантийн харилцаа, синоним, антоними болон гиперним холбоотой. Жижиг хэмжээний холбоотой байдлаас гадна бид хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн хэлбэрийн хувилбарыг анхны хувилбараас 70% хүртэл хуваалцах боломжтой байна. Хүн төрөлхтний анзаарлын судалгаанд бид анзаарчид шинэчлэгдсэн үгийг илүү сайн хувилбар гэдгийг анзаарсан. Бидний шинжилгээ дахин шинжилгээ сайжруулах үед сэтгэл хөдлөлт дэвшүүлдэг хүмүүсийн тухай шударга нэгдэл илэрхийлдэг. Харамсалтай нь, бусад лексик-семантийн харилцаа холбогдох нэр нэр төрлийн орлуулалт ихэвчлэн сайн эсвэл тэгш байдлыг хүлээн зөвшөөрдөг. Эдгээр ололтууд мөн хуваарилалтын оноо дээр харьцуулагдсан ч, үр дүнг харьцуулахад хүмүүс хэрэгтэй тодорхойлолтын тухай үнэндээ мэдлэг эсвэл ойлголтын тухай бидний загвар алдагдахыг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'F’riżorsi editati mill-komunità bħall-wikiHow, is-sentenzi huma soġġetti għal reviżjonijiet kuljum. Ix-xogħol riċenti wera li t-titjib li jirriżulta maż-żmien jista’ jiġi mmudellat b’mod komputattiv, jekk wieħed jassumi li kull reviżjoni tikkontribwixxi għat-titjib. Aħna nħarsu aktar mill-qrib lejn subsett ta’ reviżjonijiet bħal dawn, li għalihom nippruvaw itejbu mudell komputattiv u nivvalidaw sa liema punt tinsab is-suppożizzjoni li “reviżjoni tfisser a ħjar” fil-fatt. Is-sottosett ta’ reviżjonijiet ikkunsidrati hawnhekk huma sostituzzjonijiet bl-ismijiet, li spiss jinvolvu relazzjonijiet semantiċi interessanti, inklużi sinonimja, antonimja u iperinimija. Minkejja r-rabta semantika għolja, isibu li klassifikatur superviż jista’ jiddistingwi l-verżjoni riveduta ta’ sentenza minn verżjoni oriġinali b’preċiżjoni qrib is-70%, meta jitqies il-kuntest. Fi studju ta’ annotazzjoni umana, a ħna nnotaw li l-annotaturi jidentifikaw is-sentenza riveduta bħala “verżjoni aħjar” bi prestazzjoni simili. L-analiżi tagħna turi qbil ġust fost l-annotaturi meta reviżjoni ttejjeb il-fluwenza. B’kuntrast ma’ dan, is-sostituzzjonijiet bl-ismijiet li jinvolvu relazzjonijiet lexikali-semantiċi oħra ta’ spiss jitqiesu bħala tajbin ugwalment jew għandhom it-tendenza li jikkawżaw nuqqas ta’ qbil. Filwaqt li dawn is-sejbiet huma riflessi wkoll fil-punteġġi tal-klassifikazzjoni, tqabbil tar-riżultati juri li l-mudell tagħna jonqos f’każijiet fejn il-bnedmin jistgħu jirrikorru għal għarfien fattwali jew intwizzjonijiet dwar il-livell meħtieġ ta’ speċifiċità.', 'no': 'I tilfellesskapsresular som wikiHow, er setningar subject to revisions on a daily basis. Nyleg har arbeidet vist at resultatet forbedringar over tid kan modelerast datamaskin, dersom kvar revisjon bidrar til forbedringen. Vi ser nærmere på ein subgruppe av slike revisjonar, som vi prøver å forbedra ein datamaskin modell og validera i kor langt forventinga som «reviserte» betyr betre. Underdelen av revisjonar som er betrakte her er substitusjonar som ofte involverer interessante semantiske forhold, inkludert synonym, antonym og hypernimum. Til tross av høg semantisk relasjon, finn vi at ein oversikt klassifiserer kan distisera den gjenopprette versjonen av eit setning frå eit originalt versjon med eit nøyaktig nær 70%, når konteksten skal brukast. I eit menneskelig notasjonsstudie observerer vi at annotatorar identifiserer den reviserte setninga som « bedre versjon » med liknande utvikling. Analysen vårt viser eit rett samtale mellom annotatorar når ein revisjon forbetrar flukt. I contrast, noun substitusjonar som involverer andre leksiske semantiske forhold blir ofte oppfatta som å vera like godt eller vanleg å føra til ulike forskjeller. Selv om disse finningane også er reflektere i klassifikasjonskolaren, viser eit sammenligning av resultat at modellen vårt mislukkast i tilfeller der menneske kan rekna til faktisk kunnskap eller intuisjonar om den nødvendige nivået for spesifikasjon.', 'ro': 'În resursele editate de comunitate, cum ar fi wikiHow, propozițiile sunt supuse revizuirii zilnice. Lucrările recente au arătat că îmbunătățirile rezultate în timp pot fi modelate computațional, presupunând că fiecare revizuire contribuie la îmbunătățire. Aruncăm o privire mai atentă asupra unui subset al unor astfel de revizuiri, pentru care încercăm să îmbunătățim un model computațional și să validăm în măsura în care este valabilă ipoteza că "revizuit înseamnă mai bine". Subansamblul reviziilor luate în considerare aici sunt substituțiile substantivelor, care adesea implică relații semantice interesante, inclusiv sinonimia, antonimia și hipernimia. În ciuda relației semantice ridicate, constatăm că un clasificator supravegheat poate distinge versiunea revizuită a unei propoziții de o versiune originală cu o precizie aproape de 70%, atunci când ține cont de context. Într-un studiu de adnotare umană, observăm că adnotatorii identifică propoziția revizuită ca fiind "versiunea mai bună" cu performanțe similare. Analiza noastră dezvăluie un acord corect între adnotatori atunci când o revizuire îmbunătățește fluența. În schimb, substituțiile substantivelor care implică alte relații lexico-semantice sunt adesea percepute ca fiind la fel de bune sau tind să provoace dezacorduri. În timp ce aceste constatări sunt reflectate și în scorurile de clasificare, o comparație a rezultatelor arată că modelul nostru eșuează în cazurile în care oamenii pot recurge la cunoștințe sau intuiții fapte despre nivelul necesar de specificitate.', 'ml': "വിക്കിഹോവിനെപ്പോലെ സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ ചിട്ടപ്പെട്ട വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ദിവസവും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതാ അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, സമയത്തിനുമുമ്പില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലം കണക്കൂട്ടിയോടെ  ഇത്തരം മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നോക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് മോഡല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടു ഇവിടെ വിചാരിക്കുന്ന മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമൊന്നുമല്ല, അതില്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ആശ്വാസകരമായ സെമാന്\u200dറിക ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന് അത്യുന്നതമായ സെമാന്\u200dറിക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം, നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് സംസാരിച്ച രേഖയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒര മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നുണ്ട്. 'നല്ല പതിപ്പ്' എന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇതുപോലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്രകൃതിയോടൊപ്പ നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഒരു നീതിപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ കരാര്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മാറ്റം വരുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d വ്യാജത് മറ്റുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്ന മറ്റുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് നല്ലതാണെന്നോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d  While these findings are also reflected in classification scores, a comparison of results shows that our model fails in cases where humans can resort to factual knowledge or intuitions about the required level of specificity.", 'so': "Xukummada ku saabsan heshiiska bulshada sida wikiHow waa in la beddeliyaa maalin walba. Shaqoda la soo dhowaaday waxay muuqatay in horumarinta waqtiga ka badan lagu sameyn karo xisaab, in beddelka mid kastaaba uu ku contributo horumarinta. Dhaqso waxaynu fiirinaynaa koob ka mid ah bedelka, kaas oo aynu isku daynaa in aan kordhino tusaale xisaab ah oo aan xaqiijinno sida aad u malaynayso in `laguugu soo beddelay ay ay tahay mid ka wanaagsan. Baaritaanka ka fiirsashada halkan waa mid aan la beddelin, kuwaas oo marar badan ku saabsan xiriirka suurtagalka ah, kuwaas oo ah sinonimo, antonimo iyo hypernymi. Inta kastoo la xiriira labada dhinac ee sareeya, waxaynu aragnaa in kooxaha ilaaliya uu kala sooci karo warqada la soo beddelay oo uu ka sooci karo warqad asalka ah oo si sax ah ugu dhow 70%, marka lagu xisaabo. Waxbarashada dhibaatada dadku waxaynu ka fiirinaynaa in dhibaatooyinku ay u aqoonsadaan hadalka la soo beddelay oo ay ku qoran yihiin `versiyaha ka wanaagsan'. Our analysis reveals a fair agreement among annotators when a revision improves fluency.  In contrast, noun substitutions that involve other lexical-semantic relationships are often perceived as being equally good or tend to cause disagreements.  Inta lagu fiiriyo dhamaanshahaas waxaa lagu fiiriyaa kooxaha fasaxa, tusaale ahaan resultiyada waxaa laga muujiyaa in modellkayagu uu baaqan karo xaaladaha ay dadku u ku dalban karo aqoonta runta ah ama fikradda la xiriira heerka gaarka ah ee loo baahan yahay.", 'pl': 'W zasobach edytowanych przez społeczność, takich jak wikiHow, zdania podlegają codziennym zmianom. Ostatnie prace pokazały, że wynikające z upływu czasu ulepszenia można modelować obliczeniowo, zakładając, że każda wersja przyczynia się do poprawy. Przyjrzymy się bliżej podzbiorowi takich rewizji, dla których próbujemy ulepszyć model obliczeniowy i zweryfikować, w jakim stopniu założenie "zmieniony znaczy lepiej" rzeczywiście obowiązuje. Podzbiór rozważanych tutaj rewizji to substytucje rzeczownika, które często wiążą się z interesującymi relacjami semantycznymi, w tym synonimią, antonimią i hipernimią. Pomimo wysokiego związku semantycznego, stwierdzamy, że nadzorowany klasyfikator może odróżnić zmienioną wersję zdania od wersji oryginalnej z dokładnością bliską 70%, biorąc pod uwagę kontekst. W badaniu adnotacji na ludziach obserwujemy, że adnotatorzy identyfikują zmienione zdanie jako "lepszą wersję" o podobnym wydajności. Nasza analiza ujawnia sprawiedliwą zgodę między adnotatorami, gdy rewizja poprawia płynność. Natomiast zastępstwa rzeczownika, które obejmują inne relacje leksykalno-semantyczne, są często postrzegane jako równie dobre lub mają tendencję do powodowania niezgodności. Podczas gdy odkrycia te znajdują odzwierciedlenie również w wynikach klasyfikacji, porównanie wyników pokazuje, że nasz model nie zawodzi w przypadkach, gdy ludzie mogą uciekać się do wiedzy faktycznej lub intuicji dotyczącej wymaganego poziomu specyfiki.', 'sv': 'I community-redigerade resurser som wikiHow revideras meningar dagligen. Det senaste arbetet har visat att resulterande förbättringar över tid kan modelleras beräkningsmässigt, förutsatt att varje revidering bidrar till förbättringen. Vi tittar närmare på en delmängd av sådana revideringar, för vilka vi försöker förbättra en beräkningsmodell och validera i hur långt antagandet att "reviderad betyder bättre" faktiskt håller. Underuppsättningen av revideringar som behandlas här är substantivsubstitutioner, som ofta involverar intressanta semantiska relationer, inklusive synonymer, antonymi och hypernymmi. Trots den höga semantiska relationen finner vi att en övervakad klassificerare kan skilja den reviderade versionen av en mening från en originalversion med en noggrannhet nära 70%, när man tar hänsyn till sammanhanget. I en human annotation studie observerar vi att kommentatorer identifierar den reviderade meningen som "bättre version" med liknande prestanda. Vår analys avslöjar en rättvis överenskommelse mellan kommentatorer när en revidering förbättrar flytningen. Däremot uppfattas substantiv substitutioner som involverar andra lexikal-semantiska relationer ofta som lika bra eller tenderar att orsaka oenigheter. Även om dessa resultat också återspeglas i klassificeringsresultat, visar en jämförelse av resultat att vår modell misslyckas i fall där människor kan tillgripa sakkunskap eller intuitioner om den erforderliga nivån av specificitet.', 'si': "විකිහෝ වගේ සම්මාජිකයෙන් සංපාදනය සඳහා සංපාදනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, වචන දවස් විසින් ප්\u200dරතිකාර අලුත් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ වෙලාවේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් පරිගණනය විසින් විසින් විසින් විසි අපි ඒ වගේ පරීක්ෂණයේ සම්බන්ධයක් බලන්න, ඒ වගේම අපි පරීක්ෂණ මදුල් එකක් හොයාගන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා ඒ වගේම 'පරීක්ෂණය' කියන්නේ හොඳයි ක මෙතන හිතන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවන් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන සැමැන්තික සම්බන්ධ විදියට නමුත් අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරුණාකාරයෙක් පුළුවන් වාර්තාවක් පරීක්ෂා කරලා වර මිනිස්සු කිරීමක් අධ්\u200dයානයක්, අපි බලන්නේ කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වාක්ය 'හොඳ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා සාධාරණ සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනව විරුද්ධයෙන්, අනිත් ලෙක්සිකාල් සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධතාවන් සම්බන්ධතාවන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නැති  මේ හොයාගන්න තියෙනවා වගේම විශේෂණ අවස්ථාවක් වලින්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් අසමත් වෙනවා කියලා, මිනිස්සුන්ට අවශ", 'ta': "விக்கிஎப்படி போன்ற சமூகத்தில் திருத்தப்பட்ட வளங்களில், வாக்குகள் ஒவ்வொரு நாளும் மீட்டமைக்கப்படும். Recent work has shown that resulting improvements over time can be modelled computationally, assuming that each revision contributes to the improvement.  நாம் இத்தகைய மாற்றங்களின் துணை பார்க்க முயற்சி செய்கிறோம் 'மீள்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று சரியாக இருக்கும் என்று நினைக்கிறோம். இங்கு கருதப்படும் மாற்றங்களின் துணை மாற்றங்கள் இல்லை, அது பெரும்பாலும் சுவாரஸ்யமான அர்த்தமான உறவுகளை சேர்க்கிறது, ஒத்திசைந அதிக பாதிப்பு இணைப்புகள் இருந்தாலும், கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பாளர் மீட்டப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தின் பதிப்பை முதல் பதிப்பிலிருந்து தெளிவாக 70% க்கு  மனித அறிவிப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் பார்க்க வேண்டும் என்று அறிவிப்பார்கள் மீட்டப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தை 'சிறந்த பதிப எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி ஒரு சரியான ஒப்பந்தத்தை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறது ஒரு மீள்தீர்ப்பு திறமையை மேம்படுத்த மாறாக, மற்ற லெக்சிக்சியல் பாதிப்பு உறவுகளுடன் சேர்க்கும் மாற்றங்கள் பெரும்பாலும் சரியாக இருக்கும் அல்லது வேறுபாடு While these findings are also reflected in classification scores, a comparison of results shows that our model fails in cases where humans can resort to factual knowledge or intuitions about the required level of specificity.", 'sr': 'U zajedničkim resursima kao što je wikiHow, rečenice se na svakodnevnoj osnovi predstavljaju revizijama. Poslednji rad pokazao je da rezultate poboljšanja tijekom vremena mogu biti modelirani na računalnom nivou, s obzirom da svaka revizija doprinosi poboljšanju. Pogledamo podskup takvih revizija, za koju pokušavamo da poboljšamo računalni model i potvrdimo u tome koliko daleko predpostavka da "revizirano znači bolje" zapravo drži. Podgrupa revizija koje se smatra ovde su zamjene imena, koja često uključuje interesantne semantičke odnose, uključujući sinonimu, antonimiju i hipernimu. Uprkos visokoj semantičkoj vezi, pronašli smo da nadzorni klasifikator može da razlikuje revidiranu verziju rečenice od originalne verzije sa tačnošću blizu 70%, kada uzima u obzir kontekst. U proučavanju ljudskih annotacija, primećujemo da annotatori identifikuju revidiranu rečenicu kao "bolju verziju" sa sličnim performancima. Naša analiza otkriva fer sporazum među annotatorima kada revizija poboljšava tečnost. U suprotnom, zamjene imena koje uključuju druge leksičke semantičke veze često se smatraju jednako dobrim ili često uzrokuju neslaganja. Iako su ovi nalazi takođe odraženi u klasifikacijskim rezultatima, usporedba rezultata pokazuje da naš model ne uspije u slučajevima u kojima ljudi mogu pristupiti činjeničnim znanjima ili intuicijama o potrebnom nivou specifičnosti.', 'ur': 'مجموعہ کے سمجھے ہوئے منابع میں جیسے wikiHow، جماعت روزانی کے ذریعے روزانی کے ذریعے موجود ہیں. اچھا کام دکھایا گیا ہے کہ موقع پر نتیجہ کی تغییرات کامپیوتروں سے موڈل کیے جاتے ہیں، اس کے مطابق کہ ہر تغییر تغییر تغییر کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتی ہے. ہم اس طرح کی نسبت کے ایک سوسٹ کو بہت زیادہ دیکھتے ہیں، جس کے لئے ہم ایک کمپیوٹریشن موڈل کو بہتر کرنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں اور کس طرح کی تصور کریں گے کہ „ریڈیٹ کی معنی بہتر ہے “. یہاں سمجھے جاتے ہیں ان کی سپٹیٹ نامی بدلنے والی ہے، جو اغلب دلچسپ سیمنٹی رابطہ میں شامل ہوتی ہے، جیسے سینونیمی، آنٹنیمی اور hypernymy. اچھی سیمنٹی رابطہ کے بغیر، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک نظارت والی کلیسائر ایک کلیسائر کی رابطہ کی نسخہ ایک اصلی نسخہ سے 70% کے نزدیک دقیق سے جدا کر سکتا ہے، جب سمجھ لیتے ہیں. ایک انسان کے اظہار کی مطالعہ میں، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ اظہار کرنے والوں نے ویسی طرح کے ساتھ "اچھی نسخہ" کو پہچان لیا ہے. ہماری تحلیل نے آزمائش کرنے والوں کے درمیان انصاف کا معاملہ ظاہر کیا ہے جب ایک تغییر تغییر اضافہ ہوتی ہے۔ بغیر اس کے، دوسری لکھی-سمantic رابطہ کے ساتھ دوسری رابطہ کی جایگزینی کا ذریعہ اکثر برابر اچھا ہے یا اختلاف کرنے کا ارادہ کرتا ہے. اگرچہ یہ نتائج کلاسیفوں میں بھی تفصیل کی جاتی ہیں، نتائج کا مقایسہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری نمودل کبھی ناکام ہوتی ہے جہاں انسان حقیقی علم یا بصیرت کی ضرورت کی سطح کے بارے میں غلط ہو سکتا ہے.', 'uz': 'WiiHow kabi jamiyatli tahrirlangan rasmlarda so\'zlar har kuni o\'zgarishga ruxsat beradi. Yaqinda ishni koʻrsatish mumkin, vaqtdan ko\'proq o\'zgarishlarni hisoblash mumkin, va har bir revision o\'zgarishni o\'zgartirishga qaytadi. Biz bunday o\'zgarishlarning bir guruhini ko\'rib chiqqamiz. Bu bilan biz kompyuterning modelini oshirishni istaysizki va "tahrirlash" haqida qanchalik yaxshi ma\'lumotga ega deb o\'ylaymiz. Bu yerda o\'ylangan taʼminlovlar tubi o\'zgarishlar emas. Bu yerda ko\'pincha qiziqarli semantik aloqalariga, synonymi, antonymi va hypernymi kabi. Koʻp semantik aloqalariga qarsak, boshqaruvchi darajadagi bir so\'zning oʻzgartirilgan versiyasini asl versiyadan 70%\'dan foydalanishi mumkin. Inson taʼminlovchi o\'qituvchida, biz taʼminlovchilar o\'zgartirilgan so\'zlarni "yaxshi versiyat" sifatida ko\'paytirish imkoniyatini anglatadi. Analysimizning taʼminlovchilarimiz taʼminlovchilar orasidagi muvaffaqiyatlarni oshirishda yaxshi heshimini ko\'rsatadi. Ikkinchi bo\'lsa, boshqa leksik-semantik munosabatlariga bog\'liq o\'zgarishlar ko\'pincha yaxshi ko\'proq o\'xshash bo\'lishi mumkin. While these findings are also reflected in classification scores, a comparison of results shows that our model fails in cases where humans can resort to factual knowledge or intuitions about the required level of specificity.', 'vi': 'Trong các tài nguyên được soạn thảo cộng đồng như wikiHow, các câu phạt phải được kiểm tra hàng ngày. Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã cho thấy những cải tiến tích cực có thể được mô hình hoá theo kinh nghiệm, giả sử mỗi cải cách đều góp phần cải tiến. Chúng tôi xem xét kỹ hơn một phần sau những phiên bản như vậy, chúng tôi cố gắng cải tiến một mô hình tính to án và xác nhận mức độ giả định "sửa đổi có nghĩa tốt hơn" thực sự nắm giữ. Các phiên bản tiếp theo xem xét ở đây là sự thay đổi danh từ, thường gồm các quan hệ theo ngữ nghĩa thú vị, đồng nghĩa, Antony và siêu Âm. Mặc dù quan hệ ngữ pháp cao cấp, chúng tôi thấy một người phân loại được giám sát có thể phân biệt phiên bản sửa đổi của một câu từ một bản bản gốc với độ chính xác gần 20071, khi cân nhắc tình hình. Trong một nghiên cứu ghi chú con người, chúng tôi quan sát rằng các nhà biên bản xác định câu sửa đổi là "phiên bản tốt hơn" với hiệu ứng tương tự. Phân tích của chúng tôi tiết lộ một thỏa thuận công bằng giữa các nhà biên niên khi một sự sửa đổi cải thiện thiện. Ngược lại, việc thay thế danh từ liên quan đến các mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ khác thường được cảm nhận là tốt bằng nhau hoặc có xu hướng gây ra bất đồng. Trong khi những kết quả này cũng được ghi lại trong điểm phân loại, một so sánh các kết quả cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta thất bại trong những trường hợp con người có thể sử dụng kiến thức hay nhận thức về mức độ đặc biệt cần thiết.', 'bg': 'В ресурсите, редактирани от общността, като например изреченията подлежат на ревизии ежедневно. Последната работа показва, че получените подобрения с течение на времето могат да бъдат моделирани изчислително, като се приеме, че всяка ревизия допринася за подобрението. Разглеждаме по-отблизо една подгрупа от такива ревизии, за които се опитваме да подобрим изчислителния модел и да валидираме доколко всъщност важи предположението, че "ревизирано означава по-добре". Поднаборът от ревизии, разглеждани тук, са заместители на съществителни, които често включват интересни семантични връзки, включително синоними, антоними и хипернимия. Въпреки високата семантична свързаност, откриваме, че надзорен класификатор може да разграничи ревизираната версия на изречение от оригиналната версия с точност близо 70%, когато се вземе предвид контекста. В проучване за анотация при хора наблюдаваме, че анотаторите идентифицират преработеното изречение като "по-добрата версия" със сходни показатели. Нашият анализ разкрива справедливо съгласие между анотаторите, когато ревизията подобрява плавността. За разлика от това заместванията на съществителните, които включват други лексикално-семантични взаимоотношения, често се възприемат като еднакво добри или са склонни да причинят разногласия. Въпреки че тези констатации са отразени и в класификационните оценки, сравнението на резултатите показва, че нашият модел се проваля в случаите, когато хората могат да прибягнат до фактически знания или интуиции за необходимото ниво на специфичност.', 'da': 'I fællesskabsredigerede ressourcer som wikiHow revideres sætninger dagligt. Seneste arbejde har vist, at resulterende forbedringer over tid kan modelleres beregningsmæssigt, hvis hver revision bidrager til forbedringen. Vi ser nærmere på en delmængde af sådanne revisioner, hvor vi forsøger at forbedre en beregningsmodel og validere i hvor langt antagelsen om, at "revideret betyder bedre" faktisk gælder. Undersættelsen af revisioner, der behandles her, er substantivsubstitutioner, som ofte involverer interessante semantiske relationer, herunder synonymi, antonymi og hypernymi. På trods af den høje semantiske relaterethed finder vi, at en overvåget klassificering kan skelne den reviderede version af en sætning fra en original version med en nøjagtighed tæt på 70%, når der tages hensyn til kontekst. I et menneskeligt annotationsstudie observerer vi, at kommentatorer identificerer den reviderede sætning som den `bedre version\' med lignende ydeevne. Vores analyse afslører en rimelig aftale mellem kommentatorer, når en revision forbedrer flydende. I modsætning hertil opfattes substantivsubstitutioner, der involverer andre leksikisk-semantiske relationer, ofte som værende lige så gode eller har tendens til at forårsage uenigheder. Selvom disse resultater også afspejles i klassificeringsscore, viser en sammenligning af resultater, at vores model mislykkes i tilfælde, hvor mennesker kan ty til faktisk viden eller intuitioner om det krævede niveau af specificitet.', 'nl': "In door de gemeenschap bewerkte bronnen zoals wikiHow, worden zinnen dagelijks herzien. Recent onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat resulterende verbeteringen in de loop van de tijd rekenkundig kunnen worden gemodelleerd, ervan uitgaande dat elke revisie bijdraagt aan de verbetering. We nemen een subset van dergelijke revisies nader onder de loep, waarvoor we proberen een computermodel te verbeteren en te valideren in hoeverre de veronderstelling dat 'herzien betekent beter' daadwerkelijk geldt. De subset van revisies die hier worden overwogen zijn substituties van zelfstandige naamwoorden, die vaak interessante semantische relaties omvatten, waaronder synoniem, antoniem en hypernymie. Ondanks de hoge semantische verwantheid, vinden we dat een begeleide classificator de herziene versie van een zin kan onderscheiden van een originele versie met een nauwkeurigheid dicht bij 70%, wanneer rekening wordt gehouden met context. In een menselijke annotatiestudie zien we dat annotatoren de herziene zin identificeren als de 'betere versie' met vergelijkbare prestaties. Onze analyse laat zien dat er een eerlijke overeenstemming is tussen annotatoren wanneer een revisie vloeiend werkt. Daarentegen worden substituties van zelfstandige naamwoorden die andere lexicaal-semantische relaties betreffen vaak gezien als even goed of hebben de neiging om meningsverschillen te veroorzaken. Hoewel deze bevindingen ook worden weerspiegeld in classificatiescores, toont een vergelijking van resultaten aan dat ons model mislukt in gevallen waarin mensen hun toevlucht kunnen nemen tot feitelijke kennis of intuïtie over het vereiste niveau van specificiteit.", 'hr': 'U zajedničkim resursima, poput wikiHow, kazne se na svakodnevnoj osnovi predstavljaju revizijama. Posljednji rad pokazao je da se rezultat poboljšanja tijekom vremena može modelirati računalno, s obzirom da svaka revizija doprinosi poboljšanju. Pogledamo podskup takvih revizija, zbog kojih pokušavamo poboljšati računalni model i potvrditi u tome koliko daleko predpostavlja pretpostavka da je "revizirana znači bolje", u stvari. Podgrupa revizija koje se smatra ovdje su zamjene imena, koja često uključuju interesantne semantičke odnose, uključujući sinonimu, antonimiju i hipernimu. Uprkos visokoj semantičkoj vezi, smatramo da nadzorni klasifikator može razdvojiti reviziranu verziju rečenice od originalne verzije s preciznošću blizu 70%, kada uzima u obzir kontekst. U ispitivanju ljudskih annotacija, primećujemo da annotatori identificiraju revidiranu rečenicu kao \'bolju verziju\' s sličnim učinkom. Naša analiza otkriva fer sporazum među annotatorima kada revizija poboljšava tekućinu. Za suprotno, zamjene imena koje uključuju druge leksičke-semantičke odnose često se smatraju jednako dobrim ili često uzrokuju neslaganja. Iako se ovi nalazi također odražavaju u klasifikacijskim rezultatima, usporedba rezultata pokazuje da naš model ne uspije u slučajevima u kojima ljudi mogu pristupiti činjeničnim znanjima ili intuicijama o potrebnoj razini specifičnosti.', 'de': 'In gemeinschaftlich bearbeiteten Ressourcen wie wikiHow werden Sätze täglich überarbeitet. Neuere Arbeiten haben gezeigt, dass sich daraus resultierende Verbesserungen im Laufe der Zeit rechnerisch modellieren lassen, vorausgesetzt, dass jede Revision zur Verbesserung beiträgt. Wir werfen einen genaueren Blick auf eine Teilmenge solcher Revisionen, für die wir versuchen, ein Rechenmodell zu verbessern und zu validieren, inwieweit die Annahme, dass "revidiert bedeutet besser" tatsächlich zutrifft. Die Untermenge der hier betrachteten Revisionen sind Substitutionen von Substantiven, die oft interessante semantische Beziehungen beinhalten, einschließlich Synonymie, Antonymie und Hypernymie. Trotz der hohen semantischen Verwandtschaft stellen wir fest, dass ein überwachter Klassifikator die überarbeitete Fassung eines Satzes unter Berücksichtigung des Kontexts mit einer Genauigkeit von 70% von einer Originalfassung unterscheiden kann. In einer menschlichen Annotationsstudie beobachten wir, dass Annotatoren den überarbeiteten Satz als die "bessere Version" mit ähnlicher Leistung identifizieren. Unsere Analyse zeigt eine faire Übereinstimmung zwischen Annotatoren, wenn eine Revision die Fließfähigkeit verbessert. Im Gegensatz dazu werden Substitutionen, die andere lexikalisch-semantische Beziehungen einbeziehen, oft als gleich gut wahrgenommen oder führen zu Meinungsverschiedenheiten. Während sich diese Erkenntnisse auch in Klassifikationswerten widerspiegeln, zeigt ein Vergleich der Ergebnisse, dass unser Modell in Fällen scheitert, in denen Menschen auf Sachwissen oder Intuitionen über die erforderliche Spezifität zurückgreifen können.', 'id': "Dalam sumber daya edit komunitas seperti wikiHow, kalimat subjek untuk revisi setiap hari. Pekerjaan baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa peningkatan yang berasal dari waktu dapat dipodelkan secara komputasional, berasumsi bahwa setiap revisi berkontribusi untuk peningkatan. We take a closer look at a subset of such revisions, for which we attempt to improve a computational model and validate in how far the assumption that `revised means better' actually holds.  Subset revisi yang dianggap di sini adalah substitusi nama, yang sering melibatkan hubungan semantis yang menarik, termasuk sinonimi, antonimi dan hipernimi. Meskipun hubungan semantis tinggi, kami menemukan bahwa klasifikasi yang diawasi dapat membedakan versi reviderasi kalimat dari versi asli dengan akurasi dekat 70%, ketika mempertimbangkan konteks. Dalam sebuah studi anotasi manusia, kami mengamati bahwa annotator mengidentifikasi kalimat yang diubah sebagai 'versi yang lebih baik' dengan prestasi yang sama. Analisis kami mengungkapkan kesepakatan yang adil di antara annotator ketika revisi meningkatkan keterbatasan. Sebaliknya, substitusi nama yang melibatkan hubungan lexik-semantis lain sering dianggap sama baik atau cenderung menyebabkan ketidaksetujuan. Sementara penemuan ini juga terrefleksi dalam skor klasifikasi, perbandingan hasil menunjukkan bahwa model kita gagal dalam kasus dimana manusia dapat menggunakan pengetahuan faktual atau intuisi tentang tingkat spesifik yang diperlukan.", 'ko': "wikiHow 등 커뮤니티 편집 자원에서 문장은 매일 수정된다.최근의 작업에 따르면 시간의 추이에 따라 발생하는 개선은 계산 모델링을 통해 매번 수정될 때마다 개선에 도움이 된다고 가정할 수 있다.우리는 이러한 수정된 서브집합을 더욱 자세하게 연구했고 계산 모델을 개선하고'수정이 더 좋다'는 가설이 어느 정도 실제적으로 성립되었는지 검증하고자 했다.여기서 고려한 수정자집은 명사 교체로 동의어, 반의어, 초의어를 포함한 재미있는 의미 관계를 포함한다.비록 매우 높은 의미 관련성이 있지만 우리는 상하문을 고려한 상황에서 감독분류기는 70%에 가까운 정확도로 문장의 수정판과 원시판을 구분할 수 있음을 발견했다.인류 주석 연구에서 우리는 주석자가 수정된 문장을 유사한 성능을 가진'더 좋은 버전'으로 식별하는 것을 관찰했다.우리의 분석에 의하면 수정이 유창성을 높였을 때 주석자 간에 공평한 일치가 이루어졌다고 한다.그에 비해 다른 어휘의 의미 관계와 관련된 명사 교체는 일반적으로 똑같이 좋거나 의견 차이를 일으키는 경향이 있다.이러한 발견도 분류분수에 반영되지만 결과에 대한 비교에 따르면 우리의 모델은 인류가 필요로 하는 특이성 수준에 대한 사실 지식이나 직감에 도움을 청할 수 있는 상황에서 실패한다.", 'sw': "Katika rasilimali zilizohaririwa kwa jamii kama vile wikiHow, hukumu zinakabiliwa na mabadiliko ya kila siku. Kazi ya hivi karibuni imeonyesha kwamba matokeo ya maboresho zaidi ya muda unaweza kuchukuliwa kwa hisabu, na kudhani kuwa kila upya unachangia maboresho. Tunaangalia kwa karibu kiungo cha mabadiliko haya, ambapo tunajaribu kuboresha mifano ya kompyuta na kuhakikisha kwa kiasi gani dhana ya 'iliyobadilikwa' inamaanisha vizuri zaidi' inavyoshikiliwa. Makala ya mabadiliko yaliyochukuliwa hapa hayana mabadiliko, ambayo mara nyingi huhusisha mahusiano ya kimapenzi yanayovutia, ikiwa ni pamoja na synonyoni, antonyoni na ukarimu. Pamoja na uhusiano mkubwa wa kimapenzi, tunagundua kuwa mwangalizi aliyetawala anaweza kutofautisha toleo la hukumu lililobadilika kutokana na toleo la awali na uhakika wa karibu asilimia 70, wakati akichukua muktadha. Katika utafiti wa matangazo ya binadamu, tunaona kwamba wachochezi wanatambua hukumu hiyo iliyopitishwa kama ‘toleo bora’ kwa utendaji huo. Our analysis reveals a fair agreement among annotators when a revision improves fluency.  Tofauti na hilo, mabadiliko yasiyo na maana yanayohusisha mahusiano mengine ya kisaikolojia mara nyingi yanaonekana kuwa ni vizuri au huenda kusababisha tofauti. Wakati matokeo haya pia yanaonyesha katika vipindi vya kutangaza, ukilinganishwa na matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu haushindwa katika kesi ambapo binadamu wanaweza kutumia maarifa au uelewa halisi kuhusu kiwango kinachohitajika cha mahsusi.", 'tr': "wikiHow ýaly jemgyýetde düzenlenen çeşmelerde cümleler günde wersiýa taýýarlanýar. Ýakynda wagtyň aşagynda täzelikleriň ulalyşygyny bilýän bilýändigini görkezildi, her wersiýa gelişmelere kömekleşer diýip pikir eden. Biz beýle bir wersiýanyň subünsüne bir seredip görýäris. Şonuň üçin bir sanat nusgasyny gowurak diýip barýarys. Bu ýerde pikir edilen wersiýalaryň toparynda möhüm ýerleşmeleridir. Köplenç hem gyzykly semantik baglaşyklary hem synonymy, antonimi we hipernimi bar. Yüksek semantik baglanyşyk bilen, üstlenen klasifikatçy bir sözläniň revisiýatlygyny original wersiýadan 70% ýakyn derejesi bilen çykyp biler diýip pikir edýäris. İnsanlaryň duýdurma öwrenmesinde, nusgalanlaryň çykyşyny meňzeş bir şekilde 'gowy wersiýa' diýip tanyýandygyny gözleýäris. Analizimiz, bir yenilenme gücünü geliştirdiğinde anlatıcılar arasında adil bir anlaşma gösterir. Gerçekten, başga bir leşik-semantik ilişkileri hemişe eşit bir şekilde göz önüne getirilýär ýa-da boşluşyklara sebep edip bilýär. Bu aramalar klasifikasyon noktalarına da gösterilirken, neticelerimizin karşılaştırması gösteriyor ki, insanların gerekli seviyede gerçek bilgi ya da düşünceleri gerçek bir şekilde yaratabileceğini ve gerçek bilim ve düşüncelerimizi sağlayabileceğini gösteriyor.", 'af': "In gemeenskap-redigeerde hulpbronne soos wikiHow, is sê onderwerp na hersienings op 'n daglike basis. Onlangse werk het vertoon dat resultateerde verbeteringe oor tyd kan rekenaarsief modelleer word, omdat elke hersiening bydra tot die verbetering. Ons neem 'n nader kyk na 'n subartikel van sodanige hersienings, waarvan ons probeer om 'n rekenaar model te verbeter en te geldigheid in hoe ver die aanvaar dat 'hersien beteken beter' eintlik hou. Die subartikel van hersienings wat hier aangesien is noume substitusies, wat dikwels interessante semantiese verhoudings insluitend sinoniem, antonym en hypernimum. Ons vind, alhoewel die hoë semantiese verpligtigheid, dat 'n ondersoekte klassifiseerder kan die herversiseerde weergawe van 'n teiken van 'n oorspronklike weergawe met 'n presies naby 70%, wanneer konteks in rekening neem. In 'n menslike annotasie studie, ons aanhou dat annotators die hervergroot seting identifiseer as die `beter weergawe' met vergelyke prestasie. Ons analisie openbaar 'n regverdige ooreenkoms onder annotators wanneer 'n hersiening fluiditeit verbeter. In contrast, noun substitutions that involve other lexical-semantic relationships are often perceived as being equally good of tend to cause disagreements. Alhoewel hierdie gevinde ook in klasifikasie telling reflekteer word, vertoon 'n vergelyking van resultate dat ons model misluk in geval waar mense kan die faktiese kennis of intuiasies van die benodige vlak van spesifiekheid kan reken.", 'fa': 'در منابع تغییر اجتماعی مانند ویکیهو، جمله\u200cها بر اساس یک روزی تغییر داده می\u200cشوند. کارهای اخیرا نشان داده است که توسعه\u200cهای پیشرفت در طول زمان می\u200cتوانند به صورت محاسبه\u200cی محاسبه\u200cها نموده شوند، با فرض اینکه هر تغییر به بهترین توسعه می\u200cدهد. ما به یک زیر تغییرات نزدیک تر نگاه می کنیم که برای آن تلاش می کنیم که یک مدل محاسباتی را بهتر کنیم و تصدیق کنیم که چقدر دور از حدس می گیریم که «تغییرات معنی بهتر» در واقع دارد. زیر تغییرات که در اینجا فکر می\u200cکنند جایگزینی اسم هستند که اغلب رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی جالب است، شامل تغییرات سینونیمی، آنتونی و هیپرنیمی است. با وجود ارتباط طبیعی بالا، پیدا می\u200cکنیم که یک راهنمایی نظارت شده می\u200cتواند نسخه\u200cی تغییر داده شده\u200cی یک جمله از نسخه اصلی با دقیق نزدیک به ۷۰ درصد جدا کند، زمانی که موضوع را به حساب گرفته می\u200cشود. در یک مطالعه اخطار انسان، مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که اخطار\u200cکننده\u200cها این جمله را به عنوان «نسخه بهتر» با عملکرد مشابه شناسایی می\u200cکنند. تحليل ما موافقت عادلانه بين آشنايي\u200cکننده\u200cها رو نشون ميده وقتي يه تغيير فعاليت رو بهتر ميکنه بر خلاف این، جایگزینه\u200cهای اسم که در رابطه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و semantic دیگر مشترک می\u200cشوند، اغلب به عنوان یک برابر خیر می\u200cشوند یا به عنوان اتفاقی می\u200cافتند. در حالی که این نتیجه\u200cها همچنین در امتیاز\u200cهای مختصری تفسیر می\u200cشوند، مقایسه نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما در موارد\u200cهایی که انسانها می\u200cتوانند به دانش حقیقی یا بصیرت\u200cهای درباره سطح خاص نیاز دارند شکست خورد.', 'am': 'እንደwikiHow ባለ ማኅበረሰብ ሀብት፣ ፍርዱ ዕለት ዕለት ዕለቱ በመጥረት ይገናኛል፡፡ የአሁኑ ስራ በጊዜው ላይ ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲደረግ በቁጥጥር ማድረግ እንዲችል ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ ተሳታፊዎች አካባቢ እናየዋለን፡፡ ወደዚህ የተመለከቱት ውጤቶች የተለየ ውጤቶች ናቸው፡፡ ከፍተኛ የsemantic ግንኙነት ቢሆንም፣ በተመለከተው ክፍል የተደረገውን ጽሑፍ ከአሁን ጀምሮ ክፍል ከ70 በመቶ የሚያህል ቁጥጥር ሲያስፈልግ እናስባለን፡፡ በሰው ማስታወቂያ ትምህርት ውስጥ፣ ማስታወቂዎቹ የተመለሱትን ፍርድ ‹የተሻለ መልዕክት› በሚያረጋግጡ እንደሆነ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ትምህርታችን የአሳቃሚዎች መካከል ጥሩ ተስማምነት በሚያሳድጉ ጊዜ ነው፡፡ በተለይ፣ ሌሎችን የሌክሲካዊ ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልገው ምርጫዎች ብዛት መልካም ወይም ተቃውሞ ማድረግ እንደሆነ አይታወቁም፡፡ እነዚህም ፍጥረቶች በተለያዩ ሁኔታ ላይ ሲመለከቱ፣ ፍሬዎቹ ምሳሌ በሚያሳየው ሰው በተፈለገው እውቀት ወይም እውቀት የሚያስፈልገውን አካሄድ በሚችሉበት ወቅት ሞዴላታችን ይጎድላል፡፡', 'sq': "Në burimet e edituara nga komuniteti të tilla si wikiHow, fjalët janë subjekte për revizione në një bazë të përditshme. Puna e fundit ka treguar se përmirësimet që rezultojnë me kalimin e kohës mund të modelohen kompjuterikisht, duke supozuar se çdo revizion kontribuon në përmirësim. Ne shikojmë më afër një nëngrup të këtyre revizioneve, për të cilat ne përpiqemi të përmirësojmë një model llogaritës dhe të vlerësojmë sa larg mban supozimi se `revizuar do të thotë më mirë' në fakt. Njëgrupi i revizioneve që konsiderohen këtu janë zëvendësime emrash, që shpesh përfshijnë marrëdhënie semantike interesante, duke përfshirë sinoniminë, antoniminë dhe hiperniminë. Megjithë lidhjen e lartë semantike, ne gjejmë se një klasifikues i mbikqyrur mund të dallojë versionin e revizuar të një fjalie nga një version origjinal me një saktësi afër 70%, kur merr parasysh kontekstin. Në një studim komentimi njerëzor, ne vëzhgojmë se anotatorët identifikojnë fjalën e revizuar si `versionin më të mirë' me performancë të ngjashme. Analiza jonë zbulon një marrëveshje të drejtë midis anotatorëve kur një revizion përmirëson fluencën. Në ndryshim, zëvendësimet e emrave që përfshijnë marrëdhënie të tjera leksiko-semantike shpesh konsiderohen si të jenë njëlloj të mira apo kanë tendencë të shkaktojnë mosmarrëveshje. Ndërsa këto gjetje pasqyrohen gjithashtu në rezultatet e klasifikimit, një krahasim i rezultateve tregon se modeli ynë dështon në rastet ku njerëzit mund të përdorin njohuri faktike apo intuita rreth nivelit të kërkuar të specificitetit.", 'hy': "Ինչպիսի համայնքի խմբագրված ռեսուրսներում, ինչպիսիք են WiKi-ն, նախադասությունները ամենօրյա վերանայման ենթարկվում են: Վերջին աշխատանքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ժամանակի ընթացքում արդյունքում առաջացած բարելավումները կարող են հաշվարկներով մոդելավորվել, ենթադրելով, որ յուրաքանչյուր վերանայման ներդրում է բարելավման վրա: We take a closer look at a subset of such revisions, for which we attempt to improve a computational model and validate in how far the assumption that `revised means better' actually holds.  Այստեղ հաշվի առնելու ենթախումբը անվանումների փոխարինություններ են, որոնք հաճախ ներառում են հետաքրքիր սեմանտիկ հարաբերություններ, ներառյալ սինոնիմիա, անտոնիմիա և հիպերնիմիա: Չնայած բարձր սեմանտիկ հարաբերություններին, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ վերահսկված դասակարգիչը կարող է տարբերել նախադասության վերականգնված տարբերակը սկզբնական տարբերակից 70 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ հաշվի առնելով կոնտեքստը: Մարդկային նոտացիայի ուսումնասիրության մեջ մենք նկատում ենք, որ նոտատորները հայտնաբերում են վերափոխված նախադասությունը որպես «ավելի լավ տարբերակ» նման արտադրողություններով: Մեր վերլուծությունը բացահայտում է նշումների միջև ազնիվ համաձայնություն, երբ վերլուծությունը բարելավում է հեշտությունը: In contrast, noun substitutions that involve other lexical-semantic relationships are often perceived as being equally good or tend to cause disagreements.  Մինչդեռ այս հայտնաբերությունները նույնպես արտացոլվում են դասակարգման գնահատականներում, արդյունքների համեմատությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը ձախողվում է այն դեպքերում, երբ մարդիկ կարող են օգտագործել փաստացի գիտելիքներ կամ ինտուիցիաներ, որոնք հարկավոր", 'az': 'wikiHow kimi toplum düzenli kaynaqlarda cümlələr günlük tərzdə yenilənmələrə layiqdir. Son işlər zamanında müxtəlif düzəltmələrin nəticəsi kimi hesablama modelləşdirilməsini göstərdi. Hər dəyişiklik yaxşılıqlara kömək edir. Biz böyük dəyişikliklərin subgrupuna daha yaxınlaşdırırıq, buna görə hesap modelini daha yaxınlaşdırmaq və təsdiqləmək üçün `revised means better\' vasitəsilə nə qədər uzaqlaşdığını güman edirik. Burada düşünüldüyünüz yenilənmələrin dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləridir. Bunlar sık-sıq maraqlı semantik ilişkileri, sinonimi, antonimi və hipernimi dahil edərlər. Yüksek semantik bağlılığı baxmayaraq, gözlənilmiş klasifikatçının yenilənmiş cümlənin versiyonunu 70%-nin yaxın bir versiyasından ayırd edə biləcəyini görürük. İnsanların məlumatları təhsil edilməsində, bu məlumatların "daha yaxşı versiyonu" kimi yenilənmiş cümləni bənzər performans kimi tanıdıqlarını görürük. Bizim analizimiz bir dəyişiklik fəaliyyəti daha yaxşılaşdırdığı zaman annotatorlar arasında ədalətli bir anlaşma göstərir. Əksinə, başqa dil-semantik ilişkileri ilə birlikdə istifadə edən adlı dəyişikliklər çox yaxşı və ya müqavilə olaraq görünərlər. Bu tapındıqlar da klasifikasyon qiymətlərində təşkil edilirsə də, sonuçların qarşılaşdırması göstərir ki, modellərimiz, insanların həqiqət bilgi və təşkil müəyyənləşdirilməsi haqqında gerçək səviyyə haqqında istifadə edə biləcəyi məsələlərdə xətası', 'bn': 'সম্প্রদায়ের সম্পাদনা সম্পাদনার সম্পদ যেমন উইকিউডিও, প্রতিদিনের ভিত্তিতে শাস্তি পরিবর্তন করা হয়। সাম্প্রতিক কাজ প্রদর্শন করেছে যে সময়ের বেশী উন্নয়নের ফলে গণনাত্রিকভাবে মডেল করা যাবে, অনুমান করা যায় যে প্রত্যেক সংস্কারের আমরা এই পরিবর্তনের একটি বিভাগের দিকে কাছাকাছি তাকাই, যার জন্য আমরা একটি গণনাত্রিক মডেল উন্নত করার চেষ্টা করছি এবং কার্যকর করার চেষ্টা করছি এই ধারণার মধ্যে যে এখানে বিবেচনা করা হয়েছে সংস্কারের বিভিন্ন বিনিময় না, যা প্রায়শই কৌতূহলজনক সেমান্টিক সম্পর্কের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে সি উচ্চ সেম্বান্টিক সম্পর্ক সত্ত্বেও আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে একজন পর্যবেক্ষিত শ্রেণীবিভাষক একটি মূল সংস্করণ থেকে একটি সংস্করণ পার্থক্য করতে পারে যেখানে একটি প মানুষের বিস্তারিত গবেষণায় আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে শিক্ষার্থীরা সংশোধনের বাক্যের সাথে ‘ভালো সংস্করণ’ হিসেবে চিহ আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ একটি ন্যায় চুক্তি প্রকাশ করেছে যখন সংস্কারের প্রভাব উন্নত হয়। বিপরীতে, অন্যান্য লেক্সিকাল-সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্কের সাথে যুক্ত কোন প্রতিস্থাপন প্রায়শই ভালো হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হয় অথবা বি ক্লাস্ফিকেশন স্কোরে এগুলোর ফলাফল প্রতিফলিত হচ্ছে, ফলাফলের তুলনায় দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল ব্যর্থ হয়েছে যেখানে মানুষের প্রয়োজনীয় বিশেষ পর্য', 'bs': 'U zajedničkim resursima, poput wikiHow, kazne se na svakodnevnoj osnovi predstavljaju revizijama. Skorašnji rad pokazao je da se rezultat poboljšanja tijekom vremena može modelirati računalno, s obzirom da svaka revizija doprinosi poboljšanju. Pogledamo podskup takvih revizija, zbog kojih pokušavamo poboljšati računalni model i potvrditi u tome koliko daleko predpostavlja pretpostavka da "revizirano znači bolje" zapravo drži. Podgrupa revizija koje se smatra ovdje su zamjene imena, koje često uključuju interesantne semantičke odnose, uključujući sinonimu, antonimiju i hipernimu. Uprkos visokoj semantičkoj vezi, smatramo da nadzorni klasifikator može razdvojiti reviziranu verziju rečenice od originalne verzije sa preciznošću blizu 70%, kada uzima u obzir kontekst. U proučavanju ljudskih annotacija, posmatramo da annotatori identifikuju revidiranu rečenicu kao \'bolju verziju\' sa sličnim performancima. Naša analiza otkriva fer sporazum među annotatorima kada revizija poboljšava tekućinu. Za suprotno, zamjene imena koje uključuju druge leksičke semantičke odnose često se smatraju jednako dobrim ili često uzrokuju neslaganja. Iako se ovi nalazi također odražavaju u rezultatima klasifikacije, usporedba rezultata pokazuje da naš model ne uspije u slučajevima u kojima ljudi mogu pristupiti činjeničnim znanjima ili intuicijama o potrebnoj razini specifičnosti.', 'ca': 'En recursos editats per la comunitat com wikiHow, les frases són submetides a revisions diàries. La feina recent ha demostrat que les millors que resulten amb el temps es poden modelar computacionalment, suposant que cada revisió contribueix a l\'millora. Fem una ullada més atenta a un subconjunt d\'aquestes revisions, per a les quals intentem millorar un model computacional i validar fins a quin punt la suposició que "revisat significa millor" realment es manté. El subconjunt de revisions considerades aquí són substitucions de noms, que sovint impliquen relacions semàntiques interessants, incloent la sinonimia, l\'antonimia i l\'hipernimi. Malgrat l\'alta relació semàntica, trobem que un classificador supervisat pot distingir la versió revisada d\'una frase d\'una versió original amb una precisió propera del 70%, tenint en compte el context. En un estudi d\'anotació human a, observem que els anotators identificen la frase revisada com la "millor versió" amb resultats similars. La nostra anàlisi revela un acord juste entre els anotators quan una revisió millora la fluïtat. En canvi, les substitucions de noms que impliquen altres relacions lècsiques-semàntiques sovint es consideran igualment bones o tendeixen a causar desacordes. While these findings are also reflected in classification scores, a comparison of results shows that our model fails in cases where humans can resort to factual knowledge or intuitions about the required level of specificity.', 'cs': 'V komunitně editovaných zdrojích, jako je wikiHow, jsou věty denně revizovány. Nedávné práce ukázaly, že výsledná zlepšení v průběhu času lze modelovat výpočetně za předpokladu, že každá revize přispívá ke zlepšení. Podíváme se blíže na podmnožinu těchto revizí, pro kterou se snažíme zlepšit výpočetní model a ověřit, do jaké míry platí předpoklad, že "revidovaný znamená lepší". Podmnožinou revizí, které zde uvažujeme, jsou substituce podstatných jmen, které často zahrnují zajímavé sémantické vztahy, včetně synonymie, antonymie a hypernymie. Navzdory vysoké sémantické souvislosti zjišťujeme, že dohlížený klasifikátor dokáže při zohlednění kontextu odlišit revidovanou verzi věty od původní verze s přesností blízko 70%, při zohlednění kontextu. Ve studii lidské anotace pozorujeme, že anotátoři identifikují revidovanou větu jako "lepší verzi" s podobným výkonem. Naše analýza ukazuje spravedlivou shodu mezi anotátory, když revize zlepšuje plynulost. Naproti tomu substituce podstatných jmen, které zahrnují jiné lexikálně-sémantické vztahy, jsou často vnímány jako stejně dobré nebo mají tendenci způsobit neshody. Zatímco tato zjištění se odrážejí i v klasifikačních skórích, porovnání výsledků ukazuje, že náš model selhává v případech, kdy se lidé mohou uchýlit k faktickým znalostem nebo intuicím o požadované úrovni specificity.', 'et': 'Kogukonna redigeeritud ressurssides, nagu wikiHow, muudetakse lauseid igapäevaselt. Hiljutised tööd on näidanud, et sellest tulenevaid parandusi saab aja jooksul modelleerida arvutuslikult, eeldades, et iga parandus aitab kaasa parandusele. Vaatame lähemalt selliste paranduste alamhulka, mille puhul püüame täiustada arvutusmudelit ja valideerida, kui suures ulatuses eeldus, et "parandatud tähendab paremat" tegelikult kehtib. Siin käsitletavate versioonide alamhulk on substantiivsed asendused, mis hõlmavad sageli huvitavaid semantilisi seoseid, sealhulgas sünonüümia, antonüümia ja hüpernüümia. Vaatamata kõrgele semantilisele seosele leiame, et järelevalvega klassifitseerija suudab konteksti arvestades eristada lause muudetud versiooni algversioonist täpsusega ligi 70%. Inimeste annotatsiooniuuringus täheldame, et annotatorid tuvastavad muudetud lause sarnase jõudlusega parema versioonina. Meie analüüs näitab õiglase kokkuleppe annotatorite vahel, kui revisjon parandab sujuvalt. Seevastu teisi leksikaal-semantilisi seoseid hõlmavaid substantiivseid asendusi peetakse sageli võrdselt headeks või kipuvad põhjustama lahkarvamusi. Kuigi need leiud kajastuvad ka klassifitseerimisskoorides, näitab tulemuste võrdlus, et meie mudel ebaõnnestub juhtudel, kui inimesed saavad kasutada faktilisi teadmisi või intuitsioone vajaliku spetsiifilisuse taseme kohta.', 'fi': 'Yhteisömuokatuissa resursseissa, kuten wikiHowssa, lauseita tarkistetaan päivittäin. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että ajan mittaan saavutettuja parannuksia voidaan mallintaa laskennallisesti olettaen, että jokainen tarkistus edistää parannusta. Tarkastelemme lähemmin tällaisten tarkistusten osajoukkoa, jonka osalta pyrimme parantamaan laskennallista mallia ja validoimaan, missä määrin olettamus, että "tarkistettu tarkoittaa parempaa" todella pitää paikkansa. Tässä tarkastellaan substantiivikorvauksia, joihin liittyy usein mielenkiintoisia semanttisia suhteita, kuten synonyymiä, antonyymiä ja hypernyymiä. Korkeasta semanttisesta yhteydestä huolimatta huomaamme, että valvottu luokittelija pystyy erottamaan lauseen tarkistetun version alkuperäisestä versiosta lähes 70%:n tarkkuudella kontekstia huomioon ottaen. Ihmisillä tehdyssä huomautustutkimuksessa huomasimme, että huomautustajat tunnistavat tarkistetun lauseen "paremmaksi versioksi", jolla on samanlainen suorituskyky. Analyysimme osoittaa, että kommentoijien välillä vallitsee reilu yhteisymmärrys, kun tarkistus parantaa sujuvuutta. Sen sijaan substantiivikorvaukset, joihin liittyy muita sanasto-semanttisia suhteita, nähdään usein yhtä hyvinä tai aiheuttavat erimielisyyksiä. Vaikka nämä löydökset heijastuvat myös luokituspisteisiin, tulosten vertailu osoittaa, että mallimme epäonnistuu tapauksissa, joissa ihminen voi turvautua faktatietoon tai intuitioon vaaditusta spesifisyydestä.', 'jv': "Nang kaluwargane-perusahaan anyar komunitas, kaya ngono wiiki-njaluk, kaluwargane kapan kanggo ngubah versi sapa kut. section Awak dhéwé isih luwih beraksi lan akeh barêng-barêng resmi sing beraksi karo hal-barêng nggawe ngubah model komputer Yuta menehi perusahaan kelas kuwi nggunakake tarjamahan kanggo mbatalé urip, sing katêpakan karo perusahaan semanti sing dibenakno, gambar sinanié, antanié karo perusahaan. Nanging kabèh sematik kaluwargane gampang, kita anake kelas telas nêmên ngerasakno versi perusahaan winih dhéwé nggawe versi dadi aturan sing perusahaan kanggo kelas nêmên 75%, soalé sak kontèks entuk mên. Nang granatis anyong sing dadi, kita ngubah dhéwé ngerasakno dadi pawaran pangan kelas 'versi sing luwih' lan nganggep nggawe barang kelas. Ndeleksyon awak dhéwé éntuk akeh sing beraksi barêng-barêng wong liyane karo hal-bawih sing luwih apik dhéwé. Wurunggo, njuk-Wurunggo sapa urip sing wis ana karo perusahaan langgar lejih-semanti sing gak adhil nik akeh liyo sing luwih apik, ora bisa nguasai perusahaan langgar. Genjer-genjer saiki diuntingi puntuan langgar mlebu kelalakno, sampeyan karo model sing ngomong nik kuwi model sing gak bener tentang kanggo awak dhéwé iso nggawe ngerti perusahaan ono karo perusahaan ono langgar sapa-perusahaan ono", 'sk': 'V virih, ki jih ureja skupnost, kot je wikiHow, so stavki predmet dnevnih revizij. Nedavno delo je pokazalo, da je mogoče posledične izboljšave skozi čas modelirati računalniško, ob predpostavki, da vsaka revizija prispeva k izboljšanju. Podrobneje si ogledamo podmnožico takšnih revizij, za katere poskušamo izboljšati računalniški model in preveriti, v kolikšni meri dejansko velja domneva, da "revidirano pomeni bolje". Podskupina revizij, ki se obravnavajo tukaj, so nadomestitve samostalnikov, ki pogosto vključujejo zanimive semantične relacije, vključno s sinonimijo, antonimijo in hipernimijo. Kljub visoki semantični povezanosti ugotavljamo, da lahko nadzorovani klasifikator ob upoštevanju konteksta razlikuje revidirano različico stavka od izvirne različice z natančnostjo blizu 70%. V človeški študiji opombe opažamo, da opombe identificirajo revidirani stavek kot `boljšo različico\' s podobno zmogljivostjo. Naša analiza razkriva pošteno soglasje med opozorilci, ko revizija izboljša tekočost. Nasprotno pa se nadomestitve samostalnikov, ki vključujejo druge leksikalno-semantične odnose, pogosto dojemajo kot enako dobre ali povzročajo nesoglasja. Medtem ko se te ugotovitve odražajo tudi v klasifikacijskih ocenah, primerjava rezultatov kaže, da naš model ne uspe v primerih, ko se ljudje lahko zatečejo k dejanskim znanjem ali intuicijam o zahtevani stopnji specifičnosti.', 'ha': "Aka cikin dũkiyar da aka edita shi da jamii kamar wikiAi, gareshi za'a shige a koyau. Yi nuna aikin da ake ƙara yanzu ya nuna cewa masu gabatar da kyautatawa a lokaci, za'a iya motsar shi lissafi, kuma ana yi zaton, kõwane gusari yana ƙara wa improvement. Za mu dũba zuwa wani ƙari daga wannan musamman, don haka kuma muna jarraba ka kyautata wani misali na lissafi ko da tabbatarwa da za'a kiraɗa'a yana da mafiya alhẽri. Babu jujjarin da aka yi bincike a wannan, ba su zama masu musanyãwa ba, wanda yana mai amfani da danganci na semantiki, kamar sunonimi, antonimi da surori. Babu da tsari masu sarki, za'a gane cewa wani mai tsaron sigarin da aka tsare shi daga versiyori na farko, kuma yana da taƙaitacce zuwa 70%, idan an yi lissafi. Daga wani karatun mai sanarwa na mutum, Munã ganin cewa masu zartar da shi sun gane maganar da aka kure kamar `girmar mafi alhẽri' da mai kama da shi. AnalyyinMu ya bayyana wani makubalci mai kyau a tsakanin matalauta idan juya ya improve mafiya amfani. Kuma da sãɓãni, ko da yawa aka gane wasu mutane da ke haɗi da mazauni na leksikaki ko kuwa yana da daidai ko kuwa yana sami da rabo. Waka da waɗannan fassaran ana yi fanati cikin ko-nau'i na fassarar, misalin matsalar na nuna cewa misalinmu ya ɓace a cikin mazaɓa idan an iya iya amfani da mutane ga kunyar gaskiyar ko kalma masu buƙata.", 'he': 'במשאבים שעוררים על ידי הקהילה כמו wikiHow, המשפטים נותנים לשיקונים על בסיס יומי. העבודה האחרונה הראה שהשיפורים הנוצאים במהלך הזמן יכולים להיות מודל מחשבי, בהנחה שכל שיפור תורם לשיפור. אנו מסתכלים מקרוב על תחתונה של שינויים כאלה, עבור מה שאנחנו מנסים לשפר מודל מחשבי ולקבל כמה רחוק ההנחה ש \'שינוי משמעות טוב יותר\' למעשה מחזיק. התחלקת השיקויים הנחשבות כאן הן החליפים בשמות, אשר לעתים קרובות מעורבים יחסים סמנטיים מעניינים, כולל סינונימיה, אנטונימיה וההיפרנימיה. למרות היחסים הסמנטיים הגבוהים, אנו מוצאים שהקלאסיפור שמבוקח יכול להבדיל את הגרסה המעודדת של משפט מגרסה מקורית עם מדויקה קרובה ל-70%, כשלוקח בחשבון הקשר. במחקר ציונים אנושיים, אנו רואים שמציונים מזהה את המשפט המעודד כ"גרסה טובה יותר" עם ביצועים דומים. הניתוח שלנו חושף הסכם הוגן בין המכתבים כאשר שיפור משפר את השקט. בניגוד לזה, החליפים של שם שמעסקים מערכות יחסים לקסיקו-סמנטיות אחרות נראים לעתים קרובות כמו טובים באותה מידה או נוטים לגרום להסכמות. בעוד הממצאים האלה משקפים גם בתוצאות מסווג, השוואה של התוצאות מראה שמודל שלנו נכשל במקרים שבו בני האדם יכולים להשתמש בידע עובדי או אינטואיציה על רמה הנדרשת של ספציפיות.', 'bo': "ཚོགས་སྡེ་དང་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བྱས་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལྟར་wikiHow། འཕྲལ་གསོག་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་དུས་ཚོད་ལ་ཕར་རྒྱས་རྗེས་སུ་རྩིས་གཞི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་རྩིས་བ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་ཡོད་པ་དང་གསར་ ང་ཚོས་འདི་དག་གི་བསྐྱར་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་མིག་ཚན་གཅིག་ལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལྟ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་ཡིན་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་དང་བདེ་ར འདིར་བསྐྱར་ཞིབ་དག་གི་གོ་བ་དག་གི་ཚབ་བཅུག་ལ་མིན་འདུག Despite the high semantic relatedness, we find that a supervised classifier can distinguish the revised version of a sentence from an original version with an accuracy close to 70%, when taking context into account. In a human annotation study, we observe that annotators identify the revised sentence as the `better version' with similar performance. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་སྐབས་ལྟ་སྟངས་དཀྲོག་གཏོང་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་པ་ཞིག་ཤར དེ་ལས་ཕལ་ཚུར་ཕན་ཚུན་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་གི་བརྗོད་ཁང་ནི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཞན་ཞིག་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་ལྡན་དང་། སྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ཉུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚོར དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་ཚོ་ཡང་དབྱེ་བ་གྲངས་དང་མཐུན་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་བ་ཅིག་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Specializing Unsupervised Pretraining Models for Word-Level Semantic Similarity', 'ar': 'متخصصة في نماذج التدريب المسبق غير الخاضعة للرقابة للتشابه الدلالي على مستوى الكلمات', 'fr': 'Spécialisation de modèles de pré-apprentissage non supervisés pour la similitude sémantique au niveau des', 'pt': 'Especialização de modelos de pré-treinamento não supervisionados para similaridade semântica em nível de palavra', 'es': 'Modelos de preentrenamiento no supervisados especializados para similitud semántica a nivel de palabra', 'ja': 'ワードレベルセマンティック類似性のための監督されていない事前トレーニングモデルを専門とする', 'zh': '以字级语义相似性专用无监督预练模形', 'ru': 'Специализированные модели неконтролируемого предварительного обучения для семантического сходства на уровне слов', 'hi': 'Word-Level Semantic समानता के लिए असुरक्षित Pretraining मॉडल की विशेषज्ञता', 'ga': 'Speisialtóireacht ar Mhúnlaí Réamhoiliúint gan Maoirseacht do Chosúlacht Shéimeantach Leibhéal Focal', 'el': 'Εξειδικευμένα μη εποπτευμένα μοντέλα προετοιμασίας για τη σηματική ομοιότητα σε επίπεδο λέξης', 'ka': 'სიტყვების სემანტიკური სიმბოლოებისთვის სპექციალურება', 'kk': 'Сөздің деңгейінің семантикалық ұқсастыру үлгілерін өзгерту', 'it': 'Specializzazione di modelli di simulazione non sorvegliati per somiglianza semantica a livello Word', 'lt': 'Specializuoti nenorėtus žaidimo modelius žodžių lygio Semantiniam panašumui', 'mk': 'Specializing Unsupervised Pretraining Models for Word-Level Semantic Similarity', 'ms': 'Mengkhususkan Model Latihan Latihan Tidak Diatasi untuk Keadaan Semantik Aras-Kata', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പ്രിട്രെയിനിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-Ispeċjalizzazzjoni ta’ Mudelli ta’ Tħarriġ minn Qabel Mhux Sorveljati għal Similarità Semantika fil-Livell tal-Kliem', 'mn': 'Өөр хэмжээний Semantic Similarity-ын төлөвлөгөөс хадгалагдаггүй загваруудыг тодорхойлох', 'no': 'Spesifiserer ulike forskyvingsmodeller for semiantisk likning på ordnivå', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli előkészítő modellek speciális szövegszintű szemantikus hasonlósághoz', 'pl': 'Specjalizacja nienadzorowanych modeli wstępnego treningu dla podobieństwa semantycznego na poziomie słowa', 'ro': 'Specializarea modelelor de pretindere nesupravegheate pentru similaritatea semantică la nivel Word', 'sr': 'Специализирајући неподређени модели претења за семантичну прилику на речи ниво', 'si': 'වචන- තත්වය සමාන්තික සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සඳහා සුරක්ෂිත විශේෂ කරන්න', 'so': 'Isku xiriiraya Modelooyinka waxbarashada ee aan la ilaalinayn', 'sv': 'Specialisera oserviserade låtsasmodeller för semantisk likhet på ordnivå', 'ta': 'பார்க்கப்படாத முன்பயிற்சி மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'Word-Level Semantic Similarity کے لئے غیر قابل تحریرینگ موڈل کا ویژہ کیا جا رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Специализирани модели за предтрениране без надзор за семантична сходство на ниво дума', 'hr': 'Specializiranje neodržavanih modela pretvaranja za semantičnu sličnost na razini riječi', 'da': 'Specialisering ikke-overvågede foregivende modeller til semantisk lighed på ordniveau', 'nl': 'Specialiseren van onbeheerde pretraining modellen voor semantische gelijkenis op woordniveau', 'ko': '어급 의미 싱크로율의 무감독 예훈련 모델', 'de': 'Spezialisierung von unbeaufsichtigten Vortrainingsmodellen für semantische Ähnlichkeit auf Wortebene', 'tr': 'Keleme Seviye Semantik Similatçiliki üçin Taýdalanmamış Çikleme Modelleri', 'fa': 'ЩҲЫҢЪҳЩҮвҖҢШЁЩҶШҜЫҢ ЩҶЩ…ЩҲЩҶЩҮвҖҢЩҮШ§ЫҢ ШӘШәЫҢЫҢШұ ЩӮШ§ШЁЩ„ ШӘШәЫҢЫҢШұ ЩӮШ§ШЁЩ„ ШҙШЁШ§ЩҮШӘ ШіШ·Шӯ Ъ©Щ„Щ…ЩҮ', 'sq': 'Specializimi i modeleve të parastërvitjes pa mbikqyrje për ngjashmërinë Semantike në nivelin e fjalëve', 'sw': 'Kwa kuhusiana na Modela za Mafunzo ya Uwekezaji usiotangaliwa kwa ajili ya Usalama wa Kireno', 'af': 'Spesialisering Onondersteunde Pretraining Modelle vir Woord- Vlak Semantiese Ligging', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Specializing Unsupervised Pretraining Models for Word-Level Semantic Similarity', 'az': 'Söz-səviyyəsi Semantik Similarlığı üçün müəyyən edilməmiş Qıdırma Modelləri', 'bn': 'শব্দ- স্তরের সমতুল্যের জন্য অপারেশন করা অগ্রসর প্রেট্রেনিং মডেল বিশেষ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Specializiranje neodržavanih modela pretvaranja za semantičnu sličnost na nivou riječi', 'cs': 'Specializace nekontrolovaných modelů předškolení pro sémantickou podobnost na úrovni slova', 'ca': 'Specializing Unsupervised Pretraining Models for Word-Level Semantic Similarity', 'et': 'Spetsialiseerunud järelevalveta eeltreeningmudelid sõnatasemel semantse sarnasuse jaoks', 'fi': 'Erikoistuneet valvomattomat esikoulutusmallit sanatason semanttiseen samankaltaisuuteen', 'id': 'Spesialisasi Model Pretraining Tak Tersupervisi untuk Simulasi Semantik Tingkat Kata', 'he': 'Specializing Unsupervised Pretraining Models for Word-Level Semantic Similarity', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Specializirani modeli predvajanja brez nadzora za semantično podobnost na ravni besed', 'bo': 'Word-Level Semantic Similarity', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised pretraining models have been shown to facilitate a wide range of downstream NLP applications. These models, however, retain some of the limitations of traditional static word embeddings. In particular, they encode only the distributional knowledge available in raw text corpora, incorporated through language modeling objectives. In this work, we complement such distributional knowledge with external lexical knowledge, that is, we integrate the discrete knowledge on word-level semantic similarity into pretraining. To this end, we generalize the standard BERT model to a multi-task learning setting where we couple BERT’s masked language modeling and next sentence prediction objectives with an auxiliary task of binary word relation classification. Our experiments suggest that our Lexically Informed BERT (LIBERT), specialized for the word-level semantic similarity, yields better performance than the lexically blind vanilla BERT on several language understanding tasks. Concretely, LIBERT outperforms BERT in 9 out of 10 tasks of the GLUE benchmark and is on a par with BERT in the remaining one. Moreover, we show consistent gains on 3 benchmarks for lexical simplification, a task where knowledge about word-level semantic similarity is paramount, as well as large gains on lexical reasoning probes.', 'ar': 'وقد ثبت أن نماذج ما قبل التدريب غير الخاضعة للإشراف تسهل مجموعة واسعة من تطبيقات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية في المصب. ومع ذلك ، تحتفظ هذه النماذج ببعض القيود المفروضة على حفلات الزفاف التقليدية الثابتة. على وجه الخصوص ، يقومون فقط بتشفير المعرفة التوزيعية المتاحة في نصوص أولية ، مدمجة من خلال أهداف نمذجة اللغة. في هذا العمل ، نكمل هذه المعرفة التوزيعية بالمعرفة المعجمية الخارجية ، أي أننا ندمج المعرفة المنفصلة حول التشابه الدلالي على مستوى الكلمة في التدريب المسبق. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقوم بتعميم نموذج BERT القياسي على إعداد تعلم متعدد المهام حيث نجمع بين نمذجة لغة BERT المقنعة وأهداف توقع الجملة التالية مع مهمة مساعدة لتصنيف علاقة الكلمات الثنائية. تشير تجاربنا إلى أن "بيرت (Lexically Informed" (LIBERT) ، المتخصص في التشابه الدلالي على مستوى الكلمة ، ينتج أداء أفضل من "الفانيليا" BERT الأعمى في العديد من مهام فهم اللغة. بشكل ملموس ، يتفوق LIBERT على BERT في 9 من أصل 10 مهام لمعيار GLUE وهو على قدم المساواة مع BERT في المهمة المتبقية. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر مكاسب ثابتة على 3 معايير للتبسيط المعجمي ، وهي مهمة تكون فيها المعرفة حول التشابه الدلالي على مستوى الكلمة أمرًا بالغ الأهمية ، بالإضافة إلى مكاسب كبيرة في تحقيقات التفكير المعجمي.', 'pt': 'Modelos de pré-treinamento não supervisionados foram mostrados para facilitar uma ampla gama de aplicações de PNL downstream. Esses modelos, no entanto, mantêm algumas das limitações dos embeddings tradicionais de palavras estáticas. Em particular, eles codificam apenas o conhecimento distributivo disponível em corpora de texto bruto, incorporado por meio de objetivos de modelagem de linguagem. Neste trabalho, complementamos tal conhecimento distribucional com conhecimento lexical externo, ou seja, integramos o conhecimento discreto sobre similaridade semântica em nível de palavra no pré-treinamento. Para este fim, generalizamos o modelo BERT padrão para uma configuração de aprendizado multitarefa onde acoplamos a modelagem de linguagem mascarada do BERT e os objetivos de previsão da próxima sentença com uma tarefa auxiliar de classificação de relações binárias de palavras. Nossos experimentos sugerem que nosso BERT “Lexically Informed” (LIBERT), especializado para a similaridade semântica em nível de palavra, produz melhor desempenho do que o BERT “baunilha” lexicalmente cego em várias tarefas de compreensão de linguagem. Concretamente, o LIBERT supera o BERT em 9 das 10 tarefas do benchmark GLUE e está no mesmo nível do BERT no restante. Além disso, mostramos ganhos consistentes em 3 benchmarks para simplificação lexical, tarefa em que o conhecimento sobre similaridade semântica em nível de palavra é primordial, além de grandes ganhos em testes de raciocínio lexical.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los modelos de preentrenamiento no supervisado facilitan una amplia gama de aplicaciones de PNL posteriores. Sin embargo, estos modelos mantienen algunas de las limitaciones de la incrustación de palabras estáticas tradicionales. En particular, codifican solo el conocimiento distributivo disponible en los corpus de texto sin procesar, incorporados a través de objetivos de modelado del lenguaje. En este trabajo, complementamos dicho conocimiento distributivo con conocimiento léxico externo, es decir, integramos el conocimiento discreto sobre similitud semántica a nivel de palabra en el preentrenamiento. Con este fin, generalizamos el modelo BERT estándar a un entorno de aprendizaje multitarea donde combinamos el modelado de lenguaje enmascarado de BERT y los objetivos de predicción de la siguiente oración con una tarea auxiliar de clasificación de relaciones binarias de palabras. Nuestros experimentos sugieren que nuestro BERT (LIBERT) «Léxicamente informado», especializado en la similitud semántica a nivel de palabra, produce un mejor rendimiento que el BERT «vainilla» léxicamente ciego en varias tareas de comprensión del lenguaje. Concretamente, LIBERT supera a BERT en 9 de las 10 tareas del benchmark GLUE y está a la par con BERT en el resto. Además, mostramos ganancias consistentes en 3 puntos de referencia para la simplificación léxica, una tarea en la que el conocimiento sobre la similitud semántica a nivel de palabra es primordial, así como grandes ganancias en las pruebas de razonamiento léxico.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que les modèles de pré-entraînement non supervisés facilitent un large éventail d'applications de PNL en aval. Ces modèles conservent toutefois certaines des limites des intégrations de mots statiques traditionnelles. En particulier, ils encodent uniquement les connaissances distributionnelles disponibles dans les corpus de textes bruts, incorporés par le biais d'objectifs de modélisation linguistique. Dans ce travail, nous complétons ces connaissances distributionnelles par des connaissances lexicales externes, c'est-à-dire que nous intégrons les connaissances discrètes sur la similitude sémantique au niveau des mots dans la préformation. À cette fin, nous généralisons le modèle BERT standard à un environnement d'apprentissage multitâche dans lequel nous associons la modélisation du langage masqué du BERT et les objectifs de prédiction de phrase suivante avec une tâche auxiliaire de classification des relations de mots binaires. Nos expériences suggèrent que notre BERT «\xa0Lexically Informed\xa0» (LIBERT), spécialisé dans la similitude sémantique au niveau des mots, donne de meilleures performances que le BERT «\xa0vanille\xa0» lexiquement aveugle sur plusieurs tâches de compréhension du langage. Concrètement, LIBERT surpasse BERT dans 9 des 10 tâches du benchmark GLUE et se situe sur un pied d'égalité avec BERT dans la tâche restante. De plus, nous montrons des gains constants sur 3 points de référence pour la simplification lexicale, une tâche où la connaissance de la similitude sémantique au niveau des mots est primordiale, ainsi que des gains importants sur les sondes de raisonnement lexical.", 'ja': '無監督の事前トレーニングモデルは、幅広いダウンストリームNLPアプリケーションを容易にすることが示されています。 しかし、これらのモデルは、従来の静的単語埋め込みの制限の一部を保持しています。 特に、言語モデリングの目的を通じて組み込まれた生のテキストコーラで利用可能な分布知識のみをエンコードします。 この研究では、そのような分布知識を外部の語彙知識で補完し、つまり、語レベルの意味類似性に関する離散的な知識を事前訓練に統合します。 この目的のために、標準的なBERTモデルをマルチタスク学習設定に一般化し、BERTのマスク言語モデリングと次の文予測目標をバイナリワード関係分類の補助的なタスクと結合します。 私たちの実験では、単語レベルの意味の類似性に特化した「Lexically Informed」BERT （リバート）は、いくつかの言語理解タスクにおいて、語彙的に盲目的な「バニラ」BERTよりも優れたパフォーマンスをもたらすことが示唆されています。 具体的には、リバートはグルーベンチマークの10タスクのうち9タスクでBERTを上回り、残りのタスクではBERTと同等です。 さらに、単語レベルのセマンティック類似性に関する知識が最も重要なタスクである語彙単純化のための3つのベンチマークに一貫した利得を示し、語彙推論プローブにも大きな利得を示しています。', 'zh': '无监督预练模形已证可广进NLP用。 然留静词嵌局限性。 特以原始文本语料库中可用之分编码,并语言建模并。 以此观之,外词汇补之,亦谓吾将单词级语义相似性之离散整合预习之也。 是以推格BERT于多任务学,BERT屏言建模与下句占二元词类。 吾实验明"词汇知情"BERT(LIBERT)专用于单词级语义相似性,于数语解事,胜于词汇盲之"香草"BERT有善性。 LIBERT 于 GLUE 之 10 , 9 优于 BERT,余则当 BERT 。 此外,词汇简化之3,略见一益,此一单词语义相似性之至务,及词汇理究之巨益也。', 'hi': 'अनुप्रशिक्षित प्रीट्रेनिंग मॉडल को डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए दिखाया गया है। हालांकि, ये मॉडल पारंपरिक स्थैतिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग की कुछ सीमाओं को बनाए रखते हैं। विशेष रूप से, वे केवल कच्चे पाठ निगम में उपलब्ध वितरण ज्ञान को एन्कोड करते हैं, जिसे भाषा मॉडलिंग उद्देश्यों के माध्यम से शामिल किया गया है। इस काम में, हम बाहरी लेक्सिकल ज्ञान के साथ इस तरह के वितरण ज्ञान के पूरक हैं, अर्थात, हम शब्द-स्तर की शब्दार्थ समानता पर असतत ज्ञान को प्रीट्रेनिंग में एकीकृत करते हैं। इस अंत तक, हम मानक BERT मॉडल को एक बहु-कार्य सीखने की सेटिंग में सामान्यीकृत करते हैं जहां हम BERT के नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग और अगले वाक्य भविष्यवाणी उद्देश्यों को बाइनरी शब्द संबंध वर्गीकरण के सहायक कार्य के साथ जोड़ते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे "लेक्सिकली रूप से सूचित" BERT (LIBERT), शब्द-स्तर की शब्दार्थ समानता के लिए विशेष, कई भाषा समझने वाले कार्यों पर लेक्सिकली अंधे "वेनिला" BERT की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। ठोस रूप से, लिबर्ट गोंद बेंचमार्क के 10 कार्यों में से 9 में बर्ट को मात देता है और शेष एक में बर्ट के बराबर है। इसके अलावा, हम लेक्सिकल सरलीकरण के लिए 3 बेंचमार्क पर लगातार लाभ दिखाते हैं, एक ऐसा कार्य जहां शब्द-स्तर की शब्दार्थ समानता के बारे में ज्ञान सर्वोपरि है, साथ ही साथ लेक्सिकल तर्क जांच पर बड़े लाभ भी हैं।', 'ru': 'Было показано, что модели с неконтролируемым предварительным обучением облегчают широкий спектр последующих применений NLP. Однако эти модели сохраняют некоторые ограничения традиционных статических вложений слов. В частности, они кодируют только те дистрибутивные знания, которые имеются в корпусах необработанных текстов, включенных с помощью целей языкового моделирования. В этой работе мы дополняем такие дистрибутивные знания внешними лексическими знаниями, то есть интегрируем дискретные знания о семантическом сходстве на уровне слов в предварительное обучение. С этой целью мы обобщаем стандартную модель БЕРТА в многозадачную учебную среду, где мы соединяем моделирование языка БЕРТА в масках и цели предсказания следующего предложения со вспомогательной задачей классификации отношений двоичного слова. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наш «лексически информированный» БЕРТ (ЛИБЕРТ), специализирующийся на семантическом сходстве на уровне слов, дает лучшую производительность, чем лексически слепой «ванильный» БЕРТ при выполнении нескольких задач по пониманию языка. Конкретно, LIBERT превосходит BERT в 9 из 10 задач эталона КЛЕЯ и находится на одном уровне с BERT в оставшейся. Кроме того, мы демонстрируем последовательные достижения по 3 эталонам для лексического упрощения, задача, где знания о семантическом сходстве на уровне слов имеют первостепенное значение, а также большие достижения на зондах лексического мышления.', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go n-éascaíonn múnlaí réamhoiliúna gan mhaoirseacht raon leathan d’fheidhmchláir NLP iartheachtacha. Coinníonn na samhlacha seo, áfach, cuid de na teorainneacha a bhaineann le leabú focal statach traidisiúnta. Go háirithe, ní ionchódaíonn siad ach an t-eolas dáileacháin atá ar fáil i gcorpora amhthéacs, a ionchorpraítear trí chuspóirí samhaltaithe teanga. San obair seo, déanaimid an t-eolas dáileacháin sin a chomhlánú le heolas seachtrach foclóireachta, is é sin, déanaimid an t-eolas scoite ar chosúlacht shéimeantach ar leibhéal na bhfocal a chomhtháthú isteach sa réamhoiliúint. Chuige sin, déanaimid samhail chaighdeánach BERT a ghinearálú go suíomh foghlama il-thasc ina gcuirimid le chéile cuspóirí samhaltú teanga folaithe BERT agus tuar na chéad abairte eile le tasc cúnta maidir le haicmiú caidreamh dénártha focal. Tugann ár dturgnaimh le fios go bhfuil feidhmíocht níos fearr ag BERT (LIBERT) “Ar an Eolas ó thaobh an Fhoclóra” de, atá speisialaithe don chosúlacht shéimeantach ar leibhéal na bhfocal, ná an “vanilla” atá dall ó thaobh na foclóireachta ar roinnt tascanna tuiscint teanga. Go nithiúil, is fearr le LIBERT ná BERT i 9 dtasc as 10 dtagarmharc GLUE agus tá sé ar chomhchéim le BERT sa cheann eile. Ina theannta sin, léirímid gnóthachain chomhsheasmhacha ar 3 thagarmharc le haghaidh simpliú foclóireachta, tasc ina bhfuil eolas ar chosúlacht shéimeantach leibhéal focal ríthábhachtach, chomh maith le gnóthachain mhóra ar thaiscéalaithe réasúnaíochta foclóireachta.', 'ka': "Name მაგრამ ეს მოდელები არსებობენ ტრადიციონალური სტატიკური სიტყვების ზოგიერთი დროები. განსაკუთრებულად, ისინი მხოლოდ განსაკუთრებულ ცოცხლების კოპორაში, რომლებიც ენის მოდელური მიზეზებით შექმნა. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ასეთი გარეშე ელექსიკალური ცნობილებით გარეშე ლექსიკალური ცნობილებით დამატებით, ეს არის, ჩვენ დისკრეტური ცნობილებას სიტყვების სიმენტიკური სწორ ამ დასაწყისთვის, ჩვენ ვიყენებთ სტანდარტული BERT მოდელის მრავალ დავასწავლისთვის სწავლისთვის, სადაც გვაქვს BERT-ის მაქსიკური ენის მოდელისთვის და შემდეგ წინაწყისთვის წინაწყისი მიზეზეზი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები იტყვებს, რომ ჩვენი 'ლვქსიკურად ინფორმაციული' BERT (LIBERT), სპეციალური სიტყვების სიმენტიკური განსხვავებაზე, უფრო უფრო მუშაობა, ვიდრე ლექსიკურად ბონილია' BERT-ზე ზუსტად, LIBERT გავაკეთებს BERT-ს 9 წლის 10 საქაღალდე GLUE ბანქმერტის დავაკეთება და ახლა დარჩენა BERT-ს პერტი. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ კონსტანტიური მიღება სამი ბენქმარიკაში ლექსიკალური გამოყენებაზე, რაც მეცნიერება სიტყვების სიმპანტიკური სიმპანტიკური სიმპანტიკური სიმპანტიკური სიმპა", 'hu': 'A felügyelet nélküli előkészítési modellek kimutatták, hogy megkönnyítik a downstream NLP alkalmazások széles skáláját. Ezek a modellek azonban megtartják a hagyományos statikus szóbeágyazások korlátait. Különösen csak a nyers szöveges korpuszokban elérhető disztribúciós ismereteket kódolják, amelyeket nyelvmodellezési célkitűzések segítségével beépítenek. Ebben a munkában az ilyen elosztási ismereteket külső lexikai ismeretekkel egészítjük ki, azaz a szószintű szemantikai hasonlóság diszkrét ismereteit integráljuk az előkészítésbe. Ennek érdekében általánosítjuk a szabványos BERT modellt egy többfeladatos tanulási beállításra, ahol a BERT maszkos nyelvmodellezését és a következő mondat előrejelzését összekapcsoljuk a bináris szókapcsolatok osztályozásának kiegészítő feladatával. Kísérleteink azt sugallják, hogy a szószintű szemantikai hasonlóságra specializálódott "Lexically Informed" BERT (LIBERT) jobb teljesítményt nyújt, mint a lexikailag vak "vanília" BERT több nyelvértési feladatban. Konkrétan a LIBERT a GLUE referenciaérték 10 feladatából 9-ben felülmúlja a BERT-et, és a fennmaradó feladatban egyenlő a BERT-vel. Továbbá a lexikai egyszerűsítés 3 referenciaértékének következetes előnyeit mutatjuk, amelyben a szószintű szemantikai hasonlóság ismerete kiemelkedő fontosságú, valamint a lexikai érvelési szondák jelentős előnyeit mutatjuk.', 'el': 'Τα μη εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα προεπεξεργασίας έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι διευκολύνουν ένα ευρύ φάσμα μεταγενέστερων εφαρμογών. Αυτά τα μοντέλα, ωστόσο, διατηρούν ορισμένους από τους περιορισμούς των παραδοσιακών στατικών λέξεων ενσωμάτωσης. Ειδικότερα, κωδικοποιούν μόνο τη διανεμητική γνώση που είναι διαθέσιμη σε σώματα ακατέργαστου κειμένου, ενσωματωμένη μέσω στόχων γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συμπληρώνουμε αυτή τη διανεμητική γνώση με εξωτερική λεξική γνώση, δηλαδή ενσωματώνουμε τη διακριτή γνώση σχετικά με τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα σε επίπεδο λέξεων στην προεπιλογή. Για το σκοπό αυτό, γενικεύουμε το πρότυπο μοντέλο σε ένα περιβάλλον εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών όπου συνδυάζουμε τους στόχους μοντελοποίησης μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας του και πρόβλεψης επόμενων προτάσεων με μια βοηθητική εργασία ταξινόμησης δυαδικών σχέσεων λέξεων. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το λεξικά ενημερωμένο BERT (LIBERT), εξειδικευμένο στη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα σε επίπεδο λέξεων, αποδίδει καλύτερη απόδοση από το λεξικά τυφλό BERT σε διάφορες εργασίες κατανόησης γλωσσών. Συγκεκριμένα, το LIBERT ξεπερνά τον BERT σε εννέα από τα δέκα καθήκοντα του δείκτη αναφοράς GLUE και είναι στο ίδιο επίπεδο με τον BERT στο υπόλοιπο. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε συνεπή κέρδη σε τρία σημεία αναφοράς για τη λεξική απλοποίηση, ένα έργο όπου η γνώση σχετικά με τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα σε επίπεδο λέξεων είναι πρωταρχική, καθώς και μεγάλα κέρδη σε ανιχνευτές λεξικού συλλογισμού.', 'it': 'I modelli di pre-formazione non controllati hanno dimostrato di facilitare un\'ampia gamma di applicazioni a valle della PNL. Questi modelli, tuttavia, mantengono alcune delle limitazioni delle tradizionali incorporazioni statiche di parole. In particolare, codificano solo le conoscenze distributive disponibili nei corpi di testo grezzo, incorporate attraverso obiettivi di modellazione linguistica. In questo lavoro, completiamo tale conoscenza distributiva con conoscenza lessicale esterna, cioè integriamo la conoscenza discreta sulla somiglianza semantica a livello di parola nel pretraining. A tal fine, generalizziamo il modello BERT standard a un ambiente di apprendimento multi-task in cui accoppiamo la modellazione del linguaggio mascherato di BERT e gli obiettivi di previsione della frase successiva con un compito ausiliario di classificazione delle relazioni binarie di parole. I nostri esperimenti suggeriscono che il nostro BERT "Lexically Informed" (LIBERT), specializzato per la somiglianza semantica a livello di parola, offre prestazioni migliori rispetto al BERT "vanilla" lessicamente cieco in diversi compiti di comprensione linguistica. In concreto, LIBERT supera BERT in 9 compiti su 10 del benchmark GLUE ed è alla pari con BERT nel restante. Inoltre, mostriamo guadagni consistenti su 3 parametri di riferimento per la semplificazione lessicale, un compito in cui la conoscenza della somiglianza semantica a livello di parola è fondamentale, così come grandi guadagni sulle sonde di ragionamento lessicale.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувани модели за претренирање се покажаа дека овозможуваат широк опсег на понатамошни апликации на НЛП. Сепак, овие модели задржуваат некои од ограничувањата на традиционалните статички зборови. Посебно, тие го кодираат само дистрибуционалното знаење достапно во суровиот текст корпора, вклучено преку целите на јазичното моделирање. Во оваа работа, го комплиментираме ваквото дистрибуционално знаење со надворешно лексикално знаење, тоа е, го интегрираме дискретното знаење за семантичното сличност на зборот во претренирањето. За оваа цел, го генерализираме стандардниот модел БЕРТ во поставување на учење со мултизадачи каде што ги париме маскираните јазични модели на БЕРТ и следните предвидувачки цели со помошна задача на класификација на бинарни зборови. Нашите експерименти сугерираат дека нашиот „Лексикално информиран“ БЕРТ (ЛИБЕРТ), специјализиран за семантичната сличност на зборовите, дава подобра перформанса отколку лексикално слеп „ванила“ БЕРТ на неколку задачи за разбирање на јазикот. Конкретно, ЛИБЕРТ го надминува БЕРТ во 9 од 10 задачи на ГЛУЕ benchmark и е во однос со БЕРТ во останатиот. Покрај тоа, покажуваме константни напредоци за три референтни значки за лексичко поедноставување, задача каде што знаењето за семантичната сличност на зборовите е најважно, како и големи напредоци за лексичко размислување сонди.', 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad neįžiūrimi išankstinio mokymo modeliai palengvina įvairias tolesnes NLP programas. These models, however, retain some of the limitations of traditional static word embeddings.  Visų pirma jos koduoja tik platinimo žinias, turimas žaliavinio teksto korporoje, įtraukiamas į kalbų modeliavimo tikslus. Šiame darbe papildome tokias platinimo žinias išorinėmis leksinėmis žiniomis, t. y. įtraukiame diskretines žinias apie žodžių lygio semantinį panašumą į išankstinį mokymą. Šiuo tikslu generalizuojame standartinį BERT model į į daugiafunkcinio mokymosi aplinką, kurioje susiejame BERT paslėptą kalbų modeliavimą ir kitą sakinį numatančius tikslus su papildoma dviejų žodžių santykių klasifikavimo užduotimi. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų "Lexically Informed" BERT (LIBERT), specializuotas žodžių lygio semantiniam panašumui, duoda geresnių rezultatų nei lexically blind "vanilla" BERT keliose kalbų supratimo užduotyse. Konkrečiai LIBERT atlieka BERT 9 iš 10 GLUE lyginamojo rodiklio užduočių ir likusioje yra lygiavertė BERT užduotims. Be to, mes parodome nuoseklią pažangą dėl trijų lexinio supaprastinimo kriterijų, užduoties, kurioje labai svarbios žinios apie semantinį žodžių lygio panašumą, taip pat didelės pažangos dėl lexinio motyvavimo sondų.', 'kk': "Сәйкестірілмеген өзгерту үлгілері NLP қолданбаларының көп аумағын көмектесу үшін көрсетілді. Бұл үлгілер дәстүрлі статистикалық сөздердің шектерін сақтайды. Әсіресе, олар тіл модельдің мақсаттары арқылы тек мәтін корпорасында қолданылатын үлестіру білімдерін кодтамасы. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бұл үлестірімізді сыртқы лексикалық білімдермен қосып тастаймыз, мысалы, сөз деңгейіндегі семантикалық ұқсастық білімдерді сөздерге сәйкестіктерге қосы Бұл соңында, біз стандартты BERT үлгісін бірнеше тапсырманың оқыту баптауына көп тапсырмаларды жалғастырып береміз. Біз BERT тілдің қалқан моделі мен келесі сөздердің оқыту мақсаттарын бірнеше тапсырмасына к Біздің тәжірибеміз біздің 'Лексикалық мәліметтер' BERT (LIBERT) дегеніміздің, сөз деңгейінің семантикалық ұқсастығы үшін бұл сөздердің бірнеше тілді түсініктерінде лексикалық көп 'vanilla' BERT- дан арты Сонымен қатар, LIBERT GLUE деңгейіндегі 10 тапсырмалардан 9-ден BERT-ті шектеп, қалды BERT-тің бірінде болады. Сонымен қатар, біз Лексикалық қарапайым үшін 3 бағдарламалық бағдарламалардың тұрақты жетілдерін көрсетедік. Бұл тапсырма сөздің деңгейіндегі семантикалық ұқсас білімі бағдарламалық және лексикалық тү", 'ms': "Model pralatihan tidak diawasi telah dipaparkan untuk memudahkan julat luas aplikasi NLP turun. Model ini, bagaimanapun, menyimpan sebahagian daripada keterangan dalam perkataan statik tradisional. Secara khususnya, mereka hanya mengekodkan pengetahuan pengedaran yang tersedia dalam korpra teks mentah, disertai melalui tujuan model bahasa. Dalam kerja ini, kita tambahkan pengetahuan distribusi seperti ini dengan pengetahuan lexik luaran, iaitu, kita mengintegrasikan pengetahuan diskret tentang persamaan semantik aras perkataan ke dalam latihan. Untuk tujuan ini, kita menghapuskan model BERT piawai ke tetapan pembelajaran berbilang-tugas di mana kita pasang model bahasa bertopeng BERT dan objektif ramalan kalimat berikutnya dengan tugas bantuan bagi klasifikasi hubungan perkataan binari. Eksperimen kami menyarankan bahawa 'Lexically Informed' BERT (LIBERT), khusus untuk persamaan semantik aras perkataan, memberikan prestasi yang lebih baik daripada 'vanilla' BERT yang buta secara lexik pada beberapa tugas pemahaman bahasa. Secara konkret, LIBERT melampaui BERT dalam 9 daripada 10 tugas tanda referensi GLUE dan sama dengan BERT dalam tugas yang tersisa. Selain itu, kita menunjukkan keuntungan konsisten pada 3 tanda referensi untuk pemudahan leksikal, tugas di mana pengetahuan mengenai persamaan semantik aras perkataan adalah penting, serta keuntungan besar pada sond pemakaian leksikal.", 'ml': "നിരീക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ നെഎല്\u200dപി പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ലഭ്യമാക്കു എന്നാലും ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പാരാധാരണ സ്റ്റാറ്റിക് വാക്കുകളുടെ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങളില്\u200d ചില പരിധികള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, അവര്\u200d കോണ്\u200dപോരിയില്\u200d ലഭ്യമായ പദാവലിയുടെ അറിവ് മാത്രമേ കോണ്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ. ഈ പ്രവൃത്തിയില്\u200d, പുറത്തുള്ള ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d അറിവുമായി ഇത്തരം വിതരണ അറിവ് നമ്മള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നു. അതായത്, വാക്കിന്റെ നില-നീ ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ സാധാരണ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡല്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ നമ്മള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200dറെ മുഷ്ടിച്ച ഭാഷ മ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നത് 'ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d അറിയിപ്പുള്ള' ബെര്\u200dട്ടി (ലിബെര്\u200dട്ടി) വാക്ക്-നില സെമാന്റിക് സമീപത്തിനായി വിശേഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക തീര്\u200dച്ചയായും ലിബെര്\u200dട്ട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ 10 ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്ന് 9 ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ബാര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200dറെ കൂടെ  മൂന്നു ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയുള്ള സമ്പാദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് നില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുപോലെയാണ്.", 'mt': 'Unsupervised pretraining models have been shown to facilitate a wide range of downstream NLP applications.  Madankollu, dawn il-mudelli jżommu xi wħud mil-limitazzjonijiet tal-inkorporazzjoni tradizzjonali tal-kliem statiku. B’mod partikolari, huma jikkodifikaw biss l-għarfien distributtiv disponibbli fil-korpura tat-test mhux ipproċessat, inkorporat permezz ta’ għanijiet ta’ mudellar tal-lingwi. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna nikkumplimentaw tali għarfien distributtiv b’għarfien lexiku estern, jiġifieri, nintegraw l-għarfien diskret dwar similarità semantika fil-livell tal-kelma fit-taħriġ minn qabel. Għal dan il-għan, a ħna nġeneralizzaw il-mudell standard BERT għal ambjent ta’ tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti fejn aħna nżewġu l-objettivi ta’ mudell tal-lingwa maskrat tal-BERT u t-tbassir tas-sentenza li jmiss b’kompitu awżiljarju ta’ klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni bilaterali tal-kliem. L-esperimenti tagħna jissuġġerixxu li l-BERT tagħna “Informed Lexically” (LIBERT), speċjalizzat għas-similarità semantika fil-livell tal-kelma, jagħti prestazzjoni aħjar mill-BERT “vanilla” li ma tkunx magħrufa lexikament fuq diversi kompiti ta’ fehim lingwistiku. B’mod konkret, LIBERT iwettaq il-BERT f’9 minn kull 10 kompiti tal-punt ta’ riferiment GLUE u huwa daqs il-BERT f’dak li jifdal. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu kisbiet konsistenti fuq tliet punti ta’ riferiment għas-simplifikazzjoni lexika, kompitu fejn l-għarfien dwar similarità semantika fil-livell tal-kliem huwa importanti ħafna, kif ukoll kisbiet kbar fuq sondi ta’ raġunament lexiku.', 'no': 'Dette er vist uverkjende trekkmodeller for å letta eit brett område av NLP- program nedtrekkstraum. Desse modelane beholder imidlertid nokre av grensene for tradisjonelle statistiske ordinnbygging. Dei koder berre den distribusjonale kunnskapen som er tilgjengelege i råtekstkorpora, inkludert gjennom språksmodelleringsmål. I denne arbeiden komplemerer vi slike distribusjonelle kunnskap med eksterne leksiske kunnskap, som er at vi integrerer diskrete kunnskap på ordnivå semantisk likning til trekking. I denne slutten genereliserer vi standardmodellen BERT til ein fleire oppgåver-læringsinnstilling der vi par BERT maskerte språk-modellering og neste setningsverdi med ei hjelp oppgåve av binær ord-relasjonsklassifikasjon. Våre eksperimenter foreslår at vår «Leksisk informasjon» BERT (LIBERT), spesialisert for ordnivået semantisk likning, gjer bedre utvikling enn det leksisk blinde «vanilla» BERT på fleire språk forståking. Konsert, LIBERT utfører BERT i 9 av 10 oppgåver av GLUE-benchmarket og er på ein par med BERT i den resten. I tillegg viser vi konsekvente vinn på 3 benchmarker for leksisk forenkling, eit oppgåve der kunnskap om ordnivået semantisk similaritet er paramount, og stor vinn på leksiske redeksjonssprøver.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że nienadzorowane modele wstępnego treningu ułatwiają szeroką gamę dalszych zastosowań NLP. Modele te zachowują jednak pewne ograniczenia tradycyjnych osadzeń słów statycznych. W szczególności kodują one jedynie wiedzę dystrybucyjną dostępną w korpusach tekstu surowego, włączoną poprzez cele modelowania językowego. W niniejszej pracy uzupełniamy taką wiedzę dystrybucyjną o zewnętrzną wiedzę leksykalną, czyli integrujemy dyskretną wiedzę na temat podobieństwa semantycznego na poziomie słowa do treningu wstępnego. W tym celu uogólniamy standardowy model BERT do wielozadaniowego środowiska uczenia się, w którym łączymy maskowane modelowanie języka BERT i cele przewidywania następnych zdań z pomocniczym zadaniem klasyfikacji relacji słów binarnych. Nasze eksperymenty sugerują, że nasz "Lexically Informed" BERT (LIBERT), specjalizujący się w podobieństwie semantycznym na poziomie słów, daje lepszą wydajność niż leksycznie ślepy BERT w kilku zadaniach rozumienia języka. W rzeczywistości LIBERT przewyższa BERT w dziewięciu z dziesięciu zadań referencyjnych GLUE i jest na równi z BERT w pozostałych. Ponadto pokazujemy konsekwentne zyski w zakresie 3-punktów odniesienia do uproszczenia leksykalnego, zadania, w którym najważniejsza jest wiedza na temat podobieństwa semantycznego na poziomie słów, a także duże zyski w zakresie sond rozumowania leksykalnego.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că modelele de pregătire nesupravegheate facilitează o gamă largă de aplicații PNL din aval. Cu toate acestea, aceste modele păstrează unele dintre limitările încorporărilor statice tradiționale de cuvinte. În special, ele codează doar cunoștințele distribuționale disponibile în corpurile de text brut, încorporate prin obiective de modelare lingvistică. În această lucrare, completăm astfel de cunoștințe distribuționale cu cunoștințe lexicale externe, adică integrăm cunoașterea discretă a similitudinii semantice la nivel de cuvânt în pre-formare. În acest scop, generalizăm modelul standard BERT la un cadru de învățare multi-task unde cuplăm modelarea limbajului mascat al BERT și obiectivele de predicție a propoziției următoare cu o sarcină auxiliară de clasificare binară a relațiilor de cuvinte. Experimentele noastre sugerează că BERT-ul nostru "Lexical Informed" (LIBERT), specializat pentru similitudinea semantică la nivel de cuvânt, oferă performanțe mai bune decât BERT-ul "vanilie" lexical orb în mai multe sarcini de înțelegere a limbilor. Concret, LIBERT depășește BERT în 9 din 10 sarcini ale benchmark GLUE și este la egalitate cu BERT în restul. Mai mult decât atât, prezentăm câștiguri consistente pe 3 criterii de referință pentru simplificarea lexicală, o sarcină în care cunoașterea despre similitudinea semantică la nivel de cuvânt este esențială, precum și câștiguri mari pe sondele de raționament lexical.', 'mn': 'НЛП-ын маш олон нийтлэг хэлбэрийг ашиглах боломжтой болсон. Гэвч эдгээр загварууд уламжлалтай хэлбэрийн хэмжээсүүдийг хадгалдаг. Ялангуяа, тэд зөвхөн хэлний загварын зорилгоор дүүрэн хэлбэрийн мэдлэгтэй зөвхөн хуваарилалтын мэдлэгтэй холбоотой. Энэ ажил дээр бид гадаад хэлбэрийн лексикийн мэдлэгийг нэмэгдүүлнэ гэсэн үг хэмжээний семантийн төстэй тэнцүү мэдлэгийг хэлбэртэй болгож байна. Энэ төгсгөлд бид стандарт BERT загварыг олон ажлын суралцах сургалтын тодорхойлолт болгоно. Бид BERT-ийн хэл загвар, дараагийн өгүүлбэрийн таамаглах зорилго нь хоёр дахь хэлбэртэй холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой хэлбэрээр ту Бидний туршилтууд "Лексийн мэдээлэл" БЕРТ (ЛИБЕРТ) гэсэн үг хэмжээний semantic төстэй мэргэжлийн хэмжээнд илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг олон хэлний ойлголтын даалгавраас илүү сайн үр дүнг өгдөг. Үнэндээ ЛИБЕРТ ГЛЕУ-ын 10 даалгаварын 9-д BERT-г нэмэгдүүлдэг ба үлдсэн нь BERT-тэй тэмдэглэгддэг. Мөн бид лексикийн хялбарчлалын 3 багц дээр тогтмол ашиг авч үздэг. Үүний хэмжээний семантик төстэй тэнцүү байдлын талаар мэдлэг нь хамгийн чухал, лексикийн шалтгаан судалгаанд том ашиг авч үздэг.', 'so': "Waxaa la tusay tusaalooyin aan la ilaalinayn sameynta tababar-roobka ah oo ballan badan oo ah codsiyada NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalahan waxay haystaan xaduudo ka mid ah hadalka caadiga ah. Si gaar ah waxaa loo qoraa aqoonta qaybsiga oo kaliya ee laga helaa shirkadda qoraalka ee khaas ah oo lagu qoray waxyaabaha qaabilaadda luuqada. Shuqulkaas waxaynu ku dhammaystirnaa aqoonta qaybsiga ah, aqoonta dibadda ah ee caqliga la'aanta, taas oo ah aqoonta kala duwan oo ku saabsan isku mid ah hadalka, si aynu u u dhigno tababarida. Taas darteed waxaynu u sameynaa qaababka caadiga ah ee BERT, taas oo ah qoraal waxbarasho oo badan, taasoo aynu isbarno muuqashada afka BERT ee maskax ah iyo hagitaanka qoraalka soo socda oo ku qoran shaqo xilli ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka xiriirka labaad. Imtixaanadayada waxay ka jeedaan in hawlaha waxgarashada luuqadaha ee leksiga la yidhaahdo BERT (LIBERT), oo gaar u ah hadalka heerka semantika ah, uu sameeyo wax ka wanaagsan shaqo ka mid ah kuwa indhaha la' vanilla' BERT. Si dhab ah, LIBERT wuxuu 9 ka soo baxaa 10 shaqooyin oo ka mid ah BERT, wuxuuna ku yaalaa koox ka mid ah BERT inta hadhay. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa faa'iido la mid ah oo ku qoran saddex bangiyo oo ku saabsan fududaanshada lexicka, taas oo ah shaqo ku saabsan aqoonta isku mid ahaanshaha hadalka, sidoo kale faa'iido badan oo ku saabsan baaritaanka sababta leksiga ah.", 'sv': 'Oförvakade förberedningsmodeller har visat sig underlätta ett brett utbud av efterföljande NLP-tillämpningar. Dessa modeller behåller dock vissa av begränsningarna för traditionella statiska ordinbäddningar. Framför allt kodar de endast den distribuerande kunskap som finns tillgänglig i råtextkorpor, införlivad genom språkmodelleringsmål. I detta arbete kompletterar vi sådan distributionskunskap med extern lexikal kunskap, det vill säga integrerar vi den diskreta kunskapen om ordnivå semantisk likhet i pretraining. För detta ändamål generaliserar vi BERT:s standardmodell till en inlärningsinställning för flera uppgifter där vi kopplar samman BERT:s maskerade språkmodellering och nästa meningsförutsägelsemål med en hjälpuppgift för binär ordrelationsklassificering. Våra experiment tyder på att vår "Lexically Informed" BERT (LIBERT), specialiserad på semantisk likhet på ordnivå, ger bättre prestanda än den lexikalblinda "vanilla" BERT på flera språkkunskaper. Rent konkret överträffar LIBERT BERT i 9 av 10 uppgifter i GLUE-riktmärket och är i nivå med BERT i resten. Dessutom visar vi konsekventa vinster på 3 riktmärken för lexikal förenkling, en uppgift där kunskap om ordnivå semantisk likhet är avgörande, samt stora vinster på lexikala resonemangsprover.', 'sr': "Pokazani su neodređeni modeli pretresanja kako bi olakšali širok raspon nužnih NLP aplikacija. Ovi modeli, međutim, zadržavaju neke od ograničenja tradicionalnih statičkih reči. Posebno, oni kodiraju samo distribucijske znanje koje su dostupne u sirovoj tekstskoj korpori, uključene kroz ciljeve modeliranja jezika. U ovom poslu, dopunjavamo takvo distribucijsko znanje vanjskim leksičkim znanjem, to je da integrišemo diskretno znanje o semantičkoj sličnosti rijeèima u pretkivanje. Za taj cilj generalizujemo standardni model BERT-a na većinu zadataka u kojem smo odredili maskirani jezik BERT-a i ciljevi predviđanja rečenica sa pomoænim zadatakom klasifikacije binarne rečenice. Naši eksperimenti sugeriraju da naša 'Leksički Informirana' BERT (LIBERT), specijalizovana za semantičku sličnost riječi na nivou, pruža bolju izvedbu nego leksički slijepa 'vanila' BERT na nekoliko zadataka za razumevanje jezika. Konačno, LIBERT nadmašuje BERT u 9 od 10 zadataka GLUE benchmarke i je na par sa BERT u ostalim. Osim toga, pokazujemo konsekventne dobitke na 3 kriterije za leksičko jednostavljanje, zadatak u kojem je znanje o semantičkoj sličnosti riječi na nivou, kao i velike dobitke leksičkog razuma.", 'si': "නැති ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් මොඩල් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් NLP විශාල විසින් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සහාය කරන්න. ඒත් මේ මොඩේල් එක්ක, සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථිර වචන සීමාවක් තියාගන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, ඔවුන් විශේෂ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි පැත්තක් කොර්පෝරා වලින්, භාෂාව මොඩේල් අරම මේ වැඩේ අපි ඒ වගේ විදුලි දැනගන්නේ පුළුවන් ලෙක්සිකල් දැනගන්න, ඒ කියන්නේ, අපි වචනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වචනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය BERT මොඩල් එක ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න සැකසුම් කරනවා. අපි BERT ගේ මුකුණු භාෂාව මොඩල් කරනවා. ඊළඟ වාක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්න අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අපේ  'Lexically Informed' BERT (LIBERT), විශේෂයෙන් වචනය සමාන්තික වගේ වචනය සඳහා විශේෂයෙන්, ලෙක්සිකාලික අන්ධික 'vanilla' BERT වගේ වච අනිවාර්යෙන්ම, LIBERT ට BERT වැඩ කරනවා GLUE බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් 10 වලින් 9 වලින් වැඩ කරනවා ඒ වගේම BERT වලින් ඉන්න තියෙනවා. තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ලෙක්සිකල් සාමාන්ය වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්ය විදියට සාමාන්ය විශ්වාස කරන්න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් තුනක් තියෙන්නේ, වචන සාමාන", 'ta': "கண்காணிக்கப்படாத மாதிரிகள் நீளமான NLP பயன்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆனால் இந்த மாதிரிகள், மரபார்ந்த நிலையான வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் சில எல்லைகளை வைத்துக் கொள்ளுங்கள். குறிப்பிட்டு, அவர்கள் வெற்றி அறிவிப்பு மட்டும் குறியீட்டு மட்டும் குறியீட்டாக்குகிறது, மொழி மாதிரி மாதிர இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இத்தகைய பங்கீட்டு அறிவை பூர்த்தி செய்கிறோம் வெளிப்புற அறிவுடன் நிறைவேற்றுகிறோம், அதாவது, வார்த்தை மட்டும இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் நிலையான BERT மாதிரியை பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் அமைப்பிற்கு பொதுவாக்குகிறோம். பிரெட்டின் மூடப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை இணைக்க எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகள் 'லெக்சிக்சிக்கல் அறிவிப்பு' பெர்ட்( LIBERT) வார்த்தைக்கு சிறப்பு நிலை பாதிப்பு ஒத்திசைக்கப்பட்ட, லெக்சிக்ஸிக்கான குருடர் 'வான குறிப்பில், LIBERT 10 பணிகளில் 9ல் BERT வெளியேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் மீதி ஒரு பார் இருக்கிறது. மேலும், நாம் மூன்று பகுதிகளில் உள்ள மாற்றங்களை காண்பிக்கிறோம், வார்த்தை- மட்டத்திற்கு ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் அறிவு, மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் கா", 'ur': "ناپاپرینٹ نمڈلوں کو دکھایا گیا ہے کہ نیچے سطح NLP کاربریوں کے بہت وسیع حصہ کو آسان کرنے کے لئے۔ لیکن یہ نمونڈل، سنتی سیٹیکل لفظوں کے مقداروں میں سے کچھ حفاظت رکھتے ہیں۔ مخصوصاً یہ صرف تقسیم علم کے ذریعے لکھی ٹیکسٹ کورپور میں موجود ہیں، جو زبان مدل کے ذریعے شامل ہوئے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے علم کو باہر زبان علم کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرتے ہیں، یعنی ہم کلمات سطح کی سیمانتی سیمانتی کے مطابق طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر اس کے لئے ہم نے استاندارڈ BERT موڈل کو ایک متعد-ٹاکس سیکھنے کی سیکھنے کے لئے جگہ ہم BERT کے ماسک زبان موڈلینگ اور آگے کی جماعت کی پیش بینی موضوع کو ایک دوسری کلیز نسبت کی مددگار کام کے ساتھ جوڑ دیتے ہیں۔ ہماری آزمائش یہ ہے کہ ہماری 'Lexically Informed' BERT (LIBERT)، کلمات-Level semantic similarity کے لئے مخصوص ہے، لکسی اندھی 'vanilla' BERT سے بہتر عمل پیدا کرتا ہے بہت سی زبان سمجھنے کے کاموں پر۔ بالکل، LIBERT BERT کو GLUE benchmark کے 10 کاموں میں سے 9 سے نکالتا ہے اور باقی رہنے والوں میں BERT کے ساتھ ایک پار پر ہے. اور ہم لکسیکی سادگی کے لئے تین سنچم مارک پر ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں، ایک کام جہاں کلمات-سطح سمantic similarity کے بارے میں علم بہت اضافہ ہے، اور لکسیکی منظورات پر بہت اضافہ ہے۔", 'uz': 'Name Lekin, bu modellar tadqiqiy statik so\'zlarining bir necha chegaralarini hayratadi. Hullas, ular faqat raqamli matn kompaniyadagi tarqatish maʼlumotini kodlash mumkin, bu tilning modelli obʼektlari orqali qoʻllangan. Bu ishda, biz tashqi leksik ilimni tashqi ta\'lim bilan murakkab qilamiz, biz so\'zlar darajadagi semantik teng o\'xshash haqida o\'zgarishni birlashtiramiz. Bu oxirida biz bir necha vazifa o\'rganish uchun Andoza BERT modelini yaratib, bu yerda biz BERT\'ning boshqa tilning modeli modelini va keyingi so\'zning oldini oldinga birinchi so\'zning bir xil bog\'liq darajasining bir xil vazifasi bilan bog\'liq qandaydir. Bizning tajribalarimiz, bizning "Leksika haqida xabari" BERT (LIBERT) bir necha tilda o\'xshash so\'z semantik o\'xshash bo\'lgan so\'zlarimiz, leksik ko\'pchilik "vanilla" vazifalaridan juda yaxshi bajarish natijasini anglatadi. Xo\'sh, LIBERT 10 vazifalarda 9 ta ta\'mindan BERT bajaradi va boshqa bir parcha BERT bilan bir parcha. Ko\'rib, biz Leksikal oddiylik uchun 3 vositalarni bir davomida muvaffaqiyatlarni ko\'rsamiz. Bu vazifani soʻzning semantik tenglari haqida ma\'lumotga ega bo\'lishi mumkin, va leksikal sabablar soʻzlarida katta muvaffaqiyatlarni ko\'rsatdik.', 'vi': "Các mô hình trước mưa không được giám sát đã được hiển thị để giúp một loạt các ứng dụng kiểu xuôi dòng. Những mẫu này, tuy nhiên, vẫn giữ lại một số giới hạn của sự gắn ghép từ tĩnh thường. Đặc biệt, chúng chỉ mã hóa những kiến thức phân phát có sẵn trong cơ thể chữ nguyên bản, được chấp nhận bằng mục tiêu tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ. Trong công việc này, chúng ta bổ sung kiến thức phân phát đó với kiến thức ngôn ngữ bên ngoài, tức là, chúng ta hòa nhập những kiến thức riêng biệt về mặt ngữ nghĩa trên từ vào lớp hình mẫu. Kết quả là, chúng tôi tổng hợp mô hình của BERT theo một thiết lập tập tin đa nhiệm vụ. Nơi chúng tôi kết hợp người tạo ra ngôn ngữ đeo mặt nạ của BERT và mục tiêu dự đoán câu tiếp theo với một nhiệm vụ phụ thuộc phân loại liên hệ chữ nhị phân. Những thí nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy,'Lexy Informed'BERT (LIBERT), chuyên môn về từ cấp độ phân biệt chủng tộc, cung cấp khả năng cao hơn'vani' BERT trong nhiều nhiệm vụ hiểu biết ngôn ngữ. Thực tế, ALBERT hoàn thành giải pháp BERT trong chín nhiệm vụ theo tiêu chuẩn GLUE và trùng hợp với BERT trong phần còn lại. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi thấy lợi nhuận liên tục trên 3 cho mô phỏng ngôn ngữ, một nhiệm vụ mà kiến thức về tính ngữ pháp theo ngữ nghĩa trên từ là quan trọng nhất, cũng như những lợi nhuận lớn trên các vấn đề ngôn ngữ.", 'nl': "Er is aangetoond dat onbeheerde pretraining modellen een breed scala aan downstream NLP toepassingen vergemakkelijken. Deze modellen behouden echter enkele beperkingen van traditionele statische woordinbeddingen. In het bijzonder coderen ze alleen de distributionele kennis die beschikbaar is in ruwe tekstcorpora, opgenomen door middel van taalmodelleringsdoelstellingen. In dit werk vullen we dergelijke distributionele kennis aan met externe lexicale kennis, dat wil zeggen we integreren de discrete kennis over semantische gelijkenis op woordniveau in pretraining. Daartoe veralgemenen we het standaard BERT-model tot een multi-task leeromgeving waarbij we de gemaskerde taalmodellering van BERT en de volgende zin voorspellingsdoelstellingen koppelen aan een hulptaak van binaire woordrelatieklassificatie. Onze experimenten suggereren dat onze 'Lexical Informed' BERT (LIBERT), gespecialiseerd in de semantische gelijkenis op woordniveau, betere prestaties levert dan de lexicaal blinde 'vanilla' BERT op verschillende taalbegripstaken. Concreet presteert LIBERT beter dan BERT in negen van de tien taken van de GLUE benchmark en staat op hetzelfde niveau als BERT in de rest. Bovendien tonen we consistente winsten op 3-benchmarks voor lexicale vereenvoudiging, een taak waarbij kennis over semantische gelijkenis op woordniveau van het grootste belang is, evenals grote winsten op lexicale redeneersondes.", 'bg': 'Доказано е, че неконтролираните модели за предобучение улесняват широк спектър от приложения надолу по веригата за НЛО. Тези модели обаче запазват някои от ограниченията на традиционните статични слова вграждания. По-специално, те кодират само дистрибуционните знания, налични в сурови текстови корпуси, вградени чрез целите на езиковото моделиране. В тази работа допълваме тези дистрибуционни знания с външни лексикални знания, т.е. интегрираме дискретните знания за семантичното сходство на ниво дума в предтренирането. За тази цел обобщаваме стандартния модел към настройка за обучение с множество задачи, където съчетаваме маскираното езиково моделиране и целите за предсказване на следващите изречения с помощна задача за класификация на двоични думи. Нашите експерименти предполагат, че нашият специализиран за семантична сходство на ниво дума, дава по-добри резултати от лексично слепите BERT при няколко задачи за разбиране на езика. Конкретно, Либерт надминава BERT в 9 от 10 задачи на бенчмарка и е на равни нива с BERT в останалата. Нещо повече, показваме последователни печалби при 3 показатели за лексикално опростяване, задача, при която знанието за семантичното сходство на ниво дума е от първостепенно значение, както и големи печалби при лексикалните разсъждения.', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigte Vortrainingsmodelle ermöglichen nachweislich eine Vielzahl nachgeschalteter NLP-Anwendungen. Diese Modelle behalten jedoch einige der Einschränkungen traditioneller statischer Worteinbettungen bei. Insbesondere kodieren sie nur das Verteilungswissen, das in Rohtextkorpora verfügbar ist und durch Sprachmodellierungsziele eingebunden wird. In dieser Arbeit ergänzen wir dieses Verteilungswissen mit externem lexikalischem Wissen, d.h. wir integrieren das diskrete Wissen über semantische Ähnlichkeit auf Wortebene in das Vortraining. Zu diesem Zweck verallgemeinern wir das Standard-BERT-Modell auf eine Multi-Task-Lernumgebung, in der wir BERTs maskierte Sprachmodellierung und Vorhersageziele für den nächsten Satz mit einer Hilfsaufgabe der binären Wortrelationsklassifizierung verknüpfen. Unsere Experimente deuten darauf hin, dass unser "Lexical Informed" BERT (LIBERT), spezialisiert auf semantische Ähnlichkeit auf Wortebene, bei mehreren Sprachverständnisaufgaben bessere Leistungen erbringt als das lexikalisch blinde BERT "Vanille". Konkret übertrifft LIBERT in neun von zehn Aufgaben des GLUE Benchmarks BERT und liegt im übrigen auf Augenhöhe mit BERT. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir konsistente Verbesserungen bei 3-Benchmarks für lexikalische Vereinfachung, einer Aufgabe, bei der Wissen über semantische Ähnlichkeit auf Wortebene von größter Bedeutung ist, sowie große Gewinne bei lexikalischen Argumentationssonden.', 'da': 'Uovervågede forudtræningsmodeller har vist sig at lette en lang række downstream-applikationer. Disse modeller bevarer dog nogle af begrænsningerne ved traditionelle statiske ord indlejringer. Især koder de kun den distributionsmæssige viden, der er tilgængelig i råtekstkorpora, indarbejdet gennem sprogmodelleringsmål. I dette arbejde supplerer vi denne fordelingsviden med ekstern leksikalsk viden, dvs. vi integrerer den diskrete viden om ordniveau semantisk lighed i fortræning. Til dette formål generaliserer vi standard BERT modellen til en multi-opgave læring indstilling, hvor vi parrer BERT\'s maskerede sprogmodellering og næste sætning forudsigelse mål med en hjælpeopgave af binær ordrelation klassificering. Vores eksperimenter tyder på, at vores "Lexical Informede" BERT (LIBERT), der er specialiseret i semantisk lighed på ordniveau, giver bedre ydeevne end den leksikologisk blinde "vanilla" BERT på flere sprogforståelsesopgaver. Rent konkret overgår LIBERT BERT i 9 ud af 10 opgaver i GLUE benchmark og er på niveau med BERT i de resterende opgaver. Desuden viser vi konsekvente gevinster på 3 benchmarks for leksikalsk forenkling, en opgave, hvor viden om ordniveau semantisk lighed er altafgørende, samt store gevinster på leksikalsk ræsonnement probes.', 'hr': "Pokazani su neodređeni modeli pretresanja kako bi olakšali širok raspon nužnih primjena NLP-a. Međutim, ovi modeli zadržavaju neke od ograničenja tradicionalnih statičkih riječi. Posebno, oni kodiraju samo distribucijske znanje koje su dostupne u sirovoj tekstnoj korpori, uključene putem ciljeva modeliranja jezika. U ovom poslu, dopunjavamo takve raspodjelne znanje vanjskim leksičkim znanjem, to je da integriramo diskretno znanje o semantičkoj sličnosti riječi na semantičku razinu u pretkivanje. Za taj cilj generaliziramo standardni model BERT-a na višezadatačnu nastavu učenja gdje ćemo par maskiranih jezika BERT-ova modela i sljedećih ciljeva predviđanja kazne s pomoćnim zadatkom binarnog klasifikacije veze s riječima. Naši eksperimenti sugeriraju da naša 'Leksički Informirana' BERT (LIBERT), specijalizirana za semantičku sličnost riječi na razini, pruža bolju učinku nego leksički slijepa 'vanilla' BERT na nekoliko zadataka razumijevanja jezika. Konačno, LIBERT iznosi BERT u 9 od 10 zadataka skloništa GLUE-a i na par s BERT-om u ostalih. Osim toga, pokazujemo konsekventne dobitke na 3 kriterije za leksičko jednostavljanje, zadatak u kojem je znanje o semantičkoj sličnosti riječi na razini, kao i velike dobitke leksičkog razuma.", 'sw': "Mradi wa kutengeneza matumizi yasiyoangaliwa imeonyesha kusaidia matumizi mengi ya NLP. Hata hivyo, mifano hii inabaki baadhi ya vizuizi vya neno la kitamaduni. In particular, they encode only the distributional knowledge available in raw text corpora, incorporated through language modeling objectives.  Katika kazi hii, tunatimiza maarifa kama haya ya usambazaji na maarifa ya nje ya lexico, ambayo ni, tunaunganisha maarifa tofauti kuhusu usawa wa maneno kwa kiwango cha ngazi cha kimapenzi ili kufanya utafakari. Kwa mwisho huu, tunatengeneza mtindo wa kawaida wa BERT wa kujifunza kazi nyingi ambapo tunaunganisha mifano ya lugha ya BERT na malengo ya utabiri wa hukumu inayofuata yenye kazi ya usambazaji wa neno binafsi. Majaribio yetu yanapendekeza kuwa 'Ujumbe wa Kilexico' BERT (LIBERT), maalum kwa ajili ya maneno yenye kiwango cha semanti, hutoa ufanisi bora kuliko kipofu cha 'vanilla' BERT katika kazi kadhaa za kuelewa lugha. Bila shaka, LIBERT inafanya BERT katika kazi 9 kati ya 10 za bendera ya GLUE na yuko kwenye jukwaa la BERT katika jambo lililobaki. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha mafanikio yanayoendelea kwenye bendera tatu kwa ajili ya urahisi wa uchochezi, juhudi ambapo maarifa kuhusu usawa wa kiwango cha sekunda cha maneno yanafanana, pamoja na mafanikio makubwa juu ya mashindano yanayoelezea lexico.", 'ko': "무감독 예비훈련 모델은 광범위한 하위 NLP 응용에 도움이 된다는 것이 증명되었다.그러나 이 모델들은 전통적인 정적 단어가 삽입된 한계를 보존하고 있다.특히 원시 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 사용할 수 있는 분포 지식만 인코딩하고 언어 모델링 목표를 통해 통합한다.이 작업에서 우리는 외부 어휘 지식으로 이러한 분포 지식을 보충한다. 즉, 우리는 단어급의 의미 유사성의 이산 지식을 예비 훈련에 통합시킨다.이를 위해 우리는 표준적인 버트 모델을 다중 임무 학습 환경에 보급하고 버트의 복면 언어 모델링과 다음 예측 목표와 이원어 관계 분류의 보조 임무를 결합시킬 것이다.우리의 실험에 의하면, 우리의 '어휘 알기' 버트 (LIBERT) 는 단어급의 의미 유사성에 전문적으로 사용되며, 몇 개의 언어 이해 임무에서 어휘맹인 '허브' 버트보다 표현이 더 좋다고 한다.구체적으로 LIBERT는 GLUE 벤치마크 테스트 10개 중 9개가 BERT보다 우수했고, 나머지 1개는 BERT와 동일했다.그 밖에 우리는 어휘를 간소화하는 세 가지 기준에서 일치된 수익을 나타냈다. 이 임무에서 단어급의 의미 유사성에 대한 지식은 매우 중요하고 어휘 추리 탐측에도 큰 수익을 얻었다.", 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر نمایش داده شده است تا یک مدل طولانی از کاربردهای NLP پایین را آسان کند. با این حال، این مدل\u200cها بعضی از محدودیت\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای ثابت قدیمی را حفظ می\u200cکنند. مخصوصاً آنها فقط دانش تقسیم\u200cکننده را در شرکت متن خاصی که با هدف\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی زبان شامل می\u200cشوند، رمز می\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما این دانش های تقسیم را با دانش زبانی خارجی تعداد می دهیم، یعنی ما دانش های مختلف را در طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ طبقهٔ ط برای این قسمت، ما مدل استاندارد BERT را به یک تنظیم یادگیری چندین کار را جبران می کنیم که ما مدل کردن زبان ماسک BERT را جبران می کنیم و هدف پیش بینی کردن جمله بعدی را با یک کار کمک از ارتباط کلمات دویینی رابطه به کلمات دویینی جبران می کنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که BERT (LIBERT) ، برای شبیه\u200cهای semantic طبقه\u200cی کلمه\u200cها ویژه\u200cای دارد، عملکرد بهتر از کارهای زبان\u200cشناسی کور "vanilla" BERT را در کار\u200cهای تعلیم زبان\u200cشناسی می\u200cدهد. دقیقاً LIBERT در ۹ از ۱۰ وظیفه صندوق GLUE برتری می کند و در یک صندوق با BERT در باقی مانده است. علاوه بر این، ما برتری هماهنگی را در سه نقطه برای ساده\u200cسازی زبان نشان می\u200cدهیم، یک وظیفه که علم درباره شبیه\u200cسازی طبقه\u200cی کلمه\u200cها مهم است، و برتری بزرگ در امتحان\u200cهای منطق\u200cسازی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی است.', 'tr': "Saýlanmadyk ýalňyş nusgalary görkezildi. NLP programleriniň kän hatlaryny bejermek üçin bejerilip görkezildi. Bu nusgalar, ýöne däpli statistik sözlerin daşary çykarmalarynyň käbirlerini saklaýarlar. Aýratyn bolsa, diňe çyz tekst korporasynda elýeterli paýlaşma bilgilerini kodlaýarlar, dil modelleýän maksadlary bilen guruldy. Bu işde, daşarkı lektik bilgi ile bölünme bilgilerini dağıtıyoruz, yani diskretli bilgileri kelime seviyesinde semantik bir şekilde gözlenme şeklinde birleştiriyoruz. Bu üçin BERT'iň standart BERT modelini bir multi-täblik öwrenmek üçin beýleki zada düzenleýäris we BERT'iň maskeli dilini modelleýän we indiki s özleýän öňlemek maksadyny bitirmek üçin bir kömek täbligi bilen üýtgedik. Biziň deneylerimiz 'Leksik bilen maglumatlarymyz' BERT (LIBERT), söz derejesi semantik meňzeşlikleri üçin, leksiýaly kör 'vanilla' BERT'den gowy etmäge rugsat berýär. Munuň üçin, LIBERT GLUE çekiminiň 10 işinden 9-da BERT'i üstünlik edýär we kalanlarda BERT bilen bir toparda. Munuň üçin, biz leksiýa ýeňlemek üçin 3 düýbünden ýeterli gazanlygy görkeýäris, söz derejesi semantik meňzeşlikleri barada bilgi paramun we leksiýa düşünüp barlamak üçin uly gazanlygyny görkeýäris.", 'af': "Onondersteunde pretraining modele is vertoon om 'n wyse reek van NLP toepassings te eenvoudig. Hierdie modele hou egter sommige van die beperkings van tradisionele statiese woord inbettings. Spesiaal, hulle kodeer slegs die verspreidingskennis wat beskikbaar is in rooi teks korpora, ingesluit deur taal modellering objekte. In hierdie werk is ons so verspreiding kennis met eksterne leksiese kennis, dit is, ons integreer die diskrete kennis op woord-vlak semantiese gelykenis in voorspreiding. By hierdie einde, ons genereer die standaard BERT model na 'n multi-taak leer instelling waar ons bietjie BERT se maskeerde taal modellering en volgende setvoorskou objekte met 'n hulpbruk taak van binêre woord verwanting klasifikasie. Ons eksperimente stel voorstel dat ons 'Leksiese Inligting' BERT (LIBERT), spesialiseer vir die woord- vlak semantiese gelykenis, beter effektuur gee as die leksies blinde 'vanilla' BERT op verskeie taal verstaan opdragte. Libert uitvoer BERT in 9 uit 10 taak van die GLUE benchmark en is op 'n par met BERT in die oorblyfsel een. Ook, ons wys bestaande verskaffings op 3 benchmarke vir leksiese eenvoudiging, 'n taak waar kennis oor woord-vlak semantiese gelykenis is paramount, en ook groot verskaffings op leksiese redekening probes.", 'sq': "Unsupervised pretraining models have been shown to facilitate a wide range of downstream NLP applications.  Këto modele megjithatë mbajnë disa nga kufizimet e përfshirjeve tradicionale të fjalëve statike. In particular, they encode only the distributional knowledge available in raw text corpora, incorporated through language modeling objectives.  Në këtë punë, ne komplementojmë njohuri të tilla shpërndarëse me njohuri të jashtme lexike, që do të thotë, ne integrojmë njohurinë diskret mbi ngjashmërinë semantike në nivelin e fjalëve në parastërvitjen. To this end, we generalize the standard BERT model to a multi-task learning setting where we couple BERT's masked language modeling and next sentence prediction objectives with an auxiliary task of binary word relation classification.  Eksperimentet tona sugjerojnë se BERT (LIBERT) ynë i informuar lexikalisht, i specializuar për ngjashmërinë semantike të nivelit të fjalës, jep performancë më të mirë se 'vanilla' BERT lexikalisht të verbër në disa detyra të kuptimit të gjuhës. Concretely, LIBERT outperforms BERT in 9 out of 10 tasks of the GLUE benchmark and is on a par with BERT in the remaining one.  Moreover, we show consistent gains on 3 benchmarks for lexical simplification, a task where knowledge about word-level semantic similarity is paramount, as well as large gains on lexical reasoning probes.", 'am': 'ያልተገለበጠው የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች በቁጥጥር የNLP ፕሮግራሞች ማግኘት ተገልጦአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የባሕላዊው የስታሪክ ቃላት አካባቢ ግንኙነቶችን ያቆይተዋል፡፡ በተለይም የቋንቋ ምሳሌ አቃውንቶች በተለየ ጥሩ ጽሑፍ ኮርፖርት ውስጥ የተገኘውን እውቀት ብቻ ይቆጥራሉ፡፡ In this work, we complement such distributional knowledge with external lexical knowledge, that is, we integrate the discrete knowledge on word-level semantic similarity into pretraining.  ለዚህ ምክንያት የብኤርት ቋንቋ ምሳሌ እናጋራለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ለቃላት-ደረጃ semantic ብጤት የተለየ ‹ልኬክሲካዊ ማስታወቂያ› ብሬት (LIBERT)› ብሬት በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ማስታወቂያ ስራዎችን ከሌክሲካዊ ዕውር ‹vaniላ› BERT› የተሻለ ስርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ እርግጠኛ፣ LIBERT ከ10 የGLUE benchmark ውስጥ ብሬትን በዘጠኝ ስራ ያሳርፋል፥ የቀረውም አንዲት ብሬት ጋር በጭብጥ ላይ ነው፡፡ ደግሞም የንግግር-ደረጃ እውቀት የsemantic ብጤት እና ለሌክሲካዊ አካባቢዎች ትልቅ ሀብት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ անվերահսկված նախավարժման մոդելները հնարավորություն են տալիս բազմաթիվ հետագա ՆԼՊ ծրագրեր: These models, however, retain some of the limitations of traditional static word embeddings.  Մասնավորապես, դրանք կոդավորում են միայն տարածական գիտելիքները, որոնք հասանելի են պարզ տեքստի կառուցվածքում, ներառված լեզվի մոդելավորման նպատակների միջոցով: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք լրացնում ենք այս տարածման գիտելիքները արտաքին լեքսիկական գիտելիքներով, այսինքն, մենք ինտեգրում ենք բառի մակարդակի սեմանտիկ նմանությունը նախադասության մեջ: To this end, we generalize the standard BERT model to a multi-task learning setting where we couple BERT\'s masked language modeling and next sentence prediction objectives with an auxiliary task of binary word relation classification.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր "Լեքսիկապես տեղեկացված" Բերթը (Լիբերթը), մասնավորված բառի մակարդակի սեմանտիկ նմանության համար, ավելի լավ արդյունք է ստանում, քան լեքսիկապես կոյր "վանիլա" Բերթը մի քանի լեզվի հասկանալու առաջադրանքներում: Մասնավորապես, Լիբերթը արտադրում է BERT-ը GLUE-ի համեմատական նպատակից 9-ից և հավասար է BERT-ին մնացած նպատակում: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս դասական պարզաբանության 3 համեմատային նպատակների հաջողություններ, մի խնդիր, որտեղ բառի մակարդակի սեմանտիկ նմանության մասին գիտելիքը առավել կարևոր է, ինչպես նաև լեքսիկական մտածողության ուսումնասիրությունների մեծ շահույթներ:', 'bn': "অনভারওয়ার্ডিং মডেল প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে ডাউনস্ট্রীম এনএলপি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের ব্যাপারে সুবিধা প্রদান করতে। তবে ঐতিহ্যবাহী স্টেটিক শব্দের কিছু সীমাবদ্ধ রাখা যায়। বিশেষ করে, তারা শুধুমাত্র ভাষা মডেলিং উদ্দেশ্যের মাধ্যমে বিতরণের জ্ঞান পাওয়া যায়। এই কাজে আমরা বাইরের লেক্সিক্যাল জ্ঞানের সাথে এই ধরনের বিতরণের জ্ঞান সম্পূর্ণ করি, যা হচ্ছে আমরা শব্দ-স্তরের সেম্পেন্টিক সমতুল্যের বৈষম এই শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা বহুক্ষেত্রের শিক্ষা শিক্ষার জন্য স্ট্যান্ডার বেরেট মডেল সাধারণ করি যেখানে আমরা বিবেরেটের মুখোশিত ভাষার মডেলিং এবং পরবর্তী শব্দের বাইনা আমাদের পরীক্ষার পরামর্শ প্রস্তাব করে যে আমাদের 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল তথ্য' বের্ট (লিবার্টি) শব্দের স্তরের সেমান্টিক সমতুল্যের জন্য বিশেষজ্ঞ, লেক্সিকোল Concretely, LIBERT outperforms BERT in 9 out of 10 tasks of the GLUE benchmark and is on a par with BERT in the remaining one.  Moreover, we show consistent gains on 3 benchmarks for lexical simplification, a task where knowledge about word-level semantic similarity is paramount, as well as large gains on lexical reasoning probes.", 'bs': "Pokazani su neodređeni modeli pretresanja kako bi olakšali širok raspon nužnih aplikacija NLP-a. Međutim, ovi modeli zadržavaju neke od ograničenja tradicionalnih statičkih riječi. Posebno, oni kodiraju samo distribucijske znanje dostupne u sirovoj tekstskoj korpori, uključene kroz ciljeve modeliranja jezika. U ovom poslu, dopunjavamo takvo distribucijsko znanje vanjskim leksičkim znanjem, to je da integriramo diskretno znanje o semantičkoj sličnosti riječima u pretkivanje. Za taj cilj generalizujemo standardni model BERT-a na višezadatačnu nastavu učenja gdje ćemo par maskiranog jezika BERT-a modela i ciljeva predviđanja presude sa pomoćnim zadatkom binarne riječi o klasifikaciji veze. Naši eksperimenti sugeriraju da naša 'Leksički Informirana' BERT (LIBERT), specijalizovana za semantičku sličnost riječi na nivou, pruža bolju izvedbu nego leksički slijepa 'vanilla' BERT na nekoliko zadataka za razumijevanje jezika. Konačno, LIBERT iznosi BERT u 9 od 10 zadataka skloništa GLUE-a i na par sa BERT-om u ostalih. Osim toga, pokazujemo konsekventne dobitke na 3 kriterije za leksičko jednostavljanje, zadatak u kojem je znanje o semantičkoj sličnosti riječi na nivou semantike, kao i velike dobitke leksičkog razuma.", 'ca': 'S\'ha demostrat que els models de pré-capacitació no supervisats faciliten una gran varietat d\'aplicacions de NLP avall. Aquests models, no obstant això, conserven algunes de les limitacions de l\'incorporació tradicional de paraules estàtiques. En particular, codifiquen només el coneixement de distribució disponible en texto brut corpora, incorporat a través d\'objectius de modelació lingüística. In this work, we complement such distributional knowledge with external lexical knowledge, that is, we integrate the discrete knowledge on word-level semantic similarity into pretraining.  To this end, we generalize the standard BERT model to a multi-task learning setting where we couple BERT\'s masked language modeling and next sentence prediction objectives with an auxiliary task of binary word relation classification.  Els nostres experiments suggereixen que el nostre BERT "Lexically Informed" (LIBERT), especialitzat en la similitud semàntica de nivell de paraules, produeix millor rendiment que el BERT "vanilla" llexicament cec en diverses tasques de comprensió de llenguatges. Concretely, LIBERT outperforms BERT in 9 out of 10 tasks of the GLUE benchmark and is on a par with BERT in the remaining one.  A més, mostren guanys consistents en tres punts de referència per a la simplificació lèxica, una tasca en la que el coneixement sobre la similitud semàntica de nivell de paraules és primordial, i grans guanys en sondes de raonament lèxic.', 'cs': 'Bylo prokázáno, že modely bez dohledu usnadňují širokou škálu následných aplikací NLP. Tyto modely si však zachovávají některá omezení tradičních statických slov vložení. Zejména zakódují pouze distribuční znalosti dostupné v korpusech surového textu, začleněné prostřednictvím cílů jazykového modelování. V této práci doplňujeme tyto distribuční znalosti externími lexikálními znalostmi, tj. integrujeme diskrétní znalosti o sémantické podobnosti na úrovni slova do předškolení. Za tímto účelem zobecňujeme standardní model BERT na víceúlohové učební nastavení, kde spárujeme modelování maskovaného jazyka BERT a cíle predikce dalších vět s pomocným úkolem klasifikace binárních vztahů slov. Naše experimenty naznačují, že náš "Lexicky informovaný" BERT (LIBERT), specializovaný na sémantickou podobnost na úrovni slov, přináší lepší výkon než lexicky slepý BERT při několika úkolech porozumění jazyků. Konkrétně řečeno, LIBERT překonává BERT v devíti z deseti úkolů GLUE benchmarku a je na stejné úrovni jako BERT ve zbývajícím. Kromě toho ukazujeme konzistentní zisky na třech benchmarkech pro lexikální zjednodušení, což je úkol, kde je znalost sémantické podobnosti na úrovni slova prioritní, stejně jako velké zisky na lexikálních argumentačních sondách.', 'et': 'On tõestatud, et järelevalveta eelõppemudelid hõlbustavad mitmesuguseid uue tootlusprogrammi järgnevaid rakendusi. Need mudelid säilitavad siiski mõned traditsiooniliste staatiliste sõnade manustamise piirangud. Eelkõige kodeerivad nad ainult toortekstkorporates kättesaadavad levitamisteadmised, mis on seotud keele modelleerimise eesmärkidega. Käesolevas töös täiendame selliseid distributsioonilisi teadmisi väliste leksikaalsete teadmistega, st integreerime diskreetsed teadmised sõnatasemel semantilise sarnasuse kohta eeltreeningusse. Selleks üldistame standardse BERT mudeli mitme ülesandega õppimise seadistuseks, kus ühendame BERT maskeeritud keele modelleerimise ja järgmise lause ennustamise eesmärgid binaarsete sõnasuhete klassifitseerimise abiülesandega. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et meie "Lexical Informed" BERT (LIBERT), spetsialiseerunud sõnatasemel semantilisele sarnasusele, annab parema tulemuse kui leksikalselt pime "vanilla" BERT mitmetel keelte mõistmise ülesannetel. Konkreetselt ületab LIBERT BERTi üheksas ülesandes kümnest GLUE võrdlusaluse ülesandest ning ülejäänud ülesandes on BERTiga võrdne. Lisaks näitame järjepidevat kasu sõnastiku lihtsustamise kolmel võrdlusalusel, mis on ülimalt oluline teadmiste kohta sõnatasemel semantilise sarnasuse kohta, samuti suurt kasu leksikaalse mõtlemise sondidel.', 'fi': "Ylläpitämättömien esikoulutusmallien on osoitettu helpottavan monenlaisia jatkojalostuksen sovelluksia. Nämä mallit kuitenkin säilyttävät joitakin perinteisiä staattisia sanaupotuksia koskevista rajoituksista. Erityisesti ne koodaavat vain raakatekstikorporeissa saatavilla olevaa jakelutietoa, joka on sisällytetty kielimallinnustavoitteiden kautta. Tässä työssä täydennämme tällaista jakelutietoa ulkoisella sanastotiedolla, eli integroimme diskreettisen tiedon sanatason semanttisesta samankaltaisuudesta esikoulutukseen. Tätä varten yleistämme BERT-mallin monitehtäväoppimisasetukseen, jossa yhdistämme BERT:n maskitun kielimallinnuksen ja seuraavan lauseen ennustamisen tavoitteet binaarisen sanasuhteen luokittelun aputehtävään. Kokeet viittaavat siihen, että sanatason semanttiseen samankaltaisuuteen erikoistunut 'Lexically Informed' BERT (LIBERT) tuottaa paremman suorituskyvyn kuin leksikallisesti sokea 'vanilla' BERT useissa kielen ymmärtämisen tehtävissä. Konkreettisesti LIBERT suoriutuu BERT:stä yhdeksässä kymmenestä GLUE-vertailutehtävästä ja on BERT:n tasolla jäljellä olevassa tehtävässä. Lisäksi osoitamme johdonmukaisia hyötyjä sanaston yksinkertaistamisen kolmesta vertailuarvosta, jossa tieto sanatason semanttisesta samankaltaisuudesta on ensiarvoisen tärkeää, sekä suuria hyötyjä sanaston päättelysondeista.", 'az': 'NLP proqramlarının geniş səviyyəsini asanlaşdırmaq üçün müəyyən edilməmiş pretraining modelləri göstərildi. Ancaq bu modellər, sadəcə olaraq statik sözlərin bəzi sınırlarını saxlayır. Özellikle, dil modellik məqsədləri ilə birləşdirilmiş sadiq bilgiləri yalnız çərdəli məktəb korporasında kodlayır. Bu işdə, biz böyük dağıtış elmi dış leksik elmi ilə tamamlayırıq, ki, sözlərin seviyyəti semantik similitəsini təkrar-təkrar barəsində müxtəlif elmi ilə birləşdiririk. Buna görə biz standart BERT modelini çoxlu işin öyrənməsi təyin etdik. Biz BERT\'nin maskəli dil modellərini və sonraki s özlərin təmin məqsədilərini binar sözlərin əlaqəsi klasifikasiyasının köməkçi işi ilə birlikdə təmin edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz "Leksik Bilən" BERT (LIBERT), sözlər seviyyəsi semantik similitəsi üçün özlərinə bənzəyir, leksiki kor \'vanilla\' BERT\'dan daha yaxşı performans verir. Təkcə, LIBERT GLUE benchmark ının 9 işindən BERT\'u üstün edir və geri qalanların BERT ilə birlikdə bir par ça üstündədir. Daha sonra, biz leksik basitləşdirmək üçün 3 benchmarklərdə müəyyən bir qəniməti göstəririk, söz-seviyyəti semantik similitəsi barəsində bilgi daha çox yüksək, laksici fikirləşdirmək sonlarında böyük qənimətlər də göstəririk.', 'id': "Model pretraining tidak diawasi telah menunjukkan untuk memudahkan jangkauan lebar aplikasi NLP turun. Model-model ini, bagaimanapun, memelihara beberapa batasan dari pembangunan kata statis tradisional. Terutama, mereka hanya mengkode pengetahuan distribusi yang tersedia dalam korpra teks mentah, terkandung melalui tujuan model bahasa. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita menyempurnakan pengetahuan distribusi seperti itu dengan pengetahuan eksternal lexik, yaitu, kita mengintegrasikan pengetahuan diskret pada persamaan semantis tingkat kata dalam latihan. To this end, we generalize the standard BERT model to a multi-task learning setting where we couple BERT's masked language modeling and next sentence prediction objectives with an auxiliary task of binary word relation classification.  Eksperimen kami menyarankan bahwa 'Lexically Informed' BERT (LIBERT) kami, khusus untuk persamaan semantis tingkat kata, memberikan prestasi yang lebih baik daripada 'vanilla' BERT secara lexik buta pada beberapa tugas pemahaman bahasa. Konkretnya, LIBERT melebihi BERT dalam 9 dari 10 tugas benchmark GLUE dan sama dengan BERT di yang tersisa. Selain itu, kita menunjukkan keuntungan konsisten pada 3 tanda referensi untuk penyimplifikasi lexik, tugas di mana pengetahuan tentang persamaan semantis tingkat kata adalah penting, serta keuntungan besar pada sonda pemikiran lexik.", 'jv': "model sing dibutuhke Alat-alat model iki dadi, dadi piye perusahaan kelas kuwi panggayutan. Awak-awak dhéwé kuwi ngkode ajeng-ajeng kanggo ngerasakno wis ana ing titik dhéwé, lan uwis kuwi nggawe tarjamakno ngono nggawe tarjamakno Nang lan iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno ning kejahatan luwih hayo, iki dadi, awak dhéwé entekaké kesempatan kanggo kelas sematik dhéwé ning langgar. To this end, we Generalizae the Standard BERT model to a multi-task Learning setting s Where we have a double BERT's Masked language modeing and next word preview goal with an help task of a Binary word Relative Awakdhéwé éntuk nggunakaké 'Informed Leksiké' BERT Saiki, LIBERT iso ngrusak BERT nang 9 uwong 10 dadi nggawe bentrum nggawe GLUE lan wis saben parar karo BERT dumadhi saben. Label", 'ha': "Unsupervised pretraining models have been shown to facilitate a wide range of downstream NLP applications.  @ info A cikin ƙayyade, suna kodi kawai da ilmi mai rarraba wanda ke da shi cikin makampuni raw na rubutu, an shigar da shi cikin abun misalin harshen. Daga wannan aikin, Munã cika sanin wannan da ke raba da ilmi na bakwai, ko kuma, za mu haɗa da ilmi mai tsawo a kan daidaita kalma-daraja zuwa ga littafin. Ga wannan, za mu ƙiƙira misalin BERT na daidaita zuwa wani muhalli na aikin aiki mai yawa, inda za mu sami misalin ayuka da aka rufe BERT da kuma abun gaba ga kalmar da za'a yi amfani da wani aikin lissafi na sauri biyu. Mijarayonmu yana ƙara cewa 'Leksically Agarant' BERT (LIBERT), wanda aka ƙayyade wa kalma-daraja na daidaita, yana bãyar da mafiya kyauta daga aikin littãfin da aka makanta na 'damalli' BERT a kan wasu aikin masu fahimta na harshe. Ina daidaita, LIBERT na samar BERT cikin 9 daga 10 aikin GLUU na ƙara a wani par da BERT cikin mai baka. Kayya, muna nuna kashi ta sami da mataimaki uku wa sauri, wani aikin da aka samu da ilmi a kan daidaita da kalma-daraja, da sami duk kashi mai girma a kan jarrabai masu fassarawa na leksi.", 'sk': "Pokazano je bilo, da nenadzorovani modeli predusposabljanja olajšujejo širok spekter aplikacij nadaljnje proizvodne energije. Ti modeli pa ohranjajo nekatere omejitve tradicionalnih statičnih besed. Še posebej kodirajo le distribucijsko znanje, ki je na voljo v surovih besedilnih korpusih, vključenih s cilji jezikovnega modeliranja. V tem delu takšno distribucijsko znanje dopolnjujemo z zunanjim leksikalnim znanjem, torej diskretno znanje o semantični podobnosti na besedni ravni vključujemo v predurjenje. V ta namen posplošimo standardni BERT model v večopravilno nastavitev učenja, kjer združimo BERT-ove cilje maskiranega jezikovnega modeliranja in napovedovanja naslednjih stavkov s pomožno nalogo klasifikacije binarnih besednih relacij. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da naš 'Lexical Informed' BERT (LIBERT), specializiran za semantično podobnost na ravni besed, zagotavlja boljšo učinkovitost kot leksično slepi 'vanilla' BERT pri več nalogah razumevanja jezika. LIBERT konkretno presega BERT v devetih od desetih nalog referenčnega merila GLUE in je v preostali enakovredni BERT. Poleg tega pokažemo dosledne dosežke pri treh referenčnih vrednostih za leksikalno poenostavitev, pri kateri je bistveno znanje o semantični podobnosti na ravni besed, pa tudi velike dosežke pri leksikalnih razmišljanjih.", 'he': 'הוכח שדוגמנים לא מעוקבים אחרי אימון מראש כדי להקל מגוון רחב של תוכניות NLP למטה. דוגמנים אלה, בכל אופן, שומרים חלק מהמגבלות של מילים סטטיות מסורתיות. במיוחד, הם קודדים רק את הידע המפיצה זמין בתוכנית טקסט ראויה, שמושתף באמצעות מטרות דוגמני שפה. בעבודה הזו, אנו משלים ידע פיצוי כזה עם ידע לקסיקלי חיצוני, כלומר, אנחנו משתלבים את ידע דיסקרטי על דמיון סמנטי ברמה מילים לתוך לימוד מראש. למטרה זו, אנו מגנרלים את דוגמנית BERT הסטנדרטית למסגרת לימוד במשימות רבות שבו אנו זוג את דוגמנית השפה המסווה של BERT ומטרות צפוי משפטים הבאים עם משימה עזרית של קליזציה מילים בינרית יחסים. הניסויים שלנו מציעים שהברט "מודיע לקסית" (ליברט), המומחה לדמיון סמנטי ברמה המילים, נותן ביצועים טובים יותר מאשר ברט "וונילה" העיוורת לקסית על מספר משימות הבנה לשפה. במיוחד, ליברט מבצע את BERT ב-9 מתוך 10 משימות של המרמז GLUE והוא שווה עם BERT בתוך השאר. חוץ מזה, אנו מראים היתרונות קבועות על 3 נקודות רמז להפשטה לקסיקה, משימה שבה הידע על דמיון סמנטי ברמה מילים הוא חשוב ביותר, כמו גם היתרונות גדולות על חוקי הגיון לקסי.', 'bo': "Unsupervised pretraining models have been shown to facilitate a wide range of downstream NLP applications. ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གནས་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞག་ཡོད། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ཁོང་ཚོས་ཡིག་འབྲེལ་ཁང་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཤེས་ཚུལ་རྣམས་གཅིག་པུ་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པ། In this work, we complement such distributional knowledge with external lexical knowledge, that is, we integrate the discrete knowledge on word-level semantic similarity into pretraining. To this end, we generalize the standard BERT model to a multi-task learning setting where we couple BERT's masked language modeling and next sentence prediction objectives with an auxiliary task of two words relation to classification. ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་འོད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ 'Lexically Informed'BERT(LIBERT)་་་ སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཡོད། ལྷག་པར་ཨིན། LIBERT དེ་ལས་ GLUE བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་9 ལས་10 ལས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་ BERT སི་གཞན་པའི་ནང་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་ནང་ཨིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་འབྲི་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་༣་རྣམས་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚེས་semantic similarity་རྩ"}
{'en': 'A Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier for Out-of-Domain Detection with Mahalanobis Space', 'pt': 'Um classificador baseado em distância generativo profundo para detecção fora de domínio com o espaço Mahalanobis', 'ar': 'مصنف عميق قائم على المسافة للاكتشاف خارج المجال مع مساحة ماهالانوبيس', 'fr': 'Un classificateur génératif basé sur la distance pour la détection hors domaine avec Mahalanobis Space', 'es': 'Un clasificador profundo generativo basado en la distancia para la detección fuera del dominio con Mahalanobis Space', 'ja': 'マハラノビススペースを備えた領域外検出用の深い生成距離ベースの分類子', 'hi': 'महालनोबिस स्पेस के साथ आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डिटेक्शन के लिए एक गहरी उत्पादक दूरी-आधारित क्लासिफायर', 'zh': '一本于深度生距分类器,用马哈拉诺比空间检测', 'ru': 'Глубокий генеративный дистанционный классификатор для внедоменного обнаружения с пространством Махаланобиса', 'ga': 'Aicmitheoir Cian-Ghinitheach Doimhneach le haghaidh Braite Lasmuigh den Fhearann le Spás Mahalanobis', 'ka': 'მაჰალონობისკოსტაციის გარეშე დემომინის განახლებისთვის კლასიფიერი', 'el': 'Ένας βαθιάς γενεαλογικός ταξινομητής με βάση την απόσταση για ανίχνευση εκτός πεδίου με το χώρο Μαχαλανόβη', 'hu': 'Egy mély generációs távolságalapú hirdető a tartományon kívüli észleléshez Mahalanobis térrel', 'it': 'Un Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier per il rilevamento fuori dominio con Mahalanobis Space', 'kk': 'Махаланобис бос орындағы домен сыртқы анықтау үшін түйінгі жаратылған қашықтық қашықтық классификаторы', 'lt': 'Giliavandenių generacinių nuotolių klasifikatorius, skirtas ne domeno aptikimui Mahalanobis erdvėje', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Berasas Jarak Generatif Dalam untuk Pengesanan Luar Domain dengan Ruang Mahalanobis', 'mk': 'Класификатор базиран на длабока генерација на далечина за детекција надвор од домен со просторот Махаланобис', 'ml': 'മഹാലാനോബിസ് സ്പേസുമായി ഡോമെയില്\u200d നിന്ന് പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ആഴത്തിലെ ജനററിവ് ഡിസ്റ്റന്\u200dസ് ബേസ്', 'mt': 'Klassifikatur ibbażat fuq id-Distanza Ġenerattiva Profonda għad-Detezzjoni barra mid-Domain bl-Ispazju tal-Mahalanobis', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Махаланобидын орон зай хамт гүн төрөлхтний зай-суурь хүрээлэн буй дотор тогтоох классификатор', 'pl': 'Klasyfikator oparty na odległości głębokiej generacji do wykrywania poza domeną przy użyciu przestrzeni Mahalanobis', 'ro': 'Un clasificator bazat pe distanță generativ profund pentru detectarea în afara domeniului cu spațiul Mahalanobis', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier for Out-Domain Detection with Mahalanobis Space', 'sv': 'En djup generativ distansbaserad annonsör för detektering utanför domänen med Mahalanobis utrymme', 'sr': 'Klasifikator za otkrivanje izvan domena sa Mahalanobis svemirom', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Mahalanobis Space کے ساتھ ایک عمیق پیدا کرنے والی فاصلہ بنیادی کلاسفیر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ phân tách dài với chế độ xa', 'bg': 'Дълбок генеративен дистанционен класификатор за откриване извън домейна с пространство Махаланобис', 'da': 'En dyb genererende afstandsbaseret klassificering til registrering uden for domæne med Mahalanobis Space', 'nl': 'Een diepe generatie op afstand gebaseerde classificator voor detectie buiten het domein met Mahalanobis-ruimte', 'hr': 'Klasifikator za otkrivanje van domena sa Mahalanobis svemirom na temelju duboke generacije', 'de': 'Ein Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier für Out-of-Domain-Erkennung mit Mahalanobis Space', 'ko': '깊이 생성 거리를 바탕으로 하는 마씨 공간 역외 검출 분류기', 'id': 'A Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier for Out-Domain Detection with Mahalanobis Space', 'fa': 'یک کلاس\u200cشناس\u200cکننده\u200cی فاصله\u200cی نسل عمیق برای کشف خارج از دامنه با فضای ماهالانوبیس', 'sw': 'A Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier for Out-of-Domain Detection with Mahalanobis Space', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Mahalanobis ýerleri bilen Taýşart Etmek üçin Golub jeneraly', 'am': 'A Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier for Out-of-Domain Detection with Mahalanobis Space', 'sq': 'Një klasifikues i thellë gjenerativ bazuar në distancë për zbulimin jashtë domenit me hapësirën Mahalanobis', 'az': 'Mahalanobis kosmosu ilə Dışarı Domenin keşfetməsi üçün Deep Generative Distance-Based Klasifikatör', 'hy': 'Մահալանոբիսի տարածության միջոցով բացահայտելու խորը գեներատիվ հեռավորության հիմնված դասակարգիչ', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Klasifikator za otkrivanje izvan domena sa Mahalanobis svemirom', 'ca': "Un classificador basat en la distància generativa profundaper la detecció fora del domini amb l'espai Mahalanobis", 'cs': 'Hluboký generační klasifikátor založený na vzdálenosti pro detekci mimo doménu s Mahalanobis Space', 'fi': 'Syvägeneratiivinen etäisyyspohjainen luokitus verkkotunnuksen ulkopuoliseen tunnistamiseen Mahalanobis Space -tilassa', 'et': 'Sügav generatiivne kauguspõhine klassifikaator domeeniväliseks tuvastamiseks Mahalanobis Space', 'jv': 'A deep Generative Distance-bazed CLSS for Out-of-domain detection with Nahlanobs space', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מסגר מבוסס מרחק גנרטיבי עמוק לגילוי מחוץ לתחום עם חלל Mahalanobis', 'sk': 'Globoko generativni razdaljni klasifikator za zaznavanje zunaj domene s prostorom Mahalanobis', 'bo': 'A Deep Generative Distance-Based Classifier for Out-of-Domain Detection with Mahalanobis Space'}
{'en': 'Detecting out-of-domain (OOD) input intents is critical in the task-oriented dialog system. Different from most existing methods that rely heavily on manually labeled OOD samples, we focus on the unsupervised OOD detection scenario where there are no labeled OOD samples except for labeled in-domain data. In this paper, we propose a simple but strong generative distance-based classifier to detect OOD samples. We estimate the class-conditional distribution on feature spaces of DNNs via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) to avoid over-confidence problems. And we use two distance functions, Euclidean and Mahalanobis distances, to measure the confidence score of whether a test sample belongs to OOD. Experiments on four benchmark datasets show that our method can consistently outperform the baselines.', 'es': 'La detección de intenciones de entrada fuera del dominio (OOD) es fundamental en el sistema de diálogo orientado a tareas. A diferencia de la mayoría de los métodos existentes que se basan en gran medida en muestras de OOD etiquetadas manualmente, nos centramos en el escenario de detección de OOD no supervisado en el que no hay muestras de OOD etiquetadas excepto los datos de dominio etiquetados En este artículo, proponemos un clasificador generativo basado en la distancia simple pero fuerte para detectar muestras de OOD. Estimamos la distribución condicional de clase en los espacios de características de las DNN mediante el análisis discriminante gaussiano (GDA) para evitar problemas de exceso de confianza. Y utilizamos dos funciones de distancia, distancias euclidiana y mahalanobis, para medir la puntuación de confianza de si una muestra de prueba pertenece a OOD. Los experimentos en cuatro conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que nuestro método puede superar sistemáticamente a las líneas de base.', 'fr': "La détection des intentions d'entrée hors domaine (OOD) est essentielle dans le système de dialogue orienté tâches. Contrairement à la plupart des méthodes existantes qui s'appuient fortement sur des échantillons OOD étiquetés manuellement, nous nous concentrons sur le scénario de détection d'OOD non supervisé où il n'y a pas d'échantillons OOD étiquetés sauf pour les données marquées dans le domaine. Dans cet article, nous proposons un classificateur génératif simple mais puissant basé sur la distance pour détecter les échantillons OOD. Nous estimons la distribution conditionnelle de classe sur les espaces de caractéristiques des DNN via l'analyse discriminante gaussienne (GDA) afin d'éviter les problèmes de confiance excessive. Et nous utilisons deux fonctions de distance, les distances euclidiennes et de Mahalanobis, pour mesurer le score de confiance selon lequel un échantillon de test appartient à OOD. Des expériences sur quatre ensembles de données de référence montrent que notre méthode peut constamment surpasser les niveaux de référence.", 'pt': 'A detecção de intenções de entrada fora do domínio (OOD) é fundamental no sistema de diálogo orientado a tarefas. Diferente da maioria dos métodos existentes que dependem muito de amostras OOD rotuladas manualmente, focamos no cenário de detecção de OOD não supervisionado, onde não há amostras OOD rotuladas, exceto para dados rotulados no domínio. Neste artigo, propomos um classificador baseado em distância generativo simples, mas forte, para detectar amostras OOD. Estimamos a distribuição condicional de classe em espaços de características de DNNs via análise discriminante gaussiana (GDA) para evitar problemas de excesso de confiança. E usamos duas funções de distância, distâncias Euclidiana e Mahalanobis, para medir a pontuação de confiança de uma amostra de teste pertencer ao OOD. Experimentos em quatro conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que nosso método pode superar consistentemente as linhas de base.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف مقاصد الإدخال خارج المجال (OOD) أمرًا بالغ الأهمية في نظام الحوار الموجه نحو المهام. تختلف عن معظم الطرق الحالية التي تعتمد بشكل كبير على عينات OOD المسمى يدويًا ، فإننا نركز على سيناريو اكتشاف OOD غير الخاضع للإشراف حيث لا توجد عينات OOD معنونة باستثناء البيانات الموجودة في المجال المصنفة. في هذا البحث ، نقترح مُصنِّفًا إنشائيًا بسيطًا ولكنه قوي قائم على المسافة لاكتشاف عينات OOD. نحن نقدر التوزيع الشرطي للفئة على مساحات ميزات DNNs عبر تحليل التمايز الغاوسي (GDA) لتجنب مشاكل الثقة المفرطة. ونستخدم دالتين للمسافات ، مسافات إقليدية ومهالانوبية ، لقياس درجة الثقة فيما إذا كانت عينة الاختبار تنتمي إلى OOD. تُظهر التجارب على أربع مجموعات بيانات معيارية أن طريقتنا يمكن أن تتفوق باستمرار على الخطوط الأساسية.', 'ja': 'ドメイン外（ OOD ）入力インテントの検出は、タスク指向ダイアログシステムで重要です。手動でラベル付けされたOODサンプルに大きく依存するほとんどの既存の方法とは異なり、ラベル付けされたドメイン内データを除いてラベル付けされたOODサンプルがない監視されていないOOD検出シナリオに焦点を当てています。本稿では、OODサンプルを検出するための単純でありながら強力な生成距離ベースの分類器を提案する。我々は、過信問題を回避するために、ガウス判別分析（ ＧＤＡ ）を介してＤＮＮの特徴空間上のクラス条件分布を推定する。2つの距離関数、ユークリッド距離とマハラノビス距離を使用して、被験試料がOODに属するかどうかの信頼度スコアを測定します。4つのベンチマークデータセットの実験では、当社の方法が一貫してベースラインを上回ることができることが示されています。', 'zh': '对面之语系统中,检测域外 (OOD) 输意至重。 与大抵多赖手动标 OOD 样本见法不同,专注无监督 OOD 检测方案,其除域内数据外,无标记之 OOD 样本。 本文之中,略举一种,而强大之基于生成离分类器以检测OOD样本。 吾以斯判(GDA)度DNN特征空间之类布列,以避过置信。 余以两距函数,欧氏与马哈拉诺比斯相去,以测测样本属OOD者置信度分否。 四准数集之实验,吾法可终始优于基线。', 'hi': 'कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणाली में आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन (OOD) इनपुट intents का पता लगाना महत्वपूर्ण है। मैन्युअल रूप से लेबल किए गए OOD नमूनों पर बहुत अधिक निर्भर करने वाले अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीकों से अलग, हम असुरक्षित OOD डिटेक्शन परिदृश्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जहां लेबल किए गए इन-डोमेन डेटा को छोड़कर कोई लेबल किए गए OOD नमूने नहीं हैं। इस पेपर में, हम ओओडी नमूनों का पता लगाने के लिए एक सरल लेकिन मजबूत उत्पादक दूरी-आधारित क्लासिफायर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम अति-आत्मविश्वास समस्याओं से बचने के लिए गाऊसी विभेदक विश्लेषण (जीडीए) के माध्यम से डीएनएन की सुविधा रिक्त स्थान पर वर्ग-सशर्त वितरण का अनुमान लगाते हैं। और हम दो दूरी कार्यों का उपयोग करते हैं, यूक्लिडियन और महालनोबिस दूरी, आत्मविश्वास स्कोर को मापने के लिए कि क्या परीक्षण का नमूना ओओडी से संबंधित है। चार बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि लगातार बेसलाइन को मात दे सकती है।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение внедоменных (OOD) входных интенций имеет решающее значение в диалоговой системе, ориентированной на задачу. В отличие от большинства существующих методов, которые в значительной степени зависят от образцов OOD, помеченных вручную, мы сосредоточены на сценарии неконтролируемого обнаружения OOD, в котором нет образцов OOD, помеченных вручную, за исключением помеченных внутридоменных данных. В этой статье мы предлагаем простой, но сильный генеративный классификатор на основе расстояния для обнаружения образцов OOD. Мы оцениваем классово-условное распределение на пространствах признаков DNN с помощью гауссового дискриминантного анализа (GDA), чтобы избежать проблем избыточной уверенности. И мы используем две функции расстояния, евклидовы и махаланобисовы расстояния, чтобы измерить оценку достоверности того, принадлежит ли испытуемый образец к OOD. Эксперименты с четырьмя эталонными наборами данных показывают, что наш метод может последовательно превосходить базовые линии.', 'ga': 'Tá sé ríthábhachtach cuspóirí ionchuir lasmuigh den fhearann (OOD) a bhrath sa chóras dialóige atá dírithe ar thascanna. Difriúil leis an gcuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann cheana féin a bhíonn ag brath go mór ar shamplaí OOD arna lipéadú de láimh, dírímid ar chás braite OOD gan mhaoirseacht nuair nach bhfuil aon samplaí OOD lipéadaithe ach amháin i gcás sonraí lipéadaithe san fhearann. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid aicmitheoir achar-bhunaithe giniúna simplí ach láidir chun samplaí OOD a bhrath. Déanaimid meastachán ar an dáileadh aicme-choinníollach ar shainspásanna DNNanna trí anailís idirdhealaithe Gaussach (GDA) chun fadhbanna ró-mhuiníne a sheachaint. Agus bainimid úsáid as dhá fheidhm achair, achair Eoiclídeach agus Mahalanobis, chun an scór muiníne a thomhas cibé an mbaineann sampla tástála le OOD. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar cheithre thacar sonraí tagarmhairc gur féidir lenár modh feidhmiú níos fearr ná na bonnlínte go seasta.', 'hu': 'A feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerben kritikus fontosságú a tartományonkívüli (OOD) bemeneti szándékok észlelése. A legtöbb meglévő módszertől eltérően, amelyek nagymértékben kézzel címkézett OOD mintákra támaszkodnak, a felügyelet nélküli OOD felismerési forgatókönyvre összpontosítunk, ahol nincsenek címkézett OOD minták, kivéve a címkézett tartományonbelüli adatokat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszerű, de erős generációs távolság alapú osztályozót javasolunk az OOD minták kimutatására. A túlzott konfidencia problémák elkerülése érdekében Gauss diszkrimináns analízis (GDA) segítségével becsüljük a DNN-ek tulajdonságtéreire vonatkozó osztály-feltételes eloszlását. És két távolságfüggvényt használunk, euklideai és mahalanobisz távolságokat, hogy megmérjük a konfidencia pontszámot, hogy egy tesztminta OOD-hez tartozik-e. Négy benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk következetesen felülmúlhatja az alapvető teljesítményt.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση προθέσεων εισόδου εκτός τομέα (OOD) είναι κρίσιμη στο σύστημα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο στην εργασία. Διαφορετικά από τις περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μεθόδους που βασίζονται σε μεγάλο βαθμό σε μη αυτόματο μαρκαρισμένο δείγμα, εστιάζουμε στο σενάριο ανίχνευσης χωρίς επίβλεψη, όπου δεν υπάρχουν μαρκαρισμένα δείγματα εκτός από τα μαρκαρισμένα δεδομένα εντός του τομέα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν απλό αλλά ισχυρό παραγωγικό ταξινομητή απόστασης για την ανίχνευση δειγμάτων OOD. Εκτιμούμε την κατανομή υπό όρους κλάσης στους χώρους χαρακτηριστικών των DNN μέσω Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) για την αποφυγή προβλημάτων υπερεμπιστοσύνης. Και χρησιμοποιούμε δύο συναρτήσεις απόστασης, τις αποστάσεις Ευκλείδειας και Μαχαλανόμπις, για να μετρήσουμε την βαθμολογία εμπιστοσύνης του αν ένα δείγμα δοκιμής ανήκει στην ΟΔ. Τα πειράματα σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να ξεπεράσει σταθερά τις γραμμές βάσης.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სისტემაში გარეშე დიალოგის გარეშე (OOD) მისამართება კრიტიკურია. უფრო მსგავსი მეტიდან განსხვავებულია, რომელიც მანძილურად ჩატვირთებულია OOD ჩატვირთების ჩატვირთვაზე, ჩვენ ფონსკურებულია OOD განახლების სინარიოში, სადაც არ არის ჩატვირთებული OOD ჩა ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში მხოლოდ, მაგრამ ძალიან ძალიან განტოლებული კლასიფიკაცია დავიწყებთ OOD მონაცემები. ჩვენ დავამწონეთ კლასის კონდიციონალური განყოფილება DNN-ის ფუნქციების სივრცეში დაუსიანური დისკრიმინალური ანალიზი (GDA) გამოცდილობა, რომ უფრო მეტი დარწმუ და ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ორი განტოლებული ფუნქციები, ეუკლიდიან და მაჰალანობისგან განტოლებები, რომ განსაჯერების მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების განტოლება. 4 ბენქმარკის მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მეთოდი შეიძლება მხოლოდ გავაკეთოთ ბაზის ხაზები.', 'it': "Il rilevamento degli intenti di input out-of-domain (OOD) è fondamentale nel sistema di dialogo orientato alle attività. Diversamente dalla maggior parte dei metodi esistenti che si basano fortemente su campioni OOD etichettati manualmente, ci concentriamo sullo scenario di rilevamento OOD non supervisionato in cui non ci sono campioni OOD etichettati tranne per i dati in-domain etichettati. In questo articolo, proponiamo un semplice ma forte classificatore generativo basato sulla distanza per rilevare campioni OOD. Stimiamo la distribuzione condizionale di classe sugli spazi feature delle DNN tramite l'analisi discriminante Gaussiana (GDA) per evitare problemi di sovraconfidenza. E usiamo due funzioni di distanza, distanze Euclide e Mahalanobis, per misurare il punteggio di confidenza se un campione appartiene a OOD. Esperimenti su quattro set di dati di benchmark dimostrano che il nostro metodo può costantemente superare le linee di base.", 'lt': 'Detecting out-of-domain (OOD) input intents is critical in the task-oriented dialog system.  Skirtingai nuo daugumos esamų metodų, kurie labai priklauso nuo rankiniu būdu pažymėtų OOD mėginių, daugiausia dėmesio skiriame nepastebimam OOD nustatymo scenarijui, kuriame nėra pažymėtų OOD mėginių, išskyrus pažymėtus domeno duomenis. Šiame dokumente siūlome paprastą, bet stiprų kartų atstumu pagrįstą klasifikatorių OOD mėginiams aptikti. Apskaičiuojame klasės sąlyginį DNN pasiskirstymą savybių skyriuose Gausijos diskriminacinės analizės (GDA) būdu, kad būtų išvengta pernelyg didelio pasitikėjimo problemų. Ir mes naudojame dvi atstumų funkcijas, Euklideano ir Mahalanobio atstumus, kad išmatuotume patikimumo rezultatą, ar bandinys priklauso OOD. Keturių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali nuosekliai viršyti bazines vertes.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на намерите за внесување надвор од домен (OOD) е критично во системот на дијалог ориентиран на задачите. Различно од повеќето постоечки методи кои многу се потпираат на рачно означени примероци на ОД, се фокусираме на ненадгледуваното сценарио за детекција на ОД каде што нема означени примероци на ОД освен означени податоци во доменот. Во овој весник предложуваме едноставен, но силен генерациски класификатор базиран на далечина за детектирање на примероци на ООД. We estimate the class-conditional distribution on feature spaces of DNNs via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) to avoid over-confidence problems.  And we use two distance functions, Euclidean and Mahalanobis distances, to measure the confidence score of whether a test sample belongs to OOD.  Експериментите на четири бази на податоци покажуваат дека нашиот метод константно може да ги надмине базите.', 'kk': 'Домен сыртқы (OOD) кіріс мақсаттарын тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог жүйесінде анықтау мүмкіндікті. Қолмен OOD үлгілеріне қатысты әдістердің көпшілігінен айырмашылығында, домендегі деректерден басқа, OOD үлгілері жазылмаған OOD үлгілеріне қатысты. Бұл қағазда, OOD үлгілерін анықтау үшін қарапайым, бірақ күшті қашықтық қашықтың негіздеген классификаторын таңдаймыз. Гауссияның дискриминалды анализ (GDA) арқылы DNN мүмкіндіктерінің орындарының класс шарттарының үлестірімін бағалаймыз. Біз екі қашықтық функциясын, Еклидеан және Махаланобис қашықтығын қолданып, сынақтар үлгісінің OOD қатынасына қатынасыз ба? Төрт белгі деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелер тәртібіміздің негізгі жолдардың тәжірибесінен тыс болуын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Mengesan niat input luar-domain (OOD) adalah kritikal dalam sistem dialog orientasi tugas. Berbeza dari kebanyakan kaedah yang ada yang bergantung sangat pada sampel OOD yang ditabel secara manual, kami fokus pada skenario pengesan OOD yang tidak diawasi di mana tiada sampel OOD yang ditabel kecuali data dalam domain yang ditabel. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan satu klasifikasi yang mudah tetapi kuat yang berasaskan jarak generasi untuk mengesan sampel OOD. Kami menghargai distribusi kelas-syarat pada ruang ciri DNN melalui analisis Gaussian discriminant (GDA) untuk menghindari masalah terlalu percaya diri. Dan kita gunakan dua fungsi jarak, jarak Euclidean dan Mahalanobis, untuk mengukur skor kepercayaan sama ada sampel ujian milik OOD. Eksperimen pada empat set data benchmark menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita boleh secara konsisten melampaui garis dasar.', 'ml': 'ഡൊമൈനില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്ന ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ജോലിയുടെ സംവി കൈയ്യില്\u200d ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തിയ OOD മാമ്പുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള മികച്ച രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, നമ്മള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത OOD കണ്ടെത്തുന്ന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ പക്ഷെ ശക്തിയുള്ള ജനററിവ് ദൂരത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d പരിശോധിക ഗാസ്സിയന്\u200d വ്യത്യാസവിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഒഴിവാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്സിലെ ക്ലാസ് നിശ്ചയിക്കുന്ന വിതരണ സ്ഥലങ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് ദൂരം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, യൂക്ലിഡിയനും മഹാലാനോബിസും ദൂരം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു പരീക്ഷണ ശാമ്പില്\u200d ഓ ഓ നാല് ബെന്\u200dക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ന', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ intenzjonijiet ta’ input barra d-dominju (OOD) hija kritika fis-sistema ta’ djalogu orjentat lejn ix-xogħol. B’differenza mill-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi eżistenti li jiddependu ħafna fuq kampjuni ta’ OOD ittikkettati manwalment, aħna niffokaw fuq ix-xenarju ta’ detezzjoni ta’ OOD mhux sorveljat fejn ma hemmx kampjuni ta’ OOD ittikkettati ħlief għal dejta ttikkettata fid-dominju. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu klassifikatur sempliċi iżda ġenerattiv b’saħħtu bbażat fuq id-distanza biex jinstabu kampjuni tal-OOD. Aħna nistmaw id-distribuzzjoni kundizzjonali tal-klassi fuq spazji karatteristiċi tad-DNNs permezz tal-analiżi diskriminanti Gaussjana (GDA) biex jiġu evitati problemi ta’ kunfidenza żejda. And we use two distance functions, Euclidean and Mahalanobis distances, to measure the confidence score of whether a test sample belongs to OOD.  L-esperimenti fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza juru li l-metodu tagħna jista’ b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż il-linji bażi.', 'no': 'Dette er kritisk i oppgåveorienterte dialogsystemet for å finna ut- av- domene (OOD). Fleire av dei fleste eksisterande metodane som er kraftig på manuelt merkelige OOD-prøver, fokuserer vi på den ikkje oppretta OOD-oppdagingsscenarioen der det ikkje finst nokon merkelige OOD-prøver unntatt for merkelige i domenedata. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein enkel, men sterk genererande avstandsbasert klassifisering for å finna OOD-prøver. Vi vurderer klassesconditional distribusjon på funksjonsplasser av DNN via Gaussisk diskriminasjonanalyse (GDA) for å unngå overtillit. Og vi bruker to avstandsfunksjonar, Euclidean og Mahalanobis-avstandar, for å måle tillit til at eit testprøve høyrer til OOD. Eksperimentar på fire benchmarkdatasett viser at metoden vår kan konsekvent utføra baselinjene.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie intencji wejścia poza domeną (OOD) ma kluczowe znaczenie w systemie dialogowym zorientowanym na zadania. W odróżnieniu od większości istniejących metod, które w dużej mierze opierają się na ręcznie oznakowanych próbkach OOD, koncentrujemy się na scenariuszu wykrywania OOD bez nadzoru, w którym nie ma oznakowanych próbek OOD z wyjątkiem oznakowanych danych wewnątrz domeny. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy prosty, ale silny klasyfikator oparty na odległości generacyjnej do wykrywania próbek OOD. Szacujemy rozkład warunkowy klasy na przestrzeniach funkcji DNN za pomocą Gaussowskiej analizy dyskryminantów (GDA), aby uniknąć problemów z nadmierną ufnością. I używamy dwóch funkcji odległości, odległości Euklideana i Mahalanobisa, aby mierzyć wynik zaufania, czy próbka testowa należy do OOD. Eksperymenty na czterech zestawach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że nasza metoda może konsekwentnie przewyższać linie bazowe.', 'mn': 'Холбооны (OOD) оролцооны төлөвлөгөөг тайлбарлах нь ажлын ориентиролт диалог системд чухал. Ихэнх суурилсан арга замын өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр OOD жишээн дээр хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн. ОOD шинжлэх ухааны хувилбар дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулагдаагүй OOD жишээн байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид OOD жишээ олж мэдэхэд энгийн, хүчирхэг урт зай дээр суурилсан классификаторыг санал болгож байна. Бид Гауссийн ялгаатай шинжилгээ (ГДА) аргаар ДНХ-ын өргөн зай дээр хичээл шаардлагатай хуваарилалтыг үнэлдэг. Мөн бид хоёр зай функцийг хэрэглэдэг, Еуклидиан болон Махаланобисын зай, шалгалтын жишээ нь ООД-ын хамааралтай эсэхийг хэмжээнд итгэл үнэ цэнэтэй. Дөрвөн банк өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бидний арга нь суурь шулуунуудыг үргэлж илүү олох боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Detectarea intențiilor de intrare în afara domeniului (OOD) este esențială în sistemul de dialog orientat spre activități. Diferit de majoritatea metodelor existente care se bazează în mare măsură pe eșantioane OOD etichetate manual, ne concentrăm pe scenariul de detectare OOD nesupravegheat în cazul în care nu există eșantioane OOD etichetate cu excepția datelor din domeniu etichetate. În această lucrare, propunem un clasificator generativ bazat pe distanță simplu, dar puternic pentru detectarea probelor OOD. Estimăm distribuția condiționată de clasă pe spațiile caracteristici ale DNN-urilor prin analiza discriminantă Gaussiană (GDA) pentru a evita problemele de supra-încredere. Și folosim două funcții de distanță, distanțele Euclidene și Mahalanobis, pentru a măsura scorul de încredere dacă o mostră de test aparține OOD. Experimentele efectuate pe patru seturi de date de referință arată că metoda noastră poate depăși în mod constant valorile de referință.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje ulaznih namjera izvan domena (OOD) je kritično u sistemu dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Drugačije od većine postojećih metoda koje se teško oslanjaju na ručno označene uzorke OOD-a, fokusiramo se na neodređeni scenario otkrivanja OOD-a gde nema označenih uzorka OOD-a osim označenih podataka u domenu. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavnu, ali jaku generativnu klasifikaciju na osnovu udaljenosti da otkrijemo uzorke OOD-a. Procjenjujemo uslovnu distribuciju klase o funkcionalnim prostorijama DNN putem Gausijske diskriminacijske analize (BDP) kako bi izbjegli probleme sa prekovjerenjem povjerenja. Koristimo dve funkcije udaljenosti, Euklidean i Mahalanobis udaljenosti, kako bi izmjerili rezultat povjerenja o tome da li uzorak test pripada OOD-u. Eksperimenti na četiri seta podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naša metoda može konstantno nadmašiti osnovne linije.', 'sv': 'Det är viktigt att upptäcka OOD-inmatningsintentioner utanför domänen i det uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystemet. Till skillnad från de flesta befintliga metoder som är starkt beroende av manuellt märkta OOD-prover fokuserar vi på det oövervakade OOD-detekteringsscenariot där det inte finns några märkta OOD-prover förutom märkta in-domändata. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en enkel men stark generativ avståndsbaserad klassificering för att upptäcka OOD prover. Vi uppskattar klassvillkorad fördelning på funktionsutrymmen för DNN via Gaussian Discriminant Analysis (GDA) för att undvika överkänslighetsproblem. Och vi använder två avståndsfunktioner, Euclidean och Mahalanobis avstånd, för att mäta konfidensinspoängen för huruvida ett testprov tillhör OOD. Experiment på fyra benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att vår metod konsekvent kan överträffa baslinjerna.', 'so': 'Ku baaraandegista qalabka (OOD) waa muhiim ku ah nidaamka diyaarinta shaqada. Isku duwan qaababka aad u badan oo ku kalsoonaan samooyinka OOD ee si gacan ah loo isticmaalay, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa sawir aan la ilaalinayn OOD oo aan lagu qorin samooyinka OOD oo aan lagu qorin maamulka lagu qoray mooyaane. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa fasalka fudud ee dhaqaalaha ee fog ku saleysan si aan u ogaano samooyinka OOD. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaybinta fasalka sharafta ah oo ku saabsan goobaha gaarka ah ee DNNs, baaritaanka takoorka (GDA) ee Gaussian si aan uga fogaanno dhibaatooyinka kalsoonaanta. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa laba shaqooyin oo fog, wadamada Euclidiya iyo Mahalanobis, si aan u qiyaasno imtixaanka imtixaanka inay ka mid tahay OOD. Imtixaanka ku qoran afar taariikhda ayaa tusi kara in qaabkeenkeenu ay ku sii socon karto aasaaska.', 'si': 'වැඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාද පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න. වෙනස් විදියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඉතිරියට ඇති OOD සැම්පල් වලට බලාපොරොත්තු විදියට, අපි අ මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂකයෙක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා OOD සැමැල්ම් හොයාගන අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගෝසියාන් විශ්වාස විශ්ලේෂණය (GDA) මධ්\u200dයම අපි දුරස්ථ වැඩක් දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, යුක්ලිඩියාන් සහ මහාලානෝබිස් දුරස්ථානයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, ඔවුඩ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් හතරයි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පුළුවන් විද', 'ta': 'டொமைனிலிருந்து வெளியேறுதல் (OOD) உள்ளீட்டு உள்ளீட்டு உள்ளீட்டு உள்ளீடுகள் செயல்பாட்டு செலுத்தப்பட்ட உரையா OOD மாதிரிகளை கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிட்ட முறைகளில் பெரும்பாலான இருக்கும் முறைகளில் இருந்து வேறுபாடு, நாம் காப்பாற்றப்படாத OOD கண்டுபிடிப்பு காட்சியில இந்த காகிதத்தில், OOD மாதிரிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு எளிய ஆனால் வலிமையான பொது தூரத்தில் வகுப்பானை நாம் பரிந்துர நம்பிக்கைக்கு மேலும் பிரச்சனைகளை தவிர்க்க DNNs குணங்கள் இடைவெளிகள் மீது வகுப்பு நிபந்தனையை நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். இரண்டு தூரத்தின் செயல்பாடுகள், யுக்லிடியன் மற்றும் மஹாலானோபிஸ் தூரத்தை நாம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், ஒரு சோதனை மாதிரி OOD சொந்தமா  நான்கு பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனை', 'ur': 'ڈومین (OOD) کے باہر نکلنے کے مطابق اپنا انتظام مشخص کرنا کام-oriented диалог سیسٹم میں ضرورت ہے. بہت سے موجود طریقے سے متفاوت ہیں جو اپنے ہاتھ سے لیبل کی OOD نمونے پر بھاری اعتماد رکھتے ہیں، ہم نے ناپابندی OOD شناسایی سناریو پر تمرکز کیا ہے جہاں اوOD نمونے نہیں لکھے جاتے مگر ڈومین میں لکھے ہوئے ڈاٹے کے علاوہ. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ساده لیکن مضبوط جینرائیٹ ڈیٹ بنیادی کلاسیٹر کی پیشنهاد کریں کہ OOD نمونے پتہ لیں. ہم نے گاوسی کے اختلاف کے ذریعے DNN کے فائدہ جگہ پر کلاس-کنڈیسی تقسیم کا تقسیم کیا ہے کہ بہت زیادہ اعتماد کے مسئلہ سے پرہیز کریں. اور ہم دو فاصلہ فاصلہ استعمال کرتے ہیں، یوکلیڈین اور مہالانوبیس فاصلہ کے لئے، کہ ایک امتحان نمونہ OOD کے لئے ہے یا نہیں. چار بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ بنسٹ لینوں سے باقی رہ سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu qogʻozda, biz OOD misollarini aniqlash uchun oddiy va sterk generativ masofadagi darajasini talab qilamiz. Biz Gaussian ajratish (GDA) tomonidan foydalanish uchun DNNNning xossalari darajasi tarqatishni qiymatimiz. Biz ikkita uzun funksiyalarini, Euklidan va Mahalanobis orasidagi orada ishlatamiz. Sinov samol OOD'ning imkoniyatlarini o'zgartirish mumkin. 4 benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibida eksport qilish imtiyozlarimiz asosiy satrlarni davom etishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện nội dung ngoài miền (OOOD) là then chốt trong hệ thống thoại hướng nhiệm vụ. Khác với hầu hết các phương pháp tồn tại dựa trên các mẫu OOOD tự dán nhãn, chúng ta tập trung vào một trường hợp chưa được giám sát, nơi không có mẫu OOOD dán nhãn ngoại trừ các dữ liệu nội bộ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một nhà phân loại bậc từ xa đơn giản nhưng mạnh để phát hiện mẫu OOOD. Chúng tôi ước lượng phân phối cấp độ xã hội về các khu vực đặc trưng của DNS qua phân tích chủ động kiểu Gauss (GDA) để tránh rắc rối quá tự tin. Và chúng tôi dùng hai chức năng khoảng cách, khoảng cách Euclide và Mahalanobis, để đo tỉ số bí mật của việc thử nghiệm có thuộc về OOOD hay không. Thí nghiệm trên bốn tập tin tiêu chuẩn cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể hoàn thành các đường hầm.', 'bg': 'Откриването на входни намерения извън домейна (OOD) е от решаващо значение в ориентираната към задачите диалогова система. За разлика от повечето съществуващи методи, които разчитат в голяма степен на ръчно етикетирани проби, ние се фокусираме върху сценария за откриване без надзор, при който няма етикетирани проби с изключение на етикетирани в домейна данни. В настоящата статия предлагаме прост, но силен генеративен дистанционен класификатор за откриване на проби от ОД. Ние оценяваме условното разпределение на класа върху функционалните пространства на ДНН чрез гаусски дискриминантен анализ (ГДА), за да се избегнат проблеми със свръхдоверието. И използваме две функции за дистанция, Евклидово и Махаланобис разстояния, за да измерим доверителния резултат дали дадена проба принадлежи на ООД. Експериментите с четири базови набора данни показват, че методът ни може последователно да надминава базовите линии.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje ulaznih namjera izvan domena (OOD) kritično je u sustavu dijaloga orientiranog na zadatke. Drugačije od većine postojećih metoda koje se teško oslanjaju na ručno označene uzorke OOD-a, fokusiramo se na neodređeni scenario otkrivanja OOD-a gdje nema označenih uzorka OOD-a osim podataka označenih u domenu. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavnu, ali snažnu generativnu klasifikaciju za otkrivanje uzorka OOD-a. Procjenjujemo područje klase uvjetnog distribucije o funkcionalnim prostorijama DNN-a putem Gausijske diskriminacijske analize (BDP) kako bi izbjegli probleme s prekovjerenjem povjerenja. Koristimo dvije udaljene funkcije, Euclidean i Mahalanobis udaljenosti, kako bi mjerili rezultat povjerenja o tome da li uzorak testiranja pripada OOD-u. Eksperimenti na četiri temeljne baze podataka pokazuju da naša metoda može konstantno nadmašiti osnovne linije.', 'da': "Det er afgørende i det opgaveorienterede dialogsystem at registrere input uden for domænet (OOD). Forskellig fra de fleste eksisterende metoder, der er stærkt afhængige af manuelt mærkede OOD-prøver, fokuserer vi på det uautoriserede OOD-detekteringsscenarie, hvor der ikke er mærkede OOD-prøver undtagen mærkede in-domæne data. I denne artikel foreslår vi en enkel, men stærk generativ afstandsbaseret klassificering til at detektere OOD prøver. Vi estimerer den klassebetingede fordeling på funktionsrum af DNN'er via Gaussian Discriminant Analyse (GDA) for at undgå overkonfidensisproblemer. Og vi bruger to afstandsfunktioner, Euclidean og Mahalanobis afstande, til at måle konfidensscoren af, om en testprøve tilhører OOD. Eksperimenter på fire benchmark datasæt viser, at vores metode konsekvent kan overgå basislinjerne.", 'nl': "Het detecteren van out-of-domain invoerintenties (OOD) is cruciaal in het taakgerichte dialoogsysteem. Anders dan de meeste bestaande methoden die sterk afhankelijk zijn van handmatig gelabelde OOD-samples, richten we ons op het niet-begeleide OOD-detectiescenario waarbij er geen gelabelde OOD-samples zijn, behalve gelabelde in-domein gegevens. In dit artikel stellen we een eenvoudige maar sterke generatieve distance-based classificator voor om OOD monsters te detecteren. We schatten de klasse-voorwaardelijke verdeling op kenmerkruimten van DNN's via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) om overconfidentie problemen te voorkomen. En we gebruiken twee afstandsfuncties, Euclidische en Mahalanobis afstanden, om de vertrouwensscore te meten van of een testmonster tot OOD behoort. Experimenten op vier benchmark datasets laten zien dat onze methode consistent de basislijnen kan overtreffen.", 'id': 'Mengeteksi niat masukan luar domain (OOD) adalah kritis dalam sistem dialog orientasi tugas. Berbeda dari kebanyakan metode yang ada yang bergantung sangat pada sampel OOD yang ditabel secara manual, kami fokus pada skenario deteksi OOD yang tidak diawasi di mana tidak ada sampel OOD yang ditabel kecuali data yang ditabel dalam domain. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah klasifikasi sederhana tapi kuat generasi berdasarkan jarak untuk mendeteksi sampel OOD. We estimate the class-conditional distribution on feature spaces of DNNs via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) to avoid over-confidence problems.  Dan kami menggunakan dua fungsi jarak, jarak Euclidean dan Mahalanobis, untuk mengukur skor kepercayaan apakah sampel tes milik OOD. Eksperimen pada empat set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa metode kita secara konsisten dapat melampaui garis dasar.', 'ko': '임무를 위한 대화 시스템에서 역외 입력 의도를 탐지하는 것은 매우 중요하다.대부분의 기존 방법이 인공적으로 표시된 OOD 샘플에 심각하게 의존하는 것과 달리 우리는 감독이 없는 OOD 검측 장면에 주목한다. 그 중에서 역내에 표시된 데이터를 제외하고 표시된 OOD 샘플이 없다.본고에서 우리는 간단하지만 생성 거리를 바탕으로 하는 분류기를 제시하여 OOD 샘플을 검출했다.GDA(Gass Paracture Analysis)를 통해 DNN 피쳐 공간의 클래스 조건 분포를 추정하여 과도한 신뢰 문제를 방지합니다.우리는 두 개의 거리 함수, 유클리드 거리와 마씨 거리를 사용하여 샘플이 OOD에 속하는지 여부를 측정한다.네 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리의 방법이 시종 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'de': 'Das Erkennen von Out-of-Domain (OOD) Eingabeintentionen ist im aufgabenorientierten Dialogsystem von entscheidender Bedeutung. Anders als die meisten existierenden Methoden, die stark auf manuell beschriftete OOD-Proben angewiesen sind, konzentrieren wir uns auf das unbeaufsichtigte OOD-Erkennungsszenario, bei dem es außer markierten In-Domain-Daten keine markierten OOD-Proben gibt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen einfachen, aber starken generativen Abstandsbasierten Klassifikator vor, um OOD-Proben zu detektieren. Wir schätzen die klassenbedingte Verteilung auf Merkmalsräume von DNNs mittels Gaußscher Diskriminantanalyse (GDA) ab, um Überkonformitätsprobleme zu vermeiden. Und wir verwenden zwei Entfernungsfunktionen, Euklidische und Mahalanobis Entfernungen, um den Konfidenzwert zu messen, ob eine Testprobe zu OOD gehört. Experimente an vier Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unsere Methode die Baselines durchweg übertreffen kann.', 'fa': 'شناسایی هدف ورودی خارج از دومین (OOD) در سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ مسئله مهم است. متفاوت از بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود که به طور سنگین بر نمونه\u200cهای OOD به دست نشان داده می\u200cشوند، ما روی سناریو شناسایی OOD بی\u200cپایه تمرکز می\u200cکنیم که نمونه\u200cهای OOD به جز داده\u200cهای دامنی نشان داده نمی\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک راهنمایی ساده ولی قوی بسیار محرمانه\u200cای بر اساس فاصله\u200cای برای شناسایی نمونه\u200cهای OOD. ما توزیع شرایط کلاس را در فضای ویژه DNN با طریق تحلیل جدایی گاوسی (GDA) تقریبا می\u200cکنیم تا از مشکلات زیادی اعتماد جلوگیری کند. و ما از دو تابع فاصله فاصله\u200cای استفاده می\u200cکنیم، یوکلیدین و ماهالانوبیس فاصله\u200cهای فاصله، تا نقاط اعتماد را اندازه گیری کنیم که آیا نمونه آزمایش به OOD تعلق دارد. تجربه\u200cهایی روی چهار مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ابزار نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما می\u200cتواند همیشه از خط\u200cهای ابزار برتر باشد.', 'tr': "Otomatik gaýd edilen niýetleri gören bölegi görkezilýän dijalog sisteminde wajypdyr. Öň elle etilen OOD örneklerine gollanýan iň köp taýýarlanan yönlerden beýleki görnüşler, biz öz içinde etilen etiket edilmedik OOD deteksiýasynyň senaryoyna fokus edýäris. Bu kagyzda, OOD örneklerini detek etmek üçin basit ýöne güýçli döredici bir klassifikatçi teklip edýäris We estimate the class-conditional distribution on feature spaces of DNNs via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) to avoid over-confidence problems. We biz iki uzaklyk fonksiýany, Euklidean we Mahalanobis uzaklaryny ulanýarys, bir synagyň OOD'a degişligini ölçürmek üçin. Dört benchmark sanatyndaky denetimler biziň metodamyzyň basehatlary diňe çykyp biljekdigini görkezýär.", 'sw': 'Kugundua malengo ya kutolewa ndani (OOD) ni muhimu katika mfumo wa mazungumzo yanayoelekea kazi. Tofauti na mbinu nyingi zilizopo ambazo zinategemea vibaya vipimo vya OOD vilivyowekwa kwa mkono, tunajikita kwenye eneo la kutambua OOD ambapo hakuna sampuli za OOD isipokuwa na taarifa za ndani. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza fasihi rahisi lakini yenye nguvu yenye umbali wa mbali ili kutambua sampuli za OOD. Tunakadiria usambazaji wa mazingira katika maeneo husika ya DNN kupitia uchambuzi wa ubaguzi wa Gaussia (GDA) kuepuka na matatizo mengi ya imani. Na tunatumia kazi mbili za umbali, distance ya Euclidia na Mahalanobis, ili kupima vipimo vya imani vya kama mtihani wa jaribio ni wa OOD. Majaribio kwenye seti za taarifa nne za benchmark yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu inaweza kufanya msingi.', 'af': "Kies uit- van- domein (OOD) invoer intekens is kritiese in die taak- orienteerde dialoog stelsel. Verskillende van mees bestaande metodes wat swaar op Hand gemerk OOD voorbeelde vertoon, ons fokus op die ongespeurde OOD beskrywing scenario waar daar is geen etiketeerde OOD voorbeelde behalwe vir etiketeerde in- domein data. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige maar sterk genereerbaar afstand-gebaseerde klassifiseerder om OOD voorbeelde te ontdek. Ons estimateer die klas-voorwaardige verspreiding op funksie spasies van DNN deur Gaussian diskrimineente analisie (GDA) om oorweldige vertroue probleme te verlos. En ons gebruik twee afstand funksies, Euclidean en Mahalanobis afstande, om die vertroue telling van of 'n toets voorbeeld aan OOD behoort. Eksperimente op vier benchmark datastelle vertoon dat ons metode kan konsistentlik die basis lyn uitvoer.", 'hy': 'Օբեմին դուրս գտնվող (OOO) ներմուծի նպատակների հայտնաբերումը կարևոր է խնդիրների ուղղությամբ գտնվող հաղորդակցման համակարգում: Մենք տարբերվում ենք գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդներից, որոնք մեծ քանակությամբ հիմնված են ձեռքով նշանների վրա, մենք կենտրոնանում ենք անվերահսկված OOO հայտնաբերման սցենարի վրա, որտեղ չկան նշաններ OOO, բացառությամբ նշանների, որոնք նշաններ են նշաններում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ, բայց ուժեղ սերունդների հեռավորության հիմնված դասակարգիչ OOO նմուշների հայտնաբերելու համար: We estimate the class-conditional distribution on feature spaces of DNNs via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) to avoid over-confidence problems.  Եվ մենք օգտագործում ենք երկու հեռավորության ֆունկցիաներ՝ Եուկլիդիայի և Մահալանոբիսի հեռավորությունները, որպեսզի չափենք վստահության արդյոք փորձարկման նմուշը OOO-ի է: Experiments on four benchmark datasets show that our method can consistently outperform the baselines.', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s በOOD ምሳሌዎች ላይ በብዛት የሚታመኑ ሥርዓቶች በተለየ፣ ከዶሜን ዳታዎች በቀር የOOD ምሳሌዎች በማይታወቅ ላይ ያልጠበቁትን OOD ማስታወቂያውን እናቆማለን፡፡ In this paper, we propose a simple but strong generative distance-based classifier to detect OOD samples.  የጋውስሲ ተቃዋሚዎች (GDA) በሚያረጋግጡ መከራዎች ላይ እንዲርቁ የ.ኤን አካባቢ ክፍለ ክፍል አካባቢ ክፍል እናቆጥራለን፡፡ ሁለትም የሩቅ ሥርዓት፣ ዩክሊዲያን እና ማሃላኖብ ርቀት እናስቀምጣለን፤ ፈተናው ምሳሌ OOD መሆኑን እናስፈራራለን፡፡ በአራቱ benchmark ዳታ ማሳየት ፈተናዎች ማሳየት የዓይነታችን ሥርዓት መሠረትን በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡", 'az': "Döyüşə-qovluq (OOD) giriş niyyətlərini təşkil etmək işarə ilə danışmaq sistemində kritik olar. Öz əlində etiketlənmiş OOD nümunələrinə ağır təvəkkül edən çox mevcut metodlardan fərqli olaraq, etiketlənməyən OOD keşfetmə senaryasına odaqlanırıq. Bu kağızda, OOD nümunələrini keşfetmək üçün basit, çox qüvvətli bir generikatlı uzaqlaşdırıcı təklif edirik. Biz Gaussian diskriminat analizi (GDA) vasitəsilə DNN-lərin fərqli yer üzündə səviyyə-conditional dağıtılışını təmin edirik. Və biz iki uzaq funksiyasını, Euclidean və Mahalanobis uzaqlarını, sınama nümunəsinin OOD'a ait olduğunu ölçürmək üçün istifadə edirik. Dörd benchmark veri qurduğu təcrübələrdə təcrübələrimiz baz çətinlərini sürəklə daha üstün edə biləcəyini göstərir.", 'sq': 'Detektimi i qëllimeve të hyrjes jashtë domenit (OOD) është kritik në sistemin e dialogut të orientuar ndaj detyrave. Ndryshe nga shumica e metodave ekzistuese që mbështeten fort në mostrat e OOD të etiketuara manualisht, ne përqëndrohemi në skenarin e zbulimit të OOD të pa mbikqyrur ku nuk ka mostra OOD të etiketuara përveç të dhënave të etiketuara në domeni. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një klasifikues të thjeshtë por të fortë gjenerativ bazuar në distancë për të zbuluar mostrat OOD. Ne vlerësojmë shpërndarjen klasë-kushtëzuese në hapësirat e funksioneve të DNN-ve nëpërmjet analizës diskriminuese Gausi (GDA) për të shmangur problemet e tepër besimit. Dhe ne përdorim dy funksione distance, distancat Euklidean dhe Mahalanobis, për të matur rezultatin e besimit të nëse një provë i përket OOD. Experiments on four benchmark datasets show that our method can consistently outperform the baselines.', 'cs': 'Detekce záměrů vstupu mimo doménu (OOD) je v dialogovém systému orientovaném na úlohy klíčová. Odlišný od většiny existujících metod, které se silně spoléhají na ručně označené OOD vzorky, se zaměřujeme na scénář detekce OOD bez dohledu, kde neexistují žádné označené OOD vzorky kromě označených in-domain dat. V tomto článku navrhujeme jednoduchý, ale silný generativní klasifikátor založený na vzdálenosti pro detekci OOD vzorků. Odhadujeme třídně podmíněné rozdělení na vlastnostních prostorech DNN pomocí Gaussovské diskriminantní analýzy (GDA), abychom zabránili problémům s nadměrnou důvěrou. A používáme dvě funkce vzdálenosti, Euklidovu a Mahalanobisovou vzdálenost, abychom měřili skóre spolehlivosti, zda testovací vzorek patří OOD. Experimenty na čtyřech referenčních datových sadách ukazují, že naše metoda může trvale překonat základní čáry.', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন বাইরে (OOD) ইনপুটের উদ্দেশ্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। Different from most existing methods that rely heavily on manually labeled OOD samples, we focus on the unsupervised OOD detection scenario where there are no labeled OOD samples except for labeled in-domain data.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সহজ কিন্তু শক্তিশালী জেনারেটিভ ভিত্তিক দূরত্বের ক্লাসাফারের প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে OOD নম্বর আমরা গাউসিয়ার বৈষম্য বৈষম্য বিশ্লেষণ (জিডিএ) মাধ্যমে ডিএনএন-এর বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিভিন্ন স্থানে ক্লাস-শর্তিক বিতরণ এবং আমরা দুই দূরত্বের ফাংশন, ইউক্লিডিয়ান এবং মাহালানোবিসের দূরত্ব ব্যবহার করি, যাতে একটি পরীক্ষার নমুনা অওডির কিছু কিছু নিয়ে আস্থ চারটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বেসেলাইন থেকে সর্বশেষ করতে পারে।', 'ca': "Detectar intencions d'entrada fora de domini (OOD) és crític en el sistema de diàleg orientat a les tasques. Diferent de la majoria dels mètodes existents que es basan fortament en mostres d'OOD etiquetades manualment, ens concentrem en l'escenari de detecció no supervisada d'OOD on no hi ha mostres d'OOD etiquetades excepte les dades etiquetades en domini. En aquest paper, proposem un classificador simple però fort generador basat en distància per detectar mostres d'OOD. Estem la distribució condicional de classe en espais de característiques de DNN a través de l'anàlisi discriminatori gaussia (GDA) per evitar problemes d'excess de confiança. I utilitzem dues funcions de distància, les distàncies euclídeas i Mahalanòbis, per mesurar la puntuació de confiança de si una mostra de prova pertany a l'OOD. Els experiments en quatre conjunts de dades de referència demostren que el nostre mètode pot superar constantment les línies de base.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje ulaznih namjera izvan domena (OOD) je kritično u sistemu dijaloga orientiranog na zadatke. Drugačije od većine postojećih metoda koje se teško oslanjaju na ručno označene uzorke OOD-a, fokusiramo se na neodređeni scenario otkrivanja OOD-a gdje nema označenih uzorka OOD-a osim podataka označenih u domenu. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavnu, ali snažnu generativnu klasifikaciju za otkrivanje uzorka OOD-a. Procjenjujemo uslovnu distribuciju klase o funkcionalnim prostorijama DNN putem diskriminacijske analize Gausije (BDP) kako bi izbjegao probleme sa prekovjerenjem povjerenja. Koristimo dvije funkcije udaljenosti, Euclidean i Mahalanobis udaljenosti, kako bi izmjerili rezultat povjerenja da li uzorak test pripada OOD-u. Eksperimenti na četiri seta podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naša metoda može konstantno nadmašiti osnovne linije.', 'et': 'Domeeniväliste sisendikavatsuste tuvastamine on ülesandepõhises dialoogisüsteemis kriitiline. Erinevalt enamikust olemasolevatest meetoditest, mis tuginevad suurel määral käsitsi märgistatud OOD proovidele, keskendume me järelevalveta OOD tuvastamise stsenaariumile, kus märgistatud OOD proove ei ole, välja arvatud märgistatud domeenisisesed andmed. Käesolevas töös pakume välja lihtsa, kuid tugeva generatiivse kauguspõhise klassifikaatori OOD proovide tuvastamiseks. Hindame klassi tingimuslikku jaotust DNN-de funktsiooniruumidel Gaussi diskrimineeriva analüüsi (GDA) abil, et vältida ülemäärase usalduse probleeme. Ja me kasutame kahte vahemaa funktsiooni, Eukliidi ja Mahalanobise vahemaad, et mõõta usaldusskoori selle kohta, kas testproov kuulub OOD-sse. Nelja võrdlusandmekogumiga tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et meie meetod suudab pidevalt ületada lähtetasemeid.', 'fi': 'Ulkoisten toimialueen (OOD) syöttöintenttien tunnistaminen on tärkeää tehtäväkeskeisessä valintajärjestelmässä. Toisin kuin useimmat olemassa olevat menetelmät, jotka perustuvat voimakkaasti manuaalisesti merkittyihin OOD-näytteisiin, keskitymme valvomattomaan OOD-tunnistusskenaarioon, jossa ei ole merkittyjä OOD-näytteitä lukuun ottamatta merkittyjä verkkotunnuksen tietoja. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yksinkertaista, mutta vahvaa generatiivista etäisyyspohjaista luokittelijaa OOD-näytteiden havaitsemiseen. Arvioimme luokan ehdollista jakautumista DNN:ien ominaisuusavaruuksiin Gaussin discriminant analysin (GDA) avulla liiallisen luottamusongelman välttämiseksi. Käytämme kahta etäisyysfunktiota, Euklidisia ja Mahalanobis-etäisyyksiä mittaamaan luottamuspisteitä siitä, kuuluuko koenäyte OOD:hen. Neljällä vertailuaineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että menetelmämme pystyy johdonmukaisesti ylittämään perusviivat.', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje vhodnih namenov zunaj domene (OOD) je ključnega pomena v pogovornem sistemu, usmerjenem v opravila. Za razliko od večine obstoječih metod, ki se močno zanašajo na ročno označene vzorce OOD, se osredotočamo na scenarij nenadzorovanega odkrivanja OOD, kjer ni označenih vzorcev OOD, razen označenih podatkov v domeni. V tem prispevku predlagamo preprost, vendar močan generativni klasifikator na razdalji za odkrivanje OOD vzorcev. Ocenjujemo pogojno porazdelitev razreda na funkcijskih prostorih DNN-jev preko Gaussian Discriminant Analysis (GDA), da bi se izognili težavam s prekomerno zaupanjem. In uporabljamo dve funkciji razdalje, evklidske in mahalanobisove razdalje, da izmerimo oceno zaupanja, ali testni vzorec spada v OOD. Poskusi na štirih referenčnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da lahko naša metoda dosledno presega osnovne vrednosti.', 'ha': "Idan an gane cikin tsarin aiki da aka nuna (OOD) na ƙayyade cikin tsarin zauren akwatin aiki da aka danne shi. Fara daga masu yawa na shiryoyin da ke ƙayyade, masu ƙayyade da misãlai na OOD da hannayen su yi rubutu, muna fokus a kan zane-zanen gane na OOD wanda ba'a tsare shi ba, a inda bãbu wani misãlai na OD wanda aka rubũta fãce da data wanda aka rubũta cikin-Domen. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani mai fassarar da mai sauƙi amma mai ƙarfi ga gane misãlai na OOD. Mu ƙaddara rabon da halin mai daraja a kan filayen DNN-s mai amfani da baƙaitaccen rabon da gasusi (GDA) dõmin ya kange masu ƙaranci-aminci. Kuma tuna amfani da wasu funkin tafiya biyu, wuri na Euclodi da Mahalanobis, dõmin a cika nau'in aminci, ko misali na jarraba ta zama daga OOD. Fijaroyi na danna huɗu na bangon ayuka, za'a nuna cewa metodenmu yana iya iya ƙaranci bakin bango.", 'he': 'גילוי כוונות הכניסה מחוץ לתחום (OOD) הוא קריטי במערכת הדיולוגים המיוחדת למשימות. שונה מרוב השיטות הקיומות שמסומכות בכבדות על דגימות OOD שמתווידות ידנית, אנחנו מתמקדים בתרחיש זיהוי OOD ללא מעקב In this paper, we propose a simple but strong generative distance-based classifier to detect OOD samples.  אנו מעריכים את ההפצה המונחית בכיתה על מקומות תכונות של DNN באמצעות ניתוח דיסקרמינציה גאוסית (GDA) כדי להימנע מבעיות ביטחון יתר. ואנחנו משתמשים בשני פעילות מרחק, מרחקים של אוקלדיאן ומאלנוביס, כדי למדוד את נקודת הביטחון של האם דגימת מבחן שייכת לאודי אוד. ניסויים על ארבעה קבוצות נתונים רמזים מראים שהשיטה שלנו יכולה להעביר את קווי הבסיס באופן קבוע.', 'jv': 'detecting out-of-domain (OOC) input enthusiasms is key in the task-Orientation dialog System. Language Nyong ngomatngon iki, kita ngerasakno akeh basa luwih dumaten ning jejer samplin OOC We suyu kelas-condiyonal diputasung nggawe barang kelas-condiyonal diputasung perusahaan DNNs batasan gambar diputasung (GNA) nggawe perusahaan perusahaan diputasung sumusulah. Awak dhéwé gunakake langgar sampeyan duwé, éwé nggambar perusahaan ning awak dhéwé, ingkang sampeyan pancene kuwi ngregani soko nambah perusahaan seneng dipunanggé sing bakal terus marine OOC. section', 'bo': 'Detecting out-of-domain (OOD) input intents is critical in the task-oriented dialog system. Different from most existing methods that rely heavily on manually labeled OOD samples, we focus on the unsupervised OOD detection scenario where there are no labeled OOD samples except for labeled in-domain data. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་OOD དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པར་སླ་གཏོང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་པོ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེ We estimate the class-conditional distribution on feature spaces of DNNs via Gaussian discriminant analysis (GDA) to avoid over-confidence problems. ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་པར་མཐུན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ངག་ལམ་ལུགས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞིན་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་འགྲོ་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་རྨས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་བཀོལ'}
{'en': 'Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning for Cross-Domain Slot Filling with Adversarial Attack', 'ar': 'التعلم التباين الصفري لملء الفتحات عبر المجالات بهجوم عدائي', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de tiro cero contrastante para llenar espacios entre dominios con ataques adversarios', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Contrastivo Zero-Shot para Preenchimento de Slots entre Domínios com Ataque Adversarial', 'fr': "Apprentissage Zero-Shot contrastif pour le remplissage d'emplacements interdomaines avec attaque contradictoire", 'ja': '対抗攻撃によるクロスドメインスロット充填のためのコントラストゼロショット学習', 'zh': '比零射之学,以对抗性攻跨域插槽充之', 'ru': 'Контрастное обучение с нулевым выстрелом для заполнения междоменных слотов сопернической атакой', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल हमले के साथ क्रॉस-डोमेन स्लॉट भरने के लिए कंट्रास्टिव जीरो-शॉट लर्निंग', 'ga': 'Foghlaim chodarsnachta Zero-shot le haghaidh Sliotán Tras-Fearainn a Líonadh le Ionsaí Sáraíochta', 'ka': 'კონტრესტიური Zero-Shot ნასწავლება კრონტრესომინური სლოტის შესამყავებლად კონტრესტრიალური ნაოცემებით', 'hu': 'Kontrasztív nulla lövéses tanulás a tartományokon átnyúló nyerőgépek ellentétes támadással', 'el': 'Αντιστατική εκμάθηση μηδενικού πυροβολισμού για την πλήρωση αυλακώσεων μεταξύ τομέων με αντίπαλη επίθεση', 'it': 'Apprendimento contrastante Zero-Shot per Slot Cross-Domain Riempimento con Attacco Adversario', 'kk': 'Көрсетілген доменнің слоттарын толтыру үшін контрастырмалы нөл- түсірілген оқыту', 'mk': 'Контрастивно нуларно учење за крстодомен полнење на слотови со непријателски напад', 'lt': 'Kontrastinis neišsamus mokymasis tarpdomeniniams laiko tarpsniams užpildyti prieštaringais atakais', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Zero-Shot Kontrastif untuk Penisi Slot Salib Domain Dengan Serangan Berlawan', 'mt': 'Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning for Cross-Domain Slot Filling with Adversarial Attack', 'mn': 'Төрсөлдөг Нөлөө-Shot суралцах нь Дөрсөлдөг Домены Слот Дүүрэлтэй', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഡോമെയിന്\u200d സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിലാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പൂജ്യത്തിലെ വെടിവുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക', 'pl': 'Kontrastywne uczenie się zerowo-strzałowe dla wypełniania gniazd między domenami atakiem przeciwnym', 'no': 'Kontrastiv null-skytte læring for krysdomeneslot fylling med rekursarialt Attack', 'ro': 'Învățare contrastivă Zero-Shot pentru umplerea sloturilor cross-domain cu atac adversar', 'so': 'Waxbarashada iskuullada iskuulka ah ee iskuulka laabashada-Domain buuxinaya Attack-Adversarial', 'sv': 'Kontrastivt Zero-Shot lärande för cross-domain slot fylld med Adversarial Attack', 'sr': 'Kontrastivno učenje nula pucnjave za krstodomena slota punjenje naprednih napada', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් ඩෝමේන් ස්ලෝට් පුරවන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සීරෝ වෙඩි ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ta': 'க்ராஸ்- டோமைன் சுற்றுக்கான தொடர்புடைய சூட்டு கற்றுக்கொடு', 'ur': 'Cross-Domain Slot کے لئے کنٹرسٹیف Zero-Shot سکونت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tương phản học Zero-Shot để xuyên miền lấp đầy vị trí chờ trở lại.', 'bg': 'Контрастивно обучение с нулев изстрел за запълване на слотове с противоречива атака', 'hr': 'Kontrastivno učenje nula pucnjave za krstodomena slota napunjenje napredovanim napadom', 'nl': 'Contrastieve Zero-Shot Leren voor Cross-Domain Slot Vulling met Adversarial Attack', 'da': 'Kontrastiv Zero-Shot læring for cross-domæne slot fyldning med adversarial angreb', 'de': 'Kontrastives Zero-Shot-Lernen für domänenübergreifende Slot-Füllung mit feindlichem Angriff', 'id': 'Kontrastif Zero-Shot Learning for Cross-Domain Slot Filling with Adversarial Attack', 'ko': '대항 공격 하 크로스 타임 채워진 대비 제로 사격 학습', 'fa': 'آموزش صفر-شلیک متفاوتی برای مطالعه دامنه\u200cهای متفاوت با حمله متفاوتی', 'sw': 'Kujifunza mashindano yasiyo na msimamo wa kisasa kwa ajili ya Slotti ya Kusini na Kujaza kwa Shambulio la Kigaidi', 'tr': 'Ullanyş Salyk bilen Dolamak üçin kontrast Zero-Taýdan öwrenmek', 'af': 'Kontrastief Nuwe- Shot Leer vir Kruis- Domein Slot Opvulling met Adversariale Attack', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Kontrastshëm Zero-Shot për Slot Përmbushje me sulm kundërshtar', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Qarşılıq Saldırıyla doldurulmuş Sıfır-Shot Öyrənməsi', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ডোমেইন স্লোটের জন্য যুক্তিগত শিক্ষা', 'hy': 'Հակառակ զրո-կրակի սովորելը հակառակ հարձակումներով', 'bs': 'Kontrastivno učenje nula pucnjave za krstodomena slota napunjenje napredovanim napadom', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge contra zero de dispars per llençar slots de domini transversal amb atac adversari", 'cs': 'Kontrastivní Zero-Shot učení pro naplnění slotů mezi doménami nepřátelským útokem', 'et': 'Kontrastiline null-shot õppimine domeenidevahelise pesa täitmiseks vastandliku rünnakuga', 'fi': 'Kontrastinen Zero-Shot -oppiminen verkkotunnusten välisen kolikkopelin täyttämiseen adversariaalisella hyökkäyksellä', 'jv': 'contraststive nulo-shot Learning for krus-domain slot filling with Advertorial Attack', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Kontrastno učenje ničelnega strela za polnjenje rež med domenami z neželenim napadom', 'he': 'ללמוד אפס-יריות נגדנית למלאי ארגזי דרך שדה עם התקפה נגידה', 'bo': 'Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning for Cross-Domain Slot Filling with Adversarial Attack'}
{'en': 'Zero-shot slot filling has widely arisen to cope with data scarcity in target domains. However, previous approaches often ignore constraints between slot value representation and related slot description representation in the latent space and lack enough model robustness. In this paper, we propose a Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) method for the cross-domain slot filling. The contrastive loss aims to map slot value contextual representations to the corresponding slot description representations. And we introduce an adversarial attack training strategy to improve model robustness. Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms state-of-the-art baselines under both zero-shot and few-shot settings.', 'ar': 'نشأ ملء الفتحة بدون طلقة على نطاق واسع للتعامل مع ندرة البيانات في المجالات المستهدفة. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما تتجاهل الأساليب السابقة القيود بين تمثيل قيمة الفتحة وتمثيل وصف الفتحة ذات الصلة في المساحة الكامنة وتفتقر إلى قوة النموذج الكافية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة التعلم المتباين الصفري باستخدام هجوم عدائي (CZSL-Adv) لملء الفتحة عبر المجال. تهدف الخسارة التبادلية إلى تعيين التمثيلات السياقية لقيمة الفاصل الزمني لتمثيلات وصف الفاصل الزمني المقابلة. ونقدم إستراتيجية تدريب على الهجوم العدائي لتحسين قوة النموذج. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث خطوط الأساس في ظل كل من إعدادات اللقطة الصفرية والقليل من اللقطات.', 'fr': "Le remplissage des créneaux par injection zéro est largement apparu pour faire face à la rareté des données dans les domaines cibles. Cependant, les approches précédentes ignorent souvent les contraintes entre la représentation de la valeur des créneaux et la représentation de la description des créneaux associés dans l'espace latent et manquent de robustesse du modèle. Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthode d'apprentissage par tir zéro contrastif avec attaque adverse (CZSL-Adv) pour le remplissage des emplacements entre domaines. La perte de contraste vise à mapper des représentations contextuelles de valeur de créneau avec les représentations de description de créneau correspondantes. Nous introduisons également une stratégie de formation aux attaques contradictoires afin d'améliorer la robustesse du modèle. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle surpasse de manière significative les lignes de base de pointe, à la fois pour les réglages de tir zéro et de faible tir.", 'es': 'El llenado de ranuras cero ha surgido ampliamente para hacer frente a la escasez de datos en los dominios de destino. Sin embargo, los enfoques anteriores a menudo ignoran las restricciones entre la representación del valor de ranura y la representación de descripción de ranura relacionada en el espacio latente y carecen de suficiente robustez del modelo. En este artículo, proponemos un método Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) para el llenado de espacios entre dominios. La pérdida por contraste tiene como objetivo mapear las representaciones contextuales de valores de ranura a las representaciones de descripción de ranura correspondientes. Además, introducimos una estrategia de entrenamiento para ataques adversarios para mejorar la solidez del modelo. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo supera significativamente las líneas de base de última generación tanto en configuraciones de tiro cero como de pocos disparos.', 'ja': 'ゼロショットスロット充填は、ターゲットドメインのデータ不足に対処するために広く発生しています。しかしながら、以前のアプローチは、潜在空間におけるスロット値表現と関連するスロット記述表現との間の制約を無視し、十分なモデルの堅牢性を欠くことが多い。本稿では、クロスドメインスロット充填のための対抗攻撃付きコントラストゼロショット学習（ CZSL - Adv ）法を提案する。対照的な損失は、スロット値のコンテキスト表現を対応するスロット記述表現にマッピングすることを目的とする。そして、モデルの堅牢性を向上させるための対抗攻撃訓練戦略を導入します。実験結果は、ゼロショットと数ショットの両方の設定で、当社のモデルが最先端のベースラインを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。', 'pt': 'O preenchimento de slot zero-shot surgiu amplamente para lidar com a escassez de dados nos domínios de destino. No entanto, as abordagens anteriores geralmente ignoram as restrições entre a representação do valor do slot e a representação da descrição do slot relacionado no espaço latente e carecem de robustez suficiente do modelo. Neste artigo, propomos um método Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) para o preenchimento de slots entre domínios. A perda contrastiva visa mapear representações contextuais de valor de slot para as representações de descrição de slot correspondentes. E introduzimos uma estratégia de treinamento de ataque adversário para melhorar a robustez do modelo. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo supera significativamente as linhas de base de última geração em configurações de tiro zero e poucos tiros.', 'zh': '零次插槽填已广,以应域中之数稀缺。 然前法常忽于空间中槽直示相关,且乏足鲁棒性。 本文中,立对抗性攻对零次学(CZSL-Adv)法,以跨域槽填之。 比损旨将槽直上下文映射相应。 又引入对抗性攻练方略,以崇模鲁棒性。 实验结果表明,零次少射设,皆明先基线。', 'hi': 'शून्य-शॉट स्लॉट भरने व्यापक रूप से लक्ष्य डोमेन में डेटा की कमी का सामना करने के लिए उत्पन्न हुआ है। हालांकि, पिछले दृष्टिकोण अक्सर अव्यक्त स्थान में स्लॉट मूल्य प्रतिनिधित्व और संबंधित स्लॉट विवरण प्रतिनिधित्व के बीच बाधाओं को अनदेखा करते हैं और पर्याप्त मॉडल मजबूती की कमी होती है। इस पेपर में, हम क्रॉस-डोमेन स्लॉट भरने के लिए प्रतिकूल हमले (CZSL-Adv) विधि के साथ एक Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। contrastive हानि संबंधित स्लॉट विवरण अभ्यावेदन के लिए स्लॉट मान प्रासंगिक अभ्यावेदन मैप करने के लिए उद्देश्य है। और हम मॉडल मजबूती में सुधार करने के लिए एक प्रतिकूल हमले प्रशिक्षण रणनीति पेश करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल शून्य-शॉट और कुछ-शॉट सेटिंग्स दोनों के तहत अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं को काफी हद तक मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Широко распространено заполнение слотов с нулевым выстрелом для решения проблемы нехватки данных в целевых доменах. Однако предыдущие подходы часто игнорируют ограничения между представлением значения слота и соответствующим представлением описания слота в латентном пространстве и не хватает надежности модели. В этой статье мы предлагаем метод контрастного обучения с нулевым выстрелом с враждебной атакой (CZSL-Adv) для заполнения междоменных слотов. Контрастные потери направлены на сопоставление контекстных представлений значений слотов с соответствующими представлениями описания слотов. И мы внедряем стратегию обучения соперничающим атакам, чтобы повысить надежность модели. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель значительно превосходит современные базовые линии при настройках как с нулевым, так и с малым выстрелом.', 'ga': 'Tá líonadh sliotán gan urchar tagtha chun cinn go forleathan chun dul i ngleic le ganntanas sonraí i spriocfhearainn. Mar sin féin, is minic a dhéanann cineálacha cur chuige roimhe seo neamhaird ar na srianta atá idir léiriú luach sliotán agus léiriú tuairiscí sliotán gaolmhar sa spás folaigh agus easpa stóinseachta an mhúnla. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh Foghlama Zero-Shot Codarsnacha le Ionsaí Sáraimh (CZSL-Adv) le haghaidh líonadh sliotán tras-fearainn. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an gcaillteanas codarsnachta léiriúcháin comhthéacsúla luach sliotán a mhapáil chuig na huiríll tuairiscí sliotán comhfhreagracha. Agus tugaimid isteach straitéis oiliúna um ionsaí sáraíochta chun stóinseacht na samhla a fheabhsú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár samhail na bunlínte úrscothacha go mór faoi shuímh náid agus cúpla seat.', 'el': 'Η πλήρωση αυλακώσεων μηδενικού πυροβολισμού έχει εμφανιστεί ευρέως για να αντιμετωπίσει την έλλειψη δεδομένων στους τομείς στόχων. Ωστόσο, οι προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις συχνά αγνοούν τους περιορισμούς μεταξύ της αναπαράστασης τιμών αυλακώσεων και της σχετικής αναπαράστασης περιγραφής αυλακώσεων στον λανθάνοντα χώρο και στερούνται αρκετής ανθεκτικότητας του μοντέλου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για τη συμπλήρωση αυλακώσεων μεταξύ τομέων. Η αντιδιαστατική απώλεια στοχεύει να χαρτογραφήσει τις περιεκτικές αναπαραστάσεις τιμών αυλακώσεων στις αντίστοιχες αναπαραστάσεις περιγραφής αυλακώσεων. Και εισάγουμε μια στρατηγική εκπαίδευσης αντίπαλης επίθεσης για να βελτιώσουμε την ανθεκτικότητα του μοντέλου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις τελευταίες γραμμές βάσης τόσο σε ρυθμίσεις μηδενικής βολής όσο και σε ρυθμίσεις λίγων βολών.', 'hu': 'A Zero-Shot slot töltése széles körben jelentkezett, hogy megbirkózzon a céltartományok adathűségével. A korábbi megközelítések azonban gyakran figyelmen kívül hagyják a résidő értékének ábrázolása és a kapcsolódó résidő leírásának ábrázolása közötti korlátozásokat a látens térben, és hiányoznak elegendő modellrobusztusságuk. Ebben a tanulmányban egy kontrasztív nulla lövéses tanulás Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) módszert javasolunk a cross-domain slot töltésére. A kontrasztív veszteség célja, hogy a résidő érték kontextuális reprezentációit a megfelelő résidő leírásához térképezze fel. És bevezetünk egy ellenséges támadási kiképzési stratégiát a modell robusztusságának javítása érdekében. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb alapvonalakat, mind nullás, mind néhány lövéses beállítás mellett.', 'ka': 'ნულ სტატის სტატის დაყენება ძალიან გამოიყენება, რომ მონაცემების შეუძლებელობა მიდგენისთვის მონაცემები. მაგრამ, წინა მიღება ძალიან იგნორიურება სლოტის მნიშვნელობის გამოსახულება და დაკავშირებული სლოტის გამოსახულების გამოსახულებაში და მოდელის ძალიან ძალიან მარტივია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდა კონტრესტიგური ნულ-სურათის სწავლებას კონტრესტიგური ნაკლებით (CZSL-Adv) მეტისთვის, რომელსაც კონტრესტიგური ნულ-სურათი გადატანა კონტრასტიური დაკავშირების მიზეზი, რომ კონტაქტიური მნიშვნელობის კონტექსტიური გამოსახულებებისთვის შესაძლებელი slot გამოსახულებებისთვის. და ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ნეპირატრიალური ატრუქციის სტრატიგია, რომელიც მოდელის ძალადობა უფრო მეტადება. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთებს სიტყვების ფესტური ხაზები, რომლებიც ნულ სტატის და ნულ სტატის', 'it': "Il riempimento di slot zero-shot è ampiamente sorto per far fronte alla scarsità di dati nei domini target. Tuttavia, gli approcci precedenti spesso ignorano i vincoli tra la rappresentazione del valore dello slot e la relativa rappresentazione della descrizione dello slot nello spazio latente e mancano di sufficiente robustezza del modello. In questo articolo, proponiamo un metodo Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) per il riempimento di slot cross-domain. La perdita contrastante mira a mappare le rappresentazioni contestuali del valore delle slot alle rappresentazioni corrispondenti della descrizione delle slot. E introduciamo una strategia di addestramento all'attacco avversario per migliorare la robustezza del modello. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello supera significativamente le linee di base all'avanguardia in entrambe le impostazioni zero-shot e pochi-shot.", 'mk': 'Zero-shot slot filling has widely arisen to cope with data scarcity in target domains.  Сепак, претходните пристапи честопати ги игнорираат ограничувањата помеѓу претставувањето на вредноста на слотот и поврзаното претставуваое на описот на слотот во latent space и недостасуваат доволна robustness на моделот. Во овој весник, предложуваме контрастивно нула-пукање со противнапад (CZSL-Adv) метод за полнување на слотови во крстодомените. Контрастивната загуба има за цел да ги мапира контекстните претставувања на вредноста на слотот на соодветните претставувања на описот на слотот. И воведуваме стратегија за обука на противниците за подобрување на моделот на силност. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел значително ги надминува најсовремените основни линии под поставувањата со нула и неколку снимки.', 'kk': 'Нөл- шотыр слотын толтыру мақсатты домендердің деректерінің қажеттілігін көмектесу үшін көбірек болды. Бірақ алдыңғы келесі келесі келесі орындағы слот мәндерін көрсету мен сәйкесті слот сипаттамасының шектеулерін елемейді және келесі үлгісінің жеткілігі жоқ. Бұл қағазда, біз көлемдегі слотты толтыру үшін контрастырмалы нөл-шектерді үйрену (CZSL-Adv) әдісін ұсынамыз. Контрастырлық жоғалу сәйкесті слоттың контекстік мәндерін сәйкесті слоттың сипаттамасын көрсетуге арналған. Біз қарсылық қарсылық бақылау стратегиясын келтіреміз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің кейбір нөл шарт мен кейбір шарт параметрлерінің негізгі сызықтарын жасайды.', 'lt': 'Siekiant pašalinti duomenų trūkumą tikslinėse srityse, atsirado didelių nulinių nuotolių užpildymo vietų. However, previous approaches often ignore constraints between slot value representation and related slot description representation in the latent space and lack enough model robustness.  In this paper, we propose a Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) method for the cross-domain slot filling.  Kontrastinio nuostolio tikslas – nustatyti laiko tarpsnių vertės kontekstinius atvaizdus atitinkamiems laiko tarpsnių aprašymams. Ir mes pristatome priešingų puolimų mokymo strategiją, kad pagerintume modelio patikimumą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gerokai viršija naujausias bazines linijas nuliniu ir nedideliu mastu.', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലെ ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ സാധ്യതയുടെ കൂടെ സംരക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ശൂന്യമായ സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നു. എങ്കിലും മുമ്പുള്ള അടുത്ത സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട സ്ലോട്ട് വിവരണങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളും അവഗണിക്കുന്ന നി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രോഡോമെന്\u200d സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു കോണ്\u200dട്രാസ്റ്റേറിവ് സ്ലോട്ട് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ്. എതിര്\u200dത്തുനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന നഷ്ടത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം സ്ലോട്ട് മൂല്യം പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് മാപ്പ്  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു എതിരാളിയായ ആക്രമണത്തിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ട്രെയിനിജ്ഞാനം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആര്\u200dട്ട് ബേസ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d പൂ', 'no': 'Fylling av nullsatt plass har veldig oppstått for å kopla med data feil i måldområde. Men førre tilnærmingar ignorerer ofte begrensningar mellom plassverdirepresentasjonen og tilhøyrande plassverdiskildring i laterte plass og manglar nok modell kraftighet. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein kontrastiv null-skytt læring med rekursarialt Attack (CZSL-Adv) metode for å fylle krysdomeneplassen. Den kontrastende tapen må kartera plassverdiomskrivingsrepresentasjonane til den tilsvarande plassverdiomskrivingsrepresentasjonane. Og vi introduserer ein strategi for opplæring av mottakar for å forbedra modellen av kraftighet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vår betydelig utfører baselinjer under både null-bilde og få-bilde-innstillingar.', 'mn': 'Нэг шофт дүүрэн нь зорилготой хэсэгт өгөгдлийн хамааралтай байдлаар ихэвчлэн орж ирсэн. Гэхдээ өмнөх арга зам нь слотын утгыг илэрхийлэх болон холбоотой слотын тодорхойлолтын хоорондох хязгаарлалтыг ихэвчлэн анзаарахгүй байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид холбоотой нийтлэл дүүргэхийн тулд эсрэгчийн Zero-Shot суралцах (CZSL-Adv) арга замыг суралцаж байна. Төрсөлдөг алдагдал нь слотын утгыг харьцуулахын зорилго юм. Тэгээд бид эсэргүүцлийн дайралтын сургалтын стратегийг загварын чадварыг сайжруулахын тулд танилцуулдаг. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар нь 0-н зураг болон цөөн зураг зураг доор байдлын суурь шугам дээр илүү чухал байдаг.', 'pl': 'Wypełnianie slotów zerowych powstało powszechnie, aby poradzić sobie z niedoborem danych w domenach docelowych. Jednak poprzednie podejścia często ignorują ograniczenia między reprezentacją wartości slotu a powiązaną reprezentacją opisu slotu w przestrzeni utajonej i brakują wystarczającej solidności modelu. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodę kontrastywnego uczenia się zerowo-strzałowego z atakiem przeciwnym (CZSL-Adv) dla wypełniania slotów między domenami. Strata kontrastywna ma na celu mapowanie kontekstowych reprezentacji wartości slotu do odpowiednich reprezentacji opisu slotu. Wprowadzamy również strategię treningu ataków przeciwników, aby poprawić solidność modelu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze linie bazowe zarówno w ustawieniach zero-shot, jak i kilku-shot.', 'ro': 'Umplerea sloturilor zero-shot a apărut pe scară largă pentru a face față deficitului de date în domeniile țintă. Cu toate acestea, abordările anterioare ignoră adesea constrângerile dintre reprezentarea valorii sloturilor și reprezentarea descrierii sloturilor aferente în spațiul latent și lipsesc suficientă robustețe a modelului. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă Contrastivă Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) pentru umplerea sloturilor cross-domain. Pierderea contrastivă urmărește să mapeze reprezentările contextuale ale valorii sloturilor la reprezentările corespunzătoare descrierii sloturilor. Și introducem o strategie de antrenament de atac adversar pentru a îmbunătăți robustețea modelului. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru depășește semnificativ liniile de bază de ultimă generație atât în setări zero, cât și în cele puține lovituri.', 'sr': 'Napunjavanje nule snimke široko se pojavilo kako bi se suoèilo sa nedostatkom podataka u ciljnim domenama. Međutim, prethodni pristupi često ignorišu ograničenja između predstavljanja vrijednosti slota i povezanog opisa slota u latentnom prostoru i nedostaje dovoljno robustnosti modela. U ovom papiru predlažemo kontrastivno učenje nulo-pucnjave sa metodom Adversarialnog napada (CZSL-Adv) za ispunjavanje slot a preko domena. Kontrastivni gubitak je cilj mapiranja kontekstualnih predstavljanja vrijednosti slota u odgovarajućim predstavljanjima opisa slota. I predstavljamo strategiju za obuku protivnika napada kako bi poboljšali model robotnosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi početne linije pod nulom snimanju i nekoliko snimanja.', 'ms': 'Zero-shot slot filling has widely arisen to cope with data scarcity in target domains.  Namun, pendekatan terdahulu sering abaikan keterangan diantara perwakilan nilai slot dan perwakilan keterangan slot berkaitan dalam ruang tersembunyi dan kekurangan kepekatan model yang cukup. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan satu kaedah Pelajaran Zero-Shot Kontrastif dengan Serangan Adversarial (CZSL-Adv) untuk mengisi slot saling-domain. Kehilangan bertentangan bermaksud untuk peta perwakilan kontekstual nilai slot kepada perwakilan keterangan slot yang sepadan. And we introduce an adversarial attack training strategy to improve model robustness.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kita secara signifikan melebihi garis dasar state-of-the-art di bawah kedua-dua tetapan 0-shot dan beberapa-shot.', 'so': 'Bolshada jaranjarka lagu buuxiyo jaranjarka jaranjarada waxyaabaha lagu baahdo waxaa ku soo baxay mid aad u badan. However, previous approaches often ignore constraints between slot value representation and related slot description representation in the latent space and lack enough model robustness.  Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal-qori-Shot oo ku barta weerarka caawimaadda (CZSL-Adv) qaabka lagu buuxiyo qalabka gudaha. Khasaarka ka hor jeeda waxaa loola jeedaa karta qiimaha bannaanta ee joogtada ah ee lagu qorayo tilmaamaha sawirka sawirka. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal waxbarasho oo cadaawayaasha ah si aan u hagaajino dharka modelka. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu si muhiim ah u sameeyaa qoraalka farshaxanta iyo qoraalka nuurka lagu dhufto iyo wax yar oo lagu dhufto.', 'si': 'සීරෝ ශෝට් ස්ලෝට් පුරවන්න පුළුවන් වැඩියෙන් ඉලක්ක ඩෝමේන් වලට තොරතුරු අවස්ථාවක් සමග ප්\u200d නමුත්, පසුගින් අවස්ථාවක් ස්ලෝට් විශ්වාසය සහ සම්බන්ධ ස්ලෝට් විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය අතර අවස්ථාව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සිරෝ වෙඩි තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ක්\u200dරිස්ටස් ඩොමේන් ස්ලෝට්  ස්ලෝට් විශේෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා ස්ලෝට් විශේෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා ස්ලෝට් වි ඒ වගේම අපි විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා මොඩ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙන්නේ සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙන', 'mt': "Il-mili ta’ slots b’użu żero seħħew b’mod wiesa’ biex ilaħħqu mal-iskarsezza tad-dejta f’oqsma fil-mira. Madankollu, approċċi preċedenti spiss jinjoraw ir-restrizzjonijiet bejn ir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-valur tas-slots u r-rappreżentazzjoni relatata tad-deskrizzjoni tas-slots fl-ispazju moħbi u m’għandhomx biżżejjed robustezza tal-mudell. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu Kontrastiv ta’ Tagħlim Zero-Shot b’Attakk Adversarju (CZSL-Adv) għall-mili ta’ slots bejn id-dominji. It-telf kuntrastiv għandu l-għan li jimmappa r-rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwali tal-valur tas-slots għar-rappreżentazzjonijiet korrispondenti tad-deskrizzjoni tas-slots. U nintroduċu strateġija ta' taħriġ għall-attakki avversarji biex itejbu r-robustezza tal-mudell. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati kemm taħt setturi b’żero-shot kif ukoll b’ftit shot.", 'sv': 'Zero-shot slot fyllning har i stor utsträckning uppstått för att hantera databrist i måldomäner. Tidigare tillvägagångssätt ignorerar dock ofta begränsningar mellan representation av spelautomatsvärde och relaterad representation av spelautomatbeskrivning i det latenta utrymmet och saknar tillräckligt modellrobusthet. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en metod för kontrastiv noll-skott lärande med adversariattack (CZSL-Adv) för fyllning av spelautomater över domäner. Den kontrastiva förlusten syftar till att kartlägga kortvärdens kontextuella representationer till motsvarande kortbeskrivningar. Och vi introducerar en strategi för motståndskraftig attack utbildning för att förbättra modellens robusthet. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell avsevärt överträffar state-of-the-art baslinjer under både noll-skott och få-skott inställningar.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட தளங்களில் தரவு சுருக்கத்தை நகலெடுக்க பூஜ்ஜியமான செருகுவாய் நிரப்பியுள்ளது. ஆயினும், முந்தைய நெறுங்குகள் பெரும்பாலும் செருகுவாய் மதிப்பு பிரதிநிதித்தல் மற்றும் சமீபத்திய வெளியீட்டு பிரதிந இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் முறைமை களஞ்சும் களஞ்சு செருகுவாய்ப்பு நிரப்பும் முறையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு தொடர்பு பூஜ்ஜி- ஷாட் முற எதிர்பார்த்த நஷ்டத்திற்கு செருகுவாய் மதிப்பை வரைபடத்தில் பொருத்தமான செருகுவாய் விவரிப்பு குறிப்பி மாதிரி ஆடையை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான ஒரு எதிரிய எதிர்காரணத்தை பயிற்சி திட்டத்தை நாம் அறிவிக்கும். முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் மாதிரி முக்கியமாக பூஜ்ஜியமாக சுட்டு மற்றும் சில சுட்டு அமைப்புகளுக்கு கீழ் உள்ள', 'ur': 'Zero-shot slot filling has widespread rise to cope with data scarcity in target domains. لیکن، اگلوں کی تقریبا بہت سی موقعیت اسلوٹ کی مقدار نمایش اور رابطہ دار اسلوٹ کی تعریف کے درمیان محدودیت کو نادانی کرتی ہے اور کافی موڈل قوت کی کمی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک کنٹرسٹیف صفر-شٹ کی تعلیم کرس-ڈومین لٹ بھرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. The contrastive loss aims to map slot value contextual representations to the corresponding slot description representations. اور ہم ایک مقابلہ حملہ کی تدریس استراتژی کو پیش کریں گے کہ مدل مضبوطی کو زیادہ دکھائے۔ Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms state-of-the-art baselines under both zero-shot and few-shot settings.', 'uz': "Name Lekin oldingi usullar ko'pincha slot qiymatini taʼminlashtirish va bogʻliq slot taʼriflarini keyingi boʻsh joyda taʼminlovchilarga eʼtibor berilmagan va yetarli model roʻyxati mavjud emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz cross-domen slot toʻldirish (CZSL-Adv) usulini o'rganishni davom qilamiz. Name Va biz model o'zgarishni o'zgartirish uchun foydalanuvchi taʼminlovchi strategiyasini anglatamiz. Tajriba natijalari esa modelimizning holatning asosiy asboblarini hech narsa yozilgan va bir necha shaklga moslamalar bilan bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc điền vào các khe hở trường đã xuất hiện rộng rãi để đối phó với sự khan hiếm dữ liệu trong miền đích. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp trước thường bỏ qua các giới hạn giữa sự đại diện Giá trị thời gian và mô tả thời gian tương tự trong vùng tiềm ẩn và thiếu đủ sức bền của mô hình. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tương phản Zero-Shot Learning with adversarial Agack (CZZSL-Ad) cho việc lấp đầy vùng bỏ miền chéo. Sự mất mát tương phản nhằm đề bản đồ giá trị thời gian các biểu hiện liên tục với mô tả thời gian tương ứng. Và chúng tôi giới thiệu một chiến lược huấn luyện chống đối để cải thiện uy tín của mô-đun. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta vượt trội hơn nhiều bản nền nghệ thuật dưới cả trường bắn và bắn ít.', 'bg': 'Пълненето на слотове с нулев изстрел е широко възникнало, за да се справи с недостига на данни в целевите домейни. Въпреки това, предишните подходи често игнорират ограниченията между представянето на стойността на слота и свързаното представяне на описанието на слота в латентното пространство и нямат достатъчно здравина на модела. В настоящата статия предлагаме метод за контрастивно обучение с нулев изстрел с рекламна атака (за запълване на слотове между домейни). Контрастивната загуба има за цел да картографира контекстуалните изображения на стойността на слота към съответните изображения на описанието на слота. И въвеждаме стратегия за трениране на атака срещу конкуренция, за да подобрим здравината на модела. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел значително превъзхожда най-съвременните базови линии при настройките за нулеви и няколко снимки.', 'hr': 'Punjenje mjesta nule pucnjave široko se pojavilo kako bi se suočilo s nedostatkom podataka u ciljnim domenama. Međutim, prethodni pristupi često ignoriraju ograničenja između predstavljanja vrijednosti slota i povezanog opisa slota u latentnom prostoru i nedostaju dovoljno robustnosti modela. U ovom papiru predlažemo kontrastivno učenje nulo-pucnjave s metodom oporučnog napada (CZSL-Adv) za ispunjavanje kroz domenu slova. Kontrastivni gubitak je cilj mapirati kontekstualne predstave vrijednosti slota na odgovarajuće predstave opisa slota. I predstavljamo strategiju za obuku protivnika napada kako bi poboljšali model snagu. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi početne linije u području nule snimanja i nekoliko snimanja.', 'da': 'Zero-shot slot fyldning er bredt opstået for at håndtere dataknaphed i måldomæner. Tidligere fremgangsmåder ignorerer dog ofte begrænsninger mellem repræsentation af slot værdi og relateret slot beskrivelse repræsentation i det latente rum og mangler tilstrækkelig model robusthed. I denne artikel foreslår vi en kontrastiv Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) metode til udfyldning af slots på tværs af domæner. Det kontrastive tab har til formål at kortlægge slot værdi kontekstuelle repræsentationer til de tilsvarende slot beskrivelse repræsentationer. Og vi introducerer en adversary angreb træningsstrategi for at forbedre model robusthed. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model overgår væsentligt state-of-the-art baselines under både nulskud og få skud indstillinger.', 'nl': 'Zero-shot slot vulling is op grote schaal ontstaan om dataschaarste in doeldomeinen aan te pakken. Eerdere benaderingen negeren echter vaak beperkingen tussen de weergave van sleuvenwerten en gerelateerde sleuvenbeschrijvingen in de latente ruimte en missen voldoende robuustheid van het model. In dit artikel stellen we een Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) methode voor de cross-domein slot vulling voor. Het contrastieve verlies is bedoeld om contextuele representaties van slotwaarde in kaart te brengen aan de overeenkomstige representaties van slotbeschrijving. En we introduceren een aanvalstrainingsstrategie om de robuustheid van het model te verbeteren. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan state-of-the-art baselines onder zowel zero-shot als few-shot instellingen.', 'de': 'Zero-Shot-Slot-Füllung ist weit verbreitet, um Datenknappheit in Zieldomänen zu bewältigen. Bisherige Ansätze ignorieren jedoch häufig Einschränkungen zwischen Slot-Wert-Darstellung und zugehöriger Slot-Beschreibung-Darstellung im latenten Raum und es fehlt an ausreichender Modellstabilität. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) Methode zur domänenübergreifenden Slot-Füllung vor. Der kontrastive Verlust zielt darauf ab, Slot-Wert-Kontextdarstellungen den entsprechenden Slot-Beschreibungen zuzuordnen. Und wir führen eine gegnerische Angriffstrainingstrategie ein, um die Robustheit des Modells zu verbessern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell sowohl bei Null- als auch bei Wenig-Schuss-Einstellungen die modernsten Baselines deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Penisi slot 0-shot telah muncul secara luas untuk mengatasi kekurangan data dalam domain sasaran. However, previous approaches often ignore constraints between slot value representation and related slot description representation in the latent space and lack enough model robustness.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode Kontrastif Zero-Shot Learning dengan Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) untuk mengisi slot cross-domain. Kehilangan kontras bermaksud untuk memetakan nilai slot representation kontekstual ke deskripsi slot yang cocok. Dan kami memperkenalkan strategi latihan serangan musuh untuk meningkatkan kekuatan model. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita jauh lebih berharga dari garis dasar state-of-the-art di bawah seting 0-shot dan beberapa-shot.', 'fa': 'پر کردن نقطه\u200cهای صفر به وسیله\u200cی گسترده\u200cای برای حل با کمبود داده\u200cها در دامنهای هدف افتاده است. با این وجود، تقریبا پیشینیان اغلب محدودیت بین نمایش ارزش slot و توضیح محدودیت مربوط به محدودیت محدودیت در فضای latent را نادیده می\u200cگیرند و به اندازه کافی مدل قوی را نادیده می\u200cگیرند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با حمله مخالفی (CZSL-Adv) برای پر کردن نقطه\u200cهای مخالفی دامنه\u200cای یادگیری کنترستی صفر-Shot کنترستی کنیم. خسارت متفاوتی هدف برای نقشه نمایش\u200cهای متفاوتی ارزش slot به نمایش\u200cهای توصیف slot متفاوت است. و ما یک استراتژی آموزش حمله دشمنی را معرفی می کنیم تا مدل قوی را بهبود دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما خیلی زیادی از خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای هنری را تحت تغییرات صفر و چند شلیک\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '목표 구역의 데이터 희소성에 대응하기 위해 제로 포의 틈새 충전이 광범위하게 나타나고 있다.그러나 기존의 방법은 잠재 공간에서의 틈새값 표시와 관련 틈새설명 표시 간의 제약을 소홀히 하고 충분한 모델 노봉성이 부족했다.본고에서 우리는 크로스 타임 갭을 채우는 대비 제로 사격 학습과 대항 공격(CZSL Adv) 방법을 제시했다.대비 손실은 틈새값 상하문 표시를 상응하는 틈새설명 표시에 비추는 데 목적을 둔다.모델의 노봉성을 높이기 위해 우리는 대항적인 공격 훈련 전략을 도입했다.실험 결과에 의하면 영포와 소포 두 가지 상황에서 우리의 모형은 모두 가장 선진적인 기선보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Kujawa kwa risasi zisizo na risasi imetokea kwa kiasi kikubwa kulikabiliwa na ukosefu wa taarifa katika maeneo yanayolenga. Hata hivyo, hatua zilizopita mara nyingi hupuuza vikwazo kati ya uwakilishi wa thamani za kura na maelezo yanayohusiana na maelezo yanayohusiana na maelezo ya simu za mkononi katika nafasi ya hivi karibuni na kukosekana kwa mavazi ya kutosha. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza njia ya Kujifunza Shambulio la Kigaidi (CZSL-Adv) kwa kutumia bomu la eneo hilo. Tatizo hilo linalenga ramani ya thamani ya slot kwa uwakilishi wa kisasa unaohusika. Na tunaanzisha mkakati wa mafunzo ya shambulio la upinzani wa kuboresha mavazi ya modeli. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inafanya vizuri zaidi kwenye misingi ya hali ya sanaa chini ya mazingira yasiyo ya risasi na michache yaliyopigwa risasi.', 'tr': 'Sıfır resim dolduruşy hedef alanlarynda maglumat ýetesine çözmek üçin kän bir şekilde üýtgedi. Ýöne öňki golaýlar köplenç slot mykdary temsilcisi we ýakynlaşyk slot waspy arasynda süýgütlenmeleri görmeýär. Bu kagyzda, karslot doldurmak üçin kontrast 0-Shot öwrenmek üçin bir nusgasy teklif ediyoruz. Maýyp faýllar Biz nusga çykyşlygyny örän güýçli şeklinde düzeltmek üçin tejribe salymy strategiýany tanyşdyrýarys. Durmanyň netijesi biziň nusgamyzyň çykyşyň durumyny zero-aty we biraz atly düzümlerniň aşagynda çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Plotësimi i slots zero-shot është rritur gjerësisht për të përballur me mungesën e të dhënave në domenat objektive. Megjithatë, qasjet e mëparshme shpesh injorojnë kufizimet midis përfaqësimit të vlerës së slot dhe përfaqësimit të përshkrimit të slot lidhur me të në hapësirën e fshehtë dhe mungon fuqia e mjaftueshme e modelit. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë Kontrastive Zero-Shot Learning me Attack Adversarial (CZSL-Adv) për mbushjen e slots në transdomeni. Humbja kontrastive synon të hartojë përfaqësimet kontekstuale të vlerës së slot në përfaqësimet e përshkrimit të slot korrispondues. Dhe ne prezantojmë një strategji trajnimi kundërshtar sulmi për të përmirësuar fuqinë e modelit. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë tejkalon në mënyrë të konsiderueshme linjat bazë më të avancuara si nën rregullimet zero-shot ashtu edhe pak-shot.', 'af': "Nul-skoot-slot opvulling het baie opgestaan om te koppel met data skande in doel domeine. Maar voorige toegang het dikwels geignoreer beheinings tussen slot waarde voorstelling en verwante slot beskrywing voorstelling in die latente ruimte en ontbreek genoeg model robustheid. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n kontrastiewe Zero-Shot Leer met Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) metode vir die kruisdomein slot vul. Die kontrastiewe verlies bepaal om te kaart slot waarde contextual voorstellings na die ooreenstemmende slot beskrywing voorstellings. En ons introduseer 'n teëstandige aanval-oefening strategie om model kragtigheid te verbeter. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons model betekeurig uitvoer staat-van-kuns-basisline onder beide zero-skoot en paar-skoot-instellings.", 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች ብዙ ጊዜ የደረጃ ክፍተት እና የደረጃ ግንኙነትን በመቀናኛው ቦታ እና በሞዴል ልብስ የጎደለውን ግንኙነት ይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የክፍለ አካባቢ መብት (CZSL-Adv) ሥርዓት የክፍለ ስርዓት መሞላውን የተቃውሞ የጽዮ-Shot ማራትን እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች እናም የተቃዋሚ የጦር መሣሪያን የሞዴል ልብስ ለማሻለል strategy እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች በክስተት እና በጥቂት ነጥብ መስመር ውስጥ ሞዴሌዎቻችን የ-የ-የ-የ-art መሠረት ግንኙነታችንን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡", 'hy': 'Զերոյի արտադրողների լրացումը լայնորեն առաջացել է, որպեսզի հաղթահարի նպատակային բնագավառների տվյալների բացակայությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ մոտեցումները հաճախ անտեսում են արժեքների արժեքների ներկայացման և կապված արժեքների նկարագրման սահմանափակումները թաքնված տարածքում և բավարար մոդելի ուժեղություն չունեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հակադրական զրո-կրակի սովորելը հակադրական հարձակումների (CZSla-AV) մեթոդը միջոցով բնակվող վայրերի լրացման համար: Կոնտրաստիվ կորուստը նպատակն է քարտեզագրել վայրի արժեքի կոնտեքստոնալ ներկայացումները համապատասխան վայրի նկարագրման ներկայացումների համար: Եվ մենք ներկայացնում ենք հակառակ հարձակումների ուսումնասիրության ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի բարելավենք մոդելը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր հիմնական գծերը՝ զրոյի և քիչ նկարների ընթացքում:', 'az': 'Sıfır-atlı slot doldurulması məqsəd domeinlərində məlumatların zəif olmasını çəkmək üçün genişliyi artırdı. Ancaq əvvəlki tərəflər çox sıx slot qiyməti göstəricisi və əlaqəsiz slot tərəfdarlığı arasındakı müəyyənləşdirilməsini görməzlər və çox möhkəm modellərin istifadəsi yoxdur. Bu kağızda, qarşılaşdırma slotu doldurulması üçün bir kontrast Zero-Shot öyrənməsi (CZSL-Adv) metodu təklif edirik. Müxtəlif zəiflik, slot qiymətini müəyyən edilən slot qiymətlərinin göstərilmələrinə mapa etmək niyyətindədir. Və modelləri güclüyünü düzəltmək üçün düşmənçilik saldırma təhsil stratejisini tanıdırıq. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçlarımız modellərimizin sıfır-vuruş və az-vuruş ayarlarının altında mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'টার্গেট ডোমেনের তথ্যের ক্ষতির সাথে মুছে ফেলার জন্য শূণ্যগুলো স্লোট ফোল্ডার ব্যাপকভাবে উঠেছে। তবে পূর্ববর্তী পদক্ষেপ প্রায়শই স্লোট মানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং সম্পর্কিত স্লোটের বর্ণনা সাম্প্রতিক স্থানে প্রতিনিধিত্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি যে ক্রিস্টোমেইন স্লোট পূর্ণ করার জন্য একটি কন্ট্রেসিটিভ জিরো-শুট শিক্ষা দিয়েছি। বিরোধীতা ক্ষতির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে স্লোটের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মানচিত্র মানচিত্র। এবং আমরা একটি বিরোধী আক্রমণের প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল পরিচালনা করিয়ে দিচ্ছি মডেলের রোবাস্তবতা উন্নত করার জন্য। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বেসেলাইনের নীচে শূন্য গুলি এবং কয়', 'bs': 'Punjenje nule snimke široko se pojavilo kako bi se suočilo sa nedostatkom podataka u ciljnim domenama. Međutim, prethodni pristupi često ignoriraju ograničenja između predstavljanja vrijednosti slota i predstavljanja povezanog opisa slota u latentnom prostoru i nedostaju dovoljno model robustnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo kontrastivno učenje nulo-pucnjave s metodom Adversarialnog napada (CZSL-Adv) za napunjenje slot a preko domena. Kontrastivni gubitak je cilj mapirati kontekstualne predstave vrijednosti slota na odgovarajuće predstave opisa slota. I predstavljamo strategiju za obuku protivnika napada kako bi poboljšali model snagu. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi početne linije u području nule snimanja i nekoliko snimanja.', 'ca': "El rellenç d'espais de zero fotografies ha sorgit en gran medida per afrontar l'escassetat de dades en dominis d'objectiu. No obstant això, els enfocaments anteriors sovint ignoren les restriccions entre la representació del valor del slot i la descripció del slot relacionada a l'espai latent i careixen de suficient robustet del model. En aquest article, proposem un mètode d'aprenentatge contra zero amb atac adversari (CZSL-Adv) per al rellenç d'espais de domini cruz. La pèrdua contrastiva mira a mapejar les representacions contextuals del valor del slot a les descripcions correspondents del slot. I introduïm una estratègia d'entrenament d'atacs adversaris per millorar la robustet del model. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model supera significativament les línies de base de l'última generació sota la configuració de fotografies zero i pocs fotografies.", 'cs': 'Nulové vyplnění slotů se široce objevilo, aby se vyrovnalo s nedostatkem dat v cílových doménách. Předchozí přístupy však často ignorují omezení mezi reprezentací hodnot slotu a související reprezentací popisu slotu v latentním prostoru a postrádají dostatečnou robustnost modelu. V tomto článku navrhujeme metodu kontrastivního nulového učení s nepříznivým útokem (CZSL-Adv) pro naplnění slotů mezi doménami. Kontrastní ztráta si klade za cíl mapovat kontextové reprezentace hodnot slotu na odpovídající reprezentace popisu slotu. A představujeme strategii tréninku protivníků pro zlepšení robustnosti modelu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model výrazně překonává nejmodernější základní linie v nastavení nulového i několika záběrů.', 'et': 'Null-shot slot täitmine on laialdaselt tekkinud, et toime tulla andmepuudusega sihtdomeenides. Siiski ignoreerivad varasemad lähenemisviisid sageli piiranguid teenindusaja väärtuse esitamise ja seotud teenindusaja kirjelduse esitamise vahel latentses ruumis ning puuduvad piisavalt mudeli tugevus. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kontrastiivse null-shot õppe adversariaalse rünnakuga (CZSL-Adv) meetodi domeenidevahelise pesade täitmiseks. Kontrastilise kao eesmärk on kaardistada pesa väärtuse kontekstilised esitused vastavatele pesa kirjelduse esitustele. Ja me tutvustame vastase rünnaku treeningstrateegiat mudeli tugevuse parandamiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel suudab oluliselt ületada tipptasemel baasjooni nii null- kui ka vähese pildi seadetes.', 'fi': 'Zero-shot slot täyttö on laajalti noussut käsittelemään datan niukkuutta kohdealueilla. Aiemmat lähestymistavat kuitenkin usein sivuuttavat rajoitteet slotin arvon esittämisen ja siihen liittyvän slotin kuvauksen esittämisen välillä piilevässä tilassa ja puuttuvat tarpeeksi mallin kestävyyttä. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme kontrastiivista nollashotin oppimista adversariaalisella hyökkäyksellä (CZSL-Adv) -menetelmää eri toimialueiden slottien täyttämiseen. Kontrastisen häviön tarkoituksena on kartoittaa slotin arvon kontekstuaaliset esitykset vastaaviin slotin kuvauksiin. Esittelemme vastustajan hyökkäysstrategian mallin kestävyyden parantamiseksi. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi huippuluokan perusviivoista sekä nolla- että muutaman kuvan asetuksissa.', 'he': 'מילוי שורות אפס התגלה באופן רחב כדי להתמודד עם חסר נתונים בתחומים המטרה. בכל אופן, גישות קודמות לעתים קרובות מתעלמות ממגבלות בין מייצג ערך המעצר ולמייצג תיאור המעצר הקשור במרחב הסתור ולא מספיק חזקה מודל. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת לימוד נוגדי אפס עם התקפה נוגדית (CZSL-Adv) למלאי השער. האובדן ההתנגדי מכוון למפות את הערך של הקונקסטוקטואלי של המגרש לתיאור הקונקסטוקטואלי של המגרש המתאים. ואנחנו מציגים אסטרטגיה לאימון תקיפה יריבית לשפר את החזקת המודל. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהמודל שלנו יוצא משמעותית מעל קווי הבסיס המאוחרים תחת התקנות של אפס-יריות ומעט-יריות.', 'ha': "An sami filin slot-shot mai sifri don ya samu tsari da halin data cikin sauyen da aka yi amfani da. Amma, hanyoyin zaman su zaman su ƙyale tsarin a tsakanin kimar slot da kuma taƙaitar faɗilar slot masu husũma a cikin filin nan da suka ƙara kuma ba da maɓallin motsi mai isa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata shirin Filin Siro-Shirin da Muke karanta da Cikakken Attack (CZSL-Adv) wa cikakken slot-tarakin-Domin. Takacin da ke iya motsi ya yi amfani da karta kimar slot-mazaɓa da taƙaitaccen zuwa maɓallin faɗaɗa da ke daidai. Kuma za mu fara wani takikin tamko na shawara da ke motsi dõmin ya kyautata tufãtar misali. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu yana mai muhimmi outperforma halin-halin-kunna ƙarƙashin da za'a yi amfani da tsarin yin sifo da kaɗan.", 'sk': 'Za obvladovanje pomanjkanja podatkov na ciljnih področjih se je pogosto pojavilo polnjenje rež z ničelnim strelom. Vendar pa prejšnji pristopi pogosto ignorirajo omejitve med predstavitvijo vrednosti rež in povezano predstavitvijo opisa rež v latentnem prostoru in nimajo dovolj robustnosti modela. V tem prispevku predlagamo metodo kontrastnega učenja ničelnega strela z adversarnim napadom (CZSL-Adv) za polnjenje rež med domenami. Namen kontrastne izgube je preslikati kontekstne predstavitve vrednosti reže na ustrezne predstavitve opisa reže. Za izboljšanje robustnosti modela smo uvedli strategijo za vadbo proti napadu. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš model bistveno boljši od najsodobnejših osnovnih linij tako pri nastavitvah ničelnega kot pri nekaj posnetkih.', 'jv': 'slot type slot type In this paper, we proposal a contraststive nulo-shot Learning with Advertorial Attack (CZ SL-Adv) method for the krus-domain slot filling. slot type Dhewe nganggep nggawe ngerasai perbudhakan kanggo tukang layang maning, ingkang ngerasai model. Perintah sing paling nggambar kuwi model sing dikarepaké duruh-kaluluh lan banjur-kaluluh', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྟོང་ཞིང་ཡོད་པ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གནས་སྟངས་ཉམས་འབྱུང་བ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་ལྟའི་གནད་སྡུད་གྲངས་སྟོན་པར་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྒོ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང In this paper, we propose a Contrastive Zero-Shot Learning with Adversarial Attack (CZSL-Adv) method for the cross-domain slot filling. གདོང་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ས་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས ང་ཚོས་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་གདོང་ལེན་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental Results show that our model significantly performs the state-of-the-art baselines under zero-shot and few-shot settings.'}
{'en': 'Contextual Argument Component Classification for Class Discussions', 'ar': 'تصنيف مكون الحجج السياقية لمناقشات الفصل', 'es': 'Clasificación de componentes de argumentos contextuales para discusiones en clase', 'pt': 'Classificação de Componentes de Argumentos Contextuais para Discussões em Classe', 'fr': "Classification contextuelle des composants d'arguments pour les discussions de classe", 'ja': 'クラスディスカッションのためのコンテキスト引数コンポーネント分類', 'zh': '课堂议者上下文参数组件类', 'hi': 'वर्ग चर्चाओं के लिए प्रासंगिक तर्क घटक वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Классификация компонентов контекстуальных аргументов для обсуждения в классе', 'ga': 'Argóint Chomhthéacsúil Aicmiú Comhpháirte le haghaidh Plé Ranga', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση συστατικού επιχειρήματος περιβάλλοντος για συζητήσεις κλάσης', 'hu': 'Kontextuális argumentum komponensek osztályozása az osztálybeszélgetésekhez', 'it': "Classificazione dei componenti dell'argomento contestuale per discussioni di classe", 'kk': 'Контексті аргументтің компоненті класс дискуссияларының классификациясы', 'mk': 'Класификација на компонентот за контекстни аргументи за класични дискусии', 'lt': 'Contextual Argument Component Classification for Class Discussions', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Komponen Argumen Konteks untuk Diskusi Kelas', 'ml': 'ക്ലാസ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni tal-Komponent tal-Argument Kuntest għad-Diskussjonijiet tal-Klassi', 'mn': 'Тусламжийн аргументын компонент Классын Дэлхийн Тусламжийн Классификация', 'ro': 'Clasificarea componentelor contextuale pentru discuțiile de clasă', 'sr': 'Kontekstualni komponent argumenta klasifikacija za rasprave klase', 'pl': 'Kontekstowa klasyfikacja składników argumentów dla dyskusji klasowych', 'no': 'Comment', 'sv': 'Kontextuell argumentkomponentklassificering för klassdiskussioner', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණ විස්තරය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ විස්තර කොටස් ක්\u200dලාසිකරණය', 'so': 'Qeybta dhameystirka arrimaha sharciga', 'ta': 'வகுப்பு விவாதத்திற்கான உள்ளடக்க ஆரம்ப பகுதி', 'ur': 'کلاس بحث کے لئے کنٹکسٹیول آرمونٹ رغتوں کا کلاسیفٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Classificatie van contextuele argumentcomponenten voor klassediscussies', 'bg': 'Класификация на компонента на контекстния аргумент за класови дискусии', 'da': 'Kontekstuel argument komponentklassificering for klasse diskussioner', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija komponenta kontekstualnih argumenta za rasprave klase', 'de': 'Klassifizierung von Kontextargumentkomponenten für Klassendiskussionen', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Komponen Argumen Konteksual untuk Diskusi Kelas', 'ko': '교실 토론의 어경 논원 성분 분류', 'fa': 'قطعه\u200cبندی عنصر آرژومی\u200cهای محیط برای گفتگوهای کلاس', 'sw': 'Kifungu cha Uzungumzo wa Mitandao cha Context Classification for Discussions Class', 'tr': 'Tägler diskusiýasy üçin metini görkez', 'sq': 'Contextual Argument Component Classification for Class Discussions', 'az': 'S캼n캼f m칲zakir톛l톛ri 칲칞칲n m칲xt톛lif Argument Komponentl톛ri', 'am': 'iCalImp', 'af': 'Comment', 'bn': 'ক্লাসের বিতর্কের জন্য বিভিন্ন আর্গুমেন্ট কম্পোনেন্ট', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Kontekstualni komponent argumenta klasifikacija za rasprave klase', 'ca': "Classificació del component d'arguments contextuals per a debats de classe", 'et': 'Klassiarutelude kontekstikomponentide klassifitseerimine', 'cs': 'Klasifikace souvisejících komponent argumentů pro diskuse o třídě', 'fi': 'Argumenttikomponentin luokitus luokkakeskusteluissa', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'שימוש המרכיב של התווכחות הקונקסטלית לדיונים בכיתה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razvrstitev komponent kontekstnega argumenta za razprave o razredu', 'bo': 'རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་མཁན་ཆ་ཤས་ཤིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས'}
{'en': 'Argument mining systems often consider contextual information, i.e. information outside of an argumentative discourse unit, when trained to accomplish tasks such as argument component identification, classification, and relation extraction. However, prior work has not carefully analyzed the utility of different contextual properties in context-aware models. In this work, we show how two different types of contextual information, local discourse context and speaker context, can be incorporated into a computational model for classifying argument components in multi-party classroom discussions. We find that both context types can improve performance, although the improvements are dependent on context size and position.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تأخذ أنظمة تعدين الحجج في الاعتبار المعلومات السياقية ، أي المعلومات خارج وحدة الخطاب الجدلي ، عندما يتم تدريبها لإنجاز مهام مثل تحديد مكون الحجة ، والتصنيف ، واستخراج العلاقة. ومع ذلك ، فإن العمل السابق لم يحلل بعناية فائدة الخصائص السياقية المختلفة في النماذج المدركة للسياق. في هذا العمل ، نوضح كيف يمكن دمج نوعين مختلفين من المعلومات السياقية ، سياق الخطاب المحلي وسياق المتحدث ، في نموذج حسابي لتصنيف مكونات الحجة في مناقشات الفصول متعددة الأطراف. وجدنا أن كلا نوعي السياق يمكنهما تحسين الأداء ، على الرغم من أن التحسينات تعتمد على حجم السياق وموضعه.', 'fr': "Les systèmes d'exploration d'arguments prennent souvent en compte des informations contextuelles, c'est-à-dire des informations extérieures à une unité de discours argumentatif, lorsqu'ils sont formés pour accomplir des tâches telles que l'identification de composants d'arguments, la classification et l'extraction de relations. Cependant, des travaux antérieurs n'ont pas soigneusement analysé l'utilité des différentes propriétés contextuelles dans les modèles sensibles au contexte. Dans ce travail, nous montrons comment deux types différents d'informations contextuelles, le contexte du discours local et le contexte du locuteur, peuvent être intégrés dans un modèle informatique pour classer les composants d'arguments dans des discussions en classe multipartites. Nous avons constaté que les deux types de contexte peuvent améliorer les performances, bien que les améliorations dépendent de la taille et de la position du contexte.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de minería de argumentos a menudo consideran la información contextual, es decir, la información fuera de una unidad de discurso argumentativo, cuando se les capacita para realizar tareas como la identificación de componentes del argumento, la clasificación y la extracción de relaciones. Sin embargo, el trabajo anterior no ha analizado cuidadosamente la utilidad de las diferentes propiedades contextuales en los modelos sensibles al contexto. En este trabajo, mostramos cómo se pueden incorporar dos tipos diferentes de información contextual, el contexto del discurso local y el contexto del orador, en un modelo computacional para clasificar los componentes del argumento en discusiones multipartitas en el aula. Encontramos que ambos tipos de contexto pueden mejorar el rendimiento, aunque las mejoras dependen del tamaño y la posición del contexto.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de mineração de argumentos geralmente consideram informações contextuais, ou seja, informações fora de uma unidade de discurso argumentativo, quando treinados para realizar tarefas como identificação de componentes de argumentos, classificação e extração de relações. No entanto, trabalhos anteriores não analisaram cuidadosamente a utilidade de diferentes propriedades contextuais em modelos sensíveis ao contexto. Neste trabalho, mostramos como dois tipos diferentes de informações contextuais, o contexto do discurso local e o contexto do falante, podem ser incorporados a um modelo computacional para classificar componentes de argumentos em discussões multipartidárias em sala de aula. Descobrimos que ambos os tipos de contexto podem melhorar o desempenho, embora as melhorias dependam do tamanho e da posição do contexto.', 'hi': 'तर्क खनन प्रणाली अक्सर प्रासंगिक जानकारी पर विचार करती है, यानी एक तर्कसंगत प्रवचन इकाई के बाहर की जानकारी, जब तर्क घटक पहचान, वर्गीकरण और संबंध निष्कर्षण जैसे कार्यों को पूरा करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। हालांकि, पूर्व कार्य ने संदर्भ-जागरूक मॉडल में विभिन्न प्रासंगिक गुणों की उपयोगिता का सावधानीपूर्वक विश्लेषण नहीं किया है। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि कैसे दो अलग-अलग प्रकार की प्रासंगिक जानकारी, स्थानीय प्रवचन संदर्भ और स्पीकर संदर्भ, बहु-पार्टी कक्षा चर्चाओं में तर्क घटकों को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल में शामिल किया जा सकता है। हम पाते हैं कि दोनों संदर्भ प्रकार प्रदर्शन में सुधार कर सकते हैं, हालांकि सुधार संदर्भ आकार और स्थिति पर निर्भर हैं।', 'ja': '引数マイニングシステムは、引数コンポーネントの識別、分類、および関係抽出などのタスクを達成するために訓練されたときに、文脈情報、すなわち引数論証ユニットの外側の情報を考慮することが多い。しかし、先行研究は、文脈認識モデルにおける異なる文脈特性の有用性を慎重に分析していない。この研究では、多当事者教室での議論における引数コンポーネントを分類するための計算モデルに、ローカルな話題コンテキストとスピーカーコンテキストという2つの異なるタイプのコンテキスト情報をどのように組み込むことができるかを示します。どちらのコンテキストタイプもパフォーマンスを向上させることができますが、改善はコンテキストサイズと位置に依存します。', 'zh': '论掘系统训练成诸如论证组件识,分类提取等事,常思上下文信息,即论语言单元外信息也。 然前事非仔细分析异上下文性在上下文感知模形之效也。 此二者上下文息(语上下文与言者上下文)整合于计形,以别于众课堂之论组件。 此二上下文者,皆可以益性,虽易上下文大小位也。', 'ru': 'Системы интеллектуального анализа аргументов часто рассматривают контекстуальную информацию, то есть информацию за пределами единицы аргументативного дискурса, когда обучены выполнять такие задачи, как идентификация компонента аргумента, классификация и извлечение отношения. Однако в предыдущей работе не проводился тщательный анализ полезности различных контекстуальных свойств в контекстно-зависимых моделях. В этой работе мы показываем, как два различных типа контекстной информации, контекст локального дискурса и контекст спикера, могут быть включены в вычислительную модель для классификации компонентов аргумента в многопартийных обсуждениях в классе. Мы обнаружили, что оба типа контекста могут повысить производительность, хотя улучшения зависят от размера контекста и положения.', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhreathnaíonn córais mhianadóireachta argóintí ar fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil, i.e. faisnéis lasmuigh d’aonad dioscúrsa argóinteach, nuair a chuirtear oiliúint orthu chun tascanna a dhéanamh amhail aithint chomhpháirt argóinte, aicmiú agus eastóscadh gaol. Mar sin féin, ní dhearna réamhobair anailís chúramach ar áirgiúlacht airíonna comhthéacsúla éagsúla i samhlacha atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs. Sa saothar seo, léirímid conas is féidir dhá chineál éagsúla faisnéise comhthéacsúla, comhthéacs dioscúrsa áitiúil agus comhthéacs cainteora, a ionchorprú i múnla ríomhaireachtúil chun comhpháirteanna argóinte a rangú i ndíospóireachtaí ranga ilpháirtí. Faighimid amach gur féidir leis an dá chineál comhthéacs feidhmíocht a fheabhsú, cé go mbraitheann na feabhsuithe ar mhéid agus ar shuíomh an chomhthéacs.', 'ka': 'არგუმენტების მინიღების სისტემი ზოგიერთად აღმოჩენა კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია, რადგან ინფორმაცია არგუმენტური დისკურსის ერთეულის გარეშე, როდესაც აღმოჩენა დავამუშავებლად დავაკეთებლად რამე მაგრამ, წინა სამუშაო მუშაო არ აღმოჩნდა განსხვავებული კონტექსტური მნიშვნელობების სუტილიტებას კონტექსტური მოდელში. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორ განსხვავებული კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის ორი ტიპი, ლოკალური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური და კონტექსტური კონტექსტურში შეგვიძლი ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ორივე კონტექსტური ტიპები შეუძლიათ გავაკეთოთ კონტექსტური ზომაზე და პოზაციის შესახებ.', 'hu': 'Az argumentumbányászati rendszerek gyakran figyelembe veszik a kontextuális információkat, azaz egy argumentatív diskurzus egységen kívüli információkat, amikor olyan feladatok elvégzésére képezték, mint az argumentum komponens azonosítása, osztályozás és kapcsolatkitermelés. A korábbi munkák azonban nem vizsgálták alaposan a különböző kontextuális tulajdonságok hasznosságát kontextustudatos modellekben. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk, hogyan lehet két különböző típusú kontextuális információt, a helyi diskurzus kontextust és a beszélő kontextust beépíteni egy számítástechnikai modellbe az argumentumok összetevőinek osztályozására többpártos osztálytermi beszélgetésekben. Úgy találjuk, hogy mindkét kontextustípus javíthatja a teljesítményt, bár a fejlesztések a kontextus méretétől és pozíciójától függnek.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα εξόρυξης επιχειρημάτων συχνά λαμβάνουν υπόψη πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος, δηλ. πληροφορίες εκτός μιας ενότητας επιχειρηματολογίας, όταν εκπαιδεύονται για την εκπλήρωση εργασιών όπως ο προσδιορισμός στοιχείων επιχειρημάτων, η ταξινόμηση και η εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Ωστόσο, η προηγούμενη εργασία δεν έχει αναλύσει προσεκτικά τη χρησιμότητα των διαφορετικών περιεχομένων ιδιοτήτων σε μοντέλα επίγνωσης του περιβάλλοντος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε πώς δύο διαφορετικοί τύποι πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος, το τοπικό πλαίσιο λόγου και το πλαίσιο ομιλητών, μπορούν να ενσωματωθούν σε ένα υπολογιστικό μοντέλο για την ταξινόμηση στοιχείων επιχειρημάτων σε συζητήσεις πολυκομματικής τάξης. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι και οι δύο τύποι περιβάλλοντος μπορούν να βελτιώσουν την απόδοση, αν και οι βελτιώσεις εξαρτώνται από το μέγεθος και τη θέση του περιβάλλοντος.', 'it': "I sistemi di estrazione degli argomenti spesso considerano informazioni contestuali, cioè informazioni al di fuori di un'unità di discorso argomentativo, quando addestrati a svolgere attività come l'identificazione dei componenti degli argomenti, la classificazione e l'estrazione delle relazioni. Tuttavia, il lavoro precedente non ha analizzato attentamente l'utilità di diverse proprietà contestuali in modelli contestuali. In questo lavoro, mostriamo come due diversi tipi di informazioni contestuali, contesto del discorso locale e contesto degli oratori, possono essere incorporati in un modello computazionale per classificare le componenti degli argomenti nelle discussioni in aula multi-partito. Troviamo che entrambi i tipi di contesto possono migliorare le prestazioni, anche se i miglioramenti dipendono dalle dimensioni e dalla posizione del contesto.", 'mk': 'Аргументалните рударски системи честопати ги сметаат контекстните информации, т.е. информациите надвор од аргументалната дискурсничка единица, кога се обучени за извршување на задачи како идентификација на аргументалните компоненти, класификација и извлекување Сепак, претходната работа не внимателно ја анализираше корисноста на различните контекстни сопствености во моделите свесни за контекст. Во оваа работа, покажуваме како два различни вида контекстуални информации, локален контекст на дискурсот и контекст на говорникот, може да се вклучат во компјутативен модел за класификација на компонентите на аргументите во разговорите во мултипартиските класични соби. Најдовме дека двата вида контекстни резултати можат да ја подобрат резултатот, иако подобрувањата зависат од големината и позицијата на контекстот.', 'lt': 'Argument ų kasybos sistemose dažnai atsižvelgiama į kontekstinę informaciją, t. y. informaciją, kuri nėra argumentacinis diskurso vienetas, kai ji mokoma atlikti užduotis, pvz., argument ų komponentų identifikavimą, klasifikavimą ir santykių gavimą. Tačiau ankstesnis darbas neatsižvelgė į skirtingų kontekstinių savybių naudingumą atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes. Šiame darbe parodomi, kaip dviejų skirtingų tipų kontekstinė informacija, vietos diskurso kontekstas ir kalbėtojų kontekstas gali būti įtraukti į skaičiavimo model į, pagal kurį argument ų komponentai gali būti klasifikuojami daugiapakopėse klasių diskusijose. Mes manome, kad abiejų kontekstų tipai gali pagerinti rezultatus, nors pagerėjimai priklauso nuo konteksto dydžio ir padėties.', 'kk': 'Аргументтердің бағыттау жүйелері көбінесе контексті мәліметті, т. е. аргументтік дискурстар бірлігінің сыртындағы мәліметті, аргументтік компоненттің идентификациясы, классификациясы және қатынастарды тарқату Бірақ, алдыңғы жұмыс тәртіпсіздік үлгілерде түрлі контекстік қасиеттерінің утилитасын тәртіпсіздік анализ етпейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде екі түрлі контексті мәлімет, жергілікті дискурстар контексті және орындаушы контексті, бірнеше партия сыныптарда аргументтің компоненттерін классификациялау үшін компьютерлік моделіне қосылады. Біз екі контекстің түрлері әрекеттерді жақсартуға болады, бірақ жақсартулар контекстің өлшеміне мен орынға тәуелді.', 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗ്ഗമെന്റ് മൈനിംഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആലോചിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു വാദ്യാഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ സംസാര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പുറത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, ആര എന്നാലും മുമ്പ് ജോലി പരിശോധിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകരണങ്ങളുടെ ഉപയോഗ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിച ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, ലോക്കല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെയും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന നമുക്ക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d പറ്റുന്ന രണ്ടു പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് നമു', 'mt': 'Argument mining systems often consider contextual information, i.e. information outside of an argumentative discourse unit, when trained to accomplish tasks such as argument component identification, classification, and relation extraction.  Madankollu, ix-xogħol preċedenti ma analizzax bir-reqqa l-utilità ta’ proprjetajiet kuntestwali differenti f’mudelli konxji mill-kuntest. F’dan ix-xogħol, nistgħu nuru kif żewġ tipi differenti ta’ informazzjoni kuntestwali, il-kuntest tad-diskors lokali u l-kuntest tal-kelliema, jistgħu jiġu inkorporati f’mudell komputattiv għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-komponenti tal-argument f’diskussjonijiet ta’ klassijiet b’diversi partijiet. Aħna nsibu li ż-żewġ tipi ta’ kuntest jistgħu jtejbu l-prestazzjoni, għalkemm it-titjib jiddependi fuq id-daqs u l-pożizzjoni tal-kuntest.', 'ms': 'Sistem perlombongan argumen sering mempertimbangkan maklumat kontekstual, iaitu maklumat diluar unit pembicaraan argumen, apabila dilatih untuk menyelesaikan tugas seperti pengenalan komponen argumen, kelasukan, dan ekstraksi hubungan. Namun, kerja sebelumnya tidak telah menganalisis dengan teliti utiliti ciri-ciri kontekstual berbeza dalam model yang sedar-konteks. Dalam kerja ini, kita menunjukkan bagaimana dua jenis maklumat kontekstual yang berbeza, konteks pembicaraan setempat dan konteks pembicara, boleh disertai dalam model pengiraan untuk mengklasifikasikan komponen argumen dalam perbincangan kelas berbilang parti. Kami mendapati bahawa kedua-dua jenis konteks boleh meningkatkan prestasi, walaupun peningkatan bergantung pada saiz konteks dan kedudukan.', 'mn': 'Аргументийн хөрөнгө оруулалтын систем ихэвчлэн орчин үеийн мэдээлэл, т.е. аргументын ярианы нэгжээс гадна мэдээлэл, аргументын компонентын тодорхойлолт, хуваалтын, харилцааны хамаарал гаргахын тулд ажиллагааг хийх боломжтой Гэхдээ өмнөх ажлын тухай нөхцөл байдлын өөр өөр өөрчлөлтийг мэдэх загваруудын хэрэгцээг анхаарлаа шинжилгээгүй. Энэ ажил дээр бид хоёр өөр төрлийн орчин үеийн мэдээлэл, орон нутгийн ярианы тухай, ярианы тухай ярианы тухай харуулж болно. Бид олон төрлийн ангийнхээ ярилцлаганд аргументын компонентүүдийг хичээх тооны загвар руу оруулж болно. Бид хоёр контекст төрлийн дасгал үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадна. Гэхдээ сайжруулалт нөхцөл хэмжээ болон нөхцөлд хамааралтай.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de mining de argumente consideră adesea informații contextuale, adică informații în afara unei unități de discurs argumentativ, atunci când sunt instruite să îndeplinească sarcini precum identificarea componentelor argumentului, clasificarea și extragerea relațiilor. Cu toate acestea, lucrările anterioare nu au analizat cu atenție utilitatea diferitelor proprietăți contextuale în modele conștiente de context. În această lucrare, vom arăta cum două tipuri diferite de informații contextuale, contextul discursului local și contextul vorbitorilor, pot fi încorporate într-un model computațional pentru clasificarea componentelor argumentelor în discuțiile de clasă multi-partid. Considerăm că ambele tipuri de context pot îmbunătăți performanța, deși îmbunătățirile depind de dimensiunea și poziția contextului.', 'no': 'Argumentminingssystemet ser ofte på kontekstinformasjon, t.d. informasjon utenfor ein argumentativ diskurseining, når opplært for å fullføra oppgåver som argument- komponentsidentifikasjon, klassifikasjon og utpakking. Førre arbeid har imidlertid ikkje forsiktig analysert verktøyet for ulike kontekst- eigenskapar i kontekst- merke modeller. I denne arbeiden viser vi korleis to ulike typar kontekstinformasjon, lokale diskurskontekst og talekontekst kan inkluderast i eit datamaskin modell for å klassifisera argumentkomponentar i fleire parti-klassessesjonar. Vi finn at begge konteksttypar kan forbetra utviklinga, men forbetringane er avhengig av kontekststorleik og posisjon.', 'pl': 'Systemy wydobywania argumentów często uwzględniają informacje kontekstowe, tj. informacje poza jednostką dyskursu argumentatywnego, gdy są przeszkolone do realizacji zadań takich jak identyfikacja składników argumentów, klasyfikacja i ekstrakcja relacji. Jednak wcześniejsze prace nie dokładnie analizowały użyteczności różnych właściwości kontekstowych w modelach kontekstowych. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, w jaki sposób dwa różne rodzaje informacji kontekstowych, kontekst dyskursu lokalnego i kontekst prelegenta, mogą być włączone do modelu obliczeniowego klasyfikacji składników argumentów w wielopartyjnych dyskusjach klasowych. Stwierdzimy, że oba typy kontekstu mogą poprawić wydajność, chociaż ulepszenia zależą od wielkości kontekstu i pozycji.', 'si': 'වාර්තාවක් මන්ත්\u200dරය පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තර තොරතුරු හිතන්න, ඉතින් වාර්තාවක් විස්තර කතාවක් යුනිකයෙන් එළියට තොරතුරු හිතන්න, ප්\u200d නමුත්, මුලින් වැඩේ පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ වෙනස් සංවේදනය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේ මේ වැඩේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත තොරතුරු දෙකක්, ස්ථානික සංවේදනය සහ ස්පීකර් සංවේදනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිපත්ති වලින්  අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සංවේදන වර්ගය දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒත් ප්\u200dරශ්', 'so': 'Sida badan nidaamka meelaha lagu jarayo waxay inta badan ka fikiraan macluumaad joogtada ah, marka lagu baranayo in la dhamaado shaqooyinka sida aqoonsiga kooxaha warqada ah, fasixinta iyo soo bixinta xiriirka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqo horay uma anan si taxadar leh u baarayn isticmaalka hantida joogtada ah oo kala duduwan tusaale ahaan. Markaas waxaynu tusnaynaa sidoo kale laba noocyo oo kala duduwan macluumaadka joogtada ah, xiriirka hadalka deegaanka iyo mukhsiyada hadalka, waxaa laguugu qori karaa tusaale xisaab ah oo loo kala qeybiyo qaybaha iskuullada kooxaha kala duduwan. Waxaynu ognahay in labada noocyo ee mukhaadaraadka ah ay kordhin karaan tababarka, inkastoo horumarintu waxay ku xiran tahay mid ku qoran tirada iyo booska.', 'sr': 'Argumentalni rudarski sistemi često razmišljaju o kontekstualnim informacijama, tj. informacijama izvan argumentativne diskurske jedinice, kada su obučeni da postignu zadatke poput identifikacije komponenta argumentacija, klasifikacije i izvlačenja odnosa. Međutim, prethodni rad nije pažljivo analizirao korisnost različitih kontekstualnih vlasništva u modelima koji su svesni konteksta. U ovom poslu pokazujemo kako se dva različita vrsta kontekstualnih informacija, lokalni kontekst diskusija i kontekst govornika mogu uključiti u računalni model za klasifikaciju komponenta argument a u razgovorima o multistrancima. Nalazimo da obje tipe konteksta mogu poboljšati funkciju, iako su poboljšanja zavisna od veličine konteksta i položaja.', 'ta': 'அருமதி குழந்தை அமைப்புகள் பெரும்பாலாகவே தற்காலிக தகவலை பார்க்கவும், அதாவது வார்த்தைப் பேச்சு அலகுக்கு வெளியே தகவல், வார்ப்பு பொருள் கூறு அடையா ஆனால், முன்னால் வேலை கவனமாக ஆராய்ந்திருக்கவில்லை சூழல் உணர்ந்து கொள்ளும் மாதிரிகளில் வேறு தற்போதைய பண் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் எவ்வாறு இரண்டு வேறு வகையான தகவல், உள்ளூர் பேச்சு சூழல் மற்றும் பேச்சாளர் சூழல், பல அமர்வு வகுப்பு வகுப்பு தருமதிப்பு பொருள்களை வகுப்பதற இரு சூழல் வகைகளும் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், ஆனால் முன்னேற்றம் சூ', 'ur': 'آرمونٹ مینینگ سیسٹم اکثر متوسط معلومات کو سمجھتے ہیں، یعنی آرمونٹیوں کی گفتگو یونیٹ کے بغیر معلومات، جب کاموں کو پورا کرنے کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے جیسے آرمونٹ رقم کی شناسایی، کلاسیفوں اور رابطہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ لیکن پہلے کے کام نے مختلف کنٹکسٹیسٹ ویسٹیوں کے استعمال کو سیدھی طرح تحقیق نہیں کیا ہے۔ ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ کیسے دو مختلف قسم کی کنٹکسٹ معلومات، محلی گفتگو کنٹکسٹ اور اسپیکر کنٹکسٹ، ایک کامپیوتر موڈل میں داخل کئے جاتے ہیں جو بہت پارٹی کلاسروم کے بحث میں آرمونٹ رغتوں کو کلسیف کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ دونوں کنٹکس ٹائپ کی عملکرد کو بہتر کر سکتے ہیں، اگرچہ سوداگری کانٹکس اندازہ اور موقعیت پر اعتماد ہے.', 'sv': 'Argument mining system tar ofta hänsyn till kontextuell information, dvs information utanför en argumentativ diskursenhet, när de utbildas för att utföra uppgifter som argumentkomponentidentifiering, klassificering och relationsextraktion. Tidigare arbete har dock inte noggrant analyserat nyttan av olika kontextuella egenskaper i kontextmedvetna modeller. I detta arbete visar vi hur två olika typer av kontextuell information, lokal diskurskontext och talarkontroll, kan integreras i en beräkningsmodell för att klassificera argumentkomponenter i flerpartsdiskussioner i klassrum. Vi finner att båda kontexttyperna kan förbättra prestanda, även om förbättringarna beror på kontextstorlek och position.', 'uz': "Argument mining tizimi ko'pincha taʼminlovchi maʼlumot, balki argumentlar birikmasidan boshqa maʼlumotni ishga tushirishga o'rganadi. Argument komponent identification, classification, va murakkab chiqarish kabi vazifalarni bajarishga o'rganishda. Lekin oldin ishlar taʼminlovchi modellarda har xil xil xossalarning foydalanishini taʼlum qilmaydi. Bu ishda biz bir xil xil ma'lumot, lokal suhbat muktadha va gapiruvchi muktadha qanday bir xil xil turlarini bir nechta bir xil darajadagi argumentlar qismlarini birlashtirish uchun kompyuter modeliga qo'yishingiz mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, ikkita xil turlari bajarishni bajarishi mumkin, ammo o o'zgarishlar taʼminlov oʻlchami va joyga ishonadi.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống khai thác tranh luận thường xem xét các thông tin ngữ cảnh, tức là thông tin nằm ngoài các đơn vị thuyết trình đầy thuyết trình, khi được huấn luyện để thực hiện các nhiệm vụ như là nhận dạng các phần cãi, phân loại, và các mối quan hệ. Tuy nhiên, công việc trước đây chưa phân tích cẩn thận tiện ích của các tính chất ngữ cảnh khác nhau trong các mô- đun nhận diện ngữ cảnh. Trong vở kịch này, chúng tôi cho thấy hai loại thông tin ngữ cảnh khác nhau, ngữ cảnh ngôn ngữ địa phương và ngữ cảnh diễn đạt, có thể nhập vào một mô hình tính để phân loại các thành phần tranh luận trong các cuộc thảo luận đa đảng. Chúng tôi thấy cả hai kiểu ngữ cảnh có thể cải thiện lợi thế, mặc dù cải tiến phụ thuộc vào kích thước và vị trí tương ứng.', 'da': 'Argument mining systemer overvejer ofte kontekstuel information, dvs. information uden for en argumentativ diskursenhed, når de er trænet til at udføre opgaver som argumentkomponentidentifikation, klassificering og relationsudvinding. Tidligere arbejde har dog ikke omhyggeligt analyseret nytten af forskellige kontekstuelle egenskaber i kontekstbevidste modeller. I dette arbejde viser vi, hvordan to forskellige typer kontekstuel information, lokal diskurs kontekst og taler kontekst, kan indarbejdes i en beregningsmodel til klassificering af argumentkomponenter i flerpartidiskussioner i klasseværelset. Vi finder ud af, at begge konteksttyper kan forbedre ydeevnen, selvom forbedringerne afhænger af kontekststørrelse og position.', 'hr': 'Argumentski rudarski sustavi često smatraju kontekstualnim informacijama, tj. informacijama izvan jedinice argumentativnih diskursa, kada su obučeni za postizanje zadataka poput identifikacije, klasifikacije i izvlačenja odnosa. Međutim, prethodni rad nije pažljivo analizirao korisnost različitih kontekstualnih vlasništva u modelima koji su svjesni konteksta. U ovom poslu pokazujemo kako se dva različita vrsta kontekstualnih informacija, lokalni kontekst diskusija i kontekst govornika mogu uključiti u računalni model za klasifikaciju komponenta argument a u razgovorima o učionicama multistranaka. Smatramo da obje tipe konteksta mogu poboljšati učinkovitost, iako su poboljšanja ovisni o veličini konteksta i položaju.', 'nl': 'Argument mining systemen beschouwen vaak contextuele informatie, dat wil zeggen informatie buiten een argumentatieve discourseenheid, wanneer ze getraind worden om taken zoals identificatie van argumentcomponenten, classificatie en relatieontwikkeling uit te voeren. Eerder werk heeft echter niet zorgvuldig geanalyseerd het nut van verschillende contextuele eigenschappen in contextbewuste modellen. In dit werk laten we zien hoe twee verschillende soorten contextuele informatie, lokale discourscontext en sprekerscontext, kunnen worden verwerkt in een computermodel voor het classificeren van argumentcomponenten in multi-party classroom discussies. We merken dat beide contexttypen de prestaties kunnen verbeteren, hoewel de verbeteringen afhankelijk zijn van contextgrootte en positie.', 'bg': 'Системите за извличане на аргументи често разглеждат контекстуалната информация, т.е. информация извън аргументативна дискурсна единица, когато са обучени да изпълняват задачи като идентифициране на компонента на аргумента, класификация и извличане на релации. Въпреки това, предишната работа не е анализирала внимателно полезността на различни контекстуални свойства в контекстни модели. В тази работа ние показваме как два различни типа контекстуална информация, локален дискурсен контекст и контекст на говорителя, могат да бъдат включени в изчислителен модел за класифициране на компонентите на аргументите в многопартийни класни дискусии. Откриваме, че и двата типа контекста могат да подобрят ефективността, въпреки че подобренията зависят от размера и позицията на контекста.', 'de': 'Argument Mining Systeme berücksichtigen oft kontextbezogene Informationen, d.h. Informationen außerhalb einer argumentativen Diskurseinheit, wenn sie trainiert werden, Aufgaben wie Identifizierung von Argumentkomponenten, Klassifizierung und Beziehungsextraktion zu erfüllen. Bisherige Arbeiten haben jedoch den Nutzen verschiedener Kontexteigenschaften in kontextbewussten Modellen nicht sorgfältig analysiert. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, wie zwei verschiedene Arten von Kontextinformationen, lokaler Diskurskontext und Referentenkontext, in ein computergestütztes Modell zur Klassifizierung von Argumentkomponenten in Mehrparteiendiskussionen integriert werden können. Wir stellen fest, dass beide Kontexttypen die Leistung verbessern können, obwohl die Verbesserungen von der Kontextgröße und -position abhängen.', 'ko': '논증 발굴 시스템은 논증 성분 식별, 분류와 관계 추출 등 임무를 훈련하여 완성할 때 언어 환경 정보, 즉 논증 언어 단원 이외의 정보를 고려한다.그러나 이전의 작업은 상하문 감지 모델에서 서로 다른 상하문 속성의 효용을 자세하게 분석하지 않았다.이 작업에서 우리는 두 가지 서로 다른 유형의 언어 환경 정보, 현지 어편 언어 환경과 말하는 사람의 언어 환경을 하나의 계산 모델에 통합시켜 다방면 교실에서 토론한 논점 성분을 분류하는 방법을 보여 주었다.우리는 이 두 가지 상하문 유형이 모두 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다는 것을 발견했다. 비록 개선은 상하문의 크기와 위치에 달려 있지만.', 'id': 'Sistem penambangan argumen sering mempertimbangkan informasi kontekstual, i.e. informasi diluar unit diskors argumensif, ketika dilatih untuk menyelesaikan tugas seperti identifikasi komponen argumen, klasifikasi, dan ekstraksi hubungan. However, prior work has not carefully analyzed the utility of different contextual properties in context-aware models.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bagaimana dua jenis informasi kontekstual yang berbeda, konteks diskors lokal dan konteks pembicara, dapat dimasukkan ke dalam model komputasi untuk mengklasifikasi komponen argumen dalam diskusi kelas multi-parti. We find that both context types can improve performance, although the improvements are dependent on context size and position.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای ذخیره\u200cکننده آرژومی اغلب اطلاعات موضوع را در نظر می\u200cگیرند، یعنی اطلاعات خارج از یک واحد صحبت مطلوب، هنگامی که آموزش داده می\u200cشود تا کارهایی را انجام دهند مثل شناسایی عناصر رژومی، فرآیندگی و اخراج ارتباط ولی کار پیشینیان، استفاده از ویژه های متفاوتی مختلف در مدلهای آگاهی محیط به دقت تحلیل نکرده است. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه دو نوع اطلاعات متفاوت، محیط صحبت محلی و محیط صحبت\u200cکننده، می\u200cتوانند در یک مدل محاسبه برای کلاس\u200cشناسی رقم\u200cهای مجموعه در بحث\u200cهای کلاس\u200cهای متفاوت در کلاس\u200cهای متفاوت جمع شوند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که هر دو نوع محیط می\u200cتواند عملکرد را بهتر کند، اگرچه توسعه\u200cها به اندازه و موقعیت محیط بستگی دارند.', 'sq': 'Sistemet e minierave të argumenteve shpesh konsiderojnë informacion kontekstual, pra informacion jashtë një njësie diskursi argumentuese, kur janë trajnuar për të kryer detyra të tilla si identifikimi i komponenteve të argumenteve, klasifikimi dhe nxjerrja e marrëdhënieve. Megjithatë, puna e mëparshme nuk ka analizuar me kujdes utilitetin e pronave të ndryshme kontekstuale në modelet e vetëdijshëm për kontekstin. In this work, we show how two different types of contextual information, local discourse context and speaker context, can be incorporated into a computational model for classifying argument components in multi-party classroom discussions.  Ne zbulojmë se të dy tipat e kontekstit mund të përmirësojnë performancën, megjithëse përmirësimet varen nga madhësia e kontekstit dhe pozita.', 'af': "Argument mining stelsels beskou dikwels contextual informasie, bv. inligting buite van 'n argumentatiewe diskursie eenheid, wanneer opgeleer word om taak te voldoen soos argument komponent identifikasie, klasifikasie en verwanting uitvoer. Maar voorheede werk het nie versigtig die nutsprogram van verskillende contextual eienskappe in konteks-bewyse modele analyseer nie. In hierdie werk vertoon ons hoe twee verskillende tipes van contextual inligting, plaaslike diskurse konteks en sprekker konteks kan ingesluit word in 'n rekenaarse model vir klassifisering van argumentkomponente in multi party klaskamer diskusies. Ons vind dat beide kontekstipes funksie kan verbeter, alhoewel die verbeteringe afhang van konteksgrootte en posisie.", 'tr': 'Argumentler köçülemek sistemleri köplenç contextual maglumatlary düşünýär, myselýet argument i ýa söz jediniň daşynda maglumat, argumentiň komponenti identifikaýasy, klasifikasyýa we harplary çykarmak üçin bejermek üçin öwrenmeli bolýar. Ýöne öňki işden öňki görnüş nusgalarda farklı contextual häsiýetleriniň ullanyşyny ünsli çözümlenmedi. Bu işde, biz iki dürli çeşit contextual maglumaty, ýerli diskusiýa konteksti we sözler kontekstini görkezip bilýäris, multi-party synpdaky diskusiýalarda argüm a ýratynyň klasifikasy üçin bir kompýuter modeli girişip biler. Biz iki kontekst türleri etkinlik gowylaşdyryp biler diýip pikir edýäris, eger gelişmeler kontekst ululykyna we ýerlerinde baglanýar.', 'am': 'የአርጉም ጉዳይ መቆጣጠር ሲስተም፣ የግንኙነት ጉዳይ እና ግንኙነት ማድረግ ማድረግ በተማረ ጊዜ፣ እንደተጨማሪው አካባቢው ማድረግ፣ መግለጫ እና ግንኙነት ማድረግ ማድረግ በተማረ ጊዜ፣ የግንኙነት ጉዳይ ማድረግ አስተማርተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው ስራ በተጨማሪው የአካባቢው ምርጫዎች በሥርዓት-አውቃቂው ሞዴላዎችን በመጠቀም በጥያቄ ላይ በመጠቀም አያስተምርም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ሁለት ዓይነት የተለያዩ መረጃዎች፣ የቅርብ ንግግር ግንኙነት እና የንግግር ሥርዓት፣ እንዴት እንደተለያዩ አካባቢ ክፍተቶችን በብዙ-ፓርቲው ክፍል ውይይቶች ውስጥ ለመለየፍ እንደተደረገው ይችላል ብለን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ሁለትም የሥርዓት ዓይነቶች የሥርዓቱን ማሻሻል እንደሚችል እናገኛለን፤ ጥሩ ግን በሥርዓት መጠን እና ስፍራው ላይ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Argument madenci sistemləri sık-sık müxtəlif məlumatları, məsələn, argumentativ diskurs birliklərinin dışında məlumatları, argumentativ komponent tanıması, klasifikasyon və əlaqələr çıxarması kimi i şləri yerinə yetirmək üçün təhsil edildikdə düşünürlər. Ancaq əvvəlki işin məlumatlarında fərqli müxtəlif xüsusiyyətlərin istifadəsini təhlükəsizliklə analiz etmədi. Bu işdə, biz müxtəlif məlumatların, yerli söhbət məlumatlarının və söhbətçilərin məlumatlarının nə cür müxtəlif məlumatlarının, çoxlu parti sınıf məlumatlarında arqüment komponentlərini klasifikasyon üçün hesaplayan modellərə daxil edilə bilərik. İki kontekst növlərinin performansını daha yaxşılaşdıra biləcəyini görürük, lakin düzəltmələr kontekst böyüklüyü və posisiyasına bağlı olsalar belə.', 'hy': 'Արգենտատիվ հանքային համակարգերը հաճախ համարում են կոնտեքստոնալ ինֆորմացիա, այսինքն, ինֆորմացիա արգենտատիվ խոսակցության միավորից դուրս, երբ սովորեցվում են կատարել այնպիսի խնդիրներ, ինչպիսիք են արգենտատիվ բաղադրիչ Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ աշխատանքը ուշադիր չի վերլուծել տարբեր կոնտեքստային հատկությունների օգտակարությունը կոնտեքստի գիտակցած մոդելներում: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կարելի է ներառել երկու տարբեր տեսակի կոնտեքստոնալ ինֆորմացիա, տեղական խոսակցային կոնտեքստ և խոսակցային կոնտեքստ, բազմակողմների դասարանի քննարկումների ընթացքում հաշվարկման մոդե Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ երկու կոնտեքստի տեսակները կարող են բարելավել արդյունքը, չնայած որ բարելավումները կախված են կոնտեքստի չափից և դիրքից:', 'bn': 'আর্গামেন্ট মিনিং সিস্টেম প্রায়শ তথ্য বিবেচনা করে, যেমন একটি যুক্তিভাবে কথোপকথন ইউনিটের বাইরে তথ্য, যেমন যুক্তিগত পরিচয়, বিভিন্ন সংখ্যা এবং সম্পর্ক তবে পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিভিন্ন বর্তমান বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ্লেষণ করা হয়নি। এই কাজে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য, স্থানীয় কথোপকথন প্রেক্ষাপট এবং বক্তৃপক্ষের প্রেক্ষেত্রে কিভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য, স্থানী আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে দুটি প্রসঙ্গের ধরনের প্রভাব উন্নত করতে পারে, যদিও উন্নতি প্রকৃতির আকার ও অবস্থানের উপর নির্ভর করে।', 'bs': 'Argumentski rudarski sustavi često smatraju kontekstualnim informacijama, tj. informacijama izvan jedinice argumentativnih diskursa, kada su obučeni da postignu zadatke poput identifikacije komponenta argumentacija, klasifikacije i izvlačenja odnosa. Međutim, prethodni rad nije pažljivo analizirao korisnost različitih kontekstualnih vlasništva u modelima koji su svjesni konteksta. U ovom poslu pokazujemo kako se dva različita vrsta kontekstualnih informacija, lokalni kontekst diskusija i kontekst govornika mogu uključiti u računalni model za klasifikaciju komponenta argument a u razgovorima o multistrancima. Nalazimo da obje tipe konteksta mogu poboljšati učinkovitost, iako su poboljšanja zavisna od veličine konteksta i položaja.', 'cs': 'Argument mining systémy často uvažují o kontextových informacích, tj. informacích mimo argumentativní diskurzní jednotku, když jsou trénovány k plnění úkolů, jako je identifikace argumentních komponent, klasifikace a extrakce vztahů. Předchozí práce však nebyla pečlivě analyzována užitečnost různých kontextových vlastností v kontextových modelech. V této práci ukazujeme, jak mohou být dva různé typy kontextových informací, lokální diskurzní kontext a kontext řečníka, začleněny do výpočetního modelu pro klasifikaci argumentních komponent v multistranných třídních diskuzích. Zjistili jsme, že oba typy kontextu mohou zlepšit výkon, i když tato zlepšení závisí na velikosti kontextu a pozici.', 'et': 'Argumentide kaevandamise süsteemid kaaluvad sageli kontekstiteavet, st teavet väljaspool argumentatiivset diskursusüksust, kui nad on koolitatud täitma selliseid ülesandeid nagu argumentide komponentide identifitseerimine, klassifitseerimine ja seoste kaevandamine. Samas ei ole varasemates töödes hoolikalt analüüsitud erinevate kontekstuaalsete omaduste kasulikkust kontekstiteadlikes mudelites. Käesolevas töös näitame, kuidas kahte erinevat tüüpi kontekstiteavet, kohalikku diskursuse konteksti ja kõneleja konteksti, saab integreerida arvutusmudelisse argumentide komponentide klassifitseerimiseks mitmepoolsetes klassiruumis. Leiame, et mõlemad kontekstitüübid võivad parandada jõudlust, kuigi parandused sõltuvad konteksti suurusest ja positsioonist.', 'fi': 'Argumenttien louhinta-järjestelmät ottavat usein huomioon kontekstuaalisen tiedon eli argumentoivan diskurssiyksikön ulkopuolisen tiedon, kun ne on koulutettu suorittamaan tehtäviä kuten argumenttikomponenttien tunnistamista, luokittelua ja suhdeuuttamista. Aiemmassa työssä ei kuitenkaan ole huolellisesti analysoitu erilaisten kontekstuaalisten ominaisuuksien hyödyllisyyttä kontekstitiivisissä malleissa. Tässä työssä näytämme, miten kaksi erilaista kontekstitietoa, paikallinen diskurssikonteksti ja puhujakontakti, voidaan yhdistää laskennalliseen malliin argumenttikomponenttien luokitteluun monipuoluekeskusteluissa. Molemmat kontekstityypit voivat parantaa suorituskykyä, vaikka parannukset riippuvat kontekstin koosta ja sijainnista.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa uchimbaji madini mara nyingi hufikiria taarifa za kimataifa, yaani taarifa nje ya kituo cha mazungumzo ya mazungumzo, wakati ambapo walifundishwa kufanya kazi kama vile kutambua vifaa vya hoja, usambazaji, na utekelezaji wa mahusiano. Hata hivyo, kazi ya kabla haijachambua matumizi ya utaalam tofauti tofauti katika mifano inayofahamika. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha jinsi a in a mbili tofauti za taarifa za kimataifa, mazungumzo ya mazungumzo ya ndani na mazungumzo ya mazungumzo na mazungumzo ya mazungumzo, inaweza kuingizwa katika mtindo wa kompyuta wa kutangaza vifaa vya hoja katika majadiliano ya darasa la vyama vingi. Tunapata kwamba aina zote za muktadha zinaweza kuboresha ufanisi, ingawa maboresho yanategemea kwa kiwango na nafasi.', 'ca': 'Argument mining systems often consider contextual information, i.e. information outside of an argumentative discourse unit, when trained to accomplish tasks such as argument component identification, classification, and relation extraction.  Però la feina anterior no ha analitzat atentament la utilitat de diferents propietats contextuals en models conscients del context. In this work, we show how two different types of contextual information, local discourse context and speaker context, can be incorporated into a computational model for classifying argument components in multi-party classroom discussions.  Trobem que ambdós tipus de context poden millorar el rendiment, encara que les millores depenen de la mida i la posició del context.', 'sk': 'Sistemi rudarjenja argumentov pogosto upoštevajo kontekstualne informacije, tj. informacije zunaj argumentativne diskurzne enote, kadar so usposobljeni za opravljanje nalog, kot so identifikacija komponent argumentov, klasifikacija in ekstrakcija relacij. Vendar predhodno delo ni natančno analiziralo uporabnosti različnih kontekstualnih lastnosti v modelih, ki se zavedajo konteksta. V tem delu smo pokazali, kako je mogoče dve različni vrsti kontekstualnih informacij, lokalni kontekst diskurza in kontekst govornika, vključiti v računalniški model za klasifikacijo komponent argumentov v večstrankarskih razpravah v učilnici. Ugotavljamo, da lahko obe vrsti konteksta izboljšata učinkovitost, čeprav so izboljšave odvisne od velikosti konteksta in položaja.', 'ha': 'Systemi masu zartar da aiki masu yiwuwa ana ƙayyade information masu haɗi, misali, information baka wani shirin mazaɓa da muhimmada, a lõkacin da aka sanar da su su cika aikin kama da shaidar abu masu zama zane, sifati da kuma cire-faɗi. A lokacin da, kafin aiki bai yi ƙidãya haƙin amfani da wasu properties masu cikin motsi-masu sani ba. In this work, we show how two different types of contextual information, local discourse context and speaker context, can be incorporated into a computational model for classifying argument components in multi-party classroom discussions.  Muna gane cewa misãlai biyu masu ƙari saurin performance, kuma kõ da yaushe, improvements sun dõgara ga girmar da wurin.', 'he': 'מערכות כריית טיעונים לעתים קרובות שוקלות מידע קונטקסטי, כלומר מידע מחוץ ליחידת דיבור טיעון, כאשר מאומנות להשיג משימות כמו זיהוי רכיבי טיעון, קליזציה, וחילוץ יחסים. עם זאת, עבודה קודמת לא ניתחה בזהירות את שימוש של תכונות קונטקטואליות שונות בדוגמנים מודעים לקנטקסט. בעבודה הזו, אנו מראים איך שני סוגים שונים של מידע קונטקסטי, קונטקסט דיבור מקומי וקונקסט דיבורים, יכולים להיות מעורבים למודל מחשבי להקליזת רכיבי טיעון בדיונים בכיתות רבות. אנחנו מוצאים ששני סוגי הקשר יכולים לשפר את ההופעה, למרות שהשיפורים תלויים בגודל הקשר ומיקום.', 'jv': 'Report translation bugs to <\\.\\.\\.> Nanging, akeh sing sabanjuré karo nggambar-sabanjuré ora oné dicasakno ning alat karo contextual karo model sing oleh-sabanjuré. Nang gunggo iki, kita sembarang kelas telu akeh sampek informasi contextual, sampek kontèks lokal kanggo langgar sampek, iso disenyongno sistem kompatis kanggo kelas kompatis Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dibutuhke sing bisa dianggap akeh gunakake', 'bo': 'Argument mining systems often consider contextual information, i.e. information outside of an argumentative discourse unit, when trained to accomplish tasks such as argument component identification, classification, and relation extraction.  ཡིན་ནའང་། ལས་ཀ་སྔོན་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་གྱིས་contextual ངོ་བོའི་སྤྱོད་ཆས་མི་འདྲ་བ་དེ་སྟབས་བདེན་བཤད་མེད། In this work, we show how two different types of contextual information, local discourse context and speaker context, can be incorporated into a computational model for classifying argument components in multi-party classroom discussions. ང་ཚོས་ཁྱེར་ཡུག་ཀྱི་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་གནས་ཡུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained Language Model Based Active Learning for Sentence Matching', 'ar': 'التعلم النشط القائم على نموذج اللغة المدربين مسبقًا لمطابقة الجمل', 'fr': 'Apprentissage actif basé sur un modèle linguistique pré-formé pour la correspondance des phrases', 'pt': 'Aprendizado ativo baseado em modelo de linguagem pré-treinado para correspondência de frases', 'zh': '盖预训言模之句,匹配自学', 'ru': 'Активное обучение на основе предварительно обученной языковой модели для сопоставления предложений', 'hi': 'वाक्य मिलान के लिए पूर्व प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल आधारित सक्रिय शिक्षा', 'es': 'Aprendizaje activo preentrenado basado en modelos de lenguaje para la correspondencia de', 'ja': '文章マッチングのための事前トレーニング済み言語モデルベースのアクティブラーニング', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Ghníomhach Bunaithe ar Mhúnla Teanga le haghaidh Meaitseáil Pianbhreithe', 'ka': 'წინ შესწავლილი ენის მოდელის ბაზი აკრთვიური სწავლის შესაბამისათვის სიტყვების შესაბამისათვის', 'el': 'Προεκπαιδευμένη ενεργή μάθηση βασισμένη σε γλωσσικό μοντέλο για αντιστοίχιση προτάσεων', 'hu': 'Előképzett nyelvi modell alapú aktív tanulás a mondatok egyeztetéséhez', 'it': 'Apprendimento attivo basato su modelli linguistici pre-addestrati per la corrispondenza delle frasi', 'lt': 'Išankstinio mokymo kalbos modeliu pagrįstas aktyvus mokymasis, skirtas nuosprendžių derinimui', 'mk': 'Претренирано учење за совпаѓање на речениците на активно учење базирано на јазичкиот модел', 'kk': 'Сөзді сәйкестіру үшін белсенді оқыту үшін алдындағы тіл үлгісі', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Aktif Berasas Model Bahasa Latihan-Latihan untuk Perpadanan Perkataan', 'ml': 'ശിക്ഷ പൊരുത്തപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി പഠിക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന ഭാഷ മോഡില്\u200d സജ്ജീ', 'mt': 'Tagħlim attiv ibbażat fuq mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel għat-tqabbil tas-sentenzi', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загвар Үүний сургалтын үндсэн актив суралцах', 'no': 'Førehandsvis språk- modell basert aktiv læring for setningar', 'pl': 'Aktywne uczenie się oparte na modelu językowym dla dopasowywania zdań', 'sr': 'Pre obučeni jezički model osnovan na aktivnom učenju za odgovarajuće rečenice', 'ro': 'Învățare activă bazată pe modele lingvistice pre-instruite pentru potrivirea sentințelor', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂාව මොඩල් අධාරිත සක්\u200dරිය සිහිනය', 'sv': 'Förbränat språkmodellbaserat aktivt lärande för meningsmatchning', 'ta': 'வாக்கியத்தை பொருத்துவதற்கான முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி அடிப்படையான செயல் கற்றல்', 'so': 'Waxbarashada waxqabadka ee u dhexeeya waxbarashada heerka afka hore', 'ur': 'مطابق مطابق کے لئے پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل بنیاد فعال یادگیری', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bản mẫu ngôn ngữ được đào tạo để học cách kết nối bản án', 'da': 'Forududdannet sprogmodel baseret aktiv læring til sætningsmatchning', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleid op taalmodel gebaseerd actief leren voor zinsmatching', 'bg': 'Предварително обучени езикови модели базирани активно обучение за съвпадение на изреченията', 'hr': 'Preobučeni jezički model na temelju aktivnog učenja za odgovarajuće kazne', 'ko': '예비 훈련 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 문장 일치 능동 학습', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Aktif Berdasarkan Model Bahasa yang Dipelatih Berdasarkan untuk Perpadanan Perkataan', 'fa': 'مدل پیش آموزش زبان بر اساس یادگیری فعال برای هماهنگ جواب', 'de': 'Vorgeschultes Sprachmodell basiertes aktives Lernen für Satzmatching', 'af': 'Vorige onderwerp Taal Model Basies Aktiewe Leer vir Uitdrukking', 'sw': 'Kitendo cha Kitivo cha Kijifunza kwa ajili ya Matukio ya Hukumu', 'tr': 'Öňki eğlenen Dil Modeli Öňlenmek üçin Jawany Öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi aktiv për përputhjen e dënimeve bazuar në modelin e gjuhës të paratrajnuar', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'az': 'Ön təhsil edilmiş Dil Modeli Sözü eşitməsi üçün Etkinli Öyrənmə', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի հիմնված ակտիվ սովորելը դատողությունների համապատասխանման համար', 'bn': 'শাস্তি মিশ্রণের জন্য পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল', 'bs': 'Preobučeni jezički model temeljno aktivno učenje za odgovarajuće rečenice', 'ca': 'Aprendiment actiu per a ajustar sentences basat en un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat', 'cs': 'Předškolené jazykové modely založené na aktivním učení pro porovnávání vět', 'et': 'Eelõpetatud keelemudelil põhinev aktiivne õpe lausete sobitamiseks', 'fi': 'Esikoulutettu kielimallipohjainen aktiivinen oppiminen lauseiden täsmäytystä varten', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Layout', 'he': 'מודל שפה מאומן מראש מבוסס על לימוד פעיל לתאמת גזרים', 'sk': 'Aktivno učenje na osnovi jezikovnega modela za usklajevanje stavkov', 'bo': 'གསལ་བརྗོད་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ལ་སྔོན་གྱིས་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞི་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནུས་ཤོག་ཚད'}
{'en': 'Active learning is able to significantly reduce the annotation cost for data-driven techniques. However, previous active learning approaches for natural language processing mainly depend on the entropy-based uncertainty criterion, and ignore the characteristics of natural language. In this paper, we propose a pre-trained language model based active learning approach for sentence matching. Differing from previous active learning, it can provide linguistic criteria from the pre-trained language model to measure instances and help select more effective instances for annotation. Experiments demonstrate our approach can achieve greater accuracy with fewer labeled training instances.', 'ar': 'التعلم النشط قادر على تقليل تكلفة التعليقات التوضيحية بشكل كبير للتقنيات التي تعتمد على البيانات. ومع ذلك ، فإن مناهج التعلم النشط السابقة لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية تعتمد بشكل أساسي على معيار عدم اليقين القائم على الانتروبيا ، وتتجاهل خصائص اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهج التعلم النشط القائم على نموذج لغة مدرب مسبقًا لمطابقة الجملة. يختلف عن التعلم النشط السابق ، يمكن أن يوفر معايير لغوية من نموذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا لقياس الحالات والمساعدة في تحديد حالات أكثر فاعلية للتعليق التوضيحي. تظهر التجارب أن نهجنا يمكن أن يحقق دقة أكبر مع عدد أقل من حالات التدريب المصنفة.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage actif permet de réduire considérablement le coût des annotations pour les techniques pilotées par les données. Cependant, les approches d'apprentissage actif précédentes pour le traitement du langage naturel dépendent principalement du critère d'incertitude basé sur l'entropie et ignorent les caractéristiques du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche d'apprentissage actif basée sur un modèle linguistique pré-entraîné pour l'appariement des phrases. Contrairement à l'apprentissage actif précédent, il peut fournir des critères linguistiques issus du modèle de langage pré-formé pour mesurer les instances et aider à sélectionner des instances plus efficaces pour l'annotation. Les expériences démontrent que notre approche peut atteindre une plus grande précision avec moins d'instances de formation étiquetées.", 'es': 'El aprendizaje activo puede reducir significativamente el costo de anotación de las técnicas basadas en datos. Sin embargo, los enfoques previos de aprendizaje activo para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural dependen principalmente del criterio de incertidumbre basado en la entropía e ignoran las características del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque de aprendizaje activo basado en un modelo de lenguaje preentrenado para la coincidencia de oraciones. A diferencia del aprendizaje activo anterior, puede proporcionar criterios lingüísticos del modelo lingüístico previamente entrenado para medir las instancias y ayudar a seleccionar instancias más eficaces para la anotación. Los experimentos demuestran que nuestro enfoque puede lograr una mayor precisión con menos instancias de capacitación etiquetadas.', 'pt': 'O aprendizado ativo é capaz de reduzir significativamente o custo de anotação para técnicas orientadas a dados. No entanto, as abordagens de aprendizado ativo anteriores para processamento de linguagem natural dependem principalmente do critério de incerteza baseado em entropia e ignoram as características da linguagem natural. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem de aprendizagem ativa baseada em modelo de linguagem pré-treinada para correspondência de sentenças. Diferente do aprendizado ativo anterior, ele pode fornecer critérios linguísticos do modelo de linguagem pré-treinado para medir instâncias e ajudar a selecionar instâncias mais eficazes para anotação. Experimentos demonstram que nossa abordagem pode alcançar maior precisão com menos instâncias de treinamento rotuladas.', 'ja': 'アクティブラーニングは、データ駆動型テクニックの注釈コストを大幅に削減することができます。しかし、自然言語処理のためのこれまでの能動的学習アプローチは、主にエントロピーに基づく不確実性基準に依存し、自然言語の特徴を無視する。この論文では、文章マッチングのためのアクティブラーニングアプローチに基づく事前訓練された言語モデルを提案します。これまでのアクティブラーニングとは異なり、事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルから言語基準を提供して、インスタンスを測定し、より効果的なインスタンスをアノテーションのために選択するのに役立ちます。実験は、私たちのアプローチがより少ないラベル付けされたトレーニングインスタンスでより高い精度を達成できることを示しています。', 'zh': '自学能著数术之注成本。 然往用于自然语言者,赖于熵之不确定性准,而忽于自然语言之征。 本文举一种基于预训习言语模样的自己学习句子匹配。 与前学不同,可以预训言语模形,以测实例而助择效例注之。 实验明,吾道可以益寡而成准确性。', 'hi': 'सक्रिय शिक्षा डेटा-संचालित तकनीकों के लिए एनोटेशन लागत को काफी कम करने में सक्षम है। हालांकि, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए पिछले सक्रिय सीखने के दृष्टिकोण मुख्य रूप से एन्ट्रॉपी-आधारित अनिश्चितता मानदंड पर निर्भर करते हैं, और प्राकृतिक भाषा की विशेषताओं को अनदेखा करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम वाक्य मिलान के लिए एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल आधारित सक्रिय सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पिछले सक्रिय सीखने से अलग, यह उदाहरणों को मापने और एनोटेशन के लिए अधिक प्रभावी उदाहरणों का चयन करने में मदद करने के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल से भाषाई मानदंड प्रदान कर सकता है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण कम लेबल वाले प्रशिक्षण उदाहरणों के साथ अधिक सटीकता प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Активное обучение способно значительно снизить стоимость аннотаций для методов, основанных на данных. Однако предыдущие подходы к активному обучению для обработки естественного языка в основном зависят от критерия неопределенности на основе энтропии и игнорируют характеристики естественного языка. В этой статье мы предлагаем заранее обученную языковую модель, основанную на активном обучении подбору предложений. В отличие от предыдущего активного обучения, он может предоставить лингвистические критерии из предварительно обученной языковой модели для измерения экземпляров и помочь выбрать более эффективные экземпляры для аннотации. Эксперименты показывают, что наш подход может достичь большей точности при меньшем количестве отмеченных учебных мероприятий.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le foghlaim ghníomhach an costas anótála do theicnící sonraí-tiomáinte a laghdú go suntasach. Mar sin féin, braitheann cineálacha cur chuige foghlama gníomhaí roimhe seo maidir le próiseáil teanga nádúrtha go príomha ar an gcritéar neamhchinnteachta eantrópachta, agus neamhaird a dhéanamh ar shaintréithe na teanga nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige foghlama gníomhaí bunaithe ar mhúnla teanga réamh-oilte chun abairtí a mheaitseáil. Difriúil ón bhfoghlaim ghníomhach roimhe seo, féadann sé critéir theangeolaíocha a sholáthar ón múnla teanga réamhoilte chun cásanna a thomhas agus cabhrú le cásanna níos éifeachtaí a roghnú le haghaidh nótaí. Léiríonn turgnaimh gur féidir lenár gcur chuige níos cruinne a bhaint amach le níos lú cásanna oiliúna lipéadaithe.', 'ka': 'აქტიური სწავლების შესაძლებელია ძალიან გადასრულებული მონაცემების ტექნოგიების მონაცემების კონტაქცია. მაგრამ, წინა აქტიური სწავლების მიღება თავისუფალური ენის პროცესისთვის პროცესისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვის უფრო დარწმუნდება ენტოპოფიის განსაზღვრულობ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ წარმოადგილავთ წარმოადგილებული ენის მოდელს, რომელიც აკეთესი სწავლების მიმართებაზე დააკეთებულია. წინა აქტიური სწავლებისგან განსხვავებულია, ის შეუძლია ინგუფისტიკური კრიტერიტების მოდელიდან, რომელიც უფრო განსხვავებული ენგუფიკაციის მოდელიდან განსხვავება ინსტუციების ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებელია უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენა, რომელიც უფრო მეტი მარტივის შესაძლებელია.', 'el': 'Η ενεργή μάθηση είναι σε θέση να μειώσει σημαντικά το κόστος σχολιασμού για τεχνικές βασισμένες στα δεδομένα. Ωστόσο, οι προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις ενεργού μάθησης για την επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας εξαρτώνται κυρίως από το κριτήριο αβεβαιότητας που βασίζεται στην εντροπία και αγνοούν τα χαρακτηριστικά της φυσικής γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια προ-εκπαιδευμένη γλωσσική προσέγγιση βασισμένη στην ενεργή μάθηση για την αντιστοίχιση προτάσεων. Διαφορετικά από την προηγούμενη ενεργή μάθηση, μπορεί να παρέχει γλωσσικά κριτήρια από το προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο για τη μέτρηση των περιπτώσεων και να βοηθήσει στην επιλογή πιο αποτελεσματικών περιπτώσεων για σχολιασμό. Τα πειράματα αποδεικνύουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να επιτύχει μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια με λιγότερες περιπτώσεις κατάρτισης με ετικέτες.', 'hu': 'Az aktív tanulás jelentősen csökkentheti az adatvezérelt technikák jegyzetelési költségeit. A természetes nyelvfeldolgozás korábbi aktív tanulási megközelítései azonban elsősorban az entrópia alapú bizonytalansági kritériumtól függnek, és figyelmen kívül hagyják a természetes nyelv jellemzőit. Jelen tanulmányban egy előre képzett nyelvi modell alapú aktív tanulási megközelítést javasolunk a mondatok egyeztetésére. A korábbi aktív tanulástól eltérően az előzetesen képzett nyelvi modellhez képest nyelvi kritériumokat is biztosíthat a példányok mérésére és a jegyzetek hatékonyabb példányainak kiválasztására. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk nagyobb pontosságot érhet el kevesebb címkézett képzési példánnyal.', 'it': "L'apprendimento attivo è in grado di ridurre significativamente i costi di annotazione per le tecniche basate sui dati. Tuttavia, i precedenti approcci di apprendimento attivo per l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale dipendono principalmente dal criterio di incertezza basato sull'entropia e ignorano le caratteristiche del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio pre-addestrato basato sul modello linguistico di apprendimento attivo per la corrispondenza delle frasi. Diversamente dal precedente apprendimento attivo, può fornire criteri linguistici dal modello linguistico pre-addestrato per misurare le istanze e aiutare a selezionare istanze più efficaci per l'annotazione. Esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro approccio può ottenere una maggiore precisione con meno istanze di formazione etichettate.", 'kk': 'Белсенді оқыту деректерді басқару техникаларының жаңалық бағаттарын өзгерте алады. Бірақ, табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін алдыңғы белсенді оқыту жағдайлары ентропиялық тәуелдік критериясынан тәуелді, табиғи тілдің қасиеттерін елемейді. Бұл қағазда, біз тіл үлгісін сәйкестіру үшін белсенді оқыту тәртібін қолданамыз. Алдыңғы белсенді оқытудан айырмашылық, ол алдыңғы оқыту үшін тіл үлгісінен тілді критерияларын өзгертуге болады. Мәселелерді өлшейту және оқыту үшін көмектесу ү Өз тәжірибеміздің тәжірибеміздің тәжірибесіміз арқылы жарлық оқыту мәселелерімен көп дұрыстығын жеткізе алады.', 'lt': 'Aktyvus mokymasis gali gerokai sumažinti duomenų metodų anotacijos sąnaudas. Tačiau ankstesni aktyvaus mokymosi metodai natūralios kalbos apdorojimui daugiausia priklauso nuo entropijos pagrindu pagrįsto neapibrėžtumo kriterijaus ir ignoruoja natūralios kalbos savybes. Šiame dokumente siūlome iš anksto parengtą kalbų model į pagrįstą aktyvaus mokymosi metodą, skirtą derinti sakinius. Differing from previous active learning, it can provide linguistic criteria from the pre-trained language model to measure instances and help select more effective instances for annotation.  Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris gali būti tikslesnis mažiau pažymėtų mokymo atvejų.', 'mk': 'Активното учење може значително да ги намали трошоците на анотација за техниките управувани со податоци. Сепак, претходните пристапи на активно учење за природното обработување на јазикот зависат главно од критериумот на несигурност базиран на ентропија и ги игнорираат карактеристиките на природниот јазик. Во овој весник, предложуваме предобучен јазички модел базиран на активен пристап на учење за споредување на речениците. Во разлика од претходното активно учење, истиот може да обезбеди јазички критериуми од предобучениот јазички модел за мерење на инцидентите и да помогне во изборот на поефикасни инциденти за анотација. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот пристап може да постигне поголема прецизност со помалку обележани случаи на обука.', 'ml': 'സജ്ജീവമായ പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിലയം ഡേറ്റാഡാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ടെക്നിക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വില എന്നാലും മുമ്പ് സജ്ജീവമായ പഠിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയതയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രകാരം എ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വാക്ക് പൊരുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സജ്ജീവമായ പഠിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന മുമ്പുള്ള സജ്ജീവമായ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുന്നു, ഇത് മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന ഭാഷ മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യത്തിന് കുറച്ച് കുറച്ച് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്ത', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran aktif mampu mengurangi dengan signifikan kos anotasi untuk teknik pemacu data. Namun, pendekatan pembelajaran aktif terdahulu untuk pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi bergantung pada kriteria ketidakpastian berdasarkan entropi, dan abaikan ciri-ciri bahasa semulajadi. In this paper, we propose a pre-trained language model based active learning approach for sentence matching.  Berbeza dari pembelajaran aktif terdahulu, ia boleh menyediakan kriteria bahasa dari model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih untuk mengukur kejadian dan membantu memilih kejadian yang lebih efektif untuk anotasi. Eksperimen menunjukkan pendekatan kita boleh mencapai ketepatan yang lebih besar dengan kurang kes latihan yang ditabel.', 'mn': 'Актив суралцах нь өгөгдлийн удирдлагатай технологиудын үнэ цэнэтэй багасгаж чадна. Гэвч байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн өмнөх актив суралцах ойлголт нь энтропийн үндсэн тодорхойгүй тодорхойлолт, байгалийн хэлний харилцааны тодорхойлолтыг анхаарна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загварыг өгүүлбэртэй холбоотой актив суралцах арга загварыг санал болгож байна. Өмнөх үйл ажиллагааны суралцаас ялгаатай, энэ нь хэл загвараас илүү суралцагдсан хэл загварыг хэмжиж, илүү үр дүнтэй тохиолдлуудыг сонгож чадна. Бидний арга зам нь бага хэмжээний сургалтын тухай илүү тодорхой байдлыг харуулж чадна.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim attiv jista’ jnaqqas b’mod sinifikanti l-ispiża tal-annotazzjoni għat-tekniki mmexxija mid-dejta. Madankollu, approċċi ta’ tagħlim attiv preċedenti għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali jiddependu prinċipalment fuq il-kriterju ta’ inċertezza bbażat fuq l-entropija, u jinjoraw il-karatteristiċi tal-lingwa naturali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ attiv ta’ tagħlim ibbażat fuq mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel għat-tqabbil tas-sentenzi. B’differenza mit-tagħlim attiv pre ċedenti, jista’ jipprovdi kriterji lingwistiċi mill-mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel biex jitkejlu l-istanzi u jgħin jagħżel l-istanzi aktar effettivi għall-annotazzjoni. L-esperimenti juru li l-approċċ tagħna jista’ jikseb aktar preċiżjoni b’inqas każijiet ta’ taħriġ ittikkettati.', 'no': 'Aktivt læring kan redusera notasjonskostnaden for datadrivte teknikk. Men førre aktive læringstilnærmingar for naturspråkshandtering er hovudsakelig avhengig av entropibasert usikkerhetskriterion, og ignorerer karakteristikaren av naturspråk. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit føretrained språk-modell basert aktiv læringstilnærming for setningar. Dersom det er forskjellig frå førre aktiv læring, kan det gjere språkkkriterier frå den først trengte språkkmodellen for å måle instansar og hjelpa for å velja meir effektive instansar for annotasjon. Eksperimentar viser at tilnærminga vårt kan oppnå større nøyaktighet med mindre merkelige øvingsinstansar.', 'pl': 'Aktywne uczenie się jest w stanie znacznie zmniejszyć koszty adnotacji dla technik opartych na danych. Jednak wcześniejsze aktywne podejście do nauki języka naturalnego zależą głównie od kryterium niepewności opartej na entropii i ignorują cechy języka naturalnego. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wstępnie przeszkolone podejście do aktywnego uczenia się języka oparte na modelu językowym do dopasowywania zdań. Różniąc się od poprzedniego aktywnego uczenia się, może dostarczyć kryteriów językowych z wcześniej przeszkolonego modelu językowego, aby mierzyć instancje i pomóc w wyborze bardziej efektywnych instancji do adnotacji. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasze podejście może osiągnąć większą dokładność przy mniejszej liczbie oznaczonych instancji szkoleniowych.', 'ro': 'Învățarea activă este capabilă să reducă semnificativ costul adnotării pentru tehnicile bazate pe date. Cu toate acestea, abordările anterioare de învățare activă pentru procesarea limbajului natural depind în principal de criteriul de incertitudine bazat pe entropie și ignoră caracteristicile limbajului natural. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare pre-instruită bazată pe modelul lingvistic activ de învățare pentru potrivirea frazelor. Spre deosebire de învățarea activă anterioară, acesta poate furniza criterii lingvistice de la modelul lingvistic pre-instruit pentru a măsura instanțele și pentru a ajuta la selectarea instanțelor mai eficiente pentru adnotare. Experimentele demonstrează că abordarea noastră poate obține o precizie mai mare cu mai puține instanțe de instruire etichetate.', 'sr': 'Aktivno učenje može značajno smanjiti troškove annotacije za tehnike podataka. Međutim, prethodni aktivni pristup učenja prirodnog jezika uglavnom zavisi od kriterija neodređenosti na entropiji i ignoriše karakteristike prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo predobučeni jezički model na osnovu aktivnog pristupa učenja za odgovaranje rečenica. Drugačije od prethodnog aktivnog učenja, može pružiti jezičke kriterije iz predobučenog jezičkog modela da mjeri instance i pomogne izabrati efikasnije instance za annotaciju. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš pristup može ostvariti veću tačnost sa manjim označenim treningama.', 'si': 'සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් දත්ත ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් අඩු කරන්න. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරාකෘතික සක්\u200dරීය ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කළා භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වාක්ය ස මුලින් සක්\u200dරිය සිදුවීමෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරියෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වගේ භාෂ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ', 'so': 'Waxbarashada waxqabadka ah wuxuu si weyn u hoos marin karaa kharashka caddeynta aqoonta lagu isticmaalo takhasuska. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada horay u soo horeysay waxay ku xiran yihiin qeybta aqoonta ee afka dabiicadda ah, wuxuuna ka tegi karaa aqoonta luqada dabiicadda ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo jeedaynaa model afka hore oo lagu bartay oo ku saleysan habka waxbarashada waxqabad ah ee u eg qoraalka. Waxbarashada hore oo shaqo qabadka ah waxaa laga heli karaa kaarar luuqada ah oo ka mid ah qaababka afka hore lagu baray si ay u qiyaasaan tusaalooyin, waxayna caawinayaan in lagu doorto dhacdooyin faa’iido leh oo faa’iido ah. Imtixaanka waxaa muujin kara qaababkayaga aad u sahlan kartid si aad u sahlan, haddii ay sameyn karto waxbarasho shaqo yar.', 'sv': 'Aktivt lärande kan avsevärt minska kommenteringskostnaden för datadrivna tekniker. Tidigare aktiva inlärningsmetoder för behandling av naturligt språk beror dock huvudsakligen på det entropibaserade osäkerhetskriteriet och ignorerar naturspråkets egenskaper. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi en färdigutbildad språkmodell baserad aktiv inlärningsmetod för meningsmatchning. I motsats till tidigare aktivt lärande kan det tillhandahålla språkliga kriterier från den förinställda språkmodellen för att mäta instanser och hjälpa till att välja effektivare instanser för anteckningar. Experiment visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt kan uppnå större noggrannhet med färre märkta träningsinstanser.', 'ta': 'செயலில் கற்றல் தகவல் இயக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பத்திற்கான அறிவிப்பு செலவை மிகவும் குறைக்க முடியும். ஆனால், முந்தைய இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலுக்கு முன்னால் கற்றல் நெறிமொழி செயல்படுத்தல் முறைமையாக உள்ளீட்டு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள அறி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியில் வாக்கியத்திற்கு பொருத்தும் செயலில் கற் முந்தைய செயல்பாட்டிலிருந்து வேறுபாடு, முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரியிலிருந்து மொழி முறைமையிலிருந்து மொழிக் குறிப்புகள சிறிய குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி நிகழ்வுகள் மூலம் எங்கள் செயல்பாடு அதிக சரியாக பெற முடியும்.', 'ur': '賮毓丕賱 爻蹖讴诰賳蹝 讴蹖 賯丕亘賱 蹃蹝 讴蹃 趫蹖俟丕 趩賱賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 俟蹖讴賳蹖讴 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 丕馗蹃丕乇 讴蹝 賲胤丕亘賯 讴賲 讴乇 爻讴蹝蹟 賱蹖讴賳 倬蹃賱蹝 賮毓丕賱 爻蹖讴诰賳蹝 讴蹖 鬲賯乇蹖亘丕 胤亘蹖毓蹖 夭亘丕賳 倬乇丿丕夭蹖 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 夭蹖丕丿蹃 丕賳丿丕夭蹃 爻蹝 丕賳鬲乇賵倬蹖 讴蹖 亘賳蹖丕丿蹖 睾蹖乇 賯胤毓蹖 讴乇蹖俟乇蹖乇蹖爻 倬乇 蹃蹝 丕賵乇 胤亘蹖毓蹖 夭亘丕賳 讴蹖 禺氐賵氐蹖丕鬲 讴賵 睾丕賮賱 讴乇蹖诤蹟 丕爻 讴丕睾匕 賲蹖诤 蹃賲 丕蹖讴 倬蹖卮 丌賲賵夭卮 讴蹖 夭亘丕賳 賲賵趫賱 讴賵 爻賮丕乇卮 丿蹖鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤 噩賵 噩賲丕毓鬲 賲賱賳蹝 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 賮毓丕賱 蹖丕丿蹃丕賳蹖 胤乇蹖賯蹃 讴蹖 亘賳蹖丕丿 乇讴诰鬲蹖 蹃蹝. 倬蹃賱蹝 賮毓丕賱 蹖丕丿蹃丕賳蹖 爻蹝 賲鬲賮丕賵鬲 蹃蹝貙 蹖蹃 倬蹃賱蹝 鬲丿乇蹖爻 讴蹖 夭亘丕賳 賲賵趫賱 爻蹝 夭亘丕賳 讴蹖 讴乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇蹖俟乇 讴乇爻讴鬲丕 蹃蹝 讴蹃 鬲噩乇亘蹝 丿讴诰丕鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤 讴蹃 蹃賲丕乇蹖 胤乇蹖賯蹃 亘蹃鬲 夭蹖丕丿蹃 丿賯蹖賯 丨丕氐賱 讴乇爻讴鬲蹖 蹃蹝 讴賲 賱蹖亘賱 讴蹖 鬲毓賱蹖賲 讴蹝 賲胤丕亘賯蹟', 'uz': "Ma\xa0ľlumot drayveri uchun ta\xa0ľminlovchi qiymatni katta kamaytirish mumkin. Lekin oldingi aktiv o'rganish o'rganish natijasida tilni boshqarish usullari asosida entropy asosiy noto\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri kriteriga qo'llangan va asl tillarning xususiyatlariga e\xa0ľtibor beradi. Bu qog\xa0Ľozda, biz bir o'rganishdan oldin tilning asosida aktiv o'rganish usuli o'rganish usulini o'ylab beramiz. @ info: whatsthis Tajribalar bizning usuli ko'rsatishimizni ko'rsatadi, cheksiz ta\xa0ľminlovchi dasturlar bilan ko'proq foydalanishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc học hành động có thể giảm đáng kể chi phí ghi chú cho các kỹ thuật dựa trên dữ liệu. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp học hành trước đây cho việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên phụ thuộc chủ yếu vào căn cứ bí ẩn dựa trên entropy, và phớt lờ các đặc điểm của ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo dựa trên phương pháp học tập để khớp các câu. Khác với học hành trước, nó có thể cung cấp các tiêu chuẩn ngôn ngữ từ mẫu ngôn ngữ được đào tạo để đo các trường hợp và giúp chọn trường hợp có hiệu quả hơn để ghi chú. Thử nghiệm chứng minh cách tiếp cận của chúng ta có thể đạt độ chính xác hơn với ít trường hợp được đánh dấu.', 'hr': 'Aktivno učenje može značajno smanjiti troškove annotacije za tehnike podataka. Međutim, prethodni aktivni pristupi učenja prirodnog jezika uglavnom zavise od kriterija neodređenosti na entropiji i ignorira karakteristike prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo predobučeni jezički model na temelju aktivnog pristupa učenja za odgovaranje rečenica. Drugačije od prethodnog aktivnog učenja, može pružiti jezičke kriterije iz predobučenog jezičkog modela kako bi mjerila instancije i pomogla izabrati učinkovitije instancije za annotaciju. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš pristup može ostvariti veću preciznost s manjim označenim treningama.', 'bg': 'Активното обучение е в състояние значително да намали разходите за анотация за техники, управлявани от данни. Въпреки това, предишните подходи за активно учене за обработка на естествения език зависят главно от критерия за несигурност, основан на ентропия, и пренебрегват характеристиките на естествения език. В настоящата статия предлагаме предварително обучен езиков модел, базиран на активен подход за обучение за съвпадение на изречения. За разлика от предишното активно обучение, тя може да предостави лингвистични критерии от предварително обучения езиков модел за измерване на инстанции и да помогне за избора на по-ефективни инстанции за анотация. Експериментите показват, че нашият подход може да постигне по-голяма точност с по-малко етикетирани обучения.', 'nl': 'Actief leren kan de annotatiekosten voor datagestuurde technieken aanzienlijk verlagen. Echter, eerdere actieve leerbenaderingen voor natuurlijke taalverwerking hangen voornamelijk af van het entropie-gebaseerde onzekerheidscriterium en negeren de kenmerken van natuurlijke taal. In dit artikel stellen we een vooraf getrainde taalmodel gebaseerde actieve leeraanpak voor zinnenaanpassing voor. Anders dan eerder actief leren, kan het taalcriteria van het vooraf getrainde taalmodel bieden om instanties te meten en effectievere instanties voor annotatie te selecteren. Experimenten tonen aan dat onze aanpak meer nauwkeurigheid kan bereiken met minder gelabelde trainingsinstanties.', 'da': 'Aktiv læring kan reducere annoteringsomkostningerne for datadrevne teknikker betydeligt. Tidligere aktive læringsmetoder til behandling af naturligt sprog afhænger imidlertid hovedsageligt af det entropibaserede usikkerhedskriterium og ignorerer natursprogets karakteristika. I denne artikel foreslår vi en prætrænet sprogmodel baseret aktiv læringstilgang til sætningsmateriale. I modsætning til tidligere aktiv læring kan den indeholde sproglige kriterier fra den forududdannede sprogmodel til måling af forekomster og hjælpe med at vælge mere effektive forekomster til notering. Eksperimenter viser, at vores tilgang kan opnå større nøjagtighed med færre mærkede træningsinstanser.', 'de': 'Aktives Lernen kann die Annotationskosten für datengetriebene Techniken deutlich reduzieren. Bisherige aktive Lernansätze für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache hängen jedoch hauptsächlich vom entropiebasierten Unsicherheitskriterium ab und ignorieren die Eigenschaften natürlicher Sprache. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen vortrainierten Sprachmodell-basierten aktiven Lernansatz für Satzabgleich vor. Im Gegensatz zum vorherigen aktiven Lernen kann es linguistische Kriterien aus dem vortrainierten Sprachmodell bereitstellen, um Instanzen zu messen und effektivere Instanzen für Anmerkungen auszuwählen. Experimente zeigen, dass unser Ansatz mit weniger beschrifteten Trainingsinstanzen eine höhere Genauigkeit erreichen kann.', 'id': 'Active learning is able to significantly reduce the annotation cost for data-driven techniques.  Namun, pendekatan belajar aktif sebelumnya untuk proses bahasa alam tergantung pada kriteria ketidakpastian berdasarkan entropi, dan mengabaikan karakteristik bahasa alam. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model bahasa terlatih berdasarkan pendekatan pembelajaran aktif untuk persamaan kalimat. Berbeda dari belajar aktif sebelumnya, dapat menyediakan kriteria bahasa dari model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya untuk mengukur kejadian dan membantu memilih kejadian yang lebih efektif untuk anotasi. Eksperimen menunjukkan pendekatan kita dapat mencapai akurasi yang lebih besar dengan lebih sedikit kasus pelatihan yang ditabel.', 'ko': '능동적인 학습은 데이터 구동 기술의 주석 원가를 현저하게 낮출 수 있다.그러나 기존의 자연 언어 처리 능동 학습 방법은 주로 엔트로피를 바탕으로 하는 불확실성 준칙에 의존하고 자연 언어의 특성을 무시했다.본고는 예비 훈련 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 문장 일치 능동 학습 방법을 제시했다.기존의 주동적인 학습과 달리 미리 훈련된 언어 모델에서 언어 표준을 제공하여 실례를 측정하고 더욱 효과적인 실례를 선택하여 주석을 달 수 있다.실험에 의하면 우리의 방법은 비교적 적은 표기 훈련 실례에서 더욱 높은 정밀도를 얻을 수 있다.', 'fa': 'یادگیری فعال قادر است که هزینه\u200cهای اخطار برای تکنیک\u200cهای راهنمایی داده\u200cها را به طور کلی کاهش دهد. با این حال، نزدیک یادگیری فعال قبلی برای پرداخت زبان طبیعی بستگی به مقدار یقینی بر اساس انتروپی است و ویژگی زبان طبیعی را نادیده بگیرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل پیش آموزش زبانی را پیشنهاد می کنیم که روش آموزش فعالی برای هماهنگ جمله است. متفاوت از یادگیری فعال قبلی می\u200cتواند مقدار زبان\u200cشناسی را از مدل پیش آموزش داده باشد تا نمونه\u200cها را اندازه\u200cگیری کند و به انتخاب نمونه\u200cهای مثبت\u200cتر برای یادگیری کمک کند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما می\u200cتواند دقیقات بیشتری را با نمونه\u200cهای آموزش کمتر به دست آورد.', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa haraka unaweza kupunguza gharama za uchunguzi kwa mbinu zinazoendeshwa na taarifa. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kujifunza zilizopita zinazotokana na utaratibu wa lugha asilia zinategemea hasa vigezo vya usio na uhakika wa lugha ya asili, na kupuuza sifa za lugha ya asili. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya lugha iliyoendelea kabla ya kujifunza kwa njia ya haraka ya kujifunza kwa kuhusiana na hukumu. Differing from previous active learning, it can provide linguistic criteria from the pre-trained language model to measure instances and help select more effective instances for annotation.  Majaribio yanaonyesha mbinu yetu inaweza kupata ufanisi mkubwa zaidi kwa matukio machache yanayoonyesha mafunzo.', 'tr': 'janlaş öwrenmek data ýüze dolanan teknikleriň paýatlaryny örän azaltyp biler. Ýöne, tebigy diller işlemek üçin öňki aktiw öwrenmek ýagdaýynda entropi daýanýan kesgitlik kriteriýasyna baglanýar we tebigy diliň häsiýetlerini görmäge baglanýar. Bu kagyzda, biz öňünden bilim täze bir nusga sözlem üçin aktiw öwrenmek nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Öňki faýly öwrenmeden üýtgeşik, ol öňki bilim sisteminden örän öwrenmeli dil nusgasyny ölçüp, ýazmak üçin has faýly örnekleri saýlamak üçin kömek edip biler. Denminatlar biziň ýaryşymyzyň dykkalygyny az etilen eğitim örnekleri bilen ýeterlik edip biler.', 'af': "Aktiewe leer kan betekenlik die annotasie koste vir data-driefde teknike verklein. Maar die vorige aktiewe leer toegang vir natuurlike taal-prosessering het heeltemal afgehandel van die entropie-gebaseerde onsekerlike kriterie en die karakteristieke van natuurlike taal ignoreer. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n vooraf-opgelei taal model gebaseerde aktiewe onderwerp vir setinge ooreenstemmende. Verskil van vorige aktiewe leer, kan dit lingwisiese kriterie verskaf van die vooraf gevorderde taal model om voorbeelde voorbeelde te maak en help kies meer effektiewe voorbeelde voorbeelde vir annotasie. Eksperimente wys ons toegang kan groter presisie bereik met minder etiketeerde oefening voorbeelde.", 'sq': 'Mësimi aktiv është në gjendje të reduktojë ndjeshëm koston e anotacionit për teknikat e drejtuara nga të dhënat. Megjithatë, metodat e mëparshme të mësimit aktiv për procesimin natyror të gjuhës varen kryesisht nga kriteri i pasigurisë bazuar në entropi dhe injorojnë karakteristikat e gjuhës natyrore. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë mësimi aktiv të bazuar në modelin e gjuhës së paratrajnuar për përputhjen e fjalëve. Ndryshe nga mësimi aktiv i mëparshëm, ai mund të ofrojë kritere gjuhësore nga modeli i gjuhës së paratrajnuar për të masuar rastet dhe për të ndihmuar zgjedhjen e rasteve më efektive për anotacion. Eksperimentet tregojnë se qasja jonë mund të arrijë saktësi më të madhe me më pak raste trajnimi të etiketuara.', 'am': 'መግለጫ የዳታ-የሚነዳው ስህተት የሚያሳፍር የአሳተውን ውጤት በቁጥር ያጎድላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው ተማሪ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል በመጠቀም የኢንትዮጵያውያን በማስታወቂያው እርግጠኛ ነው፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋውንም እውቀት ይረሳል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የፊተኛውን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ለመተማር የሚቃወም የሥርዓት ትምህርት ሥርዓት እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት የተለየ፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ለቋንቋ የተለየ የቋንቋ ክፍተቶችን ለመለካት ይችላል፡፡ ፈተናዎች የእኛ ልግስናችን ማግኘት በጥቂት ተማሪ ግንኙነቶችን መግለጥ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ակտիվ ուսումնասիրությունը կարողանում է նշանակալիորեն նվազեցնել տվյալների հիմնված տեխնիկաների գները: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության մոտեցումները բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ հիմնականում կախված են էնտրոպիայի հիմնված անորոշ հարցում և անտեսում են բնական լեզվի հատկությունները: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդել, որը հիմնված է ակտիվ ուսուցման մոտեցում նախադասությունների համապատասխանման համար: Դրանից տարբերվում է նախորդ ակտիվ սովորելուց, այն կարող է նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի լեզվաբանական արտահայտություններ տալ, որպեսզի չափի օրինակները և օգնի ընտրել ավելի արդյունավետ օրինակներ annoտացիայի համար: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կարող է ավելի ճշգրիտ հասնել ավելի քիչ մարմնավորումների դեպքերով:', 'az': 'Etkinlik öyrənmək məlumatları təklif edən tehniklərin müəyyən qiymətini çox azaltır. Ancaq əvvəlki fəaliyyət öyrənmə təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün yaxınlıqlar entropiya dayanan təhlükəsizlik kriteriyə bağlı olar və təbiətli dilin özelliklərinə baxmayarlar. Bu kağızda, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modeli təhsil edirik ki, cümlələrlə uyuşmaq üçün aktif öyrənmə metodu. Əvvəlki aktif öyrənməkdən fərqli olaraq, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelindən dil kriteriləri təhsil edə bilər. Öyrənmək üçün nöqtələri ölçür və nöqtələri üçün daha etkili nöqtələri seçmək üçün yardım edə bilər. Həyatlar bizim tərzimizin daha az etiketli təhsil olaraq daha doğruluğunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'সক্রিয় শিক্ষা তথ্য চালানো প্রযুক্তির জন্য বিশেষ পরিমাণ কমিয়ে দিতে পারে। তবে পূর্ববর্তী সক্রিয় ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে প্রাকৃতিক শিক্ষা নির্ভর করে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা মডেলের প্রস্তাব করছি যেটা কার্যক্রমের ভিত্তিক শিক্ষা পদক্ষেপের জন্য একটি প পূর্ববর্তী সক্রিয় শিক্ষা থেকে পার্থক্য, এটি পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল থেকে ভাষাগত মূল্য প্রদান করতে পারে যে ইনস্টেম ম মা পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ কম লেবেল প্রশিক্ষণের ঘটনার সাথে আরো সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করতে পারে।', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge actiu pot reduir significativament el cost d'anotació de les tècniques basades en les dades. Però els enfocaments d'aprenentatge activ anteriors per al processament natural de llenguatges depenen principalment del criteri d'incertitud basat en entropia i ignoren les característiques del llenguatge natural. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament d'aprenentatge actiu basat en un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat per a ajustar frases. Diferent de l'aprenentatge activ anterior, pot proporcionar criteris lingüístics del model de llenguatge pré-entrenat per mesurar les instances i ajudar a seleccionar instances més efectives per anotació. Els experiments demostren que el nostre enfocament pot aconseguir més precisió amb menys exemples d'entrenament etiquetats.", 'cs': 'Aktivní učení je schopno výrazně snížit náklady na anotaci pro datově řízené techniky. Předchozí přístupy aktivního učení pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka však závisí hlavně na kritériu nejistoty založeném na entropii a ignorují charakteristiky přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku navrhujeme předškolený jazykový model založený na aktivním učení pro porovnávání vět. Na rozdíl od předchozího aktivního učení může poskytnout jazyková kritéria z předškoleného jazykového modelu pro měření instancí a pomoci výběr efektivnějších instancí pro anotaci. Experimenty ukazují, že náš přístup může dosáhnout větší přesnosti s menším počtem označených tréninkových instancí.', 'et': 'Aktiivne õpe suudab märkimisväärselt vähendada andmepõhiste tehnikate märgistamiskulusid. Ent varasemad aktiivsed õppemeetodid looduskeele töötlemiseks sõltuvad peamiselt entroopiapõhisest ebakindluse kriteeriumist ja eiravad looduskeele omadusi. Käesolevas töös pakume välja eelõpetatud keelemudelil põhineva aktiivse õppe lähenemisviisi lausete sobitamiseks. Erinevalt varasemast aktiivsest õppest võib see pakkuda eelõpetatud keelemudelist keelekriteeriume, et mõõta juhtumeid ja aidata valida tõhusamaid juhtumeid annoteerimiseks. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis suudab saavutada suurema täpsuse vähema märgistatud koolituse korral.', 'bs': 'Aktivno učenje može značajno smanjiti troškove annotacije za tehnike podataka. Međutim, prethodni aktivni pristupi učenja prirodnog jezika uglavnom zavise od kriterija neodređenosti na entropiji i ignorišu karakteristike prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo predobučeni jezički model na temelju aktivnog pristupa učenja za odgovaranje rečenica. Drugačije od prethodnog aktivnog učenja, može pružiti jezičke kriterije iz predobučenog jezičkog modela za mjerenje instancija i pomoći izabrati učinkovitije instancije za annotaciju. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš pristup može ostvariti veću tačnost sa manjim označenim treningama.', 'fi': 'Aktiivinen oppiminen pystyy vähentämään merkittävästi datavetoisten tekniikoiden merkintäkustannuksia. Aiemmat aktiivisen oppimisen lähestymistavat luonnollisen kielen prosessointiin riippuvat kuitenkin pääasiassa entropiaan perustuvasta epävarmuuskriteeristä, eivätkä luonnollisen kielen ominaisuudet huomioi. Tässä työssä ehdotamme esikoulutettua kielimallipohjaista aktiivista oppimista lauseiden sovittamiseen. Toisin kuin aikaisempi aktiivinen oppiminen, se voi tarjota kielellisiä kriteerejä esikoulutetusta kielimallista tapausten mittaamiseen ja tehokkaampien tapausten valitsemiseen merkintöjä varten. Kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme voi saavuttaa paremman tarkkuuden pienemmällä merkinnällä varustettujen harjoitusten määrällä.', 'jv': 'Attribute Nanging, gabung, dino sing paling nggawe aturan kanggo nggawe langkung pakan ngerasar tentang karo criterion sing basa nang entriopy, lan ingkang ngerasar kanggo ngerasar cara-suaraning pribadhaka. Nang pember iki, kita supoyo tresnaning model sing wis ana luwih apik, dadi kapan banget nggawe gerakan ingkang nggawe. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Gebudhakan langkung wigatining tentang kita iso nggawe akeh pinter nggawe gerakan sing nyimpen winih sing apik tur angel.', 'sk': 'Aktivno učenje lahko znatno zmanjša stroške označevanja za tehnike, ki temeljijo na podatkih. Vendar so predhodni aktivni učni pristopi za obdelavo naravnega jezika večinoma odvisni od merila negotovosti, ki temelji na entropiji, in ne upoštevajo značilnosti naravnega jezika. V prispevku predlagamo vnaprej usposobljen jezikovni model aktivnega učenja za ujemanje stavkov. V razliki od prejšnjega aktivnega učenja lahko zagotovi jezikovna merila iz vnaprej usposobljenega jezikovnega modela za merjenje primerov in pomaga izbrati učinkovitejše primere za označevanje. Poskusi kažejo, da lahko naš pristop doseže večjo natančnost z manj označenimi primeri usposabljanja.', 'he': 'הלימוד הפעיל מסוגל להפחית באופן משמעותי את עלות ההערכה לטכניקות הנדרשות מידע. עם זאת, גישות לימוד פעילות קודמות לעבודת שפת טבעית תלויות בעיקר על קריטוריון אי-בטוחות מבוסס באנטרופיה, ולהתעלם מהאופיינים של שפת טבעית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל שפה מאומן מראש מבוסס גישה לימוד פעיל לתאמת משפטים. בהבדל מלמדה פעילה קודמת, היא יכולה לספק קריטורים שפותיים מדוגל שפה מאומן מראש כדי למדוד מקרים ולעזור לבחור מקרים יעילים יותר עבור הערות. הניסויים מראים שהגישה שלנו יכולה להשיג מדויקה גדולה יותר עם פחות מקרים אימונים מסוימים.', 'ha': "Ana iya ƙara umarnin zartar da zane-zanen da ake tafiyar da shi mai girma. A lokacin da aka riga karatun karatun karatun karatun ta kasance masu amfani da harshen asiyya, yana ƙayyade mainli a kan kririn da ba'a da tabbatarwa na entropy, kuma ka ƙyale sifatinin harshen asiyya. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani misalin harshen da aka yi wa zaman-tunni, a kan karatun karatun da aikin karantawa wanda ya kamata zuwa maganar. Diffici daga zaman lõkaci na fara-gaba, yana iya ƙayyade linguistic cikin shirin harshen ta zaman-tsari don ya ƙayyade shiryoyin ayuka kuma yana taimako ya zaɓi shiryoyin ayuka masu amfani da wa alama. Kayan jarrabai sun nuna hanyoyinmu yana iya sãmu mafi taƙaita da alama masu ƙaranci da aka tabar da shi.", 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་ན་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པར་གཏོང་མཁན་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏེ། Differing from previous active learning, it can provide linguistic criteria from the pre-trained language model to measure instances and help select more effective instances for annotation. Experiments demonstrate our approach can achieve greater accuracy with less labeled training instances.'}
{'en': 'Using a Penalty-based Loss Re-estimation Method to Improve Implicit Discourse Relation Classification', 'ar': 'استخدام طريقة إعادة تقدير الخسارة المبنية على الغرامة لتحسين تصنيف علاقة الخطاب الضمني', 'fr': "Utilisation d'une méthode de réestimation des pertes basée sur les pénalités pour améliorer la classification implicite des relations de discours", 'pt': 'Usando um Método de Reestimativa de Perda Baseado em Penalidade para Melhorar a Classificação da Relação Discurso Implícita', 'es': 'Uso de un método de reestimación de pérdidas basado en sanciones para mejorar la clasificación de relaciones de discurso implícitas', 'ja': 'ペナルティベースの損失再推定法を使用して、暗黙の話題関係の分類を改善する', 'zh': '盖惩罚之失重估法改隐式语类也', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध वर्गीकरण में सुधार करने के लिए एक दंड-आधारित हानि पुन: अनुमान विधि का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Использование метода переоценки убытков на основе штрафов для улучшения классификации неявного отношения к дискурсу', 'ga': 'Modh Athmheasta Caillteanais Bunaithe ar Phionós a Úsáid chun Aicmiú an Chaidrimh Dhioscúrsa a Fheabhsú', 'ka': 'გამოყენება განსხვავებული განსხვავებების რესუმეციის მეტოდის გამოყენება იმპლიტიკური განსხვავებების კლასიფიკაცია', 'hu': 'Egy büntetőalapú veszteség újrabecslési módszer használata az Implicit Discourse Relation Classification javítására', 'el': 'Χρήση μεθόδου επαναεκτίμησης απώλειας βάσει ποινών για τη βελτίωση της ταξινόμησης της έμμεσης σχέσης συζήτησης', 'it': 'Utilizzo di un metodo di rivalutazione delle perdite basato su sanzioni per migliorare la classificazione implicita delle relazioni di discussione', 'kk': 'Шексіз сөйлеу қатынасын жақсарту үшін қайта бағалау әдісін қолдану', 'mk': 'Користејќи метод за репроценка на загубите базиран на казна за подобрување на имплицитната класификација на односите со дискурсот', 'lt': 'Naudojant baudžiamąjį nuostolių perskaičiavimo metodą siekiant pagerinti implicitų diskurso santykių klasifikavimą', 'ms': 'Mengguna Kaedah Penghargaan Kembali Kehilangan berdasarkan hukuman untuk meningkatkan Klasifikasi Hubungan Sekolah Implicit', 'ml': 'ശിക്ഷ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട വീണ്ടും പരിഗണിക്കാനുള്ള രീതിയിലൂടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ Metodu ta’ Ristima tat-Telf ibbażat fuq il-Penali għat-Titjib tal-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Impliċita tad-Diskors', 'mn': 'Шүүмжилт суурилсан алдагдлын дахин үнэлгээ хийх арга хэрэглэх', 'no': 'Bruk ein metode for gjenoppretting av tap basert på straum for å forbedra implisitt diskursrelasjon', 'pl': 'Zastosowanie metody ponownej oceny strat opartej na karach w celu poprawy klasyfikacji implicyjnych relacji dyskusyjnych', 'ro': 'Utilizarea unei metode de reevaluare a pierderilor bazate pe penalitate pentru a îmbunătăți clasificarea relațiilor implicite de discurs', 'sr': 'Koristeći metodu ponovne procjene gubitka na osnovu kazne za poboljšanje klasifikacije veza s implicitnim diskusijama', 'si': 'Penal-based Loss Re-Estigation Metodo භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය', 'so': 'Isku isticmaalaya qaababka laguugu soo celinayo', 'sv': 'Anv채nda en straffbaserad f철rlustomv채rderingsmetod f철r att f철rb채ttra klassificeringen av implicit diskursf철rh책llande', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'مجازات کی بنیادی خسارہ دوبارہ مہلت کا طریقہ استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sử dụng một phương pháp giảm giá rẻ dựa vào hình phạt để cải thiện mức độ phân giải implict', 'hr': 'Koristeći metodu ponovne procjene gubitka na osnovu kazne kako bi se poboljšala klasifikacija odnosa na provedenim diskusijama', 'bg': 'Използване на метод за преоценка на загубите, основан на санкции, за подобряване на класификацията на имплицитните дискурсни отношения', 'nl': 'Het gebruik van een sanalty-based loss herschatting methode om impliciete discourse relation classificatie te verbeteren', 'ko': '징벌에 의한 손실 재평가 방법으로 은어 관계 분류 개선', 'da': 'Brug af en straffebaseret tabsregistreringsmetode til at forbedre klassificeringen af implicit diskursforhold', 'fa': 'استفاده از روش بازارزی از دست دادن به پایه مجازات برای توسعه کلاسیف رابطه\u200cهای مشکلی', 'tr': 'Ýeri', 'af': "Gebruik van 'n Penalties-gebaseerde verlore Herestimatingsmetode om Implicite Diskursie Relasifikasie te verbeter", 'de': 'Verwendung einer sanalty-based Loss Re-Schätzungsmethode zur Verbesserung der Klassifizierung impliziter Diskursbeziehungen', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia njia ya kupoteza upya ya kuchukua hatua ya kuboresha Kuhusiana na Mawasiliano', 'hy': 'Պատիժներով հիմնված կորստի վերագնահատման մեթոդ օգտագործելը', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i një metode rishikimi të humbjes bazuar në dënim për të përmirësuar klasifikimin e lidhjes me diskutimin implicit', 'bn': 'শাস্তিভিত্তিক হারানোর পুনরাবৃত্তির পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে মুক্তি প্রদান করার জন্য বিষয়বস্তু সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'ca': 'Using a Penalty-based Loss Re-estimation Method to Improve Implicit Discourse Relation Classification', 'id': 'Menggunakan metode penghargaan ulang kehilangan berdasarkan hukuman untuk meningkatkan Klasifikasi hubungan diskursus implicit', 'cs': 'Použití metody přehodnocení ztrát založené na sankcích ke zlepšení klasifikace implicitních diskursních vztahů', 'et': 'Karistuspõhise kahju ümberhindamise meetodi kasutamine kaudse diskursssuhe klassifitseerimise parandamiseks', 'bs': 'Koristeći metodu ponovne procjene gubitka na osnovu kazne za poboljšanje klasifikacije odnosa o praktičnim diskusijama', 'az': '쿮zab-tabanl캼 Kay캼plar Yenid톛n Q톛rcl톛m톛 metodu istifad톛 etm톛k 칲칞칲n', 'fi': 'Seuraamukseen perustuvan tappion uudelleenarviointimenetelmĂ¤n kĂ¤yttĂ¤minen epĂ¤suorien diskurssisuhteiden luokittelun parantamiseksi', 'he': 'השימוש בשיטת הערכה מחדש של איבוד מבוססת על עונש כדי לשפר את מסווג היחסים של דיסקורס משמעותי', 'sk': 'Uporaba metode ponovne ocene izgube na podlagi kazni za izboljšanje klasifikacije implicitnih diskurznih razmerij', 'jv': 'Gujaring', 'ha': 'Using a Penalty-based Loss Re-estimation Method to Improve Implicit Discourse Relation Classification', 'bo': 'Penalty-based loss-estimation Method to Improve Implicit Discourse Relations Classification'}
{'en': 'We tackle implicit discourse relation classification, a task of automatically determining semantic relationships between arguments. The attention-worthy words in arguments are crucial clues for classifying the discourse relations. Attention mechanisms have been proven effective in highlighting the attention-worthy words during encoding. However, our survey shows that some inessential words are unintentionally misjudged as the attention-worthy words and, therefore, assigned heavier attention weights than should be. We propose a penalty-based loss re-estimation method to regulate the attention learning process, integrating penalty coefficients into the computation of loss by means of overstability of attention weight distributions. We conduct experiments on the Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus. The test results show that our loss re-estimation method leads to substantial improvements for a variety of attention mechanisms, and it obtains highly competitive performance compared to the state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'نتعامل مع تصنيف علاقة الخطاب الضمني ، وهي مهمة تحديد العلاقات الدلالية بين الحجج تلقائيًا. الكلمات الجديرة بالاهتمام في الحجج هي أدلة حاسمة لتصنيف علاقات الخطاب. لقد أثبتت آليات الانتباه فعاليتها في إبراز الكلمات الجديرة بالاهتمام أثناء التشفير. ومع ذلك ، يُظهر استطلاعنا أن بعض الكلمات غير الضرورية يُساء تقديرها عن غير قصد على أنها كلمات جديرة بالاهتمام ، وبالتالي ، تخصص لها أوزان اهتمام أكبر مما ينبغي. نقترح طريقة لإعادة تقدير الخسارة على أساس العقوبة لتنظيم عملية تعلم الانتباه ، ودمج معاملات العقوبة في حساب الخسارة عن طريق الثبات المفرط لتوزيعات وزن الانتباه. نجري تجارب على مجموعة بن الخطاب شجرة (PDTB). تظهر نتائج الاختبار أن طريقة إعادة تقدير الخسارة لدينا تؤدي إلى تحسينات جوهرية لمجموعة متنوعة من آليات الانتباه ، وتحصل على أداء تنافسي للغاية مقارنة بأحدث الأساليب.', 'es': 'Abordamos la clasificación implícita de relaciones discursivas, una tarea de determinar automáticamente las relaciones semánticas entre argumentos. Las palabras dignas de atención en los argumentos son claves cruciales para clasificar las relaciones del discurso. Se ha demostrado que los mecanismos de atención son eficaces para resaltar las palabras dignas de atención durante la codificación. Sin embargo, nuestra encuesta muestra que algunas palabras no esenciales se juzgan erróneamente involuntariamente como palabras dignas de atención y, por lo tanto, se les asigna un peso de atención mayor de lo que debería ser. Proponemos un método de reestimación de pérdidas basado en sanciones para regular el proceso de aprendizaje de la atención, integrando los coeficientes de penalización en el cálculo de la pérdida mediante la sobreestabilidad de las distribuciones del peso de atención. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en el corpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Los resultados de las pruebas muestran que nuestro método de reestimación de pérdidas conduce a mejoras sustanciales para una variedad de mecanismos de atención, y obtiene un rendimiento altamente competitivo en comparación con los métodos más avanzados.', 'pt': 'Abordamos a classificação de relações discursivas implícitas, uma tarefa de determinar automaticamente as relações semânticas entre argumentos. As palavras dignas de atenção nos argumentos são pistas cruciais para classificar as relações discursivas. Mecanismos de atenção têm se mostrado eficazes em destacar as palavras dignas de atenção durante a codificação. No entanto, nossa pesquisa mostra que algumas palavras não essenciais são involuntariamente mal interpretadas como as palavras dignas de atenção e, portanto, recebem pesos de atenção mais pesados do que deveriam. Propomos um método de reestimação de perda baseado em penalidade para regular o processo de aprendizagem da atenção, integrando coeficientes de penalidade no cálculo da perda por meio da sobreestabilidade das distribuições de peso de atenção. Conduzimos experimentos no corpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Os resultados dos testes mostram que nosso método de reestimação de perdas leva a melhorias substanciais para uma variedade de mecanismos de atenção, e obtém um desempenho altamente competitivo em comparação com os métodos de última geração.', 'fr': "Nous abordons la classification implicite des relations de discours, une tâche qui consiste à déterminer automatiquement les relations sémantiques entre les arguments. Les mots dignes d'attention dans les arguments sont des indices cruciaux pour classer les relations discursionnelles. Les mécanismes d'attention se sont révélés efficaces pour mettre en évidence les mots dignes d'attention lors de l'encodage. Cependant, notre enquête montre que certains mots non essentiels sont involontairement mal jugés comme des mots dignes d'attention et, par conséquent, leur poids d'attention est plus élevé que ce qui devrait l'être. Nous proposons une méthode de réestimation de la perte basée sur les pénalités pour réguler le processus d'apprentissage de l'attention, en intégrant des coefficients de pénalité dans le calcul de la perte au moyen d'une surstabilité des distributions de poids de l'attention. Nous menons des expériences sur le corpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Les résultats des tests montrent que notre méthode de réestimation des pertes conduit à des améliorations substantielles pour une variété de mécanismes d'attention, et qu'elle obtient des performances très compétitives par rapport aux méthodes de pointe.", 'ja': '私たちは、引数間の意味関係を自動的に決定するタスクである暗黙の話題関係分類に取り組んでいます。 議論における注目に値する言葉は、議論の関係を分類するための重要な手がかりである。 注意メカニズムは、エンコード中に注意に値する単語を強調するのに効果的であることが証明されています。 しかし、私たちの調査では、一部の非本質的な単語は意図せずに注目に値する単語として誤解され、したがって、本来あるべきよりも重い注目度が割り当てられていることが示されています。 注意喚起学習プロセスを調節するためのペナルティベースの損失再推定法を提案し、注意喚起重み分布の過安定性によって損失の計算にペナルティ係数を積分する。 Ｐｅｎｎ Ｄｉｓｃｏｕｒｓｅ ＴｒｅｅＢａｎｋ （ ＰＤＴＢ ）コーパスの実験を行っている。 試験結果は、当社の損失再推定法が様々な注意メカニズムの大幅な改善につながり、最先端の方法と比較して競争力の高い性能を得ていることを示しています。', 'zh': '隐式言分类,一自定参数语义之任也。 论之可关者,分类语之要也。 注意机制已验编码显值得注意者单词效也。 然臣等勘显,无关紧要者单词无意误判为可单词,故被赋重于所宜。 举惩罚之失重估以节意学,权重过度稳定性系数整合罚之失中。 实验于Penn Discourse TreeBank(PDTB)语料库。 试结果表明,吾等损益实质性改,比之先进,其有高竞争力。', 'hi': 'हम अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध वर्गीकरण से निपटते हैं, जो तर्कों के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों को स्वचालित रूप से निर्धारित करने का एक कार्य है। तर्कों में ध्यान देने योग्य शब्द प्रवचन संबंधों को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण सुराग हैं। ध्यान तंत्र एन्कोडिंग के दौरान ध्यान योग्य शब्दों को उजागर करने में प्रभावी साबित हुए हैं। हालांकि, हमारे सर्वेक्षण से पता चलता है कि कुछ अनावश्यक शब्दों को अनजाने में ध्यान-योग्य शब्दों के रूप में गलत समझा जाता है और इसलिए, भारी ध्यान वजन सौंपा जाना चाहिए। हम ध्यान सीखने की प्रक्रिया को विनियमित करने के लिए एक दंड-आधारित हानि पुन: अनुमान विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, ध्यान वजन वितरण की अतिस्थिरता के माध्यम से नुकसान की गणना में दंड गुणांक को एकीकृत करते हैं। हम पेन प्रवचन TreeBank (PDTB) कॉर्पस पर प्रयोगों का संचालन. परीक्षण के परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी हानि पुन: अनुमान विधि विभिन्न प्रकार के ध्यान तंत्रों के लिए पर्याप्त सुधार की ओर ले जाती है, और यह अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में अत्यधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'Мы рассматриваем неявную классификацию отношений дискурса, задачу автоматического определения семантических отношений между аргументами. Достойные внимания слова в аргументах являются критически важными подсказками для классификации дискурсных отношений. Механизмы внимания доказали свою эффективность в выделении достойных внимания слов во время кодирования. Однако наше обследование показывает, что некоторые несущественные слова непреднамеренно неверно оцениваются как слова, заслуживающие внимания, и поэтому им придается больший вес, чем следовало бы. Мы предлагаем метод переоценки потерь на основе штрафов для регулирования процесса обучения вниманию, интегрируя коэффициенты штрафов в расчет потерь с помощью чрезмерной стабильности распределения веса внимания. Мы проводим эксперименты на корпусе Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Результаты теста показывают, что наш метод переоценки убытков приводит к существенным улучшениям для различных механизмов внимания, и он получает высокую конкурентоспособность по сравнению с современными методами.', 'ga': 'Téimid i ngleic le haicmiú caidrimh dioscúrsa intuigthe, tasc chun caidreamh séimeantach idir argóintí a chinneadh go huathoibríoch. Is leideanna ríthábhachtacha iad na focail ar fiú aird a thabhairt orthu sna hargóintí chun an caidreamh dioscúrsa a rangú. Tá sé cruthaithe go bhfuil meicníochtaí airde éifeachtach chun béim a chur ar na focail ar fiú aird a thabhairt orthu le linn an ionchódaithe. Léiríonn ár suirbhé, áfach, go ndéantar míbhreithiúnas neamhbheartaithe ar roinnt focail neamhriachtanacha mar fhocail ar fiú aird a thabhairt orthu agus, dá bhrí sin, sanntar meáchain airde níos troime ná mar ba chóir. Molaimid modh athmheasta caillteanais bunaithe ar phionós chun an próiseas foghlama aird a rialáil, ag comhtháthú comhéifeachtaí pionóis i ríomh an chaillteanais trí ró-chobhsaíocht dáileacháin aird-mheáchan. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar chorpas Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Léiríonn torthaí na dtástálacha go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha ar éagsúlacht meicníochtaí aird mar thoradh ar ár modh athmheasta caillteanais, agus faigheann sé feidhmíocht an-iomaíoch i gcomparáid leis na modhanna úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის კომპლიციტური დისკურსების კომპლიციაციას გადავწყვებთ, სემონტიკური პირობების ავტომატურად განსაზღვრება. არგუმენტებში დააყენებული სიტყვები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ. დაახლოების მექანიზებები ეფექტიურია, რომლებიც კოდირების განმავლობაში დაახლოებით დაახლოების სიტყვები. მაგრამ ჩვენი შესახებ ჩვენი შესახებ, რომ ზოგიერთი სიტყვები არ უნდა გადაწყვეტილია, როგორც აღმოჩენებული სიტყვები და, ამიტომ, უფრო ძალიან გრძნობა იყოს. ჩვენ დავიწყვებთ დაკავშირებული დაკავშირების გარემოსწორება პროცესის რეგილექტურაციის პროცესი, დაკავშირების კოეფექტირების ინტერგურაციის კოეფექტირების კომპუტექტირებაში დაკავ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები პენ დისკურსი TreeBank (PDTB) კორპუსში გავაკეთებთ. ტესტის წარმოდგენების შედეგი ჩვენი შეცდომის რესუმენტირებას მეტი გავაკეთება მნიშვნელოვანი მექანციების განსხვავებას, და ის მიიღება ძალიან კონუმენტებული კონუმენტიური კონუმენტიური', 'el': 'Αντιμετωπίζουμε τη σιωπηρή ταξινόμηση σχέσεων λόγου, ένα καθήκον του αυτόματου προσδιορισμού σημασιολογικών σχέσεων μεταξύ επιχειρημάτων. Οι λέξεις που αξίζει την προσοχή σε επιχειρήματα είναι κρίσιμες ενδείξεις για την ταξινόμηση των σχέσεων λόγου. Οι μηχανισμοί προσοχής έχουν αποδειχθεί αποτελεσματικοί στην ανάδειξη των λέξεων που αξίζουν προσοχή κατά την κωδικοποίηση. Ωστόσο, η έρευνά μας δείχνει ότι ορισμένες μη ουσιώδεις λέξεις κρίνονται ακούσια λανθασμένα ως λέξεις άξιες προσοχής και, ως εκ τούτου, αποδίδονται βαρύτερα βάρη προσοχής από ό,τι θα έπρεπε. Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο επαναεκτίμησης απώλειας με βάση την ποινή για τη ρύθμιση της διαδικασίας μάθησης προσοχής, ενσωματώνοντας συντελεστές ποινής στον υπολογισμό της απώλειας μέσω της υπερσταθερότητας των κατανεμήσεων βάρους προσοχής. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα στο σώμα της Πεν Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Τα αποτελέσματα των δοκιμών δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος επαναεκτίμησης των ζημιών οδηγεί σε ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις για μια ποικιλία μηχανισμών προσοχής και επιτυγχάνει ιδιαίτερα ανταγωνιστική απόδοση σε σύγκριση με τις μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'Az implicit diskurzus kapcsolatok osztályozásával foglalkozunk, amely az argumentumok közötti szemantikai kapcsolatok automatikus meghatározásának feladata. Az érvekben található figyelemre méltó szavak kulcsfontosságú jelek a diskurzus viszonyok osztályozásához. A figyelemre méltó mechanizmusok hatékonynak bizonyultak a figyelemre méltó szavak kiemelésében a kódolás során. A felmérésünk azonban azt mutatja, hogy néhány lényegtelen szót véletlenül félreértékelnek figyelemre méltó szavaknak, és ezért nagyobb figyelemsúlyt rendeltek, mint kellene. A figyelemtanulás folyamatának szabályozására egy büntetőalapú veszteség újrabecslési módszert javasolunk, amely a büntetőegyütthatókat integrálja a veszteség kiszámításába a figyelem súlyeloszlásának túlzhatóságával. Kísérleteket végzünk a Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) korpuszon. A vizsgálati eredmények azt mutatják, hogy veszteség újrabecslési módszerünk jelentős javulást eredményez a különböző figyelmi mechanizmusok számára, és a legkorszerűbb módszerekhez képest rendkívül versenyképes teljesítményt ér el.', 'it': "Affrontiamo la classificazione implicita delle relazioni di discorso, un compito di determinare automaticamente le relazioni semantiche tra argomenti. Le parole degne di attenzione negli argomenti sono indizi cruciali per classificare le relazioni di discorso. I meccanismi di attenzione si sono dimostrati efficaci nell'evidenziare le parole degne di attenzione durante la codifica. Tuttavia, il nostro sondaggio mostra che alcune parole non essenziali sono erroneamente giudicate come parole degne di attenzione e, quindi, assegnano pesi di attenzione più pesanti di quanto dovrebbe essere. Proponiamo un metodo di rivalutazione della perdita basato sulla penalità per regolare il processo di apprendimento dell'attenzione, integrando coefficienti di penalità nel calcolo della perdita mediante sovrastabilità delle distribuzioni del peso dell'attenzione. Conduciamo esperimenti sul corpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). I risultati dei test mostrano che il nostro metodo di rivalutazione delle perdite porta a miglioramenti sostanziali per una varietà di meccanismi di attenzione e ottiene prestazioni altamente competitive rispetto ai metodi più moderni.", 'kk': 'Біз аргументтер арасындағы семантикалық қатынастарды автоматты түрде анықтайтын дискурстардың қатынасын шешу тапсырмасы. Аргументтердің маңызды сөздері дискурстардың қатынасын классификациялау үшін маңызды түрде. Кодтамасы кезінде назардағы сөздерді бояулау үшін әсер ететін механизмтер болды. Бірақ біздің зерттеулеріміздің кейбір үлкен сөздеріміз кездеспейтін сөздердің көмегімен қарсы деп ойлайды. Сондықтан бұл сөздердің көмегімен қарсы болуы керек. Біз тәртіпке негізделген жоғалу әдісін қайта оқыту процесін басқару үшін, тәртіпке көмектесу коэфициенттерді есептеу үшін қайта оқыту әдісін қолданамыз. Біз Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) корпус туралы эксперименттерді жасаймыз. Сынақ нәтижелері біздің жоғалтылығымызды қайта оқу әдісіміздің әртүрлі механизмтерінің көптеген жақсартылығын көрсетеді. Ол әртүрлі әдістер әдісімен салыстырылып, көптеген жақсартылық', 'ms': 'We tackle implicit discourse relation classification, a task of automatically determining semantic relationships between arguments.  Kata-kata yang layak diperhatikan dalam argumen adalah petunjuk penting untuk mengklasifikasi hubungan percakapan. Mekanisme perhatian telah terbukti berkesan dalam menyatakan perkataan yang layak untuk perhatian semasa pengekodan. Namun, penyelidikan kami menunjukkan bahawa beberapa perkataan yang tidak sengaja dianggap salah sebagai perkataan yang layak perhatian dan, oleh itu, ditugaskan berat perhatian yang lebih berat daripada seharusnya. Kami cadangkan kaedah penghargaan ulang kehilangan berdasarkan hukuman untuk mengatur proses pembelajaran perhatian, mengintegrasikan koeficient hukuman dalam pengiraan kehilangan dengan menggunakan ketidakstabilan distribusi berat perhatian. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus. Hasil ujian menunjukkan bahawa kaedah penilaian ulang kehilangan kita membawa kepada peningkatan yang besar untuk berbagai mekanisme perhatian, dan ia mendapat prestasi kompetitif yang tinggi dibandingkan dengan kaedah-kaedah terbaik.', 'mk': 'Ние се справуваме со имплицитната класификација на дискурсните односи, задача за автоматско одредување на семантичните односи меѓу аргументите. Зборовите вредни за внимание во аргументите се клучни траги за класификување на дискурсните односи. Механизмите за внимание се докажаа дека се ефикасни во истакнувањето на зборовите вредни за внимание за време на кодирањето. Сепак, нашето истражување покажува дека некои нежентијални зборови се ненамерно погрешно проценети како зборови вредни за внимание и, затоа, доделени поголеми тегови на внимание отколку што треба да бидат. Предложуваме метод за репроценка на загубата базиран на казна за регулирање на процесот на учење внимание, интегрирање на коефициентите на казната во пресметувањето на загубата со прекумерна стабилност на дистрибуцијата на тежината на вниманието. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на корпусот на "Penn Discourse TreeBank" (PDTB). The test results show that our loss re-estimation method leads to substantial improvements for a variety of attention mechanisms, and it obtains highly competitive performance compared to the state-of-the-art methods.', 'lt': 'We tackle implicit discourse relation classification, a task of automatically determining semantic relationships between arguments.  Argumentuose svarbūs žodžiai yra labai svarbūs diskursinių santykių klasifikavimo požymiai. Įrodyta, kad dėmesio mechanizmai veiksmingai pabrėžia dėmesio vertus žodžius kodavimo metu. Tačiau mūsų apklausa rodo, kad kai kurie nesąmoniški žodžiai netikėtai vertinami kaip dėmesio verti žodžiai ir todėl skiriami didesni dėmesio svoriai nei turėtų būti. Siūlome sankcijomis pagrįstą nuostolių perskaičiavimo metodą, pagal kurį būtų reguliuojamas dėmesio mokymosi procesas, įtraukiant sankcijų koeficientus į nuostolių skaičiavimą per didelio dėmesio svorio paskirstymo būdu. We conduct experiments on the Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus.  Iš bandymų rezultatų matyti, kad mūsų nuostolių perskaičiavimo metodas labai pagerina įvairius dėmesio mechanizmus ir kad jis užtikrina aukštą konkurencingumą, palyginti su naujausiais metodais.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ബന്ധം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനാക്കുന്നതിനെ തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നു. വാദ്യാഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയി വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിന് പ്രധാനപ്പ കോഡിങ്ങിനുള്ള സമയത്ത് ശ്രദ്ധയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്ന മെക്കി എന്നാലും നമ്മുടെ പരിശോധന കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു കുറച്ചു വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെറ്റായി വിചാരിക്കുന്നത്, ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന വാക ശിക്ഷ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നഷ്ടം വീണ്ടും കണക്കാക്കാനുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d നാം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ശിക്ഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്നതിനായി,  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പെന്\u200d ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട വീണ്ടും പരിഗണിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കാണിച്ചുകൊ', 'mt': 'Aħna nindirizzaw il-klassifikazzjoni impliċita tar-relazzjonijiet diskorsi, kompitu li jiddeterminaw awtomatikament ir-relazzjonijiet semantiċi bejn l-argumenti. Il-kliem li jistħoqqilhom l-attenzjoni fl-argumenti huma indikazzjonijiet kruċjali għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors. Il-mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni ntwerew effettivi biex jenfasizzaw il-kliem li jistħoqqilhom l-attenzjoni waqt l-ikkodifikar. However, our survey shows that some inessential words are unintentionally misjudged as the attention-worthy words and, therefore, assigned heavier attention weights than should be.  Aħna nipproponu metodu ta’ stima mill-ġdid tat-telf ibbażat fuq il-penali biex jiġi rregolat il-proċess tat-tagħlim tal-attenzjoni, li jintegra koeffiċjenti tal-penali fil-kalkolu tat-telf permezz ta’ stabbiltà żejda tad-distribuzzjonijiet tal-piż tal-attenzjoni. Aħna nieħdu esperimenti fuq il-korpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Ir-riżultati tat-testijiet juru li l-metodu tagħna ta’ stima mill-ġdid tat-telf iwassal għal titjib sostanzjali għal varjetà ta’ mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni, u jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva ħafna meta mqabbel mal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Бид ангилалын харилцааны үндсэн ярианы харилцаа, аргументын хоорондын semantic харилцааны автоматаар тодорхойлох үйл ажиллагааг зохицуулдаг. Аргумент дээрх анхаарлын үнэ цэнэтэй үг бол ярианы харилцааныг ангилах чухал зүйл юм. Хэрэв анхаарлын механизм нь кодлох үед анхаарлын үнэ цэнэтэй үгийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй байдаг. Гэвч бидний судалгаанд зарим сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үг анхаарлын үнэ цэнэтэй үг гэж буруу хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн гэдгийг харуулж байна. Иймээс илүү хүнд анхаарлын жин байх ёстой. Бид шагналын үндсэн алдагдлыг дахин тооцоолж, анхаарлын суралцах үйл явцыг удирдах, шагналын коэффициентүүдийг санаа зохион байгуулахын тулд анхаарлын жингийн хуваарилалтын хуваарилалтын тулд тооцоолж байх Бид Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) корпус дээр туршилтыг хийдэг. Шалгуулын үр дүнд бидний алдагдал дахин дүгнэлт хийх арга нь олон төрлийн анхаарлын механизмуудын хувьд маш олон сайжруулах боломжтой. Энэ нь урлагийн хувьд харьцуулахад маш өрсөлдөг үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Zajmujemy się ukrytą klasyfikacją relacji dyskursowych, zadaniem automatycznego określania relacji semantycznych między argumentami. Godne uwagi słowa w argumentach są kluczowymi wskazówkami klasyfikacji relacji dyskursu. Mechanizmy uwagi okazały się skuteczne w podkreślaniu wartych uwagi słów podczas kodowania. Nasze badanie pokazuje jednak, że niektóre nieistotne słowa są nieumyślnie źle oceniane jako słowa godne uwagi i dlatego przypisuje większą wagę uwagi niż powinno być. Proponujemy metodę ponownego oszacowania strat opartą na karze, aby regulować proces uczenia się uwagi, włączając współczynniki karne do obliczania straty poprzez nadmierną stabilność rozkładów wagi uwagi. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na korpusie Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Wyniki badań pokazują, że nasza metoda ponownego oszacowania strat prowadzi do znacznych ulepszeń dla różnych mechanizmów uwagi i uzyskuje wysoce konkurencyjną wydajność w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi metodami.', 'no': 'Vi løyser med implisitt diskursrelasjon med klassifikasjon, eit oppgåve med automatisk avgjering av semantiske forhold mellom argument. Merknadsverdige ord i argumentet er viktige klokka for å klassifisera diskursrelasjonane. Merknadsmekanisasjonar er vist effektiv i å markera oppmerksverdige ord under koding. Forsøket vårt viser imidlertid at nokre gjennomsiktige ord er ikkje tilstrekkeleg gjennomsiktige som oppmerksverdige ord, og derfor tildelte tyrke oppmerksvekt enn å vera. Vi foreslår ein metode for å gjenoppretta tap på straumbasert tap for å regulere oppmerksomhetsprosessen for å lære oppmerksomheten, og integrere straumkoeffisienten i rekninga av tap ved hjelp av overstabiliteten av oppmerksomhetsvetsfordelingar. Vi gjev eksperimenter på Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus. Test-resultatene viser at metoden vårt tapt gjenoppretting fører til substantive forbedringar for fleire oppmerksmekanismer, og det får stor konkurentært utvikling samanlikna med kunstmetodane tilstand.', 'ro': 'Abordăm clasificarea implicită a relațiilor discursului, o sarcină de determinare automată a relațiilor semantice dintre argumente. Cuvintele demne de atenție din argumente sunt indicii esențiale pentru clasificarea relațiilor discursului. Mecanismele de atenție s-au dovedit eficiente în evidențierea cuvintelor demne de atenție în timpul codării. Cu toate acestea, sondajul nostru arată că unele cuvinte inesențiale sunt neintenționat judecate greșit ca cuvinte demne de atenție și, prin urmare, atribuite greutăți mai mari de atenție decât ar trebui să fie. Propunem o metodă de reevaluare a pierderilor bazată pe penalizare pentru reglementarea procesului de învățare a atenției, integrarea coeficienților de penalizare în calculul pierderii prin suprastabilitatea distribuțiilor greutății atenției. Realizăm experimente pe corpul Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Rezultatele testelor arată că metoda noastră de reevaluare a pierderilor duce la îmbunătățiri substanțiale pentru o varietate de mecanisme de atenție și obține performanțe extrem de competitive în comparație cu metodele de ultimă generație.', 'so': "Waxaannu qabsanaynaa fasaxa xiriirka kala duwan, shaqada aan bilowga u go'aanno xiriirka kala duwan ee arrimaha kala dhexeeya. Erayada aad u taxadar karto hadallada ay ku hadlaan waa tusaale muhiim ah si loo kala qeybiyo xiriirka hadalka. Dhaqaalaha waxaa lagu caddeeyey mid faa’iido leh in lagu caddeeyo hadalka aad u istaahilaan marka codsiga lagu jiro. Si kastaba ha ahaatee baaritaankeenu wuxuu muujiyaa in qaar hadal aan caqli lahayn looga baahdo sida hadallo istaahila oo kale, oo sidaas darteed miisaamo culus ah oo ay ka sii daran tahay in ay jirto. Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa qaab lagu qiimeeyo khasaarada oo lagu saleynayo si loo maamulo baaritaanka waxbarashada, si loo xisaabiyo xisaabta khasaarada, sababtoo ah waajibka kala qaybinta miisaanka. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaan ku qoran xarunta baabuurta Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababkayaga khasaarada dib u qiimeynta ah uu horumarinayo meymisyo kala duduwan, wuxuuna helaa tababar aad u adag oo la xiriira qaababka farshaxanka.", 'sv': 'Vi behandlar implicit diskursrelationsklassificering, en uppgift att automatiskt best채mma semantiska relationer mellan argument. De uppm채rksamhetsv채rda orden i argumenten 채r avg철rande ledtr책dar f철r att klassificera diskursrelationerna. Uppm채rksamhetsmekanismer har visat sig vara effektiva n채r det g채ller att lyfta fram de uppm채rksamhetsv채rda orden under kodningen. V책r unders철kning visar dock att vissa on철diga ord oavsiktligt missbed철ms som de uppm채rksamhetsv채rda orden och d채rf철r tilldelas tyngre uppm채rksamhetsvikt 채n borde vara. Vi f철resl책r en straffbaserad f철rlustomv채rderingsmetod f철r att reglera uppm채rksamhetens inl채rningsprocess, integrera straffkoefficienter i ber채kningen av f철rlust med hj채lp av 철verbarhet av uppm채rksamhetens viktf철rdelningar. Vi genomf철r experiment p책 Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) korpus. Testresultaten visar att v책r f철rlustomv채rderingsmetod leder till betydande f철rb채ttringar f철r en m채ngd olika uppm채rksamhetsmekanismer, och den uppn책r h철g konkurrenskraft j채mf철rt med de senaste metoderna.', 'sr': 'Mi se suočavamo sa klasifikacijom veza sa implicitnim diskusijama, zadatak automatskog određivanja semantičkih odnosa između argumentacija. Pristojne riječi u argumentima su ključne tragove za klasifikaciju odnosa diskursa. Mehanizmi pažnje dokazani su učinkoviti u naglašavanju reèi vrijednih pažnje tokom kodiranja. Međutim, naša istraživanja pokazuje da su neke reèi nesmisleno pogrešno osuðene kao rijeèi koje su vrijedne pažnje i stoga su dodele teže težine pažnje nego što bi trebalo biti. Predlažemo metodu ponovnog procjene gubitka na osnovu kazne kako bi regulirali proces učenja pažnje, integrirali koeficijente kazne u računalo gubitka putem preteranja distribucije težine pažnje. Vodimo eksperimente na korpusu TreeBank (PDTB). Rezultati testiranja pokazuju da naš metod ponovne procjene gubitka vodi do značajnih poboljšanja za razne pažnje mehanizma, i dobija veoma konkurentne funkcije u usporedbi sa metodama države umjetnosti.', 'si': 'අපි සම්පූර්ණ කතාවක් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ අවධානය සම්බන්ධයෙන් අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් වචනය තමයි කතාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් විශේෂ කරන්න විශේෂ අවධානය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සාක්ෂිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා වචන නමුත්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වනවා කියලා කිසිම අවශ්\u200dය වචනයක් අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය වචනයක් වගේ අවශ්\u200dය වචනයක් වගේ අවශ්\u200dය වච අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා අවධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනව අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා පෙන්න් විශ්වාස ක්\u200dරීබැන්ක් (PDTB) කොර්පුස් වල. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ නැතිවෙන්න පුළුවන් අනුමාණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විදිහට අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200d', 'ta': 'நாம் தானாகவே வார்த்தைகளுக்கிடையில் பேசும் தொடர்பு வகுப்புகளை பொருத்துகிறோம். வார்த்தைகளில் கவனத்திற்கு தகுதியுள்ள வார்த்தைகள் பேச்சு தொடர்புகளை வகைப்படுத்த முக்கியமான கூட்ட கவனம் முறைமைகள் குறியீட்டுக்குறியீட்டில் கவனத்திற்கு தகுதியான வார்த்தைகளை முன்னிலைப்படுத்தும்  ஆனால், எங்கள் ஆய்வு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது சில உணர்வு வார்த்தைகள் புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியாத தவறான வார்த்தைகள் என்று குறிப்பிடு நாம் வேதனை அடிப்படையிலான இழப்பு மீண்டும் ஆய்வு முறையை கட்டுப்படுத்த முறையில் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், வேதனை குணங்களை இழப்பில் சேர்த்து  நாம் பென் வடிவமைப்பு Tree Bank (PDTB) கூர்பாஸ் மீது சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் எங்கள் இழப்பு மறுமதிப்பு முறைமையை பல கவனத்தின் முறைமைகளுக்கு பெரிய முன்னேற்றங்களை காண்பிக்கிறது மற்றும் அது மிகவும் பொருத்த', 'ur': 'ہم بحثوں کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ کا معاملہ کریں گے، ایک کام جو اپنی طرف سے معاملہ کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ کا معاملہ کریں گے۔ جھگڑنے میں اچھی باتیں اچھی نشانیاں ہیں جن کے بارے میں سخنرانی رابطہ کا تقسیم کرنا ہے ڈرانے کے مکانیزوں کو اثبات کی گئی ہے کہ ڈرانے کے وقت توجه کا ارزش دار کلمات کو اثبات کریں۔ لیکن ہمارا تحقیق دکھاتا ہے کہ بعض اخلاق کلمات بے ارادہ باتوں کے طور پر غلط سمجھے جاتے ہیں اور لہٰذا ان سے زیادہ سنگین تول رکھتے ہیں ہم نے سزا کی بنیاد رکھی گھاٹ کا دوبارہ مطالبہ کرنے کا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ توجه کی تعلیم کی پروسس کو تنظیم کرے، سزا کے مطابق خسارہ کی محاسبات کے ذریعے توجه کی توزیع کے مطابق خسارہ کی کمپیوٹ میں جمع کریں۔ ہم پین ڈسکورس تری بنک (PDTB) کورپوس پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری خسارہ دوبارہ آزمائش کا طریقہ ایک مختلف طریقے کے لئے بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور یہ بہت زیادہ مسابقه کی عمدگی حاصل کرتا ہے آزمائش طریقے کے مقابلہ میں.', 'uz': "Biz o'zgarishlar orasidagi semantik munosabatlarni avtomatik aniqlash vazifasini boshqaramiz. Murojaatlarni o'rganish uchun eng muhim so'zlar. Name Lekin bizning qidirishimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bir necha kishil so'zlar hech qanday noto'g'ri so'zlarni o'xshash deb hisoblanadi, va shunday qilib, bizning o'zgarishdan ko'proq qiymatni anglatadi. We propose a penalty-based loss re-estimation method to regulate the attention learning process, integrating penalty coefficients into the computation of loss by means of overstability of attention weight distributions.  Biz Penn Discourse Tree Bank (PDTB) corpusida jarayon imtiyozni bajaramiz. Sinov natijalari esa qaytadan tasavvur qilish usulini ko'pchilik qiymati mechanislarga katta yaxshi o'zgarishga ega beradi, va bu shaxsiy usullarning holatiga kamaytirish juda qiziqarli taxminan bajarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề liên quan ngầm, một nhiệm vụ tự động quyết định mối quan hệ theo ngữ nghĩa giữa các đối số. Những từ đáng chú ý trong các lý luận là manh mối quan trọng để phân loại các quan hệ. Cảnh sát đã có hiệu quả để nhấn mạnh những từ đáng chú ý trong lần mã hóa. Tuy nhiên, cuộc khảo sát của chúng tôi cho thấy một số từ không tình cờ bị đánh giá sai như những từ đáng chú ý và, do đó, nặng trọng lượng chú ý hơn đáng chú ý. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp đánh giá lại lỗ phạt để điều chỉnh quá trình học tập chú ý, bằng cách nhập nhãn áp suất giảm cân bằng cách gây áp lực về trọng lượng chú ý. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên cầu Pensylvania (PDTB) Corpus. Kết quả kiểm tra cho thấy phương pháp đánh giá lại mất mát của chúng ta dẫn tới cải thiện đáng kể cho nhiều cơ chế tập trung, và nó đạt được hiệu suất cạnh tranh cao so với phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Занимаваме се с класификацията на имплицитните дискурсни отношения, задача за автоматично определяне на семантичните взаимоотношения между аргументите. Заслужаващите внимание думи в аргументите са ключови улики за класифициране на дискурсните отношения. Механизмите за внимание са доказани ефективни при подчертаването на заслужаващите внимание думи по време на кодирането. Въпреки това, нашето проучване показва, че някои несъществени думи неволно се преценяват погрешно като думи, заслужаващи внимание и следователно им се присъждат по-тежки тежести на вниманието, отколкото трябва. Предлагаме метод за преоценка на загубите, базиран на наказания, за регулиране на процеса на учене на вниманието, интегрирайки коефициентите на наказание в изчисляването на загубите чрез свръхстабилност на разпределението на теглото на вниманието. Провеждаме експерименти върху корпуса на Пен Дискурс ТрейБанк (ПДТБ). Резултатите от теста показват, че нашият метод за преоценка на загубите води до значителни подобрения за различни механизми на внимание и постига високо конкурентни резултати в сравнение с най-съвременните методи.', 'hr': 'Mi rješavamo implicitne diskurske veze sa klasifikacijom, zadatak automatskog utvrđivanja semantičkih odnosa između argumenata. Pristojne riječi o pažnji u argumentima su ključne tragove za klasifikaciju odnosa o diskursima. Mehanizmi pažnje dokazani su učinkoviti u naglašavanju riječi vrijednih pažnje tijekom kodiranja. Međutim, naša istraživanja pokazuje da su neke riječi nesumjerno pogrešne osuđene kao riječi vrijedne pažnje i stoga dodijeljene teže težine pažnje nego što bi trebalo biti. Predlažemo metodu ponovnog procjene gubitka na osnovu kazne kako bi upravljali procesom učenja pažnje, uključujući koeficijente kazne u računalo gubitka pomoću prekomjernosti raspodjela težine pažnje. Provodimo eksperimente na korpusu TreeBank (PDTB) Penn Discourse. Rezultati testiranja pokazuju da naš metod ponovne procjene gubitka dovede do značajnih poboljšanja za razne mjere pažnje, i dobiva veoma konkurentne učinke u usporedbi s metodama stanja umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Wir beschäftigen uns mit der impliziten Klassifizierung von Diskursbeziehungen, einer Aufgabe, semantische Beziehungen zwischen Argumenten automatisch zu bestimmen. Die aufmerksamkeitswürdigen Worte in Argumenten sind entscheidende Anhaltspunkte für die Einordnung der Diskursbeziehungen. Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen haben sich als wirksam erwiesen, um die aufmerksamkeitswürdigen Wörter während der Codierung hervorzuheben. Unsere Umfrage zeigt jedoch, dass einige unwesentliche Wörter unbeabsichtigt als aufmerksamkeitswürdige Wörter falsch eingeschätzt werden und daher schwerere Aufmerksamkeitsgewichte zugewiesen werden, als es sein sollte. Zur Regulierung des Aufmerksamkeits-Lernprozesses schlagen wir eine Strafe-basierte Loss-Re-Schätzungsmethode vor, die Strafkoeffizienten mittels Überbelastbarkeit der Aufmerksamkeitsgewichtsverteilungen in die Berechnung des Verlustes integriert. Wir führen Experimente am Corpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) durch. Die Testergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Verlustrückschätzungsmethode zu erheblichen Verbesserungen für eine Vielzahl von Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen führt und im Vergleich zu den State-of-the-Art-Methoden eine sehr wettbewerbsfähige Leistung erzielt.', 'da': 'Vi beskæftiger os med implicit diskursrelationsklassificering, en opgave med automatisk at bestemme semantiske relationer mellem argumenter. De opmærksomhedsværdige ord i argumenter er afgørende spor til klassificering af diskursrelationerne. Opmærksomhedsmekanismer har vist sig at være effektive til at fremhæve de opmærksomhedsværdige ord under kodning. Men vores undersøgelse viser, at nogle uvæsentlige ord utilsigtet misbedømmes som de opmærksomhedsværdige ord og derfor tildeles større opmærksomhedsvægt end burde være. Vi foreslår en straffebaseret tabsregistreringsmetode til regulering af opmærksomhedsindlæringsprocessen, der integrerer straffekoefficienter i beregningen af tab ved hjælp af overstabilitet af opmærksomhedsvægtfordeling. Vi udfører eksperimenter på Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) korpus. Testresultaterne viser, at vores tabsregistreringsmetode fører til væsentlige forbedringer af en række opmærksomhedsmekanismer, og den opnår høj konkurrenceevne sammenlignet med de nyeste metoder.', 'ko': '우리는 스텔스 언어 관계의 분류를 처리하는데, 이것은 매개 변수 간의 의미 관계를 자동으로 확정하는 임무이다.논쟁에서 주의할 만한 단어는 대화어 관계를 분류하는 중요한 단서이다.주의 메커니즘은 인코딩 과정에서 주의할 만한 단어를 효과적으로 돋보이게 할 수 있다는 것이 증명되었다.그러나 일부 중요하지 않은 단어는 무의식중에 주의할 만한 단어로 오판되어 더 무거운 주의권이 부여된 것으로 조사됐다.우리는 징벌의 손실 재평가 방법을 바탕으로 주의 학습 과정을 조절하고 주의권 중분포의 초안정성을 통해 징벌 계수를 손실 계산에 집적시켰다.우리는 펜실베이니아 어편 트리 라이브러리 (PDTB) 어료 라이브러리에서 실험을 진행했다.테스트 결과에 의하면 우리의 손실 재평가 방법은 각종 주의 메커니즘을 크게 개선했고 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 경쟁력 있는 성능을 얻었다.', 'fa': 'ما رابطه\u200cهای مختلف رابطه\u200cهای مختلف را حل می\u200cکنیم، وظیفه\u200cی تعیین رابطه\u200cهای semantic بین حجت\u200cها به طور خودکار. کلمات ارزشمند توجه در مجادله\u200cها سرنخ\u200cهای مهم برای کلاس کردن رابطه\u200cهای صحبت است. مکانیسم توجه در زمان رمزبندی موثر ثابت شده است که کلمات ارزشمند توجه را مشخص کند. ولی تحقیقات ما نشان می دهد که بعضی کلمات خطرناک به ناقصی به عنوان کلمات ارزشمند توجه و بنابراین وزن توجه سنگین تر از آن است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش بازارزیابی از دست دادن بر پایه مجازات تا روش یادگیری توجه را کنترل کند، با توجه به محاسبات خسارت به وسیله زیادی از توزیع وزن توجه را به محاسبات کند. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی شرکت درخت\u200cبانک پن (PDTB) انجام می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش نشان می\u200cدهد که روش بازارزی از دست دادن ما به سوی بهبود\u200cهای زیادی برای مکانیسم\u200cهای مختلف توجه می\u200cرسد، و عملکرد بسیار مسابقه\u200cای در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای هنر می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'Tunakabiliana na usambazaji wa mazungumzo, jukumu la kuamua uhusiano wa kimapenzi kati ya mijadala. Maneno yenye thamani katika majadiliano ni sababu muhimu ya kutangaza mahusiano hayo. Mifumo ya uangalizi imethibitishwa kuwa na ufanisi katika kuonyesha maneno yanayostahili wakati wa kutangaza. However, our survey shows that some inessential words are unintentionally misjudged as the attention-worthy words and, therefore, assigned heavier attention weights than should be.  Tunazipendekeza njia ya kupunguza upya wa kudhibiti mchakato wa kujifunza, kuwaunganisha ufanisi wa adhabu katika hisabu za kupoteza kwa njia ya kutokuwepo kwa usambazaji wa mizani. Tunafanya majaribio kwenye kampuni ya Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). The test results show that our loss re-estimation method leads to substantial improvements for a variety of attention mechanisms, and it obtains highly competitive performance compared to the state-of-the-art methods.', 'nl': 'We behandelen impliciete discoursrelatiecolassificatie, een taak om automatisch semantische relaties tussen argumenten te bepalen. De aandachtwaardige woorden in argumenten zijn cruciale aanwijzingen voor het classificeren van de discoursverhoudingen. Aanmerkingsmechanismen zijn bewezen effectief bij het markeren van aandachtswaardige woorden tijdens het coderen. Uit ons onderzoek blijkt echter dat sommige niet-essentiële woorden onbedoeld verkeerd worden beoordeeld als aandachtswaarde woorden en daarom zwaardere aandachtsgewichten krijgen dan zou moeten zijn. We stellen een methode voor om het aandachtsonderwijs te reguleren, waarbij strafcoëfficiënten worden geïntegreerd in de berekening van verlies door middel van overstabiliteit van aandachtsgewichtsverteilungen. We voeren experimenten uit op het Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus. De testresultaten tonen aan dat onze methode voor het herschatten van verliezen leidt tot aanzienlijke verbeteringen voor een verscheidenheid van aandachtsmechanismen, en het verkrijgt zeer concurrerende prestaties ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art methoden.', 'sq': 'Ne trajtojmë klasifikimin implicit të marrëdhënieve diskursore, një detyrë për të përcaktuar automatikisht marrëdhëniet semantike midis argumenteve. Fjalët e vlefshme për vëmendje në argumente janë udhëzime vendimtare për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve diskursore. Mekanizmat e vëmendjes janë provuar të efektshëm në theksimin e fjalëve të denjë për vëmendje gjatë kodimit. Megjithatë, sondazhi ynë tregon se disa fjalë interesante janë pa qëllim të gjykuara gabim si fjalë të denjë për vëmendje dhe, kështu, u caktuan pesha më të rënda vëmendje se duhet të jetë. We propose a penalty-based loss re-estimation method to regulate the attention learning process, integrating penalty coefficients into the computation of loss by means of overstability of attention weight distributions.  Ne kryejmë eksperimente në trupin Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Rezultatet e test it tregojnë se metoda jonë e rishikimit të humbjeve çon në përmirësime thelbësore për një varietet mekanizmash vëmendjeje dhe ajo fiton performancë shumë konkurruese krahasuar me metodat më të larta.', 'id': 'Kami menangani klasifikasi hubungan diskors implicit, tugas untuk secara otomatis menentukan hubungan semantis antara argumen. The attention-worthy words in arguments are crucial clues for classifying the discourse relations.  Mekanisme perhatian telah terbukti efektif dalam mempertimbangkan kata-kata layak perhatian selama pengekodan. Namun, penyelidikan kami menunjukkan bahwa beberapa kata-kata perniagaan tidak sengaja dianggap salah sebagai kata-kata yang layak diperhatikan dan, oleh itu, ditugaskan berat perhatian yang lebih berat daripada seharusnya. We propose a penalty-based loss re-estimation method to regulate the attention learning process, integrating penalty coefficients into the computation of loss by means of overstability of attention weight distributions.  We conduct experiments on the Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus.  The test results show that our loss re-estimation method leads to substantial improvements for a variety of attention mechanisms, and it obtains highly competitive performance compared to the state-of-the-art methods.', 'af': "Ons beëindig inplisite diskursie verhouding van klasifikasie, 'n taak van outomaties bepaal semantiese verhouding tussen argumente. Die aandagverdige woorde in argumente is kruipende kloue vir klassifisering van die diskurse relasies. Aangaande mekanisme is effektief bevestig in die verligting van die aandagverdige woorde tydens enkodering. Maar ons ondersoek wys dat sommige bedryfde woorde onwillig misoordeel is as die aandagverdige woorde en, daarom, swaar aandagsverke as wat moet wees. Ons voorstel 'n strafgebaseerde verlies reenstemmingsmetode om die aandag-leerproses te reg en die strafgebaseerde koefiniente te integreer in die rekenaar van verlies deur middel van oorsaaklikheid van aandag-gewig-verspreidings te wees. Ons doen eksperimente op die Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpus. Die toets resultate wys dat ons verlies reenstemmingsmetode lei na substantiewe verbeteringe vir 'n verskeie aandagsmekanisasies, en dit kry baie mededingsrekkenbaarheid in vergelyking met die staat van die kunstensmetodes.", 'tr': 'Biz gizli sözleri klasifikasyýasy bilen çykyp çykýarys, semantik guramlar arasyndaky baglaýyşlaryny otomatik bilen takyklaýarys. Argumentlerde üns berilýän sözler diskurs baglaýyşyny klasifikasynda örän möhüm hereketlerdir. Dikkat meýdançalary kodlemek wagtynda üns namaýyş sözlerini ýagtylamakda täsirli bolup ثابت edildi. Ýöne, biziň araştyrymyz käbir nähili sözlerimiz üns berýän sözlerimiz ýok diýip pikir etmändigini görkezýär. Şonuň üçin özüniň üns berýän sözlerimiz gerekdiginden has kiçi üns berýändigini görkezýär. Biz azat taýýarlanan ýitirmek üçin üns öwrenmek prosesyny düzenlemek üçin, gazanlyk koeficientlerini ýitirmek üçin ýitirmek üçin ýitirmek üçin bir täze hasaplamak täze teklip berýäris. Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) corpusynda experimentalary çykýarys. Testleriň netijeleri biziň ýitişimizi ýene-dyrmak taryşymyzyň döwletlerine görä örän üns meýdançalary üçin örän gowurak getirýändigini görkeýär we ol, sungat taryşymyzyň döwletlerine görä örän ýokarylyk täsirli etkinlik ukyplar', 'am': 'የውይይት ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማቀናቀል፣ በአካባቢዎች መካከል የsemantic ግንኙነት ማረጋገጥ ስራ እናስቀናለን፡፡ በንግግር ግንኙነት ለመለየት የጠቃሚ ቃላት ነው፡፡ የፊደል ክፍተት ውስጥ የሚያስከትለውን ቃላት በመግለጥ ጥሩ መሆኗል፡፡ ነገር ግን ምርመራችን አንዳንዶቹ የስሕተት ቃላት በስሕተት የተሳሳቱ ናቸው፤ ስለዚህም ከሚገባው ይልቅ የከበደ ሚዛን ነው፡፡ ትምህርት ትምህርት ፕሮግራሙን ለማስተካከል፣ የጥፋት ክፍተቶችን በመቆጣጠር እናስቀናለን፡፡ በ Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) ኮርፓስ ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከፈተናው ውጤቶች የጥፋታችንን አካባቢ አካባቢዎች ለብዙዎቹ የጥያቄ ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ እናም ከሀገሪቱ-የዓርት ሥርዓት ጋር ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛዎችን ይታገኛል፡፡', 'bn': 'যুক্তির মধ্যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে যুক্তি নির্ধারণ করার একটি কাজ। এই কথোপকথন সম্পর্ক বিস্তারিত করার জন্য যে কথোপকথনের দৃষ্টিপূর্ণ বাক্যে মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে তা হচ্ছে। এনকোডিং এর সময় মনোযোগ্য কথা উল্লেখ করার জন্য মনোযোগ প্রমাণিত হয়েছে। তবে আমাদের জরিপ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কিছু ব্যাপারের কথা অসন্তষ্ট ভুল বিচার করা হয়েছে যেহেতু মনোযোগের যোগ্য কথা হিসেবে বিচার করা হয়ে আমরা শাস্তি ভিত্তিক ক্ষতির পুনরায় হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করি শিক্ষা প্রক্রিয়ার মনোযোগ নিয়ন্ত্রণ করার জন্য, শাস্তির কার্যক্রমের সাথে ক্ষতির মাধ আমরা পেন ডিসোর্স ট্রীব্যাংক (পিডিটিবি) কোর্পাসে পরীক্ষা করছি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের হারানোর পুনরাবৃত্তির পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ প্রদানের জন্য বিশাল উন্নতি প্রদান করে এবং এটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের পদ্ধতি', 'bs': 'Mi se rješavamo sa klasifikacijom veza sa implicitnim diskusijama, zadatak automatskog utvrđivanja semantičkih odnosa između argumentacija. Pristojne riječi o pažnji u argumentima su ključne tragove za klasifikaciju odnosa o diskursima. Mehanizmi pažnje dokazani su učinkoviti u naglašavanju riječi vrijednih pažnje tijekom kodiranja. Međutim, naša istraživanja pokazuje da su neke riječi nespremno pogrešne osuđene kao riječi koje vrijede pažnje i stoga su teže težine pažnje nego što bi trebalo biti. Predlažemo metodu ponovnog procjene gubitka na osnovu kazne kako bi regulirali proces učenja pažnje, integrirali koeficijente kazne u računalo gubitka prekomjerljivom raspodjelom težine pažnje. Vodimo eksperimente na korpusu TreeBank (PDTB). Rezultati testiranja pokazuju da naš metod ponovne procjene gubitka vodi do značajnih poboljšanja za razne pažnje mehanizma, i dobija veoma konkurentne učinke u usporedbi s metodama države umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Afectem la classificació implícita de les relacions de discurs, una tasca de determinar automàticament les relacions semàntiques entre els arguments. Les paraules dignes d'atenció en els arguments són indicis crucials per classificar les relacions de discurs. Els mecanismes d'atenció s'han demostrat efectius en destacar les paraules dignes d'atenció durant la codificació. However, our survey shows that some inessential words are unintentionally misjudged as the attention-worthy words and, therefore, assigned heavier attention weights than should be.  Proposem un mètode de re-estimació de pèrdues basat en penalització per regular el procés d'aprenentatge d'atenció, integrant coeficients de penalització en el calcul de pèrdues mitjançant la sobrestabilitat de distribucions de pes d'atenció. Fem experiments al corpus Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Els resultats dels exàmens demostren que el nostre mètode de re-estimació de pèrdues porta a millores substancials per a una varietat de mecanismes d'atenció, i obté un rendiment altament competitiu comparat amb els mètodes més avançats.", 'cs': 'Zabýváme se implicitní klasifikací diskurzních vztahů, úkolem automatického určování sémantických vztahů mezi argumenty. Pozornost hodná slova v argumentech jsou klíčovými vodítky pro klasifikaci diskurzních vztahů. Mechanismy pozornosti byly prokázány jako účinné při zvýrazňování slov hodných pozornosti během kódování. Náš průzkum však ukazuje, že některá nedůležitá slova jsou neúmyslně špatně posuzována jako slova hodná pozornosti, a proto jsou přiřazena větší váhu pozornosti, než by měla být. Navrhujeme metodu přehodnocení ztráty založenou na sankcích, která reguluje proces učení pozornosti, začlenění penalty koeficientů do výpočtu ztráty pomocí nadměrné stability rozdělení hmotnosti pozornosti. Provádíme experimenty na korpusu Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Výsledky testů ukazují, že naše metoda přehodnocení ztrát vede k výraznému zlepšení různých mechanismů pozornosti a získává vysoce konkurenční výkon ve srovnání s nejmodernějšími metodami.', 'et': 'Tegeleme kaudsete diskursussuhete klassifitseerimisega, mis on ülesanne automaatselt määrata argumentide semantilised seosed. Argumentide tähelepanuväärsed sõnad on diskursussuhete klassifitseerimisel väga olulised vihjed. Tähelepanu mehhanismid on osutunud tõhusaks tähelepanuväärsete sõnade esiletõstmisel kodeerimisel. Meie uuring näitab siiski, et mõningaid ebaolulisi sõnu hinnatakse tahtmatult tähelepanuväärseteks sõnadeks ja seetõttu määratakse neile suuremad tähelepanu kaalud kui peaks olema. Pakume välja karistuspõhise kaotuse ümberhindamise meetodi tähelepanu õppeprotsessi reguleerimiseks, integreerides karistuskoefitsiendid kaotuse arvutamisesse tähelepanu kaalujaotuse ületatavuse abil. Me teeme katseid Penn Discourse TreeBanki (PDTB) korpusega. Katsetulemused näitavad, et meie kahju ümberhindamise meetod toob kaasa erinevate tähelepanumehhanismide olulisi parandusi ja saavutab võrreldes kaasaegsete meetoditega väga konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse.', 'fi': 'Käsittelemme implisiittistä diskurssisuhteiden luokittelua, joka on tehtävä määrittää automaattisesti argumenttien semanttiset suhteet. Huomiota herättävät sanat argumenteissa ovat ratkaisevia johtolankoja diskurssisuhteiden luokittelussa. Huomiomekanismit ovat osoittautuneet tehokkaiksi korostamaan huomionarvoisia sanoja koodauksen aikana. Kyselymme osoittaa kuitenkin, että jotkin tarpeettomat sanat arvioidaan tahattomasti väärin huomionarvoisiksi sanoiksi ja siksi niille annetaan suuremmat huomiopainot kuin pitäisi. Ehdotamme seuraamuspohjaista häviön uudelleenestimointimenetelmää tarkkaavaisuuden oppimisprosessin säätelyyn integroimalla rangaistuskertoimet häviön laskentaan huomiopainojakaumien ylitatavuuden avulla. Teemme kokeita Penn Discourse TreeBankin (PDTB) korpusella. Testitulokset osoittavat, että tappioiden uudelleenarviointimenetelmämme parantaa merkittävästi erilaisia huomiomekanismeja ja tuottaa erittäin kilpailukykyistä suorituskykyä uusimpiin menetelmiin verrattuna.', 'hy': 'We tackle implicit discourse relation classification, a task of automatically determining semantic relationships between arguments.  Ուշադրության արժանի բառերը բանավեճերում կարևոր հնարավորություններ են խոսակցության հարաբերությունների դասավորման համար: Ուշադրության մեխանիզմները արդյունավետ են ապացուցել ուշադրության արժանի բառերը նշելու համար կոդավորման ընթացքում: However, our survey shows that some inessential words are unintentionally misjudged as the attention-worthy words and, therefore, assigned heavier attention weights than should be.  We propose a penalty-based loss re-estimation method to regulate the attention learning process, integrating penalty coefficients into the computation of loss by means of overstability of attention weight distributions.  Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում Penn Discurse Tree Bank (PDTB) մարմնի վրա: Տեստի արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր կորստի վերագնահատման մեթոդը հանգեցնում է նշանակալի բարելավումներին ուշադրության բազմաթիվ մեխանիզմների համար, և այն հասնում է բարձր մրցակցության արդյունքների, համեմատած ամենաբարձր մեթոդ', 'az': 'Biz müəyyən söhbətlər barəsindəki ilişkiləri seçdik, argumentlərin arasındaki semantik ilişkiləri avtomatik təyin etmək üçün. Müzakirlərdə dikkat verilmiş sözlər sözləri sözlərin əlaqələrini dəyişdirmək üçün çox vacib iplərdir. Xəbərdarlıq mehanizmiləri kodlama sırasında növbənöv yazılmış sözləri işıqlandırmaq üçün etkilidir. Ancaq araştırmalarımız belə göstərir ki, bəzi təqsirli sözlərin gözləməyə layiq sözlər kimi haqsızlıq edilməz və buna görə də daha ağır düşüncə ağırlığı olması lazımdır. Biz cəzalandırılmış ziyanı yenidən hesablama metodumu təklif edirik ki, dikkati öyrənmə prosesini düzəltsin, cəzalandırılma koeficientlərini ziyanın hesablamasına çox yüklük dağıtması vasitəsilə birləşdirsin. Biz Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB) korpusu üzerində eksperimentlər etdik. Testlərin sonuçları bizim kaybımızın yenidən değerlendirmə metodumunun müxtəlif məlumatların məlumatlarına çox yaxşılıqlarını göstərdiyini göstərir və bu, sanat metodlarına qarşılaşdığı tərzdə çox müqayisəçi performans alır.', 'sk': 'Obravnavamo klasifikacijo implicitnih diskurznih relacij, nalogo avtomatičnega določanja semantičnih relacij med argumenti. Pozornost vredne besede v argumentih so ključni namigi za klasifikacijo diskurznih odnosov. Mehanizmi pozornosti so se izkazali za učinkovite pri poudarjanju pozornosti vrednih besed med kodiranjem. Vendar pa naša raziskava kaže, da so nekatere nepomembne besede nenamerno napačno ocenjene kot besede, vredne pozornosti, zato jim je dodeljena večja teža pozornosti, kot bi morala biti. Predlagamo metodo ponovne ocene izgub, ki temelji na kaznih, za uravnavanje procesa učenja pozornosti in vključevanje kazenskih koeficientov v izračun izgube s pomočjo prekomerne stabilnosti porazdelitve teže pozornosti. Izvajamo eksperimente na korpusu Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Rezultati testiranja kažejo, da naša metoda ponovne ocene izgub vodi do bistvenih izboljšav za različne mehanizme pozornosti in zagotavlja visoko konkurenčno uspešnost v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi metodami.', 'ha': "Tuna karɓi fasalin mazaɓa na cikin mazaɓa, da wani aikin kanana ana ƙayyade danganta masu mutane a tsakanin muhimmada. Babu saurãre da magana masu saurãre su ne muhimu ga su rarraba muhimmada. An jarraba saurãre masu amfani da wajen bayyana magana masu inganci a lokacin kodi. Haƙĩƙa, suriyayinmu yana nũna cewa, akwai wasu kalmõmi bakwai an jãhiltar da su kamar maganar masu inganci, kuma sabõda haka, ana yi nauyi da nauyi masu nauyi mafi kamata. Munã buɗa hanyor hasara da aka wajabta a bakin azãba dõmin a yi adadi ga aikin da za'a karanta, kuma mu haɗa masu da abincin azãba zuwa lissafa hasara dõmin kada za'a sami rabon nauyi. Munã samun jarrabãwa a kan tamkar Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB). Matarin jarrabai yana nũna cewa hanyoyinmu na ƙidãya na hasara yana ƙara wa mafariki ga masu mutane na masu tsari, kuma yana sami da aikin mai girma a sami da metoden-na-sanar.", 'he': 'We tackle implicit discourse relation classification, a task of automatically determining semantic relationships between arguments.  The attention-worthy words in arguments are crucial clues for classifying the discourse relations.  מכונות תשומת לב הוכחו יעילים בהדגישה של מילים ראויות לשימוע בזמן הקוד. בכל אופן, הסקר שלנו מראה כי כמה מילים איינסטנטיות לא שופטות בכוונה כמילים ראויות לשימוש לב ולכן, נותנים משקלי תשומת לב כבדים יותר ממה שצריך להיות. אנחנו מציעים שיטת הערכה מחדש של אובדן מבוססת על עונשים כדי לתקן את תהליך לימוד תשומת לב, לשתלב קופיקטיבי עונש לחישוב של אובדן באמצעות יציבות יתר מדי של פיצוי משקל תשומת לב. אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים על גופוס "פני דיסקורס בינק העץ" (PDTB). תוצאות הבדיקות מראות ששיטת הערכה מחדש של האובדן שלנו מובילה לשיפורים משמעותיים למגוון של מכונות תשומת לב, והיא מקבלת ביצועים תחרותיים ביותר בהשוואה לשיטות המיוחדות ביותר.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan kelas nang resmi ingkang kelas, task kang automaneh yen nggawe barang semantar Wurung-winih sing dikarepaké kelas ning spikeng iki dadi sing klêrung nggawe gerakan kelas karo perancis. Attribute Awak dhéwé, dipunangé awak dhéwé kuwi hal-hal pêrbe awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi mau, kuwi nggawe gerakan awak dhéwé, mengko awak dhéwé, sing uwis metu gak nggawe ngubah dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasai perbudhakan langgar-sistem sing gak nggawe nguasai perbudhakan winih, ingregan koeffisiyen penalty barang nggawe kalem budhakan karo perusahaan langgar-sistem sing berarti operasi tambah pentru deweke nggawe nguasai winih. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno cara-cara nang pennan Deltoke Stasi (PNT B). Mehikan perusahaan langkung wigatining sistem sing gak nggawe nguasai perusahaan karo hal-hal kanggo ngerasai winih sing kalagayut nggawe nguasai perusahaan sampeyan karo hal sampeyan kanggo ngelarang langkung sampeyan.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དཔེ་རིགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གསལ་བཤད་དང་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག སྒྲུབ་བརྗོད་ནང་དུ་གནད་དོན་དགོས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཚིག་དག་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཚོགས་ཁག་ཆེན་ཡིན། བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཉེན་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དུ་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་རྟགས་ཉེན་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ཚར། ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྗོད་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་མེད་དུ་བ We propose a penalty-based loss re-estimation method to regulate the attention learning process, integrating penalty coefficients into the computation of loss by means of overstability of attention weight distributions. ང་ཚོས་Penn Discourse TreeBank (PDTB)ཡི་སྒེར་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྟངས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཚད་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་བསྐྱར་རྩལ་བཟོ་བ་སྐྱེན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལས་ཕར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Knowledge Graph Embedding with Atrous Convolution and Residual Learning', 'pt': 'Incorporação de Gráfico de Conhecimento com Convolução Atrous e Aprendizagem Residual', 'ar': 'تضمين الرسم البياني المعرفي مع الالتواء الأذيني والتعلم المتبقي', 'es': 'Incorporación de gráficos de conocimiento con convolución atroz y aprendizaje residual', 'fr': 'Intégration de graphes de connaissances avec convolution atrous et apprentissage résiduel', 'zh': '有 Atrous 卷积残差学图谱嵌', 'ja': 'アトロス畳み込みと残留学習による知識グラフの埋め込み', 'hi': 'Atrous Convolution और अवशिष्ट अधिगम के साथ ज्ञान ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'График знаний, внедряемый с помощью атрофической свертки и остаточного обучения', 'ga': 'Grafa Eolais a Leabú le Ramhracht Uafásach agus le Foghlaim Iarmhar', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Tudásgraf beágyazása borzalmas konvolícióval és maradéktalan tanulással', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση γραφήματος Γνώσης με Ατυχή Σύγκλιση και Υπολείπουσα Μάθηση', 'kk': 'Білім графикалық атрондық құрылғы мен қалдық оқыту', 'it': "Incorporare il grafico della conoscenza con l'Atrous Convolution e l'apprendimento residuo", 'lt': 'Žinių grafikas Įtrauktas į atmosferos konvoliuciją ir likutinį mokymąsi', 'mk': 'Вклучување на график со знаење со глупава конволуција и преостанато учење', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Grafika ta’ l-Għarfien Inkorporazzjoni b’Konveoluzzjoni Atrata u Tagħlim Residwu', 'ml': 'അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് എംബെഡിങ്ങ് ആറ്റ്രൂസ് കണക്ഷനും വീണ്ടും പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг график Атрус Хүмүүс болон Үлдсэн Сургууль', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Încorporarea graficului cunoștințelor cu convoluția Atroasă și învățarea reziduală', 'pl': 'Wbudowanie wykresu wiedzy z Atrous Convolution i Resdual Learning', 'sr': 'Znanstveni grafik uključen sa atomskom konvolucijom i ostatkom učenja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qoraalka aqoonta ee la xiriira qorsheynta iyo cilmiga', 'sv': 'Kunskapsgraf Inbäddning med förtjusande konvulution och återstående lärande', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு வரைப்படம் அணுகு தொகுப்பு மற்றும் மீண்டும் கற்றுக்கொண்டுள்ளது', 'ur': 'علم Graph Embedding with Atrous Convolution and Residual Learning', 'uz': 'Knowledge Graph Embedding with Atrous Convolution and Residual Learning', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Графика на знанието Вградяване с неприятна конвелуция и остатъчно обучение', 'nl': 'Knowledge Graph Embedden met Atrous Convolution en Residual Learning', 'da': 'Vidensgraf Embedding med forfærdelig konvulution og resterende læring', 'hr': 'Znanstveni grafik uključen s Atrous konvolucijom i ostatkom učenja', 'de': 'Knowledge Graph Embedding mit Atrous Convolution und Residual Learning', 'id': 'Graf Pengetahuan Membentuk Dengan Konvelusi Menakjubkan dan Belajar Tersisa', 'fa': 'گراف دانش با تولید آتروس و یادگیری باقی مانده', 'ko': 'atrus 볼륨과 잔차 학습에 기반한 지식 그래프 삽입', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya maarifa inapanda na Tamko la Atrous na Elimu ya Marufuku', 'tr': 'Atrous Jemi we Täze Öwrenmek bilen Grafik', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Grafi i njohurive përfshirë me konvolucion të tmerrshëm dhe mësim të mbetur', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Atrous Convolution v…ô Kalib √ñyr…ônm…ôsi il…ô Bil…ôn Grafik', 'hy': 'Գիտության գրաֆիկ, որը ներգրավված է հիանալի հակադարձման և մնացած սովորելու միջոցով', 'bn': 'বিজ্ঞান গ্রাফ আটরুস কনভোলেশন এবং পুনরায় শিক্ষা সহযোগিতা', 'bs': 'Znanstveni grafik uključen sa atomskim konvolucijom i ostatkom učenja', 'cs': 'Vkládání znalostních grafů s Atrous Convolution a zbytkovým učením', 'ca': "Gràfic del coneixement incorporat amb la convolució atractiva i l'aprenentatge residual", 'et': 'Teadmisgraafik põimimine hirmsa konvolutsiooni ja jääkõppega', 'fi': 'Knowledge Graph Upoutuminen hirvittävään konvoluutioon ja jäljellä olevaan oppimiseen', 'sk': 'Graf znanja Vključevanje v grozno konvolucijo in preostalo učenje', 'jv': 'Bilih Graph Sumber karo Atrous Konvolution lan Residual Learning', 'he': 'גרף ידע מוקף עם שינוי אטרוסי וללמוד שארית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Atrous Convolution and Residual Learning'}
{'en': 'Knowledge graph embedding is an important task and it will benefit lots of downstream applications. Currently, deep neural networks based methods achieve state-of-the-art performance. However, most of these existing methods are very complex and need much time for training and inference. To address this issue, we propose a simple but effective atrous convolution based knowledge graph embedding method. Compared with existing state-of-the-art methods, our method has following main characteristics. First, it effectively increases feature interactions by using atrous convolutions. Second, to address the original information forgotten issue and vanishing / exploding gradient issue, it uses the residual learning method. Third, it has simpler structure but much higher parameter efficiency. We evaluate our method on six benchmark datasets with different evaluation metrics. Extensive experiments show that our model is very effective. On these diverse datasets, it achieves better results than the compared state-of-the-art methods on most of evaluation metrics. The source codes of our model could be found at https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'es': 'La incorporación de gráficos de conocimiento es una tarea importante y beneficiará a muchas aplicaciones posteriores. Actualmente, los métodos basados en redes neuronales profundas alcanzan un rendimiento de vanguardia. Sin embargo, la mayoría de estos métodos existentes son muy complejos y requieren mucho tiempo para el entrenamiento y la inferencia. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un método simple pero efectivo de incrustación de gráficos de conocimiento basado en convoluciones atroces. En comparación con los métodos de última generación existentes, nuestro método tiene las siguientes características principales. En primer lugar, aumenta eficazmente las interacciones de las características mediante el uso de circunvoluciones atroces. En segundo lugar, para abordar el problema del olvido de la información original y el problema del gradiente de desvanecimiento/explosión, utiliza el método de aprendizaje residual. En tercer lugar, tiene una estructura más simple pero una eficiencia de parámetros mucho mayor. Evaluamos nuestro método en seis conjuntos de datos de referencia con diferentes métricas de evaluación. Experimentos exhaustivos demuestran que nuestro modelo es muy eficaz. En estos conjuntos de datos diversos, logra mejores resultados que los métodos más avanzados comparados en la mayoría de las métricas de evaluación. Los códigos fuente de nuestro modelo se pueden encontrar en https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ar': 'يعد تضمين الرسم البياني المعرفي مهمة مهمة وسوف يفيد الكثير من التطبيقات النهائية. حاليًا ، تحقق الأساليب القائمة على الشبكات العصبية العميقة أداءً متطورًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم هذه الأساليب الحالية معقدة للغاية وتحتاج إلى الكثير من الوقت للتدريب والاستدلال. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح طريقة تضمين الرسم البياني المعرفي البسيط والفعال القائم على الالتفاف الأذيني. بالمقارنة مع أحدث الأساليب الحالية ، فإن طريقتنا لها الخصائص الرئيسية التالية. أولاً ، يزيد بشكل فعال من تفاعلات الميزات باستخدام التلافيف الأذينية. ثانيًا ، لمعالجة مشكلة المعلومات الأصلية المنسية وقضية التدرج اللوني التلاشي / المتفجر ، فإنه يستخدم طريقة التعلم المتبقية. ثالثًا ، لديها هيكل أبسط ولكن كفاءة معلمة أعلى بكثير. نقوم بتقييم طريقتنا على ست مجموعات بيانات معيارية بمقاييس تقييم مختلفة. تظهر التجارب المكثفة أن نموذجنا فعال للغاية. في مجموعات البيانات المتنوعة هذه ، تحقق نتائج أفضل من الأساليب الحديثة المقارنة في معظم مقاييس التقييم. يمكن العثور على أكواد المصدر الخاصة بنموذجنا على https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'fr': "L'intégration de graphes de connaissances est une tâche importante qui bénéficiera à de nombreuses applications en aval. Actuellement, les méthodes basées sur les réseaux de neurones profonds atteignent des performances de pointe Cependant, la plupart de ces méthodes existantes sont très complexes et nécessitent beaucoup de temps pour la formation et l'inférence. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons une méthode d'intégration de graphes de connaissances basée sur la convolution atrous simple mais efficace. Comparée aux méthodes de pointe existantes, notre méthode présente les principales caractéristiques suivantes. Tout d'abord, il augmente efficacement les interactions entre les entités en utilisant des circonvolutions atroces. Deuxièmement, pour résoudre le problème d'oubli d'informations d'origine et de disparition ou d'explosion du gradient, il utilise la méthode d'apprentissage résiduelle. Troisièmement, il a une structure plus simple mais une efficacité des paramètres beaucoup plus élevée. Nous évaluons notre méthode sur six ensembles de données de référence avec différentes mesures d'évaluation. Des expériences approfondies montrent que notre modèle est très efficace. Sur ces divers ensembles de données, il obtient de meilleurs résultats que les méthodes de pointe comparées pour la plupart des métriques d'évaluation. Les codes sources de notre modèle peuvent être consultés à l'adresse https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'pt': 'A incorporação de gráficos de conhecimento é uma tarefa importante e beneficiará muitos aplicativos downstream. Atualmente, os métodos baseados em redes neurais profundas alcançam desempenho de última geração. No entanto, a maioria desses métodos existentes são muito complexos e precisam de muito tempo para treinamento e inferência. Para resolver esse problema, propomos um método de incorporação de grafos de conhecimento baseado em convolução simples, mas eficaz. Comparado com os métodos existentes de última geração, nosso método tem as seguintes características principais. Primeiro, ele aumenta efetivamente as interações de recursos usando convoluções atrosas. Em segundo lugar, para resolver o problema da informação original esquecida e o problema do gradiente de fuga/explosão, ele usa o método de aprendizado residual. Terceiro, tem uma estrutura mais simples, mas uma eficiência de parâmetro muito maior. Avaliamos nosso método em seis conjuntos de dados de referência com diferentes métricas de avaliação. Extensos experimentos mostram que nosso modelo é muito eficaz. Nesses diversos conjuntos de dados, ele alcança melhores resultados do que os métodos de última geração comparados na maioria das métricas de avaliação. Os códigos-fonte do nosso modelo podem ser encontrados em https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ja': 'ナレッジグラフの埋め込みは重要なタスクであり、多くのダウンストリームアプリケーションにメリットがあります。 現在、ディープニューラルネットワークに基づく手法は、最先端のパフォーマンスを実現している。 しかし、これらの既存の方法のほとんどは非常に複雑であり、訓練と推論に多くの時間を必要とする。 この問題に対処するために、単純でありながら効果的なアトラス畳み込みベースの知識グラフ埋め込み法を提案します。 既存の最先端の方法と比較して、当社の方法には以下の主な特徴があります。 まず、アトロス畳み込みを使用することで、特徴の相互作用を効果的に増大させます。 第二に、忘れ去られた元の情報の問題と消失/爆発する勾配の問題に対処するために、残留学習法を使用する。 第三に、構造は単純であるが、パラメータ効率ははるかに高い。 私たちは、異なる評価指標を持つ6つのベンチマークデータセットで方法を評価します。 広範囲にわたる実験では私たちのモデルは非常に効果的であることが示されています これらの多様なデータセットでは、ほとんどの評価指標で最先端の方法と比較してより良い結果を達成します。 当社のモデルのソースコードは、https://github.com/neukg/AcrEで見つけることができます。', 'zh': '知图谱嵌为重务,将利下流应用程序。 方今深度神经网络之道,先进之性也。 然其见法多非常复杂,须费日月以习理之。 凡此诸事,略而有效者,卷积之图谱也。 与今之先进,吾道有以下。 先之,其用卷积有效而加之。 其次,以息遗忘/爆梯度,用残差学法。 其三曰,其有约结,参数效率其高也。 我有不同评估指标六准数集上估我之法。 博实验之明,其形甚效。 凡此诸集上,其於大较指标最先进者也。 吾道之源代码可得于 https://github.com/neukg/AcrE。', 'hi': 'नॉलेज ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है और यह डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोगों के बहुत सारे लाभ होगा। वर्तमान में, गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आधारित तरीके अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं। हालांकि, इनमें से अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीके बहुत जटिल हैं और प्रशिक्षण और अनुमान के लिए बहुत समय की आवश्यकता होती है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम एक सरल लेकिन प्रभावी atrous convolution आधारित ज्ञान ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग विधि का प्रस्ताव है। मौजूदा अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में, हमारी विधि में निम्नलिखित मुख्य विशेषताएं हैं। सबसे पहले, यह प्रभावी रूप से atrous convolutions का उपयोग करके सुविधा इंटरैक्शन बढ़ाता है। दूसरा, मूल जानकारी भूल गए मुद्दे को संबोधित करने और गायब होने / विस्फोट ग्रेडिएंट मुद्दे को संबोधित करने के लिए, यह अवशिष्ट सीखने की विधि का उपयोग करता है। तीसरा, इसमें सरल संरचना है लेकिन बहुत अधिक पैरामीटर दक्षता है। हम विभिन्न मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक के साथ छह बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर हमारी विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल बहुत प्रभावी है। इन विविध डेटासेट पर, यह अधिकांश मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक पर तुलनात्मक अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करता है। हमारे मॉडल के स्रोत कोड https://github.com/neukg/AcrE पर पाया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Встраивание графа знаний является важной задачей, и это принесет пользу многим последующим приложениям. В настоящее время методы, основанные на глубоких нейронных сетях, достигают самой современной производительности. Однако большинство из этих существующих методов являются очень сложными и требуют много времени для обучения и вывода. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем простой, но эффективный метод встраивания графа знаний на основе атрофической свертки. По сравнению с существующими современными методами наш метод имеет следующие основные характеристики. Во-первых, он эффективно увеличивает взаимодействие признаков, используя атрофические скручивания. Во-вторых, для решения проблемы забытой первоначальной информации и проблемы исчезновения/взрыва градиента используется метод остаточного обучения. В-третьих, она имеет более простую структуру, но гораздо более высокую эффективность параметра. Мы оцениваем наш метод на шести эталонных наборах данных с различными оценочными показателями. Обширные эксперименты показывают, что наша модель очень эффективна. На этих разнообразных наборах данных он достигает лучших результатов, чем сравниваемые современные методы по большинству оценочных показателей. Исходные коды нашей модели можно найти по адресу https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach é leabú graf eolais agus rachaidh sé chun tairbhe go leor feidhmchlár iartheachtacha. Faoi láthair, baintear feidhmíocht úrscothach amach trí mhodhanna atá bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha doimhne. Mar sin féin, tá an chuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann cheana an-chasta agus teastaíonn go leor ama le haghaidh oiliúna agus tátail. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid modh leabú graf eolais bunaithe ar achrann atá simplí ach go huafásach. I gcomparáid leis na modhanna nua-aimseartha atá ann cheana féin, tá na príomh-shaintréithe seo a leanas ag ár modh. Ar dtús, méadaíonn sé idirghníomhaíochtaí gné go héifeachtach trí úsáid a bhaint as convolutions atrous. Ar an dara dul síos, chun dul i ngleic leis an tsaincheist a ndearnadh dearmad ar fhaisnéis bhunaidh agus ar cheist an ghrádáin atá ag imeacht/ag pléascadh, úsáideann sé an modh foghlama iarmharach. Sa tríú háit, tá struchtúr níos simplí aige ach tá éifeachtacht pharaiméadar i bhfad níos airde. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár modh ar shé thacar sonraí tagarmharcála le méadrachtaí meastóireachta éagsúla. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing go bhfuil ár múnla an-éifeachtach. Ar na tacair sonraí éagsúla seo, baineann sé torthaí níos fearr amach ná na modhanna comparáideacha úrscothacha ar fhormhór na méadrachta meastóireachta. Tá cóid foinse ár múnla le fáil ag https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'el': 'Η ενσωμάτωση γραφήματος γνώσης είναι μια σημαντική εργασία και θα ωφελήσει πολλές μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές. Επί του παρόντος, οι μέθοδοι με βάση τα βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα επιτυγχάνουν επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες από αυτές τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους είναι πολύ περίπλοκες και χρειάζονται πολύ χρόνο για εκπαίδευση και συμπεράσματα. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο ενσωμάτωσης γραφήματος γνώσης βασισμένη σε φρικτή σύγχυση. Σε σύγκριση με τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, η μέθοδος μας έχει τα ακόλουθα κύρια χαρακτηριστικά. Πρώτον, αυξάνει αποτελεσματικά τις αλληλεπιδράσεις χαρακτηριστικών με τη χρήση φρικτών διαστάσεων. Δεύτερον, για να αντιμετωπιστεί το αρχικό ζήτημα των πληροφοριών που ξεχάστηκαν και το ζήτημα της εξαφάνισης/έκρηξης της διαβάθμισης, χρησιμοποιεί τη μέθοδο απομεινόμενης μάθησης. Τρίτον, έχει απλούστερη δομή αλλά πολύ υψηλότερη αποδοτικότητα παραμέτρων. Αξιολογούμε τη μέθοδο μας σε έξι σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς με διαφορετικές μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι πολύ αποτελεσματικό. Σε αυτά τα διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων, επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από τις συγκριτικές μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στις περισσότερες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης. Οι πηγαίοι κωδικοί του μοντέλου μας μπορούν να βρεθούν στο https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ka': 'Name მიმდინარე, ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელების გარეშე მეტოვები გავაკეთებს სახელსაწყისი კეთესტაციას. მაგრამ, უფრო მეტი აქვს მეტი ძალიან კომპლექსია და უნდა მნიშვნელოვანი დრო განსწავლებისთვის და ინფრენციისთვის. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტილებისთვის, ჩვენ უფრო მაგრამ ეფექტიური კონტულუციის გადაწყვეტილი ცნობიერების გრაფიკის გადაწყვეტილების მეტი ჩვენი პროცემის გარეშე მდგომარეობით სურათების მეტისთან შემდგომარებულია. პირველად, ეს ეფექტიურად უფრო მეტადებს ფუნქციების ინტერფექციების გამოყენებით ძალიან კონგულუციების გამოყენებით. მეორე, საშუალო ინფორმაციის გადარჩენისთვის დავიწყებული პრობლემა და გადარჩენისთვის/ვკოლპოდირების პრობლემა, ის გამოყენება დარჩენის მეტი მესამე, ეს უფრო მარტივია სტრუქტურა, მაგრამ უფრო მეტი პარამეტრის ეფექტიურობა. ჩვენ ჩვენი მეთოდის 6 ბენქმარკის მონაცემების შესახებ განსხვავებული მონაცემების მეტრიკით გავამუშავებთ. ჩვენი მოდელი ძალიან ეფექციურია. ამ განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შესახებ უფრო მეტრიკის შემდგომარებით უკეთესი შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელის მხოლოდ კოდეები იქნება https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'hu': 'A tudásgrafok beágyazása fontos feladat, és sok downstream alkalmazás előnyére lesz szükség. Jelenleg a mély neurális hálózatokon alapuló módszerek korszerű teljesítményt érnek el. A legtöbb meglévő módszer azonban nagyon összetett, és sok időt igényel a képzéshez és a következtetéshez. Ennek a kérdésnek a megoldásához egy egyszerű, de hatékony atrous convolution alapú tudásgráf beágyazási módszert javasolunk. A meglévő korszerű módszerekkel összehasonlítva módszerünk a következő fő jellemzőkkel rendelkezik. Először is hatékonyan növeli a funkciók kölcsönhatását az atroce görbületek használatával. Másodszor, az eredeti, elfelejtett információs probléma és az eltűnő/felrobbanó gradiens probléma kezelésére a maradék tanulási módszert használja. Harmadszor, egyszerűbb szerkezete van, de sokkal nagyobb paraméter hatékonysága. Módszerünket hat benchmark adatkészleten értékeljük, különböző értékelési mutatókkal. A kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a modellünk nagyon hatékony. Ezeken a különböző adatkészleteken jobb eredményeket ér el, mint az összehasonlított legkorszerűbb módszerek a legtöbb értékelési mutatónál. A modellünk forráskódja a következő oldalon található: https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'lt': 'Knowledge graph embedding is an important task and it will benefit lots of downstream applications.  Šiuo metu giliųjų nervų tinklų metodai užtikrina pažangiausius rezultatus. Tačiau dauguma šių esamų metodų yra labai sudėtingi ir jiems reikia daug laiko mokymui ir išvadoms. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome paprastą, bet veiksmingą, žiauriai konvoliucijai pagrįstą žinių grafikos įterpimo metodą. Palyginti su esamais naujausiais metodais, mūsų metodas turi šias pagrindines charakteristikas. Pirma, jis veiksmingai didina savybių sąveiką naudojant atrozines konvoliucijas. Antra, norint išspręsti pradinę pamirštą informaciją ir išnykti ir (arba) sprogti gradientus, ji naudoja likutinio mokymosi metodą. Trečia, ji turi paprastesnę struktūrą, tačiau daug didesnį parametrų veiksmingumą. Vertiname savo metodą pagal šešis lyginamuosius duomenų rinkinius su skirtingais vertinimo rodikliais. Išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų model is yra labai veiksmingas. Šių įvairių duomenų rinkinių rezultatai yra geresni nei palyginti naujausi metodai daugumos vertinimo metrijų atžvilgiu. Mūsų modelio šaltiniai gali būti rasti https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'kk': 'Мәлімет графикасын ендіру - маңызды тапсырма және оның көптеген бағытталған қолданбаларының пайдасы болады. Қазіргі уақытта, негіздеген невралдық желілер әдістерін орындайды. Бірақ бұл әдістердің көпшілігі өте комплекс және оқыту және бақылау үшін көп уақыт керек. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін біз қарапайым, бірақ әсер ететін білім графикасын ендіру әдісін ұсынамыз. Мынау әдістер күйінде салыстырылған, әдіміздің негізгі қасиеттеріміз келеді. Біріншіден, бұл қиындықтарды қолдану арқылы мүмкіндіктерді көтереді. Екіншіден, бастапқы мәліметтің ұмытылған мәселесін шешу және жоғалу/үйрену градиенттің мәселесін шешу үшін қалдық оқыту әдісін қолданады. Үшіншіден, оның қарапайым құрылымы бар, бірақ параметрлердің ең көп эффективнігі бар. Біз әдімімізді алты банкмарк деректер жиындарына түрлі мәтірлердің метрикаларына тең етеміз. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер моделіміздің өте эффективті көрсетеді. Бұл әртүрлі деректер қорларында, ол метрикалық метрикалық көпшілігінде салыстырылған әртүрлі әдістерден жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізеді. Моделіміздің көзі кодтары https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'it': "L'incorporazione di grafici di conoscenza è un compito importante e avvantaggerà molte applicazioni a valle. Attualmente, i metodi basati su reti neurali profonde raggiungono prestazioni all'avanguardia. Tuttavia, la maggior parte di questi metodi esistenti sono molto complessi e richiedono molto tempo per la formazione e l'inferenza. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un metodo semplice ma efficace di incorporazione del grafico della conoscenza basato sulla convoluzione atrosa. Rispetto ai metodi esistenti allo stato dell'arte, il nostro metodo ha le seguenti caratteristiche principali. In primo luogo, aumenta efficacemente le interazioni delle caratteristiche utilizzando convoluzioni atroci. In secondo luogo, per affrontare il problema dimenticato delle informazioni originali e il problema del gradiente che scompare / esplode, utilizza il metodo di apprendimento residuo. In terzo luogo, ha una struttura più semplice ma molto più alta efficienza dei parametri. Valutiamo il nostro metodo su sei set di dati benchmark con diverse metriche di valutazione. Esperimenti approfonditi dimostrano che il nostro modello è molto efficace. Su questi diversi set di dati, ottiene risultati migliori rispetto ai metodi all'avanguardia confrontati sulla maggior parte delle metriche di valutazione. I codici sorgente del nostro modello possono essere trovati a https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'mk': 'Вклучувањето на знање график е важна задача и ќе има корист од многу понатамошни апликации. Моментално, методите базирани на длабоките нервни мрежи достигнуваат најсовремени резултати. Сепак, повеќето од овие постоечки методи се многу комплексни и им треба многу време за обука и конференција. За да го решиме ова прашање, предлагаме едноставен, но ефикасен метод за вградување на график на знаење базиран на злобна конволуција. Во споредба со постојните најнови методи, нашиот метод има главни карактеристики. Прво, ефективно ги зголемува интеракциите со карактеристики со користење на атрузни конволуции. Второ, за да се реши оригиналното заборавено прашање на информациите и проблемот со исчезнувањето/експлодирањето на градиентите, тој го користи методот на остаток на учење. Трето, има поедноставна структура, но многу повисока ефикасност на параметрите. Го проценуваме нашиот метод на шест бази на податоци со различни метрики на проценка. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот модел е многу ефикасен. На овие различни податоци, таа постигнува подобри резултати од споредените најсовремени методи на повеќето метрики на проценка. Изворните кодови на нашиот модел може да се најдат на https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran graf pengetahuan adalah tugas penting dan ia akan berguna banyak aplikasi turun. Semasa ini, kaedah berdasarkan rangkaian saraf dalam mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art. Namun, kebanyakan kaedah yang ada ini sangat kompleks dan memerlukan banyak masa untuk latihan dan kesimpulan. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan satu kaedah pemindahan grafik pengetahuan yang berdasarkan konvolusi yang mudah tapi efektif. Berbanding dengan kaedah yang ada, kaedah kita mempunyai karakteristik utama. Pertama, ia meningkatkan interaksi ciri-ciri dengan menggunakan konvolusi atros. Kedua, untuk mengatasi isu maklumat asal yang terlupa dan isu gradien menghilang/meletup, ia menggunakan kaedah pembelajaran yang tersisa. Ketiga, ia mempunyai struktur yang lebih mudah tetapi lebih tinggi efisiensi parameter. Kami menilai kaedah kami pada enam set data benchmark dengan metrik penilaian yang berbeza. Eksperimen luas menunjukkan bahawa model kita sangat efektif. Pada set data yang berbeza ini, ia mencapai keputusan yang lebih baik daripada kaedah terbaik dibandingkan pada kebanyakan metrik penilaian. Kod sumber model kita boleh ditemui di https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ് എപ്പോഡിങ്ങ് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ജോലി തന്നെയാണ് അതിന് ഒരുപാട് താഴ്ന്ന പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d  ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ അവസ് എന്നാലും, ഈ നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളില്\u200d അധികപേരും വളരെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമാണ്. പരിശീലനത്തിനും അപകടത്തിനും ഒരുപാട് സമയം ആവശ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ, പക്ഷെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ക്രൂപ്പ് വ നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയുടെ രീതികളോട് തുല്യമാക്കി നമ്മുടെ രീതി ആദ്യം, അത് പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിശ്വാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. രണ്ടാമത്, മൂല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മറന്നുപോയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കാര്യത്തിലേക്ക് വിശദീകരിക്കാനും ഗ്രാഡേഡിയന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം കാണാന മൂന്നാമത്, അതിന് എളുപ്പമുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമുണ്ട്, പക്ഷെ അതില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പാരാമീറ്ററിന്\u200dറെ ഫലവും. We evaluate our method on six benchmark datasets with different evaluation metrics.  വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വളരെ പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തമാണെന്ന്. ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d, ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച മെറ്റിക്കങ്ങളില്\u200d താല്\u200dപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്ഥിതിയെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d അത നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ ഉറവിട കോഡുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'mt': "L-inkorporazzjoni tal-grafika tal-għarfien hija kompitu importanti u se tibbenefika minn ħafna applikazzjonijiet downstream. Bħalissa, metodi bbażati fuq netwerks newrali profondi jiksbu prestazzjoni avvanzata. Madankollu, ħafna minn dawn il-metodi eżistenti huma kumplessi ħafna u jeħtieġu ħafna żmien għat-taħriġ u l-inferenza. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu metodu sempliċi iżda effettiv ta' inkorporazzjoni tal-grafika tal-għarfien ibbażata fuq konvoluzzjoni atroża. Meta mqabbel mal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati eżistenti, il-metodu tagħna għandu l-karatteristiċi ewlenin li ġejjin. L-ewwel nett, iżid b’mod effettiv l-interazzjonijiet karatteristiċi billi juża konvoluzzjonijiet atrożi. Second, to address the original information forgotten issue and vanishing/exploding gradient issue, it uses the residual learning method.  Third, it has simpler structure but much higher parameter efficiency.  Aħna jevalwaw il-metodu tagħna fuq sitt settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza b’metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni differenti. Esperimenti estensivi juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa effettiv ħafna. Fuq dawn is-settijiet differenti ta’ dejta, tikseb riżultati aħjar mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati mqabbla fuq il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni. Il-kodiċijiet tas-sors tal-mudell tagħna jistgħu jinstabu fuq https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн график бүрдүүлэх нь чухал ажил юм. Энэ нь маш олон доорх хэрэглэгчид ашиглах болно. Уг үед мэдрэлийн сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээнд суурилсан аргыг урлагийн үйл ажиллагаанд хүргэж чадна. Гэхдээ эдгээр оршиж буй арга замын ихэнх нь маш нарийн бөгөөд сургалтын болон халдварын тулд их цаг хэрэгтэй. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид энгийн гэхдээ үр дүнтэй мэдлэгтэй график бий болгох аргыг санал болгоно. Бидний арга нь үндсэн чадвартай харьцуулсан. Эхлээд, энэ нь гайхалтай холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Хоёрт, эхний мэдээллийг мартагдсан асуудлын тухай бодохын тулд энэ нь үлдсэн суралцах аргыг ашигладаг. Гурав дахь, энэ нь илүү энгийн бүтэц, гэхдээ илүү өндөр параметр үр дүнтэй. Бид өөр дүгнэлтийн метрийг 6 банкмарк өгөгдлийн сан дээр дүгнэж байна. Дөрвөн туршилтууд бидний загвар маш үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ олон төрлийн өгөгдлийн сангуудын тухай энэ нь олон төрлийн метриктикийн харьцуулахаас илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргадаг. Бидний загварын эх үүсвэрийн код нь https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'sr': 'Zaključavanje znanja grafika je važan zadatak i koristit će mnogo prijava. Trenutno, duboke neuralne mreže bazirane metode ostvaruju stanje umjetnosti. Međutim, većina ovih postojećih metoda su veoma kompleksni i treba mnogo vremena za obuku i infekciju. Da bi se riješili ovom pitanju, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu ugrađivanja znanja na osnovu užasne konvolucije. U usporedbi sa postojećim metodama umjetnosti, naša metoda prati glavne karakteristike. Prvo, to povećava interakcije karakteristika koristeći užasne konvolucije. Drugo, za rješavanje originalnih informacija koja su zaboravljena pitanja i nestala/eksplodirala pitanja gradienta, koristi ostatak metode učenja. Treće, ima jednostavniju strukturu, ali mnogo više efikasnosti parametara. Procjenjujemo našu metodu na šest baznih podataka sa različitim procjenama metrika. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš model vrlo efikasan. Na ovim različitim podacima postiže bolji rezultat od uspoređenih metoda stanja umjetnosti na većini procjene metrika. Izvorni kodovi našeg modela su pronađeni na https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'pl': 'Integrowanie wykresu wiedzy jest ważnym zadaniem i przyniesie korzyści wielu dalszych aplikacji. Obecnie metody oparte na głębokich sieciach neuronowych osiągają najnowocześniejszą wydajność. Jednak większość z tych istniejących metod jest bardzo skomplikowana i wymaga dużo czasu na szkolenie i wnioski. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy prostą, ale skuteczną metodę osadzania wykresów wiedzy opartą na okrutnych konwolucjach. W porównaniu z istniejącymi najnowocześniejszymi metodami nasza metoda ma następujące główne cechy. Po pierwsze, skutecznie zwiększa interakcje funkcji poprzez użycie okrutnych złączeń. Po drugie, aby rozwiązać oryginalny problem zapomnianych informacji i problem zanikającego/eksplodującego gradientu, wykorzystuje metodę nauki resztkowej. Po trzecie, ma prostszą strukturę, ale znacznie wyższą wydajność parametrów. Naszą metodę oceniamy na sześciu zestawach danych referencyjnych o różnych wskaźnikach oceny. Obszerne eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz model jest bardzo skuteczny. Na tych zróżnicowanych zbiorach danych osiąga lepsze wyniki niż porównywane najnowocześniejsze metody w większości wskaźników oceny. Kody źródłowe naszego modelu można znaleźć pod adresem: https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ro': 'Integrarea graficului cunoștințelor este o sarcină importantă și va beneficia de o mulțime de aplicații din aval. În prezent, metodele bazate pe rețele neuronale profunde ating performanțe de ultimă generație. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea acestor metode existente sunt foarte complexe și necesită mult timp pentru formare și deducție. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem o metodă simplă, dar eficientă de integrare a graficului cunoștințelor bazată pe convoluție atroasă. Comparativ cu metodele de ultimă generație existente, metoda noastră are următoarele caracteristici principale. În primul rând, crește eficient interacțiunile caracteristicilor prin utilizarea convoluțiilor atroce. În al doilea rând, pentru a aborda problema uitată a informațiilor originale și problema gradientului care dispare / explodează, utilizează metoda de învățare reziduală. În al treilea rând, are o structură mai simplă, dar o eficiență mult mai mare a parametrilor. Evaluăm metoda noastră pe șase seturi de date de referință cu valori diferite de evaluare. Experimente ample arată că modelul nostru este foarte eficient. Pe aceste seturi de date diverse, obține rezultate mai bune decât metodele de ultimă oră comparate pe majoritatea măsurătorilor de evaluare. Codurile sursă ale modelului nostru pot fi găsite la https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'no': 'Innebygging av kjennomsnittgrafen er ein viktig oppgåve og vil bruka mange nedstrekkprogram. I dag, dype neuralnettverk baserte metodar har tilstand til kunsthandlinga. Dei fleste av desse eksisterande metodane er imidlertid svært komplekse og treng mykje tid for trening og infeksjon. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi ein enkel, men effektiv innbyggingsmetode for innbygging av kjennomsnittgraf basert på konvolusjon. Sammenlignet med eksisterande metodar for kunsten har vårt metode følgjande hovudkarakteristikk. Først øker det effektivt funksjonsinteraksjonar ved å bruka vanskeleg konvolusjonar. To andre, for å handtera opprinnelege informasjonen glemte problemet og vanskeleg/eksplodering av fargeovergangspunktet, brukar den gjeldande læringsmetoden. Tredje har det enklare strukturen, men mykje høgare effektivitet for parametrar. Vi evaluerer metoden vårt på seks benchmarkdatasett med ulike evalueringsmetrikar. Ekstra eksperimenter viser at modellen vår er veldig effektiv. På desse forskjellige datasettene oppnår det bedre resultat enn sammenligningsmetoden for kunsten på dei fleste av evalueringsmetrikar. Klarte ikkje finna kjeldekodane til modellen vår på https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'so': "Qoraalka aqoontu waa shaqo muhiim ah, waxayna faa’iido u yeelan kartaa codsiyada hoose-hoose. Hada la joogo, shabakada neurada ee aad u dheer waxay gaadhaan bandhigyada farshaxanka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee hababkan badankoodu waa dhib adag, oo waxay u baahan yihiin waqti aad u badan waxbarasho iyo cudur la’aanta. To address this issue, we propose a simple but effective atrous convolution based knowledge graph embedding method.  Isbarbarbardhig oo ku qoran qaababka farshaxanta, qaabkanagu waxay leedahay takhasusyo muhiim ah. Marka ugu horeysa, waxay si faa’iido ah u kordhisaa iskaashatada waxyaabaha leh isticmaalka dhibaatooyin baas ah. Second, in la macaamiloodo arrimaha asalka ah ee la illoobay iyo in la lumiyo/dillaaciyo dhibaatada gradient, wuxuu isticmaalaa qaababka waxbarashada ee hadhay. Saddex, waxay leedahay dhismo fudud laakiin faa'iido ka sareeya parameter. Waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa qaababkayaga lix baaritaanka oo ku qoran qiimeynta kala duduwan. Imtixaano dheeraad ah waxay muujiyaan in modelkeenu aad u shaqeeyo. Taariikhdan macluumaad kala duduwan waxay ka heli kartaa resulti ka wanaagsan qaababka kala duduwan ee isbarbarbardhigga xaaladda farshaxanka ee metricada qiimeynta badan. Qoidaha asalka ee modellkayaga waxaa laga heli karaa https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'sv': 'Inbäddning av kunskapsgrafer är en viktig uppgift och det kommer att gynna många nedströms applikationer. För närvarande uppnår djupa neurala nätverksbaserade metoder toppmoderna prestanda. De flesta av dessa befintliga metoder är dock mycket komplexa och behöver mycket tid för utbildning och slutsatser. För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår vi en enkel men effektiv atrous convolution baserad kunskapsgraf inbäddningsmetod. Jämfört med befintliga toppmoderna metoder har vår metod följande huvudegenskaper. För det första ökar det effektivt funktionsinteraktioner genom att använda grymma konvulutioner. För det andra, för att ta itu med det ursprungliga problemet med glömd information och försvinnande/exploderande gradient problemet, använder den återstående inlärningsmetoden. För det tredje har den enklare struktur men mycket högre parametereffektivitet. Vi utvärderar vår metod på sex benchmarkdatauppsättningar med olika utvärderingsmetoder. Omfattande experiment visar att vår modell är mycket effektiv. På dessa olika datauppsättningar uppnår den bättre resultat än de jämförda toppmoderna metoderna på de flesta utvärderingsmetoder. Källkoderna för vår modell kan hittas på https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ta': 'அறிவு வரைபடம் உள்ளடக்கம் முக்கியமான செயல் தற்போது, ஆழமான புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் அடிப்படையிலான முறைகள் நிலையின்- கலை செயல்படுத்தும். ஆனால், இந்த இருக்கும் முறைகளில் பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் மிகவும் சிக்கலானது மற்றும் பயிற்சி மற்றும் குறைவு  இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் ஒரு எளிய ஆனால் வெறுப்பான ஆனால் செயல்படுத்தும் முறையான அறிவு வரைப்படம்  ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் நிலை- கலை முறைமைகளுடன் ஒப்பிட்டால், எங்கள் முறைமையில் முக்கிய குறிப்புகளை பின்பற்ற முதலில், அது குணங்களின் இடைமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி செயல்படுத்துகிறது. இரண்டாவது, மூல தகவல் பிரச்சனையைத் தேர்ந்தெடுத்து மற்றும் காணாமல்/வெடிக்கும் சாம்பல் பிரச்சனையை பயன்படுத்து மூன்றாவது, இது சுலபமான கட்டமைப்பு, ஆனால் அதிகமான அளபுரு விளைவு. ஆறு பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் எங்கள் முறையை மதிப்பிடு Extensive experiments show that our model is very effective.  இந்த வித்தியாசமான தரவு அமைப்புகளில், அது ஒப்பிடும் நிலையில்- கலை முறைமைகளை விட சிறந்த முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறது. எங்கள் மாதிரியின் மூல குறியீடுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'si': 'Name අවස්ථානයෙන්, ගොඩක් න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයේ අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාවන් විද්\u200dයාවන් සැලසුම් කරනවා. ඒත් මේ විදියට ගොඩක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට අ ප්\u200dරතිදේශයේ ස්ථිතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානය සමග, අපේ විධානයේ ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂතාවට පස්සෙන්  මුලින්ම, ඒක ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශේෂය කරනවා වගේ. දෙවෙනියි, මූලික තොරතුරු අමතක වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අමතක වෙලා තියෙන්න හා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට තුන්වෙනි විදියට, ඒකෙන් විශේෂයෙන් සංවිධානය තියෙනවා නමුත් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ අපි අපේ විධානය වෙනස් විශේෂ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක අවශ්\u200dය කරන්නේ විස්තර ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි. මේ විවිධ දත්ත සැට් වලින්, ඒක හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප අපේ මොඩල් එකේ මුළු කෝඩ් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ur': 'Knowledge graph embedding is an important task and it will benefit a lot of downstream applications. اکنون، عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیاد کی طریقے موجود ہیں. However, most of these existing methods are very complex and need much time for training and inference. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک ساده لیکن اثرات کے مطابق جہالت کا علم گراف بنیادی طریقے سے پیش کریں گے. موجود موجود موجود موجود آرت کی روش کے مقابلہ میں، ہمارا طریقہ اصلی خصوصیات کے مطابق ہے. پہلے، یہ اثرات کے طور پر اثرات اضافہ کرتا ہے، جہالت کے مطابق جہالت کے مطابق۔ دوسرا، اصلی معلومات کو بحث کرنے کے لئے بھول گیا ہے اور گراڈینٹ مسئلہ کو تباہ کرنے/پھیلانے کے لئے، یہ باقی رہنے والی تعلیم طریقہ کا استعمال کرتا ہے. تیسری، اس کے ساده سامان ہے لیکن بہت بلند پارامیٹ کے مطابق ہے. ہم اپنے طریقے کو چھ بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ مختلف ارزیابی متریک کے ساتھ ارزیابی کرتے ہیں۔ اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل بہت اثر ہے۔ ان مختلف ڈاٹ سٹوں پر یہ بہترین نتیجے حاصل کرتا ہے جو اکثر مطالعہ مطالعہ کے مقابلہ میں موجود ہیں۔ ہمارے موڈل کے سراسر کوڈ کو پایا جاتا ہے https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'uz': "Maʼlumot grafikni ajratish muhim vazifa, va u ko'pchilik dasturlariga foydalanadi. Joriy, juda qiyin neyron tarmoq usullari shaxsiyatlarni bajarish imkoniyatini bajaradi. Lekin bu ko'pchilik mavjud usullar juda murakkab va ta'lim va kichkina vaqt kerak. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz oddiy, lekin ishlab chiqarishni tasavvur qilamiz, ilmiy grafikni yaratish usulining asosida ishlatiladik. @ info: whatsthis Birinchisi, bu atrof ishlatuvchilardan foydalanuvchi shaxsiy interfektlarni foydalanadi. Ikkinchi marta, asl maʼlumot yoʻqolilgan muammolarni boshqarish va gradient muammolarini yoʻqolish uchun bu qismi o'rganish usulini foydalanadi. Uchinchi, bu oddiy structure, lekin eng katta parametr effekti bor. Biz 6 benchmark maʼlumotlarimizni qiymatimiz metriklari bilan boshqa qiymatlar bilan qiymatmiz. Koʻproq tajribalar bu modelmiz juda effektiv. Ushbu turli maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi, bu ko'pchilik qiymatlar metrikidagi davomida qiymatlar holatidan ham yaxshi natijalarni bajaradi. Modelning manba kodlari topilmadi https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng đồ thị thức là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng và nó sẽ có ích cho rất nhiều ứng dụng xuôi dòng. Hiện tại, các phương pháp dựa vào mạng thần kinh dày đặc đạt được hiệu quả. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các phương pháp tồn tại này rất phức tạp và cần rất nhiều thời gian để đào tạo và kết luận. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp lắp ghép bằng kiến thức tàn bạo đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả. So với các phương pháp hiện đại, phương pháp của chúng ta có những đặc điểm chính. Thứ nhất, nó thực sự tăng cường các hoạt động đặc biệt bằng cách sử dụng xoắn âm tàn. Thứ hai, để giải quyết vấn đề quên lãng thông tin gốc và vấn đề dốc biến mất và nổ, nó sử dụng phương pháp học bổ sung. Thứ ba, nó có cấu trúc đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả tham số cao hơn nhiều. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp trên sáu bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn với tỉ lệ đánh giá khác nhau. Những thí nghiệm bao quát cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi rất hiệu quả. Trên các tập tin đa dạng này, nó đạt được kết quả tốt hơn các phương pháp hiện đại so sánh về đa số âm lượng đánh giá. Các mã gốc của mô hình có thể tìm thấy tại https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'bg': 'Вградването на графика на знанието е важна задача и ще бъде от полза за много приложения надолу по веригата. Понастоящем методите, базирани на дълбоки невронни мрежи, постигат най-съвременни резултати. Въпреки това, повечето от тези съществуващи методи са много сложни и се нуждаят от много време за обучение и заключения. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме прост, но ефективен метод за вграждане на графика на знанието, базиран на зверски конволюции. В сравнение със съществуващите съвременни методи, нашият метод има следните основни характеристики. Първо, тя ефективно увеличава функционалните взаимодействия чрез използване на зверски конволюции. Второ, за да се справи с оригиналната информация забравен проблем и изчезващ / експлодиращ градиент проблем, той използва остатъчния метод на обучение. Трето, тя има по-проста структура, но много по-висока ефективност на параметрите. Оценяваме метода си на шест базови набора данни с различни показатели за оценка. Обширни експерименти показват, че нашият модел е много ефективен. На тези разнообразни набори от данни той постига по-добри резултати от сравнените най-съвременни методи за повечето показатели за оценка. Източниците на нашия модел могат да бъдат намерени на адрес: https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'nl': 'Het inbedden van kennisgrafieken is een belangrijke taak en het zal veel downstream toepassingen ten goede komen. Momenteel bereiken diepe neurale netwerken gebaseerde methoden state-of-the-art prestaties. De meeste van deze bestaande methoden zijn echter zeer complex en vereisen veel tijd voor training en conclusie. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een eenvoudige maar effectieve gruwelijke convolutie gebaseerde kennisgrafiek embedding methode voor. Vergeleken met bestaande state-of-the-art methoden, heeft onze methode de volgende belangrijkste kenmerken. Ten eerste verhoogt het effectief functie interacties door gruwelijke convoluties te gebruiken. Ten tweede, om het probleem van de oorspronkelijke informatie vergeten en het probleem van het verdwijnen/exploderen van gradiënt aan te pakken, maakt het gebruik van de resterende leermethode. Ten derde heeft het eenvoudigere structuur maar veel hogere parameterefficiëntie. We evalueren onze methode op zes benchmark datasets met verschillende evaluatiestatistieken. Uitgebreide experimenten tonen aan dat ons model zeer effectief is. Op deze diverse datasets bereikt het betere resultaten dan de vergeleken state-of-the-art methoden op de meeste evaluatiestatistieken. De broncodes van ons model zijn te vinden op: https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'da': 'Vidensgrafindlejring er en vigtig opgave, og det vil gavne masser af downstream applikationer. I øjeblikket opnår dybe neurale netværk baserede metoder state-of-the-art ydeevne. De fleste af disse eksisterende metoder er imidlertid meget komplekse og kræver meget tid til træning og konklusion. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en enkel, men effektiv grusom konvulution baseret viden graf indlejring metode. Sammenlignet med eksisterende state-of-the-art metoder har vores metode følgende hovedegenskaber. For det første øger det effektivt funktionsinteraktioner ved at bruge grusomme konvulutioner. For det andet bruger den restlæringsmetode til at løse det oprindelige problem med glemt information og forsvindende/eksploderende gradient problem. For det tredje har den enklere struktur, men meget højere parametereffektivitet. Vi evaluerer vores metode på seks benchmark datasæt med forskellige evalueringsmetrics. Omfattende eksperimenter viser, at vores model er meget effektiv. På disse forskellige datasæt opnår det bedre resultater end de sammenlignede state-of-the-art metoder på de fleste evalueringsmetrics. Kildekoderne for vores model kan findes på https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'hr': 'Zaključavanje znanja grafika je važan zadatak i koristit će mnogo prijava. Trenutno, duboke neuralne mreže bazirane metode ostvaruju stanje umjetnosti. Međutim, većina tih postojećih metoda su veoma kompleksni i potrebno je mnogo vremena za obuku i infekciju. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu ugrađenja znanja ugrađenog grafa na osnovu užasne konvolucije. U usporedbi s postojećim metodama umjetnosti, naša metoda prati glavne karakteristike. Prvo, to učinkovito povećava interakcije karakteristika koristeći užasne konvolucije. Drugo, za rješavanje originalnih informacija zaboravljenih pitanja i pitanja nestajanja/eksplozivanja gradienta, koristi ostatak metode učenja. Treće, ima jednostavniju strukturu ali mnogo više učinkovitosti parametara. Procjenjujemo našu metodu na šest standardnih podataka s različitim procjenama metrika. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš model vrlo efikasan. Na ovim različitim podacima postiže bolji rezultat nego uspoređene metode stanja umjetnosti na većini procjene metrika. Izvorni kodovi našeg modela su pronađeni na https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'de': 'Die Einbettung von Knowledge Graph ist eine wichtige Aufgabe und wird vielen nachgelagerten Anwendungen zugute kommen. Derzeit erreichen Deep Neuronal Networks basierte Methoden den neuesten Stand der Technik. Die meisten dieser bestehenden Methoden sind jedoch sehr komplex und benötigen viel Zeit für Training und Schlussfolgerung. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir eine einfache, aber effektive Methode zur Einbettung von Knowledge Graph vor. Im Vergleich zu bestehenden State-of-the-Art Methoden weist unsere Methode folgende Hauptmerkmale auf. Erstens erhöht es effektiv Feature-Interaktionen durch die Verwendung schrecklicher Faltungen. Zweitens verwendet es die Restlernmethode, um das Problem der ursprünglichen Information und des verschwindenden/explodierenden Gradienten anzugehen. Drittens hat es einfachere Struktur, aber viel höhere Parametereffizienz. Wir bewerten unsere Methode anhand von sechs Benchmark-Datensätzen mit unterschiedlichen Bewertungsmetriken. Umfangreiche Experimente zeigen, dass unser Modell sehr effektiv ist. Auf diesen unterschiedlichen Datensätzen erzielt es bessere Ergebnisse als die vergleichenden State-of-the-Art-Methoden bei den meisten Auswertungsmetriken. Die Quellcodes unseres Modells finden Sie unter https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'fa': 'گراف شناختن یک کار مهمی است و از بسیاری از کاربردهای پایین استفاده می\u200cکند. در حال حاضر، روش\u200cهایی که بر اساس شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cها بنیاد دارند به انجام وضعیت هنری رسیده می\u200cشوند. ولی بیشتر این روش\u200cهای موجود بسیار پیچیده و زمان زیادی برای آموزش و آلودگی نیاز دارند. برای حل این مسئله، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش ساده ولی موثری که بر اساس گراف علمی بنیاد می\u200cگیرد. در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای موجود هنر، روش ما ویژگی\u200cهای اصلی را دنبال می\u200cکند. اول، به طور تاثیر تعاملات ویژه\u200cهایی با استفاده از تبدیل\u200cهای زشت افزایش می\u200cدهد. دوم، برای حل کردن اطلاعات اصلی مشکل فراموش شده و ناپدید شدن/انفجار شدن، از روش یادگیری باقی مانده استفاده می\u200cکند. سوم، ساختار ساده\u200cتری دارد ولی بسیار عملکرد پارامتر بیشتری دارد. ما روش خودمون رو با متریک\u200cهای ارزیابی مختلف در شش مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنچم\u200cمارک ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش های گسترده نشان می دهند که مدل ما بسیار موثر است. در این مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف، نتیجه\u200cهای بهتر از روش\u200cهای مقایسه\u200cی حالت هنری بیشتر از متریک ارزیابی می\u200cرسد. کدهای منبع مدل ما می\u200cتوانند در https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'sw': 'Uwekezaji wa picha za maarifa ni kazi muhimu na utasaidia matumizi mengi ya mito ya chini. Hivi sasa, mitandao ya ndani ya neura yenye njia za msingi zinazofanikiwa na hali ya sanaa. However, most of these existing methods are very complex and need much time for training and inference.  Kupambana na suala hili, tunapendekeza mapinduzi rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi mkali wa maarifa yanayoingia. Kulinganishwa na hali inayofanana na njia za sanaa, njia yetu inafuata sifa kubwa. Kwanza, inaongeza kwa ufanisi mahusiano kwa kutumia mashambulizi makubwa. Pili, kuongelea suala la taarifa halisi lililosahau na kupotea/kupanua suala la msimu, inatumia njia ya kujifunza. Tatu, ina muundo rahisi lakini ufanisi wa kiwango kikubwa zaidi. Tunatathmini mbinu yetu katika takwimu sita za bendera kwa njia tofauti za uchunguzi. Majaribio mengi yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu una ufanisi mkubwa. Katika seti hizi za takwimu mbalimbali, inapata matokeo bora zaidi ya mbinu zilizolinganishwa na hali ya sanaa katika njia nyingi za uchunguzi. Kodi za vyanzo vya muundo wetu zinaweza kupatikana katika https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'id': 'Pengetahuan grafik pengetahuan adalah tugas penting dan akan berguna banyak aplikasi turun. Saat ini, metode jaringan saraf mendalam mencapai prestasi terbaik. Namun, kebanyakan dari metode yang ada ini sangat rumit dan membutuhkan banyak waktu untuk latihan dan kesimpulan. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan metode pengetahuan berbasis konvolusi yang sederhana tapi efektif. Berbanding dengan metode terbaik yang ada, metode kita mengikuti karakteristik utama. Pertama, secara efektif meningkatkan interaksi fitur dengan menggunakan konvolusi atros. Kedua, untuk mengatasi masalah informasi asli yang dilupakan dan masalah gradien menghilang/meledak, ia menggunakan metode belajar sisa. Ketiga, struktur ini lebih sederhana tapi efisiensi parameter jauh lebih tinggi. Kami mengevaluasi metode kami pada enam set data benchmark dengan metrik evaluasi yang berbeda. Extensive experiments show that our model is very effective.  Dalam set data yang berbeda ini, hasilnya lebih baik daripada metode terbaik dibandingkan pada kebanyakan metrik evaluasi. Kode sumber model kita dapat ditemukan di https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ko': '지식 그래프를 삽입하는 것은 중요한 임무로, 많은 하류 응용에 이익을 가져다 줄 것이다.현재 심도 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 방법이 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현하였다.그러나 기존의 대다수 방법은 매우 복잡하기 때문에 대량의 훈련과 추리 시간이 필요하다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는atrus권적을 바탕으로 하는 간단하고 효과적인 지식도 삽입 방법을 제시했다.기존의 선진적인 방법과 비교하면 우리의 방법은 다음과 같은 주요 특징을 가지고 있다.우선, 위축 권적을 사용하여 특징적인 상호작용을 효과적으로 증가시켰다.그 다음으로 원시 정보의 망각 문제와 사라짐/폭발 사다리 문제에 대해 잔차 학습 방법을 채택한다.셋째, 구조가 간단하고 매개 변수의 효율이 높다.우리는 서로 다른 평가 지표를 가진 여섯 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법을 평가했다.대량의 실험은 우리의 모형이 매우 효과적임을 나타냈다.이러한 서로 다른 데이터 집합에서, 그것은 대부분의 평가 지표에서 비교적 선진적인 방법보다 더 좋은 결과를 얻었다.우리 모델의 원본 코드는https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'sq': 'Përfshirja e grafikut të njohurive është një detyrë e rëndësishme dhe do të përfitojë shumë aplikime më poshtë. Aktualisht, metodat e rrjeteve nervore të thella arrijnë shfaqje më të larta. Megjithatë, shumica e këtyre metodave ekzistuese janë shumë komplekse dhe kanë nevojë për shumë kohë për trainimin dhe përfundimin. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një metodë të thjeshtë por të efektshme për të përfshirë grafikun e njohurive të bazuar në zhvillim të tmerrshëm. Në krahasim me metodat ekzistuese, metoda jonë ka karakteristikat kryesore. Së pari, ajo rrit efektivisht ndërveprimet e karakteristikave duke përdorur konvoluta atroze. Së dyti, për të trajtuar çështjen origjinale të informacionit të harruar dhe çështjen e zhdukjes/shpërthimit të gradient it, ajo përdor metodën e mësimit të mbetur. Së treti, ka strukturë më të thjeshtë por shumë më të lartë efektshmëri parametrash. Ne vlerësojmë metodën tonë në gjashtë baza të dhënash me metrika të ndryshme vlerësimi. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara tregojnë se modeli ynë është shumë efektiv. Në këto grupe të dhënash të ndryshme, ajo arrin rezultate më të mira se metodat më të larta të krahasuara në shumicën e metrikave të vlerësimit. Kodet burimore të modelit tonë mund të gjenden në https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'tr': 'Bilen grafik gaýşartmak wajyp zadyr we bu ýerde aşağıdaki programlere birnäçe fayda ýetirer. Häzirki wagtda, derin näral aňlary tabanly yöntemler sanat eserlerini ýetip biler. Ýöne bu bar yönleriň köpüsi gaty karmaşık we okuwçylyk we çykarmak üçin köp wagt gerek. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin basit ama etkili bir şekilde bilim grafisini içeren bir teklif ediyoruz. Häzirki sanat taryşlary bilen görä, biziň taryhymyz esasy karakterleriň üstine görä gelýär. Ilkinji gezek, täsirli köpürler ulanarak täsirleriň täsirlerini artýar. Ikinjisi, unutdan çykan meseleni çözmek we çykan/patlamak üçin, çykan öwrenmek yöntemini ulanýar. Üçüncüsü, bunun basit yapısı bar fakat daha yüksek parametreler etkinliği vardır. Biz öz yönümizi alty benchmark veri setlerinde farklı deňleme metrileri bilen deňleýäris Döwletler biziň nusgamyzyň örän täsirlidigini görkezýär. Bu dürli veri setirlerinde, deňlenme metrikleriniň köp deňleýän durumyndan has gowy netijeleri ýetip bilýär. "%s" faýly açylyp başarmady çünki ol beter ullakan. https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'af': "Kenning graaf inbetering is 'n belangrike taak en dit sal voordeel baie onderstreem toepassings. Opstuur, diep neuralnetwerke gebaseerde metodes bereik staat-van-kuns-prestasie. Maar die meeste van hierdie bestaande metodes is baie kompleks en nodig baie tyd vir onderwerp en onderwerp. Om hierdie probleem te besluit, voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige maar effektief afsonderlike konvolusie gebaseerde kennis graf inbetering metode. Vergelyk met bestaande state-of-the-art metodes, ons metode het volgende hoof karakteristieke. Eerste, dit vermeerder eienskaplike interaksies deur groot konvolusies te gebruik. Tweede, om die oorspronklike inligting te adres wat vergeet probleem en vernietig/eksplodeer Gradiënte probleem, gebruik dit die oorspronklike leermeetode. Derde, dit het eenvoudiger struktuur, maar baie hoër parameter effektiviteit. Ons evalueer ons metode op ses benchmark datastelle met verskillende evalueringsmetries. Ekstensiewe eksperimente vertoon dat ons model baie effektief is. Op hierdie verskillende datastelle, het dit beter resultate bereik as die vergelyking state-of-the-art metodes op die meeste van evalueringsmetries. Die bronkodes van ons model kon gevind word by https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'am': 'የእውቀት ቀለም ማቀናጃ አስፈላጊ ስራ ነው እናም ብዙ ፈሳሽ ፕሮግራሞች ይጠቅማል፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የጥልቅ የውይይት መረብ የሚደረገውን የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ያገኛል፡፡ ነገር ግን አብዛኛዎቹ እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች በጣም አካባቢዎች ናቸው፤ ለትምህርት እና ለመደገፍ ብዙ ጊዜ ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀላቀል ቀላል ነገር ግን የሚያስተባብል የእውቀት ቀለም ማቀናቀል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በአሁኑ የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት እየተካፈለ የሥርዓት ሥርዓት፣ ዘዴያችን የዋናው ፊደል እየተከተለ ነው፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ በጥያቄ ጉዳዮች በመጠቀም የግል ጉዳይ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ Second, to address the original information issue and disappear/explode gradient issue, it uses the residual learning method. ሦስተኛ፣ ቀላል መሠረት ነው ነገር ግን በጣም የበረታች መጠቀሚያ ነው፡፡ የስድስት benchmark ዳታዎችን በተለያዩ ማስታወቂያ ማተሚያዎች ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የስፋት ፈተናዎች ምሳሌያችን በጣም ጥቅም እንደሆነ ያሳየቃሉ፡፡ በተለያዩ የዳታ ሰርቨሮች ላይ በብዙዎቹ አስተያየት ሚትሮች ላይ ከሚተካክል ሀብት-የዓርት ሥርዓት የሚሻል ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡ የሞዴል የኩነቶች ኮዶችን በመገኘት ይችላል https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'hy': 'Գիտելու գրաֆիկի ներառումը կարևոր խնդիր է, և այն կօգտագործի շատ հետագա ծրագրեր: Currently, deep neural networks based methods achieve state-of-the-art performance.  Այնուամենայնիվ, այս գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների մեծ մասը շատ բարդ է և շատ ժամանակ է անհրաժեշտ ուսուցման և եզրակացության համար: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ, սարսափելի հակադարձման հիմնված գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի ներառման մեթոդ: Համեմատելով գոյություն ունեցող ամենաբարձր մեթոդների հետ, մեր մեթոդը ունի հիմնական հատկություններ: Առաջինը, այն արդյունավետ բարձրացնում է հատկանիշների փոխազդեցությունը, օգտագործելով սարսափելի հակադարձություններ: Երկրորդ, որպեսզի լուծենք մոռացած սկզբնական տեղեկատվությունը և անհետանանք և պայթյուն ունենանք, այն օգտագործում է մնացած ուսուցման մեթոդը: Երրորդ, այն ունի ավելի պարզ կառուցվածք, բայց շատ ավելի բարձր պարամետրերի արդյունավետություն: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մեթոդը վեց համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի վրա տարբեր գնահատման մետրիկներով: Մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը շատ արդյունավետ է: Այս բազմազան տվյալների համակարգերի վրա այն ավելի լավ արդյունքներ է ստանում, քան համեմատած ամենաբարձր մեթոդները գնահատման մետրերի մեծ մասում: Մեր մոդելի աղբյուրները կարելի է գտնել https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'az': 'Bilmə grafı içərisində möhüm bir işdir və bu çox aşağılıq proqramlarına fayda verər. Şimdilik, derin nöral ağları tərəfindən tətbiq edilən metodlar tətbiq edilir. Halbuki, bu mevcut metodların çoxu çox kompleks və təhsil və təhsil etmək üçün çox vaxt lazımdır. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün basit, amma effektiv bir bilgi grafı inşa etmək üçün təklif edirik. Bizim metodumuz mövcuddur sanat metodları ilə qarşılaşdırılmışdır. İlk dəfə, böyük konvolusyonlar istifadə edərək fəaliyyətlərin əlaqələrini artırar. İkincisi, orijinal məlumatların unutduğu məsələni çəkmək və ortadan çıxmaq/patlamaq məsələsini çəkmək üçün, geri qalan öyrənmə metodunu istifadə edir. Üçüncüsü, bunun daha basit yapısı var, amma daha yüksək parametr faydallığı var. Biz metodumuzu altı benchmark veri qurularında müxtəlif değerlendirmə metrikləri ilə değerlendiririk. Əlavə eksperimentləri modelimiz çox etkilidir. Bu müxtəlif veri qurularında, müəyyən olunmuş metriklərin çoxunun müəyyən edilmiş vəziyyətlərindən daha yaxşı sonuçlarını başa çatdırır. Modelimizin mənbə kodları https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ এনক্রেডিং একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ এবং এটি অনেক নিচের প্রয়োগ করবে। বর্তমানে গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতিগুলো শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি অর্জন করে। However, most of these existing methods are very complex and need much time for training and inference.  এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি সাধারণ কিন্তু কার্যকর কিন্তু কার্যকর ক্ষেত্রে বিভিন্ন জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ ভ বিদ্যমান রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনায়, আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রধান চরিত্রের অনুসরণ করে। প্রথমত, এটি নির্যাতন বিভ্রান্ত ব্যবহার করে কার্যকর করে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন সংঘর্ষ বৃদ্ধি করে। দ্বিতীয়, মূল তথ্যের ব্যাপারে ভুলে গেছে এবং গ্রেডিয়েন্ড বিষয়টি হারিয়ে যাওয়া এবং বিস্ফোরণ করার জন্য, এটি বাকি শ তৃতীয়, এটার কাঠামো সহজ কিন্তু আরো বেশী প্যারামিটারের কার্যকর। আমরা ছয়টি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়ন করি বিভিন্ন মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক দিয়ে। বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল খুব কার্যকর। এই বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটগুলোতে বেশীরভাগ মূল্যের মেট্রিকে তুলনা করা অবস্থার থেকে ভাল ফলাফল অর্জন করে। আমাদের মডেলের উৎস কোড পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'bs': 'Zaključavanje znanja grafika je važan zadatak i koristit će mnogo prijava. Trenutno, duboke neuralne mreže bazirane metode ostvaruju stanje umjetnosti. Međutim, većina ovih postojećih metoda su veoma kompleksni i treba mnogo vremena za obuku i infekciju. Da bi se riješili ovom pitanju, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu ugrađenja znanja ugrađenog grafa na osnovu užasne konvolucije. U usporedbi sa postojećim metodama umjetnosti, naša metoda prati glavne karakteristike. Prvo, to učinkovito povećava funkcionalne interakcije koristeći užasne konvolucije. Drugo, za rješavanje originalnih informacija zaboravljenih pitanja i nestanka/eksplodirajuća pitanja gradienta, koristi ostatak metode učenja. Treće, ima jednostavniju strukturu, ali mnogo više efikasnosti parametara. Procjenjujemo našu metodu na šest standardnih podataka sa različitim procjenama metrika. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš model vrlo efikasan. Na ovim različitim podacima postiže bolji rezultat od uspoređenih metoda stanja umjetnosti na većini procjene metrika. Izvorni kodovi našeg modela su mogli naći na https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ca': "L'incorporació del gràfic del coneixement és una tasca important i beneficiarà moltes aplicacions en avall. Currently, deep neural networks based methods achieve state-of-the-art performance.  No obstant això, la majoria d'aquests mètodes existents són molt complexes i necessiten molt de temps per a formar i inferir. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, proposem un mètode simple però efectiu d'incorporació del gràfic de coneixement basat en la convolució atrosa. Comparat amb els mètodes actuals existents, el nostre mètode té les característiques principals. Primer, augmenta efectivament les interaccions de característiques utilitzant convolucions atroses. Segon, per abordar el problema original de la informació oblidada i la desaparició/explotació del gradient, utilitza el mètode d'aprenentatge residual. Third, it has simpler structure but much higher parameter efficiency.  Evaluam el nostre mètode en sis conjunts de dades de referència amb diferents mètriques d'evaluació. Els extensos experiments demostren que el nostre model és molt efectiu. En aquests diversos conjunts de dades, aconsegueix millors resultats que els mètodes més moderns comparats en la majoria de les mètodes d'evaluació. Els codis fonts del nostre model es poden trobar a https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'cs': 'Vložení znalostních grafů je důležitým úkolem a přinese prospěch mnoha navazujícím aplikacím. V současné době dosahují metody založené na hlubokých neuronových sítích nejmodernějšího výkonu. Nicméně většina těchto stávajících metod je velmi složitá a vyžaduje mnoho času na školení a odvoz. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu vkládání znalostních grafů založenou na atrous convolution. Ve srovnání se stávajícími nejmodernějšími metodami má naše metoda následující hlavní charakteristiky. Za prvé, účinně zvyšuje interakce funkcí pomocí krutých konvolucí. Za druhé, k řešení původního problému zapomenutých informací a problému mizícího/explodujícího gradientu, používá metodu zbytkového učení. Za třetí, má jednodušší strukturu, ale mnohem vyšší účinnost parametrů. Naši metodu hodnotíme na šesti referenčních datových sadách s různými hodnotícími metrikami. Rozsáhlé experimenty ukazují, že náš model je velmi efektivní. Na těchto rozmanitých datových sadách dosahuje lepších výsledků než porovnávané nejmodernější metody na většině hodnotících metrik. Zdrojové kódy našeho modelu naleznete na adrese https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'et': 'Teadmiste graafiku manustamine on oluline ülesanne ja sellest on kasu paljud alljärgnevad rakendused. Praegu saavutavad sügavatel närvivõrkudel põhinevad meetodid tipptasemel jõudluse. Enamik neist olemasolevatest meetoditest on siiski väga keerulised ja vajavad palju aega koolituseks ja järeldusteks. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja lihtsa, kuid tõhusa julma konvolutsiooni põhjal põhineva teadmisgraafiku manustamise meetodi. Võrreldes olemasolevate kaasaegsete meetoditega on meie meetodil järgmised põhiomadused. Esiteks suurendab see efektiivselt funktsioonide koostoimeid, kasutades hirmsaid konvolutsioone. Teiseks, esialgse teabe unustatud probleemi ja kaduva/plahvatava gradienti probleemi lahendamiseks kasutab see jääkõppemeetodit. Kolmandaks on see lihtsam struktuur, kuid palju suurem parameetrite tõhusus. Hindame oma meetodit kuue erineva hindamismeetodiga võrdlusandmekogumi alusel. Laiaulatuslikud katsed näitavad, et meie mudel on väga efektiivne. Nende erinevate andmekogumite puhul saavutab see enamiku hindamismeetodite puhul paremaid tulemusi kui võrreldavad kaasaegsed meetodid. Meie mudeli lähtekoodid võib leida aadressilt https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'fi': 'Knowledge graafien upottaminen on tärkeä tehtävä ja se hyödyttää monia jatkojalostuksen sovelluksia. Tällä hetkellä syvähermoverkkoihin perustuvat menetelmät saavuttavat huipputason suorituskyvyn. Useimmat näistä nykyisistä menetelmistä ovat kuitenkin hyvin monimutkaisia ja vaativat paljon aikaa koulutukseen ja päättelyyn. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta julmaa konvoluutioon perustuvaa tietograafien upotusmenetelmää. Nykyisiin viimeisimpiin menetelmiin verrattuna menetelmällämme on seuraavat pääpiirteet. Ensinnäkin se tehostaa ominaisuuksien vuorovaikutusta käyttämällä hirveitä konvoluatioita. Toiseksi, alkuperäisen tiedon unohdetun ongelman ja katoavan/räjähtävän gradientin ongelman ratkaisemiseksi se käyttää jäännösoppimismenetelmää. Kolmanneksi se on yksinkertaisempi rakenne, mutta paljon suurempi parametrien tehokkuus. Arvioimme menetelmäämme kuudessa vertailuaineistossa, joissa on erilaisia arviointimittareita. Laajat kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme on erittäin tehokas. Näillä erilaisilla tietokokonaisuuksilla se saavuttaa parempia tuloksia kuin verratut uusimmat menetelmät useimmissa arviointimittareissa. Mallimme lähdekoodit löytyvät osoitteesta https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'he': 'הכניסה של גרף ידע היא משימה חשובה והיא תהיה מועילה בהרבה שימושים מתקדמים. Currently, deep neural networks based methods achieve state-of-the-art performance.  בכל אופן, רוב השיטות הקיומות האלה מאוד מורכבות וצריכות הרבה זמן לאימון ומסקנה. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה פשוטה אך יעילה של שיבול ידע מבוסס על שיבול ידע גרף. בהשוואה לשיטות חדשות קיימות, לשיטה שלנו יש את האופיינים העיקריים. ראשית, זה בעצם מגביר אינטראקציות מיוחדות על ידי השימוש בשלבים אטרוסיים. שנית, כדי להתמודד עם המידע המקורי שנשכח ונעלם/מתפוצץ, הוא משתמש בשיטת הלימוד השארית. שלישית, יש לו מבנה פשוט יותר אבל יעילות פרמטרים הרבה יותר גבוהה. אנו מעריכים את השיטה שלנו על שש קבוצות מידע בנסיון עם מטריות עריכה שונות. ניסויים רחבים מראים שהמודל שלנו יעיל מאוד. On these diverse datasets, it achieves better results than the compared state-of-the-art methods on most of evaluation metrics.  קודים המקור של הדוגמא שלנו יכולים למצוא ב https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'ha': "An ƙunsa da graphi na ilmi yana da wani aikin muhimu kuma yana da amfani da wasu shiryoyin ayuka na ƙarami. Aka yanzu, metoden tsarin neural masu ƙaranci da hanyoyi masu kai ga halin-the-art. A lokacin da, mafiya yawansu masu cikin hanyoyin wannan sun kasance masu husũma kuma yana da amfani da lokaci mai yawa wa yin amfani da kuma yin zartar. Domin da za mu yi addu'a ga wannan masu al'amarin, za'a buƙata wata na'ura, da kuma mai amfani da kwamfyuta matsayin fassarar sanitar da ke cikin. @ action: button Kayyan, ita yana ƙara masu husũma da amfani da misumarni masu bastarwa. Kijan, don ka yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da aka manta da halin bayani na masu buɗe/yin cire Ga na uku, yana da tsari mai sauƙi, kuma yana da mafi girma ga parameter. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyinmu a kan data na sita. Extensive experiments show that our model is very effective.  Daga wannan tsarin da aka ƙayyade, yana sãmu mafiya alhẽri ga matsalari daga misãlan-state-of-the-art kan masu yawansu masu ƙaddara. Ana iya gano kode ɗin misalinmu da https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.", 'bo': 'ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱས་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་འདིས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས ད་ལྟ། གནད་དོན་དང་སྐྱེས་གཞུང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་སྟངས་འདི་དག་གི་ལམ་ལུགས་མང་ཆེ་བ་ནི་སླ་རིམ་པ་ཁག་ཆེ་བ་དགོ གནད་དོན་འདི་ལ་བཤད་ན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཏེ། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྩ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡོད་པ་རེད། དང་པོ་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བ་རེད། གཉིས་པ། ཐོག་མའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དེ་ལས་བརྗེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་བློ་ཕམ་རླུང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་བེད་སྤྱད་ན། 3འོན་ཀྱང་། it has simpler structure but much higher parameter efficiency. We evaluate our method on six benchmark datasets with different evaluation metrics. རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་ཚད་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་ཡིན་པ་ཤར་བ། On these various datasets, it achieves better results than the comparison state-of-the-art methods on most of evaluation metrics. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'sk': 'Vključevanje grafikona znanja je pomembna naloga in bo koristilo veliko nadaljnjih aplikacij. Trenutno metode globokih nevronskih omrežij dosegajo najsodobnejšo zmogljivost. Vendar pa je večina teh obstoječih metod zelo kompleksnih in potrebuje veliko časa za usposabljanje in sklepanje. Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo preprosto, vendar učinkovito metodo vključevanja grafov znanja, ki temelji na groznih konvolucijah. V primerjavi z obstoječimi najsodobnejšimi metodami ima naša metoda naslednje glavne značilnosti. Prvič, učinkovito povečuje interakcije funkcij z uporabo groznih konvolucij. Drugič, za reševanje izvirne informacije, pozabljene težave in izginjajoče/eksplozivne težave z gradientom, uporablja metodo preostalega učenja. Tretjič, ima enostavnejšo strukturo, vendar veliko večjo učinkovitost parametrov. Našo metodo ocenjujemo na šestih referenčnih naborih podatkov z različnimi meritvami ocenjevanja. Obsežni poskusi kažejo, da je naš model zelo učinkovit. Na teh različnih naborih podatkov dosega boljše rezultate od primerjave najsodobnejših metod pri večini meritev vrednotenja. Izvorne kode našega modela lahko najdete na spletni strani https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.', 'jv': 'Punika dipunangkapan punika diangkat sing dikarepakno akeh lano lan bakal bantuan aplikasi sing dibutuhke Aku ngcono, ditambah langkung wigatining sistem sing susahe perusahaan state-of-the-arts offline. Nanging, akeh wajih-akeh sistem iki ana ing kasunyatan luwih apik lan butuh luwih dumateng kanggo tukang karo ngono ujaran. To Address this question, we proposal a Simple and effectual convolution-basated knowinggraphing method. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink First, it Effects effect expand Yuta tanggal, nggo digawe informasi sing paling-paling batasan karo kapan/pangan gradient kesemplo, kuwi nggambar sistem Residual Learn method. Genjer-Genjer We assess the method on 6 bench dataset with a new value meter. special section Coverage https://github.com/neukg/AcrE.'}
{'en': 'TPLinker : Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'ar': 'TPLinker: استخراج مشترك للكيانات والعلاقات بمرحلة واحدة من خلال ربط زوج الرموز', 'fr': "TPLinker\xa0: extraction conjointe en une étape d'entités et de relations via la liaison de paires de jetons", 'es': 'TPLinker: extracción conjunta de entidades y relaciones en una sola etapa a través de la vinculación de pares de tokens', 'pt': 'TPLinker: Extração conjunta em estágio único de entidades e relações por meio da vinculação de pares de tokens', 'ja': 'TPLinker ：トークンペアリンクによるエンティティとリレーションシップの単段階の共同抽出', 'ru': 'TPLinker: Одноступенчатая совместная экстракция сущностей и отношений через связывание пар токенов', 'hi': 'TPLinker: टोकन जोड़ी जोड़ने के माध्यम से संस्थाओं और संबंधों का एकल चरण संयुक्त निष्कर्षण', 'zh': 'TPLinker曰:因令牌链接单阶段合而取之', 'ga': 'TPLinker: Eastóscadh Comhpháirteach Aonáin agus Caidrimh Trí Nasc Péire Comhartha', 'hu': 'TPLinker: Szervezetek és kapcsolatok egylépcsős közös kivonása Token Pair összekapcsolással', 'it': 'TPLinker: Estrazione congiunta in fase singola di entità e relazioni attraverso il collegamento di coppia di token', 'ka': 'TPLinker: ერთადერთი სტაზის ერთადერთი ექსტრაქცია ინტერნეტიების და შესახებ ტოკენის ზომის შესახებ', 'el': 'Ενιαία κοινή εξαγωγή οντοτήτων και σχέσεων μέσω σύνδεσης ζευγαριού σήματος', 'kk': 'TPLinker: Токен қосымша сілтемелерімен бір-бір сәйкес нысандарды және қатынастарды тарқату', 'ms': 'TPLinker: Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'mk': 'TPLinker: Една фаза заедничка екстракција на ентитети и односи преку поврзување на парови со токени', 'ml': 'ടിപിലിങ്കാര്\u200d: ടോക്കന്\u200d പേയിര്\u200d ലിങ്ങിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ വഴിയിലൂടെ ഒറ്റ- സ്റ്റേജ് യൂണ്ട് എന്റിറ്റികളും ബന്ധങ്ങളും', 'mt': 'TPLinker: Estrazzjoni Konġunta ta’ Entitajiet u Relazzjonijiet fi stadju uniku permezz ta’ Linking ta’ Pawġi Token', 'no': 'TPLinker: Single stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'pl': 'TPLinker: Pojedyncza wspólna ekstrakcja podmiotów i relacji poprzez łączenie par tokenów', 'lt': 'TPLinker: Vieno etapo jungtinis subjektų ir santykių ekstrahavimas naudojant token pairing', 'si': 'TPlinker: Single-stage Unitt Extraction of Units and References Through Token Pair Linging', 'mn': 'TPLinker: Токен хоёр холбооны холбоотой нэг этаж нийлүүлэгдэх Entities and Relations Extraction Through Token Pair Linking', 'so': 'TPLinker: Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'sr': 'TPLinker: Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'ro': 'TPLinker: Extragerea comună într-o singură etapă a entităților și relațiilor prin conectarea perechilor de jetoane', 'ur': 'TPLinker: ایک-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'sv': 'TPLinker: Enstadig gemensam extraktion av enheter och relationer genom Token Pair Linking', 'ta': 'TPLinker: Token Pair Linking வழியாக உள்ளீடுகள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளை ஒன்றாக வெளியேற்றுதல்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'TPLinks: tổng hợp hoạt động của các đơn vị và liên hệ qua các liên kết đôi Token.', 'bg': 'Едноетапно съвместно извличане на субекти и отношения чрез свързване на двойки токени', 'hr': 'TPLinker: zajednička izvlačenja područja i odnosa iz jednog stadija kroz povezanje par Tokena', 'nl': 'TPLinker: Eenfasige gezamenlijke extractie van entiteiten en relaties via Token Pair Linking', 'da': 'TPLinker: Et trins fælles udtrækning af enheder og relationer gennem Token Pair Linking', 'de': 'TPLinker: Einstufige gemeinsame Extraktion von Entitäten und Beziehungen durch Token Pair Linking', 'id': 'TPLinker: Ekstraksi Perkongsian Satu tahap dari Entitas dan Hubungan Melalui Linking Pasangan Token', 'ko': 'TPLinker: 토큰을 통해 링크의 솔리드 및 관계를 한 단계로 공동 추출', 'fa': 'TPLinker: استخراج یک مرحله از اجتماعات و ارتباطات با طریق ارتباط جفت Token', 'sw': 'TPLinker: Joint Joint Extraction of Entries and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'tr': 'TPLinker', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'TPLinker: Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'am': 'Linker: Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'az': 'TPLinker: Token İki İlişim Aracılığı ilə birlikli Entitələrin və İlişkilərin Açırması', 'bn': 'টিপিলিঙ্কার: টোকেন পেয়ার লিংকিং-এর মাধ্যমে প্রতিটি এবং সম্পর্কের এক্সট্রেন্ট বিনিময়', 'bs': 'TPLinker: zajednička izvlačenja područja i odnosa iz jednog stadija kroz povezanje par Tokena', 'cs': 'TPLinker: Jednostupňová společná extrakce entit a vztahů prostřednictvím propojení tokenových párů', 'et': 'TPLinker: üheastmeline olemite ja suhete ühine väljavõtmine tokenipaari linkimise kaudu', 'fi': 'TPLinker: Yksivaiheinen yhteishankinta yksiköistä ja suhteista Token Pair -linkityksen kautta', 'hy': 'TPLinker: Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking', 'ca': "TPLinker: Extracció conjunta en una etapa única de les entitats i les relacions mitjançant l'enllaç de parell de fitxes", 'jv': 'paper size', 'sk': 'TPLinker: enostopenjsko skupno pridobivanje subjektov in odnosov prek povezovanja žetonov parov', 'ha': 'Link: Single- phase Join Extraction of Entities and Relations through Token Pair Linkin', 'he': 'TPLinker: יציאה משותפת בשלב אחד של יחידות ומערכות יחסים דרך קישור זוגות טוקנים', 'bo': 'TPLinker: Single-stage Joint Extraction of Entities and Relations Through Token Pair Linking'}
{'en': 'Extracting entities and relations from unstructured text has attracted increasing attention in recent years but remains challenging, due to the intrinsic difficulty in identifying overlapping relations with shared entities. Prior works show that joint learning can result in a noticeable performance gain. However, they usually involve sequential interrelated steps and suffer from the problem of exposure bias. At training time, they predict with the ground truth conditions while at inference it has to make extraction from scratch. This discrepancy leads to error accumulation. To mitigate the issue, we propose in this paper a one-stage joint extraction model, namely, TPLinker, which is capable of discovering overlapping relations sharing one or both entities while being immune from the exposure bias. TPLinker formulates joint extraction as a token pair linking problem and introduces a novel handshaking tagging scheme that aligns the boundary tokens of entity pairs under each relation type. Experiment results show that TPLinker performs significantly better on overlapping and multiple relation extraction, and achieves state-of-the-art performance on two public datasets.', 'ar': 'اجتذب استخراج الكيانات والعلاقات من النص غير المهيكل اهتمامًا متزايدًا في السنوات الأخيرة ولكنه لا يزال يمثل تحديًا ، بسبب الصعوبة الجوهرية في تحديد العلاقات المتداخلة مع الكيانات المشتركة. تظهر الأعمال السابقة أن التعلم المشترك يمكن أن يؤدي إلى مكاسب ملحوظة في الأداء. ومع ذلك ، فإنها عادة ما تنطوي على خطوات متسلسلة ومترابطة وتعاني من مشكلة تحيز التعرض. في وقت التدريب ، يتنبأون بظروف الحقيقة الأساسية بينما عند الاستدلال يجب عليهم الاستخراج من نقطة الصفر. هذا التناقض يؤدي إلى تراكم الأخطاء. للتخفيف من حدة المشكلة ، نقترح في هذه الورقة نموذج استخراج مشترك من مرحلة واحدة ، وهو TPLinker ، القادر على اكتشاف العلاقات المتداخلة التي تشترك في كيان واحد أو كلا الكيانين بينما يكون محصنًا من تحيز التعرض. يصوغ TPLinker الاستخراج المشترك كمشكلة ربط زوج رمزي ويقدم مخططًا جديدًا لوضع علامات المصافحة يعمل على محاذاة الرموز المميزة لأزواج الكيانات تحت كل نوع من أنواع العلاقات. تُظهر نتائج التجربة أن TPLinker يؤدي أداءً أفضل بشكل ملحوظ في التداخل واستخراج العلاقات المتعددة ، ويحقق أداءً متطورًا على مجموعتي بيانات عامتين.', 'es': 'Extraer entidades y relaciones de textos no estructurados ha atraído cada vez más atención en los últimos años, pero sigue siendo un desafío, debido a la dificultad intrínseca de identificar relaciones superpuestas con entidades compartidas. Trabajos anteriores muestran que el aprendizaje conjunto puede dar lugar a un aumento notable del rendimiento. Sin embargo, por lo general implican pasos secuenciales interrelacionados y sufren el problema del sesgo de exposición. En el momento del entrenamiento, predicen con el terreno las condiciones de verdad, mientras que en la inferencia tienen que hacer la extracción desde cero. Esta discrepancia conduce a la acumulación de errores. Para mitigar el problema, proponemos en este artículo un modelo de extracción conjunta de una etapa, a saber, TPLinker, que es capaz de descubrir relaciones superpuestas que comparten una o ambas entidades al tiempo que es inmune al sesgo de exposición. TPLinker formula la extracción conjunta como un problema de enlace de pares de tokens e introduce un novedoso esquema de etiquetado de enlace que alinea los tokens de límite de los pares de entidades en cada tipo de relación. Los resultados del experimento muestran que TPLinker funciona significativamente mejor en la extracción de relaciones múltiples y superpuestas, y logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en dos conjuntos de datos públicos.', 'pt': 'A extração de entidades e relações de um texto não estruturado tem atraído cada vez mais atenção nos últimos anos, mas continua sendo um desafio, devido à dificuldade intrínseca em identificar relações sobrepostas com entidades compartilhadas. Trabalhos anteriores mostram que a aprendizagem conjunta pode resultar em um ganho de desempenho perceptível. No entanto, geralmente envolvem etapas sequenciais inter-relacionadas e sofrem com o problema de viés de exposição. Na hora do treinamento, eles preveem com as condições de verdade do terreno enquanto na inferência tem que fazer a extração do zero. Essa discrepância leva ao acúmulo de erros. Para mitigar o problema, propomos neste artigo um modelo de extração conjunta de um estágio, a saber, TPLinker, que é capaz de descobrir relações sobrepostas compartilhando uma ou ambas as entidades enquanto é imune ao viés de exposição. O TPLinker formula a extração conjunta como um problema de vinculação de pares de tokens e introduz um novo esquema de marcação de handshaking que alinha os tokens de limite de pares de entidades em cada tipo de relação. Os resultados do experimento mostram que o TPLinker tem um desempenho significativamente melhor na sobreposição e na extração de múltiplas relações, e alcança um desempenho de última geração em dois conjuntos de dados públicos.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'entités et de relations à partir de textes non structurés a attiré de plus en plus d'attention ces dernières années mais reste un défi, en raison de la difficulté intrinsèque à identifier les relations qui se chevauchent avec des entités partagées. Des travaux antérieurs montrent que l'apprentissage conjoint peut entraîner un gain de performance notable. Cependant, ils impliquent généralement des étapes séquentielles interdépendantes et souffrent du problème du biais d'exposition. Au moment de l'entraînement, ils prédisent avec le terrain les conditions de la vérité alors qu'à l'inférence, il doit effectuer une extraction à partir de zéro. Cet écart entraîne une accumulation d'erreurs. Pour atténuer le problème, nous proposons dans cet article un modèle d'extraction conjointe en une étape, à savoir TPLinker, qui est capable de découvrir des relations chevauchantes partageant une ou les deux entités tout en étant immunisé contre le biais d'exposition. TPLinker formule l'extraction conjointe comme un problème de liaison de paires de jetons et introduit un nouveau schéma de balisage d'établissement de liaison qui aligne les jetons de limite des paires d'entités sous chaque type de relation. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que TPLinker est nettement plus performant en matière de chevauchement et d'extraction de relations multiples, et atteint des performances de pointe sur deux ensembles de données publics.", 'ja': '非構造化テキストからのエンティティと関係の抽出は、近年ますます注目を集めていますが、共有エンティティとの重複関係を特定することが本質的に困難であるため、依然として困難です。 以前の研究では、共同学習が顕著なパフォーマンス向上につながる可能性があることが示されています。 しかし、それらは通常、連続した相互に関連するステップを伴い、暴露バイアスの問題に苦しむ。 訓練時間には、地上の真理条件を予測し、推論時間にはゼロから抽出する必要があります。 この不一致は誤差の蓄積につながる。 この問題を緩和するために、暴露バイアスから免れながら、一方または両方のエンティティを共有する重複関係を発見することができる1段階の共同抽出モデル、すなわちTPLinkerを本稿で提案する。 TPLinkerは、トークンペアのリンク問題として共同抽出を定式化し、各リレーションタイプの下にエンティティペアの境界トークンを配置する新しいハンドシェイクタグスキームを導入します。 実験結果は、TPLinkerがオーバーラップおよび複数のリレーション抽出で著しく優れたパフォーマンスを発揮し、2つのパブリックデータセットで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '近年以来,自非结构化文本中提取实体,渐起关注,但以识与共享之重存于内难,故犹有挑战性。 前之研明,合学可以显进。 然其次第相关,而有暴露之差。 其训练也,以地实占之,而推理之时,必取诸头。 其差则差积。 缓之者,立一单提,TPLinker见共一两体之重,而不见偏差之害。 TPLinker以合取为令牌链接,引入新手标方案,以实体对界齐之。 实验结果表明,TPLinker显优于重采,而取其先进之性。', 'ru': 'Выделение объектов и отношений из неструктурированного текста в последние годы привлекает все большее внимание, но остается сложной задачей из-за внутренних трудностей в выявлении дублирующих отношений с общими объектами. Предыдущие работы показывают, что совместное обучение может привести к заметному повышению производительности. Однако они обычно включают последовательные взаимосвязанные этапы и страдают от проблемы смещения экспозиции. Во время тренировки они предсказывают с помощью наземных условий истины, в то время как при выводе он должен делать извлечение с нуля. Это расхождение приводит к накоплению ошибок. Чтобы смягчить проблему, мы предлагаем в этой работе одноступенчатую модель совместной экстракции, а именно TPLinker, которая способна обнаруживать перекрывающиеся отношения, разделяющие одну или обе сущности, будучи при этом невосприимчивой к смещению экспозиции. TPLinker формулирует совместную экстракцию как проблему связывания пары токенов и вводит новую схему тэгов рукопожатия, которая выравнивает пограничные токены пар сущностей под каждым типом отношений. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что TPLinker работает значительно лучше при перекрытии и извлечении множественных связей, и достигает самой современной производительности на двух общедоступных наборах данных.', 'hi': 'असंरचित पाठ से संस्थाओं और संबंधों को निकालने ने हाल के वर्षों में बढ़ते ध्यान को आकर्षित किया है, लेकिन साझा संस्थाओं के साथ अतिव्यापी संबंधों की पहचान करने में आंतरिक कठिनाई के कारण चुनौतीपूर्ण बना हुआ है। पूर्व कार्यों से पता चलता है कि संयुक्त सीखने के परिणामस्वरूप एक ध्यान देने योग्य प्रदर्शन लाभ हो सकता है। हालांकि, वे आमतौर पर अनुक्रमिक परस्पर संबंधित चरणों को शामिल करते हैं और एक्सपोजर पूर्वाग्रह की समस्या से पीड़ित होते हैं। प्रशिक्षण के समय, वे जमीनी सच्चाई की स्थिति के साथ भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, जबकि अनुमान पर इसे खरोंच से निष्कर्षण करना पड़ता है। यह विसंगति त्रुटि संचय की ओर ले जाती है। इस मुद्दे को कम करने के लिए, हम इस पेपर में एक-चरण संयुक्त निष्कर्षण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अर्थात्, TPLinker, जो एक्सपोज़र पूर्वाग्रह से प्रतिरक्षा होने के दौरान एक या दोनों संस्थाओं को साझा करने वाले अतिव्यापी संबंधों की खोज करने में सक्षम है। TPLinker संयुक्त निष्कर्षण को जोड़ने वाली समस्या को जोड़ने वाली टोकन जोड़ी के रूप में तैयार करता है और एक उपन्यास हैंडशेकिंग टैगिंग योजना का परिचय देता है जो प्रत्येक संबंध प्रकार के तहत इकाई जोड़े की सीमा टोकन को संरेखित करता है। प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि TPLinker अतिव्यापी और एकाधिक संबंध निष्कर्षण पर काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है, और दो सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá aird mhéadaitheach á tarraingt ar eintitis agus ar ghaolmhaireachtaí a bhaint as téacs neamhstruchtúrtha, ach tá sé dúshlánach fós, mar gheall ar an deacracht bhunúsach a bhaineann le caidreamh forluiteach a aithint le haonáin chomhroinnte. Léiríonn saothair roimhe seo go bhféadfadh gnóthachan feidhmíochta suntasach a bheith mar thoradh ar chomhfhoghlaim. Mar sin féin, is gnách go mbíonn céimeanna comhghaolmhara seicheamhacha i gceist leo agus bíonn fadhb na laofachta nochta ag baint leo. Ag am traenála, déanann siad a thuar leis na coinníollacha bunfhírinne agus ag an tátal caithfidh sé eastóscadh a bhaint as an nua. Cruthaíonn earráidí carnadh mar thoradh ar an neamhréireacht seo. Chun an tsaincheist a mhaolú, molaimid sa pháipéar seo samhail eastósctha aonchéime aonchéime, eadhon, TPLinker, atá in ann caidreamh forluiteach a aimsiú agus aonán amháin nó an dá eintiteas á roinnt agus a bheith díolmhaithe ón laofacht nochta. Foirmíonn TPLinker eastóscadh comhpháirteach mar fhadhb nasctha péire comharthaí agus tugtar isteach scéim chlibeála nua um chroitheadh láimhe a ailíníonn comharthaí teorann na bpéirí aonán faoi gach cineál caidrimh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh go bhfeidhmíonn TPLinker i bhfad níos fearr ar fhorluí agus eastóscadh gaol iolrach, agus go mbaineann sé feidhmíocht den scoth amach ar dhá thacar sonraí poiblí.', 'hu': 'Az entitások és kapcsolatok strukturálatlan szövegből történő kivonása az elmúlt években egyre nagyobb figyelmet keltett, de továbbra is kihívást jelent a közös entitásokkal való átfedő kapcsolatok azonosításának belső nehézsége miatt. Korábbi munkák azt mutatják, hogy a közös tanulás észrevehető teljesítménynövekedést eredményezhet. Általában azonban egymással összefüggő lépéseket is magukban foglalnak, és az expozíciós elfogultság problémájától szenvednek. A kiképzés idején az igazság feltételeit jósolják meg, míg a következtetés szerint a semmiből kell kivonnia. Ez az eltérés hibafelhalmozódáshoz vezet. A probléma enyhítése érdekében ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszakaszú közös extrakciós modellt javasolunk, nevezetesen a TPLinkert, amely képes felfedezni az egyik vagy mindkét entitást megosztó átfedő kapcsolatokat, miközben immunis az expozíciós előítéletektől. A TPLinker együttes extrakciót fogalmaz meg token pár összekapcsolási problémaként, és bevezet egy új kézfogási címkézési sémát, amely összehangolja az entitáspárok határvonalait minden kapcsolattípus alatt. A kísérletek eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a TPLinker jelentősen jobb teljesítményt nyújt az átfedések és a többszörös kapcsolat kitermelése terén, és két nyilvános adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el.', 'kk': 'Құрастырылмаған мәтіннен бірліктерді және қатынастарды тарқату соңғы жылдар бойынша қызықтығын көтерді, бірақ бөлек бірліктермен қатынастарды білу үшін ішкі қатынастардың көбірек мәселелерін таңдау үшін Алдыңғы жұмыс істеу жалпы оқыту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Бірақ олар кәдімгі кездескен кездескен қадамдар болып, өзгертілген қадамдардың мәселесінен өтеді. Олар өзгертілген уақытта жұмыс істеу кезінде дұрыс шарттарына бақылады, жұмыс істеу керек. Бұл бөлімі қателерді біріктіруге болады. Мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін, біз бұл қағаздың бір-бірінші сәйкес тарқату үлгісін таңдаймыз. Мәселен, TPLinker, бұл бір немесе екі бірліктерді бөлек қатынастарды көшірмелеу үшін көшірмелеу үлгісін табу TPLinker біріктірілген тарқату мәселесі ретінде біріктіріп, әрбір қатынастық түрінде нысандардың шегінің белгілерін келтіретін жаңа қолдану сұлбасын келтіреді. Тәжірибенің нәтижесі TPLinker көбірек және көбірек қатынастарды тарқату үшін көбірек жақсы жұмыс істейді, және екі көбірек деректер қорларындағы күй- жайымдық әрекеттерді же', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή οντοτήτων και σχέσεων από μη δομημένο κείμενο έχει προσελκύσει αυξανόμενη προσοχή τα τελευταία χρόνια, αλλά εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση, λόγω της εγγενής δυσκολίας στον εντοπισμό αλληλεπικαλύπτοντων σχέσεων με κοινές οντότητες. Προηγουμένες εργασίες δείχνουν ότι η κοινή μάθηση μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε ένα αξιοσημείωτο κέρδος απόδοσης. Ωστόσο, συνήθως περιλαμβάνουν διαδοχικά αλληλένδετα βήματα και υποφέρουν από το πρόβλημα της προκατάληψης έκθεσης. Κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, προβλέπουν με το έδαφος τις συνθήκες αλήθειας ενώ στο συμπέρασμα πρέπει να κάνει εξαγωγή από το μηδέν. Αυτή η διαφορά οδηγεί σε συσσώρευση σφαλμάτων. Για να μετριάσουμε το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε στην παρούσα εργασία ένα μονοστασιακό κοινό μοντέλο εξαγωγής, δηλαδή το το οποίο είναι ικανό να ανακαλύψει επικαλυπτόμενες σχέσεις που μοιράζονται μία ή και τις δύο οντότητες ενώ είναι ανοσία από την προκατάληψη έκθεσης. Το διαμορφώνει την κοινή εξαγωγή ως πρόβλημα σύνδεσης ζευγαριού σημάτων και εισάγει ένα νέο σχέδιο επισήμανσης που ευθυγραμμίζει τα οριακά σήματα ζευγαριών οντότητας κάτω από κάθε τύπο σχέσης. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι το αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα στην αλληλεπικάλυψη και εξαγωγή πολλαπλών σχέσεων και επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε δύο δημόσια σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "Estrarre entità e relazioni da testi non strutturati ha attirato sempre maggiore attenzione negli ultimi anni, ma rimane impegnativo, a causa della difficoltà intrinseca nell'individuare relazioni sovrapposte con entità condivise. I lavori precedenti dimostrano che l'apprendimento congiunto può portare a un notevole aumento delle prestazioni. Tuttavia, di solito coinvolgono fasi sequenziali interconnesse e soffrono del problema del bias dell'esposizione. Al momento dell'allenamento, predicono con il terreno le condizioni di verità mentre all'inferenza deve fare estrazione da zero. Questa discrepanza porta all'accumulo di errori. Per mitigare il problema, proponiamo in questo articolo un modello di estrazione congiunta in una fase, vale a dire TPLinker, che è in grado di scoprire relazioni sovrapposte che condividono una o entrambe le entità pur essendo immune dal bias dell'esposizione. TPLinker formula l'estrazione congiunta come problema di collegamento di coppia di token e introduce un nuovo schema di tagging handshaking che allinea i token di confine delle coppie di entità sotto ogni tipo di relazione. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che TPLinker si comporta significativamente meglio in caso di sovrapposizione e estrazione di relazioni multiple e raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia su due set di dati pubblici.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais vis daugiau dėmesio skiriama subjektų ištraukimui ir santykiams iš nesustruktūruoto teksto, tačiau jie vis dar yra sudėtingi, nes labai sunku nustatyti tarpusavio ryšius su bendrais subjektais. Ankstesni darbai rodo, kad bendras mokymasis gali reikšmingai padidinti veiklos rezultatus. Tačiau jos paprastai apima nuoseklius tarpusavyje susijusius veiksmus ir patiria sąlyčio problem ą. Mokymo metu jie prognozuoja esant žeminei tiesai esančioms sąlygoms ir daro išvadą, kad ji turi ištraukti iš nulio. Šis neatitikimas sukelia klaidų kaupimąsi. To mitigate the issue, we propose in this paper a one-stage joint extraction model, namely, TPLinker, which is capable of discovering overlapping relations sharing one or both entities while being immune from the exposure bias.  TPLinker formuoja jungtinę ekstrakciją kaip token pair susiejimo problem ą ir įdiegia naują rankų spaudimo ženklinimo sistemą, pagal kurią kiekvieno santykio tipo vienetų poros ribiniai ženklai suderinami. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad TPLinker gerokai geriau veikia dubliuojant ir ekstrahuojant daugialypius ryšius, o dviejuose viešuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose pasiekti pažangiausi rezultatai.', 'ms': 'Mengekstrak entiti dan hubungan dari teks tidak terstruktur telah menarik perhatian semakin meningkat dalam tahun-tahun terakhir tetapi tetap mencabar, disebabkan kesulitan dalam pengenalan hubungan yang meliputi dengan entiti terkongsi. Kerja-kerja terdahulu menunjukkan bahawa pembelajaran kongsi boleh menghasilkan keuntungan prestasi yang dapat dilihat. Namun, mereka biasanya melibatkan langkah berturut-turut berkaitan antara satu sama lain dan menderita dari masalah bias eksposisi. Pada masa latihan, mereka meramalkan dengan keadaan kebenaran tanah sementara pada kesimpulan ia perlu membuat ekstraksi dari kosong. Kegagalan ini menyebabkan pengumpulan ralat. Untuk mengurangi isu ini, kami cadangkan dalam kertas ini satu-tahap model ekstraksi kongsi, iaitu TPLinker, yang mampu menemukan hubungan yang meliputi berkongsi satu atau kedua-dua entiti semasa menjadi imun dari bias eksposisi. TPLinker membentuk ekstraksi kongsi sebagai masalah pemautan pasangan token dan memperkenalkan skema tag tekanan tangan yang menyesuaikan token sempadan pasangan entiti dibawah setiap jenis hubungan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa TPLinker berfungsi lebih baik pada pengekstrakan hubungan bertindih dan berbilang, dan mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada dua set data awam.', 'mk': 'Екстрактирањето на ентитетите и односите од неструктурираниот текст привлече сé поголемо внимание во последниве години, но останува предизвикувачки, поради внатрешните тешкотии во идентификувањето на прекривачките односи со заедничките ентитети. Претходните работи покажуваат дека заедничкото учење може да резултира со значителен профит. However, they usually involve sequential interrelated steps and suffer from the problem of exposure bias.  At training time, they predict with the ground truth conditions while at inference it has to make extraction from scratch.  Оваа разлика води до акумулација на грешки. За да го олесниме ова прашање, во овој документ предлагаме едностапен заеднички модел на екстракција, имено ТПЛинкер, кој е способен да открие прекривање на односите споделувајќи еден или двата ентитети додека е имун од предрасудата на изложението. TPLinker ја формулира заедничката екстракција како проблем со поврзувањето на паровите на знаци и воведува нова шема на обележување за рачно тресење која ги израмнува граничните знаци на паровите на ентитети под секој тип на врска. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека ТПЛинкер има значително подобри резултати во врска со прекривањето и екстракцијата на повеќе односи и постигнува најсовремени резултати на двата јавни податоци.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത കൊല്ലങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്ഥാപിക്കാത്ത പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വസ്തുക്കളെയും ബന്ധങ്ങളെയും പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് വളരെ ശ്രദ്ധ കൂടുതല്\u200d ആകര്\u200dഷിക്ക പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലി കാണിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് നോക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയ എന്നാലും സാധാരണയായാലും സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം ഇടപാടുകളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു. പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d  പരിശീലന സമയത്ത്, അവര്\u200d ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യ നിലപാടുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. ദുര്\u200dബലമായിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിനെ പുറത് ഈ വ്യത്യാസം പിശക് ശേഖരിക്കുന്നതിലേക്ക് നയിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ മുളപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഒരു സ്റ്റേജ് യൂട്ട് പുറത്തുവരുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ടിപിലിങ്കര്\u200d, ഒന്നോ രണ്ടോ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d TPLinker യൂണ്ട് പുറത്തേക്കുള്ള പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നമായി ഒരു ഒളിഞ്ഞ ജോടി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രശ്നം ആക്രമിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട തര പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ടിപിലിങ്കര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വളരെ നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. രണ', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურული ტექსტიდან ინტერტიკები და შესახებ გამოყენება შემდეგ წლის განმავლობაში უფრო მეტად აღმოჩენა, მაგრამ უფრო შესაძლებელია, რადგან ინტერნექტური რთული იდენტიფიკაცია შესახებ პირველი სამუშაო მუშაობები აჩვენებენ, რომ ერთადერთი სწავლების შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელი გამოყენება. მაგრამ, ისინი განსაკუთრებულად კოდენციალური კოდენციალური კოდენციალური კოდენციალური კოდენციების შესახებ და გამოცდილობის პრობლემაზე ოპვეგთეწგარ გპვმვრჲ ნა რპვნთნდ, ფვ თმა ოპვეგთეწგანვ ჟ ნაფთნჟკთრვ თჟრთნჟკთ სჟლჲგთწ, ეჲკარჲ თნტვპვნუთწ რპწბგა ეა ნაოპაგთ თჱკპაკუთ ეს განსხვავება შეცდომის კომულაციას მიიღება. ეს პრობლემენტის შემცირებისთვის, ჩვენ ამ დომენტში ერთადერთი სექტაციის გამოყენება მოდელს, რომელიც TPLinker, რომელიც შეუძლებელია აღმოჩენოთ შემცირებული პრობლემენტები, რომელიც ერთი ან ორივე ინტერტი Name გამოცდილებების შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ TPLinker მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tal-entitajiet u r-relazzjonijiet minn test mhux strutturat attirat aktar attenzjoni f’dawn l-aħħar snin iżda tibqa’ sfida, minħabba d-diffikultà intrinsika fl-identifikazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet li jikkoinċidu ma’ entitajiet kondiviżi. Xogħlijiet preċedenti juru li t-tagħlim konġunt jista’ jirriżulta f’żieda notevoli fil-prestazzjoni. Madankollu, normalment jinvolvu passi sekwenzjali interrelatati u jsofru mill-problema ta’ preġudizzju għall-espożizzjoni. Fil-ħin tat-taħriġ, huma jipprevedu bil-kundizzjonijiet tal-verità tal-art filwaqt li fl-inferenza jrid jagħmel estrazzjoni mill-zero. Din id-diskrepanza twassal għal akkumulazzjoni ta’ żbalji. Biex tittaffa l-kwistjoni, f’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu mudell ta’ estrazzjoni konġunta ta’ stadju wieħed, jiġifieri, TPLinker, li huwa kapaċi jiskopri relazzjonijiet li jikkoinċidu li jaqsmu entità waħda jew iż-żewġ entitajiet filwaqt li jkun immuni mill-preġudizzju għall-espożizzjoni. TPLinker formulates joint extraction as a token pair linking problem and introduces a novel handshaking tagging scheme that aligns the boundary tokens of entity pairs under each relation type.  Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li TPLinker iwettaq prestazzjoni sinifikanti aħjar fuq l-irduppjar u l-estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet multipli, u jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta pubbliċi.', 'pl': 'Wydobycie podmiotów i relacji z nieustrukturyzowanego tekstu przyciągnęło coraz większą uwagę w ostatnich latach, ale pozostaje wyzwaniem ze względu na istotną trudność w identyfikacji nakładających się relacji z podmiotami wspólnymi. Wcześniejsze prace pokazują, że wspólne uczenie się może skutkować zauważalnym wzrostem wydajności. Zazwyczaj jednak obejmują one kolejne, ze sobą powiązane kroki i cierpią z powodu problemu uprzedzenia ekspozycji. W czasie treningu przewidują warunki prawdy podczas gdy w wniosku musi dokonać ekstrakcji od zera. Rozbieżność ta prowadzi do gromadzenia się błędów. Aby złagodzić tę kwestię, proponujemy w niniejszym artykule jednostopniowy model wspólnej ekstrakcji, a mianowicie TPLinker, który jest w stanie odkryć nakładające się relacje dzielące jeden lub oba podmioty, a jednocześnie jest odporny na tendencje ekspozycji. TPLinker formułuje wspólną ekstrakcję jako problem łączenia pary tokenów i wprowadza nowy schemat tagowania ręką, który wyrównuje tokeny graniczne par podmiotów pod każdym typem relacji. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że TPLinker działa znacznie lepiej przy pokrywaniu się i ekstrakcji wielu relacji oraz osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność na dwóch publicznych zbiorach danych.', 'no': 'Utpakking av einingar og relasjonar frå ikkje strukturert tekst har ført til å auke oppmerksomhet i siste år, men fortsatt vanskeleg for å identifisera overlapping av relasjonar med delte einingar. Førre arbeidar viser at joint learning kan føre til ein merkelig utvikling. Desse involverer oftast sequential interrelaterte steg og kjører frå problemet med eksponeringsforsikt. På treningstid foregår dei med grunnleggjande sannhetsvilkår mens det må utpakke frå røysing. Denne skilnaden fører til feilakumulering. For å redusere dette problemet, fører vi i denne papiret eit samsvart utpakkingsmodul, dvs. TPLinker, som er i stand til å oppdage overlapping relasjonar som deler ein eller begge einingar mens du er imun frå eksponeringsforsikta. TPLinker formerer joint extraction as a token pair linking problem and introduces a novel handshaking tagging scheme that aligns the boundary tokens of entities pairs under each relation type. Eksperimentresultat viser at TPLinker utfører betydelig bedre ved overlapping og utpakking av fleire relasjonar, og når det gjer tilstanden av kunsten på to offentlige datasett.', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүн болон харилцааныг сүүлийн жилүүдэд нэмэгдүүлэх нь анхаарлыг ихэсгэсэн, гэхдээ холбоотой байгууллагуудын харилцааныг тодорхойлох хэцүү байдлаас гадна хэцүү байдаг. Эхний ажиллах нь нийлбэр суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үндсэн үр дүнд гарч чадна. Гэвч тэд ихэвчлэн хоорондоо хоорондоо холбоотой алхам холбоотой, харилцааны өрөөсгөл байдлын асуудлыг шаналдаг. Сургуулийн цаг үед тэд үнэний нөхцөл байдлыг багасгаж байдаг. Харин халдвараас гаргах хэрэгтэй. Энэ ялгаа алдаа цуглуулахад хүргэдэг. Энэ асуудлыг багасгахын тулд бид энэ цаасан дээр нэг сүүлийн хамтран хадгалах загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ бол TPLinker. Энэ нь нэг эсвэл хоёр загварыг хамтран хуваалцаж байгаа харилцаа олох боломжтой. TPLinker нь хоорондоо хоорондоо холбоотой асуудал гэж холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой, холбоотой бүр холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой загварыг ши ТПЛИнкер холбоотой холбоотой олон холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байдлаар илүү сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'si': 'අස්ථාපනය නැති පාළුවෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවය සහ සම්බන්ධතාවය නිසා අවස්ථාවක් වලින් අවස්ථාවක් වලින් අවස්ථාවක් විසින් අවස්ථාවක ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. ඒත් ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස පුහුණු වෙලාවට, ඔවුන් පැත්තේ ඇත්ත අවස්ථාවක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒක සිද්ධ වෙලාවෙන් පිටවෙන මේ විරුද්ධතාවය ප්\u200dරමාණය වැරදිලි එක්කරණය කරන්න පුළුවන්. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අඩංගුවන්න, අපි මේ පත්තරයේ එක-ස්ටේජ් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක තමයි, TPlinker, ඒක හොයාගන්න පුළුවන TPlinker ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ TPlinker ගොඩක් හොඳයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න, සහ ස', 'sv': 'Att utvinna entiteter och relationer från ostrukturerad text har fått allt större uppmärksamhet de senaste åren men är fortfarande utmanande, på grund av den inneboende svårigheten att identifiera överlappande relationer med delade entiteter. Tidigare arbeten visar att gemensamt lärande kan resultera i en märkbar prestationsförbättring. De involverar dock vanligtvis sekventiella inbördes relaterade steg och lider av problemet med exponeringsbestämmelser. Vid träningstiden förutspår de med grunden sanningsförhållandena medan det vid slutsatsen måste göra utvinning från grunden. Denna avvikelse leder till felackumulering. För att mildra problemet föreslår vi i denna uppsats en ettstegs gemensam extraktionsmodell, nämligen TPLinker, som kan upptäcka överlappande relationer som delar en eller båda entiteterna samtidigt som den är immun från exponeringsbördes. TPLinker formulerar gemensam extraktion som ett problem med länkning av token-par och introducerar ett nytt handshaking-taggschema som justerar gränstokenerna för entitetspar under varje relationstyp. Experimentsresultat visar att TPLinker presterar betydligt bättre vid överlappning och multipel relation extraktion, och uppnår toppmoderna prestanda på två offentliga datauppsättningar.', 'sr': 'Izvukanje subjekta i odnosa iz neostrukturnog teksta privlačilo je veću pažnju u poslednjih godina, ali i dalje je izazovno zbog unutrašnjih poteškoća u identifikaciji preklapanja odnosa sa zajedničkim subjektima. Prije poslova pokazuju da zajedničko učenje može rezultirati primjetljivom postupku izvedbe. Međutim, oni obično uključuju sekvenčne međusobne korake i pate od problema predrasude izloženosti. U vreme treninga predviđaju pod zemljom istinskim uvjetima dok se inficira mora izvući iz ogrebotine. Ova neslaganost vodi do akumulacije greška. Da bi smanjili problem, u ovom papiru predlažemo zajednički model ekstrakcije na jednom fazu, a to je TPLinker, koji je sposoban da otkrije preklapanje odnosa koji deli jednu ili oba entiteta dok su imuni od predrasude izloženosti. TPLinker formuliše zajedničku ekstrakciju kao problem povezivanja znakova par i predstavlja novu režimu oznake za rukovanje koji odgovara granične znakove parova entiteta pod svakim vrstom odnosa. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da TPLinker izvodi značajno bolje pri izvlačenju preklapanja i više odnosa, i postiže izvršnost države umjetnosti na dva javna podataka.', 'ro': 'Extragerea entităților și relațiilor din text nestructurat a atras atenția tot mai mare în ultimii ani, dar rămâne o provocare, datorită dificultății intrinsece în identificarea relațiilor suprapuse cu entitățile comune. Lucrările anterioare arată că învățarea comună poate duce la un câștig vizibil de performanță. Cu toate acestea, acestea implică, de obicei, etape secvențiale interconectate și suferă de problema părtinirii expunerii. În timpul antrenamentului, ei prezic cu solul condițiile adevărului, în timp ce la concluzie trebuie să facă extracția de la zero. Această discrepanţă duce la acumularea erorilor. Pentru a atenua această problemă, propunem în această lucrare un model de extracție comună într-o singură etapă, și anume TPLinker, care este capabil să descopere relații suprapuse care împărtășesc una sau ambele entități, fiind în același timp imun de părtinirea expunerii. TPLinker formulează extracția comună ca o problemă de legătură a perechilor de token și introduce o nouă schemă de etichetare a strângerii mâinii care aliniază jetoanele de frontieră ale perechilor de entități sub fiecare tip de relație. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că TPLinker performează semnificativ mai bine la suprapunerea și extragerea relațiilor multiple și obține performanțe de ultimă oră pe două seturi de date publice.', 'so': "Dhaqaalaha iyo xiriirka laga soo bixiyo qoraalka aan la dhisin ayaa soo kordhay daryeel sii kordhaya sanadkii ugu dambeeyey, laakiin waxaa hadhay dhibaato ku jirta in ay ogaato xiriirka la xiriira waxyaabaha la qaybsan. Shaqooyinka hore waxay muuqataa in waxbarashada wadajirka ah uu ka heli karo faa'iido la xiriira. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay inta badan leeyihiin tallaabooyin xiriir ah, waxayna dhibaatooyin ku jiraan dhibaatada qalbiyada soo saara. Waqtiga waxbarashada waxaa lagu sheegaa shuruudaha runta ah ee dhulka, inta ay jiraan waa in la soo bixiyo daboolka. Takooristan waxay ku leedahay qalabka. Si loo fududeeyo arimahan, waxan warqaddan uga soo jeedaynaa model wadajir ah oo ah TPLinker, kaasoo awoodi kara inuu ogaado xiriirka kala qaybsan isku xiriirka ama labada jidadba, iyadoo aan ka daafici karno qalabka daboolka. TPLinker wuxuu ka dhigaa wadajir ka soo saara sida calaamad labo oo isku xiran dhibaato, wuxuuna soo bandhigaa qorshaha qoyska handshaking tagging oo u sawirista xuduudaha labo ah oo ku qoran cayn kasta oo xiriir ah. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in TPLinker si aad u fiican u sameeyo iskuulka xiriirka kala duduwan, wuxuuna sameynayaa bandhigyada farshaxanka labada macluumaadka dadweynaha.", 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படாத உரையில் இருந்து பொருள்கள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளை வெளியேற்றுதல் செயல்பாடு இன்னும் சவாலானதாக இருக்கிறது, ஆனால் பகிர்ந்த பொரு முன்னிருப்பு வேலைகள் காட்டுகிறது சேர்ந்து கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் செயல்பாட்டின் பெருக்கலை கா ஆனால், அவர்கள் வழக்கமாக பின்வரும் இணைந்த தொடர்புடைய படிகளை சேர்க்கிறார்கள் மற்றும் வெளிப்படுத்தும் பிர பயிற்சி நேரத்தில், அவர்கள் நிலத்தில் உண்மையான நிலைமைகளுடன் முன்வாக்குகிறார்கள் போது அது துள்ளியிலிருந்த This discrepancy leads to error accumulation.  பிரச்சனையை அளக்க, நாம் இந்த தாளில் ஒரு நிலையில் ஒரு இணைப்பு பிரிப்பு மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அதாவது, டிபிலிங்கர், ஒரு அல்லது இரண்டு பொருள்களும் பாது TPLinker ஒரு குறியீடு ஜோடி இணைப்பு பிரச்சனை உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும் ஒரு புதிய கையாளும் ஒட்டும் முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அது எல்லை குறியீட முயற்சி முடிவு', 'ur': 'غیر ساختہ پیغام سے اجتماعات اور رابطہ اٹھانے کے باعث اضافہ کی توجه اضافہ ہوتی ہے لیکن اضافہ ہوتی ہے، اس کے باعث مشکل ہے کہ مشترک اجتماعات کے ساتھ زیادہ مشترک رابطہ معلوم کرنا ہے. اگلے کام دکھاتے ہیں کہ joint learning can result in a noticeable performance gain. لیکن ان کو معمولاً سفارشی مرتبہ قدم لگا رہا ہے اور کھول کھول دینے کے مشکل سے رنج لگا رہا ہے. تدریس وقت میں، انہوں نے زمین کی حقیقت شرایط کے ساتھ پیش کیا ہے، حالانکہ کمزوری کے وقت یہ ضرورت ہے کہ اسے دھوپ سے نکالنا چاہے. یہ اختلاف گمراہی جمع کرنے کی وجہ سے ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے، ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک مرحلہ joint extraction Model کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، یعنی TPLinker، جو ایک یا دونوں اجتماعات کے ساتھ ایک یا دونوں اجتماعات کا شریک ہونے کے لئے قادر ہے، جسے ایک یا دونوں اجتماعات سے درگزر ہونے کے موقع ہے. TPLinker ایک ٹوکین جوڑ کی تدریج مشکل کے طور پر جوڑی اٹھانے کا فرمول کرتا ہے اور ایک نئی ہاندشاک ٹیگ سیٹی سیٹی کو معلوم کرتا ہے جو ہر رابطہ کے نوع کے نیچے ایک ٹیٹی جوڑوں کی حد سے سیٹی ٹوکین کرتی ہے. تجربہ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ TPLinker دوسری عمومی ڈاٹ سٹ پر زیادہ بہتر عمل کرتا ہے اور بہت سی نسبت اٹھانے پر، اور دوسری عمومی ڈاٹ سٹ پر موجود رہتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Những thực thể rút ra và quan hệ từ văn bản không xây dựng đã thu hút sự chú ý nhiều hơn trong những năm gần đây nhưng vẫn còn khó khăn, vì sự khó khăn của việc xác định mối quan hệ chồng chéo với các thực thể chia sẻ. Những công trình trước đây cho thấy việc học chung có thể làm tăng hiệu suất đáng chú ý. Tuy nhiên, chúng thường liên quan đến các bước nối tiếp nhau nhau nhau nhau nhau nhau nhau nhau nhau theo chuỗi và bị mắc phải khuynh hướng phơi nhiễm. Trong thời gian huấn luyện, họ dự đoán với các điều kiện thực tế trên mặt đất trong khi có kết quả rằng nó phải thực hiện từ đầu. Sự mâu thuẫn này dẫn đến sự tích tụ lỗi. Để giảm bớt vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất trong tờ giấy này một mô hình chung về việc khai thác một giai đoạn, là máy TPLinker, người có khả năng phát hiện các mối quan hệ nối nhau chia sẻ một hoặc hai thực thể trong khi không bị ảnh hưởng bởi khuynh hướng phơi nhiễm. TPLinks phát triển các móc đôi như là một vấn đề liên kết đôi tượng trưng và giới thiệu một kế hoạch in bắt tay mới nhằm thẳng hàng các đồng xu giới hạn của thực thể theo mỗi kiểu tương quan. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy TPLinker đạt được khả năng cao hơn nhiều khi trích các mối quan hệ chồng chéo nhau và nhiều lần, và đạt được hiệu quả tối tân trên hai bộ dữ liệu công cộng.', 'uz': "Name Prior works show that joint learning can result in a noticeable performance gain.  Lekin ular odatda keyingi boshqa bir xil boshqaruvchi qadamlarni o'zgartiradi va o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish muammolarini ko'rsatadi. Tashqi vaqtda, ular dunyodagi haqiqiqiy holatlari bilan ishlab chiqaradi. Bu ko'proq holatda o'zgartirish kerak. @ info Bu muammolani kamaytirish uchun, biz bu qogʻozdagi bir daraja bir bir bir bir alohida ajratish modeli, TPLinker, biz bir yoki ikkita obʼektlarni ajratishni ko'paytirish mumkin, biz tashkilotlarni ajratish mumkin. Name Name", 'bg': 'Извличането на субекти и връзки от неструктуриран текст привлича все по-голямо внимание през последните години, но остава предизвикателство поради присъщата трудност при идентифицирането на припокриващи се отношения със споделени субекти. Предишни работи показват, че съвместното обучение може да доведе до забележимо повишаване на производителността. Въпреки това, те обикновено включват последователни взаимосвързани стъпки и страдат от проблема с отклонението на експозицията. По време на тренировка те предсказват с реалните условия на земята, докато при заключение трябва да направи извличане от нулата. Това несъответствие води до натрупване на грешки. За смекчаване на проблема, в настоящата статия предлагаме едностепенен модел на съвместна екстракция, а именно, който е способен да открие припокриващи се отношения, споделящи една или и двете единици, като същевременно е имунизиран от отклонението на експозицията. Формулира съвместно извличане като проблем за свързване на двойка символи и въвежда нова схема за етикетиране с ръкостискане, която подравнява граничните символи на двойки субекти под всеки тип релация. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че се представя значително по-добре при припокриване и извличане на множество връзки и постига най-съвременни резултати върху два обществени набора от данни.', 'da': 'Udtrækning af enheder og relationer fra ustruktureret tekst har tiltrukket stigende opmærksomhed i de seneste år, men er fortsat udfordrende på grund af de iboende vanskeligheder med at identificere overlappende relationer med fælles enheder. Tidligere værker viser, at fælles læring kan resultere i en mærkbar præstationsgevinst. Men de involverer normalt sekventielle indbyrdes forbundne trin og lider af problemet med eksponering bias. Ved træningstidspunktet forudsiger de med jorden sandhedsforholdene, mens det ved udledning skal gøre udtrækning fra bunden. Denne uoverensstemmelse fører til ophobning af fejl. For at afbøde problemet foreslår vi i denne artikel en éttrins fælles ekstraktionsmodel, nemlig TPLinker, som er i stand til at opdage overlappende relationer, der deler en eller begge enheder, samtidig med at de er immune fra eksponeringsbias. TPLinker formulerer fælles ekstraktion som et token pair linking problem og introducerer et nyt handshaking tagging system, der justerer grænsetokene for entitetspar under hver relationstype. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at TPLinker yder betydeligt bedre ved overlappende og flere relationer ekstraktion, og opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne på to offentlige datasæt.', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje subjekta i odnosa iz neostrukturnog teksta privuklo je veću pažnju u posljednjih godina, ali je i dalje izazovno zbog unutrašnjih teškoća u identifikaciji preklapanja odnosa s zajedničkim subjektima. Prije poslova pokazuju da zajedničko učenje može rezultirati primjetljivom postupku učenja. Međutim, oni obično uključuju sekvencijske međusobne korake i pate od problema predrasude izloženosti. U vrijeme obuke predviđaju pod podzemnim istinskim uvjetima dok se inficira mora izvući iz ogrebotine. Ova neslaganost vodi do akumulacije greška. Za smanjenje pitanja, u ovom papiru predlažemo zajednički model izvlačenja jedne faze, a to je TPLinker, koji je sposoban otkriti preklapanje odnosa koji dijele jednu ili oba entiteta dok su imuni od predrasude izloženosti. TPLinker formulira zajedničku izvlačenje kao problem povezivanja znakova par i uvodi novu režimu označavanja rukovanja koja odgovara graničnim znakovima parova entiteta pod svakim vrstom odnosa. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da TPLinker značajno bolje izvodi na preklapanju i izvlačenju više odnosa i postiže izvršnost stanja umjetnosti na dvije javne podatke.', 'nl': 'Het extraheren van entiteiten en relaties uit ongestructureerde tekst heeft de laatste jaren steeds meer aandacht getrokken, maar blijft een uitdaging, vanwege de intrinsieke moeilijkheid om overlappende relaties met gedeelde entiteiten te identificeren. Eerdere werken tonen aan dat gezamenlijk leren kan leiden tot een merkbare prestatiewinst. Ze hebben echter meestal betrekking op opeenvolgende onderling samenhangende stappen en lijden onder het probleem van blootstellingsbias. Tijdens de training voorspellen ze met de grond waarheidscondities terwijl ze bij conclusie van nul moeten extraheren. Deze discrepantie leidt tot accumulatie van fouten. Om dit probleem te verzachten, stellen we in dit document een eentraps gezamenlijk extractiemodel voor, namelijk TPLinker, dat in staat is overlappende relaties te ontdekken die één of beide entiteiten delen terwijl het immuun is voor de blootstellingsbias. TPLinker formuleert gezamenlijke extractie als een tokenpaar koppelkoppelprobleem en introduceert een nieuw handshaking tagging schema dat de grenstokens van entiteitsparen onder elk relatietype uitlijnt. Uit experimentresultaten blijkt dat TPLinker aanzienlijk beter presteert bij overlappende en meervoudige relatieontwikkeling, en state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt op twee openbare datasets.', 'de': 'Entitäten und Beziehungen aus unstrukturiertem Text zu extrahieren hat in den letzten Jahren immer mehr Aufmerksamkeit auf sich gezogen, bleibt aber schwierig, da es intrinsisch schwierig ist, überlappende Beziehungen mit gemeinsamen Entitäten zu identifizieren. Frühere Arbeiten zeigen, dass gemeinsames Lernen zu einem spürbaren Leistungszuwachs führen kann. Sie beinhalten jedoch in der Regel sequentielle, miteinander verbundene Schritte und leiden unter dem Problem der Expositionsbewegung. Zur Trainingszeit sagen sie mit dem Boden Wahrheitsbedingungen voraus, während sie bei der Schlussfolgerung von Grund auf Extraktion vornehmen müssen. Diese Diskrepanz führt zu Fehlerhäufigkeit. Um das Problem zu mildern, schlagen wir in diesem Beitrag ein einstufiges gemeinsames Extraktionsmodell vor, nämlich TPLinker, das in der Lage ist, überlappende Beziehungen zu entdecken, die eine oder beide Entitäten teilen und gleichzeitig immun gegen den Exposure Bias ist. TPLinker formuliert die gemeinsame Extraktion als Token-Paar-Verknüpfungsproblem und führt ein neuartiges Handshaking-Tagging-Schema ein, das die Begrenzungstoken von Entity-Paaren unter jedem Relationstyp ausrichtet. Die Ergebnisse der Experimente zeigen, dass TPLinker bei der Überlappung und der Extraktion mehrerer Relationen deutlich besser abschneidet und eine State-of-the-Art-Performance auf zwei öffentlichen Datensätzen erzielt.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi entitas dan hubungan dari teks yang tidak terstrukturasi telah menarik perhatian yang semakin meningkat dalam tahun-tahun terakhir tapi tetap menantang, karena kesulitan dalam dalam mengidentifikasi hubungan yang meliputi dengan entitas berbagi. Pekerjaan sebelumnya menunjukkan bahwa pembelajaran kongsi dapat menghasilkan keuntungan prestasi yang terlihat. Namun, mereka biasanya melibatkan langkah-langkah sekuensional yang berhubungan dan menderita dari masalah bias eksposisi. Pada waktu latihan, mereka memprediksi dengan kondisi kebenaran tanah sementara pada kesimpulan itu harus membuat ekstraksi dari nol. Kegagalan ini menyebabkan akumulasi kesalahan. Untuk mengurangi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan dalam kertas ini sebuah model ekstraksi kongsi satu tahap, yaitu, TPLinker, yang mampu menemukan hubungan yang meliputi berbagi satu atau kedua entitas sementara menjadi imun dari bias eksposisi. TPLinker membentuk ekstraksi kongsi sebagai masalah menghubungkan pasangan token dan memperkenalkan skema tagging shaking tangan yang baru yang menyesuaikan token batas pasangan entitas di bawah setiap tipe hubungan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa TPLinker berhasil jauh lebih baik pada saling bertindak dan ekstraksi hubungan berbilang, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada dua set data publik.', 'fa': 'اخراج کردن شرکتها و ارتباطات از متن غیر ساخته توجه بیشتر در سال های اخیر را جذب کرده است ولی به دلیل مشکلات داخلی در شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای متفاوت با شرکت\u200cهای مشترک باقی مانده است. کارهای پیشینه نشان می دهند که یادگیری مشترک می تواند به نتیجه رسیدن کارهای قابل توجه باشد. با این حال، معمولاً آنها مرحله\u200cهای تعاملی با تعامل تعامل می\u200cگیرند و از مشکل تعامل نشان دادن رنج می\u200cگیرند. در زمان آموزش، آنها با شرایط حقیقت زمینی پیش بینی می کنند، در حالی که در ضعیف باید خارج شوند. این اختلاف به جمع خطا می\u200cرسد. برای تخفیف این مسئله، ما در این کاغذ یک مدل استخراج یک مرحله مشترک پیشنهاد می کنیم، یعنی TPLinker، که قادر است کشف رابطه\u200cهای تخفیف با یکی یا هر دو شرکت در حالی که ایمنی از روی تخفیف است. TPLinker به عنوان یک مشکل ارتباط به جفت نشانه\u200cهای ارتباطی فرمول می\u200cکند و یک نقشه\u200cای از نقشه\u200cهای ارتباطی دستگیری تازه را معرفی می\u200cکند که نشانه\u200cهای مرزی جفت\u200cهای ارتباطی زیر هر نوع ارتباطی تطبیق می\u200cکند. نتایج تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که TPLinker با اضافه کردن و تعداد چندین رابطه بهتر عمل می\u200cکند و در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای عمومی انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 비구조화된 텍스트에서 실체와 관계를 추출하는 것은 점점 더 많은 관심을 불러일으켰지만 실체를 식별하고 공유하는 중첩 관계를 식별하기 어려워 여전히 도전적이다.이전의 연구에 의하면 연합 학습은 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있다고 한다.그러나 이들은 순서와 관련된 절차를 다루고 노출 편차가 존재한다.훈련할 때는 기본적인 사실 조건에 따라 예측하고 추리할 때는 처음부터 추출해야 한다.이런 차이는 오차가 누적될 수 있다.이 문제를 완화하기 위해 우리는 본고에서 한 단계 연합 추출 모델, 즉TPLinker를 제시했다. 이것은 한 개 또는 두 개의 실체를 공유하는 중첩 관계를 발견할 수 있고 노출 편차의 영향을 받지 않는다.TPLinker는 연결 문제에 대한 영패 추출을 설명하고, 모든 관계 유형에 실체 쌍의 경계 영패를 맞추는 새로운 악수 표기 방안을 도입했다.실험 결과 TPLinker는 중첩과 다중 관계 추출에 있어 성능이 현저히 향상되었고 두 개의 공공 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다.', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza vifaa na mahusiano kutoka maandishi yasiyoanzishwa vimevutia kuongezeka kwa hisia katika miaka ya hivi karibuni lakini bado vinaendelea changamoto, kwa sababu ya vigumu vya ndani ya kutambua mahusiano yanayohusiana na vifaa vya pamoja. Kazi za awali zinaonyesha kuwa kujifunza pamoja kunaweza kusababisha mafanikio yanayotazama. Hata hivyo, mara nyingi huwa wanahusisha hatua zinazohusiana na mfululizo na kuteswa na tatizo la kuonyesha upendeleo. Wakati wa mafunzo, wanatabiri hali ya ukweli wa ardhi wakati wakati wa janga hili linapaswa kutengenezwa kutoka kwenye viwanja. Utofauti huu unapelekea kukusanya makosa. Ili kupunguza suala hili, tunapendekeza katika karatasi hii modeli ya kujitenga kwa daraja moja, yaani, TPLinker, ambayo inaweza kugundua mahusiano ya kushirikiana na vyombo vingine au vyote hivyo wakati wakiwa na kinga na upendeleo wa kuonyesha. TPLinker inatengeneza utekelezo wa pamoja kama alama ya viwili vinavyounganisha tatizo na kutambulisha mpango wa riwaya wa kutumia mkono unaoandaa alama za mipaka ya wanandoa wa entity chini ya kila aina ya mahusiano. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa TPLinker inafanya vizuri zaidi katika kuongeza upya na kuondolewa kwa mahusiano mbalimbali, na kupata hali ya sanaa katika seti mbili za taarifa za umma.', 'tr': 'Baglanç we sazlary düzümlenmedik tekstden çykarmak soňky ýyllar içinde üns artar, ýöne bu ýagdaýda bölüniş guramlar bilen ýagdaýlaşyklary tanamak kynçylyklaryň sebäbi örän kynçylyk ýok. Öňki işler birlikde öwrenmek üçin tanyş ukyplaryň üstüne getirip biler. Ýöne olar adatça näme-täsirli ýüz-ýüz tutuşmalydyklaryny we görüşme durumlaryň kynçylygyndan çykýarlar. Okuw wagtynda, ýerlik şertleri bilen çykarmak gerekdigini aýdýarlar. Çykarmakdan çykarmak gerekdigini aýdýarlar. Bu döşerlik hata toplamaga sebep edýär. Meseleyi azatlamak üçin, bu kagyzda bir taýdan bir nusga çykarma nusgasyny teklip edýäris, iň. TPLinker, bir ýa-da iki zat bölünýän baglaşyklary a çyp biler, ýöne görüşme durumdan dowam edýär. TPLinker bir gabdaly gaýd etmek üçin bir token çift mesele hökmünde birleştirir we her baglaýyş hili altynda bir taýdan süýtgetme taslamasyny girdir. Testeniň netijesi TPLinker duşuşygy we gaty baglaýyşy çykarmak bilen has gowy bir şekilde etjek bolandygyny görkezýär we iki kamu veri setinde sungatyň durumyny ýetip bilýär.', 'af': "Uitpak van einditeite en relasies van onstruktureerde teks het in onlangse jaar vergroot aandag aangevoer, maar voortgaan vanweë die intrinsiese moeilikheid om oorvloediging van relasies met gedeelde einditeite te identifiseer. Vorige werke wys dat joint leer kan resulteer in 'n aanmerkbere prestasie verkry. Maar hulle het gewoonlik sekwensielle interverwante stappe ingesluit en van die probleem van uitdrukkingsvoorspoedige lyk. Op onderwerp tyd, het hulle voorskou met die grond waarheid voorwaardes terwyl dit by inferensie moet uittrek van skrewe. Hierdie diskreciteit lei na fout akumulering. Om die probleem te verminder, voorstel ons in hierdie papier 'n een-stadige joint extraction model, bedoel TPLinker, wat is in staat om oorvloei relasies te ontdek wat een of beide entiteite deel terwyl immune van die eksponeringsbias is. Name Eksperiment resultate wys dat TPLinker beter uitvoer op oorvloediging en veelvuldige verhouding uitvoer, en bereik staat-van-kuns-uitvoering op twee openbare datastelle.", 'am': 'አካባቢዎችን እና ግንኙነትን ከሀገር ጽሑፍ ማውጣት በቅርብ ዓመታት ላይ ማስታወቂያውን ያበዛል ነገር ግን በተካፈሉት አካባቢዎች ጋር ግንኙነት በማሳየት ግንኙነት በመጠቀም ውስጥ ግንኙነት አቅኝቷል፡፡ አስቀድሞ ሥራ ተማሪ የተጠቃሚ ትምህርት የድምፅ ውጤት ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን በተጨማሪው የግንኙነት እርምጃዎች ይጋጠማሉ፣ የውጤት ክፍልፍል መከራ ይጨምራሉ፡፡ በተማሪዎች ጊዜ የመሬት አካባቢ ውጤት ሲያሳየቁ ከክፍለ ውጤት ማውጣት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህ ጥያቄ የስህተት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ To mitigate the issue, we propose in this paper a one-stage joint extraction model, namely, TPLinker, which is capable of discovering overlapping relations sharing one or both entities while being immune from the exposure bias.  TPLinker forms joint extraction as a token pair linking problem and introduces a novel handshaking scheme that aligns the border signs of entity pairs under each relation type. ከፈተና ውጤቶች TPLinker በሁለት የህዝብ ዳታተሮች ላይ ማሳየት እና በብዛት ግንኙነት ማሳየት የበለጠ ነው የሚታየው ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Nxirja e njësive dhe marrëdhënieve nga teksti i paistrukturuar ka tërhequr vëmendje në rritje në vitet e fundit por mbetet e vështirë, për shkak të vështirësisë së brendshme në identifikimin e marrëdhënieve të kapërcyera me njësitë e përbashkëta. Punët e mëparshme tregojnë se mësimi i përbashkët mund të rezultojë në një fitim të dukshëm performancë. However, they usually involve sequential interrelated steps and suffer from the problem of exposure bias.  At training time, they predict with the ground truth conditions while at inference it has to make extraction from scratch.  Kjo mospërputhje shpie në akumulim gabimesh. Për të lehtësuar çështjen, ne propozojmë në këtë letër një model të përbashkët ekstrahimi në një fazë, veçanërisht TPLinker, i cili është në gjendje të zbulojë lidhje të mbishtypura që ndajnë njërën ose të dy njësitë ndërsa është i imunshëm nga paragjykimet e ekspozitave. TPLinker formulon nxjerrjen e përbashkët si një problem lidhjeje të çiftit token dhe fut një skemë të re të etiketave të shtrëngimit të duarve që rendit token kufitare të çifteve të njësisë nën çdo lloj marrëdhënie. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë se TPLinker performon ndjeshëm më mirë në mbishtypjen dhe nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të shumta dhe arrin shfaqjen më të lartë në dy grupe të dhënash publike.', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում անկառուցված տեքստից առանձին ուշադրություն է գրավել անկառուցվածներին և հարաբերություններին, սակայն շարունակում է դժվար լինել, որովհետև ընդհանուր կազմակերպությունների հետ կապված հարաբերությունները բացահայտելու բնակ Նախորդ աշխատանքները ցույց են տալիս, որ միասին սովորելը կարող է նշանակալի բարձրացում ունենալ: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք սովորաբար ներառում են հաջորդական փոխկապակցված քայլեր և տառապում են արտահայտության կողմնականության խնդիրից: Արժեքի ժամանակ նրանք կանխագուշակում են հիմնական ճշմարտության պայմանները, մինչդեռ հետևանքներում այն պետք է զրոյից դուրս բերի: Այս անհամապատասխանությունը հանգեցնում է սխալների աճի: Այս խնդիրը նվազեցնելու համար մենք այս թղթի մեջ առաջարկում ենք մեկ փուլում ընդհանուր վերացման մոդել, հատկապես ԹՊԼինքերը, որը կարող է հայտնաբերել կապված հարաբերությունները, որոնք կիսում են մեկ կամ երկու անհատներին, մինչդեռ իմունին են արտահայտության կո ԹՊ-Լինկերը ձևավորում է միավոր արտահանումը որպես նշանների զույգ կապող խնդիր և ներկայացնում է նոր ձեռքերով շարժվող նշանների ծրագիր, որը հարաբերության յուրաքանչյուր տեսակի մեջ հավասարեցնում է էության զույգերի սահմանները: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ԹՊ-Լինքերը շատ ավելի լավ աշխատում են կապված և բազմաթիվ հարաբերությունների վերացման վրա, և հասնում է երկու հանրային տվյալների համակարգերի ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին:', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে প্রতিষ্ঠিত লেখা থেকে বস্তুগুলো এবং সম্পর্ক বের করার ক্ষেত্রে মনোযোগ বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করেছে কিন্তু তারা এখনো চ্যালেঞ্জ করছ প্রাথমিক কাজ দেখাচ্ছে যে যোগাযোগ শিক্ষা দেখতে পাচ্ছে একটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি অর্জনের ফলে। তবে তারা সাধারণত পরস্পরের সংশ্লিষ্ট পদক্ষেপের সাথে যুক্ত এবং প্রকাশের বিভাগের সমস্যা থেকে ভোগ করে। প্রশিক্ষণের সময়, তারা ভূমিতে সত্য পরিস্থিতি দিয়ে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করেছে যখন অসুস্থ হওয়ার সময় এটাকে ক্লাচ থেকে বের করতে হবে। এই বৈষম্যের ফলে ত্রুটি সংগ্রহের কাছে যায়। এই বিষয়টি কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য, আমরা এই পাতায় একটি মাত্র এক মাত্রিক যোগাযোগ বিনিময় মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যার মাধ্যমে টিপিলিঙ্কার, যা এক বা উভয় বস্তুকে প্রকাশিত বিভাগ থে TPLinker একটি চিহ্নিত জোড়া সমস্যা হিসেবে যোগাযোগ বিনিময়ের বিনিময়ে তৈরি করে এবং প্রত্যেক সম্পর্কের ধরনের সীমান্ত জোড়ার সীমান্তের সীমান্ত প্রতী Experiment results show that TPLinker performs significantly better on overlapping and multiple relation extraction, and achieves state-of-the-art performance on two public datasets.', 'bs': 'Izvlačenje subjekta i odnosa iz neostrukturnog teksta privuklo je veću pažnju u posljednjih godina, ali je i dalje izazovno zbog unutrašnjih poteškoća u identifikaciji preklapanja odnosa sa zajedničkim subjektima. Prije poslova pokazuju da zajedničko učenje može rezultirati primjetljivom postupku izvedbe. Međutim, oni obično uključuju sekvencijske međusobne korake i pate od problema predrasude izloženosti. U vrijeme treninga predviđaju pod zemljom istinskim uvjetima, dok se inficira, mora izvući iz ogrebotine. Ova neslaganost vodi do akumulacije greška. Da bi smanjili problem, u ovom papiru predlažemo zajednički model izvlačenja jedne faze, a to je TPLinker, koji je sposoban da otkrije preklapanje odnosa koji dijele jednu ili oba entiteta dok su imuni od predrasude izloženosti. TPLinker formuliše zajedničku ekstrakciju kao problem povezivanja znakova par i predstavlja novu režimu oznake za rukovanje koji odgovara graničnim znakovima parova entiteta pod svakim vrstom odnosa. Rezultati eksperimenta pokazuju da TPLinker čini značajno bolje pri izvlačenju preklapanja i više odnosa i postiže izvršnost države umjetnosti na dvije javne baze podataka.', 'az': 'İnsanları və əlaqələri qurulmadığı məktublardan çıxartmaq son illərdə təsiri artırmaq üçün daha çox çətin idi, amma paylaşılmış vəzifələrlə birlikdə olan əlaqələri tanıtmaq çətindir. Əvvəlki işlər birlikdə öyrənmək mümkün olaraq mümkün olaraq baş verə bilər. Halbuki onlar genellikle müxtəlif dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləri içindədirlər və açıq-aşkar dəyişikliklərin problemindən çəkilirlər. Onlar təhsil vaxtında yerli həqiqət şartları ilə təxmin edirlər, çünki həqiqət şartları aşağılıqdan çıxarılması lazımdır. Bu müxtəlif xəta toplamasına yol göstərir. Bu məsələni azaltmaq üçün, bu kağıtda bir-fərqi birlikdə istifadə etmə modeli təklif edirik ki, TPLinker, bir və ya ikisini birlikdə paylaşan ilişkileri keşf edə bilər. TPLinker birləşdirilməsi bir token çift problemi olaraq ifadə edir və hər bir ilişki türünün altında növ çiftlərin sınır işaretlərini müəyyən edir. Experience sonuçları TPLinker çoxluğu və çoxlu əlaqələr çıxarılmasında çoxlu daha yaxşı işlər edir və iki kamu verilən qurma qurmaqlarında mövcuddur.', 'cs': 'Extrahování entit a vztahů z nestrukturovaného textu přitahuje v posledních letech stále větší pozornost, ale zůstává náročné vzhledem k vnitřní obtížnosti identifikovat překrývající se vztahy se sdílenými entitami. Předchozí práce ukazují, že společné učení může vést ke znatelnému zvýšení výkonu. Obvykle však zahrnují postupné vzájemně propojené kroky a trpí problémem expozičního biasu. V době tréninku předpovídají podmínky pravdy, zatímco při závěru musí provést extrakci od začátku. Tato nesrovnalost vede k hromadění chyb. Pro zmírnění této problematiky navrhujeme v tomto článku jednostupňový model společné extrakce TPLinker, který je schopen odhalit překrývající se vztahy sdílející jednu nebo obě entity a zároveň je imunní vůči expozičnímu biasu. TPLinker formuluje společnou extrakci jako problém propojení tokenových párů a zavádí nové schéma tagování rukou shaking, které zarovnává hraniční tokeny párů entit pod každým typem relace. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že TPLinker výrazně lépe funguje při překrývání a extrakci více vztahů a dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu na dvou veřejných datových sadách.', 'et': 'Üksuste ja suhete väljavõtmine struktureerimata tekstist on viimastel aastatel pälvinud järjest rohkem tähelepanu, kuid on endiselt keeruline, sest ühiste üksustega kattuvaid suhteid on raske tuvastada. Varasemad tööd näitavad, et ühine õppimine võib põhjustada märgatavat jõudluse kasvu. Siiski hõlmavad need tavaliselt järjestikuseid omavahel seotud samme ja kannatavad kokkupuute kallutamise probleemi all. Treeningu ajal prognoosivad nad maapinna tõeseid tingimusi, samas kui järeldusel tuleb see nullist välja võtta. See lahknevus põhjustab vigade kogunemist. Selle probleemi leevendamiseks pakume käesolevas töös välja üheastmelise liigese ekstraheerimise mudeli, nimelt TPLinkeri, mis suudab avastada kattuvaid suhteid, mis jagavad üht või mõlemat üksust, olles samal ajal immuunne kokkupuute eelarvamuste eest. TPLinker sõnastab ühise ekstraheerimise märkpaari linkimise probleemina ja tutvustab uut käepigistamise märgistusskeemi, mis joondab olemipaari piirimärgid iga seostüübi all. Katsetulemused näitavad, et TPLinker toimib märkimisväärselt paremini kattuvate ja mitme seose ekstraheerimisel ning saavutab kahe avaliku andmekogumi tipptasemel jõudluse.', 'ca': "Extracting entities and relations from unstructured text has attracted increasing attention in recent years but remains challenging, due to the intrinsic difficulty in identifying overlapping relations with shared entities.  Els treballs anteriors mostren que l'aprenentatge conjunt pot resultar en un notable guany de rendiment. Però normalment impliquen pas seqüencials relacionats i pateixen el problema del bias d'exposició. En el temps de l'entrenament, predien amb les condicions de veritat terrestre mentre en inferència ha de fer extracció de zero. Aquesta discrepancia porta a l'acumulació d'errors. Per mitigar la qüestió, proposem en aquest paper un model d'extracció conjunta d'una etapa, a saber, TPLinker, que és capaç de descobrir relacions sovrapposades compartint una o ambdues entitats mentre està immunitat del bias d'exposició. TPLinker formula joint extraction as a token pair linking problem and introduces a new handshake tagging scheme that aligns the boundary tokens of entity pairs under each relationship type. Els resultats d'experiments demostren que TPLinker té un rendiment significativament millor en la sobreposició i l'extracció de relacions múltiples, i aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat en dos conjunts de dades públics.", 'fi': 'Entiteettien ja suhteiden erottaminen strukturoimattomasta tekstistä on herättänyt viime vuosina yhä enemmän huomiota, mutta se on edelleen haastavaa, koska päällekkäisten suhteiden tunnistaminen jaettujen entiteettien kanssa on luontaisesti vaikeaa. Aiemmat tutkimukset osoittavat, että yhteinen oppiminen voi johtaa huomattavaan suorituskykyyn. Ne ovat kuitenkin yleensä peräkkäisiä toisiinsa liittyviä vaiheita ja kärsivät altistumisen vääristymisestä. Harjoittelun aikana he ennustavat totuudellisia olosuhteita, kun taas päätellen sen on tehtävä poisto tyhjästä. Tämä poikkeama johtaa virheiden kertymiseen. Ongelman lieventämiseksi ehdotamme tässä artikkelissa yksivaiheista niveluuttamismallia, nimittäin TPLinker, joka kykenee havaitsemaan päällekkäisiä suhteita, jotka jakavat yhden tai molempien entiteettien samalla kun on immuuni altistumisharhalta. TPLinker muotoilee yhteisen uuttamisen tokeniparin linkitysongelmana ja esittelee uuden kädenpuristuksen tagging-järjestelmän, joka kohdistaa entiteettiparien rajamerkit kunkin relaatiotyypin alla. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että TPLinker suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin päällekkäisissä ja monisuhteisissa poistoissa ja saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn kahdessa julkisessa aineistossa.', 'sk': 'Izvlečevanje entitet in odnosov iz nestrukturiranega besedila je v zadnjih letih pritegnilo vse večjo pozornost, vendar ostaja izziv zaradi notranjih težav pri ugotavljanju prekrivanja odnosov s skupnimi entitetami. Predhodna dela kažejo, da lahko skupno učenje povzroči opazno povečanje uspešnosti. Vendar pa običajno vključujejo zaporedne medsebojno povezane korake in trpijo zaradi težav pristranskosti izpostavljenosti. V času treninga napovedujejo z resničnimi pogoji, medtem ko sklepajo, da morajo izvleči iz nič. To razliko povzroči kopičenje napak. Za ublažitev tega vprašanja v prispevku predlagamo enostopenjski model ekstrakcije sklepov, in sicer TPLinker, ki je sposoben odkriti prekrivajoče se odnose, ki delijo eno ali obe entiteti, hkrati pa je imun pred pristranskostjo izpostavljenosti. TPLinker formulira skupno ekstrakcijo kot problem povezovanja žetonov par in uvaja novo shemo označevanja, ki poravnava mejne žetone parov entitet pod vsako vrsto relacije. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da je TPLinker bistveno boljši pri prekrivanju in ekstrakciji več relacij ter dosega najsodobnejše delovanje na dveh javnih naborih podatkov.', 'jv': 'Mbok ndheke sampeyan karo perusahaan kelas nang teks sing ora bisa structural dumadhi iki dadi ono akeh dumadhi kapan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan ingkang dianggap kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan opera sing berarti iki. ProgressBarUpdates politenessoffpolite, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging ora takaraning, dheweke ngerasakno ngono aturan sing perduhaan kanggo ngerasakno Gobudhakan iki bakal mudyane sampeyan error Mbok tanggal nggawe kesempatan winih, kita enyestek dhéwé ning alih iki dadi model nggawe extraksi sing perusahaan, nambah, tPLinker, sing iso nggawe nguasai perusahaan interaké sing beraksi iki dadi sampeyan karo hal sebeh dumadhi kaé biasane NPLinker Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་གཞུང་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་དབང་ཆ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་གཏམ་བཅུག་ཡོད། དེ་ནའང་དེ་འདྲ་བའི་ སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྩོམ་པ་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་རྐྱེན་དུ་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། དུས་ཚོད་གླེང་མོལ་དང་། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་རྨང་གཞི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དགོས། discrepancy་འདི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཆེ་བསམ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་དག་བཟོ་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་མཛུབ་གླིང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་ལས་ཀྱང་མཐུན་བཟོ་རྒྱུ་དང་། TPLinker formulates joint extraction as a token pair linking problem and introduces a novel handshaking tagging scheme that aligns the boundary tokens of entity pairs under each relation type. Experiment results show that TPLinker performs significantly better on overlapping and multiple relationships extraction and achieves state-of-the-art performance on public data sets two.', 'ha': "Extractin abubuwa da mazaɓa daga matsayin wanda ba'a yi sahu ba, yã ƙara muhalli a cikin shekara na farko, kuma amma yana da tsõratar, saboda haka, don ka sami matalauta da yin ganin ka gane masu haɗi da abubuwa da aka raba shi. Prior works show that joint learning can result in a noticeable performance gain.  Haƙĩƙa, ko da yaushe, sun shiga hanyõyi masu husũma a dabam, kuma suna cũtar da matsalar ta bayani. Ga zaman shawarar, sun yi bayani da halin bakin gaske da kuma a kasancẽwa, sai ya sami ta daga taɓa. Wannan afanci na ƙara zuwa kure. To, idan an cire masu al'amarin, za mu buƙata cikin wannan takarda wata misalin cire-daban da ke samu'a, TPLinkere, wanda ya iya iya iya gane masu shari da taraki guda ko duk abubuwa a lokacin da za'a tsare shi daga sharrin bayani. TPLinkers forms the Join Extracti as a symbol case-biyu linking and introduces a novel grabbing Scheme that alirar the border symbol of item par biyu below each related kind. Matarin jarrabãwa na nuna TPLinger na aikata mai kyau a kan rufe kuma mai nuna wa masu haɗi masu yawa, kuma ya sami babban-state-the-art kan danna biyu.", 'he': 'הוצאת יחסים ומערכות יחסים מטקסט לא מבושל משיכה תשומת לב גדולה בשנים האחרונות, אך נשארת מאתגרת, בגלל הקשה הפנימית לזהות יחסים מתקפלים עם יחסים משותפים. עבודות קודמות מראות שלימודים משותפים יכולים לגרום לזכות ביצועים משמעותית. בכל אופן, הם בדרך כלל מעורבים צעדים רצופיים שקשורים ביניהם וסבלים מהבעיה של ההנחות. בזמן האימונים, הם חושפים עם תנאי האמת האדמה בזמן שהתוצאה היא צריכה להוציא מחוץ לאפס. ההבדל הזה מוביל לאספת טעויות. כדי להקל את הנושא, אנו מציעים בעיתון הזה מודל חידוש משותף בשלב אחד, כלומר, TPLinker, שהוא מסוגל לגלות מערכות יחסים מתמודדות יחסים מתמודדות אחת או שתי יחידות בזמן שהיא חסינה מהחיסוי. TPLinker מייצר יצירה משותפת כבעיה של קישור זוג סימנים ומציג מערכת סימנים חדשה לחיצת יד שמתאימת את סימני הגבול של זוגות יחסים מתחת לכל סוג יחסים. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שTPLinker מבצע טוב יותר באופן משמעותי על מערכת מידע מתקפלת ומספרת יחסים, ולהשיג ביצועים חדשים בשני קבוצות נתונים ציבוריים.'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification for Short Texts', 'ar': 'تحديد اللغة العميقة واللهجة للنصوص القصيرة غير الخاضعة للإشراف', 'pt': 'Identificação profunda não supervisionada de linguagem e dialeto para textos curtos', 'es': 'Identificación profunda no supervisada de idiomas y dialectos para textos cortos', 'fr': 'Identification profonde non supervisée du langage et du dialecte pour les textes courts', 'ja': '短いテキストのための監督されていない深い言語と方言の識別', 'zh': '短文本无监深言语方言识别', 'hi': 'लघु ग्रंथों के लिए असुरक्षित गहरी भाषा और बोली पहचान', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемая глубокая идентификация языка и диалекта для коротких текстов', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Doimhneachta Teanga agus Canúintí le haghaidh Téacsanna Gearra', 'ka': 'მარტივი ტექსტისთვის განსაზღვრებული ძალიან ენაა და დიალექტის განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli mély nyelv és tárcsás azonosítás rövid szövegekhez', 'el': 'Ανεπίβλεπτη Βαθιά Γλώσσα και Διαλεκτική Αναγνώριση για Σύντομα Κείμενα', 'it': 'Identificazione del linguaggio profondo non sorvegliato e del dialetto per i testi brevi', 'kk': 'Қысқа мәтіндер үшін қолданылмаған түпнұсқа тіл мен таңдау идентификациясы', 'mk': 'Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification for Short Texts', 'lt': 'Neaprižiūrima gili kalba ir trumpųjų tekstų nuoroda', 'ms': 'Bahasa Dalam Tak Dipengawasi dan Pengenalan Dialeksi untuk Teks Pergi', 'mn': 'Богино текстийн гүнзгий хэл болон сонголтын тодорхойлолт', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷയും വായിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-Identifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Profonda u d-Dijaletta Mhux Sorveljata għal Testijiet Qasira', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta dyppa språk og utsjånad for kort tekst', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowana identyfikacja głębokiego języka i dialektu dla krótkich tekstów', 'ro': 'Identificarea limbajului profund nesupravegheat și a dialectului pentru texte scurte', 'sr': 'Необезвршена глубока језика и диалеантна идентификация за кратке текстове', 'si': 'කොටු පාළුව සඳහා ගොඩක් භාෂාව සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga luuqada hoose ee aan la ilaalinayn', 'sv': 'Icke övervakad djupspråk och dialekt identifiering för korta texter', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத ஆழம் மற்றும் குறைந்த உரைகளுக்கான உரையாடல் அடையாளம்', 'ur': 'غیر محافظت کی عمیق زبان اور کوٹی ٹیکسٹ کے لئے ڈائیلٹ شناسایی', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Không giám sát ngôn ngữ sâu và khả năng nhận diện các đoạn ngắn', 'bg': 'Неконтролиран дълбок език и идентификация на диалект за кратки текстове', 'nl': 'Ongecontroleerde Deep Language en Dialect Identificatie voor korte teksten', 'da': 'Ikke-overvåget dybt sprog og dialekt identifikation for korte tekster', 'hr': 'Nepotrebna duboka jezika i identifikacija dijaliziranja za kratke tekste', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigte Deep Language und Dialect Identification für kurze Texte', 'id': 'Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification for Short Texts', 'ko': '짧은 텍스트의 무감독 심층 언어와 사투리 식별', 'fa': 'زبان عمیق غیرقانونی و شناسایی انتخاب برای متن کوتاه', 'sw': 'Language', 'tr': 'Qısqa metinler üçin Saýlamak Derje Dili we Saýlamak Kimligi', 'af': 'Onondersteunde Deep Taal en Dialeksie Identifikasie vir Kort Teks', 'sq': 'Gjuha e thellë e pa mbikqyrur dhe identifikimi i dialektit për tekste të shkurtra', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification for Short Texts', 'bn': 'সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সটের জন্য গভীর ভাষা এবং ডায়ালেক্টর পরিচিতি', 'az': '쑑玱慱洠瑥湩쥬犙쌠쎼쎧溼椠瑳晩摡駉攠楤浬駉業鿅搠牥湩搠汩瘠駉䐠慩匠썥榧\u206d楋汭歩쥬犙੩', 'bs': 'Nepotrebna duboka jezika i identifikacija dijalekta za kratke tekste', 'ca': 'Llingua profunda i identificació de diàlectes no supervisades per textos curts', 'cs': 'Nekontrolovaná hluboká identifikace jazyka a dialektu pro krátké texty', 'et': 'Järelevalveta sügav keel ja dialekti identifitseerimine lühikeste tekstide jaoks', 'fi': 'Tarkkailematon syväkieli ja dialektitunnistus lyhyille teksteille', 'jv': 'deep', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovan globoki jezik in identifikacija dialektov za kratka besedila', 'he': 'שפה עמוקה ללא השגחה והזיהוי חיבור לטקסטים קצרים', 'bo': 'མཐོ་ཆུང་ཐེངས་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གནད་འདུག་དང་བཀོད་རྟགས་མཚོན་རྟགས'}
{'en': 'Automatic Language Identification (LI) or Dialect Identification (DI) of short texts of closely related languages or dialects, is one of the primary steps in many natural language processing pipelines. Language identification is considered a solved task in many cases ; however, in the case of very closely related languages, or in an unsupervised scenario (where the languages are not known in advance), performance is still poor. In this paper, we propose the Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) method, which can simultaneously learn sentence embeddings and cluster assignments from short texts. The UDLDI model understands the sentence constructions of languages by applying attention to character relations which helps to optimize the clustering of languages. We have performed our experiments on three short-text datasets for different language families, each consisting of closely related languages or dialects, with very minimal training sets. Our experimental evaluations on these datasets have shown significant improvement over state-of-the-art unsupervised methods and our model has outperformed state-of-the-art LI and DI systems in supervised settings.', 'fr': "L'identification automatique de la langue (LI) ou l'identification des dialectes (DI) de courts textes de langues ou de dialectes étroitement apparentés est l'une des principales étapes de nombreux processus de traitement du langage naturel. L'identification de la langue est considérée comme une tâche résolue dans de nombreux cas\xa0; cependant, dans le cas de langues très proches ou dans un scénario non supervisé (où les langues ne sont pas connues à l'avance), les performances restent faibles. Dans cet article, nous proposons la méthode UDLDI (Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification), qui permet d'apprendre simultanément les intégrations de phrases et les affectations de clusters à partir de textes courts. Le modèle UDLDI comprend les constructions de phrases des langues en accordant une attention particulière aux relations entre les caractères, ce qui permet d'optimiser le regroupement des langues. Nous avons réalisé nos expériences sur trois ensembles de données de textes courts pour différentes familles de langues, chacune composée de langues ou de dialectes étroitement liés, avec un minimum de jeux de formation. Nos évaluations expérimentales sur ces ensembles de données ont montré une amélioration significative par rapport aux méthodes non supervisées de pointe et notre modèle a surpassé les systèmes LI et DI de pointe dans les environnements supervisés.", 'pt': 'A Identificação Automática de Idioma (LI) ou Identificação de Dialeto (DI) de textos curtos de idiomas ou dialetos intimamente relacionados é uma das etapas principais em muitos pipelines de processamento de linguagem natural. A identificação do idioma é considerada uma tarefa resolvida em muitos casos; no entanto, no caso de linguagens muito próximas, ou em um cenário não supervisionado (onde as linguagens não são conhecidas antecipadamente), o desempenho ainda é ruim. Neste artigo, propomos o método Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI), que pode aprender simultaneamente a inserção de sentenças e atribuições de cluster a partir de textos curtos. O modelo UDLDI compreende as construções de sentenças das línguas, aplicando atenção às relações de caracteres, o que ajuda a otimizar o agrupamento das línguas. Realizamos nossos experimentos em três conjuntos de dados de texto curto para diferentes famílias de idiomas, cada um consistindo em idiomas ou dialetos intimamente relacionados, com conjuntos de treinamento muito mínimos. Nossas avaliações experimentais nesses conjuntos de dados mostraram uma melhoria significativa em relação aos métodos não supervisionados de última geração e nosso modelo superou os sistemas LI e DI de última geração em configurações supervisionadas.', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف التلقائي على اللغة (LI) أو التعرف على اللهجات (DI) للنصوص القصيرة للغات أو اللهجات وثيقة الصلة ، إحدى الخطوات الأساسية في العديد من خطوط أنابيب معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. يعتبر تحديد اللغة مهمة محلولة في كثير من الحالات ؛ ومع ذلك ، في حالة اللغات وثيقة الصلة جدًا ، أو في سيناريو غير خاضع للإشراف (حيث لا تكون اللغات معروفة مسبقًا) ، لا يزال الأداء ضعيفًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة تحديد اللغة العميقة واللهجة غير الخاضعة للرقابة (UDLDI) ، والتي يمكن أن تتعلم في نفس الوقت تضمين الجمل والتخصيصات العنقودية من النصوص القصيرة. يفهم نموذج UDLDI تراكيب الجمل للغات من خلال الانتباه إلى العلاقات الشخصية التي تساعد على تحسين تجميع اللغات. لقد أجرينا تجاربنا على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات نصية قصيرة لعائلات لغوية مختلفة ، تتكون كل منها من لغات أو لهجات وثيقة الصلة ، مع حد أدنى من مجموعات التدريب. أظهرت تقييماتنا التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات هذه تحسنًا كبيرًا على أحدث الأساليب غير الخاضعة للإشراف ، وقد تفوق نموذجنا على أحدث أنظمة LI و DI في الإعدادات الخاضعة للإشراف.', 'es': 'La identificación automática de idiomas (LI) o la identificación de dialectos (DI) de textos cortos de idiomas o dialectos estrechamente relacionados es uno de los pasos principales en muchos procesos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. La identificación del idioma se considera una tarea resuelta en muchos casos; sin embargo, en el caso de idiomas muy estrechamente relacionados, o en un escenario no supervisado (donde los idiomas no se conocen de antemano), el rendimiento sigue siendo deficiente. En este artículo, proponemos el método de identificación profunda no supervisada de lenguaje y dialecto (UDLDI), que puede aprender simultáneamente incrustaciones de oraciones y asignaciones de grupos a partir de textos cortos. El modelo UDLDI comprende las construcciones de oraciones de los idiomas al prestar atención a las relaciones de los caracteres, lo que ayuda a optimizar la agrupación de idiomas. Hemos realizado nuestros experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos de texto corto para diferentes familias de idiomas, cada uno de los cuales consta de idiomas o dialectos estrechamente relacionados, con conjuntos de formación mínimos. Nuestras evaluaciones experimentales en estos conjuntos de datos han demostrado una mejora significativa con respecto a los métodos no supervisados de última generación y nuestro modelo ha superado a los sistemas de LI e DI de última generación en entornos supervisados.', 'zh': '语言方言之短文本自言 (LI) 识 (DI) 众自然语言之大体也。 言多者,言识以为一解也;言知者,谓之一解也。 然密相关语,或在无监督(语先不知),性犹劣也。 本文无监督深语及方言识(UDLDI)法,可兼从短文本中学句嵌聚类赋值。 UDLDI以关注字符解言句,此助优化言之聚类也。 已于异家三短文本数集实验之,每数集都密语言方言,训练甚少。 凡此诸实验,与最先进无监督之法相比,吾形于监境之中,优于先进之LIDI。', 'ja': '密接に関連する言語または方言の短いテキストの自動言語識別（ LI ）または方言識別（ DI ）は、多くの自然言語処理パイプラインの主要なステップの1つです。 多くの場合、言語の識別は解決されたタスクと見なされます。しかし、非常に密接に関連する言語の場合、または（言語が事前に知られていない）監督されていないシナリオの場合、パフォーマンスは依然として低いです。 本稿では，短いテキストから文章の埋め込みとクラスターの割り当てを同時に学ぶことができる， Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI)法を提案する． UDLDIモデルは、言語のクラスタリングを最適化するのに役立つ文字関係に注意を払うことによって、言語の文章構成を理解します。 私たちは、それぞれが密接に関連する言語または方言で構成され、非常に最小限のトレーニングセットで、異なる言語ファミリーのための3つの短文データセットの実験を行いました。 これらのデータセットに対する当社の実験的評価は、最先端の非監督方法よりも大幅に改善されており、当社のモデルは、監督された環境で最先端のLIおよびDIシステムを上回っています。', 'hi': 'निकट से संबंधित भाषाओं या बोलियों के छोटे ग्रंथों की स्वचालित भाषा पहचान (LI) या बोली पहचान (DI), कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण पाइपलाइनों में प्राथमिक चरणों में से एक है। भाषा की पहचान को कई मामलों में एक हल किया गया कार्य माना जाता है; हालांकि, बहुत बारीकी से संबंधित भाषाओं के मामले में, या एक असुरक्षित परिदृश्य में (जहां भाषाओं को पहले से ज्ञात नहीं किया जाता है), प्रदर्शन अभी भी खराब है। इस पेपर में, हम Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक साथ छोटे ग्रंथों से वाक्य एम्बेडिंग और क्लस्टर असाइनमेंट सीख सकता है। UDLDI मॉडल चरित्र संबंधों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करके भाषाओं के वाक्य निर्माण को समझता है जो भाषाओं के क्लस्टरिंग को अनुकूलित करने में मदद करता है। हमने विभिन्न भाषा परिवारों के लिए तीन लघु-पाठ डेटासेट पर अपने प्रयोगों का प्रदर्शन किया है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक में बहुत कम प्रशिक्षण सेट के साथ निकटता से संबंधित भाषाओं या बोलियों से मिलकर बना है। इन डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन ने अत्याधुनिक असुरक्षित तरीकों पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार दिखाया है और हमारे मॉडल ने पर्यवेक्षित सेटिंग्स में अत्याधुनिक एलआई और डीआई सिस्टम को पछाड़ दिया है।', 'ru': 'Автоматическая языковая идентификация (LI) или диалектная идентификация (DI) коротких текстов тесно связанных языков или диалектов является одним из основных шагов во многих конвейерах обработки естественного языка. Во многих случаях идентификация языков считается решенной задачей; однако в случае очень близких родственных языков или в неконтролируемом сценарии (когда языки не известны заранее), производительность все еще низка. В этой статье мы предлагаем метод неконтролируемой глубокой языковой и диалектной идентификации (UDLDI), который может одновременно изучать вложения предложений и назначения кластеров из коротких текстов. Модель UDLDI понимает структуры предложений языков, уделяя внимание отношениям символов, что помогает оптимизировать кластеризацию языков. Мы провели эксперименты с тремя наборами коротких текстовых данных для разных языковых семейств, каждый из которых состоит из близкородственных языков или диалектов, с очень минимальными обучающими наборами. Наши экспериментальные оценки этих наборов данных показали значительное улучшение по сравнению с современными неконтролируемыми методами, и наша модель превзошла современные системы LI и DI в контролируемых условиях.', 'ga': 'Tá Aitheantas Uathoibríoch Teanga (LI) nó Aithint Canúintí (DI) de théacsanna gearra de theangacha nó de chanúintí a bhfuil dlúthbhaint acu leo, ar cheann de na príomhchéimeanna i go leor píblínte próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Breathnaítear ar shainaithint teanga mar thasc réitithe i mórán cásanna; áfach, i gcás teangacha atá an-ghar, nó i gcás gan mhaoirseacht (nuair nach bhfuil na teangacha ar eolas roimh ré), tá feidhmíocht lag fós. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid an modh Aitheantais Dhoimhneachta agus Chanúintí Gan Maoirseacht (UDLDI), ar féidir leabú abairtí agus tascanna cnuasaithe a fhoghlaim ó théacsanna gearra ag an am céanna. Tuigeann an tsamhail UDLDI tógáil abairtí teangacha trí aird a dhíriú ar chaidrimh charachtair a chuidíonn le cnuasach teangacha a bharrfheabhsú. Rinneamar ár dturgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí gearrthéacs do theaghlaigh teanga éagsúla, gach ceann comhdhéanta de theangacha nó de chanúintí a bhfuil dlúthbhaint acu leo, gan ach fíorbheagán tacair oiliúna. Tá feabhas suntasach léirithe ag ár meastóireachtaí turgnamhacha ar na tacair sonraí seo ar na modhanna neamh-mhaoirsithe úrscothacha agus tá sárfheidhmíocht ag ár samhail ar chórais LI agus DI den scoth i suíomhanna maoirsithe.', 'ka': 'ავტომატური ენის იდენტიფიკაცია (LI) ან დიალექტის იდენტიფიკაცია (DI) მხოლოდ დაკავშირებული ენების ან დიალექტის კონტაქტი ტექსტის ერთი არის ბევრი ნაირადი ენის პროცესტირების პირვე ენის ინდიდენტიფიკაცია უფრო მეტად განსაზღვრებულია რაოდენობაში; მაგრამ, ძალიან ძალიან მხოლოდ დაკავშირებული ენების შემთხვევაში, ან არ განსხვავებული სინარიოში (სადაც ენების წინ უცნობილი არაა წინ), კონფიგურაცია უკეთესია. ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ მინდომებით განსხვავებული ძალიან ძალიან ენერგია და დიალექტის ინდიდიტიფიკაცია (UDLDI) Metode, რომელიც შეუძლია ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ სიტყვების ინბექტირება და კლასტერის აღწ UDLDI მოდელის შესახებ ენების კონტუქციების შესახებ, რომლებიც მოხმარებს სიმბოლოების შესახებ, რომლებიც ენების კოსტურაციის ოპტიმიზაციას. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთეთ სამი კრეტქტური ტექსტის მონაცემები განსხვავებული ენის ოჯახისთვის, ყველა მხოლოდ დაკავშირებული ენები ან ეთალექტების შესახებ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური განსაზღვრებები ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გაჩვენეთ მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვრებული მეტოვების შესახებ და ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება LI და DI სისტემებში მონაცემებით.', 'el': 'Η Αυτόματη Αναγνώριση Γλωσσών (ή Διαλεκτική Αναγνώριση) σύντομων κειμένων στενά συνδεδεμένων γλωσσών ή διαλέκτων, είναι ένα από τα κύρια βήματα σε πολλούς αγωγούς επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ο γλωσσικός προσδιορισμός θεωρείται επιλυμένο έργο σε πολλές περιπτώσεις. Ωστόσο, στην περίπτωση πολύ στενά συνδεδεμένων γλωσσών ή σε σενάριο χωρίς επίβλεψη (όπου οι γλώσσες δεν είναι γνωστές εκ των προτέρων), οι επιδόσεις εξακολουθούν να είναι ανεπαρκείς. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε τη μέθοδο που μπορεί ταυτόχρονα να μάθει ενσωματώσεις προτάσεων και αναθέσεις ομαδοποίησης από σύντομα κείμενα. Το μοντέλο κατανοεί τις προτάσεις των γλωσσών εφαρμόζοντας προσοχή στις σχέσεις χαρακτήρων που βοηθούν στη βελτιστοποίηση της ομαδοποίησης γλωσσών. Έχουμε πραγματοποιήσει τα πειράματά μας σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων σύντομου κειμένου για διαφορετικές γλωσσικές οικογένειες, τα οποία αποτελούνται από στενά συνδεδεμένες γλώσσες ή διαλέκτες, με ελάχιστα εκπαιδευτικά σύνολα. Οι πειραματικές αξιολογήσεις μας σε αυτά τα σύνολα δεδομένων έχουν δείξει σημαντική βελτίωση σε σχέση με τις υπερσύγχρονες μεθόδους χωρίς επίβλεψη και το μοντέλο μας έχει ξεπεράσει τα σύγχρονα συστήματα σε εποπτευόμενες ρυθμίσεις.', 'hu': 'A szorosan rokon nyelvek vagy dialektusok rövid szövegeinek automatikus nyelvazonosítása (LI) vagy dialekt azonosítása (DI) számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozó csővezeték egyik elsődleges lépése. A nyelvazonosítás sok esetben megoldott feladatnak tekinthető; azonban a nagyon szorosan kapcsolódó nyelvek esetében, vagy felügyelet nélküli forgatókönyv esetében (ahol a nyelveket előre nem ismerik) a teljesítmény még mindig gyenge. Jelen tanulmányban javasoljuk a Felügyeletlen Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) módszert, amely rövid szövegekből egyidejűleg képes mondatbeágyazásokat és klaszterek hozzárendeléseket tanulni. Az UDLDI modell megérti a nyelvek mondatszerkezetét azzal, hogy figyelmet fordít a karakterkapcsolatokra, ami segít optimalizálni a nyelvek klaszterezését. Kísérleteinket három különböző nyelvcsaládok számára készítettük rövid szövegű adatkészleten, amelyek mindegyike szorosan rokon nyelvekből vagy dialektusokból áll, nagyon minimális képzési készletekkel. Ezeken az adatkészleteken végzett kísérleti értékelések jelentős javulást mutattak a korszerű, felügyelet nélküli módszerekkel szemben, modellünk pedig felügyelt környezetben felülmúlta a korszerű LI és DI rendszereket.', 'it': "L'identificazione automatica della lingua (LI) o l'identificazione dialettica (DI) di testi brevi di lingue o dialetti strettamente correlati, è uno dei passaggi principali di molte pipeline di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. L'identificazione linguistica è considerata un compito risolto in molti casi; Tuttavia, nel caso di lingue strettamente correlate o in uno scenario non sorvegliato (in cui le lingue non sono conosciute in anticipo), i risultati sono ancora scarsi. In questo articolo, proponiamo il metodo Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI), che può apprendere simultaneamente incorporazioni di frasi e assegnazioni cluster da brevi testi. Il modello UDLDI comprende le costruzioni delle frasi dei linguaggi applicando l'attenzione alle relazioni dei caratteri che aiutano a ottimizzare il clustering delle lingue. Abbiamo eseguito i nostri esperimenti su tre set di dati brevi per diverse famiglie linguistiche, ciascuno composto da lingue o dialetti strettamente correlati, con set di formazione molto minimi. Le nostre valutazioni sperimentali su questi set di dati hanno mostrato miglioramenti significativi rispetto ai metodi non supervisionati all'avanguardia e il nostro modello ha superato i sistemi LI e DI all'avanguardia in ambienti supervisionati.", 'lt': 'Automatinis kalbos identifikavimas (LI) arba trumpųjų glaudžiai susijusių kalbų arba dialektų tekstų identifikavimas (DI) yra vienas iš pagrindinių daugelio gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo vamzdynų etapų. Kalbos identifikavimas daugeliu atvejų laikomas išspręstu uždaviniu; tačiau labai glaudžiai susijusių kalbų atveju arba nepastebimame scenarijuje (kai kalbos iš anksto nežinomos), rezultatai vis dar blogi. Šiame dokumente siūlome netaikytos gilios kalbos ir dialekto identifikavimo (UDLDI) metodą, kuris gali tuo pačiu metu išmokti sakinių įtraukimo ir klasterinių užduočių iš trumpų tekstų. UDLDI modelis supranta kalbų sakinių konstrukciją, atkreipiant dėmesį į charakteristikų santykius, kurie padeda optimizuoti kalbų klasifikavimą. Ištyrėme savo eksperimentus su trimis trumpalaikiais duomenų rinkiniais skirtingoms kalbų šeimoms, kurių kiekvieną sudaro glaudžiai susijusios kalbos arba dialektai, su labai minimaliais mokymo rinkiniais. Mūsų eksperimentiniai šių duomenų rinkinių vertinimai parodė reikšmingą pažangą, palyginti su naujausiais nepastebimais metodais, ir mūsų modelis viršijo naujausias LI ir DI sistemas prižiūrimose aplinkybėse.', 'kk': 'Тіл не диалекттердің қысқа тілдерін автоматты түрде идентификациялау (LI) немесе диалекттердің қысқа мәтіндерін (DI) деп белгілеу - табиғлық тілдерді өңдеу қысқа тілдерінің бірі. Тіл идентификациясы көптеген кезде шешілілген тапсырма деп ойлайды. Бірақ өте жақын тілдерде немесе бақыламаған сценарияда (тілдер алдында беймәлім емес) әрекеттер әлі қатты. Бұл қағазда, біз қысқа мәтіндерден сөздерді ендіру мен кластер тапсырмаларын үйрене алатын теріс тілді және диалекты идентификациялау әдісін ұсынамыз. UDLDI үлгісі тілдердің құрылымын түсіндіреді. Бұл тілдердің кластерін оптимизациялауға көмектеседі. Біз басқа тіл үйлерінің үш қысқа мәтін деректер жиынында тәжірибелерімізді жасадық, әрбір жақын тілдер не диалекттердің тілдерінде тәжірибелеріміз өте төменгі оқыту жиындар Бұл деректер жиындарындағы тәжірибелік оқиғаларымыз өзгертілмеген әдістердің күйінде жақсы жақсартылығын көрсетті. Біздің үлгіміз LI және DI жүйелерді бақылау баптауларында орындалады.', 'mk': 'Автоматска јазичка идентификација (LI) или дијалектна идентификација (DI) на кратките тексти на блиски поврзани јазици или дијалекти, е еден од примарните чекори во многу национални гасоводи за процес на јазик. Идентификацијата на јазикот се смета за решена задача во многу случаи; сепак, во случајот на многу блиски поврзани јазици или во ненадгледуван сценарио (каде јазиците не се познати однапред), изведбата е сé уште лоша. Во овој весник, ние го предлагаме методот Ненадгледуван длабок јазик и идентификација на дијалектот (UDLDI), кој истовремено може да научи вградувања на реченици и кластерски задачи од кратки тексти. УДЛДИ моделот ги разбира изградбите на реченици на јазиците применувајќи внимание на односите со карактерите кои помагаат да се оптимизира групирањето на јазиците. Ги извршивме нашите експерименти на три набори на кратко текст податоци за различни јазички семејства, секој од кои се состои од блиски поврзани јазици или дијалекти, со многу минимални набори на обука. Нашите експериментални проценки на овие податоци покажаа значително подобрување во однос на најсовремените ненадгледувани методи и нашиот модел ги надмина најсовремените системи на ЛИ и ДИ во надгледувани поставувања.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Bahasa Automatik (LI) atau Pengenalan Dialeksi (DI) teks pendek bahasa yang berkaitan dengan rapat atau dialekt, adalah salah satu langkah utama dalam banyak garis paip pemprosesan bahasa alam. Language identification is considered a solved task in many cases;  bagaimanapun, dalam kes bahasa yang berkaitan dengan sangat dekat, atau dalam skenario yang tidak diawasi (di mana bahasa tidak diketahui dahulu), prestasi masih teruk. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah Pengenalan Bahasa Dalam Tanpa Dijaga dan Dialeksi (UDLDI), yang secara bersamaan boleh belajar penyambungan kalimat dan tugasan kumpulan dari teks pendek. Model UDLDI memahami pembangunan kalimat bahasa dengan melaksanakan perhatian kepada hubungan aksara yang membantu untuk optimumkan kumpulan bahasa. Kami telah melakukan eksperimen kami pada tiga set data teks pendek untuk keluarga bahasa yang berbeza, masing-masing terdiri dari bahasa atau dialekt yang berhubungan dekat, dengan set latihan yang sangat minimal. Evaluasi eksperimen kami pada set data ini telah menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan atas kaedah-kaedah-kaedah-state-of-the-art tidak diawasi dan model kami telah melampaui sistem-state-of-the-art LI dan DI dalam tetapan yang diawasi.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുക (LI) അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അടുത്ത് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകളുടെയോ ഡയലക്ട്രെക്റ്റുകളുടെയോ അടുത്തുചേര്\u200dന്ന ഭാഷകളുടെയോ പൈപ്പെലി ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് പല കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണെന്ന് കരുതുന്നു; എന്നാലും, വളരെ അടുത്ത് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകളുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d (ഭാഷകള്\u200d മുമ്പ് അറിയാത് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ആഴത്തിലെ ഭാഷയും ഡയലക്ട്രിക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള (UDLDI) രീതിയും പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന് UDLDI മോഡല്\u200d ഭാഷകളുടെ നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു. അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഭാഷകളുടെ സ് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷയുടെ കുടുംബങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി മൂന്നു ചെറിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എല്ല ഈ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണവിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത രീതിയില്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കുന', 'mt': 'L-Identifikazzjoni Awtomatika tal-Lingwa (LI) jew l-Identifikazzjoni tad-Djalett (DI) ta’ testi qosra ta’ lingwi jew dijaletti relatati mill-qrib, hija waħda mill-passi primarji f’ħafna pajpijiet tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. L-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa hija kkunsidrata kompitu solvut f’ħafna każijiet; madankollu, fil-każ ta’ lingwi relatati mill-qrib ħafna, jew f’xenarju mhux sorveljat (fejn il-lingwi mhumiex magħrufa minn qabel), il-prestazzjoni għadha dgħajfa. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu l-metodu ta’ Identifikazzjoni Profonda u tal-Lingwa Dijaletta (UDLDI) mhux sorveljat, li fl-istess ħin jista’ jitgħallem l-inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi u l-assenjazzjonijiet ta’ raggruppamenti minn testi qosra. Il-mudell UDLDI jifhem il-kostruzzjonijiet tas-sentenzi tal-lingwi billi japplika l-attenzjoni għar-relazzjonijiet tal-karattru li jgħinu biex jiġi ottimizzat il-raggruppament tal-lingwi. Saru l-esperimenti tagħna fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta b’test qasir għal familji differenti ta’ lingwi, kull wieħed magħmul minn lingwi jew dijaletti relatati mill-qrib, b’settijiet ta’ taħriġ minimi ħafna. L-evalwazzjonijiet sperimentali tagħna dwar dawn is-settijiet ta’ dejta wrew titjib sinifikanti fuq metodi mhux sorveljati bl-aktar mod avvanzati u l-mudell tagħna wettaq sistemi LI u DI avvanzati f’ambjenti sorveljati.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna identyfikacja języka (LI) lub identyfikacja dialektu (DI) krótkich tekstów blisko pokrewnych języków lub dialektów, jest jednym z podstawowych etapów w wielu rurociągach przetwarzania języków naturalnych. Identyfikacja języka jest uważana za rozwiązane zadanie w wielu przypadkach; jednak w przypadku bardzo blisko pokrewnych języków lub w scenariuszu bez nadzoru (gdy języki nie są znane z wyprzedzeniem), wydajność jest nadal słaba. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodę UDLDI (Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification), która może jednocześnie uczyć się osadzeń zdań i klastrować zadań z krótkich tekstów. Model UDLDI rozumie konstrukcje zdań języków poprzez zwracanie uwagi na relacje znaków, co pomaga optymalizować klastrowanie języków. Przeprowadziliśmy nasze eksperymenty na trzech zbiorach danych krótkoterminowych dla różnych rodzin językowych, składających się z blisko powiązanych języków lub dialektów, z bardzo minimalnymi zestawami treningowymi. Nasze eksperymentalne oceny tych zbiorów danych wykazały znaczącą poprawę w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych metod bez nadzoru, a nasz model przewyższył najnowocześniejsze systemy LI i DI w ustawieniach nadzorowanych.', 'mn': 'Харин ойролцоогоор холбогдсон хэл, диалектуудын богино текстүүдийн автоматтын хэлний идентификаци (LI) эсвэл диалектуудын шинжлэх ухаан (DI) нь байгалийн хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн хоолойн гол алхам юм. Холны тодорхойлолт олон тохиолдолд шийдвэрлэгдсэн ажил гэж үздэг. Гэхдээ илүү ойролцоогоор харьцуулагдсан хэл, эсвэл тайлбарлаагүй хувилбарт (хэл аль хэдийн мэддэггүй байдаг) үйл ажиллагаа ядуу байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлэлцээгүй гүн гүнзгий хэл, диалект идентификацийн (UDLDI) аргыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь богино текстүүдийн өгүүлбэрээс өгүүлбэрийг суралцаж чадна. UDLDI загвар нь хэл хэлний бүтээлүүдийг анхаарлаа хандуулж, хэл хэлний бүтээлийг сайжруулахад тусалдаг хүмүүсийн харилцаанд анхаарлаа хандуулж байна. Бид өөр хэл гэр бүлийн гурван богино текст өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилтыг хийсэн. Бүх нь ойролцоогоор холбогдсон хэл, диалект, маш бага сургалтын хэлбэртэй. Эдгээр өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын шалгалтын даалгавар нь урлагийн байдал дээр сайн сайжруулсан арга замыг харуулсан. Бидний загвар нь LI болон DI тогтолцооны байдал дээр ажиллаж чадсан.', 'no': 'Automatisk språk- identifikasjon (LI) eller Dialekt- identifikasjon (DI) av korte tekstar med nærare relaterte språk eller dialektar er ein av dei primære stegane i mange naturlege språk- behandlingslinjene. Språk-identifikasjon vert kalla til ein løyst oppgåve i mange tilfeller. Men i tillegg til svært nært relaterte språk, eller i eit usynleg scenario (der språka ikkje er kjent fordi), er utviklinga fortsatt fattig. I denne papiret foreslår vi metoden Uussparerte dypspråk og dialektidentifikasjon (UDLDI), som kan lære samtidig setningar og clustertillegg frå korte tekstar. UDLDI-modellen forstår setningane av språk ved å bruka oppmerksomhet til teiknbehandlingar som hjelper til å optimalisera klassering av språk. Vi har utført eksperimentene våre på tre kort tekstdatasett for ulike språksfamilier, kvar som inneheld av nærare relaterte språk eller dialektar, med veldig minimale opplæringssett. Våre eksperimentelle evalueringar på disse datasettene har vist signifikante forbedringar over kunsten-tilstanden utan opprettingsmetoder, og vårt modell har utført tilstanden av kunsten LI og DI i oversikte innstillingar.', 'ro': 'Identificarea automată a limbii (LI) sau identificarea dialectelor (DI) a textelor scurte din limbi strânse sau dialecte, este unul dintre pașii principali în multe conducte de procesare a limbii naturale. Identificarea limbii este considerată o sarcină rezolvată în multe cazuri; Cu toate acestea, în cazul limbilor strâns legate sau într-un scenariu nesupravegheat (în care limbile nu sunt cunoscute în prealabil), performanțele sunt încă slabe. În această lucrare, propunem metoda de identificare a limbajului profund nesupravegheat și dialectelor (UDLDI), care poate învăța simultan încorporările frazelor și atribuțiile cluster din texte scurte. Modelul UDLDI înțelege construcțiile de propoziții ale limbilor prin aplicarea atenției la relațiile de caractere care ajută la optimizarea clusterizării limbilor. Am efectuat experimentele noastre pe trei seturi de date cu text scurt pentru diferite familii de limbi, fiecare constând din limbi strâns legate sau dialecte, cu seturi de instruire foarte minime. Evaluările experimentale ale acestor seturi de date au arătat îmbunătățiri semnificative față de metodele de ultimă generație nesupravegheate, iar modelul nostru a depășit performanțele de ultimă generație ale sistemelor LI și DI în setările supravegheate.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂා පරීක්ෂණය (LI) නැත්තම් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂා පරීක්ෂණය (DI) සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් නැත්තම් භාෂාව පරීක භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් විසිදුල වැඩක් කියලා හිතන්නේ; නමුත්, ගොඩක් ලොකු සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවල් වලින්, නැත්තම් නිර්භාවිත විදිහට (භාෂාවල් ඉදිරියට දන්නේ නැත්තම්),  මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ගොඩක් භාෂාව සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න බැරි භාෂාව සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (UDLDI) විදියට, ඒක සමහ UDLDI මොඩල් තේරෙනවා භාෂාවගේ වාක්ය නිර්මාණය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා භාෂාව සම්බන්ධය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා භාෂාව අපි වෙනස් භාෂාව පවුල් සඳහා අපේ පරීක්ෂණ තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, හැමෝම සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව නැත්තම් ඩායිලක් අපේ පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය මේ දත්ත සැට් වලින් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ නැහැ කියලා, අපේ මොඩේලය LI ස', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga luqada si gaar ah (LI) ama aqoonsiga (DI) ee qoraalka gaaban oo ku qoran luuqadaha aad u dhow leedahay ama luuqadaha la xiriira, waa mid kamid ah tallaabooyinka ugu horeeya ee lagu baaraandegayo baaritaanka luuqadaha asalka ah. Aqoonsiga luqada waxaa lagu tirinayaa shaqo xalaal ah, xaaladaha badan; Si kastaba ha ahaatee, haddii luuqado aad u dhow la xiriiro ama ay ku jirto muuqasho aan la ilaalin (meesha aan hore lagu aqoonin luuqadaha), muuqashadu weli waa baahan yahay. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaabka aqoonsiga luqada hoose ee aan la ilaalinayn iyo aqoonsiga (UDLDI), kaas oo isla markaasna ka baran kara qoraalka gaaban. The UDLDI model understands the sentence constructions of languages by applying attention to character relations which helps to optimize the clustering of languages.  Imtixaankayada waxaan ku sameynay saddex koob oo macluumaad ah oo fudud ee qoysaska luuqadaha kala duduwan, mid kastana waxaa ka mid ah luqadaha la xidhiidha ama luuqadaha la xiriira, waxayna leedahay koorasyo waxbarasho oo aad u yar. Qiimeynta baaritaanka ee sameynta macluumaadyadan waxay ka muuqatay hagaajinta aad u weyn xaalada farshaxanta iyo qaababka aan la ilaalin karo, modellkayagana wuxuu sameynay xaalada qoraalka LI-da iyo DI-nidaamka ilaalinaysa.', 'sr': 'Automatska identifikacija jezika (LI) ili identifikacija dijalekata (DI) kratkih tekstova bliskog odnosa jezika ili dijalekata je jedna od glavnih koraka u mnogim prirodnim cijevima obrade jezika. Identifikacija jezika se smatra rešenim zadatkom u mnogim slučajevima; međutim, u slučaju veoma bliskog povezanog jezika, ili u neodređenom scenariju (gde jezici nisu poznati unaprijed), izvedba je i dalje siromašna. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu neodređenog dubokog jezika i identifikacije dijalekata (UDLDI), koja može istovremeno naučiti ugrađenje rečenica i zadatak klasera iz kratkih tekstova. Model UDLDI razumije konstrukcije rečenice jezika, privlačujući pažnju na odnose karaktera koji pomaže optimizirati skupljanje jezika. Izvršili smo eksperimente na tri kratka teksta podataka za različite jezičke porodice, svako se sastoji od bliskog odnosa jezika ili dijalekata, sa vrlo minimalnim setima obuke. Naše eksperimentalne procjene na ovim podacima pokazale su značajno poboljšanje nad metodama stanja umjetnosti, a naš model je nadgledan sistem stanja umjetnosti LI i DI.', 'sv': 'Automatisk språkidentifiering (LI) eller Dialect Identification (DI) av korta texter av nära besläktade språk eller dialekter, är ett av de primära stegen i många naturliga språkbehandlingspipelines. Språkidentifiering anses vara en löst uppgift i många fall. Men när det gäller mycket nära besläktade språk, eller i ett scenario utan övervakning (där språken inte är kända i förväg), är resultaten fortfarande dåliga. I denna uppsats föreslår vi metoden Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI), som samtidigt kan lära sig meningsinbäddningar och klusteruppgifter från korta texter. UDLDI-modellen förstår meningskonstruktionerna av språk genom att uppmärksamma teckenförbindelser som hjälper till att optimera klustringen av språk. Vi har utfört våra experiment på tre korttextdatauppsättningar för olika språkfamiljer, var och en bestående av nära besläktade språk eller dialekter, med mycket minimala utbildningsuppsättningar. Våra experimentella utvärderingar av dessa datauppsättningar har visat signifikant förbättring jämfört med toppmoderna icke-övervakade metoder och vår modell har överträffat toppmoderna LI- och DI-system i övervakade miljöer.', 'ta': 'Automatic Language Identification (LI) or Dialect Identification (DI) of short texts of closely related languages or dialects, is one of the primary steps in many natural language processing pipelines.  மொழி அடையாளம் பல நிகழ்வுகளில் தீர்க்கப்பட்ட பணியாக கருதப்படுகிறது; ஆனால், மிகவும் அருகில் தொடர்புடைய மொழிகள் அல்லது பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத காட்சியில் (மொழிகள் முன்னே தெரியாத இடத்தில்) செயல்ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கண்காணிக்கப்படாத ஆழம் மற்றும் Dialect Identification (UDLDI) முறைமை UDLDI மாதிரி மொழிகள் உருவாக்கத்தை புரிந்து கொள்ளும், எழுத்து தொடர்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி கவனத்தை பயன்படுத்தும், மொழிகளின் கூட்டுதல மூன்று சிறிய மொழி குடும்பங்களுக்கு மூன்று சிறிய உரை தரவுத்தளங்களில் நாங்கள் சோதனைகளை செய்துள்ளோம், ஒவ்வொரு மொழிக்க இந்த தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் பரிசோதனையின் மதிப்புகள் முன்னேற்றம் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது சாதாரண முறைகளின் நிலையில் சேமிக்கப்படாத முறைகள் மற்றும் எங்கள்', 'ur': 'سیدھی رابطہ دار زبانوں یا دیالکتوں کی چھوٹی زبانوں کی اپنی زبان شناسایی (LI) یا Dialect شناسایی (DI) میں سے ایک ہے بہت سی طبیعی زبان پرسس پائپ لین میں سے۔ زبان شناسایی کو بہت سی مواقع میں حل کیا گیا ہے۔ لیکن بہت نزدیک زبانوں کے بارے میں، یا کسی غیر قابل نظریہ میں (جہاں زبانیں پہلے معلوم نہیں ہیں) عملکرد بھی کمزور ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے غیر محفوظ کی عمیق زبان اور ڈیلٹ شناسیٹ (UDLDI) طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو ایک دفعہ مجموعۂ عبارت اور کلسٹر تعلیم کو چھوٹے ٹکسٹوں سے سیکھ سکتا ہے۔ UDLDI موڈل زبانوں کی تعلیم کو سمجھ رہا ہے، جسے اچھی طرح زبانوں کی کلسٹرینگ کرنا کی مدد کرتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے تجربے تین کوٹ ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے مختلف زبان خاندان کے لئے انجام دیے ہیں، ہر ایک کے ساتھ نزدیک مرتبہ زبانوں یا دیالکتوں میں سے ہے، بہت کم ترکین سٹ کے ساتھ۔ ہماری آزمائش کی تحقیقات ان ڈیٹ سٹوں کے بارے میں بہترین تحقیقات کی طریقے پر دکھائی گئی ہے اور ہمارے مدل نے تحقیقات کی سیستمات LI اور DI کی حالت سے زیادہ تحقیق کی ہے.', 'uz': "Tilni aniqlash (LI) yoki yaxshi bogʻ'liq tillar yoki dialeklarga qisqa matnlarni (DI) aniqlash (DI) birinchi darajada, ko'pchilik tilni boshqarish uchun biri asl foydalanuvchidan biri. Tilning identifikati ko'p holatda toʻliq vazifa deb hisoblanadi; Lekin, juda yaxshi bog'liq tillar yoki xavfsiz holatda (tillar oldin nomaʼlum boʻlmagan holatda), bajarish juda yoqtirdi. Bu hujjatda biz qoʻllanilmaydigan Depth Tilni va Dialect (UDLDI) usulini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyat qilamiz. Bu bir xil soʻzni o'rganadi va qisqa matnlarning qisqa tuzilishini o'rganadi. UDLDI modeli tilning tuzuvlarini o'rganadi. Ularni qoʻllash imkoniyatlariga foydalanadi. Biz har xil tilning oillari uchun uchta qisqa matn maʼlumotlarimizni bajardik, har bir tillar yoki dialektlar bilan yaxshi bog'liq tillar yoki dialeklarga ega bo'lganligimiz, juda kichik ta'lim sohasida. Ushbu maʼlumotlar tarkibida taʼminlovchimiz haqida saqlab qolmagan usullarda juda katta yaxshi o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi va modelimiz taʼminlovchi LI va DI tizimlarini taʼminlovchi moslamalarda bajardi.", 'vi': 'Tự động nhận diện ngôn ngữ (LI) hoặc Nhận diện khả năng ngôn ngữ ngắn của các ngôn ngữ liên quan, hoặc phương ngữ, là một trong những bước đầu trong nhiều đường ống xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Ngôn ngữ được xem là nhiệm vụ được giải quyết trong nhiều trường hợp; Tuy nhiên, trong trường hợp ngôn ngữ có liên quan rất chặt chẽ, hay trong một kịch bản không giám sát (nơi mà ngôn ngữ không được biết trước). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị phương pháp nhận diện ngôn ngữ và ngôn ngữ tự động không giám sát (UDLDAP) mà đồng thời có thể học được sự ghép câu và phân công từ các văn bản ngắn. Bộ mô hình UDkhai hiểu cấu trúc câu của ngôn ngữ bằng cách chú ý tới các mối quan hệ cá nhân, giúp phân loại các ngôn ngữ tối đa. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện thí nghiệm trên ba tập tin văn bản ngắn cho các gia đình ngôn ngữ khác nhau, mỗi bộ gồm ngôn ngữ hay phương ngữ có liên quan mật thiết, với các bộ tập luyện tối thiểu. Những đánh giá thử nghiệm của chúng tôi trên các bộ dữ liệu này đã cho thấy cải tiến đáng kể hơn các phương pháp không giám sát được mới nhất, và mô hình của chúng tôi đã vượt quá giới hạn của hệ thống ALi và IDI được giám sát.', 'bg': 'Автоматичната езикова идентификация (LI) или диалектната идентификация (DI) на кратки текстове на тясно свързани езици или диалекти, е една от основните стъпки в много тръбопроводи за обработка на естествени езици. Идентификацията на езика се счита за разрешена задача в много случаи; обаче, в случай на много близки езици или при сценарий без надзор (когато езиците не са известни предварително), производителността все още е слаба. В настоящата статия предлагаме метода за неконтролирана дълбока идентификация на езика и диалекта (който може едновременно да научи вграждания изречения и групови задания от кратки текстове. Моделът разбира конструкциите на изреченията на езиците чрез привличане на внимание към отношенията на знаците, което помага за оптимизиране на клъстерирането на езиците. Изпълнихме експериментите си с три кратки текстови набора от данни за различни езикови семейства, всеки състоящ се от тясно свързани езици или диалекти, с много минимални набори за обучение. Нашите експериментални оценки на тези набори от данни показаха значително подобрение в сравнение с най-съвременните методи без надзор и нашият модел надмина най-съвременните системи в контролирани условия.', 'da': 'Automatisk sprogidentifikation (LI) eller Dialect Identification (DI) af korte tekster af nært beslægtede sprog eller dialekter, er et af de primære trin i mange naturlige sprogbehandlingsrørledninger. Sprogidentifikation betragtes i mange tilfælde som en løst opgave; Men i tilfælde af meget nært beslægtede sprog eller i et scenario uden tilsyn (hvor sprogene ikke kendes på forhånd) er resultaterne stadig dårlige. I dette arbejde foreslår vi Usovervåget Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI), som samtidig kan lære sætninger og klyngeopgaver fra korte tekster. UDLDI modellen forstår sætningskonstruktionerne af sprog ved at lægge opmærksomhed på tegnrelationer, som hjælper med at optimere klyngningen af sprog. Vi har udført vores eksperimenter på tre korttekstdatasæt for forskellige sprogfamilier, der hver består af nært beslægtede sprog eller dialekter, med meget minimale træningssæt. Vores eksperimentelle evalueringer af disse datasæt har vist betydelige forbedringer i forhold til state-of-the-art ikke-overvågede metoder, og vores model har overgået state-of-the-art LI- og DI-systemer i overvågede omgivelser.', 'hr': 'Automatska identifikacija jezika (LI) ili identifikacija dijalekta (DI) kratkih tekstova bliskog povezanih jezika ili dijalekata je jedna od glavnih koraka u mnogim prirodnim cijevima obrade jezika. Identifikacija jezika se smatra riješenim zadatkom u mnogim slučajevima; međutim, u slučaju vrlo bliskog povezanog jezika ili u neodređenom scenariju (gdje jezici nisu poznati unaprijed), činjenica je još uvijek siromašna. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu neodređenog dubokog jezika i identifikacije dijalekata (UDLDI), koja može istovremeno naučiti uključenje rečenica i zadatke skupova iz kratkih teksta. Model UDLDI razumije konstrukcije rečenica jezika primjenjujući pažnju na odnose o karakterima koji pomaže optimizirati skupinu jezika. Izvršili smo svoje eksperimente na tri kratkotekstna podataka za različite jezičke obitelji, svaka koja se sastoji od bliskog odnosa jezika ili dijalekata, sa vrlo minimalnim setima obuke. Naše eksperimentalne procjene na ovim podacima pokazale su značajno poboljšanje tijekom nepotrebnih metoda stanja umjetnosti, a naš model je nadgledan sustav stanja umjetnosti LI i DI.', 'nl': 'Automatische Taalidentificatie (LI) of Dialect Identificatie (DI) van korte teksten van nauw verwante talen of dialecten, is een van de primaire stappen in veel natuurlijke taalverwerkingspipelines. Taalidentificatie wordt in veel gevallen beschouwd als een opgeloste taak; in het geval van zeer nauw verwante talen of in een scenario zonder toezicht (waarbij de talen niet van tevoren bekend zijn), zijn de prestaties nog steeds slecht. In dit artikel stellen we de Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) methode voor, die tegelijkertijd zinsinsluitingen en clusteropdrachten van korte teksten kan leren. Het UDLDI model begrijpt de zinnenconstructies van talen door aandacht toe te passen op karakterrelaties, wat helpt om de clustering van talen te optimaliseren. We hebben onze experimenten uitgevoerd op drie korte-tekst datasets voor verschillende taalfamilies, elk bestaande uit nauw verwante talen of dialecten, met zeer minimale trainingssets. Onze experimentele evaluaties op deze datasets hebben significante verbeteringen aangetoond ten opzichte van state-of-the-art onbeheerde methoden en ons model heeft de state-of-the-art LI- en DI-systemen in gecontroleerde omgevingen overtroffen.', 'id': 'Identifikasi Bahasa Otomatis (LI) atau Identifikasi Dialek (DI) dari teks pendek bahasa yang terhubung dekat atau dialekt, adalah salah satu langkah utama dalam banyak pipa proses bahasa alam. Language identification is considered a solved task in many cases;  namun, dalam kasus bahasa yang sangat terkait, atau dalam skenario yang tidak diawasi (di mana bahasa tidak dikenal sebelumnya), pertunjukan masih buruk. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode Identifikasi Bahasa Dalam Tidak Disupervisi dan Dialeksi (UDLDI), yang dapat secara bersamaan belajar penerbangan kalimat dan tugas kluster dari teks pendek. The UDLDI model understands the sentence constructions of languages by applying attention to character relations which helps to optimize the clustering of languages.  Kami telah melakukan eksperimen kami pada tiga set data teks pendek untuk keluarga bahasa yang berbeda, masing-masing terdiri dari bahasa yang terhubung dekat atau dialekt, dengan set latihan yang sangat minimal. Evaluasi eksperimen kami pada set data ini menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan atas metode-metode yang tidak diawasi state-of-the-art dan model kami telah melampaui sistem-sistem LI dan DI state-of-the-art dalam pengawasan yang diawasi.', 'de': 'Automatische Spracherkennung (LI) oder Dialekt-Identifikation (DI) von Kurztexten eng verwandter Sprachen oder Dialekte ist einer der Hauptschritte in vielen Pipelines zur Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprachen. Spracherkennung wird in vielen Fällen als gelöst angesehen; Bei sehr eng verwandten Sprachen oder in einem Szenario ohne Aufsicht (bei dem die Sprachen nicht im Voraus bekannt sind) ist die Leistung jedoch immer noch schlecht. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir die Methode der Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) vor, die gleichzeitig Satzbedingungen und Clusterzuweisungen aus kurzen Texten erlernen kann. Das UDLDI-Modell versteht die Satzkonstruktionen von Sprachen, indem auf Zeichenbeziehungen geachtet wird, was zur Optimierung der Clustering von Sprachen beiträgt. Wir haben unsere Experimente an drei Kurztextdatensätzen für verschiedene Sprachfamilien durchgeführt, die jeweils aus eng verwandten Sprachen oder Dialekten bestehen, mit sehr minimalen Trainingssätzen. Unsere experimentellen Auswertungen auf diesen Datensätzen haben eine signifikante Verbesserung gegenüber den modernsten unbeaufsichtigten Methoden gezeigt und unser Modell hat die neuesten LI- und DI-Systeme in überwachten Umgebungen übertroffen.', 'fa': 'شناسایی زبان خودکار (LI) یا شناسایی برگزیدن (DI) از متن کوتاه\u200cهای زبان یا دیالکت\u200cهای نزدیک، یکی از قدم\u200cهای اولیه در بسیاری از خط\u200cهای پردازش لوله\u200cهای زبان طبیعی است. شناسایی زبان در بسیاری موارد یک کار حل می\u200cشود. ولی در مورد زبانهای بسیار نزدیک، یا در یک سناریو غیرقابل تحقیق (جایی که زبانها پیش از این نمی\u200cشناسند) عملکرد هنوز فقیر است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش شناسایی عمیق و برگزیدن (UDLDI) غیرقابل قابل استفاده از زبان عمیق و برگزیدن، که همزمان می\u200cتواند از متن\u200cهای کوتاه جمله\u200cها و برگزیدن کلاستر را یاد بگیرد. مدل UDLDI ساختن جمله زبان را با توجه به رابطه\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cها که کمک می\u200cکند برای بهترین ساختن کلاس زبان\u200cها را درک کند. ما آزمایش\u200cهایمان را در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cمتن برای خانواده\u200cهای زبان مختلف انجام داده\u200cایم، هر کدام از زبان\u200cهای یا دیالکت\u200cهای نزدیک، با مجموعه\u200cهای آموزش بسیار کم. ارزیابی آزمایشی ما در این مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها بهترین عملی بر روی روش\u200cهای غیر قابل تحقیق در حالت هنر نشان داده\u200cاند و مدل ما در تنظیمات تحقیق از حالت\u200cهای هنر LI و DI را بیشتر انجام داده است.', 'ko': '자동 언어 식별(LI)이나 사투리 식별(DI)은 많은 자연 언어 처리 파이프라인의 주요 절차 중 하나로 밀접한 관련 언어나 사투리의 짧은 텍스트를 식별하는 데 사용된다.많은 상황에서 언어 식별은 이미 해결된 임무로 여겨진다.그러나 매우 밀접한 관련이 있는 언어나 감독이 없는 상황에서(언어는 사전에 알 수 없음) 성능은 여전히 떨어진다.본고에서 우리는 감독이 없는 심층 언어와 사투리 식별(UDLDI) 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은 짧은 텍스트에서 문장의 삽입과 분류 값을 동시에 배울 수 있다.UDLDI 모델은 문자 관계에 관심을 가지고 언어의 문장 구조를 이해하기 때문에 언어의 분류를 최적화하는 데 도움이 된다.우리는 세 개의 서로 다른 어계의 짧은 텍스트 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행했는데 모든 데이터 집합은 밀접한 관련 언어나 사투리로 구성되어 있고 아주 적은 훈련 집합만 있으면 된다.이러한 데이터 집합에 대한 실험 평가는 가장 선진적인 무감독 방법에 비해 우리의 모델이 현저하게 개선되었고 감독이 있는 환경에서 우리의 모델은 가장 선진적인 LI와DI시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 보여준다.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa lugha ya kujitegemea (LI) au Kutambulisha (DI) wa maandishi fupi ya lugha au lugha zinazohusiana na karibu, ni moja ya hatua za msingi katika mistari mengi ya utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Utambulisho wa lugha unachukuliwa kama jukumu lililosuliwa katika matukio mengi; Hata hivyo, kwa ajili ya lugha zinazohusiana na karibu sana, au katika eneo lisiloeleweka (ambapo lugha haijulikani mbele), utendaji bado ni masikini. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu ya utambulisho wa lugha ya kina ya kina asiyefuatiliwa na Kutambuliwa (UDLDI), ambazo kwa wakati huo unaweza kujifunza hukumu zinazoingiza na kuandika ujumbe mfupi. The UDLDI model understands the sentence constructions of languages by applying attention to character relations which helps to optimize the clustering of languages.  Tumefanya majaribio yetu kwenye seti za taarifa fupi tatu kwa ajili ya familia tofauti za lugha, kila moja ikijumuisha lugha zinazohusiana na karibu au lugha, na seti za mafunzo madogo sana. Tafiti zetu za uchunguzi katika seti hizi za takwimu zimeonyesha maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya hali ya mambo ya sanaa isiyohifadhiwa na mtindo wetu umetengeneza hali ya LI na mifumo ya DI katika mazingira yanayofuatiliwa.', 'tr': 'Diller we dialektleriň gysga metinleriniň otomatik işaretlenmesi Dil kimligi köp wagtlarda çözilmiş täze diýip kabul edilýär; Ýöne ýakynlaşyk diller ýaly-da, ýada bilinmemeýän bir senaryda (öñünden bilinmeyen diller) işleýişi gadyr. Bu kagyzda, biz Saýlamaýan Derje Dili we Saýlaw Kimligi (UDLDI) täze hili öwrenip bilýäris UDLDI modi dillerden soňrak baglaýyşlara üns berip, dilleriň klasterlerini bejermek üçin kömek edip biljek sözlerini düşünýär. Biz öz deneylerimizi dürli diller maşgalasyna üç kiçi metin veri setirmelerinde çykyp bardyk, her biri ýakyn dürli diller we dialektler bilen meňzeş edýär. Bu veri setirlerinde synanyşan çykyşlarymyz möhüm gelişmeleri görkezildi we nusgasymyz kontrol edilen düzümlerde LI we DI sistemlerinde çykyp gitdi.', 'af': "Outomatiese Taal Identifikasie (LI) of Dialeksie Identifikasie (DI) van kort teks van naby verwante tale of dialekte is een van die primêre stappe in baie natuurlike taal verwerking pyplyn. Taal identifikasie is aangesien 'n opgelos taak in baie gevalle; en maar in die geval van baie nader verwante tale, of in 'n onverondersteunde scenario (waar die tale vooraf nie bekend is nie), is die prestasie nog arm. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons die Ononderwerpende Deep Taal en Dialeksie Identifikasie (UDLDI) metode, wat kan simultaan leer sentence inbettings en cluster toepassings van kort teks. Die UDLDI model verstaan die setinge konstruksies van tale deur aandag op karakterrelasies te doen wat hulp om die klastering van tale te optimaliseer. Ons het ons eksperimente uitgevoer op drie kort teks datastelle vir verskillende taal families, elkeen bestaan van naby verwante tale of dialekte, met baie minimale onderwerp stelle. Ons eksperimentale evaluasies op hierdie datastelle het betekeurige verbetering vertoon oor staat-van-die-kunsten-ongeonderwerpende metodes en ons model het uitgevoer staat-van-die-kunsten LI en DI stelsels in onderwerp instellings.", 'am': 'ቋንቋ ማረጋገጫ (LI) ወይም መምረጥ ማረጋገጫ (DI) የቅርብ ዝርዝሮች ወይም ቋንቋዎች ወይም dialects, ብዙዎች ፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ መጀመሪያ ደረጃዎች አንዱ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት በብዙ ጉዳዮች የተፈጸመ ስራ ይመስላል; ነገር ግን ቋንቋዎች አስቀድሞ ያልታወቁበት (ቋንቋዎች ገና ሳይታወቁበት) በተለየ ቋንቋ ወይም በተጠበቀው ባይኖሩ ጊዜ ድሀ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጥልቅ ቋንቋ እና አዲስ መምረጥ (UDLDI) ዓይነትን እና ከጥቂት ጽሑፎች የቁጥጥር ግንኙነትን እና መፍጠርን እናስተማርጋለን፡፡ የUDLDI ሞዴል የቋንቋዎችን መሠረት የሚያስተውል የቋንቋዎች ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም የፊደል ግንኙነትን ለመጠቀም የሚረዳው የቋንቋዎችን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ We have performed our experiments on three short-text datasets for different language families, each consisting of closely related languages or dialects, with very minimal training sets.  Our experimental evaluations on these datasets have shown significant improvement over state-of-the-art unsupervised methods and our model has outperformed state-of-the-art LI and DI systems in supervised settings.', 'hy': 'Լեզուների կամ դիալեկտների կարճ տեքստերի ավտոմատիկ ճանաչելը (LlI) կամ դիալեկտիկ ճանաչելը (IDI) շատ բնական լեզուների վերաբերյալ խողովակաշարերի հիմնական քայլերից մեկն է: Language identification is considered a solved task in many cases;  however, in the case of very closely related languages, or in an unsupervised scenario (where the languages are not known in advance), performance is still poor.  In this paper, we propose the Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) method, which can simultaneously learn sentence embeddings and cluster assignments from short texts.  UDLSI-ի մոդելը հասկանում է լեզուների նախադասությունների կառուցվածքը, ուշադրություն դարձնելով բնավորական հարաբերություններին, որոնք օգնում են լավագույնել լեզուների խմբավորումը: Մենք կատարել ենք մեր փորձարկումները երեք կարճ տեքստի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա տարբեր լեզվի ընտանիքների համար, յուրաքանչյուրը կազմված է սերտորեն կապված լեզուներից կամ դիալեկտներից, շատ քիչ վարժեցման համակարգերի Այս տվյալների մասին մեր փորձարկվող գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս նշանակալի զարգացում ամենաբարձր անվերահսկվող մեթոդների նկատմամբ, և մեր մոդելը գերազարգացրել է ամենաբարձր համակարգերը ԼԻ և ԴԻ վերահսկվող միջավայրում:', 'az': 'YaxńĪnlńĪq dill…ôrin v…ô dialektl…ôrin qńĪsa metinl…ôrin otomatik dil kimlikl…ôri (LI) v…ô Dialect kimlikl…ôri (DI) √ßox t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ô boru √ßubuqlarńĪndan biridir. Dil tanńĪmlamasńĪ √ßoxlu vaxtlarda √ß√∂z√ľlm√ľŇü bir iŇü hesab edilir; Ancaq √ßox yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü dill…ôrin v…ô ya m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ômiŇü bir scenariyada (dill…ôrin …ôvv…ôlc…ô bilm…ôdikl…ôri m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôrd…ô) performans h…ôl…ô d…ô yoxsullur. Bu kańüńĪzda, biz qeyd edilm…ômiŇü derin dil v…ô Dialect Identification (UDLDI) metodlarńĪnńĪ t…ôklif edirik, ki bu c√ľml…ôl…ôrl…ô birlikd…ô qńĪsa m…ôtnl…ôrd…ôn yazńĪlmńĪŇü v…ô cluster iŇül…ôri √∂yr…ôn…ô bil…ôr. UDLDI modeli dill…ôrin c√ľml…ôl…ôrinin inŇüallarńĪnńĪ anlayńĪr ki, dill…ôrin √ßoxluńüunu optimiz…ô salmańüa yardńĪm edir. Biz m√ľxt…ôlif dil ail…ôl…ôri √ľ√ß√ľn √ľ√ß qńĪsa metin veri qurularńĪnńĪ t…ôhsil etdik, h…ôr biri yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü dill…ôrd…ôn v…ô dialektl…ôrd…ôn olub, √ßox az t…ôhsil qurulmuŇüdur. Bu veril…ôn qurńüularda olan eksperimental deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôrimiz m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ômiŇü metodlar √ľz…ôrind…ô √ßox yaxŇüńĪlńĪq g√∂st…ôrdi v…ô modell…ôrimiz LI v…ô DI sisteml…ôrini g√∂zl…ôyirl…ôr.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষার পরিচয় (LI) অথবা ডায়ালেক্টর (DI) নিকটবর্তী ভাষা বা ডায়ালেক্টরের সংক্ষিপ্ত লেখার সাথে সংক্ষিপ্ত লেখা বা ডায়ালেক্টরে অনেক ক্ষেত্রে ভাষার পরিচয় সমাধান করা কাজ হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হয়; তবে, খুব কাছাকাছি সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষার ক্ষেত্রে অথবা সংরক্ষিত একটি দৃশ্য (যেখানে ভাষা আগে না জানা যায়), প্রদর্শন এখনো দরিদ্র। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অনভারওয়ার্ড ভাষা এবং ডায়ালেক্টর পরিচয় (UDLDI) পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যা একই সাথে সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট থেকে শিখতে পারে শাস্তি প্রবেশ করা  UDLDI মডেল বুঝতে পারে ক্যারেক্টারের সম্পর্কের দিকে মনোযোগ প্রয়োগ করে ভাষার বাণী নির্মাণের মাধ্যমে ভাষার কথা বুঝতে পারে। আমরা বিভিন্ন ভাষার পরিবারের জন্য তিনটি সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পরীক্ষা করেছি, প্রত্যেকটি ভাষায় নিকটবর্তী ভাষা অথবা  এই তথ্য সেটে আমাদের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি অরক্ষিত পদ্ধতিতে বেশী উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে এবং আমাদে', 'bs': 'Automatska identifikacija jezika (LI) ili identifikacija dijalekata (DI) kratkih tekstova bliskog odnosa jezika ili dijalekata je jedna od glavnih koraka u mnogim prirodnim cijevima obrade jezika. Identifikacija jezika se smatra riješenim zadatkom u mnogim slučajevima; međutim, u slučaju veoma bliskog povezanog jezika, ili u neodređenom scenariju (gdje jezici nisu poznati unaprijed), nastup je još uvijek siromašan. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu neodređenog dubokog jezika i identifikacije dijalekata (UDLDI), koja može istovremeno naučiti ugrađenje rečenica i zadatak klasera iz kratkih tekstova. Model UDLDI razumije konstrukcije rečenice jezika primjenjujući pažnju na odnose karaktera koji pomaže optimizirati skupinu jezika. Izvršili smo eksperimente na tri kratka teksta podataka za različite jezičke porodice, svaka koja se sastoji od bliskog odnosa jezika ili dijalekata, sa vrlo minimalnim setima obuke. Naše eksperimentalne procjene na ovim podacima pokazale su značajno poboljšanje nad metodama stanja umjetnosti, a naš model je nadgledan sistem stanja umjetnosti LI i DI.', 'cs': 'Automatická identifikace jazyka (LI) nebo dialektová identifikace (DI) krátkých textů úzce příbuzných jazyků nebo dialektů je jedním z hlavních kroků v mnoha pipelines zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Jazyková identifikace je v mnoha případech považována za řešený úkol; Nicméně v případě jazyků velmi blízko příbuzných nebo v scénáři bez dohledu (kde jazyky nejsou známy předem), je výkon stále špatný. V tomto článku navrhujeme metodu UDLDI (Unservised Deep Language and Dialect Identification), která se může současně naučit vkládání vět a klastrování přiřazení z krátkých textů. Model UDLDI chápe větové konstrukce jazyků pomocí pozornosti na znakové vztahy, což pomáhá optimalizovat shlukování jazyků. Provedli jsme experimenty na třech krátkodobých datových sadách pro různé jazykové rodiny, z nichž každá sestává z úzce příbuzných jazyků nebo dialektů, s minimálními tréninkovými sadami. Naše experimentální vyhodnocení těchto datových sad ukázalo výrazné zlepšení oproti nejmodernějším metodám bez dohledu a náš model překonal nejmodernější LI a DI systémy v kontrolovaném prostředí.', 'ca': "L'identificació automàtica del llenguatge (LI) o la diàlecta (DI) de textos curts de llengües o diàlectes estretament relacionats, és una de les etapes primàries en molts tubs naturals de processament de llenguatges. L'identificació del llenguatge es considera una tasca resolta en molts casos; no obstant això, en el cas de llengües molt estretament relacionades, o en un escenari sense supervisió (on les llengües no són conegudes anticipadament), el rendiment encara és dolent. En aquest article, proposem el mètode d'identificació profunda i de llenguatge sense supervisió (UDLDI), que pot aprendre simultàneament incorporacions de frases i atribucions de grups a partir de curts textos. El model UDLDI entend les constructions de frases de les llengües aplicant atenció a les relacions de caràcter que ajuda a optimitzar l'agrupament de llengües. Hem fet els nostres experiments en tres conjunts de dades de curt text per diferents famílies de llengües, cada una composta de llengües o dialectes estretament relacionats, amb conjunts de capacitació molt mínimos. Les nostres evaluacions experimentals d'aquests conjunts de dades han demostrat una millora significativa en relació amb els mètodes no supervisats d'última generació i el nostre model ha superat els sistemes de TI i DI d'última generació en ambients supervisats.", 'et': 'Lähemalt seotud keelte või murrete lühitekstide automaatne keeletuvastus (LI) või dialektiidentifitseerimine (DI) on üks peamisi samme paljudes looduskeelte töötlemise torustikes. Keele tuvastamist peetakse paljudel juhtudel lahendatud ülesandeks; kuid väga tihedalt seotud keelte puhul või järelevalveta stsenaariumi puhul (kui keeled ei ole eelnevalt teada) on tulemuslikkus endiselt kehv. Käesolevas töös pakume välja järelevalveta sügavkeele ja dialekti identifitseerimise meetodi (UDLDI), mis võib samaaegselt õppida lausepõimimisi ja klastriülesandeid lühikestest tekstidest. UDLDI mudel mõistab keelte lausekonstruktsioone, rakendades tähelepanu märgisuhetele, mis aitab optimeerida keelte klastrit. Oleme teinud oma katseid kolme lühiteksti andmekogumiga erinevate keeleperekondade jaoks, millest igaüks koosneb tihedalt seotud keeltest või murretest, väga vähese koolitusega. Meie eksperimentaalsed hinnangud nende andmekogumite kohta on näidanud märkimisväärset paranemist võrreldes kaasaegsete järelevalveta meetoditega ning meie mudel on ületanud nüüdisaegsed LI- ja DI-süsteemid järelevalve all.', 'fi': 'Lähisukuisten kielten tai murteiden lyhyiden tekstien automaattinen kielitunnistus (LI) tai dialektitunnistus (DI) on yksi tärkeimmistä vaiheista monissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelyputkissa. Kielen tunnistamista pidetään monissa tapauksissa ratkaistuna tehtävänä. Kuitenkin hyvin läheisten kielten osalta tai valvomattomassa tilanteessa (jossa kieliä ei tunneta etukäteen) suorituskyky on edelleen heikko. Tässä työssä ehdotamme UDLDI (Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification) -menetelmää, joka voi samanaikaisesti oppia lauseiden upotuksia ja klusterien tehtäviä lyhyistä teksteistä. UDLDI-malli ymmärtää kielten lauserakenteita kiinnittämällä huomiota merkkisuhteisiin, mikä auttaa optimoimaan kielten klusterointia. Olemme tehneet kokeiluja kolmella eri kieliperheille tarkoitetulla lyhyttekstiaineistolla, joista jokainen koostuu läheisesti sukulaisista kielistä tai murteista, hyvin vähäisillä koulutussarjoilla. Kokeelliset arvioinnit näistä aineistoista ovat osoittaneet huomattavaa parannusta uusimpiin valvomattomiin menetelmiin verrattuna ja mallimme on ylittänyt huipputason LI- ja DI-järjestelmät valvotuissa olosuhteissa.', 'sq': 'Automatic Language Identification (LI) or Dialect Identification (DI) of short texts of closely related languages or dialects, is one of the primary steps in many natural language processing pipelines.  Identifikimi i gjuhës konsiderohet një detyrë e zgjidhur në shumë raste; however, in the case of very closely related languages, or in an unsupervised scenario (where the languages are not known in advance), performance is still poor.  Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë metodën e gjuhës së thellë dhe identifikimit të dialektit (UDLDI), e cila mund të mësojë njëkohësisht përmbajtjet e fjalëve dhe detyrimet e grupeve nga tekstet e shkurtra. The UDLDI model understands the sentence constructions of languages by applying attention to character relations which helps to optimize the clustering of languages.  Kemi kryer eksperimentet tona në tre grupe të dhënash me tekst të shkurtër për familje të ndryshme gjuhësh, secila prej tyre përbëhet nga gjuhë të lidhura me afërsi apo dialekte, me grupe shumë minimale trajnimi. Vlerësimet tona eksperimentale në këto grupe të dhënash kanë treguar përmirësim të rëndësishëm në lidhje me metodat më të larta të pa mbikqyrura dhe modeli ynë ka përmirësuar sistemet më të larta të LI dhe DI në rregullime të mbikqyrura.', 'jv': 'dockable-action usual Nanging, kapan langkung banjur luwih apik, ora tau ngomongke durung bisa (kawe awak ingkang diangkat awak dhéwé kuwi bisa diangkat), iso ngomong diandelok durung bisa diangkat. deep model Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno dhéwé éntukno karo telu akeh bantuan nggo langa luwih, sapa langa sing ngedolupan langa uga dialectan, egal dhéwé beraksi yang cukup. Isolahan kamu kelompok sing beraksi barêng dataset iki bakal seng akeh diunting liyane karo hal-karbot kuwi tindakan sing ora nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing ora bisa perusahaan karo hal-karbot.', 'ha': "@ action: inmenu An gane shaidar harshe kamar wani aikin da aka sola cikin masu yawa; A lokacin da ke cikin harshen waɗanda aka kusantar da shi makusanci, ko da wani rabo wanda ba'a tsare (inda harshen ba'a sani a gaba ɗaya) sai aikin ya ƙayyade. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata hanyar Jadi'a da Haƙĩƙa na Haƙĩka da Ya yi bayani'antar (UDLD), wanda ke iya amfani da shi a lokacin da za'a iya fahimta maganar da kuma za'a sami juyin aiki daga takardar rubutun. @ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, mun sami jarrabonmu a matsayin takardan matsayi uku masu ƙaranci ga iyãlanmu masu cikin harshen dabam-daban, kowanmu yana cikin lugha da aka kusantar da masu husũma ko diƙaitacce, da tsarin mafarinta masu ƙaranci. Our experimental evaluations on these datasets have shown significant improvement over state-of-the-art unsupervised methods and our model has outperformed state-of-the-art LI and DI systems in supervised settings.", 'sk': 'Avtomatska identifikacija jezikov (LI) ali dialektna identifikacija (DI) kratkih besedil tesno sorodnih jezikov ali narečij je eden od primarnih korakov v številnih cevovodih za obdelavo naravnih jezikov. Identifikacija jezika se v mnogih primerih šteje za rešeno nalogo; vendar je v primeru zelo tesno sorodnih jezikov ali v neobzorovanem scenariju (kjer jeziki niso znani vnaprej) zmogljivost še vedno slaba. V prispevku predlagamo metodo UDLDI (Unnadzorovan Deep Language and Dialect Identification), ki se lahko hkrati uči vdelav stavkov in dodelitev skupin iz kratkih besedil. Model UDLDI razume konstrukcije stavkov jezikov tako, da uporablja pozornost na značilne relacije, kar pomaga optimizirati združevanje jezikov. Naše poskuse smo izvedli na treh kratkih besedilnih naborih podatkov za različne jezikovne družine, vsak sestavljen iz tesno sorodnih jezikov ali narečij, z zelo minimalnimi nabori usposabljanja. Naše eksperimentalne vrednotenje teh naborov podatkov so pokazale znatno izboljšanje v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi nenadzorovanimi metodami, naš model pa je presegel najsodobnejše sisteme LI in DI v nadzorovanih okoljih.', 'he': 'זיהוי שפה אוטומטי (LI) או זיהוי דיאלקט (DI) של טקסטים קצרים של שפות או דיאלקטים קשורים קרובות, הוא אחד מהצעדים הראשונים במספר צינורות עיבוד שפות טבעיות. זיהוי שפה נחשב משימה פתורה במקרים רבים; בכל אופן, במקרה של שפות קשורות מאוד, או בתרחיש ללא השגחה (שבו השפות לא ידועות מראש), ההופעה עדיין גרועה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת הזהות של שפת עמוקה ללא השגחה (UDLDI), שיכולה ללמוד באותו הזמן משפטים ומשימות קבוצות מתוך טקסטים קצרים. מודל UDLDI מבין את בניית המשפטים של שפות על ידי השימוש תשומת לב ליחסי אופיינים שמעזרים לאופטימיזם את הקבוצה של שפות. ביצענו את הניסויים שלנו על שלושה קבוצות נתונים לטקסט קצר למשפחות שפות שונות, כל אחד מכיל שפות קרובות או דיאלקטים, עם קבוצות אימונים מינימליות מאוד. הערכות הניסיונייות שלנו על קבוצות הנתונים האלה הראו שיפור משמעותי על שיטות לא משומרות במצב מוקדם ומודל שלנו ביצע מערכות LI ומערכות DI מוקדמות במצב משומרת.', 'bo': 'Automatic Language Identification (LI) or Dialect Identification (DI) of short texts of closely related languages or dialects, is one of the primary steps in many natural language processing pipelines. སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེར་ལ་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་ཡོད་པ། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་ཕན་འབྲས་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག་ཁག་ཅིག་གིས་ཡང་མིན་འདུག། In this paper, we propose the Unsupervised Deep Language and Dialect Identification (UDLDI) method, which can simultaneously learn sentence embeddings and cluster assignments from short texts. UDLDI མ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གྱི་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚང་མི་འདྲ་བར་གསུམ་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསུམ་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྩལ་ཆེན་གྱིས་སྒྲིག་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་དག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཉར་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཟིན་བྱས'}
{'en': 'Improving Long-Tail Relation Extraction with Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention', 'ar': 'تحسين استخراج العلاقات طويلة الذيل مع الاهتمام المتزايد بالعلاقة التعاونية', 'es': 'Mejora de la extracción de relaciones de cola larga con la colaboración de atención aumentada de relaciones', 'pt': 'Melhorando a extração de relações de cauda longa com atenção colaborativa aumentada de relações', 'fr': "Améliorer l'extraction des relations à longue traîne grâce à une attention accrue axée sur la collaboration", 'ja': 'コラボレーションリレーション拡張アテンションによるロングテールリレーション抽出の改善', 'zh': '利用协作关系益意力改长尾', 'hi': 'सहयोग संबंध-संवर्धित ध्यान के साथ लंबी पूंछ संबंध निष्कर्षण में सुधार', 'ru': 'Улучшение экстракции длиннохвостой связи с совместным вниманием, усиленным отношениями', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Caidrimh Long-Tail a Fheabhsú le hAird Chomhoibritheach Gaolmhéadaithe', 'ka': 'უფრო უფრო მეტი გრძნობის გამოყენების გამოყენება შემდეგ შემდეგ გრძნობების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A hosszú farkú kapcsolat kivonásának javítása az együttműködő kapcsolat-fokozott figyelemmel', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της εξαγωγής μακροουράς σχέσης με τη συνεργασία-ενισχυμένη προσοχή', 'kk': 'Қатысушылық қатынас мен ұзындық қатынас тарқатуын жақсарту', 'it': "Migliorare l'estrazione della relazione a coda lunga con l'attenzione aumentata della relazione collaborativa", 'lt': 'Gerinti ilgalaikių santykių ekstrakciją bendradarbiaujant, didinant santykių dėmesį', 'mk': 'Подобрување на екстракцијата на долгите односи со соработка со зголемено внимание', 'ms': 'Perbaikan Ekstraksi Hubungan Panjang-Tail dengan Perhatian Bersama-Bersama', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനൊപ്പം നീണ്ട ട ടെയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെ മുന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Titjib fl-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet fit-Tul b’Attenzjoni Magħquda b’Relazzjonijiet Kolaborattivi', 'mn': 'Хамтран хамтран хамтран хамааралтай холбоотой холбоотой хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай', 'no': 'Å forbetra utpakking av langtart relasjonsrelasjon med samarbeidsrelatering-augmentert merking', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea extracției relațiilor cu coadă lungă cu atenția sporită a relațiilor de colaborare', 'pl': 'Poprawa ekstrakcji relacji długiego ogona dzięki współpracy zwiększonej uwagi', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje izvlačenja dugotrajnih odnosa sa povećanom pažnjom u vezi saradnje', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සමඟ ලොක්කු ටේල් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය වැඩ කරන්න', 'so': 'Improving Long-Tail Relation Extraction with Collaboration Relations-Augmented Attention', 'sv': 'Förbättra utdragning av långsvansar med samverkande relation-ökad uppmärksamhet', 'ta': 'Improving Long-Tail Relation Extraction with Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention', 'ur': 'لانگ ٹیل رابطہ اٹھانے کے ساتھ عمدہ کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường tương ứng dài với Cộng đồng Chú ý', 'da': 'Forbedring af udtrækning af langhaleforhold med samarbejdsrelateret opmærksomhed', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje izvlačenja dugotrajnih odnosa s povećanom pažnjom u suradnji odnosa', 'bg': 'Подобряване на извличането на дългоопашата връзка с повишено внимание на взаимоотношенията за сътрудничество', 'nl': 'Verbetering van Long-Tail Relatie Extraction met Samenwerkende Relatie-Augmented Attentie', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Long Tail Relation Extraction mit kollaborierender Relation Augmented Attention', 'ko': '협력 관계를 이용하여 강화를 하고 장미 관계 추출을 개선하는 데 주의하다', 'id': 'Menembangkan Ekstraksi Hubungan Panjang dengan Perhatian Ditambah Hubungan Kolaborasi', 'fa': 'بهتر کردن اخراج رابطه\u200cهای طولانی با توجه افزایش رابطه\u200cهای همکاری', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Utamaduni wa Kuhusiana na Mawasiliano ya ndege kwa Kushirikiana na Ushirikiano', 'tr': 'İşdeşme Maglumaty bilen Uzun Ýyglanyş Derjesi Açmak', 'af': 'Verbeter Lang-Tail Relasie Uitpakking met Samarbeidende Relasie-Vergroot Aansig', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Վերջացնել երկար հարաբերությունների արտադրումը հարաբերությունների համագործակցությամբ աճված ուշադրության հետ', 'az': 'İşbirləşdirmək İlişkiləri-Böyüdülmək İlişkilərin İlişkilərini İşləndirmək', 'sq': 'Duke përmirësuar ekstraksionin e marrëdhënieve të gjata me bashkëpunimin e vëmendjes me rritje të marrëdhënieve', 'ca': "millorar l'extracció de relacions de llarga punta amb una atenció augmentata per la col·laboració", 'bn': 'সংযোগ-অংশগ্রহণকারী সম্পর্কের সাথে লম্বা টেইল সম্পর্কের বিরুদ্ধে প্রস্থান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje izvlačenja dugotrajnih odnosa s povećanom pažnjom u vezi saradnje', 'cs': 'Zlepšení extrakce vztahů s dlouhým ocasem pomocí spolupracující vztahové pozornosti', 'et': 'Pikasaba suhete väljavõtmise parandamine koostöösuhte suurendatud tähelepanu abil', 'fi': 'Pitkähännän suhteen purkamisen parantaminen yhteistyösuhteella lisätyllä huomiolla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention', 'he': 'שיפור מחלקת מערכת יחסים ארוכה עם תשומת לב משותפת', 'jv': 'Gjelongi tanggal-tanggal raparahan luwih karo Kemerdekaan Relating-AHSV', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje ekstrakcije odnosov z dolgim repom s povečano pozornostjo v sodelovanju'}
{'en': 'Wrong labeling problem and long-tail relations are two main challenges caused by distant supervision in relation extraction. Recent works alleviate the wrong labeling by selective attention via multi-instance learning, but can not well handle long-tail relations even if hierarchies of the relations are introduced to share knowledge. In this work, we propose a novel neural network, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), to handle both the wrong labeling and long-tail relations. Particularly, we first propose relation-augmented attention network as base model. It operates on sentence bag with a sentence-to-relation attention to minimize the effect of wrong labeling. Then, facilitated by the proposed base model, we introduce collaborating relation features shared among relations in the hierarchies to promote the relation-augmenting process and balance the training data for long-tail relations. Besides the main training objective to predict the relation of a sentence bag, an auxiliary objective is utilized to guide the relation-augmenting process for a more accurate bag-level representation. In the experiments on the popular benchmark dataset NYT, the proposed CoRA improves the prior state-of-the-art performance by a large margin in terms of Precision@N, AUC and Hits@K. Further analyses verify its superior capability in handling long-tail relations in contrast to the competitors.', 'es': 'El problema de etiquetado incorrecto y las relaciones de cola larga son dos desafíos principales causados por la supervisión a distancia en la extracción de relaciones. Los trabajos recientes alivian el etiquetado incorrecto mediante la atención selectiva a través del aprendizaje de múltiples instancias, pero no pueden manejar bien las relaciones long tail incluso si se introducen jerarquías de las relaciones para compartir conocimientos. En este trabajo, proponemos una novedosa red neuronal, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CorA), para manejar tanto el etiquetado incorrecto como las relaciones long tail. En particular, primero proponemos una red de atención aumentada por relaciones como modelo base. Opera en bolsas de oraciones con una atención de oración a pariente para minimizar el efecto de un etiquetado incorrecto. Luego, facilitados por el modelo base propuesto, introducimos características de relación de colaboración compartidas entre las relaciones en las jerarquías para promover el proceso de aumento de la relación y equilibrar los datos de capacitación para las relaciones de cola larga. Además del objetivo principal de entrenamiento para predecir la relación de una bolsa de oraciones, se utiliza un objetivo auxiliar para guiar el proceso de aumento de la relación para una representación más precisa del nivel de la bolsa. En los experimentos en el popular conjunto de datos de referencia NYT, el CorA propuesto mejora el rendimiento del estado de la técnica anterior por un amplio margen en términos de Precision @N, AUC y Hits @K.', 'ar': 'مشكلة وضع العلامات الخاطئة والعلاقات طويلة الذيل هما من التحديات الرئيسية التي يسببها الإشراف البعيد فيما يتعلق باستخراج العلاقة. تعمل الأعمال الحديثة على التخفيف من وضع العلامات الخاطئة عن طريق الانتباه الانتقائي عبر التعلم متعدد الحالات ، ولكنها لا تستطيع التعامل بشكل جيد مع العلاقات طويلة الذيل حتى لو تم تقديم التسلسلات الهرمية للعلاقات لمشاركة المعرفة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح شبكة عصبية جديدة ، الاهتمام المعزز للعلاقة التعاونية (CoRA) ، للتعامل مع كل من العلامات الخاطئة والعلاقات طويلة الذيل. على وجه الخصوص ، نقترح أولاً شبكة الانتباه المعزز بالعلاقة كنموذج أساسي. إنه يعمل على حقيبة الجملة مع الانتباه إلى الجملة لتقليل تأثير العلامات الخاطئة. بعد ذلك ، وبتيسير من النموذج الأساسي المقترح ، نقدم ميزات علاقة تعاون مشتركة بين العلاقات في التسلسلات الهرمية لتعزيز عملية زيادة العلاقات وتحقيق التوازن بين بيانات التدريب للعلاقات طويلة الذيل. إلى جانب هدف التدريب الرئيسي للتنبؤ بعلاقة كيس الجملة ، يتم استخدام هدف إضافي لتوجيه عملية زيادة العلاقة للحصول على تمثيل أكثر دقة على مستوى الحقيبة. في التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعة البيانات المرجعية الشهيرة NYT ، تعمل CoRA المقترحة على تحسين الأداء المتطور السابق بهامش كبير من حيث Precision @ N و AUC و Hits @ K. تتحقق التحليلات الإضافية من قدرتها الفائقة في التعامل مع العلاقات طويلة الأمد على عكس المنافسين.', 'fr': "Le problème d'étiquetage erroné et les relations à longue traîne sont deux défis principaux causés par la supervision distante dans l'extraction des relations. Des travaux récents atténuent le mauvais étiquetage par une attention sélective via l'apprentissage multi-instance, mais ne peuvent pas bien gérer les relations à longue traîne même si des hiérarchies de relations sont introduites pour partager les connaissances. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un nouveau réseau de neurones, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), pour gérer à la fois le mauvais étiquetage et les relations à longue traîne. En particulier, nous proposons d'abord un réseau d'attention augmentée par la relation comme modèle de base. Il fonctionne sur le sac de phrases avec une attention de la phrase à la relation afin de minimiser l'effet d'un mauvais étiquetage. Ensuite, grâce au modèle de base proposé, nous introduisons des caractéristiques de relation collaboratives partagées entre les relations dans les hiérarchies afin de promouvoir le processus d'augmentation de la relation et d'équilibrer les données d'apprentissage pour les relations à longue traîne. Outre l'objectif d'entraînement principal pour prédire la relation d'un sac de phrases, un objectif auxiliaire est utilisé pour guider le processus d'augmentation de relation afin d'obtenir une représentation plus précise au niveau du sac. Dans les expériences sur le jeu de données de référence populaire NYT, le CoRA proposé améliore considérablement les performances de pointe antérieures en termes de Precision @N, AUC et Hits @K. D'autres analyses confirment sa capacité supérieure à gérer les relations long-tail par rapport à ses concurrents.", 'pt': 'Problema de rotulagem errado e relações de cauda longa são dois principais desafios causados pela supervisão distante na extração de relação. Trabalhos recentes aliviam a rotulagem errada pela atenção seletiva por meio do aprendizado de várias instâncias, mas não podem lidar bem com as relações de cauda longa, mesmo que as hierarquias das relações sejam introduzidas para compartilhar o conhecimento. Neste trabalho, propomos uma nova rede neural, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), para lidar com rotulagem errada e relações de cauda longa. Particularmente, primeiro propomos a rede de atenção aumentada em relação como modelo base. Opera no saco de frases com uma atenção frase-a-relação para minimizar o efeito de rotulagem errada. Em seguida, facilitados pelo modelo base proposto, introduzimos características de relações colaborativas compartilhadas entre as relações nas hierarquias para promover o processo de aumento de relações e balancear os dados de treinamento para relações de cauda longa. Além do objetivo principal do treinamento para prever a relação de uma bolsa de sentenças, um objetivo auxiliar é utilizado para orientar o processo de aumento de relação para uma representação mais precisa do nível de bolsa. Nos experimentos no popular conjunto de dados de referência NYT, o CoRA proposto melhora o desempenho de última geração anterior por uma grande margem em termos de Precision@N, AUC e Hits@K. Análises posteriores verificam sua capacidade superior em lidar com relações de cauda longa em comparação com os concorrentes.', 'ja': 'ラベリングの問題とロングテールの関係の間違いは、関連抽出における遠隔監督によって引き起こされる2つの主な課題です。 最近の研究では、マルチインスタンス学習を通じて選択的に注意を払うことで間違ったラベル付けを緩和しているが、関係の階層が知識を共有するために導入されても、ロングテール関係をうまく処理することはできない。 この研究では、間違ったラベル付けと長い尾の関係の両方を扱うために、新しいニューラルネットワーク、Collaborating Relation - Auggmented Attention （ CoRA ）を提案します。 特に、まずはベースモデルとして関係拡大アテンションネットワークを提案する。 間違ったラベル付けの影響を最小限に抑えるために、文間の注意を払って文章バッグ上で動作します。 そして、提案されたベースモデルを活用して、関係拡大プロセスを促進し、ロングテール関係のトレーニングデータのバランスをとるために、階層内の関係間で共有される協働関係機能を導入する。 文章バッグの関係を予測するための主なトレーニング目標に加えて、補助目標は、より正確なバッグレベルの表現のための関係拡大プロセスを導くために使用されます。 人気のあるベンチマークデータセットNYTの実験では、提案されているCoRAは、Precision @ N、AUC、およびHits @ Kの観点から、従来の最先端のパフォーマンスを大幅に改善します。さらなる分析は、競合他社とは対照的に、ロングテール関係を処理する優れた能力を検証します。', 'zh': '误标签长尾者,取中远程督两主挑战也。 近事以多故选择性注以轻过,虽引层次结构以共知,无以善处长尾。 于是条上新神经网络,协作关系增注意(CoRA),以处非长尾。 先发意力网络以为大体。 其于句囊操作,有句之关注,以大限减误标签。 然后推其本末,引层次结构共享之协作关系,以促其强,平其长尾之数。 非占句囊之大教也,以辅翼增强,以得其正袋级。 流行之准集NYT之实验,拟议之CoRA在Precision@N,AUC Hits@K大大提高先进之性。 益论验其比竞争对手长尾卓异。', 'ru': 'Проблема неправильной маркировки и отношения длинного хвоста являются двумя основными проблемами, вызванными удаленным наблюдением за извлечением отношений. Недавние работы облегчают неправильную маркировку, выборочно уделяя внимание через обучение с несколькими экземплярами, но не могут хорошо справиться с отношениями с длинным хвостом, даже если иерархии отношений внедрены для обмена знаниями. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую нейронную сеть, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), для обработки как неправильной маркировки, так и длиннохвостых отношений. В частности, сначала в качестве базовой модели мы предлагаем сеть с повышенным вниманием к отношениям. Он работает на пакете предложений с вниманием к предложению, чтобы минимизировать эффект неправильной маркировки. Затем, с помощью предлагаемой базовой модели, мы вводим функции кооперационных отношений, разделяемые между отношениями в иерархиях, для продвижения процесса расширения отношений и сбалансирования данных обучения для отношений с длинным хвостом. Помимо основной цели обучения для прогнозирования соотношения пакета предложений, вспомогательная цель используется для руководства процессом увеличения соотношения для более точного представления на уровне пакета. В экспериментах по популярному эталонному набору данных NYT, предлагаемый CoRA улучшает предыдущие современные показатели на большую маржу с точки зрения точности@N, AUC и хитов@K. Дальнейшие анализы подтверждают его превосходную способность обрабатывать отношения длинного хвоста в отличие от конкурентов.', 'hi': 'गलत लेबलिंग समस्या और लंबी पूंछ के संबंध संबंध निष्कर्षण में दूर के पर्यवेक्षण के कारण दो मुख्य चुनौतियां हैं। हाल के काम बहु-उदाहरण सीखने के माध्यम से चयनात्मक ध्यान द्वारा गलत लेबलिंग को कम करते हैं, लेकिन लंबी पूंछ के संबंधों को अच्छी तरह से संभाल नहीं सकते हैं, भले ही संबंधों के पदानुक्रम ज्ञान साझा करने के लिए पेश किए जाते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, संबंध-संवर्धित ध्यान (कोरा) का सहयोग करते हैं, ताकि गलत लेबलिंग और लंबी पूंछ वाले संबंधों दोनों को संभाला जा सके। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले आधार मॉडल के रूप में संबंध-संवर्धित ध्यान नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह गलत लेबलिंग के प्रभाव को कम करने के लिए एक वाक्य-से-संबंध ध्यान के साथ वाक्य बैग पर काम करता है। फिर, प्रस्तावित आधार मॉडल द्वारा सुविधाजनक, हम संबंध-संवर्धन प्रक्रिया को बढ़ावा देने और लंबी पूंछ संबंधों के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा को संतुलित करने के लिए पदानुक्रमों में संबंधों के बीच साझा किए गए सहयोगी संबंध सुविधाओं को पेश करते हैं। एक वाक्य बैग के संबंध की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए मुख्य प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य के अलावा, एक सहायक उद्देश्य का उपयोग अधिक सटीक बैग-स्तर के प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए संबंध-संवर्धन प्रक्रिया का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए किया जाता है। लोकप्रिय बेंचमार्क डेटासेट NYT पर प्रयोगों में, प्रस्तावित कोरा Precision@N, AUC और Hits@K के मामले में एक बड़े अंतर से पूर्व अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। आगे के विश्लेषण प्रतियोगियों के विपरीत लंबी पूंछ संबंधों को संभालने में इसकी बेहतर क्षमता को सत्यापित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Dhá phríomhdhúshlán is ea fadhb lipéadaithe mhícheart agus caidreamh fada-eireaball de bharr maoirseoireacht i bhfad i gcéin maidir le heastóscadh. Maolaíonn saothair a rinneadh le déanaí an lipéadú mícheart trí aird roghnaíoch trí fhoghlaim ilchéime, ach ní féidir leo déileáil go maith le caidreamh fada-eireaball fiú má thugtar ordlathas an chaidrimh isteach chun eolas a roinnt. San obair seo, molaimid gréasán néarúil úrnua, Ag Comhoibriú Aird Mhéadaithe Gaol (CoRA), chun an lipéadú mícheart agus an caidreamh fada-eireaball araon a láimhseáil. Go háirithe, molaimid ar dtús gréasán aird mhéadaithe gaolmhar mar mhúnla bonn. Feidhmíonn sé ar mhála pianbhreithe le haird ar phianbhreith go gaol chun éifeacht lipéadaithe mícheart a íoslaghdú. Ansin, arna éascú ag an mbunmhúnla atá beartaithe, tugaimid isteach gnéithe caidrimh chomhoibrithe a roinntear i measc na gcaidrimh sna hordlathais chun an próiseas um mhéadú an chaidrimh a chur chun cinn agus chun na sonraí oiliúna a chothromú le haghaidh caidreamh fadtéarmach. Seachas an príomhchuspóir oiliúna maidir le caidreamh mála pianbhreithe a thuar, úsáidtear cuspóir cúnta chun an próiseas méadaithe caidrimh a threorú le haghaidh léiriú níos cruinne ar leibhéal an mhála. Sna turgnaimh ar an tacar sonraí tagarmharcála móréilimh NYT, feabhsaítear an fheidhmíocht úrscothach a bhí ann roimhe seo le corrlach mór i dtéarmaí Precision@N, AUC agus Hits@K. Deimhníonn anailísí breise a chumas níos fearr maidir le caidreamh eireaball fada a láimhseáil i gcodarsnacht leis na hiomaitheoirí.', 'hu': 'A hibás címkézési probléma és a hosszú farkú kapcsolatok két fő kihívás, amelyeket a kapcsolatkitermelés távoli felügyelete okoz. A közelmúltbeli munkák a többpéldányos tanulás révén szelektív figyelemmel enyhítik a rossz címkézést, de nem tudják jól kezelni a hosszú farkú kapcsolatokat, még akkor sem, ha a kapcsolatok hierarchiáját vezetik be a tudás megosztása érdekében. Ebben a munkában egy új neurális hálózatot javasolunk, a Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), amely mind a rossz címkézés, mind a hosszú farkú kapcsolatok kezelésére szolgál. Elsősorban a kapcsolatkibővített figyelemhálózatot javasoljuk alapmodellként. Ítéletzsákon működik, mondat-kapcsolat figyelemmel, hogy minimalizálja a rossz címkézés hatását. Ezt követően a javasolt alapmodell segítségével bevezetjük a hierarchiákban lévő kapcsolatok között megosztott együttműködő kapcsolati jellemzőket a kapcsolatnövelő folyamat előmozdítása és a hosszú farkú kapcsolatok képzési adatainak kiegyensúlyozása érdekében. A mondattáska kapcsolatának előrejelzésére irányuló fő tréning célkitűzés mellett egy kiegészítő célkitűzést is használunk a kapcsolatnövelő folyamat irányítására a pontosabb zsákszintű ábrázolás érdekében. A népszerű NYT benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérletek során a javasolt CoRA nagymértékben javítja a korábbi korszerű teljesítményt a Precision@N AUC és Hits@K. További elemzések igazolják, hogy a versenytársakkal szemben kiváló képessége van a hosszú farkú kapcsolatok kezelésében.', 'el': 'Το λάθος πρόβλημα επισήμανσης και οι σχέσεις μακράς ουράς είναι δύο κύριες προκλήσεις που προκαλούνται από την μακρινή εποπτεία στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Πρόσφατα έργα ανακουφίζουν τη λανθασμένη επισήμανση με επιλεκτική προσοχή μέσω της εκμάθησης πολλαπλών περιπτώσεων, αλλά δεν μπορούν να χειριστούν καλά σχέσεις μακράς ουράς ακόμα και αν εισάγονται ιεραρχίες των σχέσεων για να μοιραστούν τη γνώση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό δίκτυο, τη Συνεργάζουσα Σχέση-Αυξημένη Προσοχή (για να χειριστεί τόσο τη λανθασμένη επισήμανση όσο και τις σχέσεις μακράς ουράς. Ειδικότερα, προτείνουμε πρώτα το δίκτυο προσοχής ως βασικό μοντέλο. Λειτουργεί σε σακούλα με πρόταση-σε-σχέση προσοχή για να ελαχιστοποιήσει την επίδραση της λανθασμένης επισήμανσης. Στη συνέχεια, με τη διευκόλυνση του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου βάσης, εισάγουμε χαρακτηριστικά συνεργασίας που μοιράζονται μεταξύ των σχέσεων στις ιεραρχίες για την προώθηση της διαδικασίας αύξησης των σχέσεων και την εξισορρόπηση των δεδομένων κατάρτισης για σχέσεις μακράς ουράς. Εκτός από τον κύριο εκπαιδευτικό στόχο για την πρόβλεψη της σχέσης μιας σακούλας με προτάσεις, χρησιμοποιείται ένας βοηθητικός στόχος για να καθοδηγήσει τη διαδικασία αύξησης της σχέσης για μια πιο ακριβή αναπαράσταση σε επίπεδο σακούλας. Στα πειράματα σχετικά με το δημοφιλές σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς NYT, το προτεινόμενο CoRA βελτιώνει την προηγούμενη υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο όσον αφορά Precision@N AUC και Hits@K. Περαιτέρω αναλύσεις επαληθεύουν την ανώτερη ικανότητά του στον χειρισμό σχέσεων μακράς ουράς σε αντίθεση με τους ανταγωνιστές.', 'ka': 'შეცდომა პრობლემები და სიგრძნე განმავლობები არის ორი მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილებები, რომლებიც განმავლობაში გადამუშავებული მონახილობაში. მიმდინარე სამუშაო შეცდომა ნიშანების შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის გამოყენებაზე, მაგრამ მრავალ ინსტენსტის სწავლების გამოყენებაში, მაგრამ არ შეუძლია ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პრომენტური ნეიროლური ქსელი, კოლაბორაციის აღმოჩენება (CoRA) დავწყებთ, რომელიც შეცდომა მარტივი მარტივის და ძალიან გრძნობების შესახებ. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ პირველად დავწყვებთ პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველ პირველ პირველ პირველ პირველ პირველ პირვე ის მუშაობა სიტყვების ფანჯრებში, რომელიც შეცდომა სიტყვების შესახებ შესახებ მინუსიზება შეცდომა სიტყვების ეფექტის შესახებ. შემდეგ, საზოგადომის ბაზის მოდელისთვის, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ თავდამუშავებელი კავშირების ფუნქციები, რომლებიც ჰიერაქტიების შესახებ დამატებული პროცესის დამატებული და გან მაგალითად საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი შესახებ, შესახებ საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკ ექსპერიმენტებში პოლუმენტური ბენქმარკური მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია NYT-ში, პროგრამის კოპა უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო Precision@N , AUC და Hits@K. ეპსდთ ანალთჱთპანთ ოპჲგვპთ ნვდჲგარა ნაი-დჲლწმა ჟოჲჟჲბნჲჟრ ჱა პაბჲრა ნა ეყლდჲოაჟნთ გპყჱკთ გ პაბჲრა ჲრ კჲნკპსმვნრპთრვ', 'kk': 'Жарамсыз жарлықтау мәселесі және ұзындық қатынастар - қатынастық қатынастарды тарқату үшін қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы екі негізгі мәселе. Жуырдағы жұмыстар көп инстанциялық оқыту арқылы таңдау үшін қате жарлық жарлығын көмектеседі, бірақ қатынастардың иерархиясы білімді ортақтастыру үшін қатынастарын ұзындық қатынастар Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз романдық невралды желі, қатынас көтерілген қатынас (CoRA) дегенді, жарамсыз жарлық жарлық пен ұзындық қатынастарды басқару үшін жасаймыз. Әсіресе, біріншіден қатынас көтерілген желі негізгі үлгі ретінде қолданып тастаймыз. Бұл сөздерді сөздерге қатынасыз тәртібін төмендету үшін тәртібімен жұмыс істейді. Содан кейін, келтірілген негізгі үлгілерден көмектесіп, иерархиядағы қатынастар арасында бөлікті қатынастар қасиеттерін көрсету үшін қатынастарды көмектесу және ұзындық қатынастар үшін оқыту деректерін Сөйлеменің қатынасын бақылау үшін негізгі оқыту мақсатын басқа, көмектесу мақсатын қолданылады, салыстыру процесін көмектесу үшін дұрыс деңгейіндегі таңдау үшін. NYT бағдарламалық бағдарламалық деректер жиынының тәжірибелерінде, келтірілген CoRA бағдарламалардың алдыңғы орындалық жағдайын үлкен шектеу арқылы Precision@N , AUC және Hits@K. Қосымша анализ, конкурсорларға қарсы ұзындық қатынасын қамтамасыз ету үшін оның жоғары қатынасын тексеру мүмкіндігін тексереді.', 'it': "Problemi di etichettatura errati e relazioni a coda lunga sono due sfide principali causate dalla supervisione a distanza nell'estrazione delle relazioni. I lavori recenti alleviano l'etichettatura sbagliata attraverso l'attenzione selettiva attraverso l'apprendimento multi-istanza, ma non riescono a gestire bene le relazioni a coda lunga anche se vengono introdotte gerarchie delle relazioni per condividere la conoscenza. In questo lavoro, proponiamo una nuova rete neurale, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), per gestire sia l'etichettatura sbagliata che le relazioni long-tail. In particolare, proponiamo come modello base la rete di attenzione aumentata di relazione. Funziona sul sacchetto frase con un'attenzione frase a relazione per minimizzare l'effetto di etichettatura errata. Successivamente, facilitati dal modello base proposto, introduciamo caratteristiche relazionali collaborative condivise tra le relazioni nelle gerarchie per promuovere il processo di aumento delle relazioni e bilanciare i dati formativi per le relazioni long-tail. Oltre all'obiettivo principale di formazione per prevedere la relazione di un sacchetto di frase, un obiettivo ausiliario è utilizzato per guidare il processo di aumento della relazione per una rappresentazione più accurata a livello di sacchetto. Negli esperimenti sul popolare set di dati di benchmark NYT, la proposta CoRA migliora le prestazioni precedenti allo stato dell'arte di un ampio margine in termini di Precision@N AUC e Hits@K. Ulteriori analisi dimostrano la sua capacità superiore nel gestire relazioni long-tail rispetto ai concorrenti.", 'lt': 'Klaidinga ženklinimo problema ir ilguoju uodegos santykiai yra du pagrindiniai iššūkiai, kylantys dėl tolimos priežiūros, susijusios su gavyba. Neseniai atlikti darbai palengvina neteisingą ženklinimą atrankiniu dėmesiu daugiašaliu mokymusi, tačiau negali gerai valdyti ilgalaikių santykių, net jei santykių hierarchijos yra įdiegtos dalijantis žiniomis. In this work, we propose a novel neural network, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), to handle both the wrong labeling and long-tail relations.  Visų pirma mes pirmiausia siūlome santykių didinimo dėmesio tinklą kaip bazinį model į. Ji veikia ant bausmės maišo, skiriant santykinį dėmesį, kad būtų kuo labiau sumažintas klaidingo ženklinimo poveikis. Then, facilitated by the proposed base model, we introduce collaborating relation features shared among relations in the hierarchies to promote the relation-augmenting process and balance the training data for long-tail relations.  Be pagrindinio mokymo tikslo prognozuoti sankcijų maišo ryšį, siekiant tikslesnio maišo lygio rodymo, naudojamas papildomas tikslas, kuriuo vadovaujamasi santykių didinimo procesui. Eksperimentuose su populiariu lyginamuoju duomenų rinkiniu NYT pasiūlytas CoRA gerokai pagerina ankstesnius pažangiausius rezultatus Precision@N , AUC ir Hits@K. Toliau atliekant analizę, priešingai nei konkurentai, patikrinama, ar jis turi didesnį pajėgumą valdyti ilgalaikius santykius.', 'mk': 'Погрешен проблем со означувањето и односите со долга опашка се два главни предизвици предизвикани од далечниот надзор во врска со извлекувањето на односите. Неодамнешните дела го олеснуваат погрешното означување со селективно внимание преку мултиинстантно учење, но не можат добро да се справат со долгите односи дури и ако се воведени хиерархии на односите за споделување на знаење. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нова нервна мрежа, Соработка со Внимание зголемено од односите (CoRA), за да се справи со погрешното етикетирање и односите со долга опашка. Особено, прво предложуваме мрежа на зголемено внимание како базичен модел. Работи на вреќата со реченици со внимание од реченица до релатива за минимизирање на ефектот на погрешно етикетирање. Потоа, олесни од предложениот базички модел, воведуваме карактеристики на соработка споделени меѓу односите во хиерархиите за промовирање на процесот на зголемување на односите и балансирање на податоците за обука за долги односи. Покрај главната обука за предвидување на односот на вреќата со реченици, се користи помошна објектива за водење на процесот на зголемување на односите за попрецизно претставување на нивото на вреќата. Во експериментите на популарниот компјутер на податоци за benchmark НЈТ, предложената КоРА ја подобрува претходната најдобра резултат со голема маргина во поглед на Precision@N , AUC и Hits@K. Понатамошни анализи ја верификуваат нејзината надлежна способност за справување со долгите односи во разлика од конкурентите.', 'ms': 'Masalah label salah dan hubungan ekor panjang adalah dua cabaran utama disebabkan oleh pengawasan jauh dalam ekstraksi hubungan. Kerja-kerja baru-baru ini mengurangkan label yang salah dengan perhatian selektif melalui pembelajaran multi-instance, tetapi tidak dapat mengendalikan hubungan ekor-panjang dengan baik walaupun hierarki hubungan diperkenalkan untuk berkongsi pengetahuan. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian saraf baru, Perhatian Perhubungan Ditambah (CoRA), untuk menangani kedua-dua label yang salah dan hubungan ekor panjang. Terutama, kita pertama-tama melamar rangkaian perhatian-meningkat hubungan sebagai model as as. Ia beroperasi pada beg kalimat dengan perhatian kalimat-ke-hubungan untuk minimumkan kesan label yang salah. Kemudian, disediakan oleh model asas yang diusulkan, kami memperkenalkan ciri-ciri hubungan berkongsi antara hubungan dalam hierarki untuk mempromosikan proses pertumbuhan hubungan dan seimbang data latihan untuk hubungan ekor panjang. Selain objektif latihan utama untuk meramalkan hubungan beg kalimat, objektif bantuan digunakan untuk memimpin proses pertumbuhan hubungan untuk perwakilan tahap beg yang lebih tepat. Dalam eksperimen pada set data benchmark populer NYT, CoRA yang diusulkan meningkatkan prestasi kemajuan terdahulu dengan margin besar dalam terma Precision@N , AUC and  Hits@K. Analisis lanjut mengesahkan kemampuan atasnya dalam mengendalikan hubungan ekor-panjang sebaliknya dengan pesaing.', 'mt': "Problema ta’ tikkettar żbaljata u relazzjonijiet bejn id-denb twil huma żewġ sfidi ewlenin ikkawżati minn superviżjoni distanti fir-rigward tal-estrazzjoni. Recent works alleviate the wrong labeling by selective attention via multi-instance learning, but cannot well handle long-tail relations even if hierarchies of the relations are introduced to share knowledge.  F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu netwerk newrali ġdid, Attenzjoni Mkabbar tar-Relazzjonijiet (CoRA), biex nimmaniġġjaw kemm it-tikkettar ħa żin kif ukoll ir-relazzjonijiet tad-denb twil. B’mod partikolari, l-ewwel nett nipproponu netwerk ta’ attenzjoni miżjuda b’relazzjoni bħala mudell bażiku. It operates on sentence bag with a sentence-to-relation attention to minimize the effect of wrong labeling.  Imbagħad, iffaċilitati mill-mudell bażiku propost, aħna nintroduċu karatteristiċi ta' relazzjoni kollaborattiva kondiviżi fost ir-relazzjonijiet fil-ġerarkiji biex nippromwovu l-proċess ta' żieda fir-relazzjonijiet u nibbilanċjaw id-dejta tat-taħriġ għal relazzjonijiet fit-tul. Minbarra l-objettiv ewlieni ta’ taħriġ li jipprevedi r-relazzjoni ta’ borża ta’ sentenza, jintuża objettiv awżiljarju biex jiggwida l-proċess ta’ żieda tar-relazzjoni għal rappreżentazzjoni aktar preċiża fil-livell ta’ borża. Fl-esperimenti dwar is-sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza popolari NYT, il-CoRA proposta ttejjeb il-prestazzjoni preċedenti l-aktar avvanzata b’marġini kbir f’termini ta’ Precision@N , AUC u Hits@K. Analiżi ulterjuri tivverifika l-kapaċità superjuri tagħha fit-trattament tar-relazzjonijiet tad-denb twil b’kuntrast mal-kompetituri.", 'ml': 'തെറ്റായ പ്രശ്നവും നീണ്ട വാലില്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങളും രണ്ടു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വെല്ലുകളാണ് വിദൂര പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ  പല ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന തെറ്റായ ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തി-കൂട്ടിയ ശ്രദ്ധ കൂട് Particularly, we first propose relation-augmented attention network as base model.  അത് വാക്കിന്റെ ബാഗില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് തെറ്റായ ലേബിളിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കുറച്ചു കൂട്ടുന്നതിനായി വാക പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബേസ് മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ബന്ധപ്രക്രിയയുടെ വ ഒരു വാക്ക് ബാഗിന്റെ ബന്ധത്തെ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രെയിനിയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം കൂടാതെ ഒരു വാക്ക് ബാഗ് നില പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച കോറാ ഒരു വലിയ മാര്\u200dജിന്\u200d കൊണ്ട് മുമ്പുള്ള ക Precision@N , AUC Hits@K. നീണ്ട ട ടാല്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d അതിന്റെ അത്യുന്നതധികം പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുക.', 'mn': 'Гэвч буруу маркингийн асуудал, урт хугацааны харилцаа нь хоёр гол сорилт юм. Харин хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын харилцааны хоорондын зөвхөн харилцааны шаардлагатай хооронд Саяхан ажил олон төрлийн сургалтын аргаар сонголтын анхаарлын тулд буруу маркингуудыг буруу маркингуудыг багасгаж чадна. Гэхдээ харилцааны архивууд мэдлэг хуваалцахын тулд харилцаа урт хугацаанд ч Энэ ажлын тулд бид шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээ, хамтран хамтран хамааралтай харилцаа (CoRA) нэмэгдүүлсэн, буруу маркинг болон урт хугацааны харилцаа хоёулахын тулд санал өгдөг. Ялангуяа бид анх харилцааны анхаарлыг суурь загвар гэж нэмэгдүүлсэн анхаарлын сүлжээ суурь загвар гэж санал болгож байна. Энэ нь буруу тэмдэглээний нөлөөг багасгах гэсэн үг дээр өгүүлбэртэй холбоотой анхаарлыг ашигладаг. Дараа нь суурь загварын тусламжтайгаар тусламжтайгаар бид хамтран ажилладаг харилцаа холбоотой байгууллагуудын тусламжтайгаа илэрхийлдэг, харилцаа нэмэгдүүлэх процессийг дэмжих, урт хугацааны харилцааны тусламжта Хувьсалын бэлгийн харилцааныг таамаглах гол дасгал зорилготой гадна хамааралтай зорилго нь илүү нарийн бэлгийн түвшинд харилцааны нэмэгдүүлэх процессийг удирдах хэрэгтэй. НYT-ийн алдартай салбарын өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилт дээр CoRA-ын санал дэвшүүлсэн урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг илүү том завсарлагаар сайжруулдаг. Precision@N , AUC болон Hits@K. Дараагийн шинжилгээ нь өрсөлдөгчдийн эсрэг урт хугацааны харилцааны удирдах чадварыг удирдаж байдаг.', 'no': 'Feil etiketteringsproblem og langhaldbehandlingar er to hovudutfordringar forårsaket av distant oversikt i forhold til utpakking. Nyleg har arbeid å redusera feil merkelapp ved å velja merkelighet ved å læra fleire instansar, men kan ikkje handtera lang halvforhold sjølv om hierarki av forholdene vert introdusert for å dele kunnskap. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit nytt neuralnettverk, samarbeidsfarga relasjonsbehandling (CoRA) for å handtera både feil etiketting og lang halvforhold. I særskilt, vi først foreslår relasjonsøkt oppmerksnettverk som grunnmodell. Det fungerer på setningsmag med eit setningsratt oppmerksomhet til å minimera effekten av feil merkelapp. Deretter, tilgjengeleg av den foreslåtte grunnmodellen, introduserer vi samarbeidsfunksjonsfunksjonar delt blant forhold i hierarkitet for å promotera relasjonsøkingsprosessen og balansera opplæringsdata for lang halvforhold. I tillegg til hovudøvingsmålet for å forhåndsvisa relasjonen til eit setningspag, vert eit hjelpemål brukt for å hjelpa fram sambandsvisingsprosessen for meir nøyaktig representasjon av bagnivå. I eksperimentene på den populære benchmarkdatasettet NYT, foreslått CoRA forbedrar førre utviklinga av kunsten med stor margin i forhold til Precision@N , AUC og Hits@K. Furre analyser kontrollerer den øvre kapasiteten i handlinga av langhaldsrelasjonar i kontrast til konkurentene.', 'pl': 'Błędny problem etykietowania i relacje long-ogon to dwa główne wyzwania spowodowane przez odległy nadzór w ekstrakcji relacji. Ostatnie prace łagodzą błędne etykietowanie poprzez selektywną uwagę poprzez uczenie się wielu instancji, ale nie mogą dobrze poradzić sobie z relacjami długiego ogona nawet jeśli hierarchia relacji są wprowadzane w celu dzielenia się wiedzą. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nową sieć neuronową, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), aby obsługiwać zarówno niewłaściwe etykietowanie, jak i relacje long-tail. W szczególności w pierwszej kolejności proponujemy sieć uwagi rozszerzonej relacji jako model bazowy. Działa na torbie zdań z uwagą zdania do relacji, aby zminimalizować efekt błędnego etykietowania. Następnie, ułatwiony przez proponowany model bazowy, wprowadzamy cechy relacji współpracujących współdzielone między relacjami w hierarchiach, aby promować proces powiększania relacji i zrównoważyć dane szkoleniowe dla relacji długogonowych. Poza głównym celem treningowym mającym na celu przewidywanie relacji worka zdań, wykorzystywany jest obiekt pomocniczy, aby kierować procesem powiększania relacji w celu dokładniejszej reprezentacji na poziomie worka. W eksperymentach na popularnym zbiorze danych referencyjnym NYT proponowany CoRA poprawia dotychczasową wydajność w znacznym stopniu pod względem: Precision@N AUC i Hits@K. Dalsze analizy potwierdzają jego doskonałą zdolność do obsługi relacji long-tail w przeciwieństwie do konkurencji.', 'ro': 'Problema greșită de etichetare și relațiile cu coada lungă sunt două provocări principale cauzate de supravegherea la distanță a extracției relațiilor. Lucrările recente atenuează etichetarea greșită prin atenția selectivă prin învățarea în mai multe instanțe, dar nu pot gestiona bine relațiile cu coadă lungă chiar dacă ierarhiile relațiilor sunt introduse pentru a împărtăși cunoștințele. În această lucrare, propunem o rețea neurală nouă, Colaborarea Relatie-Augmented Attention (CoRA), pentru a gestiona atât etichetarea greșită, cât și relațiile cu coadă lungă. În special, propunem mai întâi rețeaua de atenție cu relație augmentată ca model de bază. Acesta funcționează pe punga de propoziție cu o atenție propoziție-la-relație pentru a minimiza efectul etichetării greșite. Apoi, facilitat de modelul de bază propus, introducem caracteristici de relație colaborativă împărtășite între relațiile din ierarhii pentru promovarea procesului de creștere a relațiilor și echilibrarea datelor de formare pentru relațiile cu coadă lungă. Pe lângă obiectivul principal de formare de a prezice relația dintre un sac de propoziții, un obiectiv auxiliar este utilizat pentru a ghida procesul de creștere a relației pentru o reprezentare mai precisă la nivel de sac. În experimentele efectuate pe setul popular de date de referință NYT, CoRA propusă îmbunătățește performanțele anterioare de ultimă generație cu o marjă mare în ceea ce privește Precision@N ASC şi Hits@K. Analize suplimentare verifică capacitatea superioară a acesteia de a gestiona relațiile cu coada lungă, în contrast cu concurenții.', 'si': 'වැරදි ලේබිල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ලොකු පස්සේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් තමයි ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් තමයි දුරස්ථ අන්තිම වැරදි වැරදි ලේබිල් එක අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාවක් ඉගෙනගන්න, නමුත් ගොඩක් වැරදි සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනු මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය, සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධය (CoRA), වැරදි ලේබිල් එක්ක ස විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම සම්බන්ධයෙන් වැඩි අවධාන ජාලය විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා. ඒක වාක්ය බෑග් එකේ වාක්ය සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා වැරදි ලේබිල් එකේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අඩු කරන්න. ඊට පස්සේ, ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත ව වාක්ය බෑග් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නය අරමුණ සමඟ, සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ විශාල ජාතික බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් NYT ගැන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය CoRA ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මුලින් ස්ථානයේ  Precision@N , AUC සහ Hits@K. තවත් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා එයාගේ උපරිම ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා තර්ජනය කරන්න පුළු', 'so': 'Dhibaatooyinka labka khalad ah iyo xiriirka dhaadheerka ah waa laba dhibaatooyin oo muhiim ah oo laga keenay ilaalinta fog ee la soo saaray. Shaqooyinka la soo dhowaaday waxay u fududeeyaan calaamada khaladda ah oo aad u fiiriso barashada tusaale ahaan badan, laakiin ma suurtagal karto inay si fiican u qabsadaan xiriirka dabaalka xittaa haddii xiriirka la soo bandhigaa aqoonta. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda neurada ee warqada ah, wadajirka xiriirka la kordhiyey (CoRA), si aan u xambaarano xiriirka khaladda ah iyo xiriirka dhaadheerka. Si gaar ah, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda xiriirka oo la kordhiyey sida model asal ah. Waxay ku shaqeeyaa baaskii xukunka si ay ugu yaraato saamaynta labka khaladda. Markaas, waxaynu horumarinnaa sameynta qaababka aasaasiga ah ee lagu talo galay, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa xiriir wadajir ah oo ku saabsan xiriirka hierarkiisa, si aan u horumarino tartanka koritaanka xiriirka iyo sameynta macluumaadka waxbarashada ee xiriirka dhaadheerka. Waxyaabaha ku saabsan waxbarashada aasaasiga ah si uu wax u sii sheego xiriirka bag, waxaa loo isticmaalaa goal ku habboon inuu hago kordhiska xiriirka si aad u saxdaan qaabilaadda bag-ka. Imtixaanka ku saabsan taariikhda bangiga ee maarufu NYT, waxaa laga soo jeeday CoRA inuu hagaajiyo xaaladda hore ee farshaxanta, marxalad aad u weyn Precision@N , AUC iyo Hits@K. Baaritaanka dheeraadka ah waxaa xaqiijiya awooddiisa aad u sarreeya in la sameeyo xiriirka dabaalka dheer oo la xiriira ilaaliyayaasha.', 'sr': 'Pogrešni problem označavanja i dugotrajni odnosi su dve glavne izazove uzrokovane udaljenim nadzorom u odnosu na ekstrakciju. Nedavni radovi olakšavaju pogrešnu etiketu selektivnom pažnjom putem multiinstancijskog učenja, ali ne mogu dobro podnijeti dugotrajne odnose čak i ako se hijerarhije odnosa uvede kako bi podijelili znanje. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu neuralnu mrežu, povećanu pažnju na saradnju odnosa (CoRA), kako bi rješili pogrešne etikete i dugoročne odnose. Posebno, prvo predlažemo povećanu pažnju mrežu vezama kao bazni model. Radi na vrećici rečenice sa pažnjom rečenice u odnosu na rečenicu da minimizira učinak pogrešne etikete. Onda, olakšano predloženim baznim modelom, predstavljamo karakteristike saradnje odnosa koji su podijeljeni među odnosima u hijerarhiji kako bi promovirali proces povećanja odnosa i ravnotežali podatke o obuci za dugoročne odnose. Osim glavnog cilja obuke za predviđanje odnosa vreće rečenice, koristi se pomoćni cilj da vodi proces povećanja odnosa za tačnije predstavljanje nivoa vreća. U eksperimentima o popularnoj bazi podataka NYT-a, predložena KoRA poboljšava prethodnu predstavu umjetnosti velikom marginom u smislu Precision@N , AUC i Hits@K. Daljnje analize provjeravaju svoju nadmoćnu sposobnost u rješavanju dugotrajnih odnosa suprotno konkurentima.', 'sv': 'Fel märkningsproblem och long-tail relationer är två huvudutmaningar som orsakas av fjärrövervakning av relationsutdragning. De senaste verken lindrar fel märkning genom selektiv uppmärksamhet via flerinstans lärande, men kan inte hantera långa relationer väl även om relationshierarkier införs för att dela kunskap. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett nytt neuralt nätverk, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), för att hantera både fel märkning och long-tail relationer. Särskilt föreslår vi först relationsförstärkt uppmärksamhetsnätverk som grundmodell. Den fungerar på meningsäck med en mening-till-relation uppmärksamhet för att minimera effekten av fel märkning. Därefter, underlättat av den föreslagna basmodellen, introducerar vi samarbetsrelationsfunktioner som delas mellan relationerna i hierarkierna för att främja relationsförbättrande processen och balansera utbildningsdata för long-tail relationer. Förutom det huvudsakliga träningsmålet att förutsäga relationen mellan en meningsäck används ett hjälpmål för att vägleda relationsförstärkningsprocessen för en mer exakt representation på säcknivå. I experimenten på det populära benchmark-datauppsättningen NYT förbättrar den föreslagna CoRA den tidigare toppmoderna prestandan med stor marginal i termer av Precision@N AUC och Hits@K. Ytterligare analyser bekräftar dess överlägsna förmåga att hantera long-tail relationer jämfört med konkurrenterna.', 'ta': 'தவறான குறிப்பிட்ட சிக்கல் மற்றும் நீண்ட வால் உறவுகள் இரண்டு முக்கிய சவால்கள் தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பு தூரத்தில்  தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பல நிகழ்வுகள் கற்றுக்கொண்டு சில தவறான குறியீட்டை நீக்க முடியாது, ஆனால் தொடர்புகளின் உத்தரங்களை அறிவை பகிர்ந்து கொள் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய பிணையத்தின் பிணையத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், இணைப்பு மேலும் அதிகரிக்கப்பட்ட கவனத்தை கூட்டுகிறோம் ( க குறிப்பாக, நாம் முதலில் தொடர்பு மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட கவனத்தின் வலைப்பின்னலை அடிப்படை மாதிரி இது தவறான சிட்டியின் விளைவை குறைவாக்க வாக்கியத்துடன் ஒரு வாக்கியம்-to-relation கவனத்துடன் செயல்படுகிறது. பிறகு, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அடிப்படை மாதிரியால், நாம் உபயோகப்படுத்தும் தொடர்பு குணங்களில் பங்கிடப்பட்டுள்ள தொடர்புகளில் பங்கிடப்பட்டுள்ளது தொடர்பு வாக்கு பையின் தொடர்பை முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான முக்கிய பயிற்சி பொருளுக்கு தவிர, ஒரு அனுமதிக்கப்பட்ட பொருள் மேலும் சரியான பாக்- மட்டத்தின் பகி பெரிய பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தின் சோதனைகளில், நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட கோரா முன்னோட்டு கலை செயல்பாட்டின் முன்னோட்டு செயல்பாட்ட Precision@N , AUC மற்றும் Hits@K. - மேலும் ஆய்வுகள் போட்டோருக்கு எதிர்பார்த்து நீண்ட வால் தொடர்புகளை கையாளும் அதிக சக்தியை சரிபார்க்க.', 'ur': 'غلط لیبلینگ مسئلہ اور طویل ریل رابطہ دو مسئلہ چالیں ہیں جنہیں دور کی نظارت اٹھانے کے باعث بنایا گیا ہے. اچھا کام بہت سی مثالیں کی تعلیم کے ذریعے بری لابلینگ کو آسان کر رہے ہیں، لیکن اگرچہ رابطہ کے معاملہ میں علم شریک کرنے کے لئے لائق ہوتے ہیں، اگرچہ ان کے معاملہ کے معاملہ کے معاملہ میں بہت سی رابطہ اس کام میں ہم نے ایک نور نیورل نیٹ ورک کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، رابطہ اضافہ کی توجه (CoRA) کے ساتھ، دونوں غلط لابلینگ اور طویل ٹیل رابطہ کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے کے لئے۔ مخصوص طور پر، ہم پہلی بار رابطہ سے اضافہ کی توجه نیٹورک بنسٹ مدل کے طور پر پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. یہ ایک مجلس کے باغ پر فعال کرتا ہے کہ ایک مجلس کے ساتھ ارتباط کا اثر کم کرے۔ اس کے بعد، پیشنهاد بنسس موڈل کے ذریعہ آسان ہوا، ہم تعلق کے معاملات میں تعلق کرنے والے تعلقات کے معاملات کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ تعلقات میں اضافہ کرنے والی پروسس کو پیشنهاد کریں اور طویل ٹیل رابطہ کے لئے تعلیم کے معاملات کو برابر کریں ایک جماعت بستی کے ارتباط کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے اصلی تعلیم موقعیت کے علاوہ، ایک مددگار موقعیت استعمال کی جاتی ہے کہ رابطہ-افزایش پروسس کو زیادہ دقیق بستی سطح نمایش کے لئے ہدایت کرے. جمعی بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ NYT کی آزمائش میں، پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ CORA پہلے کی حالت آرتی کی پرورش کو بڑی مرز سے بہتر کر دیتا ہے Precision@N ، AUC اور Hits@K. اور اس سے زیادہ تحقیقات کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ مسابقات کرنے والوں کے مقابلہ میں طویل پڑے کی رابطہ کریں.', 'vi': 'Sai vấn đề nhãn và quan hệ theo đuôi dài là hai thử thách chính do sự giám sát xa xôi gây ra trong việc khai thác. Những tác phẩm gần đây làm giảm hiệu ứng sai bằng sự chăm chú chọn lọc qua các trường hợp học đa năng, nhưng không thể quản lý các mối quan hệ dài ngay cả khi hệ hệ hệ thống phân cấp được tạo ra để chia sẻ kiến thức. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng lưới thần kinh mới, hợp tác với hệ thống dữ liệu liên quan tăng cường (CoRA) để xử lý cả các mối quan hệ với hàm sai và đuôi dài. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi đề xuất mạng chú ý tăng cường quan hệ làm mẫu cơ bản. Nó hoạt động trên túi câu với một sự chú ý từ câu đến tương quan để giảm thiểu hiệu quả của hiệu ứng sai lầm. Sau đó, được hỗ trợ bởi mẫu cơ bản đề xuất, chúng ta sẽ tạo các mối quan hệ hợp tác chia sẻ giữa các quan hệ trong các cấp dưới để thúc đẩy tiến trình cải thiện quan hệ và cân bằng dữ liệu đào tạo cho các mối quan hệ dài. Bên cạnh mục tiêu huấn luyện chính để dự đoán mối liên hệ của một túi câu, một mục tiêu phụ được dùng để hướng dẫn quá trình cải thiện các mối quan hệ để có được một đại diện túi chính xác hơn. Trong các thí nghiệm trên tập tin dựa trên điểm chuẩn phổ biến New York, giá trị cộng đồng Colt đã đề nghị cải thiện hiệu suất tối tân Precision@N Nước Cộng hoà Hits@K. Các phân tích khác xác nhận khả năng cao hơn của nó trong việc xử lý các mối quan hệ đuôi dài so với đối thủ.', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi muammo va uzoqlar orasidagi boshqa murakkablarini ajratish uchun ikki muhim muammolar. Yaqinda ishlarni bir nechta misol o'rganish orqali tanlangan foydalanish orqali xato yozuvni olib tashlash mumkin, ammo o o'sha aloqalarning qiymatlarini tahlil qilishi mumkin. In this work, we propose a novel neural network, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), to handle both the wrong labeling and long-tail relations.  Ko'rsatda, biz birinchi marta bog'liq o'xshash tarmoqni asosiy modeli sifatida talab qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Keyin, taʼminlovchi asosiy modeli tomonidan foydalanishimiz mumkin, biz hierarcha munosabatlarning orasidagi huquqlarni ishlashimiz mumkin. Ulanishni oshirish jarayonini bajarishi va uzoqlar bilan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni bajarishimiz mumkin. Name Umumiy benchmark maʼlumotlar tizimini NYT'da, davomiy qilingan CoRA, birinchi katta harfni o'zgartiradi. Precision@N , AUC va Hits@K. Бошқа таҳлиллар тажовузкорларнинг ўзгартига қарши узун жиҳатлар мосламаларини қўллашда аъзоларини тасдиқлайди.", 'da': 'Forkert mærkningsproblem og langhaleforhold er to hovedudfordringer forårsaget af fjerntilsyn i relation ekstraktion. Nylige værker afhjælper den forkerte mærkning ved selektiv opmærksomhed via multi-instance learning, men kan ikke godt håndtere langhaleforhold, selvom hierarkier af relationerne indføres for at dele viden. I dette arbejde foreslår vi et nyt neuralt netværk, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), til at håndtere både forkert mærkning og langhale relationer. Især foreslår vi først relationsforøget opmærksomhedsnetværk som grundmodel. Det fungerer på sætningspose med en sætning-til-relation opmærksomhed for at minimere effekten af forkert mærkning. Derefter, lettet af den foreslåede basismodel, introducerer vi samarbejdsrelaterede funktioner delt mellem relationerne i hierarkierne for at fremme relationsforøgelsesprocessen og balancere træningsdata for long-tail relations. Ud over det vigtigste træningsmål at forudsige forholdet mellem en sætningspose, anvendes et hjælpemål til at lede relationsforøgelsesprocessen for en mere præcis pose-niveau repræsentation. I forsøgene med det populære benchmark datasæt NYT forbedrer den foreslåede CoRA den tidligere state-of-the-art ydeevne med en stor margin i form af Precision@N AUC og Hits@K. Yderligere analyser bekræfter dens overlegne evne til at håndtere langhaleforhold i modsætning til konkurrenterne.', 'bg': 'Грешният проблем с етикетирането и връзките с дългата опашка са две основни предизвикателства, причинени от далечния надзор при извличането на връзка. Последните работи облекчават погрешното етикетиране чрез селективно внимание чрез многоинстанционно обучение, но не могат да се справят добре с дългосрочните отношения, дори ако йерархиите на отношенията са въведени за споделяне на знания. В тази работа предлагаме нова невронна мрежа, която да се справи както с неправилното етикетиране, така и с връзките с дългата опашка. По-конкретно, първо предлагаме връзката разширена мрежа за внимание като базов модел. Той работи върху изречение торбичка с внимание изречение към връзка, за да сведе до минимум ефекта от неправилно етикетиране. След това, улеснени от предлагания базов модел, ние въвеждаме взаимоотношенията, споделени между отношенията в йерархиите, за да популяризираме процеса на увеличаване на отношенията и балансираме данните за обучение за отношенията с дълга опашка. Освен основната цел на обучение за предсказване на връзката на изречение торбичка, спомагателна цел се използва за насочване на процеса на увеличаване на връзката за по-точно представяне на ниво торбичка. В експериментите с популярния бенчмарков набор от данни предлага подобрение на предишното най-съвременно представяне с голям марж по отношение на Precision@N AUC и Hits@K. Допълнителни анализи потвърждават неговата превъзходна способност в справяне с дългоопашки отношения за разлика от конкурентите.', 'hr': 'Pogrešni problem označavanja i dugotrajni odnosi su dvije glavne izazove uzrokovane udaljenim nadzorom u odnosu na ekstrakciju. Skorašnji rad olakšava pogrešnu etiketiranje selektivnom pažnjom putem multiinstancijskog učenja, ali ne može dobro riješiti dugotrajne odnose čak i ako se hijerarhije odnosa uvode kako bi podijelili znanje. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu neuronsku mrežu, povećanu pažnju na suradnju odnosa (CoRA), kako bi se riješili i pogrešne etiketiranje i dugotrajne odnose. Posebno, prvo predlažemo povećanu pažnju mrežu povećane veze kao bazni model. Radi na vrećici rečenice sa pažnjom veze s rečenicama kako bi se smanjila učinak pogrešnog etiketiranja. Zatim, olakšavan predloženim baznim modelom, predstavljamo karakteristike saradnje odnosa koji su podijeljeni među odnosima u hijerarhiji kako bi promovirali proces povećanja odnosa i ravnotežali podatke o obuci za dugotrajne odnose. Osim glavnog cilja obuke za predviđanje odnosa vrećice kazne, koristi se pomoćni cilj kako bi vodio proces povećanja odnosa za precizniji predstavljanje razine vrećice. U eksperimentima o popularnoj bazi podataka NYT-a, predložena CoRA poboljšava prethodnu stanju umjetnosti velikom marginom u smislu Precision@N , AUC i Hits@K. Daljnje analize provjeravaju svoju nadmoćnu sposobnost u rješavanju dugotrajnih odnosa suprotno konkurentima.', 'nl': 'Verkeerde etiketteringsproblemen en long-tail relaties zijn twee belangrijke uitdagingen veroorzaakt door toezicht op afstand bij relatieontwikkeling. Recente werken verlichten de verkeerde etikettering door selectieve aandacht via multi-instance learning, maar kunnen niet goed omgaan met long-tail relaties zelfs als hiërarchieën van de relaties worden geïntroduceerd om kennis te delen. In dit werk stellen we een nieuw neuraal netwerk voor, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), om zowel de verkeerde labeling als long-tail relaties aan te pakken. In het bijzonder stellen we eerst relatie-augmented attention network voor als basismodel. Het werkt op zinnenzak met een zin-naar-relatie aandacht om het effect van verkeerde etikettering te minimaliseren. Vervolgens introduceren we, vergemakkelijkt door het voorgestelde basismodel, samenwerkingsverbanden die gedeeld worden tussen relaties in de hiërarchieën om het relatievergrotingsproces te bevorderen en de trainingsgegevens voor longtail relaties in balans te brengen. Naast de belangrijkste trainingsdoelstelling om de relatie van een zinnenzak te voorspellen, wordt een hulpdoelstelling gebruikt om het relatievergrotingsproces te begeleiden voor een nauwkeurigere weergave op zakniveau. In de experimenten met de populaire benchmark dataset NYT verbetert de voorgestelde CoRA de eerdere state-of-the-art prestaties met een grote marge in termen van Precision@N AUC en Hits@K. Verdere analyses bevestigen zijn superieure capaciteit in het omgaan met long-tail relaties in tegenstelling tot de concurrenten.', 'de': 'Falsches Beschriftungsproblem und Long-Tail-Beziehungen sind zwei Hauptherausforderungen, die durch Fernüberwachung bei der Beziehungsextraktion verursacht werden. Neuere Arbeiten lindern die falsche Kennzeichnung durch selektive Aufmerksamkeit durch Multi-Instanz-Lernen, können aber nicht gut mit Long-Tail-Beziehungen umgehen, selbst wenn Hierarchien der Beziehungen eingeführt werden, um Wissen zu teilen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neuartiges neuronales Netzwerk vor, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), um sowohl die falsche Kennzeichnung als auch die Long-Tail-Beziehungen zu behandeln. Insbesondere schlagen wir zunächst relationsaugmented attention network als Basismodell vor. Es arbeitet auf Satzbeutel mit einer Satz-zu-Relation-Aufmerksamkeit, um den Effekt falscher Beschriftung zu minimieren. Dann, erleichtert durch das vorgeschlagene Basismodell, führen wir kollaborierende Beziehungsmerkmale ein, die zwischen Beziehungen in den Hierarchien geteilt werden, um den Beziehungssteigerungsprozess zu fördern und die Trainingsdaten für Long-Tail-Beziehungen auszugleichen. Neben dem Haupttrainingsziel, die Beziehung eines Satzbacks vorherzusagen, wird ein Hilfsziel verwendet, um den Beziehungssteigerungsprozess für eine genauere Darstellung auf Beutelebene zu steuern. In den Experimenten am beliebten Benchmark-Datensatz NYT verbessert der vorgeschlagene CoRA die bisherige State-of-the-Art-Performance in Bezug auf Precision@N AUC und Hits@K. Weitere Analysen belegen seine überlegene Fähigkeit im Umgang mit Long-Tail-Beziehungen im Vergleich zu den Mitbewerbern.', 'id': 'Masalah label yang salah dan hubungan ekor panjang adalah dua tantangan utama disebabkan oleh pengawasan jauh dalam hubungan ekstraksi. Pekerjaan-pekerjaan baru-baru ini mengurangi label yang salah dengan perhatian selektif melalui belajar multi-instance, tetapi tidak dapat dengan baik menangani hubungan ekor panjang bahkan jika hierarki hubungan diperkenalkan untuk berbagi pengetahuan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan saraf novel, Collaborating Relation-Increased Attention (CoRA), untuk menangani kedua label yang salah dan hubungan ekor panjang. Terutama, kita pertama-tama melamar jaringan perhatian meningkat hubungan sebagai model dasar. Ini beroperasi pada tas kalimat dengan perhatian kalimat-ke-hubungan untuk mengurangi efek dari label yang salah. Then, facilitated by the proposed base model, we introduce collaborating relation features shared among relations in the hierarchies to promote the relation-augmenting process and balance the training data for long-tail relations.  Selain tujuan latihan utama untuk memprediksi hubungan tas kalimat, tujuan bantuan digunakan untuk memimpin proses pertumbuhan hubungan untuk representation level tas yang lebih akurat. Dalam eksperimen pada set data benchmark populer NYT, CoRA yang diusulkan meningkatkan prestasi terbaik sebelumnya dengan margin besar dalam terma Precision@N AUC dan Hits@K.  Further analyses verify its superior capability in handling long-tail relations in contrast to the competitors.', 'ko': '오류 표기 문제와 긴 꼬리 관계는 관계 추출에서 원격 모니터링이 가져오는 두 가지 주요 도전이다.최근의 연구는 다실례 학습을 통해 선택적 주의를 통해 잘못된 표기를 완화시켰지만 장미관계의 차원 구조를 도입해 지식을 공유해도 장미관계를 잘 처리하지 못했다.이 작업에서 우리는 잘못된 표기와 긴 꼬리 관계를 처리하기 위해 새로운 신경 네트워크를 제시했다.특히 우리는 관계 강화 주의 네트워크를 기초 모델로 먼저 제시했다.그것은 잘못된 라벨의 영향을 최소화하기 위해 문장 주머니에 문장을 사용해서 주의를 연결시킨다.그 다음에 제시된 기초 모델의 도움 아래 우리는 차원 관계에서 공유하는 협력 관계 특징을 도입하여 관계의 확충 과정을 추진하고 장미 관계의 훈련 데이터를 균형 있게 한다.문장 패키지 간의 관계를 예측하는 주요 훈련 목표를 제외하고 보조 목표를 사용하여 관계 강화 과정을 지도하여 더욱 정확한 패키지 표시를 얻었다.유행하는 기준 데이터 세트 NYT에서 진행된 실험에서 제시된 CoRA는 성능 면에서 이전의 최첨단 성능을 크게 향상시켰다Precision@N, AUC 및Hits@K.진일보한 분석은 장미 관계를 처리하는 데 있어서 경쟁 업체보다 우수한 능력을 검증했다.', 'sw': 'Tatizo lisilo sahihi na mahusiano ya muda mrefu ni changamoto mbili zilizosababishwa na uangalizi wa mbali katika utoaji wa uhusiano. Kazi za hivi karibuni hupunguza taarifa zisizo sahihi kwa kuchaguliwa kupitia kujifunza kwa namna nyingi, lakini hawawezi kukabiliana vizuri na mahusiano ya muda mrefu hata kama makundi ya mahusiano yanavyoanzishwa ili kusambaza maarifa. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mtandao wa kitabu cha neurali, Ushirikiano wa Kuhusiana na Kuongezeka kwa Kuhusiana (CoRA), ili kushughulikia mahusiano mabaya na mifumo ya muda mrefu. Hasa, tunapendekeza kwanza mtandao wa uangalizi wa mahusiano unaoongezeka kama mfano wa msingi. Inafanya kazi kwenye mfuko wa hukumu kwa lengo la kuhusiana na hukumu ili kupunguza madhara ya utambulisho wa makosa. Baada ya hayo, tunasaidia na muundo wa msingi wa pendekezo, tunaonyesha utaratibu wa ushirikiano wa mahusiano yanayosambazwa miongoni mwa mahusiano katika maeneo ya viwanja ili kuhamasisha mchakato wa kuongeza uhusiano na kulingana na taarifa za mafunzo kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya muda mrefu. Pamoja na lengo kuu la mafunzo kutabiri uhusiano wa mkoba wa hukumu, lengo la ushirikiano linatumiwa kuongoza mchakato wa kuongeza mahusiano kwa uwakilishi wa ngazi sahihi zaidi ya mkononi. Katika majaribio yanayohusu taarifa maarufu za bendera NYT, pendekezo la CoRA linaboresha hali ya kwanza ya sanaa kwa mujibu wa hali kubwa Precision@N , AUC na Hits@K. - Uchambuzi zaidi unathibitisha uwezo wake wa juu katika kukabiliana na mahusiano ya muda mrefu tofauti na wapinzani.', 'fa': 'مشکل برچسب اشتباه و رابطه\u200cهای طولانی دو چالش اصلی هستند که باعث می\u200cشود تحت نظر دور در انتقال رابطه باشد. کارهای اخیراً برچسب اشتباهی را با توجه انتخاب\u200cکننده با یادگیری بسیاری از مطالعه\u200cها کمتر می\u200cکند، ولی نمی\u200cتوانند رابطه\u200cهای طولانی را در نظر بگیرند حتی اگر آفرینش\u200cهای رابطه برای شریک علم معرفی شوند. در این کار، ما یک شبکه عصبی جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، توجه با افزایش رابطه\u200cها (CoRA) تا هر دو رابطه\u200cهای اشتباهی و طولانی را حل کنیم. مخصوصا، ما اولین بار شبکه توجه را به عنوان مدل پایه به ارتباط افزایش دادیم. این روی کیف مجازات با توجه به مجازات و ارتباط به کمترین تأثیر برچسب اشتباه عمل می\u200cکند. سپس، توسط مدل پایه پیشنهاد، ویژه\u200cهای ارتباط همکاری را در ارتباط\u200cهای دایره\u200cآرایش برای توسعه فرایند افزایش ارتباط و تعادل داده\u200cهای آموزش برای رابطه\u200cهای طولانی معرفی می\u200cکنیم. علاوه بر هدف اصلی آموزش برای پیش بینی ارتباط یک کیف جمله، هدف کمک برای هدایت فرایند افزایش ارتباط برای نمایش سطح کیف دقیق\u200cتری استفاده می\u200cشود. در آزمایش\u200cهایی که در مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای صندوق مشهور NYT هستند، پیشنهاد CORA با یک مرز بزرگ عملکرد اولین وضعیت هنری را بهتر می\u200cکند Precision@N , AUC و Hits@K. تحلیل بیشتری از آن توانایی بالاترین خود را در کنار رابطه\u200cهای طولانی در مقابل رقابتان تحقیق می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'Wrong labeling problem and long-tail relations are two main challenges caused by distant supervision in relation extraction.  Punët e fundit lehtësojnë etiketën e gabuar me vëmendjen selektive nëpërmjet mësimit me shumë raste, por nuk mund të trajtojnë mirë marrëdhëniet e bishtit të gjatë edhe nëse hierarkitë e marrëdhënieve futen për të ndarë njohuritë. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një rrjet neural të ri, të bashkëpunojë me vëmendjen e rritur nga marrëdhëniet (CoRA), për të trajtuar si etiketën e gabuar dhe marrëdhëniet e bishtit të gjatë. Veçanërisht, ne së pari propozojmë rrjetin e vëmendjes të rritur me marrëdhënie si model bazë. Ajo funksionon në çantën e fjalëve me një vëmendje fjalë-në-marrëdhënie për të minimizuar efektin e etiketave të gabuara. Pastaj, të lehtësuar nga modeli bazë i propozuar, ne futim karakteristika të marrëdhënieve bashkëpunuese të ndara midis marrëdhënieve në hierarki për të nxitur procesin e rritjes së marrëdhënieve dhe për të balancuar të dhënat e trainimit për marrëdhëniet e bishtit të gjatë. Përveç objektivit kryesor të trajnimit për të parashikuar lidhjen e një çantë dënimi, një objektiv ndihmës përdoret për të udhëzuar procesin e rritjes së lidhjes për një përfaqësim më të saktë të nivelit të çantës. In the experiments on the popular benchmark dataset NYT, the proposed CoRA improves the prior state-of-the-art performance by a large margin in terms of  Precision@N AUC dhe Hits@K. Analizat e mëtejshme verifikojnë aftësinë e saj superiore në trajtimin e marrëdhënieve të bishtit të gjatë në kontrast me konkurentët.', 'tr': 'Ýalňyş etiketlemek meseläbi we uzak ýigry derejesi ýitirmek bilen uzak supervisiýa tarapyndan gelen iki sany kynçylyk. Ýakynda ýalňyş etiketleriň ýalňyş etiketlerni multi-instal öwrenmeler bilen saýlamak üçin azaltýar, ýöne baglaýyşlaryň iýerarhiýasyny bilim paylaşmak üçin gowy ýöredip bilmez. Bu işde, biz täze bir nural şebekesini, birleşme Relasiýasyny ýeterleştirmek üçin (CoRA), hem ýalňyş etiket we uzak ýigry derejesini çözmek üçin täze teklip edýäris. Aýratyn bolsa, biz ilkinji gezek baglaýyşyň täze bir nusga görkezilýän ünsüni tem nusga hökmünde teklip edýäris. Ýalňyş etiketleýäniň täsirini azaltmak üçin sözlem bagynda seresap bilen işleýär. Soňra, teklip eden baz nusgasyna kömek edildi, biz iýerarhiýalarda baglaşyklaryň arasynda ylalaşyk we uzak ýokary baglaşyklaryň barlygyny terjime etmek üçin kömekleşik baglaşyklary çykarýarys. Sözlemiň bagynyň baglanyşyny öňlemek üçin esasy okuwçysy golaýlamak üçin, bir kömek maksady golaýlaşdyrmak üçin golaýlaşdyrylýar. Meşhur benchmark veri setiginde NYT suratlarda, CoRA öňki taryh durumyny uly gabdalyk bilen üýtgedýär Precision@N , AUC we Hits@K. Daha gowy çözümler ýakynlaşçylar bilen uzak ýokary baglaşyklary ýüzünde özüniň ýokary ukyplaryny barlap barlaýarlar.', 'af': "Verkeerde etiketting probleem en lang sterre relasies is twee hoofde uitdagings wat veroorsaak word deur afgeleë supervisie in relatie uittrekking. Onlangste werke verlos die verkeerde etiketting deur selektiewe aandag deur multiinstansie leer, maar kan nie goed behandel lank stert relasies selfs as hierarkies van die relasies ingevoer word om kennis te deel nie. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe neuralnetwerk, samelewing vergroot aandag (CoRA), om beide die verkeerde etiketting en lang-tail relasies te hanteer. Eenvoudiglik, ons voorstel eerste relatie-vergroot aandagnetwerk as basis model. Dit werk op sin sak met 'n sin-na-verwanting aandag om die effek van verkeerde etiketting te minimeer. Daarop, geïmplementeerd deur die voorgestelde basis model, introduseer ons samarbeidende verwantighede funksies wat onder verwantighede in die hierarkies gedeel is om die verwantighede-vergroot proses te bevestig en die onderriging data te balanse vir lang-sterre relasies. Buitend die hoofonderwerp doel om die verwanting van 'n setsak te voorskou, word 'n hulpdoel gebruik om die verwanting-vergroot proses te lei vir 'n meer presies sakvlak-voorstelling. In die eksperimente op die populêre benchmark-datastel NYT, die voorgestelde CoRA verbeter die voorheede staat-van-kuns-prestasie deur 'n groot grens ingevolge Precision@N , AUC en Hits@K. Verdere analiseerdes bevestig sy hoofde kapasiteit in die handling van lang stert relasies in kontras met die mededingers.", 'hy': "Սխալ պիտակավորման խնդիրը և երկար պոչխարի հարաբերությունները երկու գլխավոր մարտահրավեր են, որոնք առաջացել են հեռավոր վերահսկողության արդյունքում հանելու հարաբերություններում: Վերջին աշխատանքները նվազեցնում են սխալ պիտակումը ընտրական ուշադրության միջոցով բազմաօրինակ սովորելու միջոցով, բայց չեն կարող լավ վերահսկել երկար պոչխարի հարաբերությունները նույնիսկ եթե հարաբերությունների հիերարխիաները ներդրվում են գիտել Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նյարդային ցանց' համագործակցելով հարաբերություններով բարձրացված ուշադրությունը (ԿՕՌԱ), որպեսզի կառավարենք սխալ պիտակում և երկար պոչխարի հարաբերությունները: Հատկապես, մենք առաջին անգամ առաջարկում ենք հարաբերություններով բարձրացված ուշադրության ցանց որպես հիմնական մոդել: Այն գործում է նախադասությունների պարկի վրա, որտեղ ուշադրություն է դարձնում նախադասությունների հետ, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք սխալ պիտակների ազդեցությունը: Հետո, օգտագործելով առաջարկված հիմնական մոդելը, մենք ներկայացնում ենք համագործակցված հարաբերությունների առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք կիսվում են հարաբերությունների միջև հիերարխիաներում' առաջ քաղելու հարաբերությունների բարձրացման գործընթացը և հավասարակշռության Բացի նախադասության պարկի հարաբերության կանխատեսելու հիմնական ուսումնասիրության նպատակից, օգտագործվում է օգտագործվող նպատակը հարաբերությունների բարձրացման գործընթացի ուղղությամբ ավելի ճշգրիտ ներկայացման պարկի մակարդակի համար: ՆիԹ-ի հայտնի համեմատային տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումներում առաջարկված ԿՕՌԱ-ն բարելավում է նախկին բարձրագույն արդյունքները Precision@N , ԱՍՔ և Hits@K. Ավելի վերլուծությունները ստուգում են, որ այն ունակ է պայքարել երկար պոչքի հարաբերությունները հակառակ մրցակցություններին:", 'am': 'የስህተት ስህተት እና የረጅም ግንኙነት የረጅም ግንኙነት ከሩቅ ግንኙነት የተደረገው ሁለት ዋና ናቸው፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የግንኙነት አካባቢዎች እውቀትን ለማጋራት ቢገልጹ የተሳሳተውን ትምህርት በመምረጥ ያሳስላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የዘላለም የኔትራዊ መረብ፣ የውይይት ግንኙነት እና የረጅም ዝግጅት ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል እናስጀጋለን፡፡ Particularly, we first propose relation-augmented attention network as base model.  የፍርድ ዕቃ ላይ የስሕተት ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ማስታወቂያውን ለማንቀሳቀስ ነው፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም በተፈቀደው መቀመጫው model፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በተካፈሉት የግንኙነትን አካባቢዎች እና የግንኙነትን ማሳደግ እና የረጅም ጅማት ዳታዎችን በማስተካከል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነት ለመቀበል የዋነኛው ትምህርት አካባቢ በቀር፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ለመመራት የሚጠቅመ ነው፡፡ በተፈተናው የbenchmark dataset NYT በተፈተና ውስጥ፣ በተፈጸመ ኮራ የፊተኛውን የ-የ-art ድረ-ሥርዓት በተለየ ትልቅ ስርዓት ማድረግ ያሳድጋል፡፡ Precision@N , AUC እና Hits@K. ጨዋታው ተቃዋሚዎቹን በተቃዋሚ የረጅም ጅማት ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል የበለጠ ኃይላቸውን እንዲያረጋግጡ ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Xəta etiketləmə problemi və uzun kuyruğun əlaqələri, əlaqələri ilə uzaq bir gözləmə üzündən olan iki ana çətinlikdir. Son işlər çoxlu inşallar öyrənməsi vasitəsilə yanlış etiketli etiketli olaraq alçaldır, amma ilişkilərin hiyerarhiyaları bilgi paylaşmaq üçün daha yaxşı müdafiə edə bilmir. Bu işdə, biz yeni nöral a ğ, İlişkiləri birlikdə artırmaq üçün, yanlış etiketlənmək və uzun kuyruğun əlaqələrini müdafiə etmək üçün yeni bir nöral ağ təklif edirik. Özellikle, ilk dəfə əlaqələri artırmaq şəbəkəsini baz modeli olaraq təklif edirik. O, yanlış etiketlərin etkisini azaltmaq üçün cümlələrlə bağlantılı məlumatları olan cümlələr torbasında işləyir. Sonra, təklif edilmiş baz modeli ilə çox asanlaşdırılmış, hiyerarhiyatların əlaqələrində paylaşılan işbirlik əlaqələrini təşkil edirik ki, əlaqələri artırmaq prosesini və uzun kuyruğun əlaqələri üçün təhsil məlumatlarını müqayisədə təhsil edirik. Sözlük torbasının əlaqəsini öndərmək üçün an a təhsil məqsədi istifadə etmək üçün, əlaqəsi artırmaq prosesini daha doğru bir torba seviyesi göstəricisi üçün istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edilir. NYT qüvvətli benchmark veri qutusu təcrübələrində, CYRA təklif etdiyi təcrübələrin əvvəlki təcrübəsini böyük bir margin ilə daha yaxşılaşdırır. Precision@N , AUC və Hits@K. Further analyses verify its highest capability in long-tail relations with competitors versus.', 'bn': 'ভুল লেবেলের সমস্যা এবং দীর্ঘমাত্রার সম্পর্ক দুই প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ, যার ফলে দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের কারণে দূরবর্ত সাম্প্রতিক কাজের মাধ্যমে বেছে নির্বাচিত মনোযোগ শিক্ষার মাধ্যমে ভুল ল লেবেলের মাধ্যমে কমিয়ে দিতে পারে, কিন্তু দীর্ঘ সময়ের সম্পর্কের সাথে  এই কাজে আমরা একটি নভেল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করছি, যার সাথে সম্পর্ক বাড়িয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে (কোরা) সম্পর্কের শ্রদ্ধা করা হয়েছে, যাতে ভুল ল লেবেল এবং দ Particularly, we first propose relation-augmented attention network as base model.  এটি ভুল ল লেবেলের প্রভাব কমিয়ে দেয়ার জন্য বাক্য ব্যাগের উপর কাজ করে। তারপর প্রস্তাবিত বেস মডেলের দ্বারা আমরা তাদের সাথে সম্পর্কের বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে যোগাযোগের বৈশিষ্ট্যের সুবিধা প্রদান করি যাতে সম্পর্ক বিভিন্ন সম্পর্ একটি বাক্য ব্যাগের সম্পর্ক ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার প্রধান প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্য ছাড়া একটি অনুমোদনের উদ্দেশ্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে সংশ্লিষ্ট ব্যাগ-স জনপ্রিয় বেঞ্চমার্ক ডাটাসেট নিয়ে পরীক্ষায় প্রস্তাবিত কোরা প্রস্তাবিত কোরা বিশাল মার্গিনের মাধ্যমে প্রাথমিক শিল্পের প্রদর Precision@N , AUC আর Hits@K. আরো বিশ্লেষণ প্রতিযোগীদের বিরুদ্ধে দীর্ঘটিত সম্পর্ক নিয়ে তার উচ্চ ক্ষমতা নিশ্চিত করেছে।', 'cs': 'Nesprávný problém označování a long-tail vztahy jsou dvě hlavní problémy způsobené vzdáleným dohledem při extrakci vztahů. Nedávná práce zmírňují nesprávné označování selektivní pozorností prostřednictvím multi-instance učení, ale nemohou dobře zvládnout dlouhé vztahy, i když jsou zavedeny hierarchie vztahů pro sdílení znalostí. V této práci navrhujeme novou neuronovou síť Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), která zvládne jak špatné značení, tak vztahy s dlouhým ocasem. Jako základní model navrhujeme zejména vztahově rozšířenou pozornost síť. Pracuje na sáčku vět s pozorností věty k vztahu, aby minimalizoval účinek nesprávného označení. Následně, usnadněný navrženým základním modelem, představujeme spolupracující vztahy sdílené mezi vztahy v hierarchiech, abychom podpořili proces rozšíření vztahů a vyvážili tréninková data pro vztahy s dlouhým ocasem. Kromě hlavního cíle tréninku k predikci vztahu větového pytle je použit pomocný cíl k řízení procesu rozšíření vztahů pro přesnější reprezentaci na úrovni pytle. V experimentech na populárním benchmarkovém datovém souboru NYT navržený CoRA zlepšuje dosavadní nejmodernější výkon z hlediska Precision@N AUC a Hits@K. Další analýzy ověřují jeho vynikající schopnost zvládnout long-tail vztahy oproti konkurenci.', 'ca': "El problema d'etiquetar incorrectament i les relacions de llarga cola són dos reptes principals causats per la supervisió remota en relació amb l'extracció. Les obres recents allevian l'etiquetage equivocat através d'una atenció selectiva a través de l'aprenentatge multiinstant, però no poden gestionar bé les relacions de llarga cola fins i tot si s'introdueixen jerarquies de les relacions per compartir coneixements. En aquesta feina, proposem una nova xarxa neuronal, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), per gestionar tant l'etiquetage equivocat com les relacions de long a cua. En particular, proposem per primer cop una xarxa d'atenció augmentata per relació com a model de base. Opera en una bolsa de frases amb una atenció frase a relació per minimitzar l'efecte d'etiquetar equivocat. Llavors, facilitat pel model de base proposat, introduïm característiques de relació col·laboradora compartides entre les relacions de les jerarquies per promoure el procés de augment de les relacions i equilibrar les dades d'entrenament per les relacions de llarga cola. A part de l'objectiu principal d'entrenament de predir la relació d'una borsa de frases, s'utilitza un objectiu auxiliar per guiar el procés d'augmentació de la relació per una representació més precisa a nivell de borsa. En els experiments del conjunt de dades populars de referència NYT, el CoRA proposat millora el rendiment anterior d'última generació d'un gran marge en termes de Precision@N , AUC and  Hits@K. D'altres anàlisis verificen la seva capacitat superior en gestionar les relacions de llarga cola en contraste amb els competidors.", 'bs': 'Pogrešni problem označavanja i dugotrajni odnosi su dvije glavne izazove uzrokovane udaljenim nadzorom u odnosu na izvlačenje odnosa. Nedavni radovi olakšavaju pogrešnu etiketu selektivnom pažnjom putem multiinstancijskog učenja, ali ne mogu dobro podnijeti dugotrajne odnose čak i ako se hijerarhije odnosa uvode kako bi podijelili znanje. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu neuralnu mrežu, povećanu pažnju na saradnju odnosa (CoRA), kako bi se riješili i pogrešne etiketiranje i dugotrajne odnose. Posebno, prvo predlažemo povećanu pažnju mrežu vezama kao bazni model. Radi na vrećici rečenice sa pažnjom veze sa rečenicama da minimizira učinak pogrešne etikete. Onda, olakšavan predloženim baznim modelom, predstavljamo karakteristike saradnje veze koji su dijelili među odnosima u hijerarhiji kako bi promovirali proces povećanja odnosa i ravnotežali podatke o obuci za dugotrajne odnose. Osim glavnog cilja obuke za predviđanje odnosa vreće kazne, koristi se pomoćni cilj kako bi vodio proces povećanja odnosa za tačnije predstavljanje nivoa vreća. U eksperimentima o popularnoj grupi podataka o referenciji NYT, predložena CoRA poboljšava prethodno stanje umjetnosti velikom marginom u smislu Precision@N , AUC i Hits@K. Daljnje analize provjeravaju svoju nadmoćnu sposobnost u rješavanju dugotrajnih odnosa suprotno konkurentima.', 'et': 'Vale märgistusprobleem ja pikasabalised suhted on kaks peamist probleemi, mille põhjustab kaugjärelevalve seoste kaevandamisel. Hiljutised tööd leevendavad valet märgistust valikulise tähelepanu kaudu mitmeastmelise õppe kaudu, kuid ei suuda hästi käsitleda pikasabalisi suhteid isegi siis, kui suhete hierarhiad tutvustatakse teadmiste jagamiseks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse neurovõrgu, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), et käsitleda nii valesid märgistusi kui ka pikasabalisi suhteid. Eelkõige pakume alusmudelina välja suhteliselt suurendatud tähelepanuvõrgustiku. See töötab lausekotil lause-suhtelise tähelepanuga, et minimeerida vale märgistuse mõju. Seejärel tutvustame väljapakutud baasmudeli abil hierarhiate suhete vahel jagatud koostöösuhete funktsioone, et edendada suhete suurendamise protsessi ja tasakaalustada pikasabaste suhete koolitusandmeid. Lisaks põhieesmärgile ennustada lausekoti suhet kasutatakse lisaeesmärki seose suurendamise protsessi juhendamiseks täpsema kotitaseme esitamise saavutamiseks. Populaarse võrdlusaluse andmekogumi NYT katsetes parandab kavandatud CoRA varasemat tehnoloogilist tulemuslikkust suure marginaali võrra. Precision@N AUC ja Hits@K. Täiendavad analüüsid kinnitavad, et ta on konkurentidega võrreldes võimeline toime tulema pikasabaga.', 'fi': 'Väärä merkintäongelma ja pitkähäntäsuhteet ovat kaksi keskeistä haastetta, joita etävalvonta aiheuttaa. Viimeaikaiset työt lievittävät vääriä merkintöjä valikoivalla huomiolla moniinstanssioppimisen avulla, mutta eivät pysty käsittelemään pitkähäntäsuhteita, vaikka suhteiden hierarkiat otettaisiin käyttöön tiedon jakamiseksi. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta neuroverkkoa, Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention (CoRA), käsittelemään sekä vääriä merkintöjä että pitkähäntäsuhteita. Erityisesti perusmalliksi ehdotamme ensin suhdelisättyä huomioverkostoa. Se toimii lausepussilla lauseen suhteen huomioiden minimoidakseen väärän merkinnän vaikutuksen. Tämän jälkeen esittelemme hierarkioiden suhteiden kesken jaettuja yhteissuhdepiirteitä edistääksemme suhdetta lisääviä prosesseja ja tasapainottaaksemme pitkähäntäsuhteiden koulutustietoja. Lausespussin suhdetta ennustavan harjoittelun päätavoitteen lisäksi käytetään aputavoitetta ohjaamaan suhdelisäysprosessia tarkempaan säkkitason kuvaamiseen. Suositulla vertailuaineistolla NYT tehdyissä kokeissa ehdotettu CoRA parantaa aikaisempaa uusinta suorituskykyä suurella marginaalilla suhteessa Precision@N AUC ja Hits@K. Jatkoanalyysit vahvistavat sen ylivoimaisen kyvyn käsitellä pitkähäntäsuhteita kilpailijoihin verrattuna.', 'ha': "QXml Yin aiki na farko, ya sauƙaƙara mai kuskure da alama mai ɓarna a yi amfani da shiryarwa masu motsi masu yawa, kuma amma bã za su iya amfani da dangantaka-tail mai tsawo ba, kuma kõ dã an introduce hiirarki na danganta dõmin su share ilmi. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani jerin nan neural, shirin Relation-Ƙarawa da aka ƙara AttAttachment (Cora), dõmin su yi aiki da kuma ma'anar fasalin mai ɓarna da kuma danne-tail. Kuma kan ƙayyade, muna buƙata ƙarani da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane kamar shekarar-zane. Yanã aiki a kan wani wuri da aka kiyaye wa-gaɓa zuwa-muhalli dõmin ya ƙara aikin alama mai ɓarna. Sa'an nan kuma, ana sauƙi da shi da aka buƙata misalin da aka faɗa, sai mu fara abũbuwan husũma masu hushi da aka raba haɗi a cikin shugabannin hiergaryen dõmin ya promote muhimmin-ƙãri sami'a kuma mu balancewa data na tsari wa danganta na danganta ga dangancin-tail long-tail. Babu jiyyan mafarin muhimu dõmin ka yi bayani ga mazaunin wani wuyan cire, an a amfani da wata abun inganci dõmin ya shiryar da zartar da shirin-ƙaranci zuwa wata sifanci na daidaita-bangon. In jarraboyin da aka popular danne-bangi na NYT, the buƙatan Cora ɗin zai ƙara gaba-state-of-the-art game da babban margin in da Precision@N , AUC and Hits@K. Furan Analyi, za'a gaskata awonsa da ya fi ƙaranci ga ka yi aiki da danganta na dabam-dabam da kinyuta ga mashumari.", 'he': 'בעיית תיקון לא נכונה ומערכות יחסים עם הזנב הארוך הן שני אתגרים עיקריים שנגרמו על ידי פיקוח מרוחק במערכת חיסוך יחסים. העבודות האחרונות מקלות את התווית הלא נכונה באמצעות תשומת לב מובחרת באמצעות לימודים רבים מדרגות, אך לא יכולות להתמודד היטב עם יחסי זנב ארוך אפילו אם הייררכיות של יחסים מוצגות כדי לחלוק ידע. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים רשת עצבית חדשה, שיתוף פעולה תשומת לב מגבירה במערכת יחסים (CoRA), כדי להתמודד עם התווית הלא נכונה ומערכת יחסים עם הזנב הארוך. Particularly, we first propose relation-augmented attention network as base model.  הוא פועל על שקית משפט עם תשומת לב משפט ליחסים כדי להפחית את ההשפעה של תיקון לא נכון. ואז, מוקל על ידי מודל הבסיס המוצע, אנחנו מכירים תכונות יחסים משותפים משותפים בין יחסים בייררכיות כדי לקדם את תהליך הגדילה יחסים חוץ מהמטרה הראשית של האימונים לחזות את היחסים של שקית משפטים, מטרה נוספת משתמשת כדי להדריך את תהליך הגדילה של היחסים למציגה מדויקת יותר ברמה של שקים. בניסויים על קבוצת נתונים של רמזים פופולריים NYT, CoRA המוצע משפר את ההופעה הקודמת של מצב האומנות על ידי שווה גדולה במונחים של Precision@N , AUC and  Hits@K. ניתוחים נוספים מאשרים את היכולת העליונה שלה לטפל במערכת יחסים עם הזנב הארוך בניגוד למתחרים.', 'sk': 'Napačen problem označevanja in odnosi z dolgim repom sta dva glavna izziva, ki jih povzroča daljni nadzor pri ekstrakciji odnosov. Nedavna dela ublažijo napačno označevanje s selektivno pozornostjo prek več-stopenjskega učenja, vendar ne morejo dobro obvladovati odnosov z dolgim repom, tudi če so uvedene hierarhije odnosov za izmenjavo znanja. V tem delu predlagamo novo nevronsko omrežje, CoRA (Collaborating Relation-Augmented Attention), ki bo obvladovalo napačno označevanje in odnose z dolgim repom. Najprej predlagamo mrežo povečane pozornosti kot osnovni model. Deluje na stavkovni vreči s pozornostjo stavka do odnosa, da zmanjša učinek napačnega označevanja. Nato, na podlagi predlaganega osnovnega modela, uvajamo značilnosti sodelovanja med odnosi v hierarhijah, da bi spodbudili proces povečevanja odnosov in uravnotežili podatke o usposabljanju za odnose z dolgim repom. Poleg glavnega cilja usposabljanja za napovedovanje relacije stavkovne vreče se uporablja pomožni cilj za usmerjanje procesa povečanja relacij za natančnejšo predstavitev na nivoju vreče. V poskusih priljubljenega referenčnega nabora podatkov NYT predlagani CoRA izboljšuje predhodno najsodobnejšo uspešnost za veliko maržo v smislu Precision@N AUC in Hits@K. Nadaljnje analize potrjujejo njegovo odlično sposobnost pri upravljanju odnosov z dolgim repom v nasprotju s konkurenti.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Gujaring Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo urip nggawe netulé, tambah kuwi nggawe Relahan-ampungan Attenting (CoRI), nggawe ngubah etiket sing nêmên lan nganggo langgar-langgar wih apik. Manculine wigatining ketahan Pung Amarok neng, dino sing nyimpen ning model sing gawe nggawe #a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello! Nang barêng-barêng sing éntuk kanggo populer bendhèk dataset NYT, supoyo CoRI nggawe barang nggawe gerampen mulasar state-of-the-arts seneng berarti tambah bantuan sing berarti Precision@N , AKE karo Hits@K. Genjer-Genjer paling langkung urip nggawe kapan sithik sing luwih nguasai perusahaan langkung rawut karo perusahaan.', 'bo': 'ནོར་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་རིང་རིང་པོའི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་གདོང་ལེན་གཉིས་རེད། Recently works alleviate the wrong labeling by selective attention via multi-instance learning, but cannot handle long-tail relations even if hierarchies of the relations are introduced to share knowledge. In this work, we propose a novel neural network, Collaborating Relation-augmented Attention (CoRA), to handle both the wrong labeling and long-tail relations. ངེད་ཚོས་དང་པོ་དེ་ལ་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དྲ་བ་ལ་རྨས་གཞི་མ་དཔྱད་ཡོད། It operates on sentence bag with a sentence-to-relation attention to minimize the effect of wrong labeling. དེ་ནས་བྱས་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་རྨན་གཞི་མ་དཔེ་ལ་གྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་ནང་གི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་ནས་འབྲེལ་བ་ དེ་ལས་རང་གི་རྩ་བའི་གཞུང་སྣུམ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཅིག་གི་ཚིག་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྔོན་སྟོན་ནི་ཡིན། Popular benchmark dataset NYT ནང་གི་ས experiments ནང་དུ། CoRA་གི་སྔོན་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཚད་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་རྐྱེན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ Precision@N , AUC དང་། Hits@K. ཁོང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བའི་རིང་བའི་ལྕགས་རིམ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'ToHRE : A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'ToHRE: إستراتيجية تصنيف من أعلى إلى أسفل مع تمثيل للأكياس الهرمية لاستخراج العلاقة تحت الإشراف البعيد', 'fr': "ToHRE\xa0: une stratégie de classification descendante avec représentation hiérarchique des sacs pour l'extraction de relations supervisée à distance", 'pt': 'ToHRE: uma estratégia de classificação de cima para baixo com representação de saco hierárquico para extração de relação supervisionada à distância', 'es': 'ToHRE: Una estrategia de clasificación descendente con representación jerárquica de bolsas para la extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia', 'ja': 'ToHRE ：遠隔監視下の関係抽出のための階層的なバッグ表現を備えたトップダウン分類戦略', 'zh': 'ToHRE曰:上而下者,远监也', 'ru': 'TOHRE: Стратегия классификации сверху вниз с иерархическим представлением пакетов для дистанционно контролируемого извлечения связей', 'hi': 'ToHRE: दूर पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए पदानुक्रमित बैग प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ एक शीर्ष-डाउन वर्गीकरण रणनीति', 'ga': 'ToHRE: Straitéis Aicmithe Barr Anuas le hIonadaíocht Mhála Ordlathach le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh faoi Mhaoirseacht', 'ka': 'ToHRE: სამუშაო დაკავშირებული კლასიფიკაციის სტრატიგია, რომელიც ჰიერარიფური ბაგის გამოსახულებელია განსხვავებულად დანახულებული გეგრაციების გამოსახულებელია', 'hu': 'ToHRE: Felülről lefelé osztályozási stratégia hierarchikus zsák reprezentációval a távolról felügyelt kapcsolatok kivonásához', 'el': 'Μια στρατηγική ταξινόμησης από πάνω προς τα κάτω με ιεραρχική αναπαράσταση τσαντών για την εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή σχέσεων', 'it': "ToHRE: Una strategia di classificazione dall'alto verso il basso con rappresentazione gerarchica delle borse per l'estrazione di relazioni supervisionate a distanza", 'kk': 'ToHRE: Жоғарғы төмендегі классификациялау стратегиясы, қашықтағы қатынастарды тарқату', 'lt': 'ToHRE: iš viršaus į apačią klasifikavimo strategija, kurioje atstovaujama hierarchiniam maišeliui nuotolinio stebėjimo santykių ekstrakcijoje', 'mk': 'ToHRE: Стратегија за класификација горе надолу со хиерархиска торба за екстракција на далечно надгледувани односи', 'ms': 'ToHRE: Strategi Klasifikasi Atas-Bawah dengan Perwakilan beg Hierarkikal untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Dijaga Jauh', 'ml': 'മുകളില്\u200d- താഴെയുള്ള ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d സ്ട്രേറ്റേജിയോടൊപ്പം ഹൈറര്\u200dച്ചിക്കല്\u200d ബാഗ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു മുകളില്\u200d- താഴെ', 'mt': 'ToHRE: Strateġija ta’ Klassifikazzjoni minn fuq għal isfel b’Rappreżentanza tal-Borża Erarkika għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Sorveljata mill-bogħod', 'mn': 'ToHRE: Хамгийн хоорондоо хамааралгүй хамааралгүй хамааралгүй хамааралгүй гаргахын тулд дээд доош классификацийн стратеги', 'no': 'ToHRE: Eit klassifikasjonsstrategi med hierarkisk bagreprezentasjon for ekstern oversikt av relasjon', 'pl': 'ToHRE: Strategia klasyfikacji odgórnej z hierarchiczną reprezentacją torby dla ekstrakcji relacji nadzorowanych na odległość', 'sr': 'ToHRE: Strateška klasifikacija u vrhu dole sa hijerarskim predstavljanjem vreća za izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa', 'ro': 'ToHRE: O strategie de clasificare de sus în jos cu reprezentarea ierarhică a sacilor pentru extragerea relațiilor supravegheate la distanță', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'ToHRE: A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'sv': 'ToHRE: En uppifrån och ner klassificeringsstrategi med hierarkisk påserepresentation för avlägsna övervakade relationer', 'ta': 'மேல்: மேல்- கீழ் வகைப்படுத்தல் விதிமுறையில் உயர்நிலை பேக் பிரதிநிர்வாகிக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பு பிரித்தலுக்கான மேல்', 'ur': 'ToHRE: A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distant Supervised Relations Extraction', 'uz': 'Ushbu bogʻlamani ajratish uchun kattalashtirish', 'vi': 'Bản nâng cao: A Top-down classification Strategy with Hierarchal bag Representation for distinguly Supervisted relationson extraction', 'bg': 'Стратегия за класификация отгоре надолу с йерархично представяне на торбичките за извличане на отдалечено контролирани отношения', 'hr': 'ToHRE: Strateška klasifikacija u vrhu dolje sa hijerarskim predstavljanjem vreća za izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa', 'nl': 'ToHRE: Een top-down classificatiestrategie met hiërarchische zakrepresentatie voor afstandelijk begeleide relatieontwikkeling', 'da': 'ToHRE: En top-down klassificeringsstrategi med hierarkisk taske repræsentation for fjernstyret slægtsudvinding', 'de': 'ToHRE: Eine Top-Down Klassifikationsstrategie mit hierarchischer Beuteldarstellung für fernüberwachte Beziehungsextraktion', 'id': 'ToHRE: Sebuah Strategi Klasifikasi Atas-Bawah dengan Perwakilan Tas Hierarkis untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan DiSupervisi Jauh', 'ko': 'ToHRE: 관계 추출을 원격으로 감독하기 위한 하향 계층 패키지 분류 정책', 'fa': 'توHRE: یک استراتژی کلاسیف بالا پایین با نماینده\u200cی بسته\u200cهای جراحی برای اخراج رابطه\u200cهای دور نظارت شده', 'af': 'ToHRE: 芒聙聶n Bo- Onderkant Klassifikasie Strategie met hierarske bagvoorstelling vir afgele毛 verhouding uittrek', 'sw': 'ToHRE: Mradi wa Tamko la Kusini Top-Down With Representation of Bag for Disasted Relations', 'tr': 'ToHRE: A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distant Supervised Relationship Extraction', 'sq': 'ToHRE: Një strategji klasifikimi nga lart poshtë me përfaqësim hierarkik të çantës për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura nga larg', 'hy': 'ToHRE A: A topdown-դասակարգման ստրատեգիա, որն ունի հեռավոր վերահսկված հարաբերությունների արտադրման հիերարքիկ պարկերի ներկայացուցիչ', 'am': 'ToHRE: A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'az': 'ToHRE: Uzun Gözləşdirilmiş İlişkilərin A çırması üçün Hierarchical Bag Representation', 'bn': 'ToHRE: হিরেরাচিক্যাল বেগ প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে উপর-নীচে ক্লাসিকেশন কৌশল', 'ca': 'ToHRE: A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'cs': 'ToHRE: Strategie klasifikace shora dolů s hierarchickou reprezentací tašek pro extrakci vztahů s dálkovým dohledem', 'bs': 'ToHRE: Strateška klasifikacija u vrhu dolje sa hijerarskim predstavljanjem vreća za izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa', 'et': 'ToHRE: Ülalt alla klassifitseerimisstrateegia koos hierarhilise koti esindusega kaugelt jälgitavate suhete väljavõtmiseks', 'fi': 'ToHRE: YlhÃĪÃĪltÃĪ alas luokittelustrategia, jossa on hierarkinen pussin edustus etÃĪvalvottuun suhteeseen', 'jv': 'ToHRE A: A top-down klassification Staty with Hiaracial bag representation for Distant super Vised Relation extract', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ToHRE: אסטרטגיה מעלה למטה עם מייצג תיקים היררכיים עבור מחלקת יחסים משגיחים מרחוק', 'sk': 'ToHRE: strategija klasifikacije od zgoraj navzdol s hierarhičnim predstavništvom vreče za odstranjevanje odnosov z daljnim nadzorom', 'bo': 'ToHRE: A Top-Down Classification Strategy with Hierarchical Bag Representation for Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction'}
{'en': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) has proven to be effective to find relational facts from texts, but it still suffers from two main problems : the wrong labeling problem and the long-tail problem. Most of the existing approaches address these two problems through flat classification, which lacks hierarchical information of relations. To leverage the informative relation hierarchies, we formulate DSRE as a hierarchical classification task and propose a novel hierarchical classification framework, which extracts the relation in a top-down manner. Specifically, in our proposed framework, 1) we use a hierarchically-refined representation method to achieve hierarchy-specific representation ; 2) a top-down classification strategy is introduced instead of training a set of local classifiers. The experiments on NYT dataset demonstrate that our approach significantly outperforms other state-of-the-art approaches, especially for the long-tail problem.', 'ar': 'أثبت استخراج العلاقات الخاضعة للإشراف عن بُعد (DSRE) فعاليته في العثور على الحقائق العلائقية من النصوص ، لكنه لا يزال يعاني من مشكلتين رئيسيتين: مشكلة الوسم الخاطئة ومشكلة الذيل الطويل. تعالج معظم المناهج الحالية هاتين المشكلتين من خلال التصنيف المسطح ، الذي يفتقر إلى المعلومات الهرمية للعلاقات. للاستفادة من التسلسلات الهرمية للعلاقة بالمعلومات ، نقوم بصياغة DSRE كمهمة تصنيف هرمي ونقترح إطار تصنيف هرمي جديد ، والذي يستخرج العلاقة بطريقة من أعلى إلى أسفل. على وجه التحديد ، في إطار العمل المقترح لدينا ، 1) نستخدم طريقة تمثيل متدرجة بشكل هرمي لتحقيق تمثيل خاص بالتسلسل الهرمي ؛ 2) تم تقديم استراتيجية تصنيف من أعلى إلى أسفل بدلاً من تدريب مجموعة من المصنفات المحلية. توضح التجارب على مجموعة بيانات NYT أن نهجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب الحديثة الأخرى ، خاصة بالنسبة لمشكلة الذيل الطويل.', 'pt': 'A Extração de Relação Supervisionada à Distância (DSRE) provou ser eficaz para encontrar fatos relacionais de textos, mas ainda sofre de dois problemas principais: o problema de rotulagem errada e o problema de cauda longa. A maioria das abordagens existentes aborda esses dois problemas por meio de classificação plana, que carece de informações hierárquicas das relações. Para alavancar as hierarquias de relações informativas, formulamos o DSRE como uma tarefa de classificação hierárquica e propomos uma nova estrutura de classificação hierárquica, que extrai a relação de cima para baixo. Especificamente, em nossa estrutura proposta, 1) usamos um método de representação hierarquicamente refinado para obter uma representação específica da hierarquia; 2) uma estratégia de classificação top-down é introduzida em vez de treinar um conjunto de classificadores locais. Os experimentos no conjunto de dados do NYT demonstram que nossa abordagem supera significativamente outras abordagens de última geração, especialmente para o problema de cauda longa.', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia (DSRE) ha demostrado ser eficaz para encontrar hechos relacionales a partir de textos, pero todavía tiene dos problemas principales: el problema del etiquetado incorrecto y el problema de la cola larga. La mayoría de los enfoques existentes abordan estos dos problemas a través de una clasificación plana, que carece de información jerárquica de las relaciones. Para aprovechar las jerarquías de relaciones informativas, formulamos DSRE como una tarea de clasificación jerárquica y proponemos un marco de clasificación jerárquica novedoso, que extrae la relación de arriba hacia abajo. Específicamente, en nuestro marco propuesto, 1) utilizamos un método de representación jerárquicamente refinado para lograr una representación específica de la jerarquía; 2) se introduce una estrategia de clasificación descendente en lugar de entrenar un conjunto de clasificadores locales. Los experimentos en el conjunto de datos del NYT demuestran que nuestro enfoque supera significativamente a otros enfoques de última generación, especialmente para el problema de la cola larga.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations supervisées à distance (DSRE) s'est révélée efficace pour trouver des faits relationnels à partir de textes, mais elle souffre toujours de deux problèmes principaux\xa0: le problème d'étiquetage incorrect et le problème de longue traîne. La plupart des approches existantes abordent ces deux problèmes par le biais d'une classification plate, qui manque d'informations hiérarchiques sur les relations. Pour tirer parti des hiérarchies de relations informatives, nous formulons DSRE comme une tâche de classification hiérarchique et proposons un nouveau cadre de classification hiérarchique, qui extrait la relation de manière descendante. Plus précisément, dans le cadre que nous proposons, 1) nous utilisons une méthode de représentation hiérarchique affinée pour obtenir une représentation spécifique à la hiérarchie\xa0; 2) une stratégie de classification descendante est introduite au lieu de former un ensemble de classificateurs locaux. Les expériences sur l'ensemble de données du NYT démontrent que notre approche surpasse largement les autres approches de pointe, en particulier pour le problème de la longue traîne.", 'ja': '遠隔監視関係抽出（ DSRE ）は、テキストから関係事実を見つけるのに効果的であることが証明されているが、それでも主に2つの問題に悩まされている：間違ったラベル付け問題と長い尾の問題。既存のアプローチのほとんどは、関係の階層的情報を欠いた平坦な分類を通じて、これらの2つの問題に対処する。情報的な関係階層を活用するために、階層分類タスクとしてDSREを定式化し、トップダウン方式で関係を抽出する新しい階層分類フレームワークを提案します。具体的には、提案されたフレームワークでは、1)階層特有の表現を達成するために階層的に洗練された表現方法を使用します。2)ローカル分類子のセットをトレーニングする代わりに、トップダウンの分類戦略が導入されます。NYTデータセットの実験は、当社のアプローチが他の最先端のアプローチ、特にロングテールの問題に対して著しく優れていることを示しています。', 'hi': 'दूरस्थ पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण (DSRE) ग्रंथों से संबंधपरक तथ्यों को खोजने के लिए प्रभावी साबित हुआ है, लेकिन यह अभी भी दो मुख्य समस्याओं से ग्रस्त है: गलत लेबलिंग समस्या और लंबी पूंछ की समस्या। अधिकांश मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण फ्लैट वर्गीकरण के माध्यम से इन दो समस्याओं को संबोधित करते हैं, जिसमें संबंधों की पदानुक्रमित जानकारी का अभाव है। सूचनात्मक संबंध पदानुक्रमों का लाभ उठाने के लिए, हम एक पदानुक्रमित वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में डीएसआरई तैयार करते हैं और एक उपन्यास पदानुक्रमित वर्गीकरण ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो संबंध को ऊपर-नीचे तरीके से निकालता है। विशेष रूप से, हमारे प्रस्तावित ढांचे में, 1) हम पदानुक्रम-विशिष्ट प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित-परिष्कृत प्रतिनिधित्व विधि का उपयोग करते हैं; 2) स्थानीय क्लासिफायरों के एक सेट को प्रशिक्षित करने के बजाय एक टॉप-डाउन वर्गीकरण रणनीति पेश की जाती है। NYT डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण अन्य अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है, विशेष रूप से लंबी पूंछ की समस्या के लिए।', 'zh': '远程督取(DSRE)已验可验于文本,而犹有二要:过者标长尾。 多因扁平类以决二者,缺乏关系之分也。 以息层次结构,DSRE言分职,举新分框架,框架以自上而下。 具体来说在吾言之框架,1)吾以优化成特定于层次结构也。 2)引自上而下之策,非训练局分类器也。 NYT数集上实验明,吾道明优于先进,尤长尾也。', 'ru': 'Дистанционно контролируемая экстракция отношений (DSRE) доказала свою эффективность в поиске реляционных фактов из текстов, но она все еще страдает от двух основных проблем: проблемы неправильной маркировки и проблемы длинного хвоста. Большинство существующих подходов решают эти две проблемы с помощью плоской классификации, в которой отсутствует иерархическая информация об отношениях. Чтобы использовать информативные иерархии отношений, мы формулируем DSRE как иерархическую классификационную задачу и предлагаем новую иерархическую классификационную структуру, которая извлекает связь сверху вниз. В частности, в предлагаемой нами структуре 1) мы используем иерархически уточненный метод представления для достижения иерархически специфического представления; 2) вместо обучения набора локальных классификаторов вводится стратегия классификации сверху вниз. Эксперименты на наборе данных NYT показывают, что наш подход значительно превосходит другие современные подходы, особенно для проблемы с длинным хвостом.', 'ga': 'Tá sé cruthaithe go bhfuil Eastóscadh Caidrimh faoi Mhaoirseacht (DSRE) éifeachtach chun fíricí coibhneasta a aimsiú ó théacsanna, ach tá dhá phríomhfhadhb ag baint leis go fóill: an fhadhb lipéadaithe mícheart agus an fhadhb fhada-eireaball. Tugann an chuid is mó de na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann faoi láthair aghaidh ar an dá fhadhb seo trí aicmiú comhréidh, nach bhfuil faisnéis ordlathach ann maidir le caidreamh. Chun na hordlathais chaidrimh fhaisnéiseacha a ghiaráil, cruthaímid DSRE mar thasc ordlathach aicmithe agus molaimid creat rangaithe ordlathach úrnua, a bhaintear amach an gaol ar bhealach ón mbarr anuas. Go sonrach, inár gcreat molta, 1) úsáidimid modh ionadaíochta atá scagtha go hordlathach chun ionadaíocht a bhaineann go sonrach le hordlathas a bhaint amach; 2) tugtar isteach straitéis aicmithe ó bharr anuas in ionad oiliúint a chur ar thacar aicmitheora áitiúla. Léiríonn na turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí NYT go sáraíonn ár gcur chuige cur chuige úrscothach go mór, go háirithe maidir le fadhb na heireaball fada.', 'el': 'Η εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή σχέσεων (DSRE) έχει αποδειχθεί αποτελεσματική για την εύρεση σχεσιακών γεγονότων από κείμενα, αλλά εξακολουθεί να πάσχει από δύο κύρια προβλήματα: το λάθος πρόβλημα επισήμανσης και το πρόβλημα μακράς ουράς. Οι περισσότερες από τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις αντιμετωπίζουν αυτά τα δύο προβλήματα μέσω της επίπεδος ταξινόμησης, η οποία στερείται ιεραρχικής πληροφόρησης των σχέσεων. Για να αξιοποιήσουμε τις πληροφοριακές ιεραρχίες σχέσεων, διατυπώνουμε ως ιεραρχική εργασία ταξινόμησης και προτείνουμε ένα νέο ιεραρχικό πλαίσιο ταξινόμησης, το οποίο εξάγει τη σχέση με τρόπο από πάνω προς τα κάτω. Συγκεκριμένα, στο προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο, 1) χρησιμοποιούμε μια ιεραρχικά εκλεπτυσμένη μέθοδο αναπαράστασης για να επιτύχουμε αναπαράσταση ειδικά για την ιεραρχία. 2) εισάγεται στρατηγική κατάταξης από πάνω προς τα κάτω αντί να εκπαιδεύεται ένα σύνολο τοπικών ταξινομητών. Τα πειράματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά άλλες προσεγγίσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, ειδικά για το πρόβλημα της μακριάς ουράς.', 'hu': 'A DSRE (Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction) hatékonynak bizonyult a szövegekből származó kapcsolati tények megtalálására, de még mindig két fő problémával szenved: a rossz címkézési probléma és a hosszú farkú probléma. A meglévő megközelítések többsége ezt a két problémát lapos osztályozással kezeli, amely hiányzik a kapcsolatokra vonatkozó hierarchikus információk hiányában. Az információs kapcsolathierarchiák kihasználása érdekében hierarchikus osztályozási feladatként fogalmazzuk meg a DSRE-t és javasoljuk egy új hierarchikus osztályozási keretrendszert, amely felülről lefelé vonja ki a kapcsolatot. Konkrétan javasolt keretünkben 1) hierarchikusan finomított reprezentációs módszert alkalmazunk a hierarchia-specifikus reprezentáció eléréséhez; 2) a helyi osztályozók képzése helyett felülről lefelé osztályozási stratégiát vezetnek be. A NYT adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk jelentősen felülmúlja a többi korszerű megközelítést, különösen a hosszú farok problémáját.', 'ka': 'ექსტალურად მონახვედული პრობლემები ექსტრაქცია (DSRE) იქნება ეფექტიური ტექსტიდან პრობლემების ფაქტის მოძებნა, მაგრამ ის მხოლოდ ორი მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემების შემდეგ იქნება: არ მხოლოდ მსოფლიოსობენი დახმარების უფრო მეტი ამ ორი პრობლემების გადაწყენება, რომელიც უნდა იერაქტიკური შესახებ ინფორმაცია. რომ ინფორმაციური შესახებ იერაქტიების შესახებ, ჩვენ DSRE როგორც იერაქტიკალური კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობა გავაკეთებთ და პრომენტური იერაქტიკალური კლასიფიკაციის რამდენობა, რომელიც შესახებ დავ 1) ჩვენ იერაქტიკურად განსაზღვრებული გამოყენება იერაქტიკურად განსაზღვრებული გამოყენება იერაქტიკურად განსაზღვრებული გამოყენება; 2) დამატებული კლასიფიკაციის სტრატიგია ჩვენება მხოლოდ ლოკალური კლასიფიკაციების ნაწილად. ექსპერიმენტები NYT მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი პრობლემა მნიშვნელოვანია სხვა მსგავსი პრობლემაზე, განსაკუთრებით ძალიან ძალიან გავა', 'it': "La Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) si è dimostrata efficace nel trovare fatti relazionali dai testi, ma soffre ancora di due problemi principali: il problema di etichettatura sbagliato e il problema della coda lunga. La maggior parte degli approcci esistenti affronta questi due problemi attraverso una classificazione piatta, che manca di informazioni gerarchiche sulle relazioni. Per sfruttare le gerarchie informative delle relazioni, formuliamo DSRE come compito di classificazione gerarchica e proponiamo un nuovo quadro gerarchico di classificazione, che estrae la relazione in modo dall'alto verso il basso. Nello specifico, nel framework proposto, 1) utilizziamo un metodo di rappresentazione gerarchicamente raffinato per ottenere una rappresentazione gerarchica specifica; 2) viene introdotta una strategia di classificazione top-down invece di formare una serie di classificatori locali. Gli esperimenti sul set di dati NYT dimostrano che il nostro approccio supera significativamente altri approcci all'avanguardia, specialmente per il problema della coda lunga.", 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad nuotoliniu mastu kontroliuojamų santykių ekstraktas (DSRE) yra veiksmingas ieškant santykinių faktų iš tekstų, tačiau vis dar susiduria su dviem pagrindinėmis problemomis: neteisinga ženklinimo problema ir ilguoju uodegu problema. Most of the existing approaches address these two problems through flat classification, which lacks hierarchical information of relations.  Siekiant išnaudoti informacinių santykių hierarchijas, parengiame DSRE kaip hierarchinę klasifikavimo užduotį ir siūlome naują hierarchinę klasifikavimo sistemą, kuri ištrauktų santykius iš viršaus į apačią. Konkrečiai, pasiūlytoje sistemoje 1) hierarchiškai patobulintam atstovavimo metodui naudojame, kad būtų pasiektas hierarchiškai specifinis atstovavimas; 2) vietoj vietos klasifikatorių mokymo parengiama iš viršaus į apačią klasifikavimo strategija. Eksperimentai su NYT duomenų rinkiniu rodo, kad mūsų požiūris gerokai viršija kitus moderniausius požiūrius, ypač ilguoju uodega.', 'kk': 'Қашықтағы қатынас тарқату (DSRE) мәтіндерден қатынастық факттерді табуға әсер етеді, бірақ ол әлі екі негізгі мәселелерден тұрады: жарлықтау мәселесі жарамсыз және ұзындықтағы мәселесі. Бар жағдайдың көпшілігі бұл екі мәселелерді жақсы классификациялау арқылы шешуге болады. Бұл қатынастардың иерархиялық мәліметі жоқ. Мәліметтік иерархиялар туралы мәліметтік қатынасын көмектесу үшін, біз DSRE- ді иерархиялық классификациялау тапсырмасы ретінде формулиру және романдық иерархиялық классификациялау бағдарламасын таңдап Сәйкес, біздің қолданған қоршауымыздың 1) біз иерархиялық түрлендіру әдісін иерархиялық түрлендіру үшін қолданамыз; 2) Жергілікті классификацияларды оқыту орнына жоғарғы жоғарғы классификациялау стратегиясы келтіріледі. NYT деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелер біздің тәжірибеміздің басқа жағдайдың күйіне көп жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді, әсіресе ұзындық тәжірибенің мәселесі үшін.', 'mk': 'Оддалечено надгледуваната екстракција на односите (ДСРЕ) се покажа дека е ефикасна за пронаоѓање на релативни факти од текстовите, но сепак страда од два главни проблеми: погрешниот проблем со етикетирање и проблемот со долготрајната опашка. Повеќето од постојните пристапи ги решаваат овие два проблеми преку рамна класификација, која недостасува хиерархички информации за односите. За да ги искористиме хиерархиите на информативните односи, ја формулираме ДСРЕ како хиерархична класификациска задача и предложуваме нова хиерархиска класификациска рамка, која ја извлекува врската на начин горе надолу. Специфично, во нашата предложена рамка, 1) користиме хиерархички рефиниран метод на претставување за да постигнеме хиерархиски специфично претставување; 2) a top-down classification strategy is introduced instead of training a set of local classifiers.  Експериментите на наборот на податоци на НЈТ покажуваат дека нашиот пристап значително е поголем од другите најсовремени пристапи, особено за проблемот со долга опашка.', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan DiSupervise Jauh (DSRE) telah terbukti berkesan untuk mencari fakta hubungan dari teks, tetapi ia masih menderita dari dua masalah utama: masalah label yang salah dan masalah ekor panjang. Kebanyakan pendekatan yang ada mengatasi kedua-dua masalah ini melalui klasifikasi rata, yang kekurangan maklumat hierarkis hubungan. Untuk mengambil alih hierarki hubungan maklumat, kami membentuk DSRE sebagai tugas kelasukan hierarkis dan melamar kerangka kelasukan hierarkis yang baru, yang mengekstrak hubungan dengan cara atas ke bawah. Specifically, in our proposed framework, 1) we use a hierarchically-refined representation method to achieve hierarchy-specific representation;  2) strategi klasifikasi atas-bawah diperkenalkan selain melatih set klasifikasi setempat. Eksperimen pada set data NYT menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita jauh lebih berharga daripada pendekatan yang lain state-of-the-art, terutama untuk masalah ekor panjang.', 'ml': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) has proven to be effective to find relational facts from texts, but it still suffers from two main problems: the wrong labeling problem and the long-tail problem.  നിലവിലുള്ള മിക്കവാറും ഈ രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ ഫ്ലാറ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനിലൂടെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ വ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഹീറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ജോലിയായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d DSRE രൂപിക്കുന്നു. അത് മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും താഴെ ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഹ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d, 1) നമ്മള്\u200d ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പ്രതിന 2) ഒരു കൂട്ടം ലോക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിളുകളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പകരം മുകളിലുള്ള ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷന്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക NYT ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മറ്റു രാജ്', 'mt': 'L-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Sorveljati mill-bogħod (DSRE) uriet li hija effettiva biex jinstabu fatti relattivi mit-testi, iżda xorta ssofri minn żewġ problemi ewlenin: il-problema tat-tikkettar ħażin u l-problema tad-denb twil. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi eżistenti jindirizzaw dawn iż-żewġ problemi permezz ta’ klassifikazzjoni ċatta, li m’għandhiex informazzjoni ġerarkika dwar ir-relazzjonijiet. Biex ninfurzaw il-ġerarkiji tar-relazzjonijiet informativi, a ħna nifformulaw id-DSRE bħala kompitu ġerarkiku ta’ klassifikazzjoni u nipproponu qafas ġdid ta’ klassifikazzjoni ġerarkika, li jastrezzjona r-relazzjoni b’mod minn fuq għal isfel. Specifically, in our proposed framework, 1) we use a hierarchically-refined representation method to achieve hierarchy-specific representation;  2) tiġi introdotta strateġija ta’ klassifikazzjoni minn fuq għal isfel minflok titħarreġ sett ta’ klassifikaturi lokali. L-esperimenti fuq is-sett tad-dejta NYT juru li l-approċċ tagħna huwa ferm aktar avvanzat minn approċċi oħra avvanzati, speċjalment għall-problema tad-denb twil.', 'no': 'Avstanden oversikt utpakking av relasjonar (DSRE) har vist at det er effektivt å finna relasjonelle faktar frå tekstar, men det fortsatt køyrer frå to hovudproblemer: feil etikettingsfeil og den langhaldne problemet. Dei fleste av dei eksisterande tilnærmingane gjer disse to problemene gjennom flat klassifikasjon, som manglar hierarkisk informasjon om relasjonar. For å levera informativ relasjonshierarkitet, formerer vi DSRE som eit hierarkisk klassifikasjon- oppgåve og foreslår eit nytt hierarkisk klassifikasjonsframmeverk, som ekstraherer relasjonen på ein øvre nedover måte. I vår foreslått ramme bruker vi ein hierarkisk refinert representasjonsmetode for å oppnå hierarkisk spesifikke representasjon. 2) oppfører ein klassifikasjonsstrategi øvre ned i staden for å opplæra eit sett av lokale klassifikatorar. Eksperimentane på NYT-datasettet viser at tilnærminga vårt betydelig utfører andre tilnærmingar av kunsten, spesielt for den lange haldne problemet.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji odległego nadzoru (DSRE) okazała się skuteczna w wyszukiwaniu faktów relacyjnych z tekstów, ale nadal cierpi na dwa główne problemy: problem niewłaściwego etykietowania i problem długiego ogona. Większość istniejących podejść rozwiązuje te dwa problemy poprzez klasyfikację płaską, w której brakuje hierarchicznej informacji o relacjach. Aby wykorzystać hierarchię relacji informacyjnych, formułujemy DSRE jako hierarchiczne zadanie klasyfikacji i proponujemy nowe hierarchiczne ramy klasyfikacji, które ekstraktuje relację w sposób odgórny. W szczególności, w proponowanych przez nas ramach, 1) stosujemy hierarchicznie dopracowaną metodę reprezentacji, aby uzyskać reprezentację specyficzną dla hierarchii; 2) zamiast szkolenia zestawu lokalnych klasyfikatorów wprowadza się strategię klasyfikacji odgórnej. Eksperymenty na zbiorze danych NYT pokazują, że nasze podejście znacznie przewyższa inne najnowocześniejsze podejścia, zwłaszcza w przypadku problemu długiego ogona.', 'ro': 'Extracția relațiilor supravegheate la distanță (DSRE) s-a dovedit a fi eficientă pentru a găsi fapte relaționale din texte, dar suferă încă de două probleme principale: problema etichetării greșite și problema cu coada lungă. Majoritatea abordărilor existente abordează aceste două probleme printr-o clasificare plată, care nu are informații ierarhice privind relațiile. Pentru a valorifica ierarhiile relațiilor informative, formulăm DSRE ca o sarcină ierarhică de clasificare și propunem un nou cadru ierarhic de clasificare, care extrage relația într-o manieră de sus în jos. În mod specific, în cadrul propus, 1) utilizăm o metodă de reprezentare rafinată ierarhic pentru a realiza reprezentarea specifică ierarhiei; 2) este introdusă o strategie de clasificare de sus în jos în loc să instruiască un set de clasificatori locali. Experimentele pe setul de date NYT demonstrează că abordarea noastră depășește semnificativ alte abordări de ultimă generație, în special pentru problema cu coada lungă.', 'mn': 'Хамгийн хоорондын харилцааны хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай зүйлсийг текстүүдийн харилцааны үнэнийг олохын тулд үр дүнтэй болж байна. Гэхдээ энэ нь хоёр үндсэн асуудлуудын тулд зовлон байна: буруу маркингийн асуудлыг, урт хугацааны ас Үүний ихэнх арга барилга нь эдгээр хоёр асуудлыг бага зэрэг хэлбэрээр удирдаж, харилцааны хамааралтай мэдээлэл байхгүй. Бид мэдээллийн харилцааны тухай бага зэрэгцүүлэхийн тулд DSRE-г дүгнэлтийн хуваалцааны ажлын хувьд бүтээж, шинэ дүгнэлтийн хуваалцааны хэлбэрийг санал болгож, харилцааны тухай дээд доош талаар гаргадаг. Ялангуяа, бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн хэлбэрээр 1) бид энерархины төлөвлөгөө хийх арга хэрэглэдэг. 2) Орон нутгийн классификацийн сургалтын оронд дээд доорх классификацийн стратегийг танилцуулдаг. НИТ өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бидний арга зам нь бусад урлагийн тухай ойлголтын тулд чухал боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг. Ялангуяа урт хугацааны асуудлын тухай.', 'sr': 'Daljinski nadzorni izvlačenje odnosa (DSRE) dokazalo se da je efikasno pronaći vezne činjenice iz teksta, ali još uvijek pati od dva glavnog problema: pogrešan problem označavanja i problem dugog repa. Većina postojećih pristupa rješava te dve probleme putem ravne klasifikacije, koja nedostaje hijerarhičke informacije o odnosima. Da bi uticali na hijerarhiju informativnih odnosa, formulirali smo DSRE kao hijerarhički zadatak klasifikacije i predložili novi hijerarhički okvir klasifikacije, koji izvlači odnos na vrhunski način. Posebno, u našem predloženom okviru, 1) koristimo hijerarhički rafiniranu metodu predstavljanja kako bi postigli predstavu za hijerarhiju određenu predstavu; 2) uvede se najgora strategija klasifikacije umjesto obuke skupa lokalnih klasifikatora. Eksperimenti na NYT dataset pokazuju da naš pristup značajno iznosi druge pristupe stanja umjetnosti, posebno za problem dugog repa.', 'si': 'Distant supervised සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නය (DSRE) පිළිබඳින් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒත් ඒක තවමත් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200d ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න, ඒක සම්බන් අපි DSRE විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ කාර්ය විදියට සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට පත්තු  විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන්, 1) අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විධානයක් භ 2) ස්ථානික විශේෂ කරුණාකරුවන්ගේ සූදානම් විශේෂ කරුණාකරුවන් වෙනුවෙන් උපරිම විශ NYT දත්ත සූදානයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂයෙන් අනිත් ස්ථිතියේ ඉන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'so': "Magaalada la'aanta ka soo bixinta xiriirka (DSRE) waxay caddeysay inay faa’iido ku leedahay in laga helo xaqiiqyada xiriirka ee qoraalka, laakiin waxay weli ka dhibaataysaa laba dhibaatooyin oo muhiim ah: dhibaatada labka iyo dhibaatada daba-daba. Inta badan ee soo dhowaadayaasha joogta ah waxay u baahan yihiin labadan dhibaatooyin sida loo kala soocay fasalka bannaan, taas oo u baahan macluumaadka xiriirka hierarkiisa. Si aan u soo dirno macluumaadka xiriirka hierarchies, waxaynu u sameynaa DSRE oo ah qasnada hierarchical classification, waxaana u soo jeedinaynaa qorshaha hierarchical classification, taasoo ku soo saara xiriirka hoose-hoos. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa qaab la dhigo hierarchy-specific, si aan u gaadhno muuqashada hierarchy; 2) waxaa la soo bandhigay qorshaha fasalka hoose-hoose, taasoo aan laga helin waxbarasho koox fasax ah oo degmada ah. Imtixaanka danbiyada ee NYT waxay muujiyaan in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu aad buu u muujiyaa qaabab kale oo xaaladda farshaxanka ah, khusuusan dhibaatada dabada dheer.", 'sv': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) har visat sig vara effektivt för att hitta relationella fakta från texter, men det lider fortfarande av två huvudproblem: fel märkningsproblem och long-tail problem. De flesta av de befintliga metoderna behandlar dessa två problem genom en platt klassificering, som saknar hierarkisk information om relationerna. För att utnyttja de informativa relationshierarkierna formulerar vi DSRE som en hierarkisk klassificeringsuppgift och föreslår en ny hierarkisk klassificeringsram, som extraherar relationen uppifrån och ner. Specifikt, i vårt föreslagna ramverk, 1) använder vi en hierarkiskt förfinad representationsmetod för att uppnå hierarkispecifik representation; 2) En uppifrån och ner klassificeringsstrategi införs i stället för att utbilda en uppsättning lokala klassificerare. Experimenten på NYT-dataset visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt avsevärt överträffar andra state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt, särskilt för långsvansproblemet.', 'ta': 'தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பு வெளியீடு (DSRE) உரைகளிலிருந்து தொடர்பு காரணிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும். ஆனால் அது இன்னும் இரண்டு முக்கிய பிரச்சனைகளி இருக்கும் பெரும்பாலான நெருங்குதல்கள் இந்த இரண்டு பிரச்சனைகளை ஃப்ளாட் வகுப்பில் மூலம் வைத்துக் கொள்ளும், அத தகவல் தொடர்பு மின்னஞ்சல் தொடர்புகளை கொடுக்க, நாம் DSRE ஒரு மேல்பட்ட வகுப்பு பணியாக உருவாக்கி ஒரு புதிய ஹியரியல் வகுப்பு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது  குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தில், 1) நாங்கள் முன்னிருப்பப்படுத்தப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பிரத 2) ஒரு மேல் கீழே வகுப்பு திட்டம் உள்ளூர் வகுப்பாளர்களுக்கு பயிற்சிக்கு பதிலாக உள்ளது. NYT தரவுத்தளத்தில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது நம்முடைய அணுக்கம் மிகவும் குறிப்பாக மற்ற நிலையில் கலை நிறுவனங்களை வெளியேற', 'ur': 'دور نظارت والی رابطہ اخراج (DSRE) کی ثابت ہو چکی ہے کہ texts سے رابطہ والی حقیقت تلاش کرنے کے لئے اثرات ہے، لیکن یہ ابھی دو اصلی مسئلہ سے دردناک ہے: غلط لابلینگ مسئلہ اور طویل ٹیل مسئلہ. بہت سی موجود تقریبیں ان دونوں مسائل کو سطح کلاسیفوں کے ذریعہ سمجھتے ہیں، جن کے ارتباط کے معاملات کی حیراتی معلومات کے لائق ہیں. اس لئے ہم نے DSRE کو ایک حیراتیکل کلاسیفون کے طور پر فرمول کیا ہے اور ایک نئی حیراتیکل کلاسیفون فرمول کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جس نے ارتباط کو بالا نیچے طریقے سے نکالی ہے. خاص طور پر، ہمارے پیشنهاد فریمیٹ میں 1) ہم ایک قائم طریقے سے پاکیزہ طریقے سے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اس طریقے سے مخصوص طریقے کو پہنچ سکیں۔ 2) ایک ٹوپ-نیچے کلاسیفوں کا استراتژی معلوم کیا جاتا ہے جہاں ایک مجموعہ محلی کلاسیفوں کی تعلیم کے بدلے۔ NYT ڈاٹ سٹ کے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ بہت اچھی طریقہ سے دوسرے طریقے کے مطابق، مخصوصاً طویل پاؤں کے مسئلہ کے لئے اضافہ ہوتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Phân tích tương quan cách xa (DSR) đã chứng minh có hiệu quả tìm ra các dữ kiện liên quan từ các văn bản, nhưng nó vẫn gặp phải hai vấn đề chính: vấn đề bài đánh dấu sai và vấn đề đuôi dài. Hầu hết các phương pháp hiện tại giải quyết hai vấn đề này bằng cách phân loại đơn giản, thiếu thông tin cấp trên về quan hệ. Để sử dụng các hệ thống phân phối thông tin, chúng tôi mô tả DSE như một nhiệm vụ phân loại cấp thứ hai và đề xuất một hệ thống phân loại cấp cao mới, loại bỏ mối quan hệ này theo cách tích cực. Cụ thể, trong những gì chúng tôi đã đề nghị 2) Một chiến lược phân loại cấp cao được đưa ra thay vì đào tạo một bộ phân loại địa phương. Các thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu New York cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội hơn những phương pháp hiện đại, đặc biệt cho vấn đề đuôi dài.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik mavjud murakkablar bu ikkita muammolarni flat sifatida ishlatish mumkin. Bu bilan aloqalar haqida yetarli maʼlumot yoʻq. Maʼlumot bogʻlamalar hierarchiyatlarini qo'llash uchun biz DSRE'ni hierarchik classification vazifasi sifatida tayyorlamiz va novel hierarchik classification frameiyasini yaxshi darajaga ega qilamiz. Bu aloqalarni yuqoriga tezlashtiradi. Ko'rsatilgan, quyidagi freymdagi 1) biz hierarchi-specific represent qilish uchun hezarik-tashkilotni foydalanamiz; 2) Lokal klassifning bir ko'plab turlarini tahrirlashdan oʻrniga yuqori darajalashtirish strategini ishlatiladi. Comment", 'da': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) har vist sig at være effektiv til at finde relationelle fakta fra tekster, men den lider stadig af to hovedproblemer: det forkerte mærkningsproblem og langhaleproblemet. De fleste af de eksisterende metoder behandler disse to problemer gennem en flad klassificering, som mangler hierarkisk information om relationerne. For at udnytte de informative relationshierarkier formulerer vi DSRE som en hierarkisk klassifikationsopgave og foreslår en ny hierarkisk klassifikationsramme, der udtrækker relationen ovenfra og ned. Specielt, i vores foreslåede rammer, 1) vi bruger en hierarkisk raffineret repræsentationsmetode til at opnå hierarkisk-specifik repræsentation; 2) Der indføres en top-down klassificeringsstrategi i stedet for at uddanne et sæt lokale klassificerere. Eksperimenterne med NYT datasæt viser, at vores tilgang betydeligt overgår andre state-of-the-art tilgange, især for langhaleproblemet.', 'nl': 'Distant Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) is effectief gebleken om relationele feiten uit teksten te vinden, maar het lijdt nog steeds aan twee grote problemen: het verkeerde labeling probleem en het long-tail probleem. De meeste bestaande benaderingen pakken deze twee problemen aan door middel van platte classificatie, die geen hiërarchische informatie over relaties bevat. Om de informatieve relatiehierarchieën te benutten, formuleren we DSRE als hiërarchische classificatietaak en stellen we een nieuw hiërarchisch classificatiekader voor, dat de relatie op een top-down manier extraheert. Specifiek, in ons voorgestelde raamwerk, gebruiken we een hiërarchisch verfijnde representatiemethode om hiërarchiespecifieke representatie te bereiken; 2) Er wordt een top-down classificatiestrategie ingevoerd in plaats van een reeks lokale classificatoren op te leiden. De experimenten met NYT dataset tonen aan dat onze aanpak aanzienlijk beter presteert dan andere state-of-the-art benaderingen, vooral voor het long-tail probleem.', 'bg': 'Извличането на релационни факти от текстовете се оказа ефективно, но все още страда от два основни проблема: проблемът с погрешното етикетиране и проблемът с дългата опашка. Повечето от съществуващите подходи решават тези два проблема чрез плоска класификация, която липсва йерархична информация за отношенията. За да използваме информационните йерархии на отношенията, формулираме ДСР като йерархична класификационна задача и предлагаме нова йерархична класификационна рамка, която извлича връзката отгоре надолу. По-конкретно, в нашата предложена рамка, 1) използваме йерархично рафиниран метод на представяне за постигане на йерархично специфично представяне; 2) Въвежда се стратегия за класификация отгоре надолу вместо обучение на набор от местни класификатори. Експериментите с набора от данни показват, че нашият подход значително превъзхожда другите съвременни подходи, особено за проблема с дългата опашка.', 'de': 'Distant Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) hat sich als effektiv erwiesen, um relationale Fakten aus Texten zu finden, aber es leidet immer noch unter zwei Hauptproblemen: dem falschen Etikettierungsproblem und dem Long-Tail-Problem. Die meisten bestehenden Ansätze adressieren diese beiden Probleme durch eine flache Klassifizierung, die keine hierarchischen Informationen über Beziehungen enthält. Um die informativen Beziehungshierarchien zu nutzen, formulieren wir DSRE als hierarchische Klassifikationsaufgabe und schlagen ein neuartiges hierarchisches Klassifikationsrahmen vor, das die Beziehung top-down extrahiert. Insbesondere verwenden wir in unserem vorgeschlagenen Framework eine hierarchisch verfeinerte Repräsentationsmethode, um hierarchiespezifische Repräsentation zu erreichen; 2) Anstatt eine Reihe lokaler Klassifikatoren zu schulen, wird eine Top-Down-Klassifikationsstrategie eingeführt. Die Experimente an NYT-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz andere State-of-the-Art-Ansätze deutlich übertrifft, insbesondere für das Long-Tail-Problem.', 'ko': '원격 감독 관계 추출 (DSRE) 은 텍스트에서 관계 사실을 발견하는 효과적인 방법으로 증명되었지만, 오류 표기 문제와 긴 꼬리 문제 두 가지 주요 문제가 여전히 존재한다.기존의 대다수 방법은 평면 분류를 통해 이 두 문제를 해결하는 것이지만 평면 분류는 관계의 차원 정보가 부족하다.정보 관계의 차원 구조를 이용하기 위해 DSRE를 하나의 차원 분류 임무로 묘사하고 새로운 차원 분류 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 위에서 아래로 관계를 추출하는 방식으로 관계를 추출한다.구체적으로 말하면 우리가 제시한 구조에서 1) 우리는 층을 나누어 세분화된 표현 방법을 사용하여 특정한 차원의 표시를 실현한다.2) 한 조의 국부류기를 훈련시키는 것이 아니라 위에서 아래로 분류하는 전략을 채택한다.NYT 데이터 세트에서의 실험은 우리의 방법이 다른 가장 선진적인 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다. 특히 긴 꼬리 문제에 대해서는.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan Distant Supervised (DSRE) telah terbukti efektif untuk menemukan fakta relatif dari teks, tetapi masih menderita dari dua masalah utama: masalah label yang salah dan masalah ekor panjang. Kebanyakan pendekatan yang ada mengatasi dua masalah ini melalui klasifikasi rata, yang kekurangan informasi hierarkis hubungan. Untuk mengambil alih hierarki hubungan informatif, kami menyiformulasi DSRE sebagai tugas klasifikasi hierarkis dan melamar cadangan klasifikasi hierarkis yang baru, yang mengekstrak hubungan dengan cara atas ke bawah. Secara spesifik, dalam cadangan kami yang diusulkan, 1) kami menggunakan metode persembahan yang diperfinisikan secara hierarkis untuk mencapai persembahan spesifik hierarki; 2) strategi klasifikasi dari atas ke bawah diperkenalkan daripada melatih set klasifikasi lokal. Eksperimen di dataset NYT menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita jauh lebih besar dari pendekatan terbaik lainnya, terutama untuk masalah ekor panjang.', 'fa': 'اخراج رابطه\u200cهای دور نظارت شده (DSRE) ثابت کرده است که برای پیدا کردن حقیقت رابطه\u200cای از متن موثر است، ولی هنوز از دو مشکل اصلی رنج می\u200cبرد: مشکل برچسب اشتباه و مشکل دور مدت طولانی. بیشتر از نزدیک\u200cهای موجود این دو مشکل را با طریق classification flat دریافت می\u200cکند، که اطلاعات طبیعی از ارتباطات را لازم دارد. برای تأثیر ارتباط اطلاعات، ما DSRE را به عنوان یک وظیفه تأثیر قانونی فرمودیم و یک چهارچوب تأثیر قانونی تازه را پیشنهاد می کنیم که ارتباط را به طریق بالای پایین خارج می کند. مخصوصا، در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ 2) استراتژی مختصات بالا پایین به جای آموزش مجموعه\u200cی مختصات محلی معرفی می\u200cشود. آزمایش\u200cها در مجموعه داده\u200cهای نیویت نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما به طور معنی نزدیک\u200cهای دیگر موجود هنر را انجام می\u200cدهد، مخصوصا برای مشکل مدت طولانی.', 'sw': 'Nchini ya kuondolewa kwa uhusiano (DSRE) imethibitisha kuwa na ufanisi wa kutafuta ukweli wa mahusiano kutoka kwenye maandishi, lakini bado inaumia matatizo makuu mawili: tatizo lisilo sahihi na tatizo la muda mrefu. Matokeo mengi yanayoendelea yanazungumzia matatizo haya mawili kwa kupitia usambazaji wa kiraia, ambayo hayana taarifa za mahusiano. Ili kutumikia maeneo ya mahusiano ya taarifa, tunatengeneza DSRE kama jukumu la usambazaji mkuu na kupendekeza mfumo wa usambazaji wa kisasa, unaoonyesha uhusiano kwa njia ya juu. Kwa ujumla, katika mfumo wetu wa pendekezo, 1) tunatumia njia ya uwakilishaji ulioboreshwa kidini ili kupata uwakilishaji maalum wa kiutawala; 2) mkakati wa kutangaza daraja la juu umeanzishwa badala ya kuwafundisha kundi la wataalamu wa eneo hilo. Majaribio kwenye seti ya taarifa za NYT yanaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa utofauti wa hali ya sanaa, hasa kwa matatizo ya muda mrefu.', 'tr': "Ýakynda gözetlenýän relasiýa çykarmak (DSRE) metinlerden baglanyş faktalary tapmak üçin etkinlik bolandyr, ýöne bu durum hala iki esasy meselelerden bolýar: ýalňyş etiketleme meselesi we uzak ýigry mesele. Öň bar ýakynlaryň köpüsi şu iki meseleleri ýet klasifikasy bilen çykar, hiyerarşik maglumatyň ýetmedi. Iýerarhiýarlar hakynda maglumat baglaýyşyny ulanmak üçin, DSRE'i iýerarhiýa klasifikasyýa täbligi hökmünde we täze bir iýerarhiýa klasifikasyýa täbligi teklip edip, bu syýahaty a şak bir şekilde açar. Adatça, biziň teklif edilen çerýämizde 1) iýerarhiýa takykly suratlary ýetmek üçin bir iýerarhiýa taýýarlanan suratlary ulanýarys; 2) ýerli klassifikatçiler eğitirmek ýerine iň üst a şak klassifikatçiler strategiýasy girişdirdi. NYT veri setindeki deneyler biziň yaklaşymyz başga ýagdaýyň ýagdaýynyň ýagdaýynyň çykmasynyň, özellikle ýokaryň uzak ýokaryň meselesi üçin örän köp çykýar.", 'sq': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) has proven to be effective to find relational facts from texts, but it still suffers from two main problems: the wrong labeling problem and the long-tail problem.  Shumica e qasjeve ekzistuese trajtojnë këto dy probleme nëpërmjet klasifikimit të caktuar, të cilit i mungon informacioni hierarkik i marrëdhënieve. Për të përdorur hierarkitë e marrëdhënieve informative, ne formulojmë DSRE si një detyrë hierarkike klasifikimi dhe propozojmë një kuadër të ri hierarkik klasifikimi, i cili nxjerr marrëdhëniet në një mënyrë nga lart poshtë. Veçanërisht, në kuadrin tonë të propozuar, 1) ne përdorim një metodë përfaqësimi të rafinuar hierarkikisht për të arritur përfaqësim specifik për hierarkinë; 2) futet një strategji klasifikimi nga lart poshtë në vend të trajnimit të një sëre klasifikuesish lokalë. Eksperimentet në grupin e të dhënave të NYT tregojnë se qasja jonë është më e rëndësishme se qasjet e tjera më të larta, veçanërisht për problemin e bishtit të gjatë.', 'am': 'የውይይት ግንኙነት ማውጣት (DSRE) ከጽሑፎች የግንኙነት ውሸቶችን ለማግኘት ጥቅም ሆኖአል፤ ነገር ግን ከሁለቱ ዋና ጉዳይ መከራ ነው፤ ስህተት የጽሕፈት መከራና የረጅም ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ ግንኙነቶች ብዙዎቹ የግንኙነት መረጃ የጎደለበት በጥሩ መግለጫ የሁለቱን ጉዳዮች ያድራሉ፡፡ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት አዳራሽነትን ለማድረግ፣ DSRE እንደ hierarchical classification ሥርዓት እና አዲስ ሐይሬርክስቲክ ክፍተር መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይ፣ በተዘጋጀው ፍሬማችን (1) በተለየ የተለየ መልዕክት ማድረግ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ 2) የላይኛይቱ ክፍለ ግንኙነት ክፍተኞቹን ከማስተማር ፋንታ የክፍለ ግንኙነት strategy ይገናኛል፡፡ የNYT ዳታተር ተፈተናዎች የረጅም ጉዳይ የሀገር አካባቢ ሥርዓት፣ በተለይም የረጅም ጉዳይ እንዲያሳየፉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Afstand ondersoekte Relasie uitvoer (DSRE) het bevestig dat effektief is om relasielike fakte van tekste te vind, maar dit is nog steeds gely van twee hoofde probleme: die verkeerde etiket probleme en die lang stert probleme. Die meeste van die bestaande toegang tot hierdie twee probleem deur plat klassifikasie, wat hierarkies inligting van verwante ontbreek het. Om die informatiewe verwanting hierarkies te verwyder, formuleer ons DSRE as 'n hierarkies klasifikasie taak en voorstel 'n novele hierarkies klasifikasie raamwerk wat die verwanting uitpak op 'n bo-af manier. Spesifieke, in ons voorgestelde raamwerk, 1) ons gebruik 'n hierarkies-opgewysigde voorstellingsmetode om hierarkie-spesifieke voorstelling te bereik; 2) â\x80\x99n boonste klasifikasie-strategie is ingestel in plaas van â\x80\x99n stel plaaslike klassifiseerders. Die eksperimente op NYT-datastel bevestig dat ons toegang betekenlik ander staat-van-kuns toegang uitvoer, veral vir die lang-tail-probleem.", 'hy': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) has proven to be effective to find relational facts from texts, but it still suffers from two main problems: the wrong labeling problem and the long-tail problem.  Most of the existing approaches address these two problems through flat classification, which lacks hierarchical information of relations.  To leverage the informative relation hierarchies, we formulate DSRE as a hierarchical classification task and propose a novel hierarchical classification framework, which extracts the relation in a top-down manner.  Specifically, in our proposed framework, 1) we use a hierarchically-refined representation method to achieve hierarchy-specific representation;  2) a top-down classification strategy is introduced instead of training a set of local classifiers.  The experiments on NYT dataset demonstrate that our approach significantly outperforms other state-of-the-art approaches, especially for the long-tail problem.', 'bn': 'অদ্ভুত সম্পর্ক বিনিময় (DSRE) টেক্সট থেকে সম্পর্কের বাস্তবতা খুঁজে বের করার কার্যকর প্রমাণ করেছে, কিন্তু এটা এখনো দুই প্রধান সমস্যা থেকে কষ্ট পাচ্ছে:  বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান প্রতিক্রিয়াগুলো ফ্ল্যাট ক্লাসাফেশনের মাধ্যমে এই দুটি সমস্যাগুলোকে বিবেচনা করে, যার সম্পর্ক তথ্য সম্পর্কের হিয়ারেরাচিগুলোকে প্রতিষ্ঠান করার জন্য আমরা ডিএসRE হিয়েরারাক্কিল ক্লাসাফিকেশনের কাজ হিসেবে তৈরি করি এবং একটি নোভেল হায়েরারাক্কিল ক বিশেষ করে, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেমে ১) আমরা হিয়ারার্কিক ভাবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রতিনিধিত্বের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি হিরেরার্কি নি ২) স্থানীয় বিভিন্ন স্থানীয় বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীদের প্রশিক্ষণের পরিবর্তে একটি শীর্ষ-নীচে ক্লাসাফেশন কৌশল এনয়াটি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষাগুলো প্রমাণ করে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা অন্যান্য রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ক্ষেত্রে বিশেষ করে দীর্ঘ সময়ের', 'az': "Mətnlərdən əlaqələr tapmaq üçün uzaq təhlükəsizlik əlaqəsi çıxarma (DSRE) faydalı olduğunu göstərdi, amma bu hələ iki ana problemdən baş verər: yanlış etiketləmə problemi və uzun kuyruğun problemi. Bütün məlumatların çoxu bu iki problemi düz klasifikasiya vasitəsilə çəkir, hiyerarşik məlumatları yoxdur. İhraşimlərin məlumatı yaratmaq üçün, DSRE'i hiyerarşik klasifikasiya görevi olaraq formüləyirik və yeni hiyerarşik klasifikasiya çerçivi təklif edirik ki, bağlantısını yuxarı tərəfindən çıxarır. Özellikle, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz frameworklərimizdə 1) hiyerarşiyə müəyyən edilmiş temsil metodlarını istifadə edirik. 2) Yerli klasifikatçılar təhsil etmək yerinə yuxarı a şağıda klasifikasiya stratejisi təhsil edilir. NYT verilənlər qutusundakı eksperimentlər bizim tərəfimizin başqa mövcuddur, özlərinə də uzun kuyruğun problemi üçün başqa tərəfimizin yaxınlıqlarını daha çox etmişdir.", 'fi': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) on osoittautunut tehokkaaksi suhteellisuusfaktojen löytämiseksi teksteistä, mutta se kärsii silti kahdesta pääongelmasta: väärästä merkintäongelmasta ja pitkähäntäongelmasta. Suurin osa nykyisistä lähestymistavoista käsittelee näitä kahta ongelmaa tasaisella luokittelulla, jossa ei ole hierarkkista tietoa suhteista. Informatiivisen suhdehierarkian hyödyntämiseksi muotoilemme DSRE:n hierarkkiseksi luokittelutehtäväksi ja ehdotamme uutta hierarkkista luokituskehystä, joka poimii suhteen ylhäältä alaspäin. Ehdottamassamme kehyksessä 1) käytämme hierarkisesti hiottua edustusmenetelmää saavuttaaksemme hierarkiakohtaisen edustuksen; 2) otetaan käyttöön ylhäältä alaspäin luokittelustrategia paikallisten luokittelijoiden kouluttamisen sijaan. NYT-aineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme on huomattavasti parempi kuin muut nykyaikaiset lähestymistavat, erityisesti pitkähäntäongelman osalta.', 'et': 'Kaugjärelevalvega seotud suhete ekstraheerimine (DSRE) on osutunud tõhusaks seosfaktide leidmisel tekstidest, kuid see kannatab siiski kahe peamise probleemi all: vale märgistuse probleem ja pikasaba probleem. Enamik olemasolevatest lähenemisviisidest lahendab neid kahte probleemi ühtse klassifikatsiooni kaudu, millel puudub hierarhiline teave seoste kohta. Informatiivsete suhete hierarhiate kasutamiseks sõnastame DSRE hierarhilise klassifitseerimisülesandena ja pakume välja uue hierarhilise klassifitseerimisraamistiku, mis ekstraheerib seose ülevalt alla viisil. Eelkõige, meie kavandatud raamistikus 1) kasutame hierarhiliselt rafineeritud esindamismeetodit, et saavutada hierarhiaspetsiifiline esindamine; 2) kohalike klassifitseerijate koolitamise asemel kehtestatakse ülevalt alla klassifitseerimisstrateegia. NYT andmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie lähenemine on oluliselt üle teiste kaasaegsete lähenemisviiside, eriti pikasaba probleemi.', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions remotament supervisades (DSRE) ha demostrat ser eficaç per trobar fets relacionals dels textos, però encara pateix dos problemes principals: el problema d'etiquetage equivocat i el problema de longa cua. Most of the existing approaches address these two problems through flat classification, which lacks hierarchical information of relations.  Per aprofitar les jerarquies de relacions informatives, formulem DSRE com una tasca de classificació jeràrquica i proposem un nou marc de classificació jeràrquica, que extreu la relació de dalt a baix. Concretament, en el nostre marc proposat, 1) utilitzem un mètode de representació jeràrquicament refinat per aconseguir una representació específica per a la jeràrquia; 2) s'introdueix una estratègia de classificació de dalt a baix en comptes d'entrenar un conjunt de classificadors locals. Els experiments del conjunt de dades de la NYT demostren que el nostre enfocament supera significativament altres enfocaments més avançats, especialment en el problema de la llarga cola.", 'cs': 'Dálkově dohlížená extrakce vztahů (DSRE) se ukázala jako účinná při hledání relačních faktů z textů, ale stále trpí dvěma hlavními problémy: problémem špatného označování a problémem s dlouhým ocasem. Většina stávajících přístupů řeší tyto dva problémy prostřednictvím ploché klasifikace, která postrádá hierarchické informace o vztazích. Pro využití hierarchie informačních vztahů formulujeme DSRE jako hierarchický klasifikační úkol a navrhujeme nový hierarchický klasifikační rámec, který vztah extrahuje shora dolů. Konkrétně, v našem navrženém rámci, 1) používáme hierarchicky rafinovanou metodu reprezentace k dosažení hierarchicky specifické reprezentace; 2) Místo výcviku souboru lokálních klasifikátorů je zavedena klasifikační strategie shora dolů. Experimenty na datové sadě NYT ukazují, že náš přístup výrazně překonává ostatní moderní přístupy, zejména pro problém s dlouhým ocasem.', 'hr': 'Daljinsko nadzirano izvlačenje odnosa (DSRE) dokazalo se da je učinkovito pronaći vezne činjenice teksta, ali još uvijek pati od dva glavnih problema: pogrešni problem označavanja i problem dugotrajnog repa. Većina postojećih pristupa rješava te dvije probleme putem ravne klasifikacije, koje nedostaje hijerarhičke informacije o odnosima. Da bi se povećali hijerarhije informativnih odnosa, formulirali smo DSRE kao hijerarhički zadatak klasifikacije i predložili nov hijerarhički okvir klasifikacije, koji izvlači odnos na vrhunski način. Posebno, u našem predloženom okviru, 1) koristimo hijerarhički rafinirani način predstavljanja kako bi postigli predstavu specifične hijerarhije; 2) predstavlja se najgora strategija klasifikacije umjesto obuke skupa lokalnih klasifikatora. Eksperimenti na NYT podacima pokazuju da naš pristup značajno iznosi druge pristupe stanja umjetnosti, posebno za problem dugog repa.', 'bs': 'Daljinski nadzorni izvlačenje odnosa (DSRE) dokazalo se da je efikasno pronaći vezne činjenice iz teksta, ali još uvijek pati od dva glavnih problema: pogrešni problem označavanja i problem dugotrajnog repa. Većina postojećih pristupa rješava te dvije probleme putem ravne klasifikacije, koje nedostaje hijerarhičke informacije o odnosima. Da bi uticali na hijerarhiju informativnih odnosa, formulirali smo DSRE kao hijerarhički zadatak klasifikacije i predložili novi hijerarhički okvir klasifikacije, koji izvlači odnos na vrhunski način. Posebno, u našem predloženom okviru, 1) koristimo hijerarhički rafiniranu metodu predstavljanja kako bi postigli predstavu specifične hijerarhije; 2) predstavlja se najgora strategija klasifikacije umjesto obuke skupa lokalnih klasifikatora. Eksperimenti na NYT dataset pokazuju da naš pristup značajno iznosi druge pristupe stanja umjetnosti, posebno za problem dugog repa.', 'sk': 'Izvleček odnosov z daljnim nadzorom (DSRE) se je izkazal za učinkovito pri iskanju odnosnih dejstev iz besedil, vendar še vedno trpi za dvema glavnima težavama: napačnim označevanjem in problemom z dolgim repom. Večina obstoječih pristopov obravnava ta dva težava s pavšalno klasifikacijo, ki nima hierarhičnih informacij o odnosih. Za izkoriščanje hierarhij informacijskih relacij oblikujemo DSRE kot hierarhično klasifikacijsko nalogo in predlagamo nov hierarhični okvir klasifikacije, ki razmerje izvleče od zgoraj navzdol. Natančneje, v našem predlaganem okviru, 1) uporabljamo hierarhično rafinirano metodo reprezentacije za doseganje hierarhično specifične reprezentacije; 2) namesto usposabljanja lokalnih razvrščevalcev se uvede strategija klasifikacije od zgoraj navzdol. Poskusi z naborom podatkov NYT kažejo, da naš pristop bistveno presega druge najsodobnejše pristope, zlasti pri problemu z dolgim repom.', 'he': 'מחלקת יחסים משומרת מרחוק (DSRE) הוכיחה להיות יעילה למצוא עובדות יחסיות מהטקסטים, אך היא עדיין סובלת משני בעיות ראשיות: בעיית התווית הלא נכונה ובעיית הזנב הארוך. רוב הגישויים הנוכחים מתייחסים לשני הבעיות האלה באמצעות מסווג שטוח, אשר חסר מידע הייררכי של יחסים. כדי לנצל את הייררכיות הקשר המידעי, אנו מייצרים את DSRE כמשימה שיווג הייררכית ומציעים מסגרת שיווג הייררכית חדשה, שמוציאת את הקשר בדרך מעל למטה. במיוחד, במסגרת המוצעת שלנו, 1) אנו משתמשים בשיטת מייצג מיוחדת הייררכית כדי להשיג מייצג מיוחד הייררכיה; 2) הוציאה אסטרטגיה מסווג מעל למטה במקום לאימון קבוצה של מסווגים מקומיים. הניסויים על קבוצת נתונים של ניו יורק מראים שהגישה שלנו יוצאת משמעות יותר מגישות חדשות, במיוחד בעיית הזנב הארוך.', 'ha': "@ action: button Babu mafi yawansu da ke jiran hanyõyin su sun nuna wannan mataimako biyu game da fasalin mai flat, wanda bã ya da haƙƙin tsari na haɗi. To, idan za mu iya cika hiera masu labanci, za mu ƙayyade DSR kamar wani aikin hierrrchical classifisi kuma Mu buɗa wani firam na salon hierorchical hierorchical, wanda ke samun haɗi da shi a saman-down. Yana ƙayyade, a cikin firam da aka buɗa mu, 1) za mu yi amfani da wata hanyor uwarsa da aka sayar da shi a cikin hierrarci-da'a-ƙayyade; 2) An introduce wani taki na fasasar-babban-ƙasa, ko kuma an ƙididdige wani tsari na danne mai lokacin. jarraboyin da ke kan data na NYT sun nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana mai girma ga mataimaki na-halin-sanawa, kuma hasa'a ga matabbata mai tsawo.", 'jv': 'Distant SubVised Relative extract Banyak hal-hal nganggo dolanan sing dibutuhke iki sakjane perusahaan winih sing dibutuhke To luderage the informaative Relative herearchitecturees, we formate SSREas a fallarcal cluffisation task and proposal a rome herearchitecturecal cluffisation frame, that extract the ratio in a top-down method. CURRENTCURRENT 2) top-down Gebudhakan neng dataset NYT sing bisalahan nganggep dianggap dhéwé ngerasahan kanggo kalungsing langgar tarjamah-kalungsing maneh, supoyo kanggo ngilanggar langgar sampek bantuan.', 'bo': 'Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DSRE) has proven to be effective to find relational facts from texts, but it still suffers from two main problems: the wrong labeling problem and the long-tail problem. གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་དག་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་མིན་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་མཐུན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་དགོས། To leverage the informative relation hierarchies, we formulate DSRE as a hierarchical classification task and propose a novel hierarchical classification framework, which extracts the relation in a top-down manner. In particular, in our proposed framework, 1) we use a hierarchically-refined representation method to achieve hierarchy-specific representation; and 2) ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཞིག་ལག་སྟར་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིང་། NYT གནད་སྡུད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཞན་ཡང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་རིག'}
{'en': 'Combining Event Semantics and Degree Semantics for Natural Language Inference', 'ar': 'الجمع بين دلالات الأحداث ودلالات الدرجة لاستدلال اللغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'Combinando semântica de evento e semântica de grau para inferência de linguagem natural', 'es': 'Combinar semántica de eventos y semántica de grado para la inferencia del lenguaje', 'fr': "Combiner la sémantique des événements et la sémantique des degrés pour l'inférence en langage naturel", 'ja': '自然言語推論のための事象意味論と学位意味論の組み合わせ', 'zh': '合事语义度语义自然语言推理', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान के लिए घटना शब्दार्थ और डिग्री शब्दार्थ का संयोजन', 'ru': 'Объединение семантики событий и семантики степеней для вывода естественного языка', 'ga': 'Séimeantaic Imeachtaí agus Séimeantaic Chéim a Chomhcheangal le Tátail Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'მოვლენების სენმანტიკის და სენმანტიკის შეერთება', 'hu': 'Eseményszemantika és fokozatszemantika kombinációja a természetes nyelvi inferenciához', 'el': 'Συνδυασμός Σημαντικών Εκδηλώσεων και Σημαντικών Βαθμών για Συμπέρασμα Φυσικής Γλώσσας', 'it': "Combinare la semantica degli eventi e la semantica dei gradi per l'inferenza del linguaggio naturale", 'kk': 'Оқиғаларды біріктіру семантикалық және негізгі тілдердің шемантикалығы', 'lt': 'Combining Event Semantics and Degree Semantics for Natural Language Inference', 'mk': 'Комбинирана семантика на настаните и семантика на степени за природна инференција на јазик', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള സെമാന്റിക്സും ഡിഗ്രി സെമാന്റിക്സുകളും സങ്കല്\u200dപിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Kombinazzjoni ta’ Semanti ta’ Avvenimenti u Semanti ta’ Grad għal Inferenza Lingwistika Naturali', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл нөлөөлдөг үйл явдал Semantics, Grade Semantics for Natural Language Inference холбоотой', 'no': 'Kombinerer semantikk og gradsemiantikk for naturspråk', 'pl': 'Łączenie semantyki zdarzeń i semantyki stopnia dla wniosku języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Combinarea Semanticei Evenimentelor și Semanticei de Grad pentru Inferența Limbajului Natural', 'sr': 'Kombinacija semantika događaja i semantika u gradu prirodnog jezika', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව අවස්ථාව සමාන්තික සහ ඩිග්\u200dරි සෙමාන්ටික්ස්', 'sv': 'Kombinera händelsesemantik och examenssemantik för naturligt språk inferens', 'so': 'Heeganka dhacdooyinka', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி புகுத்தகத்திற்கான நிகழ்வு பெமான்டிக்ஸ் மற்றும் டிகிரி பொருத்தம்', 'ur': 'حادثہ سیمانٹیکس اور درجہ سیمانٹیکس طبیعی زبان کی نسبت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết hợp Đại sứ và Đại học Semantics cho Liên Xô ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'bg': 'Комбиниране на семантиката на събитията и степента семантика за естествено езиково заключение', 'nl': 'Het combineren van Event Semantics en Degree Semantics voor Natural Language Inference', 'da': 'Kombination af begivenhedssemantik og grad semantik for naturligt sprog inferens', 'hr': 'Kombinacija semantika događaja i semantika grada prirodnog jezika', 'de': 'Kombination von Ereignissemantik und Degree Semantik für natürliche Sprachfolge', 'id': 'Combining Event Semantics and Degree Semantics for Natural Language Inference', 'ko': '사건의 의미와 도의 의미를 결합하여 자연 언어 추리를 진행하다', 'fa': 'ترکیب اتفاق سیمانتیک و درجه سیمانتیک برای تفاوت زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Semantics na Semantics za Siasa kwa Kuzuia Lugha ya asili', 'af': 'Kombineer Gebeurtenis Semantieke en Grade Semantieke vir Natuurlike Taal Inferensie', 'tr': 'Vaqialar', 'sq': 'Përzjerja e Semantikave të ngjarjeve dhe Semantikave të shkallëve për Inferencën e Gjuhave Natyrore', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսիայի համար', 'az': 'T톛bi톛tli dil m칲qabiliyy톛ti 칲칞칲n olaraq Semantik v톛 Degree Semantik', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রতিরোধের জন্য অনুষ্ঠান সেমান্টিক এবং ডিগ্রি সেমান্টিক্স', 'bs': 'Kombinacija semantika događaja i semantika grada prirodnog jezika', 'cs': 'Kombinace sémantiky událostí a stupně sémantiky pro inferenci přirozeného jazyka', 'ca': 'Combinant Event Semantics and Degree Semantics for Natural Language Inference', 'et': 'Sündmuste semantika ja kraadi semantika kombineerimine loodusliku keele järelduseks', 'fi': 'Tapahtumasemantiikan ja tutkintosemantiikan yhdistäminen luonnollisen kielen päättelyyn', 'jv': 'Kombiner events semanti karo DeGrad semanti kanggo kelas Buka Teratan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Združevanje semantike dogodkov in semantike stopenj za sklepanje naravnega jezika', 'he': 'שילוב סמנטיות אירועים וסמנטיות מדרגות לשפה טבעית', 'bo': 'Combining Event Semantics and Degree Semantics for Natural Language Inference'}
{'en': 'In formal semantics, there are two well-developed semantic frameworks : event semantics, which treats verbs and adverbial modifiers using the notion of event, and degree semantics, which analyzes adjectives and comparatives using the notion of degree. However, it is not obvious whether these frameworks can be combined to handle cases in which the phenomena in question are interacting with each other. Here, we study this issue by focusing on natural language inference (NLI). We implement a logic-based NLI system that combines event semantics and degree semantics and their interaction with lexical knowledge. We evaluate the system on various NLI datasets containing linguistically challenging problems. The results show that the system achieves high accuracies on these datasets in comparison with previous logic-based systems and deep-learning-based systems. This suggests that the two semantic frameworks can be combined consistently to handle various combinations of linguistic phenomena without compromising the advantage of either framework.', 'ar': 'في علم الدلالة الرسمي ، هناك إطاران دلاليان متطوران جيدًا: دلالات الأحداث ، التي تعالج الأفعال ومعدلات الظرف باستخدام مفهوم الحدث ، ودلالات الدرجات ، التي تحلل الصفات والمقارنات باستخدام مفهوم الدرجة. ومع ذلك ، ليس من الواضح ما إذا كان يمكن دمج هذه الأطر للتعامل مع الحالات التي تتفاعل فيها الظواهر المعنية مع بعضها البعض. هنا ، ندرس هذه المشكلة من خلال التركيز على الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي (NLI). نحن ننفذ نظام NLI القائم على المنطق الذي يجمع بين دلالات الأحداث ودلالات الدرجات وتفاعلها مع المعرفة المعجمية. نقوم بتقييم النظام على مجموعات بيانات NLI المختلفة التي تحتوي على مشاكل لغوية صعبة. أظهرت النتائج أن النظام يحقق دقة عالية في مجموعات البيانات هذه مقارنةً بالأنظمة المنطقية السابقة والأنظمة القائمة على التعلم العميق. يشير هذا إلى أنه يمكن الجمع بين الإطارين الدلاليين بشكل ثابت للتعامل مع مجموعات مختلفة من الظواهر اللغوية دون المساس بميزة أي من الإطارين.', 'fr': "En sémantique formelle, il existe deux cadres sémantiques bien développés\xa0: la sémantique des événements, qui traite les verbes et les modificateurs adverbiaux en utilisant la notion d'événement, et la sémantique des degrés, qui analyse les adjectifs et les comparatifs en utilisant la notion de degré. Cependant, il n'est pas évident que ces cadres puissent être combinés pour gérer les cas dans lesquels les phénomènes en question interagissent entre eux. Nous étudions ici cette question en nous concentrant sur l'inférence du langage naturel (NLI). Nous mettons en œuvre un système NLI basé sur la logique qui combine la sémantique des événements et la sémantique des degrés et leur interaction avec les connaissances lexicales. Nous évaluons le système sur divers ensembles de données NLI contenant des problèmes linguistiques complexes. Les résultats montrent que le système atteint une grande précision sur ces ensembles de données par rapport aux systèmes basés sur la logique et aux systèmes basés sur l'apprentissage profond antérieurs. Cela suggère que les deux cadres sémantiques peuvent être combinés de manière cohérente pour gérer diverses combinaisons de phénomènes linguistiques sans compromettre l'avantage de l'un ou l'autre cadre.", 'es': 'En la semántica formal, hay dos marcos semánticos bien desarrollados: la semántica de eventos, que trata los verbos y los modificadores adverbiales utilizando la noción de evento, y la semántica de grados, que analiza los adjetivos y los comparativos utilizando la noción de grado. Sin embargo, no es obvio si estos marcos se pueden combinar para tratar casos en los que los fenómenos en cuestión interactúan entre sí. Aquí, estudiamos este tema centrándonos en la inferencia del lenguaje natural (NLI). Implementamos un sistema NLI basado en la lógica que combina la semántica de eventos y la semántica de los grados y su interacción con el conocimiento léxico. Evaluamos el sistema en varios conjuntos de datos de NLI que contienen problemas lingüísticos desafiantes. Los resultados muestran que el sistema logra una alta precisión en estos conjuntos de datos en comparación con los sistemas anteriores basados en la lógica y los sistemas basados en el aprendizaje profundo. Esto sugiere que los dos marcos semánticos se pueden combinar de manera consistente para manejar varias combinaciones de fenómenos lingüísticos sin comprometer la ventaja de ninguno de los marcos.', 'pt': 'Na semântica formal, existem duas estruturas semânticas bem desenvolvidas: semântica de evento, que trata verbos e modificadores adverbiais usando a noção de evento, e semântica de grau, que analisa adjetivos e comparativos usando a noção de grau. No entanto, não é óbvio se essas estruturas podem ser combinadas para lidar com casos em que os fenômenos em questão estão interagindo entre si. Aqui, estudamos essa questão focando na inferência de linguagem natural (NLI). Implementamos um sistema NLI baseado em lógica que combina semântica de evento e semântica de grau e sua interação com o conhecimento lexical. Avaliamos o sistema em vários conjuntos de dados NLI contendo problemas linguisticamente desafiadores. Os resultados mostram que o sistema atinge altas precisões nesses conjuntos de dados em comparação com sistemas anteriores baseados em lógica e sistemas baseados em aprendizado profundo. Isso sugere que as duas estruturas semânticas podem ser combinadas consistentemente para lidar com várias combinações de fenômenos linguísticos sem comprometer a vantagem de qualquer estrutura.', 'zh': '文语义学之中,有二善语义框架:事语义学,其事动词副词修饰词,其度语义学,其用度形容词词。 然则框架可以合而治者,未明也。 以此观之,自然语言理(NLI)究之。 吾得逻之NLI统,合事语义度语义与其词汇知相用也。 凡含言挑战性问NLI数集上评估系统。 结果表明者,比于逻辑之统,比于深度之学,当系于此数集上成高精度。 此二语义框架者,可以合之,以治言语,而不伤一框架之势也。', 'ja': '形式的意味論では、よく発達した2つの意味論的枠組みがあります。つまり、事象の概念を使用して動詞と副詞修飾語を扱う事象意味論と、次数の概念を使用して形容詞と比較語を分析する次数意味論です。 しかし、これらの枠組みを組み合わせて、問題の現象が相互作用しているケースを扱うことができるかどうかは明らかではない。 ここでは、自然言語推論（ NLI ）に焦点を当てて、この問題を研究します。 事象セマンティクスと次数セマンティクスを組み合わせた論理ベースのNLIシステムを実装し、それらと語彙知識との相互作用を実装している。 私たちは、言語的に困難な問題を含む様々なNLIデータセット上でシステムを評価します。 結果は、このシステムが以前の論理ベースのシステムとディープラーニングベースのシステムと比較して、これらのデータセットで高い精度を達成していることを示しています。 これは、2つの意味論的枠組みを一貫して組み合わせて、どちらの枠組みの利点も損なうことなく、言語現象のさまざまな組み合わせを扱うことができることを示唆している。', 'hi': 'औपचारिक शब्दार्थ में, दो अच्छी तरह से विकसित शब्दार्थ ढांचे हैं: घटना शब्दार्थ, जो घटना की धारणा का उपयोग करके क्रियाओं और क्रियाविशेषण संशोधकों का इलाज करता है, और डिग्री शब्दार्थ, जो डिग्री की धारणा का उपयोग करके विशेषणों और तुलनात्मक का विश्लेषण करता है। हालांकि, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि इन ढांचे को उन मामलों को संभालने के लिए जोड़ा जा सकता है जिनमें प्रश्न में घटनाएं एक-दूसरे के साथ बातचीत कर रही हैं। यहां, हम प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (एनएलआई) पर ध्यान केंद्रित करके इस मुद्दे का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम एक तर्क-आधारित एनएलआई प्रणाली को लागू करते हैं जो घटना शब्दार्थ और डिग्री शब्दार्थ और लेक्सिकल ज्ञान के साथ उनकी बातचीत को जोड़ती है। हम भाषाई रूप से चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्याओं वाले विभिन्न एनएलआई डेटासेट पर सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि सिस्टम पिछले तर्क-आधारित प्रणालियों और गहरी-सीखने-आधारित प्रणालियों की तुलना में इन डेटासेट पर उच्च सटीकता प्राप्त करता है। इससे पता चलता है कि दो शब्दार्थ ढांचे को किसी भी ढांचे के लाभ से समझौता किए बिना भाषाई घटनाओं के विभिन्न संयोजनों को संभालने के लिए लगातार जोड़ा जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В формальной семантике существует два хорошо разработанных семантических фрейма: семантика событий, которая рассматривает глаголы и наречные модификаторы с использованием понятия события, и семантика степеней, которая анализирует прилагательные и сравнения с использованием понятия степени. Однако неясно, могут ли эти рамки быть объединены для рассмотрения случаев, в которых рассматриваемые явления взаимодействуют друг с другом. Здесь мы изучаем этот вопрос, фокусируясь на естественном языковом выводе (NLI). Мы реализуем логическую систему NLI, которая сочетает семантику событий и семантику степеней и их взаимодействие с лексическими знаниями. Мы оцениваем систему на различных наборах данных NLI, содержащих лингвистически сложные проблемы. Результаты показывают, что система обеспечивает высокую точность этих наборов данных по сравнению с предыдущими системами, основанными на логике, и системами, основанными на глубоком обучении. Это говорит о том, что два семантических фрейма могут быть последовательно объединены для обработки различных комбинаций лингвистических явлений без ущерба для преимуществ обоих фреймворков.', 'ga': 'Sa shéimeantaic fhoirmiúil, tá dhá chreat shéimeantach dea-fhorbartha: séimeantaic imeachtaí, a láimhseálann briathra agus modhnóirí aidiachta trí úsáid a bhaint as coincheap na hócáide, agus séimeantaic céime, a dhéanann anailís ar aidiachtaí agus ar chomparáidí ag baint úsáide as coincheap na céime. Níl sé soiléir, áfach, an féidir na creataí sin a chomhcheangal chun cásanna a láimhseáil ina bhfuil na feiniméin atá i gceist ag idirghníomhú lena chéile. Anseo, déanaimid staidéar ar an gceist seo trí dhíriú ar thátal nádúrtha teanga (NLI). Cuirimid i bhfeidhm córas atá bunaithe ar loighic de chuid LNÉ a chomhcheanglaíonn séimeantaic imeachtaí agus shéimeantaic céime agus a n-idirghníomhaíocht le heolas foclóireachta. Déanaimid measúnú ar an gcóras ar thacair sonraí éagsúla de chuid LNÉ ina bhfuil fadhbanna a bhfuil dúshlán teanga orthu. Léiríonn na torthaí go mbaineann an córas amach cruinnis arda ar na tacair sonraí seo i gcomparáid le córais atá bunaithe ar loighic agus córais dhomhainfhoghlama roimhe seo. Tugann sé seo le tuiscint gur féidir an dá chreat shéimeantach a chomhcheangal go comhsheasmhach chun teaglaim éagsúla d’fheiniméin teanga a láimhseáil gan cur isteach ar bhuntáiste ceachtar den dá chreat.', 'ka': 'ფორმალური სემენტიკში, ორი ძალიან განვითარებული სემენტიკური ფრამები არის: მოვლენების სემენტიკები, რომელიც მოვლენების და აბერბალური შეცვლელების გამოყენება მოვლენების შესახებ და სემენტიკების შესახებ, რომელიც ანალიზება აექ მაგრამ, არ არის წარმოიდგინელი თუ ეს ფრამები შეიძლება კომბინირებულია, რომლებიც კითხვა ფენომენები ერთმანეთისთვის შესახებ. აქ, ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას შევსწავლობთ, რომელიც თავისუფალური ენის ინფრენციაზე (NLI). ჩვენ ლოგიკური NLI-ის სისტემის გამოყენება, რომელიც მოვლენების სიმენტიკის და დროის სიმენტიკის კომბინციაციას და ისინი ინტერქექციას ლექსიკური ცნობილებით ჩვენ სისტემის განსხვავებული NLI მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე გავამუშავებთ, რომელიც ენგლიგურიზომისტურად შესაძლებელი პრობლემები წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ სისტემა ამ მონაცემების კოკრაციაზე უფრო მარტივი მონაცემები მიიღებს წინ ლოგიკური სისტემებით და ძალიან სწავლებული სისტემათან შე ეს იტყვის, რომ ორი სემონტიკური ფემბური შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება კომბინეცირებად განსხვავებული ენგუმისტიკური ფემენის კომბინეციების გამოყენება, რომელიც არ შეიძლება კ', 'el': 'Στην τυπική σημασιολογία, υπάρχουν δύο καλά ανεπτυγμένα σημασιολογικά πλαίσια: σημασιολογία γεγονότων, η οποία αντιμετωπίζει ρήματα και επίθετους τροποποιητές χρησιμοποιώντας την έννοια του γεγονότος, και σημασιολογία βαθμού, η οποία αναλύει επίθετα και συγκριτικά χρησιμοποιώντας την έννοια του βαθμού. Ωστόσο, δεν είναι προφανές αν αυτά τα πλαίσια μπορούν να συνδυαστούν για να χειριστούν περιπτώσεις όπου τα εν λόγω φαινόμενα αλληλεπιδρούν μεταξύ τους. Εδώ, μελετούμε αυτό το ζήτημα εστιάζοντας στην εξαγωγή φυσικών γλωσσών (ΝΛΙ). Εφαρμόζουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στη λογική που συνδυάζει σημασιολογία γεγονότων και βαθμού σημασιολογία και την αλληλεπίδρασή τους με λεξική γνώση. Αξιολογούμε το σύστημα σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων που περιέχουν γλωσσικά προβλήματα. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σύστημα επιτυγχάνει υψηλές ακρίβειες σε αυτά τα σύνολα δεδομένων σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενα συστήματα λογικής και συστήματα βαθιάς μάθησης. Αυτό υποδηλώνει ότι τα δύο σημασιολογικά πλαίσια μπορούν να συνδυαστούν με συνέπεια για να χειριστούν διάφορους συνδυασμούς γλωσσικών φαινομένων χωρίς να διακυβεύονται το πλεονέκτημα των δύο πλαισίων.', 'hu': 'A formális szemantikában két jól kidolgozott szemantikai keretrendszer létezik: az eseménysemantika, amely az igéket és a adverbiális módosítókat az esemény fogalmával kezeli, és a fokszemetika, amely a mellékneveket és összehasonlítókat a fokozat fogalmával elemzi. Nem nyilvánvaló azonban, hogy ezek a keretek kombinálhatók-e olyan esetek kezelésére, amikor a szóban forgó jelenségek kölcsönhatásba lépnek egymással. Itt tanulmányozzuk ezt a kérdést a természetes nyelvi következtetésre (NLI) összpontosítva. Logikai alapú NLI rendszert hozunk létre, amely ötvözi az eseményszemantikát és a fokozatszemantikát, valamint ezek interakcióját a lexikai ismeretekkel. A rendszert különböző, nyelvi szempontból kihívást jelentő problémákat tartalmazó NLI adatkészleteken értékeljük. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a rendszer ezeken az adatkészleteken nagy pontosságot ér el a korábbi logikai alapú rendszerekhez és mélytanulási alapú rendszerekhez képest. Ez azt sugallja, hogy a két szemantikai keretrendszer következetesen kombinálható a nyelvi jelenségek különböző kombinációinak kezelésére anélkül, hogy veszélyeztetné bármelyik keretrendszer előnyét.', 'kk': 'Формалдық семантикасында екі жақсы жақсы жасалған семантикалық фреймдер бар: оқиға семантикасы, бұл оқиға жағдай көрінісін қолданатын вербаларды және adverbial өзгертушілерді және градус семантикасын анализира алады. Оқиғаларды оқиға жағдай Бірақ бұл фреймкерлер бір-бірімен қатынас ететін жағдайларды өзгерту үшін біріктіруге болмайды. Мұнда біз бұл мәселеді табиғи тіл инференциясына (NLI) көңіл беріп зерттейміз. Біз логикалық NLI бағдарламасының семантикалық, градус семантикалық және олардың лексикалық білімдермен қатынасын біріктіретін жүйесін іске асырамыз. Біз жүйені лингвистикалық мәселелерді басқа NLI деректер қорларында бағалаймыз. Нәтижелер жүйенің алдыңғы логикалық жүйелерді және түсінікті оқыту жүйелерді салыстырып, бұл деректер жиындарының дұрыстығын жеткізеді. Бұл екі семантикалық фреймдерді біріктіруге болады, бір-бірінші фреймдердің артықшылығын көмектесу үшін, тілдік пайдаланулардың түрлі комбинацияларын басқару үшін.', 'it': "Nella semantica formale, ci sono due framework semantici ben sviluppati: la semantica degli eventi, che tratta verbi e modificatori avverbiali utilizzando la nozione di evento, e la semantica dei gradi, che analizza aggettivi e comparativi utilizzando la nozione di grado. Tuttavia, non è chiaro se questi quadri possano essere combinati per gestire casi in cui i fenomeni in questione interagiscono tra loro. Qui, studiamo questo problema concentrandoci sull'inferenza del linguaggio naturale (NLI). Implementiamo un sistema NLI basato sulla logica che combina semantica degli eventi e semantica dei gradi e la loro interazione con la conoscenza lessicale. Valutiamo il sistema su vari set di dati NLI contenenti problemi linguisticamente impegnativi. I risultati mostrano che il sistema raggiunge elevate accuratezza su questi set di dati rispetto ai precedenti sistemi basati su logica e sistemi basati su deep learning. Ciò suggerisce che i due framework semantici possono essere combinati in modo coerente per gestire varie combinazioni di fenomeni linguistici senza compromettere il vantaggio di entrambi i framework.", 'mk': 'Во формалната семантика, постојат два добро развиени семантични рамки: семантика на настаните, која ги третира стапките и непријателските модификатори користејќи ја идејата на настан, и семантика на степени, која ги анализира адективите и споредбите користејќи ја идејата на степен. Сепак, не е очигледно дали овие рамки може да се комбинираат за да се справат со случаите во кои предметните феномени се взаемнуваат меѓусебно. Овде го проучуваме ова прашање со фокусирање на природната инференција на јазикот (НЛИ). Ние имплементираме логичен систем на НЛИ кој ја комбинира семантиката на настаните и семантиката на дипломите и нивната интеракција со лексичко знаење. Го проценуваме системот на различни податоци на НЛИ кои содржат јазички предизвикувачки проблеми. The results show that the system achieves high accuracies on these datasets in comparison with previous logic-based systems and deep-learning-based systems.  Ова укажува на тоа дека двете семантични рамки може да се комбинираат константно за да се справат со различни комбинации на јазички феномени без да ја компромитираат предноста на двете рамки.', 'lt': 'Oficialioje semantikoje yra dvi gerai išsivysčiusios semantikos sistemos: renginių semantikos, kuri apdoroja žodžius ir priešiškus modifikatorius naudojant renginio sąvoką, ir laipsnio semantikos, kuri analizuoja priedus ir lyginamuosius naudojant laipsnio sąvoką. Vis dėlto neaišku, ar šios sistemos gali būti derinamos siekiant spręsti atvejus, kai aptariami reiškiniai tarpusavyje sąveikauja. Čia mes nagrinėjame šį klausimą daugiausia dėmesio skiriant gamtinei kalbų išvadai (NLI). Įgyvendiname logiškai pagrįstą NLI sistemą, kuri derina renginių semantiką ir laipsnio semantiką bei jų sąveiką su leksinėmis žiniomis. Vertiname įvairių NLI duomenų rinkinių, kuriuose yra kalbų problemų, sistemą. Iš rezultatų matyti, kad sistema, palyginti su ankstesnėmis logiškai pagrįstomis sistemomis ir giliavandenio mokymosi sistemomis, užtikrina aukštą šių duomenų rinkinių tikslumą. Tai rodo, kad dvi semantines sistemas galima nuosekliai derinti įvairiems kalbinių reiškinių deriniams spręsti nekeliant pavojaus abiejų sistemų pranašumui.', 'ms': 'Dalam semantik formal, terdapat dua bingkai semantik yang berkembang dengan baik: semantik peristiwa, yang melayan verb dan pengubahsuai adverbial menggunakan gagasan peristiwa, dan semantik darjah, yang menganalisis adjektif dan perbandingan menggunakan gagasan darjah. Namun, tidak jelas sama ada bingkai-bingkai ini boleh digabung untuk mengendalikan kes-kes di mana fenomena tersebut berinteraksi antara satu sama lain. Di sini, kita mempelajari isu ini dengan fokus pada kesimpulan bahasa semulajadi (NLI). Kami melaksanakan sistem NLI berdasarkan logik yang menggabungkan semantik peristiwa dan semantik darjah dan interaksi mereka dengan pengetahuan lexik. Kami menilai sistem pada pelbagai set data NLI yang mengandungi masalah yang mencabar secara bahasa. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa sistem mencapai ketepatan tinggi pada set data ini dibandingkan dengan sistem berdasarkan logik terdahulu dan sistem berdasarkan belajar dalam. Ini menunjukkan bahawa dua bingkai semantik boleh digabung secara konsisten untuk mengendalikan berbagai kombinasi fenomena bahasa tanpa membahayakan keuntungan kedua-dua bingkai.', 'mt': 'F’semantika formali, hemm żewġ oqfsa semantiċi żviluppati sew: semantika ta’ avvenimenti, li tittratta verbs u modifikaturi avverbiali bl-użu tal-kunċett ta’ avveniment, u semantika ta’ grad, li tanalizza aġġettivi u komparattivi bl-użu tal-kunċett ta’ grad. Madankollu, mhuwiex ovvju jekk dawn l-oqfsa jistgħux jiġu kkombinati biex jittrattaw każijiet fejn il-fenomeni inkwistjoni qed jinteraġixxu ma’ xulxin. Hawnhekk, nistudjaw din il-kwistjoni billi niffokaw fuq l-inferenza lingwistika naturali (NLI). Aħna nimplimentaw sistema NLI bbażata fuq il-loġika li tgħaqqad is-semantika tal-avvenimenti u s-semantika tal-grad u l-interazzjoni tagħhom mal-għarfien lexiku. Aħna jevalwaw is-sistema fuq settijiet ta’ dejta differenti tal-NLI li fihom problemi lingwistiċi ta’ sfida. Ir-riżultati juru li s-sistema tikseb preċiżjonijiet għoljin fuq dawn is-settijiet ta’ dejta meta mqabbla ma’ sistemi preċedenti bbażati fuq loġika u sistemi bbażati fuq tagħlim profond. Dan jissuġġerixxi li ż-żewġ oqfsa semantiċi jistgħu jiġu kkombinati b’mod konsistenti biex jiġu ttrattati diversi kombinazzjonijiet ta’ fenomeni lingwistiċi mingħajr ma jiġi kompromess il-vantaġġ ta’ kwalunkwe qafas.', 'ml': 'ഫോര്\u200dമാലിക സെമാന്\u200dറിക്സില്\u200d രണ്ട് നല്ല വികസിച്ച സെമാന്\u200dറിക് ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്: സെമാന്\u200dറിക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്കുകള്\u200d, സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ ആശയം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വാര്\u200dവര എന്നാലും ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന കേസുകള്\u200d സാധിക്കുമോ എന്നത് വ്യക്തമാകുന്നില്ല, ചോദ്യ ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നം പഠിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലെ അപകടത്തിന് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നതാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d ലോഗിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു NLI സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് സെമാന്റിക്സും ഡിഗ്രി സെമാന്റിക്കും അവര ഭാഷക്കാരില്\u200d വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്ക ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് മുമ്പുള്ള ലോഗിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിസ്റ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും താ ഈ രണ്ടു സെമാന്റിക് ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d', 'no': 'I formelt semantikk er det to godt utvikla semantiske rammeverk: hendingsssemantikk, som behandler verbar og adverbiale endringar ved hjelp av hendinga og gradsssemantikk, som analyserer adjektiv og sammenligningar ved hjelp av graden. Det er imidlertid ikkje åpenbart om desse rammenene kan kombinererast for å handtera tilfellene der det spørsmålet gjer saman med kvarandre. Her studerer vi dette problemet ved å fokusera på naturspråk-infeksjon (NLI). Vi implementerer ein logisk basert NLI-system som kombinerer hendingsssemantikk og gradsssemantikk og deres samsvar med leksisk kunnskap. Vi evaluerer systemet på ulike NLI- datasett som inneheld språk vanskeleg problemer. Resultatet viser at systemet oppnår høg nøyaktighet på desse dataseta i sammenligning med førre logikkbaserte systemar og dype læringsbaserte systemar. Dette tyder på at dei to semantiske rammeverka kan kombinasjonast for å handtera ulike kombinasjonar av språkstiske fenomenar utan å kompromisa fordel av kvar rammeverk.', 'pl': 'W semantyce formalnej istnieją dwa dobrze rozwinięte ramy semantyczne: semantyka zdarzeń, która traktuje czasowniki i modyfikatory przysłówkowe przy użyciu pojęcia zdarzenia, oraz semantyka stopnia, która analizuje przymiotniki i porównawcze przy użyciu pojęcia stopnia. Nie jest jednak oczywiste, czy te ramy można łączyć w celu obsługi przypadków, w których dane zjawiska oddziałują ze sobą. Tutaj badamy tę kwestię skupiając się na wnioskach języka naturalnego (NLI). Wdrażamy oparty na logice system NLI, który łączy semantykę zdarzeń i semantykę stopnia oraz ich interakcję z wiedzą leksykalną. Oceniamy system na różnych zbiorach danych NLI zawierających problemy językowo trudne. Wyniki pokazują, że system osiąga wysoką dokładność na tych zbiorach danych w porównaniu z poprzednimi systemami opartymi na logice i systemami opartymi na głębokim uczeniu. Sugeruje to, że dwa ramy semantyczne mogą być łączone konsekwentnie, aby obsługiwać różne kombinacje zjawisk językowych bez naruszania zalet obu ram.', 'mn': 'Оримтлаг хэмжээнд хоёр сайн хөгжсөн семантик хэлбэрүүд байдаг: үйл явдлын семантик, энэ нь үйл явдлын ойлголтыг ашиглан үг болон адал явдлын өөрчлөгчдийг эмчилдэг. Энэ нь эмчилгээ болон харьцуулалтыг шинжилдэг. Гэхдээ эдгээр хэмжээсүүд хоорондоо харилцаж байгаа тохиолдолд холбогдож болох эсэхийг тодорхой биш. Энд бид энэ асуудлыг байгалийн хэл халдвар (NLI) дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа судалж байна. Бид логикийн үндсэн NLI системийг хэрэгжүүлж, үйл явдлын semantics, градус semantics болон лексикийн мэдлэгтэй харилцаа холбоотой. Бид хэл хэлний хэцүү асуудлуудтай олон NLI өгөгдлийн сангийн системийг үнэлэх болно. Үүний үр дүнд систем эдгээр өгөгдлийн сан дээр өндөр тодорхойлолт гарч ирнэ. Өмнөх логикийн үндсэн системтэй харьцуулахад, гүн гүнзгий суралцах системтэй харьцуулж байна. Энэ нь хоёр семантик хэмжээсүүд нь хэлний үзэгдлийн өөр нэгдлийг зохицуулахын тулд хоорондоо холбогдож болно.', 'ro': 'În semantica formală, există două cadre semantice bine dezvoltate: semantica evenimentului, care tratează verbele și modificatorii adverbiali folosind noțiunea de eveniment, și semantica gradului, care analizează adjective și comparative folosind noțiunea de grad. Cu toate acestea, nu este evident dacă aceste cadre pot fi combinate pentru a gestiona cazurile în care fenomenele în cauză interacționează între ele. Aici, studiem această problemă concentrându-ne pe inferența limbajului natural (NLI). Implementăm un sistem NLI bazat pe logică care combină semantica evenimentelor și semantica gradelor și interacțiunea lor cu cunoștințele lexicale. Evaluăm sistemul pe diferite seturi de date NLI care conțin probleme dificile lingvistice. Rezultatele arată că sistemul atinge o precizie ridicată asupra acestor seturi de date în comparație cu sistemele logice anterioare și sistemele bazate pe învățare profundă. Acest lucru sugerează că cele două cadre semantice pot fi combinate în mod constant pentru a gestiona diferite combinații de fenomene lingvistice fără a compromite avantajul oricărui cadru.', 'sr': 'U formalnoj semantici postoje dve dobro razvijene semantičke okvire: semantike događaja, koji tretiraju verbe i reklamske modifikatore koristeći pojam događaja i semantike stupnjeva, koji analiziraju adjektive i komparacije koristeći pojam stupnjeva. Međutim, nije oèigledno da li se ove okvire mogu kombinirati da se bave sluèajevima u kojima se pitani fenomeni međusobno mijenjaju. Ovde proučavamo ovaj problem fokusiranjem na prirodnu infekciju jezika (NLI). Mi implementiramo logički sistem NLI-a koji kombinira semantiku događaja i semantiku stupnja i njihovu interakciju sa leksičkim znanjem. Procjenjujemo sistem na raznim NLI podacima koji sadrže jezički izazovne probleme. Rezultati pokazuju da sistem postiže visoke tačnosti na ovim podacima u usporedbi sa prethodnim sistemima na logici i sistemima na dubokom učenju. To ukazuje da se dve semantičke okvire mogu kombinirati u konsekvenciji kako bi se rješavali različite kombinacije jezičkih fenomena bez ugrožavanja prednosti bilo kojeg okvira.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සෙමාන්ටික්ස් වලින්, හොඳ විකෘත සෙමාන්ටික් වර්ක දෙකක් තියෙනවා: සෙමාන්ටික්ස් වලින්, ඒ වර්ක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරකෘතික වෙනස් කරනවා සෙමාන්ටික්ස් ව ඒත් ඒක පැහැදිලි නැහැ මේ ප්\u200dරකාරයෝ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න කියලා. මෙන්න, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව අනුප්\u200dරශ්නය (NLI) වලින්. අපි ලෝකික අධික NLI පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සෙමැන්ටික් සහ ඩිග්\u200dරි සෙමැන්ටික් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන අපි භාෂාවික විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන විදිහට NLI දත්ත සෙට් වල පද්ධතිය ගැන අවශ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ පද්ධතියේ මේ දත්ත සේට් එක්ක මුලින් ලොකු සැකසුම් සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරත මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ', 'sv': 'Inom formell semantik finns det två välutvecklade semantiska ramverk: händelsesemantik, som behandlar verb och adverbiala modifierare med hjälp av begreppet händelse, och gradsemantik, som analyserar adjektiv och jämförelser med hjälp av begreppet grad. Det är dock inte uppenbart om dessa ramar kan kombineras för att hantera fall där företeelserna i fråga interagerar med varandra. Här studerar vi denna fråga genom att fokusera på naturlig språkinferens (NLI). Vi implementerar ett logikbaserat NLI-system som kombinerar händelsesemantik och examenssemantik och deras interaktion med lexikal kunskap. Vi utvärderar systemet på olika NLI-dataset som innehåller språkligt utmanande problem. Resultaten visar att systemet uppnår hög noggrannhet på dessa datauppsättningar jämfört med tidigare logikbaserade system och djupinlärningsbaserade system. Detta tyder på att de två semantiska ramverken konsekvent kan kombineras för att hantera olika kombinationer av språkliga fenomen utan att kompromissa med fördelen med någon av ramverken.', 'so': "Seantika rasmiga ah waxaa ku yaala laba firaaqadood oo si fiican u horumariyay: dhacdooyinka semantika, taas oo u daabajiya fikrada warqada iyo bedbeddelka arimaha ganacsiga ah isticmaalaya fikrada dhacdooyinka, iyo shahaadada cilmiga, kaas oo analisaa isbedelka iyo isbardhigyada isticmaalaya fikrada shahaadada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ma ahan inay isku darsami karto xaaladaha ay arrimaha la xiriira isula xiriira. Halkan, waxan waxaynu ku baranaynaa dhibaatada afka dabiicadda ah (NLI). Waxaan sameeynaa nidaamka NLI ee ku saleysan jimicsiga, kaasoo isku daryeela dhacdooyinka semantika iyo shahaadada semantika iyo xiriirkooda aqoonta lexicka. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa nidaamka ku saabsan danbiyada NLI oo ku jira dhibaatooyin afka ku saabsan. Abaalku waxay muuqataa in nidaamka aad u fududaato saxdaas oo ku qoran nidaamka hore ee jimicsiga iyo nidaamka waxbarashada mool-hoose. Taas waxaa loola jeedaa in labada frameaq oo semantika ah la wada ururi karo si ay u xambaaraan isku xiriir luqad ah oo kala duduwan, iyadoon sameyn faa'iidada labada frameaq.", 'ta': 'வடிவமைப்பு அமைப்புகளில் இரண்டு நன்றாக உருவாக்கப்பட்ட semantic சட்டங்கள் உள்ளன: நிகழ்வு பெமான்டிக்ஸ், அது வார்ப்புகள் மற்றும் அறிவிப்பு மாற்றிகளை பயன்படுத்தி செயல்படுத்தும், மற ஆனால், இந்த சட்டங்களை ஒன்றாக சேர்க்க முடியுமா என்பது தெளிவாக இல்லை கேள்வி கேட்கையில் இருக்கும் நிகழ்வுகள் ஒருவருடன்  Here, we study this issue by focusing on natural language inference (NLI).  நாம் நிகழ்வு பெமாண்டிக் மற்றும் டிகிரி பெமாண்டிக்கும் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய இணைப்பு லெக்சிக்கல் அறிவுடன் இணைக்கும @ info முடிவு இந்த இரண்டு பெமான்டிக் சட்டங்களை சேர்க்க முடியும் என்று தெரிவிக்கிறது எந்த சட்டத்தின் விருப்பங்களையும் குறைவு செய்யாமல் ம', 'ur': 'رسمی سیمانٹیکس میں دو بہت اچھی طرح تغییر کیے جاتے ہیں: حادثہ سیمانٹیکس، جو حادثہ کے مطابق فیصلہ کے مطابق فیصلہ کرتا ہے، اور درجہ سیمانٹیکس کے مطابق فیصلہ کے مطابق فیصلہ کرتا ہے، جو درجہ کے مطابق فیصلہ کے مطابق اضافہ اور مقایسہ کے مطابق تح However, it is not clear whether these frameworks can be combined to handle cases in which the phenomena are interacting with each other. یہاں، ہم اس مسئلہ کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں، طبیعی زبان کے مطابق (NLI) مطابق۔ ہم ایک لوجیک بنیادی NLI سیسٹم کو عملکرد کرتے ہیں جو حادثہ سیمانٹیکس اور درجہ سیمانٹیکس اور ان کی تعامل لکسیکی علم سے ملتی ہے۔ ہم نے سیسٹم کو مختلف NLI ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطالبہ کرلیا ہے جو زبان میں مشکلات مشکل ہیں۔ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ سیسٹم ان ڈیٹسٹوں پر بالا دقیق پہنچتا ہے جو پہلے لوجیک بنیادی سیسٹم اور عمیق سیکھنے کی بنیادی سیسٹم کے مقابلہ میں۔ یہ معلوم کرتا ہے کہ دونوں سیمنٹی فرمورک ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ ملے جائیں کہ زبان کی مختلف اتفاقات کی مختلف اتفاقات کو تحمل کرنے کے لئے بغیر کسی فرمورک کے فائدہ کا تخفیف نہ کریں.', 'uz': "Shaxsiy semantika bilan ikkita yaxshi tuzuvlangan semantik freymlari bor: hodisa semantika, shu holatning fikrlarini foydalanishida ishlab chiqarish va erkak o'zgarishlarni boshqaradi, va darajadagi semantika bilan aniqlanadi. Lekin, bu freymlar birga birlashtirilgan holatlarni boshqarishi mumkin emas. Bu yerda, biz bu muammosini o'rganamiz, tabiiy tilni o'rganish uchun. Biz bunday hodisa semantika va degradagi semantika va ularning leksik ta'siri bilan birlashtiradigan NLI tizimini bajaramiz. Biz tillarda murakkab muammolar ichida boshqa NLI maʼlumotlar tarkibida tizimni qiymatimiz. Natijalar shu tizimni oldingi logik- asosiy tizim va deep-o'rganish tizimi bilan birga kamaytirishda, bu maʼlumotlar tizimda juda yaxshi aniqlikni topadi. Bu esa, ikkita semantik freymlarini bir qancha lingvistik munosabatlarini boshqarish uchun birga birlashtirish mumkin, ikkita freymning foydalanishini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong ngữ pháp cơ chính thức, có hai nền ngữ pháp được phát triển rộng: ngữ pháp các sự kiện, mà dùng khái niệm về sự kiện, và các thuật ngữ học, phân tích tính từ và tính tương đối dùng khái niệm về độ. Tuy nhiên, không rõ ràng nếu những quy tắc này có thể được kết hợp để giải quyết các trường hợp mà những hiện tượng đang tương tác với nhau. Ở đây, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề này bằng cách tập trung vào ám ảnh ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Chúng tôi tạo ra một hệ thống ngôn ngữ logic kết hợp ngữ pháp sự kiện và ngữ pháp cấp độ và giao tiếp của chúng với kiến thức ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi đánh giá hệ thống của các nhà dữ liệu NLI khác nhau chứa các vấn đề phức tạp. Kết quả cho thấy hệ thống đạt được độ chính xác cao trên các dữ liệu này so với hệ thống logic trước và hệ thống nghiên cứu sâu. Điều này cho thấy hai quy tắc ngữ pháp có thể được kết hợp liên tục để xử lý các tổ hợp của các hiện tượng ngôn ngữ khác nhau mà không ảnh hưởng đến lợi thế của hai bộ khung.', 'da': 'I formel semantik er der to veludviklede semantiske rammer: begivenhedssemantik, der behandler verber og adverbielle modifikatorer ved hjælp af begrebet begivenhed, og gradsemantik, der analyserer adjektiver og sammenligningsmidler ved hjælp af begrebet grad. Det er imidlertid ikke indlysende, om disse rammer kan kombineres til at håndtere tilfælde, hvor de pågældende fænomener interagerer med hinanden. Her studerer vi dette spørgsmål ved at fokusere på naturligt sprog inference (NLI). Vi implementerer et logikbaseret NLI-system, der kombinerer begivenhedssemantik og grad semantik og deres interaktion med leksikisk viden. Vi evaluerer systemet på forskellige NLI datasæt, der indeholder sprogligt udfordrende problemer. Resultaterne viser, at systemet opnår høj nøjagtighed på disse datasæt sammenlignet med tidligere logikbaserede systemer og deep learning-baserede systemer. Dette tyder på, at de to semantiske rammer konsekvent kan kombineres for at håndtere forskellige kombinationer af sproglige fænomener uden at gå på kompromis med fordelen ved begge rammer.', 'hr': 'U formalnoj semantici postoje dva dobro razvijena semantička okvira: semantika događaja, koja liječi verbe i reklamske modifikacije koristeći pojam događaja i semantike stupnja, koja analizira adjektive i usporedbe koristeći pojam stupnja. Međutim, nije očigledno da li se te okvire mogu kombinirati kako bi se riješili slučajevi u kojima se pitani fenomeni međusobno mijenjaju. Ovdje proučavamo ovaj problem fokusiranjem na infekciju prirodnog jezika (NLI). Impliciramo logički sustav NLI-a koji kombinira semantiku događaja i semantiku stupnja i njihovu interakciju s leksičkim znanjem. Procjenjujemo sistem na raznim NLI podacima koji sadrže jezički izazovne probleme. Rezultati pokazuju da sustav postigne visoke preciznosti na ovim podacima u usporedbi s prethodnim sistemima na logici i sustavima na dubokom učenju. To ukazuje na to da se dvije semantičke okvire mogu kombinirati u konsekvenciji kako bi se rješavali različite kombinacije jezičkih fenomena bez ugrožavanja prednosti bilo kojeg okvira.', 'nl': 'In de formele semantiek zijn er twee goed ontwikkelde semantische kaders: gebeurtenissemantiek, die werkwoorden en adverbiale modificatoren behandelt met behulp van het begrip gebeurtenis, en graadsemantiek, die adjectieven en vergelijkingen analyseert met behulp van het begrip graad. Het is echter niet duidelijk of deze kaders gecombineerd kunnen worden om gevallen aan te pakken waarin de verschijnselen in kwestie met elkaar in wisselwerking staan. Hier bestuderen we dit vraagstuk door ons te richten op natuurlijke taalinferentie (NLI). We implementeren een op logica gebaseerd NLI-systeem dat gebeurtenissemantiek en graadsemantiek combineert en hun interactie met lexicale kennis. We evalueren het systeem op verschillende NLI datasets met taalkundig uitdagende problemen. De resultaten tonen aan dat het systeem hoge nauwkeurigheiden bereikt op deze datasets in vergelijking met eerdere logica-gebaseerde systemen en deep-learning-gebaseerde systemen. Dit suggereert dat de twee semantische kaders consistent kunnen worden gecombineerd om verschillende combinaties van linguïstische fenomenen aan te pakken zonder afbreuk te doen aan het voordeel van beide kaders.', 'bg': 'Във формалната семантика има две добре развити семантични рамки: семантика на събитията, която третира глаголите и adverbиалните модификатори, използвайки понятието за събитие, и семантика на степента, която анализира прилагателните и сравнителните, използвайки понятието за степен. Не е очевидно обаче дали тези рамки могат да бъдат комбинирани, за да се справят с случаи, в които въпросните явления взаимодействат помежду си. Тук изучаваме този въпрос, като се фокусираме върху изводите на естествения език (НЛИ). Ние внедряваме логическа базирана система, която съчетава семантика на събития и степенна семантика и тяхното взаимодействие с лексикалното знание. Ние оценяваме системата на различни НЛИ набори от данни, съдържащи лингвистично предизвикателни проблеми. Резултатите показват, че системата постига висока точност на тези набори от данни в сравнение с предишни логически базирани системи и системи, базирани на дълбоко обучение. Това предполага, че двете семантични рамки могат да бъдат комбинирани последователно, за да се справят с различни комбинации от лингвистични явления, без да се компрометира предимството на двете рамки.', 'ko': '형식어의학에서 두 가지 성숙한 의미 구조가 있는데 그것이 바로 사건어의학이다. 사건어의학은 사건의 개념을 이용하여 동사와 장어 수식어를 처리하고 정도어의학은 정도의 개념을 이용하여 형용사와 비교어를 분석한다.그러나 이런 틀이 관련 현상의 상호작용을 결합하여 처리할 수 있는지의 여부는 뚜렷하지 않다.여기서 우리는 자연언어추리(NLI)에 주목함으로써 이 문제를 연구한다.우리는 논리적인 NLI 시스템을 실현하여 사건의 의미와 정도의 의미, 그리고 그것들과 어휘 지식의 상호작용을 결합시켰다.언어 문제가 포함된 다양한 NLI 데이터 세트에서 시스템을 평가합니다.그 결과 기존의 논리 기반 시스템과 깊이 있는 학습 기반 시스템에 비해 이 시스템은 이러한 데이터 집합에서 비교적 높은 정밀도를 실현했다.이것은 이 두 의미 구조가 일치하게 결합하여 각종 언어 현상의 조합을 처리할 수 있고 그 어떠한 구조의 장점도 손상시키지 않는다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'de': 'In der formalen Semantik gibt es zwei gut entwickelte semantische Rahmenbedingungen: Ereignissemantik, die Verben und adverbiale Modifikatoren unter Verwendung des Begriffs Ereignis behandelt, und Gradsemantik, die Adjektive und Vergleichsstoffe unter Verwendung des Begriffs Grad analysiert. Es ist jedoch nicht offensichtlich, ob diese Frameworks kombiniert werden können, um Fälle zu behandeln, in denen die betreffenden Phänomene miteinander interagieren. Hier untersuchen wir dieses Thema, indem wir uns auf Natural Language Inference (NLI) konzentrieren. Wir implementieren ein logikbasiertes NLI-System, das Ereignissemantik und Gradsemantik und deren Interaktion mit lexikalischem Wissen kombiniert. Wir evaluieren das System anhand verschiedener NLI-Datensätze, die sprachlich anspruchsvolle Probleme enthalten. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das System hohe Genauigkeiten auf diesen Datensätzen im Vergleich zu bisherigen logikbasierten Systemen und Deep-Learning-basierten Systemen erzielt. Dies legt nahe, dass die beiden semantischen Frameworks konsistent kombiniert werden können, um verschiedene Kombinationen sprachlicher Phänomene zu handhaben, ohne den Vorteil eines Frameworks zu beeinträchtigen.', 'id': 'Dalam semantik formal, ada dua bingkai semantik yang sangat dikembangkan: semantik peristiwa, yang memperlakukan verb dan modifier adverbial menggunakan gagasan peristiwa, dan semantik derajat, yang menganalisis adjektif dan comparatif menggunakan gagasan derajat. However, it is not obvious whether these frameworks can be combined to handle cases in which the phenomena in question are interacting with each other.  Di sini, kami mempelajari masalah ini dengan fokus pada kesimpulan bahasa alam (NLI). Kami menerapkan sistem NLI berdasarkan logika yang menggabungkan semantik peristiwa dan semantik derajat dan interaksi mereka dengan pengetahuan lexik. Kami mengevaluasi sistem pada berbagai set data NLI yang mengandung masalah bahasa yang menantang. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa sistem mencapai akurasi tinggi pada set data ini dibandingkan dengan sistem berdasarkan logika sebelumnya dan sistem berdasarkan belajar dalam. Ini menunjukkan bahwa dua bingkai semantis dapat digabung secara konsisten untuk menangani berbagai kombinasi fenomena bahasa tanpa merusak keuntungan dari kedua bingkai.', 'fa': 'در سیمانتیک رسمی، دو فرم\u200cهای سیمانتیک خوب توسعه داده شده وجود دارد: سیمانتیک\u200cهای رویداد، که با استفاده از نظر رویداد و تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cهای تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cها با استفاده از نظر رویداد و سیمانتیک درجه تحلیل می\u200cکند که با استفاده از نظر درجه تفاوت\u200cکننده\u200cها و مقایسه\u200cها تحلیل ولی مشخص نیست که آیا این فرم\u200cها می\u200cتوانند برای رسیدن پرونده\u200cهایی که در آن رویداد\u200cهای سوال با یکدیگر تعامل می\u200cکنند ترکیب می\u200cشوند. ما این مسئله را با تمرکز روی آلودگی زبان طبیعی (NLI) مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. ما یک سیستم NLI بنیاد منطقی را اجرای می کنیم که semantics و degrees semantics و تعامل آنها را با دانش زبانی ترکیب می کند. ما سیستم را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای NLI مختلف ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که مشکلات سختی زبان\u200cشناسی دارند. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که سیستم دقیق بالا روی این مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را در مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای منطقی و سیستم\u200cهای عمیق یادگیری می\u200cکنند. این پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که دو فرم\u200cهای semantic می\u200cتوانند به طور مستقل با ترکیب مختلف ترکیب\u200cهای پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بدون توجه به سود هر فرم\u200cشناسی ترکیب شوند.', 'sw': 'Katika semantika rasmi, kuna miundombi mbili zilizoendelea vizuri: semantika za matukio, ambayo hutumia mabadiliko ya maneno na mabadiliko ya kibiashara kwa kutumia dhana ya tukio, na mifano ya vyeo, ambayo huchambua mabadiliko na wananganisha kwa kutumia dhana ya shahada. Hata hivyo, si wazi kama mifumo hii inaweza kuunganishwa ili kukabiliana na kesi ambapo mambo yanayohusiana na wao. Hapa, tunasoma suala hili kwa lengo la kuangalia maambukizi ya lugha asili (NLI). Tunatekeleza mfumo wa NLI wenye msingi ambao unaunganisha semantics na elimu na mahusiano yao na maarifa ya lexico. Tutathmini mfumo wa taarifa mbalimbali za NLI zinazohusu changamoto za lugha. Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba mfumo unapata ukweli mkubwa wa taarifa hizi ukilinganisha na mifumo ya zamani yenye msingi wa mantiki na mifumo ya kujifunza yenye msingi wa kina. Hii inapendekeza kuwa mifumo miwili ya sekondari inaweza kuunganishwa kwa pamoja ili kukabiliana na miungano mbalimbali ya lugha bila kupunguza faida ya mifumo yoyote.', 'tr': 'Resmi semantik çarçysynda iki gowy gelişmiş semantik çarçysy bar: evet semantik çarçysynda, evet düzgünini we derejesi sebäpli üýtgeçilere gowy barýar we çykyşler derejesini ulanýar. Ýagna görä, bu frameworklaryň özleriniň soraglaryň bir-birine etkileşip ýörän durumlaryny çözmek üçin birleştirilip bilenokdygyny belli däl. Bu meseleyi tebigy dil hasaplamagyna üns berýän. Biz lojik tabanlı NLI sistemini çykarýarys, olar semantik we diplom semantiklerini we olaryň leksik bilgileri bilen birleştirilýän bir sistemi çykarýarys. Biz sistemi dilinde kynçylyk çözgüt meseleleri barlaýan NLI sanlarynda çykýarys. Netijeler sistemiň bu datawatlaryň üstünde ýokary taýýarlandygyny öňki logik daýan sistemlerle we çukur öwrenme sistemleri bilen daýanlaşdyrylýandygyny görkezýär. Bu iki semantik frameworkyň her çerçevesiniň üstüni çykarmadan çykmak üçin birleştirilip biler diýip teklip edýär.', 'sq': 'Në semantikën zyrtare, ka dy kuadri semantikë të zhvilluar mirë: semantikën e ngjarjeve, e cila trajton verbët dhe modifikatorët kundërshtarë duke përdorur konceptin e ngjarjes, dhe semantikën e gradës, e cila analizon shtesë dhe krahasues duke përdorur konceptin e gradës. Megjithatë, nuk është e qartë nëse këto korniza mund të kombinohen për të trajtuar rastet në të cilat fenomenet në diskutim po ndërveprojnë me njëri-tjetrin. Këtu, ne studiojmë këtë çështje duke u përqëndruar në inferencën natyrore të gjuhës (NLI). Ne zbatojmë një sistem NLI bazuar në logjikë që kombinon semantikën e ngjarjeve dhe semantikën e gradës dhe ndërveprimin e tyre me njohurinë lexike. Ne vlerësojmë sistemin në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme NLI që përmbajnë probleme gjuhësore të vështira. Rezultatet tregojnë se sistemi arrin saktësi të larta në këto grupe të dhënash në krahasim me sistemet e mëparshëm bazuar në logjikë dhe sistemet e thella bazuar në mësim. Kjo sugjeron se dy kornizat semantike mund të kombinohen vazhdimisht për të trajtuar kombinime të ndryshme të fenomeneve gjuhësore pa kompromisuar përfitimin e të dy kornizave.', 'am': 'በፎርማሌ ስምናቲክ ውስጥ ሁለት ደግሞው የበለጠ የsemantic ፍሬማሮች አሉ፤ የንግግር እና የንግግር አዋቂዎችን በጥያቄ እና የግንኙነቱን አሳብ በመጠቀም የሚሞክሩ እና የዲጂ አፍሪካ እና አስተያየትን በመጠቀም የሚያስተምሩ አካባቢዎች እና አካባቢዎች ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ ፍሬማዎች እርስ በርሳቸው የሚነጋገሩበትን ጉዳዮች ለመከላከል የሚችሉ መሆኑን አይገልጽም፡፡ ይሄን፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ውሽት (NLI) በመጠንቀቅ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የግንኙነቱን ሰሜንቲካ እና ዲሜኒካን እና ግንኙነታቸውን ከሌክሲካዊ እውቀት ጋር የሚጋጠም የNLI ስርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በቋንቋ ቋንቋ የሚቃወም ጉዳዮች የሆኑትን የNLI ዳታተሮች ስርዓቱን እናስተካክላለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ ስርዓት እነዚህን ዳታተሮች ላይ ከፍተኛ እርግጠኝነት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህ ሁለቱ የsemantic ፍሬማሮች በተጨማሪው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን እና የፍሬም ጥቅም ሳይጎድሉ ይታሰቃሉ፡፡', 'af': "In formele semantieke is daar twee goed ontwikkelde semantiese raamwerke: gebeurtenis semantieke, wat verbe en adverbiale veranderinge behandel met die noesie van gebeurtenis en grade semantieke, wat adjektives en vergelykenisse analyseer deur die noisie van grade te gebruik. Maar dit is nie duidelik of hierdie raamwerke kan gekombineer word om gevalle te hanteer waarin die voorwaarde fenomene met mekaar interaksie is nie. Hier, ons studeer hierdie probleem deur die fokus op natuurlike taal inferensie (NLI). Ons implementeer 'n logiese gebaseerde NLI stelsel wat gebeurtenis semantieke en grade semantieke en hulle interaksie met leksiese kennis kombinieer. Ons evalueer die stelsel op verskillende NLI datastelle wat lingwisiese belangrike probleme bevat. Die resultate vertoon dat die stelsel hoë presies op hierdie datastelle bereik in vergelyking met vorige logiese gebaseerde stelsels en diep-leer-gebaseerde stelsels. Hierdie stel voorstel dat die twee semantiese raamwerke konsistentlik kombinasie kan word om verskillende kombinasies van lingwisiese fenomene te hanteer sonder om die voordeel van enige raamwerk te kompromiseer.", 'hy': "Ֆորմալ սեմանտիկայում կա երկու լավ զարգացած սեմանտիկայի շրջանակներ' իրադարձությունների սեմանտիկայը, որը վերաբերում է բայերին և հակառակ փոփոխիչներին՝ օգտագործելով իրադարձությունների գաղափարը, և աստիճանի սեմանտիկայը, որը վերլուծում է ադրեկտիվ և համեմատական առարկաները՝ օգտագործելով Այնուամենայնիվ, ակնհայտ չէ, թե այս շրջանները կարող են համադրվել այն դեպքերի վերաբերյալ, երբ այս երևույթները փոխազդում են միմյանց հետ: Այստեղ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք այս խնդիրը կենտրոնացնելով բնական լեզվի եզրակացության վրա: Մենք իրականացնում ենք մի տրամաբանական հիմնված ՆԼԻ համակարգ, որը համադրում է իրադարձությունների սեմանտիկա և աստիճանական սեմանտիկա և նրանց փոխազդեցությունը լեքսիկական գիտելիքների հետ: Մենք գնահատում ենք համակարգը տարբեր ՆԼԻ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք պարունակում են լեզվաբանական բարդ խնդիրներ: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ համակարգը հասնում է այս տվյալների համակարգերի մեծ ճշգրտություններին, համեմատած նախորդ տրամաբանական համակարգերի և խորը սովորելու համակարգերի հետ: Սա նշանակում է, որ երկու սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքները կարող են համընդհանուր կերպ համադրվել լեզվաբանական երևույթների տարբեր համադրությունների վերաբերյալ առանց վնասելու երկու կառուցվածքի առավելությունը:", 'bn': 'আনুষ্ঠানিক সেম্যান্টিক্সে দুটি ভালো উন্নত সেমান্টিক ফ্রেম্যাক্টর রয়েছে: অনুষ্ঠানের সেমান্টিক্স, যা অনুষ্ঠানের ধারণা ব্যবহার করে শব্দ এবং বিজ্ঞাপন পরিবর্তনের ব্ তবে এটা পরিষ্কার নয় যে এই ফ্রেম কেসগুলো মামলার জন্য একত্রিত হতে পারে কিনা, যেখানে প্রশ্নের ঘটনা একে অপরের সাথে যোগাযোগ করছে। এখানে আমরা এই বিষয়টি গবেষণা করছি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার আক্রান্ত (এনলি) নিয়ে। আমরা একটি লোগিক ভিত্তিক এনলি সিস্টেম ব্যবস্থা ব্যবস্থা করি যা অনুষ্ঠানের সেম্যান্টিক এবং ডিগ্রি সেম্যান্টিক এবং তা আমরা ভাষার ভাষায় চ্যালেঞ্জের সমস্যা আছে বিভিন্ন এনলিআই ডাটাসেটের ব্যাপারে সিস্টেম মূল্যায়ন করি। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পূর্ববর্তী লজিক ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম এবং গভীর-ভিত্তিক শিক্ষার সিস্টেমের তুলনায় এই তথ্য সেটের উপর বেশি  এটি পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে এই দুটি সেম্যান্টিক ফ্রেম্যাকার্ডগুলো একত্রিত হতে পারে যাতে ভাষাগত বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিভিন্ন সংস্করণের ম', 'ca': "En la semàntica formal hi ha dos marcs semàntics ben desenvolupats: la semàntica d'esdeveniments, que tracta verbs i modificadors adverbials utilitzant la noció d'esdeveniment, i la semàntica de grau, que analitza adjectius i comparadors utilitzant la noció de grau. No obstant això, no és obvi si aquests marcs es poden combinar per a gestionar casos en els quals els fenomens en qüestió interacten entre ells. Aquí estudiem aquest tema centrant-nos en la inferència natural del llenguatge (NLI). Implementam un sistema NLI basat en lògica que combina la semàntica dels events i la semàntica del grau i la seva interacció amb el coneixement lèxic. Evaluam el sistema en diversos conjunts de dades de la NLI que contenen problemes lingüísticament desafiants. Els resultats mostran que el sistema aconsegueix altes precisions en aquests conjunts de dades en comparació amb sistemes lògics anteriors i sistemes d'aprenentatge profund. Això suggereix que els dos marcs semàntics es poden combinar de manera coherent per gestionar diverses combinacions de fenomens lingüístics sense comprometre l'avantatge d'ambdós marcs.", 'cs': 'Ve formální sémantice existují dva dobře vyvinuté sémantické rámce: sémantika událostí, která zachází s slovesami a přídavnými modifikátory pomocí pojmu událost, a sémantika stupně, která analyzuje přídavná a srovnávací jména pomocí pojmu stupně. Není však zřejmé, zda lze tyto rámce kombinovat tak, aby zvládly případy, kdy dané jevy vzájemně interagují. Zde se zaměřujeme na inferenci přirozeného jazyka (NLI). Implementujeme logicky založený NLI systém, který kombinuje sémantiku událostí a stupně sémantiku a jejich interakci s lexikálními znalostmi. Systém hodnotíme na různých NLI datových sadách obsahujících jazykově náročné problémy. Výsledky ukazují, že systém dosahuje vysoké přesnosti na těchto datových sadách ve srovnání s předchozími systémy založenými na logice a systémy založenými na hlubokém učení. To naznačuje, že oba sémantické rámce mohou být důsledně kombinovány tak, aby zvládly různé kombinace jazykových jevů, aniž by byly ohroženy výhody obou rámců.', 'bs': 'U formalnoj semantici postoje dva dobro razvijena semantička okvira: semantika događaja, koja liječi verbe i reklamske modifikatore koristeći pojam događaja i semantike stupnjeva, koja analizira adjektive i komparacije koristeći pojam stupnjeva. Međutim, nije očigledno da li se te okvire mogu kombinirati kako bi se riješili slučajevi u kojima se pitani fenomeni međusobno mijenjaju. Ovdje proučavamo ovaj problem fokusiranjem na infekciju prirodnog jezika (NLI). Mi implementiramo logički sistem NLI koji kombinira semantiku događaja i semantiku stupnja i njihovu interakciju sa leksičkim znanjem. Procjenjujemo sistem na raznim NLI podacima koji sadrže jezički izazovne probleme. Rezultati pokazuju da sistem postigne visoke preciznosti na ovim podacima u usporedbi sa prethodnim sistemima na logici i sistemima na dubokom učenju. To ukazuje na to da se dva semantička okvira mogu kombinirati u konsekvenciji kako bi se rješavali različite kombinacije jezičkih fenomena bez ugrožavanja prednosti bilo kojeg okvira.', 'et': 'Formaalses semantiikas on kaks hästi arenenud semantilist raamistikku: sündmuse semantika, mis käsitleb tegusõnu ja adverbiaalseid modifikaatoreid sündmuse mõiste abil, ja kraadisemantika, mis analüüsib omadussõnu ja võrdlusi kraadi mõiste abil. Siiski ei ole selge, kas neid raamistikke saab kombineerida, et käsitleda juhtumeid, kus kõnealused nähtused omavahel suhtlevad. Siin uurime seda teemat, keskendudes looduskeele järeldusele (NLI). Rakendame loogikapõhist NLI süsteemi, mis ühendab sündmuste semantika ja kraadisemantika ning nende koostoime leksikaalsete teadmistega. Hindame süsteemi erinevate keeleliselt keerulisi probleeme sisaldavate NLI andmekogumite põhjal. Tulemused näitavad, et süsteem saavutab nende andmekogumite suure täpsuse võrreldes varasemate loogikapõhiste süsteemidega ja süvaõppel põhinevate süsteemidega. See näitab, et neid kahte semantilist raamistikku saab ühendada järjepidevalt, et käsitleda erinevaid keeleliste nähtuste kombinatsioone, kahjustamata kummagi raamistiku eelist.', 'az': 'Resmi semantika içində iki yaxşı gelişmiş semantik frameworku var: olaraq semantik, olaraq olaraq fikri və dərəcə semantik vasitəsilə verblər və adverbial modifikatçıları təhsil edir, bu da adjektivləri və komparativləri dəyişdirir. Ancaq bu frameworklərin bir-birinə qarşılaşdığı məsələlər çəkmək üçün birləşdirilməsi mümkün deyil. Burada, biz bu məsələni təbiətli dil infeksiya (NLI) ilə təhsil edirik. Biz lojik-tabanlı NLI sistemini təyin edirik ki, olaraq semantik, dərəcə semantik və laksici bilgi ilə birləşdirir. Biz sistemi dilində çətin problemlər barəsində NLI veri qurularında değerlendiririk. Sonuçlar sistemin əvvəlki logik sistemləri və derin öyrənmə sistemləri ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün bu verilən qurğuların yüksək dəyişikliklərini göstərir. Bu, iki semantik frameworkların hər ikisinin faydasını dəyişmədən, dil fenomenlərin müxtəlif kombinasyonlarını idarə etmək üçün birləşdirilməsini təmin edir.', 'fi': 'Muodollisessa semantiikassa on kaksi hyvin kehittynyttä semanttista viitekehystä: tapahtumasemantiikka, joka käsittelee verbejä ja adverbiaaleja tapahtumakäsitteen avulla, ja asteesemantiikka, joka analysoi adjektiiveja ja vertailukohteita asteen käsitteen avulla. Ei kuitenkaan ole selvää, voidaanko näitä kehyksiä yhdistää käsittelemään tapauksia, joissa kyseiset ilmiöt ovat vuorovaikutuksessa keskenään. Tässä tutkimme tätä kysymystä keskittymällä luonnollisen kielen päättelyyn (NLI). Toteutamme logiikkapohjaisen NLI-järjestelmän, jossa yhdistyvät tapahtumasemantiikka ja tutkintosemantiikka sekä niiden vuorovaikutus sanastotiedon kanssa. Arvioimme järjestelmää erilaisilla kielellisesti haastavia ongelmia sisältävillä NLI-aineistoilla. Tulokset osoittavat, että järjestelmä saavuttaa näissä aineistoissa korkeat tarkkuudet verrattuna aiempiin logiikkapohjaisiin järjestelmiin ja syväoppimiseen perustuviin järjestelmiin. Tämä viittaa siihen, että kaksi semanttista viitekehystä voidaan yhdistää johdonmukaisesti käsittelemään erilaisia kielellisten ilmiöiden yhdistelmiä vaarantamatta kummankin viitekehyksen etua.', 'jv': 'In formal semanti, there are durus gambar kapsul luwih-luwih (semanti) Nanging, ora klok dadi, piye nganggo iso nggambar barang iki dadi bisa digawe iso nguasai percah-percah sing ujaran karo nganggo. Punika, kéné mangkat kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno luwih-luwih (NLI). Awak dhéwé ngeweji sistem NLI sing basa gambar sistem logik lan ijol-ijolan semanti kuwi nggambar semanti karo kelangan seneng kesempatan kanggo kelangan langgar. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem kanggo nggawe dataset NLI sing paling nggawe perkaraan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe Rejaling wong mengko sistem kuwi akeh barang nggawe dataset iki dadi komparasi karo sistem sing basa logik karo sistem sing basa gampang Iki suggeruju kanggo sampeyan iki semanti sing bisa nguasai iki dadi bisa nguasai perusahaan winih kanggo nguasai winih, lan akeh dumadhi iki sampeyan patik dhéwé.', 'ha': "Aka cikin semantiki, akwai firam biyu wanda aka samar da shi mai kyau: semantic na event, wanda ke yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da masu shawara da masu shawarar da masu shawarar da masu shigewa da ke amfani da kalmar ayuka, da daraja na sifantiki, wanda yana anaƙayyade juyi da kafaffiyata da tsohon daraja. Amma, bã ya bayyana idan za'a iya haɗa wannan firam ko da za'a yi amfani da su ga manyan abubuwan da ke tambayar su da jũna. A nan, munã karanta wannan masu al'amarin da Muke yi makini a kan wata ana'anar harshe na natsuwa (NLI). Tuna samar da wani na'urar NLI wanda ke asansa da logiki wanda ke haɗa shirin semantiki da daraja na semantiki da kuma masu shawara da sanin leki. Ana ƙaddara na'urar tsarin NLI da ke ƙunsa da matabbata masu cikin harshen. Mataimakin ya nuna cewa, tsarin na'ura ya sami tsari masu kanana da tsari masu daidaita sami da na'urar da aka riga-bincike na'urar da aka sanar da masu ƙari. This suggests that the two semantic frameworks can be combined consistently to handle various combinations of linguistic phenomena without compromising the advantage of either framework.", 'sk': 'V formalni semantiki obstajata dva dobro razvita semantična okvirja: semantika dogodkov, ki obravnava glagole in adverbialne modifikatorje z uporabo pojma dogodka, in semantika stopenj, ki analizira pridevnike in primerjalne snovi z uporabo pojma stopnje. Vendar ni očitno, ali je mogoče te okvire združiti za obravnavanje primerov, v katerih se zadevni pojavi medsebojno povezujejo. To vprašanje preučujemo s poudarkom na sklepanju naravnega jezika (NLI). Izvajamo logično osnovan sistem NLI, ki združuje dogodkovno semantiko in stopnjsko semantiko ter njihovo interakcijo z leksikalnim znanjem. Sistem ocenjujemo na različnih naborih podatkov NLI, ki vsebujejo jezikovno zahtevne probleme. Rezultati kažejo, da sistem dosega visoko natančnost teh naborov podatkov v primerjavi s prejšnjimi logično osnovanimi sistemi in sistemi globokega učenja. To kaže, da je mogoče obe semantični okviri dosledno kombinirati za obravnavanje različnih kombinacij jezikovnih pojavov brez ogrožanja prednosti obeh okvirov.', 'bo': 'formal semantics ནང་དུ་ནུས་པ་བཟོས་པའི་semantic frameworks་གཉིས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་གཞུང་ཚན་འདི་ཚོ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ན་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་མིན་ཁྱད་པར་མེད། ད་ལྟར། འུ་ཚོས་དོན་དག་གིས་རང་རིས་སྐད་རྙིང་པ་ཚོར་ལྟ་བུ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག Results show that the system achieves high accuracy on these datasets in comparison with previous logic-based systems and deep-learning-based systems. This suggests that the two semantic frameworks can be combined consistently to handle various combinations of linguistic phenomena without compromising the advantage of either framework.', 'he': 'In formal semantics, there are two well-developed semantic frameworks: event semantics, which treats verbs and adverbial modifiers using the notion of event, and degree semantics, which analyzes adjectives and comparatives using the notion of degree.  בכל אופן, לא ברור אם המסגרים האלה יכולים להיות משולבים כדי לטפל במקרים שבהם התופעות המדוברות מתקשרות אחד עם השני. כאן, אנו לומדים את הנושא הזה על ידי להתמקד בהנחה שפה טבעית (NLI). We implement a logic-based NLI system that combines event semantics and degree semantics and their interaction with lexical knowledge.  We evaluate the system on various NLI datasets containing linguistically challenging problems.  התוצאות מראות שהמערכת משיגה מדויקות גבוהות על קבוצות נתונים אלה בהשוואה למערכות בהתבסס הגיונית קודמות ומערכות בהתבסס ללימודים עמוקים. זה מצביע ששני המסגרות הסמנטיות יכולות להיות משולבות באופן קבוע כדי להתמודד עם שילובים שונים של תופעות שפתיות מבלי להפריע ליתרון של שני המסגרות.'}
{'en': 'Detecting de minimis Code-Switching in Historical German Books', 'ar': 'الكشف عن الحد الأدنى من تبديل الشفرات في الكتب التاريخية الألمانية', 'es': 'Detectar el cambio de código de minimis en libros históricos alemanes', 'fr': 'Détection de la commutation de code de minimis dans les livres historiques allemands', 'pt': 'Detectando a comutação de código de minimis em livros históricos alemães', 'ja': '歴史的なドイツの本でのミニミスコード切り替えの検出', 'hi': 'ऐतिहासिक जर्मन पुस्तकों में डी मिनिमम कोड-स्विचिंग का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение минимизации переключения кода в исторических немецких книгах', 'zh': '检德国书之微量代码切换', 'ga': 'Athrú Cóid de minimis a bhrath i Leabhair Stairiúla na Gearmáinise', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση της αλλαγής κώδικα σε ιστορικά γερμανικά βιβλία', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'De minimis kódváltás felismerése történelmi német könyvekben', 'it': 'Rilevamento del cambio di codice de minimis nei libri storici tedeschi', 'lt': 'Detecting de minimis Code-Switching in Historical German Books', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Детектирање на менување на кодови de minimis во историските германски книги', 'ms': 'Detecting de minimis Code-Switching in Historical German Books', 'ml': 'ചരിത്രത്തിലെ ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d ചെറിയ കോഡ്- Switching ഡി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tal-bidla tal-kodiċi de minimis fil-kotba storiċi Ġermaniżi', 'mn': 'Түүхэн Германы ном дээр de minimis Code-Switching нээлттэй', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie przełączania kodów de minimis w historycznych książkach niemieckich', 'ro': 'Detectarea schimbării de coduri de minimis în cărțile istorice germane', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje de minimis šifra zamjene u istorijskim nemačkim knjigama', 'so': 'Findinta de minimis Code-Switching in Historical German Books', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka de minimis kodväxling i historiska tyska böcker', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'வரலாற்று ஜெர்மன் புத்தகங்களில் குறைந்தபட்ச குறியீடு- மாற்றுதலை கண்டுபிடிக்கும்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện Mã chuyển trong sách Đức lịch sử', 'bg': 'Откриване на кодово превключване в исторически немски книги', 'nl': 'Detectie van de minimis Code-switching in historische Duitse boeken', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje de minimis šifra zamjene u istorijskim njemačkim knjigama', 'da': 'Registrering af de minimis kodeskift i historiske tyske bøger', 'de': 'Erkennung von de minimis Code-Switching in historischen deutschen Büchern', 'ko': '독일어 역사 서적의 미량 코드 변환을 검출하다', 'id': 'Mengeteksi Pertukaran Kode de minimis dalam Buku Jerman Sejarah', 'fa': 'در کتابهای آلمانی تاریخی شناسایی de minimis Code-Switching', 'sw': 'Kugundua Code-Switching-Minimum katika Vitabu vya Kihistoria vya Ujerumani', 'tr': 'Taryhy Alman kitaplarda iň kiçi/beýik harplary açylýa', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar shkëmbimin e kodeve de minimis në librat historikë gjermanë', 'am': 'ታሪክ ጀርመን', 'az': 'Tarihi Alman Kitablarında de minimis Kod-Switching keşif edilir', 'hy': 'Գերմանական պատմական գրքերում', 'bn': 'ঐতিহাসিক জার্মানিক বইগুলোতে ডি মিনিমি কোড- পরিবর্তন সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje de minimis Code-switching u istorijskim nemačkim knjigama', 'ca': 'Detectar el canvi de codi de minimis en llibres històrics alemanys', 'cs': 'Detekce de minimis přepínání kódů v historických německých knihách', 'et': 'Vähema tähtsusega koodivahetuse tuvastamine ajaloolistes saksa raamatutes', 'fi': 'Vähämerkityksisen koodin vaihtamisen havaitseminen historiallisissa saksalaisissa kirjoissa', 'jv': 'Ndelengno de minimis kode-Switch Anyar buku alaman', 'he': 'גילוי שינוי קוד de minimis בספרים גרמניים היסטוריים', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje preklapljanja kod de minimis v zgodovinskih nemških knjigah', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ཇར་མིག་དཔེ་དེབ་ནང་དུ་ཆུང་བའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Code-switching has long interested linguists, with computational work in particular focusing on speech and social media data (Sitaram et al., 2019). This paper contrasts these informal instances of code-switching to its appearance in more formal registers, by examining the mixture of languages in the Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), a corpus of 1406 primarily German books from the 17th to 19th centuries. We automatically annotate and manually inspect spans of six embedded languages (Latin, French, English, Italian, Spanish, and Greek) in the corpus. We quantitatively analyze the differences between code-switching patterns in these books and those in more typically studied speech and social media corpora. Furthermore, we address the practical task of predicting code-switching from features of the matrix language alone in the DTA corpus. Such classifiers can help reduce errors when optical character recognition or speech transcription is applied to a large corpus with rare embedded languages.', 'ar': 'لطالما اهتمت عملية تبديل الشفرة بخبراء لغويين ، حيث يركز العمل الحسابي بشكل خاص على الكلام وبيانات الوسائط الاجتماعية (Sitaram et al. ، 2019). تتناقض هذه الورقة مع هذه الأمثلة غير الرسمية للتبديل الشفري مع ظهورها في سجلات أكثر رسمية ، من خلال فحص مزيج اللغات في Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA) ، وهي مجموعة مؤلفة من 1406 كتابًا ألمانيًا في المقام الأول من القرن السابع عشر إلى القرن التاسع عشر. نقوم تلقائيًا بتدوين ست لغات مضمنة وفحصها يدويًا (اللاتينية والفرنسية والإنجليزية والإيطالية والإسبانية واليونانية) في المجموعة. نحن نحلل كميًا الاختلافات بين أنماط تبديل الشفرة في هذه الكتب وتلك الموجودة في مجموعات الكلام ووسائل التواصل الاجتماعي المدروسة بشكل نموذجي. علاوة على ذلك ، فإننا نعالج المهمة العملية المتمثلة في التنبؤ بتبديل الشفرة من ميزات لغة المصفوفة وحدها في مجموعة DTA. يمكن أن تساعد هذه المصنفات في تقليل الأخطاء عند تطبيق التعرف البصري على الأحرف أو نسخ الكلام على مجموعة كبيرة بها لغات مضمنة نادرة.', 'fr': 'Le changement de code intéresse depuis longtemps les linguistes, le travail informatique se concentrant en particulier sur la parole et les données des réseaux sociaux (Sitaram et al., 2019). Cet article met en contraste ces cas informels de changement de code avec son apparition dans des registres plus formels, en examinant le mélange de langues dans le Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), un corpus de 1406 livres principalement allemands du XVIIe au XIXe siècle. Nous annotons et inspectons automatiquement les plages de six langues intégrées (latin, français, anglais, italien, espagnol et grec) dans le corpus. Nous analysons quantitativement les différences entre les modèles de changement de code dans ces livres et ceux des corpus de discours et de médias sociaux plus couramment étudiés. En outre, nous abordons la tâche pratique de prédire le changement de code à partir des seules fonctionnalités du langage matriciel dans le corpus DTA. Ces classificateurs peuvent aider à réduire les erreurs lorsque la reconnaissance optique de caractères ou la transcription vocale est appliquée à un vaste corpus comportant de rares langues intégrées.', 'pt': 'A troca de código há muito interessa aos linguistas, com o trabalho computacional focando em particular na fala e nos dados de mídia social (Sitaram et al., 2019). Este artigo contrasta essas instâncias informais de mudança de código com sua aparição em registros mais formais, examinando a mistura de línguas no Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), um corpus de 1406 livros principalmente alemães dos séculos XVII a XIX. Anotamos automaticamente e inspecionamos manualmente intervalos de seis idiomas incorporados (latim, francês, inglês, italiano, espanhol e grego) no corpus. Analisamos quantitativamente as diferenças entre os padrões de troca de código nesses livros e aqueles em corpora de fala e mídia social mais tipicamente estudados. Além disso, abordamos a tarefa prática de prever a troca de código de recursos da linguagem matricial apenas no corpus DTA. Esses classificadores podem ajudar a reduzir erros quando o reconhecimento óptico de caracteres ou a transcrição de fala é aplicado a um grande corpus com idiomas incorporados raros.', 'es': 'El cambio de código ha interesado desde hace mucho a los lingüistas, y el trabajo computacional se centra en particular en los datos del habla y de las redes sociales (Sitaram et al., 2019). Este artículo contrasta estos casos informales de cambio de código con su aparición en registros más formales, al examinar la mezcla de idiomas en el Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), un corpus de 1406 libros principalmente alemanes de los siglos XVII al XIX. Anotamos automáticamente e inspeccionamos manualmente los intervalos de seis idiomas incrustados (latín, francés, inglés, italiano, español y griego) en el corpus. Analizamos cuantitativamente las diferencias entre los patrones de cambio de código en estos libros y los de los cuerpos de habla y redes sociales más estudiados. Además, abordamos la tarea práctica de predecir el cambio de código a partir de las características del lenguaje matricial únicamente en el corpus de DTA. Estos clasificadores pueden ayudar a reducir los errores cuando el reconocimiento óptico de caracteres o la transcripción de voz se aplican a un corpus grande con lenguajes incrustados poco frecuentes.', 'ja': 'コードスイッチングは、特に音声およびソーシャルメディアデータに焦点を当てた計算作業で、長い間言語学者に興味を持っていました（ Sitaram et al., 2019 ）。 本論文は、17世紀から19世紀の主にドイツ語の書籍からなる1406のコーパスであるDeutsches Textarchiv （ DTA ）の言語の混合を調べることによって、コードスイッチングのこれらの非公式な例を、より正式なレジスタに現れるものと対比している。 コーパスに組み込まれている6つの言語（ラテン語、フランス語、英語、イタリア語、スペイン語、ギリシャ語）のスパンを自動的にアノテーションし、手動で検査します。 これらの本のコードスイッチングパターンと、より一般的に研究されているスピーチやソーシャルメディアのパターンの違いを定量的に分析しています。 さらに、DTAコーパスでは、行列言語の特徴だけからコードスイッチングを予測する実用的な作業に取り組んでいます。 このような分類子は、光学文字認識または音声転写が希少な埋め込み言語を有する大規模なコーパスに適用されるときに、エラーを低減するのに役立ちます。', 'zh': '久之,代码切换素感语言学家意,其计事尤注语音及社交媒体数(Sitaram等,2019)。 本文考德意志文本(DTA)言语混合,将此等代码转换实例,比之更登记册,DTA是1406主17世纪至19世纪德语书之语料库。 自注手动检语料库六种嵌语(拉丁语、法语、英语、意大利语、西班牙语、希腊语)之限。 定量分析其代码切换式与更典语音、社交媒体语料库之异。 此外 DTA 语料库中仅以矩阵言占代码切换之实。 当以光学字符识语转录宜用于奇嵌入式语言大语料库,此类可助损益。', 'hi': 'कोड-स्विचिंग में लंबे समय से रुचि रखने वाले भाषाविद हैं, विशेष रूप से भाषण और सोशल मीडिया डेटा (सीताराम एट अल। यह पेपर अधिक औपचारिक रजिस्टरों में अपनी उपस्थिति के लिए कोड-स्विचिंग के इन अनौपचारिक उदाहरणों के विपरीत है, जो ड्यूश टेक्स्टार्चिव (डीटीए) में भाषाओं के मिश्रण की जांच करके, 1406 मुख्य रूप से 17 वीं से 19 वीं शताब्दी तक जर्मन पुस्तकों का एक कॉर्पस है। हम स्वचालित रूप से एनोटेट करते हैं और मैन्युअल रूप से कॉर्पस में छह एम्बेडेड भाषाओं (लैटिन, फ्रेंच, अंग्रेजी, इतालवी, स्पेनिश और ग्रीक) के स्पैन का निरीक्षण करते हैं। हम मात्रात्मक रूप से इन पुस्तकों में कोड-स्विचिंग पैटर्न और अधिक आमतौर पर अध्ययन किए गए भाषण और सोशल मीडिया कॉर्पोरेट के बीच के अंतर का विश्लेषण करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम डीटीए कॉर्पस में अकेले मैट्रिक्स भाषा की विशेषताओं से कोड-स्विचिंग की भविष्यवाणी करने के व्यावहारिक कार्य को संबोधित करते हैं। इस तरह के क्लासिफायर त्रुटियों को कम करने में मदद कर सकते हैं जब ऑप्टिकल चरित्र पहचान या भाषण प्रतिलेखन को दुर्लभ एम्बेडेड भाषाओं के साथ एक बड़े कॉर्पस पर लागू किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Переключение кода давно заинтересовало лингвистов, при этом вычислительная работа, в частности, сосредоточена на данных речи и социальных медиа (Sitaram et al., 2019). Этот документ противопоставляет эти неофициальные случаи переключения кода его появлению в более официальных регистрах, изучая смесь языков в Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), корпусе 1406 в основном немецких книг с 17 по 19 века. Мы автоматически аннотируем и вручную проверяем в корпусе шесть встроенных языков (латинский, французский, английский, итальянский, испанский и греческий). Мы количественно анализируем различия между шаблонами переключения кода в этих книгах и в более типично изученных речевых и социальных медиа-корпусах. Кроме того, мы решаем практическую задачу прогнозирования переключения кода только из признаков языка матрицы в корпусе DTA. Такие классификаторы могут помочь уменьшить ошибки, когда оптическое распознавание символов или транскрипция речи применяется к большому корпусу с редкими встроенными языками.', 'ga': 'Tá suim ag teangeolaithe le fada an lá i gcódmhalartú, le hobair ríomhaireachtúil ag díriú go háirithe ar shonraí urlabhra agus meán sóisialta (Sitaram et al., 2019). Déanann an páipéar seo codarsnacht idir na cásanna neamhfhoirmiúla códmhalartaithe seo agus an chuma atá air i gcláir níos foirmiúla, trí scrúdú a dhéanamh ar an meascán teangacha sa Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), corpas de 1406 go háirithe leabhair Ghearmánacha ón 17ú haois go dtí an 19ú haois. Déanaimid anótáil go huathoibríoch agus de láimh ar réimsí de shé theanga leabaithe (Laidin, Fraincis, Béarla, Iodáilis, Spáinnis agus Gréigis) sa chorpas. Déanaimid anailís chainníochtúil ar na difríochtaí idir na patrúin códmhalartaithe sna leabhair seo agus iad siúd i gcorpas cainte agus meán sóisialta a bhfuil staidéar níos gnách orthu. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid aghaidh ar an tasc praiticiúil maidir le hathrú cód a thuar ó ghnéithe den teanga mhaitrís amháin i gcorpas ÚIBÁC. Is féidir le haicmitheoirí den sórt sin cabhrú le hearráidí a laghdú nuair a chuirtear aithint optúil carachtar nó trascríobh cainte i bhfeidhm ar chorpas mór ina bhfuil teangacha leabaithe neamhchoitianta.', 'hu': 'A kódváltás régóta érdeklődik a nyelvészek, a számítástechnikai munka különösen a beszéd és a közösségi média adataira összpontosít (Sitaram et al., 2019). Ez a tanulmány ellentétben áll a kódváltás ezen informális eseteivel a formálisabb nyilvántartásokban való megjelenésével, a Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA) nyelvek keverékének vizsgálatával, amely 1406 elsősorban német könyvet tartalmaz a 17. és 19. században. Automatikusan jegyzetelünk és manuálisan ellenőrizzük a korpuszban hat beágyazott nyelv (latin, francia, angol, olasz, spanyol és görög) tartományát. Mennyiségileg elemezzük ezekben a könyvekben a kódváltási minták és a jellemzően tanulmányozott beszéd és közösségi média corporák közötti különbségeket. Továbbá azzal a gyakorlati feladattal foglalkozunk, hogy a DTA korpuszban kizárólag a mátrixnyelv jellemzőiről előrejelezzük a kódváltást. Az ilyen osztályozók segíthetnek csökkenteni a hibákat, amikor optikai karakterfelismerést vagy beszédátiratot alkalmaznak egy ritka beágyazott nyelveket tartalmazó nagy korpuszon.', 'el': 'Η αλλαγή κώδικα έχει εδώ και καιρό ενδιαφέρον για γλωσσολόγους, με υπολογιστική εργασία ιδιαίτερα να εστιάζει στα δεδομένα ομιλίας και κοινωνικών μέσων (κ.α., 2019). Η παρούσα εργασία έρχεται σε αντίθεση με αυτές τις ανεπίσημες περιπτώσεις αλλαγής κώδικα με την εμφάνισή του σε πιο τυπικά μητρώα, εξετάζοντας το μείγμα γλωσσών στο Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), ένα σώμα 1406 κυρίως γερμανικών βιβλίων από τον 17ο έως τον 19ο αιώνα. Αυτόματα σχολιάζουμε και ελέγχουμε χειροκίνητα διαστήματα έξι ενσωματωμένων γλωσσών (λατινικά, γαλλικά, αγγλικά, ιταλικά, ισπανικά και ελληνικά) στο σώμα. Αναλύουμε ποσοτικά τις διαφορές μεταξύ προτύπων αλλαγής κώδικα σε αυτά τα βιβλία και εκείνων σε πιο τυπικά μελετημένα σώματα ομιλίας και κοινωνικών μέσων. Επιπλέον, ασχολούμαστε με το πρακτικό έργο της πρόβλεψης αλλαγής κώδικα από τα χαρακτηριστικά της γλώσσας μήτρας μόνο στο σώμα DTA. Τέτοιοι ταξινομητές μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στη μείωση των σφαλμάτων όταν η οπτική αναγνώριση χαρακτήρων ή η μεταγραφή ομιλίας εφαρμόζεται σε ένα μεγάλο σώμα με σπάνιες ενσωματωμένες γλώσσες.', 'ka': 'კოდის გადაცვლილება დიდი ინტერესტირებული ლინგურისტები, რომელიც კომპუტაციალური სამუშაო სამუშაო და სოციალური მედიატური მონაცემებზე (Sitaram et al., 201 ეს დოკუმენტი კონტრასტური ინფორმალური ინფორმალური ინფორმალური ინფორმაციები, რომელიც უფრო ფორმალური რეგისტურში გადაცვლა, ექსესი ტექსტარქიგში (DTA), 1406-ის კონტუსი, პირველად გერმანეთის კონტ ჩვენ ავტომატურად აღმოჩნეთ და ხელსახურად ინსპექტირებთ შვიდი ინბექტირებული ენების (ლატინური, ფრანუსი, ანგლისური, თრალიანი, სპანუსი და დრეკური) შვიდი ჩვენ კონტაქტიურად განსხვავების განსხვავებას ამ წიგნებში და ისინი, რომლებიც უფრო ტიპურად უკეთესებული სიტყვა და სოციალური მედია კოპორაში გადასვლა. დამატებით, ჩვენ DTA corpus-ში მხოლოდ მარტიკის ენაზე მხოლოდ კოდის გადაცვლის პრაქტიკური დავალების მიხედვით. ასეთი კლასიფიკაციები შეუძლიათ შეუძლიათ გადახმარება შეცდომები, როდესაც ოპტიკალური სიმბოლოების განაცნობა ან სიტყვების ტრანქრიპტიფიკაცია გადაყენება', 'it': 'Il code-switching ha da tempo interessato linguisti, con il lavoro computazionale in particolare incentrato sul discorso e sui dati dei social media (Sitaram et al., 2019). Questo articolo contrasta questi casi informali di passaggio al codice con la sua comparsa in registri più formali, esaminando la miscela di lingue nel Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), un corpus di 1406 libri principalmente tedeschi dal XVII al XIX secolo. Notiamo automaticamente e controlliamo manualmente intervalli di sei lingue incorporate (latino, francese, inglese, italiano, spagnolo e greco) nel corpus. Analizziamo quantitativamente le differenze tra i modelli di code-switching in questi libri e quelli in linguaggio più tipicamente studiato e corpora dei social media. Inoltre, affrontiamo il compito pratico di prevedere il cambio di codice dalle caratteristiche del linguaggio matrice solo nel corpus DTA. Tali classificatori possono aiutare a ridurre gli errori quando il riconoscimento ottico dei caratteri o la trascrizione vocale viene applicato a un corpus di grandi dimensioni con rari linguaggi incorporati.', 'kk': 'Кодты ауыстыруға ұзын қызықты лингвисттер бар, бұл компьютерлік жұмыс сөйлеу мен социалдық медиа деректеріне назар ауыстырылады (Sitaram et al., 2019). Бұл қағаз, 17- 19 ғасырдан Германия кітаптарының 1406 корпусының арасындағы тілдерді тексеру арқылы, олардың ақпараттық кодтамасын оқиғаларына ауыстыру үшін, оқиғаларына ауыстыру үшін көмектесілікті болады. Біз корпустағы алты ендірілген тілдер (латын, француз, ағылшын, итальян, испан және грек тілдерді) автоматты түрде белгілеп қараймыз. Біз бұл кітаптардың код ауыстыру үлгілерінің арасындағы айырмашылығын санатты түрде анализирақ, әдеттегі сөйлеу және социалдық медиа корпорасындағылар. Қосымша, біз DTA корпусындағы матрикс тілінің қасиеттерінен тек өзгерту үшін практикалық тапсырманы таңдаймыз. Бұл классификациялар оптикалық таңбаларды анықтау немесе сөйлеу транскрипті үлкен корпус тілдеріне қолданғанда қателерді азайтуға көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Премената на кодови има долго интересирани јазици, со компјутерска работа особено фокусирана на говорот и податоците на социјалните медиуми (Ситарам и други, 2019). Оваа хартија се спротивставува на овие неформални случаи на промена на код на неговото изглед во поформални регистри, со испитување на мешавината на јазиците во Deutsches Textarchiv (ДТА), корпус од 1406 главно германски книги од 17-ти до 19-ти векови. Автоматски анотираме и рачно проверуваме широкости од шест вградени јазици (латински, француски, англиски, италијански, шпански и грчки) во корпусот. Ние квантитивно ги анализираме разликите помеѓу шемите на промена на кодови во овие книги и оние во пообично студираниот говор и корпора на социјалните медиуми. Покрај тоа, ние ја решаваме практичната задача на предвидување на промена на кодови од карактеристиките на јазикот на матрицата само во ДТА корпусот. Such classifiers can help reduce errors when optical character recognition or speech transcription is applied to a large corpus with rare embedded languages.', 'lt': 'Kodeksų keitimui būdingi ilgai suinteresuoti kalbėtojai, skaičiavimo darbe daugiausia dėmesio skiriama kalbos ir social in ės žiniasklaidos duomenims (Sitaram et al., 2019 m.). Šis dokumentas skiriasi nuo šių neoficialių kodų keitimo atvejų oficialesniuose registruose, išnagrinėjant kalbų mišin į Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), 1406-ųjų Vokietijos knygų korpusas nuo 17-ojo iki 19-ojo amžiaus. Automatiškai rašome ir rankiniu būdu tikriname šešių įterptų kalbų (lotynų, prancūzų, anglų, italų, ispanų ir graikų) spektrus korpuse. Mes kiekybiškai analizuojame skirtumus tarp kodų keitimo modelių šiose knygose ir tų, kurie dažniau tiriami kalbos ir social in ės žiniasklaidos korporai. Be to, sprendžiame praktinę užduotį prognozuoti kodų keitimą nuo tik matricos kalbos savybių DTA korpuse. Tokie klasifikatoriai gali padėti sumažinti klaidas, kai optinis simbolių pripažinimas arba kalbos transkriptavimas taikomas dideliam korpusui, turinčiam retas įdėtas kalbas.', 'ms': 'Penukaran kod mempunyai bahasa yang berminat lama, dengan kerja komputasi terutama fokus pada data ucapan dan media sosial (Sitaram et al., 2019). Kertas ini bertentangan kes-kes in formal ini untuk menukar kod kepada penampilan dalam daftar lebih formal, dengan memeriksa campuran bahasa dalam Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), korpus 1406 terutama buku Jerman dari abad ke-17 hingga ke-19. We automatically annotate and manually inspect spans of six embedded languages (Latin, French, English, Italian, Spanish, and Greek) in the corpus.  Kami menganalisis secara kuantitatif perbezaan antara corak penyukaran kod dalam buku-buku ini dan yang lebih biasa belajar pidato dan korpora media sosial. Selain itu, kita mengatasi tugas praktik untuk meramalkan penyukaran kod dari ciri-ciri bahasa matriks sahaja dalam korpus DTA. Pengklasifikasi seperti ini boleh membantu mengurangi ralat apabila pengenalan aksara optik atau transkripsi ucapan dilaksanakan pada korpus besar dengan bahasa yang jarang diterbangkan.', 'ml': 'കോഡ് മാറ്റുന്നതിന് കുറേക്കാള്\u200d താല്പര്യമുള്ള ഭാഷക്കാരുണ്ട്, കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കുന് This paper contrasts these informal instances of code-switching to its appearance in more formal registers, by examining the mixture of languages in the Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), a corpus of 1406 primarily German books from the 17th to 19th centuries.  നമ്മള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ആറു അകത്തുള്ള ഭാഷകളുടെ (ലാറ്റിന്\u200d, ഫ്രെഞ്ച്, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്, ഇറ്റാലിയന്\u200d, സ്പാനിഷ്, ഗ്രീക്ക്) സ്പേന്\u200d ചെയ്യു ഈ പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d കോഡ് മാറ്റുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളും സാമ അതിനുശേഷം, DTA കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d മാറ്റിക്സ് ഭാഷയുടെ വിശേഷതകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മാത്രിക്സ് ഭാഷ മാറ്റുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രാകൃതിക ജ ഇത്തരം വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയാനോ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിനോ പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d കുറയ്ക്കുന', 'mt': 'Il-bidla tal-kodiċi għandha lingwisti li ilhom interessati, b’ħidma komputattiva b’mod partikolari li tiffoka fuq id-dejta tad-diskors u tal-midja soċjali (Sitaram et al., 2019). Dan id-dokument jikkuntrasta dawn l-istanzi informali ta’ bidla fil-kodiċi għad-dehra tiegħu f’reġistri aktar formali, billi jeżamina t-taħlita ta’ lingwi fid-Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), korpus ta’ 1406 primarjament kotba Ġermaniżi mis-17-il sa d-19-il seklu. Aħna nnotaw awtomatikament u ninspezzjonaw manwalment firxiet ta’ sitt lingwi inkorporati (Latin, French, English, Italian, Spanish, and Greek) fil-korpus. Aħna janalizzaw b’mod kwantitattiv id-differenzi bejn ix-xejriet ta’ skambju ta’ kodiċijiet f’dawn il-kotba u dawk f’diskors u korpora tal-midja soċjali li ġew studjati b’mod aktar tipiku. Barra minn hekk, nindirizzaw il-kompitu prattiku ta’ tbassir tal-qlib tal-kodiċi minn karatteristiċi tal-lingwa tal-matriċi waħedha fil-korpus tad-DTA. Such classifiers can help reduce errors when optical character recognition or speech transcription is applied to a large corpus with rare embedded languages.', 'mn': 'Код-шилжүүлэх нь урт хугацааны сонирхолтой хэлний судлаачид, тооцоололтын ажил нь илтгэл, нийгмийн хэвлэлийн мэдээлэл (Sitaram et al., 2019). Энэ цаас нь илүү официально зарчимдаа кодлог шилжүүлэх боломжтой тохиолдлуудыг харуулж, ДТА-н хэлний хоорондоо (ДТА) хэлний холбогдолтыг шалгаж, 1406-ын корпус, ихэвчлэн 17-аас 19 зууны Германы номын корпус юм. Бид корпус дээр зургаан оролцсон хэл (Латин, Француз, Англи, Итали, Испан, Грек) гэдэг хэлнүүдийг автоматаар анзаарч, гараараа шалгаж байдаг. Бид эдгээр номнуудын кодын өөрчлөлтийн загварын ялгааг олон тооны шинжилгээнд судалж байгаа илтгэл, нийгмийн медиа хэвлэлийн корпораторын хооронд судалж байна. Мөн бид DTA корпус дахь матрикс хэлний өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлох практикийн даалгаварыг таамагладаг. Ийм хэлбэрүүд нь ховор оршигдсон хэлэгтэй том корпус рүү ашиглах үед алдаа бууруулахад тусалдаг.', 'no': 'Kodebyting har lang interesserte lingvistar, med dataarbeidet spesielt fokuserer på tale og sosiale media-data (Sitaram et al., 2019). Denne papiret contrasterer desse informale instansene for å byta kode til utsjånaden i meir formale registrer ved å undersøke blandingen av språk i Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), en korpus av 1406 hovudsakelig tyske bøker frå 17. til 19. århundre. Vi markerer og kontrollerer automatisk mellomrom av seks innbygde språk (latinsk, fransk, engelsk, italsk, spansk og gresk) i korpusen. Vi analyserer kvantitativ forskjellene mellom mønsterene for å byta kodar i disse bøkene og dei i meir typisk studierte tale og sosiale media-korpora. I tillegg adresserer vi praktiske oppgåve for å foregå å omsetjinga av kodar frå funksjonar av matrisespråket alene i DTA-korpusen. Desse klassifikatorane kan hjelpa til å redusera feil når optiske teiknkonkjenning eller taletranskript vert brukt til ein stor korpus med sjeldre innbygde språk.', 'pl': 'Przełączanie kodu od dawna interesuje językoznawców, a praca obliczeniowa koncentruje się w szczególności na danych mowy i mediów społecznościowych (Sitaram et al., 2019). Niniejszy artykuł kontrastuje te nieformalne przypadki przełączania kodu do jego pojawienia się w bardziej formalnych rejestrach, badając mieszankę języków w Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), korpusie 1406 głównie książek niemieckich z XVII do XIX wieku. Automatycznie adnotacjonujemy i ręcznie sprawdzamy rozszerzenia sześciu języków osadzonych w korpusie (łaciński, francuski, angielski, włoski, hiszpański i grecki). Analizujemy ilościowo różnice między wzorcami przełączania kodu w tych książkach a tymi w bardziej typowo badanych korpusach mowy i mediów społecznościowych. Ponadto zajmujemy się praktycznym zadaniem przewidywania przełączania kodu z cech samego języka macierzowego w korpusie DTA. Takie klasyfikatory mogą pomóc zmniejszyć błędy, gdy optyczne rozpoznawanie znaków lub transkrypcja mowy jest stosowane do dużego korpusu z rzadkimi osadzonymi językami.', 'ro': 'Schimbarea codurilor are mult timp lingviști interesați, lucrând în domeniul computațional, axându-se în special pe vorbire și date de social media (Sitaram et al., 2019). Această lucrare contrastează aceste cazuri informale de schimbare a codului cu apariția sa în registre mai formale, prin examinarea amestecului de limbi în Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), un corpus de 1406 de cărți în principal germane din secolele XVII-XIX. Adnotăm automat și inspectăm manual intervale de șase limbi încorporate (latină, franceză, engleză, italiană, spaniolă și greacă) în corp. Analizăm cantitativ diferențele dintre modelele de schimbare a codului din aceste cărți și cele din corpurile de vorbire și social media mai studiate. Mai mult decât atât, abordăm sarcina practică de a anticipa schimbarea codului de la caracteristicile limbajului matrix numai în corpul DTA. Astfel de clasificatori pot ajuta la reducerea erorilor atunci când recunoașterea optică a caracterelor sau transcrierea vorbirii este aplicată unui corpus mare cu limbi rare încorporate.', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje kodova dugo interesuje lingviste, s računalnim radom posebno fokusiranim na govore i podatke o društvenim medijima (Sitaram et al., 2019). Ovaj papir se suprotstavlja ovim neformalnim slučajevima prebacivanja koda na njen izgled u formalnijim registrima, pregledavajući mješavinu jezika u Deutsches Textarchivu (DTA), korpusu od 1406, glavno njemačkih knjiga iz 17. do 19. veka. Mi automatski annotiramo i ručno provjeravamo šest ugrađenih jezika (latinski, francuski, engleski, italijanski, španjolski i grčki) u korpusu. Mi kvantitativno analiziramo razlike između obrazaca prebacivanja kodova u ovim knjigama i onih iz obiènije proučavanih govora i društvenih medijskih korpora. Osim toga, obraćamo se praktičnom zadatku predviđanja zamjene koda sa karakteristika jezika matrice samog u DTA korpusu. Takvi klasifikatori mogu pomoći smanjiti greške kada se optički prepoznavanje karaktera ili prepisanje govora primjenjuje na veliki korpus sa rijetkim ugrađenim jezicima.', 'si': 'කෝඩ් ස්විච්ජින් එක්ක ලොකු ආශ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට, පරිගණාත්මක වැඩේ විශේෂයෙන් කතාව ස මේ පැත්තේ කෝඩ් ස්විච්චි වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරනවා, දුෂ්ටිස් ටෙක්ස්ටරිව් වලින් භ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ඇතුළත් භාෂාවක් හතරක් ස්පැන්ස් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා (ලැටින්, ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස්, ඉංග්\u200dරේන් අපි මේ පොත් වලින් කෝඩ් වෙනස් විදියට විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200d තවත්, අපි DTA කෝර්පුස් වලින් මැට්\u200dරික්ස් භාෂාවගේ අවශ්\u200dය වලින් පරික්ෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් කෝඩ් ස්විච්ච මේ විශේෂකයන්ට පුළුවන් ඔප්ටික් අක්ෂර පරික්ෂණය නැත්තම් කතා පරික්ෂණය නැත්තම් වැරදි විශේෂකයෙන් ලොකු කො', 'so': 'Codsiga beddelista waxay leedahay luuqadaha aad u dheer oo xiiseysan, waxayna leeyihiin shaqada xisaabta, si gaar ah oo ku kalsoonaan hadalka iyo macluumaadka bulshada (Sitaram et al., 2019). Qoraalkan ayaa ka gees ah dhacdooyinkan xuquuqda codsiga looga beddelayo diiwaangelinta rasmi ah, marka lagu baarito isku qasbidda luuqadaha ee Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), kaas oo ah koopus 1406 buugaagta Jarmalka ugu horeysa sanadkii 17-19. Sida bilowga ah waxaynu korpuska ku qornaa lix luuqadood oo lagu qoray (Latin, Faraansiis, Ingiriis, Talyaani, Isbanish, iyo Gariig). Si qiyaasta ah ayaannu u baaraynaa kala duwanaanshaha kala beddelka qoraalkaas iyo kuwa ka akhrisan hadalka iyo shirkadaha shabakadda bulshada. Furthermore, waxaynu u sheekeysanaynaa shuqulka caadiga ah oo la sii beddelayo codsiga oo kaliya ee luqada makhriska ee DTA. Takhasuska caynkaas ah waxay caawimaad u yeelan karaan in ay leedahay qalad, marka lagu codsadaa qoraalka aqoonsashada ama qoraalka hadalka oo lagu qorayo qof aad u weyn oo luuqado khaas ah oo ku qoran.', 'sv': 'Kodväxling har länge intresserat sig för lingvister, med beräkningsarbete i synnerhet med fokus på tal och sociala mediedata (Sitaram et al., 2019). Denna uppsats kontrasterar dessa informella fall av kodbyte till dess framträdande i mer formella register, genom att undersöka blandningen av språk i Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), en korpus av 1406 främst tyska böcker från 1600 till 1800-talet. Vi kommenterar och inspekterar automatiskt intervall av sex inbäddade språk (latin, franska, engelska, italienska, spanska och grekiska) i korpusen. Vi analyserar kvantitativt skillnaderna mellan kodbytesmönster i dessa böcker och i mer typiskt studerade tal- och sociala medier corpora. Vidare behandlar vi den praktiska uppgiften att förutsäga kodbyte från funktioner i matrisspråket enbart i DTA-korpusen. Sådana klassificerare kan hjälpa till att minska fel när optisk teckenkänning eller talskription tillämpas på en stor korpus med sällsynta inbäddade språk.', 'ta': 'குறிமுறைமாற்றம் நீண்ட தேவையான மொழிகள் உள்ளது, கணக்கீட்டு வேலையுடன் குறிப்பாக பேச்சு மற்றும் சமூக ஊடக தரவுகளை கவனம் செலுத் இந்த காகிதத்தில் மேலும் வடிவமைப்பு பதிவுகளில் தோன்றும் இந்த குறியீட்டு மாற்றும் நிகழ்வுகளை எதிர்பார்க்கிறது, டெவ்ச் டெக்ஸ்க்ஸ்கார்கிவில் மொழிகளின் கலப்பை பரி நாங்கள் தானாகவே கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிட்ட ஆறு மொழிகளின் ஸ்பேன்களை பராசோதிக்க வேண்டும் (லாட்டினின், பிரெஞ்சு, ஆங்கிலம், இத்தாலி நாம் இந்த புத்தகங்களில் குறியீடு மாறுதல் முறைமைகளில் உள்ள வேறுபாடுகளை குறியீட்டு மாற்றும் வித்தியாசத்தை சரிபார்க மேலும், நாம் DTA கூட்டத்தில் மட்டும் தேர்ந்தெடுத்த மொழியின் தனிப்பயன்களில் இருந்து முன்வாக்கி குறிமுறைமாற்றத்தி இத்தகைய வகுப்பாளர்கள் சிறிய உடைந்த மொழிகளுடன் பெரிய மொழிகளுடன் பெரிய எழுத்து அல்லது பேச்சு எழுத்துரு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டால் பிழ', 'ur': 'کوڈ-سوئٹینگ بہت زیادہ علاقه مند زبان شناسوں کے ساتھ کامپیوتر کی کام ہے، جو بات اور سوسیل میڈیا ڈیٹا پر تمرکز کرتی ہے (Sitaram et al., 2019). یہ کاغذ ان غیر غیر غیر معمولی موجودات کو اس کی ظاہری صورت میں بدل دیتا ہے، ڈیچس ٹکسٹاریوف (DTA) میں زبانوں کی مخلوقات کی آزمائش کے ذریعہ، ۱۷م یہاں سے ۱۹م قرن کی جرمانی کتابوں کی کورپوس کے ذریعہ سے ۱۴۶۶ کی کورپوس کی۔ ہم نے کورپوس میں چھ جمع کئی زبانیں (لاتین، فرانسوی، انگلیسی، ایتالیایی، اسپانیایی، اور یونانی) کی جگہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا ذریعہ اپنا نظر کرتا ہے اور ہم نے ان کتابوں میں کوڈ-سوئچ پٹرنوں کے درمیان تفریق کی مقدار سے تحقیق کرلیا ہے اور ان لوگوں کو جو زیادہ عادت میں پڑھے ہوئے سخنرانی اور سوسیال میڈیا کورپور میں پڑھے جاتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم DTA کورپوس میں صرف ماٹریکس زبان کی فرصت سے کوڈ-سوچ کرنے کی پیش بینی کے قابل کام کے بارے میں مشورہ کرتے ہیں. اس طرح کی کلاسیفوں خطاؤں کو کم کر دینے کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں جب آپٹیکل شخصیٹ کی شناسایی یا کلام کی ترنسکریپٹ ایک بڑے کورپوس پر کم انداز کی زبانیں لکھی جاتی ہیں۔', 'uz': "Koda oʻzgartirish uchun juda qiziqarli tillar bor. Bu hisobot va jamiyat media maʼlumotiga (Sitaram et al, 2019) muhit qiladigan ishlar bilan foydalanadi. Bu qogʻoz 1406 asosiy Olmon aslida 17-19 asrdaridan ko'p Olmon kitoblarning bir xil tarkibini o'rganish uchun bir haqiqiy narsalarni ko'rsatadi. Biz avtomatik tahrirlash va qo'lbola qo'llangan 6 tillar (Latin, Fransuzcha, Inglizcha, Italyani, Ispancha, va Greycha) tilidagi spanlarni ko'rinamiz. Biz bu kitoblardagi ko'paytirish usullarning orasidagi o'zgarishlar orasidagi o'zgarishlarni ko'paytirib o'rganish va ijtimoiy media kompaniyasida o'rganishlar. Keyin, biz DTA corpusidagi matrix tilning xususiyatlaridan faqat o'zgarishni bajaramiz. Ushbu darajalar qoʻllanilmagan tilda optik belgilarni aniqlashda yoki tilni tahrirlashda xatolarni kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bộ chuyển đổi mã có các nhà ngôn ngữ hứng thú lâu dài, với các công việc tính, đặc biệt tập trung vào dữ liệu ngôn ngữ và truyền thông xã hội (Sitaram et al., 209). Tờ giấy này tương đối với các trường hợp biến mật mã chuyển sang xuất hiện trong các ngăn kéo chính thức hơn, bằng cách kiểm tra các ngôn ngữ trong Văn bản Đức (DTO), một tập hợp của 1406 chủ yếu là các cuốn sách Đức từ thế kỷ XVII tới XIX. Chúng tôi sẽ tự động ghi chú và kiểm tra chi tiết bằng sáu ngôn ngữ nhúng trong tập thể (Latin, Pháp, Anh, Ý, Tây Ban Nha và Hy Lạp). Chúng tôi phân tích về mặt lượng sự khác nhau giữa các mẫu chuyển đổi mã trong những cuốn sách này và những mẫu vật được nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ và truyền thông xã hội. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi giải quyết nhiệm vụ dự đoán mã chuyển đổi từ các tính năng của ngôn ngữ ma trận một mình trong tập thể DTDA. Những người phân loại này có thể giúp giảm lỗi khi nhận dạng chữ quang hay ghi âm giọng nói được áp dụng vào một tập thể lớn với ngôn ngữ được nhúng ít.', 'bg': 'Превключването на кодове отдавна се интересува от лингвисти, като изчислителната работа се фокусира по-специално върху речните и социалните медии данни (Ситарам и др., 2019). Тази статия контрастира тези неформални случаи на преминаване на кодове с появата му в по-официални регистри, като изследва сместа от езици в корпус от 1406 предимно немски книги от 17 до 19 век. Ние автоматично анотираме и ръчно проверяваме обхватите на шест вградени езика (латински, френски, английски, италиански, испански и гръцки) в корпуса. Количествено анализираме разликите между моделите на превключване на кодове в тези книги и тези в по-типично изучаваните речни и социални медийни корпуси. Освен това, ние разглеждаме практическата задача за предвиждане на кодово превключване от особеностите на матричния език само в корпуса на ДТА. Такива класификатори могат да помогнат за намаляване на грешките, когато оптичното разпознаване на знаци или транскрипцията на речта се прилага към голям корпус с редки вградени езици.', 'nl': 'Code-switching heeft al lang belangstelling voor taalkundigen, met name computerwerk dat zich richt op spraak- en social media data (Sitaram et al., 2019). Dit artikel contrasteert deze informele gevallen van codeomschakeling met zijn verschijning in meer formele registers, door de mix van talen in het Deutsche Textarchiv (DTA) te onderzoeken, een corpus van 1406 voornamelijk Duitse boeken uit de 17e tot 19e eeuw. We maken automatisch aantekeningen en controleren handmatig overspanningen van zes ingesloten talen (Latijn, Frans, Engels, Italiaans, Spaans en Grieks) in het corpus. We analyseren kwantitatief de verschillen tussen code-switching patronen in deze boeken en die in meer typisch bestudeerde spraak en social media corpora. Verder behandelen we de praktische taak van het voorspellen van code-switching vanuit kenmerken van de matrix taal alleen in het DTA corpus. Dergelijke classificatoren kunnen helpen fouten te verminderen wanneer optische tekenherkenning of spraaktranscriptie wordt toegepast op een groot corpus met zeldzame ingesloten talen.', 'da': 'Kodeskift har længe interesseret sig for sprogfolk, med beregningsarbejde med særligt fokus på tale og sociale medier data (Sitaram et al., 2019). Denne artikel kontrasterer disse uformelle tilfælde af kodeskift til dens optræden i mere formelle registre ved at undersøge blandingen af sprog i Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), et korpus af 1406 primært tyske bøger fra det 17. til 19. århundrede. Vi noterer automatisk og manuelt undersøger spændinger af seks indlejrede sprog (latin, fransk, engelsk, italiensk, spansk og græsk) i korpuset. Vi analyserer kvantitativt forskellene mellem kodeskift mønstre i disse bøger og dem i mere typisk undersøgt tale og sociale medier corpora. Desuden beskæftiger vi os med den praktiske opgave at forudsige kodeskift fra egenskaber i matrix sproget alene i DTA korpus. Sådanne klassificeringer kan hjælpe med at reducere fejl, når optisk tegngenkendelse eller taletranskription anvendes på et stort korpus med sjældne indlejrede sprog.', 'hr': 'Premjenjivanje kodova dugo zanima jezičari, s računalnim radom posebno usredotočenim na govor i podatke o društvenim medijima (Sitaram et al., 2019). Ovaj papir se suprotstavlja ovim neformalnim slučajevima prebacivanja šifre na njezin izgled u formalnijim registrama, pregledajući mješavinu jezika u Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), korpus od 1406 primarno njemačkih knjiga iz 17. do 19. stoljeća. Mi automatski annotiramo i ručno provjeravamo šest ugrađenih jezika (latinski, francuski, engleski, italijanski, španjolski i grčki) u korpusu. Mi kvantitativno analiziramo razlike između obrazaca zamjene kodova u ovim knjigama i onih iz običnije proučavanih govora i društvenih medijskih korpora. Osim toga, riješimo praktični zadatak predviđanja zamjene koda iz karakteristika jezika matrice samog u DTA korpusu. Takvi klasifikatori mogu pomoći smanjiti greške kada se primjenjuje optički priznanje karaktera ili prepisanje govora na veliki korpus s rijetkim ugrađenim jezicima.', 'de': 'Code-Switching interessiert Linguisten seit langem, wobei sich die Rechenarbeit insbesondere auf Sprach- und Social-Media-Daten konzentriert (Sitaram et al., 2019). Diese informellen Beispiele von Code-Switching werden in dieser Arbeit mit ihrem Auftreten in formaleren Registern kontrastiert, indem sie die Mischung von Sprachen im Deutschen Textarchiv (DTA) untersuchen, einem Korpus von 1406 hauptsächlich deutschen Büchern aus dem 17.bis 19.Jahrhundert. Wir kommentieren und prüfen automatisch Spannweiten von sechs eingebetteten Sprachen (Latein, Französisch, Englisch, Italienisch, Spanisch und Griechisch) im Korpus. Wir analysieren quantitativ die Unterschiede zwischen Code-Switching-Mustern in diesen Büchern und denen in typischerweise untersuchten Sprache- und Social-Media-Korpora. Darüber hinaus beschäftigen wir uns mit der praktischen Aufgabe, Code-Switching von Features der Matrixsprache allein im DTA-Korpus vorherzusagen. Solche Klassifikatoren können dazu beitragen, Fehler zu reduzieren, wenn optische Zeichenerkennung oder Sprachtranskription auf einen großen Korpus mit seltenen eingebetteten Sprachen angewendet wird.', 'id': 'Pertukaran kode memiliki bahasa yang lama tertarik, dengan pekerjaan komputasi khususnya fokus pada pidato dan data media sosial (Sitaram et al., 2019). Kertas ini bertentangan dengan kasus-kasus in formal ini untuk menukar kode ke penampilannya dalam catatan yang lebih formal, dengan memeriksa campuran bahasa di Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), sebuah korpus 1406 terutama buku Jerman dari abad ke-17 sampai ke-19. Kami secara otomatis menyatakan dan secara manual memeriksa jangkauan enam bahasa terkandung (Latin, Perancis, Inggris, Italia, Spanyol, dan Yunani) dalam korpus. Kami menganalisis secara kuantitatif perbedaan antara pola penggantian kode dalam buku-buku ini dan yang lebih biasa belajar pidato dan korpora media sosial. Selain itu, kami mengatasi tugas praktis untuk memprediksi kode-switching dari ciri-ciri bahasa matriks sendirian dalam korpus DTA. Klasifikasi tersebut dapat membantu mengurangi kesalahan ketika pengenalan karakter optik atau transkripsi pidato diterapkan pada korpus besar dengan bahasa yang langka terbenam.', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya sheria imekuwa na lugha nyingi yenye maslahi, na kazi ya kompyuta hususani kwenye hotuba na taarifa za mitandao ya kijamii (Sitaram et al, 2019). Makala hii inapinga matukio haya yasiyo rasmi ya kubadilika kwa ajili ya kuonekana kwake katika waandishi rasmi zaidi, kwa kuchunguza mchanganyiko wa lugha katika makala ya Teknolojia ya Deutsches (DTA), makampuni ya vitabu 1406 hasa ya Ujerumani kuanzia karne ya 17 hadi 19. Tunavutiza na kudhibiti lugha sita zinazotumiwa kwa manufaa (Kilatini, Kifaransa, Kiingereza, Kiitalia, Kihispania, na Kigiriki). Tunafahamu tofauti kati ya miundo ya kubadilisha sheria katika vitabu hivi na wale ambao kwa kawaida wamesoma hotuba na kampuni ya mitandao ya kijamii. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajadili juhudi halisi ya kutabiri kubadilisha kodi kutoka kwenye vipengele vya lugha ya vitambaa pekee katika vifungu vya DTA. Wataalamu wa aina hiyo wanaweza kusaidia kupunguza makosa pale utambulisho wa tabia za optiki au kuandika maneno yanayotumiwa kwenye makampuni makubwa yenye lugha chache zilizofungwa.', 'ko': '코드 변환은 언어학자들이 관심을 가지는 이슈로, 특히 음성과 소셜미디어 데이터(Sitaram et al., 2019)에 주목한다.본고는 (Deutsches Textarchiv, DTA)의 혼합 언어를 연구함으로써 이러한 비공식적인 코드 변환 실례를 더욱 공식적인 언어 영역에 나타난 것과 비교하고자 한다. DTA는 모두 1406권으로 17세기부터 19세기까지의 독일어 서적이다.우리는 자동으로 자료 라이브러리에 있는 여섯 가지 삽입식 언어 (라틴어, 프랑스어, 영어, 이탈리아어, 스페인어, 그리스어) 의 경계를 주석하고 수동으로 검사한다.우리는 이 책들의 코드 변환 모델과 더욱 전형적인 음성과 소셜 미디어 자료 라이브러리의 코드 변환 모델 간의 차이를 정량 분석했다.또한 DTA 자료 라이브러리에서 행렬 언어의 특징 예측 코드로만 전환하는 실제 작업도 논의했다.광학 문자인식이나 음성 전송이 보기 드문 삽입 언어를 가진 대형 어료 라이브러리에 적용될 때, 이런 분류기는 오류를 줄이는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.', 'fa': 'تغییر قانونی زبان\u200cشناسان طولانی علاقه\u200cمند است، با کارهای کامپیوتری در خصوص تمرکز روی داده\u200cهای سخنرانی و رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی (Sitaram et al., 2019). این کاغذ با تحقیق ترکیب زبان\u200cهای متقابل دیوس (DTA) یک کورپوس از ۱۴۴۶ کتاب آلمانی از قرن\u200cهای ۱۷م تا ۱۹۹ متقابل تغییر داده می\u200cشود. ما به طور خودکار از شش زبان وارد شده (لاتین، فرانسوی، انگلیسی، ایتالیایی، اسپانیایی و یونانی) در کورپوس آزمایش می\u200cکنیم و به دست می\u200cرسیم. ما به اندازه کافی تفاوت بین الگوهای تغییر کد در این کتابها و کسانی که معمولاً سخنرانی و شرکت رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی را مطالعه می\u200cکنند تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. به علاوه، ما به وظیفه عملی پیش بینی کردن تغییر کد از ویژه\u200cهای زبان ماتریکس تنها در کورپوس DTA صحبت می\u200cکنیم. این گروه\u200cگران می\u200cتوانند کمک کنند که خطاها را کاهش دهند وقتی شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهای optical یا ترجمه سخنرانی بر یک گروه بزرگ با زبان\u200cهای نادر وارد می\u200cشوند.', 'af': "Kode-wisseling het lank geinteresseerde lingviste, met rekenaarske werk in besonderhede fokus op spraak en sosiale media data (Sitaram et al., 2019). Hierdie papier kontras hierdie onformele voorbeelde van kode-wisseling na sy voorkoms in meer formele registre deur die gemeenskap van tale in die Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA) te ondersoek, 'n korpus van 1406, voorskynlik Duitse boeke van die 17de tot die 19de hoofde. Ons outomaties annoteer en hand inspekteer spans van ses inbêde tale (Latyn, Frans, Engels, Italiese, Spaanse en Griekse) in die korpus. Ons analyseer die verskille tussen kode-wisselpatrone in hierdie boeke en die wat in meer tipiese studieerde spreek en sosiale media korpora is. Ons adres ook die praktiese taak van voorskou van kode- wisseling van funksies van die matriks taal alleen in die DTA corpus. Soos klassifiseerders kan hulp om foute te verminder wanneer optiese karakter herkenning of spreekvordering toepassing word na 'n groot korpus met selfde ingebedde tale.", 'tr': 'Ködleme almak üçin uzak gyzyklanýan lingwistiklerdir, hatlary we sosial mediýaly maglumatlara üns berýär (Sitaram et al., 2019). Bu kagyz şu resmi sahypalary beýleki formal registerlarda üýtgetmek üçin, Deutsches Textarhiwyň (DTA) dilleriniň karmaşygyny barlap 1406-nji köpüsi olaryň üstüne 17-nji we 19-nji asyrda nemesçe kitaplaryny barlaýar. Biz korpusda alty diller (latin, fransuz, iňlisçe, italiýa, ispanyýa we Ýunança) sahypalaryny awtomatik duýýan we elleri barlaýarys. Biz bu kitaplarda ködleme üýtgetme örneklerinin farklılıklarını sayıda analiz edip, daha düzenli konuşmalarda ve sosyal medya korporasynda değerlendiriyoruz. Ayrıca, DTA corpusynda matriks dilinin özelliklerinden kelläni almak üçin praktik görevi tahmin ediyoruz. Bärde klassifirler karakterleriň tanyşyny ýa-da çykyş terjimesini çapda kömek edip biler.', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i kodeve ka gjuhëtarë të interesuar për një kohë të gjatë, me punë kompjuterike në veçanti duke u përqëndruar në të dhënat e fjalimit dhe të medias sociale (Sitaram et al., 2019). This paper contrasts these informal instances of code-switching to its appearance in more formal registers, by examining the mixture of languages in the Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), a corpus of 1406 primarily German books from the 17th to 19th centuries.  Ne automatikisht anotojmë dhe inspektojmë manualisht gjashtë gjuhë të përfshira (latin, francez, anglez, italian, spanjoll dhe grek) në korpus. Ne analizojmë në mënyrë kuantitative dallimet midis modeleve të ndërrimit të kodeve në këto libra dhe ato në më tipikisht studiuar fjalim dhe korpra të medias sociale. Përveç kësaj, ne trajtojmë detyrën praktike të parashikimit të ndërrimit të kodit nga karakteristikat e gjuhës së matricës vetëm në korpus DTA. Klasifikuesit e tillë mund të ndihmojnë në reduktimin e gabimeve kur njohja optike e karakterit apo transkriptimi i fjalës aplikohet në një korpus të madh me gjuhë të rralla të përfshira.', 'am': 'Code-switching has long interested ቋንቋዎች, particularly በተለየ ንግግር እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን ማጠቃለያ (Sitaram et al., 2019). ይህ ፕሮግራም ከ17ኛው ጀምሮ እስከ 19ኛው ክፍለ ዘመናት ጀምሮ የጀምሮ ጀምሮ የጀርመን መጻሕፍት የነበረውን የጋርማዊ መጻሕፍት የቋንቋዎችን መቀላቀል በመጠየቅ ይቃወማል፡፡ በካርፓስ ስድስት ቋንቋዎች (Latin, ፈረንሳይ, እንግሊዘኛ፥ ጣሊያንኛ፣ ስፓኒሽ እና ግሪክ) We quantitatively analyze the differences between code-switching patterns in these books and those in more typically studied speech and social media corpora.  ከዚህም በላይ በ DTA ኮርፓስ ውስጥ ብቻውን የማትርቲክ ቋንቋ ለዋጭት የሚደረገውን የሥርዓዊ ስራ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እንደነዚህ ያሉ ክፍሎች ስህተቶችን ማሳየት ወይም የንግግር ጽሑፍ በተጠቃሚ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በሚደረጉ በታላቅ ካርፓስ ላይ እንዲገልጽ ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Kod-dəyişdirməsi uzun müddətli dilçilərə məxsusdur. Komputasiya işləri, sözlər və sosyal media məlumatlarına məxsusdur (Sitaram et al., 2019). Bu kağıt, 17-ci əsrlərdən 19-ci əsrlərdən Alman kitablarının birləşdirilməsini təsdiqləyici olaraq, çox formal kayıtlarında köd-dəyişməsi olaraq bu imkansız məsələləri dəyişdirir. Biz korpus içində altı dil (Latin, Fransız, İngilizce, İtalyan, İspanyol və Yunanlıq dillərin) arasındakı uzaqlaşıqlarını avtomatik təşkil edirik. Biz bu kitablarda kodu değiştirmək modellərinin və daha çox təhsil edilmiş söhbətlərin və sosyal media korporasının arasındakı fərqliyi çox çəkirik. Daha sonra, DTA corpusunda bir başqa matriks dilinin özelliklərindən kodu dəyişməsini təmin etmək üçün praktik işləri çəkirik. Bütün klassifikatlar optik karakterlərin tanımasına və sözlərin transkripcisinə çox nadir dilləri olan korpusa istifadə edildikdə xətaları azaltmaya kömək edə bilər.', 'hy': 'Կոդի փոխանակումը երկար հետաքրքրված լեզվաբաններ ունի, հատկապես հաշվարկների աշխատանքը կենտրոնացնում է խոսքի և սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տվյալների վրա (Սիթարամ և այլն., 2019 թ․։ Այս թղթին հակադրում է կոդի փոխակերպման այս ոչ տեղեկատվական օրինակները ավելի պաշտոնական ռեստորաններում, ուսումնասիրելով լեզուների խառնուրդը Դոյքս Տեքստարչիվի (ԴՏԱ) մեջ, 1406-ի կորպոսը հիմնականում գերմանացի գրքերից 17-ից 19-րդ դարից: Մենք ինքնաբերաբար նշում ենք և ձեռքով ստուգում ենք 6 ներգրավված լեզուների (լատիներեն, ֆրանսերեն, անգլերեն, իտալիա, իսպաներեն և հունասենի) տարածքները կորպուսում: Մենք քանակությամբ վերլուծում ենք այս գրքերի կոդի փոխանակելու կաղապարների և ավելի սովորաբար ուսումնասիրելի խոսքի և սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների կառուցվածքի տարբերությունները: Ավելին, մենք քննարկում ենք այն գործնական խնդիրը, որ կանխատեսենք կոդի փոխանակումը միայն մատրիքսի լեզվի առանձնահատկություններից DTI-ում: Այս դասակարգումները կարող են օգնել նվազեցնել սխալները, երբ օպտիկական ճանաչումը կամ խոսքի վերագրումը կիրառվում են հազվադեպ ներդրված լեզուներով մեծ մարմնի վրա:', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje kodova dugo zanima lingviste, s računalnim radom posebno usredotočenim na govor i podatke o društvenim medijima (Sitaram et al., 2019). Ovaj papir se suprotstavlja ovim neformalnim slučajevima prebacivanja koda na njezin izgled u formalnijim registrama, pregledavajući mješavinu jezika u Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), korpus od 1406 prvenstveno njemačkih knjiga iz 17. do 19. veka. Mi automatski annotiramo i ručno provjeravamo šest ugrađenih jezika (latinski, francuski, engleski, italijanski, španjolski i grčki) u korpusu. Mi kvantitativno analiziramo razlike između obrazaca zamjene kodova u ovim knjigama i onih iz običnije proučavanih govora i društvenih medijskih korpora. Osim toga, obraćamo se praktičnom zadatku predviđanja zamjene koda iz karakteristika jezika matrice samog u DTA korpusu. Takvi klasifikatori mogu pomoći smanjiti greške kada se primjenjuje optički priznanje karaktera ili prepisanje govora na veliki korpus sa rijetkim ugrađenim jezicima.', 'cs': 'Přepínání kódu se dlouhodobě zajímá lingvisty, přičemž výpočetní práce se zaměřuje zejména na data řeči a sociálních médií (Sitaram et al., 2019). Tento článek kontrastuje tyto neformální případy přepínání kódu k jeho výskytu ve formálnějších rejstřících tím, že zkoumá směs jazyků v Německém Textarchivu (DTA), korpusu 1406 především německých knih ze sedmnáctého až devatenáctého století. Automaticky anotujeme a ručně kontrolujeme rozpětí šesti vložených jazyků (latina, francouzština, angličtina, italština, španělština a řečtina) v korpusu. Kvantitativně analyzujeme rozdíly mezi modely přepínání kódu v těchto knihách a typicky studovanými korpusy řeči a sociálních médií. Dále se zabýváme praktickým úkolem predikce přepínání kódu z vlastností maticového jazyka samotného v korpusu DTA. Takové klasifikátory mohou pomoci snížit chyby při aplikaci optického rozpoznávání znaků nebo přepisu řeči na velký korpus se vzácnými vloženými jazyky.', 'ca': "El canvi de codis té molt de lingüistes interessats, amb treball computacional centrat en especial en la fala i les dades dels mitjans socials (Sitaram et al., 2019). Aquest paper contrasta aquests casos oficiosos de canvi de codi a la seva aparença en registres més oficials, examinant la mezcla de llengües del Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), un corpus de 1406 llibres principalment alemanys dels segles 17 al 19. Anotem automàticament i inspeccionem manualment les extensions de sis llengües incorporades (llatí, francès, anglès, italià, espanyol i grec) al corpus. Analitzem quantitativament les diferències entre els patrons de canvi de codi d'aquests llibres i aquells en corpores de discurs i mitjans socials més típicament estudiats. A més, ens ocupem de la tasca pràctica de predir el canvi de codi de les característiques del llenguatge de matrix només al corpus DTA. Aquests classificadors poden ajudar a reduir els errors quan el reconeixement òptic del caràcter o la transcripció fonamental s'aplica a un gran corpus amb llengües rares incorporades.", 'bn': 'কোড-পরিবর্তন অনেক আগ্রহী ভাষাবাদীদের কাছে রয়েছে, যাদের কাজ বিশেষ করে বিশেষ করে ভাষণ এবং সামাজিক মিডিয়া তথ্যের প্রতি মনোযোগ আকর এই পত্রিকাটি আরো আনুষ্ঠানিক নিবন্ধনে এই অফিসিয়াল কোড পরিবর্তনের ঘটনার বিরুদ্ধে বিরোধী হয়েছে, ডিউচ্চ টেক্সট্রাক্স্কারিভ (ডিটিএ) ভাষার মিশ্রণ পরীক্ষা করেছে, প্রধান ১৪০৬ আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষায় ছয়টি ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার স্পেন পরীক্ষা করি যা ল্যাটিন, ফরাসি, ইংরেজি, ইতালিয়ান, স্প্যানিশ, এবং গ্রীকের আমরা এই বইগুলোতে কোড পরিবর্তনের পার্থক্য বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং যারা বেশী সাধারণত ভাষণ ও সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম কোর্পোরায় পড়া হয়েছে ত এছাড়াও, আমরা ডিটিএ কোর্পাসের ম্যাট্রিক্স ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্য থেকে প্রত্যাখ্যান করার বাস্তবতার প্রকৃত কাজের কথা বলি। এই ধরনের শ্রেণীবিষয়গুলোকে সাহায্য করতে পারে যখন অপটিক্যাল ক্যারেক্টার স্বীকৃতি অথবা বক্তৃতা লিখিত বিশাল কোর্পাসে প্রয়ো', 'et': 'Koodi vahetamine on juba ammu huvitatud keeleteadlastest, kelle arvutustöö keskendub eelkõige kõne- ja sotsiaalmeedia andmetele (Sitaram jt., 2019). Käesolev töö võrdleb neid mitteametlikke koodi vahetamise juhtumeid selle ilmumisega ametlikumates registrites, uurides keelte segu Deutsches Textarchivis (DTA), mis koosneb 1406 peamiselt saksa raamatust 17.–19. sajandist. Korpuses märgitakse automaatselt ja kontrollime käsitsi kuue manustatud keele (ladina, prantsuse, inglise, itaalia, hispaania ja kreeka keel) ulatusi. Analüüsime kvantitatiivselt erinevusi koodivahetuse mustrite vahel nendes raamatutes ning tavalisemalt uuritud kõne- ja sotsiaalmeedia korpustes. Lisaks käsitleme praktilist ülesannet ennustada koodivahetust ainult maatrikskeele omadustelt DTA korpuses. Sellised klassifitseerijad aitavad vähendada vigu, kui optilist märgituvastust või kõne transkriptsiooni rakendatakse haruldaste manustatud keeltega suurele korpusele.', 'fi': 'Koodinvaihto on jo pitkään kiinnostanut kielitieteilijöitä, joiden laskennallinen työ keskittyy erityisesti puhe- ja sosiaalisen median dataan (Sitaram et al., 2019). Tämä artikkeli vertailee näitä epävirallisia koodinvaihtotapauksia sen esiintymiseen virallisissa rekistereissä tarkastelemalla kielten sekoitusta Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), joka koostuu 1406 pääasiassa saksalaisesta kirjasta 1600–1800-luvuilta. Korpuseen merkitään automaattisesti kuusi upotettua kieltä (latina, ranska, englanti, italia, espanja ja kreikka) ja tarkastamme ne manuaalisesti. Analysoimme kvantitatiivisesti näiden kirjojen koodinvaihtomallien ja tyypillisemmin tutkittujen puhe- ja sosiaalisen median korpusten välisiä eroja. Lisäksi käsittelemme käytännön tehtävää ennustaa koodinvaihtoa pelkästään matriisikielen ominaisuuksista DTA-korpusessa. Tällaiset luokittelijat voivat auttaa vähentämään virheitä, kun optista merkkitunnistusta tai puheen transkriptiota käytetään suureen korpuseen, jossa on harvinaisia sulautettuja kieliä.', 'sk': 'Preklapljanje kod že dolgo zanima jezikoslovce, pri čemer se računalniško delo osredotoča predvsem na govorne in družbene medije podatke (Sitaram et al., 2019). Ta prispevek razlikuje te neformalne primere preklapljanja kod s pojavom v bolj formalnih registrih s preučevanjem mešanice jezikov v Deutsches Textarchivu (DTA), korpusu 1406 predvsem nemških knjig iz 17. do 19. stoletja. Samodejno označimo in ročno pregledujemo razpone šestih vgrajenih jezikov (latinščina, francoščina, angleščina, italijanščina, španščina in grščina) v korpusu. Količinsko analiziramo razlike med vzorci preklapljanja kod v teh knjigah in tistimi v bolj običajno preučevanih govornih korpusih in družbenih medijev. Poleg tega v korpusu DTA obravnavamo praktično nalogo napovedovanja preklapljanja kod od značilnosti matričnega jezika samega. Takšni klasifikatorji lahko pomagajo zmanjšati napake pri optičnem prepoznavanju znakov ali prepoznavanju govora v velikem korpusu z redkimi vgrajenimi jeziki.', 'ha': "Shirin kodi yana da wasu na'ura masu son zũciya, da aikin lissafi mai lissafa, mai ƙayyade wa magana da mutane (Sitaram et al, 2019). Wannan karatun na motsi da waɗannan masu takarda kodi-mai musanya zuwa appearance in wasu marubuta rasmi, da jarrabi the haɗiyar harshen cikin the Deutsches Textarchive (DTA), a Corbas of 1406 mainlin littattafai Jarman daga the 17-19 centurs. Ina zartar da shi farat ɗaya kuma ke jarraba spani 6 cikin harshen wanda aka shigar (Latin, French, Ingiriya, Italian, Isbanish, kuma Gironiya). Tuna sanar da gakiya a tsakanin musanya na kodi cikin waɗannan littattafafan da waɗanda ke karãtun magana da firma na jamii. Furan haka, Munã jãyayya masu aikin da za'a yi bayani ga kodi mai musanya daga feature of the language of matrix only in the DTA code. Such classifiers can help reduce errors when optical character recognition or speech transcription is applied to a large corpus with rare embedded languages.", 'jv': 'Ngubah-ngubah sistem sing wis ana bangistar luwih ingkang dipun, lan gunakake kompjuter sing mungkur nggawe barang lan data komunitas (Sitaram et al, 2011). Perintah sing mengkane karo perusahaan kelas in formal sing nguasai kode nggawe ngupakan anyar tentang karo registar formal sing, nguasai nggunakake karo perusahaan langkara ning kelas textarhik (DMT), sak cara-cara sing tek 1,4006 dadi pasar sedhaya sampek tanggal XIX sampek 19. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh lan ngubah manut karo akeh basa sing luwih basa (Latin é, Perancis, Inggris, Itilyan, Spanish, lan Grik) lan nganggo cara-cara. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh pisan langgar sampeyan itéparan ning kode-nambah kuwi buku iki lan kabèh liyane sing luwih basa sak cara-sak liyane sak wae nguasai perusahaan media sokusaha. Label Kelaser perangkat dipunangé nunggo akeh akeh nunggo akeh operasi kanggo nguasai karo akeh operasi kapan karo akeh operasi kanggo nguasai akeh bantuan karo akeh basa sing sumulakno.', 'he': "למחליפת קודים יש שפתים מעוניינים ארוכים, בעבודה מחשבית במיוחד מתמקדת בנתונים של נאום ומדיה חברתית (Sitaram et al., 2019). הנייר הזה משתנה במקרים לא רשמיים אלה של החלפת קוד למופע שלו ברשומות רשמיים יותר, על ידי לבדוק את הערבוב של שפות בדוקס טקסטארצ'יב (DTA), קורפוס של 1406 בעיקר ספרים גרמנים מהמאות ה-17 עד ה-19. אנו מצביעים באופן אוטומטי ובדיקות ידנית שש שפות מעורבות (לטינית, צרפתית, אנגלית, איטלקית, ספרדית, יוונית) בקורפוס. אנו מנתחים באופן כמוני את ההבדלים בין דפוסי החלפת קודים בספרים האלה ואלה בתוך דיבורים למדורים באופן טיפוסי יותר ובתקשורת תקשורת חברתית. בנוסף, אנו מתייחסים למשימה המרשמית של לחזות שינוי קוד מאפיינים של שפת המטריקס לבד בקורפוס DTA. Such classifiers can help reduce errors when optical character recognition or speech transcription is applied to a large corpus with rare embedded languages.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ལ་བསྒྱུར་སོང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག This paper contrasts these in formal instances of code-switching to its appearance in more formal registers, by examining the mixture of languages in the Deutsches Textarchiv (DTA), a corpus of 1406 primarily German books from the 17th to 19th centuries. ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྦུང་ཚང་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་༦་ཀྱི་ནང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིན་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་དེབ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་རྩིས་གཞི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་། ལས་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བསླབས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས འོན་ཀྱང་། Such classifiers can help reduce errors when optical character recognition or speech transcription is applied to a large corpus with rare embedded languages.'}
{'en': 'Connecting the Dots Between Fact Verification and Fake News Detection', 'ar': 'ربط النقاط بين التحقق من صحة الأخبار واكتشاف الأخبار الزائفة', 'pt': 'Conectando os pontos entre a verificação de fatos e a detecção de notícias falsas', 'es': 'Conectando los puntos entre la verificación de hechos y la detección de noticias falsas', 'fr': 'Faire le lien entre la vérification des faits et la détection des fausses nouvelles', 'ja': '事実確認と偽ニュース検出の間のドットの接続', 'zh': '连事验假新闻检之间', 'hi': 'तथ्य सत्यापन और नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के बीच डॉट्स कनेक्ट करना', 'ru': 'Связь точек между проверкой фактов и обнаружением фейковых новостей', 'ga': 'Na Poncanna a Nascadh Idir Fíorú Fíricí agus Brath Nuachta Bréige', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A pontok összekapcsolása a tények ellenőrzése és a hamis hírek felismerése között', 'el': 'Σύνδεση των σημείων μεταξύ επαλήθευσης γεγονότων και ανίχνευσης πλαστών ειδήσεων', 'kk': 'Деректерді тексеру мен жаңалықтарды табу арасындағы нүктелерді қосылуName', 'lt': 'Faktų patikrinimo ir suklastotų naujienų nustatymo taškų sujungimas', 'mk': 'Поврзување на точките помеѓу верификацијата на фактите и детекцијата на лажни вести', 'it': 'Collegare i punti tra verifica dei fatti e rilevamento di notizie false', 'mt': 'Nikkollegaw il-Punti bejn il-Verifika tal-Fatti u d-Detezzjoni tal-Aħbarijiet Falsi', 'ml': 'ഫാക്റ്റ് സെക്ഷന്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും ഫെയിക്ക് വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീവിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള സ്ഥാനങ', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ шалгах болон хуурамч мэдээллийн хоорондоо цэгүүдийг холбох', 'ms': 'Sambungan Titik Antara Pengesahan Fakta dan Pengesanan Berita Salah', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Povezivanje tačka između provjere činjenica i otkrivanja lažnih vesti', 'pl': 'Połączenie punktów między weryfikacją faktów a wykrywaniem fałszywych wiadomości', 'ro': 'Conectarea punctelor dintre verificarea faptelor și detectarea știrilor false', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Koppla ihop punkterna mellan faktakontroll och detektering av falska nyheter', 'so': 'Ku xiriirka dukaanka u dhexeeya Baaritaanka xaqiiqda iyo baaritaanka warbixinta beenta ah', 'ta': 'உண்மை செய்தி மற்றும் பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு இடையே புள்ளிகளை இணைக்கிறது', 'ur': 'حقیقت کی تصدیق اور غلط خبروں کی آزمائش کے درمیان دائٹوں کا اتصال کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Kết nối điểm giữa việc kiểm tra sự thật và phát hiện bản tin giả giả', 'hr': 'Povezivanje točka između provjere činjenica i otkrivanja lažnih vijesti', 'nl': 'Verbinding maken tussen feitenverificatie en vals nieuws detectie', 'da': 'Forbindelse af punkterne mellem bekræftelse af fakta og detektering af falske nyheder', 'id': 'Connecting the Dots Between Fact Verification and Fake News Detection', 'ko': '사실 검증과 가짜 뉴스 검측을 연계하다', 'de': 'Verbindung zwischen Faktenverifizierung und Fake News Detection', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Dots Katika Uthibitisho wa Ukweli na Utafiti wa Habari Hata', 'bg': 'Свързване на точките между проверката на факти и откриването на фалшиви новини', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Lidhja e pikave midis verifikimit të fakteve dhe zbulimit të lajmeve të rreme', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'fa': 'در ارتباط نقطه\u200cها بین بررسی حقیقت و بازرسی خبرهای دروغ', 'tr': 'Doğruları gerçek doğrulama ve sahte haberler tarafından bağlanma', 'bn': 'ফ্যাক্ট সার্ফিকেশন এবং ফিক সংবাদ সনাক্তির মধ্যে ডট সংযোগ সংযোগ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Povezivanje točka između provjere činjenica i otkrivanja lažnih vijesti', 'cs': 'Propojení bodů mezi ověřováním faktů a detekcí falešných zpráv', 'hy': 'Connecting the Dots Between Fact Verification and Fake News Detection', 'az': 'Həqiqət Verirməsi və Faylı Haqq İşləməsi arasında Nöqtələri Bağlanır', 'ca': 'Conectar els punts entre la verificació de fets i la detecció de notícies falses', 'et': 'Faktide kontrollimise ja valeuudiste tuvastamise punktide ühendamine', 'fi': 'Faktojen todentamisen ja väärien uutisten havaitsemisen välisten pisteiden yhdistäminen', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'חיבור הנקודות בין בדיקת העובדות לבדיקת חדשות מזויפות', 'sk': 'Povezovanje točk med preverjanjem dejstev in odkrivanjem lažnih novic', 'bo': 'དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་དང་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་དགོས་པའི་ཚག་གྲངས་སྦྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Fact verification models have enjoyed a fast advancement in the last two years with the development of pre-trained language models like BERT and the release of large scale datasets such as FEVER. However, the challenging problem of fake news detection has not benefited from the improvement of fact verification models, which is closely related to fake news detection. In this paper, we propose a simple yet effective approach to connect the dots between fact verification and fake news detection. Our approach first employs a text summarization model pre-trained on news corpora to summarize the long news article into a short claim. Then we use a fact verification model pre-trained on the FEVER dataset to detect whether the input news article is real or fake. Our approach makes use of the recent success of fact verification models and enables zero-shot fake news detection, alleviating the need of large scale training data to train fake news detection models. Experimental results on FakenewsNet, a benchmark dataset for fake news detection, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach.', 'ar': 'تمتعت نماذج التحقق من الحقائق بتقدم سريع في العامين الماضيين مع تطوير نماذج لغة مُدربة مسبقًا مثل BERT وإصدار مجموعات بيانات كبيرة الحجم مثل FEVER. ومع ذلك ، فإن المشكلة الصعبة المتمثلة في الكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة لم تستفد من تحسين نماذج التحقق من الحقائق ، والتي ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا باكتشاف الأخبار المزيفة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا بسيطًا ولكنه فعال لربط النقاط بين التحقق من الحقائق واكتشاف الأخبار المزيفة. يستخدم نهجنا أولاً نموذج تلخيص نصي تم تدريبه مسبقًا على المؤسسات الإخبارية لتلخيص المقالة الإخبارية الطويلة في مطالبة قصيرة. ثم نستخدم نموذجًا للتحقق من صحة تم تدريبه مسبقًا على مجموعة بيانات FEVER لاكتشاف ما إذا كانت المقالة الإخبارية المدخلة حقيقية أم مزيفة. يستفيد منهجنا من النجاح الأخير لنماذج التحقق من الحقائق ويتيح الكشف عن الأخبار الوهمية بدون إطلاق النار ، مما يخفف من الحاجة إلى بيانات التدريب على نطاق واسع لتدريب نماذج الكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على FakenewsNet ، وهي مجموعة بيانات معيارية للكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة ، فعالية نهجنا المقترح.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de verificação de fatos tiveram um rápido avanço nos últimos dois anos com o desenvolvimento de modelos de linguagem pré-treinados como BERT e o lançamento de conjuntos de dados de grande escala como FEVER. No entanto, o problema desafiador da detecção de notícias falsas não se beneficiou do aprimoramento dos modelos de verificação de fatos, que estão intimamente relacionados à detecção de notícias falsas. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem simples, mas eficaz, para conectar os pontos entre a verificação de fatos e a detecção de notícias falsas. Nossa abordagem primeiro emprega um modelo de sumarização de texto pré-treinado em corpora de notícias para resumir o longo artigo de notícias em uma curta afirmação. Em seguida, usamos um modelo de verificação de fatos pré-treinado no conjunto de dados FEVER para detectar se a notícia de entrada é real ou falsa. Nossa abordagem faz uso do sucesso recente dos modelos de verificação de fatos e permite a detecção de notícias falsas de tiro zero, aliviando a necessidade de dados de treinamento em larga escala para treinar modelos de detecção de notícias falsas. Resultados experimentais no FakenewsNet, um conjunto de dados de referência para detecção de notícias falsas, demonstram a eficácia da nossa abordagem proposta.', 'es': 'Los modelos de verificación de datos han experimentado un rápido avance en los últimos dos años con el desarrollo de modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados, como BERT, y la publicación de conjuntos de datos a gran escala, como FEVER. Sin embargo, el difícil problema de la detección de noticias falsas no se ha beneficiado de la mejora de los modelos de verificación de hechos, que está estrechamente relacionada con la detección de noticias falsas. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque simple pero efectivo para conectar los puntos entre la verificación de hechos y la detección de noticias falsas. Nuestro enfoque primero emplea un modelo de resumen de texto previamente entrenado en los cuerpos de noticias para resumir el artículo de noticias largo en una afirmación breve. Luego, utilizamos un modelo de verificación de hechos previamente entrenado en el conjunto de datos FEVER para detectar si el artículo de noticias introducido es real o falso. Nuestro enfoque hace uso del éxito reciente de los modelos de verificación de hechos y permite la detección de noticias falsas sin impacto, lo que alivia la necesidad de datos de capacitación a gran escala para entrenar modelos de detección de noticias falsas. Los resultados experimentales en FakeNewsNet, un conjunto de datos de referencia para la detección de noticias falsas, demuestran la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto.', 'fr': "Les modèles de vérification des faits ont connu une évolution rapide au cours des deux dernières années avec le développement de modèles de langage préformés tels que BERT et la publication de jeux de données à grande échelle tels que FEVER. Cependant, le difficile problème de la détection des fausses nouvelles n'a pas bénéficié de l'amélioration des modèles de vérification des faits, qui est étroitement liée à la détection des fausses nouvelles. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche simple mais efficace pour faire le lien entre la vérification des faits et la détection des fausses nouvelles. Notre approche utilise d'abord un modèle de résumé de texte pré-formé sur des corpus d'actualités pour résumer le long article d'actualité en une courte réclamation. Ensuite, nous utilisons un modèle de vérification des faits pré-entraîné sur l'ensemble de données FEVER pour détecter si l'article d'actualité saisi est réel ou faux. Notre approche s'appuie sur le récent succès des modèles de vérification des faits et permet une détection zéro des fausses nouvelles, réduisant ainsi le besoin de données de formation à grande échelle pour former des modèles de détection de fausses nouvelles. Les résultats expérimentaux sur FakeNewsNet, un ensemble de données de référence pour la détection des fausses nouvelles, démontrent l'efficacité de l'approche que nous proposons.", 'zh': '事验模形,于往二年中取速,发BERT等预训习言语模样,并发FEVER等大集。 然假新闻检此挑战性,未尝有益于事,与假新闻检相关也。 本文中,略而有效者,以接事验假新闻检之间。 吾法先用新闻语料库先练之文摘要模形,总长篇新闻为短长之声。 然后用 FEVER 数集上预练之事验模形以检输者新闻文之真伪也。 吾道因近成之事以验模形,成零次假新闻检,轻大练之数假新闻检模形之求。 FakenewsNet(假新闻检准集)实验验其有效性。', 'ja': '事実検証モデルは、BERTのような事前トレーニングされた言語モデルの開発と、FEVERのような大規模データセットのリリースにより、過去2年間で急速な進歩を遂げています。 しかし、フェイクニュース検出の厳しい問題は、フェイクニュース検出と密接に関連する事実検証モデルの改善には恵まれていない。 本稿では、事実検証とフェイクニュース検出の間のドットを結び付けるためのシンプルでありながら効果的なアプローチを提案する。 当社のアプローチでは、まず、ニュースコーラで事前にトレーニングされたテキスト要約モデルを使用して、長いニュース記事を短いクレームに要約します。 次に、FEVERデータセットについて事実検証モデルを使用して、入力されたニュース記事が本物か偽物かを検出します。 当社のアプローチは、最近の事実検証モデルの成功を利用し、ゼロショットのフェイクニュース検出を可能にし、フェイクニュース検出モデルをトレーニングするための大規模なトレーニングデータの必要性を軽減します。 フェイクニュース検出のためのベンチマークデータセットであるFakenewsNetの実験結果は、提案されたアプローチの有効性を示しています。', 'ru': 'Модели проверки фактов быстро продвигались в последние два года с разработкой предварительно обученных языковых моделей, таких как BERT, и выпуском крупномасштабных наборов данных, таких как ЛИХОРАДКА. Тем не менее, сложная проблема обнаружения фейковых новостей не выиграла от улучшения моделей проверки фактов, которые тесно связаны с обнаружением фейковых новостей. В этой статье мы предлагаем простой, но эффективный подход, чтобы связать точки между проверкой фактов и обнаружением фейковых новостей. Наш подход сначала использует модель обобщения текста, предварительно обученную на новостных корпорациях, чтобы обобщить длинную новостную статью в короткую претензию. Затем мы используем модель проверки фактов, предварительно обученную на наборе данных о ЛИХОРАДКЕ, чтобы определить, является ли введенная статья новостью реальной или поддельной. Наш подход использует недавний успех моделей проверки фактов и включает обнаружение поддельных новостей с нулевым выстрелом, облегчая потребность в больших данных обучения для того чтобы тренировать модели обнаружения поддельных новостей. Экспериментальные результаты на FakenewsNet, эталонном наборе данных для обнаружения фейковых новостей, демонстрируют эффективность нашего предлагаемого подхода.', 'hi': 'तथ्य सत्यापन मॉडल ने पिछले दो वर्षों में BERT जैसे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के विकास और बुखार जैसे बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट की रिहाई के साथ एक तेजी से प्रगति का आनंद लिया है। हालांकि, नकली समाचार का पता लगाने की चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या को तथ्य सत्यापन मॉडल के सुधार से लाभ नहीं हुआ है, जो नकली समाचार का पता लगाने से निकटता से संबंधित है। इस पेपर में, हम तथ्य सत्यापन और नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के बीच डॉट्स को जोड़ने के लिए एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण पहले एक पाठ summarization मॉडल को नियोजित करता है जो समाचार कॉर्पोरेट पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित होता है ताकि लंबे समाचार लेख को एक छोटे से दावे में संक्षेप में प्रस्तुत किया जा सके। फिर हम एक तथ्य सत्यापन मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं जो बुखार डेटासेट पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित है ताकि यह पता लगाया जा सके कि इनपुट समाचार लेख असली या नकली है या नहीं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण तथ्य सत्यापन मॉडल की हालिया सफलता का उपयोग करता है और शून्य-शॉट नकली समाचार का पता लगाने में सक्षम बनाता है, नकली समाचार का पता लगाने वाले मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता को कम करता है। FakenewsNet पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम, नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट, हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn tapa déanta ar mhúnlaí fíoraithe fíricí le dhá bhliain anuas nuair a forbraíodh samhlacha teanga réamhoilte mar BERT agus scaoileadh tacair sonraí ar scála mór mar FEVER. Mar sin féin, níor bhain fadhb dhúshlánach braite nuachta falsa leas as feabhas a chur ar mhúnlaí fíoraithe fíricí, a bhaineann go dlúth le braite nuachta falsa. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige simplí ach éifeachtach chun na poncanna a nascadh idir fíorú fíricí agus brath nuachta bréige. Úsáideann ár gcur chuige ar dtús múnla achoimrithe téacs atá réamh-oilte ar chorparáid nuachta chun achoimre a dhéanamh ar an alt fada nuachta ina éileamh gairid. Ansin bainimid úsáid as samhail fíoraithe fíricí réamh-oilte ar an tacar sonraí FEVER chun a bhrath an bhfuil an t-alt nuachta ionchuir fíor nó bréagach. Úsáideann ár gcur chuige an rath a bhí le déanaí ar shamhlacha fíoraithe fíricí agus cuireann sé ar chumas braite nuachta bréige gan urchar, rud a laghdaíonn an gá atá le sonraí oiliúna ar scála mór chun samhlacha braite nuachta bréige a oiliúint. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar FakenewsNet, tacar sonraí tagarmharcála do bhrath nuachta bréige, éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige molta.', 'ka': 'ფაქტის შემოწმება მოდელები ბოლო ორი წლის წინ წარმოდგენა, როგორც BERT და დიდი მონაცემების გახსნა, როგორც FEVER. მაგრამ, ტალქტური ინფორმაციის განახლების შესაძლებელი პრობლემა არ გამოიყენება ფაქტიური განახლების მოდელების შესაძლებლობადან, რომელიც ძალიან დაკავშირებულია ტალქტური ინფორ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ გვეძლევა ერთადერთი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური პროგრამა, რომელიც ფაქტიური შემოწმება და ტალქტიური ინფორმაციის განახლება დაკავშირება. ჩვენი პირველი პროგორმა ტექსტის კუმუნიზაციის მოდელს, რომელიც ახალგაზომის კომპორაციაში უნდა გავაკეთოთ ძალიან ახალგაზომის ანტიკის კომპირ შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ფაქტის შემოწმება მოდელი, რომელსაც FEVER მონაცემების შესახებ განვიცემს თუ არა მონაცემები ინფორმაცია რეალია ან ტალქტია. ჩვენი პროგორმა გამოიყენება ფაქტის შემოწმებას მოდელეების შესაძლებლობა და შესაძლებელია ნულ-სტატის ტალქტური ინფორმაციის განახლება, რომელიც უფრო დიდი განახლების მონაცემების შესა ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთ პვჱსლრართ ნა FakenewsNet, ბანქმაპკთრვ ეატვკრთთ ჱა ტალქთრვ ნჲგთნთ ევრვკრთპაŒა, ევმჲჟრთპაარ ევტვკრთგნჲჟრრა ნა ნაქთჲრ', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt két évben a tények ellenőrzésének modellei gyors fejlődést élveztek az előkészített nyelvi modellek, mint például a BERT fejlesztésével és a nagyszabású adatkészletek, mint például a FEVER kiadásával. A hamis hírek felismerésének kihívást jelentő problémája azonban nem használta a tények ellenőrzési modelleinek javítását, amelyek szorosan kapcsolódnak a hamis hírek felismeréséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony megközelítést javasolunk a pontok összekapcsolására a tények ellenőrzése és a hamis hírek felismerése között. Megközelítésünk először egy olyan szövegösszefoglaló modellt alkalmaz, amelyet előre képzettek a hírcsoportokra, hogy rövid állításba foglaljuk a hosszú cikket. Ezután a FEVER adatkészletre előzetesen kiképzett tény-ellenőrző modellt használunk annak felismerésére, hogy a bemeneti hírek valódi-e vagy hamis. Megközelítésünk a közelmúltbeli tények-ellenőrzési modelleket használja, és lehetővé teszi a nulla lövéses hamis hírek felismerését, enyhítve a nagyszabású képzési adatok igényét a hamis hírek felismerésére vonatkozó modellek képzéséhez. A FakenewsNet kísérleti eredményei, amely a hamis hírek felismerésére szolgáló referenciaadatkészlet, igazolják javasolt megközelítésünk hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα επαλήθευσης γεγονότων έχουν σημειώσει ταχεία πρόοδο τα τελευταία δύο χρόνια με την ανάπτυξη προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων όπως το BERT και την απελευθέρωση μεγάλης κλίμακας συνόλων δεδομένων όπως το FEVER. Ωστόσο, το προκλητικό πρόβλημα της ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων δεν ωφελήθηκε από τη βελτίωση των μοντέλων επαλήθευσης γεγονότων, η οποία συνδέεται στενά με την ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για τη σύνδεση των σημείων μεταξύ επαλήθευσης γεγονότων και ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων. Η προσέγγισή μας χρησιμοποιεί πρώτα ένα μοντέλο σύνοψης κειμένου προεκπαίδευσης σε νέα σώματα για να συνοψίσει το μακρύ άρθρο ειδήσεων σε μια σύντομη διεκδίκηση. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μοντέλο επαλήθευσης γεγονότων προ-εκπαιδευμένο στο σύνολο δεδομένων για να ανιχνεύσουμε αν το άρθρο ειδήσεων εισόδου είναι πραγματικό ή ψεύτικο. Η προσέγγισή μας χρησιμοποιεί την πρόσφατη επιτυχία των μοντέλων επαλήθευσης γεγονότων και επιτρέπει την ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων μηδενικού πυροβολισμού, ανακουφίζοντας την ανάγκη δεδομένων κατάρτισης μεγάλης κλίμακας για την κατάρτιση μοντέλων ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς για την ανίχνευση ψευδών ειδήσεων, καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας.', 'it': "I modelli di verifica dei fatti hanno registrato un rapido progresso negli ultimi due anni con lo sviluppo di modelli linguistici pre-formati come BERT e il rilascio di set di dati su larga scala come FEVER. Tuttavia, il difficile problema del rilevamento delle fake news non ha beneficiato del miglioramento dei modelli di verifica dei fatti, che è strettamente correlato al rilevamento delle fake news. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio semplice ma efficace per collegare i punti tra la verifica dei fatti e il rilevamento delle fake news. Il nostro approccio impiega in primo luogo un modello di sintesi testuale pre-addestrato sui corpi di notizie per riassumere il lungo articolo di notizie in una breve affermazione. Quindi usiamo un modello di verifica dei fatti pre-addestrato sul set di dati FEVER per rilevare se l'articolo di notizie di input è reale o falso. Il nostro approccio si avvale del recente successo dei modelli di verifica dei fatti e consente il rilevamento delle fake news zero-shot, alleviando la necessità di dati di formazione su larga scala per formare modelli di rilevamento delle fake news. Risultati sperimentali su FakenewsNet, un set di dati di riferimento per il rilevamento delle fake news, dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto.", 'mk': 'Моделите за верификација на фактите уживаа брз напредок во изминатите две години со развојот на предобучени јазички модели како Берт и објавувањето на големи податоци како ФЕВЕР. However, the challenging problem of fake news detection has not benefited from the improvement of fact verification models, which is closely related to fake news detection.  Во овој весник предложуваме едноставен, но ефикасен пристап за поврзување на точките помеѓу верификацијата на фактите и детекцијата на лажни вести. Нашиот пристап најпрво користи модел за резултат на текстот кој е предобучен на новинската корпора за да ја резултира долгата вест статија во кратка тврдина. Потоа користиме модел за верификација на факти кој е претрениран на податоците на ФЕВЕР за да откриеме дали статијата за внесување на вести е вистинска или лажна. Нашиот пристап го искористува неодамнешниот успех на моделите за верификација на факти и овозможува нула-снимка на лажни вести детекција, олеснувајќи ја потребата од големи податоци за обука на лажни модели за детекција на вести. Експерименталните резултати на FakenewsNet, спореден податок за детекција на лажни вести, ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на нашиот предложен пристап.', 'kk': 'Фактикалық тексеру үлгілері соңғы екі жылда BERT секілді тіл үлгілерін жасау және FEVER секілді үлкен масштаб деректер жиындарын шығару үшін тез жағдайды. Бірақ жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау мәселесі факты тексеру үлгілерін жақсартуға арналмайды, бұл жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау үлгілерімен жақын байланысты. Бұл қағазда, факты тексеру мен жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау арасындағы нүктелерді қосылу үшін қарапайым және эффективні тәртібін ұсынамыз. Біздің тәсіліміміз біріншіден жаңалық корпорасындағы мәтін тәсіліктеме үлгісін қолданып, ұзын жаңалық мақаласын қысқа тәсіліктемеге жазылады Содан кейін біз FEVER деректер жиынында алдындағы тексеру үлгісін қолданып, жаңалық мақаланың шын немесе жалғыз екенін анықтау үшін. Біздің тәсіліміз тексеру үлгілерінің жаңа сәттігін пайдаланатын және нөл сәтті жаңалықтарды анықтауға мүмкіндік береді, жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін үлкен масштаб оқыту деректерінің қаже FakenewsNet- тің эксперименталдық нәтижесі, жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін белгілі деректер жиыны көрсетеді. Біздің ұсынған тәсіліміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Faktų tikrinimo modeliai per pastaruosius dvejus metus sparčiai pasiekė pažangą kuriant iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius, pavyzdžiui, BERT, ir skelbiant didelio masto duomenų rinkinius, pavyzdžiui, FEVER. Tačiau sunki suklastotų naujienų aptikimo problema nebuvo naudinga gerinant faktų tikrinimo modelius, kurie yra glaudžiai susiję su suklastotų naujienų aptikimu. Šiame dokumente siūlome paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą požiūrį, kad taškai būtų sujungti tarp faktų patikrinimo ir suklastotų naujienų aptikimo. Mūsų požiūris pirmiausia naudoja teksto santraukos model į, parengtą naujienų korporai, kad ilgos naujienos straipsnį apibendrintų į trumpą teiginį. Tuomet naudojame faktų tikrinimo model į, parengtą FEVER duomenų rinkinyje, siekiant nustatyti, ar įvesties naujienų straipsnis yra tikras ar suklastotas. Mūsų požiūris pasinaudoja neseniai sėkmingais faktų tikrinimo modeliais ir leidžia nuliniu mastu nustatyti suklastotas naujienas, mažinant didelio masto mokymo duomenų poreikį suklastoti suklastotus naujienų aptikimo modelius. Eksperimentiniai FakenewsNet, lyginamojo duomenų rinkinio, skirto suklastotų naujienų aptikimui, rezultatai rodo mūsų siūlomo požiūrio veiksmingumą.', 'ms': 'Model pengesahan fakta telah menikmati kemajuan yang pantas dalam dua tahun terakhir dengan pembangunan model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih seperti BERT dan pembebasan set data skala besar seperti FEVER. Namun, masalah mencabar pengesan berita palsu tidak telah berguna dari peningkatan model pengesahan fakta, yang berkaitan dengan pengesahan berita palsu. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan sederhana tetapi efektif untuk menyambungkan titik antara pengesahan fakta dan pengesan berita palsu. Pertama, pendekatan kita menggunakan model ringkasan teks yang dilatih-dilatih pada korpra berita untuk ringkasan artikel berita panjang menjadi tuntutan pendek. Kemudian kita gunakan model pengesahan fakta yang dilatih-dilatih pada set data FEVER untuk mengesan sama ada artikel berita input adalah nyata atau palsu. Pendekatan kami menggunakan kejayaan baru-baru ini model pengesahan fakta dan membolehkan pengesan berita palsu 0-shot, mengurangi keperluan data latihan skala besar untuk melatih model pengesahan berita palsu. Keputusan percubaan pada FakenewsNet, set data benchmark untuk pengesan berita palsu, menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan yang kami cadangkan.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ രണ്ടു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d സത്യം ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരു വേഗത്തില്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണനം ആസ്വദിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെപ്പോലെ മോഡല എന്നാലും കള്ള വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിലാസപ്രശ്നം സത്യം ഉറപ്പുവരുത്തുന്ന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് മെച്ചപ്പെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ പ്രാപ്തികമായ ഒരു വഴിയെടുക്കുന്നു സത്യത്തെ ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നതിനും തെറ്റായ വാര്\u200dത് നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് ആദ്യം ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ മാതൃകയാണ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാര്\u200dത്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d FEVER ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിനു മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു സത്യം ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോ നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത വിജയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുണ് Experimental results on FakenewsNet, a benchmark dataset for fake news detection, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ verifika tal-fatti gawdew avvanz mgħa ġġel fl-aħħar sentejn bl-iżvilupp ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel bħall-BERT u r-rilaxx ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira bħall-FEVER. Madankollu, il-problema ta’ sfida tal-individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet foloz ma bbenefikatx mit-titjib tal-mudelli ta’ verifika tal-fatti, li huma relatati mill-qrib mal-individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet foloz. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ sempliċi iżda effettiv biex nikkollegaw il-punti bejn il-verifika tal-fatti u l-individwazzjoni tal-a ħbarijiet foloz. L-approċċ tagħna l-ewwel juża mudell ta’ sommarju tat-test imħarreġ minn qabel fuq korpora tal-a ħbarijiet biex jinġabar sommarju tal-artikolu twil tal-aħbarijiet f’dikjarazzjoni qasira. Imbagħad nużaw mudell ta’ verifika tal-fatti mħarreġ minn qabel fuq is-sett tad-dejta FEVER biex nidentifikaw jekk l-artikolu tal-a ħbarijiet tal-input huwiex reali jew fals. L-approċċ tagħna jagħmel użu mis-suċċess reċenti tal-mudelli ta’ verifika tal-fatti u jippermetti l-individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet foloz mingħajr skopijiet, u jtaffi l-ħtieġa ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ fuq skala kbira biex jitħarrġu mudelli ta’ individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet foloz. Riżultati esperimentali fuq FakenewsNet, sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza għall-individwazzjoni ta’ a ħbarijiet foloz, juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost tagħna.', 'pl': 'Modele weryfikacji faktów cieszyły się szybkim postępem w ciągu ostatnich dwóch lat dzięki opracowaniu wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych, takich jak BERT i udostępnianiu dużych zbiorów danych, takich jak FEVER. Jednak trudny problem wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości nie skorzystał z udoskonalenia modeli weryfikacji faktów, co jest ściśle związane z wykrywaniem fałszywych wiadomości. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy proste, ale skuteczne podejście do połączenia punktów między weryfikacją faktów a wykrywaniem fałszywych wiadomości. Nasze podejście wykorzystuje najpierw model podsumowania tekstu wstępnie przeszkolony na korpusach informacyjnych, aby podsumować długi artykuł wiadomościowy w krótkie twierdzenie. Następnie używamy modelu weryfikacji faktów wstępnie przeszkolonego na zbiorze danych FEVER, aby wykryć, czy wejściowy artykuł wiadomości jest prawdziwy, czy fałszywy. Nasze podejście wykorzystuje najnowsze sukcesy modeli weryfikacji faktów i umożliwia zero-shot wykrywanie fałszywych wiadomości, zmniejszając potrzebę szkoleniowych danych na dużą skalę do szkolenia modeli wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości. Wyniki eksperymentalne na FakenewsNet, zestawie danych referencyjnych do wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości, pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia.', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн хоёр жилийн дотор жинхэнэ шалгалтын загварууд BERT шиг урд сургалтын хэл загваруудыг хөгжүүлж, FEVER шиг том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангуудыг гаргаж байна. Гэхдээ хуурамч мэдээг олох асуудал нь хуурамч мэдээллийн мэдээллээс ойролцоогоор холбогдсон шалгалтын загваруудыг сайжруулахаас ашиглахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид үнэндээ шийдвэрлэх болон хуурамч мэдээний нээлттэй хоорондын цэгүүдийг холбох энгийн ч үр дүнтэй арга зам зааж байна. Эхлээд бидний арга барилга нь мэдээллийн корпора дээр урт мэдээллийн барилгыг богино хэлбэрээр тайлбарлах үед мөн хэвлэлийн жинхэнэ загварыг ашигладаг. Тэгээд бид FEVER өгөгдлийн санд сургалтын өмнө сургалтын шалгалтын загварыг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн мэдээллийн баримт жинхэнэ эсвэл хуурамч юу гэдгийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй. Бидний арга баримт саяхан шийдвэрлэх загварын амжилтыг ашиглаж, нууц шийдвэрлэх мэдээг олох боломжтой болгодог. FakenewsNet-ийн туршилтын үр дүнг, худлаа мэдээллийн мэдээлэл олохын тулд банк-марк өгөгдлийн сангууд, бидний санал өгсөн арга баримтын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Modelele de verificare a faptelor s-au bucurat de un progres rapid în ultimii doi ani prin dezvoltarea de modele lingvistice pre-instruite precum BERT și lansarea de seturi de date la scară largă, cum ar fi FEVER. Cu toate acestea, problema provocatoare a detectării știrilor false nu a beneficiat de îmbunătățirea modelelor de verificare a faptelor, care este strâns legată de detectarea știrilor false. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare simplă, dar eficientă pentru a conecta punctele între verificarea faptelor și detectarea știrilor false. Abordarea noastră folosește mai întâi un model de sintetizare a textelor pre-instruit pe corporații de știri pentru a rezuma articolul lung de știri într-o scurtă afirmație. Apoi folosim un model de verificare a faptelor pre-instruit pe setul de date FEVER pentru a detecta dacă articolul de știri de intrare este real sau fals. Abordarea noastră face uz de succesul recent al modelelor de verificare a faptelor și permite detectarea știrilor false zero-shot, atenuând nevoia de date de instruire la scară largă pentru a instrui modele de detectare a știrilor false. Rezultatele experimentale pe FakenewsNet, un set de date de referință pentru detectarea știrilor false, demonstrează eficiența abordării propuse.', 'no': 'Faktiske verifikasjonsmodular har brukt ein rask avanserting i de siste to årene med utviklinga av først trengte språk-modeller som BERT og utviklinga av store skala-datasett som FEVER. Det vanskeleg problemet med falske informasjonsoppdaging har imidlertid ikkje brukt forbetringa av faktiske verifikasjonsmodular, som er nærare relatert til falske informasjonsoppdaging. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein enkel enn effektiv tilnærming til å kopla punktene mellom faktisk verifikasjon og falske oppdaging av nyhetar. Nærminga vårt først brukar eit tekstsamanseringsmodul som er forelært på nyhetskområdet for å samansera den lange nyhetskområdet i ein kort tvaring. Så bruker vi ein faktisk verifikasjonsmodul som er forelært på FEVER- datasettet for å finna om inndata- nye artikkelen er sann eller falsk. Tilnærminga vårt gjer bruk av den siste suksessen på kontrollmodellen av faktisk, og gjer det mogleg å oppdaga falske nyhetar med null-snitt, slik at det alleviar nødvendighet for stor skala opplæringsdata for å trenga falske informasjonsoppdagingsmodeller. Eksperimentale resultat på FakenewsNet, eit benchmark dataset for falske nyhetsinformasjon, viser effektiviteten av vår foreslått tilnærming.', 'sr': 'Modeli provjere činjenica uživali su u poslednje dve godine brz napredak sa razvojom predobučenih jezičkih modela poput BERT i oslobađanjem velikih podataka poput FEVER. Međutim, izazovni problem otkrivanja lažnih vijesti nije koristio od poboljšanja modela verificije činjenica, koji je u blizini povezan sa lažnim otkrivanjem vijesti. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavan, ali efikasni pristup da povežemo tačke između provjere činjenica i lažnog otkrivanja vesti. Naš pristup prvi put koristi model za sažetak teksta predobučen na vesti korporaciji kako bi sažeti dug članak novosti u kratkom tvrdnji. Onda koristimo model za verifikaciju činjenica predobučen na setu podataka FEVER-a kako bi otkrili da li je članak za ulazne vesti stvaran ili lažni. Naš pristup koristi nedavni uspeh modela provjere činjenice i omogućava otkrivanje lažnih vijesti od nule pucnjave, ublažavajući potrebu velikih podataka o obuci za obuku lažnih modela otkrivanja vijesti. Eksperimentalni rezultati na FakenewsNetu, set podataka za lažno otkrivanje vesti, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු දෙකකින් වේගයෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් වගේ විකාශය සමග BERT වගේ විකාශය සහ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණ දත්ත සැට් නි නමුත්, බොරු වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇත්තටම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නෑ ඇත්තටම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ අපේ පළමු විදියට පාළුවක් සංවේදනයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා වාර්තාව සම ඊට පස්සේ අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා FEVER දත්ත සෙට් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇත්ත නැත්ත අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේල්ස් වල අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න සක්රිය කරනවා, සුන් FakenwsNet වල පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්, බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් තොරතුරු සූදානම්', 'so': "Tusaalada xaqiijinta ee runta ah waxay ku raaxaysteen horumarinta dhaqso ee ugu dambaysay labo sano, waxaana horumarinta modellada afka hore oo la tababaray sida BERT iyo sii daabacsada kooxda macluumaadka waaweyn sida FEVER. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dhibaatada qallafsan ee baaritaanka warbixinta beenta ah waxey faa'iido ka leedahay horumarinta tusaalaha xaqiijinta, taas oo ku dhow la xiriira baaritaanka wararka been ah. Warqadan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab fudud oo weli faa’iido leh si aan u xiriirno xukunka xaqiijinta iyo baaritaanka warbixinta been ah. Dhaqdhaheenna marka ugu horeysa wuxuu u shaqeeyaa model xarunta qoraalka ah oo horay loo tababaray shirkadda news si uu ugu soo bandhigo qoraalka warqadda dheer si ay u soo bandhigto qiimo gaaban. Markaas waxaynu isticmaalnaa model xaqiijinta ah oo aan horay u tababarinnay FEVER databases si aan u ogaano in warqada input uu yahay run ama been. Dhaqdhaheenna wuxuu isticmaalaa liibaanka ugu dambeeyey tusaalaha xaqiijinta, wuxuuna heli karaa caddeynta warbixinta been ah oo nuurad ah, si uu u fududeeyo baahida macluumaadka waxbarashada waaweyn si uu u tababaro tusaalaha baaritaanka warbixinta been ah. Experimental results on FakenewsNet, a benchmark dataset for fake news detection, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach.", 'sv': 'Faktaverifikationsmodellerna har utvecklats snabbt under de senaste två åren med utvecklingen av färdigutbildade språkmodeller som BERT och lanseringen av storskaliga datauppsättningar som FEVER. Det utmanande problemet med detektering av falska nyheter har dock inte gynnats av förbättringen av faktaverifieringsmodeller, vilket är nära relaterat till detektering av falska nyheter. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett enkelt men effektivt tillvägagångssätt för att koppla ihop prickarna mellan faktaverifiering och detektering av falska nyheter. Vårt tillvägagångssätt använder först en textsammanfattningsmodell som är förberedd på nyhetscorpora för att sammanfatta den långa nyhetsartikeln i ett kort påstående. Sedan använder vi en faktaverifieringsmodell som är färdigtränad på FEVER-datauppsättningen för att upptäcka om inmatningsnyhetsartikeln är äkta eller falsk. Vårt tillvägagångssätt utnyttjar de senaste framgångsmodellerna för faktaverifiering och möjliggör noll-shot falska nyheter detektering, vilket minskar behovet av storskalig utbildningsdata för att träna falska nyheter detektering modeller. Experimentella resultat på FakenewsNet, en benchmark datauppsättning för detektering av fake news, visar effektiviteten i vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': 'உண்மை உறுதிப்படுத்தல் மாதிரிகள் கடந்த இரண்டு ஆண்டுகளில் வேகமான முன்னேற்றத்தை அனுபவித்துள்ளார் பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதின் சவாலான பிரச்சனை இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் உண்மையை சரிபார்த்தல் மற்றும் பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு இடையே புள்ளிகளை இணைக்க ஒரு எ எங்கள் அணுகாரணம் முதலில் ஒரு உரை சுருக்கு முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரி வேலை செய்தி நிறைவேற்ற செய்தி கட்டுரையை சுருக்கும் க FEVER தகவல் அமைப்பில் ஒரு உண்மையான உறுதிப்படுத்தல் முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தி உள்ளீடு செய்தி கட்டுரை உண்மையாகவா அல்லத நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு உண்மையை சரிபார்த்தல் மாதிரிகளின் சமீபத்தில் வெற்றியை பயன்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் பூஜ்ஜியமான பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான பாக்கென்னுவெஸ்நெட்டின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'حقیقت کی تصدیق کی مدلز پہلے دو سال میں ایک سریع پیشرفت کا فائدہ پہنچا گیا ہے جس طرح BERT کی طرح پیش آموزش کی زبان مدلکوں کی توسعہ اور بڑی اسکیل ڈیٹ سٹ کے آزاد کرنا ہے جیسے FEVER۔ لیکن جھوٹی خبروں کی شناسایی کے مشکل کا اچانک مسئلہ حقیقت کی تصدیق کی مدلکوں کی improving سے فائدہ نہیں پہنچاتا، جو جھوٹی خبروں کی شناسایی سے نزدیک ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ساده اور اثرات طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ حقیقت کی تصدیق اور جھوٹی خبر شناسی کے درمیان نقطے کو اتصال کریں. ہمارا تقریبا پہلے ایک ٹیکسٹ جمع سازی موڈل استعمال کرتا ہے جو نیویس کورپور پر پہلے آموزش کی گئی ہے تاکہ طویل خبریں لکھی تھوڑی قول میں جمع کرے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک حقیقت تصدیق مدل استعمال کرتے ہیں جو FEVER ڈیٹ سٹ پر پہلے تدریس کی گئی ہے تاکہ معلوم کریں کہ اپنا انپ نیویس لکھ واقعی یا جھوٹی ہے. ہمارا طریقہ حقیقت کی تصدیق کی مدل کے اخیر موفقیت کا استعمال کرتا ہے اور صفر-شٹ کی فریب کی خبر شناسی کو قابل کرتا ہے، بہت بڑی استعمال کی آموزش کی ضرورت کو کمزور کرتا ہے کہ فریب کی خبر شناسی مدل کی آموزش کرے۔ FakenwsNet پر ایک بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کی تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے، ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا طریقہ کا اثبات دکھاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, fake news aniqlashning qiyinchalik muammolari haqiqiqiy tasdiqlash modellarini o'zgartirishga yordam bermadi. Bu fakt news aniqlashga bog'liq. Bu qogʻozda, biz haqiqiqiyligini tasdiqlash va xato хабар aniqlash orasidagi narsalarni bogʻlash uchun oddiy ishlatiladimiz. Bizning birinchi usuli yangilik kompaniyada birinchi taʼminlovchi matn taʼminlovchi modelini birinchi o'rnatadi va uzun xabar maqolasini qisqa davomida hisoblash mumkin. Keyin biz FEVER maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi haqiqiqiy tasdiqlash modelini ishlatimiz. Kiritish xabarlar haqiqiqiy yoki faqat. Biz muvaffaqiyatlarimiz haqiqiqatga tasdiqlash modellaridan foydalanadi va notoʻgʻri xabarlarni aniqlash imkoniyatini qo'shish mumkin. Bitta faqat xabar topish modellarini o'rganish uchun katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumot kerak. Experimental results on FakenewsNet, a benchmark dataset for fake news detection, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình để kiểm tra dữ liệu có tiến bộ nhanh trong vòng hai năm qua với việc phát triển các mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo trước như BERT và phát tán các tập tin trên diện rộng như FEZA. Tuy nhiên, vấn đề thách thức của việc phát hiện tin giả không được hưởng lợi từ việc cải tiến các mô hình kiểm tra sự kiện, nó liên quan đến việc phát hiện tin giả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để kết nối các chấm giữa sự xác thực và việc khám phá báo giả. Trước tiên, cách tiếp cận của chúng ta dùng một mô hình tổng hợp văn bản được đào tạo trước các chuyên gia tin tức để tổng hợp các bài báo dài thành một yêu cầu ngắn. Sau đó chúng tôi sử dụng một mô hình thực tế để xác định các tập tin đã được cung cấp trên có phải là giả hay không. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi sử dụng thành công gần đây của các mô hình kiểm tra thực tế và cho phép phát hiện tin giả bằng không, giảm thiểu nhu cầu của dữ liệu huấn luyện trên diện rộng để huấn luyện các mô hình giả. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên mạng FazewNet, nguồn dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho việc phát hiện tin giả, chứng minh hiệu quả phương pháp ưa thích của chúng ta.', 'nl': 'Fact verificatiemodellen hebben de afgelopen twee jaar een snelle vooruitgang genoten met de ontwikkeling van voorgetrainde taalmodellen zoals BERT en de release van grootschalige datasets zoals FEVER. Het uitdagende probleem van fake news detectie heeft echter niet geprofiteerd van de verbetering van feitenverificatiemodellen, die nauw verband houden met fake news detectie. In dit artikel stellen we een eenvoudige maar effectieve aanpak voor om de puntjes tussen factverificatie en fake news detectie te verbinden. Onze aanpak maakt eerst gebruik van een tekstsamenvattingsmodel dat vooraf is getraind op nieuwscorpora om het lange nieuwsartikel samen te vatten in een korte claim. Vervolgens gebruiken we een feitenverificatiemodel dat vooraf is getraind op de FEVER dataset om te detecteren of het invoernieuwsartikel echt of nep is. Onze aanpak maakt gebruik van het recente succes van fact verificatiemodellen en maakt zero-shot fake news detectie mogelijk, waardoor de behoefte aan grootschalige trainingsgegevens voor het trainen van fake news detection modellen wordt verlicht. Experimentele resultaten op FakenewsNet, een benchmark dataset voor fake news detectie, tonen de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak aan.', 'bg': 'Моделите за проверка на фактите се радват на бърз напредък през последните две години с разработването на предварително обучени езикови модели като BERT и пускането на широкомащабни набори от данни като FEVER. Въпреки това, предизвикателният проблем с откриването на фалшиви новини не се възползва от подобряването на моделите за проверка на фактите, което е тясно свързано с откриването на фалшиви новини. В тази статия предлагаме прост, но ефективен подход за свързване на точките между проверката на факти и откриването на фалшиви новини. Нашият подход първо използва модел за обобщаване на текста, предварително обучен за корпоративни новини, за да обобщи дългата новинарска статия в кратко твърдение. След това използваме модел за проверка на фактите, предварително обучен върху набора от данни, за да открием дали входящата новина статия е истинска или фалшива. Нашият подход използва скорошния успех на моделите за проверка на фактите и позволява откриване на фалшиви новини с нулев изстрел, облекчавайки необходимостта от широкомащабни данни за обучение за обучение на модели за откриване на фалшиви новини. Експерименталните резултати на база данни за откриване на фалшиви новини демонстрират ефективността на предлагания от нас подход.', 'hr': 'Modeli provjere činjenica uživali su u posljednje dvije godine brz napredak s razvojom predobučenih jezičkih modela poput BERT-a i oslobađanjem velikih podataka poput FEVER-a. Međutim, izazovni problem otkrivanja lažnih vijesti nije koristio od poboljšanja modela provjere činjenica, koji je bliski povezan s lažnim otkrivanjem vijesti. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavan i učinkoviti pristup povezati to čke između provjere činjenica i lažnog otkrivanja vijesti. Naš pristup prvi put koristi model za sažetak teksta predobučen na vijestinskom korporaciji kako bi sažeti dug članak vijesti u kratkoj tvrdnji. Onda koristimo model za provjeru činjenica predobučen na setu podataka FEVER-a kako bi otkrili je li članak za ulazne vijesti stvaran ili lažni. Naš pristup koristi nedavni uspjeh modela provjere činjenice i omogućava otkrivanje lažnih vijesti od nule pucnjave, ublažavajući potrebu velikih podataka o obuci za obuku lažnih modela otkrivanja vijesti. Eksperimentalni rezultati na FakenewsNetu, sklonište podataka za lažno otkrivanje vijesti, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa.', 'de': 'Faktenverifizierungsmodelle haben sich in den letzten zwei Jahren durch die Entwicklung vortrainierter Sprachmodelle wie BERT und die Veröffentlichung großer Datensätze wie FEVER schnell weiterentwickelt. Das herausfordernde Problem der Fake-News-Erkennung hat jedoch nicht von der Verbesserung von Fakt-Verifikationsmodellen profitiert, die eng mit der Fake-News-Erkennung verbunden sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen einfachen, aber effektiven Ansatz vor, um die Punkte zwischen Faktenverifizierung und Fake News Erkennung zu verbinden. Unser Ansatz verwendet zunächst ein Textzusammenfassungsmodell, das auf Nachrichtenkorpora vortrainiert wurde, um den langen Nachrichtenartikel in einem kurzen Claim zusammenzufassen. Dann verwenden wir ein Faktenverifizierungsmodell, das auf dem FEVER-Datensatz vortrainiert wurde, um zu erkennen, ob der eingegebene Nachrichtenartikel real oder gefälscht ist. Unser Ansatz nutzt den jüngsten Erfolg von Faktenverifizierungsmodellen und ermöglicht die Zero-Shot-Fake-News-Erkennung, wodurch der Bedarf an großformatigen Trainingsdaten zum Trainieren von Fake-News-Erkennungsmodellen reduziert wird. Experimentelle Ergebnisse auf FakenewsNet, einem Benchmark-Datensatz für FakenewsNet, zeigen die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes.', 'ko': '사실 검증 모델은 지난 2년 동안 급속히 발전했고 버트 등 미리 훈련된 언어 모델도 발전했으며 열이 나는 등 대규모 데이터 집합도 발표됐다.그러나 허위 뉴스 검출의 도전적인 문제는 사실 검증 모델의 개선 덕분이 아니라 허위 뉴스 검출과 밀접한 관계를 가진다.본고에서 우리는 간단하고 효과적인 방법을 제시하여 사실 검증과 가짜 뉴스 검측을 연결시켰다.우리의 방법은 먼저 뉴스 자료 라이브러리에서 미리 훈련된 텍스트 요약 모델을 사용하고 긴 뉴스 문장 요약을 짧은 성명으로 한다.그리고 우리는 FEVER 데이터 집합에서 미리 훈련된 사실 검증 모델을 사용하여 입력한 뉴스 기사가 진짜인지 가짜인지 검사한다.우리의 방법은 최근에 성공한 사실 검증 모델을 이용하여 제로 렌즈 가짜 뉴스 검측을 실현했고 가짜 뉴스 검측 모델을 훈련하는 데 필요한 대규모 훈련 데이터를 줄였다.FakenewsNet에서의 실험 결과는 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'id': 'Model verifikasi fakta telah menikmati kemajuan cepat dalam dua tahun terakhir dengan pengembangan model bahasa pra-dilatih seperti BERT dan pembebasan set data skala besar seperti FEVER. Namun, masalah tantangan dari deteksi berita palsu tidak berguna dari peningkatan model verifikasi fakta, yang terkait dengan deteksi berita palsu. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan sederhana namun efektif untuk menghubungkan titik antara verifikasi fakta dan deteksi berita palsu. Pertama pendekatan kami menggunakan model penglihatan teks yang dilatih di korpora berita untuk memperlihatkan artikel berita panjang menjadi klaim singkat. Kemudian kita menggunakan model verifikasi fakta yang dilatih-dilatih pada set data FEVER untuk mendeteksi apakah artikel berita input adalah nyata atau palsu. pendekatan kami menggunakan sukses baru-baru ini dari model verifikasi fakta dan memungkinkan deteksi berita palsu nol-shot, mengurangi kebutuhan data pelatihan skala besar untuk melatih model deteksi berita palsu. Hasil percobaan di FakenewsNet, set data benchmark untuk deteksi berita palsu, menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan.', 'fa': 'Models verification facts have enjoyed a fast advancement in the last two years with the development of pre-trained language models like BERT and the release of large scale datasets such as FEVER. ولی مشکل مشکل مشکل شناسایی اخبار دروغ سودی از پیشرفت مدلهای تصدیق حقیقت، که نزدیک به شناسایی اخبار دروغ ارتباط دارد، سودی نداشته است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش ساده و هنوز موثر برای ارتباط نقطه\u200cها بین تصدیق کردن حقیقت و شناسایی اخبار دروغ. اول دستور ما مدل جمع کردن متن را استفاده می کند که در شرکت خبری پیش آموزش شده است تا مقاله طولانی را به یک ادعا کوتاه جمع کند. سپس از یک مدل تصدیق حقیقت پیش آموزش یافته در مجموعه داده\u200cهای FEVER استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا بفهمیم آیا مقاله اخبار ورودی واقعی یا دروغ است. دستور ما از موفقیت اخیر موفقیت مدلهای تصدیق حقیقت استفاده می کند و اجازه می دهد که اخبار دروغ صفر را تشخیص دهد، و نیازی داده های آموزش زیادی را کمتر کند تا مدلهای شناسایی خبر دروغ را آموزش دهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی FakenewsNet، یک مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای صندوق برای شناسایی اخبار دروغ نشان می\u200cدهد که فعالیت روش پیشنهاد ما را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'da': 'Fakta verifikationsmodeller har nydt et hurtigt fremskridt i de sidste to år med udviklingen af forududdannede sprogmodeller som BERT og udgivelsen af storstilede datasæt som FEVER. Det udfordrende problem med opdagelse af falske nyheder har imidlertid ikke draget fordel af forbedringen af faktisk verifikationsmodeller, som er tæt relateret til opdagelse af falske nyheder. I denne artikel foreslår vi en enkel, men effektiv tilgang til at forbinde prikkerne mellem fakta verifikation og fake news detektion. Vores tilgang anvender først en tekst opsummering model præ-trænet på nyhedskorpora til at opsummere den lange nyhedsartikel i en kort påstand. Derefter bruger vi en faktisk verifikationsmodel, der er prætrænet på FEVER datasættet, til at registrere, om input nyhedsartikelen er ægte eller falske. Vores tilgang gør brug af de seneste succesmodeller for faktisk verifikation og muliggør nulskud falske nyheder detektering, hvilket mindsker behovet for storstilede træningsdata til at træne falske nyheder detekteringsmodeller. Eksperimentelle resultater på FakenewsNet, et benchmark datasæt til detektion af fake news, viser effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang.', 'tr': "Faýllary barlamak nusgalary soňky iki ýylda BERT ýaly öňünden eğlenen dil nusgalarynyň gelişmesi bilen we FEVER ýaly uly derejesi çykarmagy üçin ýüze çykdy. Ýöne ýalňyş haberler tanyşynyň kynçylykly mesele, hakykatdanam barlama nusgalarynyň gelişmesinden has gowy bir zat ýok. Bu ýalňyş habar tanyşynyň ýakyn meselesi. Bu kağıt içinde, hakykatdanam ve sahte haberler keşfetmesi arasynda noktaları birleştirmek için basit, etkili bir yaklaşma teklif ediyoruz. Biziň ýaryşymyz ilkinji gezek täzeliklerimiz üçin bagly täzeliklerimizi gysga iddialara üýtgetmek üçin tekst howlamaga nusgasyny işleýär. Sonra biz FEVER veri setinde öňünden geçmiş bir barlama nusgasyny ulanýarys. Täzelikler hakyky ýa-da ýalňyş dälmidir diýip soramak üçin bir nusgasyny tapylýarys. Biziň ýaryşymyz soňky barlama nusgalarynyň üstünliklerini ulanýar we zero-shot ýalňyş habar tanyşyna mümkin edýär. ýalňyş habar tanyşynyň nusgalaryny öwretmek üçin uly derejede boýunça eğitim maglumatyny azaltýar. FakenewsNet'iň örän netijesi, sahyp täzeliklerimiz tapylmak üçin bir benchmark veri setidigini, teklip eden metodamyzyň etkinliýetini görkez.", 'sw': 'Mradi wa uthibitisho wa ukweli umefurahia maendeleo ya haraka katika miaka miwili iliyopita na maendeleo ya modeli za lugha zilizofunzwa kabla kama BERT na kuachiliwa kwa seti kubwa za data kama vile FEVER. Hata hivyo, tatizo la kutambua habari potofu halijafaidika na kuboreshwa kwa miundo mbinu ya kuthibitisha ukweli, ambalo linahusiana na kutambua habari potofu. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi ili kuunganisha mada kati ya ukweli wa kuthibitisha na kutambua habari potofu. Hatua yetu ya kwanza inatumia muundo wa muhtasari wa maandishi uliofanyika kabla wa mafunzo kwenye kampuni ya habari ili kutoa muhtasari wa makala ndefu ya habari katika madai fupi. Kisha tunatumia muundo wa kuthibitisha ukweli ulioelekezwa kabla kwenye seti ya data ya FEVER ili kutambua kama makala ya habari ya input ni kweli au ni bandia. Hatua yetu inatumia mafanikio ya hivi karibuni ya mifano ya kuthibitisha ukweli na inawezesha kugundua habari bandia zisizo na sifa, kupunguza haja ya mafunzo makubwa ya taarifa ili kufundisha mifano ya uchunguzi wa habari bandia. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye FakenewsNet, seti ya taarifa za benchmark kwa ajili ya kutambua habari potofu, yanaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu inayopendekezwa.', 'af': "Fakte verifikasie modele het 'n vinnige vordering in die laaste twee jaar gelukkig met die ontwikkeling van voorafgeleerde taal modele soos BERT en die verlos van groot skaal datastelle soos FEVER. Maar die vanskeldige probleem van falske nuusbeskrywing het nie voordeel van die verbetering van feit verifikasie modele nie, wat naby verwantig is met falske nuusbeskrywing. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige nog effektief toegang om die punte tussen feit verifikasie en fak nuusbeskrywing te verbind. Ons toegang het eerste gebruik 'n teks opsomming model voor-opgelei op nuuskorpora om die lang nuusartikel in 'n kort aandrukking te opsomming. Dan gebruik ons 'n feit verifikasie model voor-opgelei op die FEVER datastel om te beskry of die invoer nuus artikel regtig of fak is. Ons toegang maak gebruik van die onlangse sukses van feit verifikasie modele en laat nul-skoot falske nuusbeskrywing maak en die behoefte van groot skaal onderwerking data allerhande om falske nuusbeskrywing modele te tren. Eksperimentale resultate op FakenewsNet, 'n benchmarkdatastel vir falske nuusdeteksie, wys die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang.", 'sq': 'Fact verification models have enjoyed a fast advancement in the last two years with the development of pre-trained language models like BERT and the release of large scale datasets such as FEVER.  However, the challenging problem of fake news detection has not benefited from the improvement of fact verification models, which is closely related to fake news detection.  Në këtë letër, propozojmë një qasje të thjeshtë por efektive për të lidhur pikat midis verifikimit të fakteve dhe zbulimit të lajmeve të rreme. Përqasja jonë përdorë së pari një model të përmbledhjes së tekstit të paratrajnuar në korporën e lajmeve për të përmbledhur artikullin e lajmeve të gjata në një pretendim të shkurtër. Pastaj përdorim një model të verifikimit të fakteve të stërvitur në sistemin e të dhënave FEVER për të zbuluar nëse artikulli i lajmeve të hyrjes është i vërtetë apo i rreme. Përqasja jonë bën përdorim të suksesit të fundit të modeleve të verifikimit të fakteve dhe lejon zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme zero-shot, duke lehtësuar nevojën e të dhënave të stërvitjes në shkallë të madhe për të trajnuar modele të rreme të zbulimit të lajmeve. Rezultatet eksperimentale në FakenewsNet, një bazë të dhënash për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme, demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar.', 'am': 'እውነተኛውን አረጋጋጭ ሞዴላዎች ባለፉት ሁለት ዓመት ውስጥ እንደ BERT እና እንደ FEVER ያለ ትልቅ የዳታ ዳታተር ማውጣት የተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ሞዴላዎችን በመፍጠር የተደሰቱ ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት የውሸት ጉዳይ የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት ቅርብ በሐሰት የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እውነቱን የሚያረጋግጥ እና የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት የሚያስፈልገውን አቀላቅሎ እና ፍለጋዊ ጥያቄን እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው የዜና አርእስት የረጅም የዜና አርእስት አቅራቢያ እንዲያሳርፍ የጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያውን ሞዴል አስቀድሞ ያስተካክላል፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም የውይይት የዜና ጽሑፍ እውነተኛ ወይም ሐሰት መሆኑን ለማግኘት የFEVER ዳታ ማድረግ በፊት የተማረከውን ሞዴል እንጠይቃለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን የእውነትን ማረጋገጫ የቅርብ ስህተት ዓይነቶች ይጠቅማል እና የሐሰት ዜናዎችን ማግኘት ይችላል፣ የዋሸት ዜና ማግኘት ዓይነቶችን ለማስተማር የሚያስፈልጋቸውን ትልቅ ትልቅ የዘጠኝ ዳታዎችን ማሳየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የፋkenewsNet ውጤቶች የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት የቤንኩርት ዳታ ማውጣት የተፈተና ውጤቶች የሞከር ሥርዓታችንን ጥያቄ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Անցյալ երկու տարիների ընթացքում փաստերի ստուգումների մոդելները շատ արագ առաջընթաց են ունեցել նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը, զարգացմանը և մեծ մասշտաբ տվյալների համակարգերի, ինչպիսիք են Fever-ը: Այնուամենայնիվ, կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման դժվար խնդիրը չի շահում փաստերի ստուգելու մոդելների բարելավումից, ինչը շատ կապված է կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման հետ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ մոտեցում, որպեսզի միացնենք կետերը փաստերի ստուգումների և կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման միջև: Մեր մոտեցումը առաջին անգամ օգտագործում է տեքստի համառոտագրման մոդել, որը նախապատրաստված է նորությունների կապորանի վրա, որպեսզի համառոտագրի երկար նորությունների հոդվածը կարճ հաղորդակցությամբ: Հետո մենք օգտագործում ենք փաստերի ստուգելու մոդել, որը նախապատրաստված է Fever տվյալների համակարգում, որպեսզի բացահայտենք, թե արդյոք մուտքագրված նորությունների հոդվածը իրական է, թե կեղծ: Մեր մոտեցումը օգտագործում է փաստերի հավասարման մոդելների վերջին հաջողությունը և հնարավորություն է տալիս կեղծ նորությունների բացահայտումը, նվազեցնելով մեծ մասշտաբի ուսումնասիրության տվյալների կարիքը կեղծ նորությունների հայտնագործման մոդելների FakNewsNet-ի փորձարկման արդյունքները, կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման համեմատային տվյալների համակարգը, ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկված մոտեցության արդյունավետությունը:', 'az': 'Fakat təsdiqləmə modelləri son iki il ərzində BERT kimi öyrənmiş dil modellərini və FEVER kimi böyük ölçü veri setlərini yayındırmaq üçün çox hızlı bir ilerləşdirilmişdir. Lakin, sahte xəbərlər keşfinin çətin problemi sahte xəbərlər keşfini yaxınlaşdırmaqdan fayda vermədi. Bu kağızda, həqiqət təsdiqləməsi və sahte xəbərlər keşfetməsi arasındakı nöqtələri bağlamaq üçün basit, hətta etkili bir yol təklif edirik. Bizim tərzimiz ilk dəfə xəbər korporasında təhsil edilmiş mətn təmizləmə modeli istifadə edir ki, uzun xəbər mətnlərini qısa tərzdə təhsil edir. Sonra FEVER veri qutusunda əvvəl təhsil edilmiş təhsil modeli istifadə edirik ki, giriş xəbərləri məktubunun gerçek və ya sahte olduğunu keşfetsin. Bizim tərzimiz həqiqət təsdiqləmə modellərinin son başarısından istifadə edir və sıfır-fəsad sahte xəbərlər keşfetməsini fəallaşdırır, sahte xəbərlər keşfetmə modellərinin böyük ölçüdə təhsil məlumatlarının ehtiyacını azaltır. FakenewsNet-in, sahte xəbərləri keşfetmək üçün benchmark veri quruluşu təcrübələrinin etkinliğini göstərər.', 'bn': 'গত দুই বছরে সত্যিকার পরিচালনা মডেল দ্রুত উন্নয়ন উপভোগ করেছে বিবের্টের মত প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের উন্নয়ন এবং বিশাল স্ক্যালের ডাটাসেটের ম তবে মিথ্যা সংবাদ আবিষ্কারের চ্যালেঞ্জের সমস্যা সত্যিকারের পরিচালনা মডেলের উন্নতি থেকে কোন কাজে পায়নি, যা মিথ্যা সংবাদ সনা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সহজ কার্যকর উপায় প্রস্তাব করছি সত্যিকার পরিচালনা এবং মিথ্যা সংবাদ আবিষ্কারের মধ্যে যুক্ত করার জন্য আমাদের প্রথমে একটি টেক্সট সারসংক্ষেপ মডেল প্রশিক্ষিত হয়েছে সংবাদ কোর্পোরায় দীর্ঘ সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের সারসংক্ষেপের জন্ তারপর আমরা FEVER ডাটাসেটে একটি সত্যিকারের পরিচালিত মডেল ব্যবহার করি যাতে ইনপুটের সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ বাস্তবতা বা মিথ্যা কিনা। আমাদের পদক্ষেপ সম্প্রতি বাস্তবতা নিশ্চিত মডেলের সাফল্য ব্যবহার করে এবং শুধুমাত্র মিথ্যা সংবাদ সনাক্ত করার সুযোগ প্রদান করে, মিথ্যা সংবা মিথ্যা সংবাদ সনাক্ত করার জন্য ফ্যাকেনিউজ নেটে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে, যা আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যকর প্রতিক্রি', 'bs': 'Modeli provjere činjenica uživali su u posljednje dvije godine brz napredak s razvojom predobučenih jezičkih modela poput BERT i oslobađanjem velikih podataka poput FEVER. Međutim, izazovni problem otkrivanja lažnih vijesti nije koristio od poboljšanja modela provjere činjenica, koji je bliski povezan sa lažnim otkrivanjem vijesti. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavan, ali efikasni pristup da povežemo tačke između provjere činjenica i lažnog otkrivanja vijesti. Naš pristup prvi put koristi model za sažetak teksta predobučen na vijestinskom korporaciji kako bi sažeti članak dugih vijesti u kratkom tvrdnji. Onda koristimo model za provjeru činjenica predobučen na setu podataka FEVER-a kako bi otkrili je li članak za ulazne vijesti stvaran ili lažni. Naš pristup koristi nedavni uspjeh modela provjere činjenice i omogućava otkrivanje lažnih vijesti bez nule pucnjave, olakšavanje potrebe velikih podataka o obuci za obuku lažnih modela otkrivanja vijesti. Eksperimentalni rezultati na FakenewsNetu, set podataka za lažno otkrivanje vijesti, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa.', 'et': 'Faktide tõendamise mudelid on viimase kahe aasta jooksul kiiresti arenenud eelõpetatud keelemudelite, nagu BERT, väljatöötamisega ja suuremahuliste andmekogumite, nagu FEVER, väljastamisega. Siiski ei ole valeuudiste tuvastamise keeruline probleem saanud kasu faktide kontrollimise mudelite parandamisest, mis on tihedalt seotud valeuudiste tuvastamisega. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja lihtsat, kuid tõhusat lähenemisviisi faktide kontrollimise ja valeuudiste tuvastamise vaheliste punktide ühendamiseks. Meie lähenemisviis kasutab esmalt teksti kokkuvõtte mudelit, mis on eelnevalt koolitatud uudistekorporates, et kokku võtta pikk uudisartikkel lühikeseks väiteks. Seejärel kasutame FEVER andmekogumil eelnevalt väljaõpetatud faktide kontrollimise mudelit, et tuvastada, kas sisenduudiste artikkel on tõeline või võlts. Meie lähenemisviis kasutab faktide tõendamise mudelite hiljutisi edusamme ja võimaldab null-shot valeuudiste tuvastamist, leevendades vajadust suuremahuliste koolitusandmete järele valeuudiste tuvastamise mudelite koolitamiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused FakenewsNeti, võrdlusandmekogumi valeuudiste tuvastamiseks, näitavad meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust.', 'fi': 'Faktojen todentamismallit ovat edistyneet nopeasti kahden viime vuoden aikana kehittämällä esikoulutettuja kielimalleja, kuten BERT, ja julkaisemalla suuria tietokokonaisuuksia, kuten FEVER. Valeuutisten havaitsemisen haastava ongelma ei kuitenkaan ole hyötynyt faktojen todentamismallien parantamisesta, joka liittyy läheisesti valeuutisten havaitsemiseen. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta lähestymistapaa faktojen todentamisen ja fake news detection -havaintojen välillä. Lähestymistapamme käyttää ensin uutiskorpusiin etukäteen koulutettua tekstiyhteenvetomallia, joka tiivistää pitkän uutisartikkelin lyhyeksi väitteeksi. Tämän jälkeen käytämme FEVER-aineistoon etukäteen koulutettua faktojen vahvistusmallia havaitsemaan, onko syöttöuutisartikkeli aito vai väärennetty. Lähestymistapamme hyödyntää faktojen todentamismallien viimeaikaista menestystä ja mahdollistaa nollakuvan fake news -tunnistuksen, mikä vähentää suuren mittakaavan koulutustiedon tarvetta fake news -tunnistusmallien kouluttamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset FakenewsNetissä, joka on vertailuaineisto fake news detection, osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden.', 'cs': 'Modely ověřování faktů se v posledních dvou letech těšily rychlému pokroku díky vývoji předškolených jazykových modelů, jako je BERT a uvolnění rozsáhlých datových sad, jako je FEVER. Náročný problém detekce falešných zpráv však nevyužil zlepšení modelů ověřování faktů, které úzce souvisí s detekcí falešných zpráv. V tomto článku navrhujeme jednoduchý, ale efektivní přístup k propojení teček mezi ověřováním faktů a detekcí falešných zpráv. Náš přístup nejprve využívá textový souhrnný model předškolený na zpravodajských korpusech, aby shrnul dlouhý zpravodajský článek do krátkého tvrzení. Poté používáme model ověřování faktů předem trénovaný na datové sadě FEVER, abychom zjistili, zda je vstupní zpravodajský článek skutečný nebo falešný. Náš přístup využívá nedávných úspěchů modelů ověřování faktů a umožňuje bezproblémovou detekci falešných zpráv, což snižuje potřebu rozsáhlých školicích dat pro trénink modelů detekce falešných zpráv. Experimentální výsledky na FakenewsNet, referenčním datovém souboru pro detekci falešných zpráv, ukazují efektivitu našeho navrhovaného přístupu.', 'ca': "Els models de verificació de fets han gaudit d'un ràpid avanç en els darrers dos anys amb el desenvolupament de models de llenguatge pré-entrenats com BERT i la publicació de conjunts de dades a gran escala com FEVER. However, the challenging problem of fake news detection has not benefited from the improvement of fact verification models, which is closely related to fake news detection.  En aquest article, proposem un enfocament simple però efectiu per connectar els punts entre la verificació de fets i la detecció de notícies falses. En primer lloc, el nostre enfocament utilitza un model de resum de text pré-entrenat en news corpora per resumir l'article de llargues notícies en una breu reclamació. Després fem servir un model de verificació de fets pré-entrenat en el conjunt de dades FEVER per detectar si l'article d'entrada és real o fals. Our approach makes use of the recent success of fact verification models and enables zero-shot fake news detection, alleviating the need of large scale training data to train fake news detection models.  Els resultats experimentals de FakenewsNet, un conjunt de dades de referència per la detecció de notícies falses, demostren l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat.", 'sk': 'Modeli preverjanja dejstev so se v zadnjih dveh letih hitro napredovali z razvojem vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov, kot je BERT, in izdajo obsežnih naborov podatkov, kot je FEVER. Vendar pa zahtevni problem odkrivanja lažnih novic ni imel koristi od izboljšanja modelov preverjanja dejstev, kar je tesno povezano z odkrivanjem lažnih novic. V tem članku predlagamo preprost, vendar učinkovit pristop za povezovanje točk med preverjanjem dejstev in odkrivanjem lažnih novic. Naš pristop najprej uporablja model povzetka besedila, ki je predhodno usposobljen na novinarskih korpusih, da povzame dolgi članek v kratko trditev. Nato uporabimo model preverjanja dejstev, ki je vnaprej usposobljen na naboru podatkov FEVER, da ugotovimo, ali je vhodna novica resnična ali lažna. Naš pristop uporablja nedavni uspeh modelov preverjanja dejstev in omogoča odkrivanje lažnih novic brez posnetkov, kar zmanjšuje potrebo po obsežnih podatkih o usposabljanju za usposabljanje modelov odkrivanja lažnih novic. Eksperimentalni rezultati FakenewsNet, referenčni nabor podatkov za odkrivanje lažnih novic, kažejo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa.', 'he': 'Fact verification models have enjoyed a fast advancement in the last two years with the development of pre-trained language models like BERT and the release of large scale datasets such as FEVER.  However, the challenging problem of fake news detection has not benefited from the improvement of fact verification models, which is closely related to fake news detection.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה פשוטה אבל יעילה כדי לקשר את הנקודות בין האמת לעובדות לגילוי חדשות מזויפות. Our approach first employs a text summarization model pre-trained on news corpora to summarize the long news article into a short claim.  ואז אנו משתמשים במודל האישור העובדות מאומן מראש על קבוצת נתונים FEVER כדי לגלות אם המאמר החדשות הכניסה הוא אמיתי או מזויף. Our approach makes use of the recent success of fact verification models and enables zero-shot fake news detection, alleviating the need of large scale training data to train fake news detection models.  תוצאות ניסיוניות על FakenewsNet, קבוצת נתונים רמז לגילוי חדשות מזויפות, מראה את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת שלנו.', 'ha': "Modalin tabbatarwa na gaskata sun ci mafĩfi da haraka a cikin cikin shekara biyu ta shige na tsohon da aka buɗe misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman-wa-zaman harshen kamar BERT da kuma aka saka masu motsi masu girma kamar FEWR. Haƙĩƙa, masu zargi na ganin lãbãri na ƙarya bai da amfani ba daga improven misãlai masu gaskata gaskiya, da abin da yake makusanci na gani na ƙarya. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buƙata wata hanyoyi mai sauƙi kuma da mai amfani dõmin mu yi haɗi dukkan dukka a tsakanin gaskiyar da zane gane na ƙarya. Mataimakinmu na farkon ya sami wani misalin muharin matsayi mai zaman wa'anar da aka yi wa wa'anar da shirin News Corpo dõmin ya ƙararin makala mai tsawo zuwa wani daidai. Sa'an nan kuma munã amfani da wata motel mai gaskata a gaba ɗaya kan tsarin FEWR, dõmin ka gane idan makala na cikin tsarin da aka shigar da shi gaske ne ko kuwa ƙarya ne. Tsarakanmu na amfani da mafaniki na farkon misãlai masu tabbatar da gaskiya kuma yana yarda a gane zane-zane na ƙarya, kuma ya sauƙaƙara muhamako da data mai girma wa tsari ga su tsari misãlai na gane ƙarya. Experimental results on FakenewsNet, a benchmark dataset for fake news detection, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach.", 'bo': 'Fact verification models have enjoyed a fast advancement in the last two years with the development of pre-trained language models like BERT and the release of large scale datasets such as FEVER. ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་བྱུང་མ་རྐྱེན་པས་དངོས་ཉིད་བདེན་རྟགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་བཤེར་ན་ཉེན འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་དང་བརྙན་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་སླ་གཏོང་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་མོས་ང ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་པོ་དེ་ལ་ཡིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱད་ནས་གསར་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག Then we use a fact verification model pre-trained on the FEVER dataset to detect whether the input news article is real or fake. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་གསར་བ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། FakenewsNet ནང་གི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་བརྡ་ཞིག་བཙལ་བཤེར་གྱི་བྱུང་ལས་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Language Nanging, aku sing nggunakake perbudhakan kanggo kalaha-perbudhakan bakal ono usaha bener kanggo nguasai model de checking, sing ndheke kapan-kapan kanggo kalaha-perbudhakan kama. Nanging mapani iki, kita supoyo biasa akeh apik tambah apik dadi kanggo nambah dots waenganggo weruh gak bakal maneh Awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan sistem dadi resampungan teks ditambah-cadi Awak dhéwé beraksi kanggo resampungan langgar barang dhéwé nganggo sawar dhéwé. Defs Awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan sistem sing gak nggawe perusahaan model sing beraksi barêng lan tau karo perusahaan barang balikat sing bakal terus-butawak dhéwé, nglanggar ngewigatining data yang kalang-bisa ngelarang model sing mbukak dhéwé. Reulti sing paling nggawe Fakenewnet, gambar deweke nggawe barang kanggo Kemerdekaan sing uwis'}
{'en': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step : Temporal Sentence Localization in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'ar': 'التفكير خطوة بخطوة: توطين الجملة الزمنية في مقاطع الفيديو عبر شبكة التعديل العميق', 'fr': 'Raisonnement étape par étape\xa0: localisation de phrases temporelles dans des vidéos via un réseau de modulation de rectification profonde', 'pt': 'Raciocínio passo a passo: localização de sentenças temporais em vídeos via rede de modulação de retificação profunda', 'es': 'Razonamiento paso a paso: localización temporal de oraciones en vídeos a través de una red profunda de rectificación', 'zh': '推理分步:因深度改调网络定位视频中时句', 'ja': '推論のステップバイステップ：深層修正変調ネットワークを介した動画の時間的な文章のローカライズ', 'hi': 'तर्क चरण-दर-चरण: डीप रेक्टिफिकेशन-मॉडुलन नेटवर्क के माध्यम से वीडियो में टेम्पोरल वाक्य स्थानीयकरण', 'ru': 'Пошаговое обоснование: локализация временного предложения в видеороликах через сеть глубокой ректификации-модуляции', 'ga': 'Réasúnaíocht Céim ar Chéim: Logánú Pianbhreithe Sealadach i bhFíseáin trí Líonra Mion-Choigeartaithe-Modhnúcháin', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრება სიტყვების ლოკალიზაცია ვიდეოში ძალიან რეკტიფიკაცია- მოდულაციის ქსელის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Λόγος βήμα προς βήμα: Προσωρινή Εντοπισμός ποινών σε βίντεο μέσω δικτύου βαθιάς διόρθωσης-διαμόρφωσης', 'hu': 'Az indokolás lépésről lépésre: Időbeli mondatok lokalizációja videókban a mély helyreigazítási-modulációs hálózaton keresztül', 'mk': 'Разумнување чекор по чекор: Локализација на привремените реченици во видео преку длабока мрежа за реtifiкација и модулација', 'it': 'Ragionare passo dopo passo: Localizzazione delle frasi temporali nei video tramite una rete di rettifica profonda e modulazione', 'kk': 'Қайталау қадам- қадам: Температуралық сөз жергілікті бейнелерде температуралық келтіру- модульдер желі арқылы', 'lt': 'Laikinojo bausmės vietos nustatymas vaizduose per gilaus taisymo ir moduliacijos tinklą', 'ms': 'Menyebabkan Langkah-Langkah: Pengesanan Sentensi Temporal dalam Video melalui Rangkaian Pembetulan-Modulasi Tepat', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേപ്പ്- ബി സ്റ്റീപ്', 'mn': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporal sentence Localization in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'mt': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Sentenza Temporal Localization in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'pl': 'Rozumowanie krok po kroku: Lokalizacja zdań czasowych w filmach poprzez sieć głębokiej korektyfikacji-modulacji', 'ro': 'Motivare pas cu pas: Localizarea sentințelor temporale în videoclipuri prin intermediul rețelei de rectificare profundă-modulare', 'no': 'Grunnering av steg etter steg: lokalisering av mellombels teikn i videoar via dørmt rektifikasjonsmoduleringsnettverk', 'sr': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporal sentence Localization in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'so': 'Fiidiyowga ku meelgaarka ah degenaanshaha daryeelka', 'sv': 'Motivering steg för steg: Tillfällig meningslokalisering i videor via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'ta': 'படியெல்லாம் படி படி: வீடியோவில் தற்காலிக வாக்கியம் இடம்', 'ur': 'سٹپٹ بہ سٹپٹ Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporal Sentence Localization via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය: වීඩියෝ වල ස්ථානය විදිහට වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය', 'uz': 'Tugmalar birikmasi:', 'vi': 'Lí lẽ từng bước: Định vị câu nói thời gian (nơi Mạng) qua mạng (Sâu) Phát âm)', 'hr': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporalna lokalizacija kazne u videoima preko duboke rektifikacijske modulacijske mreže', 'bg': 'Разбиране стъпка по стъпка: локализация на времевата присъда във видеоклипове чрез мрежа за дълбоко коригиране и модулация', 'da': 'Begrundelse Trin-for-Trin: Temporal sætningslokalisering i videoer via dybt rektificerings-moduleringsnetværk', 'nl': "Stap voor stap redeneren: Tijdelijke zinslokalisatie in video's via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network", 'de': 'Reasoning Schritt für Schritt: Temporale Satzlokalisierung in Videos über Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'fa': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Local sentence Temporary in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'id': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporal Sentence Localization in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network', 'sw': 'Kusoma hatua kwa hatua: Mahamasishaji ya muda mfupi katika Video kupitia Mtandao wa Kukabiliwa kwa Kingi', 'ko': '점차 추리: 깊이 있는 교정 변조 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 영상 시제 문장 포지셔닝', 'tr': 'Derrew Haplar-Üzgünüm: Videolarda durmuş Sözleri ýerleştirme', 'af': 'Reasonering Step- by- Step: Temporale Sense Lokalisasie in Videos deur Deep Rektifikasie- Modulasie Netwerk', 'sq': 'Rregullimi hap pas hapi: Lokalizimi i dënimit të përkohshëm në video nëpërmjet rrjetit të thellë të rregullimit-modulimit', 'am': 'በመጫን ላይ', 'hy': 'Պատճառը քայլ առ քայլ. Ժամանակական նախադասությունների տեղադրումը տեսահոլովակներում խորը ճշտման-մոդուլացիայի ցանցի միջոցով', 'az': 'Yerli Adım-Adım: Videolarda Temporal Sentence Localization', 'bn': 'পদক্ষেপ-স্টিপ: ভিডিওতে অস্থায়ী শাস্তি স্থানীয় অবস্থান: গভীর রিসিফিকেশন- মডিউলেশন নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে', 'ca': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Localització de sentences temporals en vídeos gràcies a una xarxa profunda de rectificació-modulació', 'bs': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporalna lokalizacija kazne u video putem duboke rektifikacijske modulacijske mreže', 'cs': 'Odůvodnění krok za krokem: Časová lokalizace věty ve videu prostřednictvím sítě hluboké korekce-modulace', 'et': 'Step-by-Step: Ajalise lause lokaliseerimine videotes sügava paranduse-modulatsiooni võrgu kaudu', 'fi': 'Ratkaisu askel askeleelta: aikamoinen lauseen lokalisointi videoissa syvän oikaisun ja modulaation verkon kautta', 'he': 'הגיון צעד אחר צעד: מיקום גזר זמני בסרטים באמצעות רשת תקנות עמוקה', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Ngubah Akses-Akses: lokalisation Kebebasan Gambar Kebebasan Nang Video Ngawe Perintah Resaturan-module Network', 'sk': 'Korak za korakom: lokalizacija časovnih stavkov v videoposnetkih prek mreže globoke popravke-modulacije', 'bo': 'Reasoning Step-by-Step: Temporal Sentence Localization in Videos via Deep Rectification-Modulation Network'}
{'en': 'Temporal sentence localization in videos aims to ground the best matched segment in an untrimmed video according to a given sentence query. Previous works in this field mainly rely on attentional frameworks to align the temporal boundaries by a soft selection. Although they focus on the visual content relevant to the query, these single-step attention are insufficient to model complex video contents and restrict the higher-level reasoning demand for this task. In this paper, we propose a novel deep rectification-modulation network (RMN), transforming this task into a multi-step reasoning process by repeating rectification and modulation. In each rectification-modulation layer, unlike existing methods directly conducting the cross-modal interaction, we first devise a rectification module to correct implicit attention misalignment which focuses on the wrong position during the cross-interaction process. Then, a modulation module is developed to capture the frame-to-frame relation with the help of sentence information for better correlating and composing the video contents over time. With multiple such layers cascaded in depth, our RMN progressively refines video and query interactions, thus enabling a further precise localization. Experimental evaluations on three public datasets show that the proposed method achieves state-of-the-art performance. Extensive ablation studies are carried out for the comprehensive analysis of the proposed method.', 'ar': 'يهدف توطين الجملة الزمنية في مقاطع الفيديو إلى تقديم أفضل مقطع مطابق في مقطع فيديو غير مشذب وفقًا لاستعلام جملة معين. تعتمد الأعمال السابقة في هذا المجال بشكل أساسي على الأطر الانتباهية لمحاذاة الحدود الزمنية من خلال اختيار سهل. على الرغم من أنها تركز على المحتوى المرئي ذي الصلة بالاستعلام ، إلا أن هذا الاهتمام بخطوة واحدة غير كافٍ لنمذجة محتويات الفيديو المعقدة وتقييد الطلب المنطقي على المستوى الأعلى لهذه المهمة. في هذا البحث ، نقترح شبكة جديدة للتصحيح العميق والتعديل (RMN) ، لتحويل هذه المهمة إلى عملية تفكير متعددة الخطوات عن طريق تكرار التصحيح والتعديل. في كل طبقة تعديل - تعديل ، على عكس الأساليب الحالية التي تجري مباشرة التفاعل عبر الوسائط ، نبتكر أولاً وحدة تصحيح لتصحيح اختلال الانتباه الضمني الذي يركز على الموضع الخاطئ أثناء عملية التفاعل المتبادل. بعد ذلك ، تم تطوير وحدة تعديل لالتقاط العلاقة من إطار إلى إطار بمساعدة معلومات الجملة لربط محتويات الفيديو وتكوينها بشكل أفضل بمرور الوقت. مع العديد من هذه الطبقات المتتالية في العمق ، تعمل شبكة RMN الخاصة بنا على تحسين تفاعلات الفيديو والاستعلام بشكل تدريجي ، مما يتيح مزيدًا من الترجمة الدقيقة. تُظهر التقييمات التجريبية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات عامة أن الطريقة المقترحة تحقق أداءً متطورًا. يتم إجراء دراسات اجتثاث مكثفة من أجل التحليل الشامل للطريقة المقترحة.', 'pt': 'A localização de sentenças temporais em vídeos tem como objetivo fundamentar o segmento de melhor correspondência em um vídeo não cortado de acordo com uma determinada consulta de sentença. Trabalhos anteriores neste campo baseiam-se principalmente em estruturas atencionais para alinhar os limites temporais por uma seleção suave. Embora eles se concentrem no conteúdo visual relevante para a consulta, essa atenção em uma única etapa é insuficiente para modelar conteúdos de vídeo complexos e restringir a demanda de raciocínio de nível superior para essa tarefa. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova rede de modulação de retificação profunda (RMN), transformando essa tarefa em um processo de raciocínio de várias etapas, repetindo retificação e modulação. Em cada camada de modulação de retificação, ao contrário dos métodos existentes que conduzem diretamente a interação modal cruzada, primeiro desenvolvemos um módulo de retificação para corrigir o desalinhamento de atenção implícito que se concentra na posição errada durante o processo de interação cruzada. Em seguida, é desenvolvido um módulo de modulação para capturar a relação quadro a quadro com o auxílio de informações de sentença para melhor correlacionar e compor o conteúdo do vídeo ao longo do tempo. Com várias dessas camadas em cascata em profundidade, nosso RMN refina progressivamente as interações de vídeo e consulta, permitindo assim uma localização ainda mais precisa. Avaliações experimentais em três conjuntos de dados públicos mostram que o método proposto alcança desempenho de última geração. Extensos estudos de ablação são realizados para a análise abrangente do método proposto.', 'fr': "La localisation de phrases temporelles dans les vidéos vise à ancrer le segment le mieux adapté dans une vidéo non découpée en fonction d'une requête de phrase donnée. Les travaux antérieurs dans ce domaine s'appuient principalement sur des cadres attentionnels pour aligner les limites temporelles par une sélection souple. Bien qu'ils se concentrent sur le contenu visuel pertinent pour la requête, cette attention en une seule étape est insuffisante pour modéliser des contenus vidéo complexes et limiter la demande de raisonnement de haut niveau pour cette tâche. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau réseau de modulation-rectification profonde (RMN), transformant cette tâche en un processus de raisonnement en plusieurs étapes en répétant la rectification et la modulation. Dans chaque couche de modulation de rectification, contrairement aux méthodes existantes qui conduisent directement l'interaction intermodale, nous concevons d'abord un module de rectification pour corriger le désalignement d'attention implicite qui se concentre sur la mauvaise position pendant le processus d'interaction croisée. Ensuite, un module de modulation est développé pour capturer la relation image à image à l'aide d'informations de phrase afin de mieux corréler et composer les contenus vidéo au fil du temps. Avec plusieurs couches de ce type mises en cascade en profondeur, notre RMN affine progressivement les interactions vidéo et les requêtes, permettant ainsi une localisation encore plus précise. Des évaluations expérimentales sur trois ensembles de données publics montrent que la méthode proposée atteint des performances de pointe. Des études d'ablation approfondies sont réalisées pour l'analyse complète de la méthode proposée.", 'es': 'La localización temporal de frases en los vídeos tiene como objetivo establecer el segmento mejor emparejado en un vídeo sin recortar de acuerdo con una consulta de oración dada. Los trabajos anteriores en este campo se basan principalmente en marcos atencionales para alinear los límites temporales mediante una selección suave. Aunque se centran en el contenido visual relevante para la consulta, esta atención en un solo paso es insuficiente para modelar contenidos de video complejos y restringir la demanda de razonamiento de alto nivel para esta tarea. En este artículo, proponemos una novedosa red de rectificación-modulación profunda (RMN), que transforma esta tarea en un proceso de razonamiento de varios pasos mediante la repetición de la rectificación y la modulación. En cada capa de rectificación-modulación, a diferencia de los métodos existentes que conducen directamente la interacción intermodal, primero diseñamos un módulo de rectificación para corregir la desalineación de la atención implícita que se centra en la posición incorrecta durante el proceso de interacción cruzada. Luego, se desarrolla un módulo de modulación para capturar la relación fotograma a fotograma con la ayuda de la información de la oración para correlacionar y componer mejor el contenido del video a lo largo del tiempo. Con múltiples capas de este tipo en cascada en profundidad, nuestro RMN refina progresivamente las interacciones de vídeo y consulta, lo que permite una localización más precisa. Las evaluaciones experimentales en tres conjuntos de datos públicos muestran que el método propuesto logra un rendimiento de vanguardia. Se llevan a cabo estudios de ablación exhaustivos para el análisis exhaustivo del método propuesto.', 'ja': 'ビデオにおける時間的な文のローカリゼーションは、所与の文クエリに従って、トリミングされていないビデオの最も一致するセグメントをグラウンドすることを目的としています。 この分野の以前の研究は、柔らかい選択によって時間的境界を整列させるための注意深い枠組みに主に依存している。 クエリに関連するビジュアルコンテンツに焦点を当てていますが、これらのシングルステップの注意は、複雑なビデオコンテンツをモデル化し、このタスクの上位レベルの推論需要を制限するのには不十分です。 本稿では，この課題を整流と変調を繰り返すことで多段階の推論プロセスに変換する，新たな深層整流変調ネットワーク（ RMN ）を提案する． 各整流変調層では、クロスモーダルインタラクションを直接行う既存の方法とは異なり、まず、クロスインタラクションプロセス中に間違った位置に焦点を当てた暗黙的な注意のずれを修正するための整流モジュールを考案する。 次いで、時間の経過とともにビデオコンテンツをより良く相関させ、構成するために、文章情報の助けを借りてフレーム間の関係をキャプチャするための変調モジュールが開発される。 このような複数のレイヤーを深くカスケード化することで、RMNはビデオとクエリの相互作用を徐々に改善し、より正確なローカリゼーションを可能にします。 3つの公開データセットに対する実験的評価は、提案された方法が最先端のパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。 提案された方法の包括的な分析のために、広範囲にわたるアブレーション検討が行われる。', 'hi': 'वीडियो में टेम्पोरल वाक्य स्थानीयकरण का उद्देश्य किसी दिए गए वाक्य क्वेरी के अनुसार एक अनट्रिम्ड वीडियो में सबसे अच्छा मिलान किए गए सेगमेंट को ग्राउंड करना है। इस क्षेत्र में पिछले काम मुख्य रूप से एक नरम चयन द्वारा अस्थायी सीमाओं को संरेखित करने के लिए ध्यान देने योग्य ढांचे पर भरोसा करते हैं। यद्यपि वे क्वेरी के लिए प्रासंगिक दृश्य सामग्री पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, ये एकल-चरण ध्यान जटिल वीडियो सामग्री को मॉडल करने और इस कार्य के लिए उच्च-स्तरीय तर्क मांग को प्रतिबंधित करने के लिए अपर्याप्त हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास गहरे सुधार-मॉडुलन नेटवर्क (आरएमएन) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो इस कार्य को सुधार और मॉडुलन को दोहराकर एक बहु-चरणीय तर्क प्रक्रिया में बदल देता है। प्रत्येक सुधार-मॉडुलन परत में, क्रॉस-मोडल इंटरैक्शन का संचालन करने वाले मौजूदा तरीकों के विपरीत, हम पहले अंतर्निहित ध्यान misalignment को सही करने के लिए एक सुधार मॉड्यूल तैयार करते हैं जो क्रॉस-इंटरैक्शन प्रक्रिया के दौरान गलत स्थिति पर केंद्रित होता है। फिर, समय के साथ वीडियो सामग्री को बेहतर सहसंबंधित करने और रचना करने के लिए वाक्य जानकारी की मदद से फ्रेम-टू-फ्रेम संबंध को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक मॉडुलन मॉड्यूल विकसित किया जाता है। गहराई में कैस्केड की गई कई ऐसी परतों के साथ, हमारा आरएमएन उत्तरोत्तर वीडियो और क्वेरी इंटरैक्शन को परिष्कृत करता है, इस प्रकार एक और सटीक स्थानीयकरण को सक्षम करता है। तीन सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है। प्रस्तावित विधि के व्यापक विश्लेषण के लिए व्यापक एब्लेशन अध्ययन किए जाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Временная локализация предложения в видео предназначена для определения наиболее подходящего сегмента в неограниченном видео в соответствии с заданным запросом предложения. Предыдущие работы в этой области в основном опираются на структуры внимания для выравнивания временных границ с помощью мягкого выбора. Хотя они фокусируются на визуальном контенте, относящемся к запросу, этого одношагового внимания недостаточно для моделирования сложного видеоконтента и ограничения спроса на рассуждения более высокого уровня для этой задачи. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую сеть глубокой ректификации-модуляции (RMN), преобразующую эту задачу в многоэтапный процесс рассуждения путем повторения ректификации и модуляции. В каждом ректификационно-модуляционном слое, в отличие от существующих методов, непосредственно ведущих кросс-модальное взаимодействие, мы сначала разработали модуль ректификации для исправления неявного смещения внимания, которое фокусируется на неправильном положении во время процесса кросс-взаимодействия. Затем разрабатывают модуль модуляции для захвата отношения кадр-кадр с помощью информации предложения для лучшей корреляции и составления видеоконтента во времени. С несколькими такими слоями, каскадированными в глубину, наша RMN постепенно уточняет взаимодействие видео и запросов, тем самым обеспечивая дальнейшую точную локализацию. Экспериментальные оценки по трем общедоступным наборам данных показывают, что предлагаемый метод обеспечивает самые современные результаты. Для комплексного анализа предложенного метода проводятся обширные абляционные исследования.', 'zh': '视频中时句本地化旨在据给定句问之,于未剪视频中将最佳匹片段接地。 领城以前,务在注意框架因软选择以对齐时。 虽注于视听,不足以建模视频,而限其更高层次之理。 本文建新型深度整流调网络(RMN),重复整流调,转其务为多步骤推理。 凡整流调层中,与径跨模态交之法不同,先设一整流模块以正隐式意,当错集交错之误。 然后发一调模块,于句信息助下得帻,以便随时推移视频合。 因深度级联数此类,吾 RMN 渐优化视频询交,以成其精确定位。 凡3数集实验论,所出有最先进之性。 博考其方,以综析之。', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag logánú abairtí sealadacha i bhfíseáin an mhír is fearr a mheaitseáil i bhfíseán gan bhearradh de réir fiosrúchán faoi phianbhreith ar leith. Braitheann saothair roimhe seo sa réimse seo go príomha ar chreataí aird chun na teorainneacha ama a ailíniú trí rogha bhog. Cé go ndíríonn siad ar an ábhar amhairc a bhaineann leis an gceist, ní leor an aird aonchéime seo chun ábhar casta físeáin a shamhaltú agus srian a chur ar an éileamh réasúnaíochta ardleibhéil don tasc seo. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid líonra domhain-cheartúcháin-mhodhnúcháin úrnua (RMN), a chlaochlú an tasc seo ina phróiseas réasúnaíochta ilchéime trí cheartú agus modhnú athrá. I ngach ciseal ceartúcháin-mhodhnúcháin, murab ionann agus na modhanna atá ann cheana féin a sheolann an idirghníomhaíocht thrasmhódúil go díreach, déanaimid modúl ceartúcháin a cheapadh ar dtús chun mí-ailíniú aird intuigthe a cheartú a dhíríonn ar an suíomh mícheart le linn an phróisis tras-idirghníomhaíochta. Ansin, forbraítear modúl modhnúcháin chun an gaol fráma-go-fráma a ghabháil le cabhair ó fhaisnéis abairtí chun comhghaolú agus comhdhéanamh níos fearr a dhéanamh ar an ábhar físeáin le himeacht ama. Agus sraitheanna iomadúla den sórt sin scaipthe go domhain, déanann ár RMN idirghníomhaíochtaí físeáin agus fiosrúcháin a bheachtú de réir a chéile, rud a chumasaíonn logánú beacht breise. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí turgnamhacha ar thrí thacar sonraí poiblí go mbaineann an modh atá beartaithe feidhmíocht den scoth amach. Déantar staidéir fhairsing ar ablation chun anailís chuimsitheach a dhéanamh ar an modh atá beartaithe.', 'hu': 'A videók időbeli mondatok lokalizációja célja, hogy egy adott mondatkérdezésnek megfelelően a legjobban illeszkedő szegmenst alakítsa ki egy ismeretlen videóban. A korábbi munkák ezen a területen elsősorban figyelmi keretrendszerekre támaszkodnak, amelyek lágy kiválasztással igazítják az időhatárokat. Bár a lekérdezés szempontjából releváns vizuális tartalomra összpontosítanak, ezek az egylépéses figyelem nem elegendő az összetett videótartalmak modellezéséhez és a feladat magasabb szintű érvelési igényének korlátozásához. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új mélyegyenlítő-modulációs hálózatot (RMN) javasolunk, amely ezt a feladatot többlépcsős érvelési folyamattá alakítja át a korrekció és moduláció ismétlésével. Minden egyes korrekciós-modulációs rétegben, ellentétben a meglévő módszerekkel, amelyek közvetlenül vezetik a transzmodális interakciót, először egy korrekciós modult dolgozunk ki az implicit figyelemzavar korrigálására, amely a keresztinterakciós folyamat során a rossz helyzetre összpontosít. Ezután egy modulációs modul kerül kifejlesztésre, hogy rögzítse a frame-to-frame kapcsolatot mondatinformációk segítségével a videó tartalmának idővel való jobb korrelációja és komponálása érdekében. Több ilyen réteg mélyreható, így az RMN fokozatosan finomítja a videó- és lekérdezési interakciókat, így további pontos lokalizációt tesz lehetővé. Három nyilvános adatkészleten végzett kísérleti értékelések azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer korszerű teljesítményt ér el. A javasolt módszer átfogó elemzéséhez kiterjedt ablációs vizsgálatokat végeznek.', 'el': 'Ο προσωρινός εντοπισμός προτάσεων σε βίντεο στοχεύει στην γείωση του καλύτερα αντιστοιχισμένου τμήματος σε ένα βίντεο χωρίς περικοπή σύμφωνα με ένα δεδομένο ερώτημα πρότασης. Προηγούμενες εργασίες στον τομέα αυτό βασίζονται κυρίως σε πλαίσια προσοχής για να ευθυγραμμίσουν τα χρονικά όρια με μια μαλακή επιλογή. Αν και εστιάζουν στο οπτικό περιεχόμενο που σχετίζεται με το ερώτημα, αυτή η προσοχή ενός σταδίου είναι ανεπαρκής για να μοντελοποιήσουν σύνθετα περιεχόμενα βίντεο και να περιορίσουν την απαίτηση συλλογισμού υψηλότερου επιπέδου για αυτήν την εργασία. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο δίκτυο βαθιάς διόρθωσης-διαμόρφωσης (μετατρέποντας το έργο αυτό σε μια διαδικασία σκέψης πολλαπλών βημάτων επαναλαμβάνοντας την διόρθωση και τη διαφοροποίηση. Σε κάθε στρώμα διόρθωσης-διαμόρφωσης, σε αντίθεση με τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους που διεξάγουν άμεσα τη διαστροπική αλληλεπίδραση, σχεδιάζουμε πρώτα μια ενότητα διόρθωσης για να διορθώσουμε την έμμεση λανθασμένη ευθυγράμμιση της προσοχής που εστιάζει στη λάθος θέση κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας διασταυρούμενης αλληλεπίδρασης. Στη συνέχεια, αναπτύσσεται μια ενότητα διαμόρφωσης για να καταγράψει τη σχέση καρέ-καρέ με τη βοήθεια πληροφοριών προτάσεων για καλύτερη συσχέτιση και σύνθεση του περιεχομένου βίντεο με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Με πολλαπλά τέτοια στρώματα σε βάθος, το σύστημα μας βελτιώνει προοδευτικά τις αλληλεπιδράσεις βίντεο και ερωτήματος, επιτρέποντας έτσι έναν περαιτέρω ακριβή εντοπισμό. Πειραματικές αξιολογήσεις σε τρία δημόσια σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Πραγματοποιούνται εκτεταμένες μελέτες αφαίρεσης για την ολοκληρωμένη ανάλυση της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου.', 'ka': 'Name პირველი სამყაროში მუშაობა მხოლოდ აღმოჩენებელი ფრამებზე, რომელიც ტემპალური სამყაროს გადაწყენებს მარტივი არჩევითით. მაგრამ ისინი კითხვის შესახებ ვიზუალური შესახებ დააყენებულია, ეს ერთ-დროს შესახებ არ არის მსგავსი კომპლექსი ვიდეო შესახებ მოდელექტის შესახებ და უფრო მეტი ამ დომენტში ჩვენ პროგრამებით პროგრამებით პროგრამეტრება-მოდულაციის ქსელი (RMN), რომელიც ამ დავალებას მრავალ გრაფიკური პარამეტრების პროცესში გადატანქრუნეთ, რომელი ყოველ რექტიფიკაცია-მოდულაციის ჩატვირთში, მსოფლიოს პროცესის განსხვავებაზე, ჩვენ პირველად რექტიფიკაციის მოდულია, რომელიც კრესიკონტაქციის პროცესის განსხვავებაში შეცდომა პროცესის შეცდომა შემდეგ მოდულაციის მოდულის მოდულის განვითარება, რომელიც სახელსაწყისთვის ინფორმაციის დახმარებისთვის, სახელსაწყისთვის საუკეთესო კოლელიაცია და ვიდეო ინფორმაციის რამდენიმე რამდენიმე სიტყვებით კაკაკადირებულია, ჩვენი RMN პროგრესიგურად ვიდეო და კითხვა ინტერფექციების შესაძლებელია, რადგან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ლოკალიზ ექსპერიმენტიური განსაზღვრება სამი საზოგადო მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთა მონაცემების განსაზღვრებაში იქნება, რომ მონაცემებული მეთოდის გასაზ უფრო დიდი წარმოდგენების სწავლად გავაკეთებულია ყველაფერი ანალიზაციისთვის.', 'it': "La localizzazione temporale delle frasi nei video mira a mettere a terra il segmento più adatto in un video non immediato secondo una data query di frase. I lavori precedenti in questo campo si basano principalmente su quadri di attenzione per allineare i confini temporali con una selezione morbida. Sebbene si concentrino sui contenuti visivi rilevanti per la query, queste attenzioni in un solo passaggio non sono sufficienti per modellare contenuti video complessi e limitare la richiesta di ragionamento di livello superiore per questa attività. In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova rete di rettifica-modulazione profonda (RMN), trasformando questo compito in un processo di ragionamento multi-step ripetendo rettifica e modulazione. In ogni livello di rettifica-modulazione, a differenza dei metodi esistenti che conducono direttamente l'interazione cross-modale, elaboriamo prima un modulo di rettifica per correggere il disallineamento implicito dell'attenzione che si concentra sulla posizione sbagliata durante il processo di interazione incrociata. Successivamente, viene sviluppato un modulo di modulazione per catturare la relazione frame-to-frame con l'aiuto di informazioni sulle frasi per una migliore correlazione e composizione dei contenuti video nel tempo. Con più livelli di questo tipo in cascata in profondità, il nostro RMN affina progressivamente le interazioni video e query, consentendo così un'ulteriore localizzazione precisa. Le valutazioni sperimentali su tre set di dati pubblici dimostrano che il metodo proposto raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia. Vengono effettuati approfonditi studi di ablazione per l'analisi completa del metodo proposto.", 'kk': 'Видеотияларда тәуелсіздік сөйлеменің локализациясы келтірілген сөйлеменің сұранысына сәйкес келтірілмеген видеоның ең жақсы сәйкес сегментін түсіруге мақсат беред Бұл өрісте алдыңғы жұмыс істейді, негізінде, уақытша шектерді бақытты таңдау арқылы қызықты фреймдер бойынша тұрады. Олар сұраныстағы көрініс мазмұнына назар аударуға қарағанда, бұл бір қадам назар комплекс видео мазмұнын үлгілеу үшін жеткілікті емес және осы тапсырманың жоғары деңгейінде Бұл қағазда, біз романдық түсті түзету- модуляциялау желі (RMN) деп, тапсырманы көп қадамды түзету және модуляцияны қайталап, көп қадамды түзету процесіне аударып береміз. Әрбір түзету- модуляция қабатында, бар әдістерінің көзді модульдік интерфейсін тәртіпке сәйкес істеу әдістерінің қасиетіне, біріншіден біріншіден біріншіден біріншіден өзгерту модулін түзету үшін, бі Содан кейін, бейне мазмұнын жақсы көмектесу және құру үшін қоршау мен фрейм- фрейміне қатынау үшін модуляция модулі құрылады. Бұл көптеген қабаттар тереңілігінде каскадтырылған, RMN-іміз видео және сұраныс интерфейстерін өзгертеді, сондықтан бірнеше дұрыс жергілікті болады. Үш жалпы деректер қорларындағы эксперименталдық оқиғалар ұсынылған әдістердің күй- жайындағы жұмыс істеуін көрсетеді. Кеңейтілген жұмыс істеу зерттеулері келтірілген тәсілді толық анализ үшін істейді.', 'lt': 'Laikinojo sakinio lokalizavimas vaizdo įrašuose siekia įžeminti geriausią suderintą segment ą nepatvirtintame vaizdo įrašuje pagal tam tikrą sakinio klausimą. Ankstesni darbai šioje srityje daugiausia grindžiami atidžiais pagrindais, kad laikinosios ribos būtų suderintos taikant minkštą atranką. Although they focus on the visual content relevant to the query, these single-step attention are insufficient to model complex video contents and restrict the higher-level reasoning demand for this task.  Šiame dokumente siūlome naują gilaus ištaisymo moduliacijos tinklą (angl. deep rectification-modulation network, RMN), kuris šią užduotį paverčia daugiapakopiu pagrindimo procesu, pakartodamas ištaisymą ir moduliaciją. Kiekviename koregavimo ir moduliavimo sluoksnyje, priešingai nei esami metodai, tiesiogiai atliekantys tarpmodalinę sąveiką, pirmiausia sukuriame koregavimo modulį, kad ištaisytume netiesioginį dėmesio sutrikimą, kuriame daugiausia dėmesio skiriama netinkamai padėčiai kryžminio sąveikos proceso metu. Tuomet kuriamas moduliavimo modulis, kad būtų galima užfiksuoti rėmų ir rėmų santykį naudodamas frazės informaciją, kad būtų geriau koreliuojamas ir laikui bėgant komponuojamas vaizdo turinys. Daugeliu tokių sluoksnių giliai kaskaduojant, mūsų RMN palaipsniui tobulina vaizdo ir užklausos sąveiką, taip sudarant galimybę tiksliau lokalizuoti. Eksperimentiniai trijų viešųjų duomenų rinkinių vertinimai rodo, kad siūlomu metodu pasiekti pažangiausi rezultatai. Siekiant išsamios siūlomo metodo analizės, atliekami išsamūs abliacijos tyrimai.', 'mk': 'Локализацијата на привремените реченици во видеата има за цел да го подложи најдобриот совпаѓачки сегмент во непрочитано видео според даденото прашање за реченици. Претходните дела во ова поле се потпираат главно на внимателни рамки за израмнување на временските граници со мек избор. Although they focus on the visual content relevant to the query, these single-step attention are insufficient to model complex video contents and restrict the higher-level reasoning demand for this task.  In this paper, we propose a novel deep rectification-modulation network (RMN), transforming this task into a multi-step reasoning process by repeating rectification and modulation.  Во секој слој на ректификација-модулација, за разлика од постоечките методи кои директно ја спроведуваат крстомодалната интеракција, прво дизајнираме модул за ректификација за да го поправиме имплицитното погрешно пристапување на вниманието кое се фокусира на погрешната позиција за време на проце Потоа, се развива модул за модулација за зафатување на врската рамка до рамка со помош на информациите за речениците за подобро корелација и композиција на содржината на видео со текот на времето. Со голем број вакви слоеви во длабочина, нашиот РМН прогресивно рафинира видео и барање интеракции, овозможувајќи понатамошна прецизна локализација. Експерименталните евалуации на три јавни податоци покажуваат дека предложениот метод постигнува најсовремени резултати. Се спроведуваат широки студии на аблација за сеопфатна анализа на предложениот метод.', 'mt': 'Il-lokalizzazzjoni tas-sentenzi temporanji fil-vidjows għandha l-għan li tlaħħaq l-a ħjar segment imqabbel f’vidjow mingħajr rimm skont mistoqsija tas-sentenza partikolari. Ix-xogħlijiet preċedenti f’dan il-qasam jiddependu prinċipalment fuq oqfsa attenti biex il-limiti temporali jiġu allinjati permezz ta’ għa żla mhux vinkolanti. Għalkemm jiffokaw fuq il-kontenut viżwali rilevanti għall-mistoqsija, din l-attenzjoni f’pass wieħed mhijiex biżżejjed biex timmudella kontenut kumpless tal-vidjo u tirrestrinġi d-domanda għal raġunament ta’ livell ogħla għal dan il-kompitu. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu netwerk ġdid ta’ rettifika profonda (RMN), li jittrasforma dan il-kompitu f’proċess ta’ raġunament f’diversi stadji billi tirrepeti r-rettifika u l-modulazzjoni. F’kull saff ta’ rettifika-modulazzjoni, għall-kuntrarju tal-metodi eżistenti li jwettqu direttament l-interazzjoni transmodali, l-ewwel a ħna niddisinjaw modulu ta’ rettifika biex jikkoreġu allinjament ħażin impliċitu tal-attenzjoni li jiffoka fuq il-pożizzjoni ħażina matul il-proċess ta’ interazzjoni trasversali. Imbagħad, jiġi żviluppat modulu ta’ modulazzjoni biex jinqabad ir-relazzjoni bejn il-qafas u l-qafas bl-għajnuna ta’ informazzjoni dwar is-sentenza għal korrelazzjoni u kompożizzjoni a ħjar tal-kontenut tal-vidjo maż-żmien. B’diversi saffi bħal dawn ikkassati fil-fond, l-RMN tagħna gradwalment irfina l-interazzjonijiet tal-vidjo u tal-mistoqsijiet, u b’hekk tippermetti lokalizzazzjoni preċiża ulterjuri. Evalwazzjonijiet sperimentali fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta pubbliċi juru li l-metodu propost jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata. Saru studji estensivi dwar l-ablazzjoni għall-analiżi komprensiva tal-metodu propost.', 'ms': 'Lokalisasi kalimat sementara dalam video bermaksud untuk tanah segmen terbaik yang sepadan dalam video tanpa garisan mengikut pertanyaan kalimat yang diberi. Kerja sebelumnya dalam medan ini bergantung pada bingkai perhatian untuk mengajar sempadan sementara dengan pemilihan lembut. Walaupun mereka fokus pada kandungan visual yang berkaitan dengan pertanyaan, perhatian langkah tunggal ini tidak mencukupi untuk model kandungan video kompleks dan hadapi permintaan alasan tinggi untuk tugas ini. In this paper, we propose a novel deep rectification-modulation network (RMN), transforming this task into a multi-step reasoning process by repeating rectification and modulation.  Dalam setiap lapisan penyesuaian-modulasi, tidak seperti kaedah yang wujud secara langsung melaksanakan interaksi transmodal, kita pertama-tama merancang modul penyesuaian untuk betulkan penyesuaian perhatian implicit yang fokus pada kedudukan yang salah semasa proses penyesuaian interaksi. Kemudian, modul modulasi dikembangkan untuk menangkap hubungan bingkai-bingkai dengan bantuan maklumat kalimat untuk berkorelasi dan komposisi kandungan video dengan lebih baik. Dengan berbilang lapisan seperti yang berkaskad dalam kedalaman, RMN kami secara progresif memperbaiki interaksi video dan tanya, dengan cara ini membolehkan lokasi tepat lebih lanjut. Evaluasi eksperimental pada tiga set data awam menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art. kajian ablasi yang luas dilakukan untuk analisis komprensif kaedah yang diusulkan.', 'no': 'Lokalisering av mellombels setningar i videoar måtar å bakgrunna det beste samsvarande segmentet i eit ikkje-trykket video etter eit gitt setningspurret. Førre arbeidar i dette feltet er hovudsakelig avhengig av attentive rammeverk for å justera tidlegare grensene ved eit måk utval. Selv om dei fokuserer på den visuelle innhaldet som er relevante til spørjinga, er desse enkelte steg oppmerksomheta ikkje tilstrekkelig for å modellere komplekse videoinnhaldet og avgrensera den høgare nivååårspørselen for denne oppgåva. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt dyp rektifikasjonsmoduleringsnettverk (RMN), som transformerer denne oppgåva til ein fleirsteg rasjonsprosess ved å gjentaka rektifikasjon og modular. I kvar rektifikasjonsmodulasjonslag, i motsetjing av dei eksisterande metodane som direkte gjer krysmodalet interaksjon, finn vi først eit rektifikasjonsmodul for å retta implisitt oppmerksområde som fokuserer på feil posisjon under kryssamhandlingsprosessen. Deretter er ein modulsmodul utvikla for å henta ramma-til-ramma-relasjonen med hjelp av setningsinformasjonen for betre korrelasjon og lagra videoinnhaldet over tid. Med fleire slike lag kaskadert i dybde, vil RMN vårt progresivt refinere video og spørjande interaksjonar, slik at det gjer ein meir nøyaktig lokalisering. Eksperimentale evalueringar på tre offentlige datasett viser at den foreslåde metoden gjer tilstanden for kunsten. Utvidingsstudier er er utført for den komplette analysen av den foreslåde metoden.', 'ml': 'വീഡിയോയിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ ചോദ്യം അനുസരിച്ച് ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പൊരുത്തിയ വി ഈ പ്രദേശത്തിലെ മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട് ശ്രദ്ധയുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മെ ചോദ്യത്തില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട കാഴ്ചയുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കം അവര്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d വീഡിയോ ഉള്ളടക്കം മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്-മോഡുലേഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയെ ഒരു multi-step കാരണിക്കുന്ന പ് ക്രിസ്മോഡല്\u200d ഇടപെടുത്തുന്ന നേരിട്ട് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പോലെയാണ് എല്ലാ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും മോഡുളേഷന്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു സെക പിന്നെ വാക്കിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സഹായത്തോടൊപ്പം ഫ്രെയിമില്\u200d നിന്നും ഫ്രെയിമില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പിടിക്കാനും വീഡിയോ ഉള്ളടക്കം കൂട്ടു ആഴത്തില്\u200d കഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട പലതും കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ RMN പുരോഗതി വീഡിയോ പുതുക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് കൂ മൂന്നു പൊതുവായ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണവിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d നി പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയുടെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശോധനത്തിനായി വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു.', 'ro': 'Localizarea temporală a propozițiilor în videoclipuri își propune să soluționeze segmentul cel mai potrivit într-un videoclip neterminat conform unei anumite interogări de propoziție. Lucrările anterioare din acest domeniu se bazează în principal pe cadre de atenție pentru a alinia limitele temporale printr-o selecție ușoară. Deși se concentrează pe conținutul vizual relevant pentru interogare, aceste atenții într-un singur pas sunt insuficiente pentru a modela conținutul video complex și pentru a restricționa cererea de raționament la nivel superior pentru această sarcină. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă rețea profundă de rectificare-modulare (RMN), transformând această sarcină într-un proces de raționament în mai multe etape prin repetarea rectificării și modulației. În fiecare strat de rectificare-modulare, spre deosebire de metodele existente care conduc direct interacțiunea cross-modală, concepem mai întâi un modul de rectificare pentru a corecta eroarea atenției implicite care se concentrează pe poziția greșită în timpul procesului de interacțiune cross-modală. Apoi, un modul de modulare este dezvoltat pentru a capta relația cadru-cadru cu ajutorul informațiilor propoziției pentru o mai bună corelare și compunere a conținutului video în timp. Cu mai multe astfel de straturi în cascadă în profunzime, RMN-ul nostru rafinează progresiv interacțiunile video și interogări, permițând astfel o localizare precisă suplimentară. Evaluările experimentale pe trei seturi de date publice arată că metoda propusă atinge performanțe de ultimă generație. Studii ample de ablație sunt efectuate pentru analiza cuprinzătoare a metodei propuse.', 'sr': 'Lokalizacija privremene rečenice u videoima ima cilj da podigne najbolji odgovarajući segment u nevidljivom video u skladu sa određenim zahtevom rečenice. Prethodni radovi na ovom polju oslanjaju se uglavnom na pažnju okvira da poravnaju temporalne granice mekim izborom. Iako se fokusiraju na vizualni sadržaj relevantan za pitanje, ova jedinstvena pažnja nisu dovoljna za modelu kompleksnog sadržaja video i ograničavaju zahtev za razumljivanje višeg nivoa za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu duboku mrežu rektifikacije-modulacije (RMN), preobraćajući ovaj zadatak u proces razumljivanja višekoraka ponovljajući rektifikaciju i modulaciju. U svakom sloju rektifikacije-modulacije, za razliku od postojećih metoda direktno proveravajući kroz modalnu interakciju, prvo smo smislili modul rektifikacije kako bi ispravili implicitno nepravdu pažnje koja se fokusira na pogrešnu poziciju tijekom procesa kroz interakciju. Onda se modulacijski modul razvija kako bi uhvatila odnos okvira na okviru s pomoć informacija rečenice za bolju korelaciju i sastavu video sadržaja tijekom vremena. Sa mnogim takvim slojevima kaskadiranim u dubini, naš RMN postupno refinira video i interakcije, tako omogućava daljnju preciznu lokalizaciju. Eksperimentalne procjene na tri javne podatke pokazuju da predložena metoda postigne postupak države umjetnosti. Proučavaju se prošireno proučavanje ablacije za sveobuhvatnu analizu predložene metode.', 'mn': 'Бичлэгүүд дээрх температур өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлж өгсөн өгүүлбэрээр хамгийн сайн холбоотой сегментийг тодорхойлж байна. Энэ талбарт өмнөх үйл ажиллагаа ихэвчлэн ухаантай хэлбэрүүд нь хугацааны хил хязгаарыг бага сонголт болгоход хадгалагддаг. Хэдийгээр тэд квадраттай холбогдсон видео-тоо төвлөрүүлэхэд анхаарлаа хангалттай, комплекс видео-тоо хэмжээний загварыг загварчлахад, өндөр түвшинд урьдчилан шалтгааныг хязгаарлах хэрэгцээнд Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ гүн гүнзгий шугам-модуляцийн сүлжээ (RMN) болон энэ үйлдлийг олон алхам урьдчилан шалгах процесс руу шилжүүлнэ. Шулгалт-модулийн давхар бүрт, мөн байгаа арга замыг шууд хэлбэртэй харилцааныг дамжуулах эсэхээр, бид анхны давхар харилцааны процесс дээр буруу байрлал дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлэх загварын модуль зохион байрлуулдаг. Дараа нь хэлбэрийн мэдээллийн тусламжтай, илүү холбоотой, цаг хугацаанд бичлэгийн мазмуудыг бий болгох үед модулел модуль үүсгэгдсэн. Ийм олон давхарт гүн гүнзгий хэлбэрээр бидний РМН видео болон кверсийн харилцааныг давхарлаж байна. Иймээс илүү тодорхой орон зай болгох боломжтой. Гурван нийтийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтын үнэлгээ нь санал өгсөн арга нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны төлөө гаргадаг. Өнгөрсөн хөгжлийн судалгаанууд санал өгсөн аргын бүрэн шинжилгээнд хийгддэг.', 'pl': 'Lokalizacja zdań czasowych w filmach ma na celu uziemienie najlepiej dopasowanego segmentu w nieograniczonym wideo zgodnie z danym zapytaniem zdań. Poprzednie prace w tej dziedzinie opierają się głównie na ramach uwagi, aby wyrównać granice czasowe za pomocą miękkiego selekcji. Chociaż koncentrują się one na treściach wizualnych istotnych dla zapytania, uwaga ta jednostopniowa jest niewystarczająca do modelowania złożonych treści wideo i ograniczenia wyższego poziomu zapotrzebowania na rozumowanie tego zadania. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową sieć głębokiej prostowania-modulacji (RMN), przekształcającą to zadanie w wieloetapowy proces rozumowania poprzez powtarzanie prostowania i modulacji. W każdej warstwie prosto-modulacyjnej, w przeciwieństwie do istniejących metod bezpośrednio prowadzących interakcję intermodalną, najpierw opracowujemy moduł prostowania, aby skorygować ukryte niedostosowanie uwagi, które skupia się na niewłaściwej pozycji podczas procesu interakcji krzyżowej. Następnie opracowany jest moduł modulacji, aby uchwycić relację klatki-klatki za pomocą informacji o zdaniu w celu lepszej korelacji i komponowania treści wideo w czasie. Z wieloma takimi warstwami kaskadowanymi w głębi, nasz RMN stopniowo udoskonala interakcje wideo i zapytania, umożliwiając tym samym dalszą precyzyjną lokalizację. Eksperymentalne oceny trzech publicznych zbiorów danych pokazują, że proponowana metoda osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność. W celu kompleksowej analizy proponowanej metody przeprowadzane są obszerne badania ablacji.', 'so': "Goobta ku meelgaarka ah ee fiidiyowga waxaa loola jeedaa in lagu soo dejiyo qeybta ugu fiican ee isku mid ah fiidiyowga a an sharciga lahayn sida ay ku qoran tahay codsiga go'aanka. Shaqooyinkii hore ee duurkan waxay ku xiran yihiin firaaqada dhaqdhaqaalaha si uu u soo sawiro xuduudaha waqtiga ah doorasho jilicsan. Inkastoo ay ku kalsoonaadaan waxyaabaha aragnimada ee la xiriira queriga, halkan tallaabo oo keliya ma filna in loo sameyno qalabka fiidiyowga oo murugaysan karo baahida sababta sare. Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo jeedaynaa shabakad aad u dheer oo hagaajinta (RMN), waxan waxan u beddelinaynaa si loo beddelo baaritaanka sababtiisa oo kala duduwan marka lagu soo celiyo hagaajinta iyo bedelka. Qalad kasta oo hagaajinta, si u duwan qaababka joogta ah oo toos u sameeya iskutallaabta iskutallaabta, marka hore waxaan qoraynaa qalabka hagaajinta si aan u hagaajinno isbedelka kaleemeysashada, kaasoo ku kalsoonaadaya meel khalad ah xiliga iskutallaanka. Markaas waxaa la horumariyey moduleed si aad u qabsato isku xiriirka firaaqada iyo caawimaadda macluumaadka garsooridda si aad ugu fiirsato isku xiriirka iyo soo sameynta waxyaabaha fiidiyowga waqtiga dheer. Sida aad u baahan tahay moolka dheer, RMN ayaa si horumar ah u sawiraya fiidiyowga iyo xiriirka la xiriira, sidaa darteed waxay u caawinaysaa meel aad u sahlan. Qiimeynta imtixaanka ee saddexda macluumaadka dadweynaha waxaad ka muuqataa in qaabka la soo jeeday uu gaadho sameynta farshaxanka. Waxbarashada dalbashada dheeraadka ah waxaa lagu sameeyaa baaritaanka aasaasiga ah ee qaababka la soo jeeday.", 'si': 'Name මේ ක්ෂේත්රයේ ඉස්තින් වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් සීමාව සම්බන් ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාව සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ පැත්තේ, අපි නියමය ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය-මොඩියුලේෂන් ජාලය (RMN) කිරීමට සැලසුම් කරනවා, මේ වැඩියාව ගොඩක් පැත්තක් හො හැම ප්\u200dරතිචාර-මොඩියුලේෂණ් ස්ථානයේදී, ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදි ඊට පස්සේ, වීඩියෝව සම්බන්ධයක් හොඳ සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා වීඩියෝ සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධ වීඩියෝ සම්බන අනුවෙන් ස්තූතියෙන් ගොඩක් ස්ථානයෙන් කැස්කේඩ් කරලා තියෙනවා, අපේ RMN විඩියෝ සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරවේ සාමාජික දත්ත සැට් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානය තත්වයට ප්\u200d ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානයේ සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා.', 'ur': 'ویڈیوں میں تیموں ویڈیوں کی لکالیزی کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ایک دیویوی کے مطابق اچھا مطابق مطابق اچھا مطابق مطابق مطابق ملے گا۔ اس کھیتی میں پہلے سے کام کرتا ہے سب سے زیادہ توجه کے فرمورک پر ایک نرم انتخاب سے temporal boundaries align کرنے کے لئے۔ اگرچہ وہ سؤال کے معاملہ میں مسئول منصفات پر تمرکز کریں، یہ ایک سؤال کی توجه پیچیدہ ویڈیو منصفات کی مدل کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے اور اس کام کے لئے بلند سطح منصفات کی خواہش تنگ کریں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نوی عمیق سیدھا-موڈیلوٹ نیٹ ورک (RMN) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، اس کام کو multi-step reasoning پرسس میں تبدیل کر رہے ہیں، سیدھا اور موڈیلوٹ دوبارہ کر رہے ہیں۔ ہر اصلاح-موڈیلوٹ لائر میں، مختلف موجود طریقے کے مطابق کروس-موڈال تعامل کے مطابق، ہم پہلی بار ایک اصلاح موڈیل کی تدبیر کر رہے ہیں کہ مشکل توجه کی غلط تعامل کو درست کرے جو کروس-تعامل پرسس کے وقت غلط موقعیت پر مشکل کر اس کے بعد، ایک موڈولیशन موڈیل ایجاد کی جاتی ہے کہ فیروم سے فرم رابطہ حاصل کرنے کے لئے مجلس معلومات کی مدد کے ساتھ بہتر رابطہ کرنے اور ویڈیو منصوبات کو وقت کے اوقات میں ترکیب کرنے کے لئے۔ اس طرح بہت سی لہروں کے ساتھ گھبراہٹ میں کاسک ڈالا گیا ہے، ہمارے RMN نے ویڈیو اور سؤال کی تعاملات کو اضافہ کرتا ہے، اس طرح ایک اور دقیق محلی تعاملات کو امکان دیتا ہے. تین عمومی ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کی ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کی تحقیق قائم ہوتی ہے. پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے تمام تحلیل کے لئے پھیلانے والی آزمائش پڑھائی جاتی ہیں.', 'sv': 'Temporal meningslokalisering i videor syftar till att jorda det bäst matchade segmentet i en outhärdad video enligt en given meningsfråga. Tidigare arbeten inom detta område förlitar sig huvudsakligen på uppmärksamhetsramar för att anpassa tidsgränserna genom ett mjukt urval. Även om de fokuserar på det visuella innehåll som är relevant för frågan, är denna enkelstegs uppmärksamhet otillräcklig för att modellera komplext videoinnehåll och begränsa behovet av resonemang på högre nivå för den här uppgiften. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt djupt rectification-modulation network (RMN), som omvandlar denna uppgift till en flerstegs resonemang process genom att upprepa rectification och modulering. I varje korrigeringsmoduleringsskikt, till skillnad från befintliga metoder som direkt leder den tvärmodala interaktionen, utformar vi först en korrigeringsmodul för att korrigera implicit uppmärksamhetsfel som fokuserar på fel position under korsinteraktionsprocessen. Därefter utvecklas en moduleringsmodul för att fånga frame-to-frame-relationen med hjälp av meningsinformation för att bättre korrelera och komponera videoinnehållet över tid. Med flera sådana lager kaskaderade i djupet förfina vår RMN successivt video- och frågeinteraktioner, vilket möjliggör ytterligare exakt lokalisering. Experimentella utvärderingar på tre offentliga datauppsättningar visar att den föreslagna metoden uppnår toppmoderna prestanda. Omfattande ablationsstudier utförs för en omfattande analys av den föreslagna metoden.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கிக் கேள்வி பொறுத்து வீடியோவில் சிறந்த பொருந்திய பிரிவில் உள்ள வாக்கியத்தை தற்காலிக இடமாக் இந்த புலத்தில் முந்தைய வேலைகள் மென்னெடுத்த தேர்வால் தற்காலிக விளிம்புகளை வரிசைப்படுத்த முடியும். கேள்வியில் தொடர்புடைய பார்வையின் உள்ளடக்கங்களை கவனம் செலுத்தி இருந்தாலும், இந்த ஒற்றைபடி கவனம் சிக்கலான வீடியோ உள்ளடக்கங்களை மாதிரிக்க ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஆழமான திருத்தமான பிணையத்தை (RMN), இந்த செயலை பல படி காரணங்களான செயலாக மாற்றுகிறது, திருத்தம் மற்றும் திருத @ info பின்னர், வீடியோ உள்ளடக்கங்களை மேலும் நேரத்தில் சிறந்த தொடர்புடன் வாக்கிய தகவல் உதவியால் சட்டத்திலிருந்து சட்டத்தை பிடிக்க ஒரு பாகமாக ஆழத்தில் இத்தகைய பல அடுக்குகள் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, எங்கள் RMN முன்னேற்றி வீடியோ மற்றும் கேள்வி இடைவெளிகளை திருப்புகி மூன்று பொது தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் மதிப்புகள் தெரியும் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் கலை செயல்பாட்ட பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையின் முழுமையான ஆய்வு', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Agar ular so\xa0Ľrov bilan bog\xa0Ľliq bo\xa0Ľlgan ko\xa0Ľrinish tarkibini fokuslash mumkin, bu bir qadam murakkab video tarkibini modellashga yetarli emas va bu vazifa uchun eng darajadagi sabablar so\xa0Ľrovini kamaytirish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz bu vazifani bir necha darajada o'zgartirish va qayta tahrirlash orqali o'zgartiradik. @ info Name Ko'pchilik qatlam qo'shilgan qatlamlar bilan, bizning RMN davomida video va interfeyslarni qidirish davomida o'zgartiradi, shunday qilib qo'shilga oshirish mumkin. Ta\xa0ľminlovchi uchta shaxsiy ma\xa0ľlumotlar tarkibidagi qiymatni ko\xa0Ľrsatish mumkin. Bunday talab qilingan usuli shu shaxsiy amalning holatini amalga oshirish mumkin. Ko\xa0Ľrsatilgan usulning kompyuterni aniqlash uchun kengaytirish o'qituvchilari bajarildi.", 'vi': 'Định vị câu thời gian trong đoạn video nhằm thực hiện đoạn video tương ứng tốt nhất trong đoạn video không được cấp theo một câu hỏi đã đưa ra. Những tác phẩm trước trong lĩnh vực này chủ yếu dựa vào chăm chú nền xếp thẳng hàng ranh giới thời gian bằng sự lựa chọn nhẹ nhàng. Mặc dù chúng tập trung vào nội dung thị giác liên quan đến câu hỏi, nhưng sự chú ý của một bước không đủ để mô tả nội dung video phức tạp và hạn chế nhu cầu lập trình cấp cao cho nhiệm vụ này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng lưới chỉnh sửa sâu mới (RMN), biến nhiệm vụ này thành một quá trình lập trình lập trình lập trình đa bước bằng cách lặp lại sự sửa chữa và thay đổi. Trong mỗi lớp chỉnh sửa, không như các phương pháp đang sử dụng trực tiếp tiến hành giao tiếp đường chéo, chúng ta đầu tiên nghĩ ra một mô- đun chỉnh sửa để sửa sự lệch hướng tập trung vào sai vị trí trong quá trình giao tiếp chéo. Sau đó, một mô- đun thay đổi được phát triển để xác định mối quan hệ giữa khung hình với sự giúp đỡ của thông tin câu nói để có thể phù hợp tốt hơn với nội dung video qua thời gian. Với nhiều lớp như thế hiện diện sâu hơn, RMN của chúng ta sẽ dần tinh chỉnh các tương tác video và truy vấn, nhờ đó phát triển chính xác hơn nữa. Thí nghiệm đánh giá ba bộ dữ liệu công cộng cho thấy phương pháp được áp dụng đạt đến trình độ cao nhất. Đã có nhiều nghiên cứu rửa để phân tích toàn diện phương pháp đã đề nghị.', 'bg': 'Локализацията на времевите изречения във видеоклиповете цели да заземи най-добрия съвпадащ сегмент в необработено видео според дадена заявка за изречение. Предишни работи в тази област разчитат главно на внимателни рамки за привеждане на времевите граници чрез мек подбор. Въпреки че те се фокусират върху визуалното съдържание, свързано с заявката, това едностепенно внимание е недостатъчно за моделиране на сложно видео съдържание и ограничаване на търсенето на по-високо ниво на разсъждения за тази задача. В настоящата статия предлагаме нова мрежа за дълбоко коригиране-модулация (РМН), трансформираща тази задача в многостепенен процес на разсъждаване чрез повтаряне на коригиране и модулация. Във всеки слой коригиране-модулация, за разлика от съществуващите методи, които пряко провеждат междумодалното взаимодействие, ние първо разработваме модул за коригиране на имплицитното несъответствие на вниманието, който се фокусира върху грешната позиция по време на процеса на кръстосано взаимодействие. След това се разработва модулационен модул, който улавя връзката кадър-кадър с помощта на информация за изречение за по-добро корелация и композиране на съдържанието на видеото с течение на времето. С множество такива слоеве, каскадирани в дълбочина, нашата система постепенно усъвършенства взаимодействията с видео и заявки, като по този начин позволява по-нататъшна прецизна локализация. Експерименталните оценки на три обществени набора от данни показват, че предложеният метод постига най-съвременни резултати. Извършват се обширни аблационни проучвания за изчерпателен анализ на предложения метод.', 'da': 'Temporal sætning lokalisering i videoer har til formål at jorde det bedst matchede segment i en ubegrænset video i henhold til en given sætning forespørgsel. Tidligere værker på dette område er hovedsageligt afhængige af opmærksomhedsrammer til at justere tidsgrænserne ved et blødt valg. Selvom de fokuserer på det visuelle indhold, der er relevant for forespørgslen, er denne enkelttridsopmærksomhed utilstrækkelig til at modellere komplekst videoindhold og begrænse behovet for ræsonnement på højere niveau for denne opgave. I denne artikel foreslår vi et nyt dybt rectification-modulation netværk (RMN), der omdanner denne opgave til en multi-trins ræsonnement proces ved at gentage rectification og modulation. I hvert rektificerings-modulationslag, i modsætning til eksisterende metoder, der direkte gennemfører den tværmodale interaktion, udtænker vi først et rektificeringsmodul til at korrigere implicit opmærksomheds misjustering, som fokuserer på den forkerte position under cross-interaktion processen. Derefter udvikles et modulationsmodul til at fange frame-to-frame-relationen ved hjælp af sætningsinformation for bedre korrelering og komponering af videoindholdet over tid. Med flere sådanne lag kaskaderet i dybden, forbedrer vores RMN gradvist video- og forespørgselssamtaler, hvilket muliggør en yderligere præcis lokalisering. Eksperimentelle evalueringer på tre offentlige datasæt viser, at den foreslåede metode opnår state-of-the-art performance. Der gennemføres omfattende ablationsundersøgelser med henblik på en omfattende analyse af den foreslåede metode.', 'nl': "Tijdelijke zinslokalisatie in video's heeft als doel het best overeenkomende segment in een ongestemde video te aarden volgens een bepaalde zinsquery. Eerdere werken op dit gebied baseren zich voornamelijk op attentional frameworks om de tijdsgrenzen af te stemmen door middel van een zachte selectie. Hoewel ze zich richten op de visuele inhoud die relevant is voor de query, is deze single-step aandacht onvoldoende om complexe video-inhoud te modelleren en de hogere redeneringsvraag voor deze taak te beperken. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw diep rectificatie-modulatienetwerk (RMN) voor, dat deze taak transformeert in een multi-step redeneerproces door rectificatie en modulatie te herhalen. In elke rectificatie-modulatielaag ontwikkelen we, in tegenstelling tot bestaande methoden die de cross-modale interactie rechtstreeks uitvoeren, eerst een rectificatiemodule om impliciete aandacht misalignment te corrigeren die zich richt op de verkeerde positie tijdens het cross-interactieproces. Vervolgens wordt een modulatiemodule ontwikkeld om de frame-to-frame relatie vast te leggen met behulp van zinsinformatie voor een betere correlatie en compositie van de videoinhoud in de loop van de tijd. Met meerdere dergelijke lagen in de diepte gecrascadeerd, verfijnt ons RMN geleidelijk video- en query-interacties, waardoor een verdere precieze lokalisatie mogelijk is. Experimentele evaluaties op drie publieke datasets tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode state-of-the-art prestaties levert. Voor de uitgebreide analyse van de voorgestelde methode worden uitgebreide ablatiestudies uitgevoerd.", 'hr': 'Lokalizacija privremene rečenice u snimkama cilja je da podmetne najbolji odgovarajući segment u neodređenom video u skladu s odgovarajućim zahtjevima rečenice. Prethodni radovi na ovom polju oslanjaju se uglavnom na pozorne okvire kako bi poravnali privremene granice mekim izborom. Iako se fokusiraju na vizualni sadržaj relevantan za zahtjev, te jednokoračne pažnje nisu dovoljne za model kompleksnog sadržaja video i ograničavaju zahtjev za razumljivanje višeg nivoa za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu duboku mrežu rektifikacije-modulacije (RMN), preobraćajući ovaj zadatak u multikoracijski proces razumanja ponovljajući rektifikaciju i modulaciju. U svakom sloju rektifikacije-modulacije, za razliku od postojećih metoda direktno provođujući krstomodalnu interakciju, prvo smo smislili modul rektifikacije kako bi ispravili implicitno nepravdu pažnje koja se fokusira na pogrešnu poziciju tijekom procesa interakcije. Zatim se modulacijski modul razvija kako bi uhvatila odnos okvira na okviru s pomoć informacija o rečenici za bolju korelaciju i sastavu sadržaja video tijekom vremena. S višestrukim takvim slojevima kaskadiranim dubinom, naš RMN postupno refinira video i interakcije ispitivanja, tako omogućava daljnju preciznu lokalizaciju. Eksperimentalne procjene na tri javne podatke pokazuju da predložena metoda postigne postupak države umjetnosti. Proučavaju se prošireni ispitivanja ablacije za obuhvatljivu analizu predložene metode.', 'de': 'Temporale Satzlokalisierung in Videos zielt darauf ab, das am besten passende Segment in einem ungestimmten Video entsprechend einer bestimmten Satzabfrage zu erden. Bisherige Arbeiten in diesem Bereich stützen sich hauptsächlich auf Aufmerksamkeitsrahmen, um die zeitlichen Grenzen durch eine weiche Selektion auszurichten. Obwohl sie sich auf die visuellen Inhalte konzentrieren, die für die Abfrage relevant sind, reicht diese einstufige Aufmerksamkeit nicht aus, um komplexe Videoinhalte zu modellieren und die höhere Argumentationsanforderung für diese Aufgabe einzuschränken. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges Deep Rectification-Modulation Network (RMN) vor, das diese Aufgabe durch Wiederholen von Rektifikation und Modulation in einen mehrstufigen Denkprozess überführt. In jeder Rektifikations-Modulationsschicht entwickeln wir im Gegensatz zu bestehenden Methoden, die die crossmodale Interaktion direkt leiten, zunächst ein Rektifikationsmodul, um implizite Aufmerksamkeitsfehler zu korrigieren, die sich auf die falsche Position während des Kreuzinteraktionsprozesses konzentriert. Anschließend wird ein Modulationsmodul entwickelt, um die Frame-to-Frame-Beziehung mithilfe von Satzinformationen zu erfassen, um die Videoinhalte im Laufe der Zeit besser zu korrelieren und zu komponieren. Da mehrere solcher Schichten in der Tiefe kaskadiert sind, verfeinert unser RMN schrittweise Video- und Abfrageinteraktionen und ermöglicht so eine weitere präzise Lokalisierung. Experimentelle Auswertungen an drei öffentlichen Datensätzen zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode den Stand der Technik erreicht. Zur umfassenden Analyse der vorgeschlagenen Methode werden umfangreiche Ablationsstudien durchgeführt.', 'ko': '영상의 시제 문장 포지셔닝은 주어진 문장 조회에 따라 편집되지 않은 영상에서 가장 일치하는 부분을 찾는 것이다.이전에 이 분야의 연구는 주로 주의 틀에 의존하여 부드러운 선택을 통해 시간 경계를 조정했다.비록 그들은 조회와 관련된 시각적 내용을 주목하지만 이런 일방적인 관심은 복잡한 영상 내용을 모델링하기에 부족하고 이 임무의 더욱 높은 차원의 추리 수요를 제한한다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 깊이 교정 모뎀 네트워크(RMN)를 제시했는데 중복 교정과 모뎀을 통해 이 임무를 다단계 추리 과정으로 전환시켰다.기존의 크로스모드 상호작용을 직접 하는 방법과 달리 각 교정 모뎀에서 우리는 먼저 내은 주의 착오를 교정하는 교정 모듈을 설계했다. 이 모듈은 상호작용 과정에서 잘못된 위치에 초점을 맞춘다.그리고 문장 정보를 이용하여 프레임과 프레임 간의 관계를 포착하여 시간에 따라 변화하는 영상 내용을 더욱 잘 연결하고 합성할 수 있도록 변조 모듈을 개발했다.이러한 계층이 여러 개 밀접하게 연결되면서 RMN은 영상과 조회의 상호작용을 점차적으로 보완하여 더욱 정확한 위치를 정할 수 있습니다.세 개의 공공 데이터 집합에 대한 실험 평가에 따르면 이 방법은 가장 선진적인 성능에 이르렀다.제시한 방법을 전면적으로 분석하기 위해 광범위한 소식 연구를 진행하였다.', 'sw': 'Uwekaji wa hukumu ya muda mfupi katika video inakusudia kuweka sehemu bora inayofanana katika video isiyo na hatia kwa mujibu wa swali la hukumu. Kazi zilizopita katika uwanja huu hasa wanategemea miundombi ya kutilia makini ili kutengeneza mipaka ya muda kwa uchaguzi mwepesi. Although they focus on the visual content relevant to the query, these single-step attention are insufficient to model complex video contents and restrict the higher-level reasoning demand for this task.  Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mtandao wa kisasa wa kuendeleza vizuri (RMN), kubadilisha kazi hii kuwa mchakato wa hatua mbalimbali kwa kurudisha uharibifu na unyanyasaji. Katika kila jukwaa la upatikanaji, tofauti na mbinu zilizopo zinazoongoza moja kwa moja kwa moja na mahusiano ya upande, tunaunda kifaa cha ufuatiliaji ili kurekebisha usahihi wa usimamizi usio sahihi ambao unalenga msimamo sahihi wakati wa mchakato wa kati. Kisha, kifaa cha utaratibu kinatengenezwa kupata uhusiano wa mfumo wa ndani na msaada wa taarifa za hukumu kwa ajili ya kuunganisha vizuri na kutengeneza maudhui ya video kwa muda mrefu. Wakati vipande kadhaa vya a in a hii vilivyowekwa kizuizini, RMN vyetu vinaendelea taratibu za video na kutafuta mahusiano, kwa hiyo inawezesha kuongezeka kwa maeneo sahihi zaidi. Tathmini za uchunguzi katika seti tatu za umma zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa inafanikiwa na hali ya sanaa. Utafiti mkubwa wa mabomu unafanywa kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa msingi wa mbinu zilizopendekezwa.', 'id': 'Lokalisasi kalimat sementara dalam video bermaksud untuk mendarat segmen terbaik yang cocok dalam video yang tidak terpisah menurut pertanyaan kalimat tertentu. Pekerjaan sebelumnya di bidang ini terutama bergantung pada bingkai perhatian untuk menyesuaikan batas temporal dengan seleksi lembut. Although they focus on the visual content relevant to the query, these single-step attention are insufficient to model complex video contents and restrict the higher-level reasoning demand for this task.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan rektifikasi-modulasi dalam (RMN) yang baru, mengubah tugas ini menjadi proses pemikiran multi-langkah dengan mengulangi rektifikasi dan modulasi. Dalam setiap lapisan modulasi-rektifikasi, tidak seperti metode yang ada secara langsung mengadakan interaksi transmodal, kita pertama-tama merancang modul rektifikasi untuk memperbaiki kesalahan perhatian implicit yang fokus pada posisi yang salah selama proses interaksi trans. Kemudian, modul modulasi dikembangkan untuk menangkap hubungan bingkai-bingkai dengan bantuan informasi kalimat untuk korelasi dan komposisi isi video dengan lebih baik. Dengan berbagai lapisan seperti itu mengacaukan kedalaman, RMN kami secara progresif memperbaiki interaksi video dan pertanyaan, sehingga memungkinkan lokasi yang lebih tepat. Evaluasi eksperimental pada tiga set data publik menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan mencapai prestasi terbaik. Studi ablasi yang luas dilakukan untuk analisis komprensif dari metode yang diusulkan.', 'fa': 'محلی\u200cسازی مجموعه زمانی در ویدئو هدف می\u200cدهد بهترین بخش\u200cهای متفاوت در یک ویدئو بی\u200cنام به توجه به یک سوال مجموعه\u200cای داده شود. کارهای قبلی در این زمینه بیشتر بر چشمه\u200cهای مراقبت وابستگی دارند تا مرزهای temporal را با یک انتخاب نرم تنظیم کنند. اگرچه آنها روی محتوای بینایی که مربوط به سؤال است تمرکز می کنند، این توجه یک قدم برای مدل محتوای ویدئو پیچیده کافی نیست و نیازهای منطقی بالاتر برای این کار محدود می کنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک شبکه عمیق اصلاح-modulation (RMN) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که این کار را به یک فرایند منطقی چندین قدم تغییر می\u200cدهیم با تکرار اصلاح و modulation. در هر طبقه متصل کردن و متصل کردن، مخالف از روش موجود موجود مستقیماً مستقیماً مستقیماً مسابقه متصل کردن متصل مدال، اول یک مدول اصلاح برای درست کردن مشکل توجه نامناسب که در طول فرایند متصل مشکل تمرکز می\u200cکند. سپس، یک مودیل مودیل توسعه می\u200cشود تا رابطه\u200cی قالب به قالب قالب با کمک اطلاعات جمله برای رابطه بهتر و ساختن محتوای ویدئو در طول زمان. با چندین لایه\u200cهای زیادی که در عمیق کاسکیده شده\u200cاند، RMN ما به طور پیشرفتی ویدئو و تعاملات پرسیدن را تغییر می\u200cدهد، بنابراین یک محلی دقیق بیشتری را توان می\u200cدهد. تحقیقات تجربی در سه مجموعه داده عمومی نشان می دهد که این روش پیشنهاد به انجام وضعیت هنری رسیده است. تحقیقات گسترده\u200cای برای تحلیل کامل روش پیشنهاد انجام می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "Videolarda durmuş sözlem ýerleşdirilip berilen sözlem soragyna görä iň gowy metini pozmak üçin maksady edýär. Bu sahypada öňki işleýän çapdaky çapdaky çapdaky çapdaky çapdaky çapdaky çapda geçirmek üçin paýlaşýar. Soragy bilen baglanýan görsel meýdançasyna üns ber bolsa-da, bu ýeke-adım üns kompleks wideodasyny nusga etmek üçin ýeterlik däldir we bu zada ýokary dereje sebäbi maksady gerekligini azaltyp bilmeýärler. Bu kagyzda, biz bu zady birnäçe adım derejeleme we modülasyny gaýtalap, atly derin bir derejeleme-modulaciýa şebekesine teklip berýäris. Her ýerlik modülasy gijesinde, mevcut modal terjime edilişi döretmäne görä görä, biz ilkinji gezek garşy terjime etmek üçin iň ýalňyş posisiýasyny düzeltmek üçin rectifikasyon modülini tasarlýarys. Sonra, sözlem maglumatynyň kömek bilen fraým we fraým maglumatyny çaplamak üçin bir modül döredildi. Bu şekilde birden fazla katlar derinlikde kascadırılmış, RMN'imiz videoyu gelişmek ve soraglarımızı tekrar edip, bu şekilde daha doğru bir yerleştirmesini etkinleştirir. Üç jemgyýet veri sahypalarynda synanyşan çykyşlar teklip eden yöntemiň sungatyň durumyny başarmagyny görkezýär. Önerlenen metiniň ähli analysi üçin ýakynlaşdyrylýar.", 'sq': 'Lokalizimi i fjalëve të përkohshme në videot synon të ngrejë segment in më të përshtatshëm në një video pa lidhje sipas një pyetje të dhënë fjalësh. Punët e mëparshme në këtë fushë mbështeten kryesisht në kuadrin e vëmendjes për të renditur kufijtë e përkohshëm me një zgjedhje të butë. Megjithëse ata përqëndrohen në përmbajtjen vizuale të rëndësishme për pyetjen, ky vëmendje hapi i vetëm nuk është e mjaftueshme për të modeluar përmbajtjen komplekse të videos dhe për të kufizuar kërkesën e arsyetimit më të lartë për këtë detyrë. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një rrjet të ri të thellë të modulimit të rektifikimit (RMN), duke e transformuar këtë detyrë në një proces arsyetimi shumë hapash duke përsëritur rektifikimin dhe modulimin. Në çdo shtresë rektifikimi-modulimi, ndryshe nga metodat ekzistuese që drejtojnë drejtpërdrejt ndërveprimin transmodal, ne së pari krijojmë një modul rektifikimi për të korrigjuar vëmendjen implicite gabim që përqëndrohet në pozicionin e gabuar gjatë procesit të ndërveprimit transversal. Pastaj, një modul modulimi është zhvilluar për të kapur lidhjen frame-to-frame me ndihmën e informacionit të fjalëve për korrelacionin më të mirë dhe kompozimin e përmbajtjes së videos gjatë kohës. With multiple such layers cascaded in depth, our RMN progressively refines video and query interactions, thus enabling a further precise localization.  Vlerësimet eksperimentale në tre grupe të dhënash publike tregojnë se metoda e propozuar arrin performancën më të lartë. Studime të zgjeruara ablacioni janë kryer për analizën e përgjithshme të metodës së propozuar.', 'am': 'በቪዲዮዎች ውስጥ የግል ቃላት ማቅረብ በተሰጠው ፈንድ ጠይቅ በተደረገ ውጤት ክፍል በተደረገ ቪዲዮ ውስጥ የተሻለ ክፍል ክፍል መግለጫ ያስፈልጋል። የቀድሞው በዚህች መሬት ውስጥ የሚሠራ ሥራ አብዛኛውን በጥሩ ምርጫ የሰዓቲቱን ዳርቻ ለመቀላቀል በሚያስተካክሉ ፍሬም ላይ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በመጠየቂያው የሚጠያየቁ የራእይ ጥቅረት ቢጠይቁ፣ እነዚህ አንዲት ደረጃ ትኩረት የሙሉ የቪዲዮ ጥቅልቅ ማሳየት አይጠቅሙም እናም ለዚህ ስራ የደረጃውን አዋቂነት ጥያቄ መግለጫ አይችሉም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጠለቅ ማስተካከል-ሞዴሎን መረብ (RMN) የሚለውጥ ጉዳዩን በማስተካከል በብዙ ደረጃዎች አዋቂዎችን በመለስ እና ማስተካከል በመለስ የሚለውጥ ጥልቅ ጉዳይ ያሳስባታል፡፡ በመስቀል-interaction process በኋላም የፊደል-ወደ-frame ግንኙነት በተደረገ የውይይት መረጃ በተሻለ ማሳሰል እና የቪዲዮ ዕቅድን በተጨማሪው እቅድ ለመያዝ የተዘጋጀ ሞዴል ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ እንደዚህ ብዙዎች ደረጃዎች በጥልቅ ውስጥ የተሰነዱ፣ RMN ማስታወቂያውን የቪዲዮን እና ግንኙነቶችን በመጠየቅ ያሳያል፡፡ በሦስት የህዝብ ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተና ማሳየት የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት-የ-አርእስት እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡ Extensive ablation studies are carried out for the comprehensive analysis of the proposed method.', 'af': "Tydelike seting lokalisering in videos doel doel om die beste ooreenstemmende segment in 'n ongeskryfde video te grond volgens' n gegewe seting navraag. Vorige werke in hierdie veld vertrou heeltemal op aandagbare raamwerke om die tydelike grense te aligneer deur 'n sagte keuse. Alhoewel hulle fokus op die visuele inhoud wat betrokke aan die navraag, is hierdie enkele stap aandag nie genoeg om kompleks video inhoud te model en die hoër vlak redekende versoek vir hierdie taak te beperk. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe diep regverdifikasie-modulaasie netwerk (RMN), om hierdie taak te transformeer na 'n veelvuldige stap redering proses deur herhaal van regverdifikasie en modulaasie. In elke rektifikaat-modulaag, ongelukkig van bestaande metodes direk die kruismodaal interaksie wat die kruismodaal interaksie gedoen word, het ons eerste 'n rektifikaat module ontwerp om inplisite aandag verkeerd te korrigeer wat op die verkeerde posisie fokus op die kruis-interaksie proses. Dan is 'n modulaasie module ontwikkel om die raam-na-raam verhouding te neem met die hulp van sin inligting vir beter korrelasie en die video inhoud oor tyd te stel. Met veelvuldige sodanige lagte kaskadeer in diepte, ons RMN het progresief video en navraag interaksies herstel, sodat 'n verdere presies lokalisering aanwend. Eksperimentale evaluasies op drie publieke datastelle wys dat die voorgestelde metode bereik staat van die kunstenaar. Verlengende ablasie studies word uitgevoer vir die kompleksitele analisie van die voorgestelde metode.", 'hy': 'Տեսագրությունների ժամանակական նախադասությունների տեղադրումը նպատակում է ներկայացնել լավագույն համապատասխանված սեգմերը անսահմանափակ տեսահոլովակում ըստ որոշ նախադասությունների հարցի: Անցյալ աշխատանքները այս ոլորտում հիմնականում հիմնված են ուշադրության շրջանակների վրա, որպեսզի ժամանակական սահմանները հարմարեցնեն թեթև ընտրության միջոցով: Չնայած դրանք կենտրոնանում են հարցի հետ կապված տեսողական պարունակության վրա, այս մեկ քայլ ուշադրությունը բավարար չէ բարդ տեսագրական պարունակության մոդելի համար և սահմանափակում է այս խնդրի համար ավելի բարձր մակարդակի մտածողական պահանջը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խորը վերականգնման-մոդուլյացիայի ցանց, որը վերածում է այս խնդիրը բազմաքային մտածողական գործընթացի վերաբերյալ վերականգնման և մոդուլյացիայի միջոցով: Յուրաքանչյուր վերականգնման-մոդուլացիայի շերտի մեջ, ի տարբերություն գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդներին, որոնք ուղղակիորեն կատարում են խաչը-մոդուլացիայի փոխազդեցությունը, մենք առաջին անգամ ստեղծում ենք վերականգնման մոդուլացիա, որպեսզի ուղղենք ենթադրական ուշադրության խաչ Then, a modulation module is developed to capture the frame-to-frame relation with the help of sentence information for better correlating and composing the video contents over time.  Այսպիսի բազմաթիվ շերտերի խորությամբ կատարելով, մեր ՌՄՆ-ը պրոգրեսիվ բարելավում է տեսագրությունները և հարցումները, ինչը հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի ճշգրիտ տեղադրություն: Երեք հանրային տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մեթոդը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին: Ամբողջական աբլացիայի ուսումնասիրություններ են կատարվում առաջարկված մեթոդի ամբողջական վերլուծության համար:', 'bs': 'Lokalizacija privremene rečenice u snimkama cilja je da podmetne najbolji odgovarajući segment u nevidljivom snimku u skladu s određenim zahtevom rečenice. Prethodni radovi na ovom polju oslanjaju se uglavnom na pozorne okvire da poravnaju privremene granice mekim izborom. Iako se fokusiraju na vizualni sadržaj relevantan za pitanje, ta jedinstvena pažnja nisu dovoljna za model kompleksnog sadržaja video i ograničavaju zahtjev za razumljivanje višeg nivoa za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu duboku mrežu rektifikacije-modulacije (RMN), preobraćajući ovaj zadatak u multikoracijski proces razumanja ponovljajući rektifikaciju i modulaciju. U svakom sloju rektifikacije-modulacije, za razliku od postojećih metoda direktno proveravajući cross-modalnu interakciju, prvo smo smislili modul rektifikacije kako bi ispravili implicitno nepravdu pažnje koja se fokusira na pogrešnu poziciju tijekom procesa cross-interakcije. Zatim se modulacijski modul razvija kako bi uhvatila vezu okvira na okviru s pomoć informacija rečenice za bolju korelaciju i sastavu sadržaja video tijekom vremena. Sa višestrukim takvim slojevima kaskadiranim dubinom, naš RMN postupno refinira video i interakcije, tako omogućava daljnju preciznu lokalizaciju. Eksperimentalne procjene na tri javne podatke pokazuju da predložena metoda postigne postupak države umjetnosti. Proučavaju se prošireni proučavanje ablacije za obuhvatljivu analizu predložene metode.', 'az': 'Videolarda müddətli cümlələr yerləşdirilməsi belə verilmiş cümlələr soruşmasına görə ən yaxşı eşidən segmenti yerləşdirməyə məqsəd verir. Bu sahədə əvvəlki işlər çox gözləmə çerçivelərə təvəkkül edir ki, zamanlı sınırları yumuşaq seçimlərlə düzəltsin. Onlar soruşmağa bağlı görünüş məlumatına baxmayaraq, bu tək adım məlumatı kompleks video məlumatını modellə etmək üçün kifayət deyil və bu işin yüksək səviyyədə dəyişiklik talebini azaldırmaq üçün azaldırlar. Bu kağızda, yeni dərin düzəltmə-modulaciya a ğı (RMN) təklif edirik, bu işi çoxlu adım dəyişiklik prosesi olaraq düzəltmə və modulacağı təkrarlayır. Hər düzəltmə-modulaciya səviyyəsində, mevcut metodların dəyişiklik modal etkileşiməsi ilə, ilk dəyişiklik modulu çəkirik ki, çoxlu etkileşim prosesi sırasında yanlış məlumatın üstünə təsirli məlumatı düzəltsin. Sonra, fərqli-fərqli bağlantısını daha yaxşı ilə birləşdirmək və video içərilərini zamanında yazmaq üçün bir modulaciya modulu təhsil edilir. Bu çoxlu səviyyələr derinliklə kascadılmış halda, RMN-imiz video və query interaksiyalarını tədriclə refine edir, böylece daha düzgün yerləşdirməyi qabilleştirir. Üç kamu veri qurğularındakı təcrübələrin təcrübə edilmiş metodların təcrübə göstərilir. Əlavə edilmiş metodun bütün analizi üçün genişləndirilən ablasiya təhsil edilir.', 'bn': 'ভিডিওতে স্থানীয় বাক্য স্থানীয়তার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি বাক্য অনুসন্ধান অনুযায়ী একটি অবৈধ ভিডিও ভিডিওতে সেরা মিলিত ভাগে এই ক্ষেত্রের পূর্ববর্তী কাজের উপর মূলত মনোযোগী ফ্রেমের উপর নির্ভর করে সাময়িক সীমানার সীমানা সীমাবদ্ধ করার জন্য। যদিও তারা অনুসন্ধানের সাথে সম্পর্কিত দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির বিষয়বস্তুর প্রতি মনোযোগ দিয়ে থাকে, তবুও এই একক ধাপের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি মডেল করার জন্য যথেষ্ট নয় এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গভীর সংস্কার-মডিউলেশন নেটওয়ার্ক (আরএমএন) প্রস্তাব করি, এই কাজের পুনরায় সংস্কার এবং মডুলেশন পুনরাবৃত্তি করে বহুধাপের কা প্রত্যেক সংক্রান্ত-মডিউলেশন স্তরে, সরাসরি ক্রস-মডিউল ইন্টারেক্স করার বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতির অনুরূপ, আমরা প্রথমে একটি সংক্রান্ত মডিউল তৈরি করি যাতে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে মনো তারপর, একটি মডিউলেশন মডিউল উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে ফ্রেম-থেকে ফ্রেমের সংশ্লিষ্ট তথ্যের সাহায্যে গ্রেফতার করার জন্য এবং সময়ই ভিডিও বিষয়বস্তু  এই ধরনের অনেক ক্ষেত্রে গভীরে ক্যাসেড করা হয়েছে, আমাদের আরএমএন ভিডিও পুনরায় সৃষ্টি করেছে এবং ইন্টারনেটকেশন অনুসন্ধান করেছে, যার ফলে আরো  তিনটি পাবলিক ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের প্রদর্শন প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির সম্পূর্ণ বিশ্লেষণের জন্য বিস্তৃত আগুনের গবেষণা শুরু করা হয়েছে।', 'et': 'Ajalause lokaliseerimise eesmärk videotes on määratud lausepäringu kohaselt kindlaks määramata videos kõige paremini sobitatud segment. Varasemad tööd selles valdkonnas tuginevad peamiselt tähelepanu raamistikele ajapiiride ühtlustamiseks pehme valiku abil. Kuigi nad keskenduvad päringu jaoks asjakohasele visuaalsele sisule, ei piisa sellest üheastmelisest tähelepanust keerulise videosisu modelleerimiseks ja piiravad kõrgema taseme arutlusnõudlust selle ülesande jaoks. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja uue sügava korrigeerimise-modulatsioonivõrgu (RMN), muutes selle ülesande mitmeastmeliseks arutlusprotsessiks korrigeerimise ja modulatsiooni kordamise teel. Erinevalt olemasolevatest meetoditest, mis viivad otse läbi transmodaalset interaktsiooni, töötame kõigepealt välja parandusmooduli, et parandada kaudset tähelepanuväärtust, mis keskendub vale positsioonile vastastikuse interaktsiooni protsessi ajal. Seejärel töötatakse välja modulatsioonimoodul kaadri-kaadri suhete jäädvustamiseks lauseteabe abil, et video sisu paremini korrelatsioonida ja komponeerida aja jooksul. Mitme sellise kihi kaskadeeritud sügavusega täpsustab meie RMN järk-järgult video- ja päringutegevust, võimaldades seega täpsemat lokaliseerimist. Kolme avaliku andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed hindamised näitavad, et kavandatud meetod saavutab tipptasemel tulemuslikkuse. Kavandatud meetodi põhjalikuks analüüsiks viiakse läbi ulatuslikud ablatsiooniuuringud.', 'cs': 'Cílem lokalizace časových vět ve videu je uzemnit nejlépe odpovídající segment v nezmíněném videu podle daného dotazu věty. Předchozí práce v této oblasti se spoléhají především na pozornostní rámce pro sladění časových hranic měkkým výběrem. Přestože se zaměřují na vizuální obsah relevantní pro dotaz, tato jednostupná pozornost není dostatečná k modelování složitého obsahu videa a omezení požadavku na vyšší úrovni uvažování pro tento úkol. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou hlubokou rektifikačně modulační síť (RMN), která transformuje tento úkol na vícestupňový proces uvažování opakováním rektifikace a modulace. V každé vrstvě rektifikace-modulace, na rozdíl od existujících metod přímo vedoucích cross-modální interakci, nejprve navrhneme rektifikační modul pro korekci implicitní nesouladu pozornosti, který se zaměřuje na nesprávnou polohu během procesu cross-interakce. Následně je vyvinut modulační modul pro zachycení vztahu mezi snímky pomocí informací o větě pro lepší korelaci a kompozici obsahu videa v průběhu času. S několika takovými vrstvami kaskádovanými do hloubky, náš RMN postupně zdokonaluje interakce videa a dotazů, čímž umožňuje další přesnou lokalizaci. Experimentální hodnocení tří veřejných datových souborů ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu. Pro komplexní analýzu navrhované metody jsou provedeny rozsáhlé ablační studie.', 'fi': 'Temporaalisen lauseen lokalisoinnin videoissa tavoitteena on maadoittaa kuvaamattoman videon paras segmentti tietyn lausekyselyn mukaisesti. Aikaisemmat työt tällä alalla perustuvat lähinnä huomiokehyksiin aikarajojen yhdenmukaistamiseksi pehmeällä valinnalla. Vaikka ne keskittyvät kyselyyn liittyvään visuaaliseen sisältöön, ne eivät riitä monimutkaisen videosisällön mallintamiseen ja rajoittavat korkeamman tason päättelytarvetta tälle tehtävälle. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta syvä oikaisu-modulaatioverkostoa (RMN), joka muuttaa tämän tehtävän monivaiheiseksi päättelyprosessiksi toistamalla oikaisu ja modulaatio. Jokaisessa korjaus-modulaatiokerroksessa, toisin kuin olemassa olevat menetelmät, jotka suoraan johtavat transmodaalista vuorovaikutusta, kehitämme ensin korjausmoduulin, joka korjaa implisiittisen huomiopoikkeaman, joka keskittyy väärään asentoon ristivuorovaikutusprosessin aikana. Tämän jälkeen kehitetään modulaatiomoduuli kuvaamaan kuva-kuva-suhdetta lauseinformaation avulla, jotta videon sisältö voidaan paremmin korreloida ja säveltää ajan mittaan. Kun useita tällaisia kerroksia on kaskadoitu syvälle, RMN-järjestelmämme tarkentaa asteittain video- ja kyselyvuorovaikutusta, mikä mahdollistaa tarkan lokalisoinnin. Kolmen julkisen aineiston kokeelliset arvioinnit osoittavat, että ehdotetulla menetelmällä saavutetaan uusinta suorituskykyä. Ehdotetun menetelmän kattavaa analysointia varten tehdään laajoja ablaatiotutkimuksia.', 'ca': "La localització temporal de frases en vídeos té l'objectiu de trobar el millor segment coincident en un vídeo sense tramar segons una pregunta de frases dada. Els treballs anteriors en aquest camp confien principalment en marcs atencionals per alliniar les fronteres temporals per una selecció suau. Tot i que es centren en el contingut visual rellevant a la consulta, aquesta atenció en un pas únic no és suficient per modelar continguts complexes de vídeo i limitar la demanda de raonament de nivell més alt per aquesta tasca. En aquest paper, proposem una nova xarxa de modulació profunda de rectificació (RMN), transformant aquesta tasca en un procés de raonament en molts passos repetind la rectificació i la modulació. En cada capa de rectificació-modulació, a diferència dels mètodes existents que condueixen directament l'interacció transmodal, primer dissenyem un módul de rectificació per corregir l'equilibri implícit de l'atenció que s'enfoca en la posició equivocada durant el procés d'interacció transversal. Després, es desenvolupa un módul de modulació per capturar la relació entre cadres amb l'ajuda d'informació de frases per correlacionar millor i composir el contingut del vídeo amb el temps. Amb moltes capes d'aquest tipus cascades en profunditat, la nostra RMN refina progressivament les interaccions de vídeo i consulta, permetant una localització més precisa. Experimental evaluations on three public datasets show that the proposed method achieves state-of-the-art performance.  Es fan extensos estudis d'ablació per a l'anàlisi completa del mètode proposat.", 'he': 'המיקום של משפט זמני בסרטונים מכוון לקרקע את החלק הטוב ביותר שמתאים בסרטון ללא סימנים לפי שאלת משפט מסוימת. העבודות הקודמות בשטח הזה תלויות בעיקר במסגרות תשומת לב כדי לארגן את הגבולות הזמניים על ידי בחירה רכה. למרות שהם מתמקדים בתוכן ויזואלי רלוונטי לשאול, תשומת לב צעד אחת אלה אינה מספקת למודל בתוכן וידאו מורכב ומגבלת את הדריש הגיוני ברמה גבוהה למשימה הזאת. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים רשת תיקון עמוק חדשה (RMN), משנה את המשימה הזאת לתהליך הגיון במספר צעדים על ידי חוזרת תיקון ומודולוגיה. בכל שכבת התקנות-מודולרית, בניגוד לשיטות קיימות שמובילות באופן ישיר את האינטראקציה הצלבית, אנחנו קודם מתכננים מודול התקנה ואז מתפתח מודולר מודולציה כדי לתפוס את מערכת היחסים המסגרת למסגרת עם עזרה של מידע משפטים כדי להתחבר יותר ולערוך את תוכן הווידאו במהלך הזמן. With multiple such layers cascaded in depth, our RMN progressively refines video and query interactions, thus enabling a further precise localization.  הערכות ניסיוניות על שלושה קבוצות נתונים ציבוריים מראות שהשיטה המוצעת משיגה ביצועים חדשים. ניתוחים מתרחבים על ניתוח רחב של השיטה המוצעת.', 'ha': "Wurin filin da aka lokaci da lokaci cikin video na yi amfani da wajen saka mafi kyaun rabon sigogi wanda ya yi daidai cikin wani video wanda ba'a yi inganci ba da inganci da aka tambayi cewa. Yin aiki da ya gabãta a cikin wannan field, yana ƙayyade mainli kan firam masu sauya dõmin ya juyi grensa na lokaci da wata zaɓani na buƙata. Ingawa sun zura ido ga maɓallin gani wanda ya yi da amfani da tambayin, ba za'a isa ga muhalli wa wannan aikin da za'a nuna wa maɓallin video masu haɗi ba, kuma ana ƙayyade tambayar da kwanan daraja ta sarrafa wa wannan aikin. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani jerin mai tsaro-module na nowaya (RMN), mai musanya wannan aikin zuwa wani jarabar masu hankali na dabam-dabam mai yawa da za'a dubu shiryarwa da modulori. Daga kõwane duhun shirin-module, sami da metoden wanda ke jira masu motsi masu shirya interaction-modal, za'a ƙayyade kowa, muna ƙayyade wata module mai gyare wa gyare-gyare, wa'ura masu daidaita surori mai inganci da ke zura zura ido kan halin a lokaci a lokacin-interaction. Sa'an nan, an ƙãga wani module mai motsi dõmin ya kãma mazaunin firam-zuwa-firam da taimakon taimakon maɓallin maganar da ke da amfani da mafi daidaita da kuma ya sami cikin video cikin lokaci. Da wasu abubuwa waɗand a aka canza cikin inuwanta, RMN na tafiyar da wajen canza video kuma an tambaye interaction, don haka yana iya amfani da lokalori masu ƙayyade. Kayan jarrabai kan tsarin bayani uku na umarni shine in shirin da aka buƙata ta kai halin-da-art. Ana tafiyar karatun masu ƙaranci wa kultur da aka yi wa rabo ga fassarar-jumla.", 'sk': 'Lokalizacija časovnih stavkov v videoposnetkih je namenjena označevanju najboljšega ujemajočega segmenta v neomerjenem videoposnetku glede na določeno stavkovno poizvedbo. Prejšnja dela na tem področju temeljijo predvsem na pozornih okvirih za uskladitev časovnih meja z mehkim izborom. Čeprav se osredotočajo na vizualno vsebino, pomembno za poizvedbo, ta pozornost v enem koraku ne zadostuje za modeliranje kompleksnih video vsebin in omejuje povpraševanje po višji ravni razmišljanja za to opravilo. V prispevku predlagamo novo globinsko omrežje popravkov-modulacije (RMN), ki to nalogo preoblikuje v večstopenjski proces razmišljanja s ponavljanjem popravkov in modulacije. V vsaki plasti korekcije-modulacije, za razliko od obstoječih metod, ki neposredno vodijo medmodalno interakcijo, najprej oblikujemo modul korekcije za popravljanje implicitne neuporavnave pozornosti, ki se osredotoča na napačen položaj med procesom navzkrižne interakcije. Nato je razvit modulacijski modul za zajem odnosa med okvirjem in okvirjem s pomočjo stavkovnih informacij za boljšo korelacijo in sestavljanje video vsebin skozi čas. Z več takimi plastmi, ki so kaskadirane v globini, naša RMN postopoma izboljšuje interakcije z videoposnetki in poizvedbami ter tako omogoča nadaljnjo natančno lokalizacijo. Eksperimentalne ocene treh javnih zbirk podatkov kažejo, da predlagana metoda dosega najsodobnejšo uspešnost. Za celovito analizo predlagane metode se izvajajo obsežne študije ablacije.', 'jv': 'Video string" in "context_BAR_stringClone politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pemilih iki, kita mudhaya un barêng langkung rectification-modulasion netek (RRN), dadi nganggep nggawe mungkin nganggep sistem multi-pas araraning batasan dadi apik dadi rectification lan modulasion. drawable-action Sampeyan, module modulus dumadhi kanggo nggawe frame-to-frame hak karo jutoran juter informasi nggawe barang langgar sampeyan karo iso nggawe barang sampeyan video. Multiple layers Language Progress', 'bo': 'བརྙན་གཟུགས་ནང་དུ་གནས་སྐབས་ཡིག སྒེའུ་ཁུང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཚེ་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་གཞུང་གཞུང་གི་དང་མཐའ་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་སྒྲིག Although they focus on the visual content relevant to the query, these single-step attention are insufficient to model complex video contents and restrict the higher-level reasoning demand for this task. In this paper, we propose a novel deep rectification-modulation network (RMN), transforming this task into a multi-step reasoning process by repeating rectification and modulation. In each rectification-modulation layer, unlike existing methods directly conducting the cross-modal interaction, we first devise a rectification module to correct implicit attention misalignment which focuses on the wrong position during the cross-interaction process. In each rectification-modulation layer དེ་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱས་ན། པར་གཞི་དང་གཞི་ཁྲམ་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ འོན་ཀྱང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བགོ་རིམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་RMN་གིས་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་སྣུམ་ཚུད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ མི་མང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚང་གསུམ་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ནི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས དམིགས་བསལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཡོད་པའི་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'ar': 'تقدم مؤشر المنطقة المستند إلى اللغة للتعليق على الصورة القابل للتحكم', 'pt': 'Avanço do ponteiro de região orientado por idioma para legendas de imagens controláveis', 'fr': "Avancement du pointeur de région piloté par la langue pour un sous-titrage d'image contrôlable", 'es': 'Avance del puntero de región basado en el idioma para subtítulos de imágenes controlables', 'ja': '制御可能な画像キャプションのための言語駆動領域ポインタの高度化', 'ru': 'Улучшение указателя региона на основе языка для управляемых подписей изображений', 'zh': '言语驱针进,可控图字幕', 'hi': 'नियंत्रणीय छवि कैप्शनिंग के लिए भाषा-चालित क्षेत्र सूचक उन्नति', 'ga': 'Cur Chun Cinn Pointeoir Réigiúin Tiomanta ag Teanga le haghaidh Fotheidealú Íomhá Inrialaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Προώθηση δείκτη περιοχής με βάση τη γλώσσα για ελεγχόμενη τιτλοποίηση εικόνων', 'it': 'Avanzamento del puntatore regionale basato sul linguaggio per la captazione delle immagini controllabili', 'hu': 'Nyelvvezérelt régió mutató fejlesztés a vezérelhető kép feliratozásához', 'ms': 'Kemajuan Penuding Kawasan Pemacu Bahasa untuk Capsyen Imej yang boleh Dikawal', 'kk': 'Тіл- драйвер аумағындағы кескінді бақылау үшін меңзер жақсарту', 'lt': 'Language-Drived Region Pointer Advancement for Controlled Image Captioning', 'ml': 'നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ചിത്രം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഭാഷ- ഡ്രൈവ് പ്രദേശത്തിന്റെ പ്രദേശം കു', 'mt': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'mk': 'Напредок на покажувачот на регионот со јазик за контролирање на сликите', 'mn': 'Холбоо-Драйвер хэлний тойрог хөгжүүлэх загвар хөгжүүлэх', 'no': 'Forbedring av peikaren for språk- drive- område for kontrollerbare biletet', 'pl': 'Zaawansowanie wskaźnika regionu opartego na języku dla kontrolowanego napisania obrazów', 'ro': 'Avansarea indicatorului regiunii bazat pe limbaj pentru captarea imaginilor controlate', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje pokazatelja jezika-vozačkog regiona za snimanje kontrolabilnih slika', 'so': 'Horumarinta Pointerka soonaha ee Luqada-Driven', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Språkdriven region pekare Advance för kontrollerbar bildtextning', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தும் பிம்பத்தை பிடிப்பதற்கான மொழி- இயக்கி பிரிவு குறிப்பு முன்னேற்றம்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thủ cấp vùng điều khiển Ngôn ngữ cho bộ trích ảnh điều khiển', 'nl': 'Taalgestuurde regionaanwijzer voor regelbare afbeeldingsbijschriften', 'da': 'Sprogdrevet Region Pointer Advancement for kontrollerbar billedtekster', 'de': 'Sprachgesteuerter Regionszeiger-Fortschritt für steuerbare Bildbeschriftungen', 'bg': 'Езиков ориентиран регионален показател напредък за контролирано изображение', 'id': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'ko': '언어 구동의 이미지 자막 영역 포인터 추진', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje pokazatelja jezika-vozačke regije za snimanje kontrolabilnih slika', 'sw': 'Utamasishaji wa Pointer wa Region-Driven for Controllable Image Captioning', 'tr': 'Kontroleýän Resim Käpşermek üçin dil sürüjilik bölegi Görkezilişi', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-Driven Region Pointer Advanced for Controllable Image Captioning', 'fa': 'پیشرفت نقشه\u200cهای منطقه\u200cی زبان- رانندگی برای کاپیتان تصویر قابل کنترل', 'af': 'Taal- Dryf Region Wyser Verbetering vir Kontrolbare Beeldkaptering', 'az': 'Dil-Driven bölgesi Görüntü Göstüyü Kontrol Yaxınlıqları', 'bn': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'sq': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'cs': 'Rozšíření ukazatele oblasti řízeného jazykem pro řízení titulků obrázků', 'hy': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'et': 'Keelejuhitud piirkonnapotja areng kontrollitava pildi pealdise jaoks', 'fi': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controlable Image Captaining', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje pokazatelja jezika-vozačke regije za snimanje kontrolabilnih slika', 'ca': 'Language-Driven Region Pointer Advancement for Controllable Image Captioning', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'ProgressBar', 'sk': 'Napredek regionalnega kazalca, ki ga poganja jezik, za nadzorovanje slik', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྒུལ་ཆས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་འཛིན་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་པར་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་པར་ཆས་མཐུན་རྟགས', 'he': 'התקדמות של המצב של אזור הנהג בשפה עבור מילוי תמונות שולטים'}
{'en': 'Controllable Image Captioning is a recent sub-field in the multi-modal task of Image Captioning wherein constraints are placed on which regions in an image should be described in the generated natural language caption. This puts a stronger focus on producing more detailed descriptions, and opens the door for more end-user control over results. A vital component of the Controllable Image Captioning architecture is the mechanism that decides the timing of attending to each region through the advancement of a region pointer. In this paper, we propose a novel method for predicting the timing of region pointer advancement by treating the advancement step as a natural part of the language structure via a NEXT-token, motivated by a strong correlation to the sentence structure in the training data. We find that our timing agrees with the ground-truth timing in the Flickr30k Entities test data with a precision of 86.55 % and a recall of 97.92 %. Our model implementing this technique improves the state-of-the-art on standard captioning metrics while additionally demonstrating a considerably larger effective vocabulary size.', 'ar': 'يُعد "Captioning Image Captioning" الذي يمكن التحكم فيه حقلاً فرعيًا حديثًا في المهمة متعددة الوسائط الخاصة بـ Image Captioning حيث يتم وضع قيود على المناطق الموجودة في الصورة التي يجب وصفها في التسمية التوضيحية للغة الطبيعية التي تم إنشاؤها. يضع هذا تركيزًا أقوى على إنتاج أوصاف أكثر تفصيلاً ، ويفتح الباب لمزيد من تحكم المستخدم النهائي في النتائج. أحد المكونات الحيوية لبنية Captioning للصور التي يمكن التحكم فيها هو الآلية التي تقرر توقيت حضور كل منطقة من خلال تقدم مؤشر المنطقة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة جديدة للتنبؤ بتوقيت تقدم مؤشر المنطقة من خلال معالجة خطوة التقدم كجزء طبيعي من بنية اللغة عبر رمز NEXT ، بدافع من ارتباط قوي ببنية الجملة في بيانات التدريب. وجدنا أن توقيتنا يتوافق مع توقيت الحقيقة في بيانات اختبار Flickr30k Entities بدقة 86.55٪ واسترجاع 97.92٪. يعمل نموذجنا الذي يطبق هذه التقنية على تحسين أحدث ما توصلت إليه مقاييس التسمية التوضيحية القياسية مع إظهار حجم مفردات فعال أكبر بشكل كبير.', 'es': 'Subtítulos de imágenes controlables es un subcampo reciente en la tarea multimodal de Subtítulos de imágenes en el que se imponen restricciones sobre qué regiones de una imagen deben describirse en la leyenda en lenguaje natural generada. Esto pone un mayor énfasis en producir descripciones más detalladas y abre la puerta a un mayor control del usuario final sobre los resultados. Un componente vital de la arquitectura de subtítulos de imágenes controlables es el mecanismo que decide el momento de atender a cada región mediante el avance de un puntero de región. En este artículo, proponemos un método novedoso para predecir el momento del avance del puntero de región al tratar el paso de avance como una parte natural de la estructura del lenguaje a través de un token NEXT, motivado por una fuerte correlación con la estructura de la oración en los datos de entrenamiento. Descubrimos que nuestro tiempo coincide con el tiempo real del terreno en los datos de prueba de las Entidades de Flickr30k con una precisión del 86,55% y una recuperación del 97,92%. Nuestro modelo que implementa esta técnica mejora el estado de la técnica de las métricas de subtítulos estándar y, al mismo tiempo, demuestra un tamaño de vocabulario efectivo considerablemente mayor.', 'pt': 'Legenda de imagem controlável é um subcampo recente na tarefa multimodal de legendagem de imagem em que as restrições são colocadas em quais regiões em uma imagem devem ser descritas na legenda de linguagem natural gerada. Isso coloca um foco mais forte na produção de descrições mais detalhadas e abre a porta para mais controle do usuário final sobre os resultados. Um componente vital da arquitetura Controllable Image Captioning é o mecanismo que decide o tempo de atendimento a cada região por meio do avanço de um ponteiro de região. Neste artigo, propomos um novo método para prever o tempo de avanço do ponteiro de região, tratando a etapa de avanço como uma parte natural da estrutura da linguagem por meio de um token NEXT, motivado por uma forte correlação com a estrutura da sentença nos dados de treinamento. Descobrimos que nosso tempo está de acordo com o tempo real nos dados de teste de Entidades do Flickr30k com uma precisão de 86,55% e um recall de 97,92%. Nosso modelo que implementa essa técnica melhora o estado da arte em métricas de legendas padrão, além de demonstrar um tamanho de vocabulário efetivo consideravelmente maior.', 'fr': "Le sous-titrage d'image contrôlable est un sous-champ récent de la tâche multimodale de sous-titrage d'image dans lequel des contraintes sont placées sur les régions d'une image qui doivent être décrites dans la légende en langage naturel générée. Cela met davantage l'accent sur la production de descriptions plus détaillées et permet à l'utilisateur final de mieux contrôler les résultats. Un élément essentiel de l'architecture de sous-titrage d'image contrôlable est le mécanisme qui décide de la synchronisation de la prise en charge de chaque région par le biais de l'avancement d'un pointeur de région. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour prédire le moment de l'avancement du pointeur de région en traitant l'étape d'avancement comme une partie naturelle de la structure du langage via un jeton NEXT, motivée par une forte corrélation avec la structure de la phrase dans les données d'apprentissage. Nous trouvons que notre timing est en accord avec le timing de la vérité de terrain dans les données de test des entités FlickR30k avec une précision de 86,55\xa0% et un rappel de 97,92\xa0%. Notre modèle mettant en œuvre cette technique améliore l'état actuel des mesures de sous-titrage standard tout en démontrant en outre une taille de vocabulaire efficace considérablement plus importante.", 'ja': 'コントロール可能な画像キャプションは、画像キャプションのマルチモーダルタスクの最近のサブフィールドであり、画像内のどの領域を生成された自然言語キャプションで説明すべきかに制約が課されます。 これにより、より詳細な説明を作成することに重点を置き、結果をより多くのエンドユーザーが制御できるようになります。 コントロール可能な画像キャプションアーキテクチャの重要な構成要素は、領域ポインタの進歩を通じて各領域に対応するタイミングを決定するメカニズムです。 本稿では，トレーニングデータの文章構造との強い相関を動機として， NEXTトークンを介して言語構造の自然な部分として扱うことにより，領域ポインタ進行のタイミングを予測するための新たな方法を提案する． 当社のタイミングは、Flickr 30 kエンティティのテストデータの地上真実タイミングに一致し、精度は86.55%、リコール率は97.92%です。 このテクニックを実装した当社のモデルは、標準的なキャプションメトリクスの最先端を改善すると同時に、かなり大きな効果的な語彙サイズをさらに実証します。', 'hi': 'नियंत्रणीय छवि कैप्शनिंग, छवि कैप्शनिंग के बहु-मोडल कार्य में हाल ही में एक उप-क्षेत्र है जिसमें बाधाओं को उस छवि में किन क्षेत्रों पर रखा जाता है, जिन्हें उत्पन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा कैप्शन में वर्णित किया जाना चाहिए। यह अधिक विस्तृत विवरण बनाने पर एक मजबूत ध्यान केंद्रित करता है, और परिणामों पर अधिक अंत-उपयोगकर्ता नियंत्रण के लिए दरवाजा खोलता है। नियंत्रणीय छवि कैप्शनिंग आर्किटेक्चर का एक महत्वपूर्ण घटक वह तंत्र है जो एक क्षेत्र सूचक की प्रगति के माध्यम से प्रत्येक क्षेत्र में भाग लेने का समय तय करता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक नेक्स्ट-टोकन के माध्यम से भाषा संरचना के एक प्राकृतिक हिस्से के रूप में प्रगति चरण का इलाज करके क्षेत्र सूचक उन्नति के समय की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो प्रशिक्षण डेटा में वाक्य संरचना के लिए एक मजबूत सहसंबंध से प्रेरित है। हम पाते हैं कि हमारा समय 86.55% की सटीकता और 97.92% की याद के साथ Flickr30k निकाय परीक्षण डेटा में जमीनी-सत्य समय से सहमत है। इस तकनीक को लागू करने वाला हमारा मॉडल मानक कैप्शनिंग मीट्रिक पर अत्याधुनिक में सुधार करता है, जबकि इसके अलावा काफी बड़े प्रभावी शब्दावली आकार का प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'zh': '可控字幕者字幕近一子字段也,加约束焉,宜于生成自然语言题中言之。 益务详述,为最终用户制开门。 可控图字幕体系结构之要组件机也,因其指而定之。 于本文中,设一占地指针进时新法,法NEXT令牌以步骤为言语自然,其动机与训练数句结构有甚相关性。 臣等见Flickr30k实测试数据中地真时一,精度为86.55%,召还率为97.92%。 模形入准字幕指标最新,大有效词汇量。', 'ru': 'Управляемая подпись изображения представляет собой недавнее подполе в мультимодальной задаче подписи изображения, в которой ограничения накладываются на то, какие области на изображении должны быть описаны в сгенерированной подписи на естественном языке. Это делает больший акцент на подготовке более подробных описаний и открывает дверь для более эффективного контроля конечных пользователей за результатами. Жизненно важным компонентом архитектуры управляемых подписей изображений является механизм, который определяет время посещения каждого региона посредством продвижения указателя региона. В данной работе мы предлагаем новый метод прогнозирования времени продвижения указателя области, рассматривая шаг продвижения как естественную часть языковой структуры через NEXT-токен, мотивированный сильной корреляцией со структурой предложения в обучающих данных. Мы обнаружили, что наше время совпадает с временем истины в тестовых данных сущностей Flickr30k с точностью 86,55% и отзывом 97,92%. Наша модель, реализующая этот метод, улучшает современные стандартные метрики субтитров, а также демонстрирует значительно больший эффективный размер словарного запаса.', 'ga': 'Is fo-réimse le déanaí é Fotheidealú Íomhá Inrialaithe sa tasc ilmhódach um Fhotheidealú Íomhánna ina gcuirtear srianta ar na réigiúin in íomhá ar cheart cur síos a dhéanamh orthu sa teideal teanga nádúrtha a ghintear. Cuireann sé seo béim níos láidre ar thuairiscí níos mionsonraithe a tháirgeadh, agus osclaíonn sé an doras le haghaidh rialú níos mó ag an úsáideoir deiridh ar thorthaí. Cuid ríthábhachtach den ailtireacht um Fhotheidealú Íomhá Inrialaithe is ea an mheicníocht a chinneann an t-am chun freastal ar gach réigiún trí phointeoir réigiúin a chur chun cinn. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh nua chun uainiú dul chun cinn an phointeora réigiúin a thuar trí chóireáil a dhéanamh ar an gcéim chun cinn mar chuid nádúrtha den struchtúr teanga trí chomhartha Next, arna spreagadh ag comhghaol láidir leis an struchtúr abairtí sna sonraí oiliúna. Feictear dúinn go n-aontaíonn ár n-uainiú leis an uainiú fírinne talún i sonraí tástála Aonáin Flickr30k le beachtas 86.55% agus aisghairm de 97.92%. Feabhsaíonn ár múnla a chuireann an teicníocht seo i bhfeidhm an méadracht chaighdeánach fotheidealaithe den scoth agus ag an am céanna léiríonn sé méid foclóra éifeachtach i bhfad níos mó.', 'hu': 'A vezérelhető képfeliratozás a képfeliratozás multimodális feladatának legutóbbi almezője, amelyben korlátozásokat helyeznek el arra, hogy egy kép mely régióit kell leírni a generált természetes nyelvű feliratban. Ez nagyobb hangsúlyt helyez a részletesebb leírások elkészítésére, és megnyitja az ajtót a végfelhasználók számára az eredmények feletti nagyobb ellenőrzéshez. A kontrollable Image Captioning architektúra létfontosságú eleme az a mechanizmus, amely egy régiómutató előrehaladásával határozza meg az egyes régiók részvételének időzítését. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új módszert javasolunk a régiómutató előrejelzésének időzítésére, úgy, hogy az előrehaladási lépést a nyelvi struktúra természetes részeként kezeljük egy NEXT-token segítségével, amelyet a képzési adatok mondatszerkezetével való erős korreláció motivál. Úgy találjuk, hogy az időzítésünk összhangban áll a Flickr30k Entities tesztadataiban 86,55%-os pontossággal és 97,92%-os visszahívással. Ezt a technikát bevezető modellünk javítja a szokásos feliratozási mutatók korszerűségét, miközben jelentősen nagyobb hatékony szókincsméretet mutat be.', 'el': 'Η ελεγχόμενη λεζάντα εικόνας είναι ένα πρόσφατο δευτερεύον πεδίο στην εργασία πολλαπλών τρόπων της λεζάντας εικόνας όπου τίθενται περιορισμοί σε ποιες περιοχές σε μια εικόνα θα πρέπει να περιγράφονται στην παραγόμενη λεζάντα φυσικής γλώσσας. Αυτό δίνει μεγαλύτερη έμφαση στην παραγωγή λεπτομερέστερων περιγραφών και ανοίγει την πόρτα για μεγαλύτερο έλεγχο των αποτελεσμάτων από τον τελικό χρήστη. Ένα ζωτικό στοιχείο της αρχιτεκτονικής ελέγχου εικόνας λεζάντας είναι ο μηχανισμός που αποφασίζει το χρόνο προσέγγισης σε κάθε περιοχή μέσω της προώθησης ενός δείκτη περιοχής. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την πρόβλεψη του χρόνου της εξέλιξης του δείκτη περιοχής αντιμετωπίζοντας το βήμα προόδου ως ένα φυσικό μέρος της γλωσσικής δομής μέσω ενός σήματος, υποκινούμενο από μια ισχυρή συσχέτιση με τη δομή των προτάσεων στα δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι ο συγχρονισμός μας συμφωνεί με τον συγχρονισμό βάσης-αλήθειας στα δεδομένα δοκιμής των Entities Flickr30k με ακρίβεια 86.55% και ανάκληση 97.92%. Το μοντέλο μας που εφαρμόζει αυτή την τεχνική βελτιώνει την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στις τυπικές μετρήσεις λεζάντας ενώ παράλληλα επιδεικνύει ένα σημαντικά μεγαλύτερο αποτελεσματικό μέγεθος λεξιλογίου.', 'ka': 'კონტროლურად გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულება არის მიმდინარე ქვემოდიალური გამოსახულებების მრავალური დავალებაში, რომლებიც გამოსახულებელი რეგიონებში უნდა გამოსახულებულია მიმდინარე სახელსახულებელი ეს უფრო ძალიან ფონსკურება უფრო მეტად განსაზღვრებულია და გახსნა კონტროლის კონტროლის შესაძლებლობისთვის. Name ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ პრომენტის მეტი, რომელიც რეგიონტური პონტურის წინასწორებაზე წინასწორებული წინასწორება, რომელიც წინასწორებული წინასწორება ენის სტრუქტურაციის ნახვა ნახვა ფართობით NEXT-სტრუ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ჩვენი დრო მოთავსდება სამყარო სინამდვილეების დროს Flickr30k ინტერტიტების ტესტის მონაცემებით 86,55% და 97,92%-ის შემდეგ. ჩვენი მოდელი, რომელიც ამ ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება, სტანდარტული კაპციონის მეტრიკის განმავლობაში უფრო დიდი ეფექტიური სიტყვებულის ზომა გააკეთება.', 'lt': 'Kontroliuojamos vaizdo antraštės yra naujausias daugiarūšio vaizdo antraštės uždavinio papunktis, kuriame nustatomi apribojimai, kuriuose vaizdo regionuose turėtų būti aprašyta sukurtoje natūralios kalbos antraštėje. Tai labiau sutelkia dėmesį į išsamesnių aprašymų rengimą ir atveria duris, kad galutiniai vartotojai galėtų geriau kontroliuoti rezultatus. Svarbiausias kontroliuojamos vaizdo kūrimo architektūros komponentas yra mechanizmas, kuriuo nustatomas kiekvieno regiono dalyvavimo laikas pasitelkiant regiono rodytojo pažangą. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują metodą prognozuoti regiono rodiklio pažangos laiką vertinant pažangos etapą kaip natūralią kalbos struktūros dalį naudojant NEXT ženklą, pagrįstą tvirta koreliacija su mokymo duomenų sakinių struktūra. Mes manome, kad mūsų laikas sutinka su Flickr30k subjektų bandymų duomenimis, kurių tikslumas 86,55 proc. ir atšaukimas 97,92 proc. Mūsų modelis, įgyvendinantis šį metodą, pagerina standartinių antraštinių skaitmenų pažangą, taip pat parodo gerokai didesnį veiksmingą žodyno dydį.', 'it': "Il Captioning delle immagini controllabile è un sottocampo recente nell'attività multimodale di Captioning delle immagini in cui vengono imposti vincoli su quali regioni di un'immagine dovrebbero essere descritte nella didascalia del linguaggio naturale generata. Ciò pone una maggiore attenzione alla produzione di descrizioni più dettagliate e apre le porte a un maggiore controllo dei risultati da parte dell'utente finale. Una componente vitale dell'architettura Controllable Image Captioning è il meccanismo che decide il momento di frequentare ogni regione attraverso l'avanzamento di un puntatore regione. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo per prevedere la tempistica dell'avanzamento del puntatore regionale trattando la fase di avanzamento come una parte naturale della struttura linguistica tramite un token NEXT, motivato da una forte correlazione con la struttura della frase nei dati formativi. Troviamo che la nostra tempistica concorda con la tempistica di base dei dati di test Flickr30k Entities con una precisione dell'86,55% e un richiamo del 97,92%. Il nostro modello che implementa questa tecnica migliora lo stato dell'arte sulle metriche standard di didascalia, dimostrando inoltre una dimensione efficace del vocabolario notevolmente maggiore.", 'kk': 'Басқару мүмкін кескінді айдару - өзгертілген тілдің айдарында кескіндегі аумағындағы көп модалдық тапсырмалардың көп- модалдық тапсырмасының ішкі өрісі. Бұл көбірек егжей- тегжейлі сипаттамаларды жасау үшін күшті көздейтін және соңғы пайдаланушыларды нәтижелерден басқару үшін есепті ашады. Басқару мүмкін кескін айдарының архитектурасының маңызды компоненті - аумақтағы меңзерінің өзгертілігін арқылы әрбір аумаққа қатысу уақытын шешу механизмі. Бұл қағазда, мөлшерлердің кеңейту уақытын бақылап, тіл құрылымының табиғи бөлігін NEXT- таңбалау арқылы, мәліметтердің құрылымының құрылымына күшті коррелациясы арқылы жақсы бақылау әдісін бақылаймыз. Біз біздің уақыттамыз Flickr30k нысандарының тексеру деректеріне 86,55% деген және 97,92% деген еске салуымыз келеді. Бұл техниканы іске асыру үлгісіміз стандартты мақсаттау метрикаларының күйін жасайды, сондай-ақ олардың ең үлкен сөздер өлшемін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Контролираното насловување на слики е неодамнешно подполе во мултимодалната задача на насловување на слики во која се поставуваат ограничувања на кои региони на слика треба да бидат опишани во генерираниот наслов на природниот јазик. Ова става посилен фокус на производството на подетални описи и ја отвора вратата за поголема контрола на крајниот корисник над резултатите. Витален компонент на архитектурата за контролирање на сликите е механизмот кој одлучува за тајмингот на присуството во секој регион преку напредокот на регионалниот покажувач. Во овој весник, предложуваме нов метод за предвидување на времето на напредокот на регионалниот покажувач со третирање на чекорот напредок како природен дел од јазичката структура преку НЕКСТ-знак, мотивиран од силна корелација со структурата на речениците во податоците за обука. Најдовме дека нашиот тајминг се согласува со тајмингот на основната вистина во податоците од тестот на Фликр30k Entities со прецизност од 86,55 отсто и повлекување од 97,92 отсто. Нашиот модел кој ја спроведува оваа техника ја подобрува најдобрата техника на стандардната метрика на насловување, додека додатно покажува значително поголема ефикасна големина на речникот.', 'mt': 'It-Tkabbir Kontrollabbli tal-Immaġni huwa sottoqasam riċenti fil-kompitu multimodali tat-Tkabbir tal-Immaġni li fih jitqiegħdu restrizzjonijiet fuq liema reġjuni f’immaġni għandhom jiġu deskritti fil-intestatura tal-lingwa naturali ġġenerata. Dan jiffoka aktar fuq il-produzzjoni ta’ deskrizzjonijiet aktar dettaljati, u jiftaħ il-bieb għal aktar kontroll tal-utent finali fuq ir-riżultati. Komponent vitali tal-arkitettura Kontrollabbli tal-Captioning tal-Immaġini huwa l-mekkaniżmu li jiddeċiedi l-ħin li jattendi għal kull reġjun permezz tal-avvanz ta’ indikatur tar-reġjun. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid għat-tbassir taż-żmien tal-avvanz tal-indikatur tar-reġjun billi jittrattaw il-pass ta’ avvanz bħala parti naturali tal-istruttura lingwistika permezz ta’ NEXT-token, motivat minn korrelazzjoni qawwija mal-istruttura tas-sentenza fid-dejta tat-taħriġ. Aħna nsibu li l-ħin tagħna jaqbel mal-ħin tal-ground-truth fid-dejta tat-test tal-Entitajiet Flickr30k b’preċiżjoni ta’ 86.55% u b’riferiment ta’ 97.92%. Il-mudell tagħna li jimplimenta din it-teknika jtejjeb l-aktar avvanzat fil-metriċi standard tal-intestatura filwaqt li juri wkoll daqs vokabulari effettiv konsiderevolment akbar.', 'ms': 'Capsyen Imej yang boleh Dikawal adalah sub-medan baru-baru ini dalam tugas multi modal Capsyen Imej dimana batasan ditempatkan di mana kawasan dalam imej patut dijelaskan dalam caption bahasa semulajadi yang dijana. Ini meletakkan fokus yang lebih kuat pada menghasilkan deskripsi terperinci, dan membuka pintu untuk lebih banyak kawalan pengguna akhir atas keputusan. Komponen penting arkitektur Captioning Imej yang boleh Dikawal adalah mekanisme yang memutuskan masa untuk menghadiri setiap kawasan melalui kemajuan penunjuk kawasan. In this paper, we propose a novel method for predicting the timing of region pointer advancement by treating the advancement step as a natural part of the language structure via a NEXT-token, motivated by a strong correlation to the sentence structure in the training data.  Kami mendapati bahawa masa kita bersetuju dengan masa kebenaran-tanah dalam data ujian Entiti Flickr30k dengan ketepatan 86.55% dan pengingatan 97.92%. Model kami yang melaksanakan teknik ini memperbaiki keadaan-state-of-the-art pada metrik captioning piawai sementara tambahan menunjukkan saiz vokbulari yang efektif yang jauh lebih besar.', 'ml': 'നിയന്ത്രണിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ചിത്രം ക്യാപ്റ്റന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ തലക്കെട്ടില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ തലക്കെട്ടില്\u200d പ്രകൃതിയായ ഇത് കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ശക്തിയുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ് നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഒരു ഘട്ടത്തിന്റെ പ്രാധാന്യം ഒരു പ്രദേശത്തിന്റെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടത്തിലൂടെ അഭിനയി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നെക്സ്റ്റി- ടോക്കിനുമുഖാനുപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു ശക്തിയുള്ള ബന്ധമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമയം ഫ്ലിക്രോമിക്ക് എന്റിറ്റികളുടെ ടെസ്റ്റിറ്റ് ഡേറ്റായിട്ടുള്ള ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യ സമയത്തോടൊപ്പം സമ് ഈ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സാധാരണ മെട്രിക്കളെ പിടികൂടുന്നതിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг дээр хязгаарлагддаг олон моделийн даалгавар юм. Энэ нь илүү нарийвчлалтай тодорхойлолтуудыг бүтээхэд илүү хүчтэй төвлөрүүлж, үр дүн дээр эцсийн хэрэглэгчийн удирдлагатай хаалга нээж байна. Контрол хийх боломжтой зураг зураг зураг зурагчийн архитектурын чухал хэсэг нь бүс нутгийн загварын хөгжүүлэхээр оролцох цаг хугацааны шийдвэрлэх механизм юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бүс нутгийн загварын хөгжлийн цаг хугацааны хөгжлийн цаг хугацааны хөгжлийн цаг хугацааны талаар хэлний бүтэц байгалийн хэсэг болгон NEXT-томъёог ашиглаж, сургалтын өгөгдлийн үеийн бүтэцтэй холбоотой хүчтэй холбоот Бид хугацааны цаг хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны хугацааны Бидний загвар нь энэ техникийг хэрэгжүүлэх нь стандарт хэвлэлийн метрик дээр урлагийн байдал дээр сайжруулдаг. Тэгээд нэмэлтэй нь илүү их эффективны үг хэмжээг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Kontrolowalne napisy obrazów jest ostatnim podpolem w zadaniu multimodalnym obrazu Napisy obrazów, w którym określone są ograniczenia, które regiony obrazu powinny być opisane w wygenerowanym podpisie języka naturalnego. Składa to większy nacisk na tworzenie bardziej szczegółowych opisów i otwiera drzwi do większej kontroli użytkowników końcowych nad wynikami. Istotnym elementem architektury sterowalnego napisu obrazu jest mechanizm decydujący o czasie obsługi każdego regionu poprzez zaawansowanie wskaźnika regionu. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową metodę przewidywania czasu awansu wskaźnika regionu poprzez traktowanie etapu awansu jako naturalnej części struktury językowej poprzez token NEXT, motywowany silną korelacją ze strukturą zdań w danych treningowych. Stwierdzimy, że nasz czas zgadza się z czasem podstawowym w danych testowych Flickr30k Entities o precyzji 86,55% i odwołaniu 97,92%. Nasz model wdrażający tę technikę poprawia najnowocześniejszy stan techniki w zakresie standardowych metryk napisów, a dodatkowo demonstruje znacznie większy efektywny rozmiar słownictwa.', 'no': 'Kontrollerbar biletet er eit nyleg underfelt i det fleire modalet oppgåva av biletet, der begrensningar blir plassert på kva område i biletet skal beskrivast i den genererte naturspråkstilen. Dette plasserer ein sterker fokus på å laga meir detaljerte skildringar, og opnar døra for meir sluttbrukararkontroll over resultat. Dette er ein viktig komponent av arkitekturen for kontrollerbare bilete, som bestemmer tidspunktet for å delta på kvar område gjennom avanserten av eit område- peikar. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt metode for å forhåndsvisa tidspunktet på regionen ved å behandle avansert steg som naturalt del av språkstrukturen via ein NEXT-token, motivert av ein sterk korrelasjon til setningsstrukturen i øvingsdata. Vi finn at tidspunktet vårt er tilsvarande med bakgrunnsannheten i Flickr30k Entity-test data med nøyaktig 86,55 % og rekninga av 97,92 %. Modellen vårt som implementerer denne teknikken forbedrar kunsttilstanden på standardpartisjonsmetrikar, mens tillegg viser eit svært større effektivt ordbokstørrelse.', 'ro': 'Captionarea imaginii controlabilă este un subcâmp recent în activitatea multimodală a Captionarea imaginii în care sunt plasate constrângeri asupra regiunilor dintr-o imagine ar trebui descrise în titlul de limbaj natural generat. Acest lucru pune un accent mai puternic pe producerea de descrieri mai detaliate și deschide ușa pentru un control mai mare asupra rezultatelor utilizatorilor finali. O componentă vitală a arhitecturii Captionable Image este mecanismul care decide momentul de participare la fiecare regiune prin avansarea unui indicator de regiune. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă nouă de predicție a momentului avansării indicatorului regiunii prin tratarea etapei avansării ca parte naturală a structurii lingvistice prin intermediul unui token NEXT, motivat de o puternică corelație cu structura propoziției din datele de formare. Considerăm că sincronizarea noastră este de acord cu sincronizarea adevărului de bază în datele de testare Flickr30k Entities cu o precizie de 86,55% și o retragere de 97,92%. Modelul nostru care implementează această tehnică îmbunătățește performanțele de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește măsurătorile standard de subtitrare, demonstrând în plus o dimensiune eficientă considerabil mai mare a vocabularului.', 'sr': 'Kontrolabilno snimanje slika je nedavno podpolje u multimodalnom zadatku snimanja slika, na kojem se stavljaju ograničenja na koje regije na sliki treba opisati u izrađenom prirodnom naslovu. To je jači fokus na proizvodnju detaljnih opisa i otvaranje vrata za više kontrole konačnog korisnika nad rezultatima. Životna komponenta građevinskog građevinskog građevinskog slika je mehanizam koji odlučuje vrijeme prisustvovanja svakom regionu kroz napredak pokazivača regiona. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu za predviđanje vremena napreda pokazatelja region a, tretirajući napredni korak kao prirodan deo jezičke strukture kroz NEXT-token, motivisanu jakom korelacijom sa strukturom rečenice u podacima obuke. Naše vrijeme se slaže sa vremenom podataka Flickr30k Entiteta sa preciznošću 86,55% i sećanjem 97,92%. Naš model koji implementira ovu tehniku poboljšava stanje umjetnosti na standardne kapcijanske metrike, a dodatno pokazuje značajno veću efikasnu veličinu rečenika.', 'so': 'Xukumka maamulka la maamulo waa u dhowaad sub-field in lagu sameeyo taswir kala duduwan oo sawir ah oo lagu qoro qasab ku yaala meelaha lagu qoro sawir lagu qorayo oo lagu qorayo qoraalka afka asalka ah. Taas waxay si adag ugu kalsoonaanaysaa sameynta qoraal faa’iido ah, waxayna albaabka u furtaa kontrollka isticmaalaha ugu dambeeya arimaha. Qayb muhiim ah oo ka mid ah sawirka Controllable Captioning architecture waa mekaniisada go’aanka ku saabsan waqtiga ka baxa gobol walba, horumarinta goobta gobolka. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab saxda ah oo ku hor socoshada waqtiga horumarinta ee hagitaanka ee gobolka, si loo isticmaalo tallaabinta horumarinta sida qayb asalka ah oo ka mid ah dhismaha luqada ee NEXT-token, kaas oo lagu dhaqaajiyey si xoog leh u xiriirta dhismaha ereyga ee macluumaadka waxbarashada. Waxaynu ognahay in waqtigayagu uu heshiiyo waqtiga dhulka ee ku saabsan baaritaanka firaaqada Flickr30k oo qiyaas ah 86.55 boqolkiiba iyo xusuusta 97.92 boqolkiiba. Tusaalkayaga lagu sameeyo teknikadan wuxuu bedelaa xaaladda farshaxanka ee ku saabsan qaabka caadiga ah, isla markaasna waxaa kaloo muujiyaya mid aad u weyn oo faa’iido leh oo hadalka.', 'sv': 'Kontrollerbar bildtextning är ett nyligen underfält i den multimodala uppgiften Bildtextning där begränsningar sätts på vilka regioner i en bild som ska beskrivas i den genererade bildtextningen på naturligt språk. Detta sätter ett starkare fokus på att producera mer detaljerade beskrivningar och öppnar dörren för mer slutanvändarkontroll över resultaten. En viktig komponent i arkitekturen för kontrollerbar bildtext är den mekanism som bestämmer tidpunkten för att ta hand om varje region genom att avancera en regionpekare. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny metod för att förutsäga tidpunkten för regionpekarens avancering genom att behandla avanceringssteget som en naturlig del av språkstrukturen via en NEXT-token, motiverad av en stark korrelation till meningsstrukturen i utbildningsdata. Vi finner att vår timing överensstämmer med grundsanningens timing i Flickr30k Entities testdata med en precision på 86,55% och en återkallelse på 97,92%. Vår modell som implementerar denna teknik förbättrar den senaste tekniken för standardtextning och visar dessutom en betydligt större effektiv vokabulärstorlek.', 'si': 'පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පින්වන්න පුළුවන් පින්වන්න පුළුවන් පින්වන්න පුළුවන් පින්වන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින මේක තවත් විස්තර විස්තරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වගේම තවත් අවසාන ප්\u200dරයෝජකය පාලනය කරනවා. පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පින්තූර පින්තූර කැප්ටයින් ස්ථාපනයේ විශේෂ කාරණාවක් තමයි ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා හ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් භාෂාව ස්ථානයේ ස්වභාවික කොටස් වලින්  අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට අපේ වෙලාවක් තියෙනවා ෆ්ලික්ර් 30k අන්තිත්වයේ පරීක්ෂා දත්ත 86.55% සහ 97.92% මතකයි. අපේ මෝඩේල් මේ විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණික කැප්ටයින් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය කරනවා වගේම', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பிம்பத்தின் தலைப்பு பிம்பத்தை உருவாக்கும் இயல்பான மொழி தலைப்பில் விவரிக்கப்படும் பிம்பத்தின் பல- மாதிரி பணியில் உள்ள ஒர இது மேலும் விவரங்களை உருவாக்குவதற்கு வலுப்படுத்தும் கவனத்தை அமைக்கிறது, முடிவுகள் மேலும் முடிவு பயனர் கட்டுப்பாட் கட்டுப்படுத்தும் பிம்பத்தை பிடிப்பது கட்டுப்பாட்டு அமைப்புகளின் முக்கியமான பகுதி புள்ளியின் மேம்படுத்தல் மூலம் ஒவ்வொரு பிரிவ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான நேரத்தை முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான முன்னேற்றம் படி மொழி அமைப்பின் இயல்பான பகுதியாக முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான முறைம நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் என்றால் எங்கள் நேரம் பிளிக்ரும் 30k உள்ளீட்டுகளில் நேரத்தில் ஏற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது சரியான 86.55% மற இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரி நிலைமையை மேம்படுத்துகிறது நிலையான பிடிப்பு மெட்ரிக்கும் நிலையை மேம்படுத்துகிறத', 'ur': 'Name یہ بہت زیادہ مفصل توصیح کے پیدا کرنے پر زیادہ مضبوط تمرکز کرتا ہے اور نتیجے پر اضافہ کارساز کنٹرول کے لئے دروازے کھولتا ہے. کنٹرولبل تصویر کاپیٹینگ معماری کا ایک حیات کامپیوتر ہے جو ایک منطقه پینٹر کی پیشرفت کے ذریعہ ہر منطقه پر حاضر ہونے کا وقت فیصلہ کرتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نو طریقہ پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے تقریبا کریں گے کہ منطقه پینٹر کی تائیم پیش بینی کے لئے زبان ساختاری کا ایک طبیعی حصہ کے ذریعے زبان ساختاری کے ذریعے ایک NEXT-token کے ذریعے، جسے ایک سخت تعلق کے ذریعے تدریس ڈیٹوں کے ساختار سے ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ہماری تایمینگ فلیکر30ک انٹیٹیٹیٹ کی آزمائش کے ذریعے 86.55% اور 97.92% کی یاد کرتی ہے۔ ہماری مدل اس تکنیک کے مطابق استاندارڈ کیپٹیونٹ میٹریک پر استعمال کرتی ہے اور اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ ایک بہت بڑی اثر والی آواز کی اندازہ دکھاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu foydalanuvchi natijalarini qo'shimcha foydalanuvchi uchun qo'shimcha foydalanuvchiga qo'yish mumkin. Name Bu hujjatda, biz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotdagi soʻzning tuzuvlarini oldingan darajada taʼminlovchi darajadagi novel usulni taʼminlovchi soʻzlar tartib etishni tasavvur qilishimiz mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, Flickr30k Entities soatida soat haqiqiqidagi vaqtimiz 86.55% va 97.92% xotira olamiz. Bizning modelimiz bu teknologiyani ishlatish imkoniyatini standard metriklarning holatini oshirish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Ularning soʻzni ko'paytirish uchun juda katta ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Bộ chụp ảnh dễ điều khiển là một mặt phụ mới trong nhiệm vụ chụp ảnh đa phương, nơi có những giới hạn đặt trong đó các vùng chụp ảnh cần được mô tả trong tiêu đề ngôn ngữ tự nhiên đã tạo ra. Điều này đặt trọng tâm hơn vào việc mô tả chi tiết hơn, và mở cửa để người dùng cuối cùng kiểm soát kết quả hơn. Một thành phần quan trọng của kiến trúc trích ảnh điều khiển là cơ chế quyết định thời gian tiếp cận mỗi vùng bằng cách phát triển một con trỏ vùng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để dự đoán thời điểm tiến bộ con trỏ vùng bằng cách coi bước tiến như một phần tự nhiên của cấu trúc ngôn ngữ qua biểu đồ NEXT, thúc đẩy bởi một sự tương quan mạnh mẽ với cấu trúc án trong dữ liệu huấn luyện. Chúng tôi thấy thời điểm của chúng ta hợp với thời điểm thực tế trên mặt đất trong dữ liệu thử nghiệm của loài Flickr30k với độ chính xác của 86 Cách bố trí của chúng ta để thực hiện kỹ thuật này cải thiện trạng thái nghệ thuật của thước đo đo tiêu chuẩn, và hiển thị một kích thước ngôn từ có hiệu quả lớn hơn nhiều.', 'bg': 'Контролируемият надпис на изображение е скорошно подполе в мултимодалната задача на надпис на изображение, при което се поставят ограничения върху кои региони в изображението трябва да бъдат описани в генерирания надпис на естествен език. Това поставя по-голям фокус върху изготвянето на по-подробни описания и отваря вратата за по-голям контрол на крайните потребители върху резултатите. Жизненоважен компонент на архитектурата за контролиране на изображения е механизмът, който решава времето за посещаване на всеки регион чрез напредъка на показалеца за регион. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за предсказване на времето на напредъка на показалеца на региона чрез третиране на напредъка стъпка като естествена част от езиковата структура чрез символ мотивиран от силна корелация със структурата на изречението в данните за обучение. Намираме, че времето ни е в съответствие с времето на базата на истината в тестовите данни с точност от 86,55% и отзоваване от 97,92%. Нашият модел, прилагащ тази техника, подобрява най-съвременните стандарти за надпис, като същевременно демонстрира значително по-голям ефективен размер на речника.', 'nl': 'Controleerbare afbeeldingsbijschriften is een recent subveld in de multimodale taak van afbeeldingsbijschriften waarin beperkingen worden gesteld aan welke gebieden in een afbeelding moeten worden beschreven in het gegenereerde ondertiteling in natuurlijke taal. Dit legt een sterkere focus op het produceren van meer gedetailleerde beschrijvingen en opent de deur voor meer controle van de eindgebruiker over de resultaten. Een vitaal onderdeel van de Controlable Image Captioning architectuur is het mechanisme dat bepaalt hoe lang elke regio moet worden behandeld door middel van een regionaanwijzer. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe methode voor om de timing van regio pointer vooruitgang te voorspellen door de voortgangsstap te behandelen als een natuurlijk onderdeel van de taalstructuur via een NEXT-token, gemotiveerd door een sterke correlatie met de zinsstructuur in de trainingsgegevens. We vinden dat onze timing overeenkomt met de ground-truth timing in de Flickr30k Entities testgegevens met een precisie van 86,55% en een terugroeping van 97,92%. Ons model dat deze techniek implementeert verbetert de state-of-the-art op standaard ondertitelingsstatistieken en toont bovendien een aanzienlijk grotere effectieve woordenschat.', 'da': 'Kontrollerbar billedtekst er et nyligt underfelt i den multimodale opgave Billedtekst, hvor begrænsninger er placeret på, hvilke områder i et billede der skal beskrives i den genererede billedtekst på naturligt sprog. Dette sætter stærkere fokus på at producere mere detaljerede beskrivelser og åbner døren for mere slutbrugerkontrol over resultaterne. En vigtig komponent i arkitekturen Controllable Image Captioning er den mekanisme, der bestemmer tidspunktet for at deltage i hver region gennem fremskridt af en region markør. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny metode til at forudsige tidspunktet for regionpointer fremskridt ved at behandle avanceret trin som en naturlig del af sprogstrukturen via en NEXT-token, motiveret af en stærk korrelation til sætningsstrukturen i træningsdataene. Vi finder ud af, at vores timing stemmer overens med den grundlæggende timing i Flickr30k Entities testdata med en præcision på 86,55% og en tilbagekaldelse på 97,92%. Vores model, der implementerer denne teknik, forbedrer de nyeste standarder for billedtekster, samtidig med at den demonstrerer en betydeligt større effektiv ordforråd størrelse.', 'hr': 'Kontrolabilno snimanje slika je nedavno podpolje u multimodalnom zadatku snimanja slika u kojem se ograničenja stavljaju na koje regije na sliki treba opisati u izrađenom prirodnom naslovu. To se jače fokusira na proizvodnju detaljnijih opisa i otvara vrata za više kontrole konačnog korisnika nad rezultatima. Životna komponenta građevinskog građevinskog građevinskog slika je mehanizam koji odlučuje vrijeme prisustvovanja svakom regionu kroz napredak pokazivača regija. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu predviđanja vremena napreda pokazatelja region a, tretirajući napredni korak kao prirodan dio jezičke strukture kroz NEXT-token, motiviranu jakom korelacijom sa strukturom kazne u podacima obuke. Naše vrijeme se slaže s vremenom podataka o ispitivanju podataka Flickr30k podataka s preciznošću 86,55% i podsjećanjem 97,92%. Naš model za provedbu ove tehnike poboljšava stanje umjetnosti na standardnim kapicijskim metrikama, a dodatno pokazuje značajno veću učinkovitu veličinu riječnika.', 'ko': '컨트롤 가능한 이미지 자막은 이미지 자막 다중모드 작업에서 최근에 등장한 하위 영역으로 그 중에서 이미지에서 어떤 구역이 생성된 자연 언어 자막에 묘사되어야 하는지를 제약한다.이로써 우리는 더욱 상세한 설명을 만드는 데 관심을 가지게 되었고, 최종 사용자에게 결과에 대한 더 많은 제어를 위해 문을 열었다.이미지 자막 체계 구조를 제어할 수 있는 중요한 구성 부분은 지역 지침의 전진을 통해 각 구역에 관심을 가지는 시간을 결정하는 메커니즘이다.본고에서 우리는 지역 지침이 전진하는 시간을 예측하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다. 방법은 다음 표기를 통해 전진 절차를 언어 구조의 자연스러운 부분으로 간주하고 그 동기는 훈련 데이터 중의 문장 구조와 밀접한 관계를 가진다.우리는 우리의 시간 계산이 Flickr30k 실체 테스트 데이터 중의 지상 진실 시간 계산과 일치하고 정확도는 86.55%이며 리콜률은 97.92% 라는 것을 발견했다.또한 더욱 대규모의 표준 도량을 보여주는 동시에 표준 모델에 자막을 사용하여 효율을 현저히 높였다.', 'fa': 'کاپیتان قابل کنترل تصویر یک زیر زمینه اخیر در کار بسیار مدال کاپیتان تصویر است که محدودیت در آن قرار می\u200cگیرند که منطقه\u200cها در یک تصویر باید در عنوان زبان طبیعی تولید شوند. این یک تمرکز قوی\u200cتر بر تولید توضیح\u200cهای جزئیات بیشتری قرار می\u200cدهد و در را برای کنترل بیشتری از کنترل کاربر پایان بر نتایج باز می\u200cکند. یک بخش حیاتی از معماری کاپیتان تصویر قابل کنترل مکانیسمی است که زمان حاضری به هر منطقه از طریق پیشرفت یک نقل منطقه تصمیم می\u200cگیرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش جدید برای پیش بینی کردن زمان پیشرفت نقل منطقه با درمان قدم پیشرفت به عنوان بخشی طبیعی از ساختار زبان با یک نشان NEXT، که توسط یک ارتباط قوی با ساختار جمله در داده های آموزش تحریک شده است، پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما متوجه شدیم که زمان زمان ما با زمان زمینی در اطلاعات آزمایش\u200cهای فلیکر30ک با دقیق 86.55 درصد و یادآوری 97.92 درصد موافق است. مدل ما که این تکنیک را اجرای می\u200cکند، وضعیت هنری بر متریک\u200cهای استاندارد استاندارد را بهتر می\u200cکند، در حالی که به اضافه\u200cای اندازه\u200cی کلمه\u200cهای موثرت\u200cتر را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'de': 'Steuerbare Bildbeschriftung ist ein aktuelles Unterfeld in der multimodalen Aufgabe von Bildbeschriftung, bei dem Einschränkungen festgelegt werden, welche Bereiche in einem Bild in der generierten Bildunterschrift beschrieben werden sollen. Dies legt einen stärkeren Fokus auf die Erstellung detaillierterer Beschreibungen und öffnet dem Endbenutzer die Tür für mehr Kontrolle über die Ergebnisse. Ein wesentlicher Bestandteil der Architektur für steuerbare Bildbeschriftungen ist der Mechanismus, der über den Zeitpunkt der Behandlung jeder Region durch die Weiterentwicklung eines Regionszeigers entscheidet. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, um den Zeitpunkt der Regionalpointer-Weiterentwicklung vorherzusagen, indem der Fortschrittsschritt als natürlicher Teil der Sprachstruktur über einen NEXT-Token behandelt wird, der durch eine starke Korrelation zur Satzstruktur in den Trainingsdaten motiviert ist. Wir stellen fest, dass unser Timing mit dem Ground-Truth Timing in den Flickr30k Entities Testdaten mit einer Genauigkeit von 86,55% und einem Rückruf von 97,92% übereinstimmt. Unser Modell, das diese Technik implementiert, verbessert den Stand der Technik in Bezug auf Standard-Untertitelungsmetriken und demonstriert zusätzlich eine deutlich größere effektive Vokabelgröße.', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha picha kwa udhibiti ni sehemu ya hivi karibuni katika kazi ya picha yenye sura mbalimbali ya kuonyesha picha ambapo vikwazo vinavyowekwa kwenye maeneo ya picha yanapaswa kuelezea katika tafsiri ya lugha za asili zilizozaliwa. This puts a stronger focus on producing more detailed descriptions, and opens the door for more end-user control over results.  Kifungu cha muhimu cha ujenzi wa Picha inayodhibiti Kuchapisha Picha ni mfumo unaoamua muda wa kuhudhuria katika kila eneo kupitia maendeleo ya maendeleo ya eneo hilo. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kutabiri wakati wa hatua ya maendeleo ya eneo kwa kutumia hatua za maendeleo kama sehemu ya asili ya muundo wa lugha kupitia ishara ya NEXT, inayohamasishwa na muundo mkali wa hukumu katika taarifa za mafunzo. Tunapata kwamba muda wetu unakubaliana na wakati wa ukweli wa ardhi katika vipimo vya taarifa vya Ujumbe wa Flickr30 kwa kiasi cha asilimia 86.55 na kumbukumbu ya asilimia 97.92. Mfano wetu wa kutekeleza teknolojia hii unaboresha hali ya sanaa inayofanana na hali ya kawaida ya kuchukua mitindo wakati pia kuonyesha ukubwa wa ufanisi mkubwa wa maneno.', 'tr': 'Kontroleýä Resim Käpşendirmesi ýakyn sub-sahypa surat Käpşendirmeginiň ň köp-modal zady. Resim Käpşendirmeginiň içine çäpşendirmekleri, suratda nähili böleklerde döredilen tebigy dil käpşendirmekde tassyklanmaly. Bu biraz daha detay tassymlary üretmek üçin güýçli fokus edýär we soňky Ullançylaryň üstünde gapyny a çar. Kontrol edilýän Resim Käpşenleme arhitekteginiň wajyp bölegi bir görkezilişi gelişmeden aralygy üçin wagtyny çözmekdir. Bu kagyzda, biz bölegi görkezilişi zamanyň gelişmegini NEXT-token bilen el strukturasynyň dogry bir bölegi hökmünde, sözleriň strukturasyna gaty bir baglaşyk bilen täsirli terjime edip görýäris. Zamanymyz Flickr30k Entity testi maglumatynda 86.55% döwüregi we 97.92% ýagdaýynda ylalaşýar. Bizim nusgamyz bu tekniki implemente edip otyran şeklinde standart kapatma metriklerini geliştirir. Hemişe de esasy uly täsirli sözler ululykyny görkezýär.', 'id': 'Controllable Image Captioning is a recent sub-field in the multi-modal task of Image Captioning wherein constraints are placed on which regions in an image should be described in the generated natural language caption.  Ini menempatkan fokus yang lebih kuat pada menghasilkan deskripsi terperinci, dan membuka pintu untuk lebih mengendalikan pengguna akhir atas hasil. Komponen penting dari arsitektur Captioning Gambar yang bisa dikendalikan adalah mekanisme yang memutuskan waktu untuk menghadiri setiap daerah melalui kemajuan penunjuk daerah. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk memprediksi waktunya kemajuan penunjuk daerah dengan memperlakukan langkah kemajuan sebagai bagian alami dari struktur bahasa melalui token-NEXT, yang dimotivasikan oleh korelasi kuat dengan struktur kalimat dalam data latihan. Kami menemukan bahwa waktunya setuju dengan waktunya yang sebenarnya dalam data tes Entitas Flickr30k dengan presisi 86,55% dan pengingatan 97,92%. Our model implementing this technique improves the state-of-the-art on standard captioning metrics while additionally demonstrating a considerably larger effective vocabulary size.', 'hy': "Controllable Image Captioning is a recent sub-field in the multi-modal task of Image Captioning wherein constraints are placed on which regions in an image should be described in the generated natural language caption.  Սա ավելի ուժեղ կենտրոնացում է ավելի մանրամասն նկարագրություններ ստեղծելու վրա և բացում է դուռը, որպեսզի վերջնական օգտագործողները ավելի շատ վերահսկեն արդյունքները: Կոնտրելի պատկերի կապիոնացիայի ճարտարապետության կարևոր բաղադրիչը այն մեխանիզմն է, որը որոշում է տարածաշրջանի յուրաքանչյուր մասնակցության ժամանակահատվածը տարածաշրջանի ցույց տալու միջոցով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որպեսզի կանխատեսենք տարածաշրջանի ցուցանիշների առաջընթացը' վերաբերելով առաջընթացը լեզվի կառուցվածքի բնական մասը, օգտագործելով Նեքսթ-նշան, որը խրախուսում է ուժեղ կապվածությամբ նախադասությունների կա We find that our timing agrees with the ground-truth timing in the Flickr30k Entities test data with a precision of 86.55% and a recall of 97.92%.  Our model implementing this technique improves the state-of-the-art on standard captioning metrics while additionally demonstrating a considerably larger effective vocabulary size.", 'az': 'Kontrol olaraq Görüntü Kapitlaması təbiətli dil başlığı içində müəyyən edilən çoxlu modal görüntü Kapitlamasının çoxlu işidir. Bu, daha detaylı tanımlamalar yaratmaq üçün daha güclü bir tərzim qoyur və sonların üstündə daha çox istifadəçi kontrolünü a çar. Kontrol qabiliyyətli Rəsm Kapioning arhitektarının mövcud komponenti, bölge göstəricisinin ilerləşməsi ilə hər bölgeyə katılmasının müəyyən vaxtını karar verən mehanizmidir. Bu kağızda, müəyyən vaxtı göstəricisi tədbirləşdirmək üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik ki, dil quruluşunun təbiətli bir parças ı kimi, NEXT-token vasitəsilə, cümlənin quruluşu ilə möhkəm bir bağlantısı ilə təhsil edirik. Bizim zamanımız Flickr30k Entity testi verilənləri 86,55%-dən və 97,92%-dən istifadə edir. Bizim modellərimiz bu tekniki istifadə etmək üçün standart kapasyon metriklərinin durumunu daha yaxşılaşdırır. Sonra da çox böyük təsirli sözlərin böyüklüyünü göstərir.', 'af': "Beheerbaar Beeld Opskrif is 'n onlangse sub- veld in die multimodaal taak van Beeld Opskrif waarin beheinings geplaas word op watter regione in 'n beeld in' n beeld beskrywing moet word in die genereerde natuurlike taal titel. Hierdie stel 'n sterker fokus op die produksie van meer gedetale beskrywings, en maak die deur oop vir meer einde gebruiker beheer oor resultate. 'n Bedienbare komponent van die Kontrolerbare Beeldkaptering-arkitektuur is die mekanisme wat besluit die tyd van bydraaiïng na elke region deur die vordering van 'n regionale wyser. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe metode vir die voorskou van die tyd van die regionale wyser vordering deur die vordering stap as 'n natuurlike deel van die taal struktuur te behandel deur 'n volgende token, wat deur 'n sterk korrelasie tot die setstruktuur in die onderwerp data motiveer is. Ons vind dat ons tyd ooreenkomstig met die grondwaarheid tyd in die Flickr30k Entiteit toets data met 'n presisie van 86,55% en 'n rekening van 97,92%. Ons model wat hierdie tekniks implementeer, verbeter die staat van die kuns op standaard kapisionering metries terwyl daarop 'n aansienlik groter effektief woordeboek grootte bevestig.", 'am': 'ምስል ማቀናቀል በአዲስ ደረጃዎች ውስጥ ግንቦች በሚደረጉበት የምስል ግንቦች ውስጥ በመስመር ላይ የሚዘረጉበት ግንኙነት በአዲስ ቋንቋ አርእስት ውስጥ ይገለጽበታል፡፡ ይህም የበረታች ጽሑፎችን በመፍጠር ላይ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የመሠረተ አካውንት ማቀናጃ የቆጣጠረው የምስል ዕቅድ ነው፤ የአካባቢ መስኮት በሁሉም ክፍል ላይ ለመግባት ሰዓት እየቆረጠው ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአካባቢው መስኮት የግንኙነት አካባቢ የቋንቋ አካባቢ ክፍል፣ በኔXT-ምልክት የተመሳሳይ የቁጥጥር አካባቢ እናስቸጋራለን፡፡ ሰዓታችን በFlickr30k Entities ድምፅ ውስጥ የመሬት ሰዓት እንዲያሳየቅ 86.55 በመቶ እና 97.92 በመቶ መታሰቢያ እንደሆነ እናገኛለን፡፡ የዚህን ስህተት ማድረግ ሞዴሌያችን በተጨማሪው የቋንቋ አካባቢ መጠን በሚያሳየው የዓላማ ሥርዓት አካባቢ እና በተጨማሪም የቋንቋዎች መጠን በጣም የበለጠ ሲታየቁ፡፡', 'bn': 'নিয়ন্ত্রণিত ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশন একটি সাম্প্রতিক সাবফিল্ড। ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশনের মাল্টিমোডাল কাজে যেখানে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার শিরোনামে প্রাকৃতিক This puts a stronger focus on producing more detailed descriptions, and opens the door for more end-user control over results.  কন্ট্রোলেবেল ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশন কার্যক্রমের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ হচ্ছে এই মেকেনিস যা অঞ্চলের প্রতিটি অঞ্চলে অংশগ্রহণের সময় নির্ধারণ করেছ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি অঞ্চলের বিন্দুকের সময়ের উন্নয়নের বিষয়টি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য একটি নবনীয় পদ্ধতি যা প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যের কাঠামোর মাধ্যমে একটি প্রাকৃতিক ক ক আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে ফ্লিকার্৩০ কি এন্টেটিটিসের পরীক্ষা তথ্যের সাথে আমাদের সময়ের সময় সমর্থন করেছে যা ৮৬. আমাদের মডেল এই প্রযুক্তিটি ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে স্ট্যান্ডারের শিল্পের অবস্থা উন্নত করে যাচ্ছে এবং এর সাথে এই শব্দভাণ্ডারের আকার বেশী কার্যকর', 'cs': 'Ovládací titulky obrázků je nedávné podpole multimodální úlohy Obrázků titulky, kde jsou kladena omezení, které oblasti obrázku mají být popsány v generovaném titulku přirozeného jazyka. To klade silnější důraz na vytváření podrobnějších popisů a otevírá dveře pro větší kontrolu koncových uživatelů nad výsledky. Důležitou součástí architektury Controlable Image Titting je mechanismus, který rozhoduje o načasování návštěvy každé oblasti prostřednictvím pokroku ukazatele regionu. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu pro predikci časování pokroku regionálního ukazatele pomocí tokenu NEXT jako přirozené součásti jazykové struktury, motivovanou silnou korelací se strukturou vět v tréninkových datech. Zjistili jsme, že naše načasování souhlasí s načasováním základní pravdy v testovacích datech Flickr30k Entities s přesností 86,55% a stažením 97,92%. Náš model implementující tuto techniku zlepšuje nejmodernější standardní metriky titulků a navíc demonstruje podstatně větší efektivní velikost slovní zásoby.', 'ca': "Capcionament d'imatges controlable és un subconjunt recent en la tasca multi modal de Capcionament d'imatges en què es posen restriccions en quines regions d'una imatge haurien de ser descrites en el capítol de llenguatge natural generat. Això es centra més en produir descripcions més detalladas, i obre la porta per a controlar més els resultats dels usuaris finals. A vital component of the Controllable Image Captioning architecture is the mechanism that decides the timing of attending to each region through the advancement of a region pointer.  In this paper, we propose a novel method for predicting the timing of region pointer advancement by treating the advancement step as a natural part of the language structure via a NEXT-token, motivated by a strong correlation to the sentence structure in the training data.  Trobem que el nostre cronometre està d'acord amb el cronometre terrestre-veritat de les dades de prova de les Entitats Flickr30k amb una precisió del 86,55% i un recuperació del 97,92%. El nostre model d'implementació d'aquesta tècnica millora l'actualitat en les mètriques de captionització standard mentre demuestra una mida de vocabulari molt més efectiva.", 'sq': 'Captioning i Kontrollueshëm i Imazheve është një nënfushë e kohëve të fundit në detyrën multimodale të Captioning i Imazheve ku janë vendosur kufizime në të cilat rajone në një imazh duhet të përshkruhen në titullin e gjeneruar të gjuhës natyrore. Kjo vë një fokus më të fortë në prodhimin e përshkrimeve më të detajuara dhe hap derën për më shumë kontrollin e përdoruesit përfundimtar mbi rezultatet. Një komponent thelbësor i arkitekturës së Kapsionimit të Imagjeve të Kontrollueshme është mekanizmi që vendos kohën e ndjekjes së çdo rajoni nëpërmjet përparimit të një tregues rajonal. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re për parashikimin e kohës së përparimit të treguesve të rajonit duke trajtuar hapin e përparimit si një pjesë natyrore të strukturës gjuhësore nëpërmjet një NEXT-token, të motivuar nga një korrelacion i fortë me strukturën e fjalëve në të dhënat e trainimit. We find that our timing agrees with the ground-truth timing in the Flickr30k Entities test data with a precision of 86.55% and a recall of 97.92%.  Modeli ynë që zbaton këtë teknikë përmirëson gjendjen e fundit në metrikat standarde të titullimit ndërkohë që demonstron shtesë një madhësi më të madhe efektive të fjalorit.', 'bs': 'Kontrolabilno snimanje slika je nedavno podpolje u multimodalnom zadatku snimanja slika, na kojem se stavljaju ograničenja na koje regije na sliki treba opisati u izrađenom prirodnom naslovu. To se jače fokusira na proizvodnju detaljnih opisa i otvara vrata za više kontrole konačnog korisnika nad rezultatima. Životna komponenta građevinskog građevinskog građevinskog slika je mehanizam koji odlučuje vrijeme prisustvovanja svakom regionu kroz napredak pokazivača regiona. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu za predviđanje vremena napreda pokazatelja region a, tretirajući napredni korak kao prirodni dio jezičke strukture kroz NEXT-token, motiviranu jakom korelacijom sa strukturom rečenice u podacima obuke. Naše vrijeme se slaže s vremenom na podacima Flickr30k Entiteta sa preciznošću 86,55% i sećanjem 97,92%. Naš model za provedbu ove tehnike poboljšava stanje umjetnosti na standardnoj kapcijaciji metrike, a dodatno pokazuje značajno veću efikasnu veličinu riječnika.', 'fi': 'Kontrolloitava kuvateksti on viimeisin alakenttä multimodaalisessa kuvakuvauksen tehtävässä, jossa asetetaan rajoituksia sille, mitkä kuvan alueet tulisi kuvata luodussa luonnollisessa kuvatekstissä. Tämä lisää keskittymistä yksityiskohtaisempien kuvausten tuottamiseen ja avaa oven loppukäyttäjille, jotka voivat hallita tuloksia paremmin. Kontrollittavien kuvatekstien arkkitehtuurin olennainen osa on mekanismi, joka päättää kullekin alueelle osallistumisen ajoituksen alueosoittimen avulla. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta menetelmää alueosoittimen etenemisen ajoituksen ennustamiseen käsittelemällä etenemisvaihetta luonnollisena osana kielirakennetta NEXT-tunnuksella, jota motivoi vahva korrelaatio lauserakenteen kanssa harjoitusaineistossa. Havaitsemme, että ajoituksemme sopii Flickr30k Entities -testidatan pohjatotuuden ajoitukseen 86,55% tarkkuudella ja 97,92% palautuksella. Tätä tekniikkaa soveltava mallimme parantaa standarditekstitysmetriikkaa ja osoittaa lisäksi huomattavasti suuremman efektiivisen sanaston koon.', 'et': 'Kontrollitav pildipiltreerimine on pildipiltreerimise mitmeliigilise ülesande hiljutine alamväli, kus seatakse piirangud, milliseid pildi piirkondi tuleks kirjeldada loodud looduskeeles. See paneb suurema tähelepanu üksikasjalikumate kirjelduste koostamisele ja avab ukse lõppkasutaja paremaks kontrolliks tulemuste üle. Kontrollitavate piltide pildistamise arhitektuuri oluline komponent on mehhanism, mis otsustab iga piirkonna osalemise ajastuse piirkonna kursori edendamise kaudu. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse meetodi regiooni kursori edenemise ajastuse prognoosimiseks, käsitledes edasimineku kui keelestruktuuri loomulikku osa NEXT-märgi kaudu, motiveeritud tugevast korrelatsioonist lausestruktuuriga treeningandmetes. Leiame, et meie ajastus on kooskõlas Flickr30k Entities testiandmete aluseks oleva tõe ajastusega täpsusega 86,55% ja tagasikutsumisega 97,92%. Meie mudel, mis rakendab seda tehnikat, parandab standardsete pealdiste mõõdikute tipptasemel, demonstreerides samas oluliselt suuremat efektiivset sõnavara suurust.', 'jv': "Caption Mangkane bungkane kabeh luwih nggawe akeh Detayus lan mbukake mulai kapot kanggo nguasai gambaran nguasai gambaran dumadhi. Where's the time Nang pentungé iki, kéné supoyo urip nggawe balén kanggo ngerasai kapan anyar tentang kanggo langkang supaya karo nggawe gerasane nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas sistem anyar sing luwih sabên ning a NeXT-token, ndhek iso nggawe barang nggawe barang langgar sampek dadi nyong. Awak dhéwé ngerti nggawe nggawe barang-barang iki banget kanggo Perintah sing nganggo perkaranan sing gawe barang-barêng nêmên, éwé iso nggawe barang nggawe barang-barêng lan ngawe barang-barêng saiki, nik kuwi alah-barêng saiki, éwé sawetara awa Nambah model sing nggawe teknik iki bakal bantuan kanggo sabanjuré-sabanjuré kuwi cadet kuwi cadet, nik supoyo iso nggambar barang kelas sing apik dhéwé.", 'ha': "Tsarin zane na Controlled is a newly sub-field in the multi-modal job of Image Wannan yana da mafi tsanani fokus wa ka ƙãga zafi-daki, kuma yana buɗe ƙõfõfi wa masu amfani da ƙarami masu haɗi da matsalan. Wata ƙunsa na muhimu na Tsarin Sura na Controllable Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyor nohanna wa ka yi bayani ga timin shirin pointer cikin region da za'a yi amfani da ƙẽtare daraja ta kwance kamar wani rabo na lugha a tsakanin neman NEXT, wanda aka yi ƙunci da shi mai ƙarfi na haɗi da tsarin maganar cikin data na shirin. Muna gane cewa timinmu yana yarda da lokacin da aka gaskata a cikin jarrabar Entities na Flickr30 na da taƙaitar 86.55% da tunan masanin 97.92%. Our model implementing this technique improves the state-of-the-art on standard captioning metrics while additionally demonstrating a considerably larger effective vocabulary size.", 'sk': 'Nadzorovano slikovno napisovanje je nedavno podpolje v večmodalnem opravilu slikovnega napisovanja, pri čemer so postavljene omejitve glede tega, katera regija slike naj bi bila opisana v ustvarjenem napisu naravnega jezika. To bolj osredotoča na izdelavo podrobnejših opisov in odpira vrata za večji nadzor končnih uporabnikov nad rezultati. Bistvena komponenta arhitekture nadzorovanega slikovnega zapisovanja je mehanizem, ki določa čas obiska vsake regije z napredovanjem kazalca regije. V prispevku predlagamo novo metodo za napovedovanje časa napredovanja regionalnega kazalca z obravnavanjem koraka napredovanja kot naravnega dela jezikovne strukture preko NEXT-žetona, ki jo motivira močna korelacija s strukturo stavka v podatkih o treningu. Ugotavljamo, da se naš čas ujema s časovnim časovnim časovnim časovnim časovnim časovnim časovnim časovnim časovnim časom v podatkih testiranja entitet Flickr30k z natančnostjo 86,55% in odpoklicem 97,92%. Naš model, ki izvaja to tehniko, izboljšuje najsodobnejšo metodo standardnega napisa, hkrati pa dokazuje bistveno večjo učinkovito velikost besedišča.', 'bo': 'Controlable Image Captioning is a recent sub-field in the multi modal task of Image Captioning where constraints are placed on which regions in an image should be described in the generated natural language caption. འདིས་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཏུ་དམིགས་གཏད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། A vital component of the Controllable Image Captioning architecture is the mechanism that decides the time of attending to each region through the advancement of a region pointer. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་གཏོད་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་འདི་Flickr30k Entities ནང་གི་རྨང་གཞིའི་དུས་ཚོད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ཡོད། Our model implementing this technique improves the state-of-the-art on standard captioning metrics while additionally demonstrating a considerably larger effective vocabulary size.', 'he': 'תואר תמונות שולט הוא תחת שדה לאחרונה במשימה רבת מודלית של תואר תמונות שבה מגבלות מוקמות באיזה אזורים בתמונה צריכים לתאר בתואר השפה הטבעית המיוצרת. זה מכניס מרכז חזק יותר על יצירת תיאורים מפורטים יותר, ופתח את הדלת לשליטה של משתמשים סופיים יותר על התוצאות. רכיב חיוני של ארכיטקטורת צילום תמונות בשליטה הוא המנגנון שמחליט את הזמן של להשתתף בכל אזור דרך התקדמות של מצביע אזור. In this paper, we propose a novel method for predicting the timing of region pointer advancement by treating the advancement step as a natural part of the language structure via a NEXT-token, motivated by a strong correlation to the sentence structure in the training data.  אנו מוצאים שהתזמון שלנו מסכים עם תזמון האמת באדמה בנתונים מבחן יחידות Flickr30k עם מדויק 86.55% ו זיכרון 97.92%. המודל שלנו שמפעיל את הטכניקה הזאת משפר את מצב המיוחד במטריקה סטנדרטית של כתיבה בזמן שמוכיח באופן נוסף גודל מילים יעיל גדול יותר.'}
{'en': 'An Enhanced Knowledge Injection Model for Commonsense Generation', 'ar': 'نموذج حقن معرفي محسّن لتوليد المشاع', 'pt': 'Um modelo de injeção de conhecimento aprimorado para geração de senso comum', 'es': 'Un modelo de inyección de conocimiento mejorado para la generación de sentido común', 'fr': "Un modèle d'injection de connaissances amélioré pour la génération de bon sens", 'ja': 'コモンセンス生成のための強化されたナレッジインジェクションモデル', 'zh': '向常识生增强型知识注模样', 'ru': 'Расширенная модель впрыска знаний для генерации здравого смысла', 'hi': 'कॉमनसेंस जनरेशन के लिए एक एन्हांस्ड नॉलेज इंजेक्शन मॉडल', 'ga': 'Múnla Instealladh Feabhsaithe Eolais do Ghiniúint Commonsense', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα βελτιωμένο μοντέλο εγχύσεων γνώσης για την παραγωγή κοινής λογικής', 'hu': 'Továbbfejlesztett tudás injekciós modell a Commonsense generáció számára', 'it': 'Un modello avanzato di iniezione di conoscenza per la generazione di commonsense', 'lt': 'Geresnis bendros generacijos žinių injekcijos modelis', 'mk': 'Модел за инјекција на подобрено знаење за обична генерација', 'kk': 'Commonsense жасау үшін білім беру үлгісі', 'ms': 'Model Injeksi Pengetahuan Tertinggi untuk Jenerasi Komuni', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Injezzjoni ta’ Għarfien imtejjeb għall-Ġenerazzjoni Komuni', 'ml': 'കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് ജനിപ്പിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇഞ്ചെക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200dName', 'mn': 'Commonsense Generation-ын нэмэгдсэн мэдлэг хаягдал загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Povećan model injekcije znanja za generaciju Commonsense', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Rozszerzony model wstrzykiwania wiedzy dla generowania surowców', 'ro': 'Un model îmbunătățit de injectare a cunoștințelor pentru generarea Commonsense', 'so': 'Qoraalka ka baaraandegista aqoonta', 'sv': 'En förbättrad kunskapsinjektionsmodell för Commonsense Generation', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'ஒரு மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட அறிவு நுழைவு மாதிரி', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mô hình tiêm cho chế độ tỉnh còn tăng cường', 'bg': 'Подобрен модел за инжектиране на знания за генериране на общ разум', 'da': 'En forbedret vidensinjektionsmodel for Commonsense Generation', 'nl': 'Een verbeterd kennisinjectiemodel voor het genereren van grondstoffen', 'de': 'Ein verbessertes Wissensinjektionsmodell für die Generierung von Rohstoffen', 'fa': 'یک مدل تحریک دانش بیشتری برای نسل کمونس', 'hr': 'Uzvišen model injekcije znanja za generaciju Commonsense', 'ko': '개선된 상식 생성 지식 주입 모형', 'id': 'Model Injeksi Pengetahuan Tertinggi untuk Generasi Komunis', 'sq': 'Një model i zgjeruar i injeksionit të njohurive për Gjenerimin e Përbashkët', 'sw': 'Modela ya Uwekezaji wa Elimu kwa ajili ya Generation of Commons', 'tr': 'Commonsense Jemi üçin Ullanyş Bilgi Taýdalama Modeli', 'az': 'Commonsense Generasyonu üçün Əlavə Etən Bilim Injection Modeli', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Vylepšený model vstřikování znalostí pro generování zdravého smyslu', 'bn': 'কমনসেন্স জেনারেশনের জন্য উন্নত তথ্য ইঞ্জিকেশন মডেল', 'et': 'Täiustatud teadmiste süstimise mudel tavamõistuse loomiseks', 'bs': 'Povećan model injekcije znanja za generaciju Commonsense', 'ca': "Un model d'injecció de coneixement millorat per a la generació comú", 'fi': 'Parannettu tietämyksen injektiomalli Commonsense Generation', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'דוגמא זריקת ידע משותפת לייצור משותף', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Izboljšan model vbrizganja znanja za generacijo splošnega smisla', 'bo': 'རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་དབྱིབས་བསམ་བྱ་རིམ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Commonsense generation aims at generating plausible everyday scenario description based on a set of provided concepts. Digging the relationship of concepts from scratch is non-trivial, therefore, we retrieve prototypes from external knowledge to assist the understanding of the scenario for better description generation. We integrate two additional modules into the pretrained encoder-decoder model for prototype modeling to enhance the knowledge injection procedure. We conduct experiment on CommonGen benchmark, experimental results show that our method significantly improves the performance on all the metrics.', 'ar': 'يهدف إنشاء مفهوم العموم إلى إنشاء وصف معقول للسيناريو اليومي بناءً على مجموعة من المفاهيم المتوفرة. إن حفر علاقة المفاهيم من نقطة الصفر ليس بالأمر السهل ، وبالتالي ، فإننا نسترجع النماذج الأولية من المعرفة الخارجية للمساعدة في فهم السيناريو من أجل توليد وصف أفضل. نقوم بدمج وحدتين إضافيتين في نموذج وحدة فك التشفير المشفر مسبقًا لنمذجة النموذج الأولي لتعزيز إجراء حقن المعرفة. نجري تجربة على معيار CommonGen ، وتظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تحسن الأداء بشكل كبير على جميع المقاييس.', 'pt': 'A geração do senso comum visa gerar uma descrição plausível do cenário cotidiano com base em um conjunto de conceitos fornecidos. Cavar a relação de conceitos do zero não é trivial, portanto, recuperamos protótipos do conhecimento externo para auxiliar o entendimento do cenário para melhor geração de descrição. Integramos dois módulos adicionais no modelo codificador-decodificador pré-treinado para modelagem de protótipo para aprimorar o procedimento de injeção de conhecimento. Conduzimos experimentos no benchmark CommonGen, os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método melhora significativamente o desempenho em todas as métricas.', 'fr': "La génération Commonsense vise à générer une description plausible de scénarios quotidiens basée sur un ensemble de concepts fournis. Il n'est pas facile de creuser la relation entre les concepts à partir de zéro. Par conséquent, nous récupérons des prototypes à partir de connaissances externes pour aider à comprendre le scénario afin de mieux générer des descriptions. Nous intégrons deux modules supplémentaires dans le modèle encodeur-décodeur préentraîné pour la modélisation de prototypes afin d'améliorer la procédure d'injection de connaissances. Nous menons des expériences sur le benchmark CommonGen, les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode améliore considérablement les performances sur toutes les métriques.", 'es': 'La generación de sentido común tiene como objetivo generar una descripción plausible de escenarios cotidianos basada en un conjunto de conceptos proporcionados. Excavar la relación de conceptos desde cero no es trivial, por lo tanto, recuperamos prototipos del conocimiento externo para ayudar a comprender el escenario para una mejor generación de descripciones. Integramos dos módulos adicionales en el modelo de codificador-decodificador previamente entrenado para el modelado de prototipos para mejorar el procedimiento de inyección de conocimiento. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en el punto de referencia de CommonGen, los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método mejora significativamente el rendimiento en todas las métricas.', 'ja': 'コモンセンス生成は、提供された一連の概念に基づいて、妥当な日常シナリオ記述を生成することを目的としている。概念の関係をゼロから掘り起こすことは重要ではないため、より良い記述生成のためのシナリオの理解を支援するために、外部の知識からプロトタイプを取得します。プロトタイプモデリングのために、2つの追加モジュールを事前に訓練されたエンコーダデコーダモデルに統合して、知識注入手順を強化します。私たちはCommonGenベンチマークの実験を行い、実験結果は私たちの方法がすべての指標のパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることを示しています。', 'zh': '常识生成旨在寻常。 始于掘其名而并非易事其义,故检原型于外,以助解之,以成其说。 以二额外模块集成预训练编码器- 解码器,施于原型建模,以强知识注之。 试之CommonGen实验,实验结果表明之指标著。', 'hi': 'Commonsense पीढ़ी का उद्देश्य प्रदान की गई अवधारणाओं के एक सेट के आधार पर प्रशंसनीय रोजमर्रा के परिदृश्य विवरण को उत्पन्न करना है। खरोंच से अवधारणाओं के संबंध को खोदना गैर-तुच्छ है, इसलिए, हम बेहतर विवरण पीढ़ी के लिए परिदृश्य की समझ में सहायता करने के लिए बाहरी ज्ञान से प्रोटोटाइप प्राप्त करते हैं। हम ज्ञान इंजेक्शन प्रक्रिया को बढ़ाने के लिए प्रोटोटाइप मॉडलिंग के लिए प्रीट्रेन्ड एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल में दो अतिरिक्त मॉड्यूल को एकीकृत करते हैं। हम CommonGen बेंचमार्क पर प्रयोग करते हैं, प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि सभी मीट्रिक पर प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार करती है।', 'ru': 'Генерация здравого смысла направлена на генерирование правдоподобного описания повседневного сценария на основе набора предоставленных концепций. Копать связь концепций с нуля нетривиально, поэтому мы извлекаем прототипы из внешних знаний, чтобы помочь в понимании сценария для лучшей генерации описания. Мы интегрируем два дополнительных модуля в предварительно обученную модель кодировщик-декодер для моделирования прототипа для улучшения процедуры впрыска знаний. Мы проводим эксперимент по эталону CommonGen, экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод значительно улучшает производительность по всем метрикам.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag giniúint ciall coitianta cur síos inchreidte ar chásanna laethúla a ghiniúint bunaithe ar shraith de choincheapa a chuirtear ar fáil. Níl sé fánach an caidreamh coincheapa a thochailt ón tús, mar sin, aisghabhaimid fréamhshamhlacha ón eolas seachtrach chun cuidiú le tuiscint an cháis chun cur síos níos fearr a dhéanamh. Comhtháthaimid dhá mhodúl breise isteach sa tsamhail ionchódóra-díchódóra réamhoilte le haghaidh samhaltú fréamhshamhail chun an nós imeachta um instealladh eolais a fheabhsú. Déanaimid turgnamh ar thagarmharc CommonGen, léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go gcuireann ár modh feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht na méadrachta go léir.', 'ka': 'საზოგადოებო წარმოდგენების მიზეზია, რომ ყოველდღეობის სინარიო გამოსახულება, რომელიც განახულებული კონფექტების ნაწილად იქნება. კონცეტების დაკავშირების შესახებ არ არის ტრივიალური, რადგან ჩვენ პროტოტიპები გარეშე ცნობიდან მივიღებთ, რომ უფრო უკეთესი შესახებ სენარიოს შესახებ. ჩვენ ორი დამატებული მოდულის ინტერგურაცია პროტოტიპის მოდელისთვის პროტექტიპის მოდელისთვის, რომელიც ინტერგურაციის პროცექტის შესაძლებელად გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტი CommonGen ბენქმარკზე გავაკეთებთ, ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტრიკის გამ', 'el': 'Η παραγωγή κοινής λογικής στοχεύει στη δημιουργία εύλογης καθημερινής περιγραφής σεναρίων βασισμένης σε ένα σύνολο παρεχόμενων εννοιών. Το να σκάψουμε τη σχέση των εννοιών από το μηδέν είναι ασήμαντο, ως εκ τούτου, ανακτούμε πρωτότυπα από εξωτερική γνώση για να βοηθήσουμε στην κατανόηση του σεναρίου για καλύτερη παραγωγή περιγραφών. Ενσωματώνουμε δύο πρόσθετες ενότητες στο προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για τη μοντελοποίηση πρωτοτύπων για την ενίσχυση της διαδικασίας εγχύσεων γνώσης. Διεξάγουμε πείραμα σε σημείο αναφοράς, πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση σε όλες τις μετρήσεις.', 'lt': 'Bendros kartos tikslas – sukurti patikimą kasdienį scenarijaus aprašymą, pagrįstą pateiktomis koncepcijomis. Iš pradžių išieškoti sąvokų santykius nėra trivial, todėl mes gauname prototipus iš išorinių žinių, kad padėtume suprasti geresnio aprašymo generacijos scenarijų. We integrate two additional modules into the pretrained encoder-decoder model for prototype modeling to enhance the knowledge injection procedure.  Eksperimentuojame su CommonGen lyginamuoju rodikliu, eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gerokai pagerina visų metrinių rodiklių veiksmingumą.', 'it': 'Generazione Commonsense mira a generare una descrizione plausibile dello scenario quotidiano basata su una serie di concetti forniti. Scavare la relazione dei concetti da zero non è banale, quindi, recuperiamo prototipi da conoscenze esterne per aiutare la comprensione dello scenario per una migliore generazione di descrizioni. Integriamo due moduli aggiuntivi nel modello codificatore-decoder pre-addestrato per la modellazione di prototipi per migliorare la procedura di iniezione della conoscenza. Conduciamo esperimenti sul benchmark CommonGen, i risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo migliora significativamente le prestazioni su tutte le metriche.', 'hu': 'A Commonsense generáció célja, hogy valószínűsíthető mindennapi forgatókönyv leírását generálja a megadott koncepciók során. A koncepciók kapcsolatának a semmiből történő ásása nem triviális, ezért külső tudásból szerezzük be a prototípusokat, hogy segítsük a forgatókönyv megértését a jobb leírás generálása érdekében. Két további modult integrálunk az előkészített útmérő-dekóder modellbe prototípus modellezéséhez a tudás injekciós eljárás javítása érdekében. CommonGen referenciaértéken végzünk kísérleteket, a kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jelentősen javítja a teljesítményt az összes mutatónál.', 'kk': 'Компаниялық құрылғы күнделік сценарий сипаттамасын келтірілген концепциялардың бағдарламасына негізделген. Жүгіртілген концепциялардың қатынасын түсіру үшін біз сыртқы білімдерден прототиптерді түсіруге көмектесеміз. Біз білім инжекциялау процедурын көтеру үшін қосымша екі модульді прототипті моделдеу үшін претензияланған кодер декодер үлгісіне ендіреміз. Біз CommonGen бағдарламасында тәжірибе істейміз, тәжірибелі нәтижелеріміздің метрикалық тәжірибесін өзгерту әдісін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Generasi umum bertujuan untuk menghasilkan deskripsi skenario sehari-hari yang mungkin berdasarkan set konsep yang diberikan. Menggali hubungan konsep dari awal bukanlah trivial, oleh itu, kami mengambil prototip dari pengetahuan luar untuk membantu pemahaman skenario untuk generasi penerangan yang lebih baik. Kami mengintegrasikan dua modul tambahan ke dalam model pengekod-pengekod yang dilatih sebelum dilatih untuk pengemudian prototip untuk meningkatkan prosedur suntikan pengetahuan. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada tanda referensi CommonGen, hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami meningkatkan prestasi pada semua metrik.', 'mk': 'Заедничката генерација има за цел да генерира веројатен секојдневен опис на сценариото врз основа на множина обезбедени концепти. Копањето на односот на концептите од почеток не е тривијално, затоа, ние земаме прототипи од надворешното знаење за да помогнеме во разбирањето на сценариото за подобра генерација на опис. Ние интегрираме два дополнителни модули во предобучениот модел на кодер-декодер за прототип моделирање за подобрување на процедурата на инјекција на знаење. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на комонген benchmark, експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод значително ја подобрува перформансата на сите метрики.', 'ml': 'കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് തലമുറയാണ് എല്ലാ ദിവസവും വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത്. ഒരു കൂട്ടം ആശയങ് സ്ക്രാച്ചില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ആശയങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധത്തെ കുഴിച്ചുവെക്കുന്നത് വിശ്വാസമില്ലാത്തതാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട്, പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്ര നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു കൂടുതല്\u200d മോഡ്യൂളുകളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ഇഞ്ചെക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രക്രോട്ടിമോഡലിന് മാതൃകയിലേക We conduct experiment on CommonGen benchmark, experimental results show that our method significantly improves the performance on all the metrics.', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni komuni għandha l-għan li tiġġenera deskrizzjoni plawżibbli tax-xenarju ta’ kuljum ibbażat a fuq sett ta’ kunċetti pprovduti. Digging the relationship of concepts from scratch is non-trivial, therefore, we retrieve prototypes from external knowledge to assist the understanding of the scenario for better description generation.  Aħna nintegraw żewġ moduli addizzjonali fil-mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder imħarreġ minn qabel għall-mudell tal-prototipi biex ittejjeb il-proċedura ta’ injezzjoni tal-għarfien. Aħna nieħdu esperiment fuq il-punt ta’ riferiment tal-CommonGen, ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni fuq il-metriċi kollha.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн үеийнх нь өдөр тутмын хувилбарын тодорхойлолт гаргах зорилго юм. Ойролцогчдын харилцааны холбоотой холбоотой гэдэг нь бага зэрэг биш. Тиймээс бид гадаад мэдлээс прототипүүдийг илүү сайн тодорхойлолтын төлөө ойлгохын тулд авч ирнэ. Бид хоёр нэмэлт модуль прототип модель дээр шилжүүлэх боломжтой холбоотой кодлогч загвар руу шилжүүлнэ. Бид CommonGen багц дээр туршилт хийж, туршилтын үр дүнд бидний метрийн үйл ажиллагааг маш чухал сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Generasjonen av kommunikasjon måtar å laga tilgjengeleg kvardag scenarioskildring basert på eit sett av oppgjevne konseptar. Dette er ikkje trivial å grave forholdet til konseptane frå rulla, derfor hentar vi prototypar frå eksterne kunnskap for å hjelpa forståelse av scenarioen for bedre beskrivelse. Vi integrerer to tilleggsmodular i den pretrende koderingsmodellen for prototype-modellen for å forbetra kunnskapsprosedyren. Vi gjer eksperimentet på CommonGen-benchmarket, og eksperimentelt resultat viser at metoden vår betydelig forbedrar utviklinga på alle metrikane.', 'ro': 'Generarea Commonsense își propune să genereze o descriere plauzibilă a scenariului zilnic bazată pe un set de concepte furnizate. Săparea relației conceptelor de la zero este non-trivială, prin urmare, preluăm prototipuri din cunoștințele externe pentru a ajuta înțelegerea scenariului pentru o mai bună generare de descrieri. Integrăm două module suplimentare în modelul codificator-decodor pre-instruit pentru modelarea prototipului pentru a îmbunătăți procedura de injectare a cunoștințelor. Realizăm experimente pe benchmark CommonGen, rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră îmbunătățește semnificativ performanța pe toate măsurătorile.', 'pl': 'Generowanie powszechnego sensu ma na celu generowanie wiarygodnego opisu codziennego scenariusza w oparciu o zestaw dostarczonych koncepcji. Kopanie relacji pojęć od zera jest nietrywialne, dlatego pobieramy prototypy z zewnętrznej wiedzy, aby pomóc zrozumieć scenariusz dla lepszego generowania opisu. Integrujemy dwa dodatkowe moduły do wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu kodera-dekodera do modelowania prototypowego w celu zwiększenia procedury wtrysku wiedzy. Prowadzimy eksperyment na benchmarku CommonGen, wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda znacznie poprawia wydajność wszystkich wskaźników.', 'sr': 'Generacija komunikacija cilja je da stvara uvjerljiv svakodnevni opis scenarija na osnovu set a obezbeđenih koncepta. Potkopanje odnosa koncepta iz ogrebotine nije trivialno, stoga, povlačimo prototipe iz vanjskih znanja da pomognemo razumijevanju scenarija za bolju generaciju opisa. Integrujemo dva dodatna modula u model kodera za modeling prototipa koji bi poboljšali proceduru injekcije znanja. Mi vodimo eksperiment na referenciji CommonGen-a, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda značajno poboljšava izvedbu svih metrika.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය සලකුණු විශ්වාස කරන්න හැමදාම සිනාරියෝ විස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න. ස්ක්\u200dරෑච් වලින් සංවේදනයේ සම්බන්ධයක් ගන්නේ නොට්\u200dරිවියල්, ඉතින්, අපි ප්\u200dරෝටෝප්\u200dරෝටෝප්ටයිප්ස් පිටපත් පිටපත් ගන අපි තවත් මොඩියුල් දෙකක් එක්කරනවා ප්\u200dරොටෝප් මොඩියුල් එක්කරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරොටෝප් මොඩියුල් එක්කරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික අපි කම්පන්ජෙන් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ විදි', 'so': 'Muujinta heshiiska waxaa loogu talagalay in la sameeyo sawir maalin walba oo la macaamiloodo oo ku saleysan fikrada la siiyo. Digging the relationship of concepts from scratch is non-trivial, therefore, we retrieve prototypes from external knowledge to assist the understanding of the scenario for better description generation.  Laba qalab oo kale waxaan ku koobnaynaa qaababka codcodsiga, tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan, si aan u kordhinno qalabka aqoonta injiilka. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaanka ku saabsan bangiga CommonGen, arimaha imtixaanka ayaa muujinaya in qaababkayaga uu si weyn u hagaajiyo bandhigga oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Commonsense generation syftar till att generera rimlig vardagsscenariobeskrivning baserad på en uppsättning av givna koncept. Att gräva relationen mellan koncept från grunden är inte trivialt, därför hämtar vi prototyper från extern kunskap för att underlätta förståelsen av scenariot för bättre beskrivningsgenerering. Vi integrerar ytterligare två moduler i den förklädda encoder-dekoder modellen för prototypmodellering för att förbättra kunskapsinjektionsprocessen. Vi genomför experiment på CommonGen benchmark, experimentella resultat visar att vår metod avsevärt förbättrar prestandan på alla mätvärden.', 'ta': 'ஒரு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கருத்துக்களை அடிப்படையில் சார்ந்து கொள்ளும் ஒவ்வொரு நாளும் காட்சியின் விவரம் உருவாக சுழற்சி இருந்து கருத்துக்களின் தொடர்பை துண்டிக்கும் என்பது சிறந்த விவரிப்பு தலைமுறையில் இருந்து நாம் வெளியேறு அறிவிலிருந்து முன் நாம் இரண்டு கூறுகளை சேர்க்க வேண்டும் அறிவு நுழைவு செயல்பாட்டை முனைமாதிரி முறைமையில் சேர்க்க முடியும். நாங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம் அனைத்து மெட்ரிக்குகளின் செயல்பாட்டை முன்னேற்றுகிறது என்று காட்', 'ur': 'کمنسیس نسل کا ارادہ کرتا ہے کہ روزہ سیناریو کا سٹم پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے۔ اسرار سے معلومات کا رابطہ کھولنا غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر معلومات ہے، لہٰذا ہم باہر علم سے پروٹوٹیپ اٹھاتے ہیں کہ اس سیناریو کے سمجھنے کی مدد کریں بہترین توصیح نسل کے لئے۔ ہم دو اضافہ موڈلوں کو پروٹوٹائیپ موڈلینگ کے لئے پیش رین ڈیر ڈیکوڈر موڈل میں ترکیب کرتے ہیں کہ علم انجینٹ پردازش کو بڑھائے۔ ہم کمونجن بنچممارک پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں، آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ تمام متریک پر عملکرد اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Komponentsiya yaratish davomida bir ko'plab berilgan conceptlarga yaratilgan har kuni aniqlashni yaratish mumkin. Ko'rinishdan tashkilotni ajratish muvaffaqiyatli emas, shunday qilib, biz tashqi taʼrif taʼminotlaridan foydalanish uchun tashqi taʼminotlarni tushunishga yordam beramiz. Biz ikkita qoʻshimcha modullarni ajratish imkoniyatini qoʻshish jarayonini oshirish uchun prototypning modeliga birlashtiramiz. Biz CommonGen benchmark tajribasini bajaramiz, tajribalar natijalarimiz hamma metriklarda bajarishni juda muhim yaxshi ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Sinh sản tỉnh phổ thông nhằm tạo ra mô tả mô tả mô tả mô tả mô hình cuộc đời dựa trên một loạt các khái niệm được cung cấp. Đào từ đầu mối quan hệ của các khái niệm không phải là vô giá trị, vì vậy, chúng tôi lấy các nguyên mẫu từ kiến thức bên ngoài để giúp đỡ hiểu biết về kịch bản tạo mô tả tốt hơn. Chúng tôi nhập thêm hai mô-đun bổ sung vào mô hình mã hóa hóa hóa hóa hóa được precấp cho mẫu thử để nâng quy trình tiêm kiến thức. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên tiêu chuẩn thường chung, kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi cải thiện hiệu suất trên tất cả các âm lượng.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на общ разум има за цел да генерира правдоподобно описание на ежедневния сценарий въз основа на набор от предоставени концепции. Изкопаването на връзката на концепциите от нулата е нетривиално, затова извличаме прототипи от външни знания, за да подпомогнем разбирането на сценария за по-добро генериране на описание. Интегрираме два допълнителни модула в предварително тренирания кодер-декодер модел за прототипно моделиране, за да подобрим процедурата за инжектиране на знания. Провеждаме експеримент на бенчмарк, експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни значително подобрява производителността на всички показатели.', 'nl': 'Generatie van commonsense streeft naar het genereren van een plausibele alledaagse scenario beschrijving op basis van een reeks aangeboden concepten. De relatie tussen concepten vanaf nul graven is niet-triviaal, daarom halen we prototypes uit externe kennis op om het begrip van het scenario te helpen voor een betere beschrijving generatie. We integreren twee extra modules in het vooraf getrainde encoder-decoder model voor prototype modellering om de kennisinjectieprocedure te verbeteren. We voeren experiment uit op CommonGen benchmark, experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode de prestaties op alle metrics aanzienlijk verbetert.', 'da': 'Commonsense generation sigter mod at generere plausible hverdagsscenariebeskrivelser baseret på et sæt af leverede koncepter. At grave forholdet mellem koncepter fra bunden er ikke-trivielt, derfor henter vi prototyper fra ekstern viden for at hjælpe forståelsen af scenariet for bedre beskrivelse generering. Vi integrerer to yderligere moduler i den forudtrænede encoder-dekoder model til prototypemodellering for at forbedre vidensinjektionsproceduren. Vi udfører eksperimenter på CommonGen benchmark, eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode forbedrer ydeevnen betydeligt på alle målene.', 'de': 'Die Generierung von Commonsense zielt darauf ab, eine plausible Alltagsszenarienbeschreibung basierend auf einer Reihe von bereitgestellten Konzepten zu generieren. Die Beziehung von Konzepten von Grund auf neu auszugraben ist nicht trivial, daher holen wir Prototypen aus externem Wissen, um das Verständnis des Szenarios für eine bessere Beschreibungserstellung zu unterstützen. Wir integrieren zwei zusätzliche Module in das vortrainierte Encoder-Decoder-Modell zur Prototypenmodellierung, um das Knowledge Injection Verfahren zu verbessern. Wir führen Experimente mit CommonGen Benchmark durch, experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode die Leistung aller Metriken signifikant verbessert.', 'hr': 'Generacija zajednica cilja stvaranja uvjerljivog svakodnevnog opisa scenarija na temelju niza predviđenih koncepta. Potkopanje odnosa koncepta iz ogrebotine nije trivialno, stoga, izvlačimo prototipe iz vanjskih znanja kako bi pomogli razumijevanju scenarija za bolju generaciju opisa. Mi integriramo dva dodatna modula u model kodera za modeliranje prototipa koji bi poboljšali proceduru injekcije znanja. Mi provodimo eksperiment na referenciji CommonGen-a, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda značajno poboljšava učinku na svim metrikama.', 'fa': 'نسل کمونس هدف می\u200cگیرد که توصیف سناریو روزی قابل توجه بر اساس مجموعه\u200cای از نظریه\u200cهای پیشنهاد باشد. کشیدن رابطه\u200cهای مفهوم\u200cهایی از خاکستری غیر قابل توجه است، بنابراین، ما پروتتایپ\u200cهای خارجی را از دانش خارجی می\u200cگیریم تا به درک سناریو برای نسل توصیف بهتر کمک کنیم. ما دو مدول اضافه را در مدل رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی پیش\u200cفرض برای مدل\u200cسازی نمونه\u200cهای پیش\u200cفرض برای افزایش روش تزریق علمی تزریق می\u200cکنیم. ما آزمایش روی صندوق کمونجین را انجام می دهیم، نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که روش ما عملکرد روی تمام متریک را به طور معنی بهتر می کند.', 'id': 'Generasi umum bermaksud untuk menghasilkan deskripsi skenario sehari-hari yang plausible berdasarkan set konsep yang diberikan. Menggali hubungan konsep dari nol bukan trivial, jadi, kami mengambil prototip dari pengetahuan luar untuk membantu pemahaman skenario untuk generasi deskripsi yang lebih baik. Kami mengintegrasikan dua modul tambahan ke model koder-dekoder yang dilatih sebelumnya untuk model prototip untuk meningkatkan prosedur injeksi pengetahuan. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada benchmark CommonGen, hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kami meningkatkan prestasi pada semua metrik.', 'ko': '상식 생성은 한 그룹이 제공하는 개념을 바탕으로 합리적인 일상 장면 묘사를 생성하는 데 목적을 둔다.개념 간의 관계를 처음부터 발굴하는 것은 쉬운 일이 아니기 때문에 우리는 외부 지식에서 원형을 검색하여 장면을 이해하고 묘사를 더욱 잘 생성하도록 돕는다.우리는 다른 두 모듈을 예비 훈련 인코더 - 디코더 모델에 집적하여 원형 모델링을 하여 지식 주입 과정을 강화할 것이다.CommonGen benchmark 에서 실험한 결과, 우리의 방법은 모든 지표의 성능을 현저하게 향상시켰다.', 'sw': 'Kizazi cha Mawasiliano kinalenga kutengeneza maelezo ya kila siku yenye msingi wa dhana zilizotolewa. Kutengeneza mahusiano ya dhana kutoka kwenye kipindi hiki si vizuri, kwa hiyo, tunapata mifano kutoka kwa ufahamu wa nje ili kusaidia kuelewa hali ya mambo kwa kizazi bora cha maelezo. Tunaunganisha vifaa viwili vya ziada katika mtindo wa kodi unaotarajiwa kwa mifano ya kuongeza mchakato wa ujenzi wa maarifa. Tunafanya majaribio kwenye bendera ya CommonGen, matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu inaboresha ufanisi wa mitindo yote.', 'sq': 'Gjenerata e zakonshme synon të krijojë përshkrim të besueshëm të skenarit të përditshëm bazuar në një sërë konceptesh të ofruara. Duke gërmuar lidhjen e koncepteve nga zero është jo-trivial, prandaj, ne marrim prototipe nga njohuria e jashtme për të ndihmuar kuptimin e skenarit për një gjeneratë më të mirë përshkrimi. Ne integrojmë dy module shtesë në modelin e koduesit-dekoderit të parastërvitur për modelimin e prototipit për të përmirësuar procedurën e injeksionit të njohurive. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në pikën referenciale të CommonGen, rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë përmirëson ndjeshëm performancën në të gjitha metrikat.', 'hy': 'Հիմնական սերունդը նպատակն է ստեղծել հավատալի օրական սցենարի նկարագրություն, հիմնված տրամադրված գաղափարների մի շարք վրա: Գաղափարների կապը զրոյից փորելը ոչ փոքրիկ է, ուստի մենք վերցնում ենք արտաքին գիտելիքներից նախատիպեր, որպեսզի օգնենք ավելի լավ նկարագրման սերունդի սցենարին հասկանալ: Մենք ինտեգրում ենք երկու ավելացնող մոդուլներ նախապատրաստված կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելի նախատիպ մոդելավորման համար, որպեսզի բարելավենք գիտելիքների ներարկման գործընթացը: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկումներ Common-General հարաբերականի վրա, փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը նշանակալի բարելավում է բոլոր չափումների արտադրողությունը:', 'az': 'Kommunikas nəsili günlük scenario tərzini təşkil etmək məqsədilə təşkil edilən fikirlərə dayanılmaq istəyir. Çərtmədən nəfslərin əlaqəsini qazanmaq çox kiçik deyildir, buna görə də, daha yaxşı nəsil üçün scenarionun anlamasına kömək etmək üçün dış bilgisindən prototiplər alırıq. Biz prototipi modellərinin önləşdirilmiş kodlayıcı modellərə iki çox modulu birləşdiririk ki, bilgi injeksiyonu artırsın. Biz CommonGen benchmark təcrübəsini təşviq edirik, təcrübə sonuçlarımız metodumuzun bütün metriklərin performansını çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'am': 'የውይይት ትውልድ የዕለት ዕለት ዕለቱ የሚታወቀውን ትርጓሜ በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ የነጥቦችን ግንኙነት ከመቀላቀል መቆጣጠር የተፈቀደ አይደለም፤ ስለዚህ የመስኮቱን ማስተዋል ለመሻል ትርጓሜ ትውልድ ለመረዳት ውጭ እውቀትን እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ሁለትን ጨዋታ አካባቢዎች እውቀትን የመስመር ፕሮግራም ምሳሌ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የኮምኖን የውይይት መድረክ ላይ ፈተናን እናደርጋለን፤ የሞከሩ ውጤቶች የሥርዓታችንን ሙከራ ሁሉ በሙሉ ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'bs': 'Generacija zajednice cilja je da stvori uvjerljiv opis svakodnevnog scenarija na temelju set a određenih koncepta. Prokopanje odnosa koncepta iz ogrebotine nije trivialno, stoga, izvlačimo prototipe iz vanjskih znanja kako bi pomogli razumijevanju scenarija za bolju generaciju opisa. Integrujemo dva dodatna modula u model kodiranog dekodera za modeling prototipa kako bi poboljšali proceduru injekcije znanja. Mi vodimo eksperiment na referenciji CommonGen-a, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda značajno poboljšava izvođenje svih metrika.', 'af': "Saamsinse generasie doel om veroorsaaklik elke dag-scenario beskrywing te genereer, gebaseer op 'n stel van verskaf konsepte. Om die verhouding van konsepte van skrap te grawe is nie-trivial, dan kry ons prototipes van eksterne kennis om die verstanding van die scenario te help vir beter beskrywing generasie. Ons integreer twee addisionele modules in die pretreënde enkoder-dekoder model vir prototipe modeling om die kennis-injeksie prosedure te verbeter. Ons doen eksperiment op CommonGen-benchmark, eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons metode betekenlik die prestasie op alle metries verbeter.", 'tr': 'Kommunikasy döwletleri gündelik senaryo waspyny temel edip biljek düşünjäniň bir toparyna daýanýar. Ýagtyzdan düşünjäniň ilişkisini açmak üçin wajyp däldir, şol sebäpli, daşarydaky bilimden prototipler alıp senaryony gowy tasvir jenedişi üçin kömek etmek üçin elimizden alıyoruz. Bir prototipi modelleme için iki ekleme modülü önlenmiş kodlayıcı modellere birleştiriyoruz. CommonGen aralygynda synap çykýarys, deneysel netijelerimiz hemme metriýada etkinlik ukyplarymyzy örän gowuraşdyrýandygyny görkez.', 'ca': "La generació comú té l'objectiu de generar una descripció plausible del dia a dia basada en un conjunt de conceptes proporcionats. Cavar la relació de conceptes des de zero no és trivial, per tant, obtenim prototips del coneixement extern per ajudar a entendre l'escenari per a una millor generació de descripció. Integrem dos móduls adicionals al model de codificador-decodificador pre-treinat per modelar prototips per millorar el procediment d'injecció de coneixement. Fem experiments amb el punt de referència del CommonGen, els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode millora significativament el rendiment de totes les mètriques.", 'bn': 'কমন্সেন্স প্রজন্মের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে প্রতিদিনের বিভিন্ন ধারণার উপর ভিত্তিতে প্রতিদিনের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিব Digging the relationship of concepts from scratch is non-trivial, therefore, we retrieve prototypes from external knowledge to assist the understanding of the scenario for better description generation.  জ্ঞান ইঞ্জেকশন প্রক্রিয়া বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য প্রোটোটাইপের মডেলের মাধ্যমে আমরা আরো দুটি মডিউল যুক্ত করি। আমরা কমোনজেন বেনম্যার্কে পরীক্ষা করি, পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সকল মেট্রিকের প্রদর্শনের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নত', 'et': 'Üldmõistliku tootmise eesmärk on luua tõenäoline igapäevase stsenaariumi kirjeldus, mis põhineb esitatud kontseptsioonidel. Kontseptsioonide seose kaevamine nullist ei ole triviaalne, seetõttu saame välisteadmistest prototüüpe, et aidata mõista stsenaariumi paremaks kirjelduse genereerimiseks. Integreerime kaks täiendavat moodulit eeltreenitud kodeeri-dekooderi mudelisse prototüübi modelleerimiseks, et täiustada teadmiste süstimise protseduuri. Me teeme eksperimente CommonGen võrdlusalusel, eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod parandab oluliselt kõigi mõõdikute jõudlust.', 'cs': 'Generace Commonsense si klade za cíl vytvořit věrohodný denní popis scénáře založený na sadě poskytnutých konceptů. Kopání vztahu konceptů od začátku není triviální, proto získáváme prototypy z externích znalostí, abychom pomohli pochopit scénář pro lepší generování popisů. Do předtrénovaného modelu kodéru-dekodéru integrujeme dva další moduly pro modelování prototypů pro zlepšení postupu vstřikování znalostí. Provádíme experiment na CommonGen benchmarku, experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda výrazně zlepšuje výkon všech metrik.', 'fi': 'Commonsense generation pyrkii luomaan uskottavan jokapäiväisen skenaarion kuvauksen, joka perustuu esitettyihin käsitteisiin. Käsitteiden suhteen kaivaminen tyhjästä ei ole triviaalia, joten haemme prototyyppejä ulkoisesta tiedosta auttaaksemme ymmärtämään skenaariota paremman kuvauksen tuottamiseksi. Integroimme kaksi lisämoduulia esikoulutettuun kooderi-dekooderimalliin prototyyppimallinnukseen tiedon injektointiprosessin parantamiseksi. Teemme kokeiluja CommonGen benchmarkilla, kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme parantaa merkittävästi suorituskykyä kaikissa mittareissa.', 'jv': 'Generasi Komunasi bukane dadi nggawe perusahaan sembaran seneng pisan kang dipunasaben nggunakake bataran winih. Digowula perusahaan kelompok nggawe barang nggambar luwih apik nek ora tribonan, dadi, kéné nyimpen prototipi layang kelompok nggawe akeh luwih apik dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan winih kanggo ngerasai winih sing luwih apik dhéwé. Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing dibutuhke modul sing dumaten ning koder Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk kanggo nggawe bendhèf kanggo komputer, dadi winih dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas maneh kanggo nggawe barang maning.', 'ha': "Umarnin Commons' s aim is to manufacture description of each day plausible based on some set of notions that are defined. Kurari danganta na zato daga kifi bai zama mai amfani ba, sabõda haka, za mu samo misãlai daga ilmi na bakwai dõmin mu taimake fahimta masu fahimta na fasarin wa kizafi mai kyau. Tuna haɗa moduli biyu guda zuwa misãlin kode-koda wa misãlai na yi wa ƙari ga aikin da sani. Munã samun jarrabo a kan Commongen bangment, matsalan jarrabai ke nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana ƙari ga mafarin duk metric.", 'he': "הדור המפורסם מכוון לייצור תיאור נאמן בתרחיש יומי מבוסס על קבוצה של מושגים מסופקים. Digging the relationship of concepts from scratch is non-trivial, therefore, we retrieve prototypes from external knowledge to assist the understanding of the scenario for better description generation.  אנחנו משתלבים שני מודולים נוספים לדוגמא הקודר-מפענח המאמן מראש לדוגמא של אבטיפוס כדי לשפר את תהליך הזריקה של ידע. אנו מבצעים ניסוי על נקודת השיחה של קומונג'ן, תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהשיטה שלנו משפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה בכל המטריקות.", 'sk': 'Cilj generacije splošnega smisla je ustvariti verjeten opis vsakdanjega scenarija, ki temelji na nizu predstavljenih konceptov. Kopanje odnosa konceptov iz nič ni trivialno, zato iz zunanjega znanja pridobimo prototipe, ki pomagajo razumeti scenarij za boljšo generiranje opisov. V predtrenirani model kodirnika-dekoderja vključimo dva dodatna modula za prototipno modeliranje, da bi izboljšali postopek injiciranja znanja. Izvajamo eksperimente na CommonGen referenčnem merilu, eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda bistveno izboljšuje učinkovitost vseh meritev.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མི་རབས་ཆེན་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཉིན་རིང་གི་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་པའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱས་ཡོ Digging the relationship of concepts from scratch is non-trivial, therefore, we retrieve prototypes from external knowledge to assist the understanding of the scenario for better description generation. ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣེ་མཐོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཀལ་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་CommonGen(benchmark)ནང་གི་experiment་ཕྱོགས་སྟོན་པ་གལ་ཅན་གྱི་གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གནད་ཅིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་གཞན་གྱི་ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེ'}
{'en': 'How Positive Are You : Text Style Transfer using Adaptive Style Embedding', 'ar': 'إلى أي مدى أنت إيجابي: نقل نمط النص باستخدام دمج النمط التكيفي', 'pt': 'Quão positivo você é: transferência de estilo de texto usando incorporação de estilo adaptável', 'fr': "Êtes-vous positif\xa0: transfert de style de texte à l'aide de l'intégration adaptative de style", 'es': '¿Qué tan positivo eres? Transferencia de estilos de texto mediante la incrustación de estilos adaptativos', 'ja': 'どのようにポジティブであるか:適応スタイルの埋め込みを使用したテキストスタイルの転送', 'zh': '君多积极:用自应式嵌文本式传输', 'hi': 'आप कितने सकारात्मक हैं: अनुकूली शैली एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके पाठ शैली स्थानांतरण', 'ru': 'Насколько вы положительны: перенос стиля текста с помощью встраивания адаптивного стиля', 'ga': 'Cé chomh Dearfach atá Tú: Aistriú Stíl Téacs ag Úsáid Leabú Stíl Oiriúnaitheach', 'ka': 'როგორ პოციტიგური ხართ: ტექსტის სტილის გადატანაცია', 'hu': 'Mennyire pozitív vagy: Szövegstílus átvitele adaptív stílus beágyazással', 'it': "Quanto sei positivo: Trasferimento di stile di testo utilizzando l'incorporazione di stile adattivo", 'lt': 'Kaip teigiamas jūs: teksto stiliaus perkėlimas naudojant pritaikytą stilių įterpimą', 'el': 'Πόσο θετικός είστε: Μεταφορά στυλ κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας την προσαρμοστική ενσωμάτωση στυλ', 'kk': 'Мәтін стилін адаптификалық стильді ендіру арқылы', 'mt': 'How Positive Are You: Text Style Transfer using Adaptive Style Embedding', 'mk': 'Колку сте позитивни: Пренесување на текст стил користејќи адаптивно вградување на стил', 'mn': 'Та хэрхэн эерэг байх вэ? Текст хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлт', 'ms': 'Betapa Positif Anda: Pemindahan Gaya Teks menggunakan Penjelmaan Gaya Adaptif', 'pl': 'Jak pozytywny jesteś: Transfer stylu tekstu przy użyciu adaptywnego osadzania stylu', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ്: എഡാപ്റ്റീവ് ശൈലി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പദാവലി ശൈലി മാറ്റുന്നത്', 'sr': 'Како сте позитивни: пренос текста стила користе адаптивно вклеђање стила', 'ro': 'Cât de pozitiv ești: Transfer de stil text folosind încorporarea stilului adaptiv', 'so': 'Adaptive Style Embedding', 'no': 'Korleis du er positiv: Overføring av tekststil med tilpassande innbygging av stil', 'ur': 'آپ کس طرح مثبت ہیں: Text Style Transfer using Adaptive Style Embedding', 'si': 'ඔබ කොච්චර සාධාරණාත්මක විදියට කියලා: පාළික විදියට ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Hur positiv är du: Överföring av textformatmallar med anpassningsbar stilinbäddning', 'ta': 'நீங்கள் எவ்வாறு நிலைமையாக இருக்கிறீர்கள்: உரை பாணி மாற்றி Adaptive Style Embedding', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Cách chuyển đổi phong cách văn bản dùng nhúng kiểu thích nghi', 'bg': 'Колко позитивни сте: Прехвърляне на текстов стил чрез вграждане на адаптивен стил', 'nl': 'Hoe positief bent u: Tekststijloverdracht met behulp van Adaptive Style Embedding', 'da': 'Hvor positiv er du: Overførsel af tekststil ved hjælp af Adaptive Style Embedding', 'hr': 'Kako ste pozitivni: prebacivanje teksta stila koristeći adaptivno uključenje stila', 'id': 'Seberapa Positif Anda: Transfer Gaya Teks menggunakan Pencampuran Gaya Adaptif', 'ko': '얼마나 적극적인가: 사용자 적응 스타일로 삽입된 텍스트 스타일 변환을 사용합니다', 'de': 'Wie positiv sind Sie: Text Style Transfer mit adaptiver Style Embedding', 'fa': 'چقدر مثبت هستید: انتقال استیل متن با استفاده از انجمن استیل اضافه', 'sw': 'Ni namna Nzuri Nyinyi: Transfer Text Style using Adaptive Style Embedding', 'sq': 'Sa pozitive jeni: Transferimi i stilit të tekstit duke përdorur integrimin e stilit adaptiv', 'tr': 'Sen nähili Pozit Bolýarsyň: Metin Biçimi Taýiksyz Biçimi Aňlap', 'af': 'Hoe Positive Is U: Teks Styl Oordrag gebruik aanpasbare Styl Inbetering', 'am': 'Text Style Transfer using Adaptive Style Embedding', 'az': 'Nec톛 Pozitiv S톛ns톛n: M톛tn St칲y칲n칲 Adpatif St칲y칲n칲 캻칞eri', 'hy': 'Ինչքանով եք դուք դրական: Տեքստի ոճի փոխանցումը հարմարավետ ոճի ներգրավման միջոցով', 'bn': 'আপনি কিভাবে অবস্থান করছেন: Adaptiv Style ব্যবহার করে টেক্সট স্টাইল পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Kako ste pozitivni: prebacivanje teksta stila koristeći adaptivnu integraciju stila', 'et': 'Kui positiivne sa oled: tekstistiili ülekanne kohanduva stiili manustamise abil', 'cs': 'Jak pozitivní jste: Přenos textových stylů pomocí adaptivního vkládání stylů', 'ca': "Com de positiu ets: Transfer d'estil de text utilitzant l'integració d'estil adaptatiu", 'fi': 'Kuinka myönteinen olet: Tekstityylien siirto adaptiivisen tyylin upottamisen avulla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'כמה חיובי אתה: העברת סגנון טקסט באמצעות העברת סגנון מתאים', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Kako pozitivni ste: prenos slogov besedila z uporabo prilagodljive slogovne vdelave', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཚུལ་འདི་ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཅི་སྐྱོན་རུང་ཡིན་པ། ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་བཟོ་སྣང་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'The prevalent approach for unsupervised text style transfer is disentanglement between content and style. However, it is difficult to completely separate style information from the content. Other approaches allow the latent text representation to contain style and the target style to affect the generated output more than the latent representation does. In both approaches, however, it is impossible to adjust the strength of the style in the generated output. Moreover, those previous approaches typically perform both the sentence reconstruction and style control tasks in a single model, which complicates the overall architecture. In this paper, we address these issues by separating the model into a sentence reconstruction module and a style module. We use the Transformer-based autoencoder model for sentence reconstruction and the adaptive style embedding is learned directly in the style module. Because of this separation, each module can better focus on its own task. Moreover, we can vary the style strength of the generated sentence by changing the style of the embedding expression. Therefore, our approach not only controls the strength of the style, but also simplifies the model architecture. Experimental results show that our approach achieves better style transfer performance and content preservation than previous approaches.', 'ar': 'الأسلوب السائد لنقل نمط النص غير الخاضع للرقابة هو فك الارتباط بين المحتوى والأسلوب. ومع ذلك ، من الصعب فصل معلومات النمط تمامًا عن المحتوى. تسمح الطرق الأخرى لتمثيل النص الكامن أن يحتوي على النمط والنمط الهدف للتأثير على المخرجات الناتجة أكثر مما يفعل التمثيل الكامن. ومع ذلك ، في كلا الأسلوبين ، من المستحيل ضبط قوة النمط في الناتج الناتج. علاوة على ذلك ، تؤدي هذه الأساليب السابقة عادةً مهام إعادة بناء الجملة والتحكم في الأسلوب في نموذج واحد ، مما يعقد البنية الكلية. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول هذه المشكلات من خلال فصل النموذج إلى وحدة إعادة بناء الجملة ووحدة نمط. نحن نستخدم نموذج المشفر التلقائي المعتمد على المحولات لإعادة بناء الجملة ويتم تعلم تضمين النمط التكيفي مباشرة في وحدة النمط. بسبب هذا الفصل ، يمكن لكل وحدة التركيز بشكل أفضل على مهمتها الخاصة. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكننا تغيير قوة نمط الجملة التي تم إنشاؤها عن طريق تغيير نمط تعبير التضمين. لذلك ، لا يتحكم نهجنا في قوة النمط فحسب ، بل يبسط أيضًا بنية النموذج. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا يحقق أداءً أفضل في نقل الأنماط والحفاظ على المحتوى مقارنةً بالطرق السابقة.', 'es': 'El enfoque predominante para la transferencia de estilos de texto sin supervisión es el desenredo entre el contenido y el estilo. Sin embargo, es difícil separar completamente la información de estilo del contenido. Otros enfoques permiten que la representación de texto latente contenga estilo y que el estilo de destino afecte a la salida generada más que la representación latente. Sin embargo, en ambos enfoques es imposible ajustar la fuerza del estilo en la salida generada. Además, esos enfoques anteriores generalmente realizan las tareas de reconstrucción de oraciones y control de estilo en un solo modelo, lo que complica la arquitectura general. En este artículo, abordamos estos problemas separando el modelo en un módulo de reconstrucción de oraciones y un módulo de estilo. Utilizamos el modelo de autocodificador basado en Transformer para la reconstrucción de oraciones y la incrustación de estilos adaptativos se aprende directamente en el módulo de estilos. Debido a esta separación, cada módulo puede centrarse mejor en su propia tarea. Además, podemos variar la fuerza del estilo de la oración generada cambiando el estilo de la expresión incrustada. Por lo tanto, nuestro enfoque no solo controla la fuerza del estilo, sino que también simplifica la arquitectura del modelo. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque logra un mejor rendimiento de transferencia de estilos y conservación del contenido que los enfoques anteriores.', 'pt': 'A abordagem predominante para a transferência de estilo de texto não supervisionada é a separação entre conteúdo e estilo. No entanto, é difícil separar completamente as informações de estilo do conteúdo. Outras abordagens permitem que a representação de texto latente contenha estilo e o estilo de destino afete a saída gerada mais do que a representação latente. Em ambas as abordagens, no entanto, é impossível ajustar a força do estilo na saída gerada. Além disso, essas abordagens anteriores normalmente executam as tarefas de reconstrução de sentença e controle de estilo em um único modelo, o que complica a arquitetura geral. Neste artigo, abordamos essas questões separando o modelo em um módulo de reconstrução de frases e um módulo de estilo. Usamos o modelo de autoencoder baseado em Transformer para reconstrução de frases e a incorporação de estilo adaptativo é aprendida diretamente no módulo de estilo. Devido a essa separação, cada módulo pode se concentrar melhor em sua própria tarefa. Além disso, podemos variar a força do estilo da frase gerada alterando o estilo da expressão incorporada. Portanto, nossa abordagem não apenas controla a força do estilo, mas também simplifica a arquitetura do modelo. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem alcança melhor desempenho de transferência de estilo e preservação de conteúdo do que as abordagens anteriores.', 'fr': "L'approche la plus courante pour le transfert de style de texte non supervisé est la séparation entre le contenu et le style. Cependant, il est difficile de séparer complètement les informations de style du contenu. D'autres approches permettent à la représentation textuelle latente de contenir du style et au style cible d'affecter davantage la sortie générée que la représentation latente. Dans les deux approches, cependant, il est impossible d'ajuster la force du style dans la sortie générée. De plus, ces approches précédentes réalisent généralement à la fois les tâches de reconstruction de phrase et de contrôle de style dans un seul modèle, ce qui complique l'architecture globale. Dans cet article, nous abordons ces problèmes en séparant le modèle en un module de reconstruction de phrase et un module de style. Nous utilisons le modèle d'encodeur automatique basé sur Transformer pour la reconstruction de phrases et l'intégration de style adaptatif est apprise directement dans le module de style. Grâce à cette séparation, chaque module peut mieux se concentrer sur sa propre tâche. De plus, nous pouvons modifier la force du style de la phrase générée en modifiant le style de l'expression incorporée. Par conséquent, notre approche permet non seulement de contrôler la force du style, mais également de simplifier l'architecture du modèle. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche permet d'obtenir de meilleures performances de transfert de style et de préservation du contenu que les approches précédentes.", 'ja': '監督されていないテキストスタイルの転送のための一般的なアプローチは、コンテンツとスタイルの間の分離です。 しかし、スタイル情報と内容を完全に分離することは困難である。 他のアプローチでは、潜在的なテキスト表現にスタイルを含めることができ、ターゲットスタイルは潜在的な表現よりも生成された出力に影響を与えることができます。 しかし、両方のアプローチでは、生成された出力のスタイルの強度を調整することは不可能です。 さらに、これらの以前のアプローチは、典型的には、文章再構築とスタイル制御タスクの両方を単一のモデルで実行し、全体的なアーキテクチャを複雑にする。 本稿では、モデルを文章再構築モジュールとスタイルモジュールに分離することで、これらの問題に対処する。 文の再構築にはトランスフォーマーベースのオートエンコーダーモデルを使用し、アダプティブスタイルの埋め込みはスタイルモジュールで直接学習します。 この分離のため、各モジュールは独自のタスクに集中することができます。 さらに、埋め込み式のスタイルを変更することで、生成された文章のスタイル強度を変更できます。 したがって、私たちのアプローチはスタイルの強さを制御するだけでなく、モデルアーキテクチャを簡素化します。 実験結果は、私たちのアプローチが以前のアプローチよりも優れたスタイル転送パフォーマンスとコンテンツ保存を達成していることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Преобладающим подходом к неконтролируемой передаче стиля текста является развязка между содержанием и стилем. Однако, трудно полностью отделить информацию о стиле от контента. Другие подходы позволяют скрытому текстовому представлению содержать стиль, а целевому стилю влиять на сгенерированный вывод в большей степени, чем скрытому представлению. В обоих подходах, однако, невозможно отрегулировать силу стиля в сгенерированном выходе. Более того, эти предыдущие подходы обычно выполняют как задачи реконструкции предложения, так и задачи управления стилем в одной модели, что усложняет общую архитектуру. В этой статье мы рассматриваем эти вопросы, разделяя модель на модуль реконструкции предложения и модуль стиля. Мы используем модель автокодирования на основе трансформатора для реконструкции предложений, а адаптивный стиль встраивания изучается непосредственно в модуле style. Благодаря такому разделению каждый модуль может лучше сосредоточиться на своей собственной задаче. Кроме того, мы можем варьировать силу стиля сгенерированного предложения, изменяя стиль выражения вложения. Поэтому наш подход не только контролирует силу стиля, но и упрощает архитектуру модели. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход обеспечивает лучшую производительность передачи стиля и сохранение контента по сравнению с предыдущими подходами.', 'zh': '无监文本式传输流行之法,解纠于情式之间。 然难尽分其情。 他法许潜于文本包含样式,并且比潜在表示文章更能感动生成的输出。 然二法之中,皆不能生输调度。 又前法常于单模中并行句重建、样制,使全体体系结构复杂化。 于本文中,分模形为句重构模块与式模块以决之。 用 Transformer 自编码器句重构,自应式嵌模块学之。 由此分离,模块可以益专。 此外可以改嵌表达式式变生句之式。 故吾道非徒制其制度之强,而简其模形体系结构。 实验结果表明,吾道胜于前传输而性存于后。', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित पाठ शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए प्रचलित दृष्टिकोण सामग्री और शैली के बीच विघटन है। हालांकि, सामग्री से शैली की जानकारी को पूरी तरह से अलग करना मुश्किल है। अन्य दृष्टिकोण अव्यक्त पाठ प्रतिनिधित्व को शैली और लक्ष्य शैली को अव्यक्त प्रतिनिधित्व की तुलना में उत्पन्न आउटपुट को प्रभावित करने की अनुमति देते हैं। दोनों दृष्टिकोणों में, हालांकि, उत्पन्न आउटपुट में शैली की ताकत को समायोजित करना असंभव है। इसके अलावा, वे पिछले दृष्टिकोण आमतौर पर एक ही मॉडल में वाक्य पुनर्निर्माण और शैली नियंत्रण कार्यों दोनों को निष्पादित करते हैं, जो समग्र वास्तुकला को जटिल बनाता है। इस पेपर में, हम मॉडल को एक वाक्य पुनर्निर्माण मॉड्यूल और एक शैली मॉड्यूल में अलग करके इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करते हैं। हम वाक्य पुनर्निर्माण के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित ऑटोएनकोडर मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं और अनुकूली शैली एम्बेडिंग सीधे शैली मॉड्यूल में सीखा जाता है। इस अलगाव के कारण, प्रत्येक मॉड्यूल अपने स्वयं के कार्य पर बेहतर ध्यान केंद्रित कर सकता है। इसके अलावा, हम एम्बेडिंग अभिव्यक्ति की शैली को बदलकर उत्पन्न वाक्य की शैली की ताकत को अलग-अलग कर सकते हैं। इसलिए, हमारा दृष्टिकोण न केवल शैली की ताकत को नियंत्रित करता है, बल्कि मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर को भी सरल बनाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण पिछले दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में बेहतर शैली हस्तांतरण प्रदर्शन और सामग्री संरक्षण प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Is é an cur chuige coitianta maidir le haistriú stíl téacs gan mhaoirseacht ná dícheangal idir ábhar agus stíl. Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair faisnéis stíle a scaradh go hiomlán ón ábhar. Ligeann cur chuige eile don léiriú folaigh téacs stíl a chuimsiú agus bíonn tionchar níos mó ag an stíl sprice ar an aschur ginte ná mar a dhéanann an léiriú folaigh. Sa dá chur chuige, áfach, tá sé dodhéanta a choigeartú an neart an stíl san aschur a ghintear. Ina theannta sin, is gnách go ndéanann na cineálacha cur chuige sin roimhe seo na tascanna atógála abairte agus rialaithe stíle i múnla amháin, rud a chuireann casta ar an ailtireacht iomlán. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar na saincheisteanna seo tríd an múnla a scaradh ina mhodúl atógála abairtí agus ina mhodúl stíle. Bainimid úsáid as an múnla uath-ionchódóra Trasfhoirmeoir-bhunaithe le haghaidh atógáil abairtí agus foghlaimítear an leabú stíl oiriúnaitheach go díreach sa mhodúl stíl. Mar gheall ar an scaradh seo, is féidir le gach modúl díriú níos fearr ar a thasc féin. Thairis sin, is féidir linn neart stíl na habairte a ghintear a athrú trí stíl an abairt leabaithe a athrú. Dá bhrí sin, ní hamháin go rialaíonn ár gcur chuige neart an stíl, ach freisin simplíonn sé an ailtireacht mhúnla. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár gcur chuige feidhmíocht aistrithe stíle agus caomhnú ábhair níos fearr amach ná cuir chuige roimhe seo.', 'hu': 'A felügyelet nélküli szövegstílusátvitel leggyakoribb megközelítése a tartalom és a stílus közötti szétválasztás. Azonban nehéz teljesen elválasztani a stílusinformációkat a tartalomtól. Más megközelítések lehetővé teszik, hogy a látens szöveg ábrázolása stílust tartalmazzon, a célstílus pedig jobban befolyásolja a generált kimenetet, mint a látens ábrázolás. Mindkét megközelítésben azonban lehetetlen beállítani a stílus erejét a generált kimenetben. Továbbá ezek a korábbi megközelítések jellemzően mind a mondat rekonstrukcióját, mind a stílusvezérlési feladatokat egyetlen modellben végzik, ami bonyolítja az általános architektúrát. Ebben a tanulmányban ezeket a kérdéseket azzal foglalkozunk, hogy a modellt egy mondat rekonstrukciós modulra és egy stílus modulra választjuk. A Transzformátor alapú autoencoder modellt használjuk a mondatok rekonstrukciójához és az adaptív stílus beágyazását közvetlenül a stílus modulban tanuljuk meg. Ennek az elválasztásnak köszönhetően minden modul jobban összpontosíthat a saját feladatára. Ezenkívül a beágyazó kifejezés stílusának megváltoztatásával változtathatjuk a generált mondat stíluserejét. Ezért megközelítésünk nemcsak a stílus erejét szabályozza, hanem egyszerűsíti a modell architektúráját is. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk jobb stílusátviteli teljesítményt és tartalom megőrzést ér el, mint a korábbi megközelítések.', 'ka': 'მუშაობელი ტექსტის სტილის გადატანისთვის პროგრამა არის შემდგომარების და სტილის შორის გადაშვება. მაგრამ ძალიან რთულია სტილის ინფორმაციას ყველაფერად გაყოფილი შემდგომარებით. სხვა დახმარებები შესაძლებელია, რომ შორის ტექსტის გამოსახულება სტილის და მისახულებული სტილის გამოსახულება, რომელიც შორის გამოსახულება უფრო მეტი. მაგრამ ორივე დახმარებით შესაძლებელია, რომ სტილის ძალის შესაძლებლობა შექმნა გამოყენებაში შესაძლებელია. დამატებით, ამ წინაღალდეგი დახმარება, რომელიც საუკეთესო აკრუქტურაცია და სტილის კონტრუქტურაცია ერთი მოდელში, რომელიც ყველა აკრუქტურაცია შე ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ ამ პრობლემების შესახებ მოდელის განყოფილებით წესების რექსტრუქციის მოდულში და სტილის მოდულში. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ტრანფორმეტრის დაბათებული ავტოკორმეტრის მოდელი სიტყვების რესტრუქტურაციისთვის და ადაპტიგური სტილის შებრუნებისთვის სტილის მოდულიში და ამ განყოფილების შემთხვევაში, ყოველ მოდული უფრო მეტი შეუძლია თავის საქმე დავაკეთოთ. დამატებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაცვლოთ შექმნილი სიტყვას სტილის ძალობას შეცვლით შექმნილი გამოსახულების სტილის შეცვლით. ამიტომ, ჩვენი მიღება არა მხოლოდ სტილის ძალის კონტროლურება, მაგრამ მოდელური აქტიქტურაცია უფრო გამოყენება. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაქთწრ ოპთლთფ ოჲჟრთდნვ ოჲ-ეჲბპჲრჲ ოპვჳგყპლწგანვ ნა ჟრთლჲრ თ ჱაეყპზვნთვ ნა ჟ', 'it': "L'approccio prevalente per il trasferimento non supervisionato dello stile di testo è la separazione tra contenuto e stile. Tuttavia, è difficile separare completamente le informazioni di stile dal contenuto. Altri approcci consentono alla rappresentazione del testo latente di contenere lo stile e allo stile di destinazione di influenzare l'output generato più della rappresentazione latente. In entrambi gli approcci, tuttavia, è impossibile regolare la forza dello stile nell'output generato. Inoltre, questi approcci precedenti tipicamente eseguono sia la ricostruzione delle frasi che i compiti di controllo dello stile in un unico modello, il che complica l'architettura complessiva. In questo articolo, affrontiamo questi problemi separando il modello in un modulo di ricostruzione delle frasi e un modulo di stile. Usiamo il modello di encoder automatico basato su Transformer per la ricostruzione delle frasi e l'embedding dello stile adattivo viene appreso direttamente nel modulo stile. A causa di questa separazione, ogni modulo può concentrarsi meglio sul proprio compito. Inoltre, possiamo variare la forza stilistica della frase generata cambiando lo stile dell'espressione embedding. Pertanto, il nostro approccio non solo controlla la forza dello stile, ma semplifica anche l'architettura del modello. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro approccio raggiunge prestazioni di trasferimento di stile e conservazione dei contenuti migliori rispetto agli approcci precedenti.", 'el': 'Η κυρίαρχη προσέγγιση για τη μεταφορά στυλ κειμένου χωρίς επίβλεψη είναι η αποσύνδεση μεταξύ περιεχομένου και στυλ. Ωστόσο, είναι δύσκολο να διαχωρίσετε εντελώς τις πληροφορίες στυλ από το περιεχόμενο. Άλλες προσεγγίσεις επιτρέπουν στη λανθάνουσα αναπαράσταση κειμένου να περιέχει στυλ και στο στυλ προορισμού να επηρεάζει την παραγόμενη παραγωγή περισσότερο από ό,τι η λανθάνουσα αναπαράσταση. Και στις δύο προσεγγίσεις, ωστόσο, είναι αδύνατο να ρυθμιστεί η δύναμη του στυλ στην παραγόμενη παραγωγή. Επιπλέον, αυτές οι προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις συνήθως εκτελούν τόσο την ανασυγκρότηση των προτάσεων όσο και τις εργασίες ελέγχου στυλ σε ένα μόνο μοντέλο, γεγονός που περιπλέκει τη συνολική αρχιτεκτονική. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτά τα ζητήματα διαχωρίζοντας το μοντέλο σε μια ενότητα ανασυγκρότησης προτάσεων και μια ενότητα ύφους. Χρησιμοποιούμε το μοντέλο αυτόματου κωδικοποιητή βασισμένο στον μετασχηματιστή για την ανακατασκευή προτάσεων και η ενσωμάτωση προσαρμοστικού στυλ μαθαίνεται απευθείας στην ενότητα στυλ. Λόγω αυτού του διαχωρισμού, κάθε ενότητα μπορεί να επικεντρωθεί καλύτερα στο δικό της έργο. Επιπλέον, μπορούμε να διαφοροποιήσουμε τη δύναμη στυλ της παραγόμενης πρότασης αλλάζοντας το στυλ της ενσωμάτωσης έκφρασης. Ως εκ τούτου, η προσέγγισή μας όχι μόνο ελέγχει τη δύναμη του στυλ, αλλά και απλοποιεί την αρχιτεκτονική του μοντέλου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει καλύτερη απόδοση μεταφοράς στυλ και διατήρηση περιεχομένου από τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις.', 'kk': 'Сәйкес емес мәтін стилінің тасымалдау үшін көбірек жағдай мазмұны мен стилінің арасындағы бөлшектеу. Бірақ мазмұнынан стильдің мәліметін толық бөлу қиын. Басқа арқылы келесі мәтінді көрсету стилі мен мақсатты стилі жасалған шығысын келесі келтірілгеннен артық көмектесуге мүмкіндік береді. Бірақ екі жағдайда жасалған шығыс стилінің күшін баптау мүмкін емес. Сонымен қатар, бұл алдыңғы жағдайлардың әдетте сөздерді қайта құру мен стильді басқару тапсырмаларын бір үлгінде орындайды. Бұл әрқашандағы архитектураны қиындайтын. Бұл қағазда, үлгісін қайта құру модуліне және стилінің модуліне бөліп бұл мәселелерді шешуіміз керек. Трансформация негізінде автокодер үлгісін сұлбаны қайта құру үшін қолданамыз және адаптер стилінің ендіру үлгісін стиль модулінде тікелей үйренеді. Бұл бөлістіктің себебі, әрбір модуль өзінің тапсырмасына көңіл бере алады. Сонымен қатар, құрылған сөздің стилінің күшін ендіру өрнегінің стилін өзгертуге болады. Сондықтан біз тек стильдің күшін басқаруға болмайды, сондай-ақ үлгі архитектурасын қарапайымдастырады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелеріміздің стильді тасымалдау және мазмұнын алдыңғы жағдайдан артық сақтау арқылы жақсы стильді сақтауға болады.', 'lt': 'Dažniausias metodas, taikomas nepastebimam teksto stiliaus perdavimui, yra turinio ir stiliaus atskyrimas. Tačiau sudėtinga visiškai atskirti stiliaus informaciją nuo turinio. Kiti metodai leidžia latentiniam tekstui atspindėti stilą ir tikslinį stilą daryti didesnį poveikį sukauptam išėjimui nei latentiniam atspindėjimui. Tačiau abiejuose metoduose neįmanoma koreguoti stiliaus stiprumo sukauptame išėjime. Be to, šie ankstesni metodai paprastai atlieka tiek sakinių atkūrimo, tiek stiliaus kontrolės užduotis vienu modeliu, kuris apsunkina bendrą architektūrą. In this paper, we address these issues by separating the model into a sentence reconstruction module and a style module.  We use the Transformer-based autoencoder model for sentence reconstruction and the adaptive style embedding is learned directly in the style module.  Dėl šio atskyrimo kiekvienas modulis gali geriau sutelkti dėmesį į savo užduotį. Be to, galime pakeisti sukaupto sakinio stiliaus stiprumą keičiant įterpimo išraiškos stilį. Todėl mūsų požiūris ne tik kontroliuoja stilio stiprumą, bet ir supaprastina modelio architektūrą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas užtikrina geresnius stilių perdavimo rezultatus ir turinio išsaugojimą nei ankstesni metodai.', 'mk': 'The prevalent approach for unsupervised text style transfer is disentanglement between content and style.  Сепак, тешко е целосно да се оддели информацијата за стил од содржината. Другите пристапи овозможуваат latent text representation да содржи стил и мета стил да влијае на генерираниот излез повеќе од latent representation. Сепак, во двата пристапи, невозможно е да се прилагоди силата на стилот во генерираниот излез. Покрај тоа, овие претходни пристапи обично ја извршуваат реконструкцијата на речениците и задачите за контрола на стилот во еден модел, што ја комплицира целокупната архитектура. Во овој весник, ги решаваме овие прашања со разделување на моделот во модул за реконструкција на речениците и модул за стил. Ние го користиме моделот на автокодер базиран на Трансформер за реконструкција на речениците и адаптивното вградување на стилот е научено директно во модулот на стилот. Поради оваа поделба, секој модул може подобро да се фокусира на својата задача. Покрај тоа, можеме да ја промениме силата на стилот на генерираната реченица со промена на стилот на вградениот израз. Затоа, нашиот пристап не само што ја контролира силата на стилот, туку и ја поедноставува моделната архитектура. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап постигнува подобри резултати за трансфер на стил и зачувување на содржината од претходните пристапи.', 'ms': 'Pendekatan yang berkuasa untuk pemindahan gaya teks tidak diawasi adalah penyelesaian antara kandungan dan gaya. Namun, sukar untuk memisahkan maklumat gaya dari kandungan. pendekatan lain membenarkan perwakilan teks tertutup mengandungi gaya dan gaya sasaran untuk mempengaruhi output yang dijana lebih daripada perwakilan tertutup. Dalam kedua-dua pendekatan, bagaimanapun, mustahil untuk menyesuaikan kekuatan gaya dalam output yang dijana. Lagipun, pendekatan terdahulu biasanya melakukan kedua-dua tugas pembangunan kalimat dan kawalan gaya dalam satu model, yang rumit arkitektur keseluruhan. In this paper, we address these issues by separating the model into a sentence reconstruction module and a style module.  Kami menggunakan model pengekod automatik berasaskan Transformer untuk pembangunan semula kalimat dan pembangunan gaya adaptif belajar secara langsung dalam modul gaya. Kerana pemisahan ini, setiap modul boleh fokus lebih baik pada tugasnya sendiri. Lagipun, kita boleh ubah kekuatan gaya kalimat yang dijana dengan mengubah gaya ungkapan penyembedding. Oleh itu, pendekatan kita tidak hanya mengawal kekuatan gaya, tetapi juga memudahkan arkitektur model. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi pemindahan gaya yang lebih baik dan penyimpanan kandungan daripada pendekatan terdahulu.', 'ml': 'സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത പദാവലി സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന നടപടിയാണ് ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിനും ശൈലിയുമിടയില്\u200d  എന്നാലും, ഉള്ളടക്കത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ശൈലിയിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചു വിവരിക് മറ്റുള്ള അടുത്ത പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയും ശൈലിയും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d പുതിയ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെ രണ്ടുപേരിലും ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫലത്തിലെ ശൈലിയുടെ ശക്തി മാറ്റുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല. അതുകൊണ്ടും, മുമ്പുള്ള സമീപത്തുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്ക് പുനരുമാറ്റുന്നതും ശൈലിക നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ പണികളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന് In this paper, we address these issues by separating the model into a sentence reconstruction module and a style module.  വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുനരുമാറ്റുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സ്വയം കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ശൈലിയില്\u200d ന ഈ വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഓരോ മോഡ്യൂളും സ്വന്തം ജോലിയിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാന്\u200d പറ്റും. പിന്നെ നമുക്ക് സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കിന്റെ രീതിയിലെ ശക്തി വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, അകത്തുള്ള പ്രസ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് രീതിയുടെ ശക്തിയെ മാത്രമല്ല, മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നതും എളുപ്പമാക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടി മാറ്റുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ', 'mt': 'L-approċċ prevalenti għat-trasferiment tal-istil tat-test mhux sorveljat huwa d-diżantegrazzjoni bejn il-kontenut u l-istil. Madankollu, huwa diffiċli li tiġi separata kompletament l-informazzjoni dwar l-istil mill-kontenut. Other approaches allow the latent text representation to contain style and the target style to affect the generated output more than the latent representation does.  Iżda fiż-żewġ approċċi, huwa impossibbli li tiġi aġġustata s-saħħa tal-istil fil-produzzjoni ġġenerata. Barra minn hekk, dawk l-approċċi preċedenti tipikament iwettqu kemm il-kompiti ta’ rikostruzzjoni tas-sentenza kif ukoll ta’ kontroll tal-istil f’mudell wieħed, li jikkomplika l-arkitettura ġenerali. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet billi nseparatu l-mudell f’modulu ta’ rikostruzzjoni tas-sentenzi u modulu ta’ stil. Aħna nużaw il-mudell tal-awtokoder ibbażat fuq it-Transformer għar-rikostruzzjoni tas-sentenzi u l-inkorporazzjoni tal-istil adattiv titgħallem direttament fil-modulu tal-istil. Minħabba din is-separazzjoni, kull modulu jista’ jiffoka aħjar fuq ix-xogħol tiegħu stess. Barra minn hekk, nistgħu jvarjaw is-saħħa tal-istil tas-sentenza ġġenerata billi nbidlu l-istil tal-espressjoni inkorporattiva. Għalhekk, l-approċċ tagħna mhux biss jikkontrolla s-saħħa tal-istil, iżda jissimplifika wkoll l-arkitettura mudell. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni aħjar ta’ trasferiment ta’ stil u preservazzjoni tal-kontenut minn approċċi preċedenti.', 'pl': 'Najczęstszym podejściem do transferu stylów tekstowych bez nadzoru jest rozłączenie treści i stylu. Trudno jednak całkowicie oddzielić informacje o stylu od treści. Inne podejścia umożliwiają ukrytą reprezentację tekstu zawierać styl, a docelowy styl wpływa na wygenerowane wyjście bardziej niż ukryta reprezentacja. W obu podejściach jednak niemożliwe jest dostosowanie siły stylu w generowanym wyjściu. Ponadto te poprzednie podejścia zazwyczaj wykonują zarówno rekonstrukcję zdań, jak i kontrolę stylu w jednym modelu, co komplikuje ogólną architekturę. W niniejszym artykule poruszamy te kwestie poprzez rozdzielenie modelu na moduł rekonstrukcji zdań i moduł stylu. Do rekonstrukcji zdań używamy modelu autokodera opartego na Transformerze, a osadzenie stylu adaptacyjnego uczy się bezpośrednio w modułu stylu. Dzięki tej separacji każdy moduł może lepiej skupić się na własnym zadaniu. Ponadto możemy zmienić siłę stylu wygenerowanego zdania poprzez zmianę stylu wyrażenia osadzenia. Dlatego nasze podejście nie tylko kontroluje siłę stylu, ale także upraszcza architekturę modelu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście osiąga lepszą wydajność transferu stylu i zachowanie treści niż poprzednie podejścia.', 'ro': 'Abordarea predominantă pentru transferul de stil text nesupravegheat este dezcunoașterea dintre conținut și stil. Cu toate acestea, este dificil să separați complet informațiile de stil de conținut. Alte abordări permit reprezentarea textului latent să conțină stil și stilul țintă să afecteze ieșirea generată mai mult decât reprezentarea latentă. În ambele abordări, cu toate acestea, este imposibil să se ajusteze puterea stilului în ieșirea generată. Mai mult decât atât, aceste abordări anterioare efectuează de obicei atât reconstrucția propozițiilor, cât și controlul stilului într-un singur model, ceea ce complică arhitectura generală. În această lucrare, abordăm aceste probleme prin separarea modelului într-un modul de reconstrucție a propozițiilor și un modul de stil. Folosim modelul de autoencoder bazat pe Transformer pentru reconstrucția propozițiilor, iar încorporarea stilului adaptiv este învățată direct în modulul stil. Datorită acestei separații, fiecare modul se poate concentra mai bine pe propria sarcină. Mai mult decât atât, putem varia puterea stilului propoziției generate prin schimbarea stilului expresiei de încorporare. Prin urmare, abordarea noastră nu numai că controlează puterea stilului, ci simplifică și arhitectura modelului. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră obține performanțe mai bune de transfer de stil și păstrare a conținutului decât abordările anterioare.', 'mn': 'Баталгаагүй текст хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлтийн тухай ихэвчлэн ойлголт нь content болон style хоорондоо холбогдох юм. Гэхдээ хэлбэрээс бүрэн хэлбэрээр мэдээллийг бүрэн ялгах нь хэцүү. Бусад арга баримтууд сүүлийн текст үзүүлэлтийг стиль болон зорилготой стиль нь үүсгэсэн үр дүнээс илүү нөлөөлж чадна. Гэхдээ хоёр ойлголтын тулд бий болгосон үр дүнд хэлбэрийн хүчийг засах боломжгүй. Мөн тэдгээр өмнөх арга барилгууд нь нэг загварын дахин бүтээж, хэлбэрийн удирдах ажил хоёуланг хийдэг. Энэ нь бүх архитектурыг төвөгтэй болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр асуудлуудыг өгүүлбэрийг дахин бүтээх модуль болон хэлбэрийн модуль болгон хувааж үздэг. Бид илэрхийлэл дахин бүтээх үед Трансформер суурилсан автокодчуудын загварыг ашиглаж, адаптер хэлбэрийг шууд хэлбэрээр сурсан. Энэ хуваагдах учраас модуль бүр өөрийн ажил дээр илүү анхаарлаа хандуулж чадна. Мөн бид үүсгэсэн өгүүлбэрийн хэлбэрийг өөрчилж чадна. Тиймээс бидний арга барилга зөвхөн хэлбэрийн хүчийг удирдах биш, мөн загварын архитектурыг хялбарчилж байна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга хэлбэрээс илүү сайхан шилжүүлэх үйл ажиллагаа, хэмжээсүүдийг өмнөх арга барилгуудаас илүү сайхан хадгалах боломжтой байдаг', 'no': 'Det utbreidde tilnærminga for ukjende tekststiloverføring er forsvinning mellom innhaldet og stil. Det er likevel vanskeleg å heilt skilja stilinformasjon frå innhaldet. Andre tilnærmingar gjer at latentekstreprezentasjonen inneheld stil og målstil skal påvirke den genererte utdata meir enn den latente representasjonen. I begge tilnærmingar er det likevel umulig å justera styrken på stilen i den genererte utdata. Desse førre tilnærmingane utfører vanlegvis både setningane gjenopprettingar og stilkontrollpunksjonar i eit enkelt modell, som kompliserer den generelle arkitekturen. I denne papiret sett vi opp desse problemene ved å dele modellen til ein setningsmodul og ein stilmodul. Vi brukar transformeringsmodellen for automatisk koding for setningar gjenoppretting, og tilpassande stilinnbygging er lært direkte i stilmodulen. På grunn av denne avdelinga kan kvar modul betre fokusera på sin eige oppgåve. I tillegg kan vi endra styrken på den genererte setninga ved å endra stilen på den innebygde uttrykket. Derfor, tilnærminga vårt kontrollerer ikkje berre styrken på stilen, men også forenklar modellen arkitekturen. Eksperimentale resultat viser at tilnærminga vårt når det gjer betre stiloverføringsfunksjon og innholdsparing enn tidlegare tilnærmingar.', 'sr': 'Prošireni pristup premeštaju teksta stila je rastavljanje između sadržaja i stila. Međutim, teško je potpuno odvojiti informacije o stilu od sadržaja. Drugi pristupi omogućavaju zastupanje latentnog teksta da sadrži stil i ciljni stil da utiče na proizvedeni izlaz više od latentne zastupe. Međutim, u oba pristupa, nemoguće je prilagoditi snagu stila u proizvedenom proizvodnju. Osim toga, ti prethodni pristupi obično izvršavaju rekonstrukciju rečenice i kontrolu stila u jednom modelu, koji komplicira ukupnu arhitekturu. U ovom papiru rješavamo te probleme razdvajanjem model a u rekonstrukcijski modul rečenice i modul stila. Koristimo model autokodera na transformeri za rekonstrukciju rečenica, a adaptivni stil se uči direktno u modulu stila. Zbog ovog razdvajanja, svaki modul može bolje da se fokusira na svoj zadatak. Osim toga, možemo promijeniti snagu stila proizvedene rečenice mijenjajući stil uključenog izraza. Zato, naš pristup ne samo kontrolira snagu stila, već i pojednostavlja model arhitekture. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postiže bolji izvršak transfera stila i zaštitu sadržaja od prethodnih pristupa.', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqa loo soo wareejiyo qaabka qoraalka ee aan la ilaalinayn waa mid ku xiran waxyaabaha iyo tababarka. However, it is difficult to completely separate style information from the content.  Dhaqdhaqaaqyada kale waxay saameyn ku yeelan karaan qaababka macluumaadka ugu dambeeya oo ku qoran qaababka iyo qaababka goalka si ay u saameyso soo baxa wax ka badan sharciga ugu dambeeyay. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, ma suurtowdo in la beddelo xoogga tababarka midhaha soo baxay. Markaas waxaa kale oo lagu sameeyaa qaabab keliya oo ku saabsan dhismaha iyo dhismaha qaababka lagu qorayo qaababka hore, kaas oo kamid ah dhismaha dhamaan. Warqaddan waxan ayaannu ku sheekeynaynaa arimahan si aan u kala soocno nooca dhismaha iyo nooca qaabka ah. Tusaalada kaararka ah ee lagu soo bandhigay ee qoraalka dib u dhisidda qoraalka, qaabka isku bedelana si toos ah waxaa lagu bartaa qaababka qaababka. Sababtaas darteed qaybinta, mid waluba wuxuu si wanaagsan ugu kalsoonaan karaa shaqadiisa. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku kala duwan karnaa xoogga tababarka uu soo daayay si aan u beddelno qaabka muuqashada. Sidaa darteed, dhaqdhaqaalahayagu ma maamulo xoogga qaababka oo keliya, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale sahlisaa dhismaha modellka. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in qaababkayagu uu gaadho sameynta qaababka bedelka iyo ilaalinta waxyaabaha ku jira oo ka wanaagsan qaababka hore.', 'sv': 'Det vanligaste tillvägagångssättet för överföring av textstil utan övervakning är att skilja mellan innehåll och stil. Det är dock svårt att helt skilja formatinformation från innehållet. Andra metoder gör det möjligt för den latenta textrepresentationen att innehålla stil och målstilen att påverka den genererade utmatningen mer än den latenta representationen gör. I båda tillvägagångssätten är det dock omöjligt att justera stilens styrka i den genererade utmatningen. Dessutom utför dessa tidigare tillvägagångssätt vanligtvis både meningsredskonstruktion och stilkontroll uppgifter i en enda modell, vilket komplicerar den övergripande arkitekturen. I denna uppsats behandlar vi dessa frågor genom att separera modellen i en meningsredskonstruktionsmodul och en stilmodul. Vi använder den Transformer-baserade autoencoder modellen för meningsredskonstruktion och den adaptiva stilinbäddningen lärs direkt i stilmodulen. På grund av denna separation kan varje modul bättre fokusera på sin egen uppgift. Dessutom kan vi variera stilstyrkan i den genererade meningen genom att ändra stilen på inbäddningsuttrycket. Därför kontrollerar vårt tillvägagångssätt inte bara stilens styrka, utan förenklar också modellarkitekturen. Experimentella resultat visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår bättre stilöverföringsprestanda och innehållsbevarande än tidigare tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': 'காப்பாற்றப்படாத உரை பாணி மாற்றுவதற்கான முன்னிருப்பு வழி உள்ளடக்கங்கள் மற்றும் பாணிகளுக்கிடையே இடைமாறு எனினும், உள்ளடக்கத்திலிருந்து முழுமையாக பாணியின் தகவலை வேறுபடுத்த முடியும். Other approaches allow the latent text representation to contain style and the target style to affect the generated output more than the latent representation does.  இரு முறைகளிலும், உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வெளியீட்டில் பாணியின் சக்தியை மாற்ற முடியாது. மேலும், அந்த முந்தைய நெறிமுறைகள் வழக்கமாக வாக்கு மீண்டும் பாணி கட்டுப்பாட்டு பணிகளையும் ஒரு மாதிரியில் செயல்படுத்துக இந்த காகிதத்தில், மாதிரியை ஒரு வாக்கு மீண்டும் உருவாக்கும் கூறுக்கும் பிரித்து இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை பிரிக்கி நாம் மாற்றி அடிப்படையான தானியங்கி குறியீட்டு மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி வாக்கியம் மீண்டும் மாற்றும் பாணியில் நேராக பா இந்த பிரிவு காரணம், ஒவ்வொரு கூறும் தன் பணியின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்த முடியும். மேலும், நாம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தின் பாணியை மாற்றி உள்ளீட்டு கூற்றின் பாணியை மாற்ற முடியும். அதனால், எங்கள் அணுகல் பாணியின் சக்தியை மட்டும் கட்டுப்படுத்துவதில்லை ஆனால் மாதிரி கட்டுப்பாட்டை முறைமைய முயற்சி முடிவுகள் முந்தைய வழிகளை விட சிறந்த பாணி மாற்றுதல் செயல் மற்றும் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் பாதுகாப்பை விட சிறந', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරභාවිත විනාශ විනාශ විනාශය සහ විනාශ වලට ප්\u200dරභාවිත විනාශය සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිත විනාශය වෙනු නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ස්ථානය තොරතුරු පෙරතිරෙන්න අමාරුයි. වෙනත් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ඉලක්කම් විදියට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරව හැබැයි දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන්, සිදුවීමේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ශක්තිය සැකසුම් කරන්න බෑ. ඒ වගේම, අනිත් අනිත් අනිත් අවස්ථාවක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් වාක්ය නිර්මාණය සහ වාක්ය පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළ මේ පැත්තට, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්නේ මොඩල් එක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සහ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි වාක්ය නිර්මාණය සඳහා ස්වයංකේතකය ස්වයංකේතකය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සහ සැකසුම් වාක්ය ස්ථානය සඳහා ස්වයං මේ වෙනුවෙන් මොකද්ද, හැම මොඩ්යුලෙක්ම තමුන්ගේ වැඩේ හොඳට බලන්න පුළුවන්. තවත්, අපිට පුළුවන් වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරපු වාර්තාවක් වෙනස් කරන්න, සම්බන ඉතින්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විතරයි ශක්තියේ බලය පාලනය කරන්නේ නැහැ, ඒත් මොඩල් ස්ථාපනය විතරයි. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදිහට හොඳ විදිහට ස්ථානය ගැනීම සහ සාමාන්ත්\u200dර', 'ur': 'غیر قابل تحقیق کے متن استیل ترنسیٹ کے لئے بہت گھیری طریقہ موجود اور استیل کے درمیان تغییرات ہے. لیکن یہ کاملا مشکل ہے کہ سائل معلومات کو منزل سے جدا کرنا۔ اور دوسری طریقے لٹینٹ ٹیکسٹ روشنی کو استیل اور موقع استیل کے ذریعے لٹینٹ روشنی سے زیادہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتے ہیں. لیکن دونوں قریبوں میں، سائل کے طاقت کو پیدا کیا گیا اپوٹوٹ میں تنظیم کرنا غیر ممکن ہے. اور اس سے پہلے کی طریقے معمولاً کلمہ دوبارہ ساخت کرنا اور استیل کنٹرول کا کام ایک مدل میں کر رہے ہیں، جو سارے ساختار کو پیچیدہ کرتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ان مسائلوں کو دریافت کرتے ہیں کہ موڈل کو ایک جماعت دوبارہ ساخت موڈل اور ایک استیل موڈل میں تقسیم کریں۔ ہم ترنسفور بنیادی آٹ کوڈر موڈل کو جماعت دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں اور اڈپٹیٹ استیل ایمبڈینگ استیل موڈل میں مستقیماً سیکھا جاتا ہے. اس تقسیم کی وجہ سے ہر موڈل اپنے کام پر اچھا منظور کرسکتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم پیدا کئے ہوئے واژن کی استیل قوت کو بدل سکتے ہیں، انڈینگ واژن کی استیل بدل کر۔ تو ہمارا تقریبا صرف استیل کی قوت کا کنٹرول نہیں کرتا بلکہ مدل معماری کو بھی آسان کرتا ہے۔ Experimental results show that our approach achieves better style transfer performance and content conservation than previous approaches.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, mavzudagi uslub maʼlumotini butunlay ajratish juda qiyin. Name @ info Koʻrib chiqishlar odatda bir modeldagi so'zlarni qayta tiklash va uslub boshqarish vazifalarini bajaradi. Bu hamma maktablarni kompyuterga murakkab qiladi. Ushbu qogʻozda, bu muammolani bir so'zning qayta oʻrnatish moduliga va uslub moduliga ajratish mumkin. Biz so'z qaytadan oʻrnatish uchun Transformer asosida avto-kodlash modelini foydalanamiz va oʻxshash uslub uslubining toʻgʻri oʻrnatilgan. Because of this separation, each module can better focus on its own task.  Ko'rsatganda, biz bir so'zning uslubining turini o'zgartirish mumkin. Shunday qilib, bizning fikrimiz faqat uslub kuchini boshqaruvchi emas, balki model arxituvchisini soddalaydi. Tajriba natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning qismimiz oldingi usuldan uzoqlash natijasi va tarkibini saqlash imkoniyatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Cách tiếp cận phổ biến để chuyển văn bản không giám sát là sự tách rời nội dung và phong cách. Tuy nhiên, khó mà phân biệt hoàn to àn thông tin phong cách với nội dung. Các phương pháp khác cho phép mô tả văn bản tiềm ẩn chứa kiểu dáng và kiểu đích ảnh hưởng đến kết xuất đã tạo hơn nhiều so với các mô tả tiềm năng. Trong cả hai phương pháp, tuy nhiên, không thể điều chỉnh độ mạnh của phong cách trong kết xuất được tạo ra. Hơn nữa, những phương pháp trước đó thường thực hiện cả các công việc cấu hình và kiểm soát kiểu chữ trong một mô hình duy nhất, phức tạp hóa toàn bộ cấu trúc. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết những vấn đề này bằng cách phân tách mô hình thành một mô-đun cấu hình và một mô-đun kiểu dáng. Chúng tôi sử dụng mô hình bắt mã hóa biến hình cho việc tái cấu hình các câu và việc nhúng kiểu thích nghi được học trực tiếp trong mô- đun kiểu dáng. Vì sự phân biệt này, mỗi mô-đun có thể tập trung hơn vào nhiệm vụ của riêng mình. Hơn nữa, chúng ta có thể thay đổi phong cách của câu đã tạo ra bằng cách thay đổi phong cách của biểu thức nhúng. Do đó, cách tiếp cận của chúng ta không chỉ kiểm soát sức mạnh của phong cách, mà còn làm đơn giản kiến trúc mô hình. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả chuyển nhượng kiểu hay bảo tồn nội dung tốt hơn các phương pháp trước.', 'bg': 'Преобладаващият подход за пренос на текстов стил без надзор е разгръщането между съдържание и стил. Въпреки това е трудно напълно да се отдели стиловата информация от съдържанието. Други подходи позволяват латентното представяне на текст да съдържа стил, а целевият стил да влияе на генерирания изход повече, отколкото латентното представяне. И при двата подхода обаче е невъзможно да се коригира силата на стила в генерирания изход. Освен това тези предишни подходи обикновено изпълняват както задачите за реконструкция на изреченията, така и контрола на стила в един модел, което усложнява цялостната архитектура. В настоящата статия разглеждаме тези въпроси като разделим модела на модул за реконструкция на изречение и модул за стил. Използваме модела на трансформатор за реконструкция на изречения, а адаптивното вграждане на стил се научава директно в модула за стил. Поради това разделяне всеки модул може по-добре да се съсредоточи върху собствената си задача. Освен това можем да променим силата на стила на генерираното изречение чрез промяна на стила на вграждащия израз. Ето защо нашият подход не само контролира силата на стила, но и опростява архитектурата на модела. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход постига по-добра производителност при трансфер на стил и запазване на съдържанието в сравнение с предишните подходи.', 'da': 'Den fremherskende tilgang til overførsel af ikke-overvåget tekststil er adskillelse mellem indhold og stil. Det er dog svært at adskille stiloplysninger helt fra indholdet. Andre fremgangsmåder gør det muligt for den latente tekstrepræsentation at indeholde stil, og målstilen at påvirke den genererede output mere end den latente repræsentation gør. I begge tilgange er det imidlertid umuligt at justere styrken af stilen i den genererede output. Desuden udfører de tidligere tilgange typisk både sætningsreduktion og stilkontrolopgaver i en enkelt model, hvilket komplicerer den overordnede arkitektur. I denne artikel behandler vi disse spørgsmål ved at adskille modellen i et sætnings rekonstruktionsmodul og et stilmodul. Vi bruger den Transformer-baserede autoencoder model til sætning rekonstruktion, og den adaptive stil indlejring læres direkte i stilmodulet. På grund af denne adskillelse kan hvert modul bedre fokusere på sin egen opgave. Desuden kan vi variere stilstyrken af den genererede sætning ved at ændre stilen af indlejringsudtrykket. Derfor styrer vores tilgang ikke kun stilens styrke, men forenkler også modelarkitekturen. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang opnår bedre stil overførsel ydeevne og indholdsbeskyttelse end tidligere tilgange.', 'nl': 'De meest voorkomende benadering voor de overdracht van tekststijlen zonder toezicht is de ontkoppeling tussen inhoud en stijl. Het is echter moeilijk om stijlinformatie volledig van de inhoud te scheiden. Andere benaderingen maken het mogelijk dat de latente tekstweergave stijl bevat en de doelstijl de gegenereerde uitvoer meer beïnvloedt dan de latente weergave. In beide benaderingen is het echter onmogelijk om de sterkte van de stijl in de gegenereerde output aan te passen. Bovendien voeren die eerdere benaderingen meestal zowel de zinnreconstructie als stijlbeheersingstaken uit in één model, wat de algehele architectuur bemoeilijkt. In dit artikel behandelen we deze problemen door het model te scheiden in een zinsreconstructiemodule en een stijlmodule. We gebruiken het op Transformer gebaseerde autoencoder model voor zinsreconstructie en de adaptieve stijl inbedding wordt direct geleerd in de stijlmodule. Door deze scheiding kan elke module zich beter focussen op zijn eigen taak. Bovendien kunnen we de stijlsterkte van de gegenereerde zin variëren door de stijl van de insluitexpressie te wijzigen. Daarom beheerst onze aanpak niet alleen de sterkte van de stijl, maar vereenvoudigt ook de modelarchitectuur. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak betere stijltransferprestaties en contentbehoud bereikt dan eerdere benaderingen.', 'hr': 'Prošireni pristup premještaju teksta stila neodređenog je rastavljanje između sadržaja i stila. Međutim, teško je potpuno odvojiti informacije o stilu od sadržaja. Drugi pristupi omogućavaju zastupanje latentnog teksta da sadrži stil i ciljni stil da utjecaju na proizvedeni izlaz više od latentne zastupe. Međutim, u oba pristupa, nemoguće je prilagoditi snagu stila u proizvedenom proizvodnju. Osim toga, ti prethodni pristupi obično obavljaju rekonstrukciju rečenice i kontrolu stila u jednom modelu, što komplicira ukupnu arhitekturu. U ovom papiru rješavamo te probleme razdvajanjem model a u modul rekonstrukcije rečenica i modul stila. Koristimo model autokodera na transformeri za rekonstrukciju rečenica, a adaptivni stil se uči direktno u modulu stila. Zbog ovog razdvajanja, svaki modul može bolje fokusirati na svoj zadatak. Osim toga, možemo promijeniti snagu stila proizvedene rečenice mijenjajući stil uključenog izraza. Stoga, naš pristup ne samo kontrolira snagu stila, već i pojednostavlja model arhitekture. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne bolji učinkovit prenošenja stila i očuvanje sadržaja nego prethodne pristupe.', 'de': 'Der gängige Ansatz für die unbeaufsichtigte Textstilübertragung ist die Trennung zwischen Inhalt und Stil. Es ist jedoch schwierig, Stilinformationen vollständig vom Inhalt zu trennen. Andere Ansätze erlauben es, dass die latente Textdarstellung Stil enthält und der Zielstil die generierte Ausgabe stärker beeinflusst als die latente Darstellung. In beiden Ansätzen ist es jedoch unmöglich, die Stärke des Stils in der generierten Ausgabe anzupassen. Darüber hinaus führen diese bisherigen Ansätze typischerweise sowohl die Satzkonstruktion als auch die Stilkontrolle in einem einzigen Modell aus, was die Gesamtarchitektur erschwert. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir diese Probleme, indem wir das Modell in ein Satzkonstruktionsmodul und ein Stilmodul unterteilen. Wir verwenden das Transformer-basierte Autoencoder-Modell zur Satzkonstruktion und die adaptive Stileinbettung wird direkt im Stilmodul erlernt. Durch diese Trennung kann sich jedes Modul besser auf seine eigene Aufgabe konzentrieren. Darüber hinaus können wir die Stilstärke des generierten Satzes variieren, indem wir den Stil des Einbettungsausdrucks ändern. Daher kontrolliert unser Ansatz nicht nur die Stärke des Stils, sondern vereinfacht auch die Modellarchitektur. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz eine bessere Style Transfer Performance und Content Bewahrung erreicht als bisherige Ansätze.', 'id': 'The prevalent approach for unsupervised text style transfer is disentanglement between content and style.  Namun, sulit untuk sepenuhnya memisahkan informasi gaya dari isi. Other approaches allow the latent text representation to contain style and the target style to affect the generated output more than the latent representation does.  Dalam kedua pendekatan, bagaimanapun, mustahil untuk menyesuaikan kekuatan gaya dalam output yang dihasilkan. Selain itu, pendekatan sebelumnya biasanya melakukan tugas rekonstruksi kalimat dan kontrol gaya dalam satu model, yang rumit arsitektur umum. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengatasi masalah ini dengan memisahkan model ke modul rekonstruksi kalimat dan modul gaya. Kami menggunakan model auto-encoder berasasi Transformer untuk rekonstruksi kalimat dan penambahan gaya adaptif belajar langsung dalam modul gaya. Karena pemisahan ini, setiap modul bisa lebih baik fokus pada tugasnya sendiri. Selain itu, kita dapat mengubah kekuatan gaya kalimat yang dihasilkan dengan mengubah gaya ekspresi embedding. Oleh karena itu, pendekatan kita tidak hanya mengendalikan kekuatan gaya, tetapi juga menyederhanakan arsitektur model. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi transfer gaya yang lebih baik dan konservasi isi daripada pendekatan sebelumnya.', 'fa': 'روش فراوانی برای انتقال سبک متن غیرقابل استفاده میان محتویات و سبک است. با این حال، اطلاعات طرح کاملاً از محتویات جدا کردن سخت است. روش\u200cهای دیگر اجازه می\u200cدهد که نمایش متن latent را شامل طرح و طرح هدف باشد تا بیشتر از نمایش تاریخی به نتیجه تولید شود تأثیر دهد. ولی در هر دو نزدیک، قدرت سبک در نتیجه تولید کردن غیرممکن است. و همچنین، این دسترسی پیشینیان معمولاً هر دو کار کنترل مجدد و طرح را در یک مدل تک انجام می دهند، که معماری عمومی را پیچیده می کند. در این کاغذ، ما این مسائل را با جدا کردن مدل به یک مدل بازسازی جمله و یک مدل طریق حل می کنیم. ما از مدل\u200cهای خود\u200cکودر بر اساس تغییر\u200cدهنده برای بازسازی جمله استفاده می\u200cکنیم و استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از مدل\u200cهای خود\u200cکودر بر اساس تغییر\u200cدهنده برای بازسازی جمله و استفاده از استفاده\u200cهای مت به خاطر این جدایی، هر مدول می تواند به کار خودش تمرکز کند. علاوه بر این، ما می توانیم قدرت سبک جمله تولید را تغییر دهیم با تغییر سبک عبارت داخلی. بنابراین، دسترسی ما نه تنها قدرت سبک را کنترل می کند، بلکه معماری مدل را هم ساده می کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما انجام\u200cدهنده\u200cی انتقال شیوه\u200cهای بهتر و محافظت محتویات را از دستور قبلی می\u200cرساند.', 'ko': '무감독 텍스트의 스타일 전환의 보편적인 방법은 내용과 스타일 간의 분리이다.그러나 스타일 정보와 내용을 완전히 분리하기는 어렵다.다른 방법은 잠재적인 텍스트 표시가 스타일을 포함하는 것을 허용하고, 목표 스타일은 잠재적인 표시보다 생성된 출력에 영향을 미친다.그러나 이 두 가지 방법 중 생성된 출력에서 스타일의 강도를 조정할 수 없다.그 밖에 이런 이전의 방법은 보통 한 모델에서 문장 재건과 스타일 제어 임무를 집행하기 때문에 전체적인 구조를 복잡하게 한다.본고에서 우리는 모델을 문장 재구성 모듈과 스타일 모듈로 나누어 이런 문제점을 해결한다.우리는 변압기 기반의 자동 인코더 모형을 사용하여 문장을 재구성하고 스타일 모듈에서 직접 스타일에 맞는 삽입을 배운다.이런 분리로 인해 모든 모듈은 자신의 임무에 더욱 집중할 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 삽입식 표현식의 풍격을 바꾸어 문장을 생성하는 풍격의 강도를 바꿀 수 있다.따라서 우리의 방법은 양식의 강도를 제어할 뿐만 아니라 모델 구조도 간소화시켰다.실험 결과 이전의 방법에 비해 우리의 방법은 더욱 좋은 스타일 전환 성능과 내용 보존을 실현하였다.', 'sw': 'Hatua mbaya ya uhamishaji wa mtindo wa maandishi usio na uhakika ni kupunguzwa kati ya maudhui na mtindo. Hata hivyo, ni vigumu kabisa kutofautisha taarifa za mtindo kutoka kwenye maudhui. Matokeo mengine yanaruhusu uwakilishi wa maandishi ya hivi karibuni kuhusiana na mtindo na mtindo wa lengo ili kuathiri matokeo yaliyozaliwa zaidi ya uwakilishi wa hivi karibuni. Katika hatua zote mbili, hata hivyo, haiwezekani kuboresha nguvu ya mtindo katika matokeo yaliyozaliwa. Zaidi yake, mbinu hizo zilizopita kwa kawaida zinafanya kazi za ujenzi na udhibiti wa mtindo huo katika mtindo mmoja, ambalo linachanganya majengo yote. Katika gazeti hili, tunazungumzia masuala haya kwa kutenganisha muundo katika kituo cha ujenzi na kiungo cha mtindo. Tunatumia muundo wa kodi wa zamani kwa ajili ya kujenga tena hukumu na mtindo wa kujichanganya unajifunza moja kwa moja katika mfumo wa mtindo. Because of this separation, each module can better focus on its own task.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunaweza tofauti na nguvu ya mtindo wa hukumu iliyotengenezwa kwa kubadilisha mtindo wa kujieleza. Kwa hiyo, mbinu yetu sio tu kudhibiti nguvu ya mtindo huu, bali pia inasahaulisha ujenzi wa modeli. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inafanikiwa utendaji bora wa usafirishaji wa mtindo na uhakikishaji wa maudhui kuliko njia zilizopita.', 'tr': 'Mazmunlanmadyk metin biçiminden geçirmek üçin öňün gollaşyk maksady we biçiminden aýrylmakdır. Ýöne, stil maglumatyny daşary aýratmak kyn. Başga arşiw, soňky metin namaýyşynyň stili we maksady biçiminden näbelli etmek üçin gelen çiftliki geçmişki namaýyşyndan köpä mümkin edir. Emma iki golaýda ýakynlanan çykyş içindeki stiliň güýsüni bejermek mümkin däl. Munuň üçin öňki golaýlary hem sözleriň ýene-de bir nusgada ýene-de ýene-de bir nusgada ýene-de ýene-de bir nusga ýerleşýär. Bu bütin arhitektura karmaýarlar. Bu kagyzda, nusganyň nusgyny sözlemleriň täzeden düzenleme modulyna a ýryp, bu meseleleri çözýäris Biz sözleri ýene in şa etmek üçin Transformer tabanly otoködleme nusgasyny ulanýarys we adaptiv stil gaýşartmaky modunda düzgün öwrenip bileris. Bu aýryşdyrma sebäbi, her modul öz zadyny gowy görkezip biler. Munuň üçin, biz döredilen sözleniň stilini üýtgedip üýtgedip bileris. Şol sebäpli, biziň ýaryşymyz diňe stiliň güýsüni kontrol edip ýöne nusgasyny hem basitleşdirýär. Durmançylyk netijeleri biziň ýaryşymyzyň öňki ýaryşymyzdan gowy stil göçürmegi we maksadyny goramagymyzy başarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Die oorspronklike toegang vir ononderwerpende teks-styl oordrag is ontskakeling tussen inhoud en styl. Maar dit is moeilik om volledig styl inligting van die inhoud te skei. Ander toegang laat toe die latente teks voorstelling om styl en die doel styl te bevat om die genereerde uitvoer meer as die latente voorstelling te beïnvloor. In beide toegang is dit egter onmoontlik om die sterkte van die styl in die genereerde uitvoer te korrigeer. Ook, daardie vorige toegang tipies uitvoer beide die setnings herkonstruksie en styl beheer opdragte in 'n enkele model, wat die hele architektur kompliseer. In hierdie papier, ons adres hierdie probleme deur die model te skei binne 'n seting herkonstruksie module en 'n styl module. Ons gebruik die Transformer- gebaseerde outokoder model vir seting herkonstruksie en die adaptief styl inbêer is geleer direk in die styl module. Omdat hierdie skeiding, kan elke module beter fokus op sy eie taak. Ook kan ons die styl sterkte van die genereerde seting verander deur die styl van die ingesluiting uitdrukking te verander. Daarom, ons toegang bestuur nie net die krag van die styl nie, maar ook die model-arkitektuur eenvoudig. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons toegang beter styl oordrag-prestasie en inhoud-opserving bereik as vorige toegang.", 'sq': 'Përqafimi i përhershëm për transferimin e stilit të tekstit pa mbikqyrje është shpërndarja midis përmbajtjes dhe stilit. Megjithatë, është e vështirë të ndash plotësisht informacionin e stilit nga përmbajtja. Përqasjet e tjera lejojnë përfaqësimin e tekstit të fshehtë të përmbajë stilin dhe stilin objektiv për të ndikuar në daljen e gjeneruar më shumë se përfaqësimi i fshehtë. Në të dy qasjet, megjithatë, është e pamundur të rregullohet forca e stilit në daljen e gjeneruar. Përveç kësaj, këto qasje të mëparshme zakonisht kryejnë si rindërtimin e fjalëve si edhe detyrat e kontrollit të stilit në një model të vetëm, që komplikuan arkitekturën e përgjithshme. Në këtë letër, ne i trajtojmë këto çështje duke ndarë modelin në një modul rindërtimi të fjalëve dhe një modul stili. Ne përdorim model in e autokoduesit me bazë në Transformer për rindërtimin e fjalëve dhe integrimi i stilit adaptues mësohet drejtpërdrejt në modulin stil. Për shkak të këtij ndarjeje, çdo modul mund të përqëndrohet më mirë në detyrën e vet. Moreover, we can vary the style strength of the generated sentence by changing the style of the embedding expression.  Prandaj, qasja jonë jo vetëm kontrollon forcën e stilit, por gjithashtu thjeshton arkitekturën e modelit. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë arrin performancë më të mirë stili transferimi dhe ruajtja e përmbajtjes sesa qasjet e mëparshme.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ስፋት ለመቀናቀል የፊደል ሥርዓት በይዞታና በዓይነት መካከል ግንኙነት ነው። However, it is difficult to completely separate style information from the content.  ሌሎች ደረጃዎች አዲስ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ እና የዕቅድ ዓይነት እንዲያካክሉ ይፈቅዳሉ፤ የደረጃ ውጤት በተለየ በአሁኑ መልዕክት ይልቅ እንዲያስቀምጥ ይችላል። በሁለቱ ደረጃዎች ግን በተፈጠረ ውጤት ላይ የሥልጣን ኃይል ማሻል አይቻልም። ከዚህም በኋላ የቀድሞው የሥርዓት መሠረት እና የሥርዓት ሥርዓት በተለየ አንዲት ሞዴል ውስጥ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ሞዴላውን ወደ ቃላት መሠረት ሞዴል እና የዓይነት ሞዴል በመለየት እናስረዳለን፡፡ የፊደል ሠሌዳው አካባቢ አካባቢ ሞዴል ለመሠረት እና በሥርዓት ሞዴል ውስጥ አስተማርታለን፡፡ ስለዚህ መለያየት፣ እያንዳንዱ ሞዴል በራሱ ስራ ላይ ትክክል ይችላል፡፡ ደግሞም የአውቀው የፍርድ ሥርዓት ኃይልን በመለወጥ አካባቢ መልዕክትን በመለወጥ እናልቃለን፡፡ ስለዚህም የዓይነታችንን ኃይል ብቻ አይገልጥም፥ ነገር ግን የሞዴል መሠረት አቅራቢ ነው፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ከመጀመሪያው ደረጃዎች ይልቅ የሚሻለውን የዓይነት ስልጣን እና የሆኑን መጠበቅ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': "Անվերահսկված տեքստի ոճի փոխանցման հիմնական մոտեցումը պարունակության և ոճի միջև բաժանման է: Այնուամենայնիվ, դժվար է ամբողջովին առանձնացնել ոճի տեղեկատվությունը պարունակությունից: Other approaches allow the latent text representation to contain style and the target style to affect the generated output more than the latent representation does.  Սակայն երկու մոտեցումներում անհնար է հարմարեցնել ստեղծված ելքի ոճի ուժը: Ավելին, նախորդ մոտեցումները սովորաբար կատարում են նախադասությունների վերակառուցման և ոճի վերահսկման խնդիրները մեկ մոդելի մեջ, ինչը բարդ է դարձնում ողջ ճարտարապետությունը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք այս խնդիրները' բաժանելով մոդելը նախադասությունների վերականգնման մոդուլների և ոճի մոդուլների մեջ: Մենք օգտագործում ենք ավտոկոդերի մոդելը նախադասությունների վերականգնման համար, և ադապտիվ ոճի ներգրավումը անմիջապես սովորվում է ոճի մոդելում: Այս բաժանման պատճառով յուրաքանչյուր մոդուլը ավելի լավ կարող է կենտրոնանալ իր սեփական խնդրի վրա: Ավելին, մենք կարող ենք փոխել ստեղծված նախադասության ոճի ուժը փոխելով ներառված արտահայտության ոճը: Այսպիսով, մեր մոտեցումը ոչ միայն կառավարում է ոճի ուժը, այլ նաև պարզաբանում է ճարտարապետական մոդելը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը հասնում է ավելի լավ ոճի փոխանցման արդյունքների և պարունակության պահպանության, քան նախորդ մոտեցումները:", 'az': 'Müəyyən edilməmiş mətn stili tərəfindən istifadə edilməyən çox yaxınlıq məlumat və stil arasındakı tərəfindən ayrılmaqdır. Ancaq məlumatlardan tamamilə stil məlumatını ayırmaq çətin. Başqa yollar latent metin göstəricisinin stili və məqsəd stili olaraq yaratdığı çıxışı latent göstəricisindən daha çox təsir edir. Ancaq hər ikisinin yaxınlıqlarında yaratdığı çıxartdığı stilin gücünü düzəltmək imkansız. Daha sonra, əvvəlki tərəflər genellikle cümlənin yenidən in şallaşdırması və stil kontrol işlərini tək modellərdə təşkil edir, bu da bütün arhitektura karmaşdırır. Bu kağızda, modelini yenidən inşa modulu və stil modulu bölüşdürərək bu məsələləri çəkirik. Biz Transformer tabanlı avtomatik kodlayıcı modelini cümlədən yenidən in şa etmək üçün istifadə edirik və adaptiv stil inşa edilməsi modulu dərhal öyrənirik. Bu ayrılığın səbəbi, hər modul öz işinə daha yaxşı odaklanabilir. Daha sonra, biz yaratdığımız cümlənin stili gücünü dəyişdirə bilərik, içərisində olan ifadənin stilini dəyişdirə bilərik. Beləliklə, bizim yaxınlığımız ancaq stilin gücünü kontrol edir, lakin modeli arhitektürünü də asanlaşdırır. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçlarımız əvvəlki təcrübələrdən daha yaxşı stil transfer performansını və məlumatı qoruyacağını göstərir.', 'bn': 'অরক্ষিত টেক্সট স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের জন্য পূর্ববর্তী পদক্ষেপ হচ্ছে বিষয়বস্তু এবং শৈল্পের মধ্যে অস্থিরতা। তবে বিষয়বস্তুর তথ্য পুরোপুরি বিচ্ছিন্ন করা খুব কঠিন। অন্যান্য উপায় সাম্প্রতিক টেক্সট প্রতিনিধিত্ব অনুমোদন করে সাম্প্রতিক প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে স্টাইল এবং লক্ষ্যবস্তুর শৈ In both approaches, however, it is impossible to adjust the strength of the style in the generated output.  এছাড়াও, পূর্ববর্তীদের প্রতিক্রিয়া সাধারণত একটি মডেলে বাক্য পুনর্গঠন এবং স্টাইল নিয়ন্ত্রণের কাজ পূর্ণ করে, যা সাধারণত আর্কা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মডেলটিকে একটি বাক্য পুনর্গঠন মডিউল এবং একটি স্টাইল মডিউলের মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন করে এই সমস্ত বিষয়গুলোর বিষয়ে আমরা ট্রান্সফার্ন ভিত্তিক স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক কোডার মডেল ব্যবহার করি বাক্য পুনর্গঠনের জন্য এবং স্ এই বিচ্ছিন্ন কারণে, প্রত্যেক মডিউল নিজের কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিতে পারে। এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রজন্মিত বাক্যের স্টাইল শক্তি বিভিন্ন হতে পারি এমপেডিং প্রকাশের ধরন পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে। তাই, আমাদের ক্ষেত্র শুধুমাত্র এই ধরনের শক্তি নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে না, বরং মডেলের কাঠামো সহজ করে দেয়। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পূর্ববর্তী পদক্ষেপের চেয়ে ভালো স্টাইল পরিবর্তন এবং বিষয়বস্তু সং', 'bs': 'Prošireni pristup premještaju teksta stila je rastavljanje između sadržaja i stila. Međutim, teško je potpuno odvojiti informacije o stilu od sadržaja. Drugi pristupi omogućavaju zastupanje latentnog teksta da sadrži stil i ciljni stil da utiče na proizvedeni izlaz više od latentne zastupe. Međutim, u oba pristupa, nemoguće je prilagoditi snagu stila u proizvedenom proizvodnju. Osim toga, ti prethodni pristupi obično obavljaju rekonstrukciju rečenice i kontrolu stila u jednom modelu, koji komplicira ukupnu arhitekturu. U ovom papiru rješavamo te probleme razdvajanjem model a u rekonstrukcijski modul rečenice i modul stila. Koristimo model autokodera na transformeri za rekonstrukciju rečenica i adaptivni stil se uči direktno u modulu stila. Zbog ovog razdvajanja, svaki modul može bolje fokusirati na svoj zadatak. Osim toga, možemo promijeniti snagu stila proizvedene rečenice mijenjajući stil uključenog izraza. Stoga, naš pristup ne samo kontrolira snagu stila, već i jednostavlja model arhitekture. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne bolje učinkovitost transfera stila i očuvanje sadržaja od prethodnih pristupa.', 'ca': "L'enfocament prevalent per a la transfer ència no supervisada d'estil de text és la desseparació entre contingut i estil. Però és difícil separar completament la informació d'estil del contingut. D'altres enfocaments permeten que la representació del text latent conté estil i l'estil alvo afecten la producció generada més que la representació latent. En ambdós enfocaments, no obstant això, és impossible ajustar la força de l'estil en la producció generada. A més, aquests enfocaments anteriors normalment realitzen tant les tasques de reconstrucció de frases com de control d'estil en un únic model, que complica l'arquitectura global. En aquest article, abordem aquests problemes separant el model en un módul de reconstrucció de frases i un módul d'estil. Utilitzem el model d'autocodificador basat en Transformer per a la reconstrucció de frases i l'incorporació d'estil adaptatiu es aprene directament al módul d'estil. Gràcies a aquesta separació, cada mòdul pot centrar-se millor en la seva pròpia tasca. A més, podem canviar la força d'estil de la frase generada canviant l'estil de l'expressió incorporadora. Therefore, our approach not only controls the strength of the style, but also simplifies the model architecture.  Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament aconsegueix millor rendiment de transfer ència d'estil i preservació del contingut que els anteriors.", 'et': 'Järelevalveta tekstistiilide ülekandmise valdav lähenemisviis on sisu ja stiili lahutamine. Siiski on raske stiiliteavet sisust täielikult eraldada. Teised lähenemisviisid võimaldavad latentse teksti esitusel sisaldada laadi ja sihtlaadil mõjutada genereeritud väljundit rohkem kui latentne esitus. Mõlema lähenemisviisi puhul on siiski võimatu kohandada stiili tugevust genereeritud väljundis. Lisaks täidavad need varasemad lähenemisviisid tavaliselt nii lause rekonstrueerimise kui ka stiilikontrolli ülesandeid ühes mudelis, mis raskendab üldist arhitektuuri. Käesolevas töös käsitleme neid küsimusi, eraldades mudeli lauserekonstruktsiooni mooduliks ja stiilimooduliks. Me kasutame lause rekonstrueerimiseks Transformer-põhist autokodeerijat ja adaptiivse stiili manustamist õpib otse stiilimoodulis. Selle eraldamise tõttu saab iga moodul paremini keskenduda oma ülesandele. Lisaks saame genereeritud lause stiilitugevust muuta, muutes põhiavaldise stiili. Seetõttu ei kontrolli meie lähenemisviis mitte ainult stiili tugevust, vaid lihtsustab ka mudeli arhitektuuri. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis saavutab parema stiiliülekande ja sisu säilitamise kui varasemad lähenemisviisid.', 'cs': 'Převládajícím přístupem k přenosu textových stylů bez dohledu je oddělení obsahu a stylu. Je však obtížné zcela oddělit informace o stylu od obsahu. Jiné přístupy umožňují latentní reprezentaci textu obsahovat styl a cílový styl ovlivnit generovaný výstup více než latentní reprezentace. V obou přístupech je však nemožné upravit sílu stylu v generovaném výstupu. Tyto předchozí přístupy navíc obvykle provádějí jak rekonstrukci věty, tak úlohy řízení stylu v jednom modelu, což komplikuje celkovou architekturu. V tomto článku se těmito problémy zabýváme rozdělením modelu na modul rekonstrukce věty a modul stylu. Pro rekonstrukci vět používáme model autokodéru založený na Transformeru a adaptivní styl vložení se naučí přímo v modulu stylu. Díky tomuto oddělení se každý modul může lépe soustředit na svůj vlastní úkol. Kromě toho můžeme změnit styl vygenerované věty změnou stylu vloženého výrazu. Proto náš přístup nejen řídí sílu stylu, ale také zjednodušuje architekturu modelu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup dosahuje lepšího výkonu přenosu stylu a zachování obsahu než předchozí přístupy.', 'fi': 'Yleinen lähestymistapa valvomattomaan tekstityylin siirtoon on sisällön ja tyylin erottaminen toisistaan. Tyylitietojen erottaminen sisällöstä on kuitenkin vaikeaa. Muiden lähestymistapojen avulla piilevä tekstiesitys voi sisältää tyyliä ja kohdetyyli vaikuttaa luotuun tulosteeseen enemmän kuin piilevä esitys. Molemmissa lähestymistavoissa on kuitenkin mahdotonta säätää tyylin vahvuutta luodussa tuotoksessa. Lisäksi nämä aiemmat lähestymistavat suorittavat tyypillisesti sekä lauserekonstruktion että tyylinhallinnan tehtävät yhdessä mallissa, mikä vaikeuttaa kokonaisarkkitehtuuria. Tässä työssä käsittelemme näitä kysymyksiä erottamalla mallin lauserekonstruktiomoduuliksi ja tyylimoduuliksi. Käytämme Transformer-pohjaista automaattikooderimallia lauseiden rekonstruktioon ja adaptiivinen tyyliupotus opitaan suoraan tyylimoduulissa. Tämän erottelun vuoksi jokainen moduuli voi keskittyä paremmin omaan tehtäväänsä. Lisäksi voimme muuttaa luodun lauseen tyylivahvuutta muuttamalla upotuslausekkeen tyyliä. Siksi lähestymistapamme ei ainoastaan ohjaa tyylin vahvuutta, vaan myös yksinkertaistaa malliarkkitehtuuria. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme saavuttaa aikaisempia lähestymistapoja paremman tyylinsiirtokyvyn ja sisällön säilymisen.', 'sk': 'Prevladujoč pristop za nenadzorovan prenos sloga besedila je ločevanje med vsebino in slogom. Vendar pa je težko popolnoma ločiti slogovne informacije od vsebine. Drugi pristopi omogočajo, da latentna predstavitev besedila vsebuje slog, ciljni slog pa bolj vpliva na ustvarjeni izhod kot latentna predstavitev. V obeh pristopih pa je nemogoče prilagoditi moč sloga v ustvarjenem izhodu. Poleg tega ti prejšnji pristopi običajno opravljajo tako rekonstrukcijo stavkov kot nadzor sloga v enem modelu, kar otežuje celotno arhitekturo. V prispevku obravnavamo ta vprašanja tako, da model ločimo v modul rekonstrukcije stavka in modul sloga. Za rekonstrukcijo stavkov uporabljamo model samokodirnika, ki temelji na transformatorju, prilagodljivo vgradnjo sloga pa se naučimo neposredno v modulu sloga. Zaradi te ločitve se lahko vsak modul bolje osredotoči na svojo nalogo. Poleg tega lahko spremenimo moč sloga ustvarjenega stavka tako, da spremenimo slog vdelanega izraza. Zato naš pristop ne samo nadzoruje moči sloga, temveč tudi poenostavlja arhitekturo modela. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop dosega boljšo učinkovitost prenosa sloga in ohranjanje vsebine kot prejšnji pristopi.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kayya, ma'anar in rarraba zane-zane daga kayan. Zai yarda da wasu shiryoyi masu motsi da matsayin na ƙarani da za'a ƙunsa da salon da ake yiwuwa don ya yi amfani da Outaton wanda aka ƙãga, don ya ƙari da ake nuna. @ action: button Moreover, those previous approaches typically perform both the sentence reconstruction and style control tasks in a single model, which complicates the overall architecture.  Daga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya masu abun ayuka da za'a rarraba shirin ayuka zuwa moduli mai canza salon da shirin salon. Tuna amfani da misãlin kodkode farat ɗaya cikin shirin ayuka na Transformer don a sami tsarin da aka shigar da shi yana cikin shirin ayuka. Dukan wannan rabo, kõwane moduli yana iya da amfani da aikin kansa. Za kuma, za mu canza tsarin halin maganar da aka ƙãga da shi, ko za mu canza tsarin maganar da aka shigar da shi. Saboda haka, hanyarmu bã zai iya mallakar ƙarfin mai tsari kawai, kuma amma yana mai sauƙin matsayin misalin. Matarin jarrabai na nũna cewa hanyarmu za'a sãmu mafiya alhẽri ga shawarar shida da da tsari da tsari cikin tsari daga hanyoyin zaman.", 'he': 'הגישה המפורסמת להעברת סגנון טקסט ללא השגחה היא התפרצות בין התוכן לסגנון. עם זאת, קשה להפריד מידע בסגנון לחלוטין מהתוכן. גישות אחרות מאפשרות לייצג הטקסט הלאונט לכלול סגנון וסגנון המטרה להשפיע על היציאה המיוצרת יותר מאשר לייצג הלאונט. בכל אופן, בשתי גישות, בלתי אפשרי להתאים את כוח הסגנון בתוצאה המיוצרת. חוץ מזה, גישות קודמות אלה מבצעות בדרך כלל את משימות שיחזור המשפטים ובשליטה בסגנון במודל אחד, שמסבכים את הארכיטקטורה הכללית. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם הנושאים האלה על ידי הפרדת הדוגמנית למודוד שיחזור משפטים ומודוד סגנון. אנו משתמשים בדוגמא של קודד אוטומטי מבוסס בטרנספורר לבניית מחדש משפטים והקיצוב הסגנון המתאים נלמד ישירות במודוד הסגנון. בגלל ההפרדה הזאת, כל מודול יכול להתמקד טוב יותר במשימה שלו. חוץ מזה, אנחנו יכולים לשנות את כוח הסגנון של המשפט המיוצר על ידי שינוי הסגנון של הביטוי ההכניסה. לכן, הגישה שלנו לא רק שולטת בכוח הסגנון, אלא גם מפשטת את הארכיטקטורה המודל. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהגישה שלנו משיגה ביצועים טובים יותר בעבורת סגנון ושמורת תוכן מאשר גישות קודמות.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Nanging, aku susah-susahe kanggo ngerasakno informasi jeneng susahe Alternate Nanging sampeyan akeh durung, dadi ora bisa nggawe gerakan nggawe strength nggo stil sing bisa gewis winih. Laptop" and "Desktop Nyong mapukan iki, kita ngomong alam-alam kuwi kesempatan iki bakal separah model nganggo module nambah werong sapar sampek lan module styl. ame Laopo sing separahan iki, sapa modul iso dianggawe nang sampeyan nggawe Label Kaya, yakuwis-yakuwis kuwi wis nguasar tentang kanggo tinggal stil, dadi iki dadi nyimpen architecture model. Pametuné sing paling nggambar kelas kuwi diantekaké awak dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan lan ijol-ijolan kanggo ngerayakno kanggo ngilanggar oleh operasi sing apik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛུགས་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་འདི་ནང་དོན་དང་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་དབར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། ནང་དོན་གྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་སོ་སོར་མེད་པར་ཐག་པོ་རེད། Other approaches allow the latent text representation to contain style and the target style to affect the generated output more than the latent representation does. ཡིན་ནའང་། གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། Moreover, those previous approaches typically perform both the sentence reconstruction and style control tasks in a single model, which complicates the overall architecture. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཅིག་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བྱེད་དུ་འཇ We use the Transformer-based autoencoder model for sentence reconstruction and the adaptive style embedding is learned directly in the style module. དབྱེ་སྟངས་འདིའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི། མི་དབྱེ་བ་རེ་རེ་རེར་སོ་སོའི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཐུབ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐུད་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་བཟོ་རྣམ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་འདྲ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་གཅིག་ལས་མིན་པར། རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་མཐུ Experimental Results show that our approach achieves better style transfer performance and content conservation than previous approaches.'}
{'en': 'Grammatical error detection in transcriptions of spoken English', 'ar': 'كشف الأخطاء النحوية في نسخ اللغة الإنجليزية المنطوقة', 'pt': 'Detecção de erros gramaticais em transcrições de inglês falado', 'es': 'Detección de errores gramaticales en las transcripciones del inglés hablado', 'fr': "Détection d'erreurs grammaticales dans les transcriptions de l'anglais parlé", 'ja': '口語英語の文字起こしにおける文法的誤り検出', 'zh': '英语口语转录中语法错误检测', 'hi': 'बोली जाने वाली अंग्रेजी के प्रतिलेखन में व्याकरणिक त्रुटि का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение грамматических ошибок в транскрипциях разговорного английского языка', 'ga': 'Brath earráidí gramadaí i trascríobh Béarla labhartha', 'hu': 'Nyelvtani hibák felismerése a beszélt angol átiratokban', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση γραμματικών σφαλμάτων σε μεταγραφές προφορικών Αγγλικών', 'ka': 'Grammatical error detection in transcriptions of spoken English', 'it': "Rilevamento di errori grammaticali nelle trascrizioni dell'inglese parlato", 'mk': 'Детектирање граматски грешки во транскриптите на говорен англиски', 'ms': 'Pengesanan ralat grammatik dalam transkripsi bahasa Inggeris bercakap', 'mt': 'Sejbien ta’ żbalji grammatiċi fit-traskrizzjonijiet tal-Ingliż mitkellm', 'lt': 'Gramatinių klaidų nustatymas kalbos anglų transkripcijose', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа олох нь Англи хэлний шинжилгээнд', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тілінде граматикалық қате анықтау', 'no': 'Gramatisk feiloppdaging i overskrifter av talet engelsk', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ രേഖകളില്\u200d ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'ro': 'Detectarea erorilor gramaticale în transcrierile limbii engleze vorbite', 'si': 'භාවිත ඇන්ග්\u200dරීසියේ ග්\u200dරාමාතික වැරදි හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Baaritaanka qaladka takhasaarka ah ee qoraalka afka Ingiriis', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie błędów gramatycznych w transkrypcjach mówionego języka angielskiego', 'sv': 'Grammatisk felupptäckt i transkriptioner av talad engelska', 'ur': 'زبان انگلیسی کے ترنسکریپٹوں میں گرامٹیکل خطا شناسایی', 'sr': 'Gramatièno otkrivanje greške u prepisama govornog engleskog', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Inglizcha taʼminlovchilarda grammatikal xatolik aniqlanmoqda', 'vi': 'Phát hiện lỗi máy trong các đoạn ghi âm tiếng Anh', 'nl': 'Grammatische foutdetectie in transcripties van gesproken Engels', 'hr': 'Gramatični otkrivanje greške u prepisama govornog engleskog', 'bg': 'Откриване на граматични грешки в транскрипциите на говоримия английски език', 'da': 'Grammatisk fejldetektion i transskriptioner af talt engelsk', 'de': 'Grammatische Fehlererkennung in Transkriptionen von gesprochenem Englisch', 'id': 'Deteksi kesalahan grammatik dalam transkripsi bahasa Inggris berbicara', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن خطای گراماتیک در ترجمه\u200cهای انگلیسی صحبت می\u200cشود', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa makosa ya kiganjani katika maandishi ya Kiingereza yanayozungumzwa', 'tr': 'Gürrülen iňlisçe terjime edilen hata açylyp', 'af': 'Gramatiese fout opdekking in transkripte van gespreek Engels', 'ko': '영어 구어 기록 중의 문법 오류 검출', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i gabimeve grammatike në transkriptimet e anglisht të folur', 'am': 'እንግሊዝኛ', 'hy': 'Գրամատիկ սխալների հայտնաբերումը խոսվող անգլերենի վերագրություններում', 'az': 'ńįngilizce dilind…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü t…ôkrarlarda Gramatik x…ôta keŇüif', 'bn': 'ইংরেজি সংক্রান্ত লেখায় গ্রামাটিক ত্রুটি সনাক্ত করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'Gramatično otkrivanje greška u prepisama govornog engleskog', 'cs': 'Gramatická detekce chyb v přepisech mluvené angličtiny', 'ca': "Detecció d'errors gramàtics en transcripcions d'anglès parlat", 'et': 'Grammatilise vea tuvastamine räägitava inglise keele transkriptsioonides', 'fi': 'Kielioppivirheiden havaitseminen puhutun englannin transkriptioissa', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'he': 'גילוי שגיאות גראמטיות בתכתיבות של אנגלית מדברת', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje slovničnih napak pri prepisovanju govorjene angleščine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བའི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ནང་ཚོར་བརྒྱུད་རིས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྟོགས་བྱེད་སྐབས་'}
{'en': 'We describe the collection of transcription corrections and grammatical error annotations for the CrowdED Corpus of spoken English monologues on business topics. The corpus recordings were crowdsourced from native speakers of English and learners of English with German as their first language. The new transcriptions and annotations are obtained from different crowdworkers : we analyse the 1108 new crowdworker submissions and propose that they can be used for automatic transcription post-editing and grammatical error correction for speech. To further explore the data we train grammatical error detection models with various configurations including pre-trained and contextual word representations as input, additional features and auxiliary objectives, and extra training data from written error-annotated corpora. We find that a model concatenating pre-trained and contextual word representations as input performs best, and that additional information does not lead to further performance gains.', 'ar': 'نحن نصف مجموعة تصحيحات النسخ وتعليقات الأخطاء النحوية لمجموعة CrowdED للمونولوجات الإنجليزية المنطوقة حول مواضيع الأعمال. تم جمع تسجيلات المجموعة من الناطقين الأصليين للغة الإنجليزية ومتعلمي اللغة الإنجليزية مع الألمانية كلغة أولى. تم الحصول على النسخ والتعليقات التوضيحية الجديدة من عمال جماعي مختلفين: نقوم بتحليل 1108 تقديمات جديدة للعمال الجماعي ونقترح إمكانية استخدامها للتحرير التلقائي للنسخ اللاحق وتصحيح الأخطاء النحوية للكلام. لمزيد من استكشاف البيانات ، نقوم بتدريب نماذج اكتشاف الأخطاء النحوية مع تكوينات مختلفة بما في ذلك تمثيلات الكلمات السياقية والمدربة مسبقًا كمدخلات ، وميزات إضافية وأهداف مساعدة ، وبيانات تدريب إضافية من مجموعة نصية مكتوبة بها أخطاء. نجد أن نموذجًا يدمج تمثيلات الكلمات السياقية والمدربة مسبقًا كمدخلات يحقق أداءً أفضل ، وأن المعلومات الإضافية لا تؤدي إلى مزيد من مكاسب الأداء.', 'pt': 'Descrevemos a coleção de correções de transcrição e anotações de erros gramaticais para o CrowdED Corpus de monólogos falados em inglês sobre tópicos de negócios. As gravações do corpus foram crowdsourced de falantes nativos de inglês e alunos de inglês com alemão como primeira língua. As novas transcrições e anotações são obtidas de diferentes crowdworkers: analisamos as 1108 novas submissões de crowdworker e propomos que possam ser usadas para pós-edição de transcrição automática e correção de erros gramaticais para fala. Para explorar ainda mais os dados, treinamos modelos de detecção de erros gramaticais com várias configurações, incluindo representações de palavras pré-treinadas e contextuais como entrada, recursos adicionais e objetivos auxiliares e dados extras de treinamento de corpora anotados com erros escritos. Descobrimos que um modelo que concatena representações de palavras pré-treinadas e contextuais como entrada tem melhor desempenho e que informações adicionais não levam a maiores ganhos de desempenho.', 'fr': "Nous décrivons la collection de corrections de transcription et d'annotations d'erreurs grammaticales pour le Corpus de monologues anglais parlés sur des sujets commerciaux. Les enregistrements du corpus ont été obtenus auprès de locuteurs natifs de l'anglais et d'apprenants de l'anglais dont l'allemand est la langue maternelle. Les nouvelles transcriptions et annotations sont obtenues auprès de différents travailleurs participatifs\xa0: nous analysons les 1108 nouvelles soumissions de crowdworkers et proposons qu'elles puissent être utilisées pour la post-édition automatique de la transcription et la correction des erreurs grammaticales pour la parole. Pour explorer davantage les données, nous entraînons des modèles de détection d'erreurs grammaticales avec diverses configurations, y compris des représentations de mots préentraînées et contextuelles en entrée, des fonctionnalités supplémentaires et des objectifs auxiliaires, ainsi que des données d'entraînement supplémentaires à partir de corpus annotés d'erreurs écrites. Nous constatons qu'un modèle concaténant des représentations de mots préentraînées et contextuelles en tant qu'entrée donne les meilleurs résultats, et que des informations supplémentaires ne conduisent pas à des gains de performance supplémentaires.", 'es': 'Describimos la colección de correcciones de transcripción y anotaciones de errores gramaticales para el Crowded Corpus de monólogos en inglés hablado sobre temas de negocios. Las grabaciones del corpus fueron colaboradas por hablantes nativos de inglés y estudiantes de inglés con el alemán como lengua materna. Las nuevas transcripciones y anotaciones se obtienen de diferentes trabajadores colectivos: analizamos las 1108 nuevas presentaciones de trabajadores colectivos y proponemos que se puedan utilizar para la postedición automática de transcripciones y la corrección de errores gramaticales para el habla. Para explorar más a fondo los datos, entrenamos modelos de detección de errores gramaticales con varias configuraciones, incluidas representaciones de palabras contextuales y preentrenadas como entrada, funciones adicionales y objetivos auxiliares, y datos de entrenamiento adicionales de corpus escritos con anotaciones de errores. Encontramos que un modelo que concatena representaciones de palabras preentrenadas y contextuales como entrada funciona mejor, y que la información adicional no conduce a mayores ganancias de rendimiento.', 'ja': '私たちは、ビジネストピックに関する英語の口語モノローグのCrowdEDコーパスのための転記修正と文法的誤りの注釈のコレクションについて説明します。 コーパス録音は、英語の母語話者とドイツ語を第一言語とする英語の学習者からクラウドソーシングされました。 新しいトランスクリプションとアノテーションは、さまざまなクラウドワーカーから取得されます。1108の新しいクラウドワーカーの提出物を分析し、自動トランスクリプションのポストエディットと文法上の誤り訂正に使用できることを提案します。 データをさらに調べるために、事前にトレーニングされた単語表現や文脈上の単語表現を入力として含むさまざまな構成を備えた文法的エラー検出モデル、追加の機能と補助目標、および書かれたエラーアノテーションされた組織からの追加のトレーニングデータをトレーニングします。 事前に訓練された単語表現と文脈上の単語表現を入力として連結するモデルが最も優れており、追加情報がさらなるパフォーマンス向上につながることはないことがわかっている。', 'zh': '述商主题英语口语独白之CrowdED语料库转录更与语法错误注合。 语料库录音从以英语为母语者,与以德语为第一语英语学者众包之。 新转录异注众包工作者:析1108新众包工作者,施于自转录译后辑语音语法纠错。 更探数据,以诸配练语法错误检测模形,包输预训上下文单词,附加特征、辅佐,及自书面误注语料库额外练数。 臣等按:先练与上下文单词相属为输,而附加信息不迁也。', 'hi': 'हम प्रतिलेखन सुधार और व्याकरणिक त्रुटि एनोटेशन के संग्रह का वर्णन व्यावसायिक विषयों पर बोली जाने वाली अंग्रेजी मोनोलॉग के क्राउडेड कॉर्पस के लिए करते हैं। कॉर्पस रिकॉर्डिंग को अंग्रेजी के मूल वक्ताओं और अंग्रेजी के शिक्षार्थियों से उनकी पहली भाषा के रूप में जर्मन के साथ क्राउडसोर्स किया गया था। नए प्रतिलेखन और एनोटेशन विभिन्न crowdworkers से प्राप्त कर रहे हैं: हम 1108 नए crowdworker प्रस्तुतियों का विश्लेषण और प्रस्ताव है कि वे स्वचालित प्रतिलेखन पोस्ट संपादन और भाषण के लिए व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार के लिए इस्तेमाल किया जा सकता है के लिए किया जा सकता है। डेटा का आगे पता लगाने के लिए हम इनपुट, अतिरिक्त सुविधाओं और सहायक उद्देश्यों, और लिखित त्रुटि-एनोटेट कॉर्पोरेट से अतिरिक्त प्रशिक्षण डेटा के रूप में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित और प्रासंगिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व सहित विभिन्न कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के साथ व्याकरणिक त्रुटि का पता लगाने वाले मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि इनपुट के रूप में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित और प्रासंगिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व को संयोजित करने वाला एक मॉडल सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है, और यह कि अतिरिक्त जानकारी आगे प्रदर्शन लाभ का कारण नहीं बनती है।', 'ru': 'Описан сборник коррекций транскрипции и аннотаций грамматических ошибок для CrowdED Corpus устных английских монологов на темы бизнеса. Корпусные записи были получены от носителей английского языка и изучающих английский язык с немецким в качестве их родного языка. Новые транскрипции и аннотации получены от разных краудработников: мы анализируем 1108 новых представлений краудработников и предлагаем использовать их для автоматического пост-редактирования транскрипции и исправления грамматических ошибок для речи. Для дальнейшего изучения данных мы обучаем грамматические модели обнаружения ошибок с различными конфигурациями, включая предварительно обученные и контекстные представления слов в качестве входных данных, дополнительные функции и вспомогательные цели, а также дополнительные обучающие данные из письменных корпусов с аннотациями ошибок. Мы находим, что модель, объединяющая предварительно обученные и контекстуальные представления слов в качестве входных данных, работает лучше, и что дополнительная информация не приводит к дальнейшему повышению производительности.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid cur síos ar bhailiú na gceartúchán trascríobh agus nótaí earráide gramadaí don CrowdED Corpus de chainteanna Béarla labhartha ar ábhair ghnó. Bhí na taifeadtaí corpais plódaithe ó chainteoirí dúchais an Bhéarla agus ó fhoghlaimeoirí Béarla a raibh Gearmáinis mar phríomhtheanga acu. Faightear na tras-scríbhinní agus nótaí nua ó slua-oibrithe éagsúla: déanaimid anailís ar na 1108 aighneacht nua oibrí slua-oibrithe agus molaimid gur féidir iad a úsáid le haghaidh iar-eagarthóireachta uathoibríoch trascríobh agus ceartú earráide gramadaí don chaint. Chun tuilleadh iniúchta a dhéanamh ar na sonraí déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí braite earráide gramadaí le cumraíochtaí éagsúla lena n-áirítear léirithe focal réamh-oilte agus comhthéacsúla mar ionchur, gnéithe breise agus cuspóirí cúnta, agus sonraí oiliúna breise ó chorpora scríofa atá anótáilte ag earráid. Feictear dúinn gurb é múnla a chomhcheanglaíonn léirithe réamhoilte agus comhthéacsúla focal mar ionchur is fearr a fheidhmíonn, agus nach n-eascraíonn tuilleadh gnóthachain feidhmíochta as faisnéis bhreise.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განახსენებთ ტრანქრიპტის კოლექცია და გრამმატიკური შეცდომის ანოტაციების კოლექტის კოლექტის კოლექტის კოლექტის კოლექტის კოლექტის შესა კჲპოსჟ ჱაოთჟანთ ბწჳა ოპჲბლვმთ ჲრ თნდლთიჟკთრვ დჲჟოჲეაპთ თ თნდლთიჟკთრვ სფთრვლთ ჟ დვპმანჟკთ კარჲ ოყპგთწ დჲჟოჲე. ახალი ტრანქპრებები და ამოტაციები განსხვავებული მუშაობლებიდან მიიღება: ჩვენ ანალიზებთ 1108 ახალი მუშაობელი მუშაობელი მუშაობელების მისამართებების და გვაქვს, რომ ისინი შეიძლება ავტომატური ტრანქპ მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენ გრამიტური შეცდომის მოდელების განვიცემებით, რაც განსხვავებულია კონფიგურაციების შესახებ, როგორც წინაშემოწმებული და კონტექსტური სიტყვების გამოსახულები, დამატებული ფუნქ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ მოდელი, რომელიც წინასწარმოადგენა საუკეთესო და კონტექსტური სიტყვას, რომელიც შემოწყვეტის საუკეთესო შესაძლებელია, და რომ დამატებული ინფორ', 'hu': 'A CrowdED Corpus beszélt angol monológjavításainak és nyelvtani hibajegyzéseinek gyűjteményét ismertetjük üzleti témákban. A korpusz felvételeket angol anyanyelvűktől és angol nyelvtanulóktól származó közösségi forrásokból készítették, németül, mint anyanyelvük. Az új átiratok és jegyzékek különböző crowdworkerektől származnak: elemezzük az 1108 új crowdworker beadványt, és javasoljuk, hogy azok felhasználhatók legyenek automatikus átírás utánszerkesztésre és nyelvtani hibajavításra. Az adatok további feltárásához nyelvtani hibaészlelési modelleket képzünk különböző konfigurációkkal, beleértve az előzetesen képzett és kontextuális szóreprezentációkat bemenetként, további funkciókat és kiegészítő célkitűzéseket, valamint az írott hibajegyzetekkel ellátott korpusokból származó további képzési adatokat. Úgy találjuk, hogy az előre képzett és kontextuális szóreprezentációkat bemenetként összekapcsoló modell teljesít a legjobban, és hogy a további információk nem vezetnek további teljesítménynövekedéshez.', 'el': 'Περιγράφουμε τη συλλογή διορθώσεων μεταγραφής και σχολίων γραμματικών σφαλμάτων για το Σώμα προφορικών αγγλικών μονολόγων σε επιχειρηματικά θέματα. Οι ηχογραφήσεις του σώματος προέρχονται από φυσικούς ομιλητές της αγγλικής γλώσσας και από μαθητές της αγγλικής γλώσσας με τα γερμανικά ως πρώτη τους γλώσσα. Οι νέες μεταγραφές και σχολιασμοί λαμβάνονται από διαφορετικούς εργάτες: αναλύουμε τις νέες υποβολές 1108 και προτείνουμε ότι μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για αυτόματη μεταγραφή μετά την επεξεργασία και τη διόρθωση γραμματικών σφαλμάτων για την ομιλία. Για να διερευνήσουμε περαιτέρω τα δεδομένα εκπαιδεύουμε γραμματικά μοντέλα ανίχνευσης σφαλμάτων με διάφορες διαμορφώσεις, συμπεριλαμβανομένων προενταξιακών και περιεκτικών αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων ως εισαγωγή, πρόσθετων χαρακτηριστικών και βοηθητικών στόχων, και επιπλέον δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης από γραπτά σώματα με σχόλια σφαλμάτων. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι ένα μοντέλο που συνδέει προ-εκπαιδευμένες και περιεκτικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων ως εισαγωγή αποδίδει καλύτερα και ότι οι πρόσθετες πληροφορίες δεν οδηγούν σε περαιτέρω κέρδη απόδοσης.', 'it': 'Descriviamo la raccolta di correzioni di trascrizione e annotazioni di errore grammaticale per il CrowdED Corpus di monologhi in inglese parlato su argomenti aziendali. Le registrazioni del corpus sono state raccolte in crowdsourcing da madrelingua inglese e studenti di inglese con il tedesco come prima lingua. Le nuove trascrizioni e annotazioni sono ottenute da diversi crowdworker: analizziamo le 1108 nuove proposte di crowdworker e proponiamo che possano essere utilizzate per la trascrizione automatica post-editing e la correzione degli errori grammaticali per la parola. Per esplorare ulteriormente i dati addestriamo modelli grammaticali di rilevamento degli errori con varie configurazioni tra cui rappresentazioni di parole pre-addestrate e contestuali come input, funzionalità aggiuntive e obiettivi ausiliari, e dati di formazione extra da corpora annotati con errori scritti. Troviamo che un modello che concatena rappresentazioni di parole pre-addestrate e contestuali come input funziona meglio, e che informazioni aggiuntive non portano a ulteriori guadagni di performance.', 'kk': 'Біз транскриптерді түзету және грамматикалық қатенің жазбаларын бизнес тақырыптары туралы ағылшын тілінің монологияларының CrowdED корпусының жазбаларын түсіндіреміз. Корпус жазулары ағылшын тілінен және ағылшын тілінен бірінші тіл ретінде ағылшын тілдерінен көмектеседі. Жаңа транскрипттер мен жазбалар түрлі жұмыс істеушілерден алынады: 1108 жаңа жұмыс істеушілерді анализиру және сөйлеу үшін автоматты түрде транскриптерді өзгерту және грамматикалық қателерді түзету үшін қолданылатын ж Мәліметтерді қосып зерттеу үшін біз грамматикалық қатенің анықтау үлгілерін түрлі баптауларымен ұқсатып, алдын- оқылған және контексті сөздерді келтіру, қосымша мүмкіндіктер мен көмектесу мақсаттары ретінде, жазылған қатенің Қосымша мәліметтер қосымша оқыту үлгісін біріктіреді.', 'lt': 'Mes apibūdiname transkripcijų pataisų ir gramatinių klaidų anotacijų rinkimą CrowdED Corpus kalbėtų anglų monologų verslo temomis. Korpos įrašai buvo gaunami iš gimtųjų anglų kalbėtojų ir anglų kalbėtojų su vokiečių kalba. Naujos transkripcijos ir anotacijos gautos iš skirtingų visuomenės darbuotojų: mes analizuojame 1108 naujų visuomenės darbuotojų pareiškimus ir siūlome juos naudoti automatiniam transkripcijos po redakcijos ir gramatinių klaidų ištaisymui kalboms. Siekiant toliau išnagrinėti duomenis, mokome gramatinių klaidų nustatymo modelius su įvairiomis konfigūracijomis, įskaitant iš anksto parengtus ir kontekstinius žodžių rodymus kaip įvestį, papildomas savybes ir pagalbinius tikslus ir papildomus rašytinių klaidų anotuotos korporacijos mokymo duomenis. Mes manome, kad modelis, sutampantis su iš anksto parengtais ir kontekstiniais žodžių atstovavimais kaip įnašais, geriausiai veikia ir kad papildoma informacija nesuteikia papildomų rezultatų.', 'ms': 'Kami menggambarkan koleksi perbaikan transkripsi dan anotasi ralat grammatik untuk CrowdED Corpus monolog bahasa Inggeris pada topik perniagaan. Rekaman corpus itu didapati dari orang-orang asli bahasa Inggeris dan pelajar bahasa Inggeris dengan bahasa Jerman sebagai bahasa pertama mereka. Transkripsi dan anotasi baru diterima dari pekerja ramai yang berbeza: kami menganalisis 1108 penghantaran pekerja ramai yang baru dan menyarankan bahawa mereka boleh digunakan untuk transkripsi automatik selepas-edit dan perbaikan ralat grammatik untuk ucapan. To further explore the data we train grammatical error detection models with various configurations including pre-trained and contextual word representations as input, additional features and auxiliary objectives, and extra training data from written error-annotated corpora.  We find that a model concatenating pre-trained and contextual word representations as input performs best, and that additional information does not lead to further performance gains.', 'mk': 'Ја опишуваме колекцијата на корекции за транскрипции и граматички грешки за CrowdED Corpus на зборуваните англиски монолози за бизнис теми. Германските снимки беа популарни од родни говорници на англиски и ученици на англиски со германски како прв јазик. Новите транскрипции и анотации се добиени од различни публички работници: ги анализираме 1108 нови поднесувања на публички работници и предлагаме тие да можат да се користат за автоматски транскрипции по издание и граматичка корекција на грешки за говорот. За понатамошно да ги истражуваме податоците, ги обучуваме граматичките модели за детекција на грешки со различни конфигурации, вклучувајќи и предобучени и контекстни претставувања на зборови како влог, дополнителни карактеристики и помошни цели, и дополнителни податоци за обука од пишувана Дознаваме дека моделот кој ги вклучува предобучените и контекстните претставувања на зборовите како влог е најдобро успешно и дека дополнителните информации не водат до понатамошни профили.', 'mt': 'Aħna niddeskrivu l-ġbir ta’ korrezzjonijiet tat-traskrizzjoni u annotazzjonijiet ta’ żbalji grammatiċi għall-CrowdED Corpus ta’ monologi Ingliżi mitkellma dwar suġġetti kummerċjali. Ir-rekords tal-korpus kienu miġbura minn kelliema nattivi tal-Ingliż u studenti tal-Ingliż bil-Ġermaniż bħala l-ewwel lingwa tagħhom. It-traskrizzjonijiet u l-annotazzjonijiet il-ġodda jinkisbu minn crowdworkers differenti: aħna tanalizzaw l-1108 sottomissjoni ġdida ta’ crowdworkers u nipproponu li jistgħu jintużaw għal transkrizzjonijiet awtomatiċi wara l-edizzjoni u korrezzjoni ta’ żbalji grammatiċi għad-diskors. Biex nistudjaw aktar id-dejta, aħna nħarrġu mudelli ta’ identifikazzjoni ta’ żbalji grammatiċi b’diversi konfigurazzjonijiet inklużi rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ kliem imħarrġa minn qabel u kuntestwali bħala input, karatteristiċi addizzjonali u objettivi awżiljarji, u dejta ta’ taħriġ addizzjonali minn korpra annotata b’żbalji bil-miktub. Issibu li mudell li jikkonċentra r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel u kuntestwali bħala input iwassal bl-a ħjar mod, u li informazzjoni addizzjonali ma twassalx għal aktar kisbiet fil-prestazzjoni.', 'ml': 'ബിസിനസ്സിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മോനോളജുകളുടെ ക്രൌഡ് കോര്\u200dപ്സിന്റെ ക്രോഡ്ഡ് കോര്\u200dപ്സിന്റെ വി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് റെക്കോര്\u200dഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ആദ്യ ഭാഷയായി ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ സ്പീക്ഷന്\u200dമാരില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ പഠിക്ക The new transcriptions and annotations are obtained from different crowdworkers: we analyse the 1108 new crowdworker submissions and propose that they can be used for automatic transcription post-editing and grammatical error correction for speech.  വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളുടെ കൂടെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുവാ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണെന്ന് നമുക്ക് കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. അതിന്റ', 'mn': 'Бид бизнес сэдэвтэй дээр ярьдаг Англи хэлний монолог болон грамматикийн алдааны цуглуулалтыг тайлбарлаж байна. Корпус бичлэгүүд англи хэлний сурагчид болон германы анхны хэл болгон цуглуулсан. Шинэ шинжлэх ухаан, анзаарал олон олон ажилтнуудаас гарч ирсэн: бид 1108 шинэ олон ажилтнуудыг шинжлэх ухаан, илтгэлийн дараа автоматжуулалт, грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрөхийн тулд ашиглах боломжтой санал болгож байна. Дараа нь өгөгдлийг судалж үзэхэд бид грамматикийн алдаа олох загваруудыг олон загваруудын тусламжтайгаар суралцаж, урд сургалтын, орчин үеийн үзүүлэлтийг оруулалт, нэмэлт чанар, тусламжтайгаар зорилготой, бичигдсэн алдаа гаргасан кор Бид урд сургалтын болон орчин үеийн үзүүлэлтийг хамгийн сайн ажилладаг загвар олж мэднэ. Эдгээр нэмэлт мэдээллүүд илүү дасгал үйлдвэрлэлт гаргаж чадахгүй.', 'no': 'Vi beskriver samlinga av transkriptkorreksjonar og grammatiske feilmerkingar for CrowdED- korpusen av snakkete engelske monologar på arbeidsområde. The corpus recordings were crowdsourced from native speakers of English and learners of English with German as their first language. Den nye transkripta og notasjonane vert henta frå forskjellige publikarbeidarar: me analyserer 1108 nye publikarbeidarar og foreslår at dei kan brukast for automatisk post- redigering av transkripta og grammatisk feilretting for tale. For å utforske data, treng vi grammatiske feiloppdagingsmodeller med forskjellige oppsett, inkludert føretrainerte og kontekstlege ordrepresentasjonar som inndata, ekstra funksjonar og hjelpemål, og ekstra opplæringsdata frå skriven feiloppdaga korpora. Vi finn at eit modell som samsvarar før- treng og kontekst- ordrepresentasjonar som inndata utfører best, og at tilleggsinformasjonen fører ikkje til fleire utviklingar.', 'pl': 'Opisujemy zbiór korekt transkrypcji i adnotacji błędów gramatycznych dla korpusu CrowdED monologów mówionych po angielsku na tematy biznesowe. Nagrania korpusowe pochodziły od native speakerów języka angielskiego i uczących się angielskiego z językiem pierwszym niemieckim. Nowe transkrypcje i adnotacje pozyskiwane są od różnych crowdworkerów: analizujemy nowe zgłoszenia 1108 crowdworkerów i proponujemy, aby mogły być wykorzystane do automatycznej transkrypcji po edycji i korekcji błędów gramatycznych dla mowy. Aby dalej zbadać dane, trenujemy modele wykrywania błędów gramatycznych z różnymi konfiguracjami, w tym wstępnie przeszkolone i kontekstowe reprezentacje słów jako wejście, dodatkowe funkcje i cele pomocnicze oraz dodatkowe dane treningowe z napisanych błędów korpusów. Stwierdzamy, że model łączący wstępnie przeszkolone i kontekstowe reprezentacje słów jako wejście sprawdza się najlepiej, a dodatkowe informacje nie prowadzą do dalszych wzrostów wydajności.', 'ro': 'Descriem colecția de corecții de transcriere și adnotări de erori gramaticale pentru Corpul CrowdED de monologuri vorbite în limba engleză pe teme de afaceri. Înregistrările corpurilor au fost crowdsourcing de la vorbitori nativi de engleză și cursanți de engleză cu germană ca limbă primă. Noile transcrieri și adnotări sunt obținute de la diferite crowdworkers: analizăm cele 1108 noi transmiteri crowdworker și propunem ca acestea să poată fi utilizate pentru transcrierea automată post-editare și corectarea erorilor gramaticale pentru vorbire. Pentru a explora în continuare datele, instruim modele de detectare a erorilor gramaticale cu diferite configurații, inclusiv reprezentări de cuvinte pre-instruite și contextuale ca intrare, caracteristici suplimentare și obiective auxiliare și date suplimentare de instruire din corpore scrise cu erori adnotate. Considerăm că un model care concatenează reprezentări de cuvinte pre-instruite și contextuale ca input performează cel mai bine și că informațiile suplimentare nu duc la câștiguri suplimentare de performanță.', 'sr': 'Opišemo kolekciju korekcija transkripta i gramatičnih annotacija greške za Krupni korpus govorenih engleskih monologa o poslovnim temama. Podaci korpusa su bili gužva iz roðenih govornika engleskog jezika i učenika engleskog jezika s njemaèkim kao prvi jezik. Nove prepise i annotacije su dobijene od različitih gužva radnika: analiziramo 1108 novih podataka gužva radnika i predlažemo da se mogu koristiti za automatsku prepis nakon redikcije i gramatsku korekciju greške za govor. Da bismo dalje istražili podatke koje treniramo modele detekcije gramatičkih grešaka sa različitim konfiguracijama, uključujući predobučene i kontekstualne predstave riječi kao ulaz, dodatne karakteristike i pomoćne ciljeve, i dodatne podatke o obuci iz napisanog korporacije o pogrešavanju. Nalazimo da model koji se uključuje predobučene i kontekstualne reči kako ulaz najbolje izvodi, i da dodatne informacije ne vode do daljnjih ostvarenja učinka.', 'sv': 'Vi beskriver samlingen av transkriptionskorrigeringar och grammatiska felanteckningar för CrowdED Corpus av talade engelska monologer om affärsämnen. Korpusinspelningarna var crowdsourcerade från modersmål av engelska och elever av engelska med tyska som modersmål. De nya transkriptionerna och kommentarerna är hämtade från olika crowdworkers: vi analyserar 1108 nya crowdworkers bidrag och föreslår att de kan användas för automatisk transkription efter redigering och grammatisk felkorrigering för tal. För att ytterligare utforska data tränar vi grammatiska feldetekteringsmodeller med olika konfigurationer, inklusive förklädda och kontextuella ordrepresentationer som inmatning, ytterligare funktioner och hjälpmål samt extra träningsdata från skrivna felkommenterade korpora. Vi finner att en modell som sammanfogar förutbildade och kontextuella ordrepresentationer som indata presterar bäst, och att ytterligare information inte leder till ytterligare prestationsvinster.', 'so': 'Waxaannu u qoraynaa ururka hagitaanka qoraalka iyo warqadaha qaladka ee qofka CrowdED ee ku saabsan maadooyinka ganacsiga. Aqooyinka qoyska waxaa laga soo bandhigay dadka afkooda ugu horeeya ee afka Ingiriiska iyo kuwa bara afka Ingiriiska oo Jarmalka ah. Warqadaha cusub iyo baaraandegista waxaa laga helaa shaqaalaha kala duduwan: waxaynu baaraynaa warqadaha shaqaalaha cusub ee 1108, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa in lagu isticmaali karo qoraalka dib-editing iyo hagitaanka qaladka grammatika. Si aad u baahan karto macluumaadka aan ku tababarinno tusaalaha cadaadinta qaladka ee grammatika ah oo ay leeyihiin noocyo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah mid ka mid ah qoraal-tababarid iyo qoraal-tababar-qoraal ah oo ka mid ah macluumaad dheeraad ah iyo waxyaabo la xiriira, iyo macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka qaladka. We find that a model concatenating pre-trained and contextual word representations as input performs best, and that additional information does not lead to further performance gains.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் எழுத்து திருத்தம் மற்றும் சிறந்த பிழை அறிவிப்புகளை விவரிக்கிறோம் க்ரூட்டிட் கார்ப்ஸ் பேச்சு ஆங்கிலத்தில் பேசி கார்ப்ஸ் பதிவுகள் இங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து பேச்சாளர்கள் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் கற்பவர்கள் மற்றும் அவர்கள் முதல் மொழி என்று  புதிய எழுத்துக்கள் மற்றும் அறிவிப்புகள் வேறு கூட்டத்தார்களிடமிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்டது: 1108 புதிய கூட்டு பணியாளர்கள் அனுப்பங்களை நாம் ஆராய்க்கி ப முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் தற்காலிக வார்த்தையின் பகிர்வுகள் உள்ளீடு, கூடுதல் பண்புகள் மற்றும் கூடுதல் குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் எழுதப்பட்ட பிழை குறிப்பிட்ட நிற முன் பயிற்சி மற்றும் தற்காலிக வார்த்தையில் குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரி உள்ளீடு சிறந்த செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்', 'si': 'අපි ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට කතා කරපු ඉංග්\u200dරීසි මොනොලෝග්  කොර්පස් රිකාර්ඩ් එක්ක ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් ඉ අළුත් වාර්තාව සහ අනුවාර්තාව අනුවෙන් වෙනස් කණ්ඩායම් කරුණාකරුවන්ගෙන් ලැබෙනවා: අපි 1108 අළුත් කණ්ඩායම් කරුණාකරුවන් විශේෂ කරනවා  අපි ග්\u200dරාම්ටිකාලික වැරදි හොයාගන්න විවිධ සංවිධානය සමග විවිධිපත්ත පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දත්ත පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය සහ සංවිධානය වචන වචන ව අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් හොඳම විදියට, ඒ වගේම තවත් තොරතුරු විදියට තව ප්\u200dරධ', 'ur': 'ہم تجارت موضوع پر انگلیسی مونولوگوں کے کلکس اور گراماتیکی خطاؤں کے علامتوں کو توصیح دیتے ہیں. کورپوس ریکورڈینگ انگلیسی کے ماں بولنے والوں سے اور انگلیسی سکھانے والوں سے جرمن کی پہلی زبان کے طور پر جمع کیا گیا تھا۔ نو ترنسکریپٹ اور انٹوریپٹ مختلف گروپ کارکنوں سے ملے جاتے ہیں: ہم 1108 نو گروپ کارکنوں کی تحلیل کرتے ہیں اور یہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ان کا استعمال کرنا چاہیے کہ ان کو اپنی ترنسکریپٹ کے پیچھے سمجھنے اور گروماتیک خطا درست کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم نے اس ڈیٹے کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے گراماتیکی خطا ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ کی آموزش دینے کے لئے مختلف سازوں کے ساتھ آموزش دیتے ہیں جو پیش آموزش کی اور کنٹکسٹیٹ کلمات کی تعلیمات کے طور پر وارد، اضافہ ویژگی اور مددگاری موضوع ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک موڈل جو پہلے تدریس کی اور کنٹکسٹیسٹی کلمات کی تصویر کرتی ہے جبکہ انٹیپ بہترین عمل کرتی ہے اور یہ اضافہ معلومات اضافہ کرتی ہے اور اضافہ کرتی ہے', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả bộ sưu tập sửa chữa chuyển đổi và chú thích lỗi ngữ pháp cho Tập đoàn Đông Âu về những độc thoại tiếng Anh đã nói về chủ đề kinh doanh. The Corpus recordings was crodsoured from thổ dân of English and students of English with German as their first language. Các bản ghi chép và chú thích mới được lấy từ các nhân viên đã chết: chúng tôi phân tích tài liệu từ 1108 và đề nghị nó có thể được dùng cho việc ghi lại tự động sau khi sửa chữa lỗi ngôn ngữ. Để tìm hiểu thêm dữ liệu, chúng tôi đào tạo các mô hình lỗi máy bằng các cấu hình khác nhau, gồm các biểu hiện từ ngữ được huấn luyện trước, và ngữ cảnh để nhập vào, các tính năng bổ sung và các tiêu chuẩn phụ, và các dữ liệu đào tạo thêm từ tập đoàn ghi lỗi. Chúng tôi thấy rằng mô hình hợp với các từ trước đã được đào tạo và ngữ cảnh là biểu hiện tốt nhất, và thông tin bổ sung không dẫn đến hiệu suất tăng thêm.', 'uz': "Biz Ingliz muammolari haqida gapiradigan ingliz monologiyalar uchun KrwdED Korpus haqida saqlash toʻgʻri toʻgʻri va grammatik xato taʼminotlarini anglatamiz. Korpus roʻyxatlari ingliz tilidagi natijalar va ingliz tilidagi ingliz tilidan o'rganishlar bilan birinchi tillardan ingliz tilidan o'rganishlar tarkibi bo'lgan. Yangi zavrlar va taʼriflar boshqa jamoatlar bilan olingan. Biz 1108 yangi muammolar imkoniyatlarini Analyzeriz va ular aytishdan keyin avtomatik tahrirlash va grammatik xato toʻgʻri uchun foydalanish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Biz o'ylaymiz, birinchi o'rganishdan oldin va davomida so'zlar tashkilotlarini ishga tushirish mumkin, va qoʻshimcha maʼlumot bajarish natijalariga qo'shishga ega emas.", 'hr': 'Opišemo prikupljanje korekcija prepisama i gramatičkih oznake greške za CrowdED Corpus govorenih engleskih monologa o poslovnim temama. Podaci o korpusu bili su gužva od rođenih govornika engleskog jezika i učenika engleskog jezika s njemačkim kao prvim jezikom. Nove prepise i annotacije su dobijene od različitih gužva radnika: analiziramo 1108 novih podataka gužva radnika i predlažemo da se mogu koristiti za automatsku prijenos nakon uredbe prepisanja i ispravu gramatičkih grešaka za govor. Da bismo dalje istražili podatke koje treniramo modele otkrivanja gramatičkih grešaka s različitim konfiguracijama uključujući predobučene i contextualne predstave riječi kao ulaz, dodatne karakteristike i pomoćne ciljeve, te dodatne podatke o obuci iz pisane greške navedene tijelo. Nalazimo se da model koji se uključuje predobučene i contextualne riječi kako ulaz najbolje čini, i da dodatne informacije ne vode do daljnjih dobića učinka.', 'bg': 'Описваме колекцията от корекции на транскрипцията и анотации на граматически грешки за Корпуса на говорими английски монолози по бизнес теми. Корпусните записи са събрани от носители на английски език и обучаващи английски език с немски като първи език. Новите транскрипции и анотации са получени от различни crowdworkers: анализираме 1108 нови предложения за crowdworkers и предлагаме те да бъдат използвани за автоматична транскрипция след редактиране и корекция на граматични грешки за речта. За по-нататъшно проучване на данните ние обучаваме граматически модели за откриване на грешки с различни конфигурации, включително предварително обучени и контекстуални думи като вход, допълнителни функции и спомагателни цели, както и допълнителни данни за обучение от писмени корпуси с анотирани грешки. Намираме, че моделът, който конкатенира предварително обучените и контекстуални думи като вход, е най-добър и че допълнителната информация не води до по-нататъшно повишаване на производителността.', 'da': 'Vi beskriver samlingen af transkriptionskorrektioner og grammatiske fejlnoteringer til CrowdED Corpus af talte engelske monologer om forretningsmæssige emner. Korpusoptagelserne var crowdsourcing fra engelsktalende og engelsklærere med tysk som deres første sprog. De nye transskriptioner og anmærkninger er indhentet fra forskellige crowdworkers: vi analyserer de 1108 nye crowdworkers indsendelser og foreslår, at de kan bruges til automatisk transskription post-redigering og grammatisk fejlkorrektion for tale. For yderligere at udforske dataene træner vi grammatiske fejldetekteringsmodeller med forskellige konfigurationer, herunder præ-trænede og kontekstuelle ordrepræsentationer som input, yderligere funktioner og hjælpemål og ekstra træningsdata fra skrevne fejlannoterede corpora. Vi finder ud af, at en model, der sammenkæder præ-trænede og kontekstuelle ordrepræsentationer som input, klarer sig bedst, og at yderligere oplysninger ikke fører til yderligere ydeevnegevinster.', 'nl': "We beschrijven de verzameling transcriptiecorrecties en grammaticale foutannotaties voor het CrowdED Corpus van gesproken Engelse monologen over zakelijke onderwerpen. De corpusopnames zijn crowdsourced van moedertaalsprekers van het Engels en studenten van het Engels met Duits als moedertaal. De nieuwe transcripties en annotaties zijn verkregen van verschillende crowdworkers: we analyseren de 1108 nieuwe crowdworker inzendingen en stellen voor dat ze kunnen worden gebruikt voor automatische transcriptie post-editing en grammaticale foutcorrectie voor spraak. Om de gegevens verder te verkennen trainen we grammaticale foutdetectiemodellen met verschillende configuraties, waaronder voorgetrainde en contextuele woordrepresentaties als input, extra functies en hulpdoelen, en extra trainingsgegevens van geschreven foutgeannoteerde corpora's. We vinden dat een model waarin vooraf getrainde en contextuele woordrepresentaties als input worden samengevoegd het beste presteert en dat aanvullende informatie niet leidt tot verdere prestatiewinst.", 'de': 'Wir beschreiben die Sammlung von Transkriptionskorrekturen und grammatischen Fehlerannotationen für das CrowdED Corpus gesprochener englischer Monologe zu Geschäftsthemen. Die Korpusaufnahmen stammen aus Crowdsourcing von englischen Muttersprachlern und Englischlernenden mit Deutsch als Muttersprache. Die neuen Transkriptionen und Annotationen stammen von verschiedenen Crowdworkern: Wir analysieren die 1108 neuen Crowdworker-Einreichungen und schlagen vor, dass sie für automatische Transkriptionsnachbearbeitung und grammatische Fehlerkorrektur für Sprache verwendet werden können. Um die Daten weiter zu erforschen, trainieren wir grammatische Fehlererkennungsmodelle mit verschiedenen Konfigurationen, einschließlich vortrainierter und kontextueller Wortdarstellungen als Eingabe, zusätzlicher Funktionen und Hilfsziele sowie zusätzlicher Trainingsdaten aus geschriebenen fehlerannotierten Korpora. Wir finden, dass ein Modell, das vortrainierte und kontextbezogene Wortdarstellungen als Eingabe verkettet, am besten funktioniert und dass zusätzliche Informationen nicht zu weiteren Leistungssteigerungen führen.', 'id': 'We describe the collection of transcription corrections and grammatical error annotations for the CrowdED Corpus of spoken English monologues on business topics.  Rekaman mayat tersebut berasal dari orang asli bahasa Inggris dan pelajar bahasa Inggris dengan bahasa Jerman sebagai bahasa pertama mereka. Transkripsi dan anotasi baru diperoleh dari pekerja keramaian berbeda: kami menganalisis 1108 pengiriman pekerja keramaian baru dan menyarankan bahwa mereka dapat digunakan untuk transkripsi otomatis setelah edisi dan koreksi kesalahan gramatik untuk pidato. Untuk mengeksplorasi data lebih lanjut kita melatih model deteksi kesalahan gramatik dengan berbagai konfigurasi termasuk representasi kata-kata pre-dilatih dan kontekstual sebagai input, karakteristik tambahan dan tujuan bantuan, dan data pelatihan tambahan dari korpra tulis-anotasi kesalahan. Kami menemukan bahwa model yang menyesuaikan represensi kata-kata pre-dilatih dan kontekstual sebagai input berhasil terbaik, dan bahwa informasi tambahan tidak menyebabkan keuntungan prestasi lebih lanjut.', 'ko': '우리는 붐비는 비즈니스 영어 구어 독백어 자료 라이브러리에 수집된 기록 수정과 문법 오류 주석을 묘사했다.어료고 녹음은 영어를 모국어로 하는 사람과 독일어를 모국어로 하는 영어 학습자로부터 나온다.새로운 카피와 주석은 서로 다른 크루즈워커에서 나온다. 우리는 새로운 크루즈워커가 제출한 1108개의 파일을 분석하고 음성의 자동 카피 후기 편집과 문법 오류 수정에 사용할 수 있음을 제시했다.데이터를 더욱 탐색하기 위해 우리는 각종 설정 훈련 문법 오류 검출 모델을 사용한다. 입력의 사전 훈련과 상하문 단어 표시, 부가 기능과 보조 목표, 서면 오류 주석 자료 라이브러리에서 나온 추가 훈련 데이터를 포함한다.우리는 상하문과 관련된 단어를 미리 훈련하여 연결하는 것이 입력의 모델로 가장 성능이 좋고 추가 정보는 더 이상의 성능 향상을 초래하지 않는다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ما مجموعه ترجمه\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cها و گزارش\u200cهای خطای گراماتیکی برای مجموعه\u200cهای انگلیسی که در مورد موضوع تجارت صحبت می\u200cکنند را توصیف می\u200cکنیم. ثبت\u200cنامه\u200cهای کورپوس به عنوان اولین زبان آلمانی از زبان انگلیسی و دانش\u200cآموزان انگلیسی جمعیت شده است. ترجمه\u200cهای جدید و نوشته\u200cهای جدید از کارگران گروهی متفاوت دریافت می\u200cشوند: ما تحلیل دادن ۱۱۸۸ تازه کارگران گروهی را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که آنها می\u200cتوانند برای ترجمه\u200cهای بعد از ویرایش و اصلاح خطای گرامی برای گفتار استفاده می\u200cشوند. برای further exploration of the data we train grammatical error detection models with various configurations including pre-trained and contextual words representations as input, additional features and assistance objectives, and extra training data from written error-annotated corpora. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل با نمایش\u200cهای کلمه پیش آموزش شده و متوسط در حالی که ورودی بهتر انجام می\u200cدهد، و این اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای به پیروزی بیشتری انجام نمی\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Biz terjime düzeltmekleriniň we gramatik hata ýazyşlygyny biznes temalarynda gürleýän iňlisçe monologlaryň sanyny tassymlaýarys. Korpus ýazyşylary ilkinji dil bilen iňlisçe dilinden we iňlisçe öwrenenlerden köpüsi geldi. Täze terjimeler we ýazymlar farklı kalamlar işgärlerinden berilýär: 1108 täze kalam işgärlerini analyzýarys we olaryň bu terjime edilen otomatik terjime edip we gramatik hatalaryň düzeltmesi üçin ullanylşyny maslahat berýäris. Data öňünden geçmek üçin gramatik hata tanımlama modellerini çeşitli yapılandırmalar bilen öňünden eğitilýän we şartlaşma sözlerini girdi, ekleme özellikleri we kömek maksadlaryny we ýazylýan hata tanımlama modalarynda ekleýäris. Giriş şeklinde öňünden eğitimli ve contextual kelime ifadelerinin en iyi şekilde gösterildiğini ve bu ekleme bilgileri daha fazla performans gazanmasına sebep etmez.', 'af': "Ons beskrywe die versameling van transkripsie korreksies en grammatiese fout opmerking vir die Kroud Korpus van gepraat Engelse monologe op besigheid onderwerpe. Die korpus opneem is verskeur van die taalde sprekkers van Engels en leerners van Engels met Duits as hulle eerste taal. Die nuwe transkripte en notasies word ontvang van verskillende skakelwerkers: ons analyseer die 1108 nuwe skakelwerkers onderskrifte en voorstel dat hulle kan gebruik word vir outomatiese transkripte post-redigeering en grammatiese fout korreksie vir spreek. Om die data verder te ondersoek, tref ons grammatiese fout-ontdekking modele met verskeie konfigurasies, insluitend voor-ondersoekte en contextual woord-voorstellings as invoer, addisionele funksies en hulpdoeltjies, en ekstra ondersoeking data van skryfe fout-annotateerde korpora. Ons vind dat 'n model wat voor-opgelei en contextual woord voorstellings beter uitvoer, en dat addisionele inligting nie lei na verdere uitvoerings nie.", 'sw': 'Tunaelezea mkusanyiko wa uharibifu wa kuandika na matangazo ya makosa ya kigrammani kwa Shirika la CrowdED la utambulisho wa Kiingereza kuhusu mada ya biashara. rekodi za makampuni zilitolewa kutoka kwa wazungumzaji wa asili wa Kiingereza na wanafunzi wa Kiingereza na Kijerumani kama lugha yao ya kwanza. The new transcriptions and annotations are obtained from different crowdworkers: we analyse the 1108 new crowdworker submissions and propose that they can be used for automatic transcription post-editing and grammatical error correction for speech.  Ili kuona zaidi taarifa tunazofundisha mifano ya uchunguzi wa makosa ya grammatiki yenye miundombinu mbalimbali ikiwa ni pamoja na uwakilishaji wa maneno ya zamani na yanayoendelea kama vile input, vipengele vya ziada na malengo ya uhalisia, na taarifa za ziada kutoka kwa kampuni ya makosa yaliyoandikwa. Tunapata kwamba muundo unaohusisha maongezi ya maneno ya zamani na yanayohusiana kama vile input inafanya vizuri zaidi, na taarifa za ziada haziongozi kupata mafanikio zaidi ya utendaji.', 'sq': 'Ne përshkruajmë koleksionin e korreksioneve të transkriptimit dhe anotacioneve të gabimeve gramatike për Korpus CrowdED të monologëve angleze të folur në temat e biznesit. Rregjistrimet e trupit u nxorën nga folësit vendas të anglishtit dhe mësuesit e anglishtit me gjermanin si gjuhën e parë të tyre. Transkriptimet e reja dhe anotacionet janë marrë nga punonjësit e ndryshëm të turmës: ne analizojmë 1108 paraqitjet e reja të punonjësve të turmës dhe propozojmë që ato mund të përdoren për transkriptimin automatik pas editimit dhe korrektimin e gabimeve gramatike për fjalimin. Për të eksploruar më tej të dhënat ne trajnojmë modele të zbulimit të gabimeve gramatike me konfigurime të ndryshme duke përfshirë përfaqësime fjalësh të paratrajnuara dhe kontekstuale si hyrje, karakteristika shtesë dhe objektiva ndihmëse, dhe të dhëna shtesë trajnimi nga korpra të shkruar me gabime të anotuara. Ne zbulojmë se një model që përmbush përfaqësimet e paratrajnuara dhe kontekstuale të fjalëve si hyrje funksionon më mirë dhe se informacioni shtesë nuk shpie në fitime të mëtejshme të performancës.', 'am': 'በንግድ ጉዳዮች ላይ የተናገሩት የኢንጂል አሞሎጂዎች የCrowdED ኮርፓስ የጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያዎችን እና የግራማ ስህተት ማስታወቂያዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የካርፓስ ቀለም የአገራቸው ቋንቋዎች እንግሊዝኛ እና የግሪዘኛ ተማሪዎችን በጀርመን ቋንቋቸው ናቸው፡፡ አዲስ ጽሑፎች እና ማስታወቂያው ከልዩ አካባቢ ሠራተኞች አግኝተዋል፤ 1108 አዲስ የጉዳዩ አዲስ ሰብአዊ አካባቢዎችን እና ለንግግር ማቀናጃ እና የግራማቲ ስህተት ማስታወሻ ለመጠቀም እንዲችሉ እና ለመዘጋጀት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የግራማቲካዊ ስህተት አካባቢዎችን ለመግለጽ እና የፊደል ተማሪ እና የአሁኑን ቃላት መልዕክቶች እንደ input፣ ጨማሪ ምርጫዎች እና አካባቢዎች እና ከጽሑፍ ስህተት-ተሳሳታፊ ካርፖርት የተጨማሪው ማህበረቶችን ለመጠቀም እና ለመጠቀም የፊተኛውን ተማሪ እና የአሁኑን ቃላት ምሳሌ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ እንደሚያሳየው እና የጨዋታውን መረጃ ለጥቅምነት ጥቅም ማድረግ አያስፈልግም፡፡', 'az': 'Biz işlər məsələlərində danışmış İngilizə monologlarının CrowdED Corpusu üçün təkrarlama düzəltmələrinin və qrammatik xəta bildirmələrini təsdiq edirik. Korpus kayıtları ilk dili olaraq İngilizce dilindən və İngilizce dilindən öyrənənənlərdən çox qüvvətli idi. Yeni təkrarlar və təkrarlar müxtəlif qüvvət işçilərindən alınır: 1108 yeni qüvvət işçilərinin təkrarlarını analiz edir və onlar öz təkrarlarını təkrarlayır, sonra-düzəltmək və gramatik xəta düzəltmək üçün istifadə edilə bilərlər. Daha çox təhsil etdiyimiz məlumatları araşdırmaq üçün, qrammatik xəta tanımlama modellərini müxtəlif təhsil edilmiş və müxtəlif sözlərin ifadə edilməsi, əlavə özellikləri və yardımçı məqsədilər kimi təhsil edirik və yazılmış xəta danışmış korporadan çox təhsil məlumatları təhsil edirik Biz öyrəndik ki, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş və müxtəlif sözlərin ifadə edilməsi ən yaxşı təhsil edir, və bu əlavə məlumat daha çox təhsil qazanmağa yol verməz.', 'hy': 'Մենք նկարագրում ենք վերագրման ուղղումների հավաքածուը և գրամատիկական սխալների նշումները, որոնք տեղի են ունենում Բիզնես թեմաների մասին անգլերեն խոսում անգլերեն մոնոլոգների համար: Կոպի ձայնագրությունները ամբողջ ժողովուրդը ստացվել էին անգլերենի բնիկ խոսացողներից և անգլերենի սովորողներից, որոնք գերմաներեն էին առաջին լեզուն: The new transcriptions and annotations are obtained from different crowdworkers: we analyse the 1108 new crowdworker submissions and propose that they can be used for automatic transcription post-editing and grammatical error correction for speech.  Հետագա ուսումնասիրելու համար մենք սովորեցնում ենք գրամատիկ սխալների հայտնաբերման մոդելներ տարբեր կառուցվածքներով, ներառյալ նախապատրաստված և կոնտեքստոնալ բառերի ներկայացումները, որպես ներմուծք, ավելացված հատկություններ և օգտագործական նպատակներ, և ավելացած սո Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մոդելը, որը համապատասխանում է նախապատրաստված և կոնտեքստալ բառերի ներկայացումներին, որպես ներմուծք լավագույնն է աշխատում, և որ ավելին տեղեկատվությունը չի հանգեցնում ավելի լավ արդյունքներ:', 'bn': 'আমরা ব্যবসায়ীত বিষয়ে কথা বলা ইংরেজি ভাষার বিষয়গুলোর জন্য ক্রাউডেড কোর্পাসের ক্রাউডেড ক্রোপাসের জন্য লেখা সংশোধন এবং গ্রামান প্রথম ভাষা হিসেবে জার্মানী ভাষার স্থানীয় ভাষাকারী এবং ইংরেজী শিক্ষার্থীদের কাছ থেকে এই কোর্পাস রেকর্ডের বিভিন্ন জনগণের কাছ থেকে নতুন প্রতিবেদন এবং বিবেচনা পেয়েছে: আমরা ১১০৮ নতুন গ্রুপ কর্মীদের প্রতিবেদন বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং প্রস্তাব করি যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পোস্ট এছাড়াও আমরা গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি সনাক্তির মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত এবং বর্তমান শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব, ইনপুট, অতিরিক্ত বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং অনুগ্রহের উদ আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত এবং প্রতিনিধিত্বিত শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের একটি মডেল যেহেতু ইনপুটের সেরা কাজ করে, আরো তথ্য', 'bs': 'Mi opisujemo kolekciju korekcija prepisama i gramatične oznake greške za CrowdED Corpus govorenih engleskih monologa o poslovnim temama. Podaci o korpusu su bili gužva iz rođenih govornika engleskog jezika i učenika engleskog jezika s njemačkim kao prvim jezikom. Nove prepise i annotacije su dobijene od različitih gužva radnika: analiziramo 1108 novih podataka gužva radnika i predlažemo da se mogu koristiti za automatsku prijenos nakon redakcije prepisanja i korištenje gramatičkih grešaka za govor. Da bismo dalje istražili podatke koje treniramo modele otkrivanja gramatičkih grešaka sa različitim konfiguracijama, uključujući predobučene i contextualne predstave riječi kao ulaz, dodatne funkcije i pomoćne ciljeve, i dodatne podatke o obuci iz pisane greške označene korpore. Mi smatramo da model koji sastavlja predobučene i contextualne riječi kako ulaz najbolje izvodi, i da dodatne informacije ne vode do daljnjih dobića učinka.', 'ca': "Descrivem la col·lecció de correccions de transcripció i anotacions d'errors gramàtics per al Corpus CrowdED de monologues anglesos parlats sobre temes comercials. Les gravacions del corpus van sorgir de parlants natius d'anglès i aprenents d'anglès amb alemany com a primera llengua. Les noves transcripcions i anotacions es obtienen de diferents treballadors de multitud: analitzem les 1108 noves presentacions dels treballadors de multitud i proposem que es puguin utilitzar per a la correcció automàtica de transcripció post-edició i d'errors gramàtics per al discurs. Per a explorar més les dades entrenem models de detecció d'errors gramàtics amb diverses configuracions, incloent representacions de paraules pré-entrenades i contextuals com entrada, característiques adicionals i objectius auxiliars, i dades d'entrenament adicionals de corpora anotata amb errors escrits. Trobem que un model concatenant representacions de paraules pré-entrenades i contextuals com a entrada fa el millor resultat, i que informació adicional no condueix a més guanys de rendiment.", 'cs': 'Popisujeme sbírku korekcí přepisu a gramatických chybových anotací pro CrowdED Corpus mluvených anglických monologů na obchodní témata. Korpusové nahrávky byly crowdsourcingové od rodilých mluvčích angličtiny a studentů angličtiny s němčinou jako prvním jazykem. Nové přepisy a anotace jsou získávány od různých crowdworkerů: analyzujeme 1108 nové crowdworkerů a navrhujeme, aby byly použity pro automatickou post-editaci přepisu a gramatickou korekci chyb pro řeč. Pro další prozkoumání dat trénujeme gramatické modely detekce chyb s různými konfiguracemi, včetně předškolených a kontextových reprezentací slov jako vstup, dalších funkcí a pomocných cílů a dalších tréninkových dat z psaných chybově anotovaných korpusů. Zjišťujeme, že model spojující předem trénované a kontextové reprezentace slov jako vstup funguje nejlépe a že další informace nevede k dalšímu zvýšení výkonu.', 'et': 'Kirjeldame äriteemadel peetavate inglise keele monoloogide CrowdED korpuse transkriptsiooniparanduste ja grammatiliste vigade annotatsioonide kogumist. Korpuse salvestised olid kogutud inglise keele emakeelt kõnelevatelt ja inglise keele õppijatelt, kelle esimeseks keeleks oli saksa keel. Uued transkriptsioonid ja annotatsioonid on saadud erinevatelt ühiskondlikelt töötajatelt: analüüsime 1108 uut ühiskondlikku esitust ja pakume välja, et neid saaks kasutada automaatseks transkriptsioonijärgseks toimetamiseks ja grammatiliste vigade parandamiseks kõnes. Andmete edasiseks uurimiseks koolitame erinevate konfiguratsioonidega grammatilisi veatuvastusmudeleid, sealhulgas eelõpetatud ja kontekstipõhiseid sõnaesitusi sisendina, lisafunktsioone ja abieesmärke ning täiendavaid koolitusandmeid kirjalike veamärkidega korpustest. Leiame, et kõige paremini toimib mudel, mis ühendab eelnevalt koolitatud ja kontekstipõhiseid sõnaesitusi sisendina, ning et lisateave ei too kaasa täiendavat jõudluse kasvu.', 'fi': 'Kuvaamme monikirjoituskorjausten ja kieliopillisten virheilmoitusten kokoelmaa CrowdED Corpus -korpusiin, joissa käsitellään liikeasioita käsitteleviä englanninkielisiä monologeja. Korpusäänitteet kerättiin englannin äidinkielenään puhuvilta ja englannin oppijoilta, joiden äidinkielenä oli saksa. Uudet transkriptiot ja merkinnät on saatu eri joukkotyöläisiltä: analysoimme 1108 uutta joukkotyöläislähetystä ja ehdotamme, että niitä voidaan käyttää automaattiseen transkription jälkimuokkaukseen ja puheen kielioppivirheiden korjaukseen. Tietojen tutkimiseksi harjoittelemme kieliopillisia virheiden havaitsemismalleja erilaisilla konfiguraatioilla, kuten esikoulutetuilla ja kontekstuaalisilla sanaesityksillä syötteenä, lisäominaisuuksilla ja aputavoitteilla sekä ylimääräisillä harjoitustiedoilla kirjoitetuista virheilmoituksista. Havaitsemme, että esikoulutetut ja kontekstuaaliset sanaesitykset syötteenä yhdistävä malli toimii parhaiten ja että lisätiedot eivät lisää suorituskykyä.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé pisan nggihusahaan kelompok nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelompok nggawe barang nggambar barang kelompok nggawe barang kelompok ingkang cara-lanjut cara nggawe barang. Piyambak bener neng ketong sing paling-bener winih dhéwé kuwi basa Inggris lan kelas kuwi basa Inggris barang kelas kuwi basa sing sampek dhéwé. Layout Anyone To additional istrage the data we vlack gram graphical error detection modeles with Variable configurations include before-tracted and contextual word representations as input, additional options and help goal, and extra translation data from write error-anntatid Body. Awak dhéwé éntuk model sing sampeyan kelas banter sampeyan ngon banter', 'ha': 'Tuna bayyana juyin takardar takardar rubutu da bayani na grammatisk zartarwa wa the KroudED Corfits of the English-language monogs on business topics. The Corputs was sourced from native language of English and learners of English with Jarman as their first language. The new transcriptions and annotations are obtained from different crowdworkers: we analyse the 1108 new crowdworker submissions and propose that they can be used for automatic transcription post-editing and grammatical error correction for speech.  Za ka ƙara domin yin jarraba danne da Muke kõre misogi na karatun ɓata grammatisk da tsari masu amfani da wasu tsari, kamar tsarin da aka yi wa zaman-yin-shirin da ke ke cikin tsari, da wasu masu amfani da masu inganci da gaske, da data na ƙaranci daga makampuni na rubũtarwa. Muna gane cewa wani misali wanda ke samun sunan da aka yi wa zaman shirin da ke samu da maganar da ke daidai kamar da input a ke aikata mafi kyaun, kuma da kuma abin da ke ƙaranci, ba ya kusa ya sami mafaniko.', 'sk': 'Opisujemo zbirko transkripcijskih popravkov in slovničnih napak za CrowdED korpus govorjenih angleških monologov o poslovnih temah. Korpusni posnetki so bili pridobljeni od maternih govorcev angleščine in učencev angleščine z nemščino kot prvim jezikom. Nove transkripcije in opombe so pridobljene od različnih množičnih delavcev: analiziramo 1108 novih množičnih delavcev in predlagamo, da jih lahko uporabimo za avtomatsko transkripcijsko post-urejanje in slovnično popravljanje napak za govor. Za nadaljnje raziskovanje podatkov usposabljamo slovnične modele za zaznavanje napak z različnimi konfiguracijami, vključno z vnaprej usposobljenimi in kontekstualnimi besednimi predstavitvami kot vhodnimi, dodatnimi funkcijami in pomožnimi cilji ter dodatnimi podatki o usposabljanju iz pisanih korpusov z opombami napak. Ugotavljamo, da je model, ki združuje vnaprej usposobljene in kontekstualne predstavitve besed kot vhod, najboljši in da dodatne informacije ne vodijo do nadaljnjega povečanja učinkovitosti.', 'he': 'אנו מתארים את אוסף התיקונים של תיקונים ותכתבות שגיאות גרמטיות עבור קרודד קורפוס של מונולוגים אנגליים מדברים על נושאים עסקיים. הקלטות של הקורפוס היו מקורות קהל מדברים מקומיים של אנגלית וללמידים של אנגלית עם גרמניה כשפתם הראשונה. התכתיבות והציונים החדשים נוקבלים מעבדי קהל שונים: אנו מנתחים את ההעברות החדשות של 1108 עובדי הקהל והצעים שהם יכולים להשתמש בתכתיבות אוטומטיות לאחר העורה ותיקון שגיאות גרמטית לנאום. כדי לחקור נוסף את הנתונים אנחנו מאמן דוגמני גילוי שגיאות גרמטית עם תצורות שונות כולל מייצגי מילים מאומנים מראש ומתוקפניים כתוצאה, תכונות נוספות ומטרות נוספות, ומידע מאימנים נוספים מ גופורה שנכתבה בשגיאות כתובה. אנו מוצאים שמודל שמתאים מייצגות מילים מאומנות מראש וקונקסטיקליות כתוצאה מובילה הכי טוב, ושמידע נוסף לא מוביל לזכויות נוספות ביצועים.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡིག་འབྲི་ནོར་བཅོས་དང་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་འཛོལ་བ་གྱི་གསལ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་སྐབས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཁའ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་མིང་རྣམས་ནང་ལས་ སྐད་ཡིག་གི་མིང་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་དཔོན་རིགས་དང་། ཡིག་གཏོང་གསར་པ་དང་ཡིག་གཏོང་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ནི་མཉམ་ལས་གཞན་ཞིག་ཡོད། To further explore the data we train grammatical error detection models with various configurations including pre-trained and contextual word representations as input, additional features and auxiliary objectives, and extra training data from written error-annotated corpora. ང་ཚོའི་ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུར་མི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙ'}
{'en': 'Style versus Content : A distinction without a (learnable) difference?', 'pt': 'Estilo versus conteúdo: uma distinção sem diferença (aprendizável)?', 'fr': 'Style et contenu\xa0: une distinction sans différence (facile à apprendre)\xa0?', 'ar': 'الأسلوب مقابل المحتوى: تمييز بدون فرق (قابل للتعلم)؟', 'es': 'Estilo versus contenido: ¿una distinción sin una diferencia (aprendible)?', 'ja': 'スタイルとコンテンツ： （学習可能な）違いのない区別？', 'zh': '风格与理:无(可学之)异?', 'ru': 'Стиль в сравнении с содержанием: различие без (обучаемой) разницы?', 'hi': 'शैली बनाम सामग्री: एक (सीखने योग्य) अंतर के बिना एक अंतर?', 'ga': 'Stíl in aghaidh Ábhar: Idirdhealú gan difríocht (infhoghlaim)?', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Stílus kontra tartalom: Egy különbség (tanulható) különbség nélkül?', 'el': 'Στυλ versus Περιεχόμενο: Μια διάκριση χωρίς διαφορά;', 'it': 'Stile contro contenuto: una distinzione senza una differenza (imparabile)?', 'kk': 'Стиль және Мазмұны: Айнымалы (оқылмай) айырмашылығы емес пе?', 'lt': 'Style versus Content: A distinction without a (learnable) difference?', 'mk': 'Стил против содржина: разлика без разлика?', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യാസം ഇല്ലാത്ത ഒരു വ്യത്യാസം?', 'ms': 'Gaya melawan Kandungan: Perbezaan tanpa perbezaan (boleh belajar)?', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлбэр эсвэл Content: Шинэ ялгаагүй ялгаа?', 'no': 'Stil mot innhald: Eit skilnad utan ein (lærbar) skilnad?', 'pl': 'Styl kontra treść: rozróżnienie bez (do nauki) różnicy?', 'ro': 'Stil versus conținut: O distincție fără o diferență (care poate fi învățată)?', 'sr': 'Styl protiv sadržaja: razlika bez razlike?', 'si': 'ස්ටායිල් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය: විශේෂයක් (ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්) වෙනස් නැතුව?', 'so': "Isticmaalka versus Content: Iskhilaaf la'aan (baran) kala duwan?", 'sv': 'Stil kontra innehåll: En skillnad utan en (lärbar) skillnad?', 'ur': 'Style versus Content: A distinction without a (learning) difference?', 'ta': 'பாணி எதிர்மறை உள்ளடக்கம்: வேறுபாடு இல்லாமல் (கற்றலாம்) வேறுபாடு?', 'mt': 'Stil kontra Kontenut: Differenza mingħajr differenza (li tista’ titgħallem)?', 'uz': "Uslub versus tarkibi: Birlashtirish (o'rganib boò£lmaydi) oò£zgarishni istaysizmi?", 'vi': 'Kiểu với nội dung: phân biệt không có khác biệt (phải lọc) à?', 'nl': 'Stijl versus Content: Een onderscheid zonder (leerbaar) verschil?', 'da': 'Stil versus indhold: En forskel uden en (lærbar) forskel?', 'bg': 'Стил срещу съдържание: Различение без (научена) разлика?', 'hr': 'Stil protiv sadržaja: razlika bez razlike (učenje)?', 'de': 'Stil versus Content: Eine Unterscheidung ohne (erlernbaren) Unterschied?', 'ko': '풍격과 내용: 구별이 없는 차이?', 'id': 'Gaya melawan isi: Sebuah perbedaan tanpa perbedaan (dapat belajar)?', 'fa': 'Style versus Content: A distinction without a (learning) difference?', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar', 'sw': 'Style versus Content: Utofauti bila tofauti (inayojifunza) ?', 'sq': 'Stil kundër përmbajtjes: Një dallim pa një dallim (të mësueshëm)?', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ይዞታዎች', 'az': 'Styl versus Content: A distinction without a (learning) difference?', 'bn': 'স্টাইল বিপরীত বিষয়বস্তু: কোন (শিক্ষিত) পার্থক্য ছাড়াই একটি বিচ্ছিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয়?', 'hy': 'Ստիլ հակառակ պարունակությունը. տարբերություն առանց (սովորելի) տարբերության:', 'ca': 'Estil contra Content: Una distinció sense una diferència (aprensible)?', 'cs': 'Styl versus Obsah: Rozdíl bez (naučitelného) rozdílu?', 'bs': 'Stil protiv sadržaja: razlika bez razlike?', 'et': 'Stiil ja sisu: eristamine ilma (õpitava) erinevuseta?', 'fi': 'Tyyli ja sisältö: Erottelu ilman (opittavissa) eroa?', 'jv': 'Contents:', 'sk': 'Slog proti vsebini: Razlikovanje brez (učljive) razlike?', 'he': 'סגנון נגד תוכן: הבדל ללא הבדל (ניתן ללמוד)?', 'ha': '@ label: listbox', 'bo': 'བཟོ་རྣམ་དང་ལྡོག་པའི་ནང་དོན：ཁྱད་པར་ཞིག་མེད་པ(ཤེས་རུང་བའི)ཁྱད་པར་ཞིག་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Textual style transfer involves modifying the style of a text while preserving its content. This assumes that it is possible to separate style from content. This paper investigates whether this separation is possible. We use sentiment transfer as our case study for style transfer analysis. Our experimental methodology frames style transfer as a multi-objective problem, balancing style shift with content preservation and fluency. Due to the lack of parallel data for style transfer we employ a variety of adversarial encoder-decoder networks in our experiments. Also, we use of a probing methodology to analyse how these models encode style-related features in their latent spaces. The results of our experiments which are further confirmed by a human evaluation reveal the inherent trade-off between the multiple style transfer objectives which indicates that style can not be usefully separated from content within these style-transfer systems.', 'ar': 'يتضمن نقل النمط النصي تعديل نمط النص مع الحفاظ على محتواه. يفترض هذا أنه من الممكن فصل النمط عن المحتوى. تبحث هذه الورقة فيما إذا كان هذا الفصل ممكنًا. نحن نستخدم نقل المشاعر كدراسة الحالة الخاصة بنا لتحليل نقل النمط. تعمل منهجيتنا التجريبية على نقل النمط كمشكلة متعددة الأهداف ، وتحقيق التوازن بين تغيير الأسلوب والحفاظ على المحتوى والطلاقة. نظرًا لعدم وجود بيانات متوازية لنقل النمط ، فإننا نستخدم مجموعة متنوعة من شبكات فك التشفير والتشفير العدائية في تجاربنا. أيضًا ، نستخدم منهجية فحص لتحليل كيفية ترميز هذه النماذج للميزات ذات الصلة بالأسلوب في مساحاتها الكامنة. تكشف نتائج تجاربنا التي تم تأكيدها بشكل أكبر من خلال التقييم البشري عن المفاضلة المتأصلة بين أهداف نقل الأنماط المتعددة والتي تشير إلى أنه لا يمكن فصل النمط بشكل مفيد عن المحتوى ضمن أنظمة نقل النمط هذه.', 'fr': "Le transfert de style textuel implique de modifier le style d'un texte tout en préservant son contenu. Cela suppose qu'il est possible de séparer le style du contenu. Cet article cherche à savoir si cette séparation est possible. Nous utilisons le transfert de sentiment comme étude de cas pour l'analyse de transfert de style. Notre méthodologie expérimentale définit le transfert de style comme un problème à objectifs multiples, en équilibrant le changement de style avec la préservation du contenu et la fluidité. En raison de l'absence de données parallèles pour le transfert de style, nous utilisons une variété de réseaux codeur-décodeur contradictoires dans nos expériences. Nous utilisons également une méthodologie de sondage pour analyser la façon dont ces modèles encodent les caractéristiques liées au style dans leurs espaces latents. Les résultats de nos expériences, qui sont confirmés par une évaluation humaine, révèlent le compromis inhérent entre les objectifs de transfert de style multiples, ce qui indique que le style ne peut pas être séparé utilement du contenu dans ces systèmes de transfert de style.", 'es': 'La transferencia de estilos textuales implica modificar el estilo de un texto a la vez que se preserva su contenido. Esto supone que es posible separar el estilo del contenido. Este artículo investiga si esta separación es posible. Utilizamos la transferencia de sentimientos como nuestro caso de estudio para el análisis de la transferencia de estilos. Nuestra metodología experimental enmarca la transferencia de estilos como un problema multiobjetivo, equilibrando el cambio de estilo con la preservación del contenido y la fluidez. Debido a la falta de datos paralelos para la transferencia de estilos, utilizamos una variedad de redes de codificadores-decodificadores adversarios en nuestros experimentos. Además, utilizamos una metodología de sondeo para analizar cómo estos modelos codifican características relacionadas con el estilo en sus espacios latentes. Los resultados de nuestros experimentos, que son confirmados por una evaluación humana, revelan el compromiso inherente entre los múltiples objetivos de transferencia de estilo, lo que indica que el estilo no puede separarse útilmente del contenido dentro de estos sistemas de transferencia de estilo.', 'pt': 'A transferência de estilo textual envolve a modificação do estilo de um texto preservando seu conteúdo. Isso pressupõe que é possível separar o estilo do conteúdo. Este trabalho investiga se essa separação é possível. Usamos a transferência de sentimento como nosso estudo de caso para análise de transferência de estilo. Nossa metodologia experimental enquadra a transferência de estilo como um problema multiobjetivo, equilibrando mudança de estilo com preservação de conteúdo e fluência. Devido à falta de dados paralelos para transferência de estilo, empregamos uma variedade de redes de codificador-decodificador adversárias em nossos experimentos. Além disso, utilizamos uma metodologia de sondagem para analisar como esses modelos codificam características relacionadas ao estilo em seus espaços latentes. Os resultados de nossos experimentos que são confirmados por uma avaliação humana revelam o trade-off inerente entre os múltiplos objetivos de transferência de estilo, o que indica que o estilo não pode ser separado do conteúdo dentro desses sistemas de transferência de estilo.', 'ja': 'テキストスタイルの転送には、コンテンツを保持しながらテキストのスタイルを変更することが含まれます。これは、スタイルとコンテンツを分離することが可能であることを前提としています。本稿では、この分離が可能かどうかを調査する。スタイル転送分析のケーススタディとしてセンチメント転送を使用しています。私たちの実験的方法論は、スタイル転送を多目的の問題としてフレーム化し、スタイルのシフトとコンテンツの保存と流暢さのバランスを取っています。スタイル転送のための並列データが不足しているため、私たちは実験にさまざまな対抗エンコーダデコーダネットワークを採用しています。また、プロービングの方法論を使用して、これらのモデルが潜伏空間でスタイル関連の特徴をエンコードする方法を分析します。人間の評価によってさらに確認された当社の実験の結果は、複数のスタイル転送目標の間の固有のトレードオフを明らかにし、これらのスタイル転送システム内のコンテンツからスタイルを有用に分離することはできないことを示しています。', 'zh': '文本式传输及存文本者并改之。 此可分其式也。 本文究此离合否。 我们用情移为风格转析的案例。 吾实验移风以为多端,而取平于风流畅性之间。 以乏式传输并行数据,于实验中采用诸对抗性编码器-解码器网络。 此外探测之法,所以潜编码于空间者也。 吾实验以人质之,明其多方之权衡,不能与此转统之义分也。', 'hi': 'पाठ्य शैली स्थानांतरण में किसी पाठ की सामग्री को संरक्षित करते समय उसकी शैली को संशोधित करना शामिल है। यह मानता है कि सामग्री से शैली को अलग करना संभव है। यह पेपर जांच करता है कि क्या यह अलगाव संभव है। हम शैली हस्तांतरण विश्लेषण के लिए हमारे मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में भावना हस्तांतरण का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी प्रयोगात्मक पद्धति एक बहु-उद्देश्य समस्या के रूप में शैली हस्तांतरण को फ्रेम करती है, सामग्री संरक्षण और प्रवाह के साथ शैली बदलाव को संतुलित करती है। शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए समानांतर डेटा की कमी के कारण हम अपने प्रयोगों में विभिन्न प्रकार के प्रतिकूल एनकोडर-डिकोडर नेटवर्क को नियोजित करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम विश्लेषण करने के लिए एक जांच पद्धति का उपयोग करते हैं कि ये मॉडल अपने अव्यक्त स्थानों में शैली से संबंधित सुविधाओं को कैसे एन्कोड करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों के परिणाम जो आगे एक मानव मूल्यांकन द्वारा पुष्टि की जाती हैं, कई शैली हस्तांतरण उद्देश्यों के बीच अंतर्निहित व्यापार-बंद को प्रकट करते हैं जो इंगित करता है कि शैली को इन शैली-हस्तांतरण प्रणालियों के भीतर सामग्री से उपयोगी रूप से अलग नहीं किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Передача текстового стиля предполагает изменение стиля текста при сохранении его содержимого. Это предполагает, что можно отделить стиль от контента. В этой статье рассматривается вопрос о том, возможно ли такое разделение. Мы используем передачу чувств в качестве нашего тематического исследования для анализа передачи стиля. Наша экспериментальная методология определяет передачу стиля как многоцелевую задачу, балансируя сдвиг стиля с сохранением контента и беглостью. Из-за отсутствия параллельных данных для передачи стиля мы используем в наших экспериментах различные сопернические сети кодировщик-декодер. Кроме того, мы используем методологию зондирования для анализа того, как эти модели кодируют функции, связанные со стилем, в своих латентных пространствах. Результаты наших экспериментов, которые дополнительно подтверждаются оценкой человека, показывают внутренний компромисс между несколькими целями передачи стиля, который указывает на то, что стиль не может быть полезно отделен от контента в этих системах передачи стиля.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le haistriú stíle téacs ná stíl téacs a mhodhnú agus a ábhar a chaomhnú. Glacann sé seo leis gur féidir stíl a scaradh ón ábhar. Fiosraíonn an páipéar seo an bhfuil an scaradh seo indéanta. Bainimid úsáid as aistriú meon mar ár gcás-staidéar le haghaidh anailíse aistrithe stíle. Frámaíonn ár modheolaíocht thurgnamhach aistriú stíle mar fhadhb ilchuspóireach, ag cothromú athrú stíle le caomhnú ábhair agus líofacht. Mar gheall ar an easpa sonraí comhthreomhara le haghaidh aistriú stíle bainimid úsáid as líonraí ionchódóra-díchódóra sáraíochta éagsúla inár gcuid turgnaimh. Chomh maith leis sin, bainimid úsáid as modheolaíocht iniúchta chun anailís a dhéanamh ar conas a ionchódaíonn na samhlacha seo gnéithe a bhaineann le stíl ina spásanna folaigh. Léiríonn torthaí ár dturgnaimh a dheimhnítear tuilleadh le meastóireacht dhaonna an chomhbhabhtáil bhunúsach idir na cuspóirí aistrithe ilstíl a thugann le fios nach féidir stíl a dheighilt go húsáideach ó ábhar laistigh de na córais aistrithe stíle seo.', 'el': 'Η μεταφορά στυλ κειμένου περιλαμβάνει την τροποποίηση του στυλ ενός κειμένου διατηρώντας το περιεχόμενό του. Αυτό προϋποθέτει ότι είναι δυνατόν να διαχωριστεί το στυλ από το περιεχόμενο. Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά αν αυτός ο διαχωρισμός είναι δυνατός. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη μεταφορά συναισθημάτων ως μελέτη περίπτωσής μας για την ανάλυση μεταφοράς στυλ. Η πειραματική μεθοδολογία μας πλαισιώνει τη μεταφορά στυλ ως ένα πολυ-αντικειμενικό πρόβλημα, εξισορροπώντας την αλλαγή στυλ με τη διατήρηση περιεχομένου και την ευχέρεια. Λόγω της έλλειψης παράλληλων δεδομένων για μεταφορά στυλ, χρησιμοποιούμε μια ποικιλία αντιμέτωπων δικτύων κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών στα πειράματά μας. Επίσης, χρησιμοποιούμε μια μεθοδολογία ανίχνευσης για να αναλύσουμε πώς αυτά τα μοντέλα κωδικοποιούν χαρακτηριστικά που σχετίζονται με το στυλ στους λανθάνοντες χώρους τους. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων μας που επιβεβαιώνονται περαιτέρω από μια ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση αποκαλύπτουν την εγγενή ανταλλαγή μεταξύ των πολλαπλών στόχων μεταφοράς στυλ που δείχνει ότι το στυλ δεν μπορεί να διαχωριστεί χρήσιμα από το περιεχόμενο μέσα σε αυτά τα συστήματα μεταφοράς στυλ.', 'ka': 'Name ეს იფიქრობს, რომ შესაძლებელია სტილის შესახებ შესახებ. ეს წიგნის შესაძლებელია თუ არა ეს გაყოფილი. ჩვენ სენტიმენტების გადატანსტის გამოყენება, როგორც ჩვენი სენტიმენტის გადატანსტის ანალიზაციისთვის. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური მეტოლოგია სტილის გადატანსტრიქცია როგორც მრავალექტიური პრობლემა, სტილის გადატანსტრიქცია შემდგომარებით შემდგომარებით პარალელური მონაცემები სტილის გადატანისთვის არსებობით ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებში გამოვიყენებთ განსაზღვრებული ანკოდერიური ქსელი. ასევე, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ პრობენტის მეტოლოგიის გამოყენება, როგორ ეს მოდელები კოდირებული სტილთან შესაბამისი ფუნქციების შესაბამისი განმავლობაში. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტების შედეგები, რომლებიც ადამიანის განსაზღვრებით უფრო დარწმუნებულიან, აღმოჩნდება მრავალ სტილის ტრანსტრინუს მიზეზების შესახებ, რომ სტილის შესახებ არ შეიძლებ', 'hu': 'A szövegstílusátvitel magában foglalja a szöveg stílusának módosítását, miközben megőrzi annak tartalmát. Ez feltételezi, hogy a stílus és a tartalom elválasztása lehetséges. Ez a tanulmány azt vizsgálja, hogy lehetséges-e ez az elválasztás. Esettanulmányként érzelmi transzfert használunk stílustranszfer elemzéshez. Kísérleti módszertanunk a stílustranszfert több objektív problémának tekinti, kiegyensúlyozva a stílusváltást a tartalom megőrzésével és folyékonyságával. A stílusátvitelhez párhuzamos adatok hiánya miatt kísérleteinkben különböző ellenséges kódoló-dekóder hálózatokat alkalmazunk. Ezenkívül mérési módszert használunk annak elemzésére, hogy ezek a modellek hogyan kódolják a stílushoz kapcsolódó funkciókat látens tereikben. Kísérleteink eredményei, amelyeket egy emberi értékelés is megerősít, feltárják a többszörös stílustranszfer célkitűzések közötti szükséges kompromisszumot, ami azt jelzi, hogy a stílus nem választható el hasznos módon ezen stílustranszfer rendszerek tartalmától.', 'lt': 'Tekstualinio stiliaus perdavimas apima teksto stiliaus pakeitimą, išsaugodamas jo turinį. Tai daro prielaidą, kad stilius galima atskirti nuo turinio. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama, ar šis atskyrimas yra įmanomas. Naudojame jausmų perdavimą kaip atvejų tyrimą stiliaus perdavimo analizei. Mūsų eksperimentinė metodika nustato stilių perdavimą kaip daugiametę problem ą, balansuojant stilių perdavimą su turinio išsaugojimu ir skystumu. Kadangi trūksta lygiagrečių stiliaus perdavimo duomenų, eksperimentuose naudojame įvairius priešingus kodavimo kodavimo tinklus. Taip pat naudojame bandymų metodiką analizuojant, kaip šie modeliai koduoja su stiliu susijusias savybes jų latent in ėse erdvėse. Mūsų eksperimentų rezultatai, kurie dar labiau patvirtinami atliekant žmogaus vertinimą, atskleidžia būdingą kelių stilių perdavimo tikslų tarpusavio suderinimą, kuris rodo, kad stilius negali būti naudingai atskirtas nuo šių stilių perdavimo sistemų turinio.', 'mk': 'Текстуален стил трансфер вклучува модификација на стилот на текст додека се зачува неговата содржина. Ова претпоставува дека е можно да се оддели стилот од содржината. This paper investigates whether this separation is possible.  Користиме трансфер на чувства како наша студија на случај за анализа на трансфер на стил. Нашата експериментална методологија го префрла стилот како мултиобјективен проблем, балансирајќи го стилот со зачувување на содржината и течност. Поради недостатокот на паралелни податоци за трансфер на стил, во нашите експерименти употребуваме различни непријателски мрежи за кодер-декодер. Исто така, користиме методологија за проверка за анализирање како овие модели кодираат карактеристики поврзани со стилот во нивните лантни простори. Резултатите од нашите експерименти кои понатаму се потврдени од човечката проценка откриваат сопствената разлика помеѓу целите за трансфер на повеќе стили, што покажува дека стилот не може да биде корисно одделен од содржината во овие системи за трансфер на стил.', 'ms': 'Textual style transfer involves modifying the style of a text while preserving its content.  Ini menganggap bahawa ia adalah mungkin untuk memisahkan gaya dari kandungan. Kertas ini menyelidiki sama ada pemisahan ini mungkin. We use sentiment transfer as our case study for style transfer analysis.  Metodologi eksperimental kami bingkai pemindahan gaya sebagai masalah berbilang-objektif, menyeimbangkan pemindahan gaya dengan penyimpanan kandungan dan keseluruhan. Kerana kekurangan data selari untuk pemindahan gaya kami menggunakan pelbagai rangkaian pengekod-pengekod musuh dalam eksperimen kami. Juga, kami menggunakan metodologi pengujian untuk menganalisis bagaimana model ini mengekod ciri-ciri berkaitan gaya dalam ruang tersembunyi mereka. Hasil eksperimen kami yang lebih disahkan oleh penilaian manusia menunjukkan perdagangan yang ada antara tujuan pemindahan gaya berbilang yang menunjukkan gaya tidak dapat dipisahkan dengan berguna dari kandungan dalam sistem pemindahan gaya ini.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതില്\u200d അതിന്റെ ഉള്ളടക്കം സൂക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു പദാവലിയുടെ രീതിയ ഇത് വിചാരിക്കുന്നത് ഉള്ളടക്കത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ശൈലി വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമാണെന്ന്. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഈ വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തല്\u200d സാധ്യമാണോ എന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ കേസിന്റെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d വിചാരകങ്ങള്\u200d മാ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന രീതിയിലെ രീതിയിലേക്കുള്ള പരീക്ഷണമായ രീതിയിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രശ്നമായി മാറ്റുന്നത് ഒരു പല- സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിരോധമായ കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dക ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അവയുടെ അവസാന സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ഞങ The results of our experiments which are further confirmed by a human evaluation reveal the inherent trade-off between the multiple style transfer objectives which indicates that style cannot be usefully separated from content within these style-transfer systems.', 'mt': 'It-trasferiment tal-istil tat-tessut jinvolvi l-modifika tal-istil ta’ test filwaqt li jippreserva l-kontenut tiegħu. Dan jassumi li huwa possibbli li l-istil jiġi separat mill-kontenut. Dan id-dokument jinvestiga jekk din is-separazzjoni hijiex possibbli. Aħna nużaw it-trasferiment tas-sentimenti bħala studju tal-każ tagħna għall-analiżi tat-trasferiment tal-istil. Il-metodoloġija sperimentali tagħna tifforma t-trasferiment tal-istil bħala problem a multioġġettiva, li tibbilanċja l-bidla tal-istil mal-preservazzjoni tal-kontenut u l-fluwenza. Minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ dejta parallel a għat-trasferiment tal-istil a ħna nużaw varjetà ta’ netwerks ta’ kodifikaturi avversarji fl-esperimenti tagħna. Also, we use of a probing methodology to analyse how these models encode style-related features in their latent spaces.  Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti tagħna li huma kkonfermati aktar minn evalwazzjoni umana jiżvelaw il-kompromess inerenti bejn l-għanijiet ta’ trasferiment ta’ stili multipli li jindika li l-istil ma jistax jiġi separat b’mod utli mill-kontenut f’dawn is-sistemi ta’ trasferiment ta’ stili.', 'it': "Il trasferimento di stile testuale comporta la modifica dello stile di un testo preservandone il contenuto. Ciò presuppone che sia possibile separare lo stile dal contenuto. Questo articolo indaga se questa separazione è possibile. Usiamo il sentiment transfer come nostro caso di studio per l'analisi del trasferimento di stile. La nostra metodologia sperimentale inquadra il trasferimento di stile come un problema multi-obiettivo, bilanciando il cambiamento di stile con la conservazione dei contenuti e la fluidità. A causa della mancanza di dati paralleli per il trasferimento di stile impieghiamo una varietà di reti di encoder-decoder avversari nei nostri esperimenti. Inoltre, utilizziamo una metodologia di sonding per analizzare come questi modelli codificano le caratteristiche relative allo stile nei loro spazi latenti. I risultati dei nostri esperimenti, che sono ulteriormente confermati da una valutazione umana, rivelano il compromesso intrinseco tra i molteplici obiettivi di trasferimento dello stile che indica che lo stile non può essere separato utilmente dal contenuto di questi sistemi di trasferimento dello stile.", 'mn': 'Текст хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлт өөрчлөлт нь текст хэлбэрийг хадгалах үед өөрчлөх боломжтой. Энэ нь хэлбэрээс ялгах боломжтой гэж боддог. Энэ цаас энэ хуваагдах боломжтой эсэхийг судалдаг. Бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ хэлбэрийн шинжилгээнд хэрэглэдэг. Бидний туршилтын методологийг олон зорилготой асуудал болгож, хэлбэрийн өөрчлөлтийг соёл хадгалах, шингэнтэй баланслах. Тийм шилжүүлэлтийн параллел өгөгдлийн алдаагүй учраас бид өөрсдийн туршилтанд олон эсрэг шилжүүлэлтийн кодлогчийн сүлжээг ашигладаг. Мөн бид судалгааны методологийг хэрхэн эдгээр загваруудын хэлбэртэй холбоотой дүрсийг шинжилгээр ашигладаг. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлтийн үр дүнд хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэх зорилготой олон хэлбэрийн хувьд хэлбэрээс хэрэглэгдэж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Comment Dette antar at det er mogleg å separera stil frå innhaldet. Denne papiret undersøker om denne skilnaden er mogleg. Vi bruker sentimentoverføring som tilfelle- studien vår for analyse av stiloverføringar. Dette eksperimentelle metodologiske rammer gjer stiloverføring som eit fleire målrett problem, balansering av stilforskyving med innhaldsverking og flukt. På grunn av manglene av parallelle data for stiloverføring, brukar vi ein rekkjefølgje kontraktiv koderingsnettverk i eksperimentene våre. Vi bruker også ein proberingsmetodologi for å analysera korleis desse modelane koder med stilrelaterte funksjonar i dei latente mellomroma sine. Resultatet av eksperimentene våre som er meir stadfestig av ein menneskelig evaluering viser den innhaldne utviklinga mellom dei fleire stiloverføringsverktøya som tyder at stilen kan ikkje vera nyttig skilt frå innhaldet i desse stiloverføringssystemene.', 'pl': 'Transfer stylu tekstowego polega na modyfikacji stylu tekstu przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu jego zawartości. Zakłada to, że możliwe jest oddzielenie stylu od treści. W niniejszym artykule zbadano, czy ta separacja jest możliwa. Używamy transferu sentymentów jako naszego studium przypadku do analizy transferu stylu. Nasza eksperymentalna metodologia uwzględnia transfer stylu jako wielobiektywny problem, równoważący zmianę stylu z zachowaniem treści i płynnością. Ze względu na brak równoległych danych do transferu stylu w naszych eksperymentach wykorzystujemy różnorodne sieci koderów-dekoderów przeciwnych. Wykorzystujemy również metodologię sondowania do analizy, w jaki sposób modele te kodują cechy związane ze stylem w ich utajonych przestrzeniach. Wyniki naszych eksperymentów, które są dodatkowo potwierdzone przez ludzką ocenę, ujawniają nieodłączny kompromis między wieloma celami transferu stylu, co wskazuje, że styl nie może być użytecznie oddzielony od treści w ramach tych systemów transferu stylu.', 'ro': 'Transferul stilului textual implică modificarea stilului unui text păstrând în același timp conținutul acestuia. Acest lucru presupune că este posibil să se separe stilul de conținut. Această lucrare investighează dacă această separare este posibilă. Folosim transferul sentimentelor ca studiu de caz pentru analiza transferului de stil. Metodologia noastră experimentală încadrează transferul stilului ca o problemă multiobiectivă, echilibrând schimbarea stilului cu conservarea conținutului și fluența. Datorită lipsei datelor paralele pentru transferul stilului, în experimentele noastre folosim o varietate de rețele adversare de encoder-decoder. De asemenea, folosim o metodologie de sondare pentru a analiza modul în care aceste modele codează caracteristicile legate de stil în spațiile lor latente. Rezultatele experimentelor noastre confirmate de o evaluare umană dezvăluie compromisul inerent dintre obiectivele multiple de transfer al stilului, ceea ce indică faptul că stilul nu poate fi separat util de conținutul acestor sisteme de transfer al stilului.', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje tekstualnog stila uključuje izmjenu stila teksta dok čuva sadržaj. To pretpostavlja da je moguće odvojiti stil od sadržaja. Ovaj papir istražuje je li moguće razdvajanje. Koristimo prijenos sentimenta kao studiju slučajeva za analizu transfera stila. Naša eksperimentalna metodologija okvira prenošenje stila kao multiobjektivni problem, balanciranje smjene stila sa zaštitom sadržaja i tekućinom. Zbog nedostatka paralelnih podataka za prebacivanje stila, koristimo razne mreže protivnika kodera u našim eksperimentima. Takođe, koristimo metodologiju probe kako bi analizirali kako ovi modeli kodiraju karakteristike vezane sa stilom u njihovim latentnim prostorijama. Rezultati naših eksperimenata koji su dalje potvrđeni ljudskim procenama otkrivaju inherentnu trgovinu između ciljeva prijenosa više stila koji ukazuju na to da stil ne može biti korisno odvojen od sadržaja u tim sistemima prijenosa stila.', 'kk': 'Мәтін стилінің аударуы мазмұнын сақтау кезінде мәтін стилін өзгертуге болады. Бұл мазмұнынан стильді бөлек ету мүмкін деп ойлайды. Бұл қағаз бұл бөлу мүмкін емес пе екенін тексереді. Біз көзіміздің көзіміздің көзімізді стиль аудару анализиясы үшін зерттеу үшін қолданамыз. Біздің эксперименталдық методологиялық фреймдеріміз стильді көп мақсатты мәселе ретінде аударып, мазмұнын сақтау және жылдамдығымен стильді балансировау. Стиль тасымалдау үшін параллелі деректер жоқ сияқты біз эксперименттерімізде бірнеше қарсылық кодер декодер желілерін қолданамыз. Сонымен қатар, бұл үлгілердің стильді қалай кодтау үшін сынақтау методологиясын қолданамыз. Біздің тәжірибеміздің нәтижелері, адамдардың оқиғасы бойынша қолданылатын тәжірибелеріміздің бірнеше стилді аудару мақсаттарының арасындағы тәжірибелерін көрсетеді. Бұл стилді аудару жүйелерд', 'si': 'පාළ ස්ථානය සංවර්තනය සම්බන්ධයෙන් පාළුවක් ස්ථානය වෙනස් කරනවා එයාගේ සාමාව සුරක්ෂා ක මේක හිතන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ස්ථානය වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මේ වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන්ද කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විස්තර කරනවා කියලා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණ විද්\u200dයාව විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විද්\u200dයාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවර්තනයට සමාන්\u200dය දත්ත අවශ්\u200dයය නිසා අපි විවිධ විශේෂ සංවිධානය කරනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ විවිධ සං ඒවගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාවක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාවක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා මේ මොඩේල් කොඩ් විද්\u200dයා අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය, මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් තහවුරු කරලා තියෙන්නේ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් විශේෂ වික්\u200dරමය ප්\u200d', 'so': 'Ku wareejinta qaabka qoraalka ah waxaa ka mid ah beddelista qaabka qoraalka marka la ilaaliyo waxyaabaha ku jira. Tani waxaa suurtagal ah in qaab laga kala sooco waxyaabaha. This paper investigates whether this separation is possible.  Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa wareejinta fikrada sida waxbarashada xaaladeena loo baaraandegayo baaritaanka qaababka wareejinta. Isticmaalka baaritaanka ah waxaa lagu beddelaa qaab dhibaato badan oo la jeedo, isbedelka isbedelka dabeecada iyo badbaadada. Sababta aan u baahnayn macluumaad lambarka ah ee qaababka qaabka ah ayaannu ku shaqaynaynaa shabakado kala duduwan oo ka mid ah codcoder-codcoder-ka-shaqeeya jirrabadeenna. Sidoo kale waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaababka imtixaanka si aan u baarayno sidoo kale qaababkaas ay u kooban yihiin qaababka ku saabsan meelahooda ugu dambeeya. Midhaha jirrabeena ee lagu xaqiijiyey qiimeynta dadku waxay muujiyaan dhamaanka ganacsiga hoose ee u dhexeeya waxyaabaha lagu wareejiyo qaababka kala duduwan, taas oo caddaynaya in qaababka aan si faa’iido leh looga sooci karin waxyaabaha ku jira nidaamkan wareejinta.', 'sv': 'Textuell formatöverföring innebär att du ändrar stilen på en text samtidigt som dess innehåll bevaras. Detta förutsätter att det är möjligt att skilja stil från innehåll. Denna uppsats undersöker om denna separation är möjlig. Vi använder sentimentöverföring som vår fallstudie för stilöverföringsanalys. Vår experimentella metodik ramar in stilöverföring som ett multiobjektivt problem och balanserar stilskifte med innehållsbevarande och flytande innehåll. På grund av bristen på parallella data för stilöverföring använder vi en mängd olika motstridiga encoder-dekoder nätverk i våra experiment. Dessutom använder vi en sonderingsmetod för att analysera hur dessa modeller kodar stilrelaterade funktioner i sina latenta utrymmen. Resultaten av våra experiment som ytterligare bekräftas av en mänsklig utvärdering avslöjar den inneboende avvägningen mellan de många stilöverföringsmålen vilket tyder på att stil inte på ett användbart sätt kan separeras från innehållet i dessa stilöverföringssystem.', 'ta': 'உரை பாணி மாற்றம் உரையின் பாணி இது உள்ளடக்கத்திலிருந்து பாணியை பிரிக்க முடியும் என்று நினைக்கிறது. இந்த தாள் இந்த பிரிப்பு சாத்தியமா என்று ஆராய்க்கிறது. நாங்கள் உணர்வு மாற்றுதலை பாணி மாற்றுதல் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் சோதனை முறைமை சட்டத்தின் பாணியை பல பொருள் பிரச்சனையாக மாற்றுகிறது, பாணி மாற்றம் உள்ளடக்கத்தை பாதுகாப்பு மற்ற பாணி மாற்றுவதற்கான இணைய தகவல் குறைந்ததால் நாங்கள் எங்கள் சோதனைகளில் பல்வேறு எதிர்மறை குறியீட்டாளர் வலைப்பின்னல்களை வேலை செ மேலும், இந்த மாதிரிகள் பாணி தொடர்புடைய குணங்களை எவ்வாறு குறியீடு செய்யும் போது தொடர்புடைய குணங்களை பாணிகளில்  மனித மதிப்பினால் மேலும் உறுதிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முடிவுகளின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'Name یہ خیال کرتا ہے کہ موجود سے استیل جدا کرنا ممکن ہے. یہ کاغذ تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ یہ جدائی امکان ہے. ہم احساسات انتقال کو استعمال کرتے ہیں ہمارے کیس تحقیق کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہماری آزمائش طریقے فرموں کی طریقے کا انتقال ایک multi-objective مسئلہ کے طور پر ہے، سائل شیفٹ کو متنوع حفاظت اور فلونٹ کے ساتھ برالنس کر رہا ہے. ہمارے آزمائش میں مختلف مخالف انکوڈر ڈیکوڈر نیٹورک کو استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ اور ہم نے ایک پرڈینگ طریقہ کا استعمال کیا ہے کہ ان نمڈلوں کو ان کے لٹینٹ فضاؤں میں کس طرح استیل کے متعلق متعلق ہونے کے لئے تحقیق کرنے کے لئے۔ ہمارے آزمائش کا نتیجہ جو انسان کی تحقیقات کے ذریعہ اس سے زیادہ مطمئن ہو چکا ہے اس میں بہت سی استیل ٹرنسٹر موضوعوں کے درمیان جو نشان دیتا ہے کہ استیل ان استیل ٹرنسٹر سیسٹموں کے اندر موضوعوں سے کامل طور پر فائدہ نہیں پھیر', 'uz': "Name Uslubni tarkibdan ajratish mumkin. Bu qogʻoz bu ajratish mumkin deb aniqlanadi. Biz ma'lumotni o'zgartirish uslub tarjima qilish uchun foydalanamiz. Bir necha obʼekt muammolari sifatida o'zgartirish muvaffaqiyatlarimiz. Uslubni o'zgartirish va tarkibini saqlash va suzulik bilan o'zgartirish. Uslub uzatish uchun parallel maʼlumot yoʻq sababi biz tajribamizdagi bir nechta kodekoder tarmoqni ishlaymiz. Shunday qilib, biz bu modellarning oxirigi joylarida qanday uslub bilan bogʻliq xususiyatlarni aniqlashga foydalanamiz. The results of our experiments which are further confirmed by a human evaluation reveal the inherent trade-off between the multiple style transfer objectives which indicates that style cannot be usefully separated from content within these style-transfer systems.", 'vi': 'Chuyển đổi kiểu văn bản gồm sửa đổi kiểu của văn bản trong khi vẫn giữ nội dung của nó. Điều này giả định rằng có thể phân biệt phong cách với nội dung. Tờ giấy này sẽ tìm hiểu liệu sự phân biệt này có thể. Chúng tôi dùng truyền cảm xúc để nghiên cứu cách phân tích chuyển kiểu. Các phương pháp thử nghiệm cho phép chuyển kiểu như một vấn đề đa khách quan, thay đổi kiểu cách với tiết kiệm nội dung và khéo léo. Do thiếu dữ liệu song song cho việc chuyển giao phong cách, chúng tôi sử dụng các hệ thống mã hóa trong các thí nghiệm. Chúng tôi cũng dùng một phương pháp thăm dò để phân tích cách các mô hình này mã hóa các tính năng kiểu dáng trong khoảng cách ẩn. Kết quả thí nghiệm của chúng ta, được xác nhận thêm bởi một đánh giá con người, cho thấy sự trao đổi vốn có giữa các mục tiêu chuyển đổi phong cách đa dạng cho thấy phong cách không thể tách biệt hữu ích với nội dung trong hệ thống chuyển kiểu này.', 'bg': 'Прехвърлянето на текстов стил включва промяна на стила на текст, като същевременно запазва съдържанието му. Това предполага, че е възможно да се отдели стил от съдържание. В настоящата статия се изследва дали това разделяне е възможно. Използваме трансфера на сантимента като наш казус за анализ на трансфера на стил. Нашата експериментална методология рамкира трансфера на стил като многообективен проблем, балансирайки промяната на стила със запазването на съдържанието и плавността. Поради липсата на паралелни данни за трансфер на стил, ние използваме различни контразаритни кодер-декодерни мрежи в нашите експерименти. Също така използваме сондираща методология, за да анализираме как тези модели кодират характеристиките, свързани със стила, в своите латентни пространства. Резултатите от нашите експерименти, които допълнително се потвърждават от човешка оценка, разкриват присъщия компромис между многобройните цели за трансфер на стил, което показва, че стилът не може да бъде полезно отделен от съдържанието в тези системи за трансфер на стил.', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje tekstualnog stila uključuje izmjenu stila teksta dok čuva sadržaj. To pretpostavlja da je moguće odvojiti stil od sadržaja. Ovaj papir istražuje je li moguće razdvajanje. Koristimo prijenos osjećaja kao istraživanje slučajeva za analizu prijenosa stila. Naša eksperimentalna metodologija okvira prenošenje stila kao multiobjektivni problem, balanciranje smjene stila sa zaštitom sadržaja i tekućinom. Zbog nedostatka paralelnih podataka za prebacivanje stila koristimo razne neprijateljske mreže kodera u našim eksperimentima. Također, koristimo metodologiju ispitivanja kako bi analizirali kako ovi modeli kodiraju karakteristike vezane s stilom u njihovim latentnim prostorijama. Rezultati naših eksperimenata koji su dalje potvrđeni ljudskim procjenama otkrivaju inherentnu trgovinu između ciljeva prijenosa više stila koji ukazuju na to da stil ne može biti korisno odvojen od sadržaja unutar tih sustava prijenosa stila.', 'da': 'Overførsel af teksttypografi indebærer at ændre typografien af en tekst, samtidig med at dens indhold bevares. Dette forudsætter, at det er muligt at adskille stil fra indhold. Denne artikel undersøger, om denne adskillelse er mulig. Vi bruger sentiment transfer som vores case study til stiloverførselsanalyse. Vores eksperimentelle metode rammer stiloverførsel som et multi-objektivt problem, der balancerer stilskift med indholdsbeskyttelse og flydenhed. På grund af manglen på parallelle data til stiloverførsel anvender vi en række adversielle encoder-dekoder netværk i vores eksperimenter. Vi bruger også en sondemetode til at analysere, hvordan disse modeller koder stilrelaterede funktioner i deres latente rum. Resultaterne af vores eksperimenter, som yderligere bekræftes af en menneskelig evaluering, afslører den iboende afvejning mellem de mange stiloverførselsmål, hvilket indikerer, at stil ikke med fordel kan adskilles fra indholdet i disse stiloverførselssystemer.', 'nl': 'Tekstuele stijltransfer omvat het wijzigen van de stijl van een tekst met behoud van de inhoud ervan. Dit veronderstelt dat het mogelijk is om stijl van inhoud te scheiden. In dit artikel wordt onderzocht of deze scheiding mogelijk is. We gebruiken sentiment transfer als onze case study voor stijl transfer analyse. Onze experimentele methodologie kadert stijltransfer als een multi-objectief probleem, waarbij stijlverandering in evenwicht wordt gebracht met behoud van inhoud en vloeiendheid. Door het ontbreken van parallelle data voor stijltransfer gebruiken we in onze experimenten een verscheidenheid van tegenstrijdige encoder-decoder netwerken. Ook gebruiken we een soning methodologie om te analyseren hoe deze modellen stijlgerelateerde kenmerken coderen in hun latente ruimtes. De resultaten van onze experimenten, die verder worden bevestigd door een menselijke evaluatie, onthullen de inherente compromis tussen de multiple style transfer doelstellingen, wat aangeeft dat stijl niet bruikbaar kan worden gescheiden van inhoud binnen deze style transfer systemen.', 'de': 'Bei der Textstilübertragung wird der Stil eines Textes unter Beibehaltung seines Inhalts geändert. Dies setzt voraus, dass es möglich ist, Stil vom Inhalt zu trennen. Diese Arbeit untersucht, ob diese Trennung möglich ist. Wir verwenden Sentiment Transfer als unsere Fallstudie für Stiltransferanalysen. Unsere experimentelle Methodik fasst den Stiltransfer als ein multi-objektives Problem zusammen, das Stilwechsel mit Inhaltserhaltung und Fluency ausgleicht. Aufgrund des Mangels an parallelen Daten für die Stilübertragung verwenden wir in unseren Experimenten eine Vielzahl von adversarialen Encoder-Decoder-Netzwerken. Außerdem verwenden wir eine Sondierungsmethode, um zu analysieren, wie diese Modelle stilbezogene Merkmale in ihren latenten Räumen kodieren. Die Ergebnisse unserer Experimente, die durch eine menschliche Evaluation weiter bestätigt werden, zeigen den inhärenten Kompromiss zwischen den multiplen Stiltransferzielen, der darauf hinweist, dass Stil und Inhalt innerhalb dieser Stiltransfersysteme nicht sinnvoll voneinander getrennt werden können.', 'ko': '텍스트 스타일 변환은 텍스트 스타일을 수정하고 내용을 보존하는 것과 관련이 있다.이 가설은 양식과 내용을 분리할 수 있다.본고는 이런 분리가 가능한지 아닌지를 연구하였다.우리는 정서적 이동을 스타일 이동 분석의 사례 연구로 사용한다.우리의 실험 방법은 스타일 전환을 다목적 문제로 간주하고 스타일 전환과 내용 보존과 유창성을 균형 있게 한다.스타일 전환에 사용되는 병렬 데이터가 부족하기 때문에, 우리는 실험에서 각종 대항적인 코딩 네트워크를 사용했다.그 밖에 우리는 이러한 모델이 잠재적인 공간에서 어떻게 스타일과 관련된 특징을 인코딩하는지 탐색적인 방법을 사용하여 분석한다.우리의 실험 결과는 인류 평가의 실증을 얻어 다양한 스타일 전환 목표 간의 내재적인 균형을 보여주었다. 이것은 스타일이 이런 스타일 전환 시스템의 내용에서 효과적으로 분리될 수 없다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'id': 'Transfer gaya teks melibatkan mengubah gaya teks sementara menyimpan isi. Ini menganggap bahwa mungkin untuk memisahkan gaya dari isi. Kertas ini menyelidiki apakah pemisahan ini mungkin. Kami menggunakan transfer sentimen sebagai studi kasus kami untuk analisis transfer gaya. Metodologi percobaan kami mengubah gaya transfer sebagai masalah multi-objektif, memperimbangkan gaya perubahan dengan konservasi konten dan keseluruhan. Karena kekurangan data paralel untuk transfer gaya kami menggunakan berbagai jaringan koder-dekoder musuh dalam eksperimen kami. Juga, kami menggunakan metodologi penyelidikan untuk menganalisis bagaimana model ini mengkode fitur-fitur berkaitan dengan gaya dalam ruang tersembunyi mereka. Hasil eksperimen kita yang lebih dikonfirmasi oleh evaluasi manusia mengungkapkan perdagangan yang ada antara tujuan transfer gaya berbilang yang menunjukkan gaya itu tidak dapat dipisahkan dengan berguna dari isi dalam sistem transfer gaya ini.', 'sw': 'Uhamiaji wa mtindo wa teknolojia unahusisha kuboresha mtindo wa maandishi wakati wa kulinda maudhui yake. Hii inadhani inawezekana kutofautisha mtindo wa maudhui. Papa hii inachunguza kama utaratibu huu unawezekana. Tunatumia uhamishaji wa hisia kama utafiti wetu wa kesi kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa namna ya usafirishaji. Mradi wetu wa mazoea ya mtindo wa uhamishaji kama tatizo la malengo mengi, mabadiliko ya mtindo wa usalama na ufanisi wa maudhui. Kutokana na ukosefu wa taarifa za usafirishaji wa mtindo, tunatumia mitandao mbalimbali ya kodi-decodi katika majaribio yetu. Pia, tunatumia mbinu za kujaribu kuchambua namna mifano hii inavyohusiana na mtindo katika sehemu zao za hivi karibuni. Matokeo ya majaribio yetu ambayo yanathibitishwa zaidi na tathmini za binadamu yanaonyesha upatikanaji wa biashara uliokuwepo kati ya malengo ya usafirishaji wa mitindo mbalimbali ambayo yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo huu hauwezi kutofautishwa kwa manufaa na maudhui katika mfumo huu wa usafirishaji wa mtindo.', 'fa': 'Name این فرض می\u200cکند که ممکن است استیل از محتویات جدا شود. این کاغذ تحقیق می\u200cکند که آیا این جدایی ممکن است. ما از انتقال احساسات به عنوان مطالعه پرونده\u200cمون برای تحلیل انتقال شیوه استفاده می\u200cکنیم. روش\u200cشناسی آزمایشی ما به عنوان یک مشکل بسیار هدف، تغییر\u200cسازی سبک با محافظت و حفاظت مایع می\u200cکند. به دلیل lack of parallel data for style transfer we use a variety of opponent encoder-decoder networks in our experiments. همچنین، ما از یک روش تحقیق استفاده می کنیم تا بفهمیم چگونه این مدلها ویژگی\u200cهای رابطه\u200cای با سبک\u200cها در فضای latent خود را درک می\u200cکنند. نتیجه آزمایشات ما که توسط ارزیابی انسان بیشتر تایید شده\u200cاند، تجارت اصلی بین هدف\u200cهای انتقال متعدد طرح\u200cهای متعدد را نشان می\u200cدهد که طرح قابل استفاده از محتویات در این سیستم\u200cهای انتقال طرح جدا نمی\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Metin stili tar Bu meýdançadan stili ayırmak mümkin diýip pikir edýär. Bu kagyz şu aýrylyşyň mümkin dälmändigini barlaýar. Duýgular transferini biziň hasaplanjak analizi üçin ulanýarys. Deneysel metodolojimiz, multi-objektif bir mesele olarak stil transferini, içerikleri korumak ve aklidelik bilen balanlaştırmak. Durum göçürmek üçin paralel maglumaty ýok bolmagyna sebäbi biziň deneylerimizde birnäçe düşmanlyk ködleme a ňlary ulanýarys. Munuň üçin bu nusgalaryň ýa ňky seleňlerinde nähili kodlaýandygyny çözmek üçin synanyş metodologiýasyny ulanýarys. Adamyň deňleşmegimiz tarapyndan yzyna tassyklanan deneylerimiziň netijesi şol stil-göçürme sistemalaryň içinde ullanýan maksadyň bardygyny a ýdyýar.', 'af': "Comment Hierdie aanvaar dat dit moontlik is om styl te skei van inhoud. Hierdie papier ondersoek of hierdie skeiding moontlik is. Ons gebruik sentimentoordrag as ons kasstudie vir styl oordraganaliseer. Ons eksperimentale metodologie raamme styl oordrag as 'n multi-objekte probleem, balanse styl verskuif met inhoud opslaan en fluiditeit. Dus die ontbreek van parallele data vir styl oordrag gebruik ons 'n verskillende teenstandaarlike enkodernetwerke in ons eksperimente. Ons gebruik ook van 'n probeermetodologie om te analiseer hoe hierdie modele kodeer stilverwante funksies in hul latente spasies. Die resultate van ons eksperimente wat verder bevestig word deur 'n menslike evaluering vertoon die inherende handel-af tussen die veelvuldige styl oordrag objekte wat wys dat styl nie gebruik kan wees deur inhoud in hierdie styl oordrag stelsels nie.", 'sq': 'Transferimi i stilit tekstual përfshin modifikimin e stilit të një teksti duke ruajtur përmbajtjen e tij. This assumes that it is possible to separate style from content.  Kjo letër heton nëse kjo ndarje është e mundur. Ne përdorim transferimin e ndjenjave si studimin tonë të rastit për analizën e transferimit të stilit. Metodologjia jonë eksperimentale kornizon transferimin e stilit si një problem shumëobjektiv, balancimin e ndryshimit të stilit me ruajtjen e përmbajtjes dhe fluencën. Për shkak të mungesës së të dhënave paralele për transferimin e stilit ne përdorim një shumëllojshmëri të rrjeteve kundërshtarë kodues-dekoder në eksperimentet tona. Gjithashtu, ne përdorim një metodologi sondazhi për të analizuar se si këto modele kodojnë karakteristikat lidhur me stilin në hapësirat e tyre të fshehta. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tona që janë konfirmuar më tej nga një vlerësim njerëzor zbulojnë ndërmjet objektivave të transferimit të stilit të shumëfishtë që tregon se stili nuk mund të ndahet me dobi nga përmbajtja brenda këtyre sistemeve të transferimit të stilit.', 'hy': 'Տեքստյուալ ոճի փոխանցումը ներառում է տեքստի ոճի փոխումը, մինչ պահպանում է դրա պարունակությունը: Սա ենթադրում է, որ հնարավոր է առանձնացնել ոճը պարունակությունից: Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է, արդյոք այս բաժանման հնարավորություն է: We use sentiment transfer as our case study for style transfer analysis.  Մեր փորձարկվող մեթոդոլոգիան շրջանակներում է ոճի փոխանցումը որպես բազմաօբյեկտիվ խնդիր, հավասարակշռում է ոճի փոխումը պարունակության պահպանության և հեշտության հետ: Ստիլի փոխանցման զուգահեռ տվյալների բացակայության պատճառով մենք մեր փորձերում օգտագործում ենք բազմաթիվ հակառակ կոդեր-կոդեր ցանցեր: Մենք նաև օգտագործում ենք ուսումնասիրելու մեթոդոլոգիան, որպեսզի վերլուծենք, թե ինչպես են այս մոդելները կոդավորում իրենց թաքնված տարածքներում ոճի հետ կապված հատկությունները: Մեր փորձարկումների արդյունքները, որոնք ավելի շատ հաստատում են մարդկային գնահատման միջոցով, բացահայտում են բազմաթիվ ոճի փոխանցման նպատակների միջև բնորոշ հակամարտությունը, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ ոճը չի կարող օգտակար առանձնացնել այս ոճի փոխանցման համա', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ዘይት ማቀናጃ የጽሑፉን ሥርዓት ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ዓይነት ከውይይት እንዲለይ ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ ይህ መለያየት ይቻላልን? የሥርዓት ትምህርት ለመዘዋወር የስሜት ትምህርት እናስቀራለን፡፡ የሞከሩ ማድረጊያ ፍሬማችን በብዙ አካባቢ ጉዳይ እንደሚለውጥ፣ የሥርዓት ለውጥ በማስተካከል እና የውጤት መጠበቅ እና ፍላጎት ጋር ነው፡፡ በዓይነታችን ለመዘዋወር ተቃውሞ የሚያስፈልገውን ዳርቻ በመጠቀም ምክንያት በተቃዋሚ የencoder-decoder መረብ እናስገድዳለን፡፡ እናም እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች በኋለኛው ቦታዎቻቸው የዓይነት ሥርዓት እንዴት እንደዘረጋ እናስተምር ዘንድ የሚሞክራቸውን ማህበረሰብ እንጠይቃለን፡፡ የሰው ማስታወቂያ የጨዋታውን ፍጻሜዎች በብዙ ዓይነት የተለወጠውን የንግድ አቃውሞ በሚያስታውቀው ይታያል፡፡', 'az': 'Məzmunlarını qoruyarkən mətn stilinin istifadəsini dəyişdirmək məlumatlarının istifadəsidir. Bu məlumatdan stili ayırmaq mümkün olduğunu iddia edir. Bu kağıt bu ayrılıq mümkün olub olmadığını soruşur. Biz duyguları tərəfindən istifadə etmək üçün məsələmiz tərəfindən istifadə edirik. Bizim eksperimental metodolojimiz çoxlu-objektif problemi olaraq stil tərəfindən istifadə edir, istifadə tərəfindən müəyyən edilən dəyişiklik tərəfindən istifadə edir. Durum transfer üçün paralel verilər yoxduğuna görə müxtəlif düşmənçilik kodlayıcı a ğlarını eksperimentlərimizdə istifadə edirik. Ayrıca, bu modellərin latent alanlarındakı şəkillərin necə kodlamasını analiz etmək üçün sınama metodolojisini istifadə edirik. İnsan değerlendirməsi ilə daha çox təsdiqlənmiş təcrübələrimizin sonuçları çoxlu stil tərəfindən istifadə edilməyən təhrif məqsədilərin arasındakı ticarəti göstərir.', 'ca': "La transfer ència d'estil textual implica modificar l'estil d'un text mentre conserva el seu contingut. Això suposa que és possible separar l'estil del contingut. Aquest article investiga si aquesta separació és possible. Utilitzem la transfer ència de sentiments com a estudi de cas per a l'anàlisi de transferència d'estil. La nostra metodologia experimental estructura la transfer ència d'estil com un problem a multiobjectiu, equilibrant el canvi d'estil amb la preservació del contingut i la fluència. Due to the lack of parallel data for style transfer we employ a variety of adversarial encoder-decoder networks in our experiments.  També utilitzem una metodologia d'assaig per analitzar com aquests models codifiquen característiques relacionades amb l'estil als seus espais latents. Els resultats dels nostres experiments que són més confirmats per una evaluació human a revelen el compromís inherent entre els múltiples objectius de transfer ència d'estil que indica que l'estil no pot ser separat útilment del contingut dins aquests sistemes de transferència d'estil.", 'bn': 'টেক্সটেক্সটেল স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের মধ্যে একটি টেক্সটের ধরন পরিবর্তনের ব্যবস্থা সংরক্ষণ করার সাথে জড়িত। এটি ধারণা করে যে বিষয়বস্তু থেকে স্টাইল বিচ্ছিন্ন করা সম্ভব। এই পত্রিকা তদন্ত করেছে এই বিচ্ছিন্ন সম্ভব কিনা। আমরা আমাদের কেসের গবেষণা হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি স্টাইল পরিবর্তন বিশ্লেষণের জন্য। আমাদের পরীক্ষামূলক পদ্ধতি ফ্রেমের স্টাইল বিনিময়ে বহুলক্ষেত্রের সমস্যা হিসেবে পরিণত করে, বিষয়বস্তু সংরক্ষণ এবং ফ্লাইসিক স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের জন্য প্যারালেল ডাটা অভাবের কারণে আমরা আমাদের পরীক্ষায় বিভিন্ন বিরোধী এনকোডার-ডেকোডার নেটওয়ার্ক চাকরি করি। Also, we use of a probing methodology to analyse how these models encode style-related features in their latent spaces.  আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল যা মানুষের মূল্যের দ্বারা আরো নিশ্চিত হয়েছে তা দেখাচ্ছে বিভিন্ন ধরনের ট্রান্সফারের লক্ষ্যের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন বাণিজ্য-আফ', 'cs': 'Přenos textového stylu zahrnuje úpravu stylu textu při zachování jeho obsahu. To předpokládá, že je možné oddělit styl od obsahu. Tento článek zkoumá, zda je toto oddělení možné. Přenos sentimentu používáme jako případovou studii pro analýzu stylu transferu. Naše experimentální metodika rámcuje přenos stylu jako vícecílový problém, který vyváží posun stylu s uchováváním obsahu a plynulostí. Vzhledem k nedostatku paralelních dat pro stylový přenos používáme v našich experimentech celou řadu kontroverzních kodérových a dekodérových sítí. Dále používáme metodiku sondování k analýze toho, jak tyto modely kódují stylové prvky ve svých latentních prostorech. Výsledky našich experimentů, které jsou dále potvrzeny lidským hodnocením, odhalují inherentní kompromis mezi několika cíli stylového transferu, což naznačuje, že styl nelze užitečně oddělit od obsahu v rámci těchto stylových transferových systémů.', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje tekstualnog stila uključuje izmjenu stila teksta dok čuva sadržaj. To pretpostavlja da je moguće odvojiti stil od sadržaja. Ovaj papir istražuje je li moguće razdvajanje. Koristimo prenos sentimenta kao studiju slučaja za analizu transfera stila. Naša eksperimentalna metodologija okvira prenošenje stila kao multiobjektivni problem, balanciranje smjene stila sa sačuvanjem sadržaja i tekućinom. Zbog nedostatka paralelnih podataka za prebacivanje stila koristimo razne mreže protivnih kodera u našim eksperimentima. Također, koristimo metodologiju ispitivanja kako bi analizirali kako ovi modeli kodiraju karakteristike vezane sa stilom u njihovim latentnim prostorijama. Rezultati naših eksperimenata koji su dalje potvrđeni ljudskim procjenama otkrivaju nasljednu trgovinu između ciljeva prijenosa više stila koji ukazuju na to da stil ne može biti korisno odvojen od sadržaja unutar tih sustava prijenosa stila.', 'fi': 'Tekstityylin siirto tarkoittaa tekstin tyylin muokkaamista säilyttäen sen sisällön. Tämä olettaa, että on mahdollista erottaa tyyli sisällöstä. Tässä artikkelissa selvitetään, onko tämä erottaminen mahdollista. Käytämme tunteiden siirtoa tapaustutkimuksena tyylinsiirtoanalyysissä. Kokeellisessa menetelmässämme tyylinsiirto on monitavoitteinen ongelma, joka tasapainottaa tyylinsiirtoa sisällön säilyttämiseen ja sujuvuuteen. Koska rinnakkaista dataa ei ole saatavilla tyylinsiirtoon, käytämme kokeissamme erilaisia kontrastiaalisia kooderi-dekooderiverkkoja. Lisäksi käytämme luotausmenetelmää analysoimaan, miten nämä mallit koodaavat tyyliin liittyviä ominaisuuksia piilevissä tiloissa. Kokeidemme tulokset, jotka myös vahvistetaan ihmisen suorittamalla arvioinnilla, paljastavat luontaisen kompromissin useiden tyylinsiirtotavoitteiden välillä, mikä osoittaa, että tyyliä ei voida erottaa hyödyllisesti näiden tyylinsiirtojärjestelmien sisällöstä.', 'et': 'Tekstiline stiiliülekanne hõlmab teksti stiili muutmist, säilitades selle sisu. See eeldab, et stiili on võimalik sisust eraldada. Käesolevas dokumendis uuritakse, kas see eraldamine on võimalik. Stiilisiirde analüüsimiseks kasutame sentimentaalsiiret oma juhtumi uuringuna. Meie eksperimentaalne metoodika kujundab stiiliülekannet mitmeobjektiivse probleemina, tasakaalustades stiilinihetust sisu säilitamise ja sujuvusega. Paralleelsete andmete puudumise tõttu stiiliülekande jaoks kasutame oma eksperimentides erinevaid kontrastaarseid kodeerija-dekoodrivõrke. Samuti kasutame proovimismeetodit, et analüüsida, kuidas need mudelid kodeerivad stiiliga seotud funktsioone oma latentsetes ruumides. Meie eksperimentide tulemused, mida inimhinnang veelgi kinnitab, näitavad mitmete stiilisiirde eesmärkide vahelist kompromisse, mis näitab, et stiili ei saa kasulikult eraldada nende stiilisiirde süsteemide sisust.', 'he': 'העברת סגנון טקסטולי כוללת שינוי הסגנון של טקסט בזמן שמירה בתוכנתו. זה מניח שאפשר להפריד את הסגנון מהתוכן. הנייר הזה חוקר אם ההפרדה הזאת אפשרית. אנחנו משתמשים בהעברת רגשות כמחקר התיק שלנו לניתוח העברת סגנון. המטדולוגיה הניסיוניית שלנו מסגרת העברת סגנון כבעיה רבה-אובייקטיבית, מאיזון שינוי סגנון עם שמירת תוכן ושקטנות. בגלל חוסר נתונים מקבילים עבור העברת סגנון אנחנו משתמשים במגוון של רשתות קודד-קודד נוגדיות בניסויים שלנו. בנוסף, אנו משתמשים במטדולוגיה של חקירה כדי לנתח איך הדוגמנים האלה קודים תכונות קשורות לסגנון בחלל הלאוטן שלהם. תוצאות הניסויים שלנו אשר מאושרות נוסף על ידי הערכה אנושית מראים את ההחלטה הנכונה בין מטרות העברה הסגנון הרובים שמצביעים שסגנון לא יכול להיות מופרד באופן שימושי מתוכן בתוך מערכות העברה הסגנון הללו.', 'ha': "Transmit misali na Teksil yana ƙunsa da gyare-launin matsayi idan an tsare maɓallin. Wannan yana zaton an iya iya iya rarraba salon daga kayan ƙunsa. Wannan takardar aiki na tambayi ko za'a iya amfani da wannan gaura. Tuna amfani da shige da hisia kamar karatunmu na zama fasalin misalin transfer. Shirin ayuka na jarraba misalin firam kamar wata ma'abun masu yawa, mai shida salon mai daidaita da tsarin maɓalli da fassara. Dukan bã da data masu daidaita wa transfer salon, sai mu aiki wasu zane-kodkoder-daidai cikin jarrabamarmu. Kayya, tuna amfani da wata metodi mai jarraba dõmin mu yi anadi yadda waɗannan misãlai ke kodi masu husũma da salon cikin filayen nan nan nan. Matarin jarrabai da aka ƙara ƙara bayani ga kiman, za'a bayyana shirin-farat ta guda a tsakanin abun shiryarwa masu yawa da ke nũna cẽwa, ba za'a iya rarraba salon da amfani ba daga cikin tsarin-transfer-salon.", 'sk': 'Prenos besedilnega sloga vključuje spreminjanje sloga besedila in ohranjanje njegove vsebine. To predpostavlja, da je mogoče ločiti slog od vsebine. V prispevku se preučuje, ali je ta ločitev mogoča. Prenos čustva uporabljamo kot študijo primera za analizo prenosa sloga. Naša eksperimentalna metodologija okvirja prenos sloga kot večciljni problem, ki uravnoteži premik sloga z ohranjanjem vsebine in tekočino. Zaradi pomanjkanja vzporednih podatkov za prenos slogov v naših eksperimentih uporabljamo različne kontradiralne kodirne-dekodirne mreže. Poleg tega uporabljamo metodologijo sondiranja za analizo, kako ti modeli kodirajo značilnosti, povezane s slogom, v svojih latentnih prostorih. Rezultati naših poskusov, ki jih potrjuje človeška ocena, razkrivajo neločljiv kompromis med več cilji prenosa sloga, kar kaže, da sloga ni mogoče koristno ločiti od vsebine v teh sistemih prenosa sloga.', 'jv': 'tab-style Nyong supoya-supoyo nganggo iso nggawe stiil nang susahe Pesene iki dipujuhke nungsa pangan iki apa. Name Name Tanggal ngenggo data paraleling kanggo nggawe nggawe sistem dadi karo perusahaan koder-decoder Nambah, kita ngubah sistem dadine dipunanggunian kanggo maneh "model". Rejaleng nang ujaran anyar sing paling nggawe ngupakan bener tentang karo assempen wong liyane', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱིས་ཡི་གེའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་དུ་བཅུག་པ འདིས་ནང་དོན་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་མིན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་རྟོགས་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བྱས་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་འདིས་ཡིན་མིན་བཟུང་དག་བཟོ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཔྱད་རྩིས་ཡོད་ཅིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ Our experimental methodology frames style transfer as a multi-objective problem, balancing style shift with content preservation and fluency. དབྱེ་རིགས་སྐྱེལ་ལ་ཆ་མཐུན་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་བ་དག་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་རྟགས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་དྲ་རྩིས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད། Also, we use of a probing methodology to analyze how these models encode style-related features in their latent spaces. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིག་གིས་རྐྱེན་བྱས་མེད་པའི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་དག་གི་གྲངས་སུ་རྣམས་བཟོས'}
{'en': 'Heterogeneous Recycle Generation for Chinese Grammatical Error Correction', 'ar': 'إنشاء محذوفات غير متجانسة لتصحيح الأخطاء النحوية الصينية', 'fr': 'Génération de recyclage hétérogène pour la correction des erreurs grammaticales chinoises', 'pt': 'Geração de reciclagem heterogênea para correção de erros gramaticais em chinês', 'es': 'Generación de reciclaje heterogéneo para la corrección de errores gramaticales chinos', 'ja': '中国語文法誤り訂正のための異種リサイクル生成', 'zh': '中文语法纠错异构循环生', 'hi': 'चीनी व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार के लिए विषम रीसायकल जनरेशन', 'ru': 'Гетерогенная генерация рециркуляции для исправления китайских грамматических ошибок', 'ga': 'Giniúint Athchúrsála Ilchineálach le haghaidh Ceartú Earráide Gramadaí na Síne', 'el': 'Ετερογενής παραγωγή ανακύκλωσης για την κινεζική γραμματική διόρθωση σφαλμάτων', 'it': 'Generazione eterogena di riciclaggio per la correzione degli errori grammaticali cinesi', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Heterogeneous Recycle Generation for Chinese Grammatical Error Correction', 'kk': 'Қытай граматикалық қатені түзету үшін тегероген қайталау', 'hu': 'Heterogén újrahasznosítás a kínai nyelvtani hibakorrekcióhoz', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Ulang-ulang Heterogen untuk Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik Cina', 'mk': 'Генерација на хетероген рецикл за корекција на кинеска граматска грешка', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് ഗ്രാമ്മാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഹെറ്റര്\u200dജെനിസ് റിസൈക്കിള്\u200d സൃഷ്', 'pl': 'Heterogenne generowanie recyklingu dla korekcji błędów gramatycznych w Chinach', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Riċiklu Eteroġenju għall-Korrezzjoni ta’ Żbalji Grammatiċi Ċiniżi', 'mn': 'Хятад Грамматикийн алдаа засаглалтын төлөвлөгөө', 'sr': 'Heterogenija generacija recikliranja za kinesku Gramatičnu korekciju greške', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Generarea heterogenă de reciclare pentru corectarea erorilor gramaticale chinezești', 'sv': 'Heterogen återvinningsgenerering för kinesisk grammatisk felkorrigering', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Heterogeneous Refugle Generation of Chinese Grammatical Error Correction', 'ur': 'چینی گرماتیک خطا اصلاح کے لئے ہٹروژن ریسیکل پیدائش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Хетерогенно генериране на рециклиране за корекция на китайската граматична грешка', 'nl': 'Heterogene Recycling Generatie voor Chinese Grammatische Foutcorrectie', 'id': 'Generasi Recikle Heterogen untuk Koreksi Galat Grammatis Cina', 'de': 'Heterogene Recycle Generation für chinesische Grammatical Error Correction', 'hr': 'Generacija Heterogenija recikliranja za kinesku Gramatičnu korekciju greške', 'ko': '중국어 문법 오류의 이구 순환 생성', 'da': 'Heterogen genbrugsgenerering til kinesisk grammatisk fejlkorrektion', 'sw': 'Ujengenezaji wa upya wa Heterogeneous kwa ajili ya uharibifu wa Tamko wa China', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i Riçikletave Heterogjene për Korrektimin e Gabimeve Gramatike Kineze', 'fa': 'تولید دوباره دوباره دوباره دوباره برای اصلاح خطای گراماتیک چینی', 'tr': 'Çinçe Grammatikal Hata Dogrymy üçin Heterogen Yeniden Döredişi', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի գրամմատիկ սխալների ուղղության հեթերոգեն վերարտադրման համար', 'bn': 'চীনা গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি সংস্কারের জন্য হেটারোজেনিয়ান রিসাইকেল সংস্কার', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'az': '쎇楮⁇牡浭慴楣慬⁈慴愠䓃뱺즙汴淉饳椠쎼쎧쎼渠䡥瑥牯来渠奥湩擉饮⁔즙얟歩氊', 'bs': 'Heterogena generacija reciklira za kinesku Gramatičnu korekciju greške', 'ca': 'Generació de reciclatges heterogènes per a corregir els errors gramàtics xinesos', 'cs': 'Heterogenní generace recyklace pro korekci čínských gramatických chyb', 'et': 'Heterogeene ringlussevõtu genereerimine hiina grammatilise veaparanduse jaoks', 'fi': 'Heterogeeninen kierrätys kiinalaisen kielioppivirheen korjaukseen', 'he': 'מיוצר מחזור טרוגני לתיקון שגיאות גרמטיות סיניות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Heterogeno ustvarjanje recikliranja za kitajsko slovnično popravljanje napak', 'jv': 'Generation', 'bo': 'Heterogeneous Recycle Generation for Chinese Grammatical Error Correction'}
{'en': 'Most recent works in the field of grammatical error correction (GEC) rely on neural machine translation-based models. Although these models boast impressive performance, they require a massive amount of data to properly train. Furthermore, NMT-based systems treat GEC purely as a translation task and overlook the editing aspect of it. In this work we propose a heterogeneous approach to Chinese GEC, composed of a NMT-based model, a sequence editing model, and a spell checker. Our methodology not only achieves a new state-of-the-art performance for Chinese GEC, but also does so without relying on data augmentation or GEC-specific architecture changes. We further experiment with all possible configurations of our system with respect to model composition order and number of rounds of correction. A detailed analysis of each model and their contributions to the correction process is performed by adapting the ERRANT scorer to be able to score Chinese sentences.', 'fr': "Les travaux les plus récents dans le domaine de la correction des erreurs grammaticales (GEC) s'appuient sur des modèles basés sur la traduction de machines neuronales. Bien que ces modèles offrent des performances impressionnantes, ils nécessitent une énorme quantité de données pour s'entraîner correctement. De plus, les systèmes basés sur NMT traitent GEC uniquement comme une tâche de traduction et négligent l'aspect édition de celui-ci. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une approche hétérogène du GEC chinois, composée d'un modèle basé sur NMT, d'un modèle d'édition de séquence et d'un correcteur orthographique. Notre méthodologie permet non seulement d'atteindre de nouvelles performances de pointe pour le GEC chinois, mais elle le fait également sans dépendre de l'augmentation des données ou des modifications d'architecture spécifiques au GEC. Nous expérimentons également toutes les configurations possibles de notre système en ce qui concerne l'ordre de composition du modèle et le nombre de cycles de correction. Une analyse détaillée de chaque modèle et de leurs contributions au processus de correction est effectuée en adaptant le marqueur ERRANT pour pouvoir noter des phrases chinoises.", 'ar': 'تعتمد معظم الأعمال الحديثة في مجال تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية (GEC) على النماذج القائمة على الترجمة الآلية العصبية. على الرغم من أن هذه النماذج تتميز بأداء مذهل ، إلا أنها تتطلب قدرًا هائلاً من البيانات للتدريب بشكل صحيح. علاوة على ذلك ، تتعامل الأنظمة القائمة على NMT مع GEC كمهمة ترجمة بحتة وتتغاضى عن جانب التحرير فيها. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نهجًا غير متجانس لـ GEC الصيني ، يتألف من نموذج قائم على NMT ، ونموذج تحرير تسلسل ، ومدقق إملائي. لا تحقق منهجيتنا أداءً جديدًا متطورًا لـ GEC الصيني فحسب ، بل تحقق ذلك أيضًا دون الاعتماد على زيادة البيانات أو تغييرات البنية الخاصة بـ GEC. نجرب أيضًا جميع التكوينات الممكنة لنظامنا فيما يتعلق بترتيب تكوين النموذج وعدد جولات التصحيح. يتم إجراء تحليل مفصل لكل نموذج ومساهماته في عملية التصحيح من خلال تكييف مسجل ERRANT ليكون قادرًا على تسجيل الجمل الصينية.', 'pt': 'Os trabalhos mais recentes no campo da correção de erros gramaticais (GEC) contam com modelos baseados em tradução automática neural. Embora esses modelos tenham um desempenho impressionante, eles exigem uma enorme quantidade de dados para serem treinados adequadamente. Além disso, os sistemas baseados em NMT tratam o GEC puramente como uma tarefa de tradução e ignoram o aspecto de edição do mesmo. Neste trabalho propomos uma abordagem heterogênea da GEC chinesa, composta por um modelo baseado em NMT, um modelo de edição de sequência e um corretor ortográfico. Nossa metodologia não apenas alcança um novo desempenho de última geração para o GEC chinês, mas também o faz sem depender de aumento de dados ou alterações de arquitetura específicas do GEC. Além disso, experimentamos todas as configurações possíveis do nosso sistema em relação à ordem de composição do modelo e número de rodadas de correção. Uma análise detalhada de cada modelo e suas contribuições para o processo de correção é realizada adaptando o scorer ERRANT para poder pontuar frases em chinês.', 'es': 'Los trabajos más recientes en el campo de la corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC) se basan en modelos basados en la traducción automática neuronal. Aunque estos modelos cuentan con un rendimiento impresionante, requieren una enorme cantidad de datos para entrenarse correctamente. Además, los sistemas basados en NMT tratan a GEC únicamente como una tarea de traducción y pasan por alto el aspecto de edición de la misma. En este trabajo proponemos un enfoque heterogéneo de los GEC chinos, compuesto por un modelo basado en NMT, un modelo de edición de secuencias y un corrector ortográfico. Nuestra metodología no solo logra un nuevo rendimiento de vanguardia para los GEC chinos, sino que también lo hace sin depender del aumento de datos o cambios de arquitectura específicos de GEC. Experimentamos con todas las configuraciones posibles de nuestro sistema con respecto al orden de composición del modelo y el número de rondas de corrección. Se realiza un análisis detallado de cada modelo y sus contribuciones al proceso de corrección adaptando el marcador ERRANT para poder puntuar frases en chino.', 'ru': 'Самые последние работы в области грамматической коррекции ошибок (GEC) опираются на модели на основе нейронного машинного перевода. Хотя эти модели могут похвастаться впечатляющей производительностью, они требуют огромного объема данных для правильной тренировки. Кроме того, системы на основе НМТ рассматривают ГЭК исключительно как задачу перевода и упускают из виду ее аспект редактирования. В этой работе мы предлагаем гетерогенный подход к китайскому GEC, состоящий из модели на основе NMT, модели редактирования последовательностей и проверки орфографии. Наша методология не только достигает новой современной производительности для китайской GEC, но и делает это, не полагаясь на расширение данных или изменения архитектуры, специфичные для GEC. Мы далее экспериментируем со всеми возможными конфигурациями нашей системы по порядку состава модели и количеству раундов коррекции. Подробный анализ каждой модели и их вклада в процесс коррекции выполняется путем адаптации ошибочного счетчика, чтобы иметь возможность оценивать китайские предложения.', 'ja': '文法的誤り訂正（ GEC ）の分野における最近の著作のほとんどは、ニューラル機械翻訳ベースのモデルに依存している。これらのモデルは印象的なパフォーマンスを誇りますが、適切なトレーニングには膨大な量のデータが必要です。さらに、NMTベースのシステムは、GECを純粋に翻訳タスクとして扱い、編集の側面を見落とします。本研究では、NMTベースのモデル、シーケンス編集モデル、スペルチェッカーで構成された中国のGECへの異種アプローチを提案します。当社の方法論は、中国のGECにとって新しい最先端のパフォーマンスを実現するだけでなく、データ拡張やGEC固有のアーキテクチャ変更に依存することなく実現します。モデルの構成順序と補正ラウンド数に関して、システムのすべての可能な構成をさらに実験します。各モデルの詳細な分析と修正プロセスへの貢献は、誤ったスコアラーを中国語の文章を採点できるように適応させることによって行われます。', 'zh': '语法纠错(GEC)域之最新,赖于神经机器翻译。 虽然有深性,大用数乃正。 又NMT统以GEC纯为译职,忽于编辑。 于是条上NMT体,序辑拼写检查器中国GEC异构法。 吾法非止为中国GEC得最先进之新性能,又不赖数增GEC特定之架构改。 试之以次,轮数之以配。 ERRANT评分器以详细分析之,以评分中文句。', 'hi': 'व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (जीईसी) के क्षेत्र में सबसे हाल के काम तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद-आधारित मॉडल पर भरोसा करते हैं। यद्यपि ये मॉडल प्रभावशाली प्रदर्शन का दावा करते हैं, उन्हें ठीक से प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए भारी मात्रा में डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है। इसके अलावा, एनएमटी-आधारित सिस्टम जीईसी को विशुद्ध रूप से एक अनुवाद कार्य के रूप में मानते हैं और इसके संपादन पहलू को अनदेखा करते हैं। इस काम में हम चीनी जीईसी के लिए एक विषम दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक एनएमटी-आधारित मॉडल, एक अनुक्रम संपादन मॉडल और एक वर्तनी परीक्षक से बना है। हमारी पद्धति न केवल चीनी जीईसी के लिए एक नया अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है, बल्कि डेटा वृद्धि या जीईसी-विशिष्ट आर्किटेक्चर परिवर्तनों पर भरोसा किए बिना भी ऐसा करती है। हम आगे मॉडल संरचना आदेश और सुधार के दौर की संख्या के संबंध में हमारे सिस्टम के सभी संभव विन्यास के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रत्येक मॉडल का एक विस्तृत विश्लेषण और सुधार प्रक्रिया में उनके योगदान को चीनी वाक्यों को स्कोर करने में सक्षम होने के लिए ERRANT स्कोरर को अनुकूलित करके किया जाता है।', 'ga': 'Bíonn na saothair is deireanaí i réimse ceartú earráide gramadaí (GEC) ag brath ar mhúnlaí néaracha atá bunaithe ar aistriúchán. Cé go bhfuil feidhmíocht iontach ag na samhlacha seo, teastaíonn méid ollmhór sonraí uathu chun oiliúint cheart a dhéanamh. Ina theannta sin, déileálann córais atá bunaithe ar NMT le GEC mar thasc aistriúcháin amháin agus féachann siad ar an ngné eagarthóireachta de. San obair seo molaimid cur chuige ilchineálach i leith GEC na Síne, comhdhéanta de shamhail bunaithe ar NMT, samhail eagarthóireachta seichimh, agus seiceálaí litrithe. Ní hamháin go mbaineann ár modheolaíocht amach feidhmíocht úrscothach do GEC na Síne, ach déanann sé amhlaidh freisin gan a bheith ag brath ar mhéadú sonraí nó athruithe ailtireachta a bhaineann go sonrach le GEC. Déanaimid tástáil bhreise ar gach cumraíocht fhéideartha dár gcóras maidir le hord comhdhéanamh na samhla agus líon na mbabhtaí ceartúcháin. Déantar anailís mhionsonraithe ar gach múnla agus an méid a chuireann siad leis an bpróiseas ceartúcháin tríd an scórálaí ERRANT a oiriúnú chun a bheith in ann abairtí Síneacha a scóráil.', 'el': 'Τα πιο πρόσφατα έργα στον τομέα της διόρθωσης γραμματικών σφαλμάτων βασίζονται σε μοντέλα νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Αν και αυτά τα μοντέλα διαθέτουν εντυπωσιακή απόδοση, απαιτούν τεράστια ποσότητα δεδομένων για να εκπαιδεύσουν σωστά. Επιπλέον, τα συστήματα που βασίζονται σε NMT αντιμετωπίζουν την GEC καθαρά ως μεταφραστική εργασία και παραβλέπουν την επιμέλεια της. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια ετερογενή προσέγγιση στην κινεζική GEC, η οποία αποτελείται από ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο σε NMT, ένα μοντέλο επεξεργασίας ακολουθίας και έναν ορθογραφικό έλεγχο. Η μεθοδολογία μας όχι μόνο επιτυγχάνει μια νέα απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για το κινεζικό GEC, αλλά το κάνει επίσης χωρίς να βασίζεται σε αύξηση δεδομένων ή αλλαγές αρχιτεκτονικής ειδικά για το GEC. Περαιτέρω πειραματιζόμαστε με όλες τις πιθανές διαμορφώσεις του συστήματός μας όσον αφορά τη σειρά σύνθεσης του μοντέλου και τον αριθμό των γύρων διόρθωσης. Μια λεπτομερής ανάλυση του κάθε μοντέλου και της συμβολής τους στη διαδικασία διόρθωσης πραγματοποιείται με την προσαρμογή του σκόρερ ώστε να είναι σε θέση να σκοράρει κινεζικές προτάσεις.', 'hu': 'A nyelvtani hibakorrekció (GEC) területén végzett legfrissebb munkák neurális gépi fordításon alapuló modellekre támaszkodnak. Bár ezek a modellek lenyűgöző teljesítménnyel büszkélkednek, hatalmas mennyiségű adatot igényelnek a megfelelő edzéshez. Ezenkívül az NMT-alapú rendszerek a GEC-t pusztán fordítási feladatként kezelik, és figyelmen kívül hagyják annak szerkesztési aspektusát. Ebben a munkában a kínai GEC heterogén megközelítését javasoljuk, amely egy NMT alapú modellből, egy sorozatszerkesztő modellből és egy helyesírás-ellenőrzőből áll. Módszertanunk nemcsak új, korszerű teljesítményt ér el a kínai GEC számára, hanem anélkül is, hogy adatbővítésre vagy GEC-specifikus architektúra változtatásokra támaszkodna. Továbbá kísérletezünk rendszerünk összes lehetséges konfigurációjával a modellösszetétel sorrendje és a korrekciós fordulók száma tekintetében. Az egyes modellek részletes elemzését és hozzájárulását a korrekciós folyamathoz az ERRANT pontszámítógép adaptálásával végezzük, hogy képes legyen a kínai mondatok pontszámára.', 'it': "I lavori più recenti nel campo della correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC) si basano su modelli basati sulla traduzione automatica neurale. Anche se questi modelli vantano prestazioni impressionanti, richiedono una quantità enorme di dati per allenarsi correttamente. Inoltre, i sistemi basati su NMT trattano GEC esclusivamente come un compito di traduzione e trascurano l'aspetto di editing di esso. In questo lavoro proponiamo un approccio eterogeneo al GEC cinese, composto da un modello basato su NMT, un modello di editing sequenziale e un correttore ortografico. La nostra metodologia non solo raggiunge una nuova performance all'avanguardia per GEC cinese, ma lo fa anche senza contare sull'aumento dei dati o sui cambiamenti dell'architettura GEC specifici. Sperimentiamo inoltre tutte le configurazioni possibili del nostro sistema per quanto riguarda l'ordine della composizione del modello e il numero di giri di correzione. Un'analisi dettagliata di ogni modello e dei loro contributi al processo di correzione viene eseguita adattando il marcatore ERRANT per essere in grado di segnare frasi cinesi.", 'kk': 'Грамматикалық қате түзету (GEC) өрісіндегі ең жаңа жұмыс істері невралдық компьютердің аудармалы үлгілеріне тәуелді. Бұл үлгілер дұрыс оқыту үшін көп деректер қажет етеді. Қосымша, NMT- негіздеген жүйелер GEC тапсырмасын аудару тапсырмасы ретінде қарап, өзгерту аспектін қарай қарайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, NMT негіздеген үлгі, реттік өңдеу үлгісін және емле тексергішін қытайша GEC гетероген арқылы ұсынып тастаймыз. Біздің методологиямыз тек қытайша GEC үшін жаңа күй- жайы әрекетті жеткізе алмайды, сондай-ақ деректерді өзгерту не GEC архитектурасының өзгерістеріне сенмей алмайды. Біз жүйеңіздің барлық баптауларымыз үлгі құрылу ретіне және түзету тәртібінің саны туралы тәжірибелеміз. Әрбір моделінің егжей- тегжейі анализ және олардың түзету процесіне қатынасы жұмыс істейді. ERRANT пішімдерін қытайша сөйлемелерді есептеу үшін қолданылады.', 'lt': 'Naujausi darbai gramatinių klaidų koregavimo srityje (GEC) grindžiami modeliais, pagrįstais nervinių mašin ų vertimu. Nors šiems modeliams būdingas įspūdingas rezultatas, jiems reikalingas didelis kiekis duomenų tinkamam mokymui. Be to, NMT grindžiamos sistemos vertina GEC kaip vertimo užduotį ir neatsižvelgia į jo redakcijos aspektą. Šiame darbe siūlome skirtingą požiūrį į Kinijos GEC, kurį sudaro NMT pagrįstas modelis, sekos redagavimo modelis ir raštų tikrintojas. Our methodology not only achieves a new state-of-the-art performance for Chinese GEC, but also does so without relying on data augmentation or GEC-specific architecture changes.  Toliau eksperimentuojame su visomis galimomis mūsų sistemos konfigūracijomis modelio sudėties tvarkos ir koregavimo apskritimų skaičiaus atžvilgiu. Išsami kiekvieno modelio analizė ir jų indėlis į koregavimo procesą atliekamas pritaikant ERRANT rezultatorių, kad būtų galima nustatyti Kinijos sakinius.', 'ka': 'უფრო ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო შეცდომის კონფიგურაციის (GEC) პანელში იყოს ნეიროლური მაქინის გადაწყვეტილი მოდელზე. მაგრამ ეს მოდელები იყენებენ საინტერესო გამოსახულება, მათ უნდა მასი დიდი მონაცემები, რომლებიც სწორად გაგრძელებენ. დამატებით, NMT-დაბათებული სისტემები GEC-ს მხოლოდ გადაწყენება, როგორც გადაწყენებული რაოდენობა და გადავხედოთ მისი რედაქტირების აფექტი. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩინეთი GEC-ს heterogeneous approach, რომელიც NMT-დაბათული მოდელზე შექმნა, სექციენტის რედაქტირების მოდელზე და მართლური შემოწმება. ჩვენი მეტოლოგია არა მხოლოდ ჩინეთი GEC-ის ახალი სტატიქტურის პროცექტის შესაძლებლობას, მაგრამ ამას გავაკეთება, არამედ მონაცემების აგექტიქტურაციას ან GEC-სპექტი ჩვენ მეტი ექსპერიმენტი ჩვენი სისტემის ყველა შესაძლებელი კონფიგურაციების შესახებ მოდელური კომპოზიციის შესახებ და კომპოზიციის რაოდენ ყოველ მოდელის განსაზღვრებული ანალიზია და მათი დამატებულები კონფიგურაციის პროცესში გავაკეთება ERRANT წერტილის შესაძლებლობად ჩინეთის წერტილების შესაძლებლობა.', 'mk': 'Најновите дела во полето на корекција на граматичките грешки (GEC) се потпираат на модели базирани на превод на неврални машини. Although these models boast impressive performance, they require a massive amount of data to properly train.  Покрај тоа, системите базирани на НМТ го третираат ГЕЦ чисто како преводна задача и го прегледуваат аспектот на уредувањето на неа. Во оваа работа предложуваме хетероген пристап кон кинескиот ГЕЦ, составен од модел базиран на НМТ, модел за редагирање на секвенца и проверка на магија. Нашата методологија не само што постигнува нова најнова претстава за Кинеската ГЕЦ, туку и без да се потпира на зголемување на податоците или промени на архитектурата специфични за ГЕЦ. Понатаму експериментираме со сите можни конфигурации на нашиот систем во однос на редот на моделот на композиција и бројот на кругови на корекција. Детална анализа на секој модел и нивните придонеси во процесот на корекција се извршува со адаптирање на резултатот на ЕРРАНТ за да може да добие кинески реченици.', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രദേശത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു Although these models boast impressive performance, they require a massive amount of data to properly train.  അതിനുശേഷം, NMT-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d GEC ഒരു ട്രാന്\u200dസ്റ്റര്\u200d ജോലിയായി മാത്രം ചെയ്യുകയും, അതിന്\u200dറെ എഡിറ്ററ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ചൈനീസ് ജിസിയിലേക്കുള്ള ഒരു ഹെട്രെജെന്റജീനിയസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചെയ്യുന്നു. എംഎംടി അടിസ്ഥാനമ ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ചൈനീസ് ജിസിയ്ക്കുള്ള പുതിയ സ്ഥാനം മാത്രമല്ല, ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചോ ജിസി-പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ എല്ലാ സാധ്യതകളുടെയും ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളുമായി നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. മോഡല്\u200d സംഘടനയുടെ ക എല്ലാ മോഡലിന്റെയും അവയുടെ പങ്കുകളും ശുദ്ധീകരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Kerja terbaru dalam medan penyesuaian ralat grammatik (GEC) bergantung pada model berasaskan terjemahan mesin saraf. Although these models boast impressive performance, they require a massive amount of data to properly train.  Selain itu, sistem berasaskan NMT memperlakukan GEC sebagai tugas terjemahan dan mengabaikan aspek penyuntingannya. Dalam kerja ini kami cadangkan pendekatan heterogeni kepada GEC Cina, terdiri dari model berasaskan NMT, model penyuntingan urutan, dan pemeriksa ejaan. Metodologi kami tidak hanya mencapai prestasi terbaru untuk GEC Cina, tetapi juga melakukannya tanpa bergantung pada peningkatan data atau perubahan arkitektur khusus GEC. Kami lebih lanjut eksperimen dengan semua konfigurasi sistem kita yang mungkin berkaitan dengan urutan komposisi model dan bilangan pusingan pembetulan. Analisis terperinci setiap model dan kontribusi mereka ke proses penyesuaian dilakukan dengan menyesuaikan skor ERRANT untuk dapat skor kalimat Cina.', 'mt': 'L-aktar xogħlijiet reċenti fil-qasam tal-korrezzjoni tal-iżbalji grammatiċi (GEC) jiddependu fuq mudelli bbażati fuq it-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. Għalkemm dawn il-mudelli għandhom prestazzjoni impressjonanti, jeħtieġu ammont kbir ta’ dejta biex jitħarrġu kif suppost. Barra minn hekk, is-sistemi bbażati fuq l-NMT jittrattaw lill-GEC purament bħala kompitu ta’ traduzzjoni u jinjoraw l-aspett tal-edizzjoni tiegħu. F’din il-ħidma nipproponu approċċ eteroġenu għall-GEC Ċiniż, magħmul minn mudell ibbażat fuq l-NMT, mudell ta’ edizzjoni tas-sekwenza, u verifikatur tal-ortografija. Il-metodoloġija tagħna mhux biss tikseb prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata ġdida għall-GEC Ċiniż, iżda tagħmel dan ukoll mingħajr ma tiddependi fuq żieda fid-dejta jew bidliet fl-arkitettura speċifiċi għall-GEC. Aħna qed nagħmlu aktar esperimenti bil-konfigurazzjonijiet kollha possibbli tas-sistema tagħna fir-rigward tal-ordni tal-kompożizzjoni mudell u n-numru ta’ ċirkustanzi ta’ korrezzjoni. A detailed analysis of each model and their contributions to the correction process is performed by adapting the ERRANT scorer to be able to score Chinese sentences.', 'pl': 'Najnowsze prace z zakresu korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC) opierają się na modelach neuronowych opartych na tłumaczeniu maszynowym. Chociaż modele te posiadają imponującą wydajność, wymagają ogromnej ilości danych do prawidłowego treningu. Ponadto systemy oparte na NMT traktują GEC wyłącznie jako zadanie tłumaczeniowe i pomijają jego aspekt edycyjny. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy heterogeniczne podejście do chińskiego GEC, składające się z modelu opartego na NMT, modelu edycji sekwencji oraz kontroli pisowni. Nasza metodologia nie tylko osiąga nową, najnowocześniejszą wydajność dla chińskiego GEC, ale także bez polegania na powiększaniu danych lub zmianach architektury specyficznej dla GEC. Dodatkowo eksperymentujemy ze wszystkimi możliwymi konfiguracjami naszego systemu pod względem kolejności składu modelu i liczby rund korekcji. Szczegółową analizę każdego modelu i ich wkładu w proces korekcji przeprowadza się poprzez dostosowanie punktera ERRANT, aby móc ocenić zdania chińskie.', 'ro': 'Cele mai recente lucrări în domeniul corecției erorilor gramaticale (GEC) se bazează pe modele neuronale bazate pe traduceri automate. Deși aceste modele se laudă cu performanțe impresionante, ele necesită o cantitate masivă de date pentru a se antrena corect. În plus, sistemele bazate pe NMT tratează GEC doar ca o sarcină de traducere și trec cu vederea aspectul de editare al acesteia. În această lucrare propunem o abordare eterogenă a GEC chinezesc, compusă dintr-un model bazat pe NMT, un model de editare a secvențelor și un verificator ortografic. Metodologia noastră nu numai că obține o performanță nouă de ultimă generație pentru GEC chinezesc, ci și fără a se baza pe mărirea datelor sau pe modificările arhitecturii specifice GEC. Experimentăm în continuare cu toate configurațiile posibile ale sistemului nostru în ceea ce privește ordinea compoziției modelului și numărul de runde de corecție. O analiză detaliată a fiecărui model și a contribuțiilor acestora la procesul de corectare este realizată prin adaptarea scorerului ERRANT pentru a putea puncta propoziții chinezești.', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාමාතික වැරදි සුදුසුම (GEC) ක්\u200dෂේත්\u200dරයේ අන්තිම වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි ක්\u200dෂේත්රයෙන් විශ්වාස මේ මොඩේල්ස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා නමුත්, ඔවුන්ට ගොඩක් තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා හොඳට ක්\u200dරීන ඉතින්, NMT-ආධාරිත පද්ධතිය GEC විශේෂයෙන් පරිවර්තන වැඩක් විදියට පරිවර්තන කරන්න සහ ඒකේ සංපාදනය කරන්න ප්\u200d මේ වැඩේ අපි චීනී GEC වලට හෙටෙරෝජනයින් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, NMT- අධාරිත මොඩේලයක්, ක්\u200dරමයක් සංපාදනය කරනවා අපේ විද්\u200dයාව විද්\u200dයාව විතරයි චීනී GEC සඳහා අළුත් විද්\u200dයාවක් වෙනුවෙන් නෙවෙයි, නමුත් තොරතුරු විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාවක් නැතු අපි අපේ පද්ධතියේ සියළුම සංවිධානය සමඟ පරීක්ෂණය සමඟ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් සියළුම් පරීක්ෂණය සහ හැම මොඩේල්ගේ විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් විස්තර කරන්නේ ERRANT ස්කෝර්ටර්ගේ ස්කෝර්ටර්ගේ ස්කෝ', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа засах (GEC) талбарынхамгийн сүүлийн ажил нь мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах загварууд дээр байдаг. Эдгээр загварууд гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг баярладаг ч, тэд маш олон мэдээллийг зөв сургуульд хэрэгтэй. Харин NMT-д суурилсан системүүд GEC-г зөвхөн хөрөнгө оруулах үйл ажиллагаа гэж үздэг ба түүний өөрчлөлтийн талаар нь дуусгаж үздэг. Энэ ажил дээр бид Хятадын GEC-ын heterogeneous approach, NMT-д суурилсан загвар, дарааллын загвар зохион байгуулах загвар болон шүлгийн шинжлэгчийг бий болгож байна. Бидний методолог зөвхөн Хятадын GEC-ийн шинэ урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадахгүй ч мөн өгөгдлийн нэмэлт эсвэл GEC-ийн архитектурын өөрчлөлтөнд итгэлгүй. Бид системийн бүх боломжтой тодорхойлолтуудыг загварын зохион загвар, зөв загварын тоо холбоотой туршилтыг хийж байна. Загвар бүрийн нарийвчлалтай шинжилгээ болон түүний зөв үйлдвэрлэлд оролцох үйлдвэрлэл нь ERRANT оноогчдыг Хятад өгүүлбэрийг тооцоолж чадна.', 'so': "Intii ugu dambeysay waxay ka shaqeeyaan beerta hagitaanka khaladda grammatika (GEC) waxay ku xiran yihiin muulooyinka turjumidda neural machine-based. In kastoo modelladan ay ku faani karaan tababar wanaagsan, waxay u baahan yihiin macluumaad aad u badan si ay u tababaridaan si hagaagsan. Furthermore, nidaamka NMT waxay GEC u macaamiloodaan sida shaqada turjumidda oo kaliya wuxuuna ka tegayaa dhinaca hagitaanka. Shuqulkaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab xiddig ah oo ku qoran GEC oo Shiinaha ah, kaas oo ka mid ah model ku saleysan NMT, model beddelasho dabar iyo hubsada sixirka. Isku'aalkayagu ma gaadho xaalad cusub oo farshaxan oo kale ee Shiinaha GEC, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale ku sameeyaa iyadoon ku kalsoonaan koritaanka data ama beddelka dhismaha gaarka ah ee GEC. Imtixaan dheeraad ah oo ku filan tijaabada nidaamka oo dhan oo suurtagal ah oo ku saabsan qaababka sameynta iyo safarka hagitaanka. Analyo gaar ah oo ku qoran tusaale kasta iyo kharashkooda hagitaanka waxaa lagu sameeyaa si uu u beddelo kooxda ERRANT oo uu awoodo in uu kooban karo xarumaha Shiino.", 'sv': 'De senaste verken inom grammatisk felkorrigering (GEC) bygger pﾃ･ neurala maskinﾃｶversﾃ､ttningsbaserade modeller. ﾃёen om dessa modeller har imponerande prestanda, krﾃ､ver de en enorm mﾃ､ngd data fﾃｶr att trﾃ､na ordentligt. Dessutom behandlar NMT-baserade system GEC enbart som en ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningsuppgift och bortser frﾃ･n redigeringsaspekten. I detta arbete fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en heterogen metod fﾃｶr kinesisk GEC, bestﾃ･ende av en NMT-baserad modell, en sekvensredigeringsmodell och en stavningskontroll. Vﾃ･r metod uppnﾃ･r inte bara en ny toppmodern prestanda fﾃｶr kinesisk GEC, utan gﾃｶr det ocksﾃ･ utan att fﾃｶrlita sig pﾃ･ dataﾃｶkning eller GEC-specifika arkitekturfﾃｶrﾃ､ndringar. Vi experimenterar vidare med alla mﾃｶjliga konfigurationer av vﾃ･rt system med avseende pﾃ･ modellsammansﾃ､ttningsordning och antal korrigeringsrundor. En detaljerad analys av varje modell och deras bidrag till korrigeringsprocessen utfﾃｶrs genom att anpassa ERRANT scorer fﾃｶr att kunna gﾃｶra kinesiska meningar.', 'ta': 'சிறந்த பிழை திருத்தத்தின் புலத்தில் பெரும்பாலான வேலை செய்கிறது (GEC) புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிமாற்ற மாதிர இந்த மாதிரிகள் ஆச்சரியமான செயல்பாட்டை பெருமைப்படுத்துகின்றன எனினும், அவை சரியான பயிற்சியை பயிற்சிக்கு ம அதற்கும், NMT-அடிப்படையிலான அமைப்புகள் GEC ஒரு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணியாக பயன்படுத்தி திருத்தும் பகுதியை விட்டு விடு இந்த வேலையில் நாம் சீனம் GEC க்கு ஒரு அடர்த்திய செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், NMT-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மாதிரியில், தொகுப்பு மாத Our methodology not only achieves a new state-of-the-art performance for Chinese GEC, but also does so without relying on data augmentation or GEC-specific architecture changes.  மாதிரி உருவாக்கும் வரிசையை மற்றும் திருத்தம் செய்யும் எண்ணிக்கையை பற்றி நாம் எங்கள் கணினியின் அனைத்து சாத ஒவ்வொரு மாதிரியின் விவரமான ஆய்வு மற்றும் அவற்றின் செயல்பாடுகள் திருத்தம் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு சீனா வாக்கியங்களை மதிப்பெறுவதற்க', 'no': 'Dei nyeste arbeidane i feltet med grammatiske feilretting (GEC) er tilbakekalla på modeller med omsetjingsbasert på neuralmaskinen. Selv om desse modelane bløver uttrykkelige utviklingane, krev dei massivt mengda data for å trena riktig. NMT-baserte systemer behandler GEC berre som omsetjingsprogrammet og oversikt redigeringsaspekten av det. I dette arbeidet foreslår vi ein heterogenesk tilnærming til kinesisk GEC, som er lagt av ein NMT-basert modell, ein sekvensredigeringsmodell og eit stavekontroll. Metodologien vårt er ikkje berre oppnådd eit nytt kunstfullføring for kinesisk GEC, men også gjør det utan å trykke på data augmentasjon eller endringar i GEC-spesifikke arkitektur. Vi eksperimenterer meir med alle mulige oppsett av systemet vårt med hensyn til modellerekkefølgje og talet på rotar av korrigeringa. Eit detaljert analyse av kvar modell og deres bidrag til korrigeringsprosessen vert utført ved å tilpassa ERRANT- poeng for å kunna scorera kinesiske setningar.', 'ur': 'گراماتیکی خطا اصلاح (GEC) کے کھیلے میں بہت اچھے کام نیورل ماشین کی ترجمہ کی مدل پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں. اگرچہ یہ موڈلز اثر انگیز عمل کی تعریف کرتی ہیں، ان کے لئے بہت بڑی اندازہ ڈیٹا کی ضرورت ہے کہ ٹھیک ترین کریں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، NMT بنیادی سیسٹم GEC کو صرف ایک ترجمہ کام کے طور پر سمجھتے ہیں اور اس کے سمجھنے کے منظور کو غیر نظر رکھتے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم نے چین GEC کے لئے ایک غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ ہماری روش صرف چینی GEC کے لئے ایک نئی حالت کی عملکرد نہیں پہنچ سکتی، بلکہ یہ بھی ایسا کرتا ہے کہ ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنے کے بغیر یا GEC-specific معماری بدلوں پر بھروسہ نہ کرے۔ ہم اپنے سیسٹم کی تمام امکانات کی پیکربندی کے ساتھ آگے بھی آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور نمڈل کی پیکربندی اور سیدھی راندوں کی تعداد کے ساتھ۔ ہر موڈل کی تفصیل اور ان کی اصلاح پرسس میں ان کی سفارش کرتی ہے کہ ERRANT اسکورر کو اسکورٹ کرسکیں۔', 'sr': 'Najskoriji rad u oblasti isprave gramatičnih grešaka (GEC) oslanja se na modele na osnovu prevoda na neuralnoj mašini. Iako se ovi modeli slavljaju impresivnim performancima, zahtevaju ogromnu količinu podataka za pravu obuku. Osim toga, sistemi koji se temelji na NMT-u tretiraju GEC čisto kao prevodni zadatak i pregledaju njegov uredni aspekt. U ovom poslu predlažemo heterogeneni pristup kineskom GEC-u, sastavljen od model a baziranog na NMT-u, modela redakcije sekvencija i provjeravač čarolije. Naša metodika ne samo postiže novi nastup umetnosti kineskog GEC-a, već i ne oslanja se na povećanje podataka ili promjene arhitekture na GEC-u. Dalje eksperimentiramo sa svim mogućim konfiguracijama našeg sistema u pogledu model reda kompozicije i broja krugova korekcije. Detaljna analiza svakog modela i njihovog doprinosa u procesu isprave izvršena je prilagođavanjem rezultata ERRANT-a kako bi mogla dobiti kineske rečenice.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Agar bu modellar juda ajoyib ishlashga ega bo'lsa, ular yaxshi o'rganish uchun juda ko'proq maʼlumot kerak. Keyin esa, NMT asosida tizimlar GEC faqat tarjima vazifasi sifatida ishlaydi va tahrirlash qismini uzib qoladi. In this work we propose a heterogeneous approach to Chinese GEC, composed of a NMT-based model, a sequence editing model, and a spell checker.  Bizning metodimiz faqat Xitoycha GEC uchun yangi San'atning holatini amalga oshirish emas, balki bu amalni maʼlumot qoʻshish yoki GEC'ning tayyorliq arxivga oʻzgarishni ishlatmaydi. Biz tizimmizning hamma imkoniyatlarimiz bilan boshlanamiz model tuzuvchi tartibi va to ʻgʻri sonlarning soni. Har bir modelning tahrirlash jarayonini tahrirlash imkoniyatini taʼrif qilish, Xitoy maxfiy soʻzlarini oʻzgartirish uchun ERRANT scorer oʻzgartirish imkoniyatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Các tác phẩm gần đây nhất trong lĩnh vực sửa sai ngữ pháp (GEC) dựa trên các mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh. Mặc dù các mô hình này có trình độ rất ấn tượng, nhưng chúng cần rất nhiều dữ liệu để luyện tập. Các hệ thống NMT cũng chỉ coi quản lý trí tuệ như một nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển và bỏ qua khía cạnh biên tập của nó. Trong công việc này chúng tôi đề xuất một cách tiếp cận khác nhau với trí tuệ Trung Quốc, gồm một mô hình dựa vào NMT, một mô hình hiệu chỉnh dãy số, và một máy đo thần chú. Phương pháp của chúng ta không chỉ đạt được một trình độ mới trong giới nghệ thuật cho GED Trung Quốc, mà còn không dựa vào sự gia tăng dữ liệu hay thay đổi kiến trúc cụ thể GEC. Chúng tôi còn thử nghiệm thêm với tất cả các cấu hình của hệ thống về trật tự cấu tạo mẫu và số vòng sửa chữa. Một cuộc phân tích chi tiết của mỗi mô hình và các đóng góp của chúng trong quá trình sửa chữa được thực hiện bằng cách sửa đổi bảng điểm ERANT để có thể ghi được các câu ở Trung Quốc.', 'bg': 'Най-новите работи в областта на граматическата корекция на грешки (ГЕК) разчитат на модели, базирани на невронен машинен превод. Въпреки че тези модели се похвалят с впечатляваща производителност, те изискват огромно количество данни, за да тренират правилно. Освен това, базираните на НМТ системи третират ГЕК чисто като задача за превод и пренебрегват аспекта на редактирането му. В тази работа предлагаме хетерогенен подход към китайския ГЕК, съставен от модел базиран на НМТ, модел за редактиране на последователност и правописна проверка. Нашата методология не само постига ново най-съвременно представяне за китайските ГЕК, но и го прави без да разчита на увеличаване на данните или специфични за ГЕК архитектурни промени. Освен това експериментираме с всички възможни конфигурации на нашата система по отношение на реда на състава на модела и броя на кръговете на корекция. Подробен анализ на всеки модел и техния принос към процеса на корекция се извършва чрез адаптиране на оценката на ЕРРАНТ, за да може да оценява китайски изречения.', 'da': 'De seneste værker inden for grammatisk fejlkorrektion (GEC) er baseret på neurale maskinoversættelsesbaserede modeller. Selvom disse modeller praler af imponerende ydeevne, kræver de en massiv mængde data for at træne korrekt. Desuden behandler NMT-baserede systemer GEC udelukkende som en oversættelsesopgave og overser redigeringsaspektet af det. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en heterogen tilgang til kinesisk GEC, der består af en NMT-baseret model, en sekvensredigeringsmodel og en stavekontrol. Vores metode opnår ikke blot en ny state-of-the-art ydeevne for kinesisk GEC, men gør det også uden at være afhængig af dataforøgelse eller GEC-specifikke arkitekturændringer. Vi eksperimenterer yderligere med alle mulige konfigurationer af vores system med hensyn til model sammensætning rækkefølge og antal korrektionsrunder. En detaljeret analyse af hver model og deres bidrag til korrektionsprocessen udføres ved at tilpasse ERRANT scorer for at kunne score kinesiske sætninger.', 'hr': 'Najzadnje djelo u području isprave gramatičkih grešaka (GEC) oslanjaju se na modele na osnovu prevoda na nervnim strojevima. Iako se ovi modeli slavljaju impresivnim performancima, zahtijevaju ogromnu količinu podataka za propisno treniranje. Osim toga, sustavi temeljeni na NMT-u tretiraju GEC čisto kao prevodni zadatak i pregledaju njegov uredni aspekt. U ovom poslu predlažemo heterogeneni pristup kineskom GEC-u, sastavljen od model a baziranog na NMT-u, modela redakcije sekvencija i provjeravač čarolije. Naša metodika ne samo postiže novu stanju umjetnosti za kinesku GEC-u, već i ne oslanja na povećanje podataka ili promjene arhitekture specifične za GEC-u. Dalje eksperimentiramo sa svim mogućim konfiguracijama našeg sustava u pogledu modela reda sastave i broja krugova isprave. Detaljna analiza svakog modela i njihovog doprinosa u proces isprave provede se prilagođavanjem rezultata ERRANT-a kako bi mogla dobiti kineske kazne.', 'ko': '문법 오류 수정(GEC) 분야의 최신 작업은 신경 기계 번역에 기반한 모델에 의존한다.비록 이 모델들의 성능은 인상적이지만, 그것들은 대량의 데이터가 있어야만 정확하게 훈련할 수 있다.또한 NMT 기반 시스템은 GEC를 단순히 번역 작업으로 간주하고 편집을 무시합니다.이 작업에서 우리는 NMT를 기반으로 한 모델, 서열 편집 모델과 맞춤법 검사기로 구성된 이구적인 중국어 GEC 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 중국 GEC의 최첨단 성능을 실현할 뿐만 아니라 데이터 확장이나 GEC의 특정한 구조 변경에 의존하지 않는다.우리는 모델 조합 순서와 교정 바퀴 수를 포함한 우리 시스템의 모든 가능한 설정을 한층 더 실험했다.오류 점수기를 조정하여 중국어 문장을 점수를 매길 수 있도록 하고 각 모델과 교정 과정에 대한 기여를 상세하게 분석한다.', 'nl': 'De meest recente werken op het gebied van grammaticale foutcorrectie (GEC) zijn gebaseerd op neurale machine translation-gebaseerde modellen. Hoewel deze modellen indrukwekkende prestaties bieden, hebben ze een enorme hoeveelheid gegevens nodig om goed te trainen. Bovendien behandelen NMT-gebaseerde systemen GEC louter als een vertaaltaak en zien ze het redactionele aspect ervan over het hoofd. In dit werk stellen we een heterogene benadering van Chinese GEC voor, bestaande uit een NMT-gebaseerd model, een sequence editing model en een spelling checker. Onze methodologie bereikt niet alleen een nieuwe state-of-the-art performance voor Chinese GEC, maar doet dit ook zonder te vertrouwen op data augmentatie of GEC-specifieke architectuurwijzigingen. Verder experimenteren we met alle mogelijke configuraties van ons systeem met betrekking tot de volgorde van de modellsamenstelling en het aantal correctierondes. Een gedetailleerde analyse van elk model en hun bijdragen aan het correctieproces wordt uitgevoerd door de ERRANT scorer aan te passen om Chinese zinnen te kunnen scoren.', 'de': 'Die neuesten Arbeiten im Bereich der grammatischen Fehlerkorrektur (GEC) basieren auf neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungsmodellen. Obwohl diese Modelle eine beeindruckende Leistung aufweisen, benötigen sie eine riesige Menge an Daten, um richtig trainieren zu können. Darüber hinaus behandeln NMT-basierte Systeme GEC rein als Übersetzungsaufgabe und übersehen den redaktionellen Aspekt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen heterogenen Ansatz für chinesische GEC vor, der aus einem NMT-basierten Modell, einem Sequenzmodell und einer Rechtschreibprüfung besteht. Unsere Methodik erreicht nicht nur eine neue State-of-the-Art-Performance für chinesische GEC, sondern auch ohne Datenerweiterung oder GEC-spezifische Architekturänderungen. Weiterhin experimentieren wir mit allen möglichen Konfigurationen unseres Systems hinsichtlich der Reihenfolge der Modellzusammensetzung und Anzahl der Korrekturrunden. Eine detaillierte Analyse jedes Modells und seiner Beiträge zum Korrekturprozess wird durchgeführt, indem der ERRANT Scorer angepasst wird, um chinesische Sätze bewerten zu können.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan terbaru dalam bidang koreksi kesalahan gramatik (GEC) bergantung pada model berbasis vertikasi mesin saraf. Meskipun model ini berbangga dengan prestasi yang mengesankan, mereka membutuhkan jumlah besar data untuk melatih dengan benar. Selain itu, sistem berbasis NMT memperlakukan GEC hanya sebagai tugas terjemahan dan mengabaikan aspek penyuntingannya. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan pendekatan heterogene ke GEC Cina, terdiri dari model berbasis NMT, model penyuntingan urutan, dan pemeriksa mantra. Metodologi kita tidak hanya mencapai prestasi terbaik baru untuk GEC Cina, tetapi juga melakukannya tanpa bergantung pada peningkatan data atau perubahan arsitektur spesifik GEC. We further experiment with all possible configurations of our system with respect to model composition order and number of rounds of correction.  Analisis terperinci dari setiap model dan kontribusi mereka ke proses koreksi dilakukan dengan menyesuaikan skor ERRANT untuk dapat mencetak kalimat Cina.', 'sw': 'Most recent works in the field of grammatical error correction (GEC) rely on neural machine translation-based models.  Ingawa mifano hii inafaa kufanya kazi nzuri, wanahitaji kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa kwa mafunzo sahihi. Zaidi ya hayo, mifumo yenye asili ya NMT hutumia GEC kama jukumu la kutafsiri na kuacha upande wa kuhariri. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza mbinu za kijeshi kwa GEC ya China, iliyoandaliwa na modeli yenye msingi wa NMT, modeli ya kuhariri kwa mfululizo, na mtazamo wa utafiti. Utawala wetu siyo tu unafanikiwa utendaji mpya wa sanaa wa GEC wa China, bali pia unafanya hivyo bila kutegemea kuongezeka kwa data au mabadiliko ya ujenzi maalum wa GEC. Tunajaribu zaidi na miundombinu yoyote inayowezekana na mfumo wetu kwa kuhusiana na amri ya ubunifu na maeneo ya uharibifu. Uchambuzi wa kina wa kila model na michango yao katika mchakato wa sahihi unafanyika kwa kubadilisha mpiga kurasa wa ERRANT ili kuweza kuchukua hukumu za China.', 'tr': "gramatik hata düzeltmeginiň (GEC) sahypasynda iň köp eserler näyral maşynyň terjime edilen nusgalara ynanýar. Bu nusgalar täsirli zady öňünç alyp barýarlar, ýöne dogry otlamak üçin köp sany maglumat gerek. Ümäpli, NMT tabanly sistemler GEC'i diňe terjime täbligi hökmünde gözleýän we editlemek aspektini boýun gaýd et. Bu işde biz Çinçe GEC'e öňünden beýleki bir golf teklip edip, NMT tabanly bir nusga, terjime editleme nusga we yml Ymlançysyny barlaýarys. Biziň metodologiýamyz diňe Çinçe GEC üçin täze bir ýagtylyk taýýarlanmagyny başarmady, ýöne daty üýtgetmegine ýa-da GEC takyk arhitektura üýtgetmegine ynanmaýar. Biziň sistemamyzyň ähli mümkin döredilmeleri we düzeltmek üçin örän synanyşdyrýarys. Her nusganyň detayly analyzasy we olaryň düzeltmek prosesynda gatnaşmalaryny EURRANT notlaryny ýygnamak üçin Çinçe sözlerini gollaşdyrylýar.", 'af': "Mees onlangse werke in die veld van grammatiese fout korreksie (GEC) vertrou op neurale masjien vertaling- gebaseerde modele. Alhoewel hierdie modele verroep impressionele prestasie, nodig hulle 'n groot hoeveelheid data om reg te trein. Maar NMT-gebaseerde stelsels behandel GEC net as 'n vertaling taak en oorskou die redigeringsaspek daarvan. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n heterogeneese toegang tot Sjinese GEC, gemaak van 'n NMT-gebaseerde model, 'n sekvens redigeerder model en 'n spel toesig. Ons metodologie bereik nie slegs 'n nuwe staat van die kunsten-prestasie vir die Sjinese GEC nie, maar ook doen so sonder om te vertrou op data-augmentasie of GEC-spesifieke arkitektuur verander. Ons verder eksperimenteer met alle moontlike konfigurasies van ons stelsel met respek na model composition order en nommer ronde van korreksie. 'n Gedetaileerde analisie van elke model en hulle bydraaghings tot die korreksie proses word uitgevoer deur die ERRANT teller aanpassing te maak om Sjinese teikens te tel.", 'sq': 'Punët më të fundit në fushën e korrigjimit të gabimeve grammatike (GEC) mbështeten në modele të përkthimit të makinave nervore. Megjithëse këto modele krenohen me performancë mbresëlënëse, ato kërkojnë një sasi masive të dhënash për të trajnuar siç duhet. Përveç kësaj, sistemet me bazë në NMT trajtojnë GEC thjesht si një detyrë përkthimi dhe harrojnë aspektin e redaksionit të saj. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një qasje heterogjene ndaj GEC kineze, përbërë nga një model bazuar në NMT, një model ndryshimi sekuence dhe një kontrollues ortografike. Our methodology not only achieves a new state-of-the-art performance for Chinese GEC, but also does so without relying on data augmentation or GEC-specific architecture changes.  Ne eksperimentojmë më tej me të gjitha konfigurimet e mundshme të sistemit tonë lidhur me rendin e kompozitave modeli dhe numrin e raundeve të korrigjimit. Një analizë e detajuar e çdo modeli dhe kontributet e tyre në procesin e korreksionit kryehen duke përshtatur rezultatuesin ERRANT për të qenë në gjendje të shënojë fjalët kineze.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ በgrammatical ስህተት ማቀናጃ መሬት ውስጥ የሚሠራ ሥራ (GEC) በneural machine-translation-based models ተጠጋ። Although these models boast impressive performance, they require a massive amount of data to properly train.  ከዚህም በላይ የNMT-based ስርዓቶች GEC እንደ ትርጓሜ አድራሻ ብቻ ይቆማሉ፡፡ በዚህ ስራ የቻይና GEC የተደረገውን ሥርዓት፣ የNMT ሞዴል፣ የsequence አስተካክል ሞዴል እና የspell checker እና መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቻይና GEC-ን አዲስ የ-የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት ብቻ አይደለም፣ ዳታ አካባቢ ወይም GEC-የተለየ የመሠረታዊ ለውጥ ሳይታመን ይደረጋል፡፡ በሞዴል ሥርዓት እና የክሕተት ቁጥር እና የሥርዓት ቁጥር እናስፈትናለን፡፡ የሁሉም ሞዴል እና የክስተት ፕሮጀክታቸውን ለማስተካከል የሚያስተካክል ምርጫዎች የቻይና ቃላትን ለማቀናኘት የERRANT scorer በመጠቀም ይፈጸማል።', 'fa': 'بیشتر کارهای اخیر در زمینه اصلاح خطای گراماتیک (GEC) بر مدل\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cسازی ماشین عصبی بستگی دارند. اگرچه این مدل\u200cها اجرای تحت تاثیر انگیزه می\u200cکنند، آنها نیاز به مقدار داده\u200cهای بزرگی برای آموزش درست دارند. علاوه بر این، سیستم\u200cهای بنیاد NMT به عنوان یک کار ترجمه به GEC رفتار می\u200cکنند و از طریق ویرایش فراموش می\u200cکنند. در این کار ما یک دستور متفاوتی به GEC چینی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یک مدل بنیاد NMT ساخته شده، یک مدل ویرایش دستور و یک بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی مادول است. روش\u200cشناسی ما نه تنها یک فعالیت جدید هنری برای GEC چینی می\u200cرسد، بلکه بدون اعتماد به افزایش داده\u200cها یا تغییرات معماری ویژه GEC به این کار می\u200cرسد. ما آزمایش بیشتری با تمام پیکربندی های ممکن سیستم ما در مورد سفارش ترکیب مدل و تعداد دوره های ترکیب انجام می دهیم. یک تحلیل جزئیات از هر مدل و دسترسی آنها به فرایند اصلاح با تغییر دادن امتیاز ERRANT تا بتوانند جمله های چینی را امتیاز دهند.', 'hy': 'Վերջին աշխատանքները գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղության ոլորտում հիմնված են նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելների վրա: Չնայած, որ այս մոդելները հսկայական արդյունք ունեն, նրանք հարկավոր են մեծ քանակությամբ տվյալներ, որպեսզի ճիշտ պատրաստվեն: Ավելին, NMT-ի հիմնված համակարգերը վերաբերում են ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընդհանուր թարգմանման խնդիրը և անտեսում են դրա խմբագրման ասպեկտը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք Չինաստանի գերոգեն մոտեցում, որը կազմված է NMT-ով հիմնված մոդելուց, հաջորդականության խմբագրման մոդելուց և կառավարության ստուգերից: Our methodology not only achieves a new state-of-the-art performance for Chinese GEC, but also does so without relying on data augmentation or GEC-specific architecture changes.  Մենք շարունակում ենք փորձել մեր համակարգի բոլոր հնարավոր կառուցվածքների հետ կապված մոդելի կառուցվածքի կարգավորման և ուղղության շրջանների քանակի հետ: Յուրաքանչյուր մոդելի մանրամասն վերլուծությունը և նրանց ներդրումը հարմարեցման գործընթացի մեջ կատարվում է հարմարեցնելով ERRAnt գնահատողը, որպեսզի կարողանա գնահատել չինական նախադասությունները:', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটিক্যাল সংশোধনের ক্ষেত্রে (GEC) নিউরুল মেশিনের অনুবাদ-ভিত্তি যদিও এই মডেলগুলো চমৎকার কর্মকাণ্ড প্রদর্শন করে, তাদের সঠিক প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য বিশাল পরিমাণ তথ্য প্রয়োজন। এনএমটি-ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম জিসিকে কেবল অনুবাদের কাজ হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করে এবং সম্পাদনার প্রান্তের দিকে উপেক্ষা কর এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা চীনা জিএমটি ভিত্তিক মডেল, একটি সেকেন্ড সম্পাদন মডেল এবং একটি বানান পরীক্ষক। আমাদের পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র চীনা জেসির জন্য নতুন শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি অর্জন করে না, কিন্তু তথ্য যোগাযোগ বা জেসির নির্দিষ্ট কাঠামোর পরিবর্তন নি আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেমের সকল সম্ভাব্য কনফিগারেশনের মাধ্যমে আরো পরীক্ষা করছি মডেল সংস্কারের নির্দেশ এবং সংশোধনের সং প্রত্যেক মডেলের বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ এবং তাদের সংশোধন প্রক্রিয়ায় অংশগ্রহণ করা হচ্ছে এররান্ট স্কোরের মাধ্যমে চীনা বাক্য স্কোর', 'bs': 'Najskoriji rad u oblasti isprave gramatičnih grešaka (GEC) oslanja se na modele na osnovu prevoda na neuralnoj mašini. Iako se ovi modeli slavljaju impresivnim performancima, zahtevaju ogromnu količinu podataka za pravo treniranje. Osim toga, sistemi bazirani na NMT-u tretiraju GEC čisto kao prevodni zadatak i pregledaju njegov uredni aspekt. U ovom poslu predlažemo heterogenen pristup kineskom GEC-u, sastavljen od model a baziranog na NMT-u, modela redakcije sekvence i provjeravača čarolije. Naša metodika ne samo postiže novi predstav umjetnosti kineskog GEC-a, već i to radi bez obzira na povećanje podataka ili promjene arhitekture specifične na GEC-u. Dalje eksperimentiramo sa svim mogućim konfiguracijama našeg sustava u pogledu reda modela kompozicije i broja krugova korekcije. Detaljna analiza svakog modela i njihovog doprinosa u proces isprave provede se prilagođavanjem rezultata ERRANT-a kako bi mogla dobiti kineske rečenice.', 'cs': 'Nejnovější práce v oblasti gramatické korekce chyb (GEC) se opírají o modely založené na neuronovém strojovém překladu. Ačkoli se tyto modely pyšní působivým výkonem, vyžadují obrovské množství dat pro správný trénink. Navíc systémy založené na NMT zacházejí s GEC čistě jako s překladatelskou úlohou a přehlížejí její editační aspekt. V této práci navrhujeme heterogenní přístup k čínské GEC, složený z NMT modelu, modelu sekvence editace a kontroly pravopisu. Naše metodika nejen dosahuje nového nejmodernějšího výkonu pro čínskou GEC, ale také bez spoléhání na rozšíření dat nebo změny architektury specifické pro GEC. Dále experimentujeme se všemi možnými konfiguracemi našeho systému s ohledem na pořadí složení modelu a počet kol korekce. Podrobná analýza jednotlivých modelů a jejich příspěvků k procesu korekce je provedena adaptací bodéru ERRANT tak, aby bylo možné skórovat čínské věty.', 'et': 'Kõige uuemad tööd grammatilise veakorrektsiooni (GEC) valdkonnas toetuvad neurotõlkepõhistele mudelitele. Kuigi need mudelid kiidavad muljetavaldava jõudlusega, vajavad nad õigeks treenimiseks tohutult andmeid. Lisaks käsitlevad NMT-põhised süsteemid GEC-i puhtalt tõlketööna ja jätavad selle toimetamise aspekti tähelepanuta. Käesolevas töös pakume välja heterogeense lähenemisviisi Hiina GEC-le, mis koosneb NMT-põhisest mudelist, järjestuse redigeerimise mudelist ja õigekirjakontrollist. Meie metoodika mitte ainult ei saavuta Hiina GEC jaoks uut tipptasemel jõudlust, vaid ka seda, toetumata andmete suurendamisele või GEC-spetsiifilistele arhitektuurimuutustele. Lisaks katsetame oma süsteemi kõiki võimalikke konfiguratsioone mudeli koostise järjekorra ja korrigeerimisvoorude arvu järgi. Iga mudeli üksikasjalik analüüs ja nende panus parandusprotsessi viiakse läbi, kohandades ERRANTi skoorijat, et oleks võimalik hinnata hiina lauseid.', 'fi': 'Viimeisimmät kieliopillisen virhekorjauksen (GEC) työt perustuvat neurokonekäännökseen perustuviin malleihin. Vaikka nämä mallit ylpeilevät vaikuttavasta suorituskyvystä, ne tarvitsevat valtavan määrän dataa voidakseen harjoitella kunnolla. Lisäksi NMT-pohjaiset järjestelmät kohtelevat GEC:tä puhtaasti käännöstehtävänä ja unohtavat sen editointinäkökulman. Tässä työssä ehdotamme heterogeenistä lähestymistapaa kiinalaiseen GEC:hen, joka koostuu NMT-pohjaisesta mallista, sekvenssinmuokkausmallista ja oikeinkirjoituksen tarkistamisesta. Menetelmämme ei ainoastaan saavuta Kiinan GEC:n uusinta suorituskykyä, vaan se onnistuu myös tukeutumatta datan lisäämiseen tai GEC:n arkkitehtuuriin liittyviin muutoksiin. Lisäksi kokeilemme kaikkia järjestelmämme mahdollisia konfiguraatioita mallin koostumusjärjestyksen ja korjauskierrosten määrän suhteen. Jokaisesta mallista ja niiden vaikutuksesta korjausprosessiin tehdään yksityiskohtainen analyysi mukauttamalla ERRANT-pisteytystä kiinalaisten lauseiden pisteyttämiseksi.', 'az': "Qrammatik xəta düzəltməsi (GEC) sahəsindəki ən yeni işlər nöral maşına çevirilmiş modellərə təvəkkül edir. Bu modellər etkileyici performansı təkəbbür göstərməsə də, bu modellər düzgün təhsil etmək üçün çox çox məlumat lazımdır. Daha sonra, NMT tabanlı sistemləri GEC'i təkrarlama görevi kimi təkrarlayır və onun düzəltmə aspektini görmürlər. Bu işdə biz Çin GEC-ə heterogenel bir tərzim təklif edirik, NMT-dən qurulmuş modellərdən, sıralama düzenleme modellərdən və imlâ təşkilindən olub. Bizim metodolojimiz ancaq Çin GEC üçün yeni mövcuddur performansını başa çatmaz, ancaq məlumatların art ırmasına və GEC-nin müəyyən arhitektura dəyişikliklərinə təvəkkül etmədən. Biz sistemimizin bütün mümkün yapılandırmalarını modellərlə birlikdə və növbənöv düzəltmə səbəbi ilə təcrübə edirik. Hər modellərin detaylı analizi və onların düzəltmə prosesinin səbəbi ilə ERRANT scorer'u dəyişdirmək üçün Çin cümlələrini müəyyən edə bilər.", 'ca': "Els treballs més recents en el camp de la correcció d'errors gramàtics (GEC) es basan en models basats en traducció de màquines neurals. Encara que aquests models tenen un rendiment impressionant, requereixen una quantitat enorme de dades per formar-se adequadament. A més, els sistemes basats en NMT tracten el GEC purament com una tasca de traducció i ignoren l'aspecte d'edició. En aquest treball proposem un enfocament heterogeni al GEC xinès, compost d'un model basat en NMT, un model d'edició de seqüències i un controlador ortogètic. La nostra metodologia no només aconsegueix un nou rendiment més avançat per a la GEC xinesa, sinó també ho fa sense confiar en augments de dades o canvis d'arquitectura específics per a la GEC. Continuem experimentant amb totes les configuracions possibles del nostre sistema en relació amb l'ordre de composició model i el nombre de rondes de correcció. Una anàlisi detallada de cada model i les seves contribucions al procés de correcció es fa adaptant el puntuador ERRANT per poder puntuar frases xineses.", 'jv': 'Algorithm Genjer-genjer model iki dadi sing ngomong nik akeh operasi, wong sedhaya butine data kang diolah Ngubah kok, NMT-bisa sistem dadi GEC padha putol-putol nganggo tarjamahan lan ijol-ijol kuwi nggawe ngubah apat. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita unêmêr suarané ténêran êterégenen kanggo GEC Cinên, sampe model sing basa gambar NMT, model sing wis nguasai nêterée, lan ujaran langgambar. Awak dhéwé sistem punika dipun ajeng-ajeng kanggo kelas barang-ajeng kanggo GEC Chinese, dadi iki dadi apik nek teka mulai nggawe informasi akeh Ulihke sistem sing beraksi GEC. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi barêng-barêng nggawe sistem iki dadi nggawe gerakan karo model kuwi tindakan layar lan nganggo perusahaan Ndeleksyon langkung ngerti sistem sing model lan nganggep bener sampeyan nggawe ngubah bener', 'ha': "@ action: button Although these models boast impressive performance, they require a massive amount of data to properly train.  Furan haka, na'urar NMT-da ke daidaita GEC kawai kamar aikin fassarar da kuma ya bar shirin editori na kansa. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata matsayi mai sauti zuwa GEC na China, wanda aka ƙunsa da wani motel na NMT-asansa, da misalin taƙaitacce, da kuma masu checki na spell. Kayan hanyoyinmu ba ta sãmu wani halin-sanar na-gaba kawai ga GEC na China, kuma amma yana aikata kamar haka ba idan ana ƙayyade a kan ƙaramako da data ko musanyawa na GEC-ƙayyade. Tuna ƙara jarrabi game da duk masu iya yiwuwa na tsari na'urar tsarin na'ura da masu samu'ar tsari da shiryarwa. Ana ƙissaci na kõwa motel da michangoninsu zuwa jarraba aikin hagu, za'a yi amfani da kwamfyutan mai cikakken scorer ERANNT ya iya iya nuna cewa-tsarin China.", 'sk': 'Najnovejša dela s področja slovničnega popravka napak (GEC) temeljijo na modelih nevronskega strojnega prevajanja. Čeprav se ti modeli ponašajo z impresivno zmogljivostjo, potrebujejo ogromno količino podatkov za pravilno vadbo. Poleg tega sistemi, ki temeljijo na NMT, obravnavajo GEC zgolj kot prevajalsko nalogo in spregledajo njegov vidik urejanja. V tem delu predlagamo heterogen pristop kitajskega GEC, sestavljen iz modela, ki temelji na NMT, modela za urejanje zaporedja in preverjanja črkovanja. Naša metodologija ne dosega le nove najsodobnejše zmogljivosti kitajskega GEC, temveč tudi brez zanašanja na povečanje podatkov ali spremembe arhitekture, specifične za GEC. Nadalje eksperimentiramo z vsemi možnimi konfiguracijami našega sistema glede na vrstni red sestave modela in število krogov popravkov. Podrobna analiza vsakega modela in njegovega prispevka k postopku popravka se izvede s prilagoditvijo ocenjevalca ERRANT, da bi lahko ocenili kitajske stavke.', 'he': "העבודות האחרונות בשטח תיקון שגיאות גרמטית (GEC) תלויות בדוגמנים מבוססים על מכונות עיצביות. למרות שהדוגמנים האלה מתגאות בהופעה מרשים, הם דורשים כמות מסיבית של נתונים כדי להתאמן כראוי. חוץ מזה, מערכות מבוססות על NMT מתייחסות לג'י-סי טהור כמשימה תרגום ולהתעלם מהאפקט העורך שלו. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים גישה heterogeneous לג'י ג'י סיני, מורכבת ממודל מבוסס על NMT, מודל עורך רצף, ומבדק כישוף. המטדולוגיה שלנו לא רק משיגה ביצועים חדשים במיוחד עבור GEC סיני, אלא גם עושה זאת מבלי לסמוך על גידול נתונים או שינויים בארכיטקטורה מסויימים GEC. אנו נוספים ניסויים עם כל ההגדרות האפשריות של המערכת שלנו בנוגע לסדר ההגדרות המודל ומספר סיבובים לתיקון. ניתוח פרטי של כל מודל והתרומותיהם לתהליך התיקון מבצעים על ידי שינוי הציון ERRANT כדי להיות מסוגל לקבוע משפטים סינים.", 'bo': 'དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོང་ཁག་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བདེ་སྐྱོན་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདི་ཚོ་སྣང་བརྗོད་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ནའང་། དེ་ལས་NMT་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་GEC་ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་བཞིན་པ་དང་ཞིབ་འཇུག In this work we propose a heterogeneous approach to Chinese GEC, composed of a NMT-based model, a sequence editing model and a spell checker. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནས་སྟངས་གསརཔ་ཅིག་ལས་འཕར་མེད་པར། རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནས་སྟངས ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲིག A detailed analysis of each model and their contributions to the correction process is performed by adapting the ERRANT scorer to be able to score Chinese sentences.'}
{'en': 'Formality Style Transfer with Shared Latent Space', 'fr': 'Transfert de style de formalité avec espace latent partagé', 'ar': 'نقل نمط شكلي مع مساحة كامنة مشتركة', 'es': 'Transferencia estilo formalidad con espacio latente compartido', 'pt': 'Transferência de estilo de formalidade com espaço latente compartilhado', 'ja': '共有潜在スペースを使用した形式スタイル転送', 'hi': 'साझा अव्यक्त अंतरिक्ष के साथ औपचारिकता शैली स्थानांतरण', 'zh': '共享潜空形式化法移', 'ru': 'Перенос формального стиля с общим латентным пространством', 'ga': 'Aistriú Stíl Foirmiúlachta le Spás Folaigh Roinnte', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Formalitás stílus átvitele megosztott Latent Space', 'el': 'Μεταφορά στυλ τυπικότητας με κοινόχρηστο λανθάνον χώρο', 'it': 'Trasferimento di stile formale con spazio laterale condiviso', 'kk': 'Ортақталған кейінгі бос орынмен пішімдік стилін аудару', 'mk': 'Пренос на стил на формалност со заеднички подоцна простор', 'lt': 'Formalumo stiliaus perkėlimas su bendra vėlesne erdve', 'ml': 'Formality Style Transfer with Shared Latent Space', 'mt': 'Trasferiment ta’ Stil ta’ Formalità bi Spazju Latenti Kondiviż', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Gaya Formalitas dengan Ruang Terkongsi', 'mn': 'Форматын хэлбэрийн Төвөрмөц Сүүлийн орон зайд хуваалцах', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Transfer stylu formalności ze wspólną przestrzenią latentną', 'ro': 'Transfer de stil formal cu spațiu lateral comun', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje formalnog stila sa podeljenim kasnim prostorom', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Formality Style Transfer with Shared Latent Space', 'sv': 'Formell stil överföring med delat Latent Space', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'வடிவமைப்பு பாணி பங்கிடப்பட்ட தற்போதைய இடைவெளியில் மாற்று', 'uz': 'Uslubni boshqarish', 'vi': 'Chuyển đổi kiểu chính thức với cùng khoảng thời gian', 'nl': 'Transfer van formele stijl met gedeelde latente ruimte', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje formalnog stila s zajedničkim posljednjim prostorom', 'da': 'Formel stil overførsel med delt Latent Space', 'bg': 'Прехвърляне на стил на формалност с споделено латентно пространство', 'id': 'Formality Style Transfer with Shared Latent Space', 'ko': '잠재적 공간을 공유하는 형식 스타일 전환', 'de': 'Transfer des Formalitätsstils mit Shared Latent Space', 'sw': 'Formality Style Transfer with Shared Latent Space', 'tr': 'Durum Saýlaw', 'fa': 'Transfer Style Formality با فضای تاریخی مشترک', 'sq': 'Transferimi i stilit të formalitetit me hapësirën e përbashkët të vonuar', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Bölüşdürülən Sonrakı Boşluqla Formatlıq Uslu Transfer', 'af': 'Formaliteit Styl Oordrag met Gedeelde Latent Spasie', 'bn': 'শেয়ার করা ল্যাটেন্ট স্পেসের সাথে ফরমালি স্টাইল পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje formalnog stila sa zajedničkim poslednjim prostorom', 'ca': "Transfer d'estil de formalitat amb espai compartit més tard", 'cs': 'Přenos formálního stylu se sdíleným latentním prostorem', 'et': 'Formaalsusstiili ülekanne ühise latentruumiga', 'fi': 'Muodollisuuden tyylin siirto jaetulla latenttitilalla', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'העברת סגנון רשמיות עם חלל מאוחר משותף', 'sk': 'Prenos sloga formalnosti s skupnim latentnim prostorom', 'ha': 'Transform with Shared Space', 'bo': 'མཉམ་སྦྲགས་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཚོད་གཞུང་གི་བར་སྟོང་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤོར་བ'}
{'en': 'Conventional approaches for formality style transfer borrow models from neural machine translation, which typically requires massive parallel data for training. However, the dataset for formality style transfer is considerably smaller than translation corpora. Moreover, we observe that informal and formal sentences closely resemble each other, which is different from the translation task where two languages have different vocabularies and grammars. In this paper, we present a new approach, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), for formality style transfer, where we propose two auxiliary losses and adopt joint training of bi-directional transfer and auto-encoding. Experimental results show that S2S-SLS (with either RNN or Transformer architectures) consistently outperforms baselines in various settings, especially when we have limited data.', 'ar': 'الأساليب التقليدية لأسلوب شكلي نقل النماذج المستعارة من الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، والتي تتطلب عادةً بيانات موازية ضخمة للتدريب. ومع ذلك ، فإن مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنقل نمط الشكليات أصغر بكثير من مجموعة بيانات الترجمة. علاوة على ذلك ، نلاحظ أن الجمل الرسمية وغير الرسمية تشبه بعضها البعض عن كثب ، وهو ما يختلف عن مهمة الترجمة حيث يكون للغتين مفردات وقواعد نحوية مختلفة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا جديدًا ، التسلسل إلى التسلسل مع الفضاء الكامن المشترك (S2S-SLS) ، لنقل نمط الشكليات ، حيث نقترح خسارتين مساعدتين ونعتمد تدريبًا مشتركًا للنقل ثنائي الاتجاه والتشفير التلقائي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن S2S-SLS (مع معمارية RNN أو Transformer) تتفوق باستمرار على خطوط الأساس في الإعدادات المختلفة ، خاصةً عندما تكون لدينا بيانات محدودة.', 'es': 'Los enfoques convencionales para la transferencia de estilos de formalidad toman prestados modelos de la traducción automática neuronal, que normalmente requiere datos paralelos masivos para el entrenamiento. Sin embargo, el conjunto de datos para la transferencia de estilo de formalidad es considerablemente más pequeño que los corpus de traducción. Además, observamos que las oraciones formales e informales se parecen mucho entre sí, lo cual es diferente de la tarea de traducción en la que dos idiomas tienen vocabularios y gramáticas diferentes. En este artículo, presentamos un nuevo enfoque, Secuencia a secuencia con espacio latente compartido (S2S-SLS), para la transferencia de estilo formalidad, donde proponemos dos pérdidas auxiliares y adoptamos un entrenamiento conjunto de transferencia bidireccional y codificación automática. Los resultados experimentales muestran que S2S-SLS (con arquitecturas RNN o Transformer) supera sistemáticamente a las líneas base en varios entornos, especialmente cuando tenemos datos limitados.', 'fr': "Les approches conventionnelles pour le transfert de style de formalité empruntent des modèles à la traduction automatique neuronale, qui nécessite généralement des données parallèles massives pour la formation. Cependant, le jeu de données pour le transfert de style de formalité est considérablement plus petit que les corpus de traduction. De plus, nous observons que les phrases informelles et formelles se ressemblent étroitement, ce qui est différent de la tâche de traduction où deux langues ont des vocabulaires et des grammaires différents. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle approche, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), pour le transfert de style de formalité, dans laquelle nous proposons deux pertes auxiliaires et adoptons un apprentissage conjoint du transfert bidirectionnel et de l'auto-codage. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que S2S-SLS (avec des architectures RNN ou Transformer) surpasse systématiquement les valeurs de base dans divers contextes, en particulier lorsque les données sont limitées.", 'pt': 'Abordagens convencionais para transferência de estilo de formalidade emprestam modelos da tradução de máquina neural, que normalmente requer dados paralelos massivos para treinamento. No entanto, o conjunto de dados para transferência de estilo de formalidade é consideravelmente menor do que corpora de tradução. Além disso, observamos que as frases informais e formais se assemelham muito, o que é diferente da tarefa de tradução em que duas línguas têm vocabulários e gramáticas diferentes. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova abordagem, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), para transferência de estilo de formalidade, onde propomos duas perdas auxiliares e adotamos o treinamento conjunto de transferência bidirecional e auto-codificação. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o S2S-SLS (com arquiteturas RNN ou Transformer) supera consistentemente as linhas de base em várias configurações, especialmente quando temos dados limitados.', 'ja': '形式スタイル転送モデルのための従来のアプローチは、ニューラル機械翻訳から借用しており、通常、トレーニングのために大規模な並列データを必要とする。ただし、形式スタイル転送のためのデータセットは、翻訳コーパスよりもかなり小さい。さらに、非公式文と形式文がよく似ていることが観察されます。これは、2つの言語が異なる語彙と文法を持つ翻訳タスクとは異なります。本稿では、形式スタイル転送のための新しいアプローチであるシーケンス・トゥ・シーケンス・ウィズ・シェアード・ラテン・スペース（ Ｓ ２ Ｓ － ＳＬＳ ）を提示し、２つの補助損失を提案し、双方向転送と自動符号化の共同トレーニングを採用する。実験結果によると、S 2 S - SLS （ RNNアーキテクチャまたはトランスフォーマーアーキテクチャ）は、特にデータが限られている場合、さまざまな設定で一貫してベースラインを上回っています。', 'zh': '移文借神经机器翻译,大须并数。 然文移之数集比译语料库小得多。 此外观正句极相似,与二语异词汇与语法译异务也。 本文举一共享潜伏空间(S2S-SLS)序于序新之法,用于形式化风,两助损益,并用双向移自编码之合。 实验结果表明,S2S-SLS(用RNN、Transformer架构)诸设终优于基线,尤当吾数有限时。', 'hi': 'औपचारिकता शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद से मॉडल उधार लेते हैं, जिसे आमतौर पर प्रशिक्षण के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर समानांतर डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है। हालांकि, औपचारिकता शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए डेटासेट अनुवाद निगम की तुलना में काफी छोटा है। इसके अलावा, हम देखते हैं कि अनौपचारिक और औपचारिक वाक्य एक-दूसरे से मिलते-जुलते हैं, जो अनुवाद कार्य से अलग है जहां दो भाषाओं में अलग-अलग शब्दावली और व्याकरण हैं। इस पेपर में, हम औपचारिकता शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए साझा अव्यक्त अंतरिक्ष (S2S-SLS) के साथ अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम एक नया दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जहां हम दो सहायक नुकसानों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और द्वि-दिशात्मक हस्तांतरण और ऑटो-एन्कोडिंग के संयुक्त प्रशिक्षण को अपनाते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि S2S-SLS (या तो RNN या ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर के साथ) लगातार विभिन्न सेटिंग्स में बेसलाइन को मात देता है, खासकर जब हमारे पास सीमित डेटा होता है।', 'ru': 'Традиционные подходы к передаче формального стиля заимствуют модели из нейронного машинного перевода, который обычно требует массивных параллельных данных для обучения. Тем не менее, набор данных для передачи формального стиля значительно меньше, чем корпуса перевода. Более того, мы отмечаем, что неформальные и формальные предложения близко напоминают друг друга, что отличается от задачи перевода, когда два языка имеют разные словарные запасы и грамматики. В этой статье мы представляем новый подход, последовательность-последовательность с общим латентным пространством (S2S-SLS), для формального стиля передачи, где мы предлагаем два вспомогательных убытка и принимаем совместное обучение двунаправленной передачи и автокодирования. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что S2S-SLS (с архитектурами RNN или Transformer) последовательно превосходит базовые линии в различных условиях, особенно когда у нас ограниченные данные.', 'ga': 'Cuireann cur chuige traidisiúnta le haghaidh stíl fhoirmiúlachta aistrithe samhlacha ar iasacht ó néaraistriúchán meaisín, a éilíonn go hiondúil ollshonraí comhthreomhara le haghaidh oiliúna. Mar sin féin, tá an tacar sonraí maidir le haistriú stíle foirmeálta i bhfad níos lú ná corparáid an aistriúcháin. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid faoi deara go bhfuil cosúlachtaí idir abairtí neamhfhoirmiúla agus abairtí foirmeálta, atá difriúil ó thasc an aistriúcháin ina bhfuil stór focal agus gramadach an dá theanga. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid cur chuige nua i láthair, Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh le Spás Folaigh Roinnte (S2S-SLS), le haghaidh aistriú foirmiúlachta stíle, ina molaimid dhá chaillteanas cúnta agus ina nglactar comhoiliúint aistrithe déthreo agus uathchódaithe. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn S2S-SLS (le ceachtar ailtireacht RNN nó Transformer) na bunlínte i suímh éagsúla, go háirithe nuair atá sonraí teoranta againn.', 'ka': 'კონგენციონალური დახმარება ფორმალური სტილის ტრანსტრენსის მოდელებისთვის ნეიროლური მაქსინის ტრანსტრენსიდან, რომელიც საშუალოდ მოჭირდება მასი პა მაგრამ, მონაცემები ფორმალურობის სტილის გადატანისთვის ძალიან პატარა, ვიდრე გადატანისთვის კოპორაზე. დამატებით, ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ ინფორმალური და ფორმალური სიტყვები ძალიან ერთმანეთს სხვადასხვა, რომელიც განსხვავებული საქაღალდეს, სადაც ორი ენების განსხვავებული სიტყვებულები ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალი პროგორმაციას ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ, შემდეგ-შემდეგ-შემდეგ გაყოფილი შემდეგ სივრცე (S2S-SLS), ფორმაციალური სტილის გადატანისთვის, სადაც ჩვენ გვეძლოთ ორი დახმარებული დასრულება და გავაკ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებს, რომ S2S-SLS (RNN ან ტრანფორმენსტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტ', 'el': 'Οι συμβατικές προσεγγίσεις για τη μεταφορά στυλ τυπικότητας δανείζονται μοντέλα από τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, η οποία συνήθως απαιτεί τεράστια παράλληλα δεδομένα για την εκπαίδευση. Ωστόσο, το σύνολο δεδομένων για τη μεταφορά στυλ τυπικότητας είναι σημαντικά μικρότερο από τα σώματα μετάφρασης. Επιπλέον, παρατηρούμε ότι οι άτυπες και επίσημες προτάσεις μοιάζουν στενά μεταξύ τους, κάτι που διαφέρει από το μεταφραστικό έργο όπου δύο γλώσσες έχουν διαφορετικά λεξικά και γραμματικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση, ακολουθία-σε-ακολουθία με κοινόχρηστο λανθάνοντα χώρο (για μεταφορά τύπου τυπικότητας, όπου προτείνουμε δύο βοηθητικές απώλειες και υιοθετούμε κοινή εκπαίδευση αμφίδρομης μεταφοράς και αυτόματης κωδικοποίησης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σύστημα (είτε με αρχιτεκτονική είτε μετασχηματιστή) ξεπερνά σταθερά τις γραμμές βάσης σε διάφορες ρυθμίσεις, ειδικά όταν έχουμε περιορισμένα δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'A formasági stílusú transzfer hagyományos megközelítései az idegi gépi fordításból kölcsönöznek modelleket, amelyek jellemzően masszív párhuzamos adatokat igényelnek a képzéshez. Azonban a formasági stílusátvitelhez szükséges adatkészlet lényegesen kisebb, mint a fordítási corpora. Ezenkívül megfigyeljük, hogy az informális és formális mondatok szorosan hasonlítanak egymásra, ami eltér attól a fordítási feladattól, ahol két nyelv különböző szókincsekkel és nyelvtantárgyakkal rendelkezik. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új megközelítést mutatunk be, a Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), a formalitási stílus átadására, ahol két kiegészítő veszteséget javasolunk és közös képzést fogadunk el a kétirányú átadás és az automatikus kódolás. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az S2S-SLS (RNN vagy Transformer architektúrákkal) különböző beállításokban következetesen felülmúlja az alapvető értékeket, különösen, ha korlátozott adatunk van.', 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің аудармасынан официалдық стильді аудару үлгілерінің кәдімгі арқылы, ол әдетте оқыту үшін үлкен параллель деректерді талап етеді. Бірақ официалдық стилді аудару деректер жиыны аудару корпорасынан артық. Сонымен қатар, біз мәлімет және пішімдік сөздер бір-біріне ұқсас сәйкес келеді деп белгіледік. Бұл, екі тілде әртүрлі сөздер мен граммалар бар, аудармалардың тапсырмасынан ай Бұл қағазда, біз официалдық стилді аудару үшін жаңа тәртібін көрсетедік. Біз екі көмектесік жоғалуды және екі бағытты аудару және автокодтамасын біріктіріп, біріктіріп, біріктіріп, біріктіріп, біріктіріп, біріктіріп,  Эксперименталдық нәтижелер S2S-SLS (RNN немесе түрлендіру архитектураларымен) түрлі параметрлерде негізгі сызықтарды тәуелді жасайды, осылақ біз шектелгенде.', 'it': "Gli approcci convenzionali per il trasferimento di stile formale prendono in prestito modelli dalla traduzione automatica neurale, che in genere richiede enormi dati paralleli per l'addestramento. Tuttavia, il set di dati per il trasferimento di stile formality è notevolmente più piccolo dei corpi di traduzione. Inoltre, osserviamo che le frasi informali e formali si assomigliano molto, il che è diverso dal compito di traduzione in cui due lingue hanno vocabolari e grammatiche diversi. In questo articolo, presentiamo un nuovo approccio, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), per il trasferimento di stile formale, in cui proponiamo due perdite ausiliarie e adottiamo una formazione congiunta di trasferimento bidirezionale e auto-codifica. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che S2S-SLS (con architetture RNN o Transformer) supera costantemente le linee di base in varie impostazioni, soprattutto quando abbiamo dati limitati.", 'lt': 'Įprasti formalumo perdavimo metodai pasiskolina modelius iš nervinių mašinų vertimo, o mokymui paprastai reikalingi masiniai lygiagrečiai duomenys. Tačiau formalumo stiliaus perdavimo duomenų rinkinys yra gerokai mažesnis nei vertimo korpora. Be to, pastebime, kad neoficialūs ir oficialūs sakiniai glaudžiai panašūs vienas į kitą, o tai skiriasi nuo vertimo užduoties, kurioje dvi kalbos turi skirtingus žodynus ir gramatikas. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują metodą „Seka po sekos su bendra vėlesne erdve“ (S2S-SLS), skirtą formalumo stiliaus perdavimui, kuriame siūlome du papildomus nuostolius ir priimame bendrą dvikrypčio perdavimo ir automatinio kodavimo mokymą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad S2S-SLS (su RNN ar Transformer architektūra) nuosekliai viršija bazines linijas įvairiose aplinkybėse, ypač kai turime ribotus duomenis.', 'mk': 'Конвенционалните пристапи за трансфер на формалност позајмуваат модели од превод на неврални машини, кои обично бараат масовни паралелни податоци за обука. Сепак, компјутерот на податоци за трансфер на стил на формалност е значително помал од преводната корпора. Покрај тоа, набљудуваме дека неформалните и официјалните реченици многу се слични меѓусебно, што е различно од преводната задача каде што двата јазици имаат различни зборови и граматки. Во овој документ, претставуваме нов пристап, Секвенција до Секвенција со заедничкиот задоцнет простор (S2S-SLS), за трансфер на формалниот стил, каде што предложуваме две помошни загуби и усвојуваме заедничко обука за двојно трансфер и автоматско кодирање. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека S2S-SLS (со или RNN или Transformer архитектури) константно ги надминува базите во различни поставувања, особено кога имаме ограничени податоци.', 'ms': 'pendekatan konvensional untuk pemindahan gaya formaliti model pinjam dari terjemahan mesin saraf, yang biasanya memerlukan data selari besar untuk latihan. Namun, set data untuk pemindahan gaya formaliti jauh lebih kecil daripada korpra terjemahan. Selain itu, kita menyaksikan bahawa kalimat tidak secara rasmi dan rasmi sangat mirip satu sama lain, yang berbeza dari tugas terjemahan di mana dua bahasa mempunyai kamus dan grammar yang berbeza. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru, Sequence-to-Sequence dengan Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), untuk pemindahan gaya formaliti, di mana kami menyarankan dua kerugian bantuan dan menerima latihan bersama pemindahan dua arah dan auto-pengekodan. Experimental results show that S2S-SLS (with either RNN or Transformer architectures) consistently outperforms baselines in various settings, especially when we have limited data.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഫോര്\u200dമിലിറ്റി ശൈലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കടം മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധ എങ്കിലും ഫോര്\u200dമിലിറ്റി സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പരിഭാഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ്ററിലേക് അതുകൊണ്ടും നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു, അന്യായമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരസ്പരം തുല്യമായി നോക്കുന്നു. അത് പരിഭാഷപ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കപ്പെട്ട ലാറ്റെന്\u200dറ് സ്പെയിന്\u200dറ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി ഒരു പുതിയ മാറ്റം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അവിടെ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് S2S-SLS (RNN അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d Transformer architectures) വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്', 'mt': 'Approċċi konvenzjonali għal mudelli ta’ self ta’ trasferiment ta’ stil formali minn traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali, li tipikament jeħtieġu dejta parallela massiva għat-taħriġ. Madankollu, is-sett tad-dejta għat-trasferiment tal-istil tal-formalità huwa konsiderevolment iżgħar mill-korpora tat-traduzzjoni. Barra minn hekk, naraw li s-sentenzi informali u formali jixbħu mill-qrib lil xulxin, li hija differenti mill-kompitu tat-traduzzjoni fejn żewġ lingwi għandhom vokabulari u grammi differenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw approċċ ġdid, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), għat-trasferiment tal-istil formali, fejn qed nipproponu żewġ telf awżiljarju u niddottaw taħriġ konġunt ta’ trasferiment bidirezzjonali u awto-kodifikazzjoni. Riżultati esperimentali juru li S2S-SLS (b’arkitetturi jew RNN jew Transformer) b’mod konsistenti jeċċedi l-linji bażi f’diversi ambjenti, speċjalment meta għandna dejta limitata.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэх загваруудын тулд мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах загваруудын тулд ихэвчлэн маш их параллел өгөгдлийн хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ официал хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлтийн өгөгдлийн сан нь орчуулагчийн корпорас бага байдаг. Дараа нь, бид мэдээлэл болон үндсэн үг бие биенээ ойролцоогоор адилхан байдаг гэдгийг анзаарлаа. Энэ нь хоёр хэл өөр үг болон грамм гэдгээс ялгаатай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг шинэ арга зам, Дараагийн Сүүлийн зай (S2S-SLS) дээр хуваалцах зай (sequence-to-sequence) өгсөн. Энд бид хоёр тусламжтай алдагдлыг санал болгож, хоёр шугам руу шилжүүлэх, автокодлох болон хоёр дасгал сургалт хийх болно. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд S2S-SLS (RNN болон Төрвөлжингийн архитектурууд) олон тохиолдолд суурь шугам гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Ялангуяа бидэнд хязгаарлагдсан өгөгдлийн үед.', 'pl': 'Konwencjonalne podejścia do transferu stylu formalności pożyczają modele z neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego, które zazwyczaj wymaga ogromnych danych równoległych do treningu. Jednak zbiór danych do transferu stylu formalności jest znacznie mniejszy niż korpusy tłumaczeniowe. Ponadto zauważamy, że zdania nieformalne i formalne ściśle się do siebie przypominają, co różni się od zadania tłumaczeniowego, gdzie dwa języki mają różne słowniki i gramatyki. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowe podejście, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), do transferu stylu formalności, w którym proponujemy dwie straty pomocnicze i przyjmujemy wspólne szkolenie transferu dwukierunkowego i autokodowania. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że S2S-SLS (z architekturą RNN lub Transformer) konsekwentnie przewyższa linie bazowe w różnych ustawieniach, zwłaszcza gdy mamy ograniczone dane.', 'no': 'Konvensjonale tilnærmingar for lånemodular for formalitetsstiloverføring frå neuralmaskineomsetjing, som normalt krev massive parallelle data for trening. Datasettet for formalitetsstiloverføring er imidlertid mykje mindre enn oversettelskorpa. I tillegg observerer vi at informalt og formelt setningar er nærare likt kvarandre, som er ulike frå oversettelsesoppgåva der to språk har ulike ordsamlingar og grammar. I denne papiret presenterer vi ei ny tilnærming, sekvens-til-sekvens med delt latere mellomrom (S2S-SLS), for formalitetsstiloverføring, der vi foreslår to hjelp tap og adopterer joint trening av to retningar og automatisk koding. Eksperimentale resultat viser at S2S-SLS (med anten RNN eller Transformeringsarkitektur) konsekvent utfører baselinjer i ulike innstillingar, spesielt når vi har begrenset data.', 'ro': 'Abordările convenționale pentru transferul stilului de formalitate împrumută modele de traducere automată neurală, care necesită, de obicei, date paralele masive pentru formare. Cu toate acestea, setul de date pentru transferul stilului de formalitate este considerabil mai mic decât corpurile de traducere. Mai mult decât atât, observăm că propozițiile informale și formale se aseamănă foarte mult, ceea ce este diferit de sarcina de traducere în care două limbi au vocabulare și gramatice diferite. În această lucrare, prezentăm o nouă abordare, secvență-la-secvență cu spațiu lateral partajat (S2S-SLS), pentru transferul stilului formalității, în care propunem două pierderi auxiliare și adoptăm pregătirea comună a transferului bidirecțional și auto-codificare. Rezultatele experimentale arată că S2S-SLS (cu arhitecturi RNN sau Transformer) depășește constant liniile de bază în diferite setări, mai ales atunci când avem date limitate.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada sida caadiga ah waxaa loo baahan yahay macluumaad faa’iido badan oo loo baahan yahay qaababka amaahda lagu wareejiyo qaabka asalka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka loo soo wareejiyo qaabka rasmiga ah waxaa ka yar yihiin shirkadda turjumista. Sidoo kale waxaynu fiirinaynaa in erayo rasmi ah oo rasmi ah isugu ekaysid, taas oo ka duwan shaqada turjumaadda, meesha labada luqadood ay leeyihiin hadal kala duduwan iyo grammar. Qoraalkan waxaynu keenaynaa qaab cusub, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), si aan u wareejinno qaababka rasmi ah, meesha aannu u soo jeedinno laba khasaaro oo xilli ah, waxaana sameynaynaa waxbarasho wadajir ah oo wadajir ah wado-dir ah iyo auto-encoding. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in S2S-SLS (with either RNN or Transformer architectures) si joogto ah uu u sameeyo saldhigyo ku qoran xarumaha kala duduwan, khusuusan markaynu hayno macluumaad xadhig ah.', 'sr': 'Konvencionalni pristupi za modele prebacivanja formalnosti stila pozajmljivanja iz prevoda neuralne mašine, koji obično zahteva masivne paralelne podatke za obuku. Međutim, kompleta podataka za prebacivanje formalnosti stila je mnogo manja od prevodnog korpora. Osim toga, primećujemo da se neformalne i formalne rečenice bliže slične jedni drugima, što je drugačije od prevodnog zadatka u kojem dva jezika imaju različite rečenice i gramare. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi pristup, Sequence-to-Sequence sa zajedničkim poslednjim prostorom (S2S-SLS), za prebacivanje formalnosti stila, gdje predlažemo dve pomoćne gubitke i usvojimo zajedničku obuku dvosmjernog prebacivanja i autokodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da S2S-SLS (sa ili RNN ili Transformer arhitekturom) stalno iznosi osnovne linije u različitim nastavama, posebno kada imamo ograničene podatke.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ස්ථාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරවර්තන විදියට ප්\u200dරවර්තන විදියට ප්\u200dරවර්තන විදියට ප්\u200dරව නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තාරය ගැන දත්ත සෙට් පරිවර්තන කොර්පෝරාවට වඩා ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය ව තවත්, අපි බලන්නේ නිර්මාණය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් වගේ වගේම වගේම වගේම වෙනස් වෙන්නේ භාෂා මේ පැත්තට, අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙන්වන්න, සෙක්වින්ස් ටි-සෙක්වින්ස් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට (S2S-SLS), සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ස්ථානය විදියට, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනය පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ S2S-SLS (RNN නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකය නිර්මාණයක් සමග) විවිධ සැකසුම් වලින් ප', 'ta': 'Conventional approaches for formality style transfer borrow models from neural machine translation, which typically requires massive parallel data for training.  ஆயினும், வடிவமைப்பு பாணி மாற்றுதலுக்கான தகவல் அமைப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு குறைந்ததாக உள்ளது. மேலும், நாம் ஒருவருக்கு ஒருவர் மற்றும் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் சரியான வாக்குகளை பார்க்கிறோம். அது மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணியில் இருந்து மொழ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், பகிர்ந்த தொகுதி அணுகும் தொடர்ச்சி( S2S- SLS), வடிவமைப்பு பாணி மாற்றுவதற்கு, அங்கு நாம் இரண்டு கூட்டுதல்  சோதனை முடிவு', 'sv': 'Konventionella metoder för överföring av formalitetsstil lånar modeller från neural maskinöversättning, vilket vanligtvis kräver massiva parallella data för träning. Datauppsättningen för överföring av formaliteter är dock betydligt mindre än översättningskorpor. Dessutom konstaterar vi att informella och formella meningar liknar varandra, vilket skiljer sig från översättningsuppgiften där två språk har olika vokabulär och grammatik. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), för formality style transfer, där vi föreslår två hjälpförluster och antar gemensam utbildning av tvåriktad överföring och autokodning. Experimentella resultat visar att S2S-SLS (med antingen RNN- eller Transformer-arkitekturer) konsekvent överträffar baselines i olika miljöer, särskilt när vi har begränsade data.', 'ur': 'نائرول ماشین ترجمہ سے فرمولی استیل ترجمہ موڈل کے لئے معمولی طریقے کے مطابق، جن کی تعلیم کے لئے زیادہ مشکل سائل ڈیٹا کی ضرورت ہے. However, the data set for formality style transfer is considerably smaller than translation corpora. اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ غیر معمولی اور رسمی جماعتیں ایک دوسرے کے مطابق ایک دوسرے کے مطابق مثالیں ہیں جن میں دو زبانوں میں مختلف کلمات اور گرامر ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے، سکونس-سے-سکونس-سے-سکونس (S2S-SLS) کے ساتھ، فرمولی طریقہ انتقال کے لئے، جہاں ہم دو مددگار خسارہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں اور دوسری طریقہ انتقال اور اتو-اکڈینگ کے ساتھ joint training کی پکڑ لیتے ہیں. Experimental results show that S2S-SLS (with either RNN or Transformer architectures) consistently performs baselines in various settings, especially when we have limited data.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, shaxsiy uslub transfer uchun maʼlumotlar tarjima kompaniyasiga juda kichik. Ko'rib chiqqamiz, biz haqiqatgina va formal so'zlar bir-бирларига kamaytirish mumkin. Bu tarjima vazifani o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartiradi. In this paper, we present a new approach, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), for formality style transfer, where we propose two auxiliary losses and adopt joint training of bi-directional transfer and auto-encoding.  Tekshirish natijalari S2S-SLS (RNN yoki Transformer architektlari bilan) bir nechta moslamalarda bir xil moslamalarda baza satrlarni ishga tushirish mumkin, hususan biz chegara maʼlumot bor boʻlganda.", 'vi': 'Theo các phương pháp thông thường cho các thủ tục chuyển giao mẫu từ phiên dịch máy thần kinh, mà thường cần dữ liệu song song khổng lồ để huấn luyện. Tuy nhiên, bộ dữ liệu cho việc chuyển giao phong cách còn nhỏ hơn nhiều so với cơ bản dịch. Chúng tôi nhận thấy rằng các câu trả lời không chính thức rất giống nhau, khác với các câu dịch, nơi hai ngôn ngữ có các từ và ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới, dãy số đến dãy số với Không gian cạnh sẻ (S2S-SLS) cho việc chuyển giao phong cách hình thức, nơi chúng tôi đề nghị hai thua hỗ trợ và tham gia huấn luyện di chuyển hai hướng và mã tự động. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy rằng S2S-SLS (với kiến trúc RNN hay Transformer) hoàn toàn vượt trội các Nét vẽ nền trong nhiều thiết lập khác nhau, đặc biệt khi chúng ta có giới hạn dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Конвенционалните подходи за трансфер на стил формалност заемат модели от неврален машинен превод, който обикновено изисква масивни паралелни данни за обучение. Въпреки това, наборът от данни за трансфер на стил формалност е значително по-малък от корпоративните преводи. Освен това забелязваме, че неформалните и формалните изречения много си приличат, което се различава от преводаческата задача, при която два езика имат различни речници и граматики. В настоящата статия представяме нов подход, последователност към последователност със споделено латентно пространство (при който предлагаме две допълнителни загуби и възприемаме съвместно обучение по двупосочно прехвърляне и автоматично кодиране. Експерименталните резултати показват, че последователно превъзхожда базовите линии в различни настройки, особено когато имаме ограничени данни.', 'hr': 'Konvencionalni pristupi prijenosnim modelima prijenosa formalnosti iz prevoda neuralnih strojeva, koji obično zahtijevaju masivne paralelne podatke za obuku. Međutim, kompleta podataka za prebacivanje formalnosti stila značajno je manja od prevodnog korporacije. Osim toga, primećujemo da se neformalne i formalne rečenice bliže slične jedni drugima, što je različito od prevodnog zadatka u kojem dva jezika imaju različite riječi i gramare. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi pristup, Sequence-to-Sequence s zajedničkim posljednjim prostorom (S2S-SLS), za prebacivanje formalnosti stila, gdje predlažemo dva pomoćnog gubitka i usvojimo zajedničku obuku dvosmjernog prebacivanja i autokodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je S2S-SLS (s građevinama RNN ili Transformera) stalno iznosi početne linije u različitim nastavama, posebno kada imamo ograničene podatke.', 'nl': 'Conventionele benaderingen voor formality style transfer lenen modellen van neurale machine translation, die meestal enorme parallelle data vereist voor training. De dataset voor formality style transfer is echter aanzienlijk kleiner dan vertaalcorpora. Bovendien zien we dat informele en formele zinnen sterk op elkaar lijken, wat anders is dan de vertaaltaak waarbij twee talen verschillende woordenschaten en grammatica hebben. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe aanpak, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), voor formality style transfer, waarbij we twee bijkomende verliezen voorstellen en gezamenlijke training van bi-directionele overdracht en auto-codering aannemen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat S2S-SLS (met RNN- of Transformer-architecturen) consistent beter presteert dan baselines in verschillende instellingen, vooral wanneer we beperkte gegevens hebben.', 'da': 'Konventionelle tilgange til formalitetsstil overførsel låner modeller fra neural maskinoversættelse, som typisk kræver massive parallelle data til træning. Datasættet til overførsel af formalitetsstil er dog betydeligt mindre end oversættelseskorpora. Desuden bemærker vi, at uformelle og formelle sætninger nøje ligner hinanden, hvilket er forskelligt fra oversættelsesopgaven, hvor to sprog har forskellige ordforråd og grammatik. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny tilgang, Sekvens-til-Sekvens med delt Latent Space (S2S-SLS), til formalitetsstil overførsel, hvor vi foreslår to hjælpetab og vedtager fælles træning af tovejset overførsel og auto-kodning. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at S2S-SLS (med enten RNN- eller Transformer-arkitekturer) konsekvent overgår baselines i forskellige indstillinger, især når vi har begrænsede data.', 'de': 'Herkömmliche Ansätze zur Übertragung von Formalitäten entlehnen Modelle aus neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung, die typischerweise massive parallele Daten für das Training benötigt. Der Datensatz für die Übertragung von Formalitäten ist jedoch deutlich kleiner als Übersetzungskorpora. Darüber hinaus beobachten wir, dass informelle und formale Sätze einander sehr ähnlich sind, was sich von der Übersetzungsaufgabe unterscheidet, bei der zwei Sprachen unterschiedliche Vokabulare und Grammatiken haben. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen neuen Ansatz vor, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), für Formalitätstransfer, in dem wir zwei Hilfsverluste vorschlagen und ein gemeinsames Training von bidirektionalem Transfer und Auto-Encoding übernehmen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass S2S-SLS (entweder mit RNN- oder Transformer-Architekturen) Baselines in verschiedenen Einstellungen durchweg übertrifft, insbesondere wenn wir nur begrenzte Daten haben.', 'id': 'Pendekatan konvensional untuk gaya transfer formalitas meminjam model dari terjemahan mesin saraf, yang biasanya membutuhkan data paralel besar untuk latihan. Namun, dataset untuk transfer gaya formalitas jauh lebih kecil dari korpora terjemahan. Moreover, we observe that informal and formal sentences closely resemble each other, which is different from the translation task where two languages have different vocabularies and grammars.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan pendekatan baru, Sequence-to-Sequence dengan Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), untuk transfer gaya formalitas, di mana kami menyarankan dua kerugian tambahan dan mengadopsi pelatihan kongsi transfer bidireksi dan auto-encoding. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa S2S-SLS (dengan arsitektur RNN atau Transformer) secara konsisten melebihi garis dasar dalam berbagai pengaturan, terutama ketika kita memiliki data terbatas.', 'ko': '전통적인 형식화 전환 방법은 신경기계가 번역한 모델을 빌려 사용하는데 이것은 통상적으로 대량의 병행 데이터로 훈련을 해야 한다.그러나 형식 스타일 전환의 데이터 집합은 번역 자료 라이브러리보다 훨씬 작다.그 밖에 우리는 비공식과 정식 문장이 서로 매우 비슷하다는 것을 관찰했다. 이것은 번역 임무와 달리 번역 임무에서 두 언어는 서로 다른 어휘와 문법을 가진다.본고에서 우리는 잠재적 공간 서열을 서열(S2S-SLS)으로 공유하는 새로운 형식화 이전 방법을 제시했다. 그 중에서 우리는 두 가지 보조 손실을 제시했고 양방향 이전과 자동 인코딩의 연합 훈련을 실시했다.실험 결과에 따르면 S2S-SLS(RNN 또는 Transformer 구조가 있음)는 각종 설정에서 기선보다 시종 우수하며, 특히 데이터가 제한된 상황에서는 더욱 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Matokeo ya kimataifa kwa ajili ya mifano ya usafiri wa kodi kutoka tafsiri ya mashine ya asili, ambayo kwa kawaida inahitaji takwimu kubwa za usambazaji kwa mafunzo. Hata hivyo, seti ya data kwa ajili ya uhamishaji wa mtindo wa rasmi ni ndogo zaidi ya kampuni ya kutafsiri. Zaidi, tunaona kwamba hukumu rasmi na rasmi zinafanana na moja kwa moja, ambayo ni tofauti na kazi ya tafsiri ambapo lugha mbili zina maneno tofauti na kurasa. Katika gazeti hili, tunaleta mbinu mpya, mfululizo mpya wa kuendelea kwa ajili ya kusafirishwa kwa njia rasmi (S2S-SLS), ambapo tunapendekeza kupoteza viwili vya ziada na kuchukua mafunzo ya pamoja kwa ajili ya usafirishaji wa moja-kwa-moja na kodi kwa moja. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa S2S-SLS (kwa ama nyingine RNN au majengo ya Transfer) yanaonyesha msingi katika mazingira mbalimbali, hasa pale tunapokuwa na taarifa chache.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای معمولی برای انتقال مدل\u200cهای استیل رسمی از ترجمه ماشین عصبی، که معمولاً برای آموزش اطلاعات متفاوتی بزرگ نیاز دارد. ولی مجموعه داده\u200cها برای انتقال استیل رسمی خیلی کوچک از شرکت ترجمه است. علاوه بر این، ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که جمله\u200cهای معمولی و رسمی به نزدیک شبیه یکدیگر می\u200cشوند، که از وظیفه ترجمه متفاوت است که دو زبان کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت و گرامبر دارند. در این کاغذ، ما یک دستور جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، سعادت به سعادت با فضای اخیر (S2S-SLS) مشترک، برای انتقال شیوه رسمی، جایی که دو خسارهای کمک پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و آموزش مشترک انتقال و رمزبندی خودکار را قبول می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که S2S-SLS (با معماری RNN یا تغییر تغییر\u200cدهنده) همیشه خط\u200cهای بنیادی در تنظیمات مختلف، مخصوصا وقتی داده\u200cهای محدودیت داشته\u200cایم.', 'sq': 'Conventional approaches for formality style transfer borrow models from neural machine translation, which typically requires massive parallel data for training.  Megjithatë, grupi i të dhënave për transferimin e stilit të formalitetit është konsiderueshëm më i vogël se korpora e përkthimit. Përveç kësaj, ne vëzhgojmë se fjalët jozyrtare dhe zyrtare ngjajnë afër njëri-tjetrit, e cila është ndryshe nga detyra e përkthimit ku dy gjuhë kanë fjalorë dhe gramatikë të ndryshme. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një qasje të re, Sekuencë-në-Sekuencë me hapësirën e përbashkët të vonuar (S2S-SLS), për transferimin e stilit formalitet, ku propozojmë dy humbje ndihmëse dhe miratojmë trajnimin e përbashkët të transferimit dy-drejtues dhe autokodimit. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se S2S-SLS (me arkitektura ose RNN ose Transformer) vazhdimisht kalon linjat bazë në rregullime të ndryshme, veçanërisht kur kemi të dhëna të kufizuara.', 'tr': 'formalitet stili aktarma nusgalarynyň näyral maşynyň terjimesinden adatça golaýlary gerek. Ýöne, formalitet stili transfersi üçin maglumatlar terjime etmekden has kiçidir. Munuň ýagdaýda, biz resmi we formal sözleriň bir-birine ýakyn meňzeş ýaly meňzeýäris. Bu terjime göreviniň göreviniň üýtgeşiginden başga sözleriň we gramatikleriň bar. Bu kagyzda, täze bir ýazşy görkezip, Diňe-täze Soňky Gaýd Edilmegi (S2S-SLS) bilen, formalitet stili terjime etmek üçin, ýerde iki kömek ýitiri teklip edip, ikinji göçür-göçür we awtomatik ködleme üçin bir ýagdaýyny terjime edip görkezip. Durmançylyk netijesi S2S-SLS (ya RNN ýa-da Transformer arhitekturlary bilen) dürli düzümlerde baz hatlary çykarýar, ýöne biz çykarýan wagtymyz bar.', 'af': "Konvensionale toegang vir formaliteit styl oordrag lêer modele van neurale masjien oordrag, wat tipes massief parallele data benodig vir onderwerp. Maar die datastel vir formaliteit styl oordrag is betekenlik minder as vertaling korpora. Ook, ons hou aanmerk dat onformele en formele teikene naby soos mekaar, wat anders is van die vertaling taak waar twee tale verskillende woordeboeke en gramme het. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n nuwe toegang, Sequence-to-Sequence met Gedeelde Latent Spasie (S2S-SLS), vir formaliteit styl oordrag, waar ons voorstel twee hulpverlies en aanneem saamstige onderring van bi-rigting oordrag en outomatiese-kodering. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat S2S-SLS (met of RNN of Transformer architectures) konsistentlik uitvoer baselyn in verskillende instellings, veral wanneer ons beperk data het.", 'am': 'በጥያቄ ለመግለጽ የጥያቄ ማተርጓሜ አካባቢ ማህበራዊ ትርጉም የሚደረግ የሥልጣን ጥያቄ ይደረጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የድምፅ ደረጃን ለመለወጥ ከትርጓሜ ኮርፖር ይልቅ በጣም ትንሽ ነው፡፡ ደግሞም ሁለት ቋንቋዎች ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ቃላት እና አስተያየት ባለው ትርጓሜ አድራጊ የተለየ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት አዲስ ደረጃን እናቀርባለን፣ በተለየ ቅርብ ስፋት (S2S-SLS)፣ ለሥርዓት ዘይት ለመለወጥ እና ሁለት ተሳታፊ ክፍተት እና የሀብት ስርቨር እና የራስነት ኮድ ማቀናጃ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ Experimental results show that S2S-SLS (with either RNN or Transformer architectures) consistently outperforms baselines in various settings, especially when we have limited data.', 'hy': 'Սովորաձևության ոճի փոխանցման ավանդական մոտեցումները փոխանցում են նյարդային մեքենայի փոխարգման մոդելներ, որոնք սովորաբար պահանջում են հսկայական զուգահեռ տվյալներ ուսուցման համար: However, the dataset for formality style transfer is considerably smaller than translation corpora.  Ավելին, մենք նկատում ենք, որ ոչ պաշտոնական և պաշտոնական նախադասությունները միմյանց շատ նմանվում են, ինչը տարբերվում է թարգմանման խնդիրից, որտեղ երկու լեզուներն ունեն տարբեր բառարաններ և գրամատիկներ: In this paper, we present a new approach, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), for formality style transfer, where we propose two auxiliary losses and adopt joint training of bi-directional transfer and auto-encoding.  Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ S2S-SlaS (կամ ՌՆՆ-ի կամ Թերֆորմերի ճարտարապետությունների միջոցով) մշտապես գերազանցում է տարբեր միջավայրերում հիմնական գծերը, հատկապես երբ մենք սահմանափակ տվյալներ', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের মোডেল থেকে নৈতিকতা স্টাইল ট্রান্সফারেশনের জন্য সাধারণত প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য ব্যাপক তথ্য প্রয়োজন। তবে ফরমেলিটি স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের ডাটাসেট অনুবাদ কর্পোরার চেয়ে খুব কম। এছাড়াও আমরা দেখি যে অবৈধ এবং আনুষ্ঠানিক শাস্তি একে অপরের সাথে সমান, যা অনুবাদ করার কাজ থেকে আলাদা, যেখানে দুই ভাষায় ভাষার ভাষাভা In this paper, we present a new approach, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), for formality style transfer, where we propose two auxiliary losses and adopt joint training of bi-directional transfer and auto-encoding.  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে S2S-SLS (যার সাথে আরএনএন অথবা ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফার্নাল কাঠামো আছে) বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীতে বেসেলাইন বে', 'az': 'Nöral maşına çevirilməsindən formalitə tərəfindən istifadə etmə modellərinin mənfəətli tərəflər üçün müxtəlif tərəflər təhsil etmək üçün böyük paralel məlumatları lazımdır. Ancaq formalitə tərəfindən istifadə etmək üçün verilən quruluş korporadan daha kiçikdir. Daha sonra, biz imzalı və formal cümlələr bir-birinə yaxın bənzəyirlər, ki, iki dilin fərqli sözlər və grammalar olduğu təkrarlama işindən fərqli. Bu kağızda yeni bir yol göstəririk, S2S-SLS, formalitə tərəfindən istifadə edilən şəkildə iki kömək zərəri təklif edirik və iki yönəllik tərəfindən və avtomatik kodlama təhsil edirik. Experimental sonuçları S2S-SLS (ya RNN, ya da Transformer arhitektarları ilə) müxtəlif qurğular içində baz xətirləri müxtəlif tərzlərdə istifadə edir, xüsusiyyətli məlumatlarımız varsa.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments convencionals per a la transfer ència d'estil de formalitat prenen en préstec models de traducció neural de màquines, que normalment requereix dades paralleles massives per a formar-se. Però el conjunt de dades per a la transfer ència d'estil formal és considerablement més petit que la corpora de traducció. A més, observem que les frases informals i formels s'assemblen estretament, que és diferent de la tasca de traducció on dues llengües tenen vocabularis i gramàtiques diferents. En aquest paper presentem un nou enfocament, Seqüència a Seqüència amb Espai Llantant Compartit (S2S-SLS), per a la transfer ència d'estil formal, on proposem dues pèrdues auxiliars i adoptem formació conjunta de transferència bidireccional i autocodificació. Els resultats experimentals mostren que S2S-SLS (amb arquitectures RNN o Transformer) supera constantment les línies de base en diversos entorns, especialment quan tenim dades limitades.", 'bs': 'Konvencionalni pristupi za modele prijenosa formalnog stila pozajmljivanja iz prevoda neuronskih strojeva, koji obično zahtijevaju masivne paralelne podatke za obuku. Međutim, komplet podataka za prebacivanje formalnosti stila je značajno manji od prevodnog korporacije. Osim toga, primećujemo da se neformalne i formalne rečenice bliski slične jedni drugima, što je drugačije od prevodnog zadatka u kojem dva jezika imaju različite rečenice i gramare. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi pristup, Sequence-to-Sequence sa zajedničkim poslednjim prostorom (S2S-SLS), za prebacivanje formalnosti stila, gdje predlažemo dvije pomoćne gubitke i usvojimo zajedničku obuku dvosmjernog prebacivanja i autokodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da S2S-SLS (sa DNN ili transformerskim arhitekturom) stalno iznosi osnovne linije u različitim nastavama, posebno kada imamo ograničene podatke.', 'cs': 'Konvenční přístupy pro přenos formálního stylu si vypůjčují modely z neuronového strojového překladu, který obvykle vyžaduje masivní paralelní data pro trénink. Datová sada pro přenos formality stylu je však podstatně menší než překladové korpusy. Navíc pozorujeme, že neformální a formální věty se navzájem úzce podobají, což se liší od překladatelské úlohy, kdy dva jazyky mají různé slovníky a gramatiky. V tomto článku představujeme nový přístup, Sequence-to-Sequence se sdíleným latentním prostorem (S2S-SLS), pro přenos formality style, kde navrhujeme dvě pomocné ztráty a přijímáme společný trénink obousměrného přenosu a autokódování. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že S2S-SLS (s architekturou RNN nebo Transformer) konzistentně překonává základní linie v různých nastaveních, zejména pokud máme omezená data.', 'et': 'Traditsioonilised lähenemisviisid formaalsusstiili ülekandmiseks laenavad mudeleid neuromasintõlkest, mis tavaliselt nõuab koolituseks massiivseid paralleelseid andmeid. Formaalsusstiili edastamise andmekogum on siiski oluliselt väiksem kui tõlkekorpora. Lisaks märgime, et mitteametlikud ja formaalsed laused sarnanevad omavahel tihedalt, mis erineb tõlketööst, kus kahel keelel on erinevad sõnavara- ja grammatikad. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut lähenemisviisi, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), formaalsusstiili ülekande jaoks, kus pakume välja kaks abikaotust ning võtame kasutusele ühise koolituse kahesuunalise ülekande ja automaatkodeerimise kohta. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et S2S-SLS (kas RNN- või Transformer-arhitektuuriga) ületab erinevates seadetes järjepidevalt baasjooni, eriti kui andmed on piiratud.', 'fi': 'Perinteiset lähestymistavat muodollisuustyylin siirtoon lainaavat malleja neurokonekäännöksestä, joka yleensä vaatii massiivista rinnakkaisdataa harjoitteluun. Muodollisuustyylien siirron aineisto on kuitenkin huomattavasti pienempi kuin käännöskorporat. Lisäksi huomaamme, että epämuodolliset ja muodolliset lauseet muistuttavat toisiaan läheisesti, mikä eroaa käännöstehtävästä, jossa kahdella kielellä on eri sanastot ja kieliopit. Tässä työssä esittelemme uuden lähestymistavan, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), muodollisuustyylin siirtoon, jossa ehdotamme kahta apuhäviötä ja otamme käyttöön kaksisuuntaisen siirron ja automaattisen koodauksen yhteiskoulutuksen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että S2S-SLS (joko RNN- tai Transformer-arkkitehtuurilla) suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti perusarvoja paremmin eri asetuksissa, varsinkin kun dataa on rajoitettu.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBarUpdates Nanging, dataset kanggo ngerakaké format-status mbugal kuwi, dadi tanggal kuwi tanggal Nambah, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno karo perusahaan kelas informal karo formil sing mlanganggo sampek, sing mengko karo perusahaan kelas karo perusahaan Where are langa sing gawe kelas karo perusahaan karo pangunakno. Nang pepulan iki, kita mudhaya perusahaan anyar, Seyense-to-Seyense nganggo Ketokan Kasama sing dibenarno (S 2S-SLS), nggo ngeruhan resmi formil, supoyo awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki nggo ngerasakno ampar nggawe nguasakno iki nggo ngerasakno Reulti sing paling-peringatan nganggo kuwi s2S-SLS', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Babu kuma, tsarin da aka saka transformin style formal, yana da ƙaranci mafi ƙaranci daga shirin fassarar. Kayya, muna ganin cewa misãlan da ba'a rasmi ba da rasmi ba za'a sami guda, abin da ke rarraba daga aikin fassarar, inda harshen biyu ke da wasu salofa da grammar. Ga wannan takardan, munã gabatar da wata hanyarwa na haɗi sautin da aka yi Shara da Filinaiki (S2S-SLS), wa transfer sali mai rasmi, inda Muke goyyar da hasara biyu masu lissafa kuma Mu karɓi tare da shirin haɗi wa transfer da kodi farat ɗaya. Mataimakin jarrabãwa na nuna S2S-SLS (da ko RNN ko Transformer masu tsari) na samu'a gabatar da salon cikin kewayi dabam-dabam, hususan idan mun da data masu ƙaranci.", 'sk': 'Konvencionalni pristopi za prenos formalnosti si izposojajo modele iz nevronskega strojnega prevajanja, ki običajno zahtevajo ogromne vzporedne podatke za usposabljanje. Vendar je nabor podatkov za prenos sloga formalnosti precej manjši od prevajalskih korpusov. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da si neformalni in formalni stavki zelo podobni, kar se razlikuje od prevajalske naloge, kjer imata dva jezika različne besednike in slovnice. V prispevku predstavljamo nov pristop, Sequence-to-Sequence with Shared Latent Space (S2S-SLS), za prenos formalnosti sloga, kjer predlagamo dve pomožni izgubi in sprejmemo skupno usposabljanje dvosmernega prenosa in samokodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da S2S-SLS (z arhitekturo RNN ali transformatorjev) dosledno presega osnovne črte v različnih nastavitvah, zlasti če imamo omejene podatke.', 'he': 'גישות מסורתיות להעברת סגנון רשמיות לוויות דוגמנים מתרגום מכונות עצביות, אשר בדרך כלל דורש נתונים מקבילים מסיביים לאימונים. However, the dataset for formality style transfer is considerably smaller than translation corpora.  בנוסף, אנו שומרים על המשפטים הרשמיים והרשמיים דומים קרוב אחד לשני, שהוא שונה משימה התרגום שבו לשתי שפות יש מילים שונים וגרמניות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים גישה חדשה, רצף-אל-רצף עם חלל מאוחר משותף (S2S-SLS), עבור העברה בסגנון רשמי, שבו אנו מציעים שתי אבדות עזריות ואמצעים אימון משותף של העברה ביכיוונית וקוד אוטומטי. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שS2S-SLS (עם ארכיטקטורות RNN או Transformer) עולה על קווי בסיס באופן קבוע במוסדות שונים, במיוחד כאשר יש לנו נתונים מוגבלים.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཐུན་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གནང་བ་ཡིན་པ། ཡིན་ནའང་། formal style སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་གནས་སྡུད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་འཛུགས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བ་ལས་ཆུང་ཉུང་བའི་ཡི འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྐང་ཆ་གཉིས་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་རིས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་རྣམས་མཐོང་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྡུར་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུ་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དང་། རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་པའི་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་བར་སྟོང(S2S-SLS)དང་། Experimental results show that S2S-SLS (with either RNN or Transformer architectures) consistently outperforms baselines in various settings, especially when we have limited data.'}
{'en': 'Keep it Consistent : Topic-Aware Storytelling from an Image Stream via Iterative Multi-agent Communication', 'ar': 'الحفاظ على الاتساق: سرد القصص على علم بالموضوع من تدفق الصور عبر الاتصال التكراري متعدد الوكلاء', 'es': 'Mantenga la coherencia: narración de historias basada en temas a partir de una transmisión de imágenes a través de la comunicación iterativa con varios agentes', 'pt': 'Mantenha-o consistente: narrativa consciente do tópico a partir de um fluxo de imagem por meio de comunicação multiagente iterativa', 'fr': "Assurer la cohérence\xa0: Storytelling sensible au sujet à partir d'un flux d'images via une communication itérative multi-agents", 'ja': '一貫性を保つ：反復マルチエージェントコミュニケーションを介した画像ストリームからのトピック意識のストーリーテリング', 'zh': '持一致性:迭代多摄书从图像流述主题感知故事', 'hi': 'इसे सुसंगत रखें: पुनरावर्ती बहु-एजेंट संचार के माध्यम से एक छवि स्ट्रीम से विषय-जागरूक कहानी कहने', 'ru': 'Поддерживайте его согласованность: тематически осведомленный рассказ из потока изображений через итеративную многоагентную коммуникацию', 'ga': 'Coinnigh sé Comhsheasmhach: Scéalaíocht Aithnidiúil ó Shruth Íomhá trí Chumarsáid Ilghníomhaire Atrialach', 'ka': 'შეუძლებელია: გამოსახულების სტრიმიდან გამოსახულებული მრავალ- ადვნენტის კომუნიკაციის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Tartsa konzisztens: Téma-tudatos történetmesélés egy képfolyamból az iteratív többügynöki kommunikáción keresztül', 'el': 'Διατηρήστε το συνεπές: Θεματική αφήγηση ιστοριών από μια ροή εικόνας μέσω επαναλαμβανόμενης επικοινωνίας πολλαπλών πρακτόρων', 'it': 'Mantienilo coerente: Storytelling consapevole degli argomenti da un flusso di immagini tramite comunicazione iterativa multi-agente', 'kk': 'Тұрақты сақтау: Кескінді көпagent коммуникациясы арқылы кескіндердің көпшілігінен тақырыпты түзету журналы', 'lt': 'Laikyti jį nuoseklų: nuotraukų srovės istorijos, kuriose kalbama apie temas, skleidžiamos per kartotinį daugiaagentinį komunikatą', 'mk': 'Задржи го конзистентно: Разговарање на приказни свесни за темата од тек на слики преку итеративна мултиагентска комуникација', 'ms': 'Kekalkannya Konsistent: Ceritaan Awas-Topik dari Aliran Imej melalui Komunikasi Berbanyak-Ejen Iteratif', 'mn': 'Үүнийг зөвхөн хадгалах: Сургуулийн урсгалын зурагт сэргээгдсэн түүх', 'ml': 'അതിനെ സൂക്ഷിച്ചുവെക്കുക: ഇറ്റേറ്ററിവ് പല-ഏജന്\u200dറ് കമ്മിക്കോണിങ്ങിനുമുഖാനുപയോഗിച്ചു', 'mt': 'Żommha Konsistenti: Storytelling Aware-Topic minn Image Stream permezz ta’ Komunikazzjoni b’Multiaġenti Iterattivi', 'no': 'Hald den konsistent: Storytelling av emne-vekk frå eit biletstrøm via gjentavne multiagent-kommunikasjon', 'pl': 'Utrzymuj spójność: Opowiadanie tematów z strumienia obrazów poprzez iteracyjną komunikację wielu agentów', 'ro': 'Păstrați-o consecventă: povestiri conștiente de subiecte dintr-un flux de imagine prin intermediul comunicării iterative multi-agenți', 'sr': 'Držite ga konsistentno: prièa o temama otkrivenoj priči iz struje slika putem Iterativne multiagente komunikacije', 'si': 'පින්තූර ස්ට්\u200dරීම් වලින් පින්තූර සම්බන්ධ විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානයෙන් පින්තූර සංවිධානය කරන්න', 'so': 'Ku hayso: Topic-aware History from an Image Stream via Iterative Multi-agent Communication', 'ta': 'அதை வைத்திருக்கவும்: பிம்பத்தின் தெருவிலிருந்து தலைப்பு அறிவிப்பு கதையை தேவைப்படுத்து', 'sv': 'Håll det konsekvent: Ämnesmedvetna berättelser från en bildström via iterativ fleragentskommunikation', 'ur': 'اسے پاکیزہ رکھو: ایک تصویر سیڑھی سے ٹیٹریٹی Multi-Agent Communication کے ذریعے موضوع-Aware Storytelling', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giữ nó liên tục: Ghi-nhận lời nhắc từ luồng ảnh thông qua liên lạc đa nhân tạo tạo', 'bg': 'Поддържайте го последователно: Разказване на истории по темата от поток изображения чрез итеративна мултиагентна комуникация', 'da': 'Hold det konsistent: Emnebevidst historiefortælling fra en billedstrøm via iterativ multi-agent kommunikation', 'nl': 'Consistent houden: Topic-aware Storytelling vanuit een Image Stream via Iteratieve Multi-Agent Communicatie', 'hr': 'Držite ga konsistentno: priče o otkrivanju teme iz struje slike putem Iterativne multiagentne komunikacije', 'de': 'Konsistent halten: Themenbewusstes Storytelling aus einem Bildstream über iterative Multi-Agenten-Kommunikation', 'id': 'Tetap konsisten: Ceritaan Awas-Topik dari Aliran Gambar melalui Komunikasi Multi-Agen Iteratif', 'fa': 'حفظش کنترل: داستان\u200cهای موضوع آگاهی از یک رودخانه تصویر از طریق ارتباط متعدد ماموران تکرار', 'ko': '일치성 유지: 이미지 흐름에서 테마 감지를 통해 다중 프록시 통신을 통해 이야기를 한다', 'sw': 'Zifuatilie: Simulizi za mada inayofahamika kutoka Mtaa wa Picha kupitia Mawasiliano ya Umoja wa Taifa', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar: Resim Streamdan Mazmunlar Gaýşartma', 'af': "Hou dit konsistent: Onderwerp- weg storytelling van 'n Beeldstroom deur Iteratief Multi agent Kommunikasie", 'am': 'የTopic-aware Storytelling from an Image Stream via Iterative Multi-Agent Communication', 'sq': 'Mbaje në konsistencë: Tregimi i njohur me temë nga një rrjedhë imazhi nëpërmjet komunikimit Iterativ Multi-Agent', 'hy': 'Պահեք այն համապատասխան. Տեմային պատմություններ պատմելը պատկերի հոսանքի միջոցով բազմագործականների հաղորդակցման միջոցով', 'az': 'Görüntü Stream ından Təşkil Multi-Agent Kommunikasyonu vasitəsilə Görüntü-Aware Hikayələri', 'ca': "Mantenir-ho coherent: narració conscient del tema d'un flux d'imatge a través de la comunicació multi-agent iterativa", 'cs': 'Udržujte jej konzistentní: Tématické vyprávění příběhů z obrazového streamu prostřednictvím Iterativní komunikace s více agenty', 'bn': 'এটি সংরক্ষিত রাখুন: একটি ছবির স্ট্রীম থেকে বিষয়বস্তু জানানো গল্প, ইটারেটিভ মাল্টিজেন্ট যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমে', 'bs': 'Držite ga konsistentno: priče o temama otkrivanju iz struje slika putem Iterativne multiagentne komunikacije', 'fi': 'Pidä se johdonmukaisena: Aihetietoinen tarinankerronta kuvavirrasta Iteratiivisen Multi-Agent -viestinnän kautta', 'et': 'Hoidke see järjekindlaks: teemateadlik lugude jutustamine pildivoogist iteratiivse mitmeagendi kommunikatsiooni kaudu', 'jv': 'Ngawe Rusak-Awake Rusak-Keterangan Gambar Mulai-ajan Komunikasi', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Naj bo dosledno: pripovedovanje zgodb o temah iz toka slike prek iterativne komunikacije z več agenti', 'he': 'שמור אותו תואם: סיפור מודע לנושא מתוך זרם תמונות באמצעות תקשורת סוכנים רבים', 'bo': 'འདི་ལ་འཛུགས་པ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་བརྙན་རིས་ཁྲོད་ནས་གནད་དོན་བློ་གཏོང་སྣང་མེད།'}
{'en': 'Visual storytelling aims to generate a narrative paragraph from a sequence of images automatically. Existing approaches construct text description independently for each image and roughly concatenate them as a story, which leads to the problem of generating semantically incoherent content. In this paper, we propose a new way for visual storytelling by introducing a topic description task to detect the global semantic context of an image stream. A story is then constructed with the guidance of the topic description. In order to combine the two generation tasks, we propose a multi-agent communication framework that regards the topic description generator and the story generator as two agents and learn them simultaneously via iterative updating mechanism. We validate our approach on VIST dataset, where quantitative results, ablations, and human evaluation demonstrate our method’s good ability in generating stories with higher quality compared to state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'يهدف سرد القصص المرئي إلى إنشاء فقرة سردية من سلسلة من الصور تلقائيًا. تعمل المناهج الحالية على إنشاء وصف نصي بشكل مستقل لكل صورة وربطها تقريبًا كقصة ، مما يؤدي إلى مشكلة إنشاء محتوى غير متماسك لغويًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لسرد القصص المرئية من خلال تقديم مهمة وصف الموضوع لاكتشاف السياق الدلالي العالمي لتدفق الصورة. ثم يتم إنشاء القصة بتوجيه من وصف الموضوع. من أجل الجمع بين مهام الجيلين ، نقترح إطار عمل اتصال متعدد الوكلاء يعتبر منشئ وصف الموضوع ومولد القصة عاملين ونتعلمهما في وقت واحد من خلال آلية التحديث التكراري. نحن نتحقق من صحة نهجنا في مجموعة بيانات VIST ، حيث تُظهر النتائج الكمية ، والاغتسالات ، والتقييم البشري قدرة طريقتنا الجيدة في إنشاء قصص بجودة أعلى مقارنة بأحدث الأساليب.', 'pt': 'A narrativa visual visa gerar um parágrafo narrativo a partir de uma sequência de imagens automaticamente. As abordagens existentes constroem a descrição do texto de forma independente para cada imagem e as concatenam grosseiramente como uma história, o que leva ao problema de gerar conteúdo semanticamente incoerente. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova maneira de contar histórias visuais, introduzindo uma tarefa de descrição de tópicos para detectar o contexto semântico global de um fluxo de imagens. Uma história é então construída com a orientação da descrição do tópico. Para combinar as duas tarefas de geração, propomos uma estrutura de comunicação multiagente que considera o gerador de descrição de tópicos e o gerador de histórias como dois agentes e os aprende simultaneamente por meio de um mecanismo de atualização iterativa. Validamos nossa abordagem no conjunto de dados VIST, onde resultados quantitativos, ablações e avaliação humana demonstram a boa capacidade do nosso método em gerar histórias com maior qualidade em comparação com métodos de última geração.', 'es': 'La narración visual tiene como objetivo generar automáticamente un párrafo narrativo a partir de una secuencia de imágenes. Los enfoques existentes construyen la descripción del texto de forma independiente para cada imagen y las concatenan aproximadamente como una historia, lo que lleva al problema de generar contenido semánticamente incoherente. En este artículo, proponemos una nueva forma de narración visual mediante la introducción de una tarea de descripción del tema para detectar el contexto semántico global de una secuencia de imágenes. Luego se construye una historia con la guía de la descripción del tema. Para combinar las tareas de dos generaciones, proponemos un marco de comunicación multiagente que considera al generador de descripción de temas y al generador de historias como dos agentes y los aprende simultáneamente a través de un mecanismo de actualización iterativa. Validamos nuestro enfoque en el conjunto de datos VIST, donde los resultados cuantitativos, las ablaciones y la evaluación humana demuestran la buena capacidad de nuestro método para generar historias de mayor calidad en comparación con los métodos más avanzados.', 'fr': "La narration visuelle vise à générer automatiquement un paragraphe narratif à partir d'une séquence d'images. Les approches existantes construisent une description textuelle indépendamment pour chaque image et les concaténent grossièrement en une histoire, ce qui pose le problème de la génération de contenu sémantiquement incohérent. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode de narration visuelle en introduisant une tâche de description de sujet pour détecter le contexte sémantique global d'un flux d'images. Une histoire est ensuite construite en s'appuyant sur la description du sujet. Afin de combiner les deux tâches de génération, nous proposons un cadre de communication multi-agents qui considère le générateur de description de sujet et le générateur d'histoires comme deux agents et les apprend simultanément via un mécanisme de mise à jour itératif. Nous validons notre approche sur l'ensemble de données VIST, où les résultats quantitatifs, les ablations et l'évaluation humaine démontrent la bonne capacité de notre méthode à générer des histoires de meilleure qualité par rapport aux méthodes de pointe.", 'ja': '視覚的ストーリーテリングは、一連の画像から物語の段落を自動的に生成することを目的としている。既存のアプローチは、画像ごとに独立してテキスト記述を構築し、ストーリーとして大まかに連結するため、意味的に不整合なコンテンツを生成する問題につながる。本稿では、画像ストリームのグローバルな意味論的文脈を検出するためのトピック記述タスクを導入することにより、視覚的ストーリーテリングの新しい方法を提案する。次に、トピックの説明のガイダンスを用いてストーリーが構築されます。2つの生成タスクを組み合わせるために、トピック記述ジェネレータとストーリージェネレータを2つのエージェントと見なし、反復更新機構を介して同時に学習するマルチエージェントコミュニケーションフレームワークを提案する。私たちは、定量的な結果、アブレーション、および人間の評価が、最先端の方法と比較して、より高品質なストーリーを生成する当社の方法の優れた能力を示しているVISTデータセットのアプローチを検証します。', 'zh': '视觉叙事旨在一系图像中自生叙事段落。 今图画独立,粗接为一,此生语义上不连贯之问也。 于本文中,新视觉叙事之法,引入主题,以检图流之语义上下文。 然后在主题述述的指导下构建一个故事。 合二代之务,建一智体通信框架,述生成器事生成器为两摄,迭代新制而学之。 VIST数集上验吾法,其中定量,消融与人工评证最先进之法,吾法于生成更高质量之事有良能。', 'ru': 'Визуальное повествование направлено на автоматическое создание повествовательного абзаца из последовательности изображений. Существующие подходы строят текстовое описание самостоятельно для каждого изображения и грубо контактируют их как сюжет, что приводит к проблеме генерации семантически некогерентного контента. В этой статье мы предлагаем новый способ визуального повествования, вводя задачу описания темы для обнаружения глобального семантического контекста потока изображений. Затем создается история под руководством описания темы. Для того, чтобы объединить две задачи генерации, мы предлагаем мульти-агентную коммуникационную структуру, которая рассматривает генератор описания темы и генератор сюжета как двух агентов и изучает их одновременно с помощью итеративного механизма обновления. Мы подтверждаем наш подход к набору данных VIST, где количественные результаты, абляции и оценка человека демонстрируют хорошую способность нашего метода генерировать истории с более высоким качеством по сравнению с современными методами.', 'hi': 'दृश्य कहानी कहने का उद्देश्य स्वचालित रूप से छवियों के अनुक्रम से एक कथा पैराग्राफ उत्पन्न करना है। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण प्रत्येक छवि के लिए स्वतंत्र रूप से पाठ विवरण का निर्माण करते हैं और मोटे तौर पर उन्हें एक कहानी के रूप में संयोजित करते हैं, जो शब्दार्थ असंगत सामग्री उत्पन्न करने की समस्या की ओर जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक छवि स्ट्रीम के वैश्विक शब्दार्थ संदर्भ का पता लगाने के लिए एक विषय विवरण कार्य शुरू करके दृश्य कहानी कहने के लिए एक नया तरीका प्रस्तावित करते हैं। एक कहानी तो विषय विवरण के मार्गदर्शन के साथ बनाया जाता है. दो पीढ़ी के कार्यों को संयोजित करने के लिए, हम एक बहु-एजेंट संचार ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो विषय विवरण जनरेटर और कहानी जनरेटर को दो एजेंटों के रूप में मानता है और उन्हें पुनरावर्ती अद्यतन तंत्र के माध्यम से एक साथ सीखता है। हम वीआईएसटी डेटासेट पर अपने दृष्टिकोण को मान्य करते हैं, जहां मात्रात्मक परिणाम, एब्लेशन और मानव मूल्यांकन अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में उच्च गुणवत्ता वाली कहानियों को उत्पन्न करने में हमारी विधि की अच्छी क्षमता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ga': "Tá sé mar aidhm ag scéalaíocht amhairc mír insinte a ghiniúint as seicheamh íomhánna go huathoibríoch. Cruthaíonn cur chuige reatha cur síos ar an téacs go neamhspleách ar gach íomhá agus comhcheanglaíonn siad go garbh iad mar scéal, rud a fhágann go mbíonn fadhb ann maidir le hinneachar séimeantach neamhchomhleanúnach a ghiniúint. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid bealach nua don scéalaíocht amhairc trí thasc cur síos ar thopaic a thabhairt isteach chun comhthéacs séimeantach domhanda sruth íomhá a bhrath. Tógtar scéal ansin faoi threoir chur síos ar an topaic. D'fhonn an dá thasc a chur le chéile, molaimid creat cumarsáide ilghníomhairí a mheasfaidh an gineadóir cur síos ar an ábhar agus an gineadóir scéalta mar dhá ghníomhairí agus foghlaimímid iad ag an am céanna trí mheicníocht nuashonraithe atriallach. Déanaimid ár gcur chuige maidir le tacar sonraí VIST a bhailíochtú, áit a léiríonn torthaí cainníochtúla, díbleachtaí, agus meastóireacht dhaonna cumas maith ár modha chun scéalta le caighdeán níos airde a ghiniúint i gcomparáid le modhanna úrscothacha.", 'ka': 'ვიზუალური ისტორიების საზოგადომის მიხედვით ავტომატურად გამოსახულების წერტილის პარაფიკატის შექმნა. ყველა გამოსახულებისთვის ტექსტის გამოსახულების შესახებ კონსტრუქტურაციას და ყველა გამოსახულებისთვის ისტორიის შესახებ, რომელიც გამოიყენება სიმენტიკურად არაფერი შესახებ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ ვიზუალური ისტორიების ახალი გზით გადავიტანოთ ტემების გამოსახულების რაოდენობა, რომელიც გამოსახულების სიმენტიკური კონტექსტის განსახულება. ისტორია შემდეგ იქნება საქმენტის გამოსახულებით. ჩვენ მრავალ ადვნენტის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაცია, რომელიც თემის განახლების генენერатоრი და ის ჩვენ VIST მონაცემების კონტაქტიური წარმოდგენები, წარმოდგენები და ადამიანის განსაზღვრების შესაძლებლობა ჩვენი მეთოდის წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობას გავიქმნოთ ისტორიების უფრო მეთოდის გა', 'el': 'Η οπτική αφήγηση έχει ως στόχο να δημιουργήσει μια αφηγηματική παράγραφο από μια ακολουθία εικόνων αυτόματα. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις κατασκευάζουν την περιγραφή κειμένου ανεξάρτητα για κάθε εικόνα και τις ενώνουν σε γενικές γραμμές ως ιστορία, γεγονός που οδηγεί στο πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας σημασιολογικά ασυνάρτητου περιεχομένου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν νέο τρόπο για την οπτική αφήγηση ιστοριών εισάγοντας μια εργασία περιγραφής θέματος για την ανίχνευση του παγκόσμιου σημασιολογικού πλαισίου μιας ροής εικόνας. Στη συνέχεια δημιουργείται μια ιστορία με την καθοδήγηση της περιγραφής του θέματος. Προκειμένου να συνδυαστούν οι εργασίες δύο γενεών, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο επικοινωνίας πολλαπλών πρακτόρων που θεωρεί τη γεννήτρια περιγραφής θέματος και τη γεννήτρια ιστοριών ως δύο πράκτορες και τους μαθαίνει ταυτόχρονα μέσω επαναληπτικού μηχανισμού ενημέρωσης. Επιβεβαιώνουμε την προσέγγισή μας στο σύνολο δεδομένων όπου τα ποσοτικά αποτελέσματα, οι απολύσεις και η ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση αποδεικνύουν την καλή ικανότητα της μεθόδου μας να παράγει ιστορίες υψηλότερης ποιότητας σε σύγκριση με τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους.', 'hu': 'A vizuális történetmesélés célja, hogy egy narratív bekezdést generáljon egy képsorozatból automatikusan. A meglévő megközelítések minden kép számára egymástól függetlenül szerkesztik a szövegleírást, és nagyjából történetként összekapcsolják őket, ami a szemantikailag inkoherens tartalom létrehozásának problémájához vezet. Ebben a tanulmányban a vizuális történetmesélés új módját javasoljuk egy témavezető feladat bevezetésével, amely egy képfolyam globális szemantikai kontextusának felismerésére szolgál. Ezután egy történetet építenek fel a téma leírásának útmutatásával. A két generációs feladat kombinálása érdekében egy több ügynökre kiterjedő kommunikációs keretrendszert javasolunk, amely a témavezető generátort és a történet generátort két ügynökként tekinti, és ezeket iteratív frissítési mechanizmuson keresztül egyidejűleg tanulja meg. Megközelítésünket a VIST adatkészleten validáljuk, ahol a mennyiségi eredmények, ablációk és emberi értékelések bizonyítják, hogy módszerünk jó képessége a legkorszerűbb módszerekhez képest jobb minőségű történetek készítésében.', 'it': "Lo storytelling visivo mira a generare automaticamente un paragrafo narrativo da una sequenza di immagini. Gli approcci esistenti costruiscono la descrizione del testo indipendentemente per ogni immagine e li concatenano approssimativamente come una storia, il che porta al problema di generare contenuti semanticamente incoerenti. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo modo di narrazione visiva introducendo un compito di descrizione dell'argomento per rilevare il contesto semantico globale di un flusso di immagini. Una storia viene poi costruita con la guida della descrizione dell'argomento. Al fine di combinare le due attività di generazione, proponiamo un framework di comunicazione multi-agente che considera il generatore di descrizione dell'argomento e il generatore di storia come due agenti e li apprende simultaneamente tramite meccanismo di aggiornamento iterativo. Convalidiamo il nostro approccio sul set di dati VIST, dove i risultati quantitativi, le ablazioni e la valutazione umana dimostrano la buona capacità del nostro metodo di generare storie di qualità superiore rispetto ai metodi più avanzati.", 'lt': "Vaizdo istorijos tikslas – automatiškai sukurti istorijos dalį iš vaizdų sekos. Esami metodai atskirai sudaro teksto aprašymą kiekvienam vaizdui ir apytiksliai sutrumpina juos kaip istoriją, dėl kurios kyla semantiškai nesuderinamo turinio sukūrimo problem a. In this paper, we propose a new way for visual storytelling by introducing a topic description task to detect the global semantic context of an image stream.  Tada rengiama istorija vadovaujantis temos aprašymu. Siekiant sujungti dviejų kartų užduotis, siūlome daugiaagentinę komunikacijos sistemą, kurioje temų aprašymo generatorius ir istorijų generatorius būtų laikomi dviem agentais ir jie būtų išmokti vienu metu pasitelkiant pakartotinį atnaujinimo mechanizmą. We validate our approach on VIST dataset, where quantitative results, ablations, and human evaluation demonstrate our method's good ability in generating stories with higher quality compared to state-of-the-art methods.", 'kk': 'Көрінетін журналдар тізімі автоматты түрде кескіндердің тізімінен түсінікті бөлшекті құру мақсаты. Бар жағдайда мәтін сипаттамасын әрбір кескінде тәуелсіз құру және оларды оқиға ретінде сәйкес келтіру, бұл semantically incoherent мазмұнын құру мәселесіне шейіп береді. Бұл қағазда, көрінетін журналды түсініп, тақырыпты сипаттамасын келтіріп, кескіндердің жүйелік семантикалық контексті анықтау үшін жаңа жолын таңдаймыз. Содан кейін тақырыпты сипаттамасының көмегімен құрылады. Екі құрылған тапсырмаларды біріктіру үшін, біз нақыштың сипаттамасын жасау және оқиғаның генераторын екі агент ретінде көрсету үшін көп агенттің коммуникациялық қоршауын ұсынып, оларды бірден қайталап жаңарту Біз VIST деректер қорларының тәсілімізді тексереміз, қайда санативтік нәтижелері, көмектесулері және адамдардың оқиғасы әдістеріміздің оқиғаларын жасау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Ceritaan visual bermaksud menghasilkan paragraf cerita dari urutan imej secara automatik. pendekatan yang wujud membina keterangan teks secara independen untuk setiap imej dan secara kira-kira menyatukannya sebagai cerita, yang membawa kepada masalah menghasilkan kandungan yang tidak konsisten secara semantik. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan cara baru untuk menceritakan cerita visual dengan memperkenalkan tugas penerangan topik untuk mengesan konteks semantik global strim imej. Sebuah cerita kemudian dibina dengan petunjuk keterangan topik. Untuk menggabungkan dua generasi tugas, kami cadangan komunikasi multi-ejen yang menganggap generator keterangan topik dan generator cerita sebagai dua ejen dan belajar mereka secara bersamaan melalui mekanisme kemaskini iteratif. Kami sahkan pendekatan kami pada set data VIST, di mana hasil kuantitatif, ablasi, dan penilaian manusia menunjukkan kemampuan baik kaedah kami dalam menghasilkan cerita dengan kualiti yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan kaedah-kaedah terbaik.', 'mk': 'Визуелното раскажување на приказни има за цел да генерира раскажувачки параграф од секвенца на слики автоматски. Постојаните пристапи конструираат текст опис независно за секоја слика и приближно ги концентрираат како приказна, што води до проблемот со генерирање семантички несогледна содржина. Во овој весник, предложуваме нов начин за визуелно раскажување приказни со воведување задача за опис на темата за детектирање на глобалниот семантичен контекст на сличниот поток. Приказна е потоа изградена со упатство на описот на темата. Со цел да ги комбинираме задачите на двете генерации, предложуваме мултиагентска комуникациска рамка која го смета генераторот на опис на темата и генераторот на приказни за два агенти и ги научи истовремено преку итеративен механизам на ажурирање. Ние го валидираме нашиот пристап кон сетот на податоци на ВИСТ, каде квантитивните резултати, аблациите и човечката проценка ја покажуваат добрата способност на нашиот метод во генерирањето приказни со повисок квалитет во споредба со најсовремените методи.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ചിത്രങ്ങളുടെ പ്രാവശ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു കഥാര്\u200dത്ഥിതി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനായി കാണുന്ന കഥകള്\u200d കഥാര്\u200dത നിലവിലുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് ഓരോ ചിത്രത്തിനും സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യത്തിലായി പദാവലിയുടെ വിവരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും, അതിനെ കഥാര്\u200dത്ഥമായ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ രീതിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു ചിത്ര സ്ട്രീമിന്റെ ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് സെക്സ്റ്റെയിന പിന്നീട് വിവരണത്തിന്റെ വഴികാട്ടിയാല്\u200d ഒരു കഥ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. രണ്ടു തലമുറകളുടെ ജോലികളെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പല-ഏജന്\u200dറ് കമ്മിക്കോണിങ്കേഷന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് വിവരണങ് വിഎസ്റ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയെ നാം വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ വിവിധ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d, പ്രാപ്തികങ്ങള്\u200d, മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസവും നമ്മു', 'mt': 'It-tgħid ta’ storji viżwali għandu l-għan li jiġġenera paragrafu narrattiv minn sekwenza ta’ immaġni awtomatikament. L-approċċi eżistenti jibnu deskrizzjoni tat-test b’mod indipendenti għal kull immaġni u jqassmuhom bħala storja, li twassal għall-problem a tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ kontenut semantikament inkoerenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mod ġdid għat-tgħid ta’ storji viżwali billi nintroduċu kompitu ta’ deskrizzjoni ta’ suġġett biex jinstab il-kuntest semantiku globali ta’ fluss ta’ immaġni. Imbagħad tinbena storja bil-gwida tad-deskrizzjoni tas-suġġett. Sabiex nikkombinaw il-kompiti taż-żewġ ġenerazzjonijiet, nipproponu qafas ta’ komunikazzjoni b’diversi a ġenti li jirrigwarda l-ġeneratur tad-deskrizzjoni tas-suġġett u l-ġeneratur tal-istoriji bħala żewġ aġenti u jitgħallmuhom simultanjament permezz ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ aġġornament iterattiv. Aħna jivvalidaw l-approċċ tagħna dwar is-sett tad-dejta VIST, fejn ir-riżultati kwantitattivi, l-ablazzjonijiet, u l-evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem juru l-kapaċità tajba tal-metodu tagħna fil-ġenerazzjoni ta’ storji b’kwalità ogħla meta mqabbla mal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн түүх хэлэх нь зураг дарааллаас автоматаар түүхийг бий болгох зорилго юм. Existing approaches construct text description independently for each image and roughly concatenate them as a story. This leads to a problem of generating semantically incoherent content. Энэ цаасан дээр бид зураг урсгалын дэлхийн семантик байдлыг олж мэдэх тулд сэдвийн тайлбарлалтын даалгаварыг шинэ арга зааж өгдөг. Тэгээд нэг түүх сэдвийн тайлбарлалтын загвартай байгуулагддаг. Хоёр үеийн даалгаварыг нийлүүлэхийн тулд бид сэдвийн тодорхойлогч болон түүхийн генератор хоёр агент гэж үздэг олон агентын харилцааны системийг суралцаж, тэднийг дахин шинэчлэх механизм аргаар суралцаж байна. Бид VIST өгөгдлийн сангийн тухай ойлголтыг шалгаж, хэмжээст үр дүнг, хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд бидний арга замыг илүү сайн чадвартай түүхийг бий болгодог.', 'no': 'Visuelle historieringsmål er å laga eit historisk avsnitt frå ei rekkjefølgje av bilete automatisk. Det eksisterande tilnærminga er å konstruere tekstskildring uavhengig for kvar bilete og omtrent samsvara dei som historie, som fører til problemet med å laga semantisk inkoherende innhald. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny måte for å oppretta visingshistoriar ved å introdusera eit emneformasjonsoppgåve for å oppdaga den globale semantiske konteksten av eit biletstrøm. Ein historie er derfor konstruert med hjelpelinjene til emneseksten. For å kombinere dei to generasjonsoppgåva, foreslår vi eit multiagentskommunikasjonsframmeverk som gjer temaskildringsgeneren og historien som to agentar og lærer dei samtidig med gjennom oppdateringsmekanismenyen. Vi validerer tilnærminga vårt på VIST-dataset, der kvantitative resultat, aktivasjonar og menneskeevalueringa viser at metoden vårt er godt i å laga historiar med høgare kvalitet sammenlignet med kunstmetodar.', 'pl': 'Wizualne opowiadanie ma na celu automatyczne generowanie akapitu narracyjnego z sekwencji obrazów. Istniejące podejścia konstruują opis tekstowy niezależnie dla każdego obrazu i z grubsza łączą je jako opowieść, co prowadzi do problemu generowania niespójnych semantycznie treści. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy sposób opowiadania wizualnego poprzez wprowadzenie zadania opisu tematycznego w celu wykrycia globalnego kontekstu semantycznego strumienia obrazu. Opowieść jest następnie skonstruowana z wytycznymi opisu tematu. Aby połączyć zadania dwóch generacji, proponujemy wieloagentowe ramy komunikacji, które traktują generator opisu tematu i generator historii jako dwóch agentów i uczą się ich jednocześnie poprzez iteracyjny mechanizm aktualizacji. Walidujemy nasze podejście do zbioru danych VIST, w którym wyniki ilościowe, ablacje i ocena ludzka pokazują dobrą zdolność naszej metody do generowania opowieści o wyższej jakości w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi metodami.', 'ro': 'Povestea vizuală își propune să genereze automat un paragraf narativ dintr-o secvență de imagini. Abordările existente construiesc descrierea textului independent pentru fiecare imagine și le concatenează aproximativ ca o poveste, ceea ce duce la problema generarii de conținut incoerent semantic. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă modalitate de povestire vizuală prin introducerea unei sarcini de descriere a subiectului pentru a detecta contextul semantic global al unui flux de imagine. O poveste este apoi construită cu îndrumarea descrierii subiectului. Pentru a combina cele două sarcini de generație, propunem un cadru de comunicare multi-agent care privește generatorul de descriere a subiectelor și generatorul de poveste ca doi agenți și le învață simultan prin intermediul mecanismului de actualizare iterativă. Validăm abordarea noastră cu privire la setul de date VIST, unde rezultatele cantitative, ablațiile și evaluarea umană demonstrează capacitatea bună a metodei noastre de a genera povești cu o calitate superioară comparativ cu metodele de ultimă generare.', 'sr': 'Vizualna prièa ima cilj da stvori prièan paragraf iz sekvence slika automatski. Postojeći pristupi konstruiraju opis teksta neovisno za svaku sliku i skoro ih potvrđuju kao priču, što vodi do problem a stvaranja semantički neovisnog sadržaja. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi način za vizualne priče uvođenjem zadatka opisa tema kako bi otkrili globalni semantički kontekst strema slika. Prièa se onda izgradi sa uputstvom opisa teme. Da bismo kombinirali dva generacija zadataka, predložili smo multiagentni komunikacijski okvir koji smatra generatorom opisa tema i generatorom priče kao dva agent a i naučili ih istovremeno putem mehanizma za aktualizaciju. Potvrđujemo naš pristup na kompletu VIST podataka, gdje kvantitativni rezultati, aktivacije i ljudska procjena pokazuju dobru sposobnost našeg metoda u stvaranju priče sa višem kvalitetom u usporedbi sa metodama stanja umjetnosti.', 'si': 'පින්තූර ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් පින්තූර වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න අදහස් කරනවා. ඉතින් පිළිබඳ විස්තර විස්තර විස්තරයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් හැම පිළිබඳ විස්තර විස්තර කරන්න සහ පිළිබඳ කතාවක් විදිහට ඔව මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ සාමාන්තික සාමාන්තික සංවේදනය කරන්න අළුත් විදිහක් ප්\u200dරතිරූපයෙන් ප්\u200dරත කතාවක් පස්සේ විදිහට විස්තර විස්තර කිරීමක් තියෙනවා. පිළිපති දෙකක් වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි ගොඩක් අයිතික සම්බන්ධ සංවේදනයක් සංවේදනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ කතාව සංවේදකය දෙකක් විදිහට අපි VIST දත්ත සූදානයේ අපේ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, කොහොමද ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්, සහ මිනිස්සු විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචා', 'so': 'Hadalka muuqashada aragtida waxaa loogu talagalay in loo sameeyo qeyb siman oo sawiro kala duwan. Waxaa soo dhowaadaa in ay sawir kasta u dhisaan tilmaamo qoraal ah oo si xor ah looga dhigo, taasoo sababto dhibaatada ka soo bixinta waxyaabaha aan la soo saarin. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa jid cusub oo aad sheekaynta aragga ku sameyneyso sawir ku saabsan, si a an u caddeyno dabiicadda semantic hoostooda sawir. Markaas waxaa la dhisay sheeko la hago tilmaamaha mada. Si aan u qabsato shaqooyinka labada qarni, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa firaaqad wargelinta oo kala duduwan, kaas oo ku saabsan maamulka tilmaamaha iyo dhaqaalaha sheekadda sida labo midiidin ah, islamarkaasna waxan si siman uga baranaynaa mekaniisa cusboonaysiinta. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa hababka ku saabsan VIST-ka, kaas oo ay ka muuqataa resultiyada, qalabka iyo qiimeynta dadku ay awooddayada wanaagsan u leedahay abuuridda sheekooyinka oo ay ka muuqato takhasuska sare oo la barbarbarto hababka farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Visual storytelling syftar till att generera ett berättande stycke från en sekvens av bilder automatiskt. Befintliga tillvägagångssätt konstruerar textbeskrivningar självständigt för varje bild och sammanfogar dem ungefär som en berättelse, vilket leder till problemet med att generera semantiskt inkonsekvent innehåll. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt sätt för visuellt berättande genom att introducera en ämnesbeskrivning uppgift för att upptäcka den globala semantiska kontexten i en bildström. En berättelse konstrueras sedan med ledning av ämnesbeskrivningen. För att kombinera de två generationsuppgifterna föreslår vi ett kommunikationsramverk med flera agenter som betraktar ämnesbeskrivningsgeneratorn och berättelsegeneratorn som två agenter och lär sig dem samtidigt via iterativ uppdateringsmekanism. Vi validerar vårt tillvägagångssätt på VIST dataset, där kvantitativa resultat, ablationer och mänsklig utvärdering visar vår metods goda förmåga att generera berättelser med högre kvalitet jämfört med state-of-the-art metoder.', 'ta': 'பார்வையான கதை சொல்லுதல் தானாகவே உருவாக்கும் பிம்பங்களின் தொடர்ச்சியிலிருந்து ஒரு செய்தியின் பதிவை  தற்போதைய நெருங்குகள் ஒவ்வொரு பிம்பத்திற்கும் தனித்தனாக உரை விவரிப்பை உருவாக்கி அவற்றை ஒரு கதையாக ஒருங்கிணைக்கும், அது அரிமையாக உள் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய வழியை பார்வை கதை சொல்லும் மூலம் ஒரு தலைப்பு விவரிப்பு பணியை முதலில் தேர்ந்தெடுத்து பிம்பத்த பிறகு ஒரு கதை தலைப்பு விவரங்களின் வழிகாட்டியால் உருவாக்கப்பட்டது. In order to combine the two generation tasks, we propose a multi-agent communication framework that regards the topic description generator and the story generator as two agents and learn them simultaneously via iterative updating mechanism.  VIST தரவுத்தளத்தில் நாம் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை சரிபார்க்கிறோம். அதில் அளவு முடிவுகள், உறுப்புகள், மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகள் எங்கள் முறையின் செயல்பாடுகளை மேல', 'ur': 'تصاویروں کی سطح سے ایک داستانی پاراگراف پیدا کرنے کا ارادہ کرتا ہے. Existing approaches construct text description independently for each image and roughly concatenate them as a story, which leads to the problem of generating semantically incoherent content. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نو طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ ایک تصویر سیمنٹی سیمنٹی سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک سینٹریک کا معلوم کریں۔ پھر ایک کہانی بنائی جاتی ہے اس موضوع کی ہدایت کے ساتھ۔ دو نسل کے کاموں کو ترکیب کرنے کے لئے ہم ایک متعدد اژنٹ کی ترکیب فرموک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ٹوپ کی توصیف جینراٹر اور داستان جینراٹر کو دو اژنٹ کے طور پر دیکھتا ہے اور ان کو ایک دوسرے طریقے سے سیکھتے ہیں۔ ہم VIST ڈاٹ سٹ پر اپنے طریقے کی تصدیق کرتے ہیں، جہاں مقدار نتیجے، آبلاتیوں اور انسان کی ارزش کے مطابق ہمارے طریقے کی اچھی طاقت کو دکھاتے ہیں، اور اس طریقے سے زیادہ کیفیت کے ساتھ کہانیاں پیدا کرنے کی مقابلہ میں', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu qogʻozda, biz rasm tarkibini aniqlash uchun mavzu taʼrifi vazifasini aniqlash uchun yangi yo'l rivojlanamiz. Keyin bu ma'lumot tizimi bilan yaratiladi. Ikkita avval vazifalarni birlashtirish uchun, biz ma'lum taʼrifi generator va hikoyani ikki taʼminlovchi generator deb hisoblash uchun multi-agent aloqa freymini talab qilamiz va ularni bir xil taʼminlovchi mekanisme yordamida o'rganamiz. We validate our approach on VIST dataset, where quantitative results, ablations, and human evaluation demonstrate our method's good ability in generating stories with higher quality compared to state-of-the-art methods.", 'vi': 'Việc kể ảo ảnh nhằm tạo ra một đoạn cốt truyện từ một chuỗi ảnh tự động. Các phương pháp hiện có xây dựng mô tả văn bản độc lập cho mỗi ảnh và đại khái khẳng định chúng như một câu chuyện, dẫn đến vấn đề tạo ra nội dung thiếu liên quan. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cách mới để kể chuyện bằng cách đưa ra một nhiệm vụ mô tả về chủ đề để phát hiện ngữ pháp xã hội của một dòng ảnh. Sau đó, một câu chuyện được dựng lên với sự hướng dẫn về mô tả chủ đề. Để kết hợp hai thế hệ các công việc, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ sở liên kết đa đặc vụ, xem nhà máy mô tả chủ đề và máy phát truyện như hai đặc vụ, và học cùng nhau qua các cơ chế nâng cấp thời gian. Chúng tôi xác nhận phương pháp của chúng tôi về bộ dữ liệu thăm dò, nơi kết quả s ố lượng, bắn bỏ và đánh giá con người cho thấy phương pháp này có khả năng tạo ra câu chuyện với chất lượng cao hơn so với phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Визуалното разказване на истории има за цел автоматично генериране на разказващ абзац от поредица от изображения. Съществуващите подходи изграждат текстово описание независимо за всяко изображение и грубо ги конкатенират като история, което води до проблема с генерирането на семантично несъответстващо съдържание. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов начин за визуално разказване на истории чрез въвеждане на задача за описание на темата за откриване на глобалния семантичен контекст на поток изображения. След това се изгражда история с ръководството на описанието на темата. За да се комбинират двете генерационни задачи, предлагаме комуникационна рамка, която разглежда генератора за описание на темата и генератора на истории като два агента и ги изучава едновременно чрез итеративен механизъм за актуализиране. Ние валидираме нашия подход към набора от данни, където количествените резултати, аблациите и човешката оценка показват добрата способност на нашия метод да генерира истории с по-високо качество в сравнение с най-съвременните методи.', 'hr': 'Vizualna priča ima cilj proizvesti priču iz sekvence slika automatski. Postojeći pristupi konstruiraju opis teksta neovisno za svaku sliku i skoro ih istočavaju kao priču, što vodi do problem a stvaranja semantički neovisnog sadržaja. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi način za vizualne priče uvođenjem zadatka opisa teme kako bi otkrili globalni semantički kontekst strema slika. Priča se onda izgradi s uputstvom opisa teme. Da bismo kombinirali dva generacijska zadatka, predložili smo multiagentni komunikacijski okvir koji smatra generatorom opisa teme i generatorom priče kao dva agent a i naučili ih istovremeno putem mehanizma za aktualizaciju iterativnih aktivnosti. Potvrđujemo svoj pristup na kompletu podataka VIST, gdje kvantitativni rezultati, aktivacije i ljudska procjena pokazuju dobru sposobnost našeg metoda u stvaranju priče s višem kvalitetom u usporedbi s metodama umjetnosti.', 'da': 'Visual storytelling har til formål at generere et narrativ afsnit fra en sekvens af billeder automatisk. Eksisterende tilgange konstruerer tekstbeskrivelser uafhængigt for hvert billede og sammenkobler dem groft som en historie, hvilket fører til problemet med at generere semantisk inkonsekvent indhold. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny måde at fortælle visuel historie på ved at introducere en emnebeskrivelsesopgave til at detektere den globale semantiske kontekst i en billedstrøm. En historie er derefter konstrueret med vejledning af emnebeskrivelsen. For at kombinere de to generationsopgaver foreslår vi en multi-agent kommunikationsramme, der betragter emnebeskrivelsesgeneratoren og historiegeneratoren som to agenter og lærer dem samtidig via iterativ opdateringsmekanisme. Vi validerer vores tilgang til VIST datasæt, hvor kvantitative resultater, ablationer og menneskelig evaluering viser vores metodes gode evne til at generere historier med højere kvalitet sammenlignet med state-of-the-art metoder.', 'nl': 'Visual storytelling heeft als doel automatisch een narratieve alinea te genereren uit een reeks beelden. Bestaande benaderingen construeren tekstbeschrijving onafhankelijk voor elke afbeelding en voegen ze grofweg aan elkaar als een verhaal, wat leidt tot het probleem van het genereren van semantisch incoherente inhoud. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe manier voor visuele storytelling voor door een topic description taak te introduceren om de globale semantische context van een beeldstroom te detecteren. Vervolgens wordt een verhaal opgebouwd met de begeleiding van de topic beschrijving. Om de twee generatietaken te combineren, stellen we een multi-agent communicatie framework voor dat de topic description generator en de story generator als twee agenten beschouwt en ze tegelijkertijd leert via iteratief updatemechanisme. We valideren onze aanpak op VIST dataset, waarbij kwantitatieve resultaten, ablaties en menselijke evaluatie aantonen dat onze methode goed in staat is verhalen te genereren met een hogere kwaliteit in vergelijking met state-of-the-art methoden.', 'de': 'Visual Storytelling zielt darauf ab, aus einer Bildfolge automatisch einen narrativen Absatz zu generieren. Bestehende Ansätze konstruieren Textbeschreibung unabhängig für jedes Bild und verketten sie grob zu einer Geschichte, was zum Problem führt, semantisch inkohärente Inhalte zu generieren. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuen Weg für visuelles Storytelling vor, indem wir eine Themenbeschreibungsaufgabe einführen, um den globalen semantischen Kontext eines Bildstroms zu erkennen. Eine Geschichte wird dann unter Anleitung der Themenbeschreibung konstruiert. Um die beiden Generationsaufgaben zu kombinieren, schlagen wir ein Multi-Agent-Kommunikationsframework vor, das den Themenbeschreibungsgenerator und den Story-Generator als zwei Agenten betrachtet und sie gleichzeitig durch iterativen Aktualisierungsmechanismus erlernt. Wir validieren unseren Ansatz auf VIST-Datensätzen, bei denen quantitative Ergebnisse, Ablationen und menschliche Evaluationen die gute Fähigkeit unserer Methode zeigen, Geschichten mit höherer Qualität im Vergleich zu modernen Methoden zu generieren.', 'id': 'Ceritaan visual bermaksud untuk menghasilkan paragraf cerita dari urutan gambar secara otomatis. Pendekatan yang ada membangun deskripsi teks secara independen untuk setiap gambar dan sekitar menyatukannya sebagai sebuah cerita, yang mengarah ke masalah menghasilkan konten yang tidak konsisten secara semantis. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cara baru untuk cerita visual dengan memperkenalkan tugas deskripsi topik untuk mendeteksi konteks semantis global dari aliran gambar. Sebuah cerita kemudian dibuat dengan petunjuk deskripsi topik. Untuk menggabungkan dua generasi tugas, kami mengusulkan rangka komunikasi multi-agen yang menganggap generator deskripsi topik dan generator cerita sebagai dua agen dan mempelajarinya secara bersamaan melalui mekanisme pemutakhiran iteratif. Kami mengkvalifikasi pendekatan kami pada set data VIST, di mana hasil kuantitatif, ablasi, dan evaluasi manusia menunjukkan kemampuan yang baik metode kami dalam menghasilkan cerita dengan kualitas yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan metode terbaik.', 'ko': '시각이 이야기를 하는 목적은 일련의 이미지에서 자동으로 서사 단락을 생성하는 것이다.기존의 방법은 모든 이미지를 독립적으로 텍스트 묘사를 구성하고 그것들을 하나의 이야기로 대충 연결시켜 의미가 일관되지 않는 내용을 생성하는 문제를 초래했다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 시각적 이야기 설명 방법을 제시했고 주제 묘사 임무를 도입하여 이미지 흐름의 전체적인 의미 상하문을 측정했다.그리고 주제 묘사의 지도 아래 이야기를 구축한다.이 두 생성 임무를 결합시키기 위해 우리는 다중 에이전트 통신 프레임워크를 제시했다. 이 프레임워크는 주제 설명 생성기와 이야기 생성기를 두 개의 에이전트로 간주하고 교체 업데이트 메커니즘을 통해 이를 동시에 학습한다.우리는 VIST 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법을 검증했다. 정량 결과, 소식과 인류 평가에 따르면 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 우리의 방법은 질이 높은 이야기를 만드는 데 좋은 능력을 가진다.', 'sw': 'Simulizi zinalenga kutengeneza paragraph ya simulizi kutoka mfululizo wa picha kwa urahisi. Matokeo yanayopo yanaweza kujenga maelezo ya maandishi yenye uhuru kwa kila picha na kwa kiasi kikubwa hufananisha kama hadithi, ambayo yanasababisha tatizo la kutengeneza maudhui yanayotokana na kimwili. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza njia mpya ya kusimulia simulizi za kuona kwa kuanzisha jukumu la maelezo ya mada ili kutambua muktadha wa semantic wa kimataifa wa mitandao ya picha. Hadithi hiyo imetengenezwa kwa uongozi wa maelezo haya. Ili kuunganisha kazi hizi za vizazi viwili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa mawasiliano wa watumiaji wengi ambao unahusu muuzaji wa mada na mtengenezaji wa habari kama agenti wawili na kujifunza kwa wakati mmoja kupitia mfumo wa habari mpya. Tunaweza kuthibitisha mbinu yetu kwenye seti ya taarifa za VIST, ambapo matokeo mengi, mabadiliko, na uchunguzi wa binadamu unaonyesha uwezo mzuri wa njia yetu katika kutengeneza hadithi yenye kiwango kikubwa sambamba na mbinu za sanaa.', 'fa': 'داستان\u200cهای بینایی هدف می\u200cدهد که یک پاراگراف داستان را از یک دسته تصاویر خودکار تولید کند. نزدیک\u200cهای موجود وجود دارد توصیف متن را تنها برای هر تصویر ساخت و تقریباً آنها را به عنوان داستان مشترک ساخت، که به مشکل تولید محتوای غیر منحصر است. در این کاغذ، ما راهی جدید برای تفصیل داستان\u200cهای بینایی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با توصیف یک کار توصیف موضوع برای شناسایی محیط سیمانتیک جهانی یک رودخانه تصویر. سپس داستان با هدایت توضیح موضوع ساخته می شود. برای ترکیب این دو وظیفه نسل، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ما روش\u200cهایمان را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای VIST تایید می\u200cکنیم، جایی که نتیجه\u200cهای مقداری، فعالیت\u200cها و ارزیابی انسان\u200cها توانایی خوبی روش ما را در تولید داستان\u200cهای با کیفیت بالاتر در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای هنر نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': 'Görnüş hekaýa dolamak resimlerden bir hekaýat paragrafyny otomatik bilen döretmäge maksat edýär. Existen ýakynlaşylar her surat üçin metin waspyny özi-özi gurar we olary hekaýa ýaly tassyklaýar. Bu semantik bilen daşyrmadyk maslahaty döretmäge kynçylyk edip bilýär. Bu kagyzda, surat akynyň küresem semantik kontekstini tapmak üçin täze bir nusga çykmak üçin täze bir nusga teklip edýäris Soňra tema tassyýasy bilen guruldyrylýar. Iki döwlet işini birleştirmek üçin, tema waspy jeneratçysyny we hekaýa jeneratçysyny iki ajant diýip, olary bir gezek tekrarat güncellemek mekanizmasyndan öwrenmek üçin bir multi-agent komunikaciýa çerçevesini teklip edýäris. VIST veri setegimizde ýazşymyzy takyklaýarys. Umumy netijesi, eserleşmeler we adamlaryň deňleşmeleri biziň metodamyzyň ýokary kalitede ukyplaryň ýokarynda ukyplaryň ukyplaryny ukyplaýar.', 'af': "Visuele storytelling doel om 'n narratiewe paragraaf te genereer van' n volgorde van beelde automaties. Bestaande toegang het teks beskrywing onveranderlik vir elke beeld konstrukteer en omtrent hulle as 'n storie samekomstig, wat lei na die probleem van die genereer van semantiese onsamekomstige inhoud. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe manier vir visuele storytelling deur 'n onderwerp beskrywing taak te introduseer om die globale semantiese konteks van 'n beeldstroom te beskry. 'n Gestorie is dan gebruik met die gids van die onderwerp beskrywing. Om die twee generasie opdragte te kombinereer, voorstel ons 'n multiagente kommunikasie raamwerk wat die onderwerp beskrywing genereerder en die storie genereerder as twee agente en hulle eenmaal leer deur iteratiewe opdatering mekanisme. Ons bevestig on s toegang op VIST datastel waar kvantitatiewe resultate, ablasies en menslike evaluasie die goeie moontlik van ons metode in die genereer van stories met hoër kwaliteit vergelyk met state-of-the-art metodes.", 'am': 'የሳመንት ታሪክ ክፍል ምስሎችን በተለየ ቁጥር ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ የአሁኑ ግንኙነት የጽሑፍ ዝርዝርት ለሁሉም ምስል ብልሃት ያስተካክላል እና ታሪክ እንዲሆን ያስተካክሉአታል፤ ይህም ተርጓሜ የሚያስፈልገውን አስተያየት የማይገባውን ውይይት መፍጠር ያስችላል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የራእይ ታሪክ ጉዳይ ለመግለጥ እና የምስል ውይይት የዓለማዊ ስሜናዊ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት አዲስ መንገድ እናስባለን፡፡ ታሪክ በጉዳዩ መሪ ነው፡፡ In order to combine the two generation tasks, we propose a multi-agent communication framework that regards the topic description generator and the story generator as two agents and learn them simultaneously via iterative updating mechanism.  የVIST ዳታ ማድረጊያውን እናረጋግጣለን፡፡', 'hy': "Տեսային պատմություններ պատմելու նպատակն է ավտոմատ ստեղծել պատմությունների հաջորդականությունից մի պարբերակ: Existing approaches construct text description independently for each image and roughly concatenate them as a story, which leads to the problem of generating semantically incoherent content.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք տեսողական պատմություններ պատմելու նոր միջոց' ներկայացնելով թեմայի նկարագրման խնդիր՝ հայտնաբերելու պատկերի հոսանքի գլոբալ սեմանտիկ կոնտեքստը: A story is then constructed with the guidance of the topic description.  Երկու սերնդի առաջադրանքները համադրելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմագործականների հաղորդակցման շրջանակ, որը վերաբերում է թեմայի նկարագրման գեներատորին և պատմությունների գեներատորին որպես երկու գործականներ և միաժամանակ սովորում է դրանք կրկնվող վերականգնման մեխան Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր մոտեցումը VISTA տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որտեղ քանակական արդյունքները, հակամարտությունները և մարդու գնահատումը ցույց են տալիս մեր մեթոդի լավ ունակությունը ավելի բարձր որակով պատմություններ ստեղծելու մեթոդների հետ համեմատած ամենաբարձր մեթոդների", 'sq': 'Historia vizuale synon të gjenerojë një paragraf tregues nga një sekuencë imazhesh automatikisht. Përqafimet ekzistuese ndërtojnë përshkrimin e tekstit në mënyrë të pavarur për çdo imazh dhe rreth e qartë i përmbajnë si një histori, e cila çon në problemin e krijimit të përmbajtjes semantike të pakoheshme. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një mënyrë të re për tregimin vizual të tregimeve duke paraqitur një detyrë përshkrimi të temës për të zbuluar kontekstin semantik global të një rrjedhe imazhi. Një histori është ndërtuar me udhëzimin e përshkrimit të temës. Për të kombinuar detyrat e dy gjeneratave, ne propozojmë një kuadër komunikimi me shumë agjentë që e konsideron gjeneratorin e përshkrimit të temës dhe gjeneratorin e historive si dy agjentë dhe i mësojmë a to në të njëjtën kohë nëpërmjet mekanizmit të përditësimit iterativ. Ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në sistemin e të dhënave VIST, ku rezultatet kuantitative, ablacionet dhe vlerësimet njerëzore tregojnë aftës in ë e mirë të metodës s on ë në krijimin e historive me cilësi më të lartë krahasuar me metodat më të larta.', 'az': 'Görünür hekayələri şəkillərin sıralarından bir hekayət parçasını avtomatik olaraq yaratmaq istəyir. Bütün görüntülər üçün müstəsnadır mətn tanımasını inşa edir və onları bir hekayə olaraq yaxınlaşdırır, bu da semantik müxtəlif məlumat yaratmaq probleminə yol verir. Bu kağızda, görsel hekayələr danışmaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik ki, rəsminin küresel semantik məlumatını keşfetsin. Sonra bir hekayə məsələn təfsilatının doğruluğu ilə inşa edilir. İki nəsil işini birləşdirmək üçün, məsələn tanımlama generatoru və hekayə generatoru iki agent kimi görünür və onları bir-birinə iterativ yenilənmə mehanizmi vasitəsilə öyrənirik. Biz VIST verilənlər qurğusu ilə yaxınlıqlarımızı təsdiqləyirik, çünki kvantitatlı sonuçlar, qüvvətlər və insan değerlendirməsi metodumuzun yaxşı qabiliyyətini yüksək kaliteli hekayələri yaratmaq üçün daha yüksək qiymətlə göstərir.', 'bn': 'দৃশ্যমান গল্পের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ছবির প্রান্ত থেকে একটি বর্ণনা প্যারাফ তৈরি করার জন্য। বিদ্যমান প্রতিটি ছবির জন্য স্বাধীন টেক্সট বর্ণনা তৈরি করা এবং তাদেরকে একটি গল্প হিসেবে সংযুক্ত করা যায়, যা অর্থনৈতিক ভাবে আনয়নের সমস্যা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন উপায় প্রস্তাব করি ছবির স্ট্রীমের বিশ্বব্যাপী সেম্যান্টিক প্রেক্ষাপট সনাক্ত করতে। তারপর একটি গল্প তৈরি করা হয় বিষয়টি বিবরণের নির্দেশ দিয়ে। দুই প্রজন্মের কাজের সাথে একত্রিত করার জন্য আমরা একটি বহুজেন্ট যোগাযোগ কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি যা বিষয়টি বর্ণনা জেনারেটর এবং গল্প জেনারেটর দুই এজেন্ট হিস আমরা ভিস্টি ডাটাসেটের উপর আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পরিষ্কার করি যেখানে পরিমাণ ফলাফল, বাতিল এবং মানুষের মানুষের মূল্য প্রদর্শন করে যে গল্পগুলো তৈরি করা উচ্চমানের স', 'ca': "Visual storytelling aims to generate a narrative paragraph from a sequence of images automatically.  Els enfocaments existents construeixen la descripció del text independentment per cada imatge i les concatenen aproximadament com una història, que porta al problem a de generar continguts semànticament incoherents. En aquest article, proposem una nova manera de narrar històries visuals introduint una tasca de descripció del tema per detectar el context semàntic global d'un flux d'imatges. Una història es construeix amb la orientació de la descripció del tema. Per combinar les dues tasques de generació, proposem un marc de comunicació multi agent que considera el generador de descripció del tema i el generador de històries com dos agents i les aprenem simultàneament mitjançant un mecanisme iteratiu d'actualització. Validim el nostre enfocament en el conjunt de dades VIST, on resultats quantitatius, ablacions i evaluació humana demostren la bona habilitat del nostre mètode en generar històries de més alta qualitat que els mètodes més avançats.", 'bs': 'Vizualna priča cilja je stvoriti priču iz sekvence slika automatski. Postojeći pristupi konstruiraju opis teksta neovisno za svaku sliku i skoro ih potvrđuju kao priču, što vodi do problem a stvaranja semantički neovisnog sadržaja. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi način za vizualne priče uvođenjem zadatka opisa teme kako bi otkrili globalni semantički kontekst strema slika. Onda se priča izgradila sa uputstvom opisa teme. Da bismo kombinirali dva generacija zadataka, predložili smo multiagentni komunikacijski okvir koji smatra generatorom opisa tema i generatorom priče kao dva agent a i naučili ih istovremeno putem mehanizma za aktualizaciju iterativnih aktivnosti. Potvrđujemo svoj pristup na VIST dataset, gdje kvantitativni rezultati, aktivacije i ljudska procjena pokazuju dobru sposobnost našeg metoda u stvaranju priče sa višem kvalitetom u usporedbi s metodama stanja umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Vizuální vyprávění má za cíl automaticky generovat vyprávěcí odstavec z sekvence obrázků. Existující přístupy konstruují textový popis nezávisle pro každý obrázek a zhruba je řetězí jako příběh, což vede k problému generování sémanticky nesouvisejícího obsahu. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový způsob vizuálního vyprávění představením úlohy popisu tématu pro detekci globálního sémantického kontextu obrazového toku. Příběh je pak sestaven s vedením popisu tématu. Pro kombinaci těchto dvou generačních úloh navrhujeme multiagentní komunikační framework, který považuje generátor popisu tématu a generátor příběhu za dva agenty a učí se je současně prostřednictvím iterativního aktualizačního mechanismu. Ověřujeme náš přístup na VIST datové sadě, kde kvantitativní výsledky, ablace a lidské hodnocení demonstrují dobrou schopnost naší metody generovat příběhy s vyšší kvalitou ve srovnání s nejmodernějšími metodami.', 'et': 'Visuaalse jutustamise eesmärk on luua narratiivne lõik piltide jadast automaatselt. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid konstrueerivad iga pildi teksti kirjelduse iseseisvalt ja siduvad need ligikaudu loona, mis viib semantiliselt ebaühtlase sisu genereerimise probleemini. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uut viisi visuaalseks jutustamiseks, tutvustades teemakirjelduse ülesannet pildivoogi globaalse semantilise konteksti tuvastamiseks. Seejärel ehitatakse lugu teemakirjelduse juhendamisel. Kahe põlvkonna ülesannete kombineerimiseks pakume välja mitme agendi kommunikatsiooniraamistiku, mis käsitleb teemakirjelduse generaatorit ja loo generaatorit kahe agendina ning õpib neid samaaegselt iteratiivse uuendusmehhanismi kaudu. Valideerime oma lähenemisviisi VISTi andmekogumile, kus kvantitatiivsed tulemused, ablatsioonid ja inimhindamine näitavad meie meetodi head võimet luua kõrgema kvaliteediga lugusid võrreldes kaasaegsete meetoditega.', 'fi': 'Visuaalisen tarinankerronnan tavoitteena on luoda narratiivinen kappale kuvasarjasta automaattisesti. Nykyiset lähestymistavat rakentavat tekstin kuvauksen itsenäisesti kullekin kuvalle ja yhdistävät ne karkeasti tarinaksi, mikä johtaa semanttisesti epäjohdonmukaisen sisällön tuottamiseen. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta tapaa visuaaliseen tarinankerrontaan esittelemällä aihekuvauksen tehtävän kuvavirran globaalin semanttisen kontekstin havaitsemiseksi. Tämän jälkeen rakennetaan tarina aiheen kuvauksen ohjauksella. Kahden sukupolven tehtävien yhdistämiseksi ehdotamme moniagenttisen viestintäkehyksen, joka pitää aihekuvauksen generaattoria ja tarinageneraattoria kahtena agenttina ja oppii ne samanaikaisesti iteratiivisen päivitysmekanismin avulla. Validoimme lähestymistapamme VIST-aineistoon, jossa kvantitatiiviset tulokset, ablaatiot ja ihmisen arviointi osoittavat menetelmämme hyvän kyvyn tuottaa korkealaatuisempia tarinoita verrattuna uusimpiin menetelmiin.', 'ha': "Kiryalin mai gani na yi amfani da ya ƙãga wani tabar faɗi daga fomat farat ɗaya. Akwai na samun tsari na rubutu masu buɗa ɗe wa kowanne zane, kuma ka ƙayyade su kamar wani historin, da wannan yana ƙara wa matsalar ta ƙiƙiro maɓallin ƙarai na ƙari. Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyar da wani hani na gayin bayani da za'a introduce wani aikin bayani na madaidaici dõmin ya gane mazaɓa na kimar semantic na ƙari na zane. Sa'an nan an samar da wani lãbãri na shiryarwa da ma'abũcin wannan. To, dõmin ya haɗa aikin kizayen biyu, sai mu buƙata wani firam na mawasita mai multi-ajani wanda ke hususann mai ƙididdigewa ga maɓallin ayuka da mai ƙiƙiro lãbãrin da kuma masu zartar da su kamar mataimaki biyu kuma mu sanar da su sami guda, a kan mekanin da za'a sãɓa na masu kashewa. Tuna gaskata hanyoyinmu a kan danne na V.S. da, inda matsalarari masu yiwuwa, masu bastarwa da mutane sun nuna awon iyalinmu mai kyau ga sami-tsari da sifatin-na-sanar.", 'sk': 'Cilj vizualnega pripovedovanja zgodb je samodejno ustvariti pripovedni odstavek iz zaporedja slik. Obstoječi pristopi gradijo opis besedila neodvisno za vsako sliko in jih grobo povezujejo kot zgodbo, kar vodi v problem ustvarjanja semantično neskladnih vsebin. V prispevku predlagamo nov način vizualnega pripovedovanja zgodb z uvedbo naloge opisa teme za odkrivanje globalnega semantičnega konteksta slikovnega toka. Zgodba se nato zgradi z vodstvom opisa teme. Za združitev nalog dveh generacij predlagamo komunikacijski okvir več agentov, ki generator opisa teme in generator zgodb obravnava kot dva agenta in ju hkrati uči preko iterativnega mehanizma posodabljanja. Potrdimo naš pristop k naboru podatkov VIST, kjer kvantitativni rezultati, ablacije in ocenjevanje ljudi dokazujejo dobro sposobnost naše metode pri ustvarjanju zgodb z višjo kakovostjo v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi metodami.', 'jv': 'Display boxes Sampeyan kang dianggap nggawe nguasai nggawe teks layang-asai kanggo saben surat gawe nguasai kapan kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo kuwi bali sing dumadhi kawit perusahaan seneng pisan dumadhi. Nanging mapun iki, kita supoyo biasa kanggo nggawe tarjamahan anyar nggawe ngubah tarjamahan kanggo nggawe barang dumadhi sematik kanggo masalah sistem sing dumadhi. Pasi iki dadi nggawe karo nggawe barang temu akeh pisan. Mbok ditambah akeh sampeyan gawas ramu iki, kita supoyo sistem multi-ajan komunikasi sing dumadhi nggawe jenengan perintah sing dumadhi karo perusahaan kelas telu nggawe jenis iki bakal ngelarane sampeyan karo sistem atualizasi nggawe ngupakan kno. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem anyar karo dataset, kawit kadantinatik dadi, iso mulasar tentang karo cara-tekan anyar tentang nggawe ngubah dhéwé', 'bo': 'མཐོང་ནུས་འཆར་སྒྲུང་འདིས་པར་རིས་གྲངས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་འདོད་ཡོད། Existing approaches construct text description independently of each image and roughly concatenate them as a story, which leads to the problem of generating semantically incoherent content. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་། གནད་དོན་དེ་གཏམ་གླེང་ཞིག་གི་གནད་དོན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འགོ་བཤད་བྱས་ནས་བཟོ་བ་རེད། To combine the two generation tasks, we propose a multi-agent communication framework that regards the topic description generator and the story generator as two agents and learn them simultaneously via iterative updating mechanism. ང་ཚོས་VIST གནད་སྡུད་གནད་དོན་གྲངས་འབོར་བ་དང་གྲངས་འབོར་བ་ནི་ཤེས་ཚད་དང་མི་རྣམས་ལ།', 'he': 'סיפור סיפורים חזותי מתכוון ליצור פרק סיפורי מרצף תמונות באופן אוטומטי. גישות קיימות בונות תיאור טקסט באופן עצמאי עבור כל תמונה ולעצום אותם כסיפור, מה שמוביל לבעיה של יוצר תוכן לא תואם סמנטי. In this paper, we propose a new way for visual storytelling by introducing a topic description task to detect the global semantic context of an image stream.  סיפור נבנה עם ההנחה של תיאור הנושא. כדי לשלב את המשימות של שני הדור, אנו מציעים מסגרת תקשורת multi-סוכנים שמבטיחת לגנרטור תיאור הנושא וגנרטור הסיפורים כשני סוכנים וללמד אותם באותו הזמן באמצעות מנגנון עידכון חוזר. אנו מאשרים את הגישה שלנו על קבוצת מידע VIST, שבו תוצאות קוvantיביות, ניתוחים, והעריכה האנושית מראים את היכולת הטובה של השיטה שלנו לייצור סיפורים עם איכות גבוהה יותר בהשוואה לשיטות חדשות.'}
{'en': 'Referring to what you know and do not know : Making Referring Expression Generation Models Generalize To Unseen Entities', 'ar': 'بالإشارة إلى ما تعرفه وما لا تعرفه: جعل نماذج توليد التعبير المرجعية تعمم على كيانات غير مرئية', 'fr': "Faire référence à ce que vous savez et ne savez pas\xa0: généraliser les modèles de génération d'expressions de référence aux entités invisibles", 'es': 'Refiriéndose a lo que sabe y lo que no sabe: Generalización de modelos de generación de expresiones de referencia a entidades invisibles', 'pt': 'Referindo-se ao que você sabe e não sabe: Fazendo Modelos de Geração de Expressão de Referência Generalizados para Entidades Invisíveis', 'ja': '知っていることと知らないことを参照する:参照式生成モデルを非表示のエンティティに一般化する', 'zh': '引知与不知,使引表达式成模泛化为不见之实体', 'ru': 'Ссылка на то, что вы знаете и не знаете: Как сделать модели создания ссылочных выражений обобщенными к невидимым сущностям', 'hi': 'आप जो जानते हैं और नहीं जानते हैं उसका उल्लेख करते हुए: संदर्भित अभिव्यक्ति पीढ़ी मॉडल को अनदेखी संस्थाओं के लिए सामान्यीकृत करना', 'ga': 'Ag tagairt don méid atá ar eolas agat agus nach bhfuil ar eolas agat: Ag Tagairt a Dhéanamh Múnlaí Giniúint Slonn a Ghinearálú D’Eintitis Neamhfheicthe', 'hu': 'Hivatkozás arra, amit tudsz és nem tudsz: Hivatkozó kifejezés generálási modellek általánosítása láthatatlan entitásokra', 'el': 'Αναφορά σε αυτά που γνωρίζετε και δεν γνωρίζετε: Κάνοντας τα μοντέλα δημιουργίας αναφορών να γενικεύουν σε αόρατες οντότητες', 'ka': 'რომელიც თქვენ ვიცით და არ ვიცით: განსხვავებული გამოსახულების შექმნა მოდელები განსხვავებული ელემენტებისთვის გენერალურება', 'it': 'Riferendosi a ciò che sai e non sai: Generalizzare i modelli di generazione di espressioni riferite a entità invisibili', 'kk': 'Білмегеніңізге қарай: Көрсетілмеген өрнегі құру үлгілерін көрсетілмеген нысандарға жасау', 'lt': 'Nuorodos į tai, ką žinote ir nežinote: Nuorodos į išraiškų generacijos modelių generalizavimas nepastebimiems subjektams', 'mk': 'Зборувајќи на она што го знаете и не го знаете: Направање на модели за генерација на референтни изрази за генерализирање на невидени ентитети', 'ms': 'Referring to what you know and do not know: Making Referring Expression Generation Models Generalize To Unseen Entities', 'mt': 'Li tirreferi għal dak li taf u ma tafx: Li tagħmel mudelli ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ espressjoni ta’ referenza jiġġeneralizzaw lil Entitajiet Mhux Magħrufa', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അറിയാത്തതിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു', 'mn': 'Таны мэдэх болон мэдэхгүй зүйлсийг харуулж байна: Тайлбарлаж буй илэрхийллийн төсөөлөлтийн загварууд нь харагдаагүй зүйлсийн төсөөлөлтийг бүтээх', 'ro': 'Referindu-te la ceea ce știi și nu știi: Efectuarea modelelor referitoare la generarea de expresii generalizează entităților nevăzute', 'no': 'Gjennomsikt på det du kjenner og ikkje kjenner: Lagar refererande uttrykk- modeller genererar til ukjende einingar', 'pl': 'Odnoszenie się do tego, co wiesz, a nie wiesz: Sprawianie, że modele generowania odnoszących się do wyrażeń ogólniają się do niewidzialnych podmiotów', 'sr': 'Odgovarajući na ono što znate i ne znate: praviti modele generacije izraza razmišljanja o nevidljivim stvarima', 'si': 'ඔබට දන්න හා දන්නේ නැති දේවල් ගැන බලන්න: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Si aad u leedahay waxad aqoonin: Making Referring Expression Generation Models Generalize To hidden Entries', 'sv': 'Hänvisning till vad du vet och inte vet: Göra refererande uttrycksgenereringsmodeller Generalisera till osynliga enheter', 'ta': '@ info: status', 'ur': 'جو کچھ تم جانتے ہو اور جانتے نہیں ہو اس کی طرف متوجہ ہو جاتا ہے: مثالیں بناتے ہیں جو غیب کی چیزوں کی طرف متوجہ ہوتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Liên hệ với những gì bạn biết và không biết: Chế độ Phát hiện Nền đã chung hóa cho các thực thể chưa xác định', 'bg': 'Позоваване на това, което знаете и не знаете: Прилагане на моделите за генериране на позоваване на изрази към невидими обекти', 'da': 'Henviser til, hvad du ved og ikke ved: Gør henvisende udtryksgenereringsmodeller generere til usynlige enheder', 'hr': 'S obzirom na ono što znate i ne znate: Učiniti modele generacije izraza razmišljanja generaliziraju nevidljive područje', 'nl': 'Verwijzen naar wat u wel en niet weet: Verwijzende expressiemodellen genereren naar onzichtbare entiteiten', 'de': 'Verweisen auf das, was Sie wissen und was Sie nicht wissen: Verweisende Ausdrucksgenerierungsmodelle auf unsichtbare Entitäten verallgemeinern', 'id': 'Mengingat pada apa yang Anda ketahui dan tidak tahu: Membuat Model Generasi Ekspresi Referensi Jeneralisasi Untuk Entitas Tak Terlihat', 'ko': '네가 알고 있는 것과 모르는 것을 인용한다: 인용 표현식 생성 모델을 보이지 않는 실체로 범화시키다', 'fa': 'به آنچه می\u200cدانید و نمی\u200cدانید، توجه می\u200cکنید: ساختن نمونه\u200cهای توصیف\u200cکننده\u200cی نمونه\u200cهای توصیف به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای غیب به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای توصیف می\u200cکنند', 'sw': 'Kuzuia kile unachokifahamu na hamjui: Kutengeneza Mradi wa Uzalishaji wa Tamko wa Kuzungumzia', 'tr': 'Bilýäniňiz we bilmeýäniňiz üçin wajyp geçirilýär: Günahtaryş ifade döredişi Modelleri Görkezilmediklere Döredişi', 'af': 'Verwyder na wat jy weet en doen nie weet nie: Maak verwysing Uitdrukking Genereer Modelle Generaliseer na Onsien Entiteit', 'sq': 'Duke iu referuar asaj që ju e dini dhe nuk e dini: Duke bërë modelet e gjeneratave të shprehjeve të referuara të gjeneralizuara për njësitë e padukshme', 'am': 'ወደ ማታውቁትና በማታውቁት ተሳስቷል: Making Referring Expression Generation Models Generalize to hidden entries', 'az': 'Bildiyiniz v…ô bilm…ôdiyiniz Ňüeyl…ôr…ô baxńĪrsńĪnńĪz: ńįfad…ô yaratma modell…ôri qeybi Ňüeyl…ôr…ô b…ônz…ôyir', 'bn': 'আপনি যা জানেন এবং যা জানেন না তা উল্লেখ করেন: গোপনীয় এন্ট্রিটিগুলোকে সাধারণ মোডেল তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Od onoga što znate i ne znate: praviti modele generacije izražavanja razmišljanja o nevidljivim stvarima', 'cs': 'Odkaz na to, co víte a co nevíte: Vytváření modelů generování referujících výrazů obecně na neviděné entity', 'et': 'Viide sellele, mida sa tead ja mida ei tea: Viidete avaldise genereerimise mudelite üldistamine nähtamatutele olemitele', 'fi': 'Viittaus siihen, mitä tiedät ja mitä et tiedä: Viittauslausegeneraation mallien yleistäminen näkymättömille entiteeteille', 'hy': 'Հետևում է այն բանին, ինչ դուք գիտեք և չգիտեք. Հետևում է արտահայտության ստեղծման մոդելների ընդհանուր դարձնելը անտեսված միավորներին', 'ca': "Referint al que sabeu i no sabeu: fer generalitzar els models de generació d'expressions referides a entitats invisibles", 'jv': 'Ngawe ngerti apa ora ngerti apa ora ngerti:Refer Expression Generation', 'sk': 'Sklicevanje na to, kar veste in kar ne veste: Vzpostavitev splošnih modelov generacije referenčnih izrazov na nevidne entitete', 'he': 'מתייחסים למה שאתם יודעים ולא יודעים: לגרום לדוגמאות מיוצאות מיוצאות מתייחסים לגנרליזציות בלתי נראות', 'ha': 'Yana riƙon abin da ba ka sani ba: Making Referring Entry', 'bo': 'ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཤེས་པའི་དང་མི་ཤེས་པའི་སྐོར་ལ་ལྟ་སྤྲོད་པ། ཚོར་འཆར་བརྗོད་གཞི་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་སྣང་པ།'}
{'en': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) is the computational process of generating natural language in the form of text or voice from non-linguistic data. A core micro-planning task within NLG is referring expression generation (REG), which aims to automatically generate noun phrases to refer to entities mentioned as discourse unfolds. A limitation of novel REG models is not being able to generate referring expressions to entities not encountered during the training process. To solve this problem, we propose two extensions to NeuralREG, a state-of-the-art encoder-decoder REG model. The first is a copy mechanism, whereas the second consists of representing the gender and type of the referent as inputs to the model. Drawing on the results of automatic and human evaluation as well as an ablation study using the WebNLG corpus, we contend that our proposal contributes to the generation of more meaningful referring expressions to unseen entities than the original system and related work. Code and all produced data are publicly available.', 'ar': 'توليد اللغة الطبيعية من البيانات إلى النص (NLG) هو عملية حسابية لتوليد لغة طبيعية في شكل نص أو صوت من بيانات غير لغوية. تتمثل إحدى مهام التخطيط الجزئي الأساسية داخل NLG في الإشارة إلى توليد التعبير (REG) ، والذي يهدف إلى إنشاء عبارات اسمية تلقائيًا للإشارة إلى الكيانات المذكورة عند ظهور الخطاب. هناك قيود على نماذج REG الجديدة وهي عدم القدرة على إنشاء تعبيرات مرجعية للكيانات التي لم تتم مواجهتها أثناء عملية التدريب. لحل هذه المشكلة ، نقترح امتدادين لـ NeuralREG ، وهو أحدث طراز REG لوحدة فك التشفير والتشفير. الأول عبارة عن آلية نسخ ، بينما يتكون الثاني من تمثيل جنس ونوع المرجع كمدخلات في النموذج. بالاعتماد على نتائج التقييم التلقائي والبشري بالإضافة إلى دراسة الاجتثاث باستخدام مجموعة WebNLG ، نؤكد أن اقتراحنا يساهم في توليد تعبيرات مرجعية أكثر جدوى للكيانات غير المرئية من النظام الأصلي والعمل المرتبط به. الشفرة وجميع البيانات المنتجة متاحة للجمهور.', 'es': 'La generación de lenguaje natural (NLG) de datos a texto es el proceso computacional de generación de lenguaje natural en forma de texto o voz a partir de datos no lingüísticos. Una tarea central de microplanificación dentro de NLG es la generación de expresiones referidas (REG), que tiene como objetivo generar automáticamente frases nominales para referirse a las entidades mencionadas a medida que se desarrolla el discurso. Una limitación de los modelos REG novedosos es no poder generar expresiones de referencia a entidades que no se encuentran durante el proceso de capacitación. Para resolver este problema, proponemos dos extensiones de NeuralReg, un modelo REG de codificador-decodificador de última generación. El primero es un mecanismo de copia, mientras que el segundo consiste en representar el género y el tipo del referente como insumos al modelo. Basándonos en los resultados de la evaluación automática y humana, así como en un estudio de ablación que utiliza el corpus WebNLG, sostenemos que nuestra propuesta contribuye a la generación de expresiones de referencia más significativas a entidades invisibles que el sistema original y el trabajo relacionado. El código y todos los datos producidos están a disposición del público.', 'fr': "La génération de langage naturel (GNL) de données en texte est le processus informatique de génération de langage naturel sous forme de texte ou de voix à partir de données non linguistiques. Une tâche de micro-planification de base au sein du GNL est la génération d'expressions de référence (REG), qui vise à générer automatiquement des phrases nominales pour faire référence aux entités mentionnées au fur et à mesure que le discours se déroule. L'une des limites des nouveaux modèles REG est de ne pas pouvoir générer des expressions de référence à des entités non rencontrées pendant le processus de formation. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons deux extensions de NeuralReg, un modèle REG encodeur-décodeur de pointe. Le premier est un mécanisme de copie, tandis que le second consiste à représenter le sexe et le type du référent en tant qu'entrées du modèle. En nous appuyant sur les résultats d'une évaluation automatique et humaine ainsi que sur une étude d'ablation utilisant le corpus WebNLG, nous soutenons que notre proposition contribue à la génération d'expressions de référence plus significatives pour des entités invisibles que le système original et les travaux connexes. Le code et toutes les données produites sont accessibles au public.", 'pt': 'A geração de linguagem natural de dados para texto (NLG) é o processo computacional de geração de linguagem natural na forma de texto ou voz a partir de dados não linguísticos. Uma tarefa central de microplanejamento dentro do NLG é a geração de expressões de referência (REG), que visa gerar automaticamente sintagmas nominais para se referir a entidades mencionadas à medida que o discurso se desenrola. Uma limitação dos novos modelos REG é não ser capaz de gerar expressões referentes a entidades não encontradas durante o processo de treinamento. Para resolver este problema, propomos duas extensões ao NeuralREG, um modelo REG codificador-decodificador de última geração. O primeiro é um mecanismo de cópia, enquanto o segundo consiste em representar o gênero e o tipo do referente como entradas para o modelo. Com base nos resultados da avaliação automática e humana, bem como em um estudo de ablação usando o corpus WebNLG, afirmamos que nossa proposta contribui para a geração de expressões referentes a entidades invisíveis mais significativas do que o sistema original e trabalhos relacionados. Código e todos os dados produzidos estão disponíveis publicamente.', 'ja': 'データ対テキスト自然言語生成（ NLG ）は、非言語データからテキストまたは音声の形式で自然言語を生成する計算プロセスです。 NLG内のコアマイクロプランニングタスクは、表現生成（ REG ）を参照することであり、これは、話が展開されるにつれて言及されるエンティティを参照するために名詞句を自動的に生成することを目的としている。 新規REGモデルの制限は、トレーニングプロセス中に遭遇しないエンティティへの参照表現を生成することができないことである。 この問題を解決するために、最先端のエンコーダデコーダREGモデルであるNeuralREGに2つの拡張を提案します。 1つ目はコピーメカニズムであり、2つ目は参照元の性別とタイプをモデルへの入力として表すことで構成されています。 自動評価と人間評価の結果とWebNLGコーパスを使用したアブレーション研究を参考にして、我々の提案は、元のシステムと関連する作業よりも見えない実体を参照するより有意義な表現の生成に貢献していると主張しています。 コードと生成されたすべてのデータは公開されています。', 'hi': 'डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी (एनएलजी) गैर-भाषाई डेटा से पाठ या आवाज के रूप में प्राकृतिक भाषा उत्पन्न करने की कम्प्यूटेशनल प्रक्रिया है। एनएलजी के भीतर एक मुख्य माइक्रो-प्लानिंग कार्य अभिव्यक्ति पीढ़ी (आरईजी) का उल्लेख कर रहा है, जिसका उद्देश्य स्वचालित रूप से संज्ञा वाक्यांशों को उत्पन्न करना है ताकि प्रवचन के रूप में उल्लिखित संस्थाओं को संदर्भित किया जा सके। उपन्यास REG मॉडल की एक सीमा प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया के दौरान सामना नहीं किया गया संस्थाओं के लिए संदर्भित अभिव्यक्ति उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम नहीं किया जा रहा है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम NeuralREG के लिए दो एक्सटेंशन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक अत्याधुनिक एनकोडर-डिकोडर REG मॉडल। पहला एक प्रतिलिपि तंत्र है, जबकि दूसरे में मॉडल के इनपुट के रूप में लिंग और दिग्दर्शन के प्रकार का प्रतिनिधित्व करना शामिल है। स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन के परिणामों के साथ-साथ WebNLG कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके एक एब्लेशन अध्ययन पर ड्राइंग, हम तर्क देते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्ताव मूल प्रणाली और संबंधित काम की तुलना में अनदेखी संस्थाओं के लिए अधिक सार्थक संदर्भित अभिव्यक्तियों की पीढ़ी में योगदान देता है। कोड और सभी उत्पादित डेटा सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं।', 'zh': '数至文本自然语言生 (NLG) 自非言语数以文语生自然语言数也。 NLG之心微观规事引表达式成(REG),其志自生名词短语,以引随言展言之实体。 新型REG模之局限性,不成指练中未遇之实体引表达式。 为此二广,NeuralREG者,NeuralREG先进之编码器 - 解码器REG也。 一曰复制机,二曰形输。 因自与人工评事及用WebNLG语料库之消融,臣等以为吾提案有助于本体更有意义引表达式不见之体。 代码与生成之数皆明矣。', 'ru': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) - это вычислительный процесс генерации естественного языка в виде текста или голоса из неязыковых данных. Одной из основных задач микропланирования в NLG является ссылка на генерацию выражения (REG), которая направлена на автоматическую генерацию именных фраз для ссылки на сущности, упомянутые по мере развития дискурса. Ограничение новых моделей REG не может генерировать выражения, ссылающиеся на объекты, не встречающиеся в процессе обучения. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем два расширения к NeuralREG, современной модели КОДИРОВЩИК-ДЕКОДЕР REG. Первый представляет собой механизм копирования, в то время как второй состоит из представления пола и типа референта в качестве входных данных для модели. Опираясь на результаты автоматической и человеческой оценки, а также исследования абляции с использованием корпуса WebNLG, мы утверждаем, что наше предложение способствует генерированию более значимых выражений ссылки на невидимые сущности, чем оригинальная система и связанная с ней работа. Код и все полученные данные являются общедоступными.', 'ga': 'Sonraí-go-téacs Is é Giniúint Teanga Nádúrtha (NLG) an próiseas ríomhaireachtúil chun teanga nádúrtha a ghiniúint i bhfoirm téacs nó gutha ó shonraí neamhtheangeolaíocha. Tasc lárnach micriphleanála laistigh de NLG is ea tagairt do ghiniúint nathanna cainte (REG), a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige frásaí ainmfhocail a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch chun tagairt a dhéanamh d’aonáin a luaitear nuair a leathnaíonn an dioscúrsa. Mar gheall ar theorannú ar shamhlacha núíosacha REG níltear in ann nathanna tagartha a ghiniúint d’eintitis nár aimsíodh le linn an phróisis oiliúna. Chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach, molaimid dhá shíneadh ar NeuralREG, samhail ionchódóra-díchódóra REG den scoth. Meicníocht chóipeála atá sa chéad cheann, ach is éard atá sa dara ceann ná inscne agus cineál an tagairt a léiriú mar ionchur don mhúnla. Ag tarraingt ar thorthaí na meastóireachta uathoibríocha agus daonna chomh maith le staidéar eiblithe ag baint úsáide as corpas WebNLG, áitímid go gcuidíonn ár dtogra le habairtí tagartha níos bríonna a ghiniúint d’eintitis nach bhfuil feicthe acu ná an bunchóras agus obair ghaolmhar. Tá an cód agus na sonraí go léir a tháirgtear ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'Data- to- text Natural Language Generation NLG-ის შუალური მიკროპოლანეციის რაოდენობა განსაზღვრება (REG), რომელიც მინდა ავტომატურად შექმნა სახელის ფრაზების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ელემენტების განსაზღვრება როგორ პრომენტის REG მოდელების ზომა არ შეუძლია შექმნა განსაზღვრებული გამოსახულებების შექმნა ინტერტიების განსახულებაში, რომლებიც არ შეიძლება განსახულებულია. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მუშაობით ორი გაფართლება ნეირალრეგი, რომელიც მსოფლიო კოდირების REG მოდელზე. პირველი არის კოპიფიკაციის მექანიზმი, მაგრამ მეორე არის გენექსის და რეფერენტის ტიპის გამოყენება როგორც მოდელის შენახვა. ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრების შედეგი და WebNLG კოპპუსის გამოყენებული შესწავლობა, ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრების შემდეგ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვ კოდი და ყველა გამოყენებული მონაცემები ადგილურად ხელსახულია.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv generálása (Data-to-text Natural Language Generation, NLG) a természetes nyelv szöveg vagy hang formájában történő generálásának számítási folyamata nem nyelvi adatokból. Az NLG egyik legfontosabb mikrotervezési feladata a kifejezés generálása (REG), amelynek célja, hogy automatikusan generáljon főnévkifejezéseket a diskurzus kibontakozásakor említett entitásokra vonatkozóan. Az új REG modellek korlátozása nem képes hivatkozási kifejezéseket generálni a képzési folyamat során nem találkozó entitásokra. A probléma megoldása érdekében két kiterjesztést javasolunk a NeuralREG, egy korszerű REG kódoló-dekóder modellhez. Az első egy másolási mechanizmus, míg a második a referent nemét és típusát a modell bemutatásaként jelenti. Az automatikus és emberi értékelés, valamint a WebNLG korpuszt felhasználó ablációs tanulmány eredményeire támaszkodva azt állítjuk, hogy javaslatunk hozzájárul ahhoz, hogy a láthatatlan entitásokra vonatkozó jelentősebb utalási kifejezések generálásához, mint az eredeti rendszer és a kapcsolódó munka. A kód és az összes előállított adat nyilvánosan hozzáférhető.', 'el': 'Η παραγωγή φυσικής γλώσσας από δεδομένα σε κείμενο είναι η υπολογιστική διαδικασία παραγωγής φυσικής γλώσσας με τη μορφή κειμένου ή φωνής από μη γλωσσικά δεδομένα. Ένα βασικό έργο μικροσχεδιασμού στο πλαίσιο του είναι η δημιουργία εκφράσεων παραπομπής (REG), η οποία στοχεύει στην αυτόματη δημιουργία φράσεων ουσιαστικών για να αναφερθούν σε οντότητες που αναφέρονται καθώς εξελίσσεται ο λόγος. Ένας περιορισμός των νέων μοντέλων REG δεν είναι σε θέση να δημιουργήσουν αναφορές σε οντότητες που δεν συναντήθηκαν κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας κατάρτισης. Για την επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος, προτείνουμε δύο επεκτάσεις στο ένα σύγχρονο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή REG. Ο πρώτος είναι ένας μηχανισμός αντιγραφής, ενώ ο δεύτερος συνίσταται στην αναπαράσταση του φύλου και του τύπου του αναφέροντος ως εισροών στο μοντέλο. Βασιζόμενοι στα αποτελέσματα της αυτόματης και ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης καθώς και σε μελέτη αφαίρεσης με χρήση του σώματος υποστηρίζουμε ότι η πρότασή μας συμβάλλει στη δημιουργία πιο ουσιαστικών αναφορών σε αόρατες οντότητες από ό,τι το αρχικό σύστημα και το σχετικό έργο. Ο κώδικας και όλα τα παραγόμενα δεδομένα είναι δημόσια διαθέσιμα.', 'it': "Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) è il processo computazionale di generazione del linguaggio naturale sotto forma di testo o voce da dati non linguistici. Un compito fondamentale di micro-pianificazione all'interno di NLG è quello di fare riferimento alla generazione di espressioni (REG), che mira a generare automaticamente frasi sostantive per riferirsi alle entità menzionate mentre si svolge il discorso. Una limitazione dei nuovi modelli REG non è in grado di generare espressioni di riferimento a entità non incontrate durante il processo di formazione. Per risolvere questo problema, proponiamo due estensioni a NeuralREG, un encoder-decoder all'avanguardia modello REG. Il primo è un meccanismo di copia, mentre il secondo consiste nel rappresentare il genere e il tipo del referente come input al modello. Basandoci sui risultati della valutazione automatica e umana e su uno studio di ablazione utilizzando il corpus WebNLG, sosteniamo che la nostra proposta contribuisca alla generazione di espressioni di riferimento più significative a entità invisibili rispetto al sistema originale e al lavoro correlato. Il codice e tutti i dati prodotti sono disponibili al pubblico.", 'lt': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) – tai skaičiavimo procesas, pagal kurį gamtos kalba gaminama teksto arba balso forma iš ne kalbinių duomenų. Pagrindinė mikroplanavimo užduotis NLG – tai išraiškų generacija (REG), kuria siekiama automatiškai generuoti neišvardytas frazes, kad būtų galima nurodyti subjektus, nurodytus kaip diskurso įvykius. A limitation of novel REG models is not being able to generate referring expressions to entities not encountered during the training process.  Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, siūlome dvi išplėtimus NeuralREG, naujausiam kodavimo kodavimo REG modeliui. Pirmasis yra kopijų mechanizmas, o antrasis – referento lytis ir tipas kaip pavyzdys. Remdamiesi automatinio ir žmogiškojo vertinimo rezultatais, taip pat abliacijos tyrimu naudojant WebNLG korpus, teigiame, kad mūsų pasiūlymas prisideda prie prasmingesnių išraiškų, susijusių su nematomais subjektais, sukūrimo nei pradinė sistema ir susijęs darbas. Kodas ir visi duomenys yra prieinami visuomenei.', 'kk': 'Деректерден мәтінде Түзіндік тілді құру (NLG) деген тілді тілді тілді мәтін не дыбыс түрінде лингвистикалық емес деректерден құру компьютерлік процесі. NLG ішіндегі негізгі микро планировау тапсырмасы, өрнегін құру (REG) деп белгілейді, бұл дискурс ашылған нысандарды автоматты түрде атау сөздерін құру үшін. Роман REG үлгілерінің шектеуі оқыту процесінде келмеген нысандарға сілтемелерді жасай алмайды. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін біз NeuralREG дегенге екі кеңейтуді, әртүрлі кодерлер REG үлгісінің күйі. Біріншісі - көшірмелеу механизмі, бірақ екіншісі - үлгіге енгізу ретінде гендерді және сілтемелердің түрін көрсетеді. Автоматты және адамдарды бағалау нәтижелеріне, WebNLG корпус арқылы істеу зерттеулерінің нәтижелеріне сәйкес келгенде, біз бұл ұсынысымыз бастапқы жүйе және қатынастық жұмыс арқылы көрсетілмеген мәліметті сөйл Код және барлық жасалған деректер көпшілікті қол жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Генерацијата на природен јазик од податоци до текст (NLG) е процесот на пресметка на генерација на природен јазик во форма на текст или глас од нејазички податоци. A core micro-planning task within NLG is referring expression generation (REG), which aims to automatically generate noun phrases to refer to entities mentioned as discourse unfolds.  Ограничувањето на новите модели на REG не е во можност да се генерираат референции на ентитети кои не се соочуваат за време на процесот на обука. За да го решиме овој проблем, предлагаме две проширувања на NeuralREG, најнов модел на кодер-декодер REG. Првиот е механизам на копија, додека вториот се состои од претставување на полот и типот на референтот како влози во моделот. Користејќи ги резултатите од автоматска и човечка евалуација, како и студијата за аблација користејќи го корпусот ВебНГ, тврдиме дека нашиот предлог придонесува за генерацијата на позначајни изрази кои се однесуваат на невидени ентитети отколку на оригиналниот систем и поврзаната работа. Кодексот и сите произведени податоци се јавно достапни.', 'ms': 'Data-ke-teks Jenerasi Bahasa Alami (NLG) adalah proses pengiraan untuk menghasilkan bahasa alami dalam bentuk teks atau suara dari data bukan bahasa. Name Had bagi model REG baru tidak dapat menghasilkan ungkapan rujuk kepada entiti yang tidak ditemui semasa proses latihan. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini, kami cadangkan dua sambungan ke NeuralREG, model REG pengekod-dekoder state-of-the-art. The first is a copy mechanism, whereas the second consists of representing the gender and type of the referent as inputs to the model.  Drawing on the results of automatic and human evaluation as well as an ablation study using the WebNLG corpus, we contend that our proposal contributes to the generation of more meaningful referring expressions to unseen entities than the original system and related work.  Kod dan semua data yang dihasilkan tersedia secara umum.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷ സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കണക്കിട പ്രക്രിയയാണു് ലിങ്കിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d നിന് NLG-ല്\u200d ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഒരു മൈക്രോ പ്ലാന്\u200dഗ് ജോലി പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന പ്രഖ്യാപന തലമുറയെ (REG) എന്നാണ് ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത്, സംസാരം പ്രസംഗി പരിശീലന പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d കണ്ടുമുട്ടാത്ത വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200dറെജിലേക്ക് രണ്ടു എക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d പ്രാദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ ആദ്യത്തെ ഒരു പകര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്ന മെക്കയിസ്റ്റമാണ്, രണ്ടാമത്തേതായി പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന പ്രസ്താവിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില വെബ്നെന്\u200dഎംഎല്\u200dജി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സ്വയം വിലാസവും മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസവും ഫലങ്ങളുടെയും ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വരയ്ക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പ് നമ്മു കോഡും ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ എല്ലാ വിവരങ്ങളും പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwa Naturali (NLG) minn dejta għal test hija l-proċess komputattiv tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwa naturali fil-forma ta’ test jew vuċi minn dejta mhux lingwistika. Kompitu ewlieni ta’ mikroppjanar fi ħdan il-NLG huwa li jirreferi għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ espressjonijiet (REG), li għandu l-għan li jiġġenera awtomatikament frażijiet b’isem biex jirreferi għal entitajiet imsemmija bħala żviluppi ta’ diskors. Limitazzjoni ta’ mudelli ġodda tar-REG mhijiex kapaċi tiġġenera espressjonijiet ta’ referenza għal entitajiet li ma jkunux iltaqgħu magħhom matul il-proċess ta’ taħriġ. Biex issolvi din il-problem a, qed nipproponu żewġ estensjonijiet għan-NeuralREG, mudell ta’ l-a ħħar kodifikatur-dekoder REG. L-ewwel huwa mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja, filwaqt li t-tieni jikkonsisti fir-rappreżentazzjoni tas-sess u t-tip tar-referent bħala kontributi għall-mudell. Abbażi tar-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni awtomatika u umana kif ukoll ta’ studju ta’ abblazzjoni bl-użu tal-WebNLG corpus, aħna nindirizzaw li l-proposta tagħna tikkontribwixxi għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ espressjonijiet aktar sinifikanti li jirreferu għal entitajiet mhux osservati mis-sistema oriġinali u x-xogħol relatat. Il-kodiċi u d-dejta kollha prodotta huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'pl': 'Generowanie języka naturalnego (NLG) to proces obliczeniowy generowania języka naturalnego w postaci tekstu lub głosu z danych niejęzykowych. Podstawowym zadaniem mikroplanowania w NLG jest generowanie wyrażeń referencyjnych (REG), które ma na celu automatyczne generowanie fraz rzeczowniczych, które odnoszą się do podmiotów wymienionych w trakcie rozwoju dyskursu. Ograniczeniem nowych modeli REG nie jest możliwość generowania wyrażeń odwołujących się do podmiotów niespotykanych podczas procesu szkolenia. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy dwa rozszerzenia NeuralREG, nowoczesnego modelu kodera-dekodera REG. Pierwszy to mechanizm kopiowania, natomiast drugi polega na reprezentowaniu płci i typu referenta jako wejścia do modelu. W oparciu o wyniki oceny automatycznej i ludzkiej oraz badania ablacji korpusu WebNLG twierdzimy, że nasza propozycja przyczynia się do generowania bardziej znaczących wyrażeń odnoszących się do niewidzialnych podmiotów niż oryginalny system i powiązana z nim praca. Kod i wszystkie wyprodukowane dane są publicznie dostępne.', 'no': 'Data- to- text Natural Language Generation (NLG) er dataprosessen for å laga naturspråk i form av tekst eller stemme frå ikkje- lingviske data. Ein kjerne mikroplanseringsoppgåve i NLG refererer til uttrykk-generering (REG), som må automatisk laga namn-frasar for å referera til einingar som er namnet som diskurs oppdatert. Ein avgrensing av novelle REG-modeller kan ikkje laga refererande uttrykk til einingar som ikkje oppstod under opplæringsprosessen. For å løse dette problemet, fører vi to utvidingar til NeuralREG, eit tilstand til kunstkoderingsmodell REG. Den første er ein kopimekanisme, men den andre består av å representera seks og type referansen som innlegg til modellen. Teiknar vi på resultatet av automatisk og menneskelig evaluering, og eit aktiveringsstudie med WebNLG-korpusen, så har vi tilgang til at vår forslag bidrar til å generera meir meningsverdiane refereringsuttrykk til ukjende einingar enn den opprinnelige systemet og tilhøyrande arbeidet. Kode og alle produserte data er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл бүтээл (NLG) нь байгалийн хэл болон дуу биш хэл өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээс бий болгох тооны үйл явц юм. NLG-ийн доторх жижиг бичиг төлөвлөгөөний ажил бол илэрхийллийн төлөвлөгөө (REG) гэдэг. Энэ нь илэрхийллийн төлөвлөгөөг автоматаар нэр хэлбэрийг бий болгох зорилго юм. Шинэ REG загварын хязгаарлалт нь сургалтын процесс дээр харилцаагүй байгууллагуудыг бий болгож чадахгүй. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид NeuralREG, урлагийн коддогч REG загварын тулд хоёр нэмэгдүүлэлтийг санал болно. Эхний нь хуулийн механизм юм. Хоёр дахь нь гендер, хэлбэрийг загвар руу оруулж ирсэн хэлбэрээр илэрхийлдэг. Автоматик, хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээ, WebNLG корпус ашиглан ашиглах үйл ажиллагааны үр дүн дээр зурж, бидний санал нь эхний систем болон хамааралтай ажиллаасаа илүү чухал тодорхойлж буй үйл ажиллагаанд илүү чухал илэрхийлдэг илэрхийлэлтэй хү Код болон бүх бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээллийг олон нийтэд хэрэглэгддэг.', 'ro': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) este procesul computațional de generare a limbajului natural sub formă de text sau voce din date non-lingvistice. O sarcină esențială de micro-planificare în cadrul NLG este generarea expresiei (REG), care are ca scop generarea automată a expresiilor substantive pentru a se referi la entitățile menționate pe măsură ce discursul se desfășoară. O limitare a noilor modele REG nu este capabilă să genereze expresii referitoare la entități care nu au fost întâlnite în timpul procesului de formare. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, propunem două extensii la NeuralREG, un model REG encoder-decoder de ultimă generație. Primul este un mecanism de copiere, în timp ce al doilea constă în reprezentarea genului și a tipului referentului ca intrări la model. Bazându-ne pe rezultatele evaluării automate și umane, precum și pe un studiu de ablație folosind corpusul WebNLG, susținem că propunerea noastră contribuie la generarea de expresii de referință mai semnificative pentru entități nevăzute decât sistemul original și lucrările conexe. Codul și toate datele produse sunt disponibile publicului.', 'so': 'Muujinta afka asalka ah (NLG) waa jarrabka xisaabinta ah oo ka soo saara afka asalka ah foomka macluumaadka ama codka looga sameeyo macluumaadka luuqadda aan luqadda ahayn. Shaqada qorsheynta hoose ee NLG waxaa loola jeedaa farshaxanka expression (REG), kaas oo ku talo gala inuu automatic abuuro hadal aan waxba tarayn si loo magacaabo alaabta ku qoran hadalka. Xiriirid noocyada REG ee saxda ah ma awoodi karo in uu sameeyo hadal looga jeedo oo looga soo jeedo alaabta aan dhamaan xiliga waxbarashada. Si aan u xallino dhibaatadan, waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba sii-socda ee NeuralREG, kaas oo ah sameynta qoraalka qoraalka REG. Kii kowaad waa meymisyo koobi ah, marka labaad waxaa ka mid ah mid ka mid ah wakiilka jinsiga iyo nooca qofka looga jeedo tusaale ahaan input. Markii aad sameyneyso arimaha qiimeynta bilowga iyo waxyaabaha dadka iyo waxbarashada daboolidda ee isticmaalka shabakadda WebNLG, waxaynu ka doodaynaa in horumarintayadu uu u kharribmayo abuuridda farsamada ka sii faa’iido badan muuqashada jaamacadaha qarsoon ee asalka iyo shaqada la xiriira. Codeynta iyo macluumaadka la soo saaray oo dhan waxay ku jiraan bayaan.', 'sv': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) är den beräkningsprocess som genererar naturligt språk i form av text eller röst från icke-språkliga data. En central mikroplaneringsuppgift inom NLG är att referera uttryck generation (REG), som syftar till att automatiskt generera substantivfraser för att referera till entiteter som nämns när diskursen utvecklas. En begränsning av nya REG-modeller är inte att kunna generera referensuttryck till enheter som inte påträffas under utbildningsprocessen. För att lösa detta problem föreslår vi två tillägg till NeuralREG, en state-of-the-art encoder-dekoder REG modell. Den första är en kopieringsmekanism, medan den andra består i att representera referensens kön och typ som input till modellen. Utifrån resultaten av automatisk och mänsklig utvärdering samt en ablationsstudie med hjälp av WebNLG-korpusen hävdar vi att vårt förslag bidrar till att skapa mer meningsfulla referensuttryck till osynliga entiteter än det ursprungliga systemet och relaterade arbetet. Koden och alla producerade data är allmänt tillgängliga.', 'sr': 'Generacija prirodnog jezika (NLG) podataka na tekst je kompjuterski proces stvaranja prirodnog jezika u obliku teksta ili glasa iz nejezičkih podataka. Glavni mikro-planirani zadatak unutar NLG se odnosi na generaciju izraza (REG), koja se cilja automatski stvoriti imenske rečenice da se odnose na entitate spomenute kao otvaranje diskursa. ograničenje novog modela REG-a ne može stvoriti pregovore na entitate koje nisu susreli tokom treninga. Da bi rešili ovaj problem, predlažemo dve proširenje NeuralREG, modelu "state-of-the-art encoder-decoder REG". Prvi je kopijski mehanizam, a drugi se sastoji od predstavljanja spola i vrsta referenta kao ulaganja u model. Uzimajući rezultate automatske i ljudske procjene, kao i proučavanje ablacije korporacijom WebNLG korporacije, tvrdili smo da naš prijedlog doprinosi generaciji značajnijih izraza predviđanja nevidljivim entitetima nego originalnim sistemom i povezanim radom. Kod i sve proizvođene podatke su javno dostupne.', 'si': 'Data- to- text Native language generation (NLG) is the computer process of generation in the form of text or voice from non- language data. Name REG මොඩල් එකේ සීමාවක් සිද්ධ වෙන්න බැරි වෙන්නේ නැහැ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විසඳන්න, අපි න්\u200dයූරාල්රෙජ් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ආර්ට්ට් කෝඩාර් කිරීම්  මුලින්ම තමයි ප්\u200dරතිලිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය සහ WebNLG කොර්පුස් භාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයකට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක කෝඩ් සහ හැම දේවල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ලැබෙනවා.', 'ta': 'Data- to- text Natural Language Generation (NLG) is the computation process of generating natural language in the form of text or voice from non-language data. Name புதிய REG மாதிரிகளின் எல்லைப்படுத்த முடியாது பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டில் எதிர்பாராத பொருட்களுக்கு கூறும் கூற் இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய நாம் நியுரல் REG க்கு இரண்டு விரிவாக்கத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் , ஒரு நிலை- கலை குறியாக் முதல் ஒரு நகல் கருவி தானியங்கி மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பு முடிவுகளின் முடிவுகளை வரையும் மற்றும் வலை NLG குறிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு உறுப்பிட்ட ஆராய்ச்சியின் முடிவுகளை நாம் விரும குறியீடு மற்றும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அனைத்து தரவும் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation NLG کے اندر ایک اصلی میکروٹ پلانیٹ کا کام صرف اثرات کی نسل (REG) کا ارادہ کرتا ہے، جس کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ اپنے ساتھ نوم فریزوں کو پیدا کرے جن کے ذریعہ ذکر ہوئے موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں جن کا ارادہ پردہ ہوتا روانی REG موڈل کی محدودیت نہیں ہے کہ تدریس پرسس کے موقع نہیں ملے ہوئے ایٹنیٹوں کی نسبت مثالیں پیدا کرسکتی ہیں. اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے نورال ریگ کے لئے دو اضافہ کی پیشنهاد کریں، ایک ایٹیٹ کی آنکوڈر ریگ موڈل. پہلا ایک کاپی مکانیسم ہے، حالانکہ دوسرا ایک جنس اور رفنست کی طرح کا نمایش کرنا ہے جس طرح مدل پر وارد ہوتا ہے. ہم نے ویب NLG کورپوس کے استعمال سے آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے نتائج پر ڈرایا تھا کہ ہماری پیشنهاد اصلی سیستم اور رابطہ کے کام سے زیادہ مطلوب واضح واضح واضح کی نسل کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ کیڈ اور تمام پیدا کئے ہوئے ڈاکٹے ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'vi': 'Chương trình phát ngôn ngữ tự động (NLG) là quá trình tính để tạo ra ngôn ngữ tự nhiên dưới dạng chữ hoặc giọng từ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ không ngôn ngữ. Một công việc thiết kế siêu lõi thuộc về NLI là đương tạo biểu thức (SG) nhằm tự động tạo ra các cụm từ danh từ để liên quan đến các thực thể được đề cập trong khi tiết lộ. Một giới hạn của các mô hình mới về đế chế không thể tạo ra biểu hiện chỉ thị cho các thực thể chưa gặp trong quá trình đào tạo. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị thêm hai phần mở rộng đến Neural Regi, một thời trang truyền mã hóa. Thứ nhất là một cơ chế bản sao chép, còn thứ hai là đại diện cho giới tính và kiểu cái mục lục theo mẫu. Dựa trên kết quả của việc đánh giá tự động và con người cũng như một nghiên cứu thoát sử dụng tập đoàn WebNLG, chúng tôi tranh luận rằng đề nghị của chúng tôi góp phần tạo ra những biểu hiện liên quan đến thực thể chưa từng thấy hơn hệ nguyên thủy và tác phẩm liên quan. Mật mã và mọi dữ liệu được sản xuất đều công khai.', 'uz': "Name Name Name Bu muammoga xabar qilish uchun biz NeuralREG'ga ikkita kengaytmalarni talab qilamiz, sanad kodlash usuli. Birinchi birinchi - nusxa mekaniyasi, ammo ikkinchi tomonda modelga kiritilgan jinsiya va tarkibini koʻrsatish mumkin. Biz avtomatik va inson qiymatlari natijalari va WebNLG corpusi yordamida qo'yish tahrirchi natijalarini chiqarishga murakkab qilamiz, bizning rivojlanishimiz asl tizimning asl va bog'liq ishlardan ko'proq narsalarni yaratishdan foydalanishimiz mumkin. Kodlash va barcha yaratilgan maʼlumot Public.", 'bg': 'Генериране на естествен език (НЛГ) е изчислителен процес на генериране на естествен език под формата на текст или глас от нелингвистични данни. Основна задача за микро планиране в НЛГ е генерирането на изрази (РЕГ), което има за цел автоматично генериране на съществителни фрази, които да се отнасят до същности, споменати при разгръщане на дискурса. Ограничение на новите модели REG е невъзможността да се генерират препращащи изрази към субекти, които не са срещани по време на процеса на обучение. За да решим този проблем, предлагаме две разширения на Модел на кодер-декодер. Първият е копиращ механизъм, докато вторият се състои в представяне на пола и вида на референта като входове към модела. Въз основа на резултатите от автоматична и човешка оценка, както и на аблационно проучване с помощта на корпуса твърдим, че нашето предложение допринася за генерирането на по-смислени позоваващи се изрази към невидими обекти от първоначалната система и свързаната с тях работа. Кодът и всички получени данни са публично достъпни.', 'nl': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) is het computerproces van het genereren van natuurlijke taal in de vorm van tekst of stem uit niet-linguïstische gegevens. Een kerntaak van de microplanning binnen NLG is het genereren van verwijzingen (REG), dat erop gericht is automatisch zelfstandige zinnen te genereren om te verwijzen naar entiteiten die worden genoemd als discours zich ontvouwt. Een beperking van nieuwe REG-modellen is niet in staat om verwijzende uitdrukkingen te genereren naar entiteiten die tijdens het opleidingsproces niet zijn tegengekomen. Om dit probleem op te lossen, stellen we twee uitbreidingen voor voor NeuralREG, een state-of-the-art encoder-decoder REG model. Het eerste is een kopieermechanisme, terwijl het tweede bestaat uit het vertegenwoordigen van het geslacht en type van de referent als input voor het model. Op basis van de resultaten van automatische en menselijke evaluatie en een ablatiestudie met behulp van het WebNLG corpus stellen we dat ons voorstel bijdraagt aan het genereren van betekenisvoller verwijzende uitdrukkingen naar onzichtbare entiteiten dan het oorspronkelijke systeem en aanverwante werk. Code en alle geproduceerde gegevens zijn openbaar beschikbaar.', 'da': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) er den beregningsmæssige proces til at generere naturligt sprog i form af tekst eller stemme fra ikke-sproglige data. En central mikroplanlægningsopgave inden for NLG er at henvise til udtryksgenerering (REG), som automatisk har til formål at generere substantivsætninger til at henvise til enheder, der nævnes som diskurs udfolder sig. En begrænsning af nye REG-modeller er ikke i stand til at generere henvisningsudtryk til enheder, der ikke er stødt på under uddannelsesprocessen. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi to udvidelser til NeuralREG, en state-of-the-art encoder-dekoder REG model. Den første er en kopimekanisme, mens den anden består i at repræsentere referentens køn og type som input til modellen. Med udgangspunkt i resultaterne af automatisk og menneskelig evaluering samt en ablationsundersøgelse ved hjælp af WebNLG-korpuset hævder vi, at vores forslag bidrager til genereringen af mere meningsfulde henvisningsudtryk til usynlige enheder end det oprindelige system og relaterede arbejde. Kode og alle producerede data er offentligt tilgængelige.', 'hr': 'Generacija prirodnog jezika (NLG) podataka na tekst je računalni proces proizvodnje prirodnog jezika u obliku teksta ili glasa iz nejezičkih podataka. Osnovni mikroplansiranje zadatak unutar NLG se odnosi na generaciju izraza (REG), čiji je cilj automatski stvoriti ime rečenice da se odnose na entitate spomenute kao otvaranje diskursa. ograničenje novih modela REG-a ne može proizvesti izraze pregovora na entitate koje nisu susreli tijekom procesa obuke. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo dva proširenja NeuralREG, modelu stanja umjetničkog kodera REG-a. Prvi je kopijski mehanizam, a drugi se sastoji od predstavljanja spola i vrsta referenta kao ulaganja u model. S obzirom na rezultate automatske i ljudske procjene, kao i proučavanje ablacije koristeći WebNLG korpus, tvrdili smo da naš prijedlog doprinosi generaciji značajnijih izraza povezivanja nepoznatim subjektima od originalnog sustava i povezanih radova. Kodeks i sve proizvođene podatke su javno dostupni.', 'de': 'Daten-zu-Text Natural Language Generation (NLG) ist der computergestützte Prozess zur Erzeugung natürlicher Sprache in Form von Text oder Stimme aus nicht-linguistischen Daten. Eine zentrale Mikroplanungsaufgabe innerhalb von NLG ist die Generierung von Referencing Expression (REG), die darauf abzielt, automatisch Substantivphrasen zu generieren, um sich auf Entitäten zu beziehen, die während des Diskurses erwähnt werden. Eine Beschränkung neuer REG-Modelle besteht darin, keine Referenzausdrücke für Entitäten zu generieren, die während des Trainingsprozesses nicht angetroffen wurden. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schlagen wir zwei Erweiterungen des NeuralREG vor, einem hochmodernen Encoder-Decoder REG-Modell. Der erste ist ein Kopiermechanismus, während der zweite darin besteht, Geschlecht und Typ des Referenten als Inputs für das Modell darzustellen. Basierend auf den Ergebnissen der automatischen und menschlichen Evaluation sowie einer Ablationsstudie mit dem WebNLG-Korpus behaupten wir, dass unser Vorschlag dazu beiträgt, aussagekräftigere Bezugsausdrücke auf unsichtbare Entitäten zu generieren als das ursprüngliche System und verwandte Arbeiten. Code und alle produzierten Daten sind öffentlich zugänglich.', 'id': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) adalah proses komputasi untuk menghasilkan bahasa alam dalam bentuk teks atau suara dari data bukan bahasa. Tugas mikro-rencana inti dalam NLG merujuk generasi ekspresi (REG), yang bertujuan untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan frasa nama untuk merujuk entitas yang disebut sebagai pembukaan diskors. Sebuah batasan dari model REG baru tidak dapat menghasilkan ekspresi yang merujuk kepada entitas yang tidak ditemui selama proses latihan. Untuk memecahkan masalah ini, kami mengusulkan dua ekstensi ke NeuralREG, model REG pengekode-dekoder state-of-the-art. Yang pertama adalah mekanisme salinan, sementara yang kedua terdiri dari mewakili jenis dan jenis referen sebagai masukan ke model. Menggambarkan hasil dari evaluasi otomatis dan manusia serta sebuah studi ablasi menggunakan WebNLG corpus, kami menegaskan bahwa usulan kami berkontribusi ke generasi yang lebih berarti merujuk ekspresi kepada entitas yang tidak terlihat daripada sistem asli dan pekerjaan terkait. Kode dan semua data yang diproduksi tersedia publik.', 'ko': '데이터-텍스트 자연 언어 생성(Data to text Natural Language Generation, NLG)은 비언어적 데이터로부터 텍스트나 음성 형태의 자연 언어를 생성하는 계산 과정이다.NLG의 핵심 미시적 기획 임무 중 하나는 다생성(REG)을 대표하는 것으로 말이 전개될 때 자동으로 명사 단어를 생성해 언급된 실체를 가리키는 것이 목적이다.신형 REG 모델의 한계 중 하나는 훈련 과정에서 만나지 못한 실체의 인용 표현식을 생성할 수 없다는 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해서 우리는 가장 선진적인 코딩기 REG 모델인 NeuralREG에 대해 두 가지 확장을 제기했다.첫 번째 메커니즘은 복제 메커니즘이고 두 번째 메커니즘은 가리키는 대상의 성별과 유형을 모델의 입력으로 나타낸다.자동 평가와 인공 평가 결과, 웹NLG 어료 라이브러리를 이용한 융해 연구에 따르면 우리의 제안은 원시 시스템과 관련 작업보다 의미 있는 실체가 보이지 않는 인용 표현식을 만드는 데 도움이 된다고 본다.코드와 생성된 모든 데이터는 공개된 것이다.', 'sw': 'Utengenezaji wa lugha ya asili kwa taarifa (NLG) ni mchakato wa kompyuta wa kutengeneza lugha asilia kwa namna ya maandishi au sauti kutoka data isiyo ya lugha. Mpango wa mipango madogo ndani ya NLG unamaanisha kizazi cha kujieleza (REG), ambacho kinakusudia kutengeneza maneno yasiyo na maana yanayomaanisha vitu vinavyotajwa kama mazungumzo yanavyotokea. Uzuizi wa mifano ya riwaya ya REG hauwezi kutengeneza maoni yanayoelezea kwa vyombo ambavyo havikutana wakati wa mchakato wa mafunzo. Ili kutatua tatizo hili, tunapendekeza maendeleo mawili kwa NeuralREG, modeli ya utaratibu wa sanaa ya REG. Kipindi cha kwanza ni mfumo wa nakala, wakati wa pili ni kuwawakilisha jinsia na aina ya maoni kama inavyoweka kwenye mtindo huo. Kutokana na matokeo ya utafiti wa kujitegemea na binadamu pamoja na utafiti wa kuboresha kwa kutumia kampuni ya WebNLG, tunagombana kuwa pendekezo letu linachangia kizazi chenye maana zaidi ya kuelezea maoni ya mambo yasiyo ya kijinsia kuliko mfumo wa asili na kazi inayohusiana. Sheria na taarifa zote zinazozaliwa zinapatikana hadharani.', 'tr': "Data-to-text Natal Dil Bejerilmesi (NLG) dogal dili metin ýa-lingwistiki maglumatdan döretjek sanat prosesidir. NLG içindeki esasy mikro-planlaşdyrma täblisasy ifade döredilmesi (REG) diýmekdir. Bu iň maksady sözleriň açylyk diýmek üçin adly sözleri otomatik ýagdaýda döretmek üçin hedef edýär. REG nusgalarynyň şartlygyny eğitim prosesynda garşylanmadyk bir nusga döredip bilmeýär. Bu meseleni çözmek üçin, biz NeuralREG'a iki eklenti, sanat kodlayıcı REG modelinin durumu teklif ediyoruz. Ilkinji bir nusga mehanizmidir, ikinjisi bolsa cinsiýa we referensiýa nusga görkezilýändir. Otomatik we ynsan değerlendirmeniň netijesine we WebNLG korpusyny ulanan çykyş ylmagynyň netijesine çykyp, teklibimiz başlangyç sistemden we işe görýän zada nähili möhüm bir surat döredigine kömekleýär diýip pikir etdik. Köd we ähli üretilen maglumatlar publikat içinde bar.", 'fa': 'نسخه زبان طبیعی (NLG) داده\u200cها در شکل متن یا صدا از داده\u200cهای غیر زبان\u200cشناسی است. یک وظیفه مرکز برنامه\u200cبندی میکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکروکرو محدودیت مدلهای رمانی REG قادر نیست که تولید توصیف ارتباط ارتباط به عنوان عنوان\u200cهایی که در فرایند آموزش با وجود نداشته\u200cاند تولید کند. تا این مشکل را حل کنیم، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم دو تضاعف به نورالرREG، یک مدل اکoder\u200cهای هنری REG. اولین یک مکانیسم کپی است، در حالی که دومین از نمایش جنسی و نوع مربوط به عنوان وارد مدل است. کشیدن بر نتایج ارزیابی خودکار و انسان و یک مطالعه فعالیت با استفاده از شرکت WebNLG، ما متوجه شدیم که پیشنهاد ما به نسل توصیف های معنی بیشتری نسبت به شرکت های ناشناخته\u200cتر از سیستم اصلی و کار ارتباطی کمک می\u200cکند. کد و تمام داده\u200cهای تولید به طور عمومی دسترسی دارند.', 'af': "Data- to- text Natuurlike Taal Generasie (NLG) is die rekenaar proses van genereer natuurlike taal in die vorm van teks of stem van nie- lingvisse data. 'n Hoor mikro-planning taak binne NLG verwys uitdrukking generasie (REG), wat doel om outomaties nuwe frase te genereer om te verwys na entiteite wat as diskursie oopgemaak word. 'n Begrens van novele REG-modelles is nie in staat om verwysing uitdrukkings te genereer na entiteite wat nie teenoor die oefening proses gekom het nie. Om hierdie probleem te los, voorstel ons twee uitbreidings na NeuralREG, 'n staat van die kuns enkoder-dekoder REG model. Die eerste is 'n kopie mekanisme, terwyl die tweede bestaan van die verslag en tipe van die verwysing as inputs na die model. Teken op die resultate van outomatiese en menslike evaluering en ook 'n ablasie studie met gebruik van die WebNLG korpus, het ons beveel dat ons voorstel bydra aan die generasie van meer betekenlike verwysing uitdrukkings na onversekende entiteite as die oorspronklike stelsel en verwante werk. Kode en alle geproduseerde data is openlik beskikbaar.", 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i gjuhës natyrore (NLG) është procesi llogaritës i gjenerimit të gjuhës natyrore në form ën e tekstit apo zërit nga të dhënat jo-gjuhësore. Një detyrë thelbësore mikroplanifikimi brenda NLG po referon në gjeneratën e shprehjeve (REG), e cila synon automatikisht të gjenerojë fraza emërore për të referuar në njësi të përmendura si zhvillim diskursi. Një kufizim i modeleve të reja REG nuk është në gjendje të gjenerojë shprehje referuese ndaj njësive që nuk janë takuar gjatë procesit të trajnimit. To solve this problem, we propose two extensions to NeuralREG, a state-of-the-art encoder-decoder REG model.  E para është një mekanizëm kopje, ndërsa e dyta përbëhet nga përfaqësimi i gjinit dhe tipit të referentit si hyrje në model. Duke u mbështetur në rezultatet e vlerësimit automatik dhe njerëzor si dhe në një studim ablacioni duke përdorur korpus WebNLG, ne pretendojmë se propozimi ynë kontribuon në gjeneratën e shprehjeve më të kuptueshme që referohen në njësi të padukshme sesa sistemi origjinal dhe puna e lidhur me të. Code and all produced data are publicly available.', 'am': 'የዳታ-to-text Natural language Generation (NLG) is the computation process in the form of text or voice from non-linguistic data. በNLG ውስጥ ያሉ አካባቢ አካባቢ አድራጊ የንግግር አካላት እንዲታወቁ አካባቢዎችን ማድረግ (REG) የሚያስፈልገዋል፡፡ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመፍታት፣ ለኔuralREG የሀገር የ-art encoder-decoder REG model እናሳውቃለን፡፡ መጀመሪያው የኮፒ ምርጫዎች ነው፣ ሁለተኛውም የሴት እና የዓይነቱን ዓይነት በሞዴል ውስጥ ጥያቄ እንዲመስል ነው፡፡ የራሱ እና የሰው ውጤቶች እና የበይነመረብ ጉዳይ እና የዌብ ነፃ ኮርፕስ በመጠቀም አካባቢ ትምህርት እና አካባቢ ትምህርት በመቀናኘት ስርዓት እና ተሟጋቾች ከሥልጣኑ ስርዓት እና ተሟጋቾች ስርዓት ይልቅ ለማስታወቂያው አካባቢዎችን ለመፍጠር እንዲያሳየቅ የኮድ እና የፍጥረት መረጃዎች በህዝብ የተገኙ ናቸው፡፡', 'az': "Data-to-text Natural Language Generation NLG içindəki nütfədə mikro-planlama işləri ifadə ürəklərini (REG) göstərmək istəyir, bu sözlər açılır kimi deyilən entitlərə danışmaq məqsədilə öz-özünə ismi sözləri yaratmaq istəyir. Yeni REG modellərin hədləri təhsil sürətində qarşılaşmayan məsələlərə istifadə etməyə qadir deyildir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, NeuralREG'ə iki genişliyi təklif edirik, sanat kodlayıcı REG modeli. İlk bir kopya mehanizmidir, amma ikincisi cins və referans türünü modeli inputlər kimi göstərməkdir. WebNLG korpusu vasitəsilə avtomatik və insan değerlendirməsinin sonuçlarına və ablasiya çalışmasına görə, təklifimizin başlanğıç sistemindən və əlaqəsiz işlərdən daha anlamsız ifadələrin nəsillərinə kömək edəcəyini iddia etdik. Kod və bütün ürəklənmiş məlumatlar açıq-aşkar mövcuddur.", 'bn': 'ডাটা থেকে টেক্সট প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা জেনারেশন (এনএলজি) হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় লেখা অথবা ভাষার তথ্য থেকে কণ্ঠস্বর তৈরি করার গণনা A core micro-planning task within NLG is referring expression generation (REG), which aims to automatically generate noun phrases to refer to entities mentioned as discourse unfolds.  প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়ার সময় সংযুক্ত বস্তুর ক্ষেত্রে নোভেল রিজি মডেলের সীমাবদ্ধ করা যাচ্ছে না। এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য আমরা নিউরাল রেগের দুটি বিস্তারিত প্রস্তাব করি, একটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের কোডার-ডেকোডার রিজি মডে প্রথমটি একটি কপি মেক্সিম, কিন্তু দ্বিতীয় ব্যবস্থা হচ্ছে যে লিঙ্গের প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে মডেলের প ওয়েব এনএলজি কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মুল্যায়নের ফলাফলের আঁকার জন্যে আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রস্তাব প্রথম সিস্টেম এবং সম্পর্ক কোড এবং প্রাপ্ত তথ্য প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'Generacija prirodnog jezika (NLG) podataka do teksta je računalni proces proizvodnje prirodnog jezika u obliku teksta ili glasa iz nejezičkih podataka. Glavni mikroplansiranje zadatak unutar NLG se odnosi na generaciju izraza (REG), koji se cilja automatski proizvesti imenske rečenice da se odnose na entitate spomenute kao otvaranje diskursa. ograničenje novog modela REG-a ne može stvoriti pregovore na entitate koje nisu susreli tijekom procesa obuke. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo dvije proširenje NeuralREG, modelu state-of-the-art koder-decoder REG. Prvi je kopijski mehanizam, a drugi se sastoji od predstavljanja spola i vrsta referenta kao ulaganja u model. S obzirom na rezultate automatske i ljudske procjene, kao i proučavanje ablacije koristeći WebNLG korpus, tvrdili smo da naš prijedlog doprinosi generaciji značajnijih izraza predviđanja nevidljivim entitetima nego originalnim sistemom i povezanim radom. Kod i sve proizvođene podatke su javno dostupne.', 'hy': 'Տվյալների և տեքստի միջև բնական լեզվի ստեղծման (ՆԼԳ) հաշվարկման գործընթացն է, որը ստեղծում է բնական լեզվի տեքստի կամ ձայնի ձևով ոչ լեզվաբանական տվյալներից: ՆԼԳ-ի մեջ գտնվող հիմնական միկրոպլանավորման խնդիրը նշանակում է արտահայտությունների սերունդ (REG), որը նպատակում է ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծել անվանումների արտահայտություններ, որոնք նշանակում են անվանումներ, որոնք նշանակվում են ան Նոր ՌԵԳ մոդելների սահմանափակումները չեն կարողանում ստեղծել արտահայտություններ, որոնք վերաբերվում են այն միավորներին, որոնք չեն հանդիպել ուսուցման ընթացքում: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու ընդլայնումներ ՆեյրալՌեգ-ի համար, ամենաբարձր կոդեր-կոդեր Ռեգ մոդել: Առաջինը կոպիայի մեխանիզմ է, մինչդեռ երկրորդը կազմված է գենդերային և վերաբերյալ տեսակի ներդրումներից: Հիմնվելով ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատման արդյունքների վրա, ինչպես նաև ՎեբԼԳ կորպուսի օգտագործվող աբլացիոն ուսումնասիրության վրա, մենք պնդում ենք, որ մեր առաջարկությունը ներդրում է ավելի իմաստալից արտահայտությունների ստեղծման մեջ, որոնք վերաբերվում են անտեսանելի էակներին,  Կոդը և բոլոր արտադրված տվյալները հանրային հասանելի են:', 'cs': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) je výpočetní proces generování přirozeného jazyka ve formě textu nebo hlasu z nejazykových dat. Hlavním mikroplánovacím úkolem v rámci NLG je generování referenčních výrazů (REG), jehož cílem je automaticky generovat podstatné fráze odkazující na entity zmíněné v průběhu rozvíjení diskurzu. Omezením nových REG modelů není možnost generovat odkazující výrazy na subjekty, které se během výcviku nesetkali. Pro vyřešení tohoto problému navrhujeme dvě rozšíření NeuralREG, nejmodernějšího modelu snímače a dekodéru REG. První je kopírovací mechanismus, zatímco druhý spočívá v reprezentování pohlaví a typu referenta jako vstupu do modelu. Na základě výsledků automatického a lidského hodnocení a ablační studie s využitím korpusu WebNLG tvrdíme, že náš návrh přispívá k generování smysluplnějších referenčních výrazů na neviděné entity než původní systém a související práce. Kód a veškerá vytvořená data jsou veřejně dostupná.', 'et': 'Looduskeele genereerimine (Data-to-text Natural Language Generation, NLG) on arvutuslik protsess looduskeele genereerimiseks teksti või hääle kujul mittekeelsetest andmetest. NLG mikroplaneerimise põhiülesanne on viidates väljendite genereerimine (REG), mille eesmärk on automaatselt genereerida nimisõnaväljendeid, mis viitavad üksustele, mida nimetatakse diskursuse avanemisel. Uudsete REG-mudelite piiramine seisneb selles, et ei ole võimalik luua viiteväljendeid üksustele, mida koolitusprotsessi käigus ei esine. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja NeuralREG kaks laiendust, kaasaegset kodeerija-dekooder REG mudelit. Esimene on koopiamehhanism, teine aga viitaja sugu ja tüüpi kujutamine mudeli sisendina. Tuginedes automaatse ja inimliku hindamise tulemustele ning WebNLG korpuse abil läbi viidud ablatsiooniuuringule, väidame, et meie ettepanek aitab kaasa nähtamatutele üksustele tähenduslikumate viitavate väljendite loomisele kui algne süsteem ja sellega seotud töö. Kood ja kõik esitatud andmed on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'fi': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) on laskennallinen prosessi luonnollisen kielen tuottamiseksi tekstin tai äänen muodossa ei-kielellisestä datasta. Mikrosuunnittelun ydintehtävä NLG:ssä on viittausilmaisun generointi (REG), jonka tavoitteena on automaattisesti luoda substantiivilauseoita viittaamaan diskurssin edetessä mainittuihin kokonaisuuksiin. Uusien REG-mallien rajoittaminen on se, ettei voida luoda viittausmerkkejä sellaisiin kokonaisuuksiin, joita ei ole havaittu koulutusprosessin aikana. Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kahta laajennusta NeuralREG-malliin, joka on huipputekninen kooder-decoder REG-malli. Ensimmäinen on kopiomekanismi, kun taas toinen koostuu viittauksen sukupuolen ja tyypin esittämisestä mallin syötteinä. Automaattisen ja inhimillisen arvioinnin sekä WebNLG-korpusta tehdyn ablaatiotutkimuksen perusteella väitämme, että ehdotuksemme edistää merkityksellisempien viittausilmaisujen syntymistä näkymättömiin kokonaisuuksiin kuin alkuperäinen järjestelmä ja siihen liittyvä työ. Koodi ja kaikki tuotetut tiedot ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'ca': "La generació de llenguatges naturals (NLG) és el procés computacional de generació de llenguatges naturals en forma de text o veu a partir de dades no lingüístices. Una tasca central de microplanificació dins NLG és referir a la generació d'expressions (REG), que busca generar automàticament frases de noms per referir-se a entitats mencionades com a desenvolupaments de discurs. Una limitació de nous models REG no està en mesura de generar expressions que es refereixen a entitats que no es troben durant el procés d'entrenament. Per resoldre aquest problem a, proposem dues extensions a NeuralREG, un model de codificador-codificador REG més avançat. El primer és un mecanisme de còpia, mentre el segon consisteix en representar el gènere i el tipus del referent com entrades al model. basant-nos en els resultats de l'evaluació automàtica i humana, com i en un estudi d'ablació utilitzant el còrpus WebNLG, sostenim que la nostra proposta contribueix a la generació d'expressions més significatives que refereixen a entitats invisibles que el sistema original i el treball conegut. El codi i totes les dades produïdes estan a disposició del públic.", 'ha': "Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) is the computational process of generating natural language in the form of text or voice from non-linguistic data.  An kama wani aikin micro-yin-zartarwa a cikin NLG yana neman tsari ga salon maganar (TRG), wanda ke yi nufin ya ƙãga wani magana farat ɗaya dõmin ya gane abubuwa zuwa abubuwa da aka faɗa kamar an tsohatar da magana. Tsarin misãlai na GUI na yanzu ba za'a iya ƙiƙiro salon maganar zuwa abubuwa wanda ba ya haɗi ba a lokacin aikin mafarin. To, za mu buɗe wannan muammãni, za'a buƙata sau biyu zuwa NeuralTRG, wata shirin-state-of-the-art encoder-code-R.G. Kiwanne yana da wani matsayi na kodi, kuma da na ƙarami yana cikin mai nuna mazan da nau'in da aka shigar da shi zuwa motsi. Ko ƙari da matsalar ƙidãyayyuta farat da bincike da mutane da da wani littafi na rubutu da amfani da nau'in WebNLG, tuna jãyayya cẽwa karɓoyinmu yana ƙara zuwa ƙarshen mazaɓa da muhimmi zuwa masu basĩri ko aikin da ba'a sani ba na farko. Kode da duk data wanda aka samar da shi yana da ƙayyade.", 'jv': 'Language Generation (NLG) NLG limiting Ditawak dhéwé nglakoni perkoro iki, kita ndhukungno sistem duwe estens seneng pisan NeralaREG, model -state-of-the-arts koder-decoder REG Awak dhéwé iku mekaniyen kopi, soalé kabèh iki dadi mbukak Gambar nggawe gér lan kalih perusahaan kanggo ingkang model. Ngawe Perintah sing dipolehasé perusahaan sistem sing otomatik karo dewek-perusahaan lan karo mulasar tentang kanggo nggambar aturan webNLG , awak dhéwé nyimpen dhéwé nggawe aturan tanggal nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi winih sing gawe nguasai perusahaan winih sing luwih dumadhi uwong sing ora bisa dumadhi sistèm sing open', 'sk': 'Generacija naravnega jezika (Data-to-text Natural Language Generation, NLG) je računalniški proces ustvarjanja naravnega jezika v obliki besedila ali glasu iz nejezikovnih podatkov. Osrednja naloga mikronačrtovanja znotraj NLG je referenčna generacija izrazov (REG), katere cilj je samodejno generirati samostalne stavke, ki se nanašajo na entitete, omenjene kot razvijanje diskurza. Omejitev novih modelov REG je, da ni mogoče ustvariti referenčnih izrazov na subjekte, ki niso bili srečani med postopkom usposabljanja. Za rešitev te težave predlagamo dve razširitvi NeuralREG, najsodobnejšega modela kodirnika-dekoderja REG. Prvi je kopijski mehanizem, drugi pa predstavlja spol in tip referenca kot vhodni vhod v model. Na podlagi rezultatov avtomatske in človeške evalvacije ter ablacijske študije s korpusom WebNLG trdimo, da naš predlog prispeva k ustvarjanju smiselnejših referenčnih izrazov na nevidne entitete kot prvotni sistem in sorodno delo. Koda in vsi pripravljeni podatki so javno dostopni.', 'bo': 'Data-to-text Natural Language Generation (NLG) is the computational process of generating natural language in the form of text or voice from non-linguistic data. NLG ནང་གི་core micro-planning task is referring expression generation (REG), which aims to automatically generate noun phrases to refer to entities mentioned as discourse unfolds. ཚིག་འབྲེལ་གྱི་REG མ་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་དུས་གཏོང་འཆར་བའི་དབུགས་ཆ་སྣང་མེད་བཟོ་ཐུབ་པ། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་ཐབས་འཇུག་གི་དོན་ལྟར་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འཆར་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། དང་པོ་ནི་འདྲ་བཤུ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་ཞིག་རེད། ཀྱང་ན་གཉིས་པ་དེ་སྣང་བ་དང་མིའི་རྣམ་པ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་གཏོང་བྱེད་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིན་གྱིས་རྩོལ་ཞིབ་དང་མིན་ནུས་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་གྲངས་བསྡུར་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་བཤད་སྤྲོད་དེ་ནི་མ་ལག་དང་འབྲེལ་བའ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བྱས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ཐོག་མའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ', 'he': 'דלקת השפה הטבעית (NLG) היא תהליך חישובי ליצור שפה טבעית בצורה של טקסט או קול ממידע לא שפתי. משימה מיקרו-תכנון בעיקרית בתוך NLG מתייחסת לדור ביטוי (REG), שמתכוון ליצור אוטומטית ביטויים בשמות הגבלה של דוגמני REG חדשים אינה מסוגלת ליצור ביטויים שמייחסים ליחידות שלא נפגשו במהלך תהליך האימונים. כדי לפתור את הבעיה הזאת, אנו מציעים שתי התרחשות לנויראלרג, מודל קודד-קודד REG מצוין. הראשון הוא מנגנון עותק, בעוד השני כולל מייצג את המין והסוג של הרפורננט כתוצאות למודל. בהתבסס על תוצאות הערכה האוטומטית והאנושית, כמו גם על מחקר אובלציה בשימוש בקורפוס WebNLG, אנו טוענים שההצעה שלנו תורמת לדור של ביטויים משמעותיים יותר קוד וכל הנתונים המופיעים זמינים לציבור.'}
{'en': 'Automatic Detection of Machine Generated Text : A Critical Survey', 'ar': 'الاكتشاف التلقائي للنص الذي تم إنشاؤه بواسطة الآلة: دراسة نقدية', 'fr': 'Détection automatique du texte généré par la machine\xa0: une enquête critique', 'es': 'Detección automática de texto generado por máquina: un estudio crítico', 'pt': 'Detecção Automática de Texto Gerado por Máquina: Uma Pesquisa Crítica', 'ja': '機械生成テキストの自動検出：重要な調査', 'zh': '自动检测机器生文本:要勘', 'hi': 'मशीन जनरेट किए गए पाठ का स्वत: पता लगाना: एक महत्वपूर्ण सर्वेक्षण', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение сгенерированного машиной текста: критический обзор', 'ga': 'Brath Uathoibríoch Téacs a Ghintear le Meaisín: Suirbhé Chriticiúil', 'ka': 'მაქინის შექმნილი ტექსტის ავტომატური განახსნა: კრიტიკური შენახვა', 'hu': 'A gép által generált szöveg automatikus felismerése: kritikus felmérés', 'el': 'Αυτόματη ανίχνευση κειμένου που παράγεται από μηχανή: Μια κρίσιμη έρευνα', 'kk': 'Құрылған мәтін автоматты түрде анықтау: Критикалық іздеу', 'lt': 'Automatinis mašinos sukelto teksto aptikimas: kritinė apklausa', 'mk': 'Автоматско детектирање на генерираниот текст на машината: Критичко истражување', 'it': 'Rilevamento automatico del testo generato dalla macchina: un sondaggio critico', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Automatik Teks Menjana Mesin: Survey Kritik', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ച പദാവലിയുടെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക: A Critical Survey', 'mt': 'Sejbien Awtomatiku tat-Test Ġenerat mill-Makkinarju: Stħarriġ Kritiku', 'mn': 'Машин үүсгэсэн текст автоматтыг тодорхойлох: Критик судалгаа', 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging av maskinelaga tekst: eit kritisk oppdaging', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie tekstu generowanego maszyną: krytyczne badanie', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a textului generat de mașină: un sondaj critic', 'sr': 'Автоматично откривање произведеnog текста машине: критично исследване', 'so': 'Automatic detection of machine Generated Text: A Critical Survey', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'Automatisk upptäckt av maskingenererad text: En kritisk undersökning', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிப்பு உரையை உருவாக்கு: A Critical Survey', 'ur': 'ماشین پیدا ہوا متخصص کا اٹیک تلاش: ایک کریٹیک تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện cỗ máy Phát ra văn bản: A Critic Survey.', 'bg': 'Автоматично откриване на машинно генериран текст: критично проучване', 'da': 'Automatisk registrering af maskingenereret tekst: En kritisk undersøgelse', 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje proizvedenog teksta stroja: kritično ispitivanje', 'nl': 'Automatische detectie van machinegegenereerde tekst: een kritische enquête', 'de': 'Automatische Erkennung von maschinell erzeugtem Text: Eine kritische Umfrage', 'ko': '기계 생성 텍스트의 자동 검출: 중요한 요약', 'id': 'Deteksi Otomatis Teks Yang Digenerasikan Mesin: Survey Kritik', 'fa': 'شناسایی خودکار متن تولید ماشین: یک تحقیقات جریان', 'sw': 'Kugundua Automatic Machine Generated Text: A Critical Survey', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Ýüklenen Metin Otomatik A ňlamak: A Critical Survey', 'sq': 'Gjetja automatike e tekstit të gjeneruar nga makina: Një sondazh kritik', 'az': 'Makinat yaratdığı mətnin otomatik keşif: A Critical Survey', 'hy': 'A Crimical Survey', 'am': 'Generated Text: A Critical Survey', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Automatski otkrivanje proizvedenog teksta stroja: kritično istraživanje', 'cs': 'Automatická detekce strojově generovaného textu: kritický průzkum', 'ca': 'Automatic Detection of Machine Generated Text: A Critical Survey', 'et': 'Masina genereeritud teksti automaatne tuvastamine: kriitiline uuring', 'fi': 'Automaattinen tunnistus koneella luodusta tekstistä: kriittinen tutkimus', 'jv': 'Attribute', 'sk': 'Samodejno zaznavanje strojno ustvarjenega besedila: kritična raziskava', 'he': 'גילוי אוטומטי של טקסט מיוצר מכונה: חקירה קריטית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Automatic Detection of Machine Generated Text: A critical Survey'}
{'en': 'Text generative models (TGMs) excel in producing text that matches the style of human language reasonably well. Such TGMs can be misused by adversaries, e.g., by automatically generating fake news and fake product reviews that can look authentic and fool humans. Detectors that can distinguish text generated by TGM from human written text play a vital role in mitigating such misuse of TGMs. Recently, there has been a flurry of works from both natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML) communities to build accurate detectors for English. Despite the importance of this problem, there is currently no work that surveys this fast-growing literature and introduces newcomers to important research challenges. In this work, we fill this void by providing a critical survey and review of this literature to facilitate a comprehensive understanding of this problem. We conduct an in-depth error analysis of the state-of-the-art detector and discuss research directions to guide future work in this exciting area.', 'pt': 'Os modelos geradores de texto (TGMs) se destacam na produção de texto que corresponde razoavelmente bem ao estilo da linguagem humana. Esses TGMs podem ser mal utilizados por adversários, por exemplo, gerando automaticamente notícias falsas e avaliações falsas de produtos que podem parecer autênticas e enganar os humanos. Os detectores que podem distinguir o texto gerado pelo TGM do texto escrito humano desempenham um papel vital na mitigação desse uso indevido de TGMs. Recentemente, houve uma enxurrada de trabalhos de comunidades de processamento de linguagem natural (NLP) e aprendizado de máquina (ML) para construir detectores precisos para inglês. Apesar da importância desse problema, atualmente não há nenhum trabalho que examine essa literatura em rápido crescimento e apresente aos recém-chegados importantes desafios de pesquisa. Neste trabalho, preenchemos essa lacuna fornecendo um levantamento crítico e revisão dessa literatura para facilitar uma compreensão abrangente desse problema. Conduzimos uma análise de erro aprofundada do detector de última geração e discutimos as direções de pesquisa para orientar o trabalho futuro nesta área empolgante.', 'fr': "Les modèles génératifs de texte (TGM) excellent dans la production de texte qui correspond assez bien au style du langage humain. De tels TGM peuvent être utilisés à mauvais escient par des adversaires, par exemple en générant automatiquement de fausses nouvelles et de fausses critiques de produits qui peuvent sembler authentiques et tromper les humains. Les détecteurs capables de distinguer le texte généré par TGM du texte écrit par l'homme jouent un rôle essentiel dans l'atténuation de cette mauvaise utilisation des TGM. Récemment, une multitude de travaux ont été réalisés par les communautés de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) et d'apprentissage automatique (ML) pour créer des détecteurs précis pour l'anglais. Malgré l'importance de ce problème, il n'existe actuellement aucun travail qui étudie cette littérature en pleine croissance et présente aux nouveaux arrivants d'importants défis de recherche. Dans ce travail, nous comblons ce vide en fournissant une étude critique et une revue de cette littérature afin de faciliter une compréhension globale de ce problème. Nous effectuons une analyse approfondie des erreurs du détecteur ultramoderne et discutons des orientations de recherche qui guideront les travaux futurs dans ce domaine passionnant.", 'ar': 'تتفوق النماذج المنتجة للنص (TGMs) في إنتاج نص يطابق أسلوب اللغة البشرية بشكل معقول. يمكن للخصوم إساءة استخدام مثل هذه الـ TGMs ، على سبيل المثال ، عن طريق إنشاء أخبار مزيفة ومراجعات زائفة للمنتجات تلقائيًا يمكن أن تبدو حقيقية وتخدع البشر. تلعب أجهزة الكشف التي يمكن أن تميز النص الذي تم إنشاؤه بواسطة TGM عن النص المكتوب من قبل الإنسان دورًا حيويًا في التخفيف من سوء استخدام TGMs. في الآونة الأخيرة ، كانت هناك سلسلة من الأعمال من مجتمعات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) والتعلم الآلي (ML) لبناء أجهزة كشف دقيقة للغة الإنجليزية. على الرغم من أهمية هذه المشكلة ، لا يوجد حاليًا أي عمل يقوم بمسح هذه الأدبيات سريعة النمو ويقدم للقادمين الجدد تحديات بحثية مهمة. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بملء هذا الفراغ من خلال توفير مسح ومراجعة نقدية لهذه الأدبيات لتسهيل فهم شامل لهذه المشكلة. نجري تحليل خطأ متعمق لجهاز الكشف الحديث ونناقش اتجاهات البحث لتوجيه العمل المستقبلي في هذا المجال المثير.', 'es': 'Los modelos generativos de texto (TGM) se destacan en la producción de texto que coincide razonablemente bien con el estilo del lenguaje humano. Estos TGM pueden ser mal utilizados por los adversarios, por ejemplo, al generar automáticamente noticias falsas y reseñas de productos falsas que pueden parecer auténticas y engañar a los humanos. Los detectores que pueden distinguir el texto generado por la TGM del texto escrito por humanos desempeñan un papel vital en la mitigación de tal uso indebido de las TGM. Recientemente, ha habido un aluvión de trabajos de las comunidades de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) y aprendizaje automático (ML) para construir detectores precisos para el inglés. A pesar de la importancia de este problema, actualmente no hay ningún trabajo que estudie esta literatura de rápido crecimiento y presente a los recién llegados a importantes desafíos de investigación. En este trabajo, llenamos este vacío proporcionando un estudio crítico y una revisión de esta literatura para facilitar una comprensión integral de este problema. Llevamos a cabo un análisis de errores en profundidad del detector de última generación y discutimos las direcciones de investigación para guiar el trabajo futuro en esta apasionante área.', 'ja': 'テキスト生成モデル（ TGM ）は、人間の言語のスタイルに合理的に一致するテキストを生成することに優れています。 そのようなＴＧＭは、例えば、本物の人間を騙すように見える偽ニュース及び偽製品レビューを自動的に生成することによって、敵対者によって悪用される可能性がある。 ＴＧＭによって生成されたテキストを人間の書き込まれたテキストから区別することができる検出器は、ＴＧＭのそのような誤用を軽減する上で重要な役割を果たす。 最近、自然言語処理（ NLP ）と機械学習（ ML ）の両方のコミュニティから、英語の正確な検出器を構築するための作品がたくさんあります。 この問題の重要性にもかかわらず、現在、この急速に成長している文献を調査し、新人に重要な研究課題を紹介する仕事はありません。 この研究では、この問題の包括的な理解を促進するために、この文献の批判的な調査とレビューを提供することによって、この空白を埋めます。 最先端の検出器の誤差解析を深く行い、このエキサイティングな領域での今後の作業を導くための研究の方向性について話し合います。', 'hi': 'पाठ उत्पादक मॉडल (टीजीएम) पाठ के उत्पादन में उत्कृष्टता प्राप्त करते हैं जो मानव भाषा की शैली से काफी अच्छी तरह से मेल खाता है। इस तरह के टीजीएम का विरोधियों द्वारा दुरुपयोग किया जा सकता है, उदाहरण के लिए, स्वचालित रूप से नकली समाचार और नकली उत्पाद समीक्षाएं उत्पन्न करके जो प्रामाणिक और मूर्ख इंसानों को देख सकते हैं। मानव लिखित पाठ से टीजीएम द्वारा उत्पन्न पाठ को अलग करने वाले डिटेक्टर टीजीएम के इस तरह के दुरुपयोग को कम करने में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। हाल ही में, अंग्रेजी के लिए सटीक डिटेक्टरों का निर्माण करने के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) और मशीन लर्निंग (एमएल) दोनों समुदायों से कार्यों की बाढ़ आ गई है। इस समस्या के महत्व के बावजूद, वर्तमान में ऐसा कोई काम नहीं है जो इस तेजी से बढ़ते साहित्य का सर्वेक्षण करता है और नए लोगों को महत्वपूर्ण शोध चुनौतियों से परिचित कराता है। इस काम में, हम इस समस्या की एक व्यापक समझ को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए इस साहित्य का एक महत्वपूर्ण सर्वेक्षण और समीक्षा प्रदान करके इस शून्य को भरते हैं। हम अत्याधुनिक डिटेक्टर का एक गहन त्रुटि विश्लेषण करते हैं और इस रोमांचक क्षेत्र में भविष्य के काम का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए अनुसंधान दिशाओं पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'zh': '文本生成模样 (TGM) 善生人言语风格相当的文本。 此TGM可以滥用于敌,而自生假新闻伪之论,可以见真实而愚人也。 可以TGM生之本,区别人伦之检测器,用于损益TGM滥用之至要,近自然语言处(NLP)机器学(ML)社区皆有一系而建正英语检测器。 虽然,未有事而求快速增长之文,新来者以挑战为事。 于是文献批判性考实之,以趣该解。 先进之探测器,讨论方面,以导激动人心方。', 'ru': 'Текстовые генерирующие модели (TGM) превосходят в создании текста, который достаточно хорошо соответствует стилю человеческого языка. Такие ТГМ могут быть использованы злоумышленниками, например, путем автоматического создания фейковых новостей и отзывов о фейковых продуктах, которые могут выглядеть аутентично и обманывать людей. Детекторы, которые могут отличать текст, сгенерированный TGM, от человеческого письменного текста, играют жизненно важную роль в смягчении такого неправильного использования TGM. В последнее время, шквал работ от естественн Обработки Языка (NLP) и сообществ машинного обучения (ML) для того чтобы построить точные детекторы для Английского. Несмотря на важность этой проблемы, в настоящее время не ведется никакой работы по изучению этой быстрорастущей литературы и ознакомлению новичков с важными исследовательскими задачами. В этой работе мы заполняем этот пробел, предоставляя критический обзор и обзор этой литературы, чтобы облегчить всестороннее понимание этой проблемы. Мы дирижируем глубокий анализ ошибки современного детектора и обсуждаем направления исследования для того чтобы направлять будущую работу в этой exciting зоне.', 'ga': 'Is fearr le samhlacha ginte téacs (TGManna) téacs a tháirgeadh a thagann go réasúnta maith le stíl na teanga daonna. Is féidir le naimhdeacha mí-úsáid a bhaint as TGManna den sórt sin, m.sh., trí nuacht bhréige agus léirmheasanna ar tháirgí bréige a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch a d’fhéadfadh cuma bharántúil agus amadán a thabhairt do dhaoine. Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag brathadóirí atá in ann téacs a ghineann TGM a idirdhealú ó théacs scríofa daonna chun mí-úsáid den sórt sin TGManna a mhaolú. Le déanaí, tá flúirse saothar ó phobail próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) agus meaisínfhoghlama (ML) araon chun brathadóirí cruinne a thógáil don Bhéarla. In ainneoin thábhacht na faidhbe seo, níl aon obair ann faoi láthair a dhéanann suirbhé ar an litríocht seo atá ag fás go tapa agus a thugann dúshláin taighde tábhachtacha do dhaoine nua. Sa saothar seo, líonaimid an neamhní seo trí shuirbhé criticiúil agus athbhreithniú ar an litríocht seo a sholáthar chun tuiscint chuimsitheach ar an bhfadhb seo a éascú. Déanaimid mionanailís earráide ar an mbrathadóir úrscothach agus pléimid treoracha taighde chun obair sa todhchaí sa réimse spreagúil seo a threorú.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα δημιουργίας κειμένου (ΤΜΣ) υπερέχουν στην παραγωγή κειμένου που ταιριάζει αρκετά καλά με το ύφος της ανθρώπινης γλώσσας. Τέτοια TGM μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν καταχρηστικά από τους αντιπάλους, π.χ., δημιουργώντας αυτόματα ψεύτικα νέα και ψεύτικες κριτικές προϊόντων που μπορούν να φαίνονται αυθεντικές και να ξεγελάσουν τους ανθρώπους. Οι ανιχνευτές που μπορούν να διακρίνουν το κείμενο που παράγεται από το TGM από το ανθρώπινο γραπτό κείμενο διαδραματίζουν ζωτικό ρόλο στον μετριασμό αυτής της κατάχρησης TGM. Πρόσφατα, έχει υπάρξει μια πληθώρα έργων τόσο από κοινότητες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας (και μηχανικής μάθησης (ML) για την κατασκευή ακριβών ανιχνευτών για τα αγγλικά. Παρά τη σημασία αυτού του προβλήματος, επί του παρόντος δεν υπάρχει έργο που να διερευνά αυτή τη ταχέως αναπτυσσόμενη βιβλιογραφία και να εισάγει τους νεοεισερχόμενους σε σημαντικές ερευνητικές προκλήσεις. Σε αυτή την εργασία, γεμίζουμε αυτό το κενό παρέχοντας μια κριτική έρευνα και ανασκόπηση αυτής της βιβλιογραφίας για να διευκολύνουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη κατανόηση αυτού του προβλήματος. Διεξάγουμε μια σε βάθος ανάλυση σφαλμάτων του ανιχνευτή τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και συζητάμε ερευνητικές κατευθύνσεις για να καθοδηγήσουμε μελλοντικές εργασίες σε αυτόν τον συναρπαστικό τομέα.', 'hu': 'A szöveggenerációs modellek (TGM-ek) kiválóak abban, hogy olyan szövegeket állítsanak elő, amelyek megfelelnek az emberi nyelv stílusához. Az ilyen TGM-eket az ellenségek visszaélhetik, például olyan hamis hírek és hamis termékek értékelések automatikus generálásával, amelyek hitelesnek tűnnek és megtéveszthetik az embereket. Azok az érzékelők, amelyek meg tudják különböztetni a TGM által generált szöveget az emberi írott szövegtől, létfontosságú szerepet játszanak a TGM-ekkel való visszaélés enyhítésében. A közelmúltban rengeteg munka történt mind a természetes nyelvfeldolgozó (NLP), mind a gépi tanulás (ML) közösségekből, hogy pontos detektorokat építsenek az angol nyelvre. A probléma jelentősége ellenére jelenleg nincs olyan munka, amely felmérné ezt a gyorsan növekvő irodalmat, és az újonnan érkezőket fontos kutatási kihívásokhoz vezetné be. Ebben a munkában a probléma átfogó megértésének elősegítése érdekében kritikus felméréssel és áttekintéssel töltjük ki ezt az űrt. Mélyreható hibaelemzést végzünk a korszerű detektorokról, és megvitatjuk a kutatási irányokat, amelyek irányítják a jövőbeli munkát ezen az izgalmas területen.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის გენერაციული მოდელები ასეთი TGM-ები შეიძლება შეცდომად გამოყენება, მაგალითად, ავტომატურად შექმნა ტალქტური ნუზები და ტალქტური პროდისტის რეცენტი, რომელიც შეიძლება ავტონტიკური და ტალქ დეტექტორი, რომლებიც TGM-ის შექმნილი ტექსტის განსხვავება ადამიანის წერილი ტექსტიდან იყოს გასაკეთებელი პროლია TGM-ის შეცდომა გამოყენებაში. მიმდინარე, საბოლოო ენის პროცესი (NLP) და მაქინის სწავლების (ML) საზოგადოებებიდან მუშაობის ფლური იყო, რომ ინგლისურად მარტივი deteქტორის შექმნა. ამ პრობლემას მნიშვნელოვანობას მაგრამ, ახლა არსებობს სამუშაო, რომელიც ამ სიჩქარე წარმოადგენს ლიტურატიას და ახალგაზრდები მნიშვნელოვანი სწორედ გა ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ამას გავუყენებთ კრიტიკური შემოწმებით და ამ ლიტურატის შესახებით, რომ ამ პრობლემას ყველაფერი გავიგოთ. ჩვენ შეცდომის ანალიზაციას გავაკეთებთ სურათების განსაზღვრებას და განსაზღვრებით სწორედ განსაზღვრებას მომავალი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო.', 'it': "I modelli generativi di testo (TGM) eccellono nella produzione di testo che corrisponda ragionevolmente bene allo stile del linguaggio umano. Tali TGM possono essere abusati dagli avversari, ad esempio generando automaticamente notizie false e recensioni di prodotti falsi che possono sembrare autentici e ingannare gli esseri umani. I rivelatori in grado di distinguere il testo generato dal TGM dal testo scritto umano svolgono un ruolo fondamentale nel mitigare tale uso improprio dei TGM. Recentemente, c'è stato un flusso di lavori sia da comunità di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP) che di apprendimento automatico (ML) per costruire rivelatori accurati per l'inglese. Nonostante l'importanza di questo problema, al momento non c'è lavoro che analizzi questa letteratura in rapida crescita e introduca i nuovi arrivati a importanti sfide di ricerca. In questo lavoro, colmiamo questo vuoto fornendo un'indagine critica e una revisione di questa letteratura per facilitare una comprensione completa di questo problema. Conduciamo un'analisi approfondita degli errori del rivelatore all'avanguardia e discutiamo le direzioni di ricerca per guidare il lavoro futuro in questa entusiasmante area.", 'lt': 'Tekstų kūrimo modeliai (TGM) puikiai gamina tekstą, kuris pakankamai gerai atitinka žmogaus kalbos stilą. Tokius TGM gali piktnaudžiauti priešininkai, pvz., automatiškai sukuriant suklastotas naujienas ir suklastotas produktų peržiūras, kurios gali atrodyti autentiškos ir kvailios žmonės. Detektoriai, kurie gali atskirti GMT sukeltą tekstą nuo žmogaus rašytinio teksto, atlieka gyvybiškai svarbų vaidmenį mažinant tokį piktnaudžiavimą GMT. Pastaruoju metu natūralaus kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) ir mašininio mokymosi (ML) bendruomenės atliko daug darbų, kad būtų sukurti tikslūs anglų kalbos detektoriai. Nepaisant šios problemos svarbos, šiuo metu nėra jokio darbo, kuris apžvelgtų šią sparčiai augančią literatūrą ir įvestų naujuosius į svarbius mokslinių tyrimų uždavinius. Šiame darbe užpildome šį trūkumą, atlikdami kritinį tyrimą ir peržiūrėdami šią literatūrą, kad būtų lengviau visapusiškai suprasti šią problem ą. We conduct an in-depth error analysis of the state-of-the-art detector and discuss research directions to guide future work in this exciting area.', 'mk': 'Текст генерирачки модели (ТГМ) се извонредни во производството на текст кој прилично добро го одговара стилот на човечкиот јазик. Таквите ТГМ можат да бидат злоупотребени од страна на противниците, на пример, со автоматски генерирање лажни вести и лажни рецензии на производите кои можат да изгледаат автентични и луди луѓе. Детекторите кои можат да го разликуваат текстот генериран од ТГМ од човековиот напишан текст имаат важна улога во олеснувањето на ваквата злоупотреба на ТГМ. Неодамна, постои многу дела од заедниците на природното обработување јазик (НЛП) и машинско учење (МЛ) за изградба на прецизни детектори за англиски јазик. И покрај важноста на овој проблем, моментално нема работа која ја испитува оваа брзорастечка литература и ги претставува новите литератури на важни истражувачки предизвици. Во оваа работа, ја пополнуваме оваа празнина со обезбедување критичко истражување и преглед на оваа литература за олеснување на сеопфатното разбирање на овој проблем. Правиме длабока анализа на грешките на најдобриот детектор и разговараме за насоките на истражувањето за водење на идната работа во оваа возбудлива област.', 'kk': 'Адам тілінің стиліне сәйкес келетін мәтінді жасау үлгілері (TGM) жасау үлгілерінде өте жақсы. Бұл TGM қарсы қарсы қолданылады, мысалы, автоматты түрде жалғыз жаңалықтар мен жалғыз продукттарды қарастырып, автоматты түрде автоматты түрде адамдарды автоматты түрде көрсетеді. TGM жасалған мәтінді адамдардың жазылған мәтінді таңдауға мүмкіндік беретін анықтаушылар TGM қате пайдалануын бағалау үшін маңызды роль ойлады. Жуырда, ағылшынша дұрыс анықтаушыларды құру үшін, негізгі тіл процессорының (NLP) және машиналық оқыту (ML) қоғамдарының жұмыс істері бар. Бұл мәселедің маңыздысына қарай, қазіргі уақытта өстірген әдебиетті зерттеу жұмыс жоқ жұмыс, жаңа келімдерді маңызды зерттеу мәселелеріне көмектесу жұмы Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз бұл бос мәселеді түсінуге көмектесу үшін бұл әдебиеттің көпшілігін жұмыс істеу және қарау арқылы бұл бос мәселеді толтыруға Біз оқиғаның күйін анықтаушысының тереңдігін анализ және зерттеу бағыттарын осы қызықтық аумағында болашақ жұмысты бағыттау үшін талқылаймыз.', 'ms': 'Model pembuatan teks (TGMs) melebihi dalam menghasilkan teks yang sepadan dengan gaya bahasa manusia dengan cukup baik. TGM seperti ini boleh salah digunakan oleh musuh, cth. dengan secara automatik menghasilkan berita palsu dan ulasan produk palsu yang boleh kelihatan asli dan bodoh manusia. Pengesan yang boleh membezakan teks yang dijana oleh TGM dari teks tertulis manusia bermain peran penting dalam mengurangi penggunaan salah TGM tersebut. Baru-baru ini, ada banyak pekerjaan dari komuniti pemprosesan bahasa alam (NLP) dan pembelajaran mesin (ML) untuk membina pengesan yang tepat untuk bahasa Inggeris. Walaupun penting masalah ini, sekarang tiada kerja yang menyiasat literatur yang berkembang cepat ini dan memperkenalkan orang baru kepada cabaran penyelidikan yang penting. Dalam kerja ini, kita mengisi kosong ini dengan menyediakan penyelidikan kritikal dan revisyen literatur ini untuk memudahkan pemahaman komprensif masalah ini. Kami melakukan analisis ralat mendalam pengesan state-of-the-art dan membincangkan arah kajian untuk memimpin kerja masa depan di kawasan yang menarik ini.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യന്റെ ഭാഷയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പൊരുതുന്ന പദാവലി ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പദാവലി ജനററിവ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d (ടിജിഎസ് ഇതുപോലുള്ള ടിജിഎസ് വിരോധികളാല്\u200d തെറ്റായി ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ കള്ളവാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതും വ്യാജവാര്\u200dത്തകവും വിഡ്ഢികള ടിജിഎം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മനുഷ്യരുടെ എഴുതിയ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുവെക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന അടുത്തുതന്നെ, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ജോലിയുടെ പ്രവർത്തനവും ഉണ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെങ്കിലും ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ഈ വേഗം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാഹിത്യത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജോലിയ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ ഗുരുതരമായ ഒരു പരിശോധനവും പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും കൊണ്ട് ഈ സാഹിത്യത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കു We conduct an in-depth error analysis of the state-of-the-art detector and discuss research directions to guide future work in this exciting area.', 'mn': 'Хүн хэлийн хэлбэртэй адилхан мөнгө бий болгох текст бүтээмжийн загварууд (TGM) илүү их байдаг. Ийм TGM-г эсрэг хүмүүст буруу хэрэглэж болно. Жишээ нь, хуурамч мэдээ, хуурамч бүтээгдэхүүний шинжилгээг автоматаар бүтээж болно. TGM-ийн бичсэн текстүүдийг хүн төрөлхтний бичсэн текстүүдийг тодорхойлж чадах detektors TGM-ын буруу хэрэглээ багасгах нь чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Сүүлийн үед байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн (NLP) болон машин суралцах (ML) нийгмийн хоёр дахь зөв англи хэлний шинжлэх ухааныг зохиохын тулд олон ажиллагаа гарсан. Энэ асуудлын чухал ач холбоотой ч одоо энэ хурдан өссөн уран зохиолыг судалж, шинэ ирсэн хүмүүсийг хамгийн чухал судалгааны сорилтуудад танилцуулдаг ажил байхгүй. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид энэ хоосон байдлыг дүүргэдэг. Энэ уран зохиолын шинжилгээ, энэ асуудлыг бүрэн ойлгохын тулд дэлгэрүүлэх боломжтой. Бид урлагийн судлаачын үндсэн талаар гүн гүнзгий алдаа шинжилгээ хийж, энэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийн ирээдүйн ажлыг удирдах судалгааны замаар ярилцдаг.', 'mt': "Mudelli ġenerattivi tat-test (TGMs) eċċellenti fil-produzzjoni ta’ test li jaqbel mal-istil tal-lingwa umana raġonevolment tajjeb. Dawn it-TGMs jistgħu jintużaw ħażin mill-avversarji, pereżempju billi jiġġeneraw awtomatikament aħbarijiet foloz u reviżjonijiet tal-prodotti foloz li jistgħu jidhru awtentiċi u foloz tal-bnedmin. Detectors that can distinguish text generated by TGM from human written text play a vital role in mitigating such misuse of TGMs.  Dan l-a ħħar, kien hemm ċaqliq ta’ xogħlijiet kemm mill-komunitajiet tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP) kif ukoll mit-tagħlim tal-magni (ML) biex jinbnew detetturi preċiżi għall-Ingliż. Minkejja l-importanza ta’ din il-problema, bħalissa m’hemm l-ebda xogħol li jistħarreġ din il-letteratura li qed tikber malajr u jintroduċi persuni ġodda għal sfidi importanti ta’ riċerka. F’din il-ħidma, a ħna nimlew dan il-vojt billi nipprovdu stħarriġ kritiku u reviżjoni ta’ din il-letteratura biex niffaċilitaw fehim komprensiv ta’ din il-problem a. Għandna nagħmlu analiżi tal-iżbalji fil-fond tad-detettur tal-aktar avvanzat u niddiskutu direzzjonijiet ta' riċerka biex niggwidaw ix-xogħol futur f'dan il-qasam eċċitanti.", 'no': 'Tekstgenerativ modeller (TGM) er unngåande i produksjonen av tekst som passar til stilen til menneskelig språk. Desse TGM kan feil brukast av mottakarar, f.eks. ved å laga falske nyhetar og falske produktrevisjonar som kan sjå autentisk og feil mennesker. Oppdagarar som kan distisera teksten laga av TGM frå menneskelig skriven tekst speler ein viktig rolle i å gjera slik feil bruk av TGM. Nyleg har det vært ein florry av arbeid frå både naturspråkshandtering (NLP) og maskinelæring (ML) for å bygge nøyaktige detektarar for engelsk. I tross av viktigheten til dette problemet er det ikkje noko arbeid som undersøker denne raskt utviklinga og introduserer nye kommander til viktige forskningsutfordringar. I denne arbeiden fyller vi denne tømmen ved å gjera eit kritisk undersøking og gjennomsikt av denne literaturen for å gjera ei komplett forståelse av dette problemet. Vi gjer ein feilanalyse i dybde av kunstdetektoren og diskuterer forskningsretningar for å hjelpa framtidige arbeid i denne oppmerksområdet.', 'sr': 'Generativni modeli teksta (TGM) iznad proizvodnje teksta koji odgovara stilu ljudskog jezika razumno dobro. Takve TGM mogu pogrešno iskoristiti neprijatelji, na primer, automatski proizvedenjem lažnih vijesti i lažnih pregleda proizvoda koji mogu izgledati autentične i budale ljude. Detektori koji mogu da razlikuju tekst koji je proizveden TGM od ljudskog pisanog teksta igraju vitalnu ulogu u smanjenju takve pogrešne upotrebe TGM-a. Nedavno je postojala flerija radova iz zajednica prirodnog obradivanja jezika (NLP) i mašinskog učenja (ML) da izgrade tačne detektore za engleski jezik. Uprkos važnosti ovog problema, trenutno nema posla koji istražuje ovu brzo rastuću literaturu i predstavlja nove dolaze važnim istraživačkim izazovima. U ovom poslu ispunjavamo ovo prazno pružajući kritično istraživanje i pregled ove literature kako bi olakšali sveobuhvatno razumijevanje ovog problem a. Provodimo duboku analizu greške države detektora umjetnosti i razgovaramo o istraživačkim smjerovima kako bi vodili budući rad u ovom uzbudljivom području.', 'ro': 'Modelele generative de text (TGM) excelează în producerea de text care se potrivește stilului limbajului uman destul de bine. Astfel de TGM-uri pot fi utilizate greșit de adversari, de exemplu, generând automat știri false și recenzii false de produse care pot arăta autentice și păcăli oamenii. Detectorii care pot distinge textul generat de TGM de textul scris uman joacă un rol vital în atenuarea unei astfel de utilizări abuzive a TGM-urilor. Recent, a existat un flux de lucrări atât din comunitățile de procesare a limbii naturale (PNL) cât și din comunitățile de învățare automată (ML) pentru a construi detectoare precise pentru limba engleză. În ciuda importanței acestei probleme, în prezent nu există lucrări care să analizeze această literatură în creștere rapidă și să introducă noii veniți la provocări importante de cercetare. În această lucrare, umplem acest gol oferind un studiu critic și o revizuire a acestei literaturi pentru a facilita o înțelegere cuprinzătoare a acestei probleme. Realizăm o analiză aprofundată a erorilor detectorului de ultimă generație și discutăm direcțiile de cercetare pentru a ghida activitatea viitoare în acest domeniu interesant.', 'pl': 'Modele generacyjne tekstu (TGM) doskonale sprawdzają się w tworzeniu tekstu, który dobrze pasuje do stylu ludzkiego języka. Takie TGM mogą być nadużywane przez przeciwników, np. poprzez automatyczne generowanie fałszywych wiadomości i fałszywych recenzji produktów, które mogą wyglądać autentycznie i oszukać ludzi. Detektory, które potrafią odróżnić tekst generowany przez TGM od tekstu pisanego przez człowieka, odgrywają istotną rolę w łagodzeniu takiego niewłaściwego wykorzystania TGM. Ostatnio pojawiło się mnóstwo prac zarówno ze społeczności przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP), jak i uczenia maszynowego (ML), aby zbudować dokładne detektory dla angielskiego. Pomimo znaczenia tego problemu, obecnie nie ma prac, które badają tę szybko rozwijającą się literaturę i wprowadzają nowych osób do ważnych wyzwań badawczych. W niniejszej pracy wypełniamy tę pustkę, zapewniając krytyczne badanie i przegląd tej literatury, aby ułatwić kompleksowe zrozumienie tego problemu. Przeprowadzamy dogłębną analizę błędów najnowocześniejszego detektora i omawiamy kierunki badań, które będą kierować przyszłymi pracami w tej ekscytującej dziedzinie.', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha dhaqanka ee qoraalka (TGMs) waxaa ka sarreeya dhaqashada qoraal oo u eg qaababka luqada dadka si wanaagsan. Taas oo kale TGMs waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa cadaawayaasha, tusaale ahaan dhaqdhaqaaqyada warqada been ah iyo baaritaanka waxyaabaha beenta ah e e looga jeedi karo dad daahir ah iyo nacasyo. Qoraalka kala sooci kara qoraalka TGM oo ka soo dhashay qoraalka biniaadamka waxay leeyihiin qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan isticmaalka TGMs. Muddo u dhowaad, waxaa laga helay shuqullo ka mid ah baaraandegista afka dabiicadda ah (NLP) iyo waxbarashada machine (ML) si ay u dhisaan hagitayaasha afka Ingiriiska si saxda ah. Inta kastoo ay muhiim u tahay dhibaatadan, hadda ma jirto shuqul ku baaraya fasaxan oo dhaqdhaqaaqi ah iyo kuwa cusub waxay u soo bandhigaan dhibaatooyinka baaritaanka muhiimka ah. Markaas waxan ayaannu buuxinaynaa voidkan baaritaanka muhiimka ah iyo baaritaankan si aan u fududayno garashada dhibaatadan. Anagu waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka khaladda deegaanka ah ee xaaladda farshaxanta, waxaynu kala sheekeynaynaa hagitaanka waxbarashada si aan u hagno shaqada mustaqbalka ah ee halkan xiisaysan.', 'sv': 'Textgenerativa modeller (TGM) utmärker sig när det gäller att producera text som matchar stilen i mänskligt språk ganska bra. Sådana TGM kan missbrukas av motståndare, t.ex. genom att automatiskt generera falska nyheter och falska produktrecensioner som kan se autentiska ut och lura människor. Detektorer som kan skilja text som genereras av TGM från mänsklig skriftlig text spelar en avgörande roll för att motverka sådant missbruk av TGM. Nyligen har det förekommit en uppsjö av verk från både naturliga språkbehandlingsgrupper (NLP) och maskininlärning (ML) för att bygga korrekta detektorer för engelska. Trots problemets betydelse finns det för närvarande inget arbete som undersöker denna snabbväxande litteratur och introducerar nyanlända till viktiga forskningsutmaningar. I detta arbete fyller vi detta tomrum genom att tillhandahålla en kritisk undersökning och genomgång av denna litteratur för att underlätta en omfattande förståelse av detta problem. Vi genomför en djupgående felanalys av den senaste detektorn och diskuterar forskningsriktningar för att vägleda framtida arbete inom detta spännande område.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු භාෂාවේ සාමාන්\u200dය හොඳින් සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය වෙන්න පාළුවන් පිළිබඳ ප අනිවාර්යෝ TGM වලින් විරෝධියෝ වලින් වැරදි පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන්, උදාහරණයෙන්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් බොරු වාර් TGM වලින් ලියපු පාළුවෙන් ලියපු පාළුවෙන් පරීක්ෂකයෙන් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂකයෙන් මිනිස්සු ලියපු ප අලුත් වෙලාවට, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) සහ පණිවිධානය (ML) සම්මාජිකයෙන් සිද්ධ පරීක්ෂකය නිර් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ වැදගත් වුනත්, මේ වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වැඩක් නෑ මේ වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ මේ වැඩේදී, අපි මේ විනාශයක් පුරවන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන සම්පූර්ණ විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුරවන්න සහ අපි ගොඩක් ගොඩක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් පරීක්ෂකයේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් කතා කරනවා අනාගතයේ වැඩේ මේ ප්\u200d', 'ta': 'உரை பொருத்தமான மாதிரிகள் (TGMs) உரையை உருவாக்குவதில் மேலானது, அது மனித மொழியின் பாணியை சரியாக பொருந்தும். தானாகவே பொய் செய்தி மற்றும் பொய் செய்தி மற்றும் பொய்யான பொருள் முடிவு மனிதர்களை உருவாக்கும் போலி முட்டாள்களால் இந்த TGMs தவறாக பயன TGM உரை உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரையை மனித எழுதிய உரையிலிருந்து பிரித்துக் கொள்ளும் கண்டுபிடிப்பாளர்கள் TGMs போன்ற தவறான பயன்பாட சமீபத்தில், இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் (NLP) மற்றும் இயந்திரம் கற்றல் (ML) சமூகத்திற்கு சரியான கண்காணிப்பாளர்களை உருவாக்க வேண்டும். இந்த பிரச்சனையின் முக்கியமாக இருந்தாலும், தற்போது இந்த வேகமான வளர்ந்து வரும் எழுத்தாக்கத்தைப் பரிசோதிக்கும் வேலை இல்லை ப இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இந்த காலியை நிரப்புகிறோம் ஒரு சிக்கலான ஆய்வு மற்றும் இந்த நாட்சியைப் பற்றி புரிந்து கொள்ள முடிய நாங்கள் ஆழமான பிழை ஆய்வு செய்து இந்த சுவாரஸ்யமான பகுதியில் எதிர்கால வேலையை நேர்வழி காட்டுவதற்கான ஆராய்ச்சி திசைகளை', 'ur': 'Text generative models (TGMs) in producing text that matches the style of human language reasonably well. ایسی TGM کو دشمنوں کے ذریعے غلط استعمال کر سکتے ہیں، جیسا کہ اپنے ساتھ جھوٹی خبریں اور جھوٹی محصولات کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں جو حقیقی اور بے وقوف انسانوں کی طرح بن سکتے ہیں۔ ڈیٹاکٹروں جو TGM کے ذریعہ پیدا ہوا متخصص لوگوں کے لکھے ہوئے متخصص سے جدا کر سکتے ہیں، اس طرح TGM کے غلط استعمال کرنے کے لئے اہم رغم کھیلتے ہیں. اچھے سے، انگلیسی کے لئے دقیق ڈاکٹر بنانے کے لئے ان دونوں (NLP) کی زبان پردازی اور ماشین تعلیم (ML) کی کمونٹیوں سے بہت سی کاموں کی جگہ ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کی اہم بات کے بغیر، اب کوئی کام نہیں ہے جو اس سریع رشد ادبیات کی تحقیق کرتا ہے اور اہم تحقیق چالوں کے لئے نئی آوروں کو معلوم کرتا ہے. اس کام میں، ہم نے یہ بے پروا بھر کر اس مسئلہ کی تمام سمجھ آسانی کے لئے ایک ضروری تحقیق اور تحقیق کے ذریعہ سے دکھائے۔ ہم ایک عمیق خطا تحقیقات کی تحقیقات کررہے ہیں اور اس جذاب منطقه میں مستقبل کام کی راہ دکھانے کے لئے تحقیقات کی طریقے کی بحث کررہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bunday TGMs diqqatlaridan foydalanishi mumkin, masalan, avtomatik toʻg ʻri yangilik va falsa taʼminlovchilar yaratish mumkin, haqiqiqiy va asoslangan odamlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Name Recently, there has been a flurry of works from both natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML) communities to build accurate detectors for English.  Bu muammolar muhimi bo'lsa, hozirda bu tez o'smirligini o'rganish va yangi qiziqarish muammolarini o'rganadi. Bu ishda, biz bu tovushni qiymati survey qilish va bu muammola juda muhim imkoniyatlarni o'rganish mumkin. Biz shu qiziqarli darajadagi narsalarning holatini qo'shish holatini bajaramiz va qiziqarli holatda kelajakdagi ishni bajarish uchun o'rganish qo'llanmalarini talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Mẫu tạo văn bản (TGM) xuất sắc trong việc tạo văn bản khớp hoàn toàn với kiểu ngôn ngữ con người. Những máy điều khiển đó có thể bị ngược đãi, ví dụ, bằng cách tự động tạo ra tin giả và hàng loạt giả có thể trông giống người thật và lừa g ạt. Các chuyên gia có thể phân biệt văn bản do GM tạo ra từ chữ viết người đóng vai trò quan trọng trong việc giảm thiểu việc lạm dụng TGM. Gần đây, có một loạt các tác phẩm từ cả cộng đồng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) và kỹ thuật (ML) để chế tạo máy dò chính xác cho người Anh. Bất chấp tầm quan trọng của vấn đề này, hiện tại không có việc nghiên cứu về loại văn học đang phát triển nhanh này và đưa những người mới vào những thử thách nghiên cứu quan trọng. Trong công việc này, chúng ta lấp đầy khoảng trống này bằng cách cung cấp một cuộc khảo sát quan trọng và kiểm tra tài liệu này để dễ dàng hiểu rõ vấn đề này. Chúng tôi tiến hành một cuộc phân tích sai lầm sâu sắc về máy phát hiện hiện thời trang và thảo luận hướng dẫn nghiên cứu hướng dẫn cho công việc tương lai trong lĩnh vực hào hứng này.', 'bg': 'Моделите за генериране на текст (ТГМ) се отличават в създаването на текст, който съответства на стила на човешкия език сравнително добре. Такива ТГ могат да бъдат злоупотребявани от противниците, например чрез автоматично генериране на фалшиви новини и фалшиви отзиви за продукти, които могат да изглеждат автентични и да заблудят хората. Детекторите, които могат да разграничат текста, генериран от ТГ, от човешкия текст, играят жизненоважна роля за смекчаване на такава злоупотреба с ТГ. Напоследък има множество работи както от общностите за обработка на естествени езици (НЛП), така и от общностите за машинно обучение (МЛ), за да се изградят точни детектори за английски език. Въпреки важността на този проблем в момента няма работа, която да изследва тази бързо развиваща се литература и да запознае новодошлите с важни изследователски предизвикателства. В тази работа запълваме тази празнота, като предоставяме критично проучване и преглед на тази литература, за да улесним цялостното разбиране на този проблем. Извършваме задълбочен анализ на грешките на най-съвременния детектор и обсъждаме насоките на изследванията, които да насочват бъдещата работа в тази вълнуваща област.', 'hr': 'Preveliki modeli generiranja teksta (TGM) u proizvodnji teksta koji odgovara stilu ljudskog jezika razumno dobro. Takve TGM mogu pogrešno iskoristiti protivnici, na primjer, automatski proizvedenjem lažnih vijesti i lažnih pregleda proizvoda koji mogu izgledati autentične i budale ljude. Detektori koji mogu razlikovati tekst koji je proizveden TGM od ljudskog pisaćeg teksta imaju vitalnu ulogu u smanjenju takve pogrešne primjene TGM-a. Nedavno je došlo do promjene radova iz zajednica prirodnog obrazovanja jezika (NLP) i učenja strojeva (ML) kako bi izgradili to čne detektore za engleski jezik. Unatoč važnosti ovog problema, trenutno nema posla koji istražuje ovu brzo rastuću literaturu i predstavlja nove dolaze važnim istraživačkim izazovima. U ovom poslu ispunjavamo ovo prazno pružanjem kritičnog istraživanja i preglede ove literature kako bi olakšali sveobuhvatno razumijevanje ovog problem a. Provodimo duboku analizu greške detektora stanja umjetnosti i razgovaramo o istraživačkim smjerovima kako bi vodili budući rad u ovom uzbudljivom području.', 'da': "Tekstgenerative modeller (TGM'er) udmærker sig til at producere tekst, der matcher stilen i menneskeligt sprog rimeligt godt. Sådanne TGM'er kan misbruges af modstandere, f.eks. ved automatisk at generere falske nyheder og falske produktanmeldelser, der kan se autentiske ud og narre mennesker. Detektorer, der kan skelne mellem tekst genereret af TGM og menneskelig skrevet tekst, spiller en afgørende rolle i at afbøde sådan misbrug af TGM. For nylig har der været en strøm af værker fra både Natural Language Processing (NLP) og machine learning (ML) fællesskaber til at bygge nøjagtige detektorer til engelsk. På trods af betydningen af dette problem er der i øjeblikket intet arbejde, der undersøger denne hurtigt voksende litteratur og introducerer nyankomne til vigtige forskningsudfordringer. I dette arbejde udfylder vi dette tomrum ved at give en kritisk undersøgelse og gennemgang af denne litteratur for at lette en omfattende forståelse af dette problem. Vi gennemfører en dybdegående fejlanalyse af den nyeste detektor og diskuterer forskningsretninger, der kan vejlede det fremtidige arbejde på dette spændende område.", 'nl': "Tekstgeneratieve modellen (TGM's) blinken uit in het produceren van tekst die redelijk goed aansluit bij de stijl van menselijke taal. Dergelijke TGM's kunnen misbruikt worden door tegenstanders, bijvoorbeeld door automatisch nepnieuws en nepproductbeoordelingen te genereren die authentiek kunnen lijken en mensen voor de gek kunnen houden. Detectoren die door TGM gegenereerde tekst kunnen onderscheiden van menselijke geschreven tekst spelen een cruciale rol bij het beperken van dergelijk misbruik van TGM's. Onlangs is er een storm van werken geweest van zowel natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP) als machine learning (ML) gemeenschappen om nauwkeurige detectoren voor Engels te bouwen. Ondanks het belang van dit probleem is er momenteel geen werk dat deze snelgroeiende literatuur onderzoekt en nieuwkomers introduceert in belangrijke onderzoeksuitdagingen. In dit werk vullen we deze leegte op door een kritische enquête en herziening van deze literatuur te verstrekken om een uitgebreid begrip van dit probleem te vergemakkelijken. We voeren een diepgaande foutanalyse uit van de state-of-the-art detector en bespreken onderzoeksrichtingen om toekomstige werkzaamheden op dit spannende gebied te begeleiden.", 'de': 'Textgenerative Modelle (TGMs) zeichnen sich durch die Herstellung von Text aus, der dem Stil der menschlichen Sprache angemessen entspricht. Solche TGMs können von Gegnern missbraucht werden, z.B. indem automatisch Fake News und gefälschte Produktbewertungen generiert werden, die authentisch aussehen und Menschen täuschen können. Detektoren, die von TGM erzeugten Text von menschlichem geschriebenem Text unterscheiden können, spielen eine entscheidende Rolle bei der Eindämmung eines solchen Missbrauchs von TGM. In letzter Zeit gab es eine Flut von Arbeiten sowohl aus der Natural Language Processing (NLP) als auch aus Machine Learning (ML) Communities, um genaue Detektoren für Englisch zu entwickeln. Trotz der Bedeutung dieses Problems gibt es derzeit keine Arbeit, die diese schnell wachsende Literatur untersucht und Neueinsteiger an wichtige Forschungsherausforderungen heranführt. In dieser Arbeit füllen wir diese Lücke, indem wir eine kritische Übersicht und Überprüfung dieser Literatur zur Verfügung stellen, um ein umfassendes Verständnis dieses Problems zu ermöglichen. Wir führen eine eingehende Fehleranalyse des hochmodernen Detektors durch und diskutieren Forschungsrichtungen, um zukünftige Arbeiten in diesem spannenden Bereich zu leiten.', 'id': 'Model teks generatif (TGM) sangat baik dalam memproduksi teks yang cocok dengan gaya bahasa manusia dengan cukup baik. TGM seperti ini dapat salah digunakan oleh musuh, misalnya, dengan secara otomatis menghasilkan berita palsu dan penilaian produk palsu yang dapat terlihat asli dan bodoh manusia. Detektor yang dapat membedakan teks yang dihasilkan oleh TGM dari teks tertulis manusia bermain peran penting dalam mengurangi penyalahgunaan TGM tersebut. Baru-baru ini, ada banyak pekerjaan dari masyarakat memproses bahasa alam (NLP) dan belajar mesin (ML) untuk membangun detektor akurat untuk bahasa Inggris. Meskipun masalah ini penting, saat ini tidak ada pekerjaan yang menyelidiki literatur yang tumbuh cepat ini dan memperkenalkan para baru untuk tantangan penelitian penting. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengisi kosong ini dengan menyediakan survei kritis dan penelitian sastra ini untuk memudahkan pemahaman komprensif masalah ini. Kami melakukan analisis kesalahan mendalam dari detektor state-of-the-art dan mendiskusikan arah penelitian untuk memimpin pekerjaan masa depan di daerah yang menarik ini.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای تولید متن (TGMs) بیشتر از آن در تولید متن که با سبک زبان انسان به طور منطقی خوب هماهنگ می\u200cکند. این تژم\u200cها می\u200cتوانند از طریق دشمنان اشتباه استفاده می\u200cشوند، مثال با تولید اخبار دروغ و تحقیقات محصولات دروغ که می\u200cتوانند انسان\u200cهای حقیقی و احمقانه بنظر بیاورند. کارآگاه\u200cها که می\u200cتوانند متن توسط TGM تولید شده را از متن نوشته شده\u200cی انسان جدا کنند، نقش حیاتی در تأخیر کردن چنین فایده\u200cای از TGM می\u200cکنند. اخیراً از جمعیت\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) و یادگیری ماشین (ML) برای ساختن کارآگاه\u200cهای دقیق برای انگلیسی کار می\u200cشود. با وجود مهمترین این مشکل، در حال حاضر هیچ کاری وجود ندارد که این ادبیات سریع رشد می کند و به چالش های مهم تحقیقات آشنا کنندگان را معرفی می کند. در این کار، ما این بیهوده را از طریق یک تحقیقات سنجیده و تحقیقات این ادبیات را برای آسانی درک کامل این مشکل پر می کنیم. ما یک تحلیل خطای عمیق از بازرس ایالت هنری را انجام می دهیم و در مورد مسیرهای تحقیقات صحبت می کنیم تا کار آینده را در این منطقه هیجان انگیز هدایت کنیم.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa vizazi vya maandishi (TGMs) ni bora katika kutengeneza ujumbe unaohusiana na mtindo wa lugha ya binadamu kwa kiasi kikubwa. Such TGMs can be misused by adversaries, e.g., by automatically generating fake news and fake product reviews that can look authentic and fool humans.  Wachunguzi wanaweza kutofautisha maandishi yaliyotengenezwa na TGM kutoka maandishi ya binadamu yanafanya kazi muhimu katika kupunguza matumizi ya vibaya vya TGMs. Hivi karibuni, kumekuwa na mafuta ya kazi kutoka katika upasuaji wa lugha za asili (NLP) na kujifunza mashine (ML) ili kujenga wachunguzi sahihi kwa Kiingereza. Pamoja na umuhimu wa tatizo hili, kwa sasa hakuna kazi inayotafiti fasihi hii inayoongezeka haraka na kuwaonyesha wapya katika changamoto muhimu za utafiti. Katika kazi hii, tunajaza sauti hii kwa kutoa utafiti wa muhimu na kutafiti fasihi hii ili kusaidia uelewa wa kina wa tatizo hili. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa makosa ya kina wa hali ya uchunguzi wa sanaa na kujadili maelekezo ya utafiti ili kuongoza kazi za baadaye katika eneo hili la kusisimua.', 'ko': '텍스트 생성 모델(TGMs)은 인간의 언어 스타일과 상당히 일치하는 텍스트를 생성하는 데 뛰어나다.이런 TGM은 상대방에게 오용될 수 있다. 예를 들어 허위 뉴스와 허위 제품 평론을 자동으로 생성함으로써 이런 뉴스와 평론은 진실하고 믿을 만하며 인류를 우롱할 수 있다.TGM에서 생성된 텍스트를 인간이 쓴 텍스트와 구분할 수 있는 감지기는 TGM의 이런 오용을 완화하는 데 중요한 역할을 한다.최근 자연언어처리(NLP)와 기계학습(ML) 커뮤니티에서 온 일련의 작업들이 영어를 위한 정확한 탐지기를 구축하고 있다.비록 이 문제는 매우 중요하지만, 현재는 이 빠르게 성장하는 문헌을 연구하지 않고, 신입생들에게 중요한 연구 도전을 소개하고 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 이 문헌에 대한 비판적인 조사와 회고를 통해 이 공백을 메우고 이 문제에 대한 전면적인 이해를 촉진한다.우리는 가장 선진적인 탐지기에 대해 깊이 있는 오차 분석을 하고, 이 흥분되는 분야의 미래 업무를 지도하는 연구 방향을 토론했다.', 'tr': "Metin janlaşdyrýan nusgalar (TGMs) adam diliň stiline meňzeşleýär. Böyle TGMler düşmanlar tarafından yanlış kullanılabilir, meselâ, özünden sahte haberler ve sahte ürünler oluşturup özellikle gerçek ve samsyk adamlara benzeyen sahte ürünleri oluşturup biler. TGM tarapyndan ýazylan metinlerden tapawutlap biljek detektirler TGM'iň ýalňyşlygyny azaltmak üçin has möhüm roli oýnaýarlar. Soňky wagtlar, täbiýal dil işleýän (NLP) we maşynyň öwrenmesi üçin adalat detektörler gurmak üçin işleriň birnäçe üýtgeşik bar. Bu meseläň wajyplygyna rağmen, häzirki wagt bu çalt ösümli edebiýatyny maslahat eden we täze gelenleri möhüm araşdyrma kynçylyga tarap eden işe ýok. Bu işde, biz bu boşluky kritik bir araştyrma we edebiýatyny bejermek üçin bu meseleň bütin bir düşünmesini a ňsat etmek üçin doldurýarys. Biz sungatçylyk detektoryň durumynyň derinliklerinde ýalňyşlyk analyzasyny ýöredýäris we bu gyzyklanýan bölgede gelejekde işleri gurnalamak üçin barlag yönünde çykýarys.", 'af': "Teks genereerdere modele (TGMs) oorspronklik in produksie van teks wat ooreenstem met die styl van menslike taal redelik goed. Soos TGMs kan misgebruik word deur teëstanders, bv. deur automatysk falske nuus en falske produktresensies genereer wat authentiese en dwase mense kan kyk. Detekteerders wat teks genereer deur TGM van menslike geskrywe teks kan verskil, speel 'n belangrike rol in die vermindering van sodanige misgebruik van TGM. Onlangs is daar 'n flurry van werke van beide natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP) en masjien leer (ML) gemeenskappe om presies detektors vir Engels te bou. Onthou die belangrikheid van hierdie probleem, is daar huidiglik geen werk wat hierdie vinnige groei literature ondersoek en nuutskommers voorsien na belangrike ondersoek uitdagings. In hierdie werk vervul ons hierdie ruimte deur 'n kritiese ondersoek en hersiening van hierdie literateer te verskaf om 'n kompleksies verstanding van hierdie probleem te maak. Ons gedoen 'n in-diepte fout analiseer van die staat van die kuns-detekteerder en bespreek ondersoek rigtings om toekomstige werk in hierdie opkomstige gebied te lei.", 'sq': 'Modelet gjenerative teksti (TGMs) shkëlqejnë në prodhimin e tekstit që përputhet me stilin e gjuhës njerëzore mjaft mirë. Të tilla TGM mund të përdoren keq nga kundërshtarët, për shembull, duke krijuar automatikisht lajme të rreme dhe analiza të rreme të prodhimeve që mund të duken autentike dhe njerëz të rreme. Detectors that can distinguish text generated by TGM from human written text play a vital role in mitigating such misuse of TGMs.  Kohët e fundit, ka patur një rrjedhje punësh si nga komunitetet e përpunimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP) dhe mësimit të makinave (ML) për të ndërtuar detektorë të saktë për anglishtin. Megjithë rëndësinë e këtij problemi, nuk ka punë që të shqyrtojë këtë letërsi në rritje të shpejtë dhe të paraqesë të rinj në sfida të rëndësishme kërkimesh. Në këtë punë, ne e mbushim këtë boshllëk duke ofruar një sondazh kritik dhe përmbledhje të këtij letrare për të lehtësuar një kuptim të përgjithshëm të këtij problemi. Ne kryejmë një analizë të thellë gabimesh të detektorit më të mirë dhe diskutojmë drejtimet e kërkimit për të udhëzuar punën e ardhshme në këtë fushë emocionuese.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ዓይነቶች (TGMs) በመፍጠር ጽሑፉን በመጠቀም በሚያሳየው የሰው ቋንቋ ዓይነት በመጠቀም ይሻላል። እንደዚህ ያሉት TGMs በተቃዋሚዎች ላይ የተሳሳተ ይቻላል፤ ምሳሌ፣ ሐሰተኛ ዜና የሐሰት የፍሬት መልዕክት እና ሰነፎች በሚያዩት የሐሰት ጉዳይ ፍጥረት ነው፡፡ TGM የተደረገውን ጽሑፍ ከሰው ጽሑፍ የሚለዩ ጽሑፎችን ከTGMs በመጠቀም እንደዚህ የደረጃ ስህተት በመጠቀም የሚያስፈልጉ አዋቂዎች ይታያል። በቅርብ ጊዜ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል (NLP) እና መሳሪያን ትምህርት (ML) ማኅበረሰቦች ለኢንጂልኛ ተሟጋቾችን ለመሥራት የሚችል ነጥብ ነው፡፡ Despite the importance of this problem, there is currently no work that surveys this fast-growing literature and introduces newcomers to important research challenges.  በዚህ ሥራ፣ የዚህን ንጹሕን ምርመራ እና የዚህን መጻሕፍት አዋቂውን ማስተዋል ለማግኘት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የሀገር አካባቢ ግንኙነት ላይ የጥልቅ ስህተት Analysis እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "İnsan dilinin stilinə uyğun mətn ürəklərində mətn ürəklərində çox yüksək modellər (TGM). Bütün TGMlər düşmənlərin yanlış istifadə edilə bilər, məsələn, həqiqət və aptal insanlara bənzər sahte xəbərlər və sahte proqramlar yaratmaq vasitəsilə. TGM tərəfindən insanların yazılmış mətnindən təşkil edilən mətni təşkil edən detektorlar TGM'lərin yanlış istifadəsini azaltmaq üçün vacib bir rol oynayır. Son zamanlarda, məxluqat dillərin işləməsi (NLP) və maşın öyrənməsi (ML) ümmətlərinin İngilizə üçün doğru detektörlər inşa etmək üçün çalışmaların flöri oldu. Bu problemin məqsədilə baxmayaraq, bu hızlı büyüyən məktəbəsini araşdıran və yeni gələnləri möhkəm araştırma çətinliklərə tanıyan bir iş yoxdur. Bu işdə, biz bu problemi bütün anlayışını asanlaşdırmaq üçün kritik bir araştırma və bu qisməti təsdiqləmək üçün bu boşluğu doldururuq. Biz bu heyrətli bölgedə gələcək işləri doğru yola yönəltmək üçün müxtəlif xəta analizisini təşkil edirik.", 'hy': 'Տեքստի ստեղծագործող մոդելները (ՏԳՄ) շատ լավ համապատասխանում են մարդկային լեզվի ոճին: Այսպիսի ԹԳՄ-ները կարող են սխալ օգտագործվել հակառակորդների կողմից, օրինակ, ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծելով կեղծ նորություններ և կեղծ արտադրանքներ, որոնք կարող են իրական և հիմար տեսք ունենալ մարդկանց: Դեկտորները, որոնք կարող են տարբերել ՏԳՄ-ի կողմից ստեղծված տեքստը մարդկային գրված տեքստից, կարևոր դեր են խաղում ԹԳՄ-ների այդպիսի չարաշահության նվազեցնելիս: Վերջերս աշխատանքներ են տեղի ունեցել նաև բնական լեզվի վերամշակման (ՆԼՊ) և մեքենային ուսումնասիրության (ML) համայնքներից, որպեսզի անգլերենի համար ճշգրիտ դետեկտորներ կառուցեն: Չնայած այս խնդրի կարևորությանը, ներկայումս չկա աշխատանք, որը հետազոտի այս արագ աճող գրականությունը և ներկայացնի նորագայում կարևոր ուսումնասիրության մարտահրավերներ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք լցնում ենք այս արձակուրդը, տրամադրելով այս գրականության կարևոր հետազոտություն և վերանայման, որպեսզի հեշտացնենք այս խնդրի ընդհանուր հասկանալը: We conduct an in-depth error analysis of the state-of-the-art detector and discuss research directions to guide future work in this exciting area.', 'bn': 'টেক্সট জেনারেটিভ মডেল (টিজিএমএস) মানুষের ভাষার শৈলীর সাথে যুক্তিভাবে মিলে তুলে ধরার চেয়ে বেশী ভাল। এই ধরনের টিজিএমএস বিরোধীদের দ্বারা ভুল ব্যবহার করা যায়, যেমন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মিথ্যা সংবাদ এবং মিথ্যা প্রযুক্তি পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যম টিজিএম-এর লেখা থেকে তৈরি লেখা টেক্সট বিচ্ছিন্ন করতে পারে যারা টিজিএমসের এই ধরনের ভুল ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে টিজিএমসের মাধ সম্প্রতি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার (এনএলপি) এবং মেশিন শিক্ষা (এমএল) সম্প্রদায়ের কাজের একটি ফ্ল্যারি বেড়ে গেছে যাতে ইংরেজীর এই সমস্যার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সত্ত্বেও, বর্তমানে কোন কাজ নেই যা এই দ্রুত বৃদ্ধির সাহিত্যে পর্যবেক্ষণ করে এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গবেষণার চ এই কাজে আমরা এই ফোল্ডাটি পূর্ণ করি এই সমস্যার সমালোচনার জরুরী তদন্ত এবং এই সাহিত্যের বিষয়টি সম্পর্কে পর্যবেক্ষণ করার মাধ্যমে। আমরা এই চমৎকার এলাকায় ভবিষ্যৎ কাজ পরিচালিত করার জন্য গবেষণার পথ নিয়ে আলোচনা করি।', 'ca': "Els models de generació de text (GMT) excellen en produir text que coincideix amb l'estil del llenguatge humà raonablement bé. Els adversaris poden maltractar-se, per exemple, generant automàticament notícies falses i revisions falses de productes que poden semblar autèntiques i enganyades als humans. Els detectors que poden distingir el text generat per TGM del text escrit humà juguen un paper vital en mitigar aquest abus de TGM. Recentment, hi ha hagut un munt de treballs tant de comunitats de processament natural de llenguatges (NLP) com d'aprenentatge màquina (ML) per construir detectors precisos per anglès. Malgrat l'importància d'aquest problema, actualment no hi ha treball que estudi aquesta literatura en creixement ràpid i introdueixi als nous arribant a importants reptes de recerca. En aquest treball, omplem aquest buit proporcionant un estudi crític i una revisió d'aquesta literatura per facilitar una comprensió completa d'aquest problem a. Fem una an àlisi d'errors profunda del detector d'última generació i discutem direccions de recerca per guiar el futur treball en aquesta àrea emocionant.", 'cs': 'Textgenerativní modely (TGM) vynikají v tvorbě textu, který přiměřeně dobře odpovídá stylu lidského jazyka. Takové TGM mohou být zneužívány protivníky, například automatickým generováním falešných zpráv a falešných recenzí produktů, které mohou vypadat autenticky a oklamat lidi. Detektory, které dokáží odlišit text generovaný TGM od lidského psaného textu, hrají důležitou roli při zmírnění takového zneužití TGM. V poslední době se objevilo množství prací z komunit zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) a strojového učení (ML) na vytvoření přesných detektorů pro angličtinu. Navzdory významu tohoto problému v současné době neexistuje žádná práce, která by zkoumala tuto rychle rostoucí literaturu a seznámila nováčky s důležitými výzkumnými výzvami. V této práci tuto prázdnotu vyplníme kritickým průzkumem a přehledem této literatury, abychom usnadnili komplexní porozumění tomuto problému. Provádíme hloubkovou analýzu chyb nejmodernějšího detektoru a diskutujeme směry výzkumu, které vedou budoucí práci v této vzrušující oblasti.', 'bs': 'Generativni modeli teksta (TGM) iznad proizvodnje teksta koji odgovara stilu ljudskog jezika razumno dobro. Takve TGM mogu pogrešno iskoristiti neprijatelji, na primjer, automatski proizvedenjem lažnih vijesti i lažnih pregleda proizvoda koji mogu izgledati autentične i budale ljude. Detektori koji mogu razlikovati tekst koji je proizveden TGM od ljudskog pisaćeg teksta imaju vitalnu ulogu u smanjenju takve pogrešne upotrebe TGM-a. Nedavno je postojala fleri radova iz zajednica prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP) i mašinskog učenja (ML) kako bi izgradili tačne detektore za engleski jezik. Unatoč važnosti ovog problema, trenutno nema posla koji istražuje ovu brzo rastuću literaturu i predstavlja nove dolaze važnim istraživačkim izazovima. U ovom poslu, ispunjavamo ovu prazninu pružanjem kritičnog istraživanja i preglede ove literature kako bi olakšali sveobuhvatljivo razumijevanje ovog problem a. Provodimo duboku analizu greške države detektora umjetnosti i razgovaramo o istraživačkim smjerovima kako bi vodili budući rad u ovom uzbudljivom području.', 'et': 'Teksti genereerivad mudelid (TGM) pakuvad suurepärast teksti, mis sobib inimkeele stiiliga üsna hästi. Selliseid TGM-e võivad vastased väärkasutada, näiteks luues automaatselt valeuudiseid ja võltstoodete ülevaateid, mis võivad tunduda autentsed ja inimesi lollitada. Detektorid, mis suudavad eristada TGM-i loodud teksti inimese kirjalikust tekstist, mängivad olulist rolli TGM-ide väärkasutamise leevendamisel. Hiljuti on nii looduskeele töötlemise (NLP) kui masinõppe (ML) kogukondade tööd, et ehitada täpseid andureid inglise keele jaoks. Hoolimata selle probleemi tähtsusest ei ole praegu tööd, mis uuriks seda kiiresti kasvavat kirjandust ja tutvustaks uustulnukaid oluliste uurimisprobleemidega. Selles töös täidame selle tühimiku, pakkudes kriitilist uuringut ja ülevaadet selle kirjanduse, et hõlbustada selle probleemi põhjalikku mõistmist. Viime läbi kaasaegse detektori põhjaliku veaanalüüsi ja arutame teadusuuringute suuniseid, et suunata tulevast tööd selles põnevas valdkonnas.', 'fi': 'Tekstiä tuottavat mallit (TGM) ovat erinomaisia tuottamaan tekstiä, joka vastaa ihmisen kielen tyyliä kohtuullisen hyvin. Vastustajat voivat käyttää tällaisia TGM:iä väärin esimerkiksi tuottamalla automaattisesti vääriä uutisia ja vääriä tuotearvosteluja, jotka voivat näyttää aidoilta ja huijata ihmisiä. Tunnistimilla, jotka erottavat TGM:n tuottaman tekstin ihmisen kirjoitetusta tekstistä, on tärkeä rooli TGM:n väärinkäytön lieventämisessä. Viime aikoina sekä luonnonkielten prosessoinnin (NLP) että koneoppimisen (ML) yhteisöt ovat tehneet paljon töitä tarkkojen ilmaisimien rakentamiseksi englanniksi. Ongelman merkityksestä huolimatta tällä hetkellä ei ole olemassa työtä, joka kartoittaisi tätä nopeasti kasvavaa kirjallisuutta ja toisi uusia tulokkaita tärkeisiin tutkimushaasteisiin. Tässä työssä täytämme tämän tyhjiön tarjoamalla kriittisen kyselyn ja katsauksen tähän kirjallisuuteen helpottaaksemme ongelman kokonaisvaltaista ymmärtämistä. Teemme perusteellisen virheanalyysin uusimmasta ilmaisimesta ja keskustelemme tutkimussuunnista ohjaamaan tulevaa työtä tällä jännittävällä alueella.', 'jv': 'Tuning Suara waé UnknownMonitor vendor plug-in-action Nanging kabèh lanjut ingkang dipalamat iki, saiki ora ono nggawe ngubah ujarang liyane sing bisa nguasai perbudhakan kanggo ngirim barang nggo ngerasakno Nang-uwong iki, kéné dolusan lan barang-barang iki bakal ngewehku perusahaan winih lan ujarane perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno sing perusahaan iki. Awak dhéwé gedung kapului nungsaké dipunarané nungsak perusahaan kanggo diangkat langkung urip kanggo nggawe barang langkung urip kanggo nggawe barang iki banget.', 'ha': "@ item: inmenu Text Completion @ info @ item: inmenu Text Completion A yanzu, an sami wani aikin aiki daga shirin jarraba lugha na asili (NLP) da jama'a masu karanta mashine (ML) dõmin su sami masu tsari na Ingiriya. Babu muhimmin wannan matsayi, yanzu bãbu wani aiki wanda ke tambayar wannan littãfin na ƙara kashi kuma yana gauraya yanzu zuwa masu muhimu wa masu fassarar. Daga wannan aikin, Munã cika wannan sauri da Muke iya samar da wani shirin kiraici na muhimmi kuma za mu iya amfani da fasalin wannan littafi na fassarar da fassara. Tuna sami wani anayyar ɓata mai guda a kan halin-mai-gunyar-kunnuwa kuma Muke yi jayayya da shiryarwa masu shirya aikin bayani na nan cikin wannan wuri mai muhimma.", 'sk': 'Besedilni generativni modeli (TGM) odlično ustvarjajo besedilo, ki se razumno dobro ujema s slogom človeškega jezika. Takšne TGM lahko nasprotniki zlorabljajo, npr. s samodejnim ustvarjanjem lažnih novic in lažnih ocen izdelkov, ki lahko izgledajo pristno in preslepijo ljudi. Detektorji, ki lahko razlikujejo besedilo, ki ga ustvari TGM, od človeškega pisnega besedila, imajo ključno vlogo pri ublažitvi takšne zlorabe TGM. V zadnjem času je bilo veliko del skupnosti za obdelavo naravnih jezikov (NLP) in strojno učenje (ML) za izdelavo natančnih detektorjev za angleščino. Kljub pomembnosti tega problema trenutno ni dela, ki bi pregledovala to hitro rastočo literaturo in novincem uvajala pomembne raziskovalne izzive. V tem delu to praznino zapolnimo s kritičnim pregledom in pregledom te literature, da bi olajšali celovito razumevanje tega problema. Izvajamo poglobljeno analizo napak najsodobnejšega detektorja in razpravljamo o smereh raziskav za usmerjanje prihodnjega dela na tem vznemirljivem področju.', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་མཐུན་པ་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡིག་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་མཉམ་ལས་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་མིན་འདུག གསལ་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་གདོང་མཁན་གྱིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་མི་ཐུབ། Detectors that can distinguish text generated by TGM from human written text play a vital role in mitigating such misuse of TGMs. མ་ཟད། རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མིའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་སྡེ་གཉིས་ལས་ཕན་ཐུགས་ཤིག་བྱུང་བ་ཡིན་ན། དཀའ་ངལ་འདིའི་གལ་ཆེན་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་བཏུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟ་བུ་བཏུབ་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་བ་མེད་པ་དང་གསར་གཏོང་རྩོལ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་དག་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་། གློག་ཆེན་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ཆས་ཀྱི་ནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཞིབ', 'he': 'דוגמנים מיוצרים טקסט (TGMs) מצוינים בהפיקה של טקסט שמתאים לסגנון של שפה אנושית היטב. טי-ג\'ים כאלה יכולים להשתמש לא נכון על ידי יריבים, למשל, על ידי ליצור אוטומטית חדשות מזויפות ובדיקות מוצרים מזויפים שיכולים להיראות אוטומטיים ומטופשים בני אדם. חוקרים שיכולים להבדיל טקסט שנוצר ע"י TGM מהטקסט כתוב אנושי משחקים תפקיד חיוני בהקלה של אי-השימוש כזה של TGM. לאחרונה, התרחשו פעולות מעבדת שפת טבעית (NLP) וקהילות ללמוד מכונות (ML) כדי לבנות גלאי מדויק לאנגלית. למרות חשיבות הבעיה הזו, אין כרגע עבודה שסוקרת ספרות גדולה מהר זו ומציגת חדשים לאתגרים חשובים במחקר. In this work, we fill this void by providing a critical survey and review of this literature to facilitate a comprehensive understanding of this problem.  אנו מבצעים ניתוח טעויות עמוק של גלאי המצב המיוחד ונדבר על כיווני מחקר כדי להדריך את העבודה העתידית באזור המרגש הזה.'}
{'en': 'Learning with Contrastive Examples for Data-to-Text Generation', 'ar': 'التعلم باستخدام الأمثلة المتباينة لإنشاء البيانات إلى نص', 'es': 'Aprendizaje con ejemplos contrastantes para la generación de datos a texto', 'fr': 'Apprendre avec des exemples contrastifs pour la génération de données en texte', 'pt': 'Aprendendo com exemplos contrastantes para geração de dados para texto', 'ja': 'データツーテキスト生成のための対照的な例で学ぶ', 'zh': '用比示例学数至文本生', 'hi': 'डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट जनरेशन के लिए Contrastive उदाहरणों के साथ सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение с контрастными примерами для генерации данных в текст', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim le Samplaí Codarsnacha maidir le Giniúint Sonraí go Téacs', 'ka': 'მონაცემების ტექსტის შექმნა კონტრესტიგური მაგალითან სწავლება', 'hu': 'Tanulás kontrasztív példákkal az adatok és szövegek generálásához', 'el': 'Μάθηση με αντιφατικά παραδείγματα για τη δημιουργία δεδομένων σε κείμενο', 'lt': 'Mokymasis prieštaringais duomenų ir teksto kūrimo pavyzdžiais', 'it': 'Imparare con esempi contrastanti per la generazione di dati a testo', 'ms': 'Name', 'mk': 'Учење со контрастивни примери за генерација на податоци во текст', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാവിലേക്ക്- ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'kk': 'Деректерден мәтінді құру үшін контрастық мысалдармен үйрену', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл болон Текст бүтээлтийн эсрэг жишээтэй суралцах', 'pl': 'Uczenie się z kontrastywnymi przykładami generowania danych do tekstu', 'mt': 'Tagħlim b’Eżempji Kontrastivi għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Dejta għal Test', 'sr': 'Naučenje sa kontrastivnim primjerima generacije podataka do teksta', 'ro': 'Învățarea cu exemple contrastive pentru generarea de date în text', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Lära sig med kontrasterande exempel för data-till-text generering', 'so': 'Learning with Contrastive Examples for Data-to-Text Generation', 'ta': 'தகவல் உரை உருவாக்கத்திற்கு தொடர்புடைய உதாரணங்களுடன் கற்று', 'ur': 'Data-to-Text Generation کے لئے کنٹراسٹیو مثال کے ساتھ سیکھنا', 'no': 'Læring med kontrastiske eksemplar for generering av data- til- tekst', 'vi': 'Học với trường tương phản cho đương thời tiết', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Учене с контрастивни примери за генериране на данни към текст', 'nl': 'Leren met contrasterende voorbeelden voor het genereren van gegevens naar tekst', 'de': 'Lernen mit kontrastiven Beispielen für die Daten-zu-Text-Generierung', 'ko': '비교 예시를 사용하여 데이터를 텍스트 생성에 대한 학습을 진행하다', 'da': 'Læring med kontrastive eksempler på data-til-tekst generering', 'id': 'Belajar dengan Contoh Kontrastif untuk Generasi Data-ke-Teks', 'sw': 'Kujifunza na Mifano ya Contrastive kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Taarifa-hadi-Text', 'hr': 'Naučenje s kontrastivnim primjerima generacije podataka do teksta', 'tr': 'Data-täze-Metin Jeşirmek üçin kontrast mysal bilen öwrenmek', 'fa': 'یادگیری با مثالهای متفاوتی برای تولید داده به متن', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Mësimi me shembuj kontrastë për gjenerimin e të dhënave në tekst', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Data-to-Text Generation 칲칞칲n Kontrast 칬rnekl톛ri il톛 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'hy': 'Սովորել տվյալների տեքստի ստեղծման հակադրական օրինակներով', 'bn': 'ডাটা থেকে টেক্সট উৎপাদনের জন্য কন্ট্রেসিটিভ উদাহরণ', 'ca': 'Learning with Contrastive Examples for Data-to-Text Generation', 'et': 'Õppimine kontrastiivsete näidetega andmete loomiseks tekstiks', 'cs': 'Učení s kontrastními příklady pro generování dat na text', 'fi': 'Oppiminen kontrastiivisilla esimerkeillä datasta tekstiin -luontiin', 'bs': 'Naučenje sa kontrastivnim primjerima generacije podataka do teksta', 'jv': 'Learning with contraststive example for data-to-text Generation', 'he': 'ללמוד עם דוגמאות נוגדות לייצור נתונים לטקסט', 'sk': 'Učenje s kontrastnimi primeri za ustvarjanje podatkov v besedilo', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Learning with Contrastive Examples for Data-to-Text Generation'}
{'en': 'Existing models for data-to-text tasks generate fluent but sometimes incorrect sentences e.g., Nikkei gains is generated when Nikkei drops is expected. We investigate models trained on contrastive examples i.e., incorrect sentences or terms, in addition to correct ones to reduce such errors. We first create rules to produce contrastive examples from correct ones by replacing frequent crucial terms such as gain or drop. We then use learning methods with several losses that exploit contrastive examples. Experiments on the market comment generation task show that 1) exploiting contrastive examples improves the capability of generating sentences with better lexical choice, without degrading the fluency, 2) the choice of the loss function is an important factor because the performances on different metrics depend on the types of loss functions, and 3) the use of the examples produced by some specific rules further improves performance. Human evaluation also supports the effectiveness of using contrastive examples.', 'ar': 'تولد النماذج الحالية لمهام تحويل البيانات إلى نص جملًا بطلاقة ولكنها غير صحيحة في بعض الأحيان ، على سبيل المثال ، يتم إنشاء "مكاسب مؤشر نيكاي" عند توقع "هبوط مؤشر نيكاي". نحن نحقق في النماذج المدربة على الأمثلة المتناقضة ، أي الجمل أو المصطلحات غير الصحيحة ، بالإضافة إلى النماذج الصحيحة لتقليل مثل هذه الأخطاء. نقوم أولاً بإنشاء قواعد لإنتاج أمثلة متناقضة من الأمثلة الصحيحة عن طريق استبدال المصطلحات الحاسمة المتكررة مثل "الكسب" أو "السقوط". ثم نستخدم طرق التعلم مع العديد من الخسائر التي تستغل الأمثلة المتناقضة. تُظهر التجارب على مهمة توليد تعليقات السوق أن 1) استغلال الأمثلة المتناقضة يحسن القدرة على إنشاء جمل مع اختيار معجمي أفضل ، دون التقليل من الطلاقة ، 2) اختيار وظيفة الخسارة هو عامل مهم لأن الأداء على مقاييس مختلفة يعتمد على أنواع وظائف الخسارة ، و 3) استخدام الأمثلة التي تنتجها بعض القواعد المحددة يحسن الأداء بشكل أكبر. يدعم التقييم البشري أيضًا فعالية استخدام الأمثلة المتناقضة.', 'es': 'Los modelos existentes para tareas de conversión de datos a texto generan frases fluidas pero a veces incorrectas, por ejemplo, «ganancias Nikkei» se genera cuando se espera que «Nikkei caiga». Investigamos modelos entrenados en ejemplos contrastivos, es decir, frases o términos incorrectos, además de los correctos para reducir dichos errores. Primero creamos reglas para producir ejemplos contrastantes a partir de los correctos reemplazando términos cruciales frecuentes como «ganancia» o «caída». Luego utilizamos métodos de aprendizaje con varias pérdidas que aprovechan ejemplos contrastantes. Experimentos en la tarea de generación de comentarios de mercado muestran que 1) explotar ejemplos contrastivos mejora la capacidad de generar oraciones con una mejor elección léxica, sin degradar la fluidez, 2) la elección de la función de pérdida es un factor importante porque los rendimientos en diferentes métricas dependen sobre los tipos de funciones de pérdida, y 3) el uso de los ejemplos producidos por algunas reglas específicas mejora aún más el rendimiento. La evaluación humana también respalda la eficacia del uso de ejemplos contrastantes.', 'fr': "Les modèles existants pour les tâches de conversion de données en texte génèrent des phrases fluides mais parfois incorrectes, par exemple, «\xa0Nikkei gagne\xa0» est généré lorsque «\xa0Nikkei abandonne\xa0» est attendu. Nous étudions des modèles formés sur des exemples contrastifs, c'est-à-dire des phrases ou des termes incorrects, en plus de ceux qui corrigent afin de réduire de telles erreurs. Nous créons d'abord des règles pour produire des exemples contrastés à partir des exemples corrects en remplaçant des termes cruciaux fréquents tels que «\xa0gain\xa0» ou «\xa0baisse\xa0». Nous utilisons ensuite des méthodes d'apprentissage avec plusieurs pertes qui exploitent des exemples contrastifs. Les expériences sur la tâche de génération de commentaires de marché montrent que 1) l'exploitation d'exemples contrastifs améliore la capacité de générer des phrases avec un meilleur choix lexical, sans dégrader la fluidité, 2) le choix de la fonction de perte est un facteur important car les performances sur différentes métriques dépendent sur les types de fonctions de perte, et 3) l'utilisation des exemples produits par certaines règles spécifiques améliore encore les performances. L'évaluation humaine confirme également l'efficacité de l'utilisation d'exemples contrastifs.", 'pt': 'Os modelos existentes para tarefas de dados para texto geram frases fluentes, mas às vezes incorretas, por exemplo, “ganhos Nikkei” são gerados quando “quedas Nikkei” são esperados. Investigamos modelos treinados em exemplos contrastivos, ou seja, frases ou termos incorretos, além de corretos para reduzir tais erros. Primeiro, criamos regras para produzir exemplos contrastantes dos corretos, substituindo termos cruciais frequentes, como “ganho” ou “descarte”. Em seguida, usamos métodos de aprendizado com várias perdas que exploram exemplos contrastantes. Experimentos na tarefa de geração de comentários de mercado mostram que 1) explorar exemplos contrastivos melhora a capacidade de gerar sentenças com melhor escolha lexical, sem degradar a fluência, 2) a escolha da função de perda é um fator importante porque os desempenhos em diferentes métricas dependem os tipos de funções de perda, e 3) o uso dos exemplos produzidos por algumas regras específicas melhora ainda mais o desempenho. A avaliação humana também apóia a eficácia do uso de exemplos contrastantes.', 'ja': 'データツーテキストタスクの既存のモデルは、流暢だが時には間違った文章を生成します。例えば、「日経が落ちる」と予想される場合、「日経の利得」が生成されます。 私たちは、そのような誤りを減らすための修正に加えて、対照的な例（誤った文章や用語）でトレーニングされたモデルを調査します。 まず、「ゲイン」や「ドロップ」といった頻繁に重要な用語を置き換えて、正しい用語から対照的な用例を生み出すためのルールを作成します。 次に、対照的な例を活用したいくつかの損失を伴う学習方法を使用します。 市場コメント生成タスクの実験では、1)対照的な例を利用することで、流暢性を低下させることなく、より良い語彙選択で文章を生成する能力が向上すること、2)異なる指標でのパフォーマンスが損失関数の種類に依存するため、損失関数の選択が重要な要素であること、3)いくつかの特定のルールによって生成される例の使用がさらにパフォーマンスを向上させることが示されている。 人間の評価はまた、対照的な例を使用することの有効性を支持する。', 'zh': '据到文本的现在现在模样生畅而有时不是句子,如当日经下跌时生"日经指数"。 臣等观对比性示例(之非句术语),正句术语以损其非。 首创轨则,代数之要术语(如"增益"、"降")以正示例成比示例。 然后用学术,损于比示例。 论生事之实验,1)以重于示例词汇择句之能,而不降于流畅性,2)损函数为重,异指标之性决于损函数之类,3)用特定之则示例进一步提高也。 人之评估,亦主对比性示例之有效性。', 'hi': 'डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट कार्यों के लिए मौजूदा मॉडल धाराप्रवाह लेकिन कभी-कभी गलत वाक्य उत्पन्न करते हैं जैसे, "निक्केई लाभ" उत्पन्न होता है जब "निक्केई ड्रॉप्स" की उम्मीद की जाती है। हम इस तरह की त्रुटियों को कम करने के लिए सही लोगों के अलावा, विपरीत उदाहरणों पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल की जांच करते हैं, यानी, गलत वाक्यों या शर्तों। हम पहले "लाभ" या "ड्रॉप" जैसे लगातार महत्वपूर्ण शब्दों को बदलकर सही लोगों से विरोधाभासी उदाहरण ों का उत्पादन करने के लिए नियम बनाते हैं। फिर हम कई नुकसानों के साथ सीखने के तरीकों का उपयोग करते हैं जो विपरीत उदाहरणों का शोषण करते हैं। बाजार टिप्पणी पीढ़ी कार्य पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि 1) contrastive उदाहरणों का शोषण प्रवाह को नीचा दिखाए बिना, बेहतर लेक्सिकल विकल्प के साथ वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करने की क्षमता में सुधार करता है, 2) हानि समारोह का विकल्प एक महत्वपूर्ण कारक है क्योंकि विभिन्न मीट्रिक पर प्रदर्शन नुकसान कार्यों के प्रकारों पर निर्भर करता है, और 3) कुछ विशिष्ट नियमों द्वारा उत्पादित उदाहरणों का उपयोग आगे प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। मानव मूल्यांकन भी contrastive उदाहरणों का उपयोग करने की प्रभावशीलता का समर्थन करता है।', 'ru': 'Существующие модели для задач обмена данными между текстами генерируют свободные, но иногда неправильные предложения, например, «Nikkei GAINS» генерируется, когда ожидается «Nikkei Drops». Мы исследуем модели, обученные на контрастных примерах, то есть неправильные предложения или термины, в дополнение к правильным, чтобы уменьшить такие ошибки. Сначала мы создаем правила для получения контрастных примеров из правильных, заменяя часто используемые ключевые термины, такие как «выгода» или «падение». Затем мы используем методы обучения с несколькими потерями, которые используют контрастные примеры. Эксперименты по задаче генерации рыночных комментариев показывают, что 1) использование контрастных примеров улучшает возможность генерации предложений с лучшим лексическим выбором, не ухудшая беглость, 2) выбор функции потерь является важным фактором, потому что производительность по различным метрикам зависит от типов функций потерь, и 3) использование примеров, полученных по некоторым конкретным правилам, дополнительно улучшает производительность. Оценка деятельности человека также подтверждает эффективность использования контрастных примеров.', 'ga': 'Gineann samhlacha atá ann cheana féin do thascanna sonraí-go-téacs abairtí líofa ach uaireanta míchearta m.sh., gintear “gnóthachan Nikkei” nuair a bhíonntear ag súil le “titeann Nikkei”. Fiosraíonn muid samhlacha atá oilte ar shamplaí codarsnacha .i. abairtí nó téarmaí míchearta, chomh maith leis na cinn chearta chun earráidí dá leithéid a laghdú. Cruthaímid rialacha ar dtús chun samplaí codarsnacha a tháirgeadh ó na cinn chearta trí théarmaí ríthábhachtacha ar nós “gnóthachan” nó “titim” a athsholáthar. Bainimid úsáid ansin as modhanna foghlama le roinnt caillteanas a bhaineann leas as samplaí codarsnacha. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thasc giniúna tuairimí an mhargaidh go 1) feabhsaíonn leas a bhaint as samplaí codarsnacha an cumas abairtí a ghiniúint le rogha foclóireachta níos fearr, gan an líofacht a dhíghrádú, 2) is fachtóir tábhachtach é rogha na feidhme caillteanais toisc go mbraitheann na feidhmíochtaí ar mhéadracht éagsúla. na cineálacha feidhmeanna caillteanais, agus 3) cuireann úsáid na samplaí a tháirgtear le roinnt rialacha sonracha feabhas breise ar fheidhmíocht. Tacaíonn meastóireacht dhaonna freisin le héifeachtacht samplaí codarsnacha a úsáid.', 'hu': 'Az adat-szöveges feladatok meglévő modelljei folyékony, de néha helytelen mondatokat generálnak, például "Nikkei nyereségek" akkor jönnek létre, amikor "Nikkei cseppek" várható. Ellentétes példákra, azaz helytelen mondatokra vagy kifejezésekre képzett modelleket vizsgálunk, emellett javítjuk azokat, hogy csökkentsük az ilyen hibákat. Először olyan szabályokat hozunk létre, amelyek ellentétes példákat hoznak létre a helyes kifejezésekből azáltal, hogy helyettesítjük a gyakori fontos kifejezéseket, mint például a "nyereség" vagy a "csökkenés". Ezután több veszteséggel járó tanulási módszert használunk, amelyek kontrasztos példákat használnak. A piaci megjegyzések generálásával kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy 1) a kontrasztos példák kihasználása javítja a jobb lexikai választással rendelkező mondatok generálásának képességét anélkül, hogy csökkentené a folyékonyságot, 2) a veszteségfüggvény kiválasztása fontos tényező, mert a különböző mutatók teljesítménye a veszteségfüggvények típusától függ, és 3) az egyes konkrét szabályok által előállított példák használata tovább javítja a teljesítményt. Az emberi értékelés a kontrasztos példák használatának hatékonyságát is támogatja.', 'el': 'Τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα για εργασίες δεδομένων-κειμένου δημιουργούν άπταιστες αλλά μερικές φορές λανθασμένες προτάσεις, π.χ. το "κέρδη Nikkei" δημιουργείται όταν αναμένεται "πτώση Nikkei". Ερευνούμε μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα σε αντιφατικά παραδείγματα, δηλαδή λανθασμένες προτάσεις ή όρους, εκτός από σωστές για να μειώσουμε τέτοια λάθη. Καταρχάς δημιουργούμε κανόνες για να παράγουμε αντιφατικά παραδείγματα από σωστά, αντικαθιστώντας συχνά κρίσιμους όρους όπως "κέρδος" ή "πτώση". Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε μεθόδους μάθησης με αρκετές απώλειες που εκμεταλλεύονται αντιφατικά παραδείγματα. Τα πειράματα στην εργασία δημιουργίας σχολίων της αγοράς δείχνουν ότι 1) η αξιοποίηση αντιφατικών παραδειγμάτων βελτιώνει την ικανότητα δημιουργίας προτάσεων με καλύτερη λεξική επιλογή, χωρίς να υποβαθμίζει την ευχέρεια, 2) η επιλογή της συνάρτησης απώλειας είναι σημαντικός παράγοντας επειδή οι επιδόσεις σε διαφορετικές μετρήσεις εξαρτώνται από τους τύπους συναρτήσεων απώλειας, και 3) η χρήση των παραδειγμάτων που παράγονται από ορισμένους ειδικούς κανόνες βελτιώνει περαιτέρω τις επιδόσεις. Η ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση υποστηρίζει επίσης την αποτελεσματικότητα της χρήσης αντιφατικών παραδειγμάτων.', 'it': 'I modelli esistenti per le attività data-to-text generano frasi fluenti ma talvolta errate, ad esempio, \'Nikkei guadagni\' viene generato quando \'Nikkei drops\' è previsto. Investighiamo modelli formati su esempi contrastanti, cioè frasi o termini errati, oltre a correggerli per ridurre tali errori. In primo luogo creiamo regole per produrre esempi contrastanti da quelli corretti sostituendo termini cruciali frequenti come "guadagno" o "calo". Usiamo quindi metodi di apprendimento con diverse perdite che sfruttano esempi contrastanti. Esperimenti sul compito di generazione dei commenti sul mercato mostrano che 1) sfruttando esempi contrastanti migliora la capacità di generare frasi con una migliore scelta lessicale, senza degradarne la fluidità, 2) la scelta della funzione di perdita è un fattore importante perché le prestazioni su metriche diverse dipendono dai tipi di funzioni di perdita, e 3) l\'uso degli esempi prodotti da alcune norme specifiche migliora ulteriormente le prestazioni. La valutazione umana sostiene anche l\'efficacia dell\'utilizzo di esempi contrastanti.', 'kk': "Деректер мен мәтін тапсырмаларының барлық үлгілері жылдамдығын құрады, бірақ кейбірде дұрыс сөздерді құрады, мысалы, 'Nikkei қабылдауы' дегенде құрылады. Мысалы, контрастық мәселелерде оқылған үлгілерді зерттейміз. Мысалы, бұл қателерді азайту үшін дұрыс сөздер немесе сөздерді дұрыс емес. Біз біріншіден қарсы мәселелерді дұрыс түрлерден жасау үшін ережелерді құрамыз, мысалы 'жетілдіру' немесе 'доғару' секілді көбірек үлгілерді алмастыр Содан кейін бірнеше жоғалу арқылы үйрену әдістерін қолданамыз. Мазарт түсініктемелер тапсырмасын құру тапсырмасының тәжірибелері 1) контрастық мысалдарды қолдану үшін сөйлемелерді жақсы лексикалық таңдау мүмкіндігін жасау мүмкіндігін жасау мүмкіндігін өзгертеді, 2) жоғалу функциясын таңдау - маңы (және 3) кейбір ережелерден жасалған мысалдарды қолдану үшін бірнеше ережелерді жақсы жасайды. Мұндай-ақ адамның бағалауы басқа контрастық мысалдарды қолдану мүмкіндігін қолдайды.", 'lt': 'Esami duomenų ir teksto užduočių modeliai sukuria skysčius, bet kartais neteisingus sakinius, pvz., „Nikkei gains“ sukuriama, kai tikimasi „Nikkei drops“. Mes tiriame modelius, parengtus kontrastiniais pavyzdžiais, t. y. neteisingais sakiniais ar terminais, be teisingų, kad būtų sumažintos tokios klaidos. Pirmiausia sukuriame taisykles, kuriomis būtų galima pateikti prieštaringus pavyzdžius iš teisingų, pakeičiant dažnus svarbius terminus, pavyzdžiui, "pelnas" arba "sumažėjimas". Tada naudojame mokymosi metodus su keliais nuostoliais, kurie naudoja priešingus pavyzdžius. Rinkos komentarų kūrimo užduoties eksperimentai rodo, kad 1) naudojant kontrastinius pavyzdžius pagerinamas gebėjimas kurti sakinius geriau pasirinkus leksinę įrangą, nesumažinant skysčio, 2) nuostolių funkcijos pasirinkimas yra svarbus veiksnys, nes skirtingų metrinių rodiklių rezultatai priklauso nuo nuostolių funkcijų tipų, 3) kai kuriose konkrečiose taisyklėse pateiktų pavyzdžių naudojimas dar labiau gerina veiklos rezultatus. Žmogaus vertinimas taip pat remia kontrastinių pavyzdžių naudojimo veiksmingumą.', 'ka': "მონაცემებისთვის მოდელები მონაცემებისთვის ტექსტის დავალებისთვის წარმოიქმნა, მაგრამ ზოგჯერ შეცდომა სიტყვები, მაგრამ, მაგალითად 'Nikkei gains' იქნება, როდესაც 'Nikkei drops'  ჩვენ შევხედავთ მოდელები, რომლებიც კონტრასტიური მაგალითად, მაგალითად შეცდომა სიტყვები ან სიტყვები, დამატებით მაგალითად შეცდომების შემდეგ. ჩვენ პირველად შევქმნით კონტრასტური მაგალითების გამოსახულებლად კონტრასტური მაგალითების გამოსახულებლად, როგორც 'მიიღება' ან 'drop'. შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სწავლების მეტოვები, რამდენიმე წარმოდგენებით, რომლებიც კონტრასტური მაგალითების გამოყენება. (1) კონტრასტიური მაგალითების გამოყენება კონტრასტიური მაგალითების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც უკეთესიური ლექსიკალური გამოყენებაში შეუძლებელია, უკეთესიური გამოყენებაში, 2) გამოყენება ფუნქციის გამოყენება მნიშვნელოვანი ფაქტო და 3) მაგალითების გამოყენება, რომლებიც განსაკუთრებული წესებით გამოყენება უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტია. ადამიანის განსაზღვრება ასევე ეფექტიური გამოყენება კონტრასტური მაგალითების გამოყენება.", 'ms': "Existing models for data-to-text tasks generate fluent but sometimes incorrect sentences e.g., 'Nikkei gains' is generated when 'Nikkei drops' is expected.  We investigate models trained on contrastive examples i.e., incorrect sentences or terms, in addition to correct ones to reduce such errors.  We first create rules to produce contrastive examples from correct ones by replacing frequent crucial terms such as 'gain' or 'drop'.  We then use learning methods with several losses that exploit contrastive examples.  Eksperimen dalam tugas generasi komentar pasar menunjukkan bahawa 1) mengeksploitasi contoh bertentangan meningkatkan kemampuan menghasilkan kalimat dengan pilihan leksikal yang lebih baik, tanpa merusak keseluruhan, 2) pilihan fungsi kehilangan adalah faktor penting kerana prestasi pada metrik berbeza bergantung pada jenis fungsi kehilangan,  and 3) the use of the examples produced by some specific rules further improves performance.  Evaluasi manusia juga menyokong keefektivitas menggunakan contoh bertentangan.", 'mn': 'Өгөгдлийн болон текст даалгавруудын суурь загварууд шингэн гаргадаг. Гэхдээ заримдаа буруу үг бий болдог. Жишээлбэл \'Nikkei gains\' нь \'Nikkei drops\' гэж хүлээн зөвшөөрсөн үг бий болдог. Бид эсрэг жишээ дээр сургалтын загваруудыг судалж, яг л буруу үг эсвэл хэлбэрүүдийг буруу хэлбэрүүдийг багасгах гэсэн үг юм. Эхлээд бид зөв жишээнээс эсрэг жишээг бий болгоход "ялгах" эсвэл "доошлох" шиг ихэвчлэн чухал томъёог орлуулж байдаг. Дараа нь бид суралцах аргыг олон алдаа ашиглаж, эсрэг жишээ ашигладаг. Зах зээл дээрх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үйл ажиллагааны туршилт нь 1) эсрэг жишээг ашиглаж өгүүлбэрийг илүү сайн хэлний сонголтоор бий болгох чадварыг улам сайжруулдаг. 2) алдагдах функцийн сонголт нь чухал хүчин зүйл юм. Учир нь өөр метрийн үйл ажиллагаа алдагдах функ 3) зарим тодорхой дүрмийн жишээг ашиглах нь илүү үр дүнг сайжруулдаг. Хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээ мөн эсрэг жишээ ашиглах үр дүнг дэмжиж байна.', 'mt': "Existing models for data-to-text tasks generate fluent but sometimes incorrect sentences e.g., 'Nikkei gains' is generated when 'Nikkei drops' is expected.  We investigate models trained on contrastive examples i.e., incorrect sentences or terms, in addition to correct ones to reduce such errors.  We first create rules to produce contrastive examples from correct ones by replacing frequent crucial terms such as 'gain' or 'drop'.  Imbagħad nużaw metodi ta’ tagħlim b’diversi telf li jisfruttaw eżempji kuntrastivi. L-esperimenti dwar il-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-kummenti tas-suq juru li 1) l-isfruttar ta’ eżempji kuntrastivi jtejjeb il-kapaċità li jiġu ġġenerati sentenzi b’għażla lexikali aħjar, mingħajr ma tiġi ddegradata l-fluwenza, 2) l-għażla tal-funzjoni tat-telf hija fattur importanti minħabba li l-prestazzjonijiet fuq metriċi differenti jiddependu mit-tipi ta’ funzjonijiet tat-telf, ) u 3) l-użu tal-eżempji prodotti minn xi regoli speċifiċi jkompli jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni. L-evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem tappoġġja wkoll l-effettività tal-użu ta’ eżempji kuntrastivi.", 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കു് നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഫ്ലൈന്\u200dറ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d തെറ്റായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന് ഇത്തരം തെറ്റുകള്\u200d കുറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം തെറ്റായ വാക്കുകളോ വാക്കുകളോ പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന് നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു, ശരിയായ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ആ പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു എതിര്\u200dപ്പിലുള്ള ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റ് കുറിച്ചുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് 1) വിരോധമായ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് നല്ല ല ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കഴിവ് മെച്ചറിയാതെ  (3) ചില പ്രത്യേക നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിച്ച ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പുള്ള ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പിന്തുണയ്ക', 'ro': 'Modelele existente pentru activitățile date-text generează fraze fluente, dar uneori incorecte, de exemplu, "câștiguri Nikkei" este generat atunci când se așteaptă "picături Nikkei". Investigăm modele instruite pe exemple contrastante, adică propoziții sau termeni incorecti, în plus față de cele corectate pentru a reduce astfel de erori. Creăm mai întâi reguli pentru a produce exemple contrastante din cele corecte prin înlocuirea termenilor esențiali frecvenți, cum ar fi "câștig" sau "scădere". Apoi folosim metode de învățare cu mai multe pierderi care exploatează exemple contrastante. Experimentele privind activitatea de generare a comentariilor de piață arată că 1) exploatarea exemplelor contrastante îmbunătățește capacitatea de a genera propoziții cu o mai bună alegere lexicală, fără a degrada fluența, 2) alegerea funcției de pierdere este un factor important deoarece performanțele pe diferite metrici depind de tipurile de funcții de pierdere, și 3) utilizarea exemplelor produse de anumite norme specifice îmbunătățește și mai mult performanța. Evaluarea umană susține, de asemenea, eficiența utilizării exemplelor contrastante.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande modeller for data- to- tekstoppgåver generer fluent, men noen ganger feil setningar, f.eks. «Nikkei gains» blir generert når « Nikkei drops » ventar. Vi undersøker modeller trengte på kontrastiske eksemplar, t.d. feil setningar eller vilkår, i tillegg til korrigerande for å redusera slike feil. Vi oppretter første reglar for å produsera kontrastende eksemplar frå rette, ved å byta ut ofte viktige uttrykk som «gain» eller «drop». Vi bruker så læringsmetodar med fleire tap som eksploderer kontrasteksemplar. Eksperimentar på oppgåva for å laga markedskommentarar viser at 1) å bruka kontrastiske eksemplar forbetrar kapasiteten for å laga setningar med betre leksisk val, utan å redusera flukten, 2) valet av tapfunksjonen er ein viktig faktor, fordi utgangane på ulike metrikar avhengig av typar tapfunksjonar. (og 3) bruken av eksemplene produsert av nokre spesifikke reglar forbetrar utviklinga. Menneske evaluering støttar også effektiviteten for å bruka kontrastende eksemplar.', 'pl': 'Istniejące modele zadań danych-tekstowych generują płynne, ale czasami nieprawidłowe zdania, np. "Nikkei zyski" generuje się, gdy oczekuje się "Nikkei spada". Badamy modele trenowane na przykładach kontrastywnych tj. nieprawidłowych zdaniach lub terminach, a także poprawiamy, aby zmniejszyć takie błędy. Najpierw tworzymy reguły, aby tworzyć kontrastywne przykłady z poprawnych, zastępując częste kluczowe terminy, takie jak "zysk" lub "spadek". Następnie stosujemy metody uczenia się z kilkoma stratami, które wykorzystują kontrastywne przykłady. Eksperymenty dotyczące zadania generowania komentarzy rynkowych pokazują, że 1) wykorzystanie kontrastywnych przykładów poprawia zdolność generowania zdań o lepszym wyborze leksykalicznym, bez obniżania płynności, 2) wybór funkcji straty jest ważnym czynnikiem, ponieważ wyniki różnych wskaźników zależą od rodzaju funkcji strat, oraz 3) wykorzystanie przykładów wynikających z niektórych szczególnych przepisów jeszcze bardziej poprawia wydajność. Ocena ludzka wspiera również skuteczność stosowania kontrastywnych przykładów.', 'si': 'දත්ත වෙනුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා නමුත් සමහර වෙලා අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක උදාහරණ වලින්, හරියට වැරදි වචන නැති වචන න අපි මුලින්ම නියෝජිතය සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ සම්පූර්ණ උදාහරණ වලින් නියෝජිතය නිර්මාණය කරන්න, සම්පූර්ණ ඊට පස්සේ අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න විදියට පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකෘති උදාහරණ වලි පරීක්ෂණයක් මාර්කේට් කිරීම් ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්වාස ක්\u200dරියාව පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට 1) පරික්ෂණ උදාහරණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ සහ 3) විශේෂ නීතියක් නිර්මාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා උදාහරණය. මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරතිකෘති උදාහරණය භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා.', 'sr': 'Postojeći modeli za zadatak podataka do teksta stvaraju tekućinu, ali ponekad nepravedne rečenice, npr. „Nikkei dobija“ se proizvede kada se očekuje "Nikkei padne". Istražujemo modele obučene na kontrastivnim primjerima, tj. nepravedne rečenice ili uslovi, osim ispravnih rečenica za smanjenje takvih grešaka. Prvo stvorimo pravila za proizvodnju kontrastivnih primjera od ispravnih, zamjenjujući često ključne uvjete kao što su \'dobiti\' ili \'pad\'. Onda koristimo metode učenja sa nekoliko gubitka koje koriste kontrastne primjere. Eksperimenti na zadatku generacije komentara na tržištu pokazuju da 1) iskorištavanje kontrastivnih primjera poboljšava sposobnost stvaranja rečenica sa boljim leksičkim izborom, a da ne smanjuje tečnost, 2) izbor funkcije gubitka je važan faktor jer izvodima na različitim metrikama zavise od vrsta funkcija gubitka, i 3) korištenje primjera proizvođenih nekim određenim pravilima dalje poboljšava učinkovitost. Ljudska procjena takođe podržava učinkovitost korištenja kontrastivnih primjera.', 'so': "Tusaalada joogta e e shaqooyinka macluumaadka ee macluumaadka lagu qorayo wuxuu dhalaa burbur, laakiin marmarka qaarkood waxaa la abuuraa habboon, tusaale ahaan 'Nikkei helaa' marka la rajaynayo 'Nikkei drops'. Tusaale-tababarida ka tababarida tusaale ahaan kala duwan, tusaale ahaan imtixaanka saxda ah ama qoraalka, waxaana ka baaraandeynayaa tusaale-tababaro saxda ah si ay u hoosaystiro qaladka caynkaas ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu abuurnaa sharciyada si aan uga soo bixino tusaalooyin kala duwan oo saxda ah, si aan ugu beddelno sharciga ugu muhiimsan sida 'faa'iido' ama 'drop'. Markaas waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaabab waxbarasho ah oo khasaaro badan oo u baahan tusaalayaal kala duwan. Imtixaanka arimaha commentarka suuqa waxaa muuqda in tusaalayaasha kala duwan lagu isticmaalayo uu kordhiyaa awoodda soo saaridda xuquuqda ka wanaagsan oo la doorto xuquuqda leksikarka, iyadoon hoos u dhigin faa’iidada khasaarada, 2) doorashada kharashka waa wax muhiim ah sababtoo ah falimaha kala duduwan waxay ku xiran yihiin noocyada khasaarada, (iyo 3) isticmaalka tusaalayaasha uu soo saaray qaynuunno cayiman oo uu sii kordhiyo dhamaanka. Qiimeynta dadku waxay sidoo kale caawinaysaa shaqaalaha isticmaalka tusaale ka hortaga ah.", 'sv': 'Befintliga modeller för data-to-text-uppgifter genererar flytande men ibland felaktiga meningar, t.ex. "Nikkei vinster" genereras när "Nikkei droppar" förväntas. Vi undersöker modeller tränade på kontrastiva exempel, dvs felaktiga meningar eller termer, utöver att korrigera sådana för att minska sådana fel. Vi skapar först regler för att producera kontrasterande exempel från korrekta exempel genom att ersätta vanliga avgörande termer som "vinn" eller "släpp". Vi använder sedan inlärningsmetoder med flera förluster som utnyttjar kontrasterande exempel. Experiment på marknadskommentarsgenereringsuppgiften visar att 1) att utnyttja kontrastiva exempel förbättrar förmågan att generera meningar med bättre lexikalt val, utan att försämra flytförmågan, 2) valet av förlustfunktionen är en viktig faktor eftersom prestandan på olika mätvärden beror på typen av förlustfunktioner, och 3) Användningen av de exempel som framkommit genom vissa specifika regler förbättrar resultaten ytterligare. Mänsklig utvärdering stöder också effektiviteten i att använda kontrasterande exempel.', 'ta': "தரவு- உரை பணிகளுக்கு இருக்கும் மாதிரிகள் தெளிவான உருவாக்குகிறது ஆனால் சில நேரங்களில் தவறான வாக்குகளை உதாரணமாக 'Nikkei drops' எதிர்பார்க்கும் மாதிரியான உதாரணங்களில் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளை நாம் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம், அதாவது, தவறான வாக்கு அல்லது வாக்குகள், சரியான ஒன் சரியான உதாரணங்களை உருவாக்க முதலில் நாம் விதிகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம் 'gain' அல்லது 'drop' போன்ற முக்கியமான வார்த்தைகளை மாற பிறகு நாம் கற்றல் முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் எதிர்மறையான உதாரணங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். சந்தை குறிப்பு உருவாக்கும் செயல்பாட்டின் முன்னோட்டங்கள் 1) பயன்படுத்தும் முறைமையான உதாரணங்கள், சிறந்த லெக்சிக் தேர்வுடன் வாக்குகளை உருவாக்கும் சக்தியை அதிகரிக்கும், வெளி (மற்றும் 3) சில குறிப்பிட்ட விதிகளால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உதாரணங்களை பயன்படுத்தும் மேலும் செயல்பாட் Human evaluation also supports the effectiveness of using contrastive examples.", 'ur': "Data-to-text tasks کے لئے موجود موڈل فلینٹ پیدا کرتے ہیں لیکن بعض اوقات غلطی جماعت کی مثال یہ ہے کہ 'Nikkei gains' جب 'Nikkei drops' کی انتظار کی جاتی ہے۔ ہم مدل کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو مخالف مثالوں پر آموزش کی جاتی ہیں، یعنی غلطی جماعت یا شرایط کے علاوہ، اس طرح کی غلطی کم کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم پہلے قانون پیدا کرتے ہیں کہ درستوں سے مختلف مثالیں پیدا کریں اور بہت سی ضروری قوموں کو بدل دیتے ہیں جیسے 'gain' یا 'drop'. پھر ہم تعلیم کے طریقے سے چند خسارہ کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں جو مخالف مثالیں استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ مارکت کی کمٹر کی پیدائش تاسپ کی تجربیات دکھاتی ہے کہ 1) مختلف مثالیں استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کلمات کو اچھی لکسیکی انتخاب سے جوڑنے کے قابلیت سے زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ کرتا ہے، بغیر فائدہ ذلیل کرتا ہے، 2) خسارہ کا انتخاب ایک اہم فائدہ ہے کیونکہ مختلف متریک کی نمائش خسارہ اور 3) مثالوں کا استعمال کچھ خاص قوانین سے اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ انسان کی ارزیابی بھی کنٹرسیٹ نمونوں کے استعمال کے مطابق فعالیت کی مدد کرتی ہے.", 'mk': 'Постојаните модели за задачи од податоци до текст генерираат течни, но понекогаш неправилни реченици, на пример, „Nikkei gains“ се генерираат кога се очекува „Nikkei drops“. We investigate models trained on contrastive examples i.e., incorrect sentences or terms, in addition to correct ones to reduce such errors.  Прво создаваме правила за да произведеме контрастивни примери од правилните со замена на често клучни термини како што се „добивање“ или „пад“. We then use learning methods with several losses that exploit contrastive examples.  Експериментите на задачата за генерирање коментари на пазарот покажуваат дека 1) искористувањето на контрастивните примери ја подобрува способноста за генерирање на реченици со подобар лексички избор, без да ја деградира течноста, 2) изборот на функцијата на загуба е важен фактор бидејќи изведувањата на различни метрики зависат од типови 3) употребата на примерите произведени од некои специфични правила понатаму ја подобрува резултатот. Човечката проценка, исто така, ја поддржува ефикасноста на користењето контрастивни примери.', 'uz': "Maʼlumotlar matn vazifalari uchun mavjud modellar suv yaratish mumkin, ammo ba'zi soʻzlar notoʻg ʻri, masalan, 'Nikkei tuzuvchi' kutilganda 'Nikkei tuzuvchi' yaratiladi. Biz bunday xatolarni kamaytirish uchun ishlatilgan modellarni tahrirlash mumkin, balki so'zlar yoki tugmalar bilan notoʻgʻri. Biz birinchi boshqa qoidalarni to ʻgʻri misollarni yaratish uchun qoidalar yaramiz. 'gain' yoki 'drop' kabi muhim imkoniyatlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. We then use learning methods with several losses that exploit contrastive examples.  Suqqa tajribasining vazifasi tajribalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, 1) ta'minlovchi misollarni ishlatish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirib oshirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish mumkin. Siz qo'shish funksiyasini hech qanday qilish muhim sababi, chunki har xil metrikalarning turlariga ishlash mumkin, va 3) bir necha xil qoidalar yaratilgan misollar ishlatiladi va bajarishni bajaradi. Inson qiymatlari esa contrast misollarni ishlatishni qoʻllaydi.", 'vi': 'Người mẫu tồn tại cho các công việc dữ liệu thành văn bản tạo ra những câu nói lưu loát nhưng đôi khi không đúng, ví dụ như "tăng lợi nhuận Nikkei" được tạo ra khi "Nikkei drops" được trông đợi. Chúng tôi đi ều tra các mô hình được đào tạo dựa trên các ví dụ tương đối, tức là các câu không đúng, thêm vào những câu sửa sai để giảm lỗi. Trước hết, chúng ta tạo ra những luật lệ khác nhau từ những trường hợp đúng bằng cách thay thế các thuật ngữ chủ yếu thường xuyên như "lợi lộc" hay "giảm". Chúng ta sử dụng các phương pháp học với nhiều mất mát để khai thác các ví dụ tương đối. Thử nghiệm trên nhiệm vụ sản xuất bình luận thị trường cho thấy rằng 1) khai thác các ví dụ tương đối cải thiện khả năng tạo câu chữ với sự lựa chọn ngôn ngữ văn học tốt hơn, mà không làm suy giảm tính lưu động, 2) sự lựa chọn chức năng mất mát là một yếu tố quan trọng vì các hiệu suất theo đo khác tùy thuộc vào các dạng chức năng mất mát, và ba) việc sử dụng những ví dụ được tạo ra bởi một số quy tắc cụ thể cải thiện hiệu quả. Xét nghiệm con người cũng hỗ trợ hiệu quả sử dụng các ví dụ tương đối.', 'da': 'Eksisterende modeller for data-to-text opgaver genererer flydende, men undertiden forkerte sætninger, f.eks. "Nikkei gevinster" genereres, når "Nikkei drops" forventes. Vi undersøger modeller, der er trænet på kontrasteksempler, dvs. forkerte sætninger eller termer, ud over at rette dem for at reducere sådanne fejl. Vi skaber først regler for at frembringe kontrasterende eksempler ud fra korrekte eksempler ved at erstatte hyppige afgørende udtryk som "gevinst" eller "fald". Vi bruger derefter læringsmetoder med flere tab, der udnytter kontrastive eksempler. Eksperimenter med markedskommentarsgenereringsopgaven viser, at 1) udnyttelse af kontrastive eksempler forbedrer evnen til at generere sætninger med bedre leksikalske valg, uden at nedbryde flydenheden, 2) valget af tabsfunktionen er en vigtig faktor, fordi præstationerne på forskellige målinger afhænger af typerne tabsfunktioner, og 3) anvendelsen af eksemplerne fra visse specifikke regler forbedrer yderligere resultaterne. Evaluering af mennesker understøtter også effektiviteten af at bruge kontrastive eksempler.', 'nl': "Bestaande modellen voor data-to-text taken genereren vloeiende maar soms onjuiste zinnen, bijvoorbeeld, 'Nikkei wint' wordt gegenereerd wanneer 'Nikkei valt' wordt verwacht. We onderzoeken modellen getraind op contrastieve voorbeelden, d.w.z. onjuiste zinnen of termen, naast correcte modellen om dergelijke fouten te verminderen. Eerst maken we regels om contrasterende voorbeelden te produceren van correcte voorbeelden door veelvuldige cruciale termen zoals 'gain' of 'drop' te vervangen. Vervolgens gebruiken we leermethoden met verschillende verliezen die gebruik maken van contrasterende voorbeelden. Experimenten met het genereren van marktcommentaren tonen aan dat 1) het gebruik van contrastieve voorbeelden het vermogen verbetert om zinnen te genereren met een betere lexicale keuze, zonder afbreuk te doen aan de vloeibaarheid, 2) de keuze van de verliesfunctie een belangrijke factor is omdat de prestaties op verschillende metrics afhankelijk zijn van de soorten verliesfuncties, en 3) het gebruik van de voorbeelden die in bepaalde specifieke regels zijn opgesteld, verbetert de prestaties verder. Menselijke evaluatie ondersteunt ook de effectiviteit van het gebruik van contrasterende voorbeelden.", 'id': "Existing models for data-to-text tasks generate fluent but sometimes incorrect sentences e.g., 'Nikkei gains' is generated when 'Nikkei drops' is expected.  Kami menyelidiki model yang dilatih pada contoh kontras, yaitu kalimat atau istilah yang salah, selain yang benar untuk mengurangi kesalahan tersebut. Pertama kita menciptakan aturan untuk menghasilkan contrastif dari contoh yang benar dengan menggantikan istilah penting sering seperti 'gain' atau 'drop'. Kemudian kita menggunakan metode belajar dengan beberapa kerugian yang mengeksploitasi contoh kontras. Eksperimen pada tugas generasi komentar pasar menunjukkan bahwa 1) mengeksploitasi contoh kontras meningkatkan kemampuan generasi kalimat dengan pilihan leksik yang lebih baik, tanpa merusak fluency, 2) pilihan fungsi kehilangan adalah faktor penting karena prestasi pada metrik berbeda bergantung pada jenis fungsi kehilangan, Dan 3) penggunaan contoh yang diproduksi oleh beberapa aturan spesifik lebih memperbaiki prestasi. Evaluasi manusia juga mendukung efektivitas menggunakan contoh kontras.", 'bg': 'Съществуващите модели за задачи от данни към текст генерират плавни, но понякога неправилни изречения, например "Никей печели" се генерира, когато се очаква "Никей пада". Проучваме модели, обучени по контрастни примери, т.е. неправилни изречения или термини, в допълнение към коректни такива, за да намалим тези грешки. Първо създаваме правила, за да произвеждаме контрастни примери от правилните, като заменяме честите ключови термини като "печалба" или "спад". След това използваме методи за обучение с няколко загуби, които използват контрастни примери. Експериментите по задачата за генериране на коментари на пазара показват, че 1) експлоатирането на контрастни примери подобрява способността за генериране на изречения с по-добър лексикален избор, без да влошава плавността, 2) изборът на функцията за загуба е важен фактор, тъй като показателите на различните показатели зависят от видовете функции за загуба, и 3) използването на примерите, произведени от някои специфични правила, допълнително подобрява ефективността. Оценката на човека също подкрепя ефективността на използването на контрастни примери.', 'ko': "데이터가 텍스트 작업에 들어가는 기존 모델은 유창하지만 때로는 부정확한 문장을 생성한다. 예를 들어'일경 수익'은'일경 하락'을 예상할 때 생성된다.정확한 문장이나 용어를 제외하고 우리는 비교 예시(즉 잘못된 문장이나 용어)에 따라 훈련하는 모델을 조사하여 이러한 오류를 줄였다.우리는 먼저 규칙을 만들고 흔히 볼 수 있는 관건적인 용어, 예를 들어'이익'이나'쇠퇴'를 바꾸어 정확한 예에서 대비례를 생성한다.그리고 우리는 비교 예를 이용하여 손실된 학습 방법을 사용한다.시장 평론 생성 임무에서의 실험에 의하면 1) 비교 예시를 이용하여 더 좋은 어휘 선택을 가진 문장을 생성하는 능력을 향상시킬 수 있고 유창성을 떨어뜨리지 않는다. 2) 손실 함수의 선택은 중요한 요소이다. 왜냐하면 서로 다른 도량의 성능은 손실 함수의 유형에 달려 있기 때문이다.3) 특정 규칙 생성 예제를 사용하여 성능을 향상시킵니다.인류 평가도 대비례 사용의 유효성을 지지한다.", 'de': 'Bestehende Modelle für Daten-zu-Text-Aufgaben erzeugen fließende, aber manchmal falsche Sätze, z.B. "Nikkei gewinnt" wird generiert, wenn "Nikkei fällt" erwartet wird. Wir untersuchen Modelle, die an kontrastiven Beispielen, d.h. falschen Sätzen oder Begriffen trainiert wurden, zusätzlich zu korrigierenden, um solche Fehler zu reduzieren. Zunächst erstellen wir Regeln, um kontrastive Beispiele aus korrekten Beispielen zu erzeugen, indem wir häufig wichtige Begriffe wie "Gewinn" oder "Drop" ersetzen. Wir verwenden dann Lernmethoden mit mehreren Verlusten, die kontrastive Beispiele nutzen. Experimente zur Erzeugung von Marktkommentaren zeigen, dass 1) die Nutzung kontrastiver Beispiele die Fähigkeit verbessert, Sätze mit besserer lexikalischer Auswahl zu generieren, ohne die Fließfähigkeit zu beeinträchtigen, 2) die Wahl der Verlustfunktion ein wichtiger Faktor ist, da die Leistungen verschiedener Metriken von den Arten von Verlustfunktionen abhängen, und 3) die Verwendung von Beispielen, die in einigen spezifischen Regeln erstellt wurden, verbessert die Leistung weiter. Die menschliche Evaluation unterstützt auch die Wirksamkeit kontrastiver Beispiele.', 'sw': "Mfano wa kazi za taarifa hadi maandishi unasababisha mafanikio lakini wakati mwingine hukumu zisizo sahihi, mfano, 'Nikkei anapata' huzaliwa pale 'Nikkei hupungua' inatarajiwa. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa mifano inayofundishwa kwa mifano tofauti kama vile hukumu isiyo sahihi au maneno, pamoja na wale sahihi ili kupunguza makosa hayo. Kwanza tunatengeneza sheria za kutengeneza mifano tofauti kutoka kwa wale sahihi kwa kubadilisha maneno muhimu kama vile 'faida' au 'kupungua'. Kisha tunatumia mbinu za kujifunza na hasara kadhaa ambazo zinatumia mifano tofauti. Majaribio katika kazi ya maoni ya soko yanaonyesha kuwa 1) matumizi ya mifano tofauti yanaboresha uwezo wa kutengeneza hukumu yenye uchaguzi bora wa lexico, bila kudhalilisha ufanisi, 2) uchaguzi wa kazi za kupoteza ni sababu muhimu kwa sababu matumizi ya mitindo tofauti yanategemea aina ya kazi za kupoteza, na 3) matumizi ya mifano iliyotengenezwa na baadhi ya sheria mahususi yanaboresha utendaji. Human evaluation also supports the effectiveness of using contrastive examples.", 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای موجود برای کار داده\u200cها و متن\u200cها مایع می\u200cشود ولی گاهی جمله\u200cهای اشتباهی برای مثال ، وقتی انتظار داشته باشد که «نیکیه\u200cهای پیروزی» تولید می\u200cشود. ما مدل\u200cها را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که بر نمونه\u200cهای مخالف، یعنی جمله\u200cهای غلط یا شرایط، در addition to correct ones for reducing such errors. ما اول قانون را برای تولید مثالهای مختلف از مثالهای درست با جایگزینش شرایط اغلب ضروری مثل "gain" یا "drop" ایجاد می کنیم. سپس از روش یادگیری استفاده می کنیم با چندین تباهی که مثالهای متفاوتی را استفاده می کنند. تجربه\u200cهای توصیف توصیف توصیف بازار نشان می\u200cدهند که ۱) استفاده از مثالهای متفاوتی قابلیت تولید کردن جمله\u200cها با انتخاب\u200cهای زبانی بهتر، بدون نابود کردن آلودگی، ۲) انتخاب فعالیت از دست دادن یک faktor مهم است چون اجرای متریک\u200cهای متفاوتی بستگی به نوع فعالیت از دست دادن است، و 3) استفاده از مثالها که توسط بعضی قانون خاص تولید شده، عملکرد را بهتر می کند. ارزیابی انسان همچنین فعالیت استفاده از مثالهای متفاوتی پشتیبانی می\u200cکند.', 'af': "Bestaande modele vir data- to- text taak genereer fluent, maar soms miskien verkeerde setinge bv., 'Nikkei ontvang' word genereer wanneer 'Nikkei drops' verwag word. Ons ondersoek modele wat op kontrastiewe voorbeelde opgelei is, bv. verkeerde setinge of bedrywe, in addition to correct ones to reduce such errors. Ons skep eerste reëls om kontrastiewe voorbeelde van korrekte voorbeelde te produseer deur dikwels kruisbare terme soos 'gain' of 'drop' te vervang. Ons gebruik dan leer metodes met verskeie verlies wat kontrastiewe voorbeelde gebruik. Eksperimente op die markkommentaar generasie taak wys dat 1) deur kontrastiewe voorbeelde te gebruik, verbeter die kapasiteit van die genereer van teikens met beter leksiese keuse, sonder om die fluiditeit te verdra, 2) die keuse van die verlies funksie is 'n belangrik faktor, omdat die uitgange op verskillende metries afhang van die tipes verlies funksies, (en 3) die gebruik van die voorbeelde wat deur sommige spesifieke reëls geproduseer word, verder verbeter die prestasie. Die menslike evaluering ondersteun ook die effektiviteit van die gebruik van kontrastiewe voorbeelde.", 'am': 'የዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ አድራሻ ምሳሌዎችን ፍጠር ግን አንዳንድ ጊዜ የስህተት ቃላት ምሳሌ "Nikkei drops" በተስፋ እንደሆነ ይፈጥራል። እንደዚህ ስህተቶችን ለማሳነስ በተቃዋሚ ምሳሌዎች ላይ የተማሩትን ምሳሌዎች እናምርመራለን፡፡ አስቀድመን የተቃዋሚ ምሳሌዎችን ከመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ ትምህርት ሥርዓት በተቃዋሚ ምሳሌዎች የሚጠቅሙትን ብዙዎችን ከሳሪዎች ጋር እንጠይቃለን፡፡ የገበያ ትውልድ ትውልድ ማድረግ ፈተናዎች 1) የተቃዋሚ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም የሚሻለውን የሌክሲካዊ ምርጫ መፍጠር ማድረግ እንዲያሳድጋል፣ ውጤቱን ሳይያዋርድ 2) የጠፋውን ሥራ ምርጫ የተጠቃሚ ውጤት ነው፡፡ እና 3) በተለያዩ ሥርዓቶች የተደረገውን ምሳሌዎችን የሚጠቀም የድምፅ አካሄዱን የሚሻል ነው፡፡ የሰው ምርጫዎች ደግሞ ተቃዋሚ ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም ጥቅም ይደግጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի տվյալների տեքստի առաջադրանքների մոդելներ, որոնք ճիշտ են ստեղծում, բայց երբեմն սխալ նախադասություններ են ստեղծում, օրինակ, «Nikke-ի շահույթները» ստեղծում են, երբ ակնկալվում է «Nikke-ի անկումները»: We investigate models trained on contrastive examples i.e., incorrect sentences or terms, in addition to correct ones to reduce such errors.  Սկզբում մենք ստեղծում ենք կանոններ ճիշտ օրինակներից հակադրող օրինակներ\' փոխարինելով հաճախ կարևոր տերմիններ, ինչպիսիք են "շահույթ" կամ "ընկնում": Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք սովորելու մեթոդներ մի քանի կորուստների հետ, որոնք օգտագործում են հակադրական օրինակներ: Experiments on the market comment generation task show that 1) exploiting contrastive examples improves the capability of generating sentences with better lexical choice, without degrading the fluency, 2) the choice of the loss function is an important factor because the performances on different metrics depend on the types of loss functions, 3) որոշ հատուկ կանոնների միջոցով ստեղծված օրինակների օգտագործումը ավելի բարելավում է արդյունքը: Մարդկային գնահատումը նաև աջակցում է հակադրական օրինակների օգտագործման արդյունավետությունը:', 'tr': "Data-to-text işleri üçin bar modeller howply döredir ýöne käwagt ýalňyş sözleri döredir. Meselâ, 'Nikkei gazanç' bolmagynda döredir. Biz nusgalary kontrast örneklerde, ýalňyş sözler ýa-da sözleri düzeltmek üçin düzeltmeli nusgalary barýarys. Ilkinji gezek dogry ýagdaýlardan kontrast örnekleri döretmek üçin 'gazanç' ýa-da 'drop' üýtgetmek üçin döredilşikli kurallar döredik. Sonra birnäçe ýitirmek bilen öwrenmek yöntemlerini ulanýarys, kontrast örnekleri ulanýarlar. pazarda terjimeler döredilmesi täsirinde örnekler 1) kontrast örneklerini ulanmak sözleriň gowy leksiýa saýlamagy bilen döretmäge köpräk taýýarlar, 2) ýitirme funksiýasynyň saýlamasynyň möhüm faktöridir çünki üýtgeýän metriýanyň eserleri ýitirme täplerinde bağlanýar, (we 3) Nähili takyk kurallar tarapyndan döredilen ýagdaýlaryň ullanyşyny başarmak üçin ýokarylşyrýar. Adamlar deňlemesi daňa kontrast örneklerini ulanmaklygyny golaýlaýar.", 'sq': 'Modelet ekzistuese për detyrat nga të dhëna në tekst gjenerojnë fraza të fluent e por ndonjëherë të gabuara, për shembull, \'fitime Nikkei\' gjenerohet kur pritet \'Nikkei bie\'. Ne hetojmë modele të trajnuar në shembuj kontrastë, pra, fjalë apo kushte të gabuara, përveç atyre të korrigjuara për të reduktuar gabimet e tilla. Ne së pari krijojmë rregulla për të prodhuar shembuj kontrastiv nga ato të sakta duke zëvendësuar termat e shpeshta vendimtare të tilla si "fitim" apo "rënie". Pastaj përdorim metoda mësimi me disa humbje që shfrytëzojnë shembuj kontrastë. Eksperimentet në detyrën e gjenerimit të komenteve të tregut tregojnë se 1) shfrytëzimi i shembujve kontrastuese përmirëson aftësinë e gjenerimit të fjalëve me zgjedhje më të mirë lexike, pa degraduar fluencën, 2) zgjedhja e funksionit të humbjes është një faktor i rëndësishëm sepse performancat në metrika të ndryshme varen nga llojet e funksioneve të humbjes, dhe 3) përdorimi i shembujve të prodhuar nga disa rregulla specifike përmirëson më tej performancën. Human evaluation also supports the effectiveness of using contrastive examples.', 'bn': "ডাটা থেকে টেক্সট কাজের জন্য বিদ্যমান মডেল ফ্লায়েন্ট তৈরি করে কিন্তু মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে ভুল বাক্য তৈরি করা হয়, যেমন 'নিকেই পাবে' আশা  আমরা অনুসন্ধান করি বিরোধী উদাহরণের উপর মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যেমন এই সমস্ত ভুল কমানোর পরিবর্তে সঠিক ক কাজ বা শর্তে আমরা প্রথমে নিয়ম তৈরি করি সঠিক উদাহরণ থেকে বিরোধী উদাহরণ তৈরি করি, যেমন 'লাভ' অথবা 'ফ্ল্যাড' প্রতিস্থাপন করে। তারপর আমরা শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি বেশ কয়েকটি ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত উদাহরণ ব্যবহার করে। বাজারের মন্তব্যের প্রজন্ম কাজের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ১) বিরোধী উদাহরণ ব্যবহার করে ভাল ল লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল নির্বাচনের সাথে বাক্য তৈরি করার ক্ষমতা উন্নত করে, কোন ফ্লাইসিকে অপমান করা  এবং ৩) কিছু নির্দিষ্ট নিয়মের দ্বারা উৎপাদন করা উদাহরণের ব্যবহার আরো উন্নত হয়। মানুষের মূল্যায়ন বিরোধী উদাহরণ ব্যবহারের কার্যকরীতে সমর্থন করে।", 'az': 'Data-to-text işləri üçün mövcud modellər fəaliyyət təşkil edir, amma bazen yanlış cümlələr, məsələn \'Nikkei qazanışları\' g özləniləndə yaradılır. Biz müxtəlif məsəllərdə təhsil edilmiş modelləri, həmçin in bu xətaları azaltmaq üçün yanlış sözlər və şartlar barəsində təhsil edirik. Biz ilk dəfə düzgün məsəllərdən müxtəlif məsəllər gətirmək üçün "kazanlıq" və "drop" kimi çox mövcud məsəlləri əvəz edərik. Sonra öyrənmək metodlarını müxtəlif məsəlləri istifadə edən bir neçə zərəri ilə istifadə edirik. Bağışlar təcrübələrinin təcrübələrinin təcrübəsi təcrübəsi göstərir ki, 1) müxtəlif məsəllər istifadə etmək cümlələri daha xeyirli leksik seçimləri ilə yaratmaq bacarılığını daha yaxşılaşdırır, sıxıntını azaltmadan, 2) kaybın fəaliyyətinin seçimləri möhüm faktorudur, çünki müxtəlif metriklərin perform Və 3) bəzi qaydalar ilə ürəklənən nümunələrin istifadəsi daha yaxşıdır. İnsan değerlendirməsi də müxtəlif məsəllərdən istifadə etmək efektivitətini dəstəkləyir.', 'bs': 'Postojeći modeli za zadatak podataka do teksta stvaraju tekućinu, ali ponekad nepravedne rečenice, na primjer, "Nikkei dobija" se stvaraju kada se očekuje "Nikkei padne". Istražujemo modele obučene na kontrastivnim primjerima, tj. nepravedne rečenice ili uslovi, osim ispravnih za smanjenje takvih grešaka. Prvo stvorimo pravila za proizvodnju kontrastivnih primjera od ispravnih, zamjenjujući često ključne uvjete kao što su \'dobiti\' ili \'pad\'. Onda koristimo metode učenja sa nekoliko gubitka koje koriste kontrastne primjere. Eksperimenti na zadatku generacije komentara na tržištu pokazuju da 1) iskorištavanje kontrastivnih primjera poboljšava sposobnost stvaranja rečenica sa boljim leksičkim izborom, bez smanjenja tečnosti, 2) izbor funkcije gubitka je važan faktor jer izvodima na različitim metrikama zavise od vrsta funkcija gubitka, i 3) korištenje primjera proizvođenih nekim određenim pravilima dalje poboljšava učinkovitost. Ljudska procjena također podržava učinkovitost korištenja kontrastivnih primjera.', 'cs': 'Stávající modely pro úlohy data-to-text generují plynulé, ale někdy nesprávné věty, např. "Nikkei zisky" se generuje, když se očekává "Nikkei klesá". Zkoumáme modely trénované na kontrastních příkladech, tj. nesprávných větách či termínech, kromě těch opravných, abychom tyto chyby omezili. Nejprve vytváříme pravidla pro vytváření kontrastních příkladů ze správných tím, že nahrazujeme časté klíčové termíny, jako je "zisk" nebo "pokles". Poté používáme metody učení s několika ztrátami, které využívají kontrastní příklady. Experimenty na úkolu generování komentářů na trhu ukazují, že 1) využití kontrastních příkladů zlepšuje schopnost generovat věty s lepší lexikální volbou, aniž by byla snížena plynulost, 2) volba ztrátové funkce je důležitým faktorem, protože výkonnost různých metrik závisí na typech ztrátových funkcí, a 3) použití příkladů vytvořených některými zvláštními pravidly dále zlepšuje výkon. Lidské hodnocení rovněž podporuje efektivitu používání kontrastních příkladů.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad mudelid andmetest tekstisse ülesannete jaoks loovad sujuvaid, kuid mõnikord ebaõigeid lauseid, näiteks "Nikkei kasu" tekib siis, kui oodatakse "Nikkei langeb". Uurime mudeleid, mis on koolitatud kontrastsetel näidetel ehk valedel lausetel või terminitel, lisaks nende parandamisele, et vähendada vigu. Kõigepealt loome reeglid, et tuua õigetest kontrastseid näiteid, asendades sagedased olulised terminid nagu "kasu" või "langus". Seejärel kasutame mitme kaotusega õppemeetodeid, mis kasutavad ära kontrastseid näiteid. Turukomplektide genereerimise ülesande eksperimendid näitavad, et 1) kontrastsete näidete kasutamine parandab parema leksikaalse valikuga lausete genereerimise võimet, halvendamata sujuvat lauset, 2) kadufunktsiooni valik on oluline tegur, sest erinevate mõõdikute tulemuslikkus sõltub kadufunktsioonide tüübist, ja 3) teatavate erieeskirjadega esitatud näidete kasutamine parandab tulemuslikkust veelgi. Inimeste hindamine toetab ka kontrastsete näidete kasutamise tõhusust.', 'ca': 'Els models existents de tasques de dades a text generen frases fluents però de vegades incorrectes, per exemple, quan s\'espera \'Nikkei baixa\'. Investiguem models entrenats en exemples contrastius, és a dir, frases o termes incorrectes, a més de corregir els que redueixen aquests errors. Primer creem regles per produir exemples contrastants a partir d\'exemples correctes substituint termes crucials freqüents com "guanyar" o "baixar". Després utilitzem mètodes d\'aprenentatge amb diverses pèrdues que expliquen exemples contrastants. Els experiments en la tasca de generació de comentaris del mercat mostran que 1) l\'explotació d\'exemples contrastius millora la capacitat de generar frases amb millor elecció lexical, sense degradar la fluïtat, 2) l\'elecció de la funció de pèrdua és un factor important perquè les performances en diferents mètriques depenen dels tipus de funcions de pèrdua, i 3) l\'ús dels exemples produïts per algunes regles específiques millora encara més el rendiment. L\'evaluació humana també suporta l\'efectivitat d\'utilitzar exemples contrastius.', 'hr': "Postojeći modeli za zadatke podataka do teksta stvaraju tekućinu, ali ponekad nepravedne rečenice, npr. „Nikkei dobivanje“ proizvršavaju se kada se očekuje „Nikkei padne“. Istražujemo modele obučene na kontrastivnim primjerima, tj. nepravedne rečenice ili uvjete, osim ispravnih načina za smanjenje takvih grešaka. Prvo stvorimo pravila za proizvodnju kontrastivnih primjera od ispravnih, zamjenjujući često ključne uvjete kao što su 'dobiti' ili 'pad'. Onda koristimo metode učenja sa nekoliko gubitka koje koriste kontrastne primjere. Eksperimenti na zadatku generacije komentara na tržištu pokazuju da 1) iskorištavanje kontrastivnih primjera poboljšava sposobnost proizvodnje rečenica sa boljim leksičkim izborom, bez smanjenja tečnosti, 2) izbor funkcije gubitka je važan faktor jer izvodima na različitim metrikama zavise od vrsta funkcija gubitka, i 3) korištenje primjera proizvođenih nekim određenim pravilima dalje poboljšava učinkovitost. Ljudska procjena također podržava učinkovitost korištenja kontrastivnih primjera.", 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat mallit datasta tekstiin tuottavat sujuvaa mutta toisinaan virheellistä lausetta, esim. "Nikkei-voittoja" syntyy, kun Nikkei-pudotuksia odotetaan. Tutkimme malleja, jotka on koulutettu kontrastiivisiin esimerkkeihin eli vääriin lauseisiin tai termeihin, korjattujen mallien lisäksi tällaisten virheiden vähentämiseksi. Luomme ensin sääntöjä, joilla saadaan oikeista esimerkeistä vastakkaisia esimerkkejä korvaamalla usein tärkeät termit, kuten "voitto" tai "pudotus". Tämän jälkeen käytämme oppimismenetelmiä, joissa on useita tappioita, jotka hyödyntävät kontrastiivisia esimerkkejä. Markkinakommenttien luontitehtävän kokeet osoittavat, että 1) kontrastiivisten esimerkkien hyödyntäminen parantaa kykyä luoda lauseita, joilla on parempi sanastovalinta heikentämättä sujuvuutta, 2) häviöfunktion valinta on tärkeä tekijä, koska eri mittareiden suorituskyky riippuu häviöfunktioiden tyypistä, ja 3) joidenkin erityissääntöjen mukaisten esimerkkien käyttö parantaa suorituskykyä entisestään. Ihmisten arviointi tukee myös kontrastiivisten esimerkkien käytön tehokkuutta.', 'sk': 'Obstoječi modeli za opravila iz podatkov v besedilo ustvarjajo tekoče, a včasih napačne stavke, npr. "Nikkei dobiček" se ustvari, ko se pričakuje "Nikkei padce". Raziskujemo modele, usposobljene na kontrastnih primerih, npr. nepravilnih stavkih ali izrazih, poleg popravkov, da bi zmanjšali takšne napake. Najprej ustvarimo pravila za ustvarjanje kontrastnih primerov iz pravilnih, tako da nadomestimo pogoste ključne izraze, kot sta "dobiček" ali "padec". Nato uporabljamo metode učenja z več izgubami, ki izkoriščajo kontrastne primere. Eksperimenti z nalogo ustvarjanja tržnih komentarjev kažejo, da 1) izkoriščanje kontrastnih primerov izboljšuje sposobnost ustvarjanja stavkov z boljšo leksikalno izbiro, ne da bi zmanjšali tekočost, 2) izbira funkcije izgube je pomemben dejavnik, saj je zmogljivost različnih metrik odvisna od vrst funkcij izgube, in 3) uporaba primerov iz nekaterih posebnih pravil dodatno izboljšuje učinkovitost. Ocena ljudi podpira tudi učinkovitost uporabe kontrastnih primerov.', 'ha': 'Ana samun da ke gabatar wa aikin data-zuwa-text, ya ƙãga aiki mai ruɓa, kuma a ƙididdige, misali, "Nikki ke sami" idan an yi ƙayyade "Nikki da ke saka". Tuna ƙidãya misãlai wanda aka sanar da su masu motsi masu motsi, misali, misali masu inganci ko misali, da kuma da tsarin da za\'a ƙara misalin wannan. Kayyar da farkon, Muke ƙãga wasu misãlai masu motsi daga masu sahiya, kuma Mu musanya misãlai masu muhimu kamar "amfani" ko "damu". Sa\'an nan kuma Munã yi amfani da metoden lõkaci da wasu hasãra sun yi amfani da misãlai masu motsi. Kayan jarrabi a kan aikin mai farin mabuwãyar marketi yana nuna cewa, istinin misãlai masu motsi da 1) yana ƙara wa awon ya ƙãga matsayi da zafi mai kyau wa zaɓani, kuma bã ya kunyatar da fassarar haske, 2) zaɓen aikin hasãra yana da muhimmi kwanan da aikin bayani na daban-daban na yi ƙayyade ga nau\'ar hasãra, @ action: button Ana ƙaddara mutum yana ƙarfafa fikanci da za\'a yi amfani da misãlai masu motsi.', 'he': 'דוגמנים קיימים למשימות מידע לטקסט יוצרים משפטים נוזלים, אך לפעמים לא נכונים, למשל, "ניקי מרוויחים" יוצרים כאשר "ניקי נופל". אנו חוקרים דוגמאות מאומנות על דוגמאות נוגדות, כלומר משפטים או תנאים לא נכונים, בנוסף לתקנות דוגמאות כדי להפחית טעויות כאלה. אנו קודם יוצרים חוקים כדי לייצר דוגמאות נוגדות מאותם נכונים על ידי החלפת מונחים קריטיים לעתים קרובות כמו "רווח" או "drop". ואז אנו משתמשים בשיטות למידה עם מספר אבדות שמשתמשים בדוגמאות נוגדות. ניסויים על משימת יוצרת תגובות בשוק מראים 1) ניצל דוגמאות נוגדות משפר את היכולת ליצור משפטים עם בחירה לקסית טובה יותר, בלי להפיל את הנוזל, 2) הבחירה של פונקציית האובדן היא גורם חשוב כי ההופעות על מטריות שונות תלויות בסוגים של פונקציות אובדן, 3) השימוש בדוגמאות שנוצרות על ידי כמה חוקים ספציפיים משפר את ההופעה. הערכה האנושית תומכת גם בהיעילות של השימוש בדוגמאות נוגדות.', 'jv': 'Sample rate Awak dhéwé sakjane model sing beraksi kanggo kelangan contrast, dadi, kabèh nambarang ora oleh, nambah sing beraksi kanggo nambah akeh eror Awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan hukum kanggo nyuggo ingkang dipun ciptaaken anyar tentang kanggo mbatalé "gawe" atawa "Drop". Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem yang pisan kelas karo akeh pisan neng ketahan sing paling apik, dadi kaé supoyo ingkang daftar. Perintara bener sing paling nggambar komentar karo akeh pekenar bukane nggawe 1) iso nggunakake suparamusan karo kapan kanggo ngelangubah kapan kanggo ngubah dolanan sing luwih apik dhéwé, lan ora nggawe kapan karo hal kudu nggawe gerakan sampek, 2) akeh operasi kapan kanggo langgar nggawe kapan kuwi dianggap uwong, soalé kapan kuwi kapan kuwi per Cendelok Validity', 'bo': 'Existing models for data-to-text tasks generate fluent but sometimes incorrect sentences like "Nikkei gains"are generated when "Nikkei drops" is expected. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལ་གནད་དོན་མིན་དཔེར་ན་ཕན་ཚོར་བ་དང་བཅས་མེད་པའི་དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་དབང་ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་བསྡུར་བའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་འདུག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པར་སྐྱོན་རྐྱེན་གཞན་ཡང་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experiments on the market comment generation task show that 1) exploiting contrastive examples improves the capability of generating sentences with better lexical choice, without degrading the fluency, 2) the choice of the loss function is an important factor because the performances on different metrics depend on the types of loss functions, ) དཔེར་ན། དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་གྱི་ཁྲོད་ཅིག་གིས་བཀོད་པ་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་། མི་དང་མི་རིག་ཐག་གིས་གདོང་བཅས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ནི།'}
{'en': 'MedWriter : Knowledge-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'ar': 'MedWriter: إنشاء نصوص طبية مدركة للمعرفة', 'es': 'MedWriter: generación de textos médicos conscientes del conocimiento', 'fr': 'MedWriter\xa0: Génération de textes médicaux sensibles aux connaissances', 'pt': 'MedWriter: Geração de Texto Médico Consciente do Conhecimento', 'ja': 'MedWriter: Knowledge - Aware医療テキスト生成', 'zh': '医学作家:知识感知医学文本生', 'hi': 'MedWriter: ज्ञान-जागरूक चिकित्सा पाठ पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'MedWriter: генерация медицинских текстов, основанных на знаниях', 'ga': 'MedWriter: Giniúint Téacs Leighis atá Feasach ar an Eolas', 'ka': 'MedWriter: მედიციო ტექსტის შექმნა', 'el': 'Δημιουργία ιατρικού κειμένου με γνώση', 'hu': 'MedWriter: Tudás-tudatos orvosi szöveggeneráció', 'it': 'MedWriter: Generazione di testi medici consapevoli della conoscenza', 'kk': 'MedWriter: Медицина мәтінді құру', 'mk': 'MedWriter: Генерација медицински текст на знаење', 'lt': 'MedWriter: žiniomis žinomų medicininių tekstų kūrimas', 'ms': 'Penulis MedWriter: Penjanaan Teks Medis Sedia Mengetahui', 'ml': 'MedWriter: Knowledge- Aware Medical Text Generation', 'mn': 'MedWriter: Knowledge-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'mt': 'MedWriter: Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Test Mediku Konxju mill-Għarfien', 'pl': 'MedWriter: Wiedza-świadome generowanie tekstów medycznych', 'sr': 'MedWriter: Generacija medicinskog teksta o znanju', 'no': 'MedWriter: Generering av kjennomsikt- vekk medisinsk tekst', 'ro': 'MedWriter: Generarea de text medical conștientă de cunoaștere', 'sv': 'MedWriter: Kunskapsmedveten medicinsk textgenerering', 'so': 'MedWriter: Knowledge-aware Medical Text Generation', 'ta': 'MedWriter: Knowledge- aware Medical Text Generation', 'si': 'Medwrite: а¶Ҝа·җа¶ұа¶ңа¶ұа·Ҡа¶ұ- а¶Ҝа·җа¶ұа¶ңа¶ұа·Ҡа¶ұ а·Җа·ӣа¶Ҝа·ҠвҖҚа¶ә а¶ҙа·Ҹа·… а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а·Җа·ҳа¶ӯа·’а¶ә', 'ur': 'MedWriter: Knowledge-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'uz': 'MedWriter: Known- aware Medical Text Generation', 'vi': 'Nhà phát hành văn bản y học', 'bg': 'MedWriter: Създаване на медицински текстове, осъзнати със знанието', 'da': 'MedWriter: Vidensbevidst medicinsk tekstgenerering', 'hr': 'MedWriter: Generacija medicinskog teksta o znanju', 'nl': 'MedWriter: Kennisbewuste medische tekstgeneratie', 'de': 'MedWriter: Wissensbewusste medizinische Textgenerierung', 'id': 'MedWriter: Pengetahuan Teks Medis Aware', 'fa': 'MedWriter: نسل متن پزشکی دانش و آگاهی', 'ko': 'MedWriter: 지식 인식 의학 텍스트 생성', 'sw': 'Mwandishi wa MedWriter: Ujuzi-Acquainted Text Generation', 'tr': 'MedWriter:Bilgi-Bilgi Tıbbi Metin Kurulması', 'sq': 'MedWriter: Gjenerimi i tekstit mjekësor i njohur', 'af': 'MedWriter: Knowledge-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'MedWriter: Knowledge-aware Medical Text Generation', 'bn': 'MedWriter: জ্ঞান- অবগত মেডিকেল টেক্সট জেনারেশন', 'az': 'MedWriter: Bilim-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'bs': 'MedWriter: Generacija medicinskog teksta o znanju', 'cs': 'MedWriter: Vytváření lékařských textů', 'ca': 'MedWriter: Generació de text mèdic conscient del coneixement', 'et': 'MedWriter: Teadmisteadlik meditsiiniline teksti genereerimine', 'fi': 'MedWriter: Knowledge-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'jv': 'medwrite: Jenengan Teks sing Kemerdekaan Karo Kemerdekaan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'MedWriter: Ustvarjanje medicinskega besedila, ki temelji na znanju', 'bo': 'MedWriter:علم-Aware Medical Text Generation', 'he': 'MedWriter: יצירת טקסט רפואי מודע למידע'}
{'en': 'To exploit the domain knowledge to guarantee the correctness of generated text has been a hot topic in recent years, especially for high professional domains such as medical. However, most of recent works only consider the information of unstructured text rather than structured information of the knowledge graph. In this paper, we focus on the medical topic-to-text generation task and adapt a knowledge-aware text generation model to the medical domain, named MedWriter, which not only introduces the specific knowledge from the external MKG but also is capable of learning graph-level representation. We conduct experiments on a medical literature dataset collected from medical journals, each of which has a set of topic words, an abstract of medical literature and a corresponding knowledge graph from CMeKG. Experimental results demonstrate incorporating knowledge graph into generation model can improve the quality of the generated text and has robust superiority over the competitor methods.', 'ar': 'كان استغلال معرفة المجال لضمان صحة النص الذي تم إنشاؤه موضوعًا ساخنًا في السنوات الأخيرة ، خاصة بالنسبة للمجالات المهنية العالية مثل الطب. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم الأعمال الحديثة تنظر فقط في معلومات النص غير المنظم بدلاً من المعلومات المنظمة للرسم البياني المعرفي. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على مهمة توليد النص الطبي من موضوع إلى نص وتكييف نموذج إنشاء نص مدرك للمعرفة مع المجال الطبي ، المسمى MedWriter ، والذي لا يقدم فقط المعرفة المحددة من MKG الخارجية ولكنه قادر أيضًا على التعلم التمثيل على مستوى الرسم البياني. نجري تجارب على مجموعة بيانات الأدبيات الطبية التي تم جمعها من المجلات الطبية ، ولكل منها مجموعة من كلمات الموضوع ، وملخص للأدبيات الطبية ورسم بياني معرفي مطابق من CMeKG. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن دمج الرسم البياني المعرفي في نموذج التوليد يمكن أن يحسن جودة النص الذي تم إنشاؤه وله تفوق قوي على أساليب المنافسين.', 'fr': "Exploiter les connaissances du domaine pour garantir l'exactitude du texte généré a été un sujet brûlant ces dernières années, en particulier pour les domaines hautement professionnels tels que la médecine. Cependant, la plupart des travaux récents ne prennent en compte que les informations du texte non structuré plutôt que les informations structurées du graphe de connaissances. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur la tâche de génération de sujets médicaux en texte et adaptons un modèle de génération de texte conscient des connaissances au domaine médical, nommé MedWriter, qui non seulement introduit les connaissances spécifiques du MKG externe, mais est également capable d'apprendre la représentation au niveau graphique. Nous menons des expériences sur un ensemble de données de littérature médicale collectées dans des revues médicales, chacune comportant un ensemble de mots thématiques, un résumé de la littérature médicale et un graphe de connaissances correspondant provenant de CMeKG. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que l'intégration d'un graphe de connaissances dans le modèle de génération peut améliorer la qualité du texte généré et présente une supériorité solide par rapport aux méthodes concurrentes.", 'pt': 'Explorar o conhecimento do domínio para garantir a exatidão do texto gerado tem sido um tema quente nos últimos anos, especialmente para domínios profissionais de alto nível, como o médico. No entanto, a maioria dos trabalhos recentes considera apenas as informações do texto não estruturado ao invés das informações estruturadas do grafo de conhecimento. Neste artigo, focamos na tarefa de geração de texto para texto médico e adaptamos um modelo de geração de texto consciente do conhecimento para o domínio médico, denominado MedWriter, que não apenas introduz o conhecimento específico do MKG externo, mas também é capaz de aprender representação em nível de gráfico. Conduzimos experimentos em um conjunto de dados de literatura médica coletados de revistas médicas, cada um com um conjunto de palavras de tópicos, um resumo de literatura médica e um gráfico de conhecimento correspondente do CMeKG. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que incorporar o grafo de conhecimento no modelo de geração pode melhorar a qualidade do texto gerado e tem uma superioridade robusta sobre os métodos concorrentes.', 'ja': '生成されたテキストの正確性を保証するためにドメイン知識を活用することは、特に医療などの高度な専門領域にとって、近年ホットなトピックとなっています。 しかし、最近の著作のほとんどは、知識グラフの構造化情報ではなく、非構造化テキストの情報のみを考慮している。 本稿では、医療トピック間テキスト生成タスクに焦点を当て、外部MKGからの特定の知識を紹介するだけでなく、グラフレベルの表現を学習できるMedWriterという知識認識テキスト生成モデルを医療領域に適応させる。 私たちは、医学雑誌から収集された医学文献データセットの実験を行い、それぞれにトピックワードのセット、医学文献の要約、およびCMeKGからの対応する知識グラフがあります。 実験結果は、生成モデルに知識グラフを組み込むことで、生成されたテキストの品質を向上させることができ、競合他社の方法よりも堅牢な優位性があることを示しています。', 'es': 'Explotar el conocimiento del dominio para garantizar la corrección del texto generado ha sido un tema candente en los últimos años, especialmente para dominios de alto nivel profesional como el médico. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los trabajos recientes solo consideran la información de texto no estructurado en lugar de la información estructurada del gráfico de conocimiento. En este artículo, nos centramos en la tarea de generación de texto a tema médico y adaptamos un modelo de generación de texto consciente del conocimiento al dominio médico, llamado MedWriter, que no solo introduce el conocimiento específico del MKG externo, sino que también es capaz de aprender la representación a nivel gráfico. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en un conjunto de datos de literatura médica recopilados de revistas médicas, cada una de las cuales tiene un conjunto de palabras temáticas, un resumen de la literatura médica y un gráfico de conocimiento correspondiente de CMeKG. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que la incorporación de gráficos de conocimiento en el modelo de generación puede mejorar la calidad del texto generado y tiene una gran superioridad sobre los métodos de la competencia.', 'hi': 'उत्पन्न पाठ की शुद्धता की गारंटी देने के लिए डोमेन ज्ञान का शोषण करने के लिए हाल के वर्षों में एक गर्म विषय रहा है, विशेष रूप से चिकित्सा जैसे उच्च पेशेवर डोमेन के लिए। हालांकि, हाल के अधिकांश कार्य केवल ज्ञान ग्राफ की संरचित जानकारी के बजाय असंरचित पाठ की जानकारी पर विचार करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम चिकित्सा विषय-से-पाठ पीढ़ी के कार्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और मेडिकल डोमेन के लिए एक ज्ञान-जागरूक टेक्स्ट जनरेशन मॉडल को अनुकूलित करते हैं, जिसे मेडराइटर नाम दिया जाता है, जो न केवल बाहरी एमकेजी से विशिष्ट ज्ञान का परिचय देता है, बल्कि ग्राफ-स्तर के प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने में भी सक्षम है। हम चिकित्सा पत्रिकाओं से एकत्र किए गए एक चिकित्सा साहित्य डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक में विषय शब्दों का एक सेट, चिकित्सा साहित्य का एक सार और CMeKG से एक संबंधित ज्ञान ग्राफ होता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि जनरेशन मॉडल में ज्ञान ग्राफ को शामिल करने से उत्पन्न पाठ की गुणवत्ता में सुधार हो सकता है और प्रतियोगी विधियों पर मजबूत श्रेष्ठता है।', 'zh': '用域之知正确性近年之热门话题,特于医学等高级专业领域。 然大抵近文虑非结构化本之息,非知图谱之结构化也。 夫文者,专于医学主题于文本之生事,而感知文本成形于医学领域,谓之MedWriter,不特外MKG入特定知,又能学图形也。 吾于医学期刊所集医学文献数据集实验之,每数集都有主题词,医学文献摘要与CMeKG相应图谱。 实验结果表明以图谱入生成模型可以成文,而大于竞争对手者也。', 'ru': 'Использование знаний о предметной области для гарантии правильности генерируемого текста в последние годы было горячей темой, особенно для высокопрофессиональных областей, таких как медицина. Однако в большинстве последних работ рассматривается только информация неструктурированного текста, а не структурированная информация графа знаний. В этой статье мы сосредоточимся на задаче генерации медицинской темы в текст и адаптируем модель генерации текста, основанную на знаниях, к медицинской области, называемой MedWriter, которая не только вводит конкретные знания из внешнего MKG, но и способна изучать представление на уровне графа. Мы проводим эксперименты на наборе данных медицинской литературы, собранных из медицинских журналов, каждый из которых имеет набор тематических слов, реферат медицинской литературы и соответствующий граф знаний от CMeKG. Экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют, что включение графа знаний в модель генерации может улучшить качество сгенерированного текста и имеет сильное превосходство над методами конкурентов.', 'ga': 'Is ábhar mór é le blianta beaga anuas leas a bhaint as an eolas fearainn chun cruinneas an téacs ginte a ráthú, go háirithe i réimsí ardghairmiúla ar nós leighis. Mar sin féin, ní dhéanann an chuid is mó de na saothair le déanaí ach faisnéis téacs neamhstruchtúrtha a mheas seachas faisnéis struchtúrtha ar ghraf an eolais. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar an tasc giniúna ábhar-go-téacs míochaine agus cuirimid múnla giniúna téacs atá feasach ar an eolas chuig an bhfearann leighis, darb ainm MedWriter, a thugann isteach ní hamháin an t-eolas sonrach ón MKG seachtrach ach atá in ann foghlaim freisin. léiriú ar leibhéal graf. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí litríochta leighis a bhailítear ó irisleabhair leighis, a bhfuil sraith focal topaice ag gach ceann acu, achomaireacht ar litríocht leighis agus graf eolais comhfhreagrach ó CMeKG. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir feabhas a chur ar cháilíocht an téacs a ghintear trí ghraf eolais a ionchorprú i múnla giniúna agus go bhfuil barraíocht láidir aige ar mhodhanna an iomaitheora.', 'ka': 'საკუთარი წლის შემდეგ დომინის მეცნიერების გამოიყენება, რომ დარანტირება წარმოიქმნილი ტექსტის მარტივის შესაძლებლობა, განსაკუთრებით უფრო მეცნიერი დომენეების საკ მაგრამ უფრო ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მხოლოდ აღმოჩნეთ არსტრუქტურული ტექსტის ინფორმაციას, არა სტრუქ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ კონუქტირებთ მედიცინური ტექსტის ტექსტის განვითარებაზე და მედიცინური ტექსტის განვითარებას მოდელზე აეპტირებთ, რომელიც არა მხოლოდ გარეშე MKG-ის განსაკუთრებული მეცნიერება, მაგრამ შეუძლია განვითა ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები მედიცინური ლიტურატის მონაცემების სახელიდან გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც ყველაფერი თემენტიური სიტყვები, მედიცინური ლიტურატიის აბსტრაქტი და CMeKG-ის შესაბამისი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ ცნობიერების გრაფიკის დაყენება მოდელში შეუძლია განვითარებული ტექსტის კაalitეტის უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტი', 'el': 'Η αξιοποίηση της γνώσης του τομέα για να εγγυηθεί την ορθότητα του παραγόμενου κειμένου υπήρξε ένα καυτό θέμα τα τελευταία χρόνια, ειδικά για υψηλού επιπέδου επαγγελματικούς τομείς όπως η ιατρική. Ωστόσο, τα περισσότερα πρόσφατα έργα εξετάζουν μόνο τις πληροφορίες του μη δομημένου κειμένου παρά τις δομημένες πληροφορίες του γραφήματος γνώσης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εστιάζουμε στην εργασία δημιουργίας ιατρικού θέματος-κειμένου και προσαρμόζουμε ένα μοντέλο δημιουργίας κειμένου με γνώση στον ιατρικό τομέα, το οποίο όχι μόνο εισάγει τη συγκεκριμένη γνώση από το εξωτερικό αλλά είναι επίσης ικανό να μάθει αναπαράσταση σε επίπεδο γραφήματος. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων ιατρικής βιβλιογραφίας που συλλέγονται από ιατρικά περιοδικά, καθένα από τα οποία έχει ένα σύνολο θεματικών λέξεων, μια περίληψη ιατρικής βιβλιογραφίας και ένα αντίστοιχο γράφημα γνώσης από το CMeKG. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η ενσωμάτωση γραφήματος γνώσης στο μοντέλο παραγωγής μπορεί να βελτιώσει την ποιότητα του παραγόμενου κειμένου και έχει ισχυρή υπεροχή έναντι των μεθόδων ανταγωνιστών.', 'hu': 'A domain ismeretek kiaknázása a generált szöveg helyességének garantálása érdekében az elmúlt években forró téma volt, különösen a magas szakmai területeken, mint például az orvosi. A legtöbb újabb munka azonban csak a strukturálatlan szöveg információit veszi figyelembe, nem pedig a tudásgraf strukturált információit. Ebben a tanulmányban az orvosi téma-szöveg generációs feladatra összpontosítunk, és az orvosi területhez igazítunk egy tudáskutató szöveggenerációs modellt, a MedWriter néven, amely nemcsak a külső MKG specifikus ismereteit mutatja be, hanem grafikonszintű reprezentációt is képes tanulni. Orvosi folyóiratokból gyűjtött orvosi szakirodalmi adatokon végzünk kísérleteket, amelyek mindegyike témaköri szavakkal, orvosi szakirodalom kivonatával és a CMeKG tudásgráfiával rendelkezik. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a tudásgráf generációs modellbe történő beépítése javíthatja a generációs szöveg minőségét és erőteljes felsőbbrendűséggel rendelkezik a versenytárs módszereivel szemben.', 'it': 'Sfruttare la conoscenza del dominio per garantire la correttezza del testo generato è stato un argomento caldo negli ultimi anni, soprattutto per i domini di alta professionalità come quello medico. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei lavori recenti considera solo le informazioni di testo non strutturato piuttosto che le informazioni strutturate del grafico della conoscenza. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo sul compito medico di generazione topic-to-text e adattiamo un modello di generazione di testo consapevole della conoscenza al dominio medico, chiamato MedWriter, che non solo introduce la conoscenza specifica dal MKG esterno, ma è anche in grado di imparare la rappresentazione a livello grafico. Conduciamo esperimenti su un set di dati di letteratura medica raccolti da riviste mediche, ognuna delle quali ha un insieme di parole tematiche, un abstract di letteratura medica e un corrispondente grafico della conoscenza da CMeKG. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che incorporare il grafico della conoscenza nel modello di generazione può migliorare la qualità del testo generato e ha una solida superiorità rispetto ai metodi concorrenti.', 'lt': 'Naudoti žinias apie sritį siekiant užtikrinti sukurto teksto teisingumą pastaraisiais metais buvo karšta tema, ypač aukštos profesinės sritys, pavyzdžiui, medicina. Tačiau daugumoje neseniai atliktų darbų kalbama tik apie neinstruktūrizuotą tekstą, o ne apie struktūrizuotą žinių grafiko informaciją. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame medicininei temai priklausomai nuo teksto kūrimo užduotims ir pritaikome žiniomis žinomą teksto kūrimo model į prie medicininės srities, vadinamos MedWriter, kuri ne tik įrodo konkrečias žinias iš išorinės MKG, bet ir gali mokytis grafikos lygio atstovavimo. Darome eksperimentus su medicininės literatūros duomenų rinkiniu, surinktu iš medicininių žurnalų, kurių kiekvienas turi teminių žodžių rinkinį, medicininės literatūros abstraktą ir atitinkamą žinių grafiką iš CMeKG. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad įdiegiant žinių grafiką į kartos model į galima pagerinti sukurto teksto kokybę ir jis yra tvirtai viršesnis už konkurentų metodus.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда құрылған мәтіннің дұрыстығын қамтамасыз ету үшін доменнің білімін қолдану үшін, осымен қатар медицина секілді жоғары профессионалдық домендер үшін жұмыс нақышы Бірақ соңғы жұмыстардың көпшілігі тек білім графикасының құрылмаған мәліметін орнына құрылмаған мәтіннің мәліметін қалайды. Бұл қағазда медицина нақышты мәтінді құру тапсырмасына аударып, медицина доменіне мәтінді құру үлгісін, MedWriter деп аталатын медицина құру үлгісін адаптап береміз. Бұл тек сыртқы MKG- ден арнаулы білімді емес, сондай Біз медицина күнделіктерінен жинақталған медицина литературасының деректер жинағында тәжірибелерін жасаймыз. Әрбірінің бірнеше нақышты сөздері бар, медицина литературасының абстракты және CMeKG-ден Эксперименталдық нәтижелер білім графикасын құрылған мәтіннің сапасын жасауға болады, және конкурсордың әдістеріне көмектесу арқылы дұрыс көмектесу арқылы дұрыс', 'mt': 'L-isfruttar tal-għarfien tad-dominju biex tiġi ggarantita l-korrettezza tat-test iġġenerat kien suġġett sħun f’dawn l-a ħħar snin, speċjalment għal dominji professjonali għoljin bħall-mediċin a. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħlijiet reċenti jikkunsidraw biss l-informazzjoni ta’ test mhux strutturat minflok informazzjoni strutturata tal-graff tal-għarfien. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw fuq il-kompitu ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ suġġett mediku għal test u nadattaw mudell ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ test konxju mill-għarfien għad-dominju mediku, imsejjaħ MedWriter, li mhux biss jintroduċi l-għarfien speċifiku mill-MKG estern iżda huwa kapaċi wkoll li jitgħallem rappreżentazzjoni fil-livell tal-grafu. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq sett ta’ dejta tal-letteratura medika miġbur minn ġurnali mediċi, li kull wieħed minnhom għandu sett ta’ kliem suġġett, astratt tal-letteratura medika u graff ta’ għarfien korrispondenti minn CMeKG. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-inkorporazzjoni tal-graff tal-għarfien fil-mudell tal-ġenerazzjoni tista’ ttejjeb il-kwalità tat-test iġġenerat u għandha superjorità robusta fuq il-metodi tal-kompetitur.', 'mk': 'За да се искористи знаењето на доменот за да се гарантира точноста на генерираниот текст беше жешка тема во последниве години, особено за високи професионални домени како што е медицинската. Сепак, повеќето неодамнешни дела ги сметаат само информациите за неструктуриран текст наместо структурирани информации за графикот на знаење. Во овој весник, се фокусираме на задачата за генерација на медицинска тема до текст и адаптираме модел за генерација на текст со свесност за знаење на медицинската домена, наречен MedWriter, кој не само го воведува специфичното знаење од надворешниот MKG, туку и е способен да научи претставување на графското ниво. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на медицинска литература податоци собрани од медицинските дневници, од кои секој има сет темски зборови, апстрактна медицинска литература и соодветен граф на знаење од CMeKG. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека вклучувањето на графот на знаење во генерацискиот модел може да го подобри квалитетот на генерираниот текст и има силна супериорност над методите на конкурентите.', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүний зөв байдлыг баталахын тулд саяхан мэдлэгийг ашиглах нь сүүлийн жилүүдэд халуун сэдэв болсон. Ялангуяа эмнэлгийн мэргэжилтэн мэргэжилтэн мэргэжилтэн мэргэжилтэн орон зайд Гэвч саяхан ажлын ихэнх нь мэдлэг графикийн бүтээгдэхүүний оронд бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээллийг зөвхөн бүтээгдэхүүнгүй текстийн мэдээлэл гэж боддог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эмнэлгийн сэдвийг текст бүтээлийн ажил дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж, мэдлэгтэй текст бүтээлийн загварыг MedWriter гэдэг эмнэлгийн загварт загвар зохион байгуулдаг. Энэ нь зөвхөн гадаад MKG-ээс ялангуяа мэдлэгийг танилцуулж чадахгүй, мөн Бид эмнэлгийн сэтгүүлээс цуглуулсан эмнэлгийн уран зохиолын өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтыг хийдэг. Энэ бүх нь сэтгүүлийн үг, эмнэлгийн уран зохиолын абстракт, CMeKG-ээс харьцуулсан мэдлэг график. Эмчилгээний үр дүн нь мэдлэг графикийг төрөлхтний загвар болгон бүтээгдэхүүний чанарыг сайжруулж чадна.', 'no': 'For å bruka domenekunnskapen for å garantira korrektet av oppretta tekst har vært eit varme emne i siste år, spesielt for høge profesjonale domene som medisinsk. Dei fleste nyleg arbeidane kan imidlertid berre gjerne informasjonen om ikkje strukturert tekst i staden for strukturert informasjon om kunnskapsgrafen. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på oppgåva for generering av medisinske emne-til-tekst og tilpassar eit vitenskapleg tekstmodell til medisinske domenet med navn MedWriter, som ikkje berre introduserer den spesifikke kunnskapen frå den eksterne MKG, men også er i stand til å lære grafikknivå representasjon. Vi gjer eksperimenter på ein medisinsk literatur-dataset samla frå medisinske journaler, kvar av dei har eit sett med emne-ord, ein abstrakt av medisinsk literatur og eit tilsvarande kunnskapsgraf frå CMeKG. Eksperimentale resultat demonstrerer inkludering av kunnskapsgrafen i genereringsmodellen kan forbetra kvaliteten til den genererte teksten og har kraftig overhøgd over konkurentmetodane.', 'ms': 'To exploit the domain knowledge to guarantee the correctness of generated text has been a hot topic in recent years, especially for high professional domains such as medical.  Namun, kebanyakan kerja baru-baru ini hanya mempertimbangkan maklumat teks tidak terstruktur daripada maklumat terstruktur graf pengetahuan. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada tugas generasi topik-ke-teks perubatan dan menyesuaikan model generasi teks yang sedar pengetahuan kepada domain perubatan bernama MedWriter, yang tidak hanya memperkenalkan pengetahuan spesifik dari MKG luaran tetapi juga mampu belajar mewakili aras graf. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data literatur perubatan yang dikumpulkan dari jurnal perubatan, masing-masing mempunyai set perkataan topik, abstrak literatur perubatan dan graf pengetahuan yang sepadan dari CMeKG. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan memasukkan graf pengetahuan ke dalam model generasi boleh meningkatkan kualiti teks yang dijana dan mempunyai keutamaan yang kuat terhadap kaedah kompetitor.', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie wiedzy o domenie w celu zagwarantowania poprawności wygenerowanego tekstu było w ostatnich latach gorącym tematem, zwłaszcza dla wysoko zawodowych domen, takich jak medyczny. Jednak większość ostatnich prac uwzględnia jedynie informacje tekstu nieustrukturyzowanego, a nie informacje strukturalne wykresu wiedzy. W artykule skupiamy się na medycznym zadaniu generowania tematu-tekstu i dostosowujemy model generowania tekstu świadomego wiedzy do domeny medycznej o nazwie MedWriter, który nie tylko wprowadza specyficzną wiedzę z zewnętrznego MKG, ale także jest w stanie uczyć się reprezentacji na poziomie wykresu. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na zbiorze danych literatury medycznej zebranych z czasopism medycznych, z których każdy ma zestaw słów tematycznych, streszczenie literatury medycznej oraz odpowiedni wykres wiedzy CMeKG. Wyniki eksperymentalne wykazują, że włączenie wykresu wiedzy do modelu generacji może poprawić jakość wygenerowanego tekstu i ma solidną przewagę nad metodami konkurencji.', 'ro': 'Exploatarea cunoștințelor de domeniu pentru a garanta corectitudinea textului generat a fost un subiect fierbinte în ultimii ani, în special pentru domenii profesionale de înaltă calitate, cum ar fi cel medical. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea lucrărilor recente iau în considerare doar informațiile textului nestructurat, mai degrabă decât informațiile structurate ale graficului cunoașterii. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe sarcina medicală de generare subiect-text și adaptăm un model de generare a textului conștient de cunoaștere domeniului medical, denumit MedWriter, care nu numai că introduce cunoștințele specifice din MKG extern, dar și este capabil să învețe reprezentarea la nivel grafic. Realizăm experimente pe un set de date de literatură medicală colectat din reviste medicale, fiecare dintre ele conținând un set de cuvinte tematice, un rezumat al literaturii medicale și un grafic de cunoștințe corespunzător de la CMeKG. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că încorporarea graficului cunoștințelor în modelul de generație poate îmbunătăți calitatea textului generat și are o superioritate robustă față de metodele concurenților.', 'sr': 'Da bi iskoristili znanje domena da bi garantirali ispravnost proizvedenog teksta u poslednjih godina bila vruća tema, posebno za visoke profesionalne domene poput medicinske. Međutim, većina nedavnih radova razmatra samo informacije o nestrukturiranom tekstu umjesto strukturirane informacije o grafiku znanja. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na zadatak generacije medicinske teme na tekst i prilagodimo model generacije teksta svjesnog znanja na medicinsku domenu pod nazivom MedWriter, koji ne samo predstavlja posebno znanje iz vanjskog MKG-a, nego i može učiti predstavljanje grafičkog nivoa. Mi provodimo eksperimente o medicinskoj literaturskoj grupi podataka koji su skupljeni iz medicinskih dnevnika, svaka od njih ima skup temnih reči, abstrakt medicinske literature i odgovarajući znanstveni grafik iz CMeKG-a. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da uključujući grafik znanja u model generacije može poboljšati kvalitet proizvedenog teksta i da ima jaku nadmoć nad metodama konkurenta.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පත්තර සැකසුම් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න, අන්තිම අවුරුද්දු වලින් විශේෂ ව්\u200dයාපාර නමුත්, අලුත් වැඩේ ගොඩක් වැඩේ දැනගන්න තොරතුරු ග්\u200dරාෆ් ගැන ස්ථාපනයක් නැති පාළුවගේ තොරතුරු පමණ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි වෛද්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත ව අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වෛද්\u200dය සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික දත්ත සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, හැමෝටම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වචන සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා, වෛද්\u200dය සාක්ෂ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ දන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිච', 'so': 'Si loo isticmaalo aqoonta deegaanka si loo xaqiijiyo saxda warqada la soo dhashay waxay noqotay arimo kulul ee ugu dambeeyey, khusuusan goobaha xirfadaha sare ee sida caafimaadka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqada ugu dambeysay waxay ka fikiraan macluumaadka la xiriira qoraalka aan la dhisin, taas oo aan la dhisin macluumaadka sawirka aqoonta. Warqadan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa macluumaadka dhakhaatiirta iyo farshaxanka, waxaana u bedelaynaa tusaale qarniga macluumaadka aqoonta ah, waxaana lagu magacaabaa MedWriter, kaas oo aan keliya soo bandhigi aqoon gaar ah oo ka soo baxa MKG dibadiisa, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale awoodaa in lagu baro xarunta. Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaamo ku qoran macluumaadka warqada caafimaadka ee laga soo ururiyey jardiinada caafimaadka, mid kastaba waxaa ka mid ah hadal la xiriira, mid ka mid ah warqada caafimaadka iyo qoraalka aqoonta oo u eg CMeKG. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in lagu barbaariyo sawirada aqoonta tusaale ahaan u bedela karo tijaabada qoraalka la sameeyay, wuxuuna ka bedelay sarraynta qaababka ilaaliyayaasha.', 'sv': 'Att utnyttja domänkunskapen för att garantera korrektheten i genererad text har varit ett hett ämne under de senaste åren, särskilt för högprofessionella områden som medicinsk. De flesta av de senaste verken behandlar dock endast information i ostrukturerad text snarare än strukturerad information i kunskapsgrafen. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi på den medicinska ämnes-till-text generation uppgiften och anpassar en kunskapsmedveten textgenerationsmodell till den medicinska domänen, kallad MedWriter, som inte bara introducerar den specifika kunskapen från den externa MKG utan också kan lära sig graf-nivå representation. Vi utför experiment på en medicinsk litteraturdatauppsättning insamlad från medicinska tidskrifter, som var och en har en uppsättning ämnesord, ett abstrakt av medicinsk litteratur och en motsvarande kunskapsgraf från CMeKG. Experimentella resultat visar att införlivandet av kunskapsgrafen i generationsmodellen kan förbättra kvaliteten på den genererade texten och har robust överlägsenhet över konkurrenternas metoder.', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரையின் சரியானதை உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்கு களம் அறிவை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு சமீபத்தில் ஒரு சூடான தலைப்பு, குறிப்பாக மருத்து ஆயினும், அண்மையில் பெரும்பாலான வேலைகள் அறிவு வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்கிய உரையின் தகவலை மட்டும் பார்க்கவில்லை. இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மருத்துவ தலைப்பு தலைப்பு தலைமுறையில் கவனம் செலுத்தி அறிந்து கொள்ளும் உரை உரை உருவாக்கி மாதிரியில் செலுத்துகிறோம். மெட்எழுத்தாளர் என்ற களத்தி நாம் மருத்துவ எழுத்து தகவல் அமைப்பில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம், ஒவ்வொரு சிகிச்சையில் உள்ள வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளன, மருத்துவ எழுத்துரு வெளியேற்றுதல் மற்று பரிசோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں ایک گرم موضوع ہے، مخصوصاً اچھی پروفسونی ڈمین کے لئے، جیسے پزشکی ڈمین کے لئے۔ لیکن اکثر اگلے کام صرف علم گراف کے ساختہ معلومات کے بغیر ساختہ کئے ہوئے متن کے معلومات کو سمجھتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم مڈیسی ٹیسٹ کی نسل کی تابع پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں اور ایک علم واقف ٹیسٹ کی نسل موڈل کو دکھانے کے لئے مڈیسی ڈیمین کے نام سے مد کریٹر کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتے ہیں، جو صرف خارج MKG سے خاص علم کو معلوم نہیں کرتا بلکہ وہ بھی گراف سطح ہم ایک دکتر ادبیات ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں جو پزشکی جورنل سے جمع کیے گئے ہیں، ان میں سے ہر ایک کے پاس ایک سرگوشی کلمات ہے، ایک سرگوشی ادبیات اور ایک مرتبہ علم گراف ہے جو CMeKG سے ہے. تجربہ کے نتائج کو علم گراف کے ساتھ پیدا ہونے کے موڈل میں شامل کرنا دکھاتا ہے کہ پیدا ہوا متن کا کیفیت بہتر کر سکتا ہے اور مسابقات طریقوں پر زیادہ زیادتی رکھتا ہے.', 'ml': 'സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ശരിയാണെന്ന് ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്താന്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനിലെ അറിവ് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി അടുത്ത കൊല്ലത്തില എന്നാലും ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത പ്രവൃത്തികളില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം സ്ഥാപിക്കാത്ത വാചക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മെഡ്രൈപ്പര്\u200d എന്ന മെഡിക്കല്\u200d വിഷയം മുതല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയും, അറിവുള്ള ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മെഡ്റി മെഡിക്കല്\u200d പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും സംഘടിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു മെഡിക്കല്\u200d സാഹിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഓരോരുത്തര്\u200dക്കും ഒരു വ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തലമുറയിലേക്ക് ജ്ഞാനം ഗ്രാഫ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിച്ച ടെക', 'uz': "Yaqinda yil ichida matnning to ʻgʻri haqida ishlab chiqarish uchun domen haqida foydalanish uchun juda qiyin mavzu edi, hususan tibbiy kabi yuqori proff dometer uchun. Lekin, ko'pchilik ishlarda faqat ilmiy grafik haqida yaratilgan matn haqida maʼlumotni tasavvur qiladi. Bu qogʻozda, biz tibbiy mavzu va matn yaratish vazifasiga foydalanamiz va yaxshi taʼlum matn yaratish modelini MedWriter nomli tizim domenasiga qo'shish mumkin. Bu faqat tashqi MKG'dan foydalanuvchi maʼlumotni anglatadi, balki grafik darajasi taʼminlovchisini o'rganish mumkin. Biz tibbiy roʻyxatlardan olingan tibbiy taʼminotlar haqida tajriba qilamiz. Bu yerda har bir ma'lumot so'zlari bor, tibbiy litteratorini ajratish va CMeKG'dan bir qisqa ilim grafik bor. Name", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác kiến thức miền để đảm bảo sự chính xác của văn bản đã được tạo ra đã trở thành một chủ đề nóng bỏng trong những năm gần đây, đặc biệt với lĩnh vực cao chuyên nghiệp như y học. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các công trình gần đây chỉ xem thông tin của văn bản không xây dựng hơn là thông tin cấu trúc của đồ thị kiến thức. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi tập trung vào nhiệm vụ sản xuất văn bản y học và thích ứng một mô hình sản xuất văn bản nhận thức về y học, tên là Mediter, mà không chỉ đưa ra kiến thức cụ thể từ một tập đoàn tiềm năng tiềm năng cao, mà còn có khả năng học đại diện đồ thị ở cấp đồ thị. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm trên một bộ dữ liệu về văn học y khoa được thu thập từ các tạp chí y tế, mỗi cuốn đều có một bộ từ chủ đề, một bản trừu tượng về văn học y học và một đồ thị kiến thức tương ứng từ CMYK. Kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy việc nhập đồ thị về kiến thức vào mô hình sản xuất có thể cải thiện chất lượng của văn bản đã tạo ra và có ưu thế mạnh hơn các phương pháp cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Използването на познанията за домейна, за да се гарантира коректността на генерирания текст, е гореща тема през последните години, особено за високопрофесионални области като медицината. Въпреки това, повечето от последните работи разглеждат само информацията на неструктуриран текст, а не структурирана информация на графиката на знанието. В тази статия ние се фокусираме върху задачата за генериране на тема към текст в медицината и адаптираме модел за генериране на текст, който не само въвежда специфичните знания от външния МКГ, но и е способен да научи графично представяне. Провеждаме експерименти върху набор от данни от медицинска литература, събрани от медицински списания, всяка от които има набор от тематични думи, резюме на медицинската литература и съответна графика на знанието от ЦМЕКГ. Експерименталните резултати показват, че включването на графика на знанието в модела на генериране може да подобри качеството на генерирания текст и има силно превъзходство над конкурентните методи.', 'da': 'At udnytte domænenes viden til at garantere korrektheden af genereret tekst har været et varmt emne i de seneste år, især for højt faglige domæner som medicinsk. De fleste af de seneste værker betragter imidlertid kun oplysninger om ustruktureret tekst frem for strukturerede oplysninger i vidensgrafen. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på den medicinske emne-til-tekst generationsopgave og tilpasser en videnbaseret tekstgenereringsmodel til det medicinske domæne, ved navn MedWriter, som ikke blot introducerer den specifikke viden fra den eksterne MKG, men også er i stand til at lære graf-niveau repræsentation. Vi udfører eksperimenter på et medicinsk litteraturdatasæt indsamlet fra medicinske tidsskrifter, som hver især har et sæt emneord, et abstrakt af medicinsk litteratur og en tilsvarende vidensgraf fra CMeKG. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at indarbejdelse af vidensgraf i generationsmodellen kan forbedre kvaliteten af den genererede tekst og har robust overlegenhed over konkurrenternes metoder.', 'hr': 'Za iskorištavanje znanja domena kako bi se garantirala ispravnost proizvedenog teksta u posljednjih godina bila je vruća tema, posebno za visoke profesionalne domene poput medicinske. Međutim, većina nedavnih radova razmatra samo informacije o neostrukturiranom tekstu umjesto strukturirane informacije o grafiku znanja. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na zadatak generacije medicinske teme na tekst i prilagodimo model generacije teksta svjesnog znanja na medicinsku domenu pod nazivom MedWriter, koji ne samo predstavlja specifične znanja iz vanjskog MKG-a, već i može učiti zastupanje nivoa grafika. Mi provodimo eksperimente na medicinskoj literaturskoj grupi podataka koji su skupljeni iz medicinskih dnevnika, svaka od njih ima skup temnih riječi, apstrakt medicinske literature i odgovarajući znanstveni grafik iz CMeKG-a. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da uključujući grafik znanja u model generacije može poboljšati kvalitet proizvedenog teksta i ima jaku nadmoć nad metodama konkurenta.', 'nl': 'Het benutten van de domeinkennis om de juistheid van gegenereerde tekst te garanderen is de afgelopen jaren een hot topic geweest, vooral voor high professional domeinen zoals medical. De meeste recente werken beschouwen echter alleen de informatie van ongestructureerde tekst in plaats van de gestructureerde informatie van de kennisgrafiek. In dit artikel richten we ons op de medische topic-to-text generatie taak en passen we een kennisbewust tekstgeneratie model aan op het medische domein, genaamd MedWriter, dat niet alleen de specifieke kennis van de externe MKG introduceert, maar ook in staat is om grafiek-level representatie te leren. We voeren experimenten uit met een dataset medische literatuur verzameld uit medische tijdschriften, die elk een set topic words, een samenvatting van medische literatuur en een bijbehorende kennisgrafiek van CMeKG bevat. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het integreren van kennisgrafiek in het generatiemodel de kwaliteit van de gegenereerde tekst kan verbeteren en een robuuste superioriteit heeft ten opzichte van de methoden van de concurrent.', 'de': 'Die Nutzung des Domänenwissens zur Gewährleistung der Korrektheit generierter Texte war in den letzten Jahren ein heißes Thema, insbesondere für hochprofessionelle Bereiche wie Medizin. Die meisten neueren Arbeiten berücksichtigen jedoch nur die Informationen unstrukturierten Textes und nicht die strukturierten Informationen des Wissensgraphen. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf die medizinische Themengenerierungsaufgabe und passen ein wissensbewusstes Textgenerierungsmodell namens MedWriter an, das nicht nur das spezifische Wissen aus dem externen MKG einführt, sondern auch Graph-Level-Repräsentation erlernen kann. Wir führen Experimente an einem medizinischen Literaturdatensatz durch, der aus medizinischen Fachzeitschriften gesammelt wurde, die jeweils einen Satz von Themenwörtern, eine Zusammenfassung der medizinischen Literatur und einen entsprechenden Wissensgraphen der CMeKG enthalten. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Integration von Wissensgraphen in das Generierungsmodell die Qualität des erzeugten Textes verbessern kann und eine robuste Überlegenheit gegenüber den Konkurrenzmethoden hat.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 분야 지식을 이용하여 텍스트 생성의 정확성을 확보하는 것은 줄곧 핫이슈가 되었는데, 특히 의학 등 높은 전공 분야에서 그렇다.그러나 최근의 대다수 업무는 비구조화된 텍스트의 정보만 고려하고 지식도의 구조화된 정보는 고려하지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 의학 주제를 텍스트 생성 임무로 전환하고 지식 감지 텍스트 생성 모델인 MedWriter를 의학 분야에 응용한다. 이 모델은 외부 MKG에서 특정한 지식을 도입할 뿐만 아니라 도형급 표시도 배울 수 있다.우리는 의학 저널에서 수집한 의학 문헌 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행했는데, 각 데이터 집합에는 주제어, 의학 문헌 요약, CMeKG에서 나온 상응하는 지식 도표가 있다.실험 결과에 따르면 생성 모델에 지식도를 넣으면 생성 텍스트의 질을 높일 수 있고 같은 방법에 비해 비교적 강한 우월성을 가진다.', 'id': 'Untuk mengeksploitasi pengetahuan domain untuk menjamin persis teks yang dihasilkan telah menjadi topik panas dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, terutama untuk domain profesional tinggi seperti medis. Namun, kebanyakan pekerjaan baru-baru ini hanya mempertimbangkan informasi dari teks yang tidak terstrukturasi daripada informasi strukturasi dari grafik pengetahuan. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada tugas generasi topik-ke-teks medis dan menyesuaikan model generasi teks yang sadar pengetahuan ke domain medis bernama MedWriter, yang tidak hanya memperkenalkan pengetahuan spesifik dari MKG luar tapi juga mampu belajar representation tingkat grafik. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dataset literatur medis yang dikumpulkan dari jurnal medis, masing-masing memiliki set kata topik, abstrak dari literatur medis dan grafik pengetahuan yang sesuai dari CMeKG. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan memasukkan grafik pengetahuan ke model generasi dapat meningkatkan kualitas teks yang dihasilkan dan memiliki superioritas yang kuat terhadap metode kompetitor.', 'fa': 'برای استفاده از دانش دامنی برای تضمین درستی متن تولید شده در سال های اخیر یک موضوع گرم بود، مخصوصا برای دامنهای حرفه ای بالا مثل پزشکی. ولی بیشتر کارهای اخیر فقط اطلاعات متن ساخته نشده را به جای اطلاعات ساخته شده از گراف دانش می بینند. در این کاغذ، ما روی کار تولید موضوع پزشکی به متن تمرکز می کنیم و یک مدل تولید متن آگاهی با علم به دامنی پزشکی، به نام MedWriter، که نه تنها علم خاصی از MKG خارجی معرفی می کنیم، بلکه قادر به یادگیری نمایش سطح گراف است. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ادبیات پزشکی که از مجموعه\u200cهای پزشکی جمع شده است انجام می\u200cدهیم، هر یک از آنها یک مجموعه کلمه\u200cهای موضوع دارد، یک مجموعه از ادبیات پزشکی و یک گراف دانش مربوط به CMeKG است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که شامل گراف علم به مدل نسل می\u200cتواند کیفیت متن تولید شده را بهتر کند و بر روش\u200cهای رقابت\u200cکنندگان برتری قوی داشته باشد.', 'sw': 'Kutumia maarifa ya ndani ili kuhakikisha ukweli wa maandishi yaliyozaliwa yamekuwa mada yenye moto katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, has a kwa ajili ya maeneo ya kitaalamu kama vile afya. Hata hivyo, shughuli nyingi za hivi karibuni zinachukulia taarifa za maandishi yasiyotengenezwa badala ya taarifa za ufahamu. Katika karatasi hii, tunajikita kwenye kazi ya kizazi cha mada kwa ujuzi wa kitabibu na kuingiza muundo wa kizazi kinachofahamu kwa ajili ya maeneo ya kitabibu, jina la MedWriter, ambalo si tu unaonyesha maarifa maalum kutoka kwa MKG ya nje lakini pia inaweza kujifunza uwakilishi wa ngazi ya grafu. Tunafanya majaribio katika taarifa za fasihi za kitabibu zilizokusanywa kutoka kwenye magazeti ya kitabibu, kila mmoja kati yake ina seti ya maneno ya mada, kutolewa fasihi ya afya na picha inayofanana na maarifa yanayofanana na CMeKG. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuingiza maarifa ya ufahamu katika mfumo wa kizazi unaweza kuboresha ubora wa ujumbe uliotengenezwa na umekuwa na utawala juu ya njia za mashindano.', 'tr': 'Ýüklenen metin dogrylygyny garantmak üçin domena bilgilerini ýüze tutmak üçin soňky ýyllar içinde yssy bir tema bolup, özellikle ýokary profesyonel sahypalar üçin lukmanyň ýaly ýokary ýerleri üçin ýokary bir tema bolup geçirdi. Ýöne iň köp eserler diňe bilim grafynyň strukturly maglumatyny düşünýär. Bu kagyzda, biz tıbbi temalary metin eden zada üns berýäris we bilgi bilgili metin janlaşma nusgasyny tıbbi domenalara gollaşdyrýarys. Bu diňe daşary MKG-dan belli bilgi tanyşdyryp bilmez, ýöne grafik derejesini öwrenmegi mümkin edip bilýäris. Biz lukmanyň gündeliklerinden ýygnanan mekdep edebiýat sanatynda experimentalary çykarýarys, hemmesiniň hemmesiniň bir meňzeş sözleri bar, lukmanyň bir edebiýatynyň abstrakty we CMeKG-nyň dogry bilim grafisi bar. Aramanyň netijeleri bilgi grafyny döredijilik modelinin içine daşary ýagdaýynyň kalitesini gowurap biler we konkurçy yönlerden ukyp üstünlik bar.', 'af': "Om die domein kennis te gebruik om die korrekheid van genereerde teks te garanteer, is 'n warm onderwerp in onlangse jaar, veral vir hoë professionele domene soos mediese. Maar mees van onlangse werke dink slegs die inligting van onstruktureerde teks as struktureerde inligting van die kennisgraaf. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op die mediese onderwerp-na-teks generasie taak en aanpas 'n kennis-bewyse teks generasie model na die mediese domein, genaamd MedWriter, wat nie net die spesifieke kennis voorsien van die eksterne MKG nie, maar is ook in staat om graf-vlak voorsiening te leer nie. Ons doen eksperimente op 'n mediese literature dataset wat van mediese journale versamel is, elkeen van hulle het 'n stel onderwerp woorde, 'n abstrak van mediese literatuur en 'n ooreenstemmende kennisgraf van CMeKG. Eksperimentale resultate wys die inkorporering van kennisgraaf in generasie model die kwaliteit van die genereerde teks verbeter en het kragtige superiority oor die mededingsmetodes.", 'sq': 'To exploit the domain knowledge to guarantee the correctness of generated text has been a hot topic in recent years, especially for high professional domains such as medical.  Megjithatë, shumica e punëve të fundit konsiderojnë vetëm informacionin e tekstit të pastrukturuar në vend të informacionit të strukturuar të grafikut të njohurive. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi në detyrën mjekësore të gjenerimit të temës në tekst dhe përshtatemi një model të gjenerimit të tekstit të dijshëm në domenin mjekësor, të quajtur MedWriter, i cili jo vetëm paraqet njohuritë specifike nga MKG i jashtëm por është gjithashtu në gjendje të mësojë përfaqësimin e nivelit të grafikut. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në një grup të dhënash të letërsisë mjekësore të mbledhura nga gazetat mjekësore, secila prej të cilave ka një grup fjalësh tematike, një abstrakt të letërsisë mjekësore dhe një grafik njohurie korrespondente nga CMeKG. Experimental results demonstrate incorporating knowledge graph into generation model can improve the quality of the generated text and has robust superiority over the competitor methods.', 'am': 'የውይይት የጽሑፉን ማስተካከል ለመጠቀም የውይይት እውቀት ለመጠቀም በቅርብ ዓመታት፣ ይልቁንም ለብዙ ባለሞያ አካባቢዎች እንደሚሆን አካባቢ ጉዳይ ሆኖአል፡፡ ነገር ግን የቀድሞው የጽሑፍ መረጃዎች እውቀት ግንኙነት ከመሠረት ይልቅ የተመሳሳይ የጽሑፍ መረጃ ብቻ ይመለከታሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጥምቀት ጉዳይ ለጽሑፍ ትውልድ ሥራ እናስማራለን እናውቀውም የጽሑፍ ትውልድ ምሳሌ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከአካባቢ ጋዜጠቶች በተሰበሰቡት የጥምቀት ሐሳብ ዳታ ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፤ እያንዳንዳቸውም አካባቢ ቃላት፣ የጥምቀት ትምህርት ዝርዝርት እና ከCMeKG የተለየ እውቀት ቀረፋ ነው፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች እውቀትን ቀረጽ ወደ ትውልድ ምሳሌ ማሳየት የሚያሳየው የጽሑፉን ጥያቄ እንዲያበጅል እናም በተቃዋሚው ሥርዓቶች ላይ ትልቅ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում ստեղծված տեքստի ճշմարտությունը հատկապես բարձր մասնագիտական ոլորտներում, ինչպիսիք են բժշկությունը, վառ թեմա է եղել: Այնուամենայնիվ, վերջին աշխատանքների մեծ մասը ընդունում է միայն անկառուցված տեքստի տեղեկատվությունը, ոչ թե գիտելիքի գծագրի կառուցված տեղեկատվությունը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք բժշկական թեման-տեքստի սերունդի խնդիրների վրա և հարմարեցնում ենք գիտելիքով գիտակցած տեքստի սերունդի մոդելը բժշկական ոլորտում, որը անվանում է ՄեդՍուրբ, որը ոչ միայն ներկայացնում է արտաքին ՄՔԳ-ի կողմից կոնկրետ գիտել Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում բժշկական գրականության տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որը հավաքվել է բժշկական ամսագրերից, որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը ունի մի շարք թեմային բառեր, բժշկական գրականության վերացական և համապատասխան գիտելիքների գրաֆիա ԿՄԵԿԳ Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի ներառումը սերնդի մոդելի մեջ կարող է բարելավել ստեղծված տեքստի որակը և ունենալ ուժեղ գերազանցություն մրցակցության մեթոդների մեջ:', 'az': 'Məxluqatın doğruluğunu garantiya etmək üçün domain elmi son illərdə isti bir məsəl oldu, özellikle də təhsil sahibləri kimi yüksək profesyonel domenalar üçün. Ancaq son işlərin əksəriyyəti elm grafının strukturlı məlumatlarını yerinə strukturlı məlumatların məlumatlarını düşünür. Bu kağızda, biz təhsil təhsil-təhsil təhsil-təhsil törətməsinə odaqlanırıq və bilikli mətn təhsil modelini MedWriter adlı təhsil domenasına uyğunlaşdırırıq. Bu yalnız dış MKG təhsil bilgisini təşkil edir, lakin grafik səviyyəsini öyrənə bilər. Biz təhsil günlüklərindən toplanmış tıbbi edebiyatı verilənlərin təcrübələrini təşkil edirik. Onların hər birinin məsələlərinin bir kopu, tıbbi edebiyatının abstraktu və CMeKG-dən uyğun bilgi grafı vardır. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları bilgi grafını nəsli modellərə daxil etmək üçün yaratdığı məktubun kalitetini daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər və müəllif metodların üstündə möhkəm üstünlüyünü göstərər.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে প্রজন্মিত টেক্সটের সঠিকভাবে ডোমেইনের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করার জন্য জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, বিশেষ করে উচ্চ পেশ তবে সাম্প্রতিক কাজ শুধুমাত্র জ্ঞান গ্রাফের তথ্য নির্মাণ করার পরিবর্তে অকার্যকর লেখার তথ্য বিবেচনা করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা চিকিৎসার বিষয়টি থেকে টেক্সট প্রজন্মের কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি এবং জ্ঞান-পরিচিত লেখা প্রজন্মের মডেল মেডিকেল ডোমেইনের কাছে যার নাম ম মেড লাইপার, যা বাইর আমরা মেডিকেল সাহিত্যের তথ্য সংগ্রহ করা এক পরীক্ষায় পরীক্ষা করছি, যার মধ্যে প্রত্যেকের কাছে বিষয়বস্তু শব্দ, চিকিৎসা সাহিত্যের বিরতি এবং সিমেকেজি থে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে প্রজন্মের মডেলে জ্ঞান গ্রাফ অন্তর্ভুক্ত করা হয়েছে যে তা তৈরি করা টেক্সটের মান উন্নত করতে পারে এবং প্রতিযোগিতা', 'bs': 'Da bi iskoristili znanje domena da bi garantirali ispravnost proizvedenog teksta u posljednjih godina bila vruća tema, posebno za visoke profesionalne domene poput medicinske. Međutim, većina nedavnih radova razmatra samo informacije o nestrukturiranom tekstu umjesto strukturirane informacije o grafiku znanja. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na zadatak generacije medicinske teme na tekst i prilagodimo model generacije teksta svjesnog znanja na medicinsku domenu pod nazivom MedWriter, koji ne samo predstavlja specifično znanje spoljnog MKG-a, već i može učiti predstavljanje grafa nivoa. Mi provodimo eksperimente na medicinskoj literaturskoj seti podataka koji su skupljeni iz medicinskih dnevnika, svako od njih ima skup temnih riječi, apstrakt medicinske literature i odgovarajući znanstveni grafik iz CMeKG-a. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da uključujući grafik znanja u model generacije može poboljšati kvalitet proizvedenog teksta i da ima jaku nadmoć nad metodama konkurenta.', 'ca': "Utilitzar el coneixement de domini per garantir la correctesa del text generat ha estat un tema calor en els últims anys, especialment en dominis altament professionals com la medicina. Però la majoria de les obres recents només consideran la informació del text no estructurat en comptes d'informació estructurada del gràfic del coneixement. En aquest paper, ens centrem en la tasca de generació de tema mèdic a text i adaptem un model de generació de text conscient del coneixement al domini mèdic, anomenat MedWriter, que no només introdueix el coneixement específic del MKG extern, sinó també és capaç d'aprendre representació a nivell gràfic. Fem experiments en un conjunt de dades de literatura mèdica recollits de diaris mèdics, cadascun dels quals té un conjunt de paraules temàtiques, un abstract de la literatura mèdica i un gràfic de coneixement correspondent de CMeKG. Els resultats experimentals demostren que incorporar el gràfic del coneixement al model de generació pot millorar la qualitat del text generat i té una gran superioritat sobre els mètodes competitius.", 'cs': 'Využít znalosti domény k zajištění správnosti generovaného textu je v posledních letech žhavým tématem, zejména pro vysoce odborné domény, jako je medicína. Nicméně většina posledních prací se zabývá pouze informacemi nestrukturovaného textu, nikoli strukturovanými informacemi znalostního grafu. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na lékařskou úlohu generování tématu na text a adaptujeme model generování textů vědomostí do lékařské domény s názvem MedWriter, který nejen představuje specifické znalosti z externího MKG, ale také je schopen učit se reprezentaci na úrovni grafů. Provádíme experimenty na datovém souboru lékařské literatury shromážděném z lékařských časopisů, z nichž každý má soubor tématických slov, abstrakt lékařské literatury a odpovídající znalostní graf CMeKG. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že začlenění znalostního grafu do generačního modelu může zlepšit kvalitu generovaného textu a má robustní převahu nad konkurenčními metodami.', 'fi': 'Domain-tietämyksen hyödyntäminen luodun tekstin oikeellisuuden takaamiseksi on ollut kuuma aihe viime vuosina, erityisesti korkean ammattitason aloilla, kuten lääketieteellä. Useimmissa viimeaikaisissa teoksissa käsitellään kuitenkin vain strukturoimattoman tekstin informaatiota tietokaavion strukturoidun informaation sijaan. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme lääketieteen aihepiiristä tekstiin generointitehtävään ja sopeutamme lääketieteen alaan MedWriter-nimisen tietotietoisen tekstin generointimallin, joka paitsi esittelee ulkoisen MKG:n spesifistä tietoa myös pystyy oppimaan graafisen edustuksen. Teemme kokeita lääketieteellisistä lehdistä kerätyllä lääketieteellisen kirjallisuuden aineistolla, joista jokaisella on joukko aihesanoja, lääketieteen kirjallisuuden tiivistelmä ja vastaava tietokaavio CMeKG:ltä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että tietokaavion sisällyttäminen sukupolvimalliin voi parantaa tuotetun tekstin laatua ja sillä on vahva ylivoima kilpailijan menetelmiin nähden.', 'et': 'Domeeniteadmiste kasutamine genereeritud teksti õigsuse tagamiseks on viimastel aastatel olnud kuum teema, eriti kõrgete professionaalsete valdkondade puhul, nagu meditsiini. Enamik hiljutisi tööd käsitleb aga pigem struktureerimata teksti informatsiooni kui struktureeritud informatsiooni teadmisgraafikul. Käesolevas töös keskendume meditsiinilise teema-teksti genereerimise ülesandele ja kohandame teadmistepõhist teksti genereerimise mudelit meditsiinivaldkonnale nimega MedWriter, mis mitte ainult ei tutvusta välise MKG konkreetseid teadmisi, vaid suudab õppida ka graafilise taseme esindamist. Teostame katseid meditsiiniajakirjadest kogutud meditsiinikirjanduse andmekogumiga, millest igaühel on teemasõnade komplekt, meditsiinikirjanduse kokkuvõte ja vastav teadmisgraafik CMeKG-lt. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et teadmiste graafiku lisamine generatsiooni mudelisse võib parandada genereeritud teksti kvaliteeti ja omab tugevat paremust konkurendi meetodite ees.', 'jv': 'To help Nanging, akeh opera sing kudu nggawe barang nggawe informasi alamat sak teks ora bisa structural maneh dumateng informasi alaman barang kelompok. Nang pember iki, kita dipun nglanggar tema-kanggo-teks nggawe lan wiyandik modèl nggawe alam-awake teks nggo langgar paneleng dhéwé, nganggo medWritr, sing gak dhéwé nggawe barang dhéwé nggawe barang nggo langgar banter MKG nggawe iki iso nggawe basa gambar nggo kuwi nggawe barang nggawe. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk kanggo nggambar dadi nggambar barang dhéwé, saben sing katêpakan karo aturan tembarang, résumé dhéwé basa sing berarti karo ingkang alaman sing nggawe barang dhéwé. Reulti sing paling-peringatan maneh da nggawe graf kuwi nggawe ngerasai model sing bisa luwih apik sing ngwalikno ngono nggawe sistem sing gawe nguasai perusahaan seneng sampeyan tapi.', 'he': 'לנצל את הידע המחוזי כדי להבטיח את התקנות של טקסט יוצר היה נושא חם בשנים האחרונות, במיוחד עבור תחומות מקצועיות גבוהות כמו רפואה. עם זאת, רוב העבודות האחרונות שוקלות רק את המידע של טקסט לא מבושל במקום מידע מבושל של גרף הידע. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמקדים במשימת הדור של נושא רפואי לטקסט ומתאימים דוגמא לדור טקסט מודע למדע לתחום הרפואי, בשם MedWriter, אשר לא רק מציג את הידע המיוחד מהMKG החיצוני, אלא גם מסוגל ללמוד מייצג רמה גרף. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצת מידע ספרות רפואית שנאספת מעיתונים רפואיים, לכל אחד מהם יש קבוצה של מילים נושאיות, אסטרקט של ספרות רפואית וגרף ידע מתאים מCMeKG. Experimental results demonstrate incorporating knowledge graph into generation model can improve the quality of the generated text and has robust superiority over the competitor methods.', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje domenskega znanja za zagotavljanje pravilnosti ustvarjenega besedila je bila v zadnjih letih vroča tema, zlasti za visoko strokovna področja, kot je medicina. Vendar pa večina novejših del upošteva le informacije nestrukturiranega besedila in ne strukturirane informacije grafikona znanja. V prispevku se osredotočamo na nalogo generiranja medicinske teme v besedilo in prilagodimo model generiranja besedila, ki se zaveda znanja, medicinski domeni, imenovan MedWriter, ki ne samo uvaja specifičnega znanja iz zunanjega MKG, ampak je sposoben tudi učiti grafične reprezentacije. Izvajamo eksperimente na zbirki podatkov medicinske literature, zbranih iz medicinskih revij, od katerih vsaka vsebuje nabor tematskih besed, povzetek medicinske literature in ustrezni graf znanja CMeKG. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da vključitev grafikona znanja v generacijski model lahko izboljša kakovost ustvarjenega besedila in ima močno superiornost pred konkurenčnimi metodami.', 'ha': "Kuyi amfani da ilmi na Domen dõmin ka yi hakar gaskiyar matsayin da aka ƙãga littãfin na ƙara, yã kasance mai nauyi a cikin muhimman kwanan shekara na farko, hasa'a, wa'adin mafiya shawara kamar madaidaici. A lokacin da mafi yawan aiki na farko sun yi bincike bayan information na matsayin wanda ba'a sahu ba, kuma ba da tsari wa fassarar ilmi ba. Daga wannan takardan, Munã fokusar wa aikin madaidaici zuwa-mai-matsayi kuma Muke haɗa wata motel mai ƙididdige matsayin da aka sani zuwa madaidaici da sunan MedWriter, wanda ke ƙara bayani kawai da ilmi daga bakin MKG kuma yana iya iya karanta mai gaya-daraja. Tuna samun jarrabãwa a kan data na littafan afya da aka samu daga jarrabun jarrabai, dukansu yana da wasu magana masu madaidaici, da karatun littãfin da kuma a sami karatun na da inganci daga CMeKG. Matarin jarrabawa na nuna shirin ka shigar da graphi na ilmi a cikin zanen kizafi, yana iya ƙara tsarin matsayin da aka ƙãga, kuma ya sami sarrafiya a kan metoden-tarakin.", 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གེ་འགྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་དོན་ཚན་སྤྱོད་དགོས་བྱ་རྒྱུ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་སྨན་གྱི་ལས་འགའ་སྤྱོད་མཁན འོན་ཀྱང་། ཉེ་ཆར་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་སྒྲིག་མིན་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཆོས་ཡིན་ཆ་ལ་བསམ་བླ In this paper, we focus on the medical topic-to-text generation task and adapt a knowledge-aware text generation model to the medical domain, named MedWriter, which not only introduces the specific knowledge from the external MKG but is capable of learning graph-level representation. ང་ཚོས་སྨན་ཐོག་གི་literature་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྨན་ཐོག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་པའི་བརྗོད་ཚུ། ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དབྱིབས་ཤེས་པའི་གྲངས་རིས་དཔེ་བས།གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས'}
{'en': 'Context Dependent Semantic Parsing : A Survey', 'pt': 'Análise Semântica Dependente de Contexto: Uma Pesquisa', 'es': 'Análisis semántico dependiente del contexto: una encuesta', 'ar': 'التحليل الدلالي المعتمد على السياق: مسح', 'fr': 'Analyse sémantique dépendante du contexte\xa0: une enquête', 'hi': 'संदर्भ निर्भर शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग: एक सर्वेक्षण', 'ja': 'コンテキスト依存セマンティック解析:調査', 'zh': '上下文相关语义解析勘', 'ru': 'Контекстно-зависимый семантический анализ: опрос', 'ga': 'Parsáil Shéimeantach Chleithiúnaigh ar an gComhthéacs: Suirbhé', 'ka': 'კონტექსტის განსაზღვრებული სემანტიკური პარამეტრება: შემოწმება', 'hu': 'Kontextusfüggő szemantikus értelmezés: felmérés', 'el': 'Εξαρτώμενη από το πλαίσιο Σημαντική Ανάλυση: Μια Έρευνα', 'it': 'Analisi semantica dipendente dal contesto: un sondaggio', 'kk': 'Контекстің көмегімен семантикалық талдау: A Survey', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į kontekstą, atliekamas semantinis analizavimas: apklausa', 'mk': 'Семантично анализирање зависно од контекст: Истражување', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Semantik Bergantung Konteks: Survey', 'ml': 'ഉള്ളടക്കം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസി: ഒരു പരിശോധന', 'mn': 'Контекст хамааралтай Semantic Parsing: A Survey', 'mt': 'Context Dependent Semantic Parsing: A Survey', 'no': 'Kontekstavhengig semantisk tolking: A Survey', 'pl': 'Kontekstowa analiza semantyczna zależna od kontekstu: badanie', 'ro': 'Analizarea semantică dependentă de context: un sondaj', 'sr': 'Kontekst zavisni od semantičkog razmatranja: ispitivanje', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය: A Research', 'so': 'Xirfadda ku xiran ee ku habboon:', 'sv': 'Sammanhangsberoende semantisk tolkning: En undersökning', 'ta': 'உள்ளடக்கம் சார்ந்த செமான்டிக் பாசிங்: ஒரு பரிசோதனை', 'ur': 'Context Dependent Semantic Parsing: A Survey', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Độ phân tích kỳ cục: A Survey.', 'bg': 'Контекст Зависимо семантично анализиране: проучване', 'nl': 'Contextafhankelijke semantische parsing: een enquête', 'hr': 'Kontekst ovisno o semantičkom razmatranju: ispitivanje', 'da': 'Kontekstafhængig semantisk fortolkning: En undersøgelse', 'de': 'Kontextabhängige semantische Parsing: Eine Umfrage', 'ko': '상하문 관련 어의 분석을 종합하여 서술하다.', 'fa': 'پالایش متوسط متوسط: یک تحقیق', 'id': 'Analisasi Semantik Bergantung Konteks: Survey', 'tr': '彂䅒弊', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa kimbunga kinachotegemea na maudhui: Tafiti', 'sq': 'Analizimi Semantik i Varur nga Konteksti: Një sondazh', 'af': 'Konteks afhanklike semantiese verwerking: A Survey', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Կոնտեքստի կախված սեմատիկ վերլուծություն: A Survey', 'az': 'Kontext baƒülƒ± Semantik ƒ∞zl…ôm…ô: A Survey', 'bn': 'বিষয়বস্তু নির্ভর করা সেমান্টিক পার্সিং: একটি জরিপ', 'bs': 'Kontekst ovisno o semantičkom razmatranju: ispitivanje', 'cs': 'Kontextově závislé sémantické analýzy: průzkum', 'et': 'Kontekstist sõltuv semantiline parsing: uuring', 'fi': 'Konteksti Riippuva Semanttinen Parsing: A Survey', 'ca': 'Analització Semàtica Dependent del Context: Una Encuesta', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Kontekst Odvisna semantična analiza: Raziskava', 'jv': 'context-action', 'he': 'מחקר סמנטי תלוי בקשר: חקירה', 'bo': 'Context Dependent Semantic Parsing: A Survey'}
{'en': 'Semantic parsing is the task of translating natural language utterances into machine-readable meaning representations. Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to utilize the contextual information (e.g. dialogue and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems. To address this issue, context dependent semantic parsing has recently drawn a lot of attention. In this survey, we investigate progress on the methods for the context dependent semantic parsing, together with the current datasets and tasks. We then point out open problems and challenges for future research in this area.', 'pt': 'A análise semântica é a tarefa de traduzir enunciados de linguagem natural em representações de significado legíveis por máquina. Atualmente, a maioria dos métodos de análise semântica não é capaz de utilizar as informações contextuais (por exemplo, histórico de diálogos e comentários), o que tem um grande potencial para impulsionar os sistemas de análise semântica. Para resolver esse problema, a análise semântica dependente do contexto atraiu muita atenção recentemente. Nesta pesquisa, investigamos o progresso nos métodos para a análise semântica dependente do contexto, juntamente com os conjuntos de dados e tarefas atuais. Em seguida, apontamos problemas e desafios em aberto para pesquisas futuras nessa área.', 'ar': 'الاعراب الدلالي هو مهمة ترجمة الكلام المنطقي للغة الطبيعية إلى تمثيلات المعنى التي يمكن قراءتها آليًا. حاليًا ، معظم طرق التحليل الدلالي غير قادرة على استخدام المعلومات السياقية (على سبيل المثال ، تاريخ الحوار والتعليقات) ، والتي لديها إمكانات كبيرة لتعزيز أنظمة التحليل الدلالي. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، لفت التحليل الدلالي المعتمد على السياق الكثير من الاهتمام مؤخرًا. في هذا الاستطلاع ، نحقق في التقدم المحرز في طرق التحليل الدلالي المعتمد على السياق ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع مجموعات البيانات والمهام الحالية. ثم نشير إلى المشكلات والتحديات المفتوحة للبحث المستقبلي في هذا المجال.', 'fr': "L'analyse sémantique consiste à traduire des énoncés du langage naturel en représentations de sens lisibles par machine. Actuellement, la plupart des méthodes d'analyse sémantique ne sont pas capables d'utiliser les informations contextuelles (par exemple, l'historique des dialogues et des commentaires), ce qui présente un grand potentiel pour stimuler les systèmes d'analyse sémantique. Pour résoudre ce problème, l'analyse sémantique dépendante du contexte a récemment attiré beaucoup d'attention. Dans cette enquête, nous étudions les progrès des méthodes d'analyse sémantique dépendante du contexte, ainsi que les ensembles de données et les tâches actuels. Nous soulignons ensuite les problèmes et les défis en suspens pour les recherches futures dans ce domaine.", 'es': 'El análisis semántico es la tarea de traducir las expresiones del lenguaje natural en representaciones de significado legibles por máquina. Actualmente, la mayoría de los métodos de análisis semántico no pueden utilizar la información contextual (por ejemplo, el historial de diálogos y comentarios), lo que tiene un gran potencial para impulsar los sistemas de análisis semántico. Para abordar este problema, el análisis semántico dependiente del contexto ha llamado mucho la atención recientemente. En esta encuesta, investigamos el progreso de los métodos para el análisis semántico dependiente del contexto, junto con los conjuntos de datos y las tareas actuales. Luego señalamos los problemas y desafíos abiertos para futuras investigaciones en esta área.', 'ja': 'セマンティック構文解析は、自然言語の発話を機械可読の意味表現に翻訳する作業です。現在、ほとんどのセマンティック構文解析方法は、セマンティック構文解析システムを強化する大きな可能性を有するコンテキスト情報（例えば、対話およびコメント履歴）を利用することができない。この問題に対処するために、文脈依存のセマンティック構文解析は最近大きな注目を集めています。この調査では、現在のデータセットとタスクとともに、コンテキスト依存のセマンティック構文解析の方法の進捗状況を調査します。そして、この分野の今後の研究のためのオープンな問題と課題を指摘します。', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग प्राकृतिक भाषा के उच्चारण को मशीन-पठनीय अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व में अनुवाद करने का कार्य है। वर्तमान में, अधिकांश शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग विधियां प्रासंगिक जानकारी (जैसे संवाद और टिप्पणियों के इतिहास) का उपयोग करने में सक्षम नहीं हैं, जिसमें शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग सिस्टम को बढ़ावा देने की एक बड़ी क्षमता है। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, संदर्भ निर्भर शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग ने हाल ही में बहुत ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। इस सर्वेक्षण में, हम वर्तमान डेटासेट और कार्यों के साथ संदर्भ निर्भर शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के तरीकों पर प्रगति की जांच करते हैं। फिर हम इस क्षेत्र में भविष्य के शोध के लिए खुली समस्याओं और चुनौतियों को इंगित करते हैं।', 'zh': '语义解析者,转自然语言语为机器可读之义也。 方今多语义解析法不可用上下文息(如对注历史记录),此语义解析之大力也。 所以然者,赖上下文之语义解析近多所关注。 于本考中,究上下文相关语义解析法之进退,及今之数事。 然后指其未来之悬而未决与挑战。', 'ru': 'Семантический синтаксический анализ - это задача перевода высказываний на естественном языке в машиночитаемые представления смысла. В настоящее время большинство методов семантического синтаксического анализа не в состоянии использовать контекстную информацию (например, историю диалога и комментариев), которая имеет большой потенциал для усиления систем семантического синтаксического анализа. Для решения этой проблемы, контекстно-зависимый семантический синтаксический анализ в последнее время привлек много внимания. В этом опросе мы исследуем прогресс по методам контекстно-зависимого семантического анализа вместе с текущими наборами данных и задачами. Затем мы указываем на открытые проблемы и вызовы для будущих исследований в этой области.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i bparsáil shéimeantach an tasc de chainteanna nádúrtha teanga a aistriú go léiriúcháin bhrí atá inléite ag meaisín. Faoi láthair, níl an chuid is mó de na modhanna parsála shéimeantacha in ann úsáid a bhaint as an bhfaisnéis chomhthéacsúil (m.sh. stair idirphlé agus tuairimí), a bhfuil acmhainneacht mhór ann chun na córais parsála shéimeantacha a threisiú. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, tarraingíodh go leor airde le déanaí ar pharsáil shéimeantach atá ag brath ar chomhthéacs. Sa suirbhé seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar dhul chun cinn na modhanna don pharsáil shéimeantach a bhraitheann ar an gcomhthéacs, mar aon leis na tacair sonraí agus na tascanna reatha. Cuirimid in iúl ansin fadhbanna agus dúshláin oscailte do thaighde amach anseo sa réimse seo.', 'ka': 'Semantic parsing is the task of translating natural language words into machine-readable meaning representations. მიმდინარე, ბევრი სემონტიკური პარასტის მეტი არ შეუძლია გამოიყენოთ კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია (მაგალითად დიალოგი და კომენტური ისტორია), რომელიც აქვს დიდი პროცენტური პროცენტი ამ პრობლემას გარეშე, კონტექსტური სმენტიკური პარალიზაცია ახლა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. ამ შემოწმებაში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ პროგრესი კონტექსტის მეტოვებისთვის, რომლებიც კონტექსტის სემანტიკური პარასტის შესახებ, მიმდინარე მონაცემების და შემდეგ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ გახსნილი პრობლემები და გამოცდილებები მომავალე სწორეში.', 'hu': 'A szemantikus elemzés feladata, hogy a természetes nyelvi kifejezéseket géppel olvasható jelentésreformációkká fordítsák. Jelenleg a legtöbb szemantikai elemzési módszer nem képes felhasználni a kontextuális információkat (például párbeszéd és megjegyzések történetét), amelyek nagy potenciállal rendelkeznek a szemantikai elemzési rendszerek fokozására. A probléma megoldására a kontextusfüggő szemantikai elemzés nemrégiben nagy figyelmet hívott fel. Jelen felmérésben a kontextusfüggő szemantikai elemzés módszereinek előrehaladását vizsgáljuk az aktuális adatkészletekkel és feladatokkal együtt. Ezután felhívjuk a figyelmet a jövőbeli kutatások előtt álló nyitott problémákra és kihívásokra.', 'el': 'Η σημειακή ανάλυση είναι το καθήκον της μετάφρασης των εκφράσεων φυσικής γλώσσας σε αναγνώσιμες από μηχανή αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών. Επί του παρόντος, οι περισσότερες μέθοδοι σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης δεν είναι σε θέση να χρησιμοποιήσουν τις πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος (π.χ. ιστορικό διαλόγου και σχολίων), γεγονός που έχει μεγάλη δυνατότητα να ενισχύσει τα συστήματα σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, η σημασιολογική ανάλυση εξαρτάται από το περιβάλλον έχει τραβήξει πρόσφατα μεγάλη προσοχή. Στην έρευνα αυτή, διερευνούμε την πρόοδο των μεθόδων για τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση που εξαρτάται από το πλαίσιο, μαζί με τα τρέχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων και τις εργασίες. Στη συνέχεια, επισημαίνουμε ανοιχτά προβλήματα και προκλήσεις για τη μελλοντική έρευνα στον τομέα αυτό.', 'it': "L'analisi semantica è il compito di tradurre le espressioni del linguaggio naturale in rappresentazioni di significato leggibili dalla macchina. Attualmente, la maggior parte dei metodi di analisi semantica non è in grado di utilizzare le informazioni contestuali (ad esempio la cronologia dei dialoghi e dei commenti), che hanno un grande potenziale per aumentare i sistemi di analisi semantica. Per affrontare questo problema, l'analisi semantica dipendente dal contesto ha recentemente attirato molta attenzione. In questo sondaggio, analizziamo i progressi sui metodi per l'analisi semantica dipendente dal contesto, insieme ai set di dati e alle attività attuali. Segnaliamo quindi problemi aperti e sfide per la ricerca futura in questo settore.", 'lt': 'Semantic parsing is the task of translating natural language utterances into machine-readable meaning representations.  Šiuo metu dauguma semantinių analizavimo metodų negali pasinaudoti kontekstine informacija (pvz., dialogu ir komentarų istorija), kuri turi didelį potencialą stiprinti semantinių analizavimo sistemas. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, pastaruoju metu daug dėmesio buvo skiriama nuo aplinkybių priklausomam semantiniam analizavimui. Šiame tyrime, kartu su dabartiniais duomenų rinkiniais ir uždaviniais, tiriame pažangą, susijusią su metodais, taikomais atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes priklausomam semantiniam analizavimui. Tada atkreipiame dėmesį į atviras problemas ir uždavinius būsimiems šios srities moksliniams tyrimams.', 'mk': 'Семантичкото анализирање е задача за преведување на природните изрази на јазик во машински читливи представувања на значењето. Моментно, повеќето семантични методи на анализирање не можат да ја искористат контекстната информација (на пример дијалогот и историјата на коментарите), која има голем потенцијал за зајакнување на семантичните системи на анализирање. За да се реши ова прашање, контекстно зависно семантично анализирање неодамна привлече многу внимание. Во ова истражување, го истражуваме напредокот во методите за контекстно зависно семантично анализирање, заедно со сегашните податоци и задачи. Потоа истакнуваме отворени проблеми и предизвици за идното истражување во оваа област.', 'kk': 'Жартық талдау - табиғи тіл сөздерін машина оқылмайтын мәліметтерге аудару тапсырмасы. Қазір, семантикалық талдау әдістерінің көпшілігі контексті мәліметті (мысалы, диалог және түсініктемелер журналы) пайдалануға болмайды. Бұл семантикалық талдау жүйелерін көтеруге мүмкі Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін контекстік тәуелді семантикалық талдау жақында көп назарды көрсетті. Бұл зерттеулерде, контекстің әдістерін зерттеп, қазіргі деректер жинақтары мен тапсырмаларымен бірге тәуелді семантикалық талдау әдістерін зерттейміз. Содан кейін бұл аумақтағы келесі зерттеулер үшін ашық мәселелер мен мәселелерді таңдаймыз.', 'ms': 'Penghuraian semantik adalah tugas untuk menerjemahkan ungkapan bahasa semulajadi ke dalam persembahan makna yang boleh dibaca mesin. Semasa, kebanyakan kaedah penghuraian semantik tidak mampu menggunakan maklumat kontekstual (cth. dialog dan sejarah komen), yang mempunyai potensi besar untuk meningkatkan sistem penghuraian semantik. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, penghuraian semantik tergantung konteks baru-baru ini telah menarik banyak perhatian. Dalam penyelidikan ini, kami menyelidiki kemajuan pada kaedah untuk penghuraian semantik tergantung konteks, bersama dengan set data dan tugas semasa. We then point out open problems and challenges for future research in this area.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് എന്നതാണ് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷകങ്ങളെ മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന അര്\u200dത്ഥം പ്രതിന ഇപ്പോള്\u200d, ഏറ്റവും സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് നിലവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല (ഉദാ. ഡയലോഗ് വിവരങ്ങളും കണക്ട് ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d  To address this issue, context dependent semantic parsing has recently drawn a lot of attention.  ഈ പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ഡാറ്റാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും ജോലികളുമായി നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന രീതികളില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസ പിന്നീട് ഈ പ്രദേശത്തുള്ള ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശോധനയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി തുറന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളും വ്യാലോചനം', 'mt': "L-analiżi Semantika hija l-kompitu tat-traduzzjoni ta’ espressjonijiet lingwistiċi naturali f’rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ tifsira li jinqraw mill-magna. Bħalissa, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi semantiċi tal-analiżi mhumiex kapaċi jużaw l-informazzjoni kuntestwali (pereżempju d-djalogu u l-istorja tal-kummenti), li g ħandha potenzjal kbir li ssaħħa ħ is-sistemi semantiċi tal-analiżi. Biex tiġi indirizzata din il-kwistjoni, dan l-a ħħar l-analiżi semantika dipendenti fuq il-kuntest ġibdet ħafna attenzjoni. F’dan l-istħarriġ, ninvestigaw il-progress dwar il-metodi għall-analiżi semantika dipendenti fuq il-kuntest, flimkien mas-settijiet u l-kompiti tad-dejta attwali. Imbagħad nindikaw problemi u sfidi miftuħa għar-riċerka futura f'dan il-qasam.", 'mn': 'Semantic parsing is the task of translating natural language words into machine-readable meaning representations. Одоогоор ихэнх семантик хуваалцах арга нь орчин үеийн мэдээллийг ашиглаж чадахгүй (жишээ нь, диалог болон түүх ярианы талаар) байдаг. Энэ нь semantic хуваалцах системүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэх гайхалтай боломжтой. Энэ асуудлыг асуухын тулд, нөхцөл байдлын хамааралтай semantic parsing саяхан маш их анхаарал татсан. Энэ судалгаанд бид орчин үеийн өгөгдлийн сангууд болон ажлыг хамтдаа хамааралтай салбарын аргыг судалж байна. Дараа нь бид ирээдүйн судалгаанд нээлттэй асуудал болон сорилтуудыг тайлбарлаж байна.', 'no': 'Semantisk tolking er oppgåva for å omsetja naturspråk-uttrykk til maskinelesbar meningsrepresentasjonar. Dei fleste semantiske tolkingsmetodane kan ikkje bruka kontekstinformasjonen (f.eks. dialogvindauget og kommentar historie), som har stor potensial for å auka semantiske tolkingssystemene. For å handtera dette problemet, har det nyleg teikna mykje oppmerksomhet på kontekstavhengige semantisk tolking. I denne undersøkinga undersøker vi framgang på metodane for kontekstavhengig semantisk tolking, saman med gjeldande datasett og oppgåver. Vi viser så åpne problemer og utfordringar for framtidige forskning i dette området.', 'ro': 'Analizarea semantică este sarcina de a traduce expresiile limbajului natural în reprezentări de semnificații care pot fi citite automat. În prezent, majoritatea metodelor de analizare semantică nu sunt capabile să utilizeze informația contextuală (de exemplu, istoricul dialogurilor și comentariilor), care are un mare potențial de a stimula sistemele de analizare semantică. Pentru a aborda această problemă, analizarea semantică dependentă de context a atras recent o mulțime de atenție. În cadrul acestui sondaj, investigăm progresul privind metodele de analizare semantică dependentă de context, împreună cu seturile de date și sarcinile curente. Apoi subliniem problemele deschise și provocările pentru cercetarea viitoare în acest domeniu.', 'pl': 'Parsowanie semantyczne to zadanie tłumaczenia wypowiedzi języka naturalnego na czytelne maszynowo reprezentacje znaczeń. Obecnie większość metod parsowania semantycznego nie jest w stanie wykorzystać informacji kontekstowych (np. historii dialogów i komentarzy), co ma ogromny potencjał do wzmocnienia systemów parsowania semantycznego. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, kontekstowo zależne parsowanie semantyczne zwróciło ostatnio dużą uwagę. W niniejszym badaniu badamy postępy w zakresie metod kontekstowego parsowania semantycznego wraz z aktualnymi zbiorami danych i zadaniami. Następnie wskazujemy na otwarte problemy i wyzwania dla przyszłych badań w tej dziedzinie.', 'sr': 'Semantičko analiziranje je zadatak prevoda prirodnih jezika u predstavljanje mašinskih znakova. Trenutno većina semantičkih metoda analize ne mogu iskoristiti kontekstualne informacije (npr. dijalog i povijest komentara), koja ima veliki potencijal za povećanje semantičkih analiza. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, kontekst zavisi od semantičkog analiza nedavno je privukao mnogo pažnje. U ovom istraživanju istražujemo napredak metoda konteksta zavisi o semantičkom analizu, zajedno sa trenutnim setima podataka i zadataka. Onda pokazujemo otvorene probleme i izazove za buduće istraživanje u ovoj oblasti.', 'si': 'සාමාන්තික විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පරිවර්තනය කරන්නේ වැඩේ. අවස්ථානයෙන්, ගොඩක් සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතිය භාවිත කරන්න බෑ (උදාහරණයෙන්, සංවාදය සහ කිරීම් ඉතිහාසය), ඒ මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න, සංවේදනය අවශ්\u200dය සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය ගොඩක් අවධානය කරලා තිය මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳ ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරදේශයේ අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ අභ්\u200dයානයක් තියෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Semantisk tolkning är uppgiften att översätta naturliga språkuttryck till maskinläsbara betydelserepresentationer. För närvarande kan de flesta semantiska tolkningsmetoder inte använda kontextuell information (t.ex. dialog- och kommentarshistorik), vilket har en stor potential att öka de semantiska tolkningssystemen. För att lösa detta problem har kontextberoende semantisk tolkning nyligen dragit mycket uppmärksamhet. I denna enkät undersöker vi hur metoderna för kontextberoende semantisk tolkning utvecklas tillsammans med aktuella datamängder och uppgifter. Därefter pekar vi på öppna problem och utmaningar för framtida forskning inom detta område.', 'so': 'Xirfadda Semantic is the task of translating afka asalka ah into machine-readable meaning representations. Hada la joogo, hababka baaritaanka qaarkood ma isticmaali karaan macluumaadka soo socda (tusaale ahaan dialogue iyo comments), taas oo awood u leh inuu kordhiyo nidaamka baaritaanka semantika ah. Si loo qabsado arimahan, baarlamaanka ku xiran ee midiidinka ayaa ugu dhowaad u soo jeeday dhegaysan. Baaritaankan, waxaynu baaraynaa horumarinta ku saabsan qaababka baaritaanka semantika, isla markaasna waxaynu sameynaynaa sameynta macluumaadka iyo shaqada. Markaas waxaynu muujinnaa dhibaatooyin furan iyo dhibaatooyin la xiriira cilmiga mustaqbalka ee halkan.', 'ta': 'இயற்கையான மொழிகளை மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் செயல் தற்போது, பெரும்பாலான பாடல் முறைமைகள் தற்போதைய தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்த முடியாது (உதாரணமாக உரையாடல் மற்றும் குறிப்புரைகள் வரலாறு), அது பெரும்பாலான பா இந்த பிரச்சினையை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, சூழல் சார்ந்த அமைப்பு பாசிங் சமீபத்தில் நிறைய கவனத்தை வரைகிறது. இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் சூழ்நிலையில் சார்ந்த semantic பாசிங்க் முறைமைகள் மீது முன்னேற்றம் தேடுகிறோம், நடப்பு தரவு பிறகு இந்த பரப்பில் எதிர்கால ஆய்வுக்கான திறந்த பிரச்சனைகளையும் சவால்களையும் குறிப்பி', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی پارسینگ یہ کام ہے کہ طبیعی زبان کلمات کو ماشین پڑھنے کے قابل تعریف میں ترجمہ کرنا ہے. اب اکثر سیمنٹی پارسینگ طریقے متوسط معلومات کو استعمال کرنے کے لئے قادر نہیں ہیں (جیسے ڈالیگ اور مثالیں تاریخ) جس میں سیمنٹی پارسینگ سیستموں کو زیادہ زیادہ طاقت رکھتا ہے. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں، کنٹنسٹ مسئلہ کے مطابق سیمانٹی پارسینگ نے اچھے وقت بہت اظہار کیا ہے. اس سؤرٹیو میں، ہم نے کنٹنسیٹ کے طریقے پر پیشرفت کی تحقیق کی ہے، یہاں تک کہ موجود ڈاٹ سٹ اور تاسکیوں کے ساتھ، پھر ہم اس منطقه میں کھولے مشکلات اور چالیوں کو دکھاتے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Phân tích trung học là nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển những ngôn ngữ tự nhiên vào các biểu tượng có ý nghĩa khó đọc. Hiện tại, hầu hết các phương pháp phân tích ngữ pháp không thể sử dụng các thông tin ngữ cảnh (v. d. thoại và ghi chú lịch sử), nó có tiềm năng rất lớn để tăng cường hệ thống phân tích ngữ pháp. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, xét nghiệm ngữ nghĩa phụ thuộc đã gây ra nhiều chú ý gần đây. Trong cuộc khảo sát này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu tiến trình về phương pháp phân tích ngữ cảnh dựa trên ngữ cảnh, cùng với các tập tin và các công việc hiện thời. Chúng tôi đề cập đến vấn đề và thử thách mở trong việc nghiên cứu tương lai trong lĩnh vực này.', 'uz': "Name Joriy, ko'pchilik semantik parsing usullari daqiqa maʼlumotdan foydalanib boʻlmaydi (m. g. dialog va izohlar tarixida), bu semantik parsing tizimini oshirish juda juda muhim imkoniyat. To address this issue, context dependent semantic parsing has recently drawn a lot of attention.  Bu qidirishda, biz murakkablik semantik parsing usullari va joriy maʼlumotlar sahifalar va vazifalar bilan murojaat qilamiz. Keyin bu davlatda ochiq muammolarni va kelajakdagi qidirishni anglatamiz.", 'hr': 'Semantičko analiziranje je zadatak prevoda prirodnih jezičkih izraza u predstavljanje mašine za čitanje značaja. Trenutno većina semantičkih metoda analize ne mogu iskoristiti kontekstualne informacije (npr. dijalog i povijest komentara), koja ima veliki potencijal povećanja semantičkih sustava analize. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, suština ovisnog semantičkog analiza nedavno je privukla mnogo pažnje. U ovom istraživanju istražujemo napredak metoda konteksta ovisnog semantičkog razmatranja zajedno s trenutnim podacima i zadacima. Onda pokazujemo otvorene probleme i izazove za buduće istraživanje u ovom području.', 'nl': 'Semantische parsing is de taak van het vertalen van natuurlijke taaluitingen naar machinaal leesbare betekenisrepresentaties. Momenteel zijn de meeste semantische parsing methoden niet in staat om de contextuele informatie (bijvoorbeeld dialoog- en commentaargeschiedenis) te gebruiken, wat een groot potentieel heeft om de semantische parsing systemen te stimuleren. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, heeft contextafhankelijke semantische parsing de laatste tijd veel aandacht getrokken. In dit onderzoek onderzoeken we de voortgang van de methoden voor het contextafhankelijke semantische parsen, samen met de huidige datasets en taken. Vervolgens wijzen we op open problemen en uitdagingen voor toekomstig onderzoek op dit gebied.', 'bg': 'Семантичното анализиране е задачата да преведе речите на естествения език в машинно четими символни изображения. Понастоящем повечето семантични методи за анализиране не са в състояние да използват контекстуалната информация (например диалог и история на коментарите), която има голям потенциал за засилване на семантичните системи за анализиране. За да се справи с този проблем, контекстното зависимо семантично анализиране напоследък привлече много внимание. В това проучване изследваме напредъка по методите за контекстнозависимо семантично анализиране, заедно с текущите набори от данни и задачи. След това посочваме отворени проблеми и предизвикателства пред бъдещите изследвания в тази област.', 'da': 'Semantisk fortolkning er opgaven at oversætte naturlige sprogudtalelser til maskinlæsbare meningsrepræsentationer. I øjeblikket er de fleste semantiske analysemetoder ikke i stand til at udnytte kontekstuelle oplysninger (f.eks. dialog- og kommentarhistorik), som har et stort potentiale til at øge de semantiske analysesystemer. For at løse dette problem har kontekstafhængig semantisk parsing for nylig tiltrukket meget opmærksomhed. I denne undersøgelse undersøger vi fremskridt med metoderne til den kontekstafhængige semantiske fortolkning sammen med de aktuelle datasæt og opgaver. Vi peger derefter på åbne problemer og udfordringer for fremtidig forskning på dette område.', 'de': 'Semantisches Parsen ist die Aufgabe, natﾃｼrliche Sprachﾃ､uﾃ歹rungen in maschinenlesbare Bedeutungsreprﾃ､sentationen zu ﾃｼbersetzen. Derzeit sind die meisten semantischen Parsing-Methoden nicht in der Lage, die kontextuellen Informationen (z.B. Dialog- und Kommentarhistorie) zu nutzen, was ein groﾃ歹s Potenzial hat, die semantischen Parsing-Systeme zu stﾃ､rken. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, hat kontextabhﾃ､ngiges semantisches Parsen in letzter Zeit viel Aufmerksamkeit auf sich gezogen. In dieser Umfrage untersuchen wir den Fortschritt der Methoden fﾃｼr das kontextabhﾃ､ngige semantische Parsing, zusammen mit den aktuellen Datensﾃ､tzen und Aufgaben. Anschlieﾃ歹nd zeigen wir offene Probleme und Herausforderungen fﾃｼr die zukﾃｼnftige Forschung auf diesem Gebiet auf.', 'ko': '의미 분석은 자연 언어의 언어를 기계가 읽을 수 있는 의미 표시로 번역하는 임무다.현재 대부분의 의미 분석 방법은 상하문 정보(예를 들어 대화와 역사 평론)를 이용할 수 없기 때문에 의미 분석 시스템에 큰 잠재력을 가진다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 상하문과 관련된 의미 분석이 최근 많은 관심을 모으고 있다.이 총론에서 우리는 상하문과 관련된 의미 분석 방법의 진전과 현재의 데이터 집합과 임무를 조사했다.그리고 우리는 이 분야의 미래 연구에 존재하는 문제점과 도전을 지적했다.', 'fa': 'تقسیم سیماتیک کار ترجمه زبان طبیعی به نمایش\u200cهای معنی خواندنی ماشین است. در حال حاضر، بیشترین روش\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cگیری semantic قادر به استفاده از اطلاعات متوسط نیستند (مثلاً محاورۀ و تاریخ توضیح\u200cها) که توانایی بزرگی برای افزایش سیستم\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cگیری semantic دارد. برای حل این مسئله، تحلیل سیمانتیک بستگی بستگی به محیط اخیراً توجه بسیاری کشید. در این تحقیقات، ما پیشرفت روی روش\u200cهایی برای تحقیقات سیمانتیک بستگی داریم، با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای فعلی و وظیفه\u200cهای فعلی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. سپس مشکلات باز و چالش های آینده در این منطقه را نشان می دهیم.', 'id': 'Analisasi sementik adalah tugas untuk menerjemahkan ucapan bahasa alam ke represisi arti yang dapat dibaca oleh mesin. Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to utilize the contextual information (e.g. dialogue and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems.  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, penghuraian semantis tergantung konteks baru-baru ini menarik banyak perhatian. Dalam survei ini, kami menyelidiki kemajuan pada metode untuk penghuraian semantis tergantung konteks, bersama dengan set data dan tugas saat ini. Kemudian kita menunjukkan masalah terbuka dan tantangan untuk penelitian masa depan di daerah ini.', 'tr': 'Semantik analyz edil tebigy dil sözlerini maşynyň okalabilir aňlamalary terjime etmek üçin zady. Şu wagtda, iň kop semantik analýşim metodlary senediň maglumaty ulanyp bilmeýär (meselâ, dialogyň we ýazşyrymlar g e çmişi), semantik analýşim sistemlerini bejermek üçin örän möhüm potensiýasy bar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, kontekst baglanýan semantik ayırmak soňra köp üns çekdi. Bu araşdyrmada, kontekst sistemasynda semantik parslama baglanýan yöntemleri we häzirki veri setirleri we görevleri bilen öňe çykýarys. Soňra bu ýerde gelejekde barlag üçin açyk meseleleri we kynçylyklary belirtýäris.', 'af': "Semantiese verwerking is die taak van die vertaling van natuurlike taal uitspraak in masjien-leesbare betekenis voorsiening. Opstuur, die meeste semantiese verwerking metodes kan nie die kontekslike inligting (bv. dialoog en kommentaar geskiedenis) gebruik nie, wat het 'n groot potensieal om die semantiese verwerking stelsels te vermeerder nie. Om hierdie probleem te adres, het konteks afhanklik semantiese verwerking onlangs 'n baie aandag getrek. In hierdie ondersoek, ondersoek ons vordering op die metodes vir die konteks afhanklik semantiese ondersoek, saam met die huidige datastelle en opdragte. Ons wys dan oop probleme en uitdagings vir toekomstige ondersoek in hierdie gebied.", 'sw': 'Hifadhi ya msingi ni jukumu la kutafsiri lugha za asili katika maana ya mashine yanayosomeka. Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to utilize the contextual information (e.g. dialogue and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems.  Kupambana na suala hili, mazingira yanategemea mabadiliko ya kimapenzi hivi karibuni yamesababisha macho mengi. Katika utafiti huu, tunachunguza maendeleo juu ya njia za uchimbaji wa kimapenzi unategemea, pamoja na seti za taarifa na kazi za sasa. Kisha tunaonyesha matatizo ya wazi na changamoto za utafiti wa baadaye katika eneo hili.', 'sq': 'Analizimi Semantik është detyra e përkthimit të shprehjeve të gjuhës natyrore në përfaqësime të kuptimeve të lexueshme nga makina. Aktualisht, shumica e metodave semantike të analizimit nuk janë në gjendje të përdorin informacionin kontekstual (për shembull dialogu dhe historia e komenteve), i cili ka një potencial të madh për të rritur sistemet semantike të analizimit. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, analiza semantike e varur nga konteksti ka tërhequr kohët e fundit shumë vëmendje. Në këtë sondazh, ne hetojmë përparimin në metodat për analizimin semantik të varur nga konteksti, së bashku me të dhënat dhe detyrat aktuale. Pastaj vëmë në dukje problemet e hapura dhe sfidat për kërkimet e ardhshme në këtë fushë.', 'am': 'የሴማኒክ ማኅበረሰብ የፍጥረት ቋንቋዎች ንግግሮችን ለመዘርጋት ማሻሻሻል-የሚነበበው አእምሮዎች ነው፡፡ Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to utilize the contextual information (e.g. dialogue and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems.  ወደዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የግንኙነት ተደጋፊ የsemantic ፓርቲ በቅርብ ጊዜ ብዙ ጥያቄ ያሳየዋል፡፡ በዚህ ምርመራ፣ የአሁኑን ዳታተሮች እና ስራዎችን በመጠቀም የግንኙነቱን የsemantic ማዘጋጀት ሥርዓቶችን እናጠይቃለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የክፍት መከራ እና የፍጻሜ ትምህርት ግንኙነት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը բնական լեզվի արտահայտությունների թարգմանման խնդիրն է մեքենաներով կարելի է ընթերցնել իմաստային արտահայտություններ: Ներկայումս, սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մեթոդները չեն կարողանում օգտագործել կոնտեքստալ ինֆորմացիան (օրինակ, երկխոսություն և մեկնաբանությունների պատմություն), որը մեծ պոտենցիալ ունի սեմանտիկ վերլուծության համակարգերի բարելավման համար: Այս հարցին լուծելու համար վերջերս շատ ուշադրություն է դարձրել կոնտեքստի կախված սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը: Այս հարցում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք առաջընթացը կոնտեքստի կախված սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մեթոդների վրա, միասին ներկայիս տվյալների համակարգերի և խնդիրների հետ: Այնուհետև մենք նշում ենք բաց խնդիրները և մարտահրավերները ապագա հետազոտության համար այս ոլորտում:', 'az': 'Semantik ayırış maşına oxuyabilən məsələlərə təbiətli dil sözlərini tərcümə etmək işidir. Şimdilik, çox semantik ayırma metodları, semantik ayırma sistemlərini artırmaq üçün müxtəlif məlumatları istifadə edə bilməz. Bu məsələni çəkmək üçün, məlumat bağlı semantik ayırması son zamanlarda çox məlumat çəkdi. Bu araştırma içində, müxtəlif semantik ayırma metodlarına bağlı yollarla birlikdə, günümüzdeki veri qurğuları və işləri ilə birlikdə tədbir edirik. Sonra bu bölgedə gələcək araştırmalar üçün açıq problemləri və çətinlikləri göstəririk.', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কথা মেশিন-পাঠযোগ্য অর্থ প্রতিনিধিত্বে অনুবাদ করার কাজ। বর্তমানে বেশীরভাগ সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং পদ্ধতি প্রাক্তন তথ্য ব্যবহার করতে পারে না (উদাহরণস্বরূপ ডায়ালগ এবং মন্তব্য ইতিহাস) যা সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং সি এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করার জন্য, সেমেন্টিক পার্জিং সম্প্রতি অনেক মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করেছে। In this survey, we investigate progress on the methods for the context dependent semantic parsing, together with the current datasets and tasks.  তারপর আমরা এই এলাকার ভবিষ্যত গবেষণার জন্য উন্মুক্ত সমস্যা এবং চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা উল্লেখ করি।', 'bs': 'Semantičko analiziranje je zadatak prevode prirodne jezičke govore u predstave za mašinu čitajuće značenje. Trenutno većina semantičkih metoda analize ne mogu iskoristiti kontekstualne informacije (npr. dijalog i povijest komentara), koja ima veliki potencijal za povećanje semantičkih sustava analize. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, u kontekstu zavisno semantičko analiziranje nedavno je privuklo mnogo pažnje. U ovom istraživanju istražujemo napredak metoda konteksta zavisi o semantičkom analizu, zajedno sa trenutnim podacima i zadacima. Onda pokazujemo otvorene probleme i izazove za buduće istraživanje u ovom području.', 'et': 'Semantiline parsimine on looduskeelsete väljendite tõlkimise ülesanne masinloetavateks tähendusekujutusteks. Praegu ei suuda enamik semantilisi parsimismeetodeid kasutada kontekstiteavet (nt dialoogi ja kommentaaride ajalugu), millel on suur potentsiaal semantilisi parsimissüsteeme suurendada. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks on hiljuti palju tähelepanu juhtinud kontekstist sõltuv semantiline parsimine. Uuringus uurime kontekstist sõltuva semantilise parsimise meetodite arengut koos praeguste andmekogumite ja ülesannetega. Seejärel toome esile avatud probleemid ja väljakutsed tulevaste teadusuuringute jaoks selles valdkonnas.', 'cs': 'Sémantické parsování je úkolem překladu výroků přirozeného jazyka do strojově čitelných významových reprezentací. V současné době většina sémantických parsovacích metod není schopna využít kontextové informace (např. historie dialogů a komentářů), což má velký potenciál posílit sémantické parsovací systémy. Pro řešení tohoto problému, kontextově závislé sémantické parsování upoutalo v poslední době velkou pozornost. V tomto průzkumu zkoumáme pokrok na metodách kontextově závislého sémantického parsování, spolu s aktuálními datovými sadami a úlohami. Poté poukazujeme na otevřené problémy a výzvy pro budoucí výzkum v této oblasti.', 'fi': 'Semanttinen jäsentäminen on luonnollisten kielten ilmaisujen kääntämistä koneluettaviksi merkitysesityksiksi. Tällä hetkellä useimmat semanttiset jäsennysmenetelmät eivät pysty hyödyntämään kontekstitietoa (esim. dialogi- ja kommenttihistoriaa), jolla on suuri potentiaali vahvistaa semanttisia jäsennysjärjestelmiä. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi kontekstista riippuvainen semanttinen jäsennys on viime aikoina herättänyt paljon huomiota. Tässä tutkimuksessa selvitämme edistymistä kontekstista riippuvaisen semanttisen jäsentämisen menetelmissä sekä nykyisissä aineistoissa ja tehtävissä. Tämän jälkeen korostamme avoimia ongelmia ja haasteita alan tulevalle tutkimukselle.', 'ca': "L'analització semàtica és la tasca de traduir expressions de llenguatge natural en representacions de significat llegibles per màquina. Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to utilize the contextual information (e.g. dialogue and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems.  Per abordar aquesta qüestió, l'analització semàntica que depèn del context ha atragit recentment molta atenció. In this survey, we investigate progress on the methods for the context dependent semantic parsing, together with the current datasets and tasks.  Llavors apuntem problemes oberts i reptes per a la recerca futura en aquesta àrea.", 'jv': 'semanti Ngubah text-tool-action org Nang araha-araha iki, kita yatênggunian perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno ngono nggawe barang semanti nggawe barang nggawe dataset dan tasks nggawe. Awak dhéwé ngerti perkara sing mbukaké perkara lan susahé kanggo ngerasakno iki.', 'he': 'בדיקת סמנטית היא המשימה של תרגום מילים בשפה טבעית לתוצאות משמעות קריאות במכונות. כרגע, רוב שיטות בדיקת סמנטיות אינן מסוגלות להשתמש במידע הקונטקטי (לדוגמא דיאלוג וההיסטוריה של הערות), שיש לו פוטנציאל גדול לגדל את מערכות בדיקת הסמנטית. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, בדיקת סמנטית תלויה בקשר לאחרונה משיכה הרבה תשומת לב. בסקר הזה, אנו חוקרים התקדמות בשיטות ההעברה הסמנטית המתמודדת על הקשר, יחד עם קבוצת הנתונים והמשימות הנוכחיות. ואז אנחנו מצביעים על בעיות פתוחות ואתגרים למחקר עתיד באזור הזה.', 'sk': 'Semantno razčlenjanje je naloga prevajanja izgovorov naravnega jezika v strojno berljive pomenske reprezentacije. Trenutno večina semantičnih metod razčlenjanja ne more uporabiti kontekstnih informacij (npr. dialogov in zgodovine komentarjev), kar ima velik potencial za povečanje semantičnih sistemov razčlenjanja. Za reševanje tega vprašanja je v zadnjem času pritegnilo veliko pozornosti semantično razčlenjanje, odvisno od konteksta. V tej anketi raziskujemo napredek pri metodah semantičnega razčlenjanja, odvisnega od konteksta, skupaj z aktualnimi nabori podatkov in opravili. Nato opozarjamo na odprte težave in izzive za prihodnje raziskave na tem področju.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to utilize the contextual information (e.g. dialogue and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems.  Domin da za'a yi amfani da wannan masu husũma, parse mai daidai na semantic na ƙara ya nuna masu ƙaranci. Daga wannan shirin, Munã tambaya kodi a kan hanyoyin yin mazaɓa na muhimman parse na semantic, sami da tsarin da ake kai yanzu. Sa'an nan kuma Muke nuna wa masu husũma masu buɗe da masu hanyõyi wa littafan nan gaba ɗaya a cikin wannan.", 'bo': 'Semantic parsing is the task of translating natural language utterances into machine-readable meaning representations. Currently, most semantic parsing methods are not able to use the contextual information (e.g. dialog and comments history), which has a great potential to boost the semantic parsing systems. གནད་དོན་འདི་ལ་བཤད་ན། སྐྱེས་ཡུལ་རྟེན་པའི་semantic དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་ཆད་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ལྟ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ངེད་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཙལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་མ་འོངས་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་དཀའ་ངལ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པ་དང་གདོང་'}
{'en': 'A Survey of Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'مسح الإعراب غير الخاضع للرقابة', 'fr': "Une enquête sur l'analyse de dépendance non supervisée", 'es': 'Una encuesta sobre el análisis de dependencias no supervisado', 'pt': 'Uma Pesquisa de Análise de Dependência Não Supervisionada', 'ja': '無監督の依存関係解析の調査', 'zh': '无监督赖解析勘', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग का एक सर्वेक्षण', 'ru': 'Обследование анализа неконтролируемых зависимостей', 'ga': 'Suirbhé ar Pharsáil Spleáchais Gan Mhaoirseacht', 'ka': 'არაფერიზებული დასამხოლობა განსაზღვრებას შესახებ', 'hu': 'A felügyelet nélküli függőség értelmezéséről szóló felmérés', 'el': 'Έρευνα ανάλυσης ανεξέλεγκτης εξάρτησης', 'kk': 'Сәйкестірілмеген тәуелдік талдауын зерттеу', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimos priklausomybės analizės tyrimas', 'it': "Un'indagine sull'analisi della dipendenza non controllata", 'mk': 'Истражување на ненадгледуваното анализирање зависности', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ആശ്രമങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു പരിശോധന', 'ms': 'Survey of Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'mt': 'Stħarriġ tal-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza Mhux Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Хамгаалахгүй хамаарлын талаар судалгаа', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Badanie analizy nienadzorowanej zależności', 'ro': 'Un studiu privind analizarea dependenței nesupravegheate', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Istraživanje neodređenog razmatranja zavisnosti', 'so': 'Baaritaanka jardiinada mas’uulka ah', 'sv': 'En undersökning om tolkning av icke övervakat beroende', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத சார்ந்த பாடலின் ஒரு பரிசோதனை', 'ur': 'غیر محفوظ اعتمادی تحقیق کی تحقیق', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Một cuộc kiểm soát sự quan sách dưới', 'da': 'En undersøgelse af fortolkning af uautoriseret afhængighed', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje neodređenog razmatranja zavisnosti', 'bg': 'Проучване на анализирането на зависимостта без надзор', 'de': 'Eine Erhebung über die Analyse von unbeaufsichtigter Abhängigkeit', 'nl': 'Een enquête naar niet-begeleide afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'ko': '무감독 의존 분석 종합 서술', 'id': 'A Survey of Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'fa': 'تحقیقات تجزیه اعتمادی غیرقابل حفاظت', 'sw': 'Tafiti la Kuchapisha Utegemea wa Uchunguzi usiotangaliwa', 'tr': 'Mazmunlanmadyk baglanylyk Taýýarlamasynyň barlanmasy', 'af': 'Name', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկվող կախվածության վերլուծության ուսումնասիրությունը', 'sq': 'A Survey of Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'bs': 'Istraživanje neodređenog razmatranja zavisnosti', 'az': 'Qeyd edilm…ômi≈ü baƒüƒ±mlƒ±lƒ±q analizi', 'bn': 'A Survey of Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'cs': 'Průzkum analýzy závislosti bez dohledu', 'et': 'Järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimise uuring', 'ca': "Un estudi sobre l'analisi de dependencies no supervisada", 'fi': 'Survey of Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'jv': 'offline', 'sk': 'Raziskava o nenadzorovanem razvrščanju odvisnosti', 'he': 'חקירה של בדיקת תלויות ללא השגחה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'བདེ་སྐྱོང་མེད་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Syntactic dependency parsing is an important task in natural language processing. Unsupervised dependency parsing aims to learn a dependency parser from sentences that have no annotation of their correct parse trees. Despite its difficulty, unsupervised parsing is an interesting research direction because of its capability of utilizing almost unlimited unannotated text data. It also serves as the basis for other research in low-resource parsing. In this paper, we survey existing approaches to unsupervised dependency parsing, identify two major classes of approaches, and discuss recent trends. We hope that our survey can provide insights for researchers and facilitate future research on this topic.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل التبعية النحوية مهمة مهمة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. يهدف تحليل التبعية غير الخاضع للإشراف إلى تعلم محلل التبعية من الجمل التي لا تحتوي على تعليق توضيحي لأشجار التحليل الصحيحة. على الرغم من صعوبة التحليل غير الخاضع للإشراف ، فهو اتجاه بحثي مثير للاهتمام نظرًا لقدرته على استخدام بيانات نصية غير محدودة تقريبًا. كما أنه يعمل كأساس لأبحاث أخرى في تحليل الموارد المنخفضة. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بمسح الأساليب الحالية لتحليل التبعية غير الخاضع للرقابة ، وتحديد فئتين رئيسيتين من الأساليب ، ومناقشة الاتجاهات الحديثة. نأمل أن يوفر استطلاعنا رؤى للباحثين ويسهل البحث المستقبلي حول هذا الموضوع.', 'fr': "L'analyse syntaxique des dépendances est une tâche importante dans le traitement du langage naturel. L'analyse de dépendance non supervisée vise à apprendre un analyseur de dépendance à partir de phrases qui n'ont pas d'annotation de leur arbre d'analyse correct. Malgré sa difficulté, l'analyse non supervisée est une direction de recherche intéressante en raison de sa capacité à utiliser des données textuelles non annotées presque illimitées. Il sert également de base à d'autres recherches sur l'analyse syntaxique à faibles ressources. Dans cet article, nous étudions les approches existantes de l'analyse de dépendance non supervisée, identifions deux grandes catégories d'approches et discutons des tendances récentes. Nous espérons que notre enquête pourra fournir des informations aux chercheurs et facilitera les recherches futures sur ce sujet.", 'pt': 'A análise sintática de dependência é uma tarefa importante no processamento de linguagem natural. A análise de dependência não supervisionada visa aprender um analisador de dependência de frases que não têm anotação de suas árvores de análise corretas. Apesar de sua dificuldade, a análise não supervisionada é uma direção de pesquisa interessante devido à sua capacidade de utilizar dados de texto não anotados quase ilimitados. Ele também serve como base para outras pesquisas em análise de baixo recurso. Neste artigo, examinamos as abordagens existentes para análise de dependência não supervisionada, identificamos duas classes principais de abordagens e discutimos tendências recentes. Esperamos que nossa pesquisa possa fornecer insights para pesquisadores e facilitar futuras pesquisas sobre esse tópico.', 'es': 'El análisis sintáctico de dependencias es una tarea importante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. El análisis de dependencias no supervisado tiene como objetivo aprender un analizador de dependencias a partir de oraciones que no tienen anotación de sus árboles de análisis correctos. A pesar de su dificultad, el análisis no supervisado es una dirección de investigación interesante debido a su capacidad de utilizar datos de texto no anotados casi ilimitados. También sirve como base para otras investigaciones sobre análisis de bajos recursos. En este artículo, analizamos los enfoques existentes para el análisis de dependencias no supervisado, identificamos dos clases principales de enfoques y discutimos las tendencias recientes. Esperamos que nuestra encuesta pueda proporcionar información a los investigadores y facilitar la investigación futura sobre este tema.', 'ja': '構文依存構文解析は、自然言語処理における重要な作業である。監視されていない依存関係解析は、正しい解析木のアノテーションを持たない文から依存関係解析器を学習することを目的としている。難しいにもかかわらず、監視されていない構文解析は、ほとんど無制限の注釈なしのテキストデータを利用することができるため、興味深い研究方向です。また、低リソース構文解析の他の研究の基礎ともなっている。この論文では、監視下にない依存関係解析に対する既存のアプローチを調査し、2つの主要なクラスのアプローチを特定し、最近の傾向を議論する。私たちの調査が、研究者に洞察を提供し、このトピックに関する将来の研究を促進できることを願っています。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में वाक्यात्मक निर्भरता पार्सिंग एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग का उद्देश्य उन वाक्यों से निर्भरता पार्सर सीखना है जिनके पास उनके सही पार्स पेड़ों का कोई एनोटेशन नहीं है। इसकी कठिनाई के बावजूद, अप्रशिक्षित पार्सिंग लगभग असीमित अननोटेड टेक्स्ट डेटा का उपयोग करने की अपनी क्षमता के कारण एक दिलचस्प शोध दिशा है। यह कम संसाधन पार्सिंग में अन्य अनुसंधान के लिए आधार के रूप में भी कार्य करता है। इस पेपर में, हम असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों का सर्वेक्षण करते हैं, दृष्टिकोण के दो प्रमुख वर्गों की पहचान करते हैं, और हाल के रुझानों पर चर्चा करते हैं। हमें उम्मीद है कि हमारा सर्वेक्षण शोधकर्ताओं के लिए अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान कर सकता है और इस विषय पर भविष्य के शोध की सुविधा प्रदान कर सकता है।', 'zh': '句法恃解析者,自然语言治之要务也。 无监赖解析旨未尝注正解析树句中学赖解析器。 虽困难重重,无监解析有趣,以其能用无限之未注数也。 此亦低资源解析中之别论也。 于本文中,按无监赖解析见法,定两大类法,并论近势。 愿我勘得为研究人,并促未来于此主题。', 'ru': 'Синтаксический синтаксический анализ зависимостей является важной задачей в обработке естественного языка. Неконтролируемый синтаксический анализ зависимостей направлен на изучение синтаксического анализатора зависимостей из предложений, не содержащих аннотаций к правильным деревьям синтаксического анализа. Несмотря на свою сложность, неконтролируемый синтаксический анализ является интересным направлением исследований из-за его способности использовать почти неограниченное количество текстовых данных без аннотации. Он также служит основой для других исследований в области анализа с низким уровнем ресурсов. В этой статье мы исследуем существующие подходы к неконтролируемому анализу зависимостей, выделяем два основных класса подходов и обсуждаем последние тенденции. Мы надеемся, что наш опрос поможет исследователям получить информацию и облегчит дальнейшие исследования по этой теме.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha é parsáil spleáchais chomhréire. Tá sé mar aidhm ag parsáil spleáchais gan mhaoirseacht parsálaí spleáchais a fhoghlaim ó abairtí nach bhfuil nóta ar bith acu ar a gcrann parsála cearta. In ainneoin a dheacrachta, is treo suimiúil taighde é parsáil gan mhaoirseacht mar gheall ar a chumas úsáid a bhaint as sonraí téacs nach bhfuil anótáilte beagnach gan teorainn. Feidhmíonn sé freisin mar bhunús do thaighde eile ar pharsáil acmhainní ísle. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid suirbhé ar na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin maidir le parsáil spleáchais gan mhaoirseacht, sainaithnímid dhá mhór-aicme cur chuige, agus pléimid treochtaí le déanaí. Tá súil againn gur féidir lenár suirbhé léargais a sholáthar do thaighdeoirí agus taighde a éascú ar an ábhar seo amach anseo.', 'ka': 'სინტექტიკური დასახლოების პარასიზაცია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სახელის პროცესიაში. უარყოფილი დამატებული დამატებულობის პანსერაციის მიზეზია, რომ დამატებულობის პანსერაციის გასწავლას, რომელიც მათი მარტივი პანსერაციის ხელების არაფერი არაფერ მას განმავლობაში, არაფერიზებული პასუპერიზაცია ინტერესტიური პასუპერიზაცია იყო, რადგან მისი შესაძლებლობა გამოყენება პირდაპირად უცნობილი ტექსტის მონაცემე ეს ასევე მუშაობს, როგორც სხვა პასუხისთვის მარტივი რესურსების პასუხისთვის. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ მსოფლიო პროგრამები განსხვავებულ დასაწყებელობის პარასუზაციისთვის, განსხვავებთ ორი მნიშვნელოვანი კლასები, და განსხვავებთ ახალი რრე ნაეწგამვ ჟვ, ფვ ნაქთჲრ ოპვჟლვეგანვ მჲზვ ეა ოპვეჟრაგთ თნრვპვჟთრვ ჱა პაჱჟლვეგაფთრვ თ ეა ოჲმჲდნვ ბყევღვრჲ თჱჟლვეგანვ ჱა რჲგა.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση συντακτικής εξάρτησης είναι μια σημαντική εργασία στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Η ανάλυση εξάρτησης χωρίς επιτήρηση έχει ως στόχο να μάθει έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης από προτάσεις που δεν έχουν σχόλια των σωστών δέντρων ανάλυσης τους. Παρά τη δυσκολία της, η ανάλυση χωρίς επίβλεψη είναι μια ενδιαφέρουσα ερευνητική κατεύθυνση λόγω της δυνατότητάς της να χρησιμοποιεί σχεδόν απεριόριστα μη σημειωμένα δεδομένα κειμένου. Λειτουργεί επίσης ως βάση για άλλες έρευνες στην ανάλυση χαμηλών πόρων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την ανάλυση εξάρτησης χωρίς επίβλεψη, προσδιορίζουμε δύο μεγάλες κατηγορίες προσεγγίσεων και συζητάμε τις πρόσφατες τάσεις. Ελπίζουμε ότι η έρευνά μας μπορεί να δώσει πληροφορίες για τους ερευνητές και να διευκολύνει τη μελλοντική έρευνα σε αυτό το θέμα.', 'it': "L'analisi sintattica delle dipendenze è un compito importante nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. L'analisi delle dipendenze non monitorata mira a imparare un parser di dipendenze da frasi che non hanno annotazione dei loro alberi di analisi corretti. Nonostante la sua difficoltà, l'analisi non supervisionata è una direzione di ricerca interessante a causa della sua capacità di utilizzare dati testuali quasi illimitati. Serve anche come base per altre ricerche nell'analisi a basso contenuto di risorse. In questo articolo, analizziamo gli approcci esistenti all'analisi delle dipendenze non supervisionata, identifichiamo due principali classi di approcci e discutiamo le tendenze recenti. Speriamo che il nostro sondaggio possa fornire approfondimenti ai ricercatori e facilitare la ricerca futura su questo argomento.", 'kk': 'Синтактикалық тәуелдік талдау - табиғи тілді өңдеу үшін маңызды тапсырма. Қолданбаған тәуелдік талдау мақсаты, дұрыс талдау ағаштарының мәліметі жоқ сөздерден тәуелдік талдаушысын үйрену үшін. Бұл қиындығына қарамастан, талдауға мүмкіндік бермеген мәтін деректерін қолдануға мүмкіндік беру үшін қызықты зерттеу бағыты. Сонымен қатар, басқа ресурстарды талдау үшін зерттеу негізі болады. Бұл қағазда, біз бағаламаған тәуелдік талдау үшін бар жағдайларды зерттеп, екі негізгі жағдайларды анықтап, соңғы тенденцияларды талдап береміз. Біз зерттеушілер үшін түсініктер бере алады деп үміттенеміз. Бұл нақышта болашақ зерттеулерді көмектесетін деп үміттенеміз.', 'lt': 'Syntactic dependency parsing is an important task in natural language processing.  Neprižiūrimas priklausomybės analizavimas siekia išsiaiškinti priklausomybės analizatorių iš sakinių, kuriuose nenustatyta jų teisingų analizatorių medžių. Nepaisant sunkumų, nepastebimas analizavimas yra įdomi mokslinių tyrimų kryptis, nes jis gali panaudoti beveik neribotus nenotiruotus teksto duomenis. Jis taip pat yra pagrindas kitiems mažai išteklių analizuojantiems moksliniams tyrimams. Šiame dokumente apžvelgiame esamus požiūrius į nepastebimą priklausomybės analizę, nustatome dvi pagrindines metodų klases ir aptariame naujausias tendencijas. Tikimės, kad mūsų apklausa gali suteikti mokslo darbuotojams supratimą ir palengvinti būsimus mokslinius tyrimus šia tema.', 'mk': 'Истражувањето на синтактичката зависност е важна задача во природното обработување јазици. Ненадгледуваното анализирање на зависноста има за цел да научи анализирач на зависноста од реченици кои немаат анотација на нивните правилни анализирачки дрвја. И покрај нејзините тешкотии, ненадгледуваното анализирање е интересна насока за истражување поради нејзината способност да користи речиси неограничени незабележани текстови податоци. Исто така, служи како основа за други истражувања во анализирањето со ниски ресурси. Во овој документ, ги испитуваме постојните пристапи до ненадгледувано анализирање на зависноста, идентификуваме две главни класи на пристапи и разговараме за неодамнешните трендови. Се надеваме дека нашето истражување може да обезбеди информации за истражувачите и да го олесни идното истражување на оваа тема.', 'ms': 'Penghuraian dependensi sintaktik adalah tugas penting dalam pemprosesan bahasa alami. Penghuraian dependensi tidak diawasi bermaksud untuk belajar penghuraian dependensi dari kalimat yang tidak mempunyai anotasi pokok huraian yang betul mereka. Walaupun kesulitan, penghuraian tidak diawasi adalah arah kajian yang menarik kerana kemampuannya untuk menggunakan data teks hampir tidak terbatas tanpa tanda. Ia juga berkhidmat sebagai dasar untuk kajian lain dalam penghuraian sumber rendah. Dalam kertas ini, kami survei pendekatan yang wujud untuk penghuraian dependensi tanpa diawasi, mengenalpasti dua kelas utama pendekatan, dan membincangkan trends baru-baru ini. Kami berharap penyelidikan kami boleh memberikan pandangan untuk penyelidikan dan memudahkan penyelidikan masa depan mengenai topik ini.', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്ടിക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയജോലിയാണ്. നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ആശ്രയിച്ച പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഒരു ആശ്രയിച്ച വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു.  അതിന്റെ പ്രയാസമുണ്ടെങ്കിലും സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് ഒരു ആശ്വാസകരമായ പഠിപ്പിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള വഴിയാണ്. അതിന കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d മറ്റു പഠനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായി അത് സേവിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സൂക്ഷ്മതയില്ലാത്ത ആശ്രയം പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നാം നിലവിലുള്ള വഴികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, രണ്ട് പ്ര ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉള്\u200dക്കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുമെന്നും, ഭാവിയായ വിഷയം നി', 'mt': "L-analiżi tad-dipendenza sintattika hija kompitu importanti fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Unsupervised dependency parsing aims to learn a dependency parser from sentences that have no annotation of their correct parse trees.  Minkejja d-diffikultà tagħha, l-analiżi mhux sorveljata hija direzzjoni interessanti tar-riċerka minħabba l-kapaċità tagħha li tuża data tat-test kważi illimitata mhux innotata. Dan iservi wkoll bħala l-bażi għal riċerka oħra fl-analiżi ta’ riżorsi baxxi. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nistħarrġu l-approċċi eżistenti għall-analiżi tad-dipendenza mhux sorveljata, nidentifikaw żewġ klassijiet ewlenin ta’ approċċi, u niddiskutu x-xejriet reċenti. Nittamaw li l-istħarriġ tagħna jista' jipprovdi għarfien għar-riċerkaturi u jiffaċilita r-riċerka futura dwar dan is-suġġett.", 'no': 'Analysering av syntaksiske avhengighet er ein viktig oppgåve i naturspråk. Å tolka uavhengige avhengighet måtar å læra ein avhengighetsanalyser frå setningar som ikkje har noko merking på dei rette tolkingstene sine. Til tross vanskeligheten er ikkje oppretta tolking eit interessant forskningsretning på grunn av at det kan bruka nesten uanngrensa tekstdata. Det gjev også som grunnlag for andre forskning i låg ressurstolking. I denne papiret undersøker vi eksisterande tilnærmingar til å analysera uavhengige avhengighet, identifisera to hovudklasser av tilnærmingar, og diskutera siste trender. Vi håper at undersøkinga vårt kan gjere innsyningar for forskere og gjere framtidige forskning på dette emnet.', 'hu': 'A szintaktikus függőség elemzése fontos feladat a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában. A felügyeletlen függőség elemzése célja, hogy megtanuljon egy függőség elemzőt olyan mondatokból, amelyek nem tartalmazzák a megfelelő elemzési fákat. Nehézsége ellenére a felügyelet nélküli elemzés érdekes kutatási irány, mivel képes szinte korlátlan, jelöletlen szövegadatokat használni. Az alacsony erőforrásokat igénylő elemzés egyéb kutatásainak alapjául szolgál. Ebben a tanulmányban felmérjük a felügyelet nélküli függőség elemzésének meglévő megközelítéseit, azonosítjuk a megközelítések két fő osztályát, és megvitatjuk a legutóbbi trendeket. Reméljük, hogy felmérésünk betekintést nyújthat a kutatók számára, és megkönnyíti a jövőbeli kutatást ezen a témán.', 'mn': 'Синтактикийн хамааралтай хуваалцах нь байгалийн хэл процессийн чухал ажил юм. Гэвч тэдний зөв хуваалцах модоос харуулж чадахгүй өгүүлбэрээс хамааралтай хуваалцагч сурах зорилго юм. Гэвч хэцүү байсан ч, хэлэлцэхгүй хуваалцах нь хамгийн сонирхолтой судалгааны замаар юм. Ямар ч хязгааргүй бичил мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой болсон. Энэ нь бас бага боловсролын шинжилгээний өөр судалгааны суурь юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид суурилсан арга барилгуудыг судалж, хамааралгүй хамааралтай хуваалцах, хоёр чухал арга барилгуудыг тодорхойлж, сүүлийн тенденцийг ярилцдаг. Бид судалгаагаа судлаачидд ойлголт өгч ирээдүйн судалгааны тухай туслах боломжтой гэж найдаж байна.', 'pl': 'Syntaktyczne parsowanie zależności jest ważnym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Niemonitorowane parsowanie zależności ma na celu nauczenie się parsera zależności ze zdań, które nie mają adnotacji właściwych drzew parsowania. Pomimo trudności parsowanie bez nadzoru jest interesującym kierunkiem badań ze względu na możliwość wykorzystania niemal nieograniczonych niezapisanych danych tekstowych. Służy również jako podstawa dla innych badań w dziedzinie parsowania niskich zasobów. W niniejszym artykule badamy istniejące podejścia do analizy zależności bez nadzoru, identyfikujemy dwie główne klasy podejść i omówimy najnowsze trendy. Mamy nadzieję, że nasza ankieta może dostarczyć informacji dla naukowców i ułatwić przyszłe badania nad tym tematem.', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependenței sintactice este o sarcină importantă în procesarea limbajului natural. Analizarea dependențelor nesupravegheată își propune să învețe un parser de dependență din propoziții care nu au adnotări ale arborilor lor corecti de parsare. În ciuda dificultății sale, analizarea nesupravegheată este o direcție interesantă de cercetare datorită capacității sale de a utiliza date text aproape nelimitate neanotate. De asemenea, servește ca bază pentru alte cercetări în analizarea cu resurse reduse. În această lucrare, analizăm abordările existente ale analizării dependenței nesupravegheate, identificăm două clase majore de abordări și discutăm tendințele recente. Sperăm că sondajul nostru poate oferi informații cercetătorilor și să faciliteze cercetările viitoare pe acest subiect.', 'sr': 'Analiza sintaktičke zavisnosti je važan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Neobezbeđeno analiziranje zavisnosti cilja je naučiti analiziranje zavisnosti iz rečenica koje nemaju annotaciju njihovih pravih analiziranih drveća. Uprkos svojim teškoćima, neodređeno analiziranje je zanimljiv istraživački smjer zbog njegove sposobnosti da iskoristi skoro neograničene neograničene tekstske podatke. To takođe služi kao osnova za druge istraživanja u analiziranju niskih resursa. U ovom papiru istražujemo postojeće pristupe analiziranju neodređene zavisnosti, identificiramo dve glavne klase pristupa i razgovaramo o nedavnim trendovima. Nadamo se da naše istraživanje može pružiti uvid istraživačima i olakšati buduće istraživanje o ovoj temi.', 'so': 'Baarshaha isku xirnaanta ee Sintaktika waa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah. Jardiiska ku xirnaanta la’aanta ah waxaa loola jeedaa in lagu barto baaritaanka ku xiran, taasoo aan sharaf ku lahayn geedahooda saxda ah. Despite its difficulty, unsupervised parsing is an interesting research direction because of its capability of utilizing almost unlimited unannotated text data.  Waxay sidoo kale u adeegtaa waxbarasho kale oo ku qoran jardiinada hoose-nololeed. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa meelaha ay jiraan oo aan la ilaalinayn baarlamaanka ku xirnaanta, waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa laba fasax oo waaweyn oo soo socoshada, waxaana kala sheekeysanaynaa waddooyinka ugu dambeeyay. Waxaan rajaynaynaa in baaritaankeenu ay muujin karto waxyaabaha baaritaanka iyo in uu fududeeyo baaritaanka mustaqbalka ee arimahan.', 'si': 'සංවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණයේ වැදගත් වැඩක්. අපරිශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න අදහස් කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ හරි විශ්වාස කළු වර්ගයක් නැති විශ්වාසිත ව ඒක ගොඩක් අමාරුවක් තිබුනා නමුත්, විශ්ලේෂණයක් නැති විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විසින් විශ්වාස කරන්න ඒකෙන් අනිත් පරීක්ෂණාව අඩු සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණයේ අනිත් පරීක්ෂණාව විශ්වාස කරනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විශ්වාස නැති විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා, ප්\u200dරධාන පත්තර දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, අලුත් වි අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂකයන්ට පරීක්ෂණයක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා මේ විදියට අනාගත', 'sv': 'Syntaktisk beroendetolkning är en viktig uppgift i bearbetningen av naturligt språk. Oserverad beroendetolkning syftar till att lära sig en beroendetolkning från meningar som inte har någon anteckning av sina korrekta tolkningsträd. Trots svårigheten är oövervakad tolkning en intressant forskningsriktning på grund av dess förmåga att använda nästan obegränsat oanmälda textdata. Den fungerar också som grund för annan forskning inom lågresurstolkning. I denna uppsats undersöker vi befintliga tillvägagångssätt för obevakad beroendeanalys, identifierar två huvudklasser av tillvägagångssätt och diskuterar senaste trender. Vi hoppas att vår enkät kan ge forskare insikter och underlätta framtida forskning inom detta ämne.', 'ta': 'ஒத்திசைவு சார்ந்த சார்பு பாசிடு இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் முக்கியமான செயல். கண்காணிக்கப்படாத சார்பு பாடல் சார்பு வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து ஒரு சார்பு விளக்கம் கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும். தங்கள் சரி அதன் கடினமாக இருந்தாலும், காப்பாற்றப்படாத பாடல் ஒரு சுவாரஸ்யமான ஆராய்ச்சி திசை அது குறைந்த மூலத்தை பாடலில் மற்ற ஆராய்ச்சியின் அடிப்படையாக சேவைக்கிறது. In this paper, we survey existing approaches to unsupervised dependency parsing, identify two major classes of approaches, and discuss recent trends.  நாங்கள் நம்முடைய ஆய்வு ஆராய்ச்சிகளுக்கு உணர்வு அளிக்க முடியும் என்று நம்புகிறோம் மற்றும் இந்த தலைப்ப', 'ur': 'سینٹکتیک اعتمادی پارسینگ طبیعی زبان پرسس میں ایک اہم کام ہے۔ غیر قابل تعلقات پارسینگ کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ کلمات سے ایک وابستگی پارسینٹر کو سیکھنا چاہے جو ان کے درست پارسینٹ درختوں کا کوئی اظہار نہیں رکھتا۔ اس کی مشکل کے باوجود، غیر قابل تحقیقات کی طرف سے ایک جالب تحقیقات کی طرف سے ہے، اس کی استعمال کی وجہ سے تقریباً غیر قابل تحقیقات کے متعلق ہے. یہ نیچے کم رسورس پارسینگ میں دوسری تحقیقات کا بنیاد ہے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں موجود طریقوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو غیر قابل تحقیق کرنے کے لئے موجود ہیں، دو بڑے طریقوں کا معلوم کریں، اور اچھی طریقوں سے بحث کریں۔ ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ ہماری تحقیقات پھیرنے والوں کے لئے بصیرت پیدا کر سکتی ہے اور اس موضوع پر مستقبل تحقیقات آسان کر سکتی ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info @ info @ info: whatsthis Шунингдек, у камбағал манбаъ парламент таркибида бошқа тадвирларнинг асосий сифатида бажарилади. Bu qogʻozda, biz saqlash muvaffaqiyatli qo'llanmagan qo'llanmagan usullarni o'rganamiz, ikkita muhim darajalarni aniqlash, va yaqinda ko'proq holatlarni javob beramiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, bu mavzuda qidiruvchimiz o'qituvchilarga ko'rinishimiz va kelajak o'qituvchilarni foydalanishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phân tích phụ thuộc cú pháp là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tên phân tích phụ thuộc không giám sát nhằm học được một cha xứ phụ thuộc từ câu nói không có ghi chú về cây cha đúng của họ. Mặc dù khó khăn, phân tích không giám sát là một hướng nghiên cứu thú vị vì khả năng sử dụng dữ liệu văn bản không ghi chú gần như không giới hạn. Nó cũng là nền tảng cho những nghiên cứu khác về phân tích ít tài nguyên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các phương pháp xử lý phụ thuộc không giám sát, xác định hai lớp lớn các phương pháp, và thảo luận các xu hướng gần đây. Chúng tôi hy vọng cuộc khảo sát của chúng tôi có thể cung cấp cho nhà nghiên cứu và giúp nghiên cứu tương lai về vấn đề này.', 'bg': 'Анализирането на синтактичната зависимост е важна задача в обработката на естествения език. Неконтролираното анализиране на зависимости цели да научи анализатор на зависимости от изречения, които нямат анотация на правилните им дървета за анализиране. Въпреки трудностите си, ненадзорният анализ е интересна насока на изследванията поради способността си да използва почти неограничени неописани текстови данни. Той служи и като основа за други изследвания в анализа с ниски ресурси. В тази статия изследваме съществуващите подходи за анализ на зависимостта без надзор, идентифицираме два основни класа подходи и обсъждаме последните тенденции. Надяваме се, че нашето проучване може да предостави информация за изследователите и да улесни бъдещите изследвания по тази тема.', 'da': 'Syntaktisk afhængighedsanalyse er en vigtig opgave i naturlig sprogbehandling. Uovervåget afhængighedsanalyse har til formål at lære en afhængighedsfortolker fra sætninger, der ikke har nogen notering af deres korrekte parsetræer. På trods af dets vanskeligheder er uovervåget parsing en interessant forskningsretning på grund af dens evne til at udnytte næsten ubegrænsede uannoterede tekstdata. Det tjener også som grundlag for anden forskning i lav ressource parsing. I denne artikel undersøger vi eksisterende tilgange til uautoriseret afhængighedsanalyse, identificerer to hovedklasser af tilgange og diskuterer seneste tendenser. Vi håber, at vores undersøgelse kan give forskere indsigt og lette fremtidig forskning om dette emne.', 'nl': 'Syntactische afhankelijkheidsparsing is een belangrijke taak in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Onbewaakte afhankelijkheidsparsing heeft als doel een afhankelijkheidsparser te leren van zinnen die geen annotatie hebben van hun correcte parse bomen. Ondanks de moeilijkheid van het parsen zonder toezicht is een interessante onderzoeksrichting vanwege de mogelijkheid om bijna onbeperkt ongenoteerde tekstgegevens te gebruiken. Het dient ook als basis voor ander onderzoek naar low-resource parsing. In dit artikel onderzoeken we bestaande benaderingen voor onbeheerde afhankelijkheidsparsing, identificeren we twee belangrijke klassen van benaderingen en bespreken we recente trends. We hopen dat onze enquête inzichten kan opleveren voor onderzoekers en toekomstig onderzoek naar dit onderwerp kan faciliteren.', 'de': 'Syntaktisches Dependency Parsing ist eine wichtige Aufgabe in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Unsupervised Dependency Parsing zielt darauf ab, einen Dependency Parser aus Sätzen zu lernen, die keine Annotation ihrer korrekten Parse Bäume haben. Trotz seiner Schwierigkeit ist das unüberwachte Parsen eine interessante Forschungsrichtung, da es nahezu unbegrenzte, nicht notierte Textdaten nutzen kann. Sie dient auch als Grundlage für andere Forschungen im ressourcenarmen Parsing. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir bestehende Ansätze zum unüberwachten Dependency Parsing, identifizieren zwei Hauptklassen von Ansätzen und diskutieren aktuelle Trends. Wir hoffen, dass unsere Umfrage Erkenntnisse für Forscher liefern und zukünftige Forschung zu diesem Thema erleichtern kann.', 'ko': '문법 의존 분석은 자연 언어 처리의 중요한 임무이다.무감독 의존 해석은 트리 주석을 정확하게 해석하지 않은 문장에서 의존 해석기를 배우기 위한 것이다.비록 어려움이 존재하지만 무감독 문법 분석은 흥미로운 연구 방향이다. 왜냐하면 거의 무한한 주석되지 않은 텍스트 데이터를 이용할 수 있기 때문이다.그것 또한 다른 저자원 해석 연구에 기반을 다졌다.본고에서 우리는 기존의 무감독 의존 해석 방법을 조사하고 두 가지 방법을 확정하며 최근의 추세를 토론했다.우리는 우리의 조사가 연구원들에게 견해를 제공하고 이 주제의 미래 연구를 추진할 수 있기를 바란다.', 'id': 'Analisasi dependensi sintaktik adalah tugas penting dalam proses bahasa alami. Penghuraian dependensi tidak diawasi bermaksud untuk belajar penghuraian dependensi dari kalimat yang tidak memiliki anotasi dari pepohonan penghuraian yang benar. Meskipun kesulitan, penghuraian tidak diawasi adalah arah penelitian yang menarik karena kemampuannya untuk menggunakan data teks hampir tak terbatas tanpa tanda. Ini juga layak sebagai dasar untuk penelitian lain dalam penghuraian sumber daya rendah. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengawasi pendekatan yang ada untuk pemeriksaan dependensi yang tidak diawasi, mengidentifikasi dua kelas utama pendekatan, dan mendiskusikan trends baru-baru ini. Kami berharap survei kami dapat memberikan penglihatan untuk peneliti dan memudahkan penelitian masa depan pada topik ini.', 'sw': 'Kutegemea kwa msaada ni kazi muhimu katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Kutegemea bunge hilo la kutegemea lengo la kujifunza mchambuzi wa kutegemea kutoka kwenye sentensi ambazo hazina taarifa za miti yao sahihi. Pamoja na matatizo yake, ubaguzi usioelewekwa ni mwelekeo wa utafiti wa kuvutia kwa sababu ya uwezo wake wa kutumia takwimu zisizo na mipaka. Pia inahudumia kama msingi wa utafiti mwingine katika mazungumzo ya rasilimali duni. Katika gazeti hili, tunachunguza mbinu zilizopo za kuendelea kuendelea kutegemea kutegemea, kutambua darasa mbili kubwa la mitazamo, na kujadili mwenendo wa hivi karibuni. Tunatumaini kwamba utafiti wetu unaweza kutoa ufahamu wa watafiti na kusaidia utafiti wa baadaye juu ya mada hii.', 'tr': 'Sentaktik baglançylyk ayırmak tebigy dil işlemesinde wajyp täze bir buýrukdur. Mazmunlanmadyk baglanylyk parslamasynyň amasyny sözleriň dogry parslama agaçlarynyň täzeliklerini ýok bir syýasatçysyny öwrenmek üçin gözlenýär. kynçylyka ýöne, tassyklanmadyk ahyrlamak üçin bilinmedik metin maglumatyny ulanyp biljek üçin gyzykly bir araştyrma yöntemidir. Bu ýerde iň az resurslar analyzasynda başga araştyrmalar üçin esasy däldir. Bu kagyzda, suytalanmaýan baglanylyk aýlamak üçin mevcut golaýlary maslahat edýäris, iki esasy golaýlary tanyýarys we soňky täzeliklerden habarlaşýarys. Araştyrymyzyň barlagynyň ylgamanlar üçin düşünjeleri saýlap biler we gelejekde bu tema barlagyny kömek edip biler diýip umyt edýäris.', 'hr': 'Analiza sintaktičke zavisnosti je važan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Neodobreno analiziranje zavisnosti cilja je naučiti analiziranje zavisnosti iz rečenica koje nemaju annotaciju njihovih pravih analiziranih drveća. Unatoč njenoj teškoći, neodređeno analiziranje je zanimljiv pravac istraživanja zbog mogućnosti upotrebe skoro neograničenih neograničenih tekstskih podataka. To također služi kao osnovu drugih istraživanja u razmatranju niskih resursa. U ovom papiru istražujemo postojeće pristupe analiziranju neovisne zavisnosti, identificiramo dvije glavne klase pristupa i razgovaramo o nedavnim trendovima. Nadamo se da naše istraživanje može pružiti uvid istraživačima i olakšati buduće istraživanje o ovoj temi.', 'sq': 'Analizimi i varësisë sintaktike është një detyrë e rëndësishme në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Analizimi i pavarësisë së mbikqyrur synon të mësojë një analizues të varësisë nga fjalët që nuk kanë asnjë anotacion të pemëve të tyre të analizuara të sakta. Megjithë vështirësinë e saj, analiza e pazgjidhur është një drejtim kërkimor interesant për shkak të aftësisë së saj për përdorimin e të dhënave të pakufizuara të tekstit. It also serves as the basis for other research in low-resource parsing.  Në këtë letër, ne vëzhgojmë qasjet ekzistuese për analizimin e varësisë pa mbikqyrje, identifikojmë dy klasa të mëdha të qasjeve dhe diskutojmë prirjet e fundit. Shpresojmë se sondazhi ynë mund të ofrojë kuptime për kërkuesit dhe të lehtësojë kërkimin e ardhshëm mbi këtë temë.', 'am': 'Syntactic dependency parsing is an important task in natural language processing.  በተጠበቀው የፓርስ ዛፎቻቸው ማስታወቂያ የሌላቸው ቃላት ተሟጋቾችን ለመማር የሚችል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ችግር ቢኖርበት፣ ያልጠበቀው ማጋራት የተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም ስልጣን በመቻል የተጠቃሚ ምርመራ መንገድ ነው፡፡ በዋይኛው ክፍለ ክፍል ማኅበረሰብ ውስጥ ሌሎችን ትምህርት መሠረት ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የማይጠበቀው የአደጋጋጋሚ ማኅበረሰብ የመግቢያ ደረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ምርመራዎቻችን ለምርመራዎች ማስታወቂያዎችን እንዲሰጥ እና በዚህ ጉዳይ ላይ የመጨረሻውን ምርመራ እንዲያገኝ ተስፋ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սինտակտիկ կախվածության վերլուծումը շատ կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերլուծում: Unsupervised dependency parsing aims to learn a dependency parser from sentences that have no annotation of their correct parse trees.  Չնայած դրա դժվարությանը, անվերահսկված վերլուծությունը հետազոտության հետաքրքիր ուղղություն է, քանի որ այն ունակ է օգտագործել գրեթե անսահմանափակ աննոտացված տեքստի տվյալներ: Այն նաև ծառայում է որպես հիմք ցածր ռեսուրսների վերլուծության այլ հետազոտությունների համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները անվերահսկված կախվածության վերլուծում, հայտնաբերում ենք երկու հիմնական մոտեցումների դասերը և քննարկում ենք վերջին միտումները: Մենք հույս ունենք, որ մեր հետազոտությունը կարող է ներկայացնել հետազոտողներին և հեշտացնել ապագա հետազոտությունը այս թեմայի վրա:', 'az': 'Sintaktik bağlılıq ayırması təbiətli dil işləməsində möhüm bir işdir. Tərəflənmədən bağlılıq ayırılması məqsədilə düzgün ayırılma a ğaclarının işareti olmayan cümlələrdən bağlılıq ayırıcısını öyrənmək istəyir. Çətinliklərinə baxmayaraq, müəyyən edilməyən ayırma məlumatlarını müəyyən etməyən məlumat məlumatlarını istifadə etməyə mümkün olduğu üçün ilginç bir araştırma yöntemidir. Bu həmçin in düşük ressurs ayırılmasında başqa araştırmaların əsası olar. Bu kağızda, müəyyən edilməmiş bağımlılıq ayırılması üçün, iki böyük tərəfləri tanıyır və son tərəfləri mübahisə edirik. Bizim araştırmalarımızın araştırmalarına nəzər verəcəyini və bu məsələdə gələcək araştırmalarını asanlaşdıracağını ümid edirik.', 'bn': 'সিন্ট্যাকটিক নির্ভর পার্সিং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। নির্ভর করা নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে বাক্য থেকে নির্ভরিত বিশ্লেষক শিখার যা তাদের সঠিক পার্স গাছের বির তার সমস্যা সত্ত্বেও অরক্ষিত পার্সিং একটি মজার গবেষণার দিক কারণ তার ক্ষমতা প্রায় অসীমিত টেক্সট ডাটা ব্যবহার করার ক্ষমতা। এটি নীচের সম্পদ পার্জিং এ অন্যান্য গবেষণার ভিত্তিতে সার্ভিস করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিদ্যমান উপায় পর্যবেক্ষণ করছি অরক্ষিত নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং এর জন্য, দুটি প্রধান ক্লাসের চিহ্নিত করা এবং সাম্প্রতিক ধা আমরা আশা করি আমাদের জরিপে গবেষকদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করতে পারে এবং ভবিষ্যৎ এই বিষয়ে গবেষণা সহায়তা করতে পারে।', 'af': "Sintaktieke afhanklikheid verwerking is 'n belangrike taak in natuurlike taal verwerking. Onondersoekte afhanklikheid verwerking doel om 'n afhanklikheidspanser te leer van teikens wat geen annotasie van hul korrekte verwerking bome het nie. Onthou sy moeilikheid is onverondersteunde verwerking 'n interessante verwerking rigting vanweë sy kapasiteit om amper onbeperkte teks data te gebruik. Dit dien ook as die basis vir ander ondersoek in lae hulpbron verwerking. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons bestaande toegang tot onverondersteunde afhanklikheidverwerking, identifiseer twee groot klasse van toegang en bespreek onlangse trende. Ons hoop dat ons ondersoek kan ondersoek vir ondersoekers verskaf en toekomstige ondersoek op hierdie onderwerp faciliteer.", 'ca': "L'analització de la dependencia sintàtica és una tasca important en el processament natural de llenguatges. L'analització de dependencies no supervisada té l'objectiu d'aprendre un analitzador de dependencies a partir de frases que no tenen anotació dels seus arbres correctes. Malgrat la seva dificultat, l'analització sense supervisió és una direcció interessant de recerca a causa de la seva capacitat d'utilitzar dades de text gairebé ilimitades sense notar. També serveix de base per altres recerca en l'analització de baixos recursos. En aquest paper, estudiem els enfocaments existents en l'analització de la dependencia sense supervisió, identificem dues classes importants d'enfocaments i discutem tendències recents. Esperem que el nostre estudi pugui proporcionar informació als investigadors i facilitar la recerca futura sobre aquest tema.", 'cs': 'Syntaktická analýza závislosti je důležitým úkolem při zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Nekontrolovaná analýza závislostí má za cíl naučit se parser závislostí z vět, které nemají žádnou anotaci svých správných parse stromů. Navzdory své obtížnosti je bez dohledu parsování zajímavým směrem výzkumu kvůli své schopnosti využít téměř neomezené nezapsané textové data. Slouží také jako základ pro další výzkum v oblasti analýzy nízkých zdrojů. V tomto článku zkoumáme stávající přístupy k analýze závislosti bez dohledu, identifikujeme dvě hlavní třídy přístupů a diskutujeme nedávné trendy. Doufáme, že náš průzkum může poskytnout informace pro výzkumné pracovníky a usnadnit budoucí výzkum na toto téma.', 'et': 'Süntaktiline sõltuvuse parsimine on oluline ülesanne looduskeele töötlemisel. Järelevalveta sõltuvuste parsimise eesmärk on õppida sõltuvuste parsimist lausetest, millel puudub nende õigete parsimispuude märkus. Vaatamata raskustele on järelevalveta parsimine huvitav uurimissuund, kuna võime kasutada peaaegu piiramatut märkimata tekstiandmeid. Samuti on see aluseks muudele vähese ressursiga parsimise uuringutele. Käesolevas dokumendis uurime olemasolevaid lähenemisviise järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimisele, selgitame välja kaks peamist klassi lähenemisviise ja arutame hiljutisi suundumusi. Loodame, et meie uuring annab teadlastele teadmisi ja hõlbustab edasisi uuringuid sellel teemal.', 'fa': 'تقسیم بستگی سنتاکتیک یک کار مهم در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. ویرایش بستگی غیرقابل تحقیق هدف است که یک ویرایشگر بستگی از جمله\u200cها را یاد بگیرد که هیچ آگاهی از درختهای ویرایشگری درست آنها ندارد. با وجود مشکلاتش، تقسیم ناپذیری یک مسیر تحقیقات جالبی است به دلیل توانایی آن استفاده از داده های متن غیر محدود است. این همچنین به عنوان بنیادی برای تحقیقات دیگر در بررسی منابع کم خدمت می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما روش\u200cهایی موجود برای تجزیه کردن بستگی ناپایدار تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، دو کلاس بزرگ از نزدیک\u200cها را شناسایی می\u200cکنیم، و در مورد ترند\u200cهای اخیر بحث می\u200cکنیم. امیدواریم تحقیقات ما بتواند برای تحقیقات کنندگان مشاهده دهد و تحقیقات آینده را در این موضوع آسان کند.', 'fi': 'Syntaktinen riippuvuuden jäsentäminen on tärkeä tehtävä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Valvontattomalla riippuvuuden jäsentämisellä pyritään oppimaan riippuvuuden jäsentäjä lauseista, joissa ei ole merkintöjä oikeista jäsennyspuista. Vaikeudestaan huolimatta valvomaton jäsentäminen on mielenkiintoinen tutkimussuunta, koska se pystyy hyödyntämään lähes rajattomasti merkitsemätöntä tekstitietoa. Se toimii myös pohjana muulle tutkimukselle vähävaraisessa jäsentämisessä. Tässä artikkelissa kartoitamme olemassa olevia lähestymistapoja valvomattomaan riippuvuuden analysointiin, tunnistamme kaksi keskeistä lähestymistapaa ja keskustelemme viimeaikaisista suuntauksista. Toivomme, että kyselytutkimuksemme voi tarjota tutkijoille oivalluksia ja helpottaa tulevaa tutkimusta aiheesta.', 'bs': 'Analiza sintaktičke zavisnosti je važan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Neodređeno analiziranje zavisnosti cilja je naučiti analiziranje zavisnosti iz rečenica koje nemaju annotaciju njihovih pravih analiziranih drveća. Uprkos svojim poteškoćama, neodređeno analiziranje je zanimljiv pravac istraživanja zbog mogućnosti iskoristiti skoro neograničene tekstne podatke. To takođe služi kao osnova drugih istraživanja u analiziranju niskih resursa. U ovom papiru, istražujemo postojeće pristupe analiziranju neovisne zavisnosti, identificiramo dvije glavne klase pristupa i razgovaramo o nedavnim trendovima. Nadamo se da naše istraživanje može pružiti uvid istraživačima i olakšati buduće istraživanje o ovoj temi.', 'he': 'בדיקת תלויות סינטקטית היא משימה חשובה בעבודת שפת טבעית. מחקר תלויות ללא השגחה מטרה ללמוד מחקר תלויות משפטים שאין להם הערות על עצי מחקר הנכונים שלהם. למרות הקשה שלה, בדיקות ללא השגחה היא כיוון מחקר מעניין בגלל היכולת שלה להשתמש במידע טקסט כמעט ללא מוגבל. זה גם משמש כבסיס למחקר אחר בהעברת משאבים נמוכים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו סוקרים גישות קיימות לאבחן התלויות ללא השגחה, מזהה שתי כיסויות גדולות של גישות, ודון על הטנדציות האחרונות. We hope that our survey can provide insights for researchers and facilitate future research on this topic.', 'sk': 'Analiziranje sintetične odvisnosti je pomembna naloga pri obdelavi naravnega jezika. Namen nenadzorovanega razčlenjevanja odvisnosti je učiti razčlenjevalnik odvisnosti iz stavkov, ki nimajo opomb na njihova pravilna drevesa razčlenjevanja. Kljub težavnosti je nenadzorovano razčlenjevanje zanimiva raziskovalna smer zaradi sposobnosti uporabe skoraj neomejenih neomejenih besedilnih podatkov. Prav tako služi kot podlaga za druge raziskave na področju razčlenitve z nizkimi viri. V prispevku pregledujemo obstoječe pristope k nenadzorovanem razčlenitvi odvisnosti, opredelimo dva glavna skupina pristopov in razpravljamo o najnovejših trendih. Upamo, da lahko naša raziskava zagotovi vpogled raziskovalcem in olajša prihodnje raziskave na to temo.', 'ha': "QXml QRegExp Babu da haske, parse da ba'a tsare shi yana wata shirin fitina mai fasahar kwamfyuta da abincinsa ya yi amfani da nesta data na matsayin da ba'a tsare ba. Yana da amfani da matsayin mutane a cikin parci na wuri-wuri. Daga wannan takardan, Munã tambaya kowanta masu iya kai ga parsin da ba'a tsare da inganci ba, kuma munã gane fassarar biyu masu babban matsayi, kuma kuma mu yi jayayya da hanyõyi na ƙarshe. Tuna fatan kwatanka cewa misalinmu zai iya samar da gannai ga watani kuma yana da amfani da research masu yiwuwa a kan wannan madaidaici.", 'jv': 'Where am I marker politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness buddy Nang pepul iki, awake dhéwé ngerasakno dianggap kanggo ngilangno cara-cara sing gak nggawe barang nggawe gerakan, kelas dhéwé dianggap iki luwih apik lan nganggep petang langkung dianggap. Awak dhéwé ngerti punika dipunangé awak dhéwé iso nggawe barang urip kanggo nggawe barang kanggo urêhmu kanggo bisa bantêm iki.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་ཅིག རྩིས་མེད་ཐུབ་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མིན་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚིག་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ཞིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ དཀའ་ངལ་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟ་བུར་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཞིག་རེད། དེ་ནི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་འབྱུང་བའི་མི་རྐྱེན་ཁག་ལ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཟིན་བྲིས་མེད་པའི་རྟེན ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པར་བལྟ་ཞིབ་པ་ཚོར་བརྟག་པར་མཐོང་ཚུལ་དང་། མ་འོངས་པའི་མ་འོངས་བསྒྲགས'}
{'en': 'Exploring Question-Specific Rewards for Generating Deep Questions', 'ar': 'استكشاف المكافآت الخاصة بسؤال لتوليد أسئلة عميقة', 'es': 'Exploración de recompensas específicas para preguntas por generar preguntas profundas', 'pt': 'Explorando recompensas específicas de perguntas para gerar perguntas profundas', 'fr': 'Explorer les récompenses spécifiques aux questions pour générer des questions approfondies', 'ja': 'ディープクエスチョンを生成するための質問固有の報酬を探る', 'zh': '原特定之赏,以成深入', 'ru': 'Изучение вознаграждений по конкретным вопросам для генерации глубоких вопросов', 'hi': 'गहरे प्रश्न उत्पन्न करने के लिए प्रश्न-विशिष्ट पुरस्कारों की खोज', 'ga': 'Ag Iniúchadh Luaíochtaí Ceist-Shonracha as Ceisteanna Dearfacha a Ghiniúint', 'ka': 'კითხვა- სპეციფიკალური დამუშავება ძალიან კითხვების შექმნა', 'el': 'Εξερευνώντας ειδικές ανταμοιβές για τη δημιουργία βαθέων ερωτήσεων', 'hu': 'Kérdésspecifikus jutalmak feltárása mély kérdések generálásáért', 'kk': 'Қалыпты сұрақтарды құру үшін сұрақ- ерекше қайтару', 'mk': 'Истражување на наградите специфични за прашања за генерирање длабоки прашања', 'lt': 'Nagrinėti konkrečių klausimų atlygį už gilių klausimų sukūrimą', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള പ്രത്യേക വിവരം', 'it': 'Esplorare ricompense specifiche per la generazione di domande profonde', 'ms': 'Menjelaskan Hadiah Khusus soalan untuk Menjana soalan mendalam', 'no': 'Utforskar spørsmålspesifikske returnering for oppretting av dyppa spørsmål', 'mt': "L-esplorazzjoni ta' ħlasijiet speċifiċi għall-mistoqsijiet għall-ġenerazzjoni ta' mistoqsijiet profondi", 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий асуултууд бий болгоход асуулт-тодорхой хариултыг судалж байна.', 'pl': 'Odkrywanie konkretnych pytań nagród za generowanie głębokich pytań', 'ro': 'Explorarea recompenselor specifice întrebărilor pentru generarea de întrebări profunde', 'sr': 'Ispitivanje posebnih nagrada pitanja za stvaranje dubokih pitanja', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න- විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'so': 'Question-Specific Rewards for Generation Deep Questions', 'sv': 'Utforska frågespecifika belöningar för att skapa djupa frågor', 'ta': 'ஆழம் கேள்விகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கான கேள்வி குறிப்பிட்ட முன்னேறுதல்', 'ur': 'عمیق سؤال جوڑنے کے لئے سوال-خاص پاداش کا تحقیق کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Exploring Question-Specific Rewards for Generating Deep Questions', 'vi': 'Tìm hiểu về chương trình đặt câu hỏi đặc biệt', 'bg': 'Изследване на специфични за въпроси награди за генериране на дълбоки въпроси', 'da': 'Udforsk spørgsmålsspecifikke belønninger for at generere dybe spørgsmål', 'nl': 'Vraag-specifieke beloningen verkennen voor het genereren van diepe vragen', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje posebnih nagrada pitanja za stvaranje dubokih pitanja', 'fa': 'تحقیق پاداش\u200cهای مخصوص سوال برای تولید سوال عمیق', 'de': 'Fragenspezifische Belohnungen für die Generierung tiefgreifender Fragen erforschen', 'ko': '문제에 대한 특정한 보상을 탐색하여 심각한 문제를 발생시키다', 'sw': 'Kuelezea swali-Tafsiri kwa ajili ya Kutengeneza maswali ya kina', 'sq': 'Shqyrtimi i shpërblimeve specifike për pyetje për krijimin e pyetjeve të thella', 'id': 'Menjelaskan Hadiah Spesifik Pertanyaan untuk Menjana Pertanyaan Dalam', 'hy': 'Հարցերով հատուկ վարձի ուսումնասիրելը խորը հարցերի ստեղծման համար', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Derje soraglary جوşamak üçin soraglary takyklamak', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje posebnih nagrada pitanja za stvaranje dubokih pitanja', 'af': 'Voorskou Vrag- Spesifieke Herstelling vir Genereer Deep Vragate', 'az': 'Derin suallar yaratmaq üçün sual-xüsusi geri qaytarılır', 'cs': 'Průzkum odměn specifických pro otázky za generování hlubokých otázek', 'bn': 'গভীর প্রশ্ন তৈরি করার জন্য প্রশ্ন- নির্দিষ্ট প্রত্যাখ্যান করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Küsimuspetsiifiliste preemiate uurimine sügavate küsimuste tekitamise eest', 'fi': 'Kysymyskohtaisten palkkioiden tutkiminen syvällisten kysymysten luomisesta', 'ca': 'Explorar recompensas específices per a preguntes profundes', 'he': 'חקירת תשלומים מסויימים לשאלות על יצירת שאלות עמוקות', 'jv': 'deep', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje nagrad za posamezna vprašanja za ustvarjanje globokih vprašanj', 'bo': 'ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པར་འདྲི་ཞིབ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྗེས་གཞིའི་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བཞིན'}
{'en': 'Recent question generation (QG) approaches often utilize the sequence-to-sequence framework (Seq2Seq) to optimize the log likelihood of ground-truth questions using teacher forcing. However, this training objective is inconsistent with actual question quality, which is often reflected by certain global properties such as whether the question can be answered by the document. As such, we directly optimize for QG-specific objectives via reinforcement learning to improve question quality. We design three different rewards that target to improve the fluency, relevance, and answerability of generated questions. We conduct both automatic and human evaluations in addition to thorough analysis to explore the effect of each QG-specific reward. We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics. However, only the rewards that correlate well with human judgement (e.g., relevance) lead to real improvement in question quality. Optimizing for the others, especially answerability, introduces incorrect bias to the model, resulting in poorer question quality. The code is publicly available at https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تستخدم مناهج إنشاء الأسئلة (QG) الحديثة إطار عمل التسلسل إلى التسلسل (Seq2Seq) لتحسين احتمالية تسجيل أسئلة الحقيقة باستخدام إجبار المعلم. ومع ذلك ، فإن هدف التدريب هذا لا يتوافق مع جودة السؤال الفعلية ، والتي غالبًا ما تنعكس في بعض الخصائص العالمية مثل ما إذا كان يمكن الإجابة على السؤال من خلال المستند. على هذا النحو ، نقوم بتحسين الأهداف الخاصة بـ QG بشكل مباشر من خلال التعلم المعزز لتحسين جودة السؤال. نصمم ثلاث مكافآت مختلفة تهدف إلى تحسين طلاقة الأسئلة المطروحة ومدى ملاءمتها وإمكانية الإجابة عليها. نجري تقييمات تلقائية وبشرية بالإضافة إلى تحليل شامل لاستكشاف تأثير كل مكافأة خاصة بـ QG. وجدنا أن تحسين المكافآت الخاصة بسؤال محدد يؤدي عمومًا إلى أداء أفضل في مقاييس التقييم التلقائية. ومع ذلك ، فإن المكافآت التي ترتبط جيدًا بالحكم البشري (على سبيل المثال ، الملاءمة) تؤدي إلى تحسين حقيقي في جودة السؤال. يؤدي التحسين من أجل الآخرين ، وخاصة قابلية الإجابة ، إلى إدخال تحيز غير صحيح للنموذج ، مما يؤدي إلى ضعف جودة السؤال. الكود متاح للجمهور على https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'pt': 'As abordagens recentes de geração de perguntas (QG) geralmente utilizam a estrutura de sequência a sequência (Seq2Seq) para otimizar a probabilidade de log de perguntas verdadeiras usando o forçamento do professor. No entanto, esse objetivo de treinamento é inconsistente com a qualidade real da pergunta, que geralmente é refletida por certas propriedades globais, como se a pergunta pode ser respondida pelo documento. Como tal, otimizamos diretamente para objetivos específicos de QG por meio de aprendizado por reforço para melhorar a qualidade das perguntas. Projetamos três recompensas diferentes que visam melhorar a fluência, relevância e capacidade de resposta das perguntas geradas. Conduzimos avaliações automáticas e humanas, além de análises minuciosas para explorar o efeito de cada recompensa específica do QG. Descobrimos que otimizar em recompensas específicas de perguntas geralmente leva a um melhor desempenho nas métricas de avaliação automática. No entanto, apenas as recompensas que se correlacionam bem com o julgamento humano (por exemplo, relevância) levam a uma melhoria real na qualidade da pergunta. A otimização para os outros, especialmente a capacidade de resposta, introduz um viés incorreto no modelo, resultando em pior qualidade das perguntas. O código está disponível publicamente em https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'fr': "Les approches récentes de génération de questions (QG) utilisent souvent le cadre séquence-séquence (Seq2Seq) pour optimiser la probabilité logarithmique des questions de vérité de terrain en utilisant le forçage de l'enseignant. Cependant, cet objectif de formation est incompatible avec la qualité réelle de la question, qui est souvent reflétée par certaines propriétés globales, telles que la possibilité de répondre à la question par le document. En tant que tel, nous optimisons directement les objectifs spécifiques aux QG via l'apprentissage par renforcement afin d'améliorer la qualité des questions. Nous concevons trois récompenses différentes qui visent à améliorer la fluidité, la pertinence et la capacité de réponse aux questions générées. Nous effectuons des évaluations automatiques et humaines en plus d'une analyse approfondie afin d'explorer l'effet de chaque récompense spécifique au QG. Nous constatons que l'optimisation des récompenses spécifiques aux questions conduit généralement à de meilleures performances dans les mesures d'évaluation automatique. Cependant, seules les récompenses qui sont en corrélation avec le jugement humain (par exemple, la pertinence) conduisent à une réelle amélioration de la qualité des questions. L'optimisation pour les autres, en particulier la capacité de réponse, introduit un biais incorrect dans le modèle, ce qui entraîne une moindre qualité de question. Le code est accessible au public à l'adresse https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.", 'es': 'Los enfoques de generación de preguntas (QG) recientes a menudo utilizan el marco de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq) para optimizar la probabilidad de registro de preguntas de verdad fundamental mediante el uso de la fuerza del maestro. Sin embargo, este objetivo de capacitación es inconsistente con la calidad real de la pregunta, que a menudo se refleja en ciertas propiedades globales, como si la pregunta puede ser respondida por el documento. Como tal, optimizamos directamente los objetivos específicos de QG mediante el aprendizaje de refuerzo para mejorar la calidad de las preguntas. Diseñamos tres recompensas diferentes que tienen como objetivo mejorar la fluidez, la relevancia y la capacidad de respuesta de las preguntas generadas. Llevamos a cabo evaluaciones tanto automáticas como humanas, además de un análisis exhaustivo para explorar el efecto de cada recompensa específica de QG. Descubrimos que la optimización de las recompensas específicas de la pregunta generalmente conduce a un mejor rendimiento en las métricas de evaluación automática. Sin embargo, solo las recompensas que se correlacionan bien con el juicio humano (por ejemplo, la relevancia) conducen a una mejora real en la calidad de la pregunta. La optimización para los demás, especialmente la capacidad de respuesta, introduce un sesgo incorrecto en el modelo, lo que resulta en una peor calidad de las preguntas. El código está disponible públicamente en https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'hi': 'हाल ही में प्रश्न पीढ़ी (QG) दृष्टिकोण अक्सर अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ढांचे (Seq2Seq) का उपयोग करने के लिए शिक्षक मजबूर करने का उपयोग कर जमीन-सत्य प्रश्नों की लॉग संभावना को अनुकूलित करने के लिए करते हैं। हालांकि, यह प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य वास्तविक प्रश्न गुणवत्ता के साथ असंगत है, जो अक्सर कुछ वैश्विक गुणों द्वारा परिलक्षित होता है जैसे कि क्या प्रश्न का उत्तर दस्तावेज़ द्वारा दिया जा सकता है। जैसे, हम प्रश्न की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने के माध्यम से क्यूजी-विशिष्ट उद्देश्यों के लिए सीधे अनुकूलन करते हैं। हम तीन अलग-अलग पुरस्कारों को डिजाइन करते हैं जो उत्पन्न प्रश्नों के प्रवाह, प्रासंगिकता और उत्तरदेने में सुधार करने के लिए लक्षित करते हैं। हम प्रत्येक क्यूजी-विशिष्ट इनाम के प्रभाव का पता लगाने के लिए पूरी तरह से विश्लेषण के अलावा स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन दोनों का संचालन करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि प्रश्न-विशिष्ट पुरस्कारों पर अनुकूलन आमतौर पर स्वचालित मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक में बेहतर प्रदर्शन की ओर जाता है। हालांकि, केवल पुरस्कार जो मानव निर्णय (जैसे, प्रासंगिकता) के साथ अच्छी तरह से सहसंबंधित हैं, प्रश्न की गुणवत्ता में वास्तविक सुधार की ओर ले जाते हैं। दूसरों के लिए अनुकूलन, विशेष रूप से जवाबदेही, मॉडल के लिए गलत पूर्वाग्रह का परिचय देता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप खराब प्रश्न गुणवत्ता होती है। कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ja': '最近の質問生成（ Ｑ Ｇ ）アプローチは、多くの場合、シーケンスツーシーケンスフレームワーク（ Ｓｅｑ ２ Ｓｅｑ ）を利用して、教師の強制を使用して真実の質問の対数尤度を最適化する。 しかし、このトレーニングの目的は実際の質問の質と矛盾しており、ドキュメントによって質問に答えることができるかどうかなど、特定のグローバル特性によって反映されることがよくあります。 したがって、質問の質を向上させるために、強化学習を通じてQG固有の目標に直接最適化します。 私たちは、生成された質問の流暢性、関連性、および説明責任を向上させるために、3つの異なる報酬を設計します。 各QG固有の報酬の効果を探るための徹底的な分析に加えて、自動評価と人間評価の両方を行っています。 質問固有の報酬を最適化することは、一般的に自動評価指標のパフォーマンス向上につながることがわかります。 しかし、人間の判断（例えば、関連性）とうまく相関する報酬だけが、問題の質の実際の改善につながる。 他の人々のために最適化すること、特に回答可能性は、モデルに不正確なバイアスをもたらし、結果として質問の質が悪くなります。 コードはhttps://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generationで一般公開されています。', 'ru': 'Недавние подходы к формированию вопросов (QG) часто используют фреймворк последовательности к последовательности (Seq2Seq) для оптимизации логарифмической вероятности наземных вопросов с использованием принуждения учителя. Однако эта цель обучения несовместима с фактическим качеством вопроса, что часто находит отражение в определенных глобальных свойствах, таких как возможность ответа на вопрос в документе. Таким образом, мы напрямую оптимизируем для целей, специфичных для QG, посредством обучения подкреплению для улучшения качества вопросов. Мы планируем три различные награды, которые нацелены на повышение беглости, актуальности и ответчивости генерируемых вопросов. Мы проводим как автоматические, так и человеческие оценки в дополнение к тщательному анализу, чтобы исследовать эффект каждого вознаграждения, связанного с QG. Мы обнаружили, что оптимизация вознаграждений по конкретным вопросам, как правило, приводит к лучшей производительности в метриках автоматической оценки. Тем не менее, только вознаграждения, которые хорошо коррелируют с человеческим суждением (например, актуальность), приводят к реальному улучшению качества вопроса. Оптимизация для других, особенно ответственность, вносит неправильную предвзятость в модель, что приводит к снижению качества вопросов. Код доступен в открытом доступе по адресу https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'zh': '近问成(QG)常以序框架(Seq2Seq)优化以师强地实对数可也。 然所向与实异,此常形于性,文档可对也。 故学以直针QG特定优化,以崇其质。 设三异之赏,以崇所生之流畅性、相关性、可对之性。 穷理之外,自与人工评估,以探QG特定奖之效。 吾见特定之所奖优化常致自料指标之善。 然则人之所赏(,相关性)之所加也。 其他选项优化,尤可对性,引入邪正,以致变差。 其代码于 https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation 上公给之。', 'ga': 'Is minic a úsáideann cineálacha cur chuige giniúna ceisteanna le déanaí (QG) an creat seicheamh-go-seicheamh (Seq2Seq) chun an chosúlacht is fearr a bhaint as loga ceisteanna fhírinneachta ag baint úsáide as foréigean an mhúinteora. Mar sin féin, tá an cuspóir oiliúna seo ar neamhréir le cáilíocht iarbhír na gceist, rud a léirítear go minic ag airíonna domhanda áirithe, mar shampla an féidir an cheist a fhreagairt sa doiciméad. Mar sin, déanaimid barrfheabhsú díreach ar chuspóirí a bhaineann go sonrach le QG trí fhoghlaim athneartaithe chun cáilíocht na gceisteanna a fheabhsú. Dearaimid trí dhuais dhifriúla a dhíríonn ar líofacht, ábharthacht agus freagrúlacht ceisteanna ginte a fheabhsú. Déanaimid meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna araon chomh maith le hanailís críochnúil chun éifeacht gach luach saothair a bhaineann go sonrach le QG a iniúchadh. Faighimid amach go mbíonn feidhmíocht níos fearr i méadracht mheastóireachta uathoibríoch mar thoradh ar luach saothair a bhaineann go sonrach le ceisteanna a bharrfheabhsú. Mar sin féin, is iad na luach saothair a bhaineann go maith le breithiúnas an duine (m.sh. ábharthacht) as a dtagann fíorfheabhsú ar cháilíocht na gceisteanna. Má dhéantar barrfheabhsú ar na cinn eile, go háirithe freagracht, tugtar isteach an claonadh mícheart sa mhúnla, rud a fhágann go bhfuil cáilíocht na gceisteanna níos boichte. Tá an cód ar fáil go poiblí ag https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi kérdések generálásának (QG) megközelítése gyakran a szekvencia-szekvencia keretrendszert (Seq2Seq) használja, hogy optimalizálja a talaj-igazság kérdések log valószínűségét tanári erőltetéssel. Ez a képzési célkitűzés azonban nem áll összhangban a tényleges kérdésminőséggel, amelyet gyakran tükröznek bizonyos globális tulajdonságok, például, hogy a kérdésre a dokumentum válaszolhat-e. Ennek megfelelően közvetlenül optimalizáljuk a QG-specifikus célkitűzéseket a kérdések minőségének javítása érdekében. Három különböző jutalmat tervezünk, amelyek célja a létrehozott kérdések folyékonyságának, relevanciájának és megválaszolhatóságának javítása. Alapos elemzés mellett automatikus és emberi értékeléseket is végzünk, hogy feltárjuk az egyes QG-specifikus jutalmak hatását. Úgy találjuk, hogy a kérdésspecifikus jutalmak optimalizálása általában jobb teljesítményt eredményez az automatikus értékelési mutatók terén. Azonban csak az emberi ítélőképességgel jól összefüggő jutalmak (pl. relevancia) vezetnek a kérdéses minőség valódi javulásához. A többiek számára való optimalizálás, különösen a válaszolhatóság, helytelen elfogultságot vezet be a modell számára, ami rosszabb kérdésminőséget eredményez. A kód nyilvánosan hozzáférhető a következő címen: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'el': 'Οι πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων (QG) συχνά χρησιμοποιούν το πλαίσιο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας (Seq2Seq) για να βελτιστοποιήσουν την πιθανότητα καταγραφής ερωτήσεων βασικής αλήθειας χρησιμοποιώντας την επιβολή δασκάλων. Ωστόσο, αυτός ο στόχος εκπαίδευσης δεν συνάδει με την πραγματική ποιότητα των ερωτήσεων, η οποία συχνά αντικατοπτρίζεται από ορισμένες παγκόσμιες ιδιότητες, όπως το αν η ερώτηση μπορεί να απαντηθεί από το έγγραφο. Ως εκ τούτου, βελτιστοποιούμε άμεσα για συγκεκριμένους στόχους μέσω της εκμάθησης ενίσχυσης για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας των ερωτήσεων. Σχεδιάζουμε τρεις διαφορετικές ανταμοιβές που στοχεύουν στη βελτίωση της ευκρίνειας, της συνάφειας και της απάντησης των παραγόμενων ερωτήσεων. Πραγματοποιούμε τόσο αυτόματες όσο και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις εκτός από ενδελεχή ανάλυση για να διερευνήσουμε την επίδραση κάθε ανταμοιβής που σχετίζεται με το QG. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η βελτιστοποίηση των ανταμοιβών για συγκεκριμένες ερωτήσεις οδηγεί γενικά σε καλύτερη απόδοση στις αυτόματες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης. Ωστόσο, μόνο οι ανταμοιβές που συσχετίζονται καλά με την ανθρώπινη κρίση (π.χ. συνάφεια) οδηγούν σε πραγματική βελτίωση της ποιότητας των ερωτήσεων. Η βελτιστοποίηση για τους άλλους, ιδίως η υπευθυνότητα, εισάγει εσφαλμένη προκατάληψη στο μοντέλο, με αποτέλεσμα να μειωθεί η ποιότητα των ερωτήσεων. Ο κώδικας διατίθεται στο κοινό: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'lt': 'Neseniai kylančių klausimų (QG) metodai dažnai naudoja sekos į seką sistemą (Seq2Seq), kad būtų optimizuota registro tikimybė, kad klausimai iš esmės yra pagrįsti mokytojo priverstiniu būdu. Tačiau šis mokymo tikslas neatitinka tikros klausimų kokybės, kuri dažnai atsispindi tam tikromis pasaulinėmis savybėmis, pavyzdžiui, ar klausimą galima atsakyti dokumente. Todėl tiesiogiai optimizuojame konkrečius QG tikslus stiprindami mokymąsi, kad pagerintume klausimų kokybę. Mes sukuriame tris skirtingus atlyginimus, kuriais siekiama pagerinti susidariusių klausimų lankstumą, svarbą ir atsakomybę. Be nuodugnios analizės, atliekame ir automatinius, ir žmogiškuosius vertinimus, kad išnagrinėtume kiekvieno konkretaus QG atlyginimo poveikį. Mes manome, kad optimizuojant konkrečių klausimų atlyginimus paprastai bus pasiekta geresnių rezultatų automatiniame vertinime. Tačiau tik su žmogaus vertinimu (pvz., aktualumu) susijusi nauda iš tikrųjų pagerina klausimų kokybę. Optimizuojant kitus, ypač atsakomybę, atsiranda neteisingas modelio iškraipymas, dėl kurio kyla prastesnė klausimų kokybė. Kodas skelbiamas viešai https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე კითხვების განვითარება (QG) ძალიან გამოიყენება სწორედ-დან განვითარება ფრამეტრის (Seq2Seq) სწორედ გამოყენება, რომელიც მასწავლებელი ძალიან გამოიყენება საფუნქციის და მაგრამ, ეს საკითხვის მიზეზი არაფერია რეალური კითხვის კაalitესთან, რომელიც ზოგიერთად განაცემული გლობალური განსაზღვრებით, როგორც კითხვა დოკუმენტის შესაძლებლობა როგორც იგივე, ჩვენ QG-სპექტიფიკური მიზეზებისთვის პირად ოპტიმიზებთ კითხვის კაalitესების გაუფლებისთვის სწავლების გამოყენებით. ჩვენ სამი განსხვავებული სამუშაო დავიყენებთ, რომელიც მიზეზიან გაუფეთქოთ სიგრძნობა, მნიშვნელობა და შექმნა კითხვების პასუხი. ჩვენ ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებას დამატებით ყველა QG-სპექტიფიკური მონაცემის ეფექტის გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ კითხვის განსაკუთრებულ სამუშაოდ ოპტიმიზაცია უკეთესი სამუშაოდ იქნება ავტომატური განსაკუთრებულ მეტრიკაში. მაგრამ, მხოლოდ მხოლოდ სამუშაო, რომელიც კარგად მუშაობს ადამიანის გადაწყვეტილებით (მაგალითად, მნიშვნელობა) შეგვიძლია სამუშაო კითხვის კაalitე სხვებისთვის, განსაკუთრებით პასუხისხმებით, მოდელისთვის შეცდომა წარმოდგენა, რომელიც შეიძლება უფრო ცოტა კითხვის კაalitეში. კოდის ადამიანის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'kk': 'Соңғы сұрақтарды құру (QG) көбінде мұғалім күшінде тәжірибелі сұрақтардың (Seq2Seq) журналын оптимизациялау мүмкіндігін қолданады. Бірақ бұл оқыту мақсатының шындық сұрақ сапасына сәйкес келмейді. Бұл құжаттан сұрақ жауап беруге болады, мысалы, көбірек әлемді қасиеттермен қарайды. Бұл сияқты, QG-ның ерекше мақсаттарын қолдану үшін сұрақ сапасын жақсарту үшін көптеген оқыту арқылы, тікелей оптимизациялау. Біз жасалған сұрақтардың жылдамдығын, мақсаттылығын жақсарту, қатынасын және жауап беру үшін үш түрлі ұсынысын құрамыз. Біз әрбір QG-нің қасиетін зерттеу үшін автоматты түрде және адамдардың оқиғаларын жасаймыз. Біз сұрақ арқылы оқиғаларының оптимизациясы, әдетте, автоматты түрде оқиғаларының метрикалығында жақсы оқиғаларды жасайды. Бірақ, тек адамдардың түсініктері (мысалы, маңыздылығы) сауалды сапатты жақсы жақсарту үшін жақсы ұқсас береді. Басқалардың оптимизациясы, әсіресе жауап беру үшін, үлгісіне қате тұрақты қарсы көрсетеді, сондықтан кедейін сұрақ сапасы керек болады. Код жалпы жеткізілген https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'it': "Gli approcci di generazione di domande recenti (QG) spesso utilizzano il framework sequenza-sequenza (Seq2Seq) per ottimizzare la probabilità di log di domande di verità base utilizzando il forzamento degli insegnanti. Tuttavia, questo obiettivo di formazione è incompatibile con la qualità effettiva delle domande, che spesso si riflette in determinate proprietà globali, come se la domanda possa essere risolta dal documento. Pertanto, ottimizziamo direttamente gli obiettivi specifici del QG tramite l'apprendimento di rinforzo per migliorare la qualità delle domande. Progettiamo tre premi diversi che mirano a migliorare la fluidità, la pertinenza e la risposta delle domande generate. Conduciamo valutazioni sia automatiche che umane oltre ad analisi approfondite per esplorare l'effetto di ogni ricompensa specifica QG. Troviamo che l'ottimizzazione dei premi specifici porta generalmente a migliori prestazioni nelle metriche di valutazione automatica. Tuttavia, solo i premi che si correlano bene con il giudizio umano (ad esempio, rilevanza) portano a un reale miglioramento della qualità della questione. L'ottimizzazione per gli altri, in particolare la responsability, introduce distorsioni errate al modello, con conseguente scarsa qualità delle domande. Il codice è disponibile al pubblico all'indirizzo https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.", 'ms': 'Generasi soalan baru-baru ini (QG) mendekati sering menggunakan rangkaian urutan-ke-urutan (Seq2Seq) untuk optimumkan kemungkinan log soalan-kebenaran tanah menggunakan paksa guru. Namun, tujuan latihan ini tidak konsisten dengan kualiti soalan sebenar, yang sering dicampur oleh ciri-ciri global tertentu seperti sama ada soalan boleh dijawab oleh dokumen. Sebagai seperti itu, kita secara langsung optimum untuk tujuan khusus QG melalui pembelajaran kualiti penyesalan. Kami merancang tiga hadiah yang berbeza yang sasaran untuk meningkatkan keseluruhan, relevansi, dan jawaban soalan yang dijana. Kami melakukan penilaian automatik dan manusia selain dari analisis yang mendalam untuk mengeksplorasi kesan setiap hadiah khusus QG. We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics.  Namun, hanya pahala yang berkorrelasi dengan penghakiman manusia (contohnya relevan) membawa kepada peningkatan sebenar dalam kualiti soalan. Memoptimumkan untuk yang lain, terutama kelayakan jawapan, memperkenalkan bias yang salah kepada model, yang menyebabkan kualiti soalan yang lebih buruk. Kod tersedia secara awam pada https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തിടെയുള്ള ചോദ്യ തലമുറയുടെ (ക്യൂജി) അടുത്തുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സെക്കന്\u200dസ്-ട്രെയിന്\u200dസ് ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കു എന്നാലും ഈ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഗുണവുമായി പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇത് പലപ്പോഴും കു അതുപോലെ, ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഗുണവിശേഷം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നേരെയായി ക്യൂജി- പ്രത്യേകിച് നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്വാഭാവം, വ്യത്യസ എല്ലാ ക്യൂജിയുടെയും പ്രതിഫലത്തിന്റെയും പ്രതിഫലം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും കൂടാതെ നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം മനുഷ്യരുടെയും വിലാസങ് We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics.  എന്നാലും, മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിധിയുമായി നന്നായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ (ഉദാഹരണത്ത മറ്റുള്ളവര്\u200dക്ക്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന് മാതൃകയ്ക്ക് തെറ്റായ പിശാചുക്കളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത ഈ കോഡ് പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешната генерација на прашања (QG) пристапува честопати ја користи секвенца-на-секвенца рамката (Seq2Seq) за оптимизација на веројатноста на журналот на прашањата на основна вистина користејќи принудување на наставниците. Сепак, оваа обука не е во согласност со вистинскиот квалитет на прашањата, кој честопати се одразува од одредени глобални сопствености како што е дали прашањето може да биде одговорено од документот. Како такви, директно оптимизираме за цели специфични за QG преку зајакнување на учењето за подобрување на квалитетот на прашањата. Ние дизајнираме три различни награди кои целта е подобрување на течноста, релевантноста и одговорноста на генерираните прашања. Правиме автоматски и човечки проценки, покрај темелната анализа за да го истражуваме ефектот на секоја награда специфична за QG. We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics.  However, only the rewards that correlate well with human judgement (e.g., relevance) lead to real improvement in question quality.  Оптимизирањето за останатите, особено одговорноста, претставува неправилна пристрасност кон моделот, што резултира со полош квалитет на прашањата. Кодот е јавно достапен на https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'mt': 'L-approċċi reċenti tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet (QG) ta’ spiss jużaw il-qafas ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza (Seq2Seq) biex itejbu l-probabbiltà tar-reġistrazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet tal-verità tal-art bl-użu tal-forza tal-għalliema. Madankollu, dan l-għan ta’ taħriġ huwa inkonsistenti mal-kwalità attwali tal-mistoqsijiet, li ta’ spiss hija riflessa minn ċerti karatteristiċi globali bħal jekk il-mistoqsija tistax titwieġeb mid-dokument. Bħala tali, aħna noptimizzaw direttament għall-għanijiet speċifiċi għall-QG permezz tat-tagħlim rinfurzat biex itejbu l-kwalità tal-mistoqsijiet. Aħna niddisinjaw tliet premjijiet differenti li jimmiraw biex itejbu l-fluwenza, ir-rilevanza, u r-responsabbiltà tal-mistoqsijiet iġġenerati. Aħna nieħdu evalwazzjonijiet kemm awtomatiċi kif ukoll umani flimkien ma’ analiżi bir-reqqa biex nesploraw l-effett ta’ kull premju speċifiku għall-QG. Aħna nsibu li l-ottimizzazzjoni tal-premjijiet speċifiċi għall-kwistjonijiet ġeneralment twassal għal prestazzjoni aħjar fil-metriċi tal-evalwazzjoni awtomatika. Madankollu, il-premjijiet li jikkorrelataw tajjeb mal-ġudizzju uman biss (pereżempju r-rilevanza) iwasslu g ħal titjib reali fil-kwalità inkwistjoni. L-ottimizzazzjoni għall-oħrajn, speċjalment ir-responsabbiltà, tintroduċi preġudizzju inkorrett għall-mudell, li jirriżulta f’kwalità inqas ta’ mistoqsijiet. Il-kodiċi huwa disponibbli pubblikament fuq https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'mn': 'Саяхан асуулт төрөлхтөн (QG) нь багш нарын хүчирхийллийг ашиглан дарааллаар дарааллаар дарааллаар (Seq2Seq) олон асуултуудын магадлалыг сайжруулах боломжтой болно. Гэхдээ энэ сургалтын зорилго нь бодит асуулт чанартай тэнцүү байдаг. Энэ асуултыг баримт хариулж болох эсэхийг ихэвчлэн дэлхийн зарим чанараас харуулдаг. Иймээс бид QG-ийн тодорхой зорилгоонуудыг асуулт чанарыг сайжруулахын тулд суралцах аргаар шууд сайжруулдаг. Бид үүсгэсэн асуултуудын шингэнт, хамааралтай, хариултыг сайжруулах зорилготой гурван өөр шагналыг бүтээж байна. Бид QG-ийн тодорхой шагналын үр дүнг судлах зорилгоор автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээг хоёулангуяа автоматик үнэлгээ хийдэг. Бид асуулт тодорхой шагналын тухай сайжруулах нь автоматически оюутнуудын метриктик дээр ажиллагааг илүү сайжруулдаг. Гэхдээ зөвхөн хүн төрөлхтний шийдвэрлэлтэй холбоотой шагналыг (жишээ нь хамааралтай) асуулт чанарын үнэхээр сайжруулах боломжтой болгодог. Бусдын хувьд, ялангуяа хариулт үйлдэл, загварын тухай буруу загварыг тайлбарлах нь илүү ядуу асуулт чанартай болгодог. Энэ код олон нийтэд https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'no': 'Nyleg oppretting av spørsmål (QG) nærmer ofte å bruka rekkjefølgjande rammeverket (Seq2Seq) for å optimalisera sannsynligheten for bakgrunnsannhetsspørsmål ved hjelp av lærarar. Dette opplæringsmålet er imidlertid inkonsistent med faktiske spørsmålkvalitet, som ofte er reflektert av nokre globale eigenskapar som om spørsmålet kan svarast av dokumentet. Som slik, vi optimaliserer direkte for QG-spesifikke mål ved å styrke læring for å forbetra spørsmålkvalitet. Vi design tre forskjellige tilbakestillingar som målet for å forbetra flukten, relevans og svarability til oppretta spørsmål. Vi gjer både automatiske og menneske evalueringar i tillegg til røyd analyse for å utforske effekten av kvar QG-spesifikk rekning. Vi finn at optimalisering på spørsmålspesifiserte tiltak generelt fører til bedre utvikling i automatiske evalueringsmetrikar. Men berre tiltak som korrelatert godt med menneskelige vurdering (f.eks. relevant) fører til sanne forbedringar i spørsmålskvalitet. Optimaliser for andre, spesielt svarability, introduserer feil tilstand til modellen, og resulterer i dårlegare spørsmålkvalitet. Koden er tilgjengeleg offentleg på https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'pl': 'Najnowsze podejścia do generowania pytań (QG) często wykorzystują framework sekwencji-sekwencji (Seq2Seq), aby zoptymalizować prawdopodobieństwo logowania pytań podstawowych przy użyciu wymuszania nauczycieli. Ten cel szkoleniowy jest jednak niezgodny z rzeczywistą jakością pytań, co często odzwierciedla pewne globalne właściwości, takie jak to, czy na pytanie można odpowiedzieć w dokumencie. W związku z tym optymalizujemy bezpośrednio cele specyficzne dla QG poprzez uczenie się wzmacniające w celu poprawy jakości pytań. Projektujemy trzy różne nagrody, które mają na celu poprawę płynności, trafności i odpowiedzialności generowanych pytań. Przeprowadzamy zarówno automatyczne, jak i ludzkie oceny oraz dokładną analizę, aby zbadać efekt każdej nagrody specyficznej dla QG. Stwierdzimy, że optymalizacja nagród dla konkretnych pytań generalnie prowadzi do lepszej wydajności w zakresie automatycznych wskaźników oceny. Jednak tylko nagrody, które dobrze korelują z ludzkim osądem (np. istotnością) prowadzą do rzeczywistej poprawy jakości pytań. Optymalizacja dla innych, zwłaszcza odpowiedzialność, wprowadza nieprawidłową stronniczość modelu, skutkując niższą jakością pytań. Kod jest publicznie dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ro': 'Abordările recente de generare a întrebărilor (QG) utilizează adesea cadrul secvență-la-secvență (Seq2Seq) pentru a optimiza probabilitatea jurnalului de întrebări de la sol-adevăr folosind forțarea profesorului. Cu toate acestea, acest obiectiv de formare este incompatibil cu calitatea reală a întrebărilor, care este adesea reflectată de anumite proprietăți globale, cum ar fi dacă întrebarea poate fi răspuns prin document. Ca atare, optimizăm direct obiectivele specifice QG prin învățarea de consolidare pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea întrebărilor. Proiectăm trei recompense diferite care vizează îmbunătățirea fluenței, relevanței și răspunsului întrebărilor generate. Realizăm evaluări atât automate, cât și umane, pe lângă analize amănunțite pentru a explora efectul fiecărei recompense specifice QG. Considerăm că optimizarea recompenselor specifice întrebărilor duce, în general, la o performanță mai bună în măsurătorile de evaluare automată. Cu toate acestea, numai recompensele care corelează bine cu judecata umană (de exemplu, relevanța) duc la îmbunătățirea reală a calității întrebării. Optimizarea pentru ceilalți, în special răspunderea, introduce o părtinire incorectă a modelului, rezultând o calitate mai slabă a întrebărilor. Codul este disponibil publicului la adresa https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'si': 'අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය (QG) ප්\u200dරශ්නය (Seq2Seq) ප්\u200dරශ්නය (sequence-to-sequence) ප්\u200dරශ්නය (sequence-to-sequence) ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අභ්\u200dයාගයක් ඇත්තම ප්\u200dරශ්නය ගොඩත් සමහර විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් සමහර විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ අනිවාර්යෙන්, අපි QG විශේෂ අරමුණු සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න සුභාවත් වැඩි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂ කරනවා කියලා  අපි වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තුනක් සිද්ධා කරනවා ඒ අරක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩි කරන්න, ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, සහ ප්\u200dරත අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා හැම QG-ව අපි හොයාගන්නවා ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාවට සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ස්වයංක්\u200dර නමුත්, මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසයෙන් හොඳටම සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි (උදාහරණය, සම්බන්ධ විශ්වා අනිත් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන්, මොඩල් එකට වැරදි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප කෝඩ් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන්ම තියෙනවා https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'so': "Muujinta su'aalaha la soo dhowaaday (QG) waxey marar badan isticmaali karaan noocyada soo socda (Seq2Seq) si uu u bedelo suurtagalka loggelinta suurtagalka su'aalaha runta ah ee lagu isticmaalo macallinka ku qasbidda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee goalkan waxbarashadu waxay ku xiran tahay mid ku saabsan takhasuska arrimaha runta ah, taas oo marar badan waxaa lagu fiiriyaa hantida caalamiga ah, sida in su'aalku uu ka jawaabi karo warqada. Sida darteed waxaan toos u bedelaynaa waxyaabaha QG-gaar ah, si aan u kordhinno waxbarashada kordhinta qiimaha su'aalka. Saddex abaalmarin oo kala duduwan waxaynu sameynaynaa in lagu hagaajiyo xirfadda, xiriirka iyo jawaabta su'aalaha la abuuray. Waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta iskaa maamulka ah iyo dadka, taas oo ka sokow baaritaanka si aan u baarayno saameyn kasta oo mushaar gaar ah oo QG-ka ah. Waxaan heli nahay in si gaar ah loo doorto mushaar gaar ah, wuxuu caadi ahaan u keenaa wax ka wanaagsan baaritaanka qiimeynta dhakhtarka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee abaalmarinta oo kaliya oo la xiriira xukunka dadku (tusaale ahaan saaxiibada) wuxuu keenaa hagaajinta suurtagalka. Qofka kale, khusuusan jawaabta ka gaar ah, wuxuu tusiyaa dabeecadda si khalad ah, waxaana sababtaa qiimaha su'aalaha ka baahan. The code is publicly available at  https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.", 'sr': 'Skorašnja generacija pitanja (QG) pristupa često koristi okvir sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) kako bi optimizirala mogućnost dnevnog verovatnosti pitanja zemaljske istine koristeći prisiljavanje učitelja. Međutim, ovaj cilj obuke nije u skladu sa stvarnom kvalitetom pitanja, koji se često odražava određenim globalnim vlasništvima poput da li se pitanje može odgovoriti dokumentom. Kao takav, direktno optimizujemo za QG-specifične ciljeve putem pojačanja učenja za poboljšanje kvalitete pitanja. Mi dizajniramo tri različite nagrade koje ciljaju da poboljšamo tečnost, relevantnost i odgovornost stvaranih pitanja. Obavljamo i automatske i ljudske procjene, dodatno temeljnoj analizi kako bi istražili učinak svake nagrade specifične QG-e. Nalazimo da optimizacija nagrade na specifičnim pitanjima uopšte vodi do boljih učinka u metrici automatske procjene. Međutim, samo nagrade koje dobro povezuju sa ljudskim procenama (npr. relevantnost) dovedu do stvarnog poboljšanja kvalitete pitanja. Optimizacija za ostale, posebno odgovornost, predstavlja nepravdu predrasude modelu, što rezultira siromašniji kvalitet pitanja. Kod je javno dostupan na https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'sv': 'Senaste frågegenereringsmetoder (QG) använder ofta sekvens-till-sekvens ramverket (Seq2Seq) för att optimera loggsannolikheten för marksanningsfrågor med hjälp av lärartvång. Detta utbildningsmål är dock oförenligt med den faktiska frågekvaliteten, vilket ofta återspeglas av vissa globala egenskaper, t.ex. om frågan kan besvaras av dokumentet. Därför optimerar vi direkt för QG-specifika mål genom förstärkning av inlärning för att förbättra frågekvaliteten. Vi designar tre olika belöningar som syftar till att förbättra flytande, relevans och svarbarhet för genererade frågor. Utöver noggrann analys genomför vi både automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar för att undersöka effekten av varje QG-specifik belöning. Vi finner att optimering av frågespecifika belöningar generellt leder till bättre prestanda i automatiska utvärderingsmetoder. Men endast de belöningar som väl korrelerar med mänsklig bedömning (t.ex. relevans) leder till verklig förbättring av ifrågavarande kvalitet. Optimering för de andra, särskilt svarbarhet, medför felaktig bias i modellen, vilket resulterar i sämre frågekvalitet. Koden är tillgänglig för allmänheten på https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் கேள்வி உருவாக்குதல் (QG) நெருங்குகள் பெரும்பாலும் தொடர்ச்சி வரிசையின் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்துகின்றன (Seq2Seq) ஆசிரியர் நிறுவப் ஆனால், இந்த பயிற்சி பொருள் உண்மையில் கேள்வி தரமுடன் பொருத்தமானது, அது பிரதிபலிக்கப்படும் சில உலக பண்புகளால், ஆவணத்தால் கேள்வி பதில இப்படித்தான், நாம் QG- குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட காரியங்களுக்கு நேரடியாக முன்னேற்றுகிறோம் கேள்வி தரம் ம நாம் மூன்று வேறு வித்தியாசமான விகிதிகளை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் அது விளைவு, தொடர்புகள் மற்றும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்வ நாம் ஒவ்வொரு குறிப்பிட்ட கூலிக்குரிய விளைவை கண்டறிவதற்கும் மேலும் தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகளை செய்கிறோ கேள்வி குறிப்பிட்ட கூலிகளை மேம்படுத்துவது பொதுவாக செயல்படுத்தும் தானியங்கி மதிப்பிடும் மெட்ரிக்கு சி ஆனால், மனித நியாயத்துடன் நன்றாக இணைக்கும் விகிதம் மட்டுமே மட்டுமே கேள்வி தரம் உண்மையான முன்னேற்றத்தை கொண்டு வருக மற்றவர்களுக்கு, குறிப்பாக பதிலாக இருப்பதை தேர்வு செய்வது, மாதிரியில் தவறான பிரிவை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, கேள்வி தரம் க குறியீடு பொதுவாக இருக்கிறது https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ur': 'اچھا سؤال کی نسل (QG) قریب آتی ہے کہ معلم مضبوطی کے مطابق لاگ سؤال کی امکانات کو اچھی طرح سے استعمال کرے۔ However, this training objective is incompatible with actual question quality, which is often reflected by certain global properties such as whether the question can be answered by the document. اسی طرح ہم QG-specific objectives کے لئے سؤال کی کیفیت کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے مضبوط سیکھنے کے ذریعہ استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم تین مختلف اجرت طراحی کرتے ہیں جن کا موقع ہے چلنے کے لیے فلونٹی، اضافہ اور جواب دینے کے لیے۔ ہم ہر QG-specific اجر کے اثر کا تحقیق کرنے کے لئے اپنا تحقیق کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ سوال کے مطابق ثواب پر optimization generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics. لیکن صرف اجر جو انسان کے فیصلے کے ساتھ اچھا مرتبہ ہوتا ہے (یعنی اچھا مرتبہ) سوال کے کیفیت میں واقعی اچھا مرتبہ ہوتا ہے۔ اور دوسروں کے لئے اچھی طرح کرنا، مخصوصاً جواب دینے والی، موڈل کے لئے غلط بحث پیش کرتا ہے، اور اس کے نتیجہ میں کمزور سوال کی کیفیت ہے۔ یہ کوڈ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہے https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'uz': "Keyingi savol yaratish (QG) qoidalari o'rtacha cheksiz chegarasini (Seq2Seq) yordamida o'qituvchi qator yordamida ishlatiladi. Lekin, bu taʼminlovchi obʼekt haqiqiqiy savol sifatida yetarli emas. Bu narsa dokument tomonidan javob berishi mumkin deb ko'paytiriladi. Shunday qilib, biz savol sifatini oshirish uchun QG-muhit obʼektlarni yordam beramiz. Biz uchta boshqa paytlarni yaratib, ijodkorlik, shaxsiyatli va yaratilgan savollarning javob berish uchun yaramiz. Biz har QG-xossa ijodkorning effektini aniqlash uchun avtomatik va inson qiymatlarini bajaramiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, savol-specific paytlarini ko'paytirish odatda avtomatik qiymati metriklarida yaxshi bajarishiga ega bo'ladi. Lekin, faqat inson Xukunlik bilan yaxshi bog'liqlangan paytlar haqiqiqiy yaxshi o'zgarishga ega. Boshqalarni moslash uchun javob berish modelga notoʻgʻri qismlarni koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu muammolar sifatida juda ko'proq qiladi. The code is publicly available at  https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.", 'vi': 'Cách tiếp cận hàng loạt các câu hỏi gần đây (QG) thường sử dụng các quy trình riêng biệt (Seq2Seq) để tối ưu hóa khả năng vấn đề mặt đất bằng cách ép giáo viên. Tuy nhiên, mục tiêu huấn luyện này không phù hợp với chất lượng nghi vấn thực tế, thường được phản ánh bởi một số đặc tính toàn cầu như là liệu câu hỏi có thể được trả lời bằng tài liệu không. Vì thế, chúng tôi tối ưu tiên trực tiếp các mục tiêu cụ thể của QG bằng việc củng cố học để nâng cao chất lượng hỏi. Chúng tôi thiết kế ba phần thưởng khác nhau nhằm cải thiện sự khéo léo, liên quan và đáp ứng các câu hỏi đã tạo ra. Chúng tôi tiến hành đánh giá cả tự động lẫn con người, cùng với các phân tích kỹ lưỡng để khám phá hiệu quả của mỗi phần thưởng đặc biệt. Chúng tôi thấy rằng sự tốt nhận từ những vật đặc biệt sẽ giúp tốt hơn trong các đó nhà đó. Tuy nhiên, chỉ những phần thưởng phù hợp với cách đánh giá của con người (v.d. sự liên quan) dẫn đến một sự cải tiến thực sự trong chất chất lượng. Sự bổ sung cho người khác, đặc biệt là người trả lời, dẫn đến sai lệch lệch hướng theo mẫu, dẫn đến chất lượng kém hơn. The code is công khai available at https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'nl': 'Recente benaderingen voor het genereren van vragen (QG) maken vaak gebruik van het sequence-to-sequence framework (Seq2Seq) om de logwaarschijnlijkheid van grondwaarheidsvragen te optimaliseren met behulp van lerarenforcing. Deze trainingsdoelstelling is echter inconsistent met de feitelijke vraagkwaliteit, die vaak wordt weerspiegeld door bepaalde globale eigenschappen, zoals of de vraag kan worden beantwoord door het document. Daarom optimaliseren we direct voor QG-specifieke doelstellingen via versterking learning om de vragenkwaliteit te verbeteren. We ontwerpen drie verschillende beloningen die gericht zijn op het verbeteren van de vloeiende, relevantie en antwoordbaarheid van gegenereerde vragen. We voeren zowel automatische als menselijke evaluaties uit, naast een grondige analyse om het effect van elke QG-specifieke beloning te onderzoeken. We vinden dat optimalisatie op vragenspecifieke beloningen over het algemeen leidt tot betere prestaties in automatische evaluatiestatistieken. Echter, alleen de beloningen die goed correleren met menselijk oordeel (bijvoorbeeld relevantie) leiden tot een echte verbetering van de vragenkwaliteit. Optimalisatie voor de anderen, met name responsability, leidt tot onjuiste bias in het model, wat resulteert in een slechtere vraagkwaliteit. De code is openbaar beschikbaar op: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'da': 'Seneste spørgsmålstegnelsesmetoder (QG) bruger ofte sekvens-til-sekvens rammerne (Seq2Seq) til at optimere log sandsynligheden for jord-sandhed spørgsmål ved hjælp af lærertvang. Dette uddannelsesmål er imidlertid ikke i overensstemmelse med den faktiske spørgsmålskvalitet, hvilket ofte afspejles af visse globale egenskaber, f.eks. om spørgsmålet kan besvares af dokumentet. Som sådan optimerer vi direkte til QG-specifikke mål via forstærket læring for at forbedre spørgsmålskvaliteten. Vi designer tre forskellige belønninger, der sigter mod at forbedre flydende, relevans og besvarelse af genererede spørgsmål. Vi foretager både automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer ud over grundig analyse for at undersøge effekten af hver QG-specifik belønning. Vi finder ud af, at optimering af spørgsmålsspecifikke belønninger generelt fører til bedre ydeevne i automatiske evalueringsmålinger. Men kun de belønninger, der korrelerer godt med menneskelig dømmekraft (f.eks. relevans), fører til reel forbedring i spørgsmålet kvalitet. Optimering for de andre, især ansvarlighed, introducerer forkert bias til modellen, hvilket resulterer i dårligere spørgsmålskvalitet. Koden er offentligt tilgængelig på https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'de': 'Jüngste Ansätze zur Fragegenerierung (QG) verwenden häufig das Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Framework (Seq2Seq), um die Log-Wahrscheinlichkeit von Ground-Truth-Fragen mithilfe von Lehrern zu optimieren. Dieses Schulungsziel steht jedoch nicht im Einklang mit der tatsächlichen Fragequalität, die sich oft in bestimmten globalen Eigenschaften widerspiegelt, wie z.B. ob die Frage durch das Dokument beantwortet werden kann. Daher optimieren wir direkt für QG-spezifische Ziele durch Verstärkungslernen, um die Fragenqualität zu verbessern. Wir entwerfen drei verschiedene Belohnungen, die darauf abzielen, die Fluenz, Relevanz und Antwortfähigkeit generierter Fragen zu verbessern. Wir führen sowohl automatische als auch menschliche Bewertungen durch und analysieren gründliche Analysen, um die Wirkung jeder QG-spezifischen Belohnung zu untersuchen. Wir stellen fest, dass die Optimierung von fragespezifischen Belohnungen in der Regel zu einer besseren Leistung bei automatischen Bewertungsmetriken führt. Allerdings führen nur die Belohnungen, die gut mit menschlichem Urteilsvermögen korrelieren (z.B. Relevanz), zu einer echten Verbesserung der Fragenqualität. Die Optimierung für die anderen, insbesondere die Antwortbarkeit, führt zu einer falschen Verzerrung des Modells, was zu einer schlechteren Fragequalität führt. Der Code ist öffentlich zugänglich unter https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'hr': 'Skorašnja generacija pitanja (QG) pristupa često koristi okvir sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) kako bi optimizirala vjerojatnost dnevnika pitanja zemaljske istine koristeći prisiljavanje učitelja. Međutim, ovaj cilj obuke nije u skladu s stvarnom kvalitetom pitanja, što se često odražava određenim globalnim vlasništvima poput da li se pitanje može odgovoriti dokumentom. Kao takvo, direktno optimiziramo ciljeve specifične QG putem pojačanja učenja za poboljšanje kvalitete pitanja. Mi dizajniramo tri različite nagrade koje su ciljeve za poboljšanje tekućine, relevantnosti i odgovornost stvaranih pitanja. Provodimo automatske i ljudske procjene u dodatnoj temeljnoj analizi kako bi istražili učinak svake nagrade specifične QG-e. Nalazimo da optimizacija nagrade na specifičnim pitanjima obično dovede do boljih učinka u metrici automatske procjene. Međutim, samo nagrade koje su dobro povezani s ljudskim procjenama (npr. relevantnošću) dovele do stvarnog poboljšanja u pitanju kvalitete. Optimaliziranje ostalih, posebno odgovornosti, predstavlja nepravdu predrasude modelu, što je rezultiralo siromašnije kvalitete pitanja. Kod je javno dostupan na https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ko': '최근의 문제 생성(QG) 방법은 보통 서열에서 서열 프레임워크(Seq2Seq)로 교사를 이용하여 기초 진리 문제의 대수 가능성을 최적화하도록 강요한다.그러나 이 교육 목표는 실제 문제의 질과 일치하지 않는다. 이것은 일반적으로 일부 전역 속성에 반영된다. 예를 들어 문서에서 문제를 대답할 수 있는지의 여부이다.따라서 우리는 강화된 학습을 통해 QG의 특정 목표를 직접 최적화하여 문제의 질을 향상시킨다.우리는 문제를 생성하는 유창성, 관련성, 대답 능력을 높이기 위해 세 가지 다른 보상을 설계했다.포괄적인 분석뿐 아니라 각 QG별 특정 인센티브의 효과를 탐색하기 위한 자동·인공 평가도 진행한다.우리는 자동 평가 지표에서 문제의 특정 보상을 최적화하면 일반적으로 더 좋은 실적을 얻을 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 인간의 판단과 밀접한 관련이 있는 보상(예를 들어 관련성)만이 진정으로 문제의 질을 높일 수 있다.다른 사람을 위해 최적화, 특히 대답성은 모델에 부정확한 편견을 가져와 문제의 질을 떨어뜨린다.이 코드는https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'fa': 'نسل سوال اخیر (QG) به نزدیک می\u200cآید، اغلب چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها ولی این هدف آموزش با کیفیت واقعی سوال مخالف است که اغلب توسط ویژگی های جهانی مثل این است که آیا سؤال می تواند توسط سند جواب داده شود. به عنوان این، ما مستقیما برای هدف\u200cهای مخصوص QG با وسیله یادگیری افزایش برای بهتر کیفیت سوال بهتر می\u200cکنیم. ما سه پاداش متفاوتی را طراحی می کنیم که هدف برای بهتر کردن آلودگی، ارتباط و جواب سوالات تولید شده است. ما در addition to thorough analysis of the effects of each QG specific reward conduct automatic and human evaluations for exploring the effect of each QG. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که پاداش\u200cهای مخصوص سوال\u200cها را بهترین سازی می\u200cکند که عموماً به عملکرد بهتر در متریک ارزیابی خودکار می\u200cرسد. ولی تنها پاداش\u200cهایی که با قضاوت انسان به خوبی ارتباط دارند، به سوی بهترین کیفیت سؤال می\u200cرسند. بهترین کردن برای بقیه، مخصوصاً جوابجویی، پیشرفت اشتباهی را به مدل معرفی می\u200cکند، و به نتیجه کیفیت ضعیف\u200cتر سوال می\u200cشود. کد عمومی در https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'bg': 'Последните подходи за генериране на въпроси (QG) често използват рамката последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq), за да оптимизират вероятността от логове за въпроси, свързани с истината, използвайки принуждаването на учителите. Тази цел на обучение обаче е несъвместима с действителното качество на въпроса, което често се отразява от определени глобални свойства, като например дали въпросът може да бъде отговорен чрез документа. Като такива, ние директно оптимизираме за специфични цели чрез засилване на обучението, за да подобрим качеството на въпросите. Ние проектираме три различни награди, насочени към подобряване на плавността, уместността и отговорността на генерираните въпроси. Извършваме автоматични и човешки оценки, в допълнение към задълбочен анализ, за да проучим ефекта на всяка конкретна награда. Намираме, че оптимизирането на специфичните за въпросите награди обикновено води до по-добра производителност при автоматичните показатели за оценка. Въпреки това, само наградите, които корелират добре с човешката преценка (напр. уместност), водят до реално подобрение на въпросното качество. Оптимизирането за другите, особено отговорността, въвежда неправилно отклонение в модела, което води до по-лошо качество на въпросите. Кодът е публично достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'sw': 'Recent question generation (QG) approaches often utilize the sequence-to-sequence framework (Seq2Seq) to optimize the log likelihood of ground-truth questions using teacher forcing.  Hata hivyo, lengo hili la mafunzo halisi limekuwa na kiwango cha swali, ambacho mara nyingi kinaonyesha na utamaduni wa kidunia kama vile swali linaweza kujibu na nyaraka. Kwa mfano, tunaweka nafasi moja kwa moja kwa lengo maalumu la QG kwa kutumia kujifunza kuboresha viwango vya swali. Tunaweza kutengeneza malipo matatu tofauti yanayolenga kuboresha ufanisi, ufanisi na wajibu wa maswali yaliyotengenezwa. Tunafanya tafiti za kibinadamu pamoja na uchambuzi wa kina ili kutambua athari za kila malipo maalum ya QG. Tunaona kuwa kuboresha misaada ya maswali kwa ujumla unapelekea utendaji mzuri katika mbinu za uchunguzi. Hata hivyo, malipo yanayohusiana vizuri na uamuzi wa binadamu (kwa mfano, umuhimu) yanasababisha maboresho halisi katika sifa za swali. Kupambanua kwa wengine, hususani wajibu wake, inaonyesha upendeleo usio sahihi kwa mtindo huo, na kusababisha kiwango cha swali duni. Utawala unapatikana hadharani katika https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'sq': 'Gjeneracioni i fundit i pyetjeve (QG) afrohet shpesh duke përdorur kuadrin sekuencë-në-sekuencë (Seq2Seq) për të optimizuar mundësinë e regjistrimit të pyetjeve të të vërtetës në tokë duke përdorur detyrën e mësuesit. Megjithatë, ky objektiv trainimi është i pakonsistentë me cilësinë aktuale të pyetjeve, e cila shpesh pasqyrohet nga disa prona globale të tilla si nëse pyetja mund të përgjigjet nga dokumenti. Si të tillë, ne optimizojmë drejtpërdrejt për objektivat specifike QG nëpërmjet forcimit të mësimit për të përmirësuar cilësinë e pyetjeve. Ne dizajnojmë tre shpërblime të ndryshme që synojnë të përmirësojnë fluencën, relevancën dhe përgjigjësinë e pyetjeve të gjeneratuara. Ne kryejmë vlerësime automatike dhe njerëzore përveç analizave të thella për të eksploruar efektin e çdo shpërblimi specifik QG. Ne gjejmë se optimizimi i shpërblimeve specifike për pyetje përgjithësisht çon në performancë më të mirë në metrikat automatike të vlerësimit. Megjithatë, vetëm shpërblimet që korrelohen mirë me gjykimin njerëzor (për shembull relevanca) shpien në përmirësim të vërtetë në cilësinë e pyetjes. Optimizimi për të tjerët, veçanërisht përgjegjësia, fut paragjykim të gabuar ndaj modelit, duke rezultuar në cilësi më të dobët pyetjeje. Kodi është në dispozicion publik në https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የጥያቄ ትውልድ (QG) የሚቃወሙት ሁኔታ የክፍለ ሥርዓት (Seq2Seq) በመጠቀም የመሬት-እውነት ጥያቄዎችን በመጠቀም የጦማር ውጤት በመጠቀም አስተማሪን በማስጠንቀቅ ይቻላል፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ ትምህርት አካባቢ በአካባቢው ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ የQG-የተለየ አቃውንቶችን ለመማር ጥያቄን ለማሻሻል በማድረግ እናሻራለን፡፡ የጥያቄውን፣ የግንኙነትን እና የመጠቀምን ጥያቄዎችን ለማሻል የሚችሉትን ሦስት የተለየ ዋጋዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ We conduct both automatic and human evaluations in addition to thorough analysis to explore the effect of each QG-specific reward.  We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics.  ነገር ግን በሰው ፍርድ (ለምሳሌ ተግባር) ደጋሚ የሚታያየው ዋጋ ብቻ የጥያቄውን ጥሩ እንዲያሳድግ ነው፡፡ ለሌሎች፣ ይልቁንም መልስ አካሄዱን በመጠቀም፣ በሞዴል ላይ የተሳሳተውን የጥያቄ ጥያቄ እንዲያገኛል፡፡ የሆሄያት ኮድ https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'id': 'Generasi pertanyaan baru-baru ini (QG) pendekatan sering menggunakan rangkaian rangkaian-ke-rangkaian (Seq2Seq) untuk optimisasi kemungkinan log pertanyaan-kebenaran tanah menggunakan paksa guru. Namun, tujuan pelatihan ini tidak konsisten dengan kualitas pertanyaan yang sebenarnya, yang sering diperlihatkan oleh properti global tertentu seperti apakah pertanyaan dapat dijawab oleh dokumen. Sebagai seperti itu, kami secara langsung optimisasi untuk tujuan khusus QG melalui pemerintahan belajar untuk meningkatkan kualitas pertanyaan. Kami merancang tiga hadiah yang berbeda bahwa sasaran untuk meningkatkan keseluruhan, relevansi, dan jawaban pertanyaan yang dihasilkan. Kami melakukan evaluasi otomatis dan manusia selain dari analisis teliti untuk mengeksplorasi efek setiap hadiah khusus QG. We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics.  Namun, hanya hadiah yang berkorelasi dengan baik dengan penilaian manusia (misalnya relevan) menyebabkan peningkatan nyata dalam kualitas pertanyaan. Optimizing for the others, especially answerability, introduces incorrect bias to the model, resulting in poorer question quality.  Kode tersedia publik di https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'af': 'Onlangse vraag generasie (QG) naby dikwels die volgorde-na-volgorde raamwerk (Seq2Seq) te gebruik om die log waarskynlik van grond-waarheid vrae te optimaliseer deur onderwysers te verdruk. Hierdie oefening doel is tog ongelukkig met werklike vraagkwaliteit, wat dikwels deur sekere globale eienskappe, soos of die vraag deur die dokument antwoord kan word. Soos sodat ons direk optimaliseer vir QG-spesifieke objekte deur die versterking van die leer om vraagkwaliteit te verbeter. Ons ontwerp drie verskillende vergelde wat doel om die fluiditeit, relevansie en antwoordelikheid van gegenereerde vrae te verbeter. Ons doen beide outomatiese en menslike evaluasies in bygevoeg tot duidelike analisie om die effek van elke QG-spesifieke loon te ondersoek. Ons vind dat optimaliseering op vraag-spesifieke vergelde genereerwys na beter prestasie in outomatiese evalueringsmetries. Maar net die vergelde wat goed verbind met menslike oordeel (bv. relevansie) lei na regte verbetering in vraaglike kwaliteit. Optimaliseer vir die ander, veral verantwoordelikheid, introduseer verkeerde bias aan die model, resultaat in armer vraag kwaliteit. Die kode is openlik beskikbaar by https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'hy': 'Recent question generation (QG) approaches often utilize the sequence-to-sequence framework (Seq2Seq) to optimize the log likelihood of ground-truth questions using teacher forcing.  Այնուամենայնիվ, այս ուսուցման նպատակը անհամապատասխան է իրական հարցի որակին, որը հաճախ արտացոլվում է որոշ գլոբալ հատկություններով, ինչպիսիք են, թե արդյոք հարցը կարող է պատասխանել փաստաթուղթը: Այսպիսով, մենք ուղղակի օպտիմացնում ենք QG-ի նպատակների համար, ուժեղացնելով ուսումնասիրությունը, որպեսզի բարելավենք հարցերի որակը: Մենք ստեղծում ենք երեք տարբեր պարգևեր, որոնք նպատակում են բարելավել ստեղծված հարցերի ճկունությունը, կարևորությունը և պատասխանատվությունը: Մենք կատարում ենք նաև ավտոմատիկ, նաև մարդկային գնահատումներ, բացի հիմնական վերլուծության, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք յուրաքանչյուր հատուկ հատուկ պարգևի ազդեցությունը: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ հարցերով հատուկ պարգևի լավագույնը հանդիսանում է ավտոմատիկ գնահատման մետրիկայի ավելի լավ արդյունք: Այնուամենայնիվ, միայն այն պարգևերը, որոնք լավ կապված են մարդկային դատողության հետ (օրինակ, կարևորությունը) հանգեցնում են հարցի որակի իրական բարելավմանը: Մյուսների համար լավագույնը, հատկապես պատասխանատվությունը, ներկայացնում է սխալ կողմնականություն մոդելի նկատմամբ, ինչը հանգեցնում է ավելի վատ հարցի որակի: Կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'az': 'Son sual nəzəriyyəti (QG) yaxınlaşır ki, müəllimlərə qüvvət vermək üçün seq2Seq (Seq2Seq) seqsinə-seqsinə quruluşu (seq2Seq) çox yaxınlaşır. Lakin bu təhsil məqsədi həqiqi sual kalitetiyə uyğun deyildir. Bu sual belə cürbəcür qlobal xüsusiyyətlərlə, bənzər, belə bir məqsədilə cavab verə bilərmi. Bütün bunlar kimi, QG-nin müəyyən məqsədilərini, sual keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün çoxlu öyrənmək vasitəsilə mütləq optimizləyirik. Biz yaratdığımız sualları təmizləmək üçün məqsəd olan üç müxtəlif mükafatları tasarlayırıq. Biz hər QG müəyyən mükafatının etkisini keşfetmək üçün özümüzə və insan değerlendirmələrini həmçin in tamamilə analizi ilə təşkil edirik. Biz sual mükafatlarını optimizləndirmək, genellikle avtomatik değerlendirmə metriklərində daha xeyirli performans olar. Ancaq insan hökmləri ilə yaxşı bağlı olan mükafatlar (məsələn, mövcud olan məsələlər) sual keyfiyyətinə çox yaxşılaşdırır. Başqaları üçün optimizləndirmək, özlərinə də cavab verə bilər, modellə yanlış bias göstərir, daha zəif sual kaliteti olaraq. Kod publicly available at https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'bs': 'Skorašnja generacija pitanja (QG) pristupa često upotrebljava okvir sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) kako bi optimizirala vjerojatnost dnevnika pitanja zemaljske istine koristeći prisiljavanje učitelja. Međutim, ovaj cilj obuke nije u skladu sa stvarnom kvalitetom pitanja, koji se često odražava određenim globalnim vlasništvima poput da li se pitanje može odgovoriti dokumentom. Kao takav, direktno optimiziramo za QG-specifične ciljeve putem pojačanja učenja za poboljšanje kvalitete pitanja. Mi dizajniramo tri različite nagrade koje su ciljeve da poboljšamo tekućinu, relevantnost i odgovornost stvaranih pitanja. Obavljamo i automatske i ljudske procjene u dodatnoj temeljnoj analizi kako bi istražili učinak svake nagrade specifične QG-e. Nalazimo da optimizacija nagrade na specifičnim pitanjima obično dovede do boljih učinka u metrici automatske procjene. Međutim, samo nagrade koje dobro povezuju sa ljudskim procenama (npr. relevantnošću) dovedu do stvarnog poboljšanja u pitanju kvalitete. Optimizacija ostalih, posebno odgovornosti, predstavlja nepravdu predrasude modelu, što je rezultiralo siromašnije kvalitete pitanja. Kod je javno dostupan na https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক প্রশ্ন প্রজন্ম (কিউজি) প্রায় প্রশ্নের কাছে প্রায়শই ব্যবহার করে শিক্ষকদের বাধ্য করে বাধ্য করার ব্যাপারে গ্রাম-সত্য প্রশ্নের সম্ However, this training objective is inconsistent with actual question quality, which is often reflected by certain global properties such as whether the question can be answered by the document.  As such, we directly optimize for QG-specific objectives via reinforcement learning to improve question quality.  আমরা তিনটি ভিন্ন পুরস্কার ডিজাইন করি যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সৃষ্ট প্রশ্নের প্রভাব, প্রাসঙ্গিক এবং উত্তর উন্নত করার জন্য। প্রত্যেক কিউজি-নির্দিষ্ট পুরস্কারের প্রভাব বিশ্লেষণের সাথে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মূল্যের বিষয়ট আমরা প্রশ্ন-নির্দিষ্ট পুরস্কারের ব্যাপারে সম্পাদনা করি সাধারণত স্বয়ংক্রিয় মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিকে ভালো কাজ করে। তবে শুধুমাত্র মানুষের বিচারের সাথে ভালোভাবে সংশ্লিষ্ট পুরস্কার (উদাহরণস্বরূপ প) প্রশ্নের মানে সত্যিকারে অন্যদের জন্য অপেক্ষা করা হচ্ছে, বিশেষ করে উত্তরাধিকার, মডেলের প্রতি ভুল বিভেদের উপস্থাপন করে, যার ফলে প্রশ্নের মান কম। কোড প্রকাশ্যে উপস্থিত https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda soraglar (QG) ýerleşýän sahypalar (Seq2Seq) mugallymyň zorlanmasyndan geçirmek üçin seýiklere (sequence-to-sequence framework) gollanýar. Ýöne bu okuw maksady hakyky soraglaryň keyfiyeti bilen täsirli däldir. Bu soragy sened tarapyndan jogap berilebilir ýaly käbir dünýäpli hasaplaryň tarapyndan täsirlenýär. Şonuň ýaly, biz QG-ň takyk maksadlary üçin soraglaryň keyfiýetini gelişmek üçin köpräk ukyplary ýüzeltmek üçin ýokarylýarys. Güç farklı ücretleri tasarladık, amaçlarımız sıcaklığı, önemliliğini ve üretilen soruların sorumluluğunu geliştirmek için. Biz hem otomatik hem adamlaryň deňlenmelerini hem diýip, her QG-yň täsirini gözlemek üçin ýüze çykyp barýarys. Biz soraglary takyklaýan täsirlerden optimizlemek, umumy öz-özünden deňlemek metriklerinde gowy etkinlik edendir. Ýöne, diňe adamlaryň höwesi bilen gowy täsirli täsirler (meseläm, möhüm bolmagy) soraglaryň keyfiýeti gowurak bilen mejbur edýär. Başgalar üçin gözleýşenler, özellikle jogaplary, nusga ýalňyş nepisligi görkez, nädogry soraglaryň keyfiýeti ýok bolar. Bu köd Publik Saýlawda https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset kysymykset (QG) hyödyntävät usein sekvenssi-to-sequence framework -kehystä (Seq2Seq) optimoimaan pohjatotuuskysymysten log-todennäköisyyden opettajan pakottamalla. Tämä koulutustavoite on kuitenkin ristiriidassa todellisen kysymyksen laadun kanssa, mikä usein heijastuu tiettyihin maailmanlaajuisiin ominaisuuksiin, kuten siihen, voidaanko kysymykseen vastata asiakirjassa. Optimoimme suoraan QG-erityisiin tavoitteisiin vahvistamalla oppimista kysymysten laadun parantamiseksi. Suunnittelemme kolme erilaista palkintoa, joiden tavoitteena on parantaa luotujen kysymysten sujuvuutta, relevanssia ja vastaavuutta. Suoritamme sekä automaattisia että inhimillisiä arviointeja perusteellisen analyysin lisäksi kunkin QG-kohtaisen palkkion vaikutuksen selvittämiseksi. Huomaamme, että kysymyskohtaisten palkkioiden optimointi johtaa yleensä parempaan suorituskykyyn automaattisissa arviointimittareissa. Kuitenkin vain palkit, jotka korreloivat hyvin ihmisen arvostelukykyyn (esim. merkityksellisyys), johtavat todelliseen laadun paranemiseen. Muille optimointi, erityisesti vastaavuus, tuo malliin väärän vääristymän, mikä heikentää kysymyksen laatua. Koodi on julkisesti saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'cs': 'Nedávné přístupy k generování otázek (QG) často využívají framework sekvence-to-sekvence (Seq2Seq) k optimalizaci pravděpodobnosti protokolu základních otázek pomocí nutování učitelů. Tento cíl školení však není v souladu se skutečnou kvalitou otázek, což se často odráží v určitých globálních vlastnostech, jako je například zda lze otázku zodpovědět dokumentem. Jako takový přímo optimalizujeme pro cíle specifické QG prostřednictvím posílení učení, abychom zlepšili kvalitu otázek. Navrhujeme tři různé odměny, které mají za cíl zlepšit plynulost, relevanci a zodpovědnost generovaných otázek. Kromě důkladné analýzy provádíme automatické i lidské hodnocení, abychom prozkoumali efekt každé odměny specifické pro QG. Zjišťujeme, že optimalizace odměn specifických pro otázky obecně vede k lepšímu výkonu v automatických hodnotících metrikách. Avšak pouze odměny, které dobře korelují s lidským úsudkem (např. relevance), vedou ke skutečnému zlepšení kvality otázek. Optimalizace pro ostatní, zejména zodpovědnost, zavádí nesprávné zaujatosti modelu, což vede k nižší kvalitě otázek. Kód je veřejně dostupný na adrese: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'et': 'Hiljutised küsimuste genereerimise (QG) lähenemisviisid kasutavad sageli järjestusest järjestuseni raamistikku (Seq2Seq), et optimeerida logitõenäosust põhjaliku tõe küsimuste jaoks, kasutades õpetaja sundimist. Kõnealune koolituse eesmärk ei ole aga kooskõlas küsimuse tegeliku kvaliteediga, mida sageli peegeldavad teatud globaalsed omadused, näiteks kas küsimusele on võimalik vastata dokumendiga. Sellisena optimeerime otseselt QG-spetsiifiliste eesmärkide saavutamiseks tugevdatud õppe kaudu, et parandada küsimuste kvaliteeti. Me kujundame kolm erinevat preemiat, mille eesmärk on parandada tekkinud küsimuste sujuvust, asjakohasust ja vastavust. Lisaks põhjalikule analüüsile teostame nii automaatseid kui ka inimlikke hinnanguid, et uurida iga QG-spetsiifilise tasu mõju. Leiame, et optimeerimine küsimuspetsiifiliste hüvede põhjal toob üldiselt kaasa automaatse hindamise mõõdikute parema tulemuslikkuse. Kuid ainult inimese hinnanguga hästi seotud hüved (nt asjakohasus) viivad kõnealuse kvaliteedi tõelise paranemiseni. Teiste jaoks optimeerimine, eriti vastutavus, toob mudelile kaasa ebaõige erapooletuse, mille tulemuseks on küsimuste kvaliteet halvem. Kood on avalikult kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments de la generació de preguntes recents (QG) sovint utilitzen el marc seqüència a seqüència (Seq2Seq) per optimitzar la probabilitat de registre de preguntes de veritat terrestre fent servir la força del professor. No obstant això, aquest objectiu d'entrenament és inconsistent amb la qualitat real de les preguntes, que sovint es reflecteix en certes propietats globals com si el document pot respondre a la pregunta. Com a tal, optimizem directament els objectius específics del QG mitjançant el reforç de l'aprenentatge per millorar la qualitat de les qüestions. dissenyem tres recompensas diferents que tenen l'objectiu de millorar la fluïtat, la pertinencia i la resposta de les preguntes generades. Fem evaluacions tant automàtiques com humanes a més d'una anàlisi detallada per explorar l'efecte de cada recompensa específica per a la QG. We find that optimizing on question-specific rewards generally leads to better performance in automatic evaluation metrics.  No obstant això, només les recompensas que correlacionen bé amb el judici humà (per exemple la pertinencia) porten a una millora real en la qualitat en qüestió. L'optimització dels altres, especialment la responsabilitat, introdueix un bias incorrect al model, i resulta en una qualitat de preguntes més baixa. El codi està disponible al públic https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.", 'jv': 'Packages Nanging, goal punika cursing iki kuwi nggawe rata-rata sing apik sing apik, sing nyimpen karo perusahaan sing nyimpen karo nganggo perusahaan global yo koyo ngono terus-terusahaan layanan sakjane iso diangono Dokumen. Taning Awak dhéwé éntuk telu mbuluk sing gak perusahaan kanggo dianggawe kowe ngubah aksi, ijol-ijolan lan mbulukipun dianggap kanggo ngerasakno Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan sami nggunakake sistem lan tambah sak dadi panggunakake sak ngelasakno kanggo kekakipun efek saben tanggal nggawe barang-tanggal. Anyone Nanging, uwong-uwong sing mengko nganggep kuwi adalah iki dadi aturan luwih apik lan tambah sing beraksi supaya sak bahsa ingkang dipulangan Optimisa kanggo kalaman segala, supoyo responsibé, njuk dianggap perusahaan sing dibutur Kodi iku publik nang kana https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'sk': 'Najnovejši pristopi za generacijo vprašanj (QG) pogosto uporabljajo okvir od zaporedja do zaporedja (Seq2Seq) za optimizacijo verjetnosti log vprašanj o osnovni resnici z uporabo prisilnega učitelja. Vendar pa je ta cilj usposabljanja v neskladju z dejansko kakovostjo vprašanja, ki se pogosto odraža z določenimi globalnimi lastnostmi, kot je, ali je na vprašanje mogoče odgovoriti z dokumentom. Tako neposredno optimiziramo za cilje, specifične za QG, prek učenja okrepitve za izboljšanje kakovosti vprašanj. Zasnovamo tri različne nagrade, katerih cilj je izboljšanje tekočosti, ustreznosti in odgovornosti nastalih vprašanj. Poleg temeljite analize izvajamo avtomatične in človeške ocene, da bi raziskali učinek vsake nagrade, specifične za QG. Ugotavljamo, da optimizacija nagrad za posamezna vprašanja na splošno vodi k boljši uspešnosti pri samodejnih meritvah ocenjevanja. Vendar pa samo nagrade, ki so dobro povezane s človeško presojo (npr. pomembnostjo), vodijo do resničnega izboljšanja kakovosti vprašanja. Optimizacija za druge, zlasti odgovornost, uvaja nepravilno pristranskost v model, kar ima za posledico slabšo kakovost vprašanj. Koda je javno dostopna na spletni strani: https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'he': 'דור השאלות האחרונות (QG) מתקרבים לעיתים קרובות להשתמש במסגרת רצף לרצף (Seq2Seq) כדי לאופטימיזם את סבירות היומן של שאלות אמת קרקע באמצעות הכוח המורה. However, this training objective is inconsistent with actual question quality, which is often reflected by certain global properties such as whether the question can be answered by the document.  ככה, אנו אופטימים ישירות למטרות ספציפיות של QG דרך לימוד תגבורה לשפר איכות שאלות. אנחנו מעצבים שלושה פרסים שונים כי המטרה לשפר את הנוזל, הרלוונטיות, והעניינות של שאלות יוצרות. אנו מבצעים גם ערכות אוטומטיות וגם אנושיות בנוסף לניתוח יסודי כדי לחקור את השפעה של כל פרס מסוים לכל QG. אנו מוצאים שהאופטימיזם על פרסים ספציפיים לשאלות בדרך כלל מוביל להופעה טובה יותר במטריקות הערכה אוטומטית. עם זאת, רק הפרסים שמתאימים היטב לשיפוט אנושי (למשל רלוונטיות) מובילים לשיפור אמיתי באיכות ספק. אופטימיזם עבור האחרים, במיוחד היכולת לענות, מציג חיזוק לא נכון למודל, מה שמוביל באיכות שאלות גרועה יותר. הקוד זמין לציבור ב https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.', 'ha': "Makarin QG na farko (QG) za'a yi amfani da firam-biyu-sequence (Seq2Seq) don a baƙara lokacin logogi masu yiwur maswalin gaskiya na amfani da macallin ya lazimta. A lokacin da, wannan objecti na amfani da shi bai daidai ba da wani nau'in tambayar da gaske, wanda aka ƙayyade shi a ƙayyade wasu properties masu cikin duniya, kamar idan an iya karɓa wa tambayin da takardan. Kamar wannan, Muke iya ƙayyade wajen abu na QG masu ƙayyade Muke kasarar sakamakon uku masu turu wanda ke so dõmin ya ƙara mafaniki, muhimmada, kuma masu jibar da masu tambayar da aka ƙãga. Munã tafiyar da rabo farat-farat da mutum, da kuma kuma, ana ƙara anayyar da gwargwadon, dõmin mu nẽmi aikin duk sakamakon QG-ƙayyadadde. Tuna gane cewa mafiya kyauta a kan sakamakon da aka ƙayyade tambayar, ko da yaushe, yana ƙara wa mafiya kyauta a cikin metric muhalli farat ɗaya. Kuma amma sakamakon wanda yake yin husũma da hukuncin mutãne ne mafi alhẽri a cikin matsayin gaskiya. Yi amfani da wa wasu, hususanci, masu jibar da su, yana ƙãga shirin ayuka mai maras inganci, kuma yana ƙara wa sifar da tambayar ta ƙaranci. Ana iya ƙayyade kodi da bayyane https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.", 'bo': 'འཕྲིན་དོན་མི་ཚང་མས་འདྲི་བ་དང་།QG(QG)ནི་གྲངས་སུ་གྲངས་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་རིམ་མཐུན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། འགྲོ་སློང་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ནི་དངོས་ཡོད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དངོས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་མཐུན་མེད། རྒྱ་ནག་ཀྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་QG་དམིགས་འབེབས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལ་ཐད་ཀར་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་རྒྱས་གཏོང་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལྟ་མཁན་གསུམ་གྱི་བསྡུར་རྩོལ་བ་དང་། གདོང་ཚོར་བ་དང་། གསར་བསྐྲད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་མཐུན་ས ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིའི་རྩོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་དང་མིའི་རྩོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་ལག་ལེན་གྱིས་གནད་གནད་མེད་སྒྲིལ་ལས་ཇ ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བ་ནི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་གཞན་མིན་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་སྐྱོ ཡིན་ནའང་མིའི་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་མཐར་འཁྲིད་དག་ནི་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། གཞན་པ་ཚོ་ལ་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྣང་མེད་པར། ཁྱད་པར་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་མིན་འདུག སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁ་འབྱེད་སྤྱོད་མི་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/YuxiXie/RL-for-Question-Generation.'}
{'en': 'CHIME : Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Answering', 'ar': 'CHIME: شبكة ذاكرة هرمية متقاطعة للإجابة على أسئلة المراجعة التوليدية', 'pt': 'CHIME: Rede de memória hierárquica de passagem cruzada para resposta a perguntas de revisão generativa', 'fr': 'CHIME\xa0: Réseau de mémoire hiérarchique à passages croisés pour répondre aux questions de révision générative', 'es': 'CHIME: Red de memoria jerárquica de pasos cruzados para respuestas a preguntas de revisión generativa', 'ja': 'チャイム：生成的レビュー質問の回答のためのクロスパスヒエラルキーメモリネットワーク', 'zh': 'CHIME:生成式审问答跨道分层记网络', 'hi': 'CHIME: क्रॉस-पैसेज पदानुक्रमित मेमोरी नेटवर्क जेनरेटर समीक्षा प्रश्न उत्तर के लिए', 'ru': 'CHIME: Перекрестная иерархическая сеть памяти для ответа на вопрос о генеративном обзоре', 'ga': 'CHIME: Líonra Cuimhne Ordlathach Trasliachta le haghaidh Freagra Ceist Athbhreithnithe Giniteach', 'el': 'Διασταύρωση Ιεραρχικού Δικτύου Μνήμης για την Απαντήρηση Ερωτήσεων Γενετικής Αναθεώρησης', 'ka': 'CHIME', 'hu': 'CHIME: Átlépő hierarchikus memóriahálózat generációs felülvizsgálat kérdéseinek megválaszolásához', 'lt': 'CHIME: Hierarchinės atminties tinklas, skirtas atsakymui į visuotinę peržiūrą', 'kk': 'CHIME: Жасау сұрақтарының жауап беру үшін гиеррафикалық жады желі', 'it': 'CHIME: Rete di memoria gerarchica trasversale per la risposta alle domande di revisione generativa', 'mk': 'ХИМЕ: Мрежа за хиерархиска меморија за одговори на прашањата за генеративно прегледување', 'ms': 'CHIME: Rangkaian Memori Hierarkikal Cross-passage untuk Jawapan Pertanyaan Periksaan Jeneral', 'mn': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Response', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- പാസ്സേജ് ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d മെമ്മറി നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് ജെനററിവ് റിവിയോവ് ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു', 'mt': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Answering', 'pl': 'CHIME: Sieć pamięci hierarchicznej krzyżowej dla odpowiedzi na pytania generacyjne', 'no': 'CHIME: Hierarisk minnetverk for å svara på spørsmål om generering', 'ro': 'CHIME: Rețeaua de memorie ierarhică transversală pentru răspunsul la întrebări de revizuire generativă', 'si': 'CHIME: ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව සඳහා', 'sr': 'КИМЕ: Хирархична мећинска мрежа за реагиране на питање генеривне прегледање', 'so': 'CHIME: Shabakada kors-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Questions', 'sv': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network för Generative Review Fråga Svar', 'ta': 'CHIME: கிராஸ்- கடவுச் செல்லும் பொதுவான கேள்வி பதில்', 'ur': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Answering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Các câu hỏi trả lời cho câu hỏi thăm dò', 'bg': 'ЧИМЕ: Кръстопасна йерархична памет мрежа за генеративен преглед Отговаряне на въпроси', 'da': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Spørgsmål Besvarelse', 'hr': 'CHIME: Hierarična mreža pamćenja preko prolaza za odgovor na pitanja generativne revizije', 'nl': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchisch Geheugennetwerk voor het beantwoorden van Generatieve Review Questions', 'de': 'CHIME: Cross-Passage Hierarchical Memory Network für die Beantwortung generativer Überprüfungsfragen', 'ko': 'CHIME: 생성적인 복습 퀴즈를 위한 다중 채널 차원 기억 네트워크', 'id': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Answering', 'fa': 'CHIME: شبکه حافظه\u200cهای حافظه\u200cهای زیادی برای جواب سوال تحقیقات نسل', 'tr': 'CHIME: Çoklu geçiş Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Cevap', 'sq': 'Rrjeti Hierarkik i Kujtimeve për përgjigjet e pyetjeve të shqyrtimit gjenerativ', 'sw': 'CHIME: Mtandao wa Kumbukumbu ya Kupitia Cross-Pass Hierarchical Network for Generative Review Question Answering', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'az': 'CHIME: Yenilmə Gözləmə sualına cavab vermək üçün qarşılıqlı hiyerarşik Yadın Ağığı', 'hy': 'Հիերախիկ հիշողության ցանցը գեներատիվ վերանայման հարցերի պատասխանների համար', 'bn': 'CHIME: জেনারেটিভ রিভিউ প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'CHIME: Hierarchical Memory Network za odgovor na pitanja generativne revizije', 'ca': 'CHIME: Rede de Memoria Hierarquica per respondre a preguntes de revisió generativa', 'cs': 'CHIME: Křížová hierarchická paměťová síť pro zodpovězení otázek generačního přezkumu', 'et': 'CHIME: Ristkäiguline hierarhiline mäluvõrk generatiivse ülevaate küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Answering', 'jv': 'START', 'he': 'רשת הזיכרון היררכית במעבר הצלב', 'sk': 'CHIME: Prehodna hierarhična spominska mreža za generativni pregled odgovorov na vprašanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'CHIME: Cross-passage Hierarchical Memory Network for Generative Review Question Answering'}
{'en': 'We introduce CHIME, a cross-passage hierarchical memory network for question answering (QA) via text generation. It extends XLNet introducing an auxiliary memory module consisting of two components : the context memory collecting cross-passage evidences, and the answer memory working as a buffer continually refining the generated answers. Empirically, we show the efficacy of the proposed architecture in the multi-passage generative QA, outperforming the state-of-the-art baselines with better syntactically well-formed answers and increased precision in addressing the questions of the AmazonQA review dataset. An additional qualitative analysis revealed the interpretability introduced by the memory module.', 'ar': 'نقدم CHIME ، وهي شبكة ذاكرة هرمية متقاطعة للإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) عبر توليد النص. إنه يوسع XLNet مقدمًا وحدة ذاكرة مساعدة تتكون من مكونين: ذاكرة السياق التي تجمع أدلة المرور المتقاطع ، وذاكرة الإجابة التي تعمل كمخزن مؤقت يعمل على تحسين الإجابات المتولدة باستمرار. من الناحية التجريبية ، نظهر فعالية البنية المقترحة في ضمان الجودة التوليدي متعدد الممرات ، متفوقة على أحدث خطوط الأساس بإجابات منسقة بشكل جيد من الناحية التركيبية ودقة متزايدة في معالجة أسئلة مجموعة بيانات مراجعة AmazonQA. كشف تحليل نوعي إضافي عن القابلية للتفسير التي قدمتها وحدة الذاكرة.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o CHIME, uma rede de memória hierárquica de passagem cruzada para resposta a perguntas (QA) via geração de texto. Ele estende o XLNet introduzindo um módulo de memória auxiliar composto por dois componentes: a memória de contexto coletando evidências de passagem cruzada e a memória de resposta funcionando como um buffer refinando continuamente as respostas geradas. Empiricamente, mostramos a eficácia da arquitetura proposta no QA generativo de várias passagens, superando as linhas de base de última geração com melhores respostas sintaticamente bem formadas e maior precisão ao abordar as questões do conjunto de dados de revisão do AmazonQA. Uma análise qualitativa adicional revelou a interpretabilidade introduzida pelo módulo de memória.', 'es': 'Presentamos CHIME, una red de memoria jerárquica de pasos cruzados para responder preguntas (QA) a través de la generación de texto. Extiende XLnet introduciendo un módulo de memoria auxiliar que consta de dos componentes: la memoria de contexto que recoge evidencias de pasajes cruzados y la memoria de respuestas que funciona como un búfer que refina continuamente las respuestas generadas. Empíricamente, demostramos la eficacia de la arquitectura propuesta en el control de calidad generativo de múltiples pasos, superando a las líneas de base de vanguardia con mejores respuestas sintácticamente bien formadas y una mayor precisión al abordar las preguntas del conjunto de datos de revisión de AmazonQA. Un análisis cualitativo adicional reveló la interpretabilidad introducida por el módulo de memoria.', 'fr': "Nous présentons CHIME, un réseau de mémoire hiérarchique à passages croisés pour la réponse aux questions (AQ) via la génération de texte. Il étend XLnet en introduisant un module de mémoire auxiliaire composé de deux composants\xa0: la mémoire contextuelle collectant les preuves de passage croisé, et la mémoire de réponse fonctionnant comme un tampon affinant continuellement les réponses générées. De manière empirique, nous démontrons l'efficacité de l'architecture proposée dans l'assurance qualité générative à passages multiples, surpassant les lignes de base de pointe avec de meilleures réponses syntaxiquement bien formées et une précision accrue dans la réponse aux questions de l'ensemble de données d'évaluation AmazonQA. Une analyse qualitative supplémentaire a révélé l'interprétabilité introduite par le module de mémoire.", 'ja': 'テキスト生成を介した質問応答（ QA ）のためのクロスパス階層メモリネットワークであるCHIMEを紹介します。これは、XLNetを拡張し、2つのコンポーネントからなる補助メモリモジュールを導入します。コンテキストメモリは、クロスパスエビデンスを収集し、回答メモリは、バッファとして機能し、生成された回答を継続的に改善します。実証的に、私たちは、マルチパス生成QAで提案されたアーキテクチャの有効性を示し、より良い構文的に適切な回答と、AmazonQAレビューデータセットの質問に対処する精度の向上で、最先端のベースラインを上回ります。追加の定性分析により、メモリモジュールによって導入された解釈可能性が明らかになった。', 'zh': '余言CHIME,此一跨道之分记网络,以文本问答(QA)。 广其XLNet,引一组件佐存储器模块:收交道上下文存储器,及为缓冲区不断完善答案存储器。 以经验言之,开示所陈架构于多通道生 QA 之有效性,语法上式善对益高之决 AmazonQA 审数集之精,优于先进之基线。 其一定性分析揭存储模块引入之可解释性。', 'hi': 'हम CHIME, पाठ पीढ़ी के माध्यम से प्रश्न उत्तर (QA) के लिए एक क्रॉस-मार्ग पदानुक्रमित स्मृति नेटवर्क पेश करते हैं। यह XLNet को दो घटकों से मिलकर एक सहायक मेमोरी मॉड्यूल पेश करने का विस्तार करता है: संदर्भ स्मृति क्रॉस-पैसेज सबूत एकत्र करती है, और उत्तर स्मृति एक बफर के रूप में काम करती है जो लगातार उत्पन्न उत्तरों को परिष्कृत करती है। अनुभवजन्य रूप से, हम बहु-मार्ग जननात्मक क्यूए में प्रस्तावित वास्तुकला की प्रभावकारिता दिखाते हैं, बेहतर वाक्यात्मक रूप से अच्छी तरह से गठित उत्तरों के साथ अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं को पछाड़ते हैं और AmazonQA समीक्षा डेटासेट के प्रश्नों को संबोधित करने में बढ़ी हुई सटीकता में वृद्धि करते हैं। एक अतिरिक्त गुणात्मक विश्लेषण ने मेमोरी मॉड्यूल द्वारा पेश की गई व्याख्याता का खुलासा किया।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем CHIME, иерархическую сеть иерархической памяти для ответов на вопросы (QA) через генерацию текста. Он расширяет XLNet, вводя вспомогательный модуль памяти, состоящий из двух компонентов: контекстная память, собирающая доказательства перекрестного прохода, и память ответов, работающая в качестве буфера, постоянно уточняющего сгенерированные ответы. Эмпирически мы показываем эффективность предлагаемой архитектуры в многопроходном генеративном QA, превосходящем современные базовые линии с лучшими синтаксически хорошо сформированными ответами и повышенной точностью при решении вопросов набора данных обзора AmazonQA. Дополнительный качественный анализ выявил интерпретируемость, введенную модулем памяти.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid CHIME i láthair, líonra cuimhne ordlathach tras-sliocht le haghaidh freagraí ceisteanna (QA) trí ghiniúint téacs. Leathnaíonn sé XLNet ag tabhairt isteach modúl cuimhne cúnta ina bhfuil dhá chomhpháirt: an chuimhne comhthéacs ag bailiú fianaise tras-sliocht, agus an chuimhne freagartha ag obair mar mhaolán ag scagadh na bhfreagraí ginte go leanúnach. Go heimpíreach, léirímid éifeachtúlacht na hailtireachta molta sa QA giniúna ilphasáiste, ag déanamh níos fearr ná na bunlínte úrscothacha le freagraí níos fearr atá déanta go síntach agus beachtas méadaithe maidir le dul i ngleic le ceisteanna ó thacar sonraí athbhreithnithe AmazonQA. Léirigh anailís cháilíochtúil bhreise an inléirmhíniú a thug an modúl cuimhne isteach.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα δίκτυο ιεραρχικής μνήμης διασταυρούμενου περάσματος για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων (QA) μέσω της δημιουργίας κειμένου. Επεκτείνει το εισάγοντας μια βοηθητική ενότητα μνήμης που αποτελείται από δύο συστατικά: τη μνήμη περιβάλλοντος που συλλέγει στοιχεία διασταυρούμενης διέλευσης, και τη μνήμη απαντήσεων που λειτουργεί ως προσωρινή μνήμη βελτιώνοντας συνεχώς τις παραγόμενες απαντήσεις. Εμπειρικά, καταδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης αρχιτεκτονικής στην παραγωγική QA πολλαπλών περάσεων, ξεπερνώντας τις υπερσύγχρονες γραμμές βάσης με καλύτερες συντακτικά καλοσχηματισμένες απαντήσεις και αυξημένη ακρίβεια στην αντιμετώπιση των ερωτήσεων του συνόλου δεδομένων ανασκόπησης AmazonQA. Μια πρόσθετη ποιοτική ανάλυση αποκάλυψε τη δυνατότητα ερμηνείας που εισήγαγε η μονάδα μνήμης.', 'kk': 'Мәтін құрылымыз арқылы сұрақ жауап беру (QA) үшін CHIME- ді, жұмыс жұмыс иерархиялық жады желіне келтіреміз. Бұл XLNet- ді екі компоненттің құрамындағы көмектесу жады модулін кеңейту үшін кеңейтеді: көмектесу жады құрамындағы көмектесу жады: көмектесу жады құрамындағы жауаптарды жинау жады және жауап жады буфе Эмпериялық, біз көп жұмыс құрылғысының көп жұмыс құрылғысының эффективнігін көрсетедік. Бұл көп жұмыс құрылғысының көп жұмыс құрылғысын синтактикалық жауаптары мен AmazonQA қарау деректер жиынының сұрақтарын шешу үшін дұр Қосымша квалификациялық анализ жады модулінің толқындылығын көрсетті.', 'it': "Introducemo CHIME, una rete di memoria gerarchica trasversale per rispondere alle domande (QA) tramite generazione di testo. Si estende XLNet introducendo un modulo di memoria ausiliario composto da due componenti: la memoria di contesto che raccoglie evidenze di passaggio incrociato, e la memoria di risposta che funziona come buffer affinando continuamente le risposte generate. Empiricamente, mostriamo l'efficacia dell'architettura proposta nel QA generativo multi-passaggio, superando le linee di base all'avanguardia con risposte sintatticamente ben formate e una maggiore precisione nell'affrontare le domande del set di dati di revisione AmazonQA. Un'ulteriore analisi qualitativa ha rivelato l'interpretabilità introdotta dal modulo di memoria.", 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a CHIME-t, egy átjáró hierarchikus memóriahálózatot, amely szöveggenerálással segíti a kérdések megválaszolását (QA). Az XLNet kiterjesztése egy kiegészítő memória modult vezet be, amely két komponensből áll: a kontextusmemória, amely összegyűjti a keresztjárási bizonyítékokat, és a válasz memória, amely pufferként működik, folyamatosan finomítja a generált válaszokat. Empirikusan bemutatjuk a javasolt architektúra hatékonyságát a többjáratos generációs minőségben, túllépve a legkorszerűbb alapvonalakat, jobb szintaktikailag jól kialakított válaszokkal és nagyobb pontossággal az AmazonQA felülvizsgálati adatkészlet kérdéseinek kezelésében. Egy további minőségi elemzés feltárta a memóriamodul által bevezetett értelmezhetőséget.', 'mk': 'We introduce CHIME, a cross-passage hierarchical memory network for question answering (QA) via text generation.  It extends XLNet introducing an auxiliary memory module consisting of two components: the context memory collecting cross-passage evidences, and the answer memory working as a buffer continually refining the generated answers.  Импирски, ја покажуваме ефикасноста на предложената архитектура во многупасната генерација на QA, надминувајќи ги најсовремените бази линии со подобри синтактички добро формирани одговори и зголемена прецизност во решавањето на прашањата на AmazonQA прегледот податоци. Дополнителна квалитетна анализа ја откри интерпретабилноста воведена од модулот на меморијата.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame CHIME, kryžminį hierarchinį atminties tinklą, skirtą atsakyti į klausimus (QA) per teksto kūrimą. Jis išplečia XLNet, kuriame įdiegiamas papildomas atminties modulis, sudarytas iš dviejų komponentų: kontekstinės atminties, surinkančios kryžminius įrodymus, ir atsakymo atminties, veikiančios kaip buferis, nuolat tobulinant gautus atsakymus. Empiriškai mes parodome siūlomos architektūros veiksmingumą daugiapakopės kartos QA srityje, viršijant naujausias bazines linijas su geriau sintetiškai gerai suformuotais atsakymais ir didesniu tikslumu sprendžiant AmazonQA peržiūros duomenų rinkinio klausimus. An additional qualitative analysis revealed the interpretability introduced by the memory module.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan CHIME, rangkaian memori hierarkik melintas untuk menjawab soalan (QA) melalui generasi teks. It extends XLNet introducing an auxiliary memory module consisting of two components: the context memory collecting cross-passage evidences, and the answer memory working as a buffer continually refining the generated answers.  Empirikal, kita menunjukkan kegunaan arkitektur yang diusulkan dalam QA generatif berbilang-laluan, melebihi garis dasar state-of-the-art dengan jawapan yang lebih baik secara sintaktif dan lebih tepat dalam menjalankan soalan set data ulasan AmazonQA. Analisis kualitatif tambahan menunjukkan kemampuan interpretasi yang diperkenalkan oleh modul memori.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu CHIME, netwerk ta’ memorja ġerarkika trasversali għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) permezz tal-ġenerazzjoni tat-test. Hija testendi XLNet billi tintroduċi modulu awżiljarju tal-memorja li jikkonsisti f’żewġ komponenti: il-memorja tal-kuntest li tiġbor evidenzi ta’ passaġġ trasversali, u l-memorja tar-risposta li taħdem bħala buffer li kontinwament irfina t-tweġibiet iġġenerati. Empirikament, nagħmlu evidenza tal-effikaċja tal-arkitettura proposta fil-QA ġenerattiva b’diversi passaġġi, li taqbeż il-linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati bi tweġibiet iffurmati tajjeb b’mod sintetiku u aktar preċiżjoni fl-indirizzar tal-mistoqsijiet tas-sett ta’ dejta ta’ reviżjoni tal-AmazonQA. Analiżi kwalitattiva addizzjonali żvelat l-interpretabbiltà introdotta mill-modulu tal-memorja.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയിലൂടെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനായി ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു ക്രിസ്സ് പാസ്സേജ് ഹിയറേര്\u200dരിക്കല്\u200d മെമ രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d മെമ്മറി ഘടകം എക്സ്\u200cഎല്\u200dനെറ്റിനെ പരിശീലനം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ക്രിസ്പേജ് തെളിവുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആർക്കിട്ടറിക്കാരുടെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മൾ കാണിച്ചു തരുന്നു. ക്യൂഎയുടെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് - ആര്\u200dട്ട് ബെസ്റ്റെലൈനുകളുടെ സ്ഥാനത്ത് പുറത്ത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്ക ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d ക്വാലിറ്റിവേറ്റിവിലാസം മെമ്മറി ഘടകം തുടങ്ങിയ വ്യാഖ്യാനം വെളിപ്പെടുത്തി.', 'mn': 'Бид CHIME-г текст үеийн аргаар асуулт хариулах (QA) сүлжээний гишүүн дурсамжийн сүлжээнд танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь XLNet-г хоёр компонентүүдийн тусламжтай санамжийн модуль болгож нэмэгдүүлдэг. Хариултын санамж нь хэлбэрээр дамжуулан хамтын тодорхойлолтуудыг цуглуулж, хариултын санамж буфер гэж ажилладаг. Харин үнэндээ бид олон дахь архитектурын үр дүнг харуулж, урлагийн үндсэн шугам дээр илүү сайн хариулттай болж, AmazonQA шинэчлэлийн өгөгдлийн сангийн асуултыг олон дахь хугацаанд нэмэгдүүлсэн архитектурын үр дүнг харуулж байна. Нэг нэмэлт чанартай шинжилгээ нь санамжийн модуль дамжуулагдсан ойлголтыг харуулсан.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy CHIME, przejściową hierarchiczną sieć pamięci do odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) poprzez generowanie tekstu. Rozszerza XLNet wprowadzając dodatkowy moduł pamięci składający się z dwóch składników: pamięci kontekstowej zbierającej dowody przejściowe oraz pamięci odpowiedzi działającej jako bufor stale udoskonalającej generowane odpowiedzi. Empirycznie pokazujemy skuteczność proponowanej architektury w wieloparszowym generatywnym QA, przewyższając najnowocześniejsze linie bazowe dzięki lepszym składniowo dobrze sformułowanym odpowiedziom i zwiększonej precyzji w odpowiedzi na pytania zbioru danych przeglądowych AmazonQA. Dodatkowa analiza jakościowa ujawniła interpretację wprowadzoną przez moduł pamięci.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer CHIME, eit hierarkisk minnetverk for å svara på spørsmål (QA) via tekstgenerering. Det utvidar XLNet som introduserer ein hjelpeminnmodul som inneheld to komponentar: kontekstminnet som samler gjennomgang, og svarminnet som arbeidar som buffer som kontinuerleg refiner dei genererte svara. I tidspunktet viser vi effektiviteten av den foreslåde arkitekturen i den fleire passasjonsgenerative QA, som utfører tilstanden av kunstbaselinjene med betre syntaksisk gode svar og øker nøyaktighet i å handtera spørsmålene på AmazonQA-oversiktdatasettet. Ein ekstra kvalitativ analyse viste uttolkingsbehandlinga som er introdusert av minnemodulen.', 'ro': 'Introducem CHIME, o rețea de memorie ierarhică transversală pentru răspunsul la întrebări (QA) prin generarea de text. Acesta extinde XLNet introducând un modul de memorie auxiliară format din două componente: memoria contextuală care colectează dovezi de trecere încrucișată, iar memoria răspunsurilor care funcționează ca tampon perfecționând continuu răspunsurile generate. Din punct de vedere empiric, arătăm eficacitatea arhitecturii propuse în QA generativ multi-pasaje, depășind liniile de bază de ultimă generație, cu răspunsuri sintactice mai bine formate și o precizie sporită în abordarea întrebărilor setului de date de revizuire AmazonQA. O analiză calitativă suplimentară a relevat interpretabilitatea introdusă de modulul de memorie.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo CHIME, hijerarhičku mrežu pamćenja preko prolaza za odgovor na pitanje (QA) preko tekstske generacije. Proširi XLNet koji predstavlja pomoæni modul pamćenja koji se sastoji od dva komponenta: kontekstska pamćenja koja skuplja dokaze o krstoprolazu, i pamćenje odgovora koji radi kao buffer stalno refineruje proizvedene odgovore. Empirički, pokazujemo efikasnost predložene arhitekture u generičnoj multiprolaznoj generiji QA, nadmašujući stanje umjetničkih osnovnih linija sa boljim sintaktički dobro formiranim odgovorima i povećanjem preciznosti u rješavanju pitanja seta podataka AmazonQA za pregled. Dodatna kvalitativna analiza otkrila je interpretabilnost uvedenu u modul sećanja.', 'si': 'අපි CHIME විශ්වාස කරනවා, පැත්තක් විශාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය (QA) වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ ඒක XLNet විස්තර කරනවා සඳහා අයිතික මතක මොඩියෝල් එකක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් තියෙනවා: සම්පූර්ණ මතකයා ක්\u200dරිස්පාස් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාව ප්\u200dරශ්ණත QA වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාව ප්\u200dරශ්ණත විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාව පෙන්ව තවත් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශ්ලේෂනයක් මතකය මොඩියුල් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් ව', 'so': "Waxaannu ku soo bandhignaynaa shabakadda xusuusta ee korsashada CHIME, kaas oo ah shabakadda xafiiska xusuusta ee su'aalaha ugu jawaaba QA qarniga qoraalka. Waxay fidisaa XLNet oo soo bandhigta qalabka xusuusta ah oo ka mid ah labo qeybood: xasuusta ku jirta oo soo ururiya calaamadaha baasaboorka, xusuusta jawaabta ka shaqeynaya sida buffer oo had iyo goorba u sawiraya jawaabaha dhashay. Xisaab ahaan, waxaan tusnaynaa saamaynta dhismaha la soo jeeday oo ku qoran karo wadamada farshaxanta badan ee QA, waxaana soo bixinaynaa qoraalka asalka-farshaxanta oo ka wanaagsan jawaabaha si saxda ah u sameynaya iyo si saxda ah loo kordhiyo xafiiska su'aalaha baaritaanka ee AmazonQA. Shahaado dheeraad ah waxaa lagu caddeeyey turjubaanka ku soo bandhigay moduleyda xusuusta.", 'sv': 'Vi introducerar CHIME, ett hierarkiskt minnesnätverk för frågesvar (QA) via textgenerering. Den utökar XLNet och introducerar en hjälpminnesmodul bestående av två komponenter: kontextminnet som samlar in korspassagebevis, och svarsminnet som arbetar som buffert kontinuerligt förfina de genererade svaren. Empiriskt visar vi effekten av den föreslagna arkitekturen i flerpassagsgenerativa QA, vilket överträffar de senaste baslinjerna med bättre syntaktiskt välformade svar och ökad precision när det gäller att hantera frågorna i AmazonQA granskningsdatauppsättningen. En ytterligare kvalitativ analys visade på den tolkning som minnesmodulen introducerar.', 'ta': 'நாம் கேள்விக்கு பதில் (QA) உரை உரை உருவாக்கத்தின் வழியாக கேள்வி பதில் செய்ய ஒரு கிரிஸ் கடவுச்செல்லும் மின்னஞ்சல Name வெற்றிகரமாக, நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பிரகாரத்தின் விளைவை பல- கடவுச்செயல் பொதுவான கியூஏவில் காட்டுகிறோம், மேலும் சிறந்த ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பதில்களை வெளியேற்ற ஒரு கூடுதல் குறிப்பிட்ட பரிசோதனை நினைவு கூற்றால் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழியை தெரிவித்தது.', 'ur': 'ہم CHIME کو متن نسل کے ذریعے ایک کرس-پاسج ہیراراریک میمور نیٹ ورک سے معرفی کرتے ہیں۔ یہ XLNet کو پھیلاتا ہے کہ دو قسمتوں میں شامل ایک مددگار یادگاری موڈیل کو معلوم کرتا ہے: کنٹکس یادگاری کرس-پاسج دکھائی جمع کرتی ہے، اور جواب یادگاری یادگاری بافر کے طور پر کام کرتی ہے جو پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم بہت سی سینٹیکٹی سے بہتر جواب دیتے ہیں اور آمازون کی آزمائش ڈاٹ سٹ کے سوال میں مضبوط مضبوطی سے زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں۔ ایک اضافہ کیلوٹیٹیو تحلیل نے مہمانی موڈل کے ذریعے معلوم ہونے والی تعبیر کی تعبیر کی ظاہر کی۔', 'ka': 'ჩვენ CHIME-ს ჩვენებთ, ტექსტის წარმოიქმნის გასაკითხველებისთვირაქტიური მეხსიერების ქსელი. ეს XLNet-ს გამოყენება, რომელიც ორი კომპონენტების შეფარდებული დახმარებელი მეხსიერების მოდულის შეფარდება: კონტექსტური მეხსიერები, რომელიც ძალიან დახმარებულია კონტექსტური მეხსიერები, და გა ჩვენ მრავალურად ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებულიან არქტიქტურის ეფექტიკურობას მრავალური გენერაციური QA-ში, რომელიც უფრო უკეთესი სინტაქტიურად მხოლოდ ფორმაციული პასუხებით და უფრო უფრო მხოლოდ გავა დამატებული კვალიტატიური ანალიზი გახსნა, რომ მეხსიერების მოდულიდან ჩვენებული ინტერუქტრებელობა.', 'uz': "Biz Matn generalidan savol javob berish uchun CHIME (QA) xotira tarmoqni koʻrsatimiz. Name Biz bir necha passage generativ QA davlat asosiy asosida yaxshi qo'llangan javoblarni ko'rsatumiz va AmazonQA maʼlumotlar soʻzlarini murakkab qilish uchun aniqlikni ko'rsamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu CHIME, một mạng lưới bộ nhớ cấp trên để trả lời câu hỏi (QA) qua hệ thống văn bản. Nó mở rộng XLet nhập một môđun bộ nhớ phụ thuộc gồm hai thành phần: bộ nhớ ngữ cảnh thu thập thập bằng chứng xuyên qua, và bộ nhớ trả lời hoạt động như một bộ đệm đang hoàn thiện các câu trả lời đã tạo ra. Nghiêm túc mà nói, chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng của kiến trúc được đề xuất trong QA hàng loạt các đường hầm, vượt trội các nền văn bản thời đại với các câu trả lời dễ hiểu hơn cấu hình cộng pháp và độ chính xác hơn trong việc giải quyết các câu hỏi của tập tin người Amazon. Một phân tích định chất thêm cho thấy sự giải thích được tạo ra bởi mô- đun trí nhớ.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer CHIME, et hierarkisk hukommelsesnetværk på tværs af passager til spørgsmål besvarelse (QA) via tekstgenerering. Det udvider XLNet indfører et ekstra hukommelsesmodul bestående af to komponenter: konteksthukommelsen, der indsamler tværs-passage beviser, og svarhukommelsen fungerer som en buffer løbende forfiner de genererede svar. Empirisk viser vi effektiviteten af den foreslåede arkitektur i multi-passage generative QA, hvilket overgår de state-of-the-art basislinjer med bedre syntaktisk velformede svar og øget præcision i behandlingen af spørgsmålene i AmazonQA review datasæt. En yderligere kvalitativ analyse afslørede den fortolkningsevne, der blev indført af hukommelsesmodulet.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме ХИМЕ, кръстосана йерархична памет мрежа за отговор на въпроси чрез генериране на текст. Тя разширява въвеждането на помощен модул за памет, състоящ се от два компонента: контекстната памет, събираща доказателства за кръстосан преход, и паметта на отговорите, работеща като буфер, непрекъснато усъвършенстваща генерираните отговори. Емпирично показваме ефикасността на предложената архитектура в многопреходната генеративна оценка на качеството, надминавайки най-съвременните базови линии с по-добри синтактично добре оформени отговори и повишена прецизност при решаването на въпросите от набора от данни за преглед. Допълнителен качествен анализ разкри интерпретацията, въведена от модула памет.', 'nl': 'We introduceren CHIME, een cross-passage hiërarchisch geheugennetwerk voor vragen beantwoorden (QA) via tekstgeneratie. Het breidt XLNet uit met een extra geheugenmodule bestaande uit twee componenten: het contextgeheugen dat cross-passage bewijsstukken verzamelt en het antwoordgeheugen werkt als buffer die voortdurend de gegenereerde antwoorden verfijnt. Empirisch tonen we de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde architectuur in de multi-passage generatieve QA, die de state-of-the-art baselines overtreft met betere syntactisch goed gevormde antwoorden en verhoogde precisie in het beantwoorden van de vragen van de AmazonQA review dataset. Een aanvullende kwalitatieve analyse toonde de interpreteerbaarheid van de geheugenmodule aan.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo CHIME, hijerarhičku mrežu pamćenja preko prolaza za odgovor na pitanje (QA) putem proizvodnje teksta. Proširi XLNet koji predstavlja pomoćni modul sjećanja koji se sastoji od dva komponenta: kontekstska sjećanja prikupljanja dokaze preko prolaza i uspomena odgovora koji radi kao buffer stalno refining proizvedene odgovore. Empirički, pokazujemo djelotvornost predložene arhitekture u generičnoj multiprolaznoj generiji QA, nadmašući početne linije stanja umjetnosti sa boljim sintaktički dobro formiranim odgovorima i povećanjem preciznosti u rješavanju pitanja podataka AmazonQA-a za pregled. Dodatna kvalitativna analiza otkrila je interpretabilnost uvedena modulom sjećanja.', 'id': 'We introduce CHIME, a cross-passage hierarchical memory network for question answering (QA) via text generation.  Hal ini memperluas XLNet memperkenalkan modul memori bantuan yang terdiri dari dua komponen: memori konteks yang mengumpulkan bukti-bukti cross-passage, dan memori jawaban yang bekerja sebagai buffer terus menerus memperbaiki jawaban yang dihasilkan. Empiris, kita menunjukkan efektivitas arsitektur yang diusulkan dalam QA generatif multi-passage, melampaui batas dasar state-of-the-art dengan jawaban yang lebih baik secara sintaktif dan lebih tepat dalam mengatasi pertanyaan dataset revisi AmazonQA. Analisi kualitatif tambahan mengungkapkan interpretabilitas yang diperkenalkan oleh modul memori.', 'de': 'Wir stellen CHIME vor, ein durchgängiges hierarchisches Speichernetzwerk zur Beantwortung von Fragen (QA) mittels Textgenerierung. Es erweitert XLNet um ein zusätzliches Speichermodul, das aus zwei Komponenten besteht: dem Kontextspeicher, der Cross-Passage-Beweise sammelt, und dem Antwortspeicher, der als Puffer arbeitet, der die generierten Antworten kontinuierlich verfeinert. Empirisch zeigen wir die Wirksamkeit der vorgeschlagenen Architektur in der generativen Qualitätssicherung mit mehreren Passagen und übertreffen die State-of-the-Art Baselines mit besseren syntaktisch gut geformten Antworten und erhöhter Präzision bei der Beantwortung der Fragen des AmazonQA Review Datasets. Eine zusätzliche qualitative Analyse ergab die Interpretierbarkeit des Speichermoduls.', 'ko': '퀴즈(QA)를 위한 다중 채널 계층형 스토리지 네트워크를 텍스트로 생성하는 CHIME를 소개합니다.이것은 XLNet을 확장하고 보조 저장 모듈을 도입했다. 이 모듈은 두 부분으로 구성되어 있다. 그것이 바로 크로스 채널 증거를 수집하는 상하문 저장 장치와 버퍼 구역으로서의 답안 저장 장치이다. 이 저장 장치는 생성된 답안을 끊임없이 보완한다.경험적으로 우리는 제시된 구조가 다중 채널 생성성 QA에서의 유효성을 보여줌으로써 가장 선진적인 기선보다 우수하고 문법 구조가 좋은 답안을 가지며 Amazon QA 평론 데이터 집합의 문제를 해결할 때 정밀도를 높였다.추가 정성 분석은 메모리 모듈이 도입한 해석성을 보여 주었다.', 'fa': 'ما CHIME را با توجه به نسل متن معرفی می کنیم، شبکه حافظه\u200cهای متوسط عبور برای جواب سوال (QA) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. آن XLNet را گسترش می\u200cدهد که یک مدول حافظه کمک را معرفی می\u200cکند که شامل دو بخش است: حافظه حافظه\u200cای که نشانه\u200cهای عبارت عبارت\u200cگذاری را جمع می\u200cکند، و حافظه پاسخی که همیشه به عنوان بافر کار می\u200cکند پاسخ\u200cهای تولید را در حقیقت، ما فعالیت معماری پیشنهاد را در ژنرال زیادی QA نشان می دهیم، که در حالت پایگاه هنری با جواب های بهتر سینتیکی ساخته شده و دقیق افزایش در درباره سوالات داده های بازرسی آمازون QA است. یک تحلیل کیفیت اضافه، قابلیت تعبیر توسط مدول حافظه معرفی شد.', 'tr': "CHIME'i, metin döredilmesi görä soraglamak üçin bir iýerarhiýa yadaky a ňlasyny tanyşdyrýarys Bu, XLNet'i iki komponenten oluşan yardımcı bir an ım modülünü ekleýär: geçiş önünde geçiş kanıtları toplamak için kontekst anımı ve üretilgen cevapları sürekli buffer olarak işleýär. Iň görä, biz multi-ýüze üýtgeden arhitektura etkinlik etkinleşigini görkeýäris, sungatyň durumyny gowy syntaksiýa gowy döredilen jogabalary bilen çykyp, we AmazonQA görüş veri setiriniň soraglaryny çözmekde has baglanýardyk. Goşmaça kwalitet analysi yada modul tarapyndan çykyşlygyny görkezildi.", 'af': "Ons introduiseer CHIME, 'n kruis- passage hierarkies geheue netwerk vir vraag antwoord (QA) deur teks generasie. Dit verbeter XLNet wat 'n hulpbron geheue module voorsien wat bestaan van twee komponente: die konteks geheue wat kruis- pasgewysigings versamel, en die antwoord geheue wat werk as 'n buffer gedurigdeur die genereerde antwoorde verfris. In die leërskap, wys ons die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde arkitektuur in die multi-passage genereerbare QA, wat die staat-van-die-kuns baselyne uitvoer met beter sintaktisies goed-formeerde antwoordes en vergroot presisie in die onderwerp van die vrae van die AmazonQA oorskou datastel. 'n Addisionele kwaliteit analiseer het die uitleggbare verduidelikheid vertoon deur die geheue module.", 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha CHIME, Mtandao wa kumbukumbu unaohusika kwa ajili ya kujibu maswali (QA) kupitia kizazi cha maandishi. Inaongezea XLNet kuingiza kiungo cha kumbukumbu kinachojumuisha vifaa viwili: kumbukumbu ya muktadha ikikusanya ushahidi wa kupitia mpito, na kumbukumbu iliyofanya kazi kama bufferi ikiendelea kuboresha majibu yaliyozaliwa. Kwa ujumla, tunaonyesha ufanisi wa majengo yaliyopendekezwa katika Jenerali la Umoja wa Kupitia njia mbalimbali ya QA, kuonyesha misingi ya hali ya sanaa yenye majibu mazuri ya pamoja na kuongezeka kwa urahisi katika kujadili maswali ya seti ya kurekebisha taarifa za AmazonQA. Uchambuzi wa ziada wa sifa ulionyesha tafsiri iliyotolewa na module ya kumbukumbu.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë CHIME, një rrjet hierarkik të kujtesës për përgjigjen e pyetjeve (QA) nëpërmjet gjenerimit të tekstit. Ajo zgjeron XLNet duke paraqitur një modul kujtese ndihmëse që përbëhet nga dy komponente: kujtesa kontekstike që mbledh provat e kalimit të kryqëzuar dhe kujtesa e përgjigjeve që punon si një buffer duke rafinuar vazhdimisht përgjigjet e gjeneratuara. Empirikisht, ne tregojmë efektshmërinë e arkitekturës së propozuar në QA gjenerative me shumë pasazhe, duke tejkaluar linjat bazë më të larta me përgjigje më të mirë sintetikisht të formuara dhe presion në rritje në trajtimin e pyetjeve të dataset të shqyrtimit të AmazonQA. Një analizë shtesë kualitative zbuloi interpretueshmërinë e futur nga moduli i kujtesës.', 'am': 'በጽሑፍ ትውልድ ለመመልስ (QA) የጥያቄ መልስ ጥያቄን የክሪሜን የሥርዓት ማህበረሰብ መረብ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የXLNet ምርጫዎች በሁለቱ ክፍሎች ውስጥ የሚቆጠሩ የአስታወቀ ማሰሪያ ሞዴል ሲያስቀምጥ ያሰፋል፤ የሥርዓት መግለጫ ማስረጃ ማሰሪያ እና የመስጠት ማስታወሻ ዘወትር የተፈጠረውን መልስ በመጠቀም ላይ የሚሠራውን ማስታወስ ይዘረጋል። በተፈቀደው የመዝገብ ግንኙነት የ-የ-የዓርት መሠረት ግንኙነት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪው ምርጫዎች በማስታወስ ሞኮል የተገኘውን ትርጉም ይገልጣል።', 'bn': 'টেক্সট প্রজন্মের মাধ্যমে প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদানের জন্য আমরা চিমেকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি। এটি এক্সএলেন্ট এক্সএলনেটকে প্রসারিত করে দুই কম্পোনেটরের মধ্যে একটি অনুসারী মেমরি মডিউল উল্লেখ করে: প্রেক্ষিত মেমরি সংগ্রহ করে ক্রাস-পাসেজ প্রমাণ সংগ্রহ করে  ক্ষমতাশালীন ভাবে আমরা প্রস্তাবিত প্রতিষ্ঠানের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি মাল্টিপাসেজ জ জেনারেটিভ কিউ এ-রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের বেসেলাইনের সাথে আরো সুন্দরিকভাবে সংক্রান্ত উত্তর দ একটি অতিরিক্ত পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণ স্মৃতি মডিউল দ্বারা পরিচিত অনুবাদ প্রকাশ করেছে।', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք CHMIE-ը, հատվածային հիերարխիկ հիշողության ցանցը հարցերի պատասխանելու համար տեքստի ստեղծման միջոցով: Այն ընդլայնում է XLNet-ը, ներկայացնելով օգնական հիշողության մոդուլը, որը կազմված է երկու բաղադրամասերից. կոնտեքստի հիշողությունը, որը հավաքում է հատվածային ապացույցներ, և պատասխանի հիշողությունը, որը շարունակ աշխատում է որպես բյուֆ Իմպերիկապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս նախագծված ճարտարապետության արդյունավետությունը բազմահատված սերունդ QA-ում, որը գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր հիմքի գծերը ավելի լավ սինտակտիկապես լավ ձևավորված պատասխաններով և ավելի ճշգրիտ է Amazon QA-ի վերլուծության տվյալների համակարգի հարցերի լուծման Ավելի որակային վերլուծությունը բացահայտեց հիշողության մոդուլների ներդրված մեկնաբանելիությունը:', 'az': "Biz CHIME'i, mətn nəsili vasitəsilə soruşmaq üçün bir hiyerarşik yaddaş a ğını tanıdırıq. Bu XLNet iki komponentdən oluşan yardımcı yaddaş modulu təşkil edir: dağılış yaddaşlarını birləşdirir, və təşkil edilmiş cavabları həmişəlik buffer olaraq işləyən cavab yaddaşı. İmparatorlıq olaraq, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz arhitektüyün çoxlu-keçici QA generativlərində effektivliyini göstəririk, daha yaxşı sintaktik olaraq daha yaxşı cavab verən və AmazonQA verilənlərin suallarını çəkmək üçün daha məqsədilik art ırdıq. Əlavə kvalitativ analizi yada modulu ilə təşkil edilən yorumluluğu göstərdi.", 'ca': "Introduïm CHIME, una xarxa de memòria jeràrquica per respondre preguntes (QA) a través de la generació de text. Estén XLNet introduint un módul de memòria auxiliar compost de dos components: la memòria contextual recollint evidències de passage cruzado, i la memòria de resposta funcionant com un buffer refinant continuament les respostes generades. Empiricament, demostram l'eficacia de l'arquitectura proposada en la QA generadora de múltiples passatges, superant les línies de base d'última generació amb respostes millors sinàcticament ben formades i més precisió en abordar les preguntes del conjunt de dades d'revisió AmazonQA. Una anàlisi qualitativa adicional va revelar la interpretabilitat introduïda pel módul de memòria.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo CHIME, hijerarhičku mrežu pamćenja preko prolaza za odgovor na pitanja (QA) preko tekstske generacije. Proširi XLNet koji predstavlja pomoćni modul sjećanja koji se sastoji od dva komponenta: kontekstska sjećanja prikupljanja dokaze o krstoprolazu, i uspomena odgovora koji radi kao buffer stalno refineruje proizvedene odgovore. Empirički, pokazujemo djelotvornost predložene arhitekture u generativnoj multiprolaznoj generiji QA, nadmašujući stanju umjetničkih osnovnih linija sa boljim sintaktički dobro formiranim odgovorima i povećanjem preciznosti u rješavanju pitanja seta podataka AmazonQA-a za pregled. Dodatna kvalitativna analiza otkrila je interpretabilnost uvedena modulom sjećanja.', 'cs': 'Představujeme CHIME, hierarchickou paměťovou síť pro zodpovězení otázek (QA) prostřednictvím generování textu. Rozšiřuje XLNet o pomocný paměťový modul sestávající ze dvou složek: kontextové paměti shromažďující důkazy křížového průchodu a odpověď paměti pracující jako vyrovnávací paměť neustále zdokonalující generované odpovědi. Empiricky ukazujeme účinnost navržené architektury v multi-pasážovém generativním QA, která překonává nejmodernější základní linie s lepšími syntakticky dobře vytvořenými odpověďmi a zvýšenou přesností při řešení otázek recenzního datového souboru AmazonQA. Další kvalitativní analýza odhalila interpretovatelnost zavedená paměťovým modulem.', 'et': 'Tutvustame CHIME-i, ristkäigu hierarhilist mäluvõrku küsimustele vastamiseks tekstigeneratsiooni kaudu. See laiendab XLNeti, tutvustades abimälumoodulit, mis koosneb kahest komponendist: kontekstimälu, mis kogub ristkäigu tõendeid, ja vastusmälu, mis töötab puhvrina pidevalt genereeritud vastuseid rafineerides. Empiiriliselt näitame väljapakutud arhitektuuri efektiivsust mitmekäigulises generatiivses kvaliteedi tagamises, ületades uusimaid lähtejooni paremate süntaktiliselt hästi vormistatud vastustega ja suurema täpsusega AmazonQA ülevaate andmekogumi küsimuste lahendamisel. Täiendav kvalitatiivne analüüs näitas mälumooduli tõlgendatavust.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme CHIME:n, ristikkäisen hierarkkisen muistiverkon kysymyksenvalvontaa varten tekstintuotannon kautta. Se laajentaa XLNetiä tuomalla käyttöön apumuistimoduulin, joka koostuu kahdesta komponentista: kontekstimuistista, joka kerää poikkikulkutiedostoja, ja vastausmuistista, joka toimii puskurina ja jalostaa jatkuvasti luotuja vastauksia. Empiirisesti osoitamme ehdotetun arkkitehtuurin tehokkuuden monivaiheisessa generatiivisessa laadunvarmistuksessa, ylittäen viimeisimpiä lähtölinjoja paremmin syntaktisesti muotoilluilla vastauksilla ja lisäten tarkkuutta AmazonQA:n tarkasteluaineiston kysymysten käsittelyssä. Laadullinen analyysi osoitti muistimoduulin tuoman tulkittavuuden.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah, nggambar kelas kotak tentang FindOK Jami ora, awak dhéwé menehi efekasi akeh akeh sing narunakno ning multi-pasar gambar kelas nêmêr, dadi iso nggawe barang-perusahaan karo hal-karat sing luwih dumatenne sing luwih apik lan akeh iso nggawe barang seneng daftar wigatining pararampun sing luwih dumaten lan akeh dumaten iso nggawe gerakan seneng pisan pangan Amarzone Wanggang langgambar sing apik dadi seneng nggawe akeh tarjamahan seng module sing dumadhi', 'he': 'אנחנו מכירים את CHIME, רשת זיכרון היררכית במעבר צלב לענות על שאלות (QA) דרך דור טקסט. הוא מארח את XLNet המציג מודול זיכרון עזרי מורכב משני רכיבים: הזיכרון הקונקסט לאסוף ראיות מעבר צלב, והזיכרון התשובה עובד כמחסון ממשיך מתעדכן את התשובות שנוצרות. באימפריה, אנו מראים את היעילות של הארכיטקטורה המוצעת בתוך QA הדורה במעברים רבים, ביצוע את קווי הבסיס המיוחדים ביותר עם תשובות טובות ביותר באופן סינטאקטי וגדלת מדויקת בתשובה לשאלות של קבוצת המידע האמזונקאי QA. ניתוח איכותי נוסף חשף את היכולת לפרש שהופעה על ידי מודול הזיכרון.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo CHIME, prehodno hierarhično pomnilniško omrežje za odgovarjanje na vprašanja (QA) prek generiranja besedila. Razširi XLNet z uvedbo pomožnega pomnilniškega modula, sestavljenega iz dveh komponent: kontekstnega pomnilnika, ki zbira dokaze o prehodu, in odgovornega pomnilnika, ki deluje kot pufer, ki nenehno izpopolnjuje ustvarjene odgovore. Empirično smo prikazali učinkovitost predlagane arhitekture v generativnem zagotavljanju kakovosti z več prehodi, ki presega najsodobnejše osnovne linije z boljšimi sintaktično dobro oblikovanimi odgovori in večjo natančnostjo pri obravnavanju vprašanj iz nabora podatkov o pregledu AmazonQA. Dodatna kvalitativna analiza je pokazala interpretabilnost, ki jo je uvedel spominski modul.', 'ha': "Tuna nuna shirin KIMEwa, wata jerin memory na faras-maras wa mai tambaya ta sami'ar mai tambaya (QA) zuwa matsayin. Yana shimfiɗa XLNet wanda ya ƙunsa da module na kumbura masu inganci biyu na haɗi: kumburar kwamfyutan da ke samun bayani-kiyaye, da kumbar jibar da ke aiki kamar buffet wanda ya yi amfani da shi daidai yin gyare-gyare sunan mayarwa wanda aka ƙãga. QA An nuna wani Anaƙatan Qualitative da aka introduce fassarar da modulen kumbar.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་CHIME(QA)ལ་ཡིག་གི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ནས་དུས་འཚོལ་བའི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་དྲ་བ་སྟོན་པ It extends XLNet introducing an auxiliary memory module consisting of two components: the context memory collecting cross-passage evidences, and the answer memory working as a buffer continually refining the generated answers. དངོས་འབྲེལ་གྱིས་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བཀོད་པའི་བཟོ་བཀོད་ཀྱི་ནུས་ཡུལ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། An additional qualitative analysis revealed the interpretability introduced by the memory module.'}
{'en': 'Bi-directional CognitiveThinking Network for Machine Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'شبكة التفكير المعرفي ثنائية الاتجاه لفهم آلة القراءة', 'pt': 'Rede de pensamento cognitivo bidirecional para compreensão de leitura de máquina', 'es': 'Red de pensamiento cognitivo bidireccional para la comprensión de la lectura automática', 'fr': 'Réseau bidirectionnel de pensée cognitive pour la compréhension de la lecture automatique', 'ja': '双方向認知機械読解のための思考ネットワーク', 'zh': '以机器读解者双向识思维网络', 'hi': 'द्वि-दिशात्मक संज्ञानात्मक मशीन पढ़ने की समझ के लिए नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Двунаправленная когнитивная мыслящая сеть для понимания машинного чтения', 'ga': 'Líonra Smaointeoireachta Cognaíocha Déthreo do Thuiscint Léamh Meaisín', 'ka': 'მაქინის კითხვის კომპრენსციისთვის ორგანრიგური კოგენტიგური ფიქრობის ქსელი', 'hu': 'Kétirányú kognitív gondolkodási hálózat a gépi olvasáshoz', 'el': 'Δικατευθυντικό δίκτυο γνωστικής σκέψης για την κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης', 'it': 'Rete cognitiva bidirezionale per la comprensione della lettura automatica', 'kk': 'Машин оқу құрылғысының екі бағытты CognitiveThinking желі', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Dviejų krypčių kognitivinio mąstymo tinklas mašinų skaitymo supratimui', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Pemikiran Cognitif Bi-arah untuk Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി വിചാരിക്കുന്ന കോണ്\u200dഗ്രിനിറ്റിങ്ങ് നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് വിചാരിക', 'mt': 'Bi-directional CognitiveThinking Network for Machine Reading Comprehension', 'mn': 'Машин унших шинжлэх ухааны хоёр чиглэл CognitiveThinking Network for Machine Reading Comprehension', 'no': 'Bi directional CognitiveThinking Network for Machine Reading Comprehension', 'pl': 'Dwukierunkowa sieć CognitiveThinking dla zrozumienia odczytu maszynowego', 'ro': 'Rețeaua de gândire cognitivă bidirecțională pentru înțelegerea citirii mașinilor', 'sr': 'Bidirektivna kognitivna razmišljanja mreža za kompresiju pročitanja mašina', 'si': 'මැෂින් කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවේදන ජාලය', 'sv': 'Dubbelriktad kognitivThinking-nätverk för maskinläsförståelse', 'so': 'Bi-directive CognitiveThinking Network for Machine Reading Comprehension', 'ur': 'ماشین پڑھنے کے لئے دوسری دکھانے والی CognitiveThinking نیٹ ورک', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் முடிவுக்கான சிந்திப்பு பிணைப்பு', 'uz': 'Thinking Network for Machine reading completion', 'vi': 'Chương trình hiểu biết rộng hai chiều về máy', 'bg': 'Двупосочна мрежа за когнитивно мислене за разбиране на машинното четене', 'da': 'Toretningsbestemt kognitiveThinking netværk til maskinlæsning forståelse', 'nl': 'Bidirectioneel CognitiveThinking Netwerk voor het begrijpen van machinelezen', 'hr': 'Dvosmjerno kognitivno razmišljanje mreže za kompresiju pročitanja strojeva', 'de': 'Bidirektionales CognitiveThinking Netzwerk für maschinelles Lesen', 'id': 'Jaringan Pemikiran Cognitif Bi-arah untuk Pembacaan Mesin Komprensi', 'ko': '기계 읽기 이해의 양방향 인지 사고 네트워크', 'fa': 'شبکه شناخته\u200cکننده\u200cهای دوراهی برای خواندن ماشین\u200cها', 'sq': 'Rrjeti i Mendimit Cognitive dy-drejtues për Përkuptimin e leximit të makinës', 'am': 'Thinking Network for Machine Reading Completion', 'tr': 'Maşynyň Okamak Derjesi üçin iki Görniş Taýýarlama Aýry', 'hy': 'Երկու ուղղությամբ ճանաչողական մտածողական ցանց մեքենայի ընթերցման համար', 'sw': 'Kutambua Kiongozi kwa Kiongozi', 'bn': 'মেশিন পাঠ করার জন্য বাই-সরাসরি কনফিনিটিভ চিন্তা নেটওয়ার্ক', 'ca': 'Rede de pensament cognitiu bidireccional per a la comprensió de llegir màquines', 'cs': 'Obousměrná síť kognitivního myšlení pro pochopení strojového čtení', 'bs': 'Dvosmjerno kognitivno razmišljanje mreže za kompresiju pročitanja mašina', 'az': 'Makinat oxumaq üçün iki yönəlli CognitiveThinking Network', 'et': 'Kahesuunaline kognitiivse mõtlemise võrgustik masinlugemise mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'Kaksisuuntainen kognitiivisen ajattelun verkosto konelukemisen ymmärtämiseen', 'af': 'Bi- rigting CognitiveThinking Network vir Masjien Lees Kompresie', 'jv': 'bi-directions CoGNTiCalImp Network for Masine Reading Compréncion', 'ha': 'Fikiring Networks for Machine reading Comprehension', 'sk': 'Dvosmerna mreža kognitivnega razmišljanja za razumevanje strojnega branja', 'he': 'רשת חשיבה קוגניטיבית שתי כיוונים עבור ביטוי קריאת מכונות', 'bo': 'Machine Reading Compression'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel Bi-directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) for reading comprehension from the perspective of complementary learning systems theory. It aims to simulate two ways of thinking in the brain to answer questions, including reverse thinking and inertial thinking. To validate the effectiveness of our framework, we design a corresponding Bi-directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) to encode the passage and generate a question (answer) given an answer (question) and decouple the bi-directional knowledge. The model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions which can assist inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers. Competitive improvement is observed in DuReader dataset, confirming our hypothesis that bi-directional knowledge helps the QA task. The novel framework shows an interesting perspective on machine reading comprehension and cognitive science.', 'ar': 'نقترح إطارًا جديدًا للمعرفة المعرفية ثنائي الاتجاه (BCKF) لفهم القراءة من منظور نظرية أنظمة التعلم التكميلية. يهدف إلى محاكاة طريقتين من التفكير في الدماغ للإجابة على الأسئلة ، بما في ذلك التفكير العكسي والتفكير بالقصور الذاتي. للتحقق من فعالية إطار العمل الخاص بنا ، نقوم بتصميم شبكة التفكير المعرفي ثنائية الاتجاه المقابلة (BCTN) لتشفير المقطع وإنشاء سؤال (إجابة) بإعطاء إجابة (سؤال) وفصل المعرفة ثنائية الاتجاه. النموذج لديه القدرة على عكس أسئلة التفكير التي يمكن أن تساعد في التفكير بالقصور الذاتي لتوليد إجابات أكثر دقة. لوحظ تحسن تنافسي في مجموعة بيانات DuReader ، مما يؤكد فرضيتنا القائلة بأن المعرفة ثنائية الاتجاه تساعد في مهمة ضمان الجودة. يُظهر إطار عمل الرواية منظورًا مثيرًا للاهتمام حول فهم القراءة الآلية والعلوم المعرفية.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau cadre de connaissances cognitives bidirectionnelles (BCKF) pour la compréhension en lecture du point de vue de la théorie des systèmes d'apprentissage complémentaires. Il vise à simuler deux façons de penser dans le cerveau pour répondre à des questions, y compris la pensée inversée et la pensée inertielle. Pour valider l'efficacité de notre cadre, nous concevons un réseau de pensée cognitive bidirectionnel (BCTN) correspondant pour coder le passage et générer une question (réponse) donnée à une réponse (question) et découpler les connaissances bidirectionnelles. Le modèle a la capacité d'inverser les questions de raisonnement, ce qui peut aider la pensée inertielle à générer des réponses plus précises. Une amélioration concurrentielle est observée dans l'ensemble de données DUReader, ce qui confirme notre hypothèse selon laquelle la connaissance bidirectionnelle contribue à la tâche d'AQ Ce nouveau cadre présente un point de vue intéressant sur la compréhension de la lecture automatique et les sciences cognitives.", 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova Estrutura de Conhecimento Cognitivo Bidirecional (BCKF) para compreensão de leitura a partir da perspectiva da teoria de sistemas complementares de aprendizagem. Ele visa simular duas formas de pensar no cérebro para responder a perguntas, incluindo o pensamento reverso e o pensamento inercial. Para validar a eficácia de nossa estrutura, projetamos uma Rede de Pensamento Cognitivo Bidirecional (BCTN) correspondente para codificar a passagem e gerar uma pergunta (resposta) dada uma resposta (pergunta) e desacoplar o conhecimento bidirecional. O modelo tem a capacidade de reverter questões de raciocínio que podem auxiliar o pensamento inercial a gerar respostas mais precisas. A melhoria competitiva é observada no conjunto de dados do DuReader, confirmando nossa hipótese de que o conhecimento bidirecional auxilia na tarefa de QA. A nova estrutura mostra uma perspectiva interessante sobre compreensão de leitura de máquina e ciência cognitiva.', 'es': 'Proponemos un novedoso Marco de Conocimiento Cognitivo Bidireccional (BCKF) para la comprensión lectora desde la perspectiva de la teoría de sistemas de aprendizaje complementarios. Su objetivo es simular dos formas de pensar en el cerebro para responder preguntas, incluido el pensamiento inverso y el pensamiento inercial. Para validar la eficacia de nuestro marco, diseñamos una Red de Pensamiento Cognitivo Bidireccional (BCTN) correspondiente para codificar el pasaje y generar una pregunta (respuesta) dada una respuesta (pregunta) y desacoplar el conocimiento bidireccional. El modelo tiene la capacidad de revertir las preguntas de razonamiento que pueden ayudar al pensamiento inercial a generar respuestas más precisas. Se observa una mejora competitiva en el conjunto de datos DuReader, lo que confirma nuestra hipótesis de que el conocimiento bidireccional ayuda a la tarea de control de calidad El marco novedoso muestra una perspectiva interesante sobre la comprensión de lectura automática y la ciencia cognitiva.', 'ja': '補完的学習システム理論の観点から理解を読み取るための新しい双方向認知知識フレームワーク（ BCKF ）を提案します。リバースシンキングと慣性思考を含む、質問に答えるための脳内の2つの考え方をシミュレートすることを目的としています。フレームワークの有効性を検証するために、私たちは、パスをエンコードし、答え（質問）を与えられた質問（回答）を生成し、双方向の知識を切り離すために、対応する双方向認知思考ネットワーク（ BCTN ）を設計します。モデルは、慣性思考を支援してより正確な回答を生成することができる推論質問を逆転する能力を持っています。DuReaderデータセットでは競合的な改善が観察され、双方向の知識がQAタスクに役立つという仮説が確認されます。新規のフレームワークは、機械読解理解と認知科学に関する興味深い視点を示しています。', 'hi': 'हम पूरक शिक्षण प्रणाली सिद्धांत के परिप्रेक्ष्य से समझ को पढ़ने के लिए एक उपन्यास द्वि-दिशात्मक संज्ञानात्मक ज्ञान फ्रेमवर्क (बीसीकेएफ) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसका उद्देश्य प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए मस्तिष्क में सोचने के दो तरीकों का अनुकरण करना है, जिसमें रिवर्स सोच और जड़त्वीय सोच शामिल है। हमारे ढांचे की प्रभावशीलता को मान्य करने के लिए, हम मार्ग को एन्कोड करने और एक उत्तर (प्रश्न) दिए गए प्रश्न (उत्तर) को उत्पन्न करने और द्वि-दिशात्मक ज्ञान को कम करने के लिए एक संबंधित द्वि-दिशात्मक संज्ञानात्मक सोच नेटवर्क (BCTN) डिज़ाइन करते हैं। मॉडल में तर्क प्रश्नों को उलटने की क्षमता है जो अधिक सटीक उत्तर उत्पन्न करने के लिए जड़त्वीय सोच की सहायता कर सकती है। ड्यूरीडर डेटासेट में प्रतिस्पर्धी सुधार देखा जाता है, जो हमारी परिकल्पना की पुष्टि करता है कि द्वि-दिशात्मक ज्ञान क्यूए कार्य में मदद करता है। उपन्यास रूपरेखा मशीन पढ़ने की समझ और संज्ञानात्मक विज्ञान पर एक दिलचस्प परिप्रेक्ष्य दिखाती है।', 'zh': '发一从互补学,读一新知双向框架(BCKF)。 拟大脑二思以对,逆惯性以应之。 验我框架之有效性,设一相应双向识思维网络(BCTN)以编码段落生一问(对案),与一答案(问),解耦双向知。 有反向推理之能,可以助惯性思虑之正。 DuReader数集观竞改,证我伪设,双向知有助QA。 新框架展机器读认知科学趣视角。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую двунаправленную структуру когнитивных знаний (BCKF) для понимания чтения с точки зрения теории систем дополнительного обучения. Его цель состоит в том, чтобы смоделировать два способа мышления в мозге, чтобы ответить на вопросы, включая обратное мышление и инерционное мышление. Чтобы проверить эффективность нашей структуры, мы создаем соответствующую двунаправленную когнитивную мыслящую сеть (BCTN) для кодирования отрывка и генерации вопроса (ответа), на который дается ответ (вопрос), и разделения двунаправленных знаний. Модель имеет возможность обращать вспять вопросы рассуждения, которые могут помочь инерционному мышлению генерировать более точные ответы. Конкурентное улучшение наблюдается в наборе данных DuReader, что подтверждает нашу гипотезу о том, что двунаправленное знание помогает в выполнении задачи QA. Рамка романа демонстрирует интересный взгляд на понимание машинного чтения и когнитивную науку.', 'ga': 'Molaimid Creat Faisnéise Cognaíoch Déthreo úrscéal (BCKF) le haghaidh léamhthuiscint ó thaobh theoiric na gcóras foghlama comhlántach de. Tá sé mar aidhm aige insamhail a dhéanamh ar dhá bhealach smaointeoireachta san inchinn chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt, lena n-áirítear smaointeoireacht droim ar ais agus smaointeoireacht táimhe. Chun éifeachtacht ár gcreat a bhailíochtú, dearadh againn Líonra Smaointeoireachta Cognaíocha Déthreo (BCTN) comhfhreagrach chun an sliocht a ionchódú agus ceist (freagra) a dtugtar freagra (ceist) a ghiniúint agus an t-eolas déthreoch a dhíchúpláil. Tá an cumas ag an tsamhail ceisteanna réasúnaíochta a fhreaschur a chuideoidh le smaointeoireacht táimhe freagraí níos cruinne a ghiniúint. Breathnaítear feabhas iomaíoch i dtacar sonraí DuReader, rud a dhearbhaíonn ár hipitéis go gcuidíonn eolas déthreoch leis an tasc QA. Léiríonn creat an úrscéil peirspictíocht spéisiúil ar theicneolaíocht na léamha meaisín agus ar an eolaíocht chognaíoch.', 'hu': 'A kiegészítő tanulási rendszerek elmélete szempontjából új, kétirányú kognitív tudási keretrendszert (BCKF) javasolunk az olvasásértéshez. Célja, hogy két gondolkodásmódot szimuláljon az agyban a kérdések megválaszolására, beleértve a fordított gondolkodást és a tehetetlen gondolkodást. A keretrendszer hatékonyságának érvényesítése érdekében megtervezünk egy megfelelő kétirányú kognitív gondolkodási hálózatot (BCTN), amely kódolja a szakaszt, és generálja a kétirányú tudást. A modell képes megfordítani az érvelési kérdéseket, amelyek segíthetik a tehetetlenségi gondolkodást, hogy pontosabb válaszokat generáljanak. Versenyképességi javulást figyelünk meg a DuReader adatkészletben, megerősítve hipotézisünket, hogy a kétirányú ismeretek segítik a minőségi feladatot. Az új keretrendszer érdekes perspektívát mutat a gépi olvasás megértésére és a kognitív tudományra.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο Δικατεύθυνση Γνωσιακό Πλαίσιο Γνώσης για την κατανόηση της ανάγνωσης από την προοπτική της θεωρίας συστημάτων συμπληρωματικής μάθησης. Στόχος του είναι να προσομοιώσει δύο τρόπους σκέψης στον εγκέφαλο για να απαντήσει σε ερωτήσεις, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αντίστροφης σκέψης και της αδρανείας σκέψης. Για να επικυρώσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του πλαισίου μας, σχεδιάζουμε ένα αντίστοιχο Δικατεύθυνση Δίκτυο Γνωσιακής Σκέψης (για να κωδικοποιήσουμε το πέρασμα και να δημιουργήσουμε μια ερώτηση (απάντηση) που δίνεται μια απάντηση (ερώτηση) και να αποσυνδέσουμε την αμφίδρομη γνώση. Το μοντέλο έχει την ικανότητα να αντιστρέφει τις ερωτήσεις συλλογισμού που μπορούν να βοηθήσουν την αδρανειακή σκέψη για να δημιουργήσει πιο ακριβείς απαντήσεις. Η ανταγωνιστική βελτίωση παρατηρείται στο σύνολο δεδομένων επιβεβαιώνοντας την υπόθεσή μας ότι η αμφίδρομη γνώση βοηθά στην εργασία της QA. Το νέο πλαίσιο παρουσιάζει μια ενδιαφέρουσα προοπτική στην κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης και της γνωστικής επιστήμης.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo quadro di conoscenza cognitiva bidirezionale (BCKF) per la comprensione della lettura dal punto di vista della teoria dei sistemi di apprendimento complementari. Mira a simulare due modi di pensare nel cervello per rispondere alle domande, tra cui il pensiero inverso e il pensiero inerziale. Per convalidare l'efficacia del nostro framework, progettiamo una corrispondente rete di pensiero cognitivo bidirezionale (BCTN) per codificare il passaggio e generare una domanda (risposta) data una risposta (domanda) e disaccoppiare la conoscenza bidirezionale. Il modello ha la capacità di invertire le domande di ragionamento che possono aiutare il pensiero inerziale a generare risposte più accurate. Il miglioramento competitivo è osservato nel dataset DuReader, confermando la nostra ipotesi che la conoscenza bidirezionale aiuti il compito di QA. Il nuovo quadro mostra una prospettiva interessante sulla comprensione della lettura automatica e la scienza cognitiva.", 'kk': 'Қосымша оқу жүйелердің теориясынан түсініктерді оқу үшін романдық екі бағытталған білім фреймік (BCKF) деп ұсынамыз. Бұл мидында сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін екі түрлі ойлау және инерсиялық ойлау үшін симулирациялау мақсаты болады. Біздің қоршауымыздың эффектілігін тексеру үшін, біз кейінгі екі бағытты ойлау желі (BCTN) кодтамыз және жауап (сұрақ) берілген сұрақ (жауап) құрылып, екі бағытты білім деңгейін құрамыз. Бұл үлгінің түсіндіру сұрақтарын қайтару мүмкіндігі бар. Бұл инерсиялық ойлау үшін дұрыс жауаптарды құру үшін көмектеседі. DuReader деректер жиынында тәжірибелі жақсарту, QA тапсырмасына көмектесетін гипотезамызды құптайды. Роман қоршауы машинаны оқу және конитивтік ғылым туралы қызықты перспективті көрсетеді.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტის ორდირექციონალური კონგენტიური მეცნიერების პარამეტრი (BCKF) კითხვისთვის კომპლენტერიური სწავლების ტეორიის პრექტიფიკაციის შესახებ. ეს მიზეზია, რომ ტვინიში ორი გზით ფიქრობის სიმულაციას გაუკეთოთ კითხვების შესახებ, შესახებ შეცვლელი ფიქრობის და ინერციალური ფიქრობის შესახებ ჩვენი ფრამეტრის ეფექტიურობის გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ შევქმნით ორეთექციონალური კოგენტიური ფიქრობის ქსელი (BCTN) როგორც კოდირება და კითხვა (პასუხი) გავიქმნით პასუხი (კითხვა) და ორეთექციო მოდელის შესაძლებლობა არსებული კითხვების შეცვლა, რომლებიც შეუძლია ინერციალური ფიქრობის შესაძლებლობად უფრო წესი პასუხების შექმნა. კომპეტეტიური უფლება DuReader მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც ჩვენი ჰიპეტეზა დარწმუნდება, რომ ორედირექციონალური მეცნიერება QA დავახმარებს. პრომანური ფრამეტრი ჩვენებს საინტერესო პერსპექტიკური პერსპექტიკური საკითხვის და კონგენტიგური მეცნიერების შესახებ.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ബി- നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലെ അറിവ് ഫ്രെമ്മോര്\u200dക്ക് (BCKF) വായിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പഠിക്കുന്ന സി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d തലച്ചോറിന്റെ രണ്ട് വഴികള്\u200d അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യമാണ് അതിന്റെ ഉദ്ദേശം, നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളുടെ പ്രവർത്തിയെ തെളിയിക്കാൻ, നമ്മൾ ഒരു ബി- നേരിട്ടുള്ള കോഗ്നിയറ്റിവ് ചിന്തിക്കുന്ന ശേഖരത്തിന്റെ (ബിസിറ്റിനെ) നിരീക്ഷി മോഡലിന് കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള കഴിവുണ്ട്, അത് നിയമപരമായ ചിന്തിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നു. അതിന Competitive improvement is observed in DuReader dataset, confirming our hypothesis that bi-directional knowledge helps the QA task.  ഈ നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനും പരിശാസ്ത്രം വായിക്കുന്നതിനും കാണിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രസകര', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują dvikryptį pažangiųjų žinių sistemą (BCKF), skirtą supratimui skaityti iš papildomų mokymosi sistemų teorijos perspektyvos. Jame siekiama imituoti du smegenų mąstymo būdus atsakant į klausimus, įskaitant atvirkštinį mąstymą ir inercinį mąstymą. To validate the effectiveness of our framework, we design a corresponding Bi-directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) to encode the passage and generate a question (answer) given an answer (question) and decouple the bi-directional knowledge.  Modelis gali pakeisti pagrįstus klausimus, kurie gali padėti inerciniam mąstymui gauti tikslesnius atsakymus. DuReader duomenų rinkinyje pastebimas konkurencinis pagerėjimas, patvirtinantis mūsų hipotezę, kad dvikryptinės žinios padeda atlikti QA užduotį. The novel framework shows an interesting perspective on machine reading comprehension and cognitive science.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме нова бидирекционална Когнитивна Рамка за знаење (BCKF) за читање разбирање од перспектива на комплементарната теорија на системите на учење. It aims to simulate two ways of thinking in the brain to answer questions, including reverse thinking and inertial thinking.  За да ја потврдиме ефикасноста на нашата рамка, дизајнираме соодветна двоправна мрежа на когнитивно размислување (BCTN) за кодирање на преминот и генерирање прашање (одговор) со одговор (прашање) и раскопнување на двоправното знаење. The model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions which can assist inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers.  Се наоѓа конкурентно подобрување во податоците на DuReader, потврдувајќи ја нашата хипотеза дека двојно знаење помага во задачата на QA. Новата рамка покажува интересна перспектива за разбирање на машинското читање и когнитивната наука.', 'mt': 'Aħna qed nipproponu Qafas ġdid ta’ Għarfien Konjittiv Bidirezzjonali (BCKF) għall-qari tal-fehim mill-perspettiva tat-teorija tas-sistemi ta’ tagħlim kumplimentari. Għandu l-għan li jissimula żewġ modi ta’ ħsieb fil-moħħ biex iwieġeb mistoqsijiet, inkluż ħsieb invers u ħsieb inerzjali. Biex tivvalida l-effettività tal-qafas tagħna, a ħna niddisinjaw Netwerk Bidirezzjonali tal-Ħsib Konjittiv (BCTN) korrispondenti biex nikkodifikaw il-passaġġ u jiġġeneraw mistoqsija (tweġiba) mogħtija tweġiba (mistoqsija) u niskoppjaw l-għarfien bidirezzjonali. Il-mudell għandu l-kapaċità li jirrevedi mistoqsijiet ta’ raġunament li jistgħu jgħinu fil-ħsieb inerzjali biex jiġġeneraw tweġibiet aktar preċiżi. Titjib kompetittiv huwa osservat fis-sett tad-dejta DuReader, li jikkonferma l-ipoteżi tagħna li l-għarfien bidirezzjonali jgħin ix-xogħol QA. Il-qafas il-ġdid juri perspettiva interessanti dwar il-fehim tal-qari tal-magni u x-xjenza konjittiva.', 'ms': 'Kami melamar kerangka Pengetahuan Pengetahuan Biarah (BCKF) untuk membaca pemahaman dari perspektif teori sistem pembelajaran komplementari. Ia bermaksud untuk simulasikan dua cara berfikir di otak untuk menjawab soalan, termasuk berfikiran terbalik dan berfikiran inersi. Untuk sahkan kegunaan kerangka kami, kami merancang Rangkaian Pemikiran Berdua Arah (BCTN) yang sepadan untuk mengekod laluan dan menghasilkan soalan (jawapan) yang diberikan jawapan (soalan) dan menyambungkan pengetahuan dua arah. Model mempunyai kemampuan untuk membalikkan soalan pemikiran yang boleh membantu pemikiran inersi untuk menghasilkan jawapan yang lebih tepat. Perbaikan kompetitif diperhatikan dalam set data DuReader, mengesahkan hipotesis kita bahawa pengetahuan bidireksi membantu tugas QA. kerangka novel menunjukkan perspektif yang menarik tentang pemahaman pembacaan mesin dan sains kognitif.', 'mn': 'Бид хоёр дахь бага зэрэг нэмэлт суралцах системийн теорийг унших зорилгоор хоёр дахь мэдлэгтэй мэдлэгтэй Фрэмвол (BCKF) шинэ зохиолын санал болгож байна. Энэ нь тархинд бодох хоёр арга замаар асуултуудаа хариулт өгөх, эсрэг бодол болон инерсийн бодол гэх мэт. Бидний үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг шалгахын тулд бид хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо холбоотой Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) загварыг кодлож, хариулт (асуулт) өгсөн асуулт (хариулт) бий болгож, хоорондоо холбоотой мэдлэг шилжүүлж байна. Энэ загвар нь илүү зөв хариултыг гаргаж ирэхэд инерсийн бодлоор тусалж чадна. DuReader өгөгдлийн сан дээр шагналын сайжруулалт харагдаж байна. Бидний хоёр чиглэлтийн мэдлэг нь QA ажлыг тусалдаг гэдгийг баталж байна. Шинэ хэлбэр нь машины унших болон мэдлэг ухааны талаар сонирхолтой харагдаж байна.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit novel rammeverk for kognitiv kjenning (BCKF) for å lesa forståelse frå perspektivet på komplementære læringssystemteorien. Det vil simulere to måtar å tenke på hjernen for å svara på spørsmål, inkludert omvendt tenking og inersielle tenking. For å validera effektiviteten av rammeverket vårt, designerer vi eit tilsvarande bikdirektivn kognitiv tenking nettverk (BCTN) for å koda passaget og laga eit spørsmål (svar) oppgitt ein svar (spørsmål) og dekkoperer den to retningslinjevinnstillingane. Modellen har kapasiteten til å omvenda årsakende spørsmål som kan hjelpa til inersielle tenking for å laga meir nøyaktige svar. Konkursiv forbedring blir observert i DuReader- dataset, som stadfestar hypotesien vårt at bi- retning kunnskap hjelper QA- oppgåva. novelrammeverket viser eit interessant perspektiv på maskinelesing av forståelse og kognitiv vitenskap.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe dwukierunkowe ramy wiedzy poznawczej (BCKF) do zrozumienia czytania z perspektywy teorii systemów uczenia się uzupełniającego. Ma na celu symulację dwóch sposobów myślenia w mózgu, aby odpowiedzieć na pytania, w tym myślenie odwrotne i myślenie inercyjne. Aby zweryfikować skuteczność naszego frameworku, projektujemy odpowiednią dwukierunkową sieć myślenia poznawczego (BCTN), aby zakodować przejście i generować pytanie (odpowiedź) udzielone odpowiedzi (pytanie) i oddzielić dwukierunkową wiedzę. Model ma zdolność do odwrócenia pytań rozumowania, które mogą pomóc w myśleniu inercyjnym w generowaniu bardziej dokładnych odpowiedzi. W zbiorze danych DuReader obserwowano poprawę konkurencji, co potwierdza naszą hipotezę, że wiedza dwukierunkowa pomaga w realizacji zadania QA. Nowe ramy pokazują ciekawą perspektywę rozumienia czytania maszynowego i nauki poznawczej.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir kognitivnih znanja (BCKF) za čitanje razumijevanja iz perspektive teorije komplementarnih učenjskih sustava. Cilj je simulirati dva načina razmišljanja u mozgu da odgovori na pitanja, uključujući obrnuto razmišljanje i inercijalno razmišljanje. Da bismo potvrdili učinkovitost našeg okvira, dizajnirali smo odgovarajuću dvosmjernu kognitivnu mrežu za razmišljanje (BCTN) kako bi kodirali prolaz i stvorili pitanje (odgovor) pod odgovorom (pitanje) i rasključili dvosmjerno znanje. Model ima sposobnost da okrene pitanja razuma koje mogu pomoći inercijalnom razmišljanju da stvara tačnije odgovore. Konkurentno poboljšanje je posmatrano u kompetu podataka DuReadera, potvrđujući našu hipotezu da dvosmjerno znanje pomaže zadatku QA. Novi okvir pokazuje interesantnu perspektivu o razumijevanju mašina i kognitivnoj nauci.', 'so': "Waxaan horumarinaynaa qoraal ah oo ku qoran qoraalka aqoonta aqoonta ee Bi-directive (BCKF) si aan u akhrinno kooxa qoraalka waxbarashada ee qoraalka iskuulka. waxaa loola jeedaa in ay simaalo laba qaab oo ku fikiraan maanka in ay ka jawaabto su'aalaha, including fikrada bedelka iyo fikrada xaqdarrada ah. Si a an u xaqiijinno awoodda firaaqadeena, waxaynu designnaa shabakadda u eg Bi-directive Cognitive Fikirada (BCTN) si aan u kooban baasabka kadibna u sameyno su'aal (jawaab) la siiyo jawaab (su'aal) oo aan u deynno aqoonta kooxaha. Tusaale wuxuu awood u leeyahay in uu dib u celiyo su'aalaha sababta ah, taas oo caawinaya fikrada aan sinnaan karin in uu soo bixiyo jawaabo saxda ah. Competitive improvement is observed in DuReader dataset, confirming our hypothesis that bi-directional knowledge helps the QA task.  Qoraalka warqada ah wuxuu muujiyaa aragti xiiso leh oo ku saabsan machine-ka akhrista koorsiga iyo cilmiga aqoonta.", 'si': 'අපි කියන්නේ නොවැඩක් බී-දිශ්\u200dයාත්මක කොන්ජිනිත් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් (BCKF) කියලා කියවන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධති පද්ධති  මොළුවේ හිතන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් දෙකක් අරමුණ වෙන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ විශේෂතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) දුන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) දුන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) සම මොඩල් එකට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා හිතන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් කරන්න, ඒ වගේම තව හරියට ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් Dureader දත්ත සූදානයේ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, අපේ අභිප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ස සංවේදනය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ යන්ත්\u200dරය කියවන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණ විද්\u200dයානය', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny Bi-directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) för läsförståelse ur ett perspektiv av kompletterande inlärningssystem teori. Det syftar till att simulera två sätt att tänka i hjärnan för att svara på frågor, inklusive omvänt tänkande och tröghetstänkande. För att validera effektiviteten av vårt ramverk utformar vi ett motsvarande Bi-directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) för att koda passagen och generera en fråga (svar) givet ett svar (fråga) och frikoppla den tvåriktade kunskapen. Modellen har förmågan att vända resonemang frågor som kan hjälpa tröghetstänkandet att generera mer exakta svar. Konkurrensförbättring observeras i DuReader dataset, vilket bekräftar vår hypotes att tvåriktad kunskap hjälper QA-uppgiften. Det nya ramverket visar ett intressant perspektiv på maskinläsförståelse och kognitiv vetenskap.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نومین دوسری دئیرسینٹی Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) کو پڑھنے کے لئے تفصیل پڑھنے کے لئے تقدیر دیتے ہیں۔ اس کا ارادہ ہے کہ مغز میں دو طریقے کی سوچ کریں سوال کی جواب دیں، اس کے شامل منحرف سوچ اور منحرف سوچ کریں۔ ہمارے فرمیک کے مطابقت کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک مناسب دودہرکی تصدیق کرنے والی Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) طراحی کرتے ہیں کہ مسافر کو کوڈ کرے اور ایک سوال (جواب) پیدا کریں جو ایک جواب (سوال) دیا گیا ہے اور دودہرکی علم کو بٹا دیں۔ Model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions that can help inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers. دورائڈر ڈاٹ سٹ میں کامپیوتر کی تحقیق کی جاتی ہے، ہماری فرضی کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ دو دقیق علم QA کے کام کی مدد کرتی ہے. نومین فرمیک مشین پڑھنے اور معلوم علم کے بارے میں ایک جالب نظر دکھاتا ہے.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய பி திசையாக அறிவு சட்டம் (BCKF) சிகிச்சை கற்றல் அமைப்பு திட்டத்தின் முன்னோட்டத்திலிருந்து பார்க்க ஒரு புத்தகத்தை  இது மூளையில் சிந்திக்கும் இரண்டு வழிகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறது, கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் கொடுக்க வேண்டும், மாற்று சிந் To validate the effectiveness of our framework, we design a corresponding Bi-directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) to encode the passage and generate a question (answer) given an answer (question) and decouple the bi-directional knowledge.  இந்த மாதிரியில் குறிப்பிடும் கேள்விகளை மாற்ற முடியும். அது நியாயமில்லாத சிந்தனையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு உதவும தொடர்புடைய முன்னேற்றத்தை DuReader dataset ல் பார்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, எங்கள் hypothesis உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது, இருதிசையாக அறிவு QA பணிய புதிய சட்டத்தில் இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் சுவாரஸ்யமான பார்வையை காட்டுகிறது மற்றும் அறிவியல் விஞ்ஞானத்', 'ro': 'Propunem un nou Cadru de Cunoaștere Cognitivă bidirecțională (BCKF) pentru înțelegerea citirii din perspectiva teoriei sistemelor de învățare complementare. Scopul este de a simula două moduri de gândire în creier pentru a răspunde la întrebări, inclusiv gândirea inversă și gândirea inerțială. Pentru a valida eficiența cadrului nostru, proiectăm o rețea de gândire cognitivă bidirecțională corespunzătoare (BCTN) pentru a codifica pasajul și a genera o întrebare (răspuns) dat un răspuns (întrebare) și a decupla cunoștințele bidirecționale. Modelul are capacitatea de a inversa întrebările de raționament care pot ajuta gândirea inerțială pentru a genera răspunsuri mai precise. Îmbunătățirea competitivă este observată în setul de date DuReader, confirmând ipoteza noastră că cunoștințele bidirecționale ajută la sarcina QA. Cadrul roman arată o perspectivă interesantă asupra înțelegerii citirii automate și a științei cognitive.', 'uz': "Biz murakkab o'rganish tizim tizim tezasi tizimining g fikrini o'qish uchun novel Bi-direktiv kognitiv maʼlumot Framework (BCKF) yaratuvchimiz. Bu miyadagi ikki usulda o'ylashni o'xshash mumkin, bu savollarni javob berish va o'zgarishni o'ylab ko'rsatish mumkin. Freymning effektligini to ʻgʻri qilish uchun biz maxfiy soʻzni kodlash uchun Bi- direktoriya kodlash (BCTN) yaratish va javob berilgan javob yaratish va ikkita- direktoriy илмni kamaytirish uchun. The model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions which can assist inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers.  Name Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở nhận thức truyền trực tiếp (BCKF) để đọc sự thấu hiểu từ góc nhìn của học thuyết hệ thống học bổ sung. Mục tiêu của nó là mô phỏng hai cách suy nghĩ trong não để trả lời câu hỏi, bao gồm suy nghĩ ngược và tính trì trệ. Để xác minh hiệu quả của cơ sở chúng tôi, chúng tôi thiết kế một mạng suy nghĩ bén-trực tuyến tương ứng (BCTN) để mã hóa đoạn đó và tạo ra câu hỏi (câu trả lời) với câu trả lời (câu hỏi) và tách rời kiến thức hai hướng. Mô hình này có khả năng đảo ngược những câu hỏi lập luận có thể hỗ trợ tính trì trệ để có được câu trả lời chính xác hơn. Trong tập tin DuReade có những cải tiến cạnh tranh, xác nhận giả thuyết của chúng ta rằng hiểu bi ết hai hướng có ích cho QA. Cuốn tiểu thuyết cho thấy một quan điểm thú vị về sự thấu hiểu cỗ máy và khoa học nhận thức.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова двупосочна рамка на когнитивното знание (БККФ) за разбиране на четенето от гледна точка на теорията на допълнителните системи за обучение. Тя има за цел да симулира два начина на мислене в мозъка, за да отговори на въпроси, включително обратното мислене и инерционното мислене. За да валидираме ефективността на нашата рамка, ние проектираме съответна двупосочна мрежа за когнитивно мислене (БТН), която кодира пасажа и генерира въпрос (отговор), даден отговор (въпрос) и отделя двупосочното знание. Моделът има способността да обърне въпросите на разсъждаването, които могат да помогнат на инерционното мислене да генерира по-точни отговори. Конкурентно подобрение се наблюдава в набора от данни потвърждаващо нашата хипотеза, че двупосочните знания помагат на задачата за контрол на качеството. Новата рамка показва интересна перспектива за разбирането на машинното четене и когнитивната наука.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny Bi-directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) til læseforståelse fra et perspektiv af komplementære læringssystemer teori. Det sigter mod at simulere to måder at tænke i hjernen til at besvare spørgsmål, herunder omvendt tænkning og inertiel tænkning. For at validere effektiviteten af vores rammer, designer vi et tilsvarende Bi-directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) til at kode passagen og generere et spørgsmål (svar) givet et svar (spørgsmål) og afkoble den bi-directional viden. Modellen har evnen til at vende ræsonnement spørgsmål, som kan hjælpe inertiel tænkning til at generere mere præcise svar. Konkurrenceforbedringer observeres i DuReader datasæt, hvilket bekræfter vores hypotese om, at tovejsende viden hjælper QA-opgaven. Den nye ramme viser et interessant perspektiv på maskinlæseforståelse og kognitiv videnskab.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za dvosmjernu kognitivnu znanost (BCKF) za čitanje razumijevanja iz perspektive teorije komplementarnog sustava učenja. Cilj je simulirati dva načina razmišljanja u mozgu da odgovori na pitanja, uključujući obrnuto razmišljanje i inercijalno razmišljanje. Da bismo potvrdili učinkovitost našeg okvira, dizajnirali smo odgovarajuću dvosmjernu kognitivnu mrežu razmišljanja (BCTN) kako bi kodirali prolaz i stvorili pitanje (odgovor) s obzirom na odgovor (pitanje) i rasključili dvosmjerno znanje. Model ima sposobnost obrnuti razumna pitanja koja mogu pomoći inercijalnom razmišljanju kako bi stvorila preciznije odgovore. Konkurentno poboljšanje je posmatrano u skupini podataka DuReadera, potvrđujući našu hipotezu da dvosmjerno znanje pomaže zadatku QA-a. Novi okvir pokazuje zanimljivu perspektivu o razumijevanju i kognitivnoj nauci.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw Bi-directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) voor voor leesbegrip vanuit het perspectief van complementaire leersysteemtheorie. Het doel is om twee manieren van denken in de hersenen te simuleren om vragen te beantwoorden, waaronder omgekeerd denken en inertieel denken. Om de effectiviteit van ons framework te valideren, ontwerpen we een corresponderend Bi-directioneel Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) om de passage te coderen en een vraag (antwoord) te genereren die een antwoord (vraag) krijgt en de bi-directionele kennis te ontkoppelen. Het model heeft de mogelijkheid om redeneringsvragen om te keren die inertieel denken kunnen helpen om nauwkeurigere antwoorden te genereren. Concurrentieverbetering wordt waargenomen in DuReader dataset, wat onze hypothese bevestigt dat bi-directionele kennis helpt bij de QA taak. Het nieuwe raamwerk toont een interessant perspectief op het begrip machinelezen en cognitieve wetenschap.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Bi-Directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) für Leseverstehen aus der Perspektive komplementärer Lernsystemtheorie vor. Es zielt darauf ab, zwei Denkweisen im Gehirn zu simulieren, um Fragen zu beantworten, einschließlich umgekehrtes Denken und träges Denken. Um die Wirksamkeit unseres Frameworks zu validieren, entwerfen wir ein entsprechendes Bi-Directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN), um die Passage zu kodieren und eine Frage (Antwort) zu generieren, die eine Antwort (Frage) gegeben hat und das bidirektionale Wissen zu entkoppeln. Das Modell hat die Fähigkeit, Argumentationsfragen umzukehren, die Trägheitsdenken unterstützen können, um genauere Antworten zu generieren. Konkurrenzverbesserungen werden im DuReader-Datensatz beobachtet, was unsere Hypothese bestätigt, dass bidirektionales Wissen die QA-Aufgabe unterstützt. Das neuartige Framework zeigt eine interessante Perspektive auf maschinelles Leseverständnis und kognitive Wissenschaft.', 'id': 'We propose a novel Bi-directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) for reading comprehension from the perspective of complementary learning systems theory.  Hal ini bermaksud untuk simulasi dua cara berpikir di otak untuk menjawab pertanyaan, termasuk pemikiran terbalik dan pemikiran inersial. Untuk mengkvalifikasi efektivitas kerangka kami, kami merancang Jaringan Pemikiran Cognitif Bi-arah (BCTN) yang sesuai untuk mengkode laluan dan menghasilkan pertanyaan (jawaban) yang diberikan jawaban (pertanyaan) dan mengasingkan pengetahuan bidireksi. Model memiliki kemampuan untuk membalikkan pertanyaan pemikiran yang dapat membantu pemikiran inersial untuk menghasilkan jawaban yang lebih akurat. Perbaikan kompetitif diperhatikan di dataset DuReader, mengkonfirmasi hipotesis kita bahwa pengetahuan bidireksi membantu tugas QA. Framework novel menunjukkan perspektif yang menarik tentang pemahaman pembacaan mesin dan ilmu pengetahuan kognitif.', 'ko': '우리는 상호 보완 학습 시스템 이론의 측면에서 새로운 읽기 이해 쌍방향 인지 지식 구조(BCKF)를 제시했다.그것은 역방향 사고와 관성 사고를 포함한 두뇌에서 질문에 대답하는 두 가지 사고방식을 모의하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리의 프레임워크의 유효성을 검증하기 위해 우리는 상응하는 쌍방향 인지 사고 네트워크(BCTN)를 설계하여 문장을 인코딩하고 답안(문제)을 주는 문제(답안)을 생성하며 쌍방향 지식을 결합시켰다.이 모델은 역방향으로 문제를 추리하는 능력을 가지고 있어 관성적인 사유가 더욱 정확한 답안을 만드는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.DuReader 데이터에서 경쟁 개선을 집중적으로 관찰한 것은 쌍방향 지식이 QA 임무에 도움이 된다는 우리의 가설을 입증했다.이 틀은 기계독해와 인지과학의 흥미로운 시각을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'ما یک روزنامهٔ دانش شناخته\u200cهای دوچرخه (BCKF) را برای خواندن درک از نظر نظریه نظریه\u200cهای سیستم یادگیری اضافه می\u200cکنیم. هدف این است که دو راه فکری در مغز را شبیه سازی کند تا به سوالات جواب دهد، شامل فکری و فکری غیر مستقل. برای تأثیر فعالیت چهارچوب ما، یک شبکه مشاهده\u200cی فکر کردن (BCTN) را برای کودکان گذاری و یک سوال (جواب) به یک پاسخ (سوال) داده می\u200cشود و دانش دو طریق را نابود می\u200cکنیم. این مدل توانایی برای بازگرداندن سوالات منطقی دارد که می توانند به فکرهای نابودی کمک کند تا جواب دقیقیقی بیشتر تولید کند. توسط مجموعه داده\u200cهای DuReader توجه می\u200cشود که تأیید می\u200cکند که دانش دو مسیر به کار QA کمک می\u200cکند. چهارچوب رمانی یک نگاه جالبی در مورد خواندن ماشین درک و دانش شناخته را نشان می دهد.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mradi wa maarifa ya Ujuzi wa Kiraia (BCKF) kwa kusoma ufahamu kutoka mtazamo wa nadharia ya mfumo wa kujifunza za kompyuta. Inakusudia kuunganisha njia mbili za kufikiri katika ubongo ili kujibu maswali, ikiwa ni pamoja na mabadiliko ya mawazo na mawazo yasiyo na haki. Ili kuthibitisha ufanisi wa mfumo wetu, tunaunda Mtandao wa Kihafidhina wa Kiongozi wa Kihafidhina (BCTN) kuunda swali lililopewa jibu (swali) na kupunguza maarifa ya moja kwa moja. Mfano huu una uwezo wa kubadilisha maswali yanayoeleza ambayo yanaweza kusaidia kufikiri bila haki kutengeneza majibu sahihi zaidi. Maboresho ya kompania yanaonekana kwenye seti ya data ya DuReader, inayothibitisha imani yetu ya kwamba maarifa ya moja kwa moja yanasaidia kazi ya QA. Mfumo wa riwaya unaonyesha mtazamo wa kuvutia kuhusu mashine inayosoma ufahamu na sayansi ya maarifa.', 'tr': 'Biz özümizi complementer öwrenme sistemalarynyň teoriýasyndan düşünmek üçin bir roman 2-yönünde bilim çerçevesini teklip edýäris. Beynin sorularına cevap vermek için iki yolu düşünmek amacı da, tersi düşünme ve inersel düşünme dahil. Çagymyzyň etkinliýetini takyklamak üçin, geçişi kodlamak we soragy (sorag) bermegi üçin bir 2-yönlik Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) düzenledik we iki yönlik bilgi çykarmak üçin bir sorag (jogaby) üretýäris Bu modelde inersiýal düşünüp dogry jogaplary döretmäge kömek edip biljek razylygy üýtgetmek ukypy bar. DuReader veri setinde düzgün gelişmeler, iddialerimizi iki yönden bilim KI işine kömek edip durar. Bu roman çerçevesi maşynyň okamagy we bilgili bilim hakynda gyzykly perspektivy görkeýär.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n roman bi-rigting kognitiewe kennis raamwerk (BCKF) vir lees verstanding van die perspektief van komplementêre leersystemeteorie. Dit is doel om twee maniere van gedink in die brein te simuleer om vrae te antwoord, insluitend omgekeerde gedink en inersiele gedink. Om die effektiviteit van ons raamwerk te geldigheid, ontwerp ons 'n ooreenstemmende bi-rigting kognitiewe Dink Netwerk (BCTN) om die wagwoord te kodeer en 'n vraag (antwoord) te genereer wat 'n antwoord (vraag) gegee het en die twee-rigting kennis afkoppel. Die model het die moontlik om redekening vrae te omdraai wat inersiele gedagte kan help om meer presies antwoorde te genereer. Kompatiewe verbetering is aangesien in DuReader datastel, bevestig ons hipotees dat bi-rigting kennis die QA taak hulp. Die romaniese raamwerk vertoon 'n interessante perspektief op masjien lees verstanding en kognitiewe wetenskap.", 'am': 'የቢ-አቀናቢ እውቀት ፍሬም (BCKF) አካባቢ ትምህርት ሲስተማርን ዝርዝር ከታሪክ ማስተማርን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በbrain ውስጥ የመስከርን ሁለት መንገዶች ለመመልስ እና የጥያቄ አሳብ እና የአሳማሚ አሳብ ለመስጠት ይችላል፡፡ የፍሬማችንን ጥያቄ ለማረጋገጥ፣ የቦክራኒያ አካባቢ አሳብ መረብ (BCTN) መግቢያውን ለማክበር እና መልስ (ጥያቄ) የተሰጠውን ጥያቄን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ The model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions which can assist inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers.  አካባቢ ትክክል ማድረግ በዲአዲስ ዳታተር ማድረግ ነው፤ የግል ማስታወቂያውን የQA ስራ እንዲረዳ የሚችለውን አፍላጎታችንን የሚያረጋግጥ ነው፡፡ የረኀብ ፍሬማር የሞክራዊ ማሳየት እና የሕንፃዊ እውቀት ማነብ ላይ የሚያሳየው ማተሚያ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri të njohurive të njohura dy-drejtuese (BCKF) për leximin e kuptimit nga perspektiva e teorisë komplementare të sistemeve mësuese. Ai synon të simulojë dy mënyra të menduarit në tru për të përgjigjur pyetjeve, duke përfshirë mendimin e kundërt dhe mendimin inercial. Për të vlerësuar efektshmërinë e kuadrit tonë, ne dizajnojmë një Rrjet të Mendimit Kombëtar Bidrejtues (BCTN) për të koduar kalimin dhe për të gjeneruar një pyetje (përgjigje) të dhënë një përgjigje (pyetje) dhe për të shkëputur njohurinë dy-drejtuese. The model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions which can assist inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers.  Përmirësimi konkurrues është vëzhguar në dataset DuReader, duke konfirmuar hipotezën tonë se njohuria dy-drejtuese ndihmon detyrën QA. Korniza e re tregon një perspektivë interesante mbi kuptimin e leximit të makinave dhe shkencën kognitive.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր երկուղղությամբ ճանաչողական գիտելիքների շրջանակ (BCKF) կարդալու համար ընկալումը համալրացող ուսումնական համակարգերի տեսության տեսանկյունից: Այն նպատակում է սիմուլյալ ուղեղում մտածելու երկու ձևեր պատասխանելու հարցերին, ներառյալ հակառակ մտածելը և իներցիալ մտածելը: Մեր կառուցվածքի արդյունավետությունը հաստատելու համար մենք ստեղծում ենք համապատասխան երկուղղությամբ ճանաչողական մտածողական ցանց (BCTN), որպեսզի կոդավորենք անցումը և ստեղծենք հարց (պատասխան), որը պատասխան է տալիս (հարց) և բաժանենք երկուղղությամբ գիտելիքը: Մոդելը ունի հնարավորություն հակադարձնել մտածողական հարցեր, որոնք կարող են օգնել իներցիալ մտածելուն ավելի ճշգրիտ պատասխաններ ստեղծելու: Competitive improvement is observed in DuReader dataset, confirming our hypothesis that bi-directional knowledge helps the QA task.  Նոր շրջանակը ցույց է տալիս մեքենայի ընթերցման և ճանաչողական գիտության հետաքրքիր տեսանկյունից:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি উপন্যাস বি সরাসরি কোনো পরিচালিত জ্ঞান ফ্রেম ফ্রেম (বিসিকেএফ) প্রস্তাব করেছি যাতে তারা প্রশান্তিক শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থা থিওর দৃষ্ এর উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে মস্তিষ্কে ভাবতে দুটি উপায় তৈরি করা যায় প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়ার জন্য, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে প্রত্যাবর্তন চ আমাদের ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রমের কার্যক্রম পরিষ্কার করার জন্য আমরা একটি বিডিয়াল কোন্ডিয়েন্টিভ কোন চিন্তা নেটওয়ার্ক (বিসিটিএন) ডিজাইন করি পাসের এনকোড করার জন্য এবং একটি প্ মডেলটির ক্ষমতা আছে যুক্তিগত প্রশ্ন প্রতিরোধ করতে যাচ্ছে যা অন্যায়ভাবে চিন্তা করতে পারে আরো সঠিক উত্তর তৈরি করতে। ডুরিডারের ডাটাসেটে প্রতিমাত্রিক উন্নয়ন দেখা যাচ্ছে, আমাদের হিসেবে নিশ্চিত করে যে কিউএ কাজের সাহায্য করে। এই উপন্যাসের ফ্রেম প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে মেশিনের উপর একটি মজার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিকার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে মে', 'ca': "Proposem un nou marc de coneixement cognitiu bidireccional (BCKF) per llegir la comprensió des de la perspectiva de la teoria de sistemes d'aprenentatge complementars. Té l'objectiu de simular dues maneres de pensar al cervell per respondre preguntes, incloent el pensament invers i el pensament in èrcic. Per validar l'eficacia del nostre marc, dissenyem una xarxa de pensament cognitiu bidireccional (BCTN) correspondent per codificar el passatge i generar una pregunta (resposta) donada una resposta (pregunta) i descoplar el coneixement bidireccional. El model té l'habilitat de invertir preguntes de raonament que poden ajudar al pensament inèrcic a generar respostes més exactes. Es veu una millora competitiva en el conjunt de dades DuReader, confirmant la nostra hipòtesi de que el coneixement bidireccional ajuda a la tasca QA. El nou marc mostra una perspectiva interessant sobre la comprensió de la lectura màquina i la ciència cognitiva.", 'az': 'Biz yeni iki yönəlli Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) oxumaq üçün yeni bir təklif edirik. Bu, beyin içində iki fikirləşmək yolunu simülə etmək istəyir, suallara cavab vermək, fikirləşmək və inersi fikirləşmək. Çerçivemizin etkinliğini təsdiqləmək üçün, hərəkəti kodlamaq və bir cevap (sual) verilmiş bir sual (cavab) yaratmaq və iki tərəfdən biliyi çəkmək üçün müəyyən bir iki tərəfli Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN) tasarladıq. Modelin daha doğru cavab yaratmağa yardım edə biləcək razılaşma suallarını geri çevirə biləcəyi gücü var. DuReader verilənlər qutusunda mübahisəçilik düzəltməsi, QA işin ə kömək edəcəyini təsdiqləyir. Bu roman çerçivesi maşın oxunması və kognitiv elmi barəsində ilginç bir perspektiv göstərir.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový Bi-Directional Cognitive Knowledge Framework (BCKF) pro porozumění čtení z pohledu teorie komplementárních učebních systémů. Jeho cílem je simulovat dva způsoby myšlení v mozku pro odpověď na otázky, včetně reverzního myšlení a inerciálního myšlení. Pro ověření efektivity našeho frameworku navrhujeme odpovídající Bi-Directional Cognitive Thinking Network (BCTN), která kóduje průchod a generuje otázku (odpověď) danou odpověď (otázku) a oddělí obousměrné znalosti. Model má schopnost obrátit otázky uvažování, které mohou pomoci inerciálnímu myšlení a generovat přesnější odpovědi. V datové sadě DuReader je pozorováno zlepšení konkurence, což potvrzuje naši hypotézu, že obousměrné znalosti pomáhají úkolu QA. Nový rámec ukazuje zajímavý pohled na porozumění strojovému čtení a kognitivní vědy.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za dvosmjernu kognitivnu znanost (BCKF) za čitanje razumijevanja iz perspektive teorije komplementarnog sustava učenja. Cilj je simulirati dva načina razmišljanja u mozgu da odgovori na pitanja, uključujući obrnuto razmišljanje i inercijalno razmišljanje. Da bismo potvrdili učinkovitost našeg okvira, dizajnirali smo odgovarajuću dvosmjernu kognitivnu mrežu za razmišljanje (BCTN) kako bi kodirali prolaz i stvorili pitanje (odgovor) s obzirom na odgovor (pitanje) i rasključili dvosmjerno znanje. Model ima sposobnost obrnuti pitanja razuma koja mogu pomoći inercijalnom razmišljanju da stvara tačnije odgovore. Konkurentno poboljšanje je posmatrano u skupini podataka DuReadera, potvrđujući našu hipotezu da dvosmjerno znanje pomaže zadatku QA. Novi okvir pokazuje zanimljivu perspektivu o razumijevanju mašina i kognitivnoj nauci.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uudse kahesuunalise kognitiivse teadmise raamistiku (BCKF) lugemise mõistmiseks täiendavate õppesüsteemide teooria vaatenurgast. Selle eesmärk on simuleerida ajus kahte mõtlemisviisi, et vastata küsimustele, sealhulgas pöördmõtlemine ja inertsiaalne mõtlemine. Meie raamistiku tõhususe kinnitamiseks loome vastava kahesuunalise kognitiivse mõtlemise võrgustiku (BCTN), et kodeerida läbipääs ja genereerida küsimus (vastus), antud vastus (küsimus) ja lahutada kahesuunalised teadmised. Mudelil on võime pöörata ümber arutlusküsimusi, mis võivad aidata inertsiaalsel mõtlemisel luua täpsemaid vastuseid. DuReaderi andmekogumis täheldatakse konkurentsivõimelist paranemist, mis kinnitab meie hüpoteesi, et kahesuunalised teadmised aitavad kvaliteedi tagamisel kaasa. Uudne raamistik näitab huvitavat perspektiivi masinlugemise mõistmisele ja kognitiivsele teadusele.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta kaksisuuntaista kognitiivista tietokehystä (BCKF) lukuymmärtämiseen täydentävien oppimisjärjestelmien teorian näkökulmasta. Sen tavoitteena on simuloida aivoissa kahta ajattelutapaa vastaamaan kysymyksiin, mukaan lukien käänteinen ajattelu ja inertiaajattelu. Kehyksemme tehokkuuden validoimiseksi suunnittelemme vastaavan kaksisuuntaisen kognitiivisen ajattelun verkoston (BCTN), joka koodaa läpikulun ja luo kysymyksen (vastauksen), joka antaa vastauksen (kysymyksen) ja irrottaa kaksisuuntaisen tiedon. Mallilla on kyky kääntää päättelykysymyksiä, jotka voivat auttaa inertiaajattelua tuottamaan tarkempia vastauksia. DuReader-aineistossa havaitaan kilpailullista parannusta, mikä vahvistaa hypoteesimme, että kaksisuuntainen tieto auttaa laadunvarmistustehtävään. Uusi viitekehys näyttää mielenkiintoisen näkökulman konelukemisen ymmärtämiseen ja kognitiiviseen tieteeseen.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מסגרת ידע קוניטיבי שתי כיוונים חדשה (BCKF) לקרוא הבנה מהמבט של תיאוריה מערכות הלימוד המתאימות. הוא מתכוון להדמיל שתי דרכים לחשוב במוח כדי לענות על שאלות, כולל לחשוב הפוך וחשוב אינרציאלי. כדי לאשר את היעילות של המסגרת שלנו, אנחנו מעצבים רשת חשיבה קוניטיבית שתי הכיוונית (BCTN) שתתאימה כדי לקוד את המעבר וליצור שאלה (תשובה) נתנה תשובה (שאלה) ולהפריד את הידע שתי הכיווני. למודל יש את היכולת להפוך שאלות הגיוניים שיכולות לעזור לחשוב אינרציאלי לייצר תשובות מדויקות יותר. שיפור תחרותי מתבונן בסט נתונים DuReader, מאשר ההיפתוזה שלנו כי ידע ביכיוון עוזר למשימה QA. המסגרת הרומנית מראה פרספקטיבה מעניינת על הבנה של קריאת מכונות ומדע קוגניטיבי.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov dvosmerni okvir kognitivnega znanja (BCKF) za razumevanje branja z vidika teorije komplementarnih učnih sistemov. Cilj je simulirati dva načina razmišljanja v možganih za odgovore na vprašanja, vključno z obratnim in inercialnim razmišljanjem. Da bi potrdili učinkovitost našega okvira, oblikujemo ustrezno dvosmerno kognitivno mišljenje mrežo (BCTN), ki kodira prehod in ustvari vprašanje (odgovor), dani odgovor (vprašanje) in loči dvosmerno znanje. Model ima sposobnost obračanja razmišljanja, ki lahko pomagajo inercialnemu razmišljanju pri ustvarjanju natančnejših odgovorov. Konkurenčno izboljšanje opažamo v podatkovnem naboru DuReader, kar potrjuje našo hipotezo, da dvosmerno znanje pomaga pri nalogi zagotavljanja kakovosti. Novejši okvir prikazuje zanimivo perspektivo razumevanja strojnega branja in kognitivne znanosti.', 'ha': "Tune ƙayyade wani takardar Bi-Directive Cilmi (BCKF) wa karanta Compression daga mtazamon da na'urar da matsayin na'anar da adadi. Yana aimar ya sami hanyõyi biyu masu yin tunãni a cikin uboyi dõmin ya karɓa wa tambayar su, kamar yadda ya kõma suna tunãni da fikanci masu inganci. To, in gaskata fikar firam masu, za mu design wata shirin bayani na Bi-Directive Cognitive Fikiriya (BATN) dõmin ya kode bayani na hanya kuma Mu sami wani tambayi (mai tambaya) da aka bai wa jibi (tambayi) kuma Mu ƙara zane-bayani. The model has the ability to reverse reasoning questions which can assist inertial thinking to generate more accurate answers.  An ƙara kyautatawa a cikin database na Dureader, yana mai gaskatãwa ga hanyarmu cewa da ilmi guda na ƙara aikin QA. Firam ɗin nan na nuna wani muhimmi mai amfani na kan karatun matsayin karatun Compression da Sayani na kognitive.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་ལྟ་བུ་འདིའི་མཐུན་རྩོམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སུ་གཉིས་གཡོན་པའི་རྩོམ་པ་སྒྲིག་གཞི་ཚོགས་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་ཤེས་པ་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ལྕགས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པར་མཐུན་པ་དེ་གཉིས་གཤམ་གྱི་Cognitive Thinking Network མ་དབུགས Competitive improvement is observed in DuReader dataset, confirming our hypothesis that bi-directional knowledge helps the QA task. གསར་གཏོད་གཞུང་གིས་འདིས་རྩོམ་འཁོར་གྱི་ལྟ་སྟངས་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་རྟོགས་ཤེས་རྩོམ་གཏོང་དང་།', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé nggunakake kuwi nyumbang bi-directial CoGNative knowness frame (BKF) kanggo basa basa gambaran seneng perspektur tur nggawe sistem sing nyebuti. Bilih perusahaan kelompok kuwi tindakan pangan iki bakal kelompok nggambar apakno, gambar nggawe barang nggunakake tarjamahan lan barang kelompok. Ngawe ngupakan efek karo nggawe barang sampeyan mralakno, awake kita disenyo iso nggawe "bi-directive CoGNative Minding Network" (BKT) nggo kode pasang karo nganggo perusahaan (tontong) sumelang ja dianggap (suanung) lan ngawe barang langgar sampeyan matara awake tarjamahan Model kuwi bisa ngubah perusahaan penting sampeyan sing bisa ngubah inêncial kang nggawe barang sing apik trus. Puwedhakan langgar sampeyan kang dipoleh nggawe ing Dureader dataset, ngnggunakake supotono awake sing bisa-directive biretekno liyo nggunakake KA task. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing paling nggawe perspektur sing narik kawit karo mên kuwi duluran gambar lan saiki konatif.'}
{'en': 'Molweni : A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'ar': 'Molweni: مجموعة بيانات فهم القراءة الآلية القائمة على الحوارات متعددة الأحزاب مع بنية الخطاب', 'pt': 'Molweni: um desafio Conjunto de dados de compreensão de leitura de máquina baseado em diálogos multipartidários com estrutura de discurso', 'es': 'Molweni: Un desafío Conjunto de datos de comprensión de lectura automática basado en diálogos multipartitos con estructura de discurso', 'fr': 'Molweni\xa0: A Challenge Jeu de données de compréhension de lecture automatique basé sur des dialogues multipartites avec structure de discours', 'ja': 'モルウェニ：多党対話ベースのマシンリーディング理解データセットとディスカッション構造', 'hi': 'Molweni: प्रवचन संरचना के साथ एक चुनौती Multiparty Dialogues-आधारित मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन डेटासेट', 'zh': 'Molweni曰:多方言之机器读数集', 'ru': 'Molweni: многопартийный набор данных для машинного чтения на основе многопартийных диалогов со структурой дискурса', 'ga': 'Molweni: Dúshlán Tacar Sonraí um Léamhthuiscint Inneallbhunaithe Ilpháirtíbhunaithe le Struchtúr Dioscúrsa', 'ka': 'მოლენი: დიალოგების განსაზღვრება მაქინის კომპრენციის მონაცემების კომპრენციატი განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'Molweni: Egy kihívás Többpárt párbeszédek alapú gépi olvasási értékelési adatkészlet beszédstruktúrával', 'el': 'Μολβένι: Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων κατανόησης ανάγνωσης μηχανών με βάση τους διαλόγους πολλών μερών με δομή συζήτησης', 'kk': 'Molweni: Дискурс құрылымы бойынша машинаның оқу құрылымының көптеген диалогтарының көпшілігі', 'it': 'Molweni: Una sfida Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset con Struttura Discourse', 'lt': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'ms': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'mk': 'Молвени: Базиран на различни дијалози со предизвики за машинско читање на компроментни податоци со структура на дискурс', 'ml': 'മോള്\u200dവെനി: ചല്ലഞ്ചെന്\u200dജ് Multiparty Dialogues-based യന്ത്രം വായിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റര്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വായിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രം', 'no': 'Molweni: Eit utfordring av multipartitsdialogbasert maskinelesingsdatabasert med diskursstruktur', 'pl': 'Molweni: Wyzwanie Wieloparty na dialogach maszynowych zestaw danych dotyczących zrozumienia odczytu maszynowego z strukturą dyskursu', 'mn': 'Молони: Олон-партийн диалогууд дээр машин унших өгөгдлийн баталгаа ярианы бүтэц', 'mt': "Molweni: Sett ta' Dejta ta' Komprensjoni dwar l-Aqrar tal-Magni bbażat fuq Djalogi Multipartiti b'Sfida ma' Struttura ta' Diskors", 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Molweni: En utmaning Multipart Dialogues-baserad maskinläsförståelse dataset med diskursstruktur', 'ro': 'Molweni: O provocare Dialoguri multiple bazate pe date de înțelegere a citirii mașinii cu structura discursului', 'ta': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'sr': 'Molweni: Izazov za multipartijske dijaloge baziran na mašinama za čitanje datoteka sa strukturom diskursa', 'so': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'ur': 'Molweni: ایک چالونگ Multiparty Dialogs-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Molweni: A Challeng multiparty Dialogo-based Machine Reading Compention dataset with Discourse structure', 'bg': 'Молвени: Предизвикателство Многопартийни диалози, базирани на Машинно четене набор от данни с дискурсна структура', 'da': 'Molweni: En udfordring Multipart Dialogues baseret maskinlæsning forståelse datasæt med diskursstruktur', 'nl': 'Molweni: Een uitdaging Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset met discoursstructuur', 'de': 'Molweni: Eine Herausforderung Multiparty Dialogbasierte Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset mit Diskursstruktur', 'fa': 'Molweni: یک Challenge Multiparty Dialogue based Machine Reading Comprehension Data with Discourse Structure', 'ko': 'Molweni: 다방면의 대화를 바탕으로 하는 문장 구조를 가진 기계 읽기 이해 데이터 집합', 'tr': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'sw': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'am': 'ሞልweni: የተጨማሪው Multiparty Dialogs-based Machine Reading Compression Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'hy': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'az': 'Molweni', 'bn': 'মোলওয়েনি: একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ মাল্টিপার্টি ডায়ালগ ভিত্তিক মেশিন পাঠ করছে ডিসার্স কাঠামোর সাথে ডাটাসেট', 'bs': 'Molweni: Izazovanje multipartijskih dijalogova na temelju kompresije datoteka za čitanje strojeva sa strukturom diskursa', 'ca': 'Molweni: Un conjunt de dades sobre la comprensió de lectura de màquines basat en diàlegs multipartits amb estructura de discurs', 'et': 'Molweni: väljakutse mitmepoolsetel dialoogidel põhinev masinlugemise arusaama andmekogum diskursuse struktuuriga', 'cs': 'Molweni: Výzva Vícestranných dialogů založených na strojovém čtení srozumitelná sada dat s diskursovou strukturou', 'id': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogue-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure', 'fi': 'Molweni: Haaste Monipuoluedialogeihin perustuva konelukuaineisto diskurssirakenteella', 'hr': 'Molweni: Izazovanje multipartijskih dijalogova na temelju kompresije datoteka za čitanje strojeva s strukturom diskursa', 'jv': 'MOLOTI: A Compenge Multipartite Dialogs-basa Masine Reading Compréncion dataasset with Diskure structural', 'sk': 'Molweni: Izziv večstrankarskih dialogov na podlagi strojnega branja s strukturo diskurza', 'ha': 'MolWei: A Challenge multi-party Dialog-Based Machine na karanta Comprehension Dataset with Discourse', 'he': 'מולוויני: מאתגר מבוסס על דיאלוגים מרובים במכונות קריאת מידע מובנה עם מבנה דיסקורס', 'bo': 'Molweni: A Challenge Multiparty Dialogues-based Machine Reading Comprehension Dataset with Discourse Structure'}
{'en': 'Research into the area of multiparty dialog has grown considerably over recent years. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog. Molweni’s source samples from the Ubuntu Chat Corpus, including 10,000 dialogs comprising 88,303 utterances. We annotate 30,066 questions on this corpus, including both answerable and unanswerable questions. Molweni also uniquely contributes discourse dependency annotations in a modified Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT ; Asher et al., 2016) style for all of its multiparty dialogs, contributing large-scale (78,245 annotated discourse relations) data to bear on the task of multiparty dialog discourse parsing. Our experiments show that Molweni is a challenging dataset for current MRC models : BERT-wwm, a current, strong SQuAD 2.0 performer, achieves only 67.7 % F1 on Molweni’s questions, a 20+% significant drop as compared against its SQuAD 2.0 performance.', 'ar': 'نما البحث في مجال الحوار متعدد الأحزاب بشكل كبير خلال السنوات الأخيرة. نقدم مجموعة بيانات Molweni ، وهي مجموعة بيانات لفهم قراءة الآلة (MRC) مع بنية خطاب مبنية على حوار متعدد الأطراف. عينات مصدر Molweni من Ubuntu Chat Corpus ، بما في ذلك 10000 مربع حوار يضم 88303 كلامًا. قمنا بتعليق 30،066 سؤالًا في هذه المجموعة ، بما في ذلك الأسئلة القابلة للإجابة وغير القابلة للإجابة. يساهم Molweni أيضًا بشكل فريد في التعليقات التوضيحية المتعلقة بالتبعية في الخطاب في أسلوب معدل تمثيل الخطاب المقسم (SDRT ؛ Asher وآخرون ، 2016) لجميع الحوارات متعددة الأطراف ، مما يساهم في بيانات واسعة النطاق (78245 علاقات خطاب مشروحة) للتأثير على مهمة تعدد الأحزاب تحليل خطاب الحوار. تُظهر تجاربنا أن Molweni عبارة عن مجموعة بيانات صعبة لنماذج MRC الحالية: BERT-wwm ، مؤدي SQuAD 2.0 قوي وحالي ، يحقق 67.7٪ فقط F1 في أسئلة Molweni ، وهو انخفاض كبير بنسبة 20 +٪ مقارنة بأداء SQuAD 2.0.', 'fr': "La recherche dans le domaine du dialogue multipartite s'est considérablement développée ces dernières années. Nous présentons le jeu de données Molweni, un jeu de données de compréhension de lecture automatique (MRC) dont la structure du discours repose sur un dialogue multipartite. Les exemples sources de Molweni provenant du Ubuntu Chat Corpus, y compris 10 000 boîtes de dialogue comprenant 88 303 énoncés. Nous annotons 30 066 questions sur ce corpus, y compris les questions auxquelles il est possible de répondre et de ne pas répondre. Molweni contribue également de manière unique aux annotations de dépendance du discours dans un style modifié de la théorie de la représentation du discours segmenté (SDRT\xa0; Asher et al., 2016) pour tous ses dialogues multipartites, fournissant des données à grande échelle (78 245 relations de discours annotées) pour la tâche du discours de dialogue multipartite analyse syntaxique. Nos expériences montrent que Molweni est un jeu de données difficile pour les modèles MRC actuels\xa0: Bert-WWM, un acteur actuel et performant de SQuad 2.0, n'atteint que 67,7\xa0% de F1 sur les questions de Molweni, soit une baisse significative de 20\xa0% par rapport à ses performances SQuAD 2.0.", 'es': 'La investigación en el área del diálogo multipartidista ha crecido considerablemente en los últimos años. Presentamos el conjunto de datos Molweni, un conjunto de datos de comprensión de lectura automática (MRC) con una estructura de discurso construida sobre un diálogo multipartidista. Ejemplos de fuentes de Molweni del Corpus de Chat de Ubuntu, que incluyen 10 000 diálogos que comprenden 88 303 enunciados. Anotamos 30.066 preguntas en este corpus, incluidas preguntas respondibles y no respondibles. Molweni también contribuye de manera única con anotaciones de dependencia del discurso en un estilo modificado de Teoría de la Representación del Discurso Segmentado (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) para todos sus diálogos multipartidistas, aportando datos a gran escala (78,245 relaciones de discurso anotadas) para contribuir a la tarea del diálogo multipartidista análisis sintáctico. Nuestros experimentos muestran que Molweni es un conjunto de datos desafiante para los modelos actuales de MRC: Bert-WWM, un sólido y actual intérprete de sQuad 2.0, logra solo un 67,7% de F1 en las preguntas de Molweni, una caída significativa de más del 20% en comparación con su rendimiento de sQuad 2.0.', 'pt': 'A pesquisa na área de diálogo multipartidário cresceu consideravelmente nos últimos anos. Apresentamos o conjunto de dados Molweni, um conjunto de dados de compreensão de leitura de máquina (MRC) com estrutura de discurso construída sobre diálogo multipartidário. Amostras de origem de Molweni do Ubuntu Chat Corpus, incluindo 10.000 diálogos compreendendo 88.303 enunciados. Anotamos 30.066 perguntas neste corpus, incluindo perguntas com e sem resposta. Molweni também contribui exclusivamente com anotações de dependência do discurso em um estilo modificado da Teoria da Representação do Discurso Segmentado (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) para todos os seus diálogos multipartidários, contribuindo com dados em larga escala (78.245 relações discursivas anotadas) para suportar a tarefa de multipartidários. análise do discurso do diálogo. Nossos experimentos mostram que Molweni é um conjunto de dados desafiador para os modelos MRC atuais: BERT-wwm, um atual e forte executor SQuAD 2.0, atinge apenas 67,7% F1 nas perguntas de Molweni, uma queda significativa de 20+% em comparação com seu desempenho SQuAD 2.0.', 'ja': 'マルチパーティダイアログの研究は近年大きく発展しています。マルチパーティダイアログ上に構築された対話構造を持つ機械読解（ MRC ）データセットであるMolweniデータセットを提示します。MolweniのソースサンプルはUbuntu Chat Corpusからのもので、88,303の発話を含む10,000のダイアログが含まれています。回答可能な質問と回答不可能な質問の両方を含む、このコーパスの30,066の質問に注釈を付けます。Molweniはまた、修正されたセグメンテッド・ディスコース表現理論（ SDRT; Asher et al., 2016 ）スタイルで、そのすべてのマルチパーティ・ダイアログに対してディスコース依存の注釈を独自に貢献し、マルチパーティ・ダイアログ・ディスコース解析のタスクに影響を与える大規模な（ 78,245の注釈付きディスコース関係）データを貢献している。当社の実験では、Molweniは現在のMRCモデルにとって困難なデータセットであることが示されています。現在、強力なSQuAD 2.0パフォーマーであるBERT - wwmは、Molweniの質問でわずか67.7%のF 1を達成し、SQuAD 2.0パフォーマンスと比較して20 +%の大幅な低下を達成しています。', 'ru': 'В последние годы значительно расширились исследования в области многопартийного диалога. Мы представляем набор данных Молвени - набор данных машинного понимания (MRC) со структурой дискурса, построенный на основе многопартийного диалога. Исходные образцы Molweni из Ubuntu Chat Corpus, включая 10 000 диалогов, содержащих 88 303 высказывания. Мы комментируем 30 066 вопросов в этом корпусе, включая как ответственные, так и неотвеченные вопросы. Мольвени также вносит уникальный вклад в аннотации зависимости дискурса в модифицированной Сегментированной теории представления дискурса (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) для всех ее многопартийных диалогов, внося крупномасштабные (78 245 аннотированных отношений дискурса) данные, которые должны иметь отношение к задаче многопартийного синтаксического анализа дискурса диалога. Наши эксперименты показывают, что Molweni является сложным набором данных для текущих моделей MRC: BERT-wwm, текущий, сильный исполнитель SQuAD 2.0, достигает только 67,7% F1 по вопросам Molweni, что на 20+% ниже его производительности SQuAD 2.0.', 'zh': '近年以来,多党言领域者颇长。 余辈建Molweni数据集,此一机器读解(MRC)数据集,其语结于多方对话之上。 Molweni 之源样,本自 Ubuntu Chat Corpus, 10,000 一对,其中含 88,303 一语。 注 30于此语料库上,066 有所问,对不能对。 Molweni改后分段语示理(SDRT。 Asher等,2016)备多方对语,大献(78,245注语)数,以任言解析之任。 吾实验明Molweni之于MRC也,一挑战性之数也:BERT-wwm,一强之SQuAD 2.0表现者也,Molweni之问上仅成67.7%之F1,与SQuAD 2.0性比,降20%以上。', 'hi': 'मल्टीपार्टी संवाद के क्षेत्र में अनुसंधान हाल के वर्षों में काफी बढ़ गया है। हम Molweni डेटासेट, एक मशीन पढ़ने की समझ (एमआरसी) डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो बहुदलीय संवाद पर निर्मित प्रवचन संरचना के साथ है। उबंटू चैट कॉर्पस से मोलवेनी के स्रोत नमूने, जिसमें 88,303 कथन शामिल हैं, जिनमें 10,000 संवाद शामिल हैं। हम इस कॉर्पस पर 30,066 प्रश्नों को एनोटेट करते हैं, जिसमें उत्तरदायी और अनुत्तरित दोनों प्रश्न शामिल हैं। मोलवेनी भी विशिष्ट रूप से एक संशोधित खंडित प्रवचन प्रतिनिधित्व सिद्धांत (एसडीआरटी) में प्रवचन निर्भरता एनोटेशन में योगदान देता है; Asher et al., 2016) अपने सभी बहुदलीय संवादों के लिए शैली, बड़े पैमाने पर (78,245 एनोटेट प्रवचन संबंधों) डेटा का योगदान करने के लिए multiparty संवाद प्रवचन पार्सिंग के कार्य पर सहन करने के लिए। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि Molweni वर्तमान MRC मॉडल के लिए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण डेटासेट है: BERT-wwm, एक वर्तमान, मजबूत SQuAD 2.0 कलाकार, Molweni के प्रश्नों पर केवल 67.7% F1 प्राप्त करता है, इसके SQuAD 2.0 प्रदर्शन की तुलना में 20 + % महत्वपूर्ण गिरावट।', 'ga': 'Tá méadú mór tagtha le blianta beaga anuas ar thaighde ar an réimse dialóige ilpháirtí. Cuirimid i láthair tacar sonraí Molweni, tacar sonraí ríomhthuisceana (MRC) le struchtúr dioscúrsa bunaithe ar dhialóg ilpháirtí. Samplaí foinse Molweni ón Ubuntu Chat Corpus, lena n-áirítear 10,000 dialóg comhdhéanta de 88,303 caint. Tá 30,066 ceist ar an gcorpas seo anótáilte againn, lena n-áirítear ceisteanna freagartha agus ceisteanna nach féidir a fhreagairt. Cuireann Molweni nótaí spleáchais dioscúrsa ar bhealach uathúil freisin i stíl modhnaithe Teoiric Ionadaíochta Dioscúrsa Deighilte (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) dá dialóga ilpháirtí go léir, ag cur sonraí ar scála mór (78,245 caidreamh dioscúrsa anótáilte) le cur i bhfeidhm ar thasc na ilpháirtí parsáil dioscúrsa dialóige. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh gur tacar sonraí dúshlánach é Molweni do mhúnlaí reatha MRC: ní ghnóthaíonn BERT-wwm, taibheoir láidir SQuAD 2.0 ach 67.7% F1 ar cheisteanna Molweni, titim suntasach 20+% i gcomparáid lena fheidhmíocht SQuAD 2.0.', 'hu': 'A többpártos párbeszéd területén folytatott kutatás jelentősen nőtt az elmúlt években. Bemutatjuk a Molweni adatkészletet, egy gépi olvasásértési (MRC) adatkészletet, amelynek diskurzus struktúrája több párbeszédre épül. Molweni forrásmintái az Ubuntu Chat Corpusból, beleértve a 10 000 párbeszédablakot, amelyek 88 303 kimondást tartalmaznak. 30 066 kérdést jegyzünk fel erre a korpuszra, beleértve a megválaszolható és meg nem válaszolható kérdéseket is. Molweni egyedülálló módon hozzájárul a diskurzusfüggőségi jegyzékekhez a módosított Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) stílusban az összes többpártos párbeszédhez, és nagyszabású (78 245 jegyzetelt diskurzus kapcsolat) adatot hozzájárul a többpártos párbeszéd diskurzus elemzéséhez. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a Molweni kihívást jelent a jelenlegi MRC modellek számára: a BERT-wwmm, egy jelenlegi, erős SQUAD 2.0 teljesítmény, Molweni kérdéseire mindössze 67,7%-os F1-t ér el, ami 20+ %-os jelentős csökkenést jelent az SQUAD 2.0 teljesítményéhez képest.', 'el': 'Η έρευνα στον τομέα του πολυκομματικού διαλόγου έχει αυξηθεί σημαντικά τα τελευταία χρόνια. Παρουσιάζουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων Molweni, ένα σύνολο δεδομένων κατανόησης μηχανικής ανάγνωσης (MRC) με δομή λόγου χτισμένη πάνω από διάλογο πολλαπλών μερών. Τα δείγματα πηγής του Μολβένι από το Σώμα Chat Ubuntu, συμπεριλαμβανομένων 10.000 διαλόγων που περιλαμβάνουν 88.303 ομιλίες. Παρατηρούμε 30,066 ερωτήσεις σε αυτό το σώμα, συμπεριλαμβανομένων τόσο των απαντήσεων όσο και των αναπάντητων ερωτήσεων. Επίσης, ο Μολβένι συμβάλλει μοναδικά σχόλια εξάρτησης του λόγου σε ένα τροποποιημένο στυλ Τμηματοποιημένης Θεωρίας Αντιπροσωπείας του Διαλόγου (κ.α., 2016) για όλους τους πολυκομματικούς διαλόγους του, συμβάλλοντας σε δεδομένα μεγάλης κλίμακας (78,245 σχολιασμένες σχέσεις λόγου) για να αντέξει στο έργο της ανάλυσης διαλόγου πολλαπλών μερών. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το Molweni είναι ένα δύσκολο σύνολο δεδομένων για τα τρέχοντα μοντέλα MRC: το BERT-wwm, ένα τρέχον, ισχυρό SQuAD 2.0 εκτελεστή, επιτυγχάνει μόνο 67,7% F1 στις ερωτήσεις του Molweni, μια 20+% σημαντική πτώση σε σύγκριση με την απόδοση SQuAD 2.0.', 'ka': 'მულტიპოტების დიალოგის განსაზღვრებისთვის შესაძლებლობა ბოლო წლის განმავლობაში იზრდება. ჩვენ მოლონდონის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია (MRC) მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის სტრუქ მოლონონის გამოსახულების მაგალითები Ubuntu Chat Corpus-დან, რომლებიც 10 000 დიალოგები, რომლებიც 88,303 სიტყვები. ჩვენ 30 066 კითხვები ამ კორპუსზე დავწერეთ, რომლებიც ორივე პასუხი და დაუწყვებელი კითხვები. მოლონი ასევე ერთადერთი დამატებით დისკურსების დამატებით განსაზღვრებული სეგმენტური დისკურსების ტერიოში (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) სტილის ყველა მისი მულტიპოტი დიალოგიების დიალოგი დიალოგიების დიალოგიების განსაზღვრებისთვის, დამატებით დისკურსების განსაზღვ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ მოლონი მოკითხვების შესაძლებელი მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა: BERT-wwm, მიმდინარე, ძალიან SQuAD 2.0 მონაცემები, მხოლოდ 67.7% F1 მოხდება მოლონის კითხვების შესაძლებლობაში, 20+% მნიშვნელოვანი გადა', 'kk': 'Көп партиялық диалогтың зерттеулері соңғы жылдар бойы көп өсті. Біз Molweni деректер қорларын, көптеген партиялар диалогында құрылған дискурс құрылымыз (MRC) деректер қорларының түсінімі. Ubuntu Chat Corpus бағдарламасының мәліметтері, 88.303 сөздері бар 10.000 диалогтары бар. Бұл корпус туралы 30 066 сұрақтарды жауап береміз, және жауап бермейтін сұрақтарды қоса. Сонымен қатар, Молони бір-бірінші рет өзгертілген Сегменталдық дискурстар репрезентациясының теориясы (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) стилінде дискурстардың тәуелсіздік жазбаларын көмектеседі. Бүкіл партиялық диалогтарының барлық диалогтарының үлкен масштабына (78, 245 жаз Біздің тәжірибелеріміз Молуни назардағы MRC үлгілерінің қиын деректер жиыны көрсетеді: BERT-wwm, қазіргі SQuAD 2.0 орындаушысы, тек 67,7% F1 дегенді Молонияның сұрақтарында жеткізеді, 20+% үлкен SQuAD 2.0 орындаушысына салыстырылып қа', 'it': 'La ricerca nel campo del dialogo multipartitico è cresciuta notevolmente negli ultimi anni. Presentiamo il dataset Molweni, un dataset di comprensione della lettura automatica (MRC) con struttura del discorso costruita su dialogo multipartitico. I campioni sorgente di Molweni dal Ubuntu Chat Corpus, inclusi 10.000 dialoghi contenenti 88.303 dichiarazioni. Abbiamo annotato 30.066 domande su questo corpus, incluse sia domande risposte che senza risposta. Molweni contribuisce anche in modo univoco alle annotazioni di dipendenza del discorso in uno stile modificato di rappresentazione del discorso segmentato (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) per tutti i suoi dialoghi multipartitici, contribuendo a dati su larga scala (78.245 relazioni di discorso annotate) da sostenere sul compito di analisi del discorso multipartitico. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che Molweni è un set di dati impegnativo per gli attuali modelli MRC: BERT-wwm, un attuale e forte performer SQUAD 2.0, raggiunge solo il 67,7% di F1 sulle domande di Molweni, un calo significativo del 20% rispetto alle sue prestazioni SQUAD 2.0.', 'ms': 'Penyelidikan ke kawasan dialog pihak berbilang telah tumbuh secara konsisten selama bertahun- tahun terakhir. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  Sampel sumber Molweni dari Ubuntu Chat Corpus, termasuk 10,000 dialog yang mengandungi 88,303 ungkapan. Kami menyatakan 30,066 soalan pada korpus ini, termasuk kedua-dua soalan yang dapat menjawab dan tidak dapat menjawab. Molweni juga menyumbangkan anotasi dependensi diskursus dalam Teori Perwakilan Sekmentasi Terubah (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) gaya untuk semua dialog berbilang parti, menyumbangkan data skala besar (78,245 hubungan diskursus yang dicatat) untuk dilaksanakan pada tugas penghuraian diskursus dialog berbilang parti. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa Molweni adalah set data yang mencabar untuk model MRC semasa: BERT-wwm, seorang pelakon SQuAD 2.0 yang kuat semasa, hanya mencapai 67.7% F1 pada soalan Molweni, 20+% turun yang signifikan dibandingkan dengan prestasi SQuAD 2.0.', 'lt': "Pastaraisiais metais daug išaugo daugiašalio dialogo moksliniai tyrimai. Mes pristatome Molweni duomenų rinkinį, mašinų skaitymo supratimo (MRC) duomenų rinkinį su diskurso struktūra, sukurta per daugiašalį dialog ą. Molweni's source samples from the Ubuntu Chat Corpus, including 10,000 dialogs comprising 88,303 utterances.  Nurašome 30 066 klausimų apie šį korpusą, įskaitant atsakomus ir neatsakomus klausimus. Molweni taip pat išskirtinai prisideda prie diskurso priklausomybės anotacijų modifikuotoje Segmentuoto diskurso atstovavimo teorijoje (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016 m.) visiems jos daugiašalių dialog ų stiliams, prisidedant prie didelio masto (78 245 anotuoti diskurso santykiai) duomenų, kuriuos reikia atlikti atliekant daugiašalių dialogų diskurso analizę. Mūs ų eksperimentai rodo, kad Molweni yra sunkus dabartinių MRC modelių duomenų rinkinys: dabartinis, stiprus SQuAD 2.0 atlikėjas BERT-wwm pasiekia tik 67,7 % F1 Molweni klausimų klausimuose, o 20 % žymiai sumažėja, palyginti su jo SQuAD 2.0 rezultatais.", 'mk': 'Истражувањето во областа на мултипартискиот дијалог значително се зголеми во последниве години. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  Примероците од изворот на Молвени од Убунту Чат Корпус, вклучувајќи и 10.000 дијалози кои сочинуваат 88.303 изрази. Напишуваме 30.066 прашања за овој корпус, вклучувајќи и одговорни и неодговорни прашања. Молвени, исто така, единствено придонесува за анатациите на дискурсната зависност во модифицираната теорија на сегментирана дискурсна претстава (СДРТ; Ашер и ал., 2016) за сите нејзини мултипартиски дијалози, придонесувајќи на големо ниво (78.245 анатирани дискурсни односи) податоци за задачата на анализирање дискурсни ди Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека Молвени е предизвикувачки датотек за актуелните модели на МРЦ: БЕРТ-ВМ, актуелен, силен изведувач на SQuAD 2.0, постигнува само 67,7 отсто Ф1 за прашањата на Молвени, значителен пад од 20 отсто во споредба со својата изведба на SQuAD 2.0.', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d പല്ലിപാര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ഡയലോഗിന്റെ പ്രദേശത്തേക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നതാണ്. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  ഉബുണ്ടു ചാറ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്സില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള മോള്\u200dവെനിയുടെ സോര്\u200dസ്സ് മാമ്പുകള്\u200d, 88,303 വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുന്ന 10,000 ഡയലോഗു ഈ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 30,066 ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള മൊള്\u200dവെനി മാറ്റിയ സെഗ്മെന്റ് ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d തിയറിയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആശേര്\u200d എല്ലാ സംസാരത്തിന്റെയും രീതിയില്\u200d പങ്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വലിയ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് മോള്\u200dവെനി ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ എംആര്\u200dസി മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു വിലാസകരമായ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റാണെന്നാണ്: ബെര്\u200dട്ടി- ഉം- ഉം- ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ശ', 'mt': 'Ir-riċerka fil-qasam tad-djalogu multipartitiku kibret konsiderevolment matul dawn l-aħħar snin. Aħna nippreżentaw is-sett tad-dejta Molweni, sett tad-dejta tal-komprensjoni tal-qari bil-magna (MRC) bi struttura ta’ diskors mibnija fuq djalogu multipartitiku. Kampjuni tas-sors ta’ Molweni mill-Ubuntu Chat Corpus, inklużi 10,000 djalogu li jinkludu 88,303 dikjarazzjoni. Aħna nnotaw 30 066 mistoqsija dwar dan il-korpus, inklużi kemm mistoqsijiet responsabbli kif ukoll dawk mhux responsabbli. Molweni tikkontribwixxi wkoll b’mod uniku għall-annotazzjonijiet tad-dipendenza fuq id-diskors fi stil modifikat tat-Teorija tar-Rappreżentanza tad-Diskors Segmentat (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) għad-djalogi multipartiti kollha tagħha, u tikkontribwixxi dejta fuq skala kbira (78,245 relazzjoni ta’ diskors annotata) li għandha tagħmel fuq il-kompitu tal-analizzazzjoni tad-diskors b’djalogu multipartitiku. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li Molweni hija sett ta’ dejta ta’ sfida għall-mudelli attwali tal-MRC: BERT-wwm, artist attwali u b’s a ħħtu tal-SQuAD 2.0, jilħaq biss 67.7% F1 fuq il-mistoqsijiet tal-Molweni, tnaqqis sinifikanti ta’ 20% meta mqabbel mal-prestazzjoni tal-SQuAD 2.0 tiegħu.', 'mn': 'Олон-партийн диалогын талаар судалгаа сүүлийн жилүүдэд маш их нэмэгдсэн. Бид Molweni өгөгдлийн санг, машин унших мэдээллийн санг олон партийн диалог дээр бүтээсэн ярианы бүтэц бүтээсэн. Мольоны эх үүсвэрийн үлгэр нь Убунтун Чат Корпус, 88,303 ярианы 10,000 диалогууд байдаг. Бид энэ корпус дээр 30.066 асуултуудыг анзаарч байна. Хариулт болон хариултгүй асуултууд хоёулаа ч гэсэн. Молони мөн олон партийн диалогуудын ажил дээр олон партийн диалогуудын талаар ажиллах өгөгдлийн талаар дэмжиж, олон партийн диалогуудын талаар ажиллах зорилготой хэлэлцээний хамаарал хамаарал хамааралтай хэлэлцээний тухай хэлэлцээний тухай хэлэлцээний түвшинд хамааралтай байдлын тухай нэг Бидний туршилтууд Молони бол одоогийн MRC загваруудын хэцүү өгөгдлийн санг харуулж байна: BERT-wwm, одоогийн хүчтэй SQuAD 2.0 үйлдвэрлэгч, Молонигийн асуултад 67.7% F1 гарч ирнэ, SQuAD 2.0 үйлдвэрлэлтэй харьцуулахад 20+% чухал нийтлэл.', 'ro': 'Cercetarea în domeniul dialogului multipartit a crescut considerabil în ultimii ani. Prezentăm setul de date Molweni, un set de date de înțelegere a citirii automate (MRC) cu structură de discurs construită pe dialog multiparty. Mostrele sursă ale lui Molweni din Ubuntu Chat Corpus, inclusiv 10.000 de dialoguri cuprinzând 88.303 de pronunțări. Adnotăm 30.066 de întrebări pe acest corp, incluzând atât întrebări răspunzătoare, cât și întrebări fără răspuns. Molweni contribuie, de asemenea, în mod unic cu adnotările dependenței discursului într-un stil modificat al Teoriei reprezentării discursului segmentat (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) pentru toate dialogurile sale multipartite, contribuind la date pe scară largă (78.245 relații discursuale adnotate) la sarcina analizării discursului multipartit. Experimentele noastre arată că Molweni reprezintă un set de date provocator pentru modelele MRC actuale: BERT-wwmm, un actual performer puternic SQUAD 2.0, obține doar 67,7% F1 la întrebările lui Molweni, o scădere semnificativă de 20+ % comparativ cu performanța SQUAD 2.0.', 'no': 'Forskning i området i dialogen for fleire partir har vokst mykje i løpet av siste år. Vi presenterer Molweni-datasettet, eit datasett for maskinelesing av forståelse (MRC) med diskursstruktur bygd over multipartitsdialogen. Molweni-kjeldeprøver frå Ubuntu Chat Corpus, inkludert 10.000 dialogar som inneheld 88.303 uttrykk. Vi annoterar 30 066 spørsmål om denne korpusen, inkludert både svarbare og uavhengige spørsmål. Molweni bidra også unike diskursavhengighetsnotasjonar i ein endra segmentert diskurs Representasjon teorie (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) for alle sine multipartitiske dialogvindauge, som bidra til store skala (78,245 markerte diskursrelasjonar) data som skal hentast på oppgåva av multipartitiske diskursar. Eksperimentane våre viser at Molweni er ein vanskeleg datasett for gjeldande MRC-modeller: BERT-wwm, ein gjeldande, sterk SQuAD 2.0 utfører, når berre 67,7% F1 på Molweni sin spørsmål, 20% betydelig nedgang som sammenlignet med SQuAD 2.0-utføringar.', 'pl': 'Badania w zakresie dialogu wielostronnego znacznie wzrosły w ostatnich latach. Przedstawiamy zbiór danych Molweniego, zbiór danych rozumienia odczytu maszynowego (MRC) ze strukturą dyskursu zbudowaną w oparciu o dialog wielostronny. Próbki źródłowe Molweniego z Ubuntu Chat Corpus, w tym 10.000 dialogów zawierających 88.303 wypowiedzi. Opisujemy pytania 30,066 na temat tego korpusu, w tym pytania zarówno do odpowiedzi, jak i do odpowiedzi. Molweni w wyjątkowy sposób wykorzystuje adnotacje zależności dyskursu w modyfikowanym stylu Teorii Reprezentacji Segmentowanego Dyskursu (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) dla wszystkich swoich dialogów wielostronnych, wnosząc dane na dużą skalę (78,245 adnotacje relacji dyskursu) do realizacji zadania parsowania dyskursu wielostronnego dialogu. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że Molweni jest wymagającym zestawem danych dla obecnych modeli MRC: BERT-wwm, aktualny, silny wykonawca SQuAD 2.0, osiąga tylko 67,7% F1 na pytania Molweniego, 20+% znaczący spadek w porównaniu z wydajnością SQuAD 2.0.', 'sr': 'Istraživanje u oblasti multipartijskog dijaloga je u poslednjih godina veoma poraslo. Predstavljamo setu podataka Molweni, kompleks podataka za čitanje mašine (MRC) sa strukturom diskursa izgrađenom preko multipartijskog dijaloga. Molunijevi izvorni uzorci iz Ubuntu Chat Corpusa, uključujući 10.000 dijaloga, uključujući 88.303 reči. Prijavljujemo 30.066 pitanja o ovom korpusu, uključujući i odgovorne i neodgovorne pitanja. Molweni također jedinstveno doprinosi annotacijama zavisnosti diskursa u modificiranoj teoriji predstavljanja diskursa (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) za sve svoje multipartijske dijaloge, koji doprinose velikoj skali (78,245 annotiranih diskurskih odnosa) podataka koji će se nositi na zadatak razmatranja multipartijskih dijaloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je Molweni izazovna kompleta podataka za trenutne MRC modele: BERT-wwm, trenutni, snažan izvođa č SQuAD 2.0, postiže samo 67,7% F1 na Moluninim pitanjima, značajan pad od 20+% u usporedbi s a svojim izvodima SQuAD 2.0.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් පාර්ටි සංවාදයේ පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් ගොඩක් වැඩියි. අපි මොලෝනි දත්ත සෙට්ටුව පෙන්වන්නම්, මැෂින් කියවන්න පුළුවන් (MRC) දත්ත සෙට්ටුවෙන් ගොඩක් පාර්ටි සං මොල්ජෝනිගේ මුළු සැමැල්පුම් වලින් උබුන්ටු චැට් කොර්පුස් වලින්, සංවාද 10,000 වලින් 88,303 කියන්න ති අපි මේ කෝර්පස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්න 30,066 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳ කරනවා, උත්තර දෙන්නම් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති  Name අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මොලෝනියා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මොලෝනියාගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි: BERT-wm, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ශක්තිමත් SQuAD 2.0 පරීක්ෂකයෙක්, මොලෝනියාගේ ප්\u200dර', 'so': "Baaritaanka ku yaala dhinaca dialogue multiparty ee ugu dambeeyey ayaa aad u koray. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  Tusaalada sourceed ee Molweni ee Ubuntu Chat Korpus ka soo baxay, kuwaas oo ku jira 10,000 oo diyaar ah oo ku qoran hadal 88,303. Ay ku saabsan 30,066 su'aalo, kuwaas oo ah su'aalo aan la jawaabi karo iyo aan la hadleyn. Molweni wuxuu sidoo kale si gaar ah uga bixinayaa ogeysiiska hadalka ku xiran ee ku qoran qoraalka kala duwan ee loo beddelay Segmented Discourse Representation (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) qaababka dialogueyda oo dhan, kaas oo ka qayb qaadanaya macluumaad aad u weyn (78,245 xiriirka hadalka) si ay u qaadato shaqada baaritaanka dialog-ka kala duduwan. Imtixaanadayada ayaa muujinaya in Molweni waa danbiyo dhibaataysan oo u eg samooyinka MRC: BERT-wwm, hada oo xoog leh SQuAD 2.0, wuxuu gaadhaa 67.7% F1 oo ku saabsan su'aalaha Molweni, 20+% oo muhiim ah oo isbarbardhigi karo sameynta SQuAD 2.0.", 'ta': 'பல்கடைசி உரையாடல் பரப்பில் ஆராய்ச்சி சமீபத்திற்கு மேலும் அதிகமாக வளர்ந்துள்ளது. நாம் மோல்வெனி தகவல் அமைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு இயந்திரம் படிப்பு கூட்டத்தை மேல் உரையாடல் மீது உரையாடல் பேச்சு உரையாடல்  உபுண்டு அரட்டை கார்ப்ஸில் இருந்து மொல்வெனின் மூல மாதிரிகள், 10,000 உரையாடல் சேர்ந்து 88,303 வார்த்தைகளை சேர் இந்த கார்ப்புஸ் மீது 30,066 கேள்விகளை நாம் வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம், பதிலுள்ள மற்றும் தீர்க்க முடியாத க மொல்வெனி தனிப்பட்ட பேச்சு சார்ப்பு சார்புரிமை அறிவிப்புகளை மாற்றியமைக்கப்பட்ட திட்டத்தில் (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) பாணியில் அனைத்து பலகட்சி உரையாடல்களுக்கும் பாணி எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகள் தற்போதைய MRC மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பு காட்டுகிறது: BERT- wwm, ஒரு தற்போதைய வலிமையான SQuAD 2. 0 இயக்கிய பிரிவாளர், மோல்வெனியின் கேள்விகளில் மட்டும்', 'sv': 'Forskningen inom flerpartsdialog har ökat avsevärt under de senaste åren. Vi presenterar Molweni dataset, ett dataset för maskinläsförståelse (MRC) med diskursstruktur byggd över flerpartsdialog. Molwenis källprover från Ubuntu Chat Corpus, inklusive 10 000 dialoger bestående av 88 303 yttranden. Vi kommenterar 30 066 frågor på denna korpus, inklusive både besvarade och obesvarade frågor. Molweni bidrar också unikt med diskursberoendeanteckningar i en modifierad Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) stil för alla sina flerpartsdialoger, vilket bidrar med storskalig (78 245 kommenterade diskursrelationer) data för uppgiften att tolka flerpartsdialogdiskurser. Våra experiment visar att Molweni är en utmanande datauppsättning för nuvarande MRC-modeller: BERT-wwmm, en nuvarande, stark SQUAD 2.0-presterare, uppnår endast 67,7% F1 på Molwenis frågor, en 20+% signifikant minskning jämfört med dess SQUAD 2.0 prestanda.', 'ur': 'بہت سی پارٹی ڈیلوگو کے منطقه میں تحقیق اگلے سالوں میں بہت زیادہ بڑھا گیا ہے۔ ہم مولون ڈیٹ سٹ کو پیش کریں گے، ایک ماشین پڑھنے کی سمجھ (MRC) ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ سے مختلف پارٹی دیالوگ پر بنایا گیا ہے۔ مالونو کے سراسر نمونے Ubuntu Chat Corpus سے ہیں، جو 88,303 کلمات میں شامل ہوتے ہیں 10,000 ڈالیوں میں۔ ہم اس کورپوس پر 30,066 سوال اظہار کرتے ہیں، جواب دینے والی اور جواب دینے والی سوال میں شامل ہوتے ہیں. Molweni نے بھی ایک طرح ایک طرح طرح طرح کے تمام مختلف پارٹیوں کے ڈالیوں کے لئے ایک طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے مطابق طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے ذریعے دکھانے کی اعتبارت کی علامتیں دیتی ہیں۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ مولونی موجود MRC موڈلوں کے لئے ایک مشکل ڈاٹ سٹ ہے: BERT-wwm، ایک موجود، قوی SQuAD 2.0 performer، صرف 67.7% F1 کو مولونی کے سوال پر حاصل کرتا ہے، ایک 20+% اہم ڈوب اس کے SQuAD 2.0 performance کے مقابلے میں۔', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik muloqat muloqat oynasidagi taʼminot yaqinda juda katta yil edi. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  Ubuntu Chat Korpusdan Molweni manbasi misollari, 88,303 gapiradigan 10,000 dialog bor. Biz bu corpus haqida 30,066 savollarni tahlil qilamiz. Bu muammolar va javob bermaydigan savollar. Name Molweni joriy MRC modellari uchun murakkab maʼlumot tartibi: BERT-wwm, joriy, sterk SQuAD 2. 0 bajaruvchi BERT-Wm, Molweni savollarida faqat 67.7% F1 bajaradi, SQuAD 2. 0 bajarishiga qiyin 20+ qisqaradi.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu về khu vực hộp thoại đa đảng đã phát triển đáng kể trong những năm gần đây. Chúng tôi giới thiệu bộ dữ liệu Molweni, một bộ trình độ đọc máy (MRC) với các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ được xây dựng trên hộp thoại đa đảng. Các mẫu nguồn của Moloch từ Ubbe Chat Corpus, bao gồm cả 10,000 tạp chí 88,303 kể từ đó. Chúng tôi ghi âm câu hỏi 962 trong tập đoàn này, gồm cả những câu hỏi trả lời và không thể vượt qua. Molweni cũng một cách đặc biệt góp phần lịch sử phụ thuộc vào các sử dụng trong một số các câu chú thích theo dõi đã được sửa đổi, Discourse Representation theory (SDRT; Asher et al., thậm chí là phần còn lại của các đối tượng đa đảng, đóng dữ liệu trên diện lớn (78,245 và ghi chú) về nhiệm vụ phân tích ngôn ngữ đa đảng. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng Molweni là một tập tin đầy thử thách cho các mô hình MRC hiện tại: BERT-wwM, một trình diễn SCOAD 2.0 hiện tại, đạt được chỉ 67.7=.* F1 về các câu hỏi của Molari, một lượng lớn so với trình độ cao của LAD 2.0.', 'bg': 'Изследванията в областта на многопартийния диалог нараснаха значително през последните години. Представяме набор от данни Молвени, набор от данни за машинно четене (МРС) с дискурсна структура, изградена върху многостранен диалог. Източниците на Молвени от Убунту Чат Корпус, включително 10 000 диалога, включващи 88 303 изказвания. Отбелязваме 30 066 въпроса в този корпус, включително и въпроси, които отговарят и не отговарят. Молвени също така уникално допринася за анотациите на зависимостта от дискурса в модифициран стил Теория на представянето на сегментирания дискурс (Ашер и др., 2016) за всички нейни многопартийни диалози, като допринася за широкомащабни (78 245 анотирани дискурсни отношения) данни, които да носят за задачата на многопартийния диалогов анализ на дискурса. Нашите експерименти показват, че Молвени е предизвикателен набор от данни за настоящите модели на МРС: настоящият, силен изпълнител постига едва 67.7% по въпросите на Молвени, 20+% значителен спад в сравнение с представянето на Молвени 2.0.', 'da': 'Forskningen inden for flerpartsdialog er vokset betydeligt i de seneste år. Vi præsenterer Molweni datasættet, et MRC-datasæt med diskursstruktur bygget over flerpartsdialog. Molwenis kildesprøver fra Ubuntu Chat Corpus, herunder 10.000 dialoger bestående af 88.303 udtalelser. Vi kommenterer 30.066 spørgsmål på dette korpus, herunder både besvarelige og ubesvarede spørgsmål. Molweni bidrager også unikt med diskursafhængighedsannoteringer i en modificeret Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) stil til alle sine flerpartsdialoger, hvilket bidrager med storstilede (78.245 kommenterede diskursrelationer) data til opgaven med multiparty dialog diskursanalyse. Vores eksperimenter viser, at Molweni er et udfordrende datasæt for nuværende MRC modeller: BERT-wwmm, en nuværende, stærk SQUAD 2.0 performer, opnår kun 67,7% F1 på Molwenis spørgsmål, et 20+% signifikant fald i forhold til sin SQUAD 2.0 ydeevne.', 'hr': 'Istraživanje u području multistranskih dijaloga u posljednjih godina značajno je poraslo. Predstavljamo kompleks podataka Molweni, kompleks podataka za čitanje strojeva (MRC) s strukturom diskursa izgrađenim preko multistrantnih dijaloga. Molweni izvorni uzorci iz Ubuntu Chat Corpusa, uključujući 10.000 dijaloga uključujući 88.303 riječi. Prikazujemo 30.066 pitanja o ovom korpusu, uključujući odgovorne i neodgovorne pitanja. Molweni također jedinstveno doprinosi annotacijama zavisnosti diskursa u modificiranoj teoriji predstavljanja diskursa (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) za sve svoje multistranske dijaloge, koji doprinose velikoj skali (78,245 annotiranih diskurskih odnosa) podataka o zadatku razmatranja multistranskih dijaloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je Molweni izazovna kompleta podataka za trenutne MRC modele: BERT-wwm, trenutni, snažan izvođa č SQuAD 2.0, postiže samo 67,7% F1 na Molweni pitanja, značajan pad od 20+% u usporedbi s svojim izvodima SQuAD 2.0.', 'nl': "Het onderzoek op het gebied van meerpartijendialoog is de afgelopen jaren aanzienlijk gegroeid. We presenteren de Molweni dataset, een machine reading understanding (MRC) dataset met discoursstructuur die is opgebouwd over een dialoog met meerdere partijen. Molweni's bronvoorbeelden uit het Ubuntu Chat Corpus, inclusief 10.000 dialogen met 88.303 uitingen. Op dit corpus worden 30,066 vragen geantwoord, inclusief zowel beantwoordbare als onbeantwoorde vragen. Molweni draagt ook op unieke wijze discoursafhankelijkheidsannotaties bij in een aangepaste Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) stijl voor al zijn meerpartijdialogen, waarbij grootschalige (78,245 geanotateerde discoursrelaties) gegevens worden bijgedragen aan de taak van het parsen van multipartijdialogen. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat Molweni een uitdagende dataset is voor huidige MRC modellen: BERT-wwm, een huidige, sterke SQuAD 2.0 performer, bereikt slechts 67,7% F1 op Molweni's vragen, een 20+% significante daling vergeleken met zijn SQuAD 2.0 prestaties.", 'id': "Penelitian dalam daerah dialog multipartis telah tumbuh besar selama bertahun-tahun terakhir. We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  Molweni's source samples from the Ubuntu Chat Corpus, including 10,000 dialogs comprising 88,303 utterances.  Kami menyatakan 30.066 pertanyaan pada korpus ini, termasuk pertanyaan yang dapat dijawab dan yang tidak dapat dijawab. Molweni also uniquely contributes discourse dependency annotations in a modified Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) style for all of its multiparty dialogs, contributing large-scale (78,245 annotated discourse relations) data to bear on the task of multiparty dialog discourse parsing.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa Molweni adalah set data yang menantang untuk model MRC saat ini: BERT-wwm, seorang pemain SQuAD 2.0 yang kuat saat ini, hanya mencapai 67,7% F1 pada pertanyaan Molweni, 20+% turun yang signifikan dibandingkan dengan prestasi SQuAD 2.0.", 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 다당 대화 분야에 대한 연구가 크게 발전하였다.우리는 Molweni 데이터 집합을 소개했는데 이것은 기계독해(MRC) 데이터 집합으로 그 문장 구조는 다방면의 대화 위에 세워져 있다.Molweni의 소스 코드 샘플은 Ubuntu 채팅 자료 라이브러리에서 왔습니다. 10000개의 대화상자를 포함하고 88303개의 언어를 포함합니다.우리는 어료 라이브러리에서 30066개의 문제를 주석했는데, 대답할 수 있는 것과 대답할 수 없는 문제를 포함한다.Molweni는 또한 개선된 세그먼트 언어 표징 이론(SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) 스타일로 모든 다자간 대화에 독특한 언어 의존성 주석을 제공했고 다자간 대화 언어 분석 임무에 대규모(78245개의 주석 언어 관계) 데이터를 제공했다.우리의 실험에 의하면 현재의 MRC 모델에 있어 Molweni는 도전적인 데이터 집합인 BERT wwm, 현재의 강력한 2.0급 라인업 집행자로서 Molweni 문제에서 67.7%의 F1 성적을 얻었고 2.0급 팀의 성적에 비해 20%+가 현저히 떨어졌다.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات در منطقه\u200cی گفتگوی چند پارتی در طول سال اخیر زیادی رشد کرده است. ما مجموعه داده های Molweni را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، مجموعه داده\u200cهای خواندن ماشینی (MRC) با ساختار گفتگویی که بر روی محاورۀ چند پارتی ساخته شده است. نمونه\u200cهای منبع مولونی از کورپوس چت اوبونتو، شامل ۱۰ هزار صحبت صحبت با 88.303 سخنرانی است. ما 30.066 سوال درباره این کورپوس را اخطار می\u200cکنیم، شامل هر دو سوال جواب\u200cدهنده و پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cای است. Molweni also contributes uniquely to discourse dependency annotations in a Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) for all of its multiparty dialogues, contributing large-scale (78,245 annotated discourse relations) data to bear on the task of multiparty dialog discussions parsing. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مولونی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای سخت\u200cکننده برای مدل\u200cهای MRC فعلی است: BERT-wwm، یک اجرای فعلی SQuAD 2.0 قوی، تنها 67.7 درصد F1 بر سوال\u200cهای مولونی می\u200cرسد، یک کاهش 20+% معنی در مقایسه با اجرای SQuAD 2.0 آن.', 'de': 'Die Forschung im Bereich des Mehrparteiendialogs ist in den letzten Jahren stark gewachsen. Wir präsentieren den Molweni-Datensatz, einen maschinellen Leseverständnisdatensatz (MRC) mit Diskursstruktur, der über einen Mehrparteiendialog aufgebaut ist. Molwenis Quellbeispiele aus dem Ubuntu Chat Corpus, einschließlich 10.000 Dialoge mit 88.303 Äußerungen. Wir kommentieren 30.066 Fragen zu diesem Korpus, einschließlich sowohl beantworter als auch unbeantworteter Fragen. Molweni trägt außerdem auf einzigartige Weise Diskursabhängigkeitsannotationen in einem modifizierten Stil der Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) für alle seine Mehrparteiendialoge bei und liefert großformatige (78,245 annotated discours relations) Daten, um die Aufgabe des Multiparty Dialogparsing zu übernehmen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass Molweni ein anspruchsvoller Datensatz für aktuelle MRC-Modelle ist: BERT-wwm, ein aktueller, starker SQuAD 2.0 Performer, erzielt nur 67,7% F1 auf Molwenis Fragen, einen 20+% signifikanten Rückgang im Vergleich zu seiner SQuAD 2.0 Performance.', 'sw': 'Utafiti katika eneo la mazungumzo ya vyama vingi umekua kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya miaka ya hivi karibuni. Tunaweza kuweka seti ya taarifa za Molweni, kompyuta ya mashine inayosomeka (MRC) yenye miundombinu ya mazungumzo yaliyojengwa juu ya mazungumzo ya vyama vingi. Mfano wa vyanzo vya Molweni kutoka kwenye mashindano ya Mazungumzo ya Ubuntu, ikiwa ni pamoja na mazungumzo 10,000 yanajumuisha hotuba 88,303. Tunaonyesha maswali 30,066 kuhusu makampuni haya, ikiwa ni pamoja na maswali yanayojibiwa na yasiyopatikana. Molweni pia anatoa matangazo ya kutegemea mazungumzo katika nadharia ya kubadilishwa kwa ajili ya mazungumzo yote ya vyama vingi (78,245 yanayotangazwa na mazungumzo) ili kubeba kazi ya mazungumzo ya majadiliano ya vyama vingi. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba Molweni ni seti ya changamoto kwa mifano ya s as a ya MRC: BERT-wwm, mchezaji wa sasa, mwenye nguvu ya SQuAD 2.0, anafanikiwa asilimia 67.7 F1 tu kwenye maswali ya Molweni, kupunguza kwa asilimia 20 kwa kiasi kikubwa kama ilivyolinganisha na utendaji wake wa SQuAD 2.0.', 'af': "Ondersoek in die gebied van multiparty dialoog het aansienlik gegroei oor onlangse jaar. Ons voorsien die Molweni datastel, 'n masjien lees verstanding (MRC) datastel met diskurse struktuur gebou oor multiparty dialoog. Molweni se bron voorbeelde van die Ubuntu Chat Corpus, insluitend 10,000 dialoog wat 88,303 uitspraak bevat. Ons annoteer 30,066 vrae op hierdie korpus, insluitend beide antwoordelike en onantwoordelike vrae. Molweni bydra ook eenkennige diskursie afhanklikheidsverklaringe in 'n veranderde segmenteerde diskursie voorstel teoriee (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) styl vir al sy multiparty dialoog, bydra die groot-skaal (78,245 annotateerde diskursie relasies) data om op die taak van multiparty dialoog diskursie verwerking te dra. Ons eksperimente wys dat Molweni 'n pragtige datastel is vir huidige MRC modele: BERT-wwm, 'n huidige, sterk SQuAD 2.0 uitvoerder, bereik slegs 67.7% F1 op Molweni se vrae, 'n 20+% betekende val soos vergelyk teen sy SQuAD 2.0 uitvoerder.", 'tr': "Ýyllardan bäri ýakynlaşdyrylýan köp-partylyk диалогynyň barlagy has baglanýar. Molweni veri setini, multipärtler диалогynyň üstünde guruldygy diskurs düzümleri bilen maşynyň okamasyny saýlýarys. Molweni'yň Ubuntu Chat Corpus'yň çeşme örnekleri, 88,303 s özleri dahil edýän 10,000 dialoglar Biz bu korpusda 30.066 sorag berdik hem jogaply hem jogaplamaz soraglar hem de dahil. Molweni hem ýekelikde Segmented Discourse Representation Theory Biziň deneylerimiz Molweni häzirki MRC modelleri üçin kynçylyk taýýarlandygyny görkeýär: BERT-wwm, häzirki, güçli SQuAD 2.0 eserler, Molonyň soraglarynda diňe 67.7% F1 ýetip bilýär we SQuAD 2.0 eserlerine garşykly 20+% wajyp düşürmedir.", 'sq': 'Research into the area of multiparty dialog has grown considerably over recent years.  Ne paraqesim grupin e të dhënave Molweni, një grup të të dhënave për leximin e makinave (MRC) me strukturën diskursore të ndërtuar mbi dialogun multipartik. Muzikat e burimit të Molwenit nga Ubuntu Chat Corpus, duke përfshirë 10,000 dialoge që përfshijnë 88,303 shprehje. We annotate 30,066 questions on this corpus, including both answerable and unanswerable questions.  Molweni kontribuon gjithashtu në mënyrë unike anotacionet e varësisë së diskursit në një teori të ndryshuar të përfaqësimit të diskursit të segmentuar (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) për të gjithë dialogun e saj të shumëpartit, duke kontribuar të dhënat në shkallë të madhe (78,245 marrëdhënie diskursore të anotuara) për të mbajtur në detyrën e analizimit të diskursit të dialogut të shumëpartit. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se Molweni është një grup sfidues i të dhënave për modelet e tanishme MRC: BERT-wwm, një artist i tanishëm i fortë SQuAD 2.0, arrin vetëm 67.7% F1 në pyetjet e Molwenit, një rënie 20+% e rëndësishme krahasuar me shfaqjen e SQuAD 2.0.', 'az': "Əvvəlki il ərzində çoxlu parti dialogların araştırması çox böyükdü. Biz Molweni veri qurğularını, çoxlu parti diyalələrində inşa edilmiş diskurs qurğuları ilə maşın oxuyan veri qurğularını göstəririk. Molweni'nin Ubuntu Chat Corpus'un mənbə nümunələri, 88.303 s özləri içərisində 10.000 dialoglar da dahil idi. Biz bu korpus barəsində 30.066 soruşu bildiririk, hər ikisi də cavab verə bilməz və cavab verə bilməz suallar içərisində. Molweni həmçin in çoxlu parti danışmaları üçün dəyişdirilmiş Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) tüm danışmaları üçün çoxlu parti danışmalarını təklif edir, böyük ölçüdə (78,245 danışmış diskusiya ilişkileri) məlumatlarını çoxlu parti danışmalarının işində daxil edir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz Molweni a ğımdaki MRC modellərinin çətin verilən qurduğunu göstərir: BERT-wwm, ağımdaki, qüvvətli SQuAD 2.0 performer, Molweni suallarında yalnız 67.7% F1 nəsib edir, SQuAD 2.0 performansının qarşıs ında 20+% möhkəm düşüşür.", 'am': 'በአለፉት ዓመታት ውስጥ ብዙፓርቲ መስኮት ማረፊያ እየበዛ ሆኖአል፡፡ የሞልweni ዳታ ሰርቨር፣ የሞክራዊ አካባቢ (MRC) ዳታዎችን አቀናቅላለን በብዙ ፓርቲ አካባቢ ላይ የተሠራ የንግግር ሥርዓት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የሞልweni ምንጭ ምሳሌዎች ከኡቡንቱ ቻት ኮርፓስ፣ ከ88,303 ቃላት የተጨማሪውን አቀማመጥ አቀማመጥ፡፡ በዚህ ኮርፓስ ላይ 30,066 ጥያቄዎችን እናሳስታውቃለን፡፡ ሞልweni ደግሞ በተቀናጠቀው የስድአዊ ተቃውሞ አካባቢ ፕሬዚደንት ታሪዮችን (SDRT; አሻር እና አል., 2016) የብዙፓርቲ ማነጋገር ሁሉ ዘይቤ አቀናቅሎታል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ሞልweni ለሁለተኛው MRC ዓይነቶች የሚቃወም ዳታተር ነው፤ BERT-Wm፣ አሁን ብርቱ SQuAD 2.0 አካባቢ፣ በሞልweni ጥያቄ ላይ ብቻ 67.7 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': "Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում բազմակողմների հաղորդակցման ոլորտում ուսումնասիրությունները նշանակալի են աճել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Մոլվենի տվյալների համակարգը, մեքենային ընթերցման (ՄՌԿ) տվյալների համակարգը, որը կառուցված է բազմամասնության պատկերի մեջ: Molweni's source samples from the Ubuntu Chat Corpus, including 10,000 dialogs comprising 88,303 utterances.  Մենք գրում ենք 30.066 հարց այս մարմնի մասին, ներառյալ և պատասխանատու և անպատասխանատու հարցեր: Մոլվենին նաև միանգամայն ներդրում է քննարկումների կախվածության annoտացիաներ փոխված մասնարկված քննարկումների ներկայացման թեորիայի (SSRT; Աշեր և այլն., 2016) ոճի մեջ իր բոլոր բազմակողմների համար, ներդրում է մեծ մասնարկման (78,245 annoտացված քննարկումների հարաբերություններ) տվյալներ, որոնք պետք է ներգրավվեն բազ Our experiments show that Molweni is a challenging dataset for current MRC models: BERT-wwm, a current, strong SQuAD 2.0 performer, achieves only 67.7% F1 on Molweni's questions, a 20+% significant drop as compared against its SQuAD 2.0 performance.", 'bn': 'মাল্টিপার্টি ডায়ালগের এলাকায় গবেষণা সাম্প্রতিক বছরের মধ্যে বেশী বেড়ে গেছে। We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog.  উবুন্টু চ্যাট কোর্পাস থেকে মোলওয়েনির সূত্রের উদাহরণ, যার মধ্যে ১০,০০০ ডায়ালগ আছে ৮৮,৩০৩ ভাষণ। আমরা এই কোর্পাসের ব্যাপারে ৩০,০৬৬ প্রশ্নের ব্যাখ্যা করেছি, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে উত্তর এবং অযোগ্য প্রশ্ন। মোলওয়েনি একই সাথে পরিবর্তন করা সেগমেন্ট ডিসোর্স প্রতিনিধি থিওরি (এসডিআরটি; এশারেট আল, ২০১৬) তাদের সকল বহুপার্টি ডায়ালগের জন্য বিশাল পরিমাণ (৭৮,245 বিখ্যাত কথোপকথন সম্পর্ক) তথ্য প্রদান করে। আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মোলওয়েনি বর্তমান এমআরসি মডেলের জন্য একটি চ্যালেঞ্জালেঞ্জার ডাটা সেট: বের্টি-উম, একজন বর্তমান শক্তিশালী স্কোয়াড ২. ০ প্রদর্শক, মোলওয়েনির প্রশ্নে মাত্র ৬৭', 'cs': 'Výzkum v oblasti vícestranného dialogu se v posledních letech značně rozšířil. Představujeme Molweniho datovou sadu, datovou sadu porozumění strojovému čtení (MRC) se strukturou diskurzu postavenou na vícestranném dialogu. Molweniho zdrojové ukázky z Ubuntu Chat Corpus, včetně 10.000 dialogů obsahujících 88.303 výroky. K tomuto korpusu anotujeme 30,066 otázky, včetně odpovědných i neodpovědných otázek. Molweni také jedinečně přispívá anotace závislosti diskurzu ve stylu modifikované teorie reprezentace segmentovaného diskursu (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) pro všechny své vícestranné dialogy a přispívá rozsáhlá data (78,245 anotované diskurzní vztahy), která budou nést na úkolu parsování diskurzu vícestranných dialogů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že Molweni je náročným datovým souborem pro současné MRC modely: BERT-wwm, současný, silný SQuAD 2.0 performer, dosahuje pouze 67,7% F1 na Molweniho otázky, 20+% významného poklesu ve srovnání s výkonem SQuAD 2.0.', 'ca': "La recerca sobre l'àrea del diàleg multipartit ha crescut considerablement en els últims anys. Presentam el conjunt de dades Molweni, un conjunt de dades de lectura màquina (MRC) amb estructura de discurs construït sobre diàleg multipartit. Molweni's source samples from the Ubuntu Chat Corpus, including 10,000 dialogs comprising 88,303 utterances.  Anotem 30.066 preguntes sobre aquest corpus, incloent tant preguntes responents com irresponsables. Molweni també contribueix únicament a anotacions de dependencia del discurs en un estil modificat de la Teoria de Representació del Discurse Segmentat (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) per a tots els seus diàlegs multipartits, contribuint a dades a gran escala (78.245 relacions de discurs anotats) que s'han de portar en la tasca d'analitzar discurs multipartits. Els nostres experiments demostren que Molweni és un conjunt de dades difícil per als models actuals de MRC: BERT-wwm, un actual i fort artista SQuAD 2.0, només aconsegueix 67,7% de F1 en les preguntes de Molweni, una baixa significativa del 20% comparada amb el seu desempeny SQuAD 2.0.", 'fi': 'Monipuoluedialogin tutkimus on kasvanut huomattavasti viime vuosina. Esitämme Molweni-aineiston, konelukuymmärryksen (MRC) aineiston, jonka diskurssirakenne on rakennettu monipuoluedialogin päälle. Molwenin lähdenäytteitä Ubuntu Chat Corpuksesta, sisältäen 10 000 dialogia sisältäen 88 303 lausetta. Merkitsemme tähän korpuseen 30 066 kysymystä, mukaan lukien sekä vastattavia että vastaamattomia kysymyksiä. Molweni tuottaa myös ainutlaatuisesti diskurssiriippuvuuden annotointeja muokatussa Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) -tyylissä kaikkiin monipuoluedialogiinsa, tarjoten laajamittaista (78 245 annotoitua diskurssisuhdetta) dataa monipuoluedialogin diskurssin jäsentämiseen. Kokeemme osoittavat, että Molweni on haastava aineisto nykyisille MRC-malleille: BERT-wwm, nykyinen, vahva SQuAD 2.0 -suoritin, saavuttaa Molwenin kysymyksissä vain 67,7% F1:n, mikä on 20+% merkittävä pudotus verrattuna sen SQuAD 2.0 -suoritukseen.', 'et': 'Mitmepoolse dialoogi valdkonna uuringud on viimastel aastatel märkimisväärselt kasvanud. Esitleme Molweni andmekogumit, masinlugemise mõistmise (MRC) andmekogumit, mille diskursuse struktuur on ehitatud mitmepoolse dialoogi kaudu. Molweni lähtenäidised Ubuntu vestluskorpusest, sealhulgas 10 000 dialoogi, mis sisaldavad 88 303 lauset. Me märgime 30 066 küsimust selles korpuses, sealhulgas nii vastutavad kui ka vastuseta küsimused. Molweni panustab ainulaadselt diskursuse sõltuvuse annotatsioone modifitseeritud segmenteeritud diskursuse esindamise teoorias (SDRT; Asher jt., 2016) stiilis kõigi oma mitmeparteiliste dialoogide jaoks, andes laiaulatuslikke (78 245 annoteeritud diskursussuhteid) andmeid mitmeparteilise dialoogi diskursuse parsimise ülesandele. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et Molweni on praeguste MRC mudelite jaoks keeruline andmekogum: BERT-wwm, praegune tugev SQuAD 2.0 esitaja, saavutab Molweni küsimustes vaid 67,7% F1, mis on 20% märkimisväärne langus võrreldes SQuAD 2.0 jõudlusega.', 'bs': 'Istraživanje u području multipartijskog dijaloga u posljednjih godina je značajno poraslo. Predstavljamo kompleks podataka Molweni, kompleks podataka za čitanje mašine (MRC) sa strukturom diskursa izgrađenim preko multipartijskog dijaloga. Molweni izvorni uzorci iz Ubuntu Chat Corpusa, uključujući 10.000 dijaloga uključujući 88.303 govora. Prijavljujemo 30.066 pitanja o ovom korpusu, uključujući odgovorne i neodgovorne pitanja. Molweni također jedinstveno doprinosi annotacijama zavisnosti diskursa u modificiranoj teoriji predstavljanja segmentiranih diskursa (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) za sve svoje multipartijske dijaloge, koji doprinose velikoj skali (78,245 annotiranih diskurskih odnosa) podataka koji će se nositi na zadatak razmatranja multipartijskih dijaloga diskursa. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je Molweni izazovna kompleta podataka za trenutne MRC modele: BERT-wwm, trenutni, snažan izvođa č SQuAD 2.0, postiže samo 67,7% F1 na Moluninim pitanjima, značajan pad od 20+% u usporedbi s svojim izvodima SQuAD 2.0.', 'jv': 'Rasané kaya dialog sing dibenakake opo sing dumadhi, akeh dumadhi kapan banjuré. Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset-dataset, akeh sistem sing paling akeh batasan (MPN) dataset karo sistem sing gawe barang karo dialog multi-parti Sampeyan kelompok Mulai nang Ubuntu Talk corpus, tambah 10,000 dialog sing mulai 18,30 3 sing sampeyan Awak dhéwé éntuk 30.06 kesempatan kanggo kowe lan kabèh dumadhan ngono ceoh barang lan ora gewis barang. Mulung ugo mengko perusahaan nganggep hukum sing dipunangé dipunangé karo hal-hal sing dimulai tanggal sekondiki (sdRT; Aser et al.), supoyo nggo sistem multi-partisi dipunangé, supoyo akeh-scale (bangetakno) Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan ing nggawe dataset nggawe MRT-wm gak bener: BERT-wm, dadi, sing perbudhakan nggawe', 'he': "מחקר באזור הדיולוגים המורבים גדל באופן משמעותי בשנים האחרונות. אנחנו מציגים את קבוצת נתונים מולווני, קבוצת נתונים של קריאת מכונות (MRC) עם מבנה דיבורים בנוי על ידי דיאלוג רבים. דגימות המקור של מולווני מהאובונטו צ'אט קורפוס, כולל 10,000 דיאלוגים שמכילים 88,303 מבטות. אנחנו מצביעים 30,066 שאלות על הקורפוס הזה, כולל שאלות אחראיות ולא אחראיות. מולוויני גם תורם באופן מיוחד ציוני תלויות דיבורים בתיאוריית מייצגת דיבורים משוננת (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) בסגנון של כל הדיולוגים הרב-מפלגתיים שלה, תורם נתונים בקנה מידה גדולה (78,245 יחסי דיבורים מצוינים) לשאת על משימה של דיבור דיבורים מרב-מפלגתיים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שמולוויני הוא קבוצת נתונים מאתגרת לדוגמאות MRC הנוכחיות: BERT-wwm, מופע SQuAD 2.0 כרגע חזק, משיג רק 67.7% F1 על השאלות של מולוויני, ירידה משמעותית של 20+% בהשוואה למופע SQuAD 2.0 שלה.", 'ha': "Kayan karatun zuwa filin zauren akwatin multi-birnin na ƙari. Tuna gaurar da danne na Molwan, a samun karatun na kafin karatun (MRC) da ake samar da mazaɓa da aka gina bakin zauren akwatin bayani masu yawa. Molwan misãlai daga Ubuntu Chat Corbus, ikin zauren akwatin bayani 10,000 na haɗi da hotunan 88,300. Munã sanar da masu tambayi 30,066 a kan wannan makampuni, kamar dukansu da ake karɓa da tambayi wanda bã ya iya faɗa. MolWei yana da ɗabi'a ga kunyar magana masu tsari cikin an gyare-gyare na gyare-gyare (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) cikin zauren akwatin bayanin multi-danganiyarsa, yana ƙarfafa girma (78,405 da aka sanar da mazaɓa) data dõmin su ɗauke a kan aikin mazaɓan magana na multi-par. Kayan jarrabõnmu ke nuna MolWei yana da zargi ga tsarin mutane na MRC yanzu: BERT-wwm, da yanzu mai ƙarfi SQuAD 2.0, yana s ãmu kawai 67.7% F1 kan tambayar Molwayi, da sautin 20+% mai muhimmin da aka sammentar da shi na SQuAD 2.0.", 'sk': 'Raziskave na področju večstrankarskega dialoga so se v zadnjih letih precej povečale. Predstavljamo Molwenijev nabor podatkov, nabor podatkov strojnega branja (MRC) s strukturo diskurza, zgrajeno na večstrankarskem dialogu. Molwenijevi vzorci vira iz Ubuntu Chat Corpusa, vključno z 10.000 dialogi, ki vsebujejo 88.303 izgovorov. V tem korpusu navedemo 30.066 vprašanj, vključno z odgovornimi in neodgovornimi vprašanji. Molweni prav tako edinstveno prispeva opombe diskurzne odvisnosti v modificiranem slogu Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) za vse svoje večstrankarske dialoge in prispeva obsežne (78.245 označenih diskurznih relacij) podatke za nalogo razčlenitve večstrankarskega dialoga. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da je Molweni zahteven nabor podatkov za trenutne modele MRC: BERT-wwm, trenutni, močan SQuAD 2.0 izvajalec, doseže le 67,7% F1 na Molwenijevih vprašanjih, kar je 20+% pomemben padec v primerjavi z zmogljivostjo SQuAD 2.0.', 'bo': "དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་བསྒྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་མང་གསོག་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། We present the Molweni dataset, a machine reading comprehension (MRC) dataset with discourse structure built over multiparty dialog. Ubuntu Chat Corpus ནང་ལས་ Molweni's source samples from the Ubuntu Chat Corpus, including 10,000 dialogs comprising 88,303 utterances. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྒོ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་གསུམ་དང་༦༠་ཙམ་སྙན་གྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ལན་གསལ་མེད་པའི་དྲ Molweni also uniquely contributes discourse dependency annotations in a modified Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT; Asher et al., 2016) style for all of its multiparty dialogs, contributing large-scale (78,245 annotated discourse relations) data to bear on the task of multiparty dialog discourse parsing. Our experiments show that Molweni is a challenging dataset for current MRC models: BERT-wwm, a current, strong SQuAD 2.0 performer, achieves only 67.7% F1 on Molweni's questions, a 20+% significant drop as compared against its SQuAD 2.0 performance."}
{'en': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension : a Literature Review', 'ar': 'فهم آلة المحادثة: مراجعة الأدب', 'es': 'Comprensión de máquinas conversacionales: una revisión de la literatura', 'fr': 'Compréhension conversationnelle des machines\xa0: une revue de la littérature', 'pt': 'Compreensão de Máquina Conversacional: uma Revisão da Literatura', 'ja': '会話機械の理解：文献レビュー', 'zh': '会话机器解:文献综述', 'hi': 'संवादी मशीन समझ: एक साहित्य की समीक्षा', 'ru': 'Понимание разговорной машины: обзор литературы', 'ga': 'Innealthuiscint Chomhrá: Léirmheas ar an Litríocht', 'ka': 'კონტაქციო მაქინის კომპრენცია: Literature Review', 'hu': 'Beszélgetési gép megértése: irodalmi áttekintés', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση της μηχανής συνομιλίας: μια ανασκόπηση της λογοτεχνίας', 'kk': 'Сөйлейтін машинаның компрессиясы: әдебиеттік редакциясы', 'mk': 'Конверзационална машина: преглед на литературата', 'it': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: una rassegna letteraria', 'lt': 'Konversacinės mašinos suvokimas: literatūros apžvalga', 'ms': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന മെഷീന്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുക: ഒരു സാഹിത്രത്തിന്റെ രീതിയിലേക്കു്', 'mt': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review', 'pl': 'Rozumienie maszyny konwersacyjnej: przegląd literatury', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн Машины Төрсөлдөөн: Соёл зохиолын Төрсөлдөөн', 'no': 'Kompleksjon av samtalemaskina: ein literaturoversikt', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea mașinii conversaționale: o recenzie de literatură', 'so': 'Heshiiska labaad: a Literature Review', 'sr': 'Konverzacionalna kompresija mašine: revizija književnosti', 'si': 'සංවාදක මැෂින් සම්පූර්ණය: සාධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'KonversationsmaskinfĂ¶rstĂĄelse: en litteraturĂ¶versikt', 'ta': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review', 'ur': 'ارتباط ماشین کمپرینسی: ایک صحیح رسی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Разбиране на разговорната машина: литературен преглед', 'hr': 'Razgovorna kompresija stroja: revizija književnosti', 'nl': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review', 'da': 'Samtalende maskinforståelse: en litteraturanmeldelse', 'de': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review', 'ko': '회화기계 이해: 문헌 총론', 'id': 'Kompresi Mesin Berbicara: Review Literatur', 'fa': 'تفاوت ماشین مکالمه: یک تحقیق ادبیات', 'sq': 'Komprehimi i makinës konversuese: një shqyrtim i letrave', 'sw': 'Mashine ya mazungumzo: Mapitio ya Fasihi', 'tr': 'Ýa şmak Maşynyň Derjesi: Edebiýat Bejermesi', 'af': 'Gespraakte Masjien Kompleksie: √¢¬Ä¬ôn Litteraatwerk', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'কথোপকথন মেশিন সমাপূর্ণ: একটি সাহিত্যের রিভিউ', 'hy': 'Խոսախոսական մեքենայի ընկալումը. գրականության վերլուծություն', 'az': '兯湵얟浡⁍慫楮敬즙物渠哉饲즙晬즙湭즙獩㨊', 'bs': 'Razgovorna kompresija mašine: revizija književnosti', 'ca': 'Comprensió de la màquina conversacional: una revisió de la literatura', 'cs': 'Rozumění konverzačního stroje: přehled literatury', 'et': 'Vestlusmasina arusaam: kirjanduse ülevaade', 'fi': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review', 'jv': 'Cumberén Majin Cumberén: a Digetari Resolusi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razumevanje pogovornih strojev: pregled literature', 'he': 'הבנה של מכונת שיחה: מחקר ספרות', 'bo': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension: a Literature Review'}
{'en': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), a research track in conversational AI, expects the machine to understand an open-domain natural language text and thereafter engage in a multi-turn conversation to answer questions related to the text. While most of the research in Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) revolves around single-turn question answering (QA), multi-turn CMC has recently gained prominence, thanks to the advancement in natural language understanding via neural language models such as BERT and the introduction of large-scale conversational datasets such as CoQA and QuAC. The rise in interest has, however, led to a flurry of concurrent publications, each with a different yet structurally similar modeling approach and an inconsistent view of the surrounding literature. With the volume of model submissions to conversational datasets increasing every year, there exists a need to consolidate the scattered knowledge in this domain to streamline future research. This literature review attempts at providing a holistic overview of CMC with an emphasis on the common trends across recently published models, specifically in their approach to tackling conversational history. The review synthesizes a generic framework for CMC models while highlighting the differences in recent approaches and intends to serve as a compendium of CMC for future researchers.', 'ar': 'فهم آلة المحادثة (CMC) ، وهو مسار بحثي في الذكاء الاصطناعي للمحادثة ، يتوقع أن يفهم الجهاز نصًا بلغة طبيعية مفتوحة المجال وبعد ذلك ينخرط في محادثة متعددة الأدوار للإجابة على الأسئلة المتعلقة بالنص. بينما تدور معظم الأبحاث في مجال فهم القراءة الآلي (MRC) حول الإجابة على الأسئلة أحادية المنعطف (QA) ، اكتسبت CMC متعددة الأدوار مؤخرًا مكانة بارزة ، وذلك بفضل التقدم في فهم اللغة الطبيعية عبر نماذج اللغة العصبية مثل BERT والمقدمة من مجموعات بيانات المحادثة واسعة النطاق مثل CoQA و QuAC. ومع ذلك ، أدى ارتفاع الاهتمام إلى موجة من المنشورات المتزامنة ، ولكل منها نهج نمذجة مختلف ولكنه مماثل هيكليًا ونظرة غير متسقة للأدبيات المحيطة. مع زيادة حجم عمليات إرسال النماذج إلى مجموعات البيانات التخاطبية كل عام ، هناك حاجة إلى دمج المعرفة المتناثرة في هذا المجال لتبسيط البحث المستقبلي. تحاول مراجعة الأدبيات هذه تقديم نظرة عامة شاملة عن CMC مع التركيز على الاتجاهات الشائعة عبر النماذج المنشورة مؤخرًا ، وتحديداً في نهجها لمعالجة تاريخ المحادثة. تقوم المراجعة بتجميع إطار عام لنماذج CMC مع إبراز الاختلافات في الأساليب الحديثة وتعتزم أن تكون بمثابة خلاصة وافية لـ CMC للباحثين المستقبليين.', 'es': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), una vía de investigación en IA conversacional, espera que la máquina entienda un texto en lenguaje natural de dominio abierto y, a continuación, participe en una conversación de varios turnos para responder preguntas relacionadas con el texto. Si bien la mayor parte de la investigación en Comprensión de lectura automática (MRC) gira en torno a la respuesta a preguntas (QA) de un solo giro, la CMC multivuelta ha ganado protagonismo recientemente, gracias al avance en la comprensión del lenguaje natural a través de modelos de lenguaje neuronal como BERT y la introducción de conjuntos de datos conversacionales como CoQA y QuAC. Sin embargo, el aumento del interés ha llevado a una avalancha de publicaciones simultáneas, cada una con un enfoque de modelado diferente pero estructuralmente similar y una visión inconsistente de la literatura circundante. Dado que el volumen de envíos de modelos a conjuntos de datos conversacionales aumenta cada año, existe la necesidad de consolidar el conocimiento disperso en este campo para agilizar la investigación futura. Esta revisión de la literatura intenta proporcionar una visión general holística de la CMC con énfasis en las tendencias comunes en los modelos publicados recientemente, específicamente en su enfoque para abordar la historia de la conversación. La revisión sintetiza un marco genérico para los modelos de CMC, al tiempo que destaca las diferencias en los enfoques recientes y pretende servir como un compendio de CMC para futuros investigadores.', 'fr': "Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), une piste de recherche en IA conversationnelle, attend de la machine qu'elle comprenne un texte en langage naturel de domaine ouvert, puis qu'elle engage une conversation à plusieurs tours pour répondre aux questions liées au texte. Alors que la plupart des recherches en compréhension de lecture automatique (MRC) tournent autour de la réponse aux questions (AQ) en un tour, la CMC multi-tours a récemment gagné en importance, grâce aux progrès de la compréhension du langage naturel via des modèles de langage neuronal tels que BERT et à l'introduction de ensembles de données conversationnels tels que CoQA et QuAC. L'intérêt croissant a cependant conduit à une multitude de publications simultanées, chacune ayant une approche de modélisation différente mais structurellement similaire et une vision incohérente de la littérature environnante. Le volume de modèles soumis à des ensembles de données conversationnels augmentant chaque année, il existe un besoin de consolider les connaissances dispersées dans ce domaine afin de rationaliser les recherches futures. Cette revue de littérature tente de fournir un aperçu holistique du CMC en mettant l'accent sur les tendances communes des modèles récemment publiés, en particulier dans leur approche de l'histoire conversationnelle. La revue synthétise un cadre générique pour les modèles CMC tout en soulignant les différences entre les approches récentes et vise à servir de compendium de CMC pour les futurs chercheurs.", 'pt': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), uma trilha de pesquisa em IA conversacional, espera que a máquina entenda um texto em linguagem natural de domínio aberto e, posteriormente, se envolva em uma conversa de vários turnos para responder a perguntas relacionadas ao texto. Enquanto a maior parte da pesquisa em Compreensão de Leitura de Máquina (MRC) gira em torno da resposta a perguntas (QA) de turno único, o CMC de turnos múltiplos ganhou destaque recentemente, graças ao avanço na compreensão da linguagem natural por meio de modelos de linguagem neural, como BERT e a introdução de conjuntos de dados de conversação em grande escala, como CoQA e QuAC. O aumento do interesse, no entanto, levou a uma enxurrada de publicações simultâneas, cada uma com uma abordagem de modelagem diferente, mas estruturalmente semelhante, e uma visão inconsistente da literatura circundante. Com o volume de envios de modelos para conjuntos de dados de conversação aumentando a cada ano, existe a necessidade de consolidar o conhecimento disperso neste domínio para agilizar pesquisas futuras. Esta revisão da literatura tenta fornecer uma visão holística do CMC com ênfase nas tendências comuns em modelos publicados recentemente, especificamente em sua abordagem para lidar com a história da conversação. A revisão sintetiza uma estrutura genérica para modelos de CMC enquanto destaca as diferenças nas abordagens recentes e pretende servir como um compêndio de CMC para futuros pesquisadores.', 'ja': '会話型AIの研究トラックである会話型機械理解（ CMC ）は、機械がオープンドメインの自然言語テキストを理解し、その後、テキストに関連する質問に答えるための複数ターンの会話に参加することを期待しています。 機械読解理解（ MRC ）の研究のほとんどは、単一ターンの質疑応答（ QA ）を中心としているが、BERTなどの神経言語モデルを介した自然言語理解の進歩とCoQAやQuACなどの大規模な会話データセットの導入により、多ターンCMCが最近注目されている。 しかし、関心の高まりは、同時に出版される一連の出版物につながり、それぞれが異なるが構造的に類似したモデリングアプローチを有し、周囲の文献に対する一貫性のない見解を有している。 会話データセットへのモデル送信の量が年々増加するにつれて、将来の研究を合理化するために、この分野の散在した知識を統合する必要があります。 この文献レビューは、最近発表されたモデル全体の共通の傾向、特に会話履歴へのアプローチに重点を置いて、CMCの全体的な概要を提供しようと試みている。 このレビューは、最近のアプローチの違いを強調しながら、CMCモデルの一般的なフレームワークを統合し、将来の研究者のためのCMCの総集編として機能することを意図している。', 'zh': '会话机器知(CMC)者,会话AI之治道也,期机器解开域自然语言本,然后多轮对以对。 虽机器读解(MRC)大抵研究皆绕单轮问答(QA),然因BERT等神经语言形于自然语言解者进步及CoQA、QuAC等大会话数集引入,多轮次CMC近得显位。 然兴趣之升,一系并出版物,每出版物不同而相似者建模与文献异论。 随向对数集提交的模形数每年都在增加,有要整合该领的分散知识,以简化未来的研究。 本文献综述图CMC之体概述,重者近发之同势,尤在治对史之法。 综述综CMC通用框架,并为近法之异,欲为未来之CMC简编。', 'hi': 'संवादी मशीन समझ (सीएमसी), संवादात्मक एआई में एक शोध ट्रैक, मशीन को एक ओपन-डोमेन प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ को समझने की उम्मीद करता है और उसके बाद पाठ से संबंधित प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए एक बहु-बारी वार्तालाप में संलग्न होता है। जबकि मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन (एमआरसी) में अधिकांश शोध एकल-बारी प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) के आसपास घूमता है, बहु-बारी सीएमसी ने हाल ही में प्रमुखता प्राप्त की है, BERT जैसे तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल के माध्यम से प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ में प्रगति और CoQA और QuAC जैसे बड़े पैमाने पर संवादात्मक डेटासेट की शुरुआत के लिए धन्यवाद। ब्याज में वृद्धि, हालांकि, समवर्ती प्रकाशनों की एक बाढ़ का कारण बनी है, प्रत्येक एक अलग अभी तक संरचनात्मक रूप से समान मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोण और आसपास के साहित्य के एक असंगत दृष्टिकोण के साथ। संवादी डेटासेट के लिए मॉडल सबमिशन की मात्रा हर साल बढ़ने के साथ, भविष्य के शोध को सुव्यवस्थित करने के लिए इस डोमेन में बिखरे हुए ज्ञान को समेकित करने की आवश्यकता है। यह साहित्य समीक्षा हाल ही में प्रकाशित मॉडलों में आम रुझानों पर जोर देने के साथ सीएमसी का एक समग्र अवलोकन प्रदान करने का प्रयास करती है, विशेष रूप से संवादी इतिहास से निपटने के लिए उनके दृष्टिकोण में। समीक्षा हाल के दृष्टिकोणों में अंतर को उजागर करते हुए सीएमसी मॉडल के लिए एक सामान्य ढांचे को संश्लेषित करती है और भविष्य के शोधकर्ताओं के लिए सीएमसी के संग्रह के रूप में सेवा करने का इरादा रखती है।', 'ru': 'Понимание разговорной машины (CMC), исследовательский трек в разговорном искусственном интеллекте, ожидает, что машина поймет текст на естественном языке с открытым доменом и после этого начнет многооборотную беседу, чтобы ответить на вопросы, связанные с текстом. В то время как большая часть исследований в области понимания машинного чтения (MRC) вращается вокруг однооборотного ответа на вопросы (QA), многооборотный CMC недавно получил известность, благодаря прогрессу в понимании естественного языка с помощью нейронных языковых моделей, таких как BERT, и внедрению крупномасштабных наборов разговорных данных, таких как CoQA и Quac. Однако рост интереса привел к появлению большого числа параллельных публикаций, каждая из которых имеет свой, но структурно схожий подход к моделированию и непоследовательный взгляд на окружающую литературу. В связи с увеличением с каждым годом количества представляемых моделей в наборы данных для бесед существует необходимость консолидации разрозненных знаний в этой области для упорядочения будущих исследований. В этом обзоре литературы предпринята попытка предоставить целостный обзор CMC с акцентом на общие тенденции в недавно опубликованных моделях, особенно в их подходе к истории разговоров. В обзоре обобщаются общие рамки для моделей КМЦ, при этом подчеркиваются различия в последних подходах, и он призван служить в качестве компендиума КМЦ для будущих исследователей.', 'ga': 'Tá Tuiscint Meaisín Comhrá (CMC), rian taighde in AI comhrá, ag súil go dtuigeann an meaisín téacs teanga nádúrtha fearainn oscailte agus ina dhiaidh sin gabháil le comhrá il-uaine chun ceisteanna a bhaineann leis an téacs a fhreagairt. Cé go mbaineann an chuid is mó den taighde ar Thuiscint Mheaine-léitheoireachta (MRC) le freagra ceiste aon chasadh (QA), tháinig CMC il-uaine chun suntais le déanaí, a bhuíochas leis an dul chun cinn i dtuiscint teanga nádúrtha trí mhúnlaí néartheanga mar BERT agus an réamhrá. de thacair shonraí chomhrá ar mhórscála mar CoQA agus QuAC. Mar sin féin, tá flúirse foilseachán comhthráthach mar thoradh ar an méadú ar spéis, gach ceann acu le cur chuige samhaltaithe difriúil ach atá cosúil le struchtúr agus dearcadh neamh-chomhsheasmhach ar an litríocht máguaird. Agus líon na n-aighneachtaí eiseamláireacha do thacair shonraí chomhrá ag méadú gach bliain, tá gá ann an t-eolas scaipthe sa réimse seo a chomhdhlúthú chun taighde sa todhchaí a chuíchóiriú. Déanann an t-athbhreithniú litríochta seo iarracht forbhreathnú iomlánaíoch a sholáthar ar CMC le béim ar na treochtaí coitianta ar fud na samhlacha a foilsíodh le déanaí, go háirithe ina gcur chuige chun dul i ngleic leis an stair chomhrá. Déanann an t-athbhreithniú sintéisiú ar chreat cineálach do mhúnlaí CMC agus ag an am céanna leagann sé béim ar na héagsúlachtaí sa chur chuige a tharla le déanaí agus tá sé beartaithe aige feidhmiú mar achoimre ar CMC do thaighdeoirí amach anseo.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση μηχανών συνομιλίας (ένα ερευνητικό κομμάτι στην τεχνητή νοημοσύνη συνομιλίας, αναμένει από το μηχάνημα να κατανοήσει ένα κείμενο φυσικής γλώσσας ανοικτού τομέα και στη συνέχεια να συμμετάσχει σε μια συζήτηση πολλαπλών στροφών για να απαντήσει σε ερωτήσεις που σχετίζονται με το κείμενο. Ενώ το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της έρευνας στην κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης (MRC) περιστρέφεται γύρω από την απάντηση ερωτήσεων με μία στροφή (QA), το πολυστροφικό CMC έχει αποκτήσει πρόσφατα προβάδισμα, χάρη στην πρόοδο στην κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας μέσω των νευρωνικών γλωσσικών μοντέλων όπως το BERT και την εισαγωγή μεγάλης κλίμακας συνόλων δεδομένων συνομιλίας όπως το CoQA και το QuAC. Η αύξηση του ενδιαφέροντος, ωστόσο, οδήγησε σε μια πληθώρα ταυτόχρονων εκδόσεων, η καθεμία με διαφορετική αλλά δομικά παρόμοια προσέγγιση μοντελοποίησης και μια ασυνεπή άποψη της γύρω βιβλιογραφίας. Με τον όγκο των υποβαλλόμενων μοντέλων σε σύνολα δεδομένων συνομιλίας να αυξάνεται κάθε χρόνο, υπάρχει ανάγκη να εδραιωθεί η διάσπαρτη γνώση σε αυτόν τον τομέα για να εξορθολογιστεί η μελλοντική έρευνα. Αυτή η βιβλιογραφική ανασκόπηση επιχειρεί να παράσχει μια ολιστική επισκόπηση της CMC με έμφαση στις κοινές τάσεις στα πρόσφατα δημοσιευμένα μοντέλα, ειδικά στην προσέγγισή τους στην αντιμετώπιση της ιστορίας της συνομιλίας. Η ανασκόπηση συνθέτει ένα γενικό πλαίσιο για μοντέλα ενώ αναδεικνύει τις διαφορές στις πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις και σκοπεύει να χρησιμεύσει ως ένα συμπέρασμα για τους μελλοντικούς ερευνητές.', 'hu': 'A Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), a beszélgető mesterséges intelligencia kutatási pályája elvárja, hogy a gép megértse a nyílt domain természetes nyelvű szöveget, majd többfordulós beszélgetést folytasson a szöveggel kapcsolatos kérdések megválaszolására. Míg a gépi olvasási megértés (MRC) kutatásainak nagy része az egyfordulós kérdésre (QA) irányul, a többfordulós CMC a közelmúltban kiemelkedő helyre került, köszönhetően a természetes nyelv megértésének fejlődésének az olyan neurális nyelvmodelleken keresztül, mint a BERT, valamint a nagyszabású beszélgetési adathalmazok bevezetésének, mint a CoQA és a QuAC. Az érdeklődés növekedése azonban párhuzamos publikációkhoz vezetett, amelyek mindegyike más, de strukturálisan hasonló modellezési megközelítéssel és a környező irodalom következetlen nézeteivel rendelkezik. Mivel évről évre növekszik a beszélgetési adatkészletekhez benyújtott modellek mennyisége, a jövőbeli kutatások racionalizálása érdekében szükség van arra, hogy konszolidáljuk ezen a területen a szétszórt ismereteket. Ez az irodalmi áttekintés arra törekszik, hogy holisztikus áttekintést nyújtson a CMC-ről, hangsúlyt fektetve a közelmúltban publikált modellek közös trendjeire, különösen a beszélgetéstörténet kezelésére irányuló megközelítésükre. A felülvizsgálat szintetizálja a CMC modellek általános keretét, miközben kiemeli a közelmúltbeli megközelítések különbségeit, és a CMC összefoglalójaként szolgál a jövőbeli kutatók számára.', 'it': "Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), un percorso di ricerca nell'IA conversazionale, si aspetta che la macchina comprenda un testo in linguaggio naturale a dominio aperto e successivamente si impegni in una conversazione a più turni per rispondere alle domande relative al testo. Mentre la maggior parte della ricerca in Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) ruota intorno alla risposta alle domande a un solo turno (QA), il CMC a più turni ha recentemente acquisito importanza, grazie all'avanzamento nella comprensione del linguaggio naturale attraverso modelli di linguaggio neurale come BERT e all'introduzione di set di dati conversazionali su larga scala come CoQA e QuAC. L'aumento dell'interesse ha tuttavia portato a un flusso di pubblicazioni simultanee, ognuna con un approccio modellistico diverso ma strutturalmente simile e una visione incoerente della letteratura circostante. Con il volume di presentazioni di modelli a set di dati conversazionali in aumento ogni anno, esiste la necessità di consolidare la conoscenza diffusa in questo settore per semplificare la ricerca futura. Questa revisione della letteratura cerca di fornire una panoramica olistica della CMC con enfasi sulle tendenze comuni tra i modelli recentemente pubblicati, in particolare nel loro approccio alla storia della conversazione. La revisione sintetizza un quadro generico per i modelli CMC evidenziando le differenze negli approcci recenti e intende servire da compendio di CMC per i futuri ricercatori.", 'ka': 'პარაუზაციური მაქინის კომპრენცია (CMC), პარაუზაციური AI-ში პარაუზაცია, მაქინა იმედია, რომ გახსნა დიომინური ენერგიის ტექსტი და შემდეგ მრავალური პარაუზაციაში გადაწყვება ტექსტის შესახებ მაქსინური კითხვის კომპრენსციის უფრო მეტი კითხვების შესახებ (QA) გადაწყვება, მრავალური კითხვების შესახებ (CMC) მხოლოდ მიიღეთ მნიშვნელობა, რადგან მიიღეთ ნეიროლური ენის მოდელების გამოსახულება, როგორც BERT და დიდი მარტივი კონტაქციო მაგრამ ინტერესტის ზომა იყო, რომელიც ერთადერთი პუბულიკაციების ფლიპერია, ყოველთვის განსხვავებული მაგრამ სტრუქტურურურად მსგავსი მოდელური პროგრამით და გარშემო ლიტურატიის შე მოდელური მონაცემებების სიმაღლე, რომელიც ყოველ წლის გაზრდება მოდელური მონაცემებების სიმაღლე, არსებობს უნდა კონსოლიდირება, რომელიც მომავალური მონაცემებების გაზრდებ ამ ლიტერატურის შესახებ მოცდილობა CMC-ის ჰოლტისტიკური შესახებ, რომელიც მხოლოდ განახლებული მოდელების საერთო ტენდენციების განმავლობაში დაახლოებით, განსაკუთრებით განახლოებით განსახებ განახლება სინტესტიზებს CMC მოდელისთვის გენერიკური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც განახლებების განსხვავებას აღწერებს და მინდომა CMC-ის კონფენდისმი მომავალეთისთვის.', 'mk': 'Конверзационално разбирање на машината (CMC), истражувачка трага во конверзационална AI, очекува машината да разбере текст на природен јазик на отворен домен и потоа да се вклучи во мултиобратен разговор за одговор на прашањата поврзани со текстот. И покрај тоа што повеќето истражувања во Механичното читање разбирање (МРЦ) се вртат околу одговорот на еднокруг прашања (QA), мултикруг ЦМЦ неодамна доби истакнување, благодарение на напредокот во природното разбирање на јазикот преку модели на невровниот јазик како што е БЕРТ и воведувањето на големи конверзационални податоци како што Сепак, зголемувањето на интересот доведе до популација на конкурентни публикации, секоја со различен, но структурно сличен пристап на моделирање и несогласен поглед на околната литература. With the volume of model submissions to conversational datasets increasing every year, there exists a need to consolidate the scattered knowledge in this domain to streamline future research.  Овој преглед на литературата се обидува да обезбеди холистички преглед на СМЦ со акцент на заедничките трендови во неодамна објавените модели, посебно во нивниот пристап кон решавањето на разговорната историја. Прегледот синтетизира генерална рамка за моделите на CMC, истакнувајќи ги разликите во неодамнешните пристапи и има намера да служи како компендиум на CMC за идните истражувачи.', 'lt': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), mokslinis pokalbio AI kelias, tikisi, kad mašin a supras atviro domeno natūralių kalbų tekstą ir vėliau dalyvaus daugkartiniame pokalbyje atsakydama į su tekstu susijusius klausimus. Nors dauguma mašin ų skaitymo supratimo (angl. Machine Reading Comprehension, MRC) mokslinių tyrimų yra susiję su vienkartiniais atsakymais į klausimus (angl. single-turn question answering, QA), daugelis kartų CMC neseniai įgijo reikšmę, nes pažanga natūralioje kalbos supratimo srityje pasitelkiant nervinių kalbų modelius, pavyzdžiui, BERT, ir įdiegiant plataus masto pokalbių duomenų rinkinius, pavyzdžiui, CoQA ir QuAC. Vis dėlto padidėjęs susidomėjimas paskatino įvairius vienu metu skelbiamus leidinius, kurių modeliavimo metodas buvo kitoks, tačiau struktūriškai panašus, ir nesuderinamas aplinkinės literatūros požiūris. Kadangi kiekvienais metais didėja pokalbių duomenų rinkiniams pateiktų pavyzdžių kiekis, reikia konsoliduoti skleistas žinias šioje srityje, kad būtų racionalizuoti būsimi moksliniai tyrimai. Šioje literatūros apžvalgoje siekiama pateikti išsamią CMC apžvalgą, kurioje pabrėžiamos bendros neseniai paskelbtų modelių tendencijos, ypač jų požiūris į pokalbių istoriją. Atliekant peržiūrą apibendrinama bendroji CMC modelių sistema, kartu pabrėžiami naujausių metodų skirtumai ir ketinama būti būsimų mokslininkų CMC sudėtinė dalis.', 'kk': 'Компьютерлік машиналық компрессиясы (CMC), аударылық AI зерттеу жолы, компьютердің ашық домендық тәуелді тілді мәтін түсініп, содан кейін мәтіннің сұрақтарына жауап беру үшін көп аударылған сұрақтарына қаты Машин оқу құрылғысының (MRC) зерттеулерінің көпшілігі жауап беру (QA) сұрақтарының көпшілігіне қарсы болғанда, көпшілікті CMC жаңа жауап берілген, невралдық тіл үлгілерімен, мысалы, BERT және CoQA және QuAC секілді үлкен көпшілікті аудару дерект Бірақ қызықтың көтерілігі бір-бірінші басқа, бірақ бір-бірінші сәйкесті модель тәсілі және қоршау литературасының қарамастық көрінісі бар. Айнымалы деректер жиындарына үлгі жіберу көлемі көтерілген жылдар бойынша, келесі зерттеулерді көтеру үшін осы доменде таратылған білімдерді консолидациялау керек. Бұл литература қарау әрекеті CMC және жаңа жаңа жарияланған моделдердің жалпы тенденцияларына көмектесу әрекетін көру әрекетіне әсер ету әрекетіне әсер ету әрекетіне әсер етеді. Қарастыру сәйкестігі CMC үлгілерінде жалпы бағдарламалардың айырмашылығын белгілеп, келесі зерттеулерге CMC бағдарламалығын қолданатын жалпы бағдарламаларды синтезациялайды.', 'ms': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), a research track in conversational AI, expects the machine to understand an open-domain natural language text and thereafter engage in a multi-turn conversation to answer questions related to the text.  Sementara kebanyakan kajian dalam Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin (MRC) berputar sekitar jawapan soalan berturut-turut (QA), CMC berturut-turut baru-baru ini mendapat keterangan, berkat kemajuan dalam pemahaman bahasa alami melalui model bahasa saraf seperti BERT dan perkenalan set data percakapan skala besar seperti CoQA dan QuAC. Pertumbuhan kepentingan, bagaimanapun, telah menyebabkan kegembiraan penerbitan yang bersamaan, masing-masing dengan pendekatan model yang berbeza tetapi struktur yang sama dan pandangan tidak konsisten kepada literatur sekeliling. Dengan volum penghantaran model ke set data percakapan meningkat setiap tahun, terdapat kebutuhan untuk konsolidasi pengetahuan yang tersebar dalam domain ini untuk streamline kajian masa depan. Ujian literatur ini cuba untuk menyediakan pandangan keseluruhan CMC dengan fokus pada trends umum di seluruh model yang baru-baru ini diterbitkan, khususnya dalam pendekatan mereka untuk mengatasi sejarah perbualan. Ulasan sintesis kerangka generik untuk model CMC sambil menyatakan perbezaan dalam pendekatan baru-baru ini dan berniat untuk berkhidmat sebagai kompendium CMC bagi penyelidik masa depan.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിലെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ട്രാക്ക് സിഎംസി (സിഎംസി), സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു പഠിക്കുന്ന മെഷീന്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പേരില്\u200d പഠനങ്ങളില്\u200d മിക്കവേറെയും ഒരു തിരിച്ചുമാറുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ചുറ്റില്\u200d വീണുപോകുമ്പോഴും, ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച സിഎംസി അടുത്ത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട് എന്നാലും താല്പര്യത്തിന്റെ ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയ്ക്കുള്ള പ്രചരണത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രകാശങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു മാതൃകയുള സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d കീഴ്പ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ശബ്ദം കൊണ്ട്, ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശോധനത് സിഎംസിയുടെ ഒരു വിശിഷ്ടമായ നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ സാഹിത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്തുതന്നെ പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ച മോഡലുകളില്\u200d സ അടുത്ത സമ്പ്രദായങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സിഎംസി മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു സാധാരണ ഫ്രെയിമെയിറ്റ് സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്', 'pl': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), ścieżka badawcza w dziedzinie sztucznej inteligencji konwersacyjnej, oczekuje, że maszyna zrozumie tekst języka naturalnego w otwartej domenie, a następnie zaangażuje się w rozmowę wielokrotną, aby odpowiedzieć na pytania związane z tekstem. Podczas gdy większość badań dotyczących zrozumienia odczytu maszynowego (MRC) koncentruje się wokół odpowiedzi na pytania z jednym turnem (QA), multiturn CMC zyskał ostatnio znaczenie, dzięki postępowi w rozumieniu języka naturalnego za pomocą neuronowych modeli języka, takich jak BERT i wprowadzeniu dużej skali zbiorów danych konwersacyjnych, takich jak CoQA i QuAC. Wzrost zainteresowania doprowadził jednak do szeregu równoległych publikacji, z których każda ma inne, ale strukturalnie podobne podejście do modelowania i niespójne spojrzenie na otaczającą literaturę. Wraz z corocznym wzrostem ilości modeli zgłaszanych do zbiorów danych konwersacyjnych, istnieje potrzeba konsolidacji rozproszonej wiedzy w tej dziedzinie w celu usprawnienia przyszłych badań. Niniejszy przegląd literatury próbuje zapewnić całościowy przegląd CMC z naciskiem na wspólne trendy w ostatnio opublikowanych modelach, w szczególności w ich podejściu do rozwiązywania historii konwersacji. Przegląd syntetyzuje ogólne ramy dla modeli CMC, podkreślając różnice w najnowszych podejściach i ma służyć jako kompendium CMC dla przyszłych badaczy.', 'mt': 'Il-Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju Konversazzjonali (CMC), mogħdija ta’ riċerka fl-AI konversazzjonali, tistenna li l-makkinarju jifhem test lingwistiku naturali b’dominju miftuħ u minn hemm ’il quddiem jinvolvi ruħu fi konversazzjoni b’diversi dawriet biex iwieġeb mistoqsijiet relatati mat-test. Filwaqt li l-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka fil-Komprensjoni tal-qari bil-Magni (MRC) tiddawwar madwar it-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’dawra waħda (QA), dan l-aħħar is-CMC b’diversi dawriet kisbet prominenza, bis-saħħa tal-avvanz fil-fehim tal-lingwa naturali permezz ta’ mudelli tal-lingwa newrali bħall-BERT u l-introduzzjoni ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta konversazzjonali fuq skala kbira bħall-CoQA u The rise in interest has, however, led to a flurry of concurrent publications, each with a different yet structurally similar modeling approach and an inconsistent view of the surrounding literature.  Billi l-volum ta’ sottomissjonijiet mudelli għal settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ konverżjoni qed jiżdied kull sena, jeżisti l-ħtieġa li l-għarfien mifrux f’dan il-qasam jiġi kkonsolidat biex ir-riċerka futura tiġi ssimplifikata. Din ir-reviżjoni tal-letteratura tipprova tipprovdi ħarsa ġenerali olistika tas-CMC b’enfasi fuq ix-xejriet komuni fil-mudelli ppubblikati reċentement, speċifikament fl-approċċ tagħhom biex jindirizzaw l-istorja tal-konverżjoni. Ir-reviżjoni tissinteżizza qafas ġeneriku għall-mudelli tas-CMC filwaqt li tenfasizza d-differenzi fl-approċċi reċenti u beħsiebha sservi bħala kompendium tas-CMC għar-riċerkaturi futuri.', 'mn': 'Хариултын Машин Төрөвдүүлэлт (CMC), харилцааны AI-ын судалгааны загвар, машин нээлттэй дотор байгалийн хэлний текст ойлгохыг хүсч, дараа нь тексттэй холбоотой асуултуудыг хариулах олон өөрчлөлт ярианд оролцож байна. Машин унших судалгааны ихэнх судалгаа (MRC) нэг эргэн асуултын хариулт (QA) тойронд орж ирсэн ч олон эргэн CMC саяхан хамгийн чухал болсон. Байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд BERT болон CoQA болон QuAC зэрэг том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангуудын хөгжлийн талаар баярлалаа. Гэхдээ сонирхолтой өсөлт нь хоёр дахин нийтлэгдсэн хэвлэлүүд болж, бүх хүн бүр өөр, бүтээлч, бүтээлч төстэй загварын арга барилга болон эргэн тойрны уран зохиолын тухай харагдаж байлаа. Холбооны өгөгдлийн санг жил бүр нэмэгдүүлэх загварын хэмжээний сургалтын хэмжээний тулд ирээдүйн судалгааны шинжлэх ухааны тусламжтай болж байна. Энэ уран зохиолын шинжилгээ нь СМС-г саяхан хэвлэгдсэн загваруудын нийтлэг тенденцийг анхаарлаа хандуулах зорилго, ялангуяа харилцааны түүхийн тухай зорилгодог арга загваруудын тухай. Шинжлэх нь CMC загварын ерөнхий хэмжээг нэгтгэдэг. Сүүлийн арга загварын ялгааг тодорхойлож ирээдүйн судлаачид CMC-ын төлөөлөл болгох гэсэн үг.', 'ro': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), o pistă de cercetare în IA conversațională, se așteaptă ca aparatul să înțeleagă un text de limbă naturală cu domeniu deschis și apoi să se angajeze într-o conversație cu mai multe rânduri pentru a răspunde la întrebări legate de text. În timp ce majoritatea cercetărilor în domeniul înțelegerii mașinilor de citire (MRC) se învârte în jurul răspunsului la întrebări cu un singur rând (QA), CMC cu mai multe rânduri a câștigat recent importanță, datorită progresului în înțelegerea limbajului natural prin modele de limbaj neural, cum ar fi BERT și introducerea seturilor de date conversaționale la scară largă, cum ar fi CoQA și QuAC. Creșterea interesului a condus, totuși, la un flux de publicații concurente, fiecare având o abordare de modelare diferită, dar structural similară și o viziune inconsecventă a literaturii din jur. Odată cu creșterea volumului de transmiteri de modele la seturile de date conversaționale în fiecare an, există o necesitate de a consolida cunoștințele dispersate în acest domeniu pentru a eficientiza cercetarea viitoare. Această revizuire a literaturii încearcă să ofere o imagine de ansamblu holistică a CMC, cu accent pe tendințele comune ale modelelor publicate recent, în special în abordarea acestora de abordare a istoriei conversației. Revizuirea sintetizează un cadru generic pentru modelele CMC evidențiind în același timp diferențele dintre abordările recente și intenționează să servească ca un compendiu al CMC pentru viitorii cercetători.', 'sr': 'Konverzaciona komprehenzija mašine (CMC), istraživačka traga u konverzacionom AI-u očekuje da mašin a razume tekst prirodnog jezika otvorenog domena i nakon toga uključi se u razgovor sa mnogim okrenutim da odgovori na pitanja vezane za tekst. Iako većina istraživanja u komprenciji za čitanje mašina (MRC) se okreće oko odgovora na jednookret pitanja (QA), mnogo okretanja CMC je nedavno dobila veliku velikost, zahvaljujući napredu prirodnog razumijevanja jezika kroz neuralne jezičke modele kao što su BERT i uvođenje velikih konverzacionih seta podataka poput CoQA i QuAC. Međutim, povećanje interesa je dovelo do svjetlosti istovremenih publikacija, svako sa drugačijim, ali strukturno sličnim pristupom modelima i neskladnom pogledom okružene literature. S obzirom na volum podataka model a svake godine povećavajući razgovorne podatake, postoji potreba za konsolidiranjem raspršenih znanja u ovoj oblasti da streamliniraju buduće istraživanje. Ovaj pregled književnosti pokušava pružiti holistički pregled CMC sa naglaskom na zajedničke trende u nedavno objavljenim modelima, posebno u njihovom pristupu rješavanju razgovorne istorije. Pregled sintetizira generični okvir za CMC modele dok se naglašava razlike u nedavnim pristupima i namjerava služiti kao kompenzijum CMC za buduće istraživače.', 'no': 'Samtalemaskinekomprehension (CMC), eit forskningsspor i samtale AI, forventar maskinen å forstå ein naturleg språk med opna domenet og deretter startar i eit fleire omtale for å svara på spørsmåla relatert til teksten. Mens dei fleste forskningane i maskinelesingskomprehensisjonen (MRC) revolver rundt svar på spørsmål om enkeltvaring (QA), har CMC nyleg gått viktig, takk på avanserten i naturspråk-forståking via neuralspråk-modeller som BERT og innføring av store skala konverteringsdatasett som CoQA og QuAC. I staden har likevel økningen i interesse ført til ein flurry av samtidige publikasjonar, kvar med ein annan, men strukturært liknande modelleringstilnærming og ein inkonsistent vising av omgivnande literatur. Med lydstyrke av modeller til samtaledatasett som økar kvar år, finst det ein måte å konsolidera den spretta kunnskapen i denne domenet for å streamlisera framtidige forskning. Denne undersøkelsen prøver å gje ei holistisk overvåk av CMC med ein strek på de vanlege trendene over nyleg utgjevne modeller, spesielt i tilnærminga til å få samtalehistorie. Reviseren syntiserer eit generelt rammeverk for CMC-modeller medan du markerer forskjellingane i nyleg tilnærmingar, og vil kalle som kompensjon av CMC for framtidige forskere.', 'ta': 'பேச்சு இயந்திரத்தை மீட்டுதல் (CMC), பேச்சு AI யில் ஒரு ஆராய்ச்சி தடத்தை எதிர்பார்க்கும், இயந்திரத்தை திறந்த இயற்கையான மொழி உரையை புரிந்து கொள்ளும்  இயந்திரத்தில் பெரும்பாலான ஆராய்ச்சி படிப்பு முடிவு (MRC) ஒற்றைத் திரும்பும் கேள்விக்கு பதில் சுற்றி திரும்பும் போது, பல முறை CMC சமீபத்தில் பெரும்பாலானது, பெரும்பாலான மொழி புரிந்து ப வட்டியின் அதிகரிப்பு தற்போதைய பொருள்களின் சூழ்நிலையை கொண்டுள்ளது, ஒவ்வொரு பொருளுக்கும் வேறு வட்டியலிலும் போன்ற மாதிரியான ஒவ்வொரு ஆண்டும் அதிகரிக்கும் பேசும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு மாதிரி ஒலியளவு கொண்டு, இந்த களத்தில் பரப்பும் அறிவினை மேம்படுத்த வேண் இந்த எழுத்தாக்கத்தின் முயற்சி சிஎம்சி ஒரு புதிய மேலோட்டம் கொடுக்க முயற்சிக்கிறது, சமீபத்தில் வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் மீது பொதுவான ச இந்த பார்வை சிஎம்சி மாதிரிகளுக்கான பொதுவான சட்டத்தை ஒத்திசைக்கும் போது சமீபத்தில் உள்ள வேறுபாடுகளை முன்னிலைப்படுத்தும் போது மற', 'sv': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), ett forskningsspår inom konversationell AI, förväntar sig att maskinen ska förstå en öppen domän naturlig språktext och därefter engagera sig i en multi-turn konversation för att svara på frågor relaterade till texten. Medan merparten av forskningen inom Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) kretsar kring svar på frågor med ett enda varv (QA), har multi-turn CMC nyligen blivit framträdande, tack vare utvecklingen inom förståelsen av naturligt språk via neurala språkmodeller som BERT och införandet av storskaliga konversationsdata som CoQA och QuAC. Ökningen av intresset har dock lett till en uppsjö av samtidiga publikationer, var och en med en annorlunda men strukturellt liknande modelleringsmetod och en inkonsekvent syn på den omgivande litteraturen. I takt med att mängden modellinlämningar till konversationsdata ökar varje år, finns det ett behov av att konsolidera den spridda kunskapen inom detta område för att effektivisera framtida forskning. Denna litteraturöversikt syftar till att ge en helhetsbild av CMC med betoning på de gemensamma trenderna mellan nyligen publicerade modellerna, särskilt i deras förhållningssätt till att hantera konversationshistoria. Översynen sammanfattar ett generiskt ramverk för CMC-modeller samtidigt som den belyser skillnaderna i de senaste tillvägagångssätten och avser att fungera som ett kompendium av CMC för framtida forskare.', 'si': 'සංවාදක මැෂින් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය (CMC), සංවාදක AI වල පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා, පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ මැෂින් කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය (MRC) ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය (QA) වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා, Multi-turn CMC අවසානයෙ නමුත් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම, සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන, හැමෝම වෙනස් තාමත් සංවිධානයෙන් වගේ සංව හැම අවුරුද්දේ වාර්තාවික දත්ත සේට් වලට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පිළිබඳින්න, මෙහි ප්\u200dරමාණයේ පිළිබඳු දන්නවට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න අවශ මේ සාධාරණ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා CMC ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා අතින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේ පරීක්ෂණය CMC මොඩේල්ස් වලට සාමාන්\u200dය සංවිධානයක් සංවිධානය කරනවා, අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂකයන්ට තියෙන වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dර', 'so': "Machinka la-sameynta (CMC), wadada baaraandegista AI, wuxuu rajaynayaa mashiinka inuu garto qoraal af dabiicadda ah oo afka kala duduwan oo gudaha ah, markaasna uu sameynayaa hadal kala duduwan si uu uga jawaabo su'aalo la xiriira qoraalka. Inta badan baaritaanka Machine Reading Comparinta (MRC) ayaa soo wareegsan karta jawaabta su'aalaha hal jeer ah (QA), ugu dhowaad CMC ayaa faa'iido badan ku helay, waxaana ku mahad naqayaa horumarinta garashada afka dabiicadda ah, tusaale ahaan BERT iyo soo saaridda kooxaha macluumaadka kala sheekeysan sida CoQA iyo QuAC. Si kastaba ha ahaatee koritaanku wuxuu sababtay baaritaanka la socda, mid kastaaba wuxuu leeyahay qaab u eg qaab tusaale ah iyo arag a an la mid ahayn ee warqadda ku wareegsan. Cimil walba waxaa loo baahan yahay inuu kordhiyo aqoonta kala firidhsan ee domain ku yaala si uu u hagaajiyo waxbarashada mustaqbalka. Qoraalkan ayaa isku dayaya in uu soo daajiyo qoraal daahir ah oo CMC, kaas oo ku dadaalaya waddooyinka caadiga ah ee ugu dhowaad la soo daabacay, si gaar ah qaababka ay u baaraandegaan taariikhda hadalka. Ka baaraandegista ayaa samooyinka CMC ku qoran qoraal geneeral ah, marka uu ku caddeeyo kala duwanaanshaha ugu dambeeya qaababka, wuxuuna ku talo galay inuu u shaqeeyo qoraalka CMC ee baaritaanka mustaqbalka ah.", 'ur': 'تبلیغ ماشین کمپرینسی (CMC) کی ایک تحقیق ٹراک کی امید ہے کہ ماشین ایک کھلی دامنی طبیعی زبان کی متن سمجھے اور اس کے بعد متن کے سوال کی جواب دینے کے لئے بہت سی تبلیغ کی بات میں مشغول ہو جائے. اگرچہ ماشین پڑھنے کی کمپرینس (MRC) کی اکثریت تحقیقات ایک بار سوال جواب (QA) کے اطراف میں پھیر رہی ہے، بہت سی ٹرنگ سی سی نے اچھے وقت سے زیادہ اضافہ حاصل کی ہے، نورول زبان کی مدلکوں کے ذریعہ مغلوب ہونے کی شکریہ کے لئے نورول زبان کی مدلکوں کے ذریعہ، BERT اور بڑی اسکیل کی مکا لیکن سود کے ساتھ اضافہ ہونے کی وجہ سے ایک دوسری جماعت کی جگہ پہنچا گئی ہے، ہر ایک کو ایک دوسری طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح ہر سال مکالمانی ڈاٹ سٹ کے ماڈل مضبوط ہونے کے ذریعہ سے، اس ڈومین میں پھیلا ہوا علم کو تدبیر کرنے کے لئے ایک ضرورت ہے. This literature review attempts to provide a holistic overview of CMC with an emphasis on the common trends of recently published models, specifically in their approach to tackling conversational history. رسویٹ سی سی موڈل کے لئے ایک عمومی فرمود کا سازمان کرتا ہے جبکہ اچھی طریقوں میں تفاوت کی تعریف کرتا ہے اور اس کا ارادہ کرتا ہے کہ مستقبل تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے CMC کی کمانڈیوم کے طور پر عمل کریں.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik Mashining o'qishni o'qishga o'rganish (MRC) davomida bir necha boshqaruv savol javob beradi, ko'plab-turli CMC yaqinda ko'plab keldi, bizga ko'pchilik CMC asl tilni o'rganish modellarini BERT kabi neyralik modellari yordamida rivojlanishni va CoQA va QuAC kabi katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini ishga tushirish mumkin. The rise in interest has, however, led to a flurry of concurrent publications, each with a different yet structurally similar modeling approach and an inconsistent view of the surrounding literature.  Bir yil aloqa maʼlumotlar tarkibini koʻpaytirish uchun model imkoniyatlarining disk qismi bilan, bu domen'dagi ajratilgan maʼlumot yordamida kelajak qidirish uchun kerak. Bu littatiyatni tahrirlash orqali CMC haqida o'xshash ko'rinishga harakat qiladi. Yaqinda ochilgan modellarning umumiy yo'nalishi mumkin, hususan talab qilish tarixini boshqarish uchun ularning o'zgarishga qarang. Name", 'vi': 'Máy gia tốc đại hoàn to àn đối thoại (C.C., một đường ray nghiên cứu về cấu trúc AI đối thoại, mong đợi cỗ máy hiểu được một văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên mở miền và sau đó tham gia một cuộc đối thoại nhiều lần để trả lời các câu hỏi liên quan đến đoạn. Trong khi phần lớn nghiên cứu về am hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (MRC) xoay quanh việc trả lời câu hỏi một lần (QA), thì CMYK đa chiều (nhiều lần) gần đây đã trở nên nổi bật nhờ tiến bộ hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên thông qua các mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh như BERT và việc sử dụng các tập tin lớn về giao dịch như CodA và Qurac. Tuy nhiên, sự gia tăng đáng chú ý đã dẫn đến một loạt các tạp chí cạnh tranh, mỗi loại với một cách tiếp cận mẫu khác nhau nhưng về cấu trúc tương tự và một góc nhìn mâu thuẫn của văn học xung quanh. Với mức độ chịu đựng của mô- đun để phát triển dữ liệu đối thoại mỗi năm, cần phải củng cố những kiến thức rải rác trong lĩnh vực này để nâng cấp nghiên cứu tương lai. Bài văn học này thử nghiệm để cung cấp một tổng quan về C.C. với sự nhấn mạnh về xu hướng phổ biến trong các mô hình mới được công bố, đặc biệt trong cách giải quyết lịch sử đối thoại. Bản tóm tắt tổng hợp mô hình chung về mô hình CMYK, trong khi nhấn mạnh sự khác biệt trong các phương pháp gần đây và dự định sẽ phục vụ như tổng hợp của CMYK cho các nghiên cứu tương lai.', 'bg': 'Разбиране на разговорните машини (ЦМК), изследователска следа в разговорния изкуствен интелект, очаква машината да разбере текст на естествен език с отворен домейн и след това да се включи в многократен разговор, за да отговори на въпроси, свързани с текста. Докато по-голямата част от изследванията в областта на разбирането за машинно четене (МРС) се въртят около еднократно отговаряне на въпроси (КВ), многократното КМ наскоро придоби популярност благодарение на напредъка в разбирането на естествения език чрез невронни езикови модели като и въвеждането на широкомащабни разговорни набори от данни като КоQA и QuAC. Повишаването на интереса обаче води до вълна от едновременни публикации, всяка с различен, но структурно сходен подход на моделиране и непоследователен поглед към заобикалящата литература. Тъй като обемът на подаваните модели до разговорни набори от данни нараства всяка година, съществува необходимост от консолидиране на разпръснатите знания в тази област, за да се рационализират бъдещите изследвания. Този преглед на литературата се опитва да предостави цялостен преглед на КМС с акцент върху общите тенденции в наскоро публикуваните модели, особено в техния подход към справяне с историята на разговорите. Прегледът синтезира обща рамка за моделите на КМС, като същевременно подчертава разликите в последните подходи и възнамерява да служи като сборник на КМС за бъдещи изследователи.', 'da': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), et forskningsspor inden for conversational AI, forventer, at maskinen forstår en åbent domæne natursprogtekst og derefter deltager i en multi-turn samtale for at besvare spørgsmål relateret til teksten. Mens det meste af forskningen i Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) drejer sig om single-turn spørgsmål besvarelse (QA), har multi-turn CMC for nylig fået fremtrædende plads takket være fremskridtene inden for forståelse af natursprog via neurale sprogmodeller som BERT og introduktionen af storstilede konversationsdatasæt såsom CoQA og QuAC. Den stigende interesse har imidlertid ført til en strøm af samtidige publikationer, der hver især har en anderledes, men strukturelt lignende modelleringsmetode og et inkonsekvent syn på den omgivende litteratur. Med mængden af modelindsendelser til samtaledatasæt stigende hvert år, er der behov for at konsolidere den spredte viden på dette område for at strømline fremtidig forskning. Denne litteraturgennemgang forsøger at give et holistisk overblik over CMC med vægt på de fælles tendenser på tværs af nyligt offentliggjorte modeller, især i deres tilgang til at tackle samtalshistorie. Gennemgangen sammenfatter en generisk ramme for CMC modeller samtidig med at den fremhæver forskellene i de seneste tilgange og har til hensigt at tjene som et kompendium af CMC for fremtidige forskere.', 'nl': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), een onderzoekstraject in conversational AI, verwacht dat de machine een open-domein natuurlijke taaltekst begrijpt en vervolgens een multi-turn gesprek aangaat om vragen te beantwoorden die verband houden met de tekst. Terwijl het grootste deel van het onderzoek in Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) draait om single-turn question responsing (QA), is multiturn CMC recentelijk prominent geworden, dankzij de vooruitgang in het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal via neurale taalmodellen zoals BERT en de introductie van grootschalige conversationele datasets zoals CoQA en QuAC. De toename van de belangstelling heeft echter geleid tot een fluctuur van gelijktijdige publicaties, elk met een andere maar structureel vergelijkbare modelleringsaanpak en een inconsistente kijk op de omliggende literatuur. Met het toenemende aantal inzendingen van modellen aan conversationele datasets per jaar, is er een behoefte om de verspreide kennis op dit gebied te consolideren om toekomstig onderzoek te stroomlijnen. Deze literatuurreview probeert een holistisch overzicht te geven van CMC met de nadruk op de gemeenschappelijke trends in recent gepubliceerde modellen, met name in hun aanpak van conversational history. De review synthetiseert een generiek raamwerk voor CMC modellen terwijl de verschillen in recente benaderingen worden benadrukt en is van plan te dienen als een compendium van CMC voor toekomstige onderzoekers.', 'hr': 'Razgovorna komprehenzija strojeva (CMC), istraživačka traga u razgovoru AI očekuje da stroj razumije tekst prirodnog jezika otvorenog domena i nakon toga uključi se u razgovor o višeokretanju kako bi odgovorili na pitanja povezane s tekstom. Iako većina istraživanja u komprenciji za čitanje strojeva (MRC) se okreće oko odgovora na jednookret pitanja (QA), više okretanja CMC nedavno je dobila veliku velikost zahvaljujući napredu razumijevanja prirodnog jezika kroz modele neuroloških jezika kao što su BERT i uvođenju velikih konverzacionih seta podataka poput CoQA i QuAC. Međutim, povećanje interesa dovelo je do svjetlosti istovremenih publikacija, svaka s drugačijim, ali strukturno sličnim pristupom modelizacije i neskladnom pogledom okružene literature. S obzirom na objem podataka model a na razgovorne podatake svake godine povećavaju, postoji potreba za konsolidiranjem raspadanih znanja u ovom domenu kako bi streamlinirali buduće istraživanje. Ovaj pregled književnosti pokušava pružiti holistički pregled CMC-a s naglaskom na zajedničke trende u nedavno objavljenim modelima, posebno u njihovom pristupu rješavanju razgovorne povijesti. Pregled sintezira generički okvir CMC modela dok naglašava razlike u nedavnim pristupima i namjerava služiti kao kompenzijum CMC za buduće istraživače.', 'de': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), ein Forschungspfad in der konversativen KI, erwartet, dass die Maschine einen offenen, natürlichen Sprachtext versteht und anschließend in ein Mehrfachgespräch eintritt, um Fragen im Zusammenhang mit dem Text zu beantworten. Während sich der Großteil der Forschung im Bereich Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) um Single-Turn Question Responsibitor (QA) dreht, hat Multi-Turn CMC in jüngster Zeit an Bedeutung gewonnen, dank der Weiterentwicklung des Verständnisses natürlicher Sprache über neuronale Sprachmodelle wie BERT und die Einführung großformatiger Konversationsdatensätze wie CoQA und QuAC. Das steigende Interesse hat jedoch zu einer Flut gleichzeitiger Publikationen geführt, die jeweils einen anderen, aber strukturell ähnlichen Modellierungsansatz und eine inkonsistente Sicht auf die umliegende Literatur aufweisen. Da das Volumen der Modelleinreichungen an Konversationsdatensätze jedes Jahr zunimmt, besteht die Notwendigkeit, das verstreute Wissen in diesem Bereich zu konsolidieren, um zukünftige Forschung zu rationalisieren. Diese Literaturrecherche versucht, einen ganzheitlichen Überblick über CMC zu geben, wobei der Schwerpunkt auf den gemeinsamen Trends in jüngst veröffentlichten Modellen liegt, insbesondere in ihrem Ansatz, Konversationsgeschichte anzugehen. Der Review synthetisiert ein generisches Framework für CMC-Modelle, wobei die Unterschiede in den jüngsten Ansätzen hervorgehoben werden und beabsichtigt, als Kompendium von CMC für zukünftige Forscher zu dienen.', 'sw': 'Mchoro wa Mashine ya mazungumzo (CMC), utafiti katika AI ya mazungumzo, anatarajia mashine ya kuelewa maandishi ya lugha ya asili ya ndani na kisha kujihusisha mazungumzo mengi ili kujibu maswali yanayohusiana na maandishi. Wakati tafiti nyingi katika Mashine ya Kusoma Uchambuzi (MRC) zinazunguka majibu ya maswali ya moja kwa moja (QA), CMC ya hivi karibuni imepata umaarufu, shukrani kwa maendeleo ya lugha asili kupitia mifano ya lugha ya asili kama vile BERT na kutengeneza seti za data za mazungumzo makubwa kama vile CoQA na QuAC. Kuongezeka kwa maslahi, hata hivyo, umesababisha mafuriko ya kuchapishwa kwa wakati mmoja, kila mmoja akiwa na mbinu tofauti tofauti na mifano inayofanana na mtazamo usio na ukweli wa fasihi inayozunguka. With the volume of model submissions to conversational datasets increasing every year, there exists a need to consolidate the scattered knowledge in this domain to streamline future research.  Tafiti hili la fasihi linajaribu kutoa mtazamo mzuri wa CMC kwa lengo la msisitizo wa mitindo ya kawaida katika mifano ya hivi karibuni iliyochapishwa, hususani katika njia yao ya kukabiliana na historia ya mazungumzo. Tafiti hilo linaunganisha mfumo wa msingi wa mifumo ya CMC wakati unaonyesha tofauti katika mbinu za hivi karibuni na lengo la kutumika kama kompyuta ya CMC kwa watafiti wa baadaye.', 'id': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), a research track in conversational AI, expects the machine to understand an open-domain natural language text and thereafter engage in a multi-turn conversation to answer questions related to the text.  Sementara kebanyakan penelitian dalam Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin (MRC) berbalik sekitar jawaban pertanyaan satu-putaran (QA), CMC berbaris-putaran baru-baru ini mendapat prominensi, berkat kemajuan dalam pemahaman bahasa alam melalui model bahasa saraf seperti BERT dan penemuan set data konversasi skala besar seperti CoQA dan QuAC. Pertumbuhan kepentingan, bagaimanapun, telah menyebabkan banyak publikasi yang bersamaan, masing-masing dengan pendekatan model yang berbeda namun strukturalnya sama dan pandangan yang tidak konsisten dari literatur sekitar. Dengan volum pengiriman model ke set data konversasi meningkat setiap tahun, ada kebutuhan untuk konsolidasi pengetahuan tersebar di domain ini untuk menyesuaikan penelitian masa depan. Revisi literatur ini mencoba untuk menyediakan pandangan global CMC dengan fokus pada trends umum di model yang baru-baru ini diterbitkan, secara khusus dalam pendekatan mereka untuk mengatasi sejarah konversasi. The review synthesizes a generic framework for CMC models while highlighting the differences in recent approaches and intends to serve as a compendium of CMC for future researchers.', 'ko': '회화기계이해(CMC)는 회화 인공지능의 연구 방향으로 기계가 개방된 영역의 자연 언어 텍스트를 이해한 후에 여러 차례의 대화를 통해 텍스트와 관련된 문제를 대답하기를 기대한다.기계독해(MRC)의 대부분 연구는 단륜문답(QA)을 중심으로 전개됐지만 BERT와 같은 신경언어모델을 통해 자연언어 이해에 진전을 거두었고 코QA와Quac 같은 대규모 대화 데이터 집합의 도입으로 다륜CMC가 최근 두드러졌다.그러나 흥미의 증가로 인해 일련의 동시 출판물이 출판되었고 매 권마다 다르지만 구조가 비슷한 모델링 방법이 있고 주변 문헌에 대한 견해도 일치하지 않는다.모델이 대화 데이터 집합에 제출되는 수가 해마다 늘어나면서 이 분야의 분산된 지식을 통합시켜 미래 연구를 간소화할 필요가 있다.이 문헌은 CMC의 전체적인 개술을 제공하고자 하는데, 중심은 최근에 발표된 모델의 공통된 추세, 특히 대화의 역사를 처리하는 방법에 있다.이 요약서는 CMC 모델의 범용 프레임워크를 종합하면서 최근 방법의 차이를 강조하고, 향후 연구자들에게 CMC 개요를 제공할 계획이다.', 'fa': 'مکالمات ماشین مکالمات (CMC) یک ردیابی تحقیقات در AI مکالمات انتظار دارد که ماشین یک متن زبان طبیعی باز دامنه را درک کند و بعد از آن در یک مکالمه متفاوتی برای پاسخ از سوالات رابطه به متن درگیرد. در حالی که اکثر تحقیقات در تأکید خواندن ماشین (MRC) در اطراف پاسخ سوال\u200cهای یک برگشت (QA) بازگشت می\u200cکند، CMC چندین برگشت اخیراً بزرگی به دست آورده است، به سزای پیشرفت در درک زبان طبیعی با مدل\u200cهای زبان عصبی مانند BERT و introduction of large-scale conversational datasets such as CoQA and QuAC. با این حال، رشد علاقه\u200cای از منتشر کردن منتشر شده است، هر یک با طریق مدل\u200cسازی متفاوتی و دید ناپایدار از ادبیات محیط است. با توجه از تحویل مدل به مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مکالمانی هر سال افزایش می\u200cدهد، نیازی وجود دارد که علم پراکنده\u200cای در این دامنه را تفسیر کند تا تحقیقات آینده را روشن کند. این تحقیقات ادبیات سعی می\u200cکند که یک نظر کامل از CMC را با تسبیح بر ترند مشترک در مدل\u200cهای اخیر منتشر شده، به طور مخصوصا در طریق آنها برای حل تاریخ مکالمه تحقیق کنند. بازرسی یک چهارچوب ژنرالی برای مدل CMC را ترکیب می\u200cکند در حالی که تفاوت\u200cهای نزدیک اخیر را تشکیل می\u200cدهد و قصد می\u200cدهد به عنوان کمپیوند CMC برای محققان آینده خدمت کند.', 'tr': "Qonuşma Makine Çykyşyk (CMC), sözleşişi AI'de bir araştyrma traci, maşynyň a ç-domani tebigy dil metini düşünmesine garaşýar we soňra metin bilen ilgili soraglary jogap etmek üçin bir näçe çenli söhbetden çykyp barýar. Maşynyň Okamak Derjesindeki barlag (MRC) ýekeje gezek jogap berilýän soragynyň köpüsi (QA) töwereginde üýtgeýär, ýöne köp gezek CMC üýtgeýän boldy, tebigat dilleriniň düşünüşinde näus dil modelleri ýaly BERT we CoQA we QuAC ýaly uly düýtgeýän terjime düzümleriniň daşyrylygyna şükürlendirmesi Yöne gyzyklanýan ýokary wagty ýygnaklyk publikalaryň çykyşyny getirdi. Her biri dürli we dürli bir nusga meňzeşli bir nusga we daşyrak edebiýatyň görnüşi bolup durdy. Çaltylyk dataýatlaryna görkezilmek üçin her ýyl kän bir nusga gönderilmesi bilen gelejek araştyrmalaryny düzeltmek üçin bu sahyda döwletleri köçürmek gerek bolar. Bu edebiýat çykyşynyň CMC barada örän juňky çapda nusgalaryň üstünde täsirli bir üns bermekde synanyşýar. Şu ýagdaýda olaryň taryhdan çykmak üçin gurnalary bar. Çaprylyk soňky ýagdaýlaryň tapawutlaryny ýagtylamakda CMC modelleriniň jeneral framlaryny syntezartýar we gelejek çözümleri üçin CMC'iň döwüregi hökmünde hökman etjek bolýar.", 'af': "Gespraakte Masjien Komprimensie (CMC), â\x80\x99n ondersoek snit in konvertasionale AI, verwag die masjien om 'n oop-domein natuurlike taal teks te verstaan en daarna in 'n multi-draai gesprek te staan om vrae te antwoord met die teks. Alhoewel die meeste van die ondersoek in Masjien Lees Komprênsie (MRC) rondom enkel- draai vraag antwoord (QA), het veelvuldige draai CMC onlangs prominens ontvang, dankie van die avansiering in natuurlike taal verstanding deur neurale taal modele soos BERT en die inligting van groot- skaal omskakelingsdatastelle soos CoQA en QuAC. Die opstanding in belang het tog na 'n flurry van samekomstige publikasies gelei, elkeen met 'n ander nog struktuurlik vergelykende modellende toegang en 'n ongelukkige aansig van die omgewing literaat. Met die volume van model onderskrywings na konversasionale datastelle wat elke jaar vergroei word, bestaan daar 'n benodig om die verstrooide kennis in hierdie domein te konsoliseer om toekomstige onderskrywings te streamliseer. Hierdie literasie oorskou probeer om 'n holistiese oorskou van CMC te verskaf met 'n belangrikheid op die gemeenskaplike trende oor onlangs gepubliseerde modele, spesifieke in hulle toegang om konversasionale geskiedenis te probeer. Die hersiening sintetiseer 'n generieke raamwerk vir CMC-modele terwyl die verskille in onlangse toegang verlig en bepaal om as 'n kompensuum van CMC te dien vir toekomstige ondersoekers.", 'sq': "Komprehimi i Makinës Konversionale (CMC), një gjurmë kërkimi në AI konversational, pret që makina të kuptojë një tekst të gjuhës natyrore në domeni të hapur dhe pastaj të angazhohet në një bisedë shumë-kthese për t'u përgjigjur pyetjeve lidhur me tekstin. Ndërsa shumica e kërkimeve në Komprehimin e Leximit të Makinës (MRC) rrotullohet rreth përgjigjes së pyetjeve me një kthesë të vetme (QA), CMC me shumë kthesa kohët e fundit ka fituar rëndësi, falë përparimit në kuptimin natyror të gjuhës nëpërmjet modeleve të gjuhës nervore të tilla si BERT dhe futjes së grupeve të dhënash në shkallë të madhe bisedimesh të tilla si CoQA dhe QuAC. Rritja e interesit, megjithatë, ka çuar në një rrjedhje publikimesh të përkohshme, secila me një metodë modelimi të ndryshme por strukturisht të ngjashme dhe një pamje të pakonsistentë të letërsisë rrethuese. Me volumin e paraqitjeve të modeleve në grupet e të dhënave të bisedimeve që rriten çdo vit, ekziston një nevojë për konsolidimin e njohurive të shpërndara në këtë fushë për të racionalizuar kërkimet e ardhshme. Ky shqyrtim i letërsisë përpiqet të ofrojë një përmbledhje holistike të CMC me një theks në prirjet e përbashkëta nëpërmjet modeleve të botuara kohët e fundit, veçan ërisht në qasjen e tyre për trajtimin e historisë bisedimore. Revizioni sintetizon një kuadër gjeneral për modelet CMC ndërsa thekson dallimet në qasjet e fundit dhe synon të shërbejë si një kompendium i CMC për kërkuesit e ardhshëm.", 'hy': 'Խոսախոսական մեքենայի ընկալումը (ՄԿԿ), խոսախոսական ԱԲ-ի ուսումնասիրության հետազոտություն, ակնկալում է, որ մեքենան հասկանա բաց բնական լեզվի տեքստը և հետո մասնակցում է բազմահատուկ խոսակցության, որպեսզի պատասխանի տեքստի հետ կապված հար Մինչդեռ մեքենաների ընթերցման ընկալումների (ՄՌԿ) հետազոտությունների մեծամասնությունը պտտվում է հարցերի մեկ անգամ պատասխանելու (QA) շուրջ, բազմաանգամ գտնվող ՄՌԿ-ը վերջերս գերազանցություն է ստացել, շնորհիվ բնական լեզվի հասկացության առաջընթացը նյարդային լեզվի մոդելների, ինչպիսիք են BER- The rise in interest has, however, led to a flurry of concurrent publications, each with a different yet structurally similar modeling approach and an inconsistent view of the surrounding literature.  Ամեն տարի աճելով մոդելների ներկայացումների ծավալը հաղորդակցման տվյալների համակարգերին, կարիք կա հաստատել այս ոլորտում տարածված գիտելիքները ապագայի հետազոտությունների պարզաբանելու համար: Այս գրականության վերլուծությունը փորձում է հաստատել ԿՄԿ-ի ամբողջական ընդհանուր պատկերացումը, կենտրոնացնելով վերջերս հրատարակված մոդելների ընդհանուր միտումների վրա, հատկապես խոսակցության պատմության լուծման նրանց մոտեցումների Հետազոտությունը սինթեզիցնում է ընդհանուր շրջանակը ԿՄԿ մոդելների համար, միաժամանակ նշելով վերջին մոտեցումների տարբերությունները և մտածում է օգտագործել ԿՄԿ-ի կոմպենդիումը ապագա հետազոտողների համար:', 'am': 'የአካባቢው መኪን ድምፅ (CMC)፣ በተማካሪዎቹ AI የተጠቃሚ ምርመራ መድረክ፣ ማሻሻሪያው የተከፈተ የድምፅ ቋንቋ ጽሑፍ እንዲያስተውል ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡ በመኪን ውስጥ በብዙ ምርመራዎች ብዙዎቹ አንዲት መለያየት ጥያቄን በመቀበል (QA) ያስመለሳሉ፣ በቅርብ ጊዜ ብዙዎች የCMC ውጤት አግኝቷል፣ እንደBERT እና እንደቆዩ የሕትመት ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም እና ቁካሲ በሚመስል ትልቅ የሚናገር ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም አመሰግናለሁ፡፡ ነገር ግን የሚወስድ አካባቢ በአካባቢው የጽሕፈት አካባቢ፣ እያንዳንዳቸውም በተለየ መልዕክት እና በዙሪያው የጽሕፈት ውይይት የሚቆጠር መልዕክት ነው፡፡ በየዓመቱ የሚጨምረው የዳታ ማህበረሰቦችን የሚጨምሩ የሞዴል አዋጅ ድምፅ፣ በዚህ ዶሜን የተበተነ እውቀትን ለማድረግ ግድ አለበት፡፡ This literature review attempts at providing a holistic overview of CMC with an emphasis on the common trends across recently published models, specifically in their approach to tackling conversational history.  የውይይት ግንኙነትን በአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ላይ በተለየ ጊዜ የCMC ዓይነቶች የgeneric ፍሬማርን ያስተካክላል እና ለፊት ለተምር ተማሪዎችን የCMC ኮምፒዩተር ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'az': "Qonuşma Makinelərin Kompleksiyonu (CMC), söhbətli AI'nin araştırma izləri, maşının a çıq-domani təbiətli dil metini anlamasını gözləyir və sonra metinlə bağlı suallara cavab vermək üçün çoxlu dönüş söhbətə girər. Maşın oxuyan müxtəlif (MRC) araştırmalarının əksəriyyəti tək dönüş sual cavabı (QA) ətrafında dönüşən halda, çox dönüş CMC yenidən çox yüksək dəyişdi, BERT kimi nöral dil modellərindən və CoQA və QuAC kimi böyük dəyişiklik məlumatların istifadəsinə görə təbiətli dillərin anlaşılması üçün təbiətli dəyişikliklərin dəyişikliklərinə Ancaq maraqlıq yüksəlişi müxtəlif yayınlamalarla birlikdə bir fərqli olaraq, hər biri müxtəlif, amma strukturlu kimi modellərin yaxınlığını və ətrafındakı səhifələrin inconsistenci görünüşü idi. Hər il müzakirə verilən məlumat qurularına modellərin səviyyəsi ilə, gələcək araştırmaların çoxluğuna gəlməsi üçün bu domandakı yayılmış bilgiləri birləşdirmək ehtiyacı var. Bu ədəbiyyat sınaması CMC ilə müəyyən edilmiş modellərin ortaq trendlərini təsirləndirmək üçün çalışır, müəyyən edilmiş keçmişə çəkilmək üçün onların tərzini təsirləndirir. Qeyd etmək CMC modellərinin generiki framework ünü sintezləşdirir, son yaxınlıqlarında fərqliyi işıqlandırmaq və gələcək araştırmacılar üçün CMC'nin kompenziyası olaraq işıqlandırmaq istəyir.", 'bs': 'Konverzaciona komprehenzija mašine (CMC), istraživačka traga u konverzacijskom AI-u očekuje da mašin a razume tekst prirodnog jezika otvorenog domena i nakon toga uključi se u multiokrenutom razgovoru kako bi odgovorili na pitanja vezane za tekst. Iako većina istraživanja u komprenciji za čitanje mašina (MRC) se okreće oko odgovora na jednookret pitanja (QA), više okretanja CMC nedavno je dobila veliku prednost zahvaljujući napredu prirodnog razumijevanja jezika kroz neuralne jezičke modele poput BERT i uvođenju velikih konverzacionih seta podataka poput CoQA i QuAC. Međutim, povećanje interesa je dovelo do svjetlosti istovremenih publikacija, svaka sa drugačijim, a strukturno sličnim pristupom modelima i neskladnom pogledom okružene literature. S obzirom na volum podataka model a na razgovorne podatake koji se svake godine povećavaju, postoji potreba za konsolidiranjem raspršenih znanja u ovoj oblasti kako bi streamlinirali buduće istraživanje. Ovaj pregled književnosti pokušava pružiti holistički pregled CMC-a s naglaskom na zajedničke trende u nedavno objavljenim modelima, posebno u njihovom pristupu rješavanju razgovorne povijesti. Pregled sintezira generični okvir CMC modela dok se naglašava razlike u nedavnim pristupima i namjerava služiti kao kompenzijum CMC za buduće istraživače.', 'et': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), vestlusliku tehisintellekti uurimisrada, eeldab, et masin mõistab avatud domeeni looduskeelset teksti ja seejärel osaleb mitmekäigulises vestluses, et vastata tekstiga seotud küsimustele. Kuigi enamik masinlugemise mõistmise uuringutest (MRC) keskendub ühekordsele küsimusele vastamisele (QA), on mitme pöörde CMC hiljuti saanud silmapaistva tähtsuse tänu looduskeele mõistmise arengule neurokeele mudelite, nagu BERT, kaudu ning suuremahuliste vestlusandmekogumite, nagu CoQA ja QuAC kasutuselevõtule. Huvi suurenemine on siiski põhjustanud samaaegsete publikatsioonide hulga, millest igaühel on erinev, kuid struktuuriliselt sarnane modelleerimise lähenemisviis ja vastuoluline vaade ümbritsevast kirjandusest. Kuna vestlusandmekogumitesse esitatavate mudelite hulk suureneb iga aasta, on vaja koondada hajutatud teadmised selles valdkonnas tulevaste teadusuuringute ühtlustamiseks. Kirjanduse ülevaates püütakse anda terviklik ülevaade CMC-st, rõhutades hiljuti avaldatud mudelite ühiseid suundumusi, eriti nende lähenemist vestlusajaloo käsitlemisele. Ülevaates sünteesitakse CMC mudelite üldine raamistik, rõhutades samas hiljutiste lähenemisviiside erinevusi ja kavatsetakse kasutada CMC kokkuvõttena tulevastele teadlastele.', 'bn': 'আলোচনার এক গবেষণা ট্র্যাক (সিএমসি), যা আলোচনায় একটি গবেষণা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার লেখা বুঝতে পারে এবং তারপর টেক্সটের সাথে সম্পর্কিত প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়ার জন্যে বহুর যদিও মেশিনের বেশীরভাগ গবেষণা একক প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রকাশ করে (এমআরসি) প্রশ্নের প্রতিক্রিয়ায় বিস্ফোরণ করেছে, সাম্প্রতিক মাল্টিফাইন সিএমসি সম্প্রতি বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় অর্জন করেছে, যেমন নিউরেল ভাষার মডেলের মাধ তবে আগ্রহের বৃদ্ধির ফলে সাথে সাথে প্রকাশিত প্রকাশনার একটি ফ্লুরি তৈরি হয়েছে, প্রত্যেককে কাঠামোভাবে একই ধরনের মডেলিং পদ্ধতি এবং চারপাশে প্রতি বছর আলোচনার ডাটাসেট বৃদ্ধি প্রদানের মডেলের সামনে মডেলের জমা প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণার জন্য এই ডোমেইনে বিভিন্ন জ্ঞ সম্প্রতি প্রকাশিত মোডেলের উপর সাধারণ ধারাবাহিক পর্যবেক্ষণের প্রচেষ্টা দিয়ে সিএমসির একটি বিশেষ পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রদান করার চেষ্টা করেছে, বিশেষ করে তাদের সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে পার্থক্য উল্লেখ করে এবং ভবিষ্যত গবেষকদের জন্য সিএমসির একটি কম্পিডেন্ডাম হিসেবে সার্ভিউরি করার চেষ্টা করছে।', 'cs': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), výzkumná stopa konverzační umělé inteligence, očekává, že stroj porozumí otevřenému textu přirozeného jazyka a poté se zapojí do víceotáčkové konverzace, aby odpověděl na otázky související s textem. Zatímco většina výzkumu v oblasti rozumění strojového čtení (MRC) se točí kolem odpovědi na otázky s jedním otočením (QA), multi-turn CMC v poslední době získala význam díky pokroku v porozumění přirozenému jazyce prostřednictvím neuronových jazykových modelů, jako je BERT a zavedení rozsáhlých konverzačních datových sad, jako jsou CoQA a QuAC. Nárůst zájmu však vedl k řadě souběžných publikací, každá s jiným, ale strukturálně podobným modelovacím přístupem a nekonzistentním pohledem na okolní literaturu. Vzhledem k tomu, že objem modelů do konverzačních datových souborů roste každým rokem, existuje potřeba konsolidovat rozptýlené znalosti v této oblasti, aby bylo možné zefektivnit budoucí výzkum. Tento přehled literatury se snaží poskytnout ucelený přehled o CMC s důrazem na běžné trendy napříč nedávno publikovanými modely, konkrétně v jejich přístupu k řešení konverzační historie. Přehled syntetizuje obecný rámec pro CMC modely a zároveň zdůrazňuje rozdíly v nedávných přístupech a má v úmyslu sloužit jako kompendium CMC pro budoucí výzkumné pracovníky.', 'ca': "Comprensió de la màquina conversacional (CMC), una pista de recerca en AI conversacional, espera que la màquina entengui un text de llenguatge natural de domini obert i després s'involucri en una conversa a múltiples voltants per respondre preguntes relacionades amb el text. Mentre que la majoria de la investigació en Comprehension de Llegida Màquina (MRC) gira al voltant de la resposta a preguntes d'un cop a l'altre (QA), el CMC de molts cop a l'altre ha guanyat prominencia fa poc, gràcies a l'avançament en l'enteniment natural del llenguatge mitjançant models de llenguatge neural com BERT i la introducció de conjunts de dades conversacionals a gran escala com CoQA i QuAC. El creixement de l'interès, no obstant això, ha portat a una fluctuació de publicacions concurrents, cadascuna amb un enfocament de modelació diferent però estructuralment similar i una visió inconsistent de la literatura al voltant. Amb el volum de presentacions de models a conjunts de dades conversacionals creixent cada any, hi ha la necessitat de consolidar el coneixement dispersat en aquest domini per racionalitzar la recerca futura. Aquesta revisió de la literatura intenta proporcionar una visió global de la CMC amb un enfocament en les tendències comunes en els models publicats recentment, específicament en el seu enfocament a abordar la història conversacional. La revisió sintetitza un marc genèric per als models de CMC alhora que destaca les diferències en els enfocaments recents i té l'intenció de servir com a compendium de CMC per a futurs investigadors.", 'fi': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), keskustelutekoälyn tutkimusrata, odottaa koneen ymmärtävän avoimen verkkotunnuksen luonnollisen kielen tekstiä ja osallistuvan sen jälkeen monimutkaiseen keskusteluun vastatakseen tekstiin liittyviin kysymyksiin. Vaikka suurin osa koneenlukun ymmärtämisen tutkimuksesta keskittyy yhden käännöksen kysymysvastaukseen (QA), monikierroksen CMC on viime aikoina noussut esiin luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisen edistyksen ansiosta neurokielimallien, kuten BERT:n, avulla ja laajojen keskusteluaineistojen, kuten CoQA:n ja QuAC:n, käyttöönoton ansiosta. Kiinnostuksen lisääntyminen on kuitenkin johtanut samanaikaisiin julkaisuihin, joista jokaisella on erilainen mutta rakenteellisesti samankaltainen mallinnuslähestymistapa ja epäjohdonmukainen näkemys ympäröivästä kirjallisuudesta. Keskustelutietoaineistoihin lähetettyjen mallien määrä kasvaa joka vuosi, joten alan hajanaista tietoa on tarpeen vahvistaa tulevan tutkimuksen virtaviivaistamiseksi. Tässä kirjallisuuskatsauksessa pyritään tarjoamaan kokonaisvaltainen yleiskatsaus CMC:stä painottaen äskettäin julkaistujen mallien yhteisiä trendejä, erityisesti niiden lähestymistavassa keskusteluhistoriaan. Katsaus syntetisoi geneerisen viitekehyksen CMC malleille korostaen eroja viimeaikaisissa lähestymistavoissa ja aikoo toimia yhteenvetona CMC malleista tuleville tutkijoille.', 'jv': 'conversations Masine Compréncion (SMC), un track in conversations AI, supoyo sistem kanggo saben kelas teks open-domain normal language lan nganggo mulai conversations plural to responsa question Relative to text. Anyone Awak dhéwé, nglanggar nggalakno karo hal-hal, dadi piwong liyane kabèh sing mengko tarjamahan, sabên karo nganggo kuwi cah-cah nguasai sistem sing gawe nguasai tarjamahan lan ijol-ijol sing paling-ijol sing ngendalikno. Daerah sing dibutuhke Lisabasek punika dipunangé kuwi nggawe barang kelas bakal sing berarti bantuan CCK kuwi nguasar sing nguasar barang nggawe modèl sing luwih apik, ngomong njaluk kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan. Genjer-Genjer', 'sk': 'Raziskovalna pot v pogovorni umetni inteligenci pričakuje, da bo stroj razumel besedilo naravnega jezika v odprti domeni in se nato vključil v večobratni pogovor, da bo odgovoril na vprašanja, povezana z besedilom. Medtem ko se večina raziskav strojnega branja (MRC) vrti okoli odgovarjanja na vprašanja z enim obratom (QA), je več obratov CMC nedavno pridobila pomembnost, zahvaljujoč napredku razumevanja naravnega jezika prek modelov nevronskih jezikov, kot sta BERT, in uvedbi obsežnih pogovornih zbirk podatkov, kot sta CoQA in QuAC. Povečanje zanimanja pa je privedlo do vrtenja sočasnih publikacij, vsaka z drugačnim, a strukturno podobnim modeliranjem in neskladnim pogledom na okoliško literaturo. Ker količina predloženih modelov v pogovorne zbirke podatkov vsako leto narašča, obstaja potreba po konsolidaciji razpršenega znanja na tem področju, da bi racionalizirali prihodnje raziskave. Ta pregled literature poskuša zagotoviti celovit pregled CMC s poudarkom na skupnih trendih v nedavno objavljenih modelih, zlasti v njihovem pristopu k reševanju pogovorne zgodovine. Pregled sintetizira generični okvir za modele CMC, hkrati pa poudarja razlike v novejših pristopih in namerava služiti kot zbirek CMC za bodoče raziskovalce.', 'ha': "Comprehension na Makininki da ake yi wa shirin ayuka (CMC), wata hango na fitina cikin AI mai haɗuwa, yana fãtan an gane kwamfyutan ya fahimta wani littãfin da aka buɗe lugha na guda da kuma ya yi aiki a cikin mazaɓa-dabam-dabam zuwa masu karɓa wa tambayar masu husũma da matsayin. A lokacin da mafi yawancin tafarkin da ake karanta Comprehension (MRC) na tafi da wajen karɓar tambayar ta guda-ɗaya (QA), jama'a-biyu mai yawa CMC ya ci prominen, masu gõdiya ga koɗaitarwa cikin fahimtar harshen asili, kamar misãlai na BERT da kuma an introduce na danganta masu takarda da takwai mai girma kamar CoQA da Quac. Kiɗa ɗa riba, kuma amma, yã led to an sami marubuci da ake samu da shi, dukansu da wani matsayi mai kama da kwamfyutan misalin na rubutu da wani taƙaitacce na littãfin da ke kẽwayen. Fãce da saurin da ake saka da tsarin mutane da aka ƙãra, a kõwace shẽkara, aka buƙata, don ka sami wani ilmi wanda aka wãtsa a cikin wannan Domen dõmin ya ƙara research masu ƙarai. Wannan littafin na jarraba a bãyar da wata taskõki na CMC da ya yi emphasi a kan hanyõyi masu haɗi a cikin misãlai da aka sanar da shi a yanzu-yanzu, hususanci, a cikin hanyarsu zuwa ga tacilin historin mazaɓa. @ info: whatsthis", 'he': 'ההבנה של מכונת שיחה (CMC), מסלול מחקר באי.אי שיחה, מצפה שהמכונה תבין טקסט שפתוח בתחום טבעי ולאחר מכן תתערב בשיחה במספר הפנים כדי לענות על שאלות קשורות לטקסט. בעוד רוב המחקר בהבנה של קריאת מכונות (MRC) מסתובב סביב תשובת שאלות מסיבה אחת (QA), CMC מסיבה רבה קיבל בראש לאחרונה, הודות לקדמות בהבנה בשפה הטבעית באמצעות דוגמני שפת עצבית כמו BERT וההכניסה של קבוצות מידע שיחה ברמה גדולה כמו CoQA וקואק. עם זאת, הגידול באינטרסים הוביל לפרסומות מתאימות, כל אחד עם גישה דוגמנית שונה ובמבנה מבני דומה ומראה לא תואמת של הספרות הסביבה. עם כמות ההעברות של דוגמנים לקבוצות נתונים לשיחה גדולה בכל שנה, יש צורך לקבוע את הידע המפוזר בתחום הזה ביקורת הספרות הזו מנסה לספק תצוגה הוליסטית של CMC עם התקף על הטנדים המשותפים בין דוגמנים שנוצאים לאחרונה, במיוחד בגישה שלהם להתמודד עם ההיסטוריה השיחתית. הבדיקה מסינטזה מסגרת כללית לדוגמאות CMC בזמן שמדגישים את ההבדלים באמצעות הגישות האחרונות והתכוונת לשרת כקומפנדיום של CMC עבור חוקרים עתידים.', 'bo': 'Conversational Machine Comprehension (CMC), conversational AI ནང་ལ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གླེང་མོལ་ཞིག་ཡིག་ཆ་འདྲ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། རྗེས་སུ་མ་ལག་གི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་domain་རང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡིག་ Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC)ནང་གི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟ་ཀློག་པའི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་ཉིན་ཁ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དགའ་ཚོར་དགའ་འབྱུང་རྐྱེན་དེ་འདྲ་རྒྱའི་ཚོར་བསྡམས་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་མེད་སོ་སོང་། མི་འདྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་པའི་ With the volume of model submissions to conversational datasets increasing every year, there is a need to consolidate the scattered knowledge in this domain to streamline future research. ཞིབ་དཔྱད་འདིས་CMC ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་དག་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་མཐུན་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་མིག་ཆས་མཐོང་ནུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་ཁོང The review synthesizes a generic framework for CMC models while highlighting the differences in recent approaches and intends to serve as a CMC for future researchers.'}
{'en': 'Reinforced Multi-task Approach for Multi-hop Question Generation', 'ar': 'نهج متعدد المهام معزز لإنشاء أسئلة متعددة القفزات', 'pt': 'Abordagem multitarefa reforçada para geração de perguntas de vários saltos', 'es': 'Enfoque multitarea reforzado para la generación de preguntas multisalto', 'fr': 'Approche multitâche renforcée pour la génération de questions multi-hop', 'ja': 'マルチホップクエスチョン生成のための強化されたマルチタスクアプローチ', 'zh': '所以多跳生强化多任务法也', 'hi': 'मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न पीढ़ी के लिए प्रबलित बहु-कार्य दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Усиленный многозадачный подход для генерации многозадачных вопросов', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Ilthasc Treisithe maidir le Giniúint Ceisteanna Ilhop', 'el': 'Ενισχυμένη προσέγγιση πολλαπλών εργασιών για τη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων πολλαπλών χορού', 'hu': 'Megerősített többfeladatos megközelítés a multi-hop kérdések generálásához', 'ka': 'Multi-hop კითხვების განვითარებისთვის მრავალ დავალების მიღება', 'kk': 'Көп- хоп сұрақтарды жасау үшін көп- тапсырмаларды қайталау', 'it': 'Approccio multi-task rinforzato per la generazione di domande multi-hop', 'mk': 'Посилен пристап со повеќе задачи за генерација на повеќе прашања', 'ms': 'Pendekatan berbilang-tugas dikuasai untuk Jenerasi soalan berbilang-lompat', 'ml': 'Multi- hop ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അധിക ജോലിയുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് വീണ്ടും വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിച്ച', 'mt': 'Approċċ imsaħħaħ b’ħafna kompiti għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet b’Ħadd Multi', 'pl': 'Wzmocnione podejście wielozadaniowe dla generowania pytań wielozadaniowych', 'mn': 'Олон-холбоотой асуулт бий болгох олон ажлын ойлголт', 'no': 'Støtta tilgang til fleire oppgåver for generering av fleirhopp spørsmål', 'ro': 'Abordare multiplă consolidată pentru generarea de întrebări multi-hop', 'si': 'Multi-Hop ප්\u200dරශ්න සිද්ධානය සඳහා ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි අවස්ථාව', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaq badan oo shaqo badan loo soo celiyey', 'ta': 'Multi- hop கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்திற்கான பல- பணி அணுகு', 'sr': 'Pojačan pristup mnogim zadacima za generaciju multihopa pitanja', 'lt': 'sustiprintas daugiafunkcinis daugiafunkcinio klausimų generavimo metodas', 'sv': 'Förstärkt flerfunktionsmetod för generering av frågor i flera hop', 'ur': 'Multi-hop سوال پیدائش کے لئے بہت سی دنیا کی تقرب', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiếp cận đa nhiệm vụ gia tăng cho Thế Hệ câu hỏi đa hop', 'bg': 'Усилена многозадача подход за генериране на въпроси с няколко скока', 'hr': 'Pojačan pristup višestrukog zadatka za generaciju multihopskih pitanja', 'nl': 'Versterkte Multi-Task aanpak voor het genereren van Multi-Hop vragen', 'da': 'Forstærket multi-task tilgang til multi-hop spørgsmål generering', 'id': 'Pendekatan Multi-Tugas Dikuatkan untuk Generasi Pertanyaan Multi-Hop', 'fa': 'نزدیک چندین کار برای نسل سوال چندین هوپ', 'ko': '다중 점프 문제 생성에 사용되는 다중 퀘스트 강화 방법', 'de': 'Verstärkter Multi-Task Ansatz für die Generierung von Multi-Hop-Fragen', 'sw': 'Tayarishwa kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Maswali mengi', 'tr': 'Çoklu-Hop Soragy Jeşirmek üçin Köp-Taýgyzyň Ýarlanjak', 'sq': 'Përqasje e forcuar me shumë detyra për gjenerimin e pyetjeve me shumë hapa', 'af': 'Versterkte Multi-task Approach vir Multi-Hop Fraag Generasie', 'am': 'Multi-hop Question Generation', 'hy': 'Բազմահական հարցերի ստեղծման համար ուժեղացված բազմահական մոտեցումը', 'az': 'Çoxlu-Hop sual Generasyonu üçün çoxlu-iş Yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'Reinforced Multi-task Approach for Multi-hop Question Generation', 'ca': 'Un enfocament multitascat reforçat per a la generació de preguntes multihops', 'cs': 'Posílený multi-úlohový přístup pro generování více-hop otázek', 'bs': 'Pojačan pristup multi-task za generaciju multi-hop pitanja', 'et': 'Tugevdatud mitme ülesandega lähenemine mitme hüppega küsimuste loomiseks', 'fi': 'Vahvistettu monitehtävä lähestymistapa monihyppelykysymysten muodostamiseen', 'jv': 'Reject', 'he': 'הגישה מרובה-משימות מאוחצת ליצירת שאלות מרובות-תקופות', 'sk': 'Okrepljen pristop za večopravila za oblikovanje vprašanj z več preskoki', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་མི་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་བསླབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Question generation (QG) attempts to solve the inverse of question answering (QA) problem by generating a natural language question given a document and an answer. While sequence to sequence neural models surpass rule-based systems for QG, they are limited in their capacity to focus on more than one supporting fact. For QG, we often require multiple supporting facts to generate high-quality questions. Inspired by recent works on multi-hop reasoning in QA, we take up Multi-hop question generation, which aims at generating relevant questions based on supporting facts in the context. We employ multitask learning with the auxiliary task of answer-aware supporting fact prediction to guide the question generator. In addition, we also proposed a question-aware reward function in a Reinforcement Learning (RL) framework to maximize the utilization of the supporting facts. We demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach through experiments on the multi-hop question answering dataset, HotPotQA. Empirical evaluation shows our model to outperform the single-hop neural question generation models on both automatic evaluation metrics such as BLEU, METEOR, and ROUGE and human evaluation metrics for quality and coverage of the generated questions.', 'ar': 'يحاول إنشاء الأسئلة (QG) حل معكوس مشكلة الإجابة على السؤال (QA) من خلال إنشاء سؤال لغة طبيعية عند تقديم مستند وإجابة. بينما يتجاوز التسلسل لتسلسل النماذج العصبية الأنظمة المستندة إلى القواعد لـ QG ، إلا أنها محدودة في قدرتها على التركيز على أكثر من حقيقة داعمة واحدة. بالنسبة إلى QG ، غالبًا ما نطلب حقائق داعمة متعددة لتوليد أسئلة عالية الجودة. مستوحى من الأعمال الحديثة حول التفكير متعدد القفزات في ضمان الجودة ، نتناول إنشاء أسئلة متعددة القفزات ، والتي تهدف إلى إنشاء أسئلة ذات صلة بناءً على الحقائق الداعمة في السياق. نحن نستخدم التعلم متعدد المهام مع المهمة الإضافية المتمثلة في التنبؤ بالحقائق الداعمة المدرك للإجابة لتوجيه منشئ الأسئلة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، اقترحنا أيضًا وظيفة مكافأة مدركة للأسئلة في إطار عمل التعلم المعزز (RL) لتعظيم الاستفادة من الحقائق الداعمة. نوضح فعالية نهجنا من خلال التجارب على مجموعة البيانات التي تجيب على السؤال متعدد القفزات ، HotPotQA. يُظهر التقييم التجريبي نموذجنا للتغلب على نماذج إنشاء الأسئلة العصبية ذات القفزة المفردة على كل من مقاييس التقييم التلقائي مثل BLEU و METEOR و ROUGE ومقاييس التقييم البشري للجودة وتغطية الأسئلة التي تم إنشاؤها.', 'fr': "La génération de questions (QG) tente de résoudre le problème inverse de la réponse à une question (QA) en générant une question en langage naturel avec un document et une réponse. Bien que les modèles neuronaux séquencés surpassent les systèmes basés sur des règles pour le QG, leur capacité à se concentrer sur plus d'un fait à l'appui est limitée. Pour QG, nous avons souvent besoin de plusieurs éléments justificatifs pour générer des questions de haute qualité. Inspirés par des travaux récents sur le raisonnement multi-hop dans le domaine de l'assurance qualité, nous adoptons la génération de questions multi-hop, qui vise à générer des questions pertinentes basées sur des faits justificatifs dans le contexte. Nous utilisons l'apprentissage multitâche avec la tâche auxiliaire de prédiction des faits à l'appui tenant compte des réponses pour guider le générateur de questions. De plus, nous avons également proposé une fonction de récompense tenant compte des questions dans un cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement (RL) afin de maximiser l'utilisation des éléments justificatifs. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de notre approche par des expériences sur le jeu de données de réponse aux questions à sauts multiples, HotPotQA. L'évaluation empirique montre que notre modèle surpasse les modèles de génération de questions neuronales à saut unique sur les mesures d'évaluation automatiques telles que BLEU, METEOR et ROUGE et les mesures d'évaluation humaine pour la qualité et la couverture des questions générées.", 'es': 'La generación de preguntas (QG) intenta resolver la inversa del problema de respuesta a preguntas (QA) mediante la generación de una pregunta en lenguaje natural dado un documento y una respuesta. Si bien los modelos neuronales de secuencia a secuencia superan a los sistemas basados en reglas para QG, tienen una capacidad limitada para centrarse en más de un hecho de apoyo. Para QG, a menudo necesitamos varios datos de apoyo para generar preguntas de alta calidad. Inspirados en trabajos recientes sobre el razonamiento de múltiples saltos en el control de calidad, nos ocupamos de la generación de preguntas de múltiples saltos, que tiene como objetivo generar preguntas relevantes basadas en hechos de apoyo en el contexto. Empleamos el aprendizaje multitarea con la tarea auxiliar de predicción de hechos de apoyo a las respuestas para guiar al generador de preguntas. Además, también propusimos una función de recompensa con preguntas en un marco de aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL) para maximizar la utilización de los datos de apoyo. Demostramos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque a través de experimentos en el conjunto de datos de respuestas a preguntas de múltiples saltos, HotpotQA. La evaluación empírica muestra que nuestro modelo supera a los modelos de generación de preguntas neuronales de salto único tanto en métricas de evaluación automática como BLEU, METEOR y ROUGE como en métricas de evaluación humana para la calidad y la cobertura de las preguntas generadas.', 'pt': 'A geração de perguntas (QG) tenta resolver o inverso do problema de resposta a perguntas (QA) gerando uma pergunta em linguagem natural dado um documento e uma resposta. Embora os modelos neurais sequenciais superem os sistemas baseados em regras para QG, eles são limitados em sua capacidade de se concentrar em mais de um fato de apoio. Para a QG, muitas vezes exigimos vários fatos de apoio para gerar perguntas de alta qualidade. Inspirados em trabalhos recentes sobre raciocínio multi-hop em QA, abordamos a geração de perguntas Multi-hop, que visa gerar perguntas relevantes com base em fatos de suporte no contexto. Empregamos o aprendizado multitarefa com a tarefa auxiliar de previsão de fatos de suporte com reconhecimento de resposta para orientar o gerador de perguntas. Além disso, também propusemos uma função de recompensa com reconhecimento de perguntas em uma estrutura de Aprendizado por Reforço (RL) para maximizar a utilização dos fatos de apoio. Demonstramos a eficácia de nossa abordagem por meio de experimentos no conjunto de dados de resposta a perguntas de vários saltos, HotPotQA. A avaliação empírica mostra que nosso modelo supera os modelos de geração de perguntas neurais de salto único em métricas de avaliação automática, como BLEU, METEOR e ROUGE, e métricas de avaliação humana para qualidade e cobertura das perguntas geradas.', 'ru': 'Генерация вопросов (QG) пытается решить обратную задачу ответа на вопросы (QA), создавая вопрос на естественном языке, заданный документом и ответом. Хотя последовательность для последовательности нейронных моделей превосходит основанные на правилах системы для QG, они ограничены в своей способности фокусироваться на более чем одном подтверждающем факте. Для QG мы часто требуем множества подтверждающих фактов, чтобы генерировать высококачественные вопросы. Вдохновленные недавними работами по мультихоп рассуждениям в QA, мы рассматриваем генерацию мультихоп вопросов, которая направлена на генерацию соответствующих вопросов на основе подтверждающих фактов в контексте. Мы используем многозадачное обучение со вспомогательной задачей, заключающейся в поддержке прогнозирования фактов с учетом ответов, чтобы направлять генератор вопросов. Кроме того, мы также предложили функцию вознаграждения с учетом вопросов в рамках обучения подкреплению (RL), чтобы максимально использовать подтверждающие факты. Эффективность нашего подхода мы демонстрируем с помощью экспериментов над набором данных для ответа на многохоповые вопросы HotPotQA. Эмпирическая оценка показывает, что наша модель превосходит модели генерации однохоповых нейронных вопросов по обеим метрикам автоматической оценки, таким как BLEU, METEOR и ROUGE, и метрикам человеческой оценки для качества и охвата сгенерированных вопросов.', 'ja': '質問生成（ QG ）は、文書と回答が与えられた自然言語の質問を生成することによって、質問回答（ QA ）の逆問題を解決しようとする。 配列ニューラルモデルへの配列は、QGのルールベースのシステムを上回るが、それらは、複数の裏付けとなる事実に焦点を当てる能力が制限されている。 QGでは、質の高い質問を生成するために、複数の裏付けとなる事実を必要とすることがよくあります。 QAにおけるマルチホップ推論の最近の研究に触発されて、文脈における裏付けとなる事実に基づいて関連する質問を生成することを目的としたマルチホップクエスチョン生成を取り上げます。 私たちは、答えを意識して事実予測をサポートする補助的なタスクでマルチタスク学習を採用して、質問生成器を導いています。 さらに、補強学習（ RL ）フレームワークでは、裏付けとなる事実を最大限に活用するための質問認識報酬機能も提案した。 私たちは、マルチホップの質問に答えるデータセットHotPotQAの実験を通じて、アプローチの有効性を示します。 実証的評価は、BLEU、流星、ルージュなどの自動評価指標と、生成された質問の質とカバレッジに関する人間の評価指標の両方で、シングルホップのニューラル・クエスチョン生成モデルを上回ることを示す。', 'zh': '问生 (QG) 试生给定文档与自然语言对以问 (QA) 。 虽序于序列神经模形越QG之统,而专注于数事之力有限。 其于QG,常须数事以成高质量。 近者 QA 中多跳理之发,吾用多跳生,以上下文事相关也。 吾以多任务学对感知佐命之任以指导生成器。 又于强化学(RL)框架中发一事感知奖函数,以极支持。 问答数集HotPotQA实验以验其有效性。 实论之,我自料指标(如BLEU,METEORROUGE)及生成之质与覆盖范围之人指标皆优于单跳神经。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न जनरेशन (QG) एक दस्तावेज़ और एक उत्तर दिए गए एक प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रश्न उत्पन्न करके प्रश्न उत्तर (QA) समस्या के व्युत्क्रम को हल करने का प्रयास करता है। जबकि अनुक्रम तंत्रिका मॉडल क्यूजी के लिए नियम-आधारित प्रणालियों को पार करने के लिए अनुक्रम, वे एक से अधिक सहायक तथ्यों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने की अपनी क्षमता में सीमित हैं। क्यूजी के लिए, हमें अक्सर उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रश्नों को उत्पन्न करने के लिए कई सहायक तथ्यों की आवश्यकता होती है। क्यूए में मल्टी-हॉप तर्क पर हाल के कार्यों से प्रेरित होकर, हम मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न पीढ़ी लेते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य संदर्भ में सहायक तथ्यों के आधार पर प्रासंगिक प्रश्न उत्पन्न करना है। हम प्रश्न जनरेटर का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए उत्तर-जागरूक सहायक तथ्य भविष्यवाणी के सहायक कार्य के साथ मल्टीटास्क सीखने को नियोजित करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमने सहायक तथ्यों के उपयोग को अधिकतम करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण लर्निंग (आरएल) ढांचे में एक प्रश्न-जागरूक इनाम समारोह का भी प्रस्ताव दिया। हम डेटासेट, HotPotQA का जवाब देने वाले मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न पर प्रयोगों के माध्यम से हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। अनुभवजन्य मूल्यांकन हमारे मॉडल को एकल-हॉप तंत्रिका प्रश्न पीढ़ी के मॉडल को दोनों स्वचालित मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक जैसे BLEU, METEOR, और ROUGE और उत्पन्न प्रश्नों की गुणवत्ता और कवरेज के लिए मानव मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन करने के लिए दिखाता है।', 'ga': 'Déanann giniúint ceisteanna (QG) iarracht an fhadhb contrártha do fhreagra ceisteanna (QA) a réiteach trí cheist teanga nádúrtha a ghiniúint nuair a thugtar doiciméad agus freagra. Cé go sáraíonn seicheamh samhlacha néaracha córais bunaithe ar rialacha do QG, tá siad teoranta ina gcumas díriú ar níos mó ná fíric tacaíochta amháin. Maidir le QG, is minic a theastaíonn fíricí tacaíochta iolracha uainn chun ceisteanna ardchaighdeáin a ghiniúint. Spreagtha ag saothair le déanaí ar réasúnaíocht il-hop i QA, glacaimid le giniúint ceisteanna Il-hop, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige ceisteanna ábhartha a ghiniúint bunaithe ar fhíricí tacaíochta sa chomhthéacs. Bainimid úsáid as foghlaim ilthasc agus an tasc cúnta de thuar fíricí a thacaíonn le freagraí atá feasach ar fhreagra chun gineadóir na gceisteanna a threorú. Ina theannta sin, mholamar freisin feidhm luach saothair a bheadh feasach ar cheisteanna i gcreat Foghlama Atreisithe (FF) chun an úsáid is fearr a bhaint as na fíricí tacaíochta. Léirímid éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige trí thurgnaimh ar an tacar sonraí freagartha ceisteanna il-hop, HotPotQA. Léiríonn meastóireacht eimpíreach ár múnla chun sárobair a dhéanamh ar na samhlacha giniúna ceiste néaracha aon-hop ar mhéadracht mheastóireachta uathoibríocha amhail BLEU, METEOR, agus ROUGE agus méadracht mheastóireachta daonna maidir le cáilíocht agus clúdach na gceisteanna ginte.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία ερωτήσεων (QG) επιχειρεί να λύσει το αντίστροφο πρόβλημα της απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA) δημιουργώντας μια ερώτηση φυσικής γλώσσας που δίνεται σε ένα έγγραφο και μια απάντηση. Ενώ τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχίας ξεπερνούν τα συστήματα βασισμένα σε κανόνες για την QG, είναι περιορισμένα στην ικανότητά τους να επικεντρωθούν σε περισσότερα από ένα υποστηρικτικά γεγονότα. Για την ΚΓ, συχνά απαιτούμε πολλαπλά υποστηρικτικά γεγονότα για να παραγάγουμε ερωτήσεις υψηλής ποιότητας. Εμπνευσμένοι από πρόσφατες εργασίες σχετικά με τη συλλογιστική πολλών χορού στην QA, αναλαμβάνουμε τη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων πολλαπλών χορού, η οποία στοχεύει στη δημιουργία σχετικών ερωτήσεων βασισμένων σε υποστηρικτικά γεγονότα στο πλαίσιο. Χρησιμοποιούμε την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών με την βοηθητική εργασία της πρόβλεψης υποστηρικτικών γεγονότων για να καθοδηγήσουμε τη γεννήτρια ερωτήσεων. Επιπλέον, προτείναμε επίσης μια λειτουργία ανταμοιβής με επίγνωση των ερωτήσεων σε ένα πλαίσιο Ενίσχυσης Μάθησης (για τη μεγιστοποίηση της αξιοποίησης των υποστηρικτικών γεγονότων. Επιδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας μέσα από πειράματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων απαντήσεων πολλών ερωτήσεων, HotPotQA. Η εμπειρική αξιολόγηση δείχνει ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα μοντέλα δημιουργίας νευρωνικών ερωτήσεων ενός χορού τόσο σε αυτόματες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης όπως και σε μετρήσεις ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης για την ποιότητα και την κάλυψη των παραγόμενων ερωτήσεων.', 'hu': 'A kérdések generálása (QG) megpróbálja megoldani a kérdésválasz fordított problémáját úgy, hogy egy természetes nyelvű kérdést generál egy dokumentum és egy válasz. Míg a szekvencia-szekvencia neurális modellek felülmúlják a QG szabályalapú rendszereit, korlátozott kapacitásuk van arra, hogy egynél több alátámasztó tényre összpontosítsanak. A QG esetében gyakran több támogató tényre van szükségünk ahhoz, hogy kiváló minőségű kérdéseket generáljunk. A minőségbiztosítás multi-hop érveléséről szóló közelmúltbeli munkák inspirálták a Multi-hop kérdések generálását, amelynek célja, hogy releváns kérdéseket generáljon a kontextusban támasztott tények alapján. A kérdésgenerátor irányításához többfeladatú tanulást alkalmazunk a válasz-tudatos tényfelőrejelzés kiegészítő feladatával. Ezenkívül javasoltunk egy kérdés-tudatos jutalmazási funkciót a Reinforcement Learning (RL) keretrendszerben, hogy maximalizáljuk az alátámasztó tények hasznosítását. Megközelítésünk hatékonyságát a multi-hop kérdésre válaszoló adatkészleten, a HotPotQA-n végzett kísérletekkel mutatjuk be. Az empirikus értékelések azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja az egyugrás neurális kérdések generálásának modelljeit mind az automatikus értékelési mutatók, mint például a BLEU, METEOR és ROUGE, mind pedig az emberi értékelési mutatók a generált kérdések minősége és lefedettsége érdekében.', 'ka': 'Name QG-ის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია, როგორც ნეიროლური მოდელების კონფიგურაცია QG-ის კონფიგურაცია, ისინი უფრო მეტი ფაქტის კონფიგურაციას დავუ QG-სთვის, ჩვენ ზოგიერთად უნდა მრავალ დახმარებელი ფაქტები გავიქცევთ მაღალური კითხვები. QA-ში მრავალ-ჰოპური პარამენტის შესახებ, ჩვენ მრავალ-ჰოპური კითხვების შესახებ დავწყებთ, რომელიც უნდა შექმნა შესახებ კითხვების შესახებ, რომელიც კონტექსტში ფა ჩვენ მრავალ დავასწავლობთ მრავალ დავასწავლობის შესაძლებლობელი დავასწავლობთ პასუხის დამხმარებელი ფაქტის წარმოდგენება, რომელიც კითხვის генერато დამატებით, ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ კითხვის შეცდომა ფუნქცია სწავლების (RL) ფუნქციაში, რომელიც მაქსიმიკეთებული ფაქტის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობას ექსპერიმენტებით მრავალ-ჰოპური კითხვაზე, რომელიც დაახსენებს მონაცემების კითხვაზე HotPotQA. იმპერიკალური განსაზღვრება ჩვენი მოდელის გავაკეთება ერთ-ჰოპის ნეიროლური კითხვის მოდელის გავაკეთება ორივე ავტომატური განსაზღვრება მეტრიკაში, როგორც BLEU, METEOR, და ROUGE და ადამიანის განსაზღვრება მეტრი', 'it': "La generazione di domande (QG) tenta di risolvere il problema inverso della risposta alle domande (QA) generando una domanda di linguaggio naturale data un documento e una risposta. Mentre i modelli neurali sequenza-sequenza superano i sistemi basati su regole per il QG, sono limitati nella loro capacità di concentrarsi su più di un fatto di supporto. Per QG, spesso abbiamo bisogno di molteplici fatti di supporto per generare domande di alta qualità. Ispirati ai recenti lavori sul ragionamento multi-hop nel QA, prendiamo in considerazione la generazione di domande Multi-hop, che mira a generare domande rilevanti basate su fatti di supporto nel contesto. Impieghiamo l'apprendimento multitask con il compito ausiliario di predizione dei fatti di supporto alla risposta per guidare il generatore di domande. Inoltre, abbiamo anche proposto una funzione di ricompensa consapevole delle domande in un framework Reinforcement Learning (RL) per massimizzare l'utilizzo dei fatti di supporto. Dimostriamo l'efficacia del nostro approccio attraverso esperimenti sul set di dati multi-hop di risposta alle domande, HotPotQA. La valutazione empirica mostra che il nostro modello supera i modelli di generazione di domande neurali single-hop sia sulle metriche di valutazione automatica come BLEU, METEOR e ROUGE sia sulle metriche di valutazione umana per qualità e copertura delle domande generate.", 'lt': 'Klausimų generacija (QG) bando išspręsti atvirkščiai atsakymo į klausimus (QA) problem ą sukuriant natūralų kalbų klausimą, pateiktą dokumentu ir atsakymu. Nors sekos nervinių modelių sekos viršija taisyklių pagrindu grindžiamas QG sistemas, jos ribotos savo gebėjimu sutelkti dėmesį į daugiau kaip vieną patvirtinamąjį faktą. Kad kiltų aukštos kokybės klausimų, dažnai reikalaujame kelių patvirtinamųjų faktų. Įkvėpta neseniai atliktais darbais, susijusiais su daugiapynių motyvavimu QA, mes pradedame daugiapynių klausimų generaciją, kuria siekiama iškelti svarbius klausimus, pagrįstus faktais šioje srityje. We employ multitask learning with the auxiliary task of answer-aware supporting fact prediction to guide the question generator.  Be to, pasiūlėme klausimų suprantamos atlyginimo funkciją pagal Mokymosi sustiprinimu sistemą, kad būtų kuo labiau panaudoti patvirtinantys faktai. Mūsų požiūrio veiksmingumas parodomas eksperimentais, susijusiais su daugiapakopiais atsakymais į klausimų rinkinį HotPotQA. Empirinis vertinimas rodo mūsų model į, pagal kurį vieno apynio neuralinių klausimų generavimo modeliai būtų didesni už automatinius vertinimo rodiklius, pavyzdžiui, BLEU, METEOR, ROUGE ir žmogaus vertinimo rodiklius, kad būtų galima nustatyti sukeltų klausimų kokybę ir aprėptį.', 'mk': 'Генерацијата на прашања (QG) се обидува да го реши обратниот проблем со одговорот на прашањата (QA) со генерирање на природно прашање на јазикот со документ и одговор. While sequence to sequence neural models surpass rule-based systems for QG, they are limited in their capacity to focus on more than one supporting fact.  За QG, често бараме повеќе поддржувачки факти за да генерираме висококвалитетни прашања. Инспирирани од неодамнешните дела на мултихоп размислување во КА, ние ја започнуваме генерацијата на мултихоп прашања, која има за цел генерација релевантни прашања базирани на поддршка на фактите во контекст. Работиме на мултизадачно учење со помошната задача на поддршка на предвидувањето на фактите за да го водиме генераторот на прашања. Покрај тоа, ние, исто така, предложивме функција на награда свесна за прашања во рамката за зајакнување на учењето (РЛ) за максимализација на искористувањето на поддржувачките факти. Демонстрираме ефикасност на нашиот пристап преку експерименти на мнозинското прашање одговарање на податоците, HotPotQA. Империската евалуација покажува дека нашиот модел е да ги надминеме моделите за генерација на нервни прашања од еден хоп на автоматска метрика на евалуација како БЛЕУ, МЕТЕОР и РУГЕ и човечка метрика за евалуација за квалитетот и покривањето на генерираните праша', 'ms': 'Generasi soalan (QG) cuba untuk menyelesaikan sebaliknya masalah jawapan soalan (QA) dengan menghasilkan soalan bahasa biasa yang diberikan dokumen dan jawapan. Sementara jujukan untuk jujukan model saraf melebihi sistem berdasarkan peraturan untuk QG, mereka terhad dalam kapasitas mereka untuk fokus pada lebih dari satu fakta sokongan. For QG, we often require multiple supporting facts to generate high-quality questions.  Diterinspirasi oleh kerja-kerja baru-baru ini mengenai alasan multi-hop dalam QA, kami mengambil generasi soalan Multi-hop, yang bertujuan untuk menghasilkan soalan yang berkaitan berdasarkan sokongan fakta dalam konteks. Kami menggunakan pembelajaran tugas berbilang dengan tugas bantuan untuk mendukung ramalan fakta yang menyadari jawapan untuk memimpin generator soalan. Selain itu, kami juga mengusulkan fungsi hadiah yang sedar soalan dalam kerangka Pelajaran Penyukuran (RL) untuk maksimumkan penggunaan fakta sokongan. Kami menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan kami melalui eksperimen pada soalan multi-hop menjawab set data, HotPotQA. Empirical evaluation shows our model to outperform the single-hop neural question generation models on both automatic evaluation metrics such as BLEU, METEOR, and ROUGE and human evaluation metrics for quality and coverage of the generated questions.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യ തലമുറയുടെ (ക്യൂഎ) പ്രശ്നം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ (ക്യൂഎ) പ്രശ്നം പരിഹാരിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു  കിജിയിലേക്കുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമുകളിലേക്കുള്ള തുടര്\u200dച്ചയ്ക്കുള്ള സം ക്യൂജിയുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d, നമുക്ക് പലപ്പോഴും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന സത്യങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, അതിന്റെ ഉയര്\u200dത്ത ക്യൂഎയിലെ പല-ഹോപ്പിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പല-ഹോപ്പ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d തലമുറയിലേക്ക് എടുക്കുന്നു.  ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ജനററെറ്ററിനെ വഴികാട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഉത്തരമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല കൂടാതെ, പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന സത്യത്തിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം ഏറ്റവും വലുതാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രതിഫല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സ്ഥിതിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പല-ഹോപ്പ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം  സാമ്പത്തികമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയം വിലാസപ്രകാരം മെട്രിക്കുകളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മ', 'no': 'Name Mens sekvensen for å sekvensera neuralmodeller over regelsbaserte systemar for QG, er dei begrenset i kapasiteten til å fokusera på fleire enn ein støttande faktor. For QG krev vi ofte fleire støttande faktar for å laga høg kvalitet spørsmål. Inspirert av nyleg arbeid om fleirhopp-rasjon i QA, tar vi opp fleirhopp-spørsmål, som mål å laga relevant spørsmål basert på støtte faktar i konteksten. Vi brukar fleire oppgåver med hjelpeoppgåva for å støtta faktisk forhåndsvising for å håndtere spørjingsgeneren. I tillegg foreslåde vi også eit spørsmål-oppmerkingsfunksjon i eit reinforcement Learning (RL) rammeverk for å maksimere bruk av støttande faktane. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt gjennom eksperimenter på fleirhopp spørsmålet som svarar på datasettet HotPotQA. Empirical evaluation shows our model to perform the single-hop neural question generation models on both automatic evaluation metrics such as BLEU, METEOR, and ROUGE and human evaluation metrics for quality and coverage of the generated questions.', 'pl': 'Generowanie pytań (QG) próbuje rozwiązać problem odwrotny odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) poprzez generowanie pytania językowego naturalnego podanego dokumentowi i odpowiedzi. Podczas gdy modele neuronowe sekwencji do sekwencji przewyższają systemy oparte na regułach dla QG, są one ograniczone w swojej zdolności do skupienia się na więcej niż jednym faktie. Dla QG często potrzebujemy wielu faktów, aby generować wysokiej jakości pytania. Zainspirowani ostatnimi pracami nad rozumowaniem multi-hop w QA, podejmujemy generowanie pytań multi-hop, którego celem jest generowanie istotnych pytań w oparciu o fakty wspierające w kontekście. Wykorzystujemy wielozadaniowe uczenie się z pomocniczym zadaniem świadomej odpowiedzi wspierającej przewidywanie faktów, aby kierować generatorem pytań. Ponadto zaproponowaliśmy również funkcję nagrody świadomej pytania w ramach Reinforcement Learning (RL), aby maksymalizować wykorzystanie faktów uzupełniających. Skuteczność naszego podejścia demonstrujemy poprzez eksperymenty na zbiorze danych dotyczących odpowiedzi na pytania multi-hop, HotPotQA. Ocena empiryczna pokazuje, że nasz model przewyższa modele generowania pytań neuronowych jednoosobowych zarówno w zakresie automatycznych wskaźników oceny, takich jak BLEU, METEOR i ROUGE, jak i wskaźników oceny ludzkiej dla jakości i pokrycia generowanych pytań.', 'mt': "Il-ġenerazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet (QG) tipprova ssolvi l-problem a inversa tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) billi tiġġenera mistoqsija lingwistika naturali mogħtija dokument u tweġiba. While sequence to sequence neural models surpass rule-based systems for QG, they are limited in their capacity to focus on more than one supporting fact.  Għall-QG, ħafna drabi jeħtieġu diversi fatti ta’ appoġġ biex jiġġeneraw mistoqsijiet ta’ kwalità għolja. Inspirati minn xogħlijiet reċenti dwar ir-raġunament multi-hop fil-QA, aħna nieħdu bidu għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet multi-hop, li għandhom l-għan li jiġġeneraw mistoqsijiet rilevanti bbażati fuq l-appoġġ tal-fatti fil-kuntest. Aħna nużaw tagħlim multikompiti bil-kompitu awżiljarju ta’ tbassir tal-fatti li jappoġġja b’mod konxju mit-tweġibiet biex jiggwida l-ġeneratur tal-mistoqsijiet. Barra minn hekk, ipproponejna wkoll funzjoni ta' premju konxja mill-mistoqsijiet f'qafas ta' Tagħlim ta' Rinfurzar (RL) biex timmassimizza l-użu tal-fatti ta' appoġġ. Aħna nippruvaw l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna permezz ta’ esperimenti dwar is-sett ta’ dejta li jwieġeb għall-mistoqsijiet multi-hop, HotPotQA. L-evalwazzjoni empirika turi l-mudell tagħna biex inqabżu l-mudelli ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet newrali b’hop wieħed kemm fuq il-metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni awtomatiċi bħall-BLEU, METEOR, u ROUGE u l-metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni umana għall-kwalità u l-kopertura tal-mistoqsijiet iġġenerati.", 'mn': 'Суулт төрөлхтөн (QG) асуулт хариултын эсрэг асуудлыг (QA) шийдэхэд байгалийн хэл асуудлыг бий болгож, баримт болон хариулт өгсөн асуудлыг бий болгоход хичээдэг. QG-ийн мэдрэлийн загваруудын дарааллаар QG-ийн загварын үндсэн системийг дамжуулахын тулд тэд нэгээс илүү дэмжиж буй үнэндээ төвлөрөх чадвартай хязгаарлагддаг. QG-ийн хувьд бидэнд ихэвчлэн өндөр чанартай асуултууд бий болгох олон дэмжиж буй зүйлсийг шаарддаг. QA-д олон холбоотой ойлголтын тухай саяхан ажиллуудын тулд бид олон холбоотой асуулт үеэс авч ирсэн. Энэ нь үнэндээ дэмжих үнэндээ хамааралтай асуулт бий болгох зорилго юм. Бид олон ажлын сургалтыг хариулт ойлголтын тусламжтай ашиглаж, асуулт гаргагчдыг удирдах талаар дэмжиж буй тодорхойлолтыг ашигладаг. Үүнээс ч мөн бид асуулт ойлгомжтой шагналын функцийг дэмжиж буй үнэндээс ашиглах боломжтой болгон reinforcement Learning (RL) хэлбэрээр санал болгосон. Бид олон Hop асуултын хариултын өгөгдлийн санг HotPotQA-ын туршилтын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг. Эзэмшигийн оюутнууд нь бидний загварыг нэг холбоотой мэдрэлийн асуулт бүтээх загваруудыг автоматически оюутнуудын метриктик, BLEU, METEOR, ROUGE болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын хэмжээний сайн болон түвшингийн метриктик дээр илүү олох', 'ro': 'Generarea de întrebări (QG) încearcă să rezolve problema inversă a răspunsului la întrebări (QA) generând o întrebare de limbaj natural dată un document și un răspuns. În timp ce modelele neuronale secvențiale depășesc sistemele bazate pe reguli pentru QG, acestea sunt limitate în capacitatea lor de a se concentra pe mai multe fapte susținătoare. Pentru QG, avem adesea nevoie de mai multe fapte de susținere pentru a genera întrebări de înaltă calitate. Inspirați de lucrările recente privind raționamentul multi-hop în QA, preluăm generarea de întrebări Multi-hop, care vizează generarea de întrebări relevante bazate pe fapte susținute în context. Utilizăm învățarea multitask cu sarcina auxiliară de a susține predicția faptelor conștientă de răspunsuri pentru a ghida generatorul de întrebări. În plus, am propus, de asemenea, o funcție de recompensare conștientă de întrebări într-un cadru de învățare de armare (RL) pentru a maximiza utilizarea faptelor susținute. Demonstrăm eficacitatea abordării noastre prin experimente pe setul de date de răspuns la întrebări multi-hop, HotPotQA. Evaluarea empirică arată că modelul nostru depășește modelele de generare a întrebărilor neurale single-hop atât pe măsurătorile automate de evaluare, cum ar fi BLEU, METEOR și ROUGE, cât și pe măsurătorile de evaluare umană pentru calitatea și acoperirea întrebărilor generate.', 'sr': 'Generacija pitanja (QG) pokušava rešiti obrnuti problem odgovora na pitanje (QA) stvaranjem prirodnog jezika pitanja koji je dao dokument i odgovor. Iako je sekvencija za sekvenciju neuralnih modela preko pravila baziranih na QG-u, ograničena su u svojoj kapaciteti da se fokusiraju na više od jedne podrške činjenice. Za QG, često zahtevamo višestruke podrške činjenice da bi stvorili visoke kvalitetne pitanja. Inspirirani nedavnim radovima o multihopskom razumijevanju u QA-u, poduzimamo generaciju multihopskog pitanja, koja cilja na stvaranje relevantnih pitanja na temelju podrške činjenica u kontekstu. Mi zapošljavamo učenje multizadataka sa pomoænim zadatkom svesti odgovora koji podržava predviđanje činjenica da vodi generator pitanja. Osim toga, mi smo takođe predložili funkciju nagrade svjesne pitanja u okviru učenja pojačanja (RL) kako bi maksimalizirali korištenje podrške činjenica. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa kroz eksperimente na multihopskom pitanju odgovarajućem setu podataka, HotPotQA. Empirička procjena pokazuje naš model kako bi nadmašio modele generacije neuralnih pitanja jednohopa na obje automatske procjene metrike kao što su BLEU, METEOR i ROUGE i ljudske procjene metrike za kvalitet i pokrivanje proizvedenih pitanja.', 'kk': 'Name QG үшін невралдық моделдерді басқару үшін QG ережелердің негіздеген жүйелерін реттеу кезінде олар бірнеше қолдау үшін көмектесу мүмкіндігін шектеп тұрады. QG үшін көпшілікті сапатты сұрақтарды жасау үшін бірнеше қолдау факттарын талап етеді. QA дегенде көп-хоп тәртібінде жаңа жұмыс істеген, біз көп-хоп сұрақтарды құру үшін көп-хоп сұрақтарды жасап алдық. Бұл контексті факттарды қолдауға негізделген сұрақтарды құр Біз бірнеше тапсырма үйренуді сұрақ генераторын бағыттау үшін жауап беретін тапсырманың көмекшілік тапсырмасын қолданамыз. Қосымша, біз қолдаулы факттерді қолдау үшін қолдау үшін қолдау (RL) бағдарламасында сұрақтарды түсініктіру функциясын қолдандық. Біз көп-хоп сұрақтардың жауап беретін деректер жиынының, HotPotQA эксперименттерінің әсерілігін көрсетедік. Эмпирикалық оқу үлгісімізді бір-хоп невралдық сұрақ құрылғысының үлгісін бір-бірінші невралдық жасау үлгілерінен шығару үлгісін көрсетеді, мысалы BLEU, METEOR және ROUGE және адамдардың оқу метрикалы', 'sv': 'Frågagenerering (QG) försöker lösa det inversa frågesvaret (QA) problemet genom att generera en naturligt språkfråga med ett dokument och ett svar. Medan sekvens till sekvens neurala modeller överträffar regelbaserade system för QG, är de begränsade i sin förmåga att fokusera på mer än ett stödjande faktum. För QG behöver vi ofta flera stödfakta för att generera högkvalitativa frågor. Inspirerad av senaste arbeten om multi-hop resonemang inom QA tar vi upp Multi-hop frågegenerering, som syftar till att generera relevanta frågor baserade på stödjande fakta i sammanhanget. Vi använder multitasking learning med hjälpuppgiften att svara-medveten stödjande faktapreciering för att vägleda frågegeneratorn. Dessutom föreslog vi också en frågemedveten belöningsfunktion i ett RL-ramverk för att maximera utnyttjandet av stödfakta. Vi demonstrerar effektiviteten i vårt tillvägagångssätt genom experiment på datauppsättningen HotPotQA med flera hop-frågor. Empirisk utvärdering visar att vår modell överträffar modellerna för generering av neurala frågeställningar med enkel hop på både automatiska utvärderingsmetoder som BLEU, METEOR och ROUGE och mänskliga utvärderingsmetoder för kvalitet och täckning av de genererade frågorna.', 'si': 'Name QG වෙනුවෙන් න්\u200dයූරාල් මෝඩේල් පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය කරන්න, ඔවුන් ඔවුන් QG වෙනුවෙන්, අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා. QA වලින් ගොඩක් හොප් සලකුණු විදියට අලුත් වැඩවල් නිසා අපි ගොඩක් හොප් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගන්නවා, ඒකෙන් අදහස් කරනවා සම්බන් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න සිද්ධාකරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න සිද්ධාකරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න සිද්ධාකරණය සඳහා ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන ඒ වගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කළා ති අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, HotPotQA. ඉම්පිරිකාලික විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක-හොප් න්\u200dයූරල් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ව', 'so': "Isticmaalka su'aalaha (QG) wuxuu isku dayaa in uu ka xalliyo ka dib dhigista jawaabta su'aalaha (QA) dhibaatada ku saabsan sababinta su'aal afka dabiiciga ah oo la siiyo dukumenti iyo jawaab. Inta lagu dabarayo tusaalaha neurada ee QG waxay ku xadgudbaan nidaamka qaynuunnada, waxay awoodooda u xadan yihiin inay ku kalsoonaadaan in ka badan hal runta kaalmeeya. QG, sida badan waxaan u baahan nahay waxyaabo badan oo taageeraya si aan u soo saarno su'aalo takhasuska sare. Shaqooyinka ugu dambeeyay ee QA waxaa la soo dhiibay waxyaabo badan oo ku saabsan sababta QA, waxaynu qaadannaa qarniyada su'aalaha badan oo badan, taas oo ku talo gala in la soo saaro su'aalo saaxiib ah oo ku saabsan kaalmada runta ah. Waxaannu shaqaynaynaa waxbarasho badan oo ku saabsan shaqada habboon oo ku saabsan aqoonta kaalmada runta ah, si aan loo hago dhaqaalaha su'aalaha. In addition, we also proposed a question-aware reward function in a Reinforcement Learning (RL) framework to maximize the utilization of the supporting facts.  Waxaynu muujinnaa faa’iidada qaabilaadeenna ku saabsan su'aalaha badan ee u jawaabta danbiyada HotPotQA. Qiimeynta jimicsiga ah wuxuu tusiyaa modeleelka ku sameynta qaababka arimaha neurada ee hal-hop oo keliya ah oo ku qoran qaababka qiimeynta, tusaale ahaan BLEU, METEOR, iyo ROUGE iyo metrikada qiimeynta dadka ee qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta iyo daboolka su'aalaha la sameeyay.", 'ta': 'கேள்வி தலைமுறை (QA) கேள்வியின் தலைகீழியை தீர்க்க முயற்சிக்கிறது ஒரு ஆவணத்தை மற்றும் ஒரு விடை புதிய மாதிரிகளை கியுஜி க்கான விதிமுறைமைகளை மேற்கொள்வதற்கான தொடர்ச்சியில், அவை ஒரு ஆதரிக்கும் உண்மையை விட அதிகமாக கவனம் செலுத் QG க்கு, நாம் பெரும்பாலும் உயர்தரமான கேள்விகளை உருவாக்க பல ஆதரிக்கைகள் வேண்டும். QA யில் பல- hop காரணங்கள் மீது சமீபத்தில் வேலை செய்யப்பட்டது, நாம் பல- hop கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்தை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம், இது சூழலில் ஆதரிக்கும நாங்கள் பல கேள்வி உருவாக்குபவரை வழிகாட்டுவதற்கு பதில் தெரியும் ஆதரவு உண்மையை முன்னோட்டத்துடன் கற்றுக் கொள்ள பல்வேற மேலும், நாங்கள் ஒரு கேள்வி அறிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் செயல்பாட்டை ஆர்எல் சட்டத்தில் பெரிதாக்க உதவி உண்மைகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு. பல-hop கேள்விகளின் பதில் தரவு அமைப்பு, ஹாட்போட்கியூஏ என்ற சோதனைகள் மூலம் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது. தானாகவே மதிப்பிடும் மெட்ரிக் முறைமைகளிலும் தானியங்கி மதிப்பிடும் முறைமைகளிலும் தானாகவே மதிப்பிடும் முறைகளிலும் மற்றும் ரூஜ் மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பின் முறைகள', 'ur': 'Name حالانکہ QG کے لئے نئورل موڈل کی سفارش کے لئے قانون کی بنیادی سیستموں کی سفارش کرتی ہے، وہ ایک سے زیادہ مدد کرنے والے حقیقت پر محدود ہیں۔ QG کے لئے ہمیں بہت سی موقع کی مدد کرنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ بہت سی سؤال پیدا کریں۔ QA میں بہت سے ہپ رابطہ کے بارے میں اچھے کاموں کے ذریعہ مشورہ کیا گیا ہے، ہم Multi-hop سوال نسل کو اٹھا لیتے ہیں، جس کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ موجود حقیقتوں کی مدد پر موجود سوال پیدا کریں۔ ہم نے سوال جنراٹر کو راہ دکھانے کے لئے بہت سی تابع کی تعلیم کے ساتھ جواب دینے والی تابع کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے بھی ایک سوال جاننے والی پاداش فعالیت کی پیشنهاد کی کہ ایک Reinforcement Learning (RL) فرمود میں مدد کرنے والی حقیقت کے استعمال کو مزید مزید کریں۔ ہم نے اپنے طریقے کے مطابق مطابق دکھائے ہیں، ہٹ پوٹ کیا، multi-hop سوال کے مطابق آزمائش کے ذریعہ۔ امپراتیک ارزیابی ہماری مدل کو دکھاتا ہے کہ ایک-هوپ نئورل سوال کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک-هوپ نئورل سوال کے موڈل کو دوسرے سے زیادہ اضافہ کریں جیسے BLEU، METEOR، اور ROUGE اور انسان کی ارزیابی مٹریک کو پیدا کیا گیا سوال کی کیفیت اور پورش کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Name Koʻrib chiqish uchun neyural modellarni QG uchun qoidadagi tizimlarni boshqarish imkoniyatlariga qaramadi, ular bir qoʻllanmalarning birdan ortiq qoʻllanmalarni foydalanish imkoniyatini juda chegara. QG uchun, biz ko'p marta ko'p qoʻllanmalarni qo'llash kerak, juda katta darajada savollar yaratish uchun. Yaqinda QA'da bir necha-hop g'oyalari bilan ishga tushirilgan ishlar bilan biz ko'plab-hop savol yaratuvchimiz. Bu muammolarni qoʻllash uchun muhim savollarni yaratish mumkin. Biz savol generatorini ishga tushirish uchun ko'plab soʻzni o'rganamiz. Ko'pchilik soʻzni qo'llash haqiqida foydalanish uchun soʻrov muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli funksiyatini boshqaramiz. Biz bir necha-hop savollariga javob beruvchi maʼlumotlar sahifasini ko'rsatumiz. Empirik qiymatlari esa bir necha narsa savol yaratish modellarimizni avtomatik qiymatlash metriklariga ko'rsatish mumkin, balki BLEU, METEOR, va ROUGE va inson qiymatlari metriklarini taqlash va yaratilgan savolllarni qiymatga qarshi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Thế hệ câu hỏi (QG) cố giải quyết ngược lại vấn đề trả lời câu hỏi bằng cách tạo ra một câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên được đưa ra một tài liệu và một câu trả lời. Trong khi các mô hình thần kinh phân loại thành thứ tự vượt qua hệ thống quy định của QG, chúng có giới hạn trong khả năng tập trung vào hơn một thực tế hỗ trợ. Với QG, chúng tôi thường cần nhiều dữ liệu hỗ trợ để tạo ra câu hỏi chất lượng cao. Nguồn cảm hứng từ những tác phẩm gần đây về lập trình đa hop trong QA, chúng tôi tiếp tục sản xuất các câu hỏi đa hop, nhằm tạo ra câu hỏi liên quan dựa trên sự kiện hỗ trợ trong ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi sử dụng đa nhiệm vụ học tập với công việc phụ của dự đoán sự kiện phụ để hướng dẫn máy phát câu hỏi. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi cũng đề xuất một chức năng thưởng nhận biết hỏi trong một cơ sở phát triển học (RL) để có thể sử dụng tối đa các dữ kiện hỗ trợ. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của cách tiếp cận qua các thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu trả lời đa hop, HotPotQA. Các mô hình của chúng tôi được đánh giá kỹ để vượt qua các mô hình thần kinh đơn điệu của các câu hỏi, cả về các âm lượng đánh giá tự động như NICOU, METEOR, và RONE và con người đo lượng chất lượng và sự bao quát các câu hỏi đã tạo ra.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на въпроси се опитва да реши проблема с обратното отговаряне на въпроси чрез генериране на въпрос с естествен език, даден документ и отговор. Докато последователността към последователността невронните модели надминават базираните на правила системи за QG, те са ограничени в способността си да се фокусират върху повече от един подкрепящ факт. За КГ често изискваме множество подкрепящи факти, за да генерираме висококачествени въпроси. Вдъхновени от последните работи по мулти-хоп разсъждения в областта на качеството, ние поемаме мулти-хоп генериране на въпроси, които имат за цел да генерират подходящи въпроси въз основа на подкрепящи факти в контекста. Ние използваме многозадачно обучение с спомагателната задача за осъзнаване на отговорите подкрепящо предсказване на фактите, за да насочим генератора на въпроси. Освен това предложихме функция за възнаграждение, съобразена с въпросите, в рамка за подсилване на обучението (РС), за да се максимизира използването на подкрепящите факти. Ние демонстрираме ефективността на нашия подход чрез експерименти върху набор от данни за отговор на въпроси с мулти-хоп. Емпиричната оценка показва, че нашият модел превъзхожда моделите за генериране на невронни въпроси с един скок както при автоматични измервателни показатели като и при човешки измервателни показатели за качество и покритие на генерираните въпроси.', 'nl': 'Question generation (QG) probeert het omgekeerde probleem van het beantwoorden van vragen (QA) op te lossen door een natuurlijke taalvraag te genereren die een document en een antwoord krijgt. Hoewel sequence-to-sequence neurale modellen overtreffen op regelgebaseerde systemen voor QG, zijn ze beperkt in hun capaciteit om zich te concentreren op meer dan één ondersteunend feit. Voor QG hebben we vaak meerdere ondersteunende feiten nodig om kwalitatief hoogwaardige vragen te genereren. Geïnspireerd door recente werken over multi-hop redeneren in QA, nemen we Multi-hop vragengeneratie op, die gericht is op het genereren van relevante vragen op basis van ondersteunende feiten in de context. We gebruiken multitask learning met de hulptaak van antwoordbewuste ondersteunende feitenvoorspelling om de vragengenerator te begeleiden. Daarnaast hebben we ook een vragenbewuste beloningsfunctie voorgesteld in een Reinforcement Learning (RL) framework om het gebruik van de ondersteunende feiten te maximaliseren. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van onze aanpak aan de hand van experimenten met de multi-hop vragenantwoorddataset HotPotQA. Empirische evaluatie toont aan dat ons model de single-hop neurale vragengeneratiemodellen overtreft op zowel automatische evaluatiestatistieken zoals BLEU, METEOR en ROUGE als menselijke evaluatiestatistieken voor kwaliteit en dekking van de gegenereerde vragen.', 'da': 'Spørgsmålstegnelse (QG) forsøger at løse det omvendte spørgsmålstegn ved at generere et naturligt sprogspørgsmål givet et dokument og et svar. Mens sekvens til sekvens neurale modeller overgår regelbaserede systemer for QG, er de begrænset i deres evne til at fokusere på mere end én understøttende kendsgerning. For QG kræver vi ofte flere understøttende fakta for at generere spørgsmål af høj kvalitet. Inspireret af nylige værker om multi-hop ræsonnement i QA, tager vi Multi-hop spørgsmål generation, som sigter mod at generere relevante spørgsmål baseret på understøttende fakta i sammenhængen. Vi anvender multitask læring med hjælpeopgaven med svar-bevidst understøttende faktisk forudsigelse for at lede spørgsmålstegneren. Derudover foreslog vi også en spørgsmålsbevidst belønningsfunktion i en Reinforcement Learning (RL) ramme for at maksimere udnyttelsen af de understøttende fakta. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af vores tilgang gennem eksperimenter med multi-hop spørgsmål besvarelse datasæt, HotPotQA. Empirisk evaluering viser, at vores model overgår single-hop neurale spørgsmålstegnelsesmodeller på både automatiske evalueringsmetrics som BLEU, METEOR og ROUGE og menneskelige evalueringsmetrics for kvalitet og dækning af de genererede spørgsmål.', 'hr': 'Generacija pitanja (QG) pokušava riješiti obrnuti problem odgovora na pitanje (QA) stvaranjem prirodnog jezičkog pitanja koji je dao dokument i odgovor. Iako je sekvencija za sekvenciju neuralnih modela nadmažena na pravilima sustava za QG, ograničena su u svojoj kapaciteti da se fokusiraju na više od jedne podrške činjenice. Za QG često zahtijevamo višestruke podrške činjenice za stvaranje visokokvalitetnih pitanja. Uhvaćeni nedavnim radovima o razumijevanju multihopa u QA-u, poduzimamo generaciju multihopa pitanja, koja cilja na stvaranje relevantnih pitanja na temelju podrške činjenica u kontekstu. Mi zapošljavamo učenje multizadataka s pomoćnim zadatkom odgovornog svjesnog predviđanja činjenica kako bi vodili generator pitanja. Osim toga, mi smo također predložili funkciju nagrade svjesne pitanja u okviru učenja pojačanja (RL) kako bi se maksimalizirali korištenje podrške činjenica. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa kroz eksperimente na multihopskom pitanju odgovarajućem podacima, HotPotQA. Empirička procjena pokazuje naš model kako bi se nadmašio modeli generacije jednohopnih neuralnih pitanja na obje automatske procjene metrike poput BLEU, METEOR i ROUGE i ljudske procjene metrike za kvalitet i pokrivanje proizvedenih pitanja.', 'de': 'Question Generation (QG) versucht, das Inverse der Frage Beantwortung (QA) Problem zu lösen, indem eine natürliche Sprache Frage generiert wird, die einem Dokument und einer Antwort gegeben wird. Während Sequenz-zu-Sequenz neuronale Modelle regelbasierte Systeme für QG übertreffen, sind sie in ihrer Fähigkeit begrenzt, sich auf mehr als eine unterstützende Tatsache zu konzentrieren. Für QG benötigen wir oft mehrere unterstützende Fakten, um qualitativ hochwertige Fragen zu generieren. Inspiriert von aktuellen Arbeiten zum Multi-Hop-Denken in der Qualitätssicherung greifen wir Multi-Hop-Fragegeneration auf, die darauf abzielt, relevante Fragen basierend auf unterstützenden Fakten im Kontext zu generieren. Wir setzen Multitask Learning mit der Hilfsaufgabe der antwortbewussten unterstützenden Faktenvorhersage ein, um den Fragegenerator zu steuern. Darüber hinaus haben wir auch eine Frage-bewusste Belohnungsfunktion in einem Reinforcement Learning (RL) Framework vorgeschlagen, um die Nutzung der unterstützenden Fakten zu maximieren. Wir demonstrieren die Effektivität unseres Ansatzes durch Experimente am Multi-Hop Fragebeantworter Datensatz HotPotQA. Die empirische Auswertung zeigt, dass unser Modell die Single-Hop-Modelle zur Generierung neuronaler Fragen sowohl für automatische Auswertungsmetriken wie BLEU, METEOR und ROUGE als auch für menschliche Auswertungsmetriken für Qualität und Abdeckung der generierten Fragen übertrifft.', 'id': 'Generasi Pertanyaan (QG) mencoba untuk memecahkan kebalikan masalah jawaban pertanyaan (QA) dengan menghasilkan pertanyaan bahasa alami yang diberikan dokumen dan jawaban. Sementara urutan untuk urutan model saraf melewati sistem berdasarkan aturan untuk QG, mereka terbatas dalam kapasitas mereka untuk fokus pada lebih dari satu fakta mendukung. Untuk QG, kita sering membutuhkan banyak fakta mendukung untuk menghasilkan pertanyaan kualitas tinggi. Terinspirasi oleh pekerjaan baru-baru ini pada multi-hop reasoning di QA, kami mengambil generasi multi-hop pertanyaan, yang bertujuan untuk menghasilkan pertanyaan relevan berdasarkan mendukung fakta dalam konteks. Kami menggunakan pembelajaran multitask dengan tugas bantuan yang menyadari jawaban mendukung prediksi fakta untuk memimpin generator pertanyaan. In addition, we also proposed a question-aware reward function in a Reinforcement Learning (RL) framework to maximize the utilization of the supporting facts.  We demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach through experiments on the multi-hop question answering dataset, HotPotQA.  Evaluasi imperial menunjukkan model kita untuk melaksanakan model generasi pertanyaan saraf single-hop pada kedua metrik evaluasi otomatis seperti BLEU, METEOR, dan ROUGE dan metrik evaluasi manusia untuk kualitas dan penutupan pertanyaan yang dihasilkan.', 'ko': '문제생성(QG)은 문서와 답안을 정해주는 자연스러운 언어문제를 생성함으로써 퀴즈(QA) 문제의 역문제를 해결하려고 한다.서열에서 서열로 이어지는 신경모델은 QG에서 규칙 기반 시스템을 능가하지만 하나 이상의 사실 지원에 집중하는 능력에 한계가 있다.QG의 경우 일반적으로 여러 가지 지원 사실에 의해 고품질 문제가 발생합니다.QA에서 다중 점프 추리의 최신 연구 성과를 계발하여 우리는 다중 점프 문제 생성을 시작했는데 상하문에서 지지하는 사실에 따라 관련 문제를 생성하기 위한 것이다.우리는 다중 임무 학습과 사실 예측을 지원하는 답안 감지 보조 임무를 이용하여 문제 생성기를 지도한다.또한 지원되는 사실을 최대한 활용하기 위해 학습(RL) 프레임워크를 강화하는 문제감지 장려 함수도 제시했다.다중 퀴즈 데이터 세트 HotPotQA에서의 실험을 통해 우리는 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.실증 평가에 따르면 우리 모델은 BLEU, METEOR, ROUGE 등 자동 평가 지표와 문제 생성의 질과 범위에서 단일 점프 신경 문제 생성 모델보다 우수하다.', 'sw': 'Kizazi cha Swali (QG) jaribio la kutatua uwekezaji wa kujibu swali (QA) kwa kutengeneza swali la lugha asili lililopewa nyaraka na jibu. Wakati upatikanaji wa mifumo ya neurali hupitia mifumo yenye msingi wa utawala wa QG, wanakuwa na uwezo wao wa kutangaza zaidi ya ukweli mmoja unaomuunga mkono. Kwa QG, mara nyingi tunahitaji ukweli kadhaa wa kuunga mkono ili kutengeneza maswali yenye sifa kubwa. Kuhamishwa na shughuli za hivi karibuni kuhusu masuala ya watu wengi yanayohusiana na QA, tunachukua kizazi cha maswali ya watu wengi, ambacho kinakusudia kutengeneza maswali yanayohusiana na kusaidia ukweli katika muktadha huo. Tunajiri maswali mengi ya kujifunza kwa jukumu la ushirikiano wa kujibu maarifa ya kuunga mkono utabiri wa ukweli wa kuongoza muuzaji wa swali. Zaidi ya hayo, tulipendekeza kazi ya malipo yenye ufahamu wa maswali katika mfumo wa Elimu ya Maendeleo (RL) ili kuzidisha matumizi ya ukweli unaomuunga mkono. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu kupitia majaribio kuhusu maswali ya watu wengi yanayojibu seti ya data, HotPotQA. Utafiti wa kipekee unaonyesha mifano yetu ya kutekeleza mifano ya uzalishaji wa maswali ya neura moja kwa moja kwenye mbinu za kutathmini binafsi kama vile BLEU, METEOR, na ROUGE na njia za uchunguzi wa binadamu kwa ubora na taarifa za maswali yaliyozaliwa.', 'tr': "Sorag jenaýaty (QG) bir sened we jogap berilen bir dil soragyny döredip soragynyň tersini çözmesine synanyşýar. Näyral nusgalary QG üçin adalat sistemalary yzarlamak üçin bu sahypalary öz ukyplarynda bir nusgadan köpräk üçin üns bermek üçin sınırly. QG üçin köplenç ýokary kaliwatly soraglary döretmek üçin birnäçe destekleýän faktalary gerek. QA'da köp-hoplaryň razylygynda ýakyn işlerden örän näçe-Hoplaryň soragyny üýtgedýäris. Bu tema kontekstde faktlary destekleýän soraglary döretmäge niýetlenýän. Biz sorag jeneratörüni yönlendirmek üçin köp zady öwrenmek üçin kömekleyici zady bilen ulanýarys. Ayrıca, destekli gerçeklerin kullanımını azaltmak üçin bir sorumdan bilinç ödül fonksiyonu teklif ettik. Biz çoklu-Hop soru veri seti HotPotQA üzerinde yaklaşımızın etkinliğini gösteriyoruz. Wagtlaýyn çözümlenmek biziň modelimizi ýekeje-hop neural soragy döretmek üçin hem awtomatik deňleme metrikleri ýaly BLEU, METEOR we ROUGE we adamlaryň çözümlenme metriklerini ýagdaýda çykarmak üçin hatlarymyzy görkezýär.", 'fa': 'نسل سوال (QG) سعی می\u200cکند که مشکل جواب سوال (QA) را با تولید یک سوال زبان طبیعی که یک سند و یک جواب داده شده حل کند. در حالی که ترتیب برای ترتیب مدل عصبی سیستم\u200cهای قانونی بر QG بیشتر از یک حقیقت پشتیبانی محدود می\u200cشوند. برای QG، ما اغلب برای تولید سؤال های کیفیت بالا نیاز داریم. توسط کارهای اخیر روی دلیل\u200cهای متعدد هوپ در QA، ما نسل سوال\u200cهای متعدد هوپ را دریافت می\u200cکنیم، که هدف می\u200cگیرد به تولید سوال\u200cهای مربوط به پشتیبانی حقیقت در محیط است. ما از یادگیری بسیاری از کارها استفاده می کنیم که با وظیفه کمک کننده از پیش بینی\u200cهای حقیقتی که می\u200cدانند به راهنمایی ژنراتور سوال است. علاوه بر این، ما همچنین یک عملکرد پاداشی از سوال آگاهی در یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار ما فعالیت دستور ما را از طریق آزمایشات روی سؤال چند هوپ پاسخ داده\u200cهای HotPotQA نشان می\u200cدهیم. ارزیابی امپراطوری مدل ما را نشان می دهد که مدل\u200cهای نسل\u200cهای عصبی یک هوپ را بر روی متریک ارزیابی خودکار مثل BLEU، METEOR و ROUGE و متریک ارزیابی انسان برای کیفیت و پوشش سوالات تولید کند.', 'af': "Vrag generasie (QG) probeer om die omgekeerde van vraag antwoord (QA) probleem te los deur 'n natuurlike taal vraag te genereer wat 'n dokument en 'n antwoord gegee is. Terwyl sekvensie na sekvensie van neurale modele oorvloei reël-gebaseerde stelsels vir QG, is hulle beperk in hul kapasiteit om op meer as een ondersteunde feit te fokus. Vir QG, ons het dikwels veelvuldige ondersteunde fakte nodig om hoë-kwaliteit vrae te genereer. Inspirasie deur onlangse werke op multihops redering in QA, neem ons Multihops vraag generasie op, wat doel doen om relevante vraag te genereer gebaseer op ondersteunde fakte in die konteks. Ons gebruik multitaak leer met die hulp taak van antwoord-bewys ondersteunde feit voorskou om die vraaggenereerder te lei. In addition, we also proposed a question-aware reward function in a Reinforcement Learning (RL) framework to maximize the use of the supporting facts. Ons wys die effektiviteit van ons toegang deur eksperimente op die multihopvraag wat antwoord datastel, HotPotQA. Enigeriese evaluasie wys ons model om die enkele-hop neurale vraag generasiemodel te uitvoer op beide outomatiese evaluasie metries soos BLEU, METEOR en ROUGE en menslike evaluasie metries vir kwaliteit en dekking van die genereerde vrae.", 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i pyetjeve (QG) përpiqet të zgjidhë kundërshtimin e problemit të përgjigjes së pyetjeve (QA) duke krijuar një pyetje gjuhës natyrore të dhënë një dokument dhe një përgjigje. Ndërsa sekuenca për sekuencën e modeleve neuronale kalon sistemet bazuar në rregulla për QG, ata janë të kufizuar në kapacitetin e tyre për të përqëndruar në më shumë se një fakt mbështetës. Për QG, ne shpesh kërkojmë fakte të shumta mbështetëse për të gjeneruar pyetje të cilësisë së lartë. Inspiruar nga punët e fundit mbi arsyetimin multi-hop në QA, ne marrim gjeneratën e pyetjeve Multi-hop, e cila synon të gjenerojë pyetje të rëndësishme bazuar në mbështetjen e fakteve në kontekst. Ne përdorim mësim shumëdetyrash me detyrën ndihmëse të përgjigjes-ndërgjegjshme mbështetjen parashikimit të fakteve për të udhëzuar gjeneratorin e pyetjeve. Përveç kësaj, ne propozuam gjithashtu një funksion shpërblimi në dijeni të pyetjeve në një kuadër të Mësimit të Përforcimit (RL) për të maksimalizuar përdorimin e fakteve mbështetëse. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë nëpërmjet eksperimenteve mbi pyetjet e shumëhopit që përgjigjen për të dhënat, HotPotQA. Empirical evaluation shows our model to outperform the single-hop neural question generation models on both automatic evaluation metrics such as BLEU, METEOR, and ROUGE and human evaluation metrics for quality and coverage of the generated questions.', 'am': 'ጥያቄ ትውልድ While sequence to sequence neural models surpass rule-based systems for QG, they are limited in their capacity to focus on more than one supporting fact.  ለQG ብዙ ጊዜ ከፍተኛ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር የብዙ ደጋሚ እውነተኞችን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በቅርብ ዘመን በQA ውስጥ በብዙ-hop ጉዳይ ላይ የሚደረገውን ሥራ እናስወግዳለን፡፡ የጥያቄውን አዋጅ ለመመራት የሚችሉትን የእውነትን ለመደገፍ የሚደግፉትን የመረጃ ትምህርት ለማድረግ በብዙው ጥያቄዎችን እናሰራለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የጥያቄ ዋጋ ሥራ (RL) በተጨማሪው ማስተማር (RL) ፍሬማር ላይ የደጋጋፊውን ውሸት ለመጠቀም አቀረብን፡፡ በብዙ-hop ጥያቄ ላይ የመልስ ዳታተር መግለጫ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የኢሜሪካዊ ምርጫዎች የብሊዩን፣ ሜቴሮን እና ሮዩጂ እና የሰው ጉዳይ ምትርኮችን ለጥያቄ እና ለጥያቄ ጥያቄ እና ለጥያቄ ክፍተት ማድረጊያውን የነፃ ጠይቅ ትውልድ ምሳሌዎችን ለማሳየት ሞዴላዎችን የሚያሳየው፡፡', 'hy': 'Հարցողների սերունդը (QG) փորձում է լուծել հարցերին պատասխանելու (QA) հակառակը՝ ստեղծելով բնական լեզվային հարց, որը տալիս է փաստաթղթի և պատասխան: While sequence to sequence neural models surpass rule-based systems for QG, they are limited in their capacity to focus on more than one supporting fact.  QG-ի համար մենք հաճախ պահանջում ենք բազմաթիվ աջակցող փաստեր բարձր որակի հարցեր ստեղծելու համար: Հոգեշնչված վերջին աշխատանքներով, որոնք վերաբերում են բազմահուսային մտածողություններին QA-ում, մենք սկսում ենք բազմահուսային հարցերի սերունդ, որը նպատակում է ստեղծել հարցեր, որոնք հիմնված են փաստերի աջակցության վրա կոնտեքստ Մենք օգտագործում ենք բազմախնդիրներ սովորելը պատասխաններով գիտակցած օգտագործող խնդիրների կանխատեսումը հարցերի գեներատորի ուղղությամբ: Ավելին, մենք նաև առաջարկեցինք հարցերով գիտակցած վարձի գործառույթ Արժեքավորման ուսումնասիրության (RL) շրջանակում, որպեսզի մեծանանք աջակցող փաստերի օգտագործումը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը բազմահուսային հարցերին պատասխանող փորձարկումների միջոցով, որը պատասխանում է տվյալների համակարգին, Հոթ Փոթ ՔԱ: Իմպրիկական գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը մեկ հուսանքի նյարդային հարցերի ստեղծման մոդելներից դուրս է գալիս այնքան ավտոմատիկ գնահատման մետրիկայի վրա, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ Բլեուզ, Մետեորը, Ռուգեն և մարդկային գնահատման մետրիկայը ստե', 'az': "sual nəsli (QG) bir döküm və cavab verilən təbiətli dil sualını yaratmaq üçün sual cavabını çəkməyə çalışır. QG üçün nöral modellərin sıralaması üçün sıralama sıralama istifadə edilməsi üçün, onlar bir dəstəkdən çox istifadə etmək üçün qabiliyyətində sınırlanırlar. QG üçün çox çox dəstəkləyici faktaları yüksək kaliteli suallar yaratmaq üçün istəyirik. QA'da çoxlu-Hop razılığı haqqında son işlər təşkil edilmişdir, çoxlu-Hop sual nəsilini alırıq, bu həqiqətlərə dəstəklənmək haqqındakı suallar təşkil etmək niyyətində olan. Biz sual generatörünü doğru yola yönəltmək üçün çoxlu işin öyrənməsini cavab verən tədbirlərin köməkçisi ilə istifadə edirik. Biz həmçin in həmçinin həmçinin desteklənən faktların istifadəsini artırmaq üçün bir sual bilən ödül funksiyasını təbliğ etdik. Biz çoxlu-Hop soruşu verilən qutusu, HotPotQA ilə təsirimizin etkinliğini göstəririk. Empirical evaluation shows our model to perform the single-hop neural question generation models on both automatic evaluation metrics such as BLEU, METEOR, and ROUGE and human evaluation metrics for quality and coverage of the questions.", 'bn': 'প্রশ্ন প্রজন্ম (কিউজি) প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের বিনিয়োগ সমাধানের চেষ্টা করে একটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রশ্ন তৈরি করে একটি নথি এবং উত্তর দ কিউজির জন্য নিউরেল মডেলের নিয়ম-ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম পার্স করার ক্ষেত্রে সীমাবদ্ধ, তারা এক সমর্থনকারী বাস্তবতার উপর মনোযোগ দিতে  কিজির জন্য আমাদের প্রায়শই বেশ কিছু সমর্থন প্রয়োজন, যাতে উচ্চমান প্রশ্ন তৈরি করা। সাম্প্রতিক কিউএ মাল্টিহোপ প্রশ্নের ব্যাপারে অনুপ্রাণিত করেছে, আমরা মাল্টিহোপ প প্রজন্ম নিয়ে যাচ্ছি, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে এই প্রসঙ্গে প্রশ্ন আমরা প্রশ্ন জেনারেটরের হেদায়েত করার জন্য প্রশ্ন জেনারেটর নির্দেশ দেয়ার জন্য প্রতিক্রিয়া জানানোর জন্য অন্যান্য প্ এছাড়াও আমরা প্রশ্নের পরিচালিত পুরস্কার প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম পুনর্গঠন শিক্ষা শিক্ষা (আরএল) ফ্রেমে সমর্থনের ব্যবহারের জন্য। আমরা মাল্টিহোপ প্রশ্নের প্রশ্নের জবাব দিয়ে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করছি হোটপটকিয়া স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিলু, মেটোর এবং রুজের এবং মানুষের মানুষের মূল্যের মান এবং তৈরি প্রশ্নের কাভারেজের জন্য মানুষের মানুষের মূল্য প্রকাশ করার জন্য আমাদের মডেল দেখ', 'bs': 'Generacija pitanja (QG) pokušava rešiti obrnuti problem odgovora na pitanje (QA) stvaranjem prirodnog jezičkog pitanja koji je dao dokument i odgovor. Iako je sekvencija za sekvenciju neuralnih modela nadmažena na pravilima na QG-u, ograničena su u svojoj kapaciteti da se fokusiraju na više od jedne činjenice podrške. Za QG, često zahtijevamo višestruke podrške činjenice za stvaranje visokokvalitetnih pitanja. Uhvaćeni nedavnim radovima o razumijevanju multihopa u QA-u, poduzimamo generaciju multihopa pitanja, koja cilja na stvaranje relevantnih pitanja na temelju podrške činjenica u kontekstu. Mi zapošljavamo učenje multizadataka sa pomoćnim zadatkom odgovornog svjesnog predviđanja činjenica da vodimo generator pitanja. Osim toga, mi smo također predložili funkciju nagrade svjesne pitanja u okviru učenja pojačanja (RL) kako bi se maksimalizirali korištenje činjenica podrške. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa kroz eksperimente na multihopskom pitanju odgovarajućem podacima, HotPotQA. Empirička procjena pokazuje naš model kako bi se nadmašio modeli generacije jednohopnog neuralnog pitanja na obje automatske procjene metrike kao što su BLEU, METEOR i ROUGE i ljudske procjene metrike za kvalitet i pokrivanje proizvedenih pitanja.', 'ca': "La generació de preguntes intenta resoldre el contrari del problem a de resposta a preguntes generant una pregunta de llenguatge natural dada un document i una resposta. Mentre que la seqüència de models neuronals supera els sistemes basats en regles per a QG, estan limitats en la seva capacitat de centrar-se en més d'un fet de suport. Per a QG, sovint necessitem múltiples fets de suport per generar preguntes d'alta qualitat. Inspirats per treballs recents sobre raonament multi hop a QA, comencem a generar preguntes multihop, que busquen generar preguntes relevants basades en el suport de fets en el context. Empreguem aprenentatge multitasca amb la tasca auxiliar de predicció de fets conscient de la resposta per guiar el generador de preguntes. In addition, we also proposed a question-aware reward function in a Reinforcement Learning (RL) framework to maximize the utilization of the supporting facts.  Demonstrem l'eficacia del nostre enfocament a través d'experiments sobre el conjunt de dades de resposta a preguntes multihops, HotPotQA. L'evaluació empírica mostra que el nostre model per superar els models de generació de preguntes neurals d'un únic hop en les mètriques d'evaluació automàtica com BLEU, METEOR, ROUGE i humans per a la qualitat i cobertura de les preguntes generades.", 'cs': 'Generování otázek (QG) se pokouší vyřešit inverzní problém odpovědi na otázky (QA) generováním otázky přirozeného jazyka dané dokumentu a odpovědi. Zatímco sekvence na sekvenci neuronové modely překonávají systémy založené na pravidlech pro QG, jsou omezené ve své schopnosti zaměřit se na více než jeden podpůrný fakt. Pro QG často vyžadujeme několik podpůrných faktů, abychom generovali vysoce kvalitní otázky. Inspirováni nedávnými pracemi o multi-hop uvažování v QA, zabýváme se generováním multi-hop otázek, které se zaměřuje na generování relevantních otázek založených na podpůrných faktech v kontextu. Pro řízení generátoru otázek využíváme multitasking learning s pomocným úkolem odpovědí-vědomé podpůrné predikce faktů. Kromě toho jsme navrhli také funkci odměny uvědoměné otázkám v rámci Reinforcement Learning (RL), která maximalizuje využití podpůrných faktů. Účinnost našeho přístupu demonstrujeme pomocí experimentů na multi-hop otázkové sadě HotPotQA. Empirické hodnocení ukazuje, že náš model překonává modely generování neurálních otázek v jednom hopu jak u automatických hodnotících metrik, jako jsou BLEU, METEOR a ROUGE, tak i lidských hodnotících metrik pro kvalitu a pokrytí generovaných otázek.', 'et': 'Küsimuste genereerimine (QG) püüab lahendada küsimustele vastamise pöördprobleemi, genereerides looduskeelse küsimuse, mis on antud dokumendile ja vastusele. Kuigi järjestuse neuraalsed mudelid ületavad QG reeglipõhiseid süsteeme, on nende suutlikkus keskenduda rohkem kui ühele toetavale faktile piiratud. Kvaliteetsete küsimuste tekkimiseks vajame sageli mitut tõendavat fakti. Inspireerituna hiljutistest töödest multi-hop arutlemise kohta kvaliteedi tagamisel, võtame kasutusele Multi-hop küsimuste generatsiooni, mille eesmärk on luua asjakohaseid küsimusi kontekstis toetavate faktide põhjal. Küsimuste generaatori juhtimiseks kasutame mitmeülesannetega õppimist koos vastusteadliku faktide prognoosimise abiülesandega. Lisaks pakkusime välja ka küsimusteadliku preemiafunktsiooni tugevdusõppe raamistikus, et maksimeerida toetavate faktide kasutamist. Me demonstreerime oma lähenemisviisi efektiivsust läbi eksperimentide multi-hop küsimustele vastamise andmekogumiga HotPotQA. Empiiriline hindamine näitab, et meie mudel ületab ühe hüppega neuroküsimuste genereerimise mudeleid nii automaatsete hindamismeetikate nagu BLEU, METEOR ja ROUGE kui ka inimeste hindamismeetikate puhul genereeritud küsimuste kvaliteedi ja katvuse osas.', 'fi': 'Kysymysten generointi (QG) yrittää ratkaista inverse of question answer (QA) -ongelmaa luomalla luonnollisen kielen kysymys, joka annetaan asiakirjalle ja vastaukselle. Vaikka sekvenssimallit ylittävät QG:n sääntöpohjaiset järjestelmät, niiden kyky keskittyä useampaan kuin yhteen tukifaktaan on rajallinen. QG: lle tarvitsemme usein useita tukevia faktoja tuottaaksemme laadukkaita kysymyksiä. Uusien QA:n monihop-päättelyä käsittelevien teosten innoittamana siirrymme Multi-hop-kysymysteknologiaan, jonka tavoitteena on luoda relevantteja kysymyksiä kontekstissa olevien tosiasioiden pohjalta. Käytämme monitehtäväoppimista ja vastaustietoisen faktojen ennustamisen aputehtävää kysymysgeneraattorin ohjaamiseksi. Lisäksi ehdotimme kysymystietoista palkitsemistoimintoa vahvistamalla oppimista (RL) tukevien faktojen hyödyntämisen maksimoimiseksi. Osoitamme lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden kokeilemalla monihyppyistä kysymyksiin vastaamista koskevaa aineistoa HotPotQA. Empiirinen arviointi osoittaa, että mallimme suoriutuu yhden hypyn neurokysymysmallit paremmin sekä automaattisissa arviointimittareissa, kuten BLEU, METEOR ja ROUGE, että ihmisen arviointimittareissa luodtujen kysymysten laadun ja kattavuuden varmistamiseksi.', 'sk': 'Generacija vprašanj (QG) poskuša rešiti problem obratnega odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA) z ustvarjanjem vprašanja v naravnem jeziku, ki je dano dokument in odgovor. Medtem ko zaporedje do zaporedja nevronskih modelov presega sisteme, ki temeljijo na pravilih za QG, so omejeni v svoji sposobnosti, da se osredotočijo na več kot eno podporno dejstvo. Za QG pogosto potrebujemo več podpornih dejstev, da ustvarimo visokokakovostna vprašanja. Z navdihom nad nedavnimi deli o multi-hop razmišljanju v kakovosti se lotimo generacije vprašanj Multi-hop, katere cilj je ustvariti relevantna vprašanja na podlagi podpornih dejstev v kontekstu. Za vodenje generatorja vprašanj uporabljamo večopravilno učenje s pomožno nalogo zavedanja odgovorov podporne napovedi dejstev. Poleg tega smo predlagali tudi funkcijo nagrajevanja, ki se zaveda vprašanj, v okviru okrepitvenega učenja (RL), da bi čim bolj izkoristili podporna dejstva. Učinkovitost našega pristopa dokazujemo s pomočjo eksperimentov na podatkovnem naboru za odgovore na vprašanja, HotPotQA. Empirično ocenjevanje kaže, da naš model presega modele generiranja nevronskih vprašanj z enim skokom tako pri samodejnih meritvah ocenjevanja, kot so BLEU, METEOR in ROUGE, kot tudi pri meritvah ocenjevanja človeka za kakovost in pokritost ustvarjenih vprašanj.', 'jv': 'Name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Tulung, awak dhéwé butuh dipunangé supoyatan kanggo ngilangno ketahanan luwih apik. Awakdhéwé karo hal-hal nganggo sistem sing gak nyengkuyung ing multi-hol lan mên iki, awak dhéwé buturan kesempatan Multi-hol, sing nganggo nggawe layakno sing isiné katêpakan karo nggunakake sing nggawe barang nggawe barang-sistem. Awak dhéwé éntuk multitask seneng nggawe lan akeh pengguna-pengguna nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang pengguna-pengguna kuwi nggawe Perintah Panjenengan Nambah, awak dhéwé mulai nggawe sistem-Awak dhéwé éntuk barêng nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang-barêng (RL) kuwi nggawe sistem sing bisa bantêr nggawe barang nggawe barang. Awak dhéwé éntuk efekat kanggo ngerasakno ning perintah sing nyebatasan multi-top sing ngomong dataset, HotpotqA. Validity empirecal', 'ha': "Question generation (QG) attempts to solve the inverse of question answering (QA) problem by generating a natural language question given a document and an answer.  Waka da ake saka wa masallatain neural sun shige wasu na'ura a kan QG, za'a ƙayyade su cikin awon su zura ido kan bayan gaskiya guda mai ƙaranci. @ info: whatsthis An yi wahayi da aikin kwanan nan a kan multi-jum masu hankalin a cikin QA, Munã ɗauki danne na multi-jum masu tambayar, da aimi ya ƙãga masu muhimmi masu tambayar da ke cikin muhimmada. Munã aiki multi-askar da za'a karanta da aikin inganci na masu sani na taimaki-bayani na gaskiya dõmin ya shiryar da mai gaura masu tambayar. Da wannan, mun goyya da wani aikin da aka sani a cikin firam-Rafforf Learnin (RL) dõmin a maximise amfani da masu ƙaranci. Yana nũna fikancin hanyarmu a bayan jarrabai masu tambayin masu multi-juma da ake karɓa wa tsarin da aka HotPotQA. Ana ƙaddara shirin Empirical na nuna misãlai da za'a samar masu motsi na masu tambayar neural guda ta farat ɗaya a kan misãlai na ƙaddara masu motsi farat ɗaya kamar BLEU, MEMETOOR, da RuUGE da manyan evaluation metrikati ga tsarin da kuma tsarin masu sakan da aka ƙãga.", 'he': 'דור שאלות (QG) מנסה לפתור את ההפך של בעיית תשובת שאלות (QA) על ידי ליצור שאלה שפה טבעית שנתנה מסמך ותשובה. בזמן שהרצף לרצף דוגמנים עצביים עובר מערכות מבוססות על חוקים עבור QG, הם מוגבלים בכוחות שלהם להתמקד על יותר מעבדה תמיכה אחת. עבור QG, אנחנו לעתים קרובות דורשים עובדות מרובות תמיכה כדי ליצור שאלות איכות גבוהה. השראה על ידי העבודות האחרונות על ההיגיון multi-hop ב QA, אנחנו לוקחים את דור שאלות Multi-hop, שמתכוון ליצור שאלות רלוונטיות מבוססות על תומכת עובדות בקשר. אנו משתמשים ללמוד במשימות רבות עם המשימה העוזרת של חיזוי עובדות מודע לתשובה כדי להדריך את גנרטור השאלות. בנוסף, הצענו גם תפקיד פרס מודע לשאלות במסגרת לימוד חיבורי (RL) כדי למקסימום את השימוש של העובדות המתמיכות. אנחנו מראים את היעילות של הגישה שלנו באמצעות ניסויים על השאלה המולט-הופ שעוברת על קבוצת נתונים, HotPotQA. הערכה האימפרית מראה את הדוגמא שלנו להעביר את הדוגמאות של דור השאלות העצביות יחיד על שני מטריות הערכה אוטומטיות כמו BLEU, METEOR, ו ROUGE ומטריות הערכה האנושית לאיכות וכיסוי של השאלות הנוצרות.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་མིང(QG)གིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ While sequence to sequence neural models surpass rule-based systems for QG, they are limited in their capacity to focus on one more than one supporting fact. QG ལ་སྤྱོད་པར་ང་ཚོར་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པར་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་དངོས་ཡོད་ཚད་མང་པོ་དགོས་མཁོ་ཡོད། QA ནང་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ལས་ཕར་སྟོན་པའི་ལས་འགན་སྤེལ་བྱ་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་ལན་གསལ་བ་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་ཁས་བའི་ལས་ཀ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོད་པ་ལྟར་ངེད་ཚོས་ཤེས་འཇུག་གི་ལས་ཉེན་ཁ་སྐོང་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣུམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མེད་པའི་གྲི་ཚིག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ Empirical evaluation shows our model to outperform the single-hop neural question models on both automatic evaluation metrics such as BLEU, METEOR, and ROUGE and human evaluation metrics for quality and coverage of the generated questions.'}
{'en': 'Does Chinese BERT Encode Word Structure?', 'ar': 'هل يقوم BERT الصيني بتشفير بنية الكلمات؟', 'pt': 'O BERT chinês codifica a estrutura da palavra?', 'fr': 'Le BERT chinois code-t-il la structure des mots\xa0?', 'es': '¿El BERT chino codifica la estructura de las palabras?', 'ja': '中国語のBERTは単語構造をエンコードしますか？', 'zh': '中文BERT单词构否编码?', 'ru': 'Кодирует ли китайский BERT структуру слова?', 'hi': 'क्या चीनी BERT एन्कोड वर्ड संरचना करता है?', 'ga': 'An Ionchódaíonn Sínis BERT Struchtúr Focal?', 'ka': 'ჩინეთი BERT კოდის სიტყვების სტრუქტურაცია?', 'hu': 'A kínai BERT kódolja a szóstruktúrát?', 'kk': 'Қытай BERT сөз құрылымы кодтады ба?', 'lt': 'Does Chinese BERT Encode Word Structure?', 'ms': 'Does Chinese BERT Encode Word Structure?', 'el': 'Το κινεζικό BERT κωδικοποιεί τη δομή λέξεων;', 'it': 'Il cinese BERT codifica la struttura delle parole?', 'mt': 'L-Istruttura tal-kliem taċ-Ċina BERT tikkodifika?', 'mn': 'Хятад БЕРТ үг бүтэц коддог уу?', 'no': 'Er kinesisk BERT kode ordstruktur?', 'mk': 'Дали Кинеската BERT ја кодира структурата на зборовите?', 'pl': 'Czy chiński BERT koduje strukturę słowa?', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് ബെര്\u200dട്ട് വാക്ക് സ്ട്രാക്ട്രൂട്ട് എക്കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ടോ?', 'sr': 'Da li kineska BERT kodira strukturu riječi?', 'si': 'චීනි බෙර්ට් එක්කෝඩ් වචන ස්ථාපනය කරනවද?', 'so': 'Miyey Shiinaha BERT ka kooban yihiin hadal dhismo?', 'sv': 'Kodar kinesiska BERT ordstruktur?', 'ur': 'کیا چینی BERT ویڈ ساختار کا اکنود کرتا ہے؟', 'ro': 'BERT chinezesc codează structura cuvintelor?', 'ta': 'சீனா பெர்ட் வார்த்தை உருவாக்கம் குறியீடு?', 'uz': 'Does Chinese BERT Encode Word Structure?', 'vi': 'Mã hóa từ ở Trung Hoa.', 'bg': 'Китайският BERT кодира ли структурата на думите?', 'nl': 'Codeert Chinese BERT woordstructuur?', 'da': 'Koder kinesisk BERT ordstruktur?', 'hr': 'Da li kineska BERT kodira strukturu riječi?', 'de': 'Codiert chinesisches BERT Wortstruktur?', 'id': 'Apakah struktur kata BERT Cina?', 'fa': 'ساختار کلمه چيني "برت" رمزگذاري ميکنه؟', 'ko': '중국어는 단어 구조를 인코딩합니까?', 'sw': 'Je, Mradi wa Uchina wa BERT unafungua maneno?', 'tr': 'Çinçe BERT Kelimi Ködleýärmi?', 'af': 'Het Sjinese BERT Enkodeer Woord Struktuur?', 'sq': 'A kodon struktura e fjalëve kineze BERT?', 'am': 'የቻይና BERT ቃላት መክፈት ይኖራልን?', 'hy': 'Does Chinese BERT Encode Word Structure?', 'bn': 'চীনা বার্ট কি শব্দ কাঠামো এনকোড করা হচ্ছে?', 'az': 'Çincə BERT Kelimi Qurulumu Kodlayır?', 'bs': 'Da li kineska BERT kodira strukturu riječi?', 'ca': 'Estructura de paraules codifica BERT xinès?', 'cs': 'Kóduje čínský BERT slovní strukturu?', 'et': 'Kas hiina BERT kodeerib sõnastruktuuri?', 'fi': 'Koodaako kiinalainen BERT sanarakenne?', 'jv': 'Mbok bara Chinese BERT Atowo Ndukutu Ketokani ?', 'sk': 'Ali kitajski BERT kodira besedno strukturo?', 'he': 'האם BERT סיני קוד מבנה מילים?', 'ha': 'Shin, KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་མི་BERT སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་བཀོད་པ་ཡིན་ནམ།'}
{'en': 'Contextualized representations give significantly improved results for a wide range of NLP tasks. Much work has been dedicated to analyzing the features captured by representative models such as BERT. Existing work finds that syntactic, semantic and word sense knowledge are encoded in BERT. However, little work has investigated word features for character languages such as Chinese. We investigate Chinese BERT using both attention weight distribution statistics and probing tasks, finding that (1) word information is captured by BERT ; (2) word-level features are mostly in the middle representation layers ; (3) downstream tasks make different use of word features in BERT, with POS tagging and chunking relying the most on word features, and natural language inference relying the least on such features.', 'ar': 'التمثيلات السياقية تعطي نتائج محسنة بشكل ملحوظ لمجموعة واسعة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. تم تكريس الكثير من العمل لتحليل الميزات التي تم التقاطها بواسطة النماذج التمثيلية مثل BERT. يجد العمل الحالي أن المعرفة النحوية والدلالية ومعاني الكلمات مشفرة في BERT. ومع ذلك ، فقد بحث القليل من العمل ميزات الكلمات للغات الأحرف مثل الصينية. نحن نحقق في BERT الصينية باستخدام إحصائيات توزيع وزن الانتباه ومهام التحقيق ، ووجدنا أن (1) معلومات كلمة يتم التقاطها بواسطة BERT ؛ (2) تكون ميزات مستوى الكلمات في الغالب في طبقات التمثيل الوسطى ؛ (3) تستفيد المهام النهائية بشكل مختلف من ميزات الكلمات في BERT ، مع اعتماد علامات نقاط البيع والتقسيم إلى أقصى حد على ميزات الكلمات ، واستنتاج اللغة الطبيعية الذي يعتمد بشكل أقل على هذه الميزات.', 'pt': 'As representações contextualizadas fornecem resultados significativamente aprimorados para uma ampla gama de tarefas de PNL. Muito trabalho tem sido dedicado a analisar as características capturadas por modelos representativos como o BERT. O trabalho existente descobre que o conhecimento sintático, semântico e do sentido da palavra está codificado no BERT. No entanto, pouco trabalho investigou recursos de palavras para idiomas de caracteres, como o chinês. Investigamos o BERT chinês usando estatísticas de distribuição de peso de atenção e tarefas de sondagem, descobrindo que (1) a informação da palavra é capturada pelo BERT; (2) os recursos de nível de palavra estão principalmente nas camadas de representação intermediárias; (3) tarefas de downstream fazem uso diferente de recursos de palavras no BERT, com marcação e agrupamento de POS confiando mais nos recursos de palavras e a inferência de linguagem natural contando menos com esses recursos.', 'es': 'Las representaciones contextualizadas ofrecen resultados significativamente mejores para una amplia gama de tareas de PNL. Se ha dedicado mucho trabajo a analizar las características capturadas por modelos representativos como BERT. El trabajo existente encuentra que el conocimiento sintáctico, semántico y del sentido de las palabras está codificado en BERT. Sin embargo, poco trabajo ha investigado las características de las palabras para idiomas de caracteres como el chino. Investigamos el BERT chino utilizando tanto estadísticas de distribución de peso de atención como tareas de sondeo, y descubrimos que (1) BERT captura la información de las palabras; (2) las entidades a nivel de palabra se encuentran principalmente en las capas de representación intermedias; (3) las tareas posteriores hacen un uso diferente de las características de las palabras en BERT, con etiquetado POS y la fragmentación que se basa más en las características de las palabras, y la inferencia del lenguaje natural que se basa menos en dichas características.', 'fr': "Les représentations contextualisées donnent des résultats nettement améliorés pour un large éventail de tâches de PNL. De nombreux travaux ont été consacrés à l'analyse des caractéristiques capturées par des modèles représentatifs tels que BERT. Les travaux existants montrent que les connaissances syntaxiques, sémantiques et du sens des mots sont codées dans BERT. Cependant, peu de travaux ont étudié les caractéristiques des mots pour les langues de caractères telles que le chinois. Nous étudions le BERT chinois en utilisant à la fois des statistiques de distribution du poids de l'attention et des tâches de sondage, en constatant que (1) les informations sur les mots sont capturées par BERT\xa0; (2) les entités au niveau des mots se trouvent principalement dans les couches de représentation intermédiaires\xa0; (3) les tâches en aval utilisent différemment les caractéristiques des mots dans BERT, avec le marquage POS et le découpage qui repose le plus sur les caractéristiques des mots, et l'inférence du langage naturel qui repose le moins sur de telles caractéristiques.", 'zh': '上下文化 NLP 务著改进。 务在析代表性(如 BERT)所获。 见事句法,语义词义编码在BERT中。 然少勘汉语等字语单词特征。 用意权重布计探事以究中文BERT,得(1)单词信BERT获。 (2)字级特征多在中; (3)下流于BERT单词之用不同,POS表与分块最赖于单词,而自然语言理最不赖于此。', 'ja': '文脈化された表現は、幅広いNLPタスクの結果を大幅に改善する。BERTのような代表的なモデルが捉えた特徴の分析に多くの作業が費やされてきた。既存の研究では、構文、意味論、単語センスの知識がBERTで符号化されていることがわかっている。しかしながら、中国語などの文字言語の単語特徴についてはほとんど調査されていない。私たちは、注意重み分布統計とプロービングタスクの両方を使用して中国のBERTを調査し、(1)単語情報はBERTによってキャプチャされていること、(2)単語レベルの機能はほとんどが中間表現レイヤーにあること、(3)下流のタスクはBERTで単語機能を異なる使用し、POSタグ付けとチャンキングは単語機能に最も依存し、自然言語の推論はそのような機能に最も依存していないことを発見しました。', 'ru': 'Контекстуализированные представления дают значительно улучшенные результаты для широкого спектра задач NLP. Много работы было посвящено анализу функций, захваченных репрезентативными моделями, такими как BERT. Существующая работа обнаруживает, что синтаксические, семантические и смысловые знания закодированы в BERT. Тем не менее, мало работы были изучены особенности слова для языков символов, таких как китайский. Мы исследуем китайский BERT, используя как статистику распределения веса внимания, так и задачи зондирования, обнаружив, что (1) информация о слове захватывается BERT; (2) функции на уровне слова в основном находятся в средних уровнях представления; (3) задачи ниже по потоку по-разному используют функции слова в BERT, при этом POS-тегирование и чанкинг в наибольшей степени полагаются на функции слова, а вывод естественного языка в наименьшей степени полагается на такие функции.', 'hi': 'संदर्भित अभ्यावेदन एनएलपी कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला के लिए काफी बेहतर परिणाम देते हैं। BERT जैसे प्रतिनिधि मॉडल द्वारा कैप्चर की गई सुविधाओं का विश्लेषण करने के लिए बहुत काम समर्पित किया गया है। मौजूदा काम पाता है कि वाक्यात्मक, शब्दार्थ और शब्द भावना ज्ञान BERT में एन्कोडेड हैं। हालांकि, बहुत कम काम ने चीनी जैसी चरित्र भाषाओं के लिए शब्द सुविधाओं की जांच की है। हम दोनों ध्यान वजन वितरण के आंकड़ों और जांच कार्यों का उपयोग करके चीनी BERT की जांच करते हैं, यह पाते हुए कि (1) शब्द जानकारी BERT द्वारा कब्जा कर ली गई है; (2) शब्द-स्तर की विशेषताएं ज्यादातर मध्य प्रतिनिधित्व परतों में होती हैं; (3) डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य BERT में शब्द सुविधाओं का अलग-अलग उपयोग करते हैं, जिसमें पीओएस टैगिंग और चंकिंग शब्द सुविधाओं पर सबसे अधिक निर्भर करते हैं, और प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान ऐसी विशेषताओं पर कम से कम निर्भर करता है।', 'ga': "Tugann léirithe comhthéacsúla torthaí feabhsaithe go mór do raon leathan tascanna NLP. Tá go leor oibre tiomnaithe d'anailís a dhéanamh ar na gnéithe a ghlac samhlacha ionadaíocha ar nós BERT. Faightear amach i saothar atá ann cheana féin go bhfuil eolas ar chiall chomhréire, shéimeantach agus focal ionchódaithe in BERT. Mar sin féin, is beag obair a rinne iniúchadh ar ghnéithe focal do theangacha carachtair mar an tSínis. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar BERT Síneach agus úsáid á baint as staitisticí um dháileadh aird-mheáchan agus tascanna iniúchta, faightear amach go bhfuil (1) faisnéis focal gafa ag CRET; (2) tá gnéithe leibhéal na bhfocal den chuid is mó sna sraitheanna lárionadaíochta; (3) baineann tascanna iartheachtacha úsáidí éagsúla as gnéithe focal in BERT, le clibeáil agus smután POS ag brath is mó ar ghnéithe focal, agus tátal teanga nádúrtha ag brath ar a laghad ar ghnéithe dá leithéid.", 'ka': 'კონტექსტუალურად გამოსახულებული გამოსახულებები გაუკეთებულია გასაკეთებული შედეგი NLP დავალებების დიდი პანზიმი. მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო მუშაო მოდელები, როგორც BERT-ს, ანალიზაციისთვის გააკეთებულია. Existing work finds that syntactic, semantic and word sense knowledge are encoded in BERT. მაგრამ პატარა სამუშაო სიტყვების შესახებ, როგორც ჩინეთი სამუშაო ენებისთვის. ჩვენ ჩინეთანი BERT-ს გამოყენებთ ინფორმაციის სიტყვების სტატისტიკის გამოყენებას და დავაწყენებას, რომ (1) სიტყვების ინფორმაცია BERT-ის გამოყენება; (2) სიტყვების დონეზე სიტყვების ფუნქციები უფრო მეტად საშუალო გამოსახულების სიტყვებში; (3) ბერტიში სიტყვის ფუნქციების გამოყენება განსხვავებულია, რომელიც POS-ს მონიშნულებაში და ყველაზე მეტი სიტყვის ფუნქციების შესაძლებლობა, და ბერტიული ენის ინფრენცია, რომელიც უფრო', 'hu': 'A kontextualizált reprezentációk jelentősen javult eredményeket nyújtanak számos NLP-feladat esetében. Sok munkát szenteltek a reprezentatív modellek, például a BERT által rögzített funkciók elemzésére. A meglévő munkák megállapítják, hogy a szintaktikai, szemantikai és szóérzéki ismeretek a BERT-ben vannak kódolva. Azonban kevés munka vizsgálta a karakternyelvek, mint például a kínai szavak jellemzőit. Vizsgáljuk a kínai BERT-t figyelem súlyelosztási statisztikákkal és mérési feladatokkal egyaránt, megállapítva, hogy (1) szóinformációkat a BERT rögzíti; (2) a szószintű jellemzők többnyire a középső ábrázolási rétegekben vannak; (3) a továbbfelé irányuló feladatok eltérő módon használják a BERT szófunkcióit, a POS-címkézés és a darabolás a legtöbbet a szófunkciókra támaszkodik, a természetes nyelvi következtetés pedig a legkevésbé az ilyen funkciókra támaszkodik.', 'el': 'Οι αναπαραστάσεις του περιβάλλοντος παρέχουν σημαντικά βελτιωμένα αποτελέσματα για ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών. Πολλά έργα έχουν αφιερωθεί στην ανάλυση των χαρακτηριστικών που καταγράφονται από αντιπροσωπευτικά μοντέλα όπως το BERT. Η υπάρχουσα εργασία διαπιστώνει ότι η συντακτική, σημασιολογική και νοητική γνώση των λέξεων κωδικοποιούνται στο BERT. Ωστόσο, λίγη εργασία έχει διερευνήσει χαρακτηριστικά λέξεων για γλώσσες χαρακτήρων όπως τα κινεζικά. Ερευνούμε τα κινεζικά χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο στατιστικά στοιχεία κατανομής βάρους προσοχής όσο και εργασίες ανίχνευσης, διαπιστώνοντας ότι (1) πληροφορίες λέξεων συλλαμβάνονται από το ΒΕΡΤ. (2) τα χαρακτηριστικά επιπέδου λέξεων βρίσκονται κυρίως στα μεσαία στρώματα αναπαράστασης· (3) οι μεταγενέστερες εργασίες χρησιμοποιούν διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά λέξεων στο BERT, με την επισήμανση και την απόσπαση σημείων POS να βασίζονται στο μεγαλύτερο βαθμό σε χαρακτηριστικά λέξεων, και το συμπέρασμα φυσικής γλώσσας να βασίζεται στο ελάχιστο σε αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά.', 'lt': 'Sudėtinės atstovybės gerokai pagerina įvairių NLP užduočių rezultatus. Didelis darbas skirtas tipinių modelių, pavyzdžiui, BERT, požymių analizei. Existing work finds that syntactic, semantic and word sense knowledge are encoded in BERT.  Vis dėlto nedidelis darbas ištyrė žodžių charakteristikas tokioms simbolių kalboms kaip kinų. Mes tiriame Kinijos BERT naudodami tiek dėmesio svorio paskirstymo statistiką, tiek tyrimo užduotis, nustatydami, kad (1) žodžio informaciją gauna BERT; (2) žodžio lygio savybės daugiausia yra viduriniuose reprezentaciniuose sluoksniuose; (3) tolesnėse užduotyse BERT naudojami skirtingi žodžio požymiai, o POS ženklinimas ir dalijimas labiausiai priklauso nuo žodžio požymių, o natūrali kalbos išvada mažiausiai priklauso nuo tokių požymių.', 'it': "Le rappresentazioni contestualizzate forniscono risultati significativamente migliori per un'ampia gamma di attività NLP. Molto lavoro è stato dedicato all'analisi delle caratteristiche catturate da modelli rappresentativi come BERT. Il lavoro esistente rileva che la conoscenza sintattica, semantica e del senso delle parole sono codificate in BERT. Tuttavia, poco lavoro ha indagato le caratteristiche delle parole per le lingue dei caratteri come il cinese. Investighiamo il BERT cinese utilizzando sia statistiche di distribuzione del peso dell'attenzione che compiti di sondaggio, scoprendo che (1) le informazioni sulle parole sono catturate da BERT; (2) le caratteristiche a livello di parola sono principalmente nei livelli medi di rappresentazione; (3) le attività a valle utilizzano in modo diverso le caratteristiche delle parole in BERT, con la marcatura e il chunking POS che si basano maggiormente sulle caratteristiche delle parole, e l'inferenza del linguaggio naturale che si basa meno su tali caratteristiche.", 'mk': 'Контекстуалните претставувања даваат значително подобри резултати за широк опсег на NLP задачи. Многу работа е посветена на анализирањето на карактеристиките зафатени од претставните модели како што е Берт. Постојаната работа покажува дека синтактичкото, семантичното и зборното знаење се кодирано во BERT. Сепак, мала работа ги истражува зборните карактеристики за јазиците на карактеристики како што е кинескиот. Истражуваме Кинески БЕРТ користејќи и статистика за дистрибуција на тежината на вниманието, и истражувајќи задачи, откривајќи дека (1) зборни информации се зафатени од БЕРТ; (2) карактеристиките на ниво на зборови се претежно во средните слоеви на претставување; (3) Надворешните задачи прават различна употреба на зборни карактеристики во БЕРТ, со означување и делење на POS најмногу зависи од зборни карактеристики, и природна инференција на јазик најмалку зависи од вакви карактеристики.', 'kk': 'Контекстік кескіндер NLP тапсырмаларының көпшілік аумағында өте жақсартылған нәтижелерін көрсетеді. BERT секілді негізгі үлгілердің қасиеттерін анализ ету үшін көп жұмыс болды. Бар жұмыс істеген синтактикалық, семантикалық және сөздердің сезімі білімі BERT-де кодтады. Бірақ кішкентай жұмыс қытайша тілдер үшін сөздің мүмкіндігін зерттеді. Біз қытайша BERT дегенді зерттеп, көңіл үлестіру статистикасын және тапсырмаларды тексеру арқылы (1) сөздер мәліметі BERT арқылы түзеді. (2) Сөздің деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктері көбінде ортаңғы түсіндіру қабаттарында; (3) Төмендету тапсырмалары BERT- де сөздің мүмкіндіктерін, POS- тегтері және сөздің мүмкіндіктерінің көпшілігіне көмектесу және табиғи тілдерінің көпшілігі осылай мүмкіндіктеріне қа', 'ms': 'Perwakilan konteks memberikan keputusan yang lebih baik untuk julat lebar tugas NLP. Banyak kerja telah didedikasikan untuk menganalisis ciri-ciri yang ditangkap oleh model mewakili seperti BERT. Kerja yang wujud mencari bahawa pengetahuan sintaktik, semantik dan perasaan perkataan dikodifikasikan dalam BERT. Namun, sedikit kerja telah menyelidiki fitur perkataan untuk bahasa aksara seperti Cina. Kami menyelidiki BERT Cina menggunakan kedua-dua statistik distribusi berat perhatian dan tugas penyelidikan, mencari bahawa (1) maklumat perkataan ditangkap oleh BERT; (2) ciri-ciri aras-perkataan adalah kebanyakan dalam lapisan perwakilan tengah; (3) tugas turun membuat penggunaan berbeza bagi ciri-ciri perkataan dalam BERT, dengan tag POS dan potongan bergantung paling pada ciri-ciri perkataan, dan kesimpulan bahasa alami bergantung sekurang-kurangnya pada ciri-ciri seperti itu.', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati jagħtu riżultati a ħjar b’mod sinifikanti għal firxa wiesgħa ta’ kompiti NLP. Ħafna xogħol ġie ddedikat għall-analiżi tal-karatteristiċi maqbuda minn mudelli rappreżentattivi bħall-BERT. Ix-xogħol eżistenti jsib li l-għarfien sintattiku, semantiku u tas-sens tal-kliem huwa kkodifikat fil-BERT. Madankollu, ftit xogħol investiga karatteristiċi tal-kelma għal lingwi tal-karattri bħaċ-Ċiniż. Aħna ninvestigaw il-BERT Ċiniż bl-użu kemm tal-istatistika tad-distribuzzjoni tal-piż tal-attenzjoni kif ukoll tal-kompiti ta’ sondaġġ, u nsibu li (1) informazzjoni bil-kelma tinqabad mill-BERT; (2) il-karatteristiċi fil-livell tal-kliem huma l-aktar fis-saffi ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tan-nofs; (3) ix-xogħlijiet downstream jagħmlu użu differenti tal-karatteristiċi tal-kliem fil-BERT, bit-tikkettar u l-qsim tal-POS jiddependu l-aktar fuq il-karatteristiċi tal-kliem, u l-inferenza tal-lingwa naturali tiddependi l-inqas fuq dawn il-karatteristiċi.', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн үзүүлэлт нь NLP даалгаварын олон хэсэгт маш сайжруулсан үр дүнг өгдөг. БЕРТ гэх мэт загварын загваруудын дүрсийг шинжилгээнд олон ажил зориулсан. Ингээд байгаа ажил нь синтактик, semantic, үг мэдрэмжтэй мэдлэг БЕРТ-д кодлогдсон гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Гэхдээ жижиг ажил Хятад хэл шиг харьцааны хэлнүүдийн тухай үгийг судалсан. Бид Хятад БЕРТ-г анхаарлын жингийн хуваарилалтын статистик болон шалгалтын ажлыг ашиглан судалгаагаар (1) үг мэдээллийг БЕРТ-ээр барьж байна. (2) үгний түвшинд ихэнхдээ дундаж үзүүлэлтийн давхарт байдаг. (3) Доорх даалгаварууд нь BERT-д сөрөг чадварыг өөр өөрчлөгдөж, POS-г тэмдэглэж, хэлний чадварыг хамгийн ихэнхдээ итгэдэг, байгалийн хэл халдвар нь хамгийн бага нь ийм чадварууд дээр итгэдэг.', 'ml': 'എംഎല്\u200dപി ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വിശാലമായി മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നു. പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പിടികൂടിയ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ജോലി ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ജോലി കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക്ക്, സെമാന്റിക്കും വാക്കുകളുടെ വിവരങ എന്നാലും, ചൈനീസ് പോലുള്ള അക്ഷരഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ട്. നമ്മള്\u200d ചൈനീസ് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഭാരം വിതരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചും ജോലികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ വാ (2) വാക്ക്- നില വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d മദ്ധ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ തട്ടിലാണ്; (3) താഴെ നദിയിലെ ജോലികള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, പോസ് ടാഗിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു, വാക്കിന്റെ വിശേഷതകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വി', 'no': 'Kontekstualiserte representasjonar gjev signifikante forbetra resultat for eit brett område av NLP- oppgåver. Mange arbeid er spesifisert for å analysera funksjonane som er henta av representativee modeller som BERT. Det eksisterande arbeidet finn at kunnskap for syntaktisk, semantisk og ordfølelse er koda i BERT. Dette har imidlertid liten arbeid undersøkt ordfunksjonar for teiknspråk som kinesisk. Vi undersøker kinesisk BERT med både oppmerksomhetsstatistikk for vektsdistribusjon og prøver oppgåver, og finn at (1) ordinformasjon vert henta av BERT. (2) Ordnivåfunksjonar er hovudsakelig i dei midtre representasjonslage. (3) nedstrømmeoppgåver gjer ulike bruk av ordfunksjonar i BERT, med POS-merking og bryting som tilhøyrer dei meste på ordfunksjonar, og naturspråk-infeksjon som tilhøyrer minst på slike funksjonar.', 'pl': 'Kontekstualizowane reprezentacje dają znacznie lepsze wyniki dla szerokiego zakresu zadań NLP. Wiele pracy poświęcono analizie funkcji uchwyconych przez reprezentatywne modele, takie jak BERT. Istniejące prace stwierdzają, że wiedza składniowa, semantyczna i słowowa jest zakodowana w BERT. Jednak niewiele prac badało cechy słowa dla języków znakowych, takich jak chiński. Badamy chiński BERT, wykorzystując zarówno statystyki rozkładu wagi uwagi, jak i zadania sondujące, stwierdzając, że (1) informacje słowa są przechwytywane przez BERT; (2) funkcje na poziomie słów znajdują się głównie w środkowych warstwach reprezentacji; (3) dalsze zadania różnią się wykorzystywaniem funkcji słowa w BERT, przy czym tagowanie i fragmentowanie POS opierają się najbardziej na funkcjach słowa, a wnioskowanie języka naturalnego opiera się w najmniejszym stopniu na takich funkcjach.', 'ro': 'Reprezentările contextualizate oferă rezultate semnificativ îmbunătățite pentru o gamă largă de activități PNL. Multă muncă a fost dedicată analizării caracteristicilor capturate de modele reprezentative precum BERT. Lucrările existente constată că cunoștințele sintactice, semantice și simțurile cuvintelor sunt codificate în BERT. Cu toate acestea, puține lucrări au investigat caracteristicile cuvintelor pentru limbile caractere, cum ar fi chineza. Investigăm BERT chinezesc folosind atât statistici de distribuție a greutății atenției, cât și sarcini de sondare, constatând că (1) informațiile cuvintelor sunt capturate de BERT; (2) caracteristicile la nivel de cuvinte sunt în principal în straturile de reprezentare mijlocie; (3) sarcinile din aval utilizează în mod diferit caracteristicile cuvintelor din BERT, etichetarea și împărțirea POS bazându-se cel mai mult pe caracteristicile cuvintelor, iar inferența limbajului natural bazându-se cel mai puțin pe astfel de caracteristici.', 'sr': 'Kontekstualizirani predstavnici daju značajno poboljšane rezultate za širok niz NLP zadataka. Mnogo posla je posvećeno analiziranju karakteristika koje su uhvaćene predstavnim modelima kao što su BERT. Postojeći rad nalazi se da su sintaktički, semantički i osjećajni znanje kodirane u BERT-u. Međutim, mali rad je istražio karakteristike reči za jezike karaktera kao što su kineski. Istražujemo kinesku BERT koristeći statistiku distribucije težine pažnje i istraživanje zadataka, otkrivajući da (1) informacije o rečima uhvate BERT; (2) karakteristike razine riječi uglavnom su u srednjim slojevima predstavljanja; (3) Najnoviji zadatak koristi različite karakteristike reči u BERT-u, sa označavanjem i naglašavanjem POS-a koji se najviše oslanjaju na karakteristike reči, i prirodne jezičke infekcije koje se najmanje oslanjaju na takve karakteristike.', 'so': 'Dhaqaalaha la xiriiray waxay si aad ah u hagaajiyaan resultooyin aad u fiican oo ah shaqaalaha NLP oo kala duduwan. Shaqo badan waxaa loo baahan yahay in loo baarayo qalabka wakiilka sida BERT. Shaqo la joogo wuxuu ka helaa in aqoonta waxyaabaha la xiriira ee la xiriira, mid-ka-sooc iyo hadalka lagu hadlo ay ku qoran yihiin BERT. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqo yar ayaa baaritaanta hadalka ku saabsan luqadaha xarafka sida Shiino. Waxaynu baaraynaa xarumaha kala qaybinta miisaanka iyo baaritaanka shaqada ee Shiinaha BERT, waxaynu ka baaraynaa macluumaadka ku saabsan (1) hadalka BERT; (2) Xirfaha heerka ee hadalka waxaa inta badan ku yaala xarumaha qaabilaadda dhexe; (3) Shaqooyinka hoose-durka waxay ka samaysaa isticmaalka hadalka oo kala duduwan ee BERT, oo ay POS ku baaraandegaan iyo ku kalsoonaaneyso si ugu badan hadalka, iyo cudurada afka dabiicadda ah ee ugu yaraan waxyaabaha caynkaas ah.', 'sv': 'Kontextualiserade representationer ger avsevärt förbättrade resultat för ett brett spektrum av NLP-uppgifter. Mycket arbete har ägnats åt att analysera de funktioner som fångats av representativa modeller som BERT. Befintligt arbete visar att syntaktisk, semantisk och ordsinneskunskap kodas i BERT. Men lite arbete har undersökt ordfunktioner för teckenspråk som kinesiska. Vi undersöker kinesisk BERT med hjälp av både uppmärksamhetsviktsfördelningsstatistik och sonderingsuppgifter, och konstaterar att (1) ordinformation fångas upp av BERT; (2) Funktioner på ordnivå är mestadels i de mittersta representationslagren. (3) Nedåtgående uppgifter använder ordfunktioner i BERT på olika sätt, med POS-märkning och -chunking som mest bygger på ordfunktioner, och naturliga språkslutsatser som minst bygger på sådana funktioner.', 'ta': 'சூழலாக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்புகள் NLP வேலைகளுக்கு மிக மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை கொடுக்கிறது. பிரெட் போன்ற பிரதிநிதி மாதிரிகள் பிடித்துக் கொண்ட பண்புகளை ஆய்வு செய்ய பல பணிகள் தனிப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. இருக்கும் வேலையை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிரெட்டில் ஒத்திசைவு, பாதிப்பு மற்றும் வார்த்தை அறிவு குறியீ ஆனால், சீனா போன்ற எழுத்து மொழிகளுக்கு சிறிய வேலை சொல்லின் குணங்களை ஆய்வு செய்துள்ளது. நாங்கள் இரு கவனத்தின் எடை பங்கீட்டு புள்ளிவிவரங்களையும் பயன்படுத்தி சீனம் பிரெட் வார்த்தை தகவல் பிடித்துக் கொண்டு தேடுக (2) சொல்- மட்டத்தின் குணங்கள் அதிக மத்திய குறிப்பு அடுக்குகளில் உள்ளன; (3) கீழ்கண்ணீர் பணிகள் BERT ல் வேறு வார்த்தைகளின் குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தும், POS குறிக்கும் மற்றும் வார்த்தை குணங்களில் அதிகமாக நம்புகிறது, மற்றும்', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිනිස්ථාපනයක් NLP වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් වැඩ ගොඩක් වැඩක් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ BERT වගේ ප්\u200dරධාන මොඩේල් වලින් අල්ලගත්ත අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය තියෙන්නේ වැඩේ හොයාගන්නවා කියලා සංකේතික, සැමැන්ටික් සහ වචන දැනය BERT වලින් කොඩ් කරලා තියෙනවා. නමුත්, පොඩි වැඩක් චීනි භාෂාව වගේ වචන වචන වචන වලට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙනවා. අපි චීනී BERT පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා බලාපොරොත්තු බලාපොරොත්තු පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය වැඩක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ (2) වචන ස්ථානය සලකුණු විශේෂය ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ස්ථානයේ; (3) පහළු වැඩක් BERT වලින් වචන අවශ්\u200dය භාවිත කරනවා, POS ටැගින් සහ චංකින් වචන අවශ්\u200dය වලින් අවශ්\u200dය භාවිතාවය සහ ස්වභාවිත භ', 'ur': 'کنٹکسٹولیز نمایش NLP کے کاموں کے لئے بہت زیادہ اچھے نتائج دیتے ہیں. بہت سی کام کی تعلیم کی گئی ہے کہ BERT کے مطابق نمائندس نمائندل کے ذریعے پکڑے ہوئے فرصت تحقیق کرنے کے لئے۔ Existing work finds that syntactic, semantic and word sense knowledge is encoded in BERT. لیکن بہت کم کام نے کلمات کی تعریف کی ہے جیسے چینی زبانوں کے لئے۔ ہم چینی BERT کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں توجه وزن تقسیم آمار اور تاسکیوں کی تحقیق کے مطابق، دیکھتے ہیں کہ (1) کلمات معلومات BERT سے پکڑی جاتی ہے۔ (2) لفظ سطح کی تعریف اکثر وسط نمایش لفظ میں ہیں۔ (3) نیچے پاؤنٹریم کے کام BERT میں لفظوں کا فائدہ مختلف کر رہے ہیں، اس کے ساتھ POS ٹاگ اور چانچ کے ساتھ لفظوں پر سب سے زیادہ بھروسہ کر رہے ہیں، اور نطبیعی زبان کا فائدہ ایسے فائدہ پر کم بھروسہ رکھتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name Bir necha ishni BERT kabi representant modellarining xususiyatlarini aniqlash uchun ishlaydi. Mavjud vazifalar BERT\'da sintaktik, semantik va so\'zlar haqida maʼlumotni kodlash mumkin. Lekin, kichkina ishni Xitoycha kabi harflar tilning xossalarini o\'rganadi. Biz Xitoycha BERT ta\'minlovchi taʼminotni boshqarish statistikasi va vazifalarni aniqlash imkoniyatini o\'rganamiz va "1" so\'zlari BERT tomonidan olingan deb o\'rganamiz; (2) Soʻz- darajadagi moslamalar katta taʼminlovchi qatlamdagi moslamalar; Name', 'vi': 'Các biểu hiện hiện hiện hiện hiện hiện tương ứng có hiệu quả cải thiện đáng kể cho một loạt công việc. Đã có rất nhiều công việc nghiên cứu các yếu tố được chụp bởi các mô hình đại diện như BERT. Việc tồn tại thấy rằng kiến thức cấu trúc văn học, ngữ pháp và khái niệm chữ được mã hóa qua BERT. Tuy nhiên, ít việc nghiên cứu các tính năng từ cho ngôn ngữ đặc trưng như Trung Quốc. Chúng tôi điều tra BERT của Trung Quốc, sử dụng cả các loại chính sách phân phối trọng lượng tập trung và các công việc thăm dò, phát hiện ra (1) thông tin từ được nuôi bởi BERT; (2) Các tính năng từ cấp hầu hết nằm trong các lớp đại diện trung bình. (3) các công việc xuôi dòng sử dụng các tính năng từ trong giao kèo, với dấu hiệu của trường và thiết lập bằng cách dựa vào các tính năng từ, và ngụ ý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên ít nhất dựa trên các tính năng đó.', 'bg': 'Контекстualiзираните представяния дават значително подобрени резултати за широк спектър от задачи за НЛО. Много работа е посветена на анализирането на характеристиките, заловени от представителни модели като BERT. Съществуващата работа установява, че синтактичното, семантичното и словочувството знание са кодирани в BERT. Въпреки това, малко работа е изследвала характеристиките на думите за езици на знаци като китайски. Ние изследваме китайския БЕРТ, като използваме както статистика за разпределение на теглото на вниманието, така и задачи за сондиране, като установим, че (1) информацията за думите се улавя от БЕРТ; (2) характеристиките на ниво дума са предимно в средните слоеве на представяне; (3) задачите надолу по веригата използват различно функциите на думите в BERT, като маркирането и групирането на ПОС разчитат най-много на функциите на думите, а изводите на естествения език разчитат най-малко на такива функции.', 'nl': 'Gecontextualiseerde representaties geven aanzienlijk verbeterde resultaten voor een breed scala aan NLP-taken. Er is veel werk besteed aan het analyseren van de functies die zijn vastgelegd door representatieve modellen zoals BERT. Uit bestaand werk blijkt dat syntactische, semantische en woordzinnige kennis gecodeerd zijn in BERT. Er is echter weinig onderzoek gedaan naar woordeigenschappen voor karaktertalen zoals Chinees. We onderzoeken Chinese BERT met behulp van aandachtsgewichtsverdeling statistieken en tastende taken, waarbij we vaststellen dat (1) woordinformatie wordt vastgelegd door BERT; (2) de kenmerken op woordniveau bevinden zich meestal in de middelste representatielagen; (3) downstreamtaken maken verschillend gebruik van woordfuncties in BERT, waarbij POS tagging en chunking het meest afhankelijk zijn van woordkenmerken, en natuurlijke taalinferentie het minst afhankelijk is van dergelijke functies.', 'da': 'Kontekstualiserede repræsentationer giver betydeligt forbedrede resultater for en lang række NLP-opgaver. Meget arbejde er blevet dedikeret til at analysere de funktioner, der er fanget af repræsentative modeller som BERT. Eksisterende arbejde konstaterer, at syntaktisk, semantisk og ordsanselig viden er kodet i BERT. Ikke meget arbejde har imidlertid undersøgt ordfunktioner for tegnsprog som kinesisk. Vi undersøger kinesisk BERT ved hjælp af både opmærksomhedsvægtfordelingsstatistik og sonderingsopgaver, og konstaterer, at (1) ordoplysninger indsamles af BERT; (2) ordniveau funktioner er for det meste i de midterste repræsentationslag; (3) downstream-opgaver gør forskellig brug af ordfunktioner i BERT, idet POS-mærkning og -chunking er mest afhængig af ordfunktioner, og naturlige sprogkonklusioner er mindst afhængige af sådanne funktioner.', 'hr': 'Kontekstualizirani predstavnici daju značajno poboljšane rezultate za širok raspon zadataka NLP-a. Mnogo je posla posvećeno analiziranju karakteristika koje su uhvaćene predstavnim modelima poput BERT-a. Postojeći rad nalazi se da su znanje sintaktičkog, semantičkog i smisla riječi kodirane u BERT-u. Međutim, mali rad je istraživao riječi za karakterske jezike poput Kineskog. Istražujemo kinesku BERT koristeći statistiku distribucije težine pažnje i obaveze istraživanja, otkrivajući da (1) informacije o riječima uhvate BERT; (2) karakteristike razine riječi uglavnom su u srednjim slojevima zastupanja; (3) Dužni zadatak koristi različite karakteristike riječi u BERT-u, s označavanjem POS-a i naglašavanjem najviše na karakteristike riječi, i prirodne jezičke infekcije koje se najmanje oslanjaju na takve karakteristike.', 'id': 'Perwakilan kontekstualisasi memberikan hasil yang lebih baik untuk jangkauan lebar tugas NLP. Much work has been dedicated to analyzing the features captured by representative models such as BERT.  Pekerjaan yang ada menemukan bahwa pengetahuan sintaksi, semantis dan perasaan kata dikodeksi dalam BERT. Namun, sedikit pekerjaan telah menyelidiki fitur kata untuk bahasa karakter seperti bahasa Cina. Kami menyelidiki BERT Cina menggunakan kedua statistik distribusi berat perhatian dan tugas penyelidikan, menemukan bahwa (1) informasi kata ditangkap oleh BERT; (2) karakteristik tingkat kata kebanyakan berada di lapisan representation tengah; (3) tugas turun membuat penggunaan berbeda dari karakteristik kata dalam BERT, dengan tanda POS dan potongan bergantung paling pada karakteristik kata, dan kesimpulan bahasa alami bergantung paling sedikit pada karakteristik tersebut.', 'de': 'Kontextualisierte Darstellungen liefern deutlich verbesserte Ergebnisse für eine Vielzahl von NLP-Aufgaben. Viel Arbeit wurde der Analyse der Merkmale gewidmet, die von repräsentativen Modellen wie BERT erfasst wurden. Bisherige Arbeiten zeigen, dass syntaktisches, semantisches und Wortsinnwissen in BERT kodiert sind. Allerdings wurde wenig Arbeit mit Wortmerkmalen für Zeichensprachen wie Chinesisch untersucht. Wir untersuchen chinesisches BERT mit Hilfe von Aufmerksamkeitsgewichtsverteilungsstatistiken und Sondierungsaufgaben, wobei wir feststellen, dass (1) Wortinformationen von BERT erfasst werden; (2) Funktionen auf Wortebene befinden sich meist in den mittleren Darstellungsebenen; (3) Downstream-Aufgaben verwenden Wortfunktionen in BERT unterschiedlich, wobei POS-Tagging und Chunking am meisten auf Wortfunktionen basieren, und natürliche Sprachinferenzen am wenigsten auf solche Funktionen.', 'ko': '언어 환경화된 표현 방식은 각종 NLP 임무의 결과를 현저하게 개선할 수 있다.일반적인 모델(예: BERT)이 캡처한 피쳐를 분석하는 데 많은 노력을 기울이고 있습니다.기존 연구에서 문법, 어의와 어의 지식은 모두 BERT에 인코딩된 것으로 나타났다.그러나 한자 언어(예를 들어 중국어)의 어휘 특징을 연구하는 것은 거의 없다.우리는 주의권 중분포 통계와 탐지 임무 두 가지 방법으로 중국어 BERT를 연구하여 (1) BERT가 단어 정보를 포착한 것을 발견했다.(2) 어급 특징은 대부분 중간 표시층에 위치한다.(3) BERT에서 하위 작업은 단어의 특징에 대한 사용이 다르기 때문에 어성 표시와 블록은 단어의 특징에 가장 의존하고 자연 언어 추리는 이러한 특징에 가장 의존하지 않는다.', 'fa': 'نمایش\u200cهای متوسط به عنوان نتیجه\u200cهای بسیار بهتر برای مجموعه عملیات NLP می\u200cدهند. کارهای زیادی برای تحلیل ویژگی\u200cهایی که توسط مدل\u200cهای نماینده\u200cای مانند BERT دستگیر شده\u200cاند، به عنوان تحلیل داده شده است. کار موجود پیدا می\u200cکند که علم سنتاکتیک، سنتاکتیک و احساس کلمه در BERT Encoded می\u200cشوند. ولی کار کوچک برای زبانهای شخصیت مثل چینی تحقیق کرده است. ما با استفاده از статистика توزیع وزن توجه و وظیفه\u200cهای تحقیق کردن توجه به چینی BERT تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، و پیدا می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات کلمه (۱) توسط BERT گرفته می\u200cشود. (۲) ویژگی\u200cهای سطح کلمه بیشتر در سطح نمایش وسط هستند. (3) کارهای پایین پایین استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای کلمات مختلف در BERT می\u200cکنند، با نقاشی POS و نقاشی که بیشتر بر ویژه\u200cهای کلمات تسلیم می\u200cشوند، و بیماری زبان طبیعی که حداقل بر این ویژه\u200cها تسلیم می\u200cشوند.', 'tr': "Çap täzelikleri NLP täzelikleri üçin örän uly täzelikleri üçin örän gowylaşdyrylýar. BERT ýaly reprezental nusgalar tarapyndan ýazylan hatlary çözmek üçin köp işe bejerilýär. Öň bar işi BERT'da syntaktik, semantik we söz duýgularyň bilgi kodlanýandygyny görer. Ýöne kiçi iş hyt dilleri ýaly karakter dilleri üçin sözlerini inceledi. Biz Çinçe BERT'i hem üns beren taýýarlama statistiklerini we zadlary barlap, BERT tarapyndan (1) söz maglumatyny tapylýarys; (2) söz düzeyi özellikleri orta temsil katlarynda köplenç; (3) Açyk täblikler BERT'da söz özelliklerini ulanýar, POS-iň köp söz özelliklerinde gürrüňde taýýarlar we tebigy diliň iň az möhümlerine taýýarlar.", 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesit e kontekstuar japin rezultate të përmirësuara ndjeshëm për një gamë të gjerë detyrash NLP. Shumë punë është dedikuar për analizën e karakteristikave të kapura nga modele përfaqësuese të tilla si BERT. Puna ekzistuese gjen se njohuria sintaktike, semantike dhe e kuptimit të fjalës janë koduar në BERT. Megjithatë, pak punë ka hetuar karakteristikat e fjalëve për gjuhët e karaktereve të tilla si kinezët. We investigate Chinese BERT using both attention weight distribution statistics and probing tasks, finding that (1) word information is captured by BERT;  (2) karakteristikat e nivelit të fjalëve janë kryesisht në nivelet e përfaqësimit të mesëm; (3) Detyrat poshtë rrjedhës bëjnë përdorim të ndryshëm të karakteristikave të fjalëve në BERT, me etiketën e POS dhe copëzimin e mbështetur më së shumti në karakteristikat e fjalëve dhe përfundimin natyror të gjuhës mbështetur më së paku në karakteristikat e tilla.', 'sw': 'Maandamano yaliyohusishwa yanatoa matokeo maboresho makubwa ya kazi nyingi za NLP. Kazi nyingi imejitenga kuchambua vipengele vilivyochukuliwa na mifano kama vile BERT. Kazi inayoendelea inagundua kuwa maarifa ya ushirikiano, semantic na maneno yanajumuishwa huko BERT. Hata hivyo, kazi ndogo imechunguza vipengele vya maneno kwa lugha za wahusika kama vile Kichina. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa BERT wa China kwa kutumia takwimu za usambazaji wa uzito na kufanya kazi za kuthibitisha, tunagundua kuwa taarifa (1) ya neno linakamatwa na BERT; (2) Tafsiri za kiwango cha maneno zaidi katika vipande vya uwakilizaji wa kati; (3) Kazi za mito za chini zinatengeneza matumizi tofauti ya maneno huko BERT, kwa kutumia mabango ya POS na kufungia kutegemea zaidi kwenye vipengele vya maneno, na uvumilivu wa lugha ya asili unaotumia kidogo kwenye vipengele hivi.', 'af': "Konteksualiseerde voorstellings gee betekeurig verbeterde resultate vir 'n wyde omvang van NLP opdragte. Baie werk is gespesifiseer om die funksies wat deur reprezentante modele geneem word te analyseer soos BERT. Bestaande werk vind dat sintaktieke, semantiese en woordesens kennis in BERT gekodeer word. Maar, die klein werk het die woord eienskappe vir karaktertaals soos Sjinees ondersoek. Ons ondersoek Sjinese BERT met beide aanmerksgewig verspreidingsstatistiek en probeer opdragte, vind dat (1) woord inligting deur BERT gevang word; (2) woord-vlak-funksies is meeste in die middelste verteenwoordelaag; en (3) Onderstremde opdragte maak verskillende gebruik van woord funksies in BERT, met POS-etiketting en die meeste verwagting van woord funksies en natuurlike taal-inferensie wat die minste op sodanige funksies vertrou.", 'az': "Üstünlük göstəricilər NLP işlərinin geniş səviyyəsi üçün çox xeyirli nəticələri verir. BERT kimi göstərici modellər tarafından alınan fəaliyyətləri analizə etmək üçün çox iş təyin edildi. Əvvəlki işdə sintaktik, semantik və sözlərin elmi BERT-də kodlanmışdır. Lakin kiçik işlər Çin kimi məqsəd dillərinin sözlərini incidir. Biz Çinli BERT'u təşkil dağıtma statistiklərini və işləri təşkil edərək təşkil edirik, bu söz məlumatı BERT tarafından tutulur. (2) Söz səviyyəsi xüsusiyyətləri çox orta göstəricisi səviyyələrindədir; (3) Aşağıdakı işlər BERT içində söz özelliklərini, POS etiketləri və söz özelliklərinə ən çox təvəkkül edir və təbiətli dillərin dəyişikliklərinə ən az təvəkkül edir.", 'am': 'በተጨማሪው የNLP ስራዎችን በተለየ ውጤቶች ትክክል እንዲሰጥተዋል፡፡ ብዙ ሥራ እንደ BERT የሚመስሉትን የፖስቲካ ሞዴላዎችን ለማስተዋል ተደግሟል፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥራ የሲንተርክ፣ የsemantic እና የንግግር እውቀት በBERT ውስጥ ሆኖአል ማለትን ያገኛል፡፡ ነገር ግን ትንሽ ሥራ እንደ ቻይና ያሉትን የፊደል ቋንቋዎች ቃላትን መርምረዋል፡፡ We investigate Chinese BERT using both attention weight distribution statistics and probing tasks, finding that (1) word information is captured by BERT;  (2) የቃላት-ደረጃ ምርጫዎች በመካከለኛው ክፍል ላይ ናቸው; (3) የውኃው ስራዎች በBERT ላይ የቃላትን የፊደል ቅርጽ እና የPOS ማተሚያ እና በንግግር ግንኙነት ላይ በመጠቀም እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ውጤት በሚያነሳው በአካባቢው ግንኙነት ላይ በማንሹ የሚጠቅመውን እና በመጠቀም ይጨምሩበታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Կոնտեքստալիզացված ներկայացումները նշանակալի բարելավված արդյունքներ են տալիս ՆԼՊ խնդիրների լայն տարբերակի համար: Շատ աշխատանք է նվիրված վերլուծելու հատկանիշներին, որոնք նկարահանվում են ներկայացուցիչ մոդելների, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը: Գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքը հայտնաբերում է, որ սինտակտիկ, սեմանտիկ և բառային զգացողության գիտելիքները կոդավորված են BER-ում: Այնուամենայնիվ, քիչ աշխատանք է ուսումնասիրել այնպիսի բառերի հատկանիշներ, ինչպիսիք են չինական լեզուները: We investigate Chinese BERT using both attention weight distribution statistics and probing tasks, finding that (1) word information is captured by BERT;  (2) բառի մակարդակի առանձնահատկությունները գտնվում են մեջտեղի ներկայացման շերտերում, (3) ներքևի աշխատանքները տարբեր կերպ են օգտագործում բառի հատկանիշները BER-ում, POS-ի նշանները և բառերի բաժինները հիմնված են առավել բառերի հատկանիշների վրա, և բնական լեզվի եզրակացությունը հիմնված է առավել քիչ նման հատկանի', 'bn': 'বিস্তৃত প্রতিনিধিত্বে এনএলপি কাজের জন্য ব্যাপক উন্নত ফলাফল প্রদান করে। প্রতিনিধি মডেল, যেমন বাইরেট। বিদ্যমান কাজ খুঁজে পাচ্ছে যে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক, সেমেন্টিক এবং শব্দের জ্ঞান বিবের্টে এনকোড করা হয়েছে। তবে ছোট কাজ চীনা ভাষার ক্ষেত্রে শব্দের বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুসন্ধান করেছে। আমরা চীনা বার্টিকে তদন্ত করি উভয় ওজন বিতরণ পরিসংখ্যান এবং কাজের পরীক্ষা ব্যবহার করে এবং দেখা যাচ্ছি যে (১) শব্দ তথ্য বিবের্টে (2) শব্দ-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য মধ্যপ্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে বেশীরভাগ; (৩) নিচে নদীর কাজ বিবের্টে শব্দের বিভিন্ন ব্যবহার করে, পোস ট্যাগিং এবং বিশ্বাস করে শব্দের বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর সবচেয়ে বেশী নির্ভর করে এবং প্রাকৃতিক', 'ca': "Les representacions contextuals donen resultats significativament millorats per a una gran gamma de tasques de NLP. S'ha dedicat molta feina a analitzar les característiques capturades per models representatius com BERT. La feina existent troba que el coneixement sinàctic, semàntic i de sentit de paraules està codificat en BERT. No obstant això, poca feina ha investigat característiques de paraules per a llengües de caràcter com el xinès. Investiguem el BERT xinès fent servir estadístiques de distribució de pes d'atenció i investigant tasques, descobrint que (1) la informació de paraula és capturada per BERT; (2) les característiques del nivell de paraules estan principalment a les capes de representació mitjana; (3) Les tasques avall fan un ús diferent de les característiques de les paraules a BERT, amb etiquetes POS i trossos més confiant en les característiques de les paraules, i la inferència natural de la llengua que es basa al menys en aquestes característiques.", 'bs': 'Kontekstualizirani predstavnici pružaju značajno poboljšane rezultate za širok niz NLP zadataka. Mnogo posla je posvećeno analiziranju karakteristika koje su uhvaćene predstavnim modelima poput BERT. Postojeći rad nalazi se da su sintaktične, semantične i riječne znanje kodirane u BERT-u. Međutim, mali rad je istraživao karakteristike riječi za jezike karaktera poput kineskog. Istražujemo kinesku BERT koristeći statistiku distribucije težine pažnje i istraživanje zadataka, otkrivajući da je (1) informacija riječi uhvatila BERT; (2) karakteristike razine riječi uglavnom su u srednjim slojevima predstavljanja; (3) Najnoviji zadatak koristi različite karakteristike riječi u BERT-u, s označavanjem i udaranjem POS-a koji se najviše oslanjaju na karakteristike riječi, i prirodne jezičke infekcije koje se najmanje oslanjaju na takve karakteristike.', 'cs': 'Kontextualizované reprezentace poskytují výrazně lepší výsledky pro širokou škálu úloh NLP. Hodně práce byla věnována analýze funkcí zachycených reprezentativními modely, jako je BERT. Stávající práce zjišťuje, že syntaktické, sémantické a slovní znalosti jsou kódovány v BERT. Nicméně málo práce zkoumalo slovní vlastnosti pro znakové jazyky, jako je čínština. Vyšetřujeme čínský BERT pomocí statistik rozložení hmotnosti pozornosti a sondovacích úkolů a zjišťujeme, že (1) slovní informace jsou zachyceny BERT; (2) funkce na úrovni slov jsou většinou ve středních vrstvách reprezentace; (3) následné úlohy využívají slovní funkce v BERT odlišně, přičemž značení POS a členění se nejvíce spoléhá na slovní funkce a inference přirozeného jazyka se nejméně spoléhá na tyto funkce.', 'et': 'Kontekstiliseeritud esitused annavad oluliselt paremaid tulemusi mitmesuguste uue tööprogrammi ülesannete puhul. Palju tööd on pühendatud selliste representatiivsete mudelite nagu BERT poolt saadud funktsioonide analüüsimisele. Olemasolevad tööd leiavad, et süntaktilised, semantilised ja sõnatundlikud teadmised on kodeeritud BERT-is. Kuid vähe tööd on uurinud sõna omadusi märgikeelte nagu hiina keel. Me uurime hiina BERT-i, kasutades nii tähelepanu kaalujaotuse statistikat kui ka prooviülesandeid, leides, et (1) sõnateave on BERT-i poolt kogutud; (2) sõnataseme tunnused on enamasti keskmistes esituskihites; (3) alljärgnevates ülesannetes kasutatakse BERT-is erinevalt sõnafunktsioone, kusjuures POS-i sildistamine ja tükkimine sõnafunktsioonidele tugineb kõige rohkem ning looduskeele järeldused kõige vähem sellistele funktsioonidele.', 'fi': 'Konteksturoidut esitykset antavat huomattavasti parempia tuloksia useille NLP-tehtäville. Edustavien mallien, kuten BERTin, kuvaamien ominaisuuksien analysointiin on panostettu paljon. Nykyisessä työssä havaitaan, että syntaktinen, semanttinen ja sanaaistitieto on koodattu BERT:iin. Kuitenkin vähän työtä on tutkittu sanaominaisuuksia merkkikielillä, kuten kiina. Tutkimme kiinalaista BERT:tä sekä huomiopainon jakautumista koskevien tilastojen että luotaustehtävien avulla, ja havaitsemme, että (1) sanatiedot tallentuvat BERT:n toimesta; (2) sanatason ominaisuudet ovat enimmäkseen keskimmäisissä esitystasoissa; (3) loppupään tehtävissä käytetään BERTin sanaominaisuuksia eri tavoin, kun POS-tunnisteet ja lohkotus perustuvat eniten sanaominaisuuksiin ja luonnollisen kielen päättely vähiten tällaisiin ominaisuuksiin.', 'sk': 'Kontekstulizirane predstavitve dajejo znatno izboljšane rezultate za širok spekter opravil NLP. Veliko dela je bilo namenjenega analizi funkcij, ki jih zajemajo reprezentativni modeli, kot je BERT. Obstoječe delo ugotavlja, da so sintaktično, semantično in besedno znanje kodirano v BERT. Vendar pa je malo dela raziskoval besedne značilnosti za znakovne jezike, kot je kitajščina. Kitajski BERT raziskujemo tako s statistiko porazdelitve teže pozornosti kot z opravili sondiranja, ugotovimo, da (1) besedne informacije zajame BERT; (2) značilnosti besedne ravni so večinoma v srednjih plasteh predstavitve; (3) nadaljnja opravila v programu BERT različno uporabljajo besedne funkcije, pri čemer se označevanje in sestavljanje POS najbolj opira na besedne funkcije, sklepanje naravnega jezika pa najmanj opira na takšne funkcije.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis An ƙayyade aiki mai yawa dõmin a yi anadi ga misãlai masu tsari kamar BERT. Yin aikin da ke gaba, yana gane cewa an kode sanin sanyi na syntactic, semantic da magana cikin BERT. A lokacin da, aikin kaɗan ya gane wasu fassarar magana wa lugha kamar China. Ina tambayi BERT na China game da statistics na gauraya masu nau'i da kuma masu jarraba aiki, kuma munã gane cewa ana kãma maganar (1) da BERT; (2) Furofati masu maganar-daraja ne mafi yawa cikin zanen mai nuna tsakanin; (3) Tayinin da ke ƙaranci na ƙarƙashi, za'a samu amfani da wasu masu amfani da magana cikin BERT, da shirin taging and Chunking da ke ƙayyade mafi yawanci ga masu hushi na magana, da kuma kada-ƙunci da harshe na natura sun yi ƙayyade da ƙayyade kan wannan feature.", 'jv': 'LP Umuh sing ngeweh dilakon kanggo ngeralasi perusahaan neng model repréntasi sing nyelarane ning BERT Bali gambar ditambah kuwi nggambar sinaksi, sematik lan ngerasahan seneng pisan kelas nggo koder nggo BERT. Jupuk, akeh gunane saiki akeh nyokot ujian akeh operasi kanggo langa cara-cara kuwi basa ning Cino. Awak dhéwé nyonggunian BERT Jejaring ing pancene nggambar aturan tapi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang (1) informasi uwong wis rambarang BERT; nggawe (2) Spanish (3) Perintah sing dipunangé perusahaan kelas telu nggawe gerangkat luwih (BERT), lan mbok sing dibenangke singular dan nggoleki ujaran kuwi perintah sing gak dhéwé, lan akeh langkung langkung dipunangke sing paling dhéwé.', 'bo': 'རྣམ་གྲངས་བསྡུས་པའི་འཆར་བརྗོད་པ་དེ་ནི་NLP ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མངོན་གསལ་རྗེས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ BERT དཔེར་ན། Representative མིག་དཔེ་དབུགས་གྱིས་captured ཡོད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Existence་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲུབ་ཚིག་དང་། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དང་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་ཤེས་ཚིག་མངོན་གསལ་བྱས་པའི་ལྟ་ཀློག་འད འོན་ཀྱང་། ལས་ཀ་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཅིག་ལ་རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་གི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་BERT་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དབྱངས་ཚད་རྩལ (2) ཡི་གེའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དེ་དབུས་རིགས་ཀྱི་བང་རིམ་ནང་ཡོད། (3) འོག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་མི་འདྲ་བ་ཡིན། BERT ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་རྟགས་བཀལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀ', 'he': 'נציגות קונטקסטולוגיות נותנות תוצאות משתפרות משמעותיות לגוון רחב של משימות NLP. עבודה רבה הוקדשה לניתוח את המאפיינים שנתפסו על ידי דוגמנים מייצגים כמו BERT. Existing work finds that syntactic, semantic and word sense knowledge are encoded in BERT.  עם זאת, מעט עבודה חקרה תכונות מילים לשפות אופיים כמו סיני. אנו חוקרים BERT סיני בשימוש גם סטטיסטיקות פיצוי משקל תשומת לב וגם משימות חקירה, למצוא כי (1) מידע מילה נתפס על ידי BERT; (2) תכונות רמת מילים הן בעיקר בשכבות היציגה האמצעית; (3) משימות מתחתיות משתמשות בצורה שונה במילים בברט, עם תווים POS ומחטיפים מסתמכים הכי הרבה על תכונות מילים, ומסקנה שפה טבעית מסתמכת הכי פחות על תכונות כאלה.'}
{'en': 'One Comment from One Perspective : An Effective Strategy for Enhancing Automatic Music Comment', 'es': 'Un comentario desde una perspectiva: una estrategia eficaz para mejorar los comentarios musicales automáticos', 'fr': "Un commentaire d'une seule perspective\xa0: une stratégie efficace pour améliorer le commentaire automatique de musique", 'ar': 'تعليق واحد من منظور واحد: إستراتيجية فعالة لتحسين التعليقات الموسيقية التلقائية', 'pt': 'Um Comentário de Uma Perspectiva: Uma Estratégia Eficaz para Melhorar o Comentário Automático de Música', 'ja': '1つの視点からの1つのコメント：自動音楽コメントを強化するための効果的な戦略', 'zh': '一角之论:强自乐论者有效', 'hi': 'एक परिप्रेक्ष्य से एक टिप्पणी: स्वचालित संगीत टिप्पणी बढ़ाने के लिए एक प्रभावी रणनीति', 'ru': 'Один комментарий с одной точки зрения: эффективная стратегия улучшения автоматических музыкальных комментариев', 'ga': 'Trácht Amháin ó Dhearcadh Amháin: Straitéis Éifeachtach chun Trácht Uathoibríoch Ceoil a Fheabhsú', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Egy megjegyzés egy perspektívából: hatékony stratégia az automatikus zene javítására Megjegyzés', 'el': 'Ένα σχόλιο από μια προοπτική: Μια αποτελεσματική στρατηγική για την ενίσχυση της αυτόματης μουσικής Σχόλια', 'it': 'Un commento da una prospettiva: una strategia efficace per migliorare la musica automatica Commento', 'lt': 'Vienas komentaras iš vienos perspektyvos: veiksminga automatinės muzikos komentarų stiprinimo strategija', 'kk': 'Comment', 'mk': 'Еден коментар од една перспектива: ефективна стратегија за подобрување на автоматската музика', 'ms': 'Satu Komen dari Satu Perspektif: Strategi Efektif untuk meningkatkan Komen Muzik Automatik', 'ml': 'ഒരു കാഴ്ച്ചയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഒരു അഭിപ്രായം: സ്വയം സംഗീതത്തിനുള്ള സ്ട്രാറ്റേജിയുടെ പ്രഭാവികമായ ഒരു', 'mn': 'Нэг Перспективээс нэг тайлбар: Автоматикийн хөгжмийн нэмэгдүүлэх эффективны стратеги Comment', 'mt': 'Kumment wieħed minn Perspettiva waħda: Strateġija Effettiva għat-Titjib tal-Kumment tal-Mużika Awtomatika', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Jeden komentarz z jednej perspektywy: Skuteczna strategia zwiększania automatycznego komentarza muzycznego', 'ro': 'Un comentariu dintr-o perspectivă: o strategie eficientă pentru îmbunătățirea muzicii automate Comentariu', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Comment', 'sv': 'En kommentar från ett perspektiv: En effektiv strategi för att förbättra automatisk musik Kommentar', 'sr': 'Jedan komentar iz jedne perspektive: Efektivna strategija za povećanje automatske muzike Comment', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Comment', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Một bình luận từ một viễn cảnh: Một chiến lược hiệu quả cho việc cải thiện nhạc tự động', 'bg': 'Един коментар от една перспектива: Ефективна стратегия за подобряване на автоматичната музика Коментар', 'nl': 'Eén commentaar vanuit één perspectief: Een effectieve strategie voor het verbeteren van automatische muziek Commentaar', 'da': 'En kommentar fra ét perspektiv: En effektiv strategi for at forbedre automatisk musik Kommentar', 'hr': 'Comment', 'de': 'Ein Kommentar aus einer Perspektive: Eine effektive Strategie zur Verbesserung der automatischen Musik Kommentar', 'ko': '한 각도의 평론: 자동 음악 평론을 강화하는 효과적인 전략', 'id': 'Satu Komen dari Satu Perspektif: Strategi Efektif untuk meningkatkan Komen Musik Otomatis', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Comment', 'tr': "One Perspective'dan bir töwzih: An Effective Strategy for Enhancing Automatic Music Comment", 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Një koment nga një perspektivë: Një strategji efektive për përmirësimin e komenteve të muzikës automatike', 'am': 'Comment', 'hy': 'Մեկ մեկնաբանություն մեկ տեսանկյունից. Ավտոմատիկ երաժշտության բարելավման արդյունավետ ռազմավարություն', 'az': 'Bir Perspektivd톛n bir T톛rc칲m톛: Otomatik M칲ziki Art캼rmaq 칲칞칲n Etkileyici Strateji Comment', 'bn': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Comment', 'ca': "Un comentari d'una perspectiva: Una estratègia efectiva per millorar el comentari de música automàtica", 'et': 'Üks kommentaar ühest vaatenurgast: tõhus strateegia automaatmuusika parandamiseks Comment', 'cs': 'Jeden komentář z jednoho pohledu: Efektivní strategie pro zlepšení automatické hudby Komentář', 'fi': 'Yksi kommentti yhdestä näkökulmasta: Tehokas strategia automaattisen musiikin tehostamiseksi Kommentti', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'One Comment from One Perspective: An Effective Strategy for Enhancing Automatic Music Comment', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'sk': 'En komentar z ene perspektive: učinkovita strategija za izboljšanje avtomatske glasbe Komentar', 'bo': 'Comment'}
{'en': 'The automatic generation of music comments is of great significance for increasing the popularity of music and the music platform’s activity. In human music comments, there exists high distinction and diverse perspectives for the same song. In other words, for a song, different comments stem from different musical perspectives. However, to date, this characteristic has not been considered well in research on automatic comment generation. The existing methods tend to generate common and meaningless comments. In this paper, we propose an effective multi-perspective strategy to enhance the diversity of the generated comments. The experiment results on two music comment datasets show that our proposed model can effectively generate a series of diverse music comments based on different perspectives, which outperforms state-of-the-art baselines by a substantial margin.', 'ar': 'يعد الإنشاء التلقائي للتعليقات الموسيقية ذا أهمية كبيرة لزيادة شعبية الموسيقى ونشاط منصة الموسيقى. في تعليقات الموسيقى البشرية ، يوجد تمييز كبير ووجهات نظر متنوعة للأغنية نفسها. بمعنى آخر ، بالنسبة للأغنية ، تنبع التعليقات المختلفة من وجهات نظر موسيقية مختلفة. ومع ذلك ، حتى الآن ، لم يتم اعتبار هذه الخاصية جيدًا في البحث عن إنشاء التعليقات تلقائيًا. تميل الأساليب الحالية إلى توليد تعليقات عامة لا معنى لها. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح استراتيجية فعالة متعددة وجهات النظر لتعزيز تنوع التعليقات الناتجة. تظهر نتائج التجربة على مجموعتي بيانات للتعليقات الموسيقية أن نموذجنا المقترح يمكن أن يولد بشكل فعال سلسلة من التعليقات الموسيقية المتنوعة بناءً على وجهات نظر مختلفة ، والتي تتفوق على أحدث خطوط الأساس بهامش كبير.', 'fr': "La génération automatique de commentaires musicaux est d'une grande importance pour augmenter la popularité de la musique et l'activité de la plateforme musicale. Dans les commentaires de musique humaine, il existe une grande distinction et des perspectives diverses pour une même chanson. En d'autres termes, pour une chanson, les différents commentaires proviennent de différentes perspectives musicales. Cependant, à ce jour, cette caractéristique n'a pas été bien prise en compte dans les recherches sur la génération automatique de commentaires. Les méthodes existantes ont tendance à générer des commentaires communs et dénués de sens. Dans cet article, nous proposons une stratégie multiperspective efficace pour améliorer la diversité des commentaires générés. Les résultats de l'expérience sur deux ensembles de données de commentaires musicaux montrent que le modèle que nous proposons peut générer efficacement une série de commentaires musicaux divers basés sur des perspectives différentes, ce qui surpasse largement les lignes de base de pointe.", 'es': 'La generación automática de comentarios musicales es de gran importancia para aumentar la popularidad de la música y la actividad de la plataforma musical. En los comentarios sobre música humana, existe una gran distinción y diversas perspectivas para una misma canción. En otras palabras, para una canción, los comentarios diferentes provienen de diferentes perspectivas musicales. Sin embargo, hasta la fecha, esta característica no se ha considerado bien en la investigación sobre la generación automática de comentarios. Los métodos existentes tienden a generar comentarios comunes y sin sentido. En este artículo, proponemos una estrategia eficaz de múltiples perspectivas para mejorar la diversidad de los comentarios generados. Los resultados del experimento en dos conjuntos de datos de comentarios musicales muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto puede generar de manera efectiva una serie de comentarios musicales diversos basados en diferentes perspectivas, lo que supera a las líneas de base de última generación por un margen sustancial.', 'pt': 'A geração automática de comentários de música é de grande importância para aumentar a popularidade da música e a atividade da plataforma de música. Nos comentários de música humana, existe grande distinção e perspectivas diversas para uma mesma música. Em outras palavras, para uma música, diferentes comentários derivam de diferentes perspectivas musicais. No entanto, até o momento, essa característica não foi bem considerada em pesquisas sobre geração automática de comentários. Os métodos existentes tendem a gerar comentários comuns e sem sentido. Neste artigo, propomos uma estratégia multi-perspectiva eficaz para aumentar a diversidade dos comentários gerados. Os resultados do experimento em dois conjuntos de dados de comentários de música mostram que nosso modelo proposto pode efetivamente gerar uma série de comentários de música diversos com base em diferentes perspectivas, o que supera as linhas de base de última geração por uma margem substancial.', 'ja': '音楽コメントの自動生成は、音楽の人気と音楽プラットフォームの活動を高めるために非常に重要です。ヒューマンミュージックのコメントでは、同じ曲に対して高い区別と多様な視点が存在する。言い換えれば、曲にとって、異なるコメントは異なる音楽的な視点から生まれる。しかしながら、現在に至るまで、自動コメント生成の研究ではこの特性はあまり考慮されていない。既存の方法は、共通の意味のないコメントを生成する傾向がある。本稿では、生成されたコメントの多様性を高めるための効果的な多視点戦略を提案する。2つの音楽コメントデータセットの実験結果は、提案されたモデルが異なる視点に基づいて一連の多様な音楽コメントを効果的に生成することができ、最先端のベースラインを大幅に上回ることを示しています。', 'hi': 'संगीत टिप्पणियों की स्वचालित पीढ़ी संगीत की लोकप्रियता और संगीत मंच की गतिविधि को बढ़ाने के लिए बहुत महत्वपूर्ण है। मानव संगीत टिप्पणियों में, एक ही गीत के लिए उच्च अंतर और विविध दृष्टिकोण मौजूद हैं। दूसरे शब्दों में, एक गीत के लिए, विभिन्न टिप्पणियां विभिन्न संगीत दृष्टिकोणों से स्टेम करती हैं। हालांकि, आज तक, इस विशेषता को स्वचालित टिप्पणी पीढ़ी पर शोध में अच्छी तरह से नहीं माना गया है। मौजूदा तरीके आम और अर्थहीन टिप्पणियां उत्पन्न करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम उत्पन्न टिप्पणियों की विविधता को बढ़ाने के लिए एक प्रभावी बहु-परिप्रेक्ष्य रणनीति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। दो संगीत टिप्पणी डेटासेट पर प्रयोग के परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों के आधार पर विभिन्न संगीत टिप्पणियों की एक श्रृंखला को प्रभावी ढंग से उत्पन्न कर सकता है, जो पर्याप्त मार्जिन से अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं को मात देता है।', 'zh': '乐论自生于益乐之知名,乐平之动有大义。 人伦乐论,同歌异论。 换句话说于一歌,异论异视角。 然迄今为止自论生成,未有善虑者也。 今法往往生常见无义之注。 本文中,有效者多视角策,以增所生为论多样性。 二乐论数集之实验结果表明,形模有效视角成列异论,性大优于先进之基线。', 'ru': 'Автоматическая генерация музыкальных комментариев имеет большое значение для повышения популярности музыки и активности музыкальной платформы. В комментариях к человеческой музыке существует высокое различие и разнообразие точек зрения на одну и ту же песню. Другими словами, для песни разные комментарии проистекают из разных музыкальных точек зрения. Однако до сих пор эта характеристика не была хорошо рассмотрена в исследованиях по автоматической генерации комментариев. Существующие методы, как правило, порождают общие и бессмысленные комментарии. В настоящем документе мы предлагаем эффективную многоплановую стратегию для увеличения разнообразия генерируемых комментариев. Результаты эксперимента по двум наборам данных музыкальных комментариев показывают, что предлагаемая нами модель может эффективно генерировать ряд разнообразных музыкальных комментариев, основанных на различных точках зрения, которые значительно превосходят современные базовые линии.', 'ga': 'Tá tábhacht mhór ag giniúint uathoibríoch tuairimí ceoil chun an tóir a bhíonn ag ceol agus gníomhaíocht an ardáin cheoil a mhéadú. I dtuairimí ceoil an duine, tá ard-idirdhealú agus peirspictíochtaí éagsúla ann don amhrán céanna. I bhfocail eile, i gcás amhrán, eascraíonn tuairimí difriúla ó pheirspictíochtaí ceoil éagsúla. Mar sin féin, go dtí seo, níor breithníodh go maith an tréith seo i dtaighde ar ghiniúint tráchta uathoibríoch. Is gnách go ngineann na modhanna reatha tuairimí coitianta gan brí. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid straitéis ilpheirspictíocht éifeachtach chun cur le héagsúlacht na dtuairimí ginte. Léiríonn torthaí an turgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí tráchtaireachta ceoil gur féidir lenár múnla molta sraith tuairimí ceoil ilghnéitheacha a ghiniúint go héifeachtach bunaithe ar pheirspictíochtaí éagsúla, a sháraíonn na bunlínte úrscothacha le corrlach suntasach.', 'hu': 'A zenei kommentek automatikus generálása nagy jelentőséggel bír a zene népszerűségének és a zenei platform tevékenységének növelésében. Az emberi zenei megjegyzésekben ugyanannak a dalnak nagy megkülönböztetése és különböző perspektívái vannak. Más szóval egy dal esetében különböző megjegyzések különböző zenei perspektívákból erednek. Ezt a jellemzőt azonban eddig nem tekintették jól az automatikus megjegyzések generálására vonatkozó kutatások során. A meglévő módszerek általában közös és értelmetlen megjegyzéseket generálnak. Ebben a tanulmányban hatékony, többperspektívás stratégiát javasolunk a létrehozott észrevételek sokféleségének fokozása érdekében. Két zenei komment adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk hatékonyan képes különböző perspektívákon alapuló, különböző zenei kommentek sorozatát generálni, amelyek jelentős mértékben felülmúlják a legkorszerűbb bázisokat.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη παραγωγή μουσικών σχολίων έχει μεγάλη σημασία για την αύξηση της δημοτικότητας της μουσικής και της δραστηριότητας της μουσικής πλατφόρμας. Στα ανθρώπινα μουσικά σχόλια, υπάρχει μεγάλη διάκριση και διαφορετικές προοπτικές για το ίδιο τραγούδι. Με άλλα λόγια, για ένα τραγούδι, διαφορετικά σχόλια προέρχονται από διαφορετικές μουσικές προοπτικές. Ωστόσο, μέχρι σήμερα, αυτό το χαρακτηριστικό δεν έχει θεωρηθεί καλά στην έρευνα για την αυτόματη δημιουργία σχολίων. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι τείνουν να δημιουργούν κοινά και ανούσια σχόλια. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια αποτελεσματική στρατηγική πολλαπλών προοπτικών για την ενίσχυση της ποικιλομορφίας των παραγόμενων σχολίων. Τα αποτελέσματα του πειράματος σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων σχολίων μουσικής δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μας μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να δημιουργήσει μια σειρά διαφορετικών μουσικών σχολίων βασισμένων σε διαφορετικές προοπτικές, τα οποία ξεπερνούν τις σύγχρονες γραμμές βάσης κατά ένα σημαντικό περιθώριο.', 'ka': 'მუსიკის კომენტრების ავტომატიკური წარმოდგენა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელია მუსიკის და მუსიკო პლატატურის აკეთეტიობის პ ადამიანის მუსიკა კომენტრებში არსებობს დიდი განსხვავება და განსხვავებული პეროვნტიკები იგივე სიტყვაზე. სხვა სიტყვებით, სიტყვებისთვის განსხვავებული კომენტაქტები განსხვავებული მუსიკალური პეროვტიკებიდან გამოვიყენება. მაგრამ ახლა ეს პერატიფიკატი არ იყო სწორად აღმოჩნდა ავტომატური კომენტურების განვითარებაში. მიმდინარე მეტოვები საერთო და უნიშვნელოვანი კომენტრების შექმნა. ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ ვფიქრდებით მრავალ პერსპექტიკური სტრატიგია, რომელიც შექმნა კომენტურების განსხვავებას უფრო მეტივად. ექსპერიმენტის შედეგი ორი მუსიკური კომენტების მონაცემების მონაცემების შესაძლებელია, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები მოდელის შესაძლებელად განსხვავებული მუსიკური კომენტების სერიო, რომელიც განსხვავებული პ', 'lt': 'Automatinė muzikos komentarų generacija yra labai svarbi didinant muzikos populiarumą ir muzikos platformos veiklą. Žmogaus muzikos komentaruose yra didelis skirtumas ir įvairios tos pačios dainos perspektyvos. Kitaip tariant, dainos komentarai skirtingi iš skirtingų muzikos perspektyvų. Tačiau iki šiol ši savybė nebuvo tinkamai vertinama atliekant automatinės komentarų kūrimo tyrimus. Esami metodai paprastai sukelia bendrų ir beprasmiškų pastabų. Šiame dokumente siūlome veiksmingą daugialypę strategiją, kuria siekiama padidinti gautų komentarų įvairovę. Dviejų muzikos komentarų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis gali veiksmingai sukurti įvairių muzikos komentarų seriją, pagrįstą skirtingomis perspektyvomis, o tai gerokai viršija naujausias bazines linijas.', 'it': "La generazione automatica di commenti musicali è di grande importanza per aumentare la popolarità della musica e l'attività della piattaforma musicale. Nei commenti della musica umana, esiste un'alta distinzione e prospettive diverse per la stessa canzone. In altre parole, per una canzone, commenti diversi derivano da diverse prospettive musicali. Tuttavia, ad oggi, questa caratteristica non è stata considerata bene nella ricerca sulla generazione automatica dei commenti. I metodi esistenti tendono a generare commenti comuni e senza significato. In questo articolo, proponiamo un'efficace strategia multi-prospettiva per migliorare la diversità dei commenti generati. I risultati dell'esperimento su due dataset di commenti musicali mostrano che il nostro modello proposto può effettivamente generare una serie di commenti musicali diversificati basati su prospettive diverse, che superano di gran lunga le linee di base all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Автоматска генерација на музички коментари е од голема важност за зголемување на популарноста на музиката и активноста на музичката платформа. Во коментарите на човечката музика постои висока разлика и различни перспективи за истата песна. Со други зборови, за песна, различни коментари доаѓаат од различни музички перспективи. Сепак, досега, оваа карактеристика не се смета добро во истражувањето за генерација автоматски коментари. The existing methods tend to generate common and meaningless comments.  Во овој весник предложуваме ефикасна мултиперспективна стратегија за зголемување на различноста на генерираните коментари. Резултатите од експериментите на двата податоци за музички коментари покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел може ефикасно да генерира серија различни музички коментари базирани на различни перспективи, кои ги надминуваат најсовремените бази линии со значителна маргина.', 'kk': 'Музыкалық түсініктерін автоматты түрде құру - музыкалық және музыкалық платформасының белсенділігін көтеру үшін көп маңызды. Адам музыкасының түсініктемелерінде бір ән үшін көптеген түрлі түсініктер және түрлі түсініктер бар. Басқа сөздер үшін, әртүрлі түсініктемелер әртүрлі музыкалық түсініктерден шығады. Бірақ қазірше, бұл қасиеттер автоматты түсініктемелерді құру үшін зерттеулерде дұрыс емес. Бар әдістер жалпы және маңызды түсініктемелерді құру әдістейді. Бұл қағазда, жасалған түсініктердің әртүрлі түсініктерін өзгерту үшін көптеген бірнеше перспективалық стратегиясын ұсынамыз. Екі музыкалық түсініктеме деректер қорларының тәжірибесінің нәтижесі біздің келтірілген моделіміздің бірнеше түсініктемелерін бағдарламалық түсініктеріне негізделген, әртүрлі түсініктеріне негізделген, ол', 'ml': 'സംഗീതത്തിന്റെ സ്വയമായുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് സംഗീതത്തിന്റെയും സംഗീതത്തിന്റെയും പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിന്റെയും പ്രവർത് മനുഷ്യരുടെ സംഗീതത്തിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായത്തില്\u200d ഒരേ പാട്ടിന് ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വ്യത്യാസവും വ്യത്യസ്ത കാഴ്ചകളും ഉണ്ട്. മറ്റൊരു വാക്കുകളില്\u200d, ഒരു പാട്ടിന് വ്യത്യസ്ത സംഗീതകാഴ്ചയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. However, to date, this characteristic has not been considered well in research on automatic comment generation.  നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സാധാരണയും അർഥിക്കാത്ത വിവരങ്ങളും ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വളര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന അഭിപ്രായങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ഒരു പ് രണ്ടു സംഗീതകാര്യങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത കാഴ്ചകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു വ്യത', 'ms': "The automatic generation of music comments is of great significance for increasing the popularity of music and the music platform's activity.  Dalam komentar muzik manusia, terdapat perbezaan tinggi dan perspektif berbeza untuk lagu yang sama. Dengan kata lain, untuk lagu, komen berbeza berasal dari perspektif muzik yang berbeza. Namun, hingga kini, karakteristik ini tidak dianggap baik dalam kajian tentang generasi komentar automatik. Kaedah yang wujud cenderung menghasilkan komen biasa dan tidak bermakna. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan strategi multi-perspektif yang berkesan untuk meningkatkan pelbagai komen yang dijana. Hasil eksperimen pada dua set data komentar muzik menunjukkan bahawa model kami yang direncanakan boleh secara efektif menghasilkan siri komentar muzik berbeza berdasarkan perspektif berbeza, yang melampaui garis dasar state-of-the-art dengan margin yang besar.", 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ kummenti mużikali hija ta’ importanza kbira biex tiżdied il-popolarità tal-mużika u l-attività tal-pjattaforma mużikali. Fil-kummenti tal-mużika umana, jeżisti distinzjoni għolja u perspettivi differenti għall-istess kantina. Fi kliem ieħor, għal kantina, kummenti differenti jirriżultaw minn perspettivi mużikali differenti. Madankollu, s’issa, din il-karatteristika ma ġietx ikkunsidrata tajjeb fir-riċerka dwar il-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ kummenti. Il-metodi eżistenti għandhom it-tendenza li jiġġeneraw kummenti komuni u mingħajr sens. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu strateġija effettiva b’diversi perspettivi biex tissaħħaħ id-diversità tal-kummenti ġġenerati. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta dwar kummenti mużikali juru li l-mudell propost tagħna jista’ effettivament jiġġenera serje ta’ kummenti mużikali varji bbażati fuq perspettivi differenti, li jaqbżu l-linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati b’marġini sostanzjali.', 'mn': 'Хөгжим хэвлэлийн автоматжуулалт нь хөгжим болон хөгжмийн хөдөлгөөнийг нэмэгдүүлэхэд маш чухал юм. Хүн төрөлхтний хөгжмийн хэлэлцээнд ижил дуу дээр өндөр ялгаатай, өөр өөр ойлголт байдаг. Өөрөөр хэлбэл, дуу хэлэхэд өөр өөр захирагчид хөгжмийн үзэл дээр гарч ирдэг. Гэвч одоогийн үед энэ тодорхойлолт автоматик сэтгүүлийн үеийн судалгаанд сайн ойлгомжгүй. Ингэж байгаа арга нь ерөнхий, утгагүй заавар бий болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бүтээгдэхүүний олон ойлголтын стратегийг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд үр дүнтэй олон асуудлын стратегийг санал болгодог. Энэ туршилтын үр дүнд хоёр хөгжмийн комментарийн өгөгдлийн багц нь бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь олон төрлийн хөгжмийн комментарүүдийг үр дүнтэй бүтээж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь урлагийн үндсэн суурь шугамнуудыг маш олон загвараар гарга', 'no': 'Den automatiske genereringa av musikkkommentarar er av stor betydning for å auka populariteten av musikk og musikkplattformen. I menneske musikkkommentarar finst det høg skilnad og ulike perspektiv for same song. I andre ord, for ein song stemmer ulike kommentarar frå ulike musikkperspektiv. Denne karakteristikaren har imidlertid ikkje blitt betre i forskning om automatisk kommentarar. Den eksisterande metodane har tendens til å laga felles og uttrykkelige kommentarar. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein effektiv multiperspektivstrategi for å forbetra mangfolden av dei genererte kommentarane. Eksperimenten gjer resultatet på to musikkkommentar- dataset viser at vår foreslått modell kan effektivt laga ein serie av forskjellige musikkkommentarar basert på ulike perspektiv, som utfører baselinjer for status-of-the-art med ein stor margin.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne generowanie komentarzy muzycznych ma ogromne znaczenie dla zwiększenia popularności muzyki i aktywności platformy muzycznej. W komentarzach muzycznych ludzi istnieje wysokie wyróżnienie i różnorodne perspektywy dla tej samej piosenki. Innymi słowy, dla piosenki różne komentarze wynikają z różnych perspektyw muzycznych. Do tej pory jednak cecha ta nie została uznana za dobrze w badaniach nad automatycznym generowaniem komentarzy. Istniejące metody mają tendencję do generowania powszechnych i bezsensownych komentarzy. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy skuteczną strategię wielopunkcyjną zwiększającą różnorodność generowanych komentarzy. Wyniki eksperymentu na dwóch zestawach danych komentarzy muzycznych pokazują, że proponowany model może skutecznie generować serię różnorodnych komentarzy muzycznych opartych na różnych perspektywach, które znacznie przewyższają najnowocześniejsze linie bazowe.', 'ro': 'Generarea automată a comentariilor muzicale are o mare importanță pentru creșterea popularității muzicii și a activității platformei muzicale. În comentariile muzicii umane, există distincție ridicată și perspective diverse pentru aceeași melodie. Cu alte cuvinte, pentru un cântec, comentarii diferite provin din perspective muzicale diferite. Cu toate acestea, până în prezent, această caracteristică nu a fost considerată bine în cercetarea privind generarea automată de comentarii. Metodele existente tind să genereze comentarii comune și lipsite de sens. În această lucrare, propunem o strategie eficientă multi-perspectivă pentru a spori diversitatea comentariilor generate. Rezultatele experimentului pe două seturi de date de comentarii muzicale arată că modelul nostru propus poate genera efectiv o serie de comentarii muzicale diverse bazate pe perspective diferite, care depășesc cu o marjă substanțială liniile de bază de ultimă generație.', 'si': 'සංගීත කිරීමේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සංගීතය සහ සංගීත ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ගොඩක් වැඩි කරන මිනිස්සු සංගීත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, එකම ගිණියක් වෙනුවෙන් හා විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනව අනිත් වචනයෙන්, සංගීතයක් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් කිරීමක් වෙනුවෙන් සංගීත ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් ඉන්නවා. නමුත්, අවස්ථානයෙන්, මේ විශේෂතාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විශේෂණයේ හොඳ තියෙන්න තියෙන විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය සහ අදහස් කිරීමක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂ විශේෂ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා. සංගීත කිරීම් දෙකක් තොරතුරු සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විවිධ සංගීත කිරීමක් විවිධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Qoraalka muusikada oo iskaa ah ayaa muhiim u ah in uu kordhiyo dhaqdhaqaalaha muusikada iyo tababarka muusikada. Sharciga muusikada dadka waxaa ku jira muusiko kala duduwan iyo muusiko kala duduwan isla gabaygaas. Hadal kale, gabay waxaa laga helaa aragti kala duduwan oo muusikada kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tan iyo waqtigaas si fiican laguma fiiriyo baaritaanka farsamada commentarka. Qadooyinka joogta ah waxay sameeyaan commentaro caadi ah oo aan waxyaabo lahayn. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal tayo leh oo arag badan, si loo kordhiyo kala duduwan oo commentarada soo saaray. Imtixaanka waxaa ka soo baxay laba diimeed oo muusiko ah oo ka muuqata in qaab leh muusikadeenna uu ka soo saari karo aragti kala duduwan oo muusikada ah, taasoo ka muuqata qoraalka farshaxanka ah oo ku qoran marxalad caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Den automatiska genereringen av musikkommentarer är av stor betydelse för att öka musikens popularitet och musikplattformens aktivitet. I mänskliga musikkommentarer finns det hög distinktion och olika perspektiv för samma låt. Med andra ord, för en låt kommer olika kommentarer från olika musikaliska perspektiv. Hittills har dock denna egenskap inte bedömts väl i forskningen om automatisk kommentarsgenerering. De befintliga metoderna tenderar att generera gemensamma och meningslösa kommentarer. I detta dokument föreslår vi en effektiv flerperspektivstrategi för att öka mångfalden i de genererade kommentarerna. Experimentsresultaten på två musikkommentarsdataset visar att vår föreslagna modell effektivt kan generera en rad olika musikkommentarer baserade på olika perspektiv, vilket överträffar toppmoderna baslinjer med en betydande marginal.', 'sr': 'Automatska generacija muzičkih komentara je od velike značajnosti za povećanje popularnosti muzike i aktivnosti muzičke platforme. U ljudskim komentarima muzike postoji visoka razlika i različita perspektiva za istu pesmu. Drugim rečima, za pjesmu, različiti komentari dolaze iz različitih muzičkih perspektiva. Međutim, do sada, ova karakteristika se ne smatra dobro u istraživanju o generaciji automatskih komentara. Postoje metode su tendencije da stvaraju zajedničke i besmislene komentare. U ovom papiru predlažemo efikasnu multiperspektivnu strategiju za unapređenje raznolikosti proizvedenih komentara. Rezultati eksperimenta na dva kompleta podataka o muzičkim komentarima pokazuju da naš predloženi model može efektivno stvoriti niz različitih muzičkih komentara na temelju različitih perspektiva, koja iznosi osnovne linije države umjetnosti značajnom marginom.', 'ta': 'இசை குறிப்புகளின் தன்னியக்கமாக உருவாக்குதல் பெரிய முக்கியமானது இசை மற்றும் இசை முறைமையின் செயலை அதிகரிக்க மனித இசை குறிப்புகளில், அதிக வித்தியாசம் மற்றும் வித்தியாசமான காட்சிகள் இருக்கிறது, அதே பாட்டிற்கான வேறு வார்த்தைகளில், பாடலுக்கு, வேறு வித்தியாசமான குறிப்புகள் வெவ்வேறு இசை காட்சிகளிலிருந்து  ஆனால் தானியங்கி குறிப்பு உருவாக்கத்தின் ஆராய்ச்சியில் இந்த குறிப்பு நன்றாக கருதப்படாது. The existing methods tend to generate common and meaningless comments.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு விருப்பமான பல- பார்வையுடைய திட்டத்தை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோ இரண்டு இசை குறிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வெவ்வேறு பார்வைகளில் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பல்வேறு இசை க', 'ur': 'موسیقی کمانٹروں کی اتمام کی نسل موسیقی اور موسیقی پٹروم کی فعالیت بڑھنے کے لئے بہت اہم ہے۔ انسان کی موسیقی مثالیں میں، ایک ہی سنگت کے لئے بلند فرق اور مختلف نظریں موجود ہیں۔ اور دوسرے کلمات میں، ایک سنگت کے لئے مختلف مثالیں مختلف موسیقی نظر سے آتی ہیں۔ اگرچہ، یہاں تک، یہ خصوصی اچھی طرح اچھی طرح نظر نہیں کیا گیا ہے، اپنا اٹوٹوٹ ٹوٹ نسل کے بارے میں. موجود طریقے مشترک اور بے معنی توضیح پیدا کرنے کے لئے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مثبت multi-perspective استراتژی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ پیدا کئے ہوئے کمانٹروں کی مختلف طریقے سے زیادہ کریں۔ آزمائش کا نتیجہ دو موسیقی کمانٹر ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی موڈل ایک سری مختلف موسیقی کمانٹروں کی نسخہ جوڑ سکتی ہے جو مختلف نظریوں پر بنیاد رکھتی ہے، جو ایک بہت زیادہ مقدار کے ذریعہ سٹیٹ کی بنیاس لین', 'uz': "Musiqa izohlarining avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik zatish musiqa va musiqa platformning aktivlarini oshirish uchun juda muhim. In human music comments, there exists high distinction and diverse perspectives for the same song.  Boshqa so'zlar bilan, bir xil musiqa ko'rinishdan boshqa izohlar. Lekin har kuni, bu hususiyat avtomatik izoh generalida avtomatik o'rganishda yaxshi ko'rsatilmagan. Mavjud usullar umumiy va ma'lum izohlarni yaratadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz yaratilgan izohlarning tarkibini oshirish uchun ko'plab-koʻrinadigan strategiya talab qilamiz. Ikki musiqa izohi maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari koʻrsatiladi. Bu murakkablik modelimiz boshqa shakllarga asoslangan bir xil musiqa izohlarini yaratishi mumkin. Bu juda katta qiymati harfni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Tự động s ản xuất các bình luận âm nhạc rất quan trọng cho việc phát triển nổi tiếng của nhạc và các nền công nghệ âm nhạc. Trong các bình luận âm nhạc con người, có sự khác biệt cao và nhiều triển vọng khác nhau trong cùng bài hát. Nói cách khác, với một bài hát, những bình luận khác nhau là từ một góc nhìn âm nhạc khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, cho đến nay, đặc điểm này chưa được xem xét kỹ trong việc nghiên cứu sản xuất bình luận tự động. Các phương pháp hiện tại thường tạo ra bình luận bình thường và vô nghĩa. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một chiến lược đa chiều hiệu quả để tăng sự đa dạng các nhận xét đã tạo ra. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên hai tập tin bình luận âm nhạc cho thấy rằng mô hình đã đề nghị của chúng ta có thể tạo ra một loạt các bình luận âm nhạc khác nhau dựa trên một góc nhìn khác nhau, nó vượt trội các bản nền nghệ thuật hơn với một mức độ đáng kể.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното генериране на музикални коментари е от голямо значение за увеличаване на популярността на музиката и активността на музикалната платформа. В коментарите на човешката музика съществува високо отличие и разнообразни перспективи за една и съща песен. С други думи, за една песен различните коментари произлизат от различни музикални перспективи. Към днешна дата обаче тази характеристика не се разглежда добре в изследванията за автоматично генериране на коментари. Съществуващите методи са склонни да генерират общи и безсмислени коментари. В настоящата статия предлагаме ефективна многоперспективна стратегия за повишаване на многообразието на генерираните коментари. Резултатите от експеримента върху две музикални коментари показват, че предложеният модел може ефективно да генерира серия от разнообразни музикални коментари въз основа на различни перспективи, които надминават най-съвременните базови линии със значителна разлика.', 'nl': 'Het automatisch genereren van muziekcommentaren is van groot belang voor het verhogen van de populariteit van muziek en de activiteit van het muziekplatform. In menselijke muziek commentaren bestaat er een hoog onderscheid en diverse perspectieven voor hetzelfde lied. Met andere woorden, voor een nummer komen verschillende commentaren voort uit verschillende muzikale perspectieven. Tot op heden is dit kenmerk echter niet goed beschouwd in onderzoek naar automatische commentaargeneratie. De bestaande methoden hebben de neiging om gemeenschappelijke en zinloze opmerkingen te genereren. In dit document stellen we een effectieve multi-perspectieven strategie voor om de diversiteit van de gegenereerde opmerkingen te vergroten. De experimentresultaten op twee muziekcommentaren datasets laten zien dat ons voorgestelde model effectief een reeks verschillende muziekcommentaren kan genereren op basis van verschillende perspectieven, die state-of-the-art baselines met een aanzienlijke marge overtreft.', 'da': 'Den automatiske generering af musikkommentarer er af stor betydning for at øge musikkens popularitet og musikplatformens aktivitet. I menneskelige musikkommentarer findes der høj skelnen og forskellige perspektiver for den samme sang. Med andre ord, for en sang stammer forskellige kommentarer fra forskellige musikalske perspektiver. Indtil videre er denne egenskab imidlertid ikke blevet betragtet godt i forskningen om automatisk kommentarsgenerering. De eksisterende metoder har en tendens til at generere almindelige og meningsløse kommentarer. I dette dokument foreslår vi en effektiv multi-perspektivstrategi for at øge mangfoldigheden af de genererede kommentarer. Eksperimentets resultater på to musikkommentarsdatasæt viser, at vores foreslåede model effektivt kan generere en række forskellige musikkommentarer baseret på forskellige perspektiver, som overgår state-of-the-art baselines med en betydelig margin.', 'hr': 'Automatska generacija glazbenih komentara ima veliku značaj za povećanje popularnosti glazbe i aktivnosti glazbenih platformi. U ljudskim komentarima glazbe postoji visoka razlika i različita perspektiva za istu pjesmu. Drugim riječima, za pjesmu, različiti komentari dolaze iz različitih muzičkih perspektiva. Međutim, do sada, ova karakteristika nije dobro smatrala u istraživanju o generaciji automatskih komentara. Postoje metode tendencija stvaraju zajedničke i besmislene komentare. U ovom papiru predlažemo učinkovitu multiperspektivnu strategiju za unapređenje raznolikosti proizvedenih komentara. Rezultati eksperimenta na dvije baze podataka o muzičkim komentarima pokazuju da naš predloženi model može učinkovito proizvesti niz različitih muzičkih komentara na temelju različitih perspektiva, koji iznosi osnovne linije države umjetnosti značajnom marginom.', 'de': 'Die automatische Generierung von Musikkommentaren ist von großer Bedeutung für die Steigerung der Popularität von Musik und der Aktivität der Musikplattform. In menschlichen Musikkommentaren gibt es eine hohe Unterscheidung und vielfältige Perspektiven für ein und dasselbe Lied. Anders ausgedrückt, für einen Song entstehen unterschiedliche Kommentare aus unterschiedlichen musikalischen Perspektiven. Bislang wurde diese Eigenschaft jedoch in der Forschung zur automatischen Kommentarerstellung nicht gut berücksichtigt. Die bestehenden Methoden neigen dazu, allgemeine und sinnlose Kommentare zu generieren. In diesem Papier schlagen wir eine effektive multiperspektivische Strategie vor, um die Vielfalt der generierten Kommentare zu verbessern. Die Experimentergebnisse an zwei Musikkommentar-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell effektiv eine Reihe von verschiedenen Musikkommentaren basierend auf verschiedenen Perspektiven generieren kann, die State-of-the-Art-Baselines deutlich übertreffen.', 'ko': '음악 평론의 자동 생성은 음악의 유행도와 음악 플랫폼의 활동성을 향상시키는 데 중요한 의미를 가진다.인류 음악 평론에서 같은 노래에는 고도의 차이와 다른 시각이 존재한다.한 곡에 대한 평론이 다른 음악적 시각에서 나온다는 얘기다.그러나 지금까지 이 특성은 자동 평론 생성 연구에서 잘 고려되지 않았다.기존의 방법은 왕왕 흔하고 무의미한 평론을 낳는다.본고에서 우리는 효과적인 다각도 전략을 제시하여 논평 생성의 다양성을 강화했다.두 개의 음악 평론 데이터집에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 모델은 서로 다른 시각을 바탕으로 일련의 서로 다른 음악 평론을 효과적으로 생성할 수 있고 그 성능은 가장 선진적인 기선보다 훨씬 우수하다.', 'sw': 'Kizazi cha kujitegemea cha maoni ya muziki ni muhimu sana kwa kuongeza umaarufu wa muziki na shughuli za jukwaa la muziki. Katika maoni ya muziki wa binadamu, kuna tofauti kubwa na mitazamo mbalimbali kwa wimbo huo. Kwa maneno mengine, kwa wimbo, maoni tofauti yanatokana na mitazamo tofauti ya muziki. Hata hivyo, mpaka sasa, utafiti huu haujachukuliwa vizuri katika kizazi cha maoni binafsi. mbinu zilizopo huwa zinatengeneza maoni yasiyo na maana. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mkakati wenye ufanisi wa mitazamo mbalimbali wa kuongeza tofauti ya maoni yaliyozaliwa. Matokeo yaliyotokana na taarifa za maoni miwili ya muziki yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu unapendekezwa kunaweza kutengeneza mfululizo wa maoni mbalimbali ya muziki katika mitazamo tofauti, ambayo inaonyesha msingi wa hali ya sanaa na msingi wa muhimu.', 'id': "The automatic generation of music comments is of great significance for increasing the popularity of music and the music platform's activity.  In human music comments, there exists high distinction and diverse perspectives for the same song.  Dengan kata lain, untuk sebuah lagu, komentar yang berbeda berasal dari perspektif musik yang berbeda. Namun, sampai saat ini, karakteristik ini tidak dianggap baik dalam penelitian tentang generasi komentar otomatis. Metode yang ada cenderung untuk menghasilkan komentar yang umum dan tidak berarti. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan strategi multiperspektif yang efektif untuk meningkatkan kebanyakan komentar yang dihasilkan. Hasil eksperimen pada dua set data komentar musik menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan dapat secara efektif menghasilkan serangkaian komentar musik yang berbeda berdasarkan perspektif yang berbeda, yang melebihi garis dasar state-of-the-art dengan margin yang besar.", 'tr': 'Müzik töwürmeleriniň otomatik döwletleri aýdym we aýdym platformanyň beýlenenligini artdyrmak üçin örän wajypdyr. Adamlar aýdym aýdymlarynda bir aýdym üçin ýokary üýtgeşik we üýtgeşik görüşleri bar. Başga sözler bolsa, a ýdym üçin farklı terjimeler aýdym görnüşinden däldir. Şol häzirçe, bu karakterler awtomatik terjimeler döredilmesinde has gowy üýtgedilmedi. Öň bar yöntemler orta we maksadsyz töwürler döretýär. Bu kagyzda, biz üretilen terjimeleriň näsazlygyny geliştirmek üçin etkinlik bir multi-perspektive stratejiýany teklip edip otyrys. Deneyniň netijesi iki saz terjimelerinde düzümler ýaly nusgasynda biziň teklip eden nusgasymyz beýleki görnüşlerde döredip biljekdigini görkez. Bu nusgasymyz möhüm gabdalykdan daşary edip bilýär.', 'af': "Die outomatiese generasie van musiekkommentaar is van groot betekening vir die vergroot populariteit van musiek en die musiekplatforme se aktiviteit. In menslike musiekkommentaar bestaan daar hoë verskil en verskillende perspeksies vir dieselfde lied. In ander woorde, vir 'n lied, kom verskillende kommentaar uit verskillende musiekperspeksies. Maar tot nou, hierdie karakteristiek is nie goed beskou in resek oor outomatiese kommentaar generasie nie. Die bestaande metodes tendeer om gemeenskaplike en betekenlose kommentaar te genereer. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n effektief multiperspektief strategie om die verskeidigheid van die genereerde kommentaar te verbeter. Die eksperiment resultate op twee musiekkommentaar datastel vertoon dat ons voorgestelde model effektief kan genereer 'n reeks van verskeie musiekkommentaar gebaseer op verskillende perspeksies, wat uitvoer state-of-the-art basisline deur 'n groot lyn.", 'sq': 'Gjenerata automatike e komenteve muzikore ka rëndësi të madhe për rritjen e popullaritetit të muzikës dhe veprimtarisë s ë platform ës muzikore. Në komentet e muzikës njerëzore, ekziston dallim i lartë dhe perspektiva të ndryshme për të njëjtën këngë. Me fjalë të tjera, për një këngë, komente të ndryshme vijnë nga perspektiva muzikore të ndryshme. Megjithatë, deri tani, kjo karakteristikë nuk është konsideruar mirë në kërkimin mbi gjenerimin automatik të komenteve. Metodat ekzistuese tenderojnë të gjenerojnë komente të përbashkëta dhe pa kuptim. In this paper, we propose an effective multi-perspective strategy to enhance the diversity of the generated comments.  Rezultatet e eksperimentit në dy grupe të dhënash të komenteve muzikore tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar mund të gjenerojë efektivisht një seri komentesh muzikore të ndryshme bazuar në perspektiva të ndryshme, e cila tejkalon linjat bazë më të larta me një margin thelbësor.', 'am': 'የሙዚቃ ትውልድ የሙዚቃ ውጤት እና የሙዚቃዊ ፕላጦማር ተሟጋቾችን ለማድረግ እጅግ አዋቂ ነው፡፡ በሰው የሙዚቃ አስተያየት ላይ ከፍተኛ ልዩነት እና ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነቶች አሉ፡፡ በሌላ ቃል፣ ለዝማኔ፣ ልዩ አስተያየት ከልዩ ሙዚቃ ዓይነት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ ይህ ባሕላዊ ትውልድ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ትምህርት በመፍጠር መልካም አልተመለከቱም፡፡ The existing methods tend to generate common and meaningless comments.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የፍጥረት ትምህርት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እንዲያበዛ በብዙ-perspective strategy እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ፈተናው በሁለት የሙዚቃ አስተያየት ዳታተር ላይ ፍጻሜ እንዲያሳየው በተለየ ዓይነቶች ላይ የተለያየ የሙዚቃ አስተያየት እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'az': 'Müzik şəhadətlərinin avtomatik nəsili müzik və müzik platformunun fəaliyyətini artırmaq üçün çox mövzudur. İnsanların müzik şəkillərində eyni şarkı üçün yüksək fərqli və müxtəlif perspektivlər var. Başqa sözlərə, şarkı üçün müxtəlif şəkillər müzikal perspektivlərindən gəlir. Ancaq bu xüsusiyyət, otomatik komentar nəsili barəsindəki araştırmalarda gözəl baxmadı. Mevcut metodlar ortaq və anlamsız şəkillər yaratmaq istəyirlər. Bu kağızda, ürəklənmiş şəhadətlərin müxtəlifliyini artırmaq üçün müxtəlif çoxlu perspektiv strateji təklif edirik. İki musiqi komentar verilənlərin sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərimiz müzik komentalarını müxtəlif perspektivlərə dayanan bir seriyə təşkil edə bilər. Bu, möhkəm bir margin vasitəsilə müzik səhifələrindən üstün gəlir.', 'hy': 'Երաժշտական մեկնաբանությունների ավտոմատիկ սերունդը մեծ կարևորություն ունի երաժշտության և երաժշտական հարթակի ակտիվության աճի համար: In human music comments, there exists high distinction and diverse perspectives for the same song.  Այլ կերպ ասած, երգի համար տարբեր մեկնաբանությունները տարբեր երաժշտական տեսանկյուններից են գալիս: Այնուամենայնիվ, մինչև հիմա այս հատկությունը լավ չի համարվել ավտոմատիկ մեկնաբանությունների ստեղծման հետազոտության մեջ: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները հակված են ստեղծել ընդհանուր և անիմաստալից մեկնաբանություններ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք արդյունավետ բազմատեսականների ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի բարելավենք ստեղծված մոտեցումների բազմազանությունը: Երկու երաժշտական մեկնաբանությունների տվյալների փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մոդելը կարող է արդյունավետ ստեղծել մի շարք տարբեր երաժշտական մեկնաբանություններ, հիմնված տարբեր տեսանկյունների վրա, որոնք գերազանցում են ամենաբարձր հիմքեր', 'bn': 'মিউজিক মন্তব্যের স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রজন্ম গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যারা সঙ্গীত এবং সঙ্গীত প্ল্যাটফর্মের জনপ্রিয় মানুষের সঙ্গীত মন্তব্যে একই গানের জন্য উচ্চবিচ্ছিন্ন এবং বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি রয়েছে। অন্য কথায়, একটি গানের জন্য বিভিন্ন মন্তব্য বিভিন্ন সঙ্গীত দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে এসেছে। তবে স্বয়ংক্রিয় মন্তব্য প্রজন্মের উপর গবেষণায় এই চরিত্র বিবেচনা করা হয়নি। বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি সাধারণ এবং অর্থহীন মন্তব্য তৈরি করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি কার্যকর বহুদৃষ্টিভঙ্গিক কৌশল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে উৎপাদন করা মন্তব্যের বৈচিত্র্য বৃদ্ধি করতে। এই পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দুই সঙ্গীত মন্তব্যের ডাটাসেটে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল কার্যকর ভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে ভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে বিভিন্ন ধরনে', 'fa': 'نسل اتوماتیک توضیح های موسیقی برای افزایش شهرت موسیقی و فعالیت های موسیقی مهم است. در توضیح موسیقی انسان، فرق های بلند و متفاوت برای یک آهنگ وجود دارد. به عبارت دیگر، برای یک آهنگ، توضیح های متفاوت از نظر موسیقی متفاوت است. ولی به این حال، این ویژگی در تحقیقات نسل توضیح\u200cهای خودکار خوب به نظر نمی\u200cرسد. روش\u200cهای موجود به تولید مشترک و بی\u200cمعنی تولید می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما یک استراتژی بسیار موثر برای افزایش مختلف توصیف\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه آزمایش در دو مجموعه اطلاعات توضیح موسیقی نشان می دهد که مدل پیشنهاد ما می تواند به طور موثر یک مجموعه توضیح موسیقی مختلف را تولید کند که بر روی perspektivهای مختلف است، که با یک مرز زیادی از مرز زیادی استفاده می کند.', 'bs': 'Automatska generacija muzičkih komentara je od velike značajnosti za povećanje popularnosti muzike i aktivnosti muzičke platforme. U ljudskim komentarima muzike postoji visoka razlika i različita perspektiva za istu pesmu. Drugim riječima, za pjesmu, različiti komentari dolaze iz različitih muzičkih perspektiva. Međutim, do sada, ova karakteristika se ne smatra dobro u istraživanju o generaciji automatskih komentara. Postoje metode često proizvode zajedničke i besmislene komentare. U ovom papiru predlažemo efikasnu multiperspektivnu strategiju za unapređenje raznolikosti proizvedenih komentara. Rezultat eksperimenta na dva kompleta podataka o muzičkim komentarima pokazuje da naš predloženi model može efektivno stvoriti niz različitih muzičkih komentara na temelju različitih perspektiva, koja iznosi osnovne linije države umjetnosti značajnom marginom.', 'ca': "La generació automàtica de comentaris musicals és de gran importància per augmentar la popularitat de la música i l'activitat de la plataforma musical. En els comentaris de música humana, hi ha una gran distinció i perspectives diverses per a la mateixa cançó. En altres paraules, per a una cançó, diferents comentaris provenen de diferents perspectives musicals. Tot i així, fins ara, aquesta característica no s'ha considerat bé en la recerca sobre la generació de comentaris automàtics. Els mètodes existents tendeixen a generar comentaris comuns i sense sentit. En aquest paper, proposem una estratègia multiperspectiva efectiva per millorar la diversitat dels comentaris generats. Els resultats de l'experiment en dos conjunts de dades de comentaris músics mostren que el nostre model proposat pot generar efectivament una sèrie de comentaris músics diversos basats en diferents perspectives, que supera les línies de base més avançades d'un marge substancial.", 'et': 'Muusikakommentaaride automaatne genereerimine on suure tähtsusega muusika populaarsuse ja muusikaplatvormi tegevuse suurendamisel. Inimmuusika kommentaarides on sama laulu jaoks suur eristus ja erinevad perspektiivid. Teisisõnu, laulu puhul tulenevad erinevad kommentaarid erinevatest muusikalistest vaatenurkadest. Seni ei ole seda omadust siiski automaatse kommentaaride genereerimise uuringutes hästi arvestatud. Olemasolevad meetodid kipuvad tekitama ühiseid ja mõttetuid kommentaare. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja tõhusa mitmeperspektiivilise strateegia, et suurendada esitatud kommentaaride mitmekesisust. Kahe muusikakommentaaride andmekogumi eksperimendi tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud mudel suudab tõhusalt genereerida erinevatel perspektiividel põhinevaid erinevaid muusikakommentaare, mis ületab oluliselt kaasaegseid lähtejooni.', 'fi': 'Musiikkikommenttien automaattisella tuottamisella on suuri merkitys musiikin suosion ja musiikkialustan toiminnan kasvattamisessa. Ihmismusiikkikommenteissa samalle laululle on paljon erottelua ja erilaisia näkökulmia. Toisin sanoen laululle erilaiset kommentit juontuvat erilaisista musiikillisista näkökulmista. Tähän mennessä tätä ominaisuutta ei kuitenkaan ole otettu hyvin huomioon automaattista kommentointia koskevassa tutkimuksessa. Nykyiset menetelmät tuottavat yleensä yhteisiä ja merkityksettömiä kommentteja. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotamme tehokasta moninäkökulmista strategiaa, jonka avulla voidaan lisätä saatujen kommenttien monimuotoisuutta. Kokeilutulokset kahdesta musiikinkommenttiaineistosta osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli pystyy tehokkaasti tuottamaan joukon erilaisia musiikkikommentteja eri näkökulmista, jotka ylittävät huipputason viitearvot merkittävästi.', 'cs': 'Automatické generování hudebních komentářů má velký význam pro zvýšení popularity hudby a aktivity hudební platformy. V komentářích lidské hudby existuje vysoký rozlišení a různé perspektivy pro stejnou píseň. Jinými slovy, u písničky vycházejí různé komentáře z různých hudebních perspektiv. Tato charakteristika však dosud nebyla při výzkumu automatického generování komentářů považována za dobře. Stávající metody mají tendenci generovat běžné a bezvýznamné komentáře. V tomto článku navrhujeme efektivní multiperspektivní strategii pro zvýšení rozmanitosti generovaných komentářů. Výsledky experimentů na dvou datových sadách hudebních komentářů ukazují, že náš navržený model může efektivně generovat řadu různých hudebních komentářů založených na různých perspektivách, které výrazně překonávají moderní základní linie.', 'jv': 'Jeneng automatik sing komentar musik kuwi nggawe akeh luwih apik kanggo kuwi popularno sing gawe musik karo akeh lanjut sing musik. Nang komentar musik sing wong, sing uwis dibenakake luwih lan ijol-ijol sing nganggep kuwi sing koyo ngono. Wurung liyane, kanggo nganggo sing, komentar sing wis dipambalo sing mengko perspektur musik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Perintah sing isih perbudhakan kang nggawe sawaran kuwi cah-cah dumateng. Nanging kuwi iki, kita nyubah ndheke sampeyan akeh Multi-perspekpektur nggambar nggawe barang sing nyimpen tur angka sing bisa komentar sing gagale. Wang', 'ha': "Kiyãyen farat-farat mai izni na musiki yana da muhimu wa ƙãra umarin musiki da aikin musiki. In human music comments, there exists high distinction and diverse perspectives for the same song.  Yana cikin wasu kalmõmi, dõmin wani ƙara, wata kalma dabam-dabam, za'a ci daga misãlai dabam-dabam. Amma, har a yanzu, ba a ƙaddara wannan halin a kan yin ƙidãya a cikin fitina kan zaɓen sharuya farat ɗaya. @ info: whatsthis Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani takwai mai amfani ga sha'awa masu yawa dõmin a ƙara wa'ada-sharuɗe. Matarin ya sami a kan danne biyu na musiki, yana nuna cewa misalinmu da aka buƙata, yana iya iya amfani da ƙarami masu ƙidãya wa masu musiki masu cikin sha'awurin wasu kalmõmi dabam-dabam, da ke samar da halin-danne-na-art da wani margin mai girma.", 'he': 'הדור האוטומטי של תגובות מוזיקה הוא משמעותי גדולה לגבירת הפופולריות של המוזיקה והפעילות של הפלטפורמת המוזיקה. בהערות מוזיקה אנושית, יש הבדל גבוה ומבטים מגוונים לאותו שיר. In other words, for a song, different comments stem from different musical perspectives.  בכל אופן, עד כה, האופייני הזה לא נחשב היטב במחקר על דור הערות אוטומטית. השיטות הקיומות נוטות לייצר תגובות משותפות וחסרות משמעות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים אסטרטגיה יעילה רבי פרספקטיבה כדי לשפר את מגוון ההערות המיוצרות. תוצאות הניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים של תגובות מוזיקה מראות שהמודל המוצע שלנו יכול ליצור באופן יעיל סדרה של תגובות מוזיקה מיוחדות מבוססות על מבטים שונים, אשר מגביר את קווי הבסיס המיוחדים ביותר על ידי שווה משמעותית.', 'sk': 'Avtomatska generacija glasbenih komentarjev je zelo pomembna za povečanje popularnosti glasbe in aktivnosti glasbene platforme. V komentarjih človeške glasbe obstaja visoka razlika in različne perspektive za isto pesem. Z drugimi besedami, za pesem različni komentarji izhajajo iz različnih glasbenih perspektiv. Vendar pa ta značilnost doslej ni bila dobro upoštevana v raziskavah o avtomatskem ustvarjanju komentarjev. Obstoječe metode ponavadi ustvarjajo skupne in nesmiselne pripombe. V tem dokumentu predlagamo učinkovito večperspektivno strategijo za povečanje raznolikosti ustvarjenih pripomb. Rezultati eksperimenta na dveh naborih podatkov o glasbenih komentarjih kažejo, da lahko naš predlagani model učinkovito ustvari niz različnih glasbenih komentarjev, ki temeljijo na različnih perspektivah, kar precej presega najsodobnejše osnovne črte.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་རོལ་དབྱངས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མི་རབས་ནི་རོལ་དབྱངས་དང་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་སྒེར་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་གཏོང་ན མིའི་རོལ་དབྱངས་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནང་དུ་གཞན་མི་གཅིག་དང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་མཐོ་རིམ་མཐུན་ཡོད། གཞན་དང་། སྒྲུང་མིའི་ནང་དུ། དབྱངས་རོལ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་མཐོང་སྣང་རྙེད་ཐུབ། ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟུན། ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྦྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་མེད་པ གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་དག་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་མེད་པའི་མཆན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་དང་མཐོང་སྐྱོང་བ་ཞིག The experiment results on two music comments datasets show that our proposed model can effectively generate a series of different music comments based on different perspectives, which outperforms state-of-the-art baselines by a substantial margin.'}
{'en': 'A Tale of Two Linkings : Dynamically Gating between Schema Linking and Structural Linking for Text-to-SQL Parsing', 'ar': 'قصة ارتباطين: التبديل الديناميكي بين ارتباط المخطط والربط الهيكلي لتحليل النص إلى SQL', 'es': 'Historia de dos enlaces: selección dinámica entre la vinculación de esquemas y la vinculación estructural para el análisis de texto a SQL', 'fr': "Une histoire de deux liens\xa0: Déclenchement dynamique entre la liaison de schéma et la liaison structurelle pour l'analyse texte-SQL", 'ja': '2つのリンクの物語:スキーマリンクと構造的リンクとの間のテキスト- to - SQL解析のための動的ゲーティング', 'pt': 'Um conto de dois vínculos: Portabilidade dinâmica entre vínculo de esquema e vínculo estrutural para análise de texto para SQL', 'hi': 'दो लिंकिंग की एक कहानी: स्कीमा लिंकिंग और स्ट्रक्चरल लिंकिंग के बीच टेक्स्ट-टू-एसक्यूएल पार्सिंग के लिए गतिशील रूप से गेटिंग', 'ru': 'Рассказ о двух связях: динамическое построение связей между схемами и структурными связями для анализа текста на SQL', 'zh': '二链接故事:动于架构链接构链接之间门控以析于SQL', 'ga': 'Scéal Dhá Nasc: Geata go Dinimiciúil idir Nascadh Scéimre agus Nascadh Struchtúrtha le haghaidh Parsáil Téacs-go-SQL', 'ka': 'ორი კავშირების სიტყვა: დინამიკურად სქემას დაკავშირება და სტრუქტურული კავშირება ტექსტის დაკავშირება SQL', 'hu': 'Két összekapcsolásról szóló mese: dinamikus összekapcsolás a sémakötések és a strukturális összekapcsolás között a szöveg-SQL értelmezéshez', 'el': 'Μια ιστορία δύο συνδέσεων: Δυναμική συλλογή μεταξύ σύνδεσης σχήματος και δομικής σύνδεσης για ανάλυση κειμένου-σε-SQL', 'kk': 'Екі сілтемелер тізімі: Мәтін- мен SQL талдау үшін сұлбаның сілтемесі мен структуралық сілтемесі арасындағы динамикалық тізімі', 'it': "Un racconto di due collegamenti: Gating dinamico tra collegamento schema e collegamento strutturale per l'analisi testo-SQL", 'lt': 'Dviejų sąsajų istorija: dinamiškas sąsajų tarp schemos sąsajų ir struktūrinio sąsajų teksto-SQL analizei', 'mk': 'Приказна за две врски: динамично поврзување помеѓу поврзувањето на шемата и структурно поврзување за анализирање текст- на- SQL', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'രണ്ടു ലിങ്കിങ്ങുകളുടെ ഒരു സംസാരം: സ്കീമാ ലിങ്ങിനും സ്ട്രാക്ട്രൂറല്\u200d ലിങ്ങിനും ഇടയില്\u200d സ്കീമാ ലിങ്ങിങ്ങും എസ്ക', 'mt': 'Storja ta’ Żewġ Rabtiet: Ġbir dinamiku bejn l-Iskema ta’ Rabta u r-Rabta Strutturali għall-Analiżi tat-Test mal-SQL', 'mn': 'Хоёр хоёр холбоотой түүх: Схема холбоотой, бүтэц холбоотой холбоотой Мэдээлэл-ээс SQL шинжилгээний хувьд', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Opowieść dwóch powiązań: Dynamiczne gromadzenie między łączeniem schematu a łączeniem strukturalnym dla parowania tekstu do SQL', 'ro': 'Povestea a două legături: întâlnirea dinamică între legătura schemei și legătura structurală pentru analizarea text-la-SQL', 'sr': 'Prièa o dva povezanja: dinamièno okupljanje izmeðu povezanja šeme i strukturalnog povezanja za analizu teksta na SQL', 'sv': 'En berättelse om två länkar: Dynamiskt Gating mellan schemalänkning och strukturell länkning för text-till-SQL tolkning', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Tale of Two Linkings: Dynamically Gating between Schema Linking and Structural Linking for Text-to-SQL Parsing', 'ta': 'இரண்டு இணைப்புகளின் பேசு: உரையில் இருந்து SQL பாடலுக்கான திட்டம் இணைப்பு மற்றும் அமைப்பு இணைப்புக்கு இடையே Dynamically Gating', 'ur': 'دو لینکنگ کی داستان: سیمیا لینکنگ اور ساختاری لینک کے درمیان سیمیاٹ کی طریقہ سے SQL پارسینگ کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một câu chuyện liên kết hai mối: Sự kết nối động động cơ giữa giản và kết nối cấu trúc cho văn bản tới SQL Parsons', 'bg': 'Приказка за две връзки: динамично свързване между свързване на схеми и структурно свързване за анализ текст към SQL', 'hr': 'Priča o dva povezanja: dinamički skupljanje između povezanja šeme i strukturalnog povezanja za ispitivanje teksta na SQL-u', 'da': 'En fortælling om to sammenkædninger: Dynamisk sammenkædning mellem skema sammenkædning og strukturel sammenkædning til tekst-til-SQL tolkning', 'nl': 'Een verhaal van twee koppelingen: dynamisch verzamelen tussen schema-koppeling en structurele koppeling voor tekst-naar-SQL Parsing', 'de': 'Eine Geschichte zweier Verknüpfungen: Dynamisches Sammeln zwischen Schema-Verknüpfung und Strukturverknüpfung für Text-to-SQL Parsing', 'fa': 'یک داستان از دو لینک: جمع داینامیک بین لینک برنامه و لینک ساختاری متن به SQL', 'ko': '두 가지 링크의 이야기: 텍스트에서 SQL로 해석되는 패턴 링크와 구조 링크 사이의 동적 선택', 'id': 'Sebuah Kisah Dua Hubungan: Pintu Dinamik antara Hubungan Skema dan Hubungan Struktur untuk Penganalisan Teks-ke-SQL', 'sw': 'A Tale of Two Linkings: Dynamically Gating between Schema Linking and Structural Linking for Text-to-SQL Parsing', 'tr': 'İki Saýlaw Hizmeti: Metin-tä-SQL Çözümlenmek üçin dinamik şekiller birleşme ve strukturel Bağlantı Aralında Gating', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një tregim me dy lidhje: lidhje dinamike midis lidhjes së skemës dhe lidhjes strukturore për analizimin e tekstit në SQL', 'am': 'Two Linkings: Dynamically Gating between Schema Linking and Structural Linking for Text- to-SQL Parsing', 'hy': 'Երկու կապերի պատմությունը. Ստեմայի կապերի և կառուցվածքային կապերի միջև դինամիկ կապեր տեքստի-SQL վերլուծության համար', 'az': 'İki bağlıq hekayəsi: Şema bağlaması və strukturlu bağlama arasında Metin-to-SQL analizi üçün dinamik olaraq', 'bn': 'দুই লিংকিং এর বক্তব্য: স্কীমা লিঙ্কিং এবং কৌশল লিং এর মধ্যে ডাইনামিক্যাল গেটিং টেক্সট- থেকে SQL পার্সিং এর জন্য', 'cs': 'Příběh dvou propojení: Dynamické shromažďování mezi propojením schémat a strukturálním propojením pro analýzu textu na SQL', 'et': 'Lugu kahest lingist: dünaamiliselt ühendamine skeemi linkimise ja struktuurilise lingimise vahel teksti-SQL-i parsimiseks', 'bs': 'Priča o dva povezanja: dinamički okupljanje između povezanja šeme i strukturalnog povezanja za analizu teksta na SQL', 'ca': "Una història de dos enllaços: Una unió dinàmica entre enllaç d'esquema i enllaç estructural per l'analització de text a SQL", 'fi': 'Tarina kahdesta linkityksestä: Dynaaminen yhdistäminen kaavioiden linkityksen ja rakenteellisen linkityksen välillä teksti-SQL-parsing', 'sk': 'Zgodba o dveh povezavah: dinamično povezovanje med shemami in strukturnim povezovanjem za razčlenitev besedila v SQL', 'he': 'A Tale of Two Linkings: Dynamically Gating between Schema Linking and Structural Linking for Text-to-SQL Parsing', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Tale of Two Linkings: Dynamically Gating between Schema Linking and Structural Linking for Text-to-SQL Parsing', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates'}
{'en': 'In Text-to-SQL semantic parsing, selecting the correct entities (tables and columns) for the generated SQL query is both crucial and challenging ; the parser is required to connect the natural language (NL) question and the SQL query to the structured knowledge in the database. We formulate two linking processes to address this challenge : schema linking which links explicit NL mentions to the database and structural linking which links the entities in the output SQL with their structural relationships in the database schema. Intuitively, the effectiveness of these two linking processes changes based on the entity being generated, thus we propose to dynamically choose between them using a gating mechanism. Integrating the proposed method with two graph neural network-based semantic parsers together with BERT representations demonstrates substantial gains in parsing accuracy on the challenging Spider dataset. Analyses show that our proposed method helps to enhance the structure of the model output when generating complicated SQL queries and offers more explainable predictions.', 'ar': 'في التحليل الدلالي لـ Text-to-SQL ، يعد اختيار الكيانات الصحيحة (الجداول والأعمدة) لاستعلام SQL الذي تم إنشاؤه أمرًا بالغ الأهمية وصعبًا ؛ المحلل اللغوي مطلوب لربط سؤال اللغة الطبيعية (NL) واستعلام SQL بالمعرفة المهيكلة في قاعدة البيانات. نقوم بصياغة عمليتي ربط لمواجهة هذا التحدي: ربط المخطط الذي يربط إشارات NL الصريحة بقاعدة البيانات والربط الهيكلي الذي يربط الكيانات في SQL الناتج بعلاقاتها الهيكلية في مخطط قاعدة البيانات. حدسيًا ، تتغير فعالية عمليتي الربط هاتين بناءً على الكيان الذي يتم إنشاؤه ، وبالتالي نقترح الاختيار بينهما ديناميكيًا باستخدام آلية البوابة. يُظهر تكامل الطريقة المقترحة مع اثنين من المحلل الدلالي المستند إلى الشبكة العصبية للرسم البياني جنبًا إلى جنب مع تمثيلات BERT مكاسب كبيرة في دقة التحليل على مجموعة بيانات Spider الصعبة. تظهر التحليلات أن طريقتنا المقترحة تساعد في تحسين بنية مخرجات النموذج عند إنشاء استعلامات SQL معقدة وتقدم تنبؤات أكثر قابلية للتفسير.', 'es': 'En el análisis semántico de texto a SQL, seleccionar las entidades correctas (tablas y columnas) para la consulta SQL generada es crucial y desafiante; el analizador debe conectar la pregunta de lenguaje natural (NL) y la consulta SQL con el conocimiento estructurado de la base de datos. Formulamos dos procesos de enlace para abordar este desafío: enlace de esquema que vincula menciones NL explícitas a la base de datos y enlace estructural que vincula las entidades en el SQL de salida con sus relaciones estructurales en el esquema de la base de datos. Intuitivamente, la eficacia de estos dos procesos de vinculación cambia en función de la entidad que se genera, por lo que proponemos elegir dinámicamente entre ellos mediante un mecanismo de control. La integración del método propuesto con dos analizadores semánticos basados en redes neuronales de gráficos junto con representaciones BERT demuestra ganancias sustanciales en la precisión del análisis en el desafiante conjunto de datos Spider. Los análisis muestran que nuestro método propuesto ayuda a mejorar la estructura de la salida del modelo al generar consultas SQL complicadas y ofrece predicciones más explicables.', 'fr': "Dans l'analyse sémantique Text-to-SQL, la sélection des entités correctes (tables et colonnes) pour la requête SQL générée est à la fois cruciale et difficile\xa0; l'analyseur doit connecter la question en langage naturel (NL) et la requête SQL aux connaissances structurées de la base de données. Nous formulons deux processus de liaison pour relever ce défi\xa0: la liaison de schéma qui lie les mentions NL explicites à la base de données et la liaison structurelle qui lie les entités dans le code SQL en sortie avec leurs relations structurelles dans le schéma de base de données. Intuitivement, l'efficacité de ces deux processus de liaison change en fonction de l'entité générée, nous proposons donc de choisir dynamiquement entre eux à l'aide d'un mécanisme de portillonnage. L'intégration de la méthode proposée avec deux analyseurs sémantiques basés sur un réseau neuronal graphique ainsi que des représentations BERT démontre des gains substantiels en termes de précision d'analyse sur le difficile jeu de données Spider. Les analyses montrent que la méthode que nous proposons contribue à améliorer la structure de la sortie du modèle lors de la génération de requêtes SQL complexes et offre des prévisions plus explicables.", 'pt': 'Na análise semântica Text-to-SQL, selecionar as entidades corretas (tabelas e colunas) para a consulta SQL gerada é crucial e desafiador; o analisador é necessário para conectar a pergunta de linguagem natural (NL) e a consulta SQL ao conhecimento estruturado no banco de dados. Formulamos dois processos de vinculação para enfrentar esse desafio: vinculação de esquema que vincula menções NL explícitas ao banco de dados e vinculação estrutural que vincula as entidades no SQL de saída com seus relacionamentos estruturais no esquema de banco de dados. Intuitivamente, a eficácia desses dois processos de ligação muda com base na entidade que está sendo gerada, portanto, propomos escolher dinamicamente entre eles usando um mecanismo de gating. A integração do método proposto com dois analisadores semânticos baseados em redes neurais gráficas juntamente com representações BERT demonstra ganhos substanciais na precisão da análise no desafiador conjunto de dados Spider. As análises mostram que nosso método proposto ajuda a melhorar a estrutura da saída do modelo ao gerar consultas SQL complicadas e oferece previsões mais explicáveis.', 'ja': 'Text - to - SQLセマンティック構文解析では、生成されたSQLクエリの正しいエンティティ(表と列)を選択することが重要であり、困難です。構文解析器は、データベース内の構造化された知識に自然言語(NL)の質問とSQLクエリを接続する必要があります。 この課題に対処するために、2つのリンクプロセスを策定します。1つは、明示的なNL言及をデータベースにリンクするスキーマリンク、もう1つは、出力SQLのエンティティとデータベーススキーマの構造関係をリンクする構造リンクです。 直感的には、これら2つのリンクプロセスの有効性は、生成されるエンティティに基づいて変化するため、ゲーティングメカニズムを使用してそれらの間で動的に選択することを提案します。 提案された方法を2つのニューラルグラフネットワークベースのセマンティック構文解析器とBERT表現と統合することは、挑戦的なSpiderデータセットの構文解析精度の大幅な向上を実証する。 分析によると、提案された方法は、複雑なSQLクエリを生成する際にモデル出力の構造を強化し、より説明可能な予測を提供するのに役立つことが示されています。', 'zh': '文本SQL语义解析中,为生成者SQL询择正体(表和列)既重且挑战性。 解析器须将自然语言(NL)问SQL连数据库结构化。 为二链接以应之:架构链接(其显式NL链接链接至数据库)与构链接(输SQL之实体与其在数据库架构者链接)。 直观曰:此二链接者有效性因其实体而变之,故吾言用门控而动之。 以所上之法与二神经网络之语义解析器与BERT合,有挑战性之Spider数集上解析准确性有实质性之崇。 分析表明,吾道有助于杂SQL询而益之,益之以占。', 'hi': 'पाठ-से-SQL शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग में, जनरेट किए गए SQL क्वेरी के लिए सही एंटिटी (तालिकाएँ और स्तंभ) का चयन करना महत्वपूर्ण और चुनौतीपूर्ण दोनों है; पार्सर डेटाबेस में संरचित ज्ञान के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा (NL) प्रश्न और SQL क्वेरी कनेक्ट करने के लिए आवश्यक है। हम इस चुनौती को संबोधित करने के लिए दो लिंकिंग प्रक्रियाओं को तैयार करते हैं: स्कीमा लिंकिंग जो स्पष्ट एनएल को डेटाबेस और संरचनात्मक लिंकिंग का उल्लेख करती है जो आउटपुट एसक्यूएल में संस्थाओं को डेटाबेस स्कीमा में उनके संरचनात्मक संबंधों के साथ जोड़ती है। Intuitively, इन दो लिंकिंग प्रक्रियाओं की प्रभावशीलता उत्पन्न होने वाली इकाई के आधार पर बदलती है, इस प्रकार हम गतिशील रूप से गेटिंग तंत्र का उपयोग करके उनके बीच चयन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। दो ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित सिमेंटिक पार्सर के साथ प्रस्तावित विधि को एकीकृत करना BERT प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ मिलकर चुनौतीपूर्ण स्पाइडर डेटासेट पर सटीकता को पार्स करने में पर्याप्त लाभ प्रदर्शित करता है। विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि जटिल एसक्यूएल प्रश्नों को उत्पन्न करते समय मॉडल आउटपुट की संरचना को बढ़ाने में मदद करती है और अधिक समझाने योग्य भविष्यवाणियां प्रदान करती है।', 'ru': 'В семантическом парсинге Text-to-SQL выбор правильных сущностей (таблиц и столбцов) для сгенерированного SQL-запроса является одновременно решающим и сложным; парсер должен соединить вопрос естественного языка (NL) и SQL-запрос со структурированными знаниями в базе данных. Для решения этой задачи мы формулируем два связующих процесса: связывание схемы, которая связывает явные упоминания NL с базой данных, и структурное связывание, которое связывает сущности в выходном SQL с их структурными связями в схеме базы данных. Интуитивно эффективность этих двух связующих процессов изменяется в зависимости от генерируемого объекта, поэтому мы предлагаем динамически выбирать между ними с помощью механизма стробирования. Интеграция предложенного метода с двумя графовыми нейросетевыми семантическими парсерами вместе с представлениями BERT демонстрирует существенные достижения в точности синтаксического анализа на сложном наборе данных Spider. Анализы показывают, что предлагаемый нами метод помогает улучшить структуру вывода модели при генерации сложных SQL-запросов и предлагает более объяснимые прогнозы.', 'ga': 'Sa pharsáil shéimeantach Téacs-go-SQL, tá sé ríthábhachtach agus dúshlánach na heintitis chearta (táblaí agus colúin) a roghnú don cheist SQL ginte; tá an parsálaí ag teastáil chun ceist na teanga nádúrtha (NL) agus an cheist SQL a nascadh leis an eolas struchtúrtha sa bhunachar sonraí. Cuirimid dhá phróiseas nasctha le chéile chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dúshlán seo: nascadh scéimre a nascann tagairtí follasacha NL leis an mbunachar sonraí agus nascadh struchtúrach a nascann na haonáin san aschur SQL lena ngaolmhaireachtaí struchtúracha i scéimre an bhunachair sonraí. Go hintinneach, athraíonn éifeachtacht an dá phróiseas nasctha seo bunaithe ar an eintiteas a ghintear, agus mar sin tá sé beartaithe againn roghnú go dinimiciúil eatarthu ag baint úsáide as meicníocht geataithe. Léiríonn comhtháthú an mhodha atá beartaithe le dhá pharsálaí shéimeantacha néaracha líonra-bhunaithe mar aon le huiríll BERT gnóthachain shuntasacha i gcruinneas parsála ar thacar sonraí dúshlánach Spider. Léiríonn anailísí go gcabhraíonn an modh atá molta againn le struchtúr an aschuir mhúnla a fheabhsú agus fiosrúcháin casta SQL á nginiúint againn agus go dtugann sé tuar níos soiléire.', 'hu': 'A Text-to-SQL szemantikai elemzésben a létrehozott SQL lekérdezéshez szükséges megfelelő entitások (táblák és oszlopok) kiválasztása kulcsfontosságú és kihívást jelent; Az elemző szükséges, hogy összekapcsolja a természetes nyelvű (NL) kérdést és az SQL lekérdezést az adatbázis strukturált ismereteihez. Ennek a kihívásnak a megoldására két összekapcsolási folyamatot fogalmazunk meg: a kifejezetten NL említéseket összekapcsoló séma és a strukturális összekapcsolás, amely összekapcsolja a kimeneti SQL entitásokat az adatbázis sémájában lévő strukturális kapcsolataikkal. Intuitív módon e két összekapcsoló folyamat hatékonysága a generált entitástól függően változik, ezért azt javasoljuk, hogy dinamikusan válasszunk közöttük egy gating mechanizmus segítségével. A javasolt módszer két gráf neurális hálózat alapú szemantikai elemzővel történő integrálása BERT reprezentációkkal kombinálva jelentős mértékben növekszik az elemzési pontosság a kihívást jelentő Spider adatkészleten. Az elemzések azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszerünk segít javítani a modell kimenetének struktúráját bonyolult SQL lekérdezések generálásakor, és megmagyarázhatóbb előrejelzéseket kínál.', 'el': 'Στην σημασιολογική ανάλυση κειμένου-σε-η επιλογή των σωστών οντοτήτων (πίνακες και στήλες) για το παραγόμενο ερώτημα είναι τόσο κρίσιμη όσο και δύσκολη. ο αναλυτής απαιτείται για να συνδέσει την ερώτηση φυσικής γλώσσας (NL) και το ερώτημα με τη δομημένη γνώση στη βάση δεδομένων. Διαμορφώνουμε δύο διαδικασίες σύνδεσης για την αντιμετώπιση αυτής της πρόκλησης: τη σύνδεση σχήματος που συνδέει ρητές αναφορές NL με τη βάση δεδομένων και τη δομική σύνδεση που συνδέει τις οντότητες στην έξοδο με τις δομικές σχέσεις τους στο σχήμα βάσης δεδομένων. Διαισθητικά, η αποτελεσματικότητα αυτών των δύο διαδικασιών σύνδεσης αλλάζει με βάση την οντότητα που δημιουργείται, επομένως προτείνουμε να επιλέξουμε δυναμικά μεταξύ τους χρησιμοποιώντας έναν μηχανισμό πύλης. Η ενσωμάτωση της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου με δύο σημασιολογικούς αναλυτές γραφικών νευρωνικών δικτύων σε συνδυασμό με αναπαραστάσεις αποδεικνύει σημαντικά οφέλη στην ανάλυση της ακρίβειας στο απαιτητικό σύνολο δεδομένων Σπάιντερ. Οι αναλύσεις δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος συμβάλλει στην ενίσχυση της δομής της εξόδου μοντέλου κατά τη δημιουργία περίπλοκων ερωτήσεων και προσφέρει πιο επεξηγηματικές προβλέψεις.', 'ka': 'ტექსტი- დან SQL სმენტიკური პარალიზაციაში, შექმნილი SQL კითხვაზე მნიშვნელოვანი და შესაძლებელოვანი ინტერტიების არჩევა; პროცენტორი უნდა დაკავშიროთ მონახვა ენის (NL) კითხვა და SQL კითხვა ბაზატურის სტრუქტურაციული ცნობილებისთვის. ჩვენ ორი პროცესები გადაკავშირებთ ამ განცემების გარეშე: სქემა, რომელიც გადაკავშირება განსხვავებული NL და სტრუქტურული დაკავშირება, რომელიც განსხვავებული SQL-ის სტრუქტურული დაკავშირებების გარე ინტევიტიურად, ამ ორი პროცესების შესაბამისი ცვლილებების ეფექტიურობა, რომლებიც იქნება ინტერტის შესაბამისათვის, ამიტომ ჩვენ დავწყვებთ დინამიკურად მათგანი შორის ამორჩევ საზოგადომის მეთოდის ინტერგურაცია ორი გრაფიკური ნეიროლური ქსელის მუშაობით სემენტიკური პარასერებით ერთად BERT-ის გამოსახულებებითან გამოსახულება გამოსახულებს ძალიან წარმოიდგი ანალიზები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა მოდელის გამოსახულების სტრუქტურაციას უფრო მეტირებას, როდესაც კომპლექტირებული SQL კითხვების შექმნა და უფრო განახ', 'it': "Nell'analisi semantica Text-to-SQL, selezionare le entità corrette (tabelle e colonne) per la query SQL generata è cruciale e stimolante; il parser è necessario per collegare la domanda del linguaggio naturale (NL) e la query SQL alla conoscenza strutturata nel database. Formuliamo due processi di collegamento per affrontare questa sfida: schema linking che collega menzioni NL esplicite al database e structural linking che collega le entità nell'SQL di output con le loro relazioni strutturali nello schema database. Intuitivamente, l'efficacia di questi due processi di collegamento cambia in base all'entità generata, quindi proponiamo di scegliere dinamicamente tra di loro utilizzando un meccanismo di gating. L'integrazione del metodo proposto con due parser semantici basati su reti neurali grafici insieme alle rappresentazioni BERT dimostra notevoli guadagni nell'accuratezza dell'analisi sul complesso di dati Spider. Le analisi dimostrano che il nostro metodo proposto aiuta a migliorare la struttura dell'output del modello quando si generano query SQL complesse e offre previsioni più spiegabili.", 'lt': 'Teksto į SQL semantinio analizavimo metu labai svarbu ir sunku pasirinkti teisingus subjektus (lenteles ir stulpelius) sukurtam SQL klausimui; analizatorius turi sujungti natūralią kalbą (NL) ir SQL klausimą su struktūrinėmis duomenų bazės žiniomis. Šiam iššūkiui spręsti suformuluojame du susiejimo procesus: schemą, kuri aiškiai susieja Nyderlandus su duomenų baze ir struktūrinį susiejimą, kuris susieja išėjimo SQL subjektus su jų struktūriniais santykiais duomenų bazės schemoje. Intuityviai, šių dviejų susiejimo procesų veiksmingumas keičiasi remiantis sukuriamu subjektu, taigi siūlome dinamiškai pasirinkti juos naudojant gating mechanizmą. Siūlomo metodo integravimas su dviem grafiniais nerviniais tinklais pagrįstais semantiniais analizatoriais kartu su BERT rodymais rodo didelį naudą analizuojant tikslumą sudėtingame Spider duomenų rinkinyje. Analizės rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas padeda stiprinti modelio išeigos struktūrą sukuriant sudėtingus SQL klausimus ir siūlo aiškiau prognozuoti.', 'mk': 'Во семантичното анализирање од текст до SQL, изборот на правилните ентитети (таблички и колони) за генерираното SQL прашање е клучен и предизвикувачки; анализаторот е потребен за поврзување на прашањето на природниот јазик (NL) и прашањето SQL со структурираното знаење во базата на податоци. Ние формулираме два процеси поврзување за решавање на овој предизвик: шема поврзување кое експлицитно поврзува НЛ споменува со базата на податоци и структурно поврзување кое ги поврзува ентитетите во излезот СКЛ со нивните структурни односи во базата на Интуитивно, ефикасноста на овие два процеси на поврзување се менува базирано на генерирањето на ентитетот, па ние предлагаме динамично да избереме меѓу нив користејќи генерирачки механизам. Интеграцијата на предложениот метод со два семантични анализатори со семантична мрежа базирани на график заедно со претставувањата на БЕРТ покажува значителни зголемувања во анализата на точноста на предизвикувачкиот пајак податок. Анализите покажуваат дека нашиот предложен метод помага во зголемувањето на структурата на излезот на моделот кога генерира комплицирани SQL прашања и нуди пообјаснливи предвидувања.', 'ms': 'In Text-to-SQL semantic parsing, selecting the correct entities (tables and columns) for the generated SQL query is both crucial and challenging;  penghurai diperlukan untuk sambung soalan bahasa semulajadi (NL) dan pertanyaan SQL ke pengetahuan struktur dalam pangkalan data. Kami membentuk dua proses pautan untuk mengatasi cabaran ini: skema pautan mana pautan eksplicit NL menyebut kepada pangkalan data dan pautan struktur yang pautan entiti dalam output SQL dengan hubungan struktur mereka dalam skema pangkalan data. Secara intuitif, keefektivitas dua proses penghubung ini berubah berdasarkan entiti yang dijana, jadi kami cadangkan untuk memilih secara dinamik diantara mereka menggunakan mekanisme gating. Penyempurnaan kaedah yang diusulkan dengan dua penghurai semantik berasaskan rangkaian saraf graf bersama dengan perwakilan BERT menunjukkan keuntungan yang besar dalam hurai ketepatan pada set data Spider yang menantang. Analyses show that our proposed method helps to enhance the structure of the model output when generating complicated SQL queries and offers more explainable predictions.', 'kk': 'SQL сұраныс үшін мәтін- мен SQL semantic талдауында, құрылған SQL сұраныс үшін дұрыс нысандарды (кестелер мен бағандар) таңдау үшін маңызды және әсер етілген; мәтін- мен SQL сұраныстың бі Табиғи тіл (NL) сұрағын және SQL сұрағын деректер қорындағы құрылған білімдерге қосылу үшін талдаушы керек. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін екі сілтеме процестерін формулировамыз: NL деректер қорына сұлбаттау сұлбасы, SQL шығысындағы нысандарды деректер қорының құрылғы сұлбасында сілтемелерімен сілтемеледі. Бұл екі сілтеме процестердің өзгерістерін құрылған нысанға негізделген, сондықтан біз олардың арасында динамикалық түрлендіру механизмі қолданып таңдау үшін таңдаймыз. БЕРТ келтірілген әдістерді екі графикалық неврал желінде негізделген семантикалық талдаушылармен бірге бірге бірге бірге бірге бірге белгілікті өзгерту әдістерінің дұрыстығын талдауды көрсетеді. Анализацияларды көрсету үлгі шығысының құрылымына көмектеседі, SQL сұраныстарын құрып, түсінікті таңдауға көмектеседі.', 'ml': 'എസ്ക്യൂഎല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി ശരിയായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d (ടേബിളുകളും നിര്\u200dമ്മാണങ്ങള്\u200d) തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട the parser is required to connect the natural language (NL) question and the SQL query to the structured knowledge in the database.  ഈ വ്യാജത്തിന് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d രണ്ടു ലിങ്ങിങ്ങിങ്ങ് പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രൂപിക്കുന്നു: ഡാറ്റാബേസില്\u200d NL പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന സ്കീമാ ലിങ്ക് ചെയ്യുന ഈ രണ്ടു ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ് പ്രക്രിയകളുടെ പ്രക്രിയഫലമാണ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന വസ്തുവിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് മാറ്റുന്നത്, അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പുറത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d വളര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d സഹായിക്ക', 'mt': 'Fl-analiżi semantika minn Test għal SQL, l-għażla tal-entitajiet korretti (tabelli u kolonni) għall-mistoqsija SQL iġġenerata hija kemm kruċjali kif ukoll ta’ sfida; il-analizzatur huwa meħtieġ li jgħaqqad il-kwistjoni tal-lingwa naturali (NL) u l-mistoqsija SQL mal-għarfien strutturat fid-database. Aħna nformulaw żewġ proċessi ta’ rabta biex nindirizzaw din l-isfida: skema li tgħaqqad li tgħaqqad in-NL b’mod espliċitu ssemmi mad-database u rabta strutturali li tgħaqqad l-entitajiet fl-SQL tal-output mar-relazzjonijiet strutturali tagħhom fl-iskema tad-database. Intwittivament, l-effettività ta’ dawn iż-żewġ proċessi ta’ rabta tibdil ibbażat fuq l-entità li qed tiġi ġġenerata, u għalhekk qed nipproponu li nagħżlu b’mod dinamiku bejniethom bl-użu ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ gating. L-integrazzjoni tal-metodu propost ma’ żewġ analizzaturi semantiċi bbażati fuq in-netwerk newrali tal-grafika flimkien mar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-BERT turi kisbiet sostanzjali fl-analiżi tal-preċiżjoni fuq is-sett ta’ dejta Spider li jisfida. L-analiżi turi li l-metodu propost tagħna jgħin biex tittejjeb l-istruttura tal-produzzjoni tal-mudell meta jiġu ġġenerati mistoqsijiet ikkumplikati dwar SQL u joffri tbassir aktar spjegabbli.', 'mn': 'Текст-ээс SQL-т semantic хуваалцах үед, үүсгэн SQL кверсийн зөв нэгж (хүснэгт, багана) сонгох нь чухал болон шаардлагатай. Байгалийн хэл (NL) асуултыг, SQL кверийг өгөгдлийн сангийн бүтээгдэхүүнтэй холбох хэрэгтэй. Бид энэ сорилтыг удирдах хоёр холбоотой процессийг тооцоолж байна: NL-г тодорхой холбоотой схема өгөгдлийн сан болон бүтцийн холбоотой холбоотой, өгөгдлийн сан схемы бүтцийн холбоотой SQL-ын гаргасан бүтцийг холбоотой. Эдгээр хоёр холбоотой үйл явцуудын үр дүнтэй үр дүнтэй байдал нь бүтээгдэхүүний бий болгон өөрчлөгдөж байна. Иймээс бид тэдний хоорондын хоорондоо холбоотой механизм ашиглан динамик сонгохыг санал бол Хоёр график мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан semantic parsers болон BERT-ын илтгэлүүдтэй холбоотой арга замыг нэгтгэх нь шаардлагатай Spider өгөгдлийн сангийн зөв талаар үнэхээр ашигтай байдаг. Шалгуулалт нь бидний санал өгсөн арга нь төвөгтэй SQL квадратуудыг бүтээж, илүү тайлбарлах таамаглалтыг гаргах үед загварын бүтээгдэхүүнд тусалдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'I semantisk tolking av tekst- til SQL er det både vanskeleg og vanskeleg å velja korrekte entiteter (tabeller og kolonner) for den genererte SQL- spørjinga. tolkaren er nødvendig for å kopla til naturspråket (NL) spørsmålet og SQL- spørsmålet til den strukturerte kunnskapen i databasen. Vi formerer to tilkoplingsprosesser for å handtera denne utfordringen: skjema som lenkjer eksplisitt NL mener til databasen og strukturelle lenkje som lenkjer entitetene i utdataSQL med sine strukturelle forhold i databaseskjema. Intuitivt er effektiviteten av desse to tilkoplingsprosessene endringar basert på eininga som vert generert, slik at vi foreslår å velja dynamisk mellom dei med ein gating mechanism. Integrering av den foreslåde metoden med to grafnettverksbaserte semantiske tolkar saman med BERT-representasjonar viser stor forskjell i tolking av nøyaktighet på den vanskelege datasettet for Spider. Analyser viser at vårt foreslått metode hjelper til å forbetra strukturen av modelleutdata når det genererar kompliserte SQL- spørjingar og tilbyr meir forklarbare forhåndsvising.', 'pl': 'W parsowaniu semantycznym Text-to-SQL wybór właściwych jednostek (tabeli i kolumn) dla generowanego zapytania SQL jest zarówno kluczowy, jak i wymagający; Parser jest wymagany do połączenia pytania języka naturalnego (NL) i zapytania SQL ze strukturalną wiedzą w bazie danych. Formułujemy dwa procesy łączenia, aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu: łączenie schematu, które łączy wyraźne wzmianki NL z bazą danych oraz łączenie strukturalne, które łączy podmioty w wyjściowym SQL z ich relacjami strukturalnymi w schemacie bazy danych. Intuicyjnie efektywność tych dwóch procesów łączących zmienia się w zależności od generowanej jednostki, dlatego proponujemy dynamiczny wybór między nimi za pomocą mechanizmu gating. Integracja proponowanej metody z dwoma analizatorami semantycznymi opartymi na wykresach sieci neuronowej wraz z reprezentacjami BERT pokazuje znaczny wzrost dokładności analizowania wymagającego zbioru danych Spider. Analizy pokazują, że proponowana przez nas metoda pomaga poprawić strukturę wyjścia modelu podczas generowania skomplikowanych zapytań SQL i oferuje bardziej wytłumaczalne prognozy.', 'ro': 'În analizarea semantică Text-to-SQL, selectarea entităților corecte (tabele și coloanele) pentru interogarea SQL generată este atât crucială, cât și provocatoare; parserul este necesar pentru a conecta întrebarea limbajului natural (NL) și interogarea SQL la cunoștințele structurate din baza de date. Formulăm două procese de legătură pentru a face față acestei provocări: schema de legătură care leagă mențiunile explicite NL de baza de date și structura de legătură care leagă entitățile din SQL de ieșire cu relațiile lor structurale în schema de bază de date. Intuitiv, eficacitatea acestor doua procese de legatura se schimba in functie de entitatea generata, astfel propunem sa alegem dinamic intre ele folosind un mecanism de gating. Integrarea metodei propuse cu două analize semantice bazate pe rețele neurale grafice împreună cu reprezentările BERT demonstrează câștiguri substanțiale în precizia analizării pe setul de date provocator Spider. Analizele arată că metoda propusă ajută la îmbunătățirea structurii ieșirii modelului atunci când generează interogări SQL complicate și oferă predicții mai explicabile.', 'sr': 'U semantičkom analizu teksta na SQL, odabranje ispravnih entiteta (tablica i kolona) za proizvedeni SQL zahtev je i ključno i izazovno; analizator je potreban da poveže prirodno jezik (NL) pitanje i SQL pitanje sa strukturiranim znanjem u bazi podataka. Formirali smo dva povezanja procesa za rješavanje ovog izazova: šema povezanja koja povezuje ekskluzivnu NL spominje bazu podataka i strukturnu povezanost koja povezuje entitate u SQL-u sa njihovim strukturnim odnosima u šemu baze podataka. Intuitivno, učinkovitost tih dva procesa povezivanja promjena na temelju stvaranja entiteta, tako predlažemo dinamički izabrati između njih koristeći mehanizam prijevoza. Integrujući predloženu metodu sa dvojicom semantičnih analizatora na grafu neuralne mreže zajedno sa predstavljanjem BERT pokazuje značajne dobitke u analizu tačnosti na kompletu izazovnih paukovih podataka. Analiziranja pokazuje da naša predložena metoda pomaže da poboljša strukturu modela izlaza kada stvara komplikovane SQL ispitivanja i ponudi objašnjivije predviđanja.', 'si': 'පාළ- ට- SQL සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණයෙන්, නිර්මාණය කරපු SQL ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා හරිම අයිතියක් තෝරාගන්න, ප්\u200dරශ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව (NL) ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ SQL ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා දත්තුවෙන් සංස්ථාපනය ක අපි මේ අභ්\u200dයානය විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වැඩසටහන් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා: ස්කීමා සම්බන්ධ වැඩසටහන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩසටහන් සහ සංස්කරණය සම්බන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන්ම, මේ සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන්, ඉතින් අපි ඔවුන්ගේ අතර අතර සම්බන්ධ විධානය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විධානය සමඟ බෙර්ට් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණය සමග BERT ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණා විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරන්න උදව් කරනවා මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ සංස්ක', 'so': "Qorshaha SQL-ka-SQL waa muhiim iyo dhibaatooyin muhiim ah. baaritaanka waxaa loo baahan yahay in la xiriiro su'aalaha afka asalka ah (NL) iyo su'aalaha SQL oo la xiriira aqoonta aasaasiga ah. We formulate two linking processes to address this challenge: schema linking which links explicit NL mentions to the database and structural linking which links the entities in the output SQL with their structural relationships in the database schema.  Sida darteed waxyaabaha labadan kooxaha isku xiran waxay bedeshaan habka la sameeyo, sidaas darteed waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aad si dhaqdhaqaaqsan u doorataan dhexdooda isticmaalka meymiska hagitaanka. Isku qabsashada qaababka la soo jeeday iyo laba baarlamayaasha neurada ee shabakadda semantika ah ee ku saleysan BERT waxay muuqataa faa'iido badan oo ku saabsan korsashada cadaaladda Spider-ka. Analyaalku wuxuu muujiyaa in qaabkeennu uu soo jeeday uu caawinayo in uu kordhiyo dhismaha soo baxa modellka marka uu sameeyo su'aalo complicsan SQL oo uu siiyo wax ka sii sheegid.", 'sv': 'I semantisk text-till-SQL-tolkning är det både avgörande och utmanande att välja rätt entiteter (tabeller och kolumner) för den genererade SQL-frågan. parsern krävs för att koppla frågan om naturligt språk (NL) och SQL-frågan till den strukturerade kunskapen i databasen. Vi formulerar två kopplingsprocesser för att hantera denna utmaning: schemalänkning som länkar explicita NL-omnämnanden till databasen och strukturell länkning som länkar entiteterna i utdataSQL med deras strukturella relationer i databasschemat. Intuitivt förändras effektiviteten av dessa två länkande processer baserat på den entitet som genereras, därför föreslår vi att dynamiskt välja mellan dem med hjälp av en gating mekanism. Att integrera den föreslagna metoden med två grafneurala nätverksbaserade semantiska tolkare tillsammans med BERT-representationer visar betydande vinster i tolkningens noggrannhet på den utmanande Spider-datauppsättningen. Analyser visar att vår föreslagna metod hjälper till att förbättra strukturen på modellutmatningen vid generering av komplicerade SQL-frågor och erbjuder mer förklarliga förutsägelser.', 'ta': 'உரையில் இருந்து SQL கேள்விக்கான சரியான பொருள்கள் (அட்டவணைகள் மற்றும் நெடுக்கைகள்) தேர்ந்தெடுத்தால் முக்கியமானது மற்றும் சவால்  இயல்பான மொழி (NL) கேள்வியையும் SQL கேள்வியையும் தரவுத்தளத்தில் அமைக்கப்பட்ட அறிவியுடன் இணைக்க வேண்டும். இந்த சவாலை முடியும் இரண்டு இணைப்பு செயல்களை நாம் உருவாக்குகிறோம்: திட்டமான இணைப்பு திட்டம் இணைப்பு என்எல் தகவல்தளத்தில் குறிப்பிடும் மற்றும் கட்டுப்பாட் இந்த இரண்டு இணைப்பு செயல்களின் விளைவுகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பொருளின் அடிப்படையில் மாறுகிறது, அதனால் நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பு முறைமையை பயன்படுத் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறையில் இரண்டு வரைப்படத்தின் பிணையம் சார்ந்த பிணையம் பார்சர்களுடன் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட பிரெட் குறிப்புகளுடன் இரண்டு வரைபடம் சே மாதிரி வெளியீட்டின் உருவாக்கத்தை அதிகரிக்க உதவும் என்று ஆராய்ச்சிகள் காட்டுகிறது சிக்கலான SQL கேள்விகளை உருவாக்கும் போது மற்', 'ur': 'Text-to-SQL semantic parsing میں، جوڑا ہوا SQL سؤال کے لئے درست ایٹیوں (ٹیبلز اور ستونوں) کا انتخاب کرنا ضروری ہے اور مشکل ہے۔ پارچر کی ضرورت ہے کہ طبیعی زبان (NL) سؤال اور SQL سؤال ڈیٹابیس میں ساختہ علم کے ساتھ اتصال کرے۔ ہم نے اس چالوں کے بارے میں دو نقش پرسسوں کی تفریق کی ہے: اسکیم کی تفریق جو NL کی تفریق کرتی ہے، ڈیٹابیس اور ساخترکی تفریق کے ساتھ تفریق کرتی ہے، جسے اپوٹٹٹ SQL میں ایٹیٹیوں کو ان کے ساخترکٹ رابطے ڈیٹابی ان دونوں مرتبہ پرسسوں کی تغییرات جن کی وجہ سے ایجاد کی جاتی ہے، اسی طرح ہم ان کے درمیان داینامی طریقہ سے انتخاب کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. دو گراف نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیادی سیمانٹی پارس کے ساتھ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کی ترکیب کرنا BERT نمایش کے ساتھ بہت اچھی فائدہ دکھاتا ہے جو چالٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے بارے میں بہت اچھی فائدہ پارس کرتی ہے. تحلیل کرتا ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ موڈل آئٹوٹ کے ساختار کی عمدہ کرنے کی مدد کرتا ہے جب پیچیدہ SQL سوال جوڑ دیتا ہے اور زیادہ توضیح دینے والی پیش بینی کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name We formulate two linking processes to address this challenge: schema linking which links explicit NL mentions to the database and structural linking which links the entities in the output SQL with their structural relationships in the database schema.  Bu ikkita bog'liq jarayonlarning effekti yaratiladigan obʼekt asosida o'zgarishlarini o'zgartiradi, shunday qilib biz ularning orasidagi qismning mekanikani yordamida o'zgarishni davom qilamiz. Name Analyzerlar koʻrsatiladi, modelning tuzuvlarini oshirishga yordam beradi va murakkab SQL soʻrovlarini yaratishda va qo'shimcha foydalanuvchilarni oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'In Text-to-SQL semantics phân tách, Lựa chọn các thực thể chính xác (các bảng và cột) cho yêu cầu SQL đã được tạo vừa là thiết yếu và thử thách; Bộ phân giải cần kết nối câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (nhu cầu SQL) và câu hỏi có mã SQL với kiến thức được cấu trúc trong cơ sở dữ liệu. Chúng tôi mô tả hai thủ tục liên kết để đối phó với thử thách này: liên kết âm mưu liên kết con người mà con người có liên kết trực tiếp với cơ sở dữ liệu. Trực giác, tính hiệu quả của hai tiến trình liên kết này thay đổi dựa trên cơ thể được tạo ra, do đó chúng tôi đề nghị chọn tự động giữa hai tiến trình nhờ vào một cơ chế chọn lọc. Sự hợp nhất phương pháp đã đề nghị với hai phân tích cơ quan quan chữ chính thức của mạng lưới thần kinh cùng với các biểu hiện của BERT đã chứng minh được nhiều lợi thế trong việc phân tích chính xác trên tập tin thử thách. Phân tích cho thấy phương pháp đề xuất giúp cải thiện cấu trúc của kết xuất mô hình khi tạo các yêu cầu SQL phức tạp và cung cấp các dự đoán có thể giải thích hơn.', 'bg': 'При семантичното анализиране от текст към избор на правилните обекти (таблици и колони) за генерираната заявка е едновременно решаващо и предизвикателно; анализаторът е необходим за свързване на въпроса с естествения език (NL) и заявката към структурираното знание в базата данни. Формулираме два процеса на свързване, за да се справим с това предизвикателство: свързване на схема, която свързва изрични споменавания към базата данни и структурно свързване, което свързва субектите в изходния SQL с техните структурни взаимоотношения в схемата на базата данни. Интуитивно ефективността на тези два свързващи процеса се променя въз основа на генерираното същество, така че предлагаме динамично да избираме между тях с помощта на гейтинг механизъм. Интегрирането на предложения метод с два семантични анализатора на базата на графична невронна мрежа заедно с представянето показва значителни печалби в точността на анализа на предизвикателния набор от данни на Спайдър. Анализите показват, че предложеният ни метод помага да се подобри структурата на изходния модел при генериране на сложни заявки и предлага по-обясними прогнози.', 'hr': 'U semantičkom analizu teksta do SQL-a, odabrati ispravne entitate (tablice i kolone) za proizvedeno SQL ispitivanje je ključna i izazovna; analizator je potrebno za povezivanje prirodnog jezika (NL) pitanja i SQL pitanje sa strukturiranim znanjem u bazi podataka. Formirali smo dva povezanja procesa za rješavanje ovog izazova: šema povezanja koja povezuje pojasno NL spominje bazu podataka i strukturnu povezanost koja povezuje entitate u izvodnji SQL sa njihovim strukturnim odnosima u šemu baze podataka. Intuitivno, učinkovitost tih dva procesa povezanih promjena na temelju stvaranja entiteta, stoga predlažemo dinamički odabrati između njih koristeći mehanizam prijevoza. Uključujući predloženu metodu sa dvije semantične analizatore na neuralnoj mreži, zajedno s predstavljanjem BERT-a, pokazuje značajne dobitke u analizanju točnosti na izazovnom kompletu podataka pauka. Analiziranja pokazuju da naša predložena metoda pomaže u poboljšanju strukture modelskog izlaza kada proizvede komplicirane SQL ispitivanja i nude objašnjivije predviđanja.', 'da': 'I Text-to-SQL semantisk parsing er det både afgørende og udfordrende at vælge de korrekte entiteter (tabeller og kolonner) til den genererede SQL-forespørgsel; parseren er påkrævet for at forbinde natursprogspørgsmålet (NL) og SQL-forespørgslen til den strukturerede viden i databasen. Vi formulerer to sammenkædningsprocesser for at løse denne udfordring: skemaforbindelse, som forbinder eksplicitte NL-omtaler til databasen, og strukturel forbindelse, som forbinder entiteterne i output SQL med deres strukturelle relationer i databaseskemaet. Intuitivt ændrer effektiviteten af disse to sammenkædningsprocesser sig baseret på den enhed, der genereres, og derfor foreslår vi dynamisk at vælge mellem dem ved hjælp af en gating mekanisme. Integrering af den foreslåede metode med to grafneurale netværksbaserede semantiske parsere sammen med BERT repræsentationer demonstrerer betydelige gevinster i parsing nøjagtighed på det udfordrende Spider datasæt. Analyser viser, at vores foreslåede metode hjælper med at forbedre strukturen af modellen output, når der genereres komplicerede SQL-forespørgsler og tilbyder mere forklarelige forudsigelser.', 'nl': "Bij semantische parsing van tekst naar SQL is het selecteren van de juiste entiteiten (tabellen en kolommen) voor de gegenereerde SQL query cruciaal en uitdagend; De parser is nodig om de natuurlijke taalvraag en de SQL query te koppelen aan de gestructureerde kennis in de database. We formuleren twee koppelingsprocessen om deze uitdaging aan te pakken: schema linking die expliciete NL vermeldingen linkt aan de database en structurele linking die de entiteiten in de output SQL koppelt aan hun structurele relaties in het databaseschema. Intuïtief verandert de effectiviteit van deze twee koppelingsprocessen op basis van de entiteit die wordt gegenereerd, dus stellen we voor om dynamisch tussen hen te kiezen met behulp van een gating mechanisme. Door de voorgestelde methode te integreren met twee op neuronale netwerken gebaseerde semantische parsers in combinatie met BERT-representaties, wordt de nauwkeurigheid van het parsen op de uitdagende Spider dataset aanzienlijk verbeterd. Analyses tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methode helpt om de structuur van de model output te verbeteren bij het genereren van ingewikkelde SQL query's en biedt meer uitlegbare voorspellingen.", 'fa': 'در بررسی متن به SQL semantic، برگزیدن entities درست (tables and columns) برای پرسش SQL تولید هر دو بسیار مهم و مشکل است. پاره\u200cکننده لازم است که سوال زبان طبیعی (NL) و سوال SQL را با دانش ساخته\u200cشده در داده\u200cبان ارتباط کند. ما دو فرایند ارتباط برای حل این چالش را فرمول می\u200cکنیم: برنامه ارتباط که ارتباط NL روشن به داده\u200cهای اطلاعات و ارتباط ساختار ارتباط می\u200cدهد که ارتباط ساختارشان را در SQL خروج با ارتباط ساختارشان در برنامه\u200cی داده\u200cهای داده\u200cهای خود عملکرد این دو فرآیند مرتبط بر اساس متعلق تولید شده است، بنابراین ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از یک مکانیسم درگیری بین آن\u200cها را dynamically انتخاب کنیم. جمع کردن روش پیشنهاد با دو مشخص\u200cکننده\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی با نمایش\u200cهای BERT در بررسی دقیقاتی در مجموعه داده\u200cهای عنکبوت مشکل نشان می\u200cدهد. تحلیل\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش پیشنهاد ما کمک می\u200cکند تا ساختار نتیجه مدل را بیشتر کند وقتی تولید سوالات SQL پیچیده و پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای قابل توضیح بیشتری را پیشنهاد دهد.', 'de': 'Beim semantischen Text-to-SQL Parsing ist die Auswahl der richtigen Entitäten (Tabellen und Spalten) für die generierte SQL-Abfrage sowohl entscheidend als auch herausfordernd. Der Parser wird benötigt, um die Frage der natürlichen Sprache (NL) und die SQL-Abfrage mit dem strukturierten Wissen in der Datenbank zu verbinden. Wir formulieren zwei Verknüpfungsprozesse, um diese Herausforderung anzugehen: Schema-Verknüpfung, die explizite NL-Erwähnungen mit der Datenbank verknüpft und strukturelle Verknüpfung, die die Entitäten in der Ausgabe-SQL mit ihren strukturellen Beziehungen im Datenbankschema verknüpft. Intuitiv ändert sich die Effektivität dieser beiden Verknüpfungsprozesse basierend auf der generierten Entität, daher schlagen wir vor, dynamisch zwischen ihnen über einen Gating-Mechanismus zu wählen. Die Integration der vorgeschlagenen Methode mit zwei graphen neuronalen Netzwerk-basierten semantischen Parsern zusammen mit BERT-Darstellungen zeigt erhebliche Verbesserungen in der Parsing-Genauigkeit auf dem herausfordernden Spider-Datensatz. Analysen zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagene Methode dazu beiträgt, die Struktur der Modellausgabe bei der Generierung komplizierter SQL-Abfragen zu verbessern und erklärbarere Vorhersagen bietet.', 'id': 'Dalam penghuraian semantis Teks-ke-SQL, memilih entitas yang tepat (tabel dan kolom) untuk pertanyaan SQL yang dihasilkan adalah penting dan menantang; pemeriksa diperlukan untuk menghubungkan pertanyaan bahasa alami (NL) dan pertanyaan SQL dengan pengetahuan strukturasi di database. Kami menyusun dua proses menghubungkan untuk mengatasi tantangan ini: skema menghubungkan yang menghubungkan eksplicit NL menyebutkan ke database dan struktur menghubungkan yang menghubungkan entitas dalam output SQL dengan hubungan struktur mereka dalam skema database. Intuisif, efektivitas dari dua proses menghubungkan perubahan berdasarkan entitas yang dihasilkan, sehingga kami mengusulkan untuk memilih secara dinamik diantara mereka menggunakan mekanisme gating. Integrasi metode yang diusulkan dengan dua grafik jaringan saraf berdasarkan parser semantis bersama dengan rappresentasi BERT menunjukkan keuntungan besar dalam menghindari akurasi pada set data Spider yang menantang. Analisis menunjukkan bahwa metode kami diusulkan membantu meningkatkan struktur output model ketika menghasilkan pertanyaan SQL yang rumit dan menawarkan prediksi yang lebih jelas.', 'ko': '텍스트에서 SQL의 의미 해석에서 생성된 SQL 조회를 위해 정확한 실체(표와 열)를 선택하는 것은 매우 중요하고 도전적이다.해석기는 자연 언어(NL) 문제와 SQL 조회를 데이터베이스에 연결하는 구조화된 지식을 필요로 한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 두 가지 링크 과정을 제정했다. 그것이 바로 모델 링크(schema linking, 현식 NL 인용을 데이터베이스에 연결)와 구조 링크(structural linking, 출력 SQL의 실체와 데이터베이스 모델의 구조 관계를 연결한다).직관적으로 말하면 이 두 링크 과정의 유효성은 생성된 실체에 따라 달라지기 때문에 우리는 선택 메커니즘을 사용하여 그들 사이에서 동적 선택을 하는 것을 권장한다.제시된 방법을 두 개의 도신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 의미 분석기와 결합한 데다가 BERT는 도전적인 스파이더 데이터 집합에서 해석 정밀도를 현저히 높일 수 있다고 밝혔다.분석에 의하면 복잡한 SQL 조회를 생성할 때 우리가 제시한 방법은 모델 출력의 구조를 강화하고 더 많은 해석 가능한 예측을 제공하는 데 도움이 된다.', 'sw': 'Katika mabadiliko ya kimapenzi na SQL, kuchagua vitu sahihi (meza na safu) kwa ajili ya swali la SQL lililotengenezwa ni muhimu na changamoto; mchambuzi anahitaji kuunganisha maswali ya lugha asilia (NL) na swali la SQL kwa ufahamu wa ujenzi katika database. We formulate two linking processes to address this challenge: schema linking which links explicit NL mentions to the database and structural linking which links the entities in the output SQL with their structural relationships in the database schema.  Kwa ujumla, ufanisi wa michakato haya mawili yanabadilika kwa msingi wa taasisi inayotengenezwa, kwa hiyo tunapendekeza kuchagua kwa nguvu kati yao kwa kutumia mfumo wa kuunganisha. Kuunganisha mbinu zilizopendekezwa na wabunge wa picha mbili wenye mtandao wa neura pamoja na wawakilishi wa BERT wanaonyesha mafanikio makubwa katika kuendesha uhakika wa taarifa za Spider. Uchambuzi unaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa inasaidia kuongeza muundo wa matokeo ya modeli wakati wa kutengeneza maswali magumu ya SQL na kutoa utabiri usioeleweka zaidi.', 'af': "In Teks- na- SQL semantiese verwerking, kies die korrekte entiteite (tabelle en kolomme) vir die genereerde SQL navraag is beide kruipende en uitgelaat; en Die ontleerder is benodig om die natuurlike taal (NL) vraag te koppel en die SQL navraag na die struktureerde kennis in die databasis. Ons formeer twee koppeling prosesse om hierdie uitdrukking te adres: skema koppeling wat skakel eksplisiese NL bepaal na die databasis en strukturele koppeling wat skakel die entiteite in die uitset SQL met hul strukturele verhouding in die databasis skema. Intuitief, die effektiviteit van hierdie twee koppeling prosesse veranderinge gebaseer op die genereerde entiteit, sodat ons voorstel om dinamies tussen hulle te kies met 'n gating mechanisme te gebruik. Integreer die voorgestelde metode met twee graaf neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde semantiese verwerkers saam met BERT-voorstellings verskyn substantiele verkrywings in die verwerking van presisiteit op die aanvaardige Spider-datastel. Analiseer wys dat ons voorgestelde metode hulp om die struktuur van die model uitvoer te verbeter wanneer genereer kompliseerde SQL vrae en offer meer verduidelike voorskoue.", 'tr': "SQL soragy üçin metin-tä-SQL semantik analýşinde, üretilen hatlar üçin dogry bir zat (täblisaň we sütünler) saýlamak hem möhüm bir we çözümlidir; ýene-de bir sened soragy üçin ullanýar tebigy dili (NL) soragyny we SQL soragyny databank içindeki strukturly bilgileri bilen baglaşmak üçin tertiblemek gerek. Biz bu kynçylygy çözmek üçin iki bağlantı prosesini formüle etdik: NL bağlantısı databank ve struktur bağlantısı ile birleştirir. Bu sistemi database şemasında struktur ilişkilerini SQL çizgisinde birleştirir. Bu iki procesiň etkinliýeti birnäçe guralýan guralýan guralýan üýtgewlerine daýanýar, şonuň üçin olaryň arasynda gatlama mekanizmasyny ulanarak dinamik saýlamagyny teklip edýäris. BERT'iň temsilleri bilen öňürlenen yöntemi iki grafik näyral şebekesi bilen birleşdirmek üçin çözümli örümjek maglumaty takmynanda gaty bir gazanlygy görkezýär. Analyze ediyor ki teklif edilen yöntemimiz, karmaşık SQL sorgularyny oluşturduğunda modellerin yapısını geliştirmek için yardım edip, daha düşünelik tahminleri teklif ediyor.", 'sq': 'Në analizimin semantik tekst-në-SQL, zgjedhja e njësive të sakta (tabela dhe kolona) për pyetjen e gjeneruar SQL është si vendimtare ashtu edhe sfiduese; analizuesi është i kërkuar për të lidhur pyetjen e gjuhës natyrore (NL) dhe pyetjen e SQL me njohurinë e strukturuar në bazë të dhënave. Ne formulojmë dy procese lidhje për të trajtuar këtë sfidë: skema lidhje e cila lidh NL të qartë përmend në bazën e dhënave dhe lidhje strukturore që lidh njësitë në SQL të daljes me marrëdhëniet strukturore të tyre në skemën e bazës së dhënave. Në mënyrë intuitive, efektshmëria e këtyre dy proceseve lidhje ndryshon bazuar në njësinë që gjenerohet, kështu ne propozojmë të zgjedhim dinamikisht midis tyre duke përdorur një mekanizëm gating. Integrimi i metodës së propozuar me dy analizues semantikë me bazë në rrjetin nervor grafik së bashku me përfaqësimet e BERT demonstron fitime thelbësore në analizimin e saktësisë në grupin e të dhënave sfiduese Spider. Analizat tregojnë se metoda jonë e propozuar ndihmon për të përmirësuar strukturën e prodhimit të modelit kur krijon pyetje të komplikuara SQL dhe ofron parashikime më të shpjegueshme.', 'am': 'በጽሑፍ-ወደ-SQL ማስታወቂያ ማህበረሰብ፣ ለመፍጠር የSQL ጉዳይ አቅራቢያ አካባቢዎችን (ገበታዎች እና ስልክቶች) በመረጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ መግለጫ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ (NL) ጥያቄ እና SQL ጥያቄ በመዳረጃው ውስጥ እውቀትን ለመግጠም ያስፈልጋል። ይህንን ጥያቄ ለመጠየቅ ሁለት የተያያያየ ፕሮጀክቶችን እናደርጋለን፤ schema እና NL በመጠቀም እና የመረጃ መቀመጫዎች እና የመሠረተኛ ግንኙነትን እና አካባቢዎችን በመውጫው SQL ውስጥ አካባቢ ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም የዳታ መቀመጫው ዘዴማ ውስጥ የሚያያያይዛቸዋል፡፡ በጥያቄ፣ እነዚህ ሁለቱ ግንኙነት ፕሮጀክቶች አካባቢውን በመፍጠር ይለውጣሉ፡፡ ስለዚህም በመግለጫ አካሄድ በመጠቀም በአዲስ መምረጥ እናስባታለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በሁለት የግራፍ ነዌራዊ መረብ ላይ የተቀመጠውን የsemantic ፓርራር እና BERT መልዕክቶች በተጨማሪው የSpider ዳታተር ማዘጋጀት ላይ የሚያሳውቅ የውጤት ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቃለች፡፡ Analysis shows that our proposed method is helping to enhance the model output structure when creating complicated SQL queries and increasingly explaining predictions.', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ վերլուծում տեքստի-սQL-ի մեջ SQL հարցում ճիշտ հաստատությունների (աղյուսակների և սյունների) ընտրությունը շատ կարևոր է և դժվար: վերլուծումը պահանջվում է կապելու բնական լեզվի (ՆԼ) հարցը և SQL հարցը բազայի կառուցվածված գիտելիքների հետ: Մենք ձևավորում ենք երկու գործընթաց, որոնք կապում են այս մարտահրավերի լուծման համար. սխեմա, որը կապում է, որը կապում է բացատրական ՆԼ-ը հիշեցնում է բազայի և կառուցվածքային կապերի հետ, որոնք կապում են SQL-ի արտադրության անհատները նրանց կառուցվա Ինտուիտիվ, այս երկու գործընթացների արդյունավետությունը փոխվում է կազմակերպության հիմնված վրա, որը ստեղծվում է, և մենք առաջարկում ենք դինամիկ ընտրել դրանց միջև՝ օգտագործելով գետիվ մեխանիզմ: Integrating the proposed method with two graph neural network-based semantic parsers together with BERT representations demonstrates substantial gains in parsing accuracy on the challenging Spider dataset.  Հետազոտությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը օգնում է բարելավել մոդելի արդյունքի կառուցվածքը, երբ ստեղծում են բարդ SQL հարցեր և առաջարկում ավելի բացատրելի կանխատեսումներ:', 'az': 'Mətn-to-SQL semantik ayırmasında, ürəklənmiş SQL soruşması üçün düzgün məlumatları (tabletler və sütunlar) seçmək də mövcuddur və çətinlikdir; təbiətli dil (NL) sualını və SQL sualını dağıt verilənlərin qurulmuş biliklərinə bağlamaq üçün ayırıcı lazımdır. Biz bu çətinlikdən çəkinmək üçün iki bağlayıcı proses formüləyirik: NL-i bağlayıb dağıt tabanına və strukturlu bağlayıb bağlayıb, SQL-in çıxış məlumatlarını dağıt tabanında strukturlu ilişkiləri ilə bağlayır. Bu iki birləşdirilmiş proseslərin dəyişikliklərinin etkinliği, buna görə də onların arasındakı dəyişiklik mehānismini istifadə edərək dinamik seçməsini təklif edirik. İki grafik nöral ağ tərəfindən olan semantik analizacılar birlikdə BERT tərzimləri ilə birlikdə təklif edilən metodları ilə birlikdə çətin örümçək verilənlərin dəqiqliyini ayırmaq üçün böyük qənimətlər göstərir. Analyzlər göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş metodumuzun modellərin çıxışının strukturasını daha kompleks SQL soruşmalarını yaratmaq və daha açıq-aydın tədbirləri təklif edir.', 'ca': "En l'analització semàntica text-to-SQL, seleccionar les entitats correctes (taules i columnes) per la consulta SQL generada és tant crucial com difícil; l'analitzador és requerit per connectar la pregunta de llenguatge natural (NL) i la pregunta SQL amb el coneixement estructurat de la base de dades. Formem dos processos de vinculació per abordar aquest repte: esquema que vincula que vincula explícitament NL menciona a la base de dades i vinculació estructural que vincula les entitats de la SQL de sortida amb les seves relacions estructurals de la base de dades. Intuïtivament, l'eficacia d'aquests dos processos d'enllaç canvia basat en la generació d'una entitat, així que proposem triar dinàmicament entre ells fent servir un mecanisme de gating. Integrar el mètode proposat amb dos analitzadors semàntics basats en la xarxa neural gràfic juntament amb representacions BERT demostra avanços substancials en l'analització de la precisió del conjunt de dades Spider desafiant. Les anàlisis mostren que el nostre mètode proposat ajuda a millorar l'estructura de la producció del model quan genera preguntes complicades de SQL i ofereix prediccions més explicables.", 'bn': 'টেক্সট- থেকে SQL সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং এ সঠিক বস্তু (টেবিল এবং কলাম) নির্বাচন করা হয়েছে এসকিউএল অনুসন্ধানের জন্য সঠিক বস্তু (টেবিল এবং কল প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা (NL) প্রশ্ন এবং ডাটাবেসের কাঠামো জ্ঞানের সাথে SQL অনুসন্ধানের সাথে সংযোগ স্থাপন করার জন্য প্রস এই চ্যালেঞ্জের মাধ্যমে আমরা দুটি লিঙ্কিং প্রক্রিয়া তৈরি করি: স্কীমা লিঙ্ক করা যায় যা ডাটাবেস এবং কাঠামো লিঙ্কের উল্লেখ করে এনএল সংযুক্ত করে যায় যা আউটপুট S এই দুই লিঙ্কিং প্রক্রিয়ার কার্যকর্ম তৈরি করা বস্তুর ভিত্তিতে পরিবর্তন ঘটে, তাই আমরা তাদের মধ্যে একটি গেটিং মেকেনিস্টিম ব্যবহার করে তাদে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির সাথে দুটি গ্রাফ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক সেম্যান্টিক পার্সারের সাথে যুক্ত করে বিবেরেটের প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে ব বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি মডেল আউটপুটের কাঠামো বাড়াতে সাহায্য করে যখন জটিল এসকিউএল প্রশ্ন তৈরি করে আরো ব্যাখ', 'cs': 'V sémantickém parsování Text-to-SQL je výběr správných entit (tabulek a sloupců) pro generovaný SQL dotaz klíčový a náročný; Parser je nutný k propojení otázky přirozeného jazyka (NL) a SQL dotazu se strukturovanými znalostmi v databázi. Pro řešení této výzvy formulujeme dva propojovací procesy: schéma propojení, které propojuje explicitní NL zmínky s databází a strukturální propojení, které propojuje entity ve výstupním SQL s jejich strukturálními vztahy v databázovém schématu. Intuitivně se efektivita těchto dvou propojovacích procesů mění na základě generované entity, proto navrhujeme dynamicky volit mezi nimi pomocí gatingového mechanismu. Integrace navržené metody se dvěma grafovými sémantickými parsery založenými na neuronových sítích společně s BERT reprezentacemi ukazuje značné zvýšení přesnosti parsování na náročné datové sadě Spider. Analýzy ukazují, že naše navržená metoda pomáhá zlepšit strukturu modelového výstupu při generování složitých SQL dotazů a nabízí vysvětlitelnější predikce.', 'bs': 'U semantičkom analizu teksta na SQL, odabranje ispravnih entiteta (tablica i kolona) za proizvedeni SQL zahtev je i ključno i izazovno; analizator je potreban za povezivanje prirodnog jezika (NL) pitanja i SQL pitanja sa strukturiranim znanjem u bazi podataka. Formirali smo dva procesa povezanja kako bi se riješila ovaj izazov: šema povezanja koja povezuje pojasno NL spominje bazu podataka i strukturnu povezanost koja povezuje entitate u SQL-u sa njihovim strukturnim odnosima u šemu baze podataka. Intuitivno, učinkovitost tih dva procesa povezivanja promjena na temelju stvaranja entiteta, stoga predlažemo dinamički izabrati između njih koristeći mehanizam prijevoza. Integrujući predloženu metodu sa dvije semantične analizatore na grafu neuronske mreže zajedno sa predstavljanjem BERT pokazuje značajne dobitke u analizu tačnosti na kompletu izazovnih paukovih podataka. Analiziranja pokazuju da naša predložena metoda pomaže da poboljša strukturu modela izlaza kada proizvede komplicirane SQL ispitivanja i ponudi objašnjivije predviđanja.', 'et': 'Teksti-SQL semantilises parsimises on loodud SQL-päringu jaoks õigete olemite (tabelite ja veergude) valimine nii oluline kui ka keeruline; parser on vajalik looduskeele (NL) küsimuse ja SQL-päringu ühendamiseks struktureeritud teadmistega andmebaasis. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks sõnastame kaks sidumisprotsessi: skeemi linkimine, mis ühendab selgesõnalised NL nimetused andmebaasiga, ja struktuuriline linkimine, mis ühendab väljund SQL olemid nende struktuuriliste seostega andmebaasi skeemis. Intuitiivselt muutub nende kahe siduva protsessi efektiivsus genereeritava olemi põhjal, seega teeme ettepaneku valida dünaamiliselt nende vahel, kasutades värvimehhanismi. Kavandatud meetodi integreerimine kahe graafilise närvivõrgupõhise semantilise parseriga koos BERT esitustega näitab märkimisväärset edu parsimise täpsuses keerulise Spider andmekogumi puhul. Analüüsid näitavad, et meie pakutud meetod aitab tõhustada mudeli väljundi struktuuri keeruliste SQL-päringute genereerimisel ja pakub selgitatavamaid prognoose.', 'fi': 'Teksti-SQL-semanttisessa jäsentämisessä oikeiden entiteettien (taulukoiden ja sarakkeiden) valitseminen luodulle SQL-kyselylle on sekä ratkaisevaa että haastavaa. Analysoijaa tarvitaan yhdistämään luonnonkielikysymys (NL) ja SQL-kysely tietokannan jäsenneltyyn tietoon. Haasteeseen vastaamiseksi muotoillaan kaksi linkitysprosessia: schema linking, joka linkittää eksplisiittiset NL-maininnat tietokantaan, ja structural linking, joka linkittää SQL:n tuotoksen entiteetit niiden rakenteellisiin suhteisiin tietokantakaaviossa. Intuitiivisesti näiden kahden linkitysprosessin tehokkuus muuttuu syntyvän kokonaisuuden perusteella, joten ehdotamme dynaamista valintaa niiden välillä käyttämällä porttimekanismia. Ehdotetun menetelmän integrointi kahteen graafiseen neuroverkkoon pohjautuvaan semanttiseen parseriin yhdessä BERT-esityksiin osoittaa merkittäviä hyötyjä haastavan Spider-aineiston parsimisessa. Analyysit osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä auttaa parantamaan mallin tuotoksen rakennetta monimutkaisten SQL-kyselyjen luomisessa ja tarjoaa selittäviä ennusteita.', 'sk': 'Pri semantičnem razčlenjanju besedila v SQL je izbira pravilnih entitet (tabel in stolpcev) za ustvarjeno poizvedbo SQL ključnega pomena in zahtevnega; Razčlenjevalnik je potreben za povezavo vprašanja naravnega jezika (NL) in poizvedbe SQL s strukturiranim znanjem v zbirki podatkov. Za reševanje tega izziva oblikujemo dva procesa povezovanja: povezovanje sheme, ki povezuje eksplicitne omembe NL z bazo podatkov in strukturno povezovanje, ki povezuje entitete v izhodnem SQL z njihovimi strukturnimi relacijami v shemi baze podatkov. Intuitivno se učinkovitost teh dveh povezovalnih procesov spreminja na podlagi entitete, ki se ustvarja, zato predlagamo dinamično izbiro med njima z uporabo mehanizma gating. Integracija predlagane metode z dvema semantičnima razčlenjevalnikoma na podlagi grafičnega nevronskega omrežja skupaj s predstavitvami BERT kaže precejšnje dobičke pri razčlenjanju natančnosti pri zahtevnem naboru podatkov Spider. Analize kažejo, da naša predlagana metoda pomaga izboljšati strukturo izhodnega modela pri ustvarjanju zapletenih SQL poizvedb in ponuja bolj pojasnljive napovedi.', 'ha': '@ action: button Ana ƙayyade parser dõmin ya haɗi tambayar harshen asiyyar (NL) da kuma tambayin SQL zuwa masanin da aka saka cikin bangon database. We formulate two linking processes to address this challenge: schema linking which links explicit NL mentions to the database and structural linking which links the entities in the output SQL with their structural relationships in the database schema.  Taimar waɗannan aikinin da ke haɗi biyu sun musanya a kan an gina abun, kamar haka, Munã kwaɗayin ka sake hanyoyi a tsakanin su da wani mekanin mai ganga. Yi haɗa shirin da aka buɗa shi da parser biyu na gragragrafi na naurar-based semantic samura da masu wakin BERT, yana nuna mafaniki mai girma cikin parse tsari a kan danne-danne na tsãwa. Ana yi anaƙatan ya nuna cewa metoden da ake buƙata yana taimako da ya ƙara ƙidãya matsayin ayuka idan ya ƙãga tambayar SQL da lissafa kuma ya bãyar da bayani masu bayana.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Coverage Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan langgambar sampeyan iki nggawe perusahaan karo hal-hal structural sampeyan karo hal-hal gewehke NL kuwi nggawe databasa iki structural sampeyan Link 2 Backing Genjer', 'bo': 'In Text-to-SQL semantic parsing, selecting the correct entities (tables and columns) for the generated SQL query is both crucial and challenging; and དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག(NL)འདྲི་ཞིབ་དང་SQL་འདྲི་ཞིབ་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དགོས་པ We formulate two linking processes to address this challenge: schema linking which links explicit NL mentions to the database and structural linking which links the entities in the output SQL with their structural relationships in the database schema. དང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་དག་གི་དབང་ཆ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་ Integrating the proposed method with two neural network-based semantic parsers together with BERT representations demonstrate substantial gains in parsing accuracy on the challenging Spider dataset. Analyses show that our proposed method helps to enhance the structure of the model output when generating complicated SQL queries and offers more explainable predictions.', 'he': 'בהעברה סמנטית טקסט-לס המחקר נדרש כדי לקשר את שאלת השפה הטבעית (NL) ואת שאלת SQL לידע המבנה במאגר הנתונים. אנו מייצרים שני תהליכים של קישור כדי להתמודד עם האתגר הזה: סגמה שקשורה שקשורה בין NL שמדובר באופן ברור למאגר הנתונים וקשור מבנה שמקשר את היחידות שביציאה SQL עם מערכות יחסים מבנייות שלהם בתוכנית הנתונים. באופן אינטואיטיבי, היעילות של שני תהליכים הקשורים האלה משתנות בהתבסס על היחידה שנוצרה, כך אנחנו מציעים לבחור ביניהם באופן דינמי באמצעות מנגנון גייט. השיטה המוצעת באמצעות שתי מעבדות סמנטיות מבוססות ברשת עצבית גרפים יחד עם מייצגות BERT מראות שיכורים משמעותיים באבחן מדויקת על קבוצת נתונים של עכביש מאתגר. ניתוחים מראים שהשיטה המוצעת שלנו עוזרת לשפר את מבנה ההוצאה של המודל כשיוצרים שאלות SQL מסובכות ומציעה חזיונות מוסברות יותר.'}
{'en': 'Autoregressive Affective Language Forecasting : A Self-Supervised Task', 'ar': 'التنبؤ اللغوي الانحداري الذاتي: مهمة تخضع للإشراف الذاتي', 'es': 'Predicción autorregresiva del lenguaje afectivo: una tarea autosupervisada', 'pt': 'Previsão de linguagem afetiva autorregressiva: uma tarefa auto-supervisionada', 'fr': 'Prévisions linguistiques affectives autorégressives\xa0: une tâche auto-supervisée', 'ja': '自己回帰的情意言語予測：自己監督されたタスク', 'hi': 'स्वत: प्रतिगामी भावात्मक भाषा पूर्वानुमान: एक स्व-पर्यवेक्षित कार्य', 'zh': '自归情语占,自督事', 'ru': 'Авторегрессивное прогнозирование аффективного языка: самоконтролируемая задача', 'ga': 'Réamhaisnéisiú Teanga Aiféiseach Uathchéimnitheach: Tasc Féinmhaoirsithe', 'hu': 'Autoregresszív hatásos nyelvi előrejelzés: önfelügyeleti feladat', 'ka': 'ავტორეგრექსიური აფექტიური ენის პროგრამი: სოფექტიური დანახვა', 'el': 'Αυτοανακριτική Επιθετική Γλωσσική Πρόβλεψη: Μια Αυτοεπίβλεπτη Εργασία', 'it': 'Previsione del linguaggio affettivo autoregressivo: un compito auto-supervisionato', 'kk': 'Авто- регрессивні эффективті тіл бағдарламасы: Өзінің бақылау тапсырмасы', 'lt': 'Autoregresinė poveikio kalbų prognozė: savarankiškai prižiūrima užduotis', 'mk': 'Авторегресивно предвидување на ефективниот јазик: Самонадгледувана задача', 'ms': 'Ramalan Bahasa Afektif Autoregressive: A Self-Supervised Task', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ആഫ്രിക്റ്റീവ് ഭാഷ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുക: ഒരു സ്വയം സുപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലി', 'mt': 'Tbassir Awtoregressiv tal-Lingwa Affettiva: Kompitu Awto-Superviż', 'mn': 'Автоматик сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй хэл ойлголт: Өөрийгөө харах үйл ажил', 'pl': 'Autoregresywne prognozowanie języka afektywnego: zadanie samodzielnie nadzorowane', 'no': 'Autoregressiv effektiv språk- forhåndsvising: Eit sjølvovervakt oppgåve', 'ro': 'Previziunea limbajului afectiv autoregresiv: o sarcină auto-supravegheată', 'sr': 'Autoregresivno uticajno proglašavanje jezika: sami nadgledani zadatak', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය: ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩක්', 'so': 'Autoregressive Affective Language Forecasting: A Self-Supervised Task', 'ta': 'Autoregressive Affective Language Forecasting: A Self-Supervised Task', 'sv': 'Autoregressiv affektiv språkprognos: En självövervakad uppgift', 'ur': 'اٹوگریسٹی اثرات زبان کی پیش بینی: ایک خود-Supervised Task', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dự đoán ngôn ngữ ảnh hưởng: nhiệm vụ tự giám sát', 'bg': 'Авторегресивно афективно езиково прогнозиране: самоконтролирана задача', 'nl': 'Autoregressieve affectieve taalvoorspelling: een zelfbegeleide taak', 'da': 'Autoregressiv affektiv sprogprognose: En selvstyret opgave', 'de': 'Autoregressive Affektive Language Forecasting: Eine selbstüberwachte Aufgabe', 'id': 'Progresi Bahasa Afektif Autoregressive: A Self-Supervised Task', 'ko': '회귀 감정 언어 예측: 자기 감독 임무', 'sw': 'Utangazaji wa lugha yenye kujidhibiti: Kazi ya kujitegemea', 'tr': 'Otomatik gaýşartýan diller öňlenmek: Otomatik Gözlemä Taýşart', 'hr': 'Autoregresivno učinkovito proglašavanje jezika: samovjereni zadatak', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی زبان تاثیر\u200cپذیر خودکار: یک وظیفه تحت نظر خودکار', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i gjuhës me ndikim automatik: Një detyrë vetë-mbikqyrure', 'hy': 'A Auto- Survey Mission', 'az': 'Autoregressive Effective Language Forecasting: A Self-Supervised Task', 'bs': 'Autoregresivno utjecajno proglašavanje jezika: samovršeni zadatak', 'af': "Outomatiese regressief effektief taal voorskou: ' n Selfbesig Opdrag", 'cs': 'Autoregresivní efektivní jazyková předpověď: samozřejmý úkol', 'bn': 'Autoregressive Affective Language Forecasting: A Self-Supervised Task', 'ca': 'Previsió autoregressiva de llenguatges afectants: Una tasca auto-supervisada', 'fi': 'Autoregressive Affective Language Forecasting: Itsevalvottu tehtävä', 'et': 'Autoregressiivne mõjutav keele prognoosimine: enesejärelevalve ülesanne', 'he': 'שיפוט משפיע אוטורגרסיבי: משימה שמשמרת על עצמה', 'sk': 'Avtoregresivno učinkovito napovedovanje jezika: samonadzorovana naloga', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ལུས་པུའི་སྒུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་བཀོད་འདུག：རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་ཀ་ཞིག་', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'Human natural language is mentioned at a specific point in time while human emotions change over time. While much work has established a strong link between language use and emotional states, few have attempted to model emotional language in time. Here, we introduce the task of affective language forecasting   predicting future change in language based on past changes of language, a task with real-world applications such as treating mental health or forecasting trends in consumer confidence. We establish some of the fundamental autoregressive characteristics of the task (necessary history size, static versus dynamic length, varying time-step resolutions) and then build on popular sequence models for words to instead model sequences of language-based emotion in time. Over a novel Twitter dataset of 1,900 users and weekly + daily scores for 6 emotions and 2 additional linguistic attributes, we find a novel dual-sequence GRU model with decayed hidden states achieves best results (r =.66) significantly out-predicting, e.g., a moving averaging based on the past time-steps (r =.49). We make our anonymized dataset as well as task setup and evaluation code available for others to build on.affective language forecasting – predicting future change in language based on past changes of language, a task with real-world applications such as treating mental health or forecasting trends in consumer confidence. We establish some of the fundamental autoregressive characteristics of the task (necessary history size, static versus dynamic length, varying time-step resolutions) and then build on popular sequence models for words to instead model sequences of language-based emotion in time. Over a novel Twitter dataset of 1,900 users and weekly + daily scores for 6 emotions and 2 additional linguistic attributes, we find a novel dual-sequence GRU model with decayed hidden states achieves best results (r = .66) significantly out-predicting, e.g., a moving averaging based on the past time-steps (r = .49). We make our anonymized dataset as well as task setup and evaluation code available for others to build on.', 'ar': 'يتم ذكر اللغة الطبيعية للإنسان في نقطة زمنية محددة بينما تتغير المشاعر البشرية بمرور الوقت. في حين أن الكثير من العمل قد أنشأ رابطًا قويًا بين استخدام اللغة والحالات العاطفية ، إلا أن القليل منهم حاول صياغة لغة عاطفية في الوقت المناسب. هنا ، نقدم مهمة التنبؤ باللغة العاطفية - التنبؤ بالتغيير المستقبلي في اللغة بناءً على التغييرات السابقة للغة ، وهي مهمة مع تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي مثل علاج الصحة العقلية أو التنبؤ بالاتجاهات في ثقة المستهلك. لقد أنشأنا بعض الخصائص الأساسية للإنحدار الذاتي للمهمة (حجم السجل الضروري ، والطول الثابت مقابل الطول الديناميكي ، ودقة متغيرة للخطوات الزمنية) ثم نبني على نماذج التسلسل الشائعة للكلمات لنمذجة بدلاً من ذلك تسلسل العاطفة المستندة إلى اللغة في الوقت المناسب. عبر مجموعة بيانات Twitter جديدة تضم 1900 مستخدم وعشرات أسبوعية + يومية لـ 6 مشاعر و 2 سمات لغوية إضافية ، وجدنا نموذج GRU جديدًا مزدوج التسلسل مع حالات مخفية متحللة يحقق أفضل النتائج (r = 0.66) بشكل كبير للتنبؤ ، على سبيل المثال ، متوسط متحرك يعتمد على الخطوات الزمنية الماضية (r = .49). نجعل مجموعة البيانات المجهولة المصدر وكذلك إعداد المهام ورمز التقييم متاحين للآخرين للبناء عليها.', 'fr': "Le langage naturel humain est mentionné à un moment précis alors que les émotions humaines changent au fil du temps. Bien que de nombreux travaux aient établi un lien étroit entre l'utilisation du langage et les états émotionnels, peu ont tenté de modéliser le langage émotionnel dans le temps. Nous présentons ici la tâche de la prévision linguistique affective — prévoir les changements futurs de langue en fonction des changements de langue passés, une tâche avec des applications concrètes telles que le traitement de la santé mentale ou la prévision des tendances en matière de confiance des consommateurs. Nous établissons certaines des caractéristiques autorégressives fondamentales de la tâche (taille de l'historique nécessaire, durée statique par rapport à la durée dynamique, résolutions temporelles variables), puis nous nous appuyons sur des modèles de séquence populaires pour les mots afin de modéliser des séquences d'émotions basées sur la langue dans le temps. Sur un nouveau jeu de données Twitter de 1 900 utilisateurs et des scores hebdomadaires + quotidiens pour 6 émotions et 2 attributs linguistiques supplémentaires, nous découvrons qu'un nouveau modèle GRU à double séquence avec des états cachés désintégrés permet d'obtenir les meilleurs résultats (r = 0,66) dépassant de manière significative, par exemple, une moyenne mobile basée sur les étapes temporelles passées (r =. 49). Nous mettons notre jeu de données anonymisé ainsi que le code de configuration et d'évaluation des tâches à la disposition des autres utilisateurs.", 'es': 'El lenguaje natural humano se menciona en un momento específico, mientras que las emociones humanas cambian con el tiempo. Si bien mucho trabajo ha establecido un fuerte vínculo entre el uso del lenguaje y los estados emocionales, pocos han intentado modelar el lenguaje emocional a tiempo. Aquí presentamos la tarea de pronosticar el lenguaje afectivo: predecir los cambios futuros en el idioma en función de los cambios pasados del idioma, una tarea con aplicaciones del mundo real, como el tratamiento de la salud mental o la previsión de tendencias en la confianza del consumidor. Establecemos algunas de las características autorregresivas fundamentales de la tarea (el tamaño necesario del historial, la duración estática frente a la dinámica, diferentes resoluciones de pasos de tiempo) y luego nos basamos en modelos populares de secuencias de palabras para modelar secuencias de emociones basadas en el lenguaje en el tiempo. Sobre un novedoso conjunto de datos de Twitter de 1900 usuarios y puntuaciones semanales diarias de 6 emociones y 2 atributos lingüísticos adicionales, encontramos que un novedoso modelo GRU de doble secuencia con estados ocultos decadentes logra los mejores resultados (r = .66) con una predicción significativamente superior, por ejemplo, un promedio móvil basado en los pasos de tiempo pasados (r =. 49). Ponemos a disposición de otros usuarios nuestro conjunto de datos anonimizado, así como el código de configuración y evaluación de tareas.', 'pt': 'A linguagem natural humana é mencionada em um momento específico, enquanto as emoções humanas mudam ao longo do tempo. Embora muitos trabalhos tenham estabelecido uma forte ligação entre o uso da linguagem e os estados emocionais, poucos tentaram modelar a linguagem emocional a tempo. Aqui, apresentamos a tarefa de previsão de linguagem afetiva – prever mudanças futuras na linguagem com base em mudanças passadas de linguagem, uma tarefa com aplicações do mundo real, como tratar a saúde mental ou prever tendências na confiança do consumidor. Estabelecemos algumas das características autorregressivas fundamentais da tarefa (tamanho do histórico necessário, comprimento estático versus dinâmico, resoluções de passos de tempo variáveis) e, em seguida, construímos modelos de sequência populares de palavras para modelar sequências de emoção baseada em linguagem no tempo. Em um novo conjunto de dados do Twitter de 1.900 usuários e pontuações semanais + diárias para 6 emoções e 2 atributos linguísticos adicionais, descobrimos que um novo modelo GRU de sequência dupla com estados ocultos decaídos alcança melhores resultados (r = 0,66) com previsão significativamente maior, por exemplo, , uma média móvel baseada nos passos de tempo anteriores (r = 0,49). Disponibilizamos nosso conjunto de dados anônimos, bem como o código de configuração e avaliação de tarefas, para que outros possam construir.', 'ja': '人間の自然言語は特定の時点で言及され、人間の感情は時間の経過とともに変化します。 多くの研究が、言語使用と感情状態との間に強い結びつきを確立しているが、感情言語を時間的にモデル化しようとした研究はほとんどない。 ここでは、情動言語予測のタスクを紹介します。これは、言語の過去の変化に基づいて言語の将来的な変化を予測すること、メンタルヘルスの治療や消費者の信頼性の傾向の予測などの現実世界での応用に関するタスクです。 私たちは、タスクの基本的な自己回帰特性のいくつか（必要な履歴サイズ、静的対動的長さ、さまざまな時間ステップの解像度）を確立し、言語ベースの感情のシーケンスを時間の代わりにモデル化するために、人気のある単語のシーケンスモデルを構築します。 1,900人のユーザーの新規のTwitterデータセットと、6つの感情と2つの追加の言語属性の週次+日次スコアを超えて、私たちは、衰退した隠れた状態を持つ新規のデュアルシーケンスGRUモデルが、過去の時間ステップに基づいて動く平均値（ r =.49 ）など、予測を大幅に上回る最良の結果（ r = 0.06 ）を達成することを見出します。 匿名化されたデータセットとタスクの設定と評価コードを他のユーザーが構築できるようにします。', 'zh': '人之自然语言,特定之所及,而情之所移也。 虽众事坚固,鲜有拟情言语者。 此言情言之任 - 以往言占言之来,此一有世应用程序之事,如治心理健康占消费者信心之势也。 立事者自归于征(必小大,静与动,异时而步长分辨率),然后立流单词之序,非时建模于言情也。 一包1,900名用户者新型Twitter数集、6种情、2种语言属性每周+日得分中,见一种衰隐新型双序GRU形得最佳(r = .66),显优于占候,如基于往时步长(r = .49)移均。 使匿名数据集及职事置评代码可供他构。', 'hi': 'मानव प्राकृतिक भाषा का उल्लेख समय में एक विशिष्ट बिंदु पर किया जाता है जबकि मानव भावनाएं समय के साथ बदलती हैं। जबकि बहुत काम ने भाषा के उपयोग और भावनात्मक राज्यों के बीच एक मजबूत लिंक स्थापित किया है, कुछ ने समय पर भावनात्मक भाषा को मॉडल करने का प्रयास किया है। यहां, हम भावात्मक भाषा पूर्वानुमान के कार्य को पेश करते हैं - भाषा के पिछले परिवर्तनों के आधार पर भाषा में भविष्य के परिवर्तन की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों के साथ एक कार्य जैसे मानसिक स्वास्थ्य का इलाज करना या उपभोक्ता विश्वास में रुझानों का पूर्वानुमान करना। हम कार्य की कुछ मौलिक autoregressive विशेषताओं (आवश्यक इतिहास आकार, स्थिर बनाम गतिशील लंबाई, अलग-अलग समय-चरण संकल्प) स्थापित करते हैं और फिर समय में भाषा-आधारित भावनाओं के मॉडल अनुक्रमों के बजाय शब्दों के लिए लोकप्रिय अनुक्रम मॉडल पर निर्माण करते हैं। 1,900 उपयोगकर्ताओं के एक उपन्यास ट्विटर डेटासेट और 6 भावनाओं और 2 अतिरिक्त भाषाई विशेषताओं के लिए साप्ताहिक + दैनिक स्कोर पर, हम पाते हैं कि क्षयग्रस्त छिपे हुए राज्यों के साथ एक उपन्यास दोहरी-अनुक्रम जीआरयू मॉडल सबसे अच्छा परिणाम प्राप्त करता है (आर = .66) काफी हद तक आउट-भविष्यवाणी करता है, उदाहरण के लिए, पिछले समय-चरणों (आर = .49) के आधार पर एक चलती औसत। हम अपने अनाम डेटासेट के साथ-साथ कार्य सेटअप और मूल्यांकन कोड को दूसरों के निर्माण के लिए उपलब्ध कराते हैं।', 'ru': 'Человеческий естественный язык упоминается в определенный момент времени, в то время как человеческие эмоции меняются с течением времени. Хотя большая часть работы установила прочную связь между использованием языка и эмоциональными состояниями, лишь немногие пытались смоделировать эмоциональный язык во времени. Здесь мы вводим задачу аффективного языкового прогнозирования – прогнозирования будущих изменений языка на основе прошлых изменений языка, задачу с реальными приложениями, такими как лечение психического здоровья или прогнозирование тенденций в доверии потребителей. Мы устанавливаем некоторые из фундаментальных авторегрессивных характеристик задачи (необходимый размер истории, статическая и динамическая длительность, различные временные интервалы), а затем строим на популярных моделях последовательности для слов, чтобы вместо этого смоделировать последовательности языковых эмоций во времени. В новом наборе данных Twitter, состоящем из 1900 пользователей и еженедельных + ежедневных оценок для 6 эмоций и 2 дополнительных лингвистических атрибутов, мы находим, что новая модель ГРУ с двойной последовательностью с загнившими скрытыми состояниями достигает наилучших результатов (r = .66), значительно преувеличивая, например, скользящее усреднение на основе прошлых временных шагов (r = .49). Мы делаем наш анонимный набор данных, а также код настройки задач и оценки доступными для других пользователей.', 'ga': 'Luaitear teanga nádúrtha an duine ag pointe ama ar leith agus athraíonn mothúcháin dhaonna le himeacht ama. Cé gur chruthaigh go leor oibre nasc láidir idir úsáid teanga agus staid mhothúchánach, is beag duine a rinne iarracht teanga mhothúchánach a shamhaltú in am. Anseo, tugaimid isteach an tasc a bhaineann le réamhaisnéis mhothúchánach teanga – athruithe teanga sa todhchaí a thuar bunaithe ar athruithe teanga san am a chuaigh thart, tasc le feidhmchláir fhíorshaolacha ar nós meabhairshláinte a chóireáil nó treochtaí muiníne tomhaltóirí a thuar. Bunaímid cuid de bhuntréithe uath-aischéimnitheacha an taisc (méid staire riachtanach, fad statach versus dinimiciúil, réitigh céimeanna ama éagsúla) agus ansin tógaimid ar mhúnlaí seichimh coitianta le haghaidh focail chun seichimh mothúcháin teanga-bhunaithe a shamhaltú in am. Thar thacar sonraí nua Twitter de 1,900 úsáideoir agus scóir sheachtainiúla + laethúla do 6 mhothúchán agus 2 thréith theangeolaíoch bhreise, feicimid go mbaineann samhail GRU úrscéal dé-seicheamh le stáit ceilte meathlaithe na torthaí is fearr (r = .66) amach go suntasach, m.sh. , meánú gluaisteach bunaithe ar na céimeanna ama atá caite (r = .49). Cuirimid ár dtacar sonraí anaithnide chomh maith le socrú tascanna agus cód meastóireachta ar fáil do dhaoine eile le tógáil orthu.', 'el': 'Η ανθρώπινη φυσική γλώσσα αναφέρεται σε ένα συγκεκριμένο χρονικό σημείο ενώ τα ανθρώπινα συναισθήματα αλλάζουν με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Ενώ πολλές εργασίες έχουν δημιουργήσει μια ισχυρή σύνδεση μεταξύ της χρήσης της γλώσσας και των συναισθηματικών καταστάσεων, λίγοι έχουν προσπαθήσει να μοντελοποιήσουν τη συναισθηματική γλώσσα εγκαίρως. Εδώ, εισάγουμε το έργο της συναισθηματικής πρόβλεψης γλωσσών και της πρόβλεψης μελλοντικών αλλαγών στη γλώσσα με βάση προηγούμενες αλλαγές της γλώσσας, ένα έργο με πραγματικές εφαρμογές όπως η αντιμετώπιση της ψυχικής υγείας ή η πρόβλεψη τάσεων στην εμπιστοσύνη των καταναλωτών. Καθορίζουμε μερικά από τα θεμελιώδη αυτοανακριτικά χαρακτηριστικά της εργασίας (απαραίτητο μέγεθος ιστορικού, στατικό versus δυναμικό μήκος, ποικίλες αναλύσεις χρόνου-βημάτων) και στη συνέχεια χτίζουμε σε δημοφιλή μοντέλα ακολουθίας για λέξεις για να μοντελοποιήσουμε ακολουθίες γλωσσικών συναισθημάτων στο χρόνο. Μέσα από ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων του Twitter χρηστών 1.900 και εβδομαδιαίες και ημερήσιες βαθμολογίες για 6 συναισθήματα και δύο επιπλέον γλωσσικές ιδιότητες, διαπιστώνουμε ότι ένα νέο μοντέλο διπλής ακολουθίας με αποσυνθεμένες κρυφές καταστάσεις επιτυγχάνει τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα (ρ  .66) σημαντικά υπερπροβλέψει, π.χ., μια κινούμενη μέση μέτρηση βασισμένη στα προηγούμενα χρονικά βήματα (r  .49). Κάνουμε το ανώνυμο σύνολο δεδομένων μας, καθώς και τον κώδικα ρύθμισης και αξιολόγησης εργασιών διαθέσιμο για άλλους να βασιστούν.', 'hu': 'Az emberi természetes nyelvet egy adott időpontban említik, míg az emberi érzelmek idővel változnak. Bár sok munka erős kapcsolatot teremtett a nyelvhasználat és az érzelmi állapotok között, kevesen próbálták meg időben modellezni az érzelmi nyelvet. Itt bemutatjuk az affektív nyelvi előrejelzés feladatát - a nyelv jövőbeli változásainak előrejelzését a múltbeli nyelvváltozások alapján, olyan valós alkalmazásokkal, mint a mentális egészség kezelése vagy a fogyasztói bizalom tendenciáinak előrejelzése. Megállapítjuk a feladat néhány alapvető autoregresszív jellemzőjét (szükséges történelmi méret, statikus kontra dinamikus hossz, változó időlépési felbontások), majd a szavak népszerű sorozatmodelljeire építjük, hogy helyette a nyelvi alapú érzelmek szekvenciáit modellezzük időben. Egy 1900 felhasználóból álló új Twitter adatkészlet és heti + napi pontszám 6 érzelem és 2 további nyelvi tulajdonság felett találtunk egy új, kettős sorozatú GRU modell romlott rejtett állapotokkal, amelyek a legjobb eredményeket érik el (r = .66), jelentősen meghaladják az előrejelzést, pl. a múltbeli időlépéseken alapuló mozgó átlagot (r = .49). anonimizált adatkészletünket, valamint feladatbeállítási és értékelési kódunkat mások számára is elérhetővé tesszük.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის ნახვა ენერგია განსაკუთრებული წერტილიდან განსაკუთრებულია, როცა ადამიანის ემოციები დროში ცვლიან. თუმცა ბევრი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაობა ენების გამოყენება და ემოციონალური სტატუსების შორის ძალიან დაკავშირება, რამდენიმე მოცდილობენ აქ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ მომდინარე ენის გადაცვლების დასაწყება, რომელიც მხოლოდ მსოფლიო პროგრამებით, როგორც მეცნიერო ჯანმრთვის ან პროგრამებით მომხოლოდ ენის შეცვლების ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ რაოდენობის ფუნდამეტური ავტორეგრესიური პროგრამეტრებების (საჭირო ისტორიის ზომი, სტატიკური და დინამიკური სიგრძე, განსხვავებული დროის განსხვავებები) და შემდეგ პოლუპური სექციური მოდელები 1.900 მომხმარებელი და კვირაში + ყოველთვის მონაცემები 6 ემოციებისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთ ჩვენ ჩვენი ანონიმიზებული მონაცემების კოდის შესაძლებელია და დავაკეთებული მონაცემების კოდის შესაძლებელია.', 'it': "Il linguaggio naturale umano è menzionato in un momento specifico, mentre le emozioni umane cambiano nel tempo. Mentre molto lavoro ha stabilito un forte legame tra l'uso del linguaggio e gli stati emotivi, pochi hanno tentato di modellare il linguaggio emotivo nel tempo. Qui, presentiamo il compito di previsione affettiva del linguaggio - predire il cambiamento futuro del linguaggio in base ai cambiamenti passati del linguaggio, un compito con applicazioni del mondo reale come il trattamento della salute mentale o la previsione delle tendenze nella fiducia dei consumatori. Stabiliamo alcune delle caratteristiche autoregressive fondamentali del compito (dimensione della cronologia necessaria, lunghezza statica vs dinamica, risoluzione variabile dei passi temporali) e poi costruiamo su modelli di sequenza popolari per le parole per modellare invece sequenze di emozioni basate sul linguaggio nel tempo. Su un nuovo set di dati Twitter di 1.900 utenti e punteggi settimanali + giornalieri per 6 emozioni e 2 attributi linguistici aggiuntivi, troviamo un nuovo modello di GRU a doppia sequenza con stati nascosti decaduti che raggiunge i migliori risultati (r = .66) significativamente superiori alle previsioni, ad esempio una media mobile basata sui passi temporali passati (r = .49). Mettiamo a disposizione degli altri il nostro set di dati anonimizzati, nonché il codice di configurazione e valutazione delle attività.", 'lt': 'Žmogaus natūrali kalba yra paminėta konkrečiu momentu, o žmogaus emocijos keičiasi laikui bėgant. Nors daug darbo sukūrė tvirtą ryšį tarp kalbos naudojimo ir emocinių būklių, keli bandė laiku modeliuoti emocinę kalbą. Čia įvedame paveikimo kalbų prognozavimo užduotį - prognozuoti būsimus kalbos pokyčius, pagrįstus ankstesniais kalbos pokyčiais, užduotį, susijusią su realaus pasaulio taikymo sritimis, pavyzdžiui, psichikos sveikatos gydymu arba vartotojų pasitikėjimo prognozavimu. Nustatome kai kurias pagrindines užduoties autoregresines savybes (reikalingas istorijos dydis, statinis ir dinaminis ilgis, skirtingos laiko žingsnių rezoliucijos) ir tada remdamiesi populiariomis sekos modeliais žodžiams, o vietoj to modeliuojamos kalba grindžiamos emocijos sekos laiku. Over a novel Twitter dataset of 1,900 users and weekly + daily scores for 6 emotions and 2 additional linguistic attributes, we find a novel dual-sequence GRU model with decayed hidden states achieves best results (r = .66) significantly out-predicting, e.g., a moving averaging based on the past time-steps (r = .49).  Mes pateikiame anonimizuotą duomenų rinkinį, taip pat užduočių nustatymą ir vertinimo kodą kitiems naudotis.', 'mk': 'Човечкиот природен јазик се споменува во одреден момент на време додека човечките емоции се менуваат со текот на времето. И покрај тоа што многу работа воспостави силна врска помеѓу употребата на јазикот и емоционалните состојби, малку се обидоа да го моделираат емоционалниот јазик на време. Here, we introduce the task of affective language forecasting - predicting future change in language based on past changes of language, a task with real-world applications such as treating mental health or forecasting trends in consumer confidence.  We establish some of the fundamental autoregressive characteristics of the task (necessary history size, static versus dynamic length, varying time-step resolutions) and then build on popular sequence models for words to instead model sequences of language-based emotion in time.  Со нов компјутер на податоци на Твитер од 1.900 корисници и неделни + дневни резултати за 6 емоции и 2 дополнителни јазички атрибути, најдовме нов модел со двојна секвенца на ГрУ со расипани скриени состојби постигнува најдобри резултати (r = .66) значително надпредвидувачки, на пример движење на просечноста базирано на минатите временски чекори ( Ние ги поставуваме нашите анонимни податоци, како и конструкцијата на задачите и кодот за евалуација на располагање за другите да се изградат на.', 'kk': 'Адам табиғи тілі уақыт бойынша адамдардың емоциялары өзгертілген уақытта айырылады. Көп жұмыс тіл пайдалану мен эмоциялық күйлері арасындағы күшті сілтеме орнатылғанда, бірнеше емоциялық тілді уақытта үлгілеу әрекеттері болды. Мұнда біз тілдерді таңдау тапсырмасын таңдаймыз - өткен тіл өзгерістеріне негізделген болашақ өзгерістерін таңдаймыз, мысалы, психикалық саулық немесе пайдаланушылардың сенімдерінің тенденцияларын қалау үші Біз тапсырманың негізгі авторегрессиялық қасиеттерін (керек тарихтың өлшемі, статикалық және динамикалық ұзындығы, уақыт- қадамдық шешулерді түрлендіріп) құрып, сөздерді тілдерді негізделген эмоциялық реттерін уақытта үші 1.900 пайдаланушылар және апта сайын + күн сайын 6 емоциялық және 2 қосымша лингвистикалық атрибуттардың романдық Твиттердің деректер жиынында, жасырылған жасырылған күйлердің жақсы нәтижелері (r = .66) болады, мысалы, өткен уақыт қадамдарына негізделген орташа жылжыту (r = .49 Біз анонимделген деректер жиынымыз және тапсырмаларды баптау және бағалау кодымызды басқаларға қол жеткіземіз.', 'ms': 'Bahasa semulajadi manusia disebut pada titik tertentu pada masa semasa emosi manusia berubah pada masa. Walaupun banyak kerja telah menetapkan hubungan kuat antara penggunaan bahasa dan keadaan emosional, beberapa telah cuba untuk model bahasa emosional pada masa. Di sini, kita memperkenalkan tugas ramalan bahasa yang mempengaruhi - meramalkan perubahan masa depan dalam bahasa berdasarkan perubahan bahasa masa lalu, tugas dengan aplikasi dunia nyata seperti merawat kesehatan mental atau meramalkan trends dalam kepercayaan konsumen. Kami menetapkan beberapa ciri-ciri autoregresif asas tugas (saiz sejarah yang diperlukan, statik melawan panjang dinamik, resolusi langkah masa yang berbeza) dan kemudian membina pada model urutan popular untuk perkataan untuk menggantikan urutan model emosi berdasarkan bahasa pada masa. Dalam set data Twitter yang baru dari 1,900 pengguna dan skor setiap minggu + harian untuk 6 emosi dan 2 atribut bahasa tambahan, kami jumpa model GRU dual-urutan yang baru dengan keadaan tersembunyi yang rosak mencapai keputusan terbaik (r = .66) secara signifikan keluar-ramalan, cth., rata-rata bergerak berdasarkan langkah-masa yang lalu (r = .49). Kami membuat set data anonim kami serta setup tugas dan kod penilaian tersedia untuk orang lain untuk dibina.', 'mt': 'Il-lingwa naturali umana tissemma f’mument speċifiku filwaqt li l-emozzjonijiet umani jinbidlu maż-żmien. Filwaqt li ħafna xogħol stabbilixxa rabta qawwija bejn l-użu tal-lingwa u l-istati emozzjonali, ftit ippruvaw jimmudellaw il-lingwa emozzjonali fiż-żmien. Here, we introduce the task of affective language forecasting - predicting future change in language based on past changes of language, a task with real-world applications such as treating mental health or forecasting trends in consumer confidence.  Aħna nistabbilixxu xi wħud mill-karatteristiċi awtoregressivi fundamentali tal-kompitu (id-daqs neċessarju tal-istorja, it-tul statiku kontra dinamiku, riżoluzzjonijiet varji fil-pass taż-żmien) u mbagħad nibnu fuq mudelli ta’ sekwenza popolari għal kliem biex minflok jimmudellaw sekwenzi ta’ emozzjoni bbażata fuq il-lingwa fil-ħin. Permezz ta’ sett ġdid ta’ dejta fuq Twitter ta’ 1,900 utent u punteġġi ta’ kull ġimgħa + kuljum g ħal 6 emozzjonijiet u 2 attributi lingwistiċi addizzjonali, isibu mudell ġdid ta’ sekwenza doppja GRU bi stati moħbija mnaqqsa jikseb l-a ħjar riżultati (r = .66) li jipprevedu b’mod sinifikanti, e ż., medja li tiċċaqlaq ibbażata fuq il-passi ta’ żmien tal-imgħoddi (r = .49). Aħna nagħmlu disponibbli s-sett tad-dejta anonimizzat tagħna kif ukoll it-twaqqif tal-kompiti u l-kodiċi ta’ evalwazzjoni għal oħrajn li jistgħu jibnu fuqhom.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний байгалийн хэл цаг хугацаанд хүний сэтгэл хөдлөл өөрчлөгдөж байдаг. Хэдийгээр олон ажил хэлний хэрэглээ, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төвшин хоорондох хүчтэй холбоотой ч, хэд хэдэн нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэл загварын хугацаанд загварчлахыг хичээсэн Энд бид хэл дээрх ирээдүйн өөрчлөлтийг таамаглаж, өмнө нь хэл дээрх бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээний ажил, сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн эмчилгээ эсвэл хэрэглэгчийн итгэл итгэлтэй таамаглалтын тенденцийг эмчилгээх үйл ажиллаг Бид ажлын зарим суурь сэтгэл хөдлөлийг автоматжуулах автоматжуулалтын өөрчлөлтийг (хэрэгтэй түүх хэмжээ, статик эсвэл динамик урт, цаг хугацааны шийдвэрлэлтийг өөрчлөгдөж), дараа нь хэл дээр суурилсан сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварын оронд олон нийтлэ 1.900 хэрэглэгчид, долоо хоногт + өдөр тутмын 6 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тоо, 2 нэмэлт хэлний шинжлэх ухааны 2 давхар дарааллын GRU загварын зохиолын давхар дарааллын шинжлэх ухаан орнуудтай хамгийн сайн үр дүн (r =.66) гаргадаг. Жишээлбэл, өмнөх цаг хугацааны давхар (r =.49) дээ Бид өөрсдийгөө зохион байгуулахын тулд нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг, ажлын setup, үнэлгээний кодыг ашиглаж чадна.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d സമയത്ത് മാറുമ്പോള്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200dറെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക പ്രഖ്യാപിക്ക ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും emotional അവസ്ഥകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയില്\u200d വളരെ ശക്തിയുള്ള ബന്ധം സ്ഥാപിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോഴും, കുറച്ചു സമയത്ത ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഭാഷയിലെ ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെ മാനസിക ജോലിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനപരമായ സ്വതന്ത്രീകരണവിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ചിലത് നാം സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു (ആവശ്യമായ ചരിത്രത്തിന്റെ വലിപ്പം, സ്റ്റാസ്റ്റിക്ക് മാത്രം നീളം, സമയ-പടി വ്യത്യ 1,900 ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെയും ആഴ്ചയ്ക്കും സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടുകളുടെയും ആഴ്ചയ്ക്കുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും 2 കൂടുതല്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ട്രൂവല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും മികച We make our anonymized dataset as well as task setup and evaluation code available for others to build on.', 'pl': 'Ludzki język naturalny jest wspominany w określonym momencie w czasie, podczas gdy ludzkie emocje zmieniają się z czasem. Chociaż wiele prac ustaliło silny związek między używaniem języka a stanami emocjonalnymi, niewielu próbowało modelować język emocjonalny w czasie. Przedstawiamy tutaj zadanie afektywnego prognozowania języka i przewidywania przyszłych zmian języka w oparciu o przeszłe zmiany języka, zadanie z aplikacjami realnymi, takimi jak leczenie zdrowia psychicznego czy prognozowanie trendów zaufania konsumentów. Ustalamy niektóre z podstawowych autoregresyjnych cech zadania (niezbędny rozmiar historii, długość statyczna i dynamiczna, różne rozdzielczości kroków czasowych) a następnie budujemy na popularnych modelach sekwencji słów, aby zamiast tego modelować sekwencje emocji opartych na języku w czasie. Na podstawie nowego zbioru danych Twittera dotyczącego użytkowników 1.900 oraz tygodniowych i dziennych wyników dla 6-ciu emocji i dwóch dodatkowych atrybutów językowych, odkrywamy nowy model GRU o dwusekwencyjnych stanach rozpadających się, osiągający najlepsze wyniki (r = .66) znacznie przewidujący, np. uśrednienie ruchome oparte na poprzednich krokach czasu (r = .49). Udostępniamy nasz anonimowy zestaw danych oraz kod konfiguracji i oceny zadań dla innych.', 'ro': 'Limbajul uman natural este menționat într-un anumit moment în timp ce emoțiile umane se schimbă în timp. Deși multă muncă a stabilit o legătură puternică între utilizarea limbii și stările emoționale, puțini au încercat să modeleze limbajul emoțional în timp. Aici, introducem sarcina de prognozare a limbajului afectiv - predicția schimbărilor viitoare ale limbajului bazate pe schimbările anterioare ale limbajului, o sarcină cu aplicații din lumea reală, cum ar fi tratarea sănătății mintale sau prognozarea tendințelor în încrederea consumatorilor. Stabilim unele dintre caracteristicile autoregresive fundamentale ale sarcinii (dimensiunea istorică necesară, lungimea statică versus dinamică, rezoluțiile variate în timp) și apoi construim pe modele de secvență populare pentru cuvinte pentru a modela în schimb secvențe ale emoțiilor bazate pe limbaj în timp. Pe lângă un nou set de date Twitter de 1.900 de utilizatori și scoruri săptămânale + zilnice pentru 6 emoții și 2 atribute lingvistice suplimentare, găsim un nou model GRU cu două secvențe, cu stări ascunse degradate, obține cele mai bune rezultate (r = .66) care depășește semnificativ prezicerea, de exemplu, o medie mobilă bazată pe pașii temporali trecuți (r = .49). Punem la dispoziția altora setul nostru de date anonim, precum și codul de configurare a sarcinilor și evaluare.', 'no': 'Menneske naturspråk vert menytt på ein spesifikk tidspunkt mens menneske følelser endrar over tidspunkt. Mens mykje arbeid har oppretta ein sterk lenk mellom språkbruk og emosjonelle tilstandar, har få forsøk å modellere emosjonell språk i tid. Her introduserer vi oppgåva for påvirkelige språk- forhåndsvising av framtidige endringar i språk basert på siste endringar av språk, eit oppgåve med verkelege program som behandling av mentale helse eller forhåndsvising av trender i brukarstyrke. Vi oppretter nokre av de grunnleggjande autoregressivne karakteristika for oppgåva (nødvendige historiesktorleik, statisk versus dynamisk lengd, varierer tidsstrekkoppløysing) og bygger så på populære sekvensmodeller for ord i staden for modeller av språkbaserte emosjonar i tid. Over eit nytt Twitter-dataset med 1.900 brukarar og kvart veke + daglige poeng for 6 emosjonar og 2 ekstra lingviske attributtar, finn vi eit roman dualisensisk GRU-modell med dekkede g øymde tilstandar når det gjer best e resultat (r = .66) betydelig utfordring, f.eks. ein flytting gjennomsnitt basert på siste tidsstrekk (r = .49). Vi gjer våre anonymiserte datasett og oppgåveoppsett og evalueringskode tilgjengeleg for andre å bygge på.', 'sr': 'Ljudski prirodni jezik se spominje na određenom trenutku u vremenu dok se ljudska emocija menja tokom vremena. Iako je mnogo posla uspostavio jaku vezu između korištenja jezika i emocionalnih država, nekoliko su pokušali da modeluju emocionalni jezik na vreme. Ovde predstavljamo zadatak predviđanja učinkovitih jezika - predviđanja budućih promjena jezika na temelju prošlih promjena jezika, zadatak sa stvarnim svijetskim aplikacijama poput tretmana mentalnog zdravlja ili predviđanja trendova u povjerenju potroša ča. Postavljamo neke od osnovnih autoregresivnih karakteristika zadatka (neophodne veličine povijesti, statične i dinamične dužine, različite rezolucije vremenskih koraka) i onda izgradimo na popularnim modelima sekvencije reči da umjesto modela sekvencija emocija na jeziku u vreme. Preko novog seta podataka u Twitteru od 1.900 korisnika i nedeljno + dnevnih rezultata za 6 emocija i 2 dodatne lingvističke atribute, nalazimo nov model GRU dvosekvencije sa pokvarenim skrivenim državama koji postiže najbolji rezultat (r = .66) značajno nepredvidljiv, na primer, mjerenje pokretanja temeljito na prošlim koracima vremena (r = .49). Postavljamo našu anonimizovanu podatku, kao i kod uspostavljanja zadataka i procjene za drugi koji će nastaviti.', 'sv': 'Människans naturliga språk nämns vid en viss tidpunkt medan mänskliga känslor förändras över tid. Även om mycket arbete har etablerat en stark koppling mellan språkanvändning och känslotillstånd, har få försökt modellera känslomässigt språk i tid. Här introducerar vi uppgiften med affektiv språkprognos - att förutsäga framtida språkförändringar baserat på tidigare språkförändringar, en uppgift med verkliga tillämpningar såsom behandling av psykisk hälsa eller prognostisering av trender i konsumenternas förtroende. Vi fastställer några av de grundläggande autoregressiva egenskaperna hos uppgiften (nödvändig historik storlek, statisk kontra dynamisk längd, varierande tidssteg upplösningar) och bygger sedan på populära sekvensmodeller för ord för att istället modellera sekvenser av språkbaserade känslor i tid. Med hjälp av en ny Twitter-datauppsättning med 1 900 användare och vecko + dagliga poäng för 6 känslor och 2 ytterligare språkliga attribut, finner vi en ny GRU-modell med förfallna dolda tillstånd som uppnår bästa resultat (r = .66) signifikant överträffande, t.ex. ett rörligt genomsnitt baserat på tidigare tidssteg (r = .49). Vi gör vårt anonymiserade dataset samt uppgiftsinställnings- och utvärderingskod tillgängliga för andra att bygga vidare på.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව කියන්නේ විශේෂ කාලයක් වෙලාවට මිනිස්සු හැඟීම් වෙනස් වෙන ගොඩක් වැඩේ වැඩේ භාෂාව සහ භාවිතාවක් භාවිතාවක් සමඟ ශක්තිමත් සම්බන්ධයක් ස්ථාපිත කරලා තියෙනව මෙතන, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ - භාෂාවේ අනාගත වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් අනාගත වෙනුවෙන් අනාගත වෙනස අපි කාර්යයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් ස්ථාපනය කරනවා (අවශ්\u200dය ඉතිහාසය ප්\u200dරමාණය, ස්ථිර විසිද්ධ Over a new Twitter data set of 1,900 users and WEEKDAY + day scores for 6 emos and 2 extra language Attribes, we find a roman dual-sequence GRU Model with decaied hiding state achievas better scores (r = .66) portently out-forecast, e.g., a move Average based on the Past time-Steps (r = .49). අපි අපේ අනමිත දත්ත සූදානම් සහ වැඩක් සැකසුම් සහ අනිත් අනිත් අනිවාර්යාත්මක කෝඩ් අවස්ථාවක් ලැබ', 'so': "Luqada dabiicadda ee dadku waa waqti gaar ah marka ay xisaabta dadku waqti ka badashaan. While much work has established a strong link between language use and emotional states, few have attempted to model emotional language in time.  Halkan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa shaqada horumarinta luuqada saameyn ku leh - horumarinta beddelka luuqada mustaqbalka ah oo ku saleysan beddelka hore ee luuqada, shaqo ku leh codsiga caafimaadka dhimirka ama horumarinta caafimaadka dhimirka, kalsoonida isticmaalaha. Waxaannu dhisaynaa noocyo ka mid ah waxyaabaha aasaasiga ah ee shaqada (tirada taariikhda loo baahan yahay, static versus dynamic, go'aanka xilliga kala duduwan), kadibna waxaynu dhisaynaa qaababka qaababka aad u leedahay hadalka, si aan ugu badalno sameyno xilliga ismoodka luqada. Wixii warqada ah e e Twitterka oo ah 1,900 isticmaalayaal iyo dhamaan usbuuc + noocyo maalin ah 6 fikradooda iyo 2 noocyo kale oo luuqadaha ah, waxaynu helnaa model qoraalka GRU oo ku qoran labaad oo labaad oo qarsoon oo dowlado qarsoon ah (r = .66) wuxuu helaa resultooyin aad u wanaagsan (r = .66) oo ka sii sheegi kara tusaale ahaan qiyaastii ku socda oo ku saleysan socodkii hore (r = .49). Waxaannu sameynaa kooxda macluumaadka aan la aqoon lahayn iyo sidoo kale kaarka shaqada iyo qiimeynta ee kuwa kale ay dhisaan.", 'ta': 'மனித இயற்கையான மொழி குறிப்பிட்ட நேரத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட நேரத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட நேரத்தில் க While much work has established a strong link between language use and emotional states, few have attempted to model emotional language in time.  இங்கே நாம் பாதிக்கும் மொழி மொழி முன்னோட்டத்தின் பணியை முன்வாக்குகிறோம் - மொழியின் மாற்றங்களை மாற்றுவதை முன்னோக்கிய மொழியில் மாற்ற நாம் பணியின் அடிப்படையான தன்னியக்கட்டுப்படுத்தல் தன்னியக்கமான தன்னியக்கம் (தேவையான வரலாற்று அளவு, static versus dynamic நீளம், வேறு நேரம் படி தீர்வுகள்) நிறுவப்படுத்துகிறோம் பிறகு  1,900 பயனர்கள் மற்றும் வாரத்தில் + நாள் மதிப்புகள் 6 உணர்வுகளுக்கும் மற்றும் 2 கூடுதல் மொழிக்குணர்வுகளுக்கும் ஒரு புதிய இரட்டை பின்வரிசை GRU மாதிரியை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். அழிந்த நாடுகளுடன் மறைந்து விட்டது சிறந நாங்கள் எங்கள் அறியாத தகவல் அமைப்பை மற்றும் செயல் அமைப்பு மற்றும் மதிப்பு குறியீடு மற்றும் மற்றவர்கள் கட்ட வேண்ட', 'ur': 'انسان کی طبیعی زبان ایک مقررہ نقطہ میں ذکر کی جاتی ہے جبکہ انسان کی احساسات زمانہ میں بدل رہی ہیں۔ اگرچہ بہت سی کام زبان استعمال اور احساساتی وضعیت کے درمیان ایک قوی لینک بنا چکی ہے، بہت کم لوگ وقت میں احساساتی زبان کی مدل کرنے کی کوشش کر رہے ہیں. یہاں، ہم تغییر زبان کی پیش بینی کی کوشش کی پیش بینی کرتے ہیں - زبان کی پیش بینی کی تغییر کی پیش بینی کریں جو پہلے زبان کی تغییر کی بنیاد ہے، ایک کام جو واقعی دنیا کی کاربرد کے ساتھ ہے، جیسے روانی سلامتی کا تحقیق کرنا یا مصروف کے اع ہم نے دنیا کی کچھ بنیادی اٹوگریسٹیوں کی تعریفیں بنائیں (ضروری تاریخ کی اندازہ، سٹیسٹی نسبت داینمانیک لمبی، متفاوت زمان-سٹے حل) اور پھر کلمات کے عوض کلمات کی مدل کے لئے لکھنے کے لئے لکھنے کے لئے لکھنے کی مدل بنائیں۔ 1.900 کارساز اور ہفتے کے ساتھ + 6 احساسات اور 2 زیادہ زبان تعریف کے لئے روانی ٹویٹر ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ، ہم نے ایک نوم دوئل-سٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پایا ہے جو ٹکڑے ہوئے چھپائے حالت کے ساتھ بہترین نتیجے حاصل کرتی ہیں (r =.66) بہت اچھی پیش بینی کرنے والی ہے، جیسے پہلے زمانے کے سٹے (r =.49) پر متوسط ایک ہم نے اپنا نانامی ڈیٹ سٹ اور تاسپ سٹّپ اور ارزیابی کوڈ کو دوسروں کے لئے موجود بنایا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ tự nhiên con người được đề cập vào một thời điểm cụ thể trong khi cảm xúc con người thay đổi theo thời gian. Trong khi nhiều việc đã tạo ra mối liên hệ mạnh mẽ giữa sử dụng ngôn ngữ và trạng thái cảm xúc, một số ít đã cố gắng mô hình ngôn ngữ cảm xúc theo thời gian. Ở đây, chúng tôi đưa ra nhiệm vụ dự đoán ngôn ngữ cổ động dự đoán sự thay đổi ngôn ngữ tương lai dựa trên những thay đổi ngôn ngữ quá khứ, một nhiệm vụ với các ứng dụng thực tế như là điều trị sức khỏe tinh thần hay dự đoán xu hướng về niềm tin của người tiêu khiển. Chúng tôi xác định một số đặc điểm tự thụt lùi cơ bản của nhiệm vụ (kích thước lịch sử cần thiết, độ tĩnh đối với độ dài động, cách giải quyết từng bước thời gian khác nhau) và sau đó xây dựng các mô hình dãy số phổ biến để từ thay vào đó mô hình các chuỗi cảm xúc ngôn ngữ dựa vào thời gian. Trên một tập tin đầy tiểu thuyết trên Twitter của người dùng 1,900 và hàng tuần ghi số hàng ngày dành cho sáu cảm xúc và hai yếu tố ngôn ngữ khác, chúng tôi tìm thấy một mô hình GRU hai dãy số mới với các trạng thái bị tẩy não có kết quả tốt nhất (r.=.62) nằm ngoài dự đoán đáng kể, ví dụ, một tính trung chuyển động dựa trên các bước thời gian trước (r=.49). Chúng tôi cung cấp dữ liệu ẩn danh cũng như quy trình cài đặt nhiệm vụ và mã đánh giá của những người khác để xây dựng.', 'uz': "Inson hissiyotlari vaqtda o'zgartirilayotganda oddiy til foydalanadi. Ko'p ishlar tilda foydalanuvchi va emotional holatlar orasidagi qiyin bogʻ'lanadi, vaqtda foydalanuvchi tilni foydalanishga bir nechta foydalanuvchi foydalanadi. Bu yerda biz o'zgarishlar asosida o'zgarishga kelajak tillar o'zgarishni predicting qilamiz, aslida dunyo dasturlari bilan ta'minlovchi fikrlarni ko'rib chiqarish yoki foydalanuvchiga ishlab chiqarish imkoniyatini ko'rib chiqarish imkoniyatini ko'rib chiqarish vazifasini old Biz vazifaning asosiy avto-regressiv (tarix oʻlchami, static versus dynamik uzunligi, har xil qadam qoidalari) haqida bir necha xil xossalarini qoʻllamiz va keyin vaqtda o'zgarishga o'xshagan so'zlarni o'zgartirish uchun umuman tartib modellarini yaratishmiz. Yangi Twitter foydalanuvchidan 1,900 foydalanuvchilar va hafta + har kuni xossalari va 6 hissiyalar va 2 qoʻshimcha lingvistika xossalari uchun bir necha darajada GRU modelini topamiz. Oldingi vaqt qatlamlar asosida yaratilgan oddiy darajaga qarab qoladi (r=.66) eng yaxshi natijalar bajaradi. Biz nomaʼlum maʼlumotlar tarkibini va vazifa saqlash va qiymatni boshqalarni yaratish uchun imkoniyatlar mumkin.", 'nl': 'Menselijke natuurlijke taal wordt genoemd op een specifiek moment in de tijd terwijl menselijke emoties veranderen in de tijd. Hoewel veel werk een sterke link heeft gelegd tussen taalgebruik en emotionele toestanden, hebben weinigen geprobeerd emotionele taal op tijd te modelleren. Hier introduceren we de taak van affectieve taalvoorspelling en het voorspellen van toekomstige taalveranderingen op basis van eerdere taalveranderingen, een taak met echte toepassingen zoals het behandelen van geestelijke gezondheid of het voorspellen van trends in consumentenvertrouwen. We stellen enkele van de fundamentele autoregressieve kenmerken van de taak vast (noodzakelijke geschiedenis grootte, statische versus dynamische lengte, variërende tijd-stap resoluties) en bouwen vervolgens op populaire sequentiemodellen voor woorden om in plaats daarvan sequenties van taal-gebaseerde emotie in de tijd te modelleren. Aan de hand van een nieuwe Twitter dataset van 1.900 gebruikers en wekelijkse en dagelijkse scores voor 6 emoties en twee extra linguïstische attributen, vinden we een nieuw dual-sequence GRU model met vervallen verborgen toestanden dat de beste resultaten behaalt (r = .66) significant overvoorspelling, bijvoorbeeld een voortschrijdende gemiddeling gebaseerd op de vorige tijdsstappen (r = .49). We stellen onze geanonimiseerde dataset en taakinstellings- en evaluatiecode beschikbaar voor anderen om op te bouwen.', 'da': 'Menneskets naturlige sprog nævnes på et bestemt tidspunkt, mens menneskelige følelser ændrer sig over tid. Mens meget arbejde har etableret en stærk forbindelse mellem sprogbrug og følelsesmæssige tilstande, har få forsøgt at modellere følelsesmæssige sprog i tide. Her introducerer vi opgaven med affektiv sprogprognose - at forudsige fremtidige sprogændringer baseret på tidligere sprogændringer, en opgave med virkelige applikationer såsom behandling af mental sundhed eller prognose tendenser i forbrugertillid. Vi etablerer nogle af de grundlæggende autoregressive karakteristika ved opgaven (nødvendig historiestørrelse, statisk versus dynamisk længde, varierende tidstrinsopløsninger) og bygger derefter på populære sekvensmodeller for ord for i stedet at modellere sekvenser af sprogbaserede følelser i tid. Over et nyt Twitter datasæt på 1.900 brugere og ugentlige + daglige scorer for 6 følelser og 2 yderligere sproglige attributter, finder vi en ny dual-sekvens GRU model med forfaldne skjulte tilstande opnår de bedste resultater (r = .66) betydeligt ud af forudsigelse, f.eks. et glidende gennemsnit baseret på de tidligere tidstrin (r = .49). Vi stiller vores anonymiserede datasæt samt opgaveopsætning og evalueringskode til rådighed for andre at bygge videre på.', 'bg': 'Човешкият естествен език се споменава в определен момент от времето, докато човешките емоции се променят с течение на времето. Въпреки че много работа е установила силна връзка между употребата на езика и емоционалните състояния, малцина са се опитали да моделират емоционалния език във времето. Тук представяме задачата за прогнозиране на афективния език - прогнозиране на бъдещите промени в езика въз основа на минали промени в езика, задача с реални приложения като лечение на психичното здраве или прогнозиране на тенденциите в потребителското доверие. Установяваме някои от фундаменталните авторегресивни характеристики на задачата (необходим размер на историята, статична спрямо динамична дължина, различна резолюция във времето) и след това изграждаме върху популярни модели за последователност на думи, за да моделираме последователности на езикова емоция във времето. Чрез нов набор от данни от 1900 потребители и седмични + дневни оценки за 6 емоции и 2 допълнителни лингвистични атрибута, откриваме нов модел с двойна последователност с влошени скрити състояния, постига най-добри резултати (r = 0,66), значително надхвърлящ прогнозите, напр. движеща се средна стойност въз основа на миналите времеви стъпки (r = 0,49). Ние правим нашия анонимизиран набор от данни, както и код за настройка и оценка на задачите достъпни за други хора.', 'de': 'Menschliche natürliche Sprache wird zu einem bestimmten Zeitpunkt erwähnt, während menschliche Emotionen sich im Laufe der Zeit ändern. Während viel Arbeit eine starke Verbindung zwischen Sprachgebrauch und emotionalen Zuständen hergestellt hat, haben nur wenige versucht, emotionale Sprache rechtzeitig zu modellieren. Hier stellen wir die Aufgabe der affektiven Sprachprognose und die Vorhersage künftiger Sprachveränderungen basierend auf früheren Sprachveränderungen vor, eine Aufgabe mit realen Anwendungen wie der Behandlung psychischer Gesundheit oder der Prognose von Trends im Verbrauchervertrauen. Wir etablieren einige der grundlegenden autoregressiven Eigenschaften der Aufgabe (notwendige Verlaufsgröße, statische versus dynamische Länge, variierende Zeitschrittauflösungen) und bauen dann auf populären Sequenzmodellen für Wörter auf, um stattdessen Sequenzen sprachbasierter Emotionen in der Zeit zu modellieren. Über einen neuartigen Twitter-Datensatz von 1.900-Nutzern und wöchentlichen und täglichen Bewertungen für 6-Emotionen und 2-weitere linguistische Attribute finden wir heraus, dass ein neuartiges duales GRU-Modell mit zerfallenen versteckten Zuständen die besten Ergebnisse erzielt (r = .66) signifikant übertrifft, z.B. eine gleitende Mittelung basierend auf den vergangenen Zeitschritten (r = .49). Wir stellen unseren anonymisierten Datensatz sowie Task Setup und Evaluation Code für andere zur Verfügung.', 'hr': 'Ljudski prirodni jezik se spominje na određenom trenutku u vrijeme dok se ljudske emocije promjene tijekom vremena. Iako je mnogo posla uspostavio jaku vezu između korištenja jezika i emocionalnih stanja, nekoliko su pokušavali modelirati emocionalni jezik na vrijeme. Ovdje predstavljamo zadatak predviđanja učinkovitih jezika - predviđanje budućih promjena jezika na temelju prošlih promjena jezika, zadatak sa stvarnim svijetskim aplikacijama poput liječenja mentalnog zdravlja ili predviđanja trendova povjerenja potroša ča. Postavljamo neke od temeljnih autoregresivnih karakteristika zadatka (neophodne veličine povijesti, statične i dinamične dužine, različite rješenja vremenskih koraka) i onda izgradimo na popularnim modelima sekvencije riječi umjesto modela sekvencija emocija na jeziku u vrijeme. Preko novog seta podataka u Twitter-u od 1.900 korisnika i tjedno + dnevnih rezultata za 6 emocija i 2 dodatne lingvističke atribute, nalazimo nov model GRU-a u dvosekvenciji s pokvarenim skrivenim državama koji postiže najbolji rezultat (r = .66) značajno nepredvidljiv, na primjer, mjerenje pokretanja temeljito na prošlim vremenskim koracima (r = .49). Postavljamo naš anonimirani set podataka, kao i kod uspostavljanja zadataka i procjene za drugi koji će nastaviti.', 'sw': 'Lugha ya asili ya binadamu inatajwa wakati fulani wakati wa hisia za binadamu zinabadilika kwa muda. Wakati kazi nyingi imeweka kiungo kikubwa kati ya matumizi ya lugha na mataifa ya hisia, wachache wamejaribu kuunda lugha ya hisia kwa muda. Hapa, tunaonyesha jukumu la kutabiri lugha yenye athari - kutabiri mabadiliko ya baadaye katika lugha kwa msingi wa mabadiliko ya zamani ya lugha, kazi yenye matumizi ya kimataifa kama vile kutibu afya ya akili au matatizo ya kutabiri kwa imani ya watumiaji. Tunaweza kuanzisha baadhi ya utaalamu wa msingi wa kujidhibiti wa kazi (ukubwa wa historia unahitajika, ukubwa wa takwimu na ubaguzi wa rangi, masuala ya hatua tofauti ya muda) na kisha kujenga mifano maarufu kwa maneno badala ya kutengeneza mfululizo wa hisia za lugha kwa muda. Zaidi ya takwimu za mtandao wa twita za watumiaji 1,900 pamoja na score za kila wiki na kila siku kwa hisia 6 na vipengele vya lugha 2 zaidi, tunatafuta mtindo wa kisasa wa GRU kwa mara mbili ambazo nchi zilizofichwa zinafanikiwa matokeo mazuri (r=.66) kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya kutabiri, kwa mfano, kuondoka kwa wastani kwa msingi wa hatua zilizopita (r= .49). Tunafanya taarifa zetu zisizoeleweka pamoja na kuweka juhudi na kutathmini sheria zinazopatikana kwa ajili ya wengine kujenga.', 'ko': '인류의 자연 언어는 특정한 시간에 언급되고 인류의 감정은 시간의 추이에 따라 변화한다.많은 연구들이 언어 사용과 정서 상태 사이에 강력한 관계를 맺었지만, 정서 언어에 대한 모델링을 제때에 시도하는 사람은 드물다.여기서 우리는 감정 언어 예측의 임무인 과거의 언어 변화에 따라 미래의 언어 변화를 예측하는 것을 소개했다. 이것은 심리적 건강을 치료하거나 소비자의 신뢰를 예측하는 추세를 실제적으로 응용하는 임무이다.우리는 임무의 기본적인 자귀환 특징(필요한 역사 크기, 정태와 동적 길이, 서로 다른 시간 보폭 해상도)을 구축한 다음에 유행하는 단어 서열 모델을 구축하여 언어를 바탕으로 하는 감정 서열의 시간 모델을 대체했다.1900명의 사용자를 보유한 신형 트위터 데이터 집합에서 우리는 쇠퇴하고 숨겨진 상태를 가진 신형 이중 서열 GRU 모델이 가장 좋은 결과(r=0.66)를 얻어 예측보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 발견했다. 예를 들어 과거 시간보의 이동 평균(r=0.49)을 바탕으로 한다.우리는 익명 데이터 집합과 작업 설정과 평가 코드를 다른 사람이 사용할 수 있도록 합니다.', 'id': 'Bahasa alam manusia disebut pada titik tertentu waktu sementara emosi manusia berubah dengan waktu. Sementara banyak pekerjaan telah menetapkan hubungan yang kuat antara penggunaan bahasa dan keadaan emosional, beberapa telah mencoba untuk model bahasa emosional pada waktu. Di sini, kita memperkenalkan tugas prognosis bahasa yang mempengaruhi - memprediksi perubahan bahasa masa depan berdasarkan perubahan bahasa masa lalu, tugas dengan aplikasi dunia nyata seperti merawat kesehatan mental atau prognosis trends dalam kepercayaan konsumen. Kami mendirikan beberapa karakteristik autoregresif dasar tugas (ukuran sejarah yang diperlukan, statis versus panjang dinamik, resolusi langkah-waktu yang berbeda) dan kemudian membangun pada model urutan popular untuk kata-kata untuk menggantikan urutan model emosi berdasarkan bahasa pada waktu. Dalam set data Twitter novel dari 1.900 pengguna dan setiap minggu + skor sehari-hari untuk 6 emosi dan 2 atribut bahasa tambahan, kami menemukan model GRU dual-urutan novel dengan keadaan tersembunyi yang rusak mencapai hasil terbaik (r = .66) yang signifikan keluar-prediksi, misalnya, rata-rata bergerak berdasarkan langkah-langkah masa lalu (r = .49). Kami membuat dataset anonim kami serta pengaturan tugas dan kode evaluasi tersedia untuk orang lain untuk membangun.', 'sq': 'Human natural language is mentioned at a specific point in time while human emotions change over time.  Ndërsa shumë punë ka krijuar një lidhje të fortë midis përdorimit të gjuhës dhe shteteve emocionale, pak janë përpjekur të modelojnë gjuhën emocionale në kohë. Këtu, ne futim detyrën e parashikimit të gjuhës afektive - parashikimin e ndryshimeve të ardhshme në gjuhë bazuar në ndryshimet e kaluara të gjuhës, një detyrë me aplikime të botës reale të tilla si trajtimi i shëndetit psikologjik apo parashikimi i prirjeve në besimin e konsumatorit. Ne vendosim disa nga karakteristikat themelore autoregresive të detyrës (madhësia e nevojshme e historisë, gjatësia statike kundër dinamike, zgjidhjet e ndryshme të hapit të kohës) dhe pastaj ndërtojmë mbi modelet e sekuencës popullore për fjalë për në vend të kësaj model in e sekuencës të emocioneve bazuar në gjuhë në kohë. Over a novel Twitter dataset of 1,900 users and weekly + daily scores for 6 emotions and 2 additional linguistic attributes, we find a novel dual-sequence GRU model with decayed hidden states achieves best results (r = .66) significantly out-predicting, e.g., a moving averaging based on the past time-steps (r = .49).  Ne e bëjmë të disponueshme grupin tonë të dhënash anonimizuar si dhe rregullimin e detyrave dhe kodin e vlerësimit për të tjerët që të ndërtojnë.', 'af': "Mense natuurlike taal word in 'n spesifieke punt in tyd aangetem terwyl menslike emosies oor tyd verander. Alhoewel baie werk 'n sterk skakel tussen taal gebruik en emosionele staatste gestel het, sommige het geprobeer om emosionele taal in tyd te model. Hier, ons introduseer die taak van effektief taal voorskou - voorskou toekomstige veranderinge in taal gebaseer op verlede veranderinge van taal, 'n taak met reël wêreld toepassings soos die behandeling van menslike gesondheid of voorskou trende in gebruikers vertroue. Ons stel sommige van die fundamentele autoregressiewe karakteristieke van die taak (nodige geskiedenis grootte, statiese verskillende dinamiese lengte, verskillende tyd-stap oplossing) en dan bou op populêre volgorde modele vir woorde na plaas van model sekwensies van taal-gebaseerde emosie in tyd. Oor 'n nuwe Twitter-datastel van 1,900 gebruikers en weekly + daglige aantal vir 6 emosies en 2 addisionele lingwisiese eienskappe, vind ons 'n novel dubbel-volgorde GRU model met verdwyn weggesteekte staatste beter resultate (r = .66) bereik betekeurig uitvoorskou, bv. 'n beweeging middelgrond gebaseer op die verlede tyd-stappe (r = .49). Ons maak ons anonymiseerde datastel en opdragopstelling en evalueringskode beskikbaar vir ander om op te bou.", 'tr': 'Adamlar tebigy dili wagtyň bir takyk wagtda a ýdylýar, adamlaryň duýgulary wagtyň üstünde üýtgeýändir. Köp işe diller we duýgular durumlary arasynda güýçli bir baglaýyşy guruldy bolsa, wagtynda azajyk duýgular dili nusgala etmäge synanyşdy. Bu ýerde, güýçli dilleriň önümleriniň täsirli täsirli täsirli zadyny görkezip bilýäris - öňki dilleriň üýtgewiklerine dayanan gelejek täsirini, duýuklary saglygyny barlamak ýa-da tüketýän ynamlygynda täsirli täsirleriň önümlerini çaklamak ýa Biz buýrukyň esasy awtomatik regressiv karakterlerini (gerekli taryh ululykyna, statik we dinamik uzalykyna, wagt-adım çözümleri) we soňra sözlerini zamanda tabanly duýgularyň düzümlerini örän beýleki düzümlerni taýýarlapdyk. 1.900 ullançy we hepde bir Twitter maglumatynda + g ünlük 6 duýgym we 2 dürlik lingwistiki atributlar üçin, onda gizlenen döwletler bilen iň gowy netijeleri (r = .66) tapýarys. Öňki wagt-adına daýanýan bir hereket edişi (r = .49). Biziň anonymyz veri setirmelerimizi we işi düzenlemek we deňlemek kodlarymyzy başgalaryň edişi üçin mejbur edip bilýäris.', 'fa': 'زبان طبیعی انسان در یک نقطه خاص در زمان، در حالی که احساسات انسان در زمان تغییر می\u200cکنند. در حالی که بسیاری از کارها ارتباط قوی بین استفاده از زبان و وضعیت احساساتی ایجاد کرده اند، کمی سعی کردند به مدل زبان احساساتی در زمان کنند. در اینجا، ما وظیفه پیش بینی کردن زبانهای تاثیرگذاری را معرفی می کنیم - پیش بینی تغییرات آینده در زبان بر اساس تغییرات زبان گذشته، وظیفه با کاربردهای دنیای واقعی مثل درمان سلامت روانی یا پیش بینی ترند در اعتماد مصرف کننده. ما بعضی از ویژگی\u200cهای اصلی خودگریزگریزگریزگریزگریزگری کار را (اندازه تاریخ لازم، ثابت نسبت به طول دینامیک، حل\u200cهای زمان-قدم متفاوت) ایجاد می\u200cکنیم و بعدش روی مدل\u200cهای مدل\u200cهای جمعی برای کلمات به جای مدل\u200cهای احساسات بر اساس زبان طی یک مجموعه داده های توئیتر نویسی از ۱۹۰۰ کاربر و هر هفته + امتیاز روزانه برای ۶ احساس و ۲ ویژه های زبان\u200cشناسی اضافه می\u200cکنیم، ما یک مدل نویسی دوگانه\u200cترین GRU را پیدا می\u200cکنیم که با ایالت\u200cهای مخفی نابود شده بهترین نتایج (r = .66) به طور اضافه پیش بینی می\u200cرسد، مثال یک متوسط حرکت بر اساس قد ما مجموعه داده\u200cهای بی\u200cنام\u200cنام\u200cگذاری خود را همچنین پیکربندی و ارزیابی کار را برای بقیه برای ساختن آن موجود می\u200cکنیم.', 'am': 'የሰው አካባቢ ቋንቋ በጊዜው በተለየ ጊዜ ይታወሳል፡፡ ብዙ ሥራ በቋንቋ ተጠቃሚ እና emotional ሀገራት መካከል ብርቱ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ሲሆን፣ ጥቂቶች በጊዜው የemotional ቋንቋን ማሳየት ሞክረዋል፡፡ ወደዚህ፣ የቋንቋ ልሳኖች ማስታወቂያ - የቀድሞው ቋንቋ ለውጥ በመለወጥ፣ የመጀመሪያው የዓለማዊ ፕሮግራሞች፣ የmental ጤና ወይም የመጠቀም ጉዳይ በመጠቀም የሚቆጠሩ የቋንቋ ፍጻሜዎችን ለመቀበል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የስራውን መሠረት አካባቢ ባሕላዊ አካላት (ታሪክ መጠን፣ static versus dynamic ርዝመት፣ በተለየ ጊዜ-ደረጃ መልዕክቶች) እናደርጋለን፡፡ በ አሁኑ የ1,900 ተጠቃሚዎች እና በየሳምንት + ቀኑ ደረጃዎች ለ6 እውቀት እና ለ2 ጨማሪ ቋንቋዊ አካባቢዎች የGRU ሞዴል አግኝተናል፡፡ ያልታወቀ ዳታሬሳችንን እና ለሌሎችም ለመሥራት ማሰናከል እና ማስታወቂያ ኮድ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'মানুষের প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় এক নির্দিষ্ট বিন্দুতে উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে যখন মানুষের অনুভূতি সময়ের পরে পরিবর যদিও অনেক কাজ ভাষা ব্যবহার এবং আবেগের রাষ্ট্রের মধ্যে একটি শক্তিশালী লিঙ্ক স্থাপন করেছে, তবে সময়ে কয়েকজন আবেগ ভাষা মডেল করা এখানে আমরা প্রভাবিত ভাষা প্রদর্শনের কাজের উপস্থাপন করি- ভাষার আগের ভিত্তিক পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিতে ভবিষ্যতের ভবিষ্যতের পরিবর্তন, বাস্তবতা বিশ্বের প্রা আমরা কাজের মৌলিক স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণের কিছু বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করি (প্রয়োজনীয় ইতিহাসের আকার, স্টেটিক বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘ, সময়-পদক্ষেপের বিভিন্ন সিদ্ধান্ত) এব সাপ্তাহিক ব্যবহারকারী এবং সপ্তাহ + দৈনিক স্কোরের মধ্যে ১,৯০০ টুইটারের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের মাধ্যমে ৬ অনুভূতি এবং আরও দুই ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য, আমরা একটি উপন্যাস দুই-সেকেন্ড গ্রাইউ মডেল খু আমরা আমাদের অজ্ঞাত তথ্য সেট এবং কাজের সাথে অন্যান্যদের কাছে তৈরি করার জন্য কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'hy': "Մարդկային բնական լեզուն նշում է որոշակի ժամանակահատվածում, մինչդեռ մարդու զգացմունքները ժամանակի ընթացքում փոփոխվում են: Մինչդեռ շատ աշխատանք հաստատել է լեզվի օգտագործման և զգացմունքային վիճակների միջև ուժեղ կապ, մի քանիսը փորձել են ժամանակի ընթացքում մոդելավորել զգացմունքային լեզվին: Այստեղ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ազդեցության լեզվի կանխատեսման խնդիրը' լեզվի ապագա փոփոխությունների կանխատեսումը, հիմնված լեզվի անցյալի փոփոխությունների վրա, խնդիր իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերի հետ, ինչպիսիք են հոգեկան առողջության բուժումը կամ սպառողների վստահության տենդ Մենք ստեղծում ենք առաջադրանքի հիմնարար ինքնագրավիչ հատկությունները (անհրաժեշտ պատմության չափսերը, ստատիկ և դինամիկ երկարությունը, տարբեր ժամանակային փուլումների լուծումները) և ապա հիմնում ենք բառերի հայտնի հաջորդականության մոդելների վրա, որպեսզի ժամանակի ընթացքում լեզվի Թվիթերի 1,900 օգտագործողների նոր տվյալների ընթացքում և շաբաթական + օրական գնահատականների միջոցով 6 զգացմունքների և 2 լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունների համար մենք գտնում ենք նոր երկու հաջորդականություն ունեցող GRU մոդել, որն ունի կործանված թաքնված վիճակներ, ստանում է լավագույն արդյունքներ (r = .66), որոնք նշանակալի չեն կանխատեսում, օրինակ անցյալ ժամանակ Մենք հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր անանուն տվյալների համակարգը, ինչպես նաև խնդիրների կառուցվածքը և գնահատման կոդը ուրիշների համար:", 'bs': 'Ljudski prirodni jezik se spominje na određenom trenutku u vremenu dok se ljudske emocije promene tijekom vremena. Iako je mnogo posla uspostavio jaku vezu između korištenja jezika i emocionalnih država, nekoliko su pokušali da modeluju emocionalni jezik na vrijeme. Ovdje predstavljamo zadatak predviđanja učinkovitih jezika - predviđanje budućih promjena jezika na temelju prošlih promjena jezika, zadatak sa stvarnim svijetskim aplikacijama poput liječenja mentalnog zdravlja ili predviđanja trendova povjerenja potroša ča. Postavljamo neke od osnovnih autoregresivnih karakteristika zadatka (neophodne veličine povijesti, statične i dinamične dužine, različite rezolucije vremenskih koraka) i onda izgradimo na popularnim modelima sekvencije reči da umjesto modela sekvencija emocija na jeziku u vrijeme. Preko novog seta podataka u Twitter-u od 1.900 korisnika i tjedno + dnevnih rezultata za 6 emocija i 2 dodatne lingvističke atribute, nalazimo nov model GRU dvosekvence sa pokvarenim skrivenim državama koji dostignu najbolje rezultate (r = .66) značajno nepredvidljivim, na primjer, mjerenje pokretanja temeljno na prošlim koracima vremena (r = .49). Postavljamo naš anonimirani set podataka, kao i kod uspostavljanja zadataka i procjene za drugi koji će nastaviti.', 'cs': 'Lidský přirozený jazyk je zmíněn v určitém okamžiku, zatímco lidské emoce se v průběhu času mění. Zatímco mnoho práce vytvořilo silnou vazbu mezi používáním jazyka a emočními stavy, jen málokdo se pokusil modelovat emoční jazyk v čase. Zde představujeme úkol afektivní jazykové predikce a predikce budoucích změn jazyka na základě minulých změn jazyka, úkol s reálnými aplikacemi, jako je léčba duševního zdraví nebo predikce trendů v důvěře spotřebitelů. Stanovíme některé ze základních autoregresivních charakteristik úkolu (potřebná velikost historie, statická versus dynamická délka, různá rozlišení časových kroků) a pak stavíme na populárních sekvenčních modelech slov, abychom namísto toho modelovali sekvence jazykových emocí v čase. Na základě nového datového souboru Twitteru uživatelů 1.900 a týdenního a denního skóre šesti emocí a dvou dalších jazykových atributů zjišťujeme, že nový model dual-sekvence GRU s rozpadlými skrytými stavy dosahuje nejlepších výsledků (r = .66) výrazně předpovídá, např. klouzavého průměru založeného na minulých časových krocích (r = .49). Náš anonymizovaný datový soubor, stejně jako nastavení úkolů a vyhodnocovací kód zpřístupníme ostatním, na kterých mohou stavět.', 'et': 'Inimese loomulikku keelt nimetatakse teatud ajahetkel, samas kui inimemotsioonid muutuvad aja jooksul. Kuigi palju tööd on loonud tugeva seose keelekasutuse ja emotsionaalsete seisundite vahel, on vähesed püüdnud emotsionaalset keelt õigeaegselt modelleerida. Siin tutvustame afektiivse keele prognoosimise ülesannet - ennustada tulevasi keelemuutusi varasemate keelemuutuste põhjal, ülesannet reaalsete rakendustega, näiteks vaimse tervise ravi või tarbijate usalduse prognoosimise suundumusi. Määrame välja mõned ülesande autoregressiivsed põhiomadused (vajalik ajaloo suurus, staatiline või dünaamiline pikkus, erinev ajasammu resolutsioon) ja seejärel toetume populaarsetele sõnade jadamudelitele, et modelleerida selle asemel keelepõhiseid emotsioone ajas. Uudse Twitteri andmekogumi, millest koosnevad 1900 kasutajat ning 6 emotsiooni ja 2 täiendavat keelelist atribuuti iganädalane + päevane skoor, põhjal leiame, et uudne kahekordne GRU mudel koos lagunenud varjatud olekutega saavutab parimad tulemused (r = .66), mis on oluliselt suuremad kui prognoos, nt liikuv keskmine, mis põhineb eelmistel ajasammudelitel (r = .49). Teeme oma anonüümseks muudetud andmekogumi, samuti ülesannete seadistamise ja hindamise koodi kättesaadavaks teistele.', 'fi': 'Ihmisen luonnollinen kieli mainitaan tietyssä vaiheessa, kun taas ihmisen tunteet muuttuvat ajan myötä. Vaikka paljon työtä on vahvistanut vahvan yhteyden kielen käytön ja tunnetilojen välillä, harvat ovat yrittäneet mallintaa tunnekieltä ajoissa. Tässä esitellään affektiivisen kielen ennustamisen tehtävä - tulevaisuuden kielen muutoksen ennustaminen aikaisempien kielimuutosten perusteella, tehtävä, jossa käytetään todellisia sovelluksia, kuten mielenterveyden hoitoa tai kuluttajien luottamuksen ennusteita. Määritämme osan tehtävän autoregressiivisistä perusominaisuuksista (tarvittavan historian koko, staattinen ja dynaaminen pituus, vaihtelevat aikaaskeltarkkuudet) ja rakennamme sen jälkeen suosittuja sekvenssimalleja sanoille mallintaaksemme kielipohjaisten tunteiden sekvenssejä ajassa. Uusien 1 900 käyttäjän Twitter-aineistojen ja kuuden tunteen viikoittaisen + päivittäisen pistemäärän sekä kahden kielellisen attribuutin avulla uusi kaksoissekvenssimalli, jossa on rappeutuneita piilotiloja, saavuttaa parhaat tulokset (r = 0,66), jotka ovat merkittävästi ennakoitavissa, esim. liukuva keskiarvo perustuu aiempiin aikavaiheisiin (r = 0,49). Annamme anonymisoidun aineistomme sekä tehtävien määritys- ja arviointikoodin muiden käyttöön.', 'ca': "La llengua natural human a es menciona en un moment específic mentre les emocions humanes canvien amb el temps. Mentre que molta feina ha establit un vincle fort entre l'ús del llenguatge i els estats emocionals, pocs han intentat modelar el llenguatge emocional en el temps. Aquí introduim la tasca de la previsió afectiva del llenguatge - predir el futur canvi en el llenguatge basat en canvis de llenguatge passats, una tasca amb aplicacions del món real, com el tractament de la salut mental o la previsió de tendències en la confiança dels consumidors. Establecem algunes de les característiques autoregressives fonamentals de la tasca (la mida de la història necessària, la longitud estatica contra dinàmica, les resolucions variades del pas del temps) i després construim models de seqüència popular per paraules que, en canvi, model in seqüències d'emoció basada en el llenguatge en el temps. A través d'un nou conjunt de dades de Twitter de 1.900 usuaris i puntuacions setmanals + diàries per 6 emocions i 2 atributs lingüístics adicionals, trobem un model GRU de doble seqüència amb estats ocults desapareguts aconsegueix els millors resultats (r = .66) significativament previsibles, per exemple una mitjana en moviment basada en els passats passos de temps (r = .49). Fem disponible el nostre conjunt de dades anònims, la configuració de tasques i el codi d'evaluació per a altres.", 'az': 'İnsan təbiətli dili zamanında müəyyən vaxtda deyilir. İnsan duyguları zamanında dəyişir. Həqiqətən, çox iş dil istifadəsi və emosiyal durumlar arasında güclü bir bağlantı yaratdı, çox az emosiyal dili zamanda modelləşdirməyə çalışırdı. Burada təsirli dil tədbirlərini təşkil edirik - əvvəlki dillərin dəyişikliklərinə dayanan gələcək dəyişikliklərin tədbirlərini təşkil edirik, həqiqət dünyanın uyğulamaları kimi mental sağlığını təhsil etmək və ya müştəqilərə güvenilir tədbirlərini təşkil edirik. Biz işlərin əsas təkrarlayıcılarından bəzilərini quraşdırırıq (lazım keçmişin böyüklüyü, statik və dinamik uzunluğu, vaxtlı-adım çözümlərini dəyişdirir) və sonra sözlərin modellərini zamanında dil-tabanlı emosiyaların modellərini dəyişdiririk. Bir yeni Twitter veri quruluğu ilə 1.900 istifadəçilər və haftalıqda + g ünlük 6 hiss və 2 əlavə dil qüdrəti üçün müəyyən edilən müəyyən müddətlərin üstündə yeni dual-sequence GRU modeli tapır ıq, çürümüş gizli durumlar ilə ən yaxşı sonuçları (r =.66) artırır, məsələn, əvvəlki vaxt adımlarına ( r =.49) dayandırılır. Biz anonimlənmiş verilən quruluşumuz və başqalarının qurulması üçün işlər qurulması və değerlendirmə kodu faydalandırırıq.', 'sk': 'Človeški naravni jezik se omenja v določenem času, medtem ko se človeška čustva sčasoma spreminjajo. Medtem ko je veliko dela vzpostavilo močno povezavo med uporabo jezika in čustvenimi stanji, jih je malo poskušalo pravočasno modelirati čustveni jezik. Tu predstavljamo nalogo afektivnega napovedovanja jezika - napovedovanja prihodnjih sprememb jezika na podlagi preteklih sprememb jezika, nalogo z realnimi aplikacijami, kot je zdravljenje duševnega zdravja ali napovedovanje trendov zaupanja potrošnikov. Določimo nekatere temeljne avtoregresivne značilnosti naloge (potrebna velikost zgodovine, statična in dinamična dolžina, različne ločljivosti časovnih korakov) in nato gradimo na popularnih modelih zaporedij besed, da namesto tega modeliramo zaporedje jezikovnih čustev v času. Na novem Twitterjevem naboru podatkov 1.900 uporabnikov in tedenskih + dnevnih rezultatov za 6 čustev in 2 dodatna jezikovna atributa smo ugotovili, da nov model GRU z dvojnim zaporedjem z razpadajočimi skritimi stanji dosega najboljše rezultate (r = 0,66), ki bistveno presega napoved, npr. drseče povprečje na podlagi preteklih časovnih korakov (r = 0,49). Naš anonimiziran nabor podatkov ter nastavitev opravil in vrednotenje kode dajemo na voljo drugim.', 'jv': 'Suwisan anyar luwih dumadhi nganggo kuwi kesempatan ning aku, sampek cuwih-duwih sing ngubah ning aku. Nanging kabèh obah-obahan seneng nggawe barang matang ning langga lan stad kuwi mungkin, durung-amanan saiki ngejaraké kuwi tindah éntuk ning aku. Saiki, kéné mulai nggawe aturan nggawe barang nggawe luwih apik - ingkang pawaran kanggo ngerasai luwih dumadhi kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngubah urip, kesempatan karo aplikasi sing ngregani uwong, koyo ngono nggalakno kuwi nggalakno or a tau persuran kanggo ngerasai winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé isih perusahaan nganggo cara-cara sistem sing dibenalke nggawe nguasai (hal-kalaayurakan, dadi stabil lan warni nggawe geraksi), lan nganggo nggawe nguasai sistem sing popular terus-teka kanggo kuwi tindakan kuwi tindakan Mungkin nganggo donêng ngentambah Google Samsul akeh 1.9 pengguna sampeyan karo semana + Daerah sing dibutungan kanggo 6 empatir lan 2 atiribusi Language dumadhi, kita kesempatan model dhuwur-sekondi ARGU karo akeh akeh basa dhuwur kesempatan dhuwur kesempatan (r= .6) supayapun deweke nglanggar sampeyan luwih dumadhi aceh operasi aku (r= .49). Awak dhéwé éné beraksi dadi nggawe lan akeh nggawe dadi nggawe dadi, dadi nggawe barang nggawe dolanan karo perusahaan kanggo tinggal wiharé', 'he': 'שפה טבעית אנושית מוזכרת בשלב מסוים בזמן בזמן שהרגשות האנושיות משתנות במהלך הזמן. בעוד הרבה עבודה יצרה קשר חזק בין השימוש בשפה למצבים רגשיים, מעט ניסו לדוגמא שפה רגשית בזמן. Here, we introduce the task of affective language forecasting - predicting future change in language based on past changes of language, a task with real-world applications such as treating mental health or forecasting trends in consumer confidence.  אנו קובעים חלק מהתכונות אוטומגרסיביות הבסיסיות של המשימה (גודל ההיסטוריה הכרחי, אורך סטטי נגד דינמי, פתרונות צעדים-זמן שונים) ואז בונים על דוגמנים רצף פופולריים למילים למקום רצפים דוגמנים של רגשות מבוססים בשפה בזמן. במהלך קבוצת נתונים טוויטר חדשה של 1,900 משתמשים ובנקודות יומיות + שבועיות עבור 6 רגשות ושני תכונות שפתיים נוספים, אנו מוצאים מודל GRU רומן של רצף כפול עם מדינות חבויות מתמוטטות משיגים את התוצאות הטובות ביותר (r = .66) מחוץ לחזוי באופן משמעותי, לדוגמא, ממוצע זז מבוסס על צעדים הזמן האחרונים (r = .49). אנו מכניסים את קבוצת המידע האנונימית שלנו, כמו גם את המערכת המשימה וקוד הערכה זמין לאחרים לבנות עליהם.', 'ha': "An ambaci harshen mutum da aka ƙayyade shi a wani wuni na ƙayyadadde a lokacin da hisãbin mutum ke musanya lokaci. Ko da yawa wani aikin ya saɓa wani linki mai ƙarfi tsakanin amfani da misalin harshe da shiryoyin hisãbi, sai kaɗan sun yi jarraba su motsar maganar hisãbi a lokacin. Here, we introduce the task of affective language forecasting - predicting future change in language based on past changes of language, a task with real-world applications such as treating mental health or forecasting trends in consumer confidence.  Mu ɗauki wani abu na bincike na farat-regressive masu aikin (girmar historin da ake amfani da shi, tsakiya versa dinamic, masu buƙata masu motsi ga zaman shawara-lokaci) kuma ka sami a kan misãlai masu mutane da za'a samu'a wa maganar da za'a sami motsi masu sauran hisãbin da aka rubutu wa lugha a cikin lokaci. Ko da wani tsari na Twitter na yanzu na amfani da 1,9000 da wato+ score na kwanan wata shekara g a hisãbi 6 da wasu shiryoyin linguistic na 2, za mu iya sãmu wani motsi na sauri na biyu da aka rubũta na rubutu GRU da daidaita bakin-daidaita da aka ɓõye (r =.66) ya sami mafi kyaun matsala (r =.66) mai bayan bayani na bayani, misali, wata saukarwa mai saukarwa a kan tafiyar-talli na zaman (r = .49). Kana sami tsarin da ba'a sani ba, da kuma kodi na tsari da evaluation za'a iya samun wasu da za'a samar da su.", 'bo': 'སྐབས་དེར་མིའི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དག་ནི་དུས་ཚོར་དམིགས་བསལ་ཞིག་འཛིན་དུས། སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སེམས འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་གནོད་ཅན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ནང་གི་མ་འོངས་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དང་། འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་། མི་འོངས We establish some of the fundamental autoregressive characteristics of the task (necessary history size, static versus dynamic length, varying time-step resolutions) and then build on popular sequence models for words to instead of model sequences of language-based emotions in time. Over a novel Twitter dataset of 1,900 users and weekly + daily scores for 6 emotions and 2 additional linguistic attributes, we find a novel dual-sequence GRU model with decayed hidden states achieves best results (r = .66) significantly out-predicting, e.g., a moving averaging based on the past time-steps ང་ཚོས་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ལས་འགུལ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'ar': 'التعرف على الاندماج المعجمي الصيني من نهاية إلى نهاية مع معرفة سامية', 'es': 'Reconocimiento integral de la fusión léxica china con conocimiento de Sememe', 'fr': 'Reconnaissance de fusion lexicale chinoise de bout en bout avec Sememe Knowledge', 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de Fusão Lexical Chinesa de ponta a ponta com conhecimento de Sememe', 'ja': 'セメム語の知識を持つ中国語の語彙融合認識', 'zh': '端到端汉语词汇融识精明', 'hi': 'सेमेम ज्ञान के साथ चीनी लेक्सिकल फ्यूजन मान्यता को समाप्त करने के लिए अंत', 'ru': 'Конец китайскому лексическому признанию слияния с семемными знаниями', 'ga': 'Deireadh le hAitheantas Comhleá Foclóra na Síne le hEolas Sememe', 'ka': 'დასრულება ჩინეთი ლექსიკალური ფუციის განაცნობა სემემის მეცნიერებით', 'el': 'Τέλος σε τέλος κινεζική Lexical Fusion αναγνώριση με τη γνώση του Sememe', 'hu': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'it': 'Riconoscimento della fusione lessicale cinese end to end con Sememe Knowledge', 'kk': 'Қытай лексикалық Fusion- ті Sememe- тің білімімен білуге аяқтау', 'mk': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'lt': 'Baigti ir baigti Kinijos leksikalinės branduolinės sintezės pripažinimą seminėmis žiniomis', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഫുഷന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Хятадын лексикийн Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge төгсгөлд', 'ms': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'mt': 'Tmiem sa Tmiem ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Fużjoni Lessika Ċiniża b’Għarfien tas-Semem', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea fuziunii lexicale chinezești de la sfârșit la sfârșit cu cunoștințele Sememe', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie syntezy jądrowej od końca do końca dzięki wiedzy Sememe', 'sr': 'Kraj do kraja kineske prepoznavanje leksičkog fuzija sa Sememom znanjem', 'no': 'Slutt til slutt kinesisk leksisk Fusion- kjenning med semikjenkjenning', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Dhammaan dhamaadka aqoonsiga qoraalka ee China Lexical fusion', 'sv': 'Slut till slut kinesisk Lexical Fusion erkännande med Sememe Kunskap', 'ur': 'سیمیم علم کے ساتھ چین کی لکسیکل فوسین پتپذیر ہونے کی پایان ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết thúc việc xác nhận thử nghiệm với khả năng thông thạo hóa chất.', 'da': 'End to End Kinesisk Lexical Fusion Anerkendelse med Sememe Viden', 'hr': 'Kraj do kraja kineske prepoznavanje leksičkog fuzija sa semim znanjem', 'nl': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition met Sememe Kennis', 'id': 'Akhir untuk Akhir Pengenalan Fusi Lexik Cina dengan Pengetahuan Sememe', 'fa': 'پایان به پایان شناختن سوخت لکسیکی چینی با دانش سمی', 'sw': 'Mwisho wa Kumaliza Ufumbuzi wa Lexico wa China kwa ufahamu wa Jina', 'bg': 'От край до край разпознаване на китайски лексикален синтез със знания', 'tr': 'Semei Bilgi bilen Çinçe Leksik Fusion Tanamagyny soňra', 'de': 'End to End Chinesische Lexical Fusion Erkennung mit Sememe Wissen', 'ko': '의소 지식을 바탕으로 하는 끝에서 끝까지 중국어 어휘 융합 식별', 'am': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'hy': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'sq': 'End to End Chinese Lexical Fusion Recognition with Sememe Knowledge', 'az': 'Sememe Biliml…ôri il…ô √áinc…ô Leksik Fusion Recognition End to End', 'bs': 'Kraj do kraja kineske prepoznavanje leksičkog fuzija sa Sememom znanjem', 'ca': 'Fin a acabar el reconeixement xinès de la fusió lexical amb el coneixement seminal', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání čínské lexikální fúze od konce do konce se znalostmi Sememe', 'fi': 'Kiinalainen Lexical Fusion -tunnistus Sememe Knowledge -osaamisella', 'bn': 'Name', 'af': 'Einde na Einde Sjinese Leksiese Fusionerkening met Sememe kennis', 'et': 'Lõpp lõpuni Hiina Lexical Fusion Tunnustamine Sememe teadmistega', 'he': 'סוף עד סוף זיהוי מיזון קסי סיני עם ידע סמימי', 'jv': 'Mawit kanggo ngerti Perangkat Kemerdekaan Panjenengan Leksial Fotion karo semie Bilih', 'sk': 'Od konca do konca kitajsko Lexical Fusion prepoznavanje s Sememe znanjem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'མཇུག་རྫོགས་ལ། ཆེན་ཤེས་པའི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་གཟུགས་སྡོད་Fusion རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ལ་མཇུག་བསྡད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present Chinese lexical fusion recognition, a new task which could be regarded as one kind of coreference recognition. First, we introduce the task in detail, showing the relationship with coreference recognition and differences from the existing tasks. Second, we propose an end-to-end model for the task, handling mentions as well as coreference relationship jointly. The model exploits the state-of-the-art contextualized BERT representations as an encoder, and is further enhanced with the sememe knowledge from HowNet by graph attention networks. We manually annotate a benchmark dataset for the task and then conduct experiments on it. Results demonstrate that our final model is effective and competitive for the task. Detailed analysis is offered for comprehensively understanding the new task and our proposed model.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم التعرف على الاندماج المعجمي الصيني ، وهي مهمة جديدة يمكن اعتبارها نوعًا واحدًا من التعرف على المرجع. أولاً ، نقدم المهمة بالتفصيل ، مع إظهار العلاقة مع التعرف على المرجع والاختلافات عن المهام الحالية. ثانيًا ، نقترح نموذجًا شاملاً للمهمة ، مع التعامل مع الإشارات بالإضافة إلى العلاقة المرجعية بشكل مشترك. يستغل النموذج تمثيلات BERT السياقية الأكثر حداثة باعتبارها أداة ترميز ، ويتم تعزيزها بشكل أكبر بالمعرفة شبه الكاملة من HowNet بواسطة شبكات الانتباه بالرسم البياني. نعلق يدويًا على مجموعة بيانات معيارية للمهمة ثم نجري تجارب عليها. تظهر النتائج أن نموذجنا النهائي فعال وتنافسي للمهمة. يتم تقديم تحليل مفصل لفهم المهمة الجديدة ونموذجنا المقترح بشكل شامل.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons la reconnaissance de fusion lexicale chinoise, une nouvelle tâche qui pourrait être considérée comme une sorte de reconnaissance de coréférence. Tout d'abord, nous présentons la tâche en détail, en montrant la relation avec la reconnaissance de coréférence et les différences par rapport aux tâches existantes. Ensuite, nous proposons un modèle de bout en bout pour la tâche, gérant les mentions ainsi que la relation de coréférence conjointement. Le modèle exploite les représentations BERT contextualisées de pointe en tant qu'encodeur, et est encore amélioré avec les connaissances en sémème de HowNet par les réseaux d'attention graphique. Nous annotons manuellement un jeu de données de référence pour la tâche, puis nous menons des expériences sur celui-ci. Les résultats montrent que notre modèle final est efficace et compétitif pour la tâche. Une analyse détaillée est proposée pour comprendre de manière exhaustive la nouvelle tâche et le modèle que nous proposons.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos o reconhecimento de fusão lexical chinesa, uma nova tarefa que pode ser considerada como um tipo de reconhecimento de correferência. Primeiramente, apresentamos a tarefa em detalhes, mostrando a relação com o reconhecimento de correferência e as diferenças das tarefas existentes. Em segundo lugar, propomos um modelo de ponta a ponta para a tarefa, lidando com menções e relações de correferência de forma conjunta. O modelo explora as representações BERT contextualizadas de última geração como um codificador e é aprimorado ainda mais com o conhecimento de sememas da HowNet por redes de atenção de grafos. Anotamos manualmente um conjunto de dados de referência para a tarefa e, em seguida, realizamos experimentos nele. Os resultados demonstram que nosso modelo final é eficaz e competitivo para a tarefa. Uma análise detalhada é oferecida para entender de forma abrangente a nova tarefa e nosso modelo proposto.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos el reconocimiento de la fusión léxica china, una nueva tarea que podría considerarse como un tipo de reconocimiento de correferencia. Primero, presentamos la tarea en detalle, mostrando la relación con el reconocimiento de correferencias y las diferencias con las tareas existentes. En segundo lugar, proponemos un modelo integral para la tarea, manejando las menciones y la relación de correferencia de forma conjunta. El modelo explota las representaciones BERT contextualizadas de última generación como un codificador, y se mejora aún más con el conocimiento sememe de HowNet mediante redes de atención gráfica. Anotamos manualmente un conjunto de datos de referencia para la tarea y, a continuación, realizamos experimentos en él. Los resultados demuestran que nuestro modelo final es eficaz y competitivo para la tarea. Se ofrece un análisis detallado para comprender de manera integral la nueva tarea y el modelo que proponemos.', 'ja': '本稿では，中国語の語彙融合認識を提示し，コアレファレンス認識の一種とみなすことができる新しい課題を提示する．まず、コアリファレンス認識との関係と既存のタスクとの違いを示しながら、タスクを詳細に紹介します。第二に、タスクのエンドツーエンドのモデルを提案し、メンションとコアリファレンス関係を共同で扱う。このモデルは、エンコーダとして最先端のコンテキスト化されたBERT表現を利用し、グラフアテンションネットワークによるHowNetからのセム知識でさらに強化されています。タスクのベンチマークデータセットに手動で注釈を付け、実験を行います。結果は、当社の最終モデルがタスクに効果的で競争力があることを示しています。新しいタスクと提案されたモデルを包括的に理解するために、詳細な分析が提供されています。', 'zh': '本文中,汉语词汇融,此一共指之新务也。 先备言事,示与共指征知异。 其次,臣等为立端到端,共处提共指。 先进上下BERT以为编码器,以图形网络益强HowNetsememe知。 余手动注事者基准数集,然后实验之。 结果表明,吾之终有效于事而有竞争力者也。 供其详析,以周知新务,与吾所陈。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем китайское лексическое распознавание слияния, новую задачу, которую можно рассматривать как один из видов распознавания ядра. Во-первых, мы подробно представляем задачу, показывая взаимосвязь с распознаванием coreference и отличия от существующих задач. Во-вторых, мы предлагаем сквозную модель для задачи, обрабатывающую упоминания, а также базовые отношения совместно. Модель использует современные контекстуализированные представления BERT в качестве кодировщика и дополнительно улучшается с помощью семенных знаний из HowNet с помощью сетей внимания графа. Мы вручную аннотируем набор контрольных данных для задания, а затем проводим над ним эксперименты. Результаты показывают, что наша окончательная модель эффективна и конкурентоспособна для выполнения задачи. Для всестороннего понимания новой задачи и предлагаемой нами модели предлагается подробный анализ.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम चीनी लेक्सिकल संलयन मान्यता प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक नया कार्य जिसे एक प्रकार की कोरेफेरेंस मान्यता के रूप में माना जा सकता है। सबसे पहले, हम कार्य को विस्तार से पेश करते हैं, जो मौजूदा कार्यों से सह-संदर्भ मान्यता और मतभेदों के साथ संबंध दिखाते हैं। दूसरा, हम कार्य के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, उल्लेखों के साथ-साथ सह-सम्मेलन संबंधों को संयुक्त रूप से संभालते हैं। मॉडल एक एनकोडर के रूप में अत्याधुनिक संदर्भित BERT प्रतिनिधित्व का शोषण करता है, और ग्राफ ध्यान नेटवर्क द्वारा HowNet से sememe ज्ञान के साथ आगे बढ़ाया जाता है। हम मैन्युअल रूप से कार्य के लिए एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट को एनोटेट करते हैं और फिर उस पर प्रयोग करते हैं। परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा अंतिम मॉडल कार्य के लिए प्रभावी और प्रतिस्पर्धी है। विस्तृत विश्लेषण व्यापक रूप से नए कार्य और हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल को समझने के लिए पेश किया जाता है।', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid aitheantas comhleá foclóireachta na Síne i láthair, tasc nua a d'fhéadfaí a mheas mar aon chineál aitheantais croíláir. Ar an gcéad dul síos, tugaimid an tasc isteach go mion, ag taispeáint an gaol le haitheantas croíláir agus difríochtaí ó na tascanna atá ann cheana féin. Ar an dara dul síos, molaimid múnla ceann go ceann don tasc, ag plé le tagairtí chomh maith le caidreamh croífhreagartha i gcomhpháirt. Baineann an tsamhail leas as na huiríll comhthéacsaithe úrscothach BERT mar ionchódóir, agus feabhsaítear tuilleadh é leis an eolas leathcheann ó HowNet trí líonraí aird ghraif. Déanaimid anótáil de láimh ar thacar sonraí tagarmharcála don tasc agus ansin déanaimid turgnaimh air. Léiríonn torthaí go bhfuil ár múnla deiridh éifeachtach agus iomaíoch don tasc. Cuirtear anailís mhionsonraithe ar fáil chun an tasc nua agus an tsamhail atá beartaithe againn a thuiscint go cuimsitheach.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩინეთი ლექსიკალური ფუზიციის აღმოჩვენება, ახალი რაოდენობა, რომელიც შეიძლება აღმოჩნოთ როგორც ერთი ტიპი ფუზიციის აღმოჩნოთ. პირველი, ჩვენ დავაჩვენეთ რაოდენობას დეტალურად, რომელიც აჩვენებთ შესახებ სწორედ განაცნობას და განსხვავებას აქვს რაოდენობებიდან. მეორე, ჩვენ მინდომარებით დასრულებული მოდელის მოდელის გადასრულება, შესახებ შესახებ და შესახებ შესახებ. მოდელეც კონტექსტუალური BERT-ის გამოსახულებები როგორც კოდორეტორი გამოიყენება და უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფ ჩვენ პირდაპირად მონიშნეთ მონაცემები დანაცემების საქმე და შემდეგ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ. შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი ბოლო მოდელი ეფექტიურია და კონკურექტიურია რაოდენობისთვის. Detailed analysis is offered for comprehensive understanding the new task and our proposed model.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την κινεζική λεξική αναγνώριση συγχώνευσης, ένα νέο έργο που θα μπορούσε να θεωρηθεί ως ένα είδος αναγνώρισης συγχώνευσης. Πρώτον, εισάγουμε λεπτομερώς την εργασία, δείχνοντας τη σχέση με την αναγνώριση της συνάφειας και τις διαφορές από τις υπάρχουσες εργασίες. Δεύτερον, προτείνουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο για το έργο, το οποίο διαχειρίζεται τις αναφορές καθώς και τη σχέση συνεργασίας από κοινού. Το μοντέλο εκμεταλλεύεται τις υπερσύγχρονες αναπαραστάσεις BERT ως κωδικοποιητή, και ενισχύεται περαιτέρω με τη γνώση των σειμάτων από το HowNet μέσω δικτύων προσοχής γραφήματος. Σημειώνουμε χειροκίνητα ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς για την εργασία και στη συνέχεια διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε αυτό. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το τελικό μοντέλο μας είναι αποτελεσματικό και ανταγωνιστικό για το έργο. Προσφέρεται λεπτομερής ανάλυση για την πλήρη κατανόηση του νέου έργου και του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου μας.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a kínai lexikális fúziós felismerést, egy új feladatot, amely egyfajta coreferencia felismerésnek tekinthető. Először is részletesen bemutatjuk a feladatot, bemutatva a coreferencia felismeréssel való kapcsolatot és a meglévő feladatoktól való eltéréseket. Másodszor egy end-to-end modellt javasolunk a feladathoz, az említések és a coreferencia kapcsolatok együttes kezelésével. A modell kódolóként használja ki a legkorszerűbb kontextuális BERT ábrázolásokat, és a HowNet szeméme tudásával tovább fejleszti a grafikonok figyelemmel kísérő hálózatok. Manuálisan jegyzetelünk egy referenciaadatkészletet a feladathoz, majd kísérleteket végezünk rajta. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy végső modellünk hatékony és versenyképes a feladathoz. Részletes elemzést kínálunk az új feladat és javasolt modellünk átfogó megértéséhez.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз қытайша лексикалық түсініктемесін таңдаймыз. Бұл жаңа тапсырма бір түрлі қатынау ретінде қалай алады. Біріншіден, біз тапсырманы егжей- тегжейлі таңдап, бар тапсырмалардың қатынасын анықтау мен айырмашылығын көрсету. Екіншіден, біз тапсырманың аяқтау үлгісін және қатынасы біріктіру үлгісін қолданамыз. Бұл үлгі бағдарламаның контекстуалды BERT кескіндерін кодер ретінде жұмыс істейді, сондай-ақ HowNet-ден земемді білімдерді графикалық желілер арқылы көмектеседі. Біз тапсырманың бақылау деректер жиынын қолмен жазып, оны тәжірибелеуді орындаймыз. Нәтижелер біздің соңғы моделіміз тапсырма үшін эффективті және конкурсивті деп көрсетеді. Егжей- тегжейі анализ жаңа тапсырманы және қолданыстағы үлгісін толық түсінуге болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome Kinijos leksinės sintezės pripažinimą, naują užduotį, kurią galima laikyti vieno tipo koreferenciniu pripažinimu. Pirma, išsamiai pristatome užduotį, parodant santykius su sąžiningumo pripažinimu ir esamų užduočių skirtumus. Antra, siūlome užduoties pabaigos model į, bendrai tvarkyti minėtus klausimus ir bendrai palaikyti santykius. Modelis naudoja naujausius kontekstinius BERT atstovus kaip kodatorių ir toliau stiprinamas naudojant HowNet spermos žinias grafikos dėmesio tinklais. Mes rankiniu būdu anotuojame užduoties lyginamąjį duomenų rinkinį ir tuomet atliekame eksperimentus. Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų galutinis model is yra veiksmingas ir konkurencingas. Siūloma išsami analizė, kad būtų visapusiškai suprantama nauja užduotis ir mūsų siūlomas model is.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo il riconoscimento lessicale cinese della fusione, un nuovo compito che potrebbe essere considerato come un tipo di riconoscimento della coreferenza. In primo luogo, presentiamo il compito in dettaglio, mostrando il rapporto con il riconoscimento della coreferenza e le differenze rispetto ai compiti esistenti. In secondo luogo, proponiamo un modello end-to-end per il compito, gestendo le menzioni e la relazione di coreferenza congiuntamente. Il modello sfrutta le rappresentazioni BERT contestualizzate all'avanguardia come encoder ed è ulteriormente migliorato con le conoscenze sememe di HowNet tramite reti di attenzione grafiche. Annotamo manualmente un set di dati di benchmark per l'attività e poi conduciamo esperimenti su di esso. I risultati dimostrano che il nostro modello finale è efficace e competitivo per il compito. Vengono offerte analisi dettagliate per comprendere in modo completo il nuovo compito e il modello proposto.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме кинеско препознавање на лексикалната фузија, нова задача која може да се смета за еден вид препознавање на соодветност. Прво, ја претставуваме задачата во детали, покажувајќи ја врската со признавањето на соодветноста и разликите од постојните задачи. Второ, предложуваме модел од крај до крај за задачата, заеднички решавање на спомените, како и односот на соодветност. Моделот ги искористува најсовремените контекстуални претставувања на БЕРТ како кодер, и понатаму се подобрува со знаењето за семето од HowNet со мрежите на графичко внимание. Рачно анотираме набор на податоци за задачата и потоа спроведуваме експерименти на неа. Резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот финален модел е ефикасен и конкурентен за задачата. Понудена е детална анализа за сеопфатно разбирање на новата задача и нашиот предложен модел.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചൈനീസ് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതാണ്, ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലിയെ കോര്\u200dഫറന്\u200dസ് തിരിച്ചറിയാന ആദ്യം, നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടാമത്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന പേരുകളും കോര്\u200d ഈ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബെര്\u200dടി പ്രതിനിധികളെ ഒരു കോഡോര്\u200dഡരായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഗ്രാഫ് ശ്രദ്ധ നെറ്റുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഹൌനെറ We manually annotate a benchmark dataset for the task and then conduct experiments on it.  നമ്മുടെ അവസാനത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും മത്സരിക്കുന്നതുമാണെന്നും ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ ജോലിയും നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലും മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pengenalan fusi lexik Cina, tugas baru yang boleh dianggap sebagai satu jenis pengenalan persamaan. Pertama, kita memperkenalkan tugas secara terperinci, menunjukkan hubungan dengan pengenalan persamaan dan perbezaan dari tugas yang ada. Kedua, kami cadangkan model akhir-akhir untuk tugas, mengendalikan sebutan serta hubungan persamaan bersama-sama. The model exploits the state-of-the-art contextualized BERT representations as an encoder, and is further enhanced with the sememe knowledge from HowNet by graph attention networks.  Kami secara manual anotasi set data benchmark untuk tugas dan kemudian melakukan eksperimen di atasnya. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa model akhir kita adalah efektif dan kompetitif untuk tugas. Analisis terperinci ditawarkan untuk memahami secara keseluruhan tugas baru dan model kami ditawarkan.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw ir-rikonoxximent tal-fużjoni lexika Ċiniża, kompitu ġdid li jista’ jitqies bħala tip wieħed ta’ rikonoxximent tal-koerenza. L-ewwel nett, aħna nintroduċu l-kompitu fid-dettall, li juri r-relazzjoni mar-rikonoxximent tal-koerenza u d-differenzi mill-kompiti eżistenti. It-tieni nett, qed nipproponu mudell minn tarf sa tarf għall-kompitu, l-immaniġġjar tas-semmiet kif ukoll ir-relazzjoni ta’ koreferenza b’mod konġunt. Il-mudell jisfrutta r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-BERT kontekstwalizzati l-aktar avvanzati bħala kodifikatur, u jissaħħaħ aktar bl-għarfien tas-semen minn HowNet permezz ta’ netwerks ta’ attenzjoni grafika. Aħna nnutaw manwalment sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza għall-kompitu u mbagħad nagħmlu esperimenti fuqu. Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudell finali tagħna huwa effettiv u kompetittiv għall-kompitu. Detailed analysis is offered for comprehensively understanding the new task and our proposed model.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Хятад хэлсэн хэлбэрийн нэгтгэлийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөх шинэ ажил илтгэдэг. Эхлээд бид үүнийг нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж, харилцаа нь зөвшөөрөл хүлээн зөвшөөрөл, өөрчлөлттэй харилцаа харуулж байна. Хоёрдугаар, бид ажлын төгсгөл загварын загварыг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Мөн хамтдаа зөвшөөрөл харилцаа холбоотой. Энэ загвар нь урлагийн орчин үеийн төлөвлөгөө болон BERT-ын төлөвлөгөөг коддогч болгон ашиглаж байна. ХавNet-ээс анхаарлын сүлжээний мэдлэгийг график сүлжээгээр нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бид ажил дээрх банк-марк өгөгдлийн санг гараараа анзаарч, дараа нь туршилтыг хийнэ. Үүний үр дүнд бидний сүүлийн загвар нь ажил дээр үр дүнтэй, өрсөлдөөнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Шинэ ажил болон санал өгсөн загварыг бүрэн ойлгохын тулд нарийвчлалтай шинжилгээ гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy chińskie rozpoznawanie syntezy leksykalnej, nowe zadanie, które można uznać za jeden rodzaj rozpoznawania koreferencji. Najpierw szczegółowo przedstawiamy zadanie, pokazując związek z rozpoznawaniem współreferencji oraz różnice od istniejących zadań. Po drugie, proponujemy model end-to-end dla zadania, obsługujący wspólnie wzmianki oraz relacje współdzielne. Model wykorzystuje najnowocześniejsze kontekstualizowane reprezentacje BERT jako koder i jest dodatkowo wzbogacony o wiedzę sememe z HowNet za pomocą sieci uwagi grafów. Ręcznie anomentujemy zestaw danych referencyjnych dla danego zadania, a następnie przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na nim. Wyniki pokazują, że nasz ostateczny model jest skuteczny i konkurencyjny do tego zadania. Proponowana jest szczegółowa analiza dla kompleksowego zrozumienia nowego zadania i proponowanego przez nas modelu.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi kinesisk skrivebeskyving, eit nytt oppgåve som kan verta kalla til ein type gjenkjenning av koreferanse. Først introduserer vi oppgåva i detalj, viser forholdet med gjenkjenning og forskjeller frå dei eksisterande oppgåva. Andre, vi foreslår ein sluttmodell for oppgåva, handtering av oppgåva, samt håndteringsforhold. Modellen ekspluaterer kontekstualiserte BERT-representasjonane som koder, og er meir forbetra med sememekunnskapen frå HowNet ved grafennettverk. Vi merker manuelt ein dataset for benchmarken for oppgåva og så gjer eksperimenter på det. Resultat viser at det siste modellet vår er effektivt og konkurentivt for oppgåva. Detaljerte analyse er tilbygd for å komplett forstå den nye oppgåva og vår foreslått modellen.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo priznanje kineske leksičke fuzije, novi zadatak koji bi se smatrao jednim vrstom prepoznavanja pristojnosti. Prvo predstavljamo zadatak detaljno, pokazujući vezu sa priznanjem pristojnosti i razlikama od postojećih zadataka. Drugo, predlažemo model kraja do kraja za zadatak, rešenje spominjanja, kao i zajednički odnos na dobrodušnost. Model iskoristi kontekstualizirane predstave BERT kao koder i dalje se poboljšava sa sememom znanjem iz HowNeta grafičkim mrežama pažnje. Ruèno annotiramo rezervni set podataka za zadatak i onda provodimo eksperimente na njemu. Rezultati pokazuju da je naš poslednji model efikasan i konkurentan za zadatak. Detaljna analiza se ponudi za sveobuhvatno razumevanje novog zadatka i našeg predloženog modela.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm recunoașterea fuziunii lexicale chineze, o nouă sarcină care ar putea fi privită ca un fel de recunoaștere a coreferenței. În primul rând, introducem sarcina în detaliu, arătând relația cu recunoașterea corefenței și diferențele față de sarcinile existente. În al doilea rând, propunem un model end-to-end pentru sarcină, gestionând mențiunile și relația de corefență în comun. Modelul exploatează reprezentările contextualizate BERT de ultimă oră ca encoder și este îmbunătățit în continuare cu cunoștințele sememe de la HowNet prin intermediul rețelelor de atenție grafice. Adnotăm manual un set de date de referință pentru sarcină și apoi efectuăm experimente pe ea. Rezultatele demonstrează că modelul nostru final este eficient și competitiv pentru această sarcină. Este oferită o analiză detaliată pentru înțelegerea cuprinzătoare a noii sarcini și a modelului propus.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි චීනි ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධයක් අඳුරගන්න පුළුවන් අළුත් වැඩක් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට කියල මුලින්ම, අපි විස්තර වලින් වැඩක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, සම්බන්ධතාවක් අඳුරගන්න සමග සම්බන්ධතාවක් පෙනුම් කරනවා. දෙවෙනි වෙනුවෙන්, අපි අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කරනවා වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ස්ථිතිය-සංවේදනය BERT සංවේදනය කිරීමක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හොනෙට් වලින් සීමි දන අපි කාර්යය සඳහා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් එකක් අල්ලගන්නවා ඊට පස්සේ ඒ ගැන පරීක්ෂණ කරන්න. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ අන්තිම මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්ණයෙන් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණයෙන් වෙනවා කියලා. විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් අළුත් වැඩය සහ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය ප්\u200dරවේශනය තේරුම් ගන්න ප', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa aqoonsiga fudud ee Shiinaha, shaqo cusub oo lagu kaleemeyn karo aqoonsi karta. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu shaqada u soo bandhignaynaa si gaar ah, waxaynu tusnaynaa xiriirka aqoonsashada aqoonsashada aqoonsashada iyo kala duwan ka duwan shaqada joogta. Second, waxaynu horumarinaynaa model ugu dhammaadka shaqada, dhaqashada hadalka iyo xiriirka xirfada. Tusaalada ayaa u baaraandegay xaaladda farshaxanta ee BERT-ka mid ah cod, waxaana lagu sii kordhiyaa aqoonta sememe ee ka yimid HowNet xagga shabakada warbixinta. Waxaan si gacan ah ugu baaraandegaynaa macluumaadka qoraalka shaqada, kadibna waxan ku sameynaa imtixaan. Resultiyada waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayaga ugu dambeeya uu shaqada u shaqeeyo oo u tartami karo. Baaritaanka waxaa loo bixiyaa si aad u garan karo shuqulka cusub iyo modellkayaga la soo jeediyey.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் சீனம் லெக்சிக்சியல் தெரியும் அடையாளம், ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பு அடையாளம் என்று கருதப்படும். முதலில், நாம் பணியை விவரமாக குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், குறிப்பிட்ட அடையாளம் மற்றும் வேறுபாடுகளை தற்போதைய பணிகளில் இருந் இரண்டாவது, நாம் பணிக்கான முடிவு முடிவு மாதிரி முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், கையாளும் குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் குறிப இந்த மாதிரி பிரெட் குறியீட்டாக்கியின் நிலையில் இருந்து பிரெட் குறிமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும் மேலும் அதிகப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது ஹோ We manually annotate a benchmark dataset for the task and then conduct experiments on it.  முடிவுகள் வேலைக்கு எங்கள் இறுதி மாதிரி செயல்படுத்தும் போராடியும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. புதிய செயல் மற்றும் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியை புரிந்து புரிந்து கொள்ள விவரமான ஆய்வு வழங', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi kinesisk lexikal fusion erkännande, en ny uppgift som skulle kunna betraktas som ett slags coreference erkännande. Först introducerar vi uppgiften i detalj och visar relationen med coreference igenkänning och skillnader från befintliga uppgifter. För det andra föreslår vi en end-to-end modell för uppgiften, hantering av omnämnanden samt coreference relation gemensamt. Modellen utnyttjar de senaste kontextualiserade BERT-representationerna som kodare, och förstärks ytterligare med sememekunskapen från HowNet genom grafuppmärksamhetsnätverk. Vi kommenterar manuellt en benchmark datauppsättning för uppgiften och utför sedan experiment på den. Resultaten visar att vår slutliga modell är effektiv och konkurrenskraftig för uppgiften. Detaljerad analys erbjuds för att förstå den nya uppgiften och vår föreslagna modell.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم چین کی لکسیکی فوجین کی شناخت کررہے ہیں، ایک نوی کام جو ایک طرح کی مہربانی کی شناخت سمجھ سکتی ہے۔ پہلی بار، ہم اس کام کو تفصیل میں پیش کرتے ہیں، اور موجود کاموں سے مختلف رابطہ دکھاتے ہیں. دوسرا، ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک آخر-to-end مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ذکر اور رشتہ رابطہ کے ساتھ سمجھتے ہیں. Model uses the state-of-the-art contextualized BERT representations as an encoder, and is further enhanced with the sememe knowledge from HowNet by graph attention networks. ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کو اپنا ذکر کرتے ہیں اور اس پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری آخری موڈل اس کام کے لئے مفید اور مسابقه ہے۔ تفصیلات کی تحقیقات نو کام اور ہماری پیشنهاد مدل کو پوری طرح سمجھنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz Xitoycha Leksikal fuksining tashkilotlarini aniqlash imkoniyatini hozir qilamiz. Bu yangi vazifa bir xitoz tashkilotni tashkilotga hisoblash mumkin. Birinchisi, biz vazifa haqida o'xshash beramiz, ma'lumotni aniqlash va mavjud vazifalar bilan aloqalarni ko'rsatamiz. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz vazifa uchun oxirigi modelni boshqarish, fikrlarni boshqarish va birlashtirish bilan bog'liq munosabatlarini boshqarishmiz. Name Biz vazifani qoʻlbola qo'lbola aytganmiz va keyin uni jarayon imtiyozni bajaramiz. Natijalar shu vazifa uchun oxirgi modelmiz ishlaydi va rivojlanishimizni ko'rsatadi. Tafsilotlar tarjima qilingan yangi vazifani va oldingan modelmiz uchun.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu nhận diện ngôn ngữ văn học Trung Quốc về nhiệt hạch, một nhiệm vụ mới có thể được coi là một kiểu công nhận hạn chót. Trước hết, chúng ta sẽ tiến hành nhiệm vụ một cách chi tiết, hiển thị mối quan hệ với việc chấp nhận và sự khác biệt với các nhiệm vụ hiện tại. Thứ hai, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp cuối cùng cho nhiệm vụ, xử lý đề cập cũng như quan hệ hạn chót cùng nhau. Mô hình này khai thác các biểu tượng của BERT trong tình hình nền tranh luận như mã hóa, và được nâng cao thêm với kiến thức tầm cỡ của Howlet nhờ các mạng quan tâm đồ thị. Chúng tôi sẽ ghi chú một bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho nhiệm vụ và tiến hành thí nghiệm. Kết quả cho thấy mẫu cuối cùng của chúng ta có hiệu quả và cạnh tranh cho nhiệm vụ. Phân tích chi tiết được đề nghị để hiểu hoàn toàn các nhiệm vụ mới và mẫu đã đề nghị.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме разпознаването на китайския лексикален синтез, нова задача, която може да се разглежда като един вид разпознаване на кореференцията. Първо, представяме задачата подробно, показвайки връзката с разпознаването на кореференцията и различията от съществуващите задачи. Второ, предлагаме модел от край до край за задачата, работещ съвместно с споменаванията, както и взаимоотношенията с кореференцията. Моделът експлоатира най-съвременните контекстуализирани изображения като кодер и е допълнително подобрен със семеме знания от HowNet чрез графични мрежи за внимание. Ръчно анотираме сравнителен набор от данни за задачата и след това провеждаме експерименти върху нея. Резултатите показват, че крайният ни модел е ефективен и конкурентен за задачата. Предлага се подробен анализ за цялостно разбиране на новата задача и предложения модел.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi kinesisk lexikal fusion anerkendelse, en ny opgave, der kunne betragtes som en slags coreference anerkendelse. For det første introducerer vi opgaven i detaljer og viser forholdet til coreference anerkendelse og forskelle fra de eksisterende opgaver. For det andet foreslår vi en end-to-end model for opgaven, der håndterer omtaler samt coreferenceforhold i fællesskab. Modellen udnytter de avancerede kontekstualiserede BERT-repræsentationer som en encoder, og er yderligere forbedret med sememe viden fra HowNet ved hjælp af grafopmærksomhedsnetværk. Vi annoterer manuelt et benchmark datasæt til opgaven og udfører derefter eksperimenter på det. Resultaterne viser, at vores endelige model er effektiv og konkurrencedygtig til opgaven. Detaljeret analyse tilbydes for en omfattende forståelse af den nye opgave og vores foreslåede model.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo priznanje kineske leksičke fuzije, novi zadatak koji se može smatrati jednim vrstom prepoznavanja pristojnosti. Prvo predstavljamo zadatak detaljno, pokazujući odnos s priznanjem pristojnosti i razlike od postojećih zadataka. Drugo, predlažemo model kraja do kraja zadatka, spominjanje rješavanja, kao i zajedno veze s pristojnošću. Model koristi kontekstualizirane predstave BERT-a kao kodera i dalje se poboljšava sa sememom znanjem iz HowNeta grafičkim mrežama pažnje. Ručno annotiramo rezervni set podataka za zadatak i onda provodimo eksperimente na njemu. Rezultati pokazuju da je naš konačni model učinkovit i konkurentan za zadatak. Detaljna analiza se ponudi za sveobuhvatno razumijevanje novog zadatka i našeg predloženog modela.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we Chinese lexicale fusie herkenning, een nieuwe taak die kan worden beschouwd als één soort coreferentie herkenning. Eerst introduceren we de taak in detail, waarbij we de relatie met coreferentie herkenning en verschillen met de bestaande taken laten zien. Ten tweede stellen we een end-to-end model voor voor de taak, waarbij vermeldingen en coreference relatie gezamenlijk worden behandeld. Het model maakt gebruik van de state-of-the-art contextualiseerde BERT representaties als encoder, en wordt verder uitgebreid met de sememe kennis van HowNet door grafiekaandachtsnetwerken. We annoteren handmatig een benchmark dataset voor de taak en voeren er vervolgens experimenten mee uit. De resultaten tonen aan dat ons uiteindelijke model effectief en concurrerend is voor de taak. Gedetailleerde analyse wordt aangeboden om de nieuwe taak en ons voorgestelde model volledig te begrijpen.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan pengenalan fusi lexik Cina, tugas baru yang dapat dianggap sebagai satu jenis pengenalan koreferensi. Pertama, kita memperkenalkan tugas secara rinci, menunjukkan hubungan dengan pengakuan persamaan dan perbedaan dari tugas yang ada. Kedua, kita mengusulkan model akhir-akhir untuk tugas, menangani sebutan serta hubungan koreferensi bersama-sama. Model ini mengeksploitasi reprezentasi BERT kontekstualisasi state-of-the-art sebagai pengekode, dan ditambah lebih lanjut dengan pengetahuan semen dari HowNet oleh jaringan perhatian grafik. Kami secara manual anotasi set data benchmark untuk tugas dan kemudian melakukan eksperimen di atasnya. Results demonstrate that our final model is effective and competitive for the task.  Analisis terperinci ditawarkan untuk memahami secara meliputi tugas baru dan model kami yang diusulkan.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 중국어 어휘 융합 식별이라는 새로운 임무를 제기했는데 이것은 일종의 공지 식별으로 볼 수 있다.우선, 우리는 이 임무를 상세하게 소개하고 공지 식별과의 관계와 기존 임무와의 차이를 보여 주었다.그 다음에 우리는 언급과 공지 관계를 연합하여 처리하는 철저한 임무 모델을 제시했다.이 모델은 가장 선진적인 배경화 버트 표시를 인코더로 하고 그림 주의 네트워크를 통해 의 의소 지식을 더욱 강화했다.우리는 임무를 위해 수동으로 기준 데이터 집합을 주석한 후에 그것을 실험했다.결과적으로 우리의 최종 모델은 효과적이고 경쟁력 있는 임무이다.새로운 임무와 우리가 제시한 모델을 전면적으로 이해하기 위해 본고는 상세한 분석을 제공하였다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz Çinçe lektik birleşmeleri tanyşyrýarys, täze bir zady arkaýyn tanyşyry diýip kabul edilebilir. Birinjisi, biz bu zady detaylar bilen tanyşdyrýarys we bar zadlaryň arasyndaky görnüşleri bilen aýratyny görkez. Ikinjisi, bu zadyň soňunda taýýarlanan nusgasyny teklip edýäris, agzalary we golaýlaşyklary bilen çykmak üçin. Model sanat halyndaky tesbitleri BERT ködlemeleri ködleme hökmünde ulanýar we HowNet'den grafik şebekleri bilen sememi bilen gowylaşdyrylýar. Biz bu işiň üçin bir benchmark veri setirini elimizden duýdurýarys we soňra munyň üstünde deneyler çykýarys. Netijenler biziň iň soňky nusgymyzyň işiň üçin täsirli we ýaryşykly bolandygyny görkezýär. Täze zadymyzy we teklip eden nusganymyzy çykarmak üçin detaylar analyzasy teklip edildi.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir chinesische lexikalische Fusionserkennung vor, eine neue Aufgabe, die als eine Art der Koreferenzerkennung betrachtet werden könnte. Zunächst stellen wir die Aufgabe im Detail vor, zeigen den Zusammenhang mit der Coreferenzerkennung und Unterschiede zu den bestehenden Aufgaben. Zweitens schlagen wir ein End-to-End-Modell für die Aufgabe vor, das Erwähnungen sowie Coreferenzbeziehungen gemeinsam behandelt. Das Modell nutzt die modernsten kontextualisierten BERT-Darstellungen als Encoder und wird durch Graphenaufmerksamkeitsnetzwerke mit dem Sememe-Wissen aus HowNet weiter verbessert. Wir kommentieren manuell einen Benchmark-Datensatz für die Aufgabe und führen dann Experimente daran durch. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser endgültiges Modell effektiv und wettbewerbsfähig für die Aufgabe ist. Eine detaillierte Analyse wird angeboten, um die neue Aufgabe und unser vorgeschlagenes Modell umfassend zu verstehen.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما شناسایی زبان زبان چینی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک کار جدید که می\u200cتواند به عنوان یک نوع شناسایی رضایت باشد. اول، ما این کار را به جزئیات معرفی می کنیم، که رابطه با شناسایی و تفاوت از وظیفه های موجود را نشان می دهیم. دوم، ما یک مدل پایان و پایان برای این کار پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، مراقبت اشاره\u200cها و رابطه\u200cهای مربوط به همدیگر. این مدل نمایش\u200cهای BERT را به عنوان یک کودره استفاده می\u200cکند، و با دانش سیمیم از HowNet به عنوان شبکه\u200cهای توجه گراف بیشتر با دانش\u200cهای سیمیه\u200cای از هونت بهبود می\u200cکند. ما به دستی یک مجموعه اطلاعات صندوق برای این کار را نشان می دهیم و بعد آزمایشات روی آن انجام می دهیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل نهایی ما برای این کار موثر و مسابقه است. تحلیل جزئیات برای فهمیدن کامل کار جدید و مدل پیشنهاد ما پیشنهاد شده است.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, laat ons die Sjinese leksiese afsondering herken, 'n nuwe taak wat as een soort van koreferensie herken kan word. Eerste, ons introduseer die taak in detaljes, wys die verwanting met koreferensie herken en verskille van die bestaande taak. Tweede, ons voorstel 'n einde-tot-einde model vir die taak, die handsaming van die bepaalde mense en ook die hoeferensieverhouding saamstig. Die model uitbreek die state-of-the-art contextualiseerde BERT-voorstellings as 'n enkoder, en is verder verbeter met die sememe kennis van HowNet deur graaf aandagnetwerke. Ons notaeer 'n benchmark dataset vir die taak en dan uitvoer eksperimente daarop. Resultate bevestig dat ons eindelike model effektief en rekenaar is vir die taak. Detaileerde analisie is voorgegee vir kompleks verstaan die nuwe taak en ons voorgestelde model.", 'sq': 'In this paper, we present Chinese lexical fusion recognition, a new task which could be regarded as one kind of coreference recognition.  Së pari, ne futim detyrën në detaj, duke treguar marrëdhëniet me njohjen e korreferencës dhe dallimet nga detyrat ekzistuese. Së dyti, ne propozojmë një model nga fundi në fund për detyrën, trajtimin e përmendimeve si dhe marrëdhëniet koreference së bashku. Modeli shfrytëzon përfaqësimet e BERT-it në kontekst si një kodues dhe përmirësohet më tej me njohurinë e spermës nga HowNet nga rrjetet e vëmendjes grafike. Ne anotojmë manualisht një bazë të dhënash për detyrën dhe pastaj bëjmë eksperimente në të. Rezultatet tregojnë se modeli ynë përfundimtar është efektiv dhe konkurrues për detyrën. Analiza e detajuar ofrohet për të kuptuar plotësisht detyrën e re dhe modelin tonë të propozuar.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք չինական լեքսիկական ֆուզիայի ճանաչումը, նոր խնդիր, որը կարելի է համարվել մի տեսակ կորեֆերանսի ճանաչումը: Նախ և առաջ, մենք մանրամասն ներկայացնում ենք այս խնդիրը, ցույց տալով հարաբերությունը գոյություն ունեցող խնդիրների հետ և տարբերությունները: Second, we propose an end-to-end model for the task, handling mentions as well as coreference relationship jointly.  Մոդելը օգտագործում է վերջին տեխնոլոգիական BER-ի կոնտեքստիալացված ներկայացումները որպես կոդեր, և շարունակում է զարգացվել Հոունետի սերմի գիտելիքներով գրաֆիկի ուշադրության ցանցերով: Մենք ձեռքով նշում ենք այս խնդրի համեմատական տվյալների համակարգը և հետո փորձեր ենք կատարում դրա վրա: Results demonstrate that our final model is effective and competitive for the task.  Պատրաստվում է մանրամասն վերլուծություն, որպեսզի ամբողջովին հասկանանք նոր խնդիրը և մեր առաջարկած մոդելը:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা চীনা লেক্সিক্যাল ফ্যাশন স্বীকৃতি উপস্থাপন করি, একটি নতুন কাজ যা কোরেন্সেন্স স্বীকৃতি হিসেবে বিবেচনা  প্রথমত, আমরা এই কাজটিকে বিস্তারিত ভাবে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেখাচ্ছি, বর্তমান কাজের স্বীকৃতি এবং পার্থক্য দেখাচ্ছি। দ্বিতীয়, আমরা কাজের জন্য শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, মেনে নিয়ে যাচ্ছি এবং সাথে যোগাযোগের সম্পর্ক। এই মডেলটি প্রতিযোগিতায় বিবেরেটের প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে একটি এনকোডার হিসেবে বিস্ফোরণ করে, আর গ্রাফ মনোযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা হ আমরা নিজেদের কাজের জন্য একটি বেঞ্চমার্ক ডাটাসেট ব্যাখ্যা করি এবং তারপর এর উপর পরীক্ষা করি। ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের চূড়ান্ত মডেল কার্যকর এবং প্রতিযোগিতায় কার্যকর। নতুন কাজ এবং আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের জন্য বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে।', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha kutambuliwa kwa uchochezi wa kimapenzi wa China, kazi mpya ambayo inaweza kuchukuliwa kama namna moja ya kutambuliwa maarufu. Kwanza, tunaonyesha jukumu hili kwa kina, kuonyesha uhusiano na kutambua mafanikio na tofauti na kazi zilizopo. Pili, tunapendekeza muundo wa mwisho wa mwisho wa kazi, kutekeleza maneno pamoja na uhusiano wa msingi pamoja. The model exploits the state-of-the-art contextualized BERT representations as an encoder, and is further enhanced with the sememe knowledge from HowNet by graph attention networks.  Tunapata taarifa za bendera kwa manufaa kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo na kisha kutekeleza majaribio hayo. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu wa mwisho una ufanisi na ushindani wa kazi hiyo. Uchambuzi wa kina umetolewa kwa ajili ya kuelewa kwa ujumla wa kazi mpya na modeli yetu inayopendekezwa.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo priznanje kineske leksičke fuzije, novi zadatak koji bi se mogao smatrati jednim vrstom priznanja pristojnosti. Prvo predstavljamo zadatak detaljno, pokazujući vezu sa priznanjem pristojnosti i razlikama od postojećih zadataka. Drugo, predlažemo model kraja do kraja za zadatak, spominjanje spominjanja, kao i zajednički odnos na dobrodušnost. Model iskoristi kontekstualizirane predstave BERT-a kao kodera i dalje se poboljšava sa sememom znanjem iz HowNeta grafičkim mrežama pažnje. Ručno annotiramo rezervni set podataka za zadatak i onda provodimo eksperimente na njemu. Rezultati pokazuju da je naš konačni model efikasan i konkurentan za zadatak. Detaljna analiza se ponudi za sveobuhvatno razumijevanje novog zadatka i našeg predloženog modela.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme čínské lexikální rozpoznávání fúze, nový úkol, který by mohl být považován za jeden druh rozpoznávání koreferencí. Nejprve představíme úlohu detailně, ukazujeme vztah s rozpoznáváním koreferencí a odlišnosti od stávajících úkolů. Za druhé navrhujeme komplexní model pro daný úkol, který společně zpracovává zmínky i vztahy společně. Model využívá nejmodernější kontextualizované BERT reprezentace jako snímač a je dále rozšířen o znalosti sememe z HowNet pomocí grafových pozornostních sítí. Ručně anotujeme referenční datovou sadu pro daný úkol a pak na ní provádíme experimenty. Výsledky ukazují, že náš konečný model je efektivní a konkurenceschopný pro daný úkol. Nabízíme detailní analýzu pro komplexní pochopení nového úkolu a navrženého modelu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame hiina leksikaalse fusion tuvastamist, uut ülesannet, mida võiks pidada ühte liiki koreferenssi tuvastamiseks. Esiteks tutvustame ülesannet üksikasjalikult, näidates seost kaasreferentsi tuvastamisega ja erinevusi olemasolevatest ülesannetest. Teiseks pakume välja ülesande täieliku mudeli, käsitledes nimetusi ja kaasviidet ühiselt. Mudel kasutab kaasaegseid kontekstualiseeritud BERT esitusi kodeerijana ja seda täiendavad HowNeti sememe teadmised graafilise tähelepanu võrgustikud. Me märgistame käsitsi ülesande võrdlusandmekogumi ja seejärel teeme sellega katseid. Tulemused näitavad, et meie lõplik mudel on selle ülesande täitmiseks tõhus ja konkurentsivõimeline. Pakutakse üksikasjalikku analüüsi uue ülesande ja meie pakutud mudeli põhjalikuks mõistmiseks.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa esittelemme kiinalaisen sanaston fuusion tunnistamista, uutta tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､, jota voitaisiin pitﾃ､ﾃ､ erﾃ､ﾃ､nlaisena yhteisferenssin tunnistamisena. Ensin esittelemme tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n yksityiskohtaisesti, mikﾃ､ on suhde yhteisferenssin tunnistamiseen ja eroavuudet olemassa oleviin tehtﾃ､viin. Toiseksi ehdotamme tehtﾃ､vﾃ､lle end-to-end-mallia, jossa kﾃ､sitellﾃ､ﾃ､n mainintoja ja yhteissuhdetta yhdessﾃ､. Malli hyﾃｶdyntﾃ､ﾃ､ viimeisintﾃ､ tekniikkaa kontekstualisoituja BERT-esityksiﾃ､ koodaajana, ja sitﾃ､ tﾃ､ydennetﾃ､ﾃ､n HowNetin sememe-tiedolla graafisten huomioverkostojen avulla. Annotoimme manuaalisesti vertailuaineiston tehtﾃ､vﾃ､lle ja teemme sen jﾃ､lkeen kokeita. Tulokset osoittavat, ettﾃ､ lopullinen mallimme on tehokas ja kilpailukykyinen tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n. Tarjolla on yksityiskohtainen analyysi uuden tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n ja ehdotetun mallin kokonaisvaltaiseksi ymmﾃ､rtﾃ､miseksi.', 'ca': "In this paper, we present Chinese lexical fusion recognition, a new task which could be regarded as one kind of coreference recognition.  First, we introduce the task in detail, showing the relationship with coreference recognition and differences from the existing tasks.  Segon, proposem un model de final a final per a la tasca, gestionar les mencions i la relació de coreferença conjuntament. El model explota les representacions BERT contextualitzades de l'última generació com a codificador, i es millora més amb el coneixement del semen de HowNet a través de xarxes d'atenció gràfica. Anotem manualment un conjunt de dades de referència per a la tasca i després fem experiments. Els resultats demostren que el nostre model final és eficaç i competitiu per a la tasca. Es ofereix una anàlisi detallada per entendre comprensivament la nova tasca i el nostre model proposat.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቻይና ሌክሲካዊ ውጤት ማውቀትን እናቀርባታለን፣ አንድ ዓይነት የፍሬት ማውቀት የሚመስል አዲስ ስራ ነው፡፡ First, we introduce the task in detail, showing the relationship with coreference recognition and differences from the existing tasks.  Second, we propose an end-to-end model for the task, handling mentions as well as coreference relationship jointly.  ምሳሌው የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት BERT መልዕክቶችን እንደ የኮድ ሆኗል፣ የሆwNet የsememe እውቀት በተጨማሪው በgraph ተጠቃሚዎች መረብ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ ለስራው የመረጃ ዳታዎችን በእጃችን እናሳውቃለን እናም ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ የኋለኛይቱ ምሳሌ ለስራው ጥቅም እና ትጋት እንዲሆን ያሳያል፡፡ የአዲሱን ስራ እና በተፈቃደላችን ሞዴል ለማስተዋል የተረዘዘዘ ትርጉም ነው፡፡', 'az': "Bu kağızda, biz Çin dilində fəsanın tanımasını göstərdik, yeni bir işi bir cür təsirlik tanıması olar. İlk dəfə, biz bu işi detaylı təşkil edirik, mövcuddur işlərdən müxtəlif tanıma və fərqlərlə ilişkiləri göstəririk. İkincisi, bu işin sonu-sonu modelini təbliğ edirik, sözləri və mərhəmətli əlaqələri birlikdə istifadə edirik. Model, sanat müxtəlif BERT göstəricilərini kodlayıcı olaraq istifadə edir və HowNet'dən gönüllü məlumatları ilə daha da art ırar. Biz bu iş üçün bir benchmark veri quruluşu əlində bildiririk və sonra on a təcrübə edirik. Sonuçlarımız son modeliyimiz iş üçün effektiv və müəllif olduğunu göstərir. Detaylı analizi yeni işi və təklif etdiyimiz modeliyi tamamlamaq üçün təklif edilir.", 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã gaurar da sunan fushi na Leksika na China, wani aikin da za'a iya gane shi kamar wata na'anar tamkar karata. Kayyan da, za mu fara aikin da rarrabe, a nuna mazaunin da na gane kwamfyuta da sãɓãni daga aikin da ke jira. Na ƙarshe, za'a goyyade wata misali ta ƙara zuwa-ƙari wa aikin, yin aiki da rabo-abun da sami da danganci na daidaita. @ info: whatsthis Suna karatun takardan littãfin da hannuwansa zuwa aikin, sa'an nan kuma Mu sami jarrabãwa a kansa. Matamakon sun nuna cewa misalinmu na ƙarami yana mai amfani da mai gaura ga aikin. Ana motsa Ana bayyana shi dõmin a iya fahimta aiki na yanzu da misalinmu wanda aka buƙata.", 'jv': 'Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé éneng pisan kelas saiki nggawe gerapakan karo perusahaan anyar, nik awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe ngupakan ngerasakno Awak dhéwé, nggunakake nggawe lan akeh lan luwih-luwih, iso nggawe barang karo nggawe gerakan karo nggawe gerakan sing wis ana. Siji-wis, kita supoyo model end-to-end kanggo nggawe task, njaluk-njaluk bahsa ngono corefer dialog Model kuwi nggunakake stêt-karo contextual BERT repréntasi ingkang koder, lan dadi wis luwih apik lan kabèh lanjut sememu sing diputasane sakjane perusahaan seneng operasi sistem sing di kowé nggawe netwisan warisan Report translation bugs to <\\.\\.\\.> Pametuné maneh sawetara dadi model anyar tentang ing pejalaké lan tambah njaluk kanggo nggawe gerakan. Detays arahilé sing nyimpen kanggo ngerasakno akeh luwih nggawe task sing dibutuhke lan model sing nyimpen.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo prepoznavanje kitajske leksikalne fuzije, novo nalogo, ki bi jo lahko obravnavali kot eno vrsto prepoznavanja koreference. Najprej podrobno predstavimo nalogo, prikazujemo povezavo s prepoznavanjem koreference in razlike od obstoječih nalog. Drugič, predlagamo model od konca do konca za nalogo, ki skupaj obravnava omembe in povezovanje. Model izkorišča najsodobnejše kontekstualizirane BERT reprezentacije kot kodirnik in je dodatno izboljšan s sememe znanjem HowNet s pomočjo grafskih pozornosti mrež. Ročno označimo referenčni nabor podatkov za opravilo in nato opravimo poskuse na njem. Rezultati kažejo, da je naš končni model učinkovit in konkurenčen za nalogo. Ponujamo podrobno analizo za celovito razumevanje nove naloge in našega predlaganega modela.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים זיהוי התמזגות הלקסית סינית, משימה חדשה שיכולה להיחשב כסוג אחד של זיהוי התאמה. ראשית, אנו מציגים את המשימה בפרטים, מראים את מערכת היחסים עם זיהוי הכוונה וההבדלים מהמשימות הקיומות. שנית, אנחנו מציעים מודל סוף-סוף למשימה, לטפל בזכרונות וגם מערכת יחסים ביחד. המודל מנצל את היציגות BERT המתוקפות ביותר בתור קודם, והוא משתפר יותר עם ידע הזרע מהאוונט על ידי רשתות תשומת לב גראפ. אנו מציינים באופן ידני קבוצת מידע רמז למשימה ואז מבצעים ניסויים עליה. תוצאות מראות שהמודל הסופי שלנו יעיל ותחרות למשימה. ניתוח מפורט מוצע כדי להבין באופן מלא את המשימה החדשה והמודל המוצע שלנו.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ལུས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་དྲན་སྤེལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན་སྐྱེས་ཚ དང་པོ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་བྱ་བ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་རྐྱེན་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད། གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་བ་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་སྤྲོད་དགོས། Model uses the state-of-the-art contextualized BERT representations as an encoder, and is further enhanced with the sememe knowledge from HowNet by graph attention networks. འུ་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་ལག་སྟར་བཀོད་པའི་བརྗོད་ཆེན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཅིག་སྟོན་བྱེད་དགོས། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཅིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནི་སྒྲུབ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་མིན་པར། གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསར་བ་དང་གི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པ་གིས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་སྔ'}
{'en': 'Comparison by Conversion : Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'ar': 'المقارنة عن طريق التحويل: عكس الهندسة UCCA من النحو والمعجم الدلالات', 'pt': 'Comparação por conversão: UCCA de engenharia reversa a partir de sintaxe e semântica léxica', 'fr': 'Comparaison par conversion\xa0: rétro-ingénierie UCCA à partir de la syntaxe et de la sémantique lexicale', 'es': 'Comparación por conversión: UCCA de ingeniería inversa a partir de la semántica sintáctica y léxica', 'ja': '変換による比較:構文および語彙セマンティクスからのリバースエンジニアリングUCCA', 'hi': 'रूपांतरण द्वारा तुलना: रिवर्स इंजीनियरिंग UCCA वाक्यविन्यास और लेक्सिकल शब्दार्थ से', 'zh': '转换较之,逆于语法词法语义UCCA', 'ru': 'Сравнение по преобразованию: обратное проектирование UCCA из синтаксиса и лексической семантики', 'ga': 'Comparáid Trí Tiontú: UCCA Cúl-innealtóireacht ó Chomhréir agus Séimeantaic Lexical', 'ka': 'შემდგომარება შემდგომარება: სინტაქსი და ლექსიკალური სემენტიკის შემდგომარება', 'el': 'Σύγκριση ανά μετατροπή: Αντίστροφη Μηχανική από τη Συντακτική και Λεξική Σημασία', 'hu': 'Összehasonlítás konverzióval: Reverse-Engineering UCCA szintaxisból és lexikai szemantikából', 'it': 'Confronto per conversione: Reverse-Engineering UCCA da sintassi e semantica lessicale', 'kk': 'Түрлендіру бойынша салыстыру: Синтаксис және лексикалық семантикалық түрлі инженериялық UCCA', 'lt': 'Palyginimas pagal konversiją: atvirkštinės inžinerijos UCCA iš sintaksų ir leksinių Semantikų', 'mk': 'Порачување според конверзија: Вратен инженерски УККА од синтаксична и лексикална семантика', 'ms': 'Comparison by Conversion: Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'mn': 'Өөрчлөлтийн харьцуулалт: Синтаксис болон Лексик Semantics', 'no': 'Samanlikning etter konvertering: Reverse-Engineering UCCA frå syntaks og leksisk semiantikk', 'ml': 'പതിപ്പില്\u200d നിന്നും ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്സിക്സില്\u200d നിന്നും തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'Tqabbil skont il-Konverżjoni: UCCA ta’ inġinerija inversa minn Semanti Sintetiċi u Lessiċi', 'pl': 'Porównanie według konwersji: Inżynieria odwrotna UCCA z Semantyki Syntax i Lexical', 'sr': 'Upoređenje konverzijom: Reverse-Engineering UCCA iz sintaksa i leksičkih semantika', 'si': 'වාර්තාවෙන් සම්පූර්ණය: වාර්තාව සහ ලෙක්සිකාල් සෙමැන්ටික්ස් වලින් වාර්තාවෙන් වෙනස් ඉං', 'so': 'Isbarbardhig qoraalka: Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'ro': 'Comparație prin conversie: Reverse-Engineering UCCA din Sintaxă și Semantică Lexicală', 'sv': 'Jämförelse med omvandling: Omvänd teknik UCCA från syntax och lexisk semantik', 'ta': 'மாற்றுதலால் ஒப்பிடு', 'ur': 'تبدیل کے مطابق مقایسہ: سینٹکس اور لکسیسی سیمانٹیکس سے Reverse-Engineering UCCA', 'uz': 'Comparison by Conversion: Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'vi': 'So sánh qua đối thoại: đảo ngược về kỹ thuật âm thanh từ Syntax and Lexicon Semantics', 'bg': 'Сравнение по преобразуване: Обратно инженерство от Синтаксис и Лексикална Семантика', 'nl': 'Vergelijking op conversie: Reverse-Engineering UCCA uit syntaxis en Lexical Semantics', 'hr': 'Uspoređenje konverzijom: Reverse-Engineering UCCA iz sintaksa i leksičkih semantika', 'da': 'Sammenligning efter konvertering: Reverse-Engineering UCCA fra syntaks og Lexical Semantics', 'id': 'Comparison by Conversion: Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'ko': '변환을 통한 비교: 구문과 어휘 의미의 역방향 프로젝트 UCCA', 'fa': 'Comparison by Conversion: Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'de': 'Vergleich nach Konvertierung: Reverse-Engineering UCCA aus Syntax und Lexical Semantics', 'sw': 'Unganganishwa na Mabadiliko: UCCA ya Kurejea UCCA kutoka Syntax na Semantics za Lexico', 'af': 'Vergelyking deur omskakeling: Omgekeerde- Engineering UCCA van Sintaks en Leksiese Semantieke', 'sq': 'Krahasimi nga Konversioni: UCCA Reverse-Engineering nga Sintaksi dhe Semantika Lexike', 'tr': 'Dönüştürme tarafından karşılaştırıldı: Sintaks ve Leksik Semantiklerden Ters-Mühendislik UCCA', 'hy': 'Համեմատությունը համեմատությամբ. հակառակ ինժեներական UCCA-ը սինտաքսից և լեքսիկական սեմանտիկայից', 'am': 'Conversion: Reverse-engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'az': 'Dönüşünün qarşılaşdırılması: Sintaks və Leksik Semantik tərəfindən dönüş-inženjeri UCCA', 'bn': 'সংস্করণের তুলনা', 'ca': 'Comparació per Conversion: Reverse-Engineering UCCA de Syntax and Lexical Semantics', 'cs': 'Porovnání podle konverze: Reverzní inženýrství UCCA ze syntaxe a Lexické sémantiky', 'bs': 'Upoređenje konverzijom: Reverse-Engineering UCCA iz sintaksa i leksičkih semantika', 'et': 'Võrdlus konversiooni järgi: pöördtehnika UCCA süntaksist ja leksiilsest semantikast', 'fi': 'Vertailu muunnoksen mukaan: Käänteinen tekniikka UCCA Syntaksista ja Lexical Semantiikasta', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Primerjava po pretvorbi: Reverse-Engineering UCCA iz Sintakse in Lexical Semantics', 'jv': 'Ngubah Karo Ngubah: Gupakan-Ingenisi Ucah Sentraksi lan Leksial semanti', 'he': 'השוואה על ידי שינוי: UCCA ההנדסה ההפוך מסינטקס וסמנטיקה לקסית', 'bo': 'Comparison by Conversion: Reverse-Engineering UCCA from Syntax and Lexical Semantics'}
{'en': 'Building robust natural language understanding systems will require a clear characterization of whether and how various linguistic meaning representations complement each other. To perform a systematic comparative analysis, we evaluate the mapping between meaning representations from different frameworks using two complementary methods : (i) a rule-based converter, and (ii) a supervised delexicalized parser that parses to one framework using only information from the other as features. We apply these methods to convert the STREUSLE corpus (with syntactic and lexical semantic annotations) to UCCA (a graph-structured full-sentence meaning representation). Both methods yield surprisingly accurate target representations, close to fully supervised UCCA parser qualityindicating that UCCA annotations are partially redundant with STREUSLE annotations. Despite this substantial convergence between frameworks, we find several important areas of divergence.', 'es': 'La construcción de sistemas sólidos de comprensión del lenguaje natural requerirá una clara caracterización de si las diversas representaciones de significados lingüísticos se complementan entre sí y de qué manera. Para realizar un análisis comparativo sistemático, evaluamos el mapeo entre las representaciones de significado de diferentes marcos utilizando dos métodos complementarios: (i) un convertidor basado en reglas y (ii) un analizador delexicalizado supervisado que analiza un marco utilizando solo la información del otro como características. Aplicamos estos métodos para convertir el corpus STREUSLE (con anotaciones semánticas sintácticas y léxicas) en UCCA (una representación de significado de oración completa estructurada en gráficos). Ambos métodos producen representaciones de objetivos sorprendentemente precisas, cercanas a la calidad del analizador UCCA totalmente supervisado, lo que indica que las anotaciones UCCA son parcialmente redundantes con las anotaciones STREUSLE. A pesar de esta convergencia sustancial entre marcos, encontramos varias áreas importantes de divergencia.', 'ar': 'سيتطلب بناء أنظمة قوية لفهم اللغة الطبيعية توصيفًا واضحًا لما إذا كانت تمثيلات المعاني اللغوية المختلفة تكمل بعضها البعض وكيف تتكامل. لإجراء تحليل مقارن منهجي ، نقوم بتقييم التعيين بين تمثيلات المعنى من أطر عمل مختلفة باستخدام طريقتين تكميليتين: (1) المحول القائم على القواعد ، و (2) المحلل اللغوي الخاضع للإشراف الذي يوزع إلى إطار واحد باستخدام المعلومات من الآخر فقط كميزات. نحن نطبق هذه الطرق لتحويل مجموعة STREUSLE (مع التعليقات التوضيحية الدلالية النحوية والمعجمية) إلى UCCA (تمثيل المعنى الكامل للجمل المبني على الرسم البياني). تقدم كلتا الطريقتين تمثيلات مستهدفة دقيقة بشكل مدهش ، قريبة من جودة محلل UCCA الخاضع للإشراف بالكامل - مما يشير إلى أن التعليقات التوضيحية لـ UCCA زائدة جزئيًا مع التعليقات التوضيحية STREUSLE. على الرغم من هذا التقارب الكبير بين الأطر ، نجد العديد من مجالات الاختلاف المهمة.', 'fr': "La mise en place de systèmes robustes de compréhension du langage naturel nécessitera une caractérisation claire de la complémentarité entre les différentes représentations de signification linguistique et de quelle manière. Pour effectuer une analyse comparative systématique, nous évaluons la correspondance entre les représentations de signification de différents cadres à l'aide de deux méthodes complémentaires\xa0: (i) un convertisseur basé sur des règles, et (ii) un analyseur délexicalisé supervisé qui analyse un framework en utilisant uniquement les informations de l'autre comme caractéristiques. Nous appliquons ces méthodes pour convertir le corpus STREUSLE (avec des annotations sémantiques syntaxiques et lexicales) en UCCA (représentation de sens de phrase complète structurée par un graphe). Les deux méthodes produisent des représentations cibles étonnamment précises, proches de la qualité de l'analyseur UCCA entièrement supervisé, ce qui indique que les annotations UCCA sont partiellement redondantes avec les annotations STREUSLE. Malgré cette convergence substantielle entre les cadres, nous trouvons plusieurs points de divergence importants.", 'pt': 'Construir sistemas robustos de compreensão de linguagem natural exigirá uma caracterização clara de se e como várias representações de significado linguístico se complementam. Para realizar uma análise comparativa sistemática, avaliamos o mapeamento entre representações de significado de diferentes frameworks usando dois métodos complementares: (i) um conversor baseado em regras e (ii) um analisador deslexicalizado supervisionado que analisa para um framework usando apenas informações do outro como características. Aplicamos esses métodos para converter o corpus STREUSLE (com anotações semânticas sintáticas e lexicais) para UCCA (uma representação de significado de sentença completa estruturada em grafo). Ambos os métodos produzem representações de destino surpreendentemente precisas, próximas da qualidade do analisador UCCA totalmente supervisionado, indicando que as anotações UCCA são parcialmente redundantes com as anotações STREUSLE. Apesar dessa convergência substancial entre os frameworks, encontramos várias áreas importantes de divergência.', 'ja': '堅牢な自然言語理解システムを構築するには、さまざまな言語的意味表現が互いに補完するかどうか、どのように補完するかを明確に特徴付ける必要がある。系統的な比較分析を実行するために、我々は、（ ｉ ）ルールベースの変換器、および（ ｉ ｉ ）他のフレームワークからの情報のみを特徴として使用して、一方のフレームワークを解析する監視された非フレキシカル化された構文解析器という２つの相補的な方法を使用して、異なるフレームワークからの意味表現間のマッピングを評価する。これらの方法を応用して、STREUSLEコーパス（構文および語彙セマンティック注釈付き）をUCCA （グラフ構造の全文意味表現）に変換します。両方の方法は、完全に監視されたUCCAパーサーの品質に近い、驚くほど正確なターゲット表現を生み出します。これは、UCCAアノテーションがSTREUSLEアノテーションと部分的に冗長であることを示しています。フレームワーク間のこの実質的な収束にもかかわらず、私たちはいくつかの重要な分岐点を見つけます。', 'zh': '构强自然语言解统须明表诸语言意义及相补否。 以两互补之法评之框架映射:(i)法之转换器,与(ii)监督式deexicalized解析器,解析器用一框架之信以为解析框架。 以此STREUSLE语料库(带句法、词汇语义注)转为UCCA(图结构之句示)。 此二者皆可以惊准,近监UCCA解析器,明UCCA注STREUSLE注冗余也。 虽框架有实质性之趋同,见异域之要害者数人。', 'hi': 'मजबूत प्राकृतिक भाषा समझने वाली प्रणालियों के निर्माण के लिए एक स्पष्ट लक्षण वर्णन की आवश्यकता होगी कि क्या और कैसे विभिन्न भाषाई अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व एक-दूसरे के पूरक हैं। एक व्यवस्थित तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण करने के लिए, हम दो पूरक विधियों का उपयोग करके विभिन्न ढांचे से अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के बीच मानचित्रण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: (i) एक नियम-आधारित कनवर्टर, और (ii) एक पर्यवेक्षित delexicalized पार्सर जो सुविधाओं के रूप में दूसरे से केवल जानकारी का उपयोग करके एक ढांचे को पार्स करता है। हम इन विधियों को STREUSLE कॉर्पस (वाक्यात्मक और लेक्सिकल सिमेंटिक एनोटेशन के साथ) को यूसीसीए (एक ग्राफ-संरचित पूर्ण-वाक्य अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व) में परिवर्तित करने के लिए लागू करते हैं। दोनों विधियों में आश्चर्यजनक रूप से सटीक लक्ष्य प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त होता है, जो पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित यूसीसीए पार्सर गुणवत्ता के करीब होता है- यह दर्शाता है कि यूसीसीए एनोटेशन आंशिक रूप से STREUSLE एनोटेशन के साथ अनावश्यक हैं। ढांचे के बीच इस पर्याप्त अभिसरण के बावजूद, हम विचलन के कई महत्वपूर्ण क्षेत्रों को पाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Построение надежных систем понимания естественного языка потребует четкой характеристики того, дополняют ли друг друга различные языковые представления. Для выполнения систематического сравнительного анализа мы оцениваем отображение между смысловыми представлениями из разных фреймворков с использованием двух взаимодополняющих методов: (i) преобразователя, основанного на правилах, и (ii) контролируемого делексикализованного анализатора, который анализирует одну фреймворк, используя только информацию из другой в качестве признаков. Применяем эти методы для преобразования корпуса STREUSLE (с синтаксическими и лексическими семантическими аннотациями) в UCCA (графоструктурированное полноценное представление смысла). Оба метода дают удивительно точные целевые представления, близкие к полностью контролируемому качеству парсера UCCA, что указывает на то, что аннотации UCCA частично избыточны с аннотациями STREUSLE. Несмотря на эту значительную конвергенцию между рамками, мы находим несколько важных областей расхождений.', 'ga': 'Chun córais láidre nádúrtha tuisceana ar an teanga a thógáil, beidh gá le tréithriú soiléir ar cé acu an gcomhlánaíonn agus conas a chomhlánaíonn léiriúcháin éagsúla brí teangeolaíochta a chéile. Chun anailís chórasach chomparáideach a dhéanamh, déanaimid meastóireacht ar an léarscáiliú idir léiriúcháin brí ó chreataí éagsúla ag baint úsáide as dhá mhodh chomhlántacha: (i) tiontaire bunaithe ar rialacha, agus (ii) parsálaí díleicsiceoithe maoirsithe a pharsálann go dtí creat amháin agus úsáid á baint as faisnéis ón gceann eile amháin. mar ghnéithe. Cuirimid na modhanna seo i bhfeidhm chun corpas STREUSLE (le nótaí comhréire agus foclóireachta) a thiontú go UCCA (léiriú brí abairtí iomlán struchtúrtha le graf). Tugann an dá mhodh léiriúcháin sprice iontach cruinn, gar do cháilíocht parsálaí UCCA atá faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán – rud a thugann le fios go bhfuil cuid de na nótaí UCCA iomarcach agus nótaí STREUSLE. In ainneoin an chóineasaithe shubstaintiúil seo idir creataí, aimsímid go leor réimsí tábhachtacha éagsúlachta.', 'ka': 'სისტემის ძალიან ძალიან ნაირადი ენერგიის განსხვავების შექმნა დაუჭირდება განსაკუთრებული სისტემის განსხვავება თუ არა და თუ როგორ განსხვავებული ენერგიოსტიკური ნიშნა სისტემატიკური კომპლიენტიური ანალიზაციის გავაკეთოთ, ჩვენ განსხვავებული ფემპლიენტიური განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებას გამოყენებული ორი კომპლიენტიური მეტოვების გამოყენება: i) კომპლიენტიური განსაზღვრებელი, და ii) დავაკეთებული ჩვენ ამ მეტოვების გამოყენება, რომ STREUSLE corpus (სინტაქტიური და ლექსიკალური სიმენტიური ანოტაციებით) გადაწყენოთ UCCA ორივე მეტოვები გამოვიყენება საშუალოდ მარტივი მისაღების გამოსახულება, რომელიც უფრო დანახულებული UCCA პანუზერის გასახულებლად დაახლოებით, რომ UCCA ანოტაციები ნაწილად სრულს ანოტაციები მაგრამ ეს მნიშვნელოვანი კონგერგენცია შორის შორის, ჩვენ ვიპოვეთ რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავება.', 'el': 'Η οικοδόμηση ισχυρών συστημάτων κατανόησης της φυσικής γλώσσας θα απαιτήσει έναν σαφή χαρακτηρισμό του κατά πόσον και πώς οι διάφορες γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις σημαίνουν αλληλοσυμπληρώνονται. Για να εκτελέσουμε μια συστηματική συγκριτική ανάλυση, αξιολογούμε τη χαρτογράφηση μεταξύ συμβολικών αναπαραστάσεων από διαφορετικά πλαίσια χρησιμοποιώντας δύο συμπληρωματικές μεθόδους: (i) έναν μετατροπέα βασισμένο σε κανόνες, και (ii) έναν εποπτευμένο επεξεργαστή που αναλύει σε ένα πλαίσιο χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο πληροφορίες από το άλλο ως χαρακτηριστικά. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτές τις μεθόδους για να μετατρέψουμε το σώμα (με συντακτικές και λεξικές σημασιολογικές σημειώσεις) σε μια αναπαράσταση πλήρους φράσης με δομή γραφής. Και οι δύο μέθοδοι αποδίδουν εκπληκτικά ακριβείς αναπαραστάσεις στόχων, κοντά στην πλήρως εποπτευόμενη ποιότητα ανάλυσης υποδεικνύοντας ότι οι σχολιασμοί είναι μερικώς περιττές με σχολιασμούς STREUSLE. Παρά τη σημαντική αυτή σύγκλιση μεταξύ των πλαισίων, διαπιστώνουμε αρκετούς σημαντικούς τομείς αποκλίσεων.', 'hu': 'Robusztus természetes nyelvértési rendszerek kialakításához egyértelmű jellemzésre van szükség arra, hogy a különböző nyelvi jelentéseket ábrázoló reprezentációk kiegészítik-e egymást. Szisztematikus összehasonlító elemzés elvégzéséhez két kiegészítő módszer segítségével értékeljük a különböző keretrendszerekből származó jelentésreformációk leképezését: (i) egy szabályalapú konvertáló, és (ii) egy felügyelt delexikalizált elemző, amely az egyik keretrendszerbe csak a másikból származó információkat használja funkcióként. Ezeket a módszereket alkalmazzuk a STREUSLE korpuszt (szintaktikus és lexikai szemantikai jegyzetekkel) UCCA-vá (gráf-strukturált teljes mondat jelentésének ábrázolására). Mindkét módszer meglepően pontos célreprezentációt eredményez, közel a teljes mértékben felügyelt UCCA elemző minőségéhez, ami azt jelzi, hogy az UCCA jegyzetek részben redundánsak a STREUSLE jegyzetekkel. A keretek közötti jelentős konvergencia ellenére számos fontos eltérési területet találunk.', 'it': "Costruire robusti sistemi di comprensione del linguaggio naturale richiederà una chiara caratterizzazione di se e come le varie rappresentazioni di significato linguistico si completano a vicenda. Per eseguire un'analisi comparativa sistematica, valutiamo la mappatura tra rappresentazioni di significato da diversi framework utilizzando due metodi complementari: (i) un convertitore basato su regole, e (ii) un parser delessicalizzato supervisionato che analizza in un framework usando solo informazioni dall'altro come caratteristiche. Applichiamo questi metodi per convertire il corpus STREUSLE (con annotazioni semantiche sintattiche e lessicali) in UCCA (rappresentazione del significato di frase intera strutturata in grafico). Entrambi i metodi forniscono rappresentazioni target sorprendentemente accurate, vicino alla qualità del parser UCCA completamente supervisionata, indicando che le annotazioni UCCA sono parzialmente ridondanti con annotazioni STREUSLE. Nonostante questa sostanziale convergenza tra i quadri, troviamo diversi importanti settori di divergenza.", 'ms': 'Membangun sistem pemahaman bahasa alam yang kuat akan memerlukan keterangan jelas sama ada dan bagaimana pelbagai perwakilan makna bahasa saling kumpulkan. Untuk melakukan analisis perbandingan sistemik, kami menilai pemetaan diantara perwakilan makna dari bingkai berbeza menggunakan dua kaedah komplementari: (i) penyukar berdasarkan peraturan, dan (ii) penghurai yang diawasi yang dihurai ke satu bingkai menggunakan hanya maklumat dari yang lain sebagai ciri-ciri. Kami gunakan kaedah ini untuk tukar corpus STREUSLE (dengan anotasi semantik sintaktik dan leksikal) ke UCCA (representation kalimat penuh struktur graf). Kedua-dua kaedah memberikan perwakilan sasaran yang sangat tepat, hampir mengawasi kualiti penghurai UCCA yang menunjukkan bahawa anotasi UCCA sebahagian-sebahagian berlebihan dengan anotasi STREUSLE. Walaupun konvergensi yang besar antara bingkai ini, kita mendapati beberapa kawasan penting perbezaan.', 'kk': 'Түпті тілді түсіндіру жүйелерін құру үшін әртүрлі лингвистикалық мәліметтердің бір-біріне қандай түсіндіру керек болады. Жүйелікті салыстырмалы анализ істеу үшін, біз түрлі фреймкерлердің түрлі түрлі түрлі мәліметтері арасындағы картасын екі қосымша тәсілдерді қолданып: i) ережелердің негіздеген конвертері және ii) бір фреймкерлерге тек мәліметті қолдану Біз бұл әдістерді STREUSLE корпус (синтактикалық және лексикалық семантикалық жазбалармен) UCCA (графикалық құрылған толық сөйлеменің мәліметі). Екі әдістер әдістері кейінгі нақты мәліметтерді таңдайды, UCCA талдаушының сапасы жақында, UCCA жазбалары STREUSLE жазбалармен бөлек қалмайды деп белгілейді. Фреймердің арасындағы көп конвергенциясы қарай, біз бірнеше маңызды бөліктерді табуыз.', 'mk': 'Создавањето на силни системи за разбирање на природниот јазик ќе бара јасна карактеризација на тоа дали и како различните јазички значења се комплиментираат меѓусебно. За да спроведеме систематска споредлива анализа, ние ја проценуваме мапата помеѓу значењето на претставувањата од различни рамки користејќи два комплементарни методи: (i) конвертер базиран на правила, и (ii) надгледуван делексикализиран анализатор кој се анализира во една рамка користејќи само информации од другите како карактери Ги применуваме овие методи за претворање на стрЕУСЛЕ корпусот (со синтактички и лексикални семантични анотации) во УККА (графска структура на целосна реченица што значи претставување). Двајцата методи даваат изненадувачки точни претставувања на целта, блиску до целосно надгледуван квалитет на апараторот на УККА, што индицира дека анатациите на УККА се делумно претерани со анатациите на STREUSLE. И покрај оваа значајна конвергенција помеѓу рамките, најдовме неколку важни области на разлика.', 'lt': 'Siekiant sukurti tvirtas gamtinių kalbų supratimo sistemas reikės aiškiai apibūdinti, ar ir kaip įvairios kalbinės reikšmės atstovybės viena kitą papildo. Siekdami atlikti sistemingą lyginamąją analizę, vertiname skirtingų sistemų reikšmių atspindimų žemėlapius naudojant du papildomus metodus: i) taisyklių pagrindu grindžiamą konverterį ir ii) priži ūrimą deleksilizuotą analizatorių, kuris analizuoja į vieną sistemą, naudojant tik informaciją iš kitos kaip charakteristikas. Taikome šiuos metodus, kad STREUSLE korpus (su sintaktinėmis ir leksinėmis semantinėmis anotacijomis) būtų konvertuotas į UCCA (grafiniu būdu sukurtas viso sakinio atstovavimas). Abu metodai sukuria stebuklingai tikslius tikslinius rodiklius, kurie beveik visiškai prižiūrimi UCCA analizatoriaus kokybės rodikliai rodo, kad UCCA annotacijos iš dalies yra nereikalingos su STREUSLE annotacijomis. Despite this substantial convergence between frameworks, we find several important areas of divergence.', 'mt': 'Il-bini ta’ sistemi ta’ fehim tal-lingwi naturali b’saħħithom se jeħtieġ karatterizzazzjoni ċara ta’ jekk u kif diversi rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tifsira lingwistika jikkumplimentawx lil xulxin. Biex twettaq analiżi komparattiva sistematika, a ħna nivvalutaw l-immappjar bejn rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tifsira minn oqfsa differenti bl-użu ta’ żewġ metodi kumplimentari: (i) konvertitur ibbażat fuq ir-regoli, u (ii) analizzatur delessializzat superviż li janalizza għal qafas wieħed bl-użu biss ta’ informazzjoni mill-ieħor bħala karatteristiċi. Aħna napplikaw dawn il-metodi biex il-korpus STREUSLE (b’annotazzjonijiet semantiċi sintetiċi u lexiċi) jiġi kkonvertit f’UCCA (rappreżentazzjoni strutturata b’grafika b’sentenza sħiħa li tfisser). Iż-żewġ metodi jagħtu rappreżentazzjonijiet fil-mira preċiżi b’mod sorprendenti, qrib il-kwalità tal-analizzatur tal-UCCA sorveljata bis-sħiħ li jindikaw li l-annotazzjonijiet tal-UCCA huma parzjalment żejda bl-annotazzjonijiet STREUSLE. Minkejja din il-konverġenza sostanzjali bejn l-oqfsa, isibu diversi oqsma importanti ta’ diverġenza.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയിലെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വ്യക്തമായ ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ ആവശ്യമുണ്ട ഒരു സിസ്റ്റീമിക്ക് തുല്യമായ പരിശോധന നടത്താന്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള മാപ്പിന്റ് നമ്മള്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണര സ്റ്റ്രെയുസ്ലെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ (സിന്റാക്ടിക്കും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കക്കുറിപ്പുകളുമായി) യുസികായിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്ന ഈ രീതികള രണ്ട് രീതികളും അത്ഭുതകരമായി ലക്ഷ്യം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട UCCA പരിഗണിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതിന് അടുത്ത് യുസിക്കി അ ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ഈ പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d സംഭവിച്ചാലും, വ്യത്യാസപ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл ойлголтын системийг бүтээх нь хэл хэлний утгыг хэрхэн холбоотой эсвэл хэрхэн холбоотой талаар тодорхойлж чадна. Систематикийн харьцуулалтын шинжилгээ хийхэд бид өөр хэлбэрээс харьцуулагддаг төрлийн зураг хоёр дамжуулалтын аргыг ашиглаж: i) дүрмийн үндсэн шинжилгээгч, мөн ii) нэг хэлбэрээр хуваалцаж, нэг хэлбэрээр зөвхөн нөгөө хэлбэрээс мэдээлл Бид STREUSLE корпус (синтактик, лексикийн зэрэгцээтэй) UCCA-д (график бүтээгдэхүүнтэй бүрэн өгүүлбэртэй илэрхийлэл) шилжүүлэх аргыг ашиглаж байна. Хоёр арга нь гайхалтай тодорхой загварын үзүүлэлтийг өгдөг. УККА хуваарч чанарын ойролцоогоор, УККА загварын үзүүлэлтийг STREUSLE хэлэлцээгээр бага зэрэг дутагдаж байгааг харуулж байна. Фреймерийн хоорондын маш чухал холбоотой холбоотой ч бид олон чухал хэсгүүдийг олж мэднэ.', 'ro': 'Construirea unor sisteme robuste de înțelegere a limbilor naturale va necesita o caracterizare clară a modului în care diferitele reprezentări lingvistice se completează reciproc. Pentru a efectua o analiză comparativă sistematică, evaluăm maparea între reprezentările semnificației din diferite cadre folosind două metode complementare: (i) un convertor bazat pe reguli și (ii) un parser delexicalizat supravegheat care analizează la un cadru folosind doar informații de la celălalt ca caracteristici. Aplicăm aceste metode pentru a converti corpusul STREUSLE (cu adnotări semantice sintactice și lexicale) în UCCA (o reprezentare grafică structurată a înțelesului întregii propoziții). Ambele metode oferă reprezentări surprinzător de precise ale țintei, aproape de calitatea analizorului UCCA supravegheat complet, indicând faptul că adnotările UCCA sunt parțial redundante cu adnotări STREUSLE. În ciuda acestei convergențe substanțiale între cadre, găsim câteva domenii importante de divergență.', 'no': 'Bygging av robust naturleg forståking av språk vil kreve ein klar karakterisering av om og korleis ulike språkstiske betydningar kompliserer kvarandre. For å utføra eit systematisk sammenlignbare analyse, evaluerer vi mapping a mellom meningsrepresentasjonar frå ulike rammeverk med to komplementare metodar: i) ein regelbasert konverter, og ii) ein oversikt deleksiseringsanalyser som tolkar til ein rammeverk med berre informasjon frå andre som funksjonar. Vi bruker desse metodane til å konvertera STREUSLE corpus (med syntaktiske og leksiske semantiske notasjonar) til UCCA (eit representasjon av fullstendig setningsstrukturt graf). Begge metodar gjev overraska nøyaktige målsrepresentasjonar, nær fullstendig oversikt av UCCA- tolkarkvaliteten som tyder på at UCCA- notasjonar er delvis redundant med STREUSLE- notasjonar. Til tross av denne store konvergensjonen mellom rammeverka finn vi fleire viktige område av ulike forskjeller.', 'pl': 'Budowanie solidnych systemów rozumienia języka naturalnego będzie wymagało jasnej charakterystyki tego, czy i w jaki sposób różne językowe reprezentacje znaczeń uzupełniają się nawzajem. Aby przeprowadzić systematyczną analizę porównawczą, oceniamy mapowanie pomiędzy reprezentacjami znaczeń z różnych frameworków za pomocą dwóch uzupełniających się metod: (i) konwertera opartego na regułach i (ii) nadzorowanego deleksykalizowanego parsera, który analizuje do jednego frameworka wykorzystując tylko informacje z drugiego jako cechy. Stosujemy te metody do konwersji korpusu STREUSLE (z adnotacjami semantycznymi składniowymi i leksykalnymi) na UCCA (reprezentację znaczenia pełnego zdania strukturowaną na wykresie). Obie metody dają zaskakująco dokładne reprezentacje docelowe, zbliżone do pełni nadzorowanej jakości parsera UCCA – wskazując, że adnotacje UCCA są częściowo redundantne z adnotacjami STREUSLE. Pomimo tej znacznej zbieżności między ramami, stwierdzimy kilka ważnych obszarów rozbieżności.', 'sr': 'Izgradavanje robnih sustava razumevanja prirodnog jezika zahteva će jasnu karakterizaciju da li i kako se različiti jezički znaci dopunjavaju jedno drugom. Da bismo izvršili sistematsku komparativnu analizu, procjenjivali smo mapiranje između značenja predstavljanja iz različitih okvira koristeći dve komplementarne metode: i) konverter na pravilima, i ii) nadzorni deleksikalizirani analizator koji analizira na jedan okvir koristeći samo informacije od drugog kao karakteristike. Primjenjujemo te metode da preobratimo STREUSLE corpus (sa sintaktičnim i leksičkim semantičnim annotacijom) na UCCA (predstavljanje kompletne rečenice u grafu). Obje metode donose iznenađujuće tačne ciljne predstave, blizu potpuno nadziranih UCCA analizatorskih kvaliteta ukazujući na to da su annotacije UCCA djelomično smanjene sa STREUSLE annotacijom. Uprkos ovoj značajnoj konverģenciji između okvira, pronašli smo nekoliko važnih područja razlike.', 'si': 'ශක්තිමත් ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම් පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ඕනේ විශේෂ භාෂාවික අදහස් එක්කෙනෙක් පද්ධතිය සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරන්න, අපි අදහස් වෙනස් ෆ්\u200dරේම්වර්ක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ලේෂණයක් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා: (i) නීතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ලේෂ අපි මේ විධානය සඳහා STREUSLE කෝපුස් වෙනස් කරන්න (සංවිධානය සහ ලෙක්සිකල් සංවිධානය සඳහා) UCCA (ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය සම්පූර ප්\u200dරමාණය දෙන්නම් පුදුමින්ම හරියට ලක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම පරීක්ෂණය කරපු UCCA ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කුළුවත් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය මේ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර, අපිට විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Att bygga robusta system för förståelse av naturliga språk kräver en tydlig karakterisering av huruvida och hur olika språkliga betydelserepresentationer kompletterar varandra. För att utföra en systematisk jämförande analys utvärderar vi kartläggningen mellan betydelserepresentationer från olika ramverk med två kompletterande metoder: (i) en regelbaserad omvandlare, och (ii) en övervakad delexikaliserad parser som tolkar till ett ramverk med endast information från det andra som funktioner. Vi använder dessa metoder för att konvertera STREUSLE korpus (med syntaktiska och lexikala semantiska anteckningar) till UCCA (en grafstrukturerad fullmeningsrepresentation). Båda metoderna ger överraskande exakta målrepresentationer, nära fullt övervakad UCCA-tolkningskvalitet, vilket indikerar att UCCA-anteckningar delvis är överflödiga med STREUSLE-anteckningar. Trots denna stora konvergens mellan ramarna finner vi flera viktiga skillnader.', 'so': 'Buildidda nidaamka waxgarashada afka dabiicadda ah ee la isticmaalo waxay u baahan tahay mid cadcad ah in lagu sameynayo iyo siduu macnaheedu yahay noocyada luuqadaha kala duduwan ay isugu dhamaystaan. Si aan u sameyno baaritaanka nidaamka u dhigista, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa sawirada u dhaxaysa sawirada midhaha kala duwan ee ka soo jeeda qamiisyada kala duwan ee isticmaalaya laba qaabab komplementa ah: (i) wareejiyaha rule-based, iyo (ii) oo la ilaaliyey delexicalized Parser oo u baaraandegaa hal framework oo isticmaalaya macluumaad oo kaliya oo kale u isticmaalaya sida gaariiq Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa hababkan in lagu beddelo STREUSLE korpus (oo lagu beddelo syntactic iyo lexical semantic annotations) UCCA (taas oo macnaheedu yahay qoraal-structured oo dhan). Dhammaan qaababka aad u sahlan waxay soo bixisaa noocyo saxda ah oo ku dhow oo la ilaaliyo UCCA ParParlamer oo si qiimo ah looga jeedo in alaabta UCCA qeyb ka hoosaystiro waxay ku socotaa STREUSLE. Inta kastoo ay leedahay isbedelkan muhiimka ah, waxaan helaynaa meelo kala duwan oo muhiim ah.', 'ta': 'இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்குதல் தெளிவான எழுத்து தேவைப்படும் மற்றும் பல மொழிகளின் அர்த்தம ஒரு அமைப்பு ஒப்பீட்டு ஆய்வு செய்ய, நாம் வேறு சட்டங்களில் இருந்து பிரிவுகளுக்கு இடையில் உள்ள வரைப்படத்தை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம்: (i) விதிமுறை மாற்றியை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு விதிம STREUSLE குறிப்பை மாற்ற இந்த முறைகளை நாம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் (ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் மற்றும் மென்டிக் குறிப்புகளுடன்) UCCA (வரைப்பட இரண்டு முறைகளும் ஆச்சரியமாக சரியான இலக்கு குறிப்புகளை கொடுக்கும், முழுமையாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட UCCA மதிப்புக்கு அருகில் UCCA குறிப்புகள் ST சட்டங்களுக்கிடையில் இந்த மாதிரியான மாற்றங்கள் இருந்தாலும், பல முக்கியமான வேறுபாடுகளை கண்டுபிடி', 'ur': 'مضبوط طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی نظام بنانے کی ضرورت ہے کہ ایک دوسرے کو صریح تعریف کرے کہ کیا اور کس طرح مختلف زبان تعریف کی تعریف ایک دوسرے کی تعریف کرتی ہے. ایک سیستماتیک مقایسہ تحلیل کرنے کے لئے، ہم مختلف فرمورک کے معنی کے مطابق مختلف فرمورک کے منظورات کے درمیان نقشه کا ارزش کر رہے ہیں: i) ایک قانون پر بنیاد تغییر کرنے والا، اور ii) ایک تحقیر تغییر تغییر دینے والی پارچر جو ایک فرمورک میں پارچر کرتا ہے، ایک فرمور ہم نے ان طریقوں کو UCCA (ایک گراف-ساختہ پورے مجسمے کا معنی) تبدیل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا ہے۔ ان دونوں طریقوں میں تعجب کے مطابق موجود نشانیاں پیش کرتی ہیں، UCCA پارچر کی کیفیت کے نزدیک، جو نشانیاں دیتے ہیں کہ UCCA نوٹیزوں کو STREUSLE نوٹیزوں کے ساتھ حصہ سے زیادہ دور کر دیا جاتا ہے. یہ بہت اچھی سرگوشی کے باوجود، ہم مختلف کے بہت اہم منطق پاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Natalik tilni o'rganish tizimi yaratish uchun, har xil tillar ma'lumotlari bir-бирlarini birlashtirish kerak boʻlishi mumkin. Bir tizim kompakt analyzerni bajarish uchun, biz ikkita complexsiy usullar yordamida boshqa freymlar orasidagi ma'anaviy shakllarni qiymatimiz: (i) qoidaga qaror qiluvchi va (ii) boshqa shakllarga faqat maʼlumot sifatida ishlatiladigan deleksikatlarni taʼminlovchi parametrlar. Biz bu usullarni UCCAga (grafik-tuzilgan butun gaplarning ma'nosi) qo'llash uchun STREUSLE corpusini (syntactik va leksik semantik annotatalari bilan boshlash mumkin). @ info Freymlar orasidagi eng muhim bir necha muhim sohalarni topamiz.", 'vi': 'Xây dựng một hệ thống hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên mạnh mẽ đòi hỏi một sự mô tả rõ ràng về sự bổ sung của các biểu tượng ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để thực hiện một phân tích tổng quan, chúng tôi đánh giá bản đồ giữa các biểu hiện ý nghĩa từ các quy trình khác nhau bằng hai phương pháp bổ sung: i) một bộ chuyển đổi dựa trên quy tắc, và (II) một bộ phân tích được giám sát, phân tích được ghép thành một bộ, chỉ sử dụng thông tin từ bộ khác như các tính năng. Chúng tôi sử dụng các phương pháp này để chuyển đổi tập thể STERTE (với ghi chú theo ngữ pháp và nghĩa chữ viết tay) cho UCCA (một mục văn bản đầy đủ phân biệt). Cả hai phương pháp đều cung cấp những biểu tượng chính xác đáng ngạc nhiên về mục tiêu, gần với khả năng kiểm soát đầy đủ của ECCA, và cho thấy biên bản ECCA đã bị thừa thải. Bất chấp sự tương đồng quan trọng giữa lãnh vực, chúng tôi thấy có nhiều mảng khác biệt quan trọng.', 'bg': 'Изграждането на здрави системи за разбиране на естествения език ще изисква ясна характеристика на това дали и как различните лингвистични значения се допълват взаимно. За да извършим систематичен сравнителен анализ, ние оценяваме картографирането на символните изображения от различни рамки, използвайки два допълващи се метода: (i) базиран на правила конвертор и (ii) контролиран делексикализиран анализатор, който анализира до една рамка, използвайки само информация от другата като характеристики. Прилагаме тези методи, за да преобразуваме корпуса със синтактични и лексикални семантични анотации в графично структурирано пълно изречение. И двата метода дават изненадващо точни целеви представяния, близки до напълно контролираното качество на анализатора, което показва, че анотациите са частично излишни с анотациите. Въпреки това значително сближаване между рамките, откриваме няколко важни области на различие.', 'hr': 'Izgradnja robnih sustava razumijevanja prirodnog jezika zahtijevat će jasnu karakterizaciju da li i kako se različiti jezički znači dopunjavaju jedni druge. Da bismo izvršili sistematsku usporedbenu analizu, procjenjivali smo mapiranje između značenja predstavljanja iz različitih okvira koristeći dvije dodatne metode: i) pretvarač na pravilima, i ii) nadzirani deleksikalizirani pretraživač koji analizira na jedan okvir koristeći samo informacije od drugog kao karakteristike. Primjenjujemo te metode da preobratimo STREUSLE corpus (sa sintaktičkim i leksičkim semantičkim annotacijom) na UCCA (predstavljanje potpune rečenice na grafiku). Obje metode donose iznenađujuće tačne ciljne predstave, blizu potpuno nadziranog UCCA analizatora koji ukazuje na kvalitetu UCCA-a koji ukazuju na to da su izvještaje UCCA djelomično smanjene s oznakem STREUSLE-a. Uprkos ovoj značajnoj konverģenciji između okvira, pronašli smo nekoliko važnih područja razlike.', 'da': 'Opbygning af robuste natursprogforståelsessystemer kræver en klar karakterisering af, hvorvidt og hvordan forskellige sproglige meningsrepræsentationer supplerer hinanden. For at udføre en systematisk sammenlignende analyse evaluerer vi kortlægningen mellem meningsrepræsentationer fra forskellige rammer ved hjælp af to komplementære metoder: (i) en regelbaseret konverter, og (ii) en overvåget delekskaliseret parser, der fortolker til en ramme ved hjælp af kun oplysninger fra den anden som funktioner. Vi anvender disse metoder til at konvertere STREUSLE corpus (med syntaktiske og leksikske semantiske annotationer) til UCCA (en grafstruktureret fuld sætning betydning repræsentation). Begge metoder giver overraskende nøjagtige målrepræsentationer, tæt på fuldt overvåget UCCA-fortolkerkvalitet – hvilket indikerer, at UCCA-annotationer er delvist overflødige med STREUSLE-annotationer. På trods af denne betydelige konvergens mellem rammerne finder vi flere vigtige forskellige områder.', 'nl': 'Het bouwen van robuuste systemen voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal vereist een duidelijke karakterisering van of en hoe verschillende linguïstische betekenisrepresentaties elkaar aanvullen. Om een systematische vergelijkende analyse uit te voeren, evalueren we de toewijzing tussen betekenisrepresentaties uit verschillende frameworks met behulp van twee complementaire methoden: (i) een regelgebaseerde converter, en (ii) een begeleide delexicaliseerde parser die naar het ene framework analyseert met alleen informatie van het andere als kenmerken. We passen deze methoden toe om het STREUSLE corpus (met syntactische en lexicale semantische annotaties) om te zetten naar UCCA (een grafiekgestructureerde full-sent betekening representatie). Beide methoden leveren verrassend nauwkeurige target representaties op, dicht bij volledig begeleide UCCA parser kwaliteit, wat aangeeft dat UCCA annotaties gedeeltelijk redundant zijn met STREUSLE annotaties. Ondanks deze aanzienlijke convergentie tussen kaders vinden we verschillende belangrijke gebieden van divergentie.', 'id': 'Building robust natural language understanding systems will require a clear characterization of whether and how various linguistic meaning representations complement each other.  Untuk melakukan analisis komparatif sistematis, kami mengevaluasi peta antara representation berarti dari bingkai yang berbeda menggunakan dua metode komplementari: (i) konverter berdasarkan aturan, dan (ii) pengenalisasi deleksialisasi yang diawasi yang menganalisis ke satu bingkai menggunakan hanya informasi dari yang lain sebagai fitur. We apply these methods to convert the STREUSLE corpus (with syntactic and lexical semantic annotations) to UCCA (a graph-structured full-sentence meaning representation).  Kedua metode memberikan representation target yang sangat akurat, dekat dengan kualitas penganalis UCCA yang diawasi sepenuhnya menunjukkan bahwa anotasi UCCA sebagian-sebagian redundan dengan anotasi STREUSLE. Despite this substantial convergence between frameworks, we find several important areas of divergence.', 'de': 'Der Aufbau robuster natรผrlicher Sprachverstรคndnissysteme erfordert eine klare Charakterisierung, ob und wie sich verschiedene linguistische Bedeutungsreprรคsentationen ergรคnzen. Um eine systematische vergleichende Analyse durchzufรผhren, evaluieren wir die Zuordnung zwischen Bedeutungsreprรคsentationen verschiedener Frameworks mit zwei komplementรคren Methoden: (i) einem regelbasierten Konverter und (ii) einem รผberwachten delexikalisierten Parser, der nur Informationen aus dem anderen Framework als Features analysiert. Wir wenden diese Methoden an, um das STREUSLE-Korpus (mit syntaktischen und lexikalischen semantischen Annotationen) in UCCA (eine graph-strukturierte Vollsatzdarstellung) umzuwandeln. Beide Methoden liefern รผberraschend genaue Zieldarstellungen in der Nรคhe der vollstรคndig รผberwachten UCCA-Parser-Qualitรคt โ\x80\x93 was darauf hindeutet, dass UCCA-Annotationen mit STREUSLE-Annotationen teilweise redundant sind. Trotz dieser erheblichen Konvergenz zwischen den Rahmenbedingungen finden wir einige wichtige Bereiche, in denen Unterschiede bestehen.', 'ko': '강력한 자연 언어 이해 시스템을 구축하려면 각종 언어의 의미 표시 여부와 어떻게 서로 보충하는지를 명확하게 묘사해야 한다.체계적인 비교 분석을 하기 위해 우리는 서로 보완하는 두 가지 방법을 사용하여 서로 다른 프레임워크의 의미 표시 사이의 매핑을 평가한다. (i) 규칙을 바탕으로 하는 변환기와 (ii)는 다른 프레임워크에서 온 정보만 특징으로 한 프레임워크의 감독을 통해 해석기를 수식한다.우리는 이러한 방법을 적용하여 STREUSLE 자료 라이브러리(문법과 어휘의 의미를 가진 주석)를 UCCA(도형 구조의 완전한 문장의 의미 표시)로 전환시켰다.이 두 방법 모두 UCCA 주석이 STREUSLE 주석 부분과 중복되어 있음을 보여주는 완전한 감독에 가까운 UCCA 해석기 품질에 대한 놀라운 정확한 목표를 나타냈다.비록 틀 사이에 이러한 실질적인 동향이 존재하지만, 우리는 몇 가지 중요한 불일치 영역을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ساختن سیستم\u200cهای درک زبان طبیعی قوی نیاز دارد که یک تعریف روشنی از آیا و چگونه معنی زبان\u200cشناسی مختلف همدیگر را تعریف کنند. برای انجام یک تحلیل قابل مقایسه سیستم، ما نقشه\u200cبندی بین معنای نمایش\u200cدهندگان از فرم\u200cهای مختلف را با استفاده از دو روش\u200cهای اضافه\u200cکننده ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم: (i) یک تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cی قانون بر اساس قانون، و (ii) یک ویژه\u200cکننده\u200cی حذف\u200cکننده\u200cی حذف\u200cکننده\u200cای که به ما این روش\u200cها را برای تبدیل کردن کورپوس STREUSLE (با توضیح\u200cهای سنتاکتیک و زبان\u200cشناسی) به UCCA (نمایش\u200cنمایش کامل جمله\u200cای ساخته شده از گراف) استفاده می\u200cکنیم. هر دو روش نشان دادن هدف متجاوز دقیق را به طور تعجب می دهد، نزدیک به کیفیت بازیگر UCCA کاملا تحت نظر گرفته می شود، نشان می دهد که اخطار UCCA قسمتی با اخطار STREUSLE از دست داده می شود. با وجود این کنفرانس بسیار بزرگ بین فرم ها، چند منطقه مهم تفاوت را پیدا می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Kujenga mfumo wa kuelewa lugha za asili wa asili utahitaji ufafanuzi wa wazi kama na namna ambavyo uwakilishi wa lugha tofauti wanavyofanana. Ili kufanya uchambuzi wa mfumo unaofanana, tunatathmini ramani kati ya maana ya uwakilizaji kutoka mfumo tofauti kwa kutumia mbinu mbili za uungwaji: (i) mfanyakazi wa sheria, na (ii) mchanganyiko wa chama kinachochunguliwa na chama kinachotengenezwa ambacho kinachapisha kwa mfumo mmoja kwa kutumia taarifa tu kutoka kwa mwingine kama tabia. Tunatumia mbinu hizi za kubadilisha viungo vya STREUSLE (kwa matangazo ya ushirikiano na sekta ya lexico) UCCA (uwakilishi wa sentensi kamili ya picha). mbinu hizi mbili zinaleta uwakilizaji sahihi wa malengo, karibu na kufuatiliwa kwa ujumla wa UCCA mchanganyiko unaoonyesha kwamba matangazo ya UCCA yanapungua kwa kiasi kikubwa na matangazo ya STREUSLE. Pamoja na mazungumzo haya makubwa kati ya mifumo, tunagundua maeneo muhimu ya tofauti.', 'af': "Die bou van kragtige natuurlike taal verstaan stelsels sal 'n duidelike karakterisering nodig van of en hoe verskillende lingwisiese betekenis verteenwoordighede mekaar voldoen. Om 'n sistematiese vergelykbare analisie te doen, evalueer ons die kaart tussen betekening verteenwoordings van verskillende raamwerke met twee komplementare metodes: (i) â\x80\x99n reël-gebaseerde omskakelaar, en (ii) â\x80\x99n ondersoekte deleksikaliseerde ontwerker wat verwerk na een raamwerk met slegs inligting van die ander as funksie Ons wend hierdie metodes om die STREUSLE corpus (met sintaktika en leksiese semantiese notasies) te omskakel na UCCA ( 'n graafstruktureerde vol-setning beteken voorsiening). Beide metodes gee surpristig presies doel voorstellings, naby na volledig ondersoekte UCCA-ontwerker kwaliteit- aanduidelik dat UCCA-annotasies gedeeltelik herroemd is met STREUSLE annotasies. Onthou hierdie substantiele konvergensie tussen raamwerke, vind ons verskeie belangrike gebiede van verskeiding.", 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i sistemeve të forta të kuptimit të gjuhës natyrore do të kërkojë një karakterizim të qartë në se dhe si përfaqësimet e ndryshme të kuptimeve gjuhësore komplementojnë njëri-tjetrin. To perform a systematic comparative analysis, we evaluate the mapping between meaning representations from different frameworks using two complementary methods: (i) a rule-based converter, and (ii) a supervised delexicalized parser that parses to one framework using only information from the other as features.  We apply these methods to convert the STREUSLE corpus (with syntactic and lexical semantic annotations) to UCCA (a graph-structured full-sentence meaning representation).  Të dy metodat japin përfaqësime të sakta surprizuese objektive, pranë cilësisë së analizuesit të UCCA të mbikqyrur plotësisht që tregojnë se anotacionet e UCCA janë pjesërisht të tepërta me anotacionet STREUSLE. Megjithë këtë konvergencë thelbësore midis kornizave, gjejmë disa fusha të rëndësishme të dallimeve.', 'hy': 'Կառնելով ուժեղ բնական լեզվի հասկանալու համակարգեր, կպահանջվի պարզ բնորոշման այն մասին, թե արդյոք և ինչպես են լեզվաբանական նշանակության տարբեր ներկայացումները միմյանց համալրացնում: Սիստեմատիկ համեմատական վերլուծություն կատարելու համար մենք գնահատում ենք տարբեր շրջանների նշանակալի ներկայացումների միջև կազմակերպված քարտեզագրությունը՝ օգտագործելով երկու համալրացող մեթոդ: (i) կանոններով հիմնված վերափոխողը և (i) վերահսկված դելեքսիկալիզացված վերլուծում, որը վերլուծում է մեկ Մենք կիրառում ենք այս մեթոդները, որպեսզի վերածենք Ստրեուսլե կորպուսը (սինտակտիկ և լեքսիկական սեմանտիկ նոտացիաներով) UCCA-ի (գծագրի կառուցվածքով ամբողջ նախադասությունը, որը նշանակում է ներկայացում): Երկու մեթոդները զարմանալիորեն ճշգրիտ նպատակային ներկայացումներ են տալիս, որոնք մոտ լիովին վերահսկված են UCCA-ի վերլուծության որակի ցույց են տալիս, որ UCCA-ի annoտացիաները մասամբ անհրաժեշտ են Ստրեուսլե annoտացիաների հետ: Չնայած շրջանների միջև նշանակալի մոտեցումներին, մենք գտնում ենք բազմաթիվ կարևոր տարբերությունների ոլորտներ:', 'tr': "Güýtgeli tebigy diller düşünüp sistemalary guralýar, bir-birini nähili dil a ňladygyny we nähili bir täsirli bir karakterifikasy gerekecek. Sistem karşılaştırma çözümlerini etkinleştirmek üçin, farklı çerçevelerden gelen ifadeler arasynda çizgileri değerlendiriyoruz: (i) bir kural tabanlı çeviricisi, we (ii) bir deleksiklendirilen çözümleri, bir çerçeve tarafından diňe bir şekilde bilgi kullanarak çözümlendirilen çözümlerini değerlendiriyoruz. Biz bu yöntemleri STREUSLE köpüsini UCCA'a dönüştürmek üçin uygulapdyk. Her iki yöntem şaşırtıcı şekilde tam hedef temsillerini sağlar, UCCA tanşörlerinin tamamlanmış şekilde gözetlenmiş şekilde gözetlenmiş bir UCCA duyarlaması STREUSLE duyarlamalarla bölümcül şekilde boşaltýar. Çarpmalaryň arasyndaky möhüm bir birleşigine rağmen, çykyşyň birnäçe möhüm bölegi tapdyk.", 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስርዓቶች መሠረት የቋንቋ አእምሮዎች እርስ በርሳቸው እንዴት እንደሚጨምሩ እና እንዴት እንደሚፈጸም ግልጽን ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የሥርዓት አስተያየት ለመፈጸም፣ ከሌሎቹ ፍሬም የተለየውን ክፍሎች እና ሁለት ተጨማሪ ሥርዓቶችን በመጠቀም እና (i) የሥርዓት ተሟጋቾች እና (ii) የተጠበቀው የሜሌክሲካል ምርጫዎችን ለአንድ ፍሬማርክ ብቻ መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን አካባቢዎችን እናስተውላለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓቶች የSTREUSLE ኮፕስስ (በSyntactic እና Lexical semantic annotations) ወደ UCCA (graph-structured ሙሉ-sentence ማህበረሰብ) እናደርጋለን፡፡ የUCCA ማስታወቂያ ተቃውሞ በSTREUSLE ማስታወቂያው ተጨማሪ እንደሆነ በሙሉ ተለይቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ይህ አካባቢ ውጤት በሥርዓት መካከል የተለየ ልዩ ግንኙነት እናገኛለን፡፡', 'ca': "Construir sistemes de comprensió natural robustos de llenguatges necessitarà una caracterització clara de si i com diverses representacions de significat lingüístic s'complementan. Per fer una anàlisi comparativa sistemàtica, evaluem el mapatge entre representacions significatives de diferents marcs fent servir dos mètodes complementars: (i) un convertidor basat en regles, i (ii) un analitzador delexicalitzat supervisat que analitza a un marc fent servir només informació de l'altre com a característiques. Aplicam aquests mètodes per convertir el corpus STREUSLE (amb anotacions semàntiques sinàctiques i lècsiques) en UCCA (una representació de frases completas estructurada amb gràfic). Ambdós mètodes produeixen representacions d'objectiu sorprenentment exactes, gairebé supervisades de la qualitat de l'analitzador UCCA indicant que les anotacions UCCA són parcialment redundants amb anotacions STREUSLE. Malgrat aquesta convergència substancial entre cadres, trobem diverses àrees importants de divergència.", 'az': 'Qüvvətli təbiətli dil anlama sistemlərini inşa etmək elmi anlama sistemlərinin bir-birinə necə təşkil edir, necə də müxtəlif dil anlama təşkil edir. Sistem saldırıcı analizi təqdim etmək üçün, müxtəlif frameworklardan müəyyən ifadələr arasında xəritə çəkirik: i) qayda-tabanlı dönüşücü və ii) bir fərqləndirilmiş deleksiksikalizli parçalayıcı, digərindən yalnız məlumat olaraq istifadə edir. Biz bu metodları STREUSLE korpusu (sintaktik və leksik semantik məlumatları ilə) UCCA-ya döndərmək üçün istifadə edirik. İki metod şaşırtıcı olaraq doğru məqsəd göstəricilərini təşkil edir, tamamilə gözlənilmiş UCCA ayırıcı kaliteti-göstəricisi ilə UCCA bildiricilərinin parçası STREUSLE bildirilmələri ilə azaldığını göstərir. Çerçivelər arasındakı böyük bir konverģenciyə rağmen, müxtəlif bölgeler arasında bir neçə möhüm məlumatlar tapırıq.', 'bs': 'Izgradavanje robnih sustava razumijevanja prirodnog jezika zahtijevaće jasnu karakterizaciju da li i kako se različiti jezički znaci dopunjavaju jedni druge. Da bismo izvršili sistematsku komparativnu analizu, procjenjivali smo mapiranje između značenja predstavljanja iz različitih okvira koristeći dvije komplementarne metode: i) konverter na pravilima, i ii) nadzorni deleksikalizirani analizator koji analizira na jedan okvir koristeći samo informacije od drugog kao karakteristike. Primjenjujemo te metode da preobratimo STREUSLE corpus (sa sintaktičnim i leksičkim semantičkim annotacijom) na UCCA (predstavljanje kompletne rečenice u grafu). Obje metode donose iznenađujuće tačne ciljne predstave, blizu potpuno nadziranih UCCA analizatorskih kvaliteta ukazujući na to da su annotacije UCCA djelomično smanjene s oznakem STREUSLE. Uprkos ovoj značajnoj konverģenciji između okvira, pronašli smo nekoliko važnih područja razlike.', 'cs': 'Budování robustních systémů porozumění přirozenému jazyku bude vyžadovat jasnou charakterizaci toho, zda a jak se různé jazykové reprezentace významu vzájemně doplňují. Pro provedení systematické srovnávací analýzy vyhodnocujeme mapování mezi reprezentacemi významů z různých frameworků pomocí dvou komplementárních metod: (i) konvertoru založeného na pravidlech a (ii) supervisovaného delexikalizovaného parseru, který analyzuje do jednoho frameworku pouze pomocí informací z druhého jako vlastností. Používáme tyto metody k převodu korpusu STREUSLE (se syntaktickými a lexikálními sémantickými anotacemi) na UCCA (grafově strukturovanou reprezentaci významu celé věty). Obě metody přinášejí překvapivě přesné reprezentace cílů, blízko plně kontrolované kvalitě parseru UCCA, což naznačuje, že anotace UCCA jsou částečně redundantní s anotacemi STREUSLE. Navzdory této podstatné konvergenci mezi rámci zjišťujeme několik důležitých oblastí rozdílu.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে পারার ব্যবস্থা নির্মাণ করার ক্ষেত্রে পরিষ্কার করা আবশ্যক যে ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার মানে প্রতি একটি সিস্টেমিক তুলনামূলক বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য, আমরা বিভিন্ন ফ্রেমের প্রতিনিধিদের মানে মানচিত্রের মানে মানচিত্রের মানে মূল্য চালিয়ে দেই: আই) একটি নিয়ম-ভিত্তিক বিনিময় আমরা এই পদ্ধতিগুলো প্রয়োগ করি স্ট্রেসিল কোর্পাস (সিন্ট্যাক্সিক এবং লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সেম্যান্টিক বিষয়বস্তু সহ) ইউসিকিয়ার কাছে (একটি গ্রা উভয় পদ্ধতি বিস্ময়কর ভাবে লক্ষ্যবস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করে, যা পুরোপুরি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে ইউসিকার বিষয়বস্তুর মান নির্দেশ করছে যে ইউসিকার ব ফ্রেমের মধ্যে এই প্রধান আলোচনা সত্ত্বেও, আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এলাকা খুঁজে পাই।', 'fi': 'Vahvojen luonnollisten kielten ymmärtämisjärjestelmien rakentaminen edellyttää selkeää luonnehtimista siitä, täydentävätkö kielelliset merkitykset toisiaan ja miten ne täydentävät toisiaan. Suorittaaksemme systemaattisen vertailevan analyysin arvioimme eri kehysten merkitysrepresentaatioiden kartoitusta kahdella toisiaan täydentävällä menetelmällä: (i) sääntöpohjaisella muuntimella ja (ii) valvotulla deleksikalisoitulla jäsentäjällä, joka jäsentää yhteen viitekehykseen käyttämällä vain toisen informaatiota ominaisuuksina. Käytämme näitä menetelmiä muuntaaksemme STREUSLE-korpusen (syntaktisine ja leksikalisine semantilisine annotointoineen) UCCA:ksi (graafirakenteinen koko lauseen esitystapa). Molemmat menetelmät tuottavat yllättävän tarkkoja kohdeesityksiä, jotka ovat lähellä täysin valvottua UCCA-parserin laatua, mikä osoittaa, että UCCA-merkinnät ovat osittain tarpeettomia STREUSLE-merkintöjen kanssa. Puitteiden välisestä huomattavasta lähentymisestä huolimatta havaitsemme useita merkittäviä eroja.', 'et': 'Tugevate looduslike keelte mõistmise süsteemide loomine nõuab selget kirjeldust selle kohta, kas ja kuidas erinevad keelelised tähendused üksteist täiendavad. Süstemaatilise võrdleva analüüsi teostamiseks hindame erinevate raamistike tähendusrepresentatsioonide kaardistamist kahe täiendava meetodi abil: (i) reeglipõhine muundur ja (ii) järelevalvetud deleksikaliseeritud parser, mis parsib ühe raamistiku, kasutades funktsioonidena ainult teise teavet. Me rakendame neid meetodeid STREUSLE korpuse teisendamiseks (süntaktiliste ja leksikaalsete semantiliste annotatsioonidega) UCCA-ks (graafilise struktureeritud täislausega tähenduses). Mõlemad meetodid annavad üllatavalt täpseid sihtesitusi, mis on lähedased täielikult järelevalvestatud UCCA parseri kvaliteedile, mis näitab, et UCCA annotatsioonid on STREUSLE annotatsioonidega osaliselt üleliigsed. Vaatamata raamistike olulisele lähenemisele leiame mitmeid olulisi lahknevusi.', 'jv': 'Ngawe nggawe sistem sing paling-perbudhakan kanggo sabên bangsa luwih akeh dikenakno akeh operasi ning awak dhéwé sapa-sabên seneng pisan kelangan bangsa sapa-sabên. To do a sistematical komparatative testing, we assess the maping amongst the means representations from the samihan frame. Awak dhéwé aplikasi ngono kuwi nggawe aturan KENGRUKEL Display boxes Nanging kabèh lan nganggo perusahaan nggawe wigat iki dadi, kita luwih akeh cara sing dikarepaké perusahaan', 'ha': "Ka gina tsarin fahimtar harshen na'urar ranar da aka haramta, za'a buƙata wani gyarata mai bayyanãwa ga ko da ma'anar wasu linguistic masu tsarin su su cika ɗayan. To, dõmin a cika wani anadi na kasa da daidaita, sai mu ƙaddara ramani da mazaɓa daga firam-daban, ana yi amfani da shiryoyin biyu masu kamfata:(i) wata mai shigetarwa a kan rule, da (ii) a tsari da aka tsare wa parser wanda ke yin parse zuwa firam guda, don ka yi amfani da information kawai daga wanda ke cikin faniki. Yana amfani da waɗannan hanyõyin su dõmin su mayar da nau'in na SPRESLE (da sanarwa na syntactic da leksisi) zuwa UCCA (ma'anar da fassaran cikakken rubutu). @ info: whatsthis Despite this substantial convergence between frameworks, we find several important areas of divergence.", 'he': 'בניית מערכות הבנה טבעית חזקות של שפת תדרוש אופיינה ברורה של אם ואיך מייצגים שונים של משמעות שפתית משלים אחד את השני. כדי לבצע ניתוח שיוותי מערכתי, אנו מעריכים את המפה בין מייצגים משמעותיים ממסגרות שונות באמצעות שתי שיטות תוספות: (i) מעבר מבוסס על חוקים, ו (ii) מעבד דלקסיקוליזם מושלם שמעביר למסגרה אחת באמצעות מידע רק מהשני בתור תכונות. אנו משתמשים בשיטות אלה כדי להפוך את הקורפוס STREUSLE (עם ציונים סמנטיים סינטקטיים ולקסיים) לאUCCA (מייצג משפט מלא מבוסס בגרף). שני השיטות מציגות מיצוגים מדויקים באופן מפתיע, קרובים לאיכות מעבד UCCA שמושגיח באופן מלא כי הערות UCCA הם חלקית מיותרות עם הערות STREUSLE. Despite this substantial convergence between frameworks, we find several important areas of divergence.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ནུས་པ་བཟོ་བར་ནུས་ཅན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རྟོགས་ཤིང་ཡོད་མིན་ན་ཡང་ན། To perform a systematic comparative analysis, we evaluate the mapping between meaning representations from different frameworks using two complementary methods: (i) a rule-based converter, and (ii) a supervised delexicalized parser that parses to one framework using only information from the other as features. The following parameters are: འུ་ཚོས་གཞི་འདི་དག་གིས་STREUSLE ས corpus་གཟུགས་ཅན་ལ་བསྒྱུར་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཚོ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་འཕགས་རིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ངེས་འཛིན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད། རྩི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་མཁན་ལ་བསྡར་བ་ས དེའི་རྩ་བརྗོད་གཞུང་གི་དབར་གྱི་མཉམ་དུ་བཏོན་པའི་དྲན་འབྲེལ་འདི་ལྷན་དུ་འཇུག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་གལ་ཆེན་དག', 'sk': 'Izgradnja robustnih sistemov razumevanja naravnega jezika bo zahtevala jasno opredelitev, ali in kako se različne jezikovne predstavitve pomena dopolnjujejo. Za izvedbo sistematične primerjalne analize smo ocenili kartiranje pomenskih predstavitev iz različnih okvirov z uporabo dveh dopolnilnih metod: (i) pretvornika, ki temelji na pravilih, in (ii) nadzorovanega deleksikaliziranega razčlenjevalnika, ki razčlenjuje na en okvir z uporabo samo informacij iz drugega kot značilnosti. Te metode uporabljamo za pretvorbo korpusa STREUSLE (s sintaktičnimi in leksikalnimi semantičnimi opombami) v UCCA (grafsko strukturirano celotno stavkovno reprezentacijo). Obe metodi zagotavljata presenetljivo natančne ciljne predstavitve, ki so blizu popolnoma nadzorovane kakovosti razčlenjevalnika UCCA, kar kaže, da so pri zapiskih STREUSLE delno odvečne. Kljub tej precejšnji konvergenci okvirov najdemo več pomembnih področij razlik.'}
{'en': 'Normalizing Compositional Structures Across Graphbanks', 'fr': 'Normalisation des structures compositionnelles dans les banques de graphes', 'ar': 'تطبيع الهياكل التركيبية عبر Graphbanks', 'pt': 'Normalizando Estruturas Composicionais em Graphbanks', 'es': 'Normalización de estructuras composicionales en bancos de gráficos', 'ja': 'グラフバンク全体の構成構造の正規化', 'hi': 'Graphbanks भर में Compositional Structures को Normalizing', 'zh': '跨图形库规范化结构', 'ru': 'Нормализация композиционных структур по Graphbanks', 'ga': 'Struchtúir Chomhdhéanaimh a Normalú Trasna Graifbhainc', 'el': 'Κανονικοποίηση σύνθετων δομών σε όλες τις τράπεζες γραφικών', 'hu': 'A kompozíciós struktúrák normalizálása a grafikbankokban', 'kk': 'Құрастырмалы құрылғыларды графбанктардың арасында нормализациялау', 'ka': 'კომპოზიციონალური სტრუქტურების ნორმალიზაცია', 'it': 'Normalizzazione delle strutture compositive tra banche grafiche', 'lt': 'Normalizing Compositional Structures Across Graphbanks', 'mk': 'Нормализирање на композициските структури низ графбанките', 'ms': 'Menormalkan Struktur Komposisi Melalui Bank Graf', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ്ബാങ്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള കോമ്പോണ്\u200dടിഷന്\u200d സ്ഥിരമാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-Istrutturi Kompożittivi Normalizzati Permezz tal-Graphbanks', 'mn': 'Графбанкуудын дотор нэгтгэл бүтэц', 'ro': 'Normalizarea structurilor compoziționale în cadrul băncilor grafice', 'sr': 'Normaliziranje kompozicionalne strukture kroz Graphbanke', 'no': 'Normaliserer komponentsstrukturar mellom grafikkbankar', 'so': 'Normalizing Compositional Structures Across Graphbanks', 'pl': 'Normalizacja struktur kompozycyjnych w bankach graficznych', 'sv': 'Normalisera sammansatta strukturer över grafer', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සංවිධානය සංවිධානය ග්\u200dරාෆ්බැන්ක්ස්', 'ta': 'கிராப்பாங்குகளை சுழற்றும் கூட்டு அமைப்புகள்', 'ur': 'گراف بانک کے درمیان کامپیوتنی ساختاروں کو عام کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Normalizing Compositional Structures Across Graphbanks', 'vi': 'Tiêu chuẩn cấu trúc sự kết hợp', 'da': 'Normalisering af sammensatte strukturer på tværs af grafer', 'bg': 'Нормализиране на композиционни структури в графични банки', 'nl': 'Samenstellingsstructuren normaliseren in grafiekbanken', 'hr': 'Normaliziranje kompozicionalne strukture kroz Graphbanke', 'id': 'Normalisasi Struktur Komposisi Melalui Graphbanks', 'ko': '도형 라이브러리의 성분 구조를 규범화하다', 'de': 'Normalisierung von Compositional Structures über Graphbanken hinweg', 'fa': 'ساختارهای ترکیبی در میان بانک\u200cهای گراف', 'sw': 'Udhibiti wa Miundombinu ya Makombozi', 'tr': 'Syýasy Buýruklary Grafbanklaryň arasynda bellenen', 'af': 'Normaliseer Komposisionele Struktuure tussen Graphbanke', 'sq': 'Normalizimi i strukturave përbërëse nëpërmjet grafikëve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Graphbankların arasında Kompozisyonal Yapıları Normalizē', 'hy': 'Գրաֆբանկի միջև նորմալիզացված համադրական կառուցվածքները', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ্ব্যাঙ্কের ক্ষেত্রে কম্পোটিশনেল কাঠামো স্বাভাবিক করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Normaliziranje kompozicionalne strukture kroz Graphbanke', 'ca': 'Normalitzar les estructures composicionsa través dels bancs gráfics', 'cs': 'Normalizace kompozičních struktur napříč grafovými bankami', 'fi': 'Yhdistelmärakenteiden normalisointi graafipankeissa', 'et': 'Kompositsiooniliste struktuuride normaliseerimine graafikapankade vahel', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Normalizacija kompozicijskih struktur med grafičnimi bankami', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'נורמליזת מבנים מורכבים מעבר לבנקי גראפ', 'bo': 'རྩུས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་མཁན་གྱི་དཔེ་གཞུང་ལ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'The emergence of a variety of graph-based meaning representations (MRs) has sparked an important conversation about how to adequately represent semantic structure. MRs exhibit structural differences that reflect different theoretical and design considerations, presenting challenges to uniform linguistic analysis and cross-framework semantic parsing. Here, we ask the question of which design differences between MRs are meaningful and semantically-rooted, and which are superficial. We present a methodology for normalizing discrepancies between MRs at the compositional level (Lindemann et al., 2019), finding that we can normalize the majority of divergent phenomena using linguistically-grounded rules. Our work significantly increases the match in compositional structure between MRs and improves multi-task learning (MTL) in a low-resource setting, serving as a proof of concept for future broad-scale cross-MR normalization.', 'ar': 'أثار ظهور مجموعة متنوعة من تمثيلات المعنى القائمة على الرسم البياني (MRs) محادثة مهمة حول كيفية تمثيل البنية الدلالية بشكل مناسب. تعرض MRs اختلافات هيكلية تعكس اعتبارات نظرية وتصميمية مختلفة ، مما يمثل تحديات للتحليل اللغوي الموحد والتحليل الدلالي عبر الإطار. هنا ، نطرح السؤال حول أي اختلافات في التصميم بين MRs ذات مغزى ومتجذرة لغويًا وأيها سطحية. نقدم منهجية لتطبيع التناقضات بين MRs على المستوى التركيبي (Lindemann et al. ، 2019) ، حيث وجدنا أنه يمكننا تطبيع غالبية الظواهر المتباينة باستخدام قواعد ذات أسس لغوية. يزيد عملنا بشكل كبير من التوافق في البنية التركيبية بين MRs ويحسن التعلم متعدد المهام (MTL) في بيئة منخفضة الموارد ، وهو بمثابة إثبات لمفهوم التطبيع عبر MR على نطاق واسع في المستقبل.', 'pt': 'O surgimento de uma variedade de representações de significado baseadas em grafos (MRs) desencadeou uma importante conversa sobre como representar adequadamente a estrutura semântica. MRs exibem diferenças estruturais que refletem diferentes considerações teóricas e de design, apresentando desafios para uma análise linguística uniforme e análise semântica entre frameworks. Aqui, fazemos a pergunta de quais diferenças de design entre MRs são significativas e semanticamente enraizadas e quais são superficiais. Apresentamos uma metodologia para normalizar discrepâncias entre RMs no nível composicional (Lindemann et al., 2019), descobrindo que podemos normalizar a maioria dos fenômenos divergentes usando regras fundamentadas linguisticamente. Nosso trabalho aumenta significativamente a correspondência na estrutura de composição entre MRs e melhora o aprendizado multitarefa (MTL) em um ambiente de poucos recursos, servindo como uma prova de conceito para futura normalização cruzada de MRs em larga escala.', 'es': 'La aparición de una variedad de representaciones de significado (MR) basadas en gráficos ha provocado una importante conversación sobre cómo representar adecuadamente la estructura semántica. Los MR exhiben diferencias estructurales que reflejan diferentes consideraciones teóricas y de diseño, lo que presenta desafíos para el análisis lingüístico uniforme y el análisis semántico intermarco. Aquí, nos preguntamos qué diferencias de diseño entre los MR son significativas y están arraigadas semánticamente, y cuáles son superficiales. Presentamos una metodología para normalizar las discrepancias entre MR a nivel composicional (Lindemann et al., 2019), encontrando que podemos normalizar la mayoría de los fenómenos divergentes utilizando reglas basadas en el lenguaje. Nuestro trabajo aumenta significativamente la correspondencia en la estructura compositiva entre los MR y mejora el aprendizaje multitarea (MTL) en un entorno de pocos recursos, lo que sirve como prueba de concepto para la futura normalización de RMN cruzada a gran escala.', 'fr': "L'émergence d'une variété de représentations de signification (MR) basées sur des graphes a suscité une discussion importante sur la façon de représenter correctement la structure sémantique. Les MR présentent des différences structurelles qui reflètent différentes considérations théoriques et conceptuelles, ce qui pose des défis pour l'uniformisation de l'analyse linguistique et de l'analyse sémantique inter-cadres. Nous posons ici la question de savoir quelles différences de conception entre les MR sont significatives et sémantiquement enracinées, et lesquelles sont superficielles. Nous présentons une méthodologie pour normaliser les divergences entre les MR au niveau de la composition (Lindemann et al., 2019), en constatant que nous pouvons normaliser la majorité des phénomènes divergents à l'aide de règles fondées sur la langue. Notre travail augmente considérablement l'adéquation de la structure compositionnelle entre les MR et améliore l'apprentissage multitâche (MTL) dans un environnement à faibles ressources, servant de preuve de concept pour une future normalisation inter-RM à grande échelle.", 'ja': 'さまざまなグラフベースの意味表現（ MR ）の出現は、意味構造を適切に表現する方法についての重要な会話を引き起こしました。MRは、異なる理論的および設計上の考慮事項を反映した構造的な違いを示し、統一された言語学的分析とクロスファームセマンティック構文解析に課題を提示する。ここでは、MR間のデザインの違いが意味があり、意味論的に根付いているのか、表面的であるのかという問題を提起します。我々は、構成レベルでMR間の矛盾を正規化するための方法論を提示し（ Lindemann et al., 2019 ）、言語学的に基礎づけられた規則を使用して乖離現象の大部分を正規化することができることを発見した。私たちの研究は、MR間の構成構造のマッチングを大幅に増加させ、低資源環境でのマルチタスク学習（ MTL ）を改善し、将来の大規模なクロスMR正規化のための概念の証明として役立ちます。', 'zh': '诸图义(MRs)引语义结构之要。 MR见构异,异论设虑,一言析跨框架语义解析挑战。 此其所问,MRs间设异有义,且语义根植,孰为肤浅。 建一组归一化MR异法(Lindemann等,2019)见言语之法,多所归一化。 吾事著于 MR ,而易低资源于多任务学 (MTL),为来者大跨 MR 规范化以资其名。', 'hi': 'विभिन्न प्रकार के ग्राफ-आधारित अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (MRs) के उद्भव ने शब्दार्थ संरचना का पर्याप्त रूप से प्रतिनिधित्व करने के तरीके के बारे में एक महत्वपूर्ण वार्तालाप को जन्म दिया है। एमआर संरचनात्मक मतभेदों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं जो विभिन्न सैद्धांतिक और डिजाइन विचारों को प्रतिबिंबित करते हैं, समान भाषाई विश्लेषण और क्रॉस-फ्रेमवर्क सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग के लिए चुनौतियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं। यहां, हम यह सवाल पूछते हैं कि एमआर के बीच कौन से डिजाइन अंतर सार्थक और शब्दार्थ-निहित हैं, और जो सतही हैं। हम रचनात्मक स्तर (लिंडेमैन एट अल. 2019) पर MRs के बीच विसंगतियों को सामान्य करने के लिए एक पद्धति प्रस्तुत करते हैं, यह पाते हुए कि हम भाषाई रूप से आधारित नियमों का उपयोग करके अधिकांश अलग-अलग घटनाओं को सामान्य कर सकते हैं। हमारा काम MRs के बीच compositional संरचना में मैच को काफी बढ़ाता है और कम संसाधन सेटिंग में बहु-कार्य सीखने (MTL) में सुधार करता है, जो भविष्य के व्यापक पैमाने पर क्रॉस-एमआर सामान्यीकरण के लिए अवधारणा के प्रमाण के रूप में कार्य करता है।', 'ru': 'Появление различных представлений смысла на основе графов (MR) вызвало важный разговор о том, как адекватно представить семантическую структуру. МР проявляют структурные различия, которые отражают различные теоретические и конструктивные соображения, представляя проблемы для единообразного лингвистического анализа и кросс-кадрового семантического анализа. Здесь мы задаем вопрос о том, какие конструктивные различия между МР являются значимыми и семантически укоренившимися, а какие поверхностными. Представляем методику нормализации расхождений между МР на композиционном уровне (Lindemann et al., 2019), обнаружив, что можно нормализовать большинство расхождений феноменов, используя лингвистически обоснованные правила. Наша работа значительно увеличивает соответствие в композиционной структуре между MRs и улучшает многозадачное обучение (MTL) в условиях низких ресурсов, служа как доказательство концепции для будущей широкомасштабной перекрестной нормализации MR.', 'ga': 'Tá teacht chun cinn léirithe brí éagsúla bunaithe ar ghraif (MRanna) tar éis comhrá tábhachtach a spreagadh faoi conas struchtúr séimeantach a léiriú go leordhóthanach. Léiríonn MRanna difríochtaí struchtúracha a léiríonn cúinsí teoiriciúla agus dearaidh éagsúla, a chuireann dúshláin i leith anailíse aonfhoirmeach teanga agus parsáil shéimeantach tras-chreatoibre. Anseo, cuirimid an cheist maidir le cé na difríochtaí dearaidh idir MRanna atá brí agus fréamhaithe go séimeantach, agus atá dromchlach. Cuirimid modheolaíocht i láthair chun neamhréireachtaí idir MRanna ag an leibhéal comhdhéanamh a normalú (Lindemann et al., 2019), ag fáil amach gur féidir linn formhór na bhfeiniméin éagsúla a normalú trí úsáid a bhaint as rialacha atá bunaithe ar theangeolaíocht. Méadaíonn ár gcuid oibre go suntasach an mheaitseáil struchtúr comhdhéanaimh idir MRanna agus feabhsaítear foghlaim ilthasc (MTL) i suíomh acmhainní ísle, ag feidhmiú mar chruthúnas ar choincheap le haghaidh normalú tras-MR ar scála leathan amach anseo.', 'el': 'Η εμφάνιση μιας ποικιλίας συμβολικών αναπαραστάσεων βασισμένων σε γραφήματα έχει πυροδοτήσει μια σημαντική συζήτηση σχετικά με το πώς να αναπαραστήσει επαρκώς τη σημασιολογική δομή. Οι μαγνητικές αναλύσεις παρουσιάζουν δομικές διαφορές που αντικατοπτρίζουν διαφορετικές θεωρητικές και σχεδιαστικές εκτιμήσεις, παρουσιάζοντας προκλήσεις για την ομοιόμορφη γλωσσική ανάλυση και τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση μεταξύ πλαισίων. Εδώ, θέτουμε το ερώτημα ποιες σχεδιαστικές διαφορές μεταξύ των MR είναι σημαντικές και σημασιολογικά ριζωμένες, και ποιες είναι επιφανειακές. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μεθοδολογία για την ομαλοποίηση των διαφορών μεταξύ των μαγνητικών σε επίπεδο σύνθεσης (κ.α., 2019), διαπιστώνοντας ότι μπορούμε να ομαλοποιήσουμε την πλειοψηφία των αποκλίνουσων φαινομένων χρησιμοποιώντας γλωσσικά θεμελιωμένους κανόνες. Η εργασία μας αυξάνει σημαντικά την αντιστοιχία στη δομή της σύνθεσης μεταξύ των μαγνητικών και βελτιώνει την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών (ΜΤΛ) σε ένα περιβάλλον χαμηλού πόρων, λειτουργώντας ως απόδειξη της έννοιας για μελλοντική ευρεία ομαλοποίηση διασταυρούμενων μαγνητικών.', 'hu': 'A különböző gráf alapú jelentésreformációk (MR) megjelenése fontos beszélgetést indított arról, hogyan lehet megfelelően reprezentálni a szemantikai struktúrát. Az MR-k strukturális különbségeket mutatnak, amelyek különböző elméleti és tervezési megfontolásokat tükröznek, kihívásokat jelentenek az egységes nyelvi elemzés és a keretek közötti szemantikai elemzés szempontjából. Itt azt a kérdést teszük fel, hogy az MR-k közötti tervezési különbségek melyek jelentősek és szemantikailag gyökeresek, és melyek felületesek. Bemutatjuk az MR-k közötti eltérések normalizálásának módszertanát kompozíciós szinten (Lindemann et al., 2019), megállapítva, hogy a különböző jelenségek többségét nyelvi alapú szabályok segítségével normalizálhatjuk. Munkánk jelentősen növeli az MR-k kompozíciós struktúrájának megfelelőségét, és javítja a többfeladatos tanulást (MTL) alacsony erőforrásokkal rendelkező környezetben, ami bizonyítja a jövőbeni széleskörű cross-MR normalizáció koncepcióját.', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული განსხვავებული გრაფიკური განსხვავებების გამოსახულება (MRs) გამოიყენება გასანიშვნელოვანი პარამეტრების შესახებ როგორ საკმაოდ სემონტიკური სტრუქტურაცი MRs გამოჩვენებს სტრუქტურული განსხვავებები, რომლებიც განსხვავებენ ტეორეტიკური და დიზაინის განსხვავებები, რომლებიც განსხვავებენ განსხვავებების განსხვავებას, რომლებიც განსხვავებენ აქ, ჩვენ კითხვა, რომელის განსხვავებას MRs-ის განსხვავებას უნიშვნელოვანია და სმენტიკურად გამოყენებულია, და რომელიც უფრო მუშაობელია. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მეტოლოგია MRs-ის განსხვავებების ნორმალურად კომპოზიციონალური დონეში (Lindemann et al., 2019), რომელიც აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ნორმალურად განსხვავებული ფენომენების უფრო მეტის ნორმა ჩვენი სამუშაო მნიშვნელოვანად კომპოციონალური სტრუქტურაში კომპოციონალური სტრუქტურაში გაზრუნდება და მრავალური სამუშაო სწავლებაში (MTL) გაზრუნდება, რომელიც იმუშაობს მო', 'mk': 'Почнувањето на различни графички представувања на значење (МР) предизвика важен разговор за тоа како соодветно да ја претставува семантичната структура. МР изложуваат структурни разлики кои ги одразуваат различните теоретички и дизајнски концентрации, претставувајќи предизвици за униформирана лингвистичка анализа и прекурамковна семантична анализа. Тука, го поставуваме прашањето кои разлики во дизајнот помеѓу МР се значајни и семантички корени, и кои се површни. Презентираме методологија за нормализирање на дискрепанциите помеѓу МР на композициско ниво (Lindemann итн., 2019), откривајќи дека можеме да го нормализираме мнозинството дивергентни феномени користејќи лингвистички основани правила. Нашата работа значително го зголемува совпаѓањето во композициската структура помеѓу МР и го подобрува учењето на мултизадачи (МТЛ) во поставување со ниски ресурси, служејќи како доказ за концептот за идната широка крсто-МР нормализација.', 'kk': 'Графикалық негіздеген түрлі мәліметтердің (МР) түрлі сұрақтары симпатикалық құрылғыны қалай дұрыс көрсету үшін маңызды сұрақтар жасады. МР түрлі теоретикалық және дизайнды түрлендіретін структуралық түрлендірімдерді көрсетеді, лингвистикалық анализ және меңзердің біріктіретін семантикалық талдау үшін мәселелерді көрсетеді. Мұнда, МР арасындағы қандай дизайн айырмашылығының маңызды және семантикалық түрінде тұратынын сұрақ береміз. МР арасындағы тәртіпсіздіктерді түрлендіру методологиясы (Lindemann et al., 2019). Біз лингвистикалық тәртіпсіздік ережелерді қолдану үшін көпшілігін түрлендіруге болады. МР арасындағы композиционалық құрылымыздың сәйкестігін көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту (MTL) деген көптеген ресурстардың төменгі баптауына көптеген, келесі көптеген MR нормализациясының концепциясының құ', 'it': "L'emergere di una varietà di rappresentazioni di significato basate su grafici (MRs) ha innescato un'importante conversazione su come rappresentare adeguatamente la struttura semantica. Le MR presentano differenze strutturali che riflettono diverse considerazioni teoriche e progettuali, presentando sfide all'analisi linguistica uniforme e all'analisi semantica cross-framework. Qui, ci poniamo la domanda di quali differenze progettuali tra MR sono significative e semanticamente radicate, e quali sono superficiali. Presentiamo una metodologia per normalizzare le discrepanze tra MR a livello compositivo (Lindemann et al., 2019), trovando che possiamo normalizzare la maggior parte dei fenomeni divergenti utilizzando regole basate sul linguaggio. Il nostro lavoro aumenta significativamente la corrispondenza nella struttura compositiva tra MR e migliora l'apprendimento multi-task (MTL) in un ambiente a basso consumo di risorse, servendo come prova del concetto per la futura normalizzazione cross-MR su larga scala.", 'lt': 'Įvairių grafiniu pagrindu pagrįstų reikšmių (MR) atsiradimas paskatino svarbų diskusiją apie tai, kaip tinkamai atstovauti semantinei struktūrai. MR rodo struktūrinius skirtumus, kurie atspindi skirtingus teorinius ir dizaino aspektus, keliančius iššūkius vienodai kalbinei analizei ir tarpusavio semantiniam analizavimui. Čia mes užduodame klausimą, kokie dizaino skirtumai tarp MR yra reikšmingi ir semantiškai šaknijami, ir kurie yra paviršiniai. Pateikiame metodiką, pagal kurią normalizuojami MR skirtumai sudėties lygiu (Lindemann et al., 2019 m.), nustatydami, kad galime normalizuoti daugumą skirtingų reiškinių taikant kalbomis pagrįstas taisykles. Mūsų darbas gerokai padidina MR sudėtinės struktūros atitiktį ir gerina daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi mažai išteklių turinčiais ištekliais, o tai įrodo, kad ateityje bus galima plačiai normalizuoti MR.', 'ml': 'The emergence of a variety of graph-based meaning representations (MRs) has sparked an important conversation about how to adequately represent semantic structure.  വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകരണവും ഡിസൈനിക്കങ്ങളും പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d എംആര്\u200dഎസ് പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷ അന്വേഷണങ്ങളും ക്രിസ് ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ചോദിക്കുന്നത് എംആര്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ഇടയിലെ വ്യത്യാസവും അര്\u200dത്ഥവും അര്\u200dഥിക്കുന്ന വേര്\u200dത്തകളുമാണെന്നും, അത് വളരെ അധി നമ്മള്\u200d എംആര്\u200dസിന്റെ ഇടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണമാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ലിന്\u200dഡെമാന്\u200d എ.എല്\u200d, 2019, ഭാഷ ഭാഷയിലുള്ള നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോ നമ്മുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് എംആര്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ഇടയിലുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള കളിയ്ക്ക് വളര്\u200dത്തുകയും, കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ (എംടിഎല്\u200d) പഠിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത', 'mn': 'График суурилсан олон төрлийн утгатай үзүүлэлт (МР) нь семантийн бүтцийг хэрхэн зөвхөн илэрхийлэх талаар чухал яриаг эхлүүлсэн. МР нь өөр теоретик болон дизайны санааг илэрхийлж буй бүтэц ялгааг илэрхийлж, хэлний шинжилгээг нэгтгэх болон олон хэмжээсүүдийг нэгтгэх сорилтуудыг харуулдаг. Энд бид MR-ын ямар төрлийн өөрчлөлт гэдгийг асууж байна. Энэ нь юу гэсэн үг вэ гэвэл semantic rooted гэдгийг асууж байна. Бид МР-ын зохиолын түвшинд (Линдманн т.л., 2019) ялгаатай байдлыг нормалчлахын тулд нэг арга загвар өгдөг. Бид хэлний үндсэн дүрмийг ашиглаж болно. Бидний ажил МР хоорондын биеийн бүтцийн тоглоомыг маш чухал нэмэгдүүлж, олон ажил суралцах (МТЛ) бага нөөц байгууллагын тулд, ирээдүйн өргөн хэмжээний МР хэмжээний нормализацийн ойлголтын баталгаар ажилладаг.', 'mt': 'Il-ħolqien ta’ varjetà ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tifsira bbażati fuq il-grafika (MRs) wassal għal konverżjoni importanti dwar kif għandha tiġi rrappreżentata b’mod adegwat l-istruttura semantika. L-MRs juru differenzi strutturali li jirriflettu kunsiderazzjonijiet teoretiċi u tad-disinn differenti, li jippreżentaw sfidi għal analiżi lingwistika uniformi u analiżi semantika trans-qafas. Hawnhekk, nistaqsu liema differenzi fid-disinn bejn l-MRs huma sinifikanti u b’għeruq semantiku, u li huma superfiċjali. Aħna nippreżentaw metodoloġija għan-normalizzazzjoni tad-diskrepanzi bejn l-MRs fil-livell tal-kompożizzjoni (Lindemann et al., 2019), u nsibu li nistgħu ninnormalizzaw il-maġġoranza tal-fenomeni diverġenti bl-użu ta’ regoli bbażati fuq il-lingwi. Ix-xogħol tagħna jżid b’mod sinifikanti l-ugwaljanza fl-istruttura kompożittiva bejn l-MRs u jtejjeb it-tagħlim multikompitu (MTL) f’ambjent b’riżorsi baxxi, li jservi bħala prova ta’ kunċett għan-normalizzazzjoni trans-MR fuq skala wiesgħa fil-ġejjieni.', 'ms': 'The emergence of a variety of graph-based meaning representations (MRs) has sparked an important conversation about how to adequately represent semantic structure.  MR menunjukkan perbezaan struktur yang mencerminkan pertimbangan teori dan rancangan yang berbeza, memperkenalkan cabaran untuk analisis bahasa yang sesuai dan penghuraian semantik melintas-kerangka. Di sini, kita bertanya soalan mana perbezaan rancangan antara MR bermakna dan bermakna secara semantik, dan yang permukaan. Kami memperkenalkan metodologi untuk normalisasikan perbezaan antara MR pada tahap komposisi (Lindemann et al., 2019), mencari bahawa kita boleh normalisasikan kebanyakan fenomena yang berbeza menggunakan peraturan berdasarkan bahasa. Kerja kami meningkatkan dengan signifikan persamaan dalam struktur komposisi antara MR dan meningkatkan pembelajaran-tugas-berbilang (MTL) dalam tetapan sumber rendah, berkhidmat sebagai bukti konsep untuk normalisasi-MR skala luas masa depan.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av eit ulike grafikkbasert meningsrepresentasjonar (MRs) har sparka ein viktig samtale om korleis det skal tilpassa semantisk struktur. MR-ar viser strukturelle forskjeller som reflekserer ulike teoretiske og design-konseksjonar, og viser utfordringar for å uniformera lingvistiske analyse og semantisk analyse av kryssambandet. Her spør vi spørsmålet om kva design forskjeller mellom MR er betydelig og semantisk rotert, og kva er superficial. Vi presenterer ein metodologi for å normalisere ulike forskjeller mellom MR på samordningsnivået (Lindemann et al., 2019), og finn at vi kan normalisere dei fleste forskjellige fenomena ved hjelp av språkbrukte reglar. Arbeidet vårt øker betydelig treff i komposisjonsstrukturen mellom MR og forbedrar fleire oppgåver læring (MTL) i ei låg ressursinnstilling, som tener som bevis av konsept for framtidige breidskala kryss-MR-normalisering.', 'pl': 'Pojawienie się różnych reprezentacji znaczenia opartych na wykresie (MR) wywołało ważną rozmowę o tym, jak odpowiednio reprezentować strukturę semantyczną. MR wykazują różnice strukturalne, które odzwierciedlają różne rozważania teoretyczne i projektowe, stwarzając wyzwania dla jednolitej analizy językowej i cross-frameworkowego parsowania semantycznego. Tutaj zadajemy pytanie, które różnice projektowe pomiędzy MR są znaczące i semantycznie zakorzenione, a które są powierzchowne. Przedstawiamy metodologię normalizacji rozbieżności pomiędzy MR na poziomie kompozycyjnym (Lindemann et al., 2019), stwierdzając, że możemy normalizować większość zjawisk rozbieżnych za pomocą językowo uzasadnionych reguł. Nasza praca znacząco zwiększa dopasowanie struktury kompozycyjnej pomiędzy MR i usprawnia wielozadaniowe uczenie się (MTL) w warunkach niskich zasobów, służąc jako dowód koncepcji przyszłej normalizacji cross-MR na szeroką skalę.', 'ro': 'Apariția unei varietăți de reprezentări de semnificații bazate pe grafice (MRs) a declanșat o conversație importantă despre cum să reprezinte în mod adecvat structura semantică. MR prezintă diferențe structurale care reflectă diferite considerații teoretice și de design, prezentând provocări pentru analiza lingvistică uniformă și analiza semantică cross-framework. Aici, ne punem întrebarea care diferențe de design între MR sunt semnificative și semantic înrădăcinate și care sunt superficiale. Prezentăm o metodologie pentru normalizarea discrepanțelor dintre MR la nivel compozițional (Lindemann et al., 2019), constatând că putem normaliza majoritatea fenomenelor divergente folosind reguli bazate pe lingvistică. Activitatea noastră crește semnificativ potrivirea în structura compozițională dintre MR și îmbunătățește învățarea multi-task (MTL) într-un cadru cu resurse scăzute, servind ca o dovadă a conceptului pentru viitoarea normalizare cross-MR la scară largă.', 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaaqa farshaxanka kala duduwan (MRs) ayaa kiciyey hadal muhiim ah oo ku saabsan sida loo wakiilayo dhismaha semantika. MRs waxay muujiyaan kala duwanaanshaha dhismaha oo ka fiirsada xisaabta kala duduwan ee theoretical iyo design, waxayna soo bandhigtaa dhibaatooyin ay u sameyn karto baaritaanka luuqada iyo baaritaanka semantic. Halkan, waxaynu waydiinnaa su'aalaha ku saabsan qoraalka kala duwan ee MRs u dhexeeya waxyaabaha leh iyo xilliga kala duwan, kuwaas oo ah mid aad u sareeya. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaabab ku caadi ah si aan u kala soocno sinnaanta u dhexeeya MRs-da heerka kooxaha (Lindemann et al., 2019), waxaynu ogaanayn in aan si caadi ah u caadi ahaan karno waxyaalaha badan oo kala duduwan oo isticmaalaya sharciyada afka lagu aasay. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu si weyn u kordhiyaa jimicsiga dhismaha hoose ee MRs dhexe, wuxuuna hagaajiyaa waxbarashada waxbarashada waxbarashada badan (MTL) si ay ugu adeegaan caddeynta fikrada fudud ee fududaadka u dhexaysa oo u dhexeeya koritaanka kordhinta MR.", 'sr': 'Pojavljivanje raznih predstavljanja na grafiku (MR) izazvalo je važan razgovor o tome kako adekvatno predstavljati semantičku strukturu. MR pokazuju strukturne razlike koje odražavaju različite teorijske i dizajnske razmišljanje, predstavljajući izazove za uniformnu lingvističku analizu i semantičku analizu preko okvira. Postavljamo pitanje koje su razlike dizajna između MR-a značajne i semantički korijene i koje su površne. Predstavljamo metodologiju za normalizaciju neslaganja između MR na kompozicionalnom nivou (Lindemann et al., 2019), otkrivajući da možemo normalizirati većinu različitih fenomena koristeći jezički temeljene pravila. Naš rad značajno povećava utakmicu u kompozicionalnoj strukturi između MR-a i poboljšava učenje više zadataka (MTL) u nizim resursima, službeno kao dokaz koncepta za buduću široku normalizaciju preko MR-a.', 'si': 'විවිධ සංවිධානය සඳහා විවිධ සංවිධානය (MRs) ගැන විශේෂ සංවිධානය සඳහා වැදගත් කතා කරනවා කොහොමද සංවිධ MRs ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා වෙනස් සිද්ධාත්මක සහ සිද්ධාත්මක විශේෂය, භාෂාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ක්\u200dරිස්ටර්මාටික විශේෂණය ස මෙතන, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය අහනවා MRs අතර කොච්චර වෙනස් විදිහක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා, සැමාන්තික විදිහක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා අපි පිළිගන්නවා MRs අතර සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් කරන්න (Lindemann et al., 2019), අපිට භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා භාෂාවික විශේ අපේ වැඩේ ගොඩක් වැඩියි MRs අතර සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථානයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය වැඩි කරනවා ඒ වගේම ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැ', 'sv': 'Framväxten av en mängd olika grafbaserade betydelserepresentationer (MRs) har utlöst en viktig konversation om hur man på lämpligt sätt representerar semantisk struktur. MR uppvisar strukturella skillnader som återspeglar olika teoretiska och designmässiga överväganden, vilket innebär utmaningar för enhetlig språklig analys och semantisk tolkning över ramar. Här ställer vi frågan om vilka designskillnader mellan MR är meningsfulla och semantiskt rotade och vilka som är ytliga. Vi presenterar en metod för att normalisera avvikelser mellan MR på kompositionsnivå (Lindemann et al., 2019) och konstaterar att vi kan normalisera majoriteten av avvikelser med hjälp av språkligt grundade regler. Vårt arbete ökar signifikant matchningen i kompositionell struktur mellan MR och förbättrar multi-task learning (MTL) i en lågresursmiljö, vilket fungerar som ett bevis på koncept för framtida bred cross-MR normalisering.', 'ta': 'பல்வேறு வரைபடத்திலுள்ள அர்த்தமான பிரிவுகள் (எம்ஆர்கள்) வெளியேற்றப்பட்டுள்ளது பெம்மான்டிக் கட்டத்தை எவ்வாறு போதுமான குறி MRs அமைப்பு வேறுபாடுகளை காட்டுகிறது அது வேறு திடீரியல் மற்றும் வடிவமைப்பு கருத்துக்களை பிரித்துக் கொள்கிறது, மொழிய ஆய்வு மற்றும இங்கே நாம் MRகளுக்கு இடையே உள்ள வடிவமைப்பு வேறுபாடுகள் என்பது அர்த்தமுள்ளது மற்றும் அர்த்தமான மூலம் மற்றும் அது மேல்மையா தொகுதி நிலையில் MRகளுக்கு இடையே உள்ள வேறுபாடுகளை இயல்பாக்கும் முறையில் நாம் கொண்டுள்ளோம் (லின்டெமான் மற்றும் அல், 2019) கண்டுபிடித்து நாம் மொழியில எம்ஆர்களுக்கு இடையே உள்ள தொகுப்பு அமைப்பில் எங்கள் வேலை முக்கியமாக அதிகரிக்கும் மற்றும் குறைந்த மூல அமைப்பில் பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் மேம்படுத்துகிறது,', 'ur': 'ایک مختلف گراف بنیاد کی معنی کی اضطراری (MRs) نے ایک اہم بات بنائی ہے کہ سیمنٹی ساختار کیسے اچھی طرح دکھائی جائے۔ MRs مختلف نظریات اور طراحی نظریات کی تفاوت کی تفاوت دیتے ہیں، زبان شناسی تحلیل اور کروس-فرمیم سیمانٹی پارسینگ کی تفاوت کے لئے چالیں دکھاتے ہیں. یہاں ہم پوچھتے ہیں کہ MRs کے درمیان کس طراحی اختلاف کا مطلب ہے اور سیمانٹی جڑ کی ہے، اور جو بالائی ہیں. ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں MRs کے درمیان تفریقوں کو کامپیوتنی سطح (Lindemann et al., 2019) کے ساتھ عامل کرنے کے لئے، اور یہ معلوم کرتے ہیں کہ ہم زبان بوسیدہ قانون کے مطابق مختلف فعالیتوں کی اکثریت کو عامل کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارا کام مضبوط طور پر MRs کے درمیان موجودات کی ساختاری میں مطابق زیادہ کرتا ہے اور بہت سے کام کی تعلیم (MTL) کو کم رسسور کے تنظیم میں زیادہ زیادہ کرتا ہے، جو مستقبل براڈ-اسکیل کرس-MR نارمولیزی کے لئے مطابق کا ثابت کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik raqamlarning turli ma'nosi (MRs) tashkilotlari esa semantik tuzuvni qanday tayyorlash uchun muhim muloqat bilan boshlaydi. Name Bu yerda, biz MR'ning orasidagi dizayning o'zgarishlari haqida ma'lumot va semantikal soʻzlari va juda ajoyib. We present a methodology for normalizing discrepancies between MRs at the compositional level (Lindemann et al., 2019), finding that we can normalize the majority of divergent phenomena using linguistically-grounded rules.  Bizning ishimiz MRs orasidagi kompyuterlar o'rtasida o'yicha o'yinlarni ko'paytirish va bir manbaning o'rganish (MTL) ta'limni ko'paytirish imkoniyatlarida bajaradi, kelajak kengaytirilgan kengaytmalar orqali MR normalisiyatlariga ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Sự xuất hiện của các biểu tượng ý nghĩa theo đồ thị khác nhau (MRs) đã bắt đầu cuộc đối thoại quan trọng về cách đại diện ngữ pháp thích hợp. Ảnh cộng hưởng từ cho thấy sự khác nhau về mặt lý thuyết và thiết kế khác nhau, thách thức cho việc phân tích ngôn ngữ đồng bộ và phân tích chữ thập. Ở đây, chúng tôi đặt câu hỏi về sự khác biệt thiết kế giữa MR có ý nghĩa và ngữ pháp bền bỉ và nông cạn. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp tiêu hóa sự khác biệt giữa MRs ở cấp độ phân phối (Lindenn et al., 99), tìm ra rằng chúng tôi có thể bình thường hầu hết các hiện tượng khác nhau sử dụng các quy tắc ngôn ngữ học. Công việc của chúng ta tăng tỷ lệ phối hợp giữa MRs và cải thiện việc học đa nhiệm vụ (MTV) trong một môi trường ít tài nguyên, đóng vai trò minh chứng cho kế hoạch tổng hợp khổng lồ trong tương lai.', 'hr': 'Pojavljivanje različitih predstavljanja značenja na grafiku (MR) izazvalo je važan razgovor o tome kako adekvatno predstavljati semantičku strukturu. MR pokazuju strukturne razlike koje odražavaju različite teorijske i dizajnske razmišljanje, predstavljajući izazove za ujedinjenu jezičku analizu i semantičku analizu prekogramskog okvira. Ovdje postavljamo pitanje o kojim su razlike dizajna između MR-a značajne i semantički korijenjene i koje su površne. Predstavljamo metodologiju za normalizaciju neslaganja između MR na kompozicionalnoj razini (Lindemann et al., 2019), otkrivajući da možemo normalizirati većinu različitih fenomena koristeći jezički temeljene pravila. Naš rad značajno povećava utakmicu u kompozicionalnoj strukturi između MR-a i poboljšava učenje multizadataka (MTL) u nizim resursima, službeno kao dokaz koncepta za buduću široku normalizaciju preko MR-a.', 'bg': 'Появата на различни графични символни представи предизвика важен разговор за това как да представим адекватно семантичната структура. ОМР показват структурни разлики, които отразяват различни теоретични и дизайнерски съображения, представляващи предизвикателства за единен лингвистичен анализ и междурамково семантично анализиране. Тук задаваме въпроса кои дизайнерски разлики между МР са смислени и семантично вкоренени и кои са повърхностни. Представяме методология за нормализиране на несъответствията между МР на композиционно ниво (Линдеман и др., 2019), като констатираме, че можем да нормализираме по-голямата част от дивергентните явления с помощта на лингвистично обосновани правила. Нашата работа значително увеличава съвпадението в композиционната структура между МР и подобрява многозадачното обучение (МТЛ) в среда с ниски ресурси, служейки като доказателство за концепцията за бъдещо широкомащабно кръстосано МР нормализиране.', 'da': "Fremkomsten af en række grafbaserede meningsrepræsentationer (MRs) har sat gang i en vigtig samtale om, hvordan man på passende vis repræsenterer semantisk struktur. MR'er udviser strukturelle forskelle, der afspejler forskellige teoretiske og designmæssige overvejelser, hvilket giver udfordringer til ensartet sproglig analyse og semantisk analyse på tværs af rammer. Her stiller vi spørgsmålet om, hvilke designforskelle mellem MR'er der er meningsfulde og semantisk rodfæstede, og hvilke der er overfladiske. Vi præsenterer en metode til normalisering af forskelle mellem MR'er på sammensætningsniveau (Lindemann et al., 2019), idet vi finder, at vi kan normalisere størstedelen af forskellige fænomener ved hjælp af sprogbaserede regler. Vores arbejde øger væsentligt matchet i kompositionsstruktur mellem MR'er og forbedrer multi-task learning (MTL) i en lav ressource-indstilling, der tjener som et bevis på koncept for fremtidig bredskala cross-MR normalisering.", 'nl': "De opkomst van een verscheidenheid aan grafiekgebaseerde betekenisrepresentaties (MR's) heeft een belangrijk gesprek aangewakkerd over hoe semantische structuur adequaat kan worden weergegeven. MR's vertonen structurele verschillen die verschillende theoretische en ontwerpoverwegingen weerspiegelen, wat uitdagingen oplevert voor uniforme linguïstische analyse en cross-framework semantische parsing. Hier stellen we de vraag welke ontwerpverschillen tussen MR's betekenisvol en semantisch geworteld zijn, en welke oppervlakkig. We presenteren een methodologie voor het normaliseren van discrepanties tussen MR's op compositioneel niveau (Lindemann et al., 2019), waaruit blijkt dat we de meerderheid van divergente fenomenen kunnen normaliseren met behulp van taalkundige grondregels. Ons werk verhoogt significant de match in compositionele structuur tussen MR's en verbetert multi-task learning (MTL) in een low-resource setting, wat dient als proof of concept voor toekomstige grootschalige cross-MR normalisatie.", 'de': 'Die Entstehung einer Vielzahl von graphenbasierten Bedeutungsreprﾃ､sentationen (MRs) hat eine wichtige Diskussion darﾃｼber ausgelﾃｶst, wie semantische Strukturen adﾃ､quat dargestellt werden kﾃｶnnen. MRs weisen strukturelle Unterschiede auf, die unterschiedliche theoretische und gestalterische ﾃ彙erlegungen widerspiegeln und Herausforderungen fﾃｼr eine einheitliche linguistische Analyse und frameworkﾃｼbergreifendes semantisches Parsing darstellen. Hier stellen wir die Frage, welche Designunterschiede zwischen MRs sinnvoll und semantisch verwurzelt sind und welche oberflﾃ､chlich sind. Wir prﾃ､sentieren eine Methodik zur Normalisierung von Diskrepanzen zwischen MRs auf kompositorischer Ebene (Lindemann et al., 2019), die zeigt, dass wir die Mehrheit der divergenten Phﾃ､nomene mit linguistisch fundierten Regeln normalisieren kﾃｶnnen. Unsere Arbeit erhﾃｶht die ﾃ彙ereinstimmung in der Kompositionsstruktur zwischen MRs signifikant und verbessert das Multi-Task-Lernen (MTL) in einem ressourcenarmen Umfeld, was als Proof of Concept fﾃｼr eine zukﾃｼnftige breit angelegte MR-Cross-MR-Normalisierung dient.', 'ko': '각종 도형에 기초한 의미표시(MRs)의 출현은 의미구조를 어떻게 충분히 나타낼 것인가에 대한 중요한 토론을 불러일으켰다.MRs의 구조적 차이는 서로 다른 이론과 디자인 고려를 반영하는데 이것은 통일된 언어 분석과 크로스 프레임 의미 분석에 도전을 주었다.여기서 우리가 묻고자 하는 문제는 MRs 간의 어떤 디자인 차이가 의미가 있고 어떤 것이 의미적이며 어떤 것이 천박한 것이냐는 것이다.MRs 간 차이를 성분 수준에서 규범화하는 방법(Lindemann et al., 2019)을 제시했는데, 우리는 언어에 기반한 규칙을 사용하여 대부분의 이견 현상을 규범화할 수 있음을 발견했다.우리의 작업은 MRs 간의 성분 구조 일치를 현저하게 증가시켰고 저자원 환경에서 멀티태스킹 학습(MTL)을 개선하여 미래의 대규모 크로스 MR 규범화에 개념적 증명을 제공했다.', 'id': 'Kemunculan dari berbagai macam representation berarti berbasis grafik (MR) telah menimbulkan percakapan penting tentang bagaimana mewakili struktur semantis secara adekwat. MR menunjukkan perbedaan struktur yang mencerminkan pertimbangan teori dan desain yang berbeda, menunjukkan tantangan untuk analisis bahasa seragam dan penganalisan semantis melintasi rangkaian. Di sini, kita bertanya apa perbedaan desain antara MR yang berarti dan semantis-rooted, dan yang superficial. Kami mempersembahkan metodologi untuk normalisasi perbedaan antara MR pada tingkat komposisi (Lindemann et al., 2019), menemukan bahwa kita dapat normalisasi kebanyakan fenomena yang berbeda menggunakan aturan berbasis bahasa. Pekerjaan kami meningkatkan secara signifikan persamaan dalam struktur komposisi antara MR dan meningkatkan pelajaran multi-tugas (MTL) dalam setting sumber daya rendah, melayani sebagai bukti konsep untuk normalisasi trans-MR skala luas masa depan.', 'fa': 'اضطراری از مختلف معنی بنیاد گراف (MRs) یک مکالمه مهم در مورد چگونه قابل توضیح ساختار semantic را نشان داده است. MR تفاوت ساختاری را نشان می دهد که تفاوت های تئوری و طراحی مختلف را نشان می دهد، و چالش ها را برای تحلیل زبان\u200cشناسی متحد می\u200cکند و تجزیه\u200cهای semantic cross-framework را نشان می\u200cدهد. در اینجا، ما سؤال می\u200cپرسیم که تفاوت طراحی بین MRs معنی و ریشه\u200cهای طبیعی معنی دارند، و این\u200cها طبیعی هستند. ما روش\u200cشناسی برای تعیین اختلافات بین MRs در سطح ترکیب (Lindemann et al., 2019) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتوانیم بسیاری از پدیده\u200cهای مختلف را با استفاده از قوانین زبان\u200cشناسی معمول کنیم. کارمون به طور معنی مسابقه در ساختار ترکیب بین MRs افزایش می\u200cدهد و آموزش چندین کار (MTL) را در یک تنظیم منابع کم بهتر می\u200cکند، که به عنوان ثابت مفهوم برای نورمیزی قابل مقیاس فراوانی MR در آینده می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'Kujitokeza kwa uwakilishi wa aina mbalimbali wa picha (MRs) umeibua mazungumzo muhimu kuhusu namna ya kuwakilisha muundo wa kimapenzi. MRs inaonyesha tofauti za miundombinu ambazo zinaonyesha tafakari tofauti za nadharia na ubunifu, zinazoonyesha changamoto za kuunda uchambuzi wa lugha na wimbo wa kimapenzi. Hapa, tunauliza swali ambalo ni tofauti gani ya ubunifu kati ya mashirika ya MRs ni yenye maana na yenye mizizi ya kimwili, na ambayo ni ya juu. Tunaweza kuweka mbinu ya kuboresha utofauti kati ya mashirika ya MRs katika kiwango cha uhalisia (Lindemann et al., 2019), kwa kutambua kwamba tunaweza kurekebisha hali mbalimbali kwa kutumia kanuni za msingi wa lugha. Kazi zetu zinaongezeka kwa kiasi kikubwa mchezo katika muundo wa kompyuta kati ya MRs na kuboresha elimu ya kazi mbalimbali (MTL) katika mazingira ya rasilimali ya chini, ikitumikia kuwa ushahidi wa dhana kwa ajili ya utaratibu wa mpito wa MR unaoendelea.', 'tr': "Grafik tabanly bir näçe nähili mykdarlaryň (MRs) semantik strukturyň nähili ýeterli töwekilişligi barada möhüm bir gürrüňe getirdi. MR-ler dürli teoriýaly we dizayn pikirlerini üýtgeden strukturlaryň farklygyny görkeýär, lingwistiki analýusiny we cross-framework semantik analýusiny birleştirmek üçin kynçylygy çykýarlar. Bu ýerde, biz MRlar arasynda nähili düýtgeşikleriniň anlamlyk we semantik kökleriň arasynda tapawutlaryň bardygyny sorap alýarys. Biz MR'leriň esasy derejesinde (Lindemann et al., 2019-njy ýylda) çykyşylyklary düzenlemek üçin bir metodologiýany görkeýäris. Bu şekilde, dil taýýarlanan kararlaryň köp bölegini düzenleyebiliriz. Biziň işimiz MR'ler arasynda kompozisyonal strukturyň eşleşmesini has baglanýar we köp-täblik öwrenmesini düşük resurslar gurnalýar, gelejekde döwlet-kalap cross-MR normalizasyonyň düşünjegi üçin bir kanıt bolup geçirilýär.", 'sq': 'The emergence of a variety of graph-based meaning representations (MRs) has sparked an important conversation about how to adequately represent semantic structure.  MR ekspozojnë dallime strukturore që pasqyrojnë konsiderata të ndryshme teorike dhe dizajnuese, duke paraqitur sfida për analizën gjuhësore uniforme dhe analizën semantike ndërkuadri. Këtu, ne bëjmë pyetjen se cilat dallime në dizajn midis MR janë të kuptueshme dhe të rrënjëve semantike dhe të cilat janë sipërfaqësore. Ne paraqesim një metodologji për normalizimin e mospërputhjeve midis MR-ve në nivelin kompozitiv (Lindemann et al., 2019), duke gjetur se ne mund të normalizojmë shumicën e fenomeneve të ndryshme duke përdorur rregulla të bazuara në gjuhë. Puna jonë rrit ndjeshëm ndeshjen në strukturën kompozitive midis MR-ve dhe përmirëson mësimin me shumë detyra (MTL) në një bazë burimesh të ulëta, duke shërbyer si një provë e konceptit për normalizimin e ardhshëm në skalë të gjerë ndër MR.', 'am': 'በተለያዩ የፊርግራፍ አካባቢ መልዕክቶች (MRs) ምናልባት በክፍል የተጠቃሚ አካባቢ አካባቢ ላይ እንዴት እንደምታስተካክል እንዲያስፈልግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በቋንቋዊ ትምህርት እና የክፍለ ሥርዓት ማተሚያ እና የክፍለ ሥርዓት ማኅበረሰብ ጥያቄዎችን የሚያሳየው አካባቢ ልዩነቶችን ያሳያል፡፡ ይሄን፣ የMRs መካከለኛ ልዩነት የማስተካከለኛ እና የsemantically ሥር እና ጥያቄ ያሉትን ጥያቄ እንጠይቃለን፡፡ We present a methodology for normalizing discrepancies between MRs at the compositional level (Lindemann et al., 2019), finding that we can normalize the majority of divergent phenomena using linguistically-grounded rules.  ሥራችን በሙሉ አካባቢ ሥርዓት ውስጥ የሚደረገውን ጨዋታ አበጅቷል እና የብዙ ትዕዛዝ ትምህርት (MTL) በሚያሳድገው እና ለፊት የስፋት ትልቅ-MR ማቀናቀል ማስታወቂያውን እንዲያሳድግ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Die uitbreiding van 'n verskillende graafgebaseerde betekening verteenwoordings (MRs) het 'n belangrike gesprek oor hoe om die semantiese struktuur adequate te verteenwoordig. MR vertoon strukturele verskillinge wat verskillende teorieese en ontwerp aandagings reflekteer, wat uitdagings voorsien om lingwisiese analisie te uniformeer en kruis-raamwerk semantiese verwerking. Hier vra ons die vraag waarvan die ontwerp verskil tussen MR betekenlik en semantiek-wortel is, en wat is superficial. Ons stel 'n metodologie voor die normalisering van verskillighede tussen MR op die komposisievlak (Lindemann et al., 2019), en vind dat ons die meeste van verskillende fenomene kan normaliseer met die gebruik van lingvisiese grond reëls. Ons werk verhoog betekenlik die ooreenstemming in samenstellende struktuur tussen MR en verbeter multi-taak leer (MTL) in 'n lae hulpbron instelling, wat dien as 'n bevestig van konsepte vir toekomstige breedskaal kruis-MR normalisering.", 'hy': 'Գրաֆի վրա հիմնված նշանակալի ներկայացումների (ՄՌՀ) բազմազանությունը ստեղծեց կարևոր քննարկում այն մասին, թե ինչպես ճիշտ ներկայացնել սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքը: ՄՌՀ-ները ցույց են տալիս կառուցվածքային տարբերություններ, որոնք արտացոլում են տարբեր տեսական և դիզայնային հաշվարկներ, որոնք առաջացնում են մարտահրավեր միասնական լեզվաբանական վերլուծության և շրջանակային սեմանտիկ վերլուծու Այստեղ մենք հարցնում ենք, թե ինչ դիզայնի տարբերություններ են ՄՌՀ-ների միջև իմաստալից և սեմանտիկ արմատներով, և որոնք մակերեսային են: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մագնիսական ռեզոնանսային ռեզոնանսային արտահայտությունների միջև նորմալ մեթոդոլոգիա կազմակերպության մակարդակի միջև (Լինդեմանն և այլն., 2019 թ), որի արդյունքում մենք կարող ենք նորմալ տարբեր երևույթների մեծամասնությունը լեզվաբանական հի Մեր աշխատանքը նշանակալիորեն աճում է ՄՌՀ-ի միջև կառուցվածքի համապատասխանությունը և բարելավում է բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրությունը ցածր ռեսուրսների միջոցով, որն ապացույց է տալիս ապագա լայն մակարդակի միջև ՄՌՀ-ի նորմալիզացիայի', 'bs': 'Pojavljivanje raznolikosti predstavljanja značenja na grafiku (MR) izazvalo je važan razgovor o tome kako adekvatno predstavljati semantičku strukturu. MR pokazuju strukturne razlike koje odražavaju različite teoretičke i dizajnske razmišljanje, predstavljajući izazove za uniformnu lingvističku analizu i semantičku analizu prekogramskog okvira. Ovdje postavljamo pitanje o kojim su razlike dizajna između MR-a značajne i semantički korijenjene, i koje su površne. Predstavljamo metodologiju za normalizaciju neslaganja između MR na kompozicionalnoj razini (Lindemann et al., 2019), otkrivajući da možemo normalizirati većinu različitih fenomena koristeći jezički temeljne pravila. Naš rad značajno povećava poklapanje kompozicionalne strukture između MR-a i poboljšava učenje multi task (MTL) u nizim resursima, službeno kao dokaz koncepta za buduću široku normalizaciju preko MR-a.', 'az': 'Grafik-tabanlı məsələlərinin (MRs) müxtəlif məsələlərinin gəlib-getməsi semantik quruluğu necə təsdiqlənməsi haqqında möhüm bir danışma yaratdı. MR-lər fərqli teoretik və dizayn düşüncələrini göstərən strukturlu fərqli fərqli fərqli göstərir, dil analizi birləşdirmək üçün çətinlikləri göstərir və çoxlu fərqli semantik analizi. Burada, MR arasında hansı dizayn fərqliyinin anlamlı və semantik kökü olduğunu soruşuruq və bunların üstünlüyü. Biz MRs arasındakı müxtəlif fərqləşmələri müəyyən etmək üçün (Lindemann et al., 2019), dilində müxtəlif qaydalar vasitəsilə normalizə biləcəyik. Bizim işlərimiz MRs arasında kompozisyonal yapılara uyğunluğunu artırar və çoxlu iş öyrənməsi (MTL) düşük ressurs qurmasında daha düşür, gələcək geniş ölçüdə çoxlu MR normalizasyonu üçün bir konsept olaraq istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ধরনের গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক অর্থের প্রতিনিধিত্ব (এমআরএস) উৎপাদনের উদ্যোগ সৃষ্টি করেছে সেমেন্টিক ক্ষেত্রের প্রতিনিধিত এমআরএস কাঠামোর পার্থক্য প্রদর্শন করে যা বিভিন্ন ততিত্তিক এবং ডিজাইন বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদর্শন করে, যা ভাষাগত বিশ্লেষণ এবং ক্রিম এখানে আমরা প্রশ্ন করি এমআরসের মধ্যে কোন ডিজাইনের পার্থক্য অর্থহীন এবং সাম্প্রাক্তন মূল্যের মানে এবং যা অতিরিক্ত। আমরা স্বাভাবিকভাবে ভাষাভাবে ভাষাভাবে ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক নিয়ম ব্যবহার করে এমআরসের মধ্যে বৈষম্য স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিক করার একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি। আমাদের কাজ এমআরসের মধ্যে সংস্কৃতিক কাঠামোর মেলা বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করে এবং কম সম্পদের শিক্ষা বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে। ভবিষ্যতের ব্যাপক পর্যাপ্ত ক্রস-এমআর স্বাভাবিক বিষয়', 'ca': "The emergence of a variety of graph-based meaning representations (MRs) has sparked an important conversation about how to adequately represent semantic structure.  Les ressonàncies magnètiques mostran diferències estructurals que reflecteixen diferents consideracions teòriques i de disseny, presentant reptes a l'anàlisi lingüística uniforme i l'analització semàntica transquadre. Aquí ens preguntem quines diferències de disseny entre les ressonàncies magnètiques són significatives i semàntiques, i que són superficials. Presentam una metodologia per normalitzar les discrepancies entre ressonàncies magnètiques a nivell compositiu (Lindemann et al., 2019), trobant que podem normalitzar la majoria de fenomens divergents fent servir normes lingüísticament basades. La nostra feina augmenta significativament l'ajustament en l'estructura de composició entre RM i millora l'aprenentatge multitascat (MTL) en un entorn de baix recursos, servint com prova del concepte de futura normalització transversal a gran escala.", 'cs': 'Vznik různých grafově založených reprezentací významu vyvolal důležitou konverzaci o tom, jak adekvátně reprezentovat sémantickou strukturu. MR vykazují strukturální rozdíly, které odrážejí různé teoretické a designové úvahy, představují výzvy pro jednotnou lingvistickou analýzu a cross-frameworkovou sémantickou parsování. Zde klademe otázku, které designové rozdíly mezi MR jsou smysluplné a sémanticky zakořeněné a které jsou povrchní. Představujeme metodiku normalizace rozdílů mezi MR na kompoziční úrovni (Lindemann et al., 2019), přičemž zjišťujeme, že většinu divergentních jevů lze normalizovat pomocí lingvisticky založených pravidel. Naše práce výrazně zvyšuje shodu kompoziční struktury mezi MR a zlepšuje multi-task learning (MTL) v prostředí s nízkými zdroji, což slouží jako důkaz konceptu pro budoucí široké cross-MR normalizaci.', 'et': 'Erinevate graafiliste t瓣hendusrepresentatsioonide (MR) tekkimine on tekitanud olulise vestluse semantilise struktuuri adekvaatse esindamise kohta. MR n瓣itab struktuurilisi erinevusi, mis peegeldavad erinevaid teoreetilisi ja disainilisi kaalutlusi, esitades v瓣ljakutseid 羹htsele keelelisele anal羹羹sile ja raamistiku羹lesele semantilisele parsimisele. Siin k羹sime, millised kujunduslikud erinevused MR-de vahel on t瓣henduslikud ja semantiliselt juurdunud ning millised on pealiskaudsed. Tutvustame metoodikat MR erinevuste normaliseerimiseks kompositsiooni tasandil (Lindemann et al., 2019), leides, et enamiku erinevatest n瓣htustest saame normaliseerida keeleliselt p繭hinevate reeglite abil. Meie t繹繹 suurendab m瓣rkimisv瓣瓣rselt MR-de kompositsioonistruktuuri vastavust ja parandab mitme 羹lesandega 繭ppimist (MTL) v瓣hese ressursiga keskkonnas, olles kontseptsiooni t繭estuseks tulevaseks laiaulatuslikuks MR-羹leseks normaliseerimiseks.', 'fi': 'Erilaisten graafisten merkitysrepresentaatioiden (MR) syntyminen on herättänyt tärkeän keskustelun semanttisen rakenteen riittävästä esittämisestä. MR:issä on rakenteellisia eroja, jotka heijastavat erilaisia teoreettisia ja suunnittelunäkökohtia ja asettavat haasteita yhtenäiselle kielelliselle analyysille ja monialaiselle semanttiselle jäsentämiselle. Tässä kysymme, mitkä MR-mallien suunnitteluerot ovat merkityksellisiä ja semanttisesti juurtuneita ja mitkä pinnallisia. Esitämme menetelmän MR-erojen normalisoimiseksi kompositiivisella tasolla (Lindemann et al., 2019) ja toteamme, että voimme normalisoida suurimman osan poikkeavista ilmiöistä kielellisesti perusteltujen sääntöjen avulla. Työmme lisää merkittävästi kompositiivisen rakenteen vastaavuutta MR:ien välillä ja parantaa monitehtäväoppimista (MTL) vähäresurssisessa ympäristössä, mikä toimii todisteena konseptista tulevalle laaja-alaiselle MR-normalisoinnille.', 'ha': "Farawa na wasu masu fassarawa na fassarar grafi (MRs) ya kicked wani mazaɓa na muhimu a kan jinsi ya iya halatta a kan bincike na semantic. MRs na nuna diffaniki masu motsi da suka yi wa'azi dabam-dabam, da masu gauraya wa'anar linguistic da paring na semantic. Li nan, Munã tambaya tambayar ka ko da diffaniki na MRs za'a yi ma'ani da danne na semantiki, da kuma waɗancan ne mafi kyaun. Tuna gabatar da hanyoyi wa mai normal gaura tsakanin MRs a cikin daraja mai haɗuwa (Lindamann et al., 2019), kuma munã gane cewa za'a kawaici masu yawa da abu mai rarraba, da amfani da Rubuwan a cikin harshen. Our work significantly increases the match in compositional structure between MRs and improves multi-task learning (MTL) in a low-resource setting, serving as a proof of concept for future broad-scale cross-MR normalization.", 'sk': 'Pojav različnih grafičnih pomenskih reprezentacij (MRs) je sprožil pomemben pogovor o tem, kako ustrezno predstaviti semantično strukturo. MR kažejo strukturne razlike, ki odražajo različne teoretične in oblikovalske vidike, predstavljajo izzive za enotno jezikovno analizo in medokvirno semantično razčlenjevanje. Tu postavljamo vprašanje, katere oblikovalske razlike med MR so smiselne in semantično koreninjene ter katere so površinske. Predstavljamo metodologijo za normalizacijo razlik med MR na ravni kompozicije (Lindemann et al., 2019), pri čemer ugotavljamo, da lahko večino različnih pojavov normaliziramo z jezikovno utemeljenimi pravili. Naše delo bistveno povečuje ujemanje kompozicijske strukture med MRs in izboljšuje večopravilno učenje (MTL) v okolju z nizkimi viri, kar služi kot dokaz koncepta za prihodnjo široko medMR normalizacijo.', 'jv': 'Associate MRs maneh structural ulih dumadhingan langgar sampeyan theoretik lan design contextual, nggawe pawarno nggawe ngupakan lenggunian sampeyan karo semanti nggawe Punika, awak dhéwé sikirke perusahaan kanggo nguasakno itépakan dengané MR lan sematik-perusahaan, lan ngono kuwi nggawe barang sampek. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing perusahaan kanggo nggawe sawian segala macem nggawe tarjamah dumadhi sing larang awak dhéwé (Lendman et al, 2011), iki dadi awak dhéwé iso nguasai nggawe barang langgar oleh dumadhi winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe barang-barêng langkung wigat nggawe gerakan sampek karo MRs karo nggawe layar-sistem sing nyebute multi-task (MTL) nang nggawe barang kelas nêmêr, ditambah kuwi ampuhé perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno dianggap bantuan-MR cara nggawe gerakan.', 'he': 'התפתחות של מגוון של מיצוגים של משמעות מבוססים בגרף (MRs) מעוררו שיחה חשובה על איך לייצג בהתאם מבנה סמנטי. MRs exhibit structural differences that reflect different theoretical and design considerations, presenting challenges to uniform linguistic analysis and cross-framework semantic parsing.  כאן, אנחנו שואלים את השאלה של איזה הבדלים בעיצוב בין MR הם משמעותיים ושורשים סמנטיים, והם שטחיים. אנו מציגים מטודולוגיה לנורמליזציה של ההפרעות בין MRs ברמה המרכיבית (Lindemann et al., 2019), ומוצאים שאנחנו יכולים לנורמליזציה רוב התופעות שונות באמצעות חוקים מבוססים לשונות. העבודה שלנו מגבירה באופן משמעותי את התאמה במבנה המרכיב בין MRs ושפר את הלימודים במשימות רבות (MTL) בסביבה משאבים נמוכים, משרת כהוכחה של מושג לנורמליזציה דרך MR רחבה לעתיד.', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་མིན་འདུག་གྱིས་རྩ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གལ་ཆོས་ཤིག་སླེབས་བ་དང་གལ་ཅན་ཅིག་ལ་ཡག་ཉ MRs exhibit structural differences that reflect different theoretical and design considerations, presenting challenges to uniform linguistic analysis and cross-framework semantic parsing. འདིར་ང་ཚོས་MRs་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དོན་དག་གང་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་ཡོད་པ་དང་semantically་རྩ་བ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆེས་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་བཀོད་པའི་མི་རྣམ་འགྱུར་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ལྟར། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་MRs(MTL)ནང་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ལས་རྩིས་མཐུན་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Finding the Evidence : Localization-aware Answer Prediction for Text Visual Question Answering', 'ar': 'العثور على الدليل: توقع الإجابة مع مراعاة الترجمة للإجابة على الأسئلة المرئية النصية', 'es': 'Encontrar la evidencia: predicción de respuestas con reconocimiento de la localización para respuestas visuales a preguntas de texto', 'pt': 'Encontrando a Evidência: Previsão de Resposta com Reconhecimento de Localização para Resposta Visual de Perguntas em Texto', 'fr': 'Trouver les preuves\xa0: prédiction de réponse tenant compte de la localisation pour la réponse visuelle aux questions textuelles', 'ja': 'エビデンスを見つける：テキスト視覚的な質問の回答のためのローカリゼーションを意識した回答予測', 'ru': 'Поиск доказательств: прогнозирование ответа с учетом локализации для ответа на текстовые визуальные вопросы', 'hi': 'साक्ष्य ढूँढना: पाठ दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए स्थानीयकरण-जागरूक उत्तर पूर्वानुमान', 'zh': '案:文本可视化答案者本地化感知占候', 'ga': 'Ag Lorg na Fianaise: Logánú Tuartha Freagraí le haghaidh Freagairt Téacs-Amharc-Cheist', 'ka': 'წერტილების ძებნა: ტექსტის ვიზუალური კითხვების პასუხისთვის პასუხისთვის ლოკალიზაცია', 'el': 'Εύρεση των αποδεικτικών στοιχείων: Πρόβλεψη απαντήσεων με επίγνωση της τοποθεσίας για την οπτική απάντηση ερωτήσεων κειμένου', 'hu': 'A bizonyíték megtalálása: Lokalizációtudatos válasz előrejelzés a szöveges vizuális kérdések megválaszolásához', 'kk': 'Мәтін көрінетін сұрақтар жауап беру', 'mk': 'Најдување на докази: Предвидување на одговорот на локализацијата за одговор на текстовите визуелни прашања', 'it': 'Trovare le prove: Prediczione delle risposte consapevoli della localizzazione per la risposta alle domande visive testuali', 'lt': 'Įrodymų suradimas: atsakymo į teksto vizualius klausimus prognozė vietoje', 'ml': 'തെളിവുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു: പദാവലി കാഴ്ച ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള ലോക്കലേഷന്\u200d- വിവരമുള്ള ഉത്തര', 'mn': 'Баталгаа олох: Локализацийн мэдрэгчийн хариулт хэлбэл Текст хариултын асуулт хариулт', 'mt': 'Is-sejba tal-Evidenza: Tbassir tat-tweġiba konxja mill-lokalizzazzjoni għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet viżwali tat-test', 'no': 'Finn beviseringane: Plasseringsverdi for svar på tekstvisuelle spørsmål', 'pl': 'Znalezienie dowodów: Prognoza odpowiedzi lokalizacyjnej dla tekstowego wizualnego odpowiedzi na pytania', 'ro': 'Găsirea dovezilor: Predicția răspunsului conștientă de localizare pentru răspunsul la întrebări vizuale text', 'sr': 'Pronaći dokaze: predviđanje odgovora na lokalizaciju za odgovor na vizualno pitanje teksta', 'si': 'සාක්ෂිකය හොයාගන්න: ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'so': 'Raadinta caddeynta: Horumarinta jawaabta aragtida', 'sv': 'Att hitta bevis: Lokaliseringsmedveten svarsförutsägelse för textvisuell frågeställning', 'ta': 'தெளிவாக்கத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்கும்: உரைக்காட்சி கேள்வி பதில்', 'ms': 'Mencari Bukti: Prediksi Jawapan Sedia-Lokasi untuk Jawapan soalan Visual Teks', 'ur': 'شہادت تلاش کی جاتی ہے: لیکولایزی جاننے والی جواب کی پیش بینی ٹیکسٹ ویسئل سوال جواب دینے کے لئے', 'vi': 'Tìm bằng chứng: xác định trước các câu hỏi về văn bản ảo', 'uz': '@ info', 'nl': 'Het bewijs vinden: lokalisatiebewuste antwoordvoorspelling voor het visueel beantwoorden van tekstvragen', 'da': 'Finde beviser: Lokaliseringsbevidst svarforudsigelse for tekstsvarende visuelt spørgsmål besvarelse', 'bg': 'Намиране на доказателства: прогнозиране на отговора за локализацията за текстово визуално отговаряне на въпроси', 'hr': 'Pronaći dokaze: predviđanje odgovora na lokalizaciju za odgovor na vizualno pitanje teksta', 'de': 'Evidenz finden: Lokalisierungsbewusste Antwortvorhersage für visuelle Textfragen', 'id': 'Menemukan Bukti: Prediksi Jawaban Pengetahuan Lokalisasi untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Visual Teks', 'ko': '증거 찾기: 텍스트 시각 문답에서의 포지셔닝 감지 답안 예측', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن مدرک: پیشنهاد جواب\u200cهای محلی\u200cشناسی برای پاسخ\u200cدادن سوال\u200cهای دیده\u200cای متن', 'tr': 'Finding the Evidence: Localization-aware Answer Prediction for Text Visual Question Answering', 'sw': 'Kupata ushahidi: Jibu la Location-aware Answer Preferences for Question Visual Visual Answering', 'af': 'Soek die getuienisse: Lokalisasie-bevestig Antwoord voordeel vir Teks Visuele Fraag Antwoord', 'sq': 'Gjetja e provave: parashikimi i përgjigjes për përgjigjet vizuale të tekstit', 'hy': 'Finding the Evidence: Localization-aware Answer Prediction for Text Visual Question Answering', 'am': 'Location-aware Answer Prediction for Text Visual Question', 'az': 'İşaretlərin tapılması: Mətn Görünür sual cavabı', 'bn': 'প্রমাণ খুঁজে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে: টেক্সট ভিসুয়াল প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'Pronaći dokaze: predviđanje odgovora na lokalizaciju za odgovor na vizualno pitanje teksta', 'ca': 'Trobar la prova: Predicció de resposta conscient de la localització per resposta a preguntes visuals de text', 'cs': 'Hledání důkazů: Predikce odpovědi na lokalizaci pro textové vizuální odpovědi na otázky', 'et': 'Tõendite leidmine: lokaliseerimisteadlik vastuse prognoos teksti visuaalsetele küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Todisteiden löytäminen: paikannustietoinen vastausennuste tekstiviestille visuaaliselle kysymysvastaukselle', 'sk': 'Iskanje dokazov: Napoved odgovorov na lokalizacijo za besedilno vizualno odgovarjanje na vprašanja', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Search', 'he': 'Finding the Evidence: Localization-aware Answer Prediction for Text Visual Question Answering', 'bo': 'Finding the Evidence: Localization-aware Answer Prediction for Text Visual Question Answering'}
{'en': 'Image text carries essential information to understand the scene and perform reasoning. Text-based visual question answering (text VQA) task focuses on visual questions that require reading text in images. Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting from optical character recognition (OCR) texts or a fixed vocabulary. Positional information of text is underused and there is a lack of evidence for the generated answer. As such, this paper proposes a localization-aware answer prediction network (LaAP-Net) to address this challenge. Our LaAP-Net not only generates the answer to the question but also predicts a bounding box as evidence of the generated answer. Moreover, a context-enriched OCR representation (COR) for multimodal fusion is proposed to facilitate the localization task. Our proposed LaAP-Net outperforms existing approaches on three benchmark datasets for the text VQA task by a noticeable margin.', 'ar': 'يحمل نص الصورة معلومات أساسية لفهم المشهد وإجراء الاستدلال. تركز مهمة الإجابة على الأسئلة المرئية المستندة إلى النص (VQA النصية) على الأسئلة المرئية التي تتطلب قراءة النص في الصور. تولد أنظمة VQA النصية الحالية إجابة عن طريق الاختيار من نصوص التعرف الضوئي على الأحرف (OCR) أو مفردات ثابتة. المعلومات الموضعية للنص غير مستغلة بشكل كاف وهناك نقص في الأدلة على الإجابة المتولدة. على هذا النحو ، تقترح هذه الورقة شبكة تنبؤ بالإجابات مدركة للترجمة (LaAP-Net) لمواجهة هذا التحدي. لا يولد LaAP-Net الإجابة على السؤال فحسب ، بل يتنبأ أيضًا بصندوق محيط كدليل على الإجابة التي تم إنشاؤها. علاوة على ذلك ، يُقترح تمثيل OCR المخصب بالسياق (COR) للاندماج متعدد الوسائط لتسهيل مهمة التوطين. يتفوق LaAP-Net المقترح على الأساليب الحالية في ثلاث مجموعات بيانات معيارية لمهمة VQA النصية بهامش ملحوظ.', 'pt': 'O texto da imagem carrega informações essenciais para entender a cena e realizar o raciocínio. A tarefa de resposta a perguntas visuais baseada em texto (VQA de texto) concentra-se em perguntas visuais que exigem a leitura de texto em imagens. Os sistemas VQA de texto existentes geram uma resposta selecionando textos de reconhecimento óptico de caracteres (OCR) ou um vocabulário fixo. As informações posicionais do texto são subutilizadas e faltam evidências para a resposta gerada. Como tal, este artigo propõe uma rede de previsão de resposta com reconhecimento de localização (LaAP-Net) para enfrentar esse desafio. Nosso LaAP-Net não apenas gera a resposta para a pergunta, mas também prevê uma caixa delimitadora como evidência da resposta gerada. Além disso, uma representação OCR enriquecida por contexto (COR) para fusão multimodal é proposta para facilitar a tarefa de localização. Nosso LaAP-Net proposto supera as abordagens existentes em três conjuntos de dados de referência para a tarefa de VQA de texto por uma margem notável.', 'fr': "Le texte de l'image contient des informations essentielles pour comprendre la scène et raisonner. La tâche de réponse visuelle aux questions textuelles (VQA texte) se concentre sur les questions visuelles qui nécessitent la lecture de texte dans des images. Les systèmes VQA de texte existants génèrent une réponse en choisissant parmi des textes de reconnaissance optique de caractères (OCR) ou un vocabulaire fixe. Les informations de position du texte sont sous-utilisées et il existe un manque de preuves pour la réponse générée. En tant que tel, cet article propose un réseau de prédiction de réponse sensible à la localisation (LAAP-Net) pour relever ce défi. Notre réseau LAAP-Net génère non seulement la réponse à la question, mais prédit également un cadre de sélection comme preuve de la réponse générée. De plus, une représentation OCR enrichie en contexte (COR) pour la fusion multimodale est proposée afin de faciliter la tâche de localisation. Notre LAAP-Net proposé surpasse les approches existantes sur trois ensembles de données de référence pour la tâche VQA texte d'une marge notable.", 'es': 'El texto de la imagen contiene información esencial para entender la escena y razonar. La tarea de respuesta visual a preguntas basada en texto (VQA de texto) se centra en preguntas visuales que requieren leer texto en imágenes. Los sistemas VQA de texto existentes generan una respuesta mediante la selección de textos de reconocimiento óptico de caracteres (OCR) o un vocabulario fijo. La información posicional del texto está infrautilizada y hay una falta de evidencia para la respuesta generada. Como tal, este artículo propone una red de predicción de respuestas con reconocimiento de la localización (LAAP-net) para abordar este desafío. Nuestra red LAAP no solo genera la respuesta a la pregunta, sino que también predice un cuadro delimitador como evidencia de la respuesta generada. Además, se propone una representación OCR enriquecida en el contexto (COR) para la fusión multimodal para facilitar la tarea de localización. Nuestra propuesta de LAAP-Net supera a los enfoques existentes en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia para la tarea de VQA de texto por un margen notable.', 'ru': 'Текст изображения содержит важную информацию для понимания сцены и проведения рассуждений. Задача текстового визуального ответа на вопросы (текстовый VQA) фокусируется на визуальных вопросах, требующих чтения текста на изображениях. Существующие текстовые системы VQA генерируют ответ путем выбора текстов из оптического распознавания символов (OCR) или фиксированного словаря. Позиционная информация в тексте используется недостаточно, и нет доказательств для генерируемого ответа. Таким образом, в настоящем документе предлагается сеть прогнозирования ответов с учетом локализации (LaAP-Net) для решения этой проблемы. Наша LaAP-Net не только генерирует ответ на вопрос, но и предсказывает ограничительное поле в качестве доказательства сгенерированного ответа. Кроме того, для облегчения задачи локализации предлагается обогащенное контекстом представление OCR (COR) для мультимодального слияния. Предлагаемая нами сеть LaAP-Net значительно превосходит существующие подходы по трем эталонным наборам данных для текстовой задачи VQA.', 'ja': '画像テキストは、シーンを理解し、推論を実行するために不可欠な情報を運びます。テキストベースの視覚的質問回答（テキストVQA ）タスクは、画像内のテキストを読み取る必要がある視覚的質問に焦点を当てています。既存のテキストＶＱＡシステムは、光学式文字認識（ ＯＣＲ ）テキストまたは固定語彙から選択することによって答えを生成する。テキストの位置情報が十分に活用されておらず、生成された回答の証拠が不足しています。このように、この課題に対処するための局所化を意識した回答予測ネットワーク（ LaAP - Net ）を提案している。私たちのLaAP - Netは、質問に対する回答を生成するだけでなく、生成された回答の証拠として境界ボックスを予測します。さらに、ローカリゼーションタスクを容易にするために、マルチモーダル融合のための文脈豊富なＯＣＲ表現（ ＣｏＲ ）が提案される。当社が提案するLaAP - Netは、テキストVQAタスクの3つのベンチマークデータセットの既存のアプローチを顕著なマージンで上回っています。', 'hi': 'छवि पाठ दृश्य को समझने और तर्क करने के लिए आवश्यक जानकारी ले जाता है। पाठ-आधारित दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर (पाठ VQA) कार्य उन दृश्य प्रश्नों पर केंद्रित है जिन्हें छवियों में पाठ पढ़ने की आवश्यकता होती है। मौजूदा पाठ VQA सिस्टम ऑप्टिकल वर्ण मान्यता (OCR) ग्रंथों या एक निश्चित शब्दावली से चयन करके एक उत्तर उत्पन्न करते हैं। पाठ की स्थितिगत जानकारी का कम उपयोग किया जाता है और उत्पन्न उत्तर के लिए सबूतों की कमी होती है। जैसे, यह पेपर इस चुनौती को संबोधित करने के लिए एक स्थानीयकरण-जागरूक उत्तर भविष्यवाणी नेटवर्क (LaAP-Net) का प्रस्ताव करता है। हमारा LaAP-Net न केवल प्रश्न का उत्तर उत्पन्न करता है, बल्कि उत्पन्न उत्तर के सबूत के रूप में एक बाउंडिंग बॉक्स की भविष्यवाणी भी करता है। इसके अलावा, स्थानीयकरण कार्य को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए बहुआयामी संलयन के लिए एक संदर्भ-समृद्ध ओसीआर प्रतिनिधित्व (सीओआर) प्रस्तावित है। हमारे प्रस्तावित LaAP-Net एक ध्यान देने योग्य मार्जिन से पाठ VQA कार्य के लिए तीन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण outperforms.', 'zh': '图像文本携信息,以解场景行推理。 盖文本之视问答(文本 VQA)务侧重于须读图象中文本之视。 今文本 VQA 系统以光学字符识 (OCR) 文本或定词汇中选择以成答案。 文本位信未得充,且乏生成答案证。 因此,本文发一种本地化感知答案测量网络(LaAP-Net)来应此挑战。 臣等LaAP-Net不惟生成答案,且占一界框为生成答案之证。 多模态上下文富OCR(COR)以趣本地化务。 臣等所议LaAP-Net在文本VQA三准数集上优于今法。', 'ga': 'Iompraíonn téacs íomhá faisnéis riachtanach chun an radharc a thuiscint agus chun réasúnaíocht a dhéanamh. Díríonn an tasc atá bunaithe ar fhíscheisteanna téacs-bhunaithe (téacs VQA) ar cheisteanna amhairc a dteastaíonn téacs a léamh in íomhánna. Gineann córais VQA téacs atá ann cheana freagra trí théacsanna aitheantais optúla carachtar (OCR) nó foclóir seasta a roghnú. Ní bhaintear mórán úsáide as eolas suímh an téacs agus tá easpa fianaise ann don fhreagra a ghintear. Mar sin, molann an páipéar seo líonra tuar freagraí atá feasach ar logánú (LaAP-Net) chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dúshlán seo. Ní hamháin go ngineann ár LaAP-Net freagra na ceiste ach déanann sé bosca teorann a thuar mar fhianaise ar an bhfreagra a gineadh. Ina theannta sin, moltar ionadaíocht OCR comhthéacs-saibhrithe (COR) don chomhleá ilmhódach chun tasc an logánaithe a éascú. Sáraíonn an LaAP-Net atá molta againn na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin ar thrí thacar sonraí tagarmharcála don tasc téacs VQA le corrlach suntasach.', 'ka': 'სურათის ტექსტი გადატანა მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია, რომელიც სურათის შესაძლებელად გავიგოთ და გავაკეთოთ პარამენტი. Name Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting optical character recognition texts (OCR) or a fixed vocabulary. ტექსტის პოზიციალური ინფორმაცია უფრო გამოყენებულია და შექმნა პასუხისთვის წარმოიდგინობა. როგორც ასე, ეს წიგნი მუშაობს ლოკალიზაციას უცნობიერებელი პასუხის ქსელი (LaAP-Net) ამ გამოსახულების გარეშე. LaAP-netName დამატებით, მულტიმოდიალური ფუზიციისთვის OCR-ის გამოსახულება (COR) მუშაობით განახულებულია, რომელიც ლოკალიზაციის რაოდენობას განახულებლად. ჩვენი საზოგადომის LaAP-Net-ის გავაკეთება სამი ბანქმერის მონაცემების ტექსტის VQA პარამეტრების გასაკეთებლად გავაკეთება.', 'el': 'Το κείμενο εικόνας μεταφέρει βασικές πληροφορίες για την κατανόηση της σκηνής και την εκτέλεση συλλογισμού. Η εργασία οπτικής απάντησης ερωτήσεων με βάση το κείμενο εστιάζει σε οπτικές ερωτήσεις που απαιτούν ανάγνωση κειμένου σε εικόνες. Τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα κειμένου δημιουργούν μια απάντηση επιλέγοντας από κείμενα οπτικής αναγνώρισης χαρακτήρων ή σταθερό λεξιλόγιο. Οι πληροφορίες θέσης του κειμένου δεν χρησιμοποιούνται επαρκώς και δεν υπάρχουν αποδεικτικά στοιχεία για την απάντηση που δημιουργείται. Ως εκ τούτου, η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα δίκτυο πρόβλεψης απαντήσεων με επίγνωση του εντοπισμού (LaaP-Net) για την αντιμετώπιση αυτής της πρόκλησης. Το δίκτυο μας όχι μόνο παράγει την απάντηση στην ερώτηση αλλά προβλέπει επίσης ένα οριακό πλαίσιο ως απόδειξη της παραγόμενης απάντησης. Επιπλέον, προτείνεται μια εμπλουτισμένη στο πλαίσιο εκπροσώπηση OCR (ΕΤΠ) για την πολυμορφική σύντηξη για τη διευκόλυνση του έργου εντοπισμού. Το προτεινόμενο LaaP-Net ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς για την εργασία VQA κειμένου κατά ένα αξιοσημείωτο περιθώριο.', 'hu': 'A képszöveg alapvető információkat tartalmaz a jelenet megértéséhez és az érvelés elvégzéséhez. A szövegalapú vizuális kérdésválaszolás (szöveg VQA) feladat olyan vizuális kérdésekre összpontosít, amelyek szöveg olvasását igénylik a képekben. A meglévő szöveges VQA rendszerek optikai karakterfelismerő (OCR) szövegekből vagy rögzített szókincsből választanak választ. A szöveg pozíciós információit nem használják fel, és nincs bizonyíték a generált válaszra. Ezért a tanulmány egy lokalizációtudatos válasz-előrejelző hálózatot (LaAP-Net) javasol ennek a kihívásnak a kezelésére. A LaAP-Net nem csak a kérdésre adott választ generálja, hanem a megadott válasz bizonyítékaként egy határolódobozt is előrejelez. Ezenkívül a multimodális fúzió kontextusban gazdagított OCR-reprezentációját (COR) javasolják a lokalizációs feladat megkönnyítése érdekében. A javasolt LaAP-Net érzékelhető marginnal felülmúlja a meglévő megközelítéseket három referenciaadatkészleten a szöveges VQA feladathoz.', 'it': "Il testo dell'immagine contiene informazioni essenziali per comprendere la scena ed eseguire ragionamenti. L'attività di risposta visiva basata sul testo (testo VQA) si concentra su domande visive che richiedono la lettura del testo nelle immagini. I sistemi VQA testuali esistenti generano una risposta selezionando da testi di riconoscimento ottico dei caratteri (OCR) o da un vocabolario fisso. Le informazioni sulla posizione del testo sono sottoutilizzate e mancano prove per la risposta generata. Come tale, questo articolo propone una rete di predizione delle risposte consapevoli della localizzazione (LaAP-Net) per affrontare questa sfida. La nostra LaAP-Net non solo genera la risposta alla domanda, ma prevede anche un bounding box come prova della risposta generata. Inoltre, si propone una rappresentazione OCR arricchita dal contesto (COR) per la fusione multimodale per facilitare il compito di localizzazione. La nostra proposta LaAP-Net supera gli approcci esistenti su tre set di dati benchmark per l'attività di testo VQA di un margine considerevole.", 'kk': 'Кескіннің мәтіні сәйкестігін түсініп, сезімді орындау үшін негізгі мәліметті алып тастайды. Мәтін негіздеген визуалдық сұрақтар жауап беру (мәтін VQA) тапсырмасы кескіндерде мәтін оқу керек визуалдық сұрақтарына назар аударады. Бар мәтін VQA жүйелері оптикалық таңбаны (OCR) мәтіндерінен немесе тұрақты сөздік тізбегінен таңдап жауап береді. Мәтіннің орналасу мәліметі төмен қолданылады және құрылған жауап үшін құлақтар жоқ. Бұл қағаз осы мәселелерді өзгерту үшін жергілікті түсінікті жауап бақылау желіне (LaAP- Net) ұсынады. Біздің LaAP- Net тек сұраққа жауап беруді жасайды, сондай-ақ жауап берілген жауап деп шектелген терезесін көрсетеді. Қосымша, көп модельді жинақтау үшін контексті бағалайтын OCR (КОR) деңгейін жергілікті тапсырманы көмектесу үшін ұсынылады. Біздің LaAP- Net тапсырмамыз белгілі шегімен VQA тапсырмасының үш белгілі деректер қорларында бар жағдайларды жасайды.', 'lt': 'Vaizdo tekste pateikiama svarbi informacija, kad būtų suprantama scena ir pagrįsta. Tekstinis vizualinis atsakymas į klausimus (tekstas VQA) sutelkiamas į vizualinius klausimus, kuriems reikia skaityti tekstą vaizduose. Esamos teksto VQA sistemos sukuria atsakymą pasirinkdamos iš optinių ženklų pripažinimo (OCR) tekstų arba fiksuoto žodyno. Teksto pozicinė informacija nepakankamai naudojama ir nėra įrodymų dėl gauto atsakymo. Todėl šiame dokumente siūloma spręsti šį iššūkį vietoje suprantamu atsakymų prognozavimo tinklu (LaAP-Net). Mūsų LaAP-Net ne tik sukuria atsakymą į klausimą, bet ir numato ribojimo langelį kaip įrodymą į sukauptą atsakymą. Be to, siekiant palengvinti lokalizacijos užduotį, siūloma įvairiarūšio sintezės kontekstu pagrįstą UŠR atstovavimą. Mūsų pasiūlytas LaAP-Net rezultatas yra didesnis už esamus metodus, taikomus trims VQA užduoties lyginamųjų duomenų rinkiniams, atsižvelgiant į pastebimą maržą.', 'ml': 'ഇമേജ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കാണാനും കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാനും ആവശ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്ന ചിത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d പദാവലി വായിക്കേണ്ടതുള്ള വായിക്കുവാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള വായിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ വി നിലവിലുള്ള പദാവലി വിക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ഓപ്ടിക്കല്\u200d അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നോ ഒരു ഉത്തരം ഉണ്ടാക്കു പദാവലിയുടെ സ്ഥാന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട ഉത്തരം കാണിക്കുന്നതിന് തെളിവ അതുപോലെ Our LaAP-Net not only generates the answer to the question but also predicts a bounding box as evidence of the generated answer.  അതുകൊണ്ടും, മുള്\u200dടിമോഡല്\u200d ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു കെന്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറ് സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള ഓക്സിറി പ് ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ലാപ്പി- നെറ്റ് നിലവിലുള്ള മൂന്ന് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലു', 'mk': 'Текстот на сликата носи основни информации за разбирање на сцената и извршување на размислување. Задачата за одговор на визуелни прашања на текст (текст VQA) се фокусира на визуелни прашања кои бараат читање текст во слики. Постојаните текстови VQA системи генерираат одговор со избор од тексти за оптичко препознавање знаци (OCR) или фиксен речник. Позиционалната информација за текстот е недоупотребена и нема докази за генерираниот одговор. Како таква, овој весник предложува мрежа за предвидување на одговори свесна за локализација (LaAP-Net) за решавање на овој предизвик. Нашата LaAP-Net не само што генерира одговор на прашањето, туку и предвидува гранична кутија како доказ на генерираниот одговор. Покрај тоа, предложено е контекстно обогатено претставување на ОКР (КОР) за мултимодилна фузија за олеснување на задачата за локализација. Нашата предложена LaAP-Net ги надминува постојните пристапи на три бази на податоци за текстовите VQA задачи со забележувачка маргина.', 'ms': 'Teks imej membawa maklumat penting untuk memahami adegan dan melakukan alasan. Tugas menjawab soalan visual berdasarkan teks (VQA teks) fokus pada soalan visual yang memerlukan membaca teks dalam imej. Sistem VQA teks yang wujud menghasilkan jawapan dengan memilih dari teks pengenalan aksara optik (OCR) atau kamus tetap. Positional information of text is underused and there is a lack of evidence for the generated answer.  Sebagai sebagaimana, kertas ini mencadangkan rangkaian ramalan jawapan yang sedar-lokalisasi (LaAP-Net) untuk mengatasi cabaran ini. LaAP-Net kami tidak hanya menghasilkan jawapan kepada soalan tetapi juga meramalkan kotak batas sebagai bukti jawapan yang dihasilkan. Lagipun, perwakilan OCR (COR) berkemah konteks untuk fusi multimodal diusulkan untuk memudahkan tugas lokasi. LaAP-Net yang kami cadangkan melampaui pendekatan yang ada pada tiga set data tanda referensi untuk tugas VQA teks dengan margin yang dapat dilihat.', 'mt': 'It-test tal-immaġni għandu informazzjoni essenzjali biex jifhem ix-xena u jwettaq ir-raġunament. Il-kompitu tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet viżwali bbażati fuq it-test (test VQA) jiffoka fuq mistoqsijiet viżwali li jeħtieġu l-qari tat-test fl-istampi. Is-sistemi VQA tat-test eżistenti jiġġeneraw tweġiba billi jagħżlu minn testi tar-rikonoxximent ottiku tal-karattri (OCR) jew vokabulari fiss. L-informazzjoni pożizzjonali tat-test mhijiex użata biżżejjed u hemm nuqqas ta’ evidenza għat-tweġiba ġġenerata. Bħala tali, dan id-dokument jipproponi netwerk ta’ tbassir tat-tweġibiet li jkun konxju mill-lokalizzazzjoni (LaAP-Net) biex jindirizza din l-isfida. Il-LaAP-Net tagħna mhux biss tiġġenera t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsija iżda tipprevedi wkoll kaxxa ta’ limitu bħala evidenza tat-tweġiba ġġenerata. Barra minn hekk, hija proposta rappreżentanza OCR arrikkita fil-kuntest (COR) għall-fużjoni multimodali biex tiffaċilita l-kompitu ta’ lokalizzazzjoni. Il-LaAP-Net proposta tagħna tirriżulta minn approċċi eżistenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza għall-kompitu tat-test VQA b’marġini notevoli.', 'pl': 'Tekst obrazu zawiera niezbędne informacje do zrozumienia sceny i wykonywania rozumowania. Zadanie wizualne odpowiedzi na pytania tekstowe (text VQA) koncentruje się na pytaniach wizualnych, które wymagają czytania tekstu w obrazach. Istniejące systemy VQA tekstowe generują odpowiedź poprzez wybór tekstów z optycznego rozpoznawania znaków (OCR) lub stałego słownictwa. Informacje o pozycji tekstu są niewykorzystywane i brak dowodów na wygenerowaną odpowiedź. W związku z tym w niniejszym artykule proponuje się lokalizacyjną sieć predykcyjną odpowiedzi (LaaP-Net), aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu. Nasza LaaP-Net nie tylko generuje odpowiedź na pytanie, ale także przewiduje pudełko graniczne jako dowód na wygenerowaną odpowiedź. Ponadto proponuje się wzbogaconą o kontekst reprezentację OCR (COR) dla syntezy multimodalnej, aby ułatwić lokalizację. Nasza proponowana platforma LaaP-Net przewyższa istniejące podejścia na trzech zestawach danych referencyjnych dla tekstowego zadania VQA o zauważalny margines.', 'ro': 'Textul imaginii conține informații esențiale pentru a înțelege scena și a efectua raționament. Activitatea de răspuns vizual bazată pe text (text VQA) se concentrează pe întrebări vizuale care necesită citirea textului în imagini. Sistemele VQA text existente generează un răspuns prin selectarea textelor de recunoaștere optică a caracterelor (OCR) sau a unui vocabular fix. Informațiile poziționale ale textului sunt subutilizate și nu există dovezi pentru răspunsul generat. Ca atare, această lucrare propune o rețea de predicție a răspunsurilor conștiente de localizare (LaAP-Net) pentru a aborda această provocare. LaAP-Net nu numai că generează răspunsul la întrebare, ci prezice și o casetă de limitare ca dovadă a răspunsului generat. În plus, se propune o reprezentare OCR îmbogățită în context (COR) pentru fuziunea multimodală pentru a facilita sarcina de localizare. LaAP-Net propus depășește abordările existente pe trei seturi de date de referință pentru sarcina VQA text cu o marjă vizibilă.', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн текст хувилбарыг ойлгохын тулд чухал мэдээллийг авч ирдэг. Текст суурилсан визуал асуулт хариулт (текст VQA) үйл ажиллагаа зургуудын текст унших шаардлагатай визуал асуултуудад анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting optical character recognition (OCR) texts or a fixed vocabulary. Текст дээрх байр суурь мэдээллийг бага ашиглаж байгаа бөгөөд үүсгэсэн хариултын тулд баталгаагүй байдаг. Энэ цаас нь энэ сорилтыг зохиохын тулд орон нутгийн ойлголтын хариулт таамаглах сүлжээг (LaAP-Net) санал болгодог. Бидний LaAP-Net нь зөвхөн асуултын хариулт биш, мөн үүсгэсэн хариултын нотолгоо болгон хязгаарлалтын хайрцаг гэдгийг таамагладаг. Үүнээс гадна олон моделийн цуглуулалтын OCR-ын төлөөлөлт баялагдсан байгууллага (КОР) нь орон нутгийн даалгаврыг амжилттай болгохын тулд санал өгдөг. Бидний LaAP-Net-ийн санал дэвшүүлсэн 3 банк өгөгдлийн санг VQA-ын ажлын текст дээр анзааралтай завсарлагаар хийдэг.', 'no': 'Biletekst inneheld nødvendige informasjon for å forstå scenen og utføra rasjonar. Oppgåve med tekstbasert visuell spørsmål (tekst VQA) fokuserer på visuelle spørsmål som krev lesing av tekst i bilete. Det eksisterande tekst- VQA- systemet lagar ein svar ved å velja frå optiske teiknkonkjenning (OCR) eller ein fast ordbok. Plasseringsinformasjon av tekst er underbrukt og det er mange beviser for den genererte svaret. Denne papiret foreslår eit nettverk for å forhåndsvisa svar på lokalisering (LaAP-Net) for å handtera denne utfordringa. Vårt LaAP- Nett lagar ikkje berre svaret på spørsmålet, men foregår også ein grenseboks som bevis på den genererte svaret. I tillegg foreslår ein kontekstrært OCR-representasjon (COR) for multimodal fusjon for å gjere tilgjengeleg lokaliseringsoppgåva. Vår foreslått LaAP-Net utfører eksisterande tilnærmingar på tre benchmarkdatasett for teksten VQA-oppgåva ved ein merkelig margin.', 'sr': 'Tekst slike nosi ključne informacije kako bi razumjeli scenu i izvršili razum. Za odgovor na vizualno pitanje na tekstu (tekst VQA) se fokusira na vizualna pitanja koje zahtevaju čitanje teksta na slikama. Postojeći tekst VQA sistemi stvaraju odgovor odabrati iz tekstova za prepoznavanje optičkih karaktera (OCR) ili fiksnih rečnika. Pozicionalne informacije o tekstu su poduzete i nedostaje dokaza za proizvedeni odgovor. Ovaj papir predlaže lokalizacijsku mrežu predviđanja odgovora (LaAP-Net) kako bi se riješio ovaj izazov. Naš LaAP-Net ne samo stvara odgovor na pitanje, nego takođe predviđa graničnu kutiju kao dokaz proizvedenog odgovora. Osim toga, predlaže se predstavljanje OCR za multimodalnu fuziju u kontekstu obogaćeno za lokalizaciju. Naš predloženi LaAP-Net iznosi postojeće pristupe na tri standardna seta podataka za tekst VQA zadatak primjetljivom marginom.', 'si': 'පින්තූර පාළුවේ ස්ථානය තේරුම් ගන්න සහ හැකියුම් කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය තොරතුරු අරගෙන යනවා. පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය (පාළිබඳ VQA) වැඩේ පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ තියෙන්නේ පාළුවන් VQA පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා (OCR) පාළුවක් නැත්තම් සිද්ධ පාළුවේ ස්ථානය තොරතුරු අඩු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම උත්තරය සඳහා සාක්ෂියක් නැ මෙහෙම විදියට, මේ පැත්තේ ස්ථානිකරණය සඳහා දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාලය (LaAP-Net අපේ LaAP-Net ප්\u200dරශ්නයට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නෙවෙයි නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ ඉතින්, සම්බන්ධ විශාල OCR ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය (COR) වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් මොඩිමෝඩල් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධ අපේ LaAP-Net ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් තුන්දෙනුවෙන් තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට', 'so': "Image text carries essential information to understand the scene and perform reasoning.  Jawaabta su'aalaha aragtida ee ku saleysan qoraalka (text VQA) waxay ku focus yihiin su'aalaha aragga ah oo u baahan karta qoraalka sawirada. nidaamka qoraalka VQA ee ku jira ayaa jawaab ka soo saara marka laga doorto aqoonsashada qoraalka saxda ah (OCR) ama hadal saxda ah. Macluumaadka joogtada ah ee qoraalka waxaa lagu isticmaalaa, waxaana laga baahan yahay caddeyn ku saabsan jawaabta soo saaray. Sida darteed warqaddaas ayaa soo jeedinaya shabakadda la-aqoonsan jawaabta sii-sheegidda (LaAP-Net) si uu u macaamiloodo dhibaatadan. Shabakaddayada LaAP-Net ma sameeyo jawaabta su'aalka oo keliya, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale ka hormariyaa sanduuq la xiriira sida calaamad u ah jawaabta generay. Sidoo kale waxaa loo talo galay in loo fududeeyo shaqada boosaska. Soo jeeday LaAP-Net ayaa soo bandhigay meelaha joogta ah saddex benchmark databases oo u qoran qoraalka VQA goob ah.", 'sv': 'Bildtext innehåller viktig information för att förstå scenen och utföra resonemang. Textbaserad visuell frågesvarsuppgift (text VQA) fokuserar på visuella frågor som kräver läsning av text i bilder. Befintliga text VQA-system genererar ett svar genom att välja text från optisk teckenkänning (OCR) eller ett fast ordförråd. Positionsinformation för text är underutnyttjad och det saknas bevis för det genererade svaret. Som sådan föreslår denna uppsats ett lokaliseringsövervakande svar prediction network (LaAP-Net) för att ta itu med denna utmaning. Vårt LaAP-Net genererar inte bara svaret på frågan utan förutspår också en gränsruta som bevis på det genererade svaret. Dessutom föreslås en kontextberikad OCR-representation (COR) för multimodal fusion för att underlätta lokaliseringsuppgiften. Vår föreslagna LaAP-Net överträffar befintliga metoder på tre benchmarkdatauppsättningar för text VQA-uppgiften med en märkbar marginal.', 'ta': 'பிம்பம் உரை காட்சியை புரிந்து கொள்ள முக்கியமான தகவல் செலுத்துகிறது காரணங்களை செய்யும். Text-based visual question answering (text VQA) task focuses on visual questions that require reading text in images.  நடப்பு உரை VQA அமைப்பு உரையின் நிலையான தகவல் உபயோகிக்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட விடைக்கு ஆதாரம் இல்லை. இது போன்று, இந்த காகிதத்திற்கு ஒரு உள்ளமைப்பு அறிந்து கொள்ளும் பதில் முன்னோட்டு வலைப்பின்னல் (LaAP- Net) இந்த சவால எங்கள் லாப்பி- வலைப்பின்னல் கேள்விக்கு பதில் மட்டும் உருவாக்குவதில்லை ஆனால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட விடையின் ஆதாரமாக ஒரு  மேலும், ஒரு சூழ்நிலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட OCR குறிப்பு( COR) பல்முறையான குறிப்புகளுக்கு உள்ளூட்டும் பணியை எளிதாக்குவதற எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட LaAP- Net மூன்று benchmark தரவுத்தளங்களில் இருக்கும் முறைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது ஒரு கவனிக்கப்படும் முற', 'ur': 'تصویر کے پیغام کے لئے ضروری معلومات حمل کرتا ہے کہ صحیح سمجھ سکیں اور منطق کریں۔ ٹیکسٹ بنیادی ویزیولی سؤال جواب دینے (ٹیکسٹ VQA) کا کام تصاویروں میں لکھنے کی ضرورت رکھتا ہے۔ Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting optical character recognition (OCR) texts or a fixed vocabulary. متن کی موقعیت معلومات کم استعمال کی جاتی ہے اور جواب کے لئے کوئی مدد نہیں ہے. اس طرح، یہ کاغذ ایک محلی جاننے والی جواب کی پیش بینی نیٹورک (LaAP-Net) کو اس چال کے بارے میں استعمال کرتا ہے. ہماری لااپ-نیٹ صرف سوال کے جواب کو پیدا کرتا ہے لیکن ایک محدودیت باکس کو بھی پیدا کیا گیا جواب کی شہادت کے طور پر پیش بینی کرتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ایک کنٹنسیٹ ثروت والی OCR نمایش (COR) multimodal fusion کے لئے پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے کہ لوکائل سازی کا کام آسان کرے۔ ہماری پیشنهاد لااپ-نیٹ نے تین بینچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر موجود موجود طریقے کو اضافہ کردیا ہے جو ایک مشاهده مرز کے ذریعہ ایک ٹیکسٹ VQA ٹیکسٹ کے لئے ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Mavjud matn VQA tizimi optik belgilash (OCR) matnni tanlash uchun javob yaratadi. Matnning holati maʼlumoti ishlatiladi va yaratilgan javob uchun hujjat yoʻq. Shunday qilib, bu qogʻoz bu qiymatni boshqarish uchun lokal taʼminlovchi javob tarmoqni (LaAP-Net) talab qiladi. Bizning LaAP-Net faqat savol javobiga yaratish emas, balki yaratilgan javob sifatida ko'rib chiqaradi. Ko'rsatilgan, multimodal fusion uchun qo'shilgan OCR (COR) tashkilotlarini ishlatish uchun talab qilinadi. Bizning talab qilingan LaAP-Net, uchta benchmark maʼlumot bazalarida mavjud usullarni koʻrsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ảnh văn bản mang thông tin quan trọng để hiểu hiện trường và thực hiện lập luận. Việc trả lời câu hỏi hình ảnh dựa trên văn bản (đoạn VQA) tập trung vào các câu hỏi hình ảnh cần đọc văn bản trong ảnh. Các hệ thống chữ VQA hiện thời tạo ra câu trả lời bằng cách chọn các văn bản nhận dạng quang học hay từ điển cố định. Tin tức vị trí của văn bản không được sử dụng và không có bằng chứng cho câu trả lời đã tạo ra. Như vậy, tờ giấy này đề xuất một mạng dự đoán câu trả lời cục bộ (LaAP-Net) để giải quyết thử thách này. The LaAP-Net không chỉ tạo ra câu trả lời cho câu hỏi này, còn dự đoán được một hộp tự giới hạn là bằng chứng cho câu trả lời được tạo ra. Thêm vào đó, một đại diện OCR đầy hoàn cảnh cho sự sắp xếp đa chiều được đề xuất để phát triển cục bộ. Những phương pháp bố đề nghị của LaAP-Net thực hiện trên ba tập tin tiêu chuẩn cho nhiệm vụ VQA bằng một khoảng cách đáng chú ý.', 'bg': 'Текстът на изображението носи съществена информация за разбиране на сцената и извършване на разсъждения. Текстово базираната задача за визуално отговаряне на въпроси (текст) се фокусира върху визуални въпроси, които изискват четене на текст в изображения. Съществуващите текстови системи генерират отговор чрез избор от текстове за оптично разпознаване на знаци (ОКР) или фиксиран речник. Позиционната информация на текста е недостатъчно използвана и липсват доказателства за генерирания отговор. Като такава, тази статия предлага локализационна мрежа за прогнозиране на отговорите (ЛаAP-Net) за справяне с това предизвикателство. Нашата мрежа не само генерира отговора на въпроса, но и предвижда ограничителна кутия като доказателство за генерирания отговор. Освен това се предлага обогатено с контекста представяне на OCR (COR) за мултимодален синтез, за да се улесни задачата за локализация. Нашият предложен ЛаАП-Нет превъзхожда съществуващите подходи на три сравнителни набора данни за задачата на текста с забележим марж.', 'nl': 'Beeldtekst bevat essentiële informatie om de scène te begrijpen en redenering uit te voeren. Tekstgebaseerde visuele vragenbeantwoordingstaak (tekst VQA) richt zich op visuele vragen waarvoor tekst in afbeeldingen moet worden gelezen. Bestaande tekst VQA systemen genereren een antwoord door te kiezen uit optische tekenherkenning (OCR) teksten of een vaste woordenschat. Positionele informatie van tekst wordt onvoldoende gebruikt en er is een gebrek aan bewijs voor het gegenereerde antwoord. Om deze uitdaging aan te pakken, stelt deze paper een lokalisatie-aware respons prediction network (LaaP-Net) voor. Ons LaaP-Net genereert niet alleen het antwoord op de vraag, maar voorspelt ook een bounding box als bewijs van het gegenereerde antwoord. Bovendien wordt een context-verrijkte OCR-representatie (COR) voor multimodale fusie voorgesteld om de lokalisatie-taak te vergemakkelijken. Ons voorgestelde LaaP-Net overtreft bestaande benaderingen op drie benchmark datasets voor de tekst VQA taak met een merkbare marge.', 'da': 'Billedtekst indeholder vigtige oplysninger til at forstå scenen og udføre ræsonnement. Tekstbaseret visuel spørgsmålsbesvarelse (tekst VQA) opgave fokuserer på visuelle spørgsmål, der kræver læsning af tekst i billeder. Eksisterende tekst VQA-systemer genererer et svar ved at vælge fra optisk tegngenkendelse (OCR) tekster eller et fast ordforråd. Positionsoplysninger om tekst er underbrugt, og der mangler beviser for det genererede svar. Som sådan foreslår denne artikel et lokaliseringsbevidst svar prediction netværk (LaAP-Net) for at løse denne udfordring. Vores LaAP-Net genererer ikke blot svaret på spørgsmålet, men forudsiger også en afgrænsende boks som bevis på det genererede svar. Desuden foreslås en kontekstberiget OCR-repræsentation (COR) for multimodal fusion for at lette lokaliseringsopgaven. Vores foreslåede LaAP-Net overgår eksisterende tilgange på tre benchmark datasæt for tekst VQA opgaven med en mærkbar margin.', 'hr': 'Tekst slike nosi ključne informacije kako bi razumjeli scenu i izvršili razum. Za odgovor na vizualno pitanje na tekstu (tekst VQA) se fokusira na vizualna pitanja koje zahtijevaju čitanje teksta na slikama. Postojeći tekstovi VQA sustavi stvaraju odgovor birajući iz tekstova optičkog priznanja karaktera (OCR) ili fiksnih rečnika. Pozicionalne informacije o tekstu su poduzete i nedostaje dokaza za proizvedeni odgovor. Ovaj papir predlaže lokalizacijsku mrežu predviđanja odgovora (LaAP-Net) za rješavanje ovog izazova. Naš LaAP-Net ne samo stvara odgovor na pitanje, već predviđa i graničnu kutiju kao dokaz proizvedenog odgovora. Osim toga, predlaže se predstavljanje OCR-a za multimodalnu fuziju u okviru bogatih konteksta kako bi olakšalo lokalizacijski zadatak. Naš predloženi LaAP-Net iznosi postojeće pristupe na tri standardna seta podataka za tekst VQA zadatak primjetljivom marginom.', 'id': 'Teks gambar membawa informasi penting untuk memahami adegan dan melakukan alasan. Tugas menjawab pertanyaan visual berdasarkan teks (teks VQA) fokus pada pertanyaan visual yang membutuhkan membaca teks dalam gambar. Sistem VQA teks yang ada menghasilkan jawaban dengan memilih dari teks pengenalan karakter optik (OCR) atau vocabulari tetap. Informasi posisional teks tidak digunakan dan ada kekurangan bukti untuk jawaban yang dihasilkan. Sebagai seperti itu, kertas ini mengusulkan jaringan prediksi jawaban yang sadar-lokalisasi (LaAP-Net) untuk mengatasi tantangan ini. LaAP-Net kami tidak hanya menghasilkan jawaban untuk pertanyaan tetapi juga memprediksi kotak batas sebagai bukti dari jawaban yang dihasilkan. Selain itu, sebuah perwakilan OCR (COR) yang kaya dengan konteks untuk fusi multimodal diusulkan untuk memudahkan tugas lokalisasi. LaAP-Net yang diusulkan kami melampaui pendekatan yang ada pada tiga set data benchmark untuk tugas VQA teks dengan margin yang terlihat.', 'de': 'Bildtext enthält wichtige Informationen, um die Szene zu verstehen und Argumentation durchzuführen. Textbasierte visuelle Fragebeantwortung (Text VQA) konzentriert sich auf visuelle Fragen, die das Lesen von Text in Bildern erfordern. Bestehende Text-VQA-Systeme generieren eine Antwort, indem sie aus Texten der optischen Zeichenerkennung (OCR) oder einem festen Vokabular auswählen. Positionsinformationen des Textes werden nicht genutzt und es fehlen Beweise für die generierte Antwort. In diesem Beitrag wird daher ein lokalisationsbewusstes Antwortvorhersagenetzwerk (LaaP-Net) vorgeschlagen, um diese Herausforderung anzugehen. Unser LaaP-Net generiert nicht nur die Antwort auf die Frage, sondern prognostiziert auch eine Bounding Box als Beweis für die generierte Antwort. Darüber hinaus wird eine kontextangereicherte OCR-Repräsentation (COR) für multimodale Fusion vorgeschlagen, um die Lokalisierungsaufgabe zu erleichtern. Unser vorgeschlagenes LaaP-Net übertrifft bestehende Ansätze auf drei Benchmark-Datensätzen für die Text-VQA-Aufgabe deutlich.', 'sw': 'Makala ya picha inabeba taarifa muhimu ili kuelewa eneo hilo na kutekeleza sababu. Jibu la maswali yenye msingi wa maandishi (maandishi ya VQA) linalenga kwenye maswali ya kuona yanayohitaji kusoma maandishi katika picha. Mfumo wa maandishi yanayopo VQA unatengeneza jibu kwa kuchagua kuandika maarifa ya kioptical (OCR) au lugha iliyo sahihi. Taarifa za msingi za maandishi zinatumiwa na kuna ukosefu wa ushahidi wa jibu lililotengenezwa. Kwa mfano, gazeti hili linapendekeza mtandao wa kutabiri (LaAP-Net) wa majibu yenye ufahamu wa mahali husika kutangaza changamoto hili. Mtandao wetu wa LaAP si tu unaotengeneza jibu la swali bali pia unatabiri boksi la kufungia kama ushahidi wa jibu lililozaliwa. Zaidi ya hayo, uwakilishi wa OCR wenye utajiri wa mazingira (COR) unapendekezwa kusaidia kazi ya uwazi. Mtandao wetu ulipendekezwa LaAP-Net unaonyesha mbinu zilizopo kwenye seti za taarifa tatu za bendera kwa ajili ya kazi ya maandishi ya VQA kwa njia ya kutambuliwa.', 'ko': '이미지 텍스트는 장면을 이해하고 추리를 실행하는 기본 정보를 포함한다.텍스트 기반의 시각 퀴즈(Text-VQA) 작업은 그림에서 텍스트를 읽어야 하는 시각적 문제에 중심을 두었다.기존의 텍스트 VQA 시스템은 광학 문자인식(OCR) 텍스트나 고정된 어휘에서 선택하여 답을 생성한다.텍스트의 위치 정보는 충분히 이용되지 않았고 생성된 답안을 증명할 증거가 부족했다.따라서 본고는 이 도전에 대응하기 위해 포지셔닝 감지 응답 예측 네트워크(LaAP-Net)를 제시했다.우리의 LaAP 네트워크는 문제의 답안을 생성할 뿐만 아니라 답안을 생성하는 증거로 경계 상자를 예측합니다.이 밖에 다중 모드 융합에 사용되는 상하문 풍부한 OCR 표시(COR)를 제시하여 임무를 포지셔닝하기 편리하도록 했다.텍스트 VQA 작업의 세 가지 기준 데이터 세트에서 우리가 제시한 LaAP 네트워크의 성능은 기존의 방법보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'af': "Beeldteks dra noodsaaklike inligting om die scene te verstaan en redening te doen. Teks gebaseerde visuele vraag antwoord (teks VQA) taak fokus op visuele vrae wat nodig lees teks in beelde. Name Bestaande teks VQA stelsels genereer 'n antwoord deur te kies van optiese karakterherken teks of 'n vaste woordeboek. Posisiële inligting van teks word onderbruik en daar is 'n ontbreek van getuienis vir die genereerde antwoord. Soos sodat hierdie papier voorstel 'n lokalisering-bewus antwoord voorskounetwerk (LaAP-Net) om hierdie uitdrukking te adres. Ons LaAP- Net genereer nie net die antwoord na die vraag nie, maar ook voorskou 'n grense boks as bevestig van die genereerde antwoord. Daarop is 'n konteks-ryk OCR voorstelling (COR) vir multimodaal fuisie voorgestel om die lokalisering taak te eenvoudig. Ons voorgestel LaAP-Net uitvoer bestaande toegang op drie benchmark datastel vir die teks VQA taak deur 'n notasiebare marge.", 'fa': 'متن تصویر اطلاعات ضروری برای فهمیدن صحنه و اجرای منطقی حمل می\u200cکند. Name سیستم\u200cهای متن VQA موجود با انتخاب از متن\u200cهای شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهای optical (OCR) یا یک کلمه ثابت جواب می\u200cدهد. اطلاعات موقعیت متن کم استفاده می\u200cشود و برای جواب تولید مدرک وجود ندارد. این کاغذ برای حل این چالش یک شبکه پیش\u200cبینی (LaAP-Net) را به محلی آگاه می\u200cکند. لاAP-Net ما نه تنها جواب سوال را تولید می کند بلکه یک جعبه محدود را هم پیش بینی می کند به عنوان مدرک جواب تولید می کند. علاوه بر این، نمایش OCR متوسط ثروتمندی (COR) برای ترکیب متوسط متوسط پیشنهاد می\u200cشود تا کار محلی را آسان کند. پیشنهاد ما LaAP-Net به عنوان یک مرز مشاهده\u200cای از دسترسی موجود در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای سنجیر برای کار VQA متن انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Teksti i imazhit mban informacion thelbësor për të kuptuar skenën dhe për të kryer arsyetimin. Përgjigja e pyetjeve vizuale bazuar në tekst (tekst VQA) përqëndrohet në pyetje vizuale që kërkojnë leximin e tekstit në imazhe. Sistemet ekzistuese të tekstit VQA gjenerojnë një përgjigje duke zgjedhur nga tekstet e njohjes optike të karakterit (OCR) ose një fjalor fiks. Informacioni pozitiv i tekstit është i dobët dhe ka mungesë të provave për përgjigjen e gjeneruar. Si e tillë, kjo letër propozon një rrjet parashikimi të përgjigjeve për lokalizimin (LaAP-Net) për të trajtuar këtë sfidë. LaAP-Net jonë jo vetëm gjeneron përgjigjen për pyetjen por parashikon gjithashtu një kuti kufitare si prova e përgjigjes së gjeneruar. Përveç kësaj, propozohet një përfaqësim OCR i pasur me kontekst (COR) për fuzionin multimodal për të lehtësuar detyrën e lokalizimit. LaAP-Net e propozuar jonë ekziston në tre baza të dhënash për detyrën e tekstit VQA me një margin të dukshëm.', 'tr': 'Resim metin sahypany d체힊체nmek we d체힊체nmek 체챌in esasy maglumatlary ta첵첵ar. Metin tabanly g철rsel soraglar jogapy (metin VQA) t채blisasy suratlarda metin okamaly soraglary 체챌in fokus ed첵채r. 횜흫 bar metin VQA sistemleri optik karakter tana첵mas캇ndan 첵ada sabit s철zleri sa첵lasak 체챌in bir jogap bejer. Metin durum maglumaty a 힊a휓캇 ullanyl첵ar we 체retilen jogaba 체챌in bir kan캇t 첵ok. 힇onu흫 첵aly, bu kagyz bu kyn챌ylygy 챌철zmek 체챌in 첵erle힊melik bilen tany힊 jogabaty 철nlemek 힊ebekesini teklip ediyor. Bizim LaAP-Netimiz soruya cevab캇 olu힊turur ancak 체retilen cevab캇n kan캇tlar캇 olarak s캇n캇r캇 철ng철r체yor. Ayr캇ca, 챌omodal birle힊me i챌in context-rich OCR represiyonu (COR) lokalizasyon g철revini kolayla힊t캇rmak i챌in teklif edildi. Bizi흫 LaAP-Netimiz 체챌 benchmark veri setirinde bar 첵agda첵lary 챌ykar첵ar.', 'am': 'የምስል ጽሑፍ የምስራቱን ለማስተዋል እና ማስታወቂያውን ለማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የጽሑፍ ጉዳይ መልስ የጽሑፉ ጽሑፍ የጽሑፍ የአስቸጋሪ መረጃ በተጠቀም እና የመፍጠር መልስ ላይ ማስረጃ የጎደለበት ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ ይህ ገጽ የግንኙነት እና ማስታወቂያውን የመቀበል ጥያቄ (LaAP-Net) ወደዚህ ጥያቄን ለመጠየቅ ይገልጻል፡፡ Our LaAP-Net not only generates the answer to the question but also predicts a bounding box as evidence of the generated answer.  በተጨማሪም፣ የኦክሮስ ባለጠጎች መልዕክት (COR) ለብዙነኛ ጉዳይ የቦታ ስራትን ለማግኘት ለመዘጋጀት ይገልጻል፡፡ የተዘጋጀን ላAP-መረብ በሦስት benchmark ዳታዎችን ለጽሑፉ VQA አድራሻ በተመለከተ ቦታ ላይ የሚደረገውን ደረጃዎች ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Rəsm mətni sahəsini anlamaq və razılıq etmək üçün əsas məlumatları daşıyır. Metin tabanlı vizül sual cevapı (metin VQA) işləri şəkillərdə mətn oxuması lazımdır. Existing mətn VQA sistemləri optik karakter tanımlaması (OCR) mətnlərindən və sabit sözlərdən seçirək bir cevap yaradır. Metin məlumatının məlumatı a şağı istifadə edilir və ürəklənmiş cavab üçün bir dəlil yoxdur. Bu kağıt bu çətinlikdən çəkinmək üçün yerləşdirilmiş cavab tədbir şəklinə (LaAP-Net) təklif edir. LaAP-Netimiz sualına cavab verən deyil, ancaq ürəklənmiş cavabın dəlili olaraq sınır qutusu təmin edir. Daha sonra, çoxlu modal birləşdirilmək üçün context-rich OCR göstəricisi (COR) lokalizasyon işini asanlaşdırmaq üçün təklif edilir. Bizim LaAP-Net təbliğ etdiyimiz üç benchmark veri qurduğu mətn VQA işində mövcuddur bir margin vasitəsilə müəyyən edilən tərzlərini a şkar edir.', 'bn': 'ছবির টেক্সট দেখার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য রয়েছে এবং কারণ প্রদর্শন করার জন্য। টেক্সট ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক দৃশ্য প্রশ্নের উত্তর (টেক্সট ভিকিউ) কাজের প্রতি দৃশ্যমান প্রশ্নের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছ বিদ্যমান টেক্সট ভিকিউএ সিস্টেম অপক্রিয় ক্যারেক্টার স্বীকৃতির (OCR) টেক্সট বা স্থায়ীত শব্দভাণ্ডার থেকে বেছে  টেক্সটের অবস্থান তথ্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং তৈরি করা উত্তরের জন্য প্রমাণের অভাব রয়েছে। এই প্রবন্ধটি এই চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলার জন্য স্থানীয়-সচেতন উত্তর প্রস্তাব করেছে। আমাদের লাপি-নেট প্রশ্নের উত্তর তৈরি করে না, বরং তারা প্রজন্মিত উত্তরের প্রমাণ হিসেবে প্রত্যাখ্যান করেছে। এছাড়াও, বিভিন্ন অক্সির প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে যাতে স্থানীয় অবস্থানের কাজের সুবিধা প্রদান করা হয়। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত লাAP-নেটটি তিনটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের উপর বিদ্যমান উপায় প্রকাশ করেছে যা দেখা যাচ্ছে একটি মার্গিনের', 'bs': 'Tekst slike nosi ključne informacije kako bi razumio scenu i izvršio razum. Za odgovor na vizualno pitanje na tekstu (tekst VQA) se fokusira na vizualna pitanja koje zahtijevaju čitanje teksta na slikama. Postojeći tekstni VQA sistemi stvaraju odgovor birajući iz tekstova optičkog priznanja karaktera (OCR) ili fiksnih rečnika. Pozicionalne informacije o tekstu su poduzete i nedostaje dokaza za proizvedeni odgovor. Ovaj papir predlaže lokalizacijsku mrežu predviđanja odgovora (LaAP-Net) kako bi se riješio ovaj izazov. Naš LaAP-Net ne samo stvara odgovor na pitanje, već predviđa i ograničavajuću kutiju kao dokaz stvorenog odgovora. Osim toga, predlaže se predstavljanje OCR za multimodalnu fuziju u kontekstu obogaćeno za lokalizaciju. Naš predloženi LaAP-Net iznosi postojeće pristupe na tri standardna seta podataka za tekst VQA zadatak primjetljivom marginom.', 'cs': 'Obrazový text nese základní informace pro porozumění scéně a provedení uvažování. Úloha textového zodpovězení vizuálních otázek (text VQA) se zaměřuje na vizuální otázky, které vyžadují čtení textu v obrázkech. Stávající textové VQA systémy generují odpověď výběrem textů z optického rozpoznávání znaků (OCR) nebo pevné slovní zásoby. Poziční informace textu jsou nedostatečně využívány a neexistují důkazy o generované odpovědi. Tento článek proto navrhuje lokalizačně orientovanou síť predikce odpovědí (LaaP-Net) pro řešení této výzvy. Náš LaaP-Net nejen generuje odpověď na otázku, ale také předpovídá hraniční rámeček jako důkaz generované odpovědi. Navíc je navržena kontextově obohacená reprezentace OCR (COR) pro multimodální fúzi, která usnadňuje lokalizační úlohu. Náš návrh LaaP-Net výrazně překonává stávající přístupy na třech referenčních datových sadách pro textový úkol VQA.', 'et': 'Pilditekst kannab olulist teavet stseeni mõistmiseks ja arutlemiseks. Tekstipõhine visuaalne küsimustele vastamine (teksti VQA) ülesanne keskendub visuaalsetele küsimustele, mis nõuavad teksti lugemist piltidel. Olemasolevad teksti VQA süsteemid loovad vastuse, valides optilise märgituvastuse (OCR) tekstid või fikseeritud sõnavara. Teksti positsiooniteave on alati kasutatud ja saadud vastuse kohta puuduvad tõendid. Sellisena pakutakse käesolevas töös välja lokaliseerimisteadliku vastuste prognoosimise võrgustiku (LaaP-Net) loomine selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Meie LaAP-Net mitte ainult ei genereeri vastust küsimusele, vaid ennustab ka piirikasti kui tõendit genereeritud vastusest. Lisaks tehakse ettepanek luua kontekstiga rikastatud OCR esindus mitmeliigilise fusiooni jaoks, et hõlbustada lokaliseerimist. Meie pakutud LaaP-Net ületab märgatava marginaaliga olemasolevaid lähenemisviise kolme võrdlusandmekogumi kohta teksti VQA ülesande jaoks.', 'fi': 'Kuvateksti sisältää olennaista tietoa kohtauksen ymmärtämiseksi ja päättelyn suorittamiseksi. Tekstipohjainen visuaalinen kysymysvastaus (text VQA) -tehtävä keskittyy visuaalisiin kysymyksiin, jotka edellyttävät tekstin lukemista kuvissa. Olemassa olevat tekstin VQA-järjestelmät tuottavat vastauksen valitsemalla optisen merkkitunnistuksen (OCR) tekstit tai kiinteä sanasto. Tekstin sijaintitiedot ovat alikäytettyjä ja saadusta vastauksesta ei ole näyttöä. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan lokalisaatiotietoista vastausennusteverkostoa (LaaP-Net) vastaamaan tähän haasteeseen. LaaP-Net ei ainoastaan luo vastausta kysymykseen, vaan myös ennustaa rajaavan laatikon todisteeksi luodusta vastauksesta. Lisäksi ehdotetaan multimodaalisen fuusion kontekstilla rikastettua OCR-esitystä, jotta lokalisointitehtävä helpottuisi. Ehdotettu LaaP-Net on huomattavasti parempi kuin kolme viiteaineistoa tekstin VQA-tehtävän osalta.', 'hy': 'Պատկերի տեքստը պարունակում է կարևոր տեղեկատվություն, որպեսզի հասկանա տեսարանը և իրականացնի մտածողությունը: Text-based visual question answering (text VQA) task focuses on visual questions that require reading text in images.  Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting from optical character recognition (OCR) texts or a fixed vocabulary.  Տեքստի դիրքային տեղեկատվությունը թերաօգտագործվում է և ստեղծված պատասխանի ապացույցների պակաս կա: Այսպիսով, այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է գոյություն ունեցող պատասխանների կանխատեսման ցանց (LAAP-Net) այս մարտահրավերի լուծման համար: Մեր LAAP-Net-ը ոչ միայն ստեղծում է հարցի պատասխանը, այլ նաև կանխատեսում է սահմանափակում որպես ստեղծված պատասխանի ապացույց: Ավելին, համատեքստի հարստացված OCR-ի (COR) ներկայացումը multimodial ֆուզիայի համար առաջարկվում է գտնվելու խնդրի հեշտացնելու համար: Մեր նախագծված LAAP-Net-ը արտադրում է գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները երեք համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի համար VQA-ի տեքստի հանձնարարության համար նկարագրավոր արժեքով:', 'ca': "Image text carries essential information to understand the scene and perform reasoning.  La tasca de resposta a preguntes visuals basades en text (text VQA) es centra en preguntes visuals que necessiten llegir text en imatges. Els sistemes VQA de text existents generen una resposta seleccionant dels textos OCR o un vocabulari fixe. La informació positiva del text és poc utilitzada i hi ha falta d'evidències per a la resposta generada. Com a tal, aquest article proposa una xarxa de predicció de respostes conscient de la localització (LaAP-Net) per abordar aquest repte. La nostra LaAP-Net no només genera la resposta a la pregunta, sinó també prediu una caixa de límits com prova de la resposta generada. A més, es propone una representació OCR enriquecida en el context (COR) per a la fusió multimodal per facilitar la tasca de localització. Our proposed LaAP-Net outperforms existing approaches on three benchmark datasets for the text VQA task by a noticeable margin.", 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis QA @ info: whatsthis @ info: status Kamar wancan, wannan takardar yana bukãtar da wani zane na localisation-mai sani na zama zane-ɗabi'ar bastarwa (LaPA-Net) dõmin ya address wannan bango. @ info: whatsthis Da haka, aka buƙata wani matalauci na OCR mai rikitacce (COR) wa fushi na multi-mutane don ya sauƙa ƙara wa aikin lokalori. @ info: status", 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་གེ་དོན་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་གོ་སྣང་དང་ལས་རྟོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པ། ཡི་གེའི་རྨང་གཞིའི་མཐོང་བའི་འདྲི་ཞིབ་ལན་པར(ཡི་གེའི་VQA)ལས་ཀ་སྟོན་པའི་འདྲི་ཞིབ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting from optical character recognition (OCR) texts or a fixed vocabulary. ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དུ་འོག་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་ཡོད་པ་དང་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་མི་འདུག དཔེར་ན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པ་དང་རྟོགས་པའི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པ། ང་ཚོའི་LaAP-Net་དེ་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལ་ལན་གསལ་གཅིག་པུ་མིན་པར་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱེན དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། སྐབས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྲོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་LaAP-Net དེ་ཡིས་བརྟན་བཀོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྲངས་གཟུགས་རིས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་མཐའ', 'jv': 'Test Visual question text convert-dither-type Na karo ngono, pemilih iki supoyo lokalisation-Awas mbutuhak tanggal (LaApp-net) kanggo nganggo perbudhakan iki. LaApp-net nganggo perusahaan nganggo responsa saking panggungu podho ampuhke tarjamahan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerasah LaApp-net ngapot kanggo gabungi iki dadi wis ana ing dataset kanggo telu bendhurin kanggo teks VqA task ngewehi Marjin sing bisa gabung', 'he': 'Image text carries essential information to understand the scene and perform reasoning.  Text-based visual question answering (text VQA) task focuses on visual questions that require reading text in images.  Existing text VQA systems generate an answer by selecting from optical character recognition (OCR) texts or a fixed vocabulary.  Positional information of text is underused and there is a lack of evidence for the generated answer.  As such, this paper proposes a localization-aware answer prediction network (LaAP-Net) to address this challenge.  רשת LaAP שלנו לא רק יוצרת את התשובה לשאלה, אלא גם צפה קופסת גבולות כראייה של התשובה המיוצרת. חוץ מזה, מוצעת מייצגת OCR (COR) שמעשירה בקשר למיזוג multimodal כדי להקל במשימת המיקום. Our proposed LaAP-Net outperforms existing approaches on three benchmark datasets for the text VQA task by a noticeable margin.', 'sk': 'Slikovno besedilo nosi bistvene informacije za razumevanje scene in opravljanje razmišljanja. Opravilo za vizualno odgovarjanje na vprašanja, ki temelji na besedilu, se osredotoča na vizualna vprašanja, ki zahtevajo branje besedila v slikah. Obstoječi besedilni sistemi VQA ustvarijo odgovor z izbiro besedil optičnega prepoznavanja znakov (OCR) ali fiksnega besedišča. Pozicijske informacije besedila so premalo uporabljene in ni dokazov za ustvarjen odgovor. V tem članku predlagamo mrežo za napovedovanje odgovorov na lokalizacijo (LaaP-Net) za reševanje tega izziva. Naš LaAP-Net ne samo ustvari odgovora na vprašanje, ampak tudi napoveduje mejno polje kot dokaz ustvarjenega odgovora. Poleg tega se predlaga kontekstno obogatena predstavitev OCR za multimodalno fuzijo, da se olajša naloga lokalizacije. Naš predlagani LaAP-Net za opazno maržo presega obstoječe pristope na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov za opravilo VQA besedila.'}
{'en': 'Multi-level Alignment Pretraining for Multi-lingual Semantic Parsing', 'ar': 'التدريب المسبق على المحاذاة متعدد المستويات للتحليل الدلالي متعدد اللغات', 'fr': "Préapprentissage de l'alignement multiniveau pour l'analyse sémantique multilingue", 'es': 'Preentrenamiento de alineación multinivel para el análisis semántico multilingüe', 'pt': 'Pré-treinamento de alinhamento multinível para análise semântica multilíngue', 'ja': '多言語セマンティック構文解析のためのマルチレベルアライメントプレトレーニング', 'zh': '多语言语义解析者,多习于齐预', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग के लिए बहु-स्तरीय संरेखण प्रीट्रेनिंग', 'ru': 'Многоуровневое предварительное обучение выравниванию для многоязычного семантического анализа', 'ga': 'Réamhoiliúint Ailínithe Illeibhéil le haghaidh Parsáil Shéimeantach Ilteangach', 'ka': 'Multi-Level Alignment Pretraining for Multi-lingual Semantic Parsing', 'el': 'Προετοιμασία πολλαπλών επιπέδων ευθυγράμμισης για πολυγλωσσική σημειακή ανάλυση', 'hu': 'Többszintű igazítás előadás a többnyelvű szemantikus értelmezéshez', 'it': "Pretraining di allineamento multilivello per l'analisi semantica multilingue", 'lt': 'Daugialygis suderinimas keliomis kalbomis atliekamam semantiniam analizavimui', 'kk': 'Көп- деңгейлі бірнеше тілдік шемматикалық талдау үшін түрлендіру', 'mk': 'Многу нивоа преправање на прилагодување за мултијазичко семантично анализирање', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Berlebihan-Aras untuk Pengesahan Semantik Berberbilang-bahasa', 'mt': 'Tħarriġ ta’ Allinjament Multi-Livelli għall-Analiżi Semantika Multilingwi', 'ml': 'Multi- ഭാഷക്ക് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഒരുപാട് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിശീലനം', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл хэлний Semantic Parsing-д олон түвшинд тодорхойлолт', 'no': 'Multinivåjusteringsforetrekking for fleirspråk semantisk tolking', 'pl': 'Wielopoziomowe wyrównanie wstępne dla wielojęzycznego parowania semantycznego', 'sr': 'Višeniversko ispravljanje pretvaranje za višejezičko semantičko ispitivanje', 'ro': 'Aliniere pe mai multe niveluri Pretraining pentru analizarea semantică multilingvă', 'so': 'Waxbarashada isbedelka ee heerka kala duduwan ee heerka isbedelka', 'ta': 'பல- மொழி பாடலுக்கான பல- மட்டத்தில் ஒழுங்கு முன்பயிற்சி', 'sv': 'Multi-level Alignment Pretraining för flerspråkig semantisk tolkning', 'si': 'Multi- Level Alimentation', 'ur': 'Multi-Level Alignment Pretraining for Multi-lingual Semantic Parsing', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ Trước Liên Kết đa cấp cho chế độ truyền ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Претрениране на подравняване на няколко нива за многоезично семантично анализиране', 'nl': 'Voortraining op meerdere niveaus voor meertalige semantische parsing', 'da': 'Multi-level Alignment Pretraining for Multi-lingual Semantic Parsing', 'hr': 'Višeniversko ispravljanje pretvaranje za višejezičko semantičko ispitivanje', 'de': 'Mehrstufige Ausrichtungsvorbereitung für mehrsprachiges semantisches Parsing', 'id': 'Penyesuaian Multi-level Pretraining untuk Penganalisan Semantik Multi-bahasa', 'ko': '다국어 의미 분석의 다단계 맞춤법 훈련', 'fa': 'تنظیم سطح\u200cهای زیادی برای تجزیه\u200cهای متعدد زبان', 'sw': 'Mafunzo ya Upango wa ngazi nyingi kwa ajili ya Kumbukumba kwa lugha nyingi', 'tr': 'Çoklu-düzey Metitlendirme Çarpma', 'af': 'Multi- vlak Oplysing Prarening vir veelvuldige Semantiese Toesteling', 'sq': 'Përcaktimi i nivelit të shumtë për analizimin Semantik shumëgjuhës', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Բազմամամակարդակ համապատասխանումը բազմալեզու սեմանտիկ վերլուծության համար', 'bn': 'বহুভাষী সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য বহুস্তর স্তরের প্রযুক্তি প্রশিক্ষণ', 'az': '칂oxlu dilli Semantik 캻zl톛m톛 칲칞칲n 칞oxlu s톛viyy톛 캻zl톛m톛', 'bs': 'Višeniversko ispravljanje pretvaranje za višejezičko semantičko ispitivanje', 'ca': 'Aliniament Multi-Level Pretraining for Multi lingual Semantic Parsing', 'cs': 'Víceúrovňové předtrénování zarovnání pro vícejazyčné sémantické analýzy', 'et': 'Mitmetasandiline joondamise eelõpetamine mitmekeelse semantilise parsingi jaoks', 'fi': 'Monitasoisen linjauksen esikoulutus monikieliseen semanttiseen parsaukseen', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'he': 'התאמה במספר רמות למחקר סמנטי במספר שפות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Predvajanje poravnave na več ravneh za večjezično semantično razporejanje', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལུས་མཐོ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a multi-level alignment pretraining method in a unified architecture formulti-lingual semantic parsing. In this architecture, we use an adversarial training method toalign the space of different languages and use sentence level and word level parallel corpus assupervision information to align the semantic of different languages. Finally, we jointly train themulti-level alignment and semantic parsing tasks. We conduct experiments on a publicly avail-able multi-lingual semantic parsing dataset ATIS and a newly constructed dataset. Experimentalresults show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art methods on both datasets.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um método de pré-treinamento de alinhamento multinível em uma arquitetura unificada para análise semântica multilíngue. Nesta arquitetura, usamos um método de treinamento contraditório para alinhar o espaço de diferentes idiomas e usamos corpus paralelos em nível de sentença e nível de palavra como informações de supervisão para alinhar a semântica de diferentes idiomas. Finalmente, treinamos em conjunto as tarefas de alinhamento multinível e análise semântica. Conduzimos experimentos em um conjunto de dados de análise semântica multilíngue disponível publicamente ATIS e um conjunto de dados recém-construído. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo supera métodos de última geração em ambos os conjuntos de dados.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم طريقة تدريب ما قبل المحاذاة متعددة المستويات في بنية موحدة لتحليل دلالي متعدد اللغات. في هذه البنية ، نستخدم طريقة تدريب خصومة لمحاذاة مساحة اللغات المختلفة واستخدام معلومات الإشراف على مستوى الجملة ومستوى الكلمة على مستوى النص لمحاذاة دلالات اللغات المختلفة. أخيرًا ، نقوم بتدريب مهام المحاذاة متعددة المستويات والتحليل الدلالي بشكل مشترك. نجري تجارب على مجموعة بيانات التحليل الدلالي متعددة اللغات والمتاحة للجمهور ATIS ومجموعة بيانات تم إنشاؤها حديثًا. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث الأساليب في مجموعتي البيانات.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une méthode de pré-apprentissage d'alignement multiniveau dans une architecture unifiée pour l'analyse sémantique multilingue. Dans cette architecture, nous utilisons une méthode de formation contradictoire pour aligner l'espace des différentes langues et utiliser des corpus parallèles au niveau de la phrase et du niveau des mots comme informations de supervision pour aligner la sémantique des différentes langues. Enfin, nous formons conjointement les tâches d'alignement multiniveau et d'analyse sémantique. Nous menons des expériences sur un jeu de données d'analyse sémantique multilingue ATIS accessible au public et sur un ensemble de données nouvellement construit. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle surpasse les méthodes de pointe sur les deux ensembles de données.", 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un método de preentrenamiento de alineación multinivel en una arquitectura unificada para el análisis semántico multilingüe. En esta arquitectura, utilizamos un método de entrenamiento contradictorio para alinear el espacio de diferentes idiomas y utilizamos corpus paralelos a nivel de oración y nivel de palabra como información de supervisión para alinear la semántica de los diferentes idiomas. Finalmente, entrenamos conjuntamente las tareas de alineación multinivel y análisis semántico. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en un conjunto de datos de análisis semántico multilingüe disponible públicamente ATIS y un conjunto de datos recién construido. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo supera a los métodos más avanzados en ambos conjuntos de datos.', 'zh': '本文多对齐预训练方法,宜用多语言语义解析架构。 此架构之中,抗训练方法以对齐言语之间,并句与单词并行语料库为超视信息以语义齐言。 最后,共练多对齐和语义解析务。 一可公用多语言语义解析数ATIS与一新构数集上实验。 实验结果表明,二数集上皆优于先进之法。', 'ja': '本稿では、統一されたアーキテクチャにおける多階層アライメントの事前訓練方法と、多言語セマンティック構文解析を提示する。このアーキテクチャでは、異なる言語の空間を整列させるために対立トレーニング方法を使用し、異なる言語の意味論的な整列に文レベルと単語レベルの並列コーパスアスペルビジョン情報を使用します。最後に、複数レベルの整列とセマンティック構文解析タスクを共同でトレーニングします。公的に利用可能な多言語セマンティック解析データセットATISと新しく構築されたデータセットの実験を行っています。実験結果は、当社のモデルが両方のデータセットで最先端の方法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक एकीकृत आर्किटेक्चर फॉरमूल्टी-लिंगुअल सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग में एक बहु-स्तरीय संरेखण प्रीट्रेनिंग विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इस वास्तुकला में, हम विभिन्न भाषाओं के स्थान को संरेखित करने के लिए एक प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण विधि का उपयोग करते हैं और विभिन्न भाषाओं के शब्दार्थ को संरेखित करने के लिए वाक्य स्तर और शब्द स्तर समानांतर कॉर्पस एसुपरविज़न जानकारी का उपयोग करते हैं। अंत में, हम संयुक्त रूप से बहु-स्तरीय संरेखण और शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग कार्यों को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हम सार्वजनिक रूप से लाभ उठाने योग्य बहुभाषी शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग डेटासेट ATIS और एक नवनिर्मित डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल दोनों डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем многоуровневый метод предварительного обучения выравниванию в унифицированной архитектуре формулярно-языкового семантического синтаксического анализа. В этой архитектуре мы используем метод состязательного обучения для выравнивания пространства разных языков и используем информацию о параллельном корпусе уровня предложения и уровня слова для выравнивания семантики разных языков. Наконец, мы совместно обучаем многоуровневому выравниванию и семантическому синтаксическомуразбору задач. Мы проводим эксперименты на общедоступном многоязычном наборе данных семантического анализа ATIS и новом построенном наборе данных. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель превосходит современные методы в обоих наборах данных.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair modh réamhoiliúint ailínithe il-leibhéil in ailtireacht aontaithe parsáil shéimeantach fhoirmiúil-teanga. San ailtireacht seo, úsáidimid modh traenála sáraíochta chun spás na dteangacha éagsúla a ailíniú agus úsáidimid faisnéis maoirseachta corpais chomhthreomhair leibhéal abairtí agus leibhéal focal chun séimeantach teangacha éagsúla a ailíniú. Ar deireadh, déanaimid comhthraenáil ar chúraimí ailínithe illeibhéil agus ar pharsáil shéimeantach. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí parsála shéimeantach ilteangach ATIS atá ar fáil go poiblí agus ar thacar sonraí nuathógtha. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár samhail na modhanna úrscothacha ar an dá thacar sonraí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში მრავალური დონეზე გავაკეთებთ სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა ს ამ არქტიქტურაში ჩვენ გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული ენების სივრცე და სიტყვების სივრცე პარალელი კორპუსის ინფორმაცია, რომელიც განსხვავებული ენების სიმემანტიკის სწორებლად. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ერთადერთად გავაგრძნეთ ტემულტური დონეზე დასწორება და სემონტიკური პარალიზაციის დავალება. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ მრავალურად გამოიყენებული მრავალური სიმენტიკური განაწერის მონაცემები ATIS და ახალი კონფიგურაციული მონაცემები. ექსპერიმენტალური შედეგია, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი ექსპერიმენტალური მეტოვებზე გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy többszintű igazítás előkészítési módszert mutatunk be egy egységes architektúra formulnyelvű szemantikai elemzésben. Ebben az architektúrában ellenséges képzési módszert használunk a különböző nyelvek térének igazítására, valamint mondatszintű és szószintű párhuzamos korpuszt használunk felügyeleti információként a különböző nyelvek szemantikájának igazítására. Végül közösen képzünk többszintű igazítási és szemantikai elemzési feladatokat. Kísérleteket végzünk egy nyilvánosan hozzáférhető, többnyelvű szemantikai elemzési adatkészleten és egy újonnan felépített adatkészleten. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk mindkét adatkészleten felülmúlja a korszerű módszereket.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο προ-κατάρτισης ευθυγράμμισης πολλών επιπέδων σε μια ενοποιημένη αρχιτεκτονική για την πολύγλωσση σημασιολογική ανάλυση. Σε αυτή την αρχιτεκτονική, χρησιμοποιούμε μια αντιδιαστατική μέθοδο κατάρτισης για να ευθυγραμμίσουμε το χώρο των διαφορετικών γλωσσών και να χρησιμοποιήσουμε παράλληλο σώμα σε επίπεδο προτάσεων και επίπεδο λέξεων ως πληροφορίες επίβλεψης για να ευθυγραμμίσουμε τη σημασιολογία των διαφορετικών γλωσσών. Τέλος, εκπαιδεύουμε από κοινού τις εργασίες ευθυγράμμισης μεγάλου επιπέδου και σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε ένα δημοσίως διαθέσιμο πολύγλωσσο σύνολο σημασιολογικών δεδομένων ανάλυσης και σε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους και στα δύο σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un metodo di pretraining di allineamento multi-livello in un'architettura unificata formulti-lingual semantic parsing. In questa architettura, utilizziamo un metodo di formazione avversaria per allineare lo spazio di lingue diverse e utilizzare corpus parallelo a livello di frase e di parola come informazione di supervisione per allineare la semantica di lingue diverse. Infine, addestriamo congiuntamente le attività di allineamento a più livelli e analisi semantica. Conduciamo esperimenti su un set di dati di analisi semantica multilingue accessibile pubblicamente e su un set di dati di nuova costruzione. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello supera i metodi all'avanguardia su entrambi i set di dati.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біріктірілген архитектура формулты-тілді семантикалық талдау арқылы көп деңгейі түрлендіру әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл архитектурада, біз басқа тілдер бойынша қарсы оқыту әдісін қолданамыз, сөздер деңгейін және сөздер деңгейінде параллел корпус баптау мәліметін түрлі тілдердің семантикалығын түзету үшін қо Соңында, біз нақыштарды бағыттау және semantic талдау тапсырмаларын біріктіреміз. Біз жаңа құрылған деректер жинағы ATIS деректер жинағында көп тілді semantic талдау мүмкіндіктерінің тәжірибелерін жасаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің үлгіміз деректер жиындарының күй- жай әдістерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas daugiapakopis suderinimo išankstinio mokymo metodas vieningoje architektūroje formulti-lingual semantic parsing. Šioje architektūroje naudojame priešiško mokymo metodą, skirtą suderinti skirtingų kalbų erdvę ir naudoti sakinių lygį bei žodžių lygį lygiagretus korpus ir priežiūros informaciją, kad suderintume skirtingų kalbų semantiką. Galiausiai kartu rengiame aukšto lygio derinimo ir semantinio analizavimo užduotis. Atliekame eksperimentus su viešai prieinamu daugiakalbiu semantiniu analizavimo duomenų rinkiniu ATIS ir naujai sukurtu duomenų rinkiniu. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekė pažangiausius metodus abiejuose duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме метод за претренирање на повеќето нивоа во унифицирана архитектура формулти-јазичка семантична анализа. Во оваа архитектура, користиме метод на спротивна обука за да го вклопиме просторот на различните јазици и да користиме ниво на реченици и ниво на зборови паралелно корпус за надгледување информации за да ја вклопиме семантиката на различните јазици. Конечно, заедно ги обучуваме мулти-нивните уредувања и семантичните анализирачки задачи. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на јавно достапни мултијазични семантични анализирани податоци АТИС и ново изградени податоци. Experimentalresults show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art methods on both datasets.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah penyelesaian penyelesaian berbilang-tahap dalam penghuraian semantik formulti-bahasa arkitektur bersatu. Dalam arkitektur ini, kami menggunakan kaedah latihan lawan lawan untuk menyalin ruang bahasa berbeza dan menggunakan aras kalimat dan aras perkataan sambungan maklumat pengawasan corpus untuk menyalin semantik bahasa berbeza. Akhirnya, kita bersama-sama melatih penyesuaian tahap-ulti dan tugas penghuraian semantik. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data penghuraian semantik berbilang bahasa yang boleh didapati secara umum ATIS dan set data yang baru dibina. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui kaedah state-of-the-art pada kedua-dua set data.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പല-നില മാന്ത്രികമാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d ഒരു യൂണിക്കൂട്ടിയ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിന്റെ ഫോര്\u200dമാന In this architecture, we use an adversarial training method toalign the space of different languages and use sentence level and word level parallel corpus assupervision information to align the semantic of different languages.  അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് പലത്തില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനെയും സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ജോലികളെയും പരിശീലിക്ക നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൊതുവായ ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന പല ഭാഷയിലെ സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും പുത പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും സ്ഥിതിയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്ന', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw metodu ta’ taħriġ minn qabel ta’ allinjament f’diversi livelli f’analiżi semantika tal-formuli-lingwi tal-arkitettura unifikata. F’din l-arkitettura, aħna nużaw metodu ta’ taħriġ avversarju biex nillinjaw l-ispazju ta’ lingwi differenti u nużaw il-livell tas-sentenza u l-livell tal-kelma corpus parallel bħala informazzjoni ta’ sorveljanza biex jallinjaw is-semantika ta’ lingwi differenti. Fl-aħħar nett, aħna nħarrġu b’mod konġunt il-kompiti ta’ allinjament fuq livell għoli u ta’ analiżi semantika. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq sett ta’ dejta tal-analizzazzjoni semantika multilingwi disponibbli għall-pubbliku ATIS u sett ta’ dejta mibni mill-ġdid. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jirriżulta minn metodi l-aktar avvanzati fiż-żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi ein fleire nivåjusteringsmetode i eit uniformert arkitektur-formelt semantisk tolking. I denne arkitekturen bruker vi ein opponentær øvingsmetode for å ligne plassen på ulike språk og bruke setningsnivå og ord-nivå parallelle korporasjonsinformasjonsinformasjonsinformasjonsinformasjonsinformasjonsinformasjonsinformasjon for å justera semantikk av ulike språk. I slutt treng vi samanlikningar på temanivå og semantiske tolking av oppgåver. Vi gjev eksperimenter på ein offentlig tilgjengeleg multispråk semantisk tolking av datasett ATIS og ein nylig konstruert datasett. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vår utfører tilstanden av kunstmetodar på begge datasett.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон түвшинд нэгтгэх архитектурын томъёо-хэлний semantic хуваалцах аргыг илэрхийлж байна. Энэ архитектур дээр бид өөр хэлний орон зайд эсрэг дасгал суралцах аргыг ашиглаж өгүүлбэл хэлбэрийн түвшин болон үгийн түвшин параллел корпус зэрэгцүүлэх мэдээлэл хэрэглэдэг. Эцэст нь бид нийтлэг түвшинд тэгшитгэл болон semantic хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг суралцаж байна. Бид олон хэлний хэрэглэгддэг олон хэлний шинжлэх ухааны өгөгдлийн санг ATIS болон шинэ бүтээгдэхүүний санд туршилт хийдэг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар өгөгдлийн сангийн хоёр дахь хувьд урлагийн аргыг дамжуулдаг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy wielopoziomową metodę wstępnego treningu wyrównania w ujednoliconej architekturze formułużącą wielojęzycznego parsowania semantycznego. W tej architekturze stosujemy metodę szkoleniową przeciwników, aby dostosować przestrzeń różnych języków oraz korpus równoległy na poziomie zdań i słów jako informacje nadzoru, aby dostosować semantykę różnych języków. Wreszcie wspólnie trenujemy zadania wyrównywania wielopoziomowego i parsowania semantycznego. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na publicznie dostępnym wielojęzycznym zbiorze danych analizy semantycznej ATIS oraz nowo skonstruowanym zbiorze danych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody na obu zbiorach danych.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm o metodă de pregătire a alinierii pe mai multe niveluri într-o arhitectură unificată formuli-lingvistică parsing semantic. În această arhitectură, folosim o metodă de instruire adversară pentru a alinia spațiul diferitelor limbi și folosim corpus paralel la nivel de frază și nivel de cuvânt ca informație de supraveghere pentru a alinia semantica diferitelor limbi. În cele din urmă, pregătim împreună sarcinile de aliniere la nivel ulterior și analizare semantică. Realizăm experimente pe un set de date de analizare semantică multilingvă ATIS și pe un set de date nou construit. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru depășește metodele de ultimă oră pe ambele seturi de date.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu pretvaranja višeniverskih poravnanja u jedinstvenoj arhitekturi formulti-jezičkom semantičkom analizu. U ovoj arhitekturi koristimo neprijateljski metod treninga kako bismo povezali prostor različitih jezika i koristili razinu rečenica i razinu rečenica paralelne informacije o podršci korpusa kako bi se uskladili semantični jezika različitih jezika. Konačno, zajedno treniramo poravnanje nivoa ulti i semantične analize zadataka. Provodimo eksperimente na javno dostupnom multijezičkom semantičkom analizu podataka ATIS i novom konstruiranom setu podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model izvršava metode umetnosti na obje podatke.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa qalabka isbedelka farsamada ah oo ku qoran baaritaanka dhismaha qofka la qabtay oo luqada ah semantika. Arrimadaas waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaab waxbarasho ka gees ah si aan u sameyno goobta luuqadaha kala duduwan islamarkaasna waxaynu isticmaalnaa heerka ereyga iyo heerka hadalka oo la mid ah korpus assupervision si aynu u u sameyno semantika luuqadaha kala duduwan. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu ku tababarinnaa iskuulaadka heerka kala duduwan iyo shaqooyinka baaritaanka semantiga ah. Imtixaano baaritaanka baaritaanka ee luqadaha kala duduwan ee caadiga ah ee loo isticmaalayo ATIS iyo sawir macluumaad cusub oo la dhisay. Tilmaamaha imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modelkeenu uu ka muujiyo habka farshaxanka labada macluumaadka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en flernivåorienteringsmetod i en enhetlig arkitektur formultivpråkig semantisk tolkning. I den här arkitekturen använder vi en kontradiktorisk träningsmetod för att anpassa utrymmet för olika språk och använder meningsnivå och ordnivå parallell korpus som övervakningsinformation för att anpassa semantiken för olika språk. Slutligen tränar vi gemensamt på multinivå justerings- och semantisk tolkningsuppgifter. Vi genomför experiment på ett publikt tillgängligt flerspråkigt semantiskt parsningsdataset ATIS och en nybyggd dataset. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell överträffar de senaste metoderna på båda datauppsättningarna.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ගොඩක් ස්තූතියක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ එකම විද්\u200dයාපති මේ ස්ථාපනයේ අපි විරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා වෙනස් භාෂාවල් තැනක් සහ වචන ස්ථානය සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පුස් තොරතුරු සමාන්\u200d අන්තිමේදී, අපි සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් තේමුල්ටි ස්තූතිය සහ සෙමාන්ටික් විශේෂණ වැඩ කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරජාතිකයෙන් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් බොහොම භාෂාවක් විශ්ලේෂණ දත්ත සැට ATIS සහ අළුත් නිර්මාණය කරලා  පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එකේ දෙන්නම් දත්ත සැට් එකේ ස්ථිතියේ ඉන්න ප්\u200d', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல நிலையில் ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். ஒரு unified architecture formulti-lingual semantic parsing. இந்த உருவாக்கத்தில், நாம் வேறு மொழிகளின் இடைவெளியை ஒழுங்குபடுத்தி வாக்கு நிலையையும் வார்த்தை மட்டத்தையும் வார்த்தை அளபுரு கோப்புகளை இறுதியில், நாங்கள் பல நிலையின் ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் மற்றும் பாடல் பணிகளை ஒன்றாக பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம். நாங்கள் பொது பயன்படுத்தக்கூடிய பல மொழிகள் பெம்மான்டிக் பாசிங் தகவல் அமைப்பு ATIS மற்றும் புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்ப முயற்சிக்கும் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک متحدہ معماری فرموٹی-زبانی سیمنٹی پارسینگ میں ایک متعدد سطح کی تعمیر کا طریقہ پیش کریں گے۔ اس معماری میں ہم مختلف زبانوں کی جگہ میں ایک مخالف تعلیم طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں اور کلمات سطح اور کلمات سطح مختلف زبانوں کی جگہ سے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ بالآخر، ہم ان کی تعلیم کے ساتھ تطالب کررہے ہیں ہم صریح طور پر فائدہ اٹھانے والی ملتی زبان سیمنٹی پارسینگ ڈیٹ سٹ ATIS اور ایک نئی ساختہ ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں. Experimental results show that our model performs state-of-the-art methods on both datasets.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha darajada o'zgarishni o'rganamiz, bir bir necha darajada qo'shish usulida qo'yish mumkin. Bu arxituvda, biz har xil tillarning joyini birlashtirish uchun diqqat taʼminlovchi metodidan foydalanamiz va gapning darajasi va soʻzning parallel popus asservision maʼlumotidan foydalanamiz, har xil tillardan semantik tarjima qilish uchun. Endi biz bir necha darajada birlashtirish va semantik parsing vazifalarini o'rganamiz. Biz ko'p tillar uchun foydalanadigan semantik parsing maʼlumotlarni ATIS va yangi yaratilgan maʼlumot tizimini bajaramiz. Experimentalresults show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art methods on both datasets.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp định vị đa cấp trong một cách phân tích ngữ pháp kiến trúc thống nhất. Trong kiến trúc này, chúng tôi dùng phương pháp huấn luyện đối nghịch để nghiên cứu không gian của các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, và sử dụng mức án và mức chữ song song song song song, để đảm bảo thông tin theo ngữ pháp của các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Cuối cùng, chúng ta sẽ huấn luyện độ chính thức và phân tích ngữ pháp. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên một bộ dữ liệu đa ngôn ngữ rộng có thể công khai phân tích nội dung và một bộ dữ liệu mới xây dựng. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta hoàn thiện các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия е представен метод за подравняване на многостепенни нива в унифицирана архитектурна формално-езикова семантична обработка. В тази архитектура използваме метода на съперническо обучение за подравняване на пространството на различните езици и използваме паралелен корпус на ниво изречение и ниво дума като надзорна информация за подравняване на семантиката на различните езици. Накрая, заедно обучаваме задачите за подравняване на многостепенно ниво и семантичен анализ. Провеждаме експерименти върху публично достъпен многоезичен семантичен анализ набор от данни и новопостроен набор от данни. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда най-съвременните методи и на двата набора от данни.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en multi-level alignment pretraining metode i en samlet arkitektur formulti-sproglig semantisk parsing. I denne arkitektur bruger vi en modstridende træningsmetode til at justere rummet for forskellige sprog og bruger sætningsniveau og ordniveau parallel corpus som overvågningsinformation til at justere semantikken for forskellige sprog. Endelig træner vi i fællesskab de multiniveau justering og semantisk fortolkning opgaver. Vi udfører eksperimenter på et offentligt tilgængeligt flersproget semantisk parsing datasæt ATIS og et nyopbygget datasæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model overgår state-of-the-art metoder på begge datasæt.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een multi-level alignment pretraining methode in een uniforme architectuur voor multi-lingual semantische parsing. In deze architectuur gebruiken we een tegenstrijdige trainingsmethode om de ruimte van verschillende talen uit te lijnen en gebruiken we parallelle corpus op zinnniveau en woordniveau als supervisie informatie om de semantiek van verschillende talen op elkaar af te stemmen. Tenslotte trainen we gezamenlijk de alignment- en semantische parsetaken op ulti-niveau. We voeren experimenten uit op een publiek toegankelijke meertalige semantische parsing dataset ATIS en een nieuw geconstrueerde dataset. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan state-of-the-art methoden op beide datasets.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu presvlačenja višerazina u jedinstvenom arhitekturom formulti-jezičkom semantičkom analizu. U ovoj arhitekturi koristimo neprijateljski metod obuke kako bismo povezali prostor različitih jezika i koristili razinu kazne i razinu riječi paralelne informacije o prikupljanju korpusa kako bi se uskladili semantički različitih jezika. Konačno, zajedno treniramo određenje na nivou ulti i semantičko analiziranje zadataka. Provodimo eksperimente na javno dostupnom višejezičkom semantičkom analizu podataka ATIS i novo izgrađenom kompletu podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model izvršava načine umjetnosti na obje datasete.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine mehrstufige Alignment Pretraining Methode in einer einheitlichen Architektur für multilinguales semantisches Parsing vor. In dieser Architektur verwenden wir eine gegensätzliche Trainingsmethode, um den Raum verschiedener Sprachen auszurichten und verwenden parallele Korpus auf Satz- und Wortebene als Supervisionsinformation, um die Semantik verschiedener Sprachen auszurichten. Abschließend trainieren wir gemeinsam die Mehrebenenausgleich- und semantische Parsing-Aufgaben. Wir führen Experimente an einem öffentlich zugänglichen mehrsprachigen semantischen Parsing-Datensatz ATIS und einem neu konstruierten Datensatz durch. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell die neuesten Methoden auf beiden Datensätzen übertrifft.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan metode pencegahan penyesuaian multi-tingkat dalam penyelidikan semantis formulti-bahasa arsitektur bersatu. Dalam arsitektur ini, kami menggunakan metode pelatihan lawan untuk mengikuti ruang bahasa yang berbeda dan menggunakan tingkat kalimat dan tingkat kalimat paralel corpus asuperinsi informasi untuk menyesuaikan semantis bahasa yang berbeda. Akhirnya, kita bersama-sama melatih penyesuaian tingkat-ulti dan tugas penghuraian semantis. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dataset penganalis semantis multibahasa yang dapat didapatkan publik ATIS dan dataset yang baru dibuat. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita lebih berharga dari metode terbaik pada kedua set data.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 다언어 의미 분석의 통일된 체계 구조 중의 다단계 정렬 예행 훈련 방법을 제시했다.이 체계 구조에서 우리는 대항적인 훈련 방법을 사용하여 서로 다른 언어의 공간을 맞추고 문장급과 단어급의 병행 어료 라이브러리를 감독 정보로 삼아 서로 다른 언어의 의미를 맞춘다.마지막으로 우리는 다차원 정렬과 의미 분석 임무를 연합하여 훈련한다.우리는 공개적으로 사용할 수 있는 다국어 의미 분석 데이터 집합인 ATIS와 새로 구축된 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행했다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 두 데이터 집합에서 모두 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz birden arhitektura formulti-dilli semantik analýşinde bir çoklu dereje çykarma yöntemi görkeýäris Bu arhitektura, biz dürli dilleriň ýerlerini baglaşdyrmak we sözleriň derejesini we sözleriň derejesini parallel korpuslaryň semantik dillerini çykarmak üçin teňkil etmek üçin rakipleri gollaşdyrýarys. Soňunda temalaryň çyzygyny we semantik çyzygynyň çyzygyny bilelikde otlaýrys. Biz publika meýilleşdirýän bir multi-dilli semantik analyzasynda experimentler çykýarys ATIS we täze inşa edilen veri setirinde. Durmanyň netijesi biziň nusgamyzyň her iki sanat düzümlerinde durumyny çykarýandygyny görkez.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka jukumu la kiwango cha ngazi mbalimbali kwa namna ya kutengeneza mvua katika mfumo wa ujenzi wa mfululizo wa lugha. Katika ujenzi huu, tunatumia mbinu ya mafunzo ya upinzani ili kuunganisha nafasi ya lugha tofauti na kutumia kiwango cha hukumu na kiwango cha neno kinacholinganisha taarifa za ubunifu wa lugha tofauti. Mwisho, tunafundisha juhudi za usambazaji wa ngazi nyingi pamoja na shughuli za wimbo wa kimapenzi. Tunafanya majaribio kwenye taarifa za wimbo wa lugha za aina mbalimbali zinazotumika hadharani na kutengeneza taarifa mpya zilizojengwa kwa lugha. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inafanya mbinu za aina ya sanaa kwenye seti zote za data.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش تغییر تغییر سطح چندین را در یک بازرسی فرمولتی-زبانی متحد نشان می دهیم. در این معماری، ما از یک روش آموزش دشمنی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا فضای زبان\u200cهای مختلف را ببینیم و از سطح جمله\u200cها و سطح جمله\u200cهای جمله\u200cی کلمه\u200cها استفاده کنیم تا اطلاعات متفاوتی از زبان\u200cهای مختلف را تطبیق دهیم. بالاخره، ما با هم تطابق مرحله\u200cهای طبقه\u200cی طبقه\u200cی طبقه\u200cای و وظیفه\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cی semantic را آموزش می\u200cکنیم. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ATIS و یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای تازه ساخته می\u200cکنیم که در مورد یک تجربه\u200cهای متعدد زبان فراوانی استفاده می\u200cکنند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما روش\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در هر دو مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'am': 'In this paper, we present a multi-level alignment pretraining method in a unified architecture formulti-lingual semantic parsing.  በዚህ አካውንት ውስጥ የተቃዋሚ ትምህርት ማድረግ የልዩ ቋንቋዎች ስፋትን ለመቀላቀል እና የንግግር ደረጃና የቃላት ደረጃ እና የቆርፓስ ማሳየት መረጃዎችን ለልዩ ቋንቋዎች ምሳሌ ለመቀላቀል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም ብዙ ደረጃዎች እና የsemantic ማኅበረሰብ ስራዎችን እናስተማርናለን፡፡ እና በአዲስ የተገኘው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካባቢ የዳታ ማዘጋጀት እና አዲስ የተመሠረተውን ዳታዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች በሁለቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ የ-የ-art ሥርዓቶችን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë përpara trajnimit të nivelit të shumtë në një analizë të unifikuar arkitekture formulti-gjuhësore semantike. Në këtë arkitekturë, ne përdorim një metodë stërvitjeje kundërshtare për të lidhur hapësirën e gjuhëve të ndryshme dhe përdorim nivelin e fjalëve dhe nivelin e fjalëve paralel të korpusit për të mbikqyrur informacionin semantik të gjuhëve të ndryshme. Më në fund, ne së bashku trajnojmë rregullimin e nivelit të lartë dhe detyrat e analizimit semantik. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në një grup të dhënash me shumë gjuhë të mundshme publikisht për analizimin semantik ATIS dhe një grup të dhënash të rindërtuar. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron metodat më të larta në të dy grupet e të dhënave.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n multi-vlak belyning metode in 'n eenvoudige arkitektuur formulti-tale semantiese verwerking. In hierdie arkitektuur gebruik ons 'n teëstandige onderwerking metode om die ruimte van verskillende tale te lig en gebruik setvlak en woord vlak parallele korpus aanhouding om die semantiek van verskillende tale te aligneer. Eindelik, ons het themulti-vlak opgelyking en semantiese verwerking opdragte saamgevoer. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op 'n publiek beskikbaar multi-tale semantiese verwerking datastel ATIS en 'n nuwe konstrukteer datastel. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons model uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes op beide datastelle.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, bir arhitektir formulti-dil semantik analizi ilə çoxlu seviyyətli tərəfləmə metodunu göstəririk. Bu arhitektür içində, müxtəlif dillərin uzağını və sözlərin səviyyəsini və sözlərin səviyyəsini paralel korpus adlandırması məlumatlarını müxtəlif dillərin semantik məlumatlarını düzəltmək üçün düşmənçi təhsil metodlarını istifadə edirik. Sonunda, temaları birlikdə tutmaq və semantik ayırma işlərini təhsil edirik. Biz insanlara çox dilli semantik analizə verilər seti ATIS və yeni inşa edilmiş verilər seti barəsində təcrübələr edirik. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçları modellərimizin hər ikisinin veri qurğularında mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মাল্টি স্তরের বৃষ্টি পার্জিং পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যা একত্রিত আর্কিকেটার ফর্মুল্টি-ভাষায় সেমেন্টিক পা এই প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোতে আমরা বিভিন্ন ভাষার স্থানের প্রতি বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি এবং বাক্যের স্তর এবং শব্দের স্তরের প্যারালেল কর্পাস সংরক শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা যুক্তরাষ্ট্রের মাল্টি স্তর এবং সেম্পেন্টিক পার্গিং কাজ প্রশিক্ষণ দেই। আমরা প্রকাশ্যে ব্যবহৃত বহুভাষী সেমান্টিক পার্সিং ডাটাটা সেট এবং নতুন নির্মিত তথ্য সেটের উপর পরীক্ষা করি। Experimentalresults show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art methods on both datasets.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu presvlačenja višenivoa u jedinstvenom arhitekturom formulti-jezičkom semantičkom analizu. U ovoj arhitekturi koristimo neprijateljski metod treninga kako bismo povezali prostor različitih jezika i koristili razinu rečenica i razinu rečenica paralelne informacije o podršci korpusa kako bi se uskladili semantički različitih jezika. Konačno, zajedno treniramo poravnanje nivoa ulti i semantičko analiziranje zadataka. Provodimo eksperimente na javno dostupnom multijezičkom semantičkom analizu podataka ATIS i novo konstruiranom setu podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model izvršava metode umjetnosti na obje datasete.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem un mètode de pré-entrenament d'alliniament a molts nivells en una fòrmula d'arquitectura unificada d'analització semàntica-lingüística. En aquesta arquitectura, utilitzem un mètode d'entrenament adversarial per allinjar l'espai de diferents llengües i utilitzem el nivell de frases i el nivell de paraules paral·lels de corpus per allinjar la semàntica de diferents llengües. Finalment, entrenem conjuntamentles tasques d'allinjament a nivell ulti-nivell i d'analització semàntica. Fem experiments en un conjunt de dades d'analització semàntica multillengües ATIS i un nou conjunt de dades construït. Els resultats experimentals mostrenque el nostre model supera els mètodes més avançats en ambdós conjunts de dades.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme víceúrovňovou metodu předtréninku zarovnání v jednotné architektuře formující multilinguální sémantickou parsování. V této architektuře používáme metodu adversariálního tréninku, který zarovnává prostor různých jazyků a používáme paralelní korpus na úrovni vět a slov jako supervizní informace pro sladění sémantiky různých jazyků. Nakonec společně trénujeme úlohy zarovnávání a sémantické parsování na větší úrovni. Provádíme experimenty na veřejně dostupném vícejazyčném sémantickém parsování datovém souboru ATIS a nově sestaveném datovém souboru. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model překonává nejmodernější metody na obou datových sadách.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme monitasoisen linjauksen esikoulutusmenetelmän yhtenäisessä arkkitehtuuriformaali-kielisessä semanttisessa jäsentämisessä. Tässä arkkitehtuurissa käytämme kontraditoriaalista koulutusmenetelmää eri kielten tilan tasaamiseen ja käytämme lausetason ja sanatason rinnakkaiskorpusta ohjaustietona eri kielten semantiikan tasaamiseen. Lopuksi koulutamme yhdessä monitasoisia linjaus- ja semanttisia jäsennystehtäviä. Teemme kokeiluja julkisesti saatavilla olevalla monikielisellä semanttisella jäsennysaineistolla ATIS ja vastarakennetulla aineistolla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu molempien aineistojen viimeisimpiä menetelmiä paremmin.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame mitmetasandilist joondamise eeltreeningu meetodit ühtse arhitektuurivormi mitmekeelses semantilises parsimises. Selles arhitektuuris kasutame erinevate keelte ruumi ühtlustamiseks vastava koolituse meetodit ning kasutame lausetaseme ja sõnataseme paralleelkorpust järelevalveinformatsioonina erinevate keelte semantika ühtlustamiseks. Lõpuks koolitame ühiselt mitmetasandilisi joondamise ja semantilise parsimise ülesandeid. Teostame katseid avalikult kättesaadava mitmekeelse semantilise parsimisandmekogumiga ATIS ja äsja ehitatud andmekogumiga. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel on mõlemas andmekogumis kõrgem kui kaasaegsed meetodid.', 'hy': 'In this paper, we present a multi-level alignment pretraining method in a unified architecture formulti-lingual semantic parsing.  Այս ճարտարապետության մեջ մենք օգտագործում ենք հակառակ ուսուցման մեթոդ տարբեր լեզուների տարածության հարմարեցնելու համար և օգտագործում ենք նախադասությունների և բառերի մակարդակի զուգահեռ կորպուսի տեղեկատվությունը տարբեր լեզուների սեմանտիկայի հարմարեցնելու համար: Վերջապես, մենք միասին վարժեցնում ենք ամենաբարձր մակարդակի հարմարեցման և սեմանտիկ վերլուծության խնդիրները: We conduct experiments on a publicly avail-able multi-lingual semantic parsing dataset ATIS and a newly constructed dataset.  Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է երկու տվյալների մեթոդները:', 'jv': 'In this paper, we present a multi-layer alignment Nang architecture iki, kita gambar kelas conversion method pakan karo perusahaan langkung samihan banjur Fine Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk ngéwangi kapan-kapan multi-dilangan semanti ngéwangi kapan dataset atiS karo ngéwé nggawe dataset Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "In a cikin wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wani juyi mai daraja mai yawa da za'a yi ruwan ruwa a cikin parse na fasalin littafin da aka haɗa shi. Daga wannan arkin, munã amfani da wata metode na wahamar da ke motsi zuwa masu haɗa filin lugha daban-daban kuma munã amfani da daraja na maganar da nau'in da aka daidaita maɓallin kalmõmi don a samu'in da ake yi wa masu motsi na lugha daban-daban. Haƙĩƙa, munã tafiyar da aikin juyi na-daraja da yin sauri na semantic. Tuna samun jarrabãwa a kan danne-parse na fassarar mutane masu amfani da abu mai yiwuwa da ke cikin mulki-lingui, ATIS da wani tsari na yanzu da aka gina. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da state-of-the-art kan duk-set.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo metodo večstopenjskega poravnavanja v enotni arhitekturni formalni semantični razčlenitvi. V tej arhitekturi uporabljamo kontradiktorsko metodo usposabljanja za uskladitev prostora različnih jezikov ter uporabljamo vzporedni korpus stavka in besedne ravni kot nadzorne informacije za uskladitev semantike različnih jezikov. Nazadnje skupaj usposabljamo naloge usklajevanja na več ravneh in semantičnega razčlenjanja. Izvajamo poskuse na javno dostopnem večjezičnem semantičnem razčlenjevalnem naboru podatkov ATIS in na novo zgrajenem naboru podatkov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da naš model presega najsodobnejše metode na obeh naborih podatkov.', 'he': 'In this paper, we present a multi-level alignment pretraining method in a unified architecture formulti-lingual semantic parsing.  בארכיטקטורה הזו, אנו משתמשים בשיטת אימון יריבית כדי להכניס את המרחב של שפות שונות ולהשתמש ברמה של משפטים ורמה מילים קומפוס מקבילה למידע על השגחה כדי להכניס את הסמנטיקה של שפות שונות. סוף סוף, אנו מאמן יחד את התאמה ברמה המולטי ומשימות בדיקת סמנטית. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים סמנטית רבות שפותית שימושית לפומבי ATIS ומקבוצת נתונים חדשה בנויה. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהדוגמא שלנו עולה על שיטות חדשות בשני המידע.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྦྱོར་བའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚོགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་། འུ་ཅག་གི་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གདོང་རིམ་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་འདི་མ་འདྲ་བའི་བར་སྟོང་དང་ཐ་སྙ མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་གྱི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་དང་རྣམ་པ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་བསླབས་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྤྱོད་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག Experimental Results show that our model performs state-of-the-art methods on both datasets.'}
{'en': 'Conception : Multilingually-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'ar': 'المفهوم: تمثيلات موجهات المفاهيم المحسّنة بلغات متعددة وقابلة للقراءة من قبل الإنسان', 'es': 'Concepción: Representaciones vectoriales conceptuales legibles por humanos y mejoradas en varios idiomas', 'fr': "Conception\xa0: Représentations vectorielles conceptuelles lisibles par l'homme et améliorées en plusieurs langues", 'pt': 'Concepção: Representações de vetores de conceito multilíngue e legíveis por humanos', 'ja': 'コンセプト：多言語対応、人間が読めるコンセプトベクトル表現', 'zh': '曰:多言强,人可读右向量', 'hi': 'गर्भाधान: बहुभाषी रूप से संवर्धित, मानव पठनीय अवधारणा वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'Концепция: многоязычно-усовершенствованные, человекочитаемые векторные представления концепции', 'ga': 'Coincheap: Léiriúcháin Veicteoir Coincheapa Ilteangacha, Inléite ag an Duine', 'el': 'Έννοια: Πολυγλωσσικά ενισχυμένες, αναγνώσιμες από τον άνθρωπο διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών', 'ka': 'კონცექცია: მრავალენგურად გაზრუქმებული, ადამიანის კითხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა', 'hu': 'Fogalom: Többnyelvűen fejlesztett, ember által olvasható koncepció vektor reprezentációk', 'kk': 'Концепция: Көптеген тілдердің көптеген, адамды оқуға мүмкіндік беретін концепциялар векторлардың таңбалары', 'mk': 'Conception: Multilingually-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'lt': 'Koncepcija: daugiakalbiai patobulintos žmogaus skaitomos koncepcijos vektoriaus atstovybės', 'it': "Concezione: Rappresentazioni vettoriali multilingue migliorate, leggibili dall'uomo", 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dസപ്ഷന്\u200d: പല ഭാഷയിലൂടെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തി, മനുഷ്യന്\u200d റിസ്കെപ്റ്റ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Koncepsi: Pengedulian Vektor Koncepsi Berbahasa-Diperkembangkan, Dibaca-Manusia', 'mt': 'Konċezzjoni: Rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-Vetturi tal-Kunċett Mtejjeb Multilingwalment u li Jinqra mill-Bniedem', 'pl': 'Koncepcja: Wielojęzycznie ulepszone, czytelne dla człowieka przedstawienia wektorów koncepcyjnych', 'ro': 'Concepție: reprezentanțe vectoriale ale conceptului îmbunătățite în mai multe limbi, citibile de om', 'no': 'Koncepsjon: fleirspråk-forbetra, menneskelige-lesbar konseptvektorrepresentasjonar', 'si': 'තේරුම: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් විශාලය, මිනිස්සු කියවන්න පුළුවන්', 'sr': 'Koncepcija: Multilingually-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'so': 'Ka qaadista: Horumarinta luuqadaha badan, dib u dhigista qofka', 'sv': 'Begrepp: Flerspråkigt förbättrade, människoläsbara koncept vektor representationer', 'ta': 'நிறுத்தல்: பல மொழியில் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது, மனித- Reaable Concept Vector Representations', 'ur': 'تفسیر: Multilingual-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'mn': 'Олон хэл дээр нэмэгдсэн, Хүн-уншиж чадах тодорхойлолт векторын төлөөлөлт', 'uz': 'AloqalarComment', 'vi': 'Ý tưởng: nhiều nơi phát triển, gần đạt con người', 'hr': 'Koncepcija: Multijezično-poboljšani, predstavljanje koncepcionog vektora za ljudske čitanje', 'nl': 'Conceptie: Meertalig verbeterde, menselijk leesbare conceptvectorrepresentaties', 'bg': 'Концепция: Многоезично подобрени, четими за човека концептуални векторни представи', 'id': 'Koncepsi: Pemutamaan Vektor Koncepsi Berbahasa-Diperkembangkan, Dibaca-Manusia', 'de': 'Konzeption: Mehrsprachig verbesserte, vom Menschen lesbare Konzeptvektordarstellungen', 'da': 'Begreb: Flersproget forbedret, menneskelæsbar koncept vektor repræsentationer', 'tr': 'Çoklu dillerden gelişmiş, insan-okuyabilir bir vektör Representations', 'ko': '개념: 다언어 강화, 인류가 읽을 수 있는 개념 벡터 표시', 'sw': 'Kuzuia: Mazungumzo makubwa kwa lugha nyingi, Mazungumzo ya Vector za Binadamu', 'fa': 'تفسیر: نمایش\u200cهای ویکتوری\u200cهای مفهوم\u200cهای انسان\u200cپذیرفته\u200cشده به زبان\u200cهای زیادی', 'am': 'መግለጫ፦', 'af': 'Koncepsie: Multilingually-Advanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'sq': 'Koncepcioni: Përfaqësuese të Vektorit të Ndryshuar në Shumë Gjuha dhe të lexueshëm nga Njeriu', 'hy': 'Կենցեպցիա. մարդկային ընթերցվող, բազմալեզվով բարելավված հատվածների ներկայացումներ', 'bn': 'Conception: Multilingually-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'ca': 'Concepció: Representacions multilingüístices de conceptes vectoris', 'bs': 'Koncepcija: Multilingually-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations', 'az': 'Koncepsyon: Çoxlu dil-genişlənmiş, insan-oxuyabilən bir konsept vektörü Representations', 'cs': 'Koncepce: Vícejazyčně vylepšené, člověkem čitelné koncepční vektorové reprezentace', 'et': 'Kontseptsioon: mitmekeelselt täiustatud, inimloetavad kontseptsioonid Vector Representations', 'fi': 'Conception: monikielisesti parannettu, ihmisen luettavissa oleva konseptivektori', 'sk': 'Koncept: Večjezično izboljšana, človeško berljiva konceptna vektorska predstavitev', 'jv': 'Gu10', 'he': 'הרעיון: מייצגים קטורים של קוקטורים מוגבלים במספר שפות', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Conception: Multilingually-Enhanced, Human-Readable Concept Vector Representations'}
{'en': 'To date, the most successful word, word sense, and concept modelling techniques have used large corpora and knowledge resources to produce dense vector representations that capture semantic similarities in a relatively low-dimensional space. Most current approaches, however, suffer from a monolingual bias, with their strength depending on the amount of data available across languages. In this paper we address this issue and propose Conception, a novel technique for building language-independent vector representations of concepts which places multilinguality at its core while retaining explicit relationships between concepts. Our approach results in high-coverage representations that outperform the state of the art in multilingual and cross-lingual Semantic Word Similarity and Word Sense Disambiguation, proving particularly robust on low-resource languages. Conception   its software and the complete set of representations   is available at https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ar': 'حتى الآن ، استخدمت أكثر تقنيات نمذجة الكلمات والمعنى للكلمات نجاحًا مجموعات كبيرة وموارد معرفية لإنتاج تمثيلات متجهية كثيفة تلتقط أوجه التشابه الدلالي في مساحة منخفضة الأبعاد نسبيًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم الأساليب الحالية تعاني من التحيز أحادي اللغة ، حيث تعتمد قوتها على كمية البيانات المتاحة عبر اللغات. في هذه الورقة نتناول هذه القضية ونقترح مفهوم مفهوم ، وهو أسلوب جديد لبناء تمثيلات متجهية مستقلة عن اللغة للمفاهيم التي تضع تعدد اللغات في جوهرها مع الحفاظ على العلاقات الواضحة بين المفاهيم. ينتج عن نهجنا تمثيلات عالية التغطية تتفوق على أحدث التقنيات في تشابه الكلمات الدلالية متعدد اللغات وعبر اللغات وإلغاء الغموض في إحساس الكلمات ، مما يثبت قوته بشكل خاص في اللغات منخفضة الموارد. Conception - برامجه ومجموعة كاملة من العروض - متاح على https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'pt': 'Até hoje, as técnicas de modelagem de palavra, sentido de palavra e conceito de maior sucesso usaram grandes corpora e recursos de conhecimento para produzir representações vetoriais densas que capturam semelhanças semânticas em um espaço de dimensão relativamente baixa. A maioria das abordagens atuais, no entanto, sofre de um viés monolíngue, com sua força dependendo da quantidade de dados disponíveis entre os idiomas. Neste artigo, abordamos essa questão e propomos Conception, uma nova técnica para construir representações vetoriais de conceitos independentes da linguagem que coloca a multilinguidade em seu núcleo, mantendo relações explícitas entre os conceitos. Nossa abordagem resulta em representações de alta cobertura que superam o estado da arte em semelhança de palavras semânticas multilíngues e multilíngues e desambiguação de sentido de palavras, provando-se particularmente robustas em idiomas de poucos recursos. Conception – seu software e o conjunto completo de representações – está disponível em https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'es': 'Hasta la fecha, las técnicas de modelado de palabras, sentidos de palabras y conceptos más exitosas han utilizado grandes corpus y recursos de conocimiento para producir representaciones vectoriales densas que capturan similitudes semánticas en un espacio de dimensiones relativamente bajas. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los enfoques actuales adolecen de un sesgo monolingüe, y su fuerza depende de la cantidad de datos disponibles en todos los idiomas. En este artículo abordamos este tema y proponemos Conception, una técnica novedosa para construir representaciones vectoriales de conceptos independientes del lenguaje que coloca la multilingüismo en su núcleo al tiempo que conserva las relaciones explícitas entre conceptos. Nuestro enfoque da como resultado representaciones de alta cobertura que superan el estado del arte en similitud semántica de palabras multilingües y multilingues y desambiguación del sentido de las palabras, demostrando ser particularmente sólidas en idiomas de bajos recursos. Conception, su software y el conjunto completo de representaciones, está disponible en https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'fr': "À ce jour, les techniques de modélisation de mots, de sens des mots et de concepts les plus réussies ont utilisé de grands corpus et des ressources de connaissances pour produire des représentations vectorielles denses qui capturent des similitudes sémantiques dans un espace de dimension relativement faible. La plupart des approches actuelles souffrent toutefois d'un biais monolingue, dont la force dépend de la quantité de données disponibles dans les différentes langues. Dans cet article, nous abordons cette question et proposons Conception, une nouvelle technique pour construire des représentations vectorielles indépendantes de la langue de concepts qui place le multilinguisme au cœur de ses préoccupations tout en conservant des relations explicites entre les concepts. Notre approche se traduit par des représentations à couverture élevée qui surpassent l'état de l'art en matière de similitude sémantique de mots multilingues et multilingues et de désambiguïsation des sens des mots, se révélant particulièrement robustes dans les langues à faibles ressources. Conception — son logiciel et l'ensemble complet des représentations — est disponible sur https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.", 'ja': 'これまで、最も成功した単語、単語センス、および概念モデリング技術は、大規模なコーラおよび知識リソースを使用して、比較的低次元の空間における意味的類似性を取り込む濃密なベクトル表現を生成してきた。しかしながら、現在のアプローチのほとんどは、言語間で利用可能なデータの量に応じて強みを持つ単一言語バイアスに苦しんでいます。この論文では、この問題に取り組み、概念間の明示的な関係を保持しつつ、多言語を中核とする概念の言語に依存しないベクトル表現を構築するための新たな手法である概念を提案した。私たちのアプローチは、多言語およびクロスリンガルのセマンティックワード類似性およびワードセンスの曖昧さ解消において最先端を凌駕する高カバレッジ表現をもたらし、低リソース言語では特に堅牢であることが証明されています。コンセプト（ソフトウェアと表現の完全なセット）は、https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conceptionから入手できます。', 'zh': '迄今为止至成之单词,单词义名建模术已多用语料库,以成密向量,得语义相似性于对低维之间。 然方今多术在单语偏见,其强决于跨言之数据量。 于本文中,臣等决而Conception之,此其向量术也,置多语言性于心,而存其显式也。 吾法生高覆盖率,多语言跨语义单词相似性与词义消歧义表现出色,证在低资源语尤强。 Conception- 其软件全者 - https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception 也。', 'hi': 'आज तक, सबसे सफल शब्द, शब्द भावना और अवधारणा मॉडलिंग तकनीकों ने घने वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व का उत्पादन करने के लिए बड़े कॉर्पोरेट और ज्ञान संसाधनों का उपयोग किया है जो अपेक्षाकृत कम आयामी स्थान में शब्दार्थ समानताओं को कैप्चर करते हैं। अधिकांश वर्तमान दृष्टिकोण, हालांकि, एक मोनोलिंगुअल पूर्वाग्रह से पीड़ित हैं, उनकी ताकत भाषाओं में उपलब्ध डेटा की मात्रा के आधार पर होती है। इस पत्र में हम इस मुद्दे को संबोधित करते हैं और गर्भाधान का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अवधारणाओं की भाषा-स्वतंत्र वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के निर्माण के लिए एक उपन्यास तकनीक जो अवधारणाओं के बीच स्पष्ट संबंधों को बनाए रखते हुए बहुभाषीता को अपने मूल में रखती है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण के परिणामस्वरूप उच्च-कवरेज प्रतिनिधित्व होता है जो बहुभाषी और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सिमेंटिक वर्ड समानता और वर्ड सेंस डिसकम्पिगेशन में कला की स्थिति को मात देता है, जो कम-संसाधन भाषाओं पर विशेष रूप से मजबूत साबित होता है। गर्भाधान - इसका सॉफ्टवेयर और प्रतिनिधित्व का पूरा सेट - https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'На сегодняшний день наиболее успешные методы моделирования слов, смысла слов и концепций используют большие корпуса и ресурсы знаний для создания плотных векторных представлений, которые фиксируют семантическое сходство в относительно малоразмерном пространстве. Вместе с тем большинство современных подходов страдают от одноязычной предвзятости, причем их эффективность зависит от объема данных, имеющихся по различным языкам. В этой статье мы рассматриваем этот вопрос и предлагаем Концепцию, новый метод для построения языково-независимых векторных представлений концепций, которые ставят многоязычие в его основу, сохраняя при этом явные отношения между концепциями. Наш подход приводит к высокопокрытым представлениям, которые превосходят современные в многоязычном и межязычном семантическом сходстве слов и расчленении смысла слов, оказываясь особенно надежными на языках с низким уровнем ресурсов. Концепция – ее программное обеспечение и полный набор представлений – доступны по адресу https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ga': 'Go dtí seo, bhain na teicníochtaí is rathúla focal, ciall focal, agus samhaltú coincheap úsáid as acmhainní móra corpora agus eolais chun léiriúcháin veicteora dlúth a tháirgeadh a ghlacann cosúlachtaí shéimeantacha i spás measartha íseal tríthoiseach. Tá claonadh aonteangach ag formhór na gcur chuige reatha, áfach, agus braitheann a láidreacht ar an méid sonraí atá ar fáil trasna teangacha. Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid aghaidh ar an tsaincheist seo agus molaimid Conception, teicníocht úrnua chun léirithe veicteora teanga-neamhspleácha a thógáil ar choincheapa a chuireann an ilteangachas i gcroílár agus ag an am céanna gaolmhaireachtaí follasacha a choinneáil idir na coincheapa. Is é an toradh a bhíonn ar ár gcur chuige ná léiriúcháin ardchlúdaigh a sháraíonn an úrscothacht i gCosúlacht Focal Séimeantach ilteangach agus tras-teangach agus i nDeathbhrí Cinn Focal, rud atá thar a bheith láidir i dteangacha íseal-acmhainne. Tá Conception – a bhogearraí agus an fhoireann iomlán léiriúcháin – ar fáil ag https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'el': 'Μέχρι σήμερα, οι πιο επιτυχημένες τεχνικές μοντελοποίησης λέξεων, λέξεων και εννοιών έχουν χρησιμοποιήσει μεγάλα σώματα και πόρους γνώσης για να παράγουν πυκνές διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις που αποτυπώνουν σημασιολογικές ομοιότητες σε ένα σχετικά χαμηλό-διαστατικό χώρο. Οι περισσότερες τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις, ωστόσο, υποφέρουν από μια μονογλωσσική προκατάληψη, με τη δύναμή τους να εξαρτάται από την ποσότητα των διαθέσιμων δεδομένων σε όλες τις γλώσσες. Στην παρούσα εργασία εξετάζουμε αυτό το ζήτημα και προτείνουμε τη σύλληψη, μια νέα τεχνική για την οικοδόμηση γλωσσικών διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων εννοιών που θέτει την πολυγλωσσία στον πυρήνα της, διατηρώντας ρητές σχέσεις μεταξύ εννοιών. Η προσέγγισή μας έχει ως αποτέλεσμα αναπαραστάσεις υψηλής κάλυψης που ξεπερνούν την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στις πολυγλωσσικές και πολυγλωσσικές σημασιολογικές ομοιότητες λέξεων και αποσαφηνίσεις με αίσθηση λέξεων, αποδεικνύοντας ιδιαίτερα ισχυρές σε γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας. Η σύλληψη του λογισμικού της και το πλήρες σύνολο των αναπαραστάσεων είναι διαθέσιμη στο https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ka': 'ახლა, ყველაზე წარმატებული სიტყვა, სიტყვა სიტყვა, და კონცექტის მოდელეციის ტექნოგიები გამოიყენეთ დიდი კოპორა და მეცნიერების რესურსები, რომლებიც გამოვიყენეთ ძალიან განსაკუთრებ მაგრამ უფრო მედინარე მიმდინარე დაეხმარება მონოლენგიური წარმოდგენებიდან, რომლებიც მათი ძალიან დარწმუნდება მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემების რაოდენობ ამ დოკეტში ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას გადავუწყებთ და კონცექციას, პრომენტიკური ტექნექცია, რომელიც ენერგიის განსაკუთრებული გვექტორის განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრე ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა უფრო მეტად საკუთარი გამოსახულებებით, რომელიც მრავალენგური და მრავალენგური სემონტიკური სიტყვების განსხვავება და სიტყვების განსხვავება, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან ძალ კონცექცია - ის პროგრამი და დასრულებული გამოსახულებების შესახებ https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'hu': 'A mai napig a legsikeresebb szó-, szóérzék- és koncepciómodellezési technikák nagy korpuszokat és tudási erőforrásokat használtak arra, hogy sűrű vektorreprezentációkat hozzanak létre, amelyek megragadják a szemantikai hasonlóságokat egy viszonylag alacsony dimenziós térben. A legtöbb jelenlegi megközelítés azonban egynyelvű elfogultságtól szenved, erősségük a nyelvek között rendelkezésre álló adatok mennyiségétől függ. Jelen tanulmányban foglalkozunk ezzel a kérdéssel, és javasoljuk a Conception-t, egy olyan új technikát, amely olyan fogalmak nyelvfüggetlen vektorreprezentációjának építésére szolgál, amely a többnyelvűséget helyezi magába, miközben megtartja a koncepciók közötti explicit kapcsolatokat. Megközelítésünk olyan nagy lefedettségű reprezentációkat eredményez, amelyek felülmúlják a legkorszerűbb technológiát a többnyelvű és többnyelvű szemantikus szóhasonlóságban és a Word Sense szétérthetőségben, különösen erőteljesnek bizonyulnak az alacsony erőforrású nyelveken. A koncepció - annak szoftvere és a teljes ábrázolási készlet - elérhető a következő oldalon: https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'it': "Ad oggi, le tecniche di modellazione di parole, senso delle parole e concetto di maggior successo hanno utilizzato grandi corpora e risorse di conoscenza per produrre rappresentazioni vettoriali dense che catturano somiglianze semantiche in uno spazio relativamente a bassa dimensione. La maggior parte degli approcci attuali, tuttavia, soffre di un pregiudizio monolingue, con la loro forza a seconda della quantità di dati disponibili in tutte le lingue. In questo articolo affrontiamo questo problema e proponiamo Conception, una nuova tecnica per costruire rappresentazioni vettoriali indipendenti dal linguaggio di concetti che pone la multilinguità al suo centro pur mantenendo relazioni esplicite tra concetti. Il nostro approccio si traduce in rappresentazioni ad alta copertura che superano lo stato dell'arte nella somiglianza semantica multilingue e multilingue delle parole e nella disambiguazione del senso delle parole, dimostrando particolarmente robuste nei linguaggi a basso contenuto di risorse. Conception - il suo software e l'insieme completo di rappresentazioni - è disponibile a https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.", 'kk': 'Бірақ ең сәтті сөз, сөз сезімі және концепциялық модель техникалары үлкен корпора және білім ресурстарын қолданып, семантикалық ұқсас кездескендерді салыстырып төмен өлшемі бойынша сәйкес кездес Бірақ қазіргі жағдайдың көпшілігі бірнеше тілінде бар деректер санына тәуелді, бірнеше тілінде тәуелді тәуелді. Бұл қағазда біз осы мәселеді шешуге және Концепциясын қолданып, тілдерге тәуелсіз векторлық таңбаларын құру үшін романдық техникалық. Бұл қағаздың негізінде көптеген тілдердің қатынасын түсіндіру үші Біздің тәсілдігіміз көп тілді және көп тілді Semantic сөздердің ұқсастығы мен сөздердің ұқсастығы мен сөздердің ұқсастығы жоғары мәліметтерінің негізінде болады. Біздің көбірек ресурстар тілдеріне Концепция - оның бағдарламасы және толық таңбалар жиыны - бар https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'lt': 'Iki šiol sėkmingiausi žodžiai, žodžio supratimas ir koncepcijos modeliavimo metodai naudojo didelę korprą ir žinių išteklius, kad būtų sukurti tankūs vektorių atspindimai, kurie atspindi semantines panašumas santykinai mažo matmens erdvėje. Vis dėlto dauguma dabartinių metodų patiria vienkalbinę pusiausvyrą, kurios stiprumas priklauso nuo duomenų, gautų įvairiose kalbose, kiekio. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame šį klausimą ir siūlome koncepciją, naują metodą, skirtą sąvokų, kuriose daugiakalbystė yra pagrindinė, savarankiškos kalbos, atstovavimo vektoriams kūrimui, išlaikant aiškius sąvokų santykius. Mūsų požiūris lemia didelio masto atstovavimus, kurie viršija pažangiausią pažangą daugiakalbėse ir tarpkalbėse Semantinėse žodžių panašumo ir žodžių jausmų nedviprasmiškumo srityse, įrodančius ypatingą tvirtumą mažai išteklių turinčiose kalbose. Koncepcija – jos programinė įranga ir visa atstovų rinkinys – pateikiama https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'mk': 'Досега, најуспешните зборови, зборското чувство и техниките на моделирање на концептите користеа големи корпорации и извори на знаење за да создадат густи векторски претставувања кои прифаќаат семантични сличности во релативно нискодимензионален простор. Сепак, повеќето сегашни пристапи страдаат од монојазични предрасуди, со нивната сила во зависност од количината на податоци достапни низ јазиците. Во овој документ го решаваме ова прашање и предложуваме Концепција, нова техника за изградба на векторни претставувања на концепти кои се независни од јазикот, кои ја ставаат мултијазичноста во суштината, при што се одржуваат експлицитни односи меѓу концептите Нашиот пристап резултира со високо покривање претставувања кои ја надминуваат техничката состојба на мултијазични и прекујазични семантични зборови сличност и разјаснување на зборовите, докажувајќи се особено силни на јазиците со ниски ресурси. Концепцијата - нејзиниот софтвер и целосниот сет на претставувања - се достапни на https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ms': 'To date, the most successful word, word sense, and concept modelling techniques have used large corpora and knowledge resources to produce dense vector representations that capture semantic similarities in a relatively low-dimensional space.  Kebanyakan pendekatan semasa, bagaimanapun, menderita dari bias monobahasa, dengan kekuatan mereka bergantung pada jumlah data yang tersedia di seluruh bahasa. Dalam kertas ini kami mengatasi isu ini dan melamar Konsepsi, teknik baru untuk membina perwakilan vektor bebas bahasa konsep yang meletakkan kebanyakan bahasa di inti sementara menjaga hubungan eksplicit antara konsep. Pendekatan kita menghasilkan persembahan yang meliputi tinggi yang melebihi keadaan seni dalam berbilang bahasa dan saling bahasa Seman Perkara Sama-sama dan Perkara Sensa Lupakan, membuktikan khususnya kuat dalam bahasa sumber rendah. Koncesi - perisiannya dan set penuh perwakilan - tersedia di https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ml': 'ഇന്ന് വരെ ഏറ്റവും വിജയിച്ച വാക്ക്, വാക്കുകളുടെ മനസ്സ്, കണ്ടോപ്പിന്റെ മാതൃകയുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയും അറിവുകളും ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സമ്പാദിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലഭിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും, ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d ഭാഷ-സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം വളരെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കഥ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് കൊണ്ട് വരുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളിലും ക്രിസ്ലാങ്ക് ഭാഷകളിലുമുള്ള കലാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക കോണ്\u200dസപ്ഷന്\u200d - അതിന്\u200dറെ സോഫ്റ്റ്\u200cവെയരും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ സെറ്റും ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'mt': 'Sal-lum, it-tekniki tal-mudellar tal-kelma, tas-sens tal-kelma u tal-kunċett l-aktar ta’ suċċess użaw korpra u riżorsi tal-għarfien kbar biex jipproduċu rappreżentazzjonijiet densi tal-vetturi li jaqbdu similaritajiet semantiċi fi spazju relattivament baxx fid-dimensjoni. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi attwali jsofru minn preġudizzju monolingwi, bis-saħħa tagħhom skont l-ammont ta’ dejta disponibbli fil-lingwi kollha. F’dan id-dokument nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni u nipproponu Konċezzjoni, teknika ġdida għall-bini ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ vetturi indipendenti mil-lingwa ta’ kunċetti li jqiegħdu l-multilingwiċità fil-qalba tagħha filwaqt li nżammu relazzjonijiet espliċiti bejn il-kunċetti. L-approċċ tagħna jirriżulta f’rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ kopertura għolja li jaqbżu l-istat tal-aktar avvanzat f’lingwi multipli u translingwi Similarità Semantika tal-Kliem u Diżambigwazzjoni Sens il-Kliem, li juru partikolarment b’saħħithom fuq lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi. Il-kunċett – is-softwer tiegħu u s-sett sħiħ ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet – huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр хамгийн амжилттай үг, үг мэдрэмж, ойлголтын модель технологиуд маш том корпора болон мэдлэг боловсруулалт ашиглаж байгаа бөгөөд хэмжээст хэмжээст орон зайд жижиг вектор илэрхийллийг бий болгодог. Гэхдээ ихэнх орчин үеийн ойлголт нь нэг хэл хэлбэрээс халдвар авдаг. Тэдний хүчирхэг нь хэл дээр хэрэглэгддэг өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд хамааралтай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлыг ярьж, ойлголтын тухай тодорхой харилцааны тухай олон хэлний үндсэн зан төлөвлөгөөг бий болгох шинэ техник юм. Бидний арга барилга нь олон хэл болон олон хэл хэлний урлагийн төвшинд ижил хэлбэртэй хэлний төвшин, мөн хэлний мэдрэмжтэй хэлбэрээс илүү чадвартай урлагийн төлөвлөгөөг гаргадаг. Тодорхойлолт - програм хангамж, бүрэн үзүүлэлтийн хэмжээг - ашиглах боломжтой. https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'no': 'Til dag har det mest suksessfulle ordet, ordfølelse og konseptmodelleringsteknikka brukt stor korporat og kunnskap ressursar for å produsere tette vektorrepresentasjonar som får semantiske likningar i eit relativt lav dimensjonal plass. Dei fleste gjeldande tilnærmingane kan imidlertid kjøre frå ein monospråksforsikt, med kraft avhengig av kva mykje data tilgjengelege på språk. I denne papiret adresserer vi dette problemet og foreslår vi konseptasjon, ein novel teknikk for å bygge språk-uavhengige vektorrepresentasjonar av konseptar som plasserer fleire språk på kjernen sin mens det beholder eksplisitt forhold mellom konseptar. Tilnærminga vårt resulterer i høg dekkefølgjande representasjonar som utfører kunsten i fleirspråk og krysspråk semantiske ord liknande og utviklinga av ord følgjer seg, som viser spesielt sterkt på låg ressursspråk. @ info: whatsthis https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'pl': 'Do tej pory najbardziej udane techniki modelowania słów, zmysłów słowa i koncepcji wykorzystują duże korpusy i zasoby wiedzy do produkcji gęstych reprezentacji wektorowych, które uwzględniają podobieństwa semantyczne w stosunkowo niskiej przestrzeni wymiarowej. Większość obecnych podejść cierpi jednak z powodu jednojęzycznego uprzedzenia, którego siła zależy od ilości danych dostępnych w poszczególnych językach. W artykule zajmujemy się tą kwestią i proponujemy Conception, nowatorską technikę budowania niezależnych od języka wektorowych reprezentacji pojęć, która stawia wielojęzyczność w swoim rdzeniu, zachowując jednocześnie wyraźne relacje między pojęciami. Nasze podejście skutkuje wysokim zasięgiem reprezentacji, które przewyższają najnowocześniejszą technologię w wielojęzycznych i wielojęzycznych podobieństwach słów semantycznych i rozjasnianiu zmysłu słowa, co okazuje się szczególnie solidne w przypadku języków o niskich zasobach. Koncepcja oprogramowania oraz kompletny zestaw reprezentacji dostępny jest na stronie internetowej https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ro': 'Până în prezent, cele mai de succes tehnici de modelare a cuvântului, sensului cuvântului și conceptului au folosit corpuri mari și resurse de cunoaștere pentru a produce reprezentări vectoriale dense care capturează asemănări semantice într-un spațiu relativ mic-dimensional. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea abordărilor actuale suferă de o părtinire monolingvă, puterea lor depinde de cantitatea de date disponibile în toate limbile. În această lucrare abordăm această problemă și propunem Conception, o tehnică nouă de construire a reprezentărilor vectoriale independente de limbaj a conceptelor care plasează multilingvitatea în centrul său, păstrând în același timp relații explicite între concepte. Abordarea noastră rezultă în reprezentări de înaltă acoperire care depășesc performanțele de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește similitudinea cuvintelor semantice multilingve și interlingve și dezambiguizarea sensului cuvintelor, dovedindu-se deosebit de robuste în limbile cu resurse reduse. Conception - software-ul său și setul complet de reprezentări - este disponibil la https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'sv': 'Hittills har de mest framgångsrika ord-, ordsinne- och konceptmodelleringsteknikerna använt stora korpora- och kunskapsresurser för att producera täta vektorrepresentationer som fångar semantiska likheter i ett relativt lågdimensionellt utrymme. De flesta nuvarande tillvägagångssätt lider dock av en enspråkig bias, och deras styrka beror på mängden data som finns tillgängliga på olika språk. I denna uppsats tar vi upp denna fråga och föreslår Conception, en ny teknik för att bygga språkoberoende vektorrepresentationer av begrepp som placerar flerspråkighet i centrum samtidigt som explicita relationer mellan begrepp bibehålls. Vårt tillvägagångssätt resulterar i representationer med hög täckning som överträffar det senaste inom flerspråkig och flerspråkig semantisk ordlikhet och ordförnuftsdivision, vilket visar sig vara särskilt robust på språk med låga resurser. Conception - dess programvara och hela uppsättningen representationer - finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'sr': 'Do sada, najuspešniji reč, smisao reči i tehnike modeliranja koncepta koristili su velike korporacije i znanja resurse za proizvodnju gustih predstavljanja vektora koji su uhvatili semantičke sličnosti u relativno niskom dimenzionalnom prostoru. Međutim, većina trenutnih pristupa pati od monojezičke predrasude, s njihovom snagom ovisnom o količini dostupnih podataka na jezicima. U ovom papiru rješavamo ovaj problem i predlažemo koncepciju, novu tehniku za izgradnju predstavljanja jezika nezavisnih vektora koncepta koji stavlja multijezičnost na svoju jeziku dok zadržavamo jasne veze između koncepta. Naš pristup rezultira predstavljanja visokog pokrivanja koji nadmažu stanje umetnosti na višejezičkim i međujezičkim semantičkim riječima sličnosti i razmazanosti reči, dokazujući posebno jače na jezicima niskih resursa. Koncepcija - njegov softver i kompletni set predstavljanja - je dostupna na https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන්, වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වචන, වචන අවස්ථාවය, සහ අනුවිධාන විද්\u200dයාවය ලොකු කෝපෝරා සහ දන්න අවස්ථාවක් භාවිත කරලා තිය නමුත් බොහොම දැන් ප්\u200dරවේශ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ වෙනුවෙන් එක භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් නිසා, ඔවුන්ගේ බලය භාෂ මේ පැත්තේ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, භාෂාව ස්වේශ වෙක්ටර් වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා භාෂ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක වචන ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය - එයාගේ සොෆ්ටවර් සහ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සම්පූර්ණ සැට - ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ur': 'یہاں تک، سب سے موفق کلمات، کلمات کا احساس، اور منظور موڈلینگ ٹیکنیکوں نے بہت بڑی کمپورا اور علم کے منابع استعمال کر دیئے ہیں کہ مٹی ویکتوروں کی تصاویرات پیدا کریں جو نسبتا کم اندازے کی جگہ میں سیمنٹی برابریتیں پکڑیں۔ لیکن اکثر موجود طریقے سے ایک زبان کی طرف سے مشکل ہوتے ہیں، ان کی طاقت کے ساتھ زبانوں میں موجود ہونے والی دادہ کی مقدار پر مضبوط ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم اس مسئلہ کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور تفسیر کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، زبان کے مستقل ویکتوروں کی تفسیر بنانے کے لئے ایک نئی تفسیر ہے جو اپنی اصل میں بہت سی زبان کی تعلیمات رکھتا ہے اور تفسیر کے درمیان صریح رابطہ رکھتا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ بالا حفاظت کا نتیجہ ہے جو بہت سی زبان اور کروست زبان کے مطابق کلمات کی موقعیت سے زیادہ زیادہ کرتا ہے اور کلمات کا مطابق ناامید ہوتا ہے، اور بہت زیادہ مطابق کم منبع زبانوں پر ثابت قدم رکھتا ہے۔ نظریہ - اس کا سافٹوفر اور تمام نمایش سٹ - اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ta': 'இப்போது, மிக வெற்றிகரமான வார்த்தை, வார்த்தையுடைய உணர்வு, மற்றும் கருத்து மாதிரியும் தொழில்நுட்பம் பெரிய நுறுவனம் மற்றும் அறிவு முறைகளை பயன்படுத பெரும்பாலும் தற்போதைய நெருக்கங்கள், ஆனாலும் ஒரு மொழிமொழியில் இருந்து பாதிக்கும், அவர்களுடைய சக்தி இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் காப்பெடுத்தலை திருந்திக்கொள்கிறோம், ஒரு புதிய தொழில்நுட்பம், மொழி- சுதந்தி ந நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு அதிக மறைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பல மொழிகள் மற்றும் பல மொழிகள் மற்றும் குறைந்த மொழிகளில் கலைப்பாட்டின் நிலையை வெளியேற்றும் மற்றும் குறைந Conception - அதன் மென்பொருள் மற்றும் முழு குறிப்பிட்ட அமைப்புகள் - இதில் கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'so': 'Hada la joogo, hadalka ugu liibaansan, hadalka maandooriyaha, iyo qaababka sameynta waxay isticmaaleen noocyo badan oo shirkado waaweyn iyo aqoonta si uu u sameeyo noocyo qarsoon oo u qabsada isku mid ah goob hoos u yar. Si kastaba ha ahaatee kuwa badan ee soo dhowaaday waxay ku xanuunsadaan baahida luqada ah, xooggooduna waxay ku xiran tahay tirada macluumaadka luqadaha oo dhan. Warqaddan waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa arimahan, waxaana soo jeedaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku qoraya dhisidda wado aan ku xoreenayn luuqada, kaas oo ka dhigaya fikrada qalabka kala duduwan marka aad sii haysato xiriir muuqda oo aad u muuqaneyso fikrada dhexdooda. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga ayaa ka soo baxa qaybaha farshaxanka oo ku qoran xaalada farshaxanka oo ku qoran luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo hadalka kala duduwan isku mid ah iyo qalabka Sense ee hadalka, isagoo si gaar ah u cadeynaya luqadaha hoose-resource. Dalbashka - software-kiisa iyo koox nooc oo kamid ah - waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'uz': "To date, the most successful word, word sense, and concept modelling techniques have used large corpora and knowledge resources to produce dense vector representations that capture semantic similarities in a relatively low-dimensional space.  Hozirda, ko'pchilik murakkablarida bir necha tildagi taʼlumotlar soni qo'llashadi. Bu hujjatda, biz bu muammolarni boshqaramiz va Konception, o'ylab o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish uchun novel teknologiya, o'sha g'oyalarning ko'plab o'smirlarini o'zgartirish mumkin va o'sha g'oyalarning orasidagi xususiyatlarni tayyorlash mumkin. Bizning muvaffaqiyatlarimiz bir tillar va har bir tillar xil so'zlarining holatini ko'paytirish va so'zning o'xshash so'zlarini o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'ladi. Bitta qisqa manbalar tillariga o'zgartirish mumkin. Conception - bu dastur va toʻliq koʻrinishning turi - bu yerda mavjud https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.", 'vi': 'Đến giờ, từ, nghĩa từ, và kỹ thuật mô hình khái niệm thành công nhất đã sử dụng cơ thể và kiến thức rộng lớn để tạo ra các biểu tượng vector đậm đặc, thu thập các điểm tương đối thấp. Hầu hết các phương pháp hiện tại, tuy nhiên, mắc phải khuynh hướng ngôn ngữ, với sức mạnh của chúng phụ thuộc vào lượng dữ liệu có thể cung cấp qua các ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ giải quyết vấn đề này và đề xuất Ý tưởng, một kỹ thuật mới để xây dựng các biểu tượng vector ngôn ngữ độc lập của các khái niệm mà gắn liền với nhau và giữ mối quan hệ rõ ràng giữa các khái niệm. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta kết quả là các biểu tượng cao cấp vượt trội về trạng thái nghệ thuật trong ngôn ngữ đa dạng và ngôn ngữ khác nhau luân lýStencils Similaty và Word nhạy cảm thất bại, cho thấy đặc biệt mạnh về ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Có phần mềm của nó và bộ trình diễn đầy đủ https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'bg': 'Към днешна дата най-успешните техники за моделиране на думи, думи и концепции са използвали големи корпуси и ресурси от знания, за да произвеждат плътни векторни изображения, които улавят семантични прилики в относително нискоизмерно пространство. Повечето съвременни подходи обаче страдат от едноезична пристрастност, като тяхната сила зависи от количеството данни, налични за различните езици. В настоящата статия разглеждаме този въпрос и предлагаме нова техника за изграждане на езиково-независими векторни представи на понятията, която поставя многоезичието в основата си, като същевременно запазва изрични взаимоотношения между понятията. Нашият подход води до представяне с високо покритие, което надминава най-съвременните постижения в многоезичните и междуезичните семантични сходства на думи и дисамбигуацията на чувството на думи, доказвайки се особено здрави на езици с ниски ресурси. Концепцията - неговият софтуер и пълният набор от представяния - е достъпна на адрес https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'nl': 'Tot op heden hebben de meest succesvolle woord-, woordzin- en conceptmodelleringstechnieken grote corpora en kennisbronnen gebruikt om dichte vectorrepresentaties te produceren die semantische overeenkomsten vastleggen in een relatief laagdimensionale ruimte. De meeste huidige benaderingen lijden echter aan een monolingual bias, waarbij hun kracht afhankelijk is van de hoeveelheid beschikbare gegevens in verschillende talen. In dit artikel behandelen we dit probleem en stellen we Conception voor, een nieuwe techniek voor het bouwen van taalonafhankelijke vectorrepresentaties van concepten die meertaligheid centraal stelt terwijl expliciete relaties tussen concepten behouden blijven. Onze aanpak resulteert in representaties met een hoge dekking die beter presteren dan de state of the art in meertalige en meertalige Semantische Woordgelijkenis en Word Sense Disambiguation, wat bijzonder robuust blijkt voor talen met weinig resources. Conceptie met zijn software en de volledige set van representaties is beschikbaar op https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'de': 'Bisher haben die erfolgreichsten Wort-, Wortsinn- und Konzeptmodellierungstechniken große Korpora und Wissensressourcen verwendet, um dichte Vektorrepräsentationen zu erzeugen, die semantische Ähnlichkeiten in einem relativ niederdimensionalen Raum erfassen. Die meisten derzeitigen Ansätze leiden jedoch unter einer monolingualen Verzerrung, deren Stärke von der Menge der verfügbaren Daten in den verschiedenen Sprachen abhängt. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir dieses Thema und schlagen Conception vor, eine neuartige Technik zum Aufbau sprachunabhängiger Vektorrepräsentationen von Konzepten, die Mehrsprachigkeit in ihren Kern stellt und dabei explizite Beziehungen zwischen Konzepten beibehält. Unser Ansatz führt zu Repräsentationen mit hoher Abdeckung, die den Stand der Technik in der multilingualen und crosslingualen semantischen Wortgleichheit und Word Sense Disambiguation übertreffen und sich besonders für ressourcenarme Sprachen als robust erweisen. Konzeption mit seiner Software und dem kompletten Satz von Darstellungen ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'hr': 'Za sada, najuspješniji riječ, smisao riječi i tehnike modeliranja koncepta koristili su velike korporacije i znanja za proizvodnju gustih predstavljanja vektora koji uključuju semantičke sličnosti u relativno niskom dimenzionalnom prostoru. Međutim, većina trenutnih pristupa pati od monojezičke predrasude, s njihovom snagom ovisnom o količini dostupnih podataka na jezicima. U ovom papiru obraćamo se ovom pitanju i predlažemo koncepciju, novu tehniku za izgradnju jezički nezavisnih vektorskih predstavljanja koncepta koji stavlja multijezičnost na svoju temelj, dok zadržavamo jasne veze između koncepta. Naš pristup rezultira predstavljanja visokog pokrivanja koji su nadmašili stanje umjetnosti na višejezičkim i međujezičkim semantičkim riječima sličnosti i disambiguaciji riječi, pokazujući posebno jače na jezicima niskih resursa. Koncepcija - njegov softver i kompletni sastav zastupanja - dostupna je na https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'da': 'Til dato har de mest succesfulde ord-, ordsans- og konceptmodelleringsteknikker brugt store korpora- og videnressourcer til at producere tætte vektorrepræsentationer, der fanger semantiske ligheder i et relativt lavdimensionelt rum. De fleste nuværende fremgangsmåder lider imidlertid af ensproget skævhed, idet deres styrke afhænger af mængden af data, der er tilgængelige på tværs af sprog. I denne artikel behandler vi dette spørgsmål og foreslår Conception, en ny teknik til at opbygge sproguafhængige vektorrepræsentationer af begreber, der placerer flersprogethed i sin kerne, samtidig med at de bevarer eksplicitte relationer mellem begreber. Vores tilgang resulterer i højt dækkende repræsentationer, der overgår den nyeste teknologi inden for flersprogede og tværsprogede semantiske ord lighed og ordfornemmelse Disambiguation, hvilket viser sig særligt robust på sprog med lav ressource. Conception - dens software og det komplette sæt af repræsentationer - er tilgængelig på https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'fa': 'تا حالا، بهترین کلمه موفقیت، احساس کلمه، و تکنیک مدل\u200cسازی مفهوم، منابع\u200cهای زیادی از شرکت و دانش برای تولید نمایش\u200cهای ویکتورهای داغی که شبیه\u200cهای semantic را در یک فضای نسبتا کم\u200cاندازه می\u200cگیرند استفاده می\u200cکنند. ولی بیشترین نزدیک\u200cهای فعلی از یک تنظیم زبان رنج می\u200cبرند، با قدرت آنها بستگی به مقدار داده\u200cهای موجود در زبانها است. در این کاغذ ما این مسئله را حل می\u200cکنیم و پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نظریه\u200cای، یک تکنیک جدید برای ساختن نمایش\u200cهای ویکتورهای مستقل به زبان\u200cها از نظریه\u200cهایی که تعدادی زبان\u200cهای زیادی را در مرکز آن قرار می\u200cدهد، در حالی که رابطه\u200cهای دسترسی ما به عنوان نمایش\u200cهای زیادی پوشش می\u200cرسد که موقعیت هنری در شبیه کلمه\u200cهای زیادی زبان و زیادی زبان\u200cهای زیادی و زیادی زبان\u200cهای زیادی و ناتوانی کلمه\u200cهای زیادی را ثابت می\u200cکند، و به خصوص بر زبان\u200cهای کمی منابع تفسیر - نرم\u200cافزارش و مجموعه کامل نمایش- در https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'id': 'To date, the most successful word, word sense, and concept modelling techniques have used large corpora and knowledge resources to produce dense vector representations that capture semantic similarities in a relatively low-dimensional space.  Kebanyakan pendekatan saat ini, bagaimanapun, menderita dari bias monobahasa, dengan kekuatan mereka tergantung pada jumlah data yang tersedia di berbagai bahasa. Dalam kertas ini kami mengatasi masalah ini dan melamar Konsepsi, teknik baru untuk membangun representation vektor independen bahasa dari konsep yang menempatkan multibahasa di inti sementara menjaga hubungan eksplicit antara konsep. Pendekatan kami menghasilkan persembahan yang meliputi tinggi yang melebihi keadaan seni dalam berbagai bahasa dan saling bahasa Semantik Word Similarity dan Word Sense Disambiguation, membuktikan khusus kuat dalam bahasa sumber daya rendah. Konsepsi - perangkat lunak dan set lengkap represisi - tersedia di https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ko': '지금까지 가장 성공적인 단어, 의미와 개념 모델링 기술은 대형 어료 라이브러리와 지식 자원을 이용하여 밀집된 벡터 표시를 생성하여 상대적으로 저차원 공간에서 의미의 유사성을 포착했다.그러나 현재 대부분의 방법에는 단어 편견이 존재하는데 그 강도는 언어를 뛰어넘어 사용할 수 있는 데이터의 양에 달려 있다.본고에서 우리는 이 문제를 해결하고 개념을 제시했다. 이것은 언어와 무관한 개념의 양을 구축하는 데 사용되는 새로운 기술로 다중 언어를 핵심으로 하고 개념 간의 명확한 관계를 보존한다.우리의 방법이 얻은 높은 범위는 다중 언어와 다중 언어의 의미어의 유사성과 의미의 변조가 최신 기술보다 우수하다는 것을 나타내고 저자원 언어에서 특히 강하다는 것을 증명한다.Concept - 소프트웨어 및 전체 표현 세트 -https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'tr': 'Şimdiye kadar, en başarılı kelime, kelime duygusu ve mantıklı modelleme teknolojileri, büyük korpora ve bilim kaynaklarını semantik benzerini relativ düşük boyutlu bir alanda oluşturmak için kullandılar. Ýöne köp wagtyň ýakynlaşyklary, dillerde bar maglumatyň haýsy bilen görä bir monolingüň biasyndan çykar. Bu kagyzda biz bu meseleyi çözdirip Maýsy düşündirip, dilden garaşsyz vektörler düzenlemek üçin bir täze tekniki. Bu meselede düşünceler arasyndaky düşünjeleri bolup durýar. Biziň ýaryşymyz uly daşyk çykyş şeklinde sungatyň halynyň meňzeşliki we çarp dillerden çykyş sözlerine meňzeşlik we sözlerimizi bozmak üçin ýokary çykyş edip bilýär. Mazmunlar - programi we bellenenler düzümleri - meýilleşdirilýär https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'sq': 'Deri tani, fjala më e suksesshme, kuptimi i fjalës dhe teknikat e modelimit të konceptit kanë përdorur trupa të madhe dhe burime të njohurive për të prodhuar përfaqësime të dendura vektorësh që kapin ngjashmëri semantike në një hapësirë relativisht të ulët dimensionale. Most current approaches, however, suffer from a monolingual bias, with their strength depending on the amount of data available across languages.  Në këtë letër ne trajtojmë këtë çështje dhe propozojmë Konceptim, një teknikë e re për ndërtimin e përfaqësimeve vektorësh të pavarura nga gjuha të koncepteve që vendosin shumëgjuhësinë në thelbin e saj duke mbajtur marrëdhënie të qarta midis koncepteve. Përqasja jonë rezulton në përfaqësime me mbulim të lartë që tejkalojnë gjendjen e teknologjisë në gjuhët e shumëgjuhëshme dhe ndërgjuhësore Semantike Similaritë e Fjalave dhe Paqartësimin e Fjalave, duke provuar veçanërisht të fortë në gjuhët me burime të ulëta. Koncepcioni - programi i tij dhe kompleti i përfaqësimeve - është në dispozicion në https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'sw': 'Mpaka sasa, maneno yenye mafanikio zaidi, maana, na mbinu za mifano ya mawasiliano yametumia makampuni makubwa na rasilimali za maarifa ili kutengeneza uwakilizaji wa vector kwa kiwango kikubwa kinachofanana na kimapenzi katika nafasi yenye kiwango cha chini. Matokeo mengi ya sasa, hata hivyo, yanakabiliwa na upendeleo wa lugha za kiutaifa, na nguvu zao zinategemea kiasi cha taarifa zinazopatikana katika lugha mbalimbali. Katika karatasi hii tunazungumzia suala hili na tunapendekeza Conception, teknolojia ya riwaya kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vector huru ya lugha inayowakilisha dhana ambayo inaweka uwezo wa lugha mbalimbali katika msingi wake wakati wa kuendeleza mahusiano ya wazi kati ya mawazo. Matokeo yetu yanasababisha maonesho makubwa ya habari yanayohusu hali ya sanaa katika neno la lugha za lugha mbalimbali na lugha tofauti liko sawa na Ukosefu wa Sensi, wakithibitisha hasa kuhusiana na lugha za chini za rasilimali. Kuzuia - programu yake na seti kamili ya uwakilishi - inapatikana katika https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'af': "Vandag het die mees suksesvolle woord, woord sens en konsepte modelleringteknike groot korpore en kennis hulpbronne gebruik om dense vektorvoorstellings te produseer wat semantiese gelykenisse in 'n relativies lae-dimensies spasie opgeneem. Die meeste huidige toegang, egter, lyk van 'n monolinglike voorbeeld, met hul krag afhanklik van die hoeveelheid data beskikbaar oor tale. In hierdie papier raak ons hierdie aangaande en voorstel ons Koncepsie, 'n nuwe teknikkie vir die bou van taal-onafhanklike vektor-voorstellings van konsepte wat multilingaliteit op sy kern plaas terwyl uitduidelike verhouding tussen konsepte hou. Ons toegang veroorsaak in hoë-dekking voorstellings wat die staat van die kuns in multitaal en kruistale Semantiese woord gelykbaarheid en Woord Sense Ontbreking, wat spesiaal kragtig op lae-hulpbron tale verskyn. Koncepsie - sy sagteware en die volledige stel van voorstellings - is beskikbaar by https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.", 'am': 'እስከ ዛሬ፣ የቃላት፣ የቃላት አስተዋይ እና የኮርፖርት እና እውቀት ሀብት ትልቅ የኮርፖርት እና የእውቀት ሀብትን በመጠቀም የዋይትር ምሳሌዎችን በሚያሳየው ስሜናዊ ክፍል በሚያሳስል ስፋት ውስጥ ጥልቅ የሜክሮር መልዕክቶችን ለመፍጠር ጠቅሟል፡፡ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ግን በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የሚኖሩት የድምፅ ኃይላቸው በቋንቋዎች ሁሉ ላይ የተገኘውን የዳታ ቁጥር በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ጉዳዩን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቋንቋዎች እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ተቃውሞ ብጤት እና የቃላት ሲንሳዊ ውጤት በሚያሳድጉ የራስ ክፍልፍሎች ከፍተኛ ድጋፍ አቀረበ፡፡ _መግለጫ https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'az': 'Şimdiye qədər ən müvəffəqiyyətli söz, söz anlamı və məlumat modellik teknikləri böyük korpora və elm kaynaqlarına istifadə etdilər ki, semantik məlumatları relativi düşük ölçüdə alanda məlumatları alırlar. Halbuki çox a ğıllı tərəflər dillərdə faydalanır verilən məlumatların sayısına bağlı olan monodil tərəflərindən üz çevirirlər. Bu kağızda biz bu məsələni çəkirik və Koncepsyonu təklif edirik, dil-bağımsız vektör göstəricilərini inşa etmək üçün yeni bir tekniki, ki bu məsələdə çoxlu dilləri özünün ilk tərəfində yerləşdirir, və bu məsələdə düşüncələrin arasındakı a çıq ilişkileri saxlaya Bizim yaxınlığımız çoxlu dil və çoxlu dil Semantik Kelimlərin bənzəriliyində olan sanatın durumunu daha qüvvətli göstərən yüksək örtük göstəricilərin sonuçlarına gəlir, özlərinə də çox qüvvətli dillərin istifadəsi ilə istifadə edir. Koncepsyon - onun proqramı və tamamlama göstəricilərin qurulu - faydalanır https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ca': 'Fins ara, les tècniques de modelació de paraules, sentit de paraules i conceptes més exitoses han utilitzat grans corpores i recursos de coneixement per produir representacions denses de vectors que capturen similituds semàntiques en un espai relativament baix de dimensions. Most current approaches, however, suffer from a monolingual bias, with their strength depending on the amount of data available across languages.  In this paper we address this issue and propose Conception, a novel technique for building language-independent vector representations of concepts which places multilinguality at its core while retaining explicit relationships between concepts.  Our approach results in high-coverage representations that outperform the state of the art in multilingual and cross-lingual Semantic Word Similarity and Word Sense Disambiguation, proving particularly robust on low-resource languages.  La concepció - el seu software i el conjunt complet de representacions - està disponible en https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'cs': 'K dnešnímu dni nejúspěšnější techniky modelování slov, slov a konceptů využívají velké korpusy a znalostní zdroje k produkci hustých vektorových reprezentací, které zachycují sémantické podobnosti v relativně nízko-dimenzionálním prostoru. Většina současných přístupů však trpí monojazyčným zaujatostí, jejichž síla závisí na množství dat dostupných v různých jazycích. V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou a navrhujeme Conception, novou techniku pro budování jazykově nezávislých vektorových reprezentací konceptů, která klade mnohojazyčnost do svého jádra a zachovává explicitní vztahy mezi koncepty. Náš přístup vede k reprezentacím s vysokým pokrytím, které překonávají nejmodernější stav vícejazyčných a vícejazyčných sémantických slov podobnosti a rozjasňování smyslu slova, což se ukázalo jako obzvláště robustní u jazyků s nízkými zdroji. Koncepce jeho softwaru a kompletní sada reprezentací je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'bn': 'এখন পর্যন্ত সবচেয়ে সফল শব্দ, শব্দের অর্থ এবং ধারণা মোডেলিং প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করেছে বিশাল কোর্পোরা এবং জ্ঞানের সম্পদ ব্যবহার করেছে যেগুলোর গভীর ভেক্টরের প তবে বর্তমানের বেশীরভাগ প্রতিক্রিয়া অনুভূতি থেকে ভুগছে, যেখানে তাদের শক্তি সারা ভাষায় পাওয়া তথ্য নির্ভর করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই বিষয়টিকে আলোচনা করি এবং কনসেপশনের প্রস্তাব করি, ভাষার স্বাধীন ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণের জন্য একটি উপন্যাস প্রযুক্তি যা ধারণার প আমাদের পদক্ষেপের ফলে উচ্চ কাভারেজের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ফলে মাল্টিভাষা এবং ক্রিভাষাভাষী ভাষায় শিল্পের অবস্থান সমান এবং শব্দ সেন্সের বিরুদ্ধে বিশেষ কর কনসেকশন - এর সফটওয়্যার এবং পুরোপুরি প্রতিনিধিত্ব - এ পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'bs': 'Do sada, najuspješniji riječ, smisao riječi i tehnike modeliranja koncepta koristili su velike korporacije i znanja resurse za proizvodnju gustih predstavljanja vektora koji su uhvatili semantičke sličnosti u relativno niskom dimenzionalnom prostoru. Međutim, većina trenutnih pristupa pati od monojezičke predrasude, s njihovom snagom ovisnom o količini dostupnih podataka na jezicima. U ovom papiru rješavamo ovaj problem i predlažemo koncepciju, novu tehniku za izgradnju jezički nezavisnih vektorskih predstavljanja koncepta koji stavlja multijezičnost na svoju jeziku dok zadržavamo jasne veze između koncepta. Naš pristup rezultira predstavljanja visokog pokrivanja koji su nadmašili stanje umjetnosti na višejezičkim i međujezičkim semantičkim riječima sličnosti i disambiguaciji riječi, pokazujući posebno jak na jezicima niskih resursa. Koncepcija - njegov softver i kompletni set predstavljanja - je dostupna na https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'fi': 'Tähän mennessä menestyneimmät sana-, sana- ja konseptimallintatekniikat ovat hyödyntäneet suuria korpusia ja tietoresursseja tuottaakseen tiheitä vektoriesityksiä, jotka kuvaavat semanttisia yhtäläisyyksiä suhteellisen pieniulotteisessa tilassa. Useimmat nykyiset lähestymistavat kärsivät kuitenkin yksikielisestä harhasta, ja niiden vahvuus riippuu eri kielillä saatavilla olevan tiedon määrästä. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme tätä kysymystä ja ehdotamme Conception, uutta tekniikkaa, jolla rakennetaan kielestä riippumattomia vektoriesityksiä käsitteistä, jotka asettavat monikielisyyden ytimeen säilyttäen selkeät suhteet käsitteiden välillä. Lähestymistapamme tuottaa kattavia esityksiä, jotka ylittävät huipputason monikielisessä ja monikielisessä Semanttisessa sanasamankaltaisuudessa ja WordSense Disambiguaatiossa, mikä osoittautuu erityisen vahvaksi vähäresurssisilla kielillä. Conception - sen ohjelmisto ja koko joukko esityksiä - on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'et': 'Tänaseks on kõige edukamad sõna-, sõna- ja kontseptsioonide modelleerimise tehnikad kasutanud suuri korpuseid ja teadmusressursse tihedate vektorikujutiste loomiseks, mis kajastavad semantilisi sarnasusi suhteliselt madala mõõtmega ruumis. Enamik praeguseid lähenemisviise kannatab siiski ühekeelse eelarvamuse all, mille tugevus sõltub keelte vahel kättesaadavate andmete hulgast. Käesolevas töös käsitleme seda probleemi ja pakume välja kontseptsiooni, uudse tehnika keelesõltumatute vektorikujutuste loomiseks kontseptsioonidest, mis asetab mitmekeelsuse keskmesse, säilitades samas selgesõnalised seosed kontseptsioonide vahel. Meie lähenemisviisi tulemuseks on kõrge katvusega esitused, mis ületavad tehnikat mitmekeelses ja keeleüleses semantilises sõnasarnases ja sõnaseire disambiguatsioonis, osutudes eriti tugevaks vähese ressursiga keeltes. Kontseptsioon - selle tarkvara ja kogu esituste komplekt - on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'hy': 'Այսօր ամենահաջողակ բառը, բառի զգացողությունը և գաղափարների մոդելման տեխնիկաները օգտագործել են մեծ կառուցվածքներ և գիտելիքների ռեսուրսներ խիտ վեկտորների ներկայացումների ստեղծելու համար, որոնք գրանցում են սեմանտիկ նմանությունները համեմատաբար Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս մոտեցումների մեծամասնությունը տառապում է միալեզվային կողմնականությունից, որի ուժը կախված է լեզուների միջև հասանելի տվյալների քանակից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք այս խնդիրը և առաջարկում ենք Կենցեպցիա, նոր տեխնիկա լեզվի անկախ վեկտորների պատկերացումների կառուցման համար, որը բազմալեզվությունը դրում է իր հիմքում, մինչդեռ պահպանում է բացատրիկ հարաբերությունները գաղափա Մեր մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է բարձր ծավալի ներկայացումներին, որոնք գերազանցում են արվեստի կարգավիճակը բազլեզվով և փոխլեզվով սեմանտիկ բառերի նմանությունը և բառերի զգացմունքի բացահայտումը, ապացուցելով հատկապես ուժեղ ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուներում Կոնցեպցիան, դրա ծրագրավորումը և ամբողջ ներկայացումների համակարգը, հասանելի են https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'ha': "Ga yanzu, mafaniyar maganar, ma'anar maganar da misãlai sun yi amfani da zane-zane masu haske da ma'anar ilmi dõmin ya zaɓe masu motsi masu tsawo na tsakanin sakan da ke sami cikin wani fili masu ƙaranci. Babu mafi yawan hanyõyin da ake kai yanzu, ko da yaushe, za'a zartar da abincin da ke cikin harshen. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya masu wannan masu al'amarin kuma Munã buɗa ceceception, wani technci na nowaya dõmin a ƙiƙira masu shiryarwa da huru'a harshen-na-harshen, wanda ke halatta masu mulki-abubuwa a ƙarƙashin da ke tsare danganta bayyananne tsakanin zato. Mataimakinmu ta ƙara ga masu tsari da ke samar da halin sanar cikin harshen mulki'abũta da ke tsakanin-harshe na Semantic Hadalla Tsaraki da Size, kuma yana jarraba shi da haske a kan harshen-manyan-resource. Kwamfyuta - kafin kwamfyuta da cikakken daidaita shiryoyin ayuka - za'a iya iya amfani da https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.", 'jv': 'Sayensi, nggambar uwong, gambar nggambar, gambar nggambar, lan teknik modeleling nggambar sistem wis nggawe barang basang gambar nggambar kuwi tindakan vector nggawe nguasai sematik dhéwé winih lané, lan akeh dhéwé. Awak dhéwé, nggonangé kapan langkung sampek, dadi kapan langkung pawaran karo perusahaan langkung. In this paper we Address this question and proposal Ndoleh dhéwé kuwi wis nggawe barang-akèh liyané karo akeh pisan neng akeh Artis sing bisa bantuan karo akeh langgambar lan kelangan semanti Word Similrity karo Word Sense disabled mbiguation, iso nggawe barang-akeh akeh langa dhéwé. Tulung - software sing komplit nganggo repréentasi sing gak - iso dianggo online https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'sk': 'Do danes so najuspešnejše tehnike besednega, besednega smisla in konceptnega modeliranja uporabljale velike korpuse in vire znanja za ustvarjanje gostih vektorskih reprezentacij, ki zajemajo semantične podobnosti v relativno nizkodimenzionalnem prostoru. Vendar večina sedanjih pristopov trpi zaradi enojezične pristranskosti, njihova moč pa je odvisna od količine podatkov, ki so na voljo v vseh jezikih. V prispevku obravnavamo to vprašanje in predlagamo Conception, novo tehniko za gradnjo jezikovno neodvisnih vektorskih predstavitev konceptov, ki v jedro postavlja večjezičnost, hkrati pa ohranja eksplicitne odnose med koncepti. Rezultat našega pristopa je visoko pokritost predstavitev, ki presegajo najsodobnejše pri večjezičnih in medjezičnih semantičnih podobnostih besed in razjasnitvi besednega smisla, kar je še posebej robustno pri jezikih z nizkimi viri. Koncept - njena programska oprema in celoten nabor predstavitev - je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་འབོར་ཡིན་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་། ཆ་ཚིག་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་མང་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་སྔར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་གཅིག་སྐད་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་ལས་གནོད་པའི་ངོ་བོ་ཡིན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་འདིའི་མཐུན་སྣང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་ནང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་མངོན་གསལ་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད། མཉེན་ཆས་དང་མཉེན་ཆས་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཡི་་གནས་ཚུལ་འདུག https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.', 'he': 'עד כה, המילה המצליחה ביותר, תחושת המילים, וטכניקות מודל מושג השתמשו בקופורה גדולה ומאברי ידע כדי לייצר מייצגים וקטורים צפופים שמתפסיקים דומות סמנטיות בחלל מממדי נמוך יחסית. בכל אופן, רוב הגישויים הנוכחים סובלים ממחיות מונושפתית, עם כוחו תלוי בכמות הנתונים הנוכחים ברחבי שפות. In this paper we address this issue and propose Conception, a novel technique for building language-independent vector representations of concepts which places multilinguality at its core while retaining explicit relationships between concepts.  Our approach results in high-coverage representations that outperform the state of the art in multilingual and cross-lingual Semantic Word Similarity and Word Sense Disambiguation, proving particularly robust on low-resource languages.  הקונצרציה - התוכנה שלה והקבוצה המושלמת של מייצגים - זמינה ב https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/conception.'}
{'en': 'Sentence Matching with Syntax- and Semantics-Aware BERT', 'ar': 'مطابقة الجمل مع بناء الجملة - والدلالات - إدراك BERT', 'pt': 'Correspondência de sentenças com BERT sensível à sintaxe e à semântica', 'es': 'Coincidencia de oraciones con BERT consciente de la sintaxis y la semántica', 'fr': 'Correspondance de phrases avec BERT sensible à la syntaxe et à la sémantique', 'ja': '構文とセマンティクスとの文の一致-意識BERT', 'zh': '句与语法和语义感知 BERT 匹', 'ru': 'Согласование предложения с синтаксическим и семантическим BERT', 'hi': 'वाक्य वाक्यविन्यास के साथ मिलान- और शब्दार्थ-जागरूक BERT', 'ga': 'Pianbhreith ag Meaitseáil le Comhréir agus Séimeantaic-Aware BERT', 'ka': 'სინტაქსი- და Semantics- Aware BERT', 'hu': 'A szintaxis- és szemantikai tudatossággal összhangban lévő mondat', 'el': 'Ταίριασμα φράσεων με το BERT που γνωρίζει τη σύνταξη και τη Σημασία', 'kk': 'Синтаксис және Semantics- Aware BERT- мен сәйкес сөз', 'it': 'Corrispondenza della frase con BERT consapevole della sintassi e della semantica', 'mk': 'Судбите се совпаѓаат со синтаксичното и семантичното свесно BERT', 'lt': 'Nuorodų atitikimas sintaksų ir Semantikų sąmoningumui BERT', 'ms': 'Huraian Berpadan dengan BERT Semantik- dan Sintaks- Awas', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ്- സെമാന്റിക്സ്- അറിയുന്ന ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയോടൊപ്പം പൊരുതുന്ന വിധി', 'mn': 'Синтаксис, Semantics-Aware BERT', 'mt': 'Tqabbil tas-Sentenzi ma’ BERT ta’ Sintassi u Semantiċi', 'no': 'Uttrykk som passar med Syntaks- og Semantics- Aware BERT', 'pl': 'Dopasowanie zdań z BERT świadomym składni i semantyki', 'sr': 'Pravila odgovara sintaksu i semantika-Aware BERT', 'ro': 'Potrivirea sentințelor cu BERT conștient de sintaxă și semantică', 'si': 'වාක්ය සහ සෙමැන්ටික්ස්- අවස්ථාව BERT සමග සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය', 'sv': 'Sentensmatchning med syntax- och semantisk-medveten BERT', 'ur': 'Syntax- and Semantics- Aware BERT', 'ta': 'வாக்குறிப்பு ஒத்திசைவு- மற்றும் செமான்டிக்ஸ் தெரியும் BERT உடன் பொருந்தும்', 'so': 'Xukunka ku habboon cashuurta- iyo Semantics-aware BERT', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết nối câu án với Syntax- and Semantics-Nhận BERT', 'bg': 'Съответствие на изречението с BERT, осъзнаващ синтаксиса и семантиката', 'nl': 'Sentence Matching met syntax- en semantica-aware BERT', 'da': 'Sætninger, der matcher syntaks- og semantisk-bevidst BERT', 'hr': 'Pravila odgovara sintaksijom i semanticima-Aware BERT', 'de': 'Satz-Matching mit syntax- und semantisch-bewusstem BERT', 'ko': '문법과 의미 감지의 문장이 일치하다', 'id': 'Sentence Matching with Syntax- and Semantics-Aware BERT', 'fa': 'ویژه\u200cای که با سینتکس- و سیمانتیک- آگاهی BERT', 'sw': 'Hukumu inayofanana na kodi- na Semantic-aware BERT', 'tr': 'Sözler Syntaks- ve Semantics-Aware BERT ile eşleşir', 'sq': 'Dënimi që përputhet me BERT Sintaks- dhe Semantik- Aware', 'af': 'Soektog ooreenstemmende met Syntax- en Semantics- Aware BERT', 'am': 'Syntax-and Semantics-aware BERT', 'hy': 'Արտահայտությունը համապատասխանում է Սինտաքսի և Սեմանտիկայի գիտակցությանը BER', 'az': 'Sintaks-v…ô Semantik-Aware BERT il…ô uyƒüun s√∂zl…ôr', 'bn': 'সিন্যাক্স- এবং সেম্যান্টিক- সচেতন BERT-এর সাথে শাস্তি মিল', 'bs': 'Pravila odgovara sintaksima i semantika-Aware BERT', 'ca': 'Sentences Matching with Syntax- and Semantics-Aware BERT', 'cs': 'Porovnání vět se syntaxí a sémantikou BERT', 'et': 'Lause sobitamine süntaksist ja semantikast teadliku BERT-iga', 'fi': 'Lause täsmää syntaksi- ja semantiikkatietoisen BERT:n kanssa', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'Ujemanje stavkov s sintakso in semantiko ozaveščenim BERT', 'bo': 'Sentence Matching with Syntax- and Semantics-Aware BERT', 'he': 'משפט מתאים לסינטקס וסמנטיקס-מודע BERT'}
{'en': 'Sentence matching aims to identify the special relationship between two sentences, and plays a key role in many natural language processing tasks. However, previous studies mainly focused on exploiting either syntactic or semantic information for sentence matching, and no studies consider integrating both of them. In this study, we propose integrating syntax and semantics into BERT with sentence matching. In particular, we use an implicit syntax and semantics integration method that is less sensitive to the output structure information. Thus the implicit integration can alleviate the error propagation problem. The experimental results show that our approach has achieved state-of-the-art or competitive performance on several sentence matching datasets, demonstrating the benefits of implicitly integrating syntactic and semantic features in sentence matching.', 'ar': 'تهدف مطابقة الجمل إلى تحديد العلاقة الخاصة بين جملتين ، وتلعب دورًا رئيسيًا في العديد من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، ركزت الدراسات السابقة بشكل أساسي على استغلال المعلومات النحوية أو الدلالية لمطابقة الجمل ، ولا تفكر أي دراسات في دمج كل منهما. في هذه الدراسة ، نقترح دمج بناء الجملة والدلالات في BERT مع مطابقة الجمل. على وجه الخصوص ، نستخدم طريقة تكامل بناء الجملة والدلالات الضمنية الأقل حساسية لمعلومات بنية الإخراج. وبالتالي يمكن للتكامل الضمني أن يخفف من مشكلة انتشار الخطأ. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا قد حقق أداءً متطورًا أو تنافسيًا على عدة مجموعات بيانات مطابقة للجمل ، مما يدل على فوائد الدمج الضمني للميزات النحوية والدلالية في مطابقة الجمل.', 'fr': "L'appariement des phrases vise à identifier la relation spéciale entre deux phrases et joue un rôle clé dans de nombreuses tâches de traitement du langage naturel. Cependant, les études précédentes se concentraient principalement sur l'exploitation des informations syntaxiques ou sémantiques pour l'appariement des phrases, et aucune étude n'envisageait d'intégrer les deux. Dans cette étude, nous proposons d'intégrer la syntaxe et la sémantique dans BERT avec correspondance de phrases. En particulier, nous utilisons une méthode d'intégration syntaxique et sémantique implicite qui est moins sensible aux informations de structure de sortie. Ainsi, l'intégration implicite peut atténuer le problème de propagation des erreurs. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche a atteint des performances de pointe ou concurrentielles sur plusieurs ensembles de données de correspondance de phrases, démontrant les avantages de l'intégration implicite de caractéristiques syntaxiques et sémantiques dans la correspondance de phrases.", 'es': 'La correspondencia de oraciones tiene como objetivo identificar la relación especial entre dos oraciones y desempeña un papel clave en muchas tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, los estudios anteriores se centraron principalmente en explotar la información sintáctica o semántica para la correspondencia de oraciones, y ningún estudio considera integrar ambas. En este estudio, proponemos integrar la sintaxis y la semántica en BERT con la coincidencia de oraciones. En particular, utilizamos un método de integración de sintaxis y semántica implícito que es menos sensible a la información de la estructura de salida. Por lo tanto, la integración implícita puede aliviar el problema de propagación de errores. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque ha logrado un rendimiento competitivo o de vanguardia en varios conjuntos de datos de coincidencia de frases, lo que demuestra los beneficios de integrar implícitamente características sintácticas y semánticas en la coincidencia de oraciones.', 'pt': 'A correspondência de sentenças visa identificar a relação especial entre duas sentenças e desempenha um papel fundamental em muitas tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural. No entanto, estudos anteriores se concentraram principalmente na exploração de informações sintáticas ou semânticas para correspondência de frases, e nenhum estudo considera a integração de ambas. Neste estudo, propomos integrar sintaxe e semântica no BERT com correspondência de sentenças. Em particular, usamos um método implícito de integração de sintaxe e semântica que é menos sensível às informações da estrutura de saída. Assim, a integração implícita pode aliviar o problema de propagação de erros. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem alcançou desempenho competitivo ou de última geração em vários conjuntos de dados de correspondência de sentenças, demonstrando os benefícios de integrar implicitamente recursos sintáticos e semânticos na correspondência de sentenças.', 'ja': '文章マッチングは、2つの文章間の特別な関係を特定することを目的としており、多くの自然言語処理タスクで重要な役割を果たしています。しかし、これまでの研究では、主に句のマッチングのために構文情報と意味情報のどちらかを活用することに焦点を当てており、両方を統合することを検討する研究はなかった。この研究では、構文と意味論を文のマッチングでBERTに統合することを提案しています。特に、出力構造情報に対する感度が低い暗黙の構文とセマンティクスの統合メソッドを使用します。したがって、暗黙的積分は、誤差伝播問題を緩和することができる。実験結果は、私たちのアプローチがいくつかの文マッチングデータセットで最先端または競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しており、文マッチングに構文的および意味的特徴を暗黙のうちに統合する利点を示しています。', 'zh': '句配两句殊,并于诸自然语言中起关键作用。 然前之治要在句法、语义息为句,且不研虑而合之也。 于是议集语法、语义于句BERT。 特用对输出结构信息不太敏感的隐式语法和语义集成法。 故隐式集成以纾非传。 实验结果表明,吾法于数集上得最先进及竞争力之性,证句配隐式集成句法语义之善也。', 'hi': 'वाक्य मिलान का उद्देश्य दो वाक्यों के बीच विशेष संबंध की पहचान करना है, और कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। हालांकि, पिछले अध्ययनों ने मुख्य रूप से वाक्य मिलान के लिए वाक्यात्मक या शब्दार्थ जानकारी का शोषण करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया, और कोई भी अध्ययन उन दोनों को एकीकृत करने पर विचार नहीं करता है। इस अध्ययन में, हम वाक्य मिलान के साथ BERT में वाक्यविन्यास और शब्दार्थ को एकीकृत करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एक अंतर्निहित वाक्यविन्यास और शब्दार्थ एकीकरण विधि का उपयोग करते हैं जो आउटपुट संरचना जानकारी के प्रति कम संवेदनशील है। इस प्रकार अंतर्निहित एकीकरण त्रुटि प्रोपेगेशन समस्या को कम कर सकता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे दृष्टिकोण ने कई वाक्य मिलान डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक या प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है, जो वाक्य मिलान में वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं को स्पष्ट रूप से एकीकृत करने के लाभों का प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Сопоставление предложений направлено на выявление особой взаимосвязи между двумя предложениями и играет ключевую роль во многих задачах обработки естественного языка. Однако предыдущие исследования в основном были сосредоточены на использовании либо синтаксической, либо семантической информации для сопоставления предложений, и ни одно из исследований не рассматривало возможность их интеграции. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем интегрировать синтаксис и семантику в BERT с подбором предложений. В частности, мы используем неявный метод интеграции синтаксиса и семантики, который менее чувствителен к информации о выходной структуре. Таким образом, неявная интеграция может облегчить проблему распространения ошибок. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход достиг самой современной или конкурентоспособной производительности на нескольких наборах данных, соответствующих предложению, демонстрируя преимущества неявной интеграции синтаксических и семантических особенностей в соответствии с предложением.', 'ga': "Tá sé mar aidhm ag meaitseáil abairtí an gaol speisialta idir dhá abairt a aithint, agus tá ról lárnach aige i go leor tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Dhírigh staidéir roimhe seo go príomha ar leas a bhaint as faisnéis chomhréire nó shéimeantach le haghaidh comhoiriúnú abairtí, agus ní mheasann aon staidéar an dá cheann a chomhtháthú. Sa staidéar seo, molaimid comhréir agus séimeantaic a chomhtháthú isteach i CRET le comhoiriúnú abairtí. Go háirithe, bainimid úsáid as modh comhtháthú comhréire intuigthe agus séimeantaice nach bhfuil chomh íogair d'eolas an struchtúir aschuir. Mar sin is féidir leis an gcomhtháthú intuigthe an fhadhb iomadaithe earráide a mhaolú. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil feidhmíocht úrscothach nó iomaíoch bainte amach ag ár gcur chuige ar roinnt tacar sonraí comhoiriúnaithe abairtí, rud a léiríonn na buntáistí a bhaineann le gnéithe comhréire agus séimeantaice a chomhtháthú go hintuigthe i gcomhoiriúnú abairtí.", 'ka': 'სიტყვების შესაბამისი მიზეზია, რომ ორი სიტყვების შორის სპეციალური შესაბამისი განსაზღვრება და მრავალური ენერგიის პროცესის მრავალური პროლია. მაგრამ, წინა კვლევები ძირითადად კონუქტირებულია სინტაქტიური ან სიმენტიური ინფორმაციის გამოყენებაზე, და არაფერი კვლევები უნდა იყოს ორივე ინტეგრაციას. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ გვეუნდა სინტექსტი და სენმანტიკის ინტერგურაცია BERT-ში, რომელიც სინტექსტის კონფიგურაცია. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ინტელექტიური სინტექსტი და სენმანტიკური ინტერგურაციის მეტი, რომელიც გამოყენება სტრუქტურის ინფორმაციაზე უფრო ამიტომ იმპლიციტიური ინტეგრაცია შეუძლია შეცდომის პროგრაციის პრობლემას გახსნა. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი პროგენტის შესაძლებლობა გავაკეთეთ სინტექტიკური და სიმენტიკური ფუნქციების შესაძლებლობაში, რამდენიმე წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობაში, რომლებიც შესაძლებლობად მო', 'el': 'Η αντιστοίχιση προτάσεων στοχεύει στον προσδιορισμό της ειδικής σχέσης μεταξύ δύο προτάσεων και παίζει βασικό ρόλο σε πολλές εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, προηγούμενες μελέτες επικεντρώθηκαν κυρίως στην αξιοποίηση είτε συντακτικών είτε σημασιολογικών πληροφοριών για την αντιστοίχιση προτάσεων, και καμία μελέτη δεν εξετάζει την ενσωμάτωση και των δύο. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, προτείνουμε την ενσωμάτωση της σύνταξης και της σημασιολογίας στο BERT με αντιστοίχιση προτάσεων. Ειδικότερα, χρησιμοποιούμε μια σιωπηρή μέθοδο σύνταξης και σημασιολογικής ενσωμάτωσης που είναι λιγότερο ευαίσθητη στις πληροφορίες δομής εξόδου. Έτσι η σιωπηρή ενσωμάτωση μπορεί να ανακουφίσει το πρόβλημα διάδοσης σφαλμάτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας έχει επιτύχει υπερσύγχρονη ή ανταγωνιστική απόδοση σε πολλά σύνολα δεδομένων αντιστοίχισης προτάσεων, καταδεικνύοντας τα οφέλη της έμμεσης ενσωμάτωσης συντακτικών και σημασιολογικών χαρακτηριστικών στην αντιστοίχιση προτάσεων.', 'hu': 'A mondatmegosztás célja a két mondat különleges kapcsolatának azonosítása, és kulcsszerepet játszik számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatban. A korábbi tanulmányok azonban elsősorban a szintaktikai vagy szemantikai információk kihasználására összpontosítottak, és egyetlen tanulmány sem fontolja meg mindkettő integrálását. Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy a szintaxist és a szemantikát integráljuk a BERT-be mondatmegfeleléssel. Különösen olyan implicit szintaxist és szemantikai integrációs módszert használunk, amely kevésbé érzékeny a kimeneti struktúra információira. Így az implicit integráció enyhítheti a hibaterjedési problémát. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk több mondatmegfelelős adatkészleten is korszerű vagy versenyképes teljesítményt ért el, bizonyítva a szintaktikai és szemantikai jellemzők implicit integrálásának előnyeit a mondatmegfelelésben.', 'it': "La corrispondenza delle frasi mira a identificare la relazione speciale tra due frasi e svolge un ruolo chiave in molte attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, studi precedenti si sono concentrati principalmente sullo sfruttamento di informazioni sintattiche o semantiche per la corrispondenza delle frasi, e nessuno studio considera l'integrazione di entrambi. In questo studio, proponiamo di integrare sintassi e semantica in BERT con la corrispondenza delle frasi. In particolare, utilizziamo un metodo implicito di sintassi e integrazione semantica che è meno sensibile alle informazioni della struttura di output. Così l'integrazione implicita può alleviare il problema di propagazione degli errori. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro approccio ha raggiunto prestazioni all'avanguardia o competitive su diversi set di dati di corrispondenza delle frasi, dimostrando i vantaggi di integrare implicitamente caratteristiche sintattiche e semantiche nel matching delle frasi.", 'lt': 'Sprendimų derinimo tikslas – nustatyti ypatingą dviejų sakinių santykį ir atlikti pagrindinį vaidmenį daugelyje gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduočių. Tačiau ankstesniuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama sintaktinei arba semantinei informacijai, skirtai derinti sakinius, ir jokiuose tyrimuose nebuvo svarstoma, ar juos abu būtų įtraukti. Šiame tyrime siūlome sintaksą ir semantiką integruoti į BERT ir derinti sakinius. Visų pirma naudojame implicit ų sintakso ir semantikos integracijos metodą, kuris yra mažiau jautrus išėjimo struktūros informacijai. Taigi netiesioginė integracija gali palengvinti klaidų plitimo problem ą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris pasiekė naujausius arba konkurencinius rezultatus keliuose sakiniuose atitinkančiuose duomenų rinkiniuose, įrodančius naudą implicitiškai integruojant sintaktines ir semantines savybes į sakinių derinimą.', 'kk': 'Сөздер сәйкес келетін мақсаттары екі сөздер арасындағы арнаулы қатынасын анықтау және көптеген тәуелсіздік тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларындағы кілт рөлін ойнату. Бірақ, алдыңғы зерттеулері синтактикалық немесе семантикалық мәліметті сәйкестіру үшін қолдануға көмектеседі, және зерттеулері екеуін біріктіруге болмайды. Бұл зерттеулерде синтаксис мен семантикалық синтаксисін BERT-ге сәйкес келетін сөздерді біріктіру керек. Мысалы, біз шығыс құрылғы мәліметіне бұл синтаксис мен семантикалық интеграциялау әдісін қолданамыз. Бұл үшін мәліметтің интеграциясы қате пропагациясының мәселесін көмектесе алады. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер біздің тәжірибеміздің бірнеше мәліметтерге сәйкес келетін деректер жиындарында, синтактикалық және семантикалық қасиеттерді сәйкестіктерге сәйкес келетінін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Собирањето на речениците има за цел идентификување на специјалниот однос помеѓу двете реченици и игра клучна улога во многу природни задачи за обработување јазици. Сепак, претходните студии се фокусираа главно на искористувањето или синтактички или семантички информации за споредување на речениците, а ниту една студија не разгледува да ги интегрира двете. Во оваа студија, предлагаме интеграција на синтаксата и семантиката во БЕРТ со совпаѓање на речениците. Посебно, користиме имплицитен синтаксис и семантички метод на интеграција кој е помалку чувствителен на информациите за структурата на излезот. Така имплицитната интеграција може да го олесни проблемот со проширувањето на грешките. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап постигна најдобра или конкурентна резултата на неколку реченици кои се совпаѓаат со податоци, демонстрирајќи ги бенефициите од имплицитно интеграција на синтактичките и семантичните карактеристики во совпаѓањето на речениц', 'ml': 'രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള പ്രത്യേക ബന്ധം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d വിധിക്കുന്ന ശിക്ഷയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലാണ്. പലതും സ്വാഭാവ എന്നാലും മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പൊരുതുന്നതിനായി സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്കോ സെമാന്റിക്കോ വിവരങ In this study, we propose integrating syntax and semantics into BERT with sentence matching.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിനിക്സ്റ്റാക്സും സെമാന്റിക്സും ഒരുമിച്ച രീതിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് പുറപ്പെട അതുകൊണ്ട് പിശക് പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു വാക്കുകളില്\u200d പൊരുതുന്ന പല വ', 'ms': 'Perpadanan hukuman bermaksud untuk mengenalpasti hubungan istimewa antara dua kalimat, dan bermain peran utama dalam banyak tugas pemprosesan bahasa alami. Namun, kajian terdahulu terutama fokus pada mengeksploitasi sama ada maklumat sintaktik atau semantik untuk persamaan kalimat, dan tiada kajian mempertimbangkan integrasi keduanya. Dalam kajian ini, kami cadangkan mengintegrasikan sintaks dan semantik ke BERT dengan persamaan kalimat. Secara khususnya, kita menggunakan kaedah sintaks dan integrasi semantik yang kurang sensitif kepada maklumat struktur output. Thus the implicit integration can alleviate the error propagation problem.  The experimental results show that our approach has achieved state-of-the-art or competitive performance on several sentence matching datasets, demonstrating the benefits of implicitly integrating syntactic and semantic features in sentence matching.', 'mt': 'It-tqabbil tas-sentenzi għandu l-għan li jidentifika r-relazzjoni speċjali bejn żewġ sentenzi, u għandu rwol ewlieni f’ħafna kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Madankollu, studji preċedenti ffukaw prinċipalment fuq l-isfruttar ta’ informazzjoni sintattika jew semantika għat-tqabbil tas-sentenzi, u l-ebda studju ma jikkunsidra li jintegraw it-tnejn. F’dan l-istudju, qed nipproponu li s-sintaks u s-semantika jiġu integrati fil-BERT b’paragun tas-sentenzi. B’mod partikolari, aħna nużaw metodu impliċitu ta’ integrazzjoni ta’ sintaks u semantika li huwa inqas sensittiv għall-informazzjoni dwar l-istruttura tal-output. Għalhekk l-integrazzjoni impliċita tista’ ttaffi l-problema tal-propagazzjoni tal-iżbalji. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna kiseb prestazzjoni avvanzata jew kompetittiva fuq diversi settijiet tad-dejta li jaqblu mas-sentenzi, li juru l-benefiċċji tal-integrazzjoni impliċita tal-karatteristiċi sintattiċi u semantiċi fit-tqabbil tas-sentenzi.', 'mn': 'Хоёр өгүүлбэрийн хоорондын онцгой харилцаа тодорхойлох зорилго нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагаанд хамгийн чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Гэхдээ өмнөх судалгаанууд ихэвчлэн синтактик, эсвэл семантик мэдээллийг хэрэглэх тулд анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулагдсан бөгөөд тэднийг хоёуланг нэгтгэх судалгаагүй. Энэ судалгаанд бид синтаксис болон semantics-г BERT-д өгүүлбэртэй нэгтгэх санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид гаргасан бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээлэл дээр бага чухал синтаксис болон семантик нэгтгэлийн арга ашигладаг. Иймээс буруу нэгтгэл нь алдаа хөгжүүлэх асуудлыг багасгаж чадна. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга хэмжээний өгөгдлийн санд холбогдох хэдэн өгүүлбэрүүдийн байр суурь болон өрсөлдөөнтэй үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, синтактик болон семантик хэмжээнд холбогдох ашиг үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Søkeområdet er mål å identifisera spesielle forholdet mellom to setningar, og spelar ein nøkkelrolle i mange naturlege språkshandsamar oppgåver. Førre studiar er imidlertid fokuserte hovudsakelig på å bruka enten syntaksisk eller semantisk informasjon for setningar, og ingen studiar ser på å integrere begge dei. I denne studien foreslår vi å integrere syntaks og semantikk i BERT med setningar. I særskilt bruker vi ein implisitt syntaks og semantisk integreringsmetode som er mindre sensitiv til utdatastruktureinformasjonen. Den implisitte integrasjonen kan gjere feilpropagasjonsproblem. Den eksperimentelle resultatene viser at tilnærminga vårt har oppnådd tilstanden av kunsten eller konkurentær utvikling på fleire setningar som passar med datasett, som viser fordelene av implisitt integrering av syntaktiske og semantiske funksjonar i setningsteikna.', 'pl': 'Dopasowanie zdań ma na celu zidentyfikowanie szczególnej relacji między dwoma zdaniami i odgrywa kluczową rolę w wielu zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Jednak poprzednie badania koncentrowały się głównie na wykorzystaniu informacji składniczych lub semantycznych do dopasowywania zdań, i żadne badania nie rozważają integracji obu z nich. W niniejszym opracowaniu proponujemy integrację składni i semantyki w BERT z dopasowaniem zdań. W szczególności stosujemy ukrytą składnię i metodę integracji semantycznej, która jest mniej wrażliwa na informacje o strukturze wyjściowej. W ten sposób ukryta integracja może złagodzić problem propagacji błędów. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście osiągnęło najnowocześniejszą lub konkurencyjną wydajność na kilku zbiorach danych dopasowywania zdań, demonstrując korzyści płynące z domyślnej integracji cech składni i semantycznych w dopasowywaniu zdań.', 'sr': 'Odgovaranje rečenica je cilj identifikacije posebne veze između dve rečenice i igra ključnu ulogu u mnogim prirodnim zadacima obrade jezika. Međutim, prethodne studije su se uglavnom fokusirale na iskorištavanje sintaktičnih ili semantičnih informacija o odgovaranju rečenica, i nijedna studija ne smatra integracijom oboje. U ovoj studiji predlažemo integraciju sintaksa i semantika u BERT sa odgovarajućim rečenicama. Posebno, koristimo implicitnu sintaksu i semantičku metodu integracije koja je manje osetljiva na informacije o strukturi izlaza. Zato implicitna integracija može smanjiti problem propagacije grešaka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš pristup postigao stanje umjetnosti ili konkurentne funkcije na nekoliko rečenica odgovarajućih podacima, pokazujući koristi implicitno integrisanja sintaktičnih i semantičnih karakteristika u odgovarajućoj rečenici.', 'ro': 'Potrivirea sentințelor își propune să identifice relația specială dintre două propoziții și joacă un rol cheie în multe sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, studiile anterioare s-au concentrat în principal pe exploatarea informațiilor sintactice sau semantice pentru potrivirea frazelor și niciun studiu nu ia în considerare integrarea ambelor. În acest studiu, propunem integrarea sintaxei și semanticii în BERT cu potrivirea frazelor. În special, folosim o metodă implicită de sinteză și integrare semantică care este mai puțin sensibilă la informațiile structurii de ieșire. Astfel, integrarea implicită poate atenua problema propagarii erorilor. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră a obținut performanțe de ultimă oră sau competitive pe mai multe seturi de date de potrivire a frazelor, demonstrând beneficiile integrării implicite a caracteristicilor sintactice și semantice în potrivirea frazelor.', 'si': 'වචනය සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඉලක්කම් විශේෂ සම්බන්ධය දෙකක් අතර පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කර නමුත්, කලින් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වාක්ය සඳහා සැමැන්තික තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට,  මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි වාක්ෂාව සහ සෙමැන්ටික්ස් එක්ක BERT වලට සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන්. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සහ සෙමැන්ටික් සංවේශනය විධානයක් භාවිත කරන්නේ, ඒක ප්\u200dරවේශනය සංවේශනය සඳ ඉතින් සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැරදි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරල', 'so': "Heeganka xukunku wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu aqoonsado xiriirka gaarka ah ee u dhexeeya labo hadal, wuxuuna ku ciyaariyaa qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka baaraandegista afka kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashooyinkii hore waxay ugu horeyn ku hagaajiyeen inaad isticmaasho macluumaad la xiriira qoraalka, waxbarashadana ma fiirsanayn in la qabsashada labadooda. In this study, we propose integrating syntax and semantics into BERT with sentence matching.  Si gaar ah, waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaab la-qabsashada iyo hab-galka ah, taasoo macluumaad ka fudud macluumaadka dhismaha dibadda. Sidaas darteed la qabsashada waxyaabaha la’aanta ah waxay u fududeyn karaan dhibaatada ogeysiinta qaladka. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaababkayagu ay guulaysteen xaaladda farshaxanta ama iskutallaabta ku saabsan garsoorida kala duduwan, waxayna muujiyaan faa'iidada ku saabsan isku qabsashada iskumarista iyo waxyaabaha isbedelka ah ee xabsiga u eg.", 'sv': 'Meningsmatning syftar till att identifiera det speciella förhållandet mellan två meningar, och spelar en nyckelroll i många naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter. Tidigare studier fokuserade dock främst på att utnyttja antingen syntaktisk eller semantisk information för meningsmatchning, och inga studier överväger att integrera båda. I denna studie föreslår vi att syntax och semantik integreras i BERT med meningsmatchning. I synnerhet använder vi en implicit syntax- och semantisk integrationsmetod som är mindre känslig för information om utmatningsstrukturen. Således kan den implicita integrationen lindra problemet med felspridning. De experimentella resultaten visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt har uppnått toppmoderna eller konkurrenskraftiga resultat på flera meningsmatchningsdatauppsättningar, vilket visar fördelarna med att implicit integrera syntaktiska och semantiska funktioner i meningsmatchning.', 'ur': 'مطابق مطابق مطابق کا ارتباط دو جماعتوں کے درمیان پہچان کرنا ہے اور بہت سی طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں میں ایک کلی رول لگا رہا ہے. لیکن اگلے مطالعہ ان دونوں کو سینٹکتیک یا سیمانٹیکی معلومات کے مطالعہ کے ذریعہ منتخب کیا گیا ہے، اور کوئی مطالعہ ان دونوں کو منتخب نہیں کرتا۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم سینٹکس اور سیمانٹیکس کو BERT میں متصل کرنے کے ساتھ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ مخصوصا، ہم ایک معلوم سینٹکس اور سیمانٹیکس انٹرینگ طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں جو آئوٹ ساختاری معلومات کے لئے کم حساس ہے. اسی طرح غلط جمع کرنا خطا پھیلانے کے مسئلہ کو آسان کر سکتا ہے۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ نے بہت سی جماعتیں جن کے متعلق ڈاٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ملنے والی جماعتیں یا آزمائش کے متعلق کامیابی کو پہنچ لیا ہے، جسے جماعت کے مطابق سینٹکتیک اور سیمانٹیکی فرصت میں تضابطہ کرنے کے فائدے', 'ta': 'வாக்குறிப்பு பொருத்தம் இரண்டு வாக்கியங்களுக்கிடையே சிறப்பு இணைப்பை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் பல இயற்கை மொழ ஆனால், முந்தைய ஆய்வு இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் பிரெட்டில் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் பெம்பென்டிக்கும் வாக்கியத்தை பொ குறிப்பிட்டு, அதனால் உள்ளார்ந்த ஒருங்கிணைப்பு பிழை பிரச்சனையை நீக்க முடியும். சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் என்றால் எங்கள் அணுகல் செயல்பாடு சில வாக்கியம் பொருந்தும் தரவு அமைப்புகளில் அல்லது போராட்டியிருக்கும் செயல்பாடு பெற்', 'uz': "Ikkita so'zlar orasidagi maxsus aloqalarni aniqlashga ega bo'ladi va ko'pchilik tilni boshqarish vazifalarda muhim oʻrnatish mumkin. Lekin oldingi o'qituvchilar, oddiy bir so'zlarni birlashtirish uchun syntactik yoki semantik maʼlumotini ishlatishga foydalanadi, va bu ikkita ta'limlarni birlashtirishni tasavvur qilmaydi. In this study, we propose integrating syntax and semantics into BERT with sentence matching.  Ko'rsatganda, biz tashkilotning tuzuvlari haqida juda qiziqarli narsa yordamida foydalanamiz. Shunday qilib, birlashtirish xatolik propaganda muammolarni yoyish mumkin. Tasavvur natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli bir so'zlar bilan bir so'zlar o'xshash ma'lumotlar tizimga amalga oshirilgan holatimiz yoki rivojlanish natijalarini ko'rsatadi. Bu gaplarga mos keladigan sintaktika va semantik imkoniyatlarini birlashtirishni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Câu án khớp với mục đích xác định mối quan hệ đặc biệt giữa hai câu, và đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong nhiều công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, các nghiên cứu trước chủ yếu nhằm khai thác thông tin cấu tạo từ pháp thuật hoặc ngữ pháp để kết hợp các câu, và không có nghiên cứu nào tính toán cả hai. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề nghị hợp pháp và ngữ pháp với BERT cùng câu khớp. Chúng tôi sử dụng một phương pháp hoà nhập kiểu syntax và semantics, mà ít nhạy cảm với các thông tin cấu trúc xuất. Do đó sự hòa hợp ngầm có thể giảm thiểu lỗi rải rác. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đã đạt được trình độ hiện đại hoặc cạnh tranh trên nhiều bộ dữ liệu khớp bản án, cho thấy lợi thế của việc tổng hợp trực tiếp các tính năng cú pháp và ngữ pháp trong ngữ pháp khớp.', 'bg': 'Съвпадението на изречения има за цел да идентифицира специалната връзка между две изречения и играе ключова роля в много задачи по обработка на естествения език. Въпреки това, предишни проучвания са фокусирани главно върху използването на синтактична или семантична информация за съвпадение на изреченията и нито едно проучване не разглежда интегрирането и на двете. В това изследване предлагаме интегриране на синтаксиса и семантиката в BERT със съвпадение на изреченията. По-специално, ние използваме имплицитен синтаксис и семантична интеграция метод, който е по-малко чувствителен към изходната структура информация. По този начин имплицитната интеграция може да облекчи проблема с разпространението на грешки. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход е постигнал най-съвременно или конкурентно представяне на няколко съвпадение на изречения, демонстрирайки ползите от имплицитното интегриране на синтактични и семантични характеристики в съвпадението на изречения.', 'da': 'Sætningsmatching har til formål at identificere det særlige forhold mellem to sætninger og spiller en nøglerolle i mange naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver. Tidligere undersøgelser fokuserede imidlertid hovedsageligt på at udnytte enten syntaktisk eller semantisk information til sætningsmatchning, og ingen undersøgelser overvejer at integrere dem begge. I dette studie foreslår vi at integrere syntaks og semantik i BERT med sætningsmatchning. Især bruger vi en implicit syntaks- og semantisk integrationsmetode, der er mindre følsom over for outputstrukturens oplysninger. Således kan den implicitte integration lindre fejlspredningsproblemet. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang har opnået state-of-the-art eller konkurrencedygtig ydeevne på flere sætningsmatchningsdatasæt, hvilket viser fordelene ved implicit at integrere syntaktiske og semantiske funktioner i sætningsmatchning.', 'hr': 'Odgovaranje kazne cilja je identificirati posebnu vezu između dvije rečenice i igrati ključnu ulogu u mnogim prirodnim zadacima obrade jezika. Međutim, prethodna ispitivanja su se uglavnom fokusirala na korištenje sintaktičkih ili semantičkih informacija o odgovaranju rečenica, a nijedna ispitivanja ne smatraju integriranjem oba. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo integraciju sintaksa i semantika u BERT s odgovarajućim rečenicama. Posebno koristimo implicitnu metodu sintakse i semantičke integracije koja je manje osjetljiva na informacije o strukturi izlaza. Zato implicitna integracija može smanjiti problem propagacije grešaka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš pristup postigao stanje umjetnosti ili konkurentne učinke na nekoliko rečenica odgovarajućih podacima, pokazujući koristi implicitno integriranja sintaktičnih i semantičnih karakteristika u odgovarajućoj rečenici.', 'nl': 'Sentence matching is bedoeld om de speciale relatie tussen twee zinnen te identificeren en speelt een sleutelrol in veel natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken. Eerdere studies richtten zich echter vooral op het benutten van syntactische of semantische informatie voor het matchen van zinnen, en geen studies overwegen beide te integreren. In deze studie stellen we voor om syntaxis en semantiek te integreren in BERT met zinsmatching. In het bijzonder gebruiken we een impliciete syntaxis en semantische integratiemethode die minder gevoelig is voor de outputstructuurinformatie. Zo kan de impliciete integratie het probleem van foutpropagatie verlichten. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak state-of-the-art of concurrerende prestaties heeft bereikt op verschillende zinnen matching datasets, wat de voordelen aantoont van impliciete integratie van syntactische en semantische kenmerken in zinnen matching.', 'fa': 'مسابقه\u200cای از جمله\u200cها هدف است که رابطه خاصی بین دو جمله شناسایی کند و نقش کلید را در بسیاری از کارهای پردازش زبان طبیعی بازی کند. با این حال، تحقیقات قبلی بیشتر روی استفاده از اطلاعات سنتاکتیک یا سیمانتیک برای هماهنگ کردن جمله تمرکز شده است و هیچ تحقیقاتی در نظر نمی\u200cگیرد که هر دو از آن جمع شوند. در این مطالعه، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که واژه\u200cسازی و سیمانتیک\u200cها را به BERT با جواب دادن جمله\u200cها تفریح کنیم. مخصوصاً ما از یک واژه\u200cسازی و واژه\u200cسازی سیمانتیک استفاده می\u200cکنیم که کمتر حساس به اطلاعات ساختار خروجی است. بنابراین ترکیب نامناسب می\u200cتواند مشکل گسترش خطا را کمتر کند. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که دستور ما به اجرای وضعیت هنری یا رقابتی در چندین جمله\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مسابقه رسیده است، و نشان می\u200cدهد سودهای ویژه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک و سنتاکتیک را در مسابقه\u200cی جمله\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'id': 'Sentence matching aims to identify the special relationship between two sentences, and plays a key role in many natural language processing tasks.  Namun, studi sebelumnya terutama fokus pada mengeksploitasi informasi sintaksi atau semantis untuk persamaan kalimat, dan tidak ada studi mempertimbangkan mengintegrasikan keduanya. Dalam studi ini, kami mengusulkan mengintegrasi sintaks dan semantik ke BERT dengan persamaan kalimat. Terutama, kita menggunakan sintaks implicit dan metode integrasi semantik yang kurang sensitif pada informasi struktur output. Jadi integrasi implicit dapat mengurangi masalah propagasi kesalahan. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita telah mencapai prestasi terbaik atau kompetitif pada beberapa kalimat yang cocok dataset, menunjukkan keuntungan dari mengintegrasi secara implicit fitur sintaksi dan semantis dalam persamaan kalimat.', 'de': 'Satzmatching zielt darauf ab, die besondere Beziehung zwischen zwei Sätzen zu identifizieren und spielt eine Schlüsselrolle in vielen natürlichen Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben. Bisherige Studien konzentrierten sich jedoch hauptsächlich auf die Ausnutzung syntaktischer oder semantischer Informationen für Satzabgleich, und keine Studien erwägen, beide zu integrieren. In dieser Studie schlagen wir vor, Syntax und Semantik mit Satzabgleich in BERT zu integrieren. Insbesondere verwenden wir eine implizite Syntax- und semantische Integrationsmethode, die weniger empfindlich auf die Output-Strukturinformationen ist. Somit kann die implizite Integration das Problem der Fehlerausbreitung lindern. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz State-of-the-Art oder wettbewerbsfähige Leistung auf mehreren Satz Matching Datensätzen erreicht hat, was die Vorteile der impliziten Integration syntaktischer und semantischer Merkmale in Satz Matching demonstriert.', 'sw': 'Hukumu inalenga kutambua uhusiano maalum kati ya hukumu mbili, na inacheza nafasi muhimu katika kazi nyingi za utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Hata hivyo, utafiti uliopita umejikita zaidi kwa kutumia habari za pamoja au sekunde za habari zinazofanana na hukumu hiyo, na hakuna utafiti unafikiria kuwaunganisha wote. Katika utafiti huu, tunapendekeza kuunganisha kodi na semantika kwenye BERT kwa hukumu inayofanana. Kwa hakika, tunatumia mbinu za ushirikiano na semantika ambazo hazina uelewa wa taarifa za ujenzi wa matokeo. Kwa hiyo ushirikiano usio na maana unaweza kupunguza tatizo la kutangaza kosa. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu imefanikiwa utendaji wa aina ya sanaa au ushindani katika seti kadhaa za seti zinazofanana na takwimu, zinaonyesha faida za kuunganisha vifaa vya ushirikiano na vipengele vya kimapenzi katika hukumu inayofanana.', 'ko': '문장의 일치성은 두 문장 간의 특수한 관계를 식별하는 데 목적을 두고 많은 자연 언어 처리 임무에서 중요한 역할을 한다.그러나 이전의 연구는 주로 문법이나 의미 정보를 이용하여 문장을 매칭하는 데 집중되었기 때문에 둘을 결합시키는 것을 고려하지 않았다.이 연구에서 우리는 문법과 의미를 BERT에 통합하고 문장의 일치를 제안했다.특히 우리는 은식 문법과 의미 집적 방법을 사용했는데 이 방법은 출력 구조 정보에 민감하지 않다.따라서 스텔스 포인트는 오차 전파 문제를 완화시킬 수 있다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 여러 문장 매칭 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적이거나 경쟁력 있는 성능을 얻었고 문장 매칭에서 은식 집적 문법과 의미 특징의 장점을 증명했다.', 'tr': "Eşleşen sözler üçin iki sözler arasyndaky häsiýet baglaýyşyny tanamak we tebigy diller işleýän zadlaryň köpüsi roli çalýar. Ýöne öňki araştyrmalar hem sintaktik ýa-da semantik maglumatlary sözlem üçin ulanmakda üns berildi, we hiç hili araştyrmalar ikisiniň de bir birlerini üýtgetmegini düşünmedi. Bu öwrenmede Sintaks we semantika BERT'a söz eşleşenler bilen üýtgetmegi teklip edýäris. Özellikde, çykyş strukturyň maglumaty üçin iň hassyz bir syntaksi we semantik integrasy yöntemi ulanýarys. Böylece implik integrasy hata ýazmagyň meseleni azaltyp biler. Deneymeli netijeler biziň metodamyzyň bir näçe sözlem ile eşleýän veri setirlerinde ýakyn syntaktik we semantik özellikler bilen üýtgetmegiňe mejburlaryny görkezip bolandygyny görkeýär.", 'af': "Soektog ooreenstemmende doel om die spesiale verhouding tussen twee setings te identifiseer en speel 'n sleutel rol in baie natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte. Maar voorree studie het hoef gefokus op die uitbreiding of sintaktika of semantiese inligting vir setinge ooreenstemmende, en geen studie besluit om beide hulle te integreer nie. In hierdie studie voorstel ons om sintaks en semantieke in BERT te integreer met setinge ooreenstemmende. Spesifieke gebruik ons 'n inplisite sintaks en semantieke integrasie metode wat minder sensitief is na die uitset struktuur informasie. Daarom kan die inplisite integrasie die fout propagasie probleem alleviaat. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons toegang het staat-of-kuns of mededingstekens uitvoeging op verskeie seting wat ooreenstemmende datastelle is, wat die voordele van inplisite sintaktika en semantiese funksies in sentence ooreenstemmende integreer het.", 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i dënimeve synon të identifikojë marrëdhëniet e posaçme midis dy dënimeve dhe luan një rol kyç në shumë detyra natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës. Megjithatë, studimet e mëparshme u përqëndruan kryesisht në shfrytëzimin ose të informacionit sintaktik apo semantik për përputhjen e fjalëve dhe asnjë studim nuk konsideron integrimin e të dyve. Në këtë studim, propozojmë integrimin e sintaksës dhe semantikës në BERT me përshtatjen e fjalëve. Në veçanti, ne përdorim një metodë sintakse implicite dhe integrimi semantik që është më pak e ndjeshme ndaj informacionit të strukturës së daljes. Kështu integrimi implicit mund të lehtësojë problemin e përhapjes së gabimeve. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë ka arritur shfaqjen më të lartë apo konkurruese në disa fjalë që përputhen me të dhënat, duke demonstruar përfitimet e integrimit implicit të karakteristikave sintaktike dhe semantike në përputhjen e fjalëve.', 'am': 'የሥርዓት ግንኙነት በሁለት ፍርድ መካከል የተለየውን ግንኙነት ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፣ በብዙ ፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋዎች በሚያሳየው ስራ ውስጥ መክፈቻን የሚታወቅ ትክክለኛ role ያደርጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው ትምህርት፣ የድምፅ ግንኙነት ወይም የsemantic መረጃን በመጠቀም ላይ ማሳየት እና ሁለቱንም ማሰናከል እንደማያስተውሉ፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የሲንካስብ እና ሴሜንቲክን ወደ BERT ለመቀላቀል እናሳስባታለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የውጤት አካባቢ መረጃዎችን ለማስታወቂያ የማይታወቅ የሲንካስክ እና የsemantics አንድ ማቀናጃ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ስለዚህም የስህተት አካባቢ ስህተት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ የፈተናው ውጤቶች የልግስናችን የዐርድ አካባቢ ወይም ተቃዋሚ የድረ ገጽ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': "İki cümlələr arasındakı xüsusi ilişkisini təsdiqləmək və təbiətli dil işləməsi işlərində çox növbənöv rol oynaymaq məqsədildir. Ancaq əvvəlki təhsil işləri sintaktik və ya semantik məlumatları cümlələrə uyuşmaq üçün istifadə etməyə məqsədilə odaqlandı, və heç bir təhsil onların ikisini də birləşdirməyi düşünmədi. Bu təhsil içində Sintaks və semantik birlikdə BERT'a sözlə uyuşmaq üçün təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz müəyyən bir sintaks və semantik integrasiya metodlarını istifadə edirik ki, çıxış strukturası məlumatlarına daha az hassaslıdır. Beləliklə, sıxıntılı integrasiya xəta propagasyonu problemini azaltır. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, bizim tərzimiz sintaktik və semantik fəaliyyətlərə uyuşmaq üçün bir neçə cümə ilə uyuşan məlumatlarda müqayisədə və müqayisədə müqayisədə istifadə edir.", 'hy': 'Առասությունների համապատասխանման նպատակն է բացահայտել հատուկ հարաբերությունը երկու նախադասությունների միջև և խաղում է գլխավոր դեր շատ բնական լեզվի վերլուծության խնդիրներում: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնացրեցին կամ սինտակտիկ կամ սեմանտիկ տեղեկությունների օգտագործման նախադասությունների համապատասխանման համար, և ոչ մի ուսումնասիրություն չի վերաբերում դրանց երկուս Այս ուսումնասիրության մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ինտեգրել սինտաքսը և սեմանտիկան BER-ի մեջ նախադասությունների համապատասխանման հետ: Մենք հատկապես օգտագործում ենք ենթադրական սինտաքսի և սեմանտիկայի ինտեգրման մեթոդ, որը ավելի քիչ զգայուն է արտադրյալ կառուցվածքի տեղեկատվության վրա: Այսպիսով, ենթադրական ինտեգրացիան կարող է նվազեցնել սխալների տարածման խնդիրը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը հասել է ամենաբարձր կամ մրցակցության արդյունքներին մի քանի նախադասություններում, որոնք համապատասխանում են տվյալների համակարգերին, ցույց տալով առավելությունները, որոնք ներառվում են նախադասությունների համապատասխանման մեջ ան', 'bs': 'Odgovaranje kazne cilja je identificirati posebnu vezu između dvije rečenice i igrati ključnu ulogu u mnogim prirodnim zadacima obrade jezika. Međutim, prethodna ispitivanja su se uglavnom fokusirala na iskorištavanje sintaktičkih ili semantičkih informacija o odgovaranju rečenica, a nijedna ispitivanja ne smatraju integracijom oboje. U ovoj studiji predlažemo integraciju sintaksa i semantika u BERT sa odgovarajućim rečenicama. Posebno, koristimo implicitnu metodu sintakse i semantičke integracije koja je manje osjetljiva na informacije o strukturi izlaza. Zato implicitna integracija može smanjiti problem propagacije grešaka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš pristup postigao stanje umjetnosti ili konkurentne učinke na nekoliko rečenica odgovarajućih podacima, pokazujući koristi implicitno integriranja sintaktičnih i semantičnih karakteristika u odgovarajućoj rečenici.', 'ca': "La combinació de sentences té l'objectiu d'identificar la relació especial entre dues frases, i té un paper clau en moltes tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges. No obstant això, estudis anteriors es van centrar principalment en explotar la informació sinàctica o semàntica per a ajustar frases, i cap estudi no considera integrar les dues. En aquest estudi, proposem integrar la sintaxi i la semàntica en BERT amb la combinació de frases. En particular, utilitzem un mètode implícit d'integració sintaxi i semàntica menys sensible a la informació sobre l'estructura de sortida. Així que la integració implícita pot aliviar el problema de propagació d'errors. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament ha aconseguit un rendiment més avançat o competitiu en diversos conjunts de dades que coinciden amb frases, demostrant els beneficis de l'integració implícita de característiques sinàctiques i semàntiques en l'ajustament de frases.", 'cs': 'Srovnávání vět má za cíl identifikovat zvláštní vztah mezi dvěma větami a hraje klíčovou roli v mnoha úkolech zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Předchozí studie se však zaměřily především na využití syntaktických nebo sémantických informací pro porovnávání vět a žádné studie nezvažují integraci obou z nich. V této práci navrhujeme integraci syntaxe a sémantiky do BERT s vyrovnáním vět. Konkrétně používáme implicitní syntaxi a sémantickou integrační metodu, která je méně citlivá na informace o výstupní struktuře. Implicitní integrace tak může zmírnit problém šíření chyb. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup dosáhl nejmodernějšího nebo konkurenčního výkonu na několika datových sadách pro shodování vět, což demonstruje výhody implicitní integrace syntaktických a sémantických prvků do shodování vět.', 'bn': 'শাস্তি মিলিয়ে দুই বাক্যের মধ্যে বিশেষ সম্পর্ক চিহ্নিত করার উদ্দেশ্য এবং অনেক প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে একটি গ তবে পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণাগুলো মূলত এই বাক্যের সঙ্গে যুক্ত কিংবা সামেন্টিক তথ্য ব্যবহারের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে এবং কোন গবেষণা তা এই গবেষণায় আমরা সিন্ট্যাক্স এবং সেম্যান্টিক্স বিবের্টে একত্রিত করার প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি যেখানে শাস্তি মি বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি সিন্ট্যাক্স এবং সেমেন্টিক্স একত্রিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি যা আউটপুট কাঠামোর তথ্যের জন্য কম সংবেদনশ কাজেই ইনস্টিটি একত্রিত করতে পারে ত্রুটি প্রচারণার সমস্যা কমিয়ে দিতে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা বেশ কয়েকটি বাক্যের সাথে মিলিত তথ্যের সাথে প্রতিযোগিতা করা হয়েছে অথবা প্রতিযোগিতার প্রদর্শন করেছে, যারা বা', 'et': 'Lausete sobitamise eesmärk on tuvastada kahe lause eriline seos ja mängib olulist rolli paljudes looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetes. Varasemad uuringud keskendusid aga peamiselt süntaktilise või semantilise teabe kasutamisele lausete sobitamiseks ning ükski uuring ei kaalu nende mõlema integreerimist. Selles uuringus pakume välja süntaksi ja semantika integreerimine BERT-i lausete sobitamisega. Eelkõige kasutame kaudset süntaksi ja semantika integratsiooni meetodit, mis on vähem tundlik väljundstruktuuri teabe suhtes. Seega võib kaudne integratsioon leevendada vigade leviku probleemi. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis on saavutanud kaasaegse või konkurentsivõimelise jõudluse mitmete lausete sobitamise andmekogumite puhul, näidates eeliseid süntaktiliste ja semantiliste omaduste kaudsest integreerimisest lausete sobitamises.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden täsmäytys pyrkii tunnistamaan kahden lauseen välisen erityissuhteen, ja sillä on keskeinen rooli monissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä. Aiemmissa tutkimuksissa keskityttiin kuitenkin pääasiassa joko syntaktisen tai semanttisen tiedon hyödyntämiseen lauseiden täsmäytystä varten, eikä kummankaan yhdistämistä ole tutkittu. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotetaan syntaksin ja semantiikan yhdistämistä BERT:hen lauseiden täsmäytysten avulla. Erityisesti käytämme implisiittistä syntaksia ja semanttista integraatiomenetelmää, joka on vähemmän herkkä tulosteen rakenteen tiedoille. Siten implisiittinen integraatio voi lievittää virheiden leviämisen ongelmaa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme on saavuttanut huipputason tai kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn useissa lauseiden täsmäytysaineistoissa, mikä osoittaa syntaktisten ja semanttisten ominaisuuksien implisiittisen integroinnin edut lauseiden täsmäytysaineistoon.', 'jv': 'structural navigation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné ngerasara sistêm seneng pisar lan semanti \'BERT\' nganggo gampang. Link politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Rejudging', 'sk': 'Cilj ujemanja stavkov je ugotoviti posebno razmerje med dvema stavkoma in igra ključno vlogo pri številnih nalogah obdelave naravnega jezika. Vendar so se predhodne študije osredotočale predvsem na izkoriščanje sintaktičnih ali semantičnih informacij za ujemanje stavkov in nobena študija ne obravnava integracije obeh. V tej študiji predlagamo integracijo sintakse in semantike v BERT z ujemanjem stavkov. Predvsem uporabljamo implicitno sintakso in semantično integracijo metode, ki je manj občutljiva na izhodne strukture informacij. Tako lahko implicitna integracija ublaži problem širjenja napak. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš pristop dosegel najsodobnejšo ali konkurenčno zmogljivost na več naborih podatkov ujemanja stavkov, kar kaže prednosti implicitnega integracije sintaktičnih in semantičnih značilnosti v ujemanju stavkov.', 'ha': "Halin da ke daidaita na zartar da shi yana kasancẽwa gane kiyayen muhimma tsakanin sauran biyu, kuma yana play wani role na key cikin aikin masu aiki na fassarar harshe masu yawa. A lokacin da aka riga karatun ta farko, sai ya yi amfani da amfani da ko kuma ma'abũcin haɗiya ko kuma ma'anar mutane zuwa birnin da ke daidaita. A cikin wannan lõkaci, Munã goyyade in haɗa kodi da taki zuwa BERT da cewa mai daidaita. Kayyai, Munã yi amfani da shirin suntaki da shirin haɗiya na semantiki wanda bai zama masu sauti ba zuwa ma'anar ƙaranci. Tayinsa da shirin da ke ƙara yana iya sauƙaƙara matsalar da shirin bayani. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa hanyoyinmu ya sami halin-sanar ko yana da rabo-tarayya a kan wasu salãmi masu daidaita danahan da aka samu, kuma ya nuna amfani da masu iya haɗa hanyoyin syntactic da semantic cikin sigar da ke daidaita.", 'bo': 'མིང་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ཡིན་ནའང་། གཟུགས་བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་ནང་དུ་ཚུར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཟིན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བཅུག་པ་དང་། བརྗོད་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས་འདི་གཉི འུ་ཅག་གིས་བརྗོད་འདི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་སྒྲ་ཚིག་དང་སྒྲ་ཚིག་གི་ནང་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཡོ In particular, we use an implicit syntax and semantics integration method that is less sensitive to the output structure information. དེར་བརྟེན། implicit་ཆ་དེ་གིས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོར་ཆུང་དུ་ཉེན་ཁ་གཏོང་ཐུབ། experimental results show that our approach has achieved state-of-the-art or competitive performance on several sentence matching datasets, demonstrating the benefits of implicitly integrating syntactic and semantic features in sentence matching.', 'he': 'התאמת משפטים מתכוונת לזהות את מערכת היחסים המיוחדת בין שני משפטים, ומשחקת תפקיד מפתח במשימות רבות בעבודת שפת טבעית. למרות זאת, מחקרים קודמים התמקדו בעיקר בניצחון או מידע סינטקטי או סמנטי לתאמת משפטים, ולא מחקרים שוקלים להשתלב בשניהם. במחקר הזה, אנחנו מציעים להשתלב סינטקס וסמנטיקה לברט עם התאמת משפטים. במיוחד, אנו משתמשים בשיטת סינטקסית ומחולקת שיטת אינטגרציה סמנטיקה שהיא פחות רגישה למידע מבנה ההוצאה. Thus the implicit integration can alleviate the error propagation problem.  התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהגישה שלנו השיגה ביצועים חדשים או תחרותיים במספר משפטים מתאימים למערכת נתונים, בהוכיחה היתרונות של השתלב ביטוח סינטקטי וסמנטי בתאמת משפטים.'}
{'en': 'Homonym normalisation by word sense clustering : a case in Japanese', 'ar': 'التطبيع المتماثل من خلال تجميع معنى الكلمة: حالة في اليابانية', 'pt': 'Normalização de homônimos por agrupamento de sentido de palavra: um caso em japonês', 'fr': "Normalisation de l'homonyme par regroupement de sens des mots\xa0: un cas en japonais", 'es': 'Normalización homónima mediante agrupamiento de sentidos de palabras: un caso en japonés', 'ja': '単語センスのクラスタリングによる同音異義性：日本語の場合', 'zh': '词义聚类同音异义归一化:日语中一例', 'ru': 'Нормализация омонима путем кластеризации смысла слова: случай в японском языке', 'hi': 'शब्द भावना क्लस्टरिंग द्वारा Homonym सामान्यीकरण: जापानी में एक मामला', 'ga': 'Normalú comhainm trí bhraisliú chiall focal: cás sa tSeapáinis', 'ka': 'ჰომონიმიური ნორმალიზაცია სიტყვის სიტყვის კლასტერებით: ჯაპონიური', 'el': 'Η ομαλοποίηση του ομοιώματος με τη συγκέντρωση λέξεων: μια περίπτωση στα ιαπωνικά', 'hu': 'Homonim normalizáció szóérzék klaszterezéssel: egy eset japán nyelven', 'mk': 'Нормализација на хомонимот по групирање на зборовите: случај на јапонски', 'kk': 'Хомонимді сөз сезімінің кластерингі бойынша нормализация: жапон тілінде', 'it': "Normalizzazione dell'omonima mediante clustering del senso della parola: un caso in giapponese", 'lt': 'Homonimo normalizacija pagal žodžių sąvokų klasifikavimą: atvejis japonų kalba', 'ms': 'Normalisasi homonimik mengikut kumpulan perasaan perkataan: satu kes dalam bahasa Jepun', 'ml': 'വാക്കിന്റെ സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഹോമോണിംഗ് സാധാരണ: ജപ്പാനീസില്\u200d ഒരു കേസ്', 'mn': 'Хомоним хэмжээний хэлбэрээр хэмжээний хэлбэрээр дүрслэл: япон хэлбэрээр', 'mt': 'Normalizzazzjoni tal-omonimu skont ir-raggruppament tas-sens tal-kelma: każ fil-Ġappuniż', 'no': 'Homonym- normalisering etter ordfølelse: ein tilfelle i japansk', 'ro': 'Normalizarea homonimului prin gruparea sensului cuvintelor: un caz în japoneză', 'pl': 'Normalizacja homonizmu poprzez klastrowanie słowa: przypadek w języku japońskim', 'sr': 'Homonimska normalizacija po reèima skupljanja osjeæaja: sluèaj na japanskom', 'si': 'හමෝනිම් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වචන අවශ්\u200dයය සම්බන්ධ විදියට: ජාපානියේ කේස් එකක්', 'sv': 'Homonym normalisering genom ordsenlig klustring: ett fall på japanska', 'so': 'Iskuulka midowga ee qoraalka: xaalada japaniya', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உணர்வு கூட்டுதலால் ஹோமானிம் இயல்பாக்கம்:', 'ur': 'ہمونیم عامل کرنا کلاسٹر کے ذریعہ: ایک کیس جاپانی میں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mọi người bình thường bằng cụm từ giác quan:', 'bg': 'Нормализиране на хомонима чрез групиране на смисъла на думата: случай на японски', 'nl': 'Homoniem normalisatie door woordzintuigclustering: een geval in het Japans', 'da': 'Homonym normalisering ved ordsans klyngning: et tilfælde på japansk', 'hr': 'Homonimska normalizacija riječima skupljanja osjećaja: slučaj na japanskom', 'de': 'Homonymnormalisierung durch Wortsinnclustering: ein Fall im Japanischen', 'id': 'Normalisasi homonimis mengikuti kelompok perasaan kata: sebuah kasus dalam bahasa Jepang', 'ko': '어의 집합을 통해 동음어의 규범화를 실현하다: 일본어의 한 사례', 'fa': 'طبیعت\u200cسازی همونیمی با احساس کلاس\u200cسازی: یک پرونده در ژاپنی', 'sw': 'Utawala wa maadili kwa maneno yenye maana: kesi ya Kijapani', 'sq': 'Normalizimi i homonimit sipas klasifikimit të fjalës: një rast në japonezë', 'tr': 'Homonym duýgularyna seredeniň sözi görä görnöşi: bir juponça', 'af': 'Homonyme normalisering deur woord sin klostering: √¢¬Ä¬ôn geval in Japanse', 'am': 'በንግግር ማሰናከል የኦሞኒም መደገፍ: በጃፓንኛ ጉዳይ', 'hy': 'Հոմոնիմների նորմալիզացիան բառի զգացմունքի խմբագրման միջոցով. մի դեպք ճապոներենում', 'az': 'Homonimik normalizasyonu m…ôlumatlarƒ± il…ô: Japonca olaraq', 'bn': 'শব্দের স্বাভাবিকভাবে হোমনিম স্বাভাবিক: জাপানীয় এক কেস', 'bs': 'Homonimska normalizacija po rečima skupljanje osjećaja: slučaj na japanskom', 'cs': 'Normalizace homonymu pomocí shlukování slovních smyslů: případ v japonštině', 'ca': "Normalització de l'homoni per agrupament de paraules sense sentit: un cas en japonès", 'et': 'Homonüümi normaliseerimine sõna tähenduse klastrite järgi: juhtum jaapani keeles', 'fi': 'Homonyymin normalisointi sanaaistiklusteroinnin avulla: tapaus japaniksi', 'ha': 'Homonym normalisation by word sense clustering: a case in Japanese', 'he': 'נורמליזציה הומונימית על ידי קבוצת חוש מילים: מקרה ביפנית', 'sk': 'Normalizacija homonimov z združevanjem besednih pomenov: primer v japonščini', 'jv': 'omonym (dinom)', 'bo': 'ཆེས་མི་རྣམས་ལ་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཞིག་བྱེད་པའི་དོན་རིགས།'}
{'en': 'This work presents a method of word sense clustering that differentiates homonyms and merge homophones, taking Japanese as an example, where orthographical variation causes problem for language processing. It uses contextualised embeddings (BERT) to cluster tokens into distinct sense groups, and we use these groups to normalise synonymous instances to a single representative form. We see the benefit of this normalisation in language model, as well as in transliteration.', 'ar': 'يقدم هذا العمل طريقة لتجميع معاني الكلمات التي تميز المتجانسات وتدمج المتجانسات ، مع الأخذ باليابانية كمثال ، حيث يتسبب التباين الإملائي في حدوث مشكلة في معالجة اللغة. يستخدم التضمينات السياقية (BERT) لتجميع الرموز المميزة في مجموعات معنية متميزة ، ونستخدم هذه المجموعات لتطبيع الحالات المترادفة في نموذج تمثيلي واحد. نرى فائدة هذا التطبيع في نموذج اللغة ، وكذلك في الترجمة الصوتية.', 'pt': 'Este trabalho apresenta um método de agrupamento de sentido de palavras que diferencia homônimos e mescla homófonos, tomando como exemplo o japonês, onde a variação ortográfica causa problemas para o processamento da linguagem. Ele usa embeddings contextualizados (BERT) para agrupar tokens em grupos de sentido distintos, e usamos esses grupos para normalizar instâncias sinônimas em uma única forma representativa. Vemos o benefício dessa normalização no modelo de linguagem, bem como na transliteração.', 'fr': 'Ce travail présente une méthode de regroupement des sens des mots qui différencie les homonymes et fusionne les homophones, en prenant le japonais comme exemple, où la variation orthographique pose problème au traitement du langage. Il utilise des intégrations contextualisées (BERT) pour regrouper les jetons en groupes de sens distincts, et nous utilisons ces groupes pour normaliser les instances synonymes à une forme représentative unique. Nous voyons les avantages de cette normalisation dans le modèle linguistique, ainsi que dans la translittération.', 'es': 'Este trabajo presenta un método de agrupamiento de sentidos de palabras que diferencia los homónimos y fusiona homófonos, tomando el japonés como ejemplo, donde la variación ortográfica causa problemas para el procesamiento del lenguaje. Utiliza incrustaciones contextualizadas (BERT) para agrupar los tokens en grupos de sentido distintos, y utilizamos estos grupos para normalizar las instancias sinónimas en una sola forma representativa. Vemos el beneficio de esta normalización en el modelo lingüístico, así como en la transliteración.', 'ja': 'この著作は、日本語を例にとり、正書法のバリエーションが言語処理に問題を引き起こすホモニーとマージホモフォンを区別する単語センス・クラスタリングの方法を提示している。コンテキスト化された埋め込み（ BERT ）を使用して、トークンを別々のセンスグループにクラスタ化し、これらのグループを使用して同義インスタンスを単一の代表的なフォームに正規化します。私たちは、この正規化の利点を言語モデルと音訳で見ることができます。', 'zh': '立词义聚类法,区别同音异义词并同音字,以日语为例,正字法变致言。 其用上下文嵌(BERT)将令牌聚类异义组中,用此组将同义词例规范化为代表性文。 语言模音译,见此规范化利。', 'hi': 'यह काम शब्द भावना क्लस्टरिंग की एक विधि प्रस्तुत करता है जो होमोनिम्स को अलग करता है और होमोफोन को मर्ज करता है, जापानी को एक उदाहरण के रूप में लेता है, जहां ऑर्थोग्राफिकल भिन्नता भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए समस्या का कारण बनती है। यह अलग-अलग अर्थ समूहों में टोकन क्लस्टर करने के लिए संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग (BERT) का उपयोग करता है, और हम इन समूहों का उपयोग एक एकल प्रतिनिधि रूप में समानार्थक उदाहरणों को सामान्य करने के लिए करते हैं। हम भाषा मॉडल में इस सामान्यीकरण के लाभ को देखते हैं, साथ ही लिप्यंतरण में भी।', 'ru': 'Эта работа представляет метод кластеризации смысла слова, который дифференцирует омонимы и объединяет омофоны, беря в качестве примера японский, где орфографические вариации вызывают проблемы для языковой обработки. Он использует контекстуализированные вложения (BERT) для кластеризации токенов в отдельные группы смысла, и мы используем эти группы для нормализации синонимичных экземпляров в одну репрезентативную форму. Мы видим преимущества этой нормализации как в языковой модели, так и в транслитерации.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an saothar seo i láthair modh braisliú ar chiall na bhfocal a dhéanann idirdhealú idir comhainmneacha agus a chumasc homafóin, ag glacadh na Seapáine mar shampla, áit a mbíonn éagsúlacht ortagrafach ina chúis le fadhbanna le próiseáil teanga. Úsáideann sé leabaithe comhthéacsúla (BERT) chun comharthaí a chnuasach i ngrúpaí ciall ar leith, agus úsáidimid na grúpaí seo chun cásanna comhchiallacha a normalú go foirm ionadaíoch amháin. Feicimid an buntáiste a bhaineann leis an normalú seo sa mhúnla teanga, agus sa traslitriú freisin.', 'hu': 'Ez a munka egy olyan szóérzékelési klaszterezési módszert mutat be, amely megkülönbözteti a homonímeket és egyesíti a homofónokat, például japánul, ahol az ortográfiai variáció problémát okoz a nyelvfeldolgozásban. Kontextuális beágyazásokat (BERT) használ arra, hogy a tokeneket különböző érzékcsoportokba csoportosítsa, és ezeket a csoportokat arra használjuk, hogy normalizáljuk a szinonimás példányokat egyetlen reprezentatív formába. Ennek a normalizációnak az előnyét a nyelvi modellben és a transzliterációban is látjuk.', 'ka': 'ეს სამუშაო სამუშაო სიტყვის სიტყვის სიტყვის კლასტერის მეტი, რომელიც ჰომონემის განსხვავება და ჰომოფონის შემდეგება, იაპონური მაგალითი იყოს, სადაც ორტოგრაფიული გან ეს კონტექსტუალურად გამოყენება კლასტური სიგრძნობის ჯგუფებში, და ჩვენ ამ ჯგუფებს ნორმალურად გამოყენებთ სინონიმური ინფორმაციები ერთი რესპენტენტიური ფორმაში. ჩვენ ვხედავთ ამ ნორმალიზაციის გამოსახულება ენის მოდელში, როგორც ტრანსლიტაციაში.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια μέθοδο συσσώρευσης αισθήσεων λέξεων που διαφοροποιεί τα ομόνυμα και συγχωνεύει ομοφωνικά, λαμβάνοντας ως παράδειγμα τα ιαπωνικά, όπου η ορθογραφική διακύμανση προκαλεί πρόβλημα για την επεξεργασία της γλώσσας. Χρησιμοποιεί ενσωματωμένες στο πλαίσιο ενσωμάτωσης (για να ομαδοποιήσει τα σήματα σε διακριτές ομάδες αισθήσεων και χρησιμοποιούμε αυτές τις ομάδες για να ομαλοποιήσουμε τις συνώνυμες περιπτώσεις σε μια ενιαία αντιπροσωπευτική μορφή. Βλέπουμε το όφελος αυτής της ομαλοποίησης στο γλωσσικό μοντέλο, καθώς και στην μεταγραφή.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс, гомонимдерді түрлендіру және гомофондарды біріктіру әдісін, япониянды мысалы ретінде біріктіру әдісін көрсетеді. Ортографиялық өзгерістер тілдерді өңдеу үшін мәселеле Бұл контекстуалды ендірілген ендіру (BERT) кластер белгілерін түрлі сезім топтарына қолданады. Біз бұл топтарды синонималық инстанцияларды бір репрезентациялық пішіміне қалыптастыру үшін қолдана Бұл нормализацияны тіл үлгісінде және транслитрацияның пайдалығын көреміз.', 'it': "Questo lavoro presenta un metodo di aggregazione del senso delle parole che differenzia gli omonimi e fonde gli omofoni, prendendo come esempio il giapponese, dove la variazione ortografica causa problemi per l'elaborazione del linguaggio. Utilizza le incorporazioni contestualizzate (BERT) per raggruppare i token in gruppi di senso distinti e utilizziamo questi gruppi per normalizzare le istanze sinonime in una singola forma rappresentativa. Vediamo i benefici di questa normalizzazione nel modello linguistico, così come nella traslitterazione.", 'lt': 'Šiame darbe pateikiamas žodžio supratimo klasterizavimo metodas, kuris diferencijuoja homonimus ir sujungia homofonus, pavyzdžiui, japonų kalba, kur ortografiniai pokyčiai sukelia kalbų apdorojimo problem ų. Ji naudoja kontekstinius įdėjimus (BERT), kad sutelktų žymenis į skirtingas supratimo grupes, ir mes naudojame šias grupes sinoniminiams atvejams normalizuoti į vieną reprezentacinę form ą. Matome šios normalizacijos naudą kalbų modelyje ir transliteracijoje.', 'mk': 'Оваа работа претставува метод на кластерирање на зборовите кои ги разликуваат хомонимите и ги спојуваат хомофоните, земајќи го јапонскиот како пример, каде ортографската варијација предизвикува проблеми во обработувањето на јазиците. Истиот користи контекстуални вградувања (БЕРТ) за да ги групира знаците во различни сетилни групи, и ние ги користиме овие групи за да ги нормализираме синонимите инстанции на една претставничка форма. Гледаме корист од оваа нормализација во јазичкиот модел, како и во транслитерацијата.', 'mt': 'Dan ix-xogħol jippreżenta metodu ta’ raggruppament tas-sens tal-kelma li jiddifferenzja l-omonimi u jgħaqqad l-omofoni, billi jitqies bħala eżempju l-Ġappuniż, fejn il-varjazzjoni ortografika tikkawża problema għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi. Hija tuża inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati (BERT) biex tgħaqqad it-tokens f’gruppi ta’ sens distint, u a ħna nużaw dawn il-gruppi biex in-normalizzaw l-istanzi sinonimiċi għal forma rappreżentattiva waħda. Aħna naraw il-benefiċċju ta’ din in-normalizzazzjoni fil-mudell tal-lingwa, kif ukoll fit-traslitterazzjoni.', 'ms': 'Pekerjaan ini memperlihatkan kaedah kelompok perasaan perkataan yang membezakan homonym dan gabungkan homofon, mengambil bahasa Jepun sebagai contoh, di mana variasi ortografik menyebabkan masalah untuk pemprosesan bahasa. Ia menggunakan bentuk kontekstualisasi (BERT) untuk kumpulkan token ke kumpulan sens yang berbeza, dan kami menggunakan kumpulan-kumpulan ini untuk normalisasi kejadian sinonimum ke bentuk perwakilan tunggal. We see the benefit of this normalisation in language model, as well as in transliteration.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ മനസ്സിന്റെ രീതിയിലാണ്. ഹോമോണികളെ വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നു, ഹോമോഫോയികളെ ഒന്നിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നു. ജാ അത് വ്യത്യസ്ത മനസ്സിലുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥിരമാക്കുന്നതിനായി (ബെര്\u200dട്ടി) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ഗ്രൂപ്പുകള്\u200d സാധാരണമായി സ ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡലിലും ട്രാന്\u200dസ്റ്റാന്\u200dസ്ലൈറ്റരേഷനിലും ഈ സ്വാഭാവീകരണത്തിന്റെ ഉപകാരവും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണുന്', 'mn': 'Энэ үйл ажиллагаа нь геомоним болон гомофонуудыг нэгтгэдэг, Японы жишээ болгон ортографик өөрчлөлт нь хэлний үйл ажиллагаанд асуудал үүсгэдэг үг мэдрэмжтэй хэлбэрийг харуулдаг. Энэ нь зөвхөн ойлголттой байрлал (BERT) гэх мэт мэдрэмжтэй бүлгүүдэд ангилах томъёог ашигладаг. Бид эдгээр бүлгүүдийг зөвхөн нэг төлөөлөгч хэлбэрт зөвшөөрөхийн тулд хэрэглэдэг. Бид энэ нормализацийн тулд хэл загварын тулд, мөн хэлбэрийн үлгэр зохиолын тулд харагдаж байна.', 'no': 'Dette arbeidet viser ein metode for ordfølelse som forskjeller homonym og samlingar med homofon, som tar japansk som eksempel, der ortografiske variasjonar fører til problemet for språkshandtering. Det brukar kontekstualiserte innbyggingar (BERT) for å klastere teikn i ulike sentralgrupper, og vi brukar desse gruppene for å normalisera synonyme instansar til ein enkelt representant form. Vi ser fordel av denne normaliseringa i språk-modellen, og i transliterasjon.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o metodă de grupare a simțurilor cuvintelor care diferențiază omonimele și fuzionează omofoanele, luând ca exemplu japoneza, unde variația ortografică provoacă probleme pentru procesarea limbii. Folosește încorporări contextualizate (BERT) pentru a grupa jetoane în grupuri de simțuri distincte și folosim aceste grupuri pentru a normaliza instanțele sinonime într-o singură formă reprezentativă. Vedem beneficiile acestei normalizări în modelul lingvistic, precum și în transliterare.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy przedstawiono metodę klastrowania zmysłów słowa, która różnicuje homonimy i łączy homofony, biorąc na przykład japoński, gdzie zróżnicowanie ortograficzne powoduje problem przetwarzania języka. Używa kontekstualizowanych osadzeń (BERT) do klastrowania tokenów w odrębne grupy zmysłów, a my używamy tych grup do normalizacji synonimów instancji do jednej reprezentatywnej formy. Korzyści z tej normalizacji widzimy zarówno w modelu językowym, jak i w transliteracji.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ විදිහට වචන අදහසක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙනවා ඒකෙන් හොමානිම් සහ හොමෝෆෝන් එක්ක එකතු කරනවා, ජාපානියානු උදාහරණයක් වගේ  ඒක ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය (BERT) ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි මේ  අපිට මේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පේනවා වගේම භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය වලින්.', 'sv': 'Detta arbete presenterar en metod för ordsinnesklustring som skiljer homonymer och sammanfogar homofoner, med japanska som exempel, där ortografisk variation orsakar problem för språkbehandling. Den använder kontextuella inbäddningar (BERT) för att klustra tokens i distinkta sensgrupper, och vi använder dessa grupper för att normalisera synonyma instanser till en enda representativ form. Vi ser fördelarna med denna normalisering både i språkmodellen och i transliteration.', 'so': "Shaqadaasu wuxuu soo saaraa qaab ay u kala duwan yihiin isku gaynta iyo isku dayaan qofka jabaneeska ah tusaale ahaan, meesha beddelka ortografiga ah ay sababto dhibaato ku saabsan baaritaanka luuqada. Waxay isticmaaltaa meelaha la soo jeedo (BERT) si ay calaamada ugu soo bandhigaan kooxo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, waxaana isticmaalnaa kooxahaas si aynu u caadi u dhigno qaab kaliya wakiil. Waxaynu aragnaa faa'iidada caadigan ku saabsan tusaale ahaan luqada iyo qoraalka.", 'sr': 'Ovaj rad predstavlja metodu skupljanja reèi koji diferencira homonime i spaja homofone, uzimajući japanske kao primjer, gde ortografska varijacija uzrokuje problem za procesiranje jezika. Koristi kontekstualizovane integracije (BERT) za skupljanje znakova u različite grupe smisla, i koristimo te grupe da normaliziramo sinonim slučajevima u jednom predstavnom obliku. Vidimo korist ove normalizacije u jezičkom modelu, kao i u transliteraciji.', 'ur': 'یہ کام ایک ایسی بات کا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو ہمونیم کو متفرق کرتا ہے اور ہموفون کو متفرق کرتا ہے، جاپانی کو ایک مثال بناتا ہے، جہاں اورٹوگرافیک تغییر زبان پرسس کے لئے مشکل کا سبب ہے. یہ تفصیلاتیز ایمبڈینگ (BERT) کو کلسٹر ٹوکنز کے لئے مختلف سمجھ گروہوں میں استعمال کرتا ہے، اور ہم ان گروہوں کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک نمایشن فرم کے ساتھ سینونیم ایمبڈینز (BERT) کو استعمال کریں۔ ہم اسے زبان مدل میں، اور ٹرانسلیٹر میں بھی دیکھتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலை ஒரு வார்த்தை உணர்வு முறையைக் கூட்டுகிறது, அது ஒத்திசைப்படைப்பையும் பிரித்து ஒத்திசைப்படுத்துகிறது, ஜப்பானியையும்  இது குறிப்புகளை வெவ்வேறு உணர்வு குழுக்களாக குறிப்பிட பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும் நாம் இந்த குழுக்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒத்திசைந்த நிகழ்வுகளை ஒர மொழி மாதிரியில் இந்த இயல்பாக்கத்திற்கு நன்மையை நாம் பார்க்கிறோம், மற்றும் மாற்றுதலில்.', 'uz': "Bu ishni o'zgartirish, homofalarni ajratish va homofalarni birlashtirish mumkin, masalan, Yaponiyaga ortografik variasjoneni o'zgartirish tilni boshqarish uchun muammolarni sabab beradi. Bu belgilarni bir xil g'oyalar guruhga qo'yishga (BERT) ishlatadi, va biz bu guruhlarni bir xil representant formatidan foydalanish uchun foydalanamiz. Biz bu oddiylikni tilning modelidagi foydalanishini va tarjima qilishni ko'raymiz.", 'vi': 'Công trình này có một cách cấu kết nghĩa từ phân biệt các đồng tính và hợp nhất các vị đồng tính luyến ái, lấy tiếng Nhật làm ví dụ, nơi biến dạng chính xác gây rắc rối cho việc xử lý ngôn ngữ. Nó dùng các trường hợp nội bộ để kết hợp các thẻ thành nhóm cảm nhận khác nhau, và chúng tôi sử dụng các nhóm này để làm bình thường các trường hợp đồng thành dạng đại diện duy nhất. Chúng tôi thấy lợi ích của cuộc bình phục này trong mô hình ngôn ngữ, cũng như trong việc chuyển chữ.', 'da': 'Dette arbejde præsenterer en metode til ordsans klyngning, der differentierer homonymer og fletter homofoner, tager japansk som eksempel, hvor ortografisk variation forårsager problemer for sprogbehandling. Den bruger kontekstualiserede indlejringer (BERT) til at klynge tokens i forskellige sansegrupper, og vi bruger disse grupper til at normalisere synonyme forekomster til en enkelt repræsentativ formular. Vi ser fordelene ved denne normalisering i sprogmodel såvel som i transliteration.', 'bg': 'Тази работа представя метод за групиране на думи, който разграничава хомонимите и слива хомофоните, като взема пример японски, където ортографските вариации причиняват проблеми при езиковата обработка. Той използва контекстуализирани вграждания (BERT), за да групира токените в различни групи от смисъл, а ние използваме тези групи, за да нормализираме синонимните екземпляри в една представителна форма. Виждаме ползата от това нормализиране в езиковия модел, както и в транслитерацията.', 'nl': 'Dit werk presenteert een methode van woordzintuigclustering die homoniemen differentieert en homofoons samenvoegt, waarbij Japans als voorbeeld wordt genomen, waar orthografische variatie problemen veroorzaakt voor taalverwerking. Het maakt gebruik van contextualiseerde embeddings (BERT) om tokens te clusteren in verschillende zintuigengroepen, en we gebruiken deze groepen om synonieme instanties te normaliseren tot één representatief formulier. We zien het voordeel van deze normalisatie zowel in taalmodel als in transliteratie.', 'hr': 'Ovaj rad predstavlja metodu skupljanja riječi koji diferencira homonime i skuplja homofone, uzimajući japanske kao primjer, gdje ortografska varijacija uzrokuje problem za obradu jezika. Koristi kontekstualizirane integracije (BERT) za skupljanje znakova u različite skupine osjećaja, i koristimo te skupine kako bi normalizirali sinonim slučajevima u jednom predstavnom obliku. Vidimo korist ove normalizacije u jezičkom modelu, kao i u transliteraciji.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt eine Methode des Wortsinnclusters vor, die Homonyme differenziert und Homophone zusammenführt, am Beispiel Japanisch, wo orthographische Variationen Probleme bei der Sprachverarbeitung verursachen. Es verwendet kontextualisierte Einbettungen (BERT), um Token in verschiedene Sinnesgruppen zu clustern, und wir verwenden diese Gruppen, um synonyme Instanzen zu einer einzigen repräsentativen Form zu normalisieren. Wir sehen den Nutzen dieser Normalisierung sowohl im Sprachmodell als auch in der Transliteration.', 'ko': '본고는 일본어를 예로 삼아 동음어를 구분하고 동음어를 합병하는 의미 집합 방법을 제시했는데 그 중에서 정사 변이가 언어 처리에 문제를 가져올 수 있다.이것은 상하 문화 삽입(BERT)을 사용하여 표기를 서로 다른 의미 그룹에 집합시킨다. 우리는 이 그룹을 사용하여 동일한 의미의 실례를 하나의 대표 형식으로 규범화한다.우리는 언어 모델과 음역에서 이런 규범화의 장점을 보았다.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan ini memperlihatkan metode pemikiran kata clustering yang membedakan homonim dan gabungkan homofon, mengambil bahasa Jepang sebagai contoh, di mana variasi ortografik menyebabkan masalah untuk proses bahasa. Ini menggunakan bentuk kontekstualisasi (BERT) untuk mengumpulkan token ke kelompok sens yang berbeda, dan kami menggunakan kelompok-kelompok ini untuk normalisasi kejadian sinonimus ke bentuk representatif tunggal. Kita melihat keuntungan dari normalisasi ini dalam model bahasa, juga dalam transliterasi.', 'fa': 'این کار یک روش حس کلمه را نشان می دهد که homonyms را تفریح می دهد و homophones را تفریح می دهد، به عنوان مثال ژاپنی بگیرد، جایی تغییرات orthographical باعث مشکلی برای پرداخت زبان است. این استفاده از ابتدایی\u200cهای متوسط (BERT) برای نشانه\u200cهای کلاستر به گروه\u200cهای منطق متفاوت استفاده می\u200cکند، و ما از این گروه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا به یک فرم نمایش\u200cدهنده معمول سازمانی کنیم. ما سود این عادت را در مدل زبان می بینیم، همچنین در ترجمه.', 'sw': 'Kazi hii inaonyesha njia ya maana ya maneno yanayohitimisha kuwa zinatofautisha ushoga na kuwaunganisha mashoga, wakichukua Wajapani kama mfano, ambapo mabadiliko ya kihistoria yanasababisha tatizo kwa ajili ya upasuaji wa lugha. Inatumia vifaa vinavyojitokeza (BERT) ili kuunganisha alama katika makundi tofauti, na tunatumia makundi haya kwa ajili ya kuweka matukio yasiyo na maana yanayoonyesha kuwa namna moja ya mwakilishi. Tunaona faida ya utaratibu huu katika mtindo wa lugha, na pia katika tafsiri.', 'af': "Hierdie werk stel 'n metode van woord sin klastering wat homonime verskillig en homofoon saamgevoeg, japanse as 'n voorbeeld te neem, waar orthografiese veranderinge veroorsaak probleme vir taalsverwerking. Dit gebruik kontekstualiseerde inbêdings (BERT) om cluster tekens in verskillende sin groepe te gebruik, en ons gebruik hierdie groepe om synonyme voorbeelde te normaliseer na 'n enkele reprezentante vorm. Ons sien die voordeel van hierdie normalisering in taal model, en ook in transliterasie.", 'tr': 'Bu işe homonymlary üýtgeder we homofonlary bir örnek çykarýan söz duýgularynyň bir yöntemi görkezýär. Ýaponiýany örnek görkezýär. Bu ýerde ortografiýa üýtgeşmeler dil işlemegine kynçylyk edýär. Çaltylyk baglanyşyklary (BERT) sany toparlar bilen çaplamak üçin çaplar taýýarlanýar we bu toparlary synonym ýagdaýyny bir täze şeklinde düzenlemek üçin ullanýarys. Biz bu normalization dil nusgasynda we terjime edeşinden has gowy görýäris.', 'sq': 'Ky punë paraqet një metodë të klasifikimit të kuptimit të fjalës që diferencon homonimët dhe bashkon homofonët, duke marrë si shembull japonezët, ku variacioni ortografik shkakton probleme për procesimin e gjuhës. Përdor përfshirje kontekstuale (BERT) për të mbledhur tokenat në grupe kuptimi të veçantë, dhe ne përdorim këto grupe për të normalizuar rastet sinonimike në një form ë të vetme përfaqësuese. Ne shohim përfitimin e kësaj normalizimi në model in gjuhësor si dhe në transliteracionin.', 'am': 'ይሄ ሥራ የንግግር ማስታወቂያውን የሚለይ የኮሞፖኖችን እና የተለየ እና የጃፓንን ምሳሌ የሚወስድ የኢትዮግራፊ መለወጫ ለቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ጉዳይ የሚያደርገውን የቃላትን ማሰናከል ያሳያል፡፡ በተጨማሪው አካባቢዎች (BERT) ምልክቶችን ለልዩ አእምሮ ቡድን ለማቅረብ ይጠቅማል፤ እነዚህንም ጉዳዮችን በአንድ ብሔራዊ ብሔራዊ መልዕክት ለማስተካከል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ ጥቅም እና በተለይም ጥቅም እናያለን፡፡', 'hy': 'This work presents a method of word sense clustering that differentiates homonyms and merge homophones, taking Japanese as an example, where orthographical variation causes problem for language processing.  Այն օգտագործում է կոնտեքստոնիզացված ներդրումներ (BER-ներ), որպեսզի նշանները տարբեր զգայարանների խմբերի բաժանենք, և մենք օգտագործում ենք այս խմբերը, որպեսզի նորմալիզեցնենք սինոնիմո օրինակները մեկ ներկայացուցիչ ձևի Մենք տեսնում ենք այս նորմալիզացիայի առավելությունը լեզվի մոդելի, ինչպես նաև տրանսգրականության մեջ:', 'az': 'Bu işlər homonimləri fərqləndirir və homofonları birləşdirir, japonca məsəl olaraq, orada ortografik dəyişikliklər dil işləməsi üçün problemi olar. Bu müxtəlif inşallar (BERT) ilə müxtəlif hiss qruplarına cluster işaretlərini istifadə edir, və biz bu qrupları sinonim nümunələrini tək bir nümunəli form a normalizə etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz bu normalizasyonun mənfəətini dil modelində və transliterasyonda görürük.', 'bn': 'এই কাজের একটি শব্দের মানসিকতা উপস্থাপন করে যা সমকামীদের পার্থক্য করে এবং সমকামীদের সাথে একত্রিত করে, যেখানে জাপানীদের উদাহরণ হিসেবে নিয়ে য এটি প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন মানসিক গ্রুপে চিহ্ন স্থাপন করার জন্য (বেরেটি) চিহ্ন ব্যবহার করে এবং আমরা এই গ্রুপগুলোকে এক প আমরা ভাষার মডেলে এই স্বাভাবিকতার সুবিধা দেখতে পাচ্ছি এবং ট্রান্সলিটারেশনের সাথে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj rad predstavlja metodu skupljanja riječi koji diferencira homonime i spaja homofone, uzimajući japanske kao primjer, gdje ortografska varijacija uzrokuje problem za obradu jezika. Koristi kontekstualizirane integracije (BERT) za skupljanje znakova u različite skupine smisla, i koristimo te skupine da normaliziramo sinonim slučajevima u jednom predstavnom obliku. Vidimo korist ove normalizacije u jezičkom modelu, kao i u transliteraciji.', 'ca': "Aquesta obra presenta un mètode d'agrupament de sentit de paraules que diferencia homonyms i fusiona homofons, prenent el japonès com exemple, on la variació ortogràfica provoca problemes en el processament de llenguatges. Utilitza integracions contextualitzades (BERT) per agrupar fitxes en grups de sentits distints, i utilitzem aquests grups per normalitzar les instances sinònims a una sola forma representativa. Veiem el benefici d'aquesta normalització en el model lingüístic i en la transliteració.", 'cs': 'Tato práce představuje metodu shlukování slovních smyslů, která rozlišuje homonymy a sloučí homofony, na příkladu japonštiny, kde ortografická variace způsobuje problém pro zpracování jazyka. Používá kontextualizované vložení (BERT) k seskupení tokenů do různých smyslových skupin a my tyto skupiny používáme k normalizaci synonymních instancí do jediné reprezentativní formy. Přínos této normalizace vidíme jak v jazykovém modelu, tak v transliteraci.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 ty철ss채 esitell채채n sanaaistiklusterointimenetelm채, joka erottaa homonyymit ja yhdist채채 homofonit. Esimerkkin채 k채ytet채채n japania, jossa ortografinen vaihtelu aiheuttaa ongelmia kielenk채sittelyyn. Se k채ytt채채 kontekstualisoituja upotuksia (BERT) yhdist채채kseen tokenit erillisiin aistiryhmiin, ja k채yt채mme n채it채 ryhmi채 normalisoimaan synonyymiesiintymi채 yhteen edustavaan lomakkeeseen. N채emme t채m채n normalisoinnin hy철dyn kielimallissa sek채 transliteraatiossa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse sõnateenuste klastrimise meetodit, mis eristab homonüüme ja ühendab homofone, võttes näiteks jaapani keeles, kus ortograafiline variatsioon põhjustab keeletöötlusele probleeme. See kasutab kontekstipõhiseid manustamisi (BERT), et klastristada märgid erinevatesse tähendusrühmadesse ja me kasutame neid rühmi sünonüümsete eksemplaride normaliseerimiseks ühele representatiivsele vormile. Me näeme selle normaliseerimise kasu nii keelemudelis kui ka transliteratsioonis.', 'jv': 'Ngomongke iki gunakake sistem sing paling kelas kuwi kapan kelas nang sampeyan sampeyan ingkang sampeyan karo panembang omongke sampeyan ingkang japongan, ngubah kang ngerintangan terarap sing apik tur ayos perangkat langkung sampeyan. LTR Awak dhéwé éntuk bener kanggo ngerasakno iki ning bisa model luwih, ngono nggambar tarjamahan.', 'ha': "Wannan aikin yana bãyar da wata hanyor maganar magana mai ƙaranci da ke rarraba masu gayo da haɗi gayofoyi, kuma ya riƙe Yahaya kamar misali, inda variant na ortofogi ke saba wata mataimaki ga manajan aiki na harshe. Ina amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da aka haɗa (BERT) zuwa ta sami ayukan ayuka zuwa jama'a-jama'a daban-daban, kuma tuna amfani da waɗannan ƙungiyõyi dõmin a daidaita misãlai masu da ba'a sani ba zuwa fomat guda. Munã ganin amfani da wannan mai normal cikin misalin harshe, da kuma a cikin fassarar.", 'sk': 'V delu je predstavljena metoda združevanja besednih pomenov, ki razlikuje homonime in združuje homofone, na primer japonščine, kjer ortografska variacija povzroča težave pri obdelavi jezika. Uporablja kontekstualizirane vdelave (BERT) za združevanje žetonov v različne pomenske skupine, te skupine pa uporabljamo za normalizacijo sinonimskih primerov v eno reprezentativno obliko. Prednosti te normalizacije vidimo tako v jezikovnem modelu kot tudi v transliteraciji.', 'bo': 'འདིས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་དང་། ཆེན་ཉེ་ཧོང་ལྟ་བུ་བསྡུར་ན། It uses contextual embedding (BERT) to cluster tokens in distinct sense groups. We use these groups to normalize synonymous instances to a single representative form. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱང་ཕན་ཚུན་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་རེད།', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה שיטה של גיבור מילים שמפרסמת הומונימות ומיזוג הומופונים, לוקחת את היפנים כדוגמא, שבו שוורציה אורטוגרפית גורמת לבעיה בעבודת שפות. היא משתמשת באמצעות קונטוקטוליזציה (BERT) כדי לאסוף סימנים לקבוצות חושים בודדות, ואנחנו משתמשים בקבוצות אלה כדי לנורמליז מקרים סינונימיים לצורה מייצגית אחת. אנו רואים את היתרון של הנורמליזציה הזו בדוגמנית שפה, כמו גם בטרנסליטציה.'}
{'en': 'An Unsupervised Method for Learning Representations of Multi-word Expressions for Semantic Classification', 'ar': 'طريقة غير خاضعة للإشراف لتعلم تمثيلات التعبيرات متعددة الكلمات من أجل التصنيف الدلالي', 'es': 'Un método no supervisado para aprender representaciones de expresiones de varias palabras para la clasificación semántica', 'fr': "Une méthode non supervisée pour apprendre les représentations d'expressions multimots pour la classification sémantique", 'pt': 'Um método não supervisionado para aprender representações de expressões multi-palavra para classificação semântica', 'ja': 'セマンティック分類のためのマルチワード表現を学習するための監督されていない方法', 'zh': '一学语义类用多词表达式示无监督之法', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ वर्गीकरण के लिए बहु-शब्द अभिव्यक्तियों के प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक असुरक्षित विधि', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемый метод обучения представления многословных выражений для семантической классификации', 'ga': "Modh Gan Maoirseacht chun Léiriúcháin Ilfhoclacha d'Aicmiú Séimeantach a Fhoghlaim", 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια μη εποπτευμένη μέθοδος εκμάθησης αναπαραστάσεων πολυλέξεων για τη σημειακή ταξινόμηση', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli módszer a többszós kifejezések szemantikus osztályozáshoz', 'it': "Un metodo non supervisionato per l'apprendimento Rappresentazioni di espressioni multi-parola per la classificazione semantica", 'kk': 'Бірнеше сөз өрнектерін білмеу үшін қолданылмаған әдіс', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas daugiakalbių išraiškų mokymosi būdas Semantiniam klasifikavimui', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуван метод за учење на претставувања на мултизборни изрази за семантичка класификација', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കാത്ത ഒരു രീതി', 'mn': 'Semantic Classification-ын олон үгийн илэрхийллийг сурах боломжгүй арга', 'mt': 'Metodu Mhux Sorveljat għar-Rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-Tagħlim ta’ Espressjonijiet b’Ħafna kliem għall-Klassifikazzjoni Semantika', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Neodobrena metoda za učenje predstavljanja višerečnih izraza za semantičku klasifikaciju', 'pl': 'Niemonitorowana metoda nauki reprezentacji wyrażeń wielowłowych dla klasyfikacji semantycznej', 'ro': 'O metodă nesupravegheată pentru învățarea reprezentărilor expresiilor cu mai multe cuvinte pentru clasificarea semantică', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Unwatched method for Learning Representations of Multi-word expressions for Semantic Classification', 'ta': 'An Unsupervised Method for Learning Representations of Multi-word Expressions for Semantic Classification', 'sv': 'En icke övervakad metod för lärande Representationer av flerordsuttryck för semantisk klassificering', 'ur': 'Semantic Classification کے لئے بہت سی کلیفوں کا نمایش سکھانے کے لئے ناپابندی طریقہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cách chưa được giám sát để phát triển nét xuất từ nhiều từ để phân biệt Semantic', 'da': 'En ukontrolleret metode til læring Repræsentationer af flerordsudtryk til semantisk klassificering', 'bg': 'Неконтролиран метод за учене на представяне на многословни изрази за семантична класификация', 'hr': 'Nepotrebna metoda učenja predstavljanja višeriječnih izraza za semantičku klasifikaciju', 'nl': 'Een onbewaakte methode voor het leren van representaties van meerwoorduitdrukkingen voor semantische classificatie', 'de': 'Eine unbeaufsichtigte Methode zum Lernen von Repräsentationen von Mehrwortausdrücken für die semantische Klassifizierung', 'id': 'Sebuah Metode Tidak Disupervisi untuk Belajar Perwakilan Ekspresi Berbilang untuk Klasifikasi Semantik', 'ko': '감독이 없는 다사 의미 분류 표현 학습 방법', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Njia isiyofuatiliwa kwa Kujifunza Mazungumzo ya Tamko la Maneno kwa ajili ya Kufunguliwa kwa Kisemantiki', 'sq': 'Një Metod i Pambikqyrur për Mësimin e Përfaqjeve të Shprehjeve Shumë-Fjalore për Klasifikimin Semantik', 'tr': 'Semantik sözleri üçin Representations of Multi word Expressions for Learning Unsuped Method', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'az': 'Semantik Klasifikat üçün çoxlu sözlər ifadəsi öyrənmək üçün müəyyən edilməmiş bir Method', 'bn': 'An Unsupervised Method for Learning Representations of Multi-word Expressions for Semantic Classification', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ դասակարգման բազմաբառերի արտահայտությունների առանց վերահսկման մեթոդ', 'bs': 'Neodobren metod učenja predstavljanja višeriječnih izraza za semantičku klasifikaciju', 'ca': "Un mètode sense supervisió per aprendre representacions d'expressions multiparaules per a la classificació semàtica", 'cs': 'Nekontrolovaná metoda pro učení se reprezentací víceslovních výrazů pro sémantickou klasifikaci', 'et': 'Järelevalveta meetod semantilise klassifikatsiooni mitmesõnaliste avaldiste esitamise õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Tarkkailematon menetelmä monikanavaisten lausekkeiden esittämisen oppimiseen semanttisessa luokittelussa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovana metoda za učenje predstavitev večbesednih izrazov za semantično klasifikacijo', 'jv': 'Next >', 'bo': 'Semantic Classification ཡི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྦྲགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྒྲིག་མ་ཡོད་པ།', 'he': 'שיטה ללא שליטה לימודים מייצגים של ביטויים רבים במילים לסימנטית'}
{'en': 'This paper explores an unsupervised approach to learning a compositional representation function for multi-word expressions (MWEs), and evaluates it on the Tratz dataset, which associates two-word expressions with the semantic relation between the compound constituents (e.g. the label employer is associated with the noun compound government agency) (Tratz, 2011). The composition function is based on recurrent neural networks, and is trained using the Skip-Gram objective to predict the words in the context of MWEs. Thus our approach can naturally leverage large unlabeled text sources. Further, our method can make use of provided MWEs when available, but can also function as a completely unsupervised algorithm, using MWE boundaries predicted by a single, domain-agnostic part-of-speech pattern. With pre-defined MWE boundaries, our method outperforms the previous state-of-the-art performance on the coarse-grained evaluation of the Tratz dataset (Tratz, 2011), with an F1 score of 50.4 %. The unsupervised version of our method approaches the performance of the supervised one, and even outperforms it in some configurations.', 'ar': 'تستكشف هذه الورقة نهجًا غير خاضع للإشراف لتعلم وظيفة التمثيل التركيبي للتعبيرات متعددة الكلمات (MWEs) ، وتقيمها على مجموعة بيانات Tratz ، التي تربط التعبيرات المكونة من كلمتين بالعلاقة الدلالية بين المكونات المركبة (على سبيل المثال ، صاحب التسمية مرتبط مع الوكالة الحكومية المركبة الاسمية) (تراتز ، 2011). تعتمد وظيفة التكوين على الشبكات العصبية المتكررة ، ويتم تدريبها باستخدام هدف Skip-Gram للتنبؤ بالكلمات في سياق MWEs. وبالتالي فإن أسلوبنا يمكن أن يستفيد بشكل طبيعي من مصادر النص الكبيرة غير المسماة. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكن لطريقتنا الاستفادة من MWEs المتوفرة عند توفرها ، ولكن يمكن أيضًا أن تعمل كخوارزمية غير خاضعة للإشراف تمامًا ، باستخدام حدود MWE التي تم توقعها بواسطة نمط جزء واحد من الكلام غير محدد المجال. مع حدود MWE المحددة مسبقًا ، تتفوق طريقتنا في الأداء على أحدث أداء سابق في التقييم الخشن لمجموعة بيانات Tratz (Tratz ، 2011) ، بدرجة F1 تبلغ 50.4٪. تقترب النسخة غير الخاضعة للإشراف من طريقتنا من أداء الشخص الخاضع للإشراف ، بل وتتفوق عليه في بعض التكوينات.', 'pt': 'Este artigo explora uma abordagem não supervisionada para aprender uma função de representação composicional para expressões multi-palavra (MWEs) e a avalia no conjunto de dados Tratz, que associa expressões de duas palavras com a relação semântica entre os constituintes compostos (por exemplo, o rótulo empregador está associado com o substantivo composto agência governamental) (Tratz, 2011). A função de composição é baseada em redes neurais recorrentes e é treinada usando o objetivo Skip-Gram para prever as palavras no contexto de MWEs. Assim, nossa abordagem pode naturalmente alavancar grandes fontes de texto não rotuladas. Além disso, nosso método pode fazer uso de MWEs fornecidos quando disponíveis, mas também pode funcionar como um algoritmo completamente não supervisionado, usando limites de MWE previstos por um único padrão de fala agnóstico de domínio. Com limites de MWE pré-definidos, nosso método supera o desempenho de última geração anterior na avaliação grosseira do conjunto de dados Tratz (Tratz, 2011), com uma pontuação F1 de 50,4%. A versão não supervisionada do nosso método se aproxima do desempenho do supervisionado, e até o supera em algumas configurações.', 'fr': "Cet article explore une approche non supervisée de l'apprentissage d'une fonction de représentation compositionnelle pour les expressions multi-mots (MWE), et l'évalue sur l'ensemble de données Tratz, qui associe des expressions à deux mots à la relation sémantique entre les constituants composés (par exemple, l'employeur de l'étiquette est associé à l'agence gouvernementale composée du nom) (Tratz, 2011). La fonction de composition est basée sur des réseaux neuronaux récurrents et est entraînée à l'aide de l'objectif Skip-Gram pour prédire les mots dans le contexte des MWE. Notre approche peut donc naturellement tirer parti de grandes sources de texte non étiquetées. De plus, notre méthode peut utiliser les MWE fournis lorsqu'ils sont disponibles, mais peut également fonctionner comme un algorithme totalement non supervisé, utilisant des limites MWE prédites par un modèle de partie de parole unique, indépendant du domaine. Avec des limites MWE prédéfinies, notre méthode surpasse les performances de pointe précédentes sur l'évaluation grossière du jeu de données Tratz (Tratz, 2011), avec un score F1 de 50,4\xa0%. La version non supervisée de notre méthode approche les performances de la méthode supervisée, et la surpasse même dans certaines configurations.", 'es': 'Este artículo explora un enfoque no supervisado para aprender una función de representación composicional para expresiones de varias palabras (MWE) y la evalúa en el conjunto de datos Tratz, que asocia expresiones de dos palabras con la relación semántica entre los componentes compuestos (por ejemplo, el empleador de la etiqueta está asociado con el sustantivo agencia gubernamental compuesta) (Tratz, 2011). La función de composición se basa en redes neuronales recurrentes y se entrena utilizando el objetivo Skip-Gram para predecir las palabras en el contexto de los MWE. Por lo tanto, nuestro enfoque puede aprovechar de forma natural grandes fuentes de texto sin etiqueta. Además, nuestro método puede hacer uso de los MWE proporcionados cuando estén disponibles, pero también puede funcionar como un algoritmo completamente no supervisado, utilizando límites de MWE predichos por un único patrón de parte del habla independiente del dominio. Con límites de MWE predefinidos, nuestro método supera el rendimiento de vanguardia anterior en la evaluación gruesa del conjunto de datos Tratz (Tratz, 2011), con una puntuación F1 del 50,4%. La versión no supervisada de nuestro método se acerca al rendimiento del método supervisado e incluso lo supera en algunas configuraciones.', 'ja': 'この論文は、多言語表現（ MWE ）の構成表現関数を学習するための監督されていないアプローチを探求し、2語の表現を化合物成分間の意味関係に関連付けるTratzデータセット上でそれを評価する（例えば、ラベルの雇用主が名詞化合物政府機関に関連付けられている） （ Tratz, 2011 ）。 組成関数は、再帰的なニューラルネットワークに基づいており、MWEの文脈で単語を予測するためにSkip - Gram目標を使用して訓練される。 したがって、当社のアプローチは、ラベル付けされていない大きなテキストソースを自然に活用することができます。 さらに、本方法は、利用可能な場合、提供されたMWEを利用することができるが、単一のドメイン非推定部分の発話パターンによって予測されるMWE境界を使用して、完全に監視されていないアルゴリズムとして機能することもできる。 事前定義されたMWE境界により、当社の方法は、50.4 ％のF 1スコアで、Tratzデータセットの粗粒度評価（ Tratz、2011 ）において、以前の最先端のパフォーマンスを上回ります。 私たちの方法の監督されていないバージョンは、監督されているもののパフォーマンスに近づき、いくつかの構成ではそれを上回っています。', 'zh': '本文探无监督之法以学多词表达式(MWEs)复合以示函数,并于Tratz数集上对其评估,其数集将两单词表达式与复合成分之语义相关(如,签雇主与名词复合官府相关)(Tratz,2011)。 合函数基于递归神经网络,而练之以 Skip-Gram ,以占 MWE 上下文之单词。 故吾法自可用大未标之本。 此外可用之MWE,亦可为全无监督之算,用单个域不可知词性式测MWE界。 以预定义之MWE界,吾法于Tratz数集之粗粒度评估(Tratz,2011)中优于先进之性,F1得分为50.4%。 吾法无监本近监本之性,至于配置中优之。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर बहु-शब्द अभिव्यक्तियों (MWEs) के लिए एक रचनात्मक प्रतिनिधित्व फ़ंक्शन सीखने के लिए एक असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोण की पड़ताल करता है, और Tratz डेटासेट पर इसका मूल्यांकन करता है, जो यौगिक घटकों के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंध के साथ दो-शब्द अभिव्यक्तियों को जोड़ता है (उदाहरण के लिए लेबल नियोक्ता संज्ञा यौगिक सरकारी एजेंसी के साथ जुड़ा हुआ है) (Tratz, 2011)। संरचना समारोह आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पर आधारित है, और MWEs के संदर्भ में शब्दों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए छोड़ें-ग्राम उद्देश्य का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। इस प्रकार हमारा दृष्टिकोण स्वाभाविक रूप से बड़े अनलेबल पाठ स्रोतों का लाभ उठा सकता है। इसके अलावा, हमारी विधि उपलब्ध होने पर प्रदान किए गए MWEs का उपयोग कर सकती है, लेकिन एक पूरी तरह से असुरक्षित एल्गोरिथ्म के रूप में भी कार्य कर सकती है, एक एकल, डोमेन-अज्ञेयवादी भाग-ऑफ-स्पीच पैटर्न द्वारा भविष्यवाणी की गई MWE सीमाओं का उपयोग करके। पूर्व-परिभाषित MWE सीमाओं के साथ, हमारी विधि 50.4% के F1 स्कोर के साथ Tratz डेटासेट (Tratz, 2011) के मोटे-दाने वाले मूल्यांकन पर पिछले राज्य-कला प्रदर्शन को मात देती है। हमारी विधि का असुरक्षित संस्करण पर्यवेक्षित एक के प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचता है, और यहां तक कि कुछ कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में भी इसे मात देता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье исследуется неконтролируемый подход к изучению функции композиционного представления для многословных выражений (MWE) и оценивается ее на наборе данных Tratz, который связывает двухсловные выражения с семантической связью между составными компонентами (например, работодатель по этикетке связан с правительственным учреждением по соединению существительных) (Tratz, 2011). Композиционная функция основана на рекуррентных нейронных сетях и обучается с использованием цели Skip-Gram для прогнозирования слов в контексте MWE. Таким образом, наш подход может, естественно, использовать большие немеченные текстовые источники. Кроме того, наш метод может использовать предоставленные MWE, когда они доступны, но также может функционировать как полностью неконтролируемый алгоритм, используя границы MWE, предсказанные единым, доменно-диагностическим шаблоном части речи. При заданных границах MWE наш метод превосходит предыдущую современную производительность по грубозернистой оценке набора данных Tratz (Tratz, 2011) с баллом F1 50,4%. Неконтролируемая версия нашего метода приближается к производительности контролируемой, и даже превосходит ее в некоторых конфигурациях.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo cur chuige gan mhaoirseacht maidir le feidhm ionadaíochta comhdhéanaimh a fhoghlaim do nathanna ilfhoclacha (MWEanna), agus déantar é a mheas ar thacar sonraí Tratz, a nascann sloinn dhá fhocal leis an ngaol shéimeantach idir na comhábhair chumaisc (m.sh. tá baint ag fostóir an lipéid leis an ngníomhaireacht rialtais cumaisc ainmfhocail) (Tratz, 2011). Tá feidhm an chomhdhéanaimh bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha, agus cuirtear oiliúint uirthi trí úsáid a bhaint as cuspóir Skip-Gram chun na focail a thuar i gcomhthéacs MWEanna. Mar sin is féidir lenár gcur chuige giaráil nádúrtha a bhaint as foinsí móra téacs gan lipéad. Ina theannta sin, is féidir lenár modh úsáid a bhaint as MWEanna a chuirtear ar fáil nuair a bhíonn siad ar fáil, ach féadann sé feidhmiú mar algartam go hiomlán gan mhaoirseacht, ag baint úsáide as teorainneacha MWE atá tuartha ag patrún cuid cainte agnostic fearainn amháin. Agus teorainneacha MWE réamhshainithe againn, sáraíonn ár modh an fheidhmíocht úrscothach a bhí ann roimhe sin ar an measúnú garbh ar thacar sonraí Tratz (Tratz, 2011), le scór F1 de 50.4%. Téann an leagan neamhmhaoirsithe dár modh i bhfeidhm ar fheidhmíocht an mhodha faoi mhaoirseacht, agus fiú níos fearr ná é i bhfoirmíochtaí áirithe.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის განსხვავება მრავალური გამოსახულებისთვის კომპოზიციონალური გამოსახულების ფუნქცია (MWEs) და გამოსახულება ტრაცზის მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც ორი სიტყვალური გამოსახულების შესახებ სმენტიკური შესახებ კომპონციონალური შესახებ (მა კომპოზიციის ფუნქცია რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელების ბაზეზია, და იყენება შესწავლობული გამოყენებული Skip-Gram მიზეზი MWEs-ის კონტექსტში სიტყვები. ამიტომ ჩვენი მიზეზი შეიძლება, ნაირად, უფრო დიდი არაწერებული ტექსტის ფორმატების გამოყენება. დამატებით, ჩვენი მეტი შეიძლება გამოიყენოთ MWEs, როდესაც ხელმისაწარმოდგენა, მაგრამ შეიძლება გამოყენოთ როგორც ყველაფერად განსხვავებული ალგორიტიმ, გამოყენებული MWE ზომის გამოყენება, რომელიც ერთ წინ განსაზღვრებული MWE დრინეებით, ჩვენი მეტი უფრო გავაკეთება წინ შემდეგ სამყარო განსაზღვრებას სამყარო მონაცემების განსაზღვრებაზე (Tratz, 2011), რომელიც F1 წერტილი 50,4%-ის განსაზღვრებაში. ჩვენი მედიოდის არაფერიზებული ვერსია უფრო დაახლოდება მონახვედული მედიოდის კონფიგურაციაში, და უფრო უფრო გააკეთება.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány egy felügyelet nélküli megközelítést vizsgál a többszós kifejezések kompozíciós reprezentációs függvényének (MWE) tanulására, és ezt a Tratz adatkészleten értékeli, amely a kétszós kifejezéseket az összetett összetevők szemantikai kapcsolatával társítja (pl. a címke munkáltató a főnévösszetett kormányzati ügynökséghez kapcsolódik) (Tratz, 2011). A kompozíciós funkció visszatérő neurális hálózatokon alapul, és a Skip-Gram célkitűzés segítségével képezik a szavak előrejelzésére MWE-k kontextusában. Így megközelítésünk természetesen nagy, címke nélküli szövegforrásokat használhat. Továbbá, módszerünk használhatja a megadott MWE-ket, ha rendelkezésre áll, de teljesen felügyelet nélküli algoritmusként is működhet, egyetlen, domain-agnosztikus beszédminta által előrejelzett MWE határokat használva. Módszerünk előre meghatározott MWE határokkal felülmúlja a Tratz adatkészlet durva szemcsés értékelése korábbi korszerű teljesítményét (Tratz, 2011), F1 pontszám 50,4%. Módszerünk felügyelet nélküli változata megközelíti a felügyelt teljesítményét, sőt bizonyos konfigurációkban is felülmúlja azt.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά μια απρόβλεπτη προσέγγιση για την εκμάθηση μιας σύνθετης λειτουργίας αναπαράστασης για εκφράσεις πολλαπλών λέξεων (και την αξιολογεί στο σύνολο δεδομένων το οποίο συσχετίζει εκφράσεις δύο λέξεων με τη σημασιολογική σχέση μεταξύ των σύνθετων συστατικών (π.χ. ο εργοδότης της ετικέτας συνδέεται με την κρατική υπηρεσία σύνθετου ουσιαστικού) (Τρατζ, 2011). Η λειτουργία σύνθεσης βασίζεται σε επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα και εκπαιδεύεται χρησιμοποιώντας τον στόχο Skip-Gram για να προβλέψει τις λέξεις στο πλαίσιο των MWE. Έτσι, η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί φυσικά να αξιοποιήσει μεγάλες πηγές κειμένου χωρίς επισήμανση. Επιπλέον, η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να κάνει χρήση παρεχόμενων όταν είναι διαθέσιμη, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να λειτουργήσει ως εντελώς ανεξέλεγκτος αλγόριθμος, χρησιμοποιώντας όρια που προβλέπονται από ένα μόνο, άγνωστο τμήμα ομιλίας. Με προκαθορισμένα όρια, η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις προηγούμενες επιδόσεις στην χονδροειδής αξιολόγηση του συνόλου δεδομένων Τρατζ (Τρατζ, 2011), με βαθμολογία F1 50,4%. Η χωρίς επίβλεψη έκδοση της μεθόδου μας προσεγγίζει την απόδοση της εποπτευόμενης, ακόμη και την ξεπερνά σε ορισμένες διαμορφώσεις.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjamas nepastebimas požiūris į daugžodžių išraiškų sudėties atstovavimo funkciją (MWEs) ir vertinamas Tratz duomenų rinkinyje, kuriame dvižodžiai išraiškų siejami su semantiniu jungtinių sudedamųjų dalių ryšiu (pvz., etiketės darbdavys siejamas su jungtinės vyriausybės agentūra (Tratz, 2011). Kompozicija grindžiama pasikartojančiais nerviniais tinklais ir mokoma naudojant Skip-Gram tikslą prognozuoti žodžius MWEs kontekste. Taigi mūsų požiūris, žinoma, gali sutelkti didelius nepažymėtus teksto šaltinius. Be to, mūsų metodas gali pasinaudoti suteiktais MWEs, kai yra, bet taip pat gali veikti kaip visiškai nepastebimas algoritmas, naudojant MWE ribas, numatytas vienu, domino-agnostiniu kalbos dalies modeliu. Pagal iš anksto nustatytas MWE ribas mūsų metodas viršija ankstesnius pažangiausius Tratz duomenų rinkinio (Tratz, 2011 m.), kurio F1 rezultatas yra 50,4 %. Neprižiūrima mūsų metodo versija artėja prie prižiūrimojo metodo veiklos rezultatų, o net kai kuriose konfigūracijose jis yra didesnis.', 'it': "Questo articolo esplora un approccio non supervisionato all'apprendimento di una funzione di rappresentazione compositiva per espressioni multi-parola (MWE), e lo valuta sul dataset di Tratz, che associa espressioni di due parole alla relazione semantica tra i costituenti composti (ad esempio, il datore di lavoro dell'etichetta è associato con il sostantivo composto agenzia governativa) (Tratz, 2011). La funzione di composizione si basa su reti neurali ricorrenti ed è addestrata utilizzando l'obiettivo Skip-Gram per prevedere le parole nel contesto di MWE. Così il nostro approccio può naturalmente sfruttare grandi fonti di testo non etichettate. Inoltre, il nostro metodo può fare uso di MWE forniti quando disponibili, ma può anche funzionare come un algoritmo completamente non supervisionato, utilizzando i confini MWE previsti da un singolo pattern part-of-speech agnostic del dominio. Con limiti MWE predefiniti, il nostro metodo supera le prestazioni precedenti allo stato dell'arte sulla valutazione grossolana del dataset Tratz (Tratz, 2011), con un punteggio F1 del 50,4%. La versione non supervisionata del nostro metodo si avvicina alle prestazioni di quello supervisionato, e addirittura le supera in alcune configurazioni.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бірнеше сөз өрнектерінің композиционалық түсініктеме функциясын оқытуға арналмаған тәсілді зерттеп, оны Трас деректер жиынында бағалады. Бұл композиционалық компоненттер арасындағы семантикалық қатынас (мысалы, жарлық жұмыс істейтін үкімет агенциясына сәйкес келеді) (Tra Композициялық функциясы қайталанатын невралды желіне негізделген және MWEs контекстінде сөздерді алдын- ала алу үшін Skip- Gram мақсатын қолданып тұрады. Біздің тәсіліміміз дәрігерлі жазылмаған мәтін көзіне көмектесе алады. Кейін біздің әдіміміз келтірілген MWE- ді қолдануға болады, бірақ сонымен қатар бір доменге агностикалық сөздің бөлігін қолданып MWE шектерін қолдануға болады. Алдын- ала анықталған MWE шектерімізде, біздің әдіміміз Траст деректер жиынының (Tratz, 2011) бағдарламасының алдыңғы күйінде 50,4% деген жұмыс істеу үшін таңдайды. Біздің әдіміміздің бақылаған нұсқасы бақылаған нұсқасының істеуіне жақын, сондай-ақ ол кейбір баптауларында жоқ болады.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi pendekatan tidak diawasi untuk mempelajari fungsi perwakilan komposisi untuk ungkapan berbilang perkataan (MWEs), dan mengevaluasinya pada set data Tratz, yang mengaitkan ungkapan dua perkataan dengan hubungan semantik diantara komponen komponen (cth. pegawai label diaitkan dengan agensi kerajaan komponen nama) (Tratz, 2011). Fungsi komposisi berdasarkan rangkaian saraf berulang, dan dilatih menggunakan objektif Skip-Gram untuk meramalkan perkataan dalam konteks MWEs. Oleh itu pendekatan kita boleh secara alami mengambil alih sumber teks yang besar tanpa tanda. Lagipun, kaedah kami boleh menggunakan MWEs yang disediakan apabila tersedia, tetapi juga boleh berfungsi sebagai algoritma yang tidak diawasi sepenuhnya, menggunakan sempadan MWE yang dijangka oleh satu, domain-agnostic bahagian corak-ucapan. Dengan sempadan MWE yang ditakrif-dahulu, kaedah kita melampaui prestasi terakhir pada penilaian terbuka set data Tratz (Tratz, 2011), dengan skor F1 50.4%. Versi kaedah kita yang tidak diawasi mendekati prestasi yang diawasi, dan bahkan melampaui prestasi dalam beberapa konfigurasi.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го истражува ненадгледуваниот пристап до учењето на функција на композиционална претставничка функција за мултизборни изрази (МВЕ) и го оценува на датотеката Трац, која ги асоционира двзборните изрази со семантичната врска помеѓу композиционалните составници (на пример, работодавачот на етикетата е асоциониран со владината Функцијата на композиција се базира на рецидентни нервни мрежи и се обучува со користење на целта Skip-Gram за предвидување на зборовите во контекст на MWEs. Така нашиот пристап природно може да влијае на големи неозначени извори на текст. Further, our method can make use of provided MWEs when available, but can also function as a completely unsupervised algorithm, using MWE boundaries predicted by a single, domain-agnostic part-of-speech pattern.  Со преддефинирани граници на МВЕ, нашиот метод ја надминува претходната најнова изведба на грубата оценка на датотеката Трац (Tratz, 2011), со оценка Ф1 од 50,4 отсто. Ненадгледуваната верзија на нашиот метод се приближува до изведувањето на надгледуваниот, дури и ја надминува во некои конфигурации.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас олон үгийн илэрхийлэл (MWEs) дээрх бүрдүүлэлтийн функцын суралцах боломжгүй арга замыг судалж, Трас өгөгдлийн санд хоёр үгийн илэрхийлэл холбоотой (жишээлбэл, засгийн газрын агентлагтай холбоотой) хоёр үгийн илэрхийлэл холбоотой байдаг. Бүтээлтийн функц нь дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан бөгөөд MWEs-ийн тохиолдолд үгсийг таамаглах зорилго ашиглаж сургалтын зорилго юм. Тиймээс бидний арга барилга нь магадгүй том бичил бичил мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрийг нөлөөлж чадна. Дараа нь бидний арга нь MWE-г хэрэглэх үед ашиглаж чадна, гэхдээ мөн бүрэн дэмжигдэхгүй алгоритм болгож, MWE хязгаарыг ашиглаж чадна. Эхлээд тодорхойлогдсон MWE хязгаарын хугацаанд бидний арга нь Tratz өгөгдлийн санг (Tratz, 2011), F1 оноо 50.4%-той илүү өмнөх урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг дамжуулдаг. Бидний арга замын баталгаагүй хувилбар нь удирдаггүй хүмүүсийн үйл ажиллагааны тулд ойртож, зарим загваруудын тусламжтайгаар ч үр дүнтэй болдог.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പലവാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത ഒരു സംവിധാനത്തിനുള്ള പ്രാധാന്യം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ട്രാട്ട്സ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d അതിനെ വിലയിക്കുന്നു. അത് രണ്ട് വാക് ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണു് ഈ സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്നതു്, എംഡബ്ലിഎസിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിലെ വാ അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം സ്വാഭാവികമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d MWEs ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതാണ്, ഒര മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട MWE അതിരുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട രാജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥാനത്തെ കോര്\u200dസ് ഗ്രാപ്റ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസറ് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സംസാരം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടവന്\u200dറെ പ്രകടനത്തിന് അടുത്ത് വരുന്നു. ചില ക്രമീകര', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jesplora approċċ mhux sorveljat g ħat-tagħlim ta’ funzjoni ta’ rappreżentanza kompożittiva għall-espressjonijiet b’ħafna kliem (MWEs), u jevalwah fuq is-sett tad-dejta Tratz, li jassoċja espressjonijiet b’żewġ kliem mar-relazzjoni semantika bejn il-kostitwenti komposti (pereżempju t-tikketta min iħaddem hija assoċjata mal-a ġenzija tal-gvern b’denominazzjoni komposta) (Tratz, 2011). Il-funzjoni tal-kompożizzjoni hija bbażata fuq netwerks newrali rikorrenti, u hija mħarrġa bl-użu tal-objettiv Skip-Gram biex tipprevedi l-kliem fil-kuntest tal-MWEs. Għalhekk l-approċċ tagħna jista’ naturalment iħeġġeġ sorsi kbar tat-test mingħajr tikketta. Barra minn hekk, il-metodu tagħna jista’ jagħmel użu mill-MWEs ipprovduti meta disponibbli, iżda jista’ wkoll jiffunzjona bħala algoritmu kompletament mhux sorveljat, bl-użu tal-limiti tal-MWE previsti minn mudell wieħed, domain-agnostic part-of-speech. Bil-fruntieri MWE definiti minn qabel, il-metodu tagħna jaqbeż il-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata pre ċedenti fuq l-evalwazzjoni tal-ġabra tad-dejta Tratz (Tratz, 2011), b’punteġġ F1 ta’ 50,4 %. Il-verżjoni mhux sorveljata tal-metodu tagħna tilħaq il-prestazzjoni tal-metodu sorveljat, u saħansitra taqbeżha f’xi konfigurazzjonijiet.', 'no': 'Denne papiret utforskar e it usikkerte tilnærming til å lære eit komposisjonell representasjonsfunksjon for fleire ord uttrykk (MWEs) og evaluerer det på Tratz-dataset, som assosierer to ord uttrykk med semantiske forhold mellom komponentane (f.eks. arbeidsgiveren er assosiert med namnet samanserte regjeringsagencien) (Tratz, 2011). Komposisjonsfunksjonen er basert på gjentaande neuralnettverk, og vert trent med målet Skip- Gram for å foregå ord i konteksten av MWEs. Derfor tilnærminga vårt kan naturleg levera stor ikkje-merkelige tekstkilder. I tillegg kan metoden vårt bruka tilgjengelege MWEs når det er tilgjengelege, men kan også funksjonare som ein fullstendig ikkje oppretta algoritme ved bruk av MWE-grenser som foregår av ein enkelt domeneagnostisk del-av-talemønster. Med føredefinerte MWE-grenser vil metoden vårt utføre den førre utviklinga av kunsten på utviklinga av tretz-datasettet (Tratz, 2011), med eit F1-poeng på 50,4%. Den ugjennomsiktige versjonen av metoden vår nærmer utviklinga av den oversikte, og til og med utfører den i nokre oppsett.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada bez nadzoru podejście do nauki funkcji reprezentacji kompozycyjnej dla wyrażeń wielowłowych (MWE) i ocenia go na zbiorze danych Tratz, który kojarzy wyrażenia dwusłowowe z relacją semantyczną między składnikami złożonymi (np. pracodawca etykiety jest związany z rzeczownikiem złożonym agencją rządową) (Tratz, 2011). Funkcja kompozycji opiera się na powtarzających się sieciach neuronowych i jest trenowana przy użyciu obiektu Skip-Gram do przewidywania słów w kontekście MWE. W ten sposób nasze podejście może naturalnie wykorzystać duże nieoznakowane źródła tekstu. Ponadto nasza metoda może wykorzystywać dostarczone MWE, jeśli są dostępne, ale może również funkcjonować jako całkowicie nienadzorowany algorytm, wykorzystujący granice MWE przewidywane przez pojedynczy, agnostyczny wzorzec części mowy. Dzięki wstępnie zdefiniowanym granicam MWE, nasza metoda przewyższa poprzednie najnowocześniejsze wyniki oceny gruboziarnistej zbioru danych Tratza (Tratz, 2011), z wynikiem F1 50,4%. Wersja naszej metody bez nadzoru zbliża się do wydajności nadzorowanej, a nawet przewyższa ją w niektórych konfiguracjach.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea explorează o abordare nesupravegheată a învățării unei funcții de reprezentare compozițională a expresiilor cu mai multe cuvinte (MWE) și o evaluează pe setul de date Tratz, care asociază expresiile cu două cuvinte cu relația semantică dintre constituenții compuși (de exemplu, angajatorul etichetei este asociat cu substantivul compus agenția guvernamentală) (Tratz, 2011). Funcția de compoziție se bazează pe rețele neurale recurente și este instruită folosind obiectivul Skip-Gram pentru a prezice cuvintele în contextul MWE. Astfel, abordarea noastră poate utiliza în mod natural surse mari de text fără etichete. Mai mult, metoda noastră poate utiliza MWE furnizate atunci când este disponibilă, dar poate funcționa, de asemenea, ca un algoritm complet nesupravegheat, utilizând limitele MWE prezise printr-un singur model de parte a vorbirii agnostic domeniu. Cu limite predefinite MWE, metoda noastră depășește performanțele anterioare de ultimă generație în evaluarea grosieră a setului de date Tratz (Tratz, 2011), cu un scor F1 de 50,4%. Versiunea nesupravegheată a metodei noastre abordează performanța celui supravegheat și chiar o depășește în unele configurații.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu baaraandegayaa qaab a an la ilaalinayn in lagu barto kooxa xuquuqda hadal badan (MWEs), wuxuuna ku qiimeeyaa taariikhda Tratz, kaas oo ku saabsan labada hadal oo ku saabsan xiriirka semantic oo u dhaxaysa xerada midowga guud (e.g. shaqo-bixiyaha calaamadda waxaa la xiriira ururka xuquuqda (Tratz, 2011). Iskaaskaas waxaa ku saleysan shabakado neurada ah oo soo socda, waxaana lagu tababaraa isticmaalka shabakada Skip-Gram si uu ugu hor sheego hadalka ku qoran MWEs. Sidaa darteed dhaqdhaqaalahayagu waxay si dabiicadda ah u sameyn karaan noocyo badan oo aan la aqoon karin. Waxaa kale oo uu isticmaali karaa qaababkayaga ay MWEs siiyaan marka ay jiraan, laakiin sidoo kale wuxuu u shaqeyn karaa sida algorithm oo dhan oo aan la ilaalin karin, oo uu ku isticmaali karo xuduudaha MWE oo kaliya oo hal qayb ah oo ku qoran hadalka. Inta uu ku qoran MWE xuduudaha hore, qaabkeenu wuxuu sameeyaa xaaladdii hore ee farshaxanta ku qoran koox-grained qiimeynta koox-data set (Tratz, 2011), iyadoo leh F1 score 50.4%. Tusaalada aan la ilaalinayn methodeena wuxuu u soo dhowaadaa in la sameeyo qofka ilaaliyey, xittaa wuxuu ku soo bandhigaa koonfureed qaarkood.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවස්ථාවෙන්නේ නැහැ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙනගන්න සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් (MWE), ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ට්\u200dර සම්පූර්ණ වැඩසටහන් වැඩසටහන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයේ ආධාරිත වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ස්කිප්-ග්\u200dරාම් අරක්\u200dෂාව භ ඉතින් අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ස්වභාවිතයෙන් ලොකු පාළුවන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරයි. ඉතින්, අපේ විධානය පුළුවන් MWE වලින් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන්, නමුත් සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම නොපුරුද්ධික ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් වැඩ කරන්න පු මුලින් විශ්වාස කරපු MWE සීමාව සමග, අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා පළවෙනි ස්ථිතිය-ක්\u200dරේන්ඩ් සීමාව (Tratz, 2011), ට්\u200dරැ අපේ විධානයේ නිර්ධාරිත සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඒක සමහර සංවිධානය වලින් ප්\u200dර', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker ett oövervakat förhållningssätt till att lära sig en kompositionsrepresentationsfunktion för flerordsuttryk (MWE), och utvärderar den på Tratz datauppsättningen, som associerar tvåordsuttryk med den semantiska relationen mellan de sammansatta beståndsdelarna (t.ex. etikettarbetsgivaren är associerad med substantivföreningen statlig myndighet) (Tratz, 2011). Sammansättningsfunktionen är baserad på återkommande neurala nätverk och tränas med hjälp av Skip-Gram-målet för att förutsäga orden i samband med MWE. På så sätt kan vårt tillvägagångssätt naturligtvis utnyttja stora omärkta textkällor. Vidare kan vår metod använda sig av tillhandahållna MWE när de finns tillgängliga, men kan också fungera som en helt oövervakad algoritm, med hjälp av MWE-gränser som förutspås av ett enda domänagnostiskt deltal mönster. Med fördefinierade MWE-gränser överträffar vår metod den tidigare toppmoderna prestandan på grovkornig utvärdering av Tratz datauppsättningen (Tratz, 2011), med en F1-poäng på 50,4%. Den oövervakade versionen av vår metod närmar sig prestandan hos den övervakade, och till och med överträffar den i vissa konfigurationer.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje nepotrebni pristup učenju funkcije kompozicionalnog predstavljanja za višeriječne izraze (MWEs) i procjenjuje g a na setu podataka Tratz, koja povezuje izraze dve riječi sa semantičnim odnosima između kompozicijskih sastavnika (npr. poslodavac za etikete povezan sa imenom spojenom vladinom agencijom) (Tratz, 2011). Funkcija kompozicije se temelji na recidivnim neuralnim mrežama, i obučena je koristeći cilj Skip-Gram da predvidi reči u kontekstu MWEs-a. Dakle, naš pristup prirodno može uticati na velike neopisivane izvore teksta. Nadalje, naša metoda može iskoristiti pružene MWE kada je dostupna, ali može funkcionisati kao potpuno neodređeni algoritam, koristeći granice MWE predviđene jednom domenom agnostičkom dijelom govora. Sa preddefiniranim granicama MWE-a, naša metoda je nadmašila prethodnu prednost umjetnosti na procjenu podataka Tratz-a (Tratz, 2011), sa rezultatom F1 od 50,4%. Nepotvrđena verzija našeg metoda se približava izvršnošću nadzornika, i čak ga i nadmašuje u nekim konfiguracijama.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ مختلف کلمات مثالیں (MWEs) کے لئے ایک کامپیوتنی نمایش فعالیت کی تعلیم کے لئے غیر قابل تحقیق کی طریقہ کا تحقیق کرتا ہے اور اسے ترتز ڈیٹسٹ پر ارزیابی کرتا ہے، جسے دو کلمات مثالیں متحدہ مقامات کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ کے ساتھ مشترک کرتی ہیں (یعنی لیبل کارساز نام متحدہ حکومت ایجنسی کے ساتھ مش کامپیوسیٹ فونکس دوبارہ نیورل نیٹورک پر بنیاد ہے اور MWEs کے کنٹنس میں کلمات کی پیش آنے کے لئے Skip-Gram موجود کے استعمال سے تعلیم کی جاتی ہے. اسی طرح ہمارا تقریبا طبیعی طور پر بڑے غیر قابل نوشتہ متن سورجوں کو فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے۔ اور ہمارا طریقہ موجود ہونے کے موقع موجود MWEs سے استعمال کر سکتا ہے، لیکن یہ بھی کامل غیر قابل الگوریتم کے طور پر کامل کرسکتا ہے، MWE حدود سے استعمال کر سکتا ہے جو ایک دامین-agnostic قسم کی بات پٹرنے کے ذریعہ پیش کیا گیا ہے. پیش تعریف کی MWE حدود کے ساتھ، ہمارا طریقہ 50.4% کی F1 سکوٹ کے ذریعہ سے پہلے ترازز ڈاٹسٹ کے کرس-دانے کی ارزیابی پر فعال کرتا ہے. ہمارے طریقے کی غیر قابل تحقیق کی نسخہ ایک پر آتا ہے اور اس کو کچھ سازواروں میں بھی زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'This paper explores an unsupervised approach to learning a compositional representation function for multi-word expressions (MWEs), and evaluates it on the Tratz dataset, which associates two-word expressions with the semantic relation between the compound constituents (e.g. the label employer is associated with the noun compound government agency) (Tratz, 2011).  இந்த கூட்டு செயல்பாடு திரும்ப நெருக்கிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, மறுபடியும் MWEs சூழலில் உள்ள வார்த்தைகளை முன்வாக அதனால் எங்கள் அணுகல் இயற்கையாகவே பெரிய குறிப்பிடப்படாத உரை மூலம் மேலும், எங்கள் முறைமை MWEs வழங்கும் போது பயன்படுத்த முடியும், ஆனால் முழுமையாக காப்பாற்றப்படாத algorithm ஆக செயல்பட முடியும். முன் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட MWE எல்லைகளுடன், எங்கள் முறைமையில் முந்தைய நிலையில் செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது தெற்கைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட திரை தரவுத்தளத்தின் மதிப்பு (Tratz, 2011), 50. 4%  எங்கள் முறைமையின் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத பதிப்பு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு செயலை நெருங்குகிறது, சில வடிவமைப்புகளில் கூட அதை', 'uz': "Bu hujjat bir so'zlar davomida bir so'zlar (MWEs) ta'minlovchi tashkilotni o'rganish uchun xavfsiz qilinadigan usulni o'rganish imkoniyatlarni aniqlaydi va ularni Tratz maʼlumotlar tarkibida qiymatga e g a qiladi. Bu ikkita so'zlar taʼminlovchiga bog'liqdir (масалан, yorliq ishchi tashkilotlari notoʻg ʻri xavfli tashkilotlariga bogʻli Name Thus our approach can naturally leverage large unlabeled text sources.  Koʻrsatgich, bizning usuli mavjud boʻlganda MWEs ishlatiladi, ammo o o'zimiz xavfsiz qilmagan algorithm sifatida ishlatiladi, bitta, domen-agnostic qismi va gapirish patterni koʻrsatilgan MWE chegaralaridan foydalanishi mumkin. Birinchi aniqlangan MWE chegaralari bilan, bizning birinchi darajadagi sanat jarayonlarini bajaradi. Tratz maʼlumotlar sahifasini qiymatlash (Tratz, 2011), 50.4 foiz bilan birinchi qiymatni bajaradi. Ustunning saqlanmagan versiyasi, boshqaruvchining amalni bajarishiga qaradi va xato buni bir necha moslamalarda bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu một phương pháp không giám sát để học một chức năng phân phối hợp cho các biểu thức đa từ (MWEs) và đánh giá nó trên bộ dữ liệu Tratz, nó liên kết các biểu thức hai từ với mối liên hệ về phân biệt biệt chữ với các thành phần (v.d. người thuê nhãn được g ắn liền với cơ quan chính phủ liên danh từ) (Tratz, 2011). Thành phần dựa trên các mạng thần kinh liên tục được huấn luyện bằng mục tiêu Skip-Gram để dự đoán các từ trong ngữ cảnh MWEs. Do đó, cách tiếp cận của chúng ta có thể thúc đẩy các nguồn văn bản không tải. Hơn nữa, phương pháp của chúng tôi có thể sử dụng MX được cung cấp khi sẵn sàng, nhưng cũng có thể hoạt động như một thuật toán hoàn toàn không giám sát, sử dụng ranh giới kiểu MWE được dự đoán bởi một mẫu ngôn ngữ riêng. Với những ranh giới kiểu MX được xác định, thì phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được thành quả cao nhất trong quá trình đánh giá cao thô của tập tin Tratz (Tratz, 2011), với một điểm F1 của 50.4=. Một phiên bản không được giám sát của phương pháp của chúng ta tiến gần đến hiệu quả của cái được giám sát, và thậm chí hoàn thiện nó trong một số cấu hình.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва един ненадзорен подход към изучаването на композиционна функция за многословни изрази и го оценява на набора от данни Трац, който свързва двусловните изрази със семантичната връзка между съставните съставки (напр. работодателят на етикета е свързан със съществителното съединено държавно ведомство) (Трац, 2011). Функцията за състав се основава на повтарящи се невронни мрежи и се обучава с помощта на целта Skip-Gram за предсказване на думите в контекста на MWE. По този начин нашият подход естествено може да използва големи източници на текст без етикет. Освен това нашият метод може да използва предоставените MWE, когато са налични, но също така може да функционира като напълно ненадзорен алгоритъм, използвайки границите на MWE, прогнозирани от един, домейн-агностичен модел част от речта. С предварително определени граници на МВЕ, нашият метод надминава предишните най-съвременни резултати при грубозърнестата оценка на набора от данни Трац (Трац, 2011), с оценка от 50,4%. Ненадзорният вариант на метода ни подхожда към изпълнението на надзорния и дори го превъзхожда в някои конфигурации.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje nepotrebni pristup učenju funkcije kompozicionalnog zastupanja za višeriječne izraze (MWEs) i procjenjuje g a na setu podataka Tratz, koja pridružuje dvije riječi izraze semantične veze između kompozicija (npr. poslodavca oznake povezana s imenskim vladinim agencijom) (Tratz, 2011). Funkcija kompozicije temeljena je na recidivnim nervnim mrežama i obučena koristeći cilj Skip-Gram kako bi predvidjela riječi u kontekstu MWEs-a. Dakle, naš pristup može prirodno utjecati na velike neopisivane izvore teksta. Nadalje, naša metoda može iskoristiti pružene MWE kada je dostupna, ali može funkcionirati kao potpuno neodređeni algoritam, koristeći granice MWE predviđene jednom domenom agnostičkom dijelom govora. S preddefiniranim granicama MWE-a, naša metoda iznosi prethodnu postupku umjetnosti na procjenu podataka Tratz-a (Tratz, 2011), s rezultatom F1 od 50,4%. Nepotvrđena verzija našeg metoda se približava učinkovitosti nadzornika, a čak ga i nadmašuje u nekim konfiguracijama.', 'da': "Denne artikel undersøger en uautoriseret tilgang til at lære en kompositionsrepræsentationsfunktion for flere ord udtryk (MWE), og evaluerer den på Tratz datasættet, som associerer to-ord udtryk med den semantiske relation mellem de sammensatte bestanddele (f.eks. etiketarbejdsgiveren er associeret med substantivsammensætningen regeringsorgan) (Tratz, 2011). Sammensætningsfunktionen er baseret på tilbagevendende neurale netværk og trænes ved hjælp af Skip-Gram-målet til at forudsige ordene i sammenhæng med MWE. Derfor kan vores tilgang naturligvis udnytte store mærkede tekstkilder. Desuden kan vores metode gøre brug af leverede MWE'er, når de er tilgængelige, men kan også fungere som en helt uautoriseret algoritme ved hjælp af MWE-grænser, der forudsiges af et enkelt domæneagnostisk del-of-tale mønster. Med foruddefinerede MWE grænser overgår vores metode den tidligere state-of-the-art præstation på den grovkornede evaluering af Tratz datasættet (Tratz, 2011), med en F1 score på 50,4%. Den uautoriserede version af vores metode nærmer sig ydeevnen af den overvågede, og endda overgår den i nogle konfigurationer.", 'nl': "Dit artikel onderzoekt een onbeheerde benadering van het leren van een compositionele representatiefunctie voor meerwoorduitdrukkingen (MWE's), en evalueert deze op de Tratz dataset, die tweewoorduitdrukkingen associeert met de semantische relatie tussen de samengestelde bestanddelen (bijvoorbeeld de label employer is geassocieerd met het zelfstandige overheidsagentschap) (Tratz, 2011). De compositiefunctie is gebaseerd op terugkerende neurale netwerken en is getraind met behulp van de Skip-Gram doelstelling om de woorden te voorspellen in de context van MWE's. Zo kan onze aanpak natuurlijk gebruik maken van grote niet-gelabelde tekstbronnen. Verder kan onze methode gebruik maken van verstrekte MWE's indien beschikbaar, maar kan ook functioneren als een volledig onbeheerd algoritme, met behulp van MWE-grenzen voorspeld door een enkel, domein-agnostisch deel-van-spraak patroon. Met vooraf gedefinieerde MWE grenzen presteert onze methode beter dan de vorige state-of-the-art prestaties bij de grove evaluatie van de Tratz dataset (Tratz, 2011), met een F1 score van 50,4%. De onbeheerde versie van onze methode benadert de prestaties van de begeleide methode en presteert zelfs beter in sommige configuraties.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit untersucht einen unüberwachten Ansatz zum Erlernen einer kompositorischen Repräsentationsfunktion für Mehrwortausdrücke (MWEs) und wertet sie auf dem Tratz-Datensatz aus, der Zweiwortausdrücke mit der semantischen Beziehung zwischen den zusammengesetzten Bestandteilen assoziiert (z.B. der Label Arbeitgeber ist mit der Substantiv zusammengesetzten Regierungsbehörde assoziiert) (Tratz, 2011). Die Kompositionsfunktion basiert auf wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzen und wird mit dem Skip-Gram-Ziel trainiert, die Wörter im Kontext von MWEs vorherzusagen. So kann unser Ansatz natürlich große, nicht beschriftete Textquellen nutzen. Darüber hinaus kann unsere Methode bereitgestellte MWEs verwenden, wenn verfügbar, aber auch als völlig unbeaufsichtigter Algorithmus funktionieren, der MWE-Grenzen verwendet, die durch ein einzelnes, domänennagnostisches Sprachteilmuster vorhergesagt werden. Mit vordefinierten MWE-Grenzen übertrifft unsere Methode den bisherigen Stand der Technik bei der grobkörnigen Auswertung des Tratz-Datensatzes (Tratz, 2011), mit einem F1-Score von 50,4%. Die unbeaufsichtigte Version unserer Methode nähert sich der Leistung der überwachten Methode und übertrifft sie in einigen Konfigurationen sogar.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi pendekatan yang tidak diawasi untuk mempelajari fungsi represisi komposisi untuk ekspresi multi-kata (MWEs), dan mengevaluasinya pada set data Tratz, yang mengasyorkan ekspresi dua-kata dengan hubungan semantis antara komponen (contohnya label employer diasyorkan dengan agensi pemerintah komponen nama) (Tratz, 2011). Fungsi komposisi berdasarkan jaringan saraf yang berkurang, dan dilatih menggunakan tujuan Skip-Gram untuk memprediksi kata-kata dalam konteks MWEs. Jadi pendekatan kita secara alami dapat mengambil alih sumber teks besar tanpa label. Lagipula, metode kami dapat menggunakan MWEs yang diberikan ketika tersedia, tetapi juga dapat berfungsi sebagai algoritma yang tidak diawasi sepenuhnya, menggunakan batas MWE yang diprediksi oleh satu, domain-agnostik bagian dari pola pidato. Dengan batas MWE yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya, metode kita melebihi penampilan terbaik sebelumnya pada evaluasi dataset Tratz (Tratz, 2011), dengan skor F1 50,4%. Versi yang tidak diawasi dari metode kita mendekati prestasi yang diawasi, dan bahkan melampaui prestasi dalam beberapa konfigurasi.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linatafuta mbinu zisizo na uhakika wa kujifunza kazi ya uwakilishi kwa maneno mengi (MWEs), na kutathmini kwenye seti ya data ya Tratz, ambayo inahusiana na hotuba mbili za maneno na uhusiano wa kimapenzi kati ya constituents (kwa mfano, mwajiri wa alama anaunganishwa na shirika la serikali la msingi) (Tratz, 2011). Mpango huu unatumiwa na mitandao ya uraia yanayoendelea, na unafundishwa kwa kutumia lengo la Skip-Gram kutabiri maneno katika muktadha wa MWEs. Hivyo hatua yetu inaweza kutumika vyanzo vikubwa vya maandishi yasiyoeleweka. Zaidi ya hayo, mbinu yetu inaweza kutumia MWEs pale ambapo inapatikana, lakini pia inaweza kufanya kazi kama algorithi isiyohifadhiwa kabisa, kwa kutumia mipaka ya MWE iliyotabiriwa na sehemu moja ya mazungumzo ya ndani. With pre-defined MWE boundaries, our method outperforms the previous state-of-the-art performance on the coarse-grained evaluation of the Tratz dataset (Tratz, 2011), with an F1 score of 50.4%.  Toleo lisiloelewekwa la mbinu yetu linakaribia utendaji wa aliyetawala, na hata linaonyesha katika baadhi ya mifumo.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش غیرقابل تحقیق می\u200cکند برای یاد گرفتن یک عملکرد نمایش\u200cسازی ترکیبی برای تعریف\u200cهای چند کلمه (MWEs) و آن را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ترتز ارزیابی می\u200cکند، که با ارتباط دو کلمه با ارتباط semantic بین مجموعه\u200cهای ترکیب متصل می\u200cکند (مثال کارگر برچسب با آژانس دولتی معمولی (Tratz, 2011). عملکرد ترکیب بر روی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی تکرار شده است، و با استفاده از هدف Skip-Gram آموزش داده می\u200cشود تا کلمات را در محیط MWEs پیش بینی کند. بنابراین طریق ما طبیعی می تواند منابع متن غیر قابل استفاده قرار دهد. Furthermore, our method can use MWEs provided when available, but can also function as a completely unsupervised algorithm, using MWE boundaries predicted by a single, domain-agnostic part-of-speech. با مرزهای MWE پیش تعریف شده، روش ما عملکرد موقعیت هنری پیشین را بر ارزیابی داده\u200cهای ترتز (Tratz, 2011) با نمونه\u200cهای F1 50.4 درصد انجام می\u200cدهد. نسخه\u200cی غیرقابل توجه\u200cای از روش\u200cهای ما به عملکرد بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cای نزدیک می\u200cشود، و حتی در بعضی پیکربندی\u200cها آن را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '본고는 다중 단어 표현식(MWE)의 조합 표시 함수를 감독하지 않는 방법을 모색하고 Tratz 데이터 집합에서 이를 평가했다. 이 데이터 집합은 두 단어 표현식과 복합 성분 간의 의미 관계를 연결한다(예를 들어 라벨 고용주와 명사 복합 정부 기구가 연결된다)(Tratz, 2011).합성 함수는 역귀신경 네트워크를 기반으로 하며, MWE 컨텍스트의 단어를 예측하기 위해 스킵 그램 타겟을 사용하여 훈련한다.따라서 우리의 방법은 자연히 대형 미표기 텍스트 원본을 이용할 수 있다.그 밖에 우리의 방법은 사용할 수 있을 때 제공된 MWE를 사용할 수 있지만, 완전히 감독이 없는 알고리즘으로서 하나의 알 수 없는 영역의 어성 모델로 예측된 MWE 경계를 사용할 수도 있다.미리 정의된 MWE 경계를 통해 우리의 방법은 Tratz 데이터 집합(Tratz, 2011)에 대해 굵은 입도 평가를 할 때 이전의 최신 성능보다 우수하고 F1은 50.4%로 나뉜다.우리의 방법의 비감독 버전은 감독 버전의 성능에 가깝고 심지어 일부 설정에서 감독 버전보다 우수하다.', 'af': "Hierdie papier ondersoek 'n onverondersteunde toegang tot leer van 'n komponensielle voorskyning funksie vir veelvuldige woorde uitdrukkings (MWEs), en evalueer dit op die Tratz datastel, wat toesluit twee woorde uitdrukkings met die semantiese verhouding tussen die komponente bestuurders (bv. die etiket bediener is geassosieer met die groot komponente regeringagensie) (Tratz, 2011). Die opstelling funksie is gebaseer op herhaalde neuralnetwerke, en is opgelei gebruik van die Skip- Gram objek om die woorde in die konteks van MWEs te voorskou. So kan ons toegang natuurlik groot ongeabelde teksbronne vervolg. Verder, ons metode kan gebruik van verskaf MWEs wanneer beskikbaar, maar kan ook funksioneer as 'n heeltemal ongeonderwerp algoritme, gebruik MWE grense wat deur 'n enkele, domein- agnostiese deel- van- sprekkpatroon voorskou is. Met voor-gedefinieerde MWE grense, ons metode uitvoer die vorige state-of-the-art-prestasie op die koörs-grained evaluering van die Tratz datastel (Tratz, 2011), met 'n F1 punt van 50.4%. Die onverondersteunde weergawe van ons metode naby die prestasie van die ondersoekte een, en selfs uitvoer dit in sommige opstelling.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument shqyrton një qasje të pazgjidhur për të mësuar një funksion përfaqësimi kompozitiv për shprehjet me shumë fjalë (MWEs) dhe e vlerëson atë në grupin e të dhënave Tratz, i cili shoqëron shprehjet me dy fjalë me marrëdhëniet semantike midis përbërësve të kompozitave (për shembull, punëdhënësi i etiketës është shoqëruar me agjensinë e emrave të kompozitave qeveritare) (Tratz, 2011). Funksioni i përbërjes është bazuar në rrjetet e përsëritura nervore dhe është trajnuar duke përdorur objektivin Skip-Gram për të parashikuar fjalët në kontekstin e MWEs. Kështu qasja jonë natyralisht mund të përdorë burime të mëdha teksti pa etiketë. Për më tepër, metoda jonë mund të përdorë MWEs të siguruara kur të jetë e disponueshme, por mund të funksionojë gjithashtu si një algoritëm krejtësisht i pazgjidhur, duke përdorur kufijtë MWE të parashikuar nga një model i vetëm, domain-agnostic pjesë e fjalimit. Me kufijtë e MWE-së të përcaktuara para, metoda jonë kalon performancën e mëparshme më të lartë në vlerësimin e rrezikshëm të grupit të të dhënave Tratz (Tratz, 2011), me një rezultat F1 prej 50.4%. Versioni i pa mbikqyrur i metodës sonë afrohet performancës së të mbikqyrurit dhe madje e kalon atë në disa konfigurime.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በብዛት ቃላት አካላት (MWEs) ለመማር የማይጠበቀው የአካባቢ መልዕክት መልዕክት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ቦታ ስለዚህም የሥርዓታችን መልዕክት ባሕላዊ የጽሑፍ ምንጮች ትልቅ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የዶሜን-agnostic ክፍል-of-ንግግር ምሳሌ የተዘጋጀውን MWE ዳርቻዎች በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ከቀድሞ የMWE ዳርቻዎች ጋር፣ ቀድሞው የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-ደረጃ ማውጣትን በአፍሪካዊው የቴርዝክ ዳታ ማውጣት (Tratz, 2011) በተመሳሳይ 50.4 በመቶው ነው፡፡ ያልጠበቀው የሥርዓታችን ዝርዝና የተጠበቀው የአንዱን ደብዳቤ ይደርሳል፤ በተለይም ምሳሌዎች ደግሞ ያሳየዋል።', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz multi-söz ifadeleri üçin kompozisyonal temsil fonksiýany öwrenmek üçin tassyklanmadyk bir nusgasyny çözýär we muny Tratz veri setinde deňleýär, bu nusgasy kompozisyonal kompozisyonlaryň arasynda semantik bilen baglanýan sözleri bilen birleşýär Taýram funksiýasy tekrarly näyral şebekelere daýanýar we MWEs-iň kontekstinde sözleri öňden geçirmek üçin "Skip-Gram" maksadyny ullanýar. Bärde biziň ýaryşymyz, dogruda aýdylanmaýan uly metin çeşmelerini etmäge mümkin edip biler. Mundan soňra, biziň yönümimiz ulamly MWE üçin ullanyşyp biler, ýöne tamamlanmadyk bir algoritm diýip işleýär, MWE aralygyny ýeke-agnostik bir bölüm-de-çykyş döwletlere görä önlenýär. MWE öňünden tanyş edilmiş sahalary bilen, biziň metodamyz Tratz veri setiniň (Tratz, 2011), F1 sanatynyň 50.4% degeri bilen öňki durumyny üstüne getirir. Biziň ýüregimiziň ewirilmeýän wersiýasy kontrol edeniň eserini ýakyp barýar we hatda käbir konfigurasiýalarda ony çykarýar.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ուսումնասիրում է բազմաբառերի արտահայտությունների բաղադրական ներկայացման ֆունկցիայի ուսումնասիրելու անվերահսկված մոտեցումը (MWEs) և գնահատում է այն Տրաթզի տվյալների համակարգում, որը կապում է երկու բառերի արտահայտությունները բաղադրիչների միջև գտնվող սեմանտիկ հարաբերության հետ (օրինակ, աշխատակիցները կապված են կառավար Այս ֆունկցիան հիմնված է կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերի վրա և ուսուցանվում է օգտագործելով "Սպիպ-Գրամ" նպատակը բառերի կանխատեսելու համար MWE-ի կոնտեքստում: Thus our approach can naturally leverage large unlabeled text sources.  Ավելին, մեր մեթոդը կարող է օգտագործել տրամադրված MWE-ները, երբ հասանելի է, բայց կարող է նաև գործել որպես ամբողջովին անվերահսկված ալգորիթմ, օգտագործելով MWE սահմանները, որոնք կանխատեսվում են խոսքի մի միակ բնագավառի ագնոստիկ մասի միջոցով: Առաջին սահմանափակ MWE սահմաններով մեր մեթոդը գերազանցում է նախորդ լավագույն արդյունքը Թրեթզի տվյալների համակարգի (Թրեթզ, 2011) խիստ խիստ գնահատման վրա, F1-ի գնահատականը 50.4 տոկոսով: Մեր մեթոդի անվերահսկված տարբերակը մոտենում է վերահսկված մեթոդի արդյունքին, և նույնիսկ գերազանցում է այն որոշ կազմակերպություններում:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt çoxlu sözlər ifadəsi (MWEs) üçün kompozisyonal ifadəsi öyrənmək üçün müəyyən edilməmiş bir tərzi keşfetir və onu Tratz veri qutusunda değerləşdirir. Bu, kompozisyonlar arasındakı semantik əlaqəsi ilə iki söz ifadəsi ilə birləşdirir (məsələn, etiketli istifadəçi adı ilə birləşdirilmiş hökumət a ģentsiyası ilə birləşdirilmiş). Komposisyon funksiyası yenidən nöral ağlarına dayanılır və MWEs kontekstlərində sözləri tədbir etmək üçün Skip-Gram məqsədilə təhsil edilir. Beləliklə, bizim tərəfimiz təbii olaraq böyük mətn mənbələrini istifadə edə bilər. Daha sonra, bizim metodumuz mümkün olduğu zaman təmin MWEs istifadə edə bilər, amma tamamilə müəyyən edilməmiş algoritm olaraq, MWE sınırlarını təmin edə bilər, domain-agnostik bir qismi-sözlərin örtüsü ilə təmin edə bilər. Ön belə tanımlanmış MWE sınırları ilə, bizim metodumuz Tratz veri qutusu (Tratz, 2011), F1 dərəcəsi 50,4%-dən əvvəlki mövcuddur. Bizim metodumuzun müəyyən edilməmiş versiyası gözlənilənlərin performansına yaxınlaşır, hətta bəzi konfigurasiyalarda daha üstün gəlir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি অনেক শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য একটি সংগঠন প্রতিনিধিত্বের কাজ শিখতে অরক্ষিত উপায় খুঁজে বের করেছে এবং ট্রাজ ডাটাসেটে তার মূল্যায়ন করেছে, যা দুই শব্দের প্রতিনিধির মধ্যে দুই শব্দের প্রকা পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের ভিত্তিতে এই সংগঠনের ফাংশন এবং এমডিউএসএর প্রেক্ষাপটে শব্দগুলো ভবিষ্যত করতে স্কিপ- গ্রামের লক্ষ্য ব্ তাই আমাদের প্রযুক্তি স্বাভাবিকভাবে বিশাল লেবেলের উৎস প্রদান করতে পারে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করতে পারে যখন প্রাপ্ত MWEs প্রদান করা হয়, কিন্তু একই সাথে ডোমেইন-অ্যাগ্নোস্টিক অংশের কথাবার্তা প্যাটারেন্টার দ্বারা পূর্ এমডিউই সীমানার পূর্বে নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছিল, আমাদের পদ্ধতি পূর্বের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের প্রদর্শনের বিষয়টি প্রদর্শন করেছিল। তারা ট্রাজ ডাটাসেট (ট্রাজ, ২০১১ আমাদের পদ্ধতির অরক্ষিত সংস্করণটি পর্যবেক্ষণকারীদের প্রভাবের কাছে পৌঁছে যায় এবং এমনকি কিছু কনফিগারেশনের মধ্যে এটি প', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir istražuje nepotrebni pristup učenju kompozicionalne funkcije zastupanja za višeriječne izraze (MWEs) i procjenjuje g a na setu podataka Tratz, koja povezuje izraze dvije riječi sa semantičnim odnosima između kompozicijskih sastavnika (npr. poslodavca za etiketu povezana sa imenom složenom vladinom agencijom) (Tratz, 2011). Funkcija kompozicije je temeljena na recidivnim neuralnim mrežama, i obučena koristeći cilj Skip-Gram kako bi predvidjela riječi u kontekstu MWEs-a. Dakle, naš pristup prirodno može uticati na velike nepoznate izvore teksta. Nadalje, naša metoda može iskoristiti osigurane MWE kada je dostupna, ali može funkcionisati kao potpuno neodređeni algoritam, koristeći granice MWE predviđene jednom domenom agnostičkom dijelom govora. Sa preddefiniranim granicama MWE-a, naša metoda je nadmašila prethodnu prednost umjetnosti na procjenu podataka Tratz-a (Tratz, 2011), sa rezultatom F1 od 50,4%. Neodređena verzija našeg metoda se približava učinkovitosti nadzornika, i čak ga i nadmaže u nekim konfiguracijama.', 'ca': "Aquest paper explora un enfocament sense supervisió d'aprendre una funció de representació compositiva per expressions multiparaules (MWEs) i la valora al conjunt de dades de Tratz, que associa expressions de dos paraules amb la relació semàntica entre els components composts (per exemple l'etiqueta empleador està associada amb l'a g ència governamental composta de noms) (Tratz, 2011). La funció de composició està basada en xarxes neurals recurrents, i està entrenada usant l'objectiu Skip-Gram per predir les paraules en el context de les MWEs. Així que el nostre enfocament pot, naturalment, aprofitar fonts de text grans sense etiqueta. Més aviat, el nostre mètode pot fer servir les MWEs proporcionades quan està disponible, però també pot funcionar com un algoritme completament no supervisat, utilitzant les fronteres MWE predites per un únic patró d'agnòstica de domini. Amb límits predefinits de la MWE, el nostre mètode supera el desenvolupament més avançat en l'avaluació amb grans grossos del conjunt de dades de Tratz (Tratz, 2011), amb una puntuació F1 del 50,4%. La versió no supervisada del nostre mètode s'aproxima al rendiment del supervisat, i fins i tot la supera en algunes configuracions.", 'cs': 'Tento článek zkoumá bez dohledu přístup k učení kompoziční reprezentační funkce pro víceslovní výrazy (MWE) a vyhodnocuje jej na Tratzově datové sadě, která spojuje dvouslovní výrazy se sémantickým vztahem mezi složenými složkami (např. zaměstnavatel štítku je asociován s podstatnou složenou vládní agenturou) (Tratz, 2011). Složení funkce je založeno na recidivujících neuronových sítích a je trénováno pomocí Skip-Gram cíle k předpovědi slov v kontextu MWE. Náš přístup tak může přirozeně využít velké neznačené textové zdroje. Dále naše metoda může využít poskytnuté MWE, pokud jsou k dispozici, ale může také fungovat jako zcela bez dozoru algoritmus, pomocí MWE hranic predikovaných jediným, doménově agnostickým vzorem části řeči. S předem definovanými hranicemi MWE naše metoda překonává předchozí nejmodernější výkon při hrubozrnném vyhodnocování datové sady Tratz (Tratz, 2011) s F1 skóre 50,4%. Bez dozoru verze naší metody se přibližuje výkonu dozorované metody a dokonce ji v některých konfiguracích překonává.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse järelevalveta lähenemisviisi mitmesõnaliste avaldiste kompositsioonilise esitusfunktsiooni õppimisele ja hinnatakse seda Tratzi andmekogumis, mis seostab kahesõnalisi väljendeid kompositsioonide semantilise seosega (nt etiketi tööandja on seotud substantiivse valitsusasutusega) (Tratz, 2011). Kompositsioonifunktsioon põhineb korduvatel närvivõrkudel ja seda koolitatakse kasutades Skip-Gram eesmärki sõnade ennustamiseks MWE kontekstis. Seega saab meie lähenemisviis loomulikult kasutada suuri märgistamata tekstiallikaid. Lisaks võib meie meetod kasutada pakutavaid MWE-sid, kui need on kättesaadavad, kuid võib toimida ka täiesti järelevalveta algoritmina, kasutades MWE piire, mis on prognoositud ühe domeeni-agnostilise kõneosa mustriga. Eelnevalt kindlaksmääratud MWE piiridega ületab meie meetod Tratzi andmekogumi jämeda teralise hindamise (Tratz, 2011) eelmise tehnika taseme, F1 skooriga 50,4%. Meie järelevalveta meetodi versioon läheneb järelevalveta meetodi jõudlusele ja isegi ületab seda mõnes konfiguratsioonis.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan valvomatonta lähestymistapaa monisanaisten ilmaisujen (MWE) sommittelufunktion oppimiseen ja arvioidaan sitä Tratz-aineistossa, jossa kaksisanaiset ilmaisut yhdistetään komponenttien semanttiseen suhteeseen (esim. label employer on assosioitunut substantiivin compound government agency) (Tratz, 2011). Koostumustoiminto perustuu toistuviin hermoverkkoihin ja sitä koulutetaan Skip-Gram-tavoitteen avulla ennustamaan sanoja MWE:n kontekstissa. Näin ollen lähestymistapamme voi luonnollisesti hyödyntää suuria merkitsemättömiä tekstilähteitä. Lisäksi menetelmämme voi hyödyntää tarjottuja MWE:itä, kun niitä on saatavilla, mutta se voi myös toimia täysin valvomattomana algoritmina käyttäen MWE:n rajoja, jotka on ennustettu yhdellä, domeeni-agnostisella puheen osalla. Ennalta määritellyillä MWE-rajoilla menetelmämme suoriutuu Tratz-aineiston karkeassa arvioinnissa (Tratz, 2011) edellisistä huipputasoista suorituskykyä korkeammalla F1-pisteellä 50,4%. Menetelmämme valvomaton versio lähestyy valvotun suorituskyvyn tasoa ja jopa ylittää sen joissakin kokoonpanoissa.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na g an e wani tsari wanda aka tsare wa ya sanar da wani muhimmin wakilishi wa rubutun multi-magana (MWEs), kuma yana ƙaddara shi a kan data na Trazz, wanda yana haɗa maganar biyu da muhalli na semantic a tsakanin compound constituent (misali, mai amfani da shi ne da shirin nan na nau'in rubutu (Trazz, 2011). The composition function is based on recurrent neural networks, and is trained using the Skip-Gram objective to predict the words in the context of MWEs.  Kayya da mazauninmu yana iya amfani da manyan kwanan matsayi wanda ba'a rubũta ba. Furan, metoden mu na iya amfani da wanda MWEs ke da idan an iya iya amfani da shi, kuma amma yana iya amfani da shi kamar wata algoritm wanda ba'a tsare shi ba cikakken tsari, kuma yana iya amfani da tsarin MWU wanda aka yi ƙayyade na tsari da tsarin wata guda, guda-agnostic-na-mazaɓa. game da pre-defined MWU boundaries, metoden mu outperforms the previous state-of-the-art performance on the coast-grafied evaluation of the Trazz data set (Trazz, 2011), with an F1 score of 50.4%. An tsare kwamfyutan hanyonmu, yana kusantar da aikin wanda aka tsare shi, kuma kõ da ya sami shi cikin wasu tsaro.", 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo nenadzorovan pristop k učenju funkcije kompozicijske reprezentacije za večbesedne izraze (MWE) in ga ocenjujemo na Tratzovem naboru podatkov, ki dvosbesedne izraze povezuje s semantičnim razmerjem med sestavljenimi sestavinami (npr. delodajalec etiket je povezan s samostalnikom sestavljene vladne agencije) (Tratz, 2011). Funkcija sestave temelji na ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežjih in se usposablja s pomočjo cilja Skip-Gram za napovedovanje besed v kontekstu MWE. Tako lahko naš pristop seveda izkoristi velike vire besedila brez oznake. Poleg tega lahko naša metoda uporablja zagotovljene MWE, kadar so na voljo, lahko pa deluje tudi kot popolnoma neobzorovan algoritem, pri čemer uporablja meje MWE, predvidene z enim samim domensko agnostičnim delom govora. Z vnaprej določenimi mejami MWE naša metoda presega prejšnje najsodobnejše zmogljivosti pri grobozrnati oceni Tratzovega nabora podatkov (Tratz, 2011), z rezultatom F1 50,4%. Nenadzorovana različica naše metode se približuje zmogljivosti nadzorovane metode in jo celo presega v nekaterih konfiguracijah.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki nglanggar aturan sing ora nggawe nguasakno karo mulasakno sing kompatisé nggawe gerakno karo paké Multiword Expression (SME), lan nggunakake kuwi nggawe Traz dataset, sing nggawe pawaran winih sing dibutuhke sing nyeasakno karo perusahaan semanti nggawe gerakno karo kompatisé (t.d.informasi tambah benerampun ugingkat wong liyane kabèh dumadhiné (Traz, 2011). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Saiki dadi, ditambah punika diangkat dhéwé iso nggawe aturan sing paling awak dhéwé Format autodetect failed. The error message can be used as a "error message". ProgressBarUpdates Awak dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan nggawe ngerti dadi nggawe aturan katimbang nggo ngilangno sistêm kanggo ngerasai mruput.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו חוקרת גישה לא משומרת ללמוד פונקציה מייצגת מורכבת לבטאות רבות מילים (MWEs), ומעריכה אותה על קבוצת נתונים טראץ, אשר מחוברת ביטויים בשתי מילים לקשר סמנטי בין המרכיבים המרכיבים (למשל, המעסיק התחבר לסוכנות ממשלתית המרכיבת השם) (טראץ, 2011). הפונקציה של המרכיב מבוססת על רשתות עצביות חוזרות, והיא מאומנת באמצעות המטרה Skip-Gram כדי לחזות את המילים בקשר של MWEs. כך הגישה שלנו יכולה באופן טבעי להשתמש במקורות טקסט גדולים ללא סימנים. חוץ מזה, השיטה שלנו יכולה להשתמש באמצעות MWEs הנוספים כאשר זמינים, אבל יכולה גם לפעול כאלגוריתם ללא השגחה לחלוטין, בשימוש בגבולות MWE שנצפו על ידי דפוס חלק אגנוסטי של דיבור אחד. עם גבולות MWE מוגדרים מראש, השיטה שלנו מובילה את ההופעה הקודמת ביותר על הערכה העצומה של קבוצת נתונים טראץ (טראץ, 2011), עם נקודת F1 של 50.4%. הגרסה הלא מושגת של השיטה שלנו מתקרבת לביצוע של השומר, ואפילו מתגברת עליה במסדרות מסוימות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསལ་བརྗོད་པ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྟོགས་མེད་པའི་ནང་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད། མཉམ་སྒྲིག་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཆེན Further, our method can make use of provided MWEs when available, but can also function as a completely unsupervised algorithm, using MWE boundaries predicted by a single, domain-agnostic part-of-speech pattern. With pre-defined MWE boundaries, our method outperforms the previous state-of-the-art performance on the coarse-grained evaluation of the Tratz dataset (Tratz, 2011), with an F1 score of 50.4%. With an F1 score of 50.4%. The unsupervised version of our method approaches the performance of the supervised one, and even outperforms it in some configurations.'}
{'en': 'Sentence Analogies : Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'fr': 'Analogies de phrases\xa0: régularités linguistiques dans les intégrations de phrases', 'ar': 'مقارنات الجمل: الانتظام اللغوي في تطويق الجملة', 'pt': 'Analogias de sentenças: regularidades linguísticas em embeddings de sentenças', 'es': 'Analogías de oraciones: regularidades lingüísticas en la incrustación de oraciones', 'ja': '文の類推：文の埋め込みにおける言語的規則性', 'zh': '句类:句嵌中语', 'hi': 'वाक्य उपमाएं: वाक्य एम्बेडिंग में भाषाई नियमितताएं', 'ru': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'ga': 'Analógachtaí Pianbhreithe: Rialta Teangacha i Leabú Pianbhreithe', 'ka': 'სიტყვების ანალოგია: სიტყვების რეგიგურაციები', 'hu': 'Ítéletek analógiái: Nyelvi szabályosságok az ítéletek beágyazásában', 'el': 'Αναλογίες φράσεων: Γλωσσολογικές Κανονικότητες στις ενσωμάτωση φράσεων', 'it': 'Analogie delle frasi: Regolarità linguistiche negli embedding delle frasi', 'kk': 'Сөзді аналогиялар: Сөзді ендіру үшін сызық үлгілер', 'ms': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'ml': 'വിധി അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു: വിധികളിലെ ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн аналоги: Сүүлийн нэвтрүүлэх хэлбэрийн шинжлэх ухаан', 'no': 'Uttrykk- analogiar: Linguistic Regularities i setningar', 'pl': 'Analogie zdań: Regularności językowe w osadzeniach zdań', 'mk': 'Аналогии на речениците: Лингвистички регуларности во вградувања на реченици', 'ro': 'Analogii sentințelor: Regularități lingvistice în încorporarea sentințelor', 'sr': 'Analogije kazne: Lingističke pravilnosti u uvođenju kazne', 'mt': 'Analoġiji tas-Sentenzi: Regolaritajiet Lingwistiċi fl-Embeddings tas-Sentenzi', 'so': 'Analyaalka daryeelka: Xukummada luuqadda ee qalabka daryeelka', 'si': 'වාර්තාව විශේෂය: වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් ලින්ග්විස්ටික නීතිය', 'sv': 'Meningsanalogier: Språkliga regelverk i meningsbyggnader', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம் ஆராய்வு: வாக்கியம் உடைந்துள்ள வரிசைப்பட விதிமுறைகள்', 'lt': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'ur': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'vi': 'Giọng nam: Hài lệ ngôn ngữ trong môi trường đơn', 'uz': 'Sensor taʼminlovchisi: Lingvistika tartiblar', 'nl': 'Zinn Analogies: Taalkundige Regelmatigheden in Zinn Embeddings', 'hr': 'Analogije kazne: Lingističke pravilnosti u uvođenju kazne', 'bg': 'Аналогии на изреченията: езикови регулярности в вгражданията на изречения', 'da': 'Sætningsanalogier: Sproglige regelmæssigheder i sætningsindlejringer', 'de': 'Satzanalysen: Sprachliche Regelmäßigkeiten in Satzanalysen', 'ko': '문장 유형: 문장에 삽입된 언어 법칙', 'fa': 'انالوژی\u200cهای جمله: قانونی\u200cهای لینگ\u200cویستیک در جمله\u200cهای جمله', 'sw': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'id': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'af': 'Soektog Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'tr': 'Sözler analojileri:Sözler içinde çizgi düzenlemeler', 'sq': 'Analogjet e dënimeve: Rregullsitë gjuhësore në përfshirjen e dënimeve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'az': 'Sözüm Analogiləri: Sözüm İdxalarında Sözü', 'bn': 'শাস্তি বিশ্লেষণ: শাস্তি বিদ্যমানে লিঙ্গিস্টিক নিয়ম', 'cs': 'Analogie vět: Jazykové pravidelnosti v vložení vět', 'ca': 'Sentence Analogies: Linguistic Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'bs': 'Analogije kazne: Lingističke pravilnosti u udruženju kazne', 'et': 'Lause analoogiad: keelelised regulaarsused lausepõimimistes', 'fi': 'Lausekeanalogiat: Kielelliset säännönmukaisuudet lauseiden upotuksissa', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'Ana Analog: Linguistic Regular in Ƙaraka da aka Sake', 'sk': 'Analogije stavkov: jezikovne pravilnosti v vdelavah stavkov', 'he': 'Analogies of Sentence: Language Regularities in Sentence Embeddings', 'bo': 'ཚིག་བརྗོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ：སྐད་ཡིག་ཚན་ནང་གི་གྲལ་རིམ་གྱི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'While important properties of word vector representations have been studied extensively, far less is known about the properties of sentence vector representations. Word vectors are often evaluated by assessing to what degree they exhibit regularities with regard to relationships of the sort considered in word analogies. In this paper, we investigate to what extent commonly used sentence vector representation spaces as well reflect certain kinds of regularities. We propose a number of schemes to induce evaluation data, based on lexical analogy data as well as semantic relationships between sentences. Our experiments consider a wide range of sentence embedding methods, including ones based on BERT-style contextual embeddings. We find that different models differ substantially in their ability to reflect such regularities.', 'es': 'Si bien se han estudiado ampliamente las propiedades importantes de las representaciones vectoriales de palabras, se sabe mucho menos sobre las propiedades de las representaciones vectoriales de oraciones. Los vectores de palabras a menudo se evalúan evaluando hasta qué punto exhiben regularidades con respecto a las relaciones del tipo considerado en las analogías de palabras. En este artículo, investigamos hasta qué punto los espacios de representación de vector de oración comúnmente utilizados también reflejan ciertos tipos de regularidades. Proponemos una serie de esquemas para inducir datos de evaluación, basados en datos de analogía léxica, así como en relaciones semánticas entre oraciones. Nuestros experimentos consideran una amplia gama de métodos de incrustación de oraciones, incluidos los basados en incrustaciones contextuales al estilo de Bert. Encontramos que los diferentes modelos difieren sustancialmente en su capacidad para reflejar tales regularidades.', 'ar': 'بينما تمت دراسة الخصائص المهمة لتمثيلات متجه الكلمات على نطاق واسع ، لا يُعرف الكثير عن خصائص تمثيلات ناقلات الجملة. غالبًا ما يتم تقييم متجهات الكلمات من خلال تقييم الدرجة التي تظهر بها الانتظام فيما يتعلق بالعلاقات من النوع الذي يتم النظر فيه في تشابهات الكلمات. في هذه الورقة ، نتحرى إلى أي مدى تعكس مساحات تمثيل متجه الجملة شائعة الاستخدام أيضًا أنواعًا معينة من الانتظام. نقترح عددًا من المخططات للحث على بيانات التقييم ، بناءً على بيانات القياس المعجمي وكذلك العلاقات الدلالية بين الجمل. تأخذ تجاربنا في الاعتبار مجموعة واسعة من طرق تضمين الجملة ، بما في ذلك تلك التي تعتمد على أسلوب BERT للتضمينات السياقية. نجد أن النماذج المختلفة تختلف اختلافًا كبيرًا في قدرتها على عكس مثل هذا الانتظام.', 'fr': "Bien que les propriétés importantes des représentations vectorielles de mots aient été étudiées de manière approfondie, on en sait beaucoup moins sur les propriétés des représentations vectorielles de phrases. Les vecteurs de mots sont souvent évalués en évaluant dans quelle mesure ils présentent des régularités par rapport aux relations du type considéré dans les analogies de mots. Dans cet article, nous étudions dans quelle mesure les espaces de représentation des vecteurs de phrases couramment utilisés reflètent également certains types de régularités. Nous proposons un certain nombre de schémas pour induire des données d'évaluation, basés sur des données d'analogie lexicale ainsi que sur des relations sémantiques entre les phrases. Nos expériences portent sur un large éventail de méthodes d'intégration de phrases, y compris celles basées sur des intégrations contextuelles de style Bert. Nous constatons que les différents modèles diffèrent considérablement dans leur capacité à refléter de telles régularités.", 'pt': 'Embora propriedades importantes de representações de vetores de palavras tenham sido estudadas extensivamente, muito menos se sabe sobre as propriedades de representações de vetores de sentenças. Os vetores de palavras são frequentemente avaliados avaliando até que ponto eles exibem regularidades em relação às relações do tipo considerado em analogias de palavras. Neste artigo, investigamos em que medida os espaços de representação de vetores de frases comumente usados também refletem certos tipos de regularidades. Propomos uma série de esquemas para induzir dados de avaliação, baseados em dados de analogia lexical, bem como relações semânticas entre sentenças. Nossos experimentos consideram uma ampla gama de métodos de incorporação de sentenças, incluindo aqueles baseados em incorporações contextuais no estilo BERT. Descobrimos que diferentes modelos diferem substancialmente em sua capacidade de refletir tais regularidades.', 'zh': '虽博究词向量要,而向量质于向量知之甚少。 词向量常估其词类比中虑之规律性也。 本文中,论常用之句向量示空中多大程度之规律性。 多设方略以诱评数,盖词汇类比数及句语义之间也。 臣等实验思广句嵌法,盖BERT风上下文嵌之法也。 吾观其不同规律性者,其能大异也。', 'ja': '単語ベクトル表現の重要な特性は広範囲にわたって研究されているが、文ベクトル表現の特性についてはあまり知られていない。単語ベクトルは、多くの場合、単語アナロジーで考慮される類型の関係性に関して規則性を示す程度を評価することによって評価される。本稿では、文ベクトル表現空間がどの程度一般的に使用されているか、またある種の規則性をどの程度反映しているかを検討する。文の間の意味関係だけでなく、語彙類似データに基づいて評価データを誘導するためのいくつかのスキームを提案します。私たちの実験では、BERTスタイルの文脈的埋め込みに基づくものを含む、幅広い文の埋め込み方法を検討しています。異なるモデルは、そのような規則性を反映する能力が大きく異なることがわかります。', 'hi': 'जबकि शब्द वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के महत्वपूर्ण गुणों का बड़े पैमाने पर अध्ययन किया गया है, वाक्य वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के गुणों के बारे में बहुत कम जाना जाता है। वर्ड वैक्टर का मूल्यांकन अक्सर यह आकलन करके किया जाता है कि वे किस हद तक शब्द उपमाओं में विचार किए जाने वाले प्रकार के संबंधों के संबंध में नियमितताओं को प्रदर्शित करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम जांच करते हैं कि आमतौर पर किस हद तक उपयोग किए जाने वाले वाक्य वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व रिक्त स्थान के साथ-साथ कुछ प्रकार की नियमितताओं को प्रतिबिंबित करते हैं। हम मूल्यांकन डेटा को प्रेरित करने के लिए कई योजनाओं का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो लेक्सिकल सादृश्य डेटा के साथ-साथ वाक्यों के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों के आधार पर है। हमारे प्रयोगों वाक्य एम्बेडिंग विधियों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर विचार करते हैं, जिसमें BERT-शैली के प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर शामिल हैं। हम पाते हैं कि विभिन्न मॉडल इस तरह की नियमितताओं को प्रतिबिंबित करने की उनकी क्षमता में काफी भिन्न होते हैं।', 'ru': 'В то время как важные свойства векторных представлений слов были изучены широко, гораздо меньше известно о свойствах векторных представлений предложений. Векторы слов часто оцениваются путем оценки того, в какой степени они проявляют закономерности в отношении отношений, рассматриваемых в словах-аналогах. В этой статье мы исследуем, в какой степени широко используемые пространства представления векторов предложений также отражают определенные виды закономерностей. Мы предлагаем ряд схем для индукции оценочных данных, основанных на данных лексической аналогии, а также семантических связей между предложениями. В наших экспериментах рассматривается широкий спектр методов встраивания предложений, в том числе основанных на контекстных вложениях в стиле BERT. Мы считаем, что различные модели существенно различаются по своей способности отражать такие закономерности.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil staidéar fairsing déanta ar airíonna tábhachtacha léirithe veicteoirí focal, is lú i bhfad atá ar eolas faoi airíonna léirithe veicteoirí abairte. Is minic a dhéantar veicteoirí focal a mheas trí mheasúnú a dhéanamh ar cé chomh mór agus a léiríonn siad rialtacht maidir le gaolta den sórt a mheastar in analaí focal. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar a mhéid a léiríonn spásanna ionadaíochta veicteora abairte a úsáidtear go coitianta cineálacha áirithe rialtachtaí. Molaimid roinnt scéimeanna chun sonraí meastóireachta a aslú, bunaithe ar shonraí analaí foclóireachta chomh maith le gaolmhaireachtaí shéimeantacha idir abairtí. Déanann ár dturgnaimh machnamh ar raon leathan de mhodhanna leabú abairtí, lena n-áirítear cinn atá bunaithe ar leabaithe comhthéacsúla ar stíl CRET. Faighimid amach go bhfuil difríocht shuntasach idir múnlaí éagsúla ina gcumas chun rialtacht dá leithéid a léiriú.', 'hu': 'Míg a szóvektoros reprezentációk fontos tulajdonságait széles körben tanulmányozták, sokkal kevesebbet tudunk a mondatvektoros reprezentációk tulajdonságairól. A szóvektorokat gyakran úgy értékelik, hogy felmérik, milyen mértékben mutatnak szabályszerűséget a szóanalógiákban figyelembe vett kapcsolatok tekintetében. Ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy milyen mértékben tükrözik az általánosan használt mondatvektoros reprezentációs terek bizonyos szabályosságokat. Az értékelési adatok indukálására számos olyan sémát javasolunk, amelyek lexikai analógia adatokon és mondatok közötti szemantikai kapcsolatokon alapulnak. Kísérleteink számos mondatbeágyazási módszert vizsgálnak, beleértve a BERT-stílusú kontextuális beágyazásokon alapuló módszereket is. Úgy találjuk, hogy a különböző modellek jelentősen eltérnek az ilyen szabályszerűségek tükrözésére való képességük tekintetében.', 'el': 'Ενώ σημαντικές ιδιότητες των διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων έχουν μελετηθεί εκτενώς, πολύ λιγότερα είναι γνωστά για τις ιδιότητες των διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων. Οι διανύσματα λέξεων αξιολογούνται συχνά αξιολογώντας σε ποιο βαθμό παρουσιάζουν κανονικότητες όσον αφορά τις σχέσεις του είδους που εξετάζονται στις αναλογίες λέξεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε σε ποιο βαθμό οι κοινώς χρησιμοποιούμενοι χώροι αναπαράστασης διανυσματικών προτάσεων αντικατοπτρίζουν επίσης ορισμένα είδη κανονικότητας. Προτείνουμε μια σειρά σχημάτων για την πρόκληση δεδομένων αξιολόγησης, βασισμένων σε δεδομένα λεξικής αναλογίας καθώς και σε σημασιολογικές σχέσεις μεταξύ προτάσεων. Τα πειράματά μας εξετάζουν ένα ευρύ φάσμα μεθόδων ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων εκείνων που βασίζονται σε ενσωμάτωση περιβάλλοντος τύπου BERT. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι διαφορετικά μοντέλα διαφέρουν σημαντικά ως προς την ικανότητά τους να αντικατοπτρίζουν τέτοιες κανονικότητες.', 'ka': 'თუმცა სიტყვის გვეკტორის გამოსახულებების მნიშვნელოვანობები გააკეთებულია, ძალიან ცოტა უფრო ცოტა სიტყვის გვეკტორის გამოსახულებების შესახებ. სიტყვის გვექტორები ზოგიერთად იმუშაობენ რომელის განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც მათ რეგულაციას გამოჩვენებენ, რომელიც სიტყვის ანალოგიაში აღმოჩენა. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებულობაში გამოყენებული სიტყვების განსაზღვრებების სივრცე და რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებულობაში. ჩვენ მრავალე სქემები, რომლებიც გავამუშავებთ განსაზღვრებული მონაცემები, ლექსიკალური ანალოგიური მონაცემებზე და სემენტიური შესახებ მართლას შორის. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩნენ დიდი სიტყვების კონტექსტური შეგრძელება, რომელიც BERT-სტილის კონტექსტური შეგრძელება. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ განსხვავებული მოდელები ძალიან განსხვავებულია მათი შესაძლებლობაში, რომლებიც განსხვავებენ ასეთი რედაქტორიები.', 'kk': 'Сөздің векторлардың маңызды қасиеттері кеңейтілген оқу үшін, сөздің векторлардың қасиеттері туралы білмейді. Сөздер векторлары сөздердің аналогияларындағы қанша деңгейіндегі қанша деңгейіндегі қасиеттерді оқу үшін бағалады. Бұл қағазда, біз сөйлемелер векторының кейбір түрлі тәуліктерді қалай кезде қолданылатын бос орындарды зерттейміз. Біз лексикалық аналогиялық деректеріне негізделген және сөйлемелер арасындағы семантикалық қатынастарды бағалау үшін бірнеше сұлбаларды ұсынамыз. Біздің тәжірибеміз BERT стилінің контекстуалды ендіру әдістерін көптеген тәжірибелерін сұрайды. Біз басқа үлгілер олардың бұл үлгіліктерді қарау мүмкіндігінде көбірек айырмайды.', 'lt': 'Nors išsamiai ištirtos svarbios žodžių vektorių rodmenų savybės, daug mažiau žinoma apie sakinių vektorių rodmenų savybes. žodžių vektoriai dažnai vertinami vertinant, kiek jie rodo reguliarumą santykių, kurie svarstomi žodžių analogijose, atžvilgiu. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame, kokiu mastu dažnai naudojami sakinių vektorių atstovavimo skyriai taip pat atspindi tam tikrų rūšių reguliarumą. Siūlome keletą sistemų, kuriomis skatinami vertinimo duomenys, pagrįsti leksiniais analoginiais duomenimis ir semantiniais santykiais tarp sakinių. Mūsų eksperimentuose atsižvelgiama į įvairius sakinių įtraukimo metodus, įskaitant tuos, kurie grindžiami BERT tipo kontekstiniais įtraukimais. Matome, kad skirtingi modeliai labai skiriasi jų gebėjimu atspindėti tokius reguliarumus.', 'it': 'Mentre le proprietà importanti delle rappresentazioni vettoriali di parole sono state studiate estesamente, molto meno è noto circa le proprietà delle rappresentazioni vettoriali di frase. I vettori di parole sono spesso valutati valutando in che misura presentano regolarità rispetto alle relazioni del tipo considerato nelle analogie di parole. In questo articolo, esaminiamo in che misura gli spazi di rappresentazione vettoriale comunemente usati riflettono anche alcuni tipi di regolarità. Proponiamo una serie di schemi per indurre dati di valutazione, basati su dati di analogia lessicale e relazioni semantiche tra frasi. I nostri esperimenti considerano una vasta gamma di metodi di incorporazione di frasi, inclusi quelli basati su incorporazioni contestuali in stile BERT. Troviamo che diversi modelli differiscono sostanzialmente nella loro capacità di riflettere tali regolarità.', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായി പരിശോധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് വെക്ടര്\u200d  വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d എപ്പോഴും വാക്കുകള്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്ന വ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതെന്താണെന്നും ചില നിയമങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിന ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d അനാലജിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും അടിസ്ഥാ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീതികളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടി-ശ We find that different models differ substantially in their ability to reflect such regularities.', 'mn': 'Үүний векторын илэрхийллийн чухал чанарыг маш их судалсан ч гэсэн үг векторын илэрхийллийн талаар илэрхийлэгддэггүй. Бүх векторууд хэд хэмжээнд тэдний хэд хэмжээст харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны тухай дүгнэлт үзүүлдэг вэ? Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэдэн хэмжээний үгийн векторын үзүүлэлтийн орон зайг ашигладаг вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Бид хэд хэдэн схемүүд өгөгдлийг үнэлэх, лексикийн аналогик өгөгдлийн үндсэн, мөн өгөгдлийн хоорондын семантик харилцаа үүсгэж байна. Бидний туршилтууд БЕРТ хэлбэрээр суурилсан өргөн хэлбэрүүдийг бүрдүүлэх арга замыг боддог. Бид өөр өөр загварууд ийм загваруудыг дүрслэх чадварын тулд ихэвчлэн ялгаатай байдаг.', 'no': 'Mens viktige eigenskapar for ordvektorrepresentasjonar er studerte utvida, er mykje mindre kjent om eigenskapane til setningvektorrepresentasjonar. Ordvektorar blir ofte evaluerte ved å vurdere kva grad dei viser regulære uttrykk med hensyn til forholdet i ordanalogiar. I denne papiret undersøker vi kva storleik som ofte brukt setningvektorrepresentasjonsmessingar, også reflekserer nokre typar reguleringar. Vi foreslår mange skjema for å indusera evalueringsdata basert på leksiske analogiske data og semantiske forhold mellom setningar. Eksperimentane våre ser på eit brett område med setningsmetoder, inkludert dei baserte på kontekst innbygging av BERT- stil. Vi finn at forskjellige modeller forskjeller substituelt i eigne kapasiteten til å refleksera slike reguleringar.', 'pl': 'Chociaż ważne właściwości reprezentacji wektorów słowa zostały szczegółowo zbadane, znacznie mniej wiadomo o właściwościach reprezentacji wektorów zdań. Wektory słowa są często oceniane poprzez ocenę, w jakim stopniu wykazują prawidłowości w odniesieniu do relacji tego rodzaju rozpatrywanych w analogiach słowowych. W niniejszym artykule badamy, w jakim stopniu powszechnie stosowane przestrzenie wektorowe reprezentacji zdań odzwierciedlają również pewne rodzaje regularności. Proponujemy szereg schematów wywoływania danych oceniających, opartych na analogii leksykalnej oraz relacjach semantycznych między zdaniami. Nasze eksperymenty uwzględniają szeroki zakres metod osadzania zdań, w tym metod opartych na osadzeniach kontekstowych w stylu BERT. Stwierdzamy, że różne modele różnią się znacznie pod względem ich zdolności do odzwierciedlenia takich regularności.', 'ro': 'În timp ce proprietățile importante ale reprezentărilor vectoriale ale cuvintelor au fost studiate extensiv, mult mai puțin se cunoaște despre proprietățile reprezentărilor vectoriale ale frazelor. Vectorii de cuvinte sunt adesea evaluați prin evaluarea în ce măsură prezintă regularitate în ceea ce privește relațiile de tipul considerat în analogiile cuvintelor. În această lucrare, investigăm în ce măsură spațiile de reprezentare a vectorilor propozițiilor utilizate frecvent reflectă și anumite tipuri de regularitate. Propunem o serie de scheme de inducere a datelor de evaluare, bazate pe date de analogie lexicală, precum și pe relații semantice între propoziții. Experimentele noastre iau în considerare o gamă largă de metode de încorporare a frazelor, inclusiv cele bazate pe încorporări contextuale în stil BERT. Considerăm că diferitele modele diferă substanțial în capacitatea lor de a reflecta astfel de regularități.', 'sr': 'Iako su važne vlasništvo predstavljanja rijeèi vektora proučene široko, mnogo manje je poznato o vlasništvu predstavljanja vektora rečenica. Vectori reèi često procjenjuju procjenom na koji stupanj izlaze regularnost u vezi takvih vrsta razmotrenih u reèima analogija. U ovom papiru istražujemo u kakvoj mjeri često koristimo prostore predstavljanja vektora rečenica, kao i odražavamo određene vrste redovitosti. Predlažemo broj šema da induciraju podatke o procjeni, na temelju leksičkih analogijskih podataka, kao i semantičkih odnosa između rečenica. Naši eksperimenti smatraju širom raspon metoda uključujući rečenice, uključujući one koji su temeljeni na kontekstualnim integracijama BERT stila. Nalazimo da različiti modeli značajno razlikuju u njihovoj sposobnosti da odraže takve redovitosti.', 'si': 'වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිශේෂණයේ වැදගත් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ ගැන ගො වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා වචන විශේෂයේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා විශ්වාස ක මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වාක්ෂාව වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයේ කොච්චර ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න අපි සැකසුම් කිසිම සැකසුම් සැලසුම් කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණ දත්ත, ලෙක්සිකල් විශේෂණ දත්ත සහ සැමැන්තික සම්බන්ධය අපේ පරීක්ෂණාවල් විශාල වාර්තාවක් හිතනවා වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ විදියට, BERT- වාර්තාවේ පරීක්ෂණ සංවේද අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් මෝඩේල් වලින් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් එයාලගේ පුළුවන් වලින් ඒ ව', 'so': 'Inta lagu baranayo tayada muhiimka ah ee qeybaha qeybaha ku qoran vector si ballaadhan, waxaa laga ogaan karaa in ka yar xuquuqda qeybaha qeybta. Word vectors are often evaluated by assessing to what degree they exhibit regularities with regard to relationships of the sort considered in word analogies.  Warqadan waxaynu ka baaraynaa meelaha loo wakiilayo qeybta jidhka, sidoo kale waxaynu ka baaraynaa qaynuunno cayiman ah. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qorshaha kala duduwan in lagu sameeyo macluumaadka qiimeynta, taas oo lagu saleynayo macluumaad cilmiga leksiga ah iyo xiriir kala duduwan labada sentences. Imtixaankayadu waxay ka fikiraan qaabooyin badan oo xafiiska ku qoran, kuwaas oo ku saleysan BERT-qaab xiliga ah. Waxaynu ogaanaynaa in noocyo kala duduwan ay si badan u kala duwanyihiin awoodooda ay ka fikiraan sharciyada caynkaas ah.', 'mk': 'Иако важните сопствености на претставувањата на векторите на зборовите се проучени екстремно, многу помалку се познати за сопственостите на претставувањата на векторите на речениците. Векторите на зборовите честопати се проценуваат со проценка на степенот на кој тие покажуваат регуларност во однос на односите на видот што се сметаат во зборовите аналогии. Во овој весник, истражуваме во каков степен често се користат векторите на речениците како и одразуваат одредени видови на регуларност. Предложуваме голем број шеми за индукција на податоци за проценка, базирани на лексички аналошки податоци како и семантични односи помеѓу речениците. Нашите експерименти сметаат за широк опсег на методи за вградување на реченици, вклучувајќи ги и оние базирани на контекстни вградувања во стил BERT. Најдовме дека различните модели значително се разликуваат во нивната способност да ги одразат ваквите регулативности.', 'ms': 'Walaupun ciri-ciri penting perwakilan vektor perkataan telah dipelajari secara luas, jauh kurang diketahui tentang ciri-ciri perwakilan vektor perkataan. Vektor perkataan sering diteliti dengan meneliti ke mana darjah mereka menunjukkan regularitas berkaitan dengan hubungan jenis yang dianggap dalam analogi perkataan. In this paper, we investigate to what extent commonly used sentence vector representation spaces as well reflect certain kinds of regularities.  Kami cadangkan beberapa skema untuk mengakibatkan data penilaian, berdasarkan data analogi leksikal dan hubungan semantik antara kalimat. Eksperimen kami mempertimbangkan rangkaian luas kaedah penyampaian kalimat, termasuk kaedah yang berdasarkan penyampaian kontekstual gaya BERT. We find that different models differ substantially in their ability to reflect such regularities.', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li l-karatteristiċi importanti tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi tal-kliem ġew studjati b’mod estensiv, huwa magħruf ħafna inqas dwar il-karatteristiċi tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi tas-sentenza. Il-vetturi tal-kliem ta’ spiss jiġu evalwati billi jiġi vvalutat sa liema grad juru regolaritajiet fir-rigward ta’ relazzjonijiet tat-tip ikkunsidrati fl-analogiji tal-kliem. In this paper, we investigate to what extent commonly used sentence vector representation spaces as well reflect certain kinds of regularities.  We propose a number of schemes to induce evaluation data, based on lexical analogy data as well as semantic relationships between sentences.  L-esperimenti tagħna jikkunsidraw firxa wiesgħa ta’ metodi ta’ inkorporazzjoni tas-sentenzi, inklużi dawk ibbażati fuq inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali fl-istil BERT. Aħna nsibu li mudelli differenti jvarjaw sostanzjalment fil-kapaċità tagħhom li jirriflettu tali regolaritajiet.', 'sv': 'Även om viktiga egenskaper hos ordvektorrepresentationer har studerats i stor utsträckning, är mycket mindre känt om egenskaperna hos meningsvektorrepresentationer. Ordvektorer utvärderas ofta genom att bedöma i vilken grad de uppvisar regelbundenhet med avseende på relationer av det slag som betraktas i ordanalogier. I denna uppsats undersöker vi i vilken utsträckning vanliga meningsvektorrepresentationsutrymmen också återspeglar vissa typer av regelbundenhet. Vi föreslår ett antal system för att inducera utvärderingsdata, baserade på lexikala analogdata samt semantiska relationer mellan meningar. Våra experiment överväger ett brett utbud av meningsinbäddningsmetoder, inklusive sådana baserade på BERT-liknande kontextuella inbäddningar. Vi finner att olika modeller skiljer sig avsevärt åt i sin förmåga att återspegla sådana regelbundenhet.', 'ta': 'While important properties of word vector representations have been studied extensively, far less is known about the properties of sentence vector representations.  வார்த்தை நெறிகள் பெரும்பாலும் வார்த்தையாளர்கள் எந்த degree அவர்கள் விதிமுறைகளை காண்பிக்கிறார்கள் என்பதை மதிப்பிடுகிறா இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வழக்கமாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட வாக்கு நெறிமுக்கிய இடைவெளிகளை பார்க்க வேண்டும் சில வகையான வித வாக்கியங்களுக்கிடையில் உள்ள மதிப்புரைய தகவல்களை செயல்படுத்த வேண்டும் சில திட்டங்களை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். BERT-பாணியை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள வாக்கியம் உள்ளடக்கும் முறையில் நிறைய வாக்கியங்களை பார்க்கலாம். வேறு மாதிரிகள் மாதிரியும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் அது போன்ற விதிமுறைகளை பிரதிபலிக்கு', 'ur': 'While important properties of word vector representations are studied extensively, much less is known about the properties of sentence vector representations. کلمات ویکتروں کو اکثر کس درجہ کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ کس طرح کی تعلقات کے معاملہ میں دکھائی جاتی ہیں۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کلمہ ویکتور کی نمایش جگہ کس طرح استعمال کیا جاتا ہے اور بعض طرح قانون کی نمایش کو بھی تفصیل دیتے ہیں ہم بہت سی طرح پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ارزیابی ڈیٹوں کو پیشنهاد کریں، لکسیکل آنلالوژی ڈیٹے پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں اور جماعت کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ۔ ہماری آزمائش ایک گھیری سیمہ پر جمع کرنے کے طریقے کی نظر کرتی ہیں، جن میں BERT-style contextual embeddings کی بنیاد رکھتی ہیں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ مختلف نمونے ان کے قابل میں بہت سے متفاوت ہیں کہ ان کی سیدھی قابل تفسیر کریں۔', 'uz': "Name Keyingi so'z vektorlari so'zlar analogiyalarida qanday darajaga qoidalarni qiymatlashadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz oddiy gapir vektor representing joylarini qanday darajada qidirishni va bir necha qanday qoidalarni tasavvur qilamiz. Biz leksikal analog maʼlumoti asosida va gaplar orasidagi semantik munosabatlarni qiymatlash uchun bir necha qoliplar talab qilamiz. Bizning tajribalarimiz bir necha so'zlarni o'zgartirish usullarini o'zgartiradi. BERT uslubining asosida qo'llangan. Biz o'ylaymiz, har xil modellar shu qoidalarni tasavvur qilish qobiliyatiga katta ajoyib turadi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù các tính chất quan trọng của các biểu tượng vector đã được nghiên cứu rộng, nhưng ít được biết về tính chất của các biểu tượng vector. Các véc- tơ từ thường được đánh giá bằng cách xác định mức độ chúng có liên quan đến các mối quan hệ với loại từ tương tự. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra về mức độ thường sử dụng các khu vực đại diện hình phạt, cũng phản ánh các loại quy tắc nhất định. Chúng tôi đề xuất một số kế hoạch để tạo ra các dữ liệu đánh giá dựa trên các dữ liệu so sánh từ vựng cũng như các mối quan hệ ngữ pháp giữa các câu. Các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi xem xét một loạt các phương pháp cấy ghép câu, bao gồm cả những phương pháp dựa trên sự cấy ghép ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi thấy các mô hình khác nhau rất khác nhau về khả năng phản ứng các quy tắc.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че важни свойства на слововекторните представи са изследвани широко, много по-малко е известно за свойствата на изреченията векторни представи. Текстовите вектори често се оценяват чрез оценка до каква степен те показват редовност по отношение на отношенията от вида, разглеждан в думите аналогии. В тази статия изследваме до каква степен често използваните пространства за представяне на вектори на изречения отразяват определени видове редовности. Предлагаме редица схеми за индуциране на данни за оценка, базирани на лексикална аналогия, както и семантични връзки между изреченията. Нашите експерименти разглеждат широк спектър от методи за вграждане на изречения, включително такива, базирани на контекстуални вграждания в стил BERT. Установяваме, че различните модели се различават значително в способността си да отразяват такива редовности.', 'hr': 'Iako su važne vlasništvo predstavljanja riječi vektora proučavale široko, mnogo manje je poznato o vlasništvu predstavljanja vektora rečenica. Vektori riječi često procjenjuju procjenom na koji stupanj pokazuju regularnost u vezi takvih vrsta razmotrenih u riječnim analogijama. U ovom papiru istražujemo u kakvoj mjeri često koristimo prostore predstavljanja vektora kazne kao i određujemo određene vrste redovitosti. Predlažemo broj šema za induciranje podataka o procjenama, temeljito na leksičkim analogijskim podacima, kao i semantičkim odnosima između kazne. Naši eksperimenti smatraju širokim rasponom metoda uključujući rečenice, uključujući one temeljene na contextualnim integracijama BERT stila. Nalazimo da se različiti modeli značajno razlikuju u njihovoj sposobnosti odražavati takve redovitosti.', 'nl': "Hoewel belangrijke eigenschappen van woordvectorrepresentaties uitgebreid zijn bestudeerd, is veel minder bekend over de eigenschappen van zinnvectorrepresentaties. Woordvectoren worden vaak geëvalueerd door te beoordelen in hoeverre ze regelmatigheden vertonen met betrekking tot relaties van het soort dat in woordanalogieën wordt beschouwd. In dit artikel onderzoeken we in hoeverre veelgebruikte zinnenvectorepresentatieruimten ook bepaalde soorten regulariteiten weerspiegelen. We stellen een aantal schema's voor om evaluatiegegevens te induceren, gebaseerd op lexicale analogiegegevens en semantische relaties tussen zinnen. Onze experimenten houden rekening met een breed scala aan zinsinbeddingsmethoden, waaronder methoden gebaseerd op contextuele inbeddings in BERT-stijl. We stellen vast dat verschillende modellen aanzienlijk verschillen in hun vermogen om dergelijke regelmatigheden weer te geven.", 'da': 'Mens vigtige egenskaber ved ordvektorrepræsentationer er blevet undersøgt omfattende, er langt mindre kendt om egenskaberne ved sætningsvektorrepræsentationer. Ordvektorer evalueres ofte ved at vurdere, i hvilken grad de udviser regelmæssigheder med hensyn til relationer af den art, der betragtes i ordanalogier. I denne artikel undersøger vi i hvilket omfang almindeligt anvendte sætningsvektorrepræsentationsrum også afspejler visse former for regelmæssigheder. Vi foreslår en række ordninger til at fremkalde evalueringsdata, baseret på leksikalske analogidata samt semantiske relationer mellem sætninger. Vores eksperimenter overvejer en bred vifte af sætningsindlejringsmetoder, herunder dem baseret på BERT-stil kontekstuelle indlejringer. Vi finder, at forskellige modeller er meget forskellige i deres evne til at afspejle sådanne regelmæssigheder.', 'de': 'Wﾃ､hrend wichtige Eigenschaften von Wortvektorreprﾃ､sentationen ausfﾃｼhrlich untersucht wurden, ist weit weniger ﾃｼber die Eigenschaften von Satzvektorreprﾃ､sentationen bekannt. Wortvektoren werden oft dadurch bewertet, inwieweit sie Regelmﾃ､ﾃ殃gkeiten in Bezug auf Beziehungen der Art aufweisen, die in Wortanalogien berﾃｼcksichtigt werden. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, inwieweit gﾃ､ngige Satzvektorreprﾃ､sentationsrﾃ､ume auch bestimmte Arten von Regelmﾃ､ﾃ殃gkeiten widerspiegeln. Wir schlagen eine Reihe von Schemata vor, um Auswertungsdaten zu induzieren, basierend auf lexikalischen Analogie-Daten sowie semantischen Beziehungen zwischen Sﾃ､tzen. Unsere Experimente betrachten eine breite Palette von Satzbedding-Methoden, einschlieﾃ殕ich solcher, die auf BERT-artigen kontextuellen Einbettungen basieren. Wir stellen fest, dass sich verschiedene Modelle erheblich in ihrer Fﾃ､higkeit unterscheiden, solche Regelmﾃ､ﾃ殃gkeiten widerzuspiegeln.', 'id': 'Meskipun properti penting dari representation vektor kata telah dipelajari secara ekstensif, jauh kurang diketahui tentang properti representation vektor kalimat. Vektor kata sering diteliti dengan mengevaluasi seberapa tinggi mereka menunjukkan regularitas mengenai hubungan semacam yang dianggap dalam analogi kata. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki seberapa luasnya digunakan ruang representation vektor kalimat serta merefleksikan jenis regularitas tertentu. Kami mengusulkan sejumlah skema untuk mendorong data evaluasi, berdasarkan data analogi lexik dan hubungan semantis antara kalimat. Eksperimen kami mempertimbangkan jangkauan luas metode penyembedding kalimat, termasuk metode berdasarkan penyembedding kontekstual gaya BERT. Kami menemukan bahwa model yang berbeda sangat berbeda dalam kemampuan mereka untuk merefleksi regularitas seperti itu.', 'fa': 'در حالی که ویژگی مهم نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور کلمه به وسیع مطالعه شده\u200cاند، در مورد ویژگی\u200cهای نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور جمله\u200cها خیلی کمتر شناخته می\u200cشوند. ویکتورهای کلمه اغلب با ارزیابی به کدام درجه معمولی در مورد رابطه\u200cهایی از نوع\u200cهای شبیه\u200cشناسی کلمه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند ارزیابی می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما تحقیق می کنیم تا چه مدت معمولاً فضای نمایش ویکتور جمله استفاده می\u200cشود و به نوع معمولی نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما چند نقشه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که داده\u200cهای ارزیابی را تحریک کنند، بر اساس داده\u200cهای آنلالوژی زبان\u200cشناسی و رابطه\u200cهای semantic بین جمله\u200cها. آزمایش\u200cهای ما به عنوان یک مجموعه از روش\u200cهای جمع کردن جمله\u200cهای گسترده می\u200cگویند، شامل آن\u200cها که بر اساس متوسط\u200cهای متوسط\u200cهای سبک BERT بنیاد می\u200cگیرند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که مدل\u200cهای مختلف در توانایی آنها برای تفسیر چنین معمولی تفاوت می\u200cکنند.', 'ko': '사람들은 어향량 표징의 중요한 성질에 대해 광범위한 연구를 했지만 문장 향량 표징의 성질에 대해 아는 것은 매우 적다.어향량은 통상적으로 그것들이 어류비에서 고려한 그런 관계와 관련된 규칙성을 어느 정도 나타낼 수 있는지를 평가함으로써 평가한다.본고에서 우리는 자주 사용하는 문장의 벡터가 공간이 어느 정도에 어떤 규칙을 반영했는지 연구했다.우리는 일련의 어휘 유형 비교 데이터와 문장 간의 의미 관계를 바탕으로 평가 데이터를 귀납하는 방법을 제시했다.우리의 실험은 버트 스타일의 언어 환경을 바탕으로 삽입하는 방법을 포함하여 각양각색의 문장 삽입 방법을 고려했다.우리는 서로 다른 모델이 이런 규칙을 반영하는 능력에 큰 차이가 있다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Wakati hoja muhimu za uwakilishaji wa neno zimesoma kwa kiasi kikubwa, kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi hujulikana kuhusu utaalam wa uwakilishaji wa kizuizi. Vectors wa neno mara nyingi huvutiwa kwa kutathmini vyeo vipi wanavyoonyesha kanuni kuhusu mahusiano ya aina hiyo yanayochukuliwa katika mchanganyiko wa maneno. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza kwa kiasi gani ambacho kawaida hutumika nafasi za uwakilishi wa kizuizini pamoja na kutafakari aina fulani za sheria. Tunazipendekeza mipango kadhaa ya kuanzisha taarifa za uchunguzi, kwa kutumia taarifa za uchambuzi wa lexico pamoja na mahusiano ya kimapenzi kati ya hukumu. Majaribio yetu yanachukulia njia nyingi za hukumu zinazofungwa, ikiwa ni pamoja na zile zinazotumiwa na mtindo wa BERT. Tunaona kuwa mifano tofauti hutofautiana sana na uwezo wao wa kutafakari sheria hizo.', 'tr': 'Sözlük vektör temsillerinin önemli özellikleri büyük ölçüde çalışılmıştır. - Kelime vektörleri, kelime analogilerinde düşünen ilişkileri hakkında düzenli derecelerini tanımlayarak değerlendirilir. Bu kağıtda, genellikle kullanılan cümle vektör temsilleri alanları ve belli tür düzenlemeleri ifade ediyoruz. Biz bir näçe taslaýyşy çykmak maglumatyny etmäge teklip edip görýäris. Lektik analogi maglumatynda we sözler arasyndaky semantik baglaýyşlara daýanýar. Biziň deneylerimiz BERT stilinde daýanýan sözlem taýýarlama yöntemlerini düşünýärler. Biz farklı nusgalar olaryň ýaly düzgünliklerini üýtgetmek ukypynda üýtgeşikleri farklygyny tapýarys.', 'af': "Terwyl belangrike eienskappe van woord vektor voorstellings is uitbreidig ondersoek, is baie minder bekend oor die eienskappe van sin vektor voorstellings. Woord vektore word dikwels geevalueer deur die assensie van watter grade hulle regulariteite uitbied met betrekking tot verhouding van die soort beskou in woord analogies. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek na watter uitbreiding gewoonlik gebruik is setelsvektor verteenwoordigheidspasies en ook reflekteer sekere soorte regulariteite. Ons voorstel 'n aantal skeme om evalueringsdata te induseer, gebaseer op leksiese analogiese data en semantiese verwantings tussen setings. Ons eksperimente beskou 'n wyde omvang van setinge inbetering metodes, insluitend een wat gebaseer op BERT- styl contextual inbettings. Ons vind dat verskillende modele substantief verskillig is in hul kapasiteit om sodanige regulariteite te reflekteer.", 'am': 'የቃላት አካባቢዎች ምርጫዎች በጥቅማዊ ተማርቷል፣ የፍርድ vector መልዕክቶች ግንኙነት በጣም ጥቂት አይታወቅም፡፡ የቃላት vectors ብዙ ጊዜ በንግግር አናውሎጂ ላይ በተመለከተው የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ምን እንደሆነ በማስተዋል ይታያል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የቁጥጥር መቆጣጠሪያ ቦታዎች ምን ያህል የተጠቀሙትን እና የተለያዩ የሥርዓት ሥርዓቶች እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ ሌክሲካዊ አናሎጂ ዳታ እና በክፍሎች መካከል የsemantic ግንኙነት በመጠቀም ብዙ ፕሮግራሞች እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን በBERT-ዓይነት የተገኘ የውይይት ግንኙነት የሚጨመር የፍርድ አካባቢ ሥርዓቶች ይመለከታሉ፡፡ ልዩ ዓይነቶች እንደዚህ ሥርዓቶችን ለመመለስ በመቻላቸው እጅግ ተለይተዋል ብለን እናገኛለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ndërsa pronësitë e rëndësishme të përfaqësimeve të vektorit të fjalës janë studiuar në mënyrë të gjerë, shumë më pak është e njohur rreth pronësive të përfaqësimeve të vektorit të fjalës. Word vectors are often evaluated by assessing to what degree they exhibit regularities with regard to relationships of the sort considered in word analogies.  Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë në çfarë mase përdoren zakonisht hapësirat e përfaqësimit të vektorit të fjalëve si dhe reflektojnë disa lloje rregullaliteti. Ne propozojmë një numër skemash për të nxitur të dhënat e vlerësimit, bazuar në të dhënat e analogjisë lexike si dhe marrëdhëniet semantike midis fjalëve. Eksperimentet tona konsiderojnë një gamë të gjerë metodash të përfshirjes së fjalëve, duke përfshirë ato bazuar në përfshirje kontekstuale stil BERT. Ne zbulojmë se modelet e ndryshme ndryshojnë thelbësisht në aftësinë e tyre për të pasqyruar rregullalitetet e tilla.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ բառերի վեկտորների ներկայացումների կարևոր հատկությունները լայն ուսումնասիրել են, շատ ավելի քիչ է հայտնի նախադասության վեկտորների ներկայացումների հատկությունների մասին: Word vectors are often evaluated by assessing to what degree they exhibit regularities with regard to relationships of the sort considered in word analogies.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե որքանով են սովորաբար օգտագործված նախադասությունների վեկտորների ներկայացման տարածքները, ինչպես նաև արտացոլում որոշ տեսակի կանոնավոր կարողությունները: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի շարք ծրագրեր գնահատման տվյալների արտադրման համար, հիմնված լեքսիկական նմանատիպ տվյալների վրա, ինչպես նաև նախադասությունների միջև սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների վրա: Մեր փորձարկումները համարում են նախադասությունների ներառման մեթոդներ, ներառյալ նախադասությունների մեթոդներ, որոնք հիմնված են BER-ի ոճի կոնտեքստոնալ ներառման վրա: We find that different models differ substantially in their ability to reflect such regularities.', 'az': 'Sözlük vektoru göstərilmələrinin möhüm xüsusiyyətlərinin çox yüksək təhsil edildiyi halda, sözlük vektoru göstərilmələrinin xüsusiyyətlərini daha az bilər. Sözlük vektörləri, sözlərin analogiyalarında düşünülən ilişkileri barəsində nə dərəcə göstərdiklərini müəyyən edərək değerlənirlər. Bu kağızda, biz cümlələr vektör göstəricisi məsafələrini və bəzi növləri düzgünlükləri təşkil edirik. Biz bir neçə şəkil təklif edirik ki, təklif məlumatlarına dayandırılır, lakin sözlərin arasındakı semantik ilişkisi. Bizim təcrübələrimiz BERT stilinin müxtəlif məsələlərə dayanan cümlələr içərisində geniş bir səviyyədə çəkilmə metodlarını düşünürlər. Biz fərqli modellərin böyük düzgünlükləri təcrübə etmək bacarıqlarında çox fərqli olduğunu görürük.', 'bn': 'যদিও শব্দ ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিদের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্য বিস্তারিত বৈশিষ্ট্য গবেষণা করা হয়েছে, তবে বাক্য ভেক্টরে শব্দ ভেক্টর প্রায়শই মূল্যবোধ করা হচ্ছে শব্দ বিশ্লেষণে বিবেচনা করা সম্পর্কের ব্যাপারে তারা কোন ডিগ্রি প্রদর্শন করে নিয়মিত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা তদন্ত করি কতটা সাধারণত কারাদণ্ড ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্বের স্থান ব্যবহার করে এবং কিছু নিয়মিত বিষয়ের প্ We propose a number of schemes to induce evaluation data, based on lexical analogy data as well as semantic relationships between sentences.  আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতার ভিত্তিতে বিবেরেট-স্ট আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ভিন্ন মডেল তাদের এই ধরনের নিয়ম প্রতিফলিত করার ক্ষমতায় ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন।', 'cs': 'Zatímco důležité vlastnosti slovních vektorových reprezentací byly rozsáhlě studovány, mnohem méně je známo o vlastnostech větových vektorových reprezentací. Slovní vektory jsou často hodnoceny posouzením, do jaké míry vykazují pravidelnosti s ohledem na vztahy druhu považované ve slovních analogiích. V tomto článku zkoumáme, do jaké míry běžně používané vektorové reprezentační prostory vět také odrážejí určité druhy pravidelností. Navrhujeme řadu schémat pro indukci hodnotících dat, založených na lexikálních analogických datech a sémantických vztazích mezi větami. Naše experimenty se zabývají širokou škálou metod vkládání vět, včetně těch založených na kontextových vkládáních ve stylu BERT. Zjišťujeme, že různé modely se výrazně liší schopností odrážet tyto pravidelnosti.', 'bs': 'Iako je važna vlasništva predstavljanja riječi vektora proučena široko, mnogo manje se zna o vlasništvu predstavljanja vektora rečenica. Vektori riječi često procjenjuju procjenom na koji stupanj pokazuju regularnost u vezi takve vrste koje se smatra analogijama riječi. U ovom papiru istražujemo u kakvoj mjeri često koristimo prostore predstavljanja vektora kazne, kao i određujemo određene vrste redovitosti. Predlažemo broj šema za induciranje podataka o procjenama na temelju leksičkih analogijskih podataka, kao i semantičkih odnosa između kazne. Naši eksperimenti smatraju širom raspon metoda uključujući rečenice, uključujući one koji su temeljeni na contextualnim integracijama BERT stila. Mi smatramo da različiti modeli značajno razlikuju u njihovoj sposobnosti da odraže takve redovitosti.', 'et': 'Kuigi olulisi omadusi sõna vektor esituste kohta on laialdaselt uuritud, on lausevektor esituste omadustest palju vähem teada. Sõnavaktorite hindamisel hinnatakse sageli, millisel määral nad esinevad regulaarsust seoste suhtes, mida käsitletakse sõnaloogiates. Käesolevas töös uurime, millises ulatuses tavaliselt kasutatavad lausevektori esindusruumid kajastavad ka teatud liiki regulaarsust. Pakume välja mitmeid skeeme hindamisandmete indutseerimiseks, mis põhinevad leksikaalse analoogia andmetel ja lausete semantilistel seostel. Meie eksperimendid käsitlevad laia valikut lausete manustamise meetodeid, sealhulgas BERT-stiilis kontekstipõhistel manustamistel põhinevaid meetodeid. Leiame, et erinevad mudelid erinevad oluliselt nende suutlikkuse poolest kajastada selliseid korrapärasusi.', 'fi': 'Vaikka sanavektorirepresentaatioiden tärkeitä ominaisuuksia on tutkittu laajasti, lausevektorirepresentaatioiden ominaisuuksista tiedetään paljon vähemmän. Sanavektorit arvioidaan usein arvioimalla, missä määrin niillä on sääntöjenvastaisuuksia sanaanalogiassa käsiteltyjen suhteiden suhteen. Tässä työssä tutkitaan, missä määrin yleisesti käytetyt lausevektorin esitysavaruudet heijastavat tietyntyyppisiä säännöllisyyksiä. Ehdotamme useita menetelmiä arviointidatan indusoimiseksi, jotka perustuvat leksikaaliseen analogiaan sekä lauseiden semanttisiin suhteisiin. Kokeissamme tarkastellaan monenlaisia lauseiden upotusmenetelmiä, mukaan lukien BERT-tyylisiin kontekstuaalisiin upotuksiin perustuvat menetelmät. Havaitsemme, että erilaiset mallit eroavat huomattavasti kyvystään heijastaa tällaisia sääntöjenvastaisuuksia.', 'ca': "Mentre que les propietats importants de les representacions dels vectors de paraules han estat estudiadas en gran medida, molt menys es coneix sobre les propietats de les representacions dels vectors de frases. Els vectors de paraules sovint s'evaluen valorant en quin grau mostran regularitats en relacions del tipus considerat en les analogies de paraules. En aquest paper, investigam en quin punt s'utilitzen els espais de representació dels vectors de frases i també reflecteixen certs tipus de regularitats. Proposem un cert nombre d'esquemes per induir dades d'evaluació, basades en dades d'analògia lèxica i en relacions semàntiques entre frases. Els nostres experiments consideran una gran gama de mètodes d'incorporació de frases, incloent-los basats en incorporacions contextuals d'estil BERT. Trobem que diferents models difereixen substancialment en la seva habilitat de reflexionar aquestes regularitats.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive vectors Nang pemilih iki, kita ujaran kanggo kalagayet supaya winih vector Awak dhéwé ngerti akeh akeh scheme nggawe dadi kejahatan, dadi luwih karo perusahaan langgar sampek semanti karo perusahaan winih. Awak dhéwé Perintah sing paling-manut gawe akeh gambar akeh modèr sing nyebuturan, gambar ditambah barang nggawe BERT-style contextual embedding. Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih saben model sing sampeyan sakjane dipulang lan kaya sakjane sakjane kanggo mbelaké kuwi tindakan.', 'he': 'למרות שהתכונות חשובות של ייצוגי ווקטור מילים למדו באופן רחב, הרבה פחות ידועים על תכונות ייצוגי ווקטור משפטים. Word vectors are often evaluated by assessing to what degree they exhibit regularities with regard to relationships of the sort considered in word analogies.  בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים באיזה מידה משתמשים בדרך כלל במרחבי ייצוג ווקטורים של משפטים כמו גם משקפים סוגים מסוימים של חוקיות. אנו מציעים מספר תכניות כדי לעורר נתוני הערכה, מבוססים על נתוני אנלוגיה לקסית וגם מערכות יחסים סמנטיות בין משפטים. הניסויים שלנו שוקלים מגוון רחב של שיטות תוכנית משפטים, כולל שיטות מבוססות על תוכניות קונטקסטיות בסגנון BERT. אנחנו מוצאים שדוגמנים שונים שונים באופן משמעותי ביכולת שלהם לשקף חוקיות כאלה.', 'ha': "A lokacin da an karanta properties na masu muhimu wa masu wakilishi na shiryarwa na faɗi, don a san mafi ƙaranci game da properties wa masu shiryarwa na gefen. Ana ƙaddara masu shiryi da maganar a ƙayyade ko da daraja suke nuna rukuwan a cikin zumunta da aka yi bincike a cikin fasalin kalma. Daga wannan takardan, Munã yin bincike a tsakanin da ake amfani da duk filayen halartatto na matsayin nan da kuma munã ƙaddara wasu na'umci. Munã buɗe wasu na'ura da za'a iya ƙara data ga evaluation, a kan data na fassarar kwamfyutan leksisi da sami da danganiya na semanti tsakanin hukumai. Kayan jarrabõnmu sun ƙaddara wasu hanyõyi masu cikin maganar da ke ƙunsa, da waɗannan a kan salon da aka ƙunsa da tsarin BERT. Muna gane cewa misãlai dabam-dabam na sãɓã wa gwargwadon da yake iya girma a kan karatun wannan.", 'sk': 'Medtem ko so bile pomembne lastnosti besednih vektorskih reprezentacij obsežno raziskane, je o lastnostih vektorskih reprezentacij stavkov znano veliko manj. Besedni vektorji se pogosto ocenjujejo z oceno, v kakšni meri kažejo pravilnosti glede razmerij vrste, ki se upoštevajo v besednih analogijah. V prispevku raziskujemo, v kolikšni meri običajno uporabljeni prostori za predstavitev vektorjev stavkov odražajo določene vrste pravilnosti. Predlagamo številne sheme za inducijo evalvacijskih podatkov, ki temeljijo na podatkih leksikalne analogije in semantičnih odnosih med stavki. Naši poskusi obravnavajo širok spekter metod vdelave stavkov, vključno s tistimi, ki temeljijo na kontekstualnih vdelavah v slogu BERT. Ugotavljamo, da se različni modeli bistveno razlikujejo po sposobnosti odražanja takih pravilnosti.', 'bo': 'གལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཀྱི་གསལ་པོ་བརྗོད་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཚོགས་སྟོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ངོ་བོའི་སྐོར ཐ་སྙད་vectors་ཚོར་བ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚད་ལ་གང་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྟགས་གང་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྟོང་མཁན་གྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྟོང་དང་ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཙུགས་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཚིག་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མི་འདྲ་བ་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལུས་ཡོད་ཚད་མི་འདྲ་བ་དེ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Manifold Learning-based Word Representation Refinement Incorporating Global and Local Information', 'ar': 'تحسين تمثيل الكلمات القائم على التعلم المتنوع يتضمن المعلومات العالمية والمحلية', 'pt': 'Refinamento de representação de palavras baseado em aprendizado múltiplo, incorporando informações globais e locais', 'fr': "Amélioration de la représentation des mots basée sur l'apprentissage multiple intégrant des informations globales et locales", 'es': 'Refinamiento de la representación de palabras basado en el aprendizaje múltiple que incorpora información global y local', 'ja': 'グローバルおよびローカル情報を組み込んだマニホールド学習ベースの単語表現の絞り込み', 'zh': '基于学流形示优化,包括全局本地信息', 'ru': 'Уточнение представления слов на основе обучения, включая глобальную и локальную информацию', 'hi': 'कई गुना अधिगम-आधारित Word प्रतिनिधित्व परिशोधन वैश्विक और स्थानीय जानकारी को शामिल करना', 'ga': 'Mionchóiriú ar Léiriú Focal Iomadúil atá Bunaithe ar Fhoghlaim a Ionchorpraíonn Faisnéis Dhomhanda agus Áitiúil', 'ka': 'სწავლების განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების გამოსახულება გლობალური და ლოკალური ინფორმაცია', 'hu': 'Sokféle tanulási alapú szóképviselet finomítás Globális és helyi információkat tartalmazó', 'el': 'Πολυάριθμη εκμάθηση-βασισμένη στη βελτίωση της αναπαράστασης λέξεων ενσωματώνοντας παγκόσμιες και τοπικές πληροφορίες', 'it': "Raffinazione della rappresentazione delle parole basata sull'apprendimento che incorpora informazioni globali e locali", 'kk': 'Бірнеше рет оқу негізінде сөздерді таңдау жалпы және жергілікті мәліметті ендіру', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Penampilan Perkataan Berasas Pembelajaran Berberasaskan Berlipat Menyambungkan Maklumat Global dan Lokal', 'ml': 'മാനിഫോള്\u200dഡ് പഠിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധി', 'mt': 'Rifinament tar-Rappreżentanza tal-kliem ibbażat fuq it-Tagħlim Manipli li jinkorpora Informazzjoni Globali u Lokali', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн үндсэн үг Representation Refinement Incorporating Global and Local Information', 'no': 'Fleire læringsbaserte ordreprezentasjonsrefinering med global og lokal informasjon', 'pl': 'Doskonalenie reprezentacji słów opartych na uczeniu się opartej na globalnych i lokalnych informacjach', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea cuvintelor bazată pe învățare multiplă Rafinare care încorporează informații globale și locale', 'lt': 'Daugelio mokymosi pagrindu pagrįstas žodžių atstovavimo tobulinimas, apimantis pasaulinę ir vietinę informaciją', 'so': 'Qaxootiga u soo jeedista hadalka ee ku saleysan waxbarashada', 'sv': 'Multifold Learning-based Word Representation Raffinering Inbegripande global och lokal information', 'sr': 'Mnogo puta osnovanih na učenju reèi predstavljanja za reèi ukljuèujuæi globalne i lokalne informacije', 'si': 'විශාලික සහ ස්ථානික තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණය', 'ta': 'பொது மற்றும் உள்ளூர் தகவல்', 'ur': 'سیکھنے کی بنیاد پر کلمات ریسپانسٹنسیٹ ریفنینٹ ریفنینٹ گلوبل اور محلی معلومات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập trung lại văn bản từ giáo dục Có thể thao tác thông tin cục bộ', 'da': 'Mangfold Learning-based Word Representation Raffinering Inkluderer global og lokal information', 'hr': 'Mnogo učenja osnovana na učenju Refinement predstavljanja riječi uključujući globalne i lokalne informacije', 'nl': 'Veelzijdige op leren gebaseerde woordvertegenwoordiging verfijning met wereldwijde en lokale informatie', 'bg': 'Разнообразно обучение базирано на представяне на думи Усъвършенстване на включване на глобална и местна информация', 'de': 'Vielfältige lernbasierte Wortrepräsentation mit globalen und lokalen Informationen', 'fa': 'بازسازی کلمات بنیاد یادگیری چندین بار با تولید اطلاعات جهانی و محلی', 'id': 'Penampilan Perkataan Berdasarkan Pembelajaran Berbentuk Mengangkut Informasi Global dan Lokal', 'ko': '전체 국면과 국부 정보를 결합한 유형 학습 기반의 단어 표시 정화', 'sw': 'Reference Reference of Word based in Manifold Learning Word Incororating information global and local', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përpërfaqësimi i fjalëve me bazë në mësim të ndryshëm duke përfshirë informacionin global dhe lokal', 'tr': 'Öwrenmek tabanly söz temsilcisi Ýawtomatik we Ýerli Maglumaty Ködleme', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k-tabanl캼 S칬z Representation Refinement Global v톛 Yerli Mal칲mat캼', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'ca': "Refinement de la representació de paraules basat en l'aprenentatge múltiple incorporant informació global i local", 'bn': 'ম্যানিফোল্ড শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক শব্দ প্রতিনিধি সংস্থা গ্লোবাল এবং স্থানীয় তথ্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত করে', 'bs': 'Višestruko osnovano na učenju prezentacija riječi uključujući globalne i lokalne informacije', 'et': 'Mitmekülgne õppepõhine sõna esindamine Täiustatud ülemaailmse ja kohaliku teabe kaasamine', 'cs': 'Rozmanité učení založené na vylepšení reprezentace slov zahrnující globální a místní informace', 'fi': 'Monipuolinen oppimispohjainen sanarepresentaatio Refinement Globaalin ja paikallisen tiedon yhdistäminen', 'hy': 'Comment', 'jv': 'Manifolder', 'he': 'מייצג מילים מבוסס על למידה רבה שמכיל מידע גלובלי ומקומי', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje predstavljanja besed, ki temelji na množičnem učenju, vključevanje globalnih in lokalnih informacij', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གཙོ་རིམ་ལ་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་བརྗོད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་རང་ཁུལ་ཆ་'}
{'en': 'Recent studies show that word embedding models often underestimate similarities between similar words and overestimate similarities between distant words. This results in word similarity results obtained from embedding models inconsistent with human judgment. Manifold learning-based methods are widely utilized to refine word representations by re-embedding word vectors from the original embedding space to a new refined semantic space. These methods mainly focus on preserving local geometry information through performing weighted locally linear combination between words and their neighbors twice. However, these reconstruction weights are easily influenced by different selections of neighboring words and the whole combination process is time-consuming. In this paper, we propose two novel word representation refinement methods leveraging isometry feature mapping and local tangent space respectively. Unlike previous methods, our first method corrects pre-trained word embeddings by preserving global geometry information of all words instead of local geometry information between words and their neighbors. Our second method refines word representations by aligning original and re-fined embedding spaces based on local tangent space instead of performing weighted locally linear combination twice. Experimental results obtained from standard semantic relatedness and semantic similarity tasks show that our methods outperform various state-of-the-art baselines for word representation refinement.', 'ar': 'تظهر الدراسات الحديثة أن نماذج تضمين الكلمات غالبًا ما تستخف بأوجه التشابه بين الكلمات المتشابهة والمبالغة في تقدير أوجه التشابه بين الكلمات البعيدة. ينتج عن هذا نتائج تشابه الكلمات التي تم الحصول عليها من تضمين النماذج غير المتوافقة مع الحكم البشري. تُستخدم الأساليب القائمة على التعلم المتنوع على نطاق واسع لتحسين تمثيل الكلمات عن طريق إعادة تضمين متجهات الكلمات من مساحة التضمين الأصلية إلى مساحة دلالية جديدة. تركز هذه الطرق بشكل أساسي على الحفاظ على معلومات الهندسة المحلية من خلال إجراء تركيبة خطية مرجحة محليًا بين الكلمات وجيرانها مرتين. ومع ذلك ، فإن أوزان إعادة البناء هذه تتأثر بسهولة باختيارات مختلفة من الكلمات المجاورة وتستغرق عملية الدمج بأكملها وقتًا طويلاً. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقتين جديدتين لصقل تمثيل الكلمات للاستفادة من رسم خرائط ميزات القياس ومساحة الظل المحلية على التوالي. على عكس الأساليب السابقة ، فإن طريقتنا الأولى تصحح حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا عن طريق الحفاظ على معلومات الهندسة العالمية لجميع الكلمات بدلاً من معلومات الهندسة المحلية بين الكلمات وجيرانها. تعمل طريقتنا الثانية على تحسين تمثيلات الكلمات من خلال محاذاة مسافات التضمين الأصلية والمعاد تحديدها بناءً على مساحة الظل المحلية بدلاً من تنفيذ تركيبة خطية مرجحة محليًا مرتين. تظهر النتائج التجريبية التي تم الحصول عليها من الترابط الدلالي القياسي ومهام التشابه الدلالي أن أساليبنا تتفوق على مختلف خطوط الأساس الحديثة لتمثيل الكلمات\nالتنقيح.', 'fr': "Des études récentes montrent que les modèles d'intégration de mots sous-estiment souvent les similitudes entre des mots similaires et surestiment les similitudes entre des mots distants. Il en résulte des résultats de similarité de mots obtenus à partir de modèles d'intégration incompatibles avec le jugement humain. De nombreuses méthodes basées sur l'apprentissage sont largement utilisées pour affiner les représentations de mots en réintégrant des vecteurs de mots de l'espace d'intégration d'origine dans un nouvel espace sémantique affiné. Ces méthodes se concentrent principalement sur la préservation des informations de géométrie locale en effectuant deux fois une combinaison linéaire pondérée localement entre les mots et leurs voisins. Cependant, ces poids de reconstruction sont facilement influencés par différentes sélections de mots voisins et l'ensemble du processus de combinaison prend du temps. Dans cet article, nous proposons deux nouvelles méthodes d'affinement de la représentation de mots utilisant respectivement la cartographie des caractéristiques d'isométrie et l'espace tangent local. Contrairement aux méthodes précédentes, notre première méthode corrige les intégrations de mots préentraînées en préservant les informations géométriques globales de tous les mots au lieu des informations de géométrie locale entre les mots et leurs voisins. Notre deuxième méthode affine les représentations de mots en alignant les espaces d'intégration originaux et raffinés en fonction de l'espace tangent local au lieu d'effectuer deux combinaisons linéaires localement pondérées. Les résultats expérimentaux obtenus à partir de tâches standard de relation sémantique et de similarité sémantique montrent que nos méthodes surpassent les différentes lignes de base de pointe pour la représentation des mots\nraffinement.", 'es': 'Estudios recientes muestran que los modelos de incrustación de palabras a menudo subestiman las similitudes entre palabras similares y sobreestiman las similitudes entre palabras distantes. Esto da como resultado resultados de similitud de palabras obtenidos al incorporar modelos inconsistentes con el juicio humano. Se utilizan ampliamente múltiples métodos basados en el aprendizaje para refinar las representaciones de palabras mediante la reinserción de vectores de palabras del espacio de incrustación original en un nuevo espacio semántico refinado. Estos métodos se centran principalmente en preservar la información de geometría local mediante la realización de combinaciones lineales localmente ponderadas entre las palabras y sus vecinas dos veces. Sin embargo, estas ponderaciones de reconstrucción se ven fácilmente influenciadas por diferentes selecciones de palabras vecinas y todo el proceso de combinación lleva mucho tiempo. En este artículo, proponemos dos métodos novedosos de refinamiento de la representación de palabras que aprovechan el mapeo de características de isometría y el espacio tangente local, respectivamente. A diferencia de los métodos anteriores, nuestro primer método corrige las incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas al preservar la información de geometría global de todas las palabras en lugar de la información de geometría local entre las palabras y sus vecinas. Nuestro segundo método refina las representaciones de palabras alineando los espacios de incrustación originales y refinados en función del espacio tangente local en lugar de realizar una combinación lineal localmente ponderada dos veces. Los resultados experimentales obtenidos de las tareas estándar de relación semántica y similitud semántica muestran que nuestros métodos superan a varias líneas de referencia de última generación para la representación de palabras\nrefinamiento.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、単語埋め込みモデルはしばしば類似の単語間の類似性を過小評価し、遠い単語間の類似性を過大評価することが示されている。 これにより、人間の判断と矛盾するモデルを埋め込むことから得られる単語の類似性が生じる。 マニホールド学習ベースの方法は、元の埋め込み空間から新しい洗練された意味空間にワードベクトルを再埋め込むことによって、ワード表現を洗練するために広く利用されている。 これらの方法は、主に、単語とその隣接する単語との間で2回重み付けされた局所的な線形組み合わせを行うことによって、局所的な幾何学的情報を保存することに焦点を当てている。 しかしながら、これらの再構築ウェイトは、隣接する単語の異なる選択によって容易に影響され、組み合わせプロセス全体が時間がかかる。 本稿では，等角写像と局所接線空間をそれぞれ活用した2つの新規な単語表現精緻化手法を提案する． これまでの方法とは異なり、私たちの最初の方法は、すべての単語のグローバルなジオメトリ情報を、単語とその近隣の間のローカルなジオメトリ情報の代わりに保存することによって、事前に訓練された単語の埋め込みを修正します。 2番目の方法は、重み付き局所線形結合を2回実行する代わりに、局所接線空間に基づいて元の埋め込み空間と再微調整された埋め込み空間を整列させることによって、単語の表現を改善します。 標準的なセマンティック関連性とセマンティック類似性タスクから得られた実験結果は、私たちの方法が単語表現の様々な最先端のベースラインを上回っていることを示しています。\n洗練度の向上.', 'pt': 'Estudos recentes mostram que os modelos de incorporação de palavras muitas vezes subestimam as semelhanças entre palavras semelhantes e superestimam as semelhanças entre palavras distantes. Isso resulta em resultados de similaridade de palavras obtidos da incorporação de modelos inconsistentes com o julgamento humano. Métodos baseados em aprendizado múltiplo são amplamente utilizados para refinar representações de palavras reembutindo vetores de palavras do espaço de incorporação original para um novo espaço semântico refinado. Esses métodos se concentram principalmente na preservação de informações de geometria local por meio da execução de combinação linear ponderada localmente entre palavras e seus vizinhos duas vezes. No entanto, esses pesos de reconstrução são facilmente influenciados por diferentes seleções de palavras vizinhas e todo o processo de combinação é demorado. Neste artigo, propomos dois novos métodos de refinamento de representação de palavras, aproveitando o mapeamento de características de isometria e o espaço tangente local, respectivamente. Ao contrário dos métodos anteriores, nosso primeiro método corrige incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas, preservando as informações de geometria global de todas as palavras, em vez de informações de geometria local entre as palavras e seus vizinhos. Nosso segundo método refina as representações de palavras alinhando espaços de incorporação originais e refinados com base no espaço tangente local, em vez de executar combinação linear ponderada localmente duas vezes. Resultados experimentais obtidos de tarefas padrão de relacionamento semântico e semelhança semântica mostram que nossos métodos superam várias linhas de base de última geração para representação de palavras\nrefinamento.', 'zh': '近者研明,词嵌模形低估常似单词之相似性,并高估远单词之相似性。 此嵌人之所得单词相似性也。 盖流形学之法,博用销单词向量于原始嵌空入新语义以优化单词示也。 此其大要侧重于因单词与邻单词之间再行加权局线性合以存之。 然重构权重易为邻所择,其事甚耗时。 本文各用等轴测特徵映射及局切空间出二新句示细化法。 与前法不同,第一法存单词全局几何信息而非单词与邻单词间局几何信息以正预练之单词嵌。 臣等第二法切线空对齐原始、重细嵌空以优化单词之,非再行加权局线性合也。 准语义相关性与语义相似性之实验结果表明,吾道优于先进之单词基线\n优雅。', 'hi': 'हाल के अध्ययनों से पता चलता है कि शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल अक्सर समान शब्दों के बीच समानताओं को कम आंकते हैं और दूर के शब्दों के बीच समानताओं को अधिक महत्व देते हैं। यह मानव निर्णय के साथ असंगत मॉडल एम्बेडिंग से प्राप्त शब्द समानता परिणामों में परिणाम देता है। कई गुना सीखने-आधारित विधियों का व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किया जाता है ताकि मूल एम्बेडिंग स्पेस से शब्द वैक्टर को एक नए परिष्कृत शब्दार्थ स्थान पर फिर से एम्बेड करके शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व को परिष्कृत किया जा सके। ये विधियां मुख्य रूप से शब्दों और उनके पड़ोसियों के बीच दो बार भारित स्थानीय रूप से रैखिक संयोजन करने के माध्यम से स्थानीय ज्यामिति जानकारी को संरक्षित करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करती हैं। हालांकि, ये पुनर्निर्माण भार आसानी से पड़ोसी शब्दों के विभिन्न चयनों से प्रभावित होते हैं और पूरी संयोजन प्रक्रिया समय लेने वाली होती है। इस पेपर में, हम क्रमशः आइसोमेट्री फीचर मैपिंग और स्थानीय स्पर्शरेखा अंतरिक्ष का लाभ उठाने के दो उपन्यास शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व शोधन विधियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पिछले तरीकों के विपरीत, हमारी पहली विधि शब्दों और उनके पड़ोसियों के बीच स्थानीय ज्यामिति जानकारी के बजाय सभी शब्दों की वैश्विक ज्यामिति जानकारी को संरक्षित करके पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग को सही करती है। हमारी दूसरी विधि दो बार भारित स्थानीय रूप से रैखिक संयोजन करने के बजाय स्थानीय स्पर्शरेखा स्थान के आधार पर मूल और फिर से जुर्माना एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान को संरेखित करके शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व को परिष्कृत करती है। मानक शब्दार्थ संबद्धता और शब्दार्थ समानता कार्यों से प्राप्त प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे तरीके शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए विभिन्न अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं से आगे निकलते हैं\nशोधन।', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования показывают, что модели вложения слов часто недооценивают сходство между похожими словами и переоценивают сходство между отдаленными словами. Это приводит к тому, что результаты подобия слов, полученные из моделей встраивания, несовместимы с суждениями человека. Методы, основанные на многообразии обучения, широко используются для уточнения представлений слов путем повторного встраивания векторов слов из исходного пространства вложений в новое уточненное семантическое пространство. Эти методы в основном сосредоточены на сохранении информации о локальной геометрии путем выполнения взвешенной локальной линейной комбинации между словами и их соседями дважды. Однако на эти веса реконструкции легко влияют различные подборки соседних слов, и весь процесс объединения занимает много времени. В этой статье мы предлагаем два новых метода уточнения представления слов, используя отображение признаков изометрии и локальное тангенциальное пространство соответственно. В отличие от предыдущих методов, наш первый метод исправляет предварительно обученные вложения слов, сохраняя информацию о глобальной геометрии всех слов вместо информации о локальной геометрии между словами и их соседями. Наш второй метод уточняет представления слов, выравнивая исходные и повторно определенные пространства вложений на основе локального тангенса вместо выполнения взвешенной локально линейной комбинации дважды. Экспериментальные результаты, полученные из стандартных задач семантической родственности и семантического сходства, показывают, что наши методы превосходят различные современные базовые линии для представления слов\nуточнение.', 'ga': 'Léiríonn staidéir a rinneadh le déanaí gur minic nach ndéanann samhlacha leabaithe focal na cosúlachtaí idir focail chomhchosúla a mheas faoina luach agus go ndéanann siad rómheastachán ar chosúlachtaí idir focail i bhfad i gcéin. Mar thoradh air seo faightear torthaí cosúlachta focal ó shamhlacha a neadú ar neamhréir le breithiúnas an duine. Baintear úsáid go forleathan as modhanna éagsúla atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim chun léiriúcháin focal a bheachtú trí veicteoirí focal a ath-leabú ón mbunspás leabaithe go spás shéimeantach nua scagtha. Díríonn na modhanna seo go príomha ar fhaisnéis céimseata áitiúil a chaomhnú trí chomhcheangal líneach ualaithe go háitiúil a dhéanamh idir focail agus a gcomharsana faoi dhó. Mar sin féin, tá na meáchain athchruthaithe seo faoi thionchar roghnúcháin éagsúla de na focail chomharsanachta go héasca agus tá an próiseas teaglaim iomlán am-íditheach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid dhá mhodh leasaithe ionadaíochta focal núíosacha a ghiaráil léarscáiliú gné isiméadracht agus spás tadhlaí áitiúil faoi seach. Murab ionann agus modhanna roimhe seo, ceartaíonn ár gcéad mhodh leabaithe focal réamhoilte trí fhaisnéis gheoiméadrachta dhomhanda de gach focal a chaomhnú in ionad faisnéis céimseata áitiúil idir focail agus a gcomharsana. Déanann an dara modh againn léiriúcháin focal a fheabhsú trí spásanna leabaithe bunaidh agus athmhínithe a ailíniú bunaithe ar spás tadhlaí áitiúil in ionad teaglaim líneach ualaithe go háitiúil a dhéanamh faoi dhó. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha a fuarthas ó thascanna caighdeánacha maidir le gaolmhaireacht shéimeantach agus comhchosúlacht shéimeantach go sáraíonn ár modhanna bonnlínte éagsúla den scoth le haghaidh léiriú focal.\nmionchoigeartú.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες μελέτες δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων συχνά υποτιμούν τις ομοιότητες μεταξύ παρόμοιων λέξεων και υπερεκτιμούν τις ομοιότητες μεταξύ μακρινών λέξεων. Αυτό έχει ως αποτέλεσμα αποτελέσματα ομοιότητας λέξεων που λαμβάνονται από την ενσωμάτωση μοντέλων ασυμβίβαστων με την ανθρώπινη κρίση. Οι ποικίλες μαθησιακές μέθοδοι χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως για να βελτιώσουν τις αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων ενσωματώνοντας εκ νέου διανύσματα λέξεων από τον αρχικό χώρο ενσωμάτωσης σε έναν νέο εκλεπτυσμένο σημασιολογικό χώρο. Αυτές οι μέθοδοι επικεντρώνονται κυρίως στη διατήρηση τοπικών γεωμετρικών πληροφοριών μέσω της εκτέλεσης σταθμισμένου τοπικού γραμμικού συνδυασμού μεταξύ λέξεων και γειτόνων δύο φορές. Ωστόσο, αυτά τα βάρη ανασυγκρότησης επηρεάζονται εύκολα από διαφορετικές επιλογές γειτονικών λέξεων και ολόκληρη η διαδικασία συνδυασμού είναι χρονοβόρα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε δύο νέες μεθόδους βελτίωσης της αναπαράστασης λέξεων που χρησιμοποιούν χαρτογράφηση χαρακτηριστικών ισομετρίας και τοπικό χώρο εφαπτόμενων αντίστοιχα. Σε αντίθεση με τις προηγούμενες μεθόδους, η πρώτη μας μέθοδος διορθώνει τις προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων διατηρώντας τις παγκόσμιες πληροφορίες γεωμετρίας όλων των λέξεων αντί των τοπικών γεωμετρικών πληροφοριών μεταξύ λέξεων και γειτόνων τους. Η δεύτερη μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει τις αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων ευθυγραμμίζοντας αρχικούς και επαναπροσδιορισμένους χώρους ενσωμάτωσης με βάση τον τοπικό χώρο εφαπτόμενης αντί να εκτελεί σταθμισμένους τοπικά γραμμικούς συνδυασμούς δύο φορές. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα που λαμβάνονται από τις τυπικές εργασίες σημασιολογικής συσχέτισης και σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας δείχνουν ότι οι μέθοδοι μας ξεπερνούν διάφορες σύγχρονες γραμμές βάσης για την αναπαράσταση λέξεων\nτελειοποίηση.', 'it': "Studi recenti dimostrano che i modelli di incorporazione di parole spesso sottovalutano le somiglianze tra parole simili e sovrastimano le somiglianze tra parole lontane. Ciò si traduce in risultati di somiglianza delle parole ottenuti dall'incorporazione di modelli incoerenti con il giudizio umano. Diversi metodi basati sull'apprendimento sono ampiamente utilizzati per raffinare le rappresentazioni delle parole riincorporando vettori di parole dallo spazio di incorporazione originale a un nuovo spazio semantico raffinato. Questi metodi si concentrano principalmente sulla conservazione delle informazioni geometriche locali attraverso l'esecuzione di una combinazione lineare ponderata localmente tra parole e vicini due volte. Tuttavia, questi pesi di ricostruzione sono facilmente influenzati da diverse selezioni di parole vicine e l'intero processo di combinazione richiede tempo. In questo articolo, proponiamo due nuovi metodi di raffinazione della rappresentazione delle parole che sfruttano rispettivamente la mappatura delle funzionalità isometriche e lo spazio tangente locale. A differenza dei metodi precedenti, il nostro primo metodo corregge le incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate preservando le informazioni geometriche globali di tutte le parole invece delle informazioni geometriche locali tra le parole e i loro vicini. Il nostro secondo metodo affina le rappresentazioni delle parole allineando gli spazi di incorporazione originali e ridefiniti in base allo spazio tangente locale invece di eseguire due volte combinazioni lineari localmente ponderate. I risultati sperimentali ottenuti da attività standard di relazione semantica e somiglianza semantica mostrano che i nostri metodi superano varie linee di base all'avanguardia per la rappresentazione delle parole\nraffinamento.", 'hu': 'A legutóbbi tanulmányok azt mutatják, hogy a szóbeágyazási modellek gyakran alábecsülik a hasonló szavak hasonlóságait, és túlbecsülik a távoli szavak hasonlóságait. Ez az emberi ítélőképességgel ellentmondó modellek beágyazásából eredő szóhasonlósági eredményeket eredményez. Sokféle tanulási alapú módszert használnak a szóreprezentációk finomítására azáltal, hogy újra beágyazzák a szóvektorokat az eredeti beágyazási térből egy új finomított szemantikai térbe. Ezek a módszerek elsősorban a helyi geometriai információk megőrzésére összpontosítanak a szavak és a szomszédok közötti súlyozott lokális lineáris kombinációk kétszeres végrehajtásával. Ezeket a rekonstrukciós súlyokat azonban könnyen befolyásolják a szomszédos szavak különböző kiválasztásai, és az egész kombinációs folyamat időigényes. Ebben a tanulmányban két új szóreprezentációs finomítási módszert javasolunk, amelyek kihasználják az izometriai funkciók leképezését és a helyi tangenttért. A korábbi módszerekkel ellentétben az első módszerünk javítja az előre képzett szóbeágyazásokat azáltal, hogy megőrzi az összes szó globális geometriai információját a szavak és a szomszédok közötti helyi geometriai információk helyett. Második módszerünk finomítja a szóreprezentációkat az eredeti és újraformált beágyazási szóközök helyi érintőtér alapján történő igazításával ahelyett, hogy kétszer végrehajtaná a súlyozott lokális lineáris kombinációt. A standard szemantikai kapcsolatokból és szemantikai hasonlósági feladatokból származó kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszereink felülmúlják a szóreprezentáció különböző korszerű alapjait\nfinomítás.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ კვლევების შესახებ, რომ სიტყვის მოდელები, რომლებიც კონფიგურებული სიტყვის და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სიტ ეს წარმოდგენა სიტყვების სხვადასხვა წარმოდგენება, რომელიც ადამიანის წარმოდგენებისგან არაფერი მოდელებისგან იქნება. მრავალური სწავლის განსაზღვრებული მეტოვები ძალიან გამოყენებულია სიტყვების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებისთვის სიტყვების გვეკტორების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც ორიგინალურ ეს მეტირები ძირითადად მხოლოდ ლოკალური ჯემეტრიის ინფორმაციის შენახვაზე გავაკეთებული ლოკალურად ლეინური კომბუნიაციაში სიტყვების და საზოგადოებების შორის მაგრამ, ეს რესტრუქტურაციის მნიშვნელობები ადვილედ გამოყენებულია სხვადასხვა სიტყვების მონიშვნელობით და ყველა კომბუქტურაციის პროცესი არის დროის გამოყ ჩვენ ამ დომენტში ორი პროგრამეტური სიტყვების გამოსახულება გამოსახულებლად იზომეტრიის ფუნქციების მაპრაფიკაცია და ლოკალური ტანგენტური სივრცე გამოყენება. ჩვენი პირველი მეთოდის განმავლობაში, ჩვენი პირველი მეთოდი უკეთესებს საწყისი სიტყვების ინფორმაციას, ყველა სიტყვების გლობალური გემეტრიის ინფორმაციას, სიტყვების და საზო ჩვენი მეორე მეტი შესახებ სიტყვების გამოსახულებების შესახებ ორიგინალური და გამოსახულებული სიტყვების შესახებ ლოკალური ტანგენტური სივრცე დაბათებული ადგილა ტანგენტური სივ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც სენდარტულ სენმანტიური დაკავშირება და სენმანტიური განსხვავებულობის დამუშავებაზე გავაკეთებენ, რომ ჩვენი მეცემები განსხვავებული ს\nპაფინეცია.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы зерттеулерде сөздерді ендіру үлгілері ұқсас сөздер арасындағы ұқсас сөздер мен қашықтағы сөздер арасындағы ұқсас ұқсас ұқсастығын көбірек бағалайды Бұл сөздердің ұқсастығының нәтижесі адамдардың шешіміне сәйкес келмеген үлгілерден шығарылады. Бірнеше рет оқыту негіздеген әдістер сөздерді қайта ендіру үшін сөздердің редакцияларын жаңа редакцияларына қайта ендіру үшін қолданылады. Бұл әдістер негізінде жергілікті геометрия мәліметін қамтамасыз етіп, сөздер мен қоршауларының арасындағы жергілікті сызықты біріктіру арқылы қолданылады. Бірақ бұл қайта құрылу жиілігі әртүрлі сөздерді таңдау үшін оңай әсер етеді, және толық жиілік процесі уақыт пайдалану үшін. Бұл қағазда екі жаңа сөзді түсіндіру әдістерін келтіреміз. Изометриялық қасиеттерді картаңбалау және жергілікті тангент бос орынды түсіндіру әдістерін келтіреміз. Алдыңғы әдістеріміздің бірінші әдіміміз сөздер мен соңғылар арасындағы жергілікті геометрия мәліметін сақтап, алдыңғы әдіміміздің алдын- оқылған сөздерді ендіру үшін ж Біздің екінші әдіміміз сөздердің түріндегі, жергілікті жергілікті сызық комбинациясының орнына, жергілікті тангент бос орындарына негізделген және қайта теңдеу бос орындарын Стандартты семантикалық қатынасыздық және семантикалық ұқсас тапсырмалардан алған эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің әдістеріміздің сөздердің түріндіру үшін әртүрлі орындау негізгі сызықта\nрефининг.', 'ms': 'kajian baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa model penyembedding perkataan sering meremehkan kesamaan antara perkataan yang sama dan meremehkan kesamaan antara perkataan yang jauh. Ini menghasilkan keputusan persamaan perkataan yang diperoleh dari memasukkan model yang tidak konsisten dengan penilaian manusia. Kaedah pembelajaran berasaskan berbilang digunakan secara luas untuk menyempurnakan perwakilan perkataan dengan memasukkan semula vektor perkataan dari ruang pembelajaran asal ke ruang semantik baru. Kaedah ini terutama fokus pada menyimpan maklumat geometri setempat melalui melakukan kombinasi linear secara setempat berat antara perkataan dan jiran mereka dua kali. However, these reconstruction weights are easily influenced by different selections of neighboring words and the whole combination process is time-consuming.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan dua kaedah persembahan perkataan yang baru untuk menggunakan pemetaan fitur isometri dan ruang tangen setempat secara sesuai. Tidak seperti kaedah terdahulu, kaedah pertama kita betulkan penyambungan perkataan terlatih-terlatih dengan menyimpan maklumat geometri global dari semua perkataan bukannya maklumat geometri setempat antara perkataan dan jiran mereka. Kaedah kedua kami menyempurnakan perwakilan perkataan dengan menyesuaikan ruang penyambungan asal dan ditakrif semula berdasarkan ruang tangen setempat selain daripada melakukan kombinasi linear secara setempat berat dua kali. Hasil percubaan yang diperoleh dari hubungan semantik piawai dan tugas kesamaan semantik menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melampaui garis dasar yang berbeza-beda untuk perwakilan perkataan\nPenyesuaian.', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikti tyrimai rodo, kad žodžių įterpimo modeliai dažnai nepakankamai vertina panašių žodžių panašumą ir pernelyg vertina nuotolinių žodžių panašumą. Tai lemia žodžių panašumo rezultatus, gautus įtraukiant modelius, neatitinkančius žmogaus vertinimo. Įvairūs mokymosi metodai plačiai naudojami žodžių atspindimams patobulinti iš naujo įterpiant žodžių vektorius iš pradinės įterpimo vietos į naują patobulintą semantinę erdvę. Šiuose metoduose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama vietos geometrijos informacijos išsaugojimui, atliekant svertinį vietinį linijinį žodžių ir jų kaimynų derinį du kartus. Tačiau šiems atstatymo svoriams lengvai įtakos daro skirtingi kaimyninių žodžių pasirinkimai, o visą derinio procesą reikia laiko. Šiame dokumente siūlome du naujus žodžių atspindimo patobulinimo metodus, kuriais atitinkamai naudojamas izometrinių požymių žemėlapių ir vietos liestinės erdvės svertas. Priešingai nei anksčiau, mūsų pirmasis metodas koreguoja iš anksto parengtus žodžių įterpimus išsaugodamas visuotinę visų žodžių geometrinę informaciją, o ne vietos geometrinę informaciją tarp žodžių ir jų kaimynų. Mūsų antrasis metodas patobulina žodžių rodmenis derinant originalius ir iš naujo apibūdintus įterpimo skyrius, grindžiamus vietiniu liestiniu plotu, o ne dvigubai atliekant svertinį vietinį linijinį derinį. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai, gauti iš standartinio semantinio ryšio ir semantinio panašumo užduočių, rodo, kad mūsų metodai viršija įvairias naujausias žodžių atstovavimo bazes.\npatobulinimas.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните студии покажуваат дека моделите за вградување на зборови честопати ги потценуваат сличностите помеѓу сличните зборови и преценуваат сличностите помеѓу далечните зборови. Ова резултира со резултати на сличност на зборовите кои се добиваат од вклучување на модели кои не се во согласност со човечката пресуда. Manifold learning-based methods are widely utilized to refine word representations by re-embedding word vectors from the original embedding space to a new refined semantic space.  Овие методи се фокусираат главно на зачувувањето на локалните геометриски информации преку спроведување на двојна локална линијарна комбинација помеѓу зборовите и нивните соседи. Сепак, овие тегови за реконструкција лесно се влијаат на различни избори на соседни зборови и целиот процес на комбинација потрошува време. Во овој весник, предложуваме два нови методи на рафинирање на претставувањето на зборовите кои ги користат изометриските карактеристики и локалниот тангентен простор, односно. За разлика од претходните методи, нашиот прв метод ги коригира предобучените зборови со зачувување на глобалните геометриски информации за сите зборови наместо локални геометриски информации меѓу зборовите и нивните соседи. Нашиот втор метод ги рафинира репрезентациите на зборовите со израмнување на оригиналните и рефинираните вградувачки простори базирани на локалниот тангентен простор наместо двојно да извршат локално линијарна комбинација. Експерименталните резултати добиени од стандардната семантична врска и семантична сличност задачи покажуваат дека нашите методи ги надминуваат различните најсовремени основни линии за претставување на зборови\nРафинирање.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു വാക്കിന്റെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ഒരേ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കി ഇത് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരുപോലുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കിട്ടുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരുടെ ന്യായവിധിയോടൊപ മാനിഫോള്\u200dഡ് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ രീതികള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dഡ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200dമാര്\u200d ആദ്യഭൂമിയില്\u200d നിന്ന ഈ രീതികള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തി ലോക്കല്\u200d ജോമിത്രിയിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200dക However, these reconstruction weights are easily influenced by different selections of neighboring words and the whole combination process is time-consuming.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, രണ്ടു നോവല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലുള്ള ശുദ്ധീകരിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d മാപ്പിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും ലോക്കല്\u200d  മുമ്പുള്ള രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ രീതിയില്\u200d പരിശീലന വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുമ്പില്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് വരുന്നത് ശരിയാക്കുന്നു. ലോക നമ്മുടെ രണ്ടാമത്തെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തിലുള്ള സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതി സാധാരണ സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമാന്റിക് സമമായ ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലഭ്യമായ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ട\nശുദ്ധീകരിക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania pokazują, że modele osadzania słów często nie doceniają podobieństwa między podobnymi słowami i przeceniają podobieństwa między odległymi słowami. Powoduje to wyniki podobieństwa słów uzyskane z osadzenia modeli niezgodnych z ludzkim osądem. Różnorodne metody oparte na uczeniu się są szeroko stosowane do udoskonalania reprezentacji słów poprzez ponowne osadzenie wektorów słowa z oryginalnej przestrzeni osadzania do nowej wyrafinowanej przestrzeni semantycznej. Metody te koncentrują się głównie na zachowaniu informacji o geometrii lokalnej poprzez wykonywanie ważonej lokalnie liniowej kombinacji między słowami a ich sąsiadami dwukrotnie. Jednak na te wagi rekonstrukcji łatwo wpływają różne wybory sąsiednich słów, a cały proces kombinacji jest czasochłonny. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy dwie nowe metody udoskonalania reprezentacji słów wykorzystujące odpowiednio mapowanie cech izometrycznych i lokalną przestrzeń styczną. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich metod, nasza pierwsza metoda koryguje wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów poprzez zachowanie globalnych informacji o geometrii wszystkich słów zamiast lokalnych informacji o geometrii między słowami a ich sąsiadami. Nasza druga metoda udoskonala reprezentacje słów poprzez wyrównanie oryginalnych i ponownie zdefiniowanych przestrzeni osadzających w oparciu o lokalną przestrzeń styczną zamiast dwukrotnie wykonywać ważoną lokalną kombinację liniową. Wyniki eksperymentalne uzyskane ze standardowych zadań związkowych semantycznych i podobieństwa semantycznego pokazują, że nasze metody przewyższają różne najnowocześniejsze linie podstawowe dla reprezentacji słów\nwyrafinowanie.', 'mt': 'Studji reċenti juru li mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem ta’ spiss jissottovalutaw similaritajiet bejn kliem simili u jevalwaw wisq similaritajiet bejn kliem distanti. Dan jirriżulta f’riżultati ta’ similarità tal-kliem miksuba mill-inkorporazzjoni ta’ mudelli inkonsistenti mas-sentenza umana. Metodi multipli bbażati fuq it-tagħlim huma użati b’mod wiesa’ biex jiġu raffinati r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem billi jerġgħu jiġu inkorporati vetturi tal-kliem mill-ispazju oriġinali tal-inkorporazzjoni għal spazju semantiku raffinat ġdid. Dawn il-metodi jiffukaw l-aktar fuq il-preservazzjoni tal-informazzjoni ġeometrika lokali billi jwettqu kombinazzjoni lineari ppeżata lokalment bejn il-kliem u l-ġirien tagħhom darbtejn. Madankollu, dawn il-piżijiet ta’ rikostruzzjoni huma faċilment influwenzati minn għażliet differenti ta’ kliem ġirien u l-proċess kollu ta’ kombinazzjoni jieħu ħafna żmien. In this paper, we propose two novel word representation refinement methods leveraging isometry feature mapping and local tangent space respectively.  Għall-kuntrarju tal-metodi pre ċedenti, l-ewwel metodu tagħna jikkoreġi l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel billi jippreserva l-informazzjoni ġeometrika globali tal-kliem kollha minflok l-informazzjoni ġeometrika lokali bejn il-kliem u l-ġirien tagħhom. It-tieni metodu tagħna jirrifina r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem billi jallinja spazji ta’ inkorporazzjoni oriġinali u ffinati mill-ġdid ibbażati fuq spazju tanġenti lokali minflok iwettaq kombinazzjoni lineari ppeżata lokalment darbtejn. Riżultati esperimentali miksuba minn kompiti standard ta’ rabta semantika u similarità semantika juru li l-metodi tagħna jaqbżu diversi linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati għar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-kelma\nrefinement.', 'ro': 'Studiile recente arată că modelele de încorporare a cuvintelor subestimează adesea asemănările dintre cuvinte similare și supraestimează asemănările dintre cuvintele îndepărtate. Acest lucru rezultă în rezultate similare cuvintelor obținute din încorporarea de modele incompatibile cu judecata umană. Metodele multiple bazate pe învățare sunt utilizate pe scară largă pentru a rafina reprezentările cuvintelor prin re-încorporarea vectorilor de cuvinte din spațiul original de încorporare într-un nou spațiu semantic rafinat. Aceste metode se concentrează în principal pe păstrarea informațiilor despre geometria locală prin efectuarea de combinații liniare ponderate local între cuvinte și vecinii lor de două ori. Cu toate acestea, aceste greutăți de reconstrucție sunt ușor influențate de diferite selecții de cuvinte vecine și întregul proces de combinație este consumator de timp. În această lucrare, propunem două metode noi de rafinare a reprezentării cuvintelor utilizând cartografierea caracteristicilor izometrice și respectiv spațiul tangent local. Spre deosebire de metodele anterioare, prima noastră metodă corectează încorporările de cuvinte pre-instruite, păstrând informațiile geometrice globale ale tuturor cuvintelor în loc de informațiile geometrice locale dintre cuvinte și vecinii lor. A doua metodă rafinează reprezentările de cuvinte prin alinierea spațiilor de încorporare originale și re-definite pe baza spațiului tangent local în loc să efectueze combinații liniare ponderate local de două ori. Rezultatele experimentale obținute din sarcinile standard de relație semantică și similaritate semantică arată că metodele noastre depășesc diferitele linii de bază de ultimă generație pentru reprezentarea cuvintelor\nrafinament.', 'mn': 'Саяхан судалгаанууд хэлбэрийн загваруудыг ихэвчлэн төстэй үгнүүдийн хоорондох тэнцүү байдлыг багасгадаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ нь хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжлээс бус загваруудаас илүү ижил хэмжээний үр дүн гарч ирсэн юм. Олон талаар суралцах сургалт суралцах арга нь үгний үзүүлэлтийг шинэ сэргээгдсэн семантик орон руу дахин нэвтрүүлэхээр ашигладаг. Эдгээр арга нь ерөнхийдөө орнуудын геометрийн мэдээллийг хоёр дахин хөршүүдийн хоорондын жинтэй шугам холбоотой холбоотой болгон хадгалахын тулд анхаарна. Гэвч эдгээр дахин бүтээлтийн жин нь хөршүүн үгнүүдийн сонголтоор амархан нөлөөлдөг. Бүх цуглуулах процесс бол цаг хугацааны хэрэглээ. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр шинэ үг илэрхийлэл хийх арга зам нь изометрийн өөрчлөлтийг газрын зураг болон орон нутгийн тангент орон зайд нөлөөлдөг. Өмнөх аргын ялгаа бидний анхны арга нь үг болон хөршүүдийн хоорондоо дэлхийн геометрийн мэдээллийг хадгалж өгдөг. Бидний хоёр дахь арга нь үндсэн, дахин тодорхойлолтой орон нутгийн тангент орон зайд орчин нутгийн хэлбэртэй хоёр дахин тодорхойлолтой хэлбэрийг дахин тодорхойлдог. Эмчилгээний үр дүн нь стандарт семантийн холбоотой болон семантийн холбоотой үйл ажиллагаанаас гарсан зүйлс нь бидний арга хэмжээний үйл ажиллагаанд өөр өөр өөр урлагийн суурь шугамнуудыг\nсайжруулах.', 'no': 'Nyleg studier viser at ordinnbyggingsmodeller ofte underestimer liknande mellom liknande ord og oversestimer liknande mellom distanse ord. Dette resulterer i ordliknande resultater henta frå innbygging av modeller som ikkje er tilsvarande med menneske sprøym. Fleire læringsbaserte metodar er vast brukt for å refinera ordrepresentasjonar ved å gjenoppretta ordvektorar frå den opprinnelige innbyggingsrommet til eit nytt refinert semantisk plass. Desse metodane fokuserer hovudsakelig på å lagra lokale geometriske informasjon gjennom å utføra vekta lokalt lineær kombinasjon mellom ord og naboene sin to gong. Desse rekonstruksvekta er likevel enkelt påvirka av ulike utval av nabolar og heile kombinasjonsprosessen er tidspunktet. I denne papiret foreslår vi to novel ordrepresentasjonsmetoder for refinering av ordet som leverer mapping av isometriske funksjonar og lokale tangensrom. I motsetjing til førre metoder korrigerer vår første metode innbygging av ord ved å lagra globale geometriske informasjon om alle ord i staden for lokale geometriske informasjon mellom ord og naboene sine. Dette and re metoden gjer ordrepresentasjonane refiner ved å justera opprinnelige og gjenoppretta innbyggingsmellomrom basert på lokale tangensmellomrom i staden for å utføra vekta lokalt lineær kombinasjon to gonger. Eksperimentale resultat henta frå standard semantisk relateditet og semantisk liknande oppgåver viser at metodane våre utfører ulike baselinjer for ordrepresentasjon\nrefinering.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada soo dhowaaday waxay muuqataa tusaalooyin ku qoran hadalka, inta badan waxay ku qiimeeyaan isku mid ah hadallada islamarkaasna aad u qiimeeyaan isku mid ah hadalka fog. Taas waxay resultiyaan sabab u eg hadalka oo ay ka helaan samooyin ku habboon xukunka biniaadamka. Sida badan waxaa loo isticmaalaa hababka barashada ee Manifold si loo hagaajiyo qofka hadalka loo wakiilo oo laga soo celiyo goobta asalka ah xafiiska cusub ee sawirida semantic. Dhaqdooyinkan waxay ugu khaas ahaan ku kalsoonaadaan in la ilaaliyo macluumaadka geometriyada ee deegaanka lagu sameynayo sameynta isku xiriirka qoriga ah ee u dhexeeya hadalka iyo derisyadooda laba jeer. Si kastaba ha ahaatee miisaankan dhismaha waxaa si fudud loogu saameyn karaa doorasho kala duduwan oo hadalka deriska ah, dhamaantoodna waa isticmaalka wakhtiga. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa laba qof oo warqad qoyska ah oo ku qoraya sawirka isbedelka iyo sawirka bannaanta ee degmada. Isku duwan qaababka hore, qaababkayaga ugu horreeya ayaa hagaajiya hadalka hore oo lagu baro, iyadoo lagu ilaaliyo macluumaadka geometriyada caalamiga ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadka geometriyada ee degmada u dhexeeya hadallada iyo derisyadooda. Metalkeena labaad ayaa soo bandhigaya qoraalka oo ku qoran meelaha asalka ah iyo meelaha lagu bedelay oo ku saleysan meesha ay ku qoran tahay goob aad ku saabsan karto laba jeer. Imtixaanka waxaa laga helay shuqullada isku mid ahaanshaha ee caadiga ah iyo isku mid ah\nhagaajinta.', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda studier visar att ordinbäddningsmodeller ofta underskattar likheter mellan liknande ord och överskattar likheter mellan avlägsna ord. Detta resulterar i ordlikhetsresultat som erhållits genom att bädda in modeller som är inkonsekventa med mänskligt omdöme. Mångfalda inlärningsbaserade metoder används ofta för att förfina ordrepresentationer genom att återbädda ordvektorer från det ursprungliga inbäddningsutrymmet till ett nytt förfinat semantiskt utrymme. Dessa metoder fokuserar främst på att bevara lokal geometriinformation genom att utföra viktad lokalt linjär kombination mellan ord och grannar två gånger. Dessa rekonstruktionsvikter påverkas dock lätt av olika val av närliggande ord och hela kombinationsprocessen är tidskrävande. I denna uppsats föreslår vi två nya ordrepresentationsförfiningsmetoder som utnyttjar isometri funktionskartläggning respektive lokal tangentrymd. Till skillnad från tidigare metoder korrigerar vår första metod redan tränade ordinbäddningar genom att bevara global geometriinformation för alla ord istället för lokal geometriinformation mellan ord och grannar. Vår andra metod förfinar ordrepresentationer genom att justera ursprungliga och omdefinierade inbäddningsutrymmen baserat på lokalt tangentutrymme istället för att utföra viktad lokalt linjär kombination två gånger. Experimentella resultat erhållna från standardiserade semantiska relationer och semantiska likhetsuppgifter visar att våra metoder överträffar olika toppmoderna baslinjer för ordrepresentation\nförfining.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் உள்ள படிப்புகள் காட்டுகிறது வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிகள் பெரும்பாலும் ஒத்த வார்த்தைகளுக்கிடையில இந்த வார்த்தையின் ஒத்த முடிவுகள் மனித நியாயத்துடன் உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிகளிலிருந்து பெற்றது. மானிஃபோல் கற்றல் அடிப்படையிலான முறைமைகள் புதிய துருப்பிக்கப்பட்ட semantic இடைவெளி இந்த வழிகள் முக்கியமாக உள்ளூர் புவியியல் தகவல்களை பாதுகாக்குவதற்கு கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது உள்ளூர் வரிசை மூலம் சொற்களுக்கும ஆனால், இந்த மீண்டும் நிறுவனம் எடைகள் வெவ்வேறு வார்த்தைகளால் பாதிக்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் முழு இணைப்பு செயல்பாடு நேர ம இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இரண்டு புதிய வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் பாதுகாப்பு முறைமைகளை வழங்கும் தனிப்பயன் குணங்களை வரைபடம முந்தைய முறைமைகளை வித்தியாசமாக, எங்கள் முதல் முறைமையில் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை சரிசெய்கிறது, உள்ளூர் வார்த எங்கள் இரண்டாவது முறைமை ஆரம்ப மற்றும் மற்றும் மீண்டும் தீர்மானிக்கப்பட்ட இடைவெளியில் உள்ளார்ந்த கோட்டின் இடைவெளியில் இருமுறை  சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் நிலையான பெம்பென்டிக் இணைப்புகள் மற்றும் பாதிப்பு செயல்களிலிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்டது\nபுதுப்பித்தல்.', 'sr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje pokazuje da modeli uključujući riječ često podcjenjuju sličnosti između sličnih riječi i pretprocenjuju sličnosti između udaljenih riječi. To je rezultat sličnosti reèi koji su dobili od ugraðenja modela u skladu sa ljudskim presudima. Raznovrsne metode na učenju se široko koriste za refinansiranje reprezentacija riječi prema ponovnom ugrađenju vektora riječi iz originalnog ugrađenog prostora do novog refinansiranog semantičkog prostora. Ove metode se uglavnom fokusiraju na sačuvanje lokalnih geometrijskih informacija putem izvođenja težine lokalne linearne kombinacije između riječi i njihovih suseda dvaput. Međutim, ova težina rekonstrukcije lako utječe na različite selekcije susjednih riječi i cijeli proces kombinacije je potrošenje vremena. U ovom papiru predlažemo dve nove reèi za refineranje metode za predstavljanje reèi koja ukljuèuje mapiranje izometrijskih karakteristika i lokalni tangentni prostor. Za razliku od prethodnih metoda, naša prva metoda ispravlja predobučene reči uključene čuvajući globalne geometrijske informacije svih reči umjesto lokalne geometrijske informacije između riječi i njihovih suseda. Naša druga metoda ispravlja reprezentacije riječi poravnajući originalne i ponovno navedene ugrađene prostore na temelju lokalnog tangentnog prostora umjesto izvođenja težine lokalne linearne kombinacije dvaput. Eksperimentalni rezultati dobiveni od standardnih semantičkih odnosa i semantičkih zadataka sličnosti pokazuju da naši metodi iznose različite osnovne linije stanja umjetnosti za predstavljanje riječi\nrefinement.', 'si': 'අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට අනුමාන විදියට අනුමාන විදියට අනුමාන විදියට වචනය සහ අන මේක වචනය සමාන විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙනවා මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසයෙන් නැති විදියට මොඩේල් එක්ක ස වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධා මේ විධානය ස්ථානික භාවිමිතිය තොරතුරු සුරක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වචන සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අයිතින් දෙපාරක් අ නමුත්, මේ ආපහු සංස්ථාපනය විශේෂයෙන් වෙනස් වචන් තෝරාගන්න ලේසියෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  මේ පැත්තේ, අපි අලුත් වචන දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විධානය සඳහා ස්ථානික විධානය සහ ස්ථානික විධානය ස මුලින් විධානය වගේම, අපේ පළමු විධානය ප්\u200dරධාන විධානය ප්\u200dරධාන විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරනවා වචනය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අයිතින අපේ දෙවෙනි විදියට වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ සෙමැන්ටික් සමාන්තික සමාන්තික වැඩක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට අපේ විදියට විවිධාන ස්ථ\nප්\u200dරවේශනය.', 'ur': 'اچھی مطالعہ کی تعلیمات دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ کلمات مڈیلوں میں بہت سی کلمات کے درمیان برابری کم مطالعہ کرتی ہے اور دور کلمات کے درمیان برابری کم مطالعہ کرتی ہے. یہ کلمات کی برابری کا نتیجہ ہے کہ انسان کے فیصلے کے بغیر قائم ہونے کے موڈل میں سے ملے جاتے ہیں۔ متفائلڈ سیکھنے کی بنیادی طریقے لکھنے کے لئے کلمات کی روشنی کو دفع کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ کلمات ویکتروں کو اصلی جگہ سے نئی روشن سیمانٹی جگہ تک دوبارہ انڈیڈ کریں۔ یہ طریقے صرف کلمات اور اُن کے گھر والوں کے درمیان دوبارہ بوجھ والی لینیاری ترکیب کے ذریعہ سے محلی جہامتری معلومات کی حفاظت کرنے کے ذریعہ منتظر ہیں. However, these reconstruction weights are easily influenced by different selections of neighboring words and the whole combination process is time-consuming. اس کاغذ میں ہم دو نور کلمات کی تصویر کی روشنی روشنی طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ یزامتری فرصت مکاپیٹ کرنے اور محلی ٹانگنٹ جگہ کے مطابق منظور کریں۔ پہلے طریقے کے مطابق، ہمارا پہلا طریقہ کلمات پر پیش تربین کی آموزش کی کلمات ابڈینگ کی اصلاح کرتا ہے، کلمات اور ان کے پھوڑیوں کے درمیان تمام کلمات کی جہامتری معلومات کی جگہ حفاظت کرتی ہے۔ ہمارا دوسرا طریقہ کلمات کی تعلیمات کو اصلی اور دوبارہ مفصل کی جگہ پر بنیاد رکھنے کے بغیر دوبارہ بوجھ لائنیر ترکیب کی جگہ کی جگہ پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے۔ استاندارڈ سیمانٹی رابطہ اور سیمانٹی برابری کے کاموں سے حاصل ہوئے تجربے کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے طریقے کلمات کی نمایش کے لئے مختلف موقعیت کی بنسٹلینڈ سے کام لیتے ہیں\nپاکیزگی.', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'rganishlar taʼminlovchilarini koʻrsatish mumkin, so'zlar ichidagi modellarni ko'p doim huddi so'zlar orasidagi bir xil sonlarni kamaytirish va masofadagi so'zlar orasidagi bir tenglarni ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu so'zlarning bir xil natijalariga qo'shish modellaridan imkoniyat qiladi. Name Ushbu usullar hozir lokal geometriy maʼlumotini saqlash mumkin. Lokal liney bir marta so'zlar va neighborhooda ikki marta bir necha birlashtirish mumkin. Lekin, bu tuzuvchi balandlar boshqa so'zlarni boshqa tanlash uchun ishlatiladi va butun birlashtirish vaqt foydalanishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz ikkita novel so'zni tahrirlash usullarini o'zgartirish imkoniyatlarini koʻpaytirish va lokal tangent boʻyicha joylashtirish imkoniyatini tahrirlash. Oldingi usullarda o'xshash, bizning birinchi usuli so'zlarning oldin o'rganilgan so'zlarni global geometriy maʼlumotini saqlash mumkin. Lokal geometriy maʼlumotini soʻzlari va derivatlari орасида maʼlumotni saqlash mumkin. Bizning ikkinchi usuli, lokal tangent boʻsh joy asl va qaytadan qo'yilgan joylarni aniqlash uchun so'zning tashkilotlarini qo'yish mumkin. Name\nqo'yish.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây cho thấy các mô hình ghép từ thường đánh giá thấp những điểm tương đồng và đánh giá cao những điểm tương đồng giữa từ xa. Kết quả là kết quả của sự giống nhau từ kết quả từ việc nhúng mô hình trái với phán đoán con người. Dùng các phương pháp dựa trên khả năng học tập rõ ràng để cải thiện các biểu hiện từ bằng cách trộn lại các từ phương tiện nối từ không gian ghép lại thành một lớp văn học khác. Những phương pháp này chủ yếu tập trung vào việc bảo tồn thông tin hình học địa phương bằng cách kết hợp tuyến cân nặng giữa từ và hàng xóm hai lần. Tuy nhiên, các trọng lượng tái tạo này dễ dàng bị ảnh hưởng bởi các lựa chọn khác nhau của các từ láng giềng và toàn bộ quá trình kết hợp tốn thời gian. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị hai phương pháp cải thiện chữ mới: Không như các phương pháp trước, phương pháp đầu tiên sửa chữa sự ghép từ được đào tạo trước bằng cách bảo tồn các thông tin hình học toàn cầu của mọi từ thay vì hình học địa phương giữa từ ngữ và hàng xóm. Cách thứ hai của chúng tôi cải thiện các biểu tượng từ bằng cách chỉnh căn cứ ô chữ gốc và xác minh lại các khoảng cách dựa trên một khoảng bề mặt tango địa phương thay vì hai lần thực hiện kết hợp tuyến cân nặng. Thử nghiệm kết quả từ các công việc liên quan và nét chữ giống nhau tiêu chuẩn cho thấy các phương pháp của chúng ta vượt qua nhiều nền văn học hiện đại.\nSự tinh tế.', 'nl': 'Recente studies tonen aan dat woordinbeddingsmodellen vaak overeenkomsten tussen vergelijkbare woorden onderschatten en overeenkomsten tussen verre woorden overschatten. Dit resulteert in resultaten van woordgelijkenis verkregen uit het inbedden van modellen die inconsistent zijn met menselijk oordeel. Veelzijdige leergebaseerde methoden worden op grote schaal gebruikt om woordrepresentaties te verfijnen door woordvectoren opnieuw te insluiten van de oorspronkelijke insluitruimte naar een nieuwe verfijnde semantische ruimte. Deze methoden richten zich voornamelijk op het behoud van lokale geometrie informatie door het uitvoeren van gewogen lokaal lineaire combinatie tussen woorden en hun buren twee keer. Deze reconstructiegewichten worden echter gemakkelijk beïnvloed door verschillende selecties van naburige woorden en het hele combinatieproces is tijdrovend. In dit artikel stellen we twee nieuwe methoden voor het verfijnen van woordrepresentatie voor die gebruik maken van isometrie feature mapping en lokale tangens ruimte respectievelijk. In tegenstelling tot eerdere methoden corrigeert onze eerste methode vooraf getrainde woordinsluitingen door globale geometrie-informatie van alle woorden te behouden in plaats van lokale geometrie-informatie tussen woorden en hun buren. Onze tweede methode verfijnt woordrepresentaties door originele en opnieuw gedefinieerde inbeddingsruimten op basis van lokale tangens ruimte uit te lijnen in plaats van gewogen lokaal lineaire combinaties tweemaal uit te voeren. Experimentele resultaten verkregen uit standaard semantische relatedness en semantische gelijkenis taken tonen aan dat onze methoden verschillende state-of-the-art basislijnen voor woordrepresentatie overtreffen\nverfijning.', 'bg': 'Последни проучвания показват, че моделите за вграждане на думи често подценяват приликите между подобни думи и надценяват приликите между далечните думи. Това води до резултати от сходство на думите, получени от вграждане на модели, несъвместими с човешката преценка. Многобройните методи, базирани на учене, се използват широко за усъвършенстване на представянето на думи чрез повторно вграждане на вектори на думи от първоначалното вградено пространство в ново усъвършенствано семантично пространство. Тези методи се фокусират главно върху запазването на локалната геометрична информация чрез извършване на претеглена локално линейна комбинация между думите и техните съседи два пъти. Въпреки това, тези реконструкционни тежести лесно се влияят от различни селекции на съседни думи и целият процес на комбиниране е отнемащ време. В тази статия предлагаме два нови метода за усъвършенстване на представянето на думи, използващи съответно изометричното картографиране на характеристиките и локалното тангентно пространство. За разлика от предишните методи, нашият първи метод коригира предварително обучените вграждания на думи, като запазва глобалната геометрична информация на всички думи, вместо местната геометрична информация между думите и техните съседи. Вторият ни метод усъвършенства представянето на думи чрез подравняване на оригиналните и повторно дефинираните вграждащи пространства въз основа на локално тангентно пространство, вместо да изпълнява два пъти претеглена локално линейна комбинация. Експерименталните резултати, получени от стандартни задачи за семантична свързаност и семантична сходство, показват, че нашите методи превъзхождат различни най-съвременни базови линии за представяне на думи\nУсъвършенстване.', 'id': 'Studi baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa model penerbangan kata sering meremehkan perbedaan antara kata-kata yang sama dan meremehkan perbedaan antara kata-kata yang jauh. Ini menghasilkan hasil persamaan kata yang diperoleh dari memasukkan model yang tidak konsisten dengan penilaian manusia. Metode pembelajaran berasaskan banyak digunakan secara luas untuk menyempurnakan represensi kata dengan memasukkan kembali vektor kata dari ruang pembelajaran asli ke ruang semantis baru. Metode ini terutama fokus pada mempertahankan informasi geometri lokal melalui melakukan kombinasi linear lokal berat antara kata-kata dan tetangga mereka dua kali. Namun, berat rekonstruksi ini mudah dipengaruhi oleh pemilihan yang berbeda dari kata-kata tetangga dan seluruh proses kombinasi memakan waktu. In this paper, we propose two novel word representation refinement methods leveraging isometry feature mapping and local tangent space respectively.  Tidak seperti metode sebelumnya, metode pertama kami memperbaiki pembangunan kata-kata yang terlatih-terlatih dengan mempertahankan informasi geometri global dari semua kata selain informasi geometri lokal antara kata-kata dan tetangga mereka. Metode kedua kami memperbaiki persembahan kata dengan menyesuaikan ruang penerbangan asli dan mendefinisikan ulang berdasarkan ruang tangen lokal bukannya melakukan kombinasi linear lokal berat dua kali. Hasil eksperimental yang diperoleh dari hubungan semantis standar dan tugas similaritas semantis menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi berbagai garis dasar state-of-the-art untuk perwakilan kata\nrefinement.', 'de': 'Neuere Studien zeigen, dass Worteinbettungsmodelle Ähnlichkeiten zwischen ähnlichen Wörtern oft unterschätzen und Ähnlichkeiten zwischen entfernten Wörtern überschätzen. Dies führt zu Ergebnissen der Wortähnlichkeit, die durch Einbettung von Modellen erhalten werden, die mit menschlichem Urteilsvermögen nicht vereinbar sind. Vielfältige lernbasierte Methoden werden häufig verwendet, um Wortdarstellungen zu verfeinern, indem Wortvektoren aus dem ursprünglichen Einbettungsraum in einen neuen raffinierten semantischen Raum einbettet werden. Diese Methoden konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf die Erhaltung lokaler Geometrie-Informationen, indem sie gewichtete lokal lineare Kombinationen zwischen Wörtern und ihren Nachbarn zweimal durchführen. Diese Rekonstruktionsgewichte lassen sich jedoch leicht durch unterschiedliche Selektionen benachbarter Wörter beeinflussen und der gesamte Kombinationsprozess ist zeitaufwändig. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir zwei neuartige Methoden zur Verfeinerung der Wortdarstellung vor, die Isometrie-Feature-Mapping und lokalen Tangenten-Raum nutzen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Methoden korrigiert unsere erste Methode vortrainierte Worteinbettungen, indem globale Geometrie-Informationen aller Wörter anstatt lokale Geometrie-Informationen zwischen Wörtern und ihren Nachbarn beibehalten werden. Unsere zweite Methode verfeinert Wortdarstellungen, indem ursprüngliche und neu definierte Einbettungsräume basierend auf dem lokalen Tangentenraum ausgerichtet werden, anstatt doppelt gewichtete lokal lineare Kombinationen durchzuführen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse aus standardisierten semantischen Relatedness- und semantischen Ähnlichkeitsaufgaben zeigen, dass unsere Methoden verschiedene State-of-the-Art-Baselines für Wortdarstellung übertreffen\nVerfeinerung.', 'da': 'Nylige undersøgelser viser, at ordindlejringsmodeller ofte undervurderer ligheder mellem lignende ord og overvurderer ligheder mellem fjerne ord. Dette resulterer i ord lighed resultater opnået ved indlejring af modeller, der er uoverensstemmende med menneskelig dømmekraft. Mangfold læringsbaserede metoder anvendes i vid udstrækning til at forfine ord repræsentationer ved at re-integrere ord vektorer fra det oprindelige indlejringsrum til et nyt raffineret semantisk rum. Disse metoder fokuserer primært på at bevare lokal geometri information ved at udføre vægtet lokalt lineær kombination mellem ord og deres naboer to gange. Disse rekonstruktionsvægte påvirkes dog nemt af forskellige valg af tilstødende ord, og hele kombinationsprocessen er tidskrævende. I denne artikel foreslår vi to nye ordrepræsentationsmetoder, der udnytter henholdsvis isometry feature mapping og lokal tangent space. I modsætning til tidligere metoder korrigerer vores første metode forududdannede ordindlejringer ved at bevare global geometri information for alle ord i stedet for lokal geometri information mellem ord og deres naboer. Vores anden metode forfiner ordrepræsentationer ved at justere originale og re-definerede indlejringsrum baseret på lokalt tangentrum i stedet for at udføre vægtet lokalt lineær kombination to gange. Eksperimentelle resultater opnået fra standard semantisk relaterethed og semantisk lighedsopgaver viser, at vores metoder overgår forskellige state-of-the-art basislinjer for ordrepræsentation\nforbedring.', 'hr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje pokazuje da modeli uključujući riječ često podcjenjuju sličnosti između sličnih riječi i pretjeruju sličnosti između udaljenih riječi. To je rezultat sličnosti riječi koji su dobili od uključenih modela u skladu s ljudskim presudima. Mnoge metode na učenju široko se koriste za refinansiranje reprezentacija riječi prema ponovnom ugrađenju vektora riječi iz originalnog ugrađenog prostora do novog refinaniranog semantičkog prostora. Ove metode se uglavnom fokusiraju na čuvanje lokalnih geometrijskih informacija putem provedbe težine lokalne linearne kombinacije između riječi i susjeda dvaput. Međutim, te težine rekonstrukcije lako utječu na različite selekcije susjednih riječi i cijeli proces kombinacije je potrošenje vremena. U ovom papiru predlažemo dvije nove riječi kako bi se metode refinžiranja riječi uključivale mapiranje izometrijskih karakteristika i lokalni tangentski prostor. Za razliku od prethodnih metoda, naša prva metoda ispravlja predobučene uvjeđene riječi čuvajući globalne geometrijske informacije svih riječi umjesto lokalne geometrijske informacije između riječi i susjeda. Naša druga metoda refinira reprezentacije riječi poravnajući originalne i ponovno navedene ugrađene prostore na temelju lokalnog tangentnog prostora umjesto izvođenja težine lokalne linearne kombinacije dvaput. Eksperimentalni rezultati dobiti iz standardnih zadataka semantičke odnose i semantičke sličnosti pokazuju da naši metodi nadmađuju različite osnovne linije stanja umjetnosti za predstavljanje riječi\nrefinement.', 'sw': 'Tafiti za hivi karibuni zinaonyesha kuwa mifano ya maneno yanayoingia mara nyingi hupunguza vifano kati ya maneno yanayofanana na kuchagua sawa kati ya maneno ya mbali. Matokeo haya yanasababisha matokeo yanayofanana na maneno yanayopatikana kutokana na mifano ya kutengeneza mifano yanayofanana na hukumu ya binadamu. Manifold learning-based methods are widely utilized to refine word representations by re-embedding word vectors from the original embedding space to a new refined semantic space.  mbinu hizi hasa zinalenga kuhifadhi taarifa za geometry za eneo hilo kwa kutekeleza muunganiko wa msingi wa ndani kati ya maneno na jirani zao mara mbili. Hata hivyo, mizani hizi za ujenzi zinaathirika kirahisi na uchaguzi tofauti wa maneno jirani na mchakato mzima wa pamoja ni matumizi ya muda. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia mbili za uwakilishaji maneno ya riwaya kwa ajili ya kutengeneza picha za kujitenga na nafasi ya eneo hilo. Tofauti na mbinu zilizopita, mbinu yetu ya kwanza inasahihisha neno lililofundishwa kabla kwa kuhifadhi taarifa za geometry za dunia badala ya taarifa za kijiometri kati ya maneno na jirani zao. Utawala wetu wa pili unaonyesha uwakilizaji wa neno kwa kutangaza maeneo ya asili na kwa mara nyingine yanayotumika kwa kutumia nafasi ya tangent ya eneo hilo badala ya kufanya mizani ya muunganiko wa mistari wa ndani mara mbili. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyopatikana kutokana na kazi za kawaida za mahusiano na sekunde zinazofanana na watu wanaonyesha kuwa njia zetu zinaonyesha misingi mbalimbali ya hali-ya-sanaa kwa ajili ya uwakilishi wa neno\nmabadiliko.', 'af': "Onlangse studie vertoon dat woord inbêerde modele dikwels ondersteun gelykenisse tussen gelyke woorde en oorskou gelykenisse tussen afstande woorde. Hierdie resultaat is in woorde gelykenis resultate ontvang van inbêring modele wat nie inkonsistent met menslike oordeel is nie. Verskeie lêer-gebaseerde metodes word vaste gebruik om woord voorstellings te refineer deur word vektore herinbêer van die oorspronklike inbêer ruimte na 'n nuwe gevormige semantiese ruimte. Hierdie metodes fokus heeltemal op plaaslike geometrie inligting deur geweeg lokaal lineêre kombinasie tussen woorde en hulle naboeste twee keer te bewaar. Maar hierdie rekonstruksie weegte is maklik influens deur verskillende keuses van naaste woorde en die hele kombinasie proses is tyd-verbruik. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons twee nuwe woord voorstelling verfris metodes wat isometrie funksie mapering en plaaslike tangens ruimte verwyder. Ongelyks van vorige metodes, ons eerste metode korrigeer vooraf-onderwerp woord inbêding deur globale geometrie inligting van alle woorde te bewaar in plaas van plaaslike geometrie inligting tussen woorde en hul naaste. Ons tweede metode herstel woord voorstellings deur oorspronklike en herfineer inbêde spasies gebaseer op plaaslike tangens spasie in plaas van geweeg lokaal lineêre kombinasie twee keer te uitvoer. Eksperimentale resultate ontvang van standaard semantiese verwantigheid en semantiese gelykenis-taak vertoon dat ons metodes verskillende staat-van-die-kuns-basisline vir woord-voorstelling uitvoer\nrefineering.", 'fa': 'مطالعه های اخیر نشان می دهند که مدل\u200cهای پیدا کردن کلمه\u200cها اغلب شبیه\u200cهایی بین کلمه\u200cهای مشابه و شبیه\u200cهایی بین کلمه\u200cهای دور را بیش از حد اندازه می\u200cدهند. این نتیجه به نتیجه شبیه به کلمه رسیده می شود که نتیجه\u200cهای شبیه به کلمه\u200cای از پیدا کردن مدل\u200cهای مخالف به قضاوت انسان است. روش\u200cهای متفاوت به یادگیری بسیار زیادی برای تغییر نمایش\u200cنامه\u200cهای کلمات با بازگشت ویکتورهای کلمات از فضای اصلی وارد کردن به فضای متفاوت جدید تازه استفاده می\u200cشوند. این روش ها در اصل روی حفاظت اطلاعات ژومتری محلی تمرکز می کنند با اجرای ترکیب خط محلی وزن بین کلمات و همسایه\u200cهایشان دو بار. ولی این وزن بازسازی به آسانی توسط انتخاب\u200cهای مختلف کلمات همسایه تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cگیرد و تمام فرایند ترکیب زمان\u200cconsumption است. در این کاغذ، ما دو روش بازسازی کلمه جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با ارائه نقشه\u200cسازی ویژه\u200cهای یزومتری و فضای موجود موجود محلی را تأثیر می\u200cدهد. برخلاف روش گذشته، اولین روش ما با حفاظت اطلاعات ژомاتریی جهانی از همه کلمات به جای اطلاعات ژомاتریی محلی بین کلمات و همسایه\u200cهایشان اصلاح می\u200cکند. روش دوم ما نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها را با تنظیم فضای اصلی و دوباره تنظیم می\u200cکند که بر اساس فضای تنگنت محلی بنیاد می\u200cدهد به جای اجرای ترکیب\u200cهای سنگین خطی محلی دوبار انجام می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای که از وظیفه\u200cهای استاندارد مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به کلمه\u200cهای استاندارد و شب\nبازسازی.', 'ko': '최근 연구에 따르면 단어 삽입 모델은 흔히 비슷한 단어 간의 유사성을 과소평가하고 먼 단어 간의 유사성을 과소평가하는 것으로 나타났다.이는 삽입된 모델에서 얻은 단어의 유사성 결과가 인간의 판단과 일치하지 않게 만든다.유형 학습을 바탕으로 하는 방법은 단어의 벡터를 원시 삽입 공간에서 새로운 정화된 의미 공간으로 다시 삽입함으로써 단어의 표시를 정화하는 데 광범위하게 사용된다.이런 방법은 주로 두 번의 가중 국부 선형 조합을 통해 국부 기하학적 정보를 유지하는 것이다.그러나 이런 재건축권은 인접어의 다른 선택의 영향을 받기 쉬워 전체 조합 과정에 시간이 많이 걸린다.본고에서 우리는 등거리 특징영사와 국부적 절선 공간을 각각 이용한 두 가지 새로운 단어 표시 세분화 방법을 제시했다.이전의 방법과 달리, 우리의 첫 번째 방법은 단어와 그 인접한 단어 사이의 국부적인 기하학적 정보가 아니라 모든 단어의 전체적인 기하학적 정보를 보존함으로써 미리 훈련된 단어의 삽입을 바로잡는 것이다.우리의 두 번째 방법은 국부 절선 공간을 원시적이고 새롭게 정의한 삽입 공간에 맞추는 것이지 두 번의 가중 국부 선형 조합을 실행하여 단어 표시를 세분화하는 것이 아니다.표준어의 상관도와 어의 유사성 임무에서 얻은 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 각종 가장 선진적인 단어 표시 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다\n정교하다.', 'sq': 'Studimet e fundit tregojnë se modelet e përfshirjes së fjalëve shpesh nënvlerësojnë ngjashmëritë midis fjalëve të ngjashme dhe mbivlerësojnë ngjashmëritë midis fjalëve të largëta. Kjo rezulton në rezultatet e ngjashmërisë së fjalëve të përfshira nga përfshirja e modeleve të papërkatshme me gjykimin njerëzor. Metodat e shumta të bazuara në mësim përdoren gjerësisht për të rafinuar përfaqësimet e fjalëve duke rindërtuar vektorët e fjalëve nga hapësira origjinale e përfshirjes në një hapësirë të re të rafinuar semantike. Këto metoda përqëndrohen kryesisht në ruajtjen e informacionit të gjeometrisë lokale nëpërmjet kryerjes së kombinimit të peshuar lokal linear midis fjalëve dhe fqinjëve të tyre dy herë. Megjithatë, këto pesha rindërtimi ndikohen lehtë nga zgjedhjet e ndryshme të fjalëve fqinjë dhe i tërë procesi i kombinimit është me kohë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë dy metoda të reja të përfaqësimit të fjalëve të rafinuar duke nxitur përkatësisht hartimin e karakteristikave të izometrisë dhe hapësirën lokale të tangenteve. Ndryshe nga metodat e mëparshme, metoda jonë e parë korrekton përfshirjet e fjalëve të paratrajnuara duke ruajtur informacionin e gjeometrisë globale të të gjitha fjalëve në vend të informacionit të gjeometrisë lokale midis fjalëve dhe fqinjëve të tyre. Metoda jonë e dytë rafinon përfaqësimet e fjalëve duke renditur hapësirat origjinale dhe të rifinuara të përfshirjes bazuar në hapësirën lokale të tangenteve në vend që të kryejnë kombinimin e peshuar lokalisht linear dy herë. Rezultatet eksperimentale të fituara nga lidhjet semantike standarte dhe detyrat semantike të ngjashmërisë tregojnë se metodat tona mbikalojnë linjat bazë të ndryshme më të larta për përfaqësimin e fjalëve\nrafinues.', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky aramlar şol sözleriň içine daşarylýan nusgalaryny köplenç meňzeş sözleriň arasynda ýakynlaşyklaryny çaklaýar we uzak sözleriň arasynda ýakynlaşyklaryny çaklaýar. Bu sözleriň meňzeşlikleriniň netijesi adam häsiýeti bilen döwletlere düşürmeýän nusgalardan çykylýar. Çoklu öğrenme tabanlı yöntemler, kelime vektörlerini orijinal içeren uzaydan täze gelişmiş semantik uzaya tazeltmek için kullanılır. Bu döwletler ýerli geometriýa maglumatlaryny ýerleşýän ýerleşýän sözler we goňşylaryň arasynda iki gezek çyzgylyk bilen birleşişmäge mejbur edýärler. Ýöne bu ýene-de düzenleme ağırlyklary goňşy sözleriniň beýleki saýlawlaryna aňsatlyk ýok edip otyrýar we bütin kombinatsiýa prosesi wagtyň tüketmesidir. Bu kagyzda, biz iki täze söz taýýarlama yöntemlerini izometriň suratlaryny we ýerli tangens seleňini süýtgetmek üçin teklip edýäris. Öňki döwletlere görä, biziň ilkinji döwletimiz öňki bilim edilen sözler baglaýyşyny dünýä geometriýa maglumatyny ýerine ýerleri sözler we goňşy arasynda saklaýar. İkinci yöntemimiz, yerel boyutlu çizgiler kombinasyonu iki kere yapmak yerine, orijinal ve yeniden yazılmış içeri alanlarla birleştirir. Standart semantik tedavi ve semantik benzeri görevlerden alınan deneysel sonuçlarımız kelime temsilleri için çeşitli durum-suçsuz çözümlerini çözerek gösteriyor.\nsaklanmak', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে শব্দের বিভিন্ন মডেল প্রায়শই একই রকম শব্দের মধ্যে কমান্তর করে এবং দূরবর্তী শব্দের মধ্যে  এর ফলে শব্দের সমতুল্যের ফলাফল মানুষের বিচারের বিরুদ্ধে মোডেল পাওয়া যায়। ম্যানিফোল্ড-ভিত্তিক শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে মূল বিভিন্ন স্থান থেকে পুনরায় প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য এই পদ্ধতিগুলো মূলত স্থানীয় ভৌমিতিক তথ্য সংরক্ষণের প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে স্থানীয় ভূমিতে প্রতিবেশীদের মধ্যে দুইবার শ তবে প্রতিবেশী শব্দের বিভিন্ন নির্বাচনে এই পুনর্গঠনের ওজন সহজে প্রভাবিত হয়েছে এবং পুরো সংগঠনের প্রক্রিয়া সময়-ভক্ষতি। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা দুই নভেল শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে একাত্মতার বৈশিষ্ট্য ম্যাপ এবং স্থানীয় ট্যাংকেন পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতি অনুরূপ, আমাদের প্রথম পদ্ধতি প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দের সংশোধন করে স্থানীয় ভূমিতির তথ্য এবং তাদের প্রতিবেশীদের মধ্যে বিশ্বে আমাদের দ্বিতীয় পদ্ধতি স্থানীয় ট্যাংকেন্ট স্থানের ভিত্তিতে মূল এবং পুনরায় ফিন্ডিং স্থানীয় স্থানীয় ট্যাংকেন্টের উপর ভি স্ট্যান্ডার্ডেন্ড সেম্পেন্টিক সম্পর্ক এবং সামান্যিক সমতার কাজ থেকে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে শব্দ প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য আমা\nপুনরুদ্ধার।', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ትምህርት ቃላት የፊደል ቃላት ምሳሌዎች ብዙ ጊዜ በሚያሳየው ቃላት እና በሩቅ ቃላት መካከል በሚያሳየው ብጤቶች እንዲያሳየቁ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህም የቃላት ብጤ ፍሬዎች ከሰው ፍርድ ጋር በማይተካክሉ የሚደረገው ምሳሌዎች ነው፡፡ Manifold learning-based methods are widely utilized to refine word representations by re-embedding word vectors from the original embedding space to a new refined semantic space.  እነዚህም አካባቢዎች በአካባቢው ቃልና በባልንጀሮቻቸው መካከል ሁለት ጊዜ በመስመር ውስጥ የግቢ የኢዮሜትሪ መረጃዎችን በመጠበቅ ላይ ማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ ማስታወስ ሚዛኖች በተለየ የጎረቤቶች ቃላት በመምረጥ ይቀልጣሉ፤ የሙሉ ጉዳይ የጊዜው መጠቀሚያ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ሁለት የአንባቢ ቃላት አካባቢ እና የአገር ስፋት ማህበረሰብ እና የአካባቢ ስፋትን ለመስጠት እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥርዓት፣ የፊተኛይቱ ሥርዓታችን ቃሎችን እና ጎረቤቶቻቸው መካከል የሀገር geometry መረጃዎችን በመጠበቅ የዓለምአቀፍ የኢዮማቲ መረጃዎችን በመጠበቅ ያስተካክላል፡፡ ሁለተኛይቱ ሥርዓት ቃላችን በአውሮፓዊ እና በክፍለ ስፍራዎች ላይ በመሠረት እና በክፍለ ስፍራዎችን በመለወጥ እና በአገር ስፋት ላይ የተመሳሰለውን እና የክፍለ ስፋቶችን በመለወጥ ያሳያል፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤቶች የስሜናዊ ግንኙነት እና የsemantic ብጤነት ስራዎችን የሚያሳየው የሥርዓታችን ልዩ ልዩ-የ-art-መደገፊያዎች ለቃላት መልዕክት እንዲያሳዩ ነው፡፡\nጉዳይ::', 'hy': "Վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ բառերի ներառման մոդելները հաճախ թերագնահատում են նմանատիպ բառերի և չափազանց շատ գնահատում են հեռավոր բառերի նմանությունները: Սա հանգեցնում է բառի նմանության արդյունքներին, որոնք ստացվում են մարդկային դատողության հետ անհամապատասխանող մոդելների ներառումից: Բազմաթիվ ուսումնասիրության հիմնված մեթոդներ լայնորեն օգտագործվում են բառերի ներկայացումների վերամշակելու համար՝ վերամշակելով բառերի վեկտորները սկզբնական ներգրավման տարածքից նոր վերամշակել սեմանտիկ տարածություն: Այս մեթոդները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են տեղական երկրաչափության ինֆորմացիայի պահպանության վրա' կատարելով բառերի և հարևանների միջև երկու անգամ կենտրոնացված տեղական գծային համակցությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս վերակառուցման զանգվածները հեշտությամբ ազդում են հարևան բառերի տարբեր ընտրություններից, և ամբողջ համադրման գործընթացը ժամանակ է պահանջում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու նոր բառի ներկայացման բարելավման մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են իզոմետրիայի հատկանիշների քարտեզագրությունը և տեղական տանգենտային տարածքը, համեմատաբար: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ մեթոդներին, մեր առաջին մեթոդը հարմարեցնում է նախապատրաստված բառերը պահպանելով բոլոր բառերի գլոբալ երկրաչափության տեղեկատվությունը բառերի և հարևանների միջև տեղական երկրաչափության տեղեկատվության փոխարեն: Մեր երկրորդ մեթոդը հարմարեցնում է բառերի ներկայացումները' հավասարեցնելով սկզբնական և վերաստեղծված ներդրման տարածքները, հիմնված տեղական տանգենտային տարածության վրա, տեղական տոնգենտային համադրման երկու անգամ արտադրելու փոխարեն: Experimental results obtained from standard semantic relatedness and semantic similarity tasks show that our methods outperform various state-of-the-art baselines for word representation\nբարելավումը:", 'az': 'Son təhsil işləri göstərirlər ki, modellər içərisində bənzər sözlər arasında bənzərini və uzaq sözlər arasındakı bənzərini çox dəyişdirirlər. Bu, insan hökmünə uyğun modellərdən istifadə edilməyən sözlərə bənzər şeylər verir. Öyrənmək vasitəsilə çox öyrənmək metodları sözlərin ifadələrini yenidən inşa edən söz vektörlərindən yenidən inşa etmək üçün genişliyi istifadə edilir. Bu metodlar məqsədilə yerli geometri məlumatlarını, sözlər və qonşuları arasında iki dəfə çəkilən linear kombinatsiyasını tərzdə qorumağa odaqlanır. Ancaq bu yenidən inşaat ağırları müxtəlif sözlərin seçimləri ilə asanlıqla etkilidir və bütün kombinasyon prosesi zaman istifadəsidir. Bu kağızda, iki yeni söz ifadə edilmə metodlarını təklif edirik ki, izometri özellikləri maplaması və yerli tangent alanı təklif edir. Əvvəlki metodların bənzərinə baxmayaraq, ilk metodumuz sözlərin və komşularının arasındakı yerli geometri məlumatlarının yerinə küresel geometri məlumatlarını qoruyaraq əvvəlki təhsil edilmiş sözləri düzəldər. İkincisi metodumuz sözləri təsdiqləyici olaraq yerli tangent boşluğuna dayanan və yenidən təsdiqləyici yerli linear kombinatsiyasını iki dəfə təsdiqləyib edir. Standart semantik bağlılıq və semantik similarlıq işlərindən alınan təcrübə sonuçları göstərir ki, metodlarımız sözləri göstərmək üçün müxtəlif təcrübə səhifələri\ntəmizlənmək.', 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud näitavad, et sõnade manustamise mudelid alahindavad sageli sarnaste sõnade sarnasust ja ülehinnavad kaugete sõnade sarnasust. Selle tulemuseks on sõnade sarnasuse tulemused, mis saadakse inimese hinnangule vastuolus olevate mudelite manustamisel. Mitmekordseid õppepõhiseid meetodeid kasutatakse laialdaselt sõnade esituste täpsustamiseks, integreerides sõnavaktorid uuesti algsest manustamisruumist uueks rafineeritud semantiliseks ruumiks. Need meetodid keskenduvad peamiselt kohaliku geomeetriateabe säilitamisele, teostades kaks korda kaalutud kohaliku lineaarse kombinatsiooni sõnade ja nende naabrite vahel. Kuid neid rekonstrueerimisraskusi mõjutavad kergesti erinevad naabersõnade valikud ja kogu kombinatsiooniprotsess on aeganõudev. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kaks uut sõnade esitamise täpsustamise meetodit, mis võimendavad vastavalt isomeetria funktsioonide kaardistamist ja kohalikku tangentsruumi. Erinevalt varasematest meetoditest parandab meie esimene meetod eelõpetatud sõnade manustamist, säilitades kõigi sõnade globaalse geomeetriateabe, mitte kohaliku geomeetriateabe sõnade ja nende naabrite vahel. Meie teine meetod täpsustab sõnade esitusi, joondades algsed ja uuesti täpsustatud manustamisruumid kohaliku tangendiruumi põhjal selle asemel, et teha kaalutud lokaalse lineaarse kombinatsiooni kaks korda. Standardsete semantilise seose ja semantilise sarnasuse ülesannete eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetodid ületavad erinevaid kaasaegseid lähtejooni sõnade esitamisel\ntäiustamine.', 'bs': 'Nedavno ispitivanje pokazuje da modeli uključenih riječi često podcjenjuju sličnosti između sličnih riječi i pretprocjenjuju sličnosti između udaljenih riječi. To je rezultat sličnosti riječi koji su dobili od ugrađenja modela u skladu s ljudskim presudima. Mnoge metode na učenju se široko koriste za refinansiranje reprezentacija riječi prema ponovnom ugrađenju vektora riječi iz originalnog ugrađenog prostora do novog refinansiranog semantičkog prostora. Ove metode se uglavnom fokusiraju na čuvanje lokalnih geometrijskih informacija putem provedbe težine lokalne linearne kombinacije između riječi i njihovih susjeda dvaput. Međutim, ova težina rekonstrukcije lako utječe na različite selekcije susjednih riječi i cijeli proces kombinacije je potrošenje vremena. U ovom papiru predlažemo dvije nove reči za refinzivanje metode za repinzivanje izražavanja izometrijskih karakteristika i lokalnog tangentnog prostora. Za razliku od prethodnih metoda, naša prva metoda ispravlja predobučene riječi uključene čuvajući globalne geometrijske informacije svih riječi umjesto lokalne geometrijske informacije između riječi i njihovih susjeda. Naša druga metoda refinira reprezentacije riječi poravnajući originalne i ponovno navedene ugrađene prostore na temelju lokalnog tangentnog prostora umjesto izvođenja težine lokalne linearne kombinacije dvaput. Eksperimentalni rezultati dobiveni od standardnih semantičkih odnosa i semantičkih zadataka sličnosti pokazuju da naši metodi iznose različite osnovne linije stanja umjetnosti za predstavljanje riječi\nrefinement.', 'cs': 'Nedávné studie ukazují, že modely vkládání slov často podceňují podobnosti mezi podobnými slovy a přeceňují podobnosti mezi vzdálenými slovy. To má za následek výsledky slovní podobnosti získané z vložení modelů neslučitelných s lidským úsudkem. Rozmanité metody založené na učení jsou široce využívány k upřesnění reprezentace slov opětovným vložením slovních vektorů z původního vkládacího prostoru do nového rafinovaného sémantického prostoru. Tyto metody se zaměřují především na zachování informací o lokální geometrii prováděním vážené lokálně lineární kombinace slov a jejich sousedů dvakrát. Tyto rekonstrukční váhy jsou však snadno ovlivněny různými výběry sousedních slov a celý proces kombinace je časově náročný. V tomto článku navrhujeme dvě nové metody zdokonalování reprezentace slov využívající mapování izometrických vlastností a lokální tečný prostor. Na rozdíl od předchozích metod, naše první metoda opravuje předškolené vložení slov zachováním globálních geometrických informací všech slov namísto informací o lokální geometrii mezi slovy a jejich sousedy. Naše druhá metoda upřesňuje reprezentace slov zarovnáním původních a předem definovaných vkládacích prostorů založených na lokálním tečném prostoru namísto dvakrát provedení vážené lokálně lineární kombinace. Experimentální výsledky získané ze standardních úloh sémantické souvislosti a sémantické podobnosti ukazují, že naše metody překonávají různé nejmodernější základní linie pro reprezentaci slov\nzdokonalení.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset osoittavat, että sanaupotusmallit aliarvioivat usein samankaltaisten sanojen samankaltaisuuksia ja yliarvioivat etäisten sanojen samankaltaisuuksia. Tämä johtaa sanasamankaltaisiin tuloksiin, jotka saadaan upottamalla malleja, jotka ovat ristiriidassa ihmisen harkinnan kanssa. Monipuolisia oppimiseen perustuvia menetelmiä käytetään laajalti sanaesitysten tarkentamiseen upottamalla sanavektorit uudelleen alkuperäisestä upotustilasta uuteen hienostuneeseen semanttiseen tilaan. Nämä menetelmät keskittyvät pääasiassa paikallisen geometrian tiedon säilyttämiseen tekemällä painotettuja paikallisesti lineaarisia yhdistelmiä sanojen ja niiden naapureiden välillä kahdesti. Näihin rekonstruktiopainoihin vaikuttavat kuitenkin helposti erilaiset naapurisanojen valinnat ja koko yhdistelmäprosessi on aikaa vievä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kahta uutta sanaesitystä, jotka hyödyntävät isometristen ominaisuuksien kartoitusta ja paikallista tangenttiavaruutta. Toisin kuin aikaisemmat menetelmät, ensimmäinen menetelmämme korjaa ennalta koulutetut sanaupotukset säilyttämällä kaikkien sanojen globaalin geometrian tiedot paikallisten geometrian tietojen sijaan sanojen ja niiden naapureiden välillä. Toinen menetelmämme tarkentaa sanaesityksiä kohdistamalla alkuperäiset ja uudelleen määritetyt upotusvälit paikallisen tangenttiavaruuden perusteella sen sijaan, että suorittaisimme painotetun paikallisesti lineaarisen yhdistelmän kahdesti. Standardi semanttinen yhteys- ja semanttisen samankaltaisuuden tehtävistä saadut kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme suoriutuvat paremmin kuin erilaiset nykyaikaiset sanaesityksen perusviivat.\nviimeistely.', 'ca': "Recent studies show that word embedding models often underestimate similarities between similar words and overestimate similarities between distant words.  Això resulta en resultats de similitud de paraules obtinguts incorporant models inconsistents amb el judici humà. Métodes multiples basats en l'aprenentatge s'utilitzen ampliament per refinar les representacions de paraules reintegrant vectors de paraules de l'espai original d'incorporació a un nou espai semàntic refinat. Aquests mètodes es centren principalment en preservar la informació geometrica local fent una combinació linear ponderada localment entre paraules i els seus veïns dos cops. No obstant això, aquests pesos de reconstrucció són fàcilment influenciats per diferents seleccions de paraules veïnes i tot el procés de combinació consumeix temps. En aquest paper, proposem dos mètodes de refinament de representació de paraules noves que utilitzen el mapatge de característiques isometriques i l'espai tangent local respectivament. A diferència dels mètodes anteriors, el nostre primer mètode corregeix les integracions de paraules pré-entrenades conservant la informació geometrica global de totes les paraules en lloc d'informació geometrica local entre paraules i els seus veïns. Our second method refines word representations by aligning original and re-fined embedding spaces based on local tangent space instead of performing weighted locally linear combination twice.  Experimental results obtained from standard semantic relatedness and semantic similarity tasks show that our methods outperform various state-of-the-art baselines for word representation\nrefinament.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Wurung iki ngono cah-cah sing paling-cah dumadhi gambaran ning model sing bisa nguasai nggawe barang uwong. politenessoffpolite"), and when the re is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi wis nggawe ing nggawe informasi jipemberi kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo tukang tarjamahan linear ning basa gambaran karo akeh nagara iki. Nanging, balanci nggawe restoran diolah sampeyan nguasai iki sak diolah Nang pember iki, kita sugester duruh basa gambar representation refine method, médium nggawe Isomometer caret maping lan lokal tangent space responsiblete. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kernel Perintah sing paling nggambar semanti kuwi adalah semanti karo semanti kuwi alam sing ngendalikno karo hal-hal akeh modolan sing gawe nguasai perusahaan state-of-the-arts maneh kanggo kelas telungno\nIso mulai', 'ha': "Ana ƙidãya a yanzu, ya nuna cewa misãlai da aka embedded maganar a ƙara ƙari a ƙayyade masu daidaita tsakanin maganar da ke daidai kuma ka yi bincike da daidaita tsakanin maganar mai nĩsa. Wannan yana ƙara da matsalar da kamata daga cikin misalin da ba da inganci ga mutane ba. @ info: whatsthis Wannan shiryoyin sun yi fokus mainli a tsare data na lokal geometry game da cikakken koma mai lokal linje tsakanin maganar da jiransu sau biyu. A lokacin da waɗannan masu canza rekodi za'a yi amfani da sauri mai sauƙi na zaɓen wasu kalmõmi na jiran jiran, kuma aikin komabar da ke koma shi ne mai amfani da lokaci. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa hanyoyin biyu masu wakilishi maganar nowaya da shiryarwa da ke samarari da gauraya na salon da ke cikin lokal. Di motsi da shiryoyin farko, hanyoyinmu na daidaita magana na farko wanda aka yi wa shirin da aka shigar da shi a gaba ɗaya da ya tsare data na global geometry wa duk kalmõmi, kuma bã da information na lokacin geometry tsakanin maganar da matansa. Tsarinmu na ƙari, ya gyara masu tsari ga maganar da ke sami filayen kwance da za'a juyi da sau-filin da aka danne shi a kan filin tangent na lokal, kuma ba ya sami nau'in komai na lokal sau biyu. Mataimakin jarrabawa da aka motsa daga aikin da suka yi amfani da kuma masu daidaita na semantic, yana nũna cewa hanyoyinmu za'a samar da wasu halin-state-the-art Baseline for word-wakin\nmai gyãra.", 'sk': 'Nedavne študije kažejo, da modeli vključevanja besed pogosto podcenjujejo podobnosti med podobnimi besedami in precenjujejo podobnosti med oddaljenimi besedami. To povzroči rezultate podobnosti besed, pridobljene z vdelavo modelov, ki niso skladni s človeško presojo. Metode, ki temeljijo na množičnem učenju, se pogosto uporabljajo za izboljšanje predstavitev besed s ponovno vdelavo besednih vektorjev iz prvotnega prostora za vdelavo v nov prefinjen semantični prostor. Te metode se osredotočajo predvsem na ohranjanje lokalnih geometrijskih informacij z dvakrat izvajanjem utežene lokalne linearne kombinacije besed in njihovih sosedov. Vendar pa na te rekonstrukcijske uteži zlahka vplivajo različne izbire sosednjih besed in celoten postopek kombinacije je zamuden. V prispevku predlagamo dve novi metodi izboljšanja predstavitve besed, ki izkoriščata kartiranje izometrijskih značilnosti in lokalni tangentni prostor. Za razliko od prejšnjih metod naša prva metoda popravi vnaprej usposobljene vgradnje besed z ohranjanjem globalnih geometrijskih informacij vseh besed namesto lokalnih geometrijskih informacij med besedami in njihovimi sosednjimi. Naša druga metoda izboljšuje predstavitve besed tako, da poravna originalne in ponovno določene vdelane presledke na podlagi lokalnega tangentnega prostora, namesto da dvakrat izvede ponderirano lokalno linearno kombinacijo. Eksperimentalni rezultati standardne semantične povezanosti in semantične podobnosti kažejo, da naše metode presegajo različne najsodobnejše osnovne črte za predstavitev besed\nprefinjenost.', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཟིན་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཡིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ལས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་པའི་མིག་རྣམས་ལས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། Manifold learning-based methods a re widely used to refine word representations by re-embedding word vectors from the original embedding space to a new refined semantic space. These methods mainly focus on preserving local geometry information through performing weighted locally linear combination between words and their neighbors twice. However, these reconstruction weights are easily influenced by different selections of neighboring words and the whole combination process is time-consuming. In this paper, we propose two novel word representation refinement methods leveraging isometry feature mapping and local tangent space respectively. Unlike previous methods, our first method corrects pre-trained word embeddings by preserving global geometry information of all words instead of local geometry information between words and their neighbors. Our second method refines word representations by aligning original and re-fined embedding spaces based on local tangent space instead of performing weighted locally linear combination twice. Experimental results obtained from standard semantic relatedness and semantic similarity tasks show that our methods outperform various state-of-the-art baselines for word representation\nམཐའ་འཁོར་སྐྱོང་བྱེད།', 'he': 'מחקרים לאחרונה מראים שמדוגמנים של מילים מעורבים לעתים קרובות מעריכים דמיונים בין מילים דומות ובין מעריכים יתר של דמיונים בין מילים רחוקות. זה גורם לתוצאות דומות מילים שנקבלו מכניסה מודלים שלא מתאימים לשיפוט אנושי. שיטות מורכבות מבוססות על לימוד משתמשות באופן רחב כדי לטענן מייצגות מילים על ידי להכניס מחדש ווקטורים מילים מרחב ההכניסה המקורי למרחב סמנטי חדש מעודף. These methods mainly focus on preserving local geometry information through performing weighted locally linear combination between words and their neighbors twice.  בכל אופן, משקלי הבנייה האלה משפיעים בקלות על ידי בחירות שונות של מילים שכונות וכל תהליך השילוב משתמש בזמן. In this paper, we propose two novel word representation refinement methods leveraging isometry feature mapping and local tangent space respectively.  בניגוד לשיטות קודמות, השיטה הראשונה שלנו תוקנת מילים מאומנות מראש על ידי לשמור על מידע גיאומטרי גלובלי של כל המילים במקום מידע גיאומטרי מקומי בין מילים לשכנים שלהם. השיטה השנייה שלנו מעדיפה מיצוגים מילים על ידי התאמה מקורית ומגדורה מחדש מרחבי הכניסה המבוססים על מרחב טנגנט מקומי במקום לבצע שילוב מיוחד מקומי לינרי פעמיים. תוצאות ניסויים שנוצאות מהקשר סמנטי סטנדרטי ומשימות דמיוניות סמנטיות מראות ששיטותינו עולים על שורות בסיס חדשות למילים\nשיפור.'}
{'en': 'Optimizing Transformer for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'تحسين المحول للترجمة الآلية العصبية منخفضة الموارد', 'pt': 'Otimizando o transformador para tradução automática neural de baixo recurso', 'fr': 'Optimisation du transformateur pour la traduction automatique neuronale à faibles ressources', 'es': 'Optimización del transformador para la traducción automática neuronal de bajos recursos', 'zh': '针低资源神经机器翻译优化转换器', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर का अनुकूलन', 'ja': '低資源ニューラル機械翻訳のためのトランスフォーマーの最適化', 'ru': 'Оптимизация трансформатора для низкоресурсного нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Claochladán a Bharrfheabhsú le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-Acmhainne Íseal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Βελτιστοποίηση μετασχηματιστή για νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους', 'hu': 'A transzformátor optimalizálása alacsony erőforrású idegi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Ottimizzazione del trasformatore per la traduzione automatica neurale a basse risorse', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс невралдық машинаны аудару үшін түрлендірушісін оптимизациялау', 'lt': 'Mažai išteklių taurių mašinų vertimo transformatoriaus optimizavimas', 'mk': 'Оптимизирање на трансформаторот за преведување на неврални машини со ниски ресурси', 'ms': 'Memoptimumkan Penukar untuk Penerjemahan Mesin Neural Sumber Terrendah', 'ml': 'Optimizing Transformer for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'mt': 'L-ottimizzazzjoni tat-Transformatur għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali b’Riżorsi Bażi', 'mn': 'Бага боловсролын мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх төлөвлөгч', 'no': 'Optimaliserar transformering for låg ressurs- neiralmaskineomsetjing', 'pl': 'Optymalizacja transformatora dla niskich zasobów neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Optimizarea transformatorului pentru traducerea automată neurală cu resurse reduse', 'sr': 'Optimaliziranje transformera za prevod neuralnih mašina niskog resursa', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'کم- رسورس نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے ترجمہ ترجمہ کرنے والا', 'so': 'Optimizing Transfer for Low-Resource Neural machine Translation', 'sv': 'Optimera transformatorn för Neural maskinöversättning med låg resurs', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கான மொழிமாற்றி மொழிபெயர்ப்பானை தேர்வு செய்கிறது', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Optimaliseren van transformator voor neuronale machinevertaling met weinig hulpbronnen', 'bg': 'Оптимизиране на трансформатора за нискоресурсен неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'Optimering af transformator til lav ressource neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Optimaliziranje transformera za prevod neuralnih strojeva niskog resursa', 'de': 'Optimierung des Transformators für ressourcenarme neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Optimizing Transformer for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '저자원 신경 기계 번역에 사용되는 최적화 변환기', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Kifaa cha Kichini cha Rasilimali', 'tr': 'Açk Ressurat Nural Makine terjime üçin terjime edilen', 'fa': 'تغییردهنده برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی کم منبع', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Optimizimi i Transformuesit për Transformimin e Makinës Neurale me burime të ulta', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Անվատ ռեսուրսների նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման լավագույնը', 'az': '䇅齡쒟쒱ⵒ敳獵牳畺⁎쎶牡氠䵡歩湥泉饲楮⁔즙牣쎼淉饳椠쎼쎧쎼渠哉饲揃뱭泉饹楣椠佰瑩浩穬즙湩爊', 'bn': 'নিম্ন- সম্পদ নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য অনুবাদ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Optimaliziranje transformera za prevod neuralnih strojeva niskog resursa', 'ca': 'Optimizing Transformer for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'et': 'Transformeri optimeerimine vähese ressursiga neuroalse masintõlke jaoks', 'cs': 'Optimalizace transformátoru pro neuronový strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji', 'fi': 'Muuntajan optimointi alhaisen resurssin neurokääntämiseen', 'jv': 'Transform', 'sk': 'Optimizacija transformatorja za strojni prevod z nizkimi viri', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉུང་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ', 'he': 'אופטימיזם מעבר לתרגום מכונת נוירולית עם משאבים נמוכים'}
{'en': 'Language pairs with limited amounts of parallel data, also known as low-resource languages, remain a challenge for neural machine translation. While the Transformer model has achieved significant improvements for many language pairs and has become the de facto mainstream architecture, its capability under low-resource conditions has not been fully investigated yet. Our experiments on different subsets of the IWSLT14 training data show that the effectiveness of Transformer under low-resource conditions is highly dependent on the hyper-parameter settings. Our experiments show that using an optimized Transformer for low-resource conditions improves the translation quality up to 7.3 BLEU points compared to using the Transformer default settings.', 'ar': 'لا تزال الأزواج اللغوية ذات الكميات المحدودة من البيانات المتوازية ، والمعروفة أيضًا باللغات منخفضة الموارد ، تمثل تحديًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية. في حين أن نموذج Transformer قد حقق تحسينات كبيرة للعديد من أزواج اللغات وأصبح بنية أساسية فعلية ، إلا أن قدرته في ظل ظروف منخفضة الموارد لم يتم التحقيق فيها بشكل كامل حتى الآن. تُظهر تجاربنا على مجموعات فرعية مختلفة من بيانات التدريب IWSLT14 أن فعالية المحول في ظل ظروف انخفاض الموارد تعتمد بشكل كبير على إعدادات المعلمة المفرطة. تظهر تجاربنا أن استخدام محول محسن لظروف الموارد المنخفضة يحسن جودة الترجمة حتى 7.3 نقطة BLEU مقارنة باستخدام الإعدادات الافتراضية للمحول.', 'es': 'Los pares de idiomas con cantidades limitadas de datos paralelos, también conocidos como idiomas de bajos recursos, siguen siendo un desafío para la traducción automática neuronal. Si bien el modelo Transformer ha logrado mejoras significativas para muchos pares de idiomas y se ha convertido en la arquitectura principal de facto, su capacidad en condiciones de bajos recursos aún no se ha investigado completamente. Nuestros experimentos en diferentes subconjuntos de los datos de entrenamiento de IWSLT14 muestran que la eficacia de Transformer en condiciones de bajos recursos depende en gran medida de la configuración de hiperparámetros. Nuestros experimentos muestran que el uso de un Transformer optimizado para condiciones de bajos recursos mejora la calidad de la traducción hasta 7,3 puntos BLEU en comparación con el uso de la configuración predeterminada de Transformer.', 'fr': "Les paires de langues avec des quantités limitées de données parallèles, également appelées langages à faibles ressources, restent un défi pour la traduction automatique neuronale. Alors que le modèle Transformer a apporté des améliorations significatives pour de nombreuses paires de langues et est devenu de facto l'architecture courante, sa capacité dans des conditions de faibles ressources n'a pas encore été complètement étudiée. Nos expériences sur différents sous-ensembles des données d'entraînement IWSLT14 montrent que l'efficacité du Transformer dans des conditions de faibles ressources dépend fortement des paramètres d'hyperparamètres. Nos expériences montrent que l'utilisation d'un Transformer optimisé pour des conditions de faibles ressources améliore la qualité de la traduction jusqu'à 7,3 points BLEU par rapport à l'utilisation des paramètres par défaut du Transformer.", 'pt': 'Pares de idiomas com quantidades limitadas de dados paralelos, também conhecidos como idiomas de poucos recursos, continuam sendo um desafio para a tradução automática neural. Embora o modelo Transformer tenha alcançado melhorias significativas para muitos pares de idiomas e tenha se tornado a arquitetura mainstream de fato, sua capacidade em condições de poucos recursos ainda não foi totalmente investigada. Nossos experimentos em diferentes subconjuntos dos dados de treinamento do IWSLT14 mostram que a eficácia do Transformer em condições de poucos recursos é altamente dependente das configurações de hiperparâmetros. Nossos experimentos mostram que o uso de um Transformer otimizado para condições de poucos recursos melhora a qualidade da tradução em até 7,3 pontos BLEU em comparação com o uso das configurações padrão do Transformer.', 'ja': '低リソース言語としても知られる、限られた量の並列データを有する言語ペアは、ニューラル機械翻訳の課題として残る。Transformerモデルは、多くの言語ペアで大幅な改善を達成し、事実上の主流アーキテクチャとなっていますが、低資源条件下でのその能力はまだ十分に調査されていません。IWSLT 14トレーニングデータの異なるサブセットの実験では、低資源条件下でのトランスフォーマーの有効性は、ハイパーパラメータ設定に大きく依存していることが示されています。当社の実験では、低リソース条件で最適化されたトランスフォーマーを使用すると、トランスフォーマーのデフォルト設定を使用するのと比較して、翻訳品質が最大7.3 BLEUポイント向上することが示されています。', 'ru': 'Языковые пары с ограниченным объемом параллельных данных, также известные как языки с низким уровнем ресурсов, остаются проблемой для нейронного машинного перевода. Хотя модель Transformer достигла значительных улучшений для многих языковых пар и стала де-факто основной архитектурой, ее возможности в условиях ограниченности ресурсов еще не были полностью исследованы. Наши эксперименты на различных подмножествах обучающих данных IWSLT14 показывают, что эффективность Трансформатора в условиях малого ресурса сильно зависит от настроек гиперпараметра. Наши эксперименты показывают, что использование оптимизированного Трансформатора для малоресурсных условий улучшает качество перевода до 7,3 баллов BLEU по сравнению с использованием настроек Трансформатора по умолчанию.', 'hi': 'समानांतर डेटा की सीमित मात्रा के साथ भाषा जोड़े, जिन्हें कम-संसाधन भाषाओं के रूप में भी जाना जाता है, तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक चुनौती बने हुए हैं। जबकि ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल ने कई भाषा जोड़े के लिए महत्वपूर्ण सुधार हासिल किए हैं और वास्तविक मुख्यधारा की वास्तुकला बन गई है, कम संसाधन स्थितियों के तहत इसकी क्षमता की अभी तक पूरी तरह से जांच नहीं की गई है। IWSLT14 प्रशिक्षण डेटा के विभिन्न सबसेट पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि कम संसाधन स्थितियों के तहत ट्रांसफॉर्मर की प्रभावशीलता हाइपर-पैरामीटर सेटिंग्स पर अत्यधिक निर्भर है। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि कम संसाधन स्थितियों के लिए एक अनुकूलित ट्रांसफॉर्मर का उपयोग करने से ट्रांसफॉर्मर डिफ़ॉल्ट सेटिंग्स का उपयोग करने की तुलना में अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में 7.3 BLEU अंक तक सुधार होता है।', 'zh': '有限数者并行数语对(亦谓之低资源语)犹神经机器翻译挑战也。 虽Transformer形于众言,而为实架构,其于低资源未尽也。 吾于IWSLT14练数异子集之实验,变压器于下有效性高赖于超参数设置。 吾实验之明,比于用转换器默认,而用优化于资源者转换器可转易至 7.3 BLEU 也。', 'ga': 'Is dúshlán fós iad péirí teangacha le méideanna teoranta sonraí comhthreomhara, ar a dtugtar teangacha íseal-acmhainne freisin, don aistriúchán meaisín néarach. Cé go bhfuil feabhsuithe suntasacha bainte amach ag samhail an Trasfhoirmeora do go leor péirí teangacha agus anois mar an ailtireacht phríomhshrutha de facto, níl a cumas faoi choinníollacha íseal-acmhainne fiosraithe go hiomlán fós. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar fho-thacair éagsúla de shonraí oiliúna IWSLT14 go bhfuil éifeachtacht Transformer faoi choinníollacha íseal-acmhainne ag brath go mór ar na socruithe hyper-pharaiméadair. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfeabhsaítear cáilíocht an aistriúcháin suas le 7.3 pointe BLEU trí leas a bhaint as Trasfhoirmeoir optamaithe le haghaidh coinníollacha íseal-acmhainne i gcomparáid le húsáid na socruithe réamhshocraithe Trasfhoirmeoir.', 'el': 'Τα γλωσσικά ζεύγη με περιορισμένες ποσότητες παράλληλων δεδομένων, γνωστές επίσης ως γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου, παραμένουν μια πρόκληση για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση. Ενώ το μοντέλο έχει επιτύχει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις για πολλά γλωσσικά ζεύγη και έχει γίνει η de facto κυρίαρχη αρχιτεκτονική, η ικανότητά του κάτω από συνθήκες χαμηλού πόρου δεν έχει διερευνηθεί πλήρως ακόμα. Τα πειράματά μας σε διαφορετικά υποσύνολα των δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης δείχνουν ότι η αποτελεσματικότητα του μετασχηματιστή σε συνθήκες χαμηλού πόρου εξαρτάται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από τις ρυθμίσεις υπερπαραμέτρων. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η χρήση ενός βελτιστοποιημένου μετασχηματιστή για συνθήκες χαμηλού πόρου βελτιώνει την ποιότητα μετάφρασης μέχρι 7.3 σημεία σε σύγκριση με τη χρήση των προεπιλεγμένων ρυθμίσεων μετασχηματιστή.', 'hu': 'A korlátozott mennyiségű párhuzamos adatot tartalmazó nyelvpárok, más néven alacsony erőforrású nyelvek, továbbra is kihívást jelentenek az idegi gépi fordítás számára. Bár a Transformer modell sok nyelvpár esetében jelentős fejlődést ért el, és a de facto mainstream architektúrává vált, a képességét alacsony erőforrás-igényű körülmények között még nem vizsgálták teljesen. Az IWSLT14 képzési adatok különböző részhalmazain végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a Transformer hatékonysága alacsony erőforrás-igényű körülmények között nagymértékben függ a hiperparaméter beállításaitól. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy az optimalizált Transformer használata alacsony erőforrás-igényű körülmények között akár 7,3 BLEU ponttal is javítja a fordítási minőséget a Transformer alapértelmezett beállításaihoz képest.', 'ka': 'ენის ზოგები, რომლებიც პარალელელი მონაცემების განზომილებული ზოგები, რომლებიც ცოტა რესურსების ენები, არსებობს ნეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელების განცემე თუმცა ტრანფორმეტრის მოდელი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენა მნიშვნელოვანი ენის ზოგებისთვის და უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი აქტიქტიქტურის შესაძლებლობა, მისი შესაძლებლობა აღმო ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები IWSLT14 განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავებული სპექსტებში ჩვენი განსხვავებული მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტების ექსპერიმენტია, რომ ტრანფორმენტის ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენება, რომ გამოყენება პრონფორმენტების გამოყენება მარტივი რესურსის შესახებისთვის უფრო მეტივად გადაწყენება გადაწყენება საფორმენტების', 'it': "Le coppie linguistiche con quantità limitate di dati paralleli, conosciute anche come lingue a basso contenuto di risorse, rimangono una sfida per la traduzione automatica neurale. Mentre il modello Transformer ha ottenuto miglioramenti significativi per molte coppie linguistiche ed è diventato l'architettura mainstream de facto, la sua capacità in condizioni di bassa risorsa non è ancora stata completamente studiata. I nostri esperimenti su diversi sottoinsiemi dei dati di allenamento IWSLT14 mostrano che l'efficacia di Transformer in condizioni di bassa risorsa dipende fortemente dalle impostazioni degli iper-parametri. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che l'utilizzo di un Transformer ottimizzato per condizioni a basso consumo di risorse migliora la qualità della traduzione fino a 7,3 punti BLEU rispetto all'utilizzo delle impostazioni predefinite di Transformer.", 'mk': 'Јазичките парови со ограничени количини паралелни податоци, исто така познати како јазици со ниски ресурси, остануваат предизвик за превод на неврални машини. Иако моделот Трансформ постигна значителни подобрувања за многу јазички парови и стана дефактична главна архитектура, неговата способност во услови со ниски ресурси сé уште не е целосно испитана. Нашите експерименти на различни подгрупи на податоците за обука на IWSLT14 покажуваат дека ефективноста на Трансформерот во услови со ниски ресурси е високо зависна од поставувањата на хипер-параметрите. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека употребата на оптимизиран Трансформер за услови со ниски ресурси го подобрува квалитетот на преводот до 7,3 БЛЕ поени во споредба со употребата на стандардните поставувања на Трансформерот.', 'kk': 'Тілдер параллель деректердің шектелген сандары, сондай-ақ төмен ресурс тілдері деп белгіленген, невралдық компьютердің аудармасының мәселесі болады. Түрлендіру үлгісі көптеген тіл екеуі үшін маңызды жақсартылығын жеткізгенде де фактикалық негізгі архитектура болғанда, оның көп ресурстар шарттарына арналған мүмкіндіктері әлі толық зертте IWSLT14 бақылау деректерінің әртүрлі тәжірибелеріміздің тәжірибелеріміз түрлендірушінің ең бақытты ресурстар шарттарындағы тәжірибелерінің гипер параметрлеріне тәуелді деп Біздің тәжірибеміз ресурстардың төменгі шарттары үшін оптимизацияланған түрлендірушісін қолдану үшін аудармалардың сапасын 7, 3 BLEU нүктелеріне сәйкес түрлендірушісінің әдет', 'lt': 'Kalbos poros su ribotu lygiagrečių duomenų kiekiu, taip pat vadinamomis mažai išteklių turinčiomis kalbomis, tebėra iššūkis nerviniam mašinų vertimui. Nors Transformer modelis daugeliui kalbų porų gerokai pagerino ir tapo de facto pagrindine architektūra, jo pajėgumai mažai išteklių turinčiomis sąlygomis dar nebuvo išsamiai ištirti. Mūsų eksperimentai su skirtingais IWSLT14 mokymo duomenų pogrupiais rodo, kad Transformer veiksmingumas mažai išteklių turinčiomis sąlygomis labai priklauso nuo hiperparatorių nustatymo. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad naudojant optimizuotą transformatorių mažai išteklių turinčioms sąlygoms vertimo kokybė pagerėja iki 7,3 BLEU taško, palyginti su standartiniais transformatorių nustatymais.', 'ms': 'Pasangan bahasa dengan jumlah terbatas data selari, juga dikenali sebagai bahasa sumber rendah, tetap tantangan untuk terjemahan mesin saraf. Sementara model Transformer telah mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan untuk banyak pasangan bahasa dan telah menjadi arkitektur de facto aliran utama, kemampuannya dalam keadaan sumber rendah belum diselesaikan sepenuhnya. Eksperimen kami pada subset yang berbeza dari data latihan IWSLT14 menunjukkan bahawa keefektivitas Transformer dalam keadaan sumber rendah sangat bergantung pada tetapan hyper parameter. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa menggunakan Transformer yang optimum untuk keadaan sumber rendah meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan sehingga 7.3 titik BLEU dibandingkan dengan menggunakan tetapan lalai Transformer.', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлагдсан параллель өгөгдлийн хэлбэртэй холбоотой, мөн бага нөөц хэл гэж нэрлэгдсэн хэлбэрүүд нь мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын сорилт байдаг. Трансформер загвар олон хэл хоёрын хувьд маш чухал сайжруулалт гарч, үнэндээ ихэвчлэн гол архитектур болсон ч, бага нөөцийн нөхцөл байдлын доор чадварыг бүрэн судалж чадахгүй байна. IWSLT14 сургалт өгөгдлийн өөр өөр хэсгүүдийн туршилтуудын туршилтууд нь Трансформацийн үр дүнтэй байдал бага нөөц нөхцөл байдлаар илүү хамааралтай гэдгийг харуулдаг. Бидний туршилтууд бага нөөцийн нөхцөл байдлын тулд сайхан шинэчлэлтийг ашиглах боломжтой Төрвөлжигч ашиглах нь 7.3 БЛЕУ цэг руу хөгжүүлдэг.', 'mt': 'Il-pari lingwistiċi b’ammonti limitati ta’ dejta parallel a, magħrufa wkoll bħala lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi, jibqgħu sfida għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. Filwaqt li l-mudell Transformer kiseb titjib sinifikanti għal ħafna pari lingwistiċi u sar l-arkitettura de facto prinċipali, il-kapaċità tiegħu taħt kundizzjonijiet ta’ riżorsi baxxi għadha ma ġietx investigata bis-sħiħ. L-esperimenti tagħna fuq settijiet differenti tad-dejta tat-taħriġ tal-IWSLT14 juru li l-effettività tat-Transformer f’kundizzjonijiet ta’ riżorsi baxxi hija dipendenti ħafna fuq is-setturi tal-parametri għoljin. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-użu ta’ Transformer ottimizzat għal kundizzjonijiet b’riżorsi baxxi jtejjeb il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni sa 7.3 punti BLEU meta mqabbel mal-użu tal-konfigurazzjonijiet predefiniti tat-Transformer.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പരിധികളുള്ള അളവിലുള്ള ഭാഷ ജോട്ടുകാര്\u200d, കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷകളായി അറിയു ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പല ഭാഷ ജോടികള്\u200dക്കും വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നിട്ടും അത് മൂലപ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടാക്ക IWSLT14 പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു താഴെ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരിശോധന സാധനങ്ങള്\u200d 7. 3 ബിലിയു', 'no': 'Språkparar med begrensede mengdar parallelle data, også kjent som låg ressursspråk, blir eit utfordring for omsetjing av neuralmaskin. Mens Transformeringsmodellen har oppnådd signifikante forbedringar for mange språkparar og har blitt de facto hovudarkitekturen, er det ikkje noko fullstendig undersøkt i låg ressursforhold. Eksperimentane våre på ulike undergrupper av IWSLT14-opplæringsdata viser at effektiviteten av Transformeren under låg ressursforhold er veldig avhengig av innstillingane for hyper-parameter. Eksperimentane våre viser at med ein optimalisert transformer for låg ressursforhold forbedrar omsetjingskvaliteten opp til 7,3 BLEU-punkt i sammenligning med standardinnstillingane for Transformer.', 'pl': 'Pary językowe z ograniczoną ilością danych równoległych, znane również jako języki o niskich zasobach, pozostają wyzwaniem dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego. Chociaż model Transformera osiągnął znaczące ulepszenia dla wielu par językowych i stał się de facto główną architekturą, jego możliwość w warunkach niskich zasobów nie została jeszcze w pełni zbadana. Nasze eksperymenty na różnych podzbiorach danych treningowych IWSLT14 pokazują, że skuteczność Transformera w warunkach niskich zasobów jest w dużym stopniu zależna od ustawień hiperparametrów. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że zastosowanie zoptymalizowanego Transformera dla warunków niskiej ilości zasobów poprawia jakość tłumaczenia do 7.3 punktów BLEU w porównaniu z użyciem domyślnych ustawień Transformera.', 'sr': 'Jezikovi parovi sa ograničenim količinama paralelnih podataka, takođe poznatih kao jezici niskih resursa, ostaju izazov za prevod neuralne mašine. Iako je model transformera postigao značajne poboljšanje za mnoge jezičke parove i postao de facto glavna arhitektura, njena sposobnost pod uslovima niskog resursa još nije potpuno istražena. Naši eksperimenti na različitim podskicama podataka obuke IWSLT14 pokazuju da je efikasnost transformera pod uslovima niskog resursa veoma zavisna od postavki hiper-parametara. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da korištenje optimiziranog transformera za uslove niskog resursa poboljšava kvalitet prevođenja do 7,3 BLEU tačka u usporedbi s korištenjem standardnih nastava transformera.', 'ro': 'Perechile lingvistice cu cantități limitate de date paralele, cunoscute și sub numele de limbi cu resurse reduse, rămân o provocare pentru traducerea automată neurală. Deși modelul Transformer a obținut îmbunătățiri semnificative pentru multe perechi de limbi și a devenit arhitectura principală de facto, capacitatea sa în condiții cu resurse reduse nu a fost încă investigată pe deplin. Experimentele noastre pe diferite subseturi ale datelor de instruire IWSLT14 arată că eficiența Transformer în condiții cu resurse reduse depinde foarte mult de setările hiperparametrului. Experimentele noastre arată că utilizarea unui Transformer optimizat pentru condiții cu resurse reduse îmbunătățește calitatea traducerii cu până la 7,3 puncte BLEU comparativ cu utilizarea setărilor implicite Transformer.', 'si': 'භාෂාව සමාන්\u200dය තොරතුරු සමාන්\u200dය තොරතුරු සමග භාෂාව, අඩුම භාෂාවක් කියලා දන්නවා, න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් අ වෙනස් කරණාකරණය මදුල්ය විශේෂ විශේෂ විස්තරයක් ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තර වෙලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඒකේ අඩුම අපේ පරීක්ෂණය IWSLT14 ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා දත්තයේ වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අඩුම සම්බන්ධ අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂය 7.3 BLUE අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Språkpar med begränsade mängder parallella data, även kända som lågresursspråk, förblir en utmaning för neural maskinöversättning. Transformer-modellen har uppnått betydande förbättringar för många språkpar och har blivit de facto mainstream-arkitekturen, men dess kapacitet under lågresursförhållanden har ännu inte undersökts fullt ut. Våra experiment på olika delmängder av IWSLT14 träningsdata visar att Transformers effektivitet under låga resursförhållanden är starkt beroende av hyperparameternas inställningar. Våra experiment visar att användningen av en optimerad Transformer för låga resursförhållanden förbättrar översättningskvaliteten upp till 7,3 BLEU-punkter jämfört med att använda Transformers standardinställningar.', 'so': 'Luqada labada nooc oo ku qoran tiro lambaro ah, oo sidoo kale loo yaqaan luqadaha hoose-resource, waxay ku jiraan dhibaato turjuma machine neural. Intii uu sameynta turjumista u helay hagaajinta aad u weyn ee labo badan oo luuqad ah, isla markaasna uu noqday dhismaha ugu horeeya, awooddiisa ka hoosaysa xaaladaha hoose-nololeed weli lama baarayn. Imtixaanadayada ku saabsan kooxo kala duduwan ee IWSLT14 data waxbarashada waxay muuqataa in effektada tartanka hoose-resource ay aad ugu xiran tahay xarunta hyper-parameter. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in lagu isticmaalayo turjubaanka hoose-resourceedka uu kordhiyo qiimaha turjumaadda ilaa 7.3 BLEU barbarka isticmaalka midowga hore.', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகள் என்றும் அறியப்பட்ட இணைப்பு தரவுகளுடன் மொழி ஜோடி ஜோடிகள், புதிய இயந்திரத் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு  மாற்றும் மாதிரி மாதிரி பல மொழி ஜோடிகளுக்கு மிக முன்னேற்றங்கள் பெற்றுள்ளார்கள் மற்றும் அது காரணி முக்கியமான கட்டுப்பாட்டிலாகி விட் IWSLT14 பயிற்சி தரவுகளின் வேறு வகுப்புகளில் எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது குறைந்த மூலத்தின் நிலைகளில் மாற்றும் விளைவு மேலும் அள எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கு ஒரு மாற்று மாற்றியமைக்கப்பட்ட மாற்றியமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரம் 7. 3 ப', 'ur': 'زبان جوڑے جو مقدار مقدار کے اندازے پارالی ڈاٹ کے ساتھ ہیں، اور نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے بھی پڑھے جاتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ ترنسفور موڈل بہت سی زبان جوڑوں کے لئے بہت اچھے سوداگری حاصل کئے گئے ہیں اور وہ دفعہ میں اصلی معماری معماری بنیاد ہوگئے ہیں، اس کی قابلیت کم منبع شرایط کے اندر ابھی پوری تحقیق نہیں کی گئی ہے. ہمارے آزمائش IWSLT14 ٹرینگ ڈیٹا کے مختلف سوسٹوں کے بارے میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ کم سوسٹر شرایط کے اندر ترنسفور کا فعالیت بہت زیادہ پارامیٹ سیٹیوں پر اعتبار ہے. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ کم رسسور شرایط کے لئے ایک اچھی ترنسفور کے استعمال سے ترنسوٹ کیفیٹ 7.3 BLEU پوینٹوں تک مزید ترنسوٹ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Va Transfer modeli ko'pchilik tilning ko'pchilik qo'llari uchun juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishga erishildi va bu faqat asosiy direktoriyasi bo'lgan paytda, bu imkoniyatlarning qidirish imkoniyatlarini juda tez qilmaydi. Our experiments on different subsets of the IWSLT14 training data show that the effectiveness of Transformer under low-resource conditions is highly dependent on the hyper-parameter settings.  Bizning imtiyozlarimizni ko'rsatadi, kichkina resource holatida o'zgarishni ko'rsatish mumkin, Transformer Andoza moslamalardan foydalanish bilan tarjima qiymatini 7.3 BLEU notiga oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ liên kết với một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu song song song, còn được biết đến là ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên, vẫn là thách thức cho dịch thiết bị thần kinh. Mặc dù mô hình transformer đã đạt tới cải tiến đáng kể cho nhiều cặp ngôn ngữ và đã trở thành một kiến trúc chính thống, nhưng khả năng của nó dưới những điều kiện ít tài nguyên chưa được nghiên cứu đầy đủ. Các thí nghiệm trên các nhóm khác nhau của dữ liệu huấn luyện IWSLT14 cho thấy hiệu quả của Transformer trong những điều kiện có nguồn tài nguyên thấp phụ thuộc vào thiết lập siêu việt. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng sử dụng một transformer tối ưu cho các điều kiện có ít tài nguyên cải thiện chất lượng dịch lên tới 7', 'bg': 'Езиковите двойки с ограничено количество паралелни данни, известни още като езици с нисък ресурс, остават предизвикателство за невронния машинен превод. Макар моделът на трансформатора да е постигнал значителни подобрения за много езикови двойки и да се е превърнал в де факто основната архитектура, способността му при условия с ниски ресурси все още не е напълно проучена. Нашите експерименти с различни подгрупи от данните за обучение показват, че ефективността на трансформатора при условия с нисък ресурс е силно зависима от настройките на хиперпараметрите. Нашите експерименти показват, че използването на оптимизиран трансформатор за условия с ниски ресурси подобрява качеството на превода до 7,3 точки в сравнение с използването на настройките по подразбиране на трансформатора.', 'da': 'Sprogpar med begrænsede mængder parallelle data, også kendt som lav ressource sprog, forbliver en udfordring for neural maskinoversættelse. Selvom Transformer-modellen har opnået betydelige forbedringer for mange sprogpar og er blevet den de facto mainstream arkitektur, er dens evne under lav ressource forhold ikke blevet fuldt undersøgt endnu. Vores eksperimenter med forskellige delmængder af IWSLT14 træningsdata viser, at effektiviteten af Transformer under lav ressource forhold er meget afhængig af hyper-parameterindstillingerne. Vores eksperimenter viser, at brugen af en optimeret Transformer til forhold med lave ressourcer forbedrer oversættelseskvaliteten op til 7,3 BLEU-point sammenlignet med brugen af Transformers standardindstillinger.', 'hr': 'Jazički parovi s ograničenim količinama paralelnih podataka, također poznatih kao jezici niskih resursa, ostaju izazov za prevod neuralnih strojeva. Iako je model transformera postigao značajne poboljšanje za mnoge jezičke parove i postao de facto glavna arhitektura, njegova sposobnost pod uvjetima niskih resursa još nije potpuno istražena. Naši eksperimenti na različitim podskicama podataka o obuci IWSLT14 pokazuju da je učinkovitost transformera u području niskih resursa vrlo zavisna od postavljanja hiper-parametara. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da korištenje optimiziranog transformera za uslove niskog resursa poboljšava kvalitet prevođenja do 7,3 BLEU to čka u usporedbi s korištenjem standardnih postavljanja Transformera.', 'nl': 'Taalparen met beperkte hoeveelheden parallelle gegevens, ook bekend als low-resource talen, blijven een uitdaging voor neurale machinevertaling. Hoewel het Transformer model aanzienlijke verbeteringen heeft bereikt voor veel taalparen en de facto de mainstream architectuur is geworden, is de capaciteit ervan onder lage resource omstandigheden nog niet volledig onderzocht. Onze experimenten met verschillende subsets van de IWSLT14 trainingsgegevens tonen aan dat de effectiviteit van Transformer onder lage resource omstandigheden sterk afhankelijk is van de hyper-parameter instellingen. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat het gebruik van een geoptimaliseerde Transformer voor omstandigheden met weinig resources de vertaalkwaliteit tot 7.3 BLEU-punten verbetert in vergelijking met het gebruik van de standaardinstellingen van Transformer.', 'de': 'Sprachpaare mit begrenzten Mengen an parallelen Daten, auch bekannt als ressourcenarme Sprachen, bleiben eine Herausforderung für die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung. Während das Transformer-Modell für viele Sprachpaare signifikante Verbesserungen erzielt hat und sich de facto zur Mainstream-Architektur entwickelt hat, ist seine Fähigkeit unter ressourcenarmen Bedingungen noch nicht vollständig untersucht worden. Unsere Experimente an verschiedenen Teilmengen der IWSLT14 Trainingsdaten zeigen, dass die Effektivität des Transformers unter ressourcenarmen Bedingungen stark von den Hyperparametereinstellungen abhängt. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die Verwendung eines optimierten Transformers für ressourcenarme Bedingungen die Übersetzungsqualität bis zu 7.3 BLEU-Punkte im Vergleich zur Verwendung der Transformer-Standardeinstellungen verbessert.', 'id': 'Pasangan bahasa dengan jumlah terbatas data paralel, juga dikenal sebagai bahasa sumber daya rendah, tetap tantangan untuk terjemahan mesin saraf. Sementara model Transformer telah mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan untuk banyak pasangan bahasa dan telah menjadi arsitektur de facto mainstream, kemampuannya di bawah kondisi sumber daya rendah belum menyelidiki sepenuhnya. Eksperimen kami pada subset yang berbeda dari data latihan IWSLT14 menunjukkan bahwa efektif Transformer dalam kondisi sumber daya rendah sangat tergantung pada pengaturan hyper-parameter. Our experiments show that using an optimized Transformer for low-resource conditions improves the translation quality up to 7.3 BLEU points compared to using the Transformer default settings.', 'fa': 'جفت زبان با تعداد محدودیت داده\u200cهای متفاوتی، همچنین به عنوان زبانهای کم منبع شناخته می\u200cشود، چالش برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی باقی ماند. در حالی که مدل تغییر دهنده برای جفت های زبانی بسیار زیادی به دست آورده است و در واقع معماری اصلی تبدیل شده است، توانایی آن تحت شرایط کم منابع هنوز کاملا تحقیق نشده است. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در زیر زیر زیر آموزش داده\u200cهای آموزش IWSLT14 نشان می\u200cدهند که فعالیت تغییر\u200cدهنده در شرایط کم منابع بسیار بستگی به تنظیمات پارامتر است. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که با استفاده از یک تغییر\u200cدهنده optimized برای شرایط منابع کم، کیفیت ترجمه را تا 7.3 امتیاز BLEU در مقایسه با استفاده از تنظیمات پیش\u200cفرض تغییر\u200cدهنده بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '유한한 병행 데이터를 가진 언어는 저자원 언어라고도 불리며 여전히 신경기계 번역의 도전이다.Transformer모델은 많은 언어의 측면에서 중대한 개선을 얻었고 사실상 주류 체계 구조가 되었지만 낮은 자원 조건에서의 능력은 아직 충분한 연구를 받지 못했다.IWSLT14 훈련 데이터의 서로 다른 서브집합에서의 실험에 의하면 변압기가 낮은 자원 조건에서의 유효성은 초파라미터 설정에 고도로 의존한다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리의 실험은 Transformer의 기본 설정을 사용하는 것보다 낮은 자원 조건에서 최적화된 Transformer를 사용하면 번역의 질을 7.3 BLEU 포인트 높일 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Wanaume wa lugha wenye idadi kubwa ya data zilizofanana, pia zinazojulikana kama lugha ndogo ya rasilimali, bado wanabaki kuwa changamoto kwa kutafsiri mashine ya neura. Wakati modeli ya zamani imepata maboresho makubwa kwa wanaume wengi wa lugha na imekuwa ujenzi mkuu wa ukweli, uwezo wake chini ya mazingira ya rasilimali bado haujachunguzwa vizuri. Majaribio yetu katika vipande mbalimbali vya taarifa za mafunzo ya IWSLT14 yanaonyesha kuwa ufanisi wa Transfer chini ya mazingira ya rasilimali chini ni kutegemea sana na mazingira ya upasuaji. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa kwa kutumia Transfer bora kwa hali ya chini ya rasilimali inaboresha kiwango cha tafsiri hadi pointi 7.3 BLEU ukilinganishwa na kutumia mifumo ya zamani ya kizamani.', 'tr': 'Diller parallel sanlary bilen çarpylýan çykyşlar, hem iň az ressurs dilleri diýip bilinýär, näyral maşynyň terjimesi üçin kynçylyk bar. Transformer modeli köp dil çiftleriň üçin wajyp gelişmeleri başarmady we faýldan hem esasy arhitektura çevrildi, onuň iň az resurs şertleri altynda hiç haçan maslahat edilmedi. IWSLT14 öwrenme maglumatynyň farklı subüntlerinde çykyşlarymyz hiper-parameterler düzümlerinde täsirli transformer hasaplaryna baglanýandygyny görkezýär. Biziň deneylerimiz azak resurslar şartlary üçin optimiz terjimeçi ullanýan üýtgewçilik kwalitesini 7.3 BLEU aralygyna görä terjime etmek üçin ön bellenen düzümlerni çarpýar.', 'af': "Taal paar met beperkte hoeveelheid parallele data, ook bekend as lae hulpbron tale, bly 'n uitdaging vir neurale masjien vertaling. Terwyl die Transformer model betekende verbeteringe vir baie taal paar bereik het en die de facto onderstreem arkitektuur geword het, is sy kapasiteit onder lae hulpbron voorwaardes nog nie volledig ondersoek nie. Ons eksperimente op verskillende subartikels van die IWSLT14 oefening data vertoon dat die effektiviteit van Transformer onder lae- hulpbron voorwaardes is baie afhanklik op die hiper- parameter instellings. Ons eksperimente wys dat die gebruik van 'n optimaliseerde Transformer vir lae-hulpbron voorwaardes die vertaling kwaliteit verbeter tot 7.3 BLES punte vergelyk met die gebruik van die Transformer verstek instellings.", 'sq': 'Çiftet gjuhësh me sasi të kufizuara të dhënash paralele, të njohura gjithashtu si gjuhë me burime të ulëta, mbeten një sfidë për përkthimin nervor të makinave. Ndërsa modeli Transformer ka arritur përmirësime të rëndësishme për shumë çifte gjuhësh dhe është bërë arkitektura de facto kryesore, aftësia e tij në kushte me burime të ulëta nuk është hetuar ende plotësisht. Eksperimentet tona në nëngrupe të ndryshme të të dhënave të stërvitjes IWSLT14 tregojnë se efektshmëria e Transformer në kushte me burime të ulëta është shumë e varur nga rregullimet e hyperparametrave. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se përdorimi i një Transformer optimizuar për kushte me burime të ulta përmirëson cilësinë e përkthimit deri në 7.3 pikë BLEU krahasuar me përdorimin e rregullimeve të paracaktuara të Transformer.', 'am': 'ቋንቋ ሁለት ዓይነቶች በተለያዩ የዳታ አካል እና ትንሽ-resource ቋንቋዎች የሚታወቁ የናውሬል መሣሪያዎች ትርጉም መቀላቀል ይኖራሉ። የፊደል ሞዴል በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ዓይነቶች ላይ ትልቅ ማድረግ አግኝቷል፣ የውይይት መሠረታዊ መሠረት ሆኖአል፡፡ የIWSLT14 ትምህርት ዳታዎች በተለዩ ክፍሎች ላይ ፈተናዎቻችን ከታናሹ resource ክፍል በታች በሚያሳየው በhyper-parameter መጠቀሚያ ላይ የታመነ ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የተመረጠውን ትርጉም ለማድረግ ለታናሽ resource ጉዳይ በመጠቀም የትርጉም ጥያቄን ወደ 7.3 BLEU ነጥቦች ከማንበብ የተለየ የፊደል የነበረው ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեզվի զույգերը, որոնք ունեն սահմանափակ քանակությամբ զուգահեռ տվյալներ, որոնք նաև հայտնի են որպես ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուներ, շարունակում են մարտահրավեր նյարդային մեքենայի թա While the Transformer model has achieved significant improvements for many language pairs and has become the de facto mainstream architecture, its capability under low-resource conditions has not been fully investigated yet.  Our experiments on different subsets of the IWSLT14 training data show that the effectiveness of Transformer under low-resource conditions is highly dependent on the hyper-parameter settings.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ օգտագործելով օպտիմացված տրանսֆորմացիա ցածր ռեսուրսների պայմաններում բարելավում է թարգմանման որակը մինչև 7.3 կետ, համեմատած տրանսֆորմացիայի կանոնավոր կարգավոր', 'az': "Dil çiftləri, həmçinin düşük ressurs dilləri kimi də bildirilmiş paralel məlumatların sayısı ilə, nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün çətin qalır. Transformer modeli çox dil çift üçün möhkəm təmizlənəcək və de facto mainstream arhitektura dönüşmüş halda, onun düşük ressurs şartları altında yetkinlik hələ tamamilə araşdırılmamışdır. IWSLT14 təhsil məlumatının müxtəlif subgruplarında müxtəlif təhsil məlumatının təşkil etdiyimiz təcrübələrimiz aşağı ressurs şartları altında Transformer'ın etkinliğinin hiper-parametr ayarlarına çox bağlı olduğunu göstərir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, düşük ressurs şartları üçün optimizləndirilmiş Transformer vasitəsilə tərcüm keyfiyyətini 7,3 BLEU puçlarına qədər daha yaxşılaşdırır.", 'bn': 'ভাষার জোড়া যাদের সীমিত পরামিত তথ্যের সীমিত, যাদের নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য নির্বাচনের চ্যালেঞ্জ থাকে। অনেক ভাষার জোড়ার জন্য ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফার মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পেয়েছে এবং মূল প্রতিষ্ঠানে পরিণত হয়েছে, কিন্তু তার ক্ষমতা এখনো কম সম্পদের পরি আইউএসএলটি১৪ ট্রেনিং ডাটা নিয়ে আমাদের বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কম সম্পদের পরিস্থিতিতে ট্রান্সফার্নারের কার্যক্ আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ট্রান্সফার্ম ডিফল্ট বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহারের তুলনায় অনুবাদের মান ৭.', 'bs': 'Jazički parovi sa ograničenim količinama paralelnih podataka, također poznatih kao jezici niskih resursa, ostaju izazov za prevod neuralnih strojeva. Iako je model transformera postigao značajne poboljšanje za mnoge jezičke parove i postao de facto glavna arhitektura, njegova sposobnost pod uslovima niskog resursa još nije potpuno istražena. Naši eksperimenti na različitim podskicama podataka o obuci IWSLT14 pokazuju da je učinkovitost transformera pod uslovima niskog resursa veoma zavisna od postavljanja hiper-parametara. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da korištenje optimiziranog transformera za uslove niskih resursa poboljšava kvalitet prevoda do 7,3 BLEU bodova u usporedbi s korištenjem standardnih nastava transformera.', 'ca': "Els parells de llengües amb quantitats limitades de dades paralleles, també conegudes com llengües de baix recursos, siguen un repte per a la traducció neuromàtica. Mentre que el model Transformer ha aconseguit millores significatives per a molts parells de llengües i s'ha convertit en arquitectura de facto principal, la seva capacitat en condicions de baix recursos encara no ha estat investigada completament. Els nostres experiments en diversos subconjunts de les dades d'entrenament IWSLT14 mostren que l'eficacia de Transformer en condicions de baix recursos depèn molt dels paràmetres. Els nostres experiments demostren que l'ús d'un Transformer optimitzat per condicions de baix recursos millora la qualitat de traducció fins a 7,3 punts BLEU comparat amb l'ús de la configuració predeterminada Transformer.", 'cs': 'Jazykové páry s omezeným množstvím paralelních dat, známé také jako jazyky s nízkými zdroji, zůstávají výzvou pro neuronový strojový překlad. Zatímco model Transformer dosáhl významných zlepšení pro mnoho jazykových párů a stal se de facto mainstreamovou architekturou, jeho schopnost za nízkých zdrojů dosud nebyla plně zkoumána. Naše experimenty na různých podmnožinách tréninkových dat IWSLT14 ukazují, že efektivita Transformeru v podmínkách s nízkými zdroji je velmi závislá na nastavení hyperparametrů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že použití optimalizovaného transformátoru pro podmínky s nízkými zdroji zlepšuje kvalitu překladu až do 7,3 BLEU bodů ve srovnání s použitím výchozího nastavení transformátoru.', 'et': 'Piiratud hulga paralleelsete andmetega keelepaarid, mida tuntakse ka vähese ressursiga keeltena, on neuromasintõlke jaoks endiselt väljakutseks. Kuigi Transformeri mudel on saavutanud märkimisväärseid edusamme paljude keelepaaride jaoks ja muutunud de facto peaarhitektuuriks, ei ole selle võimekust vähese ressursi tingimustes veel täielikult uuritud. Meie eksperimendid IWSLT14 koolitusandmete erinevate alamkogumitega näitavad, et Transformeri efektiivsus vähese ressursi tingimustes sõltub suuresti hüperparameetri seadistustest. Meie katsed näitavad, et optimeeritud Transformeri kasutamine vähese ressursiga tingimustes parandab tõlkekvaliteeti kuni 7,3 BLEU punkti võrreldes Transformeri vaikeseadete kasutamisega.', 'fi': 'Kieliparit, joissa on rajallinen määrä rinnakkaista dataa, tunnetaan myös vähäresurssisina kielinä, ovat edelleen haaste neurokonekääntämiselle. Vaikka Transformer-malli on saavuttanut merkittäviä parannuksia monille kielipareille ja siitä on tullut de facto valtavirtaarkkitehtuuri, sen kykyä vähäresurssisissa olosuhteissa ei ole vielä täysin tutkittu. IWSLT14-harjoitusdatan eri osajoukoilla tehdyt kokeemme osoittavat, että Transformerin tehokkuus vähävaraisissa olosuhteissa riippuu suuresti hyperparametrien asetuksista. Kokeemme osoittavat, että optimoidun muuntajan käyttö vähävaraisissa olosuhteissa parantaa käännöslaatua jopa 7,3 BLEU-pistettä verrattuna muuntajan oletusasetuksiin.', 'jv': 'Piring sampeyan karo akeh tanggal dadi, akeh dumateng liyane karo perusahaan kelas-perusahaan, dadi kapan kanggo tarjamahan pirang maneh. layers-action Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan karo akeh sampeyan sak batar IWSLT14 data aturan nggawe barang nggawe Transformer dadi efek-perusahaan sing wis diputaaken karo perusahaan-parameter Where', 'ha': "@ action: button While the Transformer model has achieved significant improvements for many language pairs and has become the de facto mainstream architecture, its capability under low-resource conditions has not been fully investigated yet.  Kayan jarrabai masu cikin jama'a masu amfani da IWSLT14 sun nũna cewa aikin Transformer, a ƙarƙashin resource, yana mai girma, kan tsarin mafarin-parameter. Kayan jarrabõnmu suka nuna cewa, a yi amfani da wani Transformer wanda aka yi amfani da shi ga muhimman-resource, yana ƙari tsarin translation up to 7.3 BLEU points sami da ya yi amfani da tsarin Farawa na farko.", 'sk': 'Jezikovni pari z omejenimi količinami vzporednih podatkov, znani tudi kot jeziki z nizkimi viri, ostajajo izziv za nevronsko strojno prevajanje. Medtem ko je model Transformer dosegel znatne izboljšave za številne jezikovne pare in je postal de facto mainstream arhitektura, njegove zmogljivosti v pogojih z nizkimi viri še niso bile v celoti raziskane. Naši eksperimenti na različnih podskupinah podatkov o usposabljanju IWSLT14 kažejo, da je učinkovitost transformatorja v pogojih z nizkimi viri zelo odvisna od nastavitev hiperparametrov. Naši poskusi kažejo, da uporaba optimiziranega transformatorja za pogoje z nizkimi viri izboljša kakovost prevajanja do 7,3 točke BLEU v primerjavi z uporabo privzetih nastavitev transformatorja.', 'he': 'זוגות שפות עם כמויות מוגבלות של נתונים מקבילים, הידועות גם בשפות משאבים נמוכות, נשארות אתגר לתרגום מכונות עצביות. למרות שהמודל הטרנספורטר השיג שיפורים משמעותיים עבור זוגות שפות רבות והפך לארכיטקטורה המרכזית de facto, היכולת שלו תחת תנאי משאבים נמוכים עדיין לא נחקרה לחלוטין. הניסויים שלנו על תת-קבוצות שונות של נתוני האימון IWSLT14 מראים שהיעילות של Transformer תחת תנאי משאבים נמוכים תלוי במיוחד על ההיפר-פארמטרים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהשימוש במעבר אופטימי לתנאי משאבים נמוכים משפר את איכות התרגום עד 7.3 נקודות BLEU בהשוואה לשימוש בתנאי הפרטים של Transformer.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག རྩིས་བརྗོད་མིའི་མ་དབུགས་དེ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཆ་ཤས་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡང་དང་ཡང་གནས་སྟངས་གཞི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་ Our experiments on different subsets of the IWSLT14 training data show that the effectiveness of Transformer under low-resource conditions is highly dependent on the hyper-parameter settings. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉུང་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ཞིག་བེད'}
{'en': 'Towards the First Machine Translation System for Sumerian Transliterations', 'ar': 'نحو أول نظام ترجمة آلية للترجمات الصوتية السومرية', 'fr': 'Vers le premier système de traduction automatique pour les translittérations sumériennes', 'pt': 'Rumo ao primeiro sistema de tradução automática para transliterações sumérias', 'es': 'Hacia el primer sistema de traducción automática para transliteraciones sumerias', 'ja': 'シュメール語翻訳のための最初の機械翻訳システムに向けて', 'ru': 'На пути к первой системе машинного перевода для шумерских транслитераций', 'zh': '迈向首用苏美尔语音译者机器翻译统', 'hi': 'सुमेरियन लिप्यंतरण के लिए पहली मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली की ओर', 'ga': "I dTreo an Chéad Chórais Aistriúcháin Inneall d'Aistriúcháin Sumerian", 'ka': 'პირველი მაქსინური თავისტრანსლიტაციის სისტემაში', 'hu': 'Az első gépi fordítási rendszer felé a sumér transzlitterációkhoz', 'it': 'Verso il primo sistema di traduzione automatica per le traslitterazioni sumere', 'kk': 'Сумерияның алғашқы аудару жүйесіне қарсы', 'lt': 'Towards the First Machine Translation System for Sumerian Transliterations', 'mk': 'За првиот машински преведувачки систем за сумерски транслитерации', 'ml': 'സുമേറിയന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ആദ്യത്തെ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റം മുകളിലേക്കു്', 'ms': 'Menuju Sistem Terjemahan Mesin Pertama untuk Transliterasi Sumerian', 'mt': 'Lejn l-Ewwel Sistema ta’ Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju għat-Trasliterazzjonijiet Sumeriani', 'mn': 'Сумерийн транслитерийн анхны машины хөгжүүлэх систем руу', 'no': 'Gå til første maskinsomsetjingssystemet for sumeriske transliterasjonar', 'pl': 'W kierunku pierwszego systemu tłumaczenia maszynowego dla transliteracji sumerskich', 'ro': 'Către primul sistem de traducere automată pentru transliterările sumeriene', 'sr': 'Prema prvom sistemu prevoda mašine za sumerijske transliteracije', 'el': 'Προς το πρώτο σύστημα μηχανικής μετάφρασης για σουμερικές μεταγραφές', 'sv': 'Mot det f철rsta maskin철vers채ttningssystemet f철r sumeriska 철vers채ttningar', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளுக்கான முதல் இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்புக்கு மேல்', 'si': 'සුමෙරියාන් වාර්ථාපනය සඳහා පළමු මැෂින් වාර්ථාපනය පද්ධතියට', 'so': 'Towards the First Machine Translation System for Sumerian Translation', 'ur': 'سوmerian Transliterations کے لئے پہلی ماشین ترجمن سیسٹم کی طرف', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Hướng tới Hệ thống dịch cỗ máy đầu tiên cho kinh Koran', 'bg': 'Към първата система за машинен превод за шумерски транслитерации', 'da': 'På vej mod det første maskinoversættelsessystem for sumeriske oversættelser', 'nl': 'Naar het eerste machinevertaalsysteem voor Soemerische transliteraties', 'hr': 'Prema prvom sustavu prevoda stroja za sumerijske transliteracije', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zum ersten maschinellen Übersetzungssystem für sumerische Transliterationen', 'id': 'Menuju Sistem Transliasi Mesin Pertama untuk Transliterasi Sumeria', 'fa': 'به سمت اولین سیستم ترجمه ماشین برای ترجمه\u200cهای سومری', 'ko': '첫번째 수메르', 'sq': 'Në drejtim të Sistemit të Parë të Përkthimit të Makinës për Transliteracionet Sumeriane', 'sw': 'Mpaka Mfumo wa Tafsiri wa Kikundi cha kwanza', 'af': 'Gaan na die eerste masjien vertaling stelsel vir Sumeriese Transliterasies', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Sumeriýan terjimeleri üçin Ilkinji Maşynyň terjime sistemine ýol', 'hy': 'Առաջին մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգը սումերիական թարգմանությունների համար', 'az': 'Sumeri t톛krarlar캼 칲칞칲n ilk ma코in t톛krarlama sistemin톛 t톛r톛f', 'bs': 'Prema prvom sistemu prevoda mašine za sumerijske transliteracije', 'ca': 'Towards the First Machine Translation System for Sumerian Transliterations', 'bn': 'সুমেরিয়ান অনুবাদের জন্য প্রথম মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম', 'cs': 'Směrem k prvnímu strojovému překladu sumerských transliterací', 'fi': 'Kohti ensimmäistä sumeriankielistä käännösjärjestelmää', 'et': 'Esimese sumeri tõlkesüsteemi suunas', 'he': 'לכיוון מערכת התרגום הראשונה של מכונות לטרנסליטרציה סומרית', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Panjenengan Sistem Terjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan Sumeran', 'sk': 'Proti prvemu sistemu strojnega prevajanja sumerskih prevajanj', 'bo': 'སུ་མེ་རིའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་འཛུལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཚིག་རྒྱུན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲོས་'}
{'en': 'The Sumerian cuneiform script was invented more than 5,000 years ago and represents one of the oldest in history. We present the first attempt to translate Sumerian texts into English automatically. We publicly release high-quality corpora for standardized training and evaluation and report results on experiments with supervised, phrase-based, and transfer learning techniques for machine translation. Quantitative and qualitative evaluations indicate the usefulness of the translations. Our proposed methodology provides a broader audience of researchers with novel access to the data, accelerates the costly and time-consuming manual translation process, and helps them better explore the relationships between Sumerian cuneiform and Mesopotamian culture.', 'ar': 'تم اختراع الكتابة المسمارية السومرية منذ أكثر من 5000 عام وتمثل واحدة من أقدم النصوص المسمارية في التاريخ. نقدم المحاولة الأولى لترجمة النصوص السومرية إلى اللغة الإنجليزية تلقائيًا. نصدر علنًا مجموعات عالية الجودة للتدريب والتقييم الموحد ونبلغ عن نتائج التجارب باستخدام تقنيات التعلم الخاضعة للإشراف والقائمة على العبارات ونقلها للترجمة الآلية. تشير التقييمات الكمية والنوعية إلى فائدة الترجمات. توفر منهجيتنا المقترحة لجمهور أوسع من الباحثين إمكانية وصول جديدة إلى البيانات ، وتسريع عملية الترجمة اليدوية المكلفة والمستهلكة للوقت ، وتساعدهم على استكشاف العلاقات بين الكتابة المسمارية السومرية وثقافة بلاد ما بين النهرين بشكل أفضل.', 'es': 'La escritura cuneiforme sumeria se inventó hace más de 5.000 años y representa una de las más antiguas de la historia. Presentamos el primer intento de traducir automáticamente textos sumerios al inglés. Publicamos corpora de alta calidad para la capacitación y evaluación estandarizadas e informamos los resultados de experimentos con técnicas de aprendizaje supervisadas, basadas en frases y de transferencia para la traducción automática. Las evaluaciones cuantitativas y cualitativas indican la utilidad de las traducciones. Nuestra metodología propuesta proporciona a un público más amplio de investigadores un acceso novedoso a los datos, acelera el costoso y lento proceso de traducción manual y les ayuda a explorar mejor las relaciones entre la cultura cuneiforme sumeria y la cultura mesopotámica.', 'fr': "L'écriture cunéiforme sumérienne a été inventée il y a plus de 5 000 ans et représente l'une des plus anciennes de l'histoire. Nous présentons la première tentative de traduction automatique de textes sumériens en anglais. Nous publions des corpus de haute qualité pour la formation et l'évaluation standardisées et nous rendons compte des résultats d'expériences avec des techniques d'apprentissage supervisées, basées sur des phrases et par transfert pour la traduction automatique. Les évaluations quantitatives et qualitatives indiquent l'utilité des traductions. La méthodologie que nous proposons fournit à un public plus large de chercheurs un accès novateur aux données, accélère le processus de traduction manuelle coûteux et leur permet de mieux explorer les relations entre le cunéiforme sumérien et la culture mésopotamienne.", 'pt': 'A escrita cuneiforme suméria foi inventada há mais de 5.000 anos e representa uma das mais antigas da história. Apresentamos a primeira tentativa de tradução automática de textos sumérios para o inglês. Publicamos corpora de alta qualidade para treinamento e avaliação padronizados e relatamos resultados de experimentos com técnicas de aprendizado supervisionado, baseado em frases e de transferência para tradução automática. Avaliações quantitativas e qualitativas indicam a utilidade das traduções. Nossa metodologia proposta fornece a um público mais amplo de pesquisadores um novo acesso aos dados, acelera o processo de tradução manual caro e demorado e os ajuda a explorar melhor as relações entre a cultura cuneiforme suméria e a cultura mesopotâmica.', 'ja': 'シュメールの楔形文字は5000年以上前に発明され、歴史上最も古い文字の1つを表しています。シュメール語のテキストを自動的に英語に翻訳する最初の試みを紹介します。標準化されたトレーニングと評価のための高品質なコーポラを公開し、機械翻訳のための監視、フレーズベース、および転送学習技術を使用した実験の結果を報告します。定量的および定性的評価は、翻訳の有用性を示している。私たちの提案された方法論は、データへの新規アクセスを提供し、費用と時間のかかる手動翻訳プロセスを加速し、シュメールの楔形文字文化とメソポタミアの文化の関係をよりよく探求するのに役立ちます。', 'zh': '苏美尔楔形文字发明于5000数年前,最为古文。 展将苏美尔文本自翻译成英语初试。 明发标准化培训估之高质量语料库,而告以监督、基于短语、移学之机器翻译实验。 量定性论明译者有用性。 臣等广加访问,速其手动耗时,助其探索苏美尔楔形文字美索不达米亚文化之际。', 'ru': 'Шумерская клинопись была изобретена более 5000 лет назад и является одной из старейших в истории. Мы представляем первую попытку автоматического перевода шумерских текстов на английский язык. Мы публично выпускаем высококачественные корпуса для стандартизированного обучения и оценки и сообщаем результаты экспериментов с контролируемыми, основанными на фразе и передающими методами обучения для машинного перевода. Количественные и качественные оценки указывают на полезность переводов. Наша предлагаемая методология обеспечивает более широкую аудиторию исследователей с романным доступом к данным, ускоряет дорогостоящий и трудоемкий процесс ручного перевода и помогает им лучше исследовать отношения между шумерской клинописью и месопотамской культурой.', 'hi': 'सुमेरियन क्यूनिफॉर्म लिपि का आविष्कार 5,000 से अधिक साल पहले किया गया था और यह इतिहास में सबसे पुराने में से एक का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। हम सुमेरियन ग्रंथों को स्वचालित रूप से अंग्रेजी में अनुवाद करने का पहला प्रयास प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम सार्वजनिक रूप से मानकीकृत प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन के लिए उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले निगम को जारी करते हैं और मशीन अनुवाद के लिए पर्यवेक्षित, वाक्यांश-आधारित और स्थानांतरण सीखने की तकनीकों के साथ प्रयोगों पर परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। मात्रात्मक और गुणात्मक मूल्यांकन अनुवादों की उपयोगिता को इंगित करते हैं। हमारी प्रस्तावित पद्धति डेटा तक उपन्यास पहुंच के साथ शोधकर्ताओं के व्यापक दर्शकों को प्रदान करती है, महंगी और समय लेने वाली मैनुअल अनुवाद प्रक्रिया को तेज करती है, और उन्हें सुमेरियन क्यूनिफॉर्म और मेसोपोटामियाई संस्कृति के बीच संबंधों का बेहतर पता लगाने में मदद करती है।', 'ga': 'Ceapadh an script cuneiform Sumerian níos mó ná 5,000 bliain ó shin agus is ionann é agus ceann de na cinn is sine sa stair. Cuirimid i láthair an chéad iarracht chun téacsanna Sumerian a aistriú go Béarla go huathoibríoch. Eisímid go poiblí corpora ardchaighdeáin le haghaidh oiliúna agus meastóireachta caighdeánaithe agus tuairiscímid torthaí ar thurgnaimh le teicnící maoirsithe, frása-bhunaithe agus foghlama aistrithe le haghaidh aistriúcháin mheaisín. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí cainníochtúla agus cáilíochtúla úsáideacht na n-aistriúchán. Soláthraíonn ár modheolaíocht atá beartaithe rochtain nua ar na sonraí do lucht éisteachta níos leithne taighdeoirí, luasaíonn sé an próiseas aistrithe láimhe costasach agus am-íditheach, agus cabhraíonn sé leo iniúchadh níos fearr a dhéanamh ar na caidrimh idir cuneiform Sumerian agus an cultúr Mesopotamian.', 'hu': 'A sumér cuneiform írást több mint 5000 évvel ezelőtt találták fel, és a történelem egyik legrégebbi könyve. Bemutatjuk az első kísérletet a sumír szövegek automatikus angolra történő fordítására. Nyilvánosan kiadjuk a kiváló minőségű corporákat szabványosított képzéshez és értékeléshez, és jelentjük az eredményeket a felügyelt, kifejezésalapú és transzfer tanulási technikákkal a gépi fordításhoz. Mennyiségi és minőségi értékelések mutatják a fordítások hasznosságát. Javasolt módszertanunk új hozzáférést biztosít a kutatók számára az adatokhoz, felgyorsítja a költséges és időigényes manuális fordítási folyamatot, és segít nekik jobban feltárni a sumér cuneiform és a mezopotámiai kultúra közötti kapcsolatokat.', 'el': 'Η σουμερική κιβωνική γραφή εφευρέθηκε πριν από πέντε.000 χρόνια και αντιπροσωπεύει ένα από τα παλαιότερα στην ιστορία. Παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη προσπάθεια αυτόματης μετάφρασης σουμερικών κειμένων στα αγγλικά. Δημοσιεύουμε δημόσια σώματα υψηλής ποιότητας για τυποποιημένη εκπαίδευση και αξιολόγηση και αναφέρουμε αποτελέσματα πειραμάτων με εποπτευμένες τεχνικές μάθησης, βασισμένες σε φράσεις και μεταφορές για μηχανική μετάφραση. Ποσοτικές και ποιοτικές αξιολογήσεις δείχνουν τη χρησιμότητα των μεταφράσεων. Η προτεινόμενη μεθοδολογία παρέχει σε ένα ευρύτερο κοινό ερευνητών νέα πρόσβαση στα δεδομένα, επιταχύνει την δαπανηρή και χρονοβόρα διαδικασία χειροκίνητης μετάφρασης και τους βοηθά να διερευνήσουν καλύτερα τις σχέσεις μεταξύ της σουμερικής κωνοειδούς και της Μεσοποταμίας κουλτούρας.', 'ka': 'бғҹбғЎбғӣбғ•бғһбғ—ВЈбғҗбғңбғҹбғҷбғ— бғҷбғЎбғңбғ—бғўбғІбғһбғӣбғҗ бғҹбғҷбғһбғ—бғқбғ\xa0 бғ‘бғ•бғҘбғ• бғ—бғұбғӣбғ—бғҹбғҡбғ•бғң бғқбғІбғ’бғ•ВҚбғ• бғІбғ\xa0 5000 бғ“бғІбғ”бғ—бғңбғ— бғқбғһбғ•бғ”бғ— бғ— бғқбғһбғ•бғ”бғҹбғ\xa0бғҗбғ’бғЎбғ’бғҗ бғ•бғ”бғ•бғң бғІбғ\xa0 бғңбғҗбғҳ-бғҹбғ\xa0бғҗбғһбғ—бғІбғ\xa0 бғ—бғҹбғ\xa0бғІбғһбғ—ВЈбғҗ. бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғһбғҳбғ\xa0бғ•бғ”бғҡбғҳ бғӣбғқбғӘбғ“бғҳбғҡбғқбғ‘бғҗ бғЎбғЈбғӣбғ”бғ\xa0бғҳбғҳбғЎ бғўбғ”бғҘбғЎбғўбғҳбғЎ бғҗбғ•бғўбғқбғӣбғҗбғўбғЈбғ\xa0бғҗбғ“ бғҳбғңбғ’бғҡбғҳбғЎбғЈбғ\xa0бғҗбғ“ бғ’бғҗбғ“бғҗбғўбғ•бғҳбғ\xa0бғ—бғ•бғҗбғЎ. бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғЎбғҗбғ®бғ”бғҡбғЎбғҗбғ¬бғ”бғ\xa0бғқбғ“ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғҷбғҗбғ\xa0бғ’бғҗбғҡбғҳбғўбғҳбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғҷбғқбғһбғқбғ\xa0бғҗбғӘбғҳбғҗбғЎ бғЎбғўбғҗбғңбғ“бғҗбғ\xa0бғўбғҳбғ–бғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳ бғ’бғҗбғңбғҗбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎбғ—бғ•бғҳбғЎ бғ“бғҗ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎбғ—бғ•бғҳбғЎ бғЁбғ”бғӣбғ“бғ”бғ’ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғҗ бғ“бғҗ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎбғ—бғ•бғҳбғЎ бғ”бғҘбғЎбғһбғ”бғ\xa0бғҳбғӣбғ”бғңбғўбғ”бғ‘бғ–бғ”, бғ\xa0бғқ бғҷбғ•бғҗбғңбғўбғҳбғўбғҳбғўбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғ“бғҗ бғҷбғ•бғҗбғҡбғҳбғўбғҗбғўбғҳбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғ’бғҗбғңбғЎбғҗбғ–бғҰбғ•бғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғ’бғҗбғңбғЎбғҗбғ–бғҰбғ•бғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғЎ бғЁбғ”бғЎбғҗбғ«бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғ”бғҡбғқбғ‘бғҗбғЎ. бғ©бғ•бғ”бғңбғҳ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғ’бғ\xa0бғҗбғӣбғҳбғЎ бғӣбғ”бғўбғқбғҡбғқбғ’бғҳбғҗ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғ“бғҳбғ“бғҳ бғҗбғЈбғ“бғҳбғЎбғўбғЈбғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғҗбғЈбғ“бғҳбғЎбғўбғЈбғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғҗбғЎ, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣбғ”бғҡбғҳбғӘ бғӣбғқбғңбғҗбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎбғ—бғ•бғҳбғЎ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғӘбғ”бғЎбғҳ, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣбғ”бғҡбғҳбғӘ бғЎбғҗбғҷбғЈбғ—бғҗбғ\xa0бғҳ бғӣбғқбғңбғҗбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎбғ—бғ•бғҳбғЎ бғ“бғҗбғҗбғ®бғҡбғқбғ‘бғҗбғЎ, бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғҰбғҳбғ\xa0бғҗбғ“ бғ“бғҗ бғ“бғ\xa0бғқбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғӘбғ”бғЎбғҳ, бғ“бғҗ бғӣбғҗбғ— бғЈ', 'it': "La scrittura cuneiforme sumera è stata inventata più di 5000 anni fa e rappresenta uno dei più antichi della storia. Presentiamo il primo tentativo di tradurre automaticamente i testi sumeri in inglese. Pubblichiamo corpora di alta qualità per la formazione e la valutazione standardizzate e riportiamo i risultati degli esperimenti con tecniche di apprendimento supervisionate, basate su frasi e trasferimento per la traduzione automatica. Valutazioni quantitative e qualitative indicano l'utilità delle traduzioni. La nostra metodologia proposta fornisce a un pubblico più ampio di ricercatori un nuovo accesso ai dati, accelera il costoso e dispendioso processo di traduzione manuale e li aiuta ad esplorare meglio le relazioni tra la cultura cuneiforme sumera e la cultura mesopotamica.", 'kk': 'Сумерияның пікір скрипті 5000 жылдан артық құрылды және тарихдағы ең ескіншісінің бірін көрсетеді. Біз Сумерияның мәтіндерін автоматты түрде ағылшын тіліне аудару әрекетін көрсетедік. Біз стандартты оқу мен оқу үшін көпшілікті сапатты корпораға көпшілік береміз және компьютердің аудару үшін тексерілген, фразаның негізінде және оқу технологияларына арналған экспе Көлемтік және сапатты оқиғалар аудармалардың пайдалығын көрсетеді. Біздің таңдалған методологиямыз, мәліметтерге жаңа қатынау арқылы зерттеушердің көңіл аудиториясын көмектеседі, ұзақ және уақытты қолмен аудару процесін көмектеседі, және оларды Сумерияның кунеформы мен Месопотамия мәдениетін', 'lt': 'Sumerijos cuneiforminis scenarijus buvo išrastas prieš daugiau kaip 5000 metų ir yra vienas iš seniausių istorijoje. Mes pristatome pirmąjį bandymą automatiškai išversti sumeriškų tekstų į anglų kalbą. Viešai išleidžiame aukštos kokybės korporas standartizuotam mokymui ir vertinimui ir teikiame ataskaitas apie eksperimentų su prižiūrimais, frazėmis pagrįstais ir perdavimo mokymosi metodais mašininiam vertimui rezultatus. Kiekybiniai ir kokybiniai vertinimai rodo vertimų naudingumą. Mūsų siūloma metodika suteikia platesnei mokslininkų auditorijai naują galimybę susipažinti su duomenimis, paspartina brangų ir ilgai trunkantį rankinio vertimo procesą ir padeda jiems geriau ištirti santykius tarp Sumerijos cuneiformos ir Mesopotamijos kultūros.', 'ms': 'Skrip cuneiform Sumeria dicipta lebih dari 5,000 tahun yang lalu dan mewakili salah satu yang paling tua dalam sejarah. Kami memperkenalkan cubaan pertama untuk menerjemahkan teks Sumerian ke Inggeris secara automatik. Kami secara awam melepaskan korpra kualiti tinggi untuk latihan dan penilaian standar dan laporan hasil eksperimen dengan teknik pembelajaran yang diawasi, berdasarkan frasa, dan pemindahan teknik pembelajaran untuk terjemahan mesin. Evaluasi kuantitatif dan kualitatif menunjukkan kegunaan terjemahan. Metodologi kami yang diusulkan menyediakan penonton yang lebih luas peneliti dengan akses baru kepada data, mempercepat proses terjemahan manual yang mahal dan memakan masa, dan membantu mereka mengeksplorasi lebih baik hubungan antara budaya cuneiform Sumeria dan Mesopotamia.', 'ml': 'സുമേരിയന്\u200d കിനീഫോം സ്ക്രിപ്റ്റ് 5,000 വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് കണ്ടെത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രായമാ സുമേരിയന്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്ക് വിവരിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യ ശ്രമം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ പരിശീലനത്തിനും പരിശീലനത്തിനും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവീകരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു, മെഷിന്\u200d പരിശീലനത് പരിഭാഷകളുടെ ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു. Our proposed methodology provides a broader audience of researchers with novel access to the data, accelerates the costly and time-consuming manual translation process, and helps them better explore the relationships between Sumerian cuneiform and Mesopotamian culture.', 'mk': 'The Sumerian cuneiform script was invented more than 5,000 years ago and represents one of the oldest in history.  Го претставуваме првиот обид да ги преведеме сумерските тексти на англиски автоматски. Јавно ослободуваме висококвалитетни корпора за стандардизирана обука и евалуација и известуваме за резултатите на експериментите со надгледувани, фрази-базирани и трансферентни техники на учење за машински превод. Квантитативните и квалитетните проценки покажуваат корисност на преведувањата. Нашата предложена методологија обезбедува поширока публика на истражувачи со нов пристап до податоците, го забрзува скапиот и временски процес на рачен превод и им помага подобро да ги истражуваат односите помеѓу сумерската кунефирма и мезопотамската култура.', 'mn': 'Сумерийн хуучин бичлэг 5,000 жилийн өмнө бүтээсэн бөгөөд түүхийн хамгийн хуучин нэгийг илэрхийлдэг. Бид Сумерийн текстүүдийг автоматаар Англи хэл рүү орлуулахын анхны хичээл үзүүлнэ. Бид нийтэд стандарт боловсрол, оюун санаанд өндөр чанартай корпора гаргаж, машины орчуулалтын туршилтын үр дүнг харуулж байна. Магадгүй, чанартай оюутнууд нь орчуулалтын хэрэгцээг харуулдаг. Бидний санал болгосон аргыг судлаачид мэдээллийн шинэ нэвтрэлтэй хандлагатай, үнэтэй, цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэдэг гарын хөрөнгө оруулалтын процессийг хурдан хурдан дамжуулдаг. Тэднийг Сумерийн куниформ болон Месопотамийн соёл хоорондын харилцааныг илүү судал', 'mt': 'L-iskript cuneiform Sumerian kien inventat aktar minn 5,000 sena ilu u jirrappreżenta wieħed mill-eqdem fl-istorja. Aħna nippreżentaw l-ewwel tentattiv biex it-testi Sumeriżi jiġu tradotti fl-Ingliż awtomatikament. Aħna nirrilaxxaw pubblikament korporazzjonijiet ta’ kwalità għolja għal taħriġ u evalwazzjoni standardizzati u nirrappurtaw riżultati dwar esperimenti b’tekniki ta’ tagħlim supervizzati, ibbażati fuq frażijiet, u trasferimenti għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna. Evalwazzjonijiet kwantitattivi u kwalitattivi jindikaw l-utilità tat-traduzzjonijiet. Il-metodoloġija proposta tagħna tipprovdi udjenza usa’ ta’ riċerkaturi b’a ċċess ġdid għad-dejta, taċċellera l-proċess ta’ traduzzjoni manwali li jiswa ħafna flus u jieħu ħafna ħin, u tgħinhom jesploraw aħjar ir-relazzjonijiet bejn il-kultura cuneiform Sumerian a u l-kultura Mesopotamiana.', 'no': 'Sumerisk cuneiform- skriptet ble oppretta fleire enn 5000 år sidan og representerer ein av dei eldste i historien. Vi viser den første prøva å omsetja Sumeriske tekstar til engelsk automatisk. Vi publiserer høg kvalitet korpora for standardiserte opplæring og evaluering og rapporterer resultat på eksperimenter med oversikte, frasebaserte og overføringstekningar for maskineoversettelse. Kvantitativ og kvalitativ evaluering tyder kor nyttig oversettelsane skal vere. Vårt foreslått metodologi gjev ei bredere publikum av forskere med novelt tilgang til dataene, akselererer den kostnadsverdien og tidsforberer manuelt oversettelseprosessen, og hjelper dei å betre utforske forholdet mellom Sumerianske kuneiform og Mesopotamianske kulturen.', 'ro': 'Scriptul cuneiform sumerian a fost inventat cu mai mult de 5000 de ani în urmă și reprezintă unul dintre cele mai vechi din istorie. Vă prezentăm prima încercare de traducere automată a textelor sumeriene în limba engleză. Oferim public corpore de înaltă calitate pentru instruire și evaluare standardizată și raportăm rezultatele experimentelor cu tehnici de învățare supravegheate, bazate pe fraze și transfer pentru traducerea automată. Evaluările cantitative și calitative indică utilitatea traducerilor. Metodologia propusă oferă un public mai larg de cercetători acces nou la date, accelerează procesul costisitor și consumator de timp de traducere manuală și îi ajută să exploreze mai bine relațiile dintre cuneiforma sumeriană și cultura mesopotamiană.', 'sr': 'Sumerijski cuneiform scenario je izumljen prije više od 5.000 godina i predstavlja jedan od najstarijih u istoriji. Predstavljamo prvi pokušaj da prevedemo sumerijske poruke na engleski automatski. Publično objavljujemo visokokvalitetnu korporaciju za standardizovanu obuku i procjenu i izvještavamo rezultate o eksperimentima s nadzornim, frazom baziranim i tehnikama za prevod mašine. Quantitativne i kvalitativne procjene ukazuju na korisnost prevoda. Naša predložena metodologija pruža širu publiku istraživača sa novim pristupom podacima, ubrzava koštan i vremenski proces manualnog prevoda, i pomaže im da bolje istražuju odnose između sumerijske kuæne forme i mesopotamijske kulture.', 'pl': 'Sumeryjskie pismo keyformowe zostało wynalezione ponad pięć tysięcy lat temu i stanowi jeden z najstarszych w historii. Prezentujemy pierwszą próbę automatycznego tłumaczenia tekstów sumeryjskich na język angielski. Publicznie publikujemy wysokiej jakości korpusy do standardowych szkoleń i oceny oraz raportujemy wyniki eksperymentów z nadzorowanymi, frazowymi i transferowymi technikami uczenia się maszynowego. Oceny ilościowe i jakościowe wskazują na przydatność tłumaczeń. Proponowana przez nas metodologia zapewnia szerszej grupie badaczy nowatorski dostęp do danych, przyspiesza kosztowny i czasochłonny proces tłumaczenia ręcznego oraz pomaga im lepiej zbadać relacje między sumeryjską kulistą a kulturą mezopotamii.', 'so': 'Qoraalka cuneiform ee Sumerian waxaa la abuurtay wax ka badan 5,000 sano kahor, wuxuuna representaa mid ka mid ah odayaashii taariikhda hore. Isticmaalka ugu horeeyay ee aan qoraalka Sumerian ugu turjumno Ingiriis si automatic ah. Waxaannu hadhuudhka u dirnaa shirkadda takhasuska sare si aan u baarayno waxbarashada iyo qiimeynta standardized, waxaana wargelinaynaa arimaha lagu qorayo imtixaanka lagu ilaaliyo, afka lagu soo jeedo, waxaana ku wareejinaynaa qalabka waxbarashada waxbarashada ee turjumidda machine. Qiimeynta qiimeynta iyo qiimeynta qiimeynta waxaa loola jeedaa faa’iidada turjumaadda. Dhakhtarkayaga la soo jeeday waxay fidiyaan dhegaysi ka sii ballaadhan baaritaanka baaritaanka macluumaadka, waxay sii kordhisaa tarjumaadka kharashka iyo wakhtiga isticmaalka gacanta, waxayna caawiyaan si wanaagsan u baaraandegista xiriirka kala dhexeeya dhaqanka Sumerian cuneiform iyo Mesopotamian.', 'ur': 'سوmerian cuneiform script was invented more than 5,000 years ago and represents one of the oldest in history. ہم پہلی کوشش کریں کہ سومری پیغام کو انگلیسی میں اتنا ہی ترجمہ کریں۔ ہم عمومی طور پر استاندارڈیزڈ تطارین اور ارزیابی کے لئے بالکل کیفیت کورپورا کو آزاد کریں اور مشین ترجمہ کے لئے تحقیق، فریز بنیاد اور ترجمہ کی تطاریق کے ذریعے ان آزمائش پر نتائج راپورت کریں۔ منطقی اور کیلوٹیٹیو ارزیابی ترجمہ کا فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں. ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ سے محققان کے زیادہ وسیع اخلاقین کو دیٹا کے لئے نو دسترسی دے رہی ہے، قیمت اور زمانہ مصرف کرنے والی مہمانی ترجمہ پرسس کو تیزی دیتا ہے، اور ان کو بہتر تحقیق کرنے کی مدد کرتا ہے سوmerian cuneiform اور Mesopotamian culture کے درمیان رابطہ کا تحقیق کرتا ہے.', 'si': 'සුමෙරියානු කුණිස්ක්\u200dරිප්ටය අවුරුදු 5000ක් කලින් හොයාගත්තා ඒ වගේම ඉතිහාසයේ ඉතිහාසයේ ඉතිහාසයේ ඉත අපි පළමු උත්සහ කරනවා සුමෙරියාන් පණිවිඩය ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් භාවිත කරන්න අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කාර්පෝරාව ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200d විශාල සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාව විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂකයන්ගේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලබාගන්නවා, දත්ත අතුරුද්ධ පරීක්ෂණය සමග සුමේරියාන් කුණු ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'sv': 'Det sumeriska cuneiformskriptet uppfanns för mer än 5000 år sedan och representerar ett av de äldsta i historien. Vi presenterar det första försöket att översätta sumeriska texter till engelska automatiskt. Vi publicerar offentligt högkvalitativa corpora för standardiserad utbildning och utvärdering och rapporterar resultat på experiment med övervakad, frasbaserad och överföringsinlärningsteknik för maskinöversättning. Kvantitativa och kvalitativa utvärderingar visar att översättningarna är användbara. Vår föreslagna metod ger en bredare publik forskare ny tillgång till data, påskyndar den kostsamma och tidskrävande manuella översättningsprocessen och hjälper dem att bättre utforska relationerna mellan sumerisk cuneiform och mesopotamisk kultur.', 'ta': 'சுமேரியன் குசிரிப்பு குறுநிரல் 5,000 ஆண்டுகளுக்கு முன்பு கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டது மற்றும் வரலாற்றில் பழைய ஒர We present the first attempt to translate Sumerian texts into English automatically.  நாங்கள் நிலைமைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பீடு மற்றும் அறிவிப்பு முடிவுகளை பொதுவாக வெளியிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் இயந்திரத் மொழ மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளின் பயன்பாட்டை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களுக்கு புதிய தகவல் அணுகலுடன் ஒரு விரிவான பார்வையை வழங்குகிறது, விலையான மற்றும் நேரம் பயன்படுத்தும் கைம', 'vi': 'The Sumer cuneiform Kịch bản được phát minh hơn 5,000 năm trước và đại diện cho một trong những chữ cổ xưa nhất lịch sử. Chúng tôi trình bày nỗ lực đầu tiên để tự động dịch văn bản Sumer thành tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi công khai phát hành hạ sĩ chất lượng cao cho huấn luyện và đánh giá tiêu chuẩn và báo cáo kết quả thử nghiệm với các thí nghiệm giám sát, từ điển, và chuyển tiếp các kỹ thuật học cho phiên dịch máy. Phân tích về mặt kĩ thuật và số lượng chỉ ra sự hữu ích của bản dịch. Phương pháp của chúng tôi đưa ra cho một số lượng lớn các nhà nghiên cứu mới có thể tiếp cận dữ liệu, tăng tốc độ tốn kém và tốn thời gian quá trình dịch chuyển bằng tay, và giúp họ khám phá tốt hơn các mối quan hệ giữa thần kinh lẫn tinh thần thượng và văn hóa Mesopotamian.', 'uz': "Name Biz Sumeriya matnlarini ingliz tilga avtomatik tarjima qilish uchun birinchi harakat qilamiz. Biz oddiy taʼminlovchi va qiymatlash uchun juda katta ta'lim kompaniyasini olib tashlamiz va o'qidirish uchun taʼminot natijalarini ajratuvchi va o'qituvchi, bir so'zlar asosida o'rganish va mashinaning tarjimalar uchun o'qituvchi teknikolarni tarjima qilamiz. Tafsilotlarning foydalanishini koʻrsatish. Bizning yaxshi usuli taʼminlovchilar maʼlumotga bog'liq murojaat qiladigan taʼminlovchilarga ko'proq taʼminlovchilarni beradi, qisqiylik va vaqt foydalanish vazifani tezlashtiradi, va ularga Sumeriya cuneiform va Mesopotamiya madaniyatning orasidagi munosabatlarni ajratishga yordam beradi.", 'bg': 'Шумерската кунеиформна писменост е измислена преди повече от 5000 години и представлява една от най-старите в историята. Представяме първия опит за автоматично превеждане на шумерски текстове на английски език. Публично публикуваме висококачествени корпуси за стандартизирано обучение и оценка и докладваме резултати от експерименти с контролирани, фразови и трансферни техники за машинен превод. Количествените и качествените оценки показват полезността на преводите. Нашата предложена методология осигурява на по-широка аудитория от изследователи нов достъп до данните, ускорява скъпия и отнемащ време процес на ръчни преводи и им помага да изследват по-добре връзките между шумерската кунеиформа и месопотамската култура.', 'da': 'Den sumeriske cuneiform skrift blev opfundet for mere end 5.000 år siden og repræsenterer en af de ældste i historien. Vi præsenterer det første forsøg på automatisk at oversætte sumeriske tekster til engelsk. Vi offentliggør corpora af høj kvalitet til standardiseret træning og evaluering og rapporterer resultater af eksperimenter med overvågede, sætningsbaserede og overførte læringsteknikker til maskinoversættelse. Kvantitative og kvalitative evalueringer viser nytten af oversættelserne. Vores foreslåede metode giver et bredere publikum af forskere ny adgang til dataene, accelererer den dyre og tidskrævende manuelle oversættelsesproces og hjælper dem med bedre at udforske forholdet mellem sumerisk cuneiform og mesopotamisk kultur.', 'nl': "Het Sumerische keilformschrift werd meer dan 5.000 jaar geleden uitgevonden en vertegenwoordigt een van de oudste in de geschiedenis. We presenteren de eerste poging om Soemerische teksten automatisch naar het Engels te vertalen. We publiceren publiekelijk hoogwaardige corpora's voor gestandaardiseerde training en evaluatie en rapporteren resultaten van experimenten met begeleide, zinnengebaseerde en transferleertechnieken voor machinevertaling. Kwantitatieve en kwalitatieve evaluaties wijzen op het nut van de vertalingen. Onze voorgestelde methodologie biedt een breder publiek van onderzoekers nieuwe toegang tot de gegevens, versnelt het kostbare en tijdrovende handmatige vertaalproces en helpt hen de relaties tussen Sumerische keilform en Mesopotamische cultuur beter te verkennen.", 'hr': 'Sumerijski cuneiform scenario je izumljen prije više od 5.000 godina i predstavlja jedan od najstarijih u povijesti. Predstavljamo prvi pokušaj prevoditi sumerijske tekste na engleski automatski. Publično objavljujemo visokokvalitetnu korporaciju za standardiziranu obuku i procjenu i izvještavamo rezultate o eksperimentima s nadzornim, frazom baziranim i tehnikama učenja za prevod strojeva. Quantitativne i kvalitativne procjene ukazuju na korisnost prevoda. Naša predložena metodika pruža širiju publiku istraživača s novim pristupom podacima, ubrzava skup i vremenski proces prijevoza i pomaže im bolje istraživati odnose između sumerijske cuneiform i Mesopotamijske kulture.', 'ko': '수미르 설형 문자는 5000여 년 전에 발명된 것으로 역사상 가장 오래된 문자 중의 하나이다.우리는 처음으로 수미르어 텍스트를 자동으로 영어로 번역하려고 시도했다.우리는 표준화 교육과 평가에 사용되는 고품질 어료 라이브러리를 공개적으로 발표하고 기계 번역의 감독, 짧은 말과 이동 학습 기술을 바탕으로 한 실험 결과를 보고한다.정량과 정성 평가는 번역의 유용성을 나타냈다.우리가 제시한 방법은 더욱 광범위한 연구자들에게 새로운 데이터 접근 경로를 제공하고 비싸고 소모되는 수동 번역 과정을 가속화하며 그들이 수미르 설형 문자와 메소포타미아 문화 간의 관계를 더욱 잘 탐색하도록 도와준다.', 'de': 'Die sumerische Keilschrift wurde vor mehr als 5.000 Jahren erfunden und stellt eine der ältesten in der Geschichte dar. Wir stellen den ersten Versuch vor, sumerische Texte automatisch ins Englische zu übersetzen. Wir veröffentlichen öffentlich hochwertige Korpora für standardisierte Schulungen und Evaluationen und berichten über Experimente mit überwachten, phrasenbasierten und transferbasierten Lerntechniken für maschinelle Übersetzung. Quantitative und qualitative Auswertungen weisen auf die Nützlichkeit der Übersetzungen hin. Unsere vorgeschlagene Methodik bietet einem breiteren Publikum von Forschern einen neuartigen Zugang zu den Daten, beschleunigt den kostspieligen und zeitraubenden manuellen Übersetzungsprozess und hilft ihnen, die Beziehungen zwischen sumerischer Keilform und mesopotamischer Kultur besser zu erforschen.', 'sw': 'Mandiko ya cuneiform ya Sumeria iliundwa zaidi ya miaka mitano,000 iliyopita na inawakilisha moja ya wazee katika historia. Tunawasilisha jaribio la kwanza la kutafsiri ujumbe wa Kisoma katika Kiingereza kwa manufaa. Tunaachia hadharani kampuni yenye kiwango cha juu kwa ajili ya mafunzo na uchunguzi na taarifa matokeo ya majaribio yanayofuatiliwa na utafiti wa maneno, na kuhamisha mbinu za kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine. Tathmini za kipaumbele na sifa zinaonyesha matumizi ya tafsiri. Utawala wetu unapendekezwa unawapa hadhira kubwa ya watafiti wenye upatikanaji wa kitabu cha habari, unaongezea mchakato wa kutafsiri gharama na matumizi ya muda wa kutumia manufaa, na kuwasaidia kutambua mahusiano yanayohusiana na utamaduni wa Kisumera na Kijumbe.', 'id': 'Skrip cuneiform Sumeria diciptakan lebih dari 5.000 tahun yang lalu dan mewakili salah satu yang paling tua dalam sejarah. Kami mempersembahkan percobaan pertama untuk menerjemahkan teks Sumerian ke Inggris secara otomatis. We publicly release high-quality corpora for standardized training and evaluation and report results on experiments with supervised, phrase-based, and transfer learning techniques for machine translation.  Evaluasi kualitatif dan kualitatif menunjukkan penggunaan dari terjemahan. Metodologi kami yang diusulkan menyediakan penonton yang lebih luas peneliti dengan akses baru ke data, mempercepat proses vertikal manual yang mahal dan memakan waktu, dan membantu mereka mengeksplorasi lebih baik hubungan antara budaya cuneiform Sumeria dan Mesopotamia.', 'fa': 'نوشته\u200cای سومری کونیفرم بیش از پنج هزار سال پیش اختراع شد و یکی از قدیمی\u200cترین تاریخ را معرفی می\u200cکند. ما اولین تلاش را برای ترجمه کردن متن سومری به انگلیسی به خودکار نشان می دهیم. ما به طور عمومی شرکت با کیفیت بالا برای آموزش و ارزیابی استانداردیز آزاد می کنیم و نتیجه\u200cها را در مورد آزمایش\u200cها با تکنیک\u200cهای یادگیری که بر اساس عبارت شده، بر اساس عبارت\u200cهای عبارت، و انتقال آموزش برای ترجمه ارزیابهای Quantitative و qualitative نشان می دهد که کاربردی ترجمه ها را نشان می دهد. روش پیشنهاد ما یک بیننده\u200cی محققان گسترده\u200cتر را با دسترسی روانی به داده\u200cها می\u200cدهد، فرایند ترجمه\u200cهای ارزشمندی و زمانی را به سرعت می\u200cدهد، و به آنها کمک می\u200cکند رابطه\u200cهای بین فرهنگ سومری و مزاپوتامیایی بهتر تحقیق کنند.', 'sq': 'Skripti cuneiform Sumerian u shpik më shumë se 5,000 vjet më parë dhe përfaqëson një nga më të moshuarit në histori. Ne paraqesim përpjekjen e parë për të përkthyer tekstet sumeriane në anglisht automatikisht. Ne publikisht lëshojmë korpra të cilësisë së lartë për trainimin e standartizuar dhe vlerësimin dhe raportojmë rezultatet mbi eksperimentet me teknika të mbikqyrura, të bazuara në fraza dhe transferimi i mësimit për përkthimin e makinave. Vlerësimet kuantitative dhe kualitative tregojnë dobësinë e përkthimeve. Metodologjia jonë e propozuar ofron një audiencë më të gjerë kërkimtarësh me akses të ri ndaj të dhënave, përshpejton procesin e përkthimit manual të kushtueshëm dhe të konsumueshëm kohë dhe i ndihmon ata të eksplorojnë më mirë marrëdhëniet midis kulturës cuneiform sumeriane dhe mesopotamiane.', 'tr': 'Sumeri küçük senarynyň 5.000 yıldan fazla öň keşfedildi ve tarihindeki en eski senarynyň birini gösterir. Biz Sumeriýanyň metinlerini öz-özüne iňlisçe terjime etmek üçin ilkinji synanyşy görkeýäris. Standardeşik okuwçylyk we deňlemek üçin ýokary kwalitet korpoýany publikaça çykarýarys we maşynyň terjime etmek üçin netijesi üstünde, fraz tabanly, we maşynyň terjime etmek üçin ýokary teknikleri barada netijesi berilýäris. Mazmunlar we kwalitet deňlenmeler terjimeleriň ullanyşlygyny görkezýär. Biziň teklip etdiğimiz metodologiýanyň daňa ýakyn arkadaşlyklaryň daňa golaý ulaşmasyny saýlaýar, we golaý we wagtlary almak isleýän el terjime prosesini höwes edýär we olara Sumeriýanyň küýüregi we Mesopotamiýanyň kültüri arasyndaky baglaýyşlaryny gowy gözlemekde kömek edi', 'af': "Die Sumeriese kuneiform skrip is meer as 5,000 jaar gelede opgemaak en verteenwoordig een van die oudste in geskiedenis. Ons stel die eerste probeer om Sumeriese teks automaties in Engels te vertaal. Ons verlos openlik hoë-kwaliteit korpora vir standardiseerde onderwerp en evaluering en rapporteer resultate op eksperimente met onderwerp, frase-gebaseerde en oordra onderwerp teknike vir masjien-vertaling. Kwantitatiewe en kwaliteit evaluasies wys die gebruikerheid van die vertalings. Ons voorgestelde metodologie verskaf 'n breideer publiek van ondersoekers met nuwe toegang tot die data, saamstig die koste en tyd-gebruikerde handverwysing proses, en help hulle beter ondersoek die verwantings tussen Sumerië kuneiform en Mesopotamie kultuur.", 'am': 'የሱማሪው cuneiform ጽሑፍ 5 ሺህ ዓመታት በፊት የተፈጠረ ነው፡፡ የሱሜራውያንን ጽሑፎች ወደ እንግሊዝኛ ማፍለስ የመጀመሪያውን ሞከር እናቀርባለን፡፡ እና የኮርፖርቴኖችን ትክክል ለማድረግ እና ማስታወቂያውን እና ፍሬዎችን በመጠበቅ፣ በንግግር በተደረገ እና የመሳሳይ ትምህርት ትምህርት ለመለስ እናስቀድዳለን፡፡ መግለጫዎች በተዘጋጀ ስሕተታችን የዳራዎችን መግኘት የሚችሉትን አስተማሪዎች ሰፊዎች ሰፊ ያሰፋል፣ ዋጋውን እና በጊዜው የሚጠቀሙትን እጁን ትርጉም ፕሮጀክት ያስቸኩላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սումերիական կունեֆորմային գրառումը հայտնագործվել է ավելի քան 5000 տարի առաջ և ներկայացնում է պատմության ամենածերներից մեկը: Մենք առաջին փորձը ներկայացնում ենք սումերիական տեքստները ավտոմատ անգլերեն թարգմանելու համար: Մենք հանրային առումով հրապարակում ենք բարձր որակային մարմիններ ստանդարտիզացված ուսումնասիրության և գնահատման համար, և զեկում ենք արդյունքներ փորձարկումների մասին, որոնք օգտագործվում են վերահսկված, արտահայտություններով հիմնված և մեքենայի Քանտավորական և որակային գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս թարգմանությունների օգտակարությունը: Մեր առաջարկած մեթոդոլոգիան հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի լայն հետազոտողների հանդիսատեսին նոր հասանելիություն տվյալներին, արագացնում է թանկ և ժամանակ պահանջող ձեռավարական թարգմանման գործընթացը և օգնում է նրանց ավելի լավ ուսումնասիրել սումերիական կունեֆորմական և մեսոպոտամիական մշակույթի', 'bn': 'সুমেরিয়ান কুইনফর্ম স্ক্রিপ্ট ৫,০০০ বছর আগে আবিষ্কার করা হয় এবং ইতিহাসের সবচেয়ে পুরোনো প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে। আমরা সুমেরিয়ান লেখাগুলো ইংরেজিতে অনুবাদ করার প্রথম প্রচেষ্টা উপস্থাপন করি। আমরা প্রকাশ্যে মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য স্বাভাবিক প্রশিক্ষণ এবং মূল্যায়নের জন্য উচ্চমান কোর্পোরাকে মুক্তি দেই এবং প্রতিবেদনের ফলাফল প্রকাশ করি। অনুবাদের প্রয়োজন নির্দেশ করে। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিতে তথ্য প্রবেশের সাথে গবেষকদের একটি বিস্তারিত শ্রোতাদের দেয়া হয়েছে যারা তথ্য প্রবেশ করতে পারে, তারা খরচ এবং সময়-ব্যবহার করার মাধ্যমে অনুবাদ প', 'az': 'Sumeri qüvvəsi skripti 5.000 il əvvəl icat edildi və tarixdəki ən yaşlılardan birini göstərir. Biz Sumeri mətnlərini öz-özünə İngilizce dilinə çevirmək üçün ilk səbəbi göstəririk. Biz standartlaşdırılmış təhsil və değerlendirmək üçün yüksək kaliteli korpora yayındırırıq və maşına çevirilmək üçün təhsil edilmiş, fraz tabanlı və təhsil öyrənmə teknikləri ilə təhsil etdik. Qıymetli və qiymətli değerlendirmələr tercümələrin faydalanılığını göstərir. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz metodolojimiz məlumatlara yeni istifadə edilən araştırmacıların daha geniş auditorisini təklif edir, mal və vaxt istifadə edən məlumatların məlumatlarını hızlandırır, və onlara Sumeri cuneiform və Mesopotamiya məlumatlarının əlaqələrini daha yaxşı keşfetməsinə kömək edir.', 'bs': 'Sumerijski cuneiform scenario je izumljen prije više od 5.000 godina i predstavlja jedan od najstarijih u istoriji. Predstavljamo prvi pokušaj da prevedemo sumerijske poruke na engleski automatski. Publično objavljujemo visokokvalitetnu korporaciju za standardizovanu obuku i procjenu i izvještavamo rezultate o eksperimentima s nadziranim, frazom baziranim i tehnikama za prevod mašine. Quantitativne i kvalitativne procjene ukazuju na korisnost prevoda. Naša predložena metodologija pruža širu publiku istraživača s novim pristupom podacima, ubrzava skup i vremenski proces manualnog prevoda, i pomaže im da bolje istražuju odnose između sumerijskih cuneiform i Mesopotamijskih kultura.', 'ca': "L'escriptura cuneiform sumèrica va ser inventada fa més de 5.000 anys i representa una de les més velles de la història. Presentam el primer intent de traduir els textos sumerians en anglès automàticament. Vam publicar corpores d'alta qualitat per a formació i evaluació estandaritzats i reportem resultats d'experiments amb tècniques d'aprenentatge supervisades, basades en frases i de transfer ència per traducció automàtica. Les evaluacions quantitatives i qualitatives indican l'utilitat de les traduccions. La nostra metodologia proposada proporciona a un públic més ampli de investigadors un nou accés a les dades, accelera el costós i demorant procés de traducció manual i els ajuda a explorar millor les relacions entre la cuneiforma sumeriana i la cultura mesopotàmica.", 'cs': 'Sumerské klínové písmo bylo vynalezeno před více než pěti tisíci lety a představuje jeden z nejstarších v historii. Představujeme první pokus o automatický překlad sumerských textů do angličtiny. Veřejně zveřejňujeme vysoce kvalitní korpusy pro standardizované školení a hodnocení a podáváme zprávy o výsledcích experimentů s technikami dohledu, frází a transferového učení pro strojový překlad. Kvantitativní a kvalitativní hodnocení ukazují na užitečnost překladů. Naše navržená metodika poskytuje širšímu publiku výzkumných pracovníků nový přístup k datům, urychluje nákladný a časově náročný manuální proces překladu a pomáhá jim lépe zkoumat vztahy mezi sumerskou klínovou a mezopotámskou kulturou.', 'et': 'Sumeri cuneiform skript leiutati üle 5000 aasta tagasi ja esindab ühte vanimat ajaloos. Esitame esimese katse tõlkida sumeri tekste inglise keelde automaatselt. Avaldame avalikult kvaliteetseid korpuseid standardiseeritud koolituseks ja hindamiseks ning anname aru masintõlke juhendatud, fraasipõhiste ja siirdeõppe tehnikate katsete tulemustest. Kvantitatiivsed ja kvalitatiivsed hinnangud näitavad tõlkete kasulikkust. Meie kavandatud metoodika pakub laiemale teadlastele uudset juurdepääsu andmetele, kiirendab kulukat ja aeganõudvat käsitõlkeprotsessi ning aitab neil paremini uurida sumeri suulise vormi ja mesopotaamia kultuuri vahelisi suhteid.', 'fi': 'Sumerialainen cuneiform-kirjoitus keksittiin yli 5000 vuotta sitten ja se edustaa historian vanhimpia. Esittelemme ensimmäisen yrityksen kääntää sumerian tekstit englanniksi automaattisesti. Julkaisemme julkisesti korkealaatuisia korpusia standardoitua koulutusta ja arviointia varten ja raportoimme tuloksista konekäännöksen ohjatuilla, lausepohjaisilla ja siirtooppimistekniikoilla. Määrälliset ja laadulliset arvioinnit osoittavat käännösten hyödyllisyyden. Ehdotettu menetelmä tarjoaa laajemmalle tutkijayleisölle uudenlaisen pääsyn dataan, nopeuttaa kallista ja aikaa vievää manuaalista käännösprosessia ja auttaa heitä tutkimaan paremmin sumerialaisen cuneiformin ja mesopotamian kulttuurin välisiä suhteita.', 'jv': 'Sumerang kuwi Wising, laku kuwi nggawe 5.000 banyut segala sakbanjur wong liya sing paling apik dhéwé kuwi duluran kanggo kuwi. Awak dhéwé éntukno saiki perusahaan kanggo tarjamahan seneng sumer kanggo itik Inggris. Awak dhéwé éntuk kesempatan akeh-kalitas kabèh kanggo tukang karo perusahaan lan ijol-ijolan winih lan balik dhéwé kuwi nggawe pawaran cara-urip bantuan, terus-urip lan ijol-urip teknik nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan Wurung nyong lan kalitas Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan mèh sabanjuré akeh lan banjuré piyambak Rong ingkang dadi, dadi kanggo kelas kuwi nggawe barang nggawe manut lan aku-pas kuwi nggawe manut, lan oleh nglanggar aturan luwih apik kejahatan sampek karo perusahaan MesopoTami.', 'sk': 'Sumerska cuneiforme pisava je bila izumljena pred več kot 5000 leti in predstavlja eno najstarejših v zgodovini. Predstavljamo prvi poskus avtomatičnega prevajanja sumerskih besedil v angleščino. Javno objavljamo visokokakovostne korpuse za standardizirano usposabljanje in ocenjevanje ter poročamo o rezultatih poskusov z nadzorovanimi, fraznimi in transfernimi tehnikami učenja strojnega prevajanja. Količinske in kvalitativne ocene kažejo na koristnost prevodov. Naša predlagana metodologija širšemu občinstvu raziskovalcev omogoča nov dostop do podatkov, pospeši drag in dolgotrajen proces ročnega prevajanja ter jim pomaga bolje raziskati odnose med sumersko cuneiforme in mezopotamsko kulturo.', 'ha': "An ƙiro manuscriptan maceiform na Sumarian a kodi 5,000 shekara zaman kuma yana wakilisha ɗayan tsohon historin. Tuna halatar da jarrabar ta farkon da za'a translate matsayin Sumar zuwa Ingiriya farat ɗaya. Tuna sakar da firma masu tsari na sifanci ko kuma, ana samun su sami matsayin da aka tsare, da kuma za'a shige masu shirya matsayin ayukan ayuka da aka tsare, da kuma aka saka muhalli wa masu fassari na mashine. Bayani masu ƙayyade na Quantitative da KCharselect unicode block name Dakatanmu da aka buƙata, yana samar da watani masu fassarar da matsayin yanzu zuwa data, yana gaugãwa da jarrabar fassarar masu yin amfani da manual-abun, kuma yana taimakon su da mafi alhẽri ga gane mazaɓa tsakanin fiteiform da kultur na Mesopotemian.", 'he': 'התסריט הסומרי הומצא לפני יותר מ-5,000 שנה ומייצג אחד מהמבוגרים ביותר בהיסטוריה. אנחנו מציגים את הניסיון הראשון לתרגם טקסטים סומריים לאנגלית באופן אוטומטי. אנו משחררים באופן פומבי גופורה איכות גבוהה לאימונים ומעריכים סטנדרטיים ודווחים על תוצאות ניסויים עם טכניקות לימוד מבוססת ביטויים ומעברת לתרגום מכונות. הערכות הכמותיות והאיכותיות מצביעות על השימוש של התרגשות. המוטדולוגיה המוצעת שלנו מספקת קהל רחב יותר של חוקרים עם גישה חדשה למידע, מאיץ את תהליך התרגום ידני יקר ומשתמש זמן, ומעזור להם לחקור טוב יותר את היחסים בין התרבות קוניפוטמית הסומרית לתרבות המסופוטמית.', 'bo': 'Sumerian cuneiform script was invented more than 5,000 years ago and represents one of the oldest in history. ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་སྤྱིར་བཏུབ་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཚད་རྩལ་འཛིན་སྒྲིག་དང་བསྡུར་ན་ནང་། རྩིས་འབྲས་དང་ཚད་ལྡན་རིམ་གྱི་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོད་པ་མཚོན་ན། Our proposed methodology provides a broader audience of researchers with novel access to the data, accelerates the costly and time-consuming manual translation process, and helps them better explore the relationships between Sumerian cuneiform and Mesopotamian culture.'}
{'en': 'Using Bilingual Patents for Translation Training', 'ar': 'استخدام براءات الاختراع ثنائية اللغة للتدريب على الترجمة', 'es': 'Uso de patentes bilingües para la formación en traducción', 'fr': 'Utilisation de brevets bilingues pour la formation en traduction', 'pt': 'Usando patentes bilíngues para treinamento de tradução', 'ja': '翻訳トレーニングのためのバイリンガル特許の使用', 'ru': 'Использование двуязычных патентов для обучения переводам', 'zh': '用双语专利译培训', 'hi': 'अनुवाद प्रशिक्षण के लिए द्विभाषी पेटेंट का उपयोग करना', 'ga': 'Paitinní Dátheangacha a Úsáid le haghaidh Oiliúint Aistriúcháin', 'ka': 'გამოყენება ბილინგური პეტენტები თავისწავლებისთვის', 'hu': 'Kétnyelvű szabadalmak használata fordítási képzéshez', 'el': 'Χρήση δίγλωσσων διπλωμάτων ευρεσιτεχνίας για μεταφραστική κατάρτιση', 'kk': 'Аудару оқыту үшін екі патенттерді қолдану', 'mk': 'Користење двогласни патенти за обука за превод', 'lt': 'Dviejų kalbų patentų naudojimas vertimo raštu mokymui', 'it': 'Utilizzo dei brevetti bilingui per la formazione di traduzione', 'ml': 'പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി ബിലിന്\u200dഗുള്\u200d പാറ്റന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Penggunaan Paten Bilingual untuk Latihan Terjemahan', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ Privattivi Bilingwi għat-Taħriġ fit-Traduzzjoni', 'mn': 'Оруулах сургалтын хоёр дахь патентүүдийг ашиглах', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie patentów dwujęzycznych do szkoleń tłumaczeniowych', 'no': 'Bruk bilenguelt patent for omsetjing', 'ro': 'Utilizarea brevetelor bilingve pentru formarea de traducere', 'sr': 'Koristenje dvostrukih patenata za obuku prevoda', 'so': 'Isticmaalka baaritaanka luqada bilowga ah', 'si': 'වාර්ථාව ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා බිලින්ගුල් පැටෙන්ට්ස් භාවිත කරන්න', 'sv': 'Användning av tvåspråkiga patent för översättningsutbildning', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'Translation Training کے لئے بیلینگل پٹینٹ استعمال کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish uchun vositalar yordamida', 'vi': 'Sử dụng bản đồ dịch ngữ học', 'hr': 'Koristeći dvostruke patente za obuku prevoda', 'bg': 'Използване на двуезични патенти за обучение по преводи', 'nl': 'Tweetalige octrooien gebruiken voor vertaaltraining', 'da': 'Brug af tosprogede patenter til oversættelsesuddannelse', 'de': 'Verwendung zweisprachiger Patente f├╝r ├ťbersetzungsausbildungen', 'id': 'Menggunakan Paten Bilingual untuk Latihan Terjemahan', 'fa': 'استفاده از Patents Bilingual for Translation Training', 'ko': '이중 언어 특허를 이용하여 번역 교육을 진행하다.', 'tr': 'Terjime Ewezam üçin Çyzgyly Patenler ullanýar', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Patients wa Kiingereza kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya Tafsiri', 'af': 'Gebruik van Bilinguele Patente vir Vertaling Oefening', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i patentave dygjuhëse për trajnimin e përkthimit', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Çeviri Tərcümə Eğitimi üçün İkinci Patentlər istifadə edilir', 'bn': 'অনুবাদ প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য বিলিঙ্গুয়েল প্যাটেন্ট ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Koristeći dvostruke patente za obuku prevoda', 'cs': 'Používání dvojjazyčných patentů pro překladatelské školení', 'et': 'Kahekeelsete patendide kasutamine tõlkekoolituses', 'hy': 'Թարգմանման ուսումնասիրության երկլեզու բաղադրիչների օգտագործումը', 'fi': 'Kaksikielisten patenttien käyttö käännöskoulutuksessa', 'ca': 'Utilitzant patents bilingües per formació de traducció', 'ha': 'Using Bilingual Patents for Translation Training', 'sk': 'Uporaba dvojezičnih patentov za usposabljanje za prevajanje', 'he': 'השימוש של פטנטים משולשים לאימוני תרגום', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah paten Bilingual kanggo Terjamahan', 'bo': 'ཡིག་སྒྲུང་བརྙན་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆོག་ཐང་རྩིས་བྱེད་སྟངས་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'While bilingual corpora have been instrumental for machine translation, their utility for training translators has been less explored. We investigate the use of bilingual corpora as pedagogical tools for translation in the technical domain. In a user study, novice translators revised Chinese translations of English patents through bilingual concordancing. Results show that concordancing with an in-domain bilingual corpus can yield greater improvement in translation quality of technical terms than a general-domain bilingual corpus.', 'ar': 'في حين أن المجموعات ثنائية اللغة كانت مفيدة للترجمة الآلية ، إلا أن فائدتها في تدريب المترجمين لم يتم استكشافها. نحن نحقق في استخدام هيئة ثنائية اللغة كأدوات تربوية للترجمة في المجال التقني. في دراسة للمستخدم ، قام المترجمون المبتدئون بمراجعة الترجمات الصينية لبراءات الاختراع الإنجليزية من خلال التوافق ثنائي اللغة. تظهر النتائج أن التوافق مع مجموعة ثنائية اللغة في المجال يمكن أن يؤدي إلى تحسين جودة ترجمة المصطلحات الفنية بشكل أكبر من مجموعة النصوص ثنائية اللغة العامة.', 'es': 'Si bien los corpus bilingües han sido fundamentales para la traducción automática, su utilidad para la formación de traductores ha sido menos explorada. Investigamos el uso de corpus bilingües como herramientas pedagógicas para la traducción en el dominio técnico. En un estudio con usuarios, traductores novatos revisaron las traducciones al chino de las patentes en inglés mediante concordancia bilingüe. Los resultados muestran que la concordancia con un corpus bilingüe dentro del dominio puede producir una mayor mejora en la calidad de la traducción de términos técnicos que un corpus bilingüe de dominio general.', 'pt': 'Embora os corpora bilíngues tenham sido fundamentais para a tradução automática, sua utilidade para o treinamento de tradutores tem sido menos explorada. Investigamos o uso de corpora bilíngües como ferramentas pedagógicas para tradução no domínio técnico. Em um estudo com usuários, tradutores iniciantes revisaram as traduções chinesas de patentes em inglês por meio de concordância bilíngue. Os resultados mostram que a concordância com um corpus bilíngue de domínio pode gerar maior melhoria na qualidade da tradução de termos técnicos do que um corpus bilíngue de domínio geral.', 'fr': "Alors que les corpus bilingues ont joué un rôle déterminant dans la traduction automatique, leur utilité pour la formation des traducteurs a été moins explorée. Nous étudions l'utilisation de corpus bilingues comme outils pédagogiques pour la traduction dans le domaine technique. Dans une étude d'utilisateurs, des traducteurs novices ont révisé les traductions chinoises de brevets anglais par le biais d'une concordance bilingue. Les résultats montrent que la concordance avec un corpus bilingue dans le domaine peut améliorer davantage la qualité de traduction des termes techniques qu'un corpus bilingue du domaine général.", 'ja': 'バイリンガルなコーパスは機械翻訳に役立ちましたが、翻訳者をトレーニングするためのその有用性はあまり探求されていません。私たちは、技術領域での翻訳のための教育ツールとしてのバイリンガルコーラの使用を調査します。ユーザー調査では、初心者の翻訳者はバイリンガルの協調を通じて英語の特許の中国語訳を改訂しました。結果は、ドメイン内バイリンガルコーパスとの調和が、一般ドメインバイリンガルコーパスよりも専門用語の翻訳品質の改善をもたらす可能性があることを示している。', 'ru': 'В то время как двуязычные корпорации сыграли важную роль в машинном переводе, их полезность для обучения переводчиков была изучена в меньшей степени. Мы исследуем использование двуязычных корпусов в качестве педагогических инструментов для перевода в технической области. В исследовании пользователей начинающие переводчики пересматривали китайские переводы английских патентов посредством двуязычного конкордирования. Результаты показывают, что согласование с внутридоменным двуязычным корпусом может привести к большему улучшению качества перевода технических терминов, чем с общедоменным двуязычным корпусом.', 'hi': 'जबकि द्विभाषी कॉर्पोरेट मशीन अनुवाद के लिए महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है, प्रशिक्षण अनुवादकों के लिए उनकी उपयोगिता का कम पता लगाया गया है। हम तकनीकी डोमेन में अनुवाद के लिए शैक्षणिक उपकरण के रूप में द्विभाषी कॉर्पोरेट के उपयोग की जांच करते हैं। एक उपयोगकर्ता अध्ययन में, नौसिखिया अनुवादकों ने द्विभाषी concordancing के माध्यम से अंग्रेजी पेटेंट के चीनी अनुवादों को संशोधित किया। परिणाम बताते हैं कि एक इन-डोमेन द्विभाषी कॉर्पस के साथ सामंजस्य एक सामान्य-डोमेन द्विभाषी कॉर्पस की तुलना में तकनीकी शब्दों की अनुवाद गुणवत्ता में अधिक सुधार कर सकता है।', 'zh': '虽双语语料库有助于机器翻译,而效用于培训翻译人鲜为人知。 吾究术域用双语语料库为译之具。 一用户研究,新手翻译人员因双语协改英文专利中文译。 结果表明,比于常域双语语料库,方于常域双语语料库,与域内双语语料库同术术语译质。', 'ga': "Cé go raibh corparáid dhátheangach ina chuid lárnach d’aistriúchán meaisín, is lú iniúchadh a rinneadh ar a n-áisiúlacht chun aistritheoirí a oiliúint. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar úsáid corpora dátheangach mar uirlisí oideolaíocha aistriúcháin sa réimse teicniúil. I staidéar úsáideora, d'athbhreithnigh aistritheoirí nua aistriúcháin na Síne ar phaitinní Béarla trí chomhfhreagras dátheangach. Léiríonn torthaí gur féidir feabhas níos fearr a chur ar cháilíocht aistriúcháin téarmaí teicniúla de réir mar a thagann le corpas dátheangach in-fhearainn ná mar a bheadh ar chorpas dátheangach ginearálta.", 'ka': 'თუმცა ორიენგური კორპორა მაქსინური გაგრძნობისთვის ინსტრუმენტური იყო, მათი სამუშაო ტრანგლიტურებისთვის სამუშაო გაგრძნობის ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ორიენგური კორპორის გამოყენებას როგორც პედაგოგიური გამოყენება ტექნონიკური დიომინში. მომხმარებელი კვლევაში, ახალი ტრანსტრალიტორები ინგლისური პეტენტების გადაწყვეტილი კინელი პეტენტების გადაწყვეტილება ორიენგური თანდაწყვეტი წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ ერთადერთობა ორიენგური კორპუსთან ერთადერთობაში შეიძლება უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენება ტექნიკური წარმოდგენებაში, ვიდრე ორიენგური კორპუსზე.', 'el': 'Ενώ τα δίγλωσσα σώματα ήταν καθοριστικά για τη μηχανική μετάφραση, η χρησιμότητά τους για την εκπαίδευση των μεταφραστών έχει διερευνηθεί λιγότερο. Ερευνούμε τη χρήση δίγλωσσων σωμάτων ως παιδαγωγικά εργαλεία μετάφρασης στον τεχνικό τομέα. Σε μια μελέτη χρηστών, αρχάριοι μεταφραστές αναθεώρησαν κινεζικές μεταφράσεις Αγγλικών διπλωμάτων ευρεσιτεχνίας μέσω δίγλωσσης εναρμόνισης. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η εναρμόνιση με ένα δίγλωσσο σώμα εντός του τομέα μπορεί να επιφέρει μεγαλύτερη βελτίωση στην ποιότητα της μετάφρασης τεχνικών όρων από ένα δίγλωσσο σώμα γενικού τομέα.', 'hu': 'Míg a kétnyelvű korpuszok a gépi fordítás szempontjából fontos szerepet játszottak, a fordítók képzésére szolgáló hasznosságukat kevésbé vizsgálták fel. Vizsgáljuk a kétnyelvű korpuszok fordítási pedagógiai eszközként történő használatát a műszaki területen. Egy felhasználói tanulmányban a kezdő fordítók kétnyelvű egyeztetéssel felülvizsgálták az angol szabadalmak kínai fordításait. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a domain belüli kétnyelvű korpuszokkal való összhang nagyobb javulást eredményezhet a technikai kifejezések fordítási minőségében, mint egy általános domain kétnyelvű korpusz.', 'it': "Mentre i corpora bilingui sono stati strumentali per la traduzione automatica, la loro utilità per la formazione dei traduttori è stata meno esplorata. Investighiamo l'uso dei corpora bilingui come strumenti pedagogici per la traduzione in ambito tecnico. In uno studio degli utenti, i traduttori principianti hanno rivisto le traduzioni cinesi dei brevetti inglesi attraverso la concordanza bilingue. I risultati mostrano che la concordanza con un corpus bilingue in-domain può produrre un miglioramento maggiore nella qualità della traduzione dei termini tecnici rispetto a un corpus bilingue di dominio generale.", 'kk': 'Екі тілді корпора машинаны аудару үшін құрылғы болғанда, олардың аударушыларын оқыту үшін құрылғысы кемінде зерттеді. Екі тілді корпораны техникалық доменде аудару үшін педагогикалық құрылғылар ретінде зерттеуді. Пайдаланушыларды зерттеу үшін, жаңа аудармалары ағылшын патенттерінің аудармаларын екі тілді сәйкестік арқылы қайта жасады. Нәтижелер домендегі екі тілі корпус сәйкестігінің түрлендіру үшін техникалық терминдердің сапатын жалпы домендің екі тілі корпус арқылы жалпы түрлендіру мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Nors dvikalbis korporas buvo instrumentas vertimui mašina, jų nauda vertimo raštu mokymui buvo mažiau ištirta. Mes tiriame dvikalbės korpros naudojimą kaip pedagoginius vertimo įrankius techninėje srityje. Naudotojų tyrime naujieji vertėjai persvarstė anglų patentų vertimus Kinijoje dvikalbiu derinimu. Rezultatai rodo, kad derinant su dvikalbiu korpusu domeno viduje gali pagerinti techninių terminų vertimo kokybę, palyginti su dvikalbiu korpusu bendrojo domeno viduje.', 'mk': 'While bilingual corpora have been instrumental for machine translation, their utility for training translators has been less explored.  Го истражуваме употребата на двојјазичните корпора како педагошки алатки за превод во техничкиот домен. Во студијата на корисниците, новите преведувачи ги ревидираа кинеските преведувања на англиски патенти преку двојно согласување. Резултатите покажуваат дека согласноста со двојјазичен корпус во домен може да предизвика поголемо подобрување во квалитетот на преводот на техничките термини отколку двојјазичен корпус во генералниот домен.', 'ms': 'Sementara corpora dua bahasa telah menjadi instrumental untuk terjemahan mesin, utiliti mereka untuk pelatihan penerjemah telah kurang dikeksplorasi. Kami menyelidiki penggunaan corpora dua bahasa sebagai alat pedagogi untuk terjemahan dalam domain teknik. Dalam kajian pengguna, penerjemah baru diubah penerjemah Cina bagi paten Inggeris melalui persetujuan dua bahasa. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa persatuan dengan korpus bilingual dalam domain boleh memberikan peningkatan yang lebih besar dalam kualiti terjemahan terma teknikal daripada korpus bilingual domain umum.', 'ml': 'രണ്ടു ഭാഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്ക് ഉപകരണങ്ങളായിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അവരുടെ ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കുറ ടെക്നിക്കല്\u200d ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി രണ്ടു ഭാഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ ഉപകരണങ്ങളായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നോവിസ് പരിഭാഷകര്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷ കോണ്\u200dകോണ്\u200dഡാന്\u200dസ് മുഖേന ചൈനീസ് പാട്ടെന്\u200dറുകളുടെ  ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ഡൊമൈന്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനോടൊപ്പം കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ജന', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li l-korpora bilingwi kienu strumentali għat-traduzzjoni bil-magni, l-utilità tagħhom għat-taħriġ tat-tradutturi kienet inqas esplorata. Aħna ninvestigaw l-użu ta’ korpra billingwi bħala għodod pedagoġiċi għat-traduzzjoni fid-dominju tekniku. Fi studju tal-utenti, tradutturi ġodda rrevedew it-traduzzjonijiet Ċiniżi ta’ privattivi Ingliżi permezz ta’ konkordanza billingwi. Ir-riżultati juru li l-koordinazzjoni ma’ korpus bilingwu fid-dominju tista’ twassal għal titjib akbar fil-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni ta’ termini tekniċi minn korpus bilingwu fid-dominju ġenerali.', 'mn': 'Хоёр хэл корпора машины хөрөнгө оруулахад хэрэгтэй байсан ч, тэдний сургалтын хөрөнгө оруулагчдын хэрэглээ бага хэмжээний судалгаа хийгдсэн. Бид хоёр хэлний корпораны хэрэглээ техник хэмжээнд орчуулахын тулд педагогик хэрэгслүүдийг судалж байна. Хэрэглэгчийн судалгаанд шинэ орчуулагчид Хятад хэлний англи patents-ын орчуулалтыг хоёр хэлний зөвхөн зөвшөөрүүлсэн. Үүний үр дүнд хоёр хэл корпус хоёр хэл хоёр хэл корпус дээр орчуулах техническин хэлбэрээс илүү сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Selv om det har vært nyttig for maskinsomsetjing, er det mindre utforska verktøyet for å trenja omsetjarane. Vi undersøker bruken av bilinguelt korpora som pedagogiske verktøy for omsetjing i tekniske domene. I ein brukarstudie gjer nye translatorer gjennom kinesiske omsetjingar av engelske patenter gjennom bilinguelt samordning. Resultater viser at samordning med eit bilinguelt korpus i domene kan gje større forbedring i omsetjingskvalitet av tekniske vilkår enn ein generell domenet bilinguelt korpus.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy korpusy dwujęzyczne były kluczowe dla tłumaczenia maszynowego, ich użyteczność do szkolenia tłumaczy została mniej zbadana. Badamy wykorzystanie dwujęzycznych korpusów jako narzędzi pedagogicznych do tłumaczenia w dziedzinie technicznej. W badaniu użytkowników początkujący tłumacze poprawili chińskie tłumaczenia patentów angielskich poprzez dwujęzyczną zgodę. Wyniki pokazują, że zgodność z korpusem dwujęzycznym w domenie może przynieść większą poprawę jakości tłumaczenia terminów technicznych niż korpus dwujęzyczny w ogólnej domenie.', 'ro': 'În timp ce corporele bilingve au fost esențiale pentru traducerea automată, utilitatea lor pentru instruirea traducătorilor a fost mai puțin explorată. Investigăm utilizarea corporelor bilingve ca instrumente pedagogice pentru traducere în domeniul tehnic. Într-un studiu utilizator, traducătorii începători au revizuit traducerile chineze ale brevetelor în limba engleză prin concordanță bilingvă. Rezultatele arată că acordarea cu un corpus bilingv intern poate duce la o îmbunătățire mai mare a calității traducerii termenilor tehnici decât un corpus bilingv general.', 'sr': 'Iako je dvojezična korpora bila instrumentalna za prevod mašine, njihova korisnost za obuku prevodioca je manje istražena. Istražujemo korištenje dvojezičkog korpora kao pedagogičke alate za prevod u tehničkom domenu. U studiji korisnika, novi prevoditelji su preobrazili kineske prevode engleskih patenata putem dvojezičkog sporazuma. Rezultati pokazuju da sporazum sa dvojezičkim korpusom u domenu može donijeti veće poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda tehničkih uslova od dvojezičkog korpusa u generalnom domenu.', 'si': 'දුවන් භාෂාවක් කොර්පෝරා යන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තනය සඳහා උපයෝජනය වෙලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ දුවන් භාෂාවික කොර්පෝරාගේ භාවිතාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් පිඩා භාවිතා කරුණාකරුවෙක් අධ්\u200dයානයෙන්, නොවිස් වාර්ථාකරුවන්ට චීනි භාවිතාවන්ගේ භාවිතාවන් අ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් දෙවල් භාෂාවක් වලින් තාක්ෂික', 'so': 'Inta lagu jiro shirkadaha labada luqadood oo qalabka lagu turjumayo mashiinka, faa’iidadooda waxbarashada turjubaanada waxaa laga baahan jiray wax yar. Waxaynu baaritaan isticmaalka shirkadaha labada luqadood oo ah qalabka cilmiga ah ee turjumaadda guriga teknolojiga. Waxbarashada isticmaalayaasha ayaa turjumayaasha novice ku soo bandhigay tarjumaadda Shiinaha oo ay leeyihiin afka ingiriiska ku qoran labada luuqadood oo isku xiran. Resultiyada waxay muuqataa in la isku xiriira labada luqadood ee gudaha lagu qoro uu soo bixi karo hagaajinta qalabka tarjumaadda noocyada teknolojiga ah ka sii kordhin karo labada luqadood.', 'sv': 'Medan tvåspråkiga korpora har varit avgörande för maskinöversättning har deras användbarhet för att utbilda översättare mindre utforskats. Vi undersöker användningen av tvåspråkiga corpora som pedagogiska verktyg för översättning inom det tekniska området. I en användarstudie reviderade nybörjare kinesiska översättningar av engelska patent genom tvåspråkig samordning. Resultaten visar att samstämmighet med en tvåspråkig korpus inom domänen kan ge större förbättring av översättningskvaliteten för tekniska termer än en tvåspråkig korpus inom allmän domän.', 'ta': 'இரு மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்கள் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு கருவியாக இருந்த போது, அவர்களுடைய பயன்பாடு மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர் நாம் தொழில்நுட்பம் களத்தில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு இரண்டு மொழிக்கோராவின் பயன்பாட்டை சிறப்பு கருவிகளாக ஆய் ஒரு பயனர் படிப்பில், நோவிக் மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்கள் இரு மொழியில் ஒத்திசைக்கும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை மாற்றியது. முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது ஒரு டொமைன் இரு மொழி கார்புஸ் உடன் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தலாம் என்பது பொது டொமைன் இரு மொழி கார்புஸ் விட மொழிபெயர்ப', 'ur': 'جبکہ دو زبان کورپورا ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے وسائل ہے، ان کے ترجمہ ٹرنسلٹروں کے لئے ان کا فائدہ کم تحقیق کیا گیا ہے. ہم نے دوزخ زبان کی کورپورا کی استعمال کی تحقیق کی تخنیک ڈومین میں ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے پڈاگوژیکل ابزار کے طور پر۔ یوسٹر کی تعلیم میں نویس ترجمندر نے انگلیسی پٹینٹوں کی ترجمندگی دو زبانوں کے ذریعے دوسری تعلیم کے ذریعے دفع کی۔ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک دامنی دو زبان کی کورپوس کے ساتھ تغییرات کی کیفیت میں زیادہ زیادہ تخنیک شرایطوں کی کورپوس سے بڑھ سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ikki tillar kompaniya mashina tarjima uchun asboblar bo'lganda, ularning tarjima tarjimalari uchun ishlatuvchisi qisqarilmadi. Biz ikkita tillar kompaniyasi foydalanishni teknik domenada tarjima qilish asboblari sifatida o'rganamiz. Foydalanuvchi tahrirchida novice tarjima qiluvchilar ikki tillar bir xitoblar bilan birlashtirish orqali Xitoycha tarjimalarini o'zgartiradi. Natijalar hozir ko'rsatadi, domen-domen ikkita tillar corpus bilan birlashtirish mumkin, texnologiya sifatida o'zgarishni umumiy-domen ikkita tillar qobiliyatiga oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong khi La Mã là công cụ dịch chuyển máy, thì tiện ích của dịch viên giáo dục cũng ít được tìm hiểu hơn. Chúng tôi điều tra việc sử dụng vật lý hai thứ làm công cụ giáo dục trong lĩnh vực kỹ thuật. Trong một nghiên cứu người dùng, người phiên dịch mới đã chỉnh lại bản dịch tiếng Trung bằng cách phối hợp hai thứ. Kết quả cho thấy sự phối hợp với một tập thể hai thứ thuộc nội bộ có thể cải thiện chất lượng kỹ thuật hơn cả một tập thể hai thứ phổ thông.', 'bg': 'Докато двуезичните корпуси са от основно значение за машинния превод, тяхната полезност за обучение на преводачи е по-малко изследвана. Проучваме използването на двуезични корпуси като педагогически инструменти за превод в техническата сфера. В потребителско проучване начинаещите преводачи преразгледаха китайските преводи на английски патенти чрез двуезично съгласуване. Резултатите показват, че съгласуването с двуезичен корпус в домейна може да доведе до по-голямо подобрение в качеството на превода на технически термини, отколкото двуезичен корпус в общ домейн.', 'da': 'Mens tosprogede corpora har været afgørende for maskinoversættelse, er deres nytte til uddannelse af oversættere blevet mindre udforsket. Vi undersøger brugen af tosprogede corpora som pædagogiske redskaber til oversættelse på det tekniske område. I en brugerundersøgelse reviderede nybegyndere oversættere kinesiske oversættelser af engelske patenter gennem tosproget overensstemmelse. Resultaterne viser, at overensstemmelse med et tosproget korpus i domænet kan give større forbedring i oversættelseskvaliteten af tekniske termer end et tosproget korpus i almindelighed.', 'hr': 'Iako je dvojezička korpora bila instrumentalna za prevod strojeva, njihova korisnost za obuku prevodioca je manje istražena. Istražujemo korištenje dvojezičkog korpora kao pedagogičke alate za prevod u tehničkoj domenu. U ispitivanju korisnika novice prevoditelji su preobrazili kineske prevode engleskih patenata putem dvojezičkog sporazuma. Rezultati pokazuju da usporedba s dvojezičkim korpusom u domenu može donijeti veće poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda tehničkih uvjeta od dvojezičkog korpusa u općem domenu.', 'nl': "Hoewel tweetalige corpora's instrumenteel zijn geweest voor machinevertaling, is hun nut voor het opleiden van vertalers minder onderzocht. We onderzoeken het gebruik van tweetalige corpora als pedagogisch hulpmiddel voor vertaling in het technische domein. In een gebruikersstudie reviseerden beginnende vertalers Chinese vertalingen van Engelse octrooien door middel van tweetalige concordanties. De resultaten tonen aan dat concordatie met een tweetalig corpus in het domein een grotere verbetering van de vertaalkwaliteit van technische termen kan opleveren dan een tweetalig corpus in het algemeen-domein.", 'de': 'Während zweisprachige Korpora für die maschinelle Übersetzung von entscheidender Bedeutung waren, wurde ihr Nutzen für die Ausbildung von Übersetzern weniger erforscht. Wir untersuchen den Einsatz zweisprachiger Korpora als pädagogisches Werkzeug für Übersetzungen im technischen Bereich. In einer Benutzerstudie überarbeiteten Neuübersetzer chinesische Übersetzungen englischer Patente durch zweisprachige Konkordanz. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Übereinstimmung mit einem zweisprachigen Korpus in-domain zu einer höheren Übersetzungsqualität technischer Begriffe führen kann als ein zweisprachiges Korpus in der allgemeinen Domäne.', 'id': 'Sementara corpora dua bahasa telah menjadi instrumental untuk terjemahan mesin, utilitas mereka untuk pelatihan terjemahan telah kurang dikeksplorasi. Kami menyelidiki penggunaan corpora dua bahasa sebagai alat pedagogi untuk terjemahan dalam daerah teknis. Dalam penelitian pengguna, penerjemah baru merevisi penerjemah Cina patent Inggris melalui persetujuan bilingual. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa persamaan dengan tubuh bilingual dalam domain dapat memberikan peningkatan lebih besar dalam kualitas terjemahan terma teknis daripada tubuh bilingual di domain umum.', 'ko': '이중 언어 자료 라이브러리는 기계 번역에서 중요한 역할을 하지만 번역자를 양성하는 데 있어서의 역할은 탐색되지 않는다.우리는 이중 언어 자료 라이브러리가 기술 분야의 번역 교학 도구로서의 사용 상황을 조사했다.한 사용자 연구에서 초보 통역사는 이중 언어 검색을 통해 영문 특허의 중국어 번역본을 수정했다.그 결과 일반 분야의 이중 언어 자료 라이브러리에 비해 분야 내의 이중 언어 자료 라이브러리의 통합은 전문 용어의 번역 질을 현저히 높일 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در حالی که شرکت دو زبان برای ترجمه ماشین وسیله\u200cای بوده است، استفاده از آنها برای ترجمه\u200cکنندگان آموزش کمتر تحقیق شده است. ما استفاده از شرکت دو زبان به عنوان ابزار پداگوژیک برای ترجمه در حوزه تکنیکی تحقیق می کنیم. در یک مطالعه کاربر، ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cهای نویس، ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cهای چینی از طریق ترجمه\u200cسازی دو زبان انگلیسی را تغییر دادند. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که هماهنگی با یک جسد دو زبان در دامنه می\u200cتواند در کیفیت ترجمه\u200cهای شرایط tekنیکی بیشتر از یک جسد دو زبان ژنرال تولید کند.', 'tr': 'Iki dil korpora maşynyň terjime edilmegi üçin örän çarpyşdyrylyp bilen, terjime etmäge üçin olaryň işi azajyk ýok. Biz iki dil korporanı teknik domeninde tercüme etmek için pedagogik araçlar olarak inceledik. Ullançylar öwrenmesinde, täze terjimeler Iňlisçe patentleriniň terjimelerini ikinji dilli ylalaşlyk bilen terjime etdiler. Sonuçlar, domenyda iki dil korpusu ile düzenlenen terjime edilen teknik şartların umumiy-domeny iki dil korpusundan daha yüksek gelişmesini gösterir.', 'sw': 'Wakati kampuni ya lugha mbili zimekuwa nyenzo ya kutafsiri mashine, matumizi yao kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mafunzo yamekuwa ya kuchunguzwa kidogo. Tunachunguza matumizi ya makampuni ya lugha mbili kama zana za kitaalamu za kutafsiri katika maeneo ya kiufundi. Katika utafiti wa mtumiaji, watafsiri wa Kinovice walitafsiri tafsiri za Kichina za Waingereza kupitia ushirikiano wa lugha mbili. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa, kuunganisha na makampuni ya lugha mbili ya ndani yanaweza kusababisha maendeleo makubwa ya tafsiri kwa kiwango cha ufundi kuliko makampuni ya lugha mbili ya ndani.', 'am': 'የሁለት ቋንቋዎች ኮርፖርት የመኪን ትርጉም ማቀናጃ ሲሆን፣ የግንኙነታቸው ትርጓሚዎች መግለጫ በጣም ጥቂት ሳይመረመር ነው፡፡ የሁለት ቋንቋዎች ኮርፖሬን ለመግለጽ የትምህርት ማቀናጃ እናስረዳለን፡፡ በተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ውስጥ የኖቪ ተርጓሚዎች በሁለት ቋንቋዎች በመግለጫቸው የቻይና ትርጓሜዎችን የንግግሊዘኛ ግንኙነቶችን ያስተካክሉ፡፡ ፍሬያዎች በሁለት ቋንቋ ካርፓስ ጋር መደጋገሚያ እንደሚያሳየው፣ የቴክክክሎጂ ግንኙነት ከመጠቀም በሁለት ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ካርፓስ የበለጠ ማድረግ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ երկլեզու կորպորան մեքենայի թարգմանման գործիքներ են ունեցել, նրանց օգտակարությունը թարգմանիչների ուսումնասիրելու համար ավելի քիչ է ուսումնասիրվել: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկլեզու մարմնի օգտագործումը որպես դասաբանական գործիքներ տեխնիկական ոլորտում թարգմանելու համար: Օգտագործողների ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում սկզբնական թարգմանիչները վերանայեցին անգլերեն բացերի չինական թարգմանությունները երկլեզու համաձայնման միջոցով: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ երկլեզու մարմնի համապատասխանելը տիեզերքում կարող է ավելի լավ բարելավել տեխնիկական տեխնիկական տերմինների թարգմանման որակը, քան ընդհանուր տիեզերքում երկլեզու մարմնի:', 'az': 'İki dil korporası maşın tercüməsinə uyğun olaraq, təhsil edənlərin istifadəsi daha az keşfedilmişdir. Biz iki dil korporasının istifadəsini tekniki domenin çevirilməsi üçün pedagogi vasitələri kimi incidirik. İstifadəçi təhsil edilməsində, yeni tercümatçılar İngilizə patentlərinin çevirilənlərini iki dil müzakirə ilə dəyişdirdi. Sonuçlar, domeinin iki dil korpusu ilə birləşdirilməsi, təhnik şartların çevirilməsinin keyfiyyətindən daha çox yaxşılaşdırılmasını göstərir.', 'af': "Terwyl twee-lingse korpora is instrumentaal vir masjien vertaling, is hul nutsprogram vir onderwerp vertalings minder onderwerp. Ons ondersoek die gebruik van twee tonge korpora as pedagogiese nutsprogramme vir vertaling in die tegniese domein. In 'n gebruiker studie het novise vertalings Sjinese vertalings van Engelse patente deur twee tale samordening hersien. Resultate wys dat samekordinasie met 'n in-domein twee tale korpus groter verbetering in vertaling kwaliteit van tekniske terme kan gee as 'n algemene-domein twee tale korpus.", 'bn': 'যদিও দুই ভাষার কোর্পোরা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য যন্ত্রপাতি প্রদান করেছে, তবে অনুবাদকদের প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য তাদের ব্যবহার প্রযুক্তিগত ডোমেইনে অনুবাদের জন্য আমরা দুই ভাষার কোর্পোরার ব্যবহারের তদন্ত করি। একটি ব্যবহারকারী গবেষণায় নোভিক অনুবাদক দুই ভাষার সাথে যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমে চীনা ভাষার অনুবাদের পুনরায় চীনা ভাষ ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ডোমেইনের দুই ভাষার কোর্পাসের সাথে যোগাযোগ করছে তা সাধারণ ডোমেইনের দুই ভাষার কোর্পাসের চেয়ে বেশি উন্নতি পাবে।', 'sq': 'Ndërsa korpra dygjuhëse kanë qenë instrumentale për përkthimin e makinave, shërbimi i tyre për trajnimin e përkthyesve është zbuluar më pak. Ne hetojmë përdorimin e korprës dygjuhëse si mjete pedagogjike për përkthimin në fushën teknike. Në një studim të përdoruesve, përkthyesit e filluesve revizuan përkthimet kineze të patentave angleze nëpërmjet përputhjes dygjuhëse. Rezultatet tregojnë se përputhja me një korpus dygjuhës në domeni mund të sjellë përmirësim më të madh në cilësinë e përkthimit të termave teknike sesa një korpus dygjuhës në domeni të përgjithshëm.', 'bs': 'Iako je dvojezička korpora bila instrumentalna za prevod strojeva, njihova korisnost za obuku prevodioca je manje istražena. Istražujemo korištenje dvojezičkog korpora kao pedagogičke alate za prevod u tehničkom domenu. U studiji korisnika novice prevoditelji su preobrazili kineske prevode engleskih patenata putem dvojezičkog sporazuma. Rezultati pokazuju da usporedba s dvojezičkim korpusom u domenu može donijeti veće poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda tehničkih uslova od dvojezičkog korpusa u općem domenu.', 'ca': "Mentre que els corpores bilingües han estat instrumentals per traduir màquines, la seva utilitat per formar traductors ha estat menys explorada. Investiguem l'ús del corpore bilingue com a eina pedagògica de traducció en el domini tècnic. En un estudi d'usuari, els noves traductors van revisar les traduccions xineses de patents angleses a través de la concordancia bilingüe. Els resultats demostren que concordant amb un cos bilingue en domini pot produir millor qualitat de traducció de termes tècnics que un cos bilingue en domini general.", 'cs': 'Zatímco dvojjazyčné korpusy byly pro strojový překlad klíčové, jejich užitečnost pro školení překladatelů byla méně zkoumána. Zkoumáme využití dvojjazyčných korpusů jako pedagogických nástrojů pro překlad v technické oblasti. V uživatelské studii revidovali začínající překladatelé čínské překlady anglických patentů prostřednictvím dvojjazyčného souhlasu. Výsledky ukazují, že soulad s bilingválním korpusem v doméně může přinést větší zlepšení kvality překladu technických pojmů než obecný bilingvální korpus.', 'et': 'Kuigi masintõlke jaoks on olnud kasulik kahekeelsed korpused, on nende kasulikkust tõlkijate koolitamisel vähem uuritud. Uurime kahekeelsete korpuste kasutamist pedagoogiliste vahenditena tõlkimiseks tehnilises valdkonnas. Kasutajauuringus parandasid algajad tõlkijad inglise patentide hiina tõlkeid kahekeelse kokkuleppe abil. Tulemused näitavad, et kooskõlastamine domeenisisese kakskeelse korpusega võib parandada tehniliste terminite tõlkekvaliteeti rohkem kui ülddomeenilise kakskeelse korpusega.', 'fi': 'Vaikka kaksikieliset korpuset ovat olleet avainasemassa konekäännöksessä, niiden hyödyllisyyttä kääntäjien kouluttamisessa on tutkittu vähemmän. Tutkimme kaksikielisten korpusten käyttöä tekniikan alan kääntämisen pedagogisina työkaluina. Käyttäjätutkimuksessa aloittelevat kääntäjät tarkistivat englanninkielisten patenttien kiinalaisia käännöksiä kaksikielisen vastaavuuden avulla. Tulokset osoittavat, että yhteensovittaminen oman verkkotunnuksen kaksikielisen korpusen kanssa voi parantaa teknisten termien käännöslaatua paremmin kuin yleinen kaksikielinen korpus.', 'jv': 'Nanging We istrage use of Bilngual Body as pedangucal tools for translation in the language Nang alih basa ning gunakake, terjamahan piyura basa Jewanika ingkang dipatent neng sampeyan ingkang sampeyan ingkang sapa-sampeyan ingkang. Reults show that concordinancing with an in-domain Bilngual corus can Yill older advancement in translation quality of Teknik terms than a General-domain Bilngual Body.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko so bili dvojezični korpusi ključni za strojno prevajanje, je njihova uporabnost za usposabljanje prevajalcev manj raziskana. Raziskujemo uporabo dvojezičnih korpusov kot pedagoških orodij za prevajanje na tehničnem področju. V študiji uporabnikov so začetniki prevajalci s pomočjo dvojezičnega soglasja revidirali kitajske prevode angleških patentov. Rezultati kažejo, da lahko skladnost z dvojezičnim korpusom v domeni prinese večje izboljšanje kakovosti prevajanja tehničnih izrazov kot dvojezični korpus v splošni domeni.', 'ha': "Kuma a lokacin da firma ta biyu suka kasance tamko na fassarar mashine, sai an yi ƙaranci ba da amfani da su wa fassarori. Ina ƙidãya amfani da kamuni biyu na'ura kamar zane na'ura wa fassari cikin muhimmin. @ info: whatsthis Matarin na nuna cewa, yin sami da wata takardar-biyu na-Domin, yana iya ƙara wa mafarinta cikin fassarar tsarin technical ko kuma da wata nau'in-Domin na biyu.", 'bo': 'སྐད We investigate the use of bilingual corpora as pedagogical tools for translation in the technical domain. སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་བརྩལ་ཞིག་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་འདྲེན་པ་གསར་གཏོང་པ་ཞིག་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་། Results show that concordancing with an in-domain bilingual corpus can yield greater improvement in translation quality of technical terms than a general-domain bilingual corpus.', 'he': 'בעוד גופורה שתיים-שפתית הייתה חשובה לתרגום מכונות, השימוש שלהם לתרגם התרגמים פחות נחקר. אנו חוקרים את השימוש של גופורה שתיים לשונות ככלים pedagogical לתרגום בתחום הטכני. In a user study, novice translators revised Chinese translations of English patents through bilingual concordancing.  Results show that concordancing with an in-domain bilingual corpus can yield greater improvement in translation quality of technical terms than a general-domain bilingual corpus.'}
{'en': 'Dual-decoder Transformer for Joint Automatic Speech Recognition and Multilingual Speech Translation', 'ar': 'محول مزدوج فك التشفير للتعرف التلقائي المشترك على الكلام وترجمة الكلام متعدد اللغات', 'fr': 'Transformateur à double décodeur pour la reconnaissance vocale automatique conjointe et la traduction vocale multilingue', 'pt': 'Transformador de decodificador duplo para reconhecimento automático de fala conjunto e tradução de fala multilíngue', 'es': 'Transformador de doble decodificador para el reconocimiento automático de voz conjunto y la traducción multilingüe de', 'hi': 'संयुक्त स्वचालित वाक् पहचान और बहुभाषी वाक् अनुवाद के लिए दोहरी विकोडक ट्रांसफार्मर', 'ja': 'ジョイント自動音声認識と多言語音声翻訳のためのデュアルデコーダトランスフォーマー', 'zh': '双解码变压器者,所以合自言别言语译也', 'ru': 'Трансформатор с двойным декодером для совместного автоматического распознавания речи и многоязычного перевода речи', 'ga': 'Claochladán dé-dhichódóra le haghaidh Comhaitheantais Urlabhra Uathoibríoch agus Aistriú Cainte Ilteangach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Kettős dekódoló transzformátor a közös automatikus beszédfelismeréshez és többnyelvű beszédfordításhoz', 'el': 'Μετασχηματιστής διπλού αποκωδικοποιητή για κοινή αυτόματη αναγνώριση ομιλίας και πολύγλωσση μετάφραση ομιλίας', 'it': 'Trasformatore dual-decoder per riconoscimento vocale automatico congiunto e traduzione vocale multilingue', 'lt': 'Dviejų dekoderių keitiklis bendram automatiniam kalbos pripažinimui ir daugiakalbiniam kalbos vertimui', 'mk': 'Трансформер со двојен декодер за заедничко автоматско препознавање на говорот и мултијазичен превед на говорот', 'ms': 'Penukar Dua-dekoder untuk Pengenalan Ucapan Automatik Berkongsi dan Penerjemahan Ucapan Berbahasa', 'mn': 'Хоёр давхар хэлний яриаг автоматжуулах болон олон хэлний хэлний хөгжүүлэх төлөвлөгч', 'kk': 'Қосымша аудару мен көптеген тілдер аудару үшін екі- кодтамасын түрлендіруші', 'no': 'Ekstra dekodertransformasjon for automatisk gjenkjenning av tale og fleirspråk- omsetjing', 'pl': 'Transformator dwudekoderowy do wspólnego automatycznego rozpoznawania mowy i wielojęzycznego tłumaczenia mowy', 'ml': 'സ്വയം സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി രണ്ട് ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d പരിഭാഷകന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Trasformatur b’dekoder doppju għar-Rikonoxximent Awtomatiku Konġunt tal-Kellem u t-Traduzzjoni Multilingwi tal-Kellem', 'ro': 'Transformator dual-decoder pentru recunoașterea automată comună a vorbirii și traducerea vorbirii multilingve', 'sr': 'Двојно-декодерски трансформатор за обједан автоматичен признање речи и превод многоезичних речи', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂාව සහ ගොඩක් භාෂාව භාෂාව සඳහා දුවල් ඩිකොඩර් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය', 'so': 'Turjumista wadajirka ah', 'sv': 'Transformator med dubbla avkodare för gemensam automatisk taligenkänning och flerspråkig talöversättning', 'ta': 'இணைய தானியங்கி பேச்சு அடையாளம் மற்றும் பல மொழி பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான இரு குறியீட்டாளர் மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'Joint Automatic Speech Recognition and Multilingual Speech Translation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ biến đổi kép cho Phát ngôn ngữ tổng hợp và phát âm đa ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Двоен декодер трансформатор за съвместно автоматично разпознаване на реч и многоезичен превод на реч', 'hr': 'Transformator dvostrukog dekodera za zajedničku automatsku prepoznavanje govora i prevod višejezičkih govora', 'da': 'Dobbelt-dekoder Transformer til fælles automatisk talegenkendelse og flersproget taleoversættelse', 'nl': 'Dual-decoder Transformator voor gezamenlijke automatische spraakherkenning en meertalige spraakvertaling', 'de': 'Dual-Decoder Transformator für gemeinsame automatische Spracherkennung und mehrsprachige Sprachübersetzung', 'id': 'Transformer Dua-dekoder untuk Pengenalan Bicara Automatik Berkongsi dan Terjemahan Bicara Berbahasa', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '자동 음성 인식과 다중 언어 음성 번역을 결합하는 이중 디코더 변환기', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Kireno mbili kwa Kutambuliwa na Utafsiri wa lugha', 'tr': 'Bir otomatik söz tanaýmasy we köp dilli söz terjimesi üçin ikinji ködleme terjimesini', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Transformuesi i dykoduesit për njohjen e përbashkët automatike të fjalës dhe përkthimin shumëgjuhës të fjalës', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Հիմնական ավտոմատիկ ճանաչման և բազլեզու ճանաչման երկու կոդեր վերածիչ', 'az': 'Birleşik Avtomatik Söz Tanıması və Çoxlu Dil Söz Çeviri üçün İkinci Dekodlayıcı', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষার স্বাক্ষর স্বীকৃতি এবং বহুভাষাভাষী ভাষার অনুবাদের জন্য দুই-ডেকোডার অনুবাদক', 'bs': 'Dvostruki dekoderni transformator za zajedničku automatsku prepoznavanje govora i prevod multijezičkih govora', 'cs': 'Transformátor dvou dekodérů pro společné automatické rozpoznávání řeči a vícejazyčný překlad řeči', 'et': 'Kahekordne dekooder Transformer ühise automaatse kõnetuvastuse ja mitmekeelse kõnetõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Kaksinkertainen dekooderimuuntaja yhteiseen automaattiseen puheentunnistukseen ja monikieliseen puheen kääntämiseen', 'ca': 'Transformador de doble decodificació per reconeixement automàtic conjunt de vosaltres i traducció multilingüe de vosaltres', 'jv': 'Coverage', 'sk': 'Dvojni dekodirni transformator za skupno samodejno prepoznavanje govora in večjezično prevajanje govora', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'משתנה כפולה של פיקוד עבור זיהוי אוטומטי משותף של דיבורים ותרגום דיבורים רבים', 'bo': 'མཐུན་ནུས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་རྟོགས་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce dual-decoder Transformer, a new model architecture that jointly performs automatic speech recognition (ASR) and multilingual speech translation (ST). Our models are based on the original Transformer architecture (Vaswani et al., 2017) but consist of two decoders, each responsible for one task (ASR or ST). Our major contribution lies in how these decoders interact with each other : one decoder can attend to different information sources from the other via a dual-attention mechanism. We propose two variants of these architectures corresponding to two different levels of dependencies between the decoders, called the parallel and cross dual-decoder Transformers, respectively. Extensive experiments on the MuST-C dataset show that our models outperform the previously-reported highest translation performance in the multilingual settings, and outperform as well bilingual one-to-one results. Furthermore, our parallel models demonstrate no trade-off between ASR and ST compared to the vanilla multi-task architecture. Our code and pre-trained models are available at https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ar': 'نقدم محول فك التشفير المزدوج ، وهو نموذج معماري جديد يقوم بشكل مشترك بالتعرف على الكلام التلقائي (ASR) وترجمة الكلام متعدد اللغات (ST). تستند نماذجنا إلى بنية Transformer الأصلية (Vaswani et al. ، 2017) ولكنها تتكون من جهازي فك ترميز ، كل منهما مسؤول عن مهمة واحدة (ASR أو ST). تكمن مساهمتنا الرئيسية في كيفية تفاعل أجهزة فك التشفير هذه مع بعضها البعض: يمكن لجهاز فك تشفير واحد أن يحضر إلى مصادر معلومات مختلفة من الآخر عبر آلية الانتباه المزدوج. نقترح نوعين مختلفين من هذه البنى المقابلة لمستويين مختلفين من التبعيات بين مفككات التشفير ، تسمى المحولات المتوازية والمتقاطعة ثنائية فك التشفير ، على التوالي. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على مجموعة بيانات MuST-C أن نماذجنا تتفوق في الأداء على أعلى أداء ترجمة تم الإبلاغ عنه مسبقًا في الإعدادات متعددة اللغات ، وتتفوق أيضًا على النتائج ثنائية اللغة. علاوة على ذلك ، لا تُظهر نماذجنا الموازية أي مقايضة بين ASR و ST مقارنة بهندسة المهام المتعددة الفانيليا. يتوفر الكود الخاص بنا والنماذج المدربة مسبقًا على https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o Transformer de decodificador duplo, um novo modelo de arquitetura que realiza em conjunto o reconhecimento automático de fala (ASR) e a tradução de fala multilíngue (ST). Nossos modelos são baseados na arquitetura original do Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017), mas consistem em dois decodificadores, cada um responsável por uma tarefa (ASR ou ST). Nossa maior contribuição está na forma como esses decodificadores interagem entre si: um decodificador pode atender a diferentes fontes de informação do outro por meio de um mecanismo de dupla atenção. Propomos duas variantes dessas arquiteturas correspondentes a dois níveis diferentes de dependências entre os decodificadores, chamados de transformadores decodificadores duplos paralelos e cruzados, respectivamente. Extensos experimentos no conjunto de dados MuST-C mostram que nossos modelos superam o desempenho de tradução mais alto relatado anteriormente nas configurações multilíngues e superam também os resultados individuais bilíngues. Além disso, nossos modelos paralelos não demonstram nenhuma troca entre ASR e ST em comparação com a arquitetura multitarefa vanilla. Nosso código e modelos pré-treinados estão disponíveis em https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'fr': "Nous présentons Transformer à double décodeur, une nouvelle architecture de modèle qui exécute conjointement la reconnaissance vocale automatique (ASR) et la traduction vocale multilingue (ST). Nos modèles sont basés sur l'architecture originale du Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017) mais se composent de deux décodeurs, chacun étant responsable d'une tâche (ASR ou ST). Notre principale contribution réside dans la façon dont ces décodeurs interagissent les uns avec les autres\xa0: un décodeur peut traiter différentes sources d'information de l'autre via un mécanisme de double attention. Nous proposons deux variantes de ces architectures correspondant à deux niveaux différents de dépendances entre les décodeurs, appelés transformateurs à double décodeur parallèle et croisé, respectivement. Des expériences approfondies sur le jeu de données MUST-C montrent que nos modèles surpassent les performances de traduction les plus élevées précédemment signalées dans les environnements multilingues, ainsi que les résultats individuels bilingues. De plus, nos modèles parallèles ne démontrent aucun compromis entre ASR et ST par rapport à l'architecture multitâche standard. Notre code et nos modèles pré-entraînés sont disponibles sur https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.", 'es': 'Presentamos Transformer de doble decodificador, una nueva arquitectura de modelo que realiza conjuntamente el reconocimiento automático de voz (ASR) y la traducción de voz multilingüe (ST). Nuestros modelos se basan en la arquitectura Transformer original (Vaswani et al., 2017) pero constan de dos decodificadores, cada uno responsable de una tarea (ASR o ST). Nuestra principal contribución radica en la forma en que estos decodificadores interactúan entre sí: un decodificador puede atender diferentes fuentes de información del otro mediante un mecanismo de doble atención. Proponemos dos variantes de estas arquitecturas que corresponden a dos niveles diferentes de dependencias entre los decodificadores, denominados Transformadores de decodificador dual paralelo y cruzado, respectivamente. Los extensos experimentos en el conjunto de datos MUST-c muestran que nuestros modelos superan el rendimiento de traducción más alto anteriormente informado en entornos multilingües y también superan los resultados bilingües individuales. Además, nuestros modelos paralelos no demuestran ninguna compensación entre ASR y ST en comparación con la arquitectura multitarea básica. Nuestro código y modelos preentrenados están disponibles en https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'zh': '引入双解码器Transformer,此一新模架构,可合行自语音识(ASR)与多语言语音译(ST)。 吾形于始Transformer架构(Vaswani,2017)于二解码器,各解码器一任(ASRST)。 凡贡在解码器:一解码器可以重机解码器信息源。 此二架构之变体,应解码器之间,谓之并行、交叉双解码器Transformers。 MuST-C 数集之广实验,吾形于多言之先告者,而优于双语一对一者也。 此外,比于常多任务架构,并行于ASRST之间无权衡取舍。 吾代码与豫练之形 https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation。', 'ja': '自動音声認識（ ASR ）と多言語音声翻訳（ ST ）を共同で行う新しいモデルアーキテクチャであるデュアルデコーダトランスフォーマーをご紹介します。 当社のモデルは、元のTransformerアーキテクチャ（ Vaswani et al., 2017 ）に基づいていますが、それぞれ1つのタスク（ ASRまたはST ）を担当する2つのデコーダーで構成されています。 私たちの主な貢献は、これらのデコーダーがどのように相互作用するかにあります。一方のデコーダーは、デュアルアテンションメカニズムを介して他方の異なる情報源に対応することができます。 これらのアーキテクチャの2つのバリアントは、デコーダ間の2つの異なるレベルの依存関係に対応し、それぞれパラレルデコーダトランスフォーマーおよびクロスデュアルデコーダトランスフォーマーと呼ばれます。 MuST - Cデータセットの広範な実験によると、当社のモデルは、多言語設定で以前に報告された最高の翻訳パフォーマンスを上回り、バイリンガルの1対1の結果を上回っています。 さらに、当社の並列モデルは、バニラマルチタスクアーキテクチャと比較して、ASRとSTのトレードオフを示していません。 コードと事前トレーニング済みモデルは、https://github.com/formiel/speech-translationから入手できます。', 'hi': 'हम दोहरी-डिकोडर ट्रांसफॉर्मर पेश करते हैं, एक नया मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर जो संयुक्त रूप से स्वचालित भाषण मान्यता (एएसआर) और बहुभाषी भाषण अनुवाद (एसटी) करता है। हमारे मॉडल मूल ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर (वासवानी एट अल. 2017) पर आधारित हैं, लेकिन इसमें दो डिकोडर शामिल हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक एक कार्य (एएसआर या एसटी) के लिए जिम्मेदार है। हमारा प्रमुख योगदान इस बात में निहित है कि ये डिकोडर एक-दूसरे के साथ कैसे बातचीत करते हैं: एक डिकोडर दोहरे ध्यान तंत्र के माध्यम से दूसरे से विभिन्न सूचना स्रोतों में भाग ले सकता है। हम इन आर्किटेक्चर के दो रूपों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो डिकोडर के बीच निर्भरता के दो अलग-अलग स्तरों के अनुरूप हैं, जिन्हें क्रमशः समानांतर और क्रॉस डुअल-डिकोडर ट्रांसफॉर्मर कहा जाता है। MuST-C डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे मॉडल बहुभाषी सेटिंग्स में पहले से रिपोर्ट किए गए उच्चतम अनुवाद प्रदर्शन से आगे निकलते हैं, और साथ ही साथ द्विभाषी एक-से-एक परिणामों को बेहतर बनाते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारे समानांतर मॉडल वेनिला मल्टी-टास्क आर्किटेक्चर की तुलना में एएसआर और एसटी के बीच कोई व्यापार-बंद प्रदर्शित नहीं करते हैं। हमारे कोड और पूर्व प्रशिक्षित मॉडल https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы внедряем двойной декодер Transformer, новую архитектуру модели, которая совместно выполняет автоматическое распознавание речи (ASR) и многоязычный перевод речи (ST). Наши модели основаны на оригинальной архитектуре трансформатора (Vaswani et al., 2017), но состоят из двух декодеров, каждый из которых отвечает за одну задачу (ASR или ST). Наш основной вклад заключается в том, как эти декодеры взаимодействуют друг с другом: один декодер может обращаться к различным источникам информации от другого через механизм двойного внимания. Предложены два варианта этих архитектур, соответствующие двум разным уровням зависимостей между декодерами, называемым параллельными и кросс-двойными дешифраторами Трансформаторами соответственно. Обширные эксперименты на наборе данных MuST-C показывают, что наши модели превосходят ранее сообщенные наивысшие характеристики перевода в многоязычных настройках, а также превосходят двуязычные результаты один-к-одному. Кроме того, наши параллельные модели демонстрируют отсутствие компромисса между ASR и ST по сравнению с многозадачной архитектурой ванили. Наш код и предварительно обученные модели доступны по адресу https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach Transformer dé-dhíchódóra, ailtireacht eiseamláireach nua a fheidhmíonn i gcomhpháirt le chéile aithint urlabhra uathoibríoch (ASR) agus aistriúchán cainte ilteangach (ST). Tá ár samhlacha bunaithe ar ailtireacht bhunaidh an Trasfhoirmeora (Vaswani et al., 2017) ach tá dhá dhíchódóir iontu, gach ceann acu freagrach as tasc amháin (ASR nó ST). Is é an chaoi a n-idirghníomhaíonn na díchódóirí seo ná an chaoi a n-idirghníomhaíonn na díchódóirí seo: is féidir le díchódóir amháin freastal ar fhoinsí éagsúla faisnéise ón gceann eile trí mheicníocht dé-aire. Molaimid dhá leagan de na hailtireachtaí seo a fhreagraíonn do dhá leibhéal éagsúla spleáchais idir na díchódaithe, ar a dtugtar na Claochladáin dé-dhéchód comhthreomhar agus trasfhoirmeacha, faoi seach. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar thacar sonraí MuST-C go sáraíonn ár gcuid samhlacha an fheidhmíocht aistriúcháin is airde a tuairiscíodh roimhe seo sna suíomhanna ilteangacha, agus go n-éiríonn leo níos fearr ná torthaí dátheangacha duine-le-duine freisin. Ina theannta sin, ní léiríonn ár samhlacha comhthreomhara aon chomhbhabhtáil idir ASR agus ST i gcomparáid leis an ailtireacht iltasc fanaile. Tá ár gcód agus ár múnlaí réamhoilte ar fáil ag https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ ორი-ევკოდირებული ტრანფორმაციელი, ახალი მოდელური აქტიქტიქტურა, რომელიც ერთადერთად ავტომატური სიტყვების განაცნობა (ASR) და მრავა ჩვენი მოდელები პირველ ტრანფორმენსტრისტრისტრის აქტიქტიქტურაზე (Vaswani et al., 2017) დაბაზიან, მაგრამ ორი დეკოდერების შეფარდება, ყოველ ერთი დავაკეთებული (ASR ან ST)  ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება იქნება, როგორ ეს დეკოდერები ერთმანეთთან დაკავშირებულია: ერთი დეკოდერები შეუძლიათ განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის ფორმატებში ერთმანეთიდან დამა ჩვენ გვეძლევთ ორი განრამეტრები ამ აქტიქტიქტურების შესახებ, რომელიც ორი განსხვავებული განრამეტრებების განსახებების დონეზე, რომელიც განსხვავებული განსახებების შორის, რომელიც პერალელი MuST-C მონაცემების კონფიმენტი ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მოდელები უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ დამატებით, ჩვენი პარალელური მოდელები არ აჩვენებენ ASR და ST-ის განმავლობას, რომლებიც განილია მრავალური დავალების აქტიქტიქტურაზე შედგენა. ჩვენი კოდი და წინ შესწავლობული მოდელები შესაძლებელია https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε τον μετασχηματιστή διπλού αποκωδικοποιητή, μια νέα πρότυπη αρχιτεκτονική που εκτελεί από κοινού την αυτόματη αναγνώριση ομιλίας (ASR) και την πολύγλωσση μετάφραση ομιλίας (ST). Τα μοντέλα μας βασίζονται στην αρχική αρχιτεκτονική αλλά αποτελούνται από δύο αποκωδικοποιητές, ο καθένας από τους οποίους είναι υπεύθυνος για μία εργασία (ή ST). Η σημαντική συνεισφορά μας έγκειται στο πώς αλληλεπιδρούν αυτοί οι αποκωδικοποιητές μεταξύ τους: ο ένας αποκωδικοποιητής μπορεί να παρακολουθεί διαφορετικές πηγές πληροφοριών από τον άλλο μέσω ενός μηχανισμού διπλής προσοχής. Προτείνουμε δύο παραλλαγές αυτών των αρχιτεκτονικών που αντιστοιχούν σε δύο διαφορετικά επίπεδα εξαρτήσεων μεταξύ των αποκωδικοποιητών, που ονομάζονται μετασχηματιστές παράλληλου και διασταυρούμενου διπλού αποκωδικοποιητή αντίστοιχα. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα μας ξεπερνούν τις υψηλότερες επιδόσεις μετάφρασης που αναφέρθηκαν προηγουμένως στις πολυγλωσσικές ρυθμίσεις, καθώς και τα δίγλωσσα αποτελέσματα ενός προς ενός. Επιπλέον, τα παράλληλα μοντέλα μας δεν δείχνουν καμία ανταλλαγή μεταξύ ASR και ST σε σύγκριση με την αρχιτεκτονική πολλαπλών εργασιών βανίλιας. Ο κώδικας και τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα μας είναι διαθέσιμα στο https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a dual-dekóder Transformert, egy új modell architektúrát, amely közösen végzi az automatikus beszédfelismerést (ASR) és a többnyelvű beszédfordítást (ST). Modelljeink az eredeti Transformer architektúrán alapulnak (Vaswani et al., 2017), de két dekóderből állnak, amelyek mindegyike felelős egy feladatért (ASR vagy ST). A legfontosabb hozzájárulásunk abban rejlik, hogy ezek a dekóderek miként kölcsönhatnak egymással: az egyik dekóder kettős figyelemmel kísérheti a másiktól eltérő információforrásokat. Ezeknek az architektúráknak két változatát javasoljuk, amelyek megfelelnek a dekódolók közötti két különböző függőségi szintnek, párhuzamos és kereszt-dekódoló transzformátoroknak. A MuST-C adatkészleten végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modelleink a korábban jelentett legmagasabb fordítási teljesítményt túllépik a többnyelvű beállításokban, és túllépik a kétnyelvű egyéni eredményeket is. Ezenkívül párhuzamos modelleink nem mutatnak kompromisszumot az ASR és ST között a vanília multi-task architektúrával összehasonlítva. Kódunk és előre képzett modelleink elérhetők a következő oldalon: https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'it': "Introducemo Transformer dual-decoder, una nuova architettura modello che esegue congiuntamente il riconoscimento vocale automatico (ASR) e la traduzione vocale multilingue (ST). I nostri modelli si basano sull'architettura originale Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017) ma consistono in due decoder, ognuno responsabile di un compito (ASR o ST). Il nostro contributo principale risiede nel modo in cui questi decoder interagiscono tra loro: un decoder può occuparsi di diverse fonti di informazione dall'altro tramite un meccanismo di doppia attenzione. Proponiamo due varianti di queste architetture corrispondenti a due diversi livelli di dipendenze tra i decoder, chiamati Transformers paralleli e cross dual-decoder. Esperimenti approfonditi sul set di dati MuST-C mostrano che i nostri modelli superano le massime prestazioni di traduzione precedentemente riportate nelle impostazioni multilingue e superano anche i risultati one-to-one bilingue. Inoltre, i nostri modelli paralleli non dimostrano alcun compromesso tra ASR e ST rispetto all'architettura multi-task vanilla. Il nostro codice e i modelli pre-addestrati sono disponibili a https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame dviejų dekoderių transformatorių, naują modelio architektūrą, kuri kartu atlieka automatinį kalbos pripažinimą (ASR) ir daugiakalbį kalbos vertimą (ST). Mūsų modeliai grindžiami pradine Transformer architektūra (Vaswani et al., 2017 m.), bet sudaryti iš dviejų dekoderių, kiekvienas atsakingas už vieną užduotį (ASR arba ST). Mūsų pagrindinis indėlis yra tai, kaip šie dekoderiai tarpusavyje sąveikauja: vienas dekoderis gali naudotis skirtingais informacijos šaltiniais per dvigubo dėmesio mechanizmą. Siūlome du šių architektūrų variantus, atitinkančius du skirtingus dekoderių priklausomybės lygius, vadinamus lygiagrečiais ir kryžminiais dvigubo dekoderių transformatoriais. Išsamūs eksperimentai su MuST-C duomenų rinkiniu rodo, kad mūsų modeliai yra didesni už anksčiau praneštus didžiausius vertimo rezultatus daugiakalbėse aplinkybėse ir didesni už dvikalbius vieno vienam rezultatus. Be to, mūsų lygiagretūs modeliai neparodo jokio ASR ir ST kompromiso, palyginti su vanilės kelių užduočių architektūra. Mūsų kodas ir parengti modeliai pateikiami https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'mk': 'Ние го воведуваме двојниот декодер Трансформер, нова моделна архитектура која заедно изведува автоматско препознавање на говорот (АСР) и мултијазичен превод на говорот (СТ). Нашите модели се базирани на оригиналната трансформена архитектура (Васани и ал., 2017), но се состои од два декодери, секој одговорен за една задача (АСР или СТ). Нашиот главен придонес лежи во тоа како овие декодери влијаат меѓусебно: еден декодер може да присуствува на различни извори на информација од другиот преку механизам на двојно внимание. Предложуваме два варијанти од овие архитектури кои одговараат на два различни нива на зависност помеѓу декодерите, наречени паралелни и крстосни двојни декодери трансформери, односно. Експериментите од МУСТ-Ц покажуваат дека нашите модели ги надминуваат највисоките преведувачки резултати во мултијазичните поставувања, како и двојјазичните резултати. Покрај тоа, нашите паралелни модели не покажуваат компромис помеѓу АСР и СТ во споредба со архитектурата на ванила со мултизадачи. Нашиот код и предобучените модели се достапни на https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'kk': 'Біз екі декодер түрлендіруші, жаңа үлгі архитектура, автоматты сөзді анықтау (ASR) мен көп тілді сөзді аудару (ST) архитектурасын келтіреміз. Біздің үлгілеріміз бастапқы Трансформалер архитектурасына негізделген, бірақ бір тапсырманың (ASR не ST) жауап беретін екі декодерден тұрады. Біздің негізгі қатынасыз бұл декодерлер бір-бірімен қалай үйлеспейді: бір декодер бір-бірінен бірнеше мәлімет көзіне қатынауға мүмкін болады. Біз бұл архитектуралардың екі айнымалылығын келтіреміз декодерлердің арасындағы екі айнымалылық тәуелдік деңгейіне сәйкес келетін, параллель және екі деңгейінің түрлендірушілері де MuST- C деректер қорларындағы кеңейтілген тәжірибелер үлгілеріміз бірнеше тілдер параметрлерінде ең жоғары аудармаларды жасап, бірнеше тілде бір- бір нәтижелерді екі тілде жұмыс істейді. Қосымша, біздің параллелі үлгілеріміз ASR мен ST арасындағы бірнеше тапсырма архитектурасына салыстырылмаған тәртіпсіздік көрсетілмейді. Біздің кодымыз мен алдын- ала оқылған моделдеріміз бар https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan Transformer-dekoder dua, arkitektur model baru yang bersama-sama melakukan pengenalan pidato automatik (ASR) dan terjemahan pidato berbilang bahasa (ST). Model kami berdasarkan arkitektur Transformer asal (Vaswani et al., 2017) tetapi terdiri dari dua dekoder, masing-masing bertanggungjawab untuk satu tugas (ASR atau ST). Sumber utama kita adalah bagaimana dekoder ini berinteraksi satu sama lain: satu dekoder boleh menghadiri sumber maklumat berbeza dari yang lain melalui mekanisme perhatian dua. Kami cadangkan dua varian arkitektur ini yang sepadan dengan dua tahap dependensi yang berbeza antara dekoder, dipanggil selari dan saling dekoder-dua Transformer, berdasarkan. Eksperimen luas pada set data MuST-C menunjukkan bahawa model kami melampaui prestasi terjemahan tertinggi yang telah dilaporkan sebelumnya dalam tetapan berbilang bahasa, dan melampaui prestasi serta hasil bilingual satu kepada satu. Selain itu, model paralel kita menunjukkan tiada perdagangan antara ASR dan ST dibandingkan dengan arkitektur multi-tugas vanilla. Our code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരു പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റ് ചേര്\u200dന്ന് സ്വയം സംസാരം തിരിച് Our models are based on the original Transformer architecture (Vaswani et al., 2017) but consist of two decoders, each responsible for one task (ASR or ST).  നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പദാര്\u200dത്ഥങ്ങള്\u200d തമ്മില്\u200d തമ്മില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ്: ഒരു ഡെക്കോഡിയര്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ് ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറുകളില്\u200d രണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നാം പ്രായസ്ത്രീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഡെകോഡേറുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ രണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ആശ്രയിക്ക മുസ്റ്റ്-സി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മുമ്പ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങ് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിട്ട അതിനുമുമ്പ്, നമ്മുടെ പാരാളല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ASR-എസ്റ്റിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യാപാനില്ലാത്ത പല്ലി പണിയുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുമായി  നമ്മുടെ കോഡും പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളും ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'mt': 'We introduce dual-decoder Transformer, a new model architecture that jointly performs automatic speech recognition (ASR) and multilingual speech translation (ST).  Il-mudelli tagħna huma bbażati fuq l-arkitettura oriġinali tat-Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017) iżda jikkonsistu minn żewġ dekoders, kull wieħed responsabbli għal kompitu wieħed (ASR jew ST). Il-kontribut ewlieni tagħna huwa kif dawn id-dekoderi jinteraġixxu ma’ xulxin: dekoder wieħed jista’ jattendi għal sorsi differenti ta’ informazzjoni minn xulxin permezz ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni doppja. Aħna nipproponu żewġ varjanti ta’ dawn l-arkitetturi li jikkorrispondu għal żewġ livelli differenti ta’ dipendenzi bejn id-dekoders, imsejħa t-Trasformaturi b’dekoder doppju paralleli u trasversali, rispettivament. Esperimenti estensivi fuq is-sett tad-dejta MuST-C juru li l-mudelli tagħna jaqbżu l-ogħla prestazzjoni ta’ traduzzjoni rrappurtata qabel fl-ambjenti multilingwi, u jaqbżu wkoll ir-riżultati bilingwi minn wieħed għal ieħor. Barra minn hekk, il-mudelli paralleli tagħna ma juru l-ebda kompromess bejn l-ASR u l-ST meta mqabbel mal-arkitettura b’ħafna kompiti tal-vanilla. Il-kodiċi tagħna u l-mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel huma disponibbli fuq https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy Transformer dwudekoderowy, nową architekturę modelową, która wspólnie wykonuje automatyczne rozpoznawanie mowy (ASR) i wielojęzyczne tłumaczenie mowy (ST). Nasze modele oparte są na oryginalnej architekturze Transformera (Vaswani et al., 2017), ale składają się z dwóch dekoderów, każdy odpowiedzialny za jedno zadanie (ASR lub ST). Nasz główny wkład polega na tym, w jaki sposób dekodery te oddziałują ze sobą: jeden dekoder może korzystać z różnych źródeł informacji od drugiego za pomocą mechanizmu podwójnej uwagi. Proponujemy dwa warianty tych architektur odpowiadające dwóm różnym poziomom zależności między dekoderami, zwanym odpowiednio transformatorami równoległymi i krzyżowymi. Obszerne eksperymenty na zbiorze danych MuST-C pokazują, że nasze modele przewyższają wcześniej zgłaszaną najwyższą wydajność tłumaczenia w ustawieniach wielojęzycznych, a także wyniki dwujęzyczne jeden na jeden. Ponadto nasze modele równoległe nie wykazują żadnych kompromisów między ASR a ST w porównaniu z waniliową architekturą wielozadaniową. Nasz kod i wstępnie przeszkolone modele są dostępne pod adresem: https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'mn': 'Бид хоёр давхар загварын шинэ загварын архитектурыг танилцуулдаг. Автоматикийн ярианы танилцуулалт (ASR) болон олон хэл хэлний хөгжүүлэлт (ST). Бидний загварууд эхний Трансформер архитектур (Vaswani et al., 2017) дээр суурилсан. Гэхдээ нэг ажил (ASR эсвэл ST) дээр хариуцлагатай хоёр загваруудыг бүрддэг. Бидний хамгийн чухал нөлөө нь эдгээр засагчид хоорондоо хэрхэн харилцаж байгааг харуулж байна: нэг засагчид өөр мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрээс хоёр анхаарлын механизмээр оролцож чадна. Бид эдгээр барилгуудын хоёр төрлийн төрлийн өөрчлөлт, зэрэгцээ параллел болон хоёр давхар шилжүүлэгчтэй холбоотой хоёр төрлийн хамааралтай байдалтай холбоотой. МАСТ-С өгөгдлийн сан дээрх олон хэл хэлний тохиолдолд бидний загвар нь өмнө нь мэдээллийн хамгийн өндөр орчуулагдсан хэлбэрийн үйл ажиллагааг дамжуулж, хоёр хэлний нэг-нэг үр дүнг дамжуулж байна. Мөн бидний параллел загварууд АСР болон ST хоорондын худалдааны холбоотой байдлын архитектуртай харьцуулахгүй. Бидний код болон урьд сургалтын загварууд https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer dual- dekoder- transformerer, eit ny modell- arkitektur som kopla utfører automatisk tale- gjenkjenning (ASR) og fleirspråksomsetjing (ST). Modellene våre er basert på den opprinnelige Transformeringsarkitekturen (Vaswani et al., 2017), men inneheld to dekoder, kvar som er ansvarleg for ein oppgåve (ASR eller ST). Vår stor bidrag ligg i korleis desse dekoderane samarbeider med kvarandre: ein dekoder kan delta på ulike informasjonskjelder frå dei andre via ein dobbelt oppmerksmekanisme. Vi foreslår to variantar av disse arkitekturane som tilsvarar to ulike nivå av avhengighet mellom dekoderane, kalla parallelle og kryss-dobbeldekodertransformerer. Ekstra eksperimenter på datasettet MuST- C viser at modelane våre utfører den høgste omsetjinga som er rapportert frå tidlegare i fleirspråk innstillingane, og utfører også bilinguelt resultat av ein til ein. Det parallelle modellen våre viser ingen utvikling mellom ASR og ST i sammenligning med vanilliske multioppgåve-arkitekturen. Våre kode og føretrainerte modeller er tilgjengelege på https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa turjubaanka labaad, dhismo cusub oo wada samaysa aqoonsashada hadalka iskaa maamulka ah (ASR) iyo turjumista hadalka luuqadaha kala duduwan (ST). Our models are based on the original Transformer architecture (Vaswani et al., 2017) but consist of two decoders, each responsible for one task (ASR or ST).  Kharashadaada muhiimka ah waxay ku qoran yihiin sida qodolku midka kale ugu xiriiro: mid koodeynta ah wuxuu ka qeyb geli karaa manfacyada macluumaadka kala duduwan ee midka kale wuxuu ku qoran karaa meymisyo dual-attention. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba kala duwan oo ka mid ah dhismahan oo u eg labada heer oo kala duwan oo ku xiran darajadooda, kuwaas oo lagu magacaabaa tusaale iyo iskutallaabta labada kooban. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadka MuST-C ayaa muujiya in modelladayagu ay sameeyaan muuqashada turjumista ugu sarreeya qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan, wuxuuna sameynayaa matooyin labaad ilaa mid. Furthermore, qaababkayaga lambarka ah waxey muujiyaan wax ka dhexeeya ASR iyo ST, iyadoo la barbarbaro dhismaha shaqaalaha badan ee vanilla ah. Qoraalkayaga iyo modelalka horay loo tababaray waxay ka helaan https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo dvostruku dekodernu transformaciju, novu modelsku arhitekturu koja zajedno izvršava automatsku priznanje govora (ASR) i prevod multijezičkih govora (ST). Naši modeli su zasnovani na originalnoj arhitekturi transformera (Vaswani et al., 2017) ali se sastoje od dva dekodera, svaki odgovoran za jedan zadatak (ASR ili ST). Naš veliki doprinos je u tome kako se ovi dekoderi međusobno mijenjaju: jedan dekoder može prisustvovati različitim izvorima informacija od drugog putem mehanizma dvostruke pažnje. Predlažemo dve varijante ove arhitekture koje odgovaraju dvim različitim nivoima ovisnosti između dekodera, nazvanim paralelnim i krstom dvostrukim transformatorima dekodera. Eksperimenti na setu podataka MuST-C pokazuju da naši modeli izvršavaju najvišu izvedbu prevođenja u multijezičkim nastavama, i izvršavaju i dvojezičke rezultate jedno na jedan. Osim toga, naši paralelni modeli ne pokazuju nikakvu trgovinu između ASR i ST u usporedbi sa vanilskom multi task arhitekturom. Naši kod i predobučeni modeli su dostupni https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'si': 'අපි දුවල් ඩිකොඩර් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා, අළුත් මොඩල් ස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය කතාව අඳුරණය (ASR) සහ ග අපේ මොඩල් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපකය විද්\u200dයාපකය විද්\u200dයාපකය (VaSwai et al., 2017) පරිස්සම් විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තමයි මේ ඩිකොඩර් එක්ක එක්කෙනෙක් එක්ක එක්කෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ කොහොමද කියලා: එක්ක ඩිකොඩර අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ විද්\u200dයාපාර දෙකක් අනුවෙන් වෙනස් ස්ථානය දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විවිධ ස්ථානය දෙකක් විතරයි MuST-C දත්ත සැටේ විසිම පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත වාර්තාවක් ගොඩක් භාෂාව තවත්, අපේ සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩේල් එක්ක ASR සහ ST අතර ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නැහැ වැනිලාව ගොඩක් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් සිද්ධා අපේ කෝඩ් සහ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar dual-decoder Transformer, en ny modellarkitektur som tillsammans utför automatisk taligenkänning (ASR) och flerspråkig talöversättning (ST). Våra modeller är baserade på den ursprungliga Transformer-arkitekturen (Vaswani et al., 2017) men består av två avkodare, var och en ansvarig för en uppgift (ASR eller ST). Vårt viktigaste bidrag ligger i hur dessa dekoder interagerar med varandra: en dekoder kan hantera olika informationskällor från den andra via en mekanism med dubbel uppmärksamhet. Vi föreslår två varianter av dessa arkitekturer som motsvarar två olika nivåer av beroenden mellan dekodrarna, så kallade parallella respektive tvärdubbla dekodrar Transformers. Omfattande experiment på MuST-C-datauppsättningen visar att våra modeller överträffar den tidigare rapporterade högsta översättningsprestandan i flerspråkiga inställningar och överträffar såväl tvåspråkiga en-till-en-resultat. Dessutom visar våra parallella modeller ingen avvägning mellan ASR och ST jämfört med vanilj multi-task arkitektur. Våra kod och förklädda modeller finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ur': 'ہم دوئل دئوڈر ترفنسر کرنے والے کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک نئی مدل معماری جو اتمام کلام کی شناسایی (ASR) اور بہت سی زبان کی ترجمہ کرتی ہے۔ ہمارے مدلز اصلی ترنسفور معماری (Vaswani et al., 2017) پر بنیاد ہیں لیکن دو ڈیکوڈر ہیں، ہر ایک ایک کام کا مسئول ہے (ASR یا ST). ہمارا بڑا حصہ یہ ہے کہ یہ ڈیکوڈر ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ کس طرح تعامل کررہے ہیں: ایک ڈیکوڈر ایک دوسرے سے مختلف معلومات سورجوں کے ذریعہ ایک دوسرے کی توجہ سے حاضر ہو سکتا ہے۔ ہم ان معماروں میں سے دو متفاوت پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو دکوڈر کے درمیان دو متفاوت سطح کے متفاوت ہیں، جن کا نام مختلف ہے اور دوئل دکوڈر تغییر کرنے والے ہیں. MuST-C ڈاٹ سٹ پر بہت زیادہ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدل پہلے سے گزرچے ہوئے بہت سے زیادہ ترجمہ کے عملہ کو مطابق کرتی ہیں اور دوزخ سے ایک دوزخ کے نتیجے بھی اضافہ کرتی ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہمارے مشابل موڈل ASR اور ST کے درمیان کس طرح تجارت نافذ دکھاتے ہیں جو vanilla multi-task architecture کے مقابلہ میں ہے. ہمارے کڈ اور پہلے تربین کی مدل موجود موجود ہیں https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ro': 'Introducem Transformer dual-decoder, un nou model de arhitectură care realizează împreună recunoașterea automată a vorbirii (ASR) și traducerea vorbirii multilingve (ST). Modelele noastre se bazează pe arhitectura originală Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017), dar constau din două decodoare, fiecare responsabil pentru o singură sarcină (ASR sau ST). Contribuția noastră majoră constă în modul în care aceste decodoare interacționează între ele: un decodor poate participa la diferite surse de informație de la celălalt printr-un mecanism de dublă atenție. Propunem două variante ale acestor arhitecturi corespunzătoare a două niveluri diferite de dependențe între decodoare, numite Transformers paralel și transversal dual-decoder, respectiv. Experimentele extinse asupra setului de date MuST-C arată că modelele noastre depășesc performanțele cele mai ridicate traduceri raportate anterior în setările multilingve și depășesc, de asemenea, rezultatele bilingve one-to-one. În plus, modelele noastre paralele nu demonstrează nici un compromis între ASR și ST în comparație cu arhitectura multi-task vanilla. Codul nostru și modelele pre-instruite sunt disponibile la https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ta': 'நாம் இருமுறை குறியீட்டு மாற்றியமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், ஒரு புதிய மாதிரி உருவாக்கம், அது தன்னியக்கமாக பேச்சு குறியீட்டு மற்று Our models are based on the original Transformer architecture (Vaswani et al., 2017) but consist of two decoders, each responsible for one task (ASR or ST).  எங்கள் முக்கிய பங்கள் என்னவென்றால் இந்த குறியீடுகள் ஒருவர் மற்றொருவருடன் தொடர்பு கொள்கிறது: ஒரு குறியீட்டாளர் வேறு தகவல் மூலங்களை  இந்த அட்டவணைகளின் இரண்டு மாறுபாடுகளை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மற்றும் மற்றும் இருமுறை குறியீட்டு மாறுபாடுகளை குறியீட்டுகளுக்கு இடையே  முஸ்டி- C தரவுத்தளத்தில் உள்ள விரிவான சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது முன்னோட்டங்கள் மொழிமொழிமாற்று அமைப்புகளில் மிக அதிக மொழிமாற்று செயல்படுத்து அதற்கு மேலும், எங்கள் இணைய மாதிரிகள் ASR மற்றும் ST இடையே எந்த வியாபாரத்தை காட்டுகிறது வானில்லா பல பணி கட்டுப்பாட்டுகளை ஒப்பி எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள் கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'uz': "Biz ikki marta-decoder tarjima beruvchini (ASR) bilan birlashtirish va bir necha tillar tili tarjima qilish (ST) bilan birlashtirish uchun yangi model arxituvchisi. Bizning modellarimiz asl Transformer arkitektika (Vaswani et al., 2017) asosida asoslangan, lekin bir vazifa (ASR yoki ST) uchun har bir xizmatga ega bo'lgan ikkita kodlash tomonidan iborat. Bizning asosiy qanday qilib, bu kodlash orqali bir-бирлари билан bog'lanishimiz mumkin: bir kodlash boshqa maʼlumot manbaslariga bir ikkita paydo qilish mekaniga qarshi mumkin. Biz bu arxituvlar ikki xil darajaga bog'liq va ikki darajaga bog'liq o'zgarishlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. @ info Ko'rsatganda, bizning parallel modellarimiz ASR va ST orasidagi bir necha vazifalar arxituvchiga kamaytirishni ko'rsatadi. Kodlash va o'rganishdan oldin modellar https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi giới thiệu hai bộ dịch chuyển biến, một công trình mẫu mới tiến hành việc nhận dạng ngôn ngữ tự động (ASR) và dịch ngôn ngữ đa dạng (ST). Các mô hình của chúng ta dựa trên cấu trúc Biến hình gốc (Vasavani et al., tê 7) nhưng có hai bộ giải, mỗi bộ phận chịu trách nhiệm cho một nhiệm vụ (ASR hay ST). Sự đóng góp quan trọng của chúng ta nằm ở cách các bộ giải này phối hợp với nhau: một bộ giải có thể phục vụ các nguồn thông tin khác nhau qua một cơ chế hai phương hướng. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai biến thể của các cấu trúc này tương ứng với hai độ quan hệ khác nhau giữa các bộ giải mã, được gọi là'Biến hình song song giải'và'crop' Transformers. C ác thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên bộ dữ liệu MuST-C cho thấy rằng các mẫu của chúng ta hoàn thành tốt hơn những trình độ dịch cao được báo trước đó trong thiết lập đa dạng, và hoàn thành tốt hơn kết quả Hơn nữa, các mô hình song song của chúng tôi không cho thấy có trao đổi giữa ASR và ST so với cấu trúc đa nhiệm vụ vani. Chúng tôi có sẵn mã và mẫu được huấn luyện https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.", 'bg': 'Представяме трансформатор с двоен декодер, нова архитектура на модела, която съвместно извършва автоматично разпознаване на речта (АСР) и многоезичен превод на речта (СТ). Нашите модели са базирани на оригиналната архитектура на трансформатора (Васвани и др., 2017), но се състоят от два декодера, всеки отговорен за една задача (АСР или СТ). Нашият основен принос е в това как тези декодери взаимодействат помежду си: единият декодер може да се грижи за различни източници на информация от другия чрез механизъм за двойно внимание. Предлагаме два варианта на тези архитектури, съответстващи на две различни нива на зависимост между декодерите, наречени съответно паралелни и кръстосани двойни декодерни трансформатори. Обширни експерименти с набора от данни показват, че нашите модели превъзхождат докладваната по-висока производителност при многоезични настройки и превъзхождат двуезичните резултати. Освен това нашите паралелни модели не демонстрират компромис между АСР и СТ в сравнение с ваниловата многофункционална архитектура. Нашият код и предварително обучени модели са на разположение на https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo dvostruku dekodernu transformaciju, novu modelsku arhitekturu koja zajedno izvršava automatsku priznanje govora (ASR) i prevod višejezičkih govora (ST). Naši modeli su temeljeni na originalnoj arhitekturi transformera (Vaswani et al., 2017) ali se sastoje od dva dekodera, svaki odgovoran za jedan zadatak (ASR ili ST). Naš veliki doprinos je u tome kako se ovi dekoderi međusobno mijenjaju: jedan dekoder može prisustvovati različitim izvorima informacija od drugog putem mehanizma dvostruke pažnje. Predlažemo dvije variante tih arhitektura koje odgovaraju dvije različite nivoe ovisnosti između dekodera, nazvane paralelnim i krstom dvostrukim transformatorima dekodera. Prošireni eksperimenti na skupini podataka MuST-C pokazuju da naši modeli iznose najviši izvještaj prijavljenih prevoda u multijezičkim nastavacima i iznosi i rezultate jedno na jedno na drugo. Osim toga, naši paralelni modeli ne pokazuju nikakvu trgovinu između ASR-a i ST u usporedbi sa multizadatačnom arhitekturom vanila. Naši kod i predobučeni modeli su dostupni na https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer dual-decoder Transformer, en ny model arkitektur, der i fællesskab udfører automatisk talegenkendelse (ASR) og flersproget taleoversættelse (ST). Vores modeller er baseret på den oprindelige Transformer arkitektur (Vaswani et al., 2017), men består af to dekodere, der hver især er ansvarlige for én opgave (ASR eller ST). Vores største bidrag ligger i, hvordan disse dekodere interagerer med hinanden: Den ene dekoder kan håndtere forskellige informationskilder fra den anden via en dobbelt opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Vi foreslår to varianter af disse arkitekturer svarende til to forskellige niveauer af afhængigheder mellem dekoderne, kaldet henholdsvis parallel og tværs dual-dekoder Transformers. Omfattende eksperimenter med MuST-C datasættet viser, at vores modeller overgår den tidligere rapporterede højeste oversættelseseffekt i de flersprogede indstillinger og overgår såvel tosprogede en-til-en-resultater. Desuden viser vores parallelle modeller ingen kompromis mellem ASR og ST sammenlignet med vanilje multi-task-arkitekturen. Vores kode og prætrænede modeller er tilgængelige på https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'nl': 'We introduceren dual-decoder Transformer, een nieuwe modelarchitectuur die gezamenlijk automatische spraakherkenning (ASR) en meertalige spraakvertaling (ST) uitvoert. Onze modellen zijn gebaseerd op de originele Transformer architectuur (Vaswani et al., 2017) maar bestaan uit twee decoders, elk verantwoordelijk voor één taak (ASR of ST). Onze grote bijdrage ligt in de interactie van deze decoders met elkaar: de ene decoder kan via een dual-attention mechanisme verschillende informatiebronnen van de andere bedienen. We stellen twee varianten van deze architecturen voor die overeenkomen met twee verschillende niveaus van afhankelijkheden tussen de decoders, respectievelijk de parallelle en cross dual-decoder Transformers genoemd. Uitgebreide experimenten met de MuST-C dataset tonen aan dat onze modellen beter presteren dan de eerder gerapporteerde hoogste vertaalprestaties in de meertalige instellingen en beter presteren dan tweetalige één-op-één resultaten. Bovendien tonen onze parallelle modellen geen compromis tussen ASR en ST in vergelijking met de vanille multitask architectuur. Onze code en voorgetrainde modellen zijn beschikbaar op https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'de': 'Wir stellen Dual-Decoder Transformer vor, eine neue Modellarchitektur, die gemeinsam automatische Spracherkennung (ASR) und mehrsprachige Sprachübersetzung (ST) durchführt. Unsere Modelle basieren auf der ursprünglichen Transformer-Architektur (Vaswani et al., 2017), bestehen aber aus zwei Decodern, die jeweils für eine Aufgabe (ASR oder ST) verantwortlich sind. Unser Hauptbeitrag liegt darin, wie diese Decoder miteinander interagieren: Ein Decoder kann über einen Dual-Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus unterschiedliche Informationsquellen der anderen bedienen. Wir schlagen zwei Varianten dieser Architekturen vor, die zwei verschiedenen Ebenen von Abhängigkeiten zwischen den Decodern entsprechen, genannt Parallel- und Cross-Dual-Decoder Transformers. Umfangreiche Experimente am MuST-C-Datensatz zeigen, dass unsere Modelle die bisher gemeldete höchste Übersetzungsleistung in den mehrsprachigen Einstellungen und die zweisprachigen Eins-zu-Eins-Ergebnisse übertreffen. Darüber hinaus zeigen unsere parallelen Modelle keinen Kompromiss zwischen ASR und ST im Vergleich zur Vanilla Multi-Task Architektur. Unser Code und vortrainierte Modelle sind verfügbar unter https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan dua dekoder Transformer, sebuah arsitektur model baru yang bersama-sama melakukan pengakuan pidato otomatis (ASR) dan terjemahan pidato multibahasa (ST). Model kami berdasarkan arsitektur Transformer asli (Vaswani et al., 2017) tetapi terdiri dari dua dekoder, masing-masing bertanggung jawab untuk satu tugas (ASR atau ST). Kontribusi utama kami adalah bagaimana dekoder ini berinteraksi satu sama lain: satu dekoder dapat menghadiri sumber informasi yang berbeda dari yang lain melalui mekanisme perhatian ganda. Kami mengusulkan dua varian arsitektur ini yang cocok dengan dua tingkat tergantung antara dekoder, disebut paralel dan salib dua dekoder Transformer, sesuai. Eksperimen ekstensif pada set data MuST-C menunjukkan bahwa model kami melampaui prestasi terjemahan tertinggi yang dilaporkan sebelumnya dalam pengaturan multibahasa, dan melampaui prestasi serta hasil bilingual satu ke satu. Selain itu, model paralel kita menunjukkan tidak ada perdagangan antara ASR dan ST dibandingkan dengan arsitektur multi-tugas vanilla. Kode kami dan model prapelatih tersedia di https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'fa': 'ما تغییر دهندۀ دوگانه را معرفی می کنیم، یک معمار مدل جدید که با هم تشخیص سخنرانی خودکار را انجام می دهد (ASR) و ترجمه سخنرانی متعدد زبان (ST). مدلهای ما بر اساس معماری اصلی تغییر دهنده (Vaswani et al., 2017) بنیاد دارند، ولی از دو دکوردر، هر یک مسئول یک کار (ASR یا ST) است. دسترسی بزرگ ما در اینجا است که چگونه این dekoderها با یکدیگر تعامل می کنند: یک dekoder می تواند به منابع اطلاعات مختلف از یکدیگر از طریق یک مکانیسم دو توجه حاضر شوند. ما دو تغییر از این معماری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با دو سطح متفاوت بستگی بین دکوردور، به عنوان تغییر دهنده\u200cهای پارالل و عبور دو دکورد است. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای MuST-C نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل\u200cهای ما بهترین ترجمه\u200cهای گزارش پیش در تنظیمات زیادی زبان\u200cها را انجام می\u200cدهند و نتیجه\u200cهای یک به یک زبان و یک به یک از دو زبان انجام می\u200cدهند. علاوه بر این، مدل\u200cهای parallel ما هیچ تجارتی بین ASR و ST را در مقایسه با معماری چندین کار vanilla نشان نمی\u200cدهند. کد و مدل پیش آموزش ما در https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ko': '자동 음성인식(ASR)과 다국어 음성번역(ST)을 함께 수행하는 새로운 모델 구조인 듀얼 디코더 변환기를 소개했다.우리의 모델은 원시 변압기 구조(Vaswani 등, 2017)를 바탕으로 하지만 두 개의 디코더로 구성되어 있으며 각 디코더는 하나의 임무(ASR 또는 ST)를 맡는다.우리의 주요 공헌은 이러한 디코더가 어떻게 상호작용하는지에 있다. 하나의 디코더는 이중 주의 메커니즘을 통해 다른 디코더의 서로 다른 정보원을 주목할 수 있다.우리는 이 두 가지 구조의 두 가지 변체를 제시했는데 각각 디코더 간의 두 가지 서로 다른 등급에 대응하는 의존 관계를 병행과 교차 디코더 변환기라고 부른다.MuST-C 데이터 세트의 대량 실험에서 우리의 모델은 다중 언어 환경에서 번역 성능이 이전에 보도된 최고 수준보다 우수하고 이중 언어 일대일의 결과보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.또한 우리의 병행 모델은 일반적인 다중 임무 체계 구조에 비해 ASR과 ST 사이에 균형이 없다는 것을 보여준다.우리의 코드와 사전 교육 모델은https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha Transfer wa Kitambua mara mbili, ujenzi mpya wa muundo unaofanya utambulisho wa kujieleza kwa pamoja (ASR) na tafsiri ya lugha nyingine za lugha (ST). Our models are based on the original Transformer architecture (Vaswani et al., 2017) but consist of two decoders, each responsible for one task (ASR or ST).  Mchango wetu mkubwa unaweka katika jinsi watu hawa wanavyohusiana na wao: Mtoaji mmoja anaweza kuhudhuria vyanzo tofauti vya habari kutoka kwa mwingine kupitia mfumo wa kuchukua hatua mbili. Tunawapendekeza mabadiliko mawili ya majengo haya yanayohusiana na kiwango viwili tofauti cha kutegemea kati ya mabadiliko hayo, yanayoitwa kwa namna fulani ya usambazaji wa mabadiliko ya mabadiliko. Majaribio mengi kwenye seti ya data ya MuST-C yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inaonyesha ufanisi wa tafsiri bora wa zamani uliotangazwa katika mazingira ya lugha mbalimbali, na kutengeneza matokeo ya lugha moja hadi moja. Zaidi ya hayo, mifano yetu ya usambazaji inaonyesha hakuna biashara kati ya ASR na ST ikilinganishwa na ujenzi wa kazi mbalimbali. Kodi zetu na mifano ya zamani yanapatikana katika https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'af': "Ons introduseer tweede- dekoder Transformeerder, 'n nuwe model arkitektuur wat saamstig outomatiese woorde herken (ASR) en multilinguele woorde vertaling (ST). Ons modele is gebaseer op die oorspronklike Transformer-arkitektuur (Vaswani et al., 2017) maar bestaan van twee dekodere, elke verantwoordelik vir een taak (ASR of ST). Ons grootste bydrang lê in hoe hierdie dekoders interaksie met mekaar: een dekoder kan by verskillende inligting bronne van die ander aangaan deur 'n tweede-aandag mekanisme. Ons voorstel twee variante van hierdie arkitektuure wat ooreenstemmend tot twee verskillende vlakke van afhanklikhede tussen die dekodere, wat die parallele en kruis tweede dekoder Transformeerders genoem word, respektief. Name Verder, ons parallele modele wys geen handel-af tussen ASR en ST vergelyk met die vanilla multi-taak-arkitektuur nie. Ons kode en voorafgeleerde modele is beskikbaar by https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.", 'tr': 'Biz ikinji ködleme terjimesini, täze bir nusga arhitektura bilen otomatik çykyş tanyşyrýan (ASR) we köp dilli çykyş terjimesini (ST) tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň modellerimiz orijinal Transformer arhitektura (Vaswani et al., 2017) daýanýar ýöne iki dekoderiň bar, her biri bir işe (ASR ýa ST) üçin sorumlulydyr. Biziň esasy täsirimiz bu dekoderler bir-birimiz bilen nähili etkileşip bilen meňzeşleýär: bir dekoder beýleki malümat çeşmelerine çift-üns mekanizma bilen gatnaşabilir. Biz bu arhitektarlaryň iki çeşitli warianatyny dekoderler arasynda parallel we çizgi dekoderler arasynda tutarlan iki çeşitli derejede teklip edip görýäris. MuST Hemmämiz parallel modellerimiz ASR we ST arasyndaky faýllary vanilla multi-täbli arhitektura karşılaşdyrylmady. Biziň ködlerimiz we öňünden bilinmeli nusgalarymyz bar. https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'am': 'ሁለተኛ-decoder Transfer እናስጠጋለን፣ አዲስ ምሳሌ መሠረት እና የንግግርን ማስታወቂያ (ASR) እና በብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ትርጓሜ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴላዎቻችን የአሁኑን ትርጉም መሠረት (Vaswani et al., 2017) በመሠረት ላይ ናቸው፤ ግን ሁሉም ለአንድ ስራ (ASR ወይም ST) በሚያሳየው ሁለት ድክዳሮች ናቸው፡፡ ታላቂቱ ድጋሜያችን ይህ አዳራቢዎች እርስ በርሳቸው እንዴት እንደሚያያጋራሉ ነው፤ አንዱ ከሌላው በተለየ መረጃ ምንጮች በሁለት ጥያቄ ማሰናከል ማሰናከል ይችላል፡፡ በሁለት ልዩ ደረጃዎች መካከል የሚታየቁ ሁለት መለያየት አካባቢዎች እና በሁለት ልዩ ደረጃዎች መካከል ተቃዋሚዎች እና አካባቢ አካባቢዎች ተሳትተዋል፡፡ በMuST-C ዳታተር ላይ የብዙ ፈተናዎች ምሳሌዎቻችን አስቀድሞ የተዘጋጀውን ትርጓሜዎችን በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ማሳየት እና በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ላይ አንድ ወደ አንዱ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያደርጉ ያሳያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ተያማሪ ሞዴላዎቻችን ASR እና ST መካከል ከንቱ ብዙ የስራ አካውንት ጋር የሚያሳልፉት ነገር የለም፡፡ ኮድማችን እና ቀድሞ ተማሪዎችን https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'az': 'Biz iki-dekoder transformatörü, yeni modeli arhitektür, birlikdə otomatik söz tanıyışı (ASR) və çoxlu dilli söz çevirici (ST) ilə təşkil edirik. Bizim modellərimiz orijinal Transformer arhitektarına dayanılır (Vaswani et al., 2017). Ancaq iki dekoderdən olur, hər biri bir işə (ASR və ST) sorumlu. Bizim böyük qismətimiz bu dekoderlərin bir-birinə necə əlaqə edir: bir dekoder digərindən müxtəlif məlumat kaynaqlarına dual-attention mehanizması vasitəsilə gedə bilər. Biz bu arhitektarların iki dəyişikliyini dekoderlərin arasında olan iki dəyişiklik bağlılığı təklif edirik. MuST-C veri quruluğunda geniş təcrübələr göstərir ki, modellərimiz əvvəlcə bildirilmiş ən yüksək çeviri performansını çoxlu dil quruluşlarında və ikili dil ilə birlikdə təcrübə edirlər. Daha sonra, paralelə modellərimiz ASR-ST arasında bir ticarət dəyişməsini vanilla çoxlu iş arhitektarıyla qarşılaşdırılmaz. Bizim kodumuz və əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş modellərimiz https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'bn': 'আমরা দুই ডেকোডার ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফারের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, একটি নতুন মডেল স্থাপত্য যা স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষণ স্বীকৃতি এবং বহুভাষার ভাষণ অনুবা আমাদের মডেল মূল ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফ্রান্স কাঠামোর ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে (ভাসোয়ানি এন্টাল ২০১৭) কিন্তু দুই ডেকোডারের মধ্যে রয়েছে,  আমাদের প্রধান অংশগ্রহণকারীরা কিভাবে একে অপরের সাথে সাথে যোগাযোগ করছে: এক ডেকোডার একে অন্যের তথ্যের সূত্রে অংশগ্রহণ করতে পারে দু আমরা এই প্রতিষ্ঠানের দুই ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রস্তাব করি, যার নামে প্যারা Extensive experiments on the MuST-C dataset show that our models outperform the previously-reported highest translation performance in the multilingual settings, and outperform as well bilingual one-to-one results.  এছাড়াও, আমাদের প্যারালেল মডেল এসআর এবং এসটির মধ্যে কোন ব্যবসা নেই যা ভ্যানিলা বহু কাজের কাঠামোর তুলনায়। আমাদের কোড এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল পাওয়া যায় https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ca': 'Introduïm Transformer amb doble decodificació, una nova arquitectura model que fa conjuntament el reconeixement automàtic de la fala (ASR) i la traducció multilingüe de la fala (ST). Els nostres models estan basats en l\'arquitectura original Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017) però són dos decoders, cada un responsable d\'una tasca (ASR o ST). La nostra contribució principal consisteix en com aquests decoders interactuan els uns amb els altres: un decoder pot assistir a diferents fonts d\'informació de l\'altre mitjançant un mecanisme de doble atenció. Proposem dues variants d\'aquestes arquitectures que corresponden a dos nivells diferents de dependencies entre els decoders, anomenats "Transformers paral·lels" i "Transformers duals". Els extensos experiments del conjunt de dades MuST-C mostren que els nostres models superen el rendiment de traducció més alt que havien estat notificats abans en les configuracions multilingües, i que també superen els resultats bilingües d\'un a un. A més, els nostres models paralèls no demostren cap compromís entre ASR i ST en comparació amb l\'arquitectura multitasca de vanilla. El nostre codi i els models pré-entrenats estan disponibles a https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo dvostruku dekodernu transformaciju, novu modelsku arhitekturu koja zajedno izvršava automatsku priznanje govora (ASR) i prevod multijezičkih govora (ST). Naši modeli su temeljeni na originalnoj arhitekturi Transformera (Vaswani et al., 2017) ali se sastoje od dva dekodera, svaki odgovoran za jedan zadatak (ASR ili ST). Naš veliki doprinos je u tome kako se ovi dekoderi međusobno mijenjaju: jedan dekoder može prisustvovati različitim izvorima informacija od drugog putem mehanizma dvostruke pažnje. Predlažemo dvije variante tih arhitektura koje odgovaraju dvije različite nivoe ovisnosti između dekodera, nazvane paralelnim i prelaznim transformatorima dvostrukog dekodera. Prošireni eksperimenti na setu podataka MuST-C pokazuju da naši modeli iznose najviši izvještaj prijavljenih prevoda u multijezičkim nastavacima i izvršavaju i dvojezičke rezultate jedno na jedan. Osim toga, naši paralelni modeli ne pokazuju nikakvu trgovinu između ASR i ST u usporedbi s vanilnom multi task arhitekturom. Naši kod i predobučeni modeli su dostupni na https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë Transformuesin me dy dekoder, një arkitekturë të re modeli që kryen së bashku njohjen automatike të fjalës (ASR) dhe përkthimin shumëgjuhës të fjalës (ST). Modelet tona janë bazuar në arkitekturën origjinale të Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017) por përbëhen nga dy dekoderët, secili përgjegjës për një detyrë (ASR apo ST). Kontributi ynë kryesor qëndron në mënyrën se si këta dekoderë ndërveprojnë me njëri-tjetrin: një dekoder mund të ndjekë burime të ndryshme informacioni nga tjetri nëpërmjet një mekanizmi të vëmendjes së dyfishtë. We propose two variants of these architectures corresponding to two different levels of dependencies between the decoders, called the parallel and cross dual-decoder Transformers, respectively.  Extensive experiments on the MuST-C dataset show that our models outperform the previously-reported highest translation performance in the multilingual settings, and outperform as well bilingual one-to-one results.  Furthermore, our parallel models demonstrate no trade-off between ASR and ST compared to the vanilla multi-task architecture.  Our code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'cs': 'Představujeme dvojitý dekodér Transformer, novou modelovou architekturu, která společně provádí automatické rozpoznávání řeči (ASR) a vícejazyčný překlad řeči (ST). Naše modely jsou založeny na původní architektuře Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017), ale sestávají ze dvou dekodérů, každý zodpovědný za jeden úkol (ASR nebo ST). Náš hlavní přínos spočívá v tom, jak tyto dekodéry vzájemně interagují: jeden dekodér může pomocí mechanismu dvojí pozornosti přistupovat k různým informačním zdrojům od druhého. Navrhujeme dvě varianty těchto architektur odpovídající dvěma různým úrovním závislostí mezi dekodéry, tzv. paralelní a křížové transformátory duálního dekodéru. Rozsáhlé experimenty na datové sadě MuST-C ukazují, že naše modely překonávají nejvyšší výkon překladu ve vícejazyčném nastavení a že překonávají stejně jako dvojjazyčné výsledky jednoho na jednoho. Navíc naše paralelní modely nedokazují žádný kompromis mezi ASR a ST ve srovnání s vanilkovou víceúlohovou architekturou. Náš kód a předškolené modely jsou k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'et': 'Tutvustame kahekordset dekooderit Transformerit, uut mudeli arhitektuuri, mis ühiselt teostab automaatset kõnetuvastust (ASR) ja mitmekeelset kõnetõlket (ST). Meie mudelid põhinevad algsel Transformeri arhitektuuril (Vaswani et al., 2017), kuid koosnevad kahest dekoodrist, millest igaüks vastutab ühe ülesande eest (ASR või ST). Meie peamine panus seisneb selles, kuidas need dekoodrid omavahel suhtlevad: üks dekooder võib hoolitseda erinevate teabeallikatega teisest kahesuguse tähelepanu mehhanismi kaudu. Pakume välja kaks varianti nendest arhitektuuridest, mis vastavad kahele erinevale sõltuvustasemele dekoodrite vahel, mida nimetatakse vastavalt paralleelseks ja ristlikuks kahekordseks dekoodriks Transformeriteks. Laiaulatuslikud katsed MuST-C andmekogumiga näitavad, et meie mudelid ületavad varem teatatud kõrgeimat tõlkimisjõudlust mitmekeelsetes seadetes ning ületavad ka kakskeelseid ühele suunatud tulemusi. Lisaks sellele ei näita meie paralleelsed mudelid ASR-i ja ST-i vahelist kompromisse võrreldes vanilje mitme ülesandega arhitektuuriga. Meie kood ja eelkoolitud mudelid on saadaval aadressil https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme dual-decoder Transformerin, uuden malliarkkitehtuurin, joka suorittaa yhdessä automaattisen puheentunnistuksen (ASR) ja monikielisen puheentunnistuksen (ST). Mallimme perustuvat alkuperäiseen Transformer-arkkitehtuuriin (Vaswani et al., 2017), mutta koostuvat kahdesta dekooderista, joista kukin vastaa yhdestä tehtävästä (ASR tai ST). Merkittävä panoksemme on se, miten nämä dekooderit toimivat keskenään: toinen dekooderi voi käsitellä eri tietolähteitä toisesta kaksoishuomion mekanismin avulla. Ehdotamme kahta varianttia näistä arkkitehtuureista, jotka vastaavat kahta erilaista riippuvuustasoa dekooderien välillä, joita kutsutaan rinnakkaisiksi ja ristikkäisiksi kaksoisdekooderimuuntajiksi. Laajat MuST-C-aineiston kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuvat aiemmin raportoidusta korkeimmasta käännöstehokkuudesta monikielisissä asetuksissa ja suoriutuvat sekä kaksikielisistä yhden-to-one-tuloksista. Lisäksi rinnakkaismallit eivät osoita kompromisseja ASR:n ja ST:n välillä verrattuna vaniljan monitehtäväarkkitehtuuriin. Koodimme ja valmiiksi koulutetut mallit ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք երկու դեկոդեր Թանֆորմար, նոր մոդել ճարտարապետություն, որը միասին կատարում է խոսքի ավտոմատիկ ճանաչման (ASR) և բազլեզու խոսքի թարգմանման (ՍՏ). Our models are based on the original Transformer architecture (Vaswani et al., 2017) but consist of two decoders, each responsible for one task (ASR or ST).  Մեր կարևոր ներդրումն այն է, թե ինչպես են այս դեկոդերները փոխազդում միմյանց հետ. մեկը կարող է օգտագործել տարբեր տեղեկատվական աղբյուրներ միմյանց երկու ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք այս ճարտարապետությունների երկու տարբերակ, որոնք համապատասխանում են դեկոդերների երկու տարբեր կախվածության մակարդակին, որը կոչվում է զուգահեռ և խաչված երկու դեկոդերների փոխարինողներ: Extensive experiments on the MuST-C dataset show that our models outperform the previously-reported highest translation performance in the multilingual settings, and outperform as well bilingual one-to-one results.  Ավելին, մեր զուգահեռ մոդելները ցույց են տալիս, որ ASR-ի և ՍՏ-ի միջև ոչ մի փոխազդեցություն չկա, համեմատած բանիլիայի բազմախնդիրների ճարտարապետության հետ: Our code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sistem sing dibenalke Two-decoder Transformer, architecture model sing dibenalke nggawe barang otomatik bukasar (ASR) lan terjamahan akeh langgambar obah (RT). Model sing dumadhi karo architecture sing paling dumadhi Transformer dumadhi (VaSwai et al, 2011) nguasai iki decoder, sapa sampek sebelah saben nggawe task (ASR atawa RT). Ndoleh bener dhéwé kuwi nggawe ngupakan kelas operasi iki dadi sabané karo: decoder sing iso ngejaraké informasi sing sampeyan liyane karo sistem sing wis diputara awak dhéwé Awak dhéwé ngerasai variant sing dibutuhke karo aketuraken iki sakjang liyane karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan karo decoder Name Label Punika ingkang kode lan model sing dibutuhke https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'ha': "We introduce dual-decoder Transformer, a new model architecture that jointly performs automatic speech recognition (ASR) and multilingual speech translation (ST).  MataimakinMu ne a kan asalin aikin Transformer na farko (Wasswani et al., 2017) kuma yana cikin kodi biyu, dukansu mai ɗauki a kan aikin guda (ATR ko S.S. Bayanmu na ƙari a cikin yadda waɗannan kodkodere ke yi haɗuwa da jũna: koda ya iya iya haɗi zuwa sourcen information masu yawa daga ɗayan, a kan wani matsayin dual-muhalli. Tuna ƙayyade wasu biyu masu cikin wannan matsayin da ke daidai da daraja biyu masu daban-dabam tsakanin kode-kodi, da aka yi masa parallel da tsohon-kode-dubu. Cire masu shimfiɗaɗãwa kan tsarin Mustan-C na nuna cewa misãlai masu ƙaranci na fassarar fassarar da aka faɗa a zaman-daidai a cikin kewayen multi-lingui, kuma ka sami da matsala biyu-zuwa-guda. Da wannan, misalinmu masu daidaita sun nuna wani fatauci na tsakanin ANR da S sammenfani da bakin mulki-aikin da aka baka. Ana sami kodi da misalin da za'a iya amfani da https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים טרנספורטר כפול-מתקן, ארכיטקטורת מודל חדשה שמבצעת ביחד זיהוי נאום אוטומטי (ASR) ותרגום נאום רב-שפתי (ST). הדוגמנים שלנו מבוססים על הארכיטקטורה המקורית Transformer (Vaswani et al., 2017) אך מורכבים משני מפענחים, כל אחד אחראי למשימה אחת (ASR או ST). התרומה העיקרית שלנו נמצאת באיך הפיתוחים האלה מתקשרים אחד עם השני: מפיתוח אחד יכול להשתתף במקורות מידע שונים מהשני באמצעות מנגנון תשומת לב כפולה. אנו מציעים שני שונים של הארכיטקטורות הללו שמתאימים לשני רמות שונות של תלויות בין התקציפים, שנקראים במקביל ולצלב התקציפים כפולים, בהתאם. ניסויים רחבים על קבוצת נתונים MuST-C מראים שהדוגמנים שלנו יוצאים מעל ביצועי התרגום הגבוה ביותר שנדווחים קודם במסדרות רבות שפות, ויוצאים גם תוצאות שתיים שפות אחת לאחד. חוץ מזה, הדוגמנים המזוריים שלנו לא מראים שום סחר בין ASR ו ST בהשוואה לארכיטקטורת הונילה multi-task. הקוד שלנו ודוגמנים מאומנים מראש זמינים ב https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'bo': 'We introduce dual-decoder Transformer, a new model architecture that jointly performs automatic speech recognition (ASR) and multilingual speech translation (ST). ང་ཚོའི་མི་དབྱིབས་གཞུང་གིས་ཐོག་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་མཁན་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་སྐྲུན་ལ་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཆེས་མཁན་གྱི་གོ་སྤྲོད་དེ་འདི་ཚོ་ནི་ཇི་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་བཟོ་བཀོད་འདི་ཚོ་གི་བཟོ་རྩིས་གཉིས་དང་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་པ་དབུས་ཀྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གཉིས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཡོད་པ་འདི་དག་བསམ་བླ Extensive experiments on the MuST-C dataset show that our models outperform the previously-reported highest translation performance in the multilingual settings, and outperform as well as bilingual one-to-one results. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་སྔར་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་ASR དང་ST དབར་གྱི་བརྗོད་སྐྱེས་ཚོགས་སྟོན་མི་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདུག https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo dvojni dekodirni transformator, novo arhitekturo modela, ki skupaj izvaja avtomatsko prepoznavanje govora (ASR) in večjezično prevajanje govora (ST). Naši modeli temeljijo na originalni arhitekturi Transformerja (Vaswani et al., 2017), vendar so sestavljeni iz dveh dekoderjev, vsak odgovoren za eno nalogo (ASR ali ST). Naš glavni prispevek je v tem, kako ti sprejemniki medsebojno delujejo: en sprejemnik lahko prek mehanizma dvojne pozornosti poskrbi za različne vire informacij, drugi pa za različne vire informacij. Predlagamo dve različici teh arhitektur, ki ustrezata dvema različnima stopnjama odvisnosti med dekoderji, imenovani paralelni in križni dvojni dekoderni transformatorji. Obsežni poskusi z naborom podatkov MuST-C kažejo, da naši modeli v večjezičnih nastavitvah presegajo predhodno poročano najvišjo učinkovitost prevajanja in tudi dvojezične rezultate enega na enega. Poleg tega naši vzporedni modeli ne kažejo kompromisa med ASR in ST v primerjavi z vanilijevo večopravilno arhitekturo. Naša koda in vnaprej usposobljeni modeli so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/formiel/speech-translation.'}
{'en': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'ar': 'الحل المرجعي للجسر العصبي القائم على التعلم متعدد المهام', 'fr': "Résolution de référence du pontage neuronal basé sur l'apprentissage multitâche", 'es': 'Resolución de referencia de puentes neuronales basada en el aprendizaje multitarea', 'pt': 'Resolução de referência de ponte neural baseada em aprendizado multitarefa', 'ja': 'マルチタスク学習ベースのニューラルブリッジ参照分解能', 'ru': 'Многозадачность Обучение-Основанное Нейронное Мостовое Эталонное Разрешение', 'hi': 'मल्टीटास्क लर्निंग-आधारित तंत्रिका ब्रिजिंग संदर्भ संकल्प', 'zh': '基于多任务学者神经桥接参考解析', 'ga': 'Taifeach Tagartha Idirlinne um Dhroichid Néaracha atá Bunaithe ar Fhoghlaim', 'ka': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'el': 'Πολυtasking βασισμένη στη μάθηση ανάλυση αναφοράς νευρωνικής γεφύρωσης', 'hu': 'Többfeladatú tanulási alapú neurális áthidalási referencia felbontás', 'it': "Risoluzione di riferimento di ponte neurale basata sull'apprendimento multi-task", 'lt': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'kk': 'Көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту негізіндегі нейралық бұрыштыру сілтемесі', 'mk': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'ms': 'Resolusi Rujukan Pergerakan Neural Berdasarkan Belajar Bertugas', 'ml': 'പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്നത്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നെയുറല്\u200d ബ്രിഡിംഗ് റെഫറന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Riżoluzzjoni ta’ Referenza dwar il-Bridging Newrali bbażata fuq it-Tagħlim Multikompiti', 'mn': 'Олон үйл ажиллагааны суралцах сургалтын үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөл', 'no': 'Utlæring av fleire oppgåver basert på neutral bridging referanse', 'pl': 'Wielozadaniowa rozdzielczość referencyjna oparta na uczeniu się', 'ro': 'Rezoluție de referință pentru conectarea neurală bazată pe învățare multiplă', 'sr': 'Резолюција референција за научавање на многозадачи', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ක්\u200dරියාව ඉගෙන ගන්න- ආධාරිත නිර්මාණික බ්\u200dරිජින්ග් ප්\u200dරවේශන විශේෂණය', 'so': 'Saamayn la xiriira barbaarinta neurada ee aasaasiga ah', 'sv': 'Referenslösning för neural överbryggning med flera uppgifter', 'ta': 'பல பணி படிக்க- அடிப்படையான நெருக்கல் பிரிட்டிங் குறிப்பு திரைத்திறன்', 'ur': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhiều nhiệm vụ về giáo dục thần kinh', 'da': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'nl': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolutie', 'bg': 'Референтна резолюция на невронните мостове, базирана на многозадачи, базирана на учене', 'hr': 'Referenčna rezolucija na osnovu učenja brojnih zadataka', 'de': 'Multitasking Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'id': 'Resolusi Referensi Perjemputan Neural Berdasarkan Belajar Multitask', 'fa': 'راه حل مربوط به یادگیری مجدد کار', 'tr': 'Çoklu täblisaň öwrenmesi barada näral terjime Etkinleşigi Çaşyrma', 'sw': 'Hudumu ya Kufundisha Neural ya Kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi', 'ko': '다중 임무 학습 기반의 신경 브리지 참조 해상도', 'af': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Resolucioni i Referencës për Rrjedhjen Neurale Bazuar në Mësimin e Shumë Detyrave', 'hy': 'Բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրությամբ հիմնված նյարդային հաղորդակցման վերլուծություն', 'az': 'Çoxlu task öyrənmə-tabanlı nöral Bridging Reference Resolution', 'bs': 'Rezolucija na osnovu učenja brojnih zadataka na Neuralnoj Bridging', 'bn': 'বহুকাজ শিক্ষা-ভিত্তিক নিউরাল ব্রিডিং রেফারেন্স রিসিউলেশন', 'ca': "Resolució de referència de combinació neuronal basada en l'aprenentatge multitasca", 'et': 'Mitme ülesandega õppimisel põhinev neuraalside sideme võrdluslahendus', 'cs': 'Víceúlohové referenční rozlišení neuronového přemostění založené na učení', 'fi': 'Multitask Learning Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution', 'jv': 'Multitask Learning-bazed Neral Bredging reference Resolution', 'he': 'פתרון התייחסות לחברה נוירולית מבוסס על למידה רבה משימות', 'sk': 'Referenčna resolucija nevralnega povezovanja na podlagi večopravilnega učenja', 'ha': 'Reference Reference Result', 'bo': 'Multitask Learning-Based Neural Bridging Reference Resolution'}
{'en': 'We propose a multi task learning-based neural model for resolving bridging references tackling two key challenges. The first challenge is the lack of large corpora annotated with bridging references. To address this, we use multi-task learning to help bridging reference resolution with coreference resolution. We show that substantial improvements of up to 8 p.p. can be achieved on full bridging resolution with this architecture. The second challenge is the different definitions of bridging used in different corpora, meaning that hand-coded systems or systems using special features designed for one corpus do not work well with other corpora. Our neural model only uses a small number of corpus independent features, thus can be applied to different corpora. Evaluations with very different bridging corpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI and SCICORP) suggest that our architecture works equally well on all corpora, and achieves the SoTA results on full bridging resolution for all corpora, outperforming the best reported results by up to 36.3 p.p..', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا قائمًا على التعلم متعدد المهام لحل المراجع المترابطة التي تعالج تحديين رئيسيين. التحدي الأول هو عدم وجود مجموعات كبيرة مشروحة بمراجع موصلة. لمعالجة هذا الأمر ، نستخدم التعلم متعدد المهام للمساعدة في ربط القرار المرجعي بدقة المرجع. نظهر أن هناك تحسينات كبيرة تصل إلى 8 ص. يمكن تحقيقه على قرار تجسير كامل مع هذه البنية. التحدي الثاني هو التعريفات المختلفة للتجسير المستخدمة في مجموعات مختلفة ، مما يعني أن الأنظمة أو الأنظمة المشفرة يدويًا باستخدام ميزات خاصة مصممة لمجموعة واحدة لا تعمل بشكل جيد مع المؤسسات الأخرى. يستخدم نموذجنا العصبي عددًا صغيرًا من الميزات المستقلة عن الجسم ، وبالتالي يمكن تطبيقه على مجموعات مختلفة. تشير التقييمات مع مجموعات تجسيرية مختلفة تمامًا (ARRAU و ISNOTES و BASHI و SCICORP) إلى أن هندستنا تعمل بشكل جيد على قدم المساواة في جميع المؤسسات ، وتحقق نتائج SoTA على حل تجسير كامل لجميع الشركات ، متفوقة في الأداء على أفضل النتائج المبلغ عنها بما يصل إلى 36.3 صفحة.', 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo neural baseado em aprendizado multitarefa para resolver referências de ponte abordando dois desafios principais. O primeiro desafio é a falta de grandes corpora anotados com referências de ponte. Para resolver isso, usamos o aprendizado multitarefa para ajudar a unir a resolução de referência com a resolução de correferência. Mostramos que melhorias substanciais de até 8 p.p. pode ser alcançado em resolução de ponte completa com esta arquitetura. O segundo desafio são as diferentes definições de bridging usadas em diferentes corpora, o que significa que sistemas codificados à mão ou sistemas que usam recursos especiais projetados para um corpus não funcionam bem com outros corpora. Nosso modelo neural usa apenas um pequeno número de recursos independentes de corpus, portanto, pode ser aplicado a diferentes corpora. Avaliações com corpora de bridging muito diferentes (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI e SCICORP) sugerem que nossa arquitetura funciona igualmente bem em todos os corpora e alcança os resultados SoTA na resolução de bridging total para todos os corpora, superando os melhores resultados relatados em até 36,3 p.p..', 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo neuronal basado en el aprendizaje multitarea para resolver referencias puente que abordan dos desafíos clave. El primer desafío es la falta de grandes cuerpos anotados con referencias puente. Para abordar esto, utilizamos el aprendizaje multitarea para ayudar a unir la resolución de referencia con la resolución de correferencias. Demostramos que se pueden lograr mejoras sustanciales de hasta 8 puntos porcentuales en la resolución de puente completa con esta arquitectura. El segundo desafío son las diferentes definiciones de puente utilizadas en los diferentes cuerpos, lo que significa que los sistemas codificados a mano o los sistemas que utilizan características especiales diseñadas para un corpus no funcionan bien con otros cuerpos. Nuestro modelo neuronal solo utiliza un pequeño número de características independientes del cuerpo, por lo que se puede aplicar a diferentes cuerpos. Las evaluaciones con cuerpos puente muy diferentes (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI y SCICORP) sugieren que nuestra arquitectura funciona igual de bien en todos los corpora y logra los resultados SoTa en la resolución total de puentes para todos los corpora, superando los mejores resultados reportados en hasta 36,3 p.p.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle neuronal basé sur l'apprentissage multitâche pour résoudre les références de pontage répondant à deux défis clés. Le premier défi est l'absence de grands corpus annotés avec des références passerelles. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous utilisons l'apprentissage multitâche pour aider à établir un pont entre la résolution de référence et la résolution de coréférence. Nous montrons que des améliorations substantielles allant jusqu'à 8 p.p. peuvent être obtenues sur la résolution de pontage complète avec cette architecture. Le deuxième défi concerne les différentes définitions du pontage utilisées dans différents corpus, ce qui signifie que les systèmes codés à la main ou les systèmes utilisant des caractéristiques spéciales conçues pour un corpus ne fonctionnent pas bien avec d'autres corpus. Notre modèle neuronal n'utilise qu'un petit nombre de caractéristiques indépendantes du corps et peut donc être appliqué à différents corpus. Les évaluations avec des corpus de transition très différents (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI et SCICORP) suggèrent que notre architecture fonctionne également bien sur tous les corpus et atteint les résultats SoTA sur la résolution de pontage complète pour tous les corpus, surpassant les meilleurs résultats rapportés jusqu'à 36,3 p.p.", 'ja': '私たちは、2つの主要な課題に取り組むための橋渡し参照を解決するためのマルチタスク学習ベースのニューラルモデルを提案します。 最初の課題は、ブリッジリファレンスで注釈された大きなコーラの欠如です。 これに対処するために、私たちはマルチタスク学習を使用して、参照解像度とコアリファレンス解像度を橋渡しするのに役立ちます。 このアーキテクチャとの完全な橋渡し解像度で最大8 ppの大幅な改善が可能であることを示しています。 2つ目の課題は、異なるコーパスで使用されるブリッジの異なる定義であり、つまり、ハンドコーディングされたシステムまたは1つのコーパスのために設計された特別な機能を使用するシステムは、他のコーパスではうまく動作しないことを意味します。 当社のニューラルモデルは、少数のコーパスに依存しない特徴のみを使用するため、異なるコーパスに適用することができます。 非常に異なる橋渡し法人（ Arrau、ISNOTES、BASHI、SCICORP ）による評価では、当社のアーキテクチャはすべての法人で同等に機能し、すべての法人の完全な橋渡し解決でSoTAの結果を達成し、最大36.3 ppの最高の報告結果を上回っていることが示唆されています。', 'zh': '吾为多任务学之神经,以决桥接引,以决两机。 首挑战为乏用桥接参考文献注大语料库。 为此者,用多任务学以助参分辨率与共推理分辨率相闻也。 吾明用此架构,于全桥接分辨率下可以达8 p.p.之实质性。 二挑战者,异语料库之桥接异义也,手动编码之统与一语料库之殊功之统不可善与语料库合也。 吾神经但用少与语料库无关,故可施于语料库。 用非常之桥接语料库(ARRAU,ISNOTES,BASHI与SCICORP)之评明,吾架构于所有语料库上皆有效,而尽得于诸语料库之全桥接分辨率,SoTA于告者36.3 p.p.。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем многозадачную обучающую нейронную модель для разрешения мостиковых ссылок, решающих две ключевые задачи. Первая проблема заключается в отсутствии крупных корпусов, снабженных связующими ссылками. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы используем многозадачное обучение, чтобы помочь соединить разрешение ссылки с разрешением ядра. Мы показываем что существенные улучшения до 8 p.p. можно достигнуть на полном разрешении моста с этой архитектурой. Вторая проблема заключается в том, что различные определения моста, используемые в различных корпусах, означают, что системы, закодированные вручную, или системы, использующие специальные функции, предназначенные для одного корпуса, плохо работают с другими корпусами. Наша нейронная модель использует только небольшое количество независимых от тела признаков, поэтому может быть применена к различным телам. Оценки с очень различными мостиковыми корпусами (Arrau, ISNOTES, BASHI и SCICORP) предполагают, что наша архитектура работает одинаково хорошо на всех корпусах, и достигает результатов SoTA на полном разрешении мостика для всех корпусов, превосходя лучшие сообщенные результаты до 36,3 п.п.', 'hi': 'हम दो प्रमुख चुनौतियों से निपटने वाले ब्रिजिंग संदर्भों को हल करने के लिए एक बहु कार्य सीखने-आधारित तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पहली चुनौती ब्रिजिंग संदर्भों के साथ एनोटेट किए गए बड़े कॉर्पोरेट की कमी है। इसे संबोधित करने के लिए, हम सह-संदर्भ रिज़ॉल्यूशन के साथ संदर्भ रिज़ॉल्यूशन को ब्रिज करने में मदद करने के लिए मल्टी-टास्क लर्निंग का उपयोग करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि इस वास्तुकला के साथ पूर्ण ब्रिजिंग रिज़ॉल्यूशन पर 8 पी.पी. तक के पर्याप्त सुधार प्राप्त किए जा सकते हैं। दूसरी चुनौती विभिन्न कॉर्पोरेट में उपयोग की जाने वाली ब्रिजिंग की विभिन्न परिभाषाएं हैं, जिसका अर्थ है कि एक कॉर्पस के लिए डिज़ाइन की गई विशेष सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके हाथ से कोडित सिस्टम या सिस्टम अन्य कॉर्पोरेट के साथ अच्छी तरह से काम नहीं करते हैं। हमारा तंत्रिका मॉडल केवल कॉर्पस स्वतंत्र सुविधाओं की एक छोटी संख्या का उपयोग करता है, इस प्रकार विभिन्न कॉर्पोरेट पर लागू किया जा सकता है। बहुत अलग ब्रिजिंग कार्पोरा (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI और SCICORP) के साथ मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारी वास्तुकला सभी कॉर्पोरेट पर समान रूप से अच्छी तरह से काम करती है, और सभी कॉर्पोरेट के लिए पूर्ण ब्रिजिंग रिज़ॉल्यूशन पर SoTA परिणाम प्राप्त करती है, 36.3 p.p. तक सबसे अच्छे परिणामों को पछाड़ती है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid samhail néarach il-thasc foghlama-bhunaithe chun tagairtí idirlinne a réiteach agus dul i ngleic le dhá phríomhdhúshlán. Is é an chéad dúshlán atá ann ná an easpa mór-chorpóra atá anótáilte le tagairtí idirlinne. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt air seo, bainimid úsáid as foghlaim ilthasc chun cabhrú le réiteach tagartha a nascadh le réiteach croí-chomhdhála. Léirímid go bhfuil feabhsuithe substaintiúla suas le 8 p.p. is féidir é a bhaint amach ar réiteach idirlinne iomlán leis an ailtireacht seo. Is é an dara dúshlán na sainmhínithe éagsúla ar an droichead a úsáidtear i gcorpas difriúil, rud a chiallaíonn nach n-oibríonn córais lámhchódaithe nó córais a úsáideann gnéithe speisialta atá deartha do chorpas amháin go maith le corpas eile. Ní úsáideann ár múnla néarúil ach líon beag gnéithe corpais neamhspleácha, mar sin is féidir iad a chur i bhfeidhm ar chorpas éagsúil. Tugann measúnuithe le corpora droichid an-difriúil (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI agus SCICORP) le fios go n-oibríonn ár n-ailtireacht chomh maith céanna ar gach corpora, agus go mbaintear amach torthaí SoTA ar réiteach idirlinne iomlán do gach corparáid, ag sárú na dtorthaí tuairiscithe is fearr suas le 36.3 lch.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο πολλαπλών εργασιών βασισμένο στη μάθηση για την επίλυση γεφυρωτικών αναφορών που αντιμετωπίζουν δύο βασικές προκλήσεις. Η πρώτη πρόκληση είναι η έλλειψη μεγάλων σωμάτων σχολιασμένων με γεφυρωτικές αναφορές. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό, χρησιμοποιούμε τη μάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για να βοηθήσουμε στη γεφύρωση της επίλυσης αναφοράς με την ανάλυση της συνάφειας. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι μπορούν να επιτευχθούν ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις έως 8 p.p. σε πλήρη γεφύρωση της ανάλυσης με αυτή την αρχιτεκτονική. Η δεύτερη πρόκληση είναι οι διαφορετικοί ορισμοί της γεφύρωσης που χρησιμοποιούνται σε διαφορετικά σώματα, πράγμα που σημαίνει ότι χειροκωδικοποιημένα συστήματα ή συστήματα που χρησιμοποιούν ειδικά χαρακτηριστικά σχεδιασμένα για ένα σώμα δεν λειτουργούν καλά με άλλα σώματα. Το νευρικό μας μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί μόνο ένα μικρό αριθμό ανεξάρτητων σωμάτων χαρακτηριστικών, έτσι μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε διαφορετικά σώματα. Αξιολογήσεις με πολύ διαφορετικά σώματα γεφύρωσης (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI και SCICORP) δείχνουν ότι η αρχιτεκτονική μας λειτουργεί εξίσου καλά σε όλα τα σώματα και επιτυγχάνει τα αποτελέσματα σε πλήρη ανάλυση γεφύρωσης για όλα τα σώματα, ξεπερνώντας τα καλύτερα αναφερθέντα αποτελέσματα μέχρι 36.3 π.p.p.', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy többfeladatos tanuláson alapuló neurális modellt a két kulcsfontosságú kihívás kezelésére. Az első kihívás a nagy korpuszok hiánya, amelyeket áthidaló hivatkozásokkal jegyzeteltek. Ennek megoldásához többfeladatos tanulást használunk a referenciafelbontás és a coreferencia felbontás áthidalásához. Megmutatjuk, hogy a teljes áthidaló felbontás mellett akár 8 p.p.-ig is jelentős javulást lehet elérni. A második kihívás a különböző korpuszokban használt hidak különböző definíciói, ami azt jelenti, hogy a kézzel kódolt rendszerek vagy rendszerek, amelyek speciális funkciókat használnak egy korpuszhoz, nem működnek jól más korpuszokkal. Neurális modellünk csak kis számú korpusz független tulajdonságot használ, így alkalmazható különböző korpuszokra. A nagyon különböző áthidaló társaságokkal (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI és SCICORP) végzett értékelések azt sugallják, hogy architektúránk egyformán működik minden társaságon, és eléri a SotA eredményeket a teljes áthidaló felbontásban minden társaság esetében, a legjobb bejelentett eredményeket akár 36,3 p.p.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მრავალური დავასწავლით ნეიროლური მოდელი, რომელიც ორი კლავის გამოსახულების გასაკეთებლად გავაკეთებთ რეფერენციების გარეშე. პირველი გამოსახულება არის დიდი კოპორაის არსებობა, რომელიც გადაწყენებული რეფერენციებით. ამის შესახებ, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მრავალ დავასწავლებელი განსწავლებელი განსწავლებელების შესახებ შესახებ რეფერენციის განსწავლებელების შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ 8 წლის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესაძლებლობა შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ ამ არქტიქტურის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესაძლებელია. მეორე განსაზღვრება არის განსხვავებული განსაზღვრებები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული კოპორაში გამოყენებულია. ეს ნიშნავს, რომ პირადი კოდირებული სისტემი ან სისტემი გამოყენებული სპეციალური განსა ჩვენი ნეიროლური მოდელი გამოყენება მხოლოდ პატარა რაოდენობა კორპუსს განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციები, რაც შეიძლება გამოყენება განსხვავებული კორპ განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ძალიან განსხვავებული ბრიგური კოპორაზე (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI და SCICORP) იყველას, რომ ჩვენი არქტიქტურა მსგავსია ყველა კოპორაზე მუშაობა და სოტა წარმოდგენა ყველა კოპორაზე, რომელიც საუკეთესო შესახებ', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello neurale multi-task basato sull'apprendimento per risolvere i riferimenti di bridge affrontando due sfide chiave. La prima sfida è la mancanza di grandi corpora annotati con riferimenti di bridge. Per risolvere questo problema, utilizziamo l'apprendimento multi-task per aiutare a collegare la risoluzione di riferimento con la risoluzione di coreferenza. Mostriamo che miglioramenti sostanziali fino a 8 p.p. possono essere raggiunti con una risoluzione completa di ponte con questa architettura. La seconda sfida sono le diverse definizioni di bridging utilizzate in diversi corpora, il che significa che sistemi codificati a mano o sistemi che utilizzano caratteristiche speciali progettate per un corpus non funzionano bene con altri corpora. Il nostro modello neurale utilizza solo un piccolo numero di caratteristiche indipendenti del corpo, quindi può essere applicato a diversi corpi. Valutazioni con corpora bridging molto diverse (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI e SCICORP) suggeriscono che la nostra architettura funziona ugualmente bene su tutti i corpora, e raggiunge i risultati SotA sulla risoluzione completa di bridging per tutti i corpora, superando i migliori risultati riportati fino a 36,3 p.p.", 'kk': 'Біз көп тапсырманың оқыту негізгі неврал үлгісін шешу үшін көп тапсырма үлгісін ұсынамыз. Бірінші мәселе - үлкен корпора сілтемелерімен байланысты. Бұл көп тапсырманы шешуге көмектесу үшін бірнеше тапсырманың оқытуын қолданамыз. Біз осы архитектураның толық бөлімінде 8 күн дейін көп жақсартылығын көрсетуге болады. Екінші мәселе - басқа корпорада қолданылатын жүйелер не жүйелер, бір корпус үшін құрылған арнаулы мүмкіндіктерді қолдану үшін басқа корпорада жақсы жұмыс істемейді. Біздің невралдық моделіміз тек корпус тәуелсіз мүмкіндіктер санын қолданады, сондықтан бөлек корпораға қолдануға болады. Біздің архитектурамыздың барлық корпораға тең жұмыс істейтін бағалаулар (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI және SCICORP) бағалау үшін әр түрлі корпораға тең жұмыс істейтін жұмыс істейді. SoTA нәтижелерін барлық корпораға толық бөлшектеу үшін жеткізеді,', 'mk': 'Предложуваме мултизадачен нервен модел заснован на учење за решавање на мостовите референции за решавање на двата клучни предизвици. The first challenge is the lack of large corpora annotated with bridging references.  За да го решиме ова, користиме мултизадачно учење за да помогнеме да се премести референтната резолуција со резолуција на соодветност. Ние покажуваме дека значителните подобрувања од до 8 часот попладне може да се постигнат со целосна резолуција на мостот со оваа архитектура. The second challenge is the different definitions of bridging used in different corpora, meaning that hand-coded systems or systems using special features designed for one corpus do not work well with other corpora.  Нашиот нервен модел користи само мал број независни карактеристики на корпусот, па може да се примени на различни корпуси. Evaluations with very different bridging corpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI and SCICORP) suggest that our architecture works equally well on all corpora, and achieves the SoTA results on full bridging resolution for all corpora, outperforming the best reported results by up to 36.3 p.p.', 'lt': 'Siūlome daugelį užduočių grindžiamą mokymosi būdu pagrįstą neurologinį model į siekiant išspręsti tarpines nuorodas, skirtas dviem pagrindiniams uždaviniams spręsti. Pirmasis iššūkis yra didelio korporo trūkumas, užfiksuotas nuorodomis į tiltus. Siekdami spręsti šį klausimą, mes naudojame mokymąsi įvairiomis užduotimis, kad padėtume susieti orientacinę rezoliuciją su koreferencine rezoliucija. Mes rodome, kad iki 8 p.m. gali būti padaryti esminiai patobulinimai visiškai pertvarkant šią architektūrą. Antrasis iššūkis yra skirtingos skirtingose korporose naudojamos tiltų sąvokos, t. y. rankiniu kodu pažymėtos sistemos arba sistemos, naudojančios specialias vieno korpuso savybes, neveikia gerai su kita korpora. Mūsų nervinis modelis naudoja tik nedidelį kūno nepriklausomų savybių skaičių, todėl gali būti taikomas skirtingoms kūno savybėms. Vertinimai su labai skirtingais tiltų korporais (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI ir SCICORP) rodo, kad mūsų architektūra veikia vienodai gerai visoms korporams, ir pasiekti SoTA rezultatus dėl visiško tiltų pertvarkymo visoms korporams, geriausiai pranešus rezultatus iki 36,3 p.p.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model saraf berbagai tugas berasaskan pembelajaran untuk memecahkan rujukan sambungan yang mengatasi dua cabaran utama. Tandakan pertama adalah kekurangan corpora besar yang dicatat dengan rujukan jembatan. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami menggunakan pembelajaran multi-tugas untuk membantu menyambung resolusi rujukan dengan resolusi rujukan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa peningkatan yang besar sehingga 8 p.p. boleh dicapai pada resolusi penuh jambatan dengan arkitektur ini. Tandakan kedua ialah definisi yang berbeza tentang jembatan yang digunakan dalam korpra yang berbeza, bermakna bahawa sistem-kod tangan atau sistem menggunakan ciri-ciri istimewa yang direka untuk satu korpus tidak berfungsi dengan baik dengan korpra lain. Model saraf kita hanya menggunakan sejumlah kecil ciri-ciri independen corpus, jadi boleh dilaksanakan pada korpra yang berbeza. Evaluasi dengan korpora yang sangat berbeza (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI dan SCICORP) menyarankan bahawa arkitektur kita bekerja sama dengan baik pada semua korpra, dan mencapai keputusan SoTA pada resolusi penuh jembatan untuk semua korpra, melampaui keputusan terbaik yang dilaporkan sehingga 36.3 p.p.', 'ml': 'ബ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങിന്റെ രേഖകള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായസ്ത്രീ ആദ്യത്തെ വ്യാല്\u200dക്കെല്ലാം ബ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ രേഖകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോറയുടെ കുറവാണ്. ഇതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന് സഹായിക്കാന നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഈ സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ബ്രിഡിങ്ങ് റിസ്റ്റേഷനില്\u200d എത്തിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നത രണ്ടാമത്തെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ബ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വിശദീകരണങ്ങളാണ്, അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം  നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ചെറിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ സ്വാതന്ത്രതയുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ, അതു വളരെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI, SCICORP) നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ട് എല്ലാ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയിലും ഒരുപോലെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു എന്നും, എല്ലാ കോര്\u200dപ', 'mn': 'Бид олон ажлын суралцах сургалтын мэдрэлийн загварыг хоёр чухал сорилтуудыг зориулахын тулд олон ажлын загвар суралцах загварыг сануулдаг. Эхний сорилт бол том корпорацийн бус байдал юм. Үүнийг хэлэхэд бид олон ажлын суралцлага ашиглаж буй хариултын шийдвэрлэлийг сайжруулахад тусалдаг. Бид 8 цагт хүртэл маш их сайжруулалт гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хоёр дахь сорилт нь өөр корпоратад хэрэглэгддэг шинэ тодорхойлолтууд юм. Энэ нь гар кодлогдсон систем эсвэл систем, нэг корпоратын төлөө зохион өөр өөр корпоратын төлөө бүтээгдэхүүнтэй сайн ажиллах Бидний мэдрэлийн загвар зөвхөн жижиг хэмжээний тогтнолтой байрлал ашигладаг. Иймээс өөр корпора дээр ашиглаж болно. Өөр өөр хэлбэрийн корпора (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI болон SCICORP) гэх мэт дүгнэлт нь бидний барилгууд бүх корпора дээр адилхан ажиллаж, бүх корпора дээрх бүрэн шийдвэрлэлтийн үр дүнг гаргаж, хамгийн сайн мэдэгдсэн үр дүнг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг сануулдаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna qed nipproponu mudell newrali bbażat fuq it-tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti biex jiġu solvuti referenzi li jgħaqqdu flimkien li jindirizzaw żewġ sfidi ewlenin. L-ewwel sfida hija n-nuqqas ta’ korpora kbira annotata b’referenzi ta’ pont. Biex nindirizzaw dan, aħna nużaw tagħlim multikompiti biex ngħinu fil-pont tar-riżoluzzjoni ta’ referenza mar-riżoluzzjoni ta’ koreferenza. Aħna nuru li titjib sostanzjali sa 8 p.p. jista’ jinkiseb b’riżoluzzjoni sħiħa ta’ pont ma’ din l-arkitettura. It-tieni sfida hija d-definizzjonijiet differenti ta’ pont użati f’korpra differenti, li jfisser li sistemi jew sistemi kkodifikati bl-idejn li jużaw karatteristiċi speċjali ddisinjati għal korpus wieħed ma jaħdmux tajjeb ma’ korpra oħra. Il-mudell newrali tagħna juża biss numru żgħir ta’ karatteristiċi indipendenti tal-korpus, u għalhekk jista’ jiġi applikat għal korpura differenti. Evalwazzjonijiet b’korpra li tgħaddi minn pont differenti ħafna (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI u SCICORP) jissuġġerixxu li l-arkitettura tagħna taħdem bl-istess mod tajjeb fuq il-korpra kollha, u tikseb ir-riżultati tas-SoTA dwar riżoluzzjoni sħiħa tal-pont għall-korpra kollha, li taqbeż l-aħjar riżultati rrappurtati sa 36.3 p.p.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein fleire oppgåver basert neuralmodell for å løysa brideringsreferanser med to nøkkelutfordringar. Den første utfordringen er manglinga av stor korpora merkt med brytingsreferanser. For å handtera dette, bruker vi fleire oppgåver læring for å hjelpa å bryta referansløysing med oppløysing av koreferansen. Vi viser at substantielle forbedringar i opp til 8:00 kan oppnå ved fullstendig brytingsoppløysing med denne arkitekturen. Den andre utfordringen er dei forskjellige definisjonane av brytinga som vert brukt i ulike korpora, som betyr at handkode systemer eller systemer som brukar spesielle funksjonar som er lagt for ei korpora ikkje fungerer godt med andre korpora. Vår neuralmodell brukar berre liten tal korpus uavhengige funksjonar, slik at det kan brukast til ulike korporar. Evalueringar med svært forskjellige brig-korpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI og SCICORP) tyder p å at arkitekturen vårt fungerer like godt på alle korporane, og når SoTA-resultatet er fullstendig brig-oppløysing for alle korporane, utfører dei beste rapporterte resultatene til opp til 36.3 p.m.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy wielozadaniowy model neuronowy oparty na uczeniu się oparty na wielozadaniowym rozwiązywaniu odniesień mostowych, które stawiają czoła dwóm kluczowym wyzwaniom. Pierwszym wyzwaniem jest brak dużych korpusów adnotacyjnych odniesieniami mostowymi. Aby temu rozwiązać, używamy wielozadaniowego uczenia się, aby pomóc w połączeniu rozdzielczości referencyjnej z rozdzielczością współreferencyjną. Pokazujemy, że znaczne ulepszenia do 8 p.p. można osiągnąć przy pełnej rozdzielczości mostu z tą architekturą. Drugim wyzwaniem są różne definicje mostowania stosowane w różnych korporach, co oznacza, że ręcznie kodowane systemy lub systemy wykorzystujące specjalne funkcje zaprojektowane dla jednego korpusu nie współpracują dobrze z innymi korporami. Nasz model neuronowy wykorzystuje tylko niewielką liczbę cech niezależnych od ciała, dzięki czemu można zastosować do różnych korpusów. Oceny z bardzo różnymi korpusami mostowymi (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI i SCICORP) sugerują, że nasza architektura działa równie dobrze na wszystkich korpusach i osiąga wyniki SoTA w pełnej rozdzielczości mostowej dla wszystkich korpusów, przewyższając najlepsze raportowane wyniki o maksymalnie 36.3 p.p.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo brojni neuralni model na osnovu učenja za rešavanje referencija o mostovanju u rješavanju dva ključna izazova. Prvi izazov je nedostatak velike korporacije annotiranog referencijama. Da bi se ovo riješili, koristimo više zadataka učenje da bi pomogli da se prebacimo rezoluciju referencije sa rezolucijom pristojnosti. Pokazujemo da se značajno poboljšavanje do 8:00 može postići na potpunoj rezoluciji mosta sa ovim arhitekturom. Drugi izazov je različite definicije mostovanja korištenih u različitim korporama, što znači da sistemi ili sistemi koji koriste specijalne funkcije dizajnirane za jednog korpora ne rade dobro sa drugim korporama. Naš neuralni model koristi samo mali broj nezavisnih karakteristika korpusa, tako se može primjenjivati na različite korpore. Evaluacija sa veoma različitim mostovnim korporama (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI i SCICORP) ukazuju na to da naša arhitektura funkcioniše jednako dobro na svim korporama, i postigne rezultate SoTA na punoj rezoluciji mostovanja svih korpora, iznosi najbolje prijavljene rezultate do 36.3 sati.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model neural bazat pe mai multe sarcini de învățare pentru rezolvarea referințelor de legătură care abordează două provocări cheie. Prima provocare este lipsa corpurilor mari adnotate cu referințe de legătură. Pentru a rezolva acest lucru, folosim învățarea multi-task pentru a ajuta la crearea unei legături între rezoluția referințelor și rezoluția coreferenței. Aratăm că îmbunătățiri substanțiale de până la 8 p.p. pot fi obținute la rezoluția completă de punte cu această arhitectură. A doua provocare este diferitele definiții ale punții de legătură utilizate în diferite corpore, ceea ce înseamnă că sistemele codificate manual sau sistemele care utilizează caracteristici speciale concepute pentru un corp nu funcționează bine cu alte corpore. Modelul nostru neural folosește doar un număr mic de caracteristici independente de corpuri, astfel încât pot fi aplicate la diferite corpuri. Evaluările cu corpore de legătură foarte diferite (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI și SCICORP) sugerează că arhitectura noastră funcționează la fel de bine pe toate corporele și obține rezultatele SotA privind rezoluția completă de legătură pentru toate corporele, depășind cele mai bune rezultate raportate cu până la 36,3 p.p.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් අභ්\u200dයාජනය දෙකක් ව පළමු අභ්\u200dයානය තමයි ලොකු කොර්පෝරා අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ බ්\u200dරිජ් සංවේදනය සමඟ. මේක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පාවිච්චි කරනවා සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසය සඳහා ප්\u200d අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ස්තූතියෙන් සිද්ධ විශාල වැඩ කරනවා මේ ස්ථාපනය 8 වෙනකම්. දෙවෙනි අභ්\u200dයාසය තමයි වෙනස් කොර්පෝරා වල භාවිත කරපු බ්\u200dරිජින්ග් විවිධ විශේෂය, අත් කෝඩ් කරපු පද්ධතිය හෝ පද්ධති අපේ න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරයි කොර්පුස් ස්වත්වයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරය ගොඩක් වෙනස් බ්\u200dරිජ් කොර්පෝරා සමග අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI සහ SCICORP) ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අපේ විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය හැම කොර්පෝරා වලට සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් සමාන්\u200dය ව', 'so': 'We propose a multi task learning-based neural model for resolving bridging references tackling two key challenges.  Caqabadaha ugu horeeya waa baahida shirkad waaweyn oo lagu dhibay warqadaha isqabsashada. Markaas waxan ayaannu isticmaalnaa waxbarashada shaqada kala duduwan si aynu ugu caawinno ku sameynta go’aanka reference-dhigista si ay u heshiiyaan go’aanka kaarka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in horumarinta ugu horumarinta ilaa saacadda 8.00 waxaa la gaadhi karaa sidoo kale dhismahan oo dhan la heshiin karo. Caqabadaha labaad waa sawir kala duduwan oo shirkadaha kala duduwan lagu isticmaalay, waxaa loola jeedaa in nidaamka gacanta codsiga ama nidaamka lagu isticmaalayo tayada gaarka ah oo loo qoray qodob kale aysan si wanaagsan u shaqayn shirkad kale. Tusaale ahaan neurada ayaa isticmaali kara noocyo yar oo madax banaan, sidaas darteed waxaa lagu codsan karaa shirkad kala duduwan. Qiimeynta shirkadaha aad u kala duduwan (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI iyo SCICORP) wuxuu ka jeedaa in dhismahayagu si sinnaan ugu shaqeeyo shirkadaha oo dhan, wuxuuna gaadhaa resultiyada SoTA oo ku saabsan heshiiska bridging oo dhan ee shirkadaha oo dhan, oo uu sameynayo resultiyada ugu fiican ee loo sheegay ilaa 36.3 p.', 'ta': 'பிரிட்டிங் குறிப்புகளை தீர்வு செய்ய பல்வேலைகளில் கற்றல் அடிப்படையிலான நெருக்கமான மாதிரியை நாம் பரிந்துர முதல் சவால் என்னவென்றால் பிரிட்டிங் குறிப்புகளுடன் பெரிய நிறுவனத்தின் குறிப்பு. To address this, we use multi-task learning to help bridging reference resolution with coreference resolution.  நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த அட்டவணையில் முழு பிரிவின் தீர்வுத்திறன் முழுமையான முன்னேற்றங்கள் முடியும். இரண்டாவது சவால் என்னவென்றால் வேறு நிறுவனத்தில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் பிரிட்ஜிங் வித்தியாசமான விளக்கங்கள், அதாவது ஒரு கோர்ப்ஸ் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட சிறப எங்கள் புதிய மாதிரி சிறிய கார்புஸ் சுதந்திரமான தன்மைகளை மட்டும் பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அதனால் வேறு நிறுவனத்திற்கு பயன் மிகவும் வேறு வித்தியாசமான பிரிட்டு நிறுவனத்துடன் (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI மற்றும் SCICORP) பிரார்த்தனை செய்கிறது எங்கள் கட்டமைப்பு அனைத்து நிறுவனத்திலும் சரியாக செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் சோTA முடி', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en multi task learning baserad neural modell för att lösa överbryggande referenser för att hantera två viktiga utmaningar. Den första utmaningen är bristen på stora korpora kommenterade med överbryggande referenser. För att åtgärda detta använder vi multi-task learning för att hjälpa till att överbrygga referensupplösning med coreference upplösning. Vi visar att betydande förbättringar på upp till 8 p.p. kan uppnås med full överbryggningsupplösning med denna arkitektur. Den andra utmaningen är de olika definitionerna av överbryggning som används i olika korpus, vilket innebär att handkodade system eller system som använder specialfunktioner utformade för en korpus inte fungerar bra med andra korpus. Vår neurala modell använder endast ett litet antal korpusoberoende funktioner, vilket kan tillämpas på olika korpus. Utvärderingar med mycket olika bridging corpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI och SCICORP) tyder på att vår arkitektur fungerar lika bra på alla corpora, och uppnår SotA-resultaten på full bridging upplösning för alla corpora, vilket överträffar de bästa rapporterade resultaten med upp till 36,3 p.p.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک بہت سے کام کی تعلیم کی بنیادی نیورل موڈل کی پیشنهاد دیتے ہیں کہ دو کلیز چالوں کے مطابق بریڈنگ سرنوشتوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے۔ پہلی چال یہ ہے کہ بہت بڑی کورپورا کا ناکام ہے جسے پلیٹنگ ریفنس کے ساتھ آواز دی گئی ہے. اس کے بارے میں ہم بہت سے کام کی تعلیم کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ مرتبہ ریزیونس کے ساتھ مرتبہ ریزیونس کے ساتھ مرتبہ کریں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ اس معماری کے ساتھ پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پو دوسری چال یہ مختلف قارپور میں استعمال ہونے کی مختلف تعریف ہے، یعنی ہاتھ کوڈ کیڈ کیے ہوئے سیستموں یا سیستموں کو ایک قارپوس کے لئے طراحی طراحی ہوئی مختلف تعریف کے مطابق دوسرے قارپور کے ساتھ اچھا کام نہیں کر ہمارے نئورل موڈل صرف ایک چھوٹی تعداد کے ذریعہ کورپوس بے نیاز ویژگی کا استعمال کرتا ہے، اسی طرح مختلف کورپور پر استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI اور SCICORP) کے مطابق بہت مختلف برڈینگ کوپرا کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے کہ ہماری معماری تمام کوپرا پر برابر عمل کرتی ہے، اور تمام کوپرا کے لئے پورا برڈینگ کے نتائج پہنچ جاتی ہے، جو سب سے بہترین گزارش کے نتائج کو 36.3 ساعت تک پہنچ جاتی ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình thần kinh đa nhiệm vụ dựa trên học tập để giải quyết vấn đề liên kết. Trước tiên, vấn đề là thiếu hạ sĩ lớn được ghi chú bằng cách kết nối. Để giải quyết chuyện này, chúng ta dùng việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ để giúp kết nối các nghị quyết bằng thuyết hạn hẹp. Chúng tôi cho thấy có thể cải tiến đáng kể tới 8P.p. khi có một giải pháp kết nối đầy đủ với kiến trúc này. Thứ hai thách thức là các định nghĩa khác nhau về kết nối trong các loại cơ thể khác nhau, nghĩa là các hệ thống hay hệ thống mã tay, sử dụng các đặc biệt thiết kế cho một tập thể không hoạt động tốt với các nhóm khác. Mẫu thần kinh của chúng ta chỉ sử dụng một số lượng nhỏ cơ thể độc lập, nên có thể áp dụng cho các hạ sĩ khác nhau. Bài đánh giá khác nhau với các cầu nối khác nhau (ARRA, ISGHS, BASI và SCCOP) cho thấy kiến trúc của chúng ta cũng hoạt động tốt như nhau trên tất cả hạ thể, và đạt được kết quả như vậy dựa trên độ phân giải kết nối đầy đủ cho tất cả cơ thể, hoàn thiện kết quả tốt nhất được báo cáo bằng đến 36.3 p..', 'uz': "Biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish asosida neyrolik modelini o'rganish uchun bir necha vazifa qo'llanmalar, ikki muhim muammolarni boshqarish uchun murakkab qilamiz. Birinchi muammolar birinchi darajada birinchi ko'pchilik qo'shilgan katta kompaniya yo'q. Buni boshqarish uchun, biz bir necha vazifa o'rganishni foydalanamiz, bir xil vazifa o'rganishni qo'shish muvaffaqiyatlarini qo'shish uchun foydalanamiz. Biz bu arxituvlar bilan butun bir murojaat murojaat qilish mumkin. Ikkinchi muammolar, boshqa kompaniyada ishlatilgan bir xil aniqliklarning turli taʼminotlari, bu narsa, qo'l kodlash tizimlari yoki tizimlarni bir corpus uchun yaratilgan maxsus xususiyatlarni ishlatish uchun boshqa kompaniya bilan yaxshi ishlamaydi. Bizning neyrolik modelimiz faqat bir necha kam korpus xossalaridan foydalanadi, shunday qilib boshqa kompaniyadan foydalanishi mumkin. Boshqa bir xil kompaniya (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI va SCICORP) haqida tasdiqlash imkoniyatlariga shunday qiladi, bizning maktablarimiz hamma kompaniyada teng yaxshi ishlaydi, va hamma kompaniya uchun soTA murojaat qilish natijalarini bajaradi, va 36.3 soat davomida eng yaxshi taklif natijalarini bajaradi.", 'da': 'Vi foreslår en multi-task learning-baseret neural model til løsning af bro referencer, der tackler to centrale udfordringer. Den første udfordring er manglen på store corpora annoteret med broreferencer. For at løse dette bruger vi multi-task learning til at hjælpe med at bygge bro mellem referenceopløsning og coreferenceopløsning. Vi viser, at der kan opnås betydelige forbedringer på op til 8 p.p. ved fuld broløsning med denne arkitektur. Den anden udfordring er de forskellige definitioner af bridging, der anvendes i forskellige korpuser, hvilket betyder, at håndkodede systemer eller systemer, der anvender særlige funktioner designet til et korpus, ikke fungerer godt sammen med andre korpuser. Vores neurale model bruger kun et lille antal korpusuafhængige funktioner, så kan anvendes på forskellige korpuster. Evalueringer med meget forskellige bridging corpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI og SCICORP) tyder på, at vores arkitektur fungerer lige godt på alle corpora, og opnår SotA resultaterne på fuld bridging opløsning for alle corpora, hvilket overgår de bedst rapporterede resultater med op til 36,3 p.p.', 'hr': 'Mi predlažemo brojni neuronski model na osnovu učenja za rješavanje referencija o bridžanju u rješavanju dva ključna izazova. Prvi izazov je nedostatak velike korporacije annotiranog s preporukama o mostovanju. Da bi se riješili ovoga, koristimo učenje višezadataka kako bi pomogli prebaciti rezoluciju referencije s rješenjem pristojnosti. Pokazujemo da se značajno poboljšavanje do 8 sati može postići na potpunoj rezoluciji mostovanja s tim arhitekturom. Drugi izazov je različite definicije mostovanja korištenih u različitim korporama, što znači da sistemi ili sustavi koji koriste posebne funkcije dizajnirane za jednog korpora ne funkcioniraju dobro sa drugim korporama. Naš neuralni model koristi samo mali broj nezavisnih karakteristika korpusa, tako se može primjenjivati na različite korporacije. Procjenjivanja s veoma različitim mostovnim korporama (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI i SCICORP) sugeriraju da naša arhitektura funkcionira jednako dobro na svim korporama i postigne rezultate SoTA na punoj rezoluciji mostovanja svih korpora, iznosi najbolje prijavljene rezultate do 36.3 h.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме невронен модел, базиран на множество задачи, за решаване на мостови референции, които се справят с две ключови предизвикателства. Първото предизвикателство е липсата на големи корпуси, анотирани с мостови препратки. За да се справим с това, използваме многофункционално обучение, за да спомогнем за свързването на референтната резолюция с резолюцията на кореференцията. Показваме, че значителни подобрения до 8 часа могат да бъдат постигнати при пълна мостова резолюция с тази архитектура. Второто предизвикателство е различните дефиниции на мостовете, използвани в различните корпуси, което означава, че ръчно кодирани системи или системи, използващи специални функции, предназначени за един корпус, не работят добре с други корпуси. Нашият невронен модел използва само малък брой независими от корпуса функции, така че може да бъде приложен към различни корпуси. Оценките с много различни мостови корпуси (АРРАУ, ИСНОТЕС, БАШИ и СКИКОРП) предполагат, че нашата архитектура работи еднакво добре на всички корпуси и постига резултатите от СОТА при пълна мостова резолюция за всички корпуси, надминавайки най-добрите докладвани резултати с до 36.3 p.p.', 'nl': "We stellen een multitask leergebaseerd neuraal model voor om overbruggingsreferenties op te lossen die twee belangrijke uitdagingen aanpakken. De eerste uitdaging is het ontbreken van grote corpora's met overbruggingsreferenties. Om dit aan te pakken, gebruiken we multitask learning om referentieresolutie te overbruggen met coreference resolutie. We laten zien dat substantiële verbeteringen tot 8 p.p. bereikt kunnen worden op volledige overbruggingsresolutie met deze architectuur. De tweede uitdaging is de verschillende definities van bridging die gebruikt worden in verschillende corpora's, wat betekent dat handgecodeerde systemen of systemen die speciale functies gebruiken die ontworpen zijn voor één corpora niet goed werken met andere corpora's. Ons neurale model gebruikt slechts een klein aantal corpusonafhankelijke kenmerken, dus kan worden toegepast op verschillende corpora. Evaluaties met zeer verschillende bridging corpora's (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI en SCICORP) suggereren dat onze architectuur even goed werkt op alle corpora's, en de SoTA-resultaten behaalt op volledige bridging resolutie voor alle corpora's, waarbij de best gerapporteerde resultaten tot 36.3 p.p. overtreffen.", 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein multitasking lernbasiertes neuronales Modell zur Lösung von Brückenreferenzen vor, das zwei zentrale Herausforderungen angeht. Die erste Herausforderung ist das Fehlen großer Korpora, die mit Brückenreferenzen kommentiert sind. Um dies anzugehen, nutzen wir Multi-Task Learning, um Referenzauflösung mit Coreferenzauflösung zu überbrücken. Wir zeigen, dass mit dieser Architektur wesentliche Verbesserungen von bis zu 8 p.p. bei voller Brückenauflösung erreicht werden können. Die zweite Herausforderung besteht in den unterschiedlichen Definitionen von Bridging, die in verschiedenen Korpora verwendet werden, was bedeutet, dass handcodierte Systeme oder Systeme, die spezielle Funktionen für ein Korpus verwenden, nicht gut mit anderen Korpora funktionieren. Unser neuronales Modell verwendet nur eine geringe Anzahl korpusunabhängiger Merkmale und kann daher auf verschiedene Korpora angewendet werden. Auswertungen mit sehr unterschiedlichen bridging corpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI und SCICORP) deuten darauf hin, dass unsere Architektur auf allen corpora gleich gut funktioniert und die SoTA Ergebnisse bei voller bridging Auflösung für alle corpora erreicht und die besten berichteten Ergebnisse um bis zu 36.3 p.p. übertrifft.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model saraf berbasis tugas pembelajaran untuk memecahkan referensi bridge mengatasi dua tantangan kunci. Tantangan pertama adalah kekurangan corpora besar yang dicatat dengan referensi jembatan. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami menggunakan belajar multi-tugas untuk membantu menyambung resolusi referensi dengan resolusi koreferensi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa peningkatan yang besar hingga 8 p.p. dapat dicapai pada resolusi penuh jembatan dengan arsitektur ini. Tantangan kedua adalah definisi yang berbeda dari jembatan yang digunakan dalam korpra berbeda, berarti bahwa sistem kode tangan atau sistem menggunakan fitur khusus yang direncanakan untuk satu korpus tidak bekerja dengan baik dengan korpra lain. Model saraf kita hanya menggunakan sejumlah kecil ciri-ciri independen corpus, sehingga dapat diaplikasikan pada corpora yang berbeda. Evaluasi dengan corpora jembatan yang sangat berbeda (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI dan SCICORP) menyarankan bahwa arsitektur kita bekerja sama dengan baik pada semua corpora, dan mencapai hasil SoTA pada resolusi jembatan penuh untuk semua corpora, melampaui hasil terbaik yang dilaporkan hingga 36,3 p.p.', 'ko': '우리는 다중 임무 학습을 바탕으로 하는 신경 모델을 제시하여 교접 참고를 해결하고 두 가지 관건적인 도전을 해결하는 데 사용한다.첫 번째 도전은 브리지 인용이 있는 대형 어료 라이브러리가 부족하다는 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해서 우리는 다중 임무 학습을 사용하여 인용 해석과 공지 해석을 연결시키는 것을 돕는다.우리는 이러한 구조를 사용하면 완전한 브리지 해상도에서 8p.p.에 이르는 실질적인 개선을 실현할 수 있음을 나타낸다.두 번째 도전은 서로 다른 원료 라이브러리에서 사용하는 브리지 정의가 다르다는 것이다. 이것은 수동 인코딩 시스템이나 하나의 원료 라이브러리로 설계된 특수한 기능을 사용하는 시스템이 다른 원료 라이브러리와 잘 협동할 수 없다는 것을 의미한다.우리의 신경 네트워크 모델은 소량의 자료 라이브러리와 무관한 특징만 사용하기 때문에 서로 다른 자료 라이브러리에 응용할 수 있다.매우 다른 브리지 자료 라이브러리(ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI와SCICORP)를 사용하여 실시한 평가에 따르면 우리의 체계 구조는 모든 자료 라이브러리에서 똑같이 유효하고 모든 자료 라이브러리의 완전한 브리지 해상도에서 소타 결과를 실현하였으며 최적 보고 결과보다 36.3p 높았다.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza modeli ya neura yenye msingi wa kazi nyingi ya kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutatua maoni ya bridge ili kupambana na changamoto mbili muhimu. Changamoto la kwanza ni ukosefu wa makampuni makubwa yanayodhihirishwa na maoni ya bridge. Ili kushughulikia hili, tunatumia kujifunza kazi nyingi ili kusaidia kukutana na suluhisho la maoni kwa utaratibu wa mafanikio. Tunaonyesha kwamba maendeleo makubwa ya kufikia saa 8 jioni yanaweza kupata suluhisho kamili kwa ujenzi huu. Changamoto la pili ni tafsiri tofauti za bridge zinazotumiwa katika makampuni tofauti, ina maana kwamba mfumo wa mikononi au mifumo maalum unaotumia vifaa maalum kwa ajili ya mashirika moja hawafanya kazi vizuri na kampuni nyingine. Mradi wetu wa neura unatumia baadhi ya vipengele vya makampuni huru, kwa hiyo inaweza kutumika kwa kampuni tofauti. Tathmini za makampuni yenye daraja tofauti sana (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI na SCICORP) zinapendekeza kwamba ujenzi wetu unafanya kazi vizuri katika makampuni yote, na kupata matokeo ya SoTA juu ya suluhisho kamili kwa kampuni zote, ikifanya matokeo bora yaliyoripotiwa kufikia saa 6.3 jioni.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل عصبی بر پایه یادگیری بسیار زیادی از کار برای حل مربوط کردن مربوط به دو چالش کلید را حل کنیم. اولین چالش، کمبود شرکت بزرگی است که با ارتباط برگزار شده است. برای حل این کار، ما از یادگیری بسیاری از کارها استفاده می کنیم تا کمک کنیم که راه حل مربوط با راه حل مربوط کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که توسعه های زیادی تا ساعت ۸ صبح می توانند در راه حل کامل پل کردن با این معماری به دست یابند. چالش دوم، تعریف های مختلف پل در شرکت مختلف استفاده می\u200cشود، یعنی سیستم\u200cهای دستی یا سیستم\u200cهای استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای که برای یک شرکت طراحی شده\u200cاند، با یک شرکت دیگر خوب کار نمی\u200cکنند. مدل عصبی ما فقط تعداد کوچک از ویژه های مستقل کورپوس را استفاده می کند، بنابراین می تواند به شرکت مختلف کاربرد شود. ارزیابی با شرکت پل های بسیار متفاوت (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI و SCICORP) پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که معماری ما در تمام شرکت همانطور کار می\u200cکند، و نتیجه\u200cهای SoTA را در راه حل کامل پل کردن برای تمام شرکت می\u200cرساند، که نتیجه\u200cهای بهترین گزارش\u200cشده تا ساعت 36:3 به پایان رسید.', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe täsirli çözümleri çözmek üçin köp täsirli täsirli öwrenmek üçin nural nusgasyny teklip berýäris. Ilkinji kynçylyk, töwürler bilen duýdurýan uly korpoýanyň ýok bolmagy. Bu çözümleri çözmek üçin, nusgala çözümlerini gollaşdyrmak üçin kömekleşik öwrenmek üçin ullanýarys. Biz bu arhitektegi bilen doly çözümlenme üçin 8-de çenli üýtgeşmeleri başaryp bileris. Ikinji kynçylyk, birnäçe korporada ulanylan tekmelenmeniň beýleki tanyşlarydyr diýip kabul edilýän sistemalar ýa sistemalar birnäçe korpora üçin tasarlanýan özellikleri ullanýarlar. Biziň neural nusgymyz diňe kiçi bir sany korpus boýunça özellikleri ulanýar, şonuň üçin başga korpora uygulanabilir. Adamlar birnäçe köp korpora bilen deňlenmeler (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI we SCICORP) arhitektegimiziň hemme korpora eşit bir şekilde işleýändigini maslahat berýär we SoTA netijelerini bütin korpora üçin doly çözümleşdirmegi üçin ýetirýär, we olar 36.3-e çenli hasaplanýan iň gowy netijelerini çözýär.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model neural të bazuar në mësimin e shumë detyrave për zgjidhjen e referimeve të urës që trajtojnë dy sfida kryesore. Sfida e parë është mungesa e korprave të mëdha të shënuara me referime të lidhura. Për të trajtuar këtë, ne përdorim mësimin me shumë detyra për të ndihmuar lidhjen e zgjidhjes së referimit me zgjidhjen e korreferencës. Ne tregojmë se p ërmirësimet thelbësore deri në 8 p.p. mund të arrihen në zgjidhjen e plotë të urës me këtë arkitekturë. Sfida e dytë është përcaktimi i ndryshëm i urës që përdoret në korpra të ndryshme, që do të thotë se sistemet apo sistemet e koduara me dorë që përdorin karakteristika të posaçme të dizajnuara për një korpus nuk funksionojnë mirë me korpra të tjera. Modeli ynë neural përdor vetëm një numër të vogël karakteristike të pavarura të korpusit, kështu që mund të aplikohet në korpura të ndryshme. Vlerësimet me korpra shumë të ndryshme me urë (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI dhe SCICORP) sugjerojnë se arkitektura jonë punon në mënyrë të barabartë mirë në të gjitha korpra dhe arrin rezultatet e SoTA në zgjidhjen e plotë të urës p ër të gjithë korpra, duke kaluar rezultatet më të mira të raportuara deri në 36.3 p.p.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n veelvuldige taak leer-gebaseerde neurale model vir die oplossing van bruidingsverwysings met twee sleutel uitdagings. Die eerste uitdrukking is die ontbreek van groot korpora wat met bruidingsverwysings aangetel is. Om dit te adres, gebruik ons multi-taak leer om te help om verwysing oplossing te brui met koreferensie oplossing. Ons wys dat substantiele verbeteringe van tot by 8:00 op volledige bruidingsresolusie met hierdie arkitektuur kan bereik word. Die tweede uitdaging is die verskillende definisies van bruiding gebruik in verskillende korpora, beteken dat hand-kodeerde stelsels of stelsels gebruik spesiale funksies wat vir een korpora ontwerp het, nie goed werk met ander korpora nie. Ons neurale model gebruik slegs 'n klein aantal korpus onafhanklike funksies, sodat kan aanwend word na verskillende korpora. Evaluasies met baie verskillende bruiding korpora (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI en SCICORP) voorstel dat ons arkitektuur gelyk goed werk op alle korpora en die SoTA resultate op volle bruiding oplossing vir alle korpora bereik, uitvoer die beste verspreiding resultate tot by 36.3 p.m.", 'bn': 'আমরা ব্রিজিং রেফারেন্স সমাধানের জন্য একটি বহু কাজ শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি দুটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রথম চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে ব্রিজিং রেফারেন্সের মাধ্যমে বিশাল কর্পোরার অভাব। এই বিষয়টি ঠিকানা করার জন্য আমরা বহুক্ষেত্র শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করি কোরেফেন্সের সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে সাহায্য করার জন আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রায় ৮টার পর্যন্ত গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ব্রিজিং সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে পূর্ণ উন্নতি পাওয়া যাবে। দ্বিতীয় চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে বিভিন্ন কর্পোরায় ব্রিজিং ব্যবহার করা বিভিন্ন সংখ্যা, এর মানে হচ্ছে হাত কোড বা সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে একটি কর্পোরার জন্য বি আমাদের নিউরেল মডেল শুধুমাত্র কোর্পাসের স্বাধীন বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে, তাই বিভিন্ন কর্পোরায় প্রয়োগ করা যাবে। বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ব্রিজিং কর্পোরা (আর্রাউ, আইসনোটেস, বাশি এবং এসসিকোর্পি) পরামর্শ দেয় যে আমাদের স্থাপনাগুলো সকল কর্পোরায় একই ভাবে কাজ করে এবং সকল কর্পোরার জন্য সোটিএ-এর ফলাফল পাওয়া যায়', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմաթիվ խնդիրների ուսումնասիրությամբ հիմնված նյարդային մոդել, որպեսզի լուծենք երկու կարևոր մարտահրավերների լուծումը: The first challenge is the lack of large corpora annotated with bridging references.  Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք օգտագործում ենք բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրություն, որպեսզի օգնենք հաղորդակցման լուծման կապել կորֆերենսի լուծման հետ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մինչև ժամը 8-ի մեծ բարելավումները կարող են հասնել այս ճարտարապետության հետ կապված ամբողջական լուծումների վրա: Երկրորդ մարտահրավերն այն է, որ կամուրջների տարբեր սահմանումները, որոնք օգտագործվում են տարբեր մարմներում, նշանակում է, որ ձեռքի կոդավորված համակարգերը կամ համակարգերը, որոնք օգտագործում են հատուկ հատկություններ, որոնք նախագծված են մեկ մարմնի Our neural model only uses a small number of corpus independent features, thus can be applied to different corpora.  Արժեքները շատ տարբեր կապի կառուցվածքով (ARRAU, ISNotes, BASHI և Scicorp) առաջարկում են, որ մեր ճարտարապետությունը հավասար լավ է աշխատում բոլոր կապի վրա, և հասնում է Սոտայի արդյունքները կապի կապի ամբողջ լուծումների վրա, առավել լավագույն հայտարարված արդյունքները մինչև 36.3 p.p.m.:', 'am': 'የሁለት የቁልፎች ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል የብዙዎች ስራ ትምህርት የናቡር ሞዴል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ጥያቄ የብሪክ መልዕክቶች የባሕላዊ ኮርፖር ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ማስታወቂያ ለመጠቀም በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ We show that substantial improvements of up to 8 p.p. can be achieved on full bridging resolution with this architecture.  ሁለተኛይቱ ግንኙነት በተለየ ኮርፖርት ውስጥ የሚጠቀም የልዩ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ የናቡር ሞዴሌያችን ነፃ ካርፓስ ብዙዎችን ብቻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ ስለዚህም ለሌላ ኮርፖርተር ይፈልጋል፡፡ በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ብሪፖርት (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI እና SCICORP) የመሠረተ ሥርዓታችን በኮርፖርት ሁሉ ላይ በአንድ ትክክል ይሠራል፡፡', 'ca': "Proposem un model neural basat en l'aprenentatge de múltiples tasques per resoldre referencies de pont que aborden dos reptes clau. El primer repte és la falta de corpores grans anotats amb referències de pont. To address this, we use multi-task learning to help bridging reference resolution with coreference resolution.  Ens mostren que es poden aconseguir millores substancials fins a 8 p.p. amb una solució de pont plena amb aquesta arquitectura. El segon repte és les diferents definicions de pont utilitzades en diferents corpores, que vol dir que els sistemes codificats a mà o sistemes que utilitzen característiques especials dissenyats per un corpore no funcionen bé amb altres corpores. El nostre model neuronal només utilitza un petit nombre de característiques independents del cos, així que es pot aplicar a diferents corpores. Evaluacions amb corpores pontificants molt diferents (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI i SCICORP) suggereixen que la nostra arquitectura funciona igualment bé en tots els corpores, i aconsegueix els resultats de SoTA en resolució pontificadora completa per tots els corpores, superant els millors resultats reportats fins a 36,3 p.p.", 'az': 'Biz çoxlu işin öyrənməsi üçün nöral modeli təklif edirik ki, iki nöqlü çətinliklərlə çəkilmək üçün çoxlu təklif edirik. İlk çətinlikdə böyük korpora yoxdur ki, körpənin referansları ilə bildirilmişdir. Bunu çəkmək üçün çoxlu işin öyrənməsini mərhəmətli çözünürlüklə birləşdirmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, saat 8 qədər böyük yaxşılıqlar bu arhitektəki ilə tamamlama çözünürlüyündə başa düşə bilər. İkinci dəyişiklik, bir korpus üçün müəyyən edilmiş xüsusiyyətlər istifadə edilən müxtəlif dəyişiklik tanımlarıdır. Bu da, əl kodlanmış sistemlər və sistemlər üçün bir korpus üçün müəyyən edilmiş xüsusiyyətlər istifadə edir. Nöral modellərimiz yalnız bir çox korpus bağımsız özelliklərini istifadə edir, buna görə də müxtəlif korpora uygulanabilir. Müxtəlif körpə korporası ilə müəyyən edilənlər (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI və SCICORP) arhitektürümüzün bütün korporalarda eyni qədər yaxşı işləməsini və bütün korporaların sonuçlarını tamamlamaq üçün SoTA sonuçlarını başa düçar edir, ən yaxşı müəyyən edilmiş sonuçlarını 36.3-ə qədər istifadə edirlər.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme multiúlohový neuronový model založený na učení založený na řešení překlenovacích referencí, které řeší dvě klíčové výzvy. První výzvou je nedostatek velkých korpusů anotovaných překlenovacími odkazy. K řešení tohoto problému používáme víceúlohové učení, které pomáhá překlenovat referenční rozlišení s koreferenčním rozlišením. Ukazujeme, že při plném přemostění s touto architekturou lze dosáhnout podstatných zlepšení až do 8 p.p. Druhou výzvou jsou různé definice mostování používané v různých korpusech, což znamená, že ručně kódované systémy nebo systémy využívající speciální funkce navržené pro jeden korpus nefungují dobře s ostatními korpusy. Náš neuronový model používá jen malý počet korpusově nezávislých vlastností, takže lze aplikovat na různé korpusy. Hodnocení s velmi odlišnými mostovacími korpusy (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI a SCICORP) naznačují, že naše architektura funguje stejně dobře na všech korpusech a dosahuje výsledků SoTA při plném přemostění pro všechny korpusy, přičemž nejlepší hlášené výsledky překonává až 36.3 p.p.', 'et': 'Pakume välja mitme ülesandega õppepõhise närvimudeli, et lahendada sideviiteid kahe põhiprobleemi lahendamiseks. Esimene väljakutse on suurte korpuste puudumine, millel on siltviited. Selle lahendamiseks kasutame mitme ülesandega õppimist, et aidata siduda viiteresolutsioon ja kordferentsiresolutsioon. Näitame, et kõnealuse arhitektuuriga on võimalik saavutada märkimisväärseid parandusi kuni 8 protsendi ulatuses. Teine väljakutse on erinevates korpustes kasutatavate sildade erinevad määratlused, mis tähendab, et käsitsi kodeeritud süsteemid või süsteemid, mis kasutavad ühe korpuse jaoks mõeldud erifunktsioone, ei tööta teiste korpustega hästi. Meie närvimudel kasutab vaid väikest hulka korpusest sõltumatuid funktsioone, seega saab seda rakendada erinevatele korpustele. Väga erinevate sildkorpustega (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI ja SCICORP) tehtud hinnangud näitavad, et meie arhitektuur töötab võrdselt hästi kõigis korpustes ja saavutab SotA tulemused kõigi korpuste täieliku sildresolutsiooni osas, ületades parimaid teatatud tulemusi kuni 36,3 p.p..', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme monitehtäväoppimiseen perustuvaa neuromallia kahden keskeisen haasteen ratkaisemiseksi. Ensimmäinen haaste on suurten korpusten puuttuminen siltaviittauksilla. Tämän ratkaisemiseksi käytämme monitehtäväoppimista, joka auttaa yhdistämään viiteresoluution ja koreferenssin resoluution. Osoitamme, että tähän arkkitehtuuriin voidaan saavuttaa huomattavia parannuksia jopa 8 p.p. Toinen haaste on eri korpusissa käytettävät sillan määritelmät, mikä tarkoittaa, että käsin koodatut järjestelmät tai järjestelmät, jotka käyttävät erityisiä ominaisuuksia, jotka on suunniteltu yhdelle korpuselle, eivät toimi hyvin muiden korpusten kanssa. Neuromallimme käyttää vain pientä määrää korpusesta riippumattomia ominaisuuksia, joten sitä voidaan soveltaa eri korpusiin. Arvioinnit, joissa on hyvin erilaisia siltakorpioita (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI ja SCICORP), viittaavat siihen, että arkkitehtuurimme toimii yhtä hyvin kaikissa korpussa ja saavuttaa SotA-tulokset täydellä siltakorkoituksella kaikkien korpusten osalta, mikä ylittää parhaat raportoidut tulokset jopa 36,3 p.p..', 'bs': 'Mi predlažemo brojni neuronski model na osnovu učenja za rješavanje referencija o mostovanju u rješavanju dva ključna izazova. Prvi izazov je nedostatak velike korporacije annotiranog referencijama. Da bi se riješili ovoga, koristimo učenje višezadataka kako bi pomogli prebaciti rezoluciju referencije sa rezolucijom pristojnosti. Pokazujemo da se značajno poboljšavanje do 8 sati može postići na potpunoj rezoluciji mostovanja s tim arhitekturom. Drugi izazov je različite definicije mostovanja korištenih u različitim korporama, što znači da sistemi ili sistemi koji koriste specijalne funkcije dizajnirane za jednog korpora ne rade dobro sa drugim korporama. Naš neuralni model koristi samo mali broj nezavisnih karakteristika korpusa, tako se može primjenjivati na različite korporacije. Evaluacije s veoma različitim mostovnim korporama (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI i SCICORP) sugeriraju da naša arhitektura funkcioniše jednako dobro na svim korporama i postigne rezultate SoTA na punoj rezoluciji mostovanja svih korpora, iznosi najbolje izvješćene rezultate do 36.3 h.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem multi task nyimpen-basa Nyural model nggawe nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan sing apik tur angel Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan kuwi ora ono nek akeh dumadhi tanggal nggawe wih-wih To Address this, we use multi-task Learning to help Bridge reference Resolution with corefpreferences Resolution. until 8:00 PM Awak dhéwé wis kabèh perusahaan nggawe wih-wih nggawe gerakan ing sak cara-wih dumadhi, nik kabèh saben sistem sing manut karo sistem sing gawe nguasai perusahaan sing dibenakno kanggo saben cara-dumadhi ora bisa ngono sak cara-dumadhi iki. Kita model sing nyebute sistem menyang puteh nang sampeyan akeh dumadhi, dadi bisa nguasal kanggo sampeyan karo sampeyan. Wulangan tahirno karo perusahaan langkung wigatining dong liyane (ARRIU, IINNOTI, BOSSI karo ?) supoyo sak olahan kanggo ngerayakno akeh akeh kaya ngono akeh podho sing wurusak nggawe lan akeh Sota ora bisa dianggap kejahatan winih kanggo ngilangno saben depan kanggo ngilangno ning ora perusahaan dumadhi iki, iso dianggap oleh dumadhi kanggo kalagayut', 'ha': "Munã buɗa wani misali na'anar aikin da aka sanar da shi a kan ƙananan neura masu ƙari da ke buƙata masu fassarar birdari da su yi danganta ta'anar musamman biyu. Kikacin na farko ni'anar ma'anar korpo mai girma wanda aka yi cũtarwa da fassarar samura. Domin da za mu yi amfani da wannan, za mu yi amfani da in karanta aiki masu yawa dõmin mu taimaki yin rabo da rabon Reference da yin rabon sarrafiya. Tuna nũna cewa mafiya ƙari da za'a iya kai duk tare 8. Kikacin da na ƙara ta biyu yana da fassarar biriki waɗanda aka yi amfani da shi a cikin komana guda daban, yana madaidaita cewa, tsarin hannuwan kode ko na'urar da aka yi amfani da wasu mistakardar da aka yi wa kofi guda, ba su aikata aiki mai kyau tãre da shi. Modelinmu na neura yana amfani da abu kaɗan na karatun koptura, don haka ana iya amfani da shi zuwa komana dabam-dabam. Ana gaskata da marubuci mai dabam-dabam-dabam (ArraU, IPACES, Bhashi da SCICORP) yana shauri cewa matsayinmu yana aiki daidai a kan duk kormpuni, kuma yana sãmun matsalar SoTA a cikakken rabo-raye wa kowanta, na sami mafi kyaun fassarar da aka sanar ta zuwa 36.3 p.m.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo nevronski model, ki temelji na večopravilnem učenju, za reševanje premostitvenih referenc, ki se soočajo z dvema ključnima izzivoma. Prvi izziv je pomanjkanje velikih korpusov, označenih z mostnimi referencami. Za reševanje tega uporabljamo večopravilno učenje, ki pomaga združiti referenčno ločljivost z ločljivostjo koreference. Pokazujemo, da je mogoče doseči bistvene izboljšave do 8 p.p. pri popolni ločljivosti premostitve s to arhitekturo. Drugi izziv so različne definicije mostišča, ki se uporabljajo v različnih korpusih, kar pomeni, da ročno kodirani sistemi ali sistemi s posebnimi funkcijami, oblikovanimi za en korpus, ne delujejo dobro z drugimi korpusi. Naš nevronski model uporablja le majhno število neodvisnih korpusnih funkcij, zato se lahko uporablja za različne korpuse. Ocene z zelo različnimi premostitvenimi korpusi (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI in SCICORP) kažejo, da naša arhitektura deluje enako dobro na vseh korpusih in dosega rezultate SotA pri polni ločljivosti premostitve za vse korpuse, kar presega najboljše poročane rezultate za do 36,3 p.p..', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མཁན་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་དཔེ་དབུས་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་གྲངས་མཐུན་ གདོང་ལེན་དང་པོ་ནི་མཐོ་རྣམས་མཐོ་ཁག་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་མ་རེད། འདི་ལ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་མང་བོའི་འགྲོ་མཐུད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན་པས། གནད་དོན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན་ན་བཟོ་བཀལ་བ་ཡིན། གདོང་ལེན་གཉིས་པ་དེ་སྡོད་མིའི་ངོས་འཛིན་པ་སོ་སོ་སོ་སོ་ལ་འཛུགས་པ་མ་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་དབུས་གཞུང་གིས་མཐུད་སྒེར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀི་ལས་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་ཀར དབྱེ་བཟོ་བ་དང་མཉམ་ལས་རྡུད་སྐྱོན་མིན་འདུག (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI དང་SCICORP)་གིས་གཟུགས་འགྲེལ་གྱི་ལས་རྩིས་གཞུང་གི་ནང་ལས་གཟུགས་གཤིས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་གནང་།', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל עצבי מבוסס על לימוד במשימות רבות לפתור התייחסות לגשר מתמודדים עם שני אתגרים מפתחיים. The first challenge is the lack of large corpora annotated with bridging references.  כדי להתמודד עם זה, אנו משתמשים ללמוד במשימות רבות כדי לעזור לגשר את הפתרון התייחסות עם הפתרון התייחסות. אנחנו מראים שיפורים משמעותיים עד 8 p.p. יכולים להשיג על פיתרון גשר מלא עם הארכיטקטורה הזאת. The second challenge is the different definitions of bridging used in different corpora, meaning that hand-coded systems or systems using special features designed for one corpus do not work well with other corpora.  המודל העצבי שלנו משתמש רק במספר קטן של תכונות עצמאות של קורפוס, כך אפשר להשתמש על גופות שונות. הערכות עם גופת גשר שונה מאוד (ARRAU, ISNOTES, BASHI וסיקורפ) מציעות שהארכיטקטורה שלנו עובדת באותה מידה טוב על כל גופת, ולהשיג את תוצאות סוטה על פתרון גשר מלא לכל גופת, ביצוע את התוצאות הטובות ביותר דווחות עד 36.3 p.p.'}
{'en': 'Automatic Discovery of Heterogeneous Machine Learning Pipelines : An Application to Natural Language Processing', 'ar': 'الاكتشاف التلقائي لخطوط أنابيب تعلم الآلة غير المتجانسة: تطبيق لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية', 'fr': "Découverte automatique de pipelines d'apprentissage automatique hétérogènes\xa0: une application au traitement du langage naturel", 'es': 'Descubrimiento automático de canales heterogéneos de aprendizaje automático: una aplicación para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural', 'pt': 'Descoberta automática de pipelines heterogêneos de aprendizado de máquina: uma aplicação ao processamento de linguagem natural', 'hi': 'विषम मशीन लर्निंग पाइपलाइनों की स्वचालित खोज: प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए एक आवेदन', 'ja': '異種機械学習パイプラインの自動発見：自然言語処理への応用', 'ru': 'Автоматическое открытие гетерогенных конвейеров машинного обучения: применение к обработке естественного языка', 'zh': '异构机器学道者自见,自然语言处之宜', 'ga': 'Píblínte Foghlama Meaisín Ilchineálacha a Fhionnachtain Uathoibríoch: Feidhm maidir le Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Heterogén gépi tanulási csővezetékek automatikus felfedezése: alkalmazás a természetes nyelv feldolgozására', 'el': 'Αυτόματη ανακάλυψη ετερογενών αγωγών μηχανικής μάθησης: Μια εφαρμογή στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας', 'it': "Scoperta automatica di oleodotti eterogeni di apprendimento automatico: un'applicazione all'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale", 'lt': 'Automatinis heterogeninių mašinų mokymosi vamzdžių aptikimas: gamtos kalbų apdorojimo programa', 'kk': 'Heterogeneous Machine Learning Pipelines- тың автоматты түрде табу: Natural Language Processing Application', 'mk': 'Автоматско откривање на цевките за учење на хетерогенски машини: Апликација за процес на природен јазик', 'ms': 'Penemuan Automatik Pipeline Pempelajaran Mesin Heterogen: Aplikasi untuk Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami', 'mt': 'Skoperta Awtomatika ta’ Pipelini ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Magni Eteroġenużi: Applikazzjoni għall-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'mn': 'Heterogeneous Machine Learning Pipelines-ын автоматически олох: Байгалийн хэл Процессорын програм', 'ml': 'പൈപ്പെലിനുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഹെറോജെന്നിയുടെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക: സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രയോ', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Automatyczne odkrywanie heterogennych rurociągów uczenia maszynowego: zastosowanie do przetwarzania języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Descoperirea automată a conductelor heterogene de învățare automată: o aplicație la procesarea limbajului natural', 'so': 'Sidoo kale iskuul u baaraandegista mashiinka barashada qoraalka ah: Ka codsashada baaraandegista afka asalka ah', 'sr': 'Автоматично разкривање гетерогенских машина научања пипелина: Прилагање природнојезика', 'sv': 'Automatisk upptäckt av heterogena rörledningar för maskininlärning: en tillämpning på naturlig språkbehandling', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tự động bỏ qua cỗ máy dị biến học đường ống... Một chương trình hóa ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'da': 'Automatisk opdagelse af heterogene maskinlæringsrørledninger: En anvendelse til naturlig sprogbehandling', 'de': 'Automatische Entdeckung heterogener Machine Learning Pipelines: Eine Anwendung für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache', 'nl': 'Automatische ontdekking van heterogene Machine Learning Pipelines: een toepassing op natuurlijke taalverwerking', 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje heterogenijskih mašina učenja: aplikacija prirodnog jezika', 'bg': 'Автоматично откриване на хетерогенни тръбопроводи за машинно обучение: приложение за обработка на естествени езици', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kujitambulisha binafsi ya mashine ya Kujifunza Miundombi: Shirika la Utafiti wa Lugha za asili', 'tr': 'Heterogen Maşynyň Öwrenmek Pipelini Awtomatik Aňlamak: Tibiýal Diller işlemegine bir program', 'id': 'Penemuan Otomatis dari Pipeline Belajar Mesin Heterogen: Aplikasi untuk Proses Bahasa Alami', 'sq': 'Zbulimi automatik i tubave të mësimit të makinave heterogjene: një aplikim për procesimin e gjuhës natyrore', 'ko': '이구기계 학습 파이프의 자동 발견: 자연 언어 처리에서의 응용', 'af': 'Name', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'Automatic Discovery of Heterogeneous Machine Learning Pipelines: An Application to Natural Language Processing', 'az': '䡥瑥牯来湥潵猠䵡歩渠쎖祲즙湭즙⁐楰敬楮泉饲楮楮⁁癴潭慴楫⁋旅齦整椺⁔즙扩즙瑬椠䑩氠쒰얟泉饭즙獩\u20c3볃ꟃ뱮⁕祧畬慭愊', 'bs': 'Automatski otkrivanje heterogenejskih mašina učenja: aplikacija prirodnog jezika', 'ca': 'Automatic Discovery of Heterogeneous Machine Learning Pipelines: An Application to Natural Language Processing', 'hy': 'Հետրոգեն մեքենաների սովորելու խողովակների ավտոմատ հայտնաբերումը. Բնական լեզվի վերլուծության ծրագիր', 'cs': 'Automatické zjištění heterogenních potrubí strojového učení: aplikace pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka', 'et': 'Heterogeensete masinõppetorustike automaatne avastamine: loodusliku keele töötlemise rakendus', 'fi': 'Heterogeenisten koneoppimisputkien automaattinen löytäminen: sovellus luonnollisen kielen käsittelyyn', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'גילוי אוטומטי של צינורות ללמוד מכונות טרוגניות: תכנית לעבודת שפת טבעית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Heterogeneous Machine Learning Pipelines ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱ་ནག', 'sk': 'Samodejno odkrivanje heterogenih cevovodov strojnega učenja: aplikacija za obdelavo naravnega jezika'}
{'en': 'This paper presents AutoGOAL, a system for automatic machine learning (AutoML) that uses heterogeneous techniques. In contrast with existing AutoML approaches, our contribution can automatically build machine learning pipelines that combine techniques and algorithms from different frameworks, including shallow classifiers, natural language processing tools, and neural networks. We define the heterogeneous AutoML optimization problem as the search for the best sequence of algorithms that transforms specific input data into the desired output. This provides a novel theoretical and practical approach to AutoML. Our proposal is experimentally evaluated in diverse machine learning problems and compared with alternative approaches, showing that it is competitive with other AutoML alternatives in standard benchmarks. Furthermore, it can be applied to novel scenarios, such as several NLP tasks, where existing alternatives can not be directly deployed. The system is freely available and includes in-built compatibility with a large number of popular machine learning frameworks, which makes our approach useful for solving practical problems with relative ease and effort.', 'ar': 'يقدم هذا البحث نظام AutoGOAL ، وهو نظام للتعلم الآلي (AutoML) يستخدم تقنيات غير متجانسة. على عكس مناهج AutoML الحالية ، يمكن أن تقوم مساهمتنا تلقائيًا ببناء خطوط أنابيب للتعلم الآلي تجمع بين التقنيات والخوارزميات من أطر مختلفة ، بما في ذلك المصنفات الضحلة وأدوات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والشبكات العصبية. نحدد مشكلة تحسين AutoML غير المتجانسة على أنها البحث عن أفضل تسلسل للخوارزميات التي تحول بيانات إدخال محددة إلى المخرجات المطلوبة. يوفر هذا نهجًا نظريًا وعمليًا جديدًا لـ AutoML. يتم تقييم اقتراحنا تجريبيًا في مشكلات التعلم الآلي المتنوعة ومقارنته بالنُهج البديلة ، مما يُظهر أنه منافس لبدائل AutoML الأخرى في المعايير القياسية. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكن تطبيقه على سيناريوهات جديدة ، مثل العديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، حيث لا يمكن نشر البدائل الحالية بشكل مباشر. النظام متاح مجانًا ويتضمن توافقًا داخليًا مع عدد كبير من أطر التعلم الآلي الشائعة ، مما يجعل نهجنا مفيدًا في حل المشكلات العملية بسهولة وجهد نسبيين.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta AutoGoal, un sistema de aprendizaje automático automático (AutoML) que utiliza técnicas heterogéneas. A diferencia de los enfoques de AutoML existentes, nuestra contribución puede crear automáticamente canales de aprendizaje automático que combinen técnicas y algoritmos de diferentes marcos, incluidos clasificadores superficiales, herramientas de procesamiento de lenguaje natural y redes neuronales. Definimos el problema heterogéneo de optimización de AutoML como la búsqueda de la mejor secuencia de algoritmos que transforme datos de entrada específicos en la salida deseada. Esto proporciona un enfoque teórico y práctico novedoso para AutoML. Nuestra propuesta se evalúa experimentalmente en diversos problemas de aprendizaje automático y se compara con enfoques alternativos, lo que demuestra que es competitiva con otras alternativas de AutoML en los puntos de referencia estándar. Además, se puede aplicar a escenarios novedosos, como varias tareas de PNL, donde las alternativas existentes no se pueden implementar directamente. El sistema está disponible de forma gratuita e incluye compatibilidad integrada con una gran cantidad de marcos de aprendizaje automático populares, lo que hace que nuestro enfoque sea útil para resolver problemas prácticos con relativa facilidad y esfuerzo.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta o AutoGOAL, um sistema de aprendizado de máquina automático (AutoML) que utiliza técnicas heterogêneas. Em contraste com as abordagens existentes do AutoML, nossa contribuição pode criar automaticamente pipelines de aprendizado de máquina que combinam técnicas e algoritmos de diferentes estruturas, incluindo classificadores superficiais, ferramentas de processamento de linguagem natural e redes neurais. Definimos o problema heterogêneo de otimização AutoML como a busca pela melhor sequência de algoritmos que transforma dados de entrada específicos na saída desejada. Isso fornece uma nova abordagem teórica e prática para o AutoML. Nossa proposta é avaliada experimentalmente em diversos problemas de aprendizado de máquina e comparada com abordagens alternativas, mostrando que é competitiva com outras alternativas de AutoML em benchmarks padrão. Além disso, pode ser aplicado a novos cenários, como várias tarefas de PNL, onde as alternativas existentes não podem ser implantadas diretamente. O sistema está disponível gratuitamente e inclui compatibilidade integrada com um grande número de estruturas populares de aprendizado de máquina, o que torna nossa abordagem útil para resolver problemas práticos com relativa facilidade e esforço.', 'fr': "Cet article présente AutoGoal, un système d'apprentissage automatique (AutoML) qui utilise des techniques hétérogènes. Contrairement aux approches AutoML existantes, notre contribution peut automatiquement créer des pipelines d'apprentissage automatique qui combinent des techniques et des algorithmes issus de différents cadres, y compris des classificateurs superficiels, des outils de traitement du langage naturel et des réseaux de neurones. Nous définissons le problème d'optimisation AutoML hétérogène comme la recherche de la meilleure séquence d'algorithmes qui transforme des données d'entrée spécifiques en sortie souhaitée. Cela fournit une nouvelle approche théorique et pratique d'AutoML. Notre proposition est évaluée expérimentalement dans divers problèmes d'apprentissage automatique et comparée à d'autres approches, ce qui montre qu'elle est compétitive par rapport aux autres alternatives AutoML dans les benchmarks standard. En outre, il peut être appliqué à de nouveaux scénarios, tels que plusieurs tâches de PNL, dans lesquels les alternatives existantes ne peuvent pas être directement déployées. Le système est disponible gratuitement et inclut une compatibilité intégrée avec un grand nombre de structures d'apprentissage automatique populaires, ce qui rend notre approche utile pour résoudre des problèmes pratiques avec une facilité et un effort relatifs.", 'ja': '本稿では，異種手法を用いた自動機械学習（ AutoML ）システムであるAutoGOALを紹介する。 既存のAutoMLアプローチとは対照的に、当社の貢献は、浅い分類子、自然言語処理ツール、ニューラルネットワークなど、さまざまなフレームワークからの技術とアルゴリズムを組み合わせた機械学習パイプラインを自動的に構築することができます。 異種AutoML最適化問題を、特定の入力データを目的の出力に変換する最良のアルゴリズムシーケンスの検索として定義します。 これは、AutoMLに対する新規の理論的および実用的なアプローチを提供します。 当社の提案は、多様な機械学習の問題で実験的に評価され、他のアプローチと比較され、標準的なベンチマークで他のAutoMLの代替案と競合することが示されています。 さらに、既存の代替案を直接展開できないいくつかのNLPタスクなどの新規シナリオに適用することができる。 このシステムは無料で利用でき、多くの人気のある機械学習フレームワークとの組み込み互換性を備えているため、当社のアプローチは、比較的簡単かつ労力をかけて実用的な問題を解決するのに役立ちます。', 'zh': '本文言AutoGOAL,此用异构术者自机器学(AutoML)统也。 方之AutoML术,吾自构机器学道,合框架术算法,包浅分类器,自然语言处器神经网络。 以异构 AutoML 优化定义为搜索特定输数转输最佳。 这为AutoML以新论行之。 臣等提案于诸机器学实验评,并校代法,明其准的准式中与他AutoML代法有竞争力。 此外可施于新场,如数NLP之任,其见代方案不得径部署。 其统免费也,兼与流行之机器学框架之内置兼容性,此吾道之于缓急也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर AutoGOAL प्रस्तुत करता है, जो स्वचालित मशीन लर्निंग (ऑटोएमएल) के लिए एक प्रणाली है जो विषम तकनीकों का उपयोग करता है। मौजूदा ऑटोएमएल दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत, हमारा योगदान स्वचालित रूप से मशीन लर्निंग पाइपलाइनों का निर्माण कर सकता है जो उथले क्लासिफायर, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण उपकरण और तंत्रिका नेटवर्क सहित विभिन्न ढांचे से तकनीकों और एल्गोरिदम को जोड़ते हैं। हम विषम AutoML अनुकूलन समस्या को एल्गोरिदम के सर्वोत्तम अनुक्रम की खोज के रूप में परिभाषित करते हैं जो विशिष्ट इनपुट डेटा को वांछित आउटपुट में परिवर्तित करता है। यह AutoML के लिए एक उपन्यास सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक दृष्टिकोण प्रदान करता है। हमारे प्रस्ताव को प्रयोगात्मक रूप से विविध मशीन सीखने की समस्याओं में मूल्यांकन किया जाता है और वैकल्पिक दृष्टिकोणों के साथ तुलना की जाती है, यह दिखाते हुए कि यह मानक बेंचमार्क में अन्य ऑटोएमएल विकल्पों के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है। इसके अलावा, इसे उपन्यास परिदृश्यों पर लागू किया जा सकता है, जैसे कि कई एनएलपी कार्य, जहां मौजूदा विकल्प सीधे तैनात नहीं किए जा सकते हैं। सिस्टम स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध है और इसमें बड़ी संख्या में लोकप्रिय मशीन लर्निंग फ्रेमवर्क के साथ इन-बिल्ट संगतता शामिल है, जो हमारे दृष्टिकोण को सापेक्ष आसानी और प्रयास के साथ व्यावहारिक समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए उपयोगी बनाता है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлена AutoGOAL, система автоматического машинного обучения (AutoML), использующая гетерогенные методы. В отличие от существующих подходов AutoML, наш вклад может автоматически строить трубопроводы машинного обучения, которые объединяют методы и алгоритмы из различных фреймворков, включая неглубокие классификаторы, инструменты обработки естественного языка и нейронные сети. Мы определяем гетерогенную задачу оптимизации AutoML как поиск наилучшей последовательности алгоритмов, которая преобразует конкретные входные данные в желаемый выход. Это обеспечивает новый теоретический и практический подход к AutoML. Наше предложение экспериментально оценивается в различных задачах машинного обучения и сравнивается с альтернативными подходами, показывая, что оно конкурирует с другими альтернативами AutoML в стандартных контрольных показателях. Кроме того, он может быть применен к новым сценариям, таким как несколько задач NLP, где существующие альтернативы не могут быть напрямую развернуты. Система свободно доступна и включает в себя встроенную совместимость с большим количеством популярных фреймворков машинного обучения, что делает наш подход полезным для решения практических задач с относительной легкостью и усилиями.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair AutoGOAL, córas um mheaisínfhoghlaim uathoibríoch (AutoML) a úsáideann teicnící ilchineálacha. I gcodarsnacht leis na cineálacha cur chuige AutoML atá ann cheana féin, is féidir lenár ranníocaíocht píblínte foghlama meaisín a thógáil go huathoibríoch a chomhcheanglaíonn teicnící agus halgartaim ó chreataí éagsúla, lena n-áirítear aicmithe éadomhain, uirlisí próiseála teanga nádúrtha, agus líonraí néaracha. Sainmhínímid fadhb ilchineálach leas iomlán a bhaint AutoML mar an cuardach don seicheamh is fearr halgartaim a athraíonn sonraí ionchuir sonracha isteach san aschur inmhianaithe. Soláthraíonn sé seo cur chuige nua teoiriciúil agus praiticiúil i leith AutoML. Déantar ár dtogra a mheas go turgnamhach maidir le fadhbanna éagsúla meaisínfhoghlama agus cuirtear i gcomparáid é le cineálacha cur chuige eile, rud a léiríonn go bhfuil sé iomaíoch le roghanna eile AutoML i tagarmharcanna caighdeánacha. Ina theannta sin, is féidir é a chur i bhfeidhm ar chásanna núíosacha, mar roinnt tascanna NLP, nuair nach féidir roghanna eile atá ann cheana a úsáid go díreach. Tá an córas ar fáil saor in aisce agus cuimsíonn sé comhoiriúnacht ionsuite le líon mór creataí meaisínfhoghlama a bhfuil tóir orthu, rud a fhágann go bhfuil ár gcur chuige úsáideach chun fadhbanna praiticiúla a réiteach go héasca agus go hiarracht.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტი აჩვენებს AutoGOAL, ავტომატიკური მაქანის სწავლების სისტემა (AutoML) რომელიც ჰეტეროგენი ტექნოგიების გამოყენება. მიმდინარე AutoML მიღებების კონტრესტით, ჩვენი დამატება შეუძლია ავტომატურად შექმნა მაქსინური სწავლების ფესტურები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული ფესტურებიდან ტექნიკები და ალგორიტიმები, რომლებიც ცოტა ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით ჰეტეროგენური AutoML ოპტიმიზაციის პრობლემა, როგორც ალგორიტემის უკეთესი წესების ძებნა, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების მონაცემების შემდეგ ეს პრომენტიკური ტეორეტიკური და პრაქტიკური მოხმარებას AutoML-ზე. ჩვენი პროგრამები ექსპერიმენტიურად განსხვავებული მაქინის სწავლების პრობლემებში გაუმუშავებულია და ალტენტრუმენტური დახმარებით გადამუშავებულია, რომ ის სხვა AutoML ალტე დამატებით, ეს შეიძლება ახალი სინარიოში გადაყენება, როგორც რამდენიმე NLP დავალება, სადაც არსებობს ალტენტრუმენტები არ შეიძლება Direkt გადაყენება. სისტემა თავისუფალურად ხელსახულია და შექმნილი კომპორაციელობა უფრო დიდი პოლიპური მაქინის სწავლების ფრამებით, რომელიც ჩვენი პროგრამის გამოსახულებელი პრაქტიკური პრობლ', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az AutoGOAL-t, egy heterogén technikákat alkalmazó automatikus gépi tanulási rendszert (AutoML). A meglévő AutoML megközelítésekkel ellentétben hozzájárulásunk automatikusan olyan gépi tanulási csatornákat építhet, amelyek különböző keretrendszerek technikáit és algoritmusait kombinálják, beleértve a sekély osztályozókat, a természetes nyelvfeldolgozó eszközöket és az idegi hálózatokat. A heterogén AutoML optimalizálási problémát úgy definiáljuk, mint a legjobb algoritmussorozat keresése, amely konkrét bemeneti adatokat a kívánt kimenetre alakítja át. Ez egy új elméleti és gyakorlati megközelítést biztosít az AutoML-hez. Javaslatunkat kísérletileg értékeljük különböző gépi tanulási problémákban és alternatív megközelítésekkel összehasonlítjuk, bizonyítva, hogy a standard referenciaértékekben versenyképes más AutoML alternatívákkal. Ezenkívül alkalmazható új forgatókönyvekre, például több NLP-feladatra is, ahol a meglévő alternatívákat nem lehet közvetlenül bevezetni. A rendszer szabadon elérhető, és beépített kompatibilitással rendelkezik számos népszerű gépi tanulási keretrendszerrel, ami hasznossá teszi a gyakorlati problémák viszonylag könnyű és erőfeszítéssel történő megoldását.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα σύστημα αυτόματης μηχανικής μάθησης (που χρησιμοποιεί ετερογενείς τεχνικές. Σε αντίθεση με τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις, η συμβολή μας μπορεί αυτόματα να δημιουργήσει αγωγούς μηχανικής μάθησης που συνδυάζουν τεχνικές και αλγόριθμους από διαφορετικά πλαίσια, συμπεριλαμβανομένων ρηχών ταξινομητών, εργαλείων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας και νευρωνικών δικτύων. Καθορίζουμε το ετερογενή πρόβλημα βελτιστοποίησης ως η αναζήτηση της καλύτερης ακολουθίας αλγόριθμων που μετατρέπει συγκεκριμένα δεδομένα εισόδου στην επιθυμητή έξοδο. Αυτό παρέχει μια νέα θεωρητική και πρακτική προσέγγιση στο αυτόματο ML. Η πρότασή μας αξιολογείται πειραματικά σε διάφορα προβλήματα μηχανικής μάθησης και συγκρίνεται με εναλλακτικές προσεγγίσεις, δείχνοντας ότι είναι ανταγωνιστική με άλλες εναλλακτικές λύσεις σε τυποποιημένα κριτήρια αναφοράς. Επιπλέον, μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε νέα σενάρια, όπως πολλές εργασίες NLP, όπου οι υπάρχουσες εναλλακτικές λύσεις δεν μπορούν να αναπτυχθούν άμεσα. Το σύστημα είναι ελεύθερα διαθέσιμο και περιλαμβάνει ενσωματωμένη συμβατότητα με ένα μεγάλο αριθμό δημοφιλών πλαισίων μηχανικής μάθησης, γεγονός που καθιστά την προσέγγισή μας χρήσιμη για την επίλυση πρακτικών προβλημάτων με σχετική ευκολία και προσπάθεια.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta AutoGOAL, un sistema di apprendimento automatico automatico (AutoML) che utilizza tecniche eterogenee. In contrasto con gli approcci AutoML esistenti, il nostro contributo può creare automaticamente pipeline di apprendimento automatico che combinano tecniche e algoritmi provenienti da diversi framework, inclusi classificatori superficiali, strumenti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e reti neurali. Definiamo il problema eterogeneo di ottimizzazione AutoML come la ricerca della migliore sequenza di algoritmi che trasformi dati di input specifici nell'output desiderato. Questo fornisce un nuovo approccio teorico e pratico ad AutoML. La nostra proposta viene valutata sperimentalmente in diversi problemi di machine learning e confrontata con approcci alternativi, dimostrando di essere competitiva con altre alternative AutoML nei benchmark standard. Inoltre, può essere applicato a nuovi scenari, come ad esempio diversi compiti del PNL, in cui le alternative esistenti non possono essere utilizzate direttamente. Il sistema è liberamente disponibile e include la compatibilità integrata con un gran numero di framework di machine learning popolari, il che rende il nostro approccio utile per risolvere problemi pratici con relativa facilità e fatica.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз гетерогенды техникаларды қолданатын автоматты машина оқыту (AutoML) жүйесін AutoGOAL дегенді көрсетеді. Мынау AutoML қатынасына қарамастан, біздің қатынасыз автоматты түрде техникаларды мен алгоритмдерді түрлі фреймдерден біріктіретін машиналық үйрену құрылғыларын құруға болады, сондай-ақ бөлек классификациялары, табиғи тілдерді Біз гетероген AutoML оптимизациясының мәселесін қалаған шығысына аударатын алгоритмдердің ең жақсы ретін іздеу үшін анықтаймыз. Бұл AutoML- ге теоретикалық және практикалық жағдай береді. Біздің ұсынысымыз әртүрлі машинаның оқыту мәселелерінде тәжірибелі мәселелерді бағалады және альтернативті жағдайлармен салыстырылады, стандартты бағдарламалардың басқа AutoML альтер Сонымен қатар, ол жаңа сценарияларға қолданылады, мысалы, NLP тапсырмалары, бар альтернативтер тікелей жұмыс істемейді. Бұл жүйе еркін қол жеткізілген және салыстырмалы және әсер етілген проблемаларды шешу үшін көптеген машиналық оқыту фреймілерімен бірнеше сәйкестіктер қолданылады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama AutoGOAL, automatinio mašinų mokymosi sistema (AutoML), kuri naudoja įvairiapusius metodus. Priešingai nei esami AutoML metodai, mūsų indėlis automatiškai gali sukurti mašinų mokymosi vamzdynus, kurie derina įvairių sistemų metodus ir algoritmus, įskaitant plokščius klasifikatorius, gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo priemones ir nervinius tinklus. Mes apibrėžiame heterogeninę AutoML optimizacijos problem ą kaip geriausios algoritmų sekos paiešką, kuri paverčia konkrečius įvesties duomenis pageidaujamu išėjimu. Tai suteikia naują teorinį ir praktinį požiūrį į AutoML. Mūsų pasiūlymas eksperimentiškai vertinamas įvairiose mašin ų mokymosi problemose ir lyginamas su alternatyviais metodais, rodančiais, kad jis konkurencingas su kitomis AutoML alternatyvomis standartiniuose lyginamuosiuose standartuose. Furthermore, it can be applied to novel scenarios, such as several NLP tasks, where existing alternatives cannot be directly deployed.  The system is freely available and includes in-built compatibility with a large number of popular machine learning frameworks, which makes our approach useful for solving practical problems with relative ease and effort.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија претставува AutoGOAL, систем за автоматско машинско учење (AutoML) кој користи хетерогенски техники. За разлика од постојните пристапи на Автомол, нашиот придонес може автоматски да изгради гасоводи за машинско учење кои комбинираат техники и алгоритми од различни рамки, вклучувајќи ги и плошките класификатори, природните алатки за процес на јазик и нервните мреж Го дефинираме хетерогенскиот проблем со оптимизацијата на Автомол како потрага по најдобрата секвенца на алгоритми кои трансформираат специфични внесени податоци во желба за излез. This provides a novel theoretical and practical approach to AutoML.  Our proposal is experimentally evaluated in diverse machine learning problems and compared with alternative approaches, showing that it is competitive with other AutoML alternatives in standard benchmarks.  Покрај тоа, истиот може да се примени на новите сценарија, како што се неколку задачи на НЛП, каде што постојните алтернативи не можат да бидат директно распоредени. Системот е слободно достапен и вклучува внатрешна компатибилност со голем број популарни рамки за машинско учење, што го прави нашиот пристап корисен за решавање на практичните проблеми со релативна лесност и напори.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan AutoGOAL, sistem untuk pembelajaran mesin automatik (AutoML) yang menggunakan teknik heterogene. Sebaliknya dengan pendekatan AutoML yang wujud, kontribusi kita boleh secara automatik membina saluran paip pembelajaran mesin yang menggabungkan teknik dan algoritma dari bingkai yang berbeza, termasuk klasifikasi rendah, alat pemprosesan bahasa alam, dan rangkaian saraf. Kami takrifkan masalah optimizasi AutoML heterogene sebagai pencarian urutan terbaik algoritma yang mengubah data input khusus ke output yang diinginkan. Ini menyediakan pendekatan teori dan praktik baru ke AutoML. cadangan kami diuji secara eksperimen dalam masalah pembelajaran mesin berbeza dan dibandingkan dengan pendekatan alternatif, menunjukkan bahawa ia adalah kompetitif dengan alternatif AutoML lain dalam tanda referensi piawai. Selain itu, ia boleh dilaksanakan pada skenario baru, seperti beberapa tugas NLP, di mana alternatif yang wujud tidak boleh digunakan secara langsung. Sistem tersedia secara bebas dan termasuk kompatibilitas dalam-dibina dengan sejumlah besar bingkai pembelajaran mesin populer, yang membuat pendekatan kita berguna untuk memecahkan masalah praktik dengan kemudahan relatif dan usaha.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta AutoGOAL, sistema għat-tagħlim awtomatiku tal-magni (AutoML) li tuża tekniki eteroġeni. B’kuntrast mal-approċċi eżistenti tal-AutoML, il-kontribut tagħna jista’ awtomatikament jibni pipelines tat-tagħlim tal-magni li jikkombinaw tekniki u algoritmi minn oqfsa differenti, inklużi klassifikaturi baxxi, għodod tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali, u netwerks newrali. Aħna niddefinixxu l-problema eteroġenja tal-ottimizzazzjoni tal-AutoML bħala t-tiftix għall-aħjar sekwenza ta’ algoritmi li jittrasformaw dejta speċifika ta’ input fil-produzzjoni mixtieqa. Dan jipprovdi approċċ teoretiku u prattiku ġdid għall-AutoML. Il-proposta tagħna hija evalwata b’mod sperimentali fi problemi varji ta’ tagħlim bil-magni u mqabbla ma’ approċċi alternattivi, li juru li hija kompetittiva ma’ alternattivi oħra AutoML f’punti ta’ riferiment standard. Furthermore, it can be applied to novel scenarios, such as several NLP tasks, where existing alternatives cannot be directly deployed.  Is-sistema hija disponibbli liberament u tinkludi kompatibbiltà integrata ma’ għadd kbir ta’ oqfsa popolari ta’ tagħlim bil-magni, li jagħmel l-approċċ tagħna utli għas-soluzzjoni ta’ problemi prattiċi b’faċilità u sforz relattiv.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സ്വയം യന്ത്ര പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമാണ് ഓട്ടോഗോവാലിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നത്. അത് ഹെറോജെനിസ്  നിലവിലുള്ള ഓട്ടോഎംഎല്\u200d സമ്മാനങ്ങളുമായി നമ്മുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം പഠിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പൈപ്പെലിനുകള്\u200d പണിയാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ കഴിയും. വ്യത്യസ് We define the heterogeneous AutoML optimization problem as the search for the best sequence of algorithms that transforms specific input data into the desired output.  ഇത് സ്വയം എംഎലിലേക്ക് ഒരു നോവല്\u200d തിയോറിക്കലിലും പ്രാക്തികമായ വഴിയും നല്\u200dകുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശം വ്യത്യസ്ത മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതാണ്. മറ്റൊരു വഴികളോടൊപ്പം താല്\u200dപ്പര്യം ചെയ്യ പിന്നീട് നിലവിലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് അയയ്ക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കില്ല. സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരുപാട് മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളുമായി പണിയിക്കപ്പെട', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser AutoGOAL, eit system for automatisk maskinelæring (AutoML) som brukar heterogeneske teknikk. I contrast with existing AutoML approaches, our contribution can automatically build machine learning pipelines that combine techniques and algorithms from different frameworks, including shallow classifiers, natural language processing tools and neural networks. Vi definerer det heterogeneske optimaliseringsproblemet for AutoML som søket etter den beste rekkjefølgja av algoritmer som transformerer spesifikke inndata til den ønskte utdata. Name Vårt forslag er eksperimentelt evaluert i ulike maskinelæringsproblemer og samanlikna med alternativ tilnærmingar, viser at det er konkurrentivt med andre AutoML-alternativ i standardvanker. Det kan også brukast til nye scenarioar, som fleire NLP-oppgåver, der eksisterande alternativer kan ikkje direkte utførast. Systemet er fritt tilgjengeleg og inneheld i bygde kompatibilitet med mange populære maskinelæringsrammeverk, som gjer tilnærminga vårt nyttig for å løysa praktiske problemar med relativt enkelt og innsatt.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь автоматически машин суралцах (AutoML) системийг автоматжуулдаг AutoGOAL-г харуулдаг. Мөн байгаа AutoML-ын ойлголтын эсрэг бидний зориулалт өөр өөр хэлбэрээс техник, алгоритмыг нийлүүлэх машин суралцах хоолойн шулуунуудыг автоматаар бүтээж болно. Бид гетероген AutoML-ын эерэг үзүүлэлтийн асуудлыг хэрэглэх алгоритмын хамгийн шилдэг дарааллыг нь тодорхойлох өгөгдлийг хүсэлтэй гаралт руу шилжүүлдэг гэж тодорхойлдог. Энэ нь AutoML-д шинэ теоретик, практикийн арга зам өгдөг. Бидний санал бол машин суралцах асуудлуудын туршилтаар шалгаж, өөр өөр арга барилгуудтай харьцуулан, стандарт багц дээр бусад AutoML-ын өөрчлөлтийг өрсөлдөг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Дараа нь, үүнийг шинэ санаанд хэрэглэж болно. Жишээ нь олон НLP даалгаврууд, суурь сонголтууд шууд ашиглаж чадахгүй. Энэ систем маш олон хүн төрөлхтний суралцах үйл ажиллагааны асуудлуудыг харьцуулахад ашигтай болгодог.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono AutoGOAL, system automatycznego uczenia maszynowego (AutoML), który wykorzystuje heterogeniczne techniki. W przeciwieństwie do istniejących podejść AutoML, nasz wkład może automatycznie budować rurociągi uczenia maszynowego, które łączą techniki i algorytmy z różnych frameworków, w tym płytkich klasyfikatorów, narzędzi do przetwarzania języka naturalnego i sieci neuronowych. Definiujemy heterogeniczny problem optymalizacji AutoML jako poszukiwanie najlepszej sekwencji algorytmów, które przekształcają określone dane wejściowe w pożądane wyjście. Zapewnia to nowatorskie teoretyczne i praktyczne podejście do AutoML. Nasza propozycja jest eksperymentalnie oceniana w różnych problemach uczenia maszynowego i porównywana z alternatywnymi podejściami, pokazując, że jest konkurencyjna z innymi alternatywami AutoML w standardowych wskaźnikach porównawczych. Ponadto można go stosować do nowych scenariuszy, takich jak kilka zadań NLP, w których istniejące alternatywy nie mogą być bezpośrednio wdrożone. System jest dowolnie dostępny i zawiera wbudowaną kompatybilność z dużą liczbą popularnych frameworków uczenia maszynowego, co sprawia, że nasze podejście jest przydatne do rozwiązywania praktycznych problemów ze względną łatwością i wysiłkiem.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă AutoGOAL, un sistem de învățare automată (AutoML) care utilizează tehnici eterogene. Spre deosebire de abordările AutoML existente, contribuția noastră poate construi automat conducte de învățare automată care combină tehnici și algoritmi din diferite cadre, inclusiv clasificatori superficiali, instrumente de procesare a limbajului natural și rețele neurale. Definim problema eterogenă de optimizare AutoML ca fiind căutarea celei mai bune secvențe de algoritmi care transformă datele specifice de intrare în ieșirea dorită. Aceasta oferă o nouă abordare teoretică și practică a AutoML. Propunerea noastră este evaluată experimental în diverse probleme de învățare automată și comparată cu abordări alternative, arătând că este competitivă cu alte alternative AutoML în standarde de referință. În plus, aceasta poate fi aplicată scenariilor noi, cum ar fi mai multe sarcini PNL, în care alternativele existente nu pot fi implementate direct. Sistemul este disponibil gratuit și include compatibilitate încorporată cu un număr mare de cadre de machine learning populare, ceea ce face abordarea noastră utilă pentru rezolvarea problemelor practice cu relativă ușurință și efort.', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo bandhigaa AutoGOAL, nidaam barashada machine-automatic (AutoML) oo isticmaalaya qalabka suurogeneous. Iska duwan qaababka ay jiraan AutoML, qaybtayadu waxay si automatic ah u dhisi kartaa baaritaanka barashada mashiinada oo ka kooban karta teknikada iyo algorithamyada iyo qashinka kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ka mid ah fasaxyo khaas ah, qalabka baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah iyo shabakado cayilnaanta ah. Waxaannu ku qoraynaa dhibaatada bedelashada jimicsiga ee AutoML sida raadinta ugu wanaagsan hababadka algorithm oo ku beddeliya macluumaadka input gaar ah oo u beddeliya midhaha la doonayo. Taasi waxay ka heleysaa qaab tioretical and practical approach autoML. Fiiriyahayada waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa dhibaatooyin waxbarasho oo machine kala duduwan, waxayna la barbarto qaabab kale oo kala duduwan, waxayna muuqaneysaa in ay iskutallaabo u leedahay bedelyada kale ee AutoML ee kaartan. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu codsan karaa aragtida saxda ah, tusaale ahaan shaqooyinka NLP, kuwaas oo aan si toos ah u soo dejin karin fursado jira. Isticmaalku waxey si xor ah u heli karaan islamarkaasna waxaa ku jira iskuulaadka barashada mashiinadaha oo badan, kaas oo ka dhigaya qaabilaada ay u faa’iido u leedahay xafiiska dhibaatooyinka caadiga ah ee la xiriira fudud iyo hawlaha.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja AutoGOAL, sistem za automatsko učenje mašine (AutoML), koji koristi heterogenezne tehnike. U suprotnosti sa postojećim pristupima AutoML-a, naš doprinos može automatski izgraditi kanalizacije za učenje mašine koji kombiniraju tehnike i algoritme iz različitih okvira, uključujući plitke klasifikatore, prirodne alate za obradu jezika i neuralne mreže. Definiramo heterogeneni problem optimizacije AutoML kao potragu za najboljim sekvencijom algoritma koji transformiše specifične ulazne podatke u željni izlaz. Ovo pruža novi teoretički i praktični pristup AutoML-u. Naš prijedlog je eksperimentalno procjenjen u različitim problemima sa učenjem mašine i u usporedbi sa alternativnim pristupima, pokazujući da je konkurentna sa drugim alternativama AutoML-a u standardnim kriterijama. Osim toga, to se može primjenjivati na nove scenarije, poput nekoliko zadataka NLP-a, gde postojeće alternative ne mogu direktno rasporediti. Sistem je slobodno dostupan i uključuje ugrađenu kompatibilnost sa velikim brojem popularnih okvira za učenje mašin a, što čini naš pristup korisnim za rješavanje praktičnih problema sa relativnim lakšom i naporima.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar AutoGOAL, ett system för automatisk maskininlärning (AutoML) som använder heterogena tekniker. I motsats till befintliga AutoML-metoder kan vårt bidrag automatiskt bygga maskininlärningpipelines som kombinerar tekniker och algoritmer från olika ramverk, inklusive ytliga klassificerare, verktyg för bearbetning av naturligt språk och neurala nätverk. Vi definierar det heterogena AutoML-optimeringsproblemet som sökandet efter den bästa sekvensen av algoritmer som omvandlar specifika indata till önskad utmatning. Detta ger ett nytt teoretiskt och praktiskt tillvägagångssätt för AutoML. Vårt förslag utvärderas experimentellt i olika maskininlärningsproblem och jämförs med alternativa tillvägagångssätt, vilket visar att det är konkurrenskraftigt med andra AutoML-alternativ i standardriktmärken. Dessutom kan den tillämpas på nya scenarier, till exempel flera nationella handlingsplaner, där befintliga alternativ inte kan användas direkt. Systemet är fritt tillgängligt och inkluderar inbyggd kompatibilitet med ett stort antal populära ramverk för maskininlärning, vilket gör vårt tillvägagångssätt användbart för att lösa praktiska problem med relativ lätthet och ansträngning.', 'si': 'Name ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ autoML අවස්ථාව සමග, අපේ සම්බන්ධය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ගන්න පායිප්ලයින් හදන්න පුළුවන් වෙන විවිධ ප්\u200dරකාර අපි හෙටෙරෝජනේස් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඇල්ගෝරිත්ම්ස්ගේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න, ඒක Name අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය විවිදිහට යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින්  තවත්, ඒක ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, NLP වැඩක් වගේ, තියෙන්න තියෙන වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න බෑ. පද්ධතිය නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ, සම්බන්ධ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විතරය', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தன்னியக்க இயந்திரத்தை கற்றுக்கான தன்னியக்க இயந்திரம் (தானியங்கி ML) முறைமையை கொடுக்கும், அது வெட்ரோஜன் த இருக்கும் தானியங்கி ML முறைமைகளுடன், எங்கள் செயல்பாடு தானாகவே கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் இயந்திரத்தை உருவாக்க முடியும். இது வேறு சட்டங்களிலிருந்து தொழில்நுட்பங்கள்  நாம் வெளியீட்டு தரவை விரும்பும் வெளியீட்டிற்கு மாற்றும் சிறந்த தேடும் பிரச்சனையாக தன்னியக்கமான ML முறைமைப்படுத்தல்  இது தன்னியக்கமாக ML க்கு ஒரு புதிய திரியல் மற்றும் செயல்படுத்தும் செயல்பாடுகளை வழங்குகிறது. எங்கள் பரிந்துரைப்பு பல இயந்திரம் கற்றல் பிரச்சனைகளில் மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது மற்றும் மாற்று வழிகளுடன் ஒப்பிடுகிறது, இது நிலையான நேர்மையில் மற அதற்கும், இது புதிய காட்சிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும், பல NLP பணிகளுக்கு, இருக்கும் விருப்பங்களை நேரடியாக கொடுக்க இயலாது. இந்த அமைப்பு இலவசமாக கிடைக்கும் மற்றும் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட பெரிய பொறுப்பான இயந்திரம் கற்றல் சட்டத்துடன் ஒப்புரிமையாக இருக்கும், அது சார', 'ur': 'This paper presents AutoGOAL, a system for automatic machine learning (AutoML) that uses heterogeneous techniques. موجود AutoML کے نزدیک ہونے کے مقابلہ میں، ہمارا مددگار اپنے ساتھ ماشین کی تعلیم پیپ لینٹ بنا سکتا ہے جو تکنیک اور الگوریتم مختلف فرمورک سے ترکیب کرتی ہیں، گھٹی کلاسفار، طبیعی زبان پرسس کے ابزار، اور نیورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ۔ ہم نے اٹوٹوژن اٹوٹوML optimization مسئلہ کی تعریف کی جگہ الگوریتموں کے بہترین سطح کی جگہ کے طور پر مقرر کر دی ہے جو ایک خاص اٹوٹوٹ ڈیٹا کو خواہش کی اٹوٹوٹ میں تبدیل کرتا ہے. یہ AutoML کے لئے ایک نئی نظریہ اور قابل طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے۔ ہماری پیشنهاد مختلف ماشین کی تعلیم مشکلات میں آزمائش کی گئی ہے اور مختلف طریقے کے مطابق مقابلہ کی گئی ہے، یہ دکھاتا ہے کہ یہ استاندارڈ بنچم مارک میں دوسرے اٹوٹوٹم الٹوٹیوں کے ساتھ مسابلہ ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ یہ نئی سناریوں پر لازم کر سکتا ہے، جیسے چند NLP ٹاکس، جہاں موجود alternatives مستقیماً استعمال نہیں کر سکتے۔ سیسٹم آزاد کے ساتھ موجود ہے اور بہت زیادہ مشهور ماشین یادہانی فرمورک کے ساتھ مہربانی کے ساتھ مہربانی کرتا ہے، جو ہماری طریقہ کو نسبتا آسانی اور تلاش کے ساتھ قابل مشکلات حل کے لئے فائدہ دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Mavjud AutoML murakkablari bilan boshqa murakkablaridan foydalanuvchimiz avtomatik o'rganish pipellarini yaratish mumkin. Ularni boshqa kompyuterdagi teknologiya va algoritlarni birlashtirish mumkin, shamol darajalar, tabiiy tillar boshqaruvchi vositalar va neyrol tarmoqlar bilan birlashtirish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Name Bizning rivojlanishimiz, har xil mashinalar o'rganish muammolarda qiymatdir va boshqa usullar bilan o'rganish va bu standard parametrlarda boshqa autoML parametrlari bilan rivojlanishi mumkin. Koʻrsatganda, bu yerda mavjud muloqatlar to ʻgʻri qoʻllanilmaydi. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất AutoGOal, một hệ thống tự động học máy (AutoML) dùng các kỹ thuật khác nhau. Tương đối với các tiếp cận của AutoML đã có, sự đóng góp của chúng tôi có thể tự động tạo ra các đường ống học máy, kết hợp các kỹ thuật và thuật toán từ các cấu trúc khác nhau, bao gồm các phân loại nông, các công cụ xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, và mạng thần kinh. Chúng tôi xác định vấn đề tối ưu của AutoML là hệ thống truy tìm hiệu ứng tốt nhất các thuật toán có thể biến dữ liệu nhập đặc biệt thành kết xuất cần thiết. Đây là cách tiếp cận lý thuyết và thực tế mới với AutoML. Lời đề nghị của chúng tôi được thử nghiệm trong các vấn đề học máy khác nhau và so sánh với các phương pháp khác nhau, cho thấy nó có thể cạnh tranh với các tiêu chuẩn. Hơn nữa, nó có thể được áp dụng cho các viễn cảnh mới, như một số công việc chọc dò tủy sống, nơi không thể triển khai trực tiếp các thay thế hiện tại. Hệ thống này có thể tự do sử dụng và có khả năng tương ứng với rất nhiều trường hợp học cỗ máy phổ biến, nhờ đó cách tiếp cận của chúng ta có ích để giải quyết các vấn đề thực tế dễ dàng và nỗ lực tương đối.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя система за автоматично машинно обучение, която използва хетерогенни техники. За разлика от съществуващите подходи, нашият принос може автоматично да изгради тръбопроводи за машинно обучение, които комбинират техники и алгоритми от различни рамки, включително плитки класификатори, инструменти за обработка на естествен език и невронни мрежи. Определяме хетерогенния проблем с оптимизацията като търсене на най-добрата последователност от алгоритми, които трансформират конкретни входни данни в желания изход. Това осигурява нов теоретичен и практически подход към АвтоМЛ. Нашето предложение е експериментално оценено при различни проблеми с машинното обучение и сравнено с алтернативни подходи, показвайки, че е конкурентоспособно с други алтернативи в стандартните показатели. Освен това тя може да се прилага за нови сценарии, като например няколко задачи за НЛО, при които съществуващите алтернативи не могат да бъдат пряко разгърнати. Системата е свободно достъпна и включва вградена съвместимост с голям брой популярни рамки за машинно обучение, което прави нашия подход полезен за решаване на практически проблеми с относителна лекота и усилия.', 'nl': "Dit artikel presenteert AutoGOAL, een systeem voor automatisch machine learning (AutoML) dat gebruik maakt van heterogene technieken. In tegenstelling tot bestaande AutoML-benaderingen, kan onze bijdrage automatisch machine learning pipelines bouwen die technieken en algoritmes combineren uit verschillende frameworks, waaronder ondiepe classificatoren, natuurlijke taalverwerkingstools en neurale netwerken. We definiëren het heterogene AutoML optimalisatieprobleem als het zoeken naar de beste reeks algoritmen die specifieke invoergegevens omzetten in de gewenste output. Dit biedt een nieuwe theoretische en praktische benadering van AutoML. Ons voorstel wordt experimenteel geëvalueerd in diverse machine learning problemen en vergeleken met alternatieve benaderingen, waaruit blijkt dat het concurrerend is met andere AutoML alternatieven in standaard benchmarks. Bovendien kan het worden toegepast op nieuwe scenario's, zoals verschillende NLP-taken, waarbij bestaande alternatieven niet direct kunnen worden ingezet. Het systeem is vrij beschikbaar en bevat ingebouwde compatibiliteit met een groot aantal populaire machine learning frameworks, wat onze aanpak nuttig maakt voor het oplossen van praktische problemen met relatief gemak en moeite.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt AutoGOAL vor, ein System für automatisches maschinelles Lernen (AutoML), das heterogene Techniken verwendet. Im Gegensatz zu bestehenden AutoML-Ansätzen kann unser Beitrag automatisch Pipelines für maschinelles Lernen erstellen, die Techniken und Algorithmen aus verschiedenen Frameworks kombinieren, einschließlich flacher Klassifikatoren, Tools zur Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache und neuronaler Netzwerke. Wir definieren das heterogene AutoML-Optimierungsproblem als die Suche nach der besten Sequenz von Algorithmen, die spezifische Eingabedaten in die gewünschte Ausgabe umwandeln. Dies bietet einen neuartigen theoretischen und praktischen Ansatz für AutoML. Unser Vorschlag wird experimentell in verschiedenen maschinellen Lernproblemen evaluiert und mit alternativen Ansätzen verglichen, was zeigt, dass es mit anderen AutoML-Alternativen in Standardbenchmarks wettbewerbsfähig ist. Darüber hinaus kann es auf neuartige Szenarien angewendet werden, wie z.B. mehrere NLP-Aufgaben, bei denen vorhandene Alternativen nicht direkt bereitgestellt werden können. Das System ist frei verfügbar und verfügt über eine eingebaute Kompatibilität mit einer Vielzahl beliebter Machine Learning Frameworks, was unseren Ansatz nützlich macht, um praktische Probleme mit relativer Leichtigkeit und Mühe zu lösen.', 'ko': '본고는 이구 기술을 사용하는 자동 기계 학습 시스템(AutoGOAL)을 소개한다.기존의 AutoML 방법에 비해 우리의 공헌은 자동으로 기계 학습 파이프를 구축하고 서로 다른 구조의 기술과 알고리즘을 결합시켜 얕은 분류기, 자연 언어 처리 도구와 신경 네트워크를 포함한다.이기종 AutoML 최적화 문제를 검색에서 특정 입력 데이터를 원하는 출력으로 변환하는 데 가장 적합한 알고리즘 시퀀스로 정의합니다.이것은 AutoML에 새로운 이론과 실천 방법을 제공했다.우리의 방안은 서로 다른 기계 학습 문제에서 실험 평가를 하고 다른 방법과 비교한 결과 표준 기준 테스트에서 다른 Automl 방법과 경쟁력이 있음을 나타냈다.그 밖에 기존 대체 방안을 직접 배치할 수 없는 NLP 작업과 같은 새로운 장면에도 적용될 수 있다.이 시스템은 무료로 제공되고 대량의 유행하는 기계 학습 프레임워크와 내장된 호환성을 포함하여 우리의 방법은 상대적으로 가볍고 열심히 실제 문제를 해결하는 데 매우 유용하다.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer AutoGOAL, et system til automatisk maskinlæring (AutoML), der bruger heterogene teknikker. I modsætning til eksisterende AutoML-tilgange kan vores bidrag automatisk opbygge maskinlæringsrørledninger, der kombinerer teknikker og algoritmer fra forskellige rammer, herunder overfladiske klassificeringer, værktøjer til behandling af natursprog og neurale netværk. Vi definerer det heterogene AutoML optimeringsproblem som søgningen efter den bedste sekvens af algoritmer, der omdanner specifikke input data til det ønskede output. Dette giver en ny teoretisk og praktisk tilgang til AutoML. Vores forslag evalueres eksperimentelt i forskellige maskinlæringsproblemer og sammenlignes med alternative tilgange, hvilket viser, at det er konkurrencedygtigt med andre AutoML alternativer i standard benchmarks. Desuden kan den anvendes på nye scenarier, f.eks. flere NLP-opgaver, hvor eksisterende alternativer ikke kan anvendes direkte. Systemet er frit tilgængeligt og indeholder indbygget kompatibilitet med en lang række populære machine learning framework, hvilket gør vores tilgang nyttig til at løse praktiske problemer med relativ lethed og indsats.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja AutoGOAL, sistem za automatsko učenje strojeva (AutoML), koji koristi heterogenene tehnike. U suprotnosti s postojećim pristupima AutoML-a, naš doprinos može automatski izgraditi cijevi za učenje strojeva koji kombiniraju tehnike i algoritme iz različitih okvira, uključujući plitke klasifikatore, prirodne alate za obradu jezika i neuralne mreže. Definiramo heterogeneni problem optimizacije AutoML kao potragu za najboljim sekvencijom algoritma koji transformira specifične ulazne podatke u željenu izlaz. To pruža nov teorijski i praktičan pristup AutoML-u. Naš prijedlog je eksperimentalno procjenjen u različitim problemima sa učenjem strojeva i u usporedbi s alternativnim pristupima, pokazujući da je konkurentna s drugim alternativama AutoML-a u standardnim kriterijama. Osim toga, to se može primjenjivati na nove scenarije, poput nekoliko zadataka NLP-a, gdje postojeće alternative ne mogu izravno rasporediti. Sistem je slobodno dostupan i uključuje ugrađenu kompatibilnost sa velikim brojem popularnih okvira za učenje strojeva, što čini naš pristup korisnim za rješavanje praktičnih problema s relativnim lakošću i naporima.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ AutoGOAL را نشان می دهد، یک سیستم برای یادگیری ماشین خودکار (AutoML) که از تکنیک های متفاوتی استفاده می کند. در مقابل با نزدیک\u200cهای AutoML موجود، دسترسی ما می\u200cتواند خط\u200cهای لوله\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین را به طور خودکار ساخت که تکنیک\u200cها و الگوریتم\u200cها از فرم\u200cهای مختلف ترکیب می\u200cکنند، شامل گروه\u200cهای کوچک، ابزار پردازش زبان طبیعی و شبکه\u200cهای عصب ما مشکل optimization AutoML هتروژن را به عنوان جستجوی بهترین ترکیب الگوریتم\u200cها تعریف می\u200cکنیم که داده\u200cهای ورودی خاص را تبدیل می\u200cکند به نتیجه خواسته. این یک روش تئوری و عملی به AutoML را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. پیشنهاد ما در مشکلات یادگیری ماشین مختلف تحقیق می\u200cشود و در مقایسه با طریق\u200cهای alternatives، نشان می\u200cدهد که آن با alternatives AutoML در مقایسه\u200cهای استاندارد مسابقه است. علاوه بر این، آن می\u200cتواند به سناریو\u200cهای نو، مثل چندین کار NLP، کاری انجام داده شود، جایی که alternatives موجود نمی\u200cتوانند مستقیماً استفاده کنند. این سیستم در دسترسی آزاد است و شامل توافق ساخته شده با تعداد زیادی از فرم\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای محبوب است، که برای حل مشکلات عملی با آسانی و تلاش نسبت به ما مفید می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha AutoGOAL, mfumo wa kujifunza mashine binafsi (AutoML) unaotumia teknolojia za kijinsia. Tofauti na mbinu za AutoML zilizopo, mchango wetu unaweza kutengeneza maboresho ya kujifunza mashine yenye kutengeneza mbinu na vipimo vya mifumo tofauti, ikiwa ni pamoja na wataalamu wa rangi mbalimbali, zana za kuchukua lugha za asili, na mitandao ya kijamii. Tunaweza kufafanua tatizo la kuboresha maambukizi ya AutoML kama kutafuta mfululizo bora wa algorithi ambao hubadilisha taarifa maalum za input katika matokeo yanayohitajika. Hii inatoa mbinu za nadharia na za kihalisi kwa AutoML. pendekezo letu ni tathmini kwa mtihani katika matatizo ya kujifunza mashine mbalimbali na kulinganisha na mbinu mbadala, ikionyesha kuwa ni ushindani na mabadiliko mengine ya AutoML katika misingi ya kawaida. Zaidi ya hayo, inaweza kutumika kwa matukio ya kisasa kama vile kazi kadhaa za NLP, ambapo mabadiliko yanayopo hayawezi kutumika moja kwa moja. Mfumo unapatikana kwa uhuru na unajumuisha ushirikiano na mfumo mkubwa wa kujifunza mashine maarufu, ambao unafanya hatua yetu kuwa na manufaa kwa kutatua matatizo yanayohusiana na rahisi na juhudi za karibu.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz ýeterlik tekniklerden ulanan awtomatik maşyny öwrenmek üçin AutoGOAL'y görkezýär. Öň bar AutoML ýakynlaşyklaryň ýakynlaşynda, biziň kömegimiz öz-özüne maşynyň öwrenmegi pipelini üýtgedip bilýär. Biz heterogenen AutoML optimizasy meselesini isleýän çizgisine üýtgeden algoritmlaryň iň gowy sequencesi diýip tanyşdyrýarys. Bu AutoML'a teoriýa we praktika bir nusga getirir. Biziň teklibimiz, dürli maşynyň öwrenmegi kynçylyklarynda deňleşdirilýär we golaý golaýlary bilen görä deňleşdirilýär. Munuň ýagdaýda, bu maňa köp NLP işi ýaly nowellar sanlaryna uygulanabilir, we bu ýerde bolan saýlawlar direk wezip edilemez. Bu sistem üýtgeşik bar we köpüräk maşyny öwrenmek üçin ýeterlik we kynçylyk bilen praktik kynçylyklary çözmek üçin gurulýan a ýratyşlygyny dahil edýär.", 'sq': 'This paper presents AutoGOAL, a system for automatic machine learning (AutoML) that uses heterogeneous techniques.  Në kundërshtim me qasjet ekzistuese të AutoML, kontributi ynë mund të ndërtojë automatikisht tubacione mësimi automatik që kombinojnë teknika dhe algoritme nga korniza të ndryshme, duke përfshirë klasifikuesit e sipërfaqeve, mjetet natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës dhe rrjetet nervore. Ne përcaktojmë problemin heterogjene të optimizimit të AutoML si kërkimin për sekuencën më të mirë të algoritmeve që transformojnë të dhënat specifike të hyrjes në output të dëshiruar. Kjo ofron një metodë të re teorike dhe praktike për AutoML. Propozimi ynë vlerësohet eksperimentalisht në probleme të ndryshme të mësimit të makinave dhe krahasohet me qasje alternative, duke treguar se është konkurrues me alternativa të tjera AutoML në pika standarde. Përveç kësaj, mund të aplikohet në skenarë të reja, të tilla si disa detyra NLP, ku alternativat ekzistuese nuk mund të vendosen drejtpërdrejt. The system is freely available and includes in-built compatibility with a large number of popular machine learning frameworks, which makes our approach useful for solving practical problems with relative ease and effort.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የኮምፒዩተር ቴክኖክኖችን የሚጠቀም የኮምፒዩተር ማስተማር (autoML) ስርዓት አውቶማጂ አቀረበ፡፡ የአሁኑ አውቶሜል ልቅናዎች በተለየ፣ የሞክራዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ መሣሪያዎች እና አሌጎሪትምን ከልዩ ፍሬማዎች የተለየ ጥቅሎች፣ ጥቁር ክፍተቶችን፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋዎች ማቀናጃ እና የደብዳቤ መረብ ሲያስተካክሉ ማሻሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ አካባቢው የኮምፕዩተርኔት የኮምፒዩተር አካባቢ ጉዳዩን ወደ ፈለገው ውጤት የሚለውጥ የአልጎርጂም ምርጫዎች መፈለጊያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይሄ የሮሜን የtheoretical እና የስህተት ሥርዓት ወደ autoML ይሰጣል። የፕሮጀክታችን በተለያዩ የኮምፒዩተር ትምህርት መከራዎች ላይ በተለየ እና በተለየ ደረጃዎች ይተካክላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የአሁኑ ምርጫዎች ቀጥተኛ ለመላክ የማይችሉበት የNLP ስራዎችን ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ሲስተምሩ በፈቃድ የተገኘ እና በተለየ ብዙ የሆኑት መሣሪያዎች ትምህርት ፍሬማዎችን ይጨምርበታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է AutoGoal-ը, մեքենայի ավտոմատիկ ուսումնասիրության (AutoML) համակարգը, որը օգտագործում է հերոգեն տեխնիկաներ: Ի հակադրություն գոյություն ունեցող AutoML մոտեցումների, մեր ներդրումը կարող է ինքնաբերաբար կառուցել մեքենային ուսումնասիրության խողովակաշարեր, որոնք միավորում են տեխնիկաներ և ալգորիթմներ տարբեր շրջաններում, ներառյալ մակերեսային դասակարգողներ, բնակ Մենք սահմանում ենք Հետերոգեն ԱվտոՄԼ-ի օպտիմացման խնդիրը որպես ալգորիթմների լավագույն հաջորդականություն փնտրելը, որը վերածում է որոշակի մուտքային տվյալներ ցանկացած արտադրության: Սա հնարավորություն է տալիս AutoML-ի նոր տեսական և պրակտիկ մոտեցում: Մեր առաջարկը փորձարկված է գնահատվում տարբեր մեքենային ուսումնասիրության խնդիրներում և համեմատելով այլընտրանքային մոտեցումների հետ, ցույց տալով, որ այն մրցակցում է այլ AutoML այլընտրանքային տարբերակների հետ ստանդարտ համե Ավելին, այն կարող է կիրառվել նոր սցենարների համար, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ մի քանի ՆԼՊ խնդիրներ, որտեղ գոյություն ունեցող այլընտրանքային տարբերակներ անմիջապես չեն կարող կիրառվել: Համակարգը ազատ հասանելի է և ներառում է ներառված համատեղելիությունը մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության բազմաթիվ հայտնի շրջանների հետ, ինչը օգտակար է դարձնում մեր մոտեցումը հարաբերական հեշտությամբ և ջանքերով իրականացնելու համար:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেশিন শিক্ষার (স্বয়ংক্রিয় এমএল) একটি সিস্টেম স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করে স্বয়ংক বিদ্যমান স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আমাদের অবদান স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মেশিন শিক্ষা পাইপেলেন তৈরি করতে পারে যা বিভিন্ন ফ্রেম থেকে প্রযুক্তি এবং অ্যা আমরা আলগরিদমের সর্বোচ্চ সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের সুনির্দিষ্ট আউটপুটের তথ্য পরিবর্তন করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্ এটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং প্রাকৃতিক উপায় প্রদান করে। Our proposal is experimentally evaluated in diverse machine learning problems and compared with alternative approaches, showing that it is competitive with other AutoML alternatives in standard benchmarks.  এছাড়াও, এটি উপন্যাসের দৃশ্যের জন্য প্রয়োগ করা যাবে, যেমন কয়েকটি এনএলপি কাজ, যেখানে বিদ্যমান বিকল্প সরাসরি প্রেরণ করা যাবে না। সিস্টেম মুক্তি পাওয়া যাচ্ছে এবং বিশাল জনপ্রিয় মেশিন শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের সাথে তৈরি করা সংখ্যার সাথে তৈরি করা যাচ্ছে, যা আত্মিক সহজ এবং প্', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel AutoGOAL, 'n stelsel vir outomatiese masjien leer (AutoML) wat heterogeneese teknike gebruik. Name In contrast with existing AutoML approaches, our contribution can automatically build machine learning pipelines that combine techniques and algorithms from different frameworks, including shallow classifiers, natural language processing tools and neural networks. Ons definieer die heterogenee AutoML optimalisasie probleem as die soek vir die beste volgorde van algoritme wat transformeer spesifieke invoer data in die verwagte uitset. Name Ons voorstel is eksperimenteel uitgewerk in verskeie masjien leer probleme en vergelyk met alternatiewe toegange, wys dat dit is mededingsel met ander AutoML alternatiewe in standaard benchmarke. Daarom kan dit toepassing word na nuwe scenarios, soos verskeie NLP-taak, waar bestaande alternatiewe nie direk verwyder kan word nie. Die stelsel is vry beskikbaar en inkluit in gebou kompatibiliteit met 'n groot aantal populêre masjien leer raamwerke, wat maak ons toegang nuttig vir die oplossing van praktiese probleme met relatiewe maklik en moeilikheid.", 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan AutoGOAL, sistem untuk belajar mesin otomatis (AutoML) yang menggunakan teknik heterogene. Sebaliknya dengan pendekatan AutoML yang ada, kontribusi kita dapat secara otomatis membangun saluran pipa belajar mesin yang menggabungkan teknik dan algoritma dari bingkai yang berbeda, termasuk klasifikasi rendah, alat proses bahasa alam, dan jaringan saraf. We define the heterogeneous AutoML optimization problem as the search for the best sequence of algorithms that transforms specific input data into the desired output.  This provides a novel theoretical and practical approach to AutoML.  Proposisi kami secara eksperimen diuji dalam masalah pembelajaran mesin yang berbeda dan dibandingkan dengan pendekatan alternatif, menunjukkan bahwa itu kompetitif dengan alternatif AutoML lain dalam benchmarks standar. Furthermore, it can be applied to novel scenarios, such as several NLP tasks, where existing alternatives cannot be directly deployed.  Sistem tersedia secara bebas dan termasuk kompatibilitas dalam dibangun dengan sejumlah besar bingkai belajar mesin populer, yang membuat pendekatan kita berguna untuk memecahkan masalah praktis dengan kemudahan relatif dan usaha.', 'az': "Bu kańüńĪt, heterogenen teknikl…ôri istifad…ô ed…ôn avtomatik maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi (AutoML) sistemi AutoGOAL'u g√∂st…ôrir. Mevcut AutoML yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪna baxmayaraq, bizim iŇütirańüńĪmńĪz, m√ľxt…ôlif frameworklardan teknikl…ôri v…ô algoritml…ôri birl…ôŇüdir…ôn maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ô boru √ßubuqlarńĪnńĪ avtomatik olaraq inŇüa ed…ô bil…ôr. Biz heterogenez AutoML optimizasyonu problemini ist…ôdiyi √ßńĪxńĪŇü yoluna √ßevir…ôn …ôn …ôn yaxŇüńĪ algoritl…ôrin sńĪralńĪńüńĪ kimi bel…ô tanńĪmlńĪyńĪq. Bu, AutoML'in yeni teoriki v…ô praktik t…ôrzini sańülar. Bizim teklifimiz m√ľxt…ôlif maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi probleml…ôrind…ô t…ôcr√ľb…ô edilir v…ô alternatif t…ôrzl…ôrl…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪlńĪr, standart benchmarklarda dig…ôr AutoML alternatifi il…ô m√ľqayis…ôd…ô olduńüunu g√∂st…ôr…ôr. Daha √ßox NLP iŇül…ôri kimi yeni senaryoya uyńüunlaŇüdńĪrńĪla bil…ôr, orada m√∂vcud alternatiflar dońürudan istifad…ô edil…ô bilm…ôz. Sistem √∂zg√ľr olaraq faydalanńĪr v…ô √ßox q√ľvv…ôtli makinat √∂yr…ônm…ô frameworklarńĪ il…ô in Ňüa edil…ôn kompatibiliyy…ôti d…ô i√ßind…ôdir. Bu bizim metodumuzu relativ asanlńĪqla v…ô √ßabalarda praktik probleml…ôri √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn faydalanńĪr.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse automaatse masinõppe süsteemi AutoGOAL, mis kasutab heterogeenseid tehnikaid. Erinevalt olemasolevatest AutoML lähenemisviisidest võib meie panus automaatselt ehitada masinõppe torujuhtmeid, mis ühendavad erinevate raamistike tehnikaid ja algoritme, sealhulgas madalad klassifitseerijad, looduskeele töötlemise tööriistad ja närvivõrgud. Määratleme heterogeense AutoML optimeerimise probleemi kui parima algoritmide jada otsimist, mis muundab konkreetsed sisendandmed soovitud väljundiks. See pakub uudset teoreetilist ja praktilist lähenemisviisi AutoML. Meie ettepanekut hinnatakse eksperimentaalselt erinevates masinõppe probleemides ja võrreldakse alternatiivsete lähenemisviisidega, näidates, et see on konkurentsivõimeline teiste AutoML alternatiividega standardsetes võrdlusnäitajates. Lisaks võib seda kohaldada uudsete stsenaariumide puhul, näiteks mitmete uue uue arenguprogrammi ülesannete puhul, kus olemasolevaid alternatiive ei saa otseselt kasutada. Süsteem on vabalt kättesaadav ja sisaldab sisseehitatud ühilduvust paljude populaarsete masinõppe raamistikega, mis muudab meie lähenemisviisi kasulikuks praktiliste probleemide lahendamiseks suhtelise lihtsuse ja pingutusega.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja AutoGOAL, sistem za automatsko učenje mašine (AutoML), koji koristi heterogenene tehnike. U suprotnosti sa postojećim pristupima AutoML, naš doprinos može automatski izgraditi cijevi za učenje mašine koji kombiniraju tehnike i algoritme iz različitih okvira, uključujući plitke klasifikatore, prirodne alate za obradivanje jezika i neuralne mreže. Definiramo heterogeneni problem optimizacije AutoML kao potragu za najboljim sekvencijom algoritma koji transformiše specifične ulazne podatke u željni izlaz. Ovo pruža novi teoretički i praktični pristup AutoML-u. Naš prijedlog je eksperimentalno procjenjen u različitim problemima sa učenjem strojeva i u usporedbi s alternativnim pristupima, pokazujući da je konkurentna sa drugim alternativama AutoML-a u standardnim kriterijama. Osim toga, to se može primjenjivati na nove scenarije, poput nekoliko zadataka NLP-a, gdje postojeće alternative ne mogu direktno rasporediti. Sistem je slobodno dostupan i uključuje ugrađenu kompatibilnost sa velikim brojem popularnih okvira za učenje mašin a, što čini naš pristup korisnim za rješavanje praktičnih problema sa relativnim lakošću i naporima.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta AutoGOAL, un sistema d'aprenentatge automàtic de màquines (AutoML) que utilitza tècniques heterogenes. A diferent dels enfocaments AutoML existents, la nostra contribució pot construir automàticament conductes d'aprenentatge màquinari que combinen tècniques i algoritmes de diferents marcs, incloent classificadors poc profunds, eines naturals de processament de llenguatges i xarxes neurals. Definim el problema heterogène d'optimització de l'AutoML com la búsqueda de la millor seqüència d'algoritmes que transforma dades d'entrada específices en la sortida desitjada. Això proporciona un nou enfocament teòric i pràctic a AutoML. La nostra proposta és evaluada experimentalment en diversos problemes d'aprenentatge màquinari i comparada amb enfocaments alternativs, mostrant que és competitiva amb altres alternatives AutoML en punts de referència estándar. A més, es pot aplicar a noves escenaris, com diverses tasques del NLP, on no es poden desplegar directament alternatives existents. El sistema està lliurament disponible i inclou la compatibilitat integrada amb un gran nombre d'marcs d'aprenentatge automàtic populars, que fa que el nostre enfocament sigui útil per resoldre problemes pràctics amb relativa fàcil i esforç.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään AutoGOAL, automaattinen koneoppimisjärjestelmä (AutoML), joka käyttää heterogeenisiä tekniikoita. Toisin kuin nykyiset AutoML-lähestymistavat, panoksemme voi automaattisesti rakentaa koneoppimisputkia, joissa yhdistetään tekniikoita ja algoritmeja eri kehyksistä, mukaan lukien matalat luokittelijat, luonnollisen kielen käsittelytyökalut ja neuroverkot. Määrittelemme heterogeenisen AutoML-optimointiongelman etsimiseksi parhaan algoritmien sekvenssin, joka muuntaa tietyn syöttötiedon halutuksi tuotokseksi. Tämä tarjoaa uudenlaisen teoreettisen ja käytännön lähestymistavan AutoML. Ehdotuksemme arvioidaan kokeellisesti erilaisissa koneoppimisongelmissa ja sitä verrataan vaihtoehtoisiin lähestymistapoihin, mikä osoittaa, että se on kilpailukykyinen muiden AutoML-vaihtoehtojen kanssa standardivertailuissa. Lisäksi sitä voidaan soveltaa uusiin skenaarioihin, kuten useisiin uuden sukupolven ohjelman tehtäviin, joissa olemassa olevia vaihtoehtoja ei voida suoraan hyödyntää. Järjestelmä on vapaasti saatavilla ja sisältää sisäänrakennetun yhteensopivuuden monien suosittujen koneoppimiskehysten kanssa, mikä tekee lähestymistapamme hyödylliseksi käytännön ongelmien ratkaisemisessa suhteellisen helpolla ja vaivalloisella.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje AutoGOAL, systém automatického strojového učení (AutoML), který využívá heterogenní techniky. Na rozdíl od existujících přístupů AutoML může náš příspěvek automaticky vytvořit strojové učení pipelines, které kombinují techniky a algoritmy z různých frameworků, včetně mělkých klasifikátorů, nástrojů pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka a neuronových sítí. Heterogenní problém optimalizace AutoML definujeme jako hledání nejlepší sekvence algoritmů, která transformuje konkrétní vstupní data do požadovaného výstupu. To poskytuje nový teoretický a praktický přístup k AutoML. Náš návrh je experimentálně hodnocen v různých problémech strojového učení a porovnáván s alternativními přístupy, což ukazuje, že je konkurenceschopný s jinými alternativami AutoML ve standardních benchmarkech. Dále může být aplikován na nové scénáře, například několik úloh NLP, kde existující alternativy nelze přímo nasadit. Systém je volně dostupný a obsahuje vestavěnou kompatibilitu s velkým množstvím populárních frameworků strojového učení, což činí náš přístup užitečný pro řešení praktických problémů s relativní snadností a úsilím.', 'jv': 'Nyong ngomong barang autoGOAL, sistem kanggo kelas mo otomatik (autoML) sing isin teknik sing berarti. Digganti karo akeh sampeyan autoML sing dumadhi, akeh dumadhi nambah iso nguasai sistem Anyar tentang karo sistem sing digawe teknik karo Algorithm karo akeh sampeyan mrogram, gambar kelas shadow Anyone Ngomongke kuwi nyumbang theoretik lan pratike kang autoML Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk karo perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno karo sistem sing gak bener, iso nggambar nggawe sistem sing wis dipoleh karo Alternate autoML sing ngentambah karo bendhèké awak dhéwé. Buk, iso nggo aplikasi kanggo ngerasakno sing, kaya sampeyan NLP ulih operasi, kawur Alternate sing ana ora bisa dianggo ndelok. Sistem kebebasan ning kebebasan lan tambah akeh nggawe kompatistir karo akeh liyane karo akeh populer sing sampeyan karo sistem sing nyimpen. Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem sing dipunakno kanggo ngilanggar perbudhakan pratiki sing apik dhéwé, lan susahe jewisan', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ɗabi'a na bãyar da jigon Allah, wata na'ura wa zane-zane farat ɗaya (farat ML) wanda ke amfani da technical masu yin amfani da shiryoyin ayuka. Tsarin da ke da hanyoyin farat-ML da ke gaba, aikin mu yana iya ƙidãya wa zane-zane da za'a iya amfani da kwamfyutan ayuka da za'a iya haɗa kungiyar-zane da algoritori daga firam daban-dabam, idan an sami fassarori masu basa, zanen aiki na zartar da harshe na asili, da zanen neura. Munã ƙayyade masu canza shiryoyin ayuka na farat ɗaya Wannan yana samar da wata matsayi na littafi mai tsayi da gaske zuwa OMAL. Ana ƙidãya zawanmu a cikin masu karatun mafarin kwamfyuta ko kuma a sami da hanyõyi masu motsi, kuma ya nuna cewa, ta yi jiyya da musamman da wasu na'urar kwamfyuta, da kuma an sami kwamfyuta a cikin bangon kwamfyuta. Furan haka, za'a iya amfani da shi zuwa filarin nan yanzu, kamar misãlin wasu aikin NLP, inda an kasa saka wasu masu buƙata masu jira zuwa hanya. Ana iya amfani da shirin ayuka da ake samar da shi, kuma yana ƙunsa da cikakken firam masu yawa na ƙidãya masu ƙidãya na mashine, wannan yana da amfani ga solarin mataimaki masu hushi da sauƙi da aikin zumunta.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen AutoGOAL, sistem za avtomatsko strojno učenje (AutoML), ki uporablja heterogene tehnike. V nasprotju z obstoječimi pristopi AutoML lahko naš prispevek samodejno gradi cevovode strojnega učenja, ki združujejo tehnike in algoritme iz različnih okvirov, vključno s plitvimi klasifikatorji, orodji za obdelavo naravnega jezika in nevronskimi omrežji. Razheterogen problem optimizacije AutoML definiramo kot iskanje najboljšega zaporedja algoritmov, ki pretvori določene vhodne podatke v želeni izhod. To zagotavlja nov teoretični in praktični pristop k AutoML. Naš predlog je eksperimentalno ocenjen pri različnih problemih strojnega učenja in primerjen z alternativnimi pristopi, kar kaže, da je konkurenčen z drugimi alternativnimi možnostmi AutoML v standardnih referenčnih vrednostih. Poleg tega se lahko uporablja za nove scenarije, kot je več nalog NLP, pri katerih obstoječih alternativ ni mogoče neposredno uporabiti. Sistem je prosto dostopen in vključuje vgrajeno združljivost z velikim številom priljubljenih okvirov strojnega učenja, zaradi česar je naš pristop uporaben za reševanje praktičnih problemov z relativno enostavnostjo in naporom.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལག་ལེན་པ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། In contrast with existing AutoML approaches, our contribution can automatically build machine learning pipelines that combine techniques and algorithms from different frameworks, including shallow classifiers, natural language processing tools, and neural networks. We define the heterogeneous AutoML optimization problem as the search for the best sequence of algorithms that transforms specific input data into the desired output. འདིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་ལག་ལེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བསམ་འཆར་བརྟན་པར་སྣ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐུན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། གསར་གཏོད་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། NLP ལས་ཀ་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། དེ་འདྲ་རྒྱ་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གདམ་ཁ་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ དེ་ནི་མ་ལག་གི་སྟོང་པར་བྱུང་བ་རེད་སྤྱོད་པར་དབང་ཆ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་བཟོ་བརྩོན་ནུས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་ཁྲམ་ག', 'he': 'This paper presents AutoGOAL, a system for automatic machine learning (AutoML) that uses heterogeneous techniques.  In contrast with existing AutoML approaches, our contribution can automatically build machine learning pipelines that combine techniques and algorithms from different frameworks, including shallow classifiers, natural language processing tools, and neural networks.  We define the heterogeneous AutoML optimization problem as the search for the best sequence of algorithms that transforms specific input data into the desired output.  זה מספק גישה תיאורטית ופרקטית חדשה לאוטומל. ההצעה שלנו נערכת מבחינה ניסיונית בבעיות מלמדת מכונות מגוונות ושוואה עם גישות אלטרנטיביות, מראה שהיא תחרותית עם אלטרנטיבות אחרות של AutoML בנקודות סטנדרטיים. Furthermore, it can be applied to novel scenarios, such as several NLP tasks, where existing alternatives cannot be directly deployed.  The system is freely available and includes in-built compatibility with a large number of popular machine learning frameworks, which makes our approach useful for solving practical problems with relative ease and effort.'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Noisy Length Constraints into Transformer with Length-aware Positional Encodings', 'es': 'Incorporación de restricciones de longitud ruidosas en el transformador con codificaciones posicionales sensibles a la longitud', 'ar': 'دمج قيود الطول المزعجة في المحول مع ترميزات موضعية مدركة للطول', 'pt': 'Incorporando restrições de comprimento barulhentas no transformador com codificações posicionais com reconhecimento de comprimento', 'fr': 'Incorporation de contraintes de longueur bruyantes dans le transformateur avec des codages de position sensibles à la longueur', 'ja': 'ノイズの多い長さの制約を、長さを認識する位置エンコーディングを備えた変圧器に組み込む', 'zh': '并噪声长于知位编码转换器中', 'hi': 'लंबाई के साथ ट्रांसफार्मर में शोर लंबाई बाधाओं को शामिल करना-जागरूक स्थितीय एन्कोडिंग', 'ru': 'Включение ограничений по длине шума в трансформатор с позиционными кодировками, учитывающими длину', 'ga': 'Srianta Fad Torainn a Ionchorprú i gClaochladán le hIonchóduithe Seasaimh atá Feasach ar Fad', 'ka': 'სიგრძნობის სიგრძნობის განზომილებები ტრანფორმეტრისტერის განზომილებელად', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση θορυβωδών περιορισμών μήκους στον μετασχηματιστή με γεωγραφικές κωδικοποιήσεις επίγνωσης μήκους', 'hu': 'Zajos hosszúsági korlátozások beépítése a transzformátorba hosszúságtudatos pozíciókódolásokkal', 'it': 'Incorporare vincoli di lunghezza rumorosi nel trasformatore con codifica di posizione consapevole della lunghezza', 'kk': 'Үнділік ұзындығын ұзындығымен байланысты кодтамасыз түрлендірушіне шектеу', 'lt': 'Triukšmo ilgio apribojimai įtraukiami į transformatorių, turinčių vietinius kodus, žinomus apie ilgį', 'mk': 'Вклучување на ограничувања на шумна должина во трансформерот со позиционални кодирања свесни за должина', 'ms': 'Memasukkan Kebatasan Panjang Bunyi ke Penukar dengan Pengekodan Posisi Bersedar Panjang', 'ml': 'നീളം- അറിയുന്ന സ്ഥിതിയുടെ കോഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നീളം കോണ്\u200dസ്ട്രെയിന്റുകളിലേക്ക് കൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni ta’ Restrizzjonijiet tat-Tul Storbjuż fit-Trasformatur b’Kodiċijiet Pożizzjonali Konxji tat-Tul', 'mn': 'Хугацааны урт хэмжээний хязгаарлалт нь урт ухаантай байрлал кодлогчтай Трансфер руу', 'no': 'Inkorporering av støylengde til transformeringsbegrensningar med posisjonskodingar med lengd-kjent', 'pl': 'Włączanie ograniczeń długości hałasu do transformatora z kodowaniem pozycjonalnym świadomym długości', 'sr': 'Uključujući ograničenje dužine zvuka u transformator sa pozicionalnim kodiranjem dužine.', 'ro': 'Incorporarea constrângerilor zgomotoase de lungime în transformator cu codări poziționale conștiente de lungime', 'so': 'Qoidaha badnaanta la xiriira', 'si': 'ගොඩක් දැනගැනීම් ස්ථානය සංකේතනයක් තියෙන්නේ නෝයිසි ලොකු සීමාව සීමාවන්න', 'ta': 'Incorporating Noisy Length Constraints into Transformer with Length-aware Positional Encodings', 'sv': 'Inbegripa bullriga längdbegränsningar i transformatorn med längdmedvetna positionskodningar', 'ur': 'طول-conscious Positional Encoding', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Cấu hình nhiễu Lãnh lực thành Transformer với các bao giờ xác định được', 'bg': 'Включване на шумни ограничения на дължината в трансформатор с разпознаващи дължината позиционни кодировки', 'nl': 'Opnemen van ruisige lengtebeperkingen in transformator met lengtebewuste positiecoderingen', 'da': 'Inddragelse af støjende længdebegrænsninger i transformatoren med længdebevidste positionskodninger', 'hr': 'Uključujući ograničenje dužine glasina u transformator sa pozicionalnim kodiranjem dužine', 'de': 'Einbindung von RauschlĂ¤ngenbeschrĂ¤nkungen in Transformatoren mit lĂ¤ngenbezogenen Positionskodierungen', 'ko': '길이 감지 위치 인코딩이 있는 Transformer에 잡음 길이 구속조건 병합', 'id': 'Menginkorporasi Kebatasan Panjang Kebisingan ke Transformer dengan Kodisan Posisi Berlayar', 'fa': 'محدودیت طول صدا در تغییر\u200cدهنده با رمزبندی موقعیت\u200cهای طولانی', 'sw': 'Kuongeza Maruzungumzo ya Kusini Kuingia Kupitia Tafsiri', 'af': 'Inkorporeer NoisLengte Beheinings binne Transformeerder met Lengte- bewys Posisiese Enkodering', 'tr': 'Güç-habar ýerli Ködlemeler bilen Goose Uzunlary Ködlemeler', 'sq': 'Përfshirja e kufizimeve të gjatësisë së zhurmës në transformues me kodifikime pozitive të ndërgjegjshme për gjatësinë', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Բռնել աղմկոտ երկարության սահմանափակումները երկարությամբ գիտակցած դիրքի կոդավորման մեջ', 'az': "Uzuncu Bil톛n Positional Kodlay캼c캼lar il톛 Transformer'a s톛s Uzuncu S톛tirl톛ri", 'bn': 'দীর্ঘ- সচেতন অবস্থান এনকোডিং দ্বারা ট্রান্সফার্নারে অন্তর্ভুক্ত নোসি দীর্ঘ কনস্ট্রেন্ট করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Uključujući ograničenje dužine glasina u transformator sa pozicionalnim kodiranjem dužine', 'ca': 'Incorporar restriccions de llargària ruidosa en un transformador amb codificacions positius conscients de llargària', 'cs': 'Začlenění šumových omezení délky do transformátoru s polohovými kódy s ohledem na délku', 'et': 'Mürakate pikkuspiirangute lisamine pikkust teadvate asukohakoodeeringutega transformaatorisse', 'fi': 'Meluisten pituusrajoitusten sisällyttäminen muuntajaan pituutta tietoisilla paikannuskoodauksilla', 'jv': 'Nois Lengste Cage Nguteran', 'he': 'Incorporating Noisy Length Constraints into Transformer with Length-aware Positional Encodings', 'sk': 'Vključevanje hrupnih omejitev dolžine v transformator s pozicijskimi kodiranji, ki se zavedajo dolžine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ནང་འདྲེན་པ་དུ་ཕན་ཚུན་རིས་ཐག་རིང་བའི་ཚད་ཚད་གཞིར་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation often suffers from an under-translation problem due to its limited modeling of output sequence lengths. In this work, we propose a novel approach to training a Transformer model using length constraints based on length-aware positional encoding (PE). Since length constraints with exact target sentence lengths degrade translation performance, we add random noise within a certain window size to the length constraints in the PE during the training. In the inference step, we predict the output lengths using input sequences and a BERT-based length prediction model. Experimental results in an ASPEC English-to-Japanese translation showed the proposed method produced translations with lengths close to the reference ones and outperformed a vanilla Transformer (especially in short sentences) by 3.22 points in BLEU. The average translation results using our length prediction model were also better than another baseline method using input lengths for the length constraints. The proposed noise injection improved robustness for length prediction errors, especially within the window size.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تعاني الترجمة الآلية العصبية من مشكلة تحت الترجمة بسبب النمذجة المحدودة لأطوال تسلسل الإخراج. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لتدريب نموذج المحولات باستخدام قيود الطول بناءً على الترميز الموضعي المدرك للطول (PE). نظرًا لأن قيود الطول مع أطوال الجملة المستهدفة الدقيقة تقلل من أداء الترجمة ، فإننا نضيف ضوضاء عشوائية ضمن حجم نافذة معين إلى قيود الطول في PE أثناء التدريب. في خطوة الاستدلال ، نتوقع أطوال المخرجات باستخدام تسلسل الإدخال ونموذج توقع الطول المستند إلى BERT. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية في ترجمة ASPEC من الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية أن الطريقة المقترحة أنتجت ترجمات بأطوال قريبة من المرجع وتفوقت على محول الفانيليا (خاصة في الجمل القصيرة) بمقدار 3.22 نقطة في BLEU. كان متوسط نتائج الترجمة باستخدام نموذج توقع الطول الخاص بنا أفضل أيضًا من طريقة أساسية أخرى باستخدام أطوال الإدخال لقيود الطول. أدى الحقن المقترح للضوضاء إلى تحسين المتانة لأخطاء التنبؤ بالطول ، خاصة داخل حجم النافذة.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale souffre souvent d'un problème de sous-traduction en raison de sa modélisation limitée des longueurs de séquence de sortie. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle approche pour l'entraînement d'un modèle de transformateur utilisant des contraintes de longueur basées sur le codage positionnel sensible à la longueur (PE). Étant donné que les contraintes de longueur avec des longueurs de phrases cibles exactes dégradent les performances de traduction, nous ajoutons du bruit aléatoire dans une certaine taille de fenêtre aux contraintes de longueur dans le PE pendant la formation. Dans l'étape d'inférence, nous prédisons les longueurs de sortie à l'aide de séquences d'entrée et d'un modèle de prédiction de longueur basé sur BERT. Les résultats expérimentaux d'une traduction ASPEC de l'anglais vers le japonais ont montré que la méthode proposée produisait des traductions avec des longueurs proches de celles de référence et surpassait un Transformer vanille (en particulier dans les phrases courtes) de 3,22 points en BLEU. Les résultats de traduction moyens à l'aide de notre modèle de prédiction de longueur étaient également meilleurs qu'une autre méthode de base utilisant des longueurs d'entrée pour les contraintes de longueur. L'injection de bruit proposée a amélioré la robustesse pour les erreurs de prédiction de longueur, en particulier dans la taille de la fenêtre.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural muitas vezes sofre de um problema de subtradução devido à sua modelagem limitada de comprimentos de sequência de saída. Neste trabalho, propomos uma nova abordagem para treinar um modelo Transformer usando restrições de comprimento baseadas em codificação posicional ciente de comprimento (PE). Como as restrições de comprimento com comprimentos exatos de sentenças alvo degradam o desempenho da tradução, adicionamos ruído aleatório dentro de um determinado tamanho de janela às restrições de comprimento no PE durante o treinamento. Na etapa de inferência, prevemos os comprimentos de saída usando sequências de entrada e um modelo de previsão de comprimento baseado em BERT. Resultados experimentais em uma tradução ASPEC de inglês para japonês mostraram que o método proposto produziu traduções com comprimentos próximos aos de referência e superou um vanilla Transformer (especialmente em frases curtas) em 3,22 pontos no BLEU. Os resultados médios de tradução usando nosso modelo de previsão de comprimento também foram melhores do que outro método de linha de base usando comprimentos de entrada para as restrições de comprimento. A injeção de ruído proposta melhorou a robustez para erros de previsão de comprimento, especialmente dentro do tamanho da janela.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal a menudo sufre un problema de subtraducción debido a su modelado limitado de las longitudes de secuencia de salida. En este trabajo, proponemos un enfoque novedoso para entrenar un modelo de Transformer utilizando restricciones de longitud basadas en la codificación posicional (PE) sensible a la longitud. Dado que las restricciones de longitud con longitudes de oración objetivo exactas degradan el rendimiento de la traducción, añadimos ruido aleatorio dentro de un tamaño de ventana determinado a las restricciones de longitud en el PE durante el entrenamiento. En el paso de inferencia, predecimos las longitudes de salida mediante secuencias de entrada y un modelo de predicción de longitud basado en Bert. Los resultados experimentales en una traducción del inglés al japonés de ASPEC mostraron que el método propuesto producía traducciones con longitudes cercanas a las de referencia y superaba en 3,22 puntos a un Transformer básico (especialmente en oraciones cortas) en BLEU. Los resultados de traducción promedio utilizando nuestro modelo de predicción de longitud también fueron mejores que otros métodos de referencia que utilizan longitudes de entrada para las restricciones de longitud. La inyección de ruido propuesta mejoró la robustez de los errores de predicción de longitud, especialmente dentro del tamaño de la ventana.', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションは、出力シーケンス長のモデリングが限られているため、翻訳不足の問題に悩まされることが多い。 本研究では，長さ認識位置符号化（ PE ）に基づく長さ制約を用いて変圧器モデルを訓練するための新たなアプローチを提案する． 正確な目標文の長さを持つ長さの制約は翻訳パフォーマンスを低下させるため、トレーニング中に特定のウィンドウサイズ内のランダムノイズをPEの長さの制約に追加します。 推論ステップでは、入力シーケンスとBERTベースの長さ予測モデルを使用して出力長を予測します。 ASPECの英語から日本語への翻訳の実験結果は、提案された方法が参照に近い長さの翻訳を生成し、BLEUではバニラトランスフォーマー（特に短い文章で）を3.22ポイント上回ったことを示しました。 我々の長さ予測モデルを使用した平均並進結果は、長さ制約の入力長を使用した別のベースライン法よりも優れていた。 提案されたノイズ噴射は、特にウィンドウサイズ内の長さ予測誤差に対する堅牢性を改善した。', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद अक्सर आउटपुट अनुक्रम लंबाई के अपने सीमित मॉडलिंग के कारण एक अंडर-ट्रांसलेशन समस्या से ग्रस्त होता है। इस काम में, हम लंबाई-जागरूक स्थितीय एन्कोडिंग (पीई) के आधार पर लंबाई बाधाओं का उपयोग करके एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। चूंकि सटीक लक्ष्य वाक्य लंबाई के साथ लंबाई की बाधाएं अनुवाद प्रदर्शन को नीचा दिखाती हैं, इसलिए हम प्रशिक्षण के दौरान पीई में लंबाई की बाधाओं के लिए एक निश्चित खिड़की के आकार के भीतर यादृच्छिक शोर जोड़ते हैं। अनुमान चरण में, हम इनपुट अनुक्रमों और BERT-आधारित लंबाई पूर्वानुमान मॉडल का उपयोग करके आउटपुट लंबाई की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। एक ASPEC अंग्रेजी-से-जापानी अनुवाद में प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चला है कि प्रस्तावित विधि ने संदर्भ वाले लोगों के करीब लंबाई के साथ अनुवाद का उत्पादन किया और BLEU में 3.22 अंकों से एक वेनिला ट्रांसफॉर्मर (विशेष रूप से छोटे वाक्यों में) को पछाड़ दिया। हमारे लंबाई पूर्वानुमान मॉडल का उपयोग करके औसत अनुवाद परिणाम लंबाई बाधाओं के लिए इनपुट लंबाई का उपयोग करके एक और बेसलाइन विधि से भी बेहतर थे। प्रस्तावित शोर इंजेक्शन ने लंबाई भविष्यवाणी त्रुटियों के लिए मजबूती में सुधार किया, विशेष रूप से खिड़की के आकार के भीतर।', 'zh': '神经机器翻译以输序建模有限而常有译者不足。 于此之中,建一用以知位编码(PE)约束以练Transformer法。 故特定窗大小随机噪声加 PE 中约束。 推理步驿,以入序与BERT之长短。 ASPEC英语至日语翻译之实验结果表明,其法生者近参考文献,而于BLEU中比常Transformer(尤于短句中)高3.22分。 用度之均平移亦优于用长之约入长之别法基线。 所言噪声注增长占鲁棒性,特在窗尺寸内。', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод часто страдает от недоперевода из-за его ограниченного моделирования длин выходных последовательностей. В этой работе мы предлагаем новый подход к обучению модели трансформатора с использованием ограничений по длине, основанных на распознавании длины с помощью позиционного кодирования (PE). Поскольку ограничения длины с точной целевой длиной предложения ухудшают производительность перевода, мы добавляем случайный шум в пределах определенного размера окна к ограничениям длины в PE во время обучения. На этапе вывода мы прогнозируем длины выходов, используя входные последовательности и модель прогнозирования длины на основе BERT. Экспериментальные результаты в переводе с английского на японский язык ASPEC показали, что предложенный метод дал переводы с длинами, близкими к эталонным, и превзошел ванильный трансформатор (особенно в коротких предложениях) на 3,22 пункта в БЛЮ. Средние результаты трансляции с использованием нашей модели прогнозирования длины также были лучше, чем другой базовый метод, использующий входные длины для ограничений длины. Предложенная шумовая инжекция улучшила устойчивость к ошибкам прогнозирования длины, особенно в пределах размера окна.', 'ga': "Is minic a bhíonn fadhb tearc-aistriúcháin ag Neural Machine Translation mar gheall ar an samhaltú teoranta a bhaineann le faid seicheamh aschuir. San obair seo, molaimid cur chuige nua maidir le hoiliúint a chur ar mhúnla Trasfhoirmeora ag baint úsáide as srianta faid bunaithe ar ionchódú suímh (PE) atá feasach ar fad. Ós rud é go ndéanann srianta faid agus faid beachta na n-abairtí sprice laghdú ar fheidhmíocht aistriúcháin, cuirimid torann randamach laistigh d'fhuinneog áirithe leis na srianta faid sa Chorpoideachas le linn na hoiliúna. Sa chéim tátail, déanaimid na faid aschuir a thuar ag baint úsáide as seichimh ionchuir agus samhail réamh-mheasta faid bunaithe ar BERT. Léirigh torthaí turgnamhacha in aistriúchán Béarla-go-Seapáinis ASPEC gur chruthaigh an modh molta aistriúcháin a bhí gar do na cinn tagartha agus gur sháraigh sé Trasfhoirmeoir fanaile (go háirithe in abairtí gearra) 3.22 pointe in BLEU. Bhí na meántorthaí aistriúcháin ag baint úsáide as ár múnla réamh-mheasta faid níos fearr freisin ná modh bonnlíne eile ag úsáid faid ionchuir do na srianta faid. D'fheabhsaigh an t-instealladh torainn a bhí beartaithe láidreacht d'earráidí tuartha faid, go háirithe laistigh de mhéid na fuinneoige.", 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás gyakran alulfordítási problémával szenved, mivel a kimeneti szekvencia hosszának korlátozott modellezése miatt. Ebben a munkában egy új megközelítést javasolunk egy transzformátor modell képzésére, amely hosszúságtudatos pozíciókódoláson (PE) alapul. Mivel a pontos célmondathosszal rendelkező hosszúsági korlátozások rontják a fordítási teljesítményt, az edzés során véletlenszerű zajt adunk egy bizonyos ablakméreten belül a PE hosszúsági korlátozásaihoz. A következtetési lépésben bemeneti szekvenciák és BERT alapú hosszú előrejelzési modell segítségével jósoljuk meg a kimeneti hosszt. Az ASPEC angol-japán fordításának kísérleti eredményei azt mutatták, hogy a javasolt módszer a referenciákhoz közeli hosszúságú fordításokat készített, és 3,22 ponttal túllépte a vanília transzformátort (különösen rövid mondatokban) a BLEU-ban. A hosszúság előrejelzési modellünket használó átlagos fordítási eredmények is jobb voltak, mint egy másik alapvető módszer, amely a hosszúsági korlátozásokhoz használta a bemeneti hosszúságokat. A javasolt zajbefecskendezés robusztusságát javította a hosszúság-előrejelzési hibák esetén, különösen az ablak méretén belül.', 'el': 'Η Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση συχνά πάσχει από ένα πρόβλημα υπομετάφρασης λόγω της περιορισμένης μοντελοποίησης των μήκους ακολουθίας εξόδου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για την εκπαίδευση ενός μοντέλου μετασχηματιστή χρησιμοποιώντας περιορισμούς μήκους που βασίζονται στην κωδικοποίηση θέσης με επίγνωση μήκους (PE). Δεδομένου ότι οι περιορισμοί μήκους με ακριβή μήκη προτάσεων στόχου υποβαθμίζουν την απόδοση μετάφρασης, προσθέτουμε τυχαίο θόρυβο μέσα σε ένα συγκεκριμένο μέγεθος παραθύρου στους περιορισμούς μήκους στο ΠΕ κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Στο βήμα συμπερασμάτων, προβλέπουμε τα μήκη εξόδου χρησιμοποιώντας ακολουθίες εισόδου και ένα μοντέλο πρόβλεψης μήκους βασισμένο στο BERT. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε μετάφραση στα Αγγλικά-Ιαπωνικά έδειξαν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος παρήγαγε μεταφράσεις με μήκη κοντά στα σημεία αναφοράς και ξεπερνούσε έναν μετασχηματιστή βανίλιας (ειδικά σε σύντομες προτάσεις) κατά 3.22 σημεία στο BLEU. Τα μέσα αποτελέσματα μετάφρασης χρησιμοποιώντας το μοντέλο πρόβλεψης μήκους ήταν επίσης καλύτερα από μια άλλη μέθοδο βάσης που χρησιμοποιεί μήκη εισόδου για τους περιορισμούς μήκους. Η προτεινόμενη έγχυση θορύβου βελτίωσε την ανθεκτικότητα για σφάλματα πρόβλεψης μήκους, ειδικά στο μέγεθος του παραθύρου.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქსინის გადარგუნება ზოგიერთად უფრო დარგუნებული პრობლემების გამოცდილება, რადგან მისი დარგუნებული მოდელური სიგრძე მოდგენა. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ პრომენტის მიღება ტრანფორმეტრის მოდელის შემწყვება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული სიგრძნობის განმავლობაზე გამოყენებული სიგრძნობის განმავლობაში პო განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების სიტყვების განმავლობაში დავადგენებთ განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების განმავლობაში, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული ფანჯრის სიტყვების განმავლობაში კონფიგური სიტყვების განმავლობ ინფრენციის ნაწილში, ჩვენ წინასწარმოდგინეთ გამოყენებული სიგრძე და BERT-ის განსაზღვრებული სიგრძე მოდელის გამოყენება. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ASPEC ანგლისურ-იაპონური გარგულისხმების გარგულისხმებისთვის გამოჩნდა, რომ გარგულისხმების გარგულისხმების სიგრძნობით გარგულისხმების გარგულისხმების გარ ჩვენი სიგრძე წარმოდგენის მოდელის გამოყენება უფრო მეტია, ვიდრე სხვა სიგრძე სიგრძე გამოყენებული სიგრძე სიგრძე. პროგრამის შეცდომების შეცდომა, განსაკუთრებით ფანჯრის ზომაში.', 'it': "Neural Machine Translation soffre spesso di un problema di sottotraduzione a causa della sua modellazione limitata delle lunghezze di sequenza di output. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo approccio alla formazione di un modello Transformer utilizzando vincoli di lunghezza basati sulla codifica posizionale length-aware (PE). Poiché i vincoli di lunghezza con lunghezze esatte di frase target degradano le prestazioni di traduzione, aggiungiamo rumore casuale all'interno di una certa dimensione della finestra ai vincoli di lunghezza nel PE durante l'allenamento. Nella fase di inferenza, prediciamo le lunghezze di uscita utilizzando sequenze di input e un modello di previsione della lunghezza basato su BERT. I risultati sperimentali in una traduzione inglese-giapponese ASPEC hanno mostrato che il metodo proposto produce traduzioni con lunghezze vicine a quelle di riferimento e ha superato un trasformatore alla vaniglia (soprattutto nelle frasi brevi) di 3,22 punti in BLEU. I risultati medi della traduzione utilizzando il nostro modello di previsione della lunghezza sono stati anche migliori di un altro metodo di base che utilizza lunghezze di input per i vincoli di lunghezza. L'iniezione di rumore proposta ha migliorato la robustezza per gli errori di previsione della lunghezza, soprattutto all'interno delle dimensioni della finestra.", 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аударуы көбінесе, шығыс ретінің ұзындығын шектеу үшін аудару мәселесінен тыс болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, ұзындығын білмейтін орналасу кодтамасына негізделген ұзындық шектеулерді қолдану үшін түрлендіруші үлгісін оқыту жағдайын жасаймыз. Тұрақты мақсатты сөйлеменің ұзындығының ұзындығын шектеу үшін, біз кейбір терезенің өлшемінде PE жұмысының ұзындығын шектеу үшін кездейсоқ дыбысты қосу үшін. Біз кідіру қадамында келтірілген кезектерді және BERT негіздеген ұзындығын алдын ала аламыз. ASPEC ағылшын- жапон аудармасының тәжірибесінің нәтижесі, сілтемелерінің жақындағы ұзындығымен жақын аудармасын көрсету әдісін көрсету әдісін көрсету әдісін көрсету әдісін көрсету және BLEU 3 Орташа аудару нәтижелері ұзындығымызды таңдау үлгісімізде басқа негізгі жолдың әдісінен да жақсы болды. Келтірілген дыбыс инжекциясы ұзындығын таңдау қатесі үшін дұрыстығын жақсартды, осылақ терезенің өлшемінде.', 'lt': 'Neural Machine Translation often suffers from an under-translation problem due to its limited modeling of output sequence lengths.  Šiame darbe siūlome naują požiūrį į Transformuotojo modelio mokymą, naudojant ilgio apribojimus, pagrįstus ilgio žinomu pozicijos kodavimu (PE). Kadangi ilgio apribojimai su tiksliu tiksliniu sakinio ilgiu mažin a vertimo charakteristikas, mes įtraukiame atsitiktinį triukšmą tam tikru lango dydžiu į ilgio apribojimus PE mokymo metu. Išvados etape prognozuojame išėjimo ilgius naudojant įėjimo sekas ir BERT pagrįstą ilgio prognozavimo model į. Eksperimentiniai ASPEC vertimo anglų ir japonų kalbomis rezultatai parodė, kad siūlomu metodu buvo parengti vertimai, kurių ilgis yra artimas referenciniams vertimams, o vanilės transformatorius (ypač trumpalaikiais sakiniais) atliko 3,22 taško BLEU. Vidutiniai vertimo rezultatai naudojant mūsų ilgio prognozavimo model į taip pat buvo geresni nei kitas pradinis metodas, naudojantis įvesties ilgius ilgio apribojimams. Siūloma triukšmo injekcija pagerino ilgumo prognozavimo klaidų patikimumą, ypač lango dydžio.', 'mk': 'Неуралната машина честопати страда од проблем со недостаток превод поради нејзиното ограничено моделирање на должината на излезната секвенца. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нов пристап до обуката на трансформираниот модел со користење на должинските ограничувања базирани на позиционалното кодирање на должината (ПЕ). Бидејќи ограничувањата на должината со точната должина на реченицата на целта ја деградираат преведувањето, додаваме случајна бука во одредена големина на прозорецот на ограничувањата на должината во ПЕ за време на тренингот. Во чекорот на инференцијата, ги предвидуваме должините на излезот користејќи вводни секвенци и модел на предвидување на должина базиран на BERT. Experimental results in an ASPEC English-to-Japanese translation showed the proposed method produced translations with lengths close to the reference ones and outperformed a vanilla Transformer (especially in short sentences) by 3.22 points in BLEU.  Просечните резултати на преводот со користење на нашиот модел за предвидување на должината беа, исто така, подобри од другиот основен метод со користење на должината на влезот за ограничувањата на должината. Предложената инјекција на шума ја подобри силноста на грешките во предвидувањето на должината, особено во големината на прозорецот.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural sering mengalami masalah terjemahan-bawah kerana pemodelan terhad panjang urutan output. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan baru untuk melatih model Transformer menggunakan keterangan panjang berdasarkan pengekodan posisi yang sedar panjang (PE). Oleh kerana keterangan panjang dengan panjang kalimat sasaran tepat merusak prestasi terjemahan, kita tambah bunyi rawak dalam saiz tetingkap tertentu kepada keterangan panjang dalam PE semasa latihan. Dalam langkah kesimpulan, kita meramalkan panjang output menggunakan jujukan input dan model ramalan panjang berdasarkan BERT. Experimental results in an ASPEC English-to-Japanese translation showed the proposed method produced translations with lengths close to the reference ones and outperformed a vanilla Transformer (especially in short sentences) by 3.22 points in BLEU.  Hasil terjemahan rata-rata menggunakan model ramalan panjang kami juga lebih baik daripada kaedah asas lain menggunakan panjang input untuk keterangan panjang. Injeksi bunyi yang diusulkan meningkatkan ketakutan bagi ralat ramalan panjang, terutama dalam saiz tetingkap.', 'mt': 'It-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali spiss tbati minn problema ta’ sottotraduzzjoni minħabba l-immudellar limitat tagħha tat-tul tas-sekwenza tal-ħruġ. F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu approċċ ġdid għat-taħriġ ta’ mudell Transformer bl-użu ta’ restrizzjonijiet fit-tul ibbażati fuq l-ikkodifikar pożizzjonali konxju mit-tul (PE). Billi r-restrizzjonijiet tat-tul b’tul eżatt tas-sentenza fil-mira jiddegradaw il-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni, a ħna nżidu storbju aleatorju f’ċertu daqs tat-tieqa mar-restrizzjonijiet tat-tul fil-PE matul it-taħriġ. Fl-istadju ta’ inferenza, a ħna nipprovaw it-tul tal-output bl-użu ta’ sekwenzi ta’ input u mudell ta’ tbassir tat-tul ibbażat fuq BERT. Riżultati esperimentali f’traduzzjoni ASPEC Ingliż-Ġappuniż urew il-metodu propost ipproduċa traduzzjonijiet b’tul qrib dak ta’ referenza u wettaq Transformer vanilla (speċjalment f’sentenzi qosra) bi 3.22 punt fil-BLEU. Ir-riżultati medji tat-traduzzjoni bl-użu tal-mudell tat-tbassir tat-tul tagħna kienu wkoll aħjar minn metodu ieħor tal-linja bażi bl-użu tat-tul tal-input għall-limitazzjonijiet tat-tul. L-injezzjoni proposta tal-istorbju tejbet ir-robustezza għall-iżbalji fit-tbassir tat-tul, speċjalment fid-daqs tat-tieqa.', 'mn': 'Ингээд мэдрэлийн машин орчуулалт ихэвчлэн үржүүлэх дарааллын урт нь хязгаарлагдсан үед бага орчуулалтын асуудалтай болдог. Энэ ажлын тулд бид урт ухаантай байрлал кодлох (PE) дээр суурилсан урт хязгаарлалтыг ашиглан Трансфер загварын сургалтын шинэ арга зам зааж өгдөг. Яг л зорилготой өгүүлбэртэй урт хязгаарлагдсан учраас бид өөрчлөлтийн үйл ажиллагааг багасгадаг. Бид тодорхой цонхны хэмжээнд PE-ын урт хязгаарлагдсан урт хязгаарлагдсан. Инференцийн алхам дээр бид input sequences болон BERT-д суурилсан урт таамаглах загварыг ашиглан гаргах уртыг таамаглаж байна. ASPEC Англи-Японы орнуудын туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь харуулсан юм. Сургуулалтын ойролцоогоор урт хувилбар бий болгосон бөгөөд үүнийг бага зэрэг хэлбэрээр (ялангуяа богино өгүүлбэрээр) BLEU-д 3.22 Бидний урт хугацааны загварыг ашиглан дундаж орчуулалтын үр дүн нь урт хязгаарлалтын оролцооны уртыг ашиглан өөр суурь шугам загвараас илүү сайн байсан. Үнэндээ чимээгүй инжекцийн хувьд урт хугацааны алдаа гаргаж, ялангуяа цонхны хэмжээнд байдаг.', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe często cierpi na problem niedostatecznego tłumaczenia ze względu na ograniczone modelowanie długości sekwencji wyjściowych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowatorskie podejście do treningu modelu Transformera z wykorzystaniem ograniczeń długości opartych na długościowym kodowaniu pozycyjnym (PE). Ponieważ ograniczenia długości z dokładną długością zdań docelowych ograniczają wydajność tłumaczenia, dodajemy losowe szumy w określonym rozmiarze okna do ograniczeń długości w PE podczas treningu. W etapie wnioskowania przewidujemy długości wyjściowe za pomocą sekwencji wejściowych i modelu prognozowania długości opartego na BERT. Wyniki eksperymentalne w ASPEC tłumaczeniu angielsko-japońskim pokazały, że proponowana metoda wytwarza tłumaczenia o długości zbliżonych do referencyjnych i przewyższa transformator waniliowy (zwłaszcza w krótkich zdaniach) o 3,22 punktów w BLEU. Średnie wyniki tłumaczenia przy użyciu naszego modelu przewidywania długości były również lepsze niż inne metody bazowe wykorzystujące długości wejściowe dla ograniczeń długości długości. Proponowany wtrysk hałasu zwiększył wytrzymałość błędów przewidywania długości, zwłaszcza w obrębie wielkości okna.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതു് അതിന്റെ പരിധികളുടെ നീളമില്ലാത്ത നീളം ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നീളം പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന നീളം നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നീളം പരിശീലനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പ്രാധ ഒരു ജാലകത്തിന്റെ വലിപ്പത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ജാലകത്തിന്റെ വലിപ്പം പെയിപിയിലെ നീളം നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള സമയത്ത് നീള അപരിഹാരത്തിന്റെ പടിയില്\u200d, ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് സെക്കന്സുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പുറപ്പെടുന്ന നീളം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റ ആസ്പെക്ക്- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്- ജാപ്പനീസ് പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം ബിലിയൂയില്\u200d 3. 22 പോയിന്റുകള്\u200d മൂന്ന് മാത്രം നീളമുള്ള വിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ രീതിയില്\u200d പരീക് നമ്മുടെ നീളം പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സാധാരണ പരിഭാഷയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വേറൊരു ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d രീതിയിലും നല്ലതായിരുന്നു. ന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ശബ്ദം ഇഞ്ചെക്ഷന്\u200d നീളം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ബലപ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത', 'no': '@ info I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit nytt tilnærming til å trenja eit transformeringsmodell med lengde begrensningar basert på lengd-kjent posisjonskoding (PE). Siden lengde med nøyaktig målsettingslengde avdegraderer omsetjingsfunksjonen, legg vi tilfeldige støy i eit viss vindaugsstorleik til lengdene i PE under opplæring. I nedtrekksteget forventar vi lengden på utdata ved å bruka inndata-sekvensar og ein BERT-basert foregåvemodus for lengd. Eksperimentale resultat i ein ASPEC-engelsk-til-japansk omsetjing viste den foreslåde metoden som produserte omsetjingar med lengde nær referansen og utførte ein vanilla-transformer (spesielt i korte setningar) med 3,22 punkt i BLEU. Gjennomsnittlige oversettelsesresultatet ved hjelp av målet vårt lengd-forhåndsvising var også bedre enn ein annan baseline-metode ved hjelp av lengden for lengdene. Førehandsvising av støyinjeksjonen forbetra kraftighet for langsfeilar, spesielt i vindaugsstorleiken.', 'ro': 'Neural Machine Translation suferă adesea de o problemă sub-traducere datorită modelării limitate a lungimilor secvențelor de ieșire. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare nouă pentru instruirea unui model Transformer folosind constrângeri de lungime bazate pe codarea pozițională conștientă de lungime (PE). Deoarece constrângerile de lungime cu lungimea exactă a propoziției țintă degradează performanța traducerii, adăugăm zgomot aleatoriu într-o anumită dimensiune a ferestrei la constrângerile de lungime din PE în timpul antrenamentului. În etapa inferenței, prezicem lungimile ieșirii folosind secvențe de intrare și un model de predicție a lungimii bazat pe BERT. Rezultatele experimentale ale unei traduceri ASPEC din engleză în japoneză au arătat că metoda propusă produce traduceri cu lungimi apropiate de cele de referință și a depășit un Transformer de vanilie (mai ales în propoziții scurte) cu 3,22 puncte în BLEU. Rezultatele medii de traducere utilizând modelul nostru de predicție a lungimii au fost, de asemenea, mai bune decât o altă metodă de bază care utilizează lungimile de intrare pentru constrângerile de lungime. Injecția de zgomot propusă a îmbunătățit robustețea erorilor de predicție a lungimii, în special în cadrul dimensiunii ferestrei.', 'sr': 'Neuralno prevodenje mašine često pati od problema sa pod prevodom zbog ograničenog modela dužine izlazne sekvence. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi pristup obuci model a transformera koji koristi ograničenja dužine na osnovu pozicionalnog kodiranja dužine (PE). Budući da dužin a ograničava sa tačnom duljinom ciljne rečenice smanjuje učinkovitost prevođenja, dodamo nasumičnu buku unutar određene veličine prozora na dužine ograničenja PE tijekom treninga. U koraku infekcije, predviđamo dužinu izlaza koristeći ulazne sekvence i model predviđanja dužine na BERT-u. Eksperimentalni rezultati ASPEC-a-japanskog prevoda pokazali su predloženi metod proizvođenog prevoda sa dužinom blizu referentnih i izvršili vanilni transformer (posebno u kratkim rečenicama) za 3,22 bodova u BLEU-u. Prosečni rezultati prevoda koristeći naš model predviđanja dužine takođe su bili bolji od druge početne metode koristeći dužine ulaska za ograničenje dužine. Predložena injekcija buke poboljšala je snažnost za pogreške predviđanja dužine, posebno unutar veličine prozora.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය වාර්ථාවයෙන් පරිවර්තන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dර මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වාර්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු සීමාවක් ප්\u200dර වාර්ථාවක් සිද්ධ වාර්ථාවක් තියෙන සිද්ධ වාර්ථාවක් විතරයි, අපි කිසිම කවුළු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන සිද්ධ වාර්ථාවක පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශන වැඩිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ඇතුළු පරීක්ෂණය සහ BERT-පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dර ASPEC ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ජාපානියෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්  @ info විශේෂයෙන්ම කවුළු ප්\u200dරමාණය ඇතුලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Turjumidda guud ee baabuurka waxey marar badan ka xanuunsadaan dhibaato hoos-turjuman sababtoo ah sameynta dhaadheerka soo baxa. In this work, we propose a novel approach to training a Transformer model using length constraints based on length-aware positional encoding (PE).  Sida uu dhererku ku xado hadalka hagaajinta oo aad u dhaadheer sameynta turjumaadda, waxaynu ku darnaa cod fudud oo daaqad ka mid ah oo ku qoran xadhiidka PE xiliga waxbarashada. Xarunta cudurka ah, waxaynu ka hor dhignaa dhaadheerka soo baxa oo ku isticmaalaya injiilka iyo sameynta sii-socoshada BERT. Imtixaanka ka soo baxay tarjumaadda ASPEC Ingiriis-to-Japanese waxay muuqatay qaabkii la soo jeeday oo ay soo saareen turjumyo ku dhow reference-horaadka ku dhow, waxayna sameeyeen baaritaanka vanilla (khusuusan ku qoran qoraalo gaaban) 3.22 goor ku qoran BLEU. Midhaha turjumaadda ee ugu dhexeeya ayaa sidoo kale ka wanaagsan qaab kale oo lagu isticmaali karo qalabka lagu qoro dhegta ah oo ku qoran. Dhaqaalaha codka la soo jeeday ayaa beddelay qalabka la sii sheegayo, gaar ahaan marka lagu jiro qiyaastii daaqada.', 'sv': 'Neural Machine Translation lider ofta av ett under철vers채ttningsproblem p책 grund av dess begr채nsade modellering av utmatningssekvensl채ngder. I detta arbete f철resl책r vi ett nytt tillv채gag책ngss채tt f철r att tr채na en Transformer modell med l채ngdbegr채nsningar baserade p책 l채ngdmedveten positionskodning (PE). Eftersom l채ngdbegr채nsningar med exakta m책lmeningsl채nder f철rs채mrar 철vers채ttningens prestanda l채gger vi till slumpm채ssigt brus inom en viss f철nsterstorlek till l채ngdbegr채nsningarna i PE under tr채ningen. I inferenssteget f철rutsp책r vi utg책ngsl채nderna med hj채lp av inmatningssekvenser och en BERT-baserad l채ngdprediktionsmodell. Experimentella resultat i en ASPEC engelsk-japansk 철vers채ttning visade att den f철reslagna metoden producerade 철vers채ttningar med l채ngder n채ra referenserna och 철vertr채ffade en vanilj Transformer (s채rskilt i korta meningar) med 3,22 po채ng i BLEU. De genomsnittliga 철vers채ttningsresultaten med v책r l채ngdprediktionsmodell var ocks책 b채ttre 채n en annan baslinje metod med inmatningsl채ngder f철r l채ngdbegr채nsningarna. Den f철reslagna bullerinjektionen f철rb채ttrade robustheten f철r l채ngdf철ruts채gelsefel, s채rskilt inom f철nsterstorleken.', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis இந்த வேலையில், நாம் மாற்றும் மாதிரி மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு புதிய செயலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நீளம் அறிந்த நிலை நீளம் சரியான இலக்கு வாக்கியத்துடன் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்டதால் நீளம் குறைந்த மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டை சேர்க்கிறது, பயிற்சியில் ஒரு  வெளியீட்டு நீளம் நீளம் உள்ளீடு வரிசைகளையும் BERT-அடிப்படையிலான நீளம் மாதிரி Name @ info பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட ஒலி உள்ளீடுகள் நீண்ட முன்கூற்று பிழைகளுக்கு ஆட்சிரியை மேம்படுத்தி, குறிப்பாக', 'ur': 'نائورل ماشین ترجمہ اکثر ایک کم ترجمہ مسئلہ کے باعث اس کی محدودیت موڈلینگ کی مدل کی وجہ سے ہوتی ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے ایک ٹرنفسر موڈل کی آموزش کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو طول سے متوجہ ہونے والی موقعیت کا اکنوڈینگ (PE) پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے۔ لہروں کے باعث قطعاً موجود قول کی طول سے ترجمہ کی عملکرد کمزور ہوتی ہے، ہم ایک پنڈروں کی اندازہ میں ایک قطعا غږ جمع کرتے ہیں جو PE میں لہروں کی محدودیتوں میں ہے. آئنفارنس سٹپے میں، ہم اُوپ ٹپٹ کی طول کی پیش بینی کرتے ہیں، اُنپ ٹپٹ کی سٹپے اور BERT کی بنیاد کی لمبی پیش بینی موڈل کے مطابق۔ ASPEC انگلیسی سے ژاپنی ترجمہ میں تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھایا گیا تھا کہ مقرر کردہ طریقہ کی ترجمہ کے ساتھ دور دراز کے ساتھ پیدا کیا گیا تھا اور بلیوس میں 3.22 پوینٹ کے ذریعہ ایک وینلیا ترجمور (مخصوصاً چھوٹے جماعتوں میں) کو ہمارے طویل پیش بینی موڈل کے مطابق عمده ترجمہ کا نتیجہ دوسرے بنسلین طریقے سے بھی بہتر تھا کہ طویل محدودیت کے لئے انپ لینگ کے مطابق۔ پیشنهاد صوت انجینٹ نے طول پیش بینی خطاؤں کے لئے زیادتی کی، مخصوصاً پنڈروں کی اندازہ میں.', 'uz': "Name Bu ishda, biz uzun yaxshi joylashtirilgan kodlash (PE) asosida, Transformer modelni tahrirlash uchun novel usulni tahrirlashni talab qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Ko'rib chiqish darajada, biz kiritish chegaralari va BERT asosida uzun prediction modeli yordamida natijaning uzunligini predictincha qilamiz. Name @ info: whatsthis Talab qilingan tovush qoʻyishni uzoqlash xatosida o'zgartiradi, hususan oynaning oʻlchamida.", 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh thường gặp vấn đề thiếu dịch do cách người mẫu hạn chế của độ dài chuỗi xuất. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mới để huấn luyện một mô hình transformer. Sử dụng các giới hạn độ dài dựa trên độ đặt hình. Vì các hạn chế độ dài với độ dài chính xác của mục tiêu làm giảm hiệu ứng dịch chuyển, chúng tôi thêm nhiễu ngẫu nhiên bên trong một số kích cỡ cửa sổ nhất định với các hạn chế độ dài trong thể dục trong thời gian huấn luyện. Trong giai đoạn ngụ ý, chúng tôi dự đoán độ dài xuất sử dụng các chuỗi nhập và một mô hình dự đoán dài dòng BERT. Kết quả thử nghiệm trong phiên dịch ASAP (Anh-Anh-với-Nhật) đã cho thấy phương pháp đã đề xuất bản dịch phiên bản với độ dài gần các kênh tham khảo ((xoắn ốc ốc vani) và sử dụng một bộ dịch biến hình vani (đặc biệt trong các đoạn ngắn) bằng 3.22 chi tiết của tiếng bíp. Các kết quả dịch trung bình sử dụng mô hình dự đoán dài của chúng tôi cũng tốt hơn một phương pháp cơ bản khác sử dụng khoảng thời gian nhập cho các hạn chế độ dài. Việc tiêm chất tạo tiếng động đề nghị nâng cao độ bền của lỗi dự đoán độ dài, đặc biệt là trong kích thước cửa sổ.', 'bg': 'Невровият машинен превод често страда от недостатъчен превод поради ограниченото му моделиране на дължините на изходните последователности. В тази работа предлагаме нов подход за обучение на трансформаторен модел, използващ ограничения на дължината, базирани на позиционно кодиране (ПЕ). Тъй като ограниченията за дължина с точна целева дължина на изречението влошават ефективността на превода, ние добавяме случаен шум в рамките на определен размер на прозореца към ограниченията за дължина в ПЕ по време на обучението. В етапа на заключение ние прогнозираме дължините на изхода, използвайки входни последователности и базиран на BERT модел за прогнозиране на дължината. Експерименталните резултати в англо-японски превод показаха, че предложеният метод произвежда преводи с дължини близки до референтните и превъзхожда ваниловия трансформатор (особено в кратки изречения) с 3,22 точки в Блеу. Средните резултати от превода, използващи нашия модел за прогнозиране на дължината, също бяха по-добри от друг базов метод, използващ входни дължини за ограниченията на дължината. Предложеното шумово впръскване подобрява здравината при грешки при прогнозиране на дължината, особено в рамките на размера на прозореца.', 'hr': 'Neuralno prevodenje strojeva često pati od problema s pod prevodom zbog ograničenog modeliranja dužine proizvodnje sekvencije. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi pristup obuci model a transformera koristeći ograničenja dužine temeljne na pozicionalnom kodiranju dužine. Budući da dužin a ograničena s to čnim ciljnim dugačkim rečenicama smanjuje učinkovitost prevođenja, dodamo slučajnu buku unutar određene veličine prozora na dužine ograničenja PE tijekom obuke. U koraku infekcije predviđamo dužinu izlaza koristeći ulazne sekvence i model predviđanja dužine na BERT-u. Eksperimentalni rezultati ASPEC-a-japanskog prevoda pokazali su predloženi metod proizvođenog prevoda s dužinom blizu referentnih i iznosili vanilnog transformera (posebno u kratkim rečenicama) za 3,22 bodova u BLEU-u. Prosječni rezultati prevoda koristeći naš model predviđanja dužine također su bolji od drugog početnog metoda koristeći dugačinu ulaza za ograničenje dužine. Predložena injekcija buke poboljšala je snažnost za pogreške predviđanja dužine, posebno unutar veličine prozora.', 'nl': 'Neural Machine Translation lijdt vaak aan een ondervertelling probleem vanwege de beperkte modellering van uitvoerreekslengten. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe benadering voor om een Transformer model te trainen met behulp van lengtebeperkingen gebaseerd op lengtebewuste positionele codering (PE). Omdat lengtebeperkingen met exacte streefzinnlengtes de vertaalprestaties verminderen, voegen we willekeurige ruis binnen een bepaalde venstergrootte toe aan de lengtebeperkingen in de PE tijdens de training. In de inferentiestap voorspellen we de outputlengtes met behulp van invoersequenties en een BERT-gebaseerd lengteprognitiemodel. Experimentele resultaten in een ASPEC Engels-naar-Japans vertaling toonden aan dat de voorgestelde methode vertalingen opleverde met lengtes die dicht bij de referentie lagen en een vanille Transformer (vooral in korte zinnen) met 3.22 punten overtrof in BLEU. De gemiddelde vertaalresultaten met behulp van ons lengteprognitiemodel waren ook beter dan een andere baseline methode met invoerlengtes voor de lengtebeperkingen. De voorgestelde geluidsinjectie verbeterde de robuustheid voor lengteprognitiefouten, vooral binnen de raamgrootte.', 'da': 'Neural Machine Translation lider ofte af et underoversættelsesproblem på grund af dens begrænsede modellering af output sekvenslængder. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny tilgang til træning af en Transformer model ved hjælp af længdebegrænsninger baseret på længdebevidst positionskodning (PE). Da længdebegrænsninger med nøjagtige målsætningslængder forringer oversættelsesevnen, tilføjer vi tilfældig støj inden for en bestemt vinduesstørrelse til længdebegrænsningerne i PE under træningen. I slutfasen forudsiger vi output længder ved hjælp af input sekvenser og en BERT-baseret længde forudsigelse model. Eksperimentelle resultater i en ASPEC engelsk-japansk oversættelse viste, at den foreslåede metode producerede oversættelser med længder tæt på referencen og overgik en vanilla Transformer (især i korte sætninger) med 3,22 point i BLEU. De gennemsnitlige oversættelsesresultater ved hjælp af vores længdepregningsmodel var også bedre end en anden basismetode ved hjælp af inputlængder til længdebegrænsningerne. Den foreslåede støjindsprøjtning forbedrede robustheden ved længdefejl, især inden for vinduesstørrelsen.', 'de': 'Die neuronale maschinelle ﾃ彙ersetzung leidet hﾃ､ufig unter einem Unterﾃｼbersetzungsproblem aufgrund der begrenzten Modellierung der Ausgabesequenzlﾃ､ngen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen neuartigen Ansatz vor, um ein Transformer-Modell unter Verwendung von Lﾃ､ngenbeschrﾃ､nkungen zu trainieren, die auf lﾃ､ngenbewusster Positionskodierung (PE) basieren. Da Lﾃ､ngenbeschrﾃ､nkungen mit exakten Zielsatzlﾃ､ngen die ﾃ彙ersetzungsleistung beeintrﾃ､chtigen, fﾃｼgen wir zufﾃ､lliges Rauschen innerhalb einer bestimmten Fenstergrﾃｶﾃ歹 zu den Lﾃ､ngenbeschrﾃ､nkungen im PE wﾃ､hrend des Trainings hinzu. Im Inferenzschritt prognostizieren wir die Ausgangslﾃ､ngen mithilfe von Eingabesequenzen und einem BERT-basierten Lﾃ､ngenprﾃ､diktionsmodell. Experimentelle Ergebnisse in einer ASPEC Englisch-Japanisch ﾃ彙ersetzung zeigten, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode ﾃ彙ersetzungen mit Lﾃ､ngen erzeugt, die nahe an den Referenzlﾃ､ngen liegen und einen Vanille Transformer (besonders in kurzen Sﾃ､tzen) um 3,22 Punkte in BLEU ﾃｼbertraf. Die durchschnittlichen ﾃ彙ersetzungsergebnisse mit unserem Lﾃ､ngenprﾃ､diktionsmodell waren auch besser als eine andere Baseline-Methode, die Eingabelﾃ､ngen fﾃｼr die Lﾃ､ngenbeschrﾃ､nkungen verwendete. Die vorgeschlagene Gerﾃ､uscheinspritzung verbesserte die Robustheit bei Lﾃ､ngenprﾃ､diktionsfehlern, insbesondere innerhalb der Fenstergrﾃｶﾃ歹.', 'id': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural sering menderita dari masalah terjemahan-bawah karena model terbatas panjang urutan keluaran. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru untuk melatih model Transformer menggunakan batas panjang berdasarkan pengekodan posisi yang sadar panjang (PE). Since length constraints with exact target sentence lengths degrade translation performance, we add random noise within a certain window size to the length constraints in the PE during the training.  Dalam langkah inferensi, kita memprediksi panjang output menggunakan urutan input dan model prediksi panjang berdasarkan BERT. Hasil eksperimental dalam sebuah terjemahan ASPEC bahasa Inggris-Jepang menunjukkan metode yang diusulkan menghasilkan terjemahan dengan panjang dekat dengan referensi dan melampaui Transformer vanilla (terutama dalam kalimat pendek) dengan 3,22 poin di BLEU. Hasil terjemahan rata-rata menggunakan model prediksi panjang kami juga lebih baik dari metode dasar lain menggunakan panjang input untuk batasan panjang. Injeksi suara yang diusulkan meningkatkan kekuatan untuk kesalahan prediksi panjang, terutama dalam ukuran jendela.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی اغلب از یک مشکل زیر ترجمه به دلیل مدل محدودیت از طول ترجمه\u200cهای نتیجه درد می\u200cیابد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش رمانی برای آموزش یک مدل تغییر دهنده با استفاده از محدودیت طولانی بر اساس رمزبندی موقعیت\u200cهای متوجه طولانی (PE). از آنجا که محدودیت طولانی با طول قول هدف دقیقاً فعالیت ترجمه را کاهش می\u200cدهد، ما صدای تصادفی در اندازه پنجره\u200cای به محدودیت طولانی در PE در طول تمرین افزودیم. در قدم آلودگی، ما طول خروجی را با استفاده از دستورات ورودی و یک مدل پیش بینی طولانی بر بنیاد BERT پیش بینی می کنیم. نتایج تجربه\u200cای در ترجمه\u200cهای انگلیسی به ژاپنی ASPEC نشان داده است که روش پیشنهاد ترجمه\u200cهای تولید شده با طول نزدیک به مرتبه\u200cها و یک ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی vanilla (مخصوصا در جمله\u200cهای کوتاه) با 3.22 نقطه در BLEU انجام داده است. نتایج متوسط ترجمه با استفاده از مدل پیش بینی طولانی ما بهتر از طریق دیگر پایین خط استفاده از طول ورودی برای محدودیت طولانی بودند. تزریق صوتی پیشنهاد برای اشتباهی پیش بینی طولانی، مخصوصا در اندازه پنجره، قدرت را بهتر کرد.', 'ko': '출력 서열의 길이에 대한 유한한 모델링 때문에 신경기계 번역은 자주 번역이 부족한 문제에 부딪힌다.이 작업에서 우리는 길이 감지 위치 인코딩(PE)을 바탕으로 하는 길이 제약을 바탕으로 하는 변압기 모델 훈련의 새로운 방법을 제시했다.정확한 목표 문장의 길이를 가진 길이 제약은 번역 성능을 떨어뜨리기 때문에 훈련 기간에 우리는 PE의 길이 제약에 일정한 창 크기 내의 무작위 소음을 넣는다.추리 단계에서 우리는 입력 서열과 버트의 길이 예측 모델을 바탕으로 출력의 길이를 예측한다.ASPEC 영일 번역에서의 실험 결과, 이 방법으로 생성된 번역문의 길이는 참고 번역문에 가깝고, BLEU에서는 허브 변압기(특히 짧은 문장)보다 3.22포인트 높았다.우리의 길이 예측 모델을 사용한 평균 번역 결과도 입력 길이를 길이 제약의 기선으로 사용하는 다른 방법보다 우수하다.제시된 소음 주입은 길이 예측 오차의 노봉성을 높였고 특히 창 크기에서 그랬다.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kijerumani mara nyingi hupata mateso kutokana na tatizo la chini ya kutafsiri kutokana na utofauti wake mdogo wa mfululizo wa matokeo. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kufundisha muundo wa Transfer kwa kutumia vizuizi vya muda mrefu kwa kutumia kodi inayoelewa vizuri (PE). Kwa kuwa muda mrefu unazuiwa na hukumu sahihi ya lengo linalosababisha ufanisi wa tafsiri, tunaongeza kelele isiyo na taratibu ndani ya ukubwa wa vinasa fulani mpaka vikwazo vya muda mrefu katika chama cha PE wakati wa mafunzo. Katika hatua ya maambukizi, tunatabiri muda mrefu wa matokeo kwa kutumia mfululizo wa input na modeli ya kutabiri kwa kiwango kikubwa cha BERT. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na tafsiri ya Kiingereza na Kijapani ya ASPEC yalionyesha mbinu hiyo ya pendekezo lililotengeneza tafsiri yenye muda mrefu karibu na maoni hayo na ilifanya Transfer wa vanilla (hasa kwa hukumu fupi) kwa pointi 3.22 huko BLEU. Matokeo ya kutafsiri kwa wastani kwa kutumia mifano yetu ya kutabiri ya muda mrefu pia yalikuwa bora zaidi ya njia nyingine ya msingi kwa kutumia viwango vya input kwa ajili ya vikwazo vya muda mrefu. Uwekezaji wa sauti ulipendekezwa uliboresha ubora wa kutabiri kwa muda mrefu, hasa ndani ya ukubwa wa vinasa.', 'tr': "Näyral Maşynyň terjimesine köplenç çykyş sequencer uzunlygynyň ahyry modellendirmesi üçin bir ahyrky meselenden bolýar. Bu işde, uzaklyk bilen tanyş ýerli ködleme (PE) tabanly terjime etmek üçin bir taýýarlama nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Uzunlyk, dogry maksadyň uzunlygy bilen terjime etmegiň netijesini azaltýar, biz äpişgäniň beýleki äpişgäniň ululykyna PE'iň ýüzünde boýunça gürrüňi ekleýäris. Açmak adımda, girdi dizirlerini we BERT tabanlı uzun öngörüm modelini kullanarak çikgin uzunluğunu tahmin ediyoruz. ASPEC Iňlisçe-japonça terjime edeniň netijesi bolan çykyşlaryň golaýynyň ýanynda döredilen terjime edilen çykyşlaryny görkezildi we çykyş çykyşlaryň (iňlisçe kısa sözleriň içine) BLEU 3.22 puýasyna seredendir. Uzluk öngörüm modelini kullanarak ortalama terjime netijesi boşluk mümkinçilikleri üçin girdi uzunluğunu kullanarak başga bir baseline yönteminden gowydyr. Ýagtylamak gürrüň atygynyň uzalyk öňünden geçirmek hatalary üçin güýçlendirdi, ýöne äpişgäniň ululykynda.", 'af': "Neurale Masjien Vertaling gely dikwels van 'n onder- vertaling probleme vanweë sy beperkte modeling van uitvoer sekwensielengte. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n roman toegang om 'n Transformer model te oefen met lengte beheinings gebaseer op lengte- bewys posisieele kodering (PE). Omdat die lengte begrens met egte teiken lengte ondergaan vertaling uitvoering, voeg ons willekeurige ruis binne 'n sekere venster grootte by die lengte begrens in die PE tydens die opvoering. In die inferensie stap, voorskou ons die uitvoer lengte gebruik invoer sekwensies en 'n BERT-gebaseerde lengte voorskou model. Eksperimentale resultate in 'n ASPEC Engelse-na-Japanse vertaling het die voorgestelde metode verkondig vertalings met lengte naby die verwysing en uitgevoer 'n vanilla Transformer (veral in kort setings) deur 3.22 punte in BLEU. Die gemiddelde vertaling resultate met die gebruik van ons lengte voorskou model was ook beter as 'n ander basisline metode met die gebruik van invoer lengte vir die lengte beheinings. Die voorgestelde ruis-injeksie het kragtigheid vir lengte voorskou foute verbeter, veral binne die venster grootte.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi i Makinës Neurale shpesh vuan nga një problem nënpërkthimi për shkak të modelimit të kufizuar të gjatësisë së sekuencës së daljes. In this work, we propose a novel approach to training a Transformer model using length constraints based on length-aware positional encoding (PE).  Meqenëse kufizimet e gjatësisë me gjatësinë e fjalës objektive degradojnë performancën e përkthimit, ne shtojmë zhurmë të rastësishme brenda një madhësie të caktuar dritare në kufizimet e gjatësisë në PE gjatë stërvitjes. Në hapin e përfundimit, parashikojmë gjatësinë e daljes duke përdorur sekuencat e hyrjes dhe një model parashikimi të gjatësisë bazuar në BERT. Rezultatet eksperimentale në një përkthim anglisht-japonez ASPEC treguan se metoda e propozuar prodhoi përkthime me gjatësi të afërta me a to të referimit dhe tejkaloi një vanilla Transformer (veçan ërisht në fjalë të shkurtra) me 3.22 pikë në BLEU. Rezultatet mesatare të përkthimit duke përdorur modelin tonë të parashikimit të gjatësisë ishin gjithashtu më të mira se një metodë tjetër bazë duke përdorur gjatësitë e hyrjes për kufizimet e gjatësisë. Injekcioni i propozuar i zhurmës përmirësoi robustësinë për gabimet e parashikimit të gjatësisë, veçanërisht brenda madhësisë së dritares.', 'am': 'የኔural machine ትርጉም ብዙ ጊዜ ከታች-ትርጉም ጉዳይ የተደረገ የውጤት ምርጫው ርዝመት ምክንያት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የረጅም አዋቂው የቆይታ ክፍል (PE) በመጠቀም የረጅም ግንኙነት አካባቢዎችን ለመግጠም የመረጃ አካሄድ መግለጫ እናስባለን፡፡ ርዝመት በክስተት ግንኙነት ላይ ግንኙነት የሚያሳርፍ ትርጓሜ እየረዝመኛ ግንኙነት ከግንኙነት ጀምሮ፣ በተስተማሪው ዘመን በPE ውስጥ ድምፅ ውስጥ በተለየ መስኮት መጠን ውስጥ ድምፅ እናጨምርበታለን፡፡ In the inference step, we predict the output lengths using input sequences and a BERT-based length prediction model.  የASPEC እንግሊዘኛ-ወደ ጃፓን ትርጓሜ ውጤቶች በBLEU 3.22 Point ውስጥ የተፈጸመ ተርጓሚዎችን በረጅም ግንኙነት እና የዋና ትርጓሜዎችን ማሳየት ነው፡፡ የጥያቄ ትርጉም ፍሬቶች የረጅም ትንቢት ሞዴል በመጠቀም ለርዝመት ግንኙነት ይሻላል፡፡ የድምፅ ድምፅ ጉዳይ የረጅም ትንቢት ስህተት፣ ይልቁንም በመስኮቱ መጠን ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': "Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը հաճախ տառապում է թերթարգմանության խնդիր, քանի որ այն սահմանափակ մոդելավորում է արտադրման հաջորդականության երկարությունը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոտեցում տրանսֆորմային մոդելի ուսումնասիրելու համար, օգտագործելով երկարության սահմանափակումներ' հիմնված երկարությամբ գիտակցած դիրքի կոդավորման վրա: Քանի որ երկարության սահմանափակումները նպատակային նախադասության ճշգրիտ երկարությամբ դեգրավորում են թարգմանման արդյունքը, մենք ավելացնում ենք պատուհանի որոշակի չափի մեջ պատուհանի մեջ պատուհանի երկարության սահմանափակումների Եզրակացության քայլում մենք կանխատեսում ենք արտադրության երկարությունը օգտագործելով ներդրման հաջորդականություններ և BER-ի հիմնված երկարության կանխատեսման մոդել: Անգլերեն-ճապոներեն թարգմանման ASPeC-ի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը ստեղծեց թարգմանություններ, որոնք մոտ են հաղորդակցման երկարությամբ, և արեց վանիլա թարֆորմերը (հատկապես կարճ նախադասություններում) 3.22 Միջին թարգմանման արդյունքները, օգտագործելով մեր երկարության կանխատեսման մոդելը, նաև ավելի լավ էին, քան մեկ այլ հիմնական մեթոդը, օգտագործելով մուտքի երկարությունը երկարության սահմանափակումների համար: Առաջարկված աղմուկի ներարկումը բարելավեց երկարության կանխատեսման սխալների կայունությունը, հատկապես պատուհանի չափսի մեջ:", 'az': "Nöral Makina Çeviri sıxıntısı sıxıntılı çıxış seçmə uzunluğunun modellenməsinə görə çox sıxıntılı bir dəyişiklik problemindən başa düşər. Bu işdə, uzunluğu bilən pozisyonal kodlama (PE) vasitəsilə uzaq müəyyənləşdirilməsi ilə Transformer modelini təhsil etmək üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik. Ölçüdə həqiqətən məqsəd cümlələrinin uzunluğunu dəyişdirməkdən sonra, təhsil sırasında PE'nin uzunluğu müəyyənləşdirilməsinə görə bəzi pəncərə böyüklüyündə rastgele səs eklərik. İnfəqiyat adımda, girdi seçmələri və BERT tabanlı uzunluğu tədbir modeli vasitəsilə çıxış uzunluğunu təmin edirik. ASPEC İngilizə-Japonca çevirindəki təcrübə sonuçlarında təcrübə edilən metodların təcrübəsini göstərdi, təcrübələrin yanında uzunluğu ilə təcrübə edir və vanilla Transformer (xüsusilə qısa cümlələrdə) BLEU 3.22 noktalarına istifadə etdi. Uğurluğumuz tədbir modelini istifadə edən ortalama çevirin sonuçları uzunluğu müəyyənləşdirilməsi üçün giriş uzunluğunu istifadə edən başqa bir baseline metodumdan daha yaxşı idi. Təsdiq edilmiş səs injeksiyonu uzunluğu tədbir xətalarına görə güclüyü artırdı, özellikle pəncərə böyüklüyünün içində.", 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ প্রায়শই আউটপুটের সীমিত পর্যায়ের দীর্ঘদিনের কারণে অনুবাদের সমস্যা থেকে কষ্ট পায়। এই কাজে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করছি একটি ট্রান্সফার মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য যাতে দীর্ঘ ব্যবস্থা ব্যবহার করে দীর্ঘ পরিচিত অবস্থা যেহেতু সঠিক লক্ষ্যের বাক্যের দীর্ঘ দীর্ঘ পরিমাণ অনুবাদের অনুষ্ঠানের প্রদর্শনের সাথে দীর্ঘদিন নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে, আমরা প্রশিক্ষণের সময়ে পিএপ ইনপুট সেকেন্স ব্যবহার করে আউটপুটের দীর্ঘদিন এবং বিএরটি-ভিত্তিক দীর্ঘ ভবিষ্যৎবাণী মডেল ব্যবহার করে আমরা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণ প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করেছে যেখানে রেফারেন্সের কাছাকাছি দীর্ঘদিনের অনুবাদ তৈরি করা হয়েছে এবং বিলিউ-এ একটি ভানিলা ট্রান্সফার্নার (বিশেষ করে স্বল্প ক আমাদের দীর্ঘ ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী মডেল ব্যবহার করে সাধারণত অনুবাদের ফলাফল অন্যান্য বেসালাইন পদ্ধতির চেয়ে ভালো ছিল, দীর্ঘ সীমা প্রস্তাবিত শব্দ ইনজেকশন দীর্ঘ ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ভুলের জন্য রাস্তা উন্নত করেছে, বিশেষ করে উইন্ডোর আকারের মধ্যে।', 'ca': "La traducció de màquines neuronals sovint pateix un problema de baixa traducció degut a la seva limitada modelació de llargues de seqüència de sortida. En aquesta feina, proposem un nou enfocament per a formar un model Transformer utilitzant restriccions de longitud basades en codificació posicional conscient de la longitud (PE). Com que les restriccions de longitud amb les llargues exactes de frases alvo degraden el rendiment de traducció, afegim soroll aleatòri dins una determinada mida de finestra a les restriccions de longitud del PE durant l'entrenament. En la etapa de inferència, predim les llargues de sortida utilitzant seqüències d'entrada i un model de predicció basat en BERT. Els resultats experimentals d'una traducció ASPEC anglès-japonès van mostrar que el mètode proposat va produir traduccions amb llargues properes a les de referència i va superar una vanilla Transformer (especialment en frases curtes) en 3,22 punts a BLEU. Els resultats mitjans de traducció utilitzant el nostre model de predicció de la longitud també eren millors que un altre mètode de base utilitzant les longituds d'entrada per les restriccions de la longitud. La injecció de soroll proposada va millorar la robustet dels errors de predicció de la llargada, especialment dins la mida de la finestra.", 'bs': 'Neuralno prevodenje mašine često pati od problema s nepotrebnim prevodom zbog ograničenog modela dužine izlazne sekvence. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi pristup obuci model a transformera koristeći ograničenja dužine na temelju lokalnog kodiranja dužine. Pošto dužin a ograničena sa to čnom duljinom ciljne rečenice smanjuje učinkovitost prevođenja, dodamo slučajnu buku unutar određene veličine prozora na dužine ograničenja PE tijekom treninga. U koraku infekcije, predviđamo dužinu izlaganja koristeći ulazne sekvence i model predviđanja dužine na BERT-u. Eksperimentalni rezultati ASPEC-a-japanskog prevoda pokazali su predloženi metod proizvođenog prevoda sa dužinom blizu referentnih i iznosili vanilnog transformera (posebno u kratkim rečenicama) za 3,22 bodova u BLEU-u. Prosječni rezultati prevoda koristeći naš model predviđanja dužine također su bili bolji od druge početne metode koristeći dužine ulaska za ograničenje dužine. Predložena injekcija buke poboljšala je snažnost za pogreške predviđanja dužine, posebno unutar veličine prozora.', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad často trpí problémem s nedostatkem překladu kvůli omezenému modelování délek výstupních sekvencí. V této práci navrhujeme nový přístup k tréninku transformátorového modelu s využitím délkových omezení založených na délkovém pozičním kódování (PE). Vzhledem k tomu, že délková omezení s přesnými délkami cílových vět snižují výkon překladu, přidáváme náhodný šum v rámci určité velikosti okna k omezení délky v PE během tréninku. V inferenčním kroku předpovídáme délky výstupu pomocí vstupních sekvencí a modelu predikce délky založeného na BERT. Experimentální výsledky v ASPEC anglicko-japonském překladu ukázaly, že navrhovaná metoda vytvořila překlady s délkami blízkými referenčním a předčila vanilkový transformátor (zejména v krátkých větách) o 3,22 body v BLEU. Průměrné výsledky překladu pomocí našeho modelu predikce délky byly také lepší než jiná základní metoda využívající vstupní délky pro omezení délky. Navržené vstřikování hluku zlepšilo robustnost pro chyby predikce délky, zejména v rámci velikosti okna.', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge kannatab sageli alatõlkeprobleemi, kuna väljundsjärjestuse pikkuste modelleerimine on piiratud. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse lähenemisviisi Transformeri mudeli koolitamisele, kasutades pikkusega piiranguid, mis põhinevad pikkusteadlikul positsioonikoodeerimisel (PE). Kuna täpse sihtlausepikkusega pikkuspiirangud halvendavad tõlkimisjõudlust, lisame treeningu ajal PE pikkuspiirangutele juhusliku müra teatud akna suuruses. Järeldusetapis prognoosime väljundpikkusi sisendjärjestuste ja BERT-põhise pikkuse prognoosimise mudeli abil. ASPEC inglise-jaapani tõlke eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitasid, et kavandatud meetod tootis tõlkeid, mille pikkused olid lähedased võrdlusväärtustele ja saavutas BLEU-s vaniljetransformaatori (eriti lühikeste lausete puhul) 3,22 punkti võrra. Meie pikkuse prognoosimise mudeli keskmised tõmbetulemused olid samuti paremad kui mõni teine algmeetod, kus kasutati pikkuse piirangute sisendipikkust. Kavandatud mürapiske parandas pikkuse prognoosimise vigade vastupidavust, eriti akna suuruses.', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös kärsii usein alikäännösongelmasta johtuen sen rajallisesta tulossekvenssin pituuksien mallintamisesta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uudenlaista lähestymistapaa muuntajamallin kouluttamiseen käyttäen pituusrajoituksia, jotka perustuvat pituustiedolliseen paikannuskoodaukseen (PE). Koska pituusrajoitukset tarkalla kohdelauseen pituudella heikentävät käännöksen suorituskykyä, lisäämme satunnaista kohinaa tietyssä ikkunassa PE:n pituusrajoituksiin harjoituksen aikana. Päätelmävaiheessa ennustetaan lähtöpituudet tulosekvenssien ja BERT-pohjaisen pituuden ennustusmallin avulla. ASPEC:n englannin-japanin käännöksen kokeelliset tulokset osoittivat, että ehdotettu menetelmä tuotti käännöksiä, joiden pituus oli lähellä referenssiä ja suoritti vaniljanmuuntajan (erityisesti lyhyissä lauseissa) 3,22 pisteellä BLEU:ssa. Keskimääräiset käännöstulokset pituudenennustusmallillamme olivat myös parempia kuin toisella perusmenetelmällä, jossa käytettiin syöttöpituuksia pituusrajoituksiin. Ehdotettu meluruiskutus paransi pituuden ennustusvirheiden kestävyyttä erityisesti ikkunan sisällä.', 'sk': 'Nevralni strojni prevod pogosto trpi zaradi omejenega modeliranja dolžin izhodnega zaporedja. V tem delu predlagamo nov pristop k usposabljanju transformatorskega modela z uporabo dolžinskih omejitev, ki temeljijo na dolžinskem označevanju (PE). Ker dolžinske omejitve z natančnimi ciljnimi dolžinami stavka zmanjšujejo učinkovitost prevajanja, dodamo naključen hrup znotraj določene velikosti oken omejitvam dolžine v PE med vadbo. V sklepnem koraku napovedujemo dolžine izhoda z uporabo vhodnih sekvenc in BERT-ovega modela napovedi dolžine. Eksperimentalni rezultati ASPEC angleško-japonskega prevoda so pokazali, da je predlagana metoda ustvarila prevode z dolžino blizu referenčnih in da je v BLEU dosegla 3,22 točke večjo od vanilijevega transformatorja (zlasti v kratkih stavkih). Povprečni rezultati prevajanja z uporabo našega modela napovedi dolžine so bili tudi boljši od druge osnovne metode z uporabo vhodnih dolžin za dolžinske omejitve. Predlagano vbrizgavanje hrupa je izboljšalo robustnost napak pri napovedovanju dolžine, zlasti znotraj velikosti oken.', 'jv': 'Ngucap Jejaring Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita unêgawe balêr kuwi nganggep kuwi model Transformer kuwi nggawe nguasai tanggal sing bisa bantêr dumadhi kanggo nguasai Where politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Where\'s the input Refirment string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe luwih akeh gawe nggawe gerakan kanggo njujuran gambaran, supaya wong kuwi nggawe cendelo.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཚིག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འབྲི་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྒྱུན་ཆས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གནད་དོན Since length constraints with exact target sentence lengths degrade translation performance, we add random noise in a certain window size to the length constraints in the PE during the training. In the inference step, we predict the output length using input sequences and a BERT-based length prediction model. Experimental results in an ASPEC English-to-Japanese translation resulted in a proposed method produced by the proposed translation with lengths close to the reference ones and outperformed a vanilla Transformer (especially in short sentences) by 3.22 points in BLEU.[2] The average translation results using our length prediction model are also better than another baseline method using input lengths for the length constraints. གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲ་སྐད་ཀྱིས་རིང་པོའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལ་སྐྱེན་ཚད་དཔག་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད།', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Daga wannan aikin, Munã buƙata wani hanyoyi wa yin amfani da misãlin Transformer, ana yi amfani da tsaro baka kodi-zane-zane (PA). Dõmin ana ƙudura tsawo da tsarin sigar maganar da aka ƙayyade haske, za'a ƙara sauri cikin girmar taga na ƙayyade durowa cikin shirin da ke cikin shirin. Daga ƙõnuwa na kasa, muna ƙayyade tsawo da ke amfani da matsayin ayuka da misãlin bayani na BERT-based. @ label The average translation results using our length prediction model were also better than another baseline method using input lengths for the length constraints.  Yinin da aka goyyade wa sauri ya improve surori wa kuskure wa kunnuwa tsawo, haske da cikin girmar taga.", 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים גישה חדשה לאימון מודל טרנספורטר בשימוש חוסרי אורך מבוססים על קוד מקומי מודע לאורך (PE). מאחר שמגבלות אורך עם אורך משפט מטרה מדויקת משפילות את ביצועי התרגום, אנחנו מוסיפים רעש אקראי בתוך גודל חלון מסוים למגבלות אורך במהלך האימון. בשלב ההנחה, אנו חוזים את אורך ההוצאה באמצעות רצפי הכניסה ומודל צפוי אורך מבוסס על BERT. תוצאות ניסיוניות בתרגום ASPEC אנגלי-ליפני הראו שהשיטה המוצעת מייצרה תרגומות עם ארוכות קרובות לאותם התייחסות והוצאה מעבר לנילה Transformer (במיוחד במשפטים קצרים) ב-3.22 נקודות ב BLEU. The average translation results using our length prediction model were also better than another baseline method using input lengths for the length constraints.  הזריקת הרעש המוצעת השתפרה את החזקה לטעויות צפייה לאורך, במיוחד בתוך גודל החלון.'}
{'en': 'Deep Inside-outside Recursive Autoencoder with All-span Objective', 'ar': 'تشفير تلقائي متكرر عميق من الداخل إلى الخارج مع هدف شامل', 'fr': 'Autoencodeur récursif intérieur-extérieur profond avec objectif à portée intégrale', 'pt': 'Autoencoder recursivo de dentro para fora com objetivo de amplitude total', 'es': 'Autoencoder recursivo profundo interior-exterior con objetivo de todos los tramos', 'ja': 'オールスパンの目的を持つ深い内側と外側の再帰的オートエンコーダ', 'zh': '有全跨度之深内-外递归自编码器', 'hi': 'सभी अवधि उद्देश्य के साथ गहरी अंदर-बाहर पुनरावर्ती Autoencoder', 'ru': 'Глубокий рекурсивный автокодер изнутри и снаружи с объективом для всех диапазонов', 'ga': 'Uath-ionchódóir Athchúrsach Deep Inside-Lasmuigh le Cuspóir Uile-réise', 'hu': 'Mélyen belül-kívül rekurzív automatikus kódoló minden távolságra kiterjedő objektívvel', 'el': 'Βαθύ εσωτερικό-εξωτερικό ανακλαστικό αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή με στόχο όλου του διαστήματος', 'it': 'Autoencoder ricorsivo profondo interno-esterno con obiettivo all-span', 'kk': 'Бүкіл кеңістік нысанның ішіндегі қайталау автокодері', 'lt': 'Giliai išorinis rekursyvus automatinis koduotojas su visapusišku tikslu', 'ka': 'ყველა განსაზღვრებული საშუალო რეკურსიური ავტოკოდერი', 'mk': 'Длабок внатрешен рекурсивен автокодер со цел на цел', 'ml': 'എല്ലാ സ്പേന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ടു് ആഴത്തില്\u200d- പുറത്തു് പുറത്തു് നില്\u200dക്കുക', 'ms': 'Autopengekod Rekursif Dalam-Luar Dalam Dalam Dengan Objektif Semua-jangkauan', 'mt': 'Awtokodifikatur Rikorsiv Profond ta’ ġewwa barra b’Objettiv tal-firxa Kollha', 'mn': 'Дотор дотор дахин дахин дахин автоматикийн коддогч бүх хэмжээний объектэй', 'pl': 'Głęboko wewnątrz-zewnętrzny Rekursywny Autokoder z obiektem całego rozpięcia', 'ro': 'Autoencoder recursiv adânc interior-exterior cu obiectiv universal', 'no': 'Djup inne- utenfor rekursiv automatisk koding med alt- breidde objekt', 'sr': 'Duboko unutrašnjost rekursivnog autokodera sa objektivom', 'so': 'Deg-deep-outside Recursive Autoencoder with all-span Objective', 'sv': 'Rekursiv autokodare med allspannmål', 'si': 'සියළු ස්ථානය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය ස්වයංකේතකය', 'ta': 'அனைத்து ஸ்பான் பொருளுடன் உள்ளிருந்து திரும்ப தானியங்கி குறியீடு', 'ur': 'داخل بیرون کے دوبارہ دوبارہ دوبارہ دوبارہ دوبارہ اکنوڈر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tái mã hóa đường nội bộ sâu bên trong với mục tiêu All-span', 'bg': 'Дълбоко вътре- външен рекурсивен автокодер с цел за всички обхвати', 'hr': 'Duboko unutrašnjost rekursivnog autokodera s objektivom svih razina', 'nl': 'Diep binnen-buiten recursieve autoencoder met All-span Objective', 'da': 'Deep Inside-Outside Recursive Autoencoder med All-span Objective', 'de': 'Deep Inside-Outside Rekursiver Autoencoder mit All-Span Objektiv', 'fa': 'عمیق در داخل بیرون رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار دوباره\u200cای با موضوع تمام طول', 'id': 'Autokoder Recursif Dalam Dalam-luar dengan Objektif Seluruh Lebar', 'ko': '전량정 목표를 가진 내외 귀속 자동 인코더', 'sw': 'Autoencoder with All-span Objects', 'af': 'Deep binne- buite rekursief Outokoder met Alle- span Objekte', 'sq': 'Autokoduesi i thellë brenda-jashtë rekursiv me Objektiv të Gjithësisë', 'tr': 'Daşarky hatda Rekursiv Otomatik Ködler', 'am': 'Autocode with All- Span Objects', 'hy': 'Ջուր ներսից արտաքին ռեսուրսիվ ինքնակոդեր՝ ամբողջ տարածության օբյեկտիվ', 'az': 'D톛rzind톛 s톛viyy톛tli D톛rzind톛 Rekursiv Avtomatik Kodlay캼c캼', 'bn': 'পুনরুদ্ধারিত স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অন্তর্ভুক্ত বস্তুর সাথে', 'bs': 'Duboko unutrašnjost rekursivnog autokodera sa svim objektivima', 'ca': "Autocodificador recursiv profund dins i fora amb objectiu d'ampliació", 'et': 'Sügav sisemine-väljaspool rekursiivne automaatkodeerija kõigi ulatustega eesmärgiga', 'cs': 'Hluboký uvnitř-vnější rekurzivní autokodér s celospěťovým objektivem', 'fi': 'Deep Inside-outside rekursiivinen automaattinen koodaus, jossa on all-span Objective', 'jv': 'deep', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Globoko znotraj-zunaj rekurzivni samokodirnik s ciljem vseh razponov', 'bo': 'ཁྱད་མའི་ནང་འཁོར་ནས་བསྡུས་པའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཚོན་རྟགས་འདྲ་བ', 'he': 'קודד אוטומטי חיצוני עמוק עם אובייקטיב'}
{'en': 'Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) is a neural-based model designed for unsupervised constituency parsing. During its forward computation, it provides phrase and contextual representations for all spans in the input sentence. By utilizing the contextual representation of each leaf-level span, the span of length 1, to reconstruct the word inside the span, the model is trained without labeled data. In this work, we extend the training objective of DIORA by making use of all spans instead of only leaf-level spans. We test our new training objective on datasets of two languages : English and Japanese, and empirically show that our method achieves improvement in parsing accuracy over the original DIORA.', 'ar': 'المشفر التلقائي العودي العميق من الداخل إلى الخارج (DIORA) هو نموذج قائم على العصبية مصمم لتحليل الدوائر الانتخابية غير الخاضعة للإشراف. أثناء الحساب إلى الأمام ، فإنه يوفر عبارة وتمثيلات سياقية لجميع الامتدادات في جملة الإدخال. من خلال استخدام التمثيل السياقي لكل امتداد على مستوى الورقة ، وامتداد الطول 1 ، لإعادة بناء الكلمة داخل النطاق ، يتم تدريب النموذج بدون بيانات معنونة. في هذا العمل ، نوسع هدف التدريب لـ DIORA من خلال الاستفادة من جميع الامتدادات بدلاً من الامتدادات على مستوى الأوراق فقط. نحن نختبر هدفنا التدريبي الجديد على مجموعات بيانات من لغتين: الإنجليزية واليابانية ، ونبين بشكل تجريبي أن طريقتنا تحقق تحسينًا في دقة التحليل على DIORA الأصلي.', 'fr': "L'autoencodeur récursif interne et extérieur profond (DIORA) est un modèle basé sur les neurones conçu pour l'analyse non supervisée des circonscriptions. Au cours de son calcul avant, il fournit des représentations de phrases et contextuelles pour toutes les plages de la phrase d'entrée. En utilisant la représentation contextuelle de chaque plage de niveau feuille, la plage de longueur 1, pour reconstruire le mot à l'intérieur de la plage, le modèle est entraîné sans données étiquetées. Dans ce travail, nous élargissons l'objectif de formation de DIORA en utilisant toutes les portées au lieu des seules portées au niveau feuille. Nous testons notre nouvel objectif de formation sur des ensembles de données en deux langues\xa0: l'anglais et le japonais, et montrons empiriquement que notre méthode améliore la précision de l'analyse par rapport au DIORA original.", 'pt': 'Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) é um modelo baseado em neural projetado para análise de eleitorado não supervisionado. Durante sua computação direta, ele fornece frases e representações contextuais para todos os intervalos na sentença de entrada. Ao utilizar a representação contextual de cada intervalo de nível de folha, o intervalo de comprimento 1, para reconstruir a palavra dentro do intervalo, o modelo é treinado sem dados rotulados. Neste trabalho, estendemos o objetivo de treinamento do DIORA fazendo uso de todos os vãos em vez de apenas vãos no nível da folha. Testamos nosso novo objetivo de treinamento em conjuntos de dados de dois idiomas: inglês e japonês, e mostramos empiricamente que nosso método alcança uma melhoria na precisão da análise em relação ao DIORA original.', 'es': 'El autocodificador recursivo profundo de adentro hacia afuera (DIORA) es un modelo basado en neuronas diseñado para el análisis de unidades constitutivas sin supervisión. Durante su cálculo hacia adelante, proporciona representaciones de frases y contextuales para todos los intervalos de la oración de entrada. Al utilizar la representación contextual de cada extensión a nivel de hoja, el lapso de longitud 1, para reconstruir la palabra dentro del lapso, el modelo se entrena sin datos etiquetados. En este trabajo, ampliamos el objetivo de entrenamiento de DIORA haciendo uso de todos los tramos en lugar de solo los tramos a nivel de hoja. Probamos nuestro nuevo objetivo de entrenamiento en conjuntos de datos de dos idiomas: inglés y japonés, y demostramos empíricamente que nuestro método mejora la precisión del análisis con respecto al DIORA original.', 'ja': 'Deep inside - outside recursive autoencoder （ DIORA ）は、無監督の選挙区構文解析のために設計されたニューラルベースのモデルです。フォワード計算中に、入力文のすべてのスパンのフレーズおよびコンテキスト表現を提供します。各リーフレベルのスパンの文脈表現、すなわち長さ１のスパンを利用して、スパン内の単語を再構築することによって、モデルは、ラベル付けされたデータなしでトレーニングされる。この作業では、リーフレベルのスパンのみではなく、すべてのスパンを利用して、DIORAのトレーニング目標を拡張します。私たちは、英語と日本語の2つの言語のデータセットで新しいトレーニング目標をテストし、経験的に、私たちの方法が元のDIORAよりも解析精度を向上させることを示します。', 'zh': '深层内-外递归自编码器 (DIORA) 者,神经之形也,专为无监解析而设之。 前计之间,为句中跨度给短语上下文。 用叶级跨度(为 1 跨度)者上下文重建跨度单词,可以无表数。 吾因跨度而非仅叶级跨度以广 DIORA 之教也。 试我新训集上英语与日语证之,比之始DIORA,吾道有所提高于解析准确性。', 'hi': 'गहरे अंदर-बाहर पुनरावर्ती ऑटोएंकोडर (DIORA) एक तंत्रिका-आधारित मॉडल है जिसे असुरक्षित निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सिंग के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। अपनी आगे की गणना के दौरान, यह इनपुट वाक्य में सभी स्पैन के लिए वाक्यांश और प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व प्रदान करता है। प्रत्येक पत्ती-स्तर की अवधि के प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके, लंबाई 1 की अवधि, अवधि के अंदर शब्द का पुनर्निर्माण करने के लिए, मॉडल को लेबल किए गए डेटा के बिना प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। इस काम में, हम केवल पत्ती-स्तर के स्पैन के बजाय सभी स्पैन का उपयोग करके DIORA के प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य का विस्तार करते हैं। हम दो भाषाओं के डेटासेट पर अपने नए प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य का परीक्षण करते हैं: अंग्रेजी और जापानी, और अनुभवजन्य रूप से दिखाते हैं कि हमारी विधि मूल DIORA पर पार्सिंग सटीकता में सुधार प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'Глубоко внутри-внешний рекурсивный автокодер (DIORA) - это нейронная модель, предназначенная для неконтролируемого анализа избирательных округов. Во время прямого вычисления он предоставляет фразеологические и контекстные представления для всех диапазонов во входном предложении. Используя контекстное представление каждого диапазона уровня лепестка, диапазона длины 1, для восстановления слова внутри диапазона, модель обучается без помеченных данных. В этой работе мы расширяем цель обучения DIORA, используя все пролеты, а не только пролеты на уровне листьев. Мы тестируем нашу новую учебную цель на наборах данных двух языков: английском и японском, и эмпирически показываем, что наш метод достигает улучшения в точности синтаксического анализа по сравнению с оригинальным DIORA.', 'ga': 'Is samhail néar-bhunaithe é uath-ionchódóir athfhillteach domhain laistigh den taobh amuigh (DIORA) atá deartha le haghaidh parsáil toghlaigh gan mhaoirseacht. Le linn a réamhríomh, cuireann sé léirithe frásaí agus comhthéacsúla ar fáil do gach réimse san abairt ionchuir. Trí úsáid a bhaint as léiriú comhthéacsúil gach réise leibhéal duille, an réimse fad 1, chun an focal laistigh den réise a athchruthú, cuirtear oiliúint ar an tsamhail gan sonraí lipéadaithe. San obair seo, leathnóimid cuspóir oiliúna DIORA trí úsáid a bhaint as gach réise seachas raonta leibhéal na nduilleog amháin. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár gcuspóir oiliúna nua ar thacair sonraí dhá theanga: Béarla agus Seapáinis, agus léirímid go heimpíreach go mbaineann ár modh feabhas amach ar chruinneas parsála thar an mbun-DIORA.', 'ka': 'ეთორა (DIORA) არის ნეიროლური დაბათებული მოდელი, რომელიც არ განსხვავებული კონსტუტენტის პარალიზაციისთვის განაზღვრებულია. სამუშაო კომპუტექტურაციის განმავლობაში, სამუშაო ფრაზი და კონტექსტური გამოსახულებების განმავლობაში ყველა განმავლობაში. ყველა ქვეშის განზომილების კონტექსტური გამოყენება, 1-ის განზომილების განზომილება, სიტყვის განზომილების შემდეგ განზომილება, მოდელის განზომილება არაფერი მონაცემები. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ DIORA-ის განსწავლების მიზეზი გავაზრუნეთ ყველა განსწავლების გამოყენებით, მხოლოდ ლურის განსწავლების მცდად. ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ჩვენი ახალი განსწავლების მიზეზი ორი ენების მონაცემების შესახებ: ანგლისური და იაპონური, და ემპერიკურად ჩვენი მეთოდი დავიწყებთ, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო', 'hu': 'A Deep inside-outside rekurzív autoencoder (DIORA) egy neurális alapú modell, amelyet felügyelet nélküli választókerületi elemzésre terveztek. Az előrehaladott számítás során kifejezéseket és kontextuális ábrázolásokat biztosít a beviteli mondat összes tartományára. Az egyes levélszintű tartományok kontextuális ábrázolásával, az 1-es hosszúságú tartomány felhasználásával rekonstruáljuk a szót a tartományban, a modell címkézett adatok nélkül készül. Ebben a munkában kibővítjük a DIORA képzési célkitűzését azzal, hogy minden feszültséget használunk a levélszintű feszültségek helyett. Új képzési célkitűzésünket két nyelvű adatkészleten teszteljük: angol és japán, és empirikusan megmutatjuk, hogy módszerünk javítja az elemzési pontosságot az eredeti DIORA-val szemben.', 'el': 'Ο αναδρομικός αυτόματος κωδικοποιητής βαθιά μέσα-έξω (DIORA) είναι ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο σχεδιασμένο για ανάλυση χωρίς επίβλεψη εκλογικών περιφερειών. Κατά τον υπολογισμό προς τα εμπρός, παρέχει φράσεις και περιγραφικές αναπαραστάσεις για όλες τις περιοχές της πρότασης εισαγωγής. Με τη χρήση της περιεκτικής αναπαράστασης κάθε έκτασης φύλλου-επιπέδου, της έκτασης μήκους 1, για την ανακατασκευή της λέξης μέσα στο εύρος, το μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται χωρίς επισημασμένα δεδομένα. Στην εργασία αυτή, επεκτείνουμε τον εκπαιδευτικό στόχο του ΔΙΟΡΑ κάνοντας χρήση όλων των διαστάσεων αντί μόνο των διαστάσεων σε επίπεδο φύλλων. Δοκιμάζουμε το νέο εκπαιδευτικό μας στόχο σε σύνολα δεδομένων δύο γλωσσών: αγγλικά και ιαπωνικά, και εμπειρικά αποδεικνύουμε ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει βελτίωση στην ακρίβεια ανάλυσης έναντι του αρχικού DIORA.', 'it': "Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) è un modello basato su neurali progettato per l'analisi delle circoscrizioni non supervisionate. Durante il calcolo in avanti, fornisce rappresentazioni di frase e contestuali per tutti gli intervalli nella frase di input. Utilizzando la rappresentazione contestuale di ogni span a livello di foglia, la span di lunghezza 1, per ricostruire la parola all'interno della span, il modello viene addestrato senza dati etichettati. In questo lavoro, estendiamo l'obiettivo formativo di DIORA utilizzando tutte le campate anziché solo campate a livello delle foglie. Testiamo il nostro nuovo obiettivo formativo su set di dati di due lingue: inglese e giapponese, e mostriamo empiricamente che il nostro metodo raggiunge un miglioramento nella precisione di analisi rispetto al DIORA originale.", 'kk': 'ДИОРА деген сыртқы қайталанатын автокодер (қайталанатын сыртқы түпнұсқасы) деген невралдық негізделген үлгісі. Бұл қайталанбаған тұрақты талдау үшін құрылған. Алдыңғы есептеу кезінде, ол келтірілген сөздің барлық аралықтар мен тәуелсіздік көрсетілетін сөздерін көрсетеді. Әрбір парақ деңгейіндегі ұзындығын қайта құру үшін, 1- ші ұзындығын көрсету үшін, үлгі жарлық деректері жоқ оқылған. Бұл жұмыстың орнына, DIORA бақылау мақсатын тек сызық деңгейінің орнына барлық меңзерлерді қолдануға арналады. Біз жаңа оқыту мақсатымызды екі тілдің деректер жиынында тексереміз: ағылшын және япон тілдері, және әдімгіміздің тәртібіміздің бастапқы DIORA- дан дұрыстығын талдау үшін жа', 'lt': 'Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) is a neural-based model designed for unsupervised constituency parsing.  Atliekant išankstinį skaičiavimą, jame pateikiamos frazės ir kontekstinės nuorodos visoms įvadiniame sakinyje esančioms sritims. Naudojant kontekstinį kiekvieno lapo lygio intervalo, 1 ilgio intervalo, atstatymą žodžiui intervalo viduje, model is mokomas be ženklintų duomenų. In this work, we extend the training objective of DIORA by making use of all spans instead of only leaf-level spans.  Bandome savo naują mokymo tikslą dviejų kalbų duomenų rinkiniuose: anglų ir japonų kalbomis, ir empiriškai parodysime, kad mūsų metodas padeda geriau analizuoti tikslumą, palyginti su originalia DIORA.', 'mk': 'Длабокиот внатрешен и надворешен рекурсивен автокодер (ДИОРА) е модел на неурална основа дизајниран за анализирање на ненадгледуваниот изборен округ. За време на својот напредок пресметок, тој обезбедува фрази и контекстни претставувања за сите граници во вводната реченица. Со искористување на контекстната претстава на секој број на листови, број на должина 1, за реконструкција на зборот во бројот на листови, моделот е трениран без означени податоци. Во оваа работа, ја прошируваме обуката на ДИОРА со користење на сите растојанија наместо само листови растојанија. Ние ја тестираме нашата нова обука за податоци на две јазици: англиски и јапонски, и емпирички покажуваме дека нашиот метод постигнува подобрување во анализирањето на точноста во однос на оригиналната ДИОРА.', 'ms': 'Autopengekod rekursif dalam-luar (DIORA) adalah model berasaskan saraf yang direka untuk penghuraian konstitusi tidak diawasi. Semasa pengiraan maju, ia menyediakan frasa dan perwakilan kontekstual untuk semua jangkauan dalam kalimat input. Dengan menggunakan perwakilan kontekstual bagi setiap jangkauan aras daun, jangkauan panjang 1, untuk membina semula perkataan di dalam jangkauan, model dilatih tanpa data labeled. Dalam kerja ini, kita memperluas tujuan latihan DIORA dengan menggunakan semua jangkauan selain daripada hanya jangkauan tahap daun. Kami menguji objektif latihan baru kami pada set data dua bahasa: Bahasa Inggeris dan Jepun, dan secara empirik menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami mencapai peningkatan dalam huraian ketepatan terhadap DIORA asal.', 'mt': 'L-awtokoder rikorrenti fil-fond ġewwa barra (DIORA) huwa mudell ibbażat fuq in-newrali ddisinjat għall-analiżi tal-kostitwenza mhux sorveljata. Matul il-komputazzjoni bil-quddiem tagħha, tipprovdi frażi u rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwali għall-firxiet kollha fis-sentenza input. Billi tintuża r-rappreżentanza kuntestwali ta’ kull firxa tal-livell tal-weraq, il-firxa tat-tul 1, biex tiġi rikostrutta l-kelma ġewwa l-firxa, il-mudell huwa mħarreġ mingħajr dejta ttikkettata. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna jestendu l-għan tat-taħriġ tad-DIORA billi nużaw il-firxiet kollha minflok il-firxiet biss tal-livell tal-weraq. Aħna ntestjaw l-objettiv ta’ taħriġ il-ġdid tagħna dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ żewġ lingwi: l-Ingliż u l-Ġappuniż, u empirikament juru li l-metodu tagħna jikseb titjib fl-analiżi tal-preċiżjoni fuq id-DIORA oriġinali.', 'mn': 'ДИОРА нь гаднаас дахин гүн дотор дахин давтагдсан автокодлогч (ДИОРА) нь мэдрэлийн үндсэн загвар юм. Өмнөх тооцоололтын үед энэ нь өгүүлбэр болон орчин үеийн бүх зайнуудыг харуулдаг. Асны хэмжээний өргөнийг ашиглаж, 1-р урт, өргөний дотор үгийг дахин бүтээх үед загвар нь маркингүй өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтыг ашиглаж байна. Энэ ажлын тулд бид ДИОРА-ын сургалтын зорилго нь зөвхөн арьс түвшин зайн оронд бүх зай ашиглаж байдаг. Бид хоёр хэлний өгөгдлийн сангийн шинэ сургалтын зорилго шалгаж, Англи, Япон, мөн бидний арга нь эхний ДИОРА дахь зөв тодорхойлолтыг хуваалцахын тулд сайжруулж чадна.', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള റിസ്കുരിസ്റ്റീവ് ഓട്ടോകോഡെര്\u200d (DIORA) സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത സംസ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിങ അതിന്റെ മുന്നോട്ടുള്ള കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അത് വാക്കുകളും പ്രതിനിധികളും നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാക്കിലെ  ഈ വാക്ക് സ്പാനിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ ലീഫ് നില സ്പാനിന്റെയും നീളം 1-ന്റെയും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡിയോറിയുടെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ സ്പേനുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ല നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം രണ്ടു ഭാഷകളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ജപ്പാനീസും നമ്മുടെ രീതി', 'no': 'Djupn inne i utgangspunktet rekursivt autokoding (DIORA) er ein neuralbasert modell som er utforma for ikkje-oppretta tilstand. Når det vert utrekna frå framtida, vert det oppgjeve frase og kontekstlege representasjonar for alle mellomrom i innsetjingsetninga. Ved å bruka den kontekstlege representasjonen av kvar breidde, breidda på lengda 1 for å gjenoppretta ordet i breidda, vert modellen trent utan merkelige data. I denne arbeiden utvidar vi opplæringsmålet av DIORA ved å bruka alle mellomrom i staden for berre mellomrom på blannnivå. Vi testar vårt ny opplæringsmål på datasett av to språk: engelsk og japansk, og empirisk viser at metoden vårt når det gjer forbetringa i tolkinga av nøyaktighet over den opprinnelige DIORA.', 'pl': 'Głęboko wewnątrz-zewnętrzny rekursywny autokoder (DIORA) to model oparty na neuronie przeznaczony do analizy okręgów wyborczych bez nadzoru. Podczas obliczeń do przodu dostarcza frazy i kontekstowych reprezentacji dla wszystkich zakresów zdania wejściowego. Wykorzystując kontekstową reprezentację każdego rozpięcia na poziomie liści, rozpięcia długości 1, aby zrekonstruować słowo wewnątrz rozpięcia, model jest trenowany bez etykietowanych danych. W niniejszej pracy rozszerzamy cel szkoleniowy DIORA poprzez wykorzystanie wszystkich rozpięć zamiast tylko rozpięć na poziomie liści. Testujemy nasz nowy cel szkoleniowy na zbiorach danych dwóch języków: angielskiego i japońskiego i empirycznie pokazujemy, że nasza metoda osiąga poprawę dokładności parsowania w porównaniu z oryginalną DIORA.', 'sr': 'Duboko iznutra rekursivni autokoder (DIORA) je neuralno baziran model dizajniran za neodređenu analizu konstitucija. Tokom svog naprednog računala, ona pruža frazu i kontekstualne predstave za sve prostore u rečenici za ulazak. Koristeći kontekstualnu predstavu svakog razdoblja nivoa liša, širokost dužine 1, kako bi rekonstruisao reč unutar razdoblja, model se obučava bez označenih podataka. U ovom poslu, proširimo cilj obuke DIORA koristeći sve prostore umjesto samo prostora nivoa lišća. Testiramo svoj novi cilj obuke na podacima dva jezika: engleski i japanski, i empirički pokazujemo da naš metod postiže poboljšanje u analizu tačnosti nad originalnom DIORA.', 'ro': 'Autoencoder recursiv profund interior-exterior (DIORA) este un model bazat pe neuroni conceput pentru analizarea circumscripției nesupravegheate. În timpul calculului său înainte, acesta oferă expresii și reprezentări contextuale pentru toate intervalele din propoziția de intrare. Utilizând reprezentarea contextuală a fiecărui interval de nivel al frunzei, intervalul de lungime 1, pentru a reconstrui cuvântul din interiorul intervalului, modelul este instruit fără date etichetate. În această lucrare, extindem obiectivul de formare al DIORA prin utilizarea tuturor intervalelor în loc de intervale de nivel al frunzelor. Testăm noul nostru obiectiv de formare pe seturi de date din două limbi: engleză și japoneză și demonstrăm empiric că metoda noastră obține o îmbunătățire a preciziei de analiză față de DIORA originală.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්වයංකේතකය (DIORA) ඇතුළේ ගොඩක් නිර්මාත්මක විශේෂණය නැති විශේෂණය සඳහා සැකසුම්  ඔහුගේ ඉස්සරහ ගණනාකරණය වෙලාවේ, ඔහුගේ ප්\u200dරවේශය සහ සංවේශය ප්\u200dරවේශය සඳහා සියළු ස්පේන්ස් වාක්ෂ හැම පැත්තක් ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපය ප්\u200dරතිරූපය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, 1 වැඩේ ස්ථානය, වචනය ඇතුලට ආපහු ස්ථාපනය කරන්න, මොඩ මේ වැඩේ අපි DIORA ගේ ප්\u200dරධානය අරමුණ වැඩ කරනවා හැම පැත්තක්ම පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි. අපි අපේ අළුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය අක්ෂේපයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා භාෂාව දෙකක් ගැන දත්ත සෙට් එක: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජාපානියානුවන්, සහ අ', 'so': "Qoraalka dib u soo celinta ee gudaha gudaha ah (DIORA) waa model neurada ah oo loo qoray baaritaanka aan la ilaalinayn. Inta lagu xisaabiyay horay, waxay ku fidiyaan hadal iyo macluumaad joogtada ah dhammaan maalmaha lagu qorayo. Isku isticmaalka muuqashada joogtada ah ee bannaanka darafka leh, cirka dhererka 1, si uu u cusboonaysiiyo ereyga gudaha spaniinka, modellka waxaa lagu baraa macluumaad la'aan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu ku fidinnaa maamulka waxbarashada ee DIORA, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa cimriga oo dhan, taas oo aan ka bedelanayn cimriga darafka oo kaliya. We test our new training objective on datasets of two languages: English and Japanese, and empirically show that our method achieves improvement in parsing accuracy over the original DIORA.", 'sv': 'Deep inside-outside rekursiv autoencoder (DIORA) är en neuralbaserad modell utformad för oövervakad valkretstolkning. Under sin framåtberäkning ger den fraser och kontextuella representationer för alla spännvidder i inmatningsfrasen. Genom att använda den kontextuella representationen av varje bladnivå spänn, spännvidden av längd 1, för att rekonstruera ordet inuti spännvidden, tränas modellen utan märkta data. I detta arbete utökar vi DIORA:s utbildningsmål genom att använda oss av alla spännvidder istället för bara bladnivåspännvidder. Vi testar vårt nya utbildningsmål på dataset av två språk: engelska och japanska, och empiriskt visar vi att vår metod uppnår en förbättring av tolkningsnoggrannheten jämfört med den ursprungliga DIORA.', 'ta': 'ஆழமாக உள்ளிருந்து திரும்ப தானியங்கி குறியீடு (DIORA) பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத கூட்டு பாடலுக்கான வடிவமைப்பு அதன் முன்னோக்கி கணக்கிடும் போது, அது உள்ளீட்டு வாக்கியத்தில் உள்ள அனைத்து நாடுகளுக்கும் சொற்றொடர் மற்றும் தற் ஒவ்வொரு லீஸ்- நிலை ஸ்பானின் தற்போதைய பங்கீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி ஸ்பான் உள்ள வார்த்தையை மீண்டும் உருவாக்க, மாதிரி குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் இல இந்த வேலையில், நாம் டியூராவின் பயிற்சியின் தலைப்பு பொருளை விரிவாக்குகிறோம் எல்லா ஸ்பேன்களையும் பயன்படுத நாம் எங்கள் புதிய பயிற்சி பொருளை இரண்டு மொழிகளின் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் சோதிக்கிறோம்: ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஜப்பானிய, மற்றும் முன்னி', 'ur': 'بیرون کے اندر دوبارہ دوبارہ دوبارہ دوبارہ اکنوڈر (DIORA) ایک نئورل-بنیادی موڈل ہے جو غیرقابل پارسینگ کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے. اس کے آگے محاسبات کے وقت، اس نے کلمہ اور متوسط نمایش کے لئے تمام فاصلے کے لئے اینپ جماعت میں پیش کرتا ہے. ہر پتے سطح کی منحصر کی تعریف کے ذریعہ، طول ۱ کی منحصر کے ذریعہ، کلمات کے درمیان دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کے لئے، مدل لابلی کے بغیر آموزش کی جاتی ہے. اس کام میں ہم DIORA کی آموزش موضوع کو پھیلاتے ہیں، صرف پھل سطح کے فضا کے بدلے تمام فضا استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم دو زبانوں کے ڈاٹ سٹوں پر ہماری نئی تدریس موضوع کی آزمائش کرتے ہیں: انگلیسی اور جاپانی، اور مضبوط طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ اصلی DIORA کے بارے میں سیدھی پردازی کے مطابق بہتر ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Tanlangan kompyuterning davomida, u kiritish imkoniyatining hamma spanlar uchun bir so'zlarni va davomida represent beradi. Ispanning ichida so'zni qayta oʻrnatish uchun, model lab boʻlmagan maʼlumot yoʻq. Bu ishda, biz DIORA'ning taʼminlovchi obʼektini hamma spanlar ishlatish uchun foydalanamiz. We test our new training objective on datasets of two languages: English and Japanese, and empirically show that our method achieves improvement in parsing accuracy over the original DIORA.", 'vi': 'Sâu bên trong, bộ tự động lưu động (DIORA) là một mô hình dựa vào thần kinh được thiết kế cho phân tích bầu cử không giám sát. Trong lúc tính trước, nó cung cấp các biểu hiện ngữ và ngữ cảnh cho tất cả các chi tiết trong câu nhập. Bằng cách vận dụng các mô tả ngữ cảnh của mỗi khoảng thời gian của lớp lá, khoảng cách của chiều dài 1, để phục hồi từ bên trong thời gian, mẫu được huấn luyện mà không có dữ liệu được dán nhãn. Trong công việc này, chúng ta mở rộng mục tiêu huấn luyện của DIORA bằng cách sử dụng tất cả khóa thay vì chỉ những lớp nhỏ trên lá. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm mục tiêu huấn luyện mới của chúng tôi về các bộ dữ liệu của hai ngôn ngữ: Anh ngữ và Nhật, và thực tế cho thấy rằng phương pháp của chúng tôi đạt được cải tiến độ chính xác hơn hơn hơn hơn hơn của DIORA ban đầu.', 'bg': 'Дълбоко вътре-външен рекурсивен автокодер (DIORA) е невронно-базиран модел, предназначен за неконтролирано анализиране на избирателните райони. По време на предварителното изчисление той предоставя фразови и контекстуални изображения за всички интервали във входното изречение. Чрез използване на контекстното представяне на всеки диапазон на нивото на листата, диапазона на дължина 1, за реконструкция на думата вътре в диапазона, моделът се обучава без етикетирани данни. В тази работа разширяваме тренировъчната цел на ДИОРА, като използваме всички интервали вместо само интервали на нивото на листата. Тестваме новата си цел за обучение на набори от данни на два езика: английски и японски и емпирично показваме, че методът ни постига подобрение в точността на анализирането спрямо оригиналната ДИОРА.', 'nl': 'Deep inside-outside recursieve autoencoder (DIORA) is een neuraal-gebaseerd model ontworpen voor onbeheerde parsing van kiesdistricten. Tijdens zijn voorwaartse berekening biedt het frase en contextuele representaties voor alle overspanningen in de invoerzin. Door gebruik te maken van de contextuele representatie van elke span op bladniveau, de span van lengte 1, om het woord binnen de span te reconstrueren, wordt het model getraind zonder gelabelde gegevens. In dit werk breiden we de trainingsdoelstelling van DIORA uit door gebruik te maken van alle overspanningen in plaats van alleen bladoverspanningen. We testen onze nieuwe trainingsdoelstelling op datasets van twee talen: Engels en Japans, en laten empirisch zien dat onze methode verbetert in het parsen nauwkeurigheid ten opzichte van de originele DIORA.', 'da': "Deep inside-outside rekursiv autoencoder (DIORA) er en neural-baseret model designet til uautoriseret valgkreds parsing. Under sin fremadgående beregning giver den sætning og kontekstuelle repræsentationer for alle spænder i input sætningen. Ved at bruge den kontekstuelle repræsentation af hvert bladniveau spænd, spændingen af længde 1, til at rekonstruere ordet inde i spændingen, trænes modellen uden mærkede data. I dette arbejde udvider vi DIORA's træningsmål ved at benytte alle spænder i stedet for kun bladniveau spænder. Vi tester vores nye træningsmål på datasæt af to sprog: engelsk og japansk, og empirisk viser vi, at vores metode opnår en forbedring i fortolkningsnøjagtigheden i forhold til den oprindelige DIORA.", 'hr': 'Duboko iznutra rekursivni autokoder (DIORA) je neuralno osnovan model dizajniran za neodređenu analizu konstitucija. Tijekom svog naprednog računala, predstavlja frazu i contextualne predstave za sve prostore u ulaznoj rečenici. Koristeći kontekstualnu predstavu svakog razdoblja nivoa listi, razdoblja dužine 1, kako bi rekonstruisao riječ unutar razdoblja, model se obučava bez označenih podataka. U ovom poslu, proširimo cilj obuke DIORA koristeći sve prostore umjesto samo prostora nivoa listi. Testiramo svoj novi cilj obuke na podacima dva jezika: engleski i japanski, i empirički pokazujemo da naš metod postigne poboljšanje razmatranja preciznosti nad originalnom DIORA.', 'de': 'DIORA (Deep Inside-Outside Rekursive Autoencoder) ist ein neuronales Modell, das für die unbeaufsichtigte Parsing von Wahlkreisen entwickelt wurde. Während seiner Vorwärtsberechnung liefert es Phrasen- und Kontextdarstellungen für alle Spannungen im Eingabesatz. Durch die Verwendung der kontextuellen Darstellung jeder Spanne auf Blattsebene, der Spanne der Länge 1, um das Wort innerhalb der Spanne zu rekonstruieren, wird das Modell ohne beschriftete Daten trainiert. In dieser Arbeit erweitern wir das Trainingsziel von DIORA, indem wir alle Spannweiten anstelle von nur blattförmigen Spannweiten nutzen. Wir testen unser neues Trainingsziel an Datensätzen zweier Sprachen: Englisch und Japanisch, und zeigen empirisch, dass unsere Methode eine Verbesserung der Parsing-Genauigkeit gegenüber dem ursprünglichen DIORA erreicht.', 'id': 'Autokoder rekursif dalam-luar (DIORA) adalah model berasasi saraf yang direncanakan untuk penganalisan konstitusi yang tidak diawasi. Selama komputasi maju, ia menyediakan frasa dan representation kontekstual untuk semua jangkauan dalam kalimat masukan. Dengan menggunakan representation kontekstual dari setiap jangkauan tingkat daun, jangkauan panjang 1, untuk rekonstruksi kata dalam jangkauan, model dilatih tanpa data labeled. In this work, we extend the training objective of DIORA by making use of all spans instead of only leaf-level spans.  Kami menguji tujuan latihan baru kami pada set data dari dua bahasa: Bahasa Inggris dan Jepang, dan secara empiris menunjukkan bahwa metode kami mencapai peningkatan dalam penghuraian akurasi atas DIORA asli.', 'ko': '내외 귀속 자동 인코더(DIORA)는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 모델로 무감독 선택 영역 분석에 사용된다.정방향 계산 과정에서, 이것은 문장의 모든 경계를 입력하기 위해 짧은 말과 상하문 표시를 제공한다.각 엽급의 경계(길이 1의 경계)의 상하문 표시를 이용하여 경계 내의 단어를 재구성하여 이 모델은 표기 데이터가 없는 상황에서 훈련한다.이 작업에서 우리는 DIORA의 훈련 목표를 확장하고 모든 경계를 이용했다. 잎의 경계가 아니라 모든 경계를 이용했다.우리는 두 언어(영어와 일본어)의 데이터 집합에서 우리의 새로운 훈련 목표를 테스트했고 실험을 통해 우리의 방법이 문법 분석 정밀도 면에서 원시적인DIORA 방법보다 향상되었다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Ndani ya ndani ya nje ya mfumo wa kujikodi (DIORA) ni muundo wa msingi wa ubongo uliobuniwa kwa ajili ya kuomba ubongo usio sahihi. During its forward computation, it provides phrase and contextual representations for all spans in the input sentence.  Kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa kisasa wa kila upepo wa kiwango cha ngazi, ongezeko la urefu wa ngazi 1, ili kujenga tena neno ndani ya spania, mwelekeo umefundishwa bila taarifa zilizowekwa. Katika kazi hii, tunaongezea lengo la mafunzo ya DIORA kwa kutumia siku zote badala ya spani za ngazi tu. Tunajaribu lengo letu jipya la mafunzo katika seti za data kwa lugha mbili: Kiingereza na Kijapani, na kwa nguvu kuonyesha kuwa njia yetu inafanikiwa kuboresha kwa usahihi wa kuandika kwa ajili ya DIORA asili.', 'fa': 'عمیق داخل بیرون\u200cهای خودکوډر دوباره\u200cای (DIORA) یک مدل بنیادی عصبی است که طراحی می\u200cشود برای پرسیدن پایگاه\u200cهای غیرقابل استفاده. در طول محاسبات پیشینش، عبارت و نمایش\u200cهای متوسط برای تمام فضایی در جمله ورودی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. با استفاده از نمایش موقعیتی هر طول سطح برگ، طول طول ۱، برای بازسازی کلمه داخل طول، مدل بدون داده\u200cهای نقاشی آموزش می\u200cشود. در این کار، ما هدف آموزش DIORA را با استفاده از تمام فضا به جای فقط فضای سطح برگ گسترش می دهیم. ما هدف آموزش جدیدمون را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دو زبان آزمایش می\u200cکنیم: انگلیسی و ژاپنی، و به صورت عمومی نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش ما به بهترین بررسی دقیق بر روی DIORA اصلی رسیده است.', 'tr': 'Daşarky daşarky otoködler (DIORA) neural tabanly bir modeldir. Saýlamak üçin dizayn. Önceki hesap sırasında, girdi sözlerinde tüm alanlar için fraz ve contextual ifadeleri sağlar. Her yaprak seviyesi boyunculuğunu kullanarak, 1 uzunluğunun uzunluğunu yeniden yapılandırmak için modeli etiket edilen veri olmadan eğitiliyor. Bu işde, DIORA okuwçysynyň amagyny diňe sapar depeleriniň ýerine ýerine ýetirerek uzaklaşdyrýarys. Biz öz täze bilim maksadymyzy iki diliň veri setirlerinde: iňlisçe we japonça we empirik bilen biziň täze maksadymyz original DIORA barada dogrylygyny çözmekde gowurak gazandyrýandygyny görkez.', 'sq': 'Autokoduesi i thellë brenda-jashtë rekursiv (DIORA) është një model me bazë nervore i dizajnuar për analizimin e qarkut zgjedhor të pazgjidhur. Gjatë llogaritjes së tij përpara, ajo ofron frazë dhe përfaqësime kontekstuale për të gjitha fushat në frazën e hyrjes. By utilizing the contextual representation of each leaf-level span, the span of length 1, to reconstruct the word inside the span, the model is trained without labeled data.  Në këtë punë, ne zgjerojmë objektivin e trajnimit të DIORA duke përdorur të gjitha shtresat në vend të vetëm shtresave të nivelit të gjetheve. We test our new training objective on datasets of two languages: English and Japanese, and empirically show that our method achieves improvement in parsing accuracy over the original DIORA.', 'am': 'የውጭው ውስጥ-ውጪ recursive autocode (DIORA) በተቀድሞው ቁጥጥር፣ የድምፅ እና የአሁኑን መልዕክት በጥያቄው ፍርድ ውስጥ ለሁሉም ሰዓት ነው፡፡ በ ስፓን ውስጥ ቃልን ለማስተካከል የደረጃ ደረጃ ቁጥር በቁጥር 1፣ የደረጃ ቁመት ቁጥር በመጠቀም፣ ሞዴል በጽሑፍ ዳታ ሳይኖር ተማሪ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የዲORA ትምህርት አካባቢ፣ የቅጠል ደረጃዎች ብቻ በመጠቀም፣ የስፋቶችን ሁሉ በመጠቀም እናሳድጋለን፡፡ አዲስ ትምህርት አዳራጊያችንን በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ላይ እና ጃፓንኛ ላይ እናስፈትናለን፤ እናም በመጀመሪያው DIORA ማዘጋጀት ፍለጋችንን ማድረግ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': "Արտաքին խորը ռեկուսիվ ավտոկոդերը (դիորան) նյարդային հիմքով մոդել է, որը նախագծված է անվերահսկված ընտրական շրջանի վերլուծության համար: Դրա առաջին հաշվարկումների ընթացքում այն տրամադրում է արտահայտություններ և կոնտեքստային ներկայացումներ ներկայացված նախադասության բոլոր տարբերակների համար: Օգտագործելով յուրաքանչյուր տերևի մակարդակի տարբերակի կոնտեքստոնալ ներկայացումը՝ 1 երկարության տարբերակը բառի վերակառուցման համար, մոդելը մարզի առանց պիտակ տվյալների: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ընդլայնում ենք դիորայի ուսուցման նպատակը օգտագործելով բոլոր տարածքները միայն տերևի մակարդակի տարածքների փոխարեն: Մենք փորձում ենք մեր նոր ուսումնասիրության նպատակը երկու լեզուների տվյալների համակարգերի վրա' անգլերեն և ճապոներեն, և էմպրիկապես ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը հասնում է բարելավմանը ճշգրտության վերլուծության մեջ սկզբնական դիորայի", 'af': "Deep binne-buite rekursief outokoder (DIORA) is 'n neurale-gebaseerde model ontwerp vir ononderwerpende konstituasie verwerking. In sy vorentoe rekenaar, verskaf dit frase en contextual voorstellings vir alle spans in die invoer seting. Deur te gebruik die contextual voorstelling van elke blaaivlak span, die span van lengte 1, om die woord binne-in die span te herkonstrukteer, word die model opgelei sonder etiketeerde data. In hierdie werk verleng ons die oefening doel van DIORA deur die gebruik van alle spans te maak in plaas van slegs blaaivlak spans. Ons probeer ons nuwe onderwerp doel op datastel van twee tale: Engels en Japans, en empiriese wys dat ons metode verbetering bereik in verwerking van presisiteit oor die oorspronklike DIORA.", 'bn': 'Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) is a neural-based model designed for unsupervised constituency parsing.  তার সামনে গণনার সময় এটি ইনপুটের সকল স্পেনের জন্য বাক্য এবং প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করে। প্রত্যেক পাতা স্প্যানের বর্তমান প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার করে স্প্যানের ভেতরে শব্দটি পুনঃনির্মাণ করার জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে লেবেলেড ছা এই কাজে আমরা ডিওরার প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্য বৃদ্ধি করি শুধুমাত্র পাতা স্পেনের পরিবর্তে সকল স্পেন ব্যবহার করে। আমরা আমাদের নতুন প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্য পরীক্ষা করছি দুই ভাষার ডাটাসেটে: ইংরেজি এবং জাপানীয় এবং সুন্দরিকভাবে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধত', 'bs': 'Duboko iznutra rekursivno autokodiranje (DIORA) je neuralno baziran model dizajniran za neodređenu analizu konstitucija. Tokom svog naprednog računala, ona pruža frazu i kontekstualne predstave za sve prostore u rečenici za ulazak. Koristeći kontekstualnu predstavu svakog razdoblja nivoa liša, širokost dužine 1, kako bi rekonstruisao riječ unutar razdoblja, model se obučava bez označenih podataka. U ovom poslu, proširimo cilj obuke DIORA koristeći sve prostore umjesto samo prostora nivoa lišća. Testiramo svoj novi cilj obuke na podacima dva jezika: engleski i japanski, i empirički pokazujemo da naš metod postigne poboljšanje u analizu tačnosti nad originalnom DIORA.', 'ca': "L'autocodificador recursiv interior-exterior (DIORA) és un model basat en neurones dissenyat per analitzar els circuits electorals sense supervisió. Durant el seu calcul avançat, proporciona frases i representacions contextuals per tots els espais de la frase d'entrada. Utilitzant la representació contextual de cada extensió de nivell de fulles, la extensió de longitud 1, per reconstruir la paraula dins l'extensió, el model està entrenat sense dades etiquetades. En aquesta feina estenem l'objectiu d'entrenament de DIORA fent servir totes les extensions en comptes de només les de nivell de fulles. Testem el nostre nou objectiu d'entrenament en conjunts de dades de dues llengües: anglès i japonès, i empiricament demostrem que el nostre mètode aconsegueix millorar l'analització de la precisió sobre el DIORA original.", 'az': 'Dışarıdaki dəyişiklik avtomatik kodlayıcı (DIORA) nöral-tabanlı modellərdir ki, müəyyən edilməmiş səhifələri ayırmaq üçün hazırlanmışdır. Əvvəlki hesablama sırasında, giriş cümləsində hər bir uzaq üçün fraz və contextual representations təyin edir. Hər yarpaq səviyyəsinin müxtəlif rəsmini istifadə edərək, 1 uzunluğunun uzunluğunu, genişliyin içindəki sözü yenidən inşa edərək, modeli etiket edilməmiş verilər olmadan təhsil edilir. Bu işdə, DIORA təhsil məqsədini yalnızca yar səviyyəsindən istifadə edərək bütün uzaqları istifadə edərik. Biz yeni təhsil məqsədimizi iki dil verilən verilənlər haqqında sınayırıq: İngilizce və Japonca, və təhsil yolumuz orijinal DIORA ilə doğruluğu ayırmaq üçün daha yaxşılaşdırılmasını göstərir.', 'cs': 'Hluboko uvnitř-vnější rekurzivní autokodér (DIORA) je neuronový model navržený pro analýzu volebních okruhů bez dohledu. Během výpočtu dopředu poskytuje fráze a kontextové reprezentace pro všechny rozpětí ve vstupní větě. Použitím kontextové reprezentace každého rozpětí na úrovni listů, rozpětí délky 1, k rekonstrukci slova uvnitř rozpětí, je model trénován bez označených dat. V této práci rozšiřujeme cíl výcviku DIORY o využití všech rozpětí namísto pouze listových rozpětí. Testujeme náš nový cíl školení na datových sadách dvou jazyků: angličtiny a japonštiny a empiricky ukazujeme, že naše metoda dosahuje zlepšení přesnosti parsování oproti původní DIORA.', 'et': 'Deep sees-external rekursiivne autokodeerija (DIORA) on närvipõhine mudel, mis on mõeldud järelevalveta valimisringkonna parsimiseks. Edasise arvutamise ajal pakub see fraasi- ja kontekstilisi esitusi kõigile sisendlause ulatustele. Kasutades iga lehetaseme ulatuse kontekstilist kujutamist, pikkusega 1 ulatust, et rekonstrueerida sõna ulatuses sees, koolitatakse mudelit ilma märgistatud andmeteta. Selles töös laiendame DIORA koolituse eesmärki, kasutades ainult lehekülgede asemel kõiki võimendeid. Testime oma uut koolituse eesmärki kahes keeles: inglise ja jaapani andmekogumites ning näitame empiiriliselt, et meie meetod saavutab parema parsimise täpsuse võrreldes originaalse DIORA-ga.', 'fi': 'Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) on neuropohjainen malli, joka on suunniteltu valvomattomaan vaalipiirien jäsentämiseen. Eteenpäin laskemisen aikana se tarjoaa lause- ja asiayhteydellisiä esityksiä kaikille syöttölauseen väleille. Käyttämällä kunkin lehden level span eli level 1 span kontekstuaalista esitystä span sisällä olevan sanan rekonstruoimiseksi malli koulutetaan ilman merkittyjä tietoja. Tässä työssä laajennamme DIORAn koulutustavoitetta hyödyntämällä kaikkia välejä lehtitasojen sijaan. Testaamme uutta koulutustavoitettamme kahdella kielellä: englanniksi ja japaniksi, ja osoitamme empiirisesti, että menetelmämme saavuttaa paremman jäsennystarkkuuden kuin alkuperäinen DIORA.', 'he': 'קודד אוטומטי מתחזר עמוק מבפנים בחוץ (DIORA) הוא מודל מבוסס על עצבים שעושה עבור בדיקת מחוז הבחירות ללא השגחה. במהלך החישוב הקדמי שלו, הוא מספק ביטוי ויציגות קונטקסטיות לכל המרחקים במשפט הכניסה. על ידי השימוש באמצעות הייצג הקונקסטי של כל תרווח רמת העלים, הרווח של אורך 1, כדי לבנות מחדש את המילה בתוך הרווח, המודל מאומן ללא נתונים מסוימים. בעבודה הזו, אנו ממשיכים את מטרה האימונים של DIORA על ידי להשתמש בכל רחבות במקום רק רחבות רמת עלים. אנו בודקים את אובייקטיבי האימונים החדשים שלנו על קבוצות נתונים של שתי שפות: אנגלית ויפנית, ואימפרית מראים שהשיטה שלנו משיגה שיפור באבחן מדויק על DIORA המקורי.', 'jv': 'deep politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Coverage Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné iso luwih akeh nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nyebuté nggawe barang langgar tarjamahan kanggo kelas barang. Awak dhéwé éntukno nggawe Tarjamahan sing bagian kanggo dataset iki luwih: Ingalas lan japané, lan kelangan kuwi perintahaan seneng pisan dhéwé iso nggawe ngubah cebo dhéwé nggawe barang langkung wih apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasah barang langkung wi', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Dura lissafar da ke gabatar da shi, yana bãyar da magana da mataimaki da duk kwanuka da aka shigar da shi. Yi amfani da shirin mai tsaya wa duk salon-daraja, tallas 1, dõmin ya sake da tsari magana guda span, an sanar da shi motalin idan ba da tsari ba. In this work, we extend the training objective of DIORA by making use of all spans instead of only leaf-level spans.  Tuna jarraba jigonmu na yanzu a kan danasãyi biyu na'ura: Ingiriya da Yamanci, kuma ana nuna alƙalumiya, hanyoyinmu za'a samar da mafarinta a kan parse tsari na farkon diORA.", 'sk': 'Globoko znotraj-zunaj rekurzivni samokodirnik (DIORA) je nevronsko osnovan model, zasnovan za nenadzorovano analiziranje volilnih okrožij. Med svojim naprejšnjim izračunom zagotavlja frazne in kontekstualne predstavitve za vse razpone vhodnega stavka. Z uporabo kontekstne reprezentacije vsakega razpona listov, razpona dolžine 1, za rekonstrukcijo besede znotraj razpona, model usposabljamo brez označenih podatkov. V tem delu razširimo cilj usposabljanja DIORA z uporabo vseh razponov namesto samo razponov listja. Naš novi cilj usposabljanja preizkušamo na naborih podatkov dveh jezikov: angleščine in japonščine ter empirično pokažemo, da naša metoda dosega izboljšanje natančnosti razčlenjanja v primerjavi z originalno DIORO.', 'bo': 'Deep inside-outside recursive autoencoder (DIORA) is a neural-based model designed for unsupervised constituency parsing. འདི་ནང་དུ་མདུན་སྐྱོད་པའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐབས་ལྟར་ཚིག་དང་ཁྱད་ཡུལ་གྱི་བར་སྟོན་རྣམས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པ By utilizing the contextual representation of each leaf-level span, the span of length 1, to reconstruct the word inside the span, the model is trained without labeled data. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་DIORA ཡི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལ་རྒྱང་བསྐྱེད་པ་ཡིན་ན། དེ་ལས་མ་ཤོག་པའི་བར་སྟོང ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་སྡུད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསརཔ་དང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Picking BERT’s Brain : Probing for Linguistic Dependencies in Contextualized Embeddings Using Representational Similarity Analysis', 'ar': 'انتقاء دماغ بيرت: البحث عن التبعيات اللغوية في الزخارف السياقية باستخدام تحليل التشابه التمثيلي', 'es': 'Escogiendo el cerebro de BERT: sondeo de dependencias lingüísticas en incrustaciones contextualizadas mediante el análisis de similitud representacional', 'fr': "Choisir le cerveau du BERT\xa0: sonder les dépendances linguistiques dans les intégrations contextualisées à l'aide de l'analyse de similarité représentationnelle", 'pt': 'Escolhendo o cérebro do BERT: sondando dependências linguísticas em incorporações contextualizadas usando análise de semelhança representacional', 'zh': '择BERT之大脑:用表徵相似性析上下文嵌中语依赖性', 'ja': 'バートの脳を選ぶ：表現的類似性分析を使用した文脈化された埋め込みにおける言語依存性の探索', 'hi': 'BERT के मस्तिष्क को चुनना: प्रतिनिधित्वात्मक समानता विश्लेषण का उपयोग करके संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग में भाषाई निर्भरताओं के लिए जांच', 'ru': 'Выбор мозга БЕРТА: исследование лингвистических зависимостей в контекстуальных вложениях с использованием репрезентативного анализа сходства', 'ga': 'Inchinn BERT a phiocadh: Ag Tóraíocht faoi Spleáchas Teangeolaíoch i Leabú Comhthéacsúla ag Úsáid Anailís Chosúlachta Ionadaíoch', 'ka': 'BERT- ის ტვინის მონიშნობა: ლინგურისტიკური განსაზღვრებების შესაძლებლობა კონტექსტუალურად გამოყენებული განსაზღვრებების ანალიზაციის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A BERT agyának kiválasztása: Nyelvi függőségek vizsgálata kontextualizált beágyazásokban reprezentációs hasonlósági elemzés segítségével', 'el': 'Διάλεξη του εγκεφάλου του Μπερτ: Έλεγχος γλωσσικών εξαρτήσεων σε περιεκτικές ενσωματώσεις χρησιμοποιώντας ανάλυση αντιπροσωπευτικής ομοιότητας', 'it': "Scelta del cervello di BERT: ricerca delle dipendenze linguistiche in incorporazioni contestualizzate utilizzando l'analisi di somiglianza rappresentativa", 'mk': 'Избирање на мозокот на BERT: Истражување за јазични зависности во контекстуални вградувања со употреба на анализа на репрезентационална сличност', 'lt': 'BERT smegenų pasirinkimas: kalbos priklausomybės kontekstinėse patalpose bandymas naudojant reprezentacinę panašumo analizę', 'kk': 'BERT- тың миды таңдау: Контекстуалды ендірулерде лингвистикалық тәуелдіктерді тексеру', 'mt': 'L-għażla tal-Brain tal-BERT: Probar għal Dipendenzi Lingwistiċi f’Embeddings Kuntest bl-Użu ta’ Analiżi ta’ Similarità Rappreżentattiva', 'ms': 'Memilih Otak BERT: Mencoba untuk Dependensi Bahasa dalam Persembahan Konteksual Mengguna Analisi Kesamaan Perwakilan', 'mn': 'BERT-ийн тархины сонголт: Төвшөөрөгдсөн дунджаар хэлбэрээр хамааралтай байдлыг шалгах', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ബ്രെയിന്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നു: പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സമമാണ അന്യായം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്', 'no': 'Vel BERT- hjernen: Prøver for lingsavhengighet i kontekstualiserte innbygging ved bruk av Representational Similarity Analysis', 'pl': 'Wybór mózgu BERT: Badanie zależności językowych w kontekstualizowanych osadzeniach za pomocą analizy podobieństwa reprezentacyjnego', 'ro': 'Alegerea creierului BERT: analiza dependențelor lingvistice în încorporările contextualizate folosind analiza similarității reprezentative', 'sr': 'Izaberanje BERT-ovog mozga: Proba za Lingističke zavisnosti u kontekstualiziranim integracijama koristeći predstavničku analizu sličnosti', 'si': 'BERT ගේ බ්\u200dරේන්ස් තෝරාගන්න: සංවිධානය සඳහා ලින්ගිස්ටික විශාල විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': "Picking BERT's Brain: Probining for Linguistic Dependences in Contextualized Embeddings using Representation Similarity Analysis", 'ta': 'பிரெட்டின் சிறப்பை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து', 'sv': 'Att välja BERT:s hjärna: Söka efter språkliga beroenden i kontextualiserade inbyggnader med hjälp av representativ liklikhetsanalys', 'ur': "BERT's Brain پکڑ رہا ہے: کانٹکسٹیولیز ایمبڈینز میں Linguistic Dependencies کے لئے امتحان کرنا", 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Lấy bộ não cân bằng: Kết quả các phụ thuộc ngôn ngữ học trong môi trường treo định hình s ử dụng phân tích trùng khớp', 'da': "Udvælgelse af BERT's hjerne: Undersøgelse af sproglige afhængigheder i kontekstualiserede indlejringer ved hjælp af repræsentativ lighedsanalyse", 'nl': 'Het brein van BERT kiezen: Onderzoek naar taalafhankelijkheden in contextualiseerde embeddings met behulp van representationele gelijkenisanalyse', 'bg': 'Избор на мозъка на Берт: проучване за лингвистични зависимости в контекстуализирани вграждания чрез анализ на представителната сходство', 'hr': 'Izaberanje BERT-ovog mozga: Proba za Lingističke zavisnosti u kontekstualiziranim uključenjima koristeći predstavničku analizu sličnosti', 'id': 'Memilih Otak BERT: Mencoba untuk Dependensi Bahasa dalam Embedding Konteksual Menggunakan Analisi Similaritas Representasi', 'de': 'BERTs Gehirn ausw瓣hlen: Suche nach sprachlichen Abh瓣ngigkeiten in kontextualisierten Einbettungen mittels Repr瓣sentationsgleichheitsanalyse', 'ko': '고르버트의 뇌: 표징 유사성 분석을 사용하여 어경화 삽입된 언어 의존성을 탐색하다', 'fa': 'برگزیدن مغز BERT: امتحان برای بستگی\u200cهای لینگیستیک در انجمن\u200cسازی متوسط با استفاده از تحلیل شبیه\u200cسازی نمایندگان', 'af': 'Kies BERT se Brain: Probeer vir Linguistiese Afhanklikhede in Konteksualiseerde Inbêdinge Gebruik Voorstellende Likveldigheidanalisie', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e trurit BERT: Probimi i varësive gjuhësore në përfshirjet e kontekstuara duke përdorur analizën e ngjashmërisë përfaqësuese', 'hy': 'ԲԵՌԹ-ի ուղեղի ընտրությունը. Լեզվաբանական կախվածությունների փորձը կոնտեքստալիզացված ներգրավումներում օգտագործելով ներկայացման նմանության վերլուծություն', 'tr': "BERT'nin Braini seçin: Çizgiselik Bağlantılar Kontekstualized İnterketlerde Sözleme", 'sw': "Picha BERT's Brain: Kujaribu Kutegemea Uganjano wa Kilinguistic katika Mazingira yanayotumia Ufanuzi wa Taifa", 'bs': 'Izaberanje BERT-ovog mozga: Proba za Lingističke zavisnosti u kontekstualiziranim integracijama koristeći predstavničku analizu sličnosti', 'bn': 'বের্টের ব্রেইন নির্বাচন করুন: প্রতিনিধি প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে লিঙ্গিস্টিক নির্ভরের জন্য প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "Picking BERT's Brain: Probing for Linguistic Dependencies in Contextualized Embeddings Using Representational Similarity Analysis", 'am': 'የBERT ብሬን በመምረጥ ላይ:', 'cs': 'Výběr mozku BERT: sondování jazykových závislostí v kontextualizovaných vloženích pomocí analýzy reprezentační podobnosti', 'fi': 'BERT:n aivojen valinta: kielellisten riippuvuuksien kartoittaminen kontekstualisoituissa upotuksissa Representational Similarity Analysis -analyysin avulla', 'et': "BERT'i aju valimine: keeleliste sõltuvuste analüüsimine kontekstualiseeritud manustamisel esindussarnasuse analüüsi abil", 'az': "BERT'nin Brain seçilməsi: Tərəfləndirilmiş İfadələrdə Səlinçilik Bağlamlıqları üçün Səlinçilik Analizi", 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izbira BERT-ovih možganov: Prodiranje jezikovne odvisnosti v kontekstualiziranih vdelavah z uporabo analize reprezentativne podobnosti', 'jv': "pick BERT's Bran: likely for Linguist dependncies in contextual embedding Using representtative Similrity Test", 'bo': "Picking BERT's Brain: Probing for Linguistic Dependencies in Contextualized Embeddings Using Representational Similarity Analysis", 'he': 'בחירת המוח של BERT: ניתוח תלויות לינגוליות בתכניות מקורקסטולוגיות באמצעות ניתוח דמיון מייצג'}
{'en': 'As the name implies, contextualized representations of language are typically motivated by their ability to encode context. Which aspects of context are captured by such representations? We introduce an approach to address this question using Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA). As case studies, we investigate the degree to which a verb embedding encodes the verb’s subject, a pronoun embedding encodes the pronoun’s antecedent, and a full-sentence representation encodes the sentence’s head word (as determined by a dependency parse). In all cases, we show that BERT’s contextualized embeddings reflect the linguistic dependency being studied, and that BERT encodes these dependencies to a greater degree than it encodes less linguistically-salient controls. These results demonstrate the ability of our approach to adjudicate between hypotheses about which aspects of context are encoded in representations of language.', 'ar': 'كما يوحي الاسم ، عادةً ما تكون التمثيلات السياقية للغة مدفوعة بقدرتها على تشفير السياق. ما هي جوانب السياق التي تلتقطها مثل هذه التمثيلات؟ نقدم نهجًا لمعالجة هذا السؤال باستخدام تحليل التشابه التمثيلي (RSA). كدراسات حالة ، نحقق في الدرجة التي يشفر بها تضمين الفعل الفاعل ، ويشفر تضمين الضمير سلف الضمير ، ويمثل تمثيل الجملة الكاملة الكلمة الرئيسية للجملة (على النحو الذي يحدده تحليل التبعية). في جميع الحالات ، نظهر أن حفلات الزفاف السياقية لـ BERT تعكس التبعية اللغوية التي تتم دراستها ، وأن BERT يشفر هذه التبعيات بدرجة أكبر مما يشفر عناصر تحكم أقل بروزًا من الناحية اللغوية. توضح هذه النتائج قدرة نهجنا على الفصل بين الفرضيات حول جوانب السياق المشفرة في تمثيلات اللغة.', 'pt': 'Como o nome indica, as representações contextualizadas da linguagem são tipicamente motivadas por sua capacidade de codificar o contexto. Quais aspectos do contexto são capturados por tais representações? Apresentamos uma abordagem para abordar essa questão usando a Análise de Similaridade Representacional (RSA). Como estudos de caso, investigamos o grau em que uma incorporação de verbo codifica o sujeito do verbo, uma incorporação de pronome codifica o antecedente do pronome e uma representação de sentença completa codifica a palavra principal da sentença (conforme determinado por uma análise de dependência). Em todos os casos, mostramos que os embeddings contextualizados do BERT refletem a dependência linguística que está sendo estudada e que o BERT codifica essas dependências em maior grau do que codifica controles menos salientes linguisticamente. Esses resultados demonstram a capacidade de nossa abordagem de julgar entre hipóteses sobre quais aspectos do contexto são codificados nas representações da linguagem.', 'ja': '名前が暗示するように、言語の文脈化された表現は、典型的には、文脈を符号化する能力によって動機づけられる。文脈のどの側面がそのような表現によって捉えられているか？表現類似性分析（ RSA ）を使用して、この問題に対処するためのアプローチを紹介します。ケーススタディとして、動詞の埋め込みが動詞の主語を符号化する度合い、代名詞の埋め込みが代名詞の前置詞を符号化する度合い、文の頭部単語を符号化する全文表現（依存関係解析によって決定される）を調査します。すべての場合において、BERTの文脈化された埋め込みは、研究されている言語的依存性を反映しており、BERTは、言語的傾向の少ない制御を符号化するよりも、これらの依存性をより大きく符号化することを示している。これらの結果は、文脈のどの側面が言語の表現にコード化されているかについて、仮説間で判断する私たちのアプローチの能力を示しています。', 'es': 'Como su nombre lo indica, las representaciones contextualizadas del lenguaje suelen estar motivadas por su capacidad de codificar el contexto. ¿Qué aspectos del contexto capturan dichas representaciones? Presentamos un enfoque para abordar esta pregunta mediante el análisis de similitud representacional (RSA). Como estudios de caso, investigamos el grado en que la incrustación de un verbo codifica el sujeto del verbo, la incrustación de un pronombre codifica el antecedente del pronombre y una representación de oración completa codifica la palabra principal de la oración (según lo determinado por un análisis de dependencias). En todos los casos, mostramos que las incorporaciones contextualizadas de BERT reflejan la dependencia lingüística que se está estudiando, y que BERT codifica estas dependencias en mayor medida que los controles menos relevantes desde el punto de vista lingüístico. Estos resultados demuestran la capacidad de nuestro enfoque para juzgar entre hipótesis sobre qué aspectos del contexto están codificados en las representaciones del lenguaje.', 'hi': 'जैसा कि नाम का तात्पर्य है, भाषा के प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व आमतौर पर संदर्भ को एन्कोड करने की उनकी क्षमता से प्रेरित होते हैं। ऐसे अभ्यावेदनों द्वारा संदर्भ के किन पहलुओं पर कब्जा कर लिया गया है? हम प्रतिनिधित्वात्मक समानता विश्लेषण (आरएसए) का उपयोग करके इस प्रश्न को संबोधित करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं। मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में, हम उस डिग्री की जांच करते हैं जिसमें एक क्रिया एम्बेडिंग क्रिया के विषय को एन्कोड करती है, एक सर्वनाम एम्बेडिंग सर्वनाम के पूर्ववर्ती को एन्कोड करता है, और एक पूर्ण-वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व वाक्य के सिर के शब्द को एन्कोड करता है (जैसा कि निर्भरता पार्स द्वारा निर्धारित किया जाता है)। सभी मामलों में, हम दिखाते हैं कि BERT के संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग भाषाई निर्भरता का अध्ययन किया जा रहा है, और यह कि BERT इन निर्भरताओं को कम भाषाई-मुख्य नियंत्रणों को एन्कोड करने की तुलना में अधिक से अधिक डिग्री तक एन्कोड करता है। ये परिणाम परिकल्पनाओं के बीच निर्णय लेने के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण की क्षमता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जिसके बारे में संदर्भ के पहलुओं को भाषा के प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोड किया गया है।', 'zh': '顾名思义者,言上下文化,编码上下文之所驱也。 此表示法得上下文之哪些方面? 吾言用具象相似性论 (RSA) 以决之。 为例研究,臣等考动词嵌编码动词主语,代词嵌编码代词前身,及完句示编码句标题词(赖解析定)。 凡此诸事,皆明BERT之上下文化,方言依赖性,而BERT于此编码高于其不甚异控件之编码。 此结果表明,吾道决于假设之间,而设及上下文之哪些方面编码于言语之中。', 'fr': "Comme son nom l'indique, les représentations contextualisées du langage sont généralement motivées par leur capacité à coder le contexte. Quels aspects du contexte sont capturés par de telles représentations\xa0? Nous introduisons une approche pour répondre à cette question à l'aide de l'analyse de similarité représentative (RSA). Dans le cadre d'études de cas, nous étudions dans quelle mesure un verbe encode le sujet du verbe, un pronom encode l'antécédent du pronom et une représentation de phrase complète code le mot principal de la phrase (tel que déterminé par une analyse de dépendance). Dans tous les cas, nous montrons que les intégrations contextualisées du BERT reflètent la dépendance linguistique étudiée, et que BERT encode ces dépendances dans une plus grande mesure qu'il ne code des contrôles moins significatifs sur le plan linguistique. Ces résultats démontrent la capacité de notre approche à trancher entre des hypothèses concernant les aspects du contexte qui sont encodés dans les représentations du langage.", 'ru': 'Как следует из названия, контекстуализированные представления языка обычно мотивируются их способностью кодировать контекст. Какие аспекты контекста отражены в таких представлениях? Мы внедряем подход к решению этого вопроса с использованием репрезентативного анализа сходства (RSA). В качестве тематических исследований мы исследуем степень, в которой вложение глагола кодирует субъект глагола, вложение местоимения кодирует предшественник местоимения, а представление полного предложения кодирует главное слово предложения (как определено синтаксическим анализом зависимости). Во всех случаях мы показываем, что контекстуализированные вложения БЕРТА отражают изучаемую лингвистическую зависимость, и что БЕРТА кодирует эти зависимости в большей степени, чем он кодирует менее лингвистически обоснованные элементы управления. Эти результаты демонстрируют способность нашего подхода судить между гипотезами о том, какие аспекты контекста закодированы в представлениях языка.', 'ga': 'Mar a thugann an t-ainm le tuiscint, is gnách go mbíonn léirithe comhthéacsúla teanga á spreagadh ag a gcumas comhthéacs a ionchódú. Cad iad na gnéithe comhthéacs atá gafa ag léiriúcháin dá leithéid? Tugaimid isteach cur chuige chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an gceist seo ag baint úsáide as Anailís Cosúlachta Ionadaíochta (RSA). Mar chás-staidéir, déanaimid imscrúdú ar a mhéid a ionchódaíonn neadú briathar ábhar an bhriathair, ionchódaíonn leabú forainm réamhfhoclach an fhorainm, agus ionchódaíonn léiriú lán-abairt ceannfhocal na habairte (mar a chinntear ag parsáil spleáchais). I ngach cás, léirímid go léiríonn leabú comhthéacsaithe BERT an spleáchas teanga a bhfuil staidéar á dhéanamh air, agus go n-ionchódaíonn BET na spleáchais sin níos mó ná mar a ionchódaíonn sé rialuithe nach bhfuil chomh teangeolaíoch céanna. Léiríonn na torthaí seo cumas ár gcur chuige maidir le breithiúnas a dhéanamh idir hipitéisí faoi na gnéithe de chomhthéacs atá ionchódaithe i léiriúcháin teanga.', 'hu': 'Ahogy a név is sugallja, a nyelv kontextuális ábrázolását jellemzően a kontextus kódolásának képessége motiválja. Az ilyen ábrázolások a kontextus mely aspektusait fogják fel? Ezt a kérdést reprezentatív hasonlósági elemzés (RSA) segítségével megközelítjük. Esettanulmányként azt vizsgáljuk, hogy egy ige beágyazása milyen mértékben kódolja az ige alanyát, egy névmást beágyazás kódolja a névmást előzményét, és egy teljes mondatos ábrázolás kódolja a mondat fejszóját (függőségi elemzés határozza meg). Minden esetben megmutatjuk, hogy a BERT kontextuális beágyazásai tükrözik a tanulmányozott nyelvi függőséget, és hogy a BERT ezeket a függőségeket nagyobb mértékben kódolja, mint amennyiben kevésbé nyelvileg kiemelkedő kontrollokat kódol. Ezek az eredmények bizonyítják megközelítésünk képességét arra, hogy hipotéziseink között döntsön arról, hogy a kontextus mely aspektusai vannak kódolva a nyelv ábrázolásában.', 'el': 'Όπως υποδηλώνει το όνομα, οι περιβαλλόμενες αναπαραστάσεις της γλώσσας συνήθως παρακινούνται από την ικανότητά τους να κωδικοποιούν το πλαίσιο. Ποιες πτυχές του πλαισίου αποτυπώνονται από τέτοιες αναπαραστάσεις; Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του ερωτήματος χρησιμοποιώντας την ανάλυση αντιπροσωπευτικής ομοιότητας (RSA). Ως περιπτωσιολογικές μελέτες, ερευνούμε τον βαθμό στον οποίο μια ενσωμάτωση ρήματος κωδικοποιεί το θέμα του ρήματος, μια ενσωμάτωση αντωνυμίας κωδικοποιεί το προηγούμενο της αντωνυμίας και μια αναπαράσταση πλήρους πρότασης κωδικοποιεί την επικεφαλής λέξη της πρότασης (όπως καθορίζεται από μια ανάλυση εξάρτησης). Σε όλες τις περιπτώσεις, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι ενσωματωμένες στο πλαίσιο του BERT αντικατοπτρίζουν τη γλωσσική εξάρτηση που μελετάται, και ότι ο BERT κωδικοποιεί αυτές τις εξαρτήσεις σε μεγαλύτερο βαθμό από ό, τι κωδικοποιεί λιγότερο γλωσσικά σημαντικούς ελέγχους. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά καταδεικνύουν την ικανότητα της προσέγγισής μας να κρίνουμε μεταξύ υποθέσεων σχετικά με το ποιες πτυχές του πλαισίου κωδικοποιούνται σε αναπαραστάσεις της γλώσσας.', 'ka': 'როგორც სახელი იგივეა, ტენექსტუალური სახელის გამოსახულებები ტიპოლურად მოტივირებულია მათი შესაძლებლობა კონტექსტურის კონტექსტურაციას კონტექსტის რამდენი აპექტირები იქნება ასეთი გამოსახულებებით? ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ამ კითხვის გასაკეთებლად გავაკეთებთ გამოსაყენებელი განსხვავებული ანალიზი (RSA). როგორც კვლევების სწორედ, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ სწორედ, რომელიც გერბის სწორედ კოდის სწორედ, სწორედ კოდის სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწ ყველა შემთხვევაში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ BERT-ის კონტექსტუალური ინბედინციები განაკეთებულია ლენგურისტიკური დააკეთებულობას, და რომ BERT ამ დააკეთებულობას უფრო მეტი დონეში, ვიდრე ეს კონტუალურად ეს შედეგი გამოჩვენებენ ჩვენი წარმოდგენის შესაძლებლობა ჰიპოტეზების შორის წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც კონტექსტის არსებები კონტექსტის რედაქტირებ', 'it': "Come suggerisce il nome, le rappresentazioni contestualizzate del linguaggio sono tipicamente motivate dalla loro capacità di codificare il contesto. Quali aspetti del contesto vengono catturati da tali rappresentazioni? Introduciamo un approccio per affrontare questa domanda utilizzando l'analisi di somiglianza rappresentativa (RSA). Come casi di studio, esaminiamo il grado in cui un embedding verbo codifica il soggetto del verbo, un embedding pronome codifica l'antecedente del pronome e una rappresentazione a frase intera codifica la parola principale della frase (come determinato da un parse di dipendenza). In tutti i casi, mostriamo che le incorporazioni contestualizzate di BERT riflettono la dipendenza linguistica studiata, e che BERT codifica queste dipendenze in misura maggiore di quanto non codifica controlli meno salienti dal punto di vista linguistico. Questi risultati dimostrano la capacità del nostro approccio di giudicare tra ipotesi su quali aspetti del contesto sono codificati nelle rappresentazioni del linguaggio.", 'kk': 'Атауы келтірілген соң, тілдердің кәдімгі түрлі көрсетілімдері әдетте оның контексті кодтау мүмкіндігіне көмектеседі. Бұл кескіндердің қайсы аспектері бар? Біз бұл сұрақты таңдау үшін Көрсетілетін ұқсас анализ (RSA) арқылы таңдаймыз. Мәселелер зерттеулері үшін, біз вербаны ендіру үшін вербоның тақырыбын кодтамыз. Ендіру үшін белгісін ендіру үшін белгісінің антицеденті кодтамыз. Ендіру үшін толық сөздің негізгі сөзді кодтамыз (тәуелдік талдау үшін анықталған). Бүкіл жағдайда, БЕРТ контекстуализациялық ендірулері лингвистикалық тәуелдігін зерттеу үшін көрсетеді. БЕРТ бұл тәуелдіктерді лингвистикалық контроллерінен артық деңгейіне кодтады. Бұл нәтижелер біздің тәртібіміздің гипотезалардың қай аспектері тілді көрсету үшін кодтамыз керек екенін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Kaip tai reiškia pavadinimas, kontekstinės kalbos atstovybės paprastai yra motyvuotos jų gebėjimu koduoti kontekstą. Kokius konteksto aspektus apibrėžia tokie atstovai? Įdiegiame požiūrį į šį klausimą naudojant reprezentacinės panašumo analizę (RSA). Kaip atvejų tyrimai, mes tiriame, kiek žodžio įterpimas koduoja žodžio dalyką, žodžio įterpimas koduoja žodžio antecedent ą, o viso sakinio atstovavimas koduoja žodžio galvą (kaip nustatyta priklausomybės analize). Visais atvejais parodome, kad BERT kontekstinė integracija atspindi tiriamą kalbinę priklausomybę ir kad BERT koduoja šias priklausomybes labiau nei koduoja mažiau kalbiniu požiūriu svarbias kontroles priemones. Šie rezultatai rodo mūsų požiūrio gebėjimą spręsti tarp hipotezių, kokie konteksto aspektai yra koduojami kalbos atstovybėse.', 'ms': 'Sebagaimana nama menunjukkan, perwakilan kontekstual bahasa biasanya disebabkan kemampuan mereka untuk mengekodkan konteks. Aspekt mana konteks ditangkap oleh perwakilan seperti ini? Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk mengatasi soalan ini dengan menggunakan Analisi Persamaan Perwakilan (RSA). Sebagai kajian kes, kami menyelidiki darjah yang mana pembangunan verb mengekodkan subjek verb, pembangunan pronun mengekodkan sebelumnya pronun, dan mewakilan kalimat penuh mengekodkan perkataan kepala kalimat (ditentukan oleh hurai dependensi). Dalam semua kes, kita menunjukkan bahawa penyambungan BERT yang berkontekstualisasi mencerminkan dependensi bahasa yang sedang dipelajari, dan bahawa BERT mengekodkan dependensi-dependensi ini ke darjah yang lebih besar daripada ia mengekodkan kawalan yang kurang bersinar bahasa. Hasil ini menunjukkan kemampuan pendekatan kita untuk menilai antara hipotesis mengenai aspek konteks yang dikodifikasikan dalam perwakilan bahasa.', 'ml': 'പേര് അര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ, ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സാധാരണമായി കോണ്\u200dകോഡ് ചെയ്യാനുള്ള കഴിവുകളാല്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാപ ഇത്തരം പ്രതിനിധികളാല്\u200d ഏത് ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നു? ഈ ചോദ്യത്തെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വഴി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കേസ് പഠിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ, വാര്\u200dബിന്റെ വിഷയത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് കോഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഡിഗ്രിയില്\u200d നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ആന്\u200dറിസെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ കോഡിങ്ങ്  എല്ലാ കാര്യങ്ങളിലും നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട അകത്തുനിന്നുള്ള ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ ആശ്രയം വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d ഇതിന ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയുടെ സാധ്യതയുടെ കഴിവ് കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mk': "As the name implies, contextualized representations of language are typically motivated by their ability to encode context.  Кои аспекти на контекст се зафатени од ваквите претставувања? Ние воведуваме пристап за решавање на ова прашање со употреба на репрезентационална анализа на сличност (RSA). As case studies, we investigate the degree to which a verb embedding encodes the verb's subject, a pronoun embedding encodes the pronoun's antecedent, and a full-sentence representation encodes the sentence's head word (as determined by a dependency parse).  Во сите случаи, покажуваме дека контекстуалните вградувања на БЕРТ ја одразуваат јазичната зависност која се проучува, и дека БЕРТ ги кодира овие зависности во поголем степен отколку кодира помалку јазички-осамени контроли. Овие резултати ја покажуваат способноста на нашиот пристап да суди помеѓу хипотезите за кои аспекти на контекст се кодирани во претставувањата на јазикот.", 'mt': 'Kif jimplika l-isem, rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati tal-lingwa huma tipikament motivati mill-kapaċità tagħhom li jikkodifikaw il-kuntest. Which aspects of context are captured by such representations?  Aħna nintroduċu approċċ biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni bl-użu tal-Analiżi ta’ Similarità Rappreżentattiva (RSA). Bħala studji ta’ każijiet, ninvestigaw il-grad s a fejn verb embedding jikkodifika s-suġġett tal-verb, inkodifika pronoun jikkodifika l-anteċedent tal-pronoun, u rappreżentanza ta’ sentenza s ħiħa tikkodifika l-kelma ewlenija tas-sentenza (kif determinat minn analiżi tad-dipendenza). Fil-każijiet kollha, nagħmlu evidenza li l-inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati tal-BERT jirriflettu d-dipendenza lingwistika li qed tiġi studjata, u li l-BERT jikkodifika dawn id-dipendenzi s a grad akbar milli jikkodifika kontrolli anqas lingwistikament salienti. Dawn ir-riżultati juru l-kapaċità tal-approċċ tagħna li tagħmel ġudizzju bejn ipoteżi dwar liema aspetti tal-kuntest huma kkodifikati fir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-lingwa.', 'mn': 'Энэ нэр нь хэл дээрх орчин үеийн үзүүлэлт нь ихэвчлэн нөхцөл байдлыг кодлох чадвараар урам зориулагддаг. Ямар нөхцөл байдлын талаар ийм үзүүлэлт хийгдсэн вэ? Бид энэ асуултыг суралцахын тулд Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA) ашиглан нэг арга зам илэрхийлж байна. Хэрэв судалгааны хувьд бид хэлний сургуулиудыг коддог хэмжээг судалж, хэлбэрийг тодорхойлох хэмжээг коддог бөгөөд бүрэн өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлох хэмжээг шийдвэрлэж байна. Бүх тохиолдолд бид БЕРТ-ын орчин тохиолдолд хэлний хамааралтай байдлыг судалж буй хэлний хамааралтай байдлыг харуулж байна. БЕРТ эдгээр хамааралтай байдлыг илүү их хэмжээнд коддог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эдгээр үр дүнд бидний бодлогын талаар хэлний илэрхийлэл дээр шийдвэрлэх боломжтой байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Jak sama nazwa wskazuje, kontekstowane reprezentacje języka są zazwyczaj motywowane ich zdolnością do kodowania kontekstu. Jakie aspekty kontekstu są uchwycone przez takie reprezentacje? Wprowadzamy podejście do rozwiązania tego pytania za pomocą analizy podobieństwa reprezentacyjnego (RSA). W ramach studiów przypadków badamy stopień, w jakim osadzenie czasownika koduje przedmiot czasownika, osadzenie zaimka koduje poprzedni zaimek, a reprezentacja pełnego zdania koduje słowo główne zdania (określone przez parse zależności). We wszystkich przypadkach pokazujemy, że kontekstualizowane osadzenia BERT odzwierciedlają badaną zależność językową i że BERT koduje te zależności w większym stopniu niż koduje mniej istotne kontrole językowe. Wyniki te pokazują zdolność naszego podejścia do rozstrzygania hipotez, które aspekty kontekstu są zakodowane w reprezentacjach języka.', 'no': 'Som namnet impliserer, er kontekstualiserte representasjonar av språk vanlegvis motivert av dei kan koda konteksten. Kva aspekt for kontekst vert henta av slike representasjonar? Vi introduserer ein tilnærming til å handtera dette spørsmålet ved å bruka Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA). Som tilfelle studier, s å undersøker vi kor grad ein verb innebygging koderer temaet til verben, eit pronoun innebygging koderer antecedenten til pronounen, og eit fullstendig setningssrepresentasjon koderer hodefordet til setninga (som bestemt av ein tillesing av avhengighet). I alle tilfellene viser vi at BERT sin kontekstualiserte innbygging reflekterer den linguistiske avhengigheten som vert studiert, og at BERT koderer desse avhengighetene til ein større grad enn den koderer mindre språkstiske kontrollar. Desse resultatene viser kanskje tilnærminga vårt til å gjera tilnærming mellom hypotesane om kva aspekt av konteksten er koda i representasjonar av språk.', 'ro': 'După cum sugerează și numele, reprezentările contextualizate ale limbajului sunt de obicei motivate de capacitatea lor de a codifica contextul. Ce aspecte ale contextului sunt capturate de astfel de reprezentări? Introducem o abordare pentru a aborda această întrebare folosind Analiza Similarității Reprezentative (RSA). Ca studii de caz, investigăm gradul în care încorporarea unui verb codează subiectul verbului, încorporarea unui pronum codează antecedentul pronumelui, iar o reprezentare integrală codează cuvântul cap al propoziției (determinat de un pars de dependență). În toate cazurile, arătăm că încorporările contextualizate ale BERT reflectă dependența lingvistică studiată și că BERT codifică aceste dependențe într-o măsură mai mare decât codează controale mai puțin importante din punct de vedere lingvistic. Aceste rezultate demonstrează capacitatea abordării noastre de a judeca între ipoteze despre ce aspecte ale contextului sunt codificate în reprezentări ale limbajului.', 'sr': 'Kao što se zove, kontekstualizirane predstave jezika su obično motivisane njihovom sposobnošću kodiranja konteksta. Koji su aspekti konteksta uhvaćeni takvim predstavljanjem? Predstavljamo pristup rješavanju ovog pitanja koristeći predstavničku analizu sličnosti (RSA). Kao studije slučajeva, istražujemo stepenicu na kojoj se verb uključuje u temu verb a, pronoun ugrađenje kodira anticedent pronouna, a predstavljanje pune rečenice kodira glavnu reč rečenice (kao što je određeno razmatranjem zavisnosti). U svim slučajevima pokazujemo da kontekstualizirani integraciji BERT-a odražavaju proučavanje jezičke zavisnosti i da BERT kodira ove zavisnosti na veću stupnju nego kodira manje jezički-salijantnih kontrola. Ovi rezultati pokazuju sposobnost našeg pristupa suđenju između hipoteze o kojim aspektima konteksta kodirani su u predstavljanju jezika.', 'si': 'නම අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන්, භාෂාවේ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් කොඩ් කරන්න පුළුවන මේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයෙන් මොන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක්ද අල්ලගන්නේ? අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ්ලේෂණය (RSA) භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කේස් පරීක්ෂණය විදියට, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වාර්තාවයේ විදියට වාර්තාවක් සංකේත කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංකේත කරනවා කියලා, සම්පූර්ණ වාක්ෂණය සංකේත කර අපි හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම පෙන්වන්නම් BERT ගේ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාෂාවික විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම BERT මේ විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාසික මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් භාෂාවේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් කොහොමද ප්\u200dරතිචා', 'so': 'Sida magacu uu u jeedo, qofka luqada la soo bandhigayo waxaa sida caadiga ah loo dhaqaajiyaa awoodooda ay kooban karto. Qaybtee dhinac ka mid ah ayaa lagu qabsaday noocyada caynkaas ah? Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa qaab aan su’aalahan looga baaraandegayo baaritaanka u eg (RSA). Sida wax lagu baranayo, waxaynu baaraynaa shahaadada ku qoran warqada ku qoran warqada, mid ku qoran karo baarlamaha ku qoran cuntada, qeybta dhamaantoodna waxaa ku qoran ereyga madaxa (sida ku qoran baarlamaanka ku xiran). Xaaladaha oo dhan, waxaynu muujinnaa in xadhigga BERT ay ka fiiriyaan ku xiran lahaanshaha afka, iyo in BERT ay ku xiran tahay shahaadadaas aad ka weyn in ay ka kooban tahay kontrollyada luuqadaha lagu saleeyo. Sababtaasi waxay muujiyaan awooddayada ku habboonaanta isbedelinta labawejiilayaasha ee ay ka kooban yihiin dhinacyada kooxaha ee ku qoran qaabka luuqada.', 'sv': 'Som namnet antyder, kontextualiserade representationer av språk motiveras vanligtvis av deras förmåga att koda sammanhang. Vilka aspekter av sammanhanget fångas upp av sådana framställningar? Vi introducerar ett tillvägagångssätt för att hantera denna fråga med hjälp av Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA). Som fallstudier undersöker vi i vilken grad ett verbinbäddning kodar verbets ämne, ett pronomen inbäddning kodar pronomens föregångare och en fullmeningsrepresentation kodar meningens huvudord (bestämd av en beroendetolkning). I alla fall visar vi att BERT:s kontextuella inbäddningar återspeglar det språkliga beroendet som studeras, och att BERT kodar dessa beroenden i högre grad än det kodar mindre språkligt framträdande kontroller. Dessa resultat visar på vår förmåga att bedöma mellan hypoteser om vilka aspekter av kontext som kodas i representationer av språk.', 'ta': 'பெயர் குறிப்பிடும் போது, மொழியின் குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டு சூழல் குறியீட்டிடுவதற்கான இயல்பாக ஊக்கப்படு இவ்வாறு பிரதிநிதிகளால் எந்த பகுதிகள் பிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது? நாம் இந்த கேள்வியை விளக்க ஒரு வழியை அறிமுகப்படுத்துகிறோம். பிரதிநிதி ஒற்றை ஆர்சா (RSA) பயன்படுத்தும். விஷயத்தின் படிப்பாடுகளாக நாம் வார்த்தை குறியீட்டில் குறியீட்டை குறியிடும் படிவத்தை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம், ஒரு சுருக்கமான குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டிடும், ஒரு மு அனைத்து நிகழ்ச்சிகளிலும், பிரெட்டின் பொருள்களின் பிரச்சனைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழியின் சார்பை பிரித்துக் கொள்கிறோம். பிரெட்டின் சார்பு மொழியில் வி இந்த முடிவுகள் மொழியின் குறிப்பிட்டுக் கொண்டிருக்கும் கருத்துக்களுக்கு இடையே ஒத்திசைப்படுத்துவதற்கான நம் இயல', 'ur': 'جس طرح نام کا معلوم ہوتا ہے، زبان کی کنٹیسٹ کی تعلیمات معمولاً ان کی کنٹیسٹ کے قابلیت کے ذریعہ منسوب ہوتی ہے. اس طرح کی تصویر کی کس قسمت کو پکڑے جاتے ہیں؟ ہم اس سؤال کے بارے میں ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ اس طریقہ کو معرفی کریں۔ کیس مطالعہ کے طور پر، ہم اس درجہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جس پر ایک ورب مطالعہ ورب کی موضوع کا کوڈ کرتا ہے، ایک اپنا مطالعہ مطالعہ اپنا انٹیسڈینٹ کا کوڈ کرتا ہے، اور ایک پورا مطالعہ مطالعہ کلمہ کے سر کلمہ کو کوڈ کرتا ہے (جس طرح ایک اپنا اعتباری پارس ہم ہر قسمت میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ BERT کی کنٹکسٹیٹ ڈیڈینگ کی مطالعہ کی زبان کی اعتباری کو دکھاتے ہیں اور BERT نے ان اعتباری کو اس سے زیادہ درجہ سے زیادہ محفوظ کرتا ہے یہ نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارے تقریبا کے قابل تفصیل کے درمیان فیصلہ کرنا ہے کہ کس طرح کائنات کی نسبت زبان کی نمونات میں کوڈ کیے جاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Nomi ichida, tilning taʼminlovchi representarini oddiy kodlash imkoniyatini kodlash imkoniyatini yaratish mumkin. Bu tashkilotlar bilan qanday qismlarni qabul qiladi? Biz bu savollarni Representativ Similar Analysi (RSA) bilan ishlatish uchun qaror qilamiz. Masalan o'rganishni tasavvur qilamiz, so'zlar mavzusini qo'yish darajasini o'rganamiz. Ko'rib chiqarish mumkin. Bu soʻzni tashkilotga ega bo'ladi. Hamma holatda biz BERT'ning davomida taʼminlov qilinganligini o'rganishni anglatdik, BERT'ning tillarini o'qishga ishlatishni anglatadi, va BERT'ning ishlatilganlarini o'rganishdan ko'proq darajaga qo'shiladi. Ushbu natijalar tilning tashkilotlarida munosabatlarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Như cái tên ngụ ý, các biểu tượng ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ được hình dung thúc đẩy bởi khả năng mã hóa ngữ cảnh. Những khía cạnh ngữ cảnh nào được ghi nhận bởi các biểu tượng này? Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp để giải quyết vấn đề này bằng phân tích mô phỏng miễn dịch (RSA). Như các trường hợp nghiên cứu, chúng tôi điều tra mức độ tổ hợp từ mã hóa vật chủ của động từ, một s ự nhúng đại từ mã hóa khả năng tiền sử của đại từ, và một đại từ đại từ to àn phần mã hóa chữ đầu của câu nói (như được phân tích bởi một phân tích phụ thuộc). Trong mọi trường hợp, chúng tôi cho thấy s ự tác nhân tình hình của BERT phản ánh sự phụ thuộc ngôn ngữ được nghiên cứu, và rằng BERT mã hóa các mối quan hệ này nhiều hơn là mã hóa các điều khiển kém phát triển ngôn ngữ. Những kết quả này chứng minh phương pháp của chúng ta có khả năng xác định giữa các giả thuyết về các khía cạnh ngữ cảnh được mã hóa ở các biểu tượng ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Както подсказва името, контекстуализираните представи на езика обикновено са мотивирани от способността им да кодират контекста. Кои аспекти на контекста са уловени от такива представи? Въвеждаме подход за решаване на този въпрос с помощта на анализ на представителната сходство. Като примерни проучвания изследваме степента, до която вграждането на глагол кодира предмета на глагола, вграждането на местоимението кодира предшественика на местоимението, а представянето на цялото изречение кодира главната дума на изречението (както се определя от анализ на зависимост). Във всички случаи показваме, че контекстуализираните вграждания на BERT отразяват изучаваната лингвистична зависимост и че BERT кодира тези зависимости в по-голяма степен, отколкото кодира по-малко лингвистично-значими контроли. Тези резултати демонстрират способността на нашия подход да преценяваме между хипотези кои аспекти на контекста са кодирани в представянето на езика.', 'hr': 'Kao što se zove, contextualizirani predstavnici jezika obično motiviraju njihova sposobnost kodiranja konteksta. Koji su aspekti konteksta uhvaćeni takvim predstavljanjem? Predstavljamo pristup rješavanju ovog pitanja koristeći predstavničku analizu sličnosti (RSA). Kao istraživanje slučajeva, istražujemo stupanj na kojoj se verb uključuje predmet verb a, pronoun ugrađenje kodira predsjednik pronouna, a predstavljanje pune rečenice kodira glavnu riječ rečenice (kao što je određeno razmatranjem zavisnosti). U svim slučajevima pokazujemo da kontekstualizirani integraciji BERT-a odražavaju proučavanje jezičke zavisnosti i da BERT kodira ove zavisnosti na veću stupnju nego kodira manje kontrole jezičke salije. Ovi rezultati pokazuju sposobnost našeg pristupa suđenju između hipoteze o kojima su aspektima konteksta kodirani u predstavljanju jezika.', 'id': 'Sebagaimana nama mengimplikasikan, persembahan kontekstualisasi bahasa biasanya dimotivasi oleh kemampuan mereka untuk mengkode konteks. Aspekt mana dari konteks tertangkap oleh representation seperti itu? Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk mengatasi pertanyaan ini dengan menggunakan Analisi Persamaan Perwakilan (RSA). Sebagai penelitian kasus, kami menyelidiki tingkat yang mana pembangunan verb mengkode subjek verb, pembangunan pronon mengkode sebelumnya pronon, dan representation kalimat penuh mengkode kata kepala kalimat (seperti ditentukan oleh analisis dependency). Dalam semua kasus, kami menunjukkan bahawa pembangunan kontekstualisasi BERT merefleksikan ketergantuan bahasa yang sedang dipelajari, dan bahwa BERT merekodkan ketergantuan tersebut ke tingkat yang lebih besar daripada merekodkan kontrol yang kurang penting secara bahasa. Hasil-hasil ini menunjukkan kemampuan pendekatan kita untuk menilai antara hipotesis tentang aspek konteks mana yang dikodeksi dalam representation bahasa.', 'de': 'Wie der Name schon sagt, werden kontextualisierte Repräsentationen von Sprache typischerweise durch ihre Fähigkeit motiviert, Kontext zu kodieren. Welche Aspekte des Kontexts werden durch solche Darstellungen erfasst? Wir stellen einen Ansatz vor, um diese Frage mittels Repräsentational Similarity Analysis (RSA) zu beantworten. Als Fallstudien untersuchen wir, inwieweit eine Verbeinbettung das Subjekt des Verbs kodiert, eine Pronomen Einbettung das Vorwort des Pronomen kodiert und eine vollständige Satzdarstellung das Kopfwort des Satzes kodiert (wie durch eine Abhängigkeitsparse bestimmt). In allen Fällen zeigen wir, dass die kontextualisierten Einbettungen von BERT die zu untersuchende linguistische Abhängigkeit widerspiegeln und dass BERT diese Abhängigkeiten stärker kodiert als weniger linguistisch signifikante Kontrollen. Diese Ergebnisse zeigen die Fähigkeit unseres Ansatzes, zwischen Hypothesen darüber zu entscheiden, welche Aspekte des Kontexts in Repräsentationen von Sprache kodiert sind.', 'da': "Som navnet antyder, er kontekstualiserede repræsentationer af sprog typisk motiveret af deres evne til at kode kontekst. Hvilke aspekter af sammenhængen fanges af sådanne repræsentationer? Vi introducerer en tilgang til at løse dette spørgsmål ved hjælp af Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA). Som casestudier undersøger vi, i hvilken grad et udsagnsord indlejring koder verbets emne, et stedord indlejring koder pronomens forudgående, og en fuld sætning repræsentation koder sætningens hovedord (bestemt af en afhængighedsfortolkning). I alle tilfælde viser vi, at BERT's kontekstualiserede indlejringer afspejler den sproglige afhængighed, der undersøges, og at BERT koder disse afhængigheder i højere grad, end det koder mindre sprogligt fremtrædende kontrol. Disse resultater viser vores tilgangs evne til at vurdere mellem hypoteser om, hvilke aspekter af kontekst der er kodet i repræsentationer af sprog.", 'nl': 'Zoals de naam al aangeeft, worden contextualiseerde representaties van taal meestal gemotiveerd door hun vermogen om context te coderen. Welke aspecten van context worden vastgelegd door dergelijke representaties? We introduceren een aanpak om deze vraag aan te pakken met behulp van Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA). Als casestudies onderzoeken we de mate waarin een werkwoord inbedding het onderwerp van het werkwoord codeert, een voornaamwoord inbedding het voorvoegsel van het voornaamwoord codeert en een volledige zinnrepresentatie codeert het hoofdwoord van de zin (zoals bepaald door een afhankelijkheidsparse). In alle gevallen laten we zien dat de contextualiseerde embeddings van BERT de bestudeerde linguïstische afhankelijkheid weerspiegelen en dat BERT deze afhankelijkheden in een grotere mate codeert dan minder linguïstisch opvallende controles. Deze resultaten tonen het vermogen van onze aanpak aan om te beslissen tussen hypothesen over welke aspecten van context zijn gecodeerd in representaties van taal.', 'tr': "Ady takyklaýar bolsa, duşuşykly dillerin ködlemeleri ködlemek ukyplaryna görä ruhlandyr. Bu ýaly suratlar tarapyndan kaýsy görnüşler çekilýär? Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA) kullanarak bu soruyu çözmek için bir yaklaşma tanıtıyoruz. Biz esaslar öwrenmelerinde, bir verbiň içinde bir verbiň resminiň kodmasynyň diplomyny barlaýarys, bir s özläni kodlaýar we doly sözläni kelläni kodlaýar Hemme ýagdaýda, BERT'yň synplandyrylan integratlaryň dil baglanyşygyny çaklaýandygyny görkezýäris we BERT'yň bu bağlyklaryny dil taýýarlanmagyndan ködleýändigini ködleýäris. Bu netijeler biziň ýaryşymyzyň hipotesiýalaryň barynda nähili aspektleriň diliniň görkezilişinde kodlanýandygyny görkezýär.", 'ko': '말 그대로 언어의 언어 환경화 표현은 일반적으로 그들이 언어 환경을 인코딩하는 능력에 의해 구동된다.이런 서술들은 언어 환경의 어떤 방면을 포착했습니까?대표적인 유사성 분석(RSA)을 사용해 이 문제를 해결하는 방법을 소개했다.사례 연구로서 우리는 삽입동사가 동사 주어에 대한 인코딩 정도, 삽입대명사가 대명사에 대한 선행어에 대한 인코딩 정도, 그리고 완전한 문장이 문장의 첫 단어에 대한 인코딩 정도(의존성 분석에 의해 확정됨)를 조사했다.모든 상황에서 우리는 버트의 언어 환경화 삽입은 연구한 언어 의존성을 반영하고 버트의 이러한 의존성에 대한 인코딩 정도는 뚜렷하지 않은 언어 제어에 대한 인코딩 정도보다 높다는 것을 알 수 있다.이러한 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 언어 환경의 어떤 측면이 언어 표징에서의 가설에 인코딩되어 판단될 수 있는지를 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'همانطور که نام معرفی می\u200cشود، نمایش\u200cهای متوسط زبان معمولاً توسط توانایی آنها برای رمزبندی محیط تحریک می\u200cشود. کدوم نقطه\u200cهای محیط توسط چنین نمایش\u200cهایی گرفته می\u200cشوند؟ ما با استفاده از تحلیل شبیه\u200cسازی نمایندگان (RSA) یک روش برای حل این سوال را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. به عنوان مطالعه پرونده\u200cها، درجه تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که یک کلمه داخل کردن موضوع کلمه را رمز می\u200cکند، یک کلمه داخل کردن پیشنهاد کلمه را رمز می\u200cکند، و یک نمایش کلمه کامل کلمه کلمه کلمه کلمه را رمز می\u200cکند (به عنوان یک تحقیق بستگی تعیین می\u200cکند). در همه موارد، ما نشان می دهیم که شرکت\u200cهای متوسط BERT، بستگی زبان\u200cشناسی که تحقیق می\u200cشود، نشان می\u200cدهند، و BERT این بستگی\u200cها را به درجه بزرگتر از کنترل\u200cهای کوچک زبان\u200cشناسی کوچک می\u200cکند. این نتیجه\u200cها توانایی دسترسی ما را برای تصمیم دادن بین فرضیه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که در مورد کدام نقطه\u200cهای محیط در نمایش\u200cهای زبان رمز شده\u200cاند.', 'sw': 'Kama jina linavyomaanisha, uwakilishi wa lugha wenye utata huhamasishwa kwa uwezo wao wa kuingia muktadha. Sehemu gani za muktadha zinachukuliwa na uwakilishi wa namna hiyo? Tunaonyesha mbinu ya kuhoji swali hili kwa kutumia uchambuzi wa Umoja wa Mataifa (RSA). Kama utafiti wa kesi, tunachunguza kiwango ambacho neno linajumuisha mada ya maneno hayo, muingizaji mkubwa unahusisha kile kinachoonyesha hisia, na uwakilishi wa hukumu kamili unajumuisha neno la hukumu (kama ilivyodetermined na bunge la kutegemea). Katika matukio yote, tunaonyesha kuwa vikwazo vya BERT vinavyoonyesha kutegemea kwa lugha zinaonyesha kutegemea kwa lugha, na kwamba BERT inajumuisha kutegemea hizi kwa daraja kubwa zaidi kuliko ilivyokuwa na udhibiti mdogo wa madini ya lugha. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha uwezo wa namna yetu ya kubadilishana kati ya unafiki ambazo mambo yanahusiana na muktadha yanajumuishwa katika uwakilishi wa lugha.', 'sq': 'Siç nënkupton emri, përfaqësimet kontekstuale të gjuhës janë tipikisht të motivuara nga aftësia e tyre për të koduar kontekstin. Which aspects of context are captured by such representations?  Ne futim një qasje për të trajtuar këtë pyetje duke përdorur Analizën Përfaqësuese të Similarisë (RSA). Si studime rastesh, ne hetojmë shkallën në të cilën një verb përfshirë kodon subjektin e verbit, një përmshirje e pronumit kodon përpara pronumit dhe një përfaqësim me fjalë të plotë kodon fjalën kryesore të fjalës (siç përcaktohet nga një analizim varësie). Në të gjitha rastet, ne tregojmë se përfshirjet kontekstuale të BERT reflektojnë varësinë gjuhësore që po studiohet dhe se BERT kodon këto varësime në një shkallë më të madhe sesa kodon kontrollin më pak gjuhësor-salient. These results demonstrate the ability of our approach to adjudicate between hypotheses about which aspects of context are encoded in representations of language.', 'az': "Adın işarə yaradıldığı kimi, dillərin müxtəlif tərzlərini yayınlaşdırmaq bacarılıqları ilə dəyişdirilir. Bu göstəricilər kimin məlumatlarına daxil edilir? Biz bu soruşmayı Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA) vasitəsilə çəkmək üçün bir yol göstəririk. Öyrəndiyimiz məs ələlər kimi, bir verb içərisində bir verb məsələsini kodlayan dərəcəsini incidirik, bir pronoun içərisində pronoun'un antecedentini kodlayır, və bütün sözlərin təsdiqlənməsi cümlənin baş sözünü kodlayır (bağlılılıq analizi ilə müəyyən edilmiş kimi). Bütün məs ələlərdə, BERT'nin müxtəlif inşallarının dil bağlılığını oxuyacağını göstərdik və BERT bu bağlılıqları dil-saliyat kontrollərindən daha böyük bir dərəfə kodlayır. Bu sonuçlar bizim tərəfimizin hekayətlərinin dillərin göstərilməsi barəsində hansı tərəflərinin kodlandığı hipotesi arasında hökm vermək bacarılığını göstərir.", 'bn': 'যেমন নামের মানে বলা হয়, ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব সাধারণত ত তাদের এনকোড করার ক্ষমতা দ্বারা উদ্দেশ্য এই ধরনের প্রতিনিধিত্ব দ্বারা কোন প্রতিনিধিত্ব গ্রহণ করা হয়? প্রতিনিধিত্বের একই ধরনের বিশ্লেষণ ব্যবহার করে এই প্রশ্নের কথা বলার একটি উপায় আমরা পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। কেসের গবেষণা হিসেবে আমরা তদন্ত করি যে ভার্বের বিষয়টিকে এনকোডিং করা হয়েছে তার ডিগ্রীর মধ্যে, একটি প্রধান বিষয়টি প্রজ্ঞার প্রতিনিধি এনকোডেন্ট এবং একটি পুরো শাস্তি প্রতিনিধিত সব ক্ষেত্রে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বের্টের প্রতিযোগিতার বিভিন্ন ভাষার নির্ভর প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিফলিত করে যে ভাষায় পড়া হচ্ছে, আর বের্টি এই বিষয়গুলোর নির্ভর করে ভাষায় এই ফলাফল দেখিয়েছে যে ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বে প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষমতার ক্ষমতা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে।', 'am': 'ስሙ እንደሚያሳየው፣ የቋንቋ መልዕክቶች በተጨማሪነት የሆኑት የሆኑትን ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል በመቻላቸው ይነግሳሉ፡፡ እንደዚህ ባለ መልዕክቶች ምን ይያዛሉ? ይህንን ጥያቄ ለመጠየቅ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጉዳዩ ትምህርት፣ የቃላትን ጉዳይ የሚቃወሙትን ድምፅ እናመረምርዋለን፣ የግንኙነቱ አካባቢ እና ሙሉ የፍርድ መልዕክት የፍርዱን ራስ ቃል (የታመነ ፓርቲ እንደተፈጸመ) እናስረዳለን፡፡ በሁሉም ጉዳይ፣ የBERT አካባቢዎች የቋንቋዊ ድጋፍ መተማርከውን እንደሚያሳየው እና BERT እነዚህን ተደጋፊዎች ከቋንቋዊ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ታጋሽነት ከታናሹ ክፍል ወደሚለይ ደረጃ ይዘረጋል፡፡ እነዚህ ፍጥረቶች የቋንቋዎች መልዕክቶች በቋንቋ ማሳየት የሚችሉትን የንፍቅና ማቀናቀል መቻላችንን ያሳያል፡፡', 'bs': 'Kao što se zove, kontekstualizirane predstave jezika obično su motivisane njihovom sposobnošću kodiranja konteksta. Koji su aspekti konteksta uhvaćeni takvim predstavljanjem? Predstavljamo pristup rješavanju ovog pitanja koristeći predstavničku analizu sličnosti (RSA). Kao istraživanje slučajeva, istražujemo stepenicu na kojoj se verb uključuje u temu verb a, pronoun ugrađenje kodira predsjednik pronouna, a predstavljanje pune rečenice kodira glavnu riječ rečenice (kao što je određeno razmatranjem zavisnosti). U svim slučajevima pokazujemo da kontekstualizirani integraciji BERT-a odražavaju proučavanje jezičke zavisnosti i da BERT kodira ove zavisnosti na veću stupnju nego kodira manje kontrole jezičke salije. Ovi rezultati pokazuju sposobnost našeg pristupa suđenju između hipoteze o kojima su aspektima konteksta kodirani u predstavljanju jezika.', 'ca': "As the name implies, contextualized representations of language are typically motivated by their ability to encode context.  Quins aspectes del context són capturats per aquestes representacions? Introduïm un enfocament per abordar aquesta qüestió fent servir l'Anàlisi de Similaritat Representacional (RSA). Com a estudis de cas, investigam el grau en què un verb incorporant codifica el tema del verb, un pronunci incorporant codifica l'antecedent del pronunci, i una representació de frases completas codifica la paraula del cap de la frase (determinada per un paràsit de dependencia). En tots els casos, demostram que les integracions contextualitzades del BERT reflexionan la dependencia lingüística estudiada, i que el BERT codifica aquestes dependencies en un grau més gran que codifica controls menys salients lingüísticament. Aquests resultats demostren l'habilitat del nostre enfocament de jutjar entre hipòtesis sobre quins aspectes del context estan codificats en representacions del llenguatge.", 'cs': 'Jak název napovídá, kontextualizované reprezentace jazyka jsou obvykle motivovány jejich schopností kódovat kontext. Jaké aspekty kontextu jsou zachyceny takovými reprezentacemi? Představujeme přístup k řešení této otázky pomocí analýzy reprezentační podobnosti (RSA). Jako případové studie zkoumáme, do jaké míry vkládání slovesa kóduje subjekt slovesa, vkládání zájmen kóduje předchůdce zájmena a reprezentace celé věty kóduje hlavní slovo věty (jak určuje parse závislosti). Ve všech případech ukazujeme, že kontextualizované vložení BERT odrážejí studovanou lingvistickou závislost a že BERT tyto závislosti kóduje ve větší míře než kóduje méně lingvisticky významné ovládací prvky. Tyto výsledky ukazují schopnost našeho přístupu rozhodovat mezi hypotézou, které aspekty kontextu jsou zakódovány v reprezentacích jazyka.', 'af': "Soos die naam impliseer, word contextualiseerde voorstellings van taal tipies motiveer deur hul moontlikheid om konteks te kodeer. Watter aspekte van konteks word deur sodanige voorstellings gevang? Ons introduseer 'n toegang om hierdie vraag te adres met die gebruik van Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA). Soos geval studies, ondersoek ons die grad waarop 'n verb inbetering die verb se onderwerp kodeer, 'n pronoun inbetering kodeer die voorwerp se antecedente, en 'n volledige voorwerp kodeer die voorwerp se kopwoord (soos bepaal deur 'n afhanklikheidverwerking). In alle gevalle, wys ons dat BERT se kontekstualiseerde inbêdinge reflekteer die lingvisse afhanklikheid wat ondersoek word, en dat BERT hierdie afhanklikhede na 'n groter grad kodeer a s dit kodeer minder lingvisse-saliense kontroles. Hierdie resultate wys die moontlikheid van ons toegang tot oordeel tussen hipotees waarvan aspekte van konteks in voorstellings van taal kodeer word.", 'fi': 'Kuten nimestä käy ilmi, kontekstualisoituja kielen esityksiä motivoi tyypillisesti niiden kyky koodata kontekstia. Mitä kontekstin näkökohtia tällaiset esitykset kuvaavat? Esitämme lähestymistavan tämän kysymyksen ratkaisemiseen käyttämällä Representational Similarity Analysis (RSA) -analyysiä. Tapaustutkimuksina tutkimme, missä määrin verbi-upotus koodaa verbin subjektin, pronomini-upotus koodaa pronominin edeltäjän ja koko lauseen esitys koodaa lauseen pääsanan (riippuvuuskäsittelyn perusteella). Kaikissa tapauksissa osoitamme, että BERT:n kontekstuaaliset upotukset heijastavat tutkittavaa kielellistä riippuvuutta ja että BERT koodaa nämä riippuvuudet suuremmassa määrin kuin se koodaa vähemmän kielellisesti merkittäviä kontrolleja. Nämä tulokset osoittavat lähestymistapamme kyvyn arvioida hypoteeseja siitä, mitkä kontekstin näkökohdat on koodattu kielen representaatioihin.', 'hy': 'Ինչպես անունը նշանակում է, լեզվի կոնտեքստիալ ներկայացումները սովորաբար խթանում են իրենց կոնտեքստի կոդավորման ունակությունից: Ի՞նչ կոնտեքստի ասպեկտներ են ներկայացնում նման ներկայացումները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս հարցին լուծելու մոտեցում՝ օգտագործելով ներկայացրական նմանության վերլուծությունը: Ինչպես դեպքերի ուսումնասիրություններ, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով բայի ներառումը կոդավորում է բայի թեման, բայի ներառումը կոդավորում է բայի նախկին, և ամբողջ նախադասության ներկայացումը կոդավորում է նախադասության գլխավոր բառը (ինչպես որոշվում է կախվածության վերլուծում): Բոլոր դեպքերում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ BER-ի կոնտեքստիալ ներդրումները արտացոլում են ուսումնասիրում եղած լեզվաբանական կախվածությունը, և որ BER-ը ավելի մեծ չափով կոդավորում է այդ կախվածությունները, քան այն կոդավորում է ավելի քիչ լեզվաբանական կարևոր կառավարում Այս արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոտեցումների հնարավորությունը դատել հիպոթեզների միջև այն մասին, թե որպիսի կոնտեքստի ասպեկտներ են կոդված լեզվի ներկայացումներում:', 'et': 'Nagu nimi ütleb, motiveerib kontekstilised keele esitused tavaliselt nende võime konteksti kodeerida. Milliseid konteksti aspekte sellised esitused kajastavad? Tutvustame lähenemisviisi selle küsimuse lahendamiseks, kasutades representatsioonilist sarnasust analüüsi (RSA). Juhtumiuuringutes uurime, mil määral verbi manustamine kodeerib verbi subjekti, asenime manustamine kodeerib asenime eelnevat ja täislauseline esitus kodeerib lause peasõna (määratud sõltuvuse parsimise abil). Kõigil juhtudel näitame, et BERT kontekstipõhised manustamised peegeldavad uuritavat keelelist sõltuvust ja et BERT kodeerib neid sõltuvusi suuremal määral kui see kodeerib vähem keeleliselt tähtsaid kontrolle. Need tulemused näitavad meie lähenemisviisi võimet otsustada hüpoteeside vahel, millised konteksti aspektid on kodeeritud keele esitustes.', 'jv': 'Tambah ono jenenge dipenalke, kelangan langkung Aspect ratio Awak dhéwé nggawe akses kanggo nganggo kesempatan iki nggambar Simularity Test (rsA) nyebutne gambar. Where there is a verb embedding Nang kabeh, kita ngomong nik bakulang kode nggunaken BERT kuwi nggawe ngulingke dipulangan ingkang dipulangan, lan BERT kuwi nggo kode dipulangan ingkang dipulangan sing luwih dumadhi kuwi nggo kode kuwi nggo kode kuwi jenis maneh dumadhi. Rejalaké iki bakal kelompok kapan anyar nggawe ngubah winih kanggo masalah', 'ha': "Kama da sunan ke ƙunsa, an yi motsi da masu cikin harshen da aka ƙididdige su a kan iyakar su kodi. Wane aspects daga mazaɓa na kãma su kamar wannan? Munã ƙara wani mataimaki da za'a yi addu'a ga wannan tambayi da ake yi amfani da Analyze na Nabakan Nabaka (RSA). Kama karatun masu amfani da musamman sarki, za mu yi amfani da daraja wanda wani marubuci ke ƙunsa da matsayin maganar verb, ko da mai ƙunci ya kodi na danne mai halartawa, kuma a cikakken cewa yana ƙunsa da kalmar maganar maganar (kamar da aka ƙayyade wani parse mai dõgara). In all cases, we show that BERT's contextualized embeddings reflect the linguistic dependency being studied, and that BERT encodes these dependencies to a greater degree than it encodes less linguistically-salient controls.  Haƙĩƙa waɗannan matsalar sun nuna awonmu ga ka yi sauri a tsakanin misãlai da ke da manyan muhimmanci na kodi cikin misãlai na harshe.", 'sk': 'Kot že ime pove, kontekstualizirane predstavitve jezika običajno motivirajo njihova sposobnost kodiranja konteksta. Katere vidike konteksta zajemajo take predstavitve? Predstavljamo pristop k reševanju tega vprašanja z uporabo reprezentativne analize podobnosti (RSA). Kot študije primerov raziskujemo stopnjo, v kateri vdelava glagola kodira glagolov subjekt, vdelava zaimka kodira predhodni zaimek, predstavitev celotnega stavka pa kodira glavno besedo stavka (kot določa razčlenitev odvisnosti). V vseh primerih pokažemo, da kontekstualizirane vdelave BERT odražajo jezikovno odvisnost, ki se preučuje, in da BERT te odvisnosti kodira v večji meri kot kodira manj jezikovno pomembne kontrole. Ti rezultati kažejo sposobnost našega pristopa za presojanje med hipotezami o tem, kateri vidiki konteksta so kodirani v reprezentacijah jezika.', 'bo': 'མིང་དེ་གསལ་བཀོད་པ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་ན་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཁ་ཡུག་ཅིག་གསལ འདི་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་གང་ཡིན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་སྤྱད་ནས་འདྲི་ཚིག་འདི་ཁ་ཤས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་བྱེད། དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་ཚིག་ཀྱི་ཚིག འུ་ཅག་གིས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཚང་མཚམས་ཞིབ་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དག་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན། གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་དང་ཕྱོགས་དབར་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་སྟོན་རུང་བ་དག་གི་ཡིག་རྟོགས་དང་།', 'he': "כפי שהשם מרמז, מייצגות קונטוקטוליזציות של שפה מוטיבציות בדרך כלל על ידי היכולת שלהם לקוד קונטקסט. Which aspects of context are captured by such representations?  אנחנו מציגים גישה להתמודד עם השאלה הזאת באמצעות ניתוח דמיון מייצג (RSA). בתור מחקרי מקרים, אנו חוקרים את המידה שבה איברים קודמים את הנושא של איברים, איברים קודמים את הקודמים של איברים, ויוצג משפט מלא קודם את מילת הראש של המשפט (כפי שקבע על ידי מחקר תלויות). In all cases, we show that BERT's contextualized embeddings reflect the linguistic dependency being studied, and that BERT encodes these dependencies to a greater degree than it encodes less linguistically-salient controls.  These results demonstrate the ability of our approach to adjudicate between hypotheses about which aspects of context are encoded in representations of language."}
{'en': 'The Devil is in the Details : Evaluating Limitations of Transformer-based Methods for Granular Tasks', 'ar': 'الشيطان في التفاصيل: تقييم قيود الأساليب القائمة على المحولات للمهام الحبيبية', 'fr': 'Le diable se cache dans les détails\xa0: évaluation des limites des méthodes basées sur les transformateurs pour les tâches granulaires', 'es': 'El problema está en los detalles: evaluación de las limitaciones de los métodos basados en transformadores para tareas granulares', 'pt': 'O diabo está nos detalhes: avaliando limitações de métodos baseados em transformadores para tarefas granulares', 'ja': '悪魔は、詳細：粒状タスクのための変圧器ベースの方法の制限を評価しています', 'zh': '细节决定成败:估 Transformer 之法对粒度任之局限性', 'hi': 'शैतान विवरण में है: दानेदार कार्यों के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित विधियों की सीमाओं का मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Дьявол в деталях: оценка ограничений методов на основе трансформаторов для гранулированных задач', 'ga': 'Tá an Diabhal sna Sonraí: Ag Measúnú Teorainneacha ar Mhodhanna Bunaithe ar Chlaochladán le haghaidh Tascanna Gráinneacha', 'ka': 'დეგალის განსაზღვრებულებაში არის: ტრანფორმაციის განსაზღვრებული მეტოდიების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Ο Διάβολος βρίσκεται στις λεπτομέρειες: Αξιολόγηση των περιορισμών των μεθόδων που βασίζονται στον μετασχηματιστή για τις κοκκώδεις εργασίες', 'hu': 'Az ördög a részletekben van: A transzformátor alapú módszerek korlátozásainak értékelése granuláris feladatokhoz', 'kk': 'Қатысушы Егжей- тегжейінде: Түрлі тапсырмалар үшін түрлендіру тәсілдерінің шектеулерін оқу', 'it': 'Il diavolo è nei dettagli: valutare le limitazioni dei metodi basati su trasformatori per compiti granulari', 'lt': 'Velnias išsamiai aprašytas: granulių užduočių transformatorių metodų apribojimų vertinimas', 'mk': 'The Devil is in the Details: Evaluating Limitations of Transformer-based Methods for Granular Tasks', 'ml': 'പിശാച് വിശദീകരണങ്ങളിലുണ്ട്: ഗ്രാനിലുള്ള ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരിധികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Id-Djalli jinsab fid-Dettalji: Evalwazzjoni tal-Limitazzjonijiet tal-Metodi bbażati fuq it-Trasformatori għal Kompiti Granulari', 'ms': 'Syaitan ada dalam Perincian: Menghargai Had Kaedah Berasas Transformer untuk Tugas Granular', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс нарийн мэдээллээр илэрхийлдэг: Гранваларлын ажлын шилжүүлэгчдийн хязгаарлалтыг үнэлэх', 'no': 'Devilen er i detaljane: Evaluerer avgrensingar av transformeringsbaserte metodar for grenseoppgåver', 'ro': 'Diavolul este în detalii: Evaluarea limitărilor metodelor bazate pe transformatori pentru sarcini granulare', 'pl': 'Diabeł jest w szczegółach: Ocena ograniczeń metod opartych na transformatorze dla zadań granulowych', 'sv': 'Djävulen är i detaljerna: Utvärdering av begränsningar av transformatorbaserade metoder för granulära uppgifter', 'so': 'Ibliiska waxaa ku jira macluumaadka: Evaluating Limitations of Methods of the former-based methods of Granular shaqooyinka', 'ur': 'شیطان تفصیل میں ہے: تغییر پھیلانے کے معاملہ کی محدودیت کا ارزش کرنا', 'sr': 'Vrag je u detaljima: procjenjivanje ograničenja metoda na transformaciji za granularne zadatke', 'si': 'ඩේවිල් විස්තරයේ තියෙන්නේ: ග්\u200dරාන්ලර් වැඩේ විස්තරයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය විධානය අවශ්\u200dයය', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Quỷ dữ nằm trong các Chi tiết: Đánh giá giới hạn của các phương pháp biến hình', 'bg': 'Дяволът е в детайлите: Оценяване на ограниченията на трансформаторните методи за гранулирани задачи', 'hr': 'Vrag je u detaljima: procjena ograničenja metoda transformera za granularne zadatke', 'da': 'Djævelen er i detaljerne: Evaluering af begrænsninger af transformatorbaserede metoder til granulære opgaver', 'nl': 'De duivel zit in de details: het evalueren van beperkingen van transformatorgebaseerde methoden voor granulaire taken', 'de': 'Der Teufel steckt im Detail: Evaluation Limitations of Transformer-based Methods for Granular Tasks', 'id': 'Iblis ada dalam rincian: Evaluasi Limitasi Metode Berdasar Transformer untuk Tugas Granular', 'fa': 'شیطان در جزئیات است: ارزیابی محدودیت روش\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده برای کارهای بزرگی', 'ko': '마귀는 디테일에 있다: 변환기 기반의 세립도 작업 방법의 한계를 평가한다', 'sw': "Shet'ani yupo kwenye maelezo: Kupima Mipaka ya Miundo ya Kigawanya", 'af': 'Die duiwel is in die Details: Evalueer beperkings van Transformer-gebaseerde metodes vir Granulare Opdragte', 'tr': 'Hat Ta첵첵arlarynda: Ullan챌ylar Ta첵첵arlamak 체챌in Hatlary Ta첵첵arlamak', 'sq': 'Djalli është në detajet: vlerësimi i kufizimeve të metodave të bazuara në transformime për detyrat granulare', 'am': 'The Devil is in the Details: Evaluating Limitations of Transformer-based Methods for Granular Tasks', 'bn': 'শয়তান বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত: গ্রান্নালুয়াল কাজের জন্য পরিবর্তন ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির সীমাবদ্ধ', 'az': 'Ňěeytan detallardadńĪr: Transformer-based T…ôrc√ľm…ôl…ôrinin QńĪymetl…ôrini QńĪymetl…ôndirm…ôk', 'hy': 'Սատանան մանրամասներում է. Գրանուլար առաջադրանքների վերաբերյալ տրանֆերմետրերի սահմանափակումների գնահատումը', 'bs': 'Vrag je u detaljima: procjenjivanje ograničenja metoda transformatora za granularne zadatke', 'ca': 'El Diable està en els detalls: Evaluation Limitations of Transformer-based Methods for Granular Tasks', 'cs': 'Ďábel je v detailech: Hodnocení omezení transformátorových metod pro granulární úlohy', 'et': 'Kurat on detailides: Transformeritel põhinevate meetodite piirangute hindamine graanuliste ülesannete jaoks', 'fi': 'Paholainen on yksityiskohdissa: Muuntajapohjaisten menetelmien rajoitusten arviointi rakeistehtävissä', 'jv': 'The Device is in the Details: invaluing limitations of Transformer-supported Methods for granular tasks', 'ha': 'Shaiɗan yana cikin Kwamfyuta: Ana ƙayyade Limits of Transformer-based Method for Hijjare', 'he': 'השטן נמצא בפרטים:', 'sk': 'Hudič je v podrobnostih: Ocenjevanje omejitev metod transformatorjev za zrnata opravila', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་ཆས་འདི་གསལ་བཤད་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྨས་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Contextual embeddings derived from transformer-based neural language models have shown state-of-the-art performance for various tasks such as question answering, sentiment analysis, and textual similarity in recent years. Extensive work shows how accurately such models can represent abstract, semantic information present in text. In this expository work, we explore a tangent direction and analyze such models’ performance on tasks that require a more granular level of representation. We focus on the problem of textual similarity from two perspectives : matching documents on a granular level (requiring embeddings to capture fine-grained attributes in the text), and an abstract level (requiring embeddings to capture overall textual semantics). We empirically demonstrate, across two datasets from different domains, that despite high performance in abstract document matching as expected, contextual embeddings are consistently (and at times, vastly) outperformed by simple baselines like TF-IDF for more granular tasks. We then propose a simple but effective method to incorporate TF-IDF into models that use contextual embeddings, achieving relative improvements of up to 36 % on granular tasks.', 'ar': 'أظهرت عمليات التضمين السياقية المستمدة من نماذج اللغة العصبية القائمة على المحولات أداءً متطورًا لمهام مختلفة مثل الإجابة على الأسئلة وتحليل المشاعر والتشابه النصي في السنوات الأخيرة. يُظهر العمل المكثف مدى دقة مثل هذه النماذج في تمثيل المعلومات المجردة والدلالية الموجودة في النص. في هذا العمل التوضيحي ، نستكشف اتجاهًا ملموسًا ونحلل أداء مثل هذه النماذج في المهام التي تتطلب مستوى تمثيل أكثر دقة. نحن نركز على مشكلة التشابه النصي من منظورين: مطابقة المستندات على مستوى دقيق (تتطلب الزخارف لالتقاط سمات دقيقة الحبيبات في النص) ، ومستوى مجرد (يتطلب الزخارف لالتقاط الدلالات النصية الشاملة). لقد أثبتنا تجريبياً ، عبر مجموعتي بيانات من مجالات مختلفة ، أنه على الرغم من الأداء العالي في مطابقة المستندات المجردة كما هو متوقع ، فإن عمليات التضمين السياقية تتفوق باستمرار (وفي بعض الأحيان ، إلى حد كبير) عن طريق خطوط أساسية بسيطة مثل TF-IDF للقيام بمهام أكثر دقة. ثم نقترح طريقة بسيطة ولكنها فعالة لدمج TF-IDF في النماذج التي تستخدم الزخارف السياقية ، وتحقيق تحسينات نسبية تصل إلى 36٪ في المهام الدقيقة.', 'es': 'Las incorporaciones contextuales derivadas de modelos de lenguaje neuronal basados en transformadores han demostrado un rendimiento de vanguardia para diversas tareas, como la respuesta a preguntas, el análisis de sentimientos y la similitud textual en los últimos años. Un extenso trabajo muestra con qué precisión estos modelos pueden representar información semántica abstracta presente en el texto. En este trabajo expositivo, exploramos una dirección tangente y analizamos el rendimiento de dichos modelos en tareas que requieren un nivel de representación más granular. Nos centramos en el problema de la similitud textual desde dos perspectivas: hacer coincidir los documentos en un nivel granular (que requiere incrustaciones para capturar atributos detallados en el texto) y un nivel abstracto (que requiere incrustaciones para capturar la semántica textual general). Demostramos empíricamente, en dos conjuntos de datos de diferentes dominios, que a pesar del alto rendimiento en la comparación de documentos abstractos como se esperaba, las incrustaciones contextuales son superadas de manera consistente (y a veces, enormemente) por líneas de base simples como TF-IDF para tareas más granulares. Luego, proponemos un método simple pero efectivo para incorporar TF-IDF en modelos que utilizan incrustaciones contextuales, logrando mejoras relativas de hasta un 36% en las tareas granulares.', 'pt': 'Embeddings contextuais derivados de modelos de linguagem neural baseados em transformadores mostraram desempenho de última geração para várias tarefas, como resposta a perguntas, análise de sentimentos e similaridade textual nos últimos anos. Um extenso trabalho mostra com que precisão esses modelos podem representar informações abstratas e semânticas presentes no texto. Neste trabalho expositivo, exploramos uma direção tangente e analisamos o desempenho de tais modelos em tarefas que exigem um nível de representação mais granular. Nós nos concentramos no problema da similaridade textual a partir de duas perspectivas: correspondência de documentos em um nível granular (exigindo embeddings para capturar atributos refinados no texto) e um nível abstrato (requerendo embeddings para capturar a semântica textual geral). Demonstramos empiricamente, em dois conjuntos de dados de diferentes domínios, que, apesar do alto desempenho na correspondência de documentos abstratos conforme o esperado, as incorporações contextuais são consistentemente (e às vezes muito) superadas por linhas de base simples como TF-IDF para tarefas mais granulares. Em seguida, propomos um método simples, mas eficaz, para incorporar o TF-IDF em modelos que usam embeddings contextuais, alcançando melhorias relativas de até 36% em tarefas granulares.', 'fr': "Les intégrations contextuelles dérivées de modèles de langage neuronal basés sur des transformateurs ont démontré des performances de pointe pour diverses tâches telles que la réponse aux questions, l'analyse des sentiments et la similitude textuelle au cours des dernières années. Des travaux approfondis montrent avec quelle précision de tels modèles peuvent représenter des informations sémantiques abstraites présentes dans un texte. Dans ce travail d'exposition, nous explorons une direction tangente et analysons les performances de tels modèles sur des tâches qui nécessitent un niveau de représentation plus granulaire. Nous nous concentrons sur le problème de la similitude textuelle sous deux angles\xa0: l'appariement de documents à un niveau granulaire (nécessitant des intégrations pour capturer des attributs fins dans le texte) et un niveau abstrait (nécessitant des intégrations pour capturer la sémantique textuelle globale). Nous démontrons empiriquement, sur deux ensembles de données provenant de domaines différents, que malgré des performances élevées en matière de correspondance de documents abstraits, comme prévu, les intégrations contextuelles sont systématiquement (et parfois largement) surpassées par des lignes de base simples comme TF-IDF pour des tâches plus granulaires. Nous proposons ensuite une méthode simple mais efficace pour intégrer TF-IDF dans des modèles qui utilisent des intégrations contextuelles, obtenant des améliorations relatives allant jusqu'à 36\xa0% sur les tâches granulaires.", 'ja': '変圧器ベースのニューラル言語モデルに由来する文脈埋め込みは、近年、質問応答、感情分析、テキストの類似性などのさまざまなタスクに対して最先端のパフォーマンスを示している。 広範な研究は、そのようなモデルがテキストに存在する抽象的で意味的な情報をいかに正確に表現できるかを示している。 この説明では、接線方向を探索し、より細かいレベルの表現を必要とするタスクに対するそのようなモデルのパフォーマンスを分析します。 私たちは、2つの観点からテキストの類似性の問題に焦点を当てています。粒度レベルでのドキュメントのマッチング（テキスト内の細かい属性をキャプチャするために埋め込みが必要）と抽象レベル（テキストの意味論全体をキャプチャするために埋め込みが必要）です。 私たちは、異なるドメインの2つのデータセットにわたって、予想通りに抽象的なドキュメントマッチングで高いパフォーマンスを発揮しているにもかかわらず、コンテキスト埋め込みは、より細かいタスクのためにTF - IDFのような単純なベースラインによって一貫して（時には大幅に）上回っていることを経験的に実証しています。 次に、コンテキスト埋め込みを使用するモデルにTF - IDFを組み込むためのシンプルで効果的な方法を提案し、粒状タスクで最大36 ％の相対的な改善を達成します。', 'zh': '近年以来,自转换器神经语言模上下文嵌诸务(如问答,情析文本相似性)最为先进。 大者明之,文本之象语义信也。 于此说明性事,探其一切线,而论其细者。 从两角注文本相似性:于粒度级上匹配文档(须嵌以获文本细粒度属性)抽象级(须嵌以获文本语义)。 二数集验,虽文档匹配之性甚高,上下文嵌更精细之任终始如一(或至大优于TF-IDF)基线。 然后举简而效,合TF-IDF于上下文,以成粒度之36%。', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल से व्युत्पन्न प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग ने हाल के वर्षों में प्रश्न उत्तर, भावना विश्लेषण और पाठ्य समानता जैसे विभिन्न कार्यों के लिए अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन दिखाया है। व्यापक कार्य से पता चलता है कि इस तरह के मॉडल पाठ में मौजूद अमूर्त, शब्दार्थ जानकारी का प्रतिनिधित्व कैसे कर सकते हैं। इस expository काम में, हम एक स्पर्शरेखा दिशा का पता लगाने और उन कार्यों पर ऐसे मॉडल के प्रदर्शन का विश्लेषण करते हैं जिनके लिए प्रतिनिधित्व के अधिक दानेदार स्तर की आवश्यकता होती है। हम दो दृष्टिकोणों से पाठ्य समानता की समस्या पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं: एक दानेदार स्तर पर मिलान दस्तावेजों (पाठ में ठीक-ठाक विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए एम्बेडिंग की आवश्यकता होती है), और एक अमूर्त स्तर (समग्र पाठ्य शब्दार्थ को कैप्चर करने के लिए एम्बेडिंग की आवश्यकता होती है)। हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से विभिन्न डोमेन से दो डेटासेट में प्रदर्शित करते हैं, कि उम्मीद के अनुसार अमूर्त दस्तावेज़ मिलान में उच्च प्रदर्शन के बावजूद, प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग लगातार (और कभी-कभी, विशाल रूप से) अधिक दानेदार कार्यों के लिए टीएफ-आईडीएफ जैसे सरल बेसलाइन द्वारा बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया जाता है। फिर हम टीएफ-आईडीएफ को उन मॉडलों में शामिल करने के लिए एक सरल लेकिन प्रभावी विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं, दानेदार कार्यों पर 36% तक के सापेक्ष सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Контекстные вложения, полученные из моделей нейронного языка на основе трансформаторов, показали современную производительность для различных задач, таких как ответы на вопросы, анализ настроений и текстовое сходство в последние годы. Обширная работа показывает, насколько точно такие модели могут представлять абстрактную, семантическую информацию, присутствующую в тексте. В этой пояснительной работе мы исследуем касательное направление и анализируем производительность таких моделей по задачам, требующим более детального уровня представления. Мы фокусируемся на проблеме текстового сходства с двух точек зрения: сопоставление документов на гранулярном уровне (требующем вложений для захвата мелкозернистых атрибутов в тексте) и абстрактном уровне (требующем вложений для захвата общей текстовой семантики). Мы эмпирически демонстрируем, в двух наборах данных из разных областей, что, несмотря на высокую производительность в абстрактном сопоставлении документов, как и ожидалось, контекстные вложения последовательно (а иногда и значительно) превосходят простые базовые линии, такие как TF-IDF, для более детальных задач. Затем мы предлагаем простой, но эффективный метод для включения TF-IDF в модели, которые используют контекстные встраивания, достигая относительных улучшений до 36% в гранулированных задачах.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá feidhmíocht úrscothach léirithe ag leabaithe comhthéacsúla a dhíorthaítear ó mhúnlaí néartheanga atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán maidir le tascanna éagsúla ar nós freagra ceisteanna, anailís meoin agus cosúlachtaí téacs. Léiríonn obair fhairsing cé chomh beacht is féidir le samhlacha den sórt sin faisnéis teibí shéimeantach atá i láthair sa téacs a léiriú. Sa saothar taispeántais seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar threo tadhlaí agus déanaimid anailís ar fheidhmíocht samhlacha dá leithéid ar thascanna a éilíonn leibhéal ionadaíochta níos gráinneach. Dírímid ar fhadhb na cosúlachta téacs ó dhá pheirspictíocht: doiciméid a mheaitseáil ar leibhéal gráinneach (a éilíonn leabú tréithe míne a ghabháil sa téacs), agus leibhéal teibí (a éilíonn leabaithe chun séimeantaic iomlán an téacs a ghabháil). Léirímid go heimpíreach, thar dhá thacar sonraí ó réimsí éagsúla, in ainneoin ardfheidhmíochta i gcomhoiriúnú teibí doiciméad mar a bhíothas ag súil leis, go bhfuil leabuithe comhthéacsúla go seasta (agus uaireanta, i bhfad) níos fearr ná bonnlínte simplí mar TF-IDF le haghaidh tascanna níos gráinneach. Molaimid ansin modh simplí ach éifeachtach chun TF-IDF a ionchorprú i múnlaí a úsáideann leabaithe comhthéacsúla, ag baint amach feabhsuithe coibhneasta suas le 36% ar thascanna gráinneacha.', 'ka': 'კონტექსტური შემდეგები, რომელიც ტრანფორმენტების ნეიროლური ენის მოდელებიდან გამოიყენებული მოდელები გამოჩვენეთ განსხვავებული რაოდენობებისთვის, როგორც კითხვების პასუხი, სენტიმენტის ანალიზ გაფართლებული სამუშაო მუშაობა, რომლის მართლად ასეთი მოდელები შეუძლიათ აბსტრაქტიკური, სენმანტიკური ინფორმაცია ტექსტში. ამ ექსპექციოტორიის სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ტანგენტური მხარეს გავაკეთებთ და ასეთი მოდელების სამუშაო დავაკეთებთ, რომლებიც უფრო გრანულური მხარეს გამოსახულება ჩვენ ტექსუალური განსხვავებების პრობლემენტის პრობლემენტი ორი პერსპუტექტიდან დავუყენებთ: სამყაროდ დრანულური დოკუმენტიდან დოკუმენტები (მოჭირდება კონფიგურაციები, რომ ტექსტიდან ატრიბუტები გა ჩვენ ემპერიკურად განსხვავებული დომენტების ორი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ აბსტრაკური დომენტების უფრო დიდი კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კ შემდეგ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ერთი მაგრამ ეფექტიური მეთოდი, რომ TF-IDF-ს მოდელში ჩვენებთ, რომელიც კონტექსტური შემოწყვებაში გამოყენებს, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული შემოწყვებაში 36%-დან გა', 'hu': 'A transzformátor alapú neurális nyelvmodellekből származó kontextuális beágyazások az elmúlt években korszerű teljesítményt mutattak különböző feladatokhoz, mint például a kérdésválasztás, az érzelmek elemzése és a szöveghasonlóság. A kiterjedt munka megmutatja, hogy az ilyen modellek mennyire pontosan képesek a szövegben jelen lévő absztrakt, szemantikai információkat képviselni. Ebben az expozíciós munkában egy érintő irányt vizsgálunk fel, és elemezzük az ilyen modellek teljesítményét olyan feladatokban, amelyek személyesebb szintű reprezentációt igényelnek. A szöveghasonlóság problémájára két perspektívából összpontosítunk: a dokumentumok egyeztetése granuláris szinten (beágyazások szükségesek a finom szemcsés attribútumok rögzítéséhez), és absztrakt szinten (beágyazások szükségesek az általános szövegszemantika rögzítéséhez). Két különböző tartományból származó adatkészleten empirikusan bizonyítjuk, hogy annak ellenére, hogy az absztrakt dokumentumok várhatóan nagy teljesítményű egyeztetése ellenére a kontextuális beágyazásokat következetesen (és időnként jelentősen) felülmúlják az olyan egyszerű alapvonalak, mint a TF-IDF a granuláltabb feladatok érdekében. Ezután egy egyszerű, de hatékony módszert javasolunk a TF-IDF beépítésére olyan modellekbe, amelyek kontextuális beágyazásokat használnak, és akár 36%-os relatív javulást érnek el a granulális feladatok esetében.', 'el': 'Οι περιεκτικές ενσωματώσεις που προέρχονται από μοντέλα νευρωνικής γλώσσας που βασίζονται στον μετασχηματιστή έχουν δείξει υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις για διάφορες εργασίες όπως η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις, η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και η ομοιότητα κειμένου τα τελευταία χρόνια. Εκτεταμένη εργασία δείχνει πόσο ακριβή τέτοια μοντέλα μπορούν να αντιπροσωπεύουν αφηρημένες, σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες που υπάρχουν στο κείμενο. Σε αυτή την εκτενή εργασία, εξερευνούμε μια εφαπτόμενη κατεύθυνση και αναλύουμε την απόδοση τέτοιων μοντέλων σε εργασίες που απαιτούν ένα πιο λεπτομερές επίπεδο αναπαράστασης. Εστιάζουμε στο πρόβλημα της ομοιότητας κειμένου από δύο προοπτικές: αντιστοίχιση εγγράφων σε ένα κοκκώδες επίπεδο (που απαιτεί ενσωμάτωση για να συλλάβει λεπτόκοκκα χαρακτηριστικά στο κείμενο) και ένα αφηρημένο επίπεδο (που απαιτεί ενσωμάτωση για να συλλάβει τη συνολική σημασιολογία κειμένου). Επιδεικνύουμε εμπειρικά, σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων από διαφορετικούς τομείς, ότι παρά την υψηλή απόδοση στην αντιστοίχιση αφηρημένων εγγράφων όπως αναμενόταν, οι ενσωματώσεις στο πλαίσιο εκτελούνται με συνέπεια (και μερικές φορές, σε μεγάλο βαθμό) από απλές γραμμές βάσης όπως για πιο λεπτομερείς εργασίες. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για την ενσωμάτωση σε μοντέλα που χρησιμοποιούν ενσωμάτωση περιβάλλοντος, επιτυγχάνοντας σχετικές βελτιώσεις έως 36% σε κοκκώδεις εργασίες.', 'it': "Le incorporazioni contestuali derivate da modelli di linguaggio neurale basati su trasformatori hanno mostrato prestazioni all'avanguardia per vari compiti come la risposta alle domande, l'analisi del sentiment e la somiglianza testuale negli ultimi anni. Un ampio lavoro mostra quanto accuratamente tali modelli possano rappresentare informazioni astratte e semantiche presenti nel testo. In questo lavoro espositivo esploriamo una direzione tangente e analizziamo le prestazioni di tali modelli su compiti che richiedono un livello di rappresentazione più granulare. Ci concentriamo sul problema della somiglianza testuale da due prospettive: corrispondenza dei documenti a livello granulare (che richiede incorporazioni per catturare attributi a grana fine nel testo) e un livello astratto (che richiede incorporazioni per catturare semantica testuale globale). Dimostriamo empiricamente, attraverso due set di dati provenienti da domini diversi, che nonostante le elevate prestazioni nella corrispondenza astratta dei documenti come previsto, le incorporazioni contestuali sono costantemente (e a volte, notevolmente) superate da semplici linee di base come TF-IDF per attività più granulari. Proponiamo quindi un metodo semplice ma efficace per incorporare TF-IDF in modelli che utilizzano incorporazioni contestuali, ottenendo miglioramenti relativi fino al 36% sulle attività granulari.", 'lt': "Atliekant įvairias užduotis, pavyzdžiui, atsakymas į klausimus, jausmų analizė ir tekstinis panašumas pastaraisiais metais, įdiegti iš transformatoriumi pagrįstų neuralinių kalbų modelių sukurti kontekstiniai elementai parodė pažangiausius rezultatus. Išsamus darbas rodo, kaip tiksliai tokie modeliai gali atspindėti tekste esančią abstrakčią semantinę informaciją. In this expository work, we explore a tangent direction and analyze such models' performance on tasks that require a more granular level of representation.  We focus on the problem of textual similarity from two perspectives: matching documents on a granular level (requiring embeddings to capture fine-grained attributes in the text), and an abstract level (requiring embeddings to capture overall textual semantics).  Empiriškai iš dviejų skirtingų sričių gaunamų duomenų rinkinių įrodome, kad nepaisant didelių rezultatų abstrakčiuose dokumentų atitikmuose, kaip tikėtasi, kontekstiniai įterpimai nuosekliai (ir kartais iš esmės) viršija paprastos bazinės linijos, pvz., TF-IDF, atliekant daugiau granuliarių užduočių. Tada siūlome paprastą, bet veiksmingą TF-IDF įtraukimo į modelius, kuriuose naudojami kontekstiniai įterpimai, metodą, kurio tikslas – santykinai pagerinti iki 36 proc. granuliarių užduočių.", 'kk': 'Түрлендіруші негіздеген неврал тіл үлгілерінен шығарылған контексттік ендірулері соңғы жылдарда сұрақ жауап, сезім анализ және мәтіндік ұқсастығын көрсетеді. Кеңейтілген жұмыс мәтінде болатын абстракты, семантикалық мәліметті көрсетеді. Бұл экспозиториялық жұмысында, біз тангент бағытты зерттеп, оның үлгілерінің жасауын анализирақ тапсырмалардың көмегімен көмектесу деңгейі керек. Біз текстуалды ұқсас мәселесінің екі қарағандағы мәселеге көздейміз: сәйкес келетін құжаттарды сәйкес көмегімен (мәтіндегі дұрыстық атрибуттарды түсіру үшін ендіру керек) және абстракты деңгейіне (жалпы мә Біз әртүрлі домендерден екі деректер қорларын көрсету үшін, күтпеген тәртүрлі құжаттың көмегімен сәйкес келетіні көмектесіп, тәртүрлі ендіру (және кейбірде көмектесілген) бағдарламалар TF- IDF секілді көмектесілген ба Содан кейін біз TF-IDF-ді бағыттау үлгілеріне қолданатын қарапайым, бірақ эффективті тәсілді қолданатын үлгілер үшін, бағытты тапсырмаларда 36% дегенге дейін салыстыратын жақсартуларды же', 'mk': 'Контекстуалните внесувања кои се произведени од моделите на нервен јазик базирани на трансформатори покажаа најнова резултат за различни задачи како што се одговорите на прашања, анализа на чувствата и текстуална сличност во последните години. Ексtensивната работа покажува колку точно ваквите модели можат да претставуваат апстрактни семантични информации присутни во текстот. Во оваа изложувачка работа, истражуваме тангентна насока и анализираме резултати на ваквите модели на задачите кои бараат погрануларно ниво на претставување. Ние се фокусираме на проблемот на текстуалната сличност од две перспективи: споредувањето на документите на грануларно ниво (барање на вградувања за да се фатат фино населени атрибути во текстот) и апстрактно ниво (барање на вградувања за да се фати целокупната текстуална семантика). We empirically demonstrate, across two datasets from different domains, that despite high performance in abstract document matching as expected, contextual embeddings are consistently (and at times, vastly) outperformed by simple baselines like TF-IDF for more granular tasks.  Потоа предложуваме едноставен, но ефикасен метод за вклучување на TF-IDF во моделите кои користат контекстни вклучувања, постигнувајќи релативни подобрувања од 36 отсто за грануларните задачи.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran konteks berasal dari model bahasa saraf berasaskan pengubah telah menunjukkan prestasi state-of-the-art untuk berbagai tugas seperti jawapan soalan, analisis perasaan, dan persamaan teks dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Kerja luas menunjukkan betapa tepatnya model tersebut boleh mewakili maklumat abstrak, semantik yang ada dalam teks. Dalam kerja ekspositori ini, kami mengeksplorasi arah tangen dan menganalisis prestasi model ini pada tugas yang memerlukan tahap perwakilan yang lebih granular. Kami fokus pada masalah persamaan teks dari dua perspektif: persamaan dokumen pada aras granular (memerlukan penyampatan untuk menangkap atribut-benih yang baik dalam teks), dan aras abstrak (memerlukan penyampatan untuk menangkap semantik teks keseluruhan). Kami secara empirik menunjukkan, melalui dua set data dari domain yang berbeza, bahawa walaupun prestasi tinggi dalam dokumen abstrak yang sepadan dengan yang dijangka, penyampilan kontekstual secara konsisten (dan kadang-kadang, luas) dilakukan oleh garis dasar sederhana seperti TF-IDF untuk tugas yang lebih granular. Kemudian kami cadangkan kaedah sederhana tetapi berkesan untuk memasukkan TF-IDF ke dalam model yang menggunakan penyambungan kontekstual, mencapai peningkatan relatif sehingga 36% pada tugas granular.', 'ml': 'മാറ്റുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്നതിനും വിചാരപ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും സ് വിശാലമായ ജോലി കാണിക്കുന്നു ഇതുപോലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് എക്ട്രാക്റ്റ്, പാഠത്തിലുള്ള സെമാന്\u200dറിക് വ ഈ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ടാങ്കെന്\u200dറ് തിരിച്ച് പരിശോധിക്കുകയും, പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d ഗ്രാന്റ്യൂ രണ്ടു ദൃഷ്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d നാം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രാനുലാറിലെ രേഖകള്\u200d പൊരുതുന്നു (പദാവലിയില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പിടിക്കാന്\u200d ആ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള രണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതീക്ഷിച്ചതുപോലുള്ള അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് രേഖകളില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തിയ പ്ര പിന്നീട് ടിഎഫ്-ഐഡിഎഫിനെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള, പ്രായോഗ്യമുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്റെ', 'mt': "L-inkorporazzjonijiet kontextwali derivati minn mudelli tal-lingwa newrali bbażati fuq it-trasformaturi wrew prestazzjoni avvanzata għal diversi kompiti bħat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, l-analiżi tas-sentimenti, u similarità testwali f’dawn l-aħħar snin. Xogħol estensiv juri kemm dawn il-mudelli jistgħu jirrappreżentaw b’mod preċiż informazzjoni astratta u semantika preżenti fit-test. F'dan ix-xogħol ta' espożizzjoni, nesploraw direzzjoni tanġenti u naliżizzaw il-prestazzjoni ta' mudelli bħal dawn fuq kompiti li jeħtieġu livell aktar granulari ta' rappreżentanza. We focus on the problem of textual similarity from two perspectives: matching documents on a granular level (requiring embeddings to capture fine-grained attributes in the text), and an abstract level (requiring embeddings to capture overall textual semantics).  Intwera empirikament, f’żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta minn dominji differenti, li minkejja prestazzjoni għolja fit-tqabbil tad-dokumenti astratti kif mistenni, l-inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali huma konsistentement (u xi drabi, ħafna) imwettqa minn linji bażi sempliċi bħal TF-IDF għal kompiti aktar granulari. Imbagħad nipproponu metodu sempliċi iżda effettiv għall-inkorporazzjoni tat-TF-IDF f’mudelli li jużaw inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali, li jiksbu titjib relattiv sa 36 % fuq kompiti granulari.", 'ro': 'Încorporările contextuale derivate din modele de limbaj neural bazate pe transformatori au arătat performanțe de ultimă generație pentru diverse sarcini, cum ar fi răspunsul la întrebări, analiza sentimentului și similaritatea textuală în ultimii ani. Lucrările extinse arată cât de exact aceste modele pot reprezenta informații abstracte, semantice prezente în text. În această lucrare expozițională, explorăm o direcție tangentă și analizăm performanța unor astfel de modele pe sarcini care necesită un nivel mai granular de reprezentare. Ne concentrăm asupra problemei similarității textuale din două perspective: potrivirea documentelor la nivel granular (necesită încorporări pentru a capta atribute fine în text) și un nivel abstract (necesită încorporări pentru a capta semantica textuală generală). Demonstrăm empiric, în cadrul a două seturi de date din domenii diferite, că, în ciuda performanțelor ridicate în corelarea abstractă a documentelor așa cum era de așteptat, încorporările contextuale sunt în mod constant (și uneori, considerabil) depășite de linii de bază simple, cum ar fi TF-IDF pentru sarcini mai granulare. Apoi propunem o metodă simplă, dar eficientă de a încorpora TF-IDF în modele care utilizează încorporări contextuale, obținând îmbunătățiri relative de până la 36% la sarcinile granulare.', 'no': 'Kontekstlige innbyggingar utførte frå transformeringsbaserte neuralspråk-modeller har vist status-of-the-art performance for ulike oppgåver som spørsmål, sentimentanalyse og tekstulikhet i siste år. Ekstra arbeid viser kor nøyaktig slike modeller kan representera abstrakt, semantisk informasjon som er i tekst. I denne eksponeringsarbeida utforskar vi ein tangent retning og analyserer utviklinga av slike modeller på oppgåver som krev meir granulert representasjonsnivå. Vi fokuserer på problemet med tekstulikhet frå to perspektiv: passande dokument på ein granular nivå (krev innbygging for å henta fine-grained attributt i teksten) og ein abstrakt nivå (krev innbygging for å henta overalt tekst-semantikk). Vi viser empirisk, over to datasett frå ulike domene, at tiltross høg utviklingar i abstrakt dokument som passar som forventa, er kontekst innbygging konsistent (og på tid, vast) utført av enkle baselinjer som TF-IDF for fleire granular oppgåver. Vi foreslår derfor ein enkel, men effektiv metode for å inkludere TF-IDF i modeller som brukar kontekstiske innbygging, og når det gjer relativt forbedringar til opp til 36 % på granular oppgåver.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд асуулт хариулт, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ, мөн текстур төстэй адилхан зүйлсийг харуулж байна. Өнгөрсөн ажил нь ийм загварууд хэрхэн тодорхой харуулж чадна вэ гэвэл текст дээр байгаа абстракт, semantic мэдээллийг харуулж чадна. Энэ дэвшүүлэлтийн ажлын тулд бид тангент чиглэлийг судалж, ийм загварын үйл ажиллагааны талаар илүү гранталын төвшин үзүүлэлтийг шалгаж байна. Бид текстур төстэй харьцааны асуудал дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж байна: гранюлалын түвшинд баримтууд хоорондоо хоёр харьцааны төстэй харьцааны асуудал дээр төвлөрүүлж байна (текст дээрх цэвэрхэн жимсний атрибутыг авах шаардлагатай) болон abs Бид өөр хэсгүүдээс хоёр өгөгдлийн санг харуулж байгааг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ тохиолдсон бичил баримтын өндөр үйл ажиллагааг хүлээн зөвшөөрөхөд тохиолдсон байдлаар тохиолдсон байдлаар TF-IDF шиг энгийн суурь шулуунууд илүү гранталын ажиллагаанд үргэлжлүүлдэг. Дараа нь бид TF-IDF-г багтаах энгийн, эффективны арга загвар зэрэгцээ хөгжүүлэх загваруудыг ашигладаг загварууд рүү нэгтгэх боломжтой боловч, грануулын ажил дээр харьцангуй сайжруулах нь 36%-аас ил', 'pl': 'Kontekstowe osadzenia pochodzące z modeli języka neuronowego opartych na transformatorach wykazały najnowocześniejszą wydajność dla różnych zadań, takich jak odpowiedź na pytania, analiza sentymentów i podobieństwo tekstowe w ostatnich latach. Obszerna praca pokazuje, jak dokładnie takie modele mogą reprezentować abstrakcyjne, semantyczne informacje obecne w tekście. W tej pracy ekspozycyjnej badamy kierunek styczny i analizujemy wydajność takich modeli w zadaniach, które wymagają bardziej szczegółowego poziomu reprezentacji. Koncentrujemy się na problemie podobieństwa tekstowego z dwóch perspektyw: dopasowywaniu dokumentów na poziomie granularnym (wymagającym osadzeń do uchwycenia drobnoziarnistych atrybutów w tekście) oraz abstrakcyjnym (wymagającym osadzeń do uchwycenia ogólnej semantyki tekstowej). Empirycznie demonstrujemy, w dwóch zbiorach danych z różnych domen, że pomimo wysokiej wydajności w dopasowaniu dokumentów abstrakcyjnych zgodnie z oczekiwaniami, osadzenia kontekstowe są konsekwentnie (a czasami znacznie) wykonywane przez proste linie bazowe, takie jak TF-IDF dla bardziej szczegółowych zadań. Następnie proponujemy prostą, ale skuteczną metodę włączenia TF-IDF do modeli wykorzystujących osadzenia kontekstowe, osiągając względną poprawę do 36% zadań granularnych.', 'so': "Xaaladaha hoose ee ka soo baxay qaababka afka neurada ee lagu beddelayo waxay tusaale ahaan shaqooyin kala duduwan, sida jawaabta su'aalaha, baaritaanka xisaabta iyo isku mid ahaanshaha qoraalka ee ugu dambeeyey. Shaqo dheeraad ah wuxuu tusiyaa sida tusaalooyinkaas si saxda ah u muuqan karo, macluumaad saxda ah oo ku qoran qoraalka. Shaqadan muuqashada waxaynu baaraynaa hagitaan aad u muuqata, waxaynu ku baaraynaa sameynta sameynta tusaaladaha oo u baahan shaqooyinka aad u baahan tahay heerka muuqaalka. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa dhibaatada qoraalka ee isku mid ah labada dhinac: dukumentiyada u eg darajada granular (waxaa looga baahan yahay in uu qabsado qalabka farsamada ee qoraalka), iyo darajada abstract (waxaa looga baahan yahay in uu qabsado qoraalka oo dhan). Waxaan si fudud ugu muujinnaa laba macluumaad oo ka mid ah meelo kala duduwan, in kastoo ay dhaqdhaqaaq dheer ku leedahay abstract dukumenti, oo ay u eg tahay wax la mid ah, waxaa lagu sameeyaa qoraalo fudud, sida TF-IDF oo kale, shaqooyin dheeraad ah. Markaas waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab fudud laakiin saameyn ah in TF-IDF lagu soo koobi karo tusaalooyin ah oo isticmaalaya meelaha joogtada ah, si uu u helo hagaajinta horumarinta ugu badnaanta ugu badnaanta 36% shaqooyinka nuurka.", 'sv': 'Kontextuella inbäddningar som härrör från transformatorbaserade neurala språkmodeller har visat state-of-the-art prestanda för olika uppgifter såsom frågesvar, sentimental analys och textlikhet under de senaste åren. Omfattande arbete visar hur exakt sådana modeller kan representera abstrakt, semantisk information som finns i text. I detta expositionsarbete utforskar vi en tangent riktning och analyserar sådana modellers prestanda på uppgifter som kräver en mer granulär nivå av representation. Vi fokuserar på problemet med textlikhet ur två perspektiv: matchande dokument på en granulär nivå (kräver inbäddningar för att fånga finkorniga attribut i texten), och en abstrakt nivå (kräver inbäddningar för att fånga övergripande textsemantik). Vi visar empiriskt, över två datauppsättningar från olika domäner, att trots hög prestanda i abstrakt dokumentmatchning som förväntat, kontextuella inbäddningar konsekvent (och ibland mycket) överträffas av enkla baslinjer som TF-IDF för mer granulära uppgifter. Vi föreslår sedan en enkel men effektiv metod för att införliva TF-IDF i modeller som använder kontextuella inbäddningar och uppnå relativa förbättringar på upp till 36% på granulära uppgifter.', 'sr': 'Kontekstualne integracije iz modela neuralnog jezika na transformaciji pokazale su predstavu umetnosti za različite zadatke poput odgovora na pitanja, analize osjećanja i tekstualne sličnosti u poslednjih godina. Prošireni rad pokazuje kako taèno takvi modeli mogu predstavljati abstraktne, semantične informacije u tekstu. U ovom ekspozitorijskom radu istražujemo tangentni smjer i analiziramo izvršnost takvih modela na zadatkima koji zahtevaju granularniji nivo zastupanja. Fokusiramo se na problem tekstualne sličnosti od dve perspektive: odgovarajući dokumenti na granularnoj nivou (zahtevajući integracije da uhvatimo fino zrno atribute u tekstu) i apstraktnu nivou (zahtevajući integracije da uhvatimo ukupnu tekstualnu semantiku). Mi empirički pokazujemo, preko dva seta podataka iz različitih domena, da, uprkos visokoj funkciji u abstraktivnom dokumentu koji se odgovara kao što je očekivano, kontekstualne integracije su konstantno (i u ponekad, ogromno) izvršene jednostavnim osnovnim linijama poput TF-IDF za više granularnih zadataka. Zatim predlažemo jednostavan, ali efikasan metod da uključimo TF-IDF u modele koji koriste kontekstualne integracije, ostvarimo relativne poboljšanje do 36% granularnih zadataka.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණකයෙන් ආධාරිත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විවිධ වර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය, විශේෂණ විශේෂ වැඩ පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩල් හරියටම ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, සෙමැන්ටික් තොරතුරු පාළු මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය වැඩේ අපි විශ්වාස කරන්නේ කැන්ජේන්ට් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඒ වගේ මොඩේල්ස් වැඩියුම් විශ්ලේ Name අපි වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලින් දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් වැඩිය ඊට පස්සේ අපි සරල නමුත් පරීක්ෂා විදියට TF-IDF එකතු කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට, ප්\u200dර', 'ur': 'تبدیل کرنے والی نیورال زبان کی مدلکوں سے پائی ہوئی کنٹکسٹیول ایمبڈینگ نے مختلف کاموں کے لئے موقعیت-of-the-art performance دکھائی ہے جیسے سوال جواب، احساسات تحلیل، اور اگلے سالوں میں تفصیل برابری دکھائی ہے. اکسٹنسیٹ کارک دکھاتا ہے کہ ایسی موڈل کس طرح دقیقاً معلوم ہو سکتے ہیں جو ٹکسٹ میں موجود ہیں، سیمنٹی معلومات. اس نمایشگری کے کام میں، ہم ایک ٹانگنٹ دئیرس کی تلاش کرتے ہیں اور ایسے نمایشگروں کے کاموں پر تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو زیادہ نمایشگری سطح کی ضرورت رکھتے ہیں. ہم دو منظور سے تفصیل شباهت کے مسئلہ پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں: ایک گرانولی سطح پر مطابق دفتروں کے مطابق مطابق ہوتے ہیں (تفصیل میں پاکیزہ دانے کے اثرات کو پکڑنے کے لئے مطابق ہے) اور ایک abstract سطح (کل تفصیل سیمانٹیکوں کو پکڑنے کے لئے اپنا ان ہم مختلف ڈومین سے دو ڈاٹ سٹ کے ذریعے دکھاتے ہیں، جو انتظار کی طرح مطابق مطابق دکھانے میں اچھی فعالیت کے بغیر، متوسط ایمبڈینگ مطابق (اور بعض وقت، بہت زیادہ) سیدھے بنیس لین کے ذریعے TF-IDF کی طرح بہت زیادہ بڑے کاموں کے لئے انجام ہوتے ہیں۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک ساده لیکن اثرات طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ TF-IDF کو مدلکوں میں شامل کریں جو کنٹکسٹیول ایمبڈینگ استعمال کریں، اور اس کے مقابلہ میں 36% زیادہ اثرات تک پہنچائیں۔', 'ta': 'மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலிருந்து வரும் புதிய மொழி மாதிரிகளில் இருந்து உள்ளடக்கங்கள் செயல்பாடுகளின் நிலை- கலை செயல்பாட்டிற்கு காண்பித்துள்ளார் விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட பணி உரையில் இருக்கும் ஒப்பிராக்டு, பெம்பென்டிக் தகவலை எவ்வாறு சரியாக இவ்வாறு மாதிரிகளை  இந்த வெளிப்பாட்டு வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு தெளிவான திசையைத் தேடி போன்ற மாதிரியின் செயல்பாட்டை ஆராய்க்கிறோம் அதிகமான கு நாம் இரண்டு பார்வைகளில் இருந்து நிரல் சமமான பிரச்சனையை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம்: நாம் வெவ்வேறு களங்களிலிருந்து இரண்டு தரவுத்தளங்கள் முழுவதும் காட்டுகிறோம். எதிர்பார்த்துக் கொண்டிருந்தாலும் அதிக செயல்பாடுகள் பொருத்தமாக இருந்தாலும் நிகழ்ந் பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு எளிய ஆனால் பயனுள்ள முறைமையை TF-IDF மாதிரியில் சேர்க்க முடியும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், சார்ந்த முன்னேற்றத்தை 36% வரை', 'uz': "Name Name Bu ko'rsatish vazifani ko'rib turamiz, bu modellarning bajarishini aniqlamiz va bu vazifalarga ko'proq granular darajasi kerak bo'lgan vazifalar kerak. Biz ikkita shakldan matnning teng muammolarini foydalanamiz: granular darajadagi ҳужжатларга мувофиқ (matnning qismlarini qabul qilish kerak) va abstract darajaga (butun matn semantika qabul qilish kerak). We empirically demonstrate, across two datasets from different domains, that despite high performance in abstract document matching as expected, contextual embeddings are consistently (and at times, vastly) outperformed by simple baselines like TF-IDF for more granular tasks.  Keyin biz TF-IDF modellariga qo'yish uchun oddiy va effektiv usulni, granular vazifalarga 36% yaxshi yaxshi o'zgarishga ega qilamiz.", 'vi': "Sự nhúng tay liên tiếp từ các mô hình thần kinh dựa trên máy biến hình đã cho thấy khả năng hiện đại của nhiều thứ như câu hỏi, phân tích cảm xúc và kết cấu giống nhau trong những năm gần đây. Một công trình rộng lớn cho thấy những mô hình này có thể tượng trưng cho thông tin trừu tượng, ngữ pháp có trong văn bản. Trong công việc phơi bày này, chúng ta sẽ khám phá một hướng đi thực sự và phân tích khả năng thực hiện của các mô- tượng này về các công việc cần một mức độ phân biệt hạt hơn. Chúng tôi tập trung vào vấn đề về nét giống với hai khía cạnh: bằng các văn bản ở mức độ hạt (yêu cầu sự nhúng vào để ghi lại các thuộc tính được tô màu sắc trong văn bản) và một mức trừu tượng (yêu cầu sự nhúng vào để nắm bắt các chữ nghĩa văn bản tổng hợp). Chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm chứng minh, trên hai bộ dữ liệu từ mỗi miền khác nhau, rằng mặc dù có trình độ cao trong việc thu liệu khớp như dự kiến, sự nhúng vào ngữ cảnh liên tục (và đôi khi, rộng lớn) được thực hiện bởi đơn giản như TF-IDF cho các công việc hạt nhân hơn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để áp dụng TF-IDF trong các mô hình có thể trộn tình hình, để đạt đến một số cải tiến tương đối trên đến 36='về các nhiệm vụ hạt.", 'bg': 'Контекстилните вграждания, получени от трансформаторни базирани невронни езикови модели, показват най-съвременни резултати за различни задачи като отговор на въпроси, анализ на сентимента и текстово сходство през последните години. Обширна работа показва колко точно такива модели могат да представят абстрактна, семантична информация, присъстваща в текста. В тази експозиционна работа изследваме тангентна посока и анализираме изпълнението на такива модели при задачи, които изискват по-гранулирано ниво на представяне. Фокусираме се върху проблема с текстовата сходство от две гледни точки: съвпадение на документи на гранулирано ниво (изискващи вграждания за улавяне на фини атрибути в текста) и абстрактно ниво (изискващи вграждания за улавяне на цялостната текстова семантика). Емпирично демонстрираме, в два набора от данни от различни области, че въпреки високата производителност в абстрактното съвпадение на документи, както се очаква, контекстуалните вграждания са последователно (и понякога значително) превъзхождани от прости базови линии като за по-подробни задачи. След това предлагаме прост, но ефективен метод за включване в модели, които използват контекстуални вграждания, постигайки относителни подобрения от до 36% при гранулираните задачи.', 'nl': 'Contextuele embeddings afgeleid van transformatorgebaseerde neurale taalmodellen hebben de afgelopen jaren state-of-the-art prestaties getoond voor verschillende taken zoals het beantwoorden van vragen, sentimentanalyse en tekstuele overeenkomsten. Uitgebreid werk laat zien hoe nauwkeurig dergelijke modellen abstracte, semantische informatie in tekst kunnen weergeven. In dit expositoire werk onderzoeken we een tangente richting en analyseren we de prestaties van dergelijke modellen op taken die een meer gedetailleerd niveau van representatie vereisen. We richten ons op het probleem van tekstuele gelijkenis vanuit twee perspectieven: het matchen van documenten op een granulair niveau (waarbij insluitingen nodig zijn om fijnkorrelige attributen in de tekst vast te leggen) en een abstract niveau (insluitingen vereist om algehele tekstsemantiek vast te leggen). We tonen empirisch aan, in twee datasets uit verschillende domeinen, dat ondanks hoge prestaties in abstracte documentmatching zoals verwacht, contextuele inbeddingen consistent (en soms aanzienlijk) worden uitgevoerd door eenvoudige basislijnen zoals TF-IDF voor meer gedetailleerde taken. Vervolgens stellen we een eenvoudige maar effectieve methode voor om TF-IDF te integreren in modellen die gebruik maken van contextuele embeddings, waardoor relatieve verbeteringen tot 36% worden bereikt bij granulaire taken.', 'hr': 'Kontekstualne integracije iz modela neuralnog jezika na transformaciji pokazale su stanje umjetnosti za različite zadatke poput odgovora na pitanje, analize osjećaja i tekstualne sličnosti u posljednjih godina. Prošireni rad pokazuje kako precizno takvi modeli mogu predstavljati abstraktne, semantičke informacije u tekstu. U ovom ekspozitorijskom radu istražujemo tangentni smjer i analiziramo učinkovitost takvih modela na zadatke koji zahtijevaju granularnu razinu zastupanja. Usredotočili smo se na problem tekstualne sličnosti od dvije perspektive: odgovarajući dokumenti na granularnoj razini (zahtijevajući uključenje ugrađenih atributa u tekstu) i apstraktnu razinu (zahtijevajući ugrađenje za uključenje ukupnih tekstualnih semantika). Mi empirički pokazujemo, preko dva podataka iz različitih domena, da, uprkos visokom učinkovitosti u apstraktnom dokumentu koji se odgovara kao što je očekivano, kontekstualne integracije su konstantno (i ponekad, ogromno) izvršene jednostavnim osnovnim linijama poput TF-IDF za više granularnih zadataka. Zatim predlažemo jednostavan, ali učinkovit način da uključimo TF-IDF u modele koji koriste contextualne integracije, postići relativno poboljšanje do 36% granularnih zadataka.', 'da': 'Kontekstuelle indlejringer afledt af transformer-baserede neurale sprogmodeller har vist state-of-the-art ydeevne til forskellige opgaver som spørgsmål besvarelse, sentimental analyse og tekstlig lighed i de seneste år. Omfattende arbejde viser, hvor præcist sådanne modeller kan repræsentere abstrakt, semantisk information til stede i tekst. I dette eksponeringsarbejde undersøger vi en tangent retning og analyserer sådanne modellers ydeevne på opgaver, der kræver et mere granulært niveau af repræsentation. Vi fokuserer på problemet med tekstlighed fra to perspektiver: matchende dokumenter på et granulært niveau (kræver indlejringer for at fange finkornede attributter i teksten) og et abstrakt niveau (kræver indlejringer for at fange overordnet tekstsemantik). Vi demonstrerer empirisk, på tværs af to datasæt fra forskellige domæner, at trods høj ydeevne i abstrakte dokumentmatchning som forventet, er kontekstuelle indlejringer konsekvent (og til tider meget) udført af enkle basislinjer som TF-IDF til mere granulære opgaver. Vi foreslår derefter en enkel, men effektiv metode til at indarbejde TF-IDF i modeller, der bruger kontekstuelle indlejringer, hvilket opnår relative forbedringer på op til 36% på granulære opgaver.', 'de': 'Kontextbezogene Einbettungen, die aus transformatorbasierten neuronalen Sprachmodellen abgeleitet wurden, haben in den letzten Jahren für verschiedene Aufgaben wie Fragebeantwortung, Stimmungsanalyse und Textähnlichkeit den neuesten Stand der Technik gezeigt. Umfangreiche Arbeiten zeigen, wie genau solche Modelle abstrakte, semantische Informationen im Text darstellen können. In dieser Expositionsarbeit untersuchen wir eine tangente Richtung und analysieren die Leistung solcher Modelle bei Aufgaben, die eine detailliertere Darstellung erfordern. Wir konzentrieren uns auf das Problem der Textähnlichkeit aus zwei Perspektiven: das Abgleichen von Dokumenten auf einer granularen Ebene (Einbettungen erfordern, um feinkörnige Attribute im Text zu erfassen) und eine abstrakte Ebene (Einbettungen erfordern, um die gesamte Textsemantik zu erfassen). Wir zeigen empirisch über zwei Datensätze aus verschiedenen Domänen hinweg, dass trotz hoher Leistung beim Matching von abstrakten Dokumenten, wie erwartet, kontextbezogene Einbettungen konsistent (und manchmal erheblich) von einfachen Baselines wie TF-IDF für granularere Aufgaben übertroffen werden. Anschließend schlagen wir eine einfache, aber effektive Methode vor, TF-IDF in Modelle zu integrieren, die kontextbezogene Einbettungen verwenden und relative Verbesserungen von bis zu 36% bei granularen Aufgaben erzielen.', 'id': "Pencampuran konteks yang berasal dari model bahasa saraf berdasarkan transformator telah menunjukkan prestasi terbaik untuk berbagai tugas seperti menjawab pertanyaan, analisis perasaan, dan persamaan teks dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Pekerjaan ekstensif menunjukkan betapa akurat model tersebut dapat mewakili informasi abstrak, semantis yang ada dalam teks. In this expository work, we explore a tangent direction and analyze such models' performance on tasks that require a more granular level of representation.  Kami fokus pada masalah persamaan tekstual dari dua perspektif: persamaan dokumen pada tingkat granular (memerlukan penyampilan untuk menangkap atribut-atribut berwarna ganda dalam teks), dan tingkat abstrak (memerlukan penyampilan untuk menangkap semantik tekstual umum). Kami secara empiris menunjukkan, melalui dua set data dari domain yang berbeda, bahwa meskipun prestasi tinggi dalam dokumen abstrak yang cocok seperti yang diharapkan, embedding kontekstual konsisten (dan kadang-kadang, luas) dilakukan oleh garis dasar sederhana seperti TF-IDF untuk tugas yang lebih granular. Kemudian kami mengusulkan metode sederhana tapi efektif untuk memasukkan TF-IDF ke dalam model yang menggunakan embedding kontekstual, mencapai perbaikan relatif sampai 36% pada tugas granular.", 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 변압기의 신경 언어 모델을 바탕으로 파생된 상하문이 각종 임무에 삽입되어 가장 선진적인 성능을 나타냈다. 예를 들어 문답, 감정 분석과 텍스트의 유사성 등이다.대량의 작업은 이러한 모델이 텍스트에 존재하는 추상적인 의미 정보를 정확하게 나타낼 수 있음을 나타낸다.이 해석적인 작업에서 우리는 절선 방향을 탐색하고 이런 모델이 더욱 세밀한 입도 표시가 필요한 임무에서의 성능을 분석했다.우리는 두 가지 측면에서 텍스트의 유사성에 주목한다. 입도 단계에서 문서와 일치하고, 추상적인 단계에서 전체적인 텍스트의 의미를 포착하기 위해 삽입해야 한다.우리는 서로 다른 분야의 두 데이터 집합에서 실증 연구를 실시한 결과 추상적인 문서의 일치에 있어 예상한 고성능을 나타냈지만 더욱 세밀한 임무에 대해 상하문 삽입이 TF-IDF 등 간단한 기선보다 시종(때로는 훨씬 낫다) 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.그 다음에 우리는 TF-IDF를 상하문으로 삽입된 모델에 포함시켜 세립도 임무에서 36%에 이르는 상대적인 개선을 실현했다.', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo yaliyotokana na mifano ya lugha ya asili ya kubadilisha imeonyesha hali ya utendaji wa sanaa kwa kazi mbalimbali kama vile majibu, uchambuzi wa hisia, na usawa wa kimsingi katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Kazi nyingi zinaonyesha jinsi mifano hiyo inavyoweza kuwakilisha taarifa za sekunde zinazopatikana kwenye maandishi. Katika kazi hii ya kuonyesha, tunatafuta mwelekeo wa wazi na tunachambua utendaji wa mifano hiyo katika kazi zinazohitaji kiwango kikubwa cha uwakilishi. Tunashikilia tatizo la usawa wa kimsingi kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa mawili: nyaraka zinazofanana na kiwango cha granular (zinahitaji kuwakamata vifaa vizuri vya viganjani katika ujumbe wa maandishi), na kiwango cha ubora (kinahitaji kuangalia vifaa vyote vya vitabu vya ujumla). Tunaonyesha kwa nguvu, katika maeneo mawili ya taarifa kutoka maeneo tofauti, kwamba pamoja na utendaji wa ufanisi mkubwa katika nyaraka za abstract ukilinganisha kama ilivyotarajiwa, matumizi ya mara kwa mara yanaendeshwa na misingi rahisi kama vile TF-IDF kwa ajili ya kazi nyingi za uchunguzi. Kisha tunapendekeza njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi kuingiza TF-IDF kuwa mifano ambayo hutumia mabadiliko ya wakati huo, kutekeleza maendeleo ya karibu ya kufikia asilimia 36 kuhusu kazi za uchimbaji.', 'tr': "Çarpdaky düzümler, transformer tabanly näural dil nusgalaryndan çykan düzümler ýaly sorag, duýgular analizi we tekst ýaly görnüşlikleri görkezilýärler. Çaplanjak üçin bu nusgalar abstrakt we semantik maglumaty metinde nähili takyk edip biljekdigini görkez. Bu görüntüleme işinde, tanjant yöntemi keşfetip, daha granular bir şekilde gösterim gereken görevlerde bu modellerin eserini çözeriz. Biz iki görnöşinden tekst ýaly görünüşlikleriniň meselesine fokus berýäris: eşleýän senedler granularyň derejesinde (tekst içinde fin depler almak üçin embedeler gerek), we abstrakt derejesinde (ähli tekst semantiklerini yakalamak üçin embedeler gerek). Biz dürli sahypalardan iki dataje setirini görä görkez. Beklenilýän ýaly abstrakt senediň üstüne ýerleşýänligini görä, contextual girişmeler TF-IDF ýaly basit çyzgylardan daşarylýar. TF-IDF ýaly basit çyzgylardan daşarylýar. Sonra TF-IDF'i teklip etmek üçin basit ýöne etkinlik bir nusga teklip edip görkezilýän çözümler, granular işinde 36%-den artyk täsirli gelişmeleri başarmak üçin.", 'fa': 'شرکت\u200cهای متوسط از مدل\u200cهای زبان عصبی\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر بر اساس تغییر\u200cپذیر برای کارهای مختلف نشان داده\u200cاند، مانند جواب سوال، تحلیل احساسات و شباهت متن در سال\u200cهای اخیر. کارهای وسیع نشان می دهد که چقدر دقیقا چنین مدل می تواند اطلاعات مثبتی و سیمانتی را در متن نشان دهد. در این کارهای نمایشگری، ما یک مسیر موجود را تحقیق می کنیم و عملکرد چنین مدلها را در کارهایی تحلیل می کنیم که نیاز به سطح نمایشگری بیشتری دارند. ما روی مشکل شباهت متن از دو نظر تمرکز می\u200cکنیم: سند\u200cهای مسابقه بر سطح granular (نیاز به وسیله\u200cی تغییرات برای گرفتن ویژه\u200cهای دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه در متن) و سطح مثبت (نیاز به وسیله\u200cهای تغییرات برای گرفتن کل سیمانتیک متن است). ما در دو مجموعه اطلاعات از دامنه\u200cهای مختلف را نشان می\u200cدهیم که با وجود عملکرد بالا در سند مطلق همانطور که انتظار داشته باشد، جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای متوسط (و بعضی وقتها، بسیار) توسط خط\u200cهای بنیادی ساده مانند TF-IDF برای کارهای بزرگتری انجام می\u200cشود. سپس ما یک روش ساده ولی موثر پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که TF-IDF را در مدل\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکند که از وسیله\u200cهای متوسط استفاده می\u200cکنند، به رسیدن بهترین نسبت به حدود 36 درصد بر روی وظیفه\u200cهای بزرگ استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'af': "Konteksual inbêding wat van transformeerder-gebaseerde neurale taal modele afgelei het, het gewys state-of-the-art-prestasie vir verskillende opdragte soos vraag antwoord, sentimentanalisie en tekstuele gelykenis in onlangse jaar. Uitbreiding werk vertoon hoe presies sodanige modele kan voorstel abstrakte, semantiese inligting wat in teks voorsien word. In hierdie eksponering werk, ondersoek ons 'n tangens rigting en analiseer sodanige modele se prestasie op opdragte wat 'n meer granuleer vlak van voorstelling nodig. Ons fokus op die probleem van tekstuele gelykenis van twee perspeksies: ooreenstemmende dokumente op 'n granuleer vlak (benodig inbêding om fyn-graad eienskappe in die teks te vang), en 'n abstrakte vlak (benodig inbêdings om die hele tekstuele semantieke te vang). Ons wys empiriese deur twee datastelle van verskillende domeine dat, selfs die hoë prestasie in abstrakte dokument ooreenstem soos verwagte, die kontekslike inbêding is konsistentlik (en op tyde, vaste) uitgevoer deur eenvoudige basisline soos TF-IDF vir meer granulere taak. Ons voorstel dan 'n eenvoudige maar effektief metode om TF-IDF in modele te inkorporeer wat kontekstieële inbettings gebruik, en relatiewe verbeteringe van tot by 36% op granuleerde taak te bereik.", 'sq': 'Ndërtesat kontekstuale të nxjerra nga modelet e gjuhës nervore me bazë në transformues kanë treguar performancë më të lartë për detyra të ndryshme të tilla si përgjigjen e pyetjeve, analizën e ndjenjave dhe ngjashmërinë tekstuale në vitet e fundit. Extensive work shows how accurately such models can represent abstract, semantic information present in text.  Në këtë punë ekspozuese, ne eksplorojmë një drejtim tangent dhe analizojmë performancën e modeleve të tilla mbi detyrat që kërkojnë një nivel më granular përfaqësimi. Ne përqëndrohemi në problem in e ngjashmërisë tekstuale nga dy perspektiva: përshtatja e dokumenteve në një nivel granular (që kërkon përfshirje për të kapur atribute të hollësishme në tekst) dhe një nivel abstrakt (që kërkon përfshirje për të kapur semantikën tekstuale të përgjithshme). Ne empirikisht demonstrojmë, nëpërmjet dy grupeve të dhënash nga fusha të ndryshme, se pavarësisht nga performanca e lartë në përshtatjen abstrakte të dokumenteve siç pritet, përfshirjet kontekstuale janë vazhdimisht (dhe ndonjëherë, gjerësisht) të mbikryera nga linjat bazë të thjeshta si TF-IDF për detyra më granulare. Pastaj propozojmë një metodë të thjeshtë por efektive për të përfshirë TF-IDF në modele që përdorin përfshirje kontekstuale, duke arritur përmirësime relative deri në 36% në detyrat granulare.', 'am': 'Contextual embeddings derived from transformer-based neural language models have shown state-of-the-art performance for various tasks such as question answering, sentiment analysis, and textual similarity in recent years.  የስፋት ስራ በጽሑፍ የተገኘውን የፊደል ቅርጽ፣ የsemantic መረጃ እንዴት እንደሚያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ በዚህ አካባቢ ሥራ፣ የዓይነ አካባቢ መንገድ እናሳውቃለን፣ የዚህንም የሞዴል አካሄዱን በሥርዓት ላይ እናስተውላለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ መልዕክት ከሁለት ምሳሌዎች ላይ እናስማማታለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተለየ አካባቢ አካባቢ ሰነዱን በተቃወመ ቁጥጥር ላይ ከፍ ከፍ አድራጊ ቢሆንም፣ የአሁኑ አካባቢዎች እንደ TF-IDF በሚደረጉ ቀላል መሠረቶች የተደረጉ ናቸው፡፡ በኋላም የTF-IDF ጥያቄን እናስቀላቅላለን፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢዎችን የሚጠቅሙ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Տարբեր առաջադրանքների, ինչպիսիք են հարցերի պատասխանը, զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը և տեքստային նմանությունը վերջին տարիների ընթացքում, վերջին տարիների ընթացքում, վերջին հատվածները ցույց են տվել վերջին հատվածներից հիմնված նյարդային լեզվի մոդելներից Ընդլայնված աշխատանքը ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչքան ճշգրիտ կարող են նման մոդելները ներկայացնել վերացական, սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվություն, որ գոյություն ունի տեքստում: Այս արտահայտության ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք շոշափելի ուղղություն և վերլուծում ենք նման մոդելների արտադրողականությունը այն խնդիրների վրա, որոնք պահանջում են ավելի լայն ներկայացման մակարդակ: Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք տեքստային նմանության խնդիրների վրա երկու տեսանկյունից. հավասարեցնել փաստաթղթերը գրանուլար մակարդակի վրա (անհրաժեշտ է ներդրումներ, որպեսզի գրանցվեն տեքստում գեղեցիկ հատկություններ), և վերացական մակարդակի վրա (անհրաժեշտ է ներդրումներ, որ Մենք էմպրիկապես ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տարբեր ոլորտների երկու տվյալների համակարգերում, չնայած վերացական փաստաթղթերի բարձր արդյունքներին, որոնք համապատասխանում են, ինչպես ակնկալվում է, կոնտեքստալ ներդրումները մշտապես (և երբեմն, մեծ մասամբ) են արտադրվում պարզ հիմնական գծերով Այնուհետև մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ մեթոդ, որպեսզի ԹՀ-ՀՀՀ-ը ներառվի մոդելների մեջ, որոնք օգտագործում են կոնտեքստոնալ ներդրումներ, հասնելով մինչև 36 տոկոսի հարաբերական բարելավումների գ', 'az': "Nəyral dil modellerindən çıxarılan müxtəlif in şallar, son illərdə sual cavab vermək, duyguları analizi və textual similaritəsini göstərmişdir. Əlavə işləri, bu modellərin mətndə olan abstrakt, semantik məlumatları necə doğru ifadə edə biləcəyini göstərir. Bu göstəriş işində, biz tangent yöntemi keşfetirik və bu modellərin performansını daha çox granular seviyyəti lazımdır. İki perspektivdən textual similarlığın problem in ə odaklanırıq: granular seviyyətində eşidən belələr (metin içində sünbül təsirlərini tutmaq üçün inşallar lazımdır) və abstrakt seviyyəti (bütün textual semantik almaq üçün inşallar lazımdır). Biz müxtəlif domenalardan iki verilən quruluğu ilə göstəririk ki, gözlədiyi kimi abstrakt dökümündə yüksək performans olmasına rağmen, müxtəlif quruluşlar TF-IDF kimi basit sətirlər ilə daha çox granular işlər üçün sürəkli (və zamanlarda çox böyük) işlər görərlər. Sonra, TF-IDF'i müxtəlif inşallarını istifadə edən modellərə qatmaq üçün basit fakat etkili bir metod təklif edirik, granular ın işlərində 36%-dən artıq yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে প্রশ্নের উত্তর, মনের বিশ্লেষণ এবং টেক্সুয়ালের সমতার মতো কাজের জন্য বিভিন্ন কাজের জন্য বিভিন্ন নিউরেল ভাষা মডেল থেকে বিভিন্ন Extensive work shows how accurately such models can represent abstract, semantic information present in text.  এই প্রকাশিত কাজের মধ্যে আমরা একটি ট্যাংকেন্ট দিকে খুঁজে বের করি এবং এ ধরনের মডেলের প্রদর্শনীর বিশ্লেষণ করি যা কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্বের আমরা দুই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে টেক্সচুয়ালের সমতুল্যের সমস্যার প্রতি মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি: গ্রানুলার স্তরের মিলিত নথিপত্র (লেখার মধ্যে সুন্দর গ্রেফতারের বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রয়োজন) এব আমরা বিভিন্ন ডোমেইন থেকে দুটি ডাটাসেট প্রদর্শন করেছি, যদিও প্রত্যাশিত তথ্যের সাথে মিলিত হওয়া সত্ত্বেও, সাধারণ বিভিন্ন কাজের জন্য টিএফ-আইডিএফের মতো সাধারণ বেসাইনে প্রদর্শন করছি। তারপর আমরা টিএফ-আইডিএফের মডেলে যোগাযোগ করার একটি সহজ কার্যকর পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যারা প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবহার করে, গ্রানালার কাজে প্রায় ৩৬% উন্নতি পায়।', 'bs': 'Kontekstualne integracije iz modela neuralnog jezika na transformaciji pokazale su predstavu state-of-the-art za različite zadatke poput odgovora na pitanje, analize osjećanja i tekstualne sličnosti u posljednjih godina. Prošireni rad pokazuje kako precizno takvi modeli mogu predstavljati abstraktne, semantične informacije koje postoje u tekstu. U ovom ekspozitorijskom radu istražujemo tangentni smjer i analiziramo performansiju takvih modela na zadatkima koji zahtijevaju granularniji nivo zastupanja. Fokusiramo se na problem tekstualne sličnosti od dvije perspektive: odgovarajući dokumenti na granularnoj razini (zahtevajući ugrađenje da uhvati fino zrno atribute u tekstu) i apstraktnu razinu (zahtevajući ugrađenje da uhvati ukupnu tekstualnu semantiku). Mi empirički pokazujemo, preko dva seta podataka iz različitih domena, da, uprkos visokom učinkovitosti u abstraktivnom dokumentu koji se odgovara kao što je očekivano, kontekstualne integracije su konstantno (i u ponekad, ogromno) izvršene jednostavnim osnovnim linijama poput TF-IDF za više granularnih zadataka. Zatim predlažemo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu da uključimo TF-IDF u modele koji koriste contextualne integracije, ostvarimo relativno poboljšanje do 36% granularnih zadataka.', 'ca': "Les integracions contextuals derivades de models de llenguatge neural basats en transformadors han demostrat el desempeny més avançat en diverses tasques, com la resposta a preguntes, l'anàlisi de sentiments i la similitud textual en els últims anys. La feina extensa mostra com de exactament aquests models poden representar informació abstracta i semàntica present en el text. En aquesta feina expositoria, explorem una direcció tangent i analitzem el rendiment d'aquests models en tasques que requereixen un nivell més granular de representació. Ens centrem en el problem a de la similitud textual de dues perspectives: la comparació de documents a nivell granular (requereix incorporacions per capturar atributs fins grans al text) i un nivell abstracte (requereix incorporacions per capturar semàntics textuals globals). Empíricament demostrem, a través de dos conjunts de dades de dominis diferents, que malgrat els alts resultats en la comparació abstracta de documentos com es esperava, les integracions contextuals són constantment (i a vegades, en gran medida) superades per línies de base simples com TF-IDF per tasques més granulars. Després proposem un mètode simple però efectiu per incorporar TF-IDF en models que utilitzen incorporacions contextuals, aconseguint millores relativas fins al 36% en tasques granulars.", 'cs': 'Kontextové vložení odvozené z modelů neuronového jazyka založených na transformátorech ukázalo nejmodernější výkon pro různé úkoly, jako je odpověď na otázky, analýza sentimentů a textová podobnost v posledních letech. Rozsáhlá práce ukazuje, jak přesně takové modely mohou reprezentovat abstraktní, sémantické informace přítomné v textu. V této expoziční práci zkoumáme styčný směr a analyzujeme výkon těchto modelů na úkolech, které vyžadují granulárnější úroveň reprezentace. Zaměřujeme se na problém textové podobnosti ze dvou pohledů: srovnávání dokumentů na granulární úrovni (vyžadující vložení k zachycení jemných atributů v textu) a abstraktní úrovni (vyžadující vložení k zachycení celkové textové sémantiky). Empiricky demonstrujeme, napříč dvěma datovými sadami z různých domén, že navzdory vysokému výkonu při porovnávání abstraktních dokumentů podle očekávání, kontextové vložení jsou konzistentně (a někdy značně) prováděny jednoduchými základními liniemi, jako je TF-IDF pro granulárnější úkoly. Následně navrhujeme jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu začlenění TF-IDF do modelů využívajících kontextové vložení, čímž docílíme relativního zlepšení až 36% u granulárních úloh.', 'et': 'Transformeritel põhinevatest neurokeelemudelitest saadud kontekstipõhised manustamised on näidanud viimastel aastatel kaasaegset jõudlust erinevate ülesannete jaoks, nagu küsimustele vastamine, sentimentaalüüs ja tekstisarnasus. Laiaulatuslik töö näitab, kui täpselt võivad sellised mudelid esitada abstraktset semantilist infot tekstis. Käesolevas ekspositsioonitöös uurime tangentsi suunda ja analüüsime selliste mudelite tulemuslikkust ülesannetel, mis nõuavad teravamat esindatust. Me keskendume tekstide sarnasuse probleemile kahest vaatenurgast: dokumentide sobitamine granulaarsel tasandil (vajab manustamist, et jäädvustada teksti peenete atribuutide) ja abstraktsel tasandil (vajab manustamist, et jäädvustada üldine tekstisemantika). Me demonstreerime empiiriliselt kahe erinevate valdkondade andmekogumi vahel, et vaatamata oodatud abstraktsete dokumentide sobitamise kõrgele jõudlusele on kontekstipõhised manustamised järjepidevalt (ja mõnikord ka tohutult) ületatud lihtsate lähtejoontega, nagu TF-IDF, detailsemate ülesannete jaoks. Seejärel pakume välja lihtsa, kuid tõhusa meetodi TF-IDF kaasamiseks mudelitesse, mis kasutavad kontekstipõhiseid manustamisi, saavutades suhtelise paranemise kuni 36% ulatuses detailsete ülesannete puhul.', 'fi': 'Muuntajapohjaisista neurokielimalleista johdetut kontekstuaaliset upotukset ovat osoittaneet viime vuosina huipputason suorituskykyä erilaisiin tehtäviin, kuten kysymyksiin vastaamiseen, tunteiden analysointiin ja tekstien samankaltaisuuteen. Laaja työ osoittaa, kuinka tarkasti tällaiset mallit voivat esittää abstraktia semanttista tietoa tekstissä. Tässä eksposiatiotyössä tutkimme tangenttisuuntaa ja analysoimme mallien suorituskykyä tehtävissä, jotka vaativat yksityiskohtaisempaa esitystasoa. Keskitymme tekstien samankaltaisuuden ongelmaan kahdesta näkökulmasta: dokumenttien täsmäyttäminen yksityiskohtaisella tasolla (vaatii upotuksia hienojakoisten attribuuttien tallentamiseksi tekstiin) ja abstraktilla tasolla (vaatii upotuksia yleisen tekstisemantiikan tallentamiseksi). Empiirisesti osoitamme kahden eri toimialojen datajoukon kautta, että vaikka abstraktien dokumenttien täsmäytys on odotetusti tehokasta, kontekstuaaliset upotukset ovat johdonmukaisesti (ja ajoittain huomattavasti) nopeampia kuin yksinkertaiset perusviivat, kuten TF-IDF, yksityiskohtaisemmissa tehtävissä. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta menetelmää TF-IDF:n sisällyttämiseksi malleihin, joissa käytetään kontekstuaalisia upotuksia, ja näin saavutetaan suhteellisia parannuksia jopa 36% yksityiskohtaisessa tehtävässä.', 'ha': "Filin da aka samu da shi daga misalin harshen neural wanda aka canza a danne shi na transformer, sun nuna halin-mai-kunyar wa aikin daban-daban, kamar jibi-tambayi, Analissari na hisia, da daidaita na rubutu cikin shekara na farko. Yin aikin faɗi na nuna cewa misalin wannan ana iya ƙayyade tsari, don ka iya nuna maɓallin abubuwa, kuma ma'anar mutane da ke cikin matsayin. Daga wannan aikin da ke iya bayani, muna sami wata shirin mai bayani kuma munã anayyar abun misãlai a kan aikin da ke da wani daraja mafi ƙaranci ga halangan. Tuna fokus a kan matsayin daidaita daga wasu kwanan biyu: mai daidaita takardar takardar kwamfyutan granular (da ke ƙayyade yin riƙon sigogi masu tsari masu fin-granular cikin matsayin), da wata daraja na'ura (yana daidai da za'a kãma kiman na rubutu). Tuna nuna kowaci, a cikin duk danne biyu daga guda daban-daban, cẽwa, kuma, kõ da yaushe, mafiya girma a cikin takardar katarakta, da kuma wanda aka ƙayyade, sai masu iya daidaita (da kuma a ƙidãyayyuta), masu bastarwa na rubutu kamar TF-IDF ga wasu aikin na dabam-granular. Sa'an nan kuma muna goyyar da wata hanyor sauƙi kuma mai amfani da TF-IDF zuwa misãlai waɗanda ke yin amfani da embargwadon da ke cikin a ƙidãya, kuma za mu sami improvements ga up to 36% a kan aikin granular.", 'jv': 'text-tool-action OU = VeriSign Trust Network Nejer Awakmone Awak dhéwé éntuk empir-perusahaan, sampek durung dataset sing gak perusahaan domain ulih dumaten, sane mepe basa sing nggawe sekolah luwih nêmên, embedding contextual sampek isih lanjut (lan saiki, nik saiki, dadi) seneng dataset sing dibutuhé awak dhéwé basa sing luwih dumateng egal tF-ID Féwé nggawe Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing sampeyan mrambah karo akeh njaluk kanggo ngilangno-NF-ID dumateng liyane sing bisa basa ingkang dipatengan contextual, iso nggawe luwih-luwih dumateng liyane wis antara sampeyan luwih dumateng kanggo kalawartané é é basa tanggal.', 'sk': 'Kontekstualne vdelave iz transformatorskih modelov nevronskega jezika so v zadnjih letih pokazale najsodobnejše delovanje pri različnih nalogah, kot so odgovarjanje na vprašanja, analiza sentimenta in besedilna podobnost. Obsežno delo kaže, kako natančno lahko takšni modeli predstavljajo abstraktne semantične informacije, prisotne v besedilu. V tem ekspostacijskem delu raziskujemo tangentno smer in analiziramo uspešnost takšnih modelov pri nalogah, ki zahtevajo bolj natančno stopnjo reprezentacije. Osredotočamo se na problem besedilne podobnosti z dveh vidikov: ujemanje dokumentov na granularni ravni (zahteva vdelave za zajem drobnozrnatih atributov v besedilu) in abstraktni ravni (zahteva vdelave za zajem celotne besedilne semantike). Empirično dokazujemo v dveh naborih podatkov iz različnih področij, da kljub visoki zmogljivosti pri usklajevanju abstraktnih dokumentov, kot je pričakovano, kontekstualne vdelave dosledno (in včasih precej) presegajo preproste osnovne črte, kot je TF-IDF za bolj podrobna opravila. Nato predlagamo preprosto, vendar učinkovito metodo za vključitev TF-IDF v modele, ki uporabljajo kontekstualne vdelave, s čimer dosežemo relativne izboljšave do 36% pri granularnih opravilih.', 'he': 'תוכניות קונטקסטיות שנוצאות מדוגמני שפת עצבית מבוססים על המעבר הראו ביצועים חדשים למשימות שונות כמו עניין שאלות, ניתוח רגשות, ודמיון טקסטלי בשנים האחרונות. עבודה רחבה מראה כמה מדויקת דוגמנים כאלה יכולים לייצג מידע אסטרקט וסמנטי נוכח בטקסט. בעבודת ההחשפה הזאת, אנו חוקרים כיוון טאנגנטי ונבחנים ביצועים של דוגמנים כאלה על משימות שדורשות רמת מייצג גבוהה יותר. אנחנו מתמקדים בבעיה של דמיון טקסטלי משני מבטים: התאמת מסמכים ברמה גרינולרית (דורשת קישורים כדי לתפוס תכונות גרינים דקות בטקסט), ורמה אסטרקטית (דורשת קישורים כדי לתפוס סמנטיקה טקסטלית כללית). We empirically demonstrate, across two datasets from different domains, that despite high performance in abstract document matching as expected, contextual embeddings are consistently (and at times, vastly) outperformed by simple baselines like TF-IDF for more granular tasks.  ואז אנו מציעים שיטה פשוטה אבל יעילה להכניס TF-IDF לדוגמנים אשר משתמשים בתכניות קונטקסטיות, להשיג שיפורים יחסיים עד 36% על משימות granular.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཞི་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་ནུས་ཡིག་ཆའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྣང་བ་མངོན་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རེད། Extensive work shows how accurately such models can represent abstract, semantic information present in text. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྟོན་པའི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཤམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་རིམ་པ་དང་། ལས་ཀ་གསལ་རྩ་བར ང་ཚོས་ཕན་ཚུན་འདྲ་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བཞག་ཡོད། We empirically demonstrate across two datasets from different domains, that despite high performance in abstract document matching as expected, contextual embeddings are consistently (and at times, vastly) outperformed by simple baselines like TF-IDF for more granular tasks. འོན་ཀྱང་།'}
{'en': 'CoLAKE : Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding', 'ar': 'CoLAKE: اللغة السياقية وتضمين المعرفة', 'pt': 'CoLAKE: Linguagem Contextualizada e Incorporação de Conhecimento', 'es': 'CoLake: incorporación de lenguaje y conocimiento contextualizado', 'fr': 'CoLake\xa0: langage contextualisé et intégration des connaissances', 'zh': 'CoLAKE:语言嵌', 'ja': 'CoLAKE ：文脈化された言語と知識の埋め込み', 'hi': 'CoLAKE: Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding', 'ru': 'CoLAKE: Контекстуализированный язык и внедрение знаний', 'ga': 'CoLAKE: Leabú Teanga agus Eolais i gComhthéacs', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'COLAKE: Ενσωμάτωση γλωσσών και γνώσεων στο πλαίσιο', 'hu': 'CoLAKE: Kontextualizált nyelv és tudás beágyazása', 'it': 'CoLAKE: Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding', 'kk': 'CoLAKE: Контекстуалды тіл мен білім ендіру', 'lt': 'CoLAKE: Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding', 'mk': 'COLAKE: Вградување на контекстен јазик и знаење', 'ms': 'CoLAKE: Bahasa dan Pengetahuan Terkonteks', 'mt': 'CoLAKE: Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding', 'ml': 'CoLAKE: Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding', 'mn': 'CoLAKE: Контекст хэл болон мэдлэг нэмж', 'no': 'CoLAKE: Innebygging av kontekstualisert språk og kjenning', 'pl': 'CoLAKE: Kontekstualizowane osadzanie języka i wiedzy', 'ro': 'CoLAKE: Încorporarea contextualizată a limbajului și cunoștințelor', 'sr': 'KOLAKE: Kontekstualizacija jezika i znanja', 'so': 'MARKE: Heeganka luuqada iyo aqoonta', 'si': 'කෝලේක්: සංවේදනය සහ දන්න භාෂා සම්බන්ධය', 'sv': 'CoLAKE: Inbäddning av kontextualiserat språk och kunskap', 'ur': 'CoLAKE: کنٹکسٹولیز زبان اور علم جمع کرنے والی', 'ta': 'காலாக்: மொழி மற்றும் அறிவு உள்ளமைப்பு', 'uz': 'KLAKE: Taò¥rifi va maò¥lumot oò£rnatili', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'КОЛАК: Вградяване на контекстуализиран език и знания', 'da': 'CoLAKE: Indlejring af kontekstualiseret sprog og viden', 'nl': 'CoLAKE: Gecontextualiseerde integratie van taal en kennis', 'hr': 'CoLAKE: Uključenje kontekstualiziranog jezika i znanja', 'de': 'CoLAKE: Kontextualisierte Einbettung von Sprache und Wissen', 'id': 'CoLAKE: Bahasa dan Pengetahuan Terkontekstualisasi', 'fa': 'کلاک: انجمن زبان و دانش', 'ko': '어경화 언어와 지식 삽입', 'sw': 'LAKE: Utafiti wa lugha na ufahamu unaotumika', 'tr': 'CoLAKE: Kontekstualized Dil we Bilgi Girişi', 'af': 'CoLAKE: Konteksualiseerde taal en kennis ingesluit', 'sq': 'CoLAKE: Përfshirje e gjuhës dhe njohurive të kontekstuara', 'am': 'ቋንቋ እና እውቀት አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'কলসেক: কন্ট্রুয়েলিয়াল ভাষা এবং জ্ঞান এমবেডিং', 'hy': 'ԿոԼԱՔ՝ Կոնտեքստալիզացված լեզու և գիտելիքի ներգրավումը', 'ca': "CoLAKE: L'integració del llenguatge i del coneixement contextualitzats", 'bs': 'KoLAKE: Kontekstualizirano uključenje jezika i znanja', 'cs': 'CoLAKE: Kontextualizované vložení jazyka a znalostí', 'fi': 'CoLAKE: Kontekstilisoitunut kieli ja tietämys', 'et': 'CoLAKE: kontekstualiseeritud keele ja teadmiste põimimine', 'az': 'CoLAKE: Kontekst Dili və Bilim İçeri', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'COLAKE: Vključevanje jezika in znanja', 'jv': 'CoLAKE: Ngubah Keteraksi Lan lan Kemerdekaan Bilih', 'he': 'קולאק: השפה והידע הקונקסטוליזציה', 'bo': 'CoLAKE: Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding'}
{'en': 'With the emerging branch of incorporating factual knowledge into pre-trained language models such as BERT, most existing models consider shallow, static, and separately pre-trained entity embeddings, which limits the performance gains of these models. Few works explore the potential of deep contextualized knowledge representation when injecting knowledge. In this paper, we propose the Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), which jointly learns contextualized representation for both language and knowledge with the extended MLM objective. Instead of injecting only entity embeddings, CoLAKE extracts the knowledge context of an entity from large-scale knowledge bases. To handle the heterogeneity of knowledge context and language context, we integrate them in a unified data structure, word-knowledge graph (WK graph). CoLAKE is pre-trained on large-scale WK graphs with the modified Transformer encoder. We conduct experiments on knowledge-driven tasks, knowledge probing tasks, and language understanding tasks. Experimental results show that CoLAKE outperforms previous counterparts on most of the tasks. Besides, CoLAKE achieves surprisingly high performance on our synthetic task called word-knowledge graph completion, which shows the superiority of simultaneously contextualizing language and knowledge representation.', 'ar': 'مع الفرع الناشئ لدمج المعرفة الواقعية في نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا مثل BERT ، تنظر معظم النماذج الحالية في عمليات ضم الكيانات الضحلة والثابتة والمدربة مسبقًا بشكل منفصل ، مما يحد من مكاسب أداء هذه النماذج. يستكشف عدد قليل من الأعمال إمكانات تمثيل المعرفة السياقية العميقة عند حقن المعرفة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح اللغة السياقية وتضمين المعرفة (CoLAKE) ، والتي تتعلم بشكل مشترك التمثيل السياقي لكل من اللغة والمعرفة مع هدف الامتيازات الممتدة. بدلاً من حقن حفلات الزفاف في الكيانات فقط ، تستخرج CoLAKE سياق المعرفة للكيان من قواعد المعرفة واسعة النطاق. للتعامل مع عدم تجانس سياق المعرفة وسياق اللغة ، نقوم بدمجهما في هيكل بيانات موحد ، رسم بياني لمعرفة الكلمات (رسم بياني WK). تم تدريب CoLAKE مسبقًا على الرسوم البيانية WK واسعة النطاق باستخدام تشفير Transformer المعدل. نجري تجارب على المهام القائمة على المعرفة ، ومهام التحقيق في المعرفة ، ومهام فهم اللغة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن CoLAKE يتفوق على نظرائه السابقين في معظم المهام. إلى جانب ذلك ، يحقق CoLAKE أداءً عاليًا بشكل مدهش في مهمتنا التركيبية المسماة إكمال الرسم البياني لمعرفة الكلمات ، والتي تُظهر تفوق تمثيل اللغة والمعرفة في الوقت نفسه.', 'es': 'Con la rama emergente de incorporar el conocimiento fáctico en modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados, como BERT, la mayoría de los modelos existentes consideran incorporaciones de entidades superficiales, estáticas y previamente entrenadas por separado, lo que limita las ganancias de rendimiento de estos modelos. Pocos trabajos exploran el potencial de la representación profunda del conocimiento contextualizado al inyectar conocimiento. En este artículo, proponemos la integración del lenguaje y el conocimiento contextualizados (CoLake), que aprende conjuntamente la representación contextualizada tanto para el lenguaje como para el conocimiento con el objetivo extendido de MLM. En lugar de inyectar solo incrustaciones de entidades, CoLake extrae el contexto de conocimiento de una entidad de bases de conocimiento a gran escala. Para manejar la heterogeneidad del contexto del conocimiento y el contexto del lenguaje, los integramos en una estructura de datos unificada, el gráfico de conocimiento de palabras (gráfico WK). CoLake está preentrenado en gráficos WK a gran escala con el codificador Transformer modificado. Llevamos a cabo experimentos sobre tareas impulsadas por el conocimiento, tareas de sondeo de conocimientos y tareas de comprensión del lenguaje. Los resultados experimentales muestran que CoLake supera a sus homólogos anteriores en la mayoría de las tareas. Además, CoLake logra un rendimiento sorprendentemente alto en nuestra tarea sintética llamada finalización de gráficos de conocimiento de palabras, que demuestra la superioridad de contextualizar simultáneamente la representación del lenguaje y el conocimiento.', 'pt': 'Com o ramo emergente de incorporar conhecimento factual em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados, como o BERT, a maioria dos modelos existentes considera embeddings de entidades superficiais, estáticos e pré-treinados separadamente, o que limita os ganhos de desempenho desses modelos. Poucos trabalhos exploram o potencial da representação contextualizada profunda do conhecimento ao injetar conhecimento. Neste artigo, propomos o Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), que aprende conjuntamente a representação contextualizada tanto da linguagem quanto do conhecimento com o objetivo estendido de MLM. Em vez de injetar apenas embeddings de entidade, o CoLAKE extrai o contexto de conhecimento de uma entidade de bases de conhecimento de grande escala. Para lidar com a heterogeneidade do contexto do conhecimento e do contexto da linguagem, nós os integramos em uma estrutura de dados unificada, gráfico de conhecimento de palavras (gráfico WK). O CoLAKE é pré-treinado em gráficos WK de grande escala com o codificador Transformer modificado. Conduzimos experimentos em tarefas orientadas ao conhecimento, tarefas de sondagem de conhecimento e tarefas de compreensão de linguagem. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o CoLAKE supera as contrapartes anteriores na maioria das tarefas. Além disso, o CoLAKE alcança um desempenho surpreendentemente alto em nossa tarefa sintética chamada preenchimento de gráfico de conhecimento de palavras, que mostra a superioridade de contextualizar simultaneamente a linguagem e a representação do conhecimento.', 'fr': "Avec la branche émergente de l'intégration de connaissances factuelles dans des modèles de langage préformés tels que BERT, la plupart des modèles existants considèrent des intégrations d'entités peu profondes, statiques et préformées séparément, ce qui limite les gains de performance de ces modèles. Peu d'œuvres explorent le potentiel d'une représentation contextualisée profonde des connaissances lors de l'injection de connaissances. Dans cet article, nous proposons le langage contextualisé et l'intégration des connaissances (CoLake), qui apprend conjointement la représentation contextualisée pour la langue et les connaissances avec l'objectif MLM étendu. Au lieu d'injecter uniquement des intégrations d'entités, CoLake extrait le contexte de connaissances d'une entité à partir de bases de connaissances à grande échelle. Pour gérer l'hétérogénéité du contexte de connaissances et du contexte linguistique, nous les intégrons dans une structure de données unifiée, un graphe de connaissance des mots (graphique WK). CoLake est pré-entraîné sur des graphes WK à grande échelle avec le codeur Transformer modifié. Nous menons des expériences sur des tâches axées sur les connaissances, des tâches d'exploration des connaissances et des tâches de compréhension du langage. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que CoLake surpasse ses homologues précédents sur la plupart des tâches. En outre, CoLake atteint des performances étonnamment élevées sur notre tâche synthétique appelée complétion graphique de la connaissance des mots, qui montre la supériorité de la contextualisation simultanée de la représentation du langage et des connaissances.", 'ja': 'BERTのような事実知識を事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルに組み込むという新たな分岐により、ほとんどの既存のモデルは、浅い、静的、および個別に事前にトレーニングされたエンティティの埋め込みを考慮しており、これらのモデルのパフォーマンスの向上を制限しています。 知識を注入する際に、深い文脈化された知識表現の可能性を探求する作品はほとんどない。 この論文では、拡張MLM目標と言語と知識の両方の文脈化された表現を共同で学習する文脈化言語と知識の埋め込み（ CoLAKE ）を提案する。 エンティティ埋め込みのみを挿入する代わりに、CoLAKEは大規模なナレッジベースからエンティティのナレッジコンテキストを抽出します。 知識コンテキストと言語コンテキストの異質性を扱うために、統一されたデータ構造、単語知識グラフ（ WKグラフ）に統合します。 CoLAKEは、改造されたトランスフォーマーエンコーダーを使用して、大規模なWKグラフで事前にトレーニングされています。 知識駆動型タスク、知識探索タスク、言語理解タスクの実験を行っています。 実験結果は、ほとんどのタスクでCoLAKEが以前の同僚を上回っていることを示しています。 さらに、CoLAKEは、単語知識グラフ完了と呼ばれる合成タスクで驚くほど高いパフォーマンスを達成し、言語と知識表現を同時にコンテキスト化することの優位性を示しています。', 'ru': 'С появлением отрасли включения фактических знаний в предварительно обученные языковые модели, такие как BERT, большинство существующих моделей рассматривают неглубокие, статические и отдельно обученные встраивания сущностей, что ограничивает рост производительности этих моделей. Немногие работы исследуют потенциал глубокого контекстуализированного представления знаний при вливании знаний. В этой статье мы предлагаем Контекстуализированное внедрение языка и знаний (CoLAKE), которое совместно изучает контекстуализированное представление как для языка, так и для знаний с расширенной целью MLM. Вместо того, чтобы вводить только сущности, CoLAKE извлекает контекст знаний сущности из крупномасштабных баз знаний. Чтобы справиться с неоднородностью контекста знаний и языкового контекста, мы интегрируем их в единую структуру данных, граф слова-знания (граф WK). CoLAKE предварительно обучается на крупномасштабных графиках WK с помощью модифицированного кодера Трансформатора. Мы проводим эксперименты над задачами, основанными на знаниях, задачами зондирования знаний и задачами понимания языка. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что CoLAKE превосходит предыдущие аналоги по большинству задач. Кроме того, CoLAKE достигает удивительно высокой производительности по нашей синтетической задаче, называемой заполнением графа слов-знаний, что показывает превосходство одновременной контекстуализации языка и представления знаний.', 'zh': '随将事实知识整合到预训练的言语模样(如BERT)中的新兴分支,大多现在模形都想了浅层,静态和独自的预练实体嵌入,这限限了这些模样的性能升擢。 少文在注知,探索深度情。 本文中,我们出了情境化言语和知识嵌入(CoLAKE),他因扩展的传销向共学语言和知识的情境。 CoLAKE 非徒注嵌也,取实于大知识库上下文。 上下文言语上下文异质性,集为一数据结构,即单词知图谱(WK图)。 CoLAKE用改进Transformer编码器大WK图训练。 我之驱使,求言解实验。 实验结果表明,CoLAKE优于前行。 CoLAKE以"单词知图谱成"为惊人之高性能,见兼言与知语境化之势也。', 'hi': 'BERT जैसे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल में तथ्यात्मक ज्ञान को शामिल करने की उभरती शाखा के साथ, अधिकांश मौजूदा मॉडल उथले, स्थिर और अलग-अलग पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित इकाई एम्बेडिंग पर विचार करते हैं, जो इन मॉडलों के प्रदर्शन लाभ को सीमित करता है। कुछ काम ज्ञान को इंजेक्ट करते समय गहरे प्रासंगिक ज्ञान प्रतिनिधित्व की क्षमता का पता लगाते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो संयुक्त रूप से विस्तारित एमएलएम उद्देश्य के साथ भाषा और ज्ञान दोनों के लिए प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व सीखता है। केवल एंटिटी एम्बेडिंग को इंजेक्ट करने के बजाय, CoLAKE बड़े पैमाने पर नॉलेज बेस से किसी एंटिटी के नॉलेज कॉन्टेक्स्ट को निकालता है। ज्ञान संदर्भ और भाषा संदर्भ की विषमता को संभालने के लिए, हम उन्हें एक एकीकृत डेटा संरचना, शब्द-ज्ञान ग्राफ (डब्ल्यूके ग्राफ) में एकीकृत करते हैं। CoLAKE संशोधित ट्रांसफॉर्मर एनकोडर के साथ बड़े पैमाने पर WK रेखांकन पर पूर्व प्रशिक्षित है। हम ज्ञान-संचालित कार्यों, ज्ञान जांच कार्यों और भाषा समझने के कार्यों पर प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि CoLAKE अधिकांश कार्यों पर पिछले समकक्षों को मात देता है। इसके अलावा, CoLAKE शब्द-ज्ञान ग्राफ पूरा होने नामक हमारे सिंथेटिक कार्य पर आश्चर्यजनक रूप से उच्च प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जो एक साथ भाषा और ज्ञान प्रतिनिधित्व को संदर्भित करने की श्रेष्ठता दिखाता है।', 'ga': 'Agus an brainse atá ag teacht chun cinn maidir le heolas fíorasach a ionchorprú i múnlaí teanga réamhoilte mar BERT, breithníonn an chuid is mó de na samhlacha atá ann cheana féin leabaithe aonáin éadomhain, statacha agus réamhoilte ar leithligh, rud a chuireann srian le gnóthachain feidhmíochta na múnlaí sin. Is beag saothar a dhéanann iniúchadh ar an bpoitéinseal a bhaineann le hionadaíocht dhomhain eolais a chomhthéacsú agus eolas á instealladh. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid Leabú Comhthéacsaithe Teanga agus Eolais (CoLAKE), a chomhfhoghlaimíonn léiriú comhthéacsaithe don teanga agus don eolas araon leis an gcuspóir leathnaithe MLM. In ionad leabaithe aonáin amháin a instealladh, baineann CoLAKE comhthéacs eolais an eintitis as bunáiteanna eolais ar scála mór. Chun ilchineálacht comhthéacs an eolais agus comhthéacs teanga a láimhseáil, déanaimid iad a chomhtháthú i struchtúr sonraí aontaithe, graf eolas focal (graf WK). Tá CoLAKE réamhoilte ar ghraif WK mórscála leis an ionchódóir Trasfhoirmeoir modhnaithe. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thascanna eolasbhunaithe, tascanna fiosraithe eolais, agus tascanna tuiscint teanga. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn CoLAKE lena gcomhghleacaithe roimhe seo ar fhormhór na dtascanna. Ina theannta sin, baineann CoLAKE ardfheidhmíocht amach ar ár dtasc sintéiseach ar a dtugtar comhlánú graf eolais focal, a léiríonn an fheabhas a bhaineann le hionadaíocht teanga agus eolais a chomhthéacsú ag an am céanna.', 'el': 'Με τον αναδυόμενο κλάδο της ενσωμάτωσης πραγματικών γνώσεων σε προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα όπως τα περισσότερα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα θεωρούν ρηχές, στατικές και χωριστά προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις οντοτήτων, γεγονός που περιορίζει τα κέρδη απόδοσης αυτών των μοντέλων. Λίγα έργα εξερευνούν τις δυνατότητες της βαθιάς αναπαράστασης της γνώσης κατά την εισαγωγή γνώσης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε την Ενσωμάτωση Περιεχομένου Γλώσσας και Γνώσης (η οποία μαθαίνει από κοινού την πλαισιωμένη αναπαράσταση τόσο για τη γλώσσα όσο και για τη γνώση με τον εκτεταμένο στόχο του ΜΛΜ. Αντί να εισάγει μόνο ενσωματώσεις οντοτήτων, το COLAKE εξάγει το πλαίσιο γνώσης μιας οντότητας από βάσεις γνώσης μεγάλης κλίμακας. Για να χειριστούμε την ετερογένεια του πλαισίου γνώσης και του γλωσσικού πλαισίου, τα ενσωματώνουμε σε μια ενοποιημένη δομή δεδομένων, το γράφημα λέξης-γνώσης (γράφημα WK). Το είναι προ-εκπαιδευμένο σε γραφήματα μεγάλης κλίμακας με τον τροποποιημένο κωδικοποιητή μετασχηματιστή. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε εργασίες βασισμένες στη γνώση, εργασίες ανίχνευσης γνώσης και εργασίες κατανόησης γλωσσών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το CoLAKE ξεπερνά τα προηγούμενα αντίστοιχα στις περισσότερες από τις εργασίες. Εξάλλου, το επιτυγχάνει εκπληκτικά υψηλές επιδόσεις στο συνθετικό μας έργο που ονομάζεται ολοκλήρωση γραφήματος λέξης-γνώσης, το οποίο δείχνει την υπεροχή της ταυτόχρονης ενσωμάτωσης της γλώσσας και της αναπαράστασης της γνώσης.', 'ka': 'ფაქტიური ცნობილების შეყვარების გარეშე მოდელში, როგორც BERT, უფრო მსგავსი მოდელები იფიქრობენ ცნობილი, სტატიკური და განყოფილებელად განსწავლებული ინტერტიკური შეყვარებები, რომელიც ამ მოდელების შესაძლებლობას დასა პატარა სამუშაო შესაძლებლობა ძალიან კონტექსტუალური ცნობიერების პროცენტაციის პროცენტაციას, როცა ცნობიერების ინექტირება ამ დომენტში ჩვენ კონტექსტუალურებული ენაა და მეცნიერების შებეჭირება (CoLAKE), რომელიც ერთადერთად სწავლის კონტექსტუალურებული გამოსახულება ენაზე და მეცნიერებისთვის MLM მიზეზით. მხოლოდ ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკურების გარეშე, CoLAKE ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური გარეშე დიდი მაგა უცნობების კონტექსტის და ენის კონტექსტის heterogeneity-ის გამოყენება, ჩვენ ისინი ერთადერთებული მონაცემების სტრუქტურაში ინტერგურაცით, სიტყვა-ცნობების გრა CoLAKE- ს დიდი მაგალითი WK გრაფიკაში შეცვლელი ტრანფორმეტრის კოდერისთან უბრალოდ განაკეთებულია. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ცნობიერებულ დავალების, ცნობიერებულ დავალების და ენის გაგრძნობის დავალების შესახებ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ CoLAKE უფრო მეტი პარამეტრების შესახებ წინასწარმოდგენა. დამატებით, CoLAKE მიიღება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სინტეტიკურ', 'it': "Con il ramo emergente dell'integrazione delle conoscenze fattuali in modelli linguistici pre-formati come BERT, la maggior parte dei modelli esistenti considera incorporazioni superficiali, statiche e separatamente pre-formate di entità, il che limita i guadagni di prestazioni di questi modelli. Pochi lavori esplorano il potenziale di una rappresentazione profonda della conoscenza contestualizzata quando iniettano conoscenza. In questo articolo, proponiamo il Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), che impara congiuntamente la rappresentazione contestualizzata sia per la lingua che per la conoscenza con l'obiettivo MLM esteso. Invece di iniettare solo incorporazioni di entità, CoLAKE estrae il contesto di conoscenza di un'entità da basi di conoscenza su larga scala. Per gestire l'eterogeneità del contesto della conoscenza e del contesto linguistico, li integriamo in una struttura dati unificata, il grafico della conoscenza delle parole (grafico WK). CoLAKE è pre-addestrato su grafici WK su larga scala con l'encoder Transformer modificato. Conduciamo esperimenti su compiti basati sulla conoscenza, compiti di ricerca della conoscenza e compiti di comprensione della lingua. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che CoLAKE supera le controparti precedenti nella maggior parte delle attività. Inoltre, CoLAKE raggiunge prestazioni sorprendentemente elevate sul nostro compito sintetico chiamato word-knowledge graph completion, che mostra la superiorità della contestualizzazione simultanea del linguaggio e della rappresentazione della conoscenza.", 'hu': 'Mivel a tényszerű ismeretek előre képzett nyelvi modellekbe történő beépítésének új ága, mint például a BERT, a legtöbb meglévő modell a sekély, statikus és külön képzett entitások beágyazását veszi figyelembe, ami korlátozza e modellek teljesítménynövekedését. Néhány mű feltárja a tudás befecskendezésének mély kontextuális ábrázolásában rejlő lehetőségeket. Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk a kontextualizált nyelv és tudás beágyazását (CoLAKE), amely a kiterjesztett MLM célkitűzéssel közösen tanul kontextualizált reprezentációt mind a nyelv, mind a tudás tekintetében. Ahelyett, hogy csak entitás beágyazásokat fecskendezne be, a CoLAKE kiterjeszti egy entitás tudáskörzetét nagyszabású tudásbázisokból. A tudási kontextus és a nyelvi kontextus heterogenitásának kezelése érdekében integráljuk őket egy egységes adatszerkezetbe, szótudási grafikonba (WK grafikon). A CoLAKE nagyméretű WK grafikonokra készült, módosított Transformer kódolóval. Kísérleteket végzünk tudásalapú feladatokkal, tudásmérő feladatokkal és nyelvértési feladatokkal. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a CoLAKE a legtöbb feladatban felülmúlja a korábbi társait. Emellett a CoLAKE meglepően nagy teljesítményt ér el szintetikus feladatunkban, az úgynevezett szó-ismeret gráf kiegészítésben, amely a nyelv és tudás egyidejűleg kontextuális ábrázolásának felsőbbrendűségét mutatja.', 'lt': 'Dauguma esamų modelių mano, kad faktinių žinių įtraukimas į išankstinio mokymo kalbų modelius, pavyzdžiui, BERT, yra paviršutinis, statinis ir atskirai išankstinio mokymo subjektų įtraukimas, todėl apribojamas šių modelių veiklos rezultatų padidėjimas. Keletas darbų išnagrinėja gilaus konteksto žinių atstovavimo galimybes įdiegiant žinias. Šiame dokumente siūlome kontekstinę kalbą ir žinių įtraukimą (CoLAKE), kuris kartu mokosi kontekstinį atstovavimą tiek kalbai, tiek žinioms su išplėstiniu MLM tikslu. Užuot investavusi tik į subjektus, COLAKE iš didelio masto žinių bazių ištraukia subjekto žinių kontekstą. Siekiant išspręsti žinių konteksto ir kalbos konteksto heterogeniškumą, integruojame juos į vieningą duomenų struktūrą, žodžių žinių grafiką (WK grafiką). CoLAKE iš anksto mokomas didelio masto WK grafikuose su modifikuotu Transformer kodatoriumi. Eksperimentuojame žiniomis pagrįstas užduotis, žinių tyrimo užduotis ir kalbų supratimo užduotis. Experimental results show that CoLAKE outperforms previous counterparts on most of the tasks.  Be to, COLAKE pasiekia nuostabiai didelius rezultatus mūsų sintetinės užduoties, vadinamos žodžių ir žinių grafikos užbaigimu, kuris rodo, kad vienu metu kontekstualizuojama kalbos ir žinių atstovavimas yra geriausias.', 'mk': 'Со развивањето на фактичното знаење во предобучените јазички модели како што е БЕРТ, повеќето постоечки модели сметаат за плошки, статички и одделно предобучени ентитети, кои ги ограничуваат добивките во перформансата на овие модели. Неколку работи го истражуваат потенцијалот на длабоко контекстуално претставување на знаењето кога се инјектира знаење. Во овој весник, ние го предлагаме Контекстулизираниот јазик и вградување на знаење (CoLAKE), кој заедно учи контекстулизирано претставување за јазик и знаење со проширената цел MLM. Наместо да инјектира само интеграции на ентитетите, КоЛАКЕ го извадува контекстот на знаење на ентитетот од големи бази на знаење. За да се справи со хетерогенетоста на контекстот на знаењето и јазичкиот контекст, ги интегрираме во унифицирана структура на податоци, график за зборо-знаење (WK график). CoLAKE is pre-trained on large-scale WK graphs with the modified Transformer encoder.  We conduct experiments on knowledge-driven tasks, knowledge probing tasks, and language understanding tasks.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека КоЛАКЕ ги надминува претходните колеги во поголемиот дел од задачите. Покрај тоа, КоЛАКЕ постигнува изненадувачки висока резултат на нашата синтетичка задача наречена комплетирање на графикот со зборови-знаење, што ја покажува супериорноста на истовремено контекстуално претставување на јазикот и знаењето.', 'kk': 'БЕРТ секілді фактикалық білімдерді алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілеріне ендіру үшін, барлық моделдердің көпшілігі бұл үлгілердің жылғыз, статикалық және бөлек алдын- оқылған білім ендіру үлгілерін шектеп береді. Кейбір жұмыс білімді инжекциялау кезінде тәртіпті мәліметтерді көрсету мүмкіндігін іздейді. Бұл қағазда, мәліметті және мәліметті ендіру (CoLAKE) дегенді ұсынамыз. Бұл мәліметтің көтерілген мәліметтің тілі мен білім мақсаттарының көтерілген мәліметті жалғастыру үшін Тек нысандарды ендіру орнына, CoLAKE үлкен өлшемді білім негізінен білім контексті шығару. Мәліметтердің контексті мен тіл контексті гетерогендиялығын басқару үшін оларды біріктірілген деректер құрылымына, сөздерді білім графикасына (WK графикасына) біріктіреміз. CoLAKE өзгертілген түрлендіруші кодтағы WK графиктерінің үлкен масштабында алдын- ала оқылған. Біз білім бағытталған тапсырмаларды, білім тапсырмаларды тексеру және тілді тапсырмаларды түсініп тұрмыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер КОЛАК тапсырмалардың көпшілігінде алдыңғы партнерді жасайды. Кейін, CoLAKE біздің синтетикалық тапсырмамызды сөз-білім графикасын толтыру деп аталатын синтетикалық тапсырмаңыздың көп жұмысын жеткізеді. Бұл тіл мен білім мәліметтерді бір-біріктіру үші', 'mt': 'Bil-fergħa emerġenti tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-għarfien fattwali fil-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel bħall-BERT, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli eżistenti jikkunsidraw inkorporazzjoni baxxa, statika u separatament imħarrġa minn qabel tal-entitajiet, li tillimita l-qligħ fil-prestazzjoni ta’ dawn il-mudelli. Ftit xogħlijiet jesploraw il-potenzjal ta’ rappreżentazzjoni profonda tal-għarfien kuntestwalizzat meta jinjettaw l-għarfien. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu l-Lingwa Kuntest u l-Inkorporazzjoni tal-Għarfien (CoLAKE), li flimkien jitgħallem rappreżentazzjoni kuntestwalizzata kemm għall-lingwa kif ukoll għall-għarfien bl-għan estiż tal-MLM. Minflok ma tinjetta biss l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-entitajiet, il-CoLAKE testrakta l-kuntest tal-għarfien ta’ entità minn bażijiet tal-għarfien fuq skala kbira. Biex nindirizzaw l-eteroġeneità tal-kuntest tal-għarfien u l-kuntest tal-lingwa, nintegraw f’struttura unifikata tad-dejta, graff tal-għarfien tal-kliem (graff WK). Il-CoLAKE huwa mħarreġ minn qabel fuq grafiċi WK fuq skala kbira bil-kodifikatur modifikat tat-Transformer. We conduct experiments on knowledge-driven tasks, knowledge probing tasks, and language understanding tasks.  Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li CoLAKE jaqbeż il-kontropartijiet preċedenti fil-biċċa l-kbira tal-kompiti. Barra minn hekk, il-CoLAKE tikseb prestazzjoni sorprendentement għolja fuq il-kompitu sintetiku tagħna msejjaħ tlestija tal-grafika tal-għarfien tal-kliem, li turi s-superjorità tar-rappreżentanza tal-lingwa u tal-għarfien li jiġu kontekstwalizzati fl-istess ħin.', 'ms': 'Dengan cabang yang muncul untuk memasukkan pengetahuan fakta ke dalam model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih seperti BERT, kebanyakan model yang ada menganggap bahasa yang rendah, statik, dan secara terpisah memasukkan entiti yang dilatih-dilatih, yang membatasi keuntungan prestasi model ini. Beberapa pekerjaan mengeksplorasi potensi perwakilan pengetahuan kontekstualisasi dalam apabila menyuntik pengetahuan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan Bahasa dan Pengetahuan Terkonteks (CoLAKE), yang bersama-sama belajar perwakilan konteks untuk bahasa dan pengetahuan dengan tujuan MLM yang dilambangkan. Daripada menyuntik hanya bentuk entiti, CoLAKE mengekstrak konteks pengetahuan entiti dari pangkalan pengetahuan skala besar. Untuk mengendalikan heterogeniti konteks pengetahuan dan konteks bahasa, kita mengintegrasikan mereka dalam struktur data bersatu, graf pengetahuan perkataan (graf WK). CoLAKE dilatih-dilatih pada graf WK skala besar dengan pengekod Transformer yang diubahsuai. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada tugas pengetahuan, tugas pengetahuan, dan tugas pemahaman bahasa. Experimental results show that CoLAKE outperforms previous counterparts on most of the tasks.  Besides, CoLAKE achieves surprisingly high performance on our synthetic task called word-knowledge graph completion, which shows the superiority of simultaneously contextualizing language and knowledge representation.', 'mn': 'БЕРТ шиг сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загвар руу үнэндээ мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх шинэ загвар нь ихэнх сургалтын загвар нь гүехэн, тогтмол болон тусгаар сургалтын өмнө сургалтын загвар юм. Энэ загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг хязгаарлаж Мэдлэгийг инжекцийн үед гүн гүнзгий орчин үеийн мэдлэгийг илэрхийлэх боломжтой байдлыг судалж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид "Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding" (CoLAKE) болон "Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding" (CoLAKE) гэсэн санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хоёр хэл болон мэдлэг хоёуланг боловсролтой MLM зорилгоор ойлгож суралцаж байна. Зөвхөн элементийн нэгдэл инжекцийг инжекцийн оронд, CoLAKE нь том хэмжээний мэдлэгийн суурь суурь бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэг байдлаас гаргадаг. Мэдлэг орчин болон хэл орчин тохиолдолын тэгш өнцөгт байдлыг удирдахын тулд бид тэднийг нэгтгэл өгөгдлийн бүтэц, үг мэдлэг график (WK график) руу нэгтгэдэг. CoLAKE нь том хэмжээний WK график дээр өөрчлөгдсөн Трансформатчийн коддор дамжуулагдсан юм. Бид мэдлэгийг удирдах үйл ажиллагаа, мэдлэгийг судалж, хэл ойлгох үйл ажиллагааны талаар туршилт хийдэг. Эмчилгээний үр дүн нь CoLAKE өмнөх ажлын ихэнх даалгавруудыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүнээс гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг CoLAKE нь "word-knowledge graph completion" гэж нэрлэгддэг. Энэ нь хэл болон мэдлэг илэрхийлэлийг нэгтгэх үеийн өндөр чадварыг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'പുറപ്പെടുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ അറിവ് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കൊണ്ട്, ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ പോലെ നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മിക Few works explore the potential of deep contextualized knowledge representation when injecting knowledge.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയും അറിവുകളും എംഎല്\u200dഎമിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തോടൊപ്പം കൂടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയ്ക്കും അറിവും പ്രതിനിധിയില ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ അറിവ് ബേസ്സില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ പരിജ്ഞാനം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെയും ഭാഷയുടെയും സംസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dവ്വം കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഒരുമിച്ചുചേര്\u200dത്ത ഡ മാറ്റിയിട്ടുള്ള ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dഗ്രാഫിന്\u200dറെ കോളാക്ക് മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു ജ്ഞാനം നടത്തുന്ന ജോലികളെക്കുറിച്ചും ജ്ഞാനം തെളിയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചും ഭാഷ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടി പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് കോലാക്ക് മുമ്പുള്ള കൂട്ടുകാരെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്നാണ്. കൂടാതെ, കോലാക്കിന് അത്ഭുതകരമായ പ്രകടനം നമ്മുടെ സിനിറ്റിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d വാക്ക്-അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരേ സമയത്', 'pl': 'Wraz z powstającą gałęzią włączania wiedzy faktycznej do wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych, takich jak BERT, większość istniejących modeli uwzględnia płytkie, statyczne i oddzielnie wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia jednostek, co ogranicza wzrost wydajności tych modeli. Niewiele prac bada potencjał głębokiej kontekstualizowanej reprezentacji wiedzy podczas wstrzykiwania wiedzy. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy kontekstualizowane osadzanie języka i wiedzy (CoLAKE), które wspólnie uczy się kontekstualizowanej reprezentacji zarówno dla języka, jak i wiedzy z rozszerzonym celem MLM. Zamiast wstrzykiwać tylko osadzenia jednostek, CoLAKE wyodrębnia kontekst wiedzy jednostki z dużych baz wiedzy. Aby poradzić sobie z heterogenicznością kontekstu wiedzy i kontekstu językowego, integrujemy je w jednolitą strukturę danych, wykres wiedzy słowa (wykres WK). CoLAKE jest wstępnie przeszkolony na dużych wykresach WK za pomocą zmodyfikowanego enkodera Transformera. Prowadzimy eksperymenty na zadaniach opartych na wiedzy, zadaniach sondujących wiedzę oraz zadaniach rozumienia języka. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że CoLAKE przewyższa poprzednie odpowiedniki w większości zadań. Ponadto CoLAKE osiąga zaskakująco wysoką wydajność w naszym syntetycznym zadaniu zwanym wykresem wiedzy słowa, który pokazuje wyższość jednoczesnego kontekstualizowania reprezentacji języka i wiedzy.', 'ro': 'Odată cu dezvoltarea ramurii de integrare a cunoștințelor de fapt în modele lingvistice pre-instruite, cum ar fi BERT, majoritatea modelelor existente iau în considerare încorporări superficiale, statice și separat pre-instruite de entități, ceea ce limitează câștigurile de performanță ale acestor modele. Puține lucrări explorează potențialul unei reprezentări profunde contextualizate a cunoașterii atunci când injectează cunoștințe. În această lucrare, propunem Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), care învață împreună reprezentarea contextualizată atât pentru limbă, cât și pentru cunoaștere, cu obiectivul extins MLM. În loc să injecteze doar încorporări de entități, CoLAKE extrage contextul de cunoaștere al unei entități din baze de cunoștințe la scară largă. Pentru a gestiona eterogeneitatea contextului cunoștințelor și contextului lingvistic, le integrăm într-o structură de date unificată, graficul cunoașterii cuvintelor (graficul WK). CoLAKE este pre-instruit pe grafice WK la scară largă cu encoder Transformer modificat. Realizăm experimente pe sarcini bazate pe cunoaștere, sarcini de sondare a cunoștințelor și sarcini de înțelegere a limbii. Rezultatele experimentale arată că CoLAKE depășește omologii anteriori în majoritatea sarcinilor. În plus, CoLAKE obține performanțe surprinzător de ridicate în sarcina noastră sintetică numită completarea graficului cunoașterii cuvintelor, care arată superioritatea reprezentării simultan a limbajului și cunoașterii.', 'no': 'Med den opprinnelige grensen av å inkludere faktiske kunnskap i før- trengte språk- modeller, som er BERT, vil dei fleste eksisterande modelane vurdere sållog, statisk og separert før- trengte innbygging av einingar, som begrenser utviklinga av desse modelane. Feil arbeidar utforskar potensialen for dypt kontekstualisert kunnskap når det injiserer kunnskap. I denne papiret foreslår vi kontekstualisert språk og kjennomsnittsamlinga (CoLAKE), som lærer saman kontekstualisert representasjon for både språk og kjennomsnitt med utvida MLM-mål. I staden for å injisera berre innbygging av einingar, pakkar CoLAKE ut kunnskapen til ein eining frå storskala kunnskapsbaser. For å handtere heterogeneitet av kunnskonteksten og språk-konteksten, integrerer vi dei i eit vienot datastruktur, ordkunnskapsgraf (WK-graf). CoLAKE er først trent på store WK- grafikk med den modifiserte transformeringskoden. Vi gjev eksperimenter på kunnskap-drivte oppgåver, kunnskap-probering av oppgåver og språk-forståking av oppgåver. Eksperimentale resultat viser at CoLAKE utfører tidlegare mottakarar på dei fleste av oppgåva. I tillegg vil CoLAKE oppnå overraska høg utvikling på syntetiske oppgåve vårt kalla fullføring av ordvitningsgraf, som viser overvekslinga av samtidig kontekstualisering av språk og kunnskapsrepresentasjon.', 'sr': 'Sa pojavljujućim granom uključivanja činjeničnih znanja u predobučene jezičke modele kao što je BERT, većina postojećih modela smatra plitkim, statičnim i odvojenim integracijama predobučenih entitata, koja ograničava dobitak učinka ovih modela. Malo poslova istražuje potencijal dubokog kontekstualizacije znanja kada ubrizgavaju znanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo kontekstualiziranu integraciju jezika i znanja (CoLAKE), koja zajedno uči kontekstualiziranu predstavu jezika i znanja sa širenim ciljem MLM. Umesto da ubrizgavaju samo objekte, CoLAKE izvlači znanje konteksta entiteta iz velikih znanja baze. Da bi se rešili heterogenetnost konteksta znanja i jezika, integrirali smo ih u jedinstvenu strukturu podataka, grafiku znanja riječi (WK grafik). CoLAKE je predobučen na velikim graficama WK sa modifikovanom koderom transformera. Mi vodimo eksperimente o zadatkima koji su vodili znanje, znanja ispitivanja zadataka i jezika razumevanja zadataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da CoLAKE iznosi prethodne kolege na većini zadataka. Osim toga, CoLAKE postiže iznenađujuće visoke funkcije na našem sintetičkom zadatku nazvanom kompletnom grafiku riječi znanja, što pokazuje superiornost istovremeno kontekstualizacije jezika i znanja.', 'so': 'Markii la soo baxay laamaha aqoonta runta ah oo ku soo qoraya modelalka afka hore ee loo tababaray, sida BERT, modellada badan ee ku jira waxay ka fiirsadaan meelo jaban, static iyo gooni ah, taas oo xadgudba koritaanka qaababka qaababkan. Wax yar ayaa shaqo ka baahan kara awoodda aqoonta aad u dheer oo la soo jeedo marka la soo bixiyo aqoonta. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qalabka aqoonta ee ku qoran luqada iyo aqoonta (CoLAKE), kaas oo si wadajir ah u baranaya wakiilka horumarsashada oo ku qoran luqada iyo aqoonta iyo goal dheer oo MLM ah. Iska badalta injiilka macluumaadka oo kaliya, CoLAKE wuxuu ka soo saaraa macluumaadka aqoonta hoose-dhexe oo aad u weyn. Si aan u xambaarano muuqashada aqoonta iyo xiriirka luqada, waxaannu ugu wada ururinaynaa dhismaha aqoonta, xarunta aqoonta (WK). CoLAKE waa horay loo tababariyey sawirada WK oo aad u weyn, kaas oo lagu beddelay kodkii beddelista. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan shaqada aqoonta, aqoonta la imtixaamo shaqooyinka, iyo waxyaabaha lagu garanayo luqada. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in CoLAKE uu sameeyo saaxiibbada hore ee shaqada badan. Besides, CoLAKE achieves surprisingly high performance on our synthetic task called word-knowledge graph completion, which shows the superiority of simultaneously contextualizing language and knowledge representation.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலும் இருக்கும் மொழி மாதிரிகளில் உண்மையான அறிவை சேர்க்கும் கிளையில், பெரும்பாலும் இருக்கும் மாதிரிகளை போன்ற பெரும்பாலான மாதிரிகள் பழுப்பு, ந சில வேலை செய்யும் அறிவை உள்ளீடும் போது ஆழமான பாதிக்கப்பட்ட அறிவு குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளதை கண்டறியும். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மொழி மற்றும் அறிவு உடையத்திற்கும் மொழி மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளப்பட்ட மொழி மற்றும் அறிவின் மூலமும் ஒன்றாக கற்றுக்  பொருள் உள்ளீடுகளை மட்டும் சுருக்குவதற்கு பதிலாக, கோலாக் பெரிய அளவு அறிவு அடிப்படைகளில் இருந்து ஒரு பொருளின் அறிவு மூலம் வ அறிவு சூழல் மற்றும் மொழி சூழல் சூழலின் தனித்தன்மையை கையாள வேண்டுமானால், நாம் அவற்றை ஒருங்கிணைக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பில CoLAKE is pre-trained on large-scale WK graphs with the modified Transformer encoder.  நாம் அறிவு இயக்கும் பணிகள் பற்றி சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம், அறிவு பணிகளை நிரூபிக்கும் அறிவு, மொழி புரிந்து கொ முயற்சி முடிவுகள் பெரும்பாலான வேலைகளில் கோலாக் முந்தைய எதிரியாளர்களை வெளியேற்றுகிறது என்பதை காட்ட அதற்கும் மேலும், CoLAKE ஆச்சரியமான உயர்ந்த செயல்பாட்டை எங்கள் சொல்ல-அறிவு வரைபடம் முடிவு என்று அழைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது மொழி மற்றும் அறிவு பிரதிந', 'sv': 'Med den framväxande grenen av att införliva faktakunskap i förberedda språkmodeller som BERT beaktar de flesta befintliga modellerna ytliga, statiska och separat förberedda enhetsinbäddningar, vilket begränsar prestandavinsterna för dessa modeller. Få verk utforskar potentialen av djup kontextualiserad kunskapsrepresentation vid injicering av kunskap. I denna uppsats föreslår vi Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), som gemensamt lär sig kontextualiserad representation för både språk och kunskap med det utökade MLM-målet. Istället för att injicera enbart entitetsinbäddningar extraherar CoLAKE en entitets kunskapskontext från storskaliga kunskapsbaser. För att hantera heterogeniteten i kunskapssammanhang och språkkontext integrerar vi dem i en enhetlig datastruktur, ordkunskapsgraf (WK graf). CoLAKE är förberedd på storskaliga WK-grafer med den modifierade Transformer-kodaren. Vi utför experiment med kunskapsdrivna uppgifter, kunskapssonderingsuppgifter och språkförståelse. Experimentella resultat visar att CoLAKE presterar bättre än tidigare motsvarigheter på de flesta av uppgifterna. Dessutom uppnår CoLAKE förvånansvärt hög prestanda på vår syntetiska uppgift som kallas ordkunskapsgrafkomplettering, vilket visar överlägset i att samtidigt kontextualisera språk och kunskapsrepresentation.', 'si': 'බෙර්ට් වලින් ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂා මොඩල් වලින් ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට ඇතුළත් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට පරි ගොඩක් වැඩ කරන්නේ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරපු භාෂාව සහ දන්නවත් සම්බන්ධය (CoLAK) කිරීමට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, ඒක සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාප ඉන්ජික් විතරයි අයින්ටිට් එක්ක සංවිධානය විතරයි, CoLAK ලොකු විශාල දැනගන්න අයින්ටියක් ගැන දන්න සම්බන් දන්න සම්බන්ධය සහ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධයේ හෙටෙරෝජනිතාවය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයා කරන්න, අපි ඔවුන්ව එකම දත්ත සූදානයක්, වචන- CoLAK විසින් වෙනස් වෙනස් කරුණාකරණය කරුණාකරණය සඳහා විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් WK ග්\u200dරාෆ් වල ප අපි දැනගන්න පුළුවන් වැඩක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, දැනගන්න පුළුවන් වැඩක් සහ භාෂාව තේරුම් වැඩක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා කොලාක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා කියලා. ඒ වගේම, කෝලක් අපේ සින්ටෙටික වැඩේ පුළුවන් විශ්වාසයෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනවා වචනය ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්පූර්ණය කියලා, ඒකෙන් එකම විදියට භා', 'ur': 'اور اس سے پہلے ترسیم کی زبان مدلکوں میں حقیقی علم کا شامل کرنا ہے جیسے BERT، بہت سے موجود موجود مدلکوں کو گہرے، سٹیٹ، اور مختلف طریقے سے پہلے ترسیم کی اجتماعی امڈینگ سمجھتے ہیں، جو ان مدلکوں کے کامیابی کو محدود کرتی ہے. بہت کم کام سمجھتے ہیں جبکہ علم کے ذریعہ تزریق کرتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم متوسط زبان اور علم جمع کرنے (CoLAKE) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ایک دوسرے سے متوسط زبان اور علم کے لئے پھیلائی MLM موضوع کے ساتھ متوسط نمایش سکھاتا ہے. صرف انٹیٹی امڈینگ کے سوا، CoLAKE ایک بڑی مقدار علم بنسس سے ایک entity کے علم کا محسوب نکالتا ہے. علم کے متصلہ اور زبان کے متصلہ کی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر CoLAKE بڑے اسکیل WK گراف پر پیش آموزش کی جاتی ہے جو بدل دی جاتی ہے ترنسفور اکڈر کے ساتھ۔ ہم علم کی مسائل کے بارے میں آزمائش کرتے ہیں، علم کی تحقیق کے بارے میں اور زبان کی سمجھ کے کاموں میں. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ CoLAKE اگلے کنٹرپارٹوں کو بہت سے کاموں پر زیادہ عمل کرتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، کولاک ہمارے سینٹیٹیک کام پر اچھا کام پہنچاتا ہے جو کلمات علم گراف پورا کرنا ہے، جو ایک دفعہ زبان اور علم کی تعبیر کی زیادتی دکھاتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Với nhánh mới nhất của việc nhập kiến thức thực tế vào các mô- đun ngôn ngữ được đào tạo trước như BERT, hầu hết các mô- đun hiện thời cho thấy sự nhúng tay, tĩnh và được đào tạo riêng biệt, giới hạn lợi nhuận của những mô- đun này. Rất ít công việc khám phá khả năng cung cấp kiến thức ngữ sâu và tình hình khi tiêm kiến thức. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị tình hình ngôn ngữ và kiến thức nhúng tay (CoLAKE), cùng học cách chế tạo văn hóa cho cả ngôn ngữ lẫn kiến thức với mục tiêu MLM mở rộng. Thay vì tiêm độc đơn nhập tổ chức, CoLAKE rút ra ngữ cảnh về kiến thức của một thực thể từ cơ sở tri thức lớn. Để xử lý sự khác nhau của ngữ cảnh kiến thức và ngữ cảnh ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi nhập chúng vào một cấu trúc dữ liệu thống nhất, đồ thị từ-kiến thức (đồ thị của WK). Trên màn hình WK với mã hóa biến hình đã được chuẩn bị sẵn. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm về các công việc dựa trên kiến thức, các công việc thăm dò kiến thức, và các công việc hiểu ngôn ngữ. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy rằng CoLAke hoàn thành các đối tác trước trong hầu hết các nhiệm vụ. Ngoài ra, CoLAek đạt được trình độ cao đáng ngạc nhiên trong công việc tổng hợp gọi là điền kết đồ thị từ hiểu biết, nó cho thấy ưu thế của việc mô phỏng ngôn ngữ và kiến thức đồng thời.', 'uz': "Bu modellarning birinchi taʼminlovchi tillar modellariga qo'yish haqiqiqiy maʼlumotni birinchi o'rganish darajasi bilan BERT kabi, mavjud modellarning ko'pchiligi o'xshash, statik va faqat o'rganilgan narsalarni o'zgartiradi. Bir nechta ishlaydi, ilmiyni qo'yishda o'rganishda juda qiziqarli tajriba qo'shiladi. Bu hujjatda biz MLM obʼektlari bilan birlashtirilgan tillar va taʼlumot muammolari (CoLAKE) ta'minlovchi tilni va ta'limni o'rganamiz. Faqat obʼektlarni qo'yishni oʻrnatishdan oʻrniga, AKLAKE juda katta taʼlumot asosidagi obʼektlarning maʼlumotni olib tashlaydi. Biz ularni bir birlashtirilgan maʼlumot tizimi, so'zlar taʼminot tizimini (WK grammatika) bilan birlashtiramiz. Name Biz ta'anaviy vazifalar, ta'lim vazifalar tizimini, tillarni o'rganish vazifalarini, tilni o'rganish vazifalarini bajaramiz. Tekshirish natijalari ko'pchilik vazifalardan oldingi boshqaruvchilarni bajaradi. KoLAKE esa, bizning syntetik vazifasimizda juda ajoyib bajarish imkoniyatini bajaradi, so'z ma'lum grafik tuzilishi mumkin, bu bir xil tilni va ilmiy tashkilotni bir xil paytida taʼminlovchi darajaga ko'rsatadi.", 'bg': 'С нововъзникващия клон на включването на фактически знания в предварително обучените езикови модели като BERT, повечето съществуващи модели разглеждат плитки, статични и отделно предварително обучени елементи, което ограничава повишаването на производителността на тези модели. Малко произведения изследват потенциала на дълбоко контекстуализирано представяне на знанията при инжектиране на знания. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме контекстуализирания език и влагане на знания (което съвместно изучава контекстуализирано представяне както за език, така и за знания с разширената цел МТМ. Вместо да инжектира само вграждания на субекти, извлича контекста на знанията на субект от широкомащабни бази от знания. За да се справим с хетерогенността на контекста на знанието и езиковия контекст, ние ги интегрираме в единна структура от данни, графика дума-знание (графика). КоЛАК е предварително обучен за мащабни графики с модифициран трансформаторен кодер. Провеждаме експерименти по задачи, свързани със знанието, задачи за изследване на знанието и задачи за разбиране на езика. Експерименталните резултати показват, че CoLAKE превъзхожда предишните си колеги в повечето задачи. Освен това постига изненадващо високи резултати по нашата синтетична задача, наречена завършване на графика за знание на думи, което показва превъзходството на едновременно контекстуализиране на езика и представянето на знанието.', 'da': 'Med den nye gren af at indarbejde faktuel viden i præuddannede sprogmodeller som BERT overvejer de fleste eksisterende modeller overfladiske, statiske og separat præuddannede enhedsindlejringer, hvilket begrænser ydeevnegevinsterne ved disse modeller. Få værker udforsker potentialet i dyb kontekstualiseret vidensrepræsentation ved indsprøjtning af viden. I denne artikel foreslår vi Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), som i fællesskab lærer kontekstualiseret repræsentation for både sprog og viden med det udvidede MLM-mål. I stedet for kun at injicere enhedsindlejringer udtrækker CoLAKE en enheds videnskontekst fra store vidensbaser. For at håndtere heterogeniteten i videnskontekst og sprogkontekst integrerer vi dem i en samlet datastruktur, ordvidensgraf (WK graf). CoLAKE er præ-trænet på store WK grafer med den modificerede Transformer encoder. Vi udfører eksperimenter med vidensdrevne opgaver, vidensundersøgelsesopgaver og sprogforståelsesopgaver. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at CoLAKE overgår tidligere modparter på de fleste af opgaverne. Desuden opnår CoLAKE overraskende høj ydeevne på vores syntetiske opgave kaldet ordviden graffærdiggørelse, som viser overlegenheden af samtidig kontekstualisering af sprog og viden repræsentation.', 'hr': 'S rastućim granom uključivanja činjeničnih znanja u predobučene jezičke modele kao što je BERT, većina postojećih modela smatra plitkim, statičnim i odvojenim integracijama predobučenih entitata, koja ograničava postignuće učinkovitosti tih modela. Manje radova istražuju potencijal dubokog kontekstualizacije znanja kada ubrizgavaju znanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo kontekstualiziranu integraciju jezika i znanja (CoLAKE), koja zajedno uči kontekstualiziranu predstavu jezika i znanja sa širenim ciljem MLM-a. Umjesto ubrizgavanja samo objekata, CoLAKE izvlači kontekst znanja jednog subjekta iz velikih znanstvenih baza. Da bi se riješili heterogenetnost konteksta znanja i jezika, integrirali smo ih u jedinstvenu strukturu podataka, grafiku znanja riječi (WK grafik). CoLAKE je predobučen na velikoj skali grafika WK sa modificiranim koderom transformera. Mi provodimo eksperimente o zadatkima koji se vode na znanje, zadatkima ispitivanja znanja i zadatkima razumijevanja jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da CoLAKE iznosi prethodne kolege na većini zadataka. Osim toga, CoLAKE postiže iznenađujuće visoke učinke na našem sintetičkom zadatku nazivom završavanje grafika riječi-znanja, što pokazuje superiornost istovremeno kontekstualizacije jezika i znanja.', 'nl': 'Met de opkomende tak van het integreren van feitelijke kennis in voorgetrainde taalmodellen zoals BERT, overwegen de meeste bestaande modellen oppervlakkige, statische en afzonderlijk voorgetrainde entiteitsinsluitingen, wat de prestatiewinst van deze modellen beperkt. Weinig werken onderzoeken het potentieel van diepe contextualiseerde kennisrepresentatie bij het injecteren van kennis. In dit artikel stellen we de Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE) voor, die gezamenlijk leert contextualiseerde representatie voor zowel taal als kennis met de uitgebreide MLM doelstelling. In plaats van alleen entiteitsinbeddingen te injecteren, haalt CoLAKE de kenniscontext van een entiteit uit grootschalige kennisbases. Om de heterogeniteit van kenniscontext en taalcontext aan te pakken, integreren we ze in een uniforme datastructuur, woord-kennis grafiek (WK grafiek). CoLAKE is voorgetraind op grootschalige WK grafieken met de aangepaste Transformer encoder. We voeren experimenten uit met kennisgestuurde taken, kennisbeproevingstaken en taalbegripstaken. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat CoLAKE bij de meeste taken beter presteert dan eerdere tegenhangers. Bovendien bereikt CoLAKE verrassend hoge prestaties op onze synthetische taak genaamd woord-kennis grafiek voltooiing, die de superioriteit toont van gelijktijdig contextualiseren van taal en kennis representatie.', 'de': 'Mit dem aufkommenden Zweig der Integration von Faktenwissen in vortrainierte Sprachmodelle wie BERT berücksichtigen die meisten existierenden Modelle flache, statische und separat vorgetrainierte Entitäteneinbettungen, was die Leistungsgewinne dieser Modelle begrenzt. Nur wenige Arbeiten erforschen das Potenzial einer tiefen kontextualisierten Wissensrepräsentation bei der Injektion von Wissen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir das Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE) vor, das gemeinsam kontextualisierte Repräsentation für Sprache und Wissen mit dem erweiterten MLM-Ziel lernt. Anstatt nur Entity-Einbettungen zu injizieren, extrahiert CoLAKE den Wissenskontext einer Entität aus großen Wissensbasen. Um die Heterogenität von Wissenskontext und Sprachkontext zu bewältigen, integrieren wir sie in eine einheitliche Datenstruktur, Word-Knowledge Graph (WK Graph). CoLAKE ist mit dem modifizierten Transformer-Encoder auf großformatigen WK-Graphen vortrainiert. Wir führen Experimente zu wissensbasierten Aufgaben, wissensbasierten Aufgaben und Sprachverständnisaufgaben durch. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass CoLAKE bei den meisten Aufgaben die bisherigen Pendants übertrifft. Außerdem erreicht CoLAKE überraschend hohe Leistungen bei unserer synthetischen Aufgabe namens Word-Knowledge Graph Completion, die die Überlegenheit der gleichzeitigen Kontextualisierung von Sprache und Wissensrepräsentation zeigt.', 'id': 'Dengan cabang yang muncul dari memasukkan pengetahuan faktual ke model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya seperti BERT, kebanyakan model yang ada menganggap rendah, statis, dan secara terpisah memasukkan entity yang terlatih sebelumnya, yang membatasi keuntungan prestasi dari model ini. Beberapa pekerjaan mengeksplorasi potensi dari perwakilan pengetahuan kontekstualisasi dalam ketika menyuntik pengetahuan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan Bahasa dan Pengetahuan Terkontekstualisasi (CoLAKE), yang bersama-sama belajar perwakilan kontekstualisasi untuk bahasa dan pengetahuan dengan tujuan MLM yang panjang. Daripada menyuntik hanya embedding entitas, CoLAKE mengekstrak konteks pengetahuan entitas dari dasar pengetahuan skala besar. Untuk menangani heterogenitas konteks pengetahuan dan konteks bahasa, kita mengintegrasikan mereka dalam struktur data yang bersatu, grafik pengetahuan kata (grafik WK). CoLAKE dilatih di grafik WK skala besar dengan koder Transformer yang diubah. We conduct experiments on knowledge-driven tasks, knowledge probing tasks, and language understanding tasks.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa CoLAKE melampaui kelompok sebelumnya pada kebanyakan tugas. Selain itu, CoLAKE mencapai prestasi yang mengejutkan tinggi pada tugas sintetis kami disebut pelengkapan grafik pengetahuan-kata, yang menunjukkan superioritas dari secara bersamaan kontekstualisasi bahasa dan representasi pengetahuan.', 'fa': 'با شاخه\u200cهای پیدا می\u200cشود که علم حقیقی را در مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبانی مانند BERT، بیشتر مدل\u200cهای موجود در حال حاضر به اندازه\u200cی گسترده، ثابت، و جداً پیدا کردن شرکت\u200cهای پیش آموزش آموزش می\u200cکنند، که به نتیجه\u200cهای انجام این مدل محدود می\u200cکند. کمی کار می\u200cکنند که پتانسیل نمایش علمی عمیق را در زمان تزریق دانش تحقیق می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم جمع کردن زبان و دانش (CoLAKE) که با همدیگر نمایش\u200cسازی متوسط برای زبان و دانش با هدف MLM گسترده می\u200cیابد. به جای تزریق کردن تنها شرکت\u200cها، CoLAKE محیط علمی یک شرکت را از پایگاه\u200cهای دانش بزرگ خارج می\u200cکند. برای حفظ عداوت محیط علم و محیط زبان، آنها را در ساختار داده های متحد، گراف دانش کلمه (WK) جمع می کنیم. CoLAKE بر گراف\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ WK پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشود با رمزگر تغییر\u200cدهنده. ما آزمایش\u200cهایی را روی کار\u200cهایی که با علم راهنمایی می\u200cکنند انجام می\u200cدهیم، وظیفه\u200cهای تحقیق علم، و وظیفه\u200cهای درک زبان را انجام می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که کلاک همکاران قبلی را در بیشتر کارها انجام می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، CoLAKE به شگفت انگیز عملکرد بالا روی کار سناتیک ما به نام کامل گراف علم کلمه رسیده است، که نشان می دهد بالاترین نمایش زبان و دانش را همزمان تغییر می دهد.', 'ko': "사실 지식을 예비 훈련 언어 모델(예를 들어 BERT)에 포함시키는 신흥 지점이 등장함에 따라 대부분의 기존 모델은 얕은 층, 정적 상태와 단독 예비 훈련의 실체 삽입을 고려하여 이러한 모델의 성능 이득을 제한했다.지식을 주입할 때 심층 어경화 지식이 나타내는 잠재력을 탐색하는 연구는 드물다.본고에서 우리는 언어 환경화 언어와 지식 삽입(CoLAKE)을 제시했는데 확장된 마케팅 목표와 함께 언어와 지식의 언어 환경화 표현을 배운다.CoLAKE는 엔티티 삽입만 주입하는 것이 아니라 대규모 지식 라이브러리에서 엔티티의 지식 컨텍스트를 추출합니다.지식 상하문과 언어 상하문의 이구성을 처리하기 위해 우리는 그것들을 하나의 통일된 데이터 구조, 즉 단어 지식 그래프(WK-graph)에 집적할 것이다.CoLAKE는 개선된 Transformer 인코더를 사용하여 대규모 WK 그림을 미리 훈련합니다.우리는 지식 구동 임무, 지식 탐색 임무와 언어 이해 임무에서 실험을 진행한다.실험 결과, CoLAKE는 대부분의 임무에서 이전의 같은 종류보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.또한 코LAKE는 우리의 종합적 임무인'단어지식도 완성'에서 놀라운 고성능을 거뒀으며, 이는 언어와 지식을 상하문화의 우월성을 동시에 나타낸다는 것을 보여준다.", 'tr': 'BERT ýaly çyndanan bilim sistemasyny öňünden eğitilen dil nusgalaryna daşary bolan depler bilen, köp bar nusgalar gadyr, statik we ayrı-ayrı öňünden eğitilen zatlary daşary kabul edip, bu nusgalaryň üstüni çykaryp barýar. Bir näçe iş bilgi enjekte etýän zaman deep contextualized bilgi temsillerinin potansiyelini gözləýär. Bu kagyzda, Kontekstualized Dil we Bilgi Bölümini (CoLAKE) teklip edýäris. Bu käbir-de MLM hedefi bilen, diller we bilgiler üçin jemgyýetli suratlary öwrenýär. Diňe bir zat içeri girişdirmek ýerine, CoLAKE uly ölçekli bilgi baserden bir zat bilen habaryny açar. Bilim kontekstleriniň we diller kontekstleriniň öňündençligini çözmek üçin olary bir birleşik maglumat strukturasyna, söz bilgi grafyny (WK grafynda) üýtgedýäris. CoLAKE Ullakan ölçekli WK grafiklerinde üýtgedilmiş Transformer ködlemeler. Bilim tarapyndan işleri, bilim kynçylygyny barlamagyny we dillerini düşünmek üçin deneyler etdik. Ilkinji netijeler CoLAKE öňki çarpaklaryň köpüsi işiň üstünde täsir edýändigini görkezýär. Munuň ýagdaýynda, CoLAKE biziň sintetik zadymyzyň söz-bilgi grafynyň tamamlanmagynyň üstünligini görkez.', 'af': "Met die uitkomende takk van die inkorporering van faktuurlike kennis in voorafoerende taal modele soos BERT, mees bestaande modele beskou slag, statiese en skielik voorafoerende entiteite inbettings, wat beperk die prestasie verskaffings van hierdie modele. Nog werke uitsoek die potensiele van diep konteksualiseerde kennis voorstelling wanneer kennis inprop word. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons die Konteksualiseerde Taal en kennis Inbetering (CoLAKE), wat saamstig leer konteksualiseerde voorstelling vir beide taal en kennis met die uitgebreide MLM doel. In plaas van slegs entiteit inbinnesting te injeksieer, KoLAKE uitpak die kennis konteks van 'n entiteit uit groot-skaal kennis bases. Om die heterogeneeit van kennis konteks en taal konteks te hanteer, integreer ons hulle in 'n eenheidige data struktuur, woord-kennis graf (WK graf). CoLAKE is voor- opgelei op groot- skaal WK grafieke met die verander Transformer enkoder. Ons doen eksperimente op kennis-gedrywe taak, kennis probeer taak en taal verstaan taak. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat CoLAKE voorheende kunstenaars op die meeste van die taak uitvoer. Buiten, CoLAKE bereik surpresies hoë prestasie op ons sintetiese taak wat word-kennis graaf voltooiing genoem word, wat wys die hoogheid van sameleentheid contextualisering taal en kennis verteenwoordigheid.", 'sw': 'Kutokana na alama inayoibuka ya kuingiza maarifa ya ukweli katika mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla kama vile BERT, mifano mengi ya kuwepo yanachukulia vifaa vinavyovurugika, mabadiliko ya vitu vilivyo vibaya na tofauti vilivyojifunza, ambavyo vinavyozuia mafunzo ya utendaji wa mifano hii. Ni wachache sana wanafanya kazi kutambua uwezekano wa uwakilishi wa ufahamu wa kina unaofanywa wakati wa kuingiza maarifa. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuanzishwa kwa lugha na maarifa (CoLAKE), ambayo kwa pamoja inajifunza uwakilishi wa lugha na ufahamu kwa lengo la mrefu la MLM. Instead of injecting only entity embeddings, CoLAKE extracts the knowledge context of an entity from large-scale knowledge bases.  Ili kushughulikia ujasiri wa muktadha wa maarifa na muktadha wa lugha, tunaunganisha katika muundo wa takwimu wa pamoja, picha ya maarifa ya maneno (picha ya WK). CoLAKE imefundishwa mbele kwenye picha za WK kwa kiwango kikubwa na kodi ya mabadiliko ya Transfer. Tunafanya majaribio kuhusu kazi zinazoendeshwa na maarifa, maarifa yanayothibitisha kazi, na kazi za kuelewa lugha. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa CoLAKE inafanya wapinzani wa zamani katika kazi nyingi. Zaidi ya hayo, CoLAKE anafanikiwa ufanisi mkubwa katika kazi yetu ya ushirikiano unaoitwa kamili ya maarifa ya maneno, ambayo inaonyesha ukubwa wa uwakilishi wa lugha na maarifa kwa wakati mmoja.', 'am': 'ከውነቱ እውቀት ጋር እንደBERT በፊት ተማሪዎች የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች ውስጥ ለመቀበል የሚያስገባው ቅርንጫፎች፣ ብዙዎቹ ያሉት ሞላት ጥሩ፣ ስታሪክ እና የተለየ ተማሪ አካባቢ አካባቢ መግለጫ ይመስላሉ፡፡ እውቀትን በመስጠት ጊዜ የጠለቀ የእውቀትን መልዕክት መግለጫ የሚያስፈልግ ጥቂቶች ሥራ ይሠራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋ እና እውቀት አካባቢ (CoLAKE) በተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ እና እውቀትን በተጨማሪው MLM አካባቢ ጋር ተማረ፡፡ አካባቢ ማውቀትን ብቻ በመግለጽ ፋንታ፣ ኮLAKE የአካባቢውን ውይይት ከትልቁ እውቀት መቀመጫዎች ውጤቱን ያወጣል፡፡ የእውቀት ግንኙነት እና የቋንቋ ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል፣ በተለያዩ ዳታ አካባቢ፣ ቃላት እውቀት ቀለም (WK graph) እናስገባቸዋለን፡፡ CoLAKE በተለወጠው የተለወጠው የዌብ መክፈቻ በተለወጠው የዌብ መክፈቻ በፊት ተማሪ ነው፡፡ እውቀት በሚገኘው ስራዎችን፣ እውቀት ስራዎችን ለማግኘት ቋንቋውንም ማስተዋል ስራዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከፈተና ውጤቶች ብዙዎቹን ስራቶች የቆይቷል፡፡ ከዚህም በቀር፣ CoLAKE በቋንቋ እና እውቀት መልዕክት እና እውቀት መልዕክት በማስተካከል በሚባል ቃላት-እውቀት ቀረፍ ተግባር ላይ ከፍተኛ ስርዓት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Փաստական գիտելիքները ներառելու զարգացող ճյուղը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների մեջ, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը, գոյություն ունեցող մոդելների մեծ մասը համարում է մակերեսային, կայուն և առանձին նախապատրաստված էության ներառումներ, որոնք սահմանափակում են այս մոդել Մի քանի աշխատանք ուսումնասիրում է խորը կոնտեքստիալ գիտելիքների ներկայացման պոտենցիալը գիտելիքների ներարտադրման ժամանակ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք Կոնտեքստալիզացված լեզվի և գիտելիքի ներգրավման (COLAke), որը միասին սովորում է կոնտեքստալիզացված ներկայացումը լեզվի և գիտելիքի համար երկարացված MLM օբյեկտիվ: Միայն անհատականության ներդրումների փոխարեն, COLAke-ը հանում է մի անհատականության գիտելիքի կոնտեքստը մեծ մասշտաբով գիտելիքների հիմքերից: Գիտելու կոնտեքստի և լեզվի կոնտեքստի տարբերակությունը վերահսկելու համար մենք դրանք ինտեգրում ենք միավորված տվյալների կառուցվածքի մեջ, բառի-գիտելիքի գրաֆիկի մեջ: Կոլաքը նախապատրաստված է մեծ մասշտաբ ՎԿ գրաֆիկների վրա, որոնք օգտագործվում են փոփոխված Տանսֆերմերի կոդերի միջոցով: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում գիտելիքով հիմնված խնդիրների, գիտելիքների ուսումնասիրելու խնդիրների և լեզվի հասկանալու խնդիրների վրա: Experimental results show that CoLAKE outperforms previous counterparts on most of the tasks.  Ավելին, Կոլաքսը զարմանալիորեն բարձր արդյունք է ստանում մեր սինթետիկ առաջադրանքի վրա, որը կոչվում է բառի-գիտելիքի գրաֆիկի ավարտում, ինչը ցույց է տալիս լեզվի և գիտելիքի ներկայացման միաժամանակ կոնտեքստիալիզացիայի', 'sq': 'Me degën në rritje të përfshirjes së njohurive faktike në modele gjuhësh të paratrajnuara të tilla si BERT, shumica e modeleve ekzistuese konsiderojnë përfshirje të sipërme, statike dhe veçanërisht të paratrajnuara të njësive, që kufizojnë fitimet e performancës të këtyre modeleve. Few works explore the potential of deep contextualized knowledge representation when injecting knowledge.  Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë Përfshirjen e Gjuhave dhe njohurive të Kontekstualizuara (CoLAKE), e cila mëson së bashku përfaqësimin e kontekstualizuar për gjuhën dhe njohurinë me objektivin e zgjeruar MLM. Në vend që të injektojë vetëm integrimet e njësisë, CoLAKE nxjerr kontekstin e njohurive të njësisë nga bazat e njohurive të shkallës së madhe. Për të trajtuar heterogenitetin e kontekstit të njohurisë dhe kontekstit të gjuhës, ne i integrojmë ato në një strukturë të unifikuar të të dhënave, grafik fjalë-njohuri (grafik WK). CoLAKE është paratrajnuar në grafikë WK në shkallë të madhe me koduesin e modifikuar Transformer. Ne kryejmë eksperimente mbi detyrat e drejtuara nga njohuria, detyrat e hetimit të njohurive dhe detyrat e kuptimit të gjuhës. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se CoLAKE i tejkalon homologët e mëparshëm në shumicën e detyrave. Përveç kësaj, COLAKE arrin performancë surprizuese të lartë në detyrën tonë sintetike të quajtur kompletimi i grafikut fjalë-njohuri, i cili tregon superioritetin e njëkohësisë kontekstualizimit të gjuhës dhe përfaqësimit të njohurisë.', 'az': 'BERT kimi əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modellərə fərqli bilgiləri birləşdirmək üçün ortaya çıxdığı bölümlə, çox mövcuddur modellər çətin, statik və ayrı-ayrı təhsil edilmiş entitələr inşallarını düşünürlər, bu modellərin performansını müəyyən edir. Biraz işlər bilgi inşallaşdırdığında dərin müxtəlif bilgi göstəricisinin potensialini keşfetir. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif dil və elm integrasyonu (CoLAKE) təklif edirik ki, bu da çox genişləndirilmiş MLM məqsədili ilə müxtəlif dil və elm göstəricisini öyrənir. Yalnız bir şey inşa etmək yerinə, CoLAKE böyük ölçülü bilgi üssələrindən birinin elm məlumatını çıxarır. Bilim məlumatının və dil məlumatının heterogeneliklərini idarə etmək üçün, onları birləşdiririk bir məlumat quruluşunda, söz-elm grafına (WK grafına). CoLAKE böyük ölçülü WK grafiklərindən əvvəl təhsil edilmişdir. Biz elm işlərini, elm işlərini sınamaq və dil anlama işlərini təşkil edirik. İşləşmə sonuçları CoLAKE əvvəlki işin çoxu ilə əvvəlki müşriklərdən üstün olduğunu göstərir. Əksinə, CoLAKE, sözlər-elm grafı tamamlama adlı sintetik işimizin üstünlüyünü göstərən sintetik işimizin üstünlüyünü göstərir.', 'ca': "Amb la rama emergent d'incorporar el coneixement factual en models de llenguatge pré-entrenats com BERT, la majoria dels models existents consideran incorporacions d'entitats poc superficials, estatiques i separadament pré-entrenats, que limitan els guanys de rendiment d'aquests models. Poques treballs exploren el potencial de la profunda representació contextualitzada del coneixement quan injecten coneixement. En aquest paper, proposem l'incorporació del llenguatge i del coneixement contextualitzats (CoLAKE), que aprenen conjuntament representació contextualitzada tant per llenguatge com per coneixement amb l'objectiu estensiu del MLM. Instead of injecting only entity embeddings, CoLAKE extracts the knowledge context of an entity from large-scale knowledge bases.  Per a gestionar la heterogeneitat del context del coneixement i del context del llenguatge, les integrem en una estructura unificada de dades, el gràfic de coneixement de paraules (gràfic WK). CoLAKE està pré-entrenat en gràfics WK a gran escala amb el codificador modificat Transformer. Fem experiments en tasques basades en el coneixement, tasques d'investigació del coneixement i tasques de comprensió del llenguatge. Els resultats experimentals mostren que CoLAKE supera les homologues anteriors en la majoria de les tasques. A més, CoLAKE aconsegueix un rendiment sorprenentment alt en la nostra tasca sintètica anomenada completació del gràfic de coneixement de paraules, que mostra la superioritat de contextualitzar simultàniament la representació del llenguatge i del coneixement.", 'cs': 'Vzhledem k vznikajícímu odvětví začlenění faktických znalostí do předškolených jazykových modelů, jako je BERT, většina stávajících modelů zvažuje mělké, statické a samostatně předškolené integrování entit, což omezuje zisky výkonu těchto modelů. Jen málo prací zkoumá potenciál hluboké kontextualizované reprezentace znalostí při vstřikování znalostí. V tomto článku navrhujeme kontextualizované vložení jazyka a znalostí (CoLAKE), které se společně učí kontextualizovanou reprezentaci jazyka i znalostí s rozšířeným cílem MLM. Místo vkládání pouze entit vložení CoLAKE extrahuje znalostní kontext entity z rozsáhlých znalostních bází. Pro zvládnutí heterogenity znalostního kontextu a jazykového kontextu je integrujeme do jednotné datové struktury, slovo-znalostní graf (WK graf). CoLAKE je předem trénován na velkých WK grafech s modifikovaným snímačem Transformer. Provádíme experimenty s úkoly založenými na znalostech, úkoly zkoumání znalostí a úkoly porozumění jazyků. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že CoLAKE při většině úkolů překonává předchozí protějšky. Kromě toho CoLAKE dosahuje překvapivě vysokého výkonu na našem syntetickém úkolu zvaném dokončování grafu slova-znalosti, který ukazuje nadřazenost současné kontextualizace jazyka a reprezentace znalostí.', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের মধ্যে সত্যিকার জ্ঞান যোগাযোগ করার ব্র্যাঙ্কের সাথে বিশেষ মডেল বিবেরিট, বিদ্যমান মডেল বিবেচনা করে বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণিত বস্তুর কয়েকজন কাজ করে জ্ঞান প্রবেশ করার সময় গভীর প্রতিনিধিত্বের সম্ভাবনা খুঁজে বের করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি কন্ট্রুয়েলিজ ভাষা এবং জ্ঞান এমবেডিং (কোলাকে) যা একত্রে ভাষা এবং জ্ঞানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পারে এমএলএম লক্ষ্য শুধুমাত্র বস্তুর প্রবেশাধিকার প্রবেশ করার পরিবর্তে কোলাকে বিশাল পর্যায়ে জ্ঞানের বেস থেকে একটি বস্তুর জ্ঞানের প্রেক্ জ্ঞানের প্রেক্ষাপট এবং ভাষার প্রেক্ষাপটের বৈশিষ্ট্য নিয়ন্ত্রণের জন্য আমরা তাদের একত্রিত তথ্য কাঠামোর মধ্যে একত্রি পরিবর্তিত ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফার্নার এনকোডার দ্বারা বিশাল স্ক্যালেকে প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে। আমরা জ্ঞান-পরিচালিত কাজ, জ্ঞান প্রমাণ করা কাজ এবং ভাষা বুঝতে পারি কাজের উপর পরীক্ষা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে কোলাকের পূর্বের বেশীরভাগ কাজের বিরুদ্ধে প্রতিযোগিতাদের প্রদর্শন করেছে। এছাড়াও, কলকে আমাদের সিন্টিটিক কাজের উপর বিস্ময়কর ভাষা পেয়েছে যার নাম শব্দ-জ্ঞান-গ্রাফ সম্পূর্ণ, যা একই সাথে ভাষা এবং জ্ঞানের প্রতিন', 'bs': 'S rastućim granom uključujući činjeničko znanje u predobučene jezičke modele kao što je BERT, većina postojećih modela smatra plitkim, statičnim i odvojenim integracijama predobučenih entitata, koja ograničava dobitak učinka tih modela. Malo radova istražuje potencijal dubokog kontekstualizacije znanja kada ubrizgavaju znanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo kontekstualiziranu integraciju jezika i znanja (CoLAKE), koja zajedno uči kontekstualiziranu predstavu jezika i znanja sa širenim ciljem MLM-a. Umjesto da ubrizgava samo integracije entiteta, CoLAKE izvlači znanje konteksta entiteta iz velikih znanja baze. Da bi se riješili heterogenetnost konteksta znanja i jezika, integrirali smo ih u jedinstvenu strukturu podataka, grafiku znanja riječi (WK grafik). CoLAKE je predobučen na velikom grafiku WK sa modificiranim koderom transformera. Mi provodimo eksperimente o zadacima koji se vode na znanje, zadacima istraživanja znanja i zadacima razumijevanja jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da CoLAKE iznosi prethodne kolege na većini zadataka. Osim toga, CoLAKE postiže iznenađujuće visoke učinke na našem sintetičkom zadatku nazivom završetku grafika riječi-znanja, što pokazuje superiornost istovremeno kontekstualizacije jezika i znanja.', 'et': 'Kuna faktiliste teadmiste integreerimine eelõpetatud keelemudelitesse, nagu BERT, on enamikus olemasolevatest mudelitest kaalutud madalaid, staatilisi ja eraldi eelõpetatud üksuste integreerimist, mis piirab nende mudelite tulemuslikkust. Vähesed tööd uurivad sügava kontekstilise teadmiste esitamise potentsiaali teadmiste süstimisel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kontekstualiseeritud keele ja teadmiste põimimise (CoLAKE), mis ühiselt õpib kontekstualiseeritud esindamist nii keele kui ka teadmiste jaoks laiendatud MLM eesmärgiga. Selle asemel, et süstida ainult üksuste manustamist, ekstraheerib CoLAKE üksuse teadmistekonteksti ulatuslikest teadmistebaasidest. Teadmistekonteksti ja keelekonteksti heterogeensuse käsitlemiseks integreerime need ühtsesse andmestruktuuri, sõnateadmise graafikusse (WK graafik). CoLAKE on eelnevalt koolitatud suuremahuliste WK graafikute jaoks modifitseeritud Transformer kodeerijaga. Teostame eksperimente teadmistepõhiste ülesannete, teadmiste proovimise ülesannete ja keele mõistmise ülesannetega. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et CoLAKE on enamikus ülesannetes parem kui varasemad. Pealegi saavutab CoLAKE üllatavalt kõrge jõudluse meie sünteetilises ülesandes, mida nimetatakse sõnateadmise graafiku lõpetamiseks, mis näitab keele ja teadmiste esitamise samaaegset kontekstualiseerimist.', 'fi': 'Koska tosiasiatiedon sisällyttäminen BERT:n kaltaisiin esikoulutettuihin kielimalleihin on kehittymässä, useimmat olemassa olevat mallit ottavat huomioon matalat, staattiset ja erikseen esikoulutetut kokonaisuudet, mikä rajoittaa näiden mallien suorituskykyä. Harvat teokset tutkivat syvällisen kontekstualisoituneen tiedon esittämisen mahdollisuuksia tiedon injektoinnissa. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), joka oppii yhdessä kontekstualisoitua esitystä sekä kielelle että tiedolle laajennetun MLM-tavoitteen mukaisesti. CoLAKE poimii kokonaisuuden tietokontekstin laajoista tietokannoista sen sijaan, että se syöttäisi vain entiteettiupotuksia. Käsittääksemme tietokontekstin ja kielikontekstin heterogeenisyyttä integroimme ne yhtenäiseen tietorakenteeseen, sanatietograafiin (WK-graafi). CoLAKE on esikoulutettu suuriin WK-kaavioihin modifioidulla Transformer-kooderilla. Teemme kokeiluja osaamislähtöisistä tehtävistä, tiedon tutkimisesta ja kielen ymmärtämisestä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että CoLAKE suoriutuu useimmissa tehtävissä aikaisemmista vastaavista. Lisäksi CoLAKE saavuttaa yllättävän korkean suorituskyvyn synteettisessä tehtävässämme, jota kutsutaan sanatietograafiksi, mikä osoittaa kielen ja tiedon esittämisen kontekstualisoinnin ylivoimaisuuden.', 'ha': "Ga da shirin mai fitarwa na shigar da sanin gaskiya a cikin misalin harshen da aka yi wa zaman-haƙƙin kamar BERT, masu yawa masu motsalan da ke cikin shirin ayuka masu buƙata, masu tsakanin da baka, da kuma a ƙayyade ƙananan abun da aka sanar da shi a gaba ɗaya, wanda ke ƙayyade fassarar da ke samun wannan misãlai. Kaɗan aiki yana jarraba mataimaki na cikin mai ƙididdigewa da ilmi a lokacin da za'a shiga ilmi. In this paper, we propose the Contextualized Language and Knowledge Embedding (CoLAKE), which jointly learns contextualized representation for both language and knowledge with the extended MLM objective.  Fãce shirin da duk abun da aka shigar da shi kawai, KULLEK yana fitar da muhallin ilmi na da wani abun daga asalin da aka girma. Yana haɗa su cikin wani tsarin danne da aka haɗa, fassarar-zane (grafi na WK). KCharselect unicode block name Lalle ne, Munã jarraba masu aikin da aka sanar da shi, da saninta, da jarrabi aikin aiki da aka sani da harshe. Mataraikin ya nuna cewa CoLEKEke ke tsẽre masu zaman rabon aiki. Babu haka, CoLEKEki yana sãmun babban aikin da aka yi wa muhimmi a kan aikin da aka sanar da kammala kalmar-kunnuwa, wanda yana nũna mafi kyauta ga mataimaki da harshe da ilimi sami ɗaya.", 'he': 'עם הענף המתפתח של שיתוף ידע עובד לדוגמאות שפות מאומנות מראש, כמו BERT, רוב הדוגמאות הקיומות מחשיבים שיתופים גבוהים, סטטיים ומפרדים Few works explore the potential of deep contextualized knowledge representation when injecting knowledge.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים את השפה והידע הקונקסטוליזציה (CoLAKE), אשר ללמוד יחד מייצג הקונקסטוליזציה לשפה וגם ידע עם המטרה המתוארת MLM. Instead of injecting only entity embeddings, CoLAKE extracts the knowledge context of an entity from large-scale knowledge bases.  To handle the heterogeneity of knowledge context and language context, we integrate them in a unified data structure, word-knowledge graph (WK graph).  CoLAKE is pre-trained on large-scale WK graphs with the modified Transformer encoder.  אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים על משימות מונעות על ידע, משימות חקירת ידע, ומשימות הבנה לשפה. Experimental results show that CoLAKE outperforms previous counterparts on most of the tasks.  Besides, CoLAKE achieves surprisingly high performance on our synthetic task called word-knowledge graph completion, which shows the superiority of simultaneously contextualizing language and knowledge representation.', 'bo': 'With the emerging branch of incorporating factual knowledge into pre-trained language models such as BERT, most existing models consider shallow, static, and separately pre-trained entity embeddings, which limits the performance gains of these models. ཆེད་པོ་སྤྲོད་དུས་རང་ཉིད་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནུས་པ་ལ་རྟོགས་བཀོད་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཚོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཁྱེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ཤེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ། Instead of injecting only entity embeddings, CoLAKE extracts the knowledge context of a entity from large-scale knowledge bases. To handle the heterogeneity of knowledge context and language context, we integrate them in a unified data structure, word-knowledge graph (WK graph). CoLAKE is pre-trained on large-scale WK graphs with the modified Transformer encoder. ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པ་(knowledge-driven tasks)ལས་ཀ་ལས་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱེད་པའི་ལས་ཀ་དང་། སྐད་ཆ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ངལ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ལ་CoLAKE་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་རྣམས་མེད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། CoLAKE དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་སྡུད་ལས་འཕགས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་།', 'sk': 'Z nastajajočo vejo vključevanja dejanskega znanja v predhodno usposobljene jezikovne modele, kot je BERT, večina obstoječih modelov obravnava plitve, statične in ločeno predhodno usposobljene entitete, kar omejuje povečanje učinkovitosti teh modelov. Malo del raziskuje potencial globoke kontekstualizirane reprezentacije znanja pri injiciranju znanja. V prispevku predlagamo kontekstualizirano jezikovno in znanje (CoLAKE), ki skupaj uči kontekstualizirano reprezentacijo za jezik in znanje z razširjenim ciljem MLM. Namesto da bi vbrizgali samo vgradnje entitet, CoLAKE iz obsežnih baz znanja izvleče kontekst znanja subjekta. Za obvladovanje heterogenosti konteksta znanja in jezikovnega konteksta ju integriramo v enotno podatkovno strukturo, graf besedno-znanje (WK graf). CoLAKE je predhodno usposobljen za obsežne WK grafe s spremenjenim transformatorskim kodirnikom. Izvajamo eksperimente na znanju usmerjenih nalogah, nalogah preiskovanja znanja in nalogah razumevanja jezika. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da CoLAKE pri večini nalog presega prejšnje kolege. Poleg tega CoLAKE doseže presenetljivo visoko uspešnost pri sintetični nalogi, imenovani zaključek grafov besednega znanja, kar kaže na superiornost istočasne kontekstualizacije jezika in predstavitve znanja.', 'jv': 'Saiki rampun sing dibenakake perusahaan winih ingkang diangkat luwih dumateng liyane karo Rasan ingkang BERT, padha model sing isih perusahaan nggawe a buturang, dadi, lan saiki berarti punika ingkang sampeyan liyane, iso nggawe akeh iso dianggap model iki. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pentungé iki, kita nggunakake ingkang Kontextual (CoLAKE), sing dipun nggambar barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo langa lan ulêngguna kuwi wis luwih nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerasahan luwih nggawe tarjamahan luwih dumadhi MLM . lah Ombudhakan langkung sampeyan karo akeh-akeh dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno ning langkung sampeyan, kita ngubah dhéwé seneng sampeyan data sak ngubah dhéwé, graf-akeh langkung (graf WK). CoLAKE iku diutag-utextattr Awak dhéwé éntuk ujaran kanggo nggawe kesempatan-akèh, ngerwarang langgar njaluk tindakan. Laptop" and "Desktop Nanging, CoLAKE iso nggawe akeh sing paling apik sabanjuré awak dhéwé seneng pisan kelas-awak dhéwé, iki sumulakno kanggo nguasai perusahaan langkung sampek iso nggawe gerakan ingkang dipun-awak dhéwé.'}
{'en': 'Target Word Masking for Location Metonymy Resolution', 'ar': 'الهدف من إخفاء الكلمات من أجل حل الكناية عن الموقع', 'pt': 'Mascaramento de palavras de destino para resolução de metonímia de localização', 'fr': 'Masquage de mots cibles pour la résolution de métonymie de localisation', 'es': 'Enmascaramiento de palabras objetivo para la resolución de metonimia de ubicación', 'hi': 'स्थान Metonymy रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए लक्ष्य Word मास्किंग', 'ja': '場所のメトニミー解決のためのターゲットワードマスキング', 'ru': 'Маскировка целевого слова для разрешения метонимии местоположения', 'zh': '位单词屏蔽 Metonymy 解析', 'ga': 'Cumhdach Sprioc Focal le haghaidh Taifeach Meitiainmneacha Suímh', 'ka': 'მისამართი სიტყვის მაქსირება ადგილის მეტონიმის რეზოლუციაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Célszó maszkolás a helymetonomiás felbontáshoz', 'el': 'Μάσκα λέξεων στόχου για ανάλυση μετωνυμίας τοποθεσίας', 'kk': 'Орналасу метоними Айырымдылығының мақсатты сөз қалқасы', 'lt': 'Vietos Metonimijos rezoliucijos tikslinis žodžių maskavimas', 'it': 'Maschera delle parole di destinazione per la risoluzione della metonimia della posizione', 'mk': 'Метонимиска резолуција', 'ms': 'Penutup Kata Sasaran untuk Resolusi Metonimi Lokasi', 'mt': 'Riżoluzzjoni tal-Metonimija tal-Kuntest fil-Mira għal Riżoluzzjoni tal-Metonimija tal-Post', 'ml': 'സ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള മെറ്റോണിമി രീതിയിലേക്കുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം വാക്ക് മാസ്കിംഗ്', 'mn': 'Орон байрлал метонимийн шийдэл', 'no': 'Målfordmasking for plasseringsmetonningsoppløysing', 'pl': 'Maskowanie słów docelowych dla rozdzielczości metonimii lokalizacji', 'ro': 'Mascarea cuvintelor țintă pentru rezoluția metonimii locației', 'si': 'ස්ථානය මීටෝනිමි විශේෂණය සඳහා ලක්ෂිත වචන මාස්ක් කරන්න', 'so': 'Maamulka hadalka goalka ee goobta metonymy Resolution', 'sr': 'Meta maskiranje reèi za Metonim Rezolucija', 'sv': 'Målordmaskering för platsmetonymilösning', 'ur': 'Location Metonymy Resolution', 'ta': 'இடத்திற்கான சொல்லை பாதுகாப்பு', 'uz': 'Manzilni ochish', 'vi': 'Thư mục đích để vẽ nên chấm điểm', 'bg': 'Маскиране на целевите думи за разделителна способност на метонимията на местоположението', 'nl': 'Doelwoordmaskering voor locatiemethonymieresolutie', 'da': 'Målordmaskering for placeringsmetonymopløsning', 'de': 'Target Word Masking for Location Metonymy Resolution', 'id': 'Masking Kata Sasaran untuk Resolusi Metonimi Lokasi', 'ko': '위치 전유 해석에 사용되는 목표어 엄폐', 'fa': 'نقاشی کلمه هدف برای راه حل متنیمی موقعیت', 'tr': 'Ýer Metonimy Çaşyrymy üçin Mazmunlar', 'sw': 'Matukio ya Neno kwa ajili ya Location Metonymy Resolution', 'af': 'Teël Woord Maskering vir Ligging Metoniemie Resolusie', 'sq': 'Objektivi i maskimit të fjalëve për zgjidhjen e Metonimit të Vendimit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'অবস্থানের মেটোনিমি রিপশনের জন্য লক্ষ্য শব্দ ম্যাসিং', 'az': 'Qonum Metonimi Çözünürlüyü üçün Heç Kelimi maskası', 'hr': 'Ciljna maskiranja riječi za Metonim Rezolucija', 'bs': 'Meta maskiranje riječi za Metonim Rezoluciju lokacije', 'cs': 'Maskování cílových slov pro rozlišení metonymie umístění', 'ca': 'Objecte Word Masking for Location Metonymy Resolution', 'et': 'Sihtsõna maskeerimine asukohas Metonüümia resolutsioon', 'fi': 'Kohdesanan peittäminen sijainnille Metonymia Resoluutio', 'jv': 'Location, $date', 'ha': 'Masanin maganar tagogi wa Tsarin Metonimy', 'sk': 'Zakrivanje ciljnih besed za lokacijo Metonimija ločljivost', 'he': 'מסכת מילים מטרה לפתרון מטונימיה במיקום', 'bo': 'གནས་ཡུལ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་གདོང་ཁེལ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Existing metonymy resolution approaches rely on features extracted from external resources like dictionaries and hand-crafted lexical resources. In this paper, we propose an end-to-end word-level classification approach based only on BERT, without dependencies on taggers, parsers, curated dictionaries of place names, or other external resources. We show that our approach achieves the state-of-the-art on 5 datasets, surpassing conventional BERT models and benchmarks by a large margin. We also show that our approach generalises well to unseen data.', 'ar': 'تعتمد مناهج دقة الكناية الحالية على الميزات المستخرجة من الموارد الخارجية مثل القواميس والموارد المعجمية المصنوعة يدويًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهج تصنيف على مستوى الكلمات من البداية إلى النهاية يعتمد فقط على BERT ، بدون تبعيات على أدوات الوسم أو المحللون أو القواميس المنسقة لأسماء الأماكن أو الموارد الخارجية الأخرى. نظهر أن نهجنا يحقق أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في 5 مجموعات بيانات ، متجاوزًا نماذج BERT التقليدية والمعايير بهامش كبير. نظهر أيضًا أن نهجنا يعمم جيدًا البيانات غير المرئية.', 'es': 'Los enfoques de resolución de metonimias existentes se basan en funciones extraídas de recursos externos, como diccionarios y recursos léxicos hechos a mano. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque de clasificación de palabras de extremo a extremo basado únicamente en BERT, sin dependencias de etiquetadores, analizadores, diccionarios seleccionados de nombres de lugares u otros recursos externos. Demostramos que nuestro enfoque alcanza el estado de la técnica en 5 conjuntos de datos, superando los modelos BERT convencionales y los puntos de referencia por un amplio margen. También demostramos que nuestro enfoque generaliza bien los datos que no se ven.', 'fr': "Les approches de résolution de métonymie existantes s'appuient sur des fonctionnalités extraites de ressources externes telles que des dictionnaires et des ressources lexicales créées à la main. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche de classification de bout en bout au niveau des mots basée uniquement sur BERT, sans dépendance aux taggers, aux analyseurs, aux dictionnaires sélectionnés de noms de lieux ou à d'autres ressources externes. Nous montrons que notre approche atteint la pointe de la technologie sur 5 ensembles de données, surpassant largement les modèles et les benchmarks BERT conventionnels. Nous montrons également que notre approche se généralise bien aux données inédites.", 'pt': 'As abordagens de resolução de metonímia existentes dependem de recursos extraídos de recursos externos, como dicionários e recursos lexicais artesanais. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem de classificação em nível de palavra de ponta a ponta baseada apenas em BERT, sem dependências de taggers, parsers, dicionários de nomes de lugares com curadoria ou outros recursos externos. Mostramos que nossa abordagem atinge o estado da arte em 5 conjuntos de dados, superando modelos e benchmarks convencionais de BERT por uma grande margem. Também mostramos que nossa abordagem generaliza bem para dados não vistos.', 'zh': '今同义词解析法外资(如字典工之词汇)取焉。 本文中,立BERT端至端单词级分类之法,不依标器,解析器,精选地名词典或外资。 吾道得先进之术于5集上,甚于旧BERT。 我们还明白,我们的方法可以很好地推到不见的数据。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा metonymy संकल्प दृष्टिकोण शब्दकोशों और हाथ से तैयार किए गए लेक्सिकल संसाधनों जैसे बाहरी संसाधनों से निकाली गई सुविधाओं पर निर्भर करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम केवल BERT के आधार पर एक एंड-टू-एंड शब्द-स्तरीय वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, टैगर्स, पार्सर, जगह के नामों के क्यूरेटेड शब्दकोशों, या अन्य बाहरी संसाधनों पर निर्भरता के बिना। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण 5 डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्राप्त करता है, पारंपरिक BERT मॉडल और बेंचमार्क को एक बड़े अंतर से पार करता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण अनदेखी डेटा के लिए अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत करता है।', 'ja': '既存のメトニミー解決アプローチは、辞書や手作りの辞書リソースなどの外部リソースから抽出された機能に依存しています。本稿では、タガー、構文解析器、地名辞書、その他の外部リソースに依存することなく、BERTのみに基づいたエンドツーエンドのワードレベル分類アプローチを提案する。当社のアプローチは、従来のBERTモデルとベンチマークを大幅に上回る5つのデータセットで最先端を達成していることを示しています。私たちはまた、私たちのアプローチが見えないデータによく一般化することを示しています。', 'ru': 'Существующие подходы к разрешению метонимии основаны на функциях, извлеченных из внешних ресурсов, таких как словари и составленные вручную лексические ресурсы. В этой статье мы предлагаем комплексный подход к классификации на уровне слов, основанный только на BERT, без зависимостей от тегеров, парсеров, курируемых словарей географических названий или других внешних ресурсов. Мы показываем, что наш подход достигает самых современных результатов на 5 наборах данных, превзойдя по большому запасу обычные модели и контрольные показатели BERT. Мы также показываем, что наш подход хорошо обобщает невидимые данные.', 'ga': 'Braitheann cuir chuige réitigh na meitíníochta atá ann cheana ar ghnéithe a bhaintear as acmhainní seachtracha amhail foclóirí agus acmhainní foclóireachta lámhcheirde. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige aicmithe ó thús go deireadh bunaithe ar BERT amháin, gan spleáchas ar chlibeálaithe, ar pharsálaithe, ar fhoclóirí coimeádta logainmneacha, ná ar acmhainní seachtracha eile. Léirímid go mbaineann ár gcur chuige an úrscothacht amach ar 5 thacar sonraí, rud a sháraíonn gnáthmhúnlaí agus tagarmharcanna BERT le corrlach mór. Léirímid freisin go ndéanann ár gcur chuige ginearálú go maith ar shonraí nach bhfuil feicthe.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις ανάλυσης μετωνυμίας βασίζονται σε χαρακτηριστικά που εξάγονται από εξωτερικούς πόρους, όπως λεξικά και χειροποίητους λεξικούς πόρους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη προσέγγιση ταξινόμησης σε επίπεδο λέξεων βασισμένη μόνο στο BERT, χωρίς εξαρτήσεις από ετικέτες, αναλυτές, επιμελημμένα λεξικά ονομάτων τοποθεσιών ή άλλους εξωτερικούς πόρους. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει την αιχμή των πέντε συνόλων δεδομένων, ξεπερνώντας κατά μεγάλο βαθμό τα συμβατικά μοντέλα και τα κριτήρια αναφοράς. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι η προσέγγισή μας γενικεύει καλά σε αόρατα δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'A meglévő metonimiás felbontási megközelítések külső erőforrásokból nyert funkciókra támaszkodnak, mint például a szótárak és a kézzel készített lexikai erőforrások. Ebben a tanulmányban egy teljes körű szó-szintű osztályozási megközelítést javasolunk, amely kizárólag BERT-n alapul, a címkézőktől, elemzőktől, helyszótáraktól vagy más külső erőforrásoktól függ. Megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk 5 adatkészleten eléri a legmodernebb technológiát, nagy mértékben felülmúlva a hagyományos BERT modelleket és referenciaértékeket. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk jól általánosítja a láthatatlan adatokat.', 'ka': 'ჩემი გარეშე რეზიციონის მიღება გარეშე რესურსებიდან გამოყენებული ფუნქციებზე, როგორც დიქტორიები და ლექსიკალური რესურსებიდან გამოყენებული. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა კლასიფიკაციის კონფიგურაცია სიტყვების დონეზე მხოლოდ BERT-ზე დაბაზეულია, მარცხების, პარასერების, სახელის სახელის სიტყვების, ან სხვა გარეშე რესურსის ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა 5 მონაცემების განმავლობაში, რომელიც კონტრანციონალური BERT მოდელები და ბენქმარიკები დიდი მარტინზე გადავიტანა. ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამის გენერალიზაცია საკმაოდ არაჩვენებელი მონაცემები.', 'it': "Gli approcci esistenti per la risoluzione della metonimia si basano su funzionalità estratte da risorse esterne come dizionari e risorse lessicali artigianali. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio end-to-end di classificazione a livello di parole basato solo su BERT, senza dipendenze da tagger, parser, dizionari curati di toponimi o altre risorse esterne. Dimostriamo che il nostro approccio raggiunge lo stato dell'arte su 5 set di dati, superando con un ampio margine i modelli e i benchmark BERT convenzionali. Mostriamo anche che il nostro approccio si generalizza bene ai dati invisibili.", 'kk': 'Менің айырмашылығым бар әдістерім сөздіктер мен қол құрылған лексикалық ресурстар секілді сыртқы ресурстардан шығарылған мүмкіндіктеріне тұрады. Бұл қағазда біз тек BERT негіздеген сөз деңгейінің соңындағы классификациясының тәуелсіздігін, тегтерге, талдаушыларға, орналасқан атауларға немесе басқа сыртқы ресурстарына тәуелсіз деп таңдаймы Біз өзіміздің тәсіліміз 5 деректер қорларындағы әдетті BERT үлгілерін және кеңістіктеріміздің күйін жеткізеді. Мұндай-ақ біз өзіміздің жалпы мәліметтерді таңдау үшін жақсы көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Постојаните пристапи за резолуција на метонимијата зависат од карактеристики извадени од надворешни ресурси како речници и рачно направени лексикални ресурси. In this paper, we propose an end-to-end word-level classification approach based only on BERT, without dependencies on taggers, parsers, curated dictionaries of place names, or other external resources.  Ние покажуваме дека нашиот пристап го постигнува најновото на 5 податоци, надминувајќи ги конвенционалните модели и benchmarks со голема маргина. Исто така покажуваме дека нашиот пристап се генерализира добро на невидени податоци.', 'lt': 'Esami metodai, kaip spręsti metonimą, grindžiami iš išorės išteklių išgautomis savybėmis, pavyzdžiui, žodynais ir rankiniu būdu dirbtais leksiniais ištekliais. Šiame dokumente siūlome klasifikavimo metodą žodžių lygiu nuo pabaigos, grindžiamą tik BERT, nepriklausomai nuo žymenų, analizatorių, pataisytų vietos pavadinimų žodynų arba kitų išor ės išteklių. Mes parodome, kad mūsų požiūris pasiekia naujausią pažangą 5 duomenų rinkiniuose, viršijančiuose tradicinius BERT modelius ir lyginamuosius rodiklius didele marža. Taip pat rodome, kad mūsų požiūris gerai apibendrina nematomus duomenis.', 'ms': 'Pendekatan resolusi metonymy yang wujud bergantung pada ciri-ciri yang diekstrak dari sumber luar seperti kamus dan sumber leksikal yang dibuat tangan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan klasifikasi aras perkataan akhir-akhir berdasarkan hanya BERT, tanpa dependensi pada tag, penghurai, kamus kurus nama tempat, atau sumber luar lain. Kita tunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita mencapai keadaan terbaik pada 5 set data, melebihi model konvensional BERT dan tanda referensi dengan margin besar. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami menyebarkan dengan baik kepada data yang tidak terlihat.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള മെട്ടോണിമി റിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിഘണ്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൈക് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് മാത്രമാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d വാക്ക് അവസാനിക്കുന്നത്. ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d, പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d, സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ പേരുകള്\u200d, വെള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം 5 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d എത്തുന്നത്, സാധാരണ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലുകള ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനം അദൃശ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നല്ലതാണെന്നാ', 'mt': 'L-approċċi eżistenti għar-riżoluzzjoni tal-metonimja jiddependu fuq karatteristiċi estratti minn riżorsi esterni bħad-dikjararji u r-riżorsi lexiċi maħduma bl-idejn. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-livell tal-kliem minn tarf sa tarf ibbażat biss fuq BERT, mingħajr dipendenzi fuq taggers, parsers, dikjararji kkurati ta’ ismijiet tal-post, jew riżorsi esterni oħra. Aħna nuru li l-approċċ tagħna jikseb l-aktar avvanzat fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta, li jaqbżu l-mudelli konvenzjonali BERT u l-punti ta’ riferiment b’marġini kbir. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-approċċ tagħna jiġġeneralizza tajjeb għal dejta mhux viżibbli.', 'mn': 'Миний шийдвэрлэл ойртох арга бол сөрөгч, гар бүтээгдэхүүний хөрөнгө зэрэг гадаад нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнээс гарсан бөгөөд байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид зөвхөн БЕРТ дээр суурилсан үг хэмжээний хуваалцааны арга замыг зориулж, тэмдэглэгчид, хуваалцагчид, гадна нэр, эсвэл бусад гадна нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнээс хамааралгүйгээр санал болгоно. Бид 5 өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд урлагийн байр суурь байдлыг харуулж, ерөнхийлөгчийн BERT загваруудыг ихэвчлэн олон загвараар дамжуулдаг. Бид мөн бидний арга зам нь мэдээллийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande metoden måten oppløysinga tilnærmer på funksjonar ekstrahert frå eksterne ressursar som ordbokar og håndoppløysing av leksiske ressursar. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein klassifikasjon på ordnivå slutt til slutt, basert berre på BERT, utan avhengighet på merker, tolkar, korrigerte ordbokstavar med plassnamn eller andre eksterne ressursar. Vi viser at tilnærminga vårt når det er tilstanden til kunsten på 5 datasett, overpassar konvensjonelle BERT-modeller og benchmarker med ein stor margin. Vi viser også at tilnærminga vårt generelliserer godt for å forskyve data.', 'pl': 'Istniejące podejścia do rozdzielczości metonymii opierają się na funkcjach ekstraktowanych z zasobów zewnętrznych, takich jak słowniki i ręcznie tworzone zasoby leksykalne. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy kompleksowe podejście klasyfikacji na poziomie słów oparte wyłącznie na BERT, bez zależności od tagerów, parserów, kuratorów słowników nazw miejsc lub innych zasobów zewnętrznych. Pokazujemy, że nasze podejście osiąga najnowocześniejszy stan techniki na pięciu zbiorach danych, znacznie przewyższając konwencjonalne modele i wskaźniki referencyjne BERT. Pokazujemy również, że nasze podejście dobrze uogólnia niewidoczne dane.', 'ro': 'Abordările existente de rezoluție a metonimii se bazează pe caracteristici extrase din resurse externe, cum ar fi dicționare și resurse lexicale create manual. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare end-to-end de clasificare la nivel de cuvinte bazată numai pe BERT, fără dependențe de etichete, parsere, dicționare curatoriate de nume de locuri sau alte resurse externe. Demonstrăm că abordarea noastră atinge cele mai moderne 5 seturi de date, depășind cu o marjă mare modelele și criteriile BERT convenționale. De asemenea, arătăm că abordarea noastră generalizează bine datelor nevăzute.', 'sr': 'Postojeća metoda da se moja rezolucija pristupa oslanja na karakteristike izvučene iz vanjskih resursa kao što su rečenici i leksički resursi na rukama. U ovom papiru predlažemo klasifikacijski pristup nivoa riječi na kraju do kraja, zasnovan samo na BERT-u, bez ovisnosti o etiketerima, parserima, krivenim rečenicima imena mjesta ili drugim vanjskim resursima. Pokazujemo da naš pristup postiže stanje umjetnosti na pet podataka, prelazeći konvencionalne BERT modele i kritike velikom marginom. Takoðe pokazujemo da naš pristup generalizuje dobro da ne vidimo podatke.', 'so': 'Xafiiska metonimada ee joogta ah waxay ku xiran yihiin xuquuqda laga soo saaray maalmaha dibadda sida dictionaries iyo maalmaha leksikada ee gacanta ku shaqeeya. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaabilaada fasalka ugu dhammaadka ee ugu dambaysta ah ee ku qoran BERT oo kaliya, iyadoo aan ku xirnaannayn taggers, baarlamayaasha, baarlamayaasha magaca meelaha lagu qoray ama macluumaadyo kale oo dibadda ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu helo xaaladda farshaxanka ee 5 databases, oo uu soo dhaafo modellada caadiga ah ee BERT iyo bangiyadu waxay ku gaadhaan marxalad weyn. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaaqyadeenu ay si wanaagsan u sameeyaan macluumaad qarsoon.', 'sv': 'Befintliga metoder för metonymiupplösning förlitar sig på funktioner som extraheras från externa resurser som ordböcker och handgjorda lexikala resurser. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en heltäckande ordnivå klassificering baserad enbart på BERT, utan beroenden av taggare, tolkare, kuraterade ordlistor för platsnamn eller andra externa resurser. Vi visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår toppmodern på 5 datauppsättningar och överträffar konventionella BERT-modeller och riktmärken med stor marginal. Vi visar också att vårt tillvägagångssätt generaliserar väl till osynliga data.', 'si': 'මගේ විශේෂණය පිළිබඳින් විශේෂය පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳ සම්බන්ධතාවක් වගේ භාෂණාවක් සහ අත් අත් අත් අ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කරනවා වචන පරීක්ෂණයක් BERT විතරයි, ටැගර්ස්, පරීක්ෂකයන්, ස්ථාන නම් සහ අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිකාර අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට දත්ත සේට් 5 වල ස්ථානයේ ඉන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, සාමාන්\u200dය BERT මොඩේල් සහ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් විශාල ප අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට දත්ත අවධානය කරන්න හොඳයි කියලා.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய முறைமை தெளிவுத்திறன் நெறிமுறைகள் அகராதிகள் மற்றும் கையில் உள்ள லெக்சிக் மூலங்கள் போன்ற வெளியேற்றப்பட் In this paper, we propose an end-to-end word-level classification approach based only on BERT, without dependencies on taggers, parsers, curated dictionaries of place names, or other external resources.  நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் எங்கள் அணுகல் 5 தரவுத்தளத்தின் நிலையை அடையும், வழக்கமான பிரெட் மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் பெரிய குறி நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் அணுகல் மறைக்கப்படாத தரவை நன்றாக உருவாக்குகிறது.', 'ur': 'میری روزی کے مطابق موجود ہوتی ہے کہ میری روزی آ پہنچ جاتی ہے اس طرح بیرونی منابع سے نکالے جاتے ہیں جیسے لکھائی اور ہاتھ پیدا کئے ہوئے لکھائی منابع۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم صرف BERT پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، ٹاگر، پارس، جگہ ناموں اور دوسرے خارجی منابعوں کے بغیر، ایک ایسی لکھی لکھی ہوئی لکھی لکھی طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری تقریبا پنج ڈیٹ سٹ پر آرتی کی حالت پہنچ جاتی ہے، ایک بڑی مارجینٹ کے ذریعہ معمولی BERT موڈل اور بنچ مارک سے زیادہ جاتی ہے. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ عمومی سے پوشیدہ دکھانے کے لئے بہتر ہے.', 'uz': "Mavjud metonami muvaffaqiyatlarini tashkilotlar va qo'llab qo'llangan leksikal rasmlaridan tashqi rasmlarni ishlatadi. Bu hujjatda biz faqat BERT asosida, taggerlar, parserlar, joylar nomini yoki boshqa tashqi rasmlarni ishlatmaydigan so'zning oxirigi darajalashtirish usulini davom qilamiz. Biz 5 maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi hodisa bajarayotganimizni ko'rsatdik, oddiy BERT modellarini va juda katta harfga ko'rib chiqaradi. Biz shunday ko'rsatdik, bizning murojaatiyatlarimiz hamma narsalarni yaxshi ko'rinishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phương pháp giải quyết về metonymy tồn tại dựa trên tính chất chiết xuất từ nguồn ngoại chất như từ điển và các nguồn ngôn ngữ tự làm thủ công. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp phân loại từ hết đến cuối chỉ dựa trên BERT, không phụ thuộc vào tác giả của các tác giả, phân tích, các từ điển của các nơi đặt tên, hoặc các nguồn tài nguyên khác bên ngoài. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi đạt được trạng thái hiện đại trên mẫu dữ liệu 5, vượt qua những mô hình hỗn hợp vỏ cây và những tiêu chuẩn chuẩn vượt trội. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy phương pháp phổ biến tốt hơn những dữ liệu vô hình.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите подходи за разделителна способност разчитат на функции, извлечени от външни ресурси като речници и ръчно изработени лексикални ресурси. В тази статия предлагаме подход за класификация от край до край, базиран само на БЕРТ, без зависимости от маркери, анализатори, курирани речници с имена на места или други външни ресурси. Показваме, че нашият подход постига най-съвременните резултати на 5 набора от данни, надминавайки конвенционалните модели и референтните показатели с голям марж. Също така показваме, че нашият подход обобщава добре невидимите данни.', 'hr': 'Postojeća metoda mog pristupa rezoluciji oslanja se na karakteristike izvučene iz vanjskih resursa poput riječi i leksičkih resursa na rukama. U ovom papiru predlažemo klasifikacijski pristup razine riječi na kraju do kraja, temeljen na BERT-u, bez ovisnosti o etiketerima, parserima, krivenim riječima imena mjesta ili drugim vanjskim resursima. Pokazujemo da naš pristup postigne državu umjetnosti na 5 podataka, prelazeći konvencionalne BERT modele i kriterije velikom marginom. Također pokazujemo da naš pristup generalizira dobro da ne vidimo podatke.', 'da': 'Eksisterende metoder til metonymi-opløsning er afhængige af funktioner udvundet fra eksterne ressourcer som ordbøger og håndlavede leksikalske ressourcer. I denne artikel foreslår vi en end-to-end klassifikationsmetode baseret på BERT, uden afhængighed af taggere, fortolkere, kuraterede ordbøger af stednavne eller andre eksterne ressourcer. Vi viser, at vores tilgang opnår topmoderne på 5 datasæt og overgår konventionelle BERT-modeller og benchmarks med stor margin. Vi viser også, at vores tilgang genererer godt til usynlige data.', 'nl': 'Bestaande methoden voor metonymieresolutie zijn afhankelijk van functies die zijn geëxtraheerd uit externe bronnen, zoals woordenboeken en handgemaakte lexicale bronnen. In dit artikel stellen we een end-to-end classificatiebenadering voor die alleen gebaseerd is op BERT, zonder afhankelijkheid van taggers, parsers, samengestelde woordenboeken met plaatsnamen of andere externe bronnen. We laten zien dat onze aanpak de state-of-the-art bereikt op vijf datasets en conventionele BERT modellen en benchmarks met een grote marge overtreft. We laten ook zien dat onze aanpak goed generaliseert naar onzichtbare data.', 'de': 'Bestehende Ansätze zur Metonymie-Auflösung basieren auf Funktionen, die aus externen Ressourcen wie Wörterbüchern und handgefertigten lexikalischen Ressourcen extrahiert wurden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen End-to-End-Klassifizierungsansatz vor, der nur auf BERT basiert, ohne Abhängigkeiten von Taggern, Parsern, kuratierten Wörterbüchern von Ortsnamen oder anderen externen Ressourcen. Wir zeigen, dass unser Ansatz den Stand der Technik auf fünf Datensätzen erreicht und konventionelle BERT-Modelle und Benchmarks deutlich übertrifft. Wir zeigen auch, dass unser Ansatz gut auf unsichtbare Daten verallgemeinert.', 'ko': '기존의 전유 해소 방법은 외부 자원(예를 들어 사전과 수공 어휘 자원)에서 추출한 특징에 의존한다.본고에서 우리는 BERT의 끝에서 끝까지 단어급 분류 방법을 바탕으로 표기기, 해석기, 지명사전 또는 다른 외부 자원에 의존하지 않는 방법을 제시했다.Dell의 접근 방식은 기존의 BERT 모델과 기준을 크게 뛰어넘는 5개의 데이터 세트에서 최첨단 수준에 도달했습니다.우리는 또 우리의 방법이 보이지 않는 데이터까지 잘 보급될 수 있다고 밝혔다.', 'id': 'Pendekatan resolusi metonymy yang ada bergantung pada ciri-ciri yang dikeluarkan dari sumber daya luar seperti kamus dan sumber daya lexik yang dibuat tangan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan klasifikasi tingkat kata dari akhir ke akhir berdasarkan hanya BERT, tanpa tergantung pada tagger, parser, kata-kata yang dikurasi nama tempat, atau sumber daya luar lainnya. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita mencapai state-of-the-art pada 5 set data, melebihi model konvensional BERT dan benchmarks dengan margin besar. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita mendeneralisasi dengan baik ke data yang tidak terlihat.', 'fa': 'روش وجود دارد که به راه حل من نزدیک می شود بر ویژه\u200cهایی که از منابع خارجی استخراج شده\u200cاند، مانند ویژه\u200cها و منابع\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی با دست می\u200cسازند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش کلمه\u200cای که تنها بر روی BERT بنیاد می\u200cرسد، بدون بستگی به نقاشی\u200cکننده\u200cها، بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cها، لغت\u200cنامه\u200cهای مکان\u200cها و دیگر منابع خارجی\u200cها را تغییر دهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که دستور ما موقعیت هنر را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها 5 می\u200cرساند، مدل\u200cهای سنتی BERT و نقشه\u200cهای سنجیده با یک مرز بزرگ فراتر می\u200cکنند. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که دسترسی ما به اطلاعات غیرقابل نظر می گیرد.', 'sw': 'Uamuzi wa utambulisho wa hali halisi unategemea vipengele vilivyotolewa na rasilimali za nje kama vile dictionary na rasilimali za lexico zilizo mikononi. In this paper, we propose an end-to-end word-level classification approach based only on BERT, without dependencies on taggers, parsers, curated dictionaries of place names, or other external resources.  Tunaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inafanikiwa hali ya sanaa kwenye seti tano za takwimu, kupitisha mifano ya kawaida ya BERT na bendera kwa kiwango kikubwa. Tunaonyesha pia kwamba mbinu zetu zinatengeneza vizuri na taarifa zisizo fichikana.', 'af': "Bestaande metode het my resolusie toegang verkry op funksies wat uit eksterne hulpbronne uitgevoer word soos woordeboeke en hand-gebruikte leksiehulpbronne. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n einde-na-einde woord-vlak klasifikasie toegang wat net op BERT gebaseer is, sonder afhanklikheid op merkers, verwerkers, gewysigde woordeboeke van plek name of ander eksterne hulpbronne. Ons wys dat ons toegang die state-of-the-art op 5 datastelle bereik, oorvloediging van konvensionele BERT modele en benchmarke deur 'n groot marge. Ons wys ook dat ons toegang genereliseer goed om data te ontsien.", 'tr': "Meň bar kararym golaýlaýan metodama daşarydaky çeşmelerden sözlükler we elimden çykan leksiýaly çeşmelerden çykylýan özelliklere ynanýar. Bu kagyzda diňe BERT'a daýan ýan soňra söz derejesi klasifikasiýasyny teklip edýäris, etiketlere, parslere, ýer adlaryň sözlerniň ýöne ýa-da başga daşarydaky çeşmelere daýanýar. Biz öz yaklaşymyz 5 veri setirlerinde, düzgün BERT modelleriniň we çykyşlarymyzyň uly gabdalykdan geçirýändigini görkez. Biz hem öz ýaryşymyz maglumatlary görmäge gowy döredip görkeýäris.", 'sq': 'Përqafimet ekzistuese të zgjidhjes së metonimisë mbështeten në karakteristikat e nxjerra nga burimet e jashtme si fjalorët dhe burimet lexike të ndërtuara me dorë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një qasje klasifikimi nga fundi në fund të nivelit të fjalëve bazuar vetëm në BERT, pa varësi nga etiketat, analizuesit, fjalorët e kuruar të emrave të vendeve, apo burimet e tjera të jashtme. Ne tregojmë se metoda jonë arrin gjendjen më të lartë në 5 grupe të dhënash, duke kaluar modelet konvencionale të BERT-it dhe pikat e referimit me një margin të madh. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se qasja jonë gjeneralizon mirë të dhënat e padukshme.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոնիմիայի լուծման մոտեցումները հիմնված են արտաքին ռեսուրսներից ստացված հատկանիշների վրա, ինչպիսիք են բառարանները և ձեռքով ստեղծված լեքսիկական ռեսուրսները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք վերջ-վերջ բառերի մակարդակի դասակարգման մոտեցում, որը հիմնված է միայն BER-ի վրա, առանց կախվածության նշաններից, վերլուծումներից, տեղային անունների դասակարգված բառարաններից կամ այլ արտաքին ռեսուրսներից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը հասնում է հինգ տվյալների համակարգի լավագույնին, գերազանցում է ավանդական BER մոդելները և հարաբերականները մեծ արժեքով: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը լավ ընդհանրացնում է անտեսանելի տվյալները:', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የሜዶኒ መልስ ቀዳሚ የውጭ ሀብት እንደ መዝገብ እና እጁን በኩል የሊክሲ ሀብት በሚወጡት ምርጫዎች ላይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ፣ BERT በተመሳሳይ፣ tagger፣ ፓርራር፣ የቦታ ስሞች ወይም ሌላ ውጭ ሀብት መብት ሳይታመኑ የመጨረሻ ቃላት-ደረጃ መክፈቻን እናስባለን፡፡ በአምስት ዳታዎች ላይ የ-የ-የ-ዓላማ ሥርዓት እንዲደርስ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ የባሕላዊው የBERT ዓይነቶች እና የዋነቶችን አካባቢዎች በቁጥጥር እንዲሻል፡፡ አካሄዳችን ለመስታወቅ ዳራዎችን እንዲያሳየው እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Mənim çətinliklərim yaxınlaşdığı metodlar sözlər və əl yaratdığı leksik kaynaqlar kimi dış kaynaqlardan çıxarılan xüsusiyyətlərə təvəkkül edir. Bu kağızda, ancaq BERT-ə dayanan söz səviyyəsi klasifikasiya approach təklif edirik, etiketçilərə, parserlərə, yerlərin adlarının və ya digər dış kaynaqların bağlılıqları olmadan. Yaxınlığımız 5 veri qurduğu məlumatın durumunu başa çatdığını göstərdik. Üstünlük BERT modellərini və benchmarklərini böyük bir dərəcədən üstün edir. Biz də göstəririk ki, bizim tərəfimiz məlumatları görmədiyimiz tərzdə yaxşı tərzdə tərzdə edir.', 'bn': 'বাইরের সম্পদ থেকে বেরিয়ে যাওয়া বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্ভর করে, যেমন সংবাদপত্র এবং হাতে ক্ষমতা প্রদান করা লেক্সিক্য এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শেষ শব্দের স্তরের শেষ পর্যন্ত শ্রেণীকরণের প্রস্তাব করি শুধুমাত্র বেরেটির উপর ভিত্তিক, ট্যাগার, পার্সার, স্থানের নাম বা বাইরের আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ ৫টি ডাটাসেটে শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র অর্জন করে, কনভেন্টাল বিবেরেট মডেল এবং বেনমেন্কের মাধ্যমে পা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা অদৃশ্য তথ্যের জন্য ভালোভাবে জেনারেল করে।', 'ca': "Els enfocaments de resolució de la metonimia existents depenen de característiques extraides de recursos externs com diccionaris i recursos lèxics manuals. En aquest article proposem un enfocament de classificació de nivell de paraules de final a final basat només en BERT, sense depències en etiquetadors, analitzadors, diccionaris curats de noms de llocs o altres recursos externs. Mostrem que el nostre enfocament aconsegueix l'última en cinc conjunts de dades, superant els models convencionals BERT i els punts de referència en un gran marge. També demostram que el nostre enfocament generalitza bé les dades invisibles.", 'cs': 'Stávající metonymické přístupy se opírají o funkce extrahované z externích zdrojů, jako jsou slovníky a ručně vytvořené lexikální zdroje. V tomto článku navrhujeme komplexní klasifikační přístup založený pouze na BERT, bez závislosti na taggerech, parserech, kurátorovaných slovnících názvů míst nebo jiných externích zdrojích. Ukazujeme, že náš přístup dosahuje nejmodernějšího stavu na pěti datových sadách a značně překonává konvenční modely BERT a benchmarky. Ukazujeme také, že náš přístup dobře obecně generalizuje neviditelná data.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad metonüümia resolutsiooni lähenemisviisid tuginevad välisressurssidest, nagu sõnaraamatud ja käsitsi valmistatud leksikaalsetest ressurssidest saadud funktsioonidele. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja sõnatasemel klassifitseerimise põhimõtte, mis põhineb ainult BERT-il, ilma et sõltuks sildistajatest, parseritest, kohanimete kureeritud sõnaraamatutest või muudest välisressurssidest. Näitame, et meie lähenemisviis saavutab viie andmekogumi tipptasemel, ületades suurel määral tavapäraseid BERTi mudeleid ja võrdlusnäitajaid. Samuti näitame, et meie lähenemisviis üldistab hästi nähtamatuid andmeid.', 'bs': 'Postojeća metoda mog rješenja se oslanja na karakteristike izvučene iz vanjskih resursa poput riječi i leksičkih resursa koje su napravljene rukama. U ovom papiru predlažemo klasifikacijski pristup nivoa riječi na kraju do kraja, zasnovan samo na BERT-u, bez ovisnosti o etiketerima, parserima, krivenim riječima imena mjesta ili drugim vanjskim resursima. Pokazujemo da naš pristup postigne državu umjetnosti na 5 dataseta, prelazeći konvencionalne BERT modele i kriterije velikom marginom. Također pokazujemo da naš pristup generalizuje dobro da ne vidimo podatke.', 'fi': 'Nykyiset metonymian resoluutiomenetelmät perustuvat ulkoisista resursseista poimittuihin ominaisuuksiin, kuten sanakirjoihin ja käsin tehtyihin sanastoresursseihin. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme päästä päähän -sanatason luokittelumenetelmää, joka perustuu vain BERT-järjestelmään, ilman riippuvuutta tunnisteista, jäsentäjistä, paikkanimien kuratoiduista sanakirjoista tai muista ulkoisista resursseista. Osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme saavuttaa viimeisintä tekniikkaa viidessä aineistossa ylittäen perinteiset BERT-mallit ja vertailuarvot suurella marginaalilla. Osoitamme myös, että lähestymistapamme yleistyy hyvin näkymättömään dataan.', 'jv': 'buddy Nang peurén iki, kita unbiasa akeh basa gambar luwih-to-end Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono hal-karat ning 5 dataset, dadi nggawe model BERT karo akeh basa sing dirampakan. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono hal-hal iki dadi ora bisa nguasakno.', 'sk': 'Obstoječi pristopi metonimije ločljivosti temeljijo na funkcijah, pridobljenih iz zunanjih virov, kot so slovarji in ročno izdelani leksikalni viri. V tem prispevku predlagamo pristop razvrščanja besed od konca do konca, ki temelji samo na BERT, brez odvisnosti od označevalcev, razčlenjevalnikov, urejenih slovarjev krajevnih imen ali drugih zunanjih virov. Pokazujemo, da naš pristop dosega najsodobnejše na petih naborih podatkov, kar za veliko maržo presega običajne modele BERT in referenčne vrednosti. Pokazujemo tudi, da naš pristop dobro posplošuje nevidnim podatkom.', 'he': 'גישות פתרון מטונימיה קיימות תלויות על תכונות שמוצאות משאבים חיצוניים כמו מילונים ומשאבים לקסיקים בידיים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה מסויימת של רמת מילים סוף-סוף מבוססת רק על BERT, ללא תלויות על Taggers, parsers, מילונים מורכבים של שמות מקומות, או משאבים חיצוניים אחרים. אנחנו מראים שהגישה שלנו משיגה את המצב החדש ב-5 קבוצות נתונים, מעבר לדוגמנים קונבנציונליים BERT ונקודות בסיס גדול. אנחנו גם מראים שהגישה שלנו מגנרליזת היטב למידע בלתי נראה.', 'ha': "Cikakken solarin metonimi da ke gaba, yana dõgara kan misfealumai waɗanda aka fizge daga sourcen bakwai kamar dictionaries da manyan itãcen leksisi da hannayensu. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata kalma mai ƙaranci ga-daraja-ƙari kawai, a kan BERT kawai, bã da daidaita kan taggeri, parser, kuma kure dictionary of site, ko wasu resource na ƙarƙasan. Tuna nũna cewa hanyoyinmu za'a sami halin-sanar kan 5 datasettes, mai sauka misãlai na BERT da bangon gaskiyar. Kayya da Muke nũna cewa hanyarmu na zaɓa danne da ba'a sani ba.", 'bo': 'གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ངའི་མིས་སྒྲིག་ཐད་གཙང་དག་བཟོས་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས In this paper, we propose an end-to-end word-level classification approach based only on BERT, without dependencies on taggers, parsers, curated dictionaries of place names, or other external resources. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་༥ ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཡིས་ཡོངས་བསྡུར་ནས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྙམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མི་རེད།'}
{'en': 'What Meaning-Form Correlation Has to Compose With : A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language', 'ar': 'ما يجب أن يؤلف ارتباط المعنى بالشكل: دراسة MFC على اللغة الاصطناعية والطبيعية', 'pt': 'Com o que a correlação de forma de significado tem que compor: um estudo de MFC em linguagem artificial e natural', 'es': 'Con qué tiene que componer la correlación significado-forma: un estudio de MFC en lenguaje artificial y natural', 'fr': 'Ce que la corrélation signifiance-forme doit composer avec\xa0: une étude de la MFC sur le langage artificiel et naturel', 'zh': '义-文相关性必曰MFC人工自然语言也', 'ja': '意味-フォーム相関が構成するもの：人工言語と自然言語に関するMFCの研究', 'hi': 'क्या अर्थ-फॉर्म सहसंबंध के साथ रचना करना है: कृत्रिम और प्राकृतिक भाषा पर एमएफसी का एक अध्ययन', 'ru': 'С чем должна состоять корреляция смысловой формы: исследование MFC на искусственном и естественном языке', 'ga': 'Cad a Chaithfidh Comhghaol Foirme Brí a Bhaint Le: Staidéar ar MFC ar Theanga Saorga agus Nádúrtha', 'hu': 'Milyen jelentés-forma korreláció kell összeállnia: MFC tanulmánya mesterséges és természetes nyelvről', 'kk': 'Ортақты пішіндегі түзету керек: МФК оқытуы мақсатты және табиғи тіл туралы', 'ka': 'სანიშვნელოვანი ფორმის კომპორაცია უნდა შექმნა: MFC კომპორაცია საკუთარი და ნაირადი ენაზე', 'el': 'Τι σημαίνει η συσχέτιση της μορφής με: Μελέτη της τεχνητής και φυσικής γλώσσας', 'mk': 'Корелацијата со она што значи форма и форма мора да се композира со: Студија на МФК за уметнички и природен јазик', 'it': 'Quale correlazione significato-forma ha a che fare con: uno studio di MFC sul linguaggio artificiale e naturale', 'mt': 'X’għandha tikkompożi l-korrelazzjoni bejn it-tifsira u l-forma: Studju ta’ MFC dwar il-lingwa artifiċjali u naturali', 'ms': 'Apa Perhubungan Bentuk-Maksud Perlu Dikomposisikan Dengan: Pelajaran MFC tentang Bahasa Sendiri dan Alami', 'lt': 'Kokia reikšmė – formos koreliacija turi būti: MVK dirbtinės ir natūralios kalbos tyrimas', 'ml': 'ഇതിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം- ഫോം കോര്\u200dബന്ധത്തിന് എന്താണ് കോപ്പോസ് ചെയ്യേണ്ടത്: ആർട്ടിഫിക്കലും സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ', 'mn': 'Үүний утгатай хэлбэрийн зөвшөөрүүлэлт нь: МФК-ын уран бүтээл, байгалийн хэл дээр судалгаа', 'pl': 'Jakie znaczenie ma korelacja formy: Badanie MFC na temat języka sztucznego i naturalnego', 'ro': 'Ce legătură înțeles-formă are de compus cu: Un studiu al MFC asupra limbajului artificial și natural', 'sr': 'Šta znači korištenje oblika mora da se sastavi sa: ispitivanje MFC o umjetnoj i prirodnoj jezici', 'si': 'මොකක්ද අදහස් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න ඕනේ: MFC පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ගැන', 'no': 'Kva gjennomsnittformkorrelasjon må skriva med: ein studie av MFC på artifisk og naturleg språk', 'so': 'What means-Form Correlation has to Compose with: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language', 'sv': 'Vad mening-form korrelation har att komponera med: En studie av MFC om artificiellt och naturligt språk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'کیا معنی-فرم اصلاح کرنا چاہتا ہے: MFC کی مصنوعی اور طبیعی زبان کے بارے میں اثر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'What meaning-Form Correlation Has to composed with: A study of MFC on artificial and Natural language', 'da': 'Hvad betyder-form korrelation har at komponere med: En undersøgelse af MFC om kunstigt og naturligt sprog', 'bg': 'Какво значение-форма корелация трябва да се състои с: Изследване на МФК за изкуствен и естествен език', 'hr': 'Koja srednja korekcija oblika mora sastaviti s: ispitivanje MFC o umjetnoj i prirodnoj jezici', 'nl': 'Wat betekening-vorm correlatie moet samenstellen: Een studie van MFC naar kunstmatige en natuurlijke taal', 'ko': '의미와 형식의 연관성: 인공언어와 자연언어의 MFC 연구', 'fa': 'چه تغییر معنی فرم باید با: مطالعه MFC در زبان مصنوعی و طبیعی', 'de': 'Welche Bedeutung-Form-Korrelation hat: Eine Studie des MFC zu Künstlicher und Natürlicher Sprache', 'id': 'What Meaning-Form Correlation Has to Compose With: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language', 'sw': 'Kitu kinachomaanisha Kuhusiana na Uhusiano unapaswa kuungana na: Utafiti wa MFC kuhusu Lugha ya Kisanaa na Kiasili', 'af': 'Wat Betekening- Form Korreksie moet met: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language', 'tr': 'Bir şekilde meýilleşdirmelidir: MFC Yapşy we Tebiýal Dili barada öwrenmelidir', 'sq': 'Çfarë do të thotë korrelacioni me formë-formë duhet të përbëhet me: një studim i MFC mbi gjuhën artificiale dhe natyrore', 'am': 'What means-Form Correlation has to Compose with: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural language', 'az': 'YaxŇüńĪ v…ô t…ôbi…ôtli dil bar…ôsind…ô MFC √∂yr…ônm…ôsi lazńĪmdńĪr.', 'hy': 'What Meaning-Form Correlation Has to Compose With: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language', 'bn': 'কি মানে ফর্ম কোর্যান্ডেন্টের সাথে কম্পোস করতে হবে: শিল্প এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় এমএফসির একটি গবেষণা', 'cs': 'Jaký význam má korelace formy složit: Studie MFC umělého a přirozeného jazyka', 'bs': 'Što znači korištenje oblika mora da se sastavi sa: ispitivanje MFC o umjetnoj i prirodnoj jezici', 'ca': 'El que la correlació entre forma i significat té a veure amb: Un estudi de MFC sobre llenguatge artificial i natural', 'fi': 'Mitä merkitys-muoto-korrelaation on koostuttava: tutkimus MFC: stä keinotekoisesta ja luonnollisesta kielestä', 'et': 'Mis tähendus-vormi korrelatsioon peab koosnema: MFC uuring kunstliku ja loodusliku keele kohta', 'jv': 'Sing Perintah-Format Kemerdekaan kang sampeyan karo: A Learn of MFC on Artidical and Normal Language', 'ha': 'A Research of MFC on art and Natural language', 'he': 'What Meaning-Form Correlation Has to Compose With: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language', 'sk': 'S čim se mora sestavljati korelacija pomena-oblike: študija MFC o umetnem in naravnem jeziku', 'bo': 'What Meaning-Form Correlation Must Compose With: A Study of MFC on Artificial and Natural Language'}
{'en': 'Compositionality is a widely discussed property of natural languages, although its exact definition has been elusive. We focus on the proposal that compositionality can be assessed by measuring meaning-form correlation. We analyze meaning-form correlation on three sets of languages : (i) artificial toy languages tailored to be compositional, (ii) a set of English dictionary definitions, and (iii) a set of English sentences drawn from literature. We find that linguistic phenomena such as synonymy and ungrounded stop-words weigh on MFC measurements, and that straightforward methods to mitigate their effects have widely varying results depending on the dataset they are applied to. Data and code are made publicly available.', 'ar': 'التركيب هو خاصية تمت مناقشتها على نطاق واسع للغات الطبيعية ، على الرغم من أن تعريفها الدقيق كان بعيد المنال. نحن نركز على الاقتراح القائل بأنه يمكن تقييم التركيب من خلال قياس ارتباط شكل المعنى. نقوم بتحليل ارتباط شكل المعنى على ثلاث مجموعات من اللغات: (1) لغات الألعاب الاصطناعية المصممة لتكون تركيبية ، (2) مجموعة من تعريفات قاموس اللغة الإنجليزية ، و (3) مجموعة من الجمل الإنجليزية مستمدة من الأدب. لقد وجدنا أن الظواهر اللغوية مثل الكلمات المترادفة وكلمات التوقف غير المبررة تؤثر على قياسات MFC ، وأن الطرق المباشرة للتخفيف من آثارها لها نتائج متباينة على نطاق واسع اعتمادًا على مجموعة البيانات التي يتم تطبيقها عليها. البيانات والرموز متاحة للجمهور.', 'pt': 'A composicionalidade é uma propriedade amplamente discutida das linguagens naturais, embora sua definição exata tenha sido elusiva. Focamos na proposta de que a composicionalidade pode ser avaliada medindo-se a correlação da forma de significado. Analisamos a correlação da forma de significado em três conjuntos de linguagens: (i) linguagens artificiais de brinquedo adaptadas para serem composicionais, (ii) um conjunto de definições de dicionário em inglês e (iii) um conjunto de frases em inglês extraídas da literatura. Descobrimos que fenômenos linguísticos como sinonímia e palavras de parada não fundamentadas pesam nas medições de MFC, e que métodos diretos para mitigar seus efeitos têm resultados amplamente variados, dependendo do conjunto de dados ao qual são aplicados. Dados e código são disponibilizados publicamente.', 'fr': "La compositionalité est une propriété largement discutée des langues naturelles, bien que sa définition exacte ait été difficile à définir. Nous nous concentrons sur la proposition selon laquelle la compositionalité peut être évaluée en mesurant la corrélation signifiance-forme. Nous analysons la corrélation entre la signification et la forme dans trois ensembles de langues\xa0: (i) des langages de jouets artificiels conçus pour être compositionnels, (ii) un ensemble de définitions de dictionnaires anglais et (iii) un ensemble de phrases anglaises tirées de la littérature. Nous constatons que les phénomènes linguistiques tels que la synonymie et les mots vides non fondés pèsent sur les mesures MFC, et que les méthodes simples pour atténuer leurs effets ont des résultats très variables en fonction de l'ensemble de données auquel elles sont appliquées. Les données et le code sont mis à la disposition du public.", 'es': 'La composicionalidad es una propiedad ampliamente discutida de los lenguajes naturales, aunque su definición exacta ha sido difícil de alcanzar. Nos centramos en la propuesta de que la composicionalidad se puede evaluar midiendo la correlación significado-forma. Analizamos la correlación significado-forma en tres conjuntos de idiomas: (i) lenguajes de juguetes artificiales adaptados para ser compositivos, (ii) un conjunto de definiciones de diccionarios de inglés y (iii) un conjunto de oraciones en inglés extraídas de la literatura. Encontramos que fenómenos lingüísticos como la sinonimia y las palabras vacías sin fundamento pesan en las mediciones de MFC, y que los métodos sencillos para mitigar sus efectos tienen resultados muy variados según el conjunto de datos al que se aplican. Los datos y el código se ponen a disposición del público.', 'ja': '組成性は、その正確な定義は明確ではないが、自然言語の広く議論されている性質である。意味論的相関を測定することで、組成性を評価できるという提案に焦点を当てている。私たちは、(i)作文に合わせた人工のおもちゃ言語、(ii)英語辞書の定義のセット、(iii)文献から得られた英語の文章のセットの3つの言語について、意味の形の相関を分析します。同義語や接地しない停止語などの言語現象は、MFC測定値に重み付けされ、それらの影響を軽減するための単純な方法は、適用されるデータセットに応じて大きく異なる結果をもたらすことがわかります。データとコードは公開されています。', 'zh': '合性是自然语言博论,定义难测。 专于测义 - 相关性以质性。 析三组语意相关性:(i)为构图量身制者造玩具语言,(ii)一朋英语词典定义,及(iii)取英语句于文学。 臣等见同义词、停词言语MFC测量甚大,而轻其简易之法有大异者,具在所用之数集。 数代码明矣。', 'ru': 'Композиционность является широко обсуждаемым свойством естественных языков, хотя ее точное определение было неуловимым. Мы фокусируемся на предложении, что композиционность может быть оценена путем измерения корреляции между смыслом и формой. Мы анализируем корреляцию между смыслом и формой на трех наборах языков: (i) искусственные языки игрушек, адаптированные для композиции, (ii) набор определений английского словаря и (iii) набор английских предложений, взятых из литературы. Мы находим, что лингвистические феномены, такие как синонимия и необоснованные стоп-слова, взвешивают измерения MFC, и что простые методы смягчения их последствий имеют широко различающиеся результаты в зависимости от набора данных, к которому они применяются. Данные и код предаются гласности.', 'hi': 'Compositionality प्राकृतिक भाषाओं की एक व्यापक रूप से चर्चा की गई संपत्ति है, हालांकि इसकी सटीक परिभाषा मायावी रही है। हम इस प्रस्ताव पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं कि अर्थ-रूप सहसंबंध को मापकर रचनात्मकता का मूल्यांकन किया जा सकता है। हम भाषाओं के तीन सेटों पर अर्थ-रूप सहसंबंध का विश्लेषण करते हैं: (i) कृत्रिम खिलौना भाषाएं जो रचनात्मक होने के अनुरूप हैं, (ii) अंग्रेजी शब्दकोश परिभाषाओं का एक सेट, और (iii) साहित्य से खींचे गए अंग्रेजी वाक्यों का एक सेट। हम पाते हैं कि भाषाई घटनाएं जैसे पर्यायवाची और अनग्राउंडेड स्टॉप-वर्ड्स एमएफसी माप पर वजन करते हैं, और उनके प्रभावों को कम करने के लिए सीधे तरीकों में डेटासेट के आधार पर व्यापक रूप से अलग-अलग परिणाम होते हैं, जिस पर वे लागू होते हैं। डेटा और कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराए जाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Airí de theangacha nádúrtha a phléitear go forleathan is ea an chomhshuíomhacht, cé go bhfuil a sainmhíniú cruinn dothuigthe. Dírímid ar an moladh gur féidir comhdhéanamh a mheas trí chomhghaolmhaireacht brí-foirme a thomhas. Déanaimid anailís ar chomhghaolú brí-fhoirme ar thrí thacar teangacha: (i) teangacha bréagacha saorga atá oiriúnaithe le bheith ina gcomhdhéanamh, (ii) sraith sainmhínithe foclóir Béarla, agus (iii) sraith abairtí Béarla ó litríocht. Faighimid amach go bhfuil feiniméin theangeolaíocha ar nós comhchiallacha agus stopfhocail neamhbhunaithe ag meáchan ar thomhais MFC, agus go mbíonn torthaí an-éagsúil ag modhanna simplí chun a n-iarmhairtí a mhaolú ag brath ar an tacar sonraí a gcuirtear i bhfeidhm iad. Cuirtear sonraí agus cód ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'კომპოზიციონალიტი არის დიდი განსაკუთრებული სახელსაწარმოდგენებული სახელსაწარმოდგენება, მაგრამ საკუთარი განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებულია. ჩვენ კონუქტირებით გავაკეთებთ, რომ კომპოზიციალურობა შეიძლება გავაკეთება, როგორც ნიშნავს ფორმის კორელაციაზე. ჩვენ ანალიზაცით სამი ენების შესახებ სიტყვების კორელაციას: i) კომპოციოლური თამაშების ენები, რომლებიც კომპოციოლური, ii) ანგლისური სიტყვების განსაზღვრების ნახვა, და iii) ანგლისური სიტყვე ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ენგუნისტიკური ფენომენები, როგორც სინონიმი და არაკონფიგური სიტყვები, MFC მოზემილების გარჩენა, და რომ მარტივი პროცემენტები, რომლებიც მათი ეფექტების გარჩენა, გარ Data and code are made publicly available.', 'it': 'La composizione è una proprietà ampiamente discussa dei linguaggi naturali, anche se la sua esatta definizione è stata sfuggente. Ci concentriamo sulla proposta che la composizione possa essere valutata misurando la correlazione significato-forma. Analizziamo la correlazione significato-forma su tre insiemi di lingue: (i) linguaggi giocattolo artificiali su misura per essere compositivi, (ii) un insieme di definizioni del dizionario inglese, e (iii) un insieme di frasi inglesi tratte dalla letteratura. Troviamo che fenomeni linguistici come sinonimia e parole di arresto non arrotondate pesano sulle misurazioni MFC, e che metodi semplici per mitigarne gli effetti hanno risultati ampiamente variabili a seconda del set di dati a cui vengono applicati. I dati e il codice sono resi pubblici.', 'el': 'Η συνθηματικότητα είναι μια ευρέως συζητημένη ιδιότητα των φυσικών γλωσσών, αν και ο ακριβής ορισμός της ήταν δυσδιάκριτος. Εστιάζουμε στην πρόταση ότι η σύνθεση μπορεί να αξιολογηθεί με τη μέτρηση της συσχέτισης έννοιας-μορφής. Αναλύουμε τη συσχέτιση εννοιών-μορφών σε τρία σύνολα γλωσσών: (i) τεχνητές γλώσσες παιχνιδιών προσαρμοσμένες στη σύνθεση, (ii) ένα σύνολο ορισμών αγγλικού λεξικού, και (iii) ένα σύνολο Αγγλικών προτάσεων που προέρχονται από τη λογοτεχνία. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι γλωσσικά φαινόμενα όπως η συνώνυμη και οι μη τεκμηριωμένες λέξεις παύσης βαρύνουν τις μετρήσεις και ότι οι απλές μέθοδοι μετριασμού των επιπτώσεών τους έχουν πολύ διαφορετικά αποτελέσματα ανάλογα με το σύνολο δεδομένων στο οποίο εφαρμόζονται. Τα δεδομένα και ο κώδικας δημοσιοποιούνται.', 'lt': 'Sudėtingumas yra plačiai aptarta natūralių kalbų savybė, nors tiksli jo apibrėžtis nėra aiški. Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame pasiūlymui, kad sudėtingumą galima įvertinti vertinant reikšmės ir formos koreliaciją. Analizuojame reikšmės ir formos koreliaciją trimis kalbų rinkiniais: i) dirbtinėmis žaislų kalbomis, pritaikytomis kompozicijai, ii) anglų žodyno apibrėžimų rinkiniu ir iii) anglų sakinių rinkiniu, paimtu i š literatūros. Mes manome, kad kalbiniai reiškiniai, pvz., sinonimija ir neapvalinti sustojimo žodžiai, sveria PKP matavimus, ir kad paprasti metodai jų poveikiui sušvelninti turi labai skirtingų rezultatų, priklausomai nuo duomenų rinkinio, kuriame jie taikomi. Duomenys ir kodas skelbiami viešai.', 'hu': 'A kompozicionalitás a természetes nyelvek széles körben vitatott tulajdonsága, bár pontos definíciója megfogható volt. Arra a javaslatra összpontosítunk, hogy a kompozicionalitás értékelhető jelentés-forma korreláció mérésével. A jelentés-forma korrelációt három nyelvhalmazon elemezzük: (i) kompozíciós mesterséges játéknyelvek, (ii) angol szótárdefiníciók sorozata, és (iii) angol mondatok sorozata irodalomból. Úgy találjuk, hogy a nyelvi jelenségek, mint például a szinonimák és a nem keretezett állószavak súlyozzák az MFC méréseket, és hogy a hatásuk enyhítésére szolgáló egyszerű módszerek nagymértékben eltérő eredményekkel járnak az alkalmazott adatkészlettől függően. Az adatokat és a kódokat nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé teszik.', 'mk': 'Композиционалноста е широко дискутирана сопственост на природните јазици, иако неговата точна дефиниција е нејасна. Ние се фокусираме на предлогот дека композицијалноста може да се процени со мерење на корелацијата значење-форма. Ние анализираме корелација на значење-форма на три набори јазици: (i) вештачки јазици на играчки направени за да бидат композиционални, (ii) набор на англиски дефиниции на речникот, и (iii) набор англиски реченици извлечени од литературата. Најдовме дека јазичните феномени како синонимија и неокруглени запирачки зборови тежат на мерките на МФЦ, и дека едноставните методи за намалување на нивните ефекти имаат многу различни резултати во зависност од податоците на кои се применуваат. Податоците и кодот се јавно достапни.', 'kk': 'Композиционалық - табиғи тілдерінің қасиеті, бірақ оның дұрыс анықтамасы келмейді. Біз тұрақтылығын мәлімет пішіндегі корреляциясын өлшеу арқылы анықтауға болады. Біз мәлімет түрлі тілдерінің үш тілдерінде корреляциясын анализирақ: i) құрылған әртүрлі ойындық тілдері, ii) ағылшын сөздік анықтамалары және iii) литератураның ағылшын сөздері. Біз лингвистикалық пайдаланулар, мысалы синонимия және бұрыштырылмаған тоқтату сөздері MFC өлшемдеріне тең, және олардың эффекттерін көшірмелеу әдістері, олардың қолданылатын деректер жиына тәуелді, көбірек тү Деректер мен код жалпы жеткізілген.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷകളുടെ സ്വത്തുക്കളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വി നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം-രൂപത്തിന്\u200dറെ ബന്ധ നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d അര്\u200dത്ഥം രൂപത്തിലുള്ള ബന്ധം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു: (i) സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒരു കൂട്ടം ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് നിഘണ്ട വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നു  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, സിനോണിമിയെപ്പോലെയും അടയാളങ്ങളില്ലാത്ത സ്റ്റോപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് വാക്കുകളെയും എംഎഫ്\u200cസിയുടെ അളവുകളില്\u200d തൂക്കുന്നു എന്നും അവയുടെ പ്ര ഡേറ്റായും കോഡും പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Il-kompożizzjonalità hija proprjetà diskussa ħafna tal-lingwi naturali, għalkemm id-definizzjoni eżatta tagħha ma kinitx ċara. Aħna niffokaw fuq il-proposta li l-kompożizzjoni tista’ tiġi vvalutata billi tkejjel il-korrelazzjoni bejn it-tifsira u l-forma. Aħna nianalizzaw il-korrelazzjoni bejn it-tifsira u l-form a tat-tifsira fuq tliet settijiet ta’ lingwi: (i) lingwi artifiċjali tal-ġugarelli mfassla biex ikunu kompożittivi, (ii) sett ta’ definizzjonijiet tad-dikjararju Ingliż, u (iii) sett ta’ sentenzi Ingliżi meħuda mil-letteratura. Aħna nsibu li fenomeni lingwistiċi bħas-sinonimja u l-kelmiet tal-waqfien mhux aġġustati jiżnu fuq il-kejl tal-MFC, u li metodi sempliċi biex jittaffew l-effetti tagħhom għandhom riżultati differenti ħafna skont is-sett tad-dejta li huma applikati għalih. Id-dejta u l-kodiċi huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'pl': 'Kompozycjonalność jest szeroko dyskutowaną właściwością języków naturalnych, choć jej dokładna definicja była nieuchwytna. Skupiamy się na propozycji oceny kompozycyjności poprzez pomiar korelacji znaczenia-formy. Analizujemy korelację znaczenia-formy na trzech zestawach języków: (i) języki sztucznych zabawek dostosowane do kompozycji, (ii) zestaw definicji angielskiego słownika oraz (iii) zestaw zdań angielskich wyciągniętych z literatury. Stwierdzono, że zjawiska językowe, takie jak synonim i nieuzasadnione stopy, ciążą na pomiary MFC, a proste metody łagodzenia ich skutków mają bardzo różne wyniki w zależności od zbioru danych, do których są stosowane. Dane i kod są udostępniane publicznie.', 'ms': 'Komposisi adalah ciri-ciri bahasa semulajadi yang dibincangkan secara luas, walaupun definisi tepatnya telah tidak jelas. Kami fokus pada cadangan bahawa komposisi boleh diukur dengan mengukur korelasi makna-bentuk. Kami menganalisis korelasi bentuk-makna pada tiga set bahasa: (i) bahasa mainan buatan disesuaikan untuk komposisi, (ii) set definisi kamus Inggeris, dan (iii) set kalimat Inggeris dilukis dari literatur. Kami mendapati bahawa fenomena bahasa seperti sinonimi dan kata-kata berhenti tidak dibutuhkan berat pada pengukuran MFC, dan bahawa kaedah sederhana untuk mengurangi kesan mereka mempunyai keputusan yang sangat berbeza bergantung pada set data yang mereka dilaksanakan. Data dan kod dibuat tersedia pada masyarakat.', 'ro': 'Compoziționalitatea este o proprietate larg discutată a limbilor naturale, deși definiția sa exactă a fost evazivă. Ne concentrăm asupra propunerii ca compoziționalitatea să poată fi evaluată prin măsurarea corelației semnificație-formă. Analizăm corelația semnificație-formă pe trei seturi de limbi: (i) limbaje artificiale de jucărie adaptate pentru a fi compoziționale, (ii) un set de definiții dicționare engleză și (iii) un set de propoziții în limba engleză extrase din literatură. Considerăm că fenomenele lingvistice, cum ar fi sinonimia și cuvintele de oprire neregulate, cântăresc pe măsurătorile MFC și că metodele simple de atenuare a efectelor lor au rezultate foarte variate în funcție de setul de date la care sunt aplicate. Datele și codurile sunt puse la dispoziția publicului.', 'no': 'Komposisjonalitet er ein vast diskutert eigenskap på naturspråk, men den nøyaktige definisjonen har vært elusive. Vi fokuserer på forslag at komposisjonalitet kan vurderes ved å måle korrelasjonen med meningsform. Vi analyserer korrelasjon med meningsform på tre sett språk: i) kunstiske spelspråk som er tilpassa til samansetting, ii) eit sett av engelske ordbokdefinisjonar, og iii) eit sett av engelske setningar teikna frå litteratur. Vi finn at lingviske fenomenar som synonyme og ungrundte stopord vekker på MFC-målingar, og at enkelte metodar for å minne effektane sine har mange forskjellige resultat avhengig av datasettet dei er brukt på. Data og kode er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'sr': 'Kompositivnost je široko raspravljena imovina prirodnih jezika, iako je taèna definicija bila nepristojna. Fokusiramo se na prijedlog da se kompozicionalnost može procijeniti mjerenjem korelacije u obliku smisla. Analiziramo korelaciju značajnog oblika na tri set a jezika: i) umjetne igračke jezike koje su pripremljene za kompoziciju, ii) setu definicija engleskog rečnika i iii) setu engleskih rečenica iz literacije. Nalazimo da lingvistički fenomeni poput sinonimije i nepokruženih stanovnih reči teže na MFC mjerenja, i da jednostavne metode za smanjenje njihovih efekata imaju široke različite rezultate ovisno o setu podataka na kojima se primjenjuju. Podaci i kod su javno dostupni.', 'sv': 'Kompositionalitet är en allmänt diskuterad egenskap av naturliga språk, även om dess exakta definition har varit svårfångad. Vi fokuserar på förslaget att kompositionalitet kan bedömas genom mätning av mening-form korrelation. Vi analyserar mening-form korrelation på tre uppsättningar språk: (i) artificiella leksaksspråk skräddarsydda för att vara kompositiva, (ii) en uppsättning engelska ordlista definitioner, och (iii) en uppsättning engelska meningar hämtade från litteratur. Vi finner att språkliga fenomen som synonymer och oreundade stopord väger tyngre på MFC-mätningar, och att enkla metoder för att mildra deras effekter har mycket varierande resultat beroende på vilken datamängd de används på. Uppgifter och koder görs tillgängliga för allmänheten.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэлний тодорхойлолт нь маш олон талаар ярьдаг байгалийн хэлнүүдийн тодорхойлолт юм. Бид хэлбэртэй холбоотой утгыг хэмжээгээр тодорхойлж чадна гэсэн санал дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлнэ. Бид утгатай хэлбэртэй холбоотой байдлыг 3 хэлбэрээр шинжилгээ хийдэг: i) уран бүтээлч тоглоомын хэл, ii) Англи хэлний үгийг тодорхойлох хэлбэрээр, iii) уран зохиолын зурагдсан англи үг. Бид хэл хэлний үзэгдэл, MFC хэмжээсүүд дээр хэмжээтэй зогсохгүй үг, мөн тэдний үр дүнг багасгах шууд арга зам нь өгөгдлийн санд хэрэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн санд хамааралтай олон өөрчлөлт гардаг. Өгөгдлийн болон код олон нийтэд хэрэглэгддэг.', 'so': 'Waajibka u dhigista waa hantida luuqadaha asalka ah oo ballaadhan looga hadlo, inkastoo uu si dhab ah u caddey. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa dhaqaalaha, in uuna qiimeyn karo in lagu qiyaaso xiriirka nooca ah. Waxaannu analyeelnaa xiriirka midhaha ah oo ku qoran saddex nooc oo luqadood: (i) luuqadaha ciyaarta oo la qoray inay noqdaan kooxa, (ii) qeyb ka mid ah qoraalka afka Ingiriiska, iyo (iii) xarumo luuqado Ingiriis oo laga soo qoray qoraalo. Waxaynu helnaa in arimaha luqada ah, sida synonymy iyo hadallada joojinta ah ay ku miisaamaan qiyaastii MFC, iyo qaababka tooska ah si ay u fududaato saameyaashooda waxay leeyihiin resultooyin kala duduwan, waxayna ku xiran yihiin macluumaadka ay ku habboon yihiin. Macluumaadka iyo codsiga waxaad ku heleysaa bayaan.', 'ta': 'Compositionality is a widely discussed property of natural languages, although its exact definition has been elusive.  ஒருங்கிணைப்பு தொடர்பை அளவிடுவதால் நாம் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். நாம் மூன்று வகையான மொழிகளில் அர்த்தமான இணைப்பை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம்: (i) சார்ந்த விளையாட்டு விளையாட்டு மொழிகள் சேர்க்க வேண்டும் என்று பார்க்கப்பட் நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் என்றால், ஒத்திசைநிறுத்தும் நிறுத்தும் நிறுத்தும் வார்த்தைகள் MFC அளவுகளை எடுக்கும் மொத்த மொழிகள் போன்ற மொழிகள் பெரும தகவல் மற்றும் குறியீடு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது.', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණතාවය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාවගේ විශේෂතාවක් විසින් කතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම එයාගේ  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් බලන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තේරුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි භාෂාව තුනක් සම්බන්ධයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා: (i) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සෙල්ලම් භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන්, (i) ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව විශ අපි හොයාගන්නවා භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරදේශ වලින් සමානෝමික සහ නැගුණු ස්ථාපිත වචන වලින් MFC විශේෂ වලින් විශේෂ විදිහට, ඒ වගේම සිද්ධ විද දත්ත සහ කෝඩ් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ලැබෙනවා.', 'ur': 'تعلقات طبیعی زبانوں کے ایک وسیع طریقے سے بحث کیا گیا ہے، اگرچہ اس کا دقیق تعریف بے وقوف ہے. ہم اس پیشنهاد پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں کہ تعبیر کی تعبیر کے مطابق مطابق مقرر کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم تین زبانوں پر معنی-فرم کا تعلق تحقیق کرتے ہیں: (i) معنی بازی زبانوں کی زبانیں compositional (ii) ایک مجموعہ انگلیسی لکھنے والی تعریف، اور (iii) ایک مجموعہ انگلیسی لکھنے والی زبانوں کی زبانیں لکھی جاتی ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ زبان شناسی پکڑے جیسے سینومین اور غیر گردش لفظ کلمات MFC اندازے پر بوجھ رہے ہیں، اور یہ سادہ طریقے ہیں کہ ان کے اثرات کمزور کرنے کے لئے ان کے اثرات کو بہت سے متفاوت کے نتیجے ہیں ان کے سامنے لکھا جاتا ہے. Data and code are publicly available.', 'uz': "Composition - tabiiy tillar xossalari juda ko'p talab qilingan, ammo ularning haqiqiqiy aniqligi muvaffaqiyatli. We focus on the proposal that compositionality can be assessed by measuring meaning-form correlation.  Biz uch tillarda o'xshash munosabatlarni aniqlamiz:(i) kompyuterga qo'yilgan rasmlar bilan ishlatadigan rasm tillari, (ii) ingliz lugʻatlarga bir ko'plab aniqlash va (iii) littatyatdan chiqqan ingliz so'zlaridan bir ko'plab so'zlarni aniqlash. Biz o'ylaymiz, sinonim va ishlab chiqarilmagan soʻzlar MFC moslamalariga o'xshash, va ularning effektlarini kamaytirish uchun oddiy usullarni ko'paytirish natijalariga juda katta ajratuvchi natijalar bor. Maʼlumot va kodlash barcha mavjud.", 'vi': 'Thành phần là tài sản được thảo luận nhiều về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, mặc dù định nghĩa chính xác của nó không rõ ràng. Chúng tôi tập trung vào đề xuất khả năng đánh giá độ hợp tác bằng cách đo mối tương quan. Chúng tôi phân tích tương quan về ba bộ ngôn ngữ: i) ngôn ngữ đồ chơi nhân tạo được thiết kế để thành hợp tác, i) một bộ định nghĩa từ đi ển tiếng Anh, và (III) một bộ câu Anh trích ra từ văn học. Chúng tôi thấy rằng những hiện tượng ngôn ngữ như đồng nghĩa và những từ dừng chân không tròn đè nặng lên các thước đo của MF, và các phương pháp đơn giản để giảm tác động của chúng có kết quả rất khác nhau tùy thuộc vào bộ dữ liệu mà chúng được áp dụng. Dữ liệu và mật mã được công bố.', 'da': 'Kompositionalitet er en meget diskuteret egenskab af natursprog, selv om dens nøjagtige definition har været undvigende. Vi fokuserer på forslaget om, at sammensætningen kan vurderes ved at måle mening-form korrelation. Vi analyserer mening-form korrelation på tre sæt sprog: (i) kunstige legetøjssprog skræddersyet til at være kompositoriske, (ii) et sæt engelske ordbogsdefinitioner, og (iii) et sæt engelske sætninger trukket fra litteratur. Vi konstaterer, at sproglige fænomener som synonymer og uforudsede stopord vejer på MFC-målinger, og at enkle metoder til at afbøde deres virkninger har vidt forskellige resultater afhængigt af det datasæt, de anvendes på. Data og kode gøres offentligt tilgængelige.', 'de': 'Kompositionalität ist eine weit diskutierte Eigenschaft natürlicher Sprachen, obwohl ihre genaue Definition schwer fassbar war. Wir konzentrieren uns auf den Vorschlag, dass Kompositionalität durch Messung von Bedeutung-Form-Korrelation beurteilt werden kann. Wir analysieren Bedeutung-Form-Korrelation auf drei Sätze von Sprachen: (i) künstliche Spielzeugsprachen, die kompositorisch zugeschnitten sind, (ii) eine Reihe von englischen Wörterbuchdefinitionen und (iii) eine Reihe von englischen Sätzen aus der Literatur. Wir stellen fest, dass linguistische Phänomene wie Synonyme und ungedeckte Stoppwörter die MFC-Messungen belasten und dass einfache Methoden zur Minderung ihrer Auswirkungen je nach Datensatz, auf den sie angewendet werden, sehr unterschiedliche Ergebnisse haben. Daten und Code werden öffentlich zugänglich gemacht.', 'hr': 'Kompozitivnost je široko raspravljena vlasništvo prirodnih jezika, iako je točno definicija bila neugodna. Fokusiramo se na prijedlogu da se sastojanstvo može procijeniti mjerenjem korelacije oblika smisla. Analiziramo korelaciju značajnog oblika na tri set a jezika: i) umjetnički jezici igračke koji su pripremljeni za sastavu, ii) setu definicija engleskog rečnika, i iii) setu engleskih rečenica iz literacije. Nalazimo da lingvistički fenomeni poput sinonimije i nepokruženih stop-riječi teže na MFC mjerenja, i da jednostavne metode za smanjenje njihovih učinka imaju široke različite rezultate ovisno o setu podataka na kojima se primjenjuju. Podaci i kod su javno dostupni.', 'bg': 'Композиционалността е широко обсъдено свойство на естествените езици, въпреки че точното й определение е неуловимо. Фокусираме се върху предложението композицията да може да бъде оценена чрез измерване на корелацията смисъл-форма. Анализираме корелацията между значението и формата на три езика: (i) изкуствени езици играчки, съобразени с композицията, (ii) набор от дефиниции на английски речник и (iii) набор от английски изречения, съставени от литературата. Установяваме, че лингвистични явления като синоними и неопределени стоп-думи тежат върху измерванията на МФК и че простите методи за смекчаване на ефектите им имат широко различни резултати в зависимост от набора от данни, към които се прилагат. Данните и кодовете са публично достъпни.', 'id': 'Kompositivitas adalah properti yang terdiskusi secara luas bahasa alam, meskipun definisi tepatnya telah tidak jelas. Kami fokus pada usulan bahwa komposisionalitas dapat diukur dengan mengukur korelasi arti-bentuk. We analyze meaning-form correlation on three sets of languages: (i) artificial toy languages tailored to be compositional, (ii) a set of English dictionary definitions, and (iii) a set of English sentences drawn from literature.  Kami menemukan bahwa fenomena bahasa seperti sinonimi dan kata-kata berhenti tidak dibutuhkan berat pada pengukuran MFC, dan bahwa metode sederhana untuk mengurangi efek mereka memiliki hasil yang sangat berbeda bergantung pada set data yang mereka aplikasikan. Data and code are made publicly available.', 'ko': '구성성은 자연 언어에서 광범위하게 논의되는 속성이다. 비록 정확한 정의는 종잡을 수 없지만.우리는 이러한 제의를 주목한다. 즉, 의미-형식적 관련성을 측정하여 구성성을 평가할 수 있다는 것이다.우리는 세 개의 언어의 의미-형식 관련성을 분석했다. (i) 합성을 위한 인공 장난감 언어, (ii) 한 개의 영어 사전 정의, 그리고 (iii) 한 개의 문헌에서 추출한 영어 문장이다.동의어와 접지하지 않는 정지어 등 언어 현상이 MFC 측정에 영향을 미쳤고, 그 영향을 경감시키는 간단한 방법은 응용된 데이터 집합에 따라 광범위하게 다른 결과를 낳았다는 것을 알 수 있다.데이터와 코드는 공개된 것이다.', 'sw': 'Compositionality is a widely discussed property of natural languages, although its exact definition has been elusive.  Tunashiria pendekezo ambalo uundaji unaweza kuchaguliwa kwa kupima mahusiano yanayomaanisha. Tunafahamu uhusiano wa maana katika aina tatu za lugha: (i) lugha za michezo ya kibiashara zinazoonekana kuwa makusanyiko, (ii) seti ya ufafanuzi wa lugha ya Kiingereza, na (iii) seti ya hukumu za Kiingereza zilizotolewa kutoka fasihi. Tunapata kwamba hali ya lugha kama vile vile ushirikiano na maneno ya kusimama yasiyo ya kawaida yanapungua upasuaji wa MFC, na njia moja kwa moja za kupunguza athari zao zina matokeo makubwa yanategemea na seti ya taarifa zinazotumiwa. Taarifa na sheria zinapatikana hadharani.', 'nl': 'Compositionaliteit is een veelbesproken eigenschap van natuurlijke talen, hoewel de exacte definitie ervan ongrijpbaar is. We richten ons op het voorstel dat compositionaliteit kan worden beoordeeld door het meten van betekenis-vorm correlatie. We analyseren betekenis-vorm correlatie op drie reeksen talen: (i) kunstmatige speelgoedtalen aangepast om compositioneel te zijn, (ii) een set Engelse woordenboek definities, en (iii) een set Engelse zinnen getrokken uit literatuur. We stellen vast dat linguïstische fenomenen zoals synoniem en ongefundeerde stopwoorden wegen op MFC-metingen, en dat eenvoudige methoden om hun effecten te beperken, zeer uiteenlopende resultaten hebben, afhankelijk van de dataset waarop ze worden toegepast. Gegevens en code worden openbaar gemaakt.', 'af': "Komposisienaliteit is 'n vaste gespreek eienskap van natuurlike tale, alhoewel sy presies definisie is onbeskikbaar. Ons fokus op die voorstel dat komposiasionaliteit deur betekenis-vorm korrelasie gemeet kan word. Ons analyseer betekenis-vorm korrelasie op drie stel tale: i) kunstenaar speletjies tale wat gemaak word om te wees, ii) â\x80\x99n stel van Engelske woordeboekdefinisies, en iii) â\x80\x99n stel van Engelse teikens wat van literaat geteken is. Ons vind dat lingwisiese fenomene soos sinoniem en ongeronderde stop-woorde gewig op MFC-measurements, en dat eenvoudige metodes om hul effekte te verminder het heeltemal verskillende resultate afhang van die datastel waarop hulle aanwend word. Data en kode is openlik beskikbaar gemaak.", 'am': 'አካባቢነት የባሕላዊ ቋንቋዎች ሀብት የተጠቃሚ ነው፣ ምንም እንኳን እውነተኛ ግንኙነቱ ግን የተለየ ነው፡፡ አካባቢ-ፍትሕ ግንኙነት በማሰናከል የሚችሉትን ጉዳይ እናስከትናለን፡፡ በሦስት ቋንቋዎች ላይ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እናስተምር:(i) የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢ መሆኑን (ii) የኢንግሊዝኛ የመዝገብ መዝገብ ግንኙነት እና (iii) የኢንግሊዝኛ ቃላት ከሐንተርነት የተቀረቡ የንግሊዝኛ ቃላት ያሳያል፡፡ We find that linguistic phenomena such as synonymy and ungrounded stop-words weigh on MFC measurements, and that straightforward methods to mitigate their effects have widely varying results depending on the dataset they are applied to.  ዳታ', 'fa': 'ترکیبی یک اموال بسیار درباره زبانهای طبیعی است، اگرچه تعریف دقیق آن بی\u200cگمان است. ما روی پیشنهاد تمرکز می کنیم که توسط اندازه\u200cگیری ارتباط منظوری قابل ارتباط سازی است. ما ارتباط معنی\u200cفرم را بر سه مجموعه زبان تحلیل می\u200cکنیم: (i) زبان اسباب بازی\u200cهای هنری که به صورت ترکیب شده\u200cاند، و (ii) مجموعه تعریف\u200cهای لغوی انگلیسی، و (iii) مجموعه\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cهای انگلیسی که از ادبیات کشید ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی مثل سنونمی و کلمات\u200cهای متوقف\u200cنشینی بر اندازه\u200cهای MFC وزن می\u200cکنند، و این روش\u200cهای مستقیم برای کمبود کردن اثرات آنها نتایج\u200cهای متفاوتی بسیار متفاوتی دارند، بستگی به مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها که به آن اطلاعات و کد به طور عمومی در دسترس قرار داده می شوند.', 'tr': 'Sy첵asat챌ylyk tebigy dillerini흫 esasy 첵agda첵da g체rr체흫le첵채n hasaplan첵ar, n채hili takyk d체힊체ndiri힊i 첵ok. Biz di첵en bir teklibe d체힊체ndirdik, di첵en 첵agda첵lygyny a흫sat 힊eklinde me흫ze첵mek 체챌in de흫le힊ebilir. Biz 철z체miz 체챌 sany dillerde m채h체m 힊eklinde me흫ze힊ligi 챌철z체mle첵채ris: (i) sany o첵un챌ylyk dilleri, (ii) I흫lis챌e s철zl체k tany힊laryny we (iii) edebi첵atdan 챌izilen i 흫lis챌e s철zleri. Biz bu lingwistiki par챌a 첵aly synonym we a첵yrmadyk halt s철zleri MFC 철l챌체mlerinde a휓캇rlyk g철r첵채ris we olary흫 etkilerini azaltmak 체챌in 첵체ze 챌ykarmak 체챌in 첵체ze 챌ykarmak 체챌in 첵체ze 챌ykan netijelerini흫 체첵tge힊igine g철r첵채n netijeleri bar. Maglumat we k철d publikak ga첵d edildi.', 'sq': 'Kompozitiviteti është një pronë e diskutuar gjerësisht për gjuhët natyrore, megjithëse përcaktimi i saj saktë ka qenë i paqartë. Ne përqëndrohemi në propozimin se kompozitiviteti mund të vlerësohet duke matur korrelacionin e kuptimit-form ës. Ne analizojmë korrelacionin e kuptimit-form ës në tre grupe gjuhësh: (i) gjuhët artificiale të lodrave të përshtatura për të qenë kompozitive, (ii) një grup përkufizimesh të fjalorëve angleze dhe (iii) një grup fjalësh angleze të nxjerra nga literatura. Ne zbulojmë se fenomenet gjuhësore të tilla si sinonimia dhe fjalët e ndalimit të papërrrethuara peshojnë mbi matjet e MFC dhe se metodat e thjeshta për të lehtësuar efektet e tyre kanë rezultate të ndryshme gjerësisht në varësi të grupit të dhënash ku janë aplikuar. Të dhënat dhe kodi janë bërë të disponueshme publikisht.', 'bs': 'Kompozitivnost je široko raspravljena vlasništvo prirodnih jezika, iako je točno definicija bila nepristojna. Fokusiramo se na prijedlogu da se kompozicionalnost može procijeniti mjerenjem korelacije u obliku smisla. Analiziramo korelaciju značajnog oblika na tri set a jezika: i) umjetnički jezici igračke koji su pripremljeni za kompoziciju, ii) setu definicija engleskog rečnika i iii) setu engleskih rečenica iz literacije. Nalazimo da lingvistički fenomeni poput sinonimije i nepokružene stopriječi teže na MFC mjerenja, i da jednostavne metode za smanjenje njihovih učinka imaju široke različite rezultate ovisno o setu podataka na kojima se primjenjuju. Podaci i kod su publicno dostupni.', 'az': 'Kompozisiyalıq təbiətli dillərin çox mübahisə edilən mülküdür, həqiqətən də, onun dəyişiklik tərzdə təmizlənməsiz idi. Biz məlumat formu ilə birləşdirilməsini ölçürək təklif etməyə odaklanırıq. Biz anlama formu ilə üç dil ilə bağlantısını analiz edirik: i) müxtəlif oyuncaq dilləri, ii) İngilizə sözlük tanımları və iii) literaturdan çəkilmiş İngilizə sözləri. Biz elmi fenomenlərin MFC ölçülərində çəkilməsi kimi sinonimi və çəkilməsi sözlərinin ağırlığını görürük. Onların təsirlərini azaltmaq üçün düzgün yollarla uyğunlaşdırılmış verilən qurbanlara bağlı olaraq çox dəyişiklik sonuçları vardır. Veri və kodu açıq-aşkar faydalanır.', 'hy': 'Կեմպոզիոնալիությունը բնական լեզուների լայն քննարկված հատկություն է, չնայած որ դրա ճշգրիտ սահմանումը անհնար է: Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք առաջարկության վրա, որ բաղադրությունը կարելի է գնահատել իմաստի-ձևի հաղորդակցման չափման միջոցով: Մենք վերլուծում ենք նշանակության-ձևի հարաբերակցությունը երեք լեզուների վերաբերյալ. i) ստեղծագործական խաղալիքի լեզուներ, որոնք պատրաստված են համադրելու համար, i) անգլերեն բառարանի սահմանումների մի շարք, և i) գրականությունից հանված անգլերեն նախադասությունների մի շարք: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ լեզվաբանական երևույթները, ինչպիսիք են սինոնիմիան և անգլորված կանգ բառերը, կշռում են ՄՖԿ-ի չափումների վրա, և որ պարզ մեթոդները իրենց ազդեցությունների նվազեցնելու համար շատ տարբեր արդյունքներ ունեն կախված տվյալների համակարգից, որին նրանք կի Data and code are made publicly available.', 'ca': "La composicionalitat és una propietat amplament discutida de les llengües naturals, encara que la seva definició exact a ha estat elusiva. Ens centrem en la proposta de que la composicionalitat pugui ser valorada mitjançant la correlació significativa-forma. Analitzem la correlació entre significat i form a en tres conjunts de llengües: i) llengües artificials de juguetes adaptades a ser composicionales, ii) un conjunt de definicions del diccionari anglès i iii) un conjunt de frases angleses dibuixades de la literatura. Trobem que fenomens lingüístics com la sinonimia i paraules de parada no arredonades pesan en les mesures de MFC, i que mètodes senzills per mitigar els seus efectes tenen resultats molt diferents segons el conjunt de dades a la que s'apliquen. Les dades i el codi estan disponibles al públic.", 'fi': 'Koostumuksellisuus on laajalti keskusteltu luonnollisten kielten ominaisuus, vaikka sen tarkka määritelmä on ollut vaikeasti havaittavissa. Keskitymme ehdotukseen, jonka mukaan kompositiivisuutta voidaan arvioida mittaamalla merkitys-muoto-korrelaatiota. Analysoimme merkityksen ja muodon korrelaatiota kolmella kieliryhmällä: (i) keinotekoisia lelukieliä, jotka on räätälöity kompositiivisiksi, (ii) joukko englannin sanakirjan määritelmiä ja (iii) joukko englanninkielisiä lauseita kirjallisuudesta. Havaitsemme, että kielelliset ilmiöt, kuten synonyymi ja pyöristämättömät pysäytyssanat, vaikuttavat MFC-mittauksiin ja että yksinkertaisilla menetelmillä niiden vaikutusten lieventämiseksi on hyvin erilaisia tuloksia riippuen siitä, mihin aineistoon niitä käytetään. Tiedot ja koodit ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'et': 'Kompositsionaalsus on looduskeelte laialdaselt arutatud omadus, kuigi selle täpne definitsioon on olnud raske. Keskendume ettepanekule, et kompositsiooni saab hinnata tähendus-vormi korrelatsiooni mõõtmise teel. Analüüsime tähendusvormi korrelatsiooni kolmes keelekomplektis: (i) kunstlikud mängukeeled, mis on kohandatud kompositsiooniks, (ii) inglise sõnastiku definitsioonide komplekt ja (iii) inglise keele lausete komplekt, mis on koostatud kirjandusest. Leiame, et keelelised nähtused nagu sünonüümia ja ümberkujundamata peatussõnad kaaluvad MFC mõõtmisi ning et lihtsad meetodid nende mõju leevendamiseks annavad väga erinevaid tulemusi sõltuvalt andmekogumist, millele neid rakendatakse. Andmed ja kood tehakse avalikkusele kättesaadavaks.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার সম্পত্তি ব্যাপকভাবে আলোচনা করা হয়েছে, যদিও তার সঠিক সংখ্যা বিস্তারিত। আমরা এই প্রস্তাবের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি যে তার মানে অর্থ-ফর্মের সম্পর্ক পরিমাপ করা যাবে। We analyze meaning-form correlation on three sets of languages: (i) artificial toy languages tailored to be compositional, (ii) a set of English dictionary definitions, and (iii) a set of English sentences drawn from literature.  আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে ভাষাগত বিষয়বস্তু যেমন সিনোনিমি এবং অনলাইন থামানো শব্দের ওজন এমএফসির মাপের উপর, আর তাদের প্রভাব কমানোর জন্য সোজা পদ্ধতি ব্যাপক ভিন্ন ফলাফল রয়েছ ডাটা এবং কোড প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'cs': 'Kompozicionalita je široce diskutovanou vlastností přírodních jazyků, ačkoli její přesná definice je nepolapitelná. Zaměřujeme se na návrh, že kompozici lze hodnotit měřením korelace významu a formy. Analyzujeme korelaci významu a formy na třech sadách jazyků: (i) umělých hračkových jazyků přizpůsobených kompozici, (ii) souboru definic anglického slovníku a (iii) souboru anglických vět čerpaných z literatury. Zjišťujeme, že jazykové jevy, jako jsou synonymie a nezahrnutá stop-slova, váží na MFC měření a že jednoduché metody ke zmírnění jejich účinků mají velmi různé výsledky v závislosti na datové sadě, na kterou jsou aplikovány. Údaje a kód jsou zpřístupněny veřejně.', 'ha': "Compositionanci yana da wani abu mai bayani da ake yi wa fatauci na harshen asimi, kuma ingawa an baka fassararsa da tabbatacce. Tuna fahimta game da buƙatan da za'a iya ƙaddara samuranci da a ƙaddara fassarar-form. Tuna yi anayyar da fassarar-danganta a kan lingui uku: (i) harsunan na fasahar littafi da aka sanar da su zama compositi, (ii) wani daidaita fassarar maganar Ingiriya, da (i) wasu salofa na Ingiriya masu motsa daga littafi. Muna gane cewa abu na lugha kamar sunonimi da kuma kuma da baka-nau'in-nau'i za'a yi nauyi a kan ma'aunin MFC, kuma hanyoyin hanya madaidaiciya ta cire fassararsu yana da matsala masu yawa, ana ƙayyade matsalatan da ake amfani da su. An samar da data da kodi da bayyane.", 'sk': 'Komposicionalnost je pogosto razpravljana lastnost naravnih jezikov, čeprav je njena natančna definicija izmuzljiva. Osredotočamo se na predlog, da je mogoče kompozicijsko oceniti z merjenjem korelacije med pomenom in obliko. Analiziramo korelacijo pomena-oblike na treh nizikih: (i) umetnih jezikih igrač, prilagojenih kompozicijskim jezikom, (ii) naboru definicij angleškega slovarja in (iii) naboru angleških stavkov iz literature. Ugotavljamo, da jezikovni pojavi, kot sta sinonimija in nezaokrožene stop besede, težijo na meritve MFC in da imajo enostavne metode za ublažitev njihovih učinkov zelo različne rezultate glede na nabor podatkov, na katerega se uporabljajo. Podatki in koda so javno dostopni.', 'he': 'המרכיבות היא רכוש שפות טבעיות ששוחחנו באופן רחב, למרות שההגדרה המדויקת שלה לא היתה ברורה. אנו מתמקדים בהצעה שיכול להעריך את המרכיבות על ידי למדוד תקשורת משמעות-צורה. אנו מנתחים שיתוף משמעות-צורה בשלושה סנטים של שפות: (i) שפות צעצועים מלאכותיות מתוכננות כדי להיות מורכבות, (ii) סנט של הגדרות מילון אנגלי, ולiii) סנט של משפטים אנגליים שמוציאים מהספרות. We find that linguistic phenomena such as synonymy and ungrounded stop-words weigh on MFC measurements, and that straightforward methods to mitigate their effects have widely varying results depending on the dataset they are applied to.  Data and code are made publicly available.', 'jv': 'Where am I Awak dhéwé éntuk akses-seneng dipunanggé kanggo sampeyan ingkang dipunanggé kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng pisan. Awak dhéwé éngleksi perusahaan-perusahaan karo telu akeh luwih: :i) kaya perusahaan kelalaman sing nggugu barang nggawe ngubah; i ii) sakjane sampek karo perusahaan kelalaman sing apik dhéwé, lan iii) sakjane Kemerdekaan karo perusahaan Inggris Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih hayo nggambar luwih dumaten karo ngono nggambar-uwong kuwi nggawe gerakan MFC measurements, lan ngono kuwi nggawe barang-uwong sing ngerasai efek dhéwé, mengko iso nguasai nggawe barang langgar-uwong susah dataset iki dadi kanggo nyenggap banjur. Dhasar karo kode kang didasakno', 'bo': 'ཆ་རྐྱེན་དེ་ནི་རང་རིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཤིག་ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དག་གི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་རིས་གཟུགས་ཅན་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་འདོན་དགོས་པ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་གནང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་འདྲེན་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་པའི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་MFC་ཚད་དང་། སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གསང་བྱས་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Evaluating Pretrained Transformer-based Models on the Task of Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'ar': 'تقييم النماذج المعتمدة مسبقًا على المحولات في مهمة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة بدقة الحبيبات', 'es': 'Evaluación de modelos preentrenados basados en transformadores en la tarea de reconocimiento detallado de entidades nombradas', 'fr': 'Évaluation de modèles préentraînés basés sur des transformateurs sur la tâche de reconnaissance fine des entités nommées', 'pt': 'Avaliando modelos baseados em transformador pré-treinados na tarefa de reconhecimento de entidade nomeada de granulação fina', 'ja': 'ファイングレインドネーム付きエンティティ認識のタスクに関する事前トレーニング済みトランスフォーマーベースモデルの評価', 'zh': '基于细粒度命实体识事之预练变压器模范评估', 'ru': 'Оценка предварительно подготовленных моделей на основе трансформаторов для задачи распознавания мелкозернистых именованных сущностей', 'hi': 'ठीक दानेदार नामित इकाई मान्यता के कार्य पर Pretrained ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल का मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Bunaithe ar Chlaochladán Réamhthraenáilte a Mheas ar Thasc Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe Mínghráinneach', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრება სტრანფორმეტრის ბაზეული მოდელების შესახებ სახელსაწერებული ინტერნეტის მიღება', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση προτύπων βασισμένων σε μετασχηματιστή με βάση το έργο της αναγνώρισης λεπτόκοκκων ονομαστικών οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'Előzetes transzformátor alapú modellek értékelése a finomszemű elnevezett entitások felismerésének feladata alapján', 'it': 'Valutazione di modelli pretrained basati su trasformatori sul compito di riconoscimento delle entità nominate a grana fine', 'kk': 'Тапсырманың тапсырмасының тапсырмасына бағытталған түрлендіру үлгілерін оқу', 'lt': 'Išankstinio apmokymo modelių, pagrįstų transformatoriais, vertinimas, susijęs su plono grūdinio pavadinimo subjekto pripažinimo užduotimi', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на претренираните трансформски модели за задачата на препознавање на фино обележани ентитети', 'ms': 'Mengevaluasi Model Berasas-Transformer Terlatih pada Tugas Pengenalan Entiti Nama Berbentuk Terbaik', 'ml': 'പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni ta’ Mudelli bbażati fuq Trasformatori Mħarrġa minn Qabel dwar il-Kompitu ta’ Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija b’Ħruġ Fin', 'mn': 'Цэцэг хэмжээний нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition Task дээр Pretrained Transformer-д суурилсан загваруудыг үнэлэх', 'no': 'Evaluerer transformeringsbaserte modeller på oppgåva av Fine Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'pl': 'Ocena wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli opartych na transformatorach na zadaniu rozpoznawania drobnoziarnistej nazwy podmiotów', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje modela na osnovu pretreniranog transformera na zadatku priznanja Fine-Grained Named Entity-a', 'ro': 'Evaluarea modelelor pretrainate bazate pe transformatori pe sarcina recunoașterii entităților denumite cu granule fine', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Shaqada aqoonsashada Finnishka', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av förutbestämda transformatorbaserade modeller på uppgiften för finkornig namnidentifiering', 'ta': 'நன்றாக பெயரிடப்பட்ட மாற்று மாற்றி அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகளின் செயலில் மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'پاکیزہ گرینڈ نامی ایٹیٹی شناخت کے کام پر پرٹرینڈ ترنسفور-بنیادی موڈل کا ارزش کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Taò¥rifi', 'vi': 'Đánh giá các chế độ biến hình giả có sẵn dựa vào Nhiệm vụ Nắm quyền nhận dạng', 'bg': 'Оценка на предварително обучени модели, базирани на трансформатори, върху задачата за разпознаване на фино зърнесто наименувано лице', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van vooraf getrainde transformatiemodellen op basis van de taak van fijnkorrelige naamsbekendheid', 'da': 'Evaluering af forudgående transformatorbaserede modeller på opgaven med finkornet navngivet enhedsgenkendelse', 'de': 'Evaluierung vortrainierter Transformatormodelle zur Aufgabe der feinkörnigen Named Entity Recognition', 'ko': '세립도 명명 실체 식별 임무를 바탕으로 하는 예비 훈련 변압기 모델 평가', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Model Transformer Berdasarkan Latihan Dalam Tugas Pengenalan Entitas bernama-Rentetan-Rentetan', 'fa': 'ارزیابی مدل\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر تغییر\u200cپذیر\u200cشده بر روی تاریخ شناسایی عنوان اسم نیکو', 'tr': 'Fine-Grained Adlanmış Entity Tanımasyna Taýýarlanan Taryhçylar', 'af': 'Evalueer voorgestelde Transformeerder-gebaseerde modele op die Opdrag van Fine-Grain Genaamde Eenheidherkening', 'sw': 'Tathmini Modeli zilizojifunza kwa ajili ya Tamko la Kutambua Ujumbe wa Tafsiri', 'sq': 'Duke vlerësuar modelet e trajnuara me bazë në transformues në detyrën e njohjes së njësisë me emër të hollë', 'hy': 'Արժեցնել նախապատրաստված տրանֆերմերների հիմնված մոդելները գեղեցիկ հագուստի անվանումների ճանաչման խնդրի վրա', 'am': 'Transformer-based Models on the task of Fine-Grained Entity Recognition', 'az': 'İyi-çətinli Adlı Entity Recognition Task üzerində Pretrained Transformer-based Models Assessment', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje modela na osnovu prethodnog transformera na zadatku prepoznavanja dobrog označenog područja', 'bn': 'ভালো গ্রেফতার কর্মের কাজের উপর প্রশিক্ষিত ট্রান্সফার্ন- ভিত্তিক মোডেল পরিচালনা করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje modela na osnovu prethodnog transformera na zadatku prepoznavanja dobrog označenog entiteta', 'ca': 'Evaluant Models Transformer-Based Pretrained on the Task of Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'cs': 'Hodnocení modelů založených na transformátorech na úkolu jemnozrnného rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Eeltreenitud transformaatoril põhinevate mudelite hindamine peeneteralise nimega üksuse tunnustamise ülesandel', 'fi': 'Valmiina muuntajapohjaisten mallien arviointi hienojyväisen nimetyn yksikön tunnistamisen tehtävässä', 'he': 'הערכה של דוגמנים מבוססים בטרנספורמים מראש על המשימה של זיהוי איכות בשם צמח', 'sk': 'Vrednotenje modelov, ki temeljijo na pretvornikih, na nalogi prepoznavanja drobnozrnatega imenovanega subjekta', 'jv': 'Validity', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྩིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དོན་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is a fundamental Natural Language Processing (NLP) task and has remained an active research field. In recent years, transformer models and more specifically the BERT model developed at Google revolutionised the field of NLP. While the performance of transformer-based approaches such as BERT has been studied for NER, there has not yet been a study for the fine-grained Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER) task. In this paper, we compare three transformer-based models (BERT, RoBERTa, and XLNet) to two non-transformer-based models (CRF and BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Furthermore, we apply each model to a multitude of distinct domains. We find that transformer-based models incrementally outperform the studied non-transformer-based models in most domains with respect to the F1 score. Furthermore, we find that the choice of domains significantly influenced the performance regardless of the respective data size or the model chosen.', 'ar': 'التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) هي مهمة أساسية لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) وظلت مجالًا بحثيًا نشطًا. في السنوات الأخيرة ، أحدثت نماذج المحولات وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا نموذج BERT الذي تم تطويره في Google ثورة في مجال البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. بينما تمت دراسة أداء المناهج القائمة على المحولات مثل BERT لـ NER ، لم تكن هناك دراسة حتى الآن لمهمة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (FG-NER) الدقيقة. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بمقارنة ثلاثة نماذج قائمة على المحولات (BERT و RoBERTa و XLNet) بنموذجين لا يعتمدان على المحولات (CRF و BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). علاوة على ذلك ، نطبق كل نموذج على العديد من المجالات المتميزة. نجد أن النماذج القائمة على المحولات تتفوق بشكل تدريجي على النماذج المدروسة غير القائمة على المحولات في معظم المجالات فيما يتعلق بدرجة F1. علاوة على ذلك ، وجدنا أن اختيار المجالات أثر بشكل كبير على الأداء بغض النظر عن حجم البيانات المعنية أو النموذج المختار.', 'es': 'El reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) es una tarea fundamental del procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) y sigue siendo un campo de investigación activo. En los últimos años, los modelos de transformadores y más específicamente el modelo BERT desarrollado en Google revolucionaron el campo de la PNL. Si bien el rendimiento de los enfoques basados en transformadores, como BERT, se ha estudiado para la NER, aún no se ha realizado un estudio para la tarea detallada de Reconocimiento de Entidades Nombradas (FG-NER). En este artículo, comparamos tres modelos basados en transformadores (BERT, RoBerta y XLnet) con dos modelos no basados en transformadores (CRF y BilSTM-CNN-CRF). Además, aplicamos cada modelo a una multitud de dominios distintos. Encontramos que los modelos basados en transformadores superan incrementalmente a los modelos no basados en transformadores estudiados en la mayoría de los dominios con respecto a la puntuación F1. Además, encontramos que la elección de los dominios influyó significativamente en el rendimiento, independientemente del tamaño de los datos respectivos o del modelo elegido.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) est une tâche fondamentale de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) et est restée un domaine de recherche actif. Ces dernières années, les modèles de transformateurs et plus particulièrement le modèle BERT développé par Google ont révolutionné le domaine de la PNL. Alors que les performances des approches basées sur les transformateurs telles que BERT ont été étudiées pour NER, il n'y a pas encore eu d'étude pour la tâche fine de reconnaissance d'entités nommées (FG-NER). Dans cet article, nous comparons trois modèles basés sur des transformateurs (BERT, Roberta et XLnet) à deux modèles non basés sur des transformateurs (CRF et BILSTM-CNN-CRF). De plus, nous appliquons chaque modèle à une multitude de domaines distincts. Nous trouvons que les modèles basés sur des transformateurs surpassent progressivement les modèles non basés sur des transformateurs étudiés dans la plupart des domaines en ce qui concerne le score F1. De plus, nous constatons que le choix des domaines a eu une influence significative sur les performances indépendamment de la taille des données ou du modèle choisi.", 'pt': 'O Reconhecimento de Entidades Nomeadas (NER) é uma tarefa fundamental do Processamento de Linguagem Natural (PNL) e tem permanecido um campo de pesquisa ativo. Nos últimos anos, os modelos de transformadores e mais especificamente o modelo BERT desenvolvido no Google revolucionaram o campo da PNL. Embora o desempenho de abordagens baseadas em transformadores, como BERT, tenha sido estudado para NER, ainda não houve um estudo para a tarefa de Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (FG-NER) de granulação fina. Neste artigo, comparamos três modelos baseados em transformadores (BERT, RoBERTa e XLNet) com dois modelos não baseados em transformadores (CRF e BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Além disso, aplicamos cada modelo a uma infinidade de domínios distintos. Descobrimos que os modelos baseados em transformador superam incrementalmente os modelos não baseados em transformador estudados na maioria dos domínios em relação à pontuação F1. Além disso, descobrimos que a escolha dos domínios influenciou significativamente o desempenho, independentemente do respectivo tamanho de dados ou do modelo escolhido.', 'zh': '名实识(NER)一自然语言理(NLP),而常为生跃之域。 近年以来,变压器模形,更具体地说谷歌开BERT彻底改变NLP域。 虽已论NER于变压器之术(如BERT)之性,而未识细粒度之实(FG-NER)。 三变压器之(BERT,RoBERTa与XLNet)二变压器(CRF与BiLSTM-CNN-CRF)比。 此外,我们将每个模形应用于多不同的领域。 吾见F1分数而言,盖变压器之渐优于变压器也。 此外,我们看见,无论各数大小或选择的模样怎么样,选择都会显著。', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）は、基本的な自然言語処理（ NLP ）タスクであり、積極的な研究分野であり続けています。近年、Googleで開発された変圧器モデル、より具体的にはBERTモデルは、NLPの分野に革命をもたらしました。BERTなどの変圧器ベースのアプローチの性能は、NERのために研究されているが、細かい名前付きエンティティ認識（ FG - NER ）タスクのための研究はまだ行われていない。本稿では，変圧器ベースの3つのモデル（ BERT ， RoBERTa ， XLNet ）と変圧器ベースでない2つのモデル（ CRF ， BiLSTM - CNN - CRF ）を比較する．さらに、私たちは各モデルを多数の異なるドメインに適用します。我々は、変圧器ベースのモデルが、F 1スコアに関してほとんどのドメインで研究された非変圧器ベースのモデルを増分的に上回ることを発見した。さらに、ドメインの選択は、それぞれのデータサイズや選択されたモデルに関係なく、パフォーマンスに大きな影響を与えたことがわかります。', 'ru': 'Именованное Распознавание Сущности (NER) основная задача Обработки Естественного Языка (NLP) и оставало активным полем исследования. В последние годы трансформаторные модели и, более конкретно, модель BERT, разработанная в Google, произвели революцию в области NLP. Хотя производительность основанных на трансформаторах подходов, таких как BERT, была изучена для NER, еще не было проведено исследование для мелкозернистой задачи распознавания именованных сущностей (FG-NER). В этой статье мы сравниваем три модели на основе трансформаторов (BERT, RoBERTa и XLNet) с двумя нетрансформаторными моделями (CRF и BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Кроме того, мы применяем каждую модель к множеству различных областей. Мы обнаружили, что модели на основе трансформаторов постепенно превосходят изученные нетрансформаторные модели в большинстве областей по отношению к оценке F1. Кроме того, мы обнаружили, что выбор доменов существенно повлиял на производительность независимо от соответствующего размера данных или выбранной модели.', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) एक मौलिक प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) कार्य है और एक सक्रिय अनुसंधान क्षेत्र बना हुआ है। हाल के वर्षों में, ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल और अधिक विशेष रूप से Google में विकसित BERT मॉडल ने NLP के क्षेत्र में क्रांति ला दी। जबकि BERT जैसे ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित दृष्टिकोणों के प्रदर्शन का अध्ययन एनईआर के लिए किया गया है, फिर भी अभी तक ठीक-ठीक नाम वाले नामित इकाई मान्यता (FG-NER) कार्य के लिए एक अध्ययन नहीं किया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम तीन ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल (BERT, RoBERTa, और XLNet) की तुलना दो गैर-ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल (CRF और BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) से करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम अलग-अलग डोमेन की एक भीड़ के लिए प्रत्येक मॉडल लागू करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल वृद्धिशील रूप से F1 स्कोर के संबंध में अधिकांश डोमेन में अध्ययन किए गए गैर-ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल को बेहतर बनाते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम पाते हैं कि डोमेन की पसंद ने संबंधित डेटा आकार या चुने गए मॉडल की परवाह किए बिना प्रदर्शन को काफी प्रभावित किया।', 'ga': 'Is tasc bunúsach Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP) é Aithint Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) agus tá sé fós ina réimse taighde gníomhach. Le blianta beaga anuas, rinne samhlacha claochladáin agus go háirithe an tsamhail BERT a forbraíodh ag Google réimse an NLP a réabhlóidiú. Cé go bhfuil staidéar déanta ar fheidhmíocht cur chuige atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán ar nós BERT le haghaidh NER, níl staidéar déanta go fóill don tasc mionghráinneach um Aithint Aonán Ainmnithe (FG-NER). Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid comparáid idir trí mhúnla atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán (BERT, RoBERTa, agus XLNet) le dhá mhúnla nach bhfuil bunaithe ar chlaochladán (CRF agus BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Ina theannta sin, cuirimid gach samhail i bhfeidhm ar an iliomad fearann ar leith. Faighimid amach go sáraíonn samhlacha atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán go hincriminteach na samhlacha nach bhfuil bunaithe ar chlaochladán a ndearnadh staidéar orthu i bhformhór na bhfearann maidir leis an scór F1. Ina theannta sin, feicimid go raibh tionchar suntasach ag rogha na bhfearann ar an bhfeidhmíocht beag beann ar mhéid na sonraí faoi seach nó ar an tsamhail a roghnaíodh.', 'ka': 'бғЎбғҗбғ®бғ”бғҡбғҳ бғҳбғңбғўбғ”бғ\xa0бғўбғҳбғўбғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғңбғҗбғӘбғңбғқбғ‘бғҗ (NER) бғҗбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎ бғӨбғЈбғңбғ“бғҗбғӣбғ”бғўбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғңбғҗбғҳбғ\xa0бғҗбғ“бғҳ бғ”бғңбғ”бғ\xa0бғ’бғҳбғҳбғЎ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғӘбғ”бғЎбғҳ (NLP) бғ\xa0бғҗбғқбғ“бғ”бғңбғқбғ‘бғҗ бғ“бғҗ бғ“бғҗбғ\xa0бғ©бғ”бғңбғҗ бғҗбғҘбғўбғҳбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғ’бғҗбғңбғҗбғӘбғңбғқбғ‘бғҗ. бғ‘бғқбғҡбғқ бғ¬бғҡбғҳбғЎ бғЁбғ”бғӣбғ“бғ”бғ’, бғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғңбғӨбғқбғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғ“бғҗ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғ’бғҗбғңбғЎбғҗбғҷбғЈбғ—бғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳбғҗ BERT бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғҳ, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣбғ”бғҡбғҳбғӘ Google бғ\xa0бғ”бғ’бғІбғҡбғЈбғӘбғҳбғҗбғӘбғҳбғҗбғЁбғҳ бғ’бғҗбғңбғ•бғҳбғ—бғҗбғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳбғҗ NLP-бғҳбғЎ бғһбғҗбғңбғ”бғҡбғҳ. бғ—бғЈбғӣбғӘбғҗ бғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғңбғӨбғқбғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғ\xa0бғ”бғЁбғ” бғӣбғҳбғҰбғ”бғ‘бғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғҗ, бғ\xa0бғқбғ’бғқбғ\xa0бғӘ BERT, NER-бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳбғҗ, бғЎбғ®бғ•бғҗ бғЈбғҷбғ•бғ” бғҗбғ\xa0бғЎбғ”бғ‘бғқбғ‘бғЎ бғЎбғ¬бғҗбғ•бғҡбғҳбғЎ бғЎбғҗбғ®бғ”бғҡбғҳ бғЎбғҗбғ®бғ”бғҡбғҳ бғҳбғңбғўбғ”бғ\xa0бғңбғ”бғўбғҳбғЎ бғӣбғҳбғҰбғ”бғ‘бғҗ (FG-NER) бғһбғҗбғ\xa0бғҗбғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎбғ—бғ•бғҳбғЎ. бғҗбғӣ бғ“бғқбғҷбғЈбғңбғЁбғҳ, бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғЎбғҗбғӣбғҳ бғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғңбғӨбғқбғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳ бғ“бғҗбғӣбғҗбғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғ—, бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғ§бғ•бғ”бғҡбғҗ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғңбғЎбғ®бғ•бғҗбғ•бғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳ бғ“бғҳбғқбғӣбғ”бғңбғ–бғ” бғ“бғҗбғ•бғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғ—. бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғҗбғҰбғӣбғқбғ©бғңбғ”бғ—, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣ бғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғңбғӨбғқбғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎ бғ‘бғҗбғ–бғ”бғЈбғҡбғҳ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғҳбғңбғўбғ”бғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғңбғўбғҗбғҡбғЈбғ\xa0бғҗбғ“ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғӣбғ”бғўбғҳ бғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғңбғӨбғқбғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҳбғЎ бғ“бғҗбғӣбғҗбғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғ—, бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғҗбғҰбғӣбғқбғ©бғңбғ”бғ—, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣ бғӣбғқбғңбғҳбғЁбғңбғЈбғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғҗ бғӣбғңбғҳбғЁбғ•бғңбғ”бғҡбғқбғ•бғҗбғңбғҳбғҗ бғӣбғқбғңбғҗбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғҗбғЎ, бғҗбғң бғӣбғқбғңбғҳбғЁбғңбғЈбғҡбғҳ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғҗбғЎ.', 'el': 'Η Αναγνώριση Οντότητας είναι ένα θεμελιώδες έργο επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας και έχει παραμείνει ενεργό ερευνητικό πεδίο. Τα τελευταία χρόνια, τα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών και ειδικότερα το μοντέλο BERT που αναπτύχθηκε στην Google έφερε επανάσταση στον τομέα της NLP. Ενώ η απόδοση προσεγγίσεων βασισμένων σε μετασχηματιστές, όπως το BERT έχει μελετηθεί για το NER, δεν έχει ακόμη πραγματοποιηθεί μελέτη για το λεπτόκοκκο έργο αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (FG-NER). Σε αυτή την εργασία, συγκρίνουμε τρία μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών (BERT, RoBERTa και XLNet) με δύο μοντέλα μη μετασχηματιστών (CRF και BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Επιπλέον, εφαρμόζουμε κάθε μοντέλο σε ένα πλήθος διαφορετικών τομέων. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται στον μετασχηματιστή ξεπερνούν σταδιακά τα μελετημένα μοντέλα που δεν βασίζονται στον μετασχηματιστή στους περισσότερους τομείς όσον αφορά την βαθμολογία F1. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η επιλογή των τομέων επηρέασε σημαντικά την απόδοση ανεξάρτητα από το αντίστοιχο μέγεθος δεδομένων ή το επιλεγμένο μοντέλο.', 'hu': 'Az elnevezett entitások felismerése (NER) alapvető feladat a természetes nyelv feldolgozása (NLP) és aktív kutatási terület maradt. Az utóbbi években a transzformátormodellek és konkrétan a Google által kifejlesztett BERT modell forradalmasították az NLP területét. Míg a transzformátor alapú megközelítések teljesítményét, mint például a BERT a NER esetében tanulmányozták, a finomszemcsés Nevezett Entity Recognition (FG-NER) feladatra még nem készült tanulmány. Ebben a tanulmányban három transzformátor alapú modellt (BERT, RoBERTa és XLNet) hasonlítunk össze két nem transzformátor alapú modellel (CRF és BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Továbbá minden modellt különböző területekre alkalmazunk. Úgy találjuk, hogy a transzformátor alapú modellek fokozatosan felülmúlják a vizsgált nem transzformátor alapú modelleket a legtöbb területen az F1 pontszám tekintetében. Továbbá úgy találjuk, hogy a domainek kiválasztása jelentősen befolyásolta a teljesítményt, függetlenül az adott adatmérettől vagy a kiválasztott modelltől.', 'lt': 'Pavadintojo subjekto pripažinimas (NER) yra pagrindinė gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotis ir išliko aktyvi mokslinių tyrimų sritis. Pastaraisiais metais transformatorių modeliai ir konkrečiau BERT modelis, sukurtas Google, revoliucijavo NLP sritį. Nors buvo tiriamas NER metodų, kaip antai BERT, veiksmingumas, dar nebuvo tiriamas finų grūdų pavadintų subjektų pripažinimo (FG-NER) uždavinys. Šiame dokumente palyginame tris transformatoriais pagrįstus modelius (BERT, RoBERTa ir XLNet) su dviem ne transformatoriais pagrįstais modeliais (CRF ir BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Be to, kiekvieną model į taikome daugeliui atskirų sričių. Matome, kad transformatoriais pagrįsti modeliai palaipsniui viršija daugumoje sričių tirtus ne transformatoriais pagrįstus modelius, palyginti su F1 balais. Be to, manome, kad atrinktos sritys turėjo didelės įtakos veiklos rezultatams, nepriklausomai nuo atitinkamo duomenų dydžio ar pasirinkto modelio.', 'it': "Il Named Entity Recognition (NER) è un compito fondamentale del Natural Language Processing (NLP) ed è rimasto un campo di ricerca attivo. Negli ultimi anni, i modelli di trasformatori e più specificamente il modello BERT sviluppato da Google hanno rivoluzionato il campo della PNL. Mentre le prestazioni di approcci basati su trasformatori come BERT sono state studiate per NER, non c'è ancora stato uno studio per il compito a grana fine Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER). In questo articolo confrontiamo tre modelli basati su trasformatori (BERT, RoBERTa e XLNet) a due modelli non basati su trasformatori (CRF e BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Inoltre, applichiamo ogni modello a una moltitudine di domini distinti. Troviamo che i modelli basati su trasformatori superano progressivamente i modelli studiati non basati su trasformatori nella maggior parte dei domini rispetto al punteggio F1. Inoltre, scopriamo che la scelta dei domini ha influenzato significativamente le prestazioni indipendentemente dalle rispettive dimensioni dei dati o dal modello scelto.", 'mk': 'Именото препознавање на ентитетите (NER) е фундаментална задача за процес на природен јазик (NLP) и остана активно истражувачко поле. In recent years, transformer models and more specifically the BERT model developed at Google revolutionised the field of NLP.  Иако изведувањето на пристапите базирани на трансформатори, како што е БЕРТ, е проучено за НЕР, сé уште не постои студија за задачата на фино признавање на именуваниот ентитет (FG-NER). Во овој весник споредуваме три модели базирани на трансформатори (БЕРТ, Роберта и XLNet) со два модели базирани на не трансформатори (CRF и BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Покрај тоа, го применуваме секој модел на многу различни домени. Најдовме дека моделите базирани на трансформатори постојано ги надминуваат проучените не-трансформаторски модели во повеќето домени во однос на оценката F1. Покрај тоа, откриваме дека изборот на домени значително влијаеше на резултатот без оглед на одредната големина на податоците или избраниот модел.', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) негізгі Түзіндік тіл процессоры (NLP) тапсырмасы және белсенді зерттеу өрісі қалды. Соңғы жылдар бойынша, өзгерту үлгілері және өзгертілген BERT үлгісі Google-де NLP өрісін революциялау үлгілерін жасады. BERT секілді түрлендірушілер негіздеген кезде, NER үшін зерттеулі болғанда, аталған нысандардың (FG-NER) тапсырмасының зерттеулері әлі жоқ. Бұл қағазда, біз үш түрлендіруші негіздеген моделдерді (BERT, RoBERTa және XLNet) екі түрлендіруші негіздеген моделдерге (CRF және BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) салыстырық. Қосымша, әрбір үлгі бірнеше түрлі доменге қолданамыз. Біз түрлендіруші негіздеген үлгілерді F1 нүктесіне қатынау үлгілердің көпшілігі үлгілеріне негіздеген түрлендіруші үлгілерінен артық болады. Сонымен қатар, домендерді таңдау үшін таңдалған деректер өлшеміне немесе таңдалған үлгісіне қарамастан әсер етеді.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) adalah tugas Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP) yang asas dan telah tetap medan penyelidikan aktif. Dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, model pengubah dan lebih spesifik model BERT yang dikembangkan di Google mengubah medan NLP. Sementara prestasi pendekatan berdasarkan pengubah seperti BERT telah dipelajari untuk NER, belum ada penelitian untuk tugas Pengenalan Entiti bernama (FG-NER) yang baik-baik. Dalam kertas ini, kita membandingkan tiga model berasaskan pengubah (BERT, RoBERTa, dan XLNet) dengan dua model bukan berasaskan pengubah (CRF dan BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Selain itu, kita gunakan setiap model untuk banyak domain yang berbeza. Kami mendapati bahawa model berasaskan pengubah secara bertambah melebihi model bukan berasaskan pengubah yang telah diteliti dalam kebanyakan domain dengan berkaitan dengan skor F1. Selain itu, kami mendapati bahawa pilihan domain mempengaruhi prestasi secara signifikan walaupun saiz data atau model yang dipilih.', 'mt': 'Ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) huwa kompitu fundamentali tal-Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLP) u baqa’ qasam ta’ riċerka attiv. F’dawn l-aħħar snin, mudelli ta’ trasformazzjoni u b’mod aktar speċifiku l-mudell BERT żviluppat f’Google irrivoluzzjonaw il-qasam tal-NLP. Filwaqt li l-prestazzjoni ta’ approċċi bbażati fuq it-trasformatur bħall-BERT ġiet studjata għal NER, għad ma kienx hemm studju għall-kompitu tar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija (FG-NER) b’għamla fina. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nqabblu tliet mudelli bbażati fuq it-trasformaturi (BERT, RoBERTa, u XLNet) ma’ żewġ mudelli mhux ibbażati fuq it-trasformaturi (CRF u BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Barra minn hekk, applikaw kull mudell għal ħafna oqsma distinti. Issibu li mudelli bbażati fuq it-trasformaturi inkrementalment jaqbżu l-mudelli mhux ibbażati fuq it-trasformaturi studjati fil-biċċa l-kbira tad-dominji fir-rigward tal-punteġġ F1. Barra minn hekk, isibu li l-għażla ta’ dominji influwenzat b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni irrispettivament mid-daqs tad-dejta rispettiv jew mill-mudell magħżul.', 'ml': 'പേര് എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് (NER) ഒരു അടിസ്ഥാനപരമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ (NLP) ജോലിയാണ്. പിന്നെ സജ്ജമായ ഒര അടുത്ത കൊല്ലങ്ങളില്\u200d, മാറ്റം മാറ്റുന്ന മോഡലുകളും, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഗൂഗിളിലെ പ്രവപ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രദേശത്തില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ട ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന് വേണ്ടി പഠിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നടപടികളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പോള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും നല്ല പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റി തിരി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d (ബെര്\u200dട്ടി, റോബെര്\u200dട്ട, എക്സ്\u200cഎല്\u200dനെറ്റ്) രണ്ട് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കാത്ത മ അതിനുശേഷം, ഓരോ മോഡലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഡൊമെയിനുകളിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പഠിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും അടിസ്ഥാനമായി മാറ്റുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d നാം കണ്ടെത അതിനുശേഷം, ഡോമെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് ഡേറ്റാ വലിപ്പം അല്ലെങ്കിലും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിനെയോ വേ', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazwanych podmiotów (NER) jest podstawowym zadaniem przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP) i pozostaje aktywną dziedziną badawczą. W ostatnich latach modele transformatorów, a dokładniej model BERT opracowany w Google, zrewolucjonizowały dziedzinę NLP. Chociaż działanie podejść opartych na transformatorach, takich jak BERT, zostało zbadane dla NER, nie przeprowadzono jeszcze badań dotyczących precyzyjnego zadania rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek (FG-NER). W artykule porównujemy trzy modele oparte na transformatorach (BERT, RoBERTa i XLNet) z dwoma modelami nieopartymi na transformatorach (CRF i BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Ponadto każdy model stosujemy do wielu różnych dziedzin. Stwierdzono, że modele oparte na transformatorach stopniowo przewyższają badane modele nieoparte na transformatorach w większości dziedzin w odniesieniu do wyniku F1. Ponadto stwierdzamy, że wybór domen znacząco wpłynął na wydajność niezależnie od odpowiedniej wielkości danych lub wybranego modelu.', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition (NER) бол үндсэн Байгалийн хэл Процессор (NLP) ажил ба актив судалгааны талбар үлдсэн. Сүүлийн жилийн дотор BERT загварын загварыг өөрчлөх загварууд нь Google-д NLP салбарын хувьсгал хийсэн. БЕРТ гэх мэт өөрчлөгчийн суурилсан ойлголтын үйл ажиллагааг НЕРТ-д судалсан ч, нэрлэгдсэн НЕРТ-ын (FG-NER) ажиллагааны тухай судалгаа хэзээ ч байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид гурван шилжүүлэгч суурилсан загварыг (BERT, RoBERTa, XLNet) хоёр шилжүүлэгч суурилагүй загвартай харьцуулдаг. Дараа нь бид загвар бүр олон ялгаатай хэсэгт хэрэглэдэг. Бид шилжүүлэгч суурилсан загварууд F1 оноо дээр хамааралтай ихэнх хэсэгт судалгаагүй шилжүүлэгч суурилсан загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Мөн бид салбарын сонголт нь өгөгдлийн хэмжээ эсвэл сонгогдсон загварын хэмжээсүүдийг хамаарахгүй үр дүнтэй нөлөөлдөг.', 'no': 'Namnet Entity Recognition (NER) er ein grunnleggjande naturspråk- prosessering (NLP) oppgåve og har blitt eit aktivt forskningsfelt. I løpet av siste år, transformeringsmodeller og meir spesifikke BERT-modellen utvikla ved Google-revolusjon av NLP-feltet. Mens utviklinga av transformeringsbaserte tilnærmingar som BERT er studiert for NER, har det enno ikkje vært eit studie for oppgåva med namnet entitetskjenning (FG-NER). I denne papiret samanliknar vi tre transformeringsbaserte modeller (BERT, RoBERTa og XLNet) til to ikkje-transformeringsbaserte modeller (CRF og BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). I tillegg bruker vi kvar modell på mange ulike domene. Vi finn at transformeringsbaserte modeller aukande utfører studierte ikkje- transformeringsbaserte modeller i dei fleste domene med respekt til F1- poeng. I tillegg finn vi at valet av domene signifikerte påvirka utviklinga uavhengig av den tilhøyrande datastorleiken eller modellen som er valde.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea entității denumite (NER) este o sarcină fundamentală de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL) și a rămas un domeniu de cercetare activ. În ultimii ani, modelele de transformatoare și mai exact modelul BERT dezvoltat la Google au revoluționat domeniul PNL. În timp ce performanța abordărilor bazate pe transformatori, cum ar fi BERT, a fost studiată pentru NER, nu a existat încă un studiu pentru sarcina de recunoaștere a entităților numite cu granule fine (FG-NER). În această lucrare, comparăm trei modele bazate pe transformator (BERT, RoBERTa și XLNet) cu două modele non-transformator (CRF și BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). În plus, aplicăm fiecare model unei multitudini de domenii distincte. Considerăm că modelele bazate pe transformator depășesc progresiv modelele non-transformator studiate în majoritatea domeniilor în ceea ce privește scorul F1. Mai mult decât atât, constatăm că alegerea domeniilor a influențat semnificativ performanța indiferent de dimensiunea datelor respective sau de modelul ales.', 'sr': 'Nazvane priznanje entiteta (NER) je osnovni zadatak procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP) i ostalo je aktivno istraživanje polje. Za poslednje godine, modeli transformacije i posebnije model BERT razvijen na Google revoluciji polja NLP-a. Iako je provedba pristupa na transformaciji kao što je BERT ispitivana za NER, još nije bilo ispitivanja zadatka o priznanju finog zrnca imenovanog entiteta (FG-NER). U ovom papiru uspoređujemo tri modela na transformaciji (BERT, RoBERTa i XLNet) sa dva modela na osnovu transformacije (CRF i BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Osim toga, primjenjujemo svaki model na mnoge različite domene. Nalazimo da modeli na transformaciji uvećavaju proučavane modele na osnovu ne transformacije u većini domena u odnosu na rezultat F1. Osim toga, smatramo da je izbor domena značajno uticao na izvodnju bez obzira na veličinu odgovarajućih podataka ili izabran model.', 'so': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is a fundamental Natural Language Processing (NLP) task and has remained an active research field.  Sannadihii ugu dambeeyey, qaababka bedelka iyo tusaalaha BERT oo gaar ah oo uu Google revolusyo ka soo baxay berrinkii NLP. While the performance of transformer-based approaches such as BERT has been studied for NER, there has not yet been a study for the fine-grained Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER) task.  Qoraalkan waxaynu isbarbardhignaa sadex noocyo ah bedelka (BERT, RoBERTA, iyo XLNet) oo laba noocyo ah oo aan bedbedeleyn (CRF iyo BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Intaas waxaa dheer, tusaale kasta waxaan u isticmaalnaa meelo kala duduwan. Waxaynu helnaa qaababka bedelka ee lagu bedeli karo si koronta ah noocyada lagu bedelay oo aan bedelka looga dhigin meelaha badan ee dowlada ku yaala iskuulka F1. Furthermore, waxaynu helnaa in doorashooyinka deegaanka aad u saameyn ku lahayd sameynta, habase ahaatee tirada macluumaadka ama modelka la doortay.', 'sv': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) är en grundläggande uppgift för Natural Language Processing (NLP) och har fortsatt att vara ett aktivt forskningsområde. Under de senaste åren revolutionerade transformatormodellerna och mer specifikt BERT-modellen som utvecklats hos Google området för NLP. Medan prestandan hos transformatorbaserade metoder som BERT har studerats för NER, har det ännu inte gjorts någon studie för den finkorniga Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER) uppgiften. I denna uppsats jämför vi tre transformatorbaserade modeller (BERT, RoBERTa och XLNet) med två icke-transformatorbaserade modeller (CRF och BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Dessutom tillämpar vi varje modell på en mängd olika domäner. Vi finner att transformatorbaserade modeller stegvis överträffar de studerade icke-transformatorbaserade modellerna i de flesta domäner med avseende på F1-poängen. Dessutom konstaterar vi att valet av domäner påverkade prestandan avsevärt oavsett respektive datastorlek eller vald modell.', 'si': 'Name අන්තිම අවුරුද්දු වලින්, පරිවර්තනය කරුණු මොඩේල් සහ විශේෂයෙන් BERT මොඩේල් ගුගුල් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය BERT විදියට පරිවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරිවර්තනය කරනවා වගේම, NER විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, තවමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ න මේ පැත්තට, අපි පරිවර්තනය කරන්න තුනක් අධාරිත මොඩල් තුනක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා (BERT, RoBERTa, සහ XLNet) නොපරිවර්තනය කරන්න බැරි මොඩල් දෙකට (CRF සහ Bi තවත්, අපි හැම ප්\u200dරමාණයක්ම විශේෂ දේමින් ගොඩක් ලබාගන්නවා. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dය තවත්, අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඩොමේන් තෝරාගන්න විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ගෞරවයේ දත්ත ප්\u200d', 'ta': 'பெயரிடப்பட்ட விருப்பங்கள் அறிதல் (NER) ஒரு அடிப்படையான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு (NLP) பணி In recent years, transformer models and more specifically the BERT model developed at Google revolutionised the field of NLP.  பிரெட் போன்ற மாற்றம் அடிப்படையான முறைமுறைகளின் செயல்பாடு NER க்கு படிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பிரித்த பெயர் பெயர் செயல் அறிவிப்பு (FG- NER) செயலுக்கு  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மூன்று மாற்றம் அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் (BERT, RoBERTA, and XLNet) இரண்டு மாற்றம் மாற்றாத மாதிரிகளுக்கு (CRF மற்றும மேலும், நாம் ஒவ்வொரு மாதிரியையும் பல வித்தியாசமான களங்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். மாற்றம் அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகள் F1 புள்ளியை பற்றி படிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை பெரும்பாலான களங்களில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது. மேலும், நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் களஞ்சியின் தேர்வு முக்கியமாக இந்த செயல்பாட்டை பாதிக்கும் என்பது தெரியும', 'ur': 'نام رکھا ہوا انٹیٹی پتچانی (NER) ایک بنیادی طبیعی زبان پرسس (NLP) کا کام ہے اور ایک فعال تحقیق فیلڈ رہا ہے۔ اگلے سالوں میں، تبدیل کرنے والے موڈل اور زیادہ مخصوصاً BERT موڈل نے گگل کے لئے NLP کے کھیتی کو تبدیل کیا۔ جبکہ تبدیل کرنے والے بنیادی تقریبیں جیسے BERT NER کے لئے پڑھی گئی ہیں، فعلا بھی نیک دانے کے نام کی Entity Recognition (FG-NER) کے کام کے لئے تحقیق نہیں کی گئی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم تین تغییر دینے والی موڈل (BERT, RoBERTa اور XLNet) کو دو غیر تغییر دینے والی موڈل (CRF اور BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) سے مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ اور ہم ہر مدل کو بہت سی مختلف دامنوں پر لازم کرتے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ تغییر پھیلانے والی موڈل اضافہ سے زیادہ غیر تغییر پھیلانے والی موڈل کو اضافہ کر رہے ہیں بہت سی ڈومین میں جو F1 اسکور کے بارے میں ہے۔ اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ڈومین کے انتخاب کی عملکرد کو اثر سے اثر دیتی ہے اگرچہ اثر کے اندازے یا انتخاب کئے ہوئے مدل کے اندازے بھی اثر دیتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda yillarda o'zgartirish modellari va hozir Google revolussiyasidagi BERT modeli NLP maydonida yaratilgan. Comment Bu qogʻozda biz uchta transformer asosida (BERT, RoBERTA, XLNet va XLNet) bilan ikkita transformer asosiy modellarga (CRF va BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) bilan kamaytamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz har bir modelni boshqa bir necha dometlarga qo'llamiz. Biz o'rganamiz, o'zgarishlar asosiy modellari F1 scorning ko'pchiligini o'rganishni o'zgartirish asosiy modellarini o'zgartiradi. Koʻrsatgich, biz domenning tanlash natijasini taqdim maʼlumot oʻlchamini yoki tanlangan modelni ko'rsatishga murakkab influensa beradi.", 'vi': 'Tênd Entity recognition (NER) is a fountain Natural nhốt nhốt nhốt nhốt nhốt nhốt nhốt Ngôn ngữ treatment (NLP) và has remain a active research field. Những năm gần đây, các mô hình máy biến hình và đặc biệt là mô hình BERT được phát triển tại Google cách mạng trong lĩnh vực N LP. Mặc dù khả năng ứng dụng của các phương pháp chuyển hóa như BERT đã được nghiên cứu cho NER, nhưng chưa hề có một nghiên cứu về công việc được đặt tên bé nhỏ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi so sánh ba mô hình dựa vào máy biến hình (BERT, ROBERTa, và Xylonet) với hai mẫu không-chuyển hóa (CRF và BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Chúng tôi cũng áp dụng mỗi mô hình cho hàng loạt miền khác nhau. Chúng tôi tìm thấy các mô- đun chuyển hóa chỉ thực hiện các mô- đun không-chuyển hoá được nghiên cứu trên hầu hết miền đối với điểm F1. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi thấy sự lựa chọn của mỗi miền ảnh hưởng đáng kể đến hiệu quả, bất kể kích thước dữ liệu hay mô hình đã chọn.', 'bg': 'Разпознаването на наименованите субекти (НЕР) е основна задача за обработка на естествения език (НЛП) и остава активна научноизследователска област. През последните години моделите на трансформатори и по-конкретно моделът разработен в Гугъл революционизираха областта на НЛО. Въпреки че изпълнението на трансформаторни подходи като BERT е проучено за NER, все още не е направено проучване за задачата за фино разпознаване на наименовани субекти (FG-NER). В тази статия сравняваме три модела на базата на трансформатори (BERT, RoBERTa и XLNet) с два модела на базата на трансформатори (CRF и BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Освен това, ние прилагаме всеки модел към множество различни области. Установяваме, че трансформаторните модели постепенно превъзхождат изследваните нетрансформаторни модели в повечето области по отношение на резултата. Освен това откриваме, че изборът на домейни значително повлиява на производителността независимо от съответния размер на данните или избрания модел.', 'nl': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is een fundamentele taak van Natural Language Processing (NLP) en is een actief onderzoeksveld gebleven. De afgelopen jaren hebben transformatormodellen en meer bepaald het bij Google ontwikkelde BERT-model een revolutie teweeggebracht op het gebied van NLP. Hoewel de prestaties van transformatorgebaseerde benaderingen zoals BERT voor NER zijn bestudeerd, is er nog geen studie voor de fijngranige Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER) taak. In dit artikel vergelijken we drie transformatorgebaseerde modellen (BERT, RoBERTa en XLNet) met twee niet-transformatorgebaseerde modellen (CRF en BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Bovendien passen we elk model toe op een veelheid van verschillende domeinen. We vinden dat transformatorgebaseerde modellen incrementele overtreffen de bestudeerde niet-transformatorgebaseerde modellen in de meeste domeinen met betrekking tot de F1 score. Bovendien vinden we dat de keuze van domeinen de prestaties aanzienlijk beïnvloedde, ongeacht de respectieve datagrootte of het gekozen model.', 'da': 'Navngivet Entity Recognition (NER) er en grundlæggende Natural Language Processing (NLP) opgave og er fortsat et aktivt forskningsfelt. I de seneste år revolutionerede transformermodellerne og mere specifikt BERT-modellen, der blev udviklet hos Google, inden for NLP. Selvom ydeevnen af transformer-baserede tilgange som BERT er blevet undersøgt for NER, er der endnu ikke foretaget en undersøgelse for den finkornede Navngivne Entity Recognition (FG-NER) opgave. I denne artikel sammenligner vi tre transformer-baserede modeller (BERT, RoBERTa og XLNet) med to ikke-transformer-baserede modeller (CRF og BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Desuden anvender vi hver model på en lang række forskellige domæner. Vi finder, at transformer-baserede modeller gradvist overgår de undersøgte ikke-transformer-baserede modeller på de fleste domæner med hensyn til F1 scoren. Desuden konstaterer vi, at valget af domæner betydeligt påvirkede ydeevnen uanset den respektive datastørrelse eller den valgte model.', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje područja (NER) je temeljni zadatak prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) i ostalo je aktivno istraživanje polje. U posljednjih godina, modeli transformacije i specijalnije model BERT razvijen na Google revoluciji polja NLP-a. Iako je provedba pristupa na transformaciji kao što je BERT ispitivana za NER, još nije bilo ispitivanja zadatka o prepoznavanju lijepog zrnca imenovanog entiteta (FG-NER). U ovom papiru uspoređujemo tri modela na transformaciji (BERT, RoBERTa i XLNet) sa dva modela na osnovu transformacije (CRF i BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Osim toga, primjenjujemo svaki model na mnoge različite domene. Nalazimo da modeli na transformaciji povećavaju proučavane modele na osnovu ne transformacije u većini domena u pogledu rezultata F1. Nadalje, smatramo da je izbor domena značajno utjecao na učinku bez obzira na veličinu odgovarajućih podataka ili model odabranog.', 'de': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) ist eine grundlegende Aufgabe der Natural Language Processing (NLP) und ist nach wie vor ein aktives Forschungsfeld. In den letzten Jahren haben Transformatormodelle und insbesondere das bei Google entwickelte BERT-Modell den Bereich NLP revolutioniert. Während die Leistungsfähigkeit transformatorbasierter Ansätze wie BERT für NER untersucht wurde, gibt es noch keine Studie für die feingranulare Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER)-Aufgabe. In diesem Beitrag vergleichen wir drei transformatorbasierte Modelle (BERT, RoBERTa und XLNet) mit zwei nicht transformatorbasierten Modellen (CRF und BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Darüber hinaus wenden wir jedes Modell auf eine Vielzahl von unterschiedlichen Domänen an. Wir stellen fest, dass transformatorbasierte Modelle die untersuchten nicht transformatorbasierten Modelle in den meisten Bereichen in Bezug auf den F1-Score inkrementell übertreffen. Darüber hinaus stellen wir fest, dass die Wahl der Domänen die Performance unabhängig von der jeweiligen Datengröße oder dem gewählten Modell maßgeblich beeinflusst hat.', 'ko': '명명실체식별(NER)은 자연언어처리(NLP)의 기본적인 임무로 활발한 연구 분야였다.최근 몇 년 동안 트랜스퍼 모델, 특히 구글이 개발한 버트 모델은 NLP 분야를 철저히 변화시켰다.변환기에 기반한 방법(예를 들어 BERT)의 성능은 이미 NER에 대해 연구를 진행했지만 세립도명명실체식별(FG-NER) 임무에 대해 연구를 진행하지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 세 가지 변압기 기반 모델(버트, 로버타와 XLNet)과 두 가지 비변압기 기반 모델(CRF와 BilSTM-CNN-CRF)을 비교했다.그 밖에 우리는 모든 모델을 다양한 분야에 응용할 것이다.우리는 대부분의 분야에서 변압기 기반 모델이 F1점수에서 비변압기 기반 모델보다 점점 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.또한 데이터 크기나 선택한 모델에 상관없이 영역의 선택이 성능에 현저한 영향을 미칠 수 있음을 발견했다.', 'id': 'Pengenalan Entitas bernama (NER) adalah tugas dasar Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP) dan telah tetap bidang penelitian aktif. In recent years, transformer models and more specifically the BERT model developed at Google revolutionised the field of NLP.  Sementara pertunjukan pendekatan berdasarkan transformator seperti BERT telah dipelajari untuk NER, belum ada penelitian untuk tugas Pengenalan Entitas bernama (FG-NER). Dalam kertas ini, kami membandingkan tiga model berdasarkan transformer (BERT, RoBERTa, dan XLNet) dengan dua model bukan berdasarkan transformer (CRF dan BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Selain itu, kami menerapkan setiap model untuk banyak domain yang berbeda. Kami menemukan bahwa model berdasarkan transformer secara bertambah besar melampaui model tidak berdasarkan transformer yang dipelajari di kebanyakan domain dengan berkaitan dengan skor F1. Selain itu, kami menemukan bahwa pilihan domain mempengaruhi prestasi secara signifikan tidak peduli ukuran data atau model yang dipilih.', 'fa': 'شناسایی واحد نامیده شده (NER) یک وظیفه پایه\u200cای از پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) است و یک منطقه تحقیقات فعال باقی مانده است. در سال های اخیر، مدل تغییر دهنده و دقیقاً مدل BERT در گوگل توسعه کرد، زمینه NLP را تغییر داد. در حالی که عملکرد روش\u200cهای متغیر\u200cکننده\u200cای مانند BERT برای NER تحقیق شده است، هنوز تحقیق برای کار شناسایی عنوان\u200cهای نیکو (FG-NER) وجود نداشته است. در این کاغذ، ما سه مدل تغییر دهنده (BERT, RoBERTa و XLNet) را با دو مدل غیر تغییر دهنده (CRF و BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. علاوه بر این، ما هر مدل را برای بسیاری از دامنهای مختلف استفاده می کنیم. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که مدل\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر بر اساس تغییر\u200cپذیر بیشتر مدل\u200cهای غیر تغییر\u200cپذیر مطالعه\u200cشده در بیشترین دامنه\u200cها با احترام امتیاز F1 بیشتری بیشتری بیشتری بیشتری از علاوه بر این، ما فهمیدیم که انتخاب دامنه\u200cها به طور کلی تأثیر اجرایی را بر اثر اندازه داده\u200cهای محترم یا مدل انتخاب می\u200cکند.', 'af': "Genaamde Entiteit Herkenning (NER) is 'n fundamentele Natuurlike Taal Verwerking (NLP) taak en het 'n aktiewe verkenning veld bly. In onlangse jaar het transformer modele en meer spesifieke die BERT model ontwikkeld by Google revolutioneer die veld van NLP. Terwyl die prestasie van transformer-gebaseerde toegang soos BERT is vir NER onderwyser, het daar nog nie 'n studie gewees vir die fyn-graad genoemde Entity Recognition (FG-NER) taak nie. In hierdie papier vergelyk ons drie transformer-gebaseerde modele (BERT, RoBERTa en XLNet) na twee nie-transformer-gebaseerde modele (CRF en BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Ons toewend elke model aan 'n menigte verskillende domeine. Ons vind dat transformer-gebaseerde modele inkrementeer uitvoer die studieerde nie-transformer-gebaseerde modele in meeste domeine met respek na die F1 telling. Ons vind ook dat die keuse van domeine betekenlik die prestasie aanvloek, ongeag van die respektiewe data grootte of die gekose model.", 'tr': "Adlanan Maksad Tanamak (NER) dogal Dil işlemesi (NLP) täblisidir we janlaşdyrma sahady bolupdyr. Soňky ýyllar içinde, BERT nusgasyny üýtgetmek nusgasynda Google'da NLP sahypasyny üýtgedi. BERT ýaly transformer taýýarlanan ýarymlary, NER üçin öwrenmegi ýaly, Adly Entity Recognition (FG-NER) zady üçin heniz bir arzuw bolmady. Bu kagyzda üç täsirli terjime eden nusgalary (BERT, RoBERTa we XLNet) 2 täsirli döwletlere (CRF we BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) karşılaýarys. Mundan başga, her nusga birnäçe üýtgeşik sahypa uygulaýarys. Birnäçe sahypalarda transformer daýanýan nusgalary F1 jümesi bilen deň üýtgetmeli nusgalary ukypdyr. Mundan soňra, sahypalaryň saýlamagyny saýlamak sahypalaryň gaýd edilen maglumatyň ululykyna ýöne täsir etmäne täsirleýär.", 'sq': 'Njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) është një detyrë themelore e procesit të gjuhës natyrore (NLP) dhe ka mbetur një fushë aktive kërkimi. Në vitet e fundit, modelet e transformuesve dhe më specifikisht modeli BERT zhvilluar në Google revolucionoi fushën e NLP. Ndërsa performanca e metodave bazuar në transformues të tilla si BERT është studiuar për NER, nuk ka patur ende një studim për detyrën e njohjes së njësisë me emër të hollë (FG-NER). Në këtë letër, krahasojmë tre modele me bazë transformuese (BERT, RoBERTa dhe XLNet) me dy modele pa bazë transformuese (CRF dhe BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Përveç kësaj, ne aplikojmë çdo model në një shumicë domenesh të ndryshme. We find that transformer-based models incrementally outperform the studied non-transformer-based models in most domains with respect to the F1 score.  Përveç kësaj, gjejmë se zgjedhja e domeneve ndikoi ndjeshëm në performancën pavarësisht nga madhësia respektive e të dhënave apo modeli i zgjedhur.', 'sw': 'Tambulisho la Ujumbe (NER) ni kazi ya msingi ya mchakato wa lugha ya asili (NLP) na imebaki kuwa mtafiti wenye kazi. Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, miundo mbinu ya mabadiliko na hususani model ya BERT iliyotengenezwa kwenye mapinduzi ya Google ilitengeneza uwanja wa NLP. Wakati utendaji wa mbinu za mabadiliko kama vile BERT imesomwa kwa ajili ya NER, bado haujakuwa na utafiti wa kazi hiyo inayofahamika kwa jina zuri (FG-NER). Katika karatasi hii, tunalinganisha mifano mitatu yenye mabadiliko (BERT, RoBERTa, na XLNet) na mifano miwili isiyo na mabadiliko (CRF na BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Furthermore, we apply each model to a multitude of distinct domains.  Tunaona kwamba mifano ya mabadiliko yanayotokana na mabadiliko yanayotokana na mifano ya mabadiliko yasiyo na mabadiliko katika maeneo mengi ya kuheshimu score ya F1. Zaidi ya hayo, tunagundua kuwa uchaguzi wa ndani umeathiri ufanisi huo bila kujali ukubwa wa takwimu au modeli iliyochaguliwa.', 'am': 'የተባለው የውይይት ግንኙነት ማውቀት (NER) የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም (NLP) ስራ ነው እና የተለመደ ምርመራ መሬት ነው፡፡ በቅርብ ዓመታት፣ ለውጥ model እና በተለየ በጎግል የንጉል revolutionን የNLP እርሻ ላይ የተደገመ BERT ሞዴል ነው፡፡ የBERT ሥርዓት እንደገና ለNER ተማርቷል የሚደረገውን የለውጥ ሥርዓት በመስመር፣ ለአፍሪካዊ ስርዓት (FG-NER) ስራ የተመሳሳይ ተማሪ ገና አልተገኘም፡፡ በዚህ ካላት ሦስት የለውጥ ዓይነቶች (BERT, RoBERTA እና XLNet) ወደ ሁለት ባይለወጥ ዓይነቶች (CRF እና ቢLSTM-CNN-CRF) እናሳያታለን፡፡ ደግሞም ሁሉን ምሳሌ በተለየ ሀገሮች ላይ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የፎርማት ምሳሌዎች በአፍሪካ ነጥቦች ውስጥ በብዙዎቹ አካባቢዎች ያሉትን ተማሪዎችንና የtransform-based ዓይነቶችን በአፍሪካ ነጥብ ላይ ሲያሳድጉ እናገኛለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የዳታ መጠን ወይም የተመረጠው ሞዴል ቢሆን የኖሞች ምርጫው በአካባቢ ማድረግ እንዲያስጨንቋል እናገኛለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Նման անձնական հասարակության ճանաչելը (ՆԵՌ) ֆունդամենտալ բնական լեզվի մշակույթ է և մնացել է ակտիվ հետազոտության ոլորտ: Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում վերափոխվող մոդելները և ավելի հատկապես BER մոդելը, որը զարգացել է Google-ում, վերափոխվեցին ՆԼՊ-ի ոլորտում: Մինչդեռ վերափոխողներով հիմնված մոտեցումների, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը, գործողությունները ուսումնասիրել են ՆԵՌ-ի համար, դեռևս ուսումնասիրություն չկա նրբագեղ անվանումների ճանաչելու (FG-ՆԵR) խնդրի համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք համեմատում ենք երեք վերափոխողների հիմնված մոդելներ (BER, ROBERta և XLNet) և երկու ոչ վերափոխողների հիմնված մոդելներ (ԿՌՖ և ԲիLSԹՄ-CNN-ԿՌՖ): Ավելին, մենք կիրառում ենք յուրաքանչյուր մոդել բազմաթիվ տարբեր բնագավառների համար: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ձևափոխիչների հիմնված մոդելները միանգամայն գերազանցում են ուսումնասիրված ոչ ձևափոխիչների հիմնված մոդելներին F1-ի հարաբերության մեծ մասում: Ավելին, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ բնագավառների ընտրությունը նշանակալի ազդեցություն ունեցավ արդյունքում անկախ տվյալների չափից կամ ընտրված մոդելից:', 'az': "Adlandırılmış Entity Recognition (NER) fundamental təbiətli Dil İşlemi (NLP) işidir və aktif bir araştırma sahəsi qaldı. Son illərdə, transformer modelləri və daha müəyyən olaraq BERT modeli Google'da NLP sahəsini dəyişdirdi. BERT NER üçün oxunduğu kimi transformer tabanlı tərzlərinin performansı olmasına rağmen, Adlı Entity Recognition (FG-NER) işi üçün daha heç bir tərzin yoxdur. Bu kağızda üç transformer tabanlı modelləri (BERT, RoBERTa və XLNet) ilə iki transformer tabanlı modelləri (CRF və BiLSTM-CNN-CRF) ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Daha sonra, hər modeli bir çox müxtəlif domena uydururuq. Biz transformer-tabanlı modelləri F1 nöqtəsinə layiq olan çoxluğu domeinlərdə təhsil edilməmiş transformer-tabanlı modellərdən daha çox üstün olduğunu görürük. Daha sonra, domenaların seçimləri seçimləri seçilmiş məlumatların böyüklüyünün və ya seçilmiş modellərin başına gəlməsinə baxmayaraq təsirlərini çox etmişdir.", 'bn': 'নাম এন্টিটি স্বীকার (NER) একটি মৌলিক স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া (NLP) কাজ এবং একটি সক্রিয় গবেষণা ক্ষেত্রে থাকে। সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে গুগল বিপ্লবের ক্ষেত্রে পরিবর্তন মডেল এবং বিআরটি মডেল উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে। While the performance of transformer-based approaches such as BERT has been studied for NER, there has not yet been a study for the fine-grained Named Entity Recognition (FG-NER) task.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা তিনটি পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক মডেলের তুলনা করি (বিবের্ট, রোবের্তা এবং এক্সএলেন্ট) দুটি বিন্যাস-ভিত্তিক মডেল (CRF এবং বিএলস্টিম-CNN- এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রত্যেক মডেল বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ডোমেনে প্রয়োগ করি। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক মডেল এফ১ স্কোরের প্রতি সম্পর্কে গবেষণা করা যাচ্ছে না পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক মডেলের বেশী তাছাড়াও, আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ডোমেনের বেছে নেওয়ার বিষয়টিকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রভাবিত করেছে, যে তথ্যের আকার বা মডেল', 'ca': "El reconeixement d'entitats (NER) és una tasca fonamental de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP) i ha sigut un camp de recerca activ. En els últims anys, els models transformadors i, més específicament, el BERT desenvolupat a Google va revolucionar el camp de NLP. Mentre el rendiment d'enfocaments basats en transformadors com BERT ha estat estudiat per a NER, encara no ha estat un estudi per a la tasca de reconeixement d'entitats anomenades fins grains (FG-NER). En aquest article comparem tres models basats en transformadors (BERT, RoBERTa i XLNet) amb dos models no basats en transformadors (CRF i BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). A més, aplicam cada model a una multitud de dominis distints. Trobem que els models basats en transformadors superen gradualment els models no basats en transformadors estudiats en la majoria de dominis en relació amb la puntuació F1. A més, trobem que l'elecció de dominis va influir significativament en el rendiment independentment de la mida de les dades respectives o del model escollit.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER) je základním úkolem zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) a zůstává aktivním výzkumným oborem. V posledních letech transformátorové modely a konkrétně BERT model vyvinutý ve společnosti Google revoluci v oblasti NLP. Zatímco výkonnost transformátorových přístupů, jako je BERT, byla studována pro NER, dosud neexistuje studie pro jemné rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (FG-NER). V tomto článku porovnáváme tři modely na bázi transformátorů (BERT, RoBERTa a XLNet) se dvěma modely na bázi transformátorů (CRF a BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Dále aplikujeme každý model na mnoho různých domén. Zjišťujeme, že modely založené na transformátorech postupně převyšují studované modely založené na transformátorech ve většině oblastí s ohledem na skóre F1. Dále zjišťujeme, že volba domén významně ovlivnila výkon bez ohledu na příslušnou velikost dat nebo zvolený model.', 'et': "Nimetatud üksuste tunnustamine (NER) on loodusliku keele töötlemise (NLP) põhiülesanne ja on jäänud aktiivseks uurimisvaldkonnaks. Viimastel aastatel muutsid Google'is välja töötatud trafomootorid ja täpsemalt BERT mudel NLP valdkonnas revolutsiooniliseks. Kuigi transformaatoril põhinevate lähenemisviiside, nagu BERT, jõudlust on uuritud NER-i puhul, ei ole veel uuringut peeneteraalse nimelise üksuse tunnustamise (FG-NER) ülesande kohta tehtud. Käesolevas töös võrdleme kolme trafopõhist mudelit (BERT, RoBERTa ja XLNet) kahe mittetrafopõhise mudeliga (CRF ja BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Lisaks rakendame iga mudeli paljudele erinevatele valdkondadele. Leiame, et trafopõhised mudelid on enamikus valdkondades F1 skoori osas järk-järgult suuremad kui uuritud mittetrafopõhised mudelid. Lisaks leiame, et valdkondade valik mõjutas oluliselt tulemuslikkust olenemata vastavast andmesuurusest või valitud mudelist.", 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje područja (NER) je osnovni zadatak procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP) i ostalo je aktivno istraživanje polje. Za poslednje godine, modeli transformacije i posebnije model BERT razvijen na Google revoluciji polja NLP-a. Iako je provedba pristupa na transformaciji kao što je BERT ispitivana za NER, još nije bilo ispitivanja za zadatak priznavanja fino zrno imenovanog entiteta (FG-NER). U ovom papiru uspoređujemo tri modela na transformaciji (BERT, RoBERTa i XLNet) sa dva modela na osnovu transformacije (CRF i BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Osim toga, primjenjujemo svaki model na mnoge različite domene. Nalazimo da modeli na transformaciji uvećavaju proučavane modele na osnovu ne transformacije u većini domena u pogledu rezultata F1. Nadalje, smatramo da je izbor domena značajno utjecao na učinku bez obzira na veličinu odgovarajućih podataka ili izabran model.', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistus (NER) on olennainen luonnollinen kielen prosessointitehtävä ja on pysynyt aktiivisena tutkimusalana. Viime vuosina muuntajamallit ja erityisesti Googlen kehittämä BERT-malli mullistivat NLP:n alan. Vaikka muuntajapohjaisten lähestymistapojen, kuten BERT:n, suorituskykyä on tutkittu NER:n osalta, ei ole vielä tutkittu hienorakeisen Nimetyn Entiteetin Reconhecimento (FG-NER) -tehtävään. Tässä työssä vertaamme kolmea muuntajapohjaista mallia (BERT, RoBERTa ja XLNet) kahteen muuntajapohjaiseen malliin (CRF ja BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Lisäksi sovellamme jokaista mallia useilla eri aloilla. Havaitsemme, että muuntajapohjaiset mallit suoriutuvat vähitellen tutkituista ei-muuntajapohjaisista malleista useimmilla toimialoilla F1-pisteen suhteen. Lisäksi havaitsimme, että toimialueiden valinta vaikutti merkittävästi suorituskykyyn tietokoosta tai valitusta mallista riippumatta.', 'jv': 'Nompok EntityAccepted (NeR) iku task singular sistem pribadi Pasing (NLP) Dino ngono cah-cah dumadhi, model sing transformer sampek karo model BERT dumadhi neng Google révolusi kapan NLP. Nomo uwis saiki dadi kapan nganggep transformer, kaya BERT dumadhi kapan DER, ora ono dumadhi kapan winih kanggo nggawe basa sing dibenakno Named Entty Learning (FG-NeR). Nanging papat iki, kita nambah telu transformer-basa model (BERT, RBERT, lan XLnet) karo model sing gak transformer-basa (CIF lan BiLTT-MT-CIF). Label Awak dhéwé luwih nêmên ngerasai model sing basa transformer dadi ngono nggawe barang basa nêmên, dadi nêmên kuwi model sing bisa nêmên transformer Nanging tambah, kita mbukak punika dipileksi winih sing gak bener nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasai nggawe barang dadi iki dadi sing apik dhéwé, ora bisa model sing apik gedhéwé.', 'ha': "Ana sunan Entity Recognition (NER) is a essencin aikin Natural Sura (NLP) and has lasted an active field of research. A cikin shekara na farko, za'a shige misãlai da ke ƙayyade misalin BERT wanda aka buɗe shi a Google revolutioned field of NLP. A lokacin da aka karanta hanyoyin transformation-based hanyoyin kamar BERT wa NER, ba a riga ba wata fitina wa aikin nan da aka rufe sunan Entity Recognition (FG-NER). Ga wannan takardan, muna samfanar da misãlai uku masu shige (BERT, RoBERTa, da XLNet) zuwa misãlai biyu waɗanda ba'a shige (CRF da BiLStM-CNN-CRF). Furthermore, we apply each model to a multitude of distinct domains.  Tuna gane cewa misalin transformer da aka ƙayyade shi ana ƙara kowace da aka karanta misãlai da ba-transformer ba a cikin masu yawa a cikin wurãre masu hushi ga scori F1. Furan haka, munã gane cewa zaɓen dukkan damu sun yi amfani da shi mai girma ko kuma ba da girmar data ko motel wanda aka zãɓe shi ba.", 'he': 'זיהוי איכות בשם NER (באנגלית: Entity Recognition - NER) הוא משימה בסיסית של תהליך שפת טבעית (NLP) והייתה תחום מחקר פעיל. בשנים האחרונות, מודלים משתנים, ובמיוחד יותר מודל BERT התפתח בגוגל הפכה את שדה NLP. בעוד ביצועים של גישות מבוססות על משתנים כמו BERT נלמדו עבור NER, עדיין לא היה מחקר עבור המשימה של זיהוי Entity בשם פין (FG-NER). בעיתון הזה, אנחנו משוותים שלושה דוגמנים מבוססים במעבר (BERT, RoBERTa, XLNet) לשני דוגמנים לא מבוססים במעבר (CRF ובילסטם-CNN-CRF). Furthermore, we apply each model to a multitude of distinct domains.  We find that transformer-based models incrementally outperform the studied non-transformer-based models in most domains with respect to the F1 score.  בנוסף, אנו מוצאים שבחירה של שטחים השפיעה משמעותית על ההופעה ללא קשר לגודל המידע המתאים או למודל שנבחר.', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) je temeljna naloga obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP) in ostaja aktivno raziskovalno področje. V zadnjih letih so transformatorski modeli in natančneje BERT model, razvit pri Googlu, revolucionirali področje NLP. Čeprav je bila učinkovitost pristopov, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, kot je BERT, proučena za NER, še ni bila študija za nalogo drobnozrnatega prepoznavanja imenovanih subjektov (FG-NER). V prispevku primerjamo tri modele na osnovi transformatorjev (BERT, RoBERTa in XLNet) z dvema modeloma na osnovi transformatorjev (CRF in BiLSTM-CNN-CRF). Poleg tega vsak model uporabljamo na številnih različnih področjih. Ugotovili smo, da modeli na osnovi transformatorjev postopoma presegajo preučevane modele na osnovi transformatorjev v večini področij glede na rezultat F1. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da je izbira domen bistveno vplivala na uspešnost ne glede na velikost podatkov ali izbran model.', 'bo': 'མིང་བཏགས་ཡོད་པའི་Entity Recognition (NER)ནི་རྨང་གཞུང་ནུས་ཀྱི་སྐད དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལོ་དག་གིས། BERT མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བར་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་དང་ཁྱད་པར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གིས་ Google དེ་གིས་གསར་བརྗོད་བྱེ BERT འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཞུང་བརྗོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་གི་རྒྱུ་དང་། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་གཞི་བརྗོད་མཁན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་BERT, RoBERTa དང་XLNet་གཉིས་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད་པའི་མ་དབ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཡོད་པའི་མངའ་ཁྱད་པར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་transformer-based models incrementally outperform the studied non-transformer-based models in most domains with respect to the F1 score. འོན་ཀྱང་། domein གདམ་ཀ་ནི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་གྲངས་སྐུལ་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་གདམ་ཟིན་པའི་མིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་'}
{'en': 'A Unifying Theory of Transition-based and Sequence Labeling Parsing', 'ar': 'نظرية موحدة للتحليل القائم على الانتقال والتسلسل تسمية', 'pt': 'Uma teoria unificadora de análise baseada em transição e rotulagem de sequência', 'fr': "Une théorie unificatrice de l'analyse basée sur la transition et de l'étiquetage de séquence", 'es': 'Una teoría unificadora del análisis de etiquetado de secuencias y basado en transiciones', 'ja': '遷移に基づくラベル付けとシーケンス解析の統一理論', 'zh': '盖渡序标记解析之一论也', 'hi': 'संक्रमण-आधारित और अनुक्रम लेबलिंग पार्सिंग का एक एकीकृत सिद्धांत', 'ru': 'Унифицирующая теория синтаксического анализа на основе перехода и маркировки последовательностей', 'ga': 'Teoiric Aontú na Parsála Tras-bhunaithe agus Lipéadú Seicheamhach', 'hu': 'Az átmenet alapú és szekvencia címkézési értelmezés egységesítő elmélete', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια ενοποιητική θεωρία της ανάλυσης ετικετών με βάση τη μετάβαση και τη διαδοχή', 'it': "Una teoria unificata dell'analisi dell'etichettatura basata sulla transizione e sulla sequenza", 'lt': 'Bendra pereinamojo laikotarpio ir sekos ženklinimo analizės teorija', 'kk': 'Тіркеме негіздеген және реттегі жарлық талдау теориясының біріктірілген теориясыName', 'mk': 'Обединувачка теорија на анализирање на транзиција и означување на секвенција', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'മാറ്റം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള സെക്കന്റ് ലാബിലിംഗ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടു', 'mt': 'Teorija Unifikanti tal-Analiżi bbażata fuq it-Tranżizzjoni u t-Tikkettar tas-Sekwenza', 'mn': 'Төвөрмөц, дарааллын лабораторын нэгтгэл теори', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Jednocząca teoria analizy etykietowania opartego na przejściu i sekwencji', 'ro': 'O teorie unificatoare a analizării etichetării pe bază de tranziție și secvență', 'sr': 'Jednostavna teorija razmatranja navedenih na prijenosnoj i sekvenciji', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qoraalka qalabka ee ku saleysan baaritaanka', 'ta': 'A Unifying Theory of Transition-based and Sequence Labeling Parsing', 'sv': 'En enhetlig teori om övergångsbaserad och sekvensmärkning tolkning', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một định lí kỳ lạ về hiệu ứng và hiệu ứng biến', 'bg': 'Унифицираща теория за анализ на етикетирането на прехода и последователността', 'nl': 'Een uniforme theorie van transitie-based en sequence labeling parsing', 'hr': 'Jednostavna teorija razmatranja oznake na prijelazu i sekvenciji', 'da': 'En forenet teori om overgangsbaseret og sekvensmærkning fortolkning', 'id': 'Sebuah Teori Unifikasi Penganalisan Berdasarkan Transisi dan Label Sekuensi', 'de': 'Eine vereinheitlichende Theorie des Übergangs-basierten und Sequenz Labeling Parsing', 'sw': 'Tamko la Muungano wa Uchaguzi wa Mabadiliko na Uchunguzi wa Kuzungumzia', 'tr': 'Translaciýan we Diňe Etiketleme Taýýarlamasynyň Birleşik Teoriýasy', 'ko': '전환과 서열 표기 분석을 바탕으로 하는 통일 이론', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një teori unifikuese e analizimit të etiketave me bazë në tranzicion dhe sekuencë', 'hy': 'A Unifying Theory of Transition-based and Sequence Labeling Parsing', 'bn': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Transition-based və Sequence Labeling Parsing Teorisi', 'bs': 'Jednostavna teorija razmatranja prelaznih i sekvenčnih oznake', 'cs': 'Jednotná teorie analýzy přechodového a sekvenčního označování', 'ca': "Una teoria unificadora de l'analització basada en la transició i l'etiqueta de seqüències", 'fi': 'Siirtymään perustuvan ja sekvenssimerkintöjen jäsentelyn yhtenäistävä teoria', 'et': 'Üleminekuperioodil põhineva ja järjestuse märgistuse analüüsimise ühtlustav teooria', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'תיאוריה מאוחדת של בדיקת תוויות מבוססת על העברה', 'sk': 'Združujoča teorija prehodnega označevanja in zaporedja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Unifying Theory of Transition-based and Sequence Labeling Parsing'}
{'en': 'We define a mapping from transition-based parsing algorithms that read sentences from left to right to sequence labeling encodings of syntactic trees. This not only establishes a theoretical relation between transition-based parsing and sequence-labeling parsing, but also provides a method to obtain new encodings for fast and simple sequence labeling parsing from the many existing transition-based parsers for different formalisms. Applying it to dependency parsing, we implement sequence labeling versions of four algorithms, showing that they are learnable and obtain comparable performance to existing encodings.', 'ar': 'نحدد تعيينًا من خوارزميات التحليل القائمة على الانتقال والتي تقرأ الجمل من اليسار إلى اليمين إلى تسلسل ترميز العلامات للأشجار النحوية. لا يؤسس هذا فقط علاقة نظرية بين التحليل القائم على الانتقال والتحليل المتسلسل ، ولكنه يوفر أيضًا طريقة للحصول على ترميزات جديدة لتحليل التسلسل السريع والبسيط من المحللون القائمون على الانتقال للعديد من الأشكال الشكلية المختلفة. بتطبيقه على تحليل التبعية ، نقوم بتنفيذ إصدارات تسمية التسلسل لأربعة خوارزميات ، مما يوضح أنها قابلة للتعلم والحصول على أداء مشابه للترميزات الحالية.', 'pt': 'Definimos um mapeamento a partir de algoritmos de análise sintática baseados em transição que lêem sentenças da esquerda para a direita para codificações de rotulagem de sequências de árvores sintáticas. Isso não apenas estabelece uma relação teórica entre análise sintática baseada em transição e análise sintática de rotulagem de sequência, mas também fornece um método para obter novas codificações para análise sintática de rotulagem de sequência rápida e simples a partir de muitos analisadores baseados em transição existentes para diferentes formalismos. Aplicando-o à análise de dependência, implementamos versões de rotulagem de sequência de quatro algoritmos, mostrando que eles podem ser aprendidos e obtêm desempenho comparável às codificações existentes.', 'fr': "Nous définissons un mappage à partir d'algorithmes d'analyse basés sur la transition qui lisent les phrases de gauche à droite aux codages d'étiquetage de séquence d'arbres syntaxiques. Cela établit non seulement une relation théorique entre l'analyse basée sur la transition et l'analyse par étiquetage de séquence, mais fournit également une méthode pour obtenir de nouveaux codages pour une analyse d'étiquetage de séquence rapide et simple à partir des nombreux analyseurs basés sur la transition existants pour différents formalismes. En l'appliquant à l'analyse des dépendances, nous mettons en œuvre des versions d'étiquetage de séquence de quatre algorithmes, montrant qu'ils sont appréhensibles et obtiennent des performances comparables à celles des codages existants.", 'es': 'Definimos un mapeo desde algoritmos de análisis basados en transiciones que leen oraciones de izquierda a derecha hasta codificaciones de etiquetado de secuencias de árboles sintácticos. Esto no solo establece una relación teórica entre el análisis basado en la transición y el análisis del etiquetado de secuencias, sino que también proporciona un método para obtener nuevas codificaciones para el análisis rápido y simple del etiquetado de secuencias de los muchos analizadores basados en la transición existentes para diferentes formalismos. Al aplicarlo al análisis de dependencias, implementamos versiones de etiquetado de secuencia de cuatro algoritmos, lo que demuestra que se pueden aprender y que obtienen un rendimiento comparable al de las codificaciones existentes.', 'ja': '文を左から右に読み取る遷移ベースの構文解析アルゴリズムから構文木のシーケンスラベル付けエンコーディングへのマッピングを定義します。これは、遷移ベースの構文解析とシーケンスラベル化構文解析との間の理論的関係を確立するだけでなく、異なる形式主義のための多くの既存の遷移ベースの構文解析器から高速かつ単純なシーケンスラベル化構文解析のための新しいエンコーディングを取得する方法を提供する。依存関係解析に適用すると、4つのアルゴリズムのシーケンスラベリングバージョンを実装し、それらが学習可能であり、既存のエンコーディングと同等のパフォーマンスを得ることを示します。', 'hi': 'हम संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सिंग एल्गोरिदम से एक मैपिंग को परिभाषित करते हैं जो वाक्यात्मक पेड़ों के अनुक्रम लेबलिंग एन्कोडिंग के लिए बाएं से दाएं वाक्यों को पढ़ते हैं। यह न केवल संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सिंग और अनुक्रम-लेबलिंग पार्सिंग के बीच एक सैद्धांतिक संबंध स्थापित करता है, बल्कि विभिन्न औपचारिकताओं के लिए कई मौजूदा संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सर से तेज और सरल अनुक्रम लेबलिंग पार्सिंग के लिए नए एन्कोडिंग प्राप्त करने के लिए एक विधि भी प्रदान करता है। निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए इसे लागू करते हुए, हम चार एल्गोरिदम के अनुक्रम लेबलिंग संस्करणों को लागू करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि वे सीखने योग्य हैं और मौजूदा एन्कोडिंग के लिए तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'zh': '定义从基转解析算法(从左到右读取句)至句法树序标编码映射。 非徒立论于解析序解析之间,而给一法,取新编码于众解析器之中,以速简之解析,施于形式主义也。 宜用于恃解析,得四算之序,明其可学,得与今编码相当也。', 'ru': 'Мы определяем отображение из алгоритмов синтаксического анализа на основе перехода, которые считывают предложения слева направо для кодирования маркировки последовательностей синтаксических деревьев. Это не только устанавливает теоретическую связь между синтаксическим разбором на основе перехода и синтаксическим разбором с метками последовательностей, но и обеспечивает способ получения новых кодировок для быстрого и простого синтаксического разбора с метками последовательностей из множества существующих синтаксических разборок на основе перехода для различных формализмов. Применяя его к синтаксическому анализу зависимостей, мы реализуем версии четырёх алгоритмов с разметкой последовательностей, показывая, что они поддаются обучению и получают сопоставимую производительность с существующими кодировками.', 'ga': 'Sainímid léarscáiliú ó halgartaim pharsála atá bunaithe ar thrasdul a léann abairtí ó chlé go deas go seicheamh ionchóduithe lipéadaithe crann comhréire. Ní hamháin go mbunaíonn sé seo gaol teoiriciúil idir parsáil thras-bhunaithe agus parsáil lipéadaithe seicheamháin, ach cuireann sé modh ar fáil freisin chun ionchóduithe nua a fháil do pharsáil lipéadaithe seichimh tapa agus shimplí ón iliomad parsáil tras-bhunaithe atá ann cheana le haghaidh foirmiúlachtaí éagsúla. Agus é á chur i bhfeidhm ar pharsáil spleáchais, cuirimid i bhfeidhm leaganacha lipéadaithe seicheamhacha de cheithre algartam, a thaispeánann gur féidir iad a fhoghlaim agus go bhfaigheann siad feidhmíocht inchomparáide leis na hionchóduithe atá ann cheana féin.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით გადაწყვეტილების ალგორიტების მარცხნიდან მარცხნიდან მარცხნიდან სინტაქტიკური ხეების კოდირების მარცხნიდან. ეს არა მხოლოდ ტეორეტიკური შესახებ გადაწყვეტილება და შესახებ დაწყვეტილება განსხვავებული ფორმალიზმისთვის განსხვავება განსხვავებული გადაწყვეტილების განსხვავება განსხვავებული გადაწყვეტილების განსხვავება განსხვავებული გადაწყვეტილების ჩვენ ამოყენებთ განსაკუთრებულობის პარასუზაციისთვის, ჩვენ გავამყენებთ 4 ალგორიტემის განსაკუთრებულება, რომ ისინი შესწავლებელია და მივიღებთ სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა კოდირე', 'el': 'Καθορίζουμε μια χαρτογράφηση από αλγόριθμους ανάλυσης που βασίζονται στη μετάβαση που διαβάζουν προτάσεις από αριστερά προς δεξιά έως κωδικοποιήσεις ετικετών ακολουθίας των συντακτικών δέντρων. Αυτό όχι μόνο εγκαθιστά μια θεωρητική σχέση μεταξύ ανάλυσης που βασίζεται στη μετάβαση και ανάλυσης σήμανσης ακολουθίας, αλλά παρέχει επίσης μια μέθοδο για την απόκτηση νέων κωδικοποιήσεων για γρήγορη και απλή ανάλυση ετικετών ακολουθίας από τους πολλούς υπάρχοντες αναλυτές που βασίζονται στη μετάβαση για διαφορετικούς φορμαλισμούς. Εφαρμόζοντας την στην ανάλυση εξαρτήσεων, εφαρμόζουμε εκδόσεις ετικετών ακολουθίας τεσσάρων αλγορίθμων, δείχνοντας ότι είναι μαθησιακές και επιτυγχάνουν συγκρίσιμη απόδοση με τις υπάρχουσες κωδικοποιήσεις.', 'hu': 'Egy leképezést definiálunk átmeneti alapú elemzési algoritmusokból, amelyek balról jobbra olvassák a mondatokat a szintaktikus fák szekvenciális címkézési kódolásaiig. Ez nemcsak elméleti kapcsolatot hoz létre az átmeneti alapú elemzés és a szekvencia-címkézés elemzés között, hanem egy módszert is biztosít a gyors és egyszerű szekvencia-címkézés elemzéséhez a sok meglévő átmeneti alapú elemzőből a különböző formalizmusokhoz. A függőség elemzésére alkalmazva négy algoritmus szekvencia-címkézési verzióját alkalmazzuk, amelyek tanulhatók és hasonló teljesítményt érnek el a meglévő kódolásokhoz.', 'lt': 'Mes apibrėžiame žemėlapius iš pereinamojo laikotarpio analizavimo algoritmų, kurie skaito sakinius iš kairės į dešinę į seką, žyminčius sintaktinių medžių kodus. This not only establishes a theoretical relation between transition-based parsing and sequence-labeling parsing, but also provides a method to obtain new encodings for fast and simple sequence labeling parsing from the many existing transition-based parsers for different formalisms.  Taikant jį priklausomybės analizei, įgyvendiname keturių algoritmų sekos ženklinimo versijas, rodančias, kad jie yra įmanomi ir įgyja panašių rezultatų kaip esami kodai.', 'it': "Definiamo una mappatura da algoritmi di analisi basati su transizione che leggono frasi da sinistra a destra alle codifiche di etichettatura sequenziale di alberi sintattici. Questo non solo stabilisce una relazione teorica tra l'analisi basata sulla transizione e l'analisi dell'etichettatura di sequenza, ma fornisce anche un metodo per ottenere nuove codifiche per l'analisi rapida e semplice dell'etichettatura di sequenza dai molti parser basati sulla transizione esistenti per diversi formalismi. Applicandolo all'analisi delle dipendenze, implementiamo versioni di etichettatura sequenziale di quattro algoritmi, dimostrando che sono imparabili e ottengono prestazioni paragonabili alle codifiche esistenti.", 'mk': 'Ние дефинираме мапирање од алгоритми за анализирање базирани на транзиција кои читаат реченици од лево на десно до секвенциски означувања на кодирање на синтактичките дрвја. Ова не само што воспоставува теоретска врска помеѓу анализирањето базирано на транзиција и анализирањето со означување на секвенца, туку и обезбедува метод за добивање нови кодирања за брзо и едноставно анализирање на секвенца од многуте постојни анализирачи базирани на транзиција за различни формализми. Применувајќи го на анализирањето на зависноста, спроведуваме верзии на етикетирање на секвенца од четири алгоритми, покажувајќи дека тие се научливи и добиваат споредливи резултати со постојните кодирања.', 'kk': 'Біз сол жақтан оң жақтан синтактикалық ағаштардың жарлық кодтамасын оқу алгоритмдерінен картасын анықтаймыз. Бұл тек ауыстыру негізінде талдау мен реттеу жарлығын талдау арасындағы теориялық қатынасын орнату емес, сондай-ақ әртүрлі офилизмдер үшін жылдам және қарапайым реттеу жарлығын талдау үшін жаңа кодтамасын алу әдісін қолданады. Тәуелсіздік талдауына қолдану үшін төрт алгоритмдер нұсқаларын жазып, оларды үйрене алатын және барлық кодтамалардың салыстырылатын ықтималдығын көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള പാര്\u200dഗിങ്ങ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു മാപ്പിങ്ങ് നാം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഇടത്തു ഇത് മാത്രമല്ല transition-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനും സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലേബിള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള സാധാരണ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നത്, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dമില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ്, നാല് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലേബിള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതാണ്, അവയെ പഠിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Aħna niddefinixxu mmappjar minn algoritmi tal-analiżi bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni li jaqraw sentenzi minn xellug għal lemin għal sekwenza li tikkettaw l-kodiċijiet tas-siġar sintattiku. Dan mhux biss jistabbilixxi relazzjoni teoretika bejn l-analizzazzjoni bbażata fuq it-tranżizzjoni u l-analizzazzjoni tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza, iżda jipprovdi wkoll metodu biex jinkisbu kodiċijiet ġodda għal tikkettar tas-sekwenza rapida u sempliċi tal-analizzazzjoni mill-ħafna analizzaturi eżistenti bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni għal formaliżmi differenti. Bl-applikazzjoni tagħha għall-analiżi tad-dipendenza, nimplimentaw verżjonijiet ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza ta’ erba’ algoritmi, li juru li jistgħu jitgħallmu u jiksbu prestazzjoni komparabbli mal-kodiċijiet eżistenti.', 'ms': 'Kami takrifkan peta dari algoritma penghuraian berasaskan-tranzisi yang membaca kalimat dari kiri ke kanan ke urutan pengekodan pokok sintaktik. Ini bukan sahaja menentukan hubungan teori antara penghuraian berasaskan-trangsi dan penghuraian-label urutan, tetapi juga menyediakan kaedah untuk mendapatkan pengekodan baru untuk penghuraian urutan cepat dan mudah dari banyak penghuraian berasaskan-trangsi yang ada untuk formalisme yang berbeza. Applying it to dependency parsing, we implement sequence labeling versions of four algorithms, showing that they are learnable and obtain comparable performance to existing encodings.', 'no': 'Vi definerer eit karting frå oversikningsbaserte tolking algoritme som lesar setningar frå venstre til høgre til sekvens for merkelappekoding av syntaktiske tre. Dette oppretter ikkje berre eit teoretisk relasjon mellom tolking og sekvensetiketting på overgangsbasert, men tilbyr også ein metode for å få nye kodingar for rask og enkle sekvensetiketting av tolking frå dei mange eksisterande overgangsbaserte tolkare for ulike formalismar. Dersom vi bruker den til tolking av avhengighet, implementerer vi sekvensmerkeldingar av fire algoritme, viser at dei er lærbar og får sammenlignbare utvikling med eksisterande kodingar.', 'mn': 'Бид шилжилт дээр суурилсан талгоритмын алгоритмын зураг тодорхойлдог. Зүүн дээс баруун тийш өгүүлбэрийг синтактик модын кодлогыг дарааллаар уншдаг. Энэ нь зөвхөн шилжилтийн талдааны болон дарааллын талдааны талдааны хоорондын теоретикийн харилцаа биш, гэхдээ бас хурдан, энгийн дарааллын талдааны шинэ кодлогийг олон шилжилт суурилсан талдаагчдын хуваалцааны хуваалцааны шинэ арга гаргадаг. Үүнийг хамааралтай хуваалцааны тулд хэрэглэх нь бид 4 алгоритмын хувилбарыг ашиглаж, суралцах болон суралцах боломжтой үйл ажиллагааг суралцах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Definim o mapare de la algoritmii de analizare bazați pe tranziție care citesc propoziții de la stânga la dreapta la codările de etichetare a secvențelor copacilor sintactici. Acest lucru nu numai că stabilește o relație teoretică între parsarea bazată pe tranziție și parsarea etichetării secvențelor, dar oferă, de asemenea, o metodă de a obține noi codări pentru parsarea rapidă și simplă a etichetării secvențelor din numeroasele parsere bazate pe tranziție existente pentru diferite formalisme. Aplicându-l la analizarea dependențelor, implementăm versiuni de etichetare a secvențelor a patru algoritmi, arătând că acestea sunt învățabile și obțin performanțe comparabile cu codările existente.', 'pl': 'Definiujemy mapowanie od algorytmów parsowania opartych na przejściach, które czytają zdania od lewej do prawej, do kodowania etykiet sekwencyjnych drzew składni. To nie tylko ustanawia teoretyczną relację między parsowaniem opartym na przejściu i parsowaniem etykietowania sekwencji, ale także zapewnia metodę uzyskania nowych kodowań dla szybkiego i prostego parsowania etykietowania sekwencji z wielu istniejących parserów opartych na przejściu dla różnych formalizmów. Stosując go do parsowania zależności, implementujemy wersje etykietowania sekwencji czterech algorytmów, pokazując, że są one nauczalne i uzyskują porównywalną wydajność do istniejących kodowań.', 'sr': 'Definiramo mapiranje od algoritma za analizu koji čitaju rečenice lijevo na desno do sekvence kodiranja etiketa sintaktičkih drveća. To ne samo utvrđuje teorijsku vezu između parsiranja na prijelazu i marķiranja na sekvenciji, nego takođe pruža metodu da dobije nove kodiranje za pregled brze i jednostavne etikete iz mnogih postojećih parsera na prijelazu za različite formalizme. Primjenjujući ga na analizu zavisnosti, implementiramo verzije označavanja sekvence četiri algoritma, pokazujući da su učeni i dobijaju usporednu funkciju sa postojećim kodiranjem.', 'si': 'Name This is not just a geometric link with transaction-based Parsing and sequence-Labling Parsing, but is a way to find new codes for Fast and Easy sequence Labling Parsing from the Multi-Exiting Transaction-based Parsers for Miscelleness. ඒක විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ඇල්ගෝරිතම් හතරක් ලෙබෝලික් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඔවුන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පෙන්වන්', 'so': 'Waxaan sawiranaa sawirada jardiinada baaritaanka ku saleysan ee lagu akhriyey ereyga bidixda ilaa midigta ilaa soo bandhigta koordisyada qoryaha syntactic. Taasi oo keliya ma dhiso xiriir cilmi ah oo ku dhaxaysa baarlamaanka lagu soo bandhigi karo iyo baarlamaanka soo bandhigyada, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale ka helaa qaab cusub oo loo helo qoraalka saxda oo fudud oo lagu qorayo baarlamayaasha badan oo ku qoran baarlamaanka kala duduwan. Codsashada baarlamaanka ku xiran, waxaynu soo bandhigaynaa warqadaha afarta algorithm oo lagu qorayo, waxaana tusinaynaa in ay bartaan oo ay sameyn karaan bandhigyo u eg codsiga.', 'sv': 'Vi definierar en kartläggning från övergångsbaserade parsningsalgoritmer som läser meningar från vänster till höger till sekvensmärkningskoder av syntaktiska träd. Detta etablerar inte bara en teoretisk relation mellan övergångsbaserad tolkning och sekvensmärkning tolkning, utan ger också en metod för att erhålla nya kodningar för snabb och enkel sekvensmärkning tolkning från många befintliga övergångsbaserade tolkare för olika formalismer. Genom att tillämpa det på beroendetolkning implementerar vi sekvensmärkningsversioner av fyra algoritmer, vilket visar att de är lärbara och får jämförbar prestanda med befintliga kodningar.', 'ta': 'நாம் மாற்றம் அடிப்படையில் இருந்து பாடல் முறைமைகளில் இருந்து வரைபடத்தை வரையறுக்கிறோம். அது இடது பக்கத்திலிருந்து வலது பக்கத்திலி இது மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலான பாடல் மற்றும் வரிசையாக்கி பாடலுக்கும் இடையே தொடர்பு மட்டுமே உருவாக்குகிறது, மற்றும் வேகமாக மற்றும் சுலபமான பின்வரிசைக்குறியீடுகளை பாடல் ச சார்ந்த பாடலுக்கு இதை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, நாம் நான்கு அல்குறியீடுகளின் குறியீட்டுக் குறியீடுகளின் வரிசையில் சேர்க்கும் பதிப்புகளை', 'ur': 'ہم نے تغییرات کی بنیادی پارسینگ الگوریتم سے ایک نقشه کی تعریف کی ہے جو بائیں سے دائیں طرف سے جماعتیں پڑھتی ہیں سینٹکتیک درختوں کے لیبلینگ اکڈینڈ پر۔ یہ نہیں صرف تغییر پر بنیاد رکھا ہوا پارسینگ اور سفارش-لابلینگ پارسینگ کے درمیان تئوریٹیک ارتباط مقرر کرتا ہے، بلکہ یہ بھی ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ بہت سی موجود تغییر-بنیاد پارسینز کے لئے نئی اکڈینگ حاصل کرنے کے لئے تیز اور ساده سفارش سفارش ہم نے اسے تقویت پارسینگ کے لئے لائق کیا ہے، چار الگوریٹم کی نسخہ لیبلینگ کو لائق کرلیا ہے، یہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ وہ سکھائی سکھائی جاتی ہیں اور موجود اکنوڈینگ کے مطابق قابل عمل حاصل کرتی ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz transition asosida bo'lgan parsing algoritlaridan diagrammani aniqlamaymiz, bu bir so'zlarni chapdan chapga to'g'ri ko'paytirish uchun qoʻllanmalar. @ info: whatsthis Buni tashkilotga qoʻllash uchun, biz to'rtta algorithning ko'paytirish versiyalarini bajaramiz, ularning o'rganadigan va mavjud kodlash usullarda mos keladigan bajarish imkoniyatini bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xác định một bản đồ từ các thuật to án phân tích chuyển tiếp, có thể đọc các câu từ trái sang phải để phân tích các hiệu cấu tạo của cây đồng pháp. Việc này không chỉ thiết lập mối quan hệ lý thuyết giữa phân tích và phân tích chuỗi, mà còn cung cấp một phương pháp để có những mã số mới cho việc phân tích nhanh và đơn giản các chuỗi phân tách ra từ các phân tích cơ bản chuyển đổi đã có cho các chính thức khác nhau. Sử dụng nó theo phân tích phụ thuộc, chúng tôi thiết lập mô phỏng các phiên bản của bốn thuật to án, cho thấy chúng có khả năng học và có hiệu quả tương đương với các mã số tồn tại.', 'bg': 'Определяме картографиране от алгоритми за анализ, базирани на преход, които четат изречения от ляво на дясно, до кодиране на последователни етикети на синтактични дървета. Това не само установява теоретична връзка между базирано на преход анализ и последователно етикетиране анализ, но също така осигурява метод за получаване на нови кодировки за бързо и просто етикетиране на последователност анализ от многото съществуващи базирани на преход анализи за различни формализми. Прилагайки го към анализа на зависимости, ние внедряваме версии за етикетиране на последователност на четири алгоритма, показвайки, че те могат да се научат и получават сравнима производителност с съществуващите кодировки.', 'da': 'Vi definerer en kortlægning fra overgangsbaserede parsing algoritmer, der læser sætninger fra venstre mod højre til sekvensmærkning kodninger af syntaktiske træer. Dette etablerer ikke kun en teoretisk relation mellem overgangsbaseret parsing og sekvensmærkning parsing, men giver også en metode til at opnå nye kodninger til hurtig og enkel sekvensmærkning parsing fra de mange eksisterende overgangsbaserede parsere til forskellige formalismer. Ved at anvende det til afhængighedsanalyse, implementerer vi sekvensmærkning versioner af fire algoritmer, der viser, at de er lærbare og opnår sammenlignelig ydeevne med eksisterende kodninger.', 'nl': 'We definiëren een mapping van transitie-gebaseerde parsing algoritmes die zinnen van links naar rechts lezen tot sequentie labeling coderingen van syntactische bomen. Dit legt niet alleen een theoretische relatie tussen transitie-based parsing en sequence-labeling parsing vast, maar biedt ook een methode om nieuwe coderingen te verkrijgen voor snelle en eenvoudige sequence labeling parsing van de vele bestaande transitie-based parsers voor verschillende formalismen. Door het toe te passen op afhankelijkheidsparsing, implementeren we sequence labeling versies van vier algoritmes, waaruit blijkt dat ze leerbaar zijn en vergelijkbare prestaties krijgen als bestaande coderingen.', 'ko': '우리는 왼쪽에서 오른쪽으로 문장을 읽는 변환에 기반한 해석 알고리즘에서 문법 트리의 서열 표기 인코딩에 대한 매핑을 정의했다.이것은 변환을 바탕으로 하는 해석과 서열 표기 해석 사이에 이론적 연계를 맺었을 뿐만 아니라 기존의 많은 변환을 바탕으로 하는 해석기에서 새로운 인코딩을 얻어 신속하고 간단한 서열 표기 해석을 실현하는 방법을 제공했다.이를 해석에 의존하여 우리는 네 가지 알고리즘의 서열 표기 버전을 실현하여 학습할 수 있고 기존 인코딩과 비슷한 성능을 얻었다.', 'id': 'We define a mapping from transition-based parsing algorithms that read sentences from left to right to sequence labeling encodings of syntactic trees.  Ini tidak hanya menentukan hubungan teori antara penghuraian berdasarkan transisi dan penghuraian label urutan, tetapi juga menyediakan metode untuk mendapatkan pengekodan baru untuk penghuraian urutan cepat dan sederhana dari banyak penghuraian berdasarkan transisi yang ada untuk formalisme yang berbeda. Menggunakannya untuk penghuraian dependensi, kami mengimplementasikan versi urutan label dari empat algoritma, menunjukkan bahwa mereka dapat dipelajari dan mendapatkan prestasi yang bisa dibandingkan dengan pengekodan yang ada.', 'de': 'Wir definieren ein Mapping von übergangsbasierten Parsing-Algorithmen, die Sätze von links nach rechts lesen, bis hin zu Sequenz-Labeling-Kodierungen syntaktischer Bäume. Dies stellt nicht nur eine theoretische Beziehung zwischen transition-based parsing und sequence-labeling parsing her, sondern bietet auch eine Methode, um neue Kodierungen für schnelle und einfache sequence labeling parsing aus den vielen vorhandenen transition-based parser für verschiedene Formalismen zu erhalten. Wir implementieren Sequenz-Labeling-Versionen von vier Algorithmen, die zeigen, dass sie erlernbar sind und eine vergleichbare Leistung mit bestehenden Codierungen erzielen.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kufafanua ramani kutoka kwa mifululizo ya wimbo wa mabadiliko yenye msingi wa mpito unaosoma sentensi kutoka kushoto hadi kulia hadi kutangaza kodi za miti ya ushirikiano. Hii siyo tu inatengeneza uhusiano wa nadharia kati ya parge yenye msingi wa mpito na wimbo unaohusika kwa mfululizo, lakini pia inatoa njia ya kupata kodi mpya kwa ajili ya mfululizo wa haraka na rahisi unaoelezea kuimba kutoka kwa mabunge mengi ya mpito kwa ajili ya utaratibu tofauti. Kutumia kitendo hicho cha kutegemea parsing, tunatekeleza visingizio vya algorithi nne vya mfululizo, wakionyesha kuwa wanajifunza na kupata utendaji wa mafanikio yanayofanana kwa kuwepo.', 'hr': 'Definiramo mapiranje iz algoritma za analiziranje prema prijelazu koji čitaju rečenice lijevo na desno do sekvencije kodiranja etiketa sintaktičkih drveća. To ne samo utvrđuje teorijsku vezu između razmatranja na prijelazu i razmatranja oznake na prijelazu, nego također pruža metodu za dobivanje novih kodiranja za brzo i jednostavno oznake oznake iz mnogih postojećih razmatrača na prijelazu za različite formalizme. Primjenjujući ga na analizu zavisnosti, implementiramo verzije označavanja sekvence četiri algoritma, pokazujući da su učeni i dobijamo usporedno učenje s postojećim kodiranjem.', 'sq': 'Ne përcaktojmë një hartë nga algoritmet e analizimit të bazuar në tranzicion që lexojnë fraza nga e majta në e djathtë në sekuencë që etiketojnë kodimet e pemëve sintaktike. This not only establishes a theoretical relation between transition-based parsing and sequence-labeling parsing, but also provides a method to obtain new encodings for fast and simple sequence labeling parsing from the many existing transition-based parsers for different formalisms.  Duke e aplikuar atë në analizimin e varësisë, ne zbatojmë versione sekuencë etiketash të katër algoritmave, duke treguar se ato janë të mësueshme dhe arrijnë performancë të krahasueshme me kodimet ekzistuese.', 'fa': 'ما نقشه\u200cبندی را از الگوریتم\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cبندی بر اساس تغییر تعریف می\u200cکنیم که جمله\u200cها را از چپ به سمت راست می\u200cخوانند تا رمز\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی از درختان سنتاکتیک. این نه تنها ارتباط نظریه\u200cای بین بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی تغییر و بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای تغییر و بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای جدید برای بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای سریع و ساده\u200cهای بررسی\u200cکننده\u200c با استفاده از آن به تقسیم بستگی، ما نسخه\u200cهای نقاشی از چهار الگوریتم را اجرا می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که آنها قابل یاد گرفتن و اجرای قابل مقایسه با رمز\u200cهای موجود هستند.', 'tr': 'Biz geçişden çykyş algorimlardan sözleriň soldan saňa taýýarlanan sanatly agaçlaryň kodlemesini okaýan bir haritalamagy tanyşdyrýarys. Bu diňe geçişe tabanly ahtarmak we sıralama etiketlemekler arasynda teoretik bir baglaýyşy däl, ýöne farklı formalizmler üçin täze ködlemeler üçin täze we basit sıralama etiketlemekleri üçin bejermek üçin bir täze ködleme täze bir süýtgedir. Muny baglançylyk ayırmagyna uygulanýarys, biz dört algoritmyň sanlaryny etitlendiriň düzümlerini çykaryp, olaryň öwrenip biljek we bar ködlemeleriň üstine ýakynlaşyrlygyny görkez.', 'am': 'ክፍተቶችን ከግራ ወደ ቀኝ ወደ ቀኝ ወደምናነብ የድምፅ ጽሑፎችን ለማቀናቀል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህም በተለዩ ፎርማሌዎች ላይ ካለው ፓርቲዎች ለጾም እና ለቀላል ስፋት ማግኘት አዲስ የኮድ ኮድ ማግኘት ማግኘት አዲስ የዶናዊ ግንኙነት ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ Applying it to dependency parsing, we implement sequence labeling versions of four algorithms, showing that they are learnable and obtain comparable performance to existing encodings.', 'af': "Ons definieer 'n kaart van oorgang-gebaseerde verwerking algoritme wat teikens van links na regs lees na sekvensie etiket-koderings van sintaktieke bome. Hierdie stel nie slegs 'n teorieese verhouding tussen oordrag-gebaseerde verwerking en volgorde-etiket verwerking nie, maar verskaf ook 'n metode om nuwe kodering te kry vir vinnige en eenvoudige volgorde etiket verwerking van die baie bestaande oordrag-gebaseerde verwerkers vir verskillende formalisme. As dit aanwend aan afhanklikheid verwerking, implementeer ons volgorde etiketting weergawes van vier algoritme, wys dat hulle leerbaar is en vergelykbare prestasie kry met bestaande kodering.", 'hy': 'Մենք սահմանում ենք քարտեզագրությունը վերաբերյալ վերլուծության ալգորիթմներից, որոնք կարդում են նախադասությունները ձախ դեպի աջ, մինչև սենտակտիկ ծառերի կոդավորումները: Սա ոչ միայն ստեղծում է տեսական հարաբերություն վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ հիմնված վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ և հաջորդականության պիտակագրման վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյա Այն կիրառելով կախվածության վերլուծության համար, մենք իրականացնում ենք չորս ալգորիթմների հաջորդականության պիտակ տալու տարբերակներ, ցույց տալով, որ դրանք սովորելի են և համեմատական արդյունք են ստանում գոյություն ունեցող կոդավորումների հետ:', 'ca': "Definim un mapa d'algoritmes d'analització basats en transició que llegeixen frases d'esquerra a dreta a seqüència etiquetant codificacions d'arbres sinàctics. Això no només estabelec una relació teòrica entre l'analització basada en la transició i l'analització d'etiquetes de seqüència, sinó també proporciona un mètode per aconseguir noves codificacions per l'analització de seqüències ràpidas i senzilles de molts analitzadors basats en la transició existents per diferents formalismes. Aplicant-lo a l'analització de dependencies, implementam versions de seqüència que etiqueten quatre algoritmes, mostrant que són aprendibles i obtenen rendiment comparable amb codificacions existents.", 'az': 'Biz hərəkət altındakı ayırma algoritmalarından xəbərləri soldan sağa və sağdan sintaktik a ğacların etiketləmə kodlarını oxuyan xəbərləri təyin edirik. Bu sadəcə keçişkilərə dayanan ayırma və sıralama etiketli ayırma arasında teorik bir ilişki təyin edir, lakin həmçinin də müxtəlif formalismlər üçün yeni kodlamalar yaratmaq üçün yeni kodlama və basit sıralama etiketli etiketli etiketləri təyin edir. Bunu bağımlılıq ayırmasına uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün, dörd algoritmin sıralama etiketlənməsi sürümlərini uyguladıq, onlar öyrənə biləcək və mevcut kodlamalarla qarşılaşdırılabilir.', 'bn': 'আমরা ট্রান্সিক ভিত্তিক পার্সিং অ্যালগোরিদম থেকে একটি ম্যাপ নির্ধারণ করেছি যা বাম থেকে ডান থেকে লেবেলের লেবেলের লেবিকেশন এটি শুধুমাত্র ট্রান্সফিক্স ভিত্তিক পার্সিং এবং সেকেন্স-ল্যাবেলিং পার্সিং এর মধ্যে কৌতূহলিক সম্পর্ক নির্ধারণ করে না, কিন্তু বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ফরমালিমের জন্য নতুন নির্ভর পার্সিং এর প্রয়োগ করার জন্য আমরা চার অ্যালগরিদমের সেকেন্ড ল্যাবেলিং সংস্করণ ব্যবহার করি, যেখানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে তারা বিদ্যমান এনকোড', 'et': 'Määratleme kaardistamise üleminekupõhistest parsimisalgoritmidest, mis loevad lauseid vasakult paremale kuni süntaktiliste puude jadasildiste kodeeringuteni. See mitte ainult ei loo teoreetilist seost üleminekupõhise parsimise ja jadamärgistuse parsimise vahel, vaid pakub ka meetodit uute kodeeringute saamiseks kiireks ja lihtsaks jadamärgistuse parsimiseks paljudest olemasolevatest üleminekupõhistest parseritest erinevate formalismide jaoks. Rakendades seda sõltuvuspartsimisele, rakendame nelja algoritmi järjestuse märgistamise versioone, näidates, et need on õppitavad ja saavutavad võrreldava jõudluse olemasolevate kodeeringutega.', 'bs': 'Definiramo mapiranje iz algoritma za analizu koji čitaju rečenice lijevo na desno do sekvence kodiranja etiketa sintaktičkih drveća. To ne samo utvrđuje teorijsku vezu između razmatranja na prijelazu i razmatranja na sekvenciji, nego također pruža metodu za dobivanje novih kodiranja za brzo i jednostavno označavanje etikete iz mnogih postojećih parsera na prijelazu za različite formalizme. Primjenjujući ga na analizu zavisnosti, implementiramo verzije označavanja sekvence od četiri algoritma, pokazujući da su učeni i dobijamo usporedbenu funkciju sa postojećim kodiranjem.', 'fi': 'Määrittelemme kartoituksen siirtymäpohjaisista jäsennysalgoritmeista, jotka lukevat lauseita vasemmalta oikealle syntaktisten puiden sekvenssimerkinnöisiin koodauksiin. Tämä ei ainoastaan luo teoreettista suhdetta siirtymäpohjaisen parsauksen ja sekvenssimerkinnän parsauksen välillä, vaan tarjoaa myös menetelmän saada uusia koodauksia nopeaan ja yksinkertaiseen sekvenssimerkinnän parsaukseen monista olemassa olevista siirtymäpohjaisista parsauksista eri formalismeja varten. Sovellamme sitä riippuvuuksien parsaukseen ja toteutamme neljän algoritmin sekvenssimerkkausversiot, jotka osoittavat, että ne ovat opittavissa ja että ne saavat vertailukelpoisen suorituskyvyn olemassa oleviin koodauksiin.', 'cs': 'Definujeme mapování od algoritmů analýzy založených na přechodu, které čtou věty zleva doprava až po kódování značek syntaktických stromů. To nejen vytváří teoretický vztah mezi parsováním založeným na přechodu a parsováním značení sekvence, ale také poskytuje metodu získání nových kódů pro rychlé a jednoduché parsování značení sekvence z mnoha existujících parserů založených na přechodu pro různé formalismy. Aplikací na analýzu závislostí implementujeme verze sekvence značení čtyř algoritmů, které ukazují, že jsou naučitelné a dosahují srovnatelného výkonu s existujícími kódováními.', 'jv': 'Learn Mode This not only defines a theoretial link amongst the transformation-supported PASS and sec-etiket CURRENTCURRENTCURRENT', 'ha': "Kana ƙayyade wani ramani daga algoritori masu yin parse a kan transiti wanda ke karatun magana daga hagu zuwa dama zuwa tsohon kodkogi masu yin takardar da itãcen syntactic. Wannan yana ƙayyade wata danganci na teoretisk tsakanin parse da aka danne shi da parse mai sauri-baƙata, kuma amma yana da wata hanyoyi wa ka sami kodi don a yi amfani da kwamfyuta sauri da sauri mai sauƙi da yin parse daga wasu parser masu da ke samar da transitional-based dõmin masu motsi. Aka amfani da shi dõmin yin tasgaro da inganci, za'a yi amfani da tsohon sigogi na rubutu, ko kuma za'a sami aikin su da daidaita zuwa kodi masu jira.", 'he': 'אנו מגדירים מפה מאלגוריתם מעבדה מבוססים במעבר שקוראים משפטים משמאל לימין לרצף קודים של עצים סינטקטיים. זה לא רק מקים מערכת יחסים תיאורטית בין מעבדה מבוססת על מעבר ולמעבדת תווית רצף, אלא גם מספק שיטה להשיג קודים חדשים עבור מעבדת תוויות רצף מהירה ופשוטה באמצעות ההפעלה למחקר תלויות, אנו מפעילים גרסאות תווית רצף של ארבעה אלגוריתמים, מראים שהם ניתן ללמוד ולקבל ביצועים שווים לקודים קיימים.', 'sk': 'Določimo preslikavo iz prehodnih algoritmov razčlenjevanja, ki berejo stavke od leve proti desni do kodiranja sintaktičnih dreves. To ne vzpostavlja le teoretične razmerje med razčlenjevanjem na podlagi prehoda in razčlenjevanjem označevanja zaporedja, ampak zagotavlja tudi metodo za pridobivanje novih kodiranj za hitro in enostavno razčlenjevanje označevanja zaporedja iz številnih obstoječih razčlenjevalnikov na podlagi prehoda za različne formalizme. Z uporabo pri razčlenitvi odvisnosti izvajamo različice štirih algoritmov za označevanje zaporedja, ki dokazujejo, da se jih je mogoče naučiti in doseči primerljivo zmogljivost z obstoječimi kodiranji.', 'bo': 'We define a mapping from transition-based parsing algorithms that read sentences from left to right to sequence labeling encodings of syntactic trees. This not only establishes a theoretical relation between transition-based parsing and sequence-labeling parsing, but also provides a method to obtain new encodings for fast and simple sequence labeling parsing from the many existing transition-based parsers for different formalisms. Applying it to dependency parsing, we implement sequence labeling versions of four algorithms, showing that they are learnable and obtain comparable performance to existing encodings.'}
{'en': 'Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation for Dependency Parsing via Improved Contextualized Word Representations', 'ar': 'تكييف المجال شبه الخاضع للإشراف لتحليل التبعية عبر تمثيلات الكلمات السياقية المحسنة', 'fr': "Adaptation de domaine semi-supervisée pour l'analyse des dépendances via des représentations de mots contextualisées améliorées", 'pt': 'Adaptação de domínio semi-supervisionada para análise de dependência por meio de representações de palavras contextualizadas aprimoradas', 'es': 'Adaptación de dominio semisupervisada para el análisis de dependencias a través de representaciones de palabras contextualizadas mejoradas', 'ja': '改善されたコンテキスト化された単語表現を介した依存関係解析のための半監督ドメインの適応', 'hi': 'अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित डोमेन अनुकूलन निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए बेहतर Contextualized Word प्रतिनिधित्व के माध्यम से', 'zh': '上下文化单词恃解析半监域', 'ru': 'Полуконтролируемая адаптация домена для анализа зависимостей с помощью улучшенных контекстуализированных представлений слов', 'ga': 'Oiriúnú Fearainn Leath-mhaoirsithe le haghaidh Parsáil Spleáchais trí Léirithe Focal Feabhsaithe i gComhthéacs', 'ka': 'სამხედვი დანახვა დომენის ადაპტიფიკაცია განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებული კონტექსტუალური სიტყვების გამოყენებით', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt tartomány-adaptáció a függőség-értelmezéshez a továbbfejlesztett kontextualizált szövegreprezentációk segítségével', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή ημιεποπτευόμενου τομέα για ανάλυση εξάρτησης μέσω βελτιωμένων αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων με περιεχόμενο', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік талдау үшін жарты бақылау доменді адаптациялау', 'it': "Adattamento del dominio semi-supervisionato per l'analisi delle dipendenze tramite rappresentazioni testuali contestualizzate migliorate", 'mk': 'Половина надгледувана адаптација на домен за анализирање зависности преку подобрени контекстуални претставувања на зборови', 'lt': 'Pusprižiūrimas domeno pritaikymas priklausomybės analizei gerinant kontekstinius žodžių atstovavimus', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Domain Semi-mengawasi untuk Menghurai Dependensi melalui Perwakilan Kata Berkonteks Terbaik', 'ml': 'മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മുഖാനുപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Adattament ta’ Domain Semi-Sorveljat għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza permezz ta’ Rappreżentazzjonijiet imtejba tal-Kliem Kuntest', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай байдлын талаар удирдлагатай холбоотой загварын адаптацийг сайжруулагдсан үгний төлөөлөлт', 'no': 'Halvoversikt domeneadaptering for avhengighetstolking via forbetra kontekstualiserte ord- representasjonar', 'pl': 'Pół-nadzorowana adaptacja domeny dla parowania zależności za pomocą ulepszonych kontekstowych reprezentacji słów', 'ro': 'Adaptare semi-supravegheată a domeniului pentru analizarea dependenței prin intermediul reprezentărilor text contextualizate îmbunătățite', 'sr': 'Polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena za analizu zavisnosti putem poboljšanih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja riječi', 'si': 'විශේෂතාවක් විශාලනය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශාලනය සම්බන්ධ විධානය විශාලනය', 'so': 'Adaptation for ku xiran jardiinada qofka lagu ilaaliyey', 'sv': 'Delvis övervakad domänanpassning för beroendetolkning via förbättrade kontextualiserade ordrepresentationer', 'ur': 'نیم نظارت والی ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ ڈیمنی پارچینگ کے ذریعے اچھی نظارت کے ذریعہ', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த பாடலுக்கான பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட Domain Adaptation by மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட வார்த்தை பிரதிபலகைகள்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chỉ cần quản lý nền tảng', 'bg': 'Полунадзорна адаптация на домейна за анализ на зависимостта чрез подобрени контекстуализирани текстови представяния', 'hr': 'Polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena za razmatranje zavisnosti putem poboljšanih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja riječi', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised domeinaanpassing voor afhankelijkheidsparsing via verbeterde contextualiseerde woordrepresentaties', 'da': 'Delvist overvåget domænetilpasning til afhængighedsfortolkning via forbedrede kontekstualiserede ordrepræsentationer', 'de': 'Halbüberwachte Domänenanpassung für Dependency Parsing durch verbesserte kontextualisierte Word-Darstellungen', 'fa': 'پایین مراقبت سازی دامنی برای تحلیل بستگی از طریق نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط\u200cترین بهبود', 'ko': '개선된 어경화어 표시를 바탕으로 하는 반감독역 자체 적응 의존 분석', 'id': 'Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation for Dependency Parsing via Improved Contextualized Word Representations', 'sw': 'Tafsiri kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Kutegemea', 'tr': 'Bağlamlık Taýdalanmasy üçin Azamlaýyn Taýdalanmasy', 'sq': 'Përpërshtatja gjysmë e mbikqyrur e domenit për analizimin e varësisë nëpërmjet përfaqësimeve të përmirësuara të fjalëve të kontekstuara', 'af': 'Semi-ondersoekte domein aanpassing vir afhanklikheidverwerking deur verbeterde konteksualiseerde woord voorstellings', 'am': 'Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation for Dependency Parsing via Improved Contextualized Word Representations', 'hy': 'Կամի-վերահսկվող բնագավառի ադապտացիան կախվածության վերլուծության համար բարելավված կոնտեքստալ բառերի ներկայացումների միջոցով', 'az': 'Yarı-gözləyirli Dependenci Parılması üçün Dərgləndirilmiş Söz İşyaları vasitəsilə Domena Adjustasyonu', 'bn': 'Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation for Dependency Parsing via Improved Contextualized Word Representations', 'bs': 'Pola nadzorne adaptacije domena za razmatranje zavisnosti putem poboljšanih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja riječi', 'ca': "Adaptació semisupervisada del domini per l'analització de dependencies mitjançant millors representacions de paraules contextualitzades", 'cs': 'Úprava domény s polovičním dohledem pro analýzu závislostí prostřednictvím vylepšených kontextualizovaných reprezentací slov', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega domeeni kohandamine sõltuvuse parsimiseks täiustatud kontekstualiseeritud sõnade esituste kaudu', 'fi': 'Osavalvottu verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen riippuvuuden parsausta varten parannettujen kontekstualisoitujen sanaesitysten avulla', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovana prilagoditev domen za razčlenitev odvisnosti z izboljšanimi kontekstualiziranimi predstavitvami besed', 'jv': 'semi-super-perspected domain Adjustment for Dehensitive parenting', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་སྐོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལྕགས་རིས་ཁོངས་བསྒྱུར་བའི་དུས་ཚན་བཟོ་བཅོས།Improved Contextualized Word Representations', 'he': 'התאמה למשטרה שמבוטחת בחצי עבור בדיקת תלויות באמצעות מייצגות מילים מקורקסטולוגיות משתפרות'}
{'en': 'In recent years, parsing performance is dramatically improved on in-domain texts thanks to the rapid progress of deep neural network models. The major challenge for current parsing research is to improve parsing performance on out-of-domain texts that are very different from the in-domain training data when there is only a small-scale out-domain labeled data. To deal with this problem, we propose to improve the contextualized word representations via adversarial learning and fine-tuning BERT processes. Concretely, we apply adversarial learning to three representative semi-supervised domain adaption methods, i.e., direct concatenation (CON), feature augmentation (FA), and domain embedding (DE) with two useful strategies, i.e., fused target-domain word representations and orthogonality constraints, thus enabling to model more pure yet effective domain-specific and domain-invariant representations. Simultaneously, we utilize a large-scale target-domain unlabeled data to fine-tune BERT with only the language model loss, thus obtaining reliable contextualized word representations that benefit for the cross-domain dependency parsing. Experiments on a benchmark dataset show that our proposed adversarial approaches achieve consistent improvement, and fine-tuning BERT further boosts parsing accuracy by a large margin. Our single model achieves the same state-of-the-art performance as the top submitted system in the NLPCC-2019 shared task, which uses ensemble models and BERT.', 'ar': 'في السنوات الأخيرة ، تم تحسين أداء التحليل بشكل كبير في النصوص داخل المجال بفضل التقدم السريع لنماذج الشبكة العصبية العميقة. يتمثل التحدي الرئيسي لأبحاث التحليل الحالية في تحسين أداء التحليل للنصوص خارج المجال التي تختلف تمامًا عن بيانات التدريب داخل المجال عندما لا يكون هناك سوى بيانات معنونة خارج المجال على نطاق صغير. للتعامل مع هذه المشكلة ، نقترح تحسين تمثيل الكلمات السياقية من خلال التعلم العدائي والضبط الدقيق لعمليات BERT. بشكل ملموس ، نحن نطبق التعلم العدائي على ثلاث طرق تمثيلية لتكييف المجال شبه الخاضع للإشراف ، أي ، التسلسل المباشر (CON) ، وزيادة الميزات (FA) ، ودمج المجال (DE) مع استراتيجيتين مفيدتين ، أي تمثيلات كلمات المجال الهدف المدمجة و قيود التعامد ، مما يمكّن من تصميم تمثيلات أكثر نقاءً لكنها فعالة في مجال محدد وثابت بالمجال. في الوقت نفسه ، نحن نستخدم بيانات غير مسماة على نطاق واسع النطاق لضبط BERT مع فقدان نموذج اللغة فقط ، وبالتالي الحصول على تمثيلات كلمات سياقية موثوقة تستفيد من تحليل التبعية عبر المجال. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعة بيانات معيارية أن مناهج الخصومة المقترحة لدينا تحقق تحسينًا ثابتًا ، كما أن ضبط BERT يعزز دقة التحليل بهامش كبير. يحقق نموذجنا الفردي نفس الأداء الحديث الذي يحققه النظام الأعلى المقدم في المهمة المشتركة NLPCC-2019 ، والتي تستخدم نماذج المجموعة و BERT.', 'es': 'En los últimos años, el rendimiento del análisis ha mejorado drásticamente en textos de dominio gracias al rápido progreso de los modelos de redes neuronales profundas. El principal desafío para la investigación de análisis actual es mejorar el rendimiento del análisis en textos fuera del dominio que son muy diferentes de los datos de entrenamiento dentro del dominio cuando solo hay datos etiquetados fuera del dominio a pequeña escala. Para hacer frente a este problema, proponemos mejorar las representaciones de palabras contextualizadas a través del aprendizaje contradictorio y el ajuste de los procesos BERT. Concretamente, aplicamos el aprendizaje contradictorio a tres métodos de adaptación de dominios semisupervisados representativos, es decir, concatenación directa (CON), aumento de características (FA) e incrustación de dominio (DE) con dos estrategias útiles, es decir, representaciones de palabras de dominio objetivo fusionadas y restricciones de ortogonalidad, lo que permite para modelar representaciones más puras pero eficaces de dominios específicos e invariantes de dominios. Simultáneamente, utilizamos datos no etiquetados de dominio de destino a gran escala para ajustar BERT solo con la pérdida del modelo de lenguaje, obteniendo así representaciones de palabras contextualizadas confiables que se benefician del análisis de dependencias entre dominios. Los experimentos en un conjunto de datos de referencia muestran que nuestros enfoques contradictorios propuestos logran una mejora constante, y el ajuste fino de BERT aumenta aún más la precisión del análisis por un amplio margen. Nuestro modelo único logra el mismo rendimiento de vanguardia que el sistema más presentado en la tarea compartida NLPCC-2019, que utiliza modelos conjuntos y BERT.', 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, o desempenho da análise foi drasticamente aprimorado em textos no domínio, graças ao rápido progresso dos modelos de redes neurais profundas. O principal desafio para a pesquisa atual de análise sintática é melhorar o desempenho da análise sintática em textos fora do domínio que são muito diferentes dos dados de treinamento no domínio quando há apenas dados rotulados fora do domínio em pequena escala. Para lidar com esse problema, propomos melhorar as representações de palavras contextualizadas por meio do aprendizado adversário e do ajuste fino dos processos BERT. Concretamente, aplicamos o aprendizado adversário a três métodos representativos de adaptação de domínio semi-supervisionado, ou seja, concatenação direta (CON), aumento de recursos (FA) e incorporação de domínio (DE) com duas estratégias úteis, ou seja, representações de palavras de domínio-alvo fundidas e restrições de ortogonalidade, permitindo assim modelar representações de domínio específico e invariante de domínio mais puras, porém eficazes. Simultaneamente, utilizamos dados não rotulados de domínio de destino em grande escala para ajustar o BERT apenas com a perda do modelo de linguagem, obtendo assim representações de palavras contextualizadas confiáveis que se beneficiam da análise de dependência entre domínios. Experimentos em um conjunto de dados de referência mostram que nossas abordagens adversárias propostas alcançam melhorias consistentes, e o ajuste fino do BERT aumenta ainda mais a precisão da análise por uma grande margem. Nosso modelo único alcança o mesmo desempenho de última geração que o sistema mais enviado na tarefa compartilhada NLPCC-2019, que usa modelos de conjunto e BERT.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, les performances d'analyse ont été considérablement améliorées sur les textes internes au domaine grâce à la progression rapide des modèles de réseaux de neurones profonds. Le principal défi de la recherche actuelle sur l'analyse syntaxique est d'améliorer les performances d'analyse de textes hors domaine qui sont très différents des données d'apprentissage dans le domaine lorsqu'il n'existe que des données étiquetées hors domaine à petite échelle. Pour faire face à ce problème, nous proposons d'améliorer les représentations textuelles contextualisées grâce à un apprentissage contradictoire et à un ajustement précis des processus BERT. Concrètement, nous appliquons l'apprentissage contradictoire à trois méthodes d'adaptation de domaines semi-supervisées représentatives, à savoir la concaténation directe (CONcaténation), l'augmentation de caractéristiques (FA) et l'intégration de domaines (DE) avec deux stratégies utiles, à savoir des représentations de mots fusionnées du domaine cible et des contraintes d'orthogonalité, permettant ainsi pour modéliser des représentations spécifiques et invariantes de domaine plus pures mais efficaces. Simultanément, nous utilisons des données non étiquetées de domaine cible à grande échelle pour affiner BERT avec uniquement la perte du modèle de langage, obtenant ainsi des représentations de mots contextualisées fiables qui bénéficient de l'analyse des dépendances entre domaines. Des expériences sur un ensemble de données de référence montrent que les approches contradictoires que nous proposons permettent une amélioration constante, et que le réglage précis du BERT augmente encore la précision de l'analyse dans une large mesure. Notre modèle unique atteint les mêmes performances de pointe que le meilleur système soumis dans la tâche partagée NLPCC-2019, qui utilise des modèles d'ensemble et BERT.", 'ja': '近年、深層ニューラルネットワークモデルの急速な進歩により、ドメイン内テキストの構文解析パフォーマンスが飛躍的に向上しています。 現在の構文解析研究の大きな課題は、小規模なアウトドメイン標識データしかない場合に、ドメイン内トレーニングデータとは大きく異なるドメイン外テキストの構文解析パフォーマンスを向上させることです。 この問題に対処するために、対立学習とBERTプロセスの微調整を通じて、文脈化された単語表現を改善することを提案します。 具体的には、我々は、３つの代表的な半監督ドメイン適応方法、すなわち、直接連結（ CON ）、特徴拡張（ FA ）、および２つの有用な戦略、すなわち、融合ターゲットドメイン単語表現および直交性制約を用いたドメイン埋め込み（ DE ）に対抗的学習を適用し、したがって、より純粋でありながら効果的なドメイン固有およびドメイン不変量表現をモデル化することを可能にする。 同時に、大規模なターゲットドメインのラベル付けされていないデータを利用して、言語モデルの損失のみでBERTを微調整することで、クロスドメイン依存性解析に有益な信頼できるコンテキスト化された単語表現を取得します。 ベンチマークデータセットの実験では、提案された対立アプローチが一貫した改善を達成し、BERTを微調整することで解析精度がさらに大幅に向上することが示されています。 当社のシングルモデルは、アンサンブルモデルとBERTを使用したNLPCC -2019共有タスクでトップ送信システムと同じ最先端のパフォーマンスを実現しています。', 'zh': '近年以来,深神经网络模形之速,域内文本解析性得显重。 今解析治要者,域外文本解析性也,当有小域表数,与域内训练殊异。 议以抗学BERT改上下文化之单词。 对抗性学用于三代表性之半,直联(CON),特徵增(FA)和域嵌(DE),有二有用之策,即融域词示和正交约束,所以能纯而有效特定域不变建模也。 且吾以大域未纪数而BERT,失言而得上下文单词,利跨域依赖性解析。 准数之实验,对抗性术成改,微BERT大大提高解析之准确性。 吾一而成与NLPCC-2019同者最先进,当统用而成BERT。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में, पार्सिंग प्रदर्शन में नाटकीय रूप से सुधार हुआ है इन-डोमेन ग्रंथों पर गहरी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल की तेजी से प्रगति के लिए धन्यवाद। वर्तमान पार्सिंग अनुसंधान के लिए प्रमुख चुनौती आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन ग्रंथों पर पार्सिंग प्रदर्शन में सुधार करना है जो इन-डोमेन प्रशिक्षण डेटा से बहुत अलग हैं जब केवल एक छोटे पैमाने पर आउट-डोमेन लेबल डेटा होता है। इस समस्या से निपटने के लिए, हम प्रतिकूल सीखने और ठीक ट्यूनिंग BERT प्रक्रियाओं के माध्यम से contextualized शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व में सुधार करने का प्रस्ताव है। ठोस रूप से, हम तीन प्रतिनिधि अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित डोमेन अनुकूलन विधियों के लिए प्रतिकूल सीखने को लागू करते हैं, यानी, प्रत्यक्ष संयोजन (कॉन), सुविधा वृद्धि (एफए), और डोमेन एम्बेडिंग (डीई) दो उपयोगी रणनीतियों के साथ, यानी, फ्यूज्ड लक्ष्य-डोमेन शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व और ओर्थोगोनेलिटी बाधाएं, इस प्रकार अधिक शुद्ध अभी तक प्रभावी डोमेन-विशिष्ट और डोमेन-अपरिवर्तनीय प्रतिनिधित्व को मॉडल करने में सक्षम बनाती हैं। इसके साथ ही, हम केवल भाषा मॉडल हानि के साथ BERT को ठीक करने के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर लक्ष्य-डोमेन अनलेबल किए गए डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं, इस प्रकार विश्वसनीय प्रासंगिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करते हैं जो क्रॉस-डोमेन निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए लाभ उठाते हैं। एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित प्रतिकूल दृष्टिकोण लगातार सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं, और ठीक-ट्यूनिंग BERT आगे एक बड़े मार्जिन से पार्सिंग सटीकता को बढ़ाता है। हमारा एकल मॉडल एनएलपीसीसी -2019 साझा कार्य में शीर्ष प्रस्तुत प्रणाली के रूप में एक ही अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जो पहनावा मॉडल और बर्ट का उपयोग करता है।', 'ru': 'В последние годы благодаря быстрому прогрессу моделей глубоких нейронных сетей значительно улучшилась производительность синтаксического анализа внутридоменных текстов. Основная проблема для текущих исследований синтаксического анализа заключается в улучшении производительности синтаксического анализа внедоменных текстов, которые сильно отличаются от данных обучения в домене, когда существуют только мелкомасштабные данные с маркировкой вне домена. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем улучшить контекстуализированные представления слов с помощью состязательного обучения и тонкой настройки процессов BERT. Конкретно, мы применяем состязательное обучение к трем репрезентативным полунаблюдаемым методам адаптации домена, то есть прямой конкатенации (CON), усилению признаков (FA) и внедрению домена (DE) с двумя полезными стратегиями, то есть объединенными представлениями слов в целевом домене и ограничениями ортогональности, что позволяет моделировать более чистые, но эффективные представления, специфичные для домена и домен-инвариантные представления. Одновременно мы используем крупномасштабные немеченные данные целевого домена для точной настройки BERT с потерей только языковой модели, таким образом получая надежные контекстуализированные представления слов, которые выгодны для междоменного синтаксического анализа зависимостей. Эксперименты с эталонным набором данных показывают, что наши предлагаемые сопернические подходы достигают последовательного улучшения, а точная настройка BERT дополнительно повышает точность синтаксического анализа с большим запасом. Наша единая модель достигает той же самой современной производительности, что и топовая система, представленная в совместной задаче NLPCC-2019, которая использует ансамблевые модели и BERT.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, tá feabhas suntasach tagtha ar fheidhmíocht parsála ar théacsanna san fhearann a bhuíochas le dul chun cinn tapa na samhlacha líonraí néaracha domhain. Is é an príomhdhúshlán don taighde parsála atá ann faoi láthair ná feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht parsála ar théacsanna lasmuigh den fhearann atá an-difriúil ó na sonraí oiliúna in-fhearainn nuair nach bhfuil ann ach sonraí lipéadaithe lasmuigh den fhearann ar scála beag. Chun déileáil leis an bhfadhb seo, tá sé beartaithe againn na huiríll comhthéacsaithe focal a fheabhsú trí fhoghlaim sháraíochta agus trí phróisis BERT a mhionchoigeartú. Go nithiúil, cuirimid an fhoghlaim sháraíochta i bhfeidhm ar thrí mhodh ionadaíocha um oiriúnú fearainn leathmhaoirsithe, i.e., comhchuibhiú díreach (CON), méadú gné (FA), agus neadú fearainn (DE) le dhá straitéis úsáideacha, i.e., léiriúcháin focal spriocfhearainn comhcheangailte agus srianta orthogonality, rud a chuireann ar chumas léirithe níos íona ach níos éifeachtaí a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann agus le hathrú ar an bhfearann a shamhaltú. Ag an am céanna, bainimid úsáid as sprioc-fearainn mhórscála sonraí gan lipéad chun CRET a mhionchoigeartú gan ach caillteanas na samhla teanga, agus ar an gcaoi sin faightear uiríll iontaofa comhthéacsaithe focal a théann chun sochair don pharsáil spleáchais tras-fearainn. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí tagarmhairc go mbaineann ár gcur chuige sáraíochta atá beartaithe feabhas comhsheasmhach amach, agus go gcuireann mionchoigeartú BERT le cruinneas parsála le corrlach mór. Baineann ár múnla aonair amach an fheidhmíocht úrscothach céanna leis an gcóras is airde a cuireadh isteach i dtasc comhroinnte NLPCC-2019, a úsáideann samhlacha ensemble agus BERT.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, η απόδοση ανάλυσης βελτιώθηκε δραματικά σε κείμενα εντός τομέα χάρη στην ταχεία πρόοδο των μοντέλων βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων. Η κύρια πρόκληση για την τρέχουσα έρευνα ανάλυσης είναι να βελτιωθεί η απόδοση ανάλυσης σε κείμενα εκτός τομέα που είναι πολύ διαφορετικά από τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης εντός τομέα όταν υπάρχουν μόνο δεδομένα μικρής κλίμακας εκτός τομέα. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε τη βελτίωση των περιεχομένων αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων μέσω της αντιπαραβολής μάθησης και του συντονισμού των διαδικασιών BERT. Συγκεκριμένα, εφαρμόζουμε την αντικρουστική μάθηση σε τρεις αντιπροσωπευτικές μεθόδους ημι-εποπτευόμενης προσαρμογής τομέων, δηλαδή την άμεση αλληλουχία (CON), την αύξηση χαρακτηριστικών (FA) και την ενσωμάτωση τομέων (DE) με δύο χρήσιμες στρατηγικές, δηλαδή τις συγχωνευμένες αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων στόχων-τομέα και τους περιορισμούς ορθογώνιας, επιτρέποντας έτσι να μοντελοποιηθούν πιο καθαρές αλλά αποτελεσματικές αναπαραστάσεις ειδικού τομέα και αμετάβλητες στον τομέα. Ταυτόχρονα, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας δεδομένα χωρίς ετικέτα για να συντονίσουμε το BERT με μόνο την απώλεια γλωσσικού μοντέλου, αποκτώντας έτσι αξιόπιστες αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων που επωφελούνται από την ανάλυση εξάρτησης μεταξύ τομέων. Τα πειράματα σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες αντικρουόμενες προσεγγίσεις επιτυγχάνουν συνεπή βελτίωση, ενώ ο συντονισμός του ενισχύει περαιτέρω την ακρίβεια ανάλυσης κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο. Το μοναδικό μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει την ίδια απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με το κορυφαίο υποβαλλόμενο σύστημα στην κοινή εργασία που χρησιμοποιεί μοντέλα συνόλων και BERT.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években a mélyneurális hálózati modellek gyors fejlődésének köszönhetően drámaian javult az értelmezési teljesítmény a domain belüli szövegeknél. A jelenlegi elemzési kutatások számára a legnagyobb kihívás a domain kívüli szövegek elemzési teljesítményének javítása, amelyek nagyon különböznek a domain belüli képzési adatoktól, ha csak kisméretű, domain kívüli adatok vannak. A probléma megoldása érdekében javasoljuk a kontextuális szóreprezentációk javítását ellentétes tanulással és a BERT folyamatok finomhangolásával. Konkrétan három reprezentatív, félig felügyelt domain adaptációs módszerre alkalmazzuk az ellentétes tanulást, azaz a közvetlen összefonódásra (CON), a funkcióbővítésre (FA) és a domain beágyazásra (DE) két hasznos stratégiával, azaz az egyesített cél-domain szóreprezentációkra és az ortogonalitási korlátozásokra, így lehetővé teszi a tisztább, mégis hatékonyabb domain-specifikus és domain-invariáns reprezentációk modellezését. Ezzel egyidejűleg nagyméretű, céltartomány nélküli adatokat használunk, hogy finomhangoljuk a BERT-t kizárólag a nyelvmodell elvesztésével, így megbízható kontextuális szóreprezentációkat kapjunk, amelyek előnyösek a tartományok közötti függőség elemzésében. A benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt ellentmondásos megközelítéseink következetes javulást érnek el, a BERT finomhangolása pedig tovább fokozza az elemzési pontosságot nagy mértékben. Egyetlen modellünk ugyanolyan korszerű teljesítményt ér el, mint a legjobb benyújtott rendszer az NLPCC-2019 megosztott feladatban, amely együttes modelleket és BERT-t használ.', 'ka': 'ბოლო წლის შემდეგ პარამეტრების გამოყენება დირამეტურად მოქმედება დემომინის ტექსტის შესაძლებლობად სიჩქარე ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელების ძალიან პროგრესი. მიმდინარე პარასტის განსხვავებაზე მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილება არის განსხვავება მონაცემების განსხვავება დემომინის განსხვავებაზე, როდესაც მხოლოდ პატარა სხვა მონაცემების განსხვავება. ამ პრობლემას გადავუდგინოთ, ჩვენ მინდომარებთ, რომ კონტექსტუალური სიტყვების გამოსახულება განსახულებული სიტყვების გამოსახულებას, განსახულებული სწავლებ განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულ სწავლებას სამი განსაკუთრებულ პროცენტირებულ პროცენტირებულ დემომინის ადაპტიფიკაციის მეტოვებისთვის გამოყენებთ, მაგალითად პირადი შესაკუთრებულება (CON), განსაკუთრებულება augmentation (FA) და დემომინის შესაკუთ ამიტომ შესაძლებელია მოდელს უფრო ფრთხი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური დიომინის სპექტიფიკური და დიომინის საშუალებელი გამოსახულებები. ასევე, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ დიდი მარტივი მინიშვნელოვანი დემომინის მონაცემები BERT-ს მხოლოდ მხოლოდ ენის მოდელს დაკავშირებით, ამიტომ მივიღებთ დარწმუნებელი კონტექსტუალური სიტყვის გამოსახულება,  ბანქმარიკის მონაცემების გამოცდილებები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ ანგარიალური დახმარებების შესაძლებლობად გაუკეთებენ, და BERT-ს შესაძლებლობად გაუკეთებენ მართლას დიდი მართლა ჩვენი ერთადერთი მოდელი იგივე მსგავსი მსგავსი მუშაობა, როგორც საუკეთესო მსგავსი მუშაობა, როგორც NLPCC-2019-ში გაყოფილი მუშაობაში, რომელიც გამოყენებს მოდელები', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni, le prestazioni di analisi sono notevolmente migliorate sui testi in-domain grazie al rapido progresso dei modelli di rete neurale profonda. La sfida principale per la ricerca di analisi attuale è migliorare le prestazioni di analisi su testi fuori dominio che sono molto diversi dai dati di formazione in-dominio quando c'è solo un dato etichettato fuori dominio su piccola scala. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo di migliorare le rappresentazioni contestualizzate delle parole attraverso l'apprendimento avversario e la messa a punto dei processi BERT. In concreto, applichiamo l'apprendimento avverso a tre metodi rappresentativi di adattamento del dominio semi-supervisionati, vale a dire concatenazione diretta (CON), aumento delle funzionalità (FA) e incorporazione del dominio (DE) con due strategie utili, vale a dire rappresentazioni di parole target-dominio fuse e vincoli ortogonali, permettendo così di modellare rappresentazioni più pure ma efficaci specifiche del dominio e invarianti del dominio. Allo stesso tempo, utilizziamo dati non etichettati con dominio target su larga scala per ottimizzare BERT con solo la perdita del modello di lingua, ottenendo così rappresentazioni di parole contestualizzate affidabili che beneficiano dell'analisi delle dipendenze cross-domain. Gli esperimenti su un set di dati di benchmark mostrano che i nostri approcci avversi proposti raggiungono un miglioramento costante e la messa a punto di BERT aumenta ulteriormente l'accuratezza dell'analisi di un ampio margine. Il nostro modello unico raggiunge le stesse prestazioni all'avanguardia del sistema presentato nel compito condiviso NLPCC-2019, che utilizza modelli ensemble e BERT.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais dėl sparčios giliųjų nervų tinklų modelių pažangos gerokai pagerėjo tekstų analizavimas srityse. Pagrindinis dabartinių tyrimų analizavimo uždavinys yra pagerinti ne srities tekstų, kurie labai skiriasi nuo srities mokymo duomenų, analizavimo rezultatus, kai yra tik mažai srities pažymėtų duomenų. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, siūlome pagerinti kontekstinius žodžių atstovavimus pasitelkiant prieštaringą mokymąsi ir tobulinant BERT procesus. Concretely, we apply adversarial learning to three representative semi-supervised domain adaption methods, i.e., direct concatenation (CON), feature augmentation (FA), and domain embedding (DE) with two useful strategies, i.e., fused target-domain word representations and orthogonality constraints, - taip sudarant galimybę modeliuoti grynesnes, bet veiksmingesnes konkrečiai valdžiai skirtas ir ne valdžiai skirtas atstovavimas. Tuo pačiu metu naudojame didelio masto tikslinio domeno be žymėjimo duomenis, kad tiksliai pritaikytume BERT tik prarandant kalbos model į ir taip gautume patikimus kontekstinius žodžių atstovavimus, kurie būtų naudingi tarpdomaino priklausomybės analizei. Eksperimentai, susiję su lyginamuoju duomenų rinkiniu, rodo, kad mūsų siūlomi prieštaringi metodai nuosekliai pagerina, o tikslesnis BERT dar labiau padidina analizavimo tikslumą didele marža. Mūsų vienintelis modelis pasiekia tokius pačius naujausius rezultatus kaip ir aukščiausios pateiktos sistemos bendroje NLPCC-2019 m. užduotyje, kurioje naudojami komplekso modeliai ir BERT.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдар бойынша, талдау мүмкіндігі домендегі мәтіндерде дұрыс жақсартылады. Невралдық желі моделдерінің тез жағдайды. Қолданыстағы талдау зерттеулерінің негізгі мәселесі - доменден тыс мәтіндерінің талдау мүмкіндігін өзгерту - толық кішкентай деңгейіндегі деректері бар болса, доменден тыс мәтіндерінен бірнеше түрлі бол Бұл мәселеге шешіміз үшін белсенді оқыту және BERT процестерін жақсы баптау арқылы контекстуалды сөздерді жақсартуға жұмыс істейміз. Сонымен қатар, біз белсендік оқытуды үш негізгі жарты бақылау доменнің адаптациялау әдістеріне қолданып, мысалы, тәсілдік сәйкестік (CON), функциялық augmentation (FA) және доменнің ендіру (DE) қолданатын екі пайдалы стратегиялары, мысалы, мәтінді Бұл үшін доменге арнаулы, доменге арнаулы және доменге арнаулы мәліметтерді үлгілеу мүмкіндік береді. Бірақ біз BERT тіл үлгісін тек қана тіл үлгісінің жоғалуы үлкен мақсат доменінің үлкен мақсатты деректерін қолдануға арналған, сондықтан көбірек доменге тәуелдік талдау үшін сенімді контекстуалды сөздерді көрсетуге бол Белгі деректер жиынындағы тәжірибелер біздің керек негізгі жағдайларымыздың тәуелді жақсартылығын көрсетеді, және BERT баптауларымыз үлкен шегімен дұрыстығын талдау үшін көтереді. Біздің жалғыз үлгіміз NLPCC-2019 ортақ тапсырманың жоғарғы жүйесінде жұмыс істейтін әрекеттеріне жеткізеді. Бұл үлгілер мен BERT үлгілерін қолданады.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത കൊല്ലങ്ങളില്\u200d, ഡൊമെയിനിലെ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ് നോക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസി ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു, വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്ത മൂന്നു പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായി പഠിക്കാനുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, നേരിട്ടുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡേപ്ഷന്\u200d രീതിയിലേക്കും, കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂട്ടുന്നതും (FA), ഡൊമെയിനിലേ അതുകൊണ്ട് കൂടുതല്\u200d ശുദ്ധിയുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിനിധികളും ഡോമെയിന്\u200d അകത്തുകടക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികളും മ അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയിലേക്ക് മാത്രമേ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d നഷ്ടത്തിലേക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്ക ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട എതിരാളികളുടെ നടപടികള്\u200d ഒര നമ്മുടെ ഒരേ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ തന്നെയാണ്. എംഎല്\u200dപിസി-2019-ലെ ഏറ്റവും മുകളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിച്ച സിസ്റ്റം പോലെയാണ്. അത്', 'mt': 'F’dawn l-aħħar snin, il-prestazzjoni tal-analiżi titjieb b’mod drammatiku fit-testi interni bis-saħħa tal-progress mgħaġġel tal-mudelli tan-netwerks newrali profondi. L-isfida ewlenija għar-riċerka attwali tal-analiżijiet hija li tittejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-analiżijiet fuq testi barra d-dominju li huma differenti ħafna mid-dejta tat-taħriġ fid-dominju meta jkun hemm biss dejta ttikkettata barra d-dominju fuq skala żgħira. To deal with this problem, we propose to improve the contextualized word representations via adversarial learning and fine-tuning BERT processes.  B’mod konkret, aħna napplikaw it-tagħlim avversarju għal tliet metodi rappreżentattivi ta’ adattament tad-dominju semisorveljati, jiġifieri l-konċentrazzjoni diretta (CON), i ż-żieda tal-karatteristiċi (FA), u l-inkorporazzjoni tad-dominju (DE) b’żewġ strateġiji utli, jiġifieri rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem fil-mira-dominju u restrizzjonijiet tal-ortogonalità, • b’hekk ikunu jistgħu jimmudellaw rappreżentazzjonijiet aktar puri iżda effettivi speċifiċi għad-dominju u invarji għad-dominju. Simultaneously, we utilize a large-scale target-domain unlabeled data to fine-tune BERT with only the language model loss, thus obtaining reliable contextualized word representations that benefit for the cross-domain dependency parsing.  Experiments on a benchmark dataset show that our proposed adversarial approaches achieve consistent improvement, and fine-tuning BERT further boosts parsing accuracy by a large margin.  Il-mudell uniku tagħna jikseb l-istess prestazzjoni avvanzata bħas-sistema ppreżentata fl-ogħla livell fil-kompitu kondiviż NLPCC-2019, li juża mudelli ensemble u BERT.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд ажиллах үйл ажиллагааны талаар мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварын хурдан хөгжүүлэхээс илүү сайжруулагддаг. Одоогийн шинжилгээний судалгааны гол сорилт нь домены дасгал өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс маш өөр өөрчлөгдөж байгаа жижиг хэмжээний гадаад хэмжээний мэдээллийг сайжруулах юм. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид эсрэг суралцах болон BERT үйл явцуудыг сайжруулахын тулд орчин үеийн үзүүлэлтийг сайжруулахыг санал болно. Ялангуяа бид эсрэг сургалтыг гурван төлөөлөгчийн хагас удирдлагатай холбооны адаптацийн арга замаар хэрэглэдэг. Яг л шууд тодорхойлолт (CON), өөрчлөлтийн нэмэгдүүлэлт (FA) болон хоёр ашигтай стратегийг ашиглаж, яг л хоёр ашигтай зорилготой зорилготой үг илэрхийлэл Иймээс илүү цэвэр боловч үр дүнтэй холбоотой болон холбоотой хүчин зүйлсийг загварчлах боломж олгодог. Үүнтэй адил бид хэл загварын алдагдалтай том хэмжээний зорилготой зорилготой зорилготой мэдээллийг хэрэглэдэг. Иймээс олон домжтой хамааралтай хуваалцааны ашиг ашигладаг итгэлтэй үг илэрхийлэл гаргадаг. Бидний санал өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн эсрэг арга баримтууд үргэлж сайжруулах боломжтой болно. БЕРТ-г сайжруулах нь илүү том хэмжээгээр тодорхойлдог. Бидний ганц загвар нь NLPCC-2019 оны хуваалтын ажлын хамгийн өндөр дамжуулагдсан системтэй адилхан урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Энэ нь загвар болон BERT ашигладаг.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år er tolkingsformet dramatisk forbedra på tekstar i domenet thanks for raskt framgang av dype neuralnettverksmodeller. Det viktigste utfordringen for gjeldande tolkingssøkje er å forbetra tolkingsfunksjon på ekstra domenetekstar som er svært ulike frå undersøkingsdata i domenet når det er berre ein liten ut- domenemerket data. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi å forbetra kontekstualiserte ordrepresentasjonane via negativ læring og finnstilling av BERT-prosesser. I tillegg bruker vi adversarial læring til tre reprezentativ semioversikte domenetilpassingsmetodar, t.d. direkte sammenlikning (CON), funksjonsaugmentation (FA), og domeneinnbygging (DE) med to nyttige strategiar, t.d. filtrerte mål-domeneordrepresentasjonar og ortognalitetsbegrensningar, Dette gjer det mogleg til å modellere meir rein enn effektiv domenespesifikk og domeneinvariant representasjonar. I tillegg bruker vi eit stor måldområde utan abelde data for å finne opp BERT med berre tapt av språk-modellen, slik at vi får tilgjengelege kontekstualiserte ordrepresentasjonar som nyttar for tolking av avhengighet på krysdomenet. Eksperimentar på ein benchmarkdatasett viser at våre foreslått negativ tilnærmingar når det gjer konsistent forbedring, og finnstilling av BERT større aukar å tolka nøyaktighet med ein stor margin. Det enkelte modellet vårt gjer det samme utviklinga av kunsten som det øvst sendte systemet i delt oppgåva NLPCC-2019, som brukar ensemble modeller og BERT.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, performanța analizării a fost îmbunătățită dramatic asupra textelor din domeniu datorită progresului rapid al modelelor de rețele neuronale profunde. Provocarea majoră pentru cercetarea actuală de analizare este de a îmbunătăți performanța de analizare a textelor în afara domeniului, care sunt foarte diferite de datele de instruire în domeniu atunci când există doar date etichetate în afara domeniului la scară mică. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, propunem îmbunătățirea reprezentărilor contextualizate de cuvinte prin învățarea adversară și reglarea fină a proceselor BERT. În mod concret, aplicăm învățarea adversară la trei metode reprezentative de adaptare a domeniului semi-supravegheate, și anume concatenarea directă (CON), augmentarea caracteristicilor (FA) și încorporarea domeniului (DE) cu două strategii utile, și anume reprezentări de cuvinte țintă-domeniu fuzionate și constrângeri ortogonale, permițând astfel modelarea unor reprezentări mai pure, dar eficiente specifice domeniului și invariante ale domeniului. În același timp, utilizăm date la scară largă fără etichete pentru domeniul țintă pentru a regla BERT cu doar pierderea modelului de limbă, obținând astfel reprezentări de cuvinte contextualizate fiabile care beneficiază de analizarea dependenței între domenii. Experimentele efectuate pe un set de date de referință arată că abordările adversare propuse obțin îmbunătățiri constante, iar reglarea fină a BERT sporește și mai mult precizia analizării cu o marjă mare. Modelul nostru unic atinge aceleași performanțe de ultimă generație ca sistemul de top depus în sarcina partajată NLPCC-2019, care utilizează modele de ansamblu și BERT.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach wydajność parsowania została znacznie poprawiona w tekstach wewnątrz domeny dzięki szybkiemu postępowi modeli głębokich sieci neuronowych. Głównym wyzwaniem dla obecnych badań nad parsowaniem jest poprawa wydajności parsowania tekstów poza domeną, które są bardzo różne od danych treningowych w domenie, gdy istnieją tylko niewielkie dane oznaczone poza domeną. Aby poradzić sobie z tym problemem proponujemy ulepszenie kontekstowych reprezentacji słów poprzez uczenie się przeciwnikowe i dostosowanie procesów BERT. Konkretnie, stosujemy naukę przeciwną do trzech reprezentatywnych pół-nadzorowanych metod adaptacji domen, tj. bezpośredniego łączenia (CON), powiększania cech (FA) i osadzania domen (DE) za pomocą dwóch użytecznych strategii, tj. scalonych reprezentacji słów docelowych i ograniczeń ortogonalności, umożliwiając tym samym modelowanie bardziej czystych, ale skutecznych reprezentacji specyficznych dla domeny i niezmiennych dla domeny. Jednocześnie wykorzystujemy dużą skalę danych nieoznakowanych domeną docelową do dostrojenia BERT tylko z utratą modelu językowego, uzyskując wiarygodne kontekstowe reprezentacje słów, które korzystają z analizy zależności między domenami. Eksperymenty na zbiorze danych referencyjnych pokazują, że proponowane przeciwne podejścia osiągają konsekwentną poprawę, a dostosowanie BERT dodatkowo zwiększa dokładność parsowania o duży margines. Nasz pojedynczy model osiąga taką samą najnowocześniejszą wydajność jak najwyższy zgłoszony system w ramach wspólnego zadania NLPCC-2019, które wykorzystuje modele zespołowe i BERT.', 'ms': 'Dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, penghuraian prestasi meningkatkan secara dramatik pada teks dalam domain berkat kemajuan cepat model rangkaian saraf dalam. cabaran utama untuk kajian hurai semasa adalah untuk meningkatkan prestasi hurai teks luar domain yang sangat berbeza dari data latihan dalam domain apabila hanya ada data yang ditabel luar domain skala kecil. To deal with this problem, we propose to improve the contextualized word representations via adversarial learning and fine-tuning BERT processes.  Concretely, we apply adversarial learning to three representative semi-supervised domain adaption methods, i.e., direct concatenation (CON), feature augmentation (FA), and domain embedding (DE) with two useful strategies, i.e., fused target-domain word representations and orthogonality constraints, Dengan demikian, membolehkan untuk memmodelkan perwakilan domain-spesifik dan domain-invarian yang lebih murni tetapi berkesan. Sama-sama, kita menggunakan data unsabeled domain sasaran skala besar untuk menyesuaikan BERT dengan hanya kehilangan model bahasa, demikian mendapatkan perwakilan perkataan kontekstualisasi yang boleh dipercayai yang berguna untuk penghuraian dependensi domain salib. Eksperimen pada set data tanda rujukan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan musuh kami diusulkan mencapai peningkatan konsisten, dan penyesuaian BERT lebih meningkatkan ketepatan penghuraian dengan margin besar. Model tunggal kita mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan sistem yang dihantar atas dalam tugas kongsi NLPCC-2019, yang menggunakan model ensemble dan BERT.', 'mk': 'Во последниве години, анализирањето на изведувањата драматично се подобрува во текстовите во домените благодарение на брзиот напредок на моделите на длабоката нервна мрежа. The major challenge for current parsing research is to improve parsing performance on out-of-domain texts that are very different from the in-domain training data when there is only a small-scale out-domain labeled data.  За да се справи со овој проблем, ние предлагаме подобрување на контекстуалните претставувања на зборови преку противно учење и финетизирање на процесите BERT. Конкретно, аплицираме противно учење на три репрезентативни полунадгледувани методи на адаптација на домените, т.е., директна концентрација (CON), зголемување на карактеристиката (FA) и вградување на домените (DE) со две корисни стратегии, т.е., споени претставувања на зборови на домените на целта и ортогоналитетот, - овозможува да се моделираат почисти, но ефикасни, доменски специфични и доменски инваријантни претставувања. Истовремено, употребуваме големи податоци без обележување на цел-домен за да го пофинираме БЕРТ со само загубата на јазичкиот модел, со што ќе добиеме доверливи контекстуални репрезентации на зборови кои ќе имаат корист за анализирањето на зависноста преку домен. Експериментите на компјутерот на податоци за benchmark покажуваат дека нашите предложени непријателски пристапи постигнуваат константно подобрување, и финетирањето на BERT понатаму ја зголемува прецизноста на анализирањето за голема маргина. Нашиот единствен модел постигнува иста најдобра резултат како и највисокиот поднесен систем во заедничката задача НЛПЦ-2019, која користи ансембли модели и БЕРТ.', 'sr': 'Za poslednje godine, analiziranje učinka je dramatično poboljšano na tekstima u domenu zahvaljujući brzom napretku dubokih modela neurone mreže. Najveći izazov za trenutne istraživanje analize je da poboljšamo analizu učinkovitosti na tekstima izvan domena koji su veoma različiti od podataka o obuci u domenu kada postoje samo mali podaci označeni izvan domena. Za rješavanje ovog problema predlažemo da poboljšamo kontekstualizirane reèi predstave putem neprijateljskog učenja i procesa BERT-a. Konačno, primjenjujemo neprijateljsko učenje na tri reprezentativne metode prilagodbe domena s polu nadzornim metodama, tj. direktne konkatentacije (CON), pojačanje funkcija (FA) i ugrađenje domena (DE) sa dve korisne strategije, tj. kombinovane reprezentacije riječi domena cilja i ograničenja ortogonalnosti, To omogućava da modeliraju čišće, ali efikasnije predstavljanje domena specifičnih i domena invariantnih predstavljanja. Istodobno, koristimo velike ciljne domene bez imenovanih podataka da se odredi BERT sa samo gubitkom jezičkog model a, tako da dobijemo pouzdane kontekstualizacije riječi koje koriste za analizu zavisnosti preko domena. Eksperimenti na setu podataka o benchmarku pokazuju da naši predloženi neprijateljski pristupi postignu konsekventno poboljšanje, a finaliziranje BERT dalje povećava parsiranje tačnosti velikom marginom. Naš jedini model postiže isto stanje umjetnosti kao najviši podignut sistem u zajedničkom zadatku NLPCC-2019, koji koristi modele i BERT.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුද්දු වලින්, විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරභාව විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරභාව විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඩොමේන් වල පා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන අභ්\u200dයාසය තමයි ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සම්බන්ධ වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, විරෝ Concertly, we use adversarial learnt to three repressive Half-supervised domain Adplication Metodos, i.e., Direcal Concatheation (CON), Feather Agmentation (FA), and domain Embding (DE) with Two Useful Astrology, i.e., fused Targe-domain word presents and orphogonality Restraints, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් තවත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. සමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම, අපි ලොකු ස්කේල් ඉලක්ෂාව- ඩොමේන් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා BERT විතරයි භාෂාව මදුල් නැති විතරයි, ඉතින් විශ්වාසිත වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විරෝධ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා. අපේ එකම මෝඩල් එක්ක තත්වය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා NLPCC-2019 වැදගත් වැඩේ පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතියෙන් ඉ', 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har tolkningen förbättrats dramatiskt på domäntexter tack vare den snabba utvecklingen av djupa neurala nätverksmodeller. Den stora utmaningen för aktuell tolkningsforskning är att förbättra tolkningsprestandan på texter utanför domänen som skiljer sig mycket från utbildningsdata inom domänen när det bara finns en liten skala utanför domänen märkt data. För att hantera detta problem föreslår vi att förbättra kontextualiserade ordrepresentationer via kontradiktoriskt lärande och finjustering av BERT-processer. Konkret tillämpar vi kontradiktoriskt lärande på tre representativa halvövervakade domänanpassningsmetoder, dvs. direkt concatenation (CON), funktionsförstärkning (FA) och domäninbäddning (DE) med två användbara strategier, dvs. fusionerade måldomänordrepresentationer och ortogonalitetsbegränsningar. vilket gör det möjligt att modellera mer rena men effektiva domänspecifika och domäninvarianta representationer. Samtidigt använder vi en storskalig måldomän omärkt data för att finjustera BERT med endast språkmodellförlusten, vilket ger tillförlitliga kontextuella ordrepresentationer som gynnar tolkningen av beroende över domäner. Experiment på en benchmarkdatauppsättning visar att våra föreslagna motstridiga tillvägagångssätt uppnår konsekvent förbättring, och finjustering av BERT ökar analysnoggrannheten ytterligare med stor marginal. Vår enda modell uppnår samma toppmoderna prestanda som det översta inlämnade systemet i den delade uppgiften NLPCC-2019, som använder ensemblemodeller och BERT.', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu dambeeyey waxaa lagu hagaajiyey bandhigyada qoraalka gudaha ku qoran, waxaana lagu mahad naqayaa horumarinta dhaqso oo u dhaqdhaqaaqsan sameynta shabakadda neurada. Caqabadaha ugu weyn ee baaritaanka baarlamaanka la joogo waa in la hagaajiyo farshaxan-bandhigyada lagu sameeyo qoraalka aan degmooyinka ahayn, kuwaas oo aad uga duwan macluumaadka waxbarashada gudaha marka lagu jiro macluumaad yar oo ku qoran gudaha. Si aan u qabno dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in horumarinta qaabilsan hadalka oo la soo jeedo lagu sameeyo koorasyada waxbarashada cadaawayaasha ah iyo koorasyada BERT ee hagaajiya. Si gaar ah, waxbarashada cadaawayaasha ah waxaannu u codsanaynaa saddex wakiil oo ah hababka bedelka deegaanka oo la ilaaliyay, tusaale ahaan toos ku leedahay (CON), kordhinta deegaanka (FA), iyo qalabka deegaanka (DE) oo laba qaab oo faa’iido leh, tusaale ahaan qofka macaamilooda e e goal-domain ah iyo xadhiidhiyada orthogonnimada, Sidaa darteed waxaa sameyn kara noocyo daahir ah oo weli faa’iido leh deegaanka iyo kuwa gudaha gala. Isku jir, waxaynu isticmaalnaa macluumaad aad u weyn oo aan la magacaabin BERT oo kaliya, taasoo aan helayno noocyada afka oo kaliya, si aad u heshid macluumaad la aaminsan karo, taasoo u faa’iido u leh baarlamaanka ku filan ee gudaha. Imtixaanka ku saabsan taariikhda benchmarkiga waxay muuqataa in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay soo gaadhaan hagaajinta sii-socota ah, iyo in baaritaanka farsamada BERT ay sii kordhiyaan si saxda ah oo ay u baaraandegaan dhinaca aad u weyn. Tusaale kaliya ayaa sameynaya isla xaalad farshaxan oo la mid ah nidaamka ugu sareeya ee la soo dhiibay shaqada la qaybsaday ee NLPCC-2019, kaas oo isticmaalaya model sameyn iyo BERT.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில், பாசிங் செயல்பாடு தானாகவே உள்ளமைப்பு உரைகளில் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது ஆழமான புதிய பிணையம் மாதிரிகளின் வேகம தற்போதைய பாடல் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கான மிகப் பெரிய சவாலானது என்னவென்றால் டொமைன் வெளியேறும் உரைகளில் பாடல் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துவதற்காகும் அது களம இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் பிரெட் செயல்களின் மூலம் தொடர்ந்து செல்லும் வார்த்தையின் பிரதிநிதிகளை மேம்படுத்த குறிப்பாக, நாம் மூன்று பிரதிநிதியாளர் பாது கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட ட டொமைன் முறைகளுக்கு எதிர்மறை கற்றலை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அதாவது, நேரடி கூட்டுதல் (CON), குணங்கள் மேம்படுத்தல் (FA), மற்றும் களம் மூடுதல் இரண  thus enabling to model more pure yet effective domain-specific and domain-invariant representations.  அதே நேரத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பெரிய அளவு இலக்கு- டோமைன் குறிப்பிடப்படாத தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி BERT மொழி மாதிரி இழப்புடன் மட்டும் நன்றாக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அதனால் நம்பிக்கை கொண்ட ஒரு பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட எதிரிய முறைகள் தொடர்ந்து முன்னேற்றத்தை அடைகிறது என்று  எங்கள் ஒற்றை மாதிரி அதே நிலையில் கலை செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது. NLPCC-2019-ல் மேல் வழங்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் உள்ளது, அது ஒத்திசைப்பாடு மாதிர', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں، پارسینگ کی عملکرد ڈومین کے متکس پر بہت اچھی طرح بہتر ہوتی ہے، جہاں عمیق نیورال نیورل نمڈل کی تیز پیشرفت کی وجہ سے۔ موجود پارسینگ تحقیقات کے لئے بہترین چال یہ ہے کہ ڈومین کے خارج ٹیکسٹ پر پارسینگ کی فعالیت کو زیادہ متفاوت کرنا ہے جبکہ صرف ایک چھوٹی اسکیل آواٹ ڈومین لیبل دی جاتی ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم نے مخالف تعلیم اور نیک تنظیم کرنے والے BERT پرسسوں کے ذریعے متوسط کلمات کی تعلیم کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. بالکل، ہم تین نماینٹروں کی نصف نظارت والی ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ کی طریقے پر مخالفت کی تعلیم لازم کرتے ہیں، یعنی سیدھی تعلیم (CON), فائدہ اضافہ (FA) اور ڈومین ایمبڈینگ (DE) کے ساتھ دو فائدہ استراتیجیوں کے ساتھ، یعنی متصلہ ٹوکیٹ ڈومین کی کلمات کی تعلیم اور ارت اسی طرح بہت پاکیزہ اور اثر والی ڈومین کے مطابق اور ڈومین-غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر اثر کی مدل کرنے کی امکان دیتا ہے. Similarly, we use a large-scale target-domain unlabeled data to fine-tune BERT with only the language model loss, thus obtaining reliable contextualized word representations that benefit for the cross-domain dependency parsing. ایک بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مخالفت کی تقریبا ثابت قدم رہتی ہے، اور نیک تنظیم BERT ایک بڑی مرز کے ذریعہ سے دقیق پارس کرنے کو اضافہ کرتا ہے. ہمارے واحد مدل نے NLPCC-2019 شریک کام میں سب سے زیادہ تحویل کی سیسٹم کے ساتھ ایک ایسی حالت کی فعالیت حاصل کرتی ہے جو انامبل مدل اور BERT کو استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Yaqinda yillarda, tashkilotni tajriba qilish domen matnlarida juda yaxshi o'zgarishdi, juda tez tarmoq modellari uchun. Joriy tashkilotni tahrirlash uchun eng muhim muammolari, domen textlaridan tashkilotni bajarish uchun bajarish natijasini bajarishi mumkin. Bu narsa faqat juda kichkina domen taʼminlovchisi maʼlumot yordamida o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu muammo bilan boshqarish uchun biz murakkablik o'rganish va BERT jarayonlarini bajarish orqali taxminan so'zlarni o'zlashtirishni istaysizmi. Muhimlik, biz uchta ta ta'lim o'rganishni o'rganamiz, balki direkt birlashtirish (CON), feature soʻzlashtirish (FA), domen ajratish (DE) va ikkita foydalanuvchi strategiya bilan ishlatish mumkin, balki target domen soʻzlarini tashkilotlari va ortogatsiya tartiblari, Shunday qilib, bu domen-specific va domen-invalid tashkilotlarini moslash mumkin. Shunday paytda, biz juda katta balandlik domen notoʻgʻri maʼlumotdan foydalanamiz, faqat tilning modeli yoʻqolishi mumkin, shunday qilib, biz cross-domen tashkilotlari uchun ishlatadigan soʻzni qo'llash mumkin. Benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibini taʼminlovchi imtiyozlar esa bizning davom etilgan motsiyalar davomida davom etish muvaffaqiyatlarini bajaradi va BERT yaxshi ko'proq bogʻ'liqni ajratish imkoniyatini bajaradi. Bizning bitta modelimiz, NLPCC-2019 bilan bir necha qanday ishlatilgan vazifani bir holatga amalga oshadi. Bu bir foydalanuvchi modellar va BERT bilan ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Những năm gần đây, khả năng phân tích phân tích của các văn bản nội bộ đã được cải thiện triệt để nhờ vào sự tiến nhanh của các mô hình mạng thần kinh sâu. Một thách thức lớn cho nghiên cứu phân tích hiện thời là cải thiện khả năng phân tích của các văn bản ngoài lĩnh vực rất khác với dữ liệu huấn luyện nội địa khi chỉ có một loại nhỏ trên lĩnh vực được đánh dấu dữ liệu. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị cải thiện các biểu hiện bằng các từ ngữ pháp qua các tiến trình nghiên cứu và nghiên cứu cẩn thận. Thực tế, chúng tôi áp dụng chương trình học ngược với ba phương pháp biến đổi miền đại diện, giám sát gần nhau, tức là kết hợp trực tiếp (CON), hiệu ứng dự đoán (FA) và cài ghép miền (de) với hai chiến lược hữu ích, ví dụ, các biểu tượng từ miền đích kết hợp và giới hạn tính theo chuẩn, Để mô tả các biểu hiện thuần khiết nhưng hiệu quả cụ thể miền và xâm lược miền. Cùng nhau, chúng tôi sử dụng một miền đích lớn vô hiệu hóa dữ liệu để hiệu chỉnh giao kèo BERT chỉ thua theo kiểu ngôn ngữ, nhờ đó đạt được các biểu hiện từ ngữ đáng tin cậy và kết hợp có lợi cho phân tích độ phụ thuộc thuộc thuộc thuộc thuộc chéo miền. Thí nghiệm trên một bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy phương pháp đối nghịch của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả nhất, và cải thiện giao thức thiếu sót tăng thêm độ chính xác. Mô hình duy nhất của chúng ta đạt được hiệu suất tuyệt vời như hệ thống được gửi lên hàng đầu trong nhiệm vụ chung của NLLLPCC-209, sử dụng các mô hình kết hợp và BERT.', 'bg': 'През последните години ефективността на анализирането е значително подобрена на текстовете в домейна благодарение на бързия напредък на моделите на дълбоки невронни мрежи. Основното предизвикателство за настоящите изследвания за анализиране е да се подобри ефективността на анализиране на текстове извън домейна, които са много различни от данните за обучение в домейна, когато има само малки данни извън домейна етикетирани. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме да подобрим контекстуализираните думи чрез съперническо обучение и фино настройване на процесите. Конкурсационно обучение прилагаме към три представителни полунадзорни метода за адаптиране на домейна, т.е. директно бетатениране (CON), увеличение на характеристиките (FA) и вграждане на домейн (DE) с две полезни стратегии, т.е. сливане на думи в целеви домейни и ограничения за ортогоналност, По този начин се дава възможност за моделиране на по-чисти, но ефективни, специфични за домейна и инвариращи представи. Едновременно с това използваме широкомащабни немаркирани данни за целеви домейни, за да преценим само загубата на езиковия модел, като по този начин получаваме надеждни контекстуализирани думи, които се възползват от анализирането на зависимостта между домейните. Експериментите върху сравнителен набор от данни показват, че предлаганите от нас противоречиви подходи постигат последователно подобрение, а фината настройка на BERT допълнително увеличава точността на анализирането с голям марж. Нашият единен модел постига същото най-съвременно представяне като топ подадената система в споделената задача, която използва ансамбълни модели и БЕРТ.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren zijn de parseringsprestaties drastisch verbeterd op in-domain teksten dankzij de snelle vooruitgang van diepe neurale netwerkmodellen. De grote uitdaging voor het huidige parsing onderzoek is het verbeteren van parsing prestaties op out-of-domain teksten die sterk verschillen van de in-domain trainingsgegevens wanneer er slechts kleinschalige buiten-domein gelabelde gegevens zijn. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we voor om de contextualiseerde woordrepresentaties te verbeteren door middel van tegenstrijdig leren en het fine-tunen van BERT processen. Concreet passen we adversariaal learning toe op drie representatieve semi-supervised domeinadaptiemethoden, namelijk directe aaneenschakeling (CON), feature augmentation (FA) en domein embedding (DE) met twee nuttige strategieën, namelijk samengevoegde doeldomeinwoordrepresentaties en orthogonale beperkingen. Dit maakt het mogelijk om meer zuivere maar effectieve domein-specifieke en domein-invariante representaties te modelleren. Tegelijkertijd gebruiken we een grootschalig doeldomein zonder label data om BERT af te stemmen met alleen het verlies van het taalmodel, waardoor betrouwbare contextualiseerde woordrepresentaties worden verkregen die baat hebben bij het parsen van afhankelijkheid tussen domeinen. Experimenten op een benchmark dataset tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde tegenstrijdige benaderingen consistente verbetering bereiken, en fine-tuning BERT verhoogt verder de nauwkeurigheid van het parsen met een grote marge. Ons single model bereikt dezelfde state-of-the-art prestaties als het top ingediende systeem in de NLPCC-2019 gedeelde taak, die gebruik maakt van ensemble modellen en BERT.', 'da': 'I de seneste år er parsing ydeevne dramatisk forbedret på in-domæne tekster takket være den hurtige udvikling af dybe neurale netværksmodeller. Den største udfordring for den nuværende analyseforskning er at forbedre fortolkningens ydeevne på uden for domænet tekster, der er meget forskellige fra inden for domænet træningsdata, når der kun er en lille skala uden for domænet mærket data. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi at forbedre de kontekstualiserede ordrepræsentationer via modstridende læring og finjustere BERT-processer. Konkret anvender vi modstridende læring til tre repræsentative semi-overvågede domænetilpasningsmetoder, dvs. direkte sammenkobling (CON), feature augmentation (FA) og domænetilpasning (DE) med to nyttige strategier, dvs. fusionerede mål-domæne ordrepræsentationer og ortogonalitetsbegrænsninger, hvilket gør det muligt at modellere mere rene, men effektive domænespecifikke og domæneinvariante repræsentationer. Samtidig udnytter vi et omfattende måldomænenumærket data til at finjustere BERT med kun tabet af sprogmodel, hvorved vi opnår pålidelige kontekstualiserede ordrepræsentationer, der gavner fortolkningen af afhængighed på tværs af domæner. Eksperimenter med et benchmark datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede modstridende tilgange opnår konsekvent forbedring, og finjustering af BERT øger fortolkningsnøjagtigheden yderligere med en stor margin. Vores enkeltmodel opnår samme state-of-the-art ydeevne som det bedst indsendte system i NLPCC-2019 delte opgave, som bruger ensemblemodeller og BERT.', 'hr': 'Za posljednje godine, analiziranje učinka je dramatično poboljšano u tekstima u domenu zahvaljujući brzom napretku dubokih modela neuronske mreže. Najvažniji izazov za trenutne istraživanje analize je poboljšati učinkovitost analize na tekstima izvan domena koji su veoma različiti od podataka o obuci u domenu kada postoje samo mali podaci označeni izvan domena. Za rješavanje ovog problema, predlažemo poboljšati kontekstualizirane riječi predstavljanja putem neprijateljskog učenja i postupaka BERT-a. Konačno, primjenjujemo neprijateljsko učenje na tri reprezentativne metode prilagodbe domena s polu nadzorom, tj. direktne concatenacije (CON), povećanje funkcija (FA) i ugrađenje domena (DE) sa dvije korisne strategije, tj. kombinirane predstave riječi o ciljnoj domenu i ograničenja ortogonalnosti, To omogućava modelu čišće i učinkovitije zastupanja domena specifičnih domena i domena invaričnih. Istodobno, koristimo veliki ciljni domen bez imenovanih podataka za finaliziranje BERT-a samo s gubitkom jezičkog modela, tako da dobijemo pouzdane kontekstualizacije riječi koje koriste za analizu zavisnosti preko domena. Eksperimenti na setu podataka o kriteriji pokazuju da naši predloženi neprijateljski pristupi postignu konsekventno poboljšanje, a finaliziranje BERT-a dalje povećava preciznost parsiranja velikom marginom. Naš jedini model postiže iste postupke umjetnosti kao najviši podignuti sustav u zajedničkom zadatku NLPCC-2019, koji koristi modele osiguranja i BERT.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren wurde die Parsing-Performance von In-Domain-Texten dank des schnellen Fortschritts von Deep Neuron Network Modellen drastisch verbessert. Die große Herausforderung für die aktuelle Parsing-Forschung besteht darin, die Parsing-Performance von Out-of-Domain-Texten zu verbessern, die sich stark von den In-Domain-Trainingsdaten unterscheiden, wenn es nur kleine, außerhalb-Domain markierte Daten gibt. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schlagen wir vor, die kontextualisierten Wortdarstellungen durch adversariales Lernen und Feinabstimmung von BERT-Prozessen zu verbessern. Konkret wenden wir adversariales Lernen auf drei repräsentative semi-überwachte Domänenanpassungsmethoden an, d.h. direkte Verkettung (CON), Feature Augmentation (FA) und Domain Embedding (DE) mit zwei nützlichen Strategien, d.h. fused Target-Domain Wortrepräsentationen und Orthogonalitätsbeschränkungen, Dadurch können reinere und effektive domänenspezifische und domaininvariante Repräsentationen modelliert werden. Gleichzeitig nutzen wir eine großflächige Zieldomain-nicht-beschriftete Daten, um BERT mit nur dem Verlust des Sprachmodells zu verfeinern und so zuverlässige kontextualisierte Wortrepräsentationen zu erhalten, die für die domänenübergreifende Dependency Parsing von Nutzen sind. Experimente an einem Benchmark-Datensatz zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagenen gegensätzlichen Ansätze eine konsistente Verbesserung erzielen, und die Feinabstimmung von BERT erhöht die Parsing-Genauigkeit um einen großen Spielraum. Unser Einzelmodell erreicht die gleiche State-of-the-Art Performance wie das Top-eingereichte System in der NLPCC-2019 Shared Task, die Ensemble-Modelle und BERT verwendet.', 'id': 'Dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, penanalisan prestasi dramatis diperbaiki pada teks dalam domain berkat kemajuan cepat dari model jaringan saraf dalam. tantangan utama untuk penelitian penghuraian saat ini adalah untuk meningkatkan prestasi penghuraian teks luar domain yang sangat berbeda dari data latihan dalam domain ketika hanya ada data kecil yang ditabel luar domain. Untuk menangani masalah ini, kami mengusulkan untuk meningkatkan perwakilan kata kontekstualisasi melalui pembelajaran musuh dan memperbaiki proses BERT. Secara konkret, kami menerapkan pembelajaran musuh untuk tiga metode persediaan domain semi-mengawasi, i.e., konkatenasi langsung (CON), peningkatan fitur (FA), dan penerbangan domain (DE) dengan dua strategi berguna, i.e., persediaan target-domain kata dan batasan ortogonalitas, Jadi memungkinkan untuk model lebih murni namun efektif representation domain-spesifik dan domain-invarian. Sama-sama, kita menggunakan data target-domain skala besar yang tidak disebut untuk memperbaiki BERT dengan hanya kehilangan model bahasa, sehingga mendapatkan perwakilan kata kontekstualisasi yang dapat manfaat untuk penghuraian dependensi cross-domain. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan musuh kami yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan konsisten, dan memperbaiki BERT lebih meningkatkan akurasi penghuraian dengan margin besar. Model tunggal kita mencapai prestasi terbaik yang sama dengan sistem terkirim atas dalam tugas berbagi NLPCC-2019, yang menggunakan model ensemble dan BERT.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 심도 신경 네트워크 모델의 신속한 발전으로 분야 내 텍스트의 해석 성능이 현저하게 향상되었다.현재 문법 분석 연구가 직면한 주요 도전은 작은 범위의 역외 표기 데이터만 있을 때 역외 텍스트에 대한 문법 분석 성능을 어떻게 향상시키는가이다. 이런 텍스트는 역내 훈련 데이터와 크게 다르다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해서 우리는 대항식 학습과 미세 조정 과정을 통해 어경화된 단어 표시를 개선할 것을 건의합니다.구체적으로 대항식 학습을 대표적인 반감독 영역 적응 방법인 직접연결(CON), 특징강화(FA), 영역삽입(DE) 세 가지에 적용하고, 목표 영역어 표시와 정교 계약을 융합하는 두 가지 유용한 전략을 사용한다.따라서 더욱 순수하지만 효과적인 영역의 특정과 영역의 불변표시를 모델링할 수 있다.또한 대규모 타겟 도메인에 데이터가 표시되지 않고 언어 모델이 손실된 경우에만 BERT를 미세하게 조정하여 신뢰할 수 있는 상하 문화 단어 표시를 얻어 도메인 간 의존 분석에 도움이 됩니다.하나의 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 의하면 우리가 제시한 대항적인 방법은 일치된 개선을 실현했고 BERT를 미세하게 조정하여 해석 정밀도를 더욱 크게 향상시켰다.우리의 단일 모델은 NLPCC-2019 공유 작업 중 최고급 제출 시스템과 같은 최첨단 성능을 실현했고 이 작업은 통합 모델과 BERT를 사용한다.', 'fa': 'در سال های اخیر، تحلیل کردن عملکرد در متن های دامنی به شدت توسط پیشرفت سریع مدل شبکه عصبی عمیق بهتر شده است. چالش بزرگی برای تحقیقات تجزیه فعلی اینه که عملکرد تجزیه کردن روی متن های خارج از دامنه های آموزش در دامنه بسیار متفاوت از داده های آموزش در دامنه هنگامی که فقط یک مقیاس کوچک از دامنه های برچسب شده است. برای حل با این مشکل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط را از طریق یادگیری دشمنی و روش\u200cهای BERT را بهتر کنیم. مخصوصاً ما درس مخالفت را به سه روش تغییر\u200cسازی دامنه\u200cی نیمه\u200cنظارت، یعنی تغییر\u200cسازی مستقیم (CON), افزایش\u200cسازی (FA) و دامنه\u200cسازی (DE) با دو استراتژی مفید، یعنی نمایش\u200cسازی کلمه\u200cهای دامنه\u200cی هدف\u200cسازی و محدودیت\u200cهای ارتفاع\u200cسا این باعث می\u200cشود نمونه\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cتر و تاثیر\u200cگیری\u200cتر از دامنه\u200cهای خاص و دامنه\u200cی غیرقابل تحریک باشد. همچنین، ما از یک مقیاس مقیاس بزرگی اطلاعات بدون استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا بتوانیم BERT را با فقدان مدل زبانی استفاده کنیم، به نتیجه نمایش\u200cدهندگان کلمه\u200cهای مطمئنی که برای ویرایش بستگی\u200cهای مختلف دامنه سود می\u200cدهند. تجربه\u200cهایی روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقداری نشان می\u200cدهند که دسترسی پیشنهاد دشمنی ما به بهترین رسیده است، و تنظیم BERT بیشتر دقیق را با یک مرز بزرگ تحلیل می\u200cکند. مدل تنها ما همان فعالیت وضعیت هنری را به عنوان اولین سیستم تحویل داده شده در وضعیت مشترک NLPCC-2019 رسیده است که از مدل\u200cهای عبارت و BERT استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, utendaji wa wimbo wa parsing umeboreshwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwenye maandishi ya ndani, shukrani kwa maendeleo ya haraka ya mitandao ya kijamii. The major challenge for current parsing research is to improve parsing performance on out-of-domain texts that are very different from the in-domain training data when there is only a small-scale out-domain labeled data.  Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, tunapendekeza kuboresha uwakilizaji wa neno lililojadiliwa kwa kupitia mafunzo ya upinzani na michakato mazuri ya BERT. Kwa hakika, tunatumia kujifunza upinzani kwa njia tatu za mwakilishi waliokuwa wakifuatiliwa na sekondari ya ndani, yaani ushirikiano wa moja kwa moja (CON), kuongeza sifa (FA), na kuongeza ndani (DE) kwa mikakati mawili yenye manufaa, yaani, uwakilishi wa maneno ya ndani na vikwazo vya upinzani, Kwa hiyo inawezesha kuonyesha uwakilishi wa ndani na mahususi ya ndani. Wakati huohuo, tunatumia taarifa kubwa ya malengo yasiyotambuliwa kwa ajili ya BERT yenye kupoteza kwa mifano ya lugha pekee, kwa hiyo tunapata uwakilishi wa maneno yanayotegemea ambao unafaa kwa ajili ya parge ya kutegemea matumaini ya ndani. Majaribio kwenye seti ya taarifa za bendera yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa za upinzani zinafanikiwa kuboresha hali ya kawaida, na kuboresha vizuri vya BERT kwa kiasi kikubwa kinaongezeka kuendelea sahihi kwa kiwango kikubwa. Mfano wetu pekee unafanikiwa utendaji huo wa sanaa kama mfumo wa juu ulioandaliwa katika kazi ya NLPCC-2019, unaotumia mifano na BERT.', 'tr': "Son ýyllar içinde analyzam çözgütlerini domynda tekstlerde gaty gowylaşdyrylýar. Häzirki analýşim araştyrmalary üçin esasy kynçylyk çözümlenmeleri out-of-domain textlerinde analýşim eserini geliştirmek üçin dir. Olar domençä eğitim maglumatyndan örän farklı bolar, eger diňe kiçi-ölçekli out-domain etiket edilen maglumaty bar. Bu meseleyi çözmek için, çevrili öğrenmek ve BERT işlemlerini düzeltmek için teklif ediyoruz. Concretely, we apply adversarial learning to three representative semi-supervised domain adaption methods, i.e., direct concatenation (CON), feature augmentation (FA), and domain embedding (DE) with two useful strategies, i.e., fused target-domain word representations and orthogonality constraints, Bu şekilde daha täsirli halda üstünlikli domena we domena-iň gaýratyp suratlaryny nusga etmäge mümkin edýär. Munuň ýagdaýda, BERT'i diňe dil nusgasy bilen laňlamak üçin uly bir hedef domynyny ullanýarys, şonuň üçin cross-domain bağlanylyk analysi üçin peýdalanmayan sözleri tapylýar. Bir benchmark veri setindeki denetimler biziň teklip eden teňkil yaklaşymyz sürekli gelişmelere ýetişip barýar we BERT taýýarlamak üçin ýeterlik derejesi uly gabdaly tarapyndan çözdirir. Biziň ýeke nusgamyz NLPCC-2019'da esasy taýýarlanan täzeliklerimizi ýetip ýetirýär. Bu nusgalary we BERT'den ullanýar.", 'sq': 'Në vitet e fundit, analizimi i performancës përmirësohet dramatikisht në tekstet në domeni falë përparimit të shpejtë të modeleve të rrjetit nervor të thellë. Sfida kryesore për analizimin aktual të kërkimeve është të përmirësohet analizimi i performancës në tekste jashtë domenit që janë shumë të ndryshme nga të dhënat e trajnimit në domeni kur ekzistojnë vetëm të dhënat e shënuara në shkallë të vogël jashtë domenit. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne propozojmë të përmirësojmë përfaqësimet e fjalëve kontekstuale nëpërmjet mësimit kundërshtar dhe rregullimit të proceseve BERT. Në mënyrë konkrete, ne aplikojmë mësimin kundërshtar në tre metoda përfaqësuese të përshtatjes së domenisë gjysmë-mbikqyrure, pra, concatenation i drejtpërdrejtë (CON), rritje e funksioneve (FA) dhe përfshirje e domenisë (DE) me dy strategji të dobishme, i.e., përfaqësime të përbashkëta të fjalëve të domenisë-objekt dhe kufizime ortogonaliteti, Kështu që mund të modelojmë përfaqësime më të pastra por më të efektshme specifike për domenin dhe invariante për domenin. Në të njëjtën kohë, ne përdorim një të dhënë në skalë të madhe të domenit objektiv pa etiketë për të përshtatur BERT me vetëm humbjen e modelit gjuhësor, duke marrë kështu përfaqësime të besueshme kontekstuale fjalësh që përfitojnë për analizimin e varësisë ndër-domeni. Eksperimentet në një sërë të dhënash referenciale tregojnë se metodat tona kundërshtare të propozuara arrijnë përmirësim konsistent dhe rregullimi i BERT rrit më tej analizimin e saktësisë me një margin të madh. Modeli ynë i vetëm arrin të njëjtin shfaqje më të lartë si sistemi më i lartë i paraqitur në detyrën e përbashkët NLPCC-2019, i cili përdor modelet e ensembleve dhe BERT.', 'af': "In onlangse jaar is die verwerking van prestasie dramatiese verbeter op in-domein teks dankie aan die vinnige vordering van diep neuralnetwerk modele. Die groot uitdrukking vir huidige verwerking ondersoek is om te verbeter verwerking effektiviteit op uit-domein teks wat baie anders is van die in-domein ondersoeking data wanneer daar slegs 'n klein-skaal uit-domein gemerkte data is. Om hierdie probleem te behandel, laat ons voorstel om die kontekstualiseerde woord voorstellings te verbeter deur teëstandige leer en fin-tuning van BERT prosesse. Ons aanwend teenstandaarlike leer aan drie reprezentante semi-ondersoekte domein aanpassing metodes, t.e. direkte samelewing (CON), funksie augmentasie (FA), en domein inbêring (DE) met twee nuttige strategies, t.e. gefokusde doel-domein woord voorstellings en orthogonaliteit beheinings, Daarom laat toe om meer rein nog effektief domein-spesifieke en domein-invariant voorstellings te model. Ons gebruik dieselfde 'n groot-skaal doel-domein ongeabelde data na fin-tune BERT met slegs die taal model verlies, sodat ons verkry betroubare contextualiseerde woord voorstellings wat voordeel vir die kruisdomein afhanklikheid verwerking. Eksperimente op 'n benchmarkdatastel vertoon dat ons voorgestelde teenstandaarlike toegang bestaan bestaande verbetering, en fin-tuning BERT verder verhoog die verwerking van presisiteit deur 'n groot marge. Ons enkele model bereik dieselfde state-of-the-art-performance as die boonste ingestuurde stelsel in die NLPCC-2019 gedeelde taak, wat gebruik ensemble modele en BERT.", 'am': 'በቅርብ ዓመታት፣ የፓርቲው የድምፅ ጽሑፎች በጠቅላላ የናቡር መረብ ሞዴላዎችን ለመቀናኘት ግለጽን በማድረግ ተሻግሮአል፡፡ የአሁኑ ማኅበረሰብ ትልቁ ግንኙነት የዶሜን ጽሑፎች የውጭ የዶሜን ጽሑፎችን ማሻሻል ነው፡፡ ከውጭ የዶሜን ትምህርት ዳታዎች ብቻ የተለየ ትልቅ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመከላከል፣ በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት እና የBERT ፕሮጀክቶችን በመጠቀም የቁጥጥር ቃላትን መክፈቻን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ፣ ለሦስት ተቃዋሚዎች የsemi-ተጠባባቂ ዶሜን አቀማመጥ ሥርዓት፣ አቀናኝነት (CON)፣ የአፍሪካዊ ማድረግ (FA) እና የውይይይት አቀማመጥ (DE) በተጠቃሚ ስርዓት፣ ያይናል፣ የግንኙነት ቃላት እና የክፍለ ግንኙነት ግንኙነት፣ ስለዚህም የዶሜን-አካባቢ እና የውይይት ግንኙነት እና የውይይት ግንኙነትን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪው ሰዓት በቋንቋው ሞዴል ብቻ ሲያሳስል ብሬቴንን በተለየ ትልቅ አካላቢ-ዶሜን በመጠቀም እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በbenchmark ዳታ ማሰናከል ላይ ፈተናዎች በተቃዋሚ ደረጃዎች አካሄዱን ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲያገኙ እና የBERT ውጤት በተለየ ትልቅ ማረፊያ ማሳየትን እንዲያሳድጋል፡፡ በNLPCC-2019 ተካፈለ ስራ ውስጥ የተሰራጨውን የልዩ ሥርዓት ሥርዓት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে ডোমেইন টেক্সটে পার্সিং পার্সিং প্রদর্শনের কার্যক্রম গভীরে গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলের দ্রুত বর্তমান পার্সিং গবেষণার জন্য প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে ডোমেইন টেক্সটের বাইরে পার্সিং পার্সিং পার্সিং পার্সিং করার জন্য যা ডোমেইনের প্রশিক্ষণের এই সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বিরোধী শিক্ষা এবং ভালো প্রক্রিয়ার মাধ্যমে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত শব্দের প্রতিনিধি নিশ্চিতভাবে আমরা তিনটি প্রতিনিধি সেমি পর্যবেক্ষিত ডোমেইন আডেশন পদ্ধতিতে বিরোধী শিক্ষা প্রয়োগ করি, যেমন সরাসরি সংযোগ (CON), বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্য বৃদ্ধি এবং ডোমেইন বিভিন্ন কৌশলের মাধ্যমে দুটি ব্যবহ যার ফলে কার্যকর ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট এবং ডোমেইন-অভিযানের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মডেল তৈরি করতে পারে। Simultaneously, we utilize a large-scale target-domain unlabeled data to fine-tune BERT with only the language model loss, thus obtaining reliable contextualized word representations that benefit for the cross-domain dependency parsing.  বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বিরোধীদের পদক্ষেপ সম্পূর্ণ উন্নতি পাওয়া যায় এবং বিবেরেটের সুন্দর পর এনএলপিসিসি-২০১৯ সালের শেয়ার কর্মসূচিতে আমাদের একই মডেল পাওয়া যায়, যা এনএলপিসিসি-২০১৯ সালের শেয়ার কর্মসূচী প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যা এক', 'bs': 'Za poslednje godine, analiziranje učinka je dramatično poboljšano na tekstima u domenu zahvaljujući brzom napretku dubokih modela neuralne mreže. Najvažniji izazov za trenutne istraživanje analize je poboljšati učinkovitost analize na tekstima izvan domena koji su veoma različiti od podataka o obuci u domenu kada postoje samo mali podaci označeni izvan domena. Za rješavanje ovog problema predlažemo da poboljšamo kontekstualizirane riječi predstavljanja putem neprijateljskog učenja i procesa BERT-a. Konačno, primjenjujemo neprijateljsko učenje na tri reprezentativne metode prilagodbe domena polu nadzorne, tj. direktne concatentacije (CON), povećanje funkcija (FA) i ugrađenje domena (DE) sa dvije korisne strategije, tj. kombinovane predstave riječi o ciljnoj domenu i ograničenja ortogonalnosti, To omogućava da modeli čišće, ali efikasnije predstave domena specifičnih i domena invariantnih predstavljanja. Istodobno, koristimo velike ciljne domene bez imenovanih podataka za finaliziranje BERT sa samo gubitkom jezičkog model a, tako da dobijemo pouzdane kontekstualizacije riječi koje koriste za analizu zavisnosti preko domena. Eksperimenti na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naši predloženi neprijateljski pristupi postignu konsekventno poboljšanje, a finaliziranje BERT dalje povećava parsiranje preciznosti velikom marginom. Naš jedini model postiže iste postupke umjetnosti kao najviši podignuti sistem u zajedničkom zadatku NLPCC-2019, koji koristi modele osiguranja i BERT.', 'az': "Son illərdə, analiz performansı dərin nöral ağ modellerinin tez ilerlemesinin səbəbi ilə dərin mətnlərin içində çox yaxşılaşdırılır. Hazırkı analiz araştırmalarının ən böyük çətinlikləri domena təhsil məlumatlarından çox fərqli olan təhsil məlumatlarından ayırmaq performansını yaxşılaşdırmaqdır. Bu problemlə çəkilmək üçün, müxtəlif sözlərin ifadə edilməsini və BERT prosesləri ilə düzəltməsini təklif edirik. Daha doğrusu, biz döyüşlük öyrənməyi üç temsilci yarı-gözləyirli domena adaptasyon metodlarına istifadə edirik, yoxsulluq çoxluğu (CON), fəaliyyət çoxluğu (FA) və domena qatışmağı iki faydalı strateji ilə, t.i. birləşdirilmiş məqsəd domena sözləri və orthogonallıq müəyyənləşdirilməsi üçün, Beləliklə daha təmiz halda etkili domena və domena-istifadəçi göstəriciləri modelləyə qadirdir. Similarly, biz çox ölçülü məqsəd domeini BERT'i yalnız dil modellərini itirmək üçün təmizlənmədiyimiz məlumatları istifadə edirik, buna görə də çox domain bağımlılığı ayırmaq üçün fayda verən güvenilir contextualized söz göstəriciləri alırıq. Bir benchmark veri qutusundakı təcrübələr göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş düşmənçilik yaxınlıqlarımız müəyyən bir düzəltməyə yetişir və BERT düzəltməsi daha çox böyük bir margin ilə ədaləti ayırmağı artırar. Bizim tək modelimiz NLPCC-2019 paylaşılmış işlərdə olan ən yüksək sistem ilə istifadə edilən sanat performansını başa çatdırır. Bu modelləri və BERT istifadə edir.", 'ca': "En els últims anys, l'analisi del rendiment s'ha millorat dramàticament en els textos en domini gràcies al ràpid progrés dels models de xarxa neural profunda. El repte principal de la recerca d'analització actual és millorar el rendiment d'analització de textos for a de domini que són molt diferents de les dades d'entrenament en domini quan només hi ha una petita escala de dades etiquetades fora de domini. Per tractar aquest problema, proposem millorar les representacions contextualitzades de paraules mitjançant l'aprenentatge adversari i ajustar els processos BERT. Concretament, aplicam l'aprenentatge adversari a tres mètodes representatius d'adaptació semisupervisades de domini, és a dir, concatenació directa (CON), augmentació de característiques (FA) i incorporació de domini (DE) amb dues estratègies útils, és a dir, representacions fusionades de paraules de domini-alvo i restriccions d'ortogonalitat, i així permet modelar representacions més pures i efectives per domini i invariants. Al mateix temps, utilitzem una gran escala de dades sense etiqueta de domini-alvo per ajustar BERT amb només la pèrdua del model de llenguatge, obtenint representacions de paraules contextualitzades fiables que beneficiin per l'analització de la dependencia entre dominis. Els experiments d'un conjunt de dades de referència demostren que els nostres enfocaments adversaris proposats aconsegueixen millorar constantment, i la perfeccionació del BERT augmenta encara més la precisió de l'analització en un gran marge. El nostre únic model aconsegueix el mateix rendiment d'última edat que el sistema suposat de la tasca compartida NLPCC-2019, que utilitza models conjunts i BERT.", 'cs': 'V posledních letech se výkon parsování u textů v doméně dramaticky zlepšil díky rychlému pokroku modelů hlubokých neuronových sítí. Hlavní výzvou současného výzkumu parsování je zlepšit výkon parsování mimo doménu textů, které se velmi liší od výcvikových dat v doméně, když existují pouze malá data označená mimo doménu. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme zlepšit kontextualizované reprezentace slov prostřednictvím adversariálního učení a jemného ladění BERT procesů. Konkrétně aplikujeme adversariální učení na tři reprezentativní metody semi-supervisované adaptace domén, tj. přímé řetězcování (CON), rozšíření funkcí (FA) a vložení domén (DE) se dvěma užitečnými strategiemi, tj. fúzovanými reprezentacemi slov v cílové doméně a omezeními ortogonality, umožňuje modelovat čistější, ale efektivnější doménově specifické a doménově invariantní reprezentace. Současně využíváme rozsáhlá data bez označení cílové domény k jemnému ladění BERT pouze se ztrátou jazykového modelu, čímž získáme spolehlivé kontextualizované reprezentace slov, které mají prospěch pro analýzu závislosti mezi doménami. Experimenty na referenčním datovém souboru ukazují, že naše navrhované kontroverzní přístupy dosahují konzistentního zlepšování a jemné ladění BERT dále zvyšuje přesnost analýzy o velký rozpětí. Náš jeden model dosahuje stejného nejmodernějšího výkonu jako nejvyšší předložený systém ve sdíleném úkolu NLPCC-2019, který využívá souborové modely a BERT.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on domeenisiseste tekstide parsimise jõudlus märkimisväärselt paranenud tänu sügavate närvivõrgumudelite kiirele arengule. Praeguse parsimistegevuse peamine väljakutse on parandada parsimise tulemuslikkust domeeniväliste tekstide puhul, mis erinevad väga domeenivälistest koolitusandmetest, kui on olemas vaid väikesemahulised domeenivälised märgistatud andmed. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks teeme ettepaneku parandada kontekstipõhiseid sõnade esitusi vastandliku õppe ja BERT-protsesside täpsustamise kaudu. Konkreetselt rakendame vastastikust õppimist kolme esindusliku pooljuhitava domeeni kohandamise meetodi suhtes, st otsese konkatenatsiooni (CON), funktsioonide suurendamise (FA) ja domeeni manustamise (DE) kahe kasuliku strateegiaga, st sihtdomeeni sõnade esitamise ja ortogonaalsuse piirangutega, võimaldades modelleerida puhtamaid, kuid efektiivsemaid domeenispetsiifilisi ja domeeniinvariantseid esitusi. Samal ajal kasutame suuremahulisi sihtdomeeni märgistamata andmeid BERT-i peenhäälestamiseks ainult keelemudeli kaotamisega, saavutades seega usaldusväärsed kontekstilised sõnade esitused, mis kasutavad domeenidevahelist sõltuvuse parsimist. Võrdlusandmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie pakutud vastastikused lähenemisviisid saavutavad järjepideva paranemise ning BERT-i peenhäälestamine suurendab parsimise täpsust veelgi suure marginaali võrra. Meie üksikmudel saavutab sama tipptasemel jõudluse kui NLPCC-2019 jagatud ülesande tipptasemel esitatud süsteem, mis kasutab ansambli mudeleid ja BERTi.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina sisäisten tekstien jäsennyssuorituskyky on parantunut merkittävästi syvähermoverkkomallien nopean kehityksen ansiosta. Nykyaikaisen parsaustutkimuksen suurin haaste on parantaa parsauksen suorituskykyä verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolisissa teksteissä, jotka eroavat hyvin verkkotunnuksen sisäisistä koulutustiedoista, kun on olemassa vain pieni verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolinen tieto. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kontekstualisoitujen sanaesitysten parantamista kontekstuaalisen oppimisen ja BERT-prosessien hienosäätön avulla. Kontrastiaalista oppimista sovelletaan kolmeen edustukselliseen puolivalvottuun domain-sopeutusmenetelmään, eli suoraan konkatenaatioon (CON), feature augmentation (FA) ja domain upotukseen (DE) kahdella hyödyllisellä strategialla, eli yhdistetyillä kohdedomain-sanaesityksillä ja ortogonaalisuusrajoituksilla. Näin voidaan mallintaa puhtaampia mutta tehokkaampia toimialueekohtaisia ja toimialueen invariantteja esityksiä. Samanaikaisesti hyödynnämme laajaa kohdeverkkotunnuksen merkitsemätöntä dataa BERT:n hienosäätöön vain kielimallin menetyksellä, jolloin saamme luotettavia kontekstualisoituja sanaesityksiä, jotka hyötyvät verkkotunnusten välisestä riippuvuuden jäsentämisestä. Vertailutietoaineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotetut vastakkaiset lähestymistapamme parantavat johdonmukaisesti ja BERT:n hienosäätö lisää edelleen jäsennystarkkuutta suurella marginaalilla. Yksikkömallimme saavuttaa saman huipputason suorituskyvyn kuin NLPCC-2019:n jaetussa tehtävässä, jossa käytetään ensemblemalleja ja BERT:tä.', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում արտադրողությունների վերլուծումը դրամական բարելավում է բնագավառի տեքստների վերաբերյալ, շնորհիվ խորը նյարդային ցանցի մոդելների արագ առաջընթացի: Այսօրվա վերլուծության ուսումնասիրությունների հիմնական մարտահրավերն այն է, որ բարելավենք արտաքին տեքստերի վերլուծությունը, որոնք շատ տարբերվում են արտաքին ուսումնասիրության տվյալներից, երբ կան միայն փոքր մասշտաբով արտաքին տվյալներ, որոնք պիտակում են: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք բարելավել կոնտեքստիալ բառերի ներկայացումները հակառակ սովորելու և բարելավելու BER գործընթացների միջոցով: Իրականում, մենք օգտագործում ենք հակառակ ուսումնասիրությունը երեք ներկայացուցիչ կես-վերահսկվող բնագավառի ադապտացիոն մեթոդների վրա, այսինքն, ուղղակի հակառակցման (CON), առանձնահատկությունների աճի (FA) և բնագավառի ներգրավման (DED) երկու օգտակար ռազմավարություններով, այսինքն՝ խառնված նպատակի-բնագավա Այսպիսով, հնարավորություն է տալիս մոդելավորել ավելի մաքուր, բայց արդյունավետ տիեզերական և տիեզերական ներկայացումներ: Միևնույն ժամանակ, մենք օգտագործում ենք մեծ մասշտաբով նպատակային տիեզերքում բացահայտված տվյալներ, որպեսզի կարգավորենք BER-ը միայն լեզվային մոդելի կորստի հետ, որպեսզի ստանանք վստահելի կոնտեքստիալ բառերի ներկայացումներ, որոնք օգտակար են տիեզերքի միջ Experiments on a benchmark dataset show that our proposed adversarial approaches achieve consistent improvement, and fine-tuning BERT further boosts parsing accuracy by a large margin.  Մեր միակ մոդելը հասնում է նույն ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքներին, ինչ ամենաբարձր ներկայացված համակարգը ՆԼՊԿԿ-2019-ի ընդհանուր հանձնարարության մեջ, որը օգտագործում է համակարգչային մոդելներ և BER-ը:', 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih se je zmogljivost analiziranja na domenskih besedilih dramatično izboljšala zaradi hitrega napredka modelov globokih nevronskih omrežij. Glavni izziv trenutnih raziskav razčlenitve je izboljšati učinkovitost razčlenitve besedil zunaj domene, ki se zelo razlikujejo od podatkov o usposabljanju v domeni, kadar obstajajo le majhni podatki zunaj domene označeni. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo izboljšanje kontekstualiziranih besednih predstavitev prek kontekstualnega učenja in natančnega uravnavanja BERT procesov. Konverzijsko učenje uporabljamo za tri reprezentativne polnadzorovane metode prilagajanja domenskih področij, tj. neposredno konkatenacijo (CON), povečanje funkcij (FA) in vdelavo domenskih področij (DE) z dvema uporabnima strategijama, tj. združenimi predstavitvami besed ciljne domene in omejitvami pravokotnosti, tako omogoča modeliranje čistejših, a učinkovitejših domensko specifičnih in invariantnih predstavitev. Hkrati uporabljamo obsežne podatke z neoznačenimi ciljnimi domenami za natančno nastavitev BERT samo z izgubo jezikovnega modela, s čimer pridobimo zanesljive kontekstualizirane besedne predstavitve, ki koristijo razčlenitvi meddomenske odvisnosti. Poskusi na referenčnem naboru podatkov kažejo, da naši predlagani kontradikcijski pristopi dosegajo dosledno izboljšanje, natančno nastavitev BERT pa dodatno povečuje natančnost razčlenjanja za veliko maržo. Naš enotni model dosega enako najsodobnejšo zmogljivost kot najboljši predloženi sistem v skupni nalogi NLPCC-2019, ki uporablja ansamble modele in BERT.', 'ha': "A cikin shekara na farko, an improve performance na parse mai girma a cikin littafan-guda masu taki ga haraka na samun misãlai na ƙarurar neura. Babbar muhimmin zartarwa wa tafarkin yin parse yanzu ni'ani da ya improve parse mai fassarar matsayin na-bayan-littattafai waɗanda suke yin sãɓa sana daga data masu tsari cikin-Domin idan ana da danne masu ƙarami na-dukkan-Domen da aka rubũta. To, domin ka yi aiki da wannan mataimaki, Munã bukãta wajen improve maganar macalli da aka haɗa a shi a bayan karantawa da kuma masu gyarawa na BERT. Tsammãnin, za mu amfani da kwamfyuta zuwa hanyoyin adadin wanda aka tsare (CON), na rubutun (FA), da kuma a ƙara cikin wuyan kambu biyu masu amfani da shi, misali, an sami tsarin maganar-Domen da aka samu tsari da kuma tsarin orthogonity, @ info: whatsthis Aka samun, munã amfani da data masu girma da bai yi amfani ba ga BERT da hasara kawai na misãlan harshen, don haka kuma munã iya amfani da shaidar maganar da ke da inganci wanda ke amfani da shi ga parse-ɗabi'a mai maras-Domen. Experiments on a set of bangbangon data show that the buƙatan hanyõyinmu da ke buƙata, za'a sami amfani da shiryoyin BERT, kuma yana ƙara yin parse tsari da tsari mai girma. Shiryayõyinmu guda na sami da halin-sanar kamar ƙarami wanda aka samar da shi a cikin aikin shirin NLPCC-2019, wanda ke amfani da misãlai da BERT.", 'jv': "cage-cage setung, cage-cage uwong kaleh tarjamahan The big shock for current PASSing R&D is to advance PASSing success on out-of-domain texts that are really new from the in-domain tutorial data when there is only a small-scale out-domain label data. Ngawe nggawe Perintah sing beraksi iki, kita supoyo nggawe Perintah sing beraksi barêng kelas telu nggawe barang seneng pisan pakan negoro nggawe barang nggawe barang sistem BERT. concretly, we use contrastorial Learning to third represent semi-super Vised domain modification Methods, i.e. immediate concatenation (CoN), character agement (Afrika), and domain embedding - so enableg to model again purge only Effect domain-special and domain-invariant representations. The first argument is 'software and source' for the first time. Simultaneous, we use a big-scale goal-domain Unlabated data to Fintune BERT with only the language model lose, so Get Relable contextual word representations that benevolve for the inter-domain diphensible PASSing. xref model sing tek dadi iso nggawe barang-sistem sing dumadhi iki dadi-kalem karo sistem sing nyimpen nggawe NLPC-2011, sing wis nambah model sing ngentambah karo BERT.", 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་མིག The major challenge for current parsing research is to improve parsing performance on out-of-domain texts that are very different from the in-domain training data when there is only a small-scale out-domain labeled data. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་གནད་དོན་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ལ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཚོར་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གཞན་རྣམས་མངོན་གཏོང་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། Concretely, we apply adversarial learning to three representative semi-supervised domain adaption methods, i.e., direct concatenation (CON), feature augmentation (FA), and domain embedding (DE) with two useful strategies, i.e., fused target-domain word representations and orthogonality constraints, thus enabling to model more pure yet effective domain-specific and domain-invariant representations. Simultaneously, we use a large-scale target-domain unlabeled data to fine-tune BERT with only the language model loss, thus obtaining reliable contextualized word representations that benefit for the cross-domain dependency parsing. Experiments on a benchmark data set show that our proposed adversarial approaches achieve consistent improvement, and fine-tuning BERT further boosts the accuracy by a large margin. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་པ་དེ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག', 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות, בדיקת ההופעה משתפרה דרמטית על טקסטים בתחום הודות לקדמות מהירה של דוגמני רשת עצבית עמוקה. האתגר העיקרי למחקר הנוכחי של בדיקת הוא לשפר את ההפעלה של בדיקת טקסטים מחוץ לתחום שהם שונים מאד מידע האימונים בתחום כאשר יש רק מידע מחוץ לתחום בקנה מידה קטנה. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, אנו מציעים לשפר את מייצגי המילים המתוקפים באמצעות לימוד יריבי ותהליכי BERT מתאימים. במיוחד, אנו משתמשים ללמוד נוגדי לשלושה שיטות התאמה מייצגיות למשטרה חצי מושגת, כלומר, שיטוי ישיר (CON), גיבוי תכונות (FA), והקיצוב של תכונות (DE) עם שתי אסטרטגיות שימושיות, כלומר מייצגי מילים מטרה-תחום ומחובלות אורגונליות, כך אפשר לדוגמא מייצגים טהורים אך יעילים יותר ספציפיים לתחום ולא שונים לתחום. באותו הזמן, אנו משתמשים במידע ממטרה במערכת גדולה ללא סימנים כדי להתאים את BERT רק עם אובדן מודל השפה, כך להשיג מייצגות מילים מאמינות קונטוקטואליזציונות שירותים למחקר התלויות בין השטח. Experiments on a benchmark dataset show that our proposed adversarial approaches achieve consistent improvement, and fine-tuning BERT further boosts parsing accuracy by a large margin.  Our single model achieves the same state-of-the-art performance as the top submitted system in the NLPCC-2019 shared task, which uses ensemble models and BERT.'}
{'en': 'Learning to Prune Dependency Trees with Rethinking for Neural Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'تعلم تقليم أشجار التبعية مع إعادة التفكير في استخراج العلاقة العصبية', 'es': 'Aprender a podar los árboles de dependencia con un replanteamiento para la extracción de relaciones neuronales', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a podar árvores de dependência com repensando a extração de relações neurais', 'fr': "Apprendre à tailler les arbres de dépendance en repensant l'extraction des relations neuronales", 'ja': '神経関係抽出の再考を伴う依存木の剪定の学習', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए पुनर्विचार के साथ निर्भरता के पेड़ों को काटना सीखना', 'zh': '学剪倚树与重思神经', 'ru': 'Обучение деревьям чернослива с переосмыслением извлечения нейронной связи', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas Crainn Spleáchais a Bearradh le hAthmhachnamh le hAghaidh Eastóscadh Néar-chaidrimh', 'ka': 'სწავლება პრონის განსაკუთრებულობის სახელებში, რომელიც ნეიროლური განსაკუთრებულობის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Μάθετε να κλαδέψετε δέντρα εξάρτησης με επανεξέταση για εξαγωγή νευρωνικών σχέσεων', 'hu': 'A függőségi fák kivágásának tanulása idegrendszeri kapcsolat kivonásának újragondolásával', 'it': "Imparare a potare alberi di dipendenza con ripensamento per l'estrazione della relazione neurale", 'kk': 'Нейралық қатынастарды тарқату үшін қайта ойлау үшін Prune тәуелдік ағаштарына үйрену', 'lt': 'Mokymasis priklausomybės nuo krūvų medžiais persvarstant nervų santykių ekstrakciją', 'mk': 'Учење на дрвјата на зависноста на Прун со размислување за екстракција на нервните односи', 'ms': 'Belajar ke Pohon Dependensi Prune dengan memikirkan semula untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി വീണ്ടും ചിന്തിക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി പ്രൂണിന്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Tagħlim lil Siġar ta’ Dipendenza ta’ Prune b’Riħsieb għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл харилцааны хамааралтай сэтгэл хөдлөлийн зам дээр суралцах нь', 'no': 'Læring til prune avhengighetstre med rethinking for utpakking av nøyrale relasjonar', 'pl': 'Nauka przycinania drzew zależności z przemyśleniem dla ekstrakcji relacji nerwowych', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a tăia copacii dependență cu regândirea pentru extracția relației neurale', 'sr': 'Naučenje na drveće zavisnosti Prune sa Rethinking za izvlačenje neuroloških odnosa', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරූන් විශේෂතාවක් වලින් ඉගෙනගන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථ', 'so': 'Learning to Prune Dependency Trees with Rethinking for Neural Relation Extraction', 'sv': 'Att lära sig beskära beroendeträd med att tänka om för extraktion av neural relation', 'ta': 'புதிய தொடர்பு வெளியேற்றத்திற்கு மீண்டும் சார்ந்து கொண்டு Prune சார்ந்த மரங்களுக்கு கற்று', 'ur': 'نئرل رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے دوبارہ سوچ کرنے کے ساتھ پرونی اعتباری درختوں کے لئے سیکھا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học về phụ thuộc mận với suy nghĩ về kết quả thần kinh', 'bg': 'Научете се да подрязвате зависими дървета с преосмисляне за извличане на неврална връзка', 'hr': 'Naučenje na drveće zavisnosti Prune s Rethinking za izvlačenje neuroloških odnosa', 'nl': 'Leren om afhankelijkheidsbomen te snoeien met heroverweging voor neurale relatie extractie', 'da': 'Lære at beskære afhængighedstræer med nytænkning for neural relation ekstraktion', 'de': 'Lernen, Abhängigkeitsbäume mit Umdenken für die Extraktion neuronaler Beziehungen zu beschneiden', 'id': 'Learning to Prune Dependency Trees with Rethinking for Neural Relation Extraction', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwenye mti wa Uhuru wa Prune kwa Kutafakari Kutokana na Utamaduni wa Karibu', 'ko': '반성 학습 기반 편집 의존 트리 신경 관계 추출에 사용', 'tr': 'Neural Baglanyşy Açmak üçin öwrenmek üçin Öňe Baýumlyk Treeleri', 'sq': 'Mësimi për drurët e varësisë në Prune me rifillimin për ekstraksionin e marrëdhënieve nervore', 'af': 'Leer na Prune afhanklikheid boom met herverwerking vir Neurale Relasie Uitpakking', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن به درختان اعتمادی Prune با بازفکری برای اخراج رابطه عصبی', 'az': 'Nöral İlişkilər Açırmaq üçün yenidən düşünüb Prune bağımlılıq ağaclarını öyrənmək', 'bn': 'Learning to Prune Dependency Trees with Rethinking for Neural Relation Extraction', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': 'Learning to Prune Dependency Trees with Rethinking for Neural Relation Extraction', 'bs': 'Naučenje na drveće zavisnosti Prune sa ponovnom razmišljanjem o izvlačenju neuroloških odnosa', 'cs': 'Naučení se řezat závislostní stromy s přehodnocením pro extrakci nervových vztahů', 'et': 'Sõltuvuspuude kärpimise õppimine neurosuhete ekstraheerimiseks ümbermõtlemisega', 'fi': 'Oppiminen karsimaan riippuvuuspuita miettimällä uudelleen hermosuhteiden uuttamista varten', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հարաբերությունների վերաբերյալ արտադրողության հետ կապված ծառեր սովորելը', 'jv': 'Caret', 'he': 'Learning to Prune Dependency Trees with Rethinking for Neural Relation Extraction', 'sk': 'Učenje obrezovanja odvisnih dreves s ponovnim razmišljanjem za ekstrakcijo živčnih odnosov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསྐྱར་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་དབྱིབས་ཤིག་ལ་སློབ་བཞིན་པ།'}
{'en': 'Dependency trees have been shown to be effective in capturing long-range relations between target entities. Nevertheless, how to selectively emphasize target-relevant information and remove irrelevant content from the tree is still an open problem. Existing approaches employing pre-defined rules to eliminate noise may not always yield optimal results due to the complexity and variability of natural language. In this paper, we present a novel architecture named Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), which learns to prune the dependency tree with rethinking in an end-to-end scheme. In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connectivity. After that, we introduce a rethinking mechanism to guide and refine the pruning operation by feeding back the high-level learned features repeatedly. Extensive experimental results demonstrate that our model achieves impressive results compared to strong competitors.', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن أشجار التبعية فعالة في التقاط العلاقات بعيدة المدى بين الكيانات المستهدفة. ومع ذلك ، فإن كيفية التأكيد بشكل انتقائي على المعلومات ذات الصلة بالهدف وإزالة المحتوى غير ذي الصلة من الشجرة لا تزال مشكلة مفتوحة. الأساليب الحالية التي تستخدم قواعد محددة مسبقًا للقضاء على الضوضاء قد لا تسفر دائمًا عن النتائج المثلى بسبب تعقيد اللغة الطبيعية وتنوعها. في هذا البحث ، نقدم بنية جديدة تسمى الشبكة التلافيفية للرسم البياني المشذب ديناميكيًا (DP-GCN) ، والتي تتعلم كيفية تقليم شجرة التبعية من خلال إعادة التفكير في مخطط شامل. في كل طبقة من DP-GCN ، نستخدم وحدة اختيار للتركيز على العقد التي تعبر عن العلاقة المستهدفة من خلال مجموعة من البوابات الثنائية ، ثم نزيد الشجرة المقطوعة برسم بياني دلالي مجتزأ لضمان الاتصال. بعد ذلك ، نقدم آلية إعادة التفكير لتوجيه عملية التقليم وتحسينها من خلال إعادة تغذية الميزات المكتسبة عالية المستوى بشكل متكرر. تظهر النتائج التجريبية المكثفة أن نموذجنا يحقق نتائج مبهرة مقارنة بالمنافسين الأقوياء.', 'fr': "Les arbres de dépendance se sont révélés efficaces pour capturer les relations à long terme entre les entités cibles. Néanmoins, la façon de mettre en valeur de manière sélective les informations pertinentes pour la cible et de supprimer le contenu non pertinent de l'arborescence reste un problème ouvert. Les approches existantes utilisant des règles prédéfinies pour éliminer le bruit peuvent ne pas toujours donner des résultats optimaux en raison de la complexité et de la variabilité du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle architecture nommée Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), qui apprend à élaguer l'arbre de dépendance en repensant un schéma de bout en bout. Dans chaque couche de DP-GCN, nous utilisons un module de sélection pour nous concentrer sur les nœuds exprimant la relation cible par un ensemble de portes binaires, puis nous augmentons l'arbre élagué avec un graphe sémantique élagué pour assurer la connectivité. Ensuite, nous introduisons un mécanisme de refonte pour guider et affiner l'opération d'élagage en renvoyant à plusieurs reprises les fonctionnalités apprises de haut niveau. Des résultats expérimentaux approfondis démontrent que notre modèle obtient des résultats impressionnants par rapport à de solides concurrents.", 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los árboles de dependencia son efectivos para capturar relaciones de largo alcance entre las entidades objetivo. Sin embargo, cómo enfatizar selectivamente la información relevante para el objetivo y eliminar el contenido irrelevante del árbol sigue siendo un problema abierto. Los enfoques existentes que emplean reglas predefinidas para eliminar el ruido pueden no siempre producir resultados óptimos debido a la complejidad y variabilidad del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, presentamos una arquitectura novedosa llamada Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), que aprende a podar el árbol de dependencias con un replanteamiento en un esquema de extremo a extremo. En cada capa de DP-GCN, empleamos un módulo de selección para concentrarnos en los nodos que expresan la relación objetivo mediante un conjunto de puertas binarias, y luego aumentamos el árbol podado con un gráfico semántico podado para garantizar la conectividad. Después de eso, introducimos un mecanismo de replanteamiento para guiar y refinar la operación de poda retroalimentando repetidamente las características aprendidas de alto nivel. Los extensos resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro modelo logra resultados impresionantes en comparación con competidores fuertes.', 'pt': 'As árvores de dependência têm se mostrado eficazes na captura de relações de longo alcance entre entidades alvo. No entanto, como enfatizar seletivamente informações relevantes para o alvo e remover conteúdo irrelevante da árvore ainda é um problema em aberto. As abordagens existentes que empregam regras pré-definidas para eliminar o ruído podem nem sempre produzir resultados ideais devido à complexidade e variabilidade da linguagem natural. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova arquitetura chamada Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), que aprende a podar a árvore de dependências repensando em um esquema de ponta a ponta. Em cada camada do DP-GCN, empregamos um módulo de seleção para nos concentrar nos nós que expressam a relação de destino por um conjunto de portas binárias e, em seguida, aumentamos a árvore podada com um grafo semântico podado para garantir a conectividade. Depois disso, apresentamos um mecanismo de repensar para orientar e refinar a operação de poda, retornando os recursos aprendidos de alto nível repetidamente. Amplos resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso modelo alcança resultados impressionantes em comparação com fortes concorrentes.', 'hi': 'निर्भरता पेड़ों को लक्ष्य संस्थाओं के बीच लंबी दूरी के संबंधों को कैप्चर करने में प्रभावी दिखाया गया है। फिर भी, लक्ष्य-प्रासंगिक जानकारी पर चुनिंदा रूप से जोर देने और पेड़ से अप्रासंगिक सामग्री को हटाने के लिए कैसे अभी भी एक खुली समस्या है। शोर को खत्म करने के लिए पूर्व-परिभाषित नियमों को नियोजित करने वाले मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण हमेशा प्राकृतिक भाषा की जटिलता और परिवर्तनशीलता के कारण इष्टतम परिणाम नहीं दे सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN) नामक एक उपन्यास आर्किटेक्चर पेश करते हैं, जो एक एंड-टू-एंड योजना में पुनर्विचार के साथ निर्भरता पेड़ को काटना सीखता है। DP-GCN की प्रत्येक परत में, हम बाइनरी गेट्स के एक सेट द्वारा लक्ष्य संबंध को व्यक्त करने वाले नोड्स पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए एक चयन मॉड्यूल को नियोजित करते हैं, और फिर कनेक्टिविटी सुनिश्चित करने के लिए एक छंटाई किए गए शब्दार्थ ग्राफ के साथ छंटाई किए गए पेड़ को बढ़ाते हैं। उसके बाद, हम उच्च-स्तरीय सीखी गई सुविधाओं को बार-बार खिलाकर छंटाई ऑपरेशन को निर्देशित करने और परिष्कृत करने के लिए एक पुनर्विचार तंत्र पेश करते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल मजबूत प्रतियोगियों की तुलना में प्रभावशाली परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ja': '依存関係ツリーは、ターゲットエンティティ間の長距離関係をキャプチャするのに効果的であることが示されています。 しかしながら、ターゲットに関連する情報を選択的に強調し、ツリーから無関係なコンテンツを削除する方法は、依然として未解決の問題です。 ノイズを排除するために事前定義されたルールを採用する既存のアプローチは、自然言語の複雑さと可変性のために常に最適な結果をもたらすとは限らない。 この論文では、エンドツーエンドのスキームで再考しながら依存関係ツリーを剪定することを学ぶ、ダイナミック剪定グラフ畳み込みネットワーク（ DP - GCN ）という新しいアーキテクチャを提示します。 DP - GCNの各レイヤーでは、選択モジュールを使用して、バイナリゲートのセットによってターゲット関係を表現するノードに集中し、次に、枝刈りされたセマンティックグラフで枝刈りされたツリーを増強して、接続性を確保します。 その後、学習したハイレベルな機能を繰り返しフィードバックすることで、枝刈り操作を導き、洗練させる再考メカニズムを導入します。 広範な実験結果は、当社のモデルが強力な競合他社と比較して印象的な結果を達成していることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Деревья зависимостей доказали свою эффективность в отражении долгосрочных отношений между целевыми объектами. Тем не менее, то, как выборочно подчеркивать целевую информацию и удалять ненужный контент из дерева, все еще остается открытой проблемой. Существующие подходы, использующие заранее определенные правила для устранения шума, не всегда могут дать оптимальные результаты из-за сложности и изменчивости естественного языка. В этой статье мы представляем новую архитектуру под названием Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), которая учится обрезать дерево зависимостей с переосмыслением в сквозной схеме. В каждом слое DP-GCN мы используем модуль выбора, чтобы сконцентрироваться на узлах, выражающих целевое отношение набором двоичных стробов, а затем дополнить обрезанное дерево обрезанным семантическим графом для обеспечения связности. После этого мы вводим механизм переосмысления, чтобы направлять и совершенствовать операцию обрезки, повторно возвращая изученные функции высокого уровня. Обширные экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель достигает впечатляющих результатов по сравнению с сильными конкурентами.', 'zh': '恃树已有效,得实之长距离也。 虽然,安有择地强信,从树中删除不相关者,犹一悬而未决也。 自然语言之复杂性可变性,用预定义法除噪声见法或非常佳也。 于本文中,发动态剪图卷积网络(DP-GCN)新架构,当架构学于端案中,更思剪树。 DP-GCN之一层,择模块以专精二进制门以表其节点,然后以剪语义图强其树,以保连接性。 后来引入重思机,反覆反馈高学指修。 博实验结果表明比强竞争对手,模样得深致。', 'ga': 'Tá sé léirithe go bhfuil crainn spleáchais éifeachtach chun caidreamh fadréimseach a ghabháil idir na heintitis sprice. Mar sin féin, is fadhb oscailte fós é conas béim a chur go roghnach ar fhaisnéis a bhaineann le spriocanna agus ábhar nach mbaineann le hábhar a bhaint den chrann. D’fhéadfadh sé nach mbeadh na torthaí is fearr i gcónaí ag baint le cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana lena n-úsáidtear rialacha réamhshainithe chun torann a dhíchur mar gheall ar chastacht agus éagsúlacht na teanga nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair ailtireacht nua darb ainm Líonra Comhdhlúite Graf a Beart go Dinimiciúla (DP-GCN), a fhoghlaimíonn conas an crann spleáchais a ghearradh le hathmhachnamh i scéim deireadh le deireadh. I ngach sraith de DP-GCN, bainimid úsáid as modúl roghnúcháin chun díriú ar nóid a chuireann an sprioc-ghaol in iúl trí shraith geataí dénártha, agus ansin cuirimid leis an gcrann pruned le graf shéimeantach bearrtha chun an nascacht a chinntiú. Tar éis sin, tugaimid isteach meicníocht athmhachnaimh chun an oibríocht bearradh a threorú agus a bheachtú trí na gnéithe ardleibhéil a foghlaimíodh a thabhairt ar ais arís agus arís eile. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha fairsinge go mbaineann ár múnla torthaí suntasacha amach i gcomparáid le hiomaitheoirí láidre.', 'ka': 'დამხოლოების ხელები გამოჩვენებულია, რომ უფრო დიდი განზომილებების შესახებ უფრო დიდ განზომილებაში იქნება. მაგრამ თუმცა, როგორ არჩეულად მონიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციას გააღმოჩნოთ და ხედან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციას წაშლა უფრო გახსნა პრობლემა არსებობს პროგრამების გამოყენება პროგრამების განსაზღვრებული წესების გამოყენება, რომელიც ძალიან არსებობს ოპტიმალური წესების გამოყენება, რაც არსებობს ნახვა ენის კო ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრომენტიკური აქტიქტიკური სახელი დინამიკურად Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), რომელიც ვისწავლის დამხმარებელობის ხე გადაწყალოთ სქემის შესახებ. DP-GCN-ის ყოველ ნაგულისხმებში, ჩვენ მონიშნული მოდულის გამოყენება, რომელიც კონტენსტირებად კონტენსტირებული კონტაქტირებული კონტაქტირების მიხედვის, რომელიც კონტაქტირებული მიხედვის ბიინერი და შემდეგ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ მექანსი გადაფიქრობის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც გადაწყვეტს და გადაწყვეტს პერაციას, რომელიც უფრო მეტად მეტად მეტად გავისწავლა. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებლობად ძალიან კონპექტირებით მოიძლება ინტერსიური წარმოდგენა.', 'hu': 'A függőségi fák hatékonynak bizonyultak a célentitások közötti hosszú távú kapcsolatok rögzítésében. Mindazonáltal, hogyan lehet szelektíven hangsúlyozni a cél-releváns információkat és eltávolítani a lényegtelen tartalmakat a fáról, még mindig nyitott probléma. A zaj kiküszöbölésére előre meghatározott szabályokat alkalmazó meglévő megközelítések nem mindig hoznak optimális eredményeket a természetes nyelv összetettsége és változékonysága miatt. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN) nevű új architektúrát, amely megtanulja a függőség fáját egy end-to-end séma újragondolásával. A DP-GCN minden egyes rétegében egy kiválasztási modult alkalmazunk, hogy a célkapcsolatot bináris kapukkal fejezzük ki, majd a metszett fát egy metszett szemantikai grafikonnal bővítsük a kapcsolat biztosítása érdekében. Ezt követően bevezetünk egy újragondolási mechanizmust, amely irányítja és finomítja a metszési műveletet a magas szintű megtanult funkciók ismételt visszaadásával. A kiterjedt kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk lenyűgöző eredményeket ér el az erős versenytársakhoz képest.', 'el': 'Τα δέντρα εξάρτησης έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι είναι αποτελεσματικά στην καταγραφή μακροχρόνιων σχέσεων μεταξύ των οντοτήτων-στόχων. Ωστόσο, το πώς να τονίσετε επιλεκτικά τις σχετικές με στόχο πληροφορίες και να αφαιρέσετε άσχετο περιεχόμενο από το δέντρο εξακολουθεί να είναι ένα ανοικτό πρόβλημα. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις που χρησιμοποιούν προκαθορισμένους κανόνες για την εξάλειψη του θορύβου ενδέχεται να μην αποφέρουν πάντα βέλτιστα αποτελέσματα λόγω της πολυπλοκότητας και της μεταβλητότητας της φυσικής γλώσσας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική που ονομάζεται Δυναμικά Κλαδευμένο Δίκτυο Σύγκλισης Γραφημάτων (το οποίο μαθαίνει να κλαδεύει το δέντρο εξάρτησης με επανεξέταση σε ένα ολοκληρωμένο σχήμα. Σε κάθε στρώμα του χρησιμοποιούμε μια ενότητα επιλογής για να επικεντρωθούμε σε κόμβους που εκφράζουν τη σχέση στόχου με ένα σύνολο δυαδικών πυλών, και στη συνέχεια να αυξήσουμε το κλαδεμένο δέντρο με ένα κλαδεμένο σημασιολογικό γράφημα για να εξασφαλίσουμε τη συνδεσιμότητα. Μετά από αυτό, εισάγουμε έναν μηχανισμό επανεξέτασης για να καθοδηγήσουμε και να βελτιώσουμε τη λειτουργία κλαδέματος τροφοδοτώντας επανειλημμένα τα υψηλού επιπέδου μαθημένα χαρακτηριστικά. Τα εκτεταμένα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει εντυπωσιακά αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με ισχυρούς ανταγωνιστές.', 'it': "Gli alberi di dipendenza hanno dimostrato di essere efficaci nel catturare relazioni a lungo raggio tra entità target. Tuttavia, come enfatizzare selettivamente le informazioni rilevanti per il target e rimuovere contenuti irrilevanti dall'albero è ancora un problema aperto. Gli approcci esistenti che utilizzano regole predefinite per eliminare il rumore potrebbero non sempre dare risultati ottimali a causa della complessità e della variabilità del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, presentiamo una nuova architettura chiamata Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), che impara a potare l'albero delle dipendenze ripensando in uno schema end-to-end. In ogni livello di DP-GCN, impieghiamo un modulo di selezione per concentrarci sui nodi che esprimono la relazione di destinazione da un insieme di gate binari, e quindi aumentiamo l'albero potato con un grafico semantico potato per garantire la connettività. Successivamente, introduciamo un meccanismo di ripensamento per guidare e perfezionare l'operazione di potatura alimentando ripetutamente le caratteristiche apprese di alto livello. Ampi risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello raggiunge risultati impressionanti rispetto ai forti concorrenti.", 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік ағаштары мақсатты нысандар арасындағы ұзындық аумағының қатынасын қабылдау үшін эффективті көрсетілді. Әйтпесе, мақсатты мәліметті таңдап, ағаштан мазмұнын өшіру әлі қалай ашық мәселе болады. Қызықты жою үшін алдын- ала анықталған ережелерді қолдану арқылы табиғи тілінің тәуелсіздігі мен айнымалылығының себебі әрқашанда оптимал нәтижелерді бермейді. Бұл қағазда біз динамикалық проунд график конвертуционалды желі (DP-GCN) деп аталатын романдық архитектураны көрсетедік. Бұл аяқтау сұлбасына қайта ойлау үшін тәуелсіздік ағашының ағашығын көшірмелеуді оқы DP-GCN қабаттарында біз таңдау модулін бинарлық қабырға қатынасын көрсету үшін қолдану үшін қосылымдылық қатынасын көрсету үшін бір қабатты таңдау модулін қолданамыз. Содан кейін, біз жоғары деңгейіндегі оқылған мүмкіндіктерді қайталап қайталау механизмін таңдау және қайталау операциясын қайталап береміз. Үлкен тәжірибелі нәтижелер үлгіміздің күшті конкурсорлармен салыстыратын нәтижелерді көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad priklausomybės medžiai yra veiksmingi užmezgant ilgalaikius tikslinių subjektų santykius. Vis dėlto, kaip atrankiškai pabrėžti tikslui svarbią informaciją ir pašalinti nereikšmingą turinį iš medžio, vis dar yra atvira problema. Esami metodai, taikantys iš anksto nustatytas taisykles triukšmui pašalinti, ne visada gali duoti optimalių rezultatų dėl natūralios kalbos sudėtingumo ir kintamumo. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują architektūrą, vadinamą dinamiškai suspaustų grafikų konvoliuciniu tinklu (DP-GCN), kuris išmoko susmulkinti priklausomybės medį iš naujo apsvarstydamas sistemą nuo galo iki galo. In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connectivity.  Po to įvedame persvarstymo mechanizmą, kuriuo vadovaujamasi ir patobulinama skaldymo veikla, pakartotinai grąžinant aukšto lygio įgytas savybes. Išsamūs eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekia įspūdingų rezultatų, palyginti su stipriais konkurentais.', 'mk': 'Се покажа дека дрвјата на зависност се ефикасни во заземањето на долготрајни односи помеѓу целните ентитети. Nevertheless, how to selectively emphasize target-relevant information and remove irrelevant content from the tree is still an open problem.  Постојаните пристапи со употреба на преддефинирани правила за елиминирање на бучава не секогаш можат да дадат оптимални резултати поради комплексноста и варијабилноста на природниот јазик. Во овој весник, претставуваме нова архитектура наречена Динамички Прунета Графска Конволуционална мрежа (DP-GCN), која научи да го исече дрвото на зависноста со преразмислување во шема од крај до крај. Во секој слој на DP-GCN, употребуваме модул за селекција за да се концентрираме на јазлите кои ја изразуваат целната врска со неколку бинарни порти, а потоа да го зголемиме скриеното дрво со скриен семантичен граф за да се осигури поврзаноста. После тоа, воведуваме механизам за преразмислување за водење и рафинирање на операцијата со враќање на научените карактеристики на високо ниво повторно. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел постигнува импресивни резултати во споредба со силните конкуренти.', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യം വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d നീളം ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ലക്ഷ്യബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് എന്നിട്ടും വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് അപരാധിക്ക ശബ്ദം നീക്കം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള നടപടികള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൈനാമിക്കല്\u200d പ്രവർത്തിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് എന്ന പേരിലുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റ് കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത്  In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connectivity.  അതിനു ശേഷം നമ്മള്\u200d വീണ്ടും ചിന്തിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെക്കിനസ്ഥാനത്തെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിനു ശേഷം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയുള്ള പ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന് ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രതിരോധികള്\u200dക്ക് തുല്യമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай мод зорилготой байгууллагын хооронд урт хугацааны харилцааны үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулсан. Гэвч гол санааг хэрхэн сонгох вэ гэвэл зорилготой мэдээллийг хэрхэн тодорхойлж, модоос хамаагүй бүтээгдэхүүнийг устгах вэ гэвэл нээлттэй асуудал юм. Байгалийн хэлний цогцол болон өөрчлөлттэй болохоор оршиж байгаа арга барилгууд шуудыг устгахад илүү тодорхойлогдсон дүрмийг ашиглах боломжгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN) нэртэй шинэ архитектурыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь хамааралтай модыг төгсгөлийн төгсгөлд дахин бодох архитектурыг сурсан. ДП-GCN-ийн давхар бүрт бид хоёр давхар хаалтын холбоотой зорилготой холбоотой хэсэг дээр төвлөрүүлэх сонголтын модуль ашиглаж, дараа нь холбоотой байдлыг гаргах зорилготой модуль дээр нэмэгдүүлнэ. Үүний дараа бид өндөр түвшинд суралцсан чадварыг дахин дахин ойлгох механизмийг танилцуулдаг. Ихэнх туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь хүчтэй өрсөлдөгчтэй харьцуулахад гайхалтай үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'mt': 'Intwera li s-siġar tad-dipendenza huma effettivi fil-kisba ta’ relazzjonijiet fuq medda twila bejn l-entitajiet fil-mira. Madankollu, kif wieħed jenfasizza b’mod selettiv l-informazzjoni rilevanti għall-mira u jitneħħa kontenut irrelevanti mis-siġar għadu problema miftuħa. Approċċi eżistenti li jużaw regoli definiti minn qabel biex jeliminaw l-istorbju mhux dejjem jistgħu jagħtu riżultati ottimali minħabba l-kumplessità u l-varjabbiltà tal-lingwa naturali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw arkitettura ġdida msejħa Netwerk ta’ Konveoluzzjoni tal-Grafika b’Ħruġ Dinamiku (DP-GCN), li qed jitgħallem li jnaqqas is-siġar tad-dipendenza billi nqisu mill-ġdid fi skema minn tarf għal tarf. F’kull saff ta’ DP-GCN, a ħna nużaw modulu ta’ għażla biex nikkonċentraw fuq nodi li jesprimu r-relazzjoni fil-mira permezz ta’ sett ta’ gates binarji, u mbagħad iżidu s-siġar imqaxxar b’graff semantiku mqaxxar biex niżguraw il-konnettività. Wara dan, a ħna nintroduċu mekkaniżmu ta’ riflessjoni biex niggwidaw u nirraffinaw l-operazzjoni tal-pruning billi nirritornaw il-karatteristiċi ta’ livell għoli li ttieħdu ripetutament. Riżultati esperimentali estensivi juru li l-mudell tagħna jikseb riżultati impressjonanti meta mqabbel ma’ kompetituri b’saħħithom.', 'ms': 'Dependency trees have been shown to be effective in capturing long-range relations between target entities.  Namun, bagaimana untuk menekankan secara selektif maklumat berkaitan sasaran dan membuang kandungan tidak berkaitan dari pokok masih masalah terbuka. pendekatan yang wujud menggunakan peraturan terdefinisi untuk menghapuskan bunyi mungkin tidak sentiasa memberikan keputusan optimal disebabkan kompleksiti dan variabiliti bahasa alam. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan arkitektur novel bernama Rangkaian Berubah Graf Dinamik Pruned (DP-GCN), yang belajar untuk mengukir pokok dependensi dengan memikirkan semula dalam skema akhir-akhir. Dalam setiap lapisan DP-GCN, kami menggunakan modul pemilihan untuk berkonsentrasi pada nod yang mengekspresikan hubungan sasaran dengan set gerbang binari, dan kemudian menambah pokok yang dipotong dengan graf semantik dipotong untuk memastikan sambungan. Setelah itu, kami memperkenalkan mekanisme pemikiran semula untuk memimpin dan menyempurnakan operasi pemotong dengan memberikan kembali ciri-ciri yang dipelajari tinggi berulang kali. Hasil percubaan yang luas menunjukkan bahawa model kita mencapai hasil yang menarik dibandingkan dengan pesaing kuat.', 'no': 'Avhengighetstrær er vist å vera effektiv i å henta langområde relasjonar mellom målene. Det er likevel eit opna problem for å velja målsettinformasjon og fjerna uavhengige innhald frå treet. Det eksisterande tilnærmingar som brukar føredefinerte reglar for å eliminere støy kan ikkje alltid gje optimal resultat på grunn av kompleksiteten og variabelen av naturspråk. I denne papiret presenterer vi eit nytt arkitektur med namn Dynamisk Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), som lærer å trekke avhengighetstreet med å gjenoppretta i eit sluttshēma. I kvar lag av DP-GCN bruker vi eit utval-modul for å konsentrera på noder som uttrykker målrelasjonen av eit sett binær portar, og så auker det kryssa treet med eit kryssa semantisk graf for å sikre på tilkoplinga. Etter det introduserer vi ein gjentakingsmekanismen for å hjelpa og refinera opprinnelige operasjonen ved å senda tilbake høg nivå lærte funksjonane på ein gong. Ekstra eksperimentelle resultat viser at modellen vårt når det gjer uttrykkelige resultat sammenlignet med sterke konkurrentar.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że drzewa zależności są skuteczne w przechwytywaniu relacji na długim zasięgu między jednostkami docelowymi. Niemniej jednak, jak selektywnie podkreślić informacje dotyczące celu i usunąć nieistotne treści z drzewa jest nadal otwartym problemem. Istniejące podejścia wykorzystujące wstępnie zdefiniowane reguły eliminacji hałasu mogą nie zawsze przynosić optymalne rezultaty ze względu na złożoność i zmienność języka naturalnego. W artykule przedstawiamy nową architekturę o nazwie Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), która uczy się przycinać drzewo zależności z przemyśleniem w schemacie end-to-end. W każdej warstwie DP-GCN stosujemy moduł selekcji, aby skoncentrować się na węzłach wyrażających relację docelową przez zestaw bram binarnych, a następnie powiększać przycięte drzewo o przycięty wykres semantyczny, aby zapewnić łączność. Następnie wprowadzamy mechanizm ponownego przemyślenia, aby prowadzić i udoskonalić operację przycinania poprzez wielokrotne odzyskiwanie nauczonych funkcji na wysokim poziomie. Obszerne wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model osiąga imponujące wyniki w porównaniu z silnymi konkurentami.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că arborii dependenței sunt eficienți în captarea relațiilor pe rază lungă dintre entitățile țintă. Cu toate acestea, modul de a sublinia selectiv informațiile relevante pentru țintă și de a elimina conținutul irelevant din copac este încă o problemă deschisă. Abordările existente care utilizează norme predefinite pentru eliminarea zgomotului pot să nu producă întotdeauna rezultate optime din cauza complexității și variabilității limbajului natural. În această lucrare, prezentăm o arhitectură nouă numită Dynamicly Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), care învață să taie arborele dependențelor prin regândirea într-o schemă end-to-end. În fiecare strat de DP-GCN, folosim un modul de selecție pentru a ne concentra asupra nodurilor care exprimă relația țintă printr-un set de porți binare, apoi mărim copacul tăiat cu un grafic semantic tăiat pentru a asigura conectivitatea. După aceea, introducem un mecanism de regândire pentru a ghida și rafina operațiunea de tăiere prin alimentarea în mod repetat a caracteristicilor învățate la nivel înalt. Rezultatele experimentale extinse demonstreaza ca modelul nostru obtine rezultate impresionante in comparatie cu concurentii puternici.', 'sr': 'Pokazano je da su drveće zavisnosti efikasne u uhvativanju dugog dometa odnosa između ciljnih entitata. Ipak, kako selektivno naglasiti mete relevantne informacije i ukloniti nevažni sadržaj drveta još uvijek je otvoren problem. Postoje pristupi upotrebljavanju preddefiniranih pravila za eliminaciju buke ne mogu uvek donijeti optimalne rezultate zbog kompleksnosti i variabilnosti prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu arhitekturu po imenu Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), koja nauči da pruži drvo zavisnosti sa ponovnom razmišljanjem u programu kraja do kraja. U svakom sloju DP-GCN-a, koristimo selekcijski modul da se koncentrišemo na čvorovima koji izražavaju ciljnu vezu sa setom binarnih vrata, a zatim povećamo pruženo drvo sa pruženim semantičkim grafikom kako bi osigurali povezanost. Nakon toga, predstavljamo mehanizam za ponovno razmišljanje da vodi i popravi pružanje operacije ponovno hraneći naučene karakteristike visokog nivoa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne impresivne rezultate u usporedbi sa jakim konkurentima.', 'so': 'Geedka ku xiran ee la xiriira waxaa looga muujiyey inay faa’iido ku leedahay qabsashada xiriirka dhaadheer ee ay u dhexeeyaan waxyaabaha la jeedo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee sida aad si gaar ah ugu boosiso macluumaad la xiriira arrimaha goalka iyo in laga qaado waxyaabaha aan cilmi lahayn geedka weli waa dhibaato furan. Dhaqdhaqaaqyada joogtada ah oo la soo dejiyo sharciyada hore oo la yaqaan in codka la dejiyo ma bixi karo sababtoo ah qallafsan iyo beddelka afka dabiicadda ah darteed. In this paper, we present a novel architecture named Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), which learns to prune the dependency tree with rethinking in an end-to-end scheme.  Dalka DP-GCN darajadooda waxaan ku shaqaynaynaa noocyo doorasha si aan ugu kalsoonaanno meelaha la jeedo oo ku qorayo xiriirka irdaha labaad, kadibna waxaan ku kordhinaa geedka nadiifsan, si aan u hubin xiriirka. Markaas kadib waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa meyminimo ka fiirsashada si aan u hagno oo aan u hagno hawlaha caqliga leh, si aan mar labaad u quudinno faa’iidada heerka sare. Imtixaanka badan waxay muujiyaan in modellkayagu uu helaa matooyin wanaagsan oo la barbardhiga kuwa xoogga badan.', 'si': 'විශේෂතා ගස් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ඉලක්ෂාත්මක අනුවෙන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් අ නමුත්, කොහොමද ලක්ෂණ- සම්බන්ධතා තොරතුරු තොරතුරු තොරතුරු තියෙන්නේ කියලා ගස් වලින් නැති සම්බන්ධතාවක මුලින් විශ්වාස කරපු නීතිය භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවේ වෙනස් විදියට හැමවෙලාවටම මේ පැත්තේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නිර්මාණික විද්\u200dයාපයක් නාමයික ප්\u200dරොන්ඩ් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය ජාලය (DP-GCN) කියලා, ඒක ඉගෙන ගන්නේ අවසානයෙන DP-GCN හැම ස්ථානයක්ම, අපි තෝරාගන්න මොඩ්යුල් එකක් භාවිත කරනවා බායිනාරි ගේට්ටුවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා නොඩ්ටුවක් වලින් ඉලක්ෂණ සම්බන්ධ කර ඊට පස්සේ, අපි ආපහු හිතන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න හැකියාවක් පෙන්වන්න හැකියාවක් හැකියාවක් ආපහු ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා,  විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මදුලේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරත', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த மரங்கள் இலக்கு பொருள்களுக்கிடையில் நீண்ட தொடர்புகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்ளும்போது தெரியும். ஆனாலும், இலக்கு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தகவல்களை எப்படி தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவும் மற்றும் மரத்திலிருந்து தேவையற்ற உள்ளடக்கங் தற்போதைய முன் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட சட்டங்களை நீக்க முன் விதிமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்துவது இயல்பான மொழியின் சிக்கல் மற்றும் மாறிறத்தின் ம இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய உருவாக்கியத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolution Network (DP- GCN), அது முடிவு முடிவு திட்டத்தில் சார்பு மரத்தை அழிக்க DP-GCN ஒவ்வொரு அடுக்கிலும் நாம் ஒரு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு கூற்றை வேலை செய்கிறோம் புலங்களின் மீது கவனத்தை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம். இலக்கு இணைப்பை உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்கு,  பின்னர், நாம் ஒரு திரும்ப சிந்திப்பு முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் நேர்வழி மற்றும் சுத்தம் செய்ய முடியும்  விரிவான சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اعتمادی درختوں کو نشان دیا گیا ہے کہ موقع اختیاروں کے درمیان طویل مدت کے ارتباط کو پکڑنے کے لئے اثر دیتے ہیں. However, how to selectively emphasize target-relevant information and remove irrelevant content from the tree is still a open problem. صوت کو ہٹانے کے لئے پہلے مقرر کردہ قوانین کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے موجود موجود طریقے ہیں، ممکن نہیں کہ طبیعی زبان کی پیچیدگی اور تبدیلی کے باعث ہمیشہ اچھی نتیجے پائیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نوی معماری پیش کریں جس کا نام Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN) ہے جو ایک آخر-to-end Scheme میں دوبارہ سوچ کرنے کے ساتھ اعتباری درخت کو کاٹنا سکھاتا ہے. ہر پلہ میں ڈی.پی.جی.جی.ن، ہم ایک انتخاب موڈل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ نوڈوں پر تغییر کریں جو ایک مجموعہ دوئنار دروازے کے ذریعہ موقع کی نسبت موقع کی تعریف کرتی ہیں، اور پھر پرینڈ درخت کو ایک پرینڈ سیمانٹی گراف کے ساتھ اضافہ کر اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک دوبارہ سمجھنے کی مکانیزی پیش کرلی ہے کہ دکھانے اور دکھانے کی عملیات کو دوبارہ دکھائیں اور دکھائیں مضبوط آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل مضبوط رقابت کرنے والوں کے مقابلہ میں اثر انگیز نتیجے حاصل کرتے ہیں.', 'sv': 'Beroendeträd har visat sig vara effektiva när det gäller att fånga långsiktiga relationer mellan målenheter. Hur man selektivt betonar målrelevant information och tar bort irrelevant innehåll från trädet är fortfarande ett öppet problem. Befintliga metoder som använder fördefinierade regler för att eliminera buller kan inte alltid ge optimala resultat på grund av komplexiteten och variationen i det naturliga språket. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en ny arkitektur som heter Dynamicly Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), som lär sig att beskära beroendeträdet genom att tänka om i ett end-to-end-schema. I varje lager av DP-GCN använder vi en urvalsmodul för att koncentrera oss på noder som uttrycker målrelationen med en uppsättning binära portar, och sedan utöka det beskurna trädet med en beskuren semantisk graf för att säkerställa anslutningen. Därefter introducerar vi en omprövningsmekanism för att styra och förfina beskärningen genom att upprepa de lärda funktionerna på hög nivå. Omfattande experimentella resultat visar att vår modell uppnår imponerande resultat jämfört med starka konkurrenter.', 'vi': 'Những cây nhiệt độ được cho thấy có hiệu quả trong việc nắm giữ quan hệ lâu dài giữa các thực thể mục tiêu. Tuy nhiên, cách nhấn mạnh mục tiêu có liên quan đến mục đích và xóa bỏ nội dung không liên quan khỏi cây vẫn là vấn đề mở. Sự tồn tại theo các phương pháp được xác định trước để loại bỏ nhiễu có thể không phải lúc nào cũng hiệu quả tối ưu vì sự phức tạp và biến dạng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiến trúc tên là Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), which học cách tỉa cây phụ thuộc với việc suy nghĩ lại trong một kế hoạch cuối cùng. Trong mỗi lớp của DP-GCN, chúng tôi dùng một mô- đun chọn để tập trung vào các nút biểu lộ tương quan đích bằng một chuỗi nhị phân, và sau đó tăng cường cây bị tỉa với một đồ thị ngữ pháp cắt tỉa để đảm bảo kết nối. Sau đó, chúng ta sẽ mở một cơ chế thay đổi để hướng dẫn và lọc các thao tác cắt tỉa bằng cách nối liên tục các tính năng học hỏi cấp cao. Kết quả thử nghiệm dồi dào cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta đạt được kết quả ấn tượng so với các đối thủ mạnh.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, qanday qanday jildning muhim maʼlumotini tanlash va daraxtdan notoʻgʻri maʼlumotni olib tashlash xato ochiq muammolar. Tovushni olib tashlash uchun oldin aniqlangan qoidalarni ishlatish imkoniyatlarida oddiy natijadagi murakkablik va oʻzgarishning sababini hech qachon bajariladigan qoidalarni bajarishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz Dynamick boshqarilgan Graph Konvolution tarmoq (DP-GCN) nomli novel arxituvchisini hosil qilamiz, bu qo'shish qolipida qo'llanmalarni o'rganadi. In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connectivity.  Keyin biz bir qachon o'rganish imkoniyatlarini ko'paytirish va o'zgartirish orqali o'rganish va o'zgarishga harakat qilamiz. Koʻproq tajriba natijalari modelimizni tasavvur qilishga ishonch hosil qiladi.", 'bg': 'Доказано е, че дърветата за зависимост са ефективни при улавянето на дългосрочни отношения между целевите субекти. Въпреки това, как селективно да подчертаете целевата информация и да премахнете неподходящото съдържание от дървото все още е отворен проблем. Съществуващите подходи, използващи предварително определени правила за премахване на шума, не винаги могат да дадат оптимални резултати поради сложността и променливостта на естествения език. В тази статия представяме нова архитектура, наречена Динамично подрязана Графична Конволюционна мрежа (ДП-ГН), която се научава да подрязва дървото на зависимостта с преосмисляне в схема от край до край. Във всеки слой използваме модул за подбор, който да се концентрира върху възлите, изразяващи целевата връзка чрез набор от двоични порти, и след това да увеличи подрязаното дърво с подрязана семантична графика, за да се гарантира свързаността. След това въвеждаме механизъм за преосмисляне за насочване и усъвършенстване на операцията по подрязване, като многократно връщаме научените функции на високо ниво. Обширните експериментални резултати показват, че нашият модел постига впечатляващи резултати в сравнение със силните конкуренти.', 'nl': 'Afhankelijkheidsbomen zijn effectief gebleken bij het vastleggen van langeafstandsrelaties tussen doelentiteiten. Hoe u doelgerichte informatie selectief benadrukt en irrelevante inhoud uit de boom verwijdert, is echter nog steeds een open probleem. Bestaande benaderingen waarbij vooraf gedefinieerde regels worden gebruikt om ruis te elimineren, kunnen niet altijd optimale resultaten opleveren vanwege de complexiteit en variabiliteit van de natuurlijke taal. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe architectuur genaamd Dynamicly Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), die leert om de afhankelijkheidsboom te snoeien met heroverweging in een end-to-end schema. In elke laag van DP-GCN gebruiken we een selectiemodule om ons te concentreren op knooppunten die de doelrelatie uitdrukken door een set binaire poorten, en vervolgens de gesnoeide boom te vergroten met een gesnoeide semantische grafiek om de connectiviteit te verzekeren. Daarna introduceren we een heroverwegingsmechanisme om de snoeiprocedure te leiden en te verfijnen door de op hoog niveau geleerde functies herhaaldelijk terug te voeren. Uitgebreide experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model indrukwekkende resultaten behaalt ten opzichte van sterke concurrenten.', 'hr': 'Pokazano je da su drveće zavisnosti učinkovite u uhvaćenju odnosa dugog raspona između ciljnih subjekta. Ipak, kako selektivno naglasiti ciljne informacije i ukloniti neovisne sadržaje drveta još uvijek je otvoren problem. Postoje pristupi koji koriste predodređena pravila za eliminaciju buke ne mogu uvijek donijeti optimalne rezultate zbog kompleksnosti i variabilnosti prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu arhitekturu po imenu Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), koja nauči pružiti drvo zavisnosti s ponovnom razmišljanjem u programu kraja do kraja. U svakom sloju DP-GCN-a, upotrebljavamo odabirski modul da se koncentrišemo na čvorovima koji izražavaju ciljnu vezu sa skupom binarnih vrata, a zatim povećamo pruženo drvo sa pruženim semantičkim grafikom kako bi osigurali povezanost. Nakon toga, predstavljamo mehanizam za ponovno razmišljanje kako bi vodili i popravili pružanje operacije ponovno hraneći naučene karakteristike visokog nivoa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne impresivne rezultate u usporedbi s jakim konkurentima.', 'da': 'Afhængighedstræer har vist sig at være effektive til at fange langdistanceforbindelser mellem målenheder. Men hvordan man selektivt fremhæver målrelevante oplysninger og fjerner irrelevant indhold fra træet er stadig et åbent problem. Eksisterende metoder, der anvender foruddefinerede regler til at fjerne støj, giver muligvis ikke altid optimale resultater på grund af det naturlige sprogs kompleksitet og variation. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny arkitektur kaldet Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), som lærer at beskære afhængighedstræet ved at gentænke i en end-to-end ordning. I hvert lag af DP-GCN anvender vi et udvælgelsesmodul til at koncentrere os om knuder, der udtrykker målrelationen ved hjælp af et sæt binære porte, og derefter udvider vi det beskåret træ med en beskåret semantisk graf for at sikre forbindelsen. Derefter introducerer vi en gentænkningsmekanisme til at styre og forbedre beskæringen ved gentagne gange at fodre de højt lærte funktioner tilbage. Omfattende eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model opnår imponerende resultater sammenlignet med stærke konkurrenter.', 'de': 'Abhängigkeitsbäume haben sich als effektiv erwiesen, um langfristige Beziehungen zwischen Zielobjekten zu erfassen. Wie zielrelevante Informationen selektiv hervorgehoben und irrelevante Inhalte aus dem Baum entfernt werden, ist jedoch noch ein offenes Problem. Bestehende Ansätze, die vordefinierte Regeln zur Beseitigung von Rauschen verwenden, liefern aufgrund der Komplexität und Variabilität natürlicher Sprache möglicherweise nicht immer optimale Ergebnisse. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine neuartige Architektur namens Dynamicly Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN) vor, die lernt, den Abhängigkeitsbaum durch Umdenken in einem End-to-End-Schema zu beschneiden. In jeder Schicht von DP-GCN verwenden wir ein Auswahlmodul, um uns auf Knoten zu konzentrieren, die die Zielbeziehung durch eine Reihe von binären Gates ausdrücken, und erweitern dann den beschnittenen Baum mit einem beschnittenen semantischen Graphen, um die Konnektivität sicherzustellen. Danach führen wir einen Umdenkmechanismus ein, um den Schnittvorgang zu führen und zu verfeinern, indem wir die auf hohem Niveau erlernten Funktionen wiederholt zurückführen. Umfangreiche experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell im Vergleich zu starken Wettbewerbern beeindruckende Ergebnisse erzielt.', 'id': 'Pohon dependensi telah terbukti efektif dalam menangkap hubungan jarak jauh antara entitas sasaran. Nevertheless, how to selectively emphasize target-relevant information and remove irrelevant content from the tree is still an open problem.  Existing approaches employing pre-defined rules to eliminate noise may not always yield optimal results due to the complexity and variability of natural language.  In this paper, we present a novel architecture named Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), which learns to prune the dependency tree with rethinking in an end-to-end scheme.  Dalam setiap lapisan DP-GCN, kami menggunakan modul pemilihan untuk berkonsentrasi pada node yang mengekspresikan hubungan sasaran dengan set gerbang binari, dan kemudian menambah pohon yang dipotong dengan grafik semantis yang dipotong untuk memastikan konektivitas. After that, we introduce a rethinking mechanism to guide and refine the pruning operation by feeding back the high-level learned features repeatedly.  Extensive experimental results demonstrate that our model achieves impressive results compared to strong competitors.', 'fa': 'درختان بستگی نشان داده شده است که در دستگیر رابطه های طولانی بین عناصر هدف موثر است. با این حال، چگونه انتخاب کردن اطلاعات مربوط به هدف و حذف محتویات بی اثری از درخت هنوز یک مشکل باز است. موجودات موجود با استفاده از قوانین پیش\u200cتعریف برای حذف صوت ممکن است نتیجه\u200cهای بهترین به دلیل پیچیدگی و تغییر دهنده زبان طبیعی نتیجه دهد. در این کاغذ، ما یک معماری نویسی به نام Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که یاد می\u200cگیرد درخت بستگی را با بازفکری در یک نقشه\u200cی پایان پایان کند. در هر طبقه DP-GCN، ما از یک مدول انتخاب استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا روی گره\u200cها تمرکز کنیم که ارتباط هدف را توسط یک مجموعه دروازه\u200cهای دویینی توسط یک مجموعه دروازه\u200cهای دویینی نشان می\u200cدهند، و سپس درخت قطع شده را با یک گراف semantic قطع بعد از آن، ما یک مکانیسم تفکری دوباره برای هدایت و تغییر عملیات پاک را معرفی می کنیم با تغییر دادن ویژگی های سطح بالا که به دفعه یاد گرفته می شود. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش زیادی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما نتیجه\u200cهای تاثیر\u200cآور در مقایسه با رقابت\u200cکنندگان قوی به دست می\u200cآید.', 'ko': '의존 트리는 목표 실체 간의 장기적인 관계를 효과적으로 포착할 수 있다는 것이 증명되었다.그러나 목표와 관련된 정보를 선택적으로 강조하고 트리에서 관련되지 않은 내용을 삭제하는 것은 여전히 해결해야 할 문제이다.자연 언어의 복잡성과 가변성 때문에 기존의 미리 정의된 규칙을 사용하여 소음을 제거하는 방법은 항상 최상의 결과를 얻지 못할 수도 있다.본고에서 우리는 동적 가지치기 권적 네트워크(DP-GCN)라고 하는 새로운 체계 구조를 제시했다. 이 네트워크는 끝에서 끝까지의 방식으로 재고를 통해 가지치기 의존 나무를 배운다.DP-GCN의 각 층에서 우리는 하나의 선택 모듈을 사용하여 이원문을 통해 목표 관계를 나타내는 노드에 집중한 다음에 가지치기 의미도를 사용하여 가지치기 나무를 확충하여 연결성을 확보한다.이후에 우리는 반성 메커니즘을 도입하여 고급 학습 특징을 반복적으로 피드백함으로써 편집 조작을 지도하고 세분화시켰다.대량의 실험 결과는 강력한 경쟁 상대에 비해 우리의 모델이 인상적인 결과를 얻었다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'sw': 'Mti wa kujitegemea umeonekana kuwa na ufanisi katika kuchukua mahusiano ya muda mrefu kati ya vitu vinavyolenga. Hata hivyo, jinsi ya kuhamasisha taarifa zinazohusiana na kuondoa maudhui yasiyo na maana kutoka mti bado ni tatizo la wazi. Existing approaches employing pre-defined rules to eliminate noise may not always yield optimal results due to the complexity and variability of natural language.  Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mharibu wa riwaya anayeitwa Dynamically Prunned Graph (DP-GCN), ambayo inajifunza kuifua mti wa kutegemea na kufikiri tena katika mpango wa mwisho. Katika kila ngazi ya DP-GCN, tunatumia kituo cha uchaguzi ili kuhusiana na maeneo yanayoonyesha uhusiano wa lengo na seti ya milango binafsi, na kisha kuongeza mti wa kisasa na picha ya kisasa ili kuhakikisha uhusiano. Baada ya hayo, tunaonyesha mfumo wa kufikiria kuongoza na kurekebisha operesheni ya akili kwa kurudisha vipengele vya kujifunza kwa mara nyingi. Matokeo mengi ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inafanikiwa matokeo mazuri yanayofanana na washindi wenye nguvu.', 'tr': 'Ganylyk agaçlary maksad zadlaryň arasyndaky baglaşyklary täsirli bolup görünýär. Yöne, maksadyň möhüm maglumaty saýlamagy we agaçdan gaýratyn maglumaty çykarmagy häzir açyk meseledir. Sesi ýitirmek üçin ön bellenen kararlaryny ulanan golaýlar tebigy diliniň çözürlik we üýtgeşikligi sebäpli hemişe göz ön bellenen netijesi bolmaz. Bu kagyzda Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network DP-GCN her gatynda, baýramyň bir gaty bilen maksady diňleýän düwmelere üns bermek üçin saýlaw modi ullanýarys we soňra gazylýan agajyny parmak üçin bir semantik grafik bilen üýtgedýäris Ondan soňra ýokary dereje öwrenen özellikleri yzyna süýtgetmek we çykarmak üçin ýene bir pikirlenme mekanizmasyny guruldyrys. Döwletimiz nusgalary güýçli döwletlere görä örän täsirli netijede ýetip biljekdigini görkez.', 'am': 'Dependency trees have been shown to be effective in capturing long-range relations between target entities.  ምንም እንኳን፣ በተመረጠው የግንኙነት መረጃ ማሳየት እና ከዛፉ ላይ ያልቻለውን ማነሳቀስ ግን የተከፈተ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የድምፅ ድምፅ ለማጥፋት ቀድሞ የተወሰነ ሥርዓቶችን ለመቀጠል የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ግንኙነት እና ልዩነት ምክንያት መፍጠር አይችልም፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ዲያኖማዊ ፕሮግራፍ የግንኙነት መረብ (DP-GCN) የተባለውን የመጠቀም ዛፍ ለመቆርጥ የሚማርበትን የመረጃ መሠረት እናቀርባለን፡፡ በDP-GCN በየደረጃው፣ የአካባቢውን ግንኙነት በሁለት በሮች እናሳየው በመኖሪያዎች ላይ እናስማራለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የደረጃ ተማሪዎችን እውቀት በመመለስ የመራጠር እና አስተዋይ ስልጣንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ብዙ ፈተና ውጤቶች ምሳሌያችን ከሚያጋራው ኃይለኞች ጋር የሚያደርግ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Afhanklikheid bome is vertoon om effektief te wees in die opvang van lang omvang relasies tussen doel entiteite. Maar hoe om die doel-relevante inligting te selekteer en verwyder onrelevante inhoud van die boom is nog 'n oop probleem. Bestaande toegang gebruik voor-gedefinieerde reëls om ruis te verwyder dalk mag nie altyd optimale resultate gee vanweë die kompleksiteit en veranderlikheid van natuurlike taal. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n nuwe arkitektuur genaamd Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), wat leer om die afhanklikheidsboom te prui met die hertenking in 'n einde-na-einde skema. In elke laag van DP-GCN, gebruik ons 'n keuse module om te konsentreer op nodes wat die doel verwanting uitdruk deur 'n stel van binêre poorte, en dan vergroot die gekraai boom met 'n gekraai semantiese graaf om die konnektiviteit te verseker. Daarna introduseer ons 'n hertenking mekanisme om die pruning-operasie te lei en herstel deur terug die hoë-vlak geleer funksies herhaal te fees. Ekstensiewe eksperimentale resultate bevestig dat ons model inpresief resultate bereik in vergelyking met sterke mededingers.", 'sq': 'Dependency trees have been shown to be effective in capturing long-range relations between target entities.  Megjithatë, si të theksojmë selektivisht informacionin e rëndësishëm për objektivin dhe të heqim përmbajtjen e paligjshme nga pema është ende një problem i hapur. Existing approaches employing pre-defined rules to eliminate noise may not always yield optimal results due to the complexity and variability of natural language.  Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një arkitekturë të re të quajtur Rrjeti Konveolutiv i Grafikëve Dynamikisht të Dënimur (DP-GCN), i cili mëson të rrënojë pemën e varësisë me rifillimin në një skemë nga fundi në fund. In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connectivity.  After that, we introduce a rethinking mechanism to guide and refine the pruning operation by feeding back the high-level learned features repeatedly.  Rezultatet eksperimentale të gjera demonstrojnë se modeli ynë arrin rezultate mbresëlënëse krahasuar me konkurentët e fortë.', 'bn': 'লক্ষ্যবস্তুর মধ্যে দীর্ঘ সীমাবদ্ধ সম্পর্ক গ্রহণের কারণে নির্ভর করা গাছগুলো কার্যকর হতে দেখা যাচ্ছে। তবুও, কিভাবে লক্ষ্যবস্তুর সংক্রান্ত তথ্য নির্বাচিত করা এবং গাছ থেকে অযৌক্তিক বিষয়বস্তু সরিয়ে ফেলা যায় তা এখনো একটি  কন্ঠস্বর সরিয়ে দেওয়ার পূর্ব নির্ধারিত নিয়ম ব্যবহার করার বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার জটিল এবং ভাষার বৈষম্যের কারণে সবসময় অপ্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডানাইমাইক্যাল প্রান্ত গ্রাফ কনভোলেশনাল নেটওয়ার্ক (ডিপি-জিসিনি) নামের একটি নোভেল কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করি, যা শেষ পরিকল্পনায় পুনরায় চিন্ ডিপি-জিসিনির প্রত্যেক স্তরে আমরা একটি নির্বাচন মডিউল চালনা করি যাতে নোডের উপর মনোযোগ দিতে পারি বাইনারি গেটের দ্বারা লক্ষ্যের সম্পর্ক প্রকাশ করে, আর তারপর শুষ্ক গাছ যোগ দিয় এর পরে আমরা একটি পুনরায় চিন্তা করার মাধ্যমে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেখিয়েছি যাতে আমরা হাই-স্তরের শিক্ষিত বৈশিষ্ট্য পুনরাবার খাওয়ার মাধ্যম বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের মডেল শক্তিশালী প্রতিযোগীদের তুলনায় আকর্ষণীয় ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ կախվածության ծառերը արդյունավետ են նպատակային կազմակերպությունների միջև երկար հարաբերությունների վերացման մեջ: Nevertheless, how to selectively emphasize target-relevant information and remove irrelevant content from the tree is still an open problem.  Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները, որոնք օգտագործում են նախասահմանափակ կանոններ աղմուկի վերացման համար, միշտ կարող են լավագույն արդյունքներ տալ բնական լեզուների բարդությունից և տարբերակությունից պատճառով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր ճարտարապետություն, որը կոչվում է Դինամիկապես փորձված գրաֆիկական համընդհանուր ցանց (PD-GNC), որը սովորում է կախվածության ծառը պատրաստել վերջնական սխեմայով: In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connectivity.  After that, we introduce a rethinking mechanism to guide and refine the pruning operation by feeding back the high-level learned features repeatedly.  Extensive experimental results demonstrate that our model achieves impressive results compared to strong competitors.', 'az': 'Bağlamlıq ağacları məqsəd məxluqatların arasındakı uzun səviyyə ilişkilerini tutmaq üçün faydalı olduğunu göstərildi. Ancaq məqsəd məlumatlarını seçmək və ağacından möhtac məlumatları silmək hələ də açıq bir problemdir. Müxtəlif dillərin qarışıqlığı və dəyişiklikləri üzündən səsləri silmək üçün əvvəlcə belə müəyyən edilmiş qaydaları istifadə etmək üçün həmişə optimal sonuçları olar. Bu kağızda Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP DP-GCN hər səviyyədə, bir binar qapılar ilə məqsəd əlaqəsini ifadə etmək üçün seçim modulu istifadə edirik və sonra bağlantısını təsdiqləmək üçün parçalanmış a ğacını parçalanmış semantik grafiklə artırırıq. Bundan sonra, yüksək səviyyənin öyrəndiyi fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli tərzlərini geri vermək və təmizləmək üçün yenidən düşünmə mehanizmini təşkil edirik. Əlavə təcrübə sonuçları modellərimizin güclü müəlliflər ilə müqayisədə etkileyici sonuçlarını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Pokazano je da su drveće zavisnosti učinkovite u uhvativanju dugog dometa odnosa između ciljnih entitata. Međutim, kako selektivno naglasiti ciljne informacije i ukloniti neophodni sadržaj drveta još uvijek je otvoren problem. Postojeći pristupi upotrebovanju preddefiniranih pravila za eliminaciju buke ne mogu uvijek donijeti optimalne rezultate zbog kompleksnosti i variabilnosti prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu arhitekturu po imenu Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), koja nauči da pruži drvo zavisnosti sa ponovnom razmišljanjem u programu kraja do kraja. U svakom sloju DP-GCN-a, koristimo selekcijski modul da se koncentrišemo na čvorovima koji izražavaju ciljnu vezu sa setom binarnih vrata, a zatim povećamo pruženo drvo sa pruženim semantičkim grafikom kako bi osigurali povezanost. Nakon toga, predstavljamo mehanizam za ponovno razmišljanje kako bi vodili i popravili pružanje operacijom ponovno hraneći naučene karakteristike visokog nivoa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne impresivne rezultate u usporedbi sa jakim konkurentima.', 'cs': 'Bylo prokázáno, že stromy závislosti jsou účinné při zachytávání vztahů na dlouhé vzdálenosti mezi cílovými entitami. Nicméně, jak selektivně zdůraznit cílově relevantní informace a odstranit irelevantní obsah ze stromu je stále otevřeným problémem. Stávající přístupy využívající předem definovaná pravidla k eliminaci šumu nemusí vždy přinášet optimální výsledky vzhledem ke složitosti a variabilitě přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku představujeme novou architekturu s názvem Dynamicky Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), která se naučí prořezávat závislostní strom s přehodnocením v end-to-end schématu. V každé vrstvě DP-GCN používáme výběrový modul, který se soustředí na uzly vyjadřující cílovou relaci sadou binárních bran, a poté rozšíříme řezaný strom o prořezaný sémantický graf, aby byla zajištěna konektivita. Poté zavádíme přehodnocení mechanismu pro vedení a zdokonalení operace řezání opakovaným zpětným zpětným zpětným zpětným způsobem učených funkcí na vysoké úrovni. Rozsáhlé experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model dosahuje působivých výsledků ve srovnání se silnými konkurenty.', 'et': 'Sõltuvuspuud on osutunud tõhusaks sihtüksuste vaheliste pikaajaliste suhete kindlakstegemisel. Kuidas selektiivselt rõhutada sihtmärgile vastavat teavet ja eemaldada puult ebaolulist sisu, on siiski lahtiseks probleemiks. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid, milles kasutatakse müra kõrvaldamiseks eelnevalt kindlaksmääratud eeskirju, ei pruugi looduskeele keerukuse ja varieeruvuse tõttu alati anda optimaalseid tulemusi. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudset arhitektuuri nimega Dünaamiliselt Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), mis õpib sõltuvuspuu kärpimist läbi mõeldes. Igas DP-GCN kihis kasutame valikumoodulit, et keskenduda sõlmedele, mis väljendavad sihtsuhet binaarsete väravate kogumi abil, ja seejärel täiendada pühendatud puu pühendatud semantilise graafikuga, et tagada ühenduvus. Pärast seda tutvustame ümbermõtlemismehhanismi, et juhtida ja täpsustada pügamistoimingut, andes korduvalt tagasi kõrgetasemelised õppinud funktsioonid. Ulatuslikud katsetulemused näitavad, et meie mudel saavutab tugevate konkurentidega võrreldes muljetavaldavaid tulemusi.', 'ca': "Dependency trees have been shown to be effective in capturing long-range relations between target entities.  Nevertheless, how to selectively emphasize target-relevant information and remove irrelevant content from the tree is still an open problem.  Existing approaches employing pre-defined rules to eliminate noise may not always yield optimal results due to the complexity and variability of natural language.  En aquest article, presentem una nova arquitectura anomenada Red de Convolució de Gràfics Dinàmicament Pruned (DP-GCN), que aprene a tallar l'arbre de dependencia en repensar un esquema de final a final. En cada capa de DP-GCN, utilitzem un módul de selecció per concentrar-nos en nodos que expressen la relació alvo per un conjunt de portes binaries, i després augmentem l'arbre prunat amb un gràfic semàntic prunat per assegurar la connectivitat. Després d'això, introduïm un mecanisme de repensació per guiar i refinar l'operació de pruning alimentant les característiques aprengutes de alt nivell repetidament. Extensive experimental results demonstrate that our model achieves impressive results compared to strong competitors.", 'fi': 'Riippuvuuspuiden on osoitettu olevan tehokkaita kohdeyhteisöjen välisten pitkän aikavälin suhteiden kuvaamisessa. Kuitenkin, kuinka valikoivasti korostetaan kohdekohtaista tietoa ja poistetaan merkityksetön sisältö puusta, on edelleen avoin ongelma. Nykyiset lähestymistavat, joissa käytetään ennalta määriteltyjä sääntöjä melun poistamiseksi, eivät välttämättä aina tuota optimaalisia tuloksia luonnollisen kielen monimutkaisuuden ja vaihtelevuuden vuoksi. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uuden arkkitehtuurin nimeltä Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN), joka oppii karsimaan riippuvuuspuuta miettimällä uudelleen päästä päähän -kaaviossa. Jokaisessa DP-GCN-kerroksessa käytämme valintamoduulia keskittymään solmuihin, jotka ilmaisevat kohdesuhdetta binääriporttien avulla, ja sitten lisäämme karsitua puuta karsitulla semanttisella graafilla yhteyden varmistamiseksi. Tämän jälkeen otamme käyttöön uudelleenajattelumekanismin, jolla ohjataan ja hiotaan karsintaa syöttämällä takaisin korkean tason opittuja ominaisuuksia toistuvasti. Laajat kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme tuottaa vaikuttavia tuloksia vahvoihin kilpailijoihin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Dijejer-jejer Sampeyan kang dipunangé dipunangé ora iso nggawe barang langgar sampeyan winih Slacky buddy Nang pepul iki, kita mulai architecture sing nganggo Dinamarika PriUnd Graph convolution Network (PP-GSN), sing yelaran kanggo ngerasakno akeh nyong nggawe nguasakno sistem tuku gawe nguasakno. Dino saben Layer di PP-GSN, kita gunakake modul sing dipileksi kanggo nggawe sistem donde sing nyimpen nggawe aksi iki dadi aturan tapi iki dadi apik, lan unyanke sistem donde iki dadi sing perbudhakan bakal terusah dumateng semanti nggo kebebasan universe Awak dhéwé, ngéwé éntukno sistem gawe nguasai penting nggawe ngubah tindakan lan ijol-ijolan winih kanggo ngilanggar barang kelas kuwat gawe ngubah. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing paling-perusahaan anyar tentang ngono model sing bisa ngono perusahaan langkung wigatining maneh sing gagetyeng.', 'ha': "An nuna itãce masu daidaita ta zama mai amfani da su kãma dangantaka mai tsawo a tsakanin abubuwa masu yiwuwa. A lokacin da ya ƙayyade shirin bayani ga shirin kai yanzu masu amfani da jigon gaba, kuma ka cire tsarin da ba'a da shi ba daga itãcen, don haka yana da wata matsala mai buɗewa. Yi da amfani da wanda ke gaba, za'a yi amfani da sharuyar a gaba-defined sauti don a iya zartar da matsalar da amfani ko daidai, saboda haka, ba za'a iya ƙara matsalar da amfani da musamman lugha na asali ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wani matsayin nowaya wanda aka suna Dũnamically Pruned Graf Conversation Networkware (DD-GC), wanda yana yarda da ya tsarkake itãcen kure da kuma yana yin tunãni a cikin shirin ta ƙarama. Aka cikin kõwace wuri na DD-GC, Muke aiki wata shiri na zãɓen don ka yi tashi a kan node mai nuna wa muhimmanci da aka yi amfani da haɗi ga ƙõfõfi biyu, kuma kuma Mu ƙara girgije na rubutu da wata grafi na kamfata dõmin ya yi tsari ga haɗi. Sa'an nan kuma, za mu nuna wani mekanin mai tunãni na shiryarwa kuma za mu gyãra aikin mai gyarawa da za'a mayar da su abincin da aka sanar ta cikin daraja a dubu. Matarin jarrabai mai yawa sun nuna cewa misalinmu yana sãmu matsalar mai kyau a sammeni da mataimaki mai ƙarfi.", 'sk': 'Izkazalo se je, da so drevesa odvisnosti učinkovita pri zajemanju odnosov na dolgi razdalji med ciljnimi subjekti. Kljub temu, kako selektivno poudariti informacije, pomembne za cilj, in odstraniti nepomembno vsebino iz drevesa, je še vedno odprta težava. Obstoječi pristopi, ki uporabljajo vnaprej določena pravila za odpravo hrupa, zaradi kompleksnosti in variabilnosti naravnega jezika morda ne dajejo vedno optimalnih rezultatov. V prispevku predstavljamo novo arhitekturo dinamično obrezano grafično konvolucionalno omrežje (DP-GCN), ki se nauči obrezovati drevo odvisnosti s ponovnim premislekom v shemi od konca do konca. V vsaki plasti DP-GCN uporabljamo izbirni modul, ki se osredotoča na vozlišča, ki izražajo ciljno relacijo z nizom binarnih vrat, nato pa obrezano drevo povečamo z obrezanim semantičnim grafom, da zagotovimo povezljivost. Po tem uvajamo mehanizem za ponovno premislek, ki bo usmerjal in izboljšal postopek obrezovanja z večkratnim vračanjem znanih značilnosti na visoki ravni. Obsežni eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš model dosega impresivne rezultate v primerjavi z močnimi konkurenti.', 'he': 'עצי תלויות הוכחו להיות יעילים בלתפוס יחסים מרחוקים ארוכים בין יחידות המטרה. עם זאת, איך להדגיש באופן בוחרי מידע רלוונטי למטרה ולהסיר תוכן לא רלוונטי מהעץ עדיין בעיה פתוחה. גישות קיימות שמשתמשות חוקים מוגדרים מראש כדי לבטל את הרעש לא תמיד נותנות תוצאות אופטימיות בגלל המורכבות והשותנות של שפה טבעית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה חדשה בשם רשת שינוי גרפים מדינמית (DP-GCN), שלמדה לחתוך את עץ ההתלויות עם מחדש מחשבה בתכנית סוף-סוף. בכל שכבה של DP-GCN, אנו משתמשים במודול הבחירה כדי להתרכז בצבעים שמביעים את יחסי המטרה על ידי קבוצה של שערים בינריים, ואז לגדל את העץ המוצק עם גרף סמנטי מוצק כדי להבטיח את הקשר. לאחר מכן, אנו מציגים מנגנון מחדש מחשבה כדי להדריך ולעדין את מבצע השקיעה על ידי להחזיר את המאפיינים הלמודים ברמה גבוהה שוב ושוב. Extensive experimental results demonstrate that our model achieves impressive results compared to strong competitors.', 'bo': 'རྟེན་འབྲེལ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་རིང་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་མཐུན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཙོ་རིམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ་དང་ཤིག་བྱང་བའི་ནང་དོན་འདོར་སྐབས་ཁ་ Existing approaches employing pre-defined rules to eliminate the noise may not always yield optimal results due to the complexity and variability of the natural language. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མིང་Dynamically Pruned Graph Convolutional Network (DP-GCN)ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། In each layer of DP-GCN, we employ a selection module to concentrate on nodes expressing the target relation by a set of binary gates, and then augment the pruned tree with a pruned semantic graph to ensure the connection. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་གཞན་ཞིག་དང་བསྐྱ ལག་འཁྱེར་ཆེན་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བརྟན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡོད་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དང་མཐོང་'}
{'en': 'How Far Does BERT Look At : Distance-based Clustering and Analysis of BERT’s Attention', 'ar': 'إلى أي مدى ينظر بيرت إلى: التجميع على أساس المسافة وتحليل انتباه بيرت', 'es': 'Hasta dónde mira BERT: Agrupación basada en la distancia y análisis de la atención de BERT', 'fr': "Jusqu'où le BERT regarde-t-il\xa0: regroupement basé sur la distance et analyse de l'attention du BERT", 'pt': 'Até onde o BERT olha: agrupamento baseado em distância e análise da atenção do BERT', 'ja': 'BERTはどこまで見ているのか：距離ベースのクラスタリングとBERTの注目度の分析', 'zh': 'BERT看多远曰:聚类BERT也', 'hi': 'BERT कितनी दूर तक दिखता है: दूरी-आधारित क्लस्टरिंग और BERT के ध्यान का विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Как далеко смотрит БЕРТА: кластеризация на расстоянии и анализ внимания БЕРТА', 'ga': 'Cé chomh fada agus a Amharcann BET Air: Cnuasú Cianbhunaithe agus Anailís ar Aire BERT', 'hu': 'Milyen messzire tekint a BERT: Távolságon alapuló klaszterezés és a BERT figyelmének elemzése', 'ka': 'როგორ დარჩენა BERT-ს დაახლოებით: განსხვავებული კლასტერი და ანალიზია BERT-ის დარჩენება', 'el': 'Πόσο μακριά κοιτάζει ο BERT: Συγκέντρωση με βάση την απόσταση και ανάλυση της προσοχής του BERT', 'it': "A che punto BERT guarda: Clustering a distanza e analisi dell'attenzione di BERT", 'kk': 'BERT қанша ұзындығын қалай қарай: BERT- дің қашықтығының қашықтық кластерингі және анализ', 'mk': 'Колку далеку BERT гледа: растојание на растојание и анализа на вниманието на BERT', 'lt': 'Kaip toli BERT žiūri: nuotolinio BERT dėmesio grupavimas ir analizė', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ട് എങ്ങനെയാണ് നോക്കുന്നത്: ദൂരെയുള്ള ക്ലാസ്റ്റിങ്ങിനെയും ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതിനെ', 'ms': 'Berapa Jauh BERT Melihat: Pengkumpulan berdasarkan jarak dan Analis Perhatian BERT', 'mn': 'BERT-ын анхаарлыг хэр хол харах вэ?', 'no': 'Kor langt BERT ser på: Avstandsbasert Clustering og Analysering av BERT sin oppmerksomhet', 'pl': 'Jak daleko patrzy BERT: klastrowanie oparte na odległości i analiza uwagi BERT', 'ro': 'Cât de departe se uită BERT la: Clustering pe distanță și analiza atenției BERT', 'sr': 'Koliko daleko je BERT pogledao: na daljini bazirani klustering i analiziranje BERT-ove pažnje', 'si': 'BERT කොච්චර දුරටත් බලන්න පුළුවන්: දුරටත් අධාරිත ක්\u200dලාස්ටර් එක්ක සහ BERT ගේ අවධානය විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': "How Far Does BERT Look At: Distance-based Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention", 'sv': 'Hur långt ser BERT på: Distansbaserad klustring och analys av BERT:s uppmärksamhet', 'ta': "How Far Does BERT Look At: Distance-based Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention", 'mt': 'Kif Jagħmel il-BERT Ħares lejn: Raggruppament u Analiżi bbażati fuq id-distanza tal-Attenzjoni tal-BERT', 'ur': 'BERT کتنا دور دیکھتا ہے: فاصلہ بنیاد کی کلاسترینگ اور تحلیل BERT کی توجہ', 'uz': "Bu yerda BERT qanday ko'rinishini ko'rsatadi: Distance-based Clustering va BERT's Attention Analysis", 'vi': 'Cây găng-tơ nhìn xa thế nào: Sự phân hủy kết nối xa xôi và phân tích chú ý của BERT.', 'nl': 'Hoe ver kijkt BERT naar: Afstandsgebaseerde clustering en analyse van de aandacht van BERT', 'hr': 'Koliko daleko BERT pogleda: udaljena klasteriranja i analiza BERT-ove pažnje', 'id': "How Far Does BERT Look At: Distance-based Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention", 'da': "Hvor langt ser BERT på: Distancebaseret klynge og analyse af BERT's opmærksomhed", 'bg': 'Докъде гледа Берт: Клъстериране на базата на дистанция и анализ на вниманието на Берт', 'de': 'Wie weit sieht BERT aus: Distance-based Clustering und Analyse der Aufmerksamkeit von BERT', 'fa': 'چقدر دور از BERT نگاه می\u200cکند: کلاسترینگ و تحلیل توجه BERT در فاصله', 'sw': 'Namna mbali BERT Inavyoangalia: Makundi na Uchambuzi wa Uchunguzi wa BERT', 'tr': "BERT N채챌e Uzak G철r체n첵채r: Uzak tabanly Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention", 'af': 'Hoe ver Doen BERT Kyk na: Afstand-gebaseerde Clustering en Analisie van BERT se Aansig', 'sq': "How Far Does BERT Look At: Distance-based Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention", 'am': 'ብሬት እንዴት እንደሚያየው ነው:: የBERT ማስታወቂያ የደረጃ ቁልጭት እና Analysis', 'ko': '버트는 얼마나 멀리 연구했는가: 거리에 기초한 집합과 버트의 주의력 분석', 'az': "BERT N톛 uzaq g칬r칲n칲r: Uzaql캼q-tabanl캼 Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention", 'bs': 'Koliko daleko je BERT pogledao: podudaljeno klasteriranje i analiziranje BERT-ove pažnje', 'hy': 'Ինչքա՞ն հեռու է Բերթը նայում. հեռավորության հիմնված խմբավորումը և Բերթը ուշադրության վերլուծումը', 'cs': 'Jak daleko se BERT dívá: seskupení na vzdálenosti a analýza pozornosti BERT', 'fi': 'Kuinka pitkälle BERT katsoo: Etäpohjainen klusterointi ja BERT:n huomion analysointi', 'bn': 'কিভাবে দূরে বেরেট দেখুন: বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক ক্লাস্টিং এবং বিবেরেটের মনোযোগের বিশ্লেষণ', 'ca': "Com de lluny mira BERT: agrupament a distància i anàlisi de l'atenció de BERT", 'et': 'Kui kaugele BERT vaatab: kauguspõhine klastrite koostamine ja BERT tähelepanu analüüs', 'sk': 'Kako daleč gleda BERT: Sklopiranje na razdalji in analiza BERT-ove pozornosti', 'he': 'כמה רחוק BERT מסתכל על: קבוצה מבוססת מרחק וניתוח של תשומת לב BERT', 'jv': "Ngawe 'Cantor' ya BERT Nanging: Distance-basa clustering lan Ngawe BeRT's Attribution", 'ha': "Ina Far Do BERT Look Look: Distance-based Clusting and Analyze of BERT's Attachment", 'bo': "BERT's Attention of How Far Does BERT Look at: Distance-based Clustering and Analysis of BERT's Attention"}
{'en': 'Recent research on the multi-head attention mechanism, especially that in pre-trained models such as BERT, has shown us heuristics and clues in analyzing various aspects of the mechanism. As most of the research focus on probing tasks or hidden states, previous works have found some primitive patterns of attention head behavior by heuristic analytical methods, but a more systematic analysis specific on the attention patterns still remains primitive. In this work, we clearly cluster the attention heatmaps into significantly different patterns through unsupervised clustering on top of a set of proposed features, which corroborates with previous observations. We further study their corresponding functions through analytical study. In addition, our proposed features can be used to explain and calibrate different attention heads in Transformer models.', 'fr': "Des recherches récentes sur le mécanisme d'attention multi-têtes, en particulier dans les modèles pré-entraînés tels que BERT, nous ont montré des heuristiques et des indices dans l'analyse de divers aspects du mécanisme. Comme la plupart des recherches se concentrent sur des tâches de sondage ou des états cachés, des travaux antérieurs ont trouvé des modèles primitifs de comportement de la tête d'attention par des méthodes analytiques heuristiques, mais une analyse plus systématique spécifique des modèles d'attention reste primitive. Dans ce travail, nous regroupons clairement les cartes thermiques de l'attention selon des modèles significativement différents grâce à un regroupement non supervisé au-dessus d'un ensemble de caractéristiques proposées, ce qui corrobore les observations précédentes. Nous étudions plus en détail leurs fonctions correspondantes par le biais d'études analytiques. De plus, les fonctionnalités que nous proposons peuvent être utilisées pour expliquer et étalonner différentes têtes d'attention dans les modèles Transformer.", 'ar': 'أظهرت الأبحاث الحديثة حول آلية الانتباه متعدد الرؤوس ، خاصةً تلك الموجودة في النماذج المدربة مسبقًا مثل BERT ، الاستدلال والقرائن في تحليل الجوانب المختلفة للآلية. نظرًا لأن معظم الأبحاث تركز على التحقيق في المهام أو الحالات المخفية ، فقد وجدت الأعمال السابقة بعض الأنماط البدائية لسلوك رأس الانتباه من خلال الأساليب التحليلية الإرشادية ، لكن التحليل الأكثر منهجية المحدد لأنماط الانتباه لا يزال بدائيًا. في هذا العمل ، قمنا بتجميع خرائط حرارة الانتباه بشكل واضح في أنماط مختلفة بشكل كبير من خلال مجموعات غير خاضعة للإشراف فوق مجموعة من الميزات المقترحة ، والتي تدعم الملاحظات السابقة. ندرس كذلك وظائفهم المقابلة من خلال الدراسة التحليلية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يمكن استخدام ميزاتنا المقترحة لشرح ومعايرة رؤوس الانتباه المختلفة في نماذج المحولات.', 'es': 'Investigaciones recientes sobre el mecanismo de atención multicabezal, especialmente en modelos preentrenados como BERT, nos han mostrado heurísticas y pistas para analizar varios aspectos del mecanismo. Como la mayor parte de la investigación se centra en tareas de sondeo o estados ocultos, trabajos anteriores han encontrado algunos patrones primitivos de comportamiento de la cabeza de atención mediante métodos analíticos heurísticos, pero un análisis más sistemático específico de los patrones de atención sigue siendo primitivo. En este trabajo, agrupamos claramente los mapas de calor de atención en patrones significativamente diferentes a través de agrupaciones no supervisadas sobre un conjunto de características propuestas, lo que corrobora con observaciones anteriores. Estudiamos más a fondo sus funciones correspondientes a través del estudio analítico. Además, nuestras funciones propuestas se pueden utilizar para explicar y calibrar diferentes cabezales de atención en los modelos Transformer.', 'pt': 'Pesquisas recentes sobre o mecanismo de atenção multi-head, especialmente em modelos pré-treinados como o BERT, nos mostraram heurísticas e pistas na análise de vários aspectos do mecanismo. Como a maior parte da pesquisa se concentra em tarefas de sondagem ou estados ocultos, trabalhos anteriores encontraram alguns padrões primitivos de comportamento da cabeça de atenção por métodos analíticos heurísticos, mas uma análise mais sistemática específica sobre os padrões de atenção ainda permanece primitiva. Neste trabalho, agrupamos claramente os heatmaps de atenção em padrões significativamente diferentes por meio de agrupamento não supervisionado em cima de um conjunto de recursos propostos, o que corrobora com observações anteriores. Estudamos ainda mais suas funções correspondentes através do estudo analítico. Além disso, nossos recursos propostos podem ser usados para explicar e calibrar diferentes cabeças de atenção em modelos de transformadores.', 'ja': '特にBERTのような事前訓練されたモデルにおける多頭注意メカニズムに関する最近の研究は、メカニズムのさまざまな側面を分析する際のヒューリスティックと手がかりを示しています。ほとんどの研究が探索タスクまたは隠れた状態に焦点を当てているため、以前の研究ではヒューリスティックな分析手法による注意頭部の行動のいくつかの原始的なパターンが見つかっているが、注意パターンに特有のより体系的な分析は依然として原始的である。この研究では、提案された一連の機能の上に、監督されていないクラスタリングを通じて、注意力ヒートマップを明確に異なるパターンにクラスタリングし、これは以前の観察と裏付けている。分析的研究を通じて、それらの対応する関数をさらに研究します。さらに、提案されている機能を使用して、トランスフォーマーモデルで異なる注意ヘッドを説明および較正することができます。', 'zh': '近于多头意机,特于BERT等预练模样,示我以启发式线。 多集于探隐,前事已发于启发式分析方法见意头行之始式,而意式之更统犹存。 于是群言无监聚类,明以注意热图聚类为明式,与前观合。 论其功能。 此外功能可施于解释校准变压器模形之不同者。', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования механизма многоглавого внимания, особенно в предварительно обученных моделях, таких как BERT, показали нам эвристику и подсказки при анализе различных аспектов механизма. Поскольку большинство исследований сосредоточены на зондирующих задачах или скрытых состояниях, предыдущие работы обнаружили некоторые примитивные модели поведения головки внимания эвристическими аналитическими методами, но более систематический анализ, специфический для моделей внимания, все еще остается примитивным. В этой работе мы четко кластеризуем тепловые карты внимания в существенно разные паттерны посредством неконтролируемой кластеризации поверх набора предлагаемых признаков, что подтверждается предыдущими наблюдениями. Мы дополнительно изучаем их соответствующие функции с помощью аналитического исследования. Кроме того, предлагаемые нами функции могут быть использованы для объяснения и калибровки различных головок внимания в моделях трансформаторов.', 'hi': 'बहु-सिर ध्यान तंत्र पर हाल के शोध, विशेष रूप से BERT जैसे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल में, हमें तंत्र के विभिन्न पहलुओं का विश्लेषण करने में ह्यूरिस्टिक्स और सुराग दिखाए गए हैं। जैसा कि अधिकांश शोध कार्यों या छिपे हुए राज्यों की जांच पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, पिछले कार्यों ने हेरिस्टिक विश्लेषणात्मक तरीकों से ध्यान सिर के व्यवहार के कुछ आदिम पैटर्न पाए हैं, लेकिन ध्यान पैटर्न पर विशिष्ट अधिक व्यवस्थित विश्लेषण अभी भी आदिम बना हुआ है। इस काम में, हम स्पष्ट रूप से प्रस्तावित सुविधाओं के एक सेट के शीर्ष पर असुरक्षित क्लस्टरिंग के माध्यम से ध्यान हीटमैप्स को काफी अलग-अलग पैटर्न में क्लस्टर करते हैं, जो पिछले अवलोकनों के साथ पुष्टि करता है। हम विश्लेषणात्मक अध्ययन के माध्यम से उनके संबंधित कार्यों का आगे अध्ययन करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारे प्रस्तावित सुविधाओं को समझाने के लिए और ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल में विभिन्न ध्यान सिर कैलिब्रेट करने के लिए इस्तेमाल किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': "Thaispeáin taighde a rinneadh le déanaí ar an meicníocht aird ilcheann, go háirithe i múnlaí réamhoilte ar nós BERT, heorastaíocht agus leideanna dúinn agus anailís á déanamh againn ar ghnéithe éagsúla den mheicníocht. Ós rud é go ndírítear an chuid is mó den taighde ar thascanna fiosrúcháin nó stáit fholaithe, d'aimsigh saothair roimhe seo roinnt patrúin primitive iompar ceann aire trí mhodhanna anailíse heorastúla, ach tá anailís níos córasaí sainiúil ar na patrúin aird fós primitive. San obair seo, táimid ag cnuasach go soiléir ar na léarscáileanna teasa aird i bpatrúin atá an-difriúil trí bhraisliú gan mhaoirseacht anuas ar thacar de ghnéithe molta, a thagann leis na breathnuithe roimhe seo. Déanaimid tuilleadh staidéir ar a bhfeidhmeanna comhfhreagracha trí staidéar anailíseach. Ina theannta sin, is féidir ár ngnéithe molta a úsáid chun cinn aird éagsúla a mhíniú agus a chalabrú i múnlaí Trasfhoirmeoirí.", 'hu': 'A többfejű figyelem mechanizmusáról szóló közelmúltbeli kutatások, különösen az előképzett modellek, mint például a BERT, heurisztikát és nyomokat mutattak a mechanizmus különböző aspektusainak elemzésében. Mivel a kutatások többsége szondázási feladatokra vagy rejtett állapotokra összpontosít, a korábbi munkák heurisztikus analitikai módszerekkel megtalálták a figyelemfej viselkedésének primitív mintáit, de a figyelemmintákra vonatkozó szisztematikusabb elemzés továbbra is primitív marad. Ebben a munkában egyértelműen a figyelem hőtérképeit jelentősen eltérő mintákba csoportosítjuk, felügyelet nélküli klaszterezés révén a javasolt jellemzők tetején, ami megerősíti a korábbi megfigyeléseket. Tovább tanulmányozzuk a megfelelő funkciókat analitikai tanulmányozással. Emellett javasolt funkcióink használhatók a Transformer modellek különböző figyelemfejeinek elmagyarázására és kalibrálására.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες έρευνες σχετικά με τον μηχανισμό προσοχής πολλαπλών κεφαλών, ειδικά σε προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα όπως το έχει δείξει heuristics και ενδείξεις για την ανάλυση διαφόρων πτυχών του μηχανισμού. Καθώς το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της έρευνας επικεντρώνεται στην ανίχνευση καθηκόντων ή κρυφών καταστάσεων, προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν βρει κάποια πρωτόγονα πρότυπα συμπεριφοράς κεφαλιού προσοχής με heuristικές αναλυτικές μεθόδους, αλλά μια πιο συστηματική ανάλυση ειδικά για τα μοτίβα προσοχής παραμένει πρωτόγονη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, ομαδοποιούμε σαφώς τους Heatmaps προσοχής σε σημαντικά διαφορετικά μοτίβα μέσω μη εποπτικής ομαδοποίησης πάνω από ένα σύνολο προτεινόμενων χαρακτηριστικών, τα οποία επιβεβαιώνουν με προηγούμενες παρατηρήσεις. Μελετάμε περαιτέρω τις αντίστοιχες λειτουργίες τους μέσω αναλυτικής μελέτης. Επιπλέον, τα προτεινόμενα χαρακτηριστικά μας μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για να εξηγήσουν και να βαθμονομήσουν διαφορετικές κεφαλές προσοχής σε μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών.', 'it': "Recenti ricerche sul meccanismo di attenzione multi-testa, soprattutto in modelli pre-addestrati come BERT, ci hanno mostrato euristiche e indizi nell'analizzare vari aspetti del meccanismo. Poiché la maggior parte della ricerca si concentra su compiti di sonda o stati nascosti, i lavori precedenti hanno trovato alcuni modelli primitivi di comportamento della testa di attenzione con metodi analitici euristici, ma un'analisi più sistematica specifica sui modelli di attenzione rimane ancora primitiva. In questo lavoro, abbiamo chiaramente raggruppato le mappe di calore dell'attenzione in modelli significativamente diversi attraverso cluster non supervisionati in cima a una serie di caratteristiche proposte, che corroborano con le osservazioni precedenti. Studiamo ulteriormente le loro funzioni corrispondenti attraverso lo studio analitico. Inoltre, le nostre funzionalità proposte possono essere utilizzate per spiegare e calibrare diverse teste di attenzione nei modelli Transformer.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы бірнеше бақылау механизмінің зерттеулері, әсіресе BERT секілді алдын- оқылған үлгілерде, механизмінің түрлі аспектерін анализиялау үшін бізге геуристика мен таңбалары көрсетті. Іздеу көпшілігі тапсырмаларды немесе жасырылған күйлерді тексеру үшін, алдыңғы жұмыстардың бірнеше алдыңғы бақылау үлгілері геуристикалық аналитикалық әдістері арқылы табылды, бірақ назардағы Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз назарды жылу картасын өте түрлі үлгілерге сәйкес келтіріп, алдыңғы наблюдаулармен корробаттау үшін қолданылмаған кластерлердің үстінде қарай аламыз. Біз аналитикалық зерттеу арқылы олардың сәйкесті функцияларын зерттейміз. Қосымша, өзгертілген қасиеттерімізді түсініп, түрлендіру үлгілерінде түрлендіру және калибрлеу үшін қолданылады.', 'mk': 'Recent research on the multi-head attention mechanism, especially that in pre-trained models such as BERT, has shown us heuristics and clues in analyzing various aspects of the mechanism.  Бидејќи повеќето истражувања се фокусираат на истражување на задачи или скриени состојби, претходните дела открија некои примитивни шеми на однесување на вниманието на главата со хеористички аналитички методи, но посистематична анализа специфична на шемите на внимание сé уште останува при Во оваа работа, јасно ги групираме топломатките на вниманието во значително различни шаблони преку ненадгледувано групирање врз еден сет предложени карактеристики, кои потврдуваат со претходните набљудувања. Понатаму ги проучуваме нивните соодветни функции преку аналитичка студија. Покрај тоа, нашите предложени карактеристики може да се користат за објаснување и калибрирање на различни глави на внимание во трансформските модели.', 'ml': 'പലതലയുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമിനെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി പോലുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെയോ ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യങ്ങളെയോ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനെയോ കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ രീതികളിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നു. ഒരു കൂട്ടം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളു അന്യാലിട്ടിക്കല്\u200d പഠനത്തിലൂടെ നമ്മള്\u200d അവരുടെ പൊരുത്തപ്പെട്ട ഫങ്ഷനുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട വ്യത്യസ്ത കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി ശ്രദ്ധ ക്രമീകരിക്കാനും ഉപയോഗിക്ക', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე მრავალთან მექსინემის შესახებ, განსაკუთრებით, რომ წინ განაკეთებული მოდელში, როგორც BERT, ჩვენ ვიღებთ ჰერისტიკა და კოლესები მაქსინემის განსხვავებული აპექტირებში. როგორც უფრო მეტი შესწავლობის კონუქტირება მოქმედებისთვის ან დაკვირული სტატებისთვის, წინ მოქმედებისთვის პრიმიტიური მოქმედების მოქმედებისთვის ჰერისტიკური ანალიტიკური მეტებით მოი ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განვითარებით აღმოჩენეთ მონაცემის გარშემო კაპონტების მნიშვნელად განსხვავებული სტრუნტების გარეშე, რომელიც წინ მონაცემებით იქნება. ჩვენ დავასწავლობთ მათი შესაბამისი ფუნქციების ანალიტიკური სწავლებით. დამატებით, ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ ფუნქციები შეიძლება გამოყენება განსხვავებული გონიშვნელობის და კალიბრებისთვის განსხვავებული გონიშვნელობის მადე', 'lt': 'Recent research on the multi-head attention mechanism, especially that in pre-trained models such as BERT, has shown us heuristics and clues in analyzing various aspects of the mechanism.  Daugumoje mokslinių tyrimų daugiausia dėmesio skiriama užduotims ištirti arba paslėptoms būklėms, ankstesniuose darbuose nustatyta kai kurių primitivių dėmesio galvos elgesio modelių heuristiniais analitiniais metodais, tačiau sistemingesnė dėmesio modelių specifinė analizė tebėra primitivi. Šiame darbe aiškiai suskirstysime dėmesio šilumos žemėlapius į gerokai skirtingus modelius nepastebimu suskirstymu į siūlomų požymių rinkinį, kuris patvirtina ankstesnius pastebėjimus. Toliau tiriame jų atitinkamas funkcijas atliekant analitinius tyrimus. Be to, mūsų siūlomos savybės gali būti naudojamos paaiškinant ir kalibruojant skirtingas dėmesio galvas Transformer modeliuose.', 'mt': 'Riċerka reċenti dwar il-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni b’ħafna ras, speċjalment li f’mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel bħall-BERT, urilna ħewristiċi u indikazzjonijiet fl-analiżi ta’ diversi aspetti tal-mekkaniżmu. Minħabba li l-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka tiffoka fuq ix-xogħol ta’ sondazzjoni jew fuq stati moħbija, xogħlijiet preċedenti sabu xi mudelli primitivi ta’ mġiba tar-ras tal-attenzjoni permezz ta’ metodi analitiċi ewristiċi, iżda analiżi aktar sistematika speċifika dwar ix-xejriet tal-attenzjoni għadha primitiva. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nġabru b’mod ċar il-mapep tas-sħana tal-attenzjoni f’mudelli differenti b’mod sinifikanti permezz ta’ raggruppament mhux sorveljat fuq sett ta’ karatteristiċi proposti, li jikkorrobora ma’ osservazzjonijiet preċedenti. Aħna nistudjaw aktar il-funzjonijiet korrispondenti tagħhom permezz ta’ studju analitiku. Barra minn hekk, il-karatteristiċi proposti tagħna jistgħu jintużaw biex jispjegaw u jikkalibraw il-kapijiet differenti tal-attenzjoni fil-mudelli Transformer.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед олон толгой анхаарлын механизмийн судалгаа, ялангуяа BERT шиг урд сургалтын загварууд нь механизмын олон асуудлыг шинжилгээнд хюристик болон анхаарлыг харуулсан. Ихэнх судалгааны ажил эсвэл нуугдмал орнуудыг судалгаанд анхаарлаа хандуулж байгаа учраас, өмнөх ажлын зарим анхаарлаа анхаарлаа анхаарлаа удирдах гол загваруудыг харсан. Гэхдээ анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлэх загваруудын туха Энэ ажил дээр бид анхаарлын дулаарлын газрыг өмнөх ажиглалтуудтай холбогдож чадахгүй хэлбэрээр маш олон төрлийн загваруудыг тодорхойлдог. Бид өөрсдийн харилцааны функцүүдийг анализ судалгаагаар судалж байна. Үүнээс гадна бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн өөр анхаарлын толгойд Трансформер загваруудыг тайлбарлаж, калибрын тулд ашиглаж болно.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania nad mechanizmem uwagi wielogłowicowej, zwłaszcza w modelach wstępnie trenowanych, takich jak BERT, pokazały nam heurystykę i wskazówki w analizie różnych aspektów mechanizmu. Ponieważ większość badań skupia się na sondowaniu zadań lub ukrytych stanów, poprzednie prace odkryły pewne prymitywne wzorce zachowania głowy uwagi metodami heurystycznymi, ale bardziej systematyczna analiza specyficzna wzorców uwagi nadal pozostaje prymitywna. W niniejszej pracy jasno klastrujemy heatmapy uwagi w znacznie różne wzorce poprzez gromadzenie bez nadzoru na szczycie zestawu proponowanych cech, co potwierdza poprzednie obserwacje. Dalej badamy ich odpowiednie funkcje poprzez badanie analityczne. Ponadto proponowane przez nas funkcje mogą być wykorzystane do wyjaśnienia i kalibracji różnych głowic uwagi w modelach Transformera.', 'ro': 'Cercetările recente privind mecanismul de atenție multi-cap, în special cele din modele pre-instruite precum BERT, ne-au arătat euristice și indicii în analiza diferitelor aspecte ale mecanismului. Deoarece majoritatea cercetărilor se concentrează pe sarcini de sondare sau stări ascunse, lucrările anterioare au găsit unele modele primitive de comportament capului atenției prin metode analitice euristice, dar o analiză mai sistematică specifică modelelor de atenție rămâne încă primitivă. În această lucrare, grupăm clar hărțile de căldură ale atenției în modele semnificativ diferite prin gruparea nesupravegheată pe partea de sus a unui set de caracteristici propuse, care coroborează cu observațiile anterioare. Studiem în continuare funcțiile lor corespunzătoare prin studiu analitic. În plus, caracteristicile noastre propuse pot fi utilizate pentru a explica și calibra diferite capete de atenție în modelele Transformer.', 'no': 'Nyleg forskning om fleire hovud-oppmerksmekanismen, spesielt at i føretrainerte modeller, som BERT, har vist oss heuristikk og kluser i analysering av ulike aspektar av mekanismen. Som dei fleste forskningsfokuserer på å prøve oppgåver eller gøymde tilstandar, har førre arbeidar funne nokre primitiv mønsterelement for oppmerksomheten med heuristiske analytiske metodar, men ein meir systematisk analyse spesifisert på oppmerksmønsteret fortsatt er primitiv. I denne arbeida klokkar vi oppmerksomhetskarten til mykje forskjellige mønsterer gjennom ulike klassering på toppen av eit sett av foreslåtte funksjonar, som koroborar med førre observasjonar. Vi studierer dei tilsvarande funksjonane lenger gjennom analytiske studier. I tillegg kan våre foreslåande funksjonar brukast for å forklare og kalibrera ulike oppmerksomhetshoder i Transformeringsmodeller.', 'ms': 'Penelitian baru-baru ini mengenai mekanisme perhatian berbilang-kepala, terutama yang dalam model yang dilatih-dilatih seperti BERT, telah menunjukkan kepada kita heuristik dan petunjuk dalam menganalisis berbagai aspek mekanisme. Sebagai kebanyakan penelitian fokus pada penyelidikan tugas atau keadaan tersembunyi, kerja-kerja terdahulu telah menemukan beberapa corak primitif perilaku kepala perhatian dengan kaedah analitik heuristik, tetapi analisis yang lebih sistematik spesifik pada corak perhatian masih primitif. In this work, we clearly cluster the attention heatmaps into significantly different patterns through unsupervised clustering on top of a set of proposed features, which corroborates with previous observations.  We further study their corresponding functions through analytical study.  Selain itu, ciri-ciri yang kami cadangkan boleh digunakan untuk menjelaskan dan mengkalibrasi kepala perhatian berbeza dalam model Transformer.', 'sr': 'Nedavno istraživanje o multiglavnom mehanizmu pažnje, posebno da u predobučenim modelima kao što je BERT, pokazalo nam je heuristiku i tragove u analizi različitih aspekta mehanizma. Kao što je većina istraživanja usredotočena na ispitivanje zadataka ili skrivene države, prethodni radovi su pronašli neke primitivne obrasce pažnje glavnog ponašanja heurističkim analitičkim metodama, ali sistematičnija analiza specifičnija na obrascima pažnje i dalje je ostaje primitivna. U ovom poslu, očigledno skupljamo mape pažnje u značajno različite obrasce kroz neodređene skupljanje na vrhu grupe predloženih karakteristika, koja potvrđuje sa prethodnim posmatranjima. Dalje proučavamo njihove odgovarajuće funkcije kroz analitičku studiju. Osim toga, naše predložene karakteristike mogu se koristiti za objašnjavanje i kalibriranje različitih glava pažnje u modelima Transformera.', 'si': 'විශේෂයෙන්ම BERT වගේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ. හොයාගන්න වැඩක් නැත්තම් හොයාගන්න වැඩක් නැත්තම් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශේෂණයක මේ වැඩේ අපි පැහැදිලිවම අවධානය ගිණුම් මැත්තුවක් විශේෂයෙන් වෙනස් පෙට්ටර් වලින් අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් සැකසුම් සඳහා  අපි තවදුරටත් ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතික විශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා. ඒ වගේම, අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් අවධානයක් පැහැදිලි කරන්න සහ කැලිබර් කරන්න.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka ugu dambeysay ee meymisyada aad u fiirsaneyso badan, khusuusan in qaab horay loo tababaray, sida BERT, uu na tusay tusaale ahaan hiuristis iyo hagitaano analyeynta dhinacyada kala duduwan ee mekaniisada. Sida ay badan baaritaanka shaqada ama wadamada qarsoonaa, shaqaalaha hore waxay ka heleen qaabab asal ah oo ka mid ah dabeecada madaxa, laakiin baaritaanka caalamiga ah oo ku saabsan qaababka kaleemeysashada, iyadoo weli sii muhiim ah. Markaas waxan, waxaan si cad u dhaqdhaqaaqnaa dabeecada aad u kala duduwan, si aan la ilaalinayno oo la kordhiyo xarumo la soo jeeday, taasoo ku habboon aragtidii hore. Waxbarashada kaleba waxaynu sii baranaynaa shaqadooda oo isku mid ah. Intaas waxaa dheer oo loo isticmaali karaa noocyada tartanka ah oo loo soo jeeday in loo caddeeyo oo lagu kalsooneeyo madaxyada digtoonaanta kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Ny forskning om flerskalig uppmärksamhetsmekanism, särskilt i pre-utbildade modeller som BERT, har visat oss heuristik och ledtrådar i analysen av olika aspekter av mekanismen. Eftersom merparten av forskningen fokuserar på sonderingsuppgifter eller dolda tillstånd har tidigare arbeten funnit några primitiva mönster av uppmärksamhetens huvud beteende genom heuristiska analytiska metoder, men en mer systematisk analys specifik på uppmärksamhetsmönstren förblir fortfarande primitiv. I detta arbete grupperar vi tydligt uppmärksamhetens värmekartor i betydligt olika mönster genom oövervakad klustring ovanpå en uppsättning föreslagna funktioner, vilket bekräftar tidigare observationer. Vi studerar vidare deras motsvarande funktioner genom analytisk studie. Dessutom kan våra föreslagna funktioner användas för att förklara och kalibrera olika uppmärksamhet huvuden i Transformer modeller.', 'ta': 'அண்மையில் பல தலைப்புகள் கவனம் முறைமையைப் பற்றி ஆராய்ச்சி காண்பித்துள்ளது, குறிப்பாக முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில், பிரெட் போன்ற ம பெரும்பாலான ஆராய்ச்சி பணிகள் அல்லது மறைக்கப்பட்ட நாடுகள் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துவது போல், முந்தைய வேலைகள் ஹூரிஸ்டிக் ஆராய்வு முறைகளால் சில முதன்மையான கவனத்தி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் தெளிவாக கவனத்தை மிகவும் வெவ்வேறு முறைகளாக மாறுபடுத்துகிறோம் மூலம் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத குணங்களின் மேல் ஒரு குறிப ஆராய்ச்சியின் மூலம் அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாடுகளை மேலும் படிக்கிறோம். மேலும், எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட குணங்கள் மாற்று மாதிரிகளில் வேறு கவனத்தின் தலைவர்களை விளக்க மற்றும் அளவிட', 'ur': 'بہت سی سروں کی توجه مکانیسم کے بارے میں اچھی تحقیق، مخصوصا یہ ہے کہ BERT کی طرح پیش آموزش کی مدلکوں میں، ہمیں مکانیسم کی مختلف منظوروں کی تحلیل میں ہوریستیک اور کلاس دکھائے گئے ہیں۔ اس طرح اکثر تحقیقات کے مطابق دنیا یا یا چھپائے وطن پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے، پہلے دنیا کے مطابق اچھی تحقیقات کے مطابق اچھی طریقے سے اچھی طریقے سے اچھی طریقے سے اچھی تحقیقات کے مطابق اچھی تحقیقات پائی جاتی ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم صریح طور پر توجه گرم مپ کو اگلوں سے مختلف پٹرنوں کے ذریعہ ایک مجموعہ کے ذریعے غیرقابل تعمیر کرنا کے ذریعہ تخلیق کرتے ہیں جو اگلوں کی توجه کے ساتھ ثابت ہوتی ہے. ہم ان کے مطابق کامل کو تحلیل کے ذریعے پڑھتے ہیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہماری پیشنهاد کی ویژگی استعمال کر دی جاتی ہے کہ تغییر مڈلس میں مختلف سروں کو توضیح اور کالیبراٹ کریں۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik muhit mechanisining o'qituvchilari, hushqat bir o'rganilgan modellarda BERT kabi modellarda bizga heuristik va qo'llanmalarni o'rganadi, mechanisning har xil qismlarini aniqlash uchun. Ko'pchilik taʼminlovchilar vazifalarni yoki bekitilgan holatlarni tasavvur qilishga foydalanishi mumkin, avval ishlar heuritik analytik usullari orqali bir asosiy usullarning asosiy shakllarini topdik, lekin eng tizim analytiklash muvaffaqiyatlariga tayyorlik holatda ham muhimi. Bu vazifanda, biz taqdimotlarni o'zgartirib turganmiz, biz taxminan boshqa shakllarga o'rganamiz. Bu tashkilotlarning yuqoridagi ko'plab qo'llanilmaydigan bir ko'plab qo'llanmagan shakllarni ko'rsatuvchimiz. Biz ularning qisqa funksiyalarini analytik o'rganish orqali o'rganamiz. Ko'pchilik hodisalarimiz Transformer modelidagi har xil taʼminlov boshqaruvchilarni aniqlashga ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu gần đây về cơ chế tập trung đa đầu, đặc biệt trong các mô hình được rèn luyện trước như BERT, đã cho ta thấy thần kinh và đầu mối trong việc phân tích các khía cạnh khác nhau của cơ chế. Khi hầu hết các nghiên cứu tập trung vào các công việc thăm dò hoặc các trạng thái ẩn giấu, các công trình trước đã tìm ra các mô hình nguyên thủy hành vi của đầu tập trung bằng các phương pháp phân tích thần kinh, nhưng một phân tích cụ thể hơn về các mô hình chú ý vẫn còn nguyên thủy. Trong công việc này, chúng ta rõ ràng chú ý bản đồ cải tạo sự chú ý vào những mô hình khác nhau đáng kể qua những tụ tập chưa được giám sát trên đỉnh một số các tính năng đề xuất, xác thực với những quan sát trước đây. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu các chức năng tương ứng qua nghiên cứu phân tích. Thêm vào đó, các tính năng đề nghị của chúng ta có thể được dùng để giải thích và hiệu chỉnh các đầu tập trung khác nhau trong mô hình transformer.', 'bg': 'Последните изследвания на механизма за многоглаво внимание, особено това в предварително обучени модели като BERT, ни показаха евристика и улики в анализа на различни аспекти на механизма. Тъй като по-голямата част от изследванията се фокусират върху сондиране на задачи или скрити състояния, предишни работи са открили някои примитивни модели на поведение на главата на вниманието чрез евристични аналитични методи, но по-систематичен анализ, специфичен за моделите на вниманието, все още остава примитивен. В тази работа ясно групираме топлинните карти на вниманието в значително различни модели чрез неконтролирано групиране върху набор от предложени характеристики, което потвърждава предишните наблюдения. Проучваме допълнително съответните им функции чрез аналитично изследване. В допълнение, предлаганите от нас функции могат да бъдат използвани за обясняване и калибриране на различни глави за внимание в моделите на трансформатори.', 'da': 'Nylig forskning om opmærksomhedsmekanismen med flere hoveder, især i prætrænede modeller som BERT, har vist os heuristik og spor i analyse af forskellige aspekter af mekanismen. Da størstedelen af forskningen fokuserer på sondeopgaver eller skjulte tilstande, har tidligere værker fundet nogle primitive mønstre af opmærksomhedhovedets adfærd ved hjælp af heuristiske analytiske metoder, men en mere systematisk analyse specifikt på opmærksomhedsmønstrene stadig er primitiv. I dette arbejde klynger vi tydeligt opmærksomhedens varmetapper ind i væsentligt forskellige mønstre gennem ubevåget klyngning oven på et sæt foreslåede funktioner, som bekræfter med tidligere observationer. Vi undersøger yderligere deres tilsvarende funktioner gennem analytisk undersøgelse. Desuden kan vores foreslåede funktioner bruges til at forklare og kalibrere forskellige opmærksomhedshoveder i Transformer modeller.', 'nl': 'Recent onderzoek naar het meerkoppige aandachtsmechanisme, vooral dat in voorgetrainde modellen zoals BERT, heeft ons heuristieken en aanwijzingen laten zien bij het analyseren van verschillende aspecten van het mechanisme. Aangezien het meeste onderzoek zich richt op het opsporen van taken of verborgen toestanden, hebben eerdere werken primitieve patronen van aandachtskopgedrag gevonden met heuristische analytische methoden, maar een meer systematische analyse specifiek op de aandachtspatronen blijft primitief. In dit werk clusteren we de aandacht heatmaps duidelijk in significant verschillende patronen door onbeheerde clustering bovenop een reeks voorgestelde kenmerken, wat bevestigt met eerdere waarnemingen. We bestuderen verder hun overeenkomstige functies door middel van analytische studie. Daarnaast kunnen onze voorgestelde functies worden gebruikt om verschillende aandachtskoppen in Transformer-modellen uit te leggen en te kalibreren.', 'hr': 'Nedavno istraživanje o multiglavnom mehanizmu pažnje, posebno da u predobučenim modelima kao što je BERT, pokazalo nam je heurističke i tragove u analiziranju različitih aspekta mehanizma. Kao što je većina istraživanja usredotočena na ispitivanje zadataka ili skrivene države, prethodni rad pronašao je neke primitivne obrasce pozornosti glavnog ponašanja heurističkim analitičkim metodama, ali sistematičnija analiza specifična na obrasce pažnje i dalje je primitivna. U ovom poslu, očigledno smo skupljali pozorne karte u značajno različite obrasce kroz neodređene skupljanje na vrhu grupe predloženih karakteristika, koja potvrđuje prethodnim promatranjima. Dalje proučavamo njihove odgovarajuće funkcije kroz analitičko ispitivanje. Osim toga, naše predložene karakteristike mogu se koristiti za objašnjavanje i kalibriranje različitih glava pažnje u modelima Transformera.', 'ko': '최근 다중 주의 메커니즘에 대한 연구, 특히 버트와 같은 예비 훈련 모델에서 이 메커니즘의 각 방면을 분석하는 계발과 단서를 보여 주었다.대부분의 연구가 탐색 임무나 숨겨진 상태에 집중되었기 때문에 이전의 작업은 계발식 분석 방법을 통해 주의 헤드 행위의 일부 원시적인 모델을 발견했지만 주의 모델에 대한 더욱 체계적인 분석은 여전히 원시적이다.이 작업에서 우리는 한 그룹이 제안한 특징 위에서 무감독 집합을 실시하여 주의력 열도를 현저하게 다른 모델로 집합시켰다. 이것은 이전의 관찰 결과와 증명된다.분석 연구를 통해 우리는 그것들의 상응하는 기능을 한층 더 연구했다.그 밖에 우리가 제시한 특징은 변압기 모델 중의 서로 다른 주의 헤드를 해석하고 교정하는 데 쓸 수 있다.', 'de': 'Jüngste Forschungen über den Mehrköpfigen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, insbesondere in vortrainierten Modellen wie BERT, haben uns Heuristiken und Hinweise zur Analyse verschiedener Aspekte des Mechanismus gezeigt. Da sich die meisten Forschungsarbeiten auf die Untersuchung von Aufgaben oder versteckten Zuständen konzentrieren, haben frühere Arbeiten einige primitive Muster des Aufmerksamkeitskopfverhaltens durch heuristische analytische Methoden gefunden, aber eine systematischere Analyse spezifisch auf die Aufmerksamkeitsmuster bleibt immer noch primitiv. In dieser Arbeit gruppieren wir die Aufmerksamkeit Heatmaps eindeutig in signifikant unterschiedliche Muster durch unüberwachte Clustering auf einer Reihe von vorgeschlagenen Merkmalen, was mit früheren Beobachtungen bestätigt wird. Wir untersuchen ihre entsprechenden Funktionen durch analytische Studien weiter. Darüber hinaus können unsere vorgeschlagenen Funktionen verwendet werden, um verschiedene Aufmerksamkeitsköpfe in Transformer-Modellen zu erklären und zu kalibrieren.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات اخیر در مورد مکانیسم توجه چندین سر، مخصوصا در مدل پیش آموزش مانند BERT، به ما نشان داده است که در تحلیل کردن نقطه\u200cهای مختلف مکانیسم هیوریستیک و نقطه\u200cها را به ما نشان داده است. همانطور که بیشتر تحقیقات روی تحقیقات وضعیت\u200cهای مخفی یا وضعیت\u200cهای تحقیقات تمرکز می\u200cکند، کارهای قبلی بعضی از الگوهای اولیه\u200cای از رفتار رئیس توجه به طریق روش\u200cهای تحلیل\u200cشناسی حوریست پیدا کردند، اما یک تحلیل سیستمی\u200cتر در این کار، مشخصاً ما نقشه\u200cهای گرم توجه را به الگوهای بسیار متفاوت می\u200cگیریم، در حالی که از طریق یک مجموعه از ویژه\u200cهای پیشنهاد، که با مشاهده\u200cهای قبلی هماهنگ می\u200cکند. ما از طریق تحقیقات تحقیقات تحقیقات بیشتر عملکرد مربوط به آنها مطالعه می کنیم. علاوه بر این، ویژه\u200cهای پیشنهاد ما می\u200cتوانند برای توضیح و کالیبران سرهای توجه مختلف در مدل تغییر دهنده استفاده شود.', 'id': 'Penelitian baru-baru ini tentang mekanisme perhatian multi-kepala, terutama bahwa dalam model yang terlatih sebelumnya seperti BERT, telah menunjukkan kepada kita heuristik dan petunjuk dalam menganalisis berbagai aspek mekanisme. Sebagai kebanyakan penelitian fokus pada penyelidikan tugas atau negara tersembunyi, pekerjaan sebelumnya telah menemukan beberapa pola primitif perilaku perhatian kepala dengan metode analitis heuristik, tetapi analisis yang lebih sistematis spesifik pada pola perhatian masih primitif. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami jelas mengumpulkan peta pemanasan perhatian menjadi pola yang sangat berbeda melalui kumpulan yang tidak diawasi di atas set karakteristik yang diusulkan, yang mengkonfirmasi dengan pengamatan sebelumnya. Kami lebih lanjut mempelajari fungsi yang sesuai dengan mereka melalui penelitian analitis. In addition, our proposed features can be used to explain and calibrate different attention heads in Transformer models.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda birnäçe kelläp üns meýdançasynda, ýöne BERT ýaly öňünden öňünden eğitilen nusgalarda, bize mehanizmanyň görnüşleri we çärelerini çözdirdi. Araştyrymyň köpüsi görevleri ýa-da gizlenen döwletlere üns berilýär, öňki eserler heuristik analitik ýagdalar bilen kelläň üns çekmeleri bilen primitive çykar tapdylar, ýöne üns çekmeleri bilen has sistematik analizi hem primitive bolup ýok. Bu işde, biz üns kartlaryny öňki gözlemlerle tanyş etmeýän bir topar üýtgedikleri üçin örän farklı nusgalara çarpýarys. Biz olaryň täsirli fonksiýalaryny analitik öwrenmeleri bilen okaýarys. Munuň üçin biziň tekliplerimiz Transformer modellerinde farklı üns kellelerini düşündirmek we kalibrlemek üçin ullanylabilir.', 'am': 'በቅርብ ጊዜ የብዙዎች የልዩ አካባቢ አካባቢዎች፣ ይልቁንም ብኤርቴን የሚመስል ተማሪዎችን እና የፍጥረት ግንኙነቶችን በአካባቢነታችን ልዩ ልዩ ጉዳይ በማስተምር ያሳየናል፡፡ በብዙ ምርመራዎች ስራዎችን ወይም የተሰወረውን ሀገሮች በመፈለግ ላይ እንደምትታወቁ፣ የቀድሞው ሥራ የራስ ጥያቄ የጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በአውሪስቲካዊ አስተያየት ሥርዓቶች አግኝተዋል፣ ነገር ግን በጥያቄ ምሳሌ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ምርጫዎች ገና ጥያቄ ይኖራል፡፡ In this work, we clearly cluster the attention heatmaps into significantly different patterns through unsupervised clustering on top of a set of proposed features, which corroborates with previous observations.  በ ትምህርት ትምህርት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የተዘጋጀው የፊደል ዓይነታችንን በተለያዩ የልዩ ትኩረት ራሶችን በማስተካከል ይቻላል፡፡', 'sw': 'Recent research on the multi-head attention mechanism, especially that in pre-trained models such as BERT, has shown us heuristics and clues in analyzing various aspects of the mechanism.  Kama utafiti wengi unavyojikita kwenye kuchunguza kazi au nchi zilizofichikana, kazi zilizopita zimeona baadhi ya mitindo ya msingi ya tabia za mwangalizi za uchunguzi na mbinu za uchambuzi za heuristi, lakini uchambuzi wa mfumo unaoeleweka kwenye mitindo ya uchunguzi bado unabaki kuwa muhimu. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha vifaa vya kusikiliza katika mitindo tofauti tofauti sana kwa kupitia viungo visivyo vya kisasa ambavyo vinavyopendekezwa juu ya vipengele vya vipengele, ambavyo vinakutana na maoni yaliyopita. Tunafuatilia zaidi kazi zao zinazofanana kupitia utafiti wa uchambuzi. Zaidi ya hayo, vipengele vyetu vya pendekezo vinaweza kutumika kuelezea na kupambanua vichwa vyenu tofauti katika mifano ya Transformer.', 'af': "Onlangste verondersoek oor die multikop aandag mekanisme, veral dat in vooraf opgelei modele soos BERT, ons heuristieke en kloue vertoon het in analyseer verskillende aspekte van die mekanisme. As die meeste van die ondersoek fokus op probeering van taak of verborge staatste, het vorige werke sommige primitiewe patrone van aandag hoof gedrag gevind deur heuristiese analitiese metodes, maar 'n meer sistematiese analisie spesifieke op die aandag patrone bly nog primitief. In hierdie werk, ons klompeer die aandag warmkaartjies in betekenlik verskillende patrone deur ononderwerpende klastering bo-op 'n stel van voorgestelde funksies wat corroborates met vorige opmerking. Ons ondersoek hulle ooreenstemmende funksies deur analitiese studie. In addition, our proposed features can be used to explain and calibrate different attention heads in Transformer models.", 'sq': 'Kërkimi i fundit mbi mekanizmin e vëmendjes me shumë koka, veçanërisht në modelet e paratrajnuar të tillë si BERT, na ka treguar heuristikë dhe udhëzime në analizën e aspekteve të ndryshme të mekanizmit. Ndërsa shumica e kërkimeve përqëndrohen në kërkimin e detyrave apo shteteve të fshehura, punët e mëparshme kanë gjetur disa modele primitive të sjelljes së vëmendjes në kokë me metodat analitike heuristike, por një analizë më sistematike specifike në modelet e vëmendjes ende mbetet primitive. Në këtë punë, ne qartë grumbullojmë hartat e vëmendjes në modele të ndryshme ndjeshëm nëpërmjet grumbullimit të pa mbikqyrur mbi një sërë karakteristikësh të propozuara, të cilat vërtetojnë me vëzhgimet e mëparshme. Ne studiojmë më tej funksionet e tyre korrespondente nëpërmjet studimit analitik. Përveç kësaj, karakteristikat tona të propozuara mund të përdoren për të shpjeguar dhe kalibruar kokat e ndryshme të vëmendjes në modelet Transformer.', 'az': 'Müxtəlif təhsil edilmiş modellərdə, bəlkə BERT kimi, çoxlu başlıq məhsaniyyəti haqqında çoxlu təhsil məhsaniyyəti barəsindəki araştırmalar bizə mehanizminin müxtəlif aspektlərini analizə etmək üçün heuristik və iplər göstərdi. Araştırmaların əksəriyyəti işləri ya da gizli durumlar barəsində təhsil edildiyi kimi, əvvəlki işlər heuristik analitik metodları ilə təhsil etdilər, amma dikkati modellərdə daha sistematik analizi hələ primitivdir. Bu işdə, gözləmə haritalarını əvvəlki gözləmələrlə kömək edən tərzlərin üstündə müəyyən edilməmiş bir qoşunun üstündə müəyyən edilməmiş qoşulmaqla çox farklı modellərə qoyuruq. Biz onların əlavə etdikləri funksiyaları analitik təhsil vasitəsilə daha çox təhsil edirik. Üstəlik, təklif etdiyimiz xüsusiyyətlərimiz Transformer modellerində fərqli təsirləri açıqlamaq və kalibrləmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের উপর, বিশেষ করে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলে বিবের্টের মতো বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া বিশ্লেষণের বিভিন্ যেহেতু বেশীরভাগ গবেষণা কাজ বা লুকিয়ে রাষ্ট্রের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, পূর্ববর্তী কাজ হিউরিস্টিক বিশ্লেষণীয় পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে মনোযোগ আচরণের কিছু প্রাথমিক ধরন প এই কাজে আমরা পরিষ্কার করে প্রস্তাবিত কিছু বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে মনোযোগ প্রদান করি, যা পূর্ববর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাবিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের ম বিশ্লেষণীয় গবেষণার মাধ্যমে আমরা তাদের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট কার্যক্রম আরো গবেষণা করি। এছাড়াও, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ব্যবহার করা যাবে ট্রান্সফ্রান্স মডেলে বিভিন্ন মনোযোগের প্র', 'ca': "Una recent recerca sobre el mecanisme d'atenció multicapa, especialment en models pré-entrenats com BERT, ens ha demostrat heurística i indicis en analitzar diversos aspectes del mecanisme. Com la majoria de la recerca es centra en la investigació de tasques o estats amagats, treballs anteriors han trobat alguns patrons primitius de comportament del cap d'atenció per mètodes analítics heurístics, però una anàlisi més sistemàtica específica dels patrons d'atenció encara és primitiva. In this work, we clearly cluster the attention heatmaps into significantly different patterns through unsupervised clustering on top of a set of proposed features, which corroborates with previous observations.  Estudiem més les seves funcions correspondents a través d'estudis analítics. A més, les nostres característiques proposades es poden utilitzar per explicar i calibrar diferents cabells d'atenció en models Transformer.", 'hy': "Վերջերս բազմագլխավոր ուշադրության մեխանիզմի վերաբերյալ հետազոտությունները, հատկապես այն, որ նախապատրաստված մոդելներում, ինչպիսիք են ԲԵՌթը, ցույց են տվել մեզ հերորիստիկան և հնարավորություններ մեխանիզմի տարբեր ասպեկ Որովհետև հետազոտությունների մեծ մասը կենտրոնանում է խնդիրների կամ թաքնված վիճակների ուսումնասիրության վրա, նախորդ աշխատանքները հայտնաբերել են որոշ ուշադրության գլխավոր վարքագծի պարզունակ կաղապարներ հորիստիկ վերլուծության մեթոդներով, բայց ավելի սիստեմատիկ վերլուծությունը, որը Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ակնհայտորեն խմբավորում ենք ուշադրության տաքարտեզները շատ տարբեր կաղապարների մեջ' անվերահսկված խմբավորումների միջոցով մի շարք առաջարկված հատկանիշների վրա, ինչը հաստատում է նախորդ դիտարկումների հետ: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք նրանց համապատասխան ֆունկցիաները վերլուծական ուսումնասիրության միջոցով: In addition, our proposed features can be used to explain and calibrate different attention heads in Transformer models.", 'bs': 'Nedavno istraživanje o multiglavnom mehanizmu pažnje, posebno da u predobučenim modelima kao što je BERT, pokazalo nam je heuristiku i tragove u analizi različitih aspekta mehanizma. Kao što je većina istraživanja usredotočena na ispitivanje zadataka ili skrivene države, prethodni radovi su pronašli neke primitivne obrasce pažnje glavnog ponašanja heurističkim analitičkim metodama, ali sistematičnija analiza specifičnija na obrasce pažnje i dalje je primitivna. U ovom poslu, očigledno skupljamo mape pažnje u značajno različite obrasce kroz neodređene skupljanje na vrhu grupe predloženih karakteristika, koja potvrđuje sa prethodnim promatranjima. Dalje proučavamo njihove odgovarajuće funkcije kroz analitičku studiju. Osim toga, naše predložene karakteristike mogu se koristiti za objašnjavanje i kalibriranje različitih glava pažnje u modelima Transformera.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset usean pään huomiomekanismista, erityisesti esikoulutetuissa malleissa kuten BERT, ovat osoittaneet heuristiikkaa ja johtolankoja mekanismin eri näkökohtien analysoinnissa. Koska suurin osa tutkimuksista keskittyy luotaustehtäviin tai piilotiloihin, aikaisemmat työt ovat löytäneet joitakin alkukantaisia huomiopään käyttäytymismalleja heuristisilla analyyttisillä menetelmillä, mutta systemaattisempi huomiokuvioihin liittyvä analyysi on edelleen primitiivinen. Tässä työssä keskitämme huomiolämpökartat selkeästi merkittävästi erilaisiin kuvioihin valvomattomalla klusteroinnilla ehdotettujen ominaisuuksien päälle, mikä tukee aiempia havaintoja. Tutkimme edelleen niiden vastaavia toimintoja analyyttisen tutkimuksen avulla. Lisäksi ehdotettuja ominaisuuksia voidaan käyttää selittämään ja kalibroimaan erilaisia huomiopäitä Transformer-malleissa.', 'cs': 'Nedávný výzkum mechanismu pozornosti více hlav, zejména v předcvičených modelech, jako je BERT, nám ukázal heuristiku a stopy při analýze různých aspektů mechanismu. Vzhledem k tomu, že se většina výzkumu zaměřuje na sondování úloh nebo skrytých stavů, předchozí práce našly některé primitivní vzorce chování hlavy pozornosti heuristickými analytickými metodami, ale systematická analýza specifická na vzorce pozornosti zůstává primitivní. V této práci jasně shlukujeme tepelné mapy pozornosti do výrazně odlišných vzorů prostřednictvím bez dozoru shlukování navržených vlastností, což potvrzuje předchozí pozorování. Dále studujeme jejich odpovídající funkce prostřednictvím analytické studie. Navíc naše navržené funkce mohou být použity k vysvětlení a kalibraci různých hlav pozornosti v modelech transformátoru.', 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud mitmepealise tähelepanu mehhanismi kohta, eriti eelnevalt koolitatud mudelites nagu BERT, on näidanud meile heuristikat ja vihjeid mehhanismi erinevate aspektide analüüsimisel. Kuna enamik uurimistöödest keskendub prooviülesannetele või varjatud olekutele, on varasemad tööd leidnud mõned primitiivsed tähelepanu pea käitumise mustrid heuristiliste analüütiliste meetodite abil, kuid süstemaatilisem tähelepanu mustritele spetsiifiline analüüs on endiselt primitiivne. Käesolevas töös rühmitame tähelepanu soojuskaardid selgelt oluliselt erinevatesse mustritesse järelevalveta klastrite kaudu kavandatud funktsioonidele, mis kinnitab varasemaid tähelepanekuid. Täiendavalt uurime nende vastavaid funktsioone analüütilise uuringu kaudu. Lisaks saab meie pakutud funktsioone kasutada erinevate tähelepanu peade selgitamiseks ja kalibreerimiseks Transformeri mudelites.', 'sk': 'Nedavne raziskave mehanizma pozornosti z več glavami, še posebej pri predhodno usposobljenih modelih, kot je BERT, so nam pokazale heuristiko in namige pri analizi različnih vidikov mehanizma. Ker se večina raziskav osredotoča na opravila sondiranja ali skritih stanj, so predhodna dela našla nekaj primitivnih vzorcev vedenja glave pozornosti s heurističnimi analitičnimi metodami, vendar bolj sistematična analiza specifičnih vzorcev pozornosti še vedno ostaja primitivna. V tem delu smo jasno združili toplotne karte pozornosti v bistveno različne vzorce preko nenadzorovanega grozdja na vrhu predlaganih značilnosti, kar potrjuje predhodna opažanja. Nadalje preučujemo njihove ustrezne funkcije s pomočjo analitične študije. Poleg tega lahko naše predlagane funkcije uporabimo za razlago in kalibriranje različnih glav pozornosti v modelih transformatorjev.', 'jv': 'Kowé nglanggar ranjelasé karo multi-head atensi mekanikasun, ngomong nik karo model sing gak bantuan, koyo BERT, nambah akeh heuristik lan kelangan neng sampek karo perusahaan langgar sampek manipulan. Taning kudu akeh istrawih mengko nggawe geraraning nggawe tasks apa nang mbukak dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan sistem sing nggawe barang kelas sistem sing nggawe geraraning sistem kuwi mau. Nang iné, kéné kesalakno nggawe mapan ing atens-urang mapan nganggo perusahaan langgar sapa nyimpen winih sing gak nggawe geratan perusahaan karo nganggo perusahaan winih sing gak nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi podho sing dibutuhé perusahaan winih. Awakdhéwé menyang pisan kelas barang nggawe funksi dipunangé karo etiket. Nambah, akeh pawarno sing paling-paling nggawe iso nggambar ampuhi kanggo ngerasakno karo kalibra gambarang sampeyan panggon model Transformer.', 'ha': "A yanzu karatun mutane na aikin muhimmanci masu yawa, hususanci, a cikin misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman-wa'anar kamar BERT, ya nũna mana heuristic da wurãre cikin analyza masu dukkan masu cikin akan mekanin. Kama da mafi yawansa research ana fokus a kan jarraba aikin ko kuma a ɓõye halin, aiki na gabani sun sãmi wasu shiryoyi na muhimmi wa aikin muhimmi wa kwanza na kifi da hanyoyin sanarwa na heuristic, kuma amma, an ƙara wani anaƙayyade na ƙayyade a ƙayyade masu kallo na kiyayyuta, yana bada mai ƙari. Daga wannan aikin, Munã sarrafa muhimmada zuwa masu cikin hanyoyin dabam mai girma, a bayan da ba'a tsare shi ba a kan wani set na zafi da aka yi niyyar da shi, wanda ke sami da taƙalumai na gaba. Ina ƙara karatun functioninsu da ke daidai a kan littafin yin analyki. In addition, our proposed features can be used to explain and calibrate different attention heads in Transformer models.", 'bo': 'འཕྲིན་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀློག་སྟངས་འདྲ་བ། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིགས་དང་། BERT་ནང་གི་དབྱེ་བ་ཚོགས་དབྱེ་བ་ ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་དང་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་མཐོང་བ་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར། གཟུགས་རིས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ནང་གི་དྲན་བསྐུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྦྱར་མེད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་གཏང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་གཉིས་ལས་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱད་ནས་གནད་དོན་རྣམས་མེད་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ།', 'he': 'מחקר לאחרונה על מנגנון תשומת לב רב ראשים, במיוחד שבדוגמנים מאומנים מראש כמו BERT, הראה לנו היוריסטיקה ורמזים בניתוח היבטים שונים של המנגנון. As most of the research focus on probing tasks or hidden states, previous works have found some primitive patterns of attention head behavior by heuristic analytical methods, but a more systematic analysis specific on the attention patterns still remains primitive.  In this work, we clearly cluster the attention heatmaps into significantly different patterns through unsupervised clustering on top of a set of proposed features, which corroborates with previous observations.  אנחנו חוקרים יותר את התפקידים המתאימים שלהם באמצעות מחקר אנליטי. בנוסף, התחומים המוצעים שלנו יכולים להשתמש כדי להסביר ולקליבר ראשי תשומת לב שונים במודלים טרנספורטרים.'}
{'en': 'An Analysis of Simple Data Augmentation for Named Entity Recognition', 'ar': 'تحليل زيادة البيانات البسيطة للتعرف على الكيان المحدد', 'es': 'Un análisis del aumento simple de datos para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas', 'fr': "Une analyse de l'augmentation simple des données pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées", 'pt': 'Uma análise de aumento de dados simples para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識のためのシンプルなデータ拡張の分析', 'zh': '名实体识者简数广之', 'ru': 'Анализ простого расширения данных для распознавания именованных сущностей', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी पहचान के लिए सरल डेटा संवर्धन का विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís ar Mhéadú Sonraí Simplí chun Aonán Ainmnithe a Aithint', 'hu': 'Egyszerű adatbővítés elemzése a nevezett szervezetek felismeréséhez', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ανάλυση Απλής Διεύρυνσης Δεδομένων για Αναγνώριση Οντότητας', 'it': 'Analisi della semplice integrazione dei dati per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate', 'lt': 'Name Entity Recognition Simple Data Augmentation Analysis', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'An Analysis of Simple Data Augmentation for Named Entity Recognition', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Analiżi ta’ Aġġustament Simpli tad-Dejta għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija', 'mn': 'Name Entity Recognition-ын энгийн өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийн шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Analiza prostego rozszerzenia danych dla rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów', 'ro': 'O analiză a măririi simple a datelor pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite', 'sr': 'Analiza pojačanja jednostavnih podataka za priznanje imenovanih podataka', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Analys of Augmentation of Simple Data for Nameed Entity Recognition', 'sv': 'En analys av enkel dataökning för identifiering av namngivna enheter', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một phân tích dữ liệu đơn giản cho nhận dạng người có tên', 'bg': 'Анализ на простото увеличаване на данните за разпознаване на наименовани субекти', 'nl': 'Een analyse van eenvoudige gegevensuitbreiding voor naamloze entiteitsherkenning', 'da': 'En analyse af simpel dataudvidelse til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder', 'ko': '명명 실체 식별에서의 간단한 데이터 확장 분석', 'de': 'Eine Analyse der einfachen Datenerweiterung zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten', 'id': 'Analisi Agmentasi Data Sederhana untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Adlanmış Entity Tanamak üçin Basit Maglumaty Aňlamak', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Augmentation of Data Simple for recognition Entity', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një analizë e rritjes së të dhënave të thjeshta për njohjen e njësisë së emëruar', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hr': 'Analiza pojačanja jednostavnih podataka za priznanje imenovanih podataka', 'hy': 'Անվանված անհատականության ճանաչման պարզ տվյալների աճի վերլուծությունը', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition üçün Basit Veri Uygulamasının analizi', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Analiza pojačanja jednostavnih podataka za priznanje imenovanih podataka', 'ca': 'An Analysis of Simple Data Augmentation for Named Entity Recognition', 'cs': 'Analýza jednoduchého rozšíření dat pro rozpoznání jmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuse tunnustamise lihtsa andmete lisamise analüüs', 'fi': 'Analyysi yksinkertaisesta tietojen lisäämisestä nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamista varten', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Analiza preprostega povečanja podatkov za prepoznavanje imenovanega subjekta', 'ha': 'An Analyza wa Augmentation na Taki Data wa sunan Entity Recognition', 'bo': 'Named Entity Recognition', 'he': 'Analysis of Simple Data Augmentation for Named Entity Recognition'}
{'en': 'Simple yet effective data augmentation techniques have been proposed for sentence-level and sentence-pair natural language processing tasks. Inspired by these efforts, we design and compare data augmentation for named entity recognition, which is usually modeled as a token-level sequence labeling problem. Through experiments on two data sets from the biomedical and materials science domains (i2b2-2010 and MaSciP), we show that simple augmentation can boost performance for both recurrent and transformer-based models, especially for small training sets.', 'es': 'Se han propuesto técnicas de aumento de datos simples pero eficaces para las tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural a nivel de oración y par de oraciones. Inspirados por estos esfuerzos, diseñamos y comparamos el aumento de datos para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas, que generalmente se modela como un problema de etiquetado de secuencias a nivel de token. A través de experimentos en dos conjuntos de datos de los dominios biomédico y de ciencia de materiales (i2b2-2010 y MASciP), demostramos que un simple aumento puede aumentar el rendimiento de los modelos recurrentes y basados en transformadores, especialmente para conjuntos de entrenamiento pequeños.', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح تقنيات زيادة البيانات البسيطة والفعالة لمهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية على مستوى الجملة والجمل. مستوحاة من هذه الجهود ، نقوم بتصميم ومقارنة زيادة البيانات للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة ، والتي عادة ما يتم تصميمها كمشكلة تسمية تسلسل على مستوى الرمز المميز. من خلال التجارب على مجموعتين من البيانات من المجالات الطبية الحيوية وعلوم المواد (i2b2-2010 و MaSciP) ، نظهر أن الزيادة البسيطة يمكن أن تعزز الأداء لكل من النماذج المتكررة والقائمة على المحولات ، خاصة لمجموعات التدريب الصغيرة.', 'fr': "Des techniques simples mais efficaces d'augmentation des données ont été proposées pour les tâches de traitement du langage naturel au niveau des phrases et des paires de phrases. Inspirés par ces efforts, nous concevons et comparons l'augmentation des données pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées, qui est généralement modélisée comme un problème d'étiquetage de séquence au niveau des jetons. Grâce à des expériences sur deux ensembles de données issus des domaines biomédical et de la science des matériaux (i2b2-2010 et MasCip), nous montrons qu'une simple augmentation peut améliorer les performances des modèles récurrents et basés sur des transformateurs, en particulier pour les petits ensembles d'entraînement.", 'pt': 'Técnicas de aumento de dados simples, mas eficazes, foram propostas para tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural em nível de sentença e par de sentença. Inspirados por esses esforços, projetamos e comparamos o aumento de dados para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada, que geralmente é modelado como um problema de rotulagem de sequência em nível de token. Por meio de experimentos em dois conjuntos de dados dos domínios da ciência biomédica e dos materiais (i2b2-2010 e MaSciP), mostramos que o aumento simples pode aumentar o desempenho de modelos recorrentes e baseados em transformadores, especialmente para pequenos conjuntos de treinamento.', 'ja': '文レベルおよび文ペアの自然言語処理タスクには、単純でありながら効果的なデータ拡張技術が提案されている。これらの取り組みに触発されて、名前付きエンティティ認識のためのデータ拡張機能を設計し、比較します。これは通常、トークンレベルのシーケンスラベリングの問題としてモデリングされます。生物医学および材料科学領域（ i 2 b 2 -2010およびMaSciP ）からの2つのデータセットの実験を通じて、シンプルな拡張は、特に小さなトレーニングセットのために、再発モデルと変圧器ベースのモデルの両方でパフォーマンスを向上させることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '既为句级、句自然语言处事简而效数增术。 受此之启,计较名实之数,常建模为令牌级序。 生物医学、材料科学二集(i2b2-2010、MaSciP)之实验,吾明其粗强可以重循环、基变压器之性,尤小习集。', 'hi': 'वाक्य-स्तर और वाक्य-जोड़ी प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों के लिए सरल अभी तक प्रभावी डेटा संवर्धन तकनीकों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है। इन प्रयासों से प्रेरित होकर, हम नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए डेटा वृद्धि को डिजाइन और तुलना करते हैं, जिसे आमतौर पर टोकन-स्तर अनुक्रम लेबलिंग समस्या के रूप में मॉडलकिया जाता है। बायोमेडिकल और सामग्री विज्ञान डोमेन (i2b2-2010 और MaSciP) से दो डेटा सेट पर प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम दिखाते हैं कि सरल वृद्धि आवर्तक और ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल दोनों के लिए प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा दे सकती है, विशेष रूप से छोटे प्रशिक्षण सेट के लिए।', 'ru': 'Для задач обработки естественного языка на уровне предложений и пар предложений были предложены простые, но эффективные методы дополнения данных. Вдохновленные этими усилиями, мы разрабатываем и сравниваем расширение данных для распознавания именованных сущностей, которое обычно моделируется как проблема маркировки последовательности на уровне токенов. Посредством экспериментов на двух наборах данных из биомедицинской и материаловедческой областей (i2b2-2010 и MaSciP), мы показываем, что простое увеличение может повысить производительность как для рекуррентных, так и для трансформаторных моделей, особенно для небольших обучающих наборов.', 'ga': 'Tá teicníochtaí méadaithe sonraí simplí ach éifeachtacha molta do thascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha ag leibhéal abairte agus péire abairtí. Arna spreagadh ag na hiarrachtaí seo, déanaimid dearadh agus comparáid ar mhéadú sonraí le haghaidh aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe, rud a mhúnlaítear de ghnáth mar fhadhb lipéadaithe seichimh leibhéal comharthaí. Trí thurgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí ó na fearainn bhithleighis agus eolaíocht ábhar (i2b2-2010 agus MaSciP), léirímid gur féidir le méadú simplí feidhmíocht a threisiú do mhúnlaí athfhillteacha agus claochladán-bhunaithe, go háirithe do thacair bheaga oiliúna.', 'ka': 'მარტივი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური მონაცემების აზექტირება ტექნოგიები მოძლევულია სიტყვების დონე და სიტყვების პარამეტრებისთვის. ჩვენ განვიყენებთ და შემდგენებთ მონაცემები, რომელიც საერთოდ მოდელეულია როგორც პრობლემა სინაცემების სინაცემებისთვის. ექსპერიმენტებით ორი მონაცემების და მატერიალური მეცნიერების დიომენტებისგან (i2b2-2010 და MaSciP) ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მარტივი ადგენტაცია შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ რეკურენტი და ტრანფორმენტების მოდელების გამ', 'el': 'Έχουν προταθεί απλές αλλά αποτελεσματικές τεχνικές αύξησης δεδομένων για εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας σε επίπεδο φράσεων και ζεύγους φράσεων. Εμπνευσμένοι από αυτές τις προσπάθειες, σχεδιάζουμε και συγκρίνουμε την αύξηση δεδομένων για αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας, η οποία συνήθως μοντελοποιείται ως πρόβλημα επισήμανσης ακολουθίας σε επίπεδο σήματος. Μέσα από πειράματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων από τους τομείς της βιοϊατρικής και της επιστήμης των υλικών (και αποδεικνύουμε ότι η απλή αύξηση μπορεί να ενισχύσει την απόδοση τόσο για επαναλαμβανόμενα όσο και για μοντέλα με βάση μετασχηματιστή, ειδικά για μικρά εκπαιδευτικά σύνολα.', 'hu': 'Egyszerű, mégis hatékony adatbővítési technikákat javasoltunk mondatszintű és mondatpáros természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokhoz. Ezekből az erőfeszítésekből inspirálva tervezzük és összehasonlítjuk az adatbővítést a nevezett entitások felismeréséhez, amelyet általában token szintű szekvencia címkézési problémáként modelleznek. Az orvostudományi és anyagtudományi területek két adatkészletén (i2b2-2010 és MaSciP) végzett kísérletek révén megmutatjuk, hogy az egyszerű fokozás növelheti a teljesítményt mind a visszatérő, mind a transzformátor alapú modellek esetében, különösen a kis edzőkészletek esetében.', 'it': "Tecniche semplici ma efficaci di aumento dei dati sono state proposte per le attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale a livello di frase e coppia di frasi. Ispirati da questi sforzi, progettiamo e confrontiamo l'aumento dei dati per il riconoscimento di entità denominate, che di solito è modellato come un problema di etichettatura di sequenza a livello di token. Attraverso esperimenti su due set di dati del settore biomedico e della scienza dei materiali (i2b2-2010 e MaSciP), mostriamo che la semplice augmentazione può aumentare le prestazioni sia per modelli ricorrenti che basati su trasformatori, specialmente per piccoli set di allenamento.", 'kk': 'Қарапайым, бірақ эффективті деректерді көтеру техникалары сұлбаның деңгейінде және сұлбаның екі табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмалары үшін ұсынылды. Бұл әрекеттер бойынша, біз деректерді аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін салыстырып салыстырып, ол әдетте белгілер деңгейіндегі мәселесі ретінде модельді. Биомедицина және материалардың ғылым домендерінің екі деректер жинақтарын тәжірибелерімен (i2b2-2010 және MaSciP) көрсету үшін біз қарапайым агентация қайталанатын және түрлендіру үлгілері үшін жұмыс істеуге болады, осылай', 'lt': 'Buvo pasiūlyti paprasti, tačiau veiksmingi duomenų didinimo metodai, skirti užduotims, susijusioms su natūralių kalbų apdorojimu bausmės lygiu ir bausmės poromis. Įkvėpę šias pastangas, sukuriame ir palyginame duomenų didinimą vardinio subjekto pripažinimui, kuris paprastai modeliuojamas kaip ženklų lygio sekos ženklinimo problem a. Atliekant dviejų biomedicinos ir medžiagų mokslinių sričių duomenų rinkinių (i2b2-2010 ir MaSciP) eksperimentus parodome, kad paprastas padidėjimas gali padidinti pasikartojančių ir transformatorių modelių, ypač mažų mokymo rinkinių, veiksmingumą.', 'ms': 'Teknik peningkatan data mudah namun efektif telah diusulkan untuk tugas pemprosesan bahasa alami tahap kalimat dan pasangan kalimat. Terinspirasi oleh usaha-usaha ini, kami merancang dan membandingkan peningkatan data untuk pengenalan entiti bernama, yang biasanya dipodelkan sebagai masalah label urutan aras-token. Melalui eksperimen pada dua set data dari bidang sains biomedikal dan bahan (i2b2-2010 dan MaSciP), kami menunjukkan bahawa peningkatan sederhana boleh meningkatkan prestasi untuk kedua-dua model berkurang dan berdasarkan pengubah, terutama untuk set latihan kecil.', 'mk': 'Прости, но ефикасни техники за зголемување на податоците се предложени за задачите за обработување на природен јазик на ниво на реченици и пар реченици. Инспирирано од овие напори, дизајнираме и споредуваме зголемување на податоците за препознавањето на именуваните ентитети, кое обично е моделирано како проблем со означувањето на секвенца на ниво на знаци. Со експерименти на два датотеки од биомедицинските и материјалните научни домени (i2b2-2010 и MaSciP), покажуваме дека едноставното зголемување може да ја зголеми резултатот за рецидентните и трансформираните модели, особено за малите научни компјутери.', 'ml': 'വാക്ക്-നിലം, വാക്ക്-ജോട്ട് ജോടി സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200d Inspired by these efforts, we design and compare data augmentation for named entity recognition, which is usually modeled as a token-level sequence labeling problem.  ബൈവിമെഡിക്കലും വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും ശാസ്ത്ര ജോമെനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും രണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും രണ്ട് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, പിന്നീട് വ', 'mn': 'Мэдээллийн өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэх технологи нь өгүүлбэр-түвшинд, өгүүлбэр-хоёр байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагаанд санал болсон. Эдгээр хичээлээс гайхшруулсан, бид бүтээгдэхүүний нэр тодорхойлолтын өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг төсөөлж, харьцуулж байна. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн тодорхойлолтын түвшин дарааллын маркингийн асуудал гэж Биологийн эмнэлгийн болон материалуудын шинжлэх ухааны салбарын хоёр өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр (i2b2-2010 болон MaSciP) туршилтуудын тулд бид энгийн нэмэгдүүлэлт нь дахин дахин дахин, шинжлэх ухааны загваруудын ажиллагааг дэвшүүлж чадна гэ', 'mt': 'Ġew proposti tekniki sempliċi iżda effettivi ta’ żieda fid-dejta għal kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali fil-livell tas-sentenzi u f’par ta’ sentenzi. Inspirati minn dawn l-isforzi, a ħna niddisinjaw u nqabblu żieda fid-dejta għar-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa, li normalment hija mmudellata bħala problema tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza fil-livell tat-token. Permezz ta’ esperimenti fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta mill-oqsma tax-xjenza bijomedika u tal-materjali (i2b2-2010 u MaSciP), nistgħu nuru li żieda sempliċi tista’ ssaħħaħ il-prestazzjoni kemm għal mudelli rikorrenti kif ukoll għal mudelli bbażati fuq it-trasformaturi, speċjalment għal settijiet żgħar ta’ taħriġ.', 'pl': 'Zaproponowano proste, ale skuteczne techniki powiększania danych dla zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego na poziomie zdań i pary zdań. Zainspirowani tymi wysiłkami projektujemy i porównujemy rozszerzenie danych dla rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek, które jest zwykle modelowane jako problem etykietowania sekwencji na poziomie tokenów. Poprzez eksperymenty na dwóch zbiorach danych z dziedzin biomedycznych i materiałowych (i2b2-2010 i MaSciP) pokazujemy, że prosta rozszerzenie może zwiększyć wydajność zarówno modeli powtarzających, jak i opartych na transformatorach, zwłaszcza dla małych zestawów treningowych.', 'no': 'Ein enkel enn effektiv data økingsteknikk har blitt foreslått for setningsnivå og setningslivå naturspråkshandsamar. Inspirert av desse forsøka, design and compare data augmentation for named entity recognition, which is usually modeled as a token-level sequence labelling problem. Då gjennom eksperimenter på to datasett frå biomedisinske og materialske vitenskapdomene (i2b2-2010 og MaSciP), viser vi at enkel augmentasjon kan auka utvikling for både rekurserande og transformeringsbaserte modeller, spesielt for små treningssett.', 'ro': 'Au fost propuse tehnici simple, dar eficiente de mărire a datelor pentru sarcinile de procesare a limbajului natural la nivel de propoziții și perechi de propoziții. Inspirați de aceste eforturi, proiectăm și comparăm mărirea datelor pentru recunoașterea entităților numite, care este de obicei modelată ca o problemă de etichetare a secvențelor la nivel de token. Prin experimente pe două seturi de date din domeniul biomedical și al științei materialelor (i2b2-2010 și MaSciP), demonstrăm că augmentarea simplă poate spori performanța atât pentru modelele recurente, cât și pentru modelele bazate pe transformatori, în special pentru seturile mici de antrenament.', 'sr': 'Jednostavne, ali efikasne tehnike povećanja podataka su predložene za zadatak obrade prirodnog jezika na nivou rečenica i rečenica. Inspirirani ovim naporima, dizajniramo i usporedimo povećanje podataka za priznanje imena entiteta, koji se obično modelira kao problem označavanja sekvencije nivoa znakova. Kroz eksperimente na dva seta podataka iz biomedicinskih i materijalnih znanstvenih domena (i2b2-2010 i MaSciP), pokazujemo da jednostavna povećanja može povećati učinkovitost za rekonstruirane i transformacijske modele, posebno za male obuke.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය හැබැයි පරීක්ෂාත්මක දත්ත විශාලනය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාර විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාව සඳහා වාක්ය සහ වාක් මේ උත්සාහ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපි දත්ත විශාල කරන්න සහ සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, නම් තියෙන්න තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් තොකෙන්  ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය සහ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dති විද්\u200dයාවක් ඩෝමේන්ස් වලින් දත්ත සටහන් දෙකක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණාවක් සඳහා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළ', 'so': 'Simple yet effective data augmentation techniques have been proposed for sentence-level and sentence-pair natural language processing tasks.  Jahaadadan waxaynu qoraynaa oo isbarbardhignaa macluumaadka la kordhiyo aqoonsashada aqoonsiga entity, taas oo sida caadiga ah loo tilmaamay dhibaatada calaamadda heerka. Imtixaanka labada kooban ee sayniska cilmiga dhakhaatiirta iyo qalabka (i2b2-2010 iyo MaSciP) waxaynu ku muujinnaa in kordhiska fudud waxay u kordhi karaan tababar-horumarinta dib u soo celinta iyo beddelinta, khusuusan sawirada waxbarashada yar.', 'sv': 'Enkla men effektiva dataökningstekniker har föreslagits för meningsnivå och meningspar naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter. Inspirerad av dessa ansträngningar utformar och jämför vi dataförstärkning för namngiven entitetsigenkänning, vilket vanligtvis modelleras som ett problem med sekvensmärkning på token-nivå. Genom experiment på två datauppsättningar från de biomedicinska och materialvetenskapliga domänerna (i2b2-2010 och MaSciP), visar vi att enkel förstärkning kan öka prestanda för både återkommande och transformatorbaserade modeller, särskilt för små träningsuppsättningar.', 'ta': 'வாக்கி- மட்டத்திற்கும் வாக்கி- ஜோடி ஜோடி இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் பணிகளுக்கும் சுலபமான தரவு சேர்ப்பு துண்டுகள இந்த முயற்சிகளால் நாம் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளத்திற்கான தரவு கூட்டுதலை வடிவமைக்க மற்றும் ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். அது வழக்கமாக குறியீட உயிரியல் மற்றும் பொருள் அறிவியல் தளங்களிலிருந்து இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளின் மூலம் (i2b2- 2010 மற்றும் மாஸ்கிபி) சோதனைகளின் மூலம் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் சுலபமான அதிகரிப', 'ur': 'سادہ اور مفید ڈیٹا افزایش ٹیکنیکوں کو sentence-level اور sentence-pair natural language processing tasks کے لئے پیشنهاد کیا گیا ہے. یہ تلاش کے ذریعہ ہم نے ڈیزائن کیا اور ڈیٹی اضافہ کے مطابق نام داری پہچان کرنے کے لئے مقایسہ کیا ہے، جو معمولاً ٹوکین سطح سطح لابلینگ مشکل کے طور پر نمودل کیا جاتا ہے. بیولوڈیکس اور مواد سائنس ڈومین (i2b2-2010 اور MaSciP) سے دو ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے کے ذریعہ سے ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ساده افزایش دوبارہ اور تبدیل کرنے والی موڈل کے لئے عملکرد کی زیادتی کرسکتی ہے، مخصوصاً چھوٹی ترینس سٹ کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Name Ushbu jarayonlarni ishga tushirib, biz ma'lumotni tasdiqlash va taʼminlovchi soʻzni tasdiqlash mumkin. Bu oddiy narsalarni teg- darajada tekshirish muammolari sifatida modellash mumkin. Biz biomediya va materiallar ilmiy domenasidan ikkita taʼminot tartibi (i2b2- 2010 va MaSciP) haqida ko'rib chiqaramiz. Qaytarish va o'zgartirish modellari uchun oddiy yozib qo'shish mumkin, hususan kichkina trening moslamalari uchun.", 'vi': 'Đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả các kỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu đã được đề xuất cho các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Nguồn cảm hứng từ những nỗ lực này, chúng tôi thiết kế và so sánh việc gia tăng dữ liệu cho việc nhận dạng thực thể tên, được mô hình hóa như một vấn đề hiệu suất biểu tượng. Qua các thí nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu từ lĩnh vực khoa học sinh học và vật liệu (i2b2-2001 và sơ SciP) chúng tôi cho thấy rằng chỉ tăng trưởng đơn giản có thể nâng cao năng lượng cho cả các mô hình phục hồi và biến đổi, đặc biệt cho các bộ tập luyện nhỏ.', 'bg': 'Прости, но ефективни техники за увеличаване на данните са предложени за задачи за обработка на естествения език на ниво изречение и двойка изречения. Вдъхновени от тези усилия, ние проектираме и сравняваме увеличаването на данните за разпознаване на имената на обекти, което обикновено се моделира като проблем с етикетирането на последователност на ниво символ. Чрез експерименти върху два набора от данни от областта на биомедицината и материалната наука (показахме, че простото увеличение може да повиши производителността както при повтарящи се, така и на базата на трансформатори модели, особено при малки набори за обучение.', 'da': 'Enkle, men effektive dataforøgelsesteknikker er blevet foreslået til sætningsniveau og sætningspar naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver. Inspireret af disse bestræbelser designer og sammenligner vi dataforøgelse for navngivet entitetsgenkendelse, som normalt modelleres som et problem med sekvensmærkning på token-niveau. Gennem eksperimenter på to datasæt fra biomedicinske og materialevidenskabelige domæner (i2b2-2010 og MaSciP), viser vi, at simpel augmentation kan øge ydeevnen for både tilbagevendende og transformer-baserede modeller, især for små træningssæt.', 'nl': 'Eenvoudige maar effectieve data augmentatie technieken zijn voorgesteld voor de verwerking van natuurlijke taal op zinnniveau en zinnenpaar. Geïnspireerd door deze inspanningen, ontwerpen en vergelijken we data augmentation voor naamloze entiteitsherkenning, die meestal wordt gemodelleerd als een token-level sequence labeling probleem. Door experimenten met twee datasets uit de biomedische en materialenwetenschappelijke domeinen (i2b2-2010 en MaSciP) laten we zien dat eenvoudige augmentatie de prestaties kan verhogen voor zowel recidiverende als transformatorgebaseerde modellen, vooral voor kleine trainingssets.', 'hr': 'Jednostavne, ali učinkovite tehnike povećanja podataka predložene su za zadatak obradivanja prirodnog jezika na razini kazne i kazne. Uhvaćeni ovim naporima, dizajniramo i uspoređujemo povećanje podataka za priznanje imena entiteta, što se obično modelira kao problem označavanja sekvence nivoa znakova. Kroz eksperimente na dva kompleta podataka iz biomedicinskih i materijalnih znanstvenih domena (i2b2-2010 i MaSciP), pokazujemo da jednostavna povećanja može povećati učinkovitost za rekonstruirane i transformacijske modele, posebno za male obuke.', 'id': 'Teknik peningkatan data sederhana namun efektif telah diusulkan untuk tugas proses bahasa alami kalimat-tingkat dan kalimat-pasangan. Terinspirasi oleh usaha-usaha ini, kami merancang dan membandingkan peningkatan data untuk pengenalan entitas bernama, yang biasanya dipodelkan sebagai masalah label urutan tingkat token. Melalui eksperimen pada dua set data dari bidang ilmiah biomedis dan materi (i2b2-2010 dan MaSciP), kami menunjukkan bahwa peningkatan sederhana dapat meningkatkan prestasi untuk model yang berulang dan berdasarkan transformer, terutama untuk set pelatihan kecil.', 'de': 'Einfache, aber effektive Methoden zur Datenauswertung wurden für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache auf Satzebene und Satzpaare vorgeschlagen. Inspiriert von diesen Bemühungen entwerfen und vergleichen wir die Datenaugmentation für die Erkennung benannter Entitäten, die normalerweise als Sequenz-Labeling-Problem auf Tokenebene modelliert wird. Durch Experimente an zwei Datensätzen aus den Bereichen Biomedizin und Materialwissenschaften (i2b2-2010 und MaSciP) zeigen wir, dass eine einfache Augmentation sowohl für rezidivierende als auch transformatorbasierte Modelle die Leistung steigern kann, insbesondere für kleine Trainingseinheiten.', 'ko': '간단하고 효과적인 데이터 확충 기술은 문장급과 문장이 자연 언어에 대한 처리 임무로 제기되었다.이러한 노력의 계발을 받아 우리는 명명 실체 식별의 데이터 강화를 설계하고 비교했다. 명명 실체 식별은 통상적으로 영패급 서열 표기 문제로 모델링되었다.생물의학과 재료과학 분야의 두 데이터 집합(i2b2-2010과MaScip)에서의 실험을 통해 우리는 간단한 강화가 귀속모델과 변환기 기반 모델의 성능을 향상시킬 수 있음을 나타냈다. 특히 작은 훈련집에 대해.', 'fa': 'تکنیک افزایش داده\u200cهای ساده و تاثیر عملی برای پرداخت کار\u200cهای زبان طبیعی جمله\u200cها و جفت جمله\u200cها پیشنهاد شده است. توسط این تلاش، ما طراحی و مقایسه داده\u200cها را برای شناسایی نامیده شده\u200cایم، که معمولاً به عنوان یک مشکل نقاشی نقاشی سطح نشان می\u200cدهد. از طریق آزمایش\u200cها در دو مجموعه داده\u200cها از دامنهای علمی بیولوپزشکی و ماده\u200cها (i2b2-2010 و MaSciP) نشان می\u200cدهیم که افزایش ساده می\u200cتواند برای مدل\u200cهای تکرار و تغییر\u200cپذیر، مخصوصا برای مجموعه آموزش کوچک فعالیت را افزایش ده', 'sw': 'Teknolojia za kuongezea takwimu nyepesi bado zinapendekezwa kwa ajili ya kiwango cha hukumu na shughuli za upasuaji wa lugha asilia mbili. Kuhamasishwa na juhudi hizi, tunatengeneza na kuunganisha taarifa kwa ajili ya kutambuliwa kwa jina la entity, ambalo mara nyingi huwekwa kama mfululizo wa kiwango cha alama. Through experiments on two data sets from the biomedical and materials science domains (i2b2-2010 and MaSciP), we show that simple augmentation can boost performance for both recurrent and transformer-based models, especially for small training sets.', 'tr': 'Senediň derejesi we sentence-çift dogry dil işlemegi üçin basit we täsirli maglumatlary bejermek teknikleri teklip edildi. Bu çabalar tarapyndan isleýän, biz birnäçe hedef tanamak üçin maglumatlary tasarlaýar we çykarýarys. Bu adatça token-derejesi etiketleme meselesi hökmünde örneklendirilýär. Biomedical we materialler bilim sahypalaryndan iki maglumat setirini (i2b2-2010 we MaSciP) deneyleriň ýüzünde birnäçe üýtgedijilik hem tekrarly we üýtgedijili modelleriň etkinleşeni ukyp biljekdigini görkez.', 'am': 'ቀላል አሁን ግን የዳታ አካባቢ መጨመር techniques ለፍርድ-ደረጃ እና ለሥርዓት-ሁለት ዓይነቶች የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ስርዓት ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች በተገኘን አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳያታለን፡፡ በሁለት ዳታዎች የbiomedical እና materials ሳይንቀሳቀስ ዳሜኖችን (i2b2-2010 እና ማስSciP) በተፈተና እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Teknikë të thjeshta megjithatë efektive të rritjes së të dhënave janë propozuar për detyrat e përdorimit natyror të gjuhës në nivelin e dënimit dhe në çiftin e dënimeve. Inspiruar nga këto përpjekje, ne dizajnojmë dhe krahasojmë rritjen e të dhënave për njohjen e emëruar të njësisë, e cila zakonisht modelohet si një problem me etiketën e sekuencës në nivel token. Through experiments on two data sets from the biomedical and materials science domains (i2b2-2010 and MaSciP), we show that simple augmentation can boost performance for both recurrent and transformer-based models, especially for small training sets.', 'hy': 'Պարզ, սակայն արդյունավետ տվյալների բարձրացման մեթոդներ են առաջարկվել նախադասությունների մակարդակի և նախադասությունների երկու բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ: Այս ջանքերով ոգեշնչված ենք, մենք նախագծում և համեմատում ենք տվյալների աճը կոչված էության ճանաչման համար, որը սովորաբար մոդելվում է որպես նշանների մակարդակի հաջորդականության պիտակ տալու խնդիր: Երկու տվյալների փորձարկումների միջոցով կենսաբժշկական և նյութերի գիտական ոլորտներից (i2B2-2010 և MaKnowledge) մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ պարզ աճը կարող է բարձրացնել արդյունքները կրկնվող և վերափոխվող մոդելների համար, հատկապես փոքր ուսուցման համակարգերի համար:', 'af': "Eenvoudige maal effektiewe data vergroot tekens is voorgestel vir sentence-level en sentence-pair natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte. Inspirasie deur hierdie versoekte, ons ontwerp en vergelyk data vergroot vir genaamde entiteiterkenning, wat gewoonlik as 'n token-vlak volgorde etiketting probleem is. Deur eksperimente op twee data stel van die biomediese en materiale wetenskapdomeine (i2b2-2010 en MaSciP), wys ons dat eenvoudige augmentasie kan uitvoeging verhoog vir beide herhaalde en transformeer-gebaseerde modele, veral vir klein opvoeging stelle.", 'az': 'Cümlələr-seviyyəti və cümlələr-çift təbiətli dil işləmə işləri üçün sadəcə olaraq faydalı verilən artırma teknikləri təbliğ edilmişdir. Bu çabalar tarafından təşkil edilmişdir, biz ünvanların tanıması üçün məlumat yükselməsini tasarlayır və salışdırırıq. Bu, genellikle bir token seviyyəti etiketləmə problemi olaraq modelləşdirilmişdir. Biomedical və materyal bilim domenalarından iki veri quruluğu təcrübələrindən (i2b2-2010 və MaSciP) təcrübələrindən istifadə edirik ki, basit yükselmək hər ikisinin yenidən və transformer modellərinin performansını artıra bilər, özlərinə də kiçik təcrübə quruluğu üçün.', 'ca': "S'han proposat tècniques simples però efectives d'augment de dades per a tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals de nivell de frases i parell de frases. Inspirats per aquests esforços, dissenyem i comparem l'augmentació de dades per al reconeixement d'entitats anomenades, que normalment es modela com un problem a d'etiquetar seqüències a nivell de fitxes. Through experiments on two data sets from the biomedical and materials science domains (i2b2-2010 and MaSciP), we show that simple augmentation can boost performance for both recurrent and transformer-based models, especially for small training sets.", 'bs': 'Jednostavne, ali efikasne tehnike povećanja podataka su predložene za zadatak obrade prirodnog jezika na nivou kazne i kazne. Inspirirani ovim naporima, dizajniramo i uspoređujemo povećanje podataka za priznanje imena entiteta, koji se obično modelira kao problem označavanja sekvencije nivoa znakova. Kroz eksperimente na dva seta podataka iz biomedicinskih i materijalnih znanstvenih domena (i2b2-2010 i MaSciP), pokazujemo da jednostavna povećanja može povećati učinkovitost i za rekonstruirane i transformacijske modele, posebno za male obuke.', 'et': 'Lause- ja lausepaari looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete jaoks on välja pakutud lihtsaid, kuid efektiivseid andmete suurendamise meetodeid. Nendest jõupingutustest inspireerituna kujundame ja võrdleme andmete suurendamist nimetatud olemi tuvastamiseks, mida tavaliselt modelleeritakse tokeni tasemel järjestuse märgistamise probleemina. Kahe biomeditsiini- ja materjaliteaduse valdkonna andmekogumiga (i2b2-2010 ja MaSciP) eksperimentidega näitame, et lihtne suurendamine võib suurendada nii korduvate kui ka transformaatoripõhiste mudelite jõudlust, eriti väikeste treeningkomplektide puhul.', 'cs': 'Pro úlohy zpracování přirozeného jazyka na úrovni vět a páru vět byly navrženy jednoduché, ale efektivní techniky rozšíření dat. Inspirováni těmito snahami navrhujeme a porovnáváme rozšíření dat pro rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit, které je obvykle modelováno jako problém s popisováním sekvencí na úrovni tokenů. Prostřednictvím experimentů na dvou datových sadách z oblasti biomedicíny a materiálovědy (i2b2-2010 a MaSciP) ukazujeme, že jednoduchá augmentace může zvýšit výkon pro recidivní i transformátorové modely, zejména pro malé tréninkové sady.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeen ja lauseparin luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtäviin on ehdotettu yksinkertaisia mutta tehokkaita datan lisäystekniikoita. Näiden pyrkimysten innoittamana suunnittelemme ja vertaamme datan lisäämistä nimettyyn entiteettitunnistukseen, joka yleensä mallinnetaan token-tason sekvenssimerkintäongelmana. Kokeilemalla kahta dataa biolääketieteen ja materiaalitieteen alalta (i2b2-2010 ja MaSciP) osoitamme, että yksinkertainen suurennus voi parantaa suorituskykyä sekä toistuvissa että muuntajapohjaisissa malleissa, erityisesti pienissä harjoitussarjoissa.', 'bn': 'শাস্তি-স্তর এবং শাস্তি-জোড়া প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের জন্য সাধারণ তথ্য যোগাযোগ কৌশল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। এই প্রচেষ্টার দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত, আমরা ডিজাইন করি এবং তুলনা করি নামের বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্বীকৃতির জন্য তথ্য সংগ্রহের জন্য, যা সাধারণত একটি ট বায়োমেডিকেল এবং উপাদানের বিজ্ঞান ডোমেইন (আই২বি২-২০১০ এবং মাস্কিপি) থেকে দুটি ডাটা সেটের মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সাধারণ বাড়াতে পারি এবং পুনরায় ভিত্তিক মডে', 'jv': 'Algorithm Nambah nambah karo perbudhakan iki, kita design lan komparasi perbudhakan data nggo nambah Entire Ato éntuk éntuk sistem sing duwé dadi sing perusahaan dengané perusahaan anyari dadi, nik sak saben nggawe sawayan seneng nggawe sistem sing nyimpen kanggo modèl recurré lan transformer, supoyo nggawe sistem sing menyang tukang.', 'ha': "Simple yet effective data augmentation techniques have been proposed for sentence-level and sentence-pair natural language processing tasks.  An Inspire su da wannan aikin, Munã ƙayyade kuma Muke shafi, kuma Muke daidaita sura wasu mutane da aka ambaci sunan ganin abun abun, da kuma ana sami da shi kamar wata matsayin mai rajiya cikin matsayin-daraja. Ko bayan jarrabãwa biyu na daidaita daga masu da aka samar da ma'anan aikin da aka sani (i2b2-2010 da MaskaiP), za Mu nũna wa ƙaramako da sauri, watau za'a ƙara aikin mutane da aka baka misãlai masu motsi da aka canza a baka ta koma da shi, hususanci ga masu tsari masu ƙarami.", 'sk': 'Preproste, a učinkovite tehnike povečanja podatkov so bile predlagane za opravila obdelave naravnega jezika stavkov in stavkovnih parov. Na podlagi teh prizadevanj oblikujemo in primerjamo povečanje podatkov za prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet, ki se običajno modelira kot problem označevanja zaporedja na ravni žetonov. S poskusi na dveh naborih podatkov s področja biomedicinske in materialne znanosti (i2b2-2010 in MaSciP) pokažemo, da lahko preprosta povečanja poveča učinkovitost tako pri ponavljajočih se modelih kot pri transformatorjih, zlasti pri majhnih naborih usposabljanja.', 'he': 'טכניקות שיפור נתונים פשוטות, אך יעילות, הציעו עבור משימות מעבדת שפת טבעית ברמה של גזר המשפט ובזוג גזר משפט. בהשראה מהמאמצים האלה, אנחנו מעצבים ושוואים גידול נתונים לזהות ישויות בשם, אשר בדרך כלל מודל כבעיה של תווית רצף רמה סימנים. באמצעות ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים מתחומים המדע הביומדיקאי והחומרים (i2b2-2010 ומאסייפ), אנו מראים שגיבוי פשוט יכול לגביר את ההופעה של דוגמנים מבוססים במחזור ומעבר, במיוחד עבור קבוצות אימונים קטנות.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་ཚང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས Inspired by these efforts, we design and compare data augmentation for named entity recognition, which is usually modeled as a token-level sequence labeling problem. Through experiments on two data sets from the biomedical and materials science domains (i2b2-2010 and MaSciP), we show that simple augmentation can boost performance for both recurrent and transformer-based models, especially for small training sets.'}
{'en': 'Integrating Domain Terminology into Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'دمج مصطلحات المجال في الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': 'Intégration de la terminologie du domaine dans la traduction automatique', 'es': 'Integración de terminología de dominio en la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Integrando a terminologia de domínio à tradução automática neural', 'ja': 'ドメイン用語を神経機械翻訳に統合する', 'zh': '集域术语于神经机器翻译中', 'ru': 'Интеграция терминологии домена в нейронный машинный перевод', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में डोमेन शब्दावली को एकीकृत करना', 'ga': 'Téarmaíocht Fearainn a Chomhtháthú san Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach', 'hu': 'Domain terminológia integrálása a neurális gépi fordításba', 'ka': 'დომენის ტერმინოლოგიის ინტერგურაცია ნეირალური მაქინის გადატყვებაში', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση ορολογίας τομέων στην νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Integrazione della terminologia di dominio nella traduzione automatica neurale', 'mk': 'Интегрирање на терминологијата на доменот во превод на неврална машина', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജിയെ നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'lt': 'Domeno terminologijos integravimas į neuroninių mašinų vertimą', 'kk': 'Домен терминологиясын нейрондық машинаның аудармасына біріктіру', 'no': 'Integrerer domeneterminologi i neiralmaskineomsetjing', 'ms': 'Integrating Domain Terminology into Neural Machine Translation', 'pl': 'Integracja terminologii domenowej do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'mt': 'L-integrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija tad-dominju fit-traduzzjoni tal-makkinarju newrali', 'mn': 'Домен терминологийг мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт руу нэгтгэх', 'so': 'La qabsashada Terminology ee maamulka Neural', 'ro': 'Integrarea terminologiei domeniului în traducerea automată neurală', 'sv': 'Integrera domänterminologi i neural maskinöversättning', 'sr': 'Integracija terminologije domena u neuronski prevod mašine', 'si': 'ඩොමේන් තර්මිනෝවිද්\u200dයාලය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් භාවිතයට', 'ta': 'டொமைன் முனையமானத்தை நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் சேர்க்கவும்', 'ur': 'ڈومین ترمینولوژی کو نئورل ماشین ترمینٹ میں ترمینٹ کر دیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giao dịch nội thất cho cấu trúc thần kinh', 'bg': 'Интегриране на терминологията на домейна в невралния машинен превод', 'nl': 'Integreren van domeinterminologie in neuronale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Integrering af domæneterminologi i Neural Machine Translation', 'hr': 'Integracija terminologije domena u prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'de': 'Integration von Domänenthemologie in die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'ko': '영역 용어를 신경 기계 번역에 통합하다', 'fa': 'ترمینالوژی دامین به ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'id': 'Integrating Domain Terminology into Neural Machine Translation', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Terminalology katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiurali', 'af': 'Integrasie van Domein Terminologie in Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'tr': 'Taýça Terminologiýasyny näyral Maşynyň terjimesine üýtgetmek', 'sq': 'Integrimi i Terminologjisë së Domenit në Translacionin e Makinës Neurale', 'hy': 'Integrating Domain Terminology into Neural Machine Translation', 'am': 'ዶሜን ተርሚኖሎጂን ወደ ኔural machine ትርጉም ማግኘት ያስገባል', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন টার্মিনোলজি নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদে যুক্ত করো', 'bs': 'Integracija terminologije domena u neuronski prevod mašine', 'ca': 'Integrar la terminologia del domini en la traducció de màquines neuronals', 'cs': 'Integrace doménové terminologie do neuronového strojového překladu', 'fi': 'Verkkotunnuksen terminologian integrointi neurokonekäännökseen', 'et': 'Domeeni terminoloogia integreerimine neuromasintõlkesse', 'az': 'Domena Terminoloji N√∂ral Makina √áeviri il…ô birl…ôŇüdiril…ôn', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vključevanje domenske terminologije v živčni strojni prevod', 'he': 'שיתוף את הטרמינולוגיה של השטח לתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'jv': 'Backing', 'bo': 'Integrating Domain Terminology into Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'This paper extends existing work on terminology integration into Neural Machine Translation, a common industrial practice to dynamically adapt translation to a specific domain. Our method, based on the use of placeholders complemented with morphosyntactic annotation, efficiently taps into the ability of the neural network to deal with symbolic knowledge to surpass the surface generalization shown by alternative techniques. We compare our approach to state-of-the-art systems and benchmark them through a well-defined evaluation framework, focusing on actual application of terminology and not just on the overall performance. Results indicate the suitability of our method in the use-case where terminology is used in a system trained on generic data only.', 'ar': 'توسع هذه الورقة العمل الحالي حول تكامل المصطلحات في الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، وهي ممارسة صناعية شائعة لتكييف الترجمة ديناميكيًا مع مجال معين. طريقتنا ، القائمة على استخدام العناصر النائبة المكملة بالتعليق التوضيحي الصرفي ، تستفيد بكفاءة من قدرة الشبكة العصبية على التعامل مع المعرفة الرمزية لتجاوز التعميم السطحي الذي تظهره التقنيات البديلة. نحن نقارن نهجنا مع أحدث الأنظمة ونقوم بقياسها من خلال إطار تقييم محدد جيدًا ، مع التركيز على التطبيق الفعلي للمصطلحات وليس فقط على الأداء العام. تشير النتائج إلى ملاءمة طريقتنا في حالة الاستخدام حيث يتم استخدام المصطلحات في نظام مدرب على بيانات عامة فقط.', 'es': 'Este documento amplía el trabajo existente sobre la integración terminológica en la traducción automática neuronal, una práctica industrial común para adaptar dinámicamente la traducción a un dominio específico. Nuestro método, basado en el uso de marcadores de posición complementados con anotación morfosintáctica, aprovecha de manera eficiente la capacidad de la red neuronal para manejar el conocimiento simbólico para superar la generalización de la superficie mostrada por técnicas alternativas. Comparamos nuestro enfoque con los sistemas de última generación y los comparamos a través de un marco de evaluación bien definido, centrándonos en la aplicación real de la terminología y no solo en el rendimiento general. Los resultados indican la idoneidad de nuestro método en el caso de uso en el que la terminología se utiliza en un sistema entrenado únicamente en datos genéricos.', 'pt': 'Este artigo estende o trabalho existente sobre integração de terminologia na Tradução Automática Neural, uma prática industrial comum para adaptar dinamicamente a tradução a um domínio específico. Nosso método, baseado no uso de placeholders complementado com anotação morfossintática, explora eficientemente a capacidade da rede neural de lidar com o conhecimento simbólico para superar a generalização de superfície mostrada por técnicas alternativas. Comparamos nossa abordagem com sistemas de última geração e os comparamos por meio de uma estrutura de avaliação bem definida, com foco na aplicação real da terminologia e não apenas no desempenho geral. Os resultados indicam a adequação do nosso método no caso de uso em que a terminologia é usada em um sistema treinado apenas em dados genéricos.', 'fr': "Cet article étend les travaux existants sur l'intégration de la terminologie dans la traduction automatique neuronale, une pratique industrielle courante visant à adapter dynamiquement la traduction à un domaine spécifique. Notre méthode, basée sur l'utilisation d'espaces réservés complétés par une annotation morphosyntaxique, exploite efficacement la capacité du réseau de neurones à gérer les connaissances symboliques pour dépasser la généralisation de surface montrée par les techniques alternatives. Nous comparons notre approche des systèmes de pointe et nous les comparons au moyen d'un cadre d'évaluation bien défini, en nous concentrant sur l'application réelle de la terminologie et pas seulement sur la performance globale. Les résultats indiquent la pertinence de notre méthode dans le cas où la terminologie est utilisée dans un système formé uniquement sur des données génériques.", 'ja': '本論文は、特定の領域に動的に翻訳を適応させるための一般的な産業慣行であるニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションへの用語統合に関する既存の研究を拡張したものである。我々の方法は、形態素論的注釈を補完するプレースホルダの使用に基づいて、代替技術によって示される表面の一般化を上回る象徴的な知識を扱うニューラルネットワークの能力を効率的に利用する。私たちは、最先端のシステムへのアプローチを比較し、全体的なパフォーマンスにとどまらず、用語の実際の適用に焦点を当て、明確に定義された評価フレームワークを通じてベンチマークします。結果は、用語が一般データのみでトレーニングされたシステムで使用されるユースケースにおける当社の方法の適合性を示しています。', 'zh': '本文将有术语集成的见事扩展到神经机器翻译中,神经机器翻译是一种常见的行事,所以动态调整译者以应特定域。 吾法盖用占位符辅形句法注,效用神经网络处理符之能,以越代术之表泛化。 以吾法较先进之统,而以定义明评框架略而试之,重术语实用,非徒全体也。 结果表明,吾法适用于通用数术语之用例。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद में शब्दावली एकीकरण पर मौजूदा काम का विस्तार करता है, जो एक विशिष्ट डोमेन के लिए अनुवाद को गतिशील रूप से अनुकूलित करने के लिए एक सामान्य औद्योगिक अभ्यास है। हमारी विधि, morphosyntactic एनोटेशन के साथ पूरक प्लेसहोल्डर्स के उपयोग के आधार पर, कुशलतापूर्वक वैकल्पिक तकनीकों द्वारा दिखाए गए सतह सामान्यीकरण को पार करने के लिए प्रतीकात्मक ज्ञान से निपटने के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की क्षमता में टैप करती है। हम अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों के लिए अपने दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करते हैं और उन्हें एक अच्छी तरह से परिभाषित मूल्यांकन ढांचे के माध्यम से बेंचमार्क करते हैं, शब्दावली के वास्तविक अनुप्रयोग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और न केवल समग्र प्रदर्शन पर। परिणाम उपयोग-मामले में हमारी विधि की उपयुक्तता को इंगित करते हैं जहां शब्दावली का उपयोग केवल सामान्य डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित प्रणाली में किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Эта статья расширяет существующую работу по интеграции терминологии в нейронный машинный перевод, общепринятую промышленную практику динамической адаптации перевода к конкретной области. Наш метод, основанный на использовании заполнителей, дополненных морфосинтаксической аннотацией, эффективно использует способность нейронной сети справляться с символическими знаниями, чтобы превзойти поверхностное обобщение, показанное альтернативными методами. Мы сравниваем наш подход к современным системам и сравниваем их с помощью четко определенной системы оценки, уделяя особое внимание фактическому применению терминологии, а не только общей эффективности. Результаты указывают на пригодность нашего метода в случае использования, когда терминология используется в системе, обученной только на общих данных.', 'ga': 'Síneann an páipéar seo an obair atá ar bun faoi láthair ar chomhtháthú téarmaíochta in Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach, cleachtas coitianta tionsclaíochta chun an t-aistriúchán a oiriúnú go dinimiciúil d’fhearann ar leith. Déanann ár modh, atá bunaithe ar úsáid sealbhóirí áite arna gcomhlánú le nótáil morphosyntactic, leas éifeachtach a bhaint as cumas an líonra néaraigh chun déileáil le heolas siombalach chun dul thar an ginearálú dromchla arna léiriú ag teicnící malartacha. Déanaimid comparáid idir ár gcur chuige maidir le córais úrscothach agus tagarmharcálaimid iad trí chreat meastóireachta dea-shainithe, ag díriú ar chur i bhfeidhm iarbhír na téarmaíochta agus ní ar an bhfeidhmíocht iomlán amháin. Léiríonn torthaí oiriúnacht ár modha sa chás úsáide ina n-úsáidtear an téarmaíocht i gcóras atá oilte ar shonraí cineálacha amháin.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány kiterjeszti a terminológiai integrációval kapcsolatos már meglévő munkát a Neurális Gépi Fordításba, amely egy közös ipari gyakorlat, amely dinamikusan adaptálja a fordítást egy adott területhez. Módszerünk, amely a helyőrzők morfoszintatikus jegyzetekkel kiegészített használatán alapul, hatékonyan kihasználja az ideghálózat képességét arra, hogy kezelje a szimbolikus tudást, hogy felülmúlja az alternatív technikák által mutatott felületi általánosítást. Összehasonlítjuk a korszerű rendszerekkel kapcsolatos megközelítésünket, és egy jól meghatározott értékelési keretrendszeren keresztül összehasonlítjuk azokat, amelyek a terminológia tényleges alkalmazására összpontosítanak, és nem csak az általános teljesítményre. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk alkalmas abban az esetben, amikor a terminológiát kizárólag generikus adatokra képzett rendszerben használják.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία επεκτείνει τις υπάρχουσες εργασίες για την ενσωμάτωση ορολογίας στην Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση, μια κοινή βιομηχανική πρακτική για τη δυναμική προσαρμογή της μετάφρασης σε έναν συγκεκριμένο τομέα. Η μέθοδος μας, βασισμένη στη χρήση κράτησης θέσης που συμπληρώνεται με μορφοσυντακτική σημείωση, αξιοποιεί αποτελεσματικά την ικανότητα του νευρωνικού δικτύου να αντιμετωπίζει τη συμβολική γνώση για να ξεπεράσει την επιφανειακή γενίκευση που δείχνουν οι εναλλακτικές τεχνικές. Συγκρίνουμε την προσέγγισή μας σε συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και τα αξιολογούμε μέσω ενός σαφώς καθορισμένου πλαισίου αξιολόγησης, εστιάζοντας στην πραγματική εφαρμογή της ορολογίας και όχι μόνο στη συνολική απόδοση. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν την καταλληλότητα της μεθόδου μας στην περίπτωση χρήσης όπου η ορολογία χρησιμοποιείται σε ένα σύστημα εκπαιδευμένο μόνο σε γενικά δεδομένα.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз терминологиялық интеграциялау үшін нейрондық машинаның аудармасына жалпы индустриалдық практиканы динамикалық доменге аудармасын өзгертуге болады. Біздің әдіміміз, морфосинтактикалық белгілерді қолдануға негізделген орындаушылардың пайдалануына негізделген, невралдық желінің символдық білімдерін альтернативті техникалар бойынша көрсетілген гадардың жалпы Біз өзіміздің тәсілімімізді суреттік жүйелерімен салыстырып, оларды жақсы анықталған оқиға бағыттау редакциясы арқылы салыстырып, терминологиялық қолданбаларына назар аударып, тек жа Нәтижелер тек жалпы деректерге оқылған жүйелік деректерде терминология қолданылатын әдісіміздің әдістерін көрсетеді.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტი ტერმინოლოგიის ინტერგრაციაზე მუშაობელი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო ინტერგრაციაში გა ჩვენი მეტი, რომელიც მოპორფსინტაქტიური ანოტაციის გამოყენებაზე დამატებული პლასექონტაქტის გამოყენებაზე, ეფექტიურად ნეიროლური ქსელის შესაძლებლობაში გამოყენება სიმბოლოგიური მეცნიერებების შესაძ ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგორმაციას სურათის სისტემებისთვის შემდგომარებით და მათი განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებული ფრამების გამოყენებით, რომელიც ტერმინოლოგიის რეალური პროგორ გამოყენების შედეგი ჩვენი მეტომის შესაძლებლობა გამოყენებაში, სადაც ტერმინოლოგია გამოყენება მხოლოდ გენერიკური მონაცემების სისტემაში.', 'it': "Questo articolo estende il lavoro esistente sull'integrazione terminologica in Neural Machine Translation, una pratica industriale comune per adattare dinamicamente la traduzione a un settore specifico. Il nostro metodo, basato sull'uso di segnaposto integrati con annotazioni morfosintattiche, attinge efficacemente alla capacità della rete neurale di affrontare conoscenze simboliche per superare la generalizzazione superficiale mostrata da tecniche alternative. Confrontiamo il nostro approccio ai sistemi all'avanguardia e li confrontiamo attraverso un quadro di valutazione ben definito, concentrandoci sull'effettiva applicazione della terminologia e non solo sulle prestazioni complessive. I risultati indicano l'idoneità del nostro metodo nel caso d'uso in cui la terminologia è utilizzata in un sistema addestrato solo su dati generici.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente išplečiamas dabartinis darbas dėl terminologijos integracijos į nervinių mašinų vertimą – bendrą pramoninę praktiką, siekiant dinamiškai pritaikyti vertimą prie konkrečios srities. Mūsų metodas, pagrįstas placeholders naudojimu, papildytu morfosintaktine anotacija, veiksmingai naudojasi nervų tinklo gebėjimu tvarkyti simbolines žinias, kad viršytų paviršiaus generalizaciją, parodytą alternatyviais metodais. Palyginame savo požiūrį į naujausias sistemas ir lyginame jas taikant aiškiai apibrėžtą vertinimo sistemą, kurioje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama faktiniam terminologijos taikymui, o ne tik bendram rezultatui. Results indicate the suitability of our method in the use-case where terminology is used in a system trained on generic data only.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperluas kerja sedia ada mengenai integrasi terminologi ke dalam Perjemahan Mesin Neural, praktek industri umum untuk menyesuaikan terjemahan secara dinamik ke domain tertentu. Kaedah kami, berdasarkan penggunaan pemegang tempat yang ditambah dengan anotasi morfosintaktik, secara efektif menggunakan kemampuan rangkaian saraf untuk berurusan dengan pengetahuan simbolik untuk melebihi pengeluaran permukaan yang dipaparkan oleh teknik alternatif. Kita membandingkan pendekatan kita kepada sistem-sistem terbaik dan benchmark mereka melalui kerangka penilaian yang ditentukan dengan baik, fokus pada aplikasi sebenar terminologi dan bukan hanya pada prestasi umum. Hasil menunjukkan kemampuan kaedah kami dalam kes-penggunaan dimana terminologi digunakan dalam sistem dilatih pada data generik sahaja.', 'mk': 'Овој документ ја проширува постоечката работа за терминолошка интеграција во Неуралната машинска транслекција, заедничка индустриска практика за динамично адаптирање на преводот на специфичен домен. Нашиот метод, базиран на употребата на локационерите, комплиментиран со морфосинтактичка анотација, ефикасно ја искористува способноста на нервната мрежа да се справи со симболичното знаење за надминување на површината генерализација покажана со алтернативни техники. Ние го споредуваме нашиот пристап до најсовремените системи и ги споредуваме преку добро дефинирана рамка за проценка, фокусирајќи се на вистинската апликација на терминологијата и не само на целокупната перформанса. Резултатите укажуваат на соодветноста на нашиот метод во случајот на употреба каде терминологијата се користи во систем обучен само на генерални податоци.', 'no': 'Denne papiret utvidar eksisterande arbeid på terminologiske integrasjon i Neuralmaskinsomsetjing, eit vanleg industriell praksis for å dynamisk tilpassa omsetjinga til eit spesifikke domene. Metoden vårt, basert på bruken av plassholdarar komplementert med morfosyntaktisk notasjon, gjer effektivt på kapasiteten til neuralnettverket for å handtera symbolsk kunnskap for å overføra overflaten generellisering vist av alternativ teknikk. Vi sammenliknar tilnærminga vårt til kunstsystemet og benchmarker dei gjennom ein godt definert evalueringsrammeverk, fokuserer på den aktuelle program av terminologien og ikkje bare på den generelle utviklinga. Resultatet tyder på korleis metoden vår er tilpassa i bruksmåten der terminologien berre vert brukt i eit systemet trent på generelle data.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലിയെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിലേക്ക് നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നീട്ടിയിരിക്കു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d, മോര്\u200dഫോസിനിറ്റിക്ക് വിശദീകരണത്തോടൊപ്പം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ രീതി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനത്തോട് തുല്യമാക്കുകയും, അതിനെ നല്ല നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന വിലയിപ്പുകളുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പിലൂട ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d മാത്രം പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മാത്രം ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jestendi l-ħidma eżistenti dwar l-integrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali, prattika industrijali komuni biex tiġi adattata dinamikament it-traduzzjoni għal qasam speċifiku. Il-metodu tagħna, ibbażat fuq l-użu ta’ placeholders ikkumplimentati b’annotazzjoni morfosintattika, jagħmel użu effiċjenti mill-kapaċità tan-netwerk newrali li jittratta l-għarfien simboliku biex taqbeż il-ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-wiċċ murija b’tekniki alternattivi. We compare our approach to state-of-the-art systems and benchmark them through a well-defined evaluation framework, focusing on actual application of terminology and not just on the overall performance.  Ir-riżultati jindikaw l-adegwatezza tal-metodu tagħna fil-każ ta’ użu fejn it-terminoloġija tintuża f’sistema mħarrġa fuq dejta ġenerika biss.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare extinde lucrările existente privind integrarea terminologiei în Neural Machine Translation, o practică industrială comună pentru adaptarea dinamică a traducerii la un anumit domeniu. Metoda noastră, bazată pe utilizarea substituenților completați cu adnotare morfosintactică, valorifică eficient capacitatea rețelei neurale de a face față cunoștințelor simbolice de a depăși generalizarea suprafeței arătată de tehnici alternative. Comparăm abordarea noastră față de sistemele de ultimă generație și le comparăm printr-un cadru de evaluare bine definit, concentrându-ne pe aplicarea efectivă a terminologiei și nu doar pe performanța generală. Rezultatele indică adecvarea metodei noastre în cazul în care terminologia este utilizată într-un sistem instruit numai pe date generice.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir proširi postojeći rad o integraciji terminologije u Neuralnu mašinu prevod, zajedničku industrijsku praksiju da dinamički prilagodi prevod na određenu domenu. Naša metoda, zasnovana na upotrebi placeholdera komplementnih morfosintaktičkim annotacijom, učinkovito privlači sposobnost neuronske mreže da se suoči sa simboličkim znanjem da bi se nadmašila generalizacija površine pokazala alternativnim tehnikama. Uspoređujemo naš pristup državnim umjetničkim sistemima i pregledimo ih dobro definiranim okvirom procjene, fokusirajući se na stvarnu primjenu terminologije, a ne samo na cjelokupnu izvedbu. Rezultati ukazuju na prikladnost našeg metode u slučaju upotrebe gdje se terminologija koristi samo u sistemu obučenom samo na generičkim podacima.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව තර්මාන්\u200dයවිද්\u200dයාව සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාපයක් නිර්මාණ මැෂින් භාවිතයට, සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපාරිත්තික ව අපේ විධානය, ප්ලේස් හෝල්ඩර්ස් භාවිතා විසින් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් මාර්පෝසින්ටාක්ටික අන්නෝටික් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනව අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වර්ත්\u200dර පද්ධතිය සහ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කරනවා ඔවුන්ව හොඳ විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය පාවිච්චි විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජන විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජන විදියට පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200d', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн тусламжтайгаар оршиж байгаа терминологийн нэгтгэл дээр ажиллаж, нийтийн үйлдвэрлэлийн дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал нь тодорхой хэлбэрээр хөгжлийн дасгал хө Бидний арга нь морфосинтактикийн анзаарал дээр нэмэгдсэн загваруудын хэрэглээнээс үндсэн, мэдрэлийн сүлжээний чадварын тулд символ мэдлэгтэй дамжуулан гадаргуйн ерөнхийлөгчийг өөр өөр техник дээр харуулах боломжтой байдаг. Бид урлагийн тогтолцооны системтэй харьцуулж, тэднийг сайн тодорхойлогдсон дүгнэлтийн хэлбэрээр тодорхойлж, терминологийн хэрэглээнд анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж, зөвхөн нийтийн үйл ажиллагаанд биш. Үр дүн нь зөвхөн ерөнхий өгөгдлийн сургалтын системд терминологи хэрэглэгддэг хэрэглээний хэрэглээний хэрэглээний тулд бидний арга хэрэглээний зөвхөн зөвхөн хэрэглээний тулд хэрэглэ', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł rozszerza istniejące prace nad integracją terminologii z neurologicznym tłumaczeniem maszynowym, powszechną praktyką przemysłową w celu dynamicznego dostosowania tłumaczeń do konkretnej dziedziny. Nasza metoda, oparta na zastosowaniu symboli zastępczych uzupełnionych anotacją morfosyntaktyczną, skutecznie wykorzystuje zdolność sieci neuronowej do radzenia sobie z wiedzą symboliczną, aby przekroczyć uogólnienie powierzchni pokazane przez alternatywne techniki. Porównujemy nasze podejście do najnowocześniejszych systemów i porównujemy je poprzez dobrze zdefiniowane ramy oceny, koncentrując się na rzeczywistym stosowaniu terminologii, a nie tylko na ogólnej wydajności. Wyniki wskazują na przydatność naszej metody w przypadku zastosowania terminologii w systemie przeszkolonym wyłącznie na danych ogólnych.', 'so': 'Warqadan wuxuu ku fidiyaa shaqada ku jira la qabsashada terminology oo u bedela tarjumaadda maskiinta Neural, tababar caadiga ah oo ku habboon tarjumaadda si aad ugu bedeshaan tarjumaadda gaar ah. Midabkayaga, oo ku saleysan isticmaalka jardiinada ay ku dhamaystiran karto isticmaalka morphosyntactic, wuxuu si faa’iido ah u wadi karaa shabakadda neurada si ay uga baaraandegaan aqoonta calaamad si ay u dhaafaan dhalashada jaamacadda oo ay u muuqato qalabka kala duwan. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa nidaamka farshaxanta ah, waxaynu ku habboonaynaa qashinka qiimeynta oo aad u yaqaan, waxaana ku kalsoonaynaa codsiga terminology ee dhabta ah ee ku habboon sameynta dhamaanka. Resultiyada waxaa loola jeedaa habboon ku habboon qaababka isticmaalka marka lagu isticmaalo terminologi lagu isticmaalo nidaamka lagu baranayo macluumaadka aasaasiga ah oo kaliya.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தற்போதைய முனையத்தில் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் இருக்கும் வேலையை விரிவாக்குகிறது, ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட ட களத்தில மாற்று தொழில்நுட்பங்களால் காண்பிக்கப்பட்ட மேற்கூறு மாற்றும் தொழில்நுட்பங்கள் மூலம் பொருள் உருவாக்கத்தை மேலேற்றும் முறைகளால் காட்டப்பட்டுள்ள நாங்கள் நிலைமைகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு நன்றாக விவரிக்கப்பட்ட மதிப்பினை சட்டத்தில் குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது, உண்மையான முனையத்தின் பயன்பாட முடிவுகள் பொதுவான தகவல் மட்டும் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் எங்கள் முறைமையின் பொருத்தமான தேவையை குறிப்பிடுகி', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats utökar befintligt arbete med terminologiintegration till Neural Machine Translation, en vanlig industriell praxis för att dynamiskt anpassa översättning till ett visst område. Vår metod, baserad på användning av platshållare kompletterad med morfosyntaktisk notering, utnyttjar effektivt förmågan hos det neurala nätverket att hantera symbolisk kunskap för att överträffa den ytgeneralisering som visas av alternativa tekniker. Vi jämför vårt tillvägagångssätt för toppmoderna system och jämför dem genom ett väldefinierat utvärderingsram, med fokus på faktisk tillämpning av terminologin och inte bara på den övergripande prestandan. Resultaten indikerar lämpligheten av vår metod i det användningsfall där terminologin används i ett system som endast utbildas på generiska data.', 'ur': 'This paper extends existing work on terminology integration into Neural Machine Translation, a common industrial practice to dynamically adapt translation to a specific domain. ہمارا طریقہ، مورپوسینٹاکیٹک یادہانی کے ساتھ مکمل ہوئے پلیس هولڈر کے استعمال پر بنیاد ہے، نیورل نیٹورک کے قابلیت میں مکمل طور پر تاپ کرتا ہے کہ سطح کی عمومی تعلیم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے مختلف ٹیکنیک کے ذریعے دکھائے جاتے ہیں. ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو ایٹرنیٹ سیسٹم کے ساتھ مقایسہ کر دیا اور ان کو ایک بہتر مقرر کیے ہوئے ارزیابی فرم کے ذریعہ بنچم کر دیا، ٹرنیمولوژی کے حقیقی کاربرد پر تمرکز کر رہے ہیں اور صرف عملکرد پر نہیں۔ نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارے طریقے کا مطابق استعمال کیس میں ہے جہاں ترمینلوژی صرف عمومی ڈیٹا پر استعمال کی جاتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mở rộng công việc liên kết các thuật ngữ về cấu trúc về cấu trúc thần kinh của máy dịch, một thực tế công nghiệp phổ biến để thay đổi một lĩnh vực cụ thể. Cách của chúng tôi, dựa vào những kẻ giữ giấy kết hợp với tác ghi chú độ động động động hoá độ đối động hoá dịch động, có năng lượng của mạng bạn điện tâm để nhận với tri Chúng ta so sánh phương pháp của chúng ta với hệ thống hiện đại và so sánh chúng qua một cơ sở đánh giá xác định, tập trung vào thực tế ứng dụng thuật ngữ và không chỉ dựa trên khả năng tổng hợp. Kết quả cho thấy phương pháp này phù hợp với trường hợp dùng thuật ngữ được sử dụng trong một hệ thống chỉ dựa trên dữ liệu chung.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz terminologiya birlashtirishda mavjud vazifani Neural Mashine tarjima qiladi, bir doim tarjima qilish uchun umumiy industrial muvaffaqiyatlarni aniqlash mumkin. Bizning usuli, morphosyntactic taqdimoti bilan murakkab bo'lgan plaginlarning foydalanishimiz asosida, o'zimning o'zgarishni o'zgartirish orqali teknologiya orqali o'zgartirish uchun neyrol tarmoqning qobiliyatiga qo'llaniladi. Biz soniyalar tizimning holatiga kamaytirimiz va ularni yaxshi qiymatlar frameiga qo'yishingiz mumkin. Terminologning asosiy dasturini foydalanishga qaramaymiz va faqat umuman bajarishga qarang. @ info", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разширява съществуващата работа по терминологична интеграция в невралния машинен превод, обща индустриална практика за динамично адаптиране на превода към определена област. Нашият метод, базиран на използването на контейнери, допълнени с морфосинтактична анотация, ефективно се възползва от способността на невронната мрежа да се справя със символично знание, за да надмине повърхностната генерализация, показана от алтернативни техники. Сравняваме подхода си към най-съвременните системи и ги сравняваме чрез добре дефинирана рамка за оценка, фокусирайки се върху действителното прилагане на терминологията, а не само върху цялостното представяне. Резултатите показват пригодността на нашия метод в случай на употреба, когато терминологията се използва в система, обучена само върху общи данни.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel breidt bestaande werkzaamheden over terminologie integratie uit in Neural Machine Translation, een gangbare industriële praktijk om vertaling dynamisch aan te passen aan een specifiek domein. Onze methode, gebaseerd op het gebruik van placeholders aangevuld met morfosyntactische annotatie, maakt efficiënt gebruik van het vermogen van het neurale netwerk om te gaan met symbolische kennis om de oppervlaktegeneralisatie te overtreffen die door alternatieve technieken wordt getoond. We vergelijken onze benadering van state-of-the-art systemen en benchmarken deze aan de hand van een goed gedefinieerd evaluatiekader, waarbij de nadruk ligt op de daadwerkelijke toepassing van terminologie en niet alleen op de algehele prestaties. De resultaten wijzen op de geschiktheid van onze methode in de use-case waarin terminologie wordt gebruikt in een systeem dat alleen is getraind op generieke gegevens.', 'da': 'Denne artikel udvider det eksisterende arbejde med terminologiintegration til Neural Machine Translation, en almindelig industripraksis for dynamisk tilpasning af oversættelse til et bestemt domæne. Vores metode, baseret på brug af pladsholdere suppleret med morfosyntaktisk annotation, udnytter effektivt det neurale netværks evne til at håndtere symbolsk viden til at overgå overfladevanalisering vist af alternative teknikker. Vi sammenligner vores tilgang til state-of-the-art systemer og benchmark dem gennem en veldefineret evalueringsramme, der fokuserer på faktisk anvendelse af terminologi og ikke kun på den samlede præstation. Resultaterne indikerer egnetheden af vores metode i det brugstilfælde, hvor terminologien anvendes i et system, der udelukkende er trænet på generiske data.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag erweitert bestehende Arbeiten zur Terminologieentegration in Neural Machine Translation, eine gängige industrielle Praxis, um Übersetzungen dynamisch an einen bestimmten Bereich anzupassen. Unsere Methode basiert auf der Verwendung von Platzhaltern, ergänzt durch morphosyntaktische Annotation, und nutzt effizient die Fähigkeit des neuronalen Netzwerks, mit symbolischem Wissen umzugehen, um die Oberflächenverallgemeinerung durch alternative Techniken zu übertreffen. Wir vergleichen unsere Herangehensweise an moderne Systeme und benchmarken diese anhand eines klar definierten Evaluierungsrahmens, wobei der eigentliche Einsatz der Terminologie und nicht nur die Gesamtleistung im Vordergrund stehen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen die Eignung unserer Methode für den Anwendungsfall, in dem Terminologie in einem System verwendet wird, das nur auf generischen Daten trainiert ist.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir proširi postojeći rad o integraciji terminologije u prevod neuroloških strojeva, zajedničku industrijsku praksiju da dinamički prilagodi prevod na određenu domenu. Naša metoda, na temelju uporabe placeholdera dodatne morfosintaktičkim annotacijom, učinkovito povezuje sposobnost neuronske mreže da se suoči sa simboličkim znanjem kako bi se nadmašila generalizacija površine pokazala alternativnim tehnikama. Uspoređujemo naš pristup stanju umjetničkih sustava i sklonimo ih dobro definiranim okvirom procjene, fokusirajući se na stvarnu primjenu terminologije, a ne samo na cjelokupnu funkciju. Rezultati ukazuju na prikladnost našeg metode u slučaju uporabe gdje se terminologija koristi samo u sustavu obučenom samo na generičkim podacima.', 'id': 'This paper extends existing work on terminology integration into Neural Machine Translation, a common industrial practice to dynamically adapt translation to a specific domain.  Metode kami, berdasarkan penggunaan pemegang tempat yang ditambah dengan anotasi morfosintaksi, secara efisien menggunakan kemampuan jaringan saraf untuk berurusan dengan pengetahuan simbolik untuk melewati generalisasi permukaan yang ditunjukkan oleh teknik alternatif. Kita membandingkan pendekatan kita ke sistem terbaik dan membandingkannya melalui rangka evaluasi yang terdefinisikan dengan baik, fokus pada aplikasi terminologi yang sebenarnya dan bukan hanya pada prestasi umum. Hasil menunjukkan kemampuan metode kita dalam kasus penggunaan dimana terminologi digunakan dalam sistem yang dilatih hanya pada data umum.', 'ko': '본고는 기존의 용어 통합 작업을 신경기계 번역으로 확대하고자 한다. 신경기계 번역은 흔히 볼 수 있는 공업 실천으로 동적 조정 번역으로 특정 분야에 적응하는 데 사용된다.우리의 방법은 점위부호의 사용을 바탕으로 형태문법 주석을 곁들여 신경 네트워크 처리 기호 지식의 능력을 효과적으로 활용하여 다른 기술이 보여준 곡면 범화를 초월했다.우리는 우리의 방법을 가장 선진적인 시스템과 비교하고 양호한 평가 구조를 정의하여 이를 기준 테스트할 것이다. 중점은 용어의 실제 응용이지 전체적인 성능이 아니다.그 결과 우리의 방법은 일반적인 데이터로만 훈련된 시스템에서 용어를 사용하는 용례에 적용된다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaeneza kazi zilizopo juu ya ushirikiano wa kimataifa katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiurali, kituo cha kawaida cha kutafsiri kwa utafsiri wa kimapenzi katika maeneo maalum. Utawala wetu, kwa kutumia watumiaji wa nafasi zilizokamilishwa na matangazo ya kifo, hupanda kwa ufanisi katika uwezo wa mtandao wa neurali ili kupambana na maarifa ya alama ya kupitisha uzalishaji wa uso ulioonyeshwa na mbinu mbadala. Tunawalinganisha mbinu yetu na mifumo ya sanaa na kuwaweka mkono kupitia mfumo wa uchunguzi unaotangazwa vizuri, tunalenga kutumia matumizi halisi ya utamaduni na sio tu kwenye utendaji wa ujumla. Results indicate the suitability of our method in the use-case where terminology is used in a system trained on generic data only.', 'af': "Hierdie papier uitbrei bestaande werk op terminologie integrasie binne Neurale Masjien Vertaling, 'n gemeenskaplike industriale praksie om vertaling dinamies aan 'n spesifieke domein te pas. Ons metode, gebaseer op die gebruik van plekhouers wat met morfosyntaktike annotasie gemeenskap is, is effektief in die moontlik van die neuralnetwerk om met simboliese kennis te behandel om die oorspronklike generalisering te oorvloei wat deur alternatiewe teknike vertoon word. Ons vergelyk ons toegang tot staat van die kunstenstelsels en benchmark hulle deur 'n goed gedefinieerde evalueringsraamwerk, fokus op die werklike toepassing van terminologie en nie net op die hele prestasie nie. Resultate wys die geskikheid van ons metode in die gebruik- geval waar terminologie gebruik word in 'n stelsel opgelei word slegs op algemene data.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz terminologiýa birleşmeginde Neural Makine terjimelerine geçirilýär, umumy industrial praktika bir domena terjime etmek üçin dinamik bir şekilde üýtgeder. Bizim yöntemimiz, morfositik duygulama ile doldurulmuş mektuplaryň kullanımına dayanan şekilde nöral ağ üstüne simbolik bilgileri başka bir şekilde ulaştırır. Biz öz yaklaşymyzy sanat sistemlerine karşılaştyrýarys we olary gowy tanyşdyrylýan deňlenme çerçevesinden çykar, terminologiýanyň gerçek uygulamasyny üçin üns berýäris diňe ähli başarylyklaryň üstüne däl. Netijenler sistemiň edil jeneral maglumaty üçin ulanylan ýagdaýymyzyň ýerligini görkezýär.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ کار موجود در ترمینالوژی به ترجمه ماشین عصبی، یک تمرین صنعتی مشترک برای ترجمه به یک دامنه خاص تغییر دهد. روش ما، بر اساس استفاده از جایگزینه\u200cهای جایگزینه\u200cای که با اظهار مورفوسینتاکتیک تعمل شده\u200cاند، به طور موثرت به توانایی شبکه عصبی برای درمان با دانش\u200cهای سیم\u200cبولیک برای تغییر\u200cسازی سطح توسط تکنیک\u200cهای جایگزینی نشان داده شده\u200cاند، به ما روش خود را با سیستم\u200cهای هنر مقایسه می\u200cکنیم و از طریق یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ نتایج نشان می دهند که مناسب روش ما در مورد پرونده استفاده است که ترمینالوژی تنها در یک سیستم آموزش داده\u200cهای ژنرالی استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የቱርሚኖሎጂን ማተርጓም በኔural machine ትርጓሜ ላይ የተገኘውን ሥራ ያሳድጋል፣ በተለያዩ ድረ ገጽ ትርጓሜን በመቀናቀል እና ትርጓሜን በመጠቀም ያስተካክላል፡፡ በሞሮፎስsyntactic ማስታወቂያ በተጨማሪው የስፍራዎች ተጠቃሚዎች በመጠቀም ሥርዓታችንን በተለየ የደቡብ መረብ ማውቀትን ለመቀበል በተለየ ስህተት ማሳየት የሚችሉትን አካባቢ ያሳስላል፡፡ አካባቢነታችንን የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና በተመሳሳይ ማስታወቂያ ፍሬም እናሳውቃቸዋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ በተጠቃሚ ዳታዎችን ብቻ በተማረ ስርዓት ውስጥ ተርሚኖሎጂ የሚጠቀምበት የሥርዓታችንን ሥርዓት ማግኘት ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'This paper extends existing work on terminology integration into Neural Machine Translation, a common industrial practice to dynamically adapt translation to a specific domain.  Metoda jonë, bazuar në përdorimin e vendembajtësve të komplementuar me anotacion morfosintaktik, përfshin efektivisht aftësinë e rrjetit nervor për të trajtuar me njohuri simbolike për të kaluar gjeneralizimin e sipërfaqes të treguar nga teknika alternative. Ne krahasojmë qasjen tonë me sistemet më të moderne dhe i paraqisim a to nëpërmjet një kuadri vlerësimi të përcaktuar mirë, duke u përqëndruar në aplikimin aktual të terminologjisë dhe jo vetëm në performancën e përgjithshme. Rezultatet tregojnë përshtatësinë e metodës sonë në rastin e përdorimit ku terminologjia përdoret në një sistem të trajnuar vetëm me të dhëna gjenerale.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ընդլայնում է գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքը տերմինոլոգիայի ինտեգրացիայի մասին Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ, ընդհանուր արդյունաբերական գործընթաց, որպեսզի դինամիկ կերպով հարմարեց Մեր մեթոդը, հիմնված տեղադրողների օգտագործման վրա, որը լրացված է մորֆոսինտակտիկ նոտացիայի միջոցով, արդյունավետ օգտագործում է նյարդային ցանցի ունակությունը վերաբերվել խորհրդանիշ գիտելիքների հետ, որպեսզի հաղթահարենք մակերևույթի ընդհանուր Մենք համեմատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը նորագույն համակարգերին և համեմատում ենք դրանք լավ սահմանափակ գնահատման շրջանակի միջոցով, կենտրոնացնելով տերմինոլոգիայի իրական կիրառման վրա և ոչ միայն ընդհանուր արդյունքների վրա: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մեթոդի համապատասխանությունը օգտագործման դեպքում, երբ տերմինոլոգիան օգտագործվում է միայն ընդհանուր տվյալների վրա վարժեցված համակարգում:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদে টার্মিনোলজির বিদ্যমান কাজ বাড়িয়ে দেয়। এটি একটি সাধারণ শিল্পের প্রশিক্ষণ যাতে একটি নির্দিষ্ট ডো আমাদের পদ্ধতি, মোরফোসিক্যাটিক বিষয়বস্তুর ব্যবহারের ভিত্তিতে, যা বিকল্প প্রযুক্তি দ্বারা দেখানোর জন্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের ক্ষমতার সাথে প্রতীক জ্ঞানের আমরা আমাদের পদক্ষেপের তুলনা করি শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের স্টেটের সাথে এবং তাদের বেনম্যাক্যান্ডের মাধ্যমে সুনির্দিষ্ট মূল্যের কাঠামো দিয়ে  ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে ব্যবহারের কেসে আমাদের পদ্ধতির যথাযথ যেখানে শুধুমাত্র সাধারণ তথ্য প্রশিক্ষিত একটি সিস্টেমে টার্ম', 'ca': "Aquest paper estendrà la feina existent sobre l'integració terminològica a la traducció de màquines neuronales, una pràctica industrial comú per adaptar dinàmicament la traducció a un domini específic. El nostre mètode, basat en l'ús de tenedors de lloc complementats amb anotació morfosinàctica, aprofita eficientment l'habilitat de la xarxa neuronal de tractar amb coneixements simbòlics per superar la generalització de la superfície mostrada per tècniques alternatives. Comparem el nostre enfocament als sistemes més moderns i els comparam a través d'un marc d'evaluació ben definit, centrant-nos en l'aplicació real de la terminologia i no només en el rendiment global. Els resultats indican l'adequació del nostre mètode en el cas d'ús on la terminologia s'utilitza en un sistema entrenat només en dades genèriques.", 'cs': 'Tento článek rozšiřuje stávající práci na integraci terminologie do neuronového strojového překladu, běžné průmyslové praxe s cílem dynamicky přizpůsobit překlad konkrétní oblasti. Naše metoda, založená na použití zástupných symbolů doplněných morfosyntaktickou anotací, efektivně využívá schopnosti neuronové sítě vypořádat se symbolickými znalostmi a překonávat povrchovou zobecnění ukázanou alternativními technikami. Porovnáváme náš přístup k nejmodernějším systémům a srovnáváme je prostřednictvím dobře definovaného hodnotícího rámce se zaměřením na aktuální aplikaci terminologie a nikoli pouze na celkový výkon. Výsledky ukazují vhodnost naší metody v případě použití terminologie v systému školeném pouze na obecných datech.', 'et': 'Käesolev dokument laiendab olemasolevat terminoloogia integratsiooni tööd neuroaalsesse masintõlkesse, mis on tavaline tööstustava, et dünaamiliselt kohandada tõlke konkreetsele valdkonnale. Meie meetod, mis põhineb kohatäidete kasutamisel, mida täiendab morfosüntaktiline annotatsioon, kasutab tõhusalt närvivõrgu võimet käsitleda sümboolseid teadmisi, et ületada pinna generaliseerumine, mida näitavad alternatiivsed tehnikad. Me võrdleme oma lähenemisviisi kaasaegsetele süsteemidele ja võrdleme neid täpselt määratletud hindamisraamistiku kaudu, keskendudes terminoloogia tegelikule rakendamisele, mitte ainult üldisele tulemuslikkusele. Tulemused näitavad meie meetodi sobivust kasutusjuhul, kui terminoloogiat kasutatakse süsteemis, mis on koolitatud ainult üldistele andmetele.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli laajentaa olemassa olevaa terminologian integrointia neurokoneelliseen käännökseen, joka on yleinen teollinen käytäntö kääntämisen dynaamiseksi mukauttamiseksi tiettyyn alaan. Menetelmämme, joka perustuu paikkamerkkien käyttöön morfosyntaktisella annotoinnilla, hyödyntää tehokkaasti neuroverkon kykyä käsitellä symbolista tietoa ylittääkseen vaihtoehtoisten tekniikoiden osoittaman pintayleistymisen. Vertaamme lähestymistapaamme viimeisimpiin järjestelmiin ja vertaamme niitä tarkasti määritellyn arviointikehyksen avulla, jossa keskitytään terminologian tosiasialliseen soveltamiseen eikä vain yleiseen suorituskykyyn. Tulokset osoittavat menetelmämme soveltuvuuden käyttötapauksessa, jossa terminologiaa käytetään vain yleisiin tietoihin perehdytetyssä järjestelmässä.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir proširi postojeći rad o integraciji terminologije u prevod neuroloških strojeva, zajedničku industrijsku praksiju da dinamički prilagodi prevod na određenu domenu. Naša metoda, temeljena na upotrebi placeholdera dodatne morfosintaktičkim annotacijom, učinkovito privlači sposobnost neuronske mreže da se suoči sa simboličkim znanjem kako bi se prevazila generalizacija površine pokazala alternativnim tehnikama. Upoređujemo naš pristup državnim umjetničkim sistemima i pregledimo ih dobro definiranim okvirom procjene, fokusirajući se na stvarnu primjenu terminologije, a ne samo na ukupno izvršenje. Rezultati ukazuju na prikladnost našeg metode u slučaju upotrebe gdje se terminologija koristi samo u sistemu obučenom samo na generičkim podacima.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt terminoloji integrasiya nöral mašin tərcümünə, tərcümə etmək üçün dinamik olaraq tərcümə etmək üçün ortaq industrial praksisi olan terminoloji tərcümünü genişləşdirir. Bizim metodumuz, morfosintaktik məlumatların istifadəsinə dayandığı yerlərin istifadəsinə görə, alternativ tekniklərlə göstərilən viraf generalizasiyasını üstün etmək üçün sinbolik bilgi ilə müvəffəq edər. Biz həyatımızı sanat sistemləri ilə qarşılaşdırır və onları gözəl tanımlanmış değerlendirmə çerçivesi ilə müəyyən edirik, terminologiyanın həqiqət uyğulamasına odaqlayır, yalnız bütün performans üzərində deyilik. Sonuçlar istifadə etmək məqsədilə metodumuzun uyğunluğunu göstərir. Terminoloji yalnız nümunəlik məlumatlarda təhsil edilən sistemdə istifadə edilir.', 'jv': 'This paper expand current job on terminal insertion in Neral Masine translation, a Common manual praksi to dynamics align translation to a special domain. Awakdhéwé, digawe oleh perusahaan anyari bayrampun sing nyenggawe nguasat karo inmaca nggawe modhak Awakdhéwé nggerarangké diangkat cando nggo sistem state-of-the-arts lan nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno, ingkang dipolerangke tarjamahan kanggo aplikasi sistem sing wis ana dan ora oleh nggawe barang pengguna kuwi. Jamian: FindOK', 'he': 'העבודה הזאת מרחיקה את העבודה הנוכחית על האינטגרציה בטרמינולוגית לתרגום מכונות נוירוליות, מעשה תעשיתי משותפת כדי להסתגל דינמית לתרגום מסוים. השיטה שלנו, בהתבסס על השימוש של מחזיקי מקומות שמוספים עם ציון מורפוסינטקטי, מתחברת באופן יעיל ליכולת של הרשת העצבית להתמודד עם ידע סמלי אנחנו משוותים את הגישה שלנו למערכות חדשות ואנחנו משוותים אותם דרך מסגרת עריכה מוגדרת היטב תוצאות מצביעות על התאימה של השיטה שלנו במקרה השימוש בו הטרמולוגיה משתמשת במערכת מאומנת רק על נתונים גנרליים.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na ƙãra aikin wanda ke da shi a kan haɗiya na tsohogi cikin Taurar Mai Tarjima na Neural, wani aikin mai ɗabi'a na industri zuwa dinamically adadin translation zuwa wani wuri na ƙayyade. Taimayinmu, a kan da amfani da placeholder da aka cika da tsarin morfosyntactic, za'a tafi da zura cikin abincin shirin neural dõmin ya yi aiki da ilmi na nemi ga ta mari zajenalisiya na fuskar sama da zafi masu motsi. Tuna samfani hanyoyinmu zuwa halin-na'urar-sanar kuma mu bangi su a kan firam mai ƙayyade, mai fassara, yana da muhimmi ga shirin ayuka masu taƙaita ta bakwai kuma ba ta zama kawai a kan aikin jumla. Mataimakin na nuna gwargwadon metoden mu cikin mazaɓa na amfani da idan an yi amfani da teraminogi, a cikin wata na'ura wanda aka sanar da shi kawai kan data na daban.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek razširja obstoječe delo na področju terminološke integracije v nevralni strojni prevod, ki je običajna industrijska praksa za dinamično prilagajanje prevajanja določenemu področju. Naša metoda, ki temelji na uporabi označb mest, dopolnjenih z morfosintaktičnimi opombami, učinkovito uporablja sposobnost nevronskega omrežja, da se spopada s simboličnim znanjem, da preseže površinsko generalizacijo, ki jo pokažejo alternativne tehnike. Naš pristop do najsodobnejših sistemov primerjamo in jih primerjamo z natančno opredeljenim ocenjevalnim okvirom, ki se osredotoča na dejansko uporabo terminologije in ne le na splošno uspešnost. Rezultati kažejo ustreznost naše metode v primeru uporabe, ko se terminologija uporablja v sistemu, usposobljenem samo za splošne podatke.', 'bo': 'This paper extends existing work on terminology integration into Neural Machine Translation, a common industrial practice to dynamically adapt translation to a specific domain. Our method, based on the use of placeholders complemented with morphosyntactic annotation, efficiently taps into the ability of the neural network to deal with symbolic knowledge to surpass the surface generalization shown by alternative techniques. Examples are: We compare our approach to state-of-the-art systems and benchmark them through a well-defined evaluation framework, focusing on actual application of terminology and not just on the overall performance. གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འཇུག་པ་དེ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས།'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation Models with Back-Translation for the Extremely Low-Resource Indigenous Language Bribri', 'ar': 'نماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية مع الترجمة الخلفية للرشوة اللغوية الأصلية منخفضة الموارد للغاية', 'es': 'Modelos neuronales de traducción automática con retrotraducción para la lengua indígena de recursos extremadamente bajos Bribri', 'pt': 'Modelos de tradução automática neural com tradução reversa para a língua indígena de recursos extremamente baixos Bribri', 'fr': 'Modèles de traduction automatique neuronale avec rétro-traduction pour la langue indigène Bribri à ressources extrêmement faibles', 'ja': '非常に低いリソースの先住民の言語Bribriのためのバック翻訳付きニューラルマシン翻訳モデル', 'zh': '有极低资源土著语 Bribri 反向译者神经机器翻译模', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल के साथ वापस अनुवाद के लिए अत्यंत कम संसाधन स्वदेशी भाषा Bribri', 'ru': 'Нейронные модели машинного перевода с обратным переводом для чрезвычайно низкоресурсного языка коренных народов Bribri', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Néar-Aistriúcháin Inneall le Cúl-Aistriúchán don Teanga Dhúchasach Fíor-Íseal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρικά μοντέλα μηχανικής μετάφρασης με οπίσθια μετάφραση για την εξαιρετικά χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους αυτόχθονες γλώσσες Μπριμπρί', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítási modellek visszafordítással a rendkívül alacsony erőforrású őslakos nyelvhez Bribri', 'it': 'Modelli neurali di traduzione automatica con traduzione posteriore per la lingua indigena estremamente bassa di risorse Bribri', 'lt': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қайта аудару үлгілері үшін қайта- аудару үлгілері Төменгі төмен ресурс тілінің брибриді үшін', 'mk': 'Модели за превод на неврални машини со назад- превод за екстремно нискоресурсен индиген јазик Bribri', 'ms': 'Neural Machine Translation Models with Back-Translation for the Extremely Low-Resource Indigenous Language Bribri', 'mt': 'Mudelli ta’ Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali bi Traduzzjoni ta’ wara għall-Lingwa Indiġena b’Riżorsi estremament baxxi Bribri', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ бага боловсруулагч хэл Брибри хэлний мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн загвартай Back-Translation Models for the Extremely Low-Resource Indigenous Language Bribri', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും കുറഞ്ഞ- വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പിന്നിലെ ഭാഷ ബ്രിബ്രി', 'ro': 'Modele de traducere automată neurală cu traducere înapoi pentru limba indigenă extrem de scăzută de resurse Bribri', 'pl': 'Neuronowe modele tłumaczenia maszynowego z tłumaczeniem wstecznym dla bardzo niskiego zasobu języka rdzennego Bribri', 'sr': 'Neuralni modeli prevoda mašine sa povratnim prevodom za izuzetno niski izvorski Indijanski jezik Bribri', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Models of Neural machine Translation with Back-Translation for the Extremely Low-Resource indigenous language Bribri', 'sv': 'Neurala maskin철vers채ttningsmodeller med bak책t철vers채ttning f철r ursprungsspr책ket med extremt l책ga resurser Bribri', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phiên dịch tạm thời cho ngôn ngữ Vốn thấp Thuộc Bình', 'bg': 'Модели на неврален машинен превод с обратен превод за изключително нискоресурсен коренен език Брибри', 'nl': 'Neurale Machine Translation Modellen met Back-Translation voor de extreem lage hulpbronnen inheemse taal Bribri', 'da': 'Neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller med back-oversættelse til det ekstremt lav ressource oprindelige sprog Bribri', 'hr': 'Modeli prevoda neuroloških strojeva s prevodom natrag za ekstremno niski izvorski Indijanski jezik Bribri', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungsmodelle mit Rückübersetzung für die extrem ressourcenarme indigene Sprache Bribri', 'fa': 'Models Translation Machine Neural with Back-Translation for the extremely Low-Resource Indigenous Language Bribri', 'id': 'Model Translation Mesin Neural dengan Translation Mundur untuk bahasa Indigenous Sangat rendah sumber daya', 'ko': '극저 자원 토착 언어의 반역 신경 기계 번역 모형', 'sw': 'Modeli za Tafsiri za Mashine za Kiasili na Tafsiri kwa ajili ya Lugha ya Kiasiri Kichini', 'tr': 'Geri-çeviri Dolamak üçin Nural Makine Çevirmek Modelleri', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Ən aşağı-düşük ressurs Hindi Dili Bribri üçün geri çevirilən nöral Makinat Çeviri Modelləri', 'bn': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modelet e përkthimit të Makinës Neurale me përkthimin mbrapa për gjuhën indigene me burime ekstremisht të ulëta Bribri', 'bs': 'Modeli prevoda neuroloških strojeva sa povratnim prevodom za izuzetno niski izvorski Indijanski jezik Bribri', 'ca': 'Neural Machine Translation Models with Back-Translation for the Extremely Low-Resource Indigenous Language Bribri', 'et': 'Neuraalsed masintõlke mudelid tagantõlkega äärmiselt vähese ressursiga põliskeele Bribri jaoks', 'fi': 'Neuraaliset konek채채nn철smallit, joissa on taustak채채nn철s 채채rimm채isen v채h채n resursseja omaavalle alkuper채iskielelle Bribri', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Neurální strojové modely překladu s zpětným překladem pro extrémně nízké zdroje domorodý jazyk Bribri', 'jv': 'Maski Njuar Inggal Terjamahan karo Gambar-Terjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan kang ibut-Resolusi bebas', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Modeli nevralnega strojnega prevajanja z nazaj prevajanjem za izjemno nizko porabo virov avtohtonega jezika Bribri', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་བའི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་ཆས་གཞུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་Bribri', 'he': 'Name'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a neural machine translation model and dataset for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7. This was trained on an extremely small dataset (5923 Bribri-Spanish pairs), providing evidence for the applicability of NMT in extremely low-resource environments. We discuss the challenges entailed in managing training input from languages without standard orthographies, we provide evidence of successful learning of Bribri grammar, and also examine the translations of structures that are infrequent in major Indo-European languages, such as positional verbs, ergative markers, numerical classifiers and complex demonstrative systems. In addition to this, we perform an experiment of augmenting the dataset through iterative back-translation (Sennrich et al., 2016a ; Hoang et al., 2018) by using Spanish sentences to create synthetic Bribri sentences. This improves the score by an average of 1.0 BLEU, but only when the new Spanish sentences belong to the same domain as the other Spanish examples. This contributes to the small but growing body of research on Chibchan NLP.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية ومجموعة بيانات للغة تشيبشان Bribri ، بمتوسط أداء بلغ 16.91.7 BLEU. تم تدريب هذا على مجموعة بيانات صغيرة للغاية (5923 زوجًا من Bribri-Spanish) ، مما يوفر دليلًا على قابلية تطبيق NMT في البيئات منخفضة الموارد للغاية. نناقش التحديات التي تنطوي عليها إدارة مدخلات التدريب من اللغات التي لا تحتوي على قواعد إملائية قياسية ، ونقدم دليلاً على التعلم الناجح لقواعد Bribri ، ونفحص أيضًا ترجمات التراكيب النادرة في اللغات الهندية الأوروبية الرئيسية ، مثل الأفعال الموضعية ، وعلامات ergative ، المصنفات العددية والأنظمة التوضيحية المعقدة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نجري تجربة لزيادة مجموعة البيانات من خلال الترجمة الخلفية التكرارية (Sennrich et al.، 2016a؛ Hoang et al.، 2018) باستخدام الجمل الإسبانية لإنشاء جمل Bribri الاصطناعية. يؤدي هذا إلى تحسين النتيجة بمتوسط 1.0 BLEU ، ولكن فقط عندما تنتمي الجمل الإسبانية الجديدة إلى نفس المجال مثل الأمثلة الإسبانية الأخرى. يساهم هذا في مجموعة الأبحاث الصغيرة والمتنامية حول Chibchan NLP.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un modelo de traducción automática neuronal y un conjunto de datos para el idioma chibchan bribri, con un rendimiento promedio de 16.91.7 BLEU. Se entrenó en un conjunto de datos extremadamente pequeño (5923 pares Bribri-español), lo que proporciona evidencia de la aplicabilidad de NMT en entornos de recursos extremadamente bajos. Discutimos los desafíos que implica la gestión de la entrada de capacitación de idiomas sin ortografías estándar, proporcionamos evidencia del aprendizaje exitoso de la gramática bribri y también examinamos las traducciones de estructuras que son poco frecuentes en los principales idiomas indoeuropeos, como verbos posicionales, ergativos marcadores, clasificadores numéricos y sistemas demostrativos complejos. Además de esto, realizamos un experimento de aumento del conjunto de datos a través de la retrotraducción iterativa (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) mediante el uso de oraciones en español para crear oraciones Bribri sintéticas. Esto mejora la puntuación en una media de 1,0 BLEU, pero solo cuando las nuevas frases en español pertenecen al mismo dominio que los demás ejemplos en español. Esto contribuye al pequeño pero creciente cuerpo de investigación sobre la PNL de Chibchan.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale et un jeu de données pour la langue chibchan Bribri, avec une performance moyenne de BLEU 16.91.7. Cela a été formé sur un ensemble de données extrêmement restreint (5923 paires Bribri-Spanish), fournissant des preuves de l'applicabilité de la NMT dans des environnements à ressources extrêmement faibles. Nous discutons des défis liés à la gestion des entrées de formation à partir de langues sans orthographe standard, nous apportons des preuves d'un apprentissage réussi de la grammaire Bribri et examinons également les traductions de structures peu fréquentes dans les principales langues indo-européennes, telles que les verbes positionnels, les ergatifs des marqueurs, des classificateurs numériques et des systèmes de démonstration complexes. En outre, nous réalisons une expérience d'augmentation de l'ensemble de données par rétro-traduction itérative (Sennrich et al., 2016a\xa0; Hoang et al., 2018) en utilisant des phrases espagnoles pour créer des phrases Bribri synthétiques. Cela améliore le score d'une moyenne de 1,0 UEBL, mais uniquement lorsque les nouvelles phrases espagnoles appartiennent au même domaine que les autres exemples espagnols. Cela contribue au nombre restreint mais croissant de recherches sur la PNL de Chibchan.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um modelo de tradução automática neural e um conjunto de dados para a linguagem Chibchan Bribri, com desempenho médio de BLEU 16.91.7. Isso foi treinado em um conjunto de dados extremamente pequeno (5923 pares Bribri-Espanhol), fornecendo evidências para a aplicabilidade do NMT em ambientes de recursos extremamente baixos. Discutimos os desafios inerentes ao gerenciamento de entrada de treinamento de idiomas sem ortografias padrão, fornecemos evidências de aprendizado bem-sucedido da gramática Bribri e também examinamos as traduções de estruturas pouco frequentes nas principais línguas indo-europeias, como verbos posicionais, marcadores ergativos, classificadores numéricos e sistemas demonstrativos complexos. Além disso, realizamos um experimento de aumento do conjunto de dados por meio de retrotradução iterativa (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) usando frases em espanhol para criar frases sintéticas de Bribri. Isso melhora a pontuação em uma média de 1,0 BLEU, mas apenas quando as novas frases em espanhol pertencem ao mesmo domínio que os outros exemplos em espanhol. Isso contribui para o pequeno mas crescente corpo de pesquisa sobre PNL Chibchan.', 'ja': '本稿では、BLEU 16.91.7の平均パフォーマンスを持つChibchan言語Bribriのニューラル機械翻訳モデルとデータセットを提示する。 これは、極めて小さなデータセット（ 5923 Bribri - Spanishペア）でトレーニングされ、極めて低資源の環境でのNMTの適用性の証拠を提供しました。 私たちは、標準的な正書法なしの言語からのトレーニングインプットを管理する際に伴う課題について議論し、Bribri文法の学習に成功した証拠を提供し、位置動詞、ergativeマーカー、数値分類子、複雑な実証システムなど、主要なインド・ヨーロッパ言語では頻繁ではない構造の翻訳も検討します。 これに加えて、スペイン語の文を使用して合成Bribri文を作成することにより、反復逆変換を通じてデータセットを拡張する実験を行います（ Sennrich et al., 2016 a; Hoang et al., 2018 ）。 これにより、平均して1.0 BLEUのスコアが向上しますが、新しいスペイン語の文章が他のスペイン語の例と同じドメインに属している場合に限られます。 これは、Chibchan NLPに関する小さいながらも成長している研究のボディに貢献しています。', 'zh': '本文发Chibchan语Bribri神经机器翻译模形数据集,均性为BLEU 16.91.7。 此乃一小数集(5923Bribri-Spanish练于),为NMT极低资源之适用性证也。 臣等论无准正字法,治自言训练输入所致挑战,供成功学Bribri语法之证,并究印欧语之不常者,如位动词,ergative标记,数分类器杂演。 自此之外,迭代反增数集之实验(Sennrich et al.2016a; Hoang等,2018)用西班牙语句创合为Bribri句。 此均以分数增1.0 BLEU,而前提为新西班牙语句与他西班牙语示例同域。 此有助于Chibchan NLP而长之者也。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлена модель нейронного машинного перевода и набор данных для чибчанского языка Bribri со средней производительностью BLEU 16.91.7. Это было обучено на чрезвычайно небольшом наборе данных (5923 брибри-испанских пары), предоставляя доказательства применимости НБП в крайне малоресурсных средах. Мы обсуждаем проблемы, связанные с управлением учебным вкладом из языков без стандартных орфографий, мы предоставляем доказательства успешного изучения грамматики Брибри, а также изучаем переводы структур, которые редко встречаются в основных индоевропейских языках, таких как позиционные глаголы, эргативные маркеры, численные классификаторы и сложные демонстрационные системы. В дополнение к этому, мы проводим эксперимент по увеличению набора данных посредством итеративного обратного перевода (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018), используя испанские предложения для создания синтетических предложений Брибри. Это улучшает результат в среднем на 1,0 BLEU, но только тогда, когда новые испанские предложения принадлежат к той же области, что и другие испанские примеры. Это способствует небольшому, но растущему объему исследований на Чибчан НЛП.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर चिबचन भाषा ब्रिबरी के लिए एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल और डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करता है, जिसमें BLEU 16.91.7 का औसत प्रदर्शन होता है। यह एक बेहद छोटे डेटासेट (5923 ब्रिब्री-स्पेनिश जोड़े) पर प्रशिक्षित किया गया था, जो बेहद कम संसाधन वाले वातावरण में एनएमटी की प्रयोज्यता के लिए सबूत प्रदान करता है। हम मानक ऑर्थोग्राफी के बिना भाषाओं से प्रशिक्षण इनपुट के प्रबंधन में शामिल चुनौतियों पर चर्चा करते हैं, हम ब्रिब्री व्याकरण के सफल सीखने के सबूत प्रदान करते हैं, और उन संरचनाओं के अनुवादों की भी जांच करते हैं जो प्रमुख इंडो-यूरोपीय भाषाओं में दुर्लभ हैं, जैसे कि स्थितिगत क्रियाएं, एर्गेटिव मार्कर, संख्यात्मक क्लासिफायर और जटिल प्रदर्शनकारी प्रणालियां। इसके अलावा, हम पुनरावर्ती बैक-ट्रांसलेशन (Sennrich et al., 2016a) के माध्यम से डेटासेट को बढ़ाने का एक प्रयोग करते हैं; Hoang et al., 2018) सिंथेटिक Bribri वाक्यों को बनाने के लिए स्पेनिश वाक्यों का उपयोग करके। यह 1.0 BLEU के औसत से स्कोर में सुधार करता है, लेकिन केवल जब नए स्पेनिश वाक्य अन्य स्पेनिश उदाहरणों के समान डोमेन से संबंधित होते हैं। यह चिबचन एनएलपी पर अनुसंधान के छोटे लेकिन बढ़ते शरीर में योगदान देता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar seo samhail néaraistriúcháin meaisín agus tacar sonraí don Chibchan Bribri teanga, le meánfheidhmíocht BLEU 16.91.7. Cuireadh oiliúint air seo ar thacar sonraí an-bheag (5923 péire Bribri-Spáinnis), ag soláthar fianaise ar infheidhmeacht NMT i dtimpeallachtaí acmhainní an-íseal. Pléimid na dúshláin a bhaineann le bainistiú a dhéanamh ar ionchur oiliúna ó theangacha gan ortagrafaíocht chaighdeánach, cuirimid fianaise ar fáil ar fhoghlaim rathúil na gramadaí Bribri, agus scrúdaíonn muid freisin na haistriúcháin ar struchtúir nach minic a bhíonn sna mórtheangacha Ind-Eorpacha, mar bhriathar suímh, marcóirí ergative, aicmitheora uimhriúla agus córais chasta thaispeántais. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid turgnamh chun an tacar sonraí a mhéadú trí aisaistriúchán atriallach (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) trí úsáid a bhaint as abairtí Spáinnise chun abairtí sintéiseacha Bribri a chruthú. Feabhsaíonn sé seo an scór 1.0 BLEU ar an meán, ach amháin nuair a bhaineann na habairtí Spáinnise nua leis an bhfearann céanna leis na samplaí Spáinnise eile. Cuireann sé seo leis an gcorp taighde ar Chibchan NLP atá beag ach atá ag dul i méid.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a Bribri Chibchan nyelvű neurális gépi fordítási modellt és adatkészletet, átlagos teljesítménye BLEU 16.91.7. Ezt egy rendkívül kis adatkészleten (5923 Bribri-spanyol pár) képezték, amely bizonyítékot nyújtott az NMT alkalmazhatóságára rendkívül alacsony erőforrás-igényű környezetben. Megvitatjuk a normál ortográfia nélküli nyelvek képzéseinek kezelésével járó kihívásokat, bizonyítékokat adunk a bribri nyelvtan sikeres elsajátítására, valamint megvizsgáljuk a főbb indoeurópai nyelvekben ritkán előforduló struktúrák fordítását, mint például pozíciós igék, ergatív markerek, numerikus osztályozók és komplex demonstrációs rendszerek. Ezen kívül egy kísérletet végezünk az adatkészlet iteratív visszafordítással (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) bővítésére spanyol mondatok használatával szintetikus Bribri mondatok létrehozására. Ez átlagosan 1,0 BLEU-val javítja a pontszámot, de csak akkor, ha az új spanyol mondatok ugyanabba a tartományba tartoznak, mint a többi spanyol példába. Ez hozzájárul a Chibchan NLP-vel kapcsolatos kis, de növekvő kutatásokhoz.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης και ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για τη γλώσσα Τσιμπχάν Μπριμπρί, με μια μέση απόδοση του BLEU 16.91.7. Αυτό εκπαιδεύτηκε σε ένα εξαιρετικά μικρό σύνολο δεδομένων (5923 ζεύγη Μπριμπρί-Ισπανικών), παρέχοντας αποδεικτικά στοιχεία για τη δυνατότητα εφαρμογής της σε περιβάλλοντα εξαιρετικά χαμηλών πόρων. Συζητούμε τις προκλήσεις που συνεπάγεται η διαχείριση των εισροών κατάρτισης από γλώσσες χωρίς τυπικές ορθογραφίες, παρέχουμε αποδείξεις επιτυχούς εκμάθησης της γραμματικής και εξετάζουμε επίσης τις μεταφράσεις δομών που είναι σπάνιες στις μεγάλες ινδοευρωπαϊκές γλώσσες, όπως ρήματα θέσης, εργοτικοί δείκτες, αριθμητικοί ταξινομητές και σύνθετα συστήματα επίδειξης. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε ένα πείραμα αύξησης του συνόλου δεδομένων μέσω επαναλαμβανόμενης αντίστροφης μετάφρασης (κ.α., 2016α, κ.α., 2018) χρησιμοποιώντας ισπανικές προτάσεις για τη δημιουργία συνθετικών προτάσεων. Αυτό βελτιώνει την βαθμολογία κατά μέσο όρο 1.0 αλλά μόνο όταν οι νέες ισπανικές προτάσεις ανήκουν στον ίδιο τομέα με τα άλλα ισπανικά παραδείγματα. Αυτό συμβάλλει στο μικρό αλλά αναπτυσσόμενο σώμα έρευνας σχετικά με το NLP Chibchan.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩიბშანის ენის ბრიბრის მისამართლად ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების მოდელი და მონაცემების შესახებ, სინამდვილეში BLEU 16.91.7. ეს იყო ძალიან პატარა მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია (5923 ბრიბრი-სპანელი ზოგები), რომელიც NMT-ის აპლექცირებულობაზე გამოიყენება ძალიან მარტივი რესურსის გარეშე. ჩვენ განვისაუბრებთ სტანდარტული ორტოგრაფიებისგან განვითარებით განვითარებით, ბრიბრის გრამატაციის წარმატების წარმატებით, და ასევე განვითარებთ სტრუქტურების გარგება, რომლებიც დიდი ინო-ევროპოლიო ენაში, როგორც პოციალური გერბები,  ამის დამატებით, ჩვენ მონაცემების კონპერიმენტის აზემონტირების ექსპერიმენტი გამოყენება (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) სინტეტიკური ბრიბრი სიტყვების შექმნა. ეს გაუკეთებს 1,0 BLEU-ის განმავლობაზე, მაგრამ მხოლოდ როდესაც ახალი სპანელი სიტყვები იგივე დიომინში იყოს, როგორც სხვა სპანელი მაგალითად. ეს იქნება ჩიბშანი NLP-ის პატარა, მაგრამ განვითარებული კვლევა.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un modello di traduzione automatica neurale e un set di dati per la lingua Chibchan Bribri, con una performance media di BLEU 16.91.7. Questo è stato addestrato su un set di dati estremamente piccolo (5923 coppie Bribri-spagnole), fornendo prove per l'applicabilità di NMT in ambienti estremamente a basso contenuto di risorse. Discutiamo le sfide insite nella gestione degli input formativi da lingue senza ortografie standard, forniamo prove di successo dell'apprendimento della grammatica Bribri e esaminiamo anche le traduzioni di strutture che sono rare nelle principali lingue indoeuropee, come verbi posizionali, marcatori ergativi, classificatori numerici e complessi sistemi dimostrativi. Oltre a questo, eseguiamo un esperimento di aumento del dataset attraverso la traduzione iterativa (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) utilizzando frasi spagnole per creare frasi sintetiche di Bribri. Questo migliora il punteggio di una media di 1,0 BLEU, ma solo quando le nuove frasi spagnole appartengono allo stesso dominio degli altri esempi spagnoli. Questo contribuisce al piccolo ma crescente corpo di ricerca sul PNL Chibchan.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Чибшан тілі Брибри үшін невралдық компьютердің аудару моделі мен деректер жиынын көрсетеді. Бірақ BLEU 16. 91. 7 деген орташа әрекеті бар. Бұл өте кішкентай деректер жинағында (5923 Брибри-Испан екеуі) оқылған, NMT қолдануға арналған көп ресурстардың ортасында дәл жеткізеді. Біз стандартты ортографиялық тілдерден оқыту жүйесін басқару үшін, Брибри грамматикасын оқыту жаңылысы бар, сондай-ақ Индо-Еуропалық тілдерінің негізгі құрылымдарының аудармаларын тексереміз, мысалы, позициялық вербалар, ергиялық маркерлері, сандарлық класси Бұл қосымша, біз деректер жиынын қайта аудару арқылы (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) синтетикалық Брибри сөйлемелерді құру үшін испан сөйлемелерді пайдалану тәжірибесін жасадық. Бұл нәтижесін 1,0 BLEU орташасына жақсартады, бірақ жаңа испан сөйлемелері басқа испан мысалдарының бір доменге қатынағанда ғана жаңа. Бұл Chibchan NLP туралы зерттеулердің кішкентай, бірақ өскен денесіне көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas Čibchano kalbos Bribri nervinis mašinų vertimo modelis ir duomenų rinkinys, kurio vidutinis rezultatas yra BLEU 16.91.7. Tai buvo parengta labai mažame duomenų rinkinyje (5923 Bribri-Ispanijos poros), kuriame buvo įrodyta, kad NMT galima taikyti labai mažai išteklių turinčiose aplinkose. Mes aptariame uždavinius, susijusius su mokymo iš kalbų be standartinių ortografijų valdymu, teikiame įrodymus apie sėkmingą Bribri gramatikos mokymąsi ir taip pat nagrinėjame struktūrų, kurios dažnai vyksta pagrindinėmis indoeuropinėmis kalbomis, vertimus, pavyzdžiui, pozicinius žodžius, ergacinius žymenis, skaitmeninius klasifikatorius ir sudėtingas demonstracines sistemas. Be to, atliekame eksperimentą duomenų rinkinio didinimui pakartotiniu atgaliniu vertimu (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) naudojant Ispanijos sakinius sintetiniams Bribri sakiniams sukurti. Tai padidina rezultatą vidutiniškai 1,0 BLEU, bet tik tada, kai nauji Ispanijos sakiniai priklauso tokiai pačiai sričiai kaip ir kiti Ispanijos pavyzdžiai. Tai prisideda prie mažo, bet augančio Chibchan NLP mokslinių tyrimų.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува модел на нервен машински превод и компјутер податоци за јазикот Чибчан Брибри, со просечна изведба на БЛЕУ 16,91,7. This was trained on an extremely small dataset (5923 Bribri-Spanish pairs), providing evidence for the applicability of NMT in extremely low-resource environments.  Разговараме за предизвиците што претставуваат управување со влогот на обуката од јазиците без стандардни ортографии, обезбедуваме докази за успешно учење на граматиката Брибри, и исто така ги испитуваме преводите на структури кои се нечесто на главните индо-европски јазици, како што се позиционалните јазици, ергативните маркери, броев Покрај ова, спроведуваме експеримент за зголемување на податоците преку iterative back-translation (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) со употреба на шпански реченици за создавање синтетички Брибри реченици. Ова го подобрува резултатот за просечно 1,0 БЛЕУ, но само кога новите шпански реченици припаѓаат на истиот домен како и другите шпански примери. Ова придонесува за малото, но растечко тело на истражување за Чибчан НЛП.', 'ms': 'This paper presents a neural machine translation model and dataset for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7.  Ini dilatih pada set data yang sangat kecil (5923 pasangan Bribri-Spanish), menyediakan bukti untuk kemudahan NMT dalam persekitaran sumber yang sangat rendah. Kami membincangkan cabaran yang mengandungi pengurusan input latihan dari bahasa tanpa ortografi piawai, kami menyediakan bukti pembelajaran sukses gramatik Bribri, dan juga memeriksa terjemahan struktur yang tidak sering dalam bahasa Indo-Eropah utama, seperti verb kedudukan, penanda ergatif, pengendali nombor dan sistem demonstrasi kompleks. Selain ini, kami melakukan percubaan untuk meningkatkan set data melalui terjemahan-belakang iteratif (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) dengan menggunakan kalimat Spanyol untuk mencipta kalimat Bribri sintetik. Ini meningkatkan skor dengan rata-rata 1.0 BLEU, tetapi hanya apabila kalimat Spanyol baru milik domain yang sama dengan contoh Spanyol lain. Ini menyumbangkan kepada badan penyelidikan kecil tetapi yang berkembang pada Chibchan NLP.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ചിബ്ചാന്\u200d ഭാഷ ബ്രിബ്രിയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷ മോഡലും ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും കാണിക്കുന്നു. ബില്യ ഇത് വളരെ ചെറിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു (5923 ബ്രിബ്രി-സ്പാനിഷ് ജോട്ടുകാര്\u200d), വളരെ കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ പ് സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഇന്\u200dപ്രോഗ്രാഫികള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. ബ്രിബ്രി ഗ്രാമാരുടെ വിജയിക്കുന്നതിന് തെളിവുകള്\u200d ഞങ് ഇതിനു കൂടാതെ സ്പാനിഷ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സാനിഷ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ബ്രിബ്രിക്ക് ശിക്ഷകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഡ This improves the score by an average of 1.0 BLEU, but only when the new Spanish sentences belong to the same domain as the other Spanish examples.  ഇത് ചിബ്ചാന്\u200d എംഎല്\u200dപിയിലെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ശരീരം വളര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്ന ചെറിയ പക്ഷെ പങ്ക് ചെയ്യും.', 'mt': 'This paper presents a neural machine translation model and dataset for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7.  Dan ġie mħarreġ fuq sett ta’ dejta estremament żgħir (5923 par Bribri-Spanjoli), li jipprovdi evidenza għall-applikabbiltà tal-NMT f’ambjenti b’riżorsi estremament baxxi. Aħna niddiskutu l-isfidi involuti fil-ġestjoni tal-input tat-taħriġ minn lingwi mingħajr ortografiji standard, nagħtu evidenza ta’ tagħlim b’suċċess tal-grammar Bribri, u eżaminaw ukoll it-traduzzjonijiet ta’ strutturi li mhumiex frekwenti f’lingwi Indo-Ewropej ewlenin, bħal verbs pożizzjonali, markaturi ergattivi, klassifikaturi numeriċi u sistemi dimostrattivi kumplessi. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu esperiment li nżidu s-sett tad-dejta permezz ta’ traduzzjoni ripetuta (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) billi nużaw sentenzi Spanjoli biex joħolqu sentenzi sintetiċi Bribri. Dan itejjeb il-punteġġ b’medja ta’ 1.0 BLEU, iżda biss meta s-sentenzi Spanjoli l-ġodda jappartjenu għall-istess qasam bħall-eżempji Spanjoli l-oħra. Dan jikkontribwixxi għall-korp żgħir iżda li qed jikber ta’ riċerka dwar Chibchan NLP.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit neuralmaskinsomsetingsmodell og datasett for Chibchan-språk Bribri, med gjennomsnittlig utvikling av BLEU 16,91,7. Dette var trent på eit ekstremt lite dataset (5923 Bribri-spansk par), som gjev beviser om NMT kan brukast i ekstremt låg ressursmiljø. Vi diskuterer utfordringane med å handtera opplæringsinndata frå språk utan standard ortografikk, vi gjer beviser om vellykke læring av Bribri-grammar, og også undersøker omsetjingane av strukturene som er oftast i store Indo-europeiske språk, slik som posisjonelle verbar, ergatiske merker, numeriske klassifikasjonar og komplekse demonstrasjonssystemar. I tillegg til dette utfører vi ein eksperiment for å auka dataset gjennom iterative tilbakeomsetjing (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) ved å bruka spanske setningar for å laga syntetiske bribri setningar. Dette forbedrar poeng med gjennomsnittlig 1,0 BLEU, men berre når dei nye spanske setningane høyrer til det same domene som dei andre spanske eksemplane. Dette bidrar til den lille, men voksne kroppen av forskning på Chibchan NLP.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono neuronowy model tłumaczenia maszynowego i zestaw danych dla języka chibchanskiego Bribri, o średniej wydajności BLEU 16.91.7. Zostało to przeszkolone na niezwykle małym zbiorze danych (pary 5923 Bribri-Hiszpańskie), dostarczając dowodów na zastosowanie NMT w środowiskach bardzo niskich zasobów. Omówimy wyzwania związane z zarządzaniem wejściami szkoleniowymi z języków bez standardowych ortografii, dostarczamy dowody udanej nauki gramatyki Bribri, a także badamy tłumaczenia struktur rzadko występujących w głównych językach indoeuropejskich, takich jak czasowniki pozycyjne, markery ergatywne, klasyfikatory numeryczne i złożone systemy demonstracyjne. Dodatkowo przeprowadzamy eksperyment zwiększania zbioru danych poprzez iteracyjne tłumaczenie wsteczne (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) przy użyciu zdań hiszpańskich do tworzenia syntetycznych zdań Bribri. Poprawia to wynik o średnio 1.0 BLEU, ale tylko wtedy, gdy nowe zdania hiszpańskie należą do tej samej domeny co inne hiszpańskie przykłady. Przyczynia się to do małego, ale rosnącego zbioru badań nad Chibchan NLP.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un model neural de traducere automată și un set de date pentru limba Chibchan Bribri, cu o performanță medie de BLEU 16.91.7. Acest lucru a fost instruit pe un set de date extrem de mic (5923 perechi Bribri-Spaniolă), oferind dovezi pentru aplicabilitatea NMT în medii extrem de scăzute de resurse. Discutăm provocările implicate în gestionarea intrărilor de formare din limbi fără ortografii standard, oferim dovezi ale învățării cu succes a gramaticii Bribri și examinăm, de asemenea, traducerile structurilor care sunt rar frecvente în limbile indoeuropene majore, cum ar fi verbele poziționale, markerii ergativi, clasificatorii numerici și sistemele demonstrative complexe. În plus, efectuăm un experiment de mărire a setului de date prin traducere iterativă înapoi (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) prin utilizarea propozițiilor spaniole pentru a crea propoziții sintetice Bribri. Acest lucru îmbunătățește scorul cu o medie de 1,0 BLEU, dar numai atunci când noile propoziții spaniole aparțin același domeniu ca și celelalte exemple spaniole. Acest lucru contribuie la corpul mic, dar în creștere de cercetare privind PNL Chibchan.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Чибхан хэл Брибри гэх мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн хөгжлийн загвар болон өгөгдлийн санг дэвшүүлдэг. Энэ нь маш жижиг өгөгдлийн санг (5923 Брибри-Испан хоёр), NMT-ийн хэрэглээ маш бага нөөцийн орчинд хангалттай баталгаатай байдаг. Бид хэлээс стандарт ортографик байхгүй суралцах боломжтой сорилтуудыг удирдаж, Брибри грамматикийн амжилттай суралцах баталгааг, мөн Индо-Европын чухал хэлнүүд дээр хамааралтай бүтээгдэхүүний хөгжлийг шалгаж үзүүлдэг. Үүнээс гадна бид өгөгдлийн санг дахин дахин дахин хөгжүүлэх туршилтын туршилт хийж, Испанийн өгүүлбэрүүдийг синтетик Брибри өгүүлбэрүүдийг бий болгохын тулд (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018). Энэ нь дундаж 1.0 БЛЕУ-ын тоогоор сайжруулдаг. Гэхдээ зөвхөн шинэ Испанийн өгүүлбэр бусад Испанийн жишээлүүдтэй адилхан хэлбэртэй байдаг. Энэ нь Chibchan NLP-ын судалгааны жижиг боловч өссөн биеийн хувьд тусалдаг.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za prevod neuralne mašine i setu podataka za Chibchan jezik Bribri, s prosječnim provedbom BLEU 16,91.7. To je obučeno na izuzetno malim podacima (5923 Bribri-španjolski par), pružajući dokaze za primjenu NMT-a u izuzetno niskim resursima. Razgovaramo o izazovima koji su uključeni u upravljanje ulazom treninga iz jezika bez standardnih ortografija, pružamo dokaze uspešnog učenja gramatike Bribri, i takođe pregledamo prevode struktura koje su neobične na velikim Indoevropskim jezicima, poput pozicionalnih verba, ergativnih znakova, brojnih klasifikatora i kompleksnih demonstracionih sustava. Osim toga, izvodimo eksperiment povećanja seta podataka putem iterativnog prevoda natrag (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) koristeći španjolske rečenice za stvaranje sintetičkih bribrijskih rečenica. To poboljšava rezultat prosječnom od 1,0 BLEU, ali samo kada nove španjolske rečenice pripadaju istom domenu kao i drugi španjolski primjeri. To doprinosi malom ali rastućem telu istraživanja na Chibchan NLP-u.', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan wuxuu keenaa model turjumista neural machine and dataset for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7. Taas waxaa lagu baray sawir aad u yar (5923 Bribri-Spanish labadooda), kaas oo u fidiya caddeynta ku habboon qofka NMT in aad u hoos u leedahay deegaanka nololeed. Waxaannu ka sheekaynaynaa dhibaatooyin ku saabsan maamulka waxbarashada afka Finnishka oo aan ku qornaynno aqoonta aqoonta standard, waxaynu siinaynaa caddeynta barashada barbaarinta Bribri, waxaana sidoo kale baaraynaa turjumaadka muuqashada ku saabsan luqadaha muhiimka ah ee Indo-Yurub, tusaale ahaan hadallada positive ah, markhaatiyaal ergative ah, fasalooyinka tirada badan iyo nidaamka muujinta adag. Taas waxaa dheer oo aan sameynaa imtixaan ku kordhiya taariikhda ee lagu soo diro iterative dib-translation (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) si aan ugu sameyno xeerarka Ispanish oo uu u sameeyo xarumaha Bribribribri. Taas waxay bedeshaa qiimeynta qiyaastii 1,0 BLEU, laakiin marka uu xukunka cusub Isbanishka ay leeyihiin isku mid tusaalaha kale oo Isbanish ah. Taasi waxay ku contributeysaa jidhka wax yar ee koraya waxbarashada oo ku saabsan Chibchan NLP.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en neural maskinﾃｶversﾃ､ttningsmodell och dataset fﾃｶr chibchansprﾃ･ket Bribri, med en genomsnittlig prestanda pﾃ･ BLEU 16.91.7. Detta utbildades pﾃ･ en extremt liten datauppsﾃ､ttning (5923 Bribri-spanska par), vilket gav bevis fﾃｶr att NMT ﾃ､r tillﾃ､mpligt i extremt lﾃ･ga resurser miljﾃｶer. Vi diskuterar utmaningarna med att hantera utbildningsinput frﾃ･n sprﾃ･k utan standardortografi, vi ger bevis pﾃ･ framgﾃ･ngsrikt lﾃ､rande av Bribri grammatik och undersﾃｶker ﾃ､ven ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningar av strukturer som ﾃ､r ovanliga i stﾃｶrre indoeuropeiska sprﾃ･k, sﾃ･som positionsverb, ergativa markﾃｶrer, numeriska klassificerare och komplexa demonstrativa system. Utﾃｶver detta utfﾃｶr vi ett experiment med att utﾃｶka datauppsﾃ､ttningen genom iterativ bakﾃ･tﾃｶversﾃ､ttning (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) genom att anvﾃ､nda spanska meningar fﾃｶr att skapa syntetiska Bribri meningar. Detta fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttrar poﾃ､ngen med i genomsnitt 1,0 BLEU, men bara nﾃ､r de nya spanska meningarna tillhﾃｶr samma domﾃ､n som de andra spanska exemplen. Detta bidrar till den lilla men vﾃ､xande forskningen om Chibchans NLP.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් මෙෂින් වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය සහ දත්ත සූදානයක් චිබ්චාන් භාෂා බ්\u200dරිබ්\u200dරි මේක පොඩි දත්ත සම්බන්ධයක් (5923 බ්\u200dරිබ්\u200dරි-ස්පැනිස් ජෝඩ්), NMT ගැන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂි දෙන්න පුළුවන් ව අපි කතා කරනවා අභ්\u200dයාගයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැති භාෂාවල් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැති භාෂාව, අපි බ්\u200dරිබ්\u200dරි ග්\u200dරාමාර්කයේ සාක්ෂිත සාක්ෂික සි මේක අතර, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් කරන්නේ ස්පැනිස් වාක්ෂිත බ්\u200dරිබ්\u200dරි වාක්ෂාව නිර්මාණය සඳහා දත්ත සෙට් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් කරන්න. මේක ප්\u200dරමාණය 1.0 BLUE වලින් වැඩ කරන්නේ, නමුත් අලුත් ස්පැනිස් වචනය අනිත් ස්පැනිස් උදාහරණ වලින් එකම ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් අය මේක චිබ්චාන් NLP ගැන පුංචි විශ්වාස කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் சிப்சான் மொழி ப்ரிப்ரிக்கான ஒரு புதிர மொழி மொழி மொழிமாற்ற மாதிரி மற்றும் தரவு அமைப்பை கொடுக்கும், சராசரி செயல்பா இது மிகவும் சிறிய தகவல் அமைப்பில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டது (5923 பிரிப்ரி- ஸ்பானிஷ் ஜோடி), மிகவும் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் சூழலில் NMT பயன் நாம் நிலையான குறிப்புகள் இல்லாமல் மொழிகளிலிருந்து பயிற்சி உள்ளீட்டை மேலாண்மை செய்யும் சவால்களை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம், பிரைப்ரி குறிப்புகளின் வெற்றிகரமாக கற்றுக்கொள்ளும், முக்கி இதைக் கூடாது, நாம் பின்சானிஷ் வாக்குகளை பயன்படுத்தி பிரிப்ரிக் வாக்குகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கான தகவல் அமைப்பை அதிகரிக்க ஒரு சோதனையை செய்கிறோம். இது 1. 0 பிலியூவின் சராசரியான மதிப்பெண்களை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, ஆனால் புதிய ஸ்பானிஷ் வாக்கியங்கள் மற்ற சிப்பானிஷ் உதாரணங்கள்  இது சிப்சான் என்எல்பி என்ற ஆராய்ச்சியின் உடல் வளர்ந்து வருகிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a neural machine translation model and data set for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7. یہ ایک بہت چھوٹی ڈیٹ سٹ (5923 برابری-اسپانیایی جوڑے) پر آموزش کی گئی تھی، جو NMT کے لئے بہت کم منطقی محیط منطقه میں ثابت کی جاتی تھی۔ ہم نے زبانوں کی تعلیم اداری کے بغیر استاندارڈ اورٹوگرافی کے سوال کی مدیریت میں مشورہ کیا ہے، ہم بریبری گرامماری کی موفقیت کی تعلیم دینے کی شہادت دیتے ہیں، اور ان کی تعلیمات کو بھی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو بڑے انڈو یورپی زبانوں میں غیر اثر ہیں، جیسے موقعیت کلاسیوں، ارجیتی مارکروں، شماری کلاسیوں اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے اسپانیایی جماعتوں کا استعمال کرکے اسپانیایی جماعتوں کے ساتھ استعمال کیا ہے کہ اسپانیایی جماعتوں کے ساتھ استعمال کریں۔ یہ اسکور 1.0 BLEU کے متوسط سے بہتر ہوتا ہے، لیکن صرف جب نئی اسپانیایی جماعتیں دوسری اسپانیایی مثال کے ساتھ ملتی ہیں۔ یہ Chibchan NLP کے ذریعے چھوٹے لیکن بڑھنے والے جسم کے ذریعے اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu juda kichkina maʼlumotlar satrida (5923 Bribri-Ispancha parchada) o'rgandi. NMT'ni juda qisqa manba muhitda qoʻllashga ishlatish mumkin. Biz tillardan o'rganishni andoza ortografiklarni boshqarish uchun murakkab qilamiz, biz Bribri grammatika muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish imkoniyatlarini bajaramiz, va bu murakkab muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish imkoniyatlarini ko'rib turib chiqaramiz, masalan tashkilotlar, ergativ markerlar, raqamli klassiflar va murakkab demonstrativ tizimlar kabi. Бундан бошқача, биз маълумотни ўзгартириш таркибида (Sennrich et al., 2016; Hoang et al., 2018) ҳужжатларни Испания ҳужжатлари билан синтезаттик Bribri ҳужжатларини яратиш учун бажаришга бажаримиз. Bu faqat Ispanchadan boshqa misollar kabi ispanchaga yangi so'zlar bir domenaga ega boʻlsa. Bu kichkina lekin chibchan NLP tashkilotlarini o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh và bộ dữ liệu cho ngôn ngữ Chigchan Bribri, với một trình độ trung bình của NICOU 16.97. Việc này được đào tạo dựa trên một tập tin cực nhỏ (523 Bribri-Spanish pairs), chứng minh được NMB có thể tồn tại trong môi trường chứa nguồn cực thấp. Chúng ta thảo luận về thử thách trong việc quản lý nội dung giáo dục từ các ngôn ngữ mà không có các bản đồ tiêu chuẩn, chúng ta cung cấp bằng chứng về việc học tập thành công của Bribri Ngữ pháp, và cũng nghiên cứu bản dịch của các cấu trúc hiếm gặp trong các ngôn ngữ Châu Âu lớn, như các động từ, đánh dấu năng lượng, các phân loại số và các hệ thống biểu tượng phức tạp. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thực hiện một thí nghiệm cải thiện bộ dữ liệu bằng cách lặp lại phiên dịch ngược (Sennkich et al., thẩm 6a; Hoang et al., 208) bằng câu ở Tây Ban Nha để tạo ra các câu Bribri tổng hợp. Điều này cải thiện điểm số bằng trung bình 1.0 tiếng bíp, nhưng chỉ khi câu mới của Tây Ban Nha thuộc về cùng một miền với những ví dụ khác của Tây Ban Nha. Nó góp phần vào một cơ thể nghiên cứu nhỏ nhưng đang tăng dần về Chigchan NLP.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя невронен машинен превод модел и набор от данни за чибчанския език Брибри със средна производителност 16.91.7. Това е обучено на изключително малък набор от данни (5923 брибри-испански двойки), осигурявайки доказателства за приложимостта на НМТ в изключително нискоресурсни среди. Обсъждаме предизвикателствата, свързани с управлението на обучението от езици без стандартна ортография, предоставяме доказателства за успешно изучаване на брибриската граматика, както и разглеждаме преводите на структури, които са рядко срещани в основните индоевропейски езици, като позиционни глаголи, ергативни маркери, цифрови класификатори и сложни демонстративни системи. В допълнение към това, извършваме експеримент за увеличаване на набора от данни чрез итеративен обратен превод (Сенрих и др., 2016а; Хоанг и др., 2018) чрез използване на испански изречения за създаване на синтетични изречения от Брибри. Това подобрява резултата средно с 1,0 но само когато новите испански изречения принадлежат към същия домейн като другите испански примери. Това допринася за малкото, но нарастващо изследване на НЛП Чибчан.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za prevod neuralnih strojeva i set podataka za Chibchan jezik Bribri, s prosječnim učinkom BLEU 16,91,7. To je obučeno na izuzetno malim podacima (5923 Bribri-španjolski par), pružajući dokaze za primjenu NMT-a u izuzetno niskim resursima. Razgovaramo o izazovima koje su uključene u upravljanje ulazom treninga iz jezika bez standardnih ortografija, pružamo dokaze uspješnog učenja gramatike Bribri, a također pregledamo prevode struktura koje su neobične na velikim Indoeuropskim jezicima, poput pozicionalnih verba, ergativnih znakova, brojnih klasifikatora i kompleksnih demonstrativnih sustava. Osim toga, izvodimo eksperiment povećanja kompleta podataka kroz iterativni prevod natrag (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) koristeći španjolske rečenice za stvaranje sintetičkih bribri rečenica. To poboljšava rezultat prosječnom od 1,0 BLEU-a, ali samo kada nove španjolske rečenice pripadaju istom domenu kao i drugi španjolski primjeri. To doprinosi malom ali rastućem tijelu istraživanja na Chibchan NLP-u.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert een neuraal machine translation model en dataset voor de Chibchan taal Bribri, met een gemiddelde prestatie van BLEU 16.91.7. Dit werd getraind op een extreem kleine dataset (5923 Bribri-Spaanse paren), wat bewijst dat NMT toepasbaar is in extreem lage resource omgevingen. We bespreken de uitdagingen die gepaard gaan met het beheren van trainingsinput van talen zonder standaard orthografieën, we leveren bewijs van succesvol leren van Bribri grammatica, en onderzoeken ook de vertalingen van structuren die zeldzaam zijn in grote Indo-Europese talen, zoals positiewerkwoorden, ergatieve markers, numerieke classificatoren en complexe demonstratieve systemen. Daarnaast voeren we een experiment uit van het vergroten van de dataset door iteratieve back-translation (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) door gebruik te maken van Spaanse zinnen om synthetische Bribri zinnen te maken. Dit verbetert de score met een gemiddelde van 1.0 BLEU, maar alleen wanneer de nieuwe Spaanse zinnen tot hetzelfde domein behoren als de andere Spaanse voorbeelden. Dit draagt bij aan het kleine maar groeiende onderzoek naar Chibchan NLP.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en neural maskinoversættelsesmodel og datasæt for Chibchan sproget Bribri, med en gennemsnitlig ydeevne på BLEU 16.91.7. Dette blev uddannet på et ekstremt lille datasæt (5923 Bribri-spanske par), der gav dokumentation for anvendeligheden af NMT i ekstremt lave ressourcer miljøer. Vi diskuterer de udfordringer, der er forbundet med at håndtere træningsinput fra sprog uden standardortografier, vi giver bevis for vellykket indlæring af Bribri grammatik, og undersøger også oversættelser af strukturer, der er sjældne i større indoeuropæiske sprog, såsom positionsverber, ergative markører, numeriske klassifikationer og komplekse demonstrative systemer. Derudover udfører vi et eksperiment med at forøge datasættet gennem iterativ back-oversættelse (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) ved at bruge spanske sætninger til at skabe syntetiske Bribri sætninger. Dette forbedrer scoren med et gennemsnit på 1,0 BLEU, men kun når de nye spanske sætninger hører til det samme domæne som de andre spanske eksempler. Dette bidrager til den lille, men voksende samling af forskning om Chibchan NLP.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt ein neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungsmodell und Datensatz für die chibchanische Sprache Bribri vor, mit einer durchschnittlichen Leistung von BLEU 16.91.7. Dies wurde auf einem extrem kleinen Datensatz (5923 Bribri-Spanish Pairs) trainiert, was die Anwendbarkeit von NMT in extrem ressourcenarmen Umgebungen belegte. Wir diskutieren die Herausforderungen bei der Verwaltung von Trainingseingaben aus Sprachen ohne Standardorthographien, wir liefern Beweise für erfolgreiches Lernen der Bribri-Grammatik und untersuchen auch die Übersetzungen von Strukturen, die in großen indoeuropäischen Sprachen selten sind, wie Positionsverben, ergative Marker, numerische Klassifikatoren und komplexe Demonstrationssysteme. Darüber hinaus führen wir ein Experiment durch, den Datensatz durch iterative Rückübersetzung (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) zu erweitern, indem spanische Sätze verwendet werden, um synthetische Bribri-Sätze zu erstellen. Dies verbessert die Punktzahl um durchschnittlich 1.0 BLEU, aber nur, wenn die neuen spanischen Sätze zur gleichen Domäne gehören wie die anderen spanischen Beispiele. Dies trägt zur kleinen, aber wachsenden Forschungsgruppe zum Chibchan NLP bei.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan model terjemahan mesin saraf dan set data untuk bahasa Chibchan Bribri, dengan prestasi rata-rata BLEU 16.91.7. Ini dilatih pada set data yang sangat kecil (5923 pasangan Bribri-Spanyol), menyediakan bukti untuk aplikabilitas NMT dalam lingkungan sumber daya yang sangat rendah. Kami mendiskusikan tantangan dalam mengelola input pelatihan dari bahasa tanpa ortografi standar, kami menyediakan bukti dari pembelajaran sukses gramatika Bribri, dan juga memeriksa terjemahan struktur yang tidak sering dalam bahasa Indo-Eropa utama, seperti verb posisi, penanda ergatif, klasifikasi numerik dan sistem demonstrasi kompleks. Selain ini, kami melakukan percobaan untuk meningkatkan dataset melalui terjemahan kembali iteratif (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) dengan menggunakan kalimat Spanyol untuk menciptakan kalimat Bribri sintetis. Ini meningkatkan skor dengan rata-rata 1,0 BLEU, tetapi hanya ketika kalimat Spanyol baru milik domain yang sama dengan contoh Spanyol lainnya. Ini berkontribusi ke tubuh penelitian kecil tapi tumbuh pada Chibchan NLP.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی و مجموعه اطلاعات برای زبان چیب چان بری را با عملکرد متوسط BLEU 16.91.7 نشان می دهد. این روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای بسیار کوچک (5923 جفت بریبری-اسپانیایی) آموزش یافته شد، که مدرک برای کاربردی NMT در محیط زیادی کم منابع است. ما در مورد چالش\u200cهایی که در کنترل ورودهای آموزش از زبان\u200cها بدون ورتوگرافی\u200cهای استاندارد صحبت می\u200cکنیم، مدرک\u200cهای آموزش موفقیت از grammar بریبری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و همچنین ترجمه\u200cهای ساختمان\u200cهایی که در زبان\u200cهای بزرگ اندو-اروپایی غیر عادی هستند، مثل کلمات\u200cهای موقعیت، نشانه\u200cهای ار در اضافه به این، ما یک آزمایش از افزایش مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را از طریق ترجمه\u200cهای پشت\u200cتاب (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) انجام می\u200cدهیم، با استفاده از جمله\u200cهای اسپانیایی برای ایجاد جمله\u200cهای سناتیک Bribri. این امتیاز را با میانگین ۱.۰ BLEU بهتر می\u200cکند، اما فقط وقتی جمله\u200cهای اسپانیایی جدید به همان حوزه\u200cای متعلق به مثال دیگر اسپانیایی باشند. این به بدن کوچک ولی رشد تحقیقات در NLP Chibchan کمک می کند.', 'ko': '본고는 Chibchan 언어인 Bobribri의 신경기계 번역 모델과 데이터 집합을 제시했는데 평균 성능은 BLEU 16.91.7이다.매우 작은 데이터 세트(5천923쌍)에서 이뤄진 훈련으로, NMT가 극히 낮은 자원 환경에서의 적용성에 증거를 제공했다.우리는 표준 정자법이 없는 언어의 교육 입력을 관리하는 데 직면한 도전에 대해 토론했고 브리브리브리 문법을 성공적으로 배웠다는 증거를 제공했으며 주요 인도 유럽 언어에서 흔히 볼 수 없는 구조의 번역, 예를 들어 위치 동사, 격자 표기, 디지털 양사와 복잡한 지시 시스템을 연구했다.이외에도 스페인어 문장을 사용하여 합성문장을 만들고 반복 번역(Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoanget al., 2018)을 통해 데이터 세트를 확장하는 실험도 진행했다.이는 평균 1.0 BLEU 점수를 높이지만, 새로운 스페인어 문장이 다른 스페인어 예제와 같은 영역에 속한다는 전제 조건이다.이는 치bchan NLP에 대한 규모는 작지만 꾸준히 증가하는 연구에 도움이 된다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz Çitçen dilinde Bribri üçin näyral maşynyň terjime nusgasyny we veri setirini görkezýär. BLEU 16.91.7 ýagdaýynda orta taýýarlanýar. Bu örän kiçi bir datawata (5923 Bribri-Ispanýolça çift) guruldy, NMT ýagdaýynyň iň az resurslarda tapawutlygyny üçin kanıtlary getirýärdi. Biz adatça ortografiýasy bolmadyk dillerden girişi işlemek üçin kynçylyklary we Bribri gramatiýasynyň üstünlikli öwrenmesiniň kanunlaryny berýäris we hem esasy Indo-Ýewropa dillerinde täsirli terjimeleriň terjimelerini barlaýarys. Ýöne möhüm sözler, ergatik sözler, sayyp klasifikatçylar we sarhoş kanunlar bilen maslahat Mundan hem, biz veri setirini tekrarat terjime eden (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) sözleriň sintetik Bribri sözleri yaratmak üçin ýeterleştirmegi denedik. Bu aralygy 1.0 BLEU ýagdaýynda üýtgedýär, ýöne täze ispanyola sözler başga örnekler bilen meňzeş domena ait bolanlar diňe. Bu Chibchan NLP'da araştyrymyň kiçi, ýöne ösdüren bedenine kömekleýär.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një model përkthimi neural makine dhe një set të dhënash për gjuhën Chibchan Bribri, me një paraqitje mesatare të BLEU 16.91.7. Kjo u trajnua në një set të dhënash ekstremisht të vogël (5923 çifte Bribri-Spanjollë), duke dhënë prova për aplikabilitetin e NMT në mjedise ekstremisht të ulët burimesh. Ne diskutojmë sfidat e përfshira në menaxhimin e hyrjeve të trainimit nga gjuhët pa ortografi standarde, ne japim prova të mësimit të suksesshëm të gramatikës Bribri dhe gjithashtu shqyrtojmë përkthimet e strukturave që janë të pakufishme në gjuhët e mëdha indo-evropiane, të tilla si verbët pozitivë, markerët ergativë, klasifikuesit numerikë dhe sistemet demonstruese komplekse. Përveç kësaj, ne kryejmë një eksperiment të rritjes së të dhënave nëpërmjet përkthimit iterativ mbrapa (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) duke përdorur frazat spanjolle për të krijuar fraza sintetike Bribri. Kjo përmirëson rezultatin me një mesatare prej 1.0 BLEU, por vetëm kur fjalët e reja spanjolle i përkasin të njëjtit domeni si shembujt e tjerë spanjollë. Kjo kontribuon në trupin e vogël por në rritje të kërkimeve mbi Chibchan NLP.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha muundo wa kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo na seti ya taarifa kwa lugha ya Chibchan Bribri, kwa kiwango cha wastani cha BLEU 16.91.7. Hii ilifundishwa kwenye seti ndogo sana ya taarifa (5923 Bribri-Spanish ndogo), kwa kutoa ushahidi wa matumizi ya NMT katika mazingira ya rasilimali yenye chini sana. Tunajojiana na changamoto zinazohusiana na kusimamia mafunzo ya kujifunza kwa lugha isiyo na sifa za kawaida, tunatoa ushahidi wa mafanikio ya kujifunza karatasi ya Bribri, na pia tunatafiti tafsiri za miundombi ambazo hazijaribika katika lugha kubwa za Kihindi-Ulaya, kama vile maneno chanya, alama za viwanda, wataalamu kadhaa na mfumo wa maandamano. Zaidi ya hili, tunafanya jaribio la kuongeza taarifa kupitia tafsiri ya kisasa ya kurejesha (Sennrich et al., 2016; Hoang et al., 2018) kwa kutumia hukumu za Kihispania ili kutengeneza sentenco ya pamoja ya Bribri. Hii inaboresha score kwa wastani wa BLEU 1.0, lakini pekee pale hukumu mpya ya Kihispania inavyomilikiwa na maelezo mengine ya Kihispania. This contributes to the small but growing body of research on Chibchan NLP.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የደዌብ መሳሪያ ትርጉም ሞዴል እና ዳታ ማድረጊያውን ለኪብቻን ቋንቋ ብሪቢ ያቀርባል፡፡ ብሌU 16.91. ይህ በጣም ትንሽ ዳታተር ሰርቨር (5923 Bribri-ስፓኒሽ ሁለቶች) የተማረ ነው፡፡ የNMT በአካባቢው የዝናብ ሀብት አካባቢ ውስጥ ለመስጠት ማስረጃዎችን የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡ በቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የግንኙነቶችን ድምፅ ማቀናቀል እናስነጋግረዋለን፡፡ ብሪቢ ግራማ ማስተማርን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የስፓኒሽ ፍርድ የሳንቲካዊ ብሪቢ ፍርድ ለመፍጠር ዳታዎችን በመጨመር ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ የስፓኒሽ ቃላት ግን በሌላ ስፓኒሽ ምሳሌዎች በአንድ ዶሜን በሆነ ጊዜ ብቻ ነው፡፡ ይህ በኪbchan NLP ላይ ትምህርት አካል ታናሽ ነገር ግን የሚያሳድግ አካል ነው፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n neurale masjien vertalingsmodel en datastel vir die Chibchan taal Bribri, met 'n gemiddelde prestasie van BLEU 16. 91. 7. Hierdie is opgelei op 'n ekstrem klein datastel (5923 Bribri-Spaanse pare), verskaf getuienis vir die toepassing van NMT in ekstrem lae hulpbron omgewing. Ons bespreek die uitdrukkings wat in die bestuur van onderwerp ingevoer van tale sonder standaard ortografies is, ons verskaf getuienis van suksesvol leer van Bribri grammatiek, en ook ondersoek die oorsettinge van strukture wat onvolledig is in groot Indo-Europeese tale, soos posisionele verbe, ergatiewe merkers, numeriese klassifiseerders en komplekse demonstrasiestelsels. In addition to this, we perform an experiment of increasing the dataset through iterative back-translation (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) by using Spanish sentences to create synthetic Bribri sentences. Hierdie verbeter die telling deur 'n gemiddelde van 1.0 BLEU, maar net wanneer die nuwe Spaanse setnings aan dieselfde domein behoort as die ander Spaanse voorbeelde. Dit bydra aan die klein, maar groei liggaam van reseksie op Chibchan NLP.", 'az': "Bu kağıt Chibchan dili Bribri üçün nürol maşına çevirmə modelini və veri qurğularını göstərir, bu şəkildə BLEU 16.91.7 ilə ortalama performans verir. Bu çox kiçik bir veri qutusunda təhsil edildi (5923 Bribri-İspanyol çift), NMT'in istifadə edilməsi üçün çox düşük ressurs çevresində dəlillər göstərdi. Biz standart ortografiyalar olmadan dillərin təhsil edilməsi ilə mübahisə edirik, Bribri grammatik öyrənməsi ilə müvəffəqiyyəti təhsil edirik, həmçin in böyük Indo-Avropa dillərində, mövcud verblər, ergatik işaretçilər, sayısal klassifiyarlar və kompleks göstərici sistemlərin təhsil edilməsini də incidirik. Bununla birlikdə, İspanyol cümlələrini sintetik Bribri cümlələrini yaratmaq üçün verilən quruluşu iterativ geri çevirib (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018). Bu nümayəni ortalama 1,0 BLEU ilə yaxşılaşdırır, ancaq yeni İspanyol cümlələri digər İspanyol misalları ilə eyni domena sahibi olduğu zaman. Bu Chibchan NLP barəsindəki küçük, lakin büyüyən təhsil vücuduna kömək edir.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za prevod neuralne mašine i setu podataka za Chibchan jezik Bribri, s prosječnim učinkom BLEU 16,91.7. To je obučeno na izuzetno malim podacima (5923 Bribri-španjolski par), pružajući dokaze za primjenu NMT-a u izuzetno niskim resursima. Razgovaramo o izazovima koji su uključeni u upravljanje ulazom treninga iz jezika bez standardnih ortografija, pružamo dokaze uspješnog učenja gramatike Bribri, a također pregledamo prevode struktura koje su neobične na velikim Indoevropskim jezicima, poput pozicionalnih verba, ergativnih znakova, brojnih klasifikatora i kompleksnih demonstracionih sustava. Osim toga, izvodimo eksperiment povećanja kompleta podataka kroz iterativni prevod natrag (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) koristeći španjolske rečenice za stvaranje sintetičkih bribri rečenica. To poboljšava rezultat prosječnom od 1,0 BLEU-a, ali samo kada nove španjolske rečenice pripadaju istom domenu kao i drugi španjolski primjeri. To doprinosi malom ali rastućem tijelu istraživanja na Chibchan NLP-u.', 'bn': 'This paper presents a neural machine translation model and dataset for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7.  এই প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছিল এক অত্যন্ত ছোট্ট ডাটাসেট (৫৯২৩ ব্রিব্রি-স্প্যানিশ জোড়া), যা এনএমটির প্রমাণ প্রদান করা হয়েছিল অত্যন্ত কম আমরা ভাষার স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার্টোগ্রাফি ছাড়া ভাষায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ ব্যবস্থা নিয়ে যে সমস্ত চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে আলোচনা করি, আমরা ব্রিব্রি গ্রামের সফল শিক্ষার প্রমাণ প্রদান করি এবং এছাড়াও ভারত-ইউরোপী এছাড়াও আমরা স্প্যানিশ শাস্তি ব্যবহার করে সিন্টেটিক ব্রিব্রির শাস্তি তৈরি করার মাধ্যমে ডাটাসেট বৃদ্ধি করার পরীক্ষা করি। এটি স্কোরের সাধারণত ১.০ বিলিউ, কিন্তু শুধু যখন নতুন স্প্যানিশ শ বাণীগুলো স্প্যানিশের মতো একই ডোমেইনের সাথে থাকে। এটা চিব্চান এনএলপির উপর গবেষণার দেহে ছোট কিন্তু বাড়ছে।', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է Չիբթանի լեզվի Բրիբրիի նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդել և տվյալների համակարգ, որի միջին արդյունքն է 16.91.7: Սա սովորեցրել է չափազանց փոքր տվյալների համակարգի վրա (Բրիբրիի-իսպաներեն զույգեր, որոնք ապացույցներ են տալիս NMT-ի կիրառելիության համար չափազանց ցածր ռեսուրսների միջավայրում: Մենք քննարկում ենք այն մարտահրավերները, որոնք առաջացել են սովորելու գործընթացը լեզուներից առանց ստանդարտ օրտոգրաֆիաների, մենք ապացույցներ ենք տալիս BriBri գրաֆիայի հաջողակ սովորելու համար, ինչպես նաև քննարկում ենք կառուցվածքների թարգմանությունները, որոնք հազվադեպ են հիմնական հնդեվրոպական լեզուներում, ինչպիսիք Ավելին, մենք կատարում ենք մի փորձ, որպեսզի զարգացնենք տվյալների համակարգը կրկնվող վերադարձ թարգմանության միջոցով (Sennych et al., 2016a; Հոանգ et al., 2018), օգտագործելով իսպաներեն նախադասություններ ստեղծելու սինթետիկ BriBri նախադասություններ: Սա բարելավում է գնահատականը 1.0-ով, բայց միայն այն ժամանակ, երբ նոր իսպաներեն նախադասությունները պատկանում են նույն բնագավառին, ինչ մյուս իսպաներեն օրինակները: Սա ներդրում է Չիբթանի ՆԼՊ-ի փոքրիկ, բայց աճող հետազոտության համար:', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje model neuronového strojového překladu a datovou sadu pro chibchanský jazyk Bribri, s průměrným výkonem BLEU 16.91.7. To bylo trénováno na extrémně malém datovém souboru (5923 bribri-španělské páry), což poskytlo důkaz o použitelnosti NMT v extrémně nízkých prostředích. Diskutujeme výzvy spojené s řízením tréninkových vstupů z jazyků bez standardních ortografií, poskytujeme důkazy o úspěšném učení bribri gramatiky a také zkoumáme překlady struktur, které jsou v hlavních indoevropských jazycích vzácné, jako jsou polohová slovesa, ergativní značky, numerické klasifikátory a komplexní demonstrační systémy. Kromě toho provádíme experiment rozšíření datové sady pomocí iterativního zpětného překladu (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) pomocí španělských vět k vytvoření syntetických vět Bribri. To zlepšuje skóre o průměr 1.0 BLEU, ale pouze pokud nové španělské věty patří do stejné domény jako ostatní španělské příklady. To přispívá k malému, ale rostoucímu souboru výzkumu Chibchan NLP.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse neuromasintõlke mudelit ja andmekogumit chibchani keele Bribri jaoks, mille keskmine jõudlus on BLEU 16.91.7. Seda koolitati väga väikese andmekogumi põhjal (5923 Bribri-Hispaania paari), mis tõendas NMT kohaldatavust äärmiselt vähese ressursiga keskkonnas. Arutleme väljakutseid, mis kaasnevad standardite ortograafiata keelte koolituse haldamisel, anname tõendeid Bribri grammatika edukast õppimisest ning uurime ka struktuuride tõlkeid, mida esineb harva suuremates Indo-Euroopa keeltes, näiteks positsioonisõnad, ergatiivsed markerid, numbrilised klassifitseerijad ja keerukad demonstratiivsüsteemid. Lisaks sellele teostame eksperimenti andmekogumi täiendamiseks iteratiivse tagatõlke kaudu (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018), kasutades hispaania lauseid sünteetiliste Bribri lausete loomiseks. See parandab skoori keskmiselt 1,0 BLEU võrra, kuid ainult siis, kui uued hispaania laused kuuluvad samasse domeeni nagu teised hispaania näited. See aitab kaasa Chibchani uue tööprogrammi väikesele, kuid kasvavale uurimistööle.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään neurokonekäännösmalli ja -aineisto Chibchan-kielelle Bribri, jonka keskimääräinen suorituskyky on BLEU 16.91.7. Tämä on koulutettu erittäin pienellä aineistolla (5923 bribri-espanjalaista paria), mikä on todiste NMT:n soveltuvuudesta erittäin vähävaraisissa ympäristöissä. Keskustelemme haasteista, joita liittyy koulutuksen hallintaan sellaisilta kieliltä, joilla ei ole standardiortografiaa, annamme todisteita bribrikieliopin onnistuneesta oppimisesta ja tutkimme myös sellaisten rakenteiden käännöksiä, jotka ovat harvinaisia suurilla indoeurooppalaisilla kielillä, kuten paikkaverbit, ergatiiviset markkerit, numeeriset luokittelijat ja monimutkaiset demonstrointijärjestelmät. Tämän lisäksi suoritamme kokeen aineiston lisäämisestä iteratiivisen takaisinkäännöksen avulla (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) käyttämällä espanjalaisia lauseita synteettisten Bribri-lauseiden luomiseen. Tämä parantaa pistemäärää keskimäärin 1,0 BLEU, mutta vain silloin, kun uudet espanjankieliset lauseet kuuluvat samaan verkkotunnukseen kuin muut espanjankieliset esimerkit. Tämä edistää Chibchanin NLP:tä koskevaa pientä mutta kasvavaa tutkimuskokonaisuutta.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un model de traducció neural de màquines i un conjunt de dades per a la llengua de Chibchan Bribri, amb un rendiment mitjà de BLEU 16,91,7. Això va ser entrenat en un conjunt de dades extremadament petit (5923 parelles Bribri-espanyols), proporcionant proves de l'aplicabilitat del NMT en entorns extremadament baixos de recursos. Discutem els reptes que impliquen la gestió de les entrades de formació de llengües sense ortografia standard, provem d'aprenentatge exitós de la gramàtica Bribri, i també examinem les traduccions d'estructures que són poc freqüents en les principals llengües indoeuropees, com els verbs positius, els marcadors ergàtics, els classificadors numberàtics i els complexos sistemes demostratius. A més d'això, fem un experiment d'augmentar el conjunt de dades a través de traducció repetitiva (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) utilitzant frases espanyoles per crear frases sintètiques Bribri. Això millora la puntuació en mitjana de 1,0 BLEU, però només quan les frases espanyoles pertanyen al mateix domini que els altres exemples espanyols. Això contribueix al petit i creixent cos de recerca sobre Chibchan NLP.", 'ha': "This paper presents a neural machine translation model and dataset for the Chibchan language Bribri, with an average performance of BLEU 16.91.7.  Wannan aka sanar da shi kan wani littãfi mai ƙaranci (5923 bribri-spanish-par), wanda ya bãyar da dalili ga amfani da NMT cikin muhalli mai ƙaranci. Munã jãyayya masu muramman da ke cikin managi tsarin da aka shigar da shi daga harshen, ba da shiryoyin ayuka na daidaita, Munã bãyar da shaidar masu cin nasara wa karatun grammar bribribri, kuma Mu sami fassarar masu fassarar masu amfani da fassarar masu cikin lugha masu ƙaranci na Indo-Ewropa, kamar misãlan verbs, alarar masu haske, fasalarari masu yawa da kuma masu haɗa na'urar masu nuna. Ga wannan, za mu yi jarrabi ko ƙaranci da tsarin bayani na iterative-translation (cennrich et al., 2016; Hoanget et al., 2018) zuwa a yi amfani da cire-spanish dõmin ya ƙãga birikin sunthetic bribribri. Wannan yana ƙarami nau'in da aka tsakanin 1,0 BLEU, amma idan cewa saurin Isbanish na haɗi da shi guda kamar misãlai na zaman Isbaniya. Wannan yana ƙarami zuwa ƙarami kuma ta ƙara wani aikin research na Shibjan NLP.", 'jv': 'Ngetongke kuwi nggawe model itoleh karo sistem Neral karo dataset kanggo langgambar Cibhan, karo perusahaan kanggo kalagayaan sisara CLUE 16.9.7 Punika andhados akeh gunakake punika dataset (barut-barut) Awak dhéwé nggawe perintah sing berarti kanggo nyengkap mulai ing nggawe sapa urip sing nggawe winih dhéwé kuwi padha ortoggraphi, kéné nyimpen nggawe barang nggawe barang nggambar terakhir, lan akeh nyongkap kanggo nyengkap tarjamahan kanggo didasakno parang dumadhi sak ning limun sing dibutungan maneh dumadhi winih-Yusuf, kaya ngono kuwi tindakan Where Nambah ngono iki, awak dhéwé iso nggawe ujian sing berarti dadi nggawe dataset kebutuhan mulai terjamahan (Sennèh et al, 2011-06; Hoang et al, 2008) supoyo kapan langgar ujian kanggo nyengkuyung kesempatan winih nggo nyengkuyung Punika barêng-barêng sing paling nggambar 1.0 B Ngomongke bener kanggo sampeyan cilik rasané sak ngelasakno ning NLP Chebhan', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja in nabor podatkov za čibchanski jezik Bribri s povprečno zmogljivostjo BLEU 16.91.7. To je bilo usposobljeno na izjemno majhnem naboru podatkov (5923 bribri-španskih parov), kar je dokazalo uporabnost NMT v okoljih z izjemno nizkimi viri. Razpravljamo o izzivih, ki jih prinaša upravljanje prispevkov usposabljanja iz jezikov brez standardne ortografije, zagotavljamo dokaze o uspešnem učenju bribrijske slovnice in prevajanje struktur, ki so redke v večjih indoevropskih jezikih, kot so pozicijski glagoli, ergativni markerji, numerični klasifikatorji in kompleksni demonstrativni sistemi. Poleg tega izvajamo eksperiment povečanja nabora podatkov z iterativnim prevajanjem nazaj (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) z uporabo španskih stavkov za ustvarjanje sintetičnih Bribrijevih stavkov. To izboljša rezultat za povprečje 1,0 BLEU, vendar le, če novi španski stavki spadajo v isto domeno kot drugi španski primeri. To prispeva k majhnemu, vendar rastočemu obsegu raziskav o NLP Chibchan.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མ་དངུལ་འཁོར་གྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གཞུང་གི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བཤད་ཡོད། བློན་ཚུལ་ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཆུང་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆུང་ཀུ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་ཅིན་ཡོད། We discuss the challenges entailed in managing training input from languages without standard orthographies, we provide evidence of successful learning of Bribri grammar, and also examine the translations of structures that are infrequent in major Indo-European languages, such as positional verbs, ergative markers, numerical classifiers and complex demonstrative systems. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེལ་ཚིག This improves the score by an average of 1.0 BLEU, but only when the new Spanish sentences belong to the same domain as the other Spanish examples. འདིས་Chibchan NLP ནང་གི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་མི་དང་མཐོ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཡན་སྐྱེད་ཡོད།', 'he': "העיתון הזה מציג מודל תרגום מכונת עצבית וסט נתונים לשפה צ'יבצ'אן בריברי, עם ביצוע ממוצע של BLEU 16.91.7. This was trained on an extremely small dataset (5923 Bribri-Spanish pairs), providing evidence for the applicability of NMT in extremely low-resource environments.  We discuss the challenges entailed in managing training input from languages without standard orthographies, we provide evidence of successful learning of Bribri grammar, and also examine the translations of structures that are infrequent in major Indo-European languages, such as positional verbs, ergative markers, numerical classifiers and complex demonstrative systems.  בנוסף לזה, אנחנו מבצעים ניסוי לגדל את קבוצת הנתונים דרך התרגום חזרה איטרטיבי (Sennrich et al., 2016a; Hoang et al., 2018) על ידי השימוש במשפטים ספרדיים ליצור משפטים בריברי סינטטיים. This improves the score by an average of 1.0 BLEU, but only when the new Spanish sentences belong to the same domain as the other Spanish examples.  זה תורם לגוף המחקר הקטן אבל גדול על צ'יבצ'ן NLP."}
{'en': 'Dynamic Curriculum Learning for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'منهج تعليمي ديناميكي للترجمة الآلية العصبية منخفضة الموارد', 'es': 'Aprendizaje curricular dinámico para traducción automática neuronal de bajos recursos', 'fr': 'Apprentissage dynamique pour la traduction automatique neuronale à faibles ressources', 'ja': '低資源神経機械翻訳のための動的カリキュラム学習', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de currículo dinâmico para tradução automática neural de poucos recursos', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए गतिशील पाठ्यक्रम सीखना', 'zh': '低资源神经机器翻译之动容课程', 'ru': 'Динамическое обучение по учебной программе для низкоресурсного нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Dinimiciúla Curaclam le haghaidh Aistriúchán Inneall Néar-Acmhainne Íseal', 'hu': 'Dinamikus tanterv tanulás alacsony erőforrású neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δυναμική Μάθηση Εκπαιδευτικών Σπουδών για Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση Χαμηλών Πόρων', 'it': 'Apprendimento dinamico del curriculum per la traduzione automatica neurale a basso contenuto di risorse', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс невралдық машинаны аудару үшін динамикалық бағдарлама оқытуы', 'lt': 'Dynamic Curriculum Learning for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Currikulum Dinamik untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Sumber Terrendah', 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡിനാമിക് പഠിപ്പി', 'mn': 'Бага боловсролын мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн хөтөлбөр суралцах', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Kurrikulu Dinamiku għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali b’Riżorsi Bażi', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Dynamiczne uczenie się programów nauczania dla niskich zasobów neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Învățarea dinamică a curriculumului pentru traducerea automată neurală cu resurse reduse', 'sr': 'Динамична учебна программа за превод невралног машина нискоресурса', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Waxbarashada koorsool for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'sv': 'Dynamiskt läroplan lärande för lågresursneural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'نیچے رسورس نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے دینامیک کریکلام', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Học hành động động cho máy thần kinh thấp', 'bg': 'Динамично обучение на учебната програма за нискоресурсен неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Dynamisch Curriculum Leren voor Neural Machine Translation met weinig hulpbronnen', 'da': 'Dynamic Curriculum Learning for Low Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'hr': 'Dinamičko učenje nastavnog programa za prevod neuroloških strojeva s niskim resursima', 'ko': '저자원 신경기계 번역을 위한 동적 과정 학습', 'de': 'Dynamisches Curriculum Learning für ressourcenarme neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Dynamic Curriculum Learning for Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'fa': 'آموزش آموزشی دینامیک برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی کم منبع', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Kilimo cha Kidynami', 'tr': 'Ýabjek Taýik Ressurat Nural Mazmunlar terjimesi üçin dinamik Maglumat Öwrenmesi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Mësimi dinamik i mësimit për përkthimin e makinës nervore me burime të ulta', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'az': 'Düşük ressurs nöral mašin tərcüməsi üçün dinamik öyrənmək', 'bn': 'নিম্ন- সম্পদ নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ডাইনামিক কার্কিউলাম', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման դինամիկ ուսումնասիրությունը', 'ca': 'Aprendiment dinàmic de currículum per traducció de màquines neuronals de baix recursos', 'cs': 'Dynamické učební vzdělávání pro nervový strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji', 'bs': 'Dinamičko učenje nastavnog programa za prevod neuroloških strojeva s niskim resursima', 'et': 'Dünaamiline õppekava õppimine madala ressursiga neuroalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Dynamic Curriculum Learning for Low Resource Neural Machine Translation', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Dinamično učenje učnega načrta za strojno prevajanje nevronov z nizkimi viri', 'he': 'לימוד שיעור דינמי לתרגום מכונת נוירות עם משאבים נמוכים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་'}
{'en': 'Large amounts of data has made neural machine translation (NMT) a big success in recent years. But it is still a challenge if we train these models on small-scale corpora. In this case, the way of using data appears to be more important. Here, we investigate the effective use of training data for low-resource NMT. In particular, we propose a dynamic curriculum learning (DCL) method to reorder training samples in training. Unlike previous work, we do not use a static scoring function for reordering. Instead, the order of training samples is dynamically determined in two ways-loss decline and model competence. This eases training by highlighting easy samples that the current model has enough competence to learn. We test our DCL method in a Transformer-based system. Experimental results show that DCL outperforms several strong baselines on three low-resource machine translation benchmarks and different sized data of WMT’16 En-De.', 'ar': "جعلت كميات كبيرة من البيانات الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) نجاحًا كبيرًا في السنوات الأخيرة. ولكن لا يزال من الصعب أن ندرب هذه النماذج على الشركات الصغيرة. في هذه الحالة ، يبدو أن طريقة استخدام البيانات أكثر أهمية. هنا ، نحقق في الاستخدام الفعال لبيانات التدريب لـ NMT منخفضة الموارد. على وجه الخصوص ، نقترح طريقة ديناميكية لتعلم المناهج الدراسية (DCL) لإعادة ترتيب عينات التدريب في التدريب. على عكس العمل السابق ، لا نستخدم وظيفة تسجيل النقاط الثابتة لإعادة الترتيب. بدلاً من ذلك ، يتم تحديد ترتيب عينات التدريب ديناميكيًا بطريقتين - انخفاض الخسارة وكفاءة النموذج. هذا يسهل التدريب عن طريق تسليط الضوء على العينات السهلة التي يتمتع النموذج الحالي بالكفاءة الكافية للتعلم. نقوم باختبار طريقة DCL الخاصة بنا في نظام قائم على المحولات. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن DCL يتفوق في الأداء على العديد من خطوط الأساس القوية على ثلاثة معايير للترجمة الآلية منخفضة الموارد وبيانات مختلفة الحجم لـ WMT'16 En-De.", 'pt': "Grandes quantidades de dados tornaram a tradução de máquina neural (NMT) um grande sucesso nos últimos anos. Mas ainda é um desafio treinar esses modelos em corpora de pequena escala. Neste caso, a forma de utilização dos dados parece ser mais importante. Aqui, investigamos o uso eficaz de dados de treinamento para NMT de poucos recursos. Em particular, propomos um método de aprendizagem curricular dinâmica (DCL) para reordenar amostras de treinamento em treinamento. Ao contrário do trabalho anterior, não usamos uma função de pontuação estática para reordenar. Em vez disso, a ordem das amostras de treinamento é determinada dinamicamente de duas maneiras - declínio da perda e competência do modelo. Isso facilita o treinamento, destacando exemplos fáceis que o modelo atual tem competência suficiente para aprender. Testamos nosso método DCL em um sistema baseado em Transformer. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o DCL supera várias linhas de base fortes em três benchmarks de tradução automática de poucos recursos e dados de tamanhos diferentes do WMT'16 En-De.", 'fr': "De grandes quantités de données ont fait de la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) un grand succès ces dernières années. Mais cela reste un défi si nous formons ces modèles sur des corpus à petite échelle. Dans ce cas, la manière d'utiliser les données semble être plus importante. Nous étudions ici l'utilisation efficace des données d'entraînement pour les NMT à faibles ressources. En particulier, nous proposons une méthode d'apprentissage dynamique du curriculum (DCL) pour réorganiser les échantillons de formation dans la formation. Contrairement aux travaux précédents, nous n'utilisons pas de fonction de notation statique pour la réorganisation. Au lieu de cela, l'ordre des échantillons d'entraînement est déterminé dynamiquement de deux manières\xa0: la diminution des pertes et la compétence du modèle. Cela facilite la formation en mettant en évidence des exemples faciles que le modèle actuel possède suffisamment de compétences pour apprendre. Nous testons notre méthode DCL dans un système basé sur un transformateur. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que DCL surpasse plusieurs niveaux de référence solides sur trois benchmarks de traduction automatique à faibles ressources et des données de taille différente de WMT'16 En-De.", 'es': "Las grandes cantidades de datos han hecho que la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) sea un gran éxito en los últimos años. Pero sigue siendo un desafío si entrenamos a estos modelos en corpus a pequeña escala. En este caso, la forma de utilizar los datos parece ser más importante. Aquí, investigamos el uso efectivo de los datos de entrenamiento para la NMT de bajos recursos. En particular, proponemos un método de aprendizaje curricular dinámico (DCL) para reordenar las muestras de capacitación en la capacitación. A diferencia de trabajos anteriores, no utilizamos una función de puntuación estática para reordenar. En cambio, el orden de las muestras de entrenamiento se determina dinámicamente de dos maneras: disminución de la pérdida y competencia del modelo. Esto facilita la capacitación al destacar ejemplos fáciles que el modelo actual tiene la competencia suficiente para aprender. Probamos nuestro método DCL en un sistema basado en Transformer. Los resultados experimentales muestran que DCL supera varias líneas de base sólidas en tres puntos de referencia de traducción automática de bajos recursos y datos de diferentes tamaños de WMT'16 En-De.", 'ja': "近年、大量のデータがニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）を大成功に導いている。しかし、これらのモデルを小規模なコーパスでトレーニングする場合、それは依然として課題です。この場合、データの使用方法がより重要であるように見えます。ここでは，低資源NMTに対するトレーニングデータの有効利用について検討する．特に、トレーニングにおけるトレーニングサンプルを並べ替えるための動的カリキュラム学習（ DCL ）方法を提案する。前作とは異なり、リオーダーには静的なスコアリング機能は使用していません。代わりに、トレーニングサンプルの順序は、損失低下とモデルコンピテンシーの2つの方法で動的に決定されます。これにより、現在のモデルが学習するのに十分な能力を持っているという簡単なサンプルを強調することで、トレーニングが容易になります。私たちは、変圧器ベースのシステムでDCL法をテストします。実験結果は、DCLが3つの低リソースの機械翻訳ベンチマークとWMT '16 En - Deの異なるサイズのデータでいくつかの強力なベースラインを上回ることを示しています。", 'zh': '近年以来,大数使神经机器翻译(NMT)取巨大成功。 然小制语料库上习之,犹一挑战也。 于是用数似重。 于是考练数低资源NMT之效也。 特出一般动态课程(DCL)以重排序训练样本。 与前事不同,不用静评分函数序。 反是,教样本之序以两定 - 损降损下。 此所以见时之足以学示例简也。 试我DCL法于变压器统中。 实验结果表明,DCL于WMT16 En-De三低资源机器翻译准与大小之数优于数强基线。', 'hi': "बड़ी मात्रा में डेटा ने हाल के वर्षों में न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) को एक बड़ी सफलता बना दिया है। लेकिन यह अभी भी एक चुनौती है अगर हम इन मॉडलों को छोटे पैमाने पर कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। इस मामले में, डेटा का उपयोग करने का तरीका अधिक महत्वपूर्ण प्रतीत होता है। यहां, हम कम संसाधन एनएमटी के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा के प्रभावी उपयोग की जांच करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम प्रशिक्षण में प्रशिक्षण नमूनों को फिर से क्रमबद्ध करने के लिए एक गतिशील पाठ्यक्रम सीखने (डीसीएल) विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पिछले काम के विपरीत, हम पुन: क्रमबद्ध करने के लिए एक स्थिर स्कोरिंग फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग नहीं करते हैं। इसके बजाय, प्रशिक्षण नमूनों का क्रम गतिशील रूप से दो तरीकों से निर्धारित किया जाता है - हानि में गिरावट और मॉडल क्षमता। यह आसान नमूनों को उजागर करके प्रशिक्षण को आसान बनाता है कि वर्तमान मॉडल में सीखने के लिए पर्याप्त क्षमता है। हम एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित प्रणाली में हमारी डीसीएल विधि का परीक्षण करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि डीसीएल तीन कम संसाधन मशीन अनुवाद बेंचमार्क और WMT'16 एन-डी के विभिन्न आकार के डेटा पर कई मजबूत आधार रेखाओं को मात देता है।", 'ru': "Большие объемы данных сделали нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) большим успехом в последние годы. Но это все равно вызов, если мы обучаем эти модели на малых корпусах. В этом случае более важным представляется способ использования данных. Здесь мы исследуем эффективное использование обучающих данных для малоресурсных НБ. В частности, мы предлагаем метод динамического обучения по учебной программе (DCL) для изменения порядка обучающих выборок в обучении. В отличие от предыдущей работы, мы не используем статическую функцию подсчета баллов для переупорядочения. Вместо этого динамически определяется порядок обучающих выборок двумя способами - снижение потерь и модельная компетенция. Это облегчает обучение, выделяя простые примеры, которые текущая модель обладает достаточной компетенцией для изучения. Мы тестируем наш метод DCL в системе на основе трансформатора. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что DCL превосходит несколько сильных базовых линий по трем контрольным параметрам машинного перевода с низким ресурсом и различным данным размера WMT'16 En-De.", 'ga': "D'éirigh go hiontach le haistriúchán meaisín néaraíoch (NMT) le blianta beaga anuas le méideanna móra sonraí. Ach is dúshlán fós é má chuirimid oiliúint ar na múnlaí seo ar chorparáidí ar mhionscála. Sa chás seo, is cosúil go bhfuil an bealach chun sonraí a úsáid níos tábhachtaí. Anseo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar úsáid éifeachtach sonraí oiliúna le haghaidh NMT ar acmhainní ísle. Go háirithe, molaimid modh foghlama curaclaim dinimiciúil (DCL) chun samplaí oiliúna san oiliúint a athordú. Murab ionann agus obair roimhe seo, ní úsáidimid feidhm scórála statach le haghaidh athordú. Ina áit sin, déantar ord na samplaí oiliúna a chinneadh go dinimiciúil ar dhá bhealach - meath caillteanais agus inniúlacht múnla. Éascaíonn sé seo oiliúint trí aibhsiú a dhéanamh ar shamplaí éasca go bhfuil dóthain inniúlachta le foghlaim sa mhúnla reatha. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár modh DCL i gcóras atá bunaithe ar Trasfhoirmeoir. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn DCL roinnt bonnlínte láidre ar thrí thagarmharc aistrithe meaisín ar acmhainní ísle agus sonraí de mhéideanna éagsúla WMT'16 En-De.", 'ka': "ბოლო წლის შემდეგ დიდი მონაცემები ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილება (NMT) დიდი წარმატება. მაგრამ ეს უკვე განსაზღვრება თუ ჩვენ ამ მოდელების მარტივი მარტივი კოპორაზე გავისწავლოთ. ამ შემთხვევაში მონაცემების გამოყენება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. აქ, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ეფექტიური გამოყენება განსწავლების მონაცემებისთვის NMT-ს. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ მინდომ დინამიკური სწავლების (DCL) მეტი, რომელიც განაკეთებული სწავლების მონაცემების განაკეთება. პირველი სამუშაო განსხვავებაში, ჩვენ არ გამოყენებთ სტატიკური სკორინგის ფუნქცია განსხვავებლად. მაშინ, სწავლის მონაცემების წევრი დინამიკურად განსაზღვრებულია ორი გზით - დასრულება და მოდელური კომპენტირება. ეს უფრო მარტივია სწავლას მარტივი გამოსახულებით, რომლებიც მიმდინარე მოდელის მარტივი კონპექტენტი აქვს. ჩვენ ჩვენი DCL მეთოდის ტესტირებით ტრანფორმეტრის ბაზეული სისტემაში. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ DCL უფრო ძალიან ძალიან ფესტური ხაზები სამი მაქსინური გადაწყვეტილება და განსხვავებული მონაცემები WMT'16 En-De-ზე.", 'el': "Μεγάλες ποσότητες δεδομένων έχουν κάνει τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) μια μεγάλη επιτυχία τα τελευταία χρόνια. Αλλά εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση αν εκπαιδεύσουμε αυτά τα μοντέλα σε μικρά σώματα. Σε αυτή την περίπτωση, ο τρόπος χρήσης των δεδομένων φαίνεται να είναι πιο σημαντικός. Εδώ, διερευνούμε την αποτελεσματική χρήση των δεδομένων κατάρτισης για NMT χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Ειδικότερα, προτείνουμε μια δυναμική μέθοδο εκμάθησης προγραμμάτων σπουδών (για την αναδιοργάνωση των δειγμάτων κατάρτισης στην εκπαίδευση. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες εργασίες, δεν χρησιμοποιούμε μια στατική λειτουργία βαθμολογίας για την αναδιατάσταση. Αντίθετα, η σειρά των δειγμάτων κατάρτισης καθορίζεται δυναμικά με δύο τρόπους: μείωση της απώλειας και ικανότητα μοντέλου. Αυτό διευκολύνει την εκπαίδευση επισημαίνοντας εύκολα δείγματα που το τρέχον μοντέλο έχει αρκετή ικανότητα για να μάθει. Δοκιμάζουμε τη μέθοδο μας σε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στον μετασχηματιστή. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το DCL ξεπερνά αρκετές ισχυρές βάσεις βάσης σε τρία σημεία αναφοράς μηχανικής μετάφρασης χαμηλού κόστους και δεδομένα διαφορετικού μεγέθους του WMT'16 En-De.", 'hu': "A nagy mennyiségű adat az elmúlt években nagy sikert hozott az idegi gépi fordítás (NMT). De még mindig kihívás, ha ezeket a modelleket kisméretű corporákra képezzük. Ebben az esetben az adatok felhasználásának módja fontosabbnak tűnik. Itt vizsgáljuk a képzési adatok hatékony felhasználását alacsony erőforrású NMT esetén. Különösen egy dinamikus tantervtanulási (DCL) módszert javasolunk a képzési minták átrendezésére a képzés során. A korábbi munkákkal ellentétben nem használunk statikus pontozási funkciót az átrendezéshez. Ehelyett a képzési minták sorrendjét dinamikusan kétféleképpen határozzák meg: veszteségcsökkenés és modellkompetencia. Ez megkönnyíti a képzést azáltal, hogy kiemeli azokat a könnyű mintákat, amelyeket a jelenlegi modell elegendő kompetenciával rendelkezik ahhoz, hogy megtanuljon. DCL módszerünket transzformátor alapú rendszerben teszteljük. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a DCL három alacsony erőforrással rendelkező gépi fordítási referenciaértéket és a WMT'16 En-De különböző méretű adatait felülmúlja számos erős alapvető értéket.", 'it': "Grandi quantità di dati hanno reso la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) un grande successo negli ultimi anni. Ma è ancora una sfida addestrare questi modelli su corpora su piccola scala. In questo caso, il modo di utilizzare i dati sembra essere più importante. Qui, esaminiamo l'uso efficace dei dati di formazione per NMT a basso contenuto di risorse. In particolare, proponiamo un metodo di apprendimento dinamico del curriculum (DCL) per riordinare i campioni di formazione nella formazione. A differenza dei lavori precedenti, non utilizziamo una funzione di punteggio statico per il riordino. Invece, l'ordine dei campioni di formazione è determinato dinamicamente in due modi: calo della perdita e competenza del modello. Questo facilita la formazione evidenziando esempi facili che il modello attuale ha abbastanza competenza per imparare. Testiamo il nostro metodo DCL in un sistema basato su Transformer. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che DCL supera diverse linee di base forti su tre benchmark di traduzione automatica a basso contenuto di risorse e dati di dimensioni diverse di WMT'16 En-De.", 'kk': "Жаңа жылдарда үлкен деректер невралдық машинаның аудармасын (NMT) жасады. Бірақ бұл үлгілерді кішкентай корпораға оқыту мүмкін емес. Мұнда деректерді қолдану әдісі көп маңызды сияқты. Мұнда, NMT бағасы ресурстар үшін оқыту деректерінің эффективті пайдалануын зерттеуде. Әрине біз оқыту үшін динамикалық бағдарламаларды оқыту (DCL) әдісін таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы жұмыс сияқты, қайта реттеу үшін static scoring функциясын пайдалануға болмайды. Осының орнына, оқыту үлгілерінің реті динамикалық түрде екі түрде анықталады - жоғалу мен үлгілерінің көмектесуі. Бұл қазіргі үлгісінде оңай үлгілерді бояулау үшін оқытуға жеткілікті көмектесу арқылы оқытуды көмектеседі. Біз DCL әдісімізді түрлендіруші жүйесінде тексереміз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері DCL үш ресурс төменгі компьютердің аудармалары мен WMT' 16 En- De- дегі әртүрлі өлшемі деректерінің бірнеше күшті негізгі сызықтарын жасайды.", 'lt': "Didelis duomenų kiekis pastaraisiais metais sukėlė didelę sėkmę nervinių mašin ų vertimui (NMT). Bet vis dar yra iššūkis, jei mes mokysime šiuos modelius mažo masto korporais. Šiuo atveju, atrodo, kad duomenų naudojimo būdas yra svarbesnis. Čia mes tiriame veiksmingą mokymo duomenų, skirtų mažai išteklių naudojantiems NMT, naudojimą. Visų pirma siūlome dinamišką mokymosi programų (DCL) metodą mokymo mėginiams pertvarkyti mokymo metu. Priešingai nei ankstesnis darbas, mes nenaudojame statinio vertinimo funkcijos pertvarkymui. Vietoj to mokymo mėginių tvarka dinamiškai nustatoma dviem būdais: nuostolių sumažėjimas ir modelio kompetencija. Tai palengvina mokymą, pabrėžiant paprastus mėginius, kuriuos dabartinis modelis turi pakankamai kompetencijos mokytis. Mūsų DCL metodą bandome transformatoriumi pagrįstoje sistemoje. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad DCL viršija kelis tvirtus bazinius rodiklius, grindžiamus trimis mažai išteklių turinčiais mašinų vertimo vertimo kriterijais ir skirtingais dydžiais WMT'16 En-De duomenimis.", 'mk': "Големи количини на податоци направија невропски машински превод (НМТ) голем успех во последните години. Но сепак е предизвик ако ги тренираме моделиве на мало ниво. Во овој случај, начинот на користење на податоците се чини дека е поважен. Овде, ја истражуваме ефикасната употреба на податоци за обука за НМТ со ниски ресурси. Посебно, предложуваме динамично учење на училиштата (ДКЛ) метод за реорганизација на примероците за обука во обуката. За разлика од претходната работа, не користиме статичка оценка функција за реорганизација. Наместо тоа, редот на примероците за обука е динамично одреден на два начини - намалување на загубата и моделна компетентност. Ова го олеснува обуката со истакнување на лесните примероци кои моменталниот модел има доволно надлежност за учење. Го тестираме нашиот ДКЛ метод во трансформски систем. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека ДКЛ надминува неколку силни основни линии на три ресурси за машински превод со ниски ресурси и различни податоци од WMT'16 En-De.", 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയത്. പക്ഷെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകളെ ചെറിയ സ്കാള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോറിയില്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഇത് ഇപ്പോഴും  ഈ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d, ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വഴി വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്ന് തോന്നുന്നു. ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനെ  In particular, we propose a dynamic curriculum learning (DCL) method to reorder training samples in training.  മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി വ്യത്യസ്തമായിട്ടുള്ള ഒരു സ്റ്റാറ്റിക് സ്കോര്\u200dങ്ങ് ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടും ഓര്\u200dഡ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുപകരം, ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ക്രമീകരണം രണ്ട് വഴികളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ന നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലിന് പഠിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള അധികാരം ലളിതമായി പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഇത് എളുപ്പമാക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഡിസിഎല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഡിസിഎല്\u200d മൂന്ന് കുറച്ച് ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. മൂന്', 'ms': "Jumlah besar data telah membuat terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) sukses dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Tetapi ia masih satu cabaran jika kita melatih model ini pada skala kecil corpora. Dalam kes ini, cara menggunakan data nampaknya lebih penting. Di sini, kami menyelidiki penggunaan efektif data latihan untuk NMT sumber rendah. Secara khususnya, kami cadangkan kaedah pembelajaran kurikulum dinamik (DCL) untuk mengatur semula sampel latihan dalam latihan. Tidak seperti kerja sebelumnya, kita tidak menggunakan fungsi skor statik untuk mengubah urutan. Sebaliknya, tertib sampel latihan ditentukan secara dinamik dalam dua cara - kehilangan penurunan dan kemampuan model. Ini memudahkan latihan dengan menyatakan sampel mudah yang model semasa mempunyai kemampuan yang cukup untuk belajar. Kami menguji kaedah DCL kami dalam sistem berasaskan Transformer. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa DCL melampaui beberapa garis dasar yang kuat pada tiga tanda referensi terjemahan mesin sumber rendah dan data saiz berbeza WMT'16 En-De.", 'mn': "Өнгөрсөн жилүүдэд маш олон мэдээллийг мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) болгон амжилттай болгодог. Гэхдээ бид жижиг хэмжээний корпора дээр эдгээр загваруудыг суралцах нь ч хэцүү. Энэ тохиолдолд өгөгдлийн хэрэглээ илүү чухал харагдаж байна. Энд бид NMT бага баялаг боловсролын суралцах өгөгдлийн үр дүнтэй хэрэглээ судалж байна. Ялангуяа бид сургалтын дасгал хөдөлгөөн хөтөлбөрийн суралцах (DCL) арга замыг дахин зохион байгуулах боломжтой. Өмнөх ажлын ялгаатай, бид дахин зохицуулахын тулд static scoring функцийг ашиглахгүй. Үүний оронд, дасгал хөдөлгөөн зураг нь хоёр аргаар шалгаж байдаг - алдагдал болон загварын өргөн чадвар. Энэ нь одоогийн загварын суралцах хангалттай чадвар байгаа амархан жишээг тодорхойлж суралцах боломжтой. Бид ДКЛ аргыг Трансфер-суурилсан системд шалгана. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд ДКЛ нь WMT'16 En-De-ын өөр хэмжээний өгөгдлийг 3 бага боломжтой машины хөрөнгө оруулалт дээр олон хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргадаг.", 'mt': 'Ammonti kbar ta’ dejta għamlu t-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) suċċess kbir f’dawn l-a ħħar snin. Iżda għadha sfida jekk inħarrġu dawn il-mudelli fuq korpra fuq skala żgħira. F’dan il-każ, il-mod kif tintuża d-dejta jidher li huwa aktar importanti. Hawnhekk, ninvestigaw l-użu effettiv tad-dejta tat-taħriġ għal NMT b’riżorsi baxxi. B’mod partikolari, qed nipproponu metodu dinamiku ta’ tagħlim kurrikulari (DCL) biex jiġu organizzati mill-ġdid kampjuni ta’ taħriġ fit-taħriġ. Unlike previous work, we do not use a static scoring function for reordering.  Minflok, l-ordni tal-kampjuni ta’ taħriġ hija ddeterminata b’mod dinamiku f’żewġ modi - tnaqqis fit-telf u kompetenza mudell. Dan jiffaċilita t-taħriġ billi jenfasizza kampjuni faċli li l-mudell attwali għandu biżżejjed kompetenza biex jitgħallem. Aħna ntestjaw il-metodu DCL tagħna f’sistema bbażata fuq it-Transformer. Riżultati esperimentali juru li d-DCL jaqbeż diversi linji bażi b’saħħithom fuq tliet punti ta’ riferiment għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni b’riżorsi baxxi u dejta ta’ daqs differenti tad-WMT’16 En-De.', 'pl': "Duże ilości danych sprawiły, że neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) stało się w ostatnich latach dużym sukcesem. Ale nadal będzie to wyzwanie, jeśli trenujemy te modele na małych korporach. W tym przypadku ważniejszy wydaje się być sposób wykorzystania danych. W tym miejscu badamy efektywne wykorzystanie danych szkoleniowych dla niskich zasobów NMT. W szczególności proponujemy metodę dynamicznego uczenia się (DCL) w celu zmiany porządku próbek szkoleń w szkoleniach. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac nie używamy statycznej funkcji punktowania do zmiany kolejności. Zamiast tego kolejność próbek szkoleniowych jest dynamicznie określana na dwa sposoby: spadek strat i kompetencje modelowe. Ułatwia to szkolenie poprzez podkreślenie łatwych próbek, że obecny model ma wystarczająco dużo kompetencji, aby się nauczyć. Testujemy naszą metodę DCL w systemie opartym na Transformerze. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że DCL przewyższa kilka silnych linii bazowych w oparciu o trzy niskie zasoby referencyjne tłumaczenia maszynowego i dane o różnej wielkości WMT'16 En-De.", 'no': 'Stor mange data har gjort neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) ein stor suksess i siste år. Men det er fortsatt eit utfordring om vi treng desse modelane på lite korpora. I dette tilfellet ser ut til at måten å bruka data er viktigere. Her undersøker vi effektivt bruk av treningsdata for låg ressursar NMT. I særskilt foreslår vi ein dynamisk læring av curriculum (DCL) metode for å rekordere opplæringsprøver på nytt i opplæring. I motsetning til førre arbeid bruker vi ikkje ein statisk skoring- funksjon for å rekordera på nytt. I staden er rekkefølgja på øvingsprøver dynamisk bestemt på to måtar – tap av nedgang og modellekompetansen. Dette lettar opplæringa ved å markere enkle prøver som det gjeldande modellet har nok kompetanse til å lære. Vi testar DCL-metoden vårt i eit transformeringssystem. Eksperimentale resultat viser at DCL utfører fleire sterke baselinjer på tre omsetjingsbankar for lavressursmaskinen og ulike storleik på WMT- 16 En- De.', 'ro': "Cantitățile mari de date au făcut ca traducerea automată neurală (NMT) să fie un mare succes în ultimii ani. Dar este încă o provocare dacă antrenăm aceste modele pe corporații la scară mică. În acest caz, modul de utilizare a datelor pare a fi mai important. Aici, investigăm utilizarea eficientă a datelor de instruire pentru NMT cu resurse reduse. În special, propunem o metodă dinamică de învățare curriculară (DCL) pentru a reordona eșantioanele de formare în cadrul formării. Spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare, nu folosim o funcție de scoring static pentru reordonare. În schimb, ordinea eșantioanelor de formare este determinată dinamic în două moduri - scăderea pierderilor și competența modelului. Acest lucru ușurează formarea prin evidențierea probelor ușoare pe care modelul actual are suficientă competență pentru a le învăța. Testăm metoda DCL într-un sistem bazat pe Transformer. Rezultatele experimentale arată că DCL depășește mai multe linii de bază puternice pe trei repere de traducere automată cu resurse reduse și date de dimensiuni diferite ale WMT'16 En-De.", 'sr': "Velika količin a podataka je u poslednjih godina prevodila neuralnu mašinu (NMT) veliki uspeh. Ali još uvek je izazov ako treniramo ove modele na malom korporaciji. U ovom slučaju, način korištenja podataka izgleda važniji. Ovdje istražujemo efikasnu upotrebu podataka o obuci za manje resurse NMT. Posebno predlažemo dinamičnu metodu učenja nastavnih programa (DCL) kako bi reordinirali uzorke obuke u obuci. Za razliku od prethodnog posla, ne koristimo statičnu funkciju skoring za reorderiranje. Umesto toga, redak uzorka obuke je dinamički određen na dva načina - smanjenje gubitka i nadležnost modela. To olakšava obuku osvjetljavajući lako uzorke koje trenutni model ima dovoljno kompetencije da nauči. Testiramo našu metodu DCL u sistemu transformera. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da DCL iznosi nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija na tri nivoa prevođenja mašina s niskim resursima i različitih veličine podataka WMT'16 En-De.", 'si': 'ගිය අවුරුද්දු වල ලොකු දත්ත ගොඩක් තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) විශාල සාර්ථක ව ඒත් ඒක තවමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා අපි මේ මොඩේල් එක පුංචි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කොර්පෝරා වලින්. මේ විදියට, දත්ත භාවිතා කරන විදියට වඩා වැදගත් වෙනවා. මෙතන, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ NMT අඩු සම්පත්ත පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශේෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශේෂණය කරලා ඉගෙනගන්න හැකීමක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශේෂණය කරනවා. මුලින් වැඩ වගේම, අපි ආපහු වැඩ කරන්න ස්ථිර ස්කෝරින් වැඩක් භාවිත කරන්නේ නෑ. ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, පුහුණුම් නිර්මාණයේ නිර්මාණය දෙකක් විදිහට නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා - නැතිවීම සහ මදු මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉ අපි අපේ DCL විධානය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ත්\u200dරාණ්පර්ෂක පද්ධතියක්. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ DCL විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වඩා බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තුනක් පරි', 'so': "Qaar badan oo macluumaad ah ayaa ka dhigay tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada (NMT) liibaano weyn sanadkii ugu dambeeyey. Laakiin weli waa dhibaato haddii aynu ku tababarinno modelladan shirkadaha yar. Markaas sida loo isticmaalayo macluumaadku waxay u muuqataa inay muhiim u tahay. Halkan, waxaynu baaritaan isticmaalka waxbarashada oo faa’iidada ah ee ku saabsan noocyada hoose ee NMT. Si gaar ah, waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaabka waxbarashada dabiicadda ah (DCL) oo loo beddeliyo samooyinka waxbarashada lagu tababaro. Shaqo horay oo aan ka mid ahayn, uma isticmaalno shaqo jimicsiga oo isticmaalaya si loo beddelo. Isku xiriirta samooyinka waxbarashadu waxay si qalloocan ah ugu qeexan yihiin laba qaab - khasaaro iyo awoodda model. Waxbarashada waxaa fududeeyaa tusaalooyin fudud, in qaababka joogtada ah uu awood ku filan yahay in aad barato. Waxaynu ku imtixaannaa habka DCL ee ku qoran nidaamka hore. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in DCL uu soo saaraa maro badan oo xoog leh oo ku qoran saddex hoos-resource machine translation benchmarks iyo data kala duduwan oo WMT'16 En-De.", 'sv': "Stora mängder data har gjort neural machine translation (NMT) till en stor framgång de senaste åren. Men det är fortfarande en utmaning om vi tränar dessa modeller på småskaliga corpora. I detta fall verkar sättet att använda data vara viktigare. Här undersöker vi effektiv användning av träningsdata för lågresurs NMT. I synnerhet föreslår vi en dynamisk läroplan inlärningsmetod (DCL) för att ändra ordning på utbildningsprover i utbildningen. Till skillnad från tidigare arbeten använder vi inte en statisk poängfunktion för omordning. Istället bestäms ordningen på träningsprover dynamiskt på två sätt - förlustnedgång och modellkompetens. Detta underlättar utbildningen genom att lyfta fram enkla prover som den nuvarande modellen har tillräckligt med kompetens för att lära sig. Vi testar vår DCL-metod i ett Transformer-baserat system. Experimentella resultat visar att DCL överträffar flera starka baslinjer på tre referensvärden för maskinöversättning med låg resurs och data i olika storlekar för WMT'16 En-De.", 'ta': 'மிகப்பெரிய தரவுகள் புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் ஒரு பெரிய வெற்றி But it is still a challenge if we train these models on small-scale corpora.  இந்த நிகழ்ச்சியில், தரவை பயன்படுத்துவது மிகவும் முக்கியமாக தெரிகிறது. இங்கே நாம் குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கு பயிற்சி தரவை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும். குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் பயிற்சியில் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளை மீண்டும் வரிசைப்படுத்துவதற்கான ஒரு இயங்கும் தொழில்நுட் முந்தைய வேலையை வித்தியாசமாக, நாம் மீண்டும் வரிசைப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு static scoring செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத அதற்கு பதிலாக, பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளின் வரிசையில் இரண்டு வழிகளில் தீர்மானிக்கப்பட்டது - இழப்பு மற்றும் மாதிரியின இந்த பயிற்சியை எளிதான மாதிரிகளை முன்னிலைப்படுத்தி தற்போதைய மாதிரியில் போதுமான திறமையை கற்றுக நாங்கள் ஒரு மாற்று அடிப்படையான முறைமையில் எங்கள் DCL முறைமையை சோதிக்கிறோம். சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': "اگلے سالوں میں بہت سی ڈیٹا نے نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کو بڑی کامیابی بنایا ہے۔ لیکن یہ بھی ایک چال ہے اگر ہم ان نمونوں کو چھوٹے مقیاس کورپورا پر آموزش دیں۔ اس حالت میں، ڈیٹا کا استعمال کرنے کا طریقہ بہت اہم بنتا ہے۔ یہاں، ہم نے NMT کے لئے کم سرمایہ کے لئے اطلاعات کی آموزش کے مطابق مطابق استعمال کی تحقیق کی۔ مخصوصاً ہم ایک سینکی کاریکلوم کی تعلیم (DCL) طریقے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ تربیت میں تربیت نمونے کو دوبارہ تربیت کریں۔ پہلے کے کام کے مطابق، ہم ایک ایستی اسکورینگ فونسل کو دوبارہ ترکیب کے لئے استعمال نہیں کرتے۔ اس عوض، نمونوں کی تعلیم کی سفارش دو طریقے سے ڈینامی سے مقرر کی جاتی ہے - خسارہ کے ذریعہ اور نمونے کی تعلیم. یہ تعلیم آسان نمونے کو ہیلایت کرنے کے ذریعے آسانی نمونے کے ساتھ آسان کر دیتا ہے جو موجود نمونڈل کے لئے کافی تعلیم ہے۔ ہم اپنے DCL روش کو تغییر دینے والی سیسٹم میں امتحان کرتے ہیں۔ Experimental results show that DCL performs several strong baselines on three low-resource machine translation benchmarks and different sized data of WMT'16 En-De.", 'uz': "Yaqinda yil ichida katta maʼlumot tarjima qiladi. Lekin biz bu modellarni kichkina kompaniyada o'rganish uchun qismi bo'ladi. Bu yerda, maʼlumotni ishlatish usuli juda muhim deb o'xshaydi. Bu yerda, biz NMT'ning kichkina resource uchun ta'lim maʼlumotini foydalanish kerak. Shunday qilib, biz ta'lim sohasida o'rganish (DCL) usulini qaytadan o'rganish mumkin. Oldingi ishni oʻzgartirish uchun statik qiymatni ishlatimaymiz. Oxiri, taʼminlovchi misollarning tartibi oddiy narsa ikki usulda qo'yiladi - yoʻqolish va model qobiliyati yoʻqoladi. Name Biz Transformer-based tizimda DCL usulini sinash. Name", 'vi': 'Một lượng lớn dữ liệu đã biến dịch cỗ máy thần kinh thành một thành công lớn trong những năm gần đây. Nhưng nó vẫn là một thử thách nếu chúng ta đào tạo những mẫu này trên hạ sĩ nhỏ. Trong trường hợp này, cách sử dụng dữ liệu có vẻ quan trọng hơn. Ở đây, chúng tôi điều tra dữ liệu đào tạo cho công ty NMT ít tài nguyên. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp học hành động động (DCL) để sắp xếp lại các mẫu huấn luyện. Không giống như công việc trước, chúng tôi không dùng một hàm ghi tĩnh để sắp xếp lại. Thay vào đó, mệnh lệnh huấn luyện mẫu được quyết định theo hai cách "giảm mất mát và năng lực mô hình." Việc này giúp dễ đào tạo bằng cách nhấn mạnh các mẫu dễ dàng mà mẫu hiện thời có đủ năng lực để học. Chúng tôi kiểm tra phương pháp DCL trong một hệ thống biến hình. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy DCL đạt được nhiều nền tảng vững chắc trên ba con đường tiêu chuẩn dịch cỗ máy nhỏ với kích thước khác nhau của WRT\'16 En-De.', 'bg': "Големите количества данни направиха невронния машинен превод (НМТ) голям успех през последните години. Но все пак е предизвикателство, ако тренираме тези модели на малки корпуси. В този случай начинът на използване на данните изглежда по-важен. Тук изследваме ефективното използване на данни за обучение за нискоресурсни НМТ. По-конкретно, ние предлагаме метод за динамично учебно обучение (ДКЛ) за пренареждане на образци от обучение в обучението. За разлика от предишната работа, ние не използваме статична функция за оценка за пренареждане. Вместо това редът на пробите за обучение се определя динамично по два начина - намаляване на загубите и компетентност на модела. Това улеснява обучението, като подчертава лесните примери, които сегашният модел има достатъчно компетентност да научи. Ние тестваме нашия метод в трансформаторна система. Експерименталните резултати показват, че DCL надминава няколко силни базови линии на три сравнителни показатели за машинен превод с нисък ресурс и различни по размер данни на WMT'16 En-De.", 'nl': "Grote hoeveelheden data hebben de afgelopen jaren van neural machine translation (NMT) een groot succes gemaakt. Maar het is nog steeds een uitdaging als we deze modellen trainen op kleinschalige corpora. In dit geval lijkt de manier waarop gegevens worden gebruikt belangrijker. Hier onderzoeken we het effectieve gebruik van trainingsdata voor low-resource NMT. Met name stellen we een dynamische curriculum learning (DCL) methode voor om trainingsvoorbeelden in training opnieuw te ordenen. In tegenstelling tot vorig werk gebruiken we geen statische scorefunctie voor het opnieuw bestellen. In plaats daarvan wordt de volgorde van trainingsmonsters dynamisch bepaald op twee manieren: verlies afname en modelcompetentie. Dit vergemakkelijkt de training door eenvoudige voorbeelden te benadrukken die het huidige model voldoende competentie heeft om te leren. We testen onze DCL methode in een Transformer gebaseerd systeem. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat DCL meerdere sterke baselines overtreft op drie low-resource machine translation benchmarks en verschillende grootte data van WMT'16 En-De.", 'da': "Store mængder data har gjort neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) til en stor succes i de seneste år. Men det er stadig en udfordring, hvis vi træner disse modeller på små corpora. I dette tilfælde synes måden at bruge data på at være vigtigere. Her undersøger vi den effektive anvendelse af træningsdata til NMT med lav ressource. Vi foreslår især en dynamisk læringsmetode (DCL) til at ændre rækkefølgen af uddannelsesprøver i uddannelsen. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde anvender vi ikke en statisk scoring funktion til omlægning. I stedet bestemmes rækkefølgen af træningsprøver dynamisk på to måder - tab fald og model kompetence. Dette letter træningen ved at fremhæve nemme prøver, som den nuværende model har nok kompetence til at lære. Vi tester vores DCL metode i et Transformer-baseret system. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at DCL overgår flere stærke basislinjer på tre benchmarks med lav ressource til maskinoversættelse og data i forskellig størrelse fra WMT'16 En-De.", 'hr': "Velika količin a podataka je u posljednjih godina napravila veliki uspjeh u prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT). Ali još uvijek je izazov ako treniramo te modele na malom korporaciji. U ovom slučaju, način korištenja podataka izgleda važniji. Ovdje istražujemo učinkovito korištenje podataka o obuci za NMT s niskim resursima. Posebno, predlažemo dinamičnu metodu učenja nastavnih programa (DCL) kako bi reordinirali uzorke obuke u obuci. Za razliku od prethodnog rada, ne koristimo statičnu funkciju skoring za reorderiranje. Umjesto toga, redak uzorka obuke dinamički je određen na dva načina - smanjenje gubitka i nadležnost modela. To olakšava obuku osvjetljavajući lako uzorke koje trenutni model ima dovoljno kompetencije za učenje. Testiramo naš metod DCL-a u sustavu na transformeri. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da DCL iznosi nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija na tri mjera prevođenja mašine s niskim resursima i različitih veličine podataka WMT'16 En-De.", 'de': "Große Datenmengen haben die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) in den letzten Jahren zu einem großen Erfolg gemacht. Aber es ist immer noch eine Herausforderung, diese Modelle auf kleinen Korpora zu trainieren. In diesem Fall scheint die Art und Weise der Datennutzung wichtiger zu sein. Hier untersuchen wir die effektive Nutzung von Trainingsdaten für ressourcenarme NMT. Insbesondere schlagen wir eine Dynamic Curriculum Learning (DCL) Methode vor, um Trainingsmuster im Training neu zu ordnen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten verwenden wir keine statische Scoring-Funktion für die Nachbestellung. Stattdessen wird die Reihenfolge der Trainingsmuster dynamisch auf zwei Arten bestimmt: Verlustrückgang und Modellkompetenz. Dies erleichtert das Training, indem einfache Beispiele hervorgehoben werden, die das aktuelle Modell über genügend Kompetenz verfügt, um zu lernen. Wir testen unsere DCL-Methode in einem Transformer-basierten System. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass DCL mehrere starke Baselines auf drei ressourcenarmen Benchmarks für maschinelle Übersetzung und unterschiedlich große Daten von WMT'16 En-De übertrifft.", 'id': "Jumlah besar data telah membuat terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) sukses besar dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Tapi masih tantangan jika kita melatih model ini pada skala kecil. Dalam kasus ini, cara menggunakan data tampaknya lebih penting. Di sini, kami menyelidiki penggunaan efektif data pelatihan untuk NMT sumber daya rendah. Terutama, kami mengusulkan metode pembelajaran kurikulum dinamik (DCL) untuk mengatur ulang sampel pelatihan dalam pelatihan. Tidak seperti pekerjaan sebelumnya, kita tidak menggunakan fungsi skor statis untuk mengatur ulang. Sebaliknya, perintah sampel pelatihan dinamik ditentukan dalam dua cara - kehilangan penurunan dan kompetensi model. This eases training by highlighting easy samples that the current model has enough competence to learn.  Kami menguji metode DCL kami dalam sistem berdasarkan Transformer. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa DCL melampaui beberapa garis dasar yang kuat pada tiga benchmark penerjemah mesin sumber daya rendah dan data ukuran berbeda WMT'16 En-De.", 'sw': "Idadi kubwa ya takwimu imefanya tafsiri ya mashine ya ubongo (NMT) mafanikio makubwa katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Lakini bado ni changamoto kama tutafundisha mifano hii kwenye kampuni ndogo. Kwa namna hii, namna ya kutumia taarifa inaonekana kuwa muhimu zaidi. Hapa, tunachunguza ufanisi wa matumizi ya mafunzo ya data kwa rasilimali ndogo ya NMT. Kwa hakika, tunapendekeza njia ya kujifunza elimu ya msimu (DCL) ya kurekebisha mifano ya mafunzo katika mafunzo. Tofauti na kazi iliyopita, hatutumii kazi ya kupunguza takwimu kwa ajili ya kuamuru tena. Instead, the order of training samples is dynamically determined in two ways - loss decline and model competence.  Hii inarahisisha mafunzo kwa kuonyesha sampuli rahisi kwamba muundo wa sasa una uwezo wa kutosha kujifunza. Tunjaribu mbinu zetu za DCL katika mfumo wa zamani. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba DCL inatoa misingi kadhaa yenye nguvu kwenye vifaa vitatu vya kutafsiri rasilimali duni na taarifa tofauti za WMT'16 En-De.", 'ko': "최근 몇 년 동안 대량의 데이터로 인해 신경기계번역(NMT)은 거대한 성공을 거두었다.그러나 우리가 소규모 어료 라이브러리에서 이 모델들을 훈련시키면 여전히 도전이다.이런 상황에서 데이터를 사용하는 방식이 더욱 중요한 것 같다.여기서 우리는 저자원 NMT 훈련 데이터의 효과적인 사용을 연구했다.특히 우리는 훈련 견본을 다시 정렬하기 위해 동적 과정 학습(DCL) 방법을 제시했다.이전 작업과 달리, 우리는 정적 평점 함수를 사용하여 다시 정렬하지 않습니다.반면 훈련 샘플의 순서는 두 가지 방식으로 동태적으로 확정된다. 바로 손실 감소와 모델 능력이다.현재 모델이 충분히 배울 수 있는 간단한 견본을 돋보이게 함으로써 교육을 간소화할 수 있다.우리는 변압기 기반 시스템에서 DCL 방법을 테스트했습니다.실험 결과에 따르면 DCL은 세 개의 저자원 기계 번역 기준 테스트와 WMT'16 En-De의 서로 다른 크기 데이터에서 몇 개의 강력한 기준선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.", 'fa': "تعداد زیادی از داده ها در سال های اخیر ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) یک موفقیت بزرگ ساخته است. اما هنوز یک چالش است اگر ما این مدلها را در مقیاس کوچک تمرین کنیم. در این مورد، راه استفاده از داده ها به نظر می رسد مهمتر است. ما در اینجا استفاده از داده های آموزش برای NMT کم منابع تحقیق می کنیم. مخصوصا، ما یک روش آموزش برنامه آموزش دینامیک (DCL) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا نمونه\u200cهای آموزش را در آموزش بازگردانیم. برخلاف کارهای قبلی، ما از یک فعالیت اسکور استفاده نمی کنیم که برای تغییر دستور دهیم. در عوض، سفارش نمونه\u200cهای آموزش در دو طریق دینامیک تعیین می\u200cشود - کاهش و رقابت مدل. این آموزش را با برق نمونه های آسانی که مدل فعلی به اندازه کافی توانایی برای یاد گرفتن دارد آسان می کند. ما روش DCL خود را در سیستم تغییر دهنده آزمایش می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که DCL چند خط پایگاه\u200cهای قوی بر سه نقشه\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای کم منبع و داده\u200cهای اندازه\u200cای متفاوت از WMT'16 En-De انجام می\u200cدهد.", 'tr': "Ullany maglumat näyral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) geçen ýyllarda uly başarnyga ýetirdi. Eger-de bu nusgalary kiçi ölçekli korporada öwrendirmegimiz entägem kynçylyk. Bu durumda, verileri kullanmak yöntemi has möhüm bolup görünýär. Bu ýerde, NMT-iň aşak ressursy üçin maglumatlaryň etkinji ulanmagyny barlaýarys. Aýratyn bolsa, biz dynamik programlar öwrenmegi (DCL) öräni okuwçylary öränlerini düzenlemek üçin teklip edýäris. Öňki işiň ýaly, ýene düzeltmek üçin statik bir takmynan fonksiyony ulanmaýarys. Ol ýerine, örän okuwçylyk düzeni dinamik şeklinde 2 ýolda karar berýär - ýitirmek we nusgasy düşürmek. Häzirki nusgalaryň öwrenmek üçin ýeterlik kompetans bardygyny ýagtylamak üçin okuwçylygy aňsatýar. DCL taryhymyzy Transformer sisteminde barlaýarys. DCL üç iň aşak ressamyň terjime etimi we WMT'iň 16 En-De-nyň farklı ululyk maglumatynda birnäçe güýçli baseliniň üstünden çykarýandygyny görkezýär.", 'sq': "Shumë të mëdha të dhënash kanë bërë përkthimin nervor të makinave (NMT) një sukses të madh në vitet e fundit. Por është ende një sfidë nëse i trajnojmë këto modele në shkallë të vogël. Në këtë rast, mënyra e përdorimit të të dhënave duket më e rëndësishme. Këtu, ne hetojmë përdorimin efektiv të të dhënave të trajnimit për NMT me burime të ulta. Veçanërisht, ne propozojmë një metodë dinamike mësimi të kursimeve (DCL) për të riorganizuar mostrat e trajnimit në trainimin. Në kundërshtim me punën e mëparshme, ne nuk përdorim një funksion pikërimi statik për riorganizimin. Në vend të kësaj, rendi i mostrave të trajnimit përcaktohet dinamikisht në dy mënyra - rënia e humbjes dhe kompetenca e modelit. Kjo lehtëson trajnimin duke theksuar mostrat e lehta që modeli aktual ka kompetencë të mjaftueshme për të mësuar. Ne testojmë metodën tonë DCL në një sistem të bazuar në Transformer. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se DCL mbizotëron disa linja bazë të forta mbi tre pika referenciale të përkthimit të makinave me burime të ulëta dhe të dhëna të madhësisë së ndryshme të WMT'16 En-De.", 'am': 'በኋለኛው ዓመታት የናቡር መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ (NMT) ትልቅ ድል አግኝቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች በኮርፖርት ላይ ባስተማርን እንግዲህ የፍላጎት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህም ጉዳይ የዳታ መቀበል መንገድ በጣም አስቸጋሪ ይመስላል፡፡ እዚህ፣ ለጥቂት የክፍለ ሀብት NMT የመጠቀም ዳታዎችን በጥያቄ እናመርመራለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ለትምህርት ትምህርት መምህርት (DCL) ማስተማርን (DCL) ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ስራ በተለየ፣ የstatic scoring function for reordering. በፋንታ፣ የትምህርት ምሳሌዎች ሥርዓት በሁለት መንገዶች ላይ የተመሠረተ ነው - የጥፋት ስህተት እና የሞዴል ሥልጣን ጥቀት ነው፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት ቀላል ምሳሌዎችን በመግለጥ ያስተካክላል፡፡ We test our DCL method in a Transformer-based system.  ከፈተናው ውጤቶች DCL በሦስት የዋና-resource machine ትርጉም benchmarks እና የተለየ የWMT-16 ዓይን-De የተለየ ዳታ እንዲያሳየው ብዙዎችን የበረታች ደረጃዎች ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Groot hoeveelheid data het neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) gemaak 'n groot sukses in onlangse jaar. Maar dit is nog 'n uitdaging as ons hierdie modele op klein skaal korpora tref. In hierdie geval, kyk die manier om data te gebruik meer belangrik te wees. Hier, ons ondersoek die effektief gebruik van onderwerp data vir lae hulpbron NMT. Ons voorstel in spesifieke 'n dinamiese kurkulum leer (DCL) metode om onderwerp voorbeelde in onderwerp te herordeer. Ongelik soos vorige werk, gebruik ons nie 'n statiese skoring funksie vir herordening nie. In plaas, die volgorde van onderwerp voorbeelde is dinamies bepaal in twee maniere - verlies verdwerp en model kompetensie. Hierdie maak oorwinning gemaak deur maklike voorbeelde te verlig wat die huidige model het genoeg kompetensie om te leer. Ons probeer ons DCL metode in 'n Transformer- gebaseerde stelsel. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat DCL verskeie sterke basisline uitvoer op drie lae- hulpbron masjien vertalingsbenchmarke en verskillende grootte data van WMT' 16 En- De.", 'bn': "সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে বিশাল পরিমাণ তথ্য নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ করেছে। কিন্তু এটা এখনো একটা চ্যালেঞ্জ, যদি আমরা এই মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করতে পারি কোর্পোরায়। এই ক্ষেত্রে তথ্য ব্যবহার করার উপায় আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মনে হচ্ছে। এখানে আমরা কম সম্পদ NMT-র জন্য প্রশিক্ষণের কার্যকর তথ্য ব্যবহার করে তদন্ত করি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রশিক্ষণের পুনরায় প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্যে একটি ডাইনামিক কার্কুল শিক্ষা প্রস্তাব করি। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের অনুরূপ, আমরা পুনরায় আদেশের জন্য স্টেটিক স্কোরিং ফাংশন ব্যবহার করি না। তার পরিবর্তে প্রশিক্ষণের নির্দেশ দুই ভাবে নির্ধারণ করা হচ্ছে - হারিয়ে যাওয়া এবং মডেলের ক্ষমতা কমে যায়। এই প্রশিক্ষণ সহজ নমুনা হিসেবে প্রশিক্ষণ সহজ করে যে বর্তমান মডেলে যথেষ্ট ক্ষমতা শিখতে পারে। আমরা ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফারের ভিত্তিক সিস্টেমে আমাদের DCL পদ্ধতি পরীক্ষা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ডিসিএল তিন নিম্ন রিসোর্স মেশিন অনুবাদের বেনম্যাক্স এবং বিভিন্ন আকারের তথ্য উইএমটি'১৬ এন-ডি।", 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում մեծ տվյալների քանակը նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) մեծ հաջողություն է դարձրել: Բայց դեռևս մարտահրավեր է, եթե մենք վարժեցնենք այս մոդելները փոքր մակարդակի վրա: Այս դեպքում, տվյալների օգտագործման ձևը ավելի կարևոր է թվում: Այստեղ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ցածր ռեսուրսների NMT-ի ուսումնասիրության տվյալների արդյունավետ օգտագործումը: Մենք հատկապես առաջարկում ենք դինամիկ ուսումնական ծրագրերի ուսումնասիրության մեթոդ, որպեսզի վերադասավորենք ուսուցման նմուշները: Unlike previous work, we do not use a static scoring function for reordering.  Փոխարենը, փորձարկման նմուշների կարգը դինամիկ որոշվում է երկու ձևով՝ կորստի նվազում և մոդելների հնարավորություն: Սա հնարավորություն է տալիս ուսումնասիրել նշելով հեշտ նմուշները, որոնք ներկայիս մոդելը բավարար հմտություններ ունի սովորելու համար: Մենք փորձում ենք մեր DLC մեթոդը տրանֆորմային համակարգում: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ DLC-ն արտադրում է մի քանի ուժեղ հիմնական գծեր երեք ցածր ռեսուրսների մեքենայի թարգմանման համեմատային նպատակների և տարբեր չափերի ՎՄԹ16 Էն-Դ տվյալների վրա:', 'az': "Ən böyük məlumatlar, son illərdə nöral maşına çevirməsi (NMT) böyük başarılı oldu. Amma bu modelləri küçük ölçüdə korpora təhsil etsək hələ də bir çətindir. Bu vəziyyətdə, məlumatları istifadə etmənin yolu daha vacib görünür. Burada, NMT-nin düşük ressurslar üçün təhsil məlumatlarının faydalı istifadəsini incidirik. Özellikle, təhsil nömrələrini yenidən düzəltmək üçün dinamik təhsil programı öyrənməsi (DCL) metodlarını təklif edirik. Əvvəlki işlərə bənzər, biz yenidən düzəltmək üçün statik scoring funksiyasını istifadə etmirik. Əvəzində, təhsil nömrələrinin sırası dinamik olaraq iki yolla təyin edilir - azalış və modeli təhsil. Bu təhsil öyrənmək üçün çox asan nümunələri işıqlandırmaq üçün asanlaşdırır. DCL metodumuzu Transformer sistemində imtahana çəkirik. Experimental sonuçları göstərir ki, DCL üç düşük ressurs makinatının çeviri benchmarklarında və WMT'16 En-De'nin müxtəlif ölçülü verilər üzərində çox qüvvətli sətir çəkir.", 'bs': "Velika količin a podataka je u posljednjih godina napravila veliki uspjeh u prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT). Ali još uvijek je izazov ako treniramo ove modele na malom korporaciji. U ovom slučaju, način korištenja podataka izgleda važniji. Ovdje istražujemo učinkovito upotrebu podataka o obuci za NMT niske resurse. Posebno predlažemo dinamičnu metodu učenja nastavnih programa (DCL) kako bi reordinirali uzorke obuke u obuci. Za razliku od prethodnog posla, ne koristimo statičnu funkciju skoring za reorderiranje. Umjesto toga, redak uzorka obuke dinamički je određen na dva načina - smanjenje gubitka i nadležnost modela. To olakšava obuku osvjetljavajući lako uzorke koje trenutni model ima dovoljno kompetencije da nauči. Testiramo naš DCL metod u sustavu na transformaciji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da DCL iznosi nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija na tri kriterija prevoda mašine s niskim resursima i različitih veličine podataka WMT'16 En-De.", 'ca': "Grans quantitats de dades han fet que la traducció neural de màquines (NMT) sigui un gran èxit en els últims anys. Però encara és un repte si entrenem aquests models en corpora a petita escala. En aquest cas, la manera d'utilitzar les dades sembla més important. Aquí investigam l'ús efectiu de dades d'entrenament per a MTN de baix recursos. En particular, proposem un mètode dinàmic d'aprenentatge del currículum (DCL) per reorganitzar mostres d'entrenament en formació. A diferència de la feina anterior, no utilitzem una funció de puntuació estàtica per reorganitzar. Instead, the order of training samples is dynamically determined in two ways - loss decline and model competence.  Això facilita l'entrenament destacant mostres fàcils que el model actual té prou competència per aprendre. Testem el nostre mètode DCL en un sistema basat en Transformer. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el DCL supera diverses línies de base fortes en tres punts de referència de traducció de màquines de baix recursos i dades de diferents dimensions de WMT'16 en-De.", 'cs': "Velké množství dat učinilo neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) v posledních letech velkým úspěchem. Ale stále je to výzva, pokud tyto modely trénujeme na malých korpusech. V tomto případě se zdá, že způsob využití dat je důležitější. Zde zkoumáme efektivní využití výcvikových dat pro NMT s nízkými zdroji. Především navrhujeme metodu dynamického učení curriculum learning (DCL), která umožňuje změnit uspořádání vzorků školení v rámci školení. Na rozdíl od předchozí práce nepoužíváme pro přeobjednávání statickou funkci bodování. Místo toho je pořadí vzorků školení dynamicky určeno dvěma způsoby: pokles ztráty a modelová kompetence. To usnadňuje trénink tím, že zdůrazňuje jednoduché vzorky, které současný model má dostatek kompetencí k učení. Naši metodu DCL testujeme v systému založeném na transformátoru. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že DCL překonává několik silných základních linií na třech benchmarkech strojového překladu s nízkými zdroji a různých velikostí dat WMT'16 En-De.", 'et': "Suur hulk andmeid on viimastel aastatel teinud neuromasintõlke (NMT) suureks eduks. Kuid see on siiski väljakutse, kui me koolitame neid mudeleid väikesemahulistel korpustel. Sel juhul näib andmete kasutamise viis olevat olulisem. Siin uurime koolitusandmete tõhusat kasutamist vähese ressursiga NMT jaoks. Eelkõige pakume välja dünaamilise õppekava (DCL) meetodi koolituse näidiste ümberkorraldamiseks. Erinevalt varasematest töödest ei kasuta me ümberkorraldamiseks staatilist skoorimisfunktsiooni. Selle asemel määratakse koolitusnäidiste järjestus dünaamiliselt kahel viisil - kaotuse vähenemine ja mudeli pädevus. See lihtsustab koolitust, tuues esile lihtsad näidised, mille õppimiseks praegusel mudelil on piisavalt pädevust. Me testime oma DCL meetodit transformaatoril põhinevas süsteemis. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et DCL-i tulemused ületavad mitmeid tugevaid lähtejooni kolme madala ressursiga masintõlke võrdlusnäitaja ja WMT'16 En-De erineva suurusega andmete puhul.", 'fi': "Suuri määrä dataa on tehnyt neurokonekäännöksestä (NMT) suuren menestyksen viime vuosina. Haasteena on kuitenkin kouluttaa näitä malleja pienimuotoisilla korpusilla. Tässä tapauksessa tiedon käyttötapa näyttää olevan tärkeämpi. Tässä selvitämme koulutustiedon tehokasta käyttöä vähävaraisille NMT:lle. Erityisesti ehdotamme dynaamista opetussuunnitelmaoppimista (DCL) -menetelmää koulutusnäytteiden uudelleenjärjestämiseksi koulutuksessa. Toisin kuin aiemmat työt, emme käytä staattista pisteytysfunktiota uudelleenjärjestelyyn. Sen sijaan koulutusnäytteiden järjestys määräytyy dynaamisesti kahdella tavalla - tappion heikkenemisellä ja malliosaamisella. Tämä helpottaa koulutusta korostamalla helppoja näytteitä, joiden oppimiseen nykyisessä mallissa on riittävästi osaamista. Testaamme DCL-menetelmämme Transformer-pohjaisessa järjestelmässä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että DCL suoriutuu useista vahvoista lähtökohdista kolmella vähäresurssisella konekäännöksen vertailuarvolla ja WMT'16 En-De:n erikokoisella datalla.", 'sk': "Velika količina podatkov je v zadnjih letih naredila nevronsko strojno prevajanje (NMT) velik uspeh. Vendar je še vedno izziv, če usposabljamo te modele na majhnih korpusih. V tem primeru se zdi način uporabe podatkov pomembnejši. Tukaj raziskujemo učinkovito uporabo podatkov o usposabljanju za NMT z nizkimi viri. Predlagamo zlasti metodo dinamičnega učnega učenja (DCL) za preureditev vzorcev usposabljanja v usposabljanju. Za razliko od prejšnjih del ne uporabljamo statične funkcije ocenjevanja za preurejanje. Namesto tega se vrstni red vzorcev usposabljanja dinamično določi na dva načina - zmanjšanje izgube in kompetence modela. To olajša usposabljanje s poudarjanjem enostavnih vzorcev, ki jih ima sedanji model dovolj kompetenc za učenje. Našo metodo DCL testiramo v transformatorskem sistemu. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da DCL presega več močnih izhodišč pri treh nizkih virov strojnega prevajanja in različnih velikostih podatkov WMT'16 En-De.", 'ha': "Babbar yawan data have made neural translation (NMT) a major successment in the few years. Amma kuma yana da wata rabo idan mun sanar da waɗannan misãlai a kan makampuni ƙarami. A cikin wannan case, hanyar da za'a yi amfani da data shine mafi muhimu. A nan, munã ƙidãya masu amfani da amfani da amfani da data na ƙaranci-resource NMT. Kayya, Munã buɗa wata hanyor karatun na karatun (DCL) da za'a sãka wa kodi misãlai masu yin kõri. @ action: button Bayyansa, ana ƙayyade misãlai masu aikin aiki da aka ƙaddara shi a cikin hanyõyi biyu - duk ɓacewa da awon misãlai. Wannan yana sauƙaƙara wa yin amfani da ya ƙayyade misãlai masu sauƙi da kwamfyutan misãlai da ake kai yanzu yana da ma'ishi ya sanar. Tuna jarraba hanyoyinMu na DCL cikin wani tsari wanda aka samu da shi. Dakatan jarrabãwa na nuna DCL ke tafiyar da several ƙarfi based on three lower-resource translation bankimarks and several sized data of WMT'16 en-De.", 'he': "כמויות גדולות של נתונים גרמו לתרגום מכונות עצביות (NMT) להצלחה גדולה בשנים האחרונות. אבל זה עדיין אתגר אם אנחנו מאמן את הדוגמנים האלה על גופורה קטנה. במקרה הזה, הדרך להשתמש במידע נראית חשובה יותר. כאן, אנו חוקרים את השימוש היעיל של נתוני אימון עבור NMT משאבים נמוכים. במיוחד, אנחנו מציעים שיטה לימוד תוכנית לימודים דינמית (DCL) כדי לשנות דוגמאות אימונים באימון. בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת, אנחנו לא משתמשים בתפקיד ציון סטטי כדי לשנות מחדש. במקום זאת, הסדר של דגימות האימון נקבע דינמית בשני דרכים - הפסקה של אובדן ומכשרות מודל. זה מקל את האימונים על ידי להדגיש דגימות קלות שיש למודל הנוכחי מספיק כישורים ללמוד. אנחנו בודקים את שיטת DCL שלנו במערכת מבוססת Transformer. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שDCL מפעיל מספר קווי בסיס חזקים על שלושה נקודות רמזים של מכונת תרגום משאבים נמוכים ומידע בגודל שונה של WMT'16 En-De.", 'bo': "དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཉེ་ཆའི་ལོ་ངོ་དུ་སྐྱེས་པའི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་བྱུང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མིག འོན་ཀྱང་། གནས་ཚུལ་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གལ་ཆེན་ཤིག་ཏུ་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན་པ་རེད། འདིར་ན། ང་ཚོས་NMT་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་གྲ་སྒྲིག་གི་ལག་ལེན་བྱས་པ་དེ་བཙལ་ནས་ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བྱེད་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མ་འདྲ་བར་ན། ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བ་ཕྱོགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གཏོང་ཡོད། འདིས་ད་ལྟོའི་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་དམིགས་གཏོང་ནི་དེ་ལྟོའི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་སྟོབས་རུང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་DCL་ལམ་ལུགས་ལ་གཞི་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ Experimental results show that DCL outperforms several strong baselines on three low-resource translation benchmarks and different sized data of WMT'16 En-De.", 'jv': "undo-type Nanging, njuk saiki wis mulai, nek awake dhewe luwih model iki ngono perusahaan anyar. Slackman iki, ngerti dadi gambar dadi bisa akeh luwih apik. Mungkin, kéné ujian pengguna nggambar nggawe data kang NMT apakno. Genjer-Genjer echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Lah-asai, sampuran dibutuhke dipunangke dipunangke punika dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke lan sampuran model Layine Awak dhéwé ngewat DCL method nang sistem sing basa Transformer Reulti sing paling-peringatan bukane ngono DCL iso nggawe nyimpen bungat sing paling maneh kanggo telu nggawe dolang-pakan karo akeh perusahaan kanggo mbalke biyanan sing sampeyan kanggo mbalke biyanan ning WT'16 en-de."}
{'en': 'How LSTM Encodes Syntax : Exploring Context Vectors and Semi-Quantization on Natural Text', 'ar': 'كيف يشفر LSTM النحو: استكشاف متجهات السياق والتكميم شبه الكمي على النص الطبيعي', 'fr': 'Comment LSTM encode la syntaxe\xa0: exploration des vecteurs contextuels et de la semi-quantification sur du texte naturel', 'es': 'Cómo codifica LSTM la sintaxis: exploración de vectores de contexto y semicuantificación en texto natural', 'pt': 'Como o LSTM codifica a sintaxe: explorando vetores de contexto e semiquantização em texto natural', 'ja': 'LSTMが構文をエンコードする方法:コンテキストベクトルの探索と自然テキストの半定量化', 'zh': 'LSTM 何以编码语法:原自然之上下文向量半量化', 'hi': 'कैसे LSTM वाक्यविन्यास encodes: प्राकृतिक पाठ पर संदर्भ वैक्टर और अर्ध परिमाणीकरण की खोज', 'ru': 'Как LSTM Кодирует Синтаксис: Изучая Векторы Контекста и Semi-Quantization на Естественном Тексте', 'ga': 'Conas a Ionchódaíonn LSTM Comhréir: Veicteoirí Comhthéacs a Iniúchadh agus Leathchainníochtú ar Théacs Nádúrtha', 'el': 'Πώς κωδικοποιεί τη σύνταξη: Εξερεύνηση διανυσμάτων περιβάλλοντος και ημι-ποσοτικοποίηση σε φυσικό κείμενο', 'ka': 'როგორ LSTM სინტექსტის კონტექსტის სინტექსტი: კონტექსტის გვეკტორები და პირველი კვანტიზაცია', 'hu': 'Hogyan kódolja az LSTM a szintaxist: kontextusvektorok és félkvantizáció feltárása a természetes szövegen', 'it': 'Come LSTM codifica la sintassi: esplorazione di vettori di contesto e semi-quantizzazione sul testo naturale', 'kk': 'LSTM синтаксисін қалай кодтамасы: Контексті векторларды және түсінікті мәтіннің жарты көлемін зерттеу', 'lt': 'Kaip LSTM koduoja sintaksą: konteksto vektorių tyrimas ir puskiekybinis natūralaus teksto tyrimas', 'ml': 'എംഎസ്റ്റിം എങ്ങനെയാണ് സിന്റാക്സ് എന്\u200dകോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നത്: ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വെക്റ്ററുകളും സ്വാഭാവിക വാചകത്തില്\u200d', 'mk': 'Како LSTM го кодира синтаксот: Истражување на контекстни вектори и полуквантизација на природниот текст', 'mt': 'Kif LSTM tikkodifika s-Sintassa: L-Esplorazzjoni tal-Vetturi tal-Kuntest u s-Semi-Kwantizzazzjoni fuq it-Test Naturali', 'ms': 'How LSTM Encodes Syntax: Exploring Context Vectors and Semi-Quantization on Natural Text', 'mn': 'LSTM шинжлэх ухаан хэрхэн шинжлэх ухаан: Контекст векторуудыг, байгалийн текст дээр хагас хэмжээний тоо шинжлэх ухаан', 'no': 'Korleis LSTM kodar syntaks: Utforskar kontekstvektorar og halvkvantisering på naturtekst', 'pl': 'Jak LSTM koduje składnię: badanie wektorów kontekstowych i półkwantyzacja tekstu naturalnego', 'ro': 'Cum LSTM codează sintaxa: explorarea vectorilor de context și semi-cuantificarea pe text natural', 'so': 'Sida LSTM uu u kooban yahay kaalmada la-Syntada: Baadayida wadanka hoose iyo Semi-Quantification ku qoran qoraalka asalka ah', 'si': 'LSTM සංකේතය කොහොමද සංකේතය: සංකේතය වෙක්ටර්ස් සහ සාමාන්\u200dය පාළුවට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න', 'sr': 'Kako LSTM kodira sintaks: istraživanje kontekstskih vektora i polu kvantizacije na prirodnom tekstu', 'sv': 'Hur LSTM kodar syntax: utforska kontextvektorer och halvkvantisering på naturlig text', 'ta': 'எப்படி LSTM ஒத்திசைவை குறியிடுகிறது: சாதாரண உரையில் உள்ள வெக்டார் மற்றும் பாதி குறியீடு', 'ur': 'LSTM کیسے سینٹکس کوڈ کرتا ہے: کانٹکس ویکتروں اور نصف- کوانتیزی طبیعی متن پر', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Cách Mật mã LSD: Thăm dò sự lây nhiễm ngữ cảnh và phân loại văn bản tự nhiên', 'hr': 'Kako LSTM kodira sintaks: istraživanje kontekstskih vektora i polu kvantizacije prirodnog teksta', 'da': 'Hvordan LSTM koder syntaks: Udforskning af kontekstvektorer og halvkvantisering på naturlig tekst', 'id': 'Bagaimana LSTM Mengenkod Sintaks: Menjelajah Vektor Konteks dan Semi-Quantisasi pada Teks Alami', 'nl': 'Hoe LSTM syntaxis codeert: Verken contextvectoren en semi-kwantificatie op natuurlijke tekst', 'de': 'Wie LSTM Syntax kodiert: Untersuchung von Kontextvektoren und Halbquantifizierung auf natürlichem Text', 'ko': 'LSTM의 문법 인코딩 방법: 자연 텍스트의 상하문 벡터와 반량화 탐색', 'sw': 'Namna LSTM inavyoorodhesha kodi: Kuchunguza Vectors of Context and Section Quantification on Natural Text', 'fa': 'چگونه سینتکس LSTM رمزبندی می\u200cکند: تحقیق ویکتورهای متصل و نصف Quantization بر متن طبیعی', 'bg': 'Как кодира синтаксиса: проучване на контекстни вектори и полуквантоване на естествен текст', 'sq': 'Si LSTM kodon sintaksën: Shqyrtimi i vektorëve të kontekstit dhe gjysmë-kuantizimit në tekstin natyror', 'af': 'Hoe LSTM enkodeer sintaks: Ondersoek Konteks Vektors en Semi- Quantisasie op Natuurlike Teks', 'tr': 'LSTM Sintaks Nasıl Kodlayır: Kontekst vektörleri ve doğal Metin yarısını Tarama', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'LSTM Sintaksi nec톛 kodlay캼r: T톛bi톛tli Metin 칲zerind톛 Kontekst Vekt칬rl톛rini v톛 Yar캼-Quantizat캼n캼 Exploring', 'bn': 'কিভাবে এলস্টিএম সিন্ট্যাক্স এনকোড করে: বিষয়বস্তু ভেক্টর এবং স্বাভাবিক টেক্সটের বিষয়বস্তু বিশ্লেষণ করা', 'bs': 'Kako LSTM kodira sintaks: istraživanje kontekstskih vektora i polu kvantizacije na prirodnom tekstu', 'ca': 'Com LSTM codifica la sintaxi: Explorar els vectors contextuals i la semiquantificació del text natural', 'et': 'Kuidas LSTM kodeerib süntaksit: konteksti vektorite uurimine ja loodusliku teksti poolkvantiseerimine', 'cs': 'Jak LSTM kóduje syntaxi: zkoumání kontextových vektorů a polokvantizace na přírodním textu', 'fi': 'Kuinka LSTM koodaa syntaksia: Kontekstivektorien tutkiminen ja luonnontekstin puolikvantitointi', 'sk': 'Kako LSTM kodira sintakso: raziskovanje kontekstnih vektorjev in polkvantizacija naravnega besedila', 'he': 'Comment', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'jv': 'Text', 'bo': 'LSTM སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་སྟངས་ལག་སྟར་འདྲ་བྱེད་སྟངས། རང་བཞིན་ཡི་གེའི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྟ་བཤེར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Long Short-Term Memory recurrent neural network (LSTM) is widely used and known to capture informative long-term syntactic dependencies. However, how such information are reflected in its internal vectors for natural text has not yet been sufficiently investigated. We analyze them by learning a language model where syntactic structures are implicitly given. We empirically show that the context update vectors, i.e. outputs of internal gates, are approximately quantized to binary or ternary values to help the language model to count the depth of nesting accurately, as Suzgun et al. (2019) recently show for synthetic Dyck languages. For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP. Moreover, with an L1 regularization, we also found that it can accurately predict whether a word is inside a phrase structure or not from a small number of components of the context vector. Even for the case of learning from raw text, context vectors are shown to still correlate well with the phrase structures. Finally, we show that natural clusters of the functional words and the part of speeches that trigger phrases are represented in a small but principal subspace of the context-update vector of LSTM.', 'ar': 'تُستخدم الشبكة العصبية المتكررة للذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) على نطاق واسع ومعروفة بالتقاط التبعيات النحوية طويلة المدى بالمعلومات. ومع ذلك ، فإن كيفية انعكاس هذه المعلومات في المتجهات الداخلية للنص الطبيعي لم يتم التحقيق فيها بشكل كافٍ حتى الآن. نقوم بتحليلها من خلال تعلم نموذج لغوي حيث يتم إعطاء التراكيب النحوية ضمنيًا. نظهر بشكل تجريبي أن متجهات تحديث السياق ، أي مخرجات البوابات الداخلية ، يتم قياسها تقريبًا إلى قيم ثنائية أو ثلاثية لمساعدة نموذج اللغة على حساب عمق التداخل بدقة ، مثل Suzgun et al. (2019) عرض مؤخرًا للغات Dyck الاصطناعية. بالنسبة لبعض الأبعاد في متجه السياق ، نظهر أن عمليات تنشيطها مرتبطة ارتباطًا وثيقًا بعمق تراكيب العبارة ، مثل VP و NP. علاوة على ذلك ، مع تنظيم L1 ، وجدنا أيضًا أنه يمكن أن يتنبأ بدقة بما إذا كانت الكلمة موجودة داخل بنية عبارة أم لا من عدد صغير من مكونات متجه السياق. حتى في حالة التعلم من النص الخام ، يظهر أن متجهات السياق لا تزال مرتبطة جيدًا بتراكيب العبارة. أخيرًا ، نوضح أن المجموعات الطبيعية للكلمات الوظيفية وجزء الخطابات التي تؤدي إلى تشغيل العبارات يتم تمثيلها في مساحة فرعية صغيرة ولكنها رئيسية لمتجه تحديث السياق لـ LSTM.', 'es': 'La red neuronal recurrente de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM) se usa ampliamente y se sabe que captura dependencias sintácticas informativas a largo plazo. Sin embargo, aún no se ha investigado suficientemente cómo se refleja esa información en sus vectores internos para el texto natural. Los analizamos aprendiendo un modelo de lenguaje en el que se dan implícitamente estructuras sintácticas. Demostramos empíricamente que los vectores de actualización de contexto, es decir, las salidas de las puertas internas, se cuantifican aproximadamente a valores binarios o ternarios para ayudar al modelo de lenguaje a contar la profundidad del anidamiento con precisión, como lo demuestran recientemente Suzgun et al. (2019) para los lenguajes Dyck sintéticos. Para algunas dimensiones en el vector de contexto, mostramos que sus activaciones están altamente correlacionadas con la profundidad de las estructuras de frases, como VP y NP. Además, con una regularización L1, también encontramos que puede predecir con precisión si una palabra está dentro de una estructura de frase o no a partir de un pequeño número de componentes del vector de contexto. Incluso para el caso de aprender del texto sin procesar, se muestra que los vectores de contexto se correlacionan bien con las estructuras de las frases. Finalmente, mostramos que los grupos naturales de las palabras funcionales y la parte de los discursos que activan las frases se representan en un subespacio pequeño pero principal del vector de actualización de contexto de LSTM.', 'pt': 'Long Short-Term Memory Recurrent Network (LSTM) é amplamente utilizado e conhecido por capturar dependências sintáticas informativas de longo prazo. No entanto, como tais informações são refletidas em seus vetores internos para texto natural ainda não foi suficientemente investigado. Nós os analisamos aprendendo um modelo de linguagem onde as estruturas sintáticas são dadas implicitamente. Mostramos empiricamente que os vetores de atualização de contexto, ou seja, saídas de portas internas, são aproximadamente quantizados para valores binários ou ternários para ajudar o modelo de linguagem a contar a profundidade de aninhamento com precisão, como Suzgun et al. (2019) mostram recentemente para linguagens sintéticas Dyck. Para algumas dimensões no vetor de contexto, mostramos que suas ativações estão altamente correlacionadas com a profundidade das estruturas de frases, como VP e NP. Além disso, com uma regularização L1, também descobrimos que ela pode prever com precisão se uma palavra está dentro de uma estrutura frasal ou não a partir de um pequeno número de componentes do vetor de contexto. Mesmo para o caso de aprendizado com texto bruto, os vetores de contexto ainda se correlacionam bem com as estruturas de frases. Por fim, mostramos que os agrupamentos naturais das palavras funcionais e a parte das falas que acionam as frases são representados em um pequeno mas principal subespaço do vetor de atualização de contexto do LSTM.', 'fr': "Le réseau neuronal récurrent de mémoire à long terme (LSTM) est largement utilisé et connu pour capturer les dépendances syntaxiques informatives à long terme. Cependant, la façon dont ces informations sont reflétées dans ses vecteurs internes pour le texte naturel n'a pas encore été suffisamment étudiée. Nous les analysons en apprenant un modèle de langage où les structures syntaxiques sont implicitement données. Nous montrons empiriquement que les vecteurs de mise à jour du contexte, c'est-à-dire les sorties des portes internes, sont approximativement quantifiés en valeurs binaires ou ternaires pour aider le modèle de langage à compter avec précision la profondeur de l'imbrication, comme Suzgun et al. (2019) l'ont récemment montré pour les langages synthétiques Dyck. Pour certaines dimensions du vecteur de contexte, nous montrons que leurs activations sont fortement corrélées avec la profondeur des structures de phrases, telles que VP et NP. De plus, avec une régularisation L1, nous avons également constaté qu'elle peut prédire avec précision si un mot se trouve dans une structure de phrase ou non à partir d'un petit nombre de composantes du vecteur de contexte. Même dans le cas de l'apprentissage à partir de texte brut, les vecteurs contextuels sont toujours en bonne corrélation avec les structures de phrases. Enfin, nous montrons que les groupes naturels des mots fonctionnels et la partie des discours qui déclenchent des phrases sont représentés dans un sous-espace restreint mais principal du vecteur de mise à jour contextuelle de LSTM.", 'ja': '長期記憶再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ ＬＳＴＭ ）は、情報的な長期構文依存性を捕捉するために広く使用され、知られている。 しかしながら、そのような情報が自然なテキストの内部ベクトルにどのように反映されるかは、まだ十分に調査されていない。 構文構造が暗黙的に与えられている言語モデルを学習することで、それらを分析します。 文脈更新ベクトル、すなわち内部ゲートの出力は、Suzgun et al .( 2019)が最近合成Dyck言語について示したように、言語モデルが入れ子の深さを正確にカウントするのに役立つように、二進数または三進数値に近い量子化されていることを経験的に示している。 コンテキストベクトルのいくつかの次元について、我々は、それらの活性化が、ＶＰ及びＮＰなどの語句構造の深さと高度に相関していることを示す。 さらに、L 1規則化では、単語がフレーズ構造内にあるかどうかをコンテキストベクトルの少数のコンポーネントから正確に予測できることもわかりました。 生テキストから学習する場合でも、コンテキストベクトルは依然としてフレーズ構造と良好に相関することが示されている。 最後に、機能単語の自然なクラスタと、フレーズを引き起こすスピーチの一部が、LSTMのコンテキスト更新ベクトルの小さいが主なサブスペースで表されることを示します。', 'zh': '长短期记递归神经网络(LSTM)为博用,且已知用于获信息性之长句法依赖性。 然此等信息,在自然文本之内载体未尽究也。 吾以一言析之,其句法结构隐式也。 臣等以经验言之,上下文更新向量(即内司所输)近量化为二进制或三元直,以助言语准量嵌套深度,如Suzgun等(2019)近为合成Dyck语所示。 其于上下文向量之维度,明其激活与短语构(如VP与NP)之深相关也。 此外因L1正则化,犹见其从上下文向量少量组件中准测单词在短语结构否。 虽学于始,上下文向量犹关短语构。 最后,我明白聚类发短语词性在 LSTM 上下文更新向量一小而要子空中。', 'hi': 'Long Short-Term Memory recurrent neural network (LSTM) व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किया जाता है और जानकारीपूर्ण दीर्घकालिक वाक्यात्मक निर्भरताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए जाना जाता है। हालांकि, प्राकृतिक पाठ के लिए इस तरह की जानकारी अपने आंतरिक वैक्टर में कैसे परिलक्षित होती है, इसकी अभी तक पर्याप्त जांच नहीं की गई है। हम एक भाषा मॉडल सीखकर उनका विश्लेषण करते हैं जहां वाक्यात्मक संरचनाएं निहित रूप से दी जाती हैं। हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से दिखाते हैं कि संदर्भ अद्यतन वैक्टर, यानी आंतरिक गेट्स के आउटपुट, भाषा मॉडल को सटीक रूप से घोंसले के शिकार की गहराई की गणना करने में मदद करने के लिए लगभग बाइनरी या टर्नरी मूल्यों के लिए क्वांटाइज्ड होते हैं, जैसा कि सुज़गुन एट अल (2019) हाल ही में सिंथेटिक डाइक भाषाओं के लिए दिखाते हैं। संदर्भ वेक्टर में कुछ आयामों के लिए, हम दिखाते हैं कि उनके सक्रियण वीपी और एनपी जैसे वाक्यांश संरचनाओं की गहराई के साथ अत्यधिक सहसंबद्ध हैं। इसके अलावा, एक एल 1 नियमितीकरण के साथ, हमने यह भी पाया कि यह सटीक रूप से भविष्यवाणी कर सकता है कि कोई शब्द एक वाक्यांश संरचना के अंदर है या नहीं संदर्भ वेक्टर के घटकों की एक छोटी संख्या से। यहां तक कि कच्चे पाठ से सीखने के मामले के लिए, संदर्भ वैक्टर को अभी भी वाक्यांश संरचनाओं के साथ अच्छी तरह से सहसंबंधित दिखाया गया है। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि कार्यात्मक शब्दों के प्राकृतिक समूहों और भाषणों के हिस्से को ट्रिगर करने वाले भाषणों का हिस्सा जो वाक्यांशों को ट्रिगर करता है, एलएसटीएम के संदर्भ-अपडेट वेक्टर के एक छोटे लेकिन प्रमुख सबस्पेस में दर्शाया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Рекуррентная нейронная сеть с длительной краткосрочной памятью (LSTM) широко используется и известна для захвата информативных долгосрочных синтаксических зависимостей. Однако вопрос о том, каким образом такая информация отражается в ее внутренних векторах для естественного текста, еще не изучен в достаточной степени. Мы анализируем их, изучая языковую модель, где синтаксические структуры задаются неявно. Мы эмпирически показываем, что векторы обновления контекста, то есть выходы внутренних ворот, приблизительно квантуются в двоичные или тернарные значения, чтобы помочь языковой модели точно подсчитать глубину вложенности, как недавно показали Suzgun et al. (2019) для синтетических языков Dyck. Для некоторых измерений в векторе контекста показываем, что их активации сильно коррелируют с глубиной фразных структур, таких как VP и NP. Кроме того, при регуляризации L1 мы также обнаружили, что он может точно предсказать, находится ли слово внутри структуры фразы или нет из небольшого количества компонентов контекстного вектора. Даже в случае обучения на основе необработанного текста контекстные векторы по-прежнему хорошо коррелируют со структурами фраз. Наконец, мы показываем, что естественные кластеры функциональных слов и часть речей, которые запускают фразы, представлены в небольшом, но главном подпространстве контекстно-обновленного вектора LSTM.', 'ga': 'Úsáidtear go forleathan líonra néaraíoch athfhillteach Cuimhne Gearrthéarmach (LSTM) go forleathan agus is eol é chun spleáchais chomhréire fadtéarmacha faisnéiseacha a ghabháil. Mar sin féin, níl imscrúdú leordhóthanach déanta go fóill ar an gcaoi a léirítear an fhaisnéis sin ina veicteoirí inmheánacha do théacs nádúrtha. Déanaimid anailís orthu trí mhúnla teanga a fhoghlaim ina dtugtar struchtúir chomhréire go hintuigthe. Léirímid go heimpíreach go bhfuil na veicteoirí nuashonraithe comhthéacs, i.e. aschuir na ngeataí inmheánacha, cainníochtaithe a bheag nó a mhór go luachanna dénártha nó trínártha chun cabhrú leis an tsamhail teanga doimhneacht an neadaithe a chomhaireamh go cruinn, mar a dúirt Suzgun et al. (2019) seó le déanaí do theangacha sintéiseacha Dyck. I gcás roinnt toisí sa veicteoir comhthéacs, léirímid go bhfuil a gcuid gníomhachtaí comhghaolaithe go mór le doimhneacht struchtúir frása, mar shampla VP agus NP. Ina theannta sin, le gnáthú L1, fuaireamar amach freisin gur féidir leis a thuar go cruinn an bhfuil focal laistigh de struchtúr frása nó nach bhfuil ó líon beag comhpháirteanna den veicteoir comhthéacs. Fiú i gcás na foghlama ó théacs amh, taispeántar go bhfuil comhghaol maith fós idir veicteoirí comhthéacs agus struchtúir na bhfrása. Ar deireadh, léirímid go ndéantar braislí nádúrtha de na focail fheidhmiúla agus an chuid d’óráidí a spreagann frásaí a léiriú i bhfospás beag ach príomhúil de veicteoir comhthéacs-nuashonraithe LSTM.', 'ka': 'ძირითადი სიმხმარების რეკურენტი ნეირალური ქსელი (LSTM) widely used and known to capture informative long-term syntactic dependencies. მაგრამ, როგორ ეს ინფორმაცია განსაზღვრებულია ჩემი ინტერქსტური გვექტორებში, როგორ ჩემი ინტერქსტური ტექსტისთვის უკვე არ იყო ჩვენ ისინი ანალიზებთ ენის მოდელის შესწავლებით, სადაც სინტაქტიკური სტრუქტურები უნდა იყოს. ჩვენ ემპერიკურად ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კონტექსტური განახლებელი გვეკტენტები, მაგალითად ინტერესტური გეკტების გადასვლები, უფრო კვანტიზებულია ბიუნარი ან ტერნარიური მნიშვნელობებისთვის, როგორც სინტეტიკური დასვლების ზოგიერთი განზომილებებისთვის კონტექსტურის გვეკტორიში, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ მათი აქტივაციები ძალიან კონტექსტურაციების სიმაღლ დამატებით, L1 რეგილარიზაციით, ჩვენ დავიწყეთ, რომ ის შეუძლია წარმოდგინოთ თუ სიტყვა ფრაზის სტრუქტურაციაში არის ან არა კონტექსტურის პატარა კომპონენტების კონ კონტექსტური ტექსტიდან მესწავლის შემთხვევაში, კონტექსტური გვექტორები ჩვენებულია, რომ ფრაზების სტრუქტურებისთვის კონტექსტურა საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ფუნქციონალური სიტყვების ნაირთი კლასტერი და სიტყვების ნაწილი, რომელიც გამოწყენებს ფრაზების ნაირთი, მაგრამ პირველური სამყაროში LSTM-ის კონ', 'el': 'Το επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο μακράς βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης (χρησιμοποιείται ευρέως και είναι γνωστό για να συλλάβει ενημερωτικές μακροπρόθεσμες συντακτικές εξαρτήσεις. Ωστόσο, ο τρόπος με τον οποίο οι πληροφορίες αυτές αντικατοπτρίζονται στα εσωτερικά διανύσματά τους για φυσικό κείμενο δεν έχει ακόμη διερευνηθεί επαρκώς. Τους αναλύουμε μαθαίνοντας ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο όπου οι συντακτικές δομές δίνονται έμμεσα. Δείχνουμε εμπειρικά ότι τα διανύσματα ενημέρωσης περιβάλλοντος, δηλαδή οι εξόδοι των εσωτερικών πυλών, είναι περίπου κβαντισμένα σε δυαδικές ή τριμηνιαίες τιμές για να βοηθήσουν το γλωσσικό μοντέλο να μετρήσει με ακρίβεια το βάθος της φωλιάσματος, όπως δείχνουν πρόσφατα για τις συνθετικές γλώσσες του Ντάικ. Για ορισμένες διαστάσεις στο διάνυσμα περιβάλλοντος, δείχνουμε ότι οι ενεργοποίησές τους συσχετίζονται ιδιαίτερα με το βάθος των δομών φράσεων, όπως η VP και η NP. Επιπλέον, με μια ρύθμιση διαπιστώσαμε επίσης ότι μπορεί να προβλέψει με ακρίβεια αν μια λέξη βρίσκεται μέσα σε μια δομή φράσεων ή όχι από έναν μικρό αριθμό συστατικών του διανυσματικού πλαισίου. Ακόμη και στην περίπτωση της εκμάθησης από ακατέργαστο κείμενο, τα διανύσματα περιβάλλοντος δείχνουν ότι εξακολουθούν να συσχετίζονται καλά με τις δομές φράσεων. Τέλος, δείχνουμε ότι οι φυσικές συστάδες των λειτουργικών λέξεων και του τμήματος των ομιλιών που προκαλούν φράσεις αντιπροσωπεύονται σε ένα μικρό αλλά κύριο υποδιαστημικό διάνυσμα της ενημέρωσης περιβάλλοντος του LSTM.', 'it': "La rete neurale ricorrente di memoria a breve termine (LSTM) è ampiamente usata e conosciuta per catturare dipendenze sintattiche informative a lungo termine. Tuttavia, il modo in cui tali informazioni si riflettono nei suoi vettori interni per il testo naturale non è ancora stato sufficientemente studiato. Li analizziamo imparando un modello linguistico in cui sono implicitamente date strutture sintattiche. Mostriamo empiricamente che i vettori di aggiornamento del contesto, cioè le uscite di porte interne, sono approssimativamente quantizzati a valori binari o ternari per aiutare il modello linguistico a contare con precisione la profondità del nesting, come dimostrano recentemente Suzgun et al. (2019) per i linguaggi sintetici Dyck. Per alcune dimensioni nel vettore di contesto, mostriamo che le loro attivazioni sono altamente correlate con la profondità delle strutture di frase, come VP e NP. Inoltre, con una regolarizzazione L1, abbiamo anche scoperto che può prevedere con precisione se una parola è all'interno di una struttura di frase o meno da un piccolo numero di componenti del vettore di contesto. Anche nel caso di apprendimento dal testo grezzo, i vettori di contesto sono ancora ben correlati con le strutture delle frasi. Infine, mostriamo che i cluster naturali delle parole funzionali e la parte dei discorsi che innescano le frasi sono rappresentati in un piccolo ma principale sottospazio del vettore di aggiornamento del contesto di LSTM.", 'kk': 'Қысқа уақыт жады қайталанатын невралдық желі (LSTM) көп қолданылады және мәліметтік ұзын уақыт синтактикалық тәуелдіктерді алу үшін беймәлім. Бірақ бұл мәлімет тәуелді мәтін үшін ішкі векторларында қалай көрсетіліп тұрған жоқ. Біз оларды синтактикалық құрылғылар келтірілген тіл үлгісін оқып анализ. Біз импирикалық түрде контексті жаңарту векторлары, т.е. ішкі қапшықтардың шығысы, тіл үлгісін дұрыс рет есептеу үшін, Suzgun et al. (2019) синтетикалық дик тілдер үшін көрсетеді. Контексті векторының кейбір өлшемдері үшін, олардың белсенділіктері, VP мен NP секілді сөздер құрылымының тереңілігімен байланысты деп көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, L1 үлгіліліктемесімен де ол сөздің құрылымының ішінде немесе контексті векторының кішкентай компоненттерінен емес екенін дұрыс түсіндіре алады. Мәтіннен оқыту үшін де, контексті векторлар сөздер құрылымына әлі жақсы сәйкес келеді. Соңында, біз функциялық сөздердің табиғи кластері және сөздерді бастайтын сөздердің бөлігін LSTM контексті жаңарту векторының кішкентай, бірақ негізгі ішкі жерінде көрсетіледі.', 'hu': 'A hosszú rövid távú memória visszatérő neurális hálózatot (LSTM) széles körben használják és ismerik az információs hosszú távú szintaktikus függőségek rögzítésére. Azonban még nem vizsgálták megfelelően, hogy az ilyen információk hogyan tükröződnek a természetes szöveg belső vektoraiban. Elemezzük őket olyan nyelvi modell tanulásával, ahol a szintaktikus struktúrákat implicit módon megadjuk. empirikusan megmutatjuk, hogy a kontextusfrissítési vektorok, azaz a belső kapuk kimenetei, megközelítőleg bináris vagy ternáris értékekre vannak kvantizálva, hogy segítsen a nyelvmodell pontosan megszámolni a fészkelés mélységét, amint azt a Suzgun és mások (2019) mutatják a szintetikus Dyck nyelvek esetében. A kontextusvektorban lévő néhány dimenzió esetében megmutatjuk, hogy aktiválásuk nagymértékben korrelálódik a kifejezési struktúrák mélységével, mint például a VP és az NP. Ezenkívül az L1 szabályozással azt is találtuk, hogy pontosan megjósolhatja, hogy egy szó egy kifejezési struktúrában van-e vagy sem a kontextusvektor kis számú összetevőjéből. Még a nyers szövegből való tanulás esetén is kimutatható, hogy a kontextusvektorok még mindig jól korrelálnak a kifejezési struktúrákkal. Végül megmutatjuk, hogy a funkcionális szavak természetes klaszterei és a beszédek kiváltó része az LSTM kontextusfrissítő vektorának kis, de fő szubtérében jelenik meg.', 'mk': 'Долга краткорочна меморија рецидентната нервна мрежа (LSTM) е широко употребена и позната за заземање информативни долгорочни синтактички зависности. Сепак, како ваквите информации се рефлектираат во своите внатрешни вектори за природен текст сé уште не е доволно истражено. Ние ги анализираме со учење на јазички модел каде што инплицитно се дадени синтактички структури. Емпирички покажуваме дека векторите за контекстно ажурирање, т.е. излезите од внатрешните порти, се околу квантизирани на бинарни или тринарни вредности за да му помогнат на јазичкиот модел да ја брои длабочината на гнездото точно, како што Suzgun et al. (2019) неодамна покажуваат за синтетичките јазици Dyck. For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP.  Покрај тоа, со регуларизација на L1, исто така откривме дека може точно да предвиде дали зборот е внатре во фразата структура или не од мал број компоненти на контекстниот вектор. Дури и за случајот на учење од суров текст, се покажува дека контекстните вектори сé уште се корелираат добро со фразните структури. Конечно, покажуваме дека природните групи на функционалните зборови и делот од говоровите кои предизвикуваат фрази се претставени во мал, но главен подпростор на контекстниот вектор на LSTM.', 'lt': 'Long Short-Term Memory recurrent neural network (LSTM) is widely used and known to capture informative long-term syntactic dependencies.  Vis dėlto, kaip tokia informacija atsispindi jos vidiniuose natūralaus teksto vektoriuose, dar nebuvo pakankamai ištirta. Analizuojame juos mokydami kalbos model į, kuriame numatomai pateikiamos sintaksinės struktūros. Empiriškai rodome, kad konteksto atnaujinimo vektoriai, t. y. vidinių vartų i šėjimai, yra maždaug kiekybiškai išmatuoti į dvišales arba trišales vertes, siekiant padėti kalbos modeliui tiksliai apskaičiuoti nesting gylį, kaip neseniai rodo Suzgun et al. (2019) sintetinių Dyck kalbų atžvilgiu. Kai kuriems konteksto vektoriaus matmenys rodo, kad jų aktyvinimas labai susijęs su frazių struktūrų gyliu, pvz., VP ir NP. Be to, nustatydami L1 reguliavimą, mes taip pat nustatėme, kad jis gali tiksliai nuspėti, ar žodis yra frazės struktūroje, ar ne iš nedidelio kontekstinio vektoriaus komponentų. Net mokymosi iš žaliavinio teksto atveju įrodoma, kad konteksto vektoriai vis dar gerai koreliuoja su frazės struktūromis. Finally, we show that natural clusters of the functional words and the part of speeches that trigger phrases are represented in a small but principal subspace of the context-update vector of LSTM.', 'mt': 'In-netwerk newrali rikorrenti tal-Memorja fuq medda qasira ta’ żmien twil (LSTM) jintuża b’mod wiesa’ u huwa magħruf li jaqbad dipendenzi sintattiċi informativi fuq medda twila ta’ żmien. Madankollu, kif tali informazzjoni tiġi riflessa fil-vetturi interni tagħha għat-test naturali għadha ma ġietx investigata biżżejjed. Aħna nianalizzawhom billi nitgħallmu mudell lingwistiku fejn jiġu impliċitament mogħtija strutturi sintattiċi. B’mod empiriku nuru li l-vetturi ta’ aġġornament tal-kuntest, jiġifieri l-ħruġ ta’ gates interni, huma kwantifikati bejn wieħed u i e ħor għal valuri binarji jew ternarji biex jgħinu lill-mudell tal-lingwa jgħodd il-fond tal-nidd b’mod preċi ż, kif juru Suzgun et al. (2019) reċentement għal-lingwi sintetiċi Dyck. For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP.  Barra minn hekk, b’regolarizzazzjoni L1, sabna wkoll li tista’ tbassar b’mod preċiż jekk kelma tkunx ġewwa struttura ta’ frażi jew le minn numru żgħir ta’ komponenti tal-vettur tal-kuntest. Anki fil-każ tat-tagħlim mit-test mhux ipproċessat, jidher li l-vetturi tal-kuntest għadhom jikkorrelaw tajjeb mal-istrutturi tal-frażi. Fl-a ħħar nett, nuru li raggruppamenti naturali tal-kliem funzjonali u l-parti tad-diskorsi li jiskattaw il-frażijiet huma rappreżentati f’sottospazju żgħir iżda prinċipali tal-vettur ta’ aġġornament tal-kuntest tal-LSTM.', 'ml': 'നീണ്ട മെമ്മറി ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന നെയൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖല (LSTM) വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നീണ്ട നീ എങ്കിലും സ്വാഭാവിക വാചകത്തിനായി ഇത്തരം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പ്രത്യേകിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് നോക്കിയിട്ടുള്ളത്. ഒരു ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d അവരെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് കൂ നമ്മള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രികമായി കാണിക്കുന്നു സുസ്സുന്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d. (2019) അടുത്തുതന്നെ സിന്തെറ്റിക്ക് ഭാഷയുടെ ആഴത്തിന്റെ ആഴത്തെ എണ്ണുന്നതിന് സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d വെക്സ്റ്റര്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ആഴ വെക്സ്റ്റെക്റ്റരിലെ ചില ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ആഴത്തിന്റെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d വളരെ ബന ഒരു L1 ന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണം കൊണ്ട്, ഒരു വാക്ക് ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുണ്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വെക്സ്റ്റോറിന്റെ ചെറിയ എണ്ണം ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ന ചുരുക്കുന്ന പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി പോലും വെക്സ്റ്റെന്റ് വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ് അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് പ്രകൃതിക വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ക്ലസ്റ്ററുകളും, വാക്കുകള്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ ഭാഗവും എള്\u200dസ്റ്', 'ms': 'Rangkaian saraf berkurang ingatan jangka pendek panjang (LSTM) digunakan secara luas dan diketahui untuk menangkap dependensi sintaktik jangka panjang maklumat. Bagaimanapun, bagaimana maklumat tersebut diselarang dalam vektor dalamnya untuk teks semulajadi belum diselesaikan cukup. Kami menganalisis mereka dengan mempelajari model bahasa di mana struktur sintaktik secara implicit diberikan. Kami empirik menunjukkan bahawa vektor kemaskini konteks, iaitu output gerbang dalaman, sekitar dikwantifikasikan kepada nilai binari atau ternary untuk membantu model bahasa menghitung kedalaman sarang dengan tepat, seperti Suzgun et al. (2019) baru-baru ini menunjukkan untuk bahasa Dyck sintetik. Untuk beberapa dimensi dalam vektor konteks, kita menunjukkan bahawa aktivasi mereka sangat berkorelaci dengan kedalaman struktur frasa, seperti VP dan NP. Moreover, with an L1 regularization, we also found that it can accurately predict whether a word is inside a phrase structure or not from a small number of components of the context vector.  Walaupun untuk kes belajar dari teks mentah, vektor konteks dipaparkan masih berkorelasi dengan struktur frasa. Akhirnya, kita tunjukkan bahawa kumpulan alami perkataan berfungsi dan bahagian ucapan yang memicu frasa adalah mewakili dalam subspace kecil tetapi utama vektor kemaskini-konteks LSTM.', 'no': 'Lang kortmann minne gjentakaste neuralnettverk (LSTM) er breidd brukt og kjent for å henta informativ langsiktige syntaksiske avhengighet. Men korleis slike informasjon er reflektert i sine interne vektorar for naturtekst enno ikkje er nok undersøkt. Vi analyserer dei ved å lære eit språk-modell der syntaktiske strukturar er implisitt gitt. Vi viser empirisk at kontekstoppdateringsvectorane, dvs. utdata av interne portar, er omtrent kvantiserte til binære eller ternare verdiar for å hjelpa språk-modellen til å telja dybde på nestinga nøyaktig, som Suzgun et al. (2019) nyleg viser for syntetiske dykkspråk. For nokre dimensjonar i kontekstvektoren viser vi at aktivasjonane sine er svært korrelaterte med dybde på frasestrukturar, som VP og NP. I tillegg har vi også funne at det kan nøyaktig foregå om eit ord er inne i eit fråstruktur eller ikkje frå ein liten tal komponentar i kontekstvektoren. I tillegg til å lære frå råtekst, vert kontekstvektorane viste til å fortsatt korrelasjona godt med frasenstrukturene. I slutt viser vi at naturlige grupper av funksjonelle ord og delen av språk som utløyser frasar er representert i ein liten, men hovudplass av den kontekstoppdaterte vektoren av LSTM.', 'ro': 'Rețeaua neurală recurentă de memorie pe termen scurt (LSTM) este utilizată pe scară largă și cunoscută pentru a capta dependențe sintactice informative pe termen lung. Cu toate acestea, modul în care aceste informații sunt reflectate în vectorii interni ai textului natural nu a fost încă investigat suficient. Le analizăm prin învățarea unui model lingvistic în care structurile sintactice sunt date implicit. Aratăm empiric că vectorii actualizării contextului, adică ieșirile porților interne, sunt aproximativ cuantificați la valori binare sau ternare pentru a ajuta modelul limbajului să numere cu precizie adâncimea cuibării, așa cum arată Suzgun et al. (2019) recent pentru limbile Dyck sintetice. Pentru unele dimensiuni din vectorul contextual, arătăm că activările lor sunt foarte corelate cu adâncimea structurilor de fraze, cum ar fi VP și NP. Mai mult decât atât, cu o regularizare L1, am descoperit, de asemenea, că poate prezice cu exactitate dacă un cuvânt se află în interiorul unei structuri de frază sau nu dintr-un număr mic de componente ale vectorului contextual. Chiar și în cazul învățării din text brut, vectorii contextului sunt încă corelați bine cu structurile frazelor. În cele din urmă, arătăm că grupurile naturale de cuvinte funcționale și partea de discursuri care declanșează fraze sunt reprezentate într-un subspațiu mic, dar principal al vectorului de actualizare a contextului LSTM.', 'si': 'ලොකු කොටි වාර්තාවක් මතකය ආපහු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය (LSTM) භාවිත වෙනවා සහ තොරතුරු ලොකු වාර්තාවක් සංවි නමුත්, මේ තොරතුරු කොහොමද ස්වභාවික පාළුවක් සඳහා ඇතුළු වෙක්ටර් වලට ප්\u200dරතිකෘති වෙන්නේ. අපි ඔවුන්ව විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා භාෂාවක් මොඩල් ඉගෙන ගන්න කියලා, කියලා සංවිධානය සංවිධාන අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය වෙක්ටර් අවස්ථාව, ඉතින් ඇතුළු ගේට්ටුවන් අවස්ථාව, බායිනාරි නැත්තර් අවස්ථාවක් සඳහා භාෂාව මදුල්යට උදව් කරන්න, සුස්ගුන් ට් ල්  සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් වලින් කිසිම පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ සක්\u200dරියාවන් ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා ක එතකොට, L1 සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරයක් සමග, අපි හොයාගත්තා ඒක හරියට පුළුවන් වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවිධානයක් ඇතුලේ තියෙන්නේ නැ පිළිබඳින් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සමහර වෙක්ටර්ස් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්. අන්තිමේදි, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වැඩ වචනයේ ස්වභාවික කොටස් සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය වචනයේ කොටස් සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය වචනයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරිත වෙක්ටර් LSTM ග', 'mn': 'Урт богино-Term Memory recurrent neural network (LSTM) нь мэдээллийн урт хугацааны синтактик хамааралтай хамааралтай байдлыг авах болон мэддэг. Гэхдээ энэ мэдээлэл байгалийн текст дээр хэрхэн доторх векторууд харагдаж байгааг харуулж чадахгүй. Бид тэднийг хэл загвар суралцаж шинжлэх ухаан өгдөг. Бид дотоод нутгийн газрын шинэчлэлүүд нь хэлний загварын гүн гүнзгийг тодорхойлох тулд ойролцоогоор хоёр эсвэл үеийн утгыг тооцоолж сузгуун et al. (2019) саяхан Синтетик Дик хэлний тухай харуулж байна. Төвчтөн векторын зарим хэмжээсүүдийн тулд бид тэдний үйлдвэрлэлүүдийг VP болон NP зэрэг хэлбэрийн гүн гүнзгий холбоотой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Түүнчлэн, L1-н шугам хэлбэрээр бид мөн тодорхой хэлбэрээр үг хэлбэрийн бүтэц дотор байгааг эсвэл тодорхой хэлбэрээс биш гэдгийг ойлгосон. Хөгжин текстээс суралцах тохиолдолд хүртэл контекст векторууд хэлэлцээний бүтэцтэй холбоотой байдаг. Эцэст нь бид функцийн үгийн байгалийн кластерууд болон өгүүлбэрүүдийн нэг хэсэг нь LSTM-ын контекст жагсаалттай векторын жижиг гэхдээ үндсэн суурь зайд илэрхийлэгддэг.', 'so': 'Shabakadda neurada ee soo socda ee xasuusta waqtiga dheer (LSTM) waxaa loo isticmaalaa oo loo yaqaan inuu qabsado macluumaad ku saabsan xirfadaha la xiriira waqtiga dheer. Si kastaba ha ahaatee sida macluumaadkaas looga fiiriyo wadooyinkooda gudaha ah ee qoraalka dabiicadda ah weli looma baahan yahay si kugu filan. Waxaannu ku baaraynaa barashada model luuqada, taasoo lagu siiyo dhismaha muusikada si aan waxtarla’aan ah. Waxaynu si fudud ugu muujinnaa in wadooyinka cusboonaysiinta irdaha gudaha ah ay qiyaastii qiimaha labaad ama beeraha dhexe lagu qiimeeyaa in lagu caawiyo modelka afka si saxda ah u tiriyo moolka guriga, sida Suzgun et al. (2019) ugu dhowaad u muujiyo luqada syntettika Dykk. For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP.  Sidoo kale waxaynu aragnay in uu si sax ah u sii sheegi karo in ereygu uu ku jiro dhismaha hadalka ama in uu ka yimaado qeybo yar oo ka mid ah vectorka hoose. Xataa haddii aad wax ka baraneyso qoraalka saxda ah, waxaa sidoo kale la muujiyaa wado qalabka kooxaha ah oo ay ku xiriiraan dhismaha afka. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu muujinnaa kooxo asalka ah ee hadallada waxqabadka iyo qayb ka mid ah hadallada ay ka soo baxaan waxay ka muuqan yihiin mid yar ee hoos-hoose ee ka mid ah vector-updates of LSTM.', 'sv': 'Long Short-Term Memory återkommande neuralt nätverk (LSTM) används ofta och är känt för att fånga informativa långsiktiga syntaktiska beroenden. Hur sådan information återspeglas i dess interna vektorer för naturtext har dock ännu inte undersökts tillräckligt. Vi analyserar dem genom att lära oss en språkmodell där syntaktiska strukturer ges underförstått. Vi visar empiriskt att kontextuppdateringsvektorerna, dvs utgångar av interna portar, är ungefär kvantiserade till binära eller ternära värden för att hjälpa språkmodellen att räkna djupet i häckningen korrekt, vilket Suzgun et al. (2019) nyligen visar för syntetiska Dyck språk. För vissa dimensioner i kontextvektorn visar vi att deras aktiveringar är starkt korrelerade med djupet i frasstrukturer, såsom VP och NP. Dessutom, med en L1 regularisering, fann vi också att det exakt kan förutsäga om ett ord är inuti en frasstruktur eller inte från ett litet antal komponenter i sammanhangsvektorn. Även vid inlärning av obehandlad text, har kontextvektorer visat sig fortfarande korrelera bra med frasstrukturerna. Slutligen visar vi att naturliga kluster av de funktionella orden och den del av tal som utlöser fraser representeras i ett litet men huvudområde av kontextuppdateringsvektorn LSTM.', 'pl': 'Rekrutująca sieć neuronowa z pamięci krótkoterminowej (LSTM) jest szeroko stosowana i znana z przechwytywania informacyjnych długoterminowych zależności składni. Nie zostało jednak jeszcze wystarczająco zbadane, w jaki sposób informacje te znajdują odzwierciedlenie w wewnętrznych wektorach tekstu naturalnego. Analizujemy je poprzez uczenie się modelu językowego, w którym struktury składni są domyślnie podane. Empirycznie pokazujemy, że wektory aktualizacji kontekstu, tj. wyjścia bram wewnętrznych, są w przybliżeniu kwantyzowane do wartości binarnych lub trójstronnych, aby pomóc modelowi językowi dokładnie liczyć głębokość zagnieżdżenia, jak pokazują ostatnio Suzgun i wszyscy. (2019) dla syntetycznych języków Dycka. Dla niektórych wymiarów wektora kontekstowego pokazujemy, że ich aktywacje są wysoce skorelowane z głębokością struktur fraz, takich jak VP i NP. Ponadto, przy regularyzacji L1, stwierdziliśmy również, że może ona dokładnie przewidzieć, czy słowo znajduje się wewnątrz struktury fraz, czy nie z niewielkiej liczby składników wektora kontekstu. Nawet w przypadku uczenia się z tekstu surowego wektory kontekstowe nadal dobrze korelują ze strukturami fraz. Na koniec pokazujemy, że naturalne gromady słów funkcjonalnych i części wypowiedzi, które wywołują frazy, są reprezentowane w małej, ale głównej podprzestrzeni wektora aktualizacji kontekstu LSTM.', 'ta': 'நீண்ட குறுக்க- முறை நினைவகம் திரும்ப நெருக்கிய வலைப்பின்னல் (LSTM) விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் அறியப்பட்டுள்ளது தக ஆயினும், அதன் உள்ளார்ந்த நெறிகளில் எவ்வாறு இவ்வாறு தகவல் பிரதிபலிக்கப்படுகிறது என்றாலும் இயல்பான உரைக்கு போதுமா நாம் ஒரு மொழி மாதிரியை கற்றுக் கொண்டு அவர்களை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம் அதில் ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்பு நாம் விருப்பமாக காட்டுகிறோம் சூசன் மற்றும் அல்லது உள் வாதில்களின் புதுப்பித்தல் வெளியீடுகள் சுக்சுன் டிக் மொழிகளின் ஆழத்தை சரியாக எண்ண உதவும் மொழி மாதிரி மதிப்புகளுக்கு சரிய சில பரிமாணங்களுக்கு, விபி மற்றும் NP போன்ற சொற்றொடர் அமைப்புகளின் ஆழத்தில் அவர்கள் செயல்பாடுகள் மிகவும் சார்ந்திருக்கிறது என மேலும், ஒரு L1 கட்டுப்பாடுடன், அது ஒரு சொற்றொடர் கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கு உள்ளே இருக்கிறதா அல்லது சூழல் நெறியின் சிறிய எண்ணிக்கையில் இருந்து அல் குறைந்த உரையிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கூட, சூழல் நெறிகள் இன்னும் சொற்றொடர் அமைப்புகளுடன் நன்றாக இணைக்க காட்டும். இறுதியில், செயல்பாடுகளின் இயல்பான வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் வார்த்தைகளின் பகுதி என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் LSTM-ன் சூழல் புதுப்பித்தல் நெறியின்', 'sr': 'Dugo kratkoročna memorija ponovna neuralna mreža (LSTM) se široko koristi i poznaje kako bi uhvatili informativne dugoročne sintaktične zavisnosti. Međutim, kako se takve informacije odražavaju u svojim unutrašnjim vektorima za prirodni tekst još nisu dovoljno istražene. Analiziramo ih učeći jezički model gde se sintaktičke strukture implicitno daju. Mi empirički pokazujemo da su vektori za aktualizaciju konteksta, tj. izlazi unutrašnjih vrata, približno kvantizirani na binarne ili ternarne vrijednosti da pomognu jezičkom modelu da računa dubinu gnijezda tačno, kao što je Suzgun et al. (2019) nedavno pokazuju za sintetičke jezike Dycka. Za neke dimenzije u kontekstskom vektoru pokazujemo da su njihove aktivacije veoma povezani sa dubinom frazu strukture, poput VP i NP. Osim toga, sa regularizacijom L1, takođe smo otkrili da može precizno predvidjeti da li je reč unutar strukture fraze ili ne iz malih broja komponenata kontekstnog vektora. Čak i za slučaj učenja sa sirovog teksta, kontekstski vektori se pokazuju da se i dalje dobro povezuju sa strukturama fraze. Konačno, pokazujemo da su prirodni skupini funkcionalnih reči i deo govora koje okidaju rečenice predstavljeni u malom, ali glavnom podprostoru vektora LSTM-a za aktualizaciju konteksta.', 'ur': 'لنگ- ٹریم میموروی دوبارہ نیورل نیٹورک (LSTM) widely used and known to capture informative long-term syntactic dependencies. لیکن، یہ معلومات اس کے اندر کی ویکتروں میں کس طرح تحقیق نہیں کی گئی ہے کہ طبیعی متن کے لئے۔ ہم ان کو ایک زبان مدل سکھاتے ہیں جہاں سینٹاکٹیک ساختاریں معلوم ہوتی ہیں۔ ہم عمدہ طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ کنٹکس اوڈیٹ ویکتور، یعنی داخلی دروازے کے نتائج، تقریباً دوئناری یا ترنری ارزش کے مطابق دوئناری یا ترنری ارزش کی مدد کرنے کے لئے زبان موڈل کے مطابق مضبوط طریقہ کے مطابق، سوزگن et al. (2019) اچھے وقت سینٹیٹیک ڈیک زبان ہم ان کی فعالیت کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان کی فعالیت بالکل تعلق کی جڑ کی عمیق بنائی جاتی ہے جیسے وی پی اور ان پی۔ اور ہم نے ایک ل1 قانونی کے ساتھ بھی پایا کہ یہ ٹھیک طور پر پیش بینی کر سکتا ہے کہ ایک لفظ ساختار کے اندر ہے یا ایک چھوٹی تعداد سے نہیں ہے۔ Even for the case of learning from raw text, context vectors are shown to still be well correlated with the phrase structures. آخر میں، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ فعال کلمات کی طبیعی کلسٹر اور کلمات کی حصہ جو ٹریگر کلمات کو ایک چھوٹی لیکن اصلی زیر فضا میں LSTM کے کنٹکس اوڈڈیٹ ویکتور کی بنیادی جاتی ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu maʼlumotning ichki vectorlarida qanday ko'rsatilgan narsa asl matn uchun juda yetarli qidirilmaydi. Biz ularni tillar modelini o'rganish bilan analyzeriz, bu yerda syntactik tuzuvlari muvaffaqiyatli emas. Biz oddiy ko'rsatganimiz, ichki portlarning qiymatlari ikki yoki ternariy qiymatlariga qiymatlar qiymatni aniqlash mumkin, Suzgun et al (2019) yaqinda birinchi darajada bir qiymatni ko'rsatish mumkin. Ko'pchilik vektordagi bir necha shakllar uchun biz ularning amallari VP va NP kabi imkoniyatlarining yuqoriga juda bog'liq. Keyin, L1 boshqaruvi bilan biz bu so'zning bir so'z tuzuvning ichida yoki context vektorining kichkina qismlaridan emas deb hisoblash mumkin. Even for the case of learning from raw text, context vectors are shown to still correlate well with the phrase structures.  Oxirgi, biz ishlayotgan so'zlarning tabiiy soʻzlar va so'zlarni ishga tushirishga ega bo'lgan so'zlarning qismi LSTM'ning context-update vektorlarining kichkina, balki asosiy subspati.", 'vi': 'Mạng thần kinh tái tạo của Ký Ức Dài Hạn (LSTM) được sử dụng rộng và được biết đến để nắm giữ các quan hệ pháp thuật lâu dài thông tin. Tuy nhiên, cách mà thông tin đó được phản ánh trong cơ quan nội bộ của nó về văn bản tự nhiên vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu đủ. Chúng tôi phân tích chúng bằng cách học một mô hình ngôn ngữ nơi cấu trúc cú pháp ẩn chứa. Chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm cho thấy các véc- tơ cập nhật ngữ cảnh, ví dụ các xuất bản của cổng nội tạng, có độ lượng xấp xỉ đến các giá trị nhị phân hoặc tế bào để giúp mô hình ngôn ngữ đo độ sâu của ấp giữ chính xác, như Suzgun et al. (209) gần đây cho thấy về ngôn ngữ nhuộm tổng hợp. Đối với một số kích thước trong véc- tơ ngữ cảnh, chúng tôi cho thấy kích hoạt của chúng có mối quan hệ chặt chẽ với độ sâu của cấu trúc cụm từ, như Phó Tổng thống và NPR. Hơn nữa, với một chỉnh sửa L1, chúng tôi cũng tìm ra rằng nó có thể dự đoán chính xác nếu một từ nằm trong một cấu trúc cụm từ hay không từ một số nhỏ các thành phần của véc- tơ ngữ cảnh. Thậm chí trong trường hợp học từ văn bản nguyên bản, các véc- tơ trường hợp vẫn liên kết tốt với cấu trúc từ điển thành ngữ. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy các cụm số tự nhiên của các từ chức năng và phần của các bài phát biểu được đại diện cho dạng chữ kích hoạt nhỏ nhưng chính của véc- tơ cập nhật ngữ cảnh của HTTM.', 'da': 'Langtidshukommelse tilbagevendende neurale netværk (LSTM) er meget udbredt og kendt til at fange informative langsigtede syntaktiske afhængigheder. Men hvordan sådanne oplysninger afspejles i dens interne vektorer for naturlig tekst er endnu ikke blevet tilstrækkeligt undersøgt. Vi analyserer dem ved at lære en sprogmodel, hvor syntaktiske strukturer implicit gives. Vi viser empirisk, at kontekst opdateringsvektorer, dvs. udgange af interne porte, er omtrent kvantiseret til binære eller ternære værdier for at hjælpe sprogmodellen til at tælle dybden af indlejring nøjagtigt, som Suzgun et al. (2019) for nylig viser for syntetiske Dyck sprog. For nogle dimensioner i kontekstvektoren viser vi, at deres aktiveringer er stærkt korreleret med dybden af sætningsstrukturer, såsom VP og NP. Desuden, med en L1 regulering, fandt vi også, at det nøjagtigt kan forudsige, om et ord er inde i en sætningsstruktur eller ej fra et lille antal komponenter i kontekstvektoren. Selv i tilfælde af at lære af rå tekst, vises kontekstvektorer stadig at korrelere godt med sætningsstrukturerne. Endelig viser vi, at naturlige klynger af de funktionelle ord og den del af taler, der udløser sætninger, er repræsenteret i et lille, men vigtigste underrum af kontekst-opdatering vektor LSTM.', 'bg': 'Дългосрочната краткосрочна памет рецидивираща невронна мрежа (ЛСТМ) е широко използвана и известна с улавянето на информативни дългосрочни синтактични зависимости. Въпреки това, как тази информация се отразява в нейните вътрешни вектори за естествен текст все още не е достатъчно проучена. Анализираме ги чрез изучаване на езиков модел, в който синтактичните структури са имплицитно дадени. Емпирично показваме, че векторите за актуализация на контекста, т.е. изходите на вътрешните портали, са приблизително количествени до двоични или тристранни стойности, за да помогнат на езиковия модел да преброи точно дълбочината на гнездене, както показват наскоро за синтетичните езици на Дик. За някои измерения в контекстния вектор показваме, че техните активирания са силно корелирани с дълбочината на фразовите структури като VP и NP. Освен това, с регулировка открихме, че тя може точно да предскаже дали дадена дума е в структурата на фразата или не от малък брой компоненти на контекстния вектор. Дори в случая на учене от суров текст, контекстните вектори все още корелират добре със структурите на фразите. Накрая, показваме, че естествените клъстери от функционалните думи и частта от речите, която задейства фразите, са представени в малко, но основно подпространство на вектора за актуализация на контекста на ЛСТМ.', 'hr': 'Kratkoročna sjećanja ponovne neuralne mreže (LSTM) se široko koristi i poznaje kako bi uhvatili informativne dugoročne sintaktične zavisnosti. Međutim, kako se takve informacije odražavaju u svojim unutrašnjim vektorima prirodnog teksta još nisu dovoljno istražene. Analiziramo ih učeći jezički model gdje se sintaktičke strukture implicitno daju. Mi empirički pokazujemo da su vektori za aktualiziranje konteksta, tj. ishod unutrašnjih vrata, približno kvantizirani na binarne ili ternarne vrijednosti kako bi pomogli jezičkom modelu da precizno broji dubinu gnijezda, kao što je Suzgun et al. (2019) nedavno pokazuju za sintetičke jezike. Za neke dimenzije u kontekstskom vektoru pokazujemo da su njihove aktivacije visoko povezani s dubinom frazu strukture, poput VP i NP. Osim toga, s regularizacijom L1, također smo otkrili da može precizno predvidjeti da li je riječ unutar strukture fraze ili ne iz malog broja komponenta kontekstnog vektora. Čak i za slučaj učenja sa sirovog teksta, kontekstski vektori se pokazuju da se i dalje dobro povezuju sa strukturama fraza. Napokon, pokazujemo da su prirodni skupini funkcionalnih riječi i dio govora koje okidaju fraze predstavljeni u malom, ali glavnom podprostoru kontekstnog aktualnog vektora LSTM-a.', 'de': 'LSTM (Long-Short-Term Memory Recidiviert Neuronal Network) ist weit verbreitet und dafür bekannt, langfristige syntaktische Abhängigkeiten zu erfassen. Wie sich solche Informationen in ihren internen Vektoren für Naturtext widerspiegeln, ist jedoch noch nicht ausreichend untersucht worden. Wir analysieren sie, indem wir ein Sprachmodell lernen, in dem syntaktische Strukturen implizit gegeben sind. Wir zeigen empirisch, dass die Kontextaktualisierungsvektoren, d.h. Ausgänge interner Gates, ungefähr auf binäre oder ternäre Werte quantisiert sind, um dem Sprachmodell zu helfen, die Tiefe der Verschachtelung genau zu zählen, wie Suzgun et al. (2019) kürzlich für synthetische Dyck-Sprachen zeigen. Für einige Dimensionen im Kontextvektor zeigen wir, dass ihre Aktivierungen stark mit der Tiefe von Phrasenstrukturen korrelieren, wie VP und NP. Darüber hinaus fanden wir mit einer L1-Regularisierung auch heraus, dass es aus einer kleinen Anzahl von Komponenten des Kontextvektors genau vorhersagen kann, ob sich ein Wort innerhalb einer Phrasenstruktur befindet oder nicht. Selbst beim Lernen aus Rohtext korrelieren Kontextvektoren noch gut mit den Phrasenstrukturen. Schließlich zeigen wir, dass natürliche Cluster der funktionalen Wörter und des Teils der Reden, die Phrasen auslösen, in einem kleinen, aber prinzipiellen Subraum des Kontext-Update-Vektors von LSTM dargestellt werden.', 'id': 'Jaringan saraf recurrent Memori Panjang Term (LSTM) sangat digunakan dan dikenal untuk menangkap dependensi sintaksi informatif jangka panjang. Namun, bagaimana informasi tersebut terrefleksi dalam vektor dalamnya untuk teks alami belum cukup diselidiki. Kami menganalisis mereka dengan mempelajari model bahasa di mana struktur sintaksi secara implicit diberikan. Kami empiris menunjukkan bahwa vektor pembaruan konteks, i.e. output dari gerbang interna, sekitar kuantisasi ke nilai binar atau ternar untuk membantu model bahasa menghitung kedalaman sarang dengan akurat, seperti Suzgun et al. (2019) baru-baru ini menunjukkan untuk bahasa Dyck sintetik. Untuk beberapa dimensi dalam vektor konteks, kita menunjukkan bahwa aktivasi mereka sangat terkait dengan kedalaman struktur frasa, seperti VP dan NP. Selain itu, dengan regularisasi L1, kami juga menemukan bahwa dapat memprediksi dengan akurat apakah kata berada dalam struktur frasa atau tidak dari sejumlah kecil komponen vektor konteks. Even for the case of learning from raw text, context vectors are shown to still correlate well with the phrase structures.  Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan bahwa kumpulan alami dari kata-kata fungsional dan bagian dari pidato yang memicu frasa adalah mewakili dalam subspace kecil tetapi utama vektor konteks-update LSTM.', 'nl': 'Long Short-Term Memory Recidiviering Neural Network (LSTM) wordt veel gebruikt en staat erom bekend informatieve syntactische afhankelijkheden op lange termijn vast te leggen. Hoe dergelijke informatie wordt weerspiegeld in de interne vectoren voor natuurlijke tekst is echter nog niet voldoende onderzocht. We analyseren ze door een taalmodel te leren waarbij syntactische structuren impliciet gegeven zijn. We tonen empirisch aan dat de context update vectoren, d.w.z. outputs van interne gates, ongeveer gekwantiseerd zijn tot binaire of ternaire waarden om het taalmodel te helpen de diepte van nesting nauwkeurig te tellen, zoals Suzgun et al. (2019) onlangs laten zien voor synthetische Dyck talen. Voor sommige dimensies in de contextvector laten we zien dat hun activeringen sterk gecorreleerd zijn met de diepte van frasestructuren, zoals VP en NP. Bovendien hebben we met een L1 regularisatie ook ontdekt dat het nauwkeurig kan voorspellen of een woord binnen een frasestructuur zit of niet van een klein aantal componenten van de contextvector. Zelfs in het geval van leren van ruwe tekst, wordt aangetoond dat contextvectoren nog steeds goed correleren met de frasestructuren. Tot slot laten we zien dat natuurlijke clusters van de functionele woorden en het deel van toespraken die zinnen triggeren vertegenwoordigd zijn in een kleine maar belangrijkste subruimte van de context-update vector van LSTM.', 'ko': '장-단기기억순환신경망(LSTM)은 장기 문법 의존 정보를 얻는 데 광범위하게 응용된다.그러나 이러한 정보가 자연 텍스트의 내부 벡터에 어떻게 반영되는지는 아직 충분한 연구를 받지 못했다.우리는 은식으로 문법 구조를 제시하는 언어 모델을 배워서 그것들을 분석한다.우리의 경험에 의하면 상하문 업데이트 벡터, 즉 내부 부서의 출력은 근사량화되어 2원 또는 3원 값으로 양화되어 언어 모델이 삽입 깊이를 정확하게 계산하는 데 도움을 준다. Suzgun 등(2019)이 최근에 합성Dyck 언어에 한 것처럼.언어 환경 벡터의 일부 차원에 대해 우리는 그것들의 활성화가 단어 구조의 깊이와 관련이 있다는 것을 발견했다. 예를 들어 VP와 NP이다.또한 L1의 정규화를 통해 우리는 상하문에서 양의 소량의 분량으로 단어가 단어 구조에 있는지 정확하게 예측할 수 있음을 발견했다.비록 원시 텍스트에서 배운 경우에도 상하문 벡터는 여전히 단어 구조와 매우 좋은 관련성을 가진다.마지막으로 우리는 기능어의 자연 집합과 촉발 단어의 음성 부분이 LSTM 상하문 업데이트 벡터의 작지만 주요한 하위 공간에서 표시된다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'شبکه عصبی (LSTM) دوباره حافظه کوتاه مدت طولانی استفاده می\u200cشود و برای گرفتن وابستگی\u200cهای سنتاکتیک طولانی اطلاعات شناخته می\u200cشود. با این حال، چگونه این اطلاعات در ویکتورهای داخلی آن برای متن طبیعی به اندازه کافی تحقیق نشده است. ما آنها را با یاد گرفتن مدل زبانی تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که ساختارهای سنتاکتیک به طور معنی داده می\u200cشوند. ما به صورت عمومی نشان می دهیم که ویکتورهای آگاهی محیط، یعنی نتیجه دروازه داخلی، تقریباً به ارزش دویینی یا ترنری کمک به مدل زبان برای شماره عمیق آگاهی دقیقا، به عنوان سوزگان et al. (2019) اخیرا برای زبانهای سینتاتیک دیک نشان می دهند. برای بعضی اندازه\u200cها در ویکتور محیط، نشان می\u200cدهیم که فعالیت\u200cهای آنها با عمیق ساختارهای عبارت، مثل VP و NP بسیار ارتباط دارند. علاوه بر این، با یک تنظیم L1، همچنین فهمیدیم که می تواند دقیقا پیش بینی کند که آیا یک کلمه داخل یک ساختار عبارت است یا نه از تعداد اندکی از بخش\u200cهای ویکتور محیط است. حتی برای یادگیری از متن خالی، ویکتورهای محیط هنوز با ساختارهای عبارت به خوبی ارتباط دارند. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که کلاس طبیعی از کلمات عملکرد و بخشی از سخنرانی که کلمات ماجرا می کنند در یک فضای کوچک ولی اصلی از ویکتور آغاز کنترل LSTM نشان می دهند.', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa neura unaoendelea kukumbuka muda mrefu wa muda mrefu (LSTM) unatumiwa sana na unajulikana kukutana na kutegemea matumaini ya muda mrefu ya kukutana taarifa. Hata hivyo, namna taarifa hizi zinavyoonekana katika vectors za ndani kwa ajili ya maandishi ya asili bado haijachunguzwa vizuri. Tunawachambua kwa kujifunza muundo wa lugha ambapo muundo wa ushirikiano usio na maana. Tunaonyesha kwa makini kuwa vectors mpya za muktadha, yaani matokeo ya milango ya ndani, zinakadiriwa kwa kiasi cha thamani za binarie au za mwisho ili kusaidia muonekano wa lugha kuhesabu kina kizuizi cha makazi, kama Suzgun et al. (2019) hivi karibuni unaonyesha lugha za Dyck. Kwa baadhi ya utofauti katika vector za muktadha, tunaonyesha kwamba vitendo vyao vimeunganishwa sana na kina mfumo wa msemo, kama vile VP na NP. Moreover, with an L1 regularization, we also found that it can accurately predict whether a word is inside a phrase structure or not from a small number of components of the context vector.  Hata kwa kesi ya kujifunza kutoka kwa ujumbe mfupi, vectors za mazingira bado zinaonyesha kuwa wanaunganisha vizuri na miundombinu ya msemo. Mwisho, tunaonyesha kuwa mabadiliko ya asili ya maneno ya kazi na sehemu ya hotuba ambazo zinaibua maneno yanawakilishwa katika upande mdogo lakini wa msingi wa vector mpya wa LSTM.', 'tr': 'Uzun zamandyr Bu şekilde, täbiçi metin üçin bu maglumat içeri vektörlerinde nädip gözetlenmedi. Biz olary bir dil nusgasyny öwrenip sintaktik düzümleri diýip analyzýarys. Biz görkezilýän görkezilişimiz, diýmek bolsa daşary çubuklaryň netijesi, dil nusgasyny dogry ýagdaýda hasaplamak üçin bilim nusgasyna kömek etmek üçin 2-nji ýa-da üçin 3-nji mykdarlaryň derejesi, Suzgun et al. (2019) i ň soňra syntetik dyk diller üçin görkezilýär Bazı ölçüler için, VP ve NP gibi ifade yapılarının derinlikleri ile bağlantıldığını gösteriyoruz. L1 düzenlemesi ile de bu sözün bir fraz yapısının içinde olup olmadığını doğru tahmin edebileceğini fark etdik. - Hat metinden öwrenmek üçin hem, kontekst vektörleri fraz struktörleri bilen has gowy bir şekilde görkezilýär. Sonunda, funksyonal sözlerin doğal toparlarını ve sözlerin tetikleyen bir küçük fakat LSTM kontekst güncelleştirme vektörünün en önemli alt alanını gösteriyoruz.', 'af': "Lang- Termine Geheue herhaalde neuralnetwerk (LSTM) is vaste gebruik en bekend om informatiewe lang- term sintaktiewe afhanklikhede te vang. Maar hoe sodanige inligting in sy interne vektore vir natuurlike teks nog nie genoeg is ondersoek nie. Ons analyseer hulle deur 'n taal model te leer waar sintaktieke strukture inplisite gegee word. Ons wys empiriese dat die konteks opdateer vektores, t.d. uitvoerdes van interne poorte, is omtrent quantiseer na binêre of ternary waardes om die taal model te help om die diepte van presies te tel, as Suzgun et al. (2019) onlangs vertoon vir sintetiese diek tale. Vir sommige dimensies in die konteksvektor, wys ons dat hulle aktiwiteite baie verbind is met die diepte van frase strukture, soos VP en NP. Ook, met 'n L1 regularisasie, ons het ook gevind dat dit kan presies voorskou of 'n woord binne 'n frase struktuur is of nie van' n klein aantal komponente van die konteksvektor nie. Selfs vir die geval van leer van raai teks, word konteksvektore vertoon om nog goed te korrelaat met die frase strukture. Eindelik, ons wys dat natuurlike klasters van die funksionele woorde en die deel van speletjies wat uittrek frases word in 'n klein maar hoofspasie van die konteks-opdateer vektor van LSTM verteenwoordig word.", 'am': 'የረጅም የረጅም ጊዜ ማስታወስ recurrent ኔural network (LSTM) በተስፋው ተጠቃሚ እና የመረጃ መረጃ የረጅም ዘመን Syntactic ተሟጋቾች ለመያዝ የታወቀ ነው። ነገር ግን እንደዚህ ያሉ መረጃ በአውስጣዊ የጽሑፍ አካባቢ ውስጥ እንዴት እንደተመለከቱ ነው፡፡ የቋንቋን ምሳሌ በማስተማር እናስተምርላቸዋለን፡፡ በአሳማሚ እናሳየዋለን፣ የውይይት ደጆች የውጤት ውጤቶች፣ የቋንቋ ሞዴል ጥልቁን እንደ ሱዙን እና አል የሚቆጥር ጥልቅ ጥልቅ እናስረዳለን፡፡ በአካባቢው ጠቅላላ ውስጥ ያሉ አካባቢዎች፣ ሥራቸው እንደ VP እና የNP ጥልቅ በጽሑፍ ግንኙነት እንዲያያሰራሉ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር የL1 ሥርዓት ጋር ቃላት በጽሑፍ አካባቢ ውስጥ መሆኑን ወይም ከታናሹ ክፍሎች ትንሽ ጉዳይ መሆኑን በመግለጥ እናውቃለን፡፡ ለጥሩ ጽሑፍ መማር እንኳ፣ የጽሑፉ መሠረት መሳሪያዎች ደግሞ በጽሑፍ መሠረቶች ደጋፍ እንዲታሰሩ ይገልጣሉ፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ የሥርዓት ቃላት እና የንግግሮችን መፍጠር የሚያሳየው የፍጥረት ቃላት እና የንግግር ክፍል የLSTM ማቀናጃ መሠረት በትንሽ ነገር ግን የዋነኛ ክፍል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Kujtesa e gjatë afat-shkurtër rrjeti neural recurrent (LSTM) përdoret gjerësisht dhe është i njohur për të kapur varësitë sintaktike afat-gjatë informative. Megjithatë, si informacioni i tillë pasqyrohet në vektorët e tij të brendshëm për tekstin natyror nuk është hetuar ende në mënyrë të mjaftueshme. Ne i analizojmë ato duke mësuar një model gjuhësh ku strukturat sintaktike janë dhënë implicitisht. Ne empirikisht tregojmë se vektorët e përditësimit të kontekstit, i.e. daljet e portave të brendshme, janë përafërsisht kuantizuar në vlera binare apo ternare për të ndihmuar modelin gjuhësor të numërojë thellësinë e foljes me saktësi, siç tregojnë Suzgun et al. (2019) kohët e fundit për gjuhët sintetike Dyck. Për disa dimensione në vektorin e kontekstit, ne tregojmë se aktivitetet e tyre janë shumë të lidhura me thellësinë e strukturave të frazëve, të tilla si VP dhe NP. Përveç kësaj, me një rregullalizim L1, gjetëm gjithashtu se mund të parashikojë saktësisht nëse një fjalë është brenda një strukture fraze apo jo nga një numër i vogël komponentesh të vektorit të kontekstit. Edhe për rastin e mësimit nga teksti i papërpunuar, vektorët e kontekstit shfaqen të korrelohen ende mirë me strukturat e frazëve. Më në fund, ne tregojmë se grupet natyrore të fjalëve funksionale dhe pjesa e fjalimeve që shkaktojnë frazat janë përfaqësuar në një nënhapësirë të vogël por kryesore të vektorit të përditësimit të kontekstit të LSTM.', 'hy': 'Լանգ կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցը (LSMT) լայնորեն օգտագործվում է և հայտնի է ինֆորմատիվ երկար ժամանակահատվածի սինտակտիկ կախվածությունների ձայնագրման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, ինչպե՞ս է այդ տեղեկատվությունը արտացոլում բնական տեքստի ներքին վեկտորներում, դեռևս բավարար չափով չի ուսումնասիրել: We analyze them by learning a language model where syntactic structures are implicitly given.  Մենք էմպրիկապես ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կոնտեքստի վերականգնման վեկտորները, այսինքն ներքին դարպասների արտադրումները, մոտավորապես քվանտավորված են երկու կամ երկրորդ արժեքների վրա, որպեսզի օգնեն լեզվի մոդելը ճշգրիտ հաշվարկել խմբավարման խորությունը, ինչպես Suzգուն և այլն (2019 Կոնտեքստի վեկտորի որոշ չափումների համար մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նրանց ակտիվացվածքները շատ կապված են արտահայտության կառուցվածքների խորության հետ, ինչպիսիք են VP և NP: Ավելին, L1-ի կարգավորման դեպքում մենք նաև հայտնաբերեցինք, որ այն կարող է ճշգրիտ կանխատեսել, թե բառը գտնվում է արտահայտության կառուցվածքի մեջ, թե ոչ կոնտեքստի վեկտորի մի փոքր քանակից: Նույնիսկ ոչ մշակված տեքստից սովորելու դեպքում ցույց է տալիս, որ կոնտեքստի վեկտորները դեռևս լավ կապված են արտահայտության կառուցվածքների հետ: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ֆունկցիոնալ բառերի բնական խմբերը և խոսքերի մասը, որոնք արտահայտում են արտահայտություններ, ներկայացված են LSMT-ի կոնտեքստի վերականգնման վեկտորի փոքր, բայց հիմնական ենթատարածքում:', 'az': 'Uzun-Uzun Uzun-Term Yadın Yenidən Yenidən Nəyral Ağ (LSTM) geniş işlədilir və informativ uzun-müddət sintaktik bağlılıqları almaq üçün tanınar. Ancaq bu məlumat, təbiətli məlumat üçün iç vektorlarında necə təsirlənəcəkdir? Biz onları sintaktik quruların müəyyən edildiyi dil modelini öyrənib analizə edirik. İçki qapıların sonuçları, suzgun et al kimi, dil modelinin dəyişikliyini doğru saymaq üçün kömək etmək üçün binar və ternar qiymətlərinə kvantifikat edilmişdir. Bazı ölçülərə görə, biz onların aktivasiyaları VP və NP kimi fraz qurularının derinlikləri ilə çox bağlı olduğunu göstəririk. Daha sonra, L1 düzgünlüyü ilə, biz də gördük ki, bu sözün bir fraz quruluşunun içində olmadığını və ya müxtəlif vektorun kiçik bir növ komponentlərin içində olmadığını təmin edə bilər. Sıfır metindən öyrənmək məqsədilə də, məlumat vektörləri hələ də fraza yapılarıyla yaxşı bağlanmaq üçün göstəriləcəklər. Sonunda, fərqli sözlərin təbiətli clusterlərin və sözlərin parçasını LSTM kontekst-güncelləndirmə vektorunun kiçik, ancaq əsl alt alanında göstəririk.', 'bn': 'দীর্ঘ সংক্ষিপ্ত-টার্ম মেমোরি পুনরাবর্তন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (LSTM) ব্যবহার করা হয় এবং তথ্য দীর্ঘমেয়াদ সিন্ট্যাকটিক নির্ভরের জন্ তবে প্রাকৃতিক টেক্সটের জন্য এই ধরনের তথ্য কিভাবে প্রতিফলিত হয়েছে তার অভ্যন্তরীণ ভেক্টরে এখনও যথেষ্ট তদন্ত করা হয় ন আমরা তাদের বিশ্লেষণ করি ভাষার মডেল শিখার মাধ্যমে যেখানে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামোগুলো ব্যর্থতা প্রদা আমরা ক্ষমতাশীল ভাবে দেখাচ্ছি যে ভেক্টর, যেমন ইন্টারনেট গেটের আপটপুট, বাইনারি অথবা টার্নারি মানের প্রায় পরিমাণ বাইনারি বা টার্নারি মূল্য, যাতে ভাষার মডেল সঠিকভাবে প্রতিষ্ঠানে For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP.  এছাড়াও, এল১ নিয়ন্ত্রণের সাথে আমরা আবিষ্কার করেছি যে এটি সঠিকভাবে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে পারে যে একটি শব্দ কাঠামোর ভেতরে আছে কিনা কিংবা প্রেক্ষি এমনকি ক্ষুদ্র লেখা থেকে শিখার ক্ষেত্রেও প্রেক্ষিত ভেক্টর এখনো ভালো কাঠামোর সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট। অবশেষে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কার্যকলাপ শব্দের প্রাকৃতিক ক্লাস্টার এবং ভাষণের অংশ যে বাক্ষতিগুলোর প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হচ্ছে এলএসএমএর কন্টেক্সটেক্ট', 'bs': 'Dugo kratkoročna memorija se široko koristi i poznaje kako bi uhvatili informativne dugoročne sintaktične zavisnosti. Međutim, kako se takve informacije odražavaju u svojim unutrašnjim vektorima prirodnog teksta još nisu dovoljno istražene. Analiziramo ih učeći jezički model gdje se sintaktičke strukture implicitno daju. Mi empirički pokazujemo da su vektori za aktualiziranje konteksta, tj. ishod unutrašnjih vrata, približno kvantizirani na binarne ili ternarne vrijednosti kako bi pomogli jezičkom modelu da računa dubinu gnijezda tačno, kao Suzgun et al. (2019) nedavno pokazuju za sintetičke jezike. Za neke dimenzije u kontekstskom vektoru pokazujemo da su njihove aktivacije visoko povezani sa dubinom frazu strukture, poput VP i NP. Osim toga, s regularizacijom L1, također smo otkrili da može precizno predvidjeti da li je riječ unutar strukture fraze ili ne iz malog broja komponenta kontekstnog vektora. Čak i za slučaj učenja sa sirovog teksta, kontekstski vektori se pokazuju da se i dalje dobro povezuju sa strukturama fraza. Napokon, pokazujemo da su prirodni skupini funkcionalnih riječi i dio govora koje okidaju fraze predstavljeni u malom ali glavnom podprostoru vektora LSTM-a za aktualizaciju konteksta.', 'ca': "La xarxa neural recurrent de memòria a curt termini (LSTM) s'utilitza ampliament i es coneix per capturar dependencies sinàctiques informatives a llarg termini. No obstant això, la manera en què aquesta informació s'reflecteix en els seus vectors interns del text natural encara no ha estat investigada suficientment. We analyze them by learning a language model where syntactic structures are implicitly given.  Mostrem empíricament que els vectors d'actualització del context e, és a dir, les sortides de portas internas, es quantifiquen aproximadament a valors binaris o ternaris per ajudar al model de llenguatge a comptar la profunditat del ninjat amb precisió, com Suzgun et al. (2019) mostren recentment per a les llengües sintètiques Dyck. For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP.  A més, amb una regularització L1, també vam descobrir que pot predir exactament si una paraula està dins una estructura de frases o no d'un petit nombre de components del vector contextual. Fins i tot en el cas d'aprendre amb text brut, es demostra que els vectors de context encara correlacionen bé amb les estructures de frases. Finalment, demostram que agrupaments naturals de paraules funcionals i la part de discursos que desencadena frases són representats en un petit, però principal, subsespai del vector d'actualització del context de LSTM.", 'cs': 'Rekurentní neuronová síť s dlouhodobou krátkodobou pamětí (LSTM) je široce používána a známa pro zachycování informativních dlouhodobých syntaktických závislostí. Způsob, jakým se tyto informace odrážejí v jejich vnitřních vektorech pro přirozený text, však dosud nebyl dostatečně zkoumán. Analyzujeme je pomocí jazykového modelu, kde jsou implicitně dány syntaktické struktury. Empiricky ukazujeme, že vektory aktualizace kontextu, tj. výstupy interních bran, jsou přibližně kvantizovány na binární nebo ternární hodnoty, aby jazykovému modelu pomohly přesně spočítat hloubku vnoření, jak to nedávno ukazují Suzgun et al. (2019) u syntetických jazyků Dycka. U některých dimenzí kontextového vektoru ukazujeme, že jejich aktivace jsou vysoce korelovány s hloubkou frázových struktur, jako jsou VP a NP. Díky regularizaci L1 jsme také zjistili, že může přesně předpovědět, zda je slovo uvnitř frázové struktury nebo ne z malého počtu komponent kontextového vektoru. Dokonce i v případě učení se ze surového textu jsou ukázány, že kontextové vektory stále dobře korelují s frázovými strukturami. Nakonec ukazujeme, že přirozené shluky funkčních slov a části projevů, které spouštějí fráze, jsou reprezentovány v malém, ale hlavním subprostoru kontextového aktualizačního vektoru LSTM.', 'et': 'Pikaajalist lühiajalist mälu korduvat närvivõrku (LSTM) kasutatakse laialdaselt ja teadaolevalt jäädvustatakse informatiivseid pikaajalisi süntaktilisi sõltuvusi. Kuid seda, kuidas selline teave kajastub loodusliku teksti sisemises vektoris, ei ole veel piisavalt uuritud. Analüüsime neid keelemudeli õppides, kus süntaktilised struktuurid on kaudselt esitatud. Empiiriliselt näitame, et konteksti värskendusvektorid, st siseväravate väljundid, on ligikaudu kvantiseeritud kahe- või kolmeväärtusteks, et aidata keelemudelil pesitsemise sügavust täpselt lugeda, nagu Suzgun jt. (2019) hiljuti näitasid sünteetiliste Dyckide keelte puhul. Mõnede kontekstivektori dimensioonide puhul näitame, et nende aktiveerimine on tugevalt korrelatsioonis fraasistruktuuride, näiteks VP ja NP sügavusega. Lisaks leidsime L1 regulariseerimisega, et see suudab täpselt ennustada, kas sõna on fraasistruktuuri sees või mitte kontekstivektori väikesest arvust komponentidest. Isegi toortekstist õppimise puhul näidatakse, et konteksti vektorid on endiselt hästi korrelatsioonis fraasistruktuuridega. Lõpuks näitame, et funktsionaalsete sõnade loomulikud klastrid ja kõnede osa, mis käivitavad fraase, on esindatud LSTM konteksti-uuenduse vektori väikeses, kuid põhilises alamruumis.', 'fi': 'Pitkän lyhyen aikavälin muistin toistuvia hermoverkkoja (LSTM) käytetään laajalti ja tiedetään keräävän informatiivisia pitkän aikavälin syntaktisia riippuvuuksia. Kuitenkin sitä, miten tällainen tieto heijastuu sen sisäisiin vektoreihin luonnolliselle tekstille, ei ole vielä riittävästi tutkittu. Analysoimme niitä oppimalla kielimallia, jossa syntaktiset rakenteet annetaan implisiittisesti. Empiirisesti osoitamme, että kontekstipäivityksen vektorit eli sisäisten porttien tuotokset kvantifioidaan likimäärin binaari- tai kolmikantaarvoiksi, jotta kielimalli pystyy laskemaan pesimisen syvyyden tarkasti, kuten Suzgun et al. (2019) äskettäin osoittivat synteettisille Dyck-kielille. Joidenkin kontekstivektorin ulottuvuuksien osalta osoitamme, että niiden aktivaatiot korreloivat voimakkaasti fraasirakenteiden syvyyteen, kuten VP ja NP. Lisäksi L1-säännöstelyn avulla huomasimme myös, että se pystyy ennustamaan tarkasti, onko sana fraasirakenteen sisällä vai ei pienestä määrästä kontekstivektorin komponentteja. Raakatekstistä opittaessa kontekstivektorit korreloivat edelleen hyvin fraasirakenteisiin. Lopuksi osoitamme, että funktionaalisten sanojen luonnolliset klusterit ja lauseita laukaisevat puheet ovat edustettuina LSTM:n kontekstipäivityksen vektorin pienessä mutta pääasiallisessa aliavaruudessa.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBarUpdates politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Genjer-Genjer Awak dhéwé empirecally show that the context Updates vectors, i.e. output of intermediate gateway string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Text FindOK', 'ha': "@ action: button A lokacin da, ko da ake yi wa wannan information a cikin hanyarsa na guda wa matsayin natsuwa ba'a iya ƙidãya ba. Ana anayya su da za'a sanar da wani misalin harshe a inda an bã su da tsaro masu haɗi. Tuna nuna kwamfyutan kodi ɗin agogo, misali, masu fitarwa na ƙõfõfin guda, za'a ƙayyade kima guda ko masu ƙari ko kuma za'a yi taimako da misalin harshen da za'a lissafa muhimmin sali da gaske, kamar Suzgun et al. (2019) na nuna wa harshen Dyck na ƙarami. Ga wasu tsohon cikin masu cikin masu sakan, Munã nuna cewa aikin su yana da giraffiyar da girgije na tsarin rasmi, kamar misali, vP da NP. Za kuma, da wani L1 ya ƙayyade shi, za mu gane cewa yana iya ƙayyade magana a cikin wani salo na rubutu ko kuma ba daga ƙarami ƙarami masu cikin sakan aikin muhalli. Ko dai da za'a sanar da daga matsayin raw, za'a nuna shiryoyi cikin muhimman da za'a yi daidai da tsarin rasmi. Haƙĩƙa, Munã nũna masu natsuwa na maganar aiki da rabon magana wanda ke fara magana za'a yi tasgaro a cikin ƙarami kuma mainli subpace of the context-update of LTRM.", 'sk': 'Dolgoročno kratkoročno ponovno nevronsko omrežje (LSTM) se široko uporablja in zna, da zajema informativne dolgoročne sintaktične odvisnosti. Vendar pa, kako se takšne informacije odražajo v notranjih vektorjih naravnega besedila, še ni bilo dovolj raziskano. Analiziramo jih z učenjem jezikovnega modela, v katerem so implicitno navedene sintaktične strukture. Empirično kažemo, da so vektorji kontekstne posodobitve, tj. izhodi notranjih vrat, približno kvantizirani na binarne ali tristranske vrednosti, da bi jezikovni model pomagal natančno šteti globino gnezdenja, kot so pred kratkim pokazali Suzgun et al. (2019) za sintetične Dyckove jezike. Za nekatere dimenzije kontekstnega vektorja pokažemo, da so njihove aktivacije močno korelacirane z globino fraznih struktur, kot sta VP in NP. Poleg tega smo z ureditvijo L1 ugotovili tudi, da lahko natančno predvidi, ali je beseda znotraj frazne strukture ali ne iz majhnega števila komponent kontekstnega vektorja. Tudi v primeru učenja iz surovega besedila je dokazano, da kontekstni vektorji še vedno dobro korelacirajo s strukturami fraz. Na koncu pokažemo, da so naravni grozdi funkcionalnih besed in del govorov, ki sprožajo fraze, predstavljeni v majhnem, a glavnem podprostoru vektorja kontekstne posodobitve LSTM.', 'he': 'רשת עצבית חוזרת לזיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר (LSTM) משתמשת באופן רחב וידועה לכלוף תלויות סינטקטיות מידעיות לטווח ארוך. עם זאת, איך מידע כזה משקף בוקטורים הפנימיים שלו לטקסט טבעי עדיין לא נחקר מספיק. We analyze them by learning a language model where syntactic structures are implicitly given.  We empirically show that the context update vectors, i.e. outputs of internal gates, are approximately quantized to binary or ternary values to help the language model to count the depth of nesting accurately, as Suzgun et al. (2019) recently show for synthetic Dyck languages.  למימדים מסוימים בוקטור הקשר, אנו מראים שהפעילות שלהם קשורות מאוד לעומק של מבנים ביטויים, כמו VP ו NP. חוץ מזה, עם ניתוח L1, מצאנו גם שהוא יכול לחזות בדיוק אם מילה נמצאת בתוך מבנה ביטוי או לא ממספר קטן של רכיבים של ווקטור הקשר. אפילו במקרה של לימוד מתוך טקסט חום, הוראים ויקטורי הקשר עדיין מתחברים היטב עם מבנים המשפטים. סוף סוף, אנו מראים כי קבוצות טבעיות של המילים המפעילות והחלק של נאומים שמפעילים ביטויים מייצגים בתא-חלל קטן אבל ראשי של ווקטור הקונקסט-עדכון של LSTM.', 'bo': 'Long-Term Memory recurrent neural network (LSTM) is widely used and known to capture informative long-term syntactic dependencies. འོན་ཀྱང་། རང་རྒྱུས་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ག་དེ་རྟོགས་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ནང་ལ་མཐོང་ན་ཕལ་མེད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དེ་དག་ཚོར་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We empirically show that the context update vectors, i.e. outputs of internal gates, are approximately quantized to binary or ternary values to help the language model to count the depth of nesting accurately, as Suzgun et al. (2019) recently show for synthetic Dyck languages. For some dimensions in the context vector, we show that their activations are highly correlated with the depth of phrase structures, such as VP and NP. ད་དུང་། L1 རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་དྲན་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་རྟོགས་པ་ཅིན་ཡིན་ནམ། ཚིག་ཡི་གེ་ནས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བསླབ་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན། Finally, we show that natural clusters of the functional words and the part of speeches that trigger phrases are represented in a small but principal subspace of the context-update vector of LSTM.'}
{'en': 'When and Who? Conversation Transition Based on Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning Network', 'ar': 'متى ومن؟ انتقال المحادثة استنادًا إلى شبكة تعلم تكافل وكيل الروبوت', 'es': '¿Cuándo y quién? Transición de conversación basada en la red de aprendizaje de simbiosis bot-agente', 'pt': 'Quando e quem? Transição de conversa com base na rede de aprendizado de simbiose de agente de bot', 'fr': "Quand et qui\xa0? Transition de conversation basée sur le réseau d'apprentissage Bot-Agent Symbiose", 'ja': 'Bot - Agent Symbiosis Learning Networkに基づく会話の移行', 'zh': '何时与谁? 盖机器人-摄共生学网络之对转也', 'hi': 'कब और कौन? बॉट-एजेंट सिम्बायोसिस लर्निंग नेटवर्क पर आधारित वार्तालाप संक्रमण', 'ru': 'Когда и кто? Переход к разговору на основе сети обучения симбиозу Bot-Agent', 'ga': 'Cathain agus Cé? Idirbhliain Comhrá Bunaithe ar Líonra Foghlama Symbiosis Bot-Agent', 'ka': 'კჲდა თ კჲდა? ბოტი- ადვნენტის სიმბიოზოსების სწავლების ქსელის ბაზაზე', 'hu': 'Mikor és Ki? Beszélgetési átmenet Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning Network alapján', 'el': 'Πότε και ποιος; Μετατόπιση συνομιλίας βασισμένη στο Δίκτυο Μάθησης Συμβίωσης Βοτ-Πράκτορα', 'kk': 'Кейі және кім? Бот- агенттің символогиялық оқыту желіне негізделген сөйлесу ауыстыруы', 'lt': 'Kada ir kas? Perėjimas prie konversijos, grindžiamas Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning tinklu', 'it': 'Quando e chi? Transizione della conversazione basata sulla rete di apprendimento della simbiosi di Bot-Agent', 'mk': 'When and Who?  Превод на конверзија базиран на мрежата за учење симбиози на агентот', 'mt': 'Meta u Min? Tranżizzjoni ta’ Konverżjoni bbażata fuq in-Netwerk ta’ Tagħlim tas-Sinbijożi ta’ l-Aġent t’Isfel', 'ms': 'Bila dan siapa? Perubahan Berdasarkan Rangkaian Belajar Simbiosis-Ejen Bawah', 'ml': 'എപ്പോഴും ആരും? ബോട്ട്- ഏജന്റ് സിമ്പിയോസിസ് പഠിക്കുന്ന ശെരിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംഭാഷണം മ', 'mn': 'Хэн болон хэн? Бот-агент Симбиосis Learning Network Based Conversation Transition', 'pl': 'Kiedy i kto? Przejście do konwersacji w oparciu o sieć uczenia się symbiozy Bot-Agent', 'sr': 'Kada i koga? Transicija razgovora na osnovu mreže za učenje bot-agenta simbioza', 'no': 'Når og kvan? Samtaleovergang basert på bot- agent- symbiosis- læringsnettverk', 'ro': 'Când şi cine? Tranziția conversației bazată pe rețeaua de învățare a simbiozei Bot-Agent', 'so': 'Goorma iyo Yaa? Talobixinta ku saleysan labada agent Symbiosis waxbarasho shabakadda', 'si': 'කවදාවත් කවුද? බොට්-නියෝජිත සංකේතියේ සංවාදය සඳහා කතාවාද සංවාදය', 'ta': 'எப்போது மற்றும் யார்? Name', 'sv': 'När och Vem? Conversation Transition Baserat på Bot-Agent Symbios Learning Network', 'ur': 'کب اور کون؟ بوٹ-اگنٹ سیمبیوسیس سیکھانٹ نیٹ ورک پر بنیاد ہے', 'uz': 'Qachon va kim? Name', 'vi': 'Khi nào và ai? Thời gian đối thoại Dựa trên mạng lưới học về biểu tượng robot', 'bg': 'Кога и кой? Преход на разговор въз основа на мрежата за учене на символиза на бот агент', 'hr': 'Kada i tko? Transicija razgovora temeljena na mreži za učenje bot-agenata simbioza', 'da': 'Hvornår og hvem? Conversation Transition Baseret på Bot-Agent Symbiose Learning Network', 'nl': 'Wanneer en wie? Gespreksovergang op basis van Bot-Agent Symbiose Learning Network', 'de': 'Wann und wer? Konversationsübergang basierend auf Bot-Agent Symbiose Learning Network', 'id': 'Kapan dan siapa? Conversation Transition Based on Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning Network', 'ko': '언제, 누구?Bot-Agent 공생 학습 네트워크 기반 세션 변환', 'fa': 'کي و کي؟ تغییرات مکالمه بر روی شبکه یادگیری ابتدایی مامور Bot-Agent Symbiosis', 'sw': 'Wakati na nani? Mabadiliko ya mazungumzo yaliyotokana na Mtandao wa Kusoma kwa Shirika la Habari la Symbios', 'tr': 'Haçan we kim? Bot-Ajan Simbollarynyň öwrenmegi Aýry ýagdala', 'sq': 'Kur dhe kush? Transicioni i bisedimeve bazuar në rrjetin e mësimit të simbiozës Bot-Agent', 'af': 'Wanneer en wie? Gespraak Oordrag gebaseer op Bot- Agent Symbiosis Leer Netwerk', 'am': 'መቼ እና ማን? Conversation Transition Based on Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning Network', 'hy': 'Երբ և ո՞վ: Հաշվի առնելով Bot-ագենտի սիմբիոզի սովորելու ցանցի', 'az': 'Ne zaman və kim? Bot-Ajan Symbiosis Öyrənmə Ağı Üstündə Qurğu', 'bn': 'কখন আর কে? বোট-এজেন্ট সিম্বিয়াস শিক্ষা নেটওয়ার্কে ভিত্তিক আলোচনা পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Kada i koga? Transicija razgovora na osnovu mreže za učenje bot-agenta simbioza', 'ca': "Quan i qui? Transició de conversa basada en la xarxa d'aprenentatge de simbiòsis", 'et': 'Millal ja kes? Vestluse üleminek bot-agendi sümbioosi õppevõrgu alusel', 'cs': 'Kdy a kdo? Konverzační přechod založený na Bot-Agent Symbióza Learning Network', 'fi': 'Milloin ja kuka? Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning Network -verkostoon perustuva keskustelun siirtymä', 'jv': 'Kapan karo sapa? New', 'sk': 'Kdaj in kdo? Prehod pogovora na podlagi mreže za učenje simbioze bot-agent', 'he': 'מתי ומי? Transition Based on Bot-Agent Symbiosis Learning Network', 'ha': 'When and Who?  KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ག་དུས་ནམ་ཡིན་ནམ། Bot-Agent་མཚོན་རྟགས་ལ་སྨན་པའི་གཏམ་གླེང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྐད་དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'In online customer service applications, multiple chatbots that are specialized in various topics are typically developed separately and are then merged with other human agents to a single platform, presenting to the users with a unified interface. Ideally the conversation can be transparently transferred between different sources of customer support so that domain-specific questions can be answered timely and this is what we coined as a Bot-Agent symbiosis. Conversation transition is a major challenge in such online customer service and our work formalises the challenge as two core problems, namely, when to transfer and which bot or agent to transfer to and introduces a deep neural networks based approach that addresses these problems. Inspired by the net promoter score (NPS), our research reveals how the problems can be effectively solved by providing user feedback and developing deep neural networks that predict the conversation category distribution and the NPS of the dialogues. Experiments on realistic data generated from an online service support platform demonstrate that the proposed approach outperforms state-of-the-art methods and shows promising perspective for transparent conversation transition.', 'ar': 'في تطبيقات خدمة العملاء عبر الإنترنت ، عادةً ما يتم تطوير روبوتات محادثة متعددة متخصصة في مواضيع مختلفة بشكل منفصل ثم يتم دمجها مع وكلاء بشريين آخرين في نظام أساسي واحد ، يتم تقديمه للمستخدمين بواجهة موحدة. من الناحية المثالية ، يمكن نقل المحادثة بشفافية بين مصادر مختلفة لدعم العملاء بحيث يمكن الإجابة على الأسئلة الخاصة بالمجال في الوقت المناسب وهذا ما صاغناه على أنه تعايش بين وكيل الروبوت. يمثل انتقال المحادثة تحديًا كبيرًا في خدمة العملاء عبر الإنترنت ، ويعمل عملنا على إضفاء الطابع الرسمي على التحدي باعتباره مشكلتين أساسيتين ، أي وقت النقل وأي روبوت أو وكيل سينتقل إليه ويقدم نهجًا قائمًا على الشبكات العصبية العميقة يعالج هذه المشكلات. مستوحاة من نتيجة محفز الشبكة (NPS) ، يكشف بحثنا كيف يمكن حل المشكلات بشكل فعال من خلال توفير ملاحظات المستخدم وتطوير شبكات عصبية عميقة تتنبأ بتوزيع فئة المحادثة و NPS للحوارات. توضح التجارب على البيانات الواقعية التي تم إنشاؤها من منصة دعم الخدمة عبر الإنترنت أن النهج المقترح يتفوق على أحدث الأساليب ويظهر منظورًا واعدًا للانتقال الشفاف للمحادثة.', 'pt': 'Em aplicativos de atendimento ao cliente online, vários chatbots especializados em vários tópicos são normalmente desenvolvidos separadamente e depois mesclados com outros agentes humanos em uma única plataforma, apresentando aos usuários uma interface unificada. Idealmente, a conversa pode ser transferida de forma transparente entre diferentes fontes de suporte ao cliente para que as perguntas específicas do domínio possam ser respondidas em tempo hábil e é isso que chamamos de simbiose Bot-Agent. A transição de conversação é um grande desafio nesse atendimento ao cliente online e nosso trabalho formaliza o desafio como dois problemas centrais, a saber, quando transferir e para qual bot ou agente transferir e introduz uma abordagem baseada em redes neurais profundas que aborda esses problemas. Inspirada no Net Promoter Score (NPS), nossa pesquisa revela como os problemas podem ser efetivamente resolvidos fornecendo feedback ao usuário e desenvolvendo redes neurais profundas que predizem a distribuição da categoria de conversa e o NPS dos diálogos. Experimentos em dados realistas gerados a partir de uma plataforma de suporte a serviços online demonstram que a abordagem proposta supera os métodos de última geração e mostra uma perspectiva promissora para a transição transparente da conversa.', 'es': 'En las aplicaciones de servicio al cliente en línea, varios chatbots que se especializan en diversos temas se desarrollan generalmente por separado y luego se fusionan con otros agentes humanos en una sola plataforma, presentando a los usuarios una interfaz unificada. Idealmente, la conversación se puede transferir de forma transparente entre diferentes fuentes de atención al cliente para que las preguntas específicas del dominio puedan responderse oportunamente, y esto es lo que llamamos simbiosis Bot-Agent. La transición de la conversación es un desafío importante en este servicio de atención al cliente en línea y nuestro trabajo formaliza el desafío como dos problemas principales, a saber, cuándo transferir y qué bot o agente transferir e introduce un enfoque basado en redes neuronales profundas que aborda estos problemas. Inspirados en el Net Promoter Score (NPS), nuestra investigación revela cómo se pueden resolver los problemas de manera efectiva proporcionando comentarios de los usuarios y desarrollando redes neuronales profundas que predicen la distribución de categorías de conversación y el NPS de los diálogos. Los experimentos con datos realistas generados a partir de una plataforma de soporte de servicios en línea demuestran que el enfoque propuesto supera a los métodos más avanzados y muestra una perspectiva prometedora para una transición de conversación transparente.', 'fr': "Dans les applications de service client en ligne, plusieurs chatbots spécialisés dans divers sujets sont généralement développés séparément, puis fusionnés avec d'autres agents humains sur une plate-forme unique, présentant aux utilisateurs une interface unifiée. Idéalement, la conversation peut être transférée de manière transparente entre différentes sources de support client afin que les questions spécifiques au domaine puissent recevoir une réponse rapide. C'est ce que nous avons appelé une symbiose Bot-Agent. La transition de conversation est un défi majeur dans un tel service client en ligne et notre travail formalise le défi en deux problèmes fondamentaux, à savoir quand transférer et vers quel bot ou agent transférer et introduit une approche basée sur les réseaux de neurones profonds qui répond à ces problèmes. Inspirées par le score net du promoteur (NPS), nos recherches révèlent comment résoudre efficacement les problèmes en fournissant des commentaires aux utilisateurs et en développant des réseaux neuronaux profonds qui prédisent la distribution des catégories de conversation et le NPS des dialogues. Des expériences sur des données réalistes générées à partir d'une plateforme de support de service en ligne démontrent que l'approche proposée surpasse les méthodes de pointe et montre une perspective prometteuse pour une transition de conversation transparente.", 'ja': 'オンラインカスタマーサービスアプリケーションでは、様々なトピックに特化した複数のチャットボットが通常別々に開発され、次いで他のヒューマンエージェントとマージされて単一のプラットフォームになり、統一されたインターフェースをユーザに提示する。 理想的には、会話はさまざまなカスタマーサポートのソース間で透明性を持って転送され、ドメイン固有の質問にタイムリーに答えることができます。これがBot - Agentの共生と呼ばれるものです。 会話の移行は、そのようなオンラインカスタマーサービスの大きな課題であり、私たちの仕事は、課題を2つの核心的な問題として正式に定義しています。つまり、転送するタイミングと、どのボットまたはエージェントに転送し、これらの問題に対処する深いニューラルネットワークに基づくアプローチを導入します。 ネットプロモータースコア（ NPS ）に触発されて、私たちの研究は、ユーザーのフィードバックを提供し、会話カテゴリー分布と対話のNPSを予測する深いニューラルネットワークを開発することによって、問題を効果的に解決できる方法を明らかにします。 オンラインサービスサポートプラットフォームから生成された現実的なデータの実験は、提案されたアプローチが最先端の方法を上回り、透明な会話の移行に有望な視点を示していることを示しています。', 'zh': '在线客户服务应用程序中,常独开诸主题数机器人,然后与诸人工摄并于单台,以一界面呈用户。 客户之所以明移者,可以时应特定于域,此吾机器人之所以摄生也。 此言转在线客户服务之要,吾事将挑战正式化为两心,即移徙何机器人、代摄,引入深神经网络之法以决之。 受净推荐值(NPS)之启也,究明用户反馈发深神经网络以占对类布NPS之效也。 在线事平台之实数实验明,所上之道优于先进,而见明对过度之前景。', 'ru': 'В онлайн-приложениях для обслуживания клиентов несколько чат-ботов, специализирующихся на различных темах, обычно разрабатываются отдельно и затем объединяются с другими человеческими агентами в единую платформу, представляя пользователям унифицированный интерфейс. В идеале разговор можно прозрачно перенести между различными источниками поддержки клиентов, чтобы своевременно отвечать на вопросы, связанные с конкретным доменом, и это то, что мы придумали как симбиоз бот-агента. Переход разговора является серьезным вызовом в таком онлайн-обслуживании клиентов, и наша работа формализует этот вызов как две основные проблемы, а именно, когда передавать и какой бот или агент передавать и внедряет подход, основанный на глубоких нейронных сетях, который решает эти проблемы. Наше исследование, вдохновленное чистой оценкой промотора (NPS), показывает, как проблемы могут быть эффективно решены путем обеспечения обратной связи с пользователями и разработки глубоких нейронных сетей, которые предсказывают распределение категорий разговоров и NPS диалогов. Эксперименты с реалистичными данными, полученными с помощью платформы поддержки онлайн-сервисов, показывают, что предлагаемый подход превосходит современные методы и демонстрирует многообещающую перспективу прозрачного перехода к разговорам.', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन ग्राहक सेवा अनुप्रयोगों में, कई चैटबॉट जो विभिन्न विषयों में विशिष्ट होते हैं, आमतौर पर अलग-अलग विकसित किए जाते हैं और फिर अन्य मानव एजेंटों के साथ एक ही मंच पर विलय कर दिए जाते हैं, जो उपयोगकर्ताओं को एक एकीकृत इंटरफ़ेस के साथ प्रस्तुत करते हैं। आदर्श रूप से वार्तालाप को ग्राहक सहायता के विभिन्न स्रोतों के बीच पारदर्शी रूप से स्थानांतरित किया जा सकता है ताकि डोमेन-विशिष्ट प्रश्नों का समय पर उत्तर दिया जा सके और यही वह है जिसे हमने बॉट-एजेंट सहजीवन के रूप में गढ़ा है। वार्तालाप संक्रमण इस तरह की ऑनलाइन ग्राहक सेवा में एक बड़ी चुनौती है और हमारा काम चुनौती को दो मुख्य समस्याओं के रूप में औपचारिक रूप देता है, अर्थात्, कब स्थानांतरित करना है और किस बॉट या एजेंट को स्थानांतरित करना है और इन समस्याओं को संबोधित करने वाले एक गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आधारित दृष्टिकोण का परिचय देना है। नेट प्रमोटर स्कोर (एनपीएस) से प्रेरित होकर, हमारे शोध से पता चलता है कि उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान करके और गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क विकसित करके समस्याओं को प्रभावी ढंग से कैसे हल किया जा सकता है जो वार्तालाप श्रेणी वितरण और संवादों के एनपीएस की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। एक ऑनलाइन सेवा समर्थन मंच से उत्पन्न यथार्थवादी डेटा पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है और पारदर्शी वार्तालाप संक्रमण के लिए आशाजनक परिप्रेक्ष्य दिखाता है।', 'ga': 'I bhfeidhmchláir seirbhíse do chustaiméirí ar líne, déantar il chatbots atá speisialaithe in ábhair éagsúla a fhorbairt go leithleach agus ansin déantar iad a chumasc le gníomhairí daonna eile chuig ardán amháin, rud a chuireann comhéadan aontaithe i láthair na n-úsáideoirí. Go hidéalach, is féidir an comhrá a aistriú go trédhearcach idir foinsí éagsúla tacaíochta do chustaiméirí ionas gur féidir ceisteanna a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann a fhreagairt go tráthúil agus is é seo an rud ar chuireamar le chéile mar shimbiosis Bot-Agent. Is mórdhúshlán é trasdul comhrá ina leithéid de sheirbhís do chustaiméirí ar líne agus cuireann ár gcuid oibre an dúshlán ar bhonn foirmiúil mar dhá phríomhfhadhb, is iad sin, cathain is ceart aistriú agus cén bot nó gníomhaire le haistriú chuige agus tugtar isteach cur chuige atá bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha doimhin a thugann aghaidh ar na fadhbanna seo. Arna spreagadh ag an glanscór tionscnóra (NPS), léiríonn ár dtaighde conas is féidir na fadhbanna a réiteach go héifeachtach trí aiseolas úsáideoirí a sholáthar agus líonraí néaracha domhain a fhorbairt a thuar dáileadh catagóir an chomhrá agus NPS na gcomhphlé. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar shonraí réalaíocha a ghintear ó ardán tacaíochta seirbhíse ar líne go sáraíonn an cur chuige atá beartaithe na modhanna úrscothacha agus go léiríonn sé peirspictíocht gealltanais maidir le haistriú trédhearcach comhrá.', 'ka': 'კლიენტერის სერვისტის პროგრამებში, რამდენიმე ქარბოტები, რომელიც განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული ტემებში, ტიპულად განვითარებულია და შემდეგ სხვა ადამიანტებით ერთადერთი პლატატურაში ერთადერთი ადამია Ideally the conversation can be transparently transferred between different sources of customer support so that domain-specific questions can be answered timely and this is what we coined as a Bot-Agent symbiosis. პარამეტრების გარეშე არის მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილება ასეთი კლიენტერის სერვისში და ჩვენი სამუშაო პროფილიზაცია, როდესაც ორი მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემების გარეშე და როდესაც პრობტო ან ადვნენტი გარეშე და გარეშე ე ჩვენი განსხვავება, როგორ პრობლემები ძალიან ეფექტიურად გახსნა გამოიყენებელი გახსნა და განვითარება ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელები, რომლებიც განსხვავებენ პარამეტრების კატეგორია და დიალოგის NPS-ს რეალური მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომელიც ინტერნეტური სერვისის მხარდაჭერის პლატატიდან შექმნილი მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომ პროგრამეტური მონაცემები უფრო გავაკეთებს ს', 'hu': 'Az online ügyfélszolgálati alkalmazásokban több, különböző témákra specializálódott chatbotot általában külön fejlesztenek ki, majd egyetlen platformra egyesítenek más emberi ügynökökkel, amelyek egységes felületet biztosítanak a felhasználók számára. Ideális esetben a beszélgetés átlátható módon átvihető a különböző ügyfélszolgálati források között, így a domain specifikus kérdések időben megválaszolhatók, és ez az, amit Bot-Agent szimbiózisként találtunk ki. A beszélgetési átmenet nagy kihívást jelent az online ügyfélszolgálatban, és munkánk a kihívást két alapvető problémaként formalizálja, nevezetesen, hogy mikor kell áthelyezni, és melyik bot vagy ügynök áthelyezni, és bevezet egy mély neurális hálózat alapú megközelítést, amely kezeli ezeket a problémákat. A net promoter score (NPS) által inspirált kutatásunk feltárja, hogy a problémákat miként lehet hatékonyan megoldani a felhasználói visszajelzésekkel és olyan mély neurális hálózatok fejlesztésével, amelyek előrejelzik a beszélgetési kategória eloszlását és a párbeszédek NPS-jét. Az online szolgáltatástámogató platformról származó reális adatokkal kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket, és ígéretes perspektívát mutat az átlátható beszélgetési átmenet tekintetében.', 'el': 'Στις διαδικτυακές εφαρμογές εξυπηρέτησης πελατών, πολλαπλά που είναι εξειδικευμένα σε διάφορα θέματα αναπτύσσονται συνήθως ξεχωριστά και στη συνέχεια συγχωνεύονται με άλλους ανθρώπινους πράκτορες σε μια ενιαία πλατφόρμα, παρουσιάζοντας στους χρήστες με μια ενιαία διεπαφή. Ιδανικά η συζήτηση μπορεί να μεταφερθεί με διαφάνεια μεταξύ διαφορετικών πηγών υποστήριξης πελατών, έτσι ώστε να μπορούν να απαντηθούν έγκαιρα συγκεκριμένες ερωτήσεις και αυτό είναι που επινοήσαμε ως συμβίωση ρομπότ-πράκτορα. Η μετάβαση της συνομιλίας είναι μια σημαντική πρόκληση σε μια τέτοια διαδικτυακή εξυπηρέτηση πελατών και το έργο μας επισημοποιεί την πρόκληση ως δύο βασικά προβλήματα, δηλαδή, πότε να μεταφερθεί και σε ποιο ρομπότ ή πράκτορα να μεταφερθεί και εισάγει μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα που αντιμετωπίζει αυτά τα προβλήματα. Εμπνευσμένη από το σκορ καθαρού προωθητή (NPS), η έρευνά μας αποκαλύπτει πώς τα προβλήματα μπορούν να επιλυθούν αποτελεσματικά παρέχοντας ανατροφοδότηση των χρηστών και ανάπτυξη βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων που προβλέπουν την κατανομή κατηγοριών συνομιλίας και το NPS των διαλόγων. Τα πειράματα σε ρεαλιστικά δεδομένα που παράγονται από μια πλατφόρμα υποστήριξης υπηρεσιών αποδεικνύουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους και δείχνει ελπιδοφόρα προοπτική για διαφανή μετάβαση συνομιλίας.', 'it': "Nelle applicazioni di servizio clienti online, più chatbot specializzati in vari argomenti sono tipicamente sviluppati separatamente e vengono poi fusi con altri agenti umani in un'unica piattaforma, presentando agli utenti un'interfaccia unificata. Idealmente la conversazione può essere trasferita in modo trasparente tra diverse fonti di assistenza clienti in modo che le domande specifiche del dominio possano essere risposte tempestive e questo è ciò che abbiamo coniato come simbiosi Bot-Agent. La transizione alla conversazione è una grande sfida in questo servizio clienti online e il nostro lavoro formalizza la sfida come due problemi fondamentali, vale a dire, quando trasferire e quale bot o agente trasferire e introduce un approccio basato su reti neurali profonde che affronta questi problemi. Ispirata dal punteggio NPS (Net Promoter Score), la nostra ricerca rivela come i problemi possano essere efficacemente risolti fornendo feedback degli utenti e sviluppando reti neurali profonde che predicono la distribuzione delle categorie di conversazione e l'NPS dei dialoghi. Esperimenti su dati realistici generati da una piattaforma di supporto ai servizi online dimostrano che l'approccio proposto supera i metodi all'avanguardia e mostra prospettive promettenti per una transizione trasparente della conversazione.", 'kk': 'Онлайн клиенттер қызметінің қолданбаларында көптеген тақырыптарда арнаулы көптеген шатботтар әдетте бөлек құрылып, содан кейін басқа адамдар агенттерімен бір платформаға біріктіріп, біріктірілген интерфейсті па Идеялық сұрақтар бағдарламалардың қолдауының түрлі көзі арасында мөлдір аударылады, сондықтан доменге ерекше сұрақтар уақытта жауап бере алады, бұл біз Bot-Agent симбиосы ретінде жасадық. Көңістік ауыстыру - онлайн клиенттер қызметінің негізгі мәселелері. Біздің жұмысамыз екі негізгі мәселелер ретінде көңістік береді. Мысалы, қазіргі бот не агенттің ауыстыру және қазіргі негізгі невралдық Желі модераторлық нәтижелері (NPS) арқылы сәйкесті, біздің зерттеулеріміз, пайдаланушылардың қайта жауап беру және диалогтардың диалогтарды үлестіру санатын және NPS тарату үшін қалай мәселелерді қалай шешуге Онлайн қызметтің қолдау платформасынан құрылған реалистикалық деректерінің тәжірибелері келтірілген тәжірибесінің күй- жай әдістерін жасап, мөлдірлі сұхбат ауыстыру үшін әсер', 'mk': 'Во онлајн апликациите за сервис на клиентите, повеќето chatbots кои се специјализирани во различни теми се обично развиваат одделно и потоа се спојуваат со други човечки агенти на една платформа, претставувајќи им се на корисниците со унифициран интерфејс. Ideally the conversation can be transparently transferred between different sources of customer support so that domain-specific questions can be answered timely and this is what we coined as a Bot-Agent symbiosis.  Транзијата на конверзацијата претставува голем предизвик во ваквата онлајн клиентска сервис и нашата работа го формализира предизвикот како два основни проблеми, имено, кога да се трансферира и кој робот или агент да се трансферира и да се воведе длабок пристап базиран на нервни мрежи кој ги решава Инспирирано од резултатот на мрежниот промотор (NPS), нашето истражување открива како проблемите може да се решат ефикасно со обезбедување на кориснички реакции и развој на длабоки нервни мрежи кои предвидуваат дистрибуција на категоријата на разговорот и NPS на дијалозите. Експериментите на реални податоци генерирани од платформата за поддршка на онлајн сервисот демонстрираат дека предложениот пристап ги надминува најсовремените методи и покажува ветувачки перспективи за транспарентна транзиција на разговорот.', 'lt': 'In online customer service applications, multiple chatbots that are specialized in various topics are typically developed separately and are then merged with other human agents to a single platform, presenting to the users with a unified interface.  Idealiai pokalbis gali būti skaidriai perduodamas tarp skirtingų klientų paramos šaltinių, kad į konkrečias sritis susijusius klausimus būtų galima atsakyti laiku ir būtent tai mes sukūrėme kaip Bot-Agent simbiozę. Perėjimas prie konversacijos yra didžiausias iššūkis tokioje internetinėje klientų paslaugoje, o mūsų darbas formalizuoja iššūkį kaip dvi pagrindines problemas, būtent, kada perkelti ir kuris robotas ar agent as perkelti į gilius nervinius tinklus ir įdiegti tokį požiūrį, kuris sprendžia šias problemas. Įkvėptas grynojo rėmėjo rezultatu (NPS), mūsų moksliniai tyrimai atskleidžia, kaip problemos gali būti veiksmingai išspręstos teikiant vartotojų grįžtamąją informaciją ir plėtojant gilius nervinius tinklus, kurie numato pokalbių kategorijos pasiskirstymą ir dialogų NPS. Reališkų duomenų, gautų iš internetinės paslaugos rėmimo platformos, eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas atitinka naujausius metodus ir rodo perspektyvą skaidriam pokalbių perėjimui.', 'ms': 'Dalam aplikasi perkhidmatan pelanggan online, berbilang chatbot yang khusus dalam berbagai topik biasanya dikembangkan secara terpisah dan kemudian dicabungkan dengan ejen manusia lain ke platform tunggal, memperkenalkan kepada pengguna dengan antaramuka yang bersatu. Idealnya perbualan boleh dipindahkan secara jelas diantara sumber sokongan pelanggan yang berbeza supaya soalan-domain-spesifik boleh dijawab tepat waktu dan inilah yang kami ciptakan sebagai simbiosis Bot-Agent. Peralihan perbualan adalah cabaran utama dalam perkhidmatan pelanggan online dan kerja kita formalisasi cabaran sebagai dua masalah utama, iaitu, bila untuk dipindahkan dan mana robot atau ejen untuk dipindahkan ke dan memperkenalkan pendekatan berdasarkan rangkaian saraf yang mendalam yang mengatasi masalah ini. Terinspirasi oleh skor promotor jaring (NPS), kajian kami mengungkapkan bagaimana masalah boleh diselesaikan secara efektif dengan menyediakan maklum balas pengguna dan mengembangkan rangkaian saraf dalam yang meramalkan distribusi kategori perbualan dan NPS dialog. Eksperimen pada data realistik yang dijana dari platform sokongan perkhidmatan online menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan melampaui kaedah state-of-the-art dan menunjukkan perspektif yang berjanji untuk transisi perbualan yang transparan.', 'mn': 'Интернэт хэрэглэгчийн үйл ажиллагааны хэрэглэгчдийн хэрэглэгчдийн хувьд олон сэдэв дээр төвлөрсөн ярианы бөмбөлөгүүд ихэвчлэн ялгаатай хөгжүүлж, дараа нь бусад хүний агентуудыг нэг платформ руу нэгтгэдэг, нэгтгэх Одоо яриаг хэрэглэгчийн дэмжлэх эх үүсвэрийн хоорондоо тодорхой байдлаар шилжүүлж болно. Тэгэхээр тодорхой асуултууд цаг хугацаанд хариулах боломжтой болно. Хариултын шилжилт бол онлайн хэрэглэгчийн үйлчилгээнд чухал асуудал юм. Бидний ажил хоёр чухал асуудал гэдэг. Энэ асуудлыг шилжүүлэх, ямар бот эсвэл агентуудыг шилжүүлэх, эдгээр асуудлыг шийдэх гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд су Шинэ дэмжигчийн оноо (NPS) нь бидний судалгаа хэрэглэгчийн хариу, гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хуваарилалт болон диалогын NPS-г таамаглаж хэрхэн үр дүнтэй шийдвэрлэхийг харуулдаг. Онлайн үйлчилгээний дэмжлэх платформаас гарсан бодит өгөгдлийн туршилтын туршилт нь санал өгсөн арга зам нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны тулд илүү тодорхой ярилцлагын шилжүүлэлтийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'Fl-applikazzjonijiet tas-servizzi tal-klijenti onlajn, chatbots multipli li huma speċjalizzati f’diversi suġġetti huma tipikament żviluppati separatament u mbagħad jingħaqdu ma’ a ġenti umani oħra għal pjattaforma waħda, li tippreżenta lill-utenti b’interface unifikat. Idealment, il-konverżjoni tista’ tiġi ttrasferita b’mod trasparenti bejn sorsi differenti ta’ appoġġ għall-klijenti sabiex il-mistoqsijiet speċifiċi għad-dominju jkunu jistgħu jitwieġbu f’waqthom u dan huwa dak li nħabbru bħala simbijożi Bot-Agent. It-tranżizzjoni tal-konverżjoni hija sfida ewlenija f’dan is-servizz tal-klijenti onlajn u x-xogħol tagħna jifformalizza l-isfida bħala żewġ problemi ewlenin, jiġifieri, meta jittrasferixxu u liema robot jew a ġent jittrasferixxu lejn u jintroduċi approċċ ibbażat fuq netwerks newrali profondi li jindirizza dawn il-problemi. Inspirata mill-punteġġ nett tal-promotur (NPS), ir-riċerka tagħna turi kif il-problemi jistgħu jiġu solvuti b’mod effettiv billi tipprovdi feedback lill-utent u tiżviluppa netwerks newrali profondi li jipprevedu d-distribuzzjoni tal-kategorija ta’ konverżjoni u l-NPS tad-djalogi. L-esperimenti fuq dejta realistika ġġenerata minn pjattaforma ta’ appoġġ għas-servizz onlajn juru li l-approċċ propost huwa aktar avvanzat mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati u juri perspettiva promettenti għal tranżizzjoni trasparenti ta’ konverżjoni.', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d കസ്റ്റര്\u200d സേവനം പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പല ചട്ട്ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്ക സംസാരം വ്യത്യസ്തമായി കസ്റ്റമറിന്റെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സ്വതന്ത്രമായി മാറ്റാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഡൊമെയ സംസാരം മാറ്റുന്നത് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d കസ്റ്ററര്\u200d സേവനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വ്യാല്\u200dക്രമത്തിലാണ്. നമ്മുടെ ജോലി ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി രണ്ടു മൂ നെറ്റ് പ്രോമേറ്റര്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d (NPS) കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങളുടെ പരിശോധന വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഫിഡബ്ബാക്ക് ഉപയോക്താവ് നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനും ആഴത്തെ പ്രവർത്തി ഒരു ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സേവനത്തിന്റെ പിന്തുണയുടെ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില', 'no': 'I internett klientteneste vert fleire samtaler som er spesialisert i ulike emne vanlegvis utvikla separert og så blir saman med andre menneske agentar til ein enkelt plattform, som viser brukarane med ein eine grensesnitt. Ideelt kan samtalen verta gjennomsiktig overført mellom ulike kjelder for klientstøtte slik at domenespesifikke spørsmål kan verta svara på tidspunkt og dette er det vi fikk ut som ein bot-agent symbiosis. Samtaleovergang er ein stor utfordring i slike klienttjeneste på nettverket og arbeidet vårt formaliserer utfordringen som to kjerneproblemer, som er når å overføra og kva bot eller agent skal overføra til og introdusera ein dyp neuralnettverk basert tilnærming som handler desse problemene. På nettframsyningspoeng (NPS), forskningen vår viser korleis problemene kan løyst ved å gjera tilbakemeldingar til brukarar og utvikla dype neuralnettverk som forventar samtalekategoridistribusjonen og NPS i dialogvindauga. Eksperimentar på realistiske data laga frå ein internettstøtte- plattformat viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga utfører tilstandsmetoder og viser promiserende perspektiv for gjennomsiktig samtaleovergang.', 'pl': 'W aplikacjach obsługi klienta online wiele chatbotów specjalizujących się w różnych tematach są zazwyczaj opracowywane oddzielnie, a następnie są łączone z innymi ludzkimi agentami na jedną platformę, prezentując użytkownikom ujednolicony interfejs. Idealnie, aby rozmowa była przejrzysta pomiędzy różnymi źródłami obsługi klienta, aby odpowiedzieć na pytania specyficzne dla domeny, a właśnie to stworzyliśmy jako symbiozę Bot-Agent. Przejście do konwersacji jest dużym wyzwaniem w takiej obsłudze klienta online, a nasza praca formalizuje wyzwanie jako dwa podstawowe problemy, a mianowicie kiedy przenieść i którego bota lub agenta przenieść i wprowadza podejście oparte na głębokich sieciach neuronowych, które rozwiązuje te problemy. Zainspirowane wynikiem NPS (netto promotor score), nasze badania ujawniają, w jaki sposób problemy można skutecznie rozwiązać poprzez dostarczanie informacji zwrotnych użytkowników i rozwijanie głębokich sieci neuronowych, które przewidują rozkład kategorii rozmowy oraz NPS dialogów. Eksperymenty na realistycznych danych generowanych z platformy wsparcia usług online pokazują, że proponowane podejście przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody i pokazuje obiecującą perspektywę przejrzystego przejścia do konwersacji.', 'ro': 'În aplicațiile de serviciu online pentru clienți, mai mulți chatbots specializați în diferite subiecte sunt de obicei dezvoltate separat și sunt apoi fuzionate cu alți agenți umani într-o singură platformă, prezentând utilizatorilor o interfață unificată. În mod ideal conversația poate fi transferată transparent între diferite surse de asistență pentru clienți, astfel încât întrebările specifice domeniului să poată fi răspuns la timp și aceasta este ceea ce am inventat ca simbioză Bot-Agent. Tranziția conversației reprezintă o provocare majoră în astfel de servicii online pentru clienți, iar munca noastră formalizează provocarea ca două probleme esențiale, și anume, atunci când să transferăm și care bot sau agent să transferăm și introduce o abordare bazată pe rețele neurale profunde, care abordează aceste probleme. Inspirată de scorul promoter net (NPS), cercetarea noastră dezvăluie modul în care problemele pot fi rezolvate eficient prin furnizarea feedback-ului utilizatorilor și dezvoltarea rețelelor neuronale profunde care prezic distribuția categoriilor de conversație și NPS-ul dialogurilor. Experimentele pe date realiste generate de o platformă de asistență pentru servicii online demonstrează că abordarea propusă depășește metodele de ultimă generație și arată o perspectivă promițătoare pentru tranziția transparentă a conversației.', 'si': 'ඉන්ලයින් ග්\u200dරාහක සේවා වැඩසටහන් වලින් විශේෂ විදිහට විශේෂ විදිහට විශේෂ විදිහට විකාශ කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ අනිත් මිනිස් නියෝජ අදහස් විදිහට කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහය සම්බන්ධයක් අතර ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනස් විද සංවාදය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තමයි අන්තර්ජ ප්\u200dරයෝජන සේවයේ ප්\u200dරධාන අභ්\u200dයාගයක් වෙන්නේ. අපේ වැඩේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් මුළු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ජාල ප්\u200dරධානකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය (NPS), අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200d අන්ලයින් සේවාව සහය ප්ලේටෆ්ටෝම් එකෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ කි', 'sv': 'I onlinekundserviceapplikationer utvecklas vanligtvis flera chatbots som är specialiserade på olika ämnen separat och slås sedan samman med andra mänskliga agenter till en enda plattform och presenterar för användarna med ett enhetligt gränssnitt. Helst kan konversationen överföras transparent mellan olika källor till kundsupport så att domänspecifika frågor kan besvaras i rätt tid och detta är vad vi myntade som en Bot-Agent symbios. Konversationsövergången är en stor utmaning i sådan kundservice online och vårt arbete formaliserar utmaningen som två kärnproblem, nämligen när man ska överföra och vilken bot eller agent man ska överföra till och introducerar ett djupt neuralt nätverk baserat tillvägagångssätt som tar itu med dessa problem. Inspirerad av Net Promoter Score (NPS), visar vår forskning hur problemen kan lösas effektivt genom att ge användarfeedback och utveckla djupa neurala nätverk som förutspår konversationskategorifördelningen och NPS i dialogerna. Experiment på realistiska data genererade från en stödplattform för onlinetjänster visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet överträffar de senaste metoderna och visar lovande perspektiv för transparent konversationsövergripande.', 'sr': 'U aplikacijama internetske klijentske usluge, višestruke razgovore koje su specijalizovane u različitim temama obično se razvijaju odvojeno, a zatim se povezuju sa drugim ljudskim agentima na jednoj platformi, predstavljajući korisnikima sa ujedinjenim interfejsom. Idealno razgovor može biti transparentno prenesen između različitih izvora podrške klijenata tako da se na vreme odgovaraju pitanja specifičnih domena, a to je ono što smo našli kao simbioza bot-agenta. Transicija razgovora je veliki izazov u takvoj online klijentskoj službi i naš rad formalizira izazov kao dva temeljna problema, a to je, kada da prebacimo i koji robot ili agent da prebaci na i predstavi dubok neuralni pristup na temelju mreže koji se rješava ovim problemima. Naše istraživanje pokazuje kako se problemi mogu efektivno rešiti pružanjem reakcije korisnika i razvojom dubokih neuralnih mreža koji predviđaju distribuciju kategorije razgovora i NPS dijaloga. Eksperimenti o reālističkim podacima koji su proizvedeni iz platforme podrške internetske usluge pokazuju da predloženi pristup iznosi metode države umjetnosti i pokazuju obećavajuću perspektivu za transparentnu razgovor.', 'so': "Adeegyada adeegga macaamiisha ee internetka ah waxaa si caadiga ah loo horumariyaa macluumaadyo kala duduwan, markaasna waxaa lagu wadaa macaamiisha kale oo qof ah oo hal jardiino ah, waxayna isticmaalayaasha isku xir ah. Talobixinta waxaa si cad looga wareejin karaa noocyada caawimaadda kala duduwan, si loo jawaabo su'aalo gaar ah oo domain-ka ah, taasina waa waxa aannu u qornay qoraalka labada-Agent symbiosis. Talobixinta waa dhibaato weyn, sida adeega macaamiisha ee internetka ah, shaqadeeduna waxay u formalisaa dhibaatada sida labo dhibaato dhexe ah, waa goorma la wareejiyo iyo iyo qofka dhaqaalaha ah in loo soo wareejiyo iyo iyo in uu soo bandhigaa shabakad aad u dheer oo cawinaad ah, kaas oo macaamiisha dhibaatooyinkaas ka shaqeeya. Shahaadada koritaanka ee shabakadda (NPS), baaritaankeennu wuxuu muujin karaa sida dhibaatooyinka ay u xalli karto si effective ah, sida loo siiyo feedbacka isticmaalaha iyo horumarinta shabakado deegaan oo ka hormariya qayb-qaybinta sameynta iyo kala qaybsiga dialogueyda. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka xaqiiqnimada ee laga soo dhashay qorshaha kaalmada adeegga ee internetka waxay muujiyaan in qaababka la soo jeedo uu sameeyo qaababka farshaxanka iyo wuxuu tusiyaa aragtida loo ballanqaado in la soo wareejiyo hadalka muuqashada.", 'ur': 'اکثر باتبوٹ جو مختلف موضوع میں مختلف طریقے سے مختلف طریقے کی گئی ہیں، ان کے بعد دوسرے انسان اگنٹوں کے ساتھ ایک پلٹورم پر ملے جاتے ہیں، ایک طریقے طریقے سے استعمال کرنے والوں کو نمایش دیتے ہیں. نظریہ سے بات مشترک مدد کے مختلف سوسوں کے درمیان روشن طور پر تغییر کی جاسکتی ہے تاکہ ڈومین کے مطابق سوال وقت کے طور پر جواب دیں اور یہ ہے کہ ہم نے Bot-Agent symbiosis کے طور پر پیدا کیا ہے. تبلیغ کی تغییر اس طرح کی آنلاین کائینٹ سرویس میں ایک بڑی چال ہے اور ہمارا کام دو اصلی مشکلات کے مطابق چال کا فرمول کرتا ہے، یعنی کب تغییر کرنا اور کون بوٹ یا اگنٹ کی طرف تغییر کرنا اور ایک عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی طرح پیش کرنا ہماری تحقیقات ظاہر کرتی ہے کہ مشکلات کس طرح اثرات کے ساتھ حل کر سکتے ہیں اور عمیق نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک کی توسعہ کے ذریعہ جو بحث کاٹیوں کے تقسیم اور ڈالگوں کے NPS کو پیش بینی کرتی ہیں۔ اولاین سرویس سپارٹ پلٹورم سے پیدا ہوئے واقعی ڈیٹوں کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا موجود طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے اور پورشیدہ صحبت کی تغییر کے لئے وعدہ دینے والی نظر دکھاتی ہے.', 'ta': 'இணைய சேவையகத்தின் பயன்பாடு குறிப்பிட்ட கேள்விகள் குறிப்பிட்ட நேரத்திற்கு பதில் அளிக்கும் பொது மெஜன்ட் சைம்பியோஸ் என்று நாம் கொண்டுள்ளோம். பேச்சு மாற்றம் என்பது ஒரு மிகப் பெரிய சவால்வால்தான் ஆன்லைன் பயனர் சேவையில் மற்றும் எங்கள் வேலை இரண்டு மூல பிரச்சனைகளாக வடிவமைக்கும், அதாவது, எப்போது மாற்றும் பாட் அல் வலைப்பின் மேம்பாட்டு புள்ளி ஒரு இணைய சேவை ஆதரவு முறைமையிலிருந்து உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உண்மையான தகவல்களின் சோதனைகள் தெரிவிக்கிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை செயல்படுத்தும் மற', 'uz': "Name Ko'rsatganda, muloqat boshqa kundalik manbalar orasidan o'zgartirish mumkin va domen-specific savollari vaqtda javob berishi mumkin va bu biz Bot-Agent symbiosis deb hisoblangan. Суҳбат ўзгартириш, интернет хизматкорида катта қийинчилик ва ишимиз икки асосий маслаҳатларни формациялашади, чунки, ушбу маслаҳатларни кўчириш ва қачон кўчириш ёки таҳдид этиш учун катта таркиб тармоқларни кўрсатиш ва ушбу мушкилларни тўғрилаш учун бажаришга эга бўлиши мумкин. Name Name", 'vi': 'Trong các ứng dụng dịch vụ khách hàng trực tuyến, nhiều phím chat chuyên về các chủ đề khác thường được phát triển riêng và sau đó được ghép với các nhân viên khác đến một bục trình bày cho người dùng với một giao diện thống nhất. Lý tưởng nhất là cuộc nói chuyện có thể được truyền đi trong sáng suốt giữa các nguồn hỗ trợ khách hàng khác nhau để câu hỏi cụ thể được trả lời đúng thời điểm và đây là những gì chúng tôi nghĩ ra như một mang tính tượng Bot-Đặc vụ. Giao dịch chuyển tiếp là một thử thách lớn trong dịch vụ khách hàng trực tuyến và công việc của chúng ta chính thức thực hiện thử thách như là hai vấn đề cốt lõi, cụ thể là khi nào nên chuyển giao, và là robot hay điệp viên để chuyển đến và tạo ra một phương pháp mạng thần kinh sâu để giải quyết những vấn đề này. Nguồn cảm hứng từ công ty phát sóng mạng (NPR) của chúng tôi tiết lộ các vấn đề có thể được giải quyết bằng cách cung cấp phản hồi của người dùng và phát triển các mạng lưới thần kinh sâu dự đoán phân phối phân loại đối thoại và NPR của các ca thoại. Thử nghiệm về dữ liệu thực tế được tạo ra từ một nền tảng hỗ trợ dịch vụ trực tuyến cho thấy phương pháp được áp dụng hiện đại và cho thấy triển vọng trong việc chuyển đổi hội thoại trong suốt.', 'da': 'I online kundeservice applikationer udvikles flere chatbots, der er specialiseret i forskellige emner, typisk separat og fusioneres derefter med andre menneskelige agenter til en enkelt platform, der præsenterer brugerne med en samlet grænseflade. Ideelt set kan samtalen overføres gennemsigtigt mellem forskellige kilder til kundesupport, så domænespecifikke spørgsmål kan besvares rettidigt, og det er, hvad vi opfandt som en Bot-Agent symbiose. Samtaleomstilling er en stor udfordring i en sådan online kundeservice, og vores arbejde formaliserer udfordringen som to kerneproblemer, nemlig hvornår man skal overføre og hvilken bot eller agent der skal overføres til og introducerer en dyb neurale netværksbaseret tilgang, der løser disse problemer. Inspireret af Net Promoter Score (NPS) afslører vores forskning, hvordan problemerne effektivt kan løses ved at give brugerfeedback og udvikle dybe neurale netværk, der forudsiger samtalekategoriefordelingen og NPS i dialogerne. Eksperimenter med realistiske data genereret fra en online service support platform viser, at den foreslåede tilgang overgår state-of-the-art metoder og viser lovende perspektiv for gennemsigtig samtaleoverstilling.', 'hr': 'U aplikacijama internetske klijentske usluge, višestruke razgovore koje su specijalizirane u različitim temama obično se razvijaju odvojeno, a zatim se zajednostavljaju s drugim ljudskim agentima na jednoj platformi, predstavljajući korisnikima s ujedinjenim interfejsom. Idealno razgovor može biti transparentno prenesen između različitih izvora potpore mušterija tako da se na vrijeme odgovore na specifična pitanja domena, a to je ono što smo našli kao simbiosis bot-agenta. Prijenos razgovora je veliki izazov u takvoj internetskoj klijentskoj službi i naš rad formalizira izazov kao dva temeljna problema, a to je kada prenijeti i koji robot ili agent prebaciti na i predstavljati dubok pristup na temelju neuronskih mreža koji rješava te probleme. Naše istraživanje pokazuje kako se problemi mogu učinkovito riješiti osiguranjem povratka korisnika i razvojom dubokih neuralnih mreža koji predviđaju distribuciju kategorije razgovora i NPS dijaloga. Eksperimenti o realnim podacima koji su proizvedeni iz platforme podrške internetske usluge pokazuju da predloženi pristup nadmašuje metode države umjetnosti i pokazuje obećavajuću perspektivu prijenosa transparentnog razgovora.', 'de': 'In Online-Kundendienstanwendungen werden in der Regel mehrere Chatbots, die auf verschiedene Themen spezialisiert sind, separat entwickelt und dann mit anderen menschlichen Agenten zu einer einzigen Plattform zusammengeführt und den Benutzern eine einheitliche Oberfläche präsentiert. Idealerweise kann das Gespräch transparent zwischen verschiedenen Quellen des Kundensupports übertragen werden, so dass domänenspezifische Fragen zeitnah beantwortet werden können und das haben wir als Bot-Agent-Symbiose geprägt. Conversation Transition ist eine große Herausforderung in einem solchen Online-Kundenservice und unsere Arbeit formalisiert die Herausforderung als zwei Kernprobleme, nämlich, wann zu übertragen und welchen Bot oder Agent zu übertragen ist und führt einen Deep Neuron Networks basierten Ansatz ein, der diese Probleme adressiert. Inspiriert vom Net Promoter Score (NPS) zeigt unsere Forschung, wie die Probleme effektiv gelöst werden können, indem Nutzer Feedback geben und tiefe neuronale Netze entwickeln, die die Verteilung der Konversationskategorien und den NPS der Dialoge vorhersagen. Experimente mit realistischen Daten, die von einer Online-Service-Support-Plattform generiert werden, zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz modernste Methoden übertrifft und vielversprechende Perspektiven für einen transparenten Konversationsübergang aufzeigt.', 'bg': 'В онлайн приложения за обслужване на клиенти, множество чатботи, специализирани в различни теми, обикновено се разработват отделно и след това се сливат с други човешки агенти в една платформа, представяйки на потребителите унифициран интерфейс. В идеалния случай разговорът може да бъде прозрачно прехвърлен между различни източници на поддръжка на клиенти, така че специфичните за домейна въпроси да могат да бъдат отговорени навреме и това е, което измислихме като симбиоза бот-агент. Преходът на разговорите е голямо предизвикателство в такова онлайн обслужване на клиенти и нашата работа формализира предизвикателството като два основни проблема, а именно кога да прехвърлим и кой бот или агент да прехвърлим и въвежда подход, базиран на дълбоки невронни мрежи, който решава тези проблеми. Вдъхновени от нетния промоутър скор (НПС), нашето изследване разкрива как проблемите могат да бъдат ефективно решени чрез предоставяне на обратна връзка от потребителите и разработване на дълбоки невронни мрежи, които предсказват разпределението на категориите разговори и НПС на диалозите. Експерименти с реалистични данни, генерирани от платформа за поддръжка на онлайн услуги, показват, че предложеният подход превъзхожда най-съвременните методи и показва обещаваща перспектива за прозрачен преход на разговора.', 'nl': 'In online customer service applicaties worden meerdere chatbots die gespecialiseerd zijn in verschillende onderwerpen meestal afzonderlijk ontwikkeld en vervolgens samengevoegd met andere menselijke agenten tot een enkel platform, waardoor de gebruikers een uniforme interface krijgen. Idealiter kan het gesprek transparant worden overgedragen tussen verschillende bronnen van klantenondersteuning, zodat domeinspecifieke vragen tijdig kunnen worden beantwoord en dit is wat we hebben bedacht als een Bot-Agent symbiose. Gesprekstransitie is een grote uitdaging in dergelijke online klantenservice en ons werk formaliseert de uitdaging als twee kernproblemen, namelijk wanneer te overbrengen en welke bot of agent over te zetten naar en introduceert een diepe neurale netwerkbenadering die deze problemen aanpakt. Geïnspireerd op de net promotor score (NPS), onthult ons onderzoek hoe de problemen effectief kunnen worden opgelost door gebruikersfeedback te geven en diepe neurale netwerken te ontwikkelen die de gesprekscategorieverdeling en de NPS van de dialogen voorspellen. Experimenten met realistische data gegenereerd vanuit een online service support platform tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak beter presteert dan state-of-the-art methoden en veelbelovend perspectief toont voor een transparante conversatie transitie.', 'ko': '온라인 고객 서비스 응용 프로그램에서 여러 개의 각종 주제를 전문적으로 연구하는 채팅 로봇은 일반적으로 단독으로 개발한 다음에 다른 인공 에이전트와 한 플랫폼에 합병하여 사용자에게 통일된 인터페이스를 제공한다.이상적인 상황에서 대화는 서로 다른 고객 지원 원천 간에 투명하게 전달되어 특정 분야의 질문에 신속하게 대답할 수 있다. 이것이 바로 우리가 창조한 로봇-대리공생관계이다.대화 전환은 이러한 온라인 고객 서비스의 주요 도전이다. 우리의 업무는 이 도전을 두 가지 핵심 문제, 즉 언제 어떤 로봇이나 에이전트로 옮기고 심도 있는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 방법을 도입하여 이러한 문제를 해결한다.순 발기인 득점(NPS)의 계발을 받아 우리의 연구는 사용자 피드백을 제공하고 예측 대화 유형의 분포와 NPS의 심층 신경 네트워크를 개발함으로써 문제를 효과적으로 해결하는 방법을 제시했다.온라인 서비스 지원 플랫폼에서 생성된 실제 데이터에 대한 실험에서 이 방법은 기존의 방법보다 우수하고 투명한 세션 전환의 전망을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Dalam aplikasi layanan pelanggan online, banyak chatbot yang spesialisasi dalam berbagai topik biasanya dikembangkan secara terpisah dan kemudian bergabung dengan agen manusia lainnya ke platform tunggal, memperkenalkan kepada pengguna dengan antarmuka yang bersatu. Idealnya percakapan dapat dipindahkan secara transparan diantara sumber dukungan pelanggan yang berbeda sehingga pertanyaan-domain spesifik dapat dijawab tepat waktu dan inilah yang kami ciptakan sebagai simbiosis Bot-Agent. Transisi konversasi adalah tantangan utama dalam layanan pelanggan online seperti itu dan pekerjaan kita formalisasi tantangan sebagai dua masalah utama, yaitu, kapan untuk dipindahkan dan mana robot atau agen untuk dipindahkan ke dan memperkenalkan pendekatan jaringan saraf yang berdasarkan mendalam yang mengatasi masalah ini. Terinspirasi oleh skor promotor net (NPS), penelitian kami mengungkapkan bagaimana masalah dapat diselesaikan secara efektif dengan menyediakan feedback pengguna dan mengembangkan jaringan saraf dalam yang memprediksi distribusi kategori percakapan dan NPS dari dialog. Eksperimen pada data realistis yang dihasilkan dari platform dukungan layanan online menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan melebihi metode state-of-the-art dan menunjukkan perspektif yang berjanji untuk transisi percakapan transparan.', 'fa': 'در کاربردهای خدمات مشتریان آنلاین، چندین صحبت\u200cهای مختلف که در موضوع مختلف متخصص هستند، معمولاً جداً توسعه می\u200cشوند و سپس با دیگر ماموران انسانی به یک پلاتورم متحد می\u200cشوند، و به کاربر با یک interface ی متحد نشان می\u200cدهند. به نظر نظر این مکالمه می تواند بین منبع مختلف پشتیبانی مشتریان را تغییر داده شود تا سوالات مختلف دامنه به زمان جواب داده شود و این چیزی است که ما به عنوان نشانه\u200cهای مامور بوت تغییر دادیم. تغییر گفتگو یک چالش بزرگی در این خدمت مشتری\u200cهای آنلاین است و کار ما چالش را به عنوان دو مشکل اصلی فرموده می\u200cکند، یعنی زمانی که تغییر دهیم و کدام ربات یا مامور انتقال به شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق به این مشکلات را معرفی می\u200cکند. تحقیقات ما توسط امتیاز ترفیع\u200cکننده\u200cی شبکه (NPS) نشان می\u200cدهد که چگونه مشکلات را با تهیه\u200cدادن واکنش\u200cهای کاربر و توسعه\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق\u200cای که توسعه\u200cهای قسمت گفتگو و NPS از گفتگوها پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند، با توسعه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای واقعی که تولید شده از یک پلاکتر پشتیبانی خدمات آنلاین نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش پیشنهاد روش\u200cهای هنری را انجام می\u200cدهد و دیدگاه\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده برای تغییر گفتگوی شفاف را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Katika matumizi ya huduma za wateja mtandaoni, michango mbalimbali ambazo huwekwa maalumu katika mada mbalimbali hupandishwa kwa namna tofauti na kisha huungana na maafisa wengine wa binadamu kwenye jukwaa moja, na kuwaonyesha watumiaji wenye sura ya pamoja. Kadhalika mazungumzo yanaweza kuhamishwa kwa uwazi kati ya vyanzo mbalimbali vya wateja ili maswali maalum ya ndani yanaweza kujibu kwa muda na hivi ndicho tulichotengeneza kama symbiosi ya Shirika la Bot-Agent. Conversation transition is a major challenge in such online customer service and our work formalises the challenge as two core problems, namely, when to transfer and which bot or agent to transfer to and introduces a deep neural networks based approach that addresses these problems.  Tafiti zetu zinaonyesha jinsi matatizo yanavyoweza kutatua kwa ufanisi kwa kutoa maoni ya watumiaji na kutengeneza mitandao ya kijamii yenye kutabiri usambazaji wa makundi ya mazungumzo na NPS ya mazungumzo. Majaribio kuhusu takwimu halisi zilizotengenezwa kutoka kwenye jukwaa la msaada wa huduma za mtandaoni zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinafanya mbinu za sanaa na zinaonyesha mtazamo wa mazungumzo ya uwazi.', 'tr': 'Çaltyn müşterileriň häsiýetlerinde, birnäçe temalarda özellikli soňra a ýratyn we soňra başga adamlary ajaýyrlar we ýekeje platform bilen bir topar bilen birleşirilýär we ullançylara birleşik bir interfeje görkezilýär. Düýbünden sohbet müşterileriň dürli kaynaklary arasynda transparent göçürülebilir we şonuň üçin domenyň spesifikaly soraglary wagtynda jogap berilebilir we bu biziň Bot-Ajan simbosisi ýaly kabul etdiğimiz zadymyz. Qonuşma geçişi ýaly internet müşterileriň hökmünde esasy kynçylyk döwüridir we işimiz bu kynçylyklary çözmekde iki esasy meseleler ýaly kynçylygy formallaýar. Şu ýagdaýda haçan, haýsy bot ýa-da ajaýyşy göçürmek we nuýral şebekleriň derejesini çykarmak Net töwekiliçi sanatynyň (NPS) tarapyndan nähili kynçylyklaryň üstüne çözilmesini ukyplaýar we uzaklaşyk netijesi täsirleýän nural şebekelerini öňden çykarýar. Çaltylyk häsiýet golaýatyndan döredilen realistik maglumatlaryň örän tejribeleri görkezýär. Bu teklip teklip edilen ýagdaýyň durumyny ýok edip, we transparent söhbet geçişidigine söz berýän perspektivini görkezýär.', 'af': "In aanlyn kliënte diens toepassings word veelvuldige geselskappe wat in verskillende onderwerpe spesialiseer is tipik ontwikkeld aparte en dan word saamgekoppel met ander menslike agente na 'n enkele platform a, wat aan die gebruikers met 'n eeneenvoudige koppelvlak voorsien word. Ideeel kan die gesprek deursigtig oordra word tussen verskillende bronne van kliënt ondersteun sodat domein-spesifieke vrae tydelik antwoord kan word en dit is wat ons gekom het as 'n Bot-agent simbiosis. Gespraak oorgang is 'n groot uitdaging in sodanige online kliëntsdiens en ons werk formaliseer die uitdaging as twee core probleme, bedoel wanneer om te oordra en wat bot of agent om te oordra na en introduseer 'n diep neuralnetwerk gebaseerde toegang wat hierdie probleme adreseer. Inspirasie deur die net promoter aantal (NPS), ons ondersoek vertel hoe die probleme effektief kan wees opgelos deur gebruiker terugmelding en die ontwikkeling van diep neuralnetwerke wat die gesprek kategorie verspreiding en die NPS van die dialoog voorskou. Eksperimente op realistiese data genereer van 'n onlinese diens ondersteunde platforma bevestig dat die voorgestelde toegang uitvoer staat-van-kuns metodes en wys beloftende perspektief vir deursigtig gesprek-oorgang.", 'sq': 'Në aplikimet e shërbimit të klientëve në internet, shumë chatbot që janë të specializuar në temë të ndryshme janë zhvilluar tipikisht veçanërisht dhe pastaj bashkohen me agjentë njerëzorë të tjerë në një platform ë të vetme, duke u paraqitur përdoruesve me një interfaqe të unifikuar. Idealisht biseda mund të transferohet në mënyrë transparente midis burimeve të ndryshme të mbështetjes së klientëve në mënyrë që pyetjet specifike në domeni të përgjigjen në kohë të duhur dhe kjo është ajo që ne krijuam si një simbiozë Bot-Agent. Tranzicioni i bisedimeve është një sfidë e madhe në shërbimin e tillë të klientëve online dhe puna jonë formalizon sfidën si dy probleme kryesore, veçanërisht, kur të transferohemi dhe cili robot apo agjent të transferohet dhe të futë një qasje të thellë të rrjeteve nervore që trajton këto probleme. Inspiruar nga rezultati i promotorëve të rrjetit (NPS), kërkimi ynë zbulon se si problemet mund të zgjidhen efektivisht duke ofruar feedback të përdoruesve dhe duke zhvilluar rrjete të thella nervore që parashikojnë shpërndarjen e kategorisë së bisedës dhe NPS të dialogut. Eksperimentet mbi të dhënat realiste të gjeneruara nga një platform ë mbështetjeje e shërbimit online demonstrojnë se qasja e propozuar ekziston në mënyra më të larta dhe tregon perspektivë premtuese për tranzicionin transparent të bisedimeve.', 'hy': 'Օնլայն հաճախորդների ծառայությունների ծրագրերում բազմաթիվ շտաբոտներ, որոնք հատուկ են տարբեր թեմաների վրա, սովորաբար առանձին են զարգացվում և հետո միավորվում են այլ մարդկային գործակալների հետ մեկ հարթակի վրա, ներկայացնում են օգտագործողներին միավոր ինտերֆե Ideally the conversation can be transparently transferred between different sources of customer support so that domain-specific questions can be answered timely and this is what we coined as a Bot-Agent symbiosis.  Խոսակցությունների փոխանցումը մեծ մարտահրավեր է այդպիսի առցանց հաճախորդների ծառայության մեջ, և մեր աշխատանքը ձևավորում է մարտահրավերը որպես երկու հիմնական խնդիր, հատկապես, երբ փոխանցել և ո՞ր ռոբոտ կամ գործակալ փոխանցել և ներկայացնել խորը նյարդային ցանցեր հիմնված մոտե Հոգեշնչված Net-աջակցող գնահատականով մեր հետազոտությունները բացահայտում են, թե ինչպես կարող են խնդիրները արդյունավետ լուծվել օգտագործողների հետ կապված արձագանքներով և զարգացնելով խորը նյարդային ցանցեր, որոնք կանխատեսում են խոսակցության կատեգորիայի բաշխման Անցանց ծառայությունների աջակցության պլատֆորմացիայից ստեղծված իրական տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մոտեցումը գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր մեթոդներին և ցույց է տալիս խոստացնող տեսանկյունին թափանցի', 'am': 'በመንግሥት የአገልጋሪ አገልግሎት ፕሮግራሞች፣ በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ የተለየ ብዙዎች የተለየ አካባቢዎች በተለየ እና በተለየ እና በተጨማሪም የሰው አካላት በተለየ እና በተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚዎችን በተጠቃሚ ማቀናጃ እና በተለየ አንድ ፕላጦማር ላይ የተጠቀሙ ናቸው፡፡ አዲስ ንግግር በተለየ የአጋራጆች ድጋፍ መካከል ግልፅ ሊለወጥ ይችላል፡፡ Conversation transition is a major challenge in such online customer service and our work formalises the challenge as two core problems, namely, when to transfer and which bot or agent to transfer to and introduces a deep neural networks based approach that addresses these problems.  የመረብ አካባቢ ነጥብ (NPS) የተገኘ፣ ምርመራችን የጠቅላቅ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ እና የንግግር ክፍል ክፍተቶችን እና የNPS አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን ጥልቅ የናዌብ መረብ መፍጠር እንዴት እንደሚችል ያስታውቃል፡፡ የኢንተርኔት አገልግሎት የድጋፍ መድረክ ላይ የሚወስደውን እውነተኛ ዳታ መፈተናዎች የሥርዓቱን-የልዩ ልማድ እንዲያሳየው እና የግልፅ ንግግር መተላለፊያ የሚገልጽ ስሜት እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'ca': "En aplicacions de servei de clients en línia, múltiples chatbots especialitzats en diversos temes es desenvolupen per separat i es fusionen amb altres agents humans en una sola plataforma, presentant als usuaris una interfície unificada. Idealment, la conversa es pot transferir de manera transparent entre diverses fonts de suport al client per poder respondre a preguntes específices per domini en temps oportun i això és el que vam crear com una simbiosi Bot-Agent. La transició de conversa és un repte important en aquest servei de clients en línia i la nostra feina formalitza el repte com a dos problemes fonamentals, a saber, quan transferir i quin robot o agent transferir i introduir un enfocament basat en xarxes neurals profunds que aborda aquests problemes. Inspirada per la puntuació del promotor net (NPS), la nostra recerca revela com els problemes poden ser resolds efectivament proporcionant feedback dels usuaris i desenvolupant redes neuronales profundes que predien la distribució de la categoria de conversa i el NPS dels diàlegs. Els experiments de dades realistes generades d'una plataforma de suport al servei on-line demostren que l'enfocament proposat supera els mètodes més avançats i mostra perspectives prometedores de transició transparent de converses.", 'bs': 'U aplikacijama usluga interneta klijenata, višestruke razgovore koje su specijalizovane u različitim temama obično se razvijaju odvojeno, a zatim se povezuju sa drugim ljudskim agentima na jednoj platformi, predstavljajući korisnikima sa ujedinjenim interfejsom. Idealno razgovor može biti transparentno prenesen između različitih izvora podrške klijenata tako da se na vrijeme odgovaraju pitanja specifičnih domena, a to je ono što smo našli kao simbiosis bot-agenta. Prijenos razgovora je veliki izazov u takvoj online klijentskoj službi i naš rad formalizira izazov kao dvije temeljne probleme, a to je, kada da prebacimo i koji robot ili agent da prebaci na i predstavi dubok neuralni pristup na temelju mreže koji se rješava ovim problemima. Naše istraživanje pokazuje kako se problemi mogu efektivno riješiti pružanjem reakcije korisnika i razvojom dubokih neuralnih mreža koji predviđaju distribuciju kategorije razgovora i NPS dijaloga. Eksperimenti o realnim podacima koji su proizvedeni iz platforme podrške internetske usluge pokazuju da predloženi pristup nadmašuje metode države umjetnosti i pokazuje obećavajuću perspektivu za transparentnu razgovor.', 'bn': 'অনলাইন ক্যাস্টমার সেবা অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে বিশেষজ্ঞ বেশ কয়েকটি চ্যাটবোট সাধারণত বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে উন্নয়ন করা হয় এবং তারপর অন্যান্য মানুষের এজেন্টে পরিকল্পনায় কথোপকথন স্পষ্টভাবে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন কাস্টমারের সমর্থনের উৎসের মধ্যে পরিবর্তন করা যায় যাতে ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট প্রশ্ন সময়ই উত্তর দেয়া যায় আলোচনা হচ্ছে অনলাইন ক্যাস্টার সার্ভিসের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং আমাদের কাজ দুটি মূল সমস্যা হিসেবে আমাদের চ্যালেঞ্জ ফরমাল করে দেয়, যেমন, কখন পরিবর্তন করা হবে এবং ক আমাদের গবেষণা প্রকাশ করেছে কিভাবে ব্যবহারকারীদের ফিডব্যাক এবং গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে সমস্যা সমাধান করা যায়, যা আলোচনার বিভাগ বিতরণ এবং ডায়ালগের NPS অনলাইন সার্ভিসের সমর্থন প্লাটফর্ম থেকে বাস্তবতা নিয়ে বাস্তবতার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপের র রাষ্ট', 'az': 'İnternet müşterilərin hizmətlərində, müxtəlif məsələlərdə xüsusiyyətli çoxlu sohbot ayrı-ayrı təşkil edilir və sonra digər insan agentları ilə birlikdə bir platform a birlikdə birlikdə istifadəçilərə təşkil edilir. İddiaylı olaraq, müşterilərin dəstəklərinin müxtəlif mənbələri arasında müzakirə edilə bilər ki, domain-specific suallarını zamanında cavab verilir və bu bizim Bot-Agent simbolu kimi yaratdığımız şey. Qonuşma dəyişiklikləri böyük online müşterilər servisində böyük bir çətinlikdir və işimiz bu problemlərə çəkinən ən çətinlikləri kimi formalizəyir. İnternet promotor score (NPS) ilə təşkil edildi, araştırmalarımız, istifadəçilərin geri cavab verməsi və dərin nöral ağlarını təşkil etmək üçün problemlərin necə efektiv çəkilməsini göstərir. İnternett servis dəstək platformundan ürəklənmiş reālistik məlumatların təcrübələri təcrübə etdiyi təcrübə metodların eyni olduğunu göstərir və vədləşdirən müzakirə keçirmək üçün vəd verən perspektivi göstərir.', 'cs': 'V on-line aplikacích zákaznického servisu se více chatbotů specializovaných na různá témata obvykle vyvíjí samostatně a pak jsou sloučeny s ostatními lidskými agenty do jedné platformy a prezentují uživatelům jednotné rozhraní. V ideálním případě může být konverzace transparentně přenášena mezi různými zdroji zákaznické podpory, aby mohly být včas zodpovězeny otázky specifické pro doménu, což je to, co jsme vytvořili jako symbióza Bot-Agent. Přechod konverzace je velkou výzvou v takovém online zákaznickém servisu a naše práce formalizuje tuto výzvu jako dva hlavní problémy, konkrétně kdy přenést a kterého bota nebo agenta přenést a zavádí hluboký přístup založený na neuronových sítích, který řeší tyto problémy. Náš výzkum inspirovaný NPS (netto promotor score) ukazuje, jak lze problémy efektivně řešit poskytováním uživatelské zpětné vazby a vývojem hlubokých neuronových sítí, které předpovídají distribuci konverzačních kategorií a NPS dialogů. Experimenty na realistických datech generovaných z platformy podpory online služeb ukazují, že navržený přístup překonává nejmodernější metody a ukazuje slibnou perspektivu pro transparentní konverzaci.', 'et': 'Veebiklienditeeninduse rakendustes töötatakse tavaliselt eraldi välja mitu erinevatele teemadele spetsialiseerunud chatboti ning seejärel ühendatakse teiste inimagentidega ühele platvormile, esitades kasutajatele ühtse liidese. Ideaalis saab vestlust läbipaistvalt üle kanda erinevate klienditoe allikate vahel, nii et domeenispetsiifilistele küsimustele vastatakse õigeaegselt ja see on see, mida me mõtlesime bot-agendi sümbioosiks. Vestluse üleminek on sellises online-klienditeeninduses suur väljakutse ja meie töö vormistab väljakutse kahe põhiprobleemina, nimelt millal üle kanda ja millisesse boti või agenti üle kanda ning tutvustab sügavatel närvivõrkudel põhinevat lähenemisviisi, mis lahendab neid probleeme. Inspireerituna Net Promoter Score (NPS) näitab meie uurimus, kuidas probleeme saab tõhusalt lahendada, andes kasutajatele tagasisidet ja arendades sügavaid neurovõrke, mis ennustavad vestluskategooriate jaotumist ja dialoogide NPS-i. Veebiteenuste tugiplatvormilt loodud realistlike andmete eksperimendid näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab kaasaegseid meetodeid ja näitab paljutõotavat perspektiivi läbipaistvaks vestlusele üleminekuks.', 'fi': 'Verkkoasiakaspalvelusovelluksissa useat eri aiheisiin erikoistuneet chatbotit kehitetään yleensä erikseen ja yhdistetään sitten muiden ihmisagenttien kanssa yhdeksi alustaksi, jossa käyttäjille esitetään yhtenäinen käyttöliittymä. Ihanteellisessa tapauksessa keskustelu voidaan siirtää läpinäkyvästi eri asiakastuen lähteiden välillä, jotta verkkotunnuskohtaisiin kysymyksiin voidaan vastata oikea-aikaisesti ja juuri tätä keksimme bot-agentti-symbioosiksi. Keskustelun siirtyminen on merkittävä haaste tällaisessa verkkopalvelussa ja työmme formalisoi haasteen kahdeksi ydinongelmaksi, eli milloin siirtää ja mihin bottiin tai agenttiin siirtää ja ottaa käyttöön syvään neuroverkkoihin perustuvan lähestymistavan, joka käsittelee näitä ongelmia. NPS:n (Net Promoter Score) innoittamana tutkimuksemme paljastaa, miten ongelmat voidaan ratkaista tehokkaasti antamalla käyttäjäpalautetta ja kehittämällä syviä hermoverkkoja, jotka ennustavat keskustelukategorian jakautumista ja dialogien NPS:ää. Verkkopalvelutukialustan realistisella datalla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa ylittää huipputason menetelmät ja näyttää lupaavan näkökulman avoimeen keskusteluun siirtymiseen.', 'ha': "Daga shiryoyin shiryoyin ayuka na ɗabi'a, masu buƙata masu da aka ƙayyade masu buƙata masu cikin masu buƙata, ana buɗe su da ɗabi'a, kuma ana haɗa masu adadin mutum zuwa wata platform guda, sunã gaya wa masu amfani da wata haɗa fuskar kwamfyuta. Kayya, za'a iya motsa mazaɓa wajen bayani a tsakanin sourcen daban-daban na ɗabi'a, dõmin a iya karɓa wa masu tambayar masu husika da lokaci, kuma kamar wannan ne muka zafi sunan Shimbia'in Bot-Ajansa. Talkiya ya zama mai girma a cikin abincin matafiyar da kuma aikinmu yana danganta kansala kamar matabbata biyu masu ƙaranci, a yaushe za'a shige shi da kuma wanne mai haɗa zuwa da shi ko kuma ya shiga a matsayin neural wanda ke tambayar su masu bastarwa. Inspired by the Net promoter score (NPS), research banner up a kan su iya sola masu cikin sha'anin su da amfani da kuma a buɗe zanen tsari masu ƙarƙashin neura waɗanda ke gabani da rabon gafaka da NPS na zauren zauren zauren akwatin bayani. Experiments on data masu gaske wanda aka haifa daga wani bango na ƙaramin aiki na Intanet yana nuna cewa, shirin da aka buƙata ta wajen aikin hanyoyin-state-of-art kuma yana nuna wani kalma mai yiwuwa wa shiftarwa mai bayyane.", 'sk': 'V spletnih aplikacijah za pomoč strankam se več chatbotov, specializiranih za različne teme, običajno razvijejo ločeno in se nato združijo z drugimi človeškimi agenti na eno platformo in uporabnikom predstavijo enoten vmesnik. V idealnem primeru lahko pogovor pregledno prenesemo med različnimi viri podpore strankam, tako da lahko pravočasno odgovorimo na domenska vprašanja in to smo izmislili kot simbiozo bot-agent. Prehod pogovorov je velik izziv v takih spletnih storitvah za stranke in naše delo formalizira izziv kot dva ključna težava, namreč, kdaj prenesti in kateri bot ali agent prenesti ter uvaja pristop, ki temelji na globokih nevronskih omrežjih, ki obravnava te težave. Naša raziskava, ki jo navdihuje Net Promoter Score (NPS), razkriva, kako je težave mogoče učinkovito rešiti z zagotavljanjem povratnih informacij uporabnikov in razvojem globokih nevronskih omrežij, ki napovedujejo porazdelitev kategorij pogovora in NPS dialogov. Eksperimenti na realističnih podatkih, pridobljenih na platformi za podporo spletnim storitvam, kažejo, da predlagani pristop presega najsodobnejše metode in kaže obetavno perspektivo za pregleden prehod pogovora.', 'he': 'בתוכניות שירות לקוחות באינטרנט, מספר chatbots המיוחדים בנושאים שונים פותחים בדרך כלל באופן נפרד ואז מתמזגים עם סוכנים אנושיים אחרים לפלטפורמה אחת, מציגים למשתמשים עם ממשק מאוחד. באופן אידיאלי, השיחה יכולה להעביר באופן שווה בין מקורות שונים של תמיכה לקוחות כך שאלות מסוימות לתחום יכולות לענות בזמן וזה מה שהתכננו כסימביוזה של סוכן בוט. שינוי השיחה הוא אתגר גדול בשירות הלקוחות האינטרנט כזה והעבודה שלנו פורמלית את האתגר כשתי בעיות בעיקריות, כלומר, מתי להעביר ואיזה רובוט או סוכן להעביר ולהציג גישה עמוקה מבוססת על רשתות עצביות Inspired by the net promoter score (NPS), our research reveals how the problems can be effectively solved by providing user feedback and developing deep neural networks that predict the conversation category distribution and the NPS of the dialogues.  ניסויים על נתונים מציאותיים שנוצרים מפלטפורמת תמיכה לשירותים באינטרנט מראים שהגישה המוצעת מעלית שיטות מצוינות ומראות פרספקטיבה מבטיחה למעבר שיחה שקופה.', 'jv': 'Nang aplikasi hukum kanggo online, akeh karo kesempatan sing ngomong karo temas sing dipujahan karo nganggo sampeyan sampeyan karo akeh sing nguasai Applet So that domain-special question can be accounted timely and this is the thing we coned as a bot-ajant symbol. Dialog Change Jejaring Gebudhakan langkung data reralistik sing gagewakke suku kelompok nggunakake online', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་ཞབས་ཞུ་བ་དང་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཆས་ནང་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བའི་གླེང་མོལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་གནད་དོན་འདྲ་མ་འདྲ་བ་རྒྱུན་རྟགས་སོ་སོ་སོ་དང་མཉམ་ད Ideally the conversation can be transparent between different sources of customer support so that domain-specific questions can be answered timely and this is what we coined as a Bot-Agent symbiosis. Conversation transition is a major challenge in such an online customer service and our work formalizes the challenge as two core problems, namely, when to transfer and which bot or agent to transfer to and introduces a deep neural network based approach that addresses these problems. Inspired by the net promoter score (NPS), our research reveals how the problems can be effectively solved by providing user feedback and developing deep neural networks that predict the conversation category distribution and the NPS of the dialogues. དྲ་ཐོག་ཞབས་ཞུ་བའི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གླེང་སྟེགས་ནས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བཞིན་པའི་སྐོར'}
{'en': 'Translation vs. Dialogue : A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling', 'ar': 'الترجمة مقابل الحوار: تحليل مقارن لنمذجة التسلسل إلى التسلسل', 'pt': 'Tradução vs. Diálogo: Uma Análise Comparativa da Modelagem de Sequência a Sequência', 'es': 'Traducción frente a diálogo: un análisis comparativo del modelado secuencia a secuencia', 'fr': 'Translation vs dialogue\xa0: une analyse comparative de la modélisation séquence-séquence', 'ja': '翻訳対対話：配列間モデリングの比較分析', 'zh': '译与对:序建模者较之', 'ru': 'Перевод в сравнении с диалогом: сравнительный анализ моделирования последовательности к последовательности', 'hi': 'अनुवाद बनाम संवाद: अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडलिंग का एक तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán vs. Agallamh: Anailís Chomparáideach ar Shamhaltú Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh', 'ka': 'გადაწყვანა vs. დიალოგი: შემდეგ- დან შემდეგ მოდელის შემდეგ ანალიზი', 'hu': 'Fordítás kontra párbeszéd: A szekvencia-szekvencia modellezés összehasonlító elemzése', 'kk': 'Аудару және диалог: реттеу реттеу үлгісін салыстыру', 'lt': 'Vertimas ir dialogas: lyginamoji sekos modeliavimo analizė', 'el': 'Μετάφραση vs. Διάλογος: Μια συγκριτική ανάλυση της μοντελοποίησης ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία', 'it': "Traduzione vs. Dialogo: un'analisi comparativa della modellazione sequenziale", 'mk': 'Превод против дијалог: споредлива анализа на моделирање од секвенција до секвенција', 'ms': 'Terjemahan vs. Dialog: Analisis Perbandingan Modelan Sejukan-ke-Sejukan', 'ml': 'പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക vs. ഡയലോഗ്: സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- മുതല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിങിന്റെ ഒരു തുല്യമായ അന്വേഷണം', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni vs. Djalogu: Analiżi komparattiva tal-Immudellar minn Sekwenza għal Sekwenza', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэл эсрэг диалог: Дараагийн дарааллаас дарааллаар загварын харьцуулсан шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Omsetjing mot dialogen: Eit sammenligg analyse av sekvens- til- sekvensmodellering', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie vs dialog: Analiza porównawcza modelowania sekwencji na sekwencję', 'ro': 'Traducere vs. Dialog: O analiză comparativă a modelării secvență-secvență', 'sr': 'Превод против диалога: Распоредна анализа модела последовања до последовања', 'si': 'වාර්ථාව විරුද්ධ සංවාද: A comparison of sequence- to- sequence Modeling', 'so': 'Turjumista vs. Dialog: A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling', 'sv': 'Översättning vs dialog: En jämförande analys av sekvens-till-sekvensmodellering', 'ur': 'Translation vs. Dialog: A comparative analysis of sequence- to- sequence Modeling', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு vs. உரையாடல்:', 'uz': 'Tarjima- ketlik muloqat: Namuna tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch tương đương: A Componetive Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling.', 'da': 'Oversættelse vs. Dialog: En sammenlignende analyse af sekvens-til-sekvensmodellering', 'nl': 'Vertaling versus dialoog: Een vergelijkende analyse van sequentie-to-sequentie modellering', 'id': 'Translation vs. Dialogue: A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling', 'ko': '서열 모델링에 대한 서열 비교 분석', 'fa': 'ترجمه vs. محاورۀ: یک تحلیل مقایسه از مدل\u200cهای بعدی به بعدی', 'hr': 'Prevod protiv dijaloga: usporedna analiza modela sekvence do sekvence', 'bg': 'Превод срещу диалог: Сравнителен анализ на моделирането последователност към последователност', 'af': "Vertaling teen. Dialoog: ' n Vergelykbare Analisie van Sequence- to- Sequence Modeling", 'de': 'Übersetzung vs. Dialog: Eine vergleichende Analyse der Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Modellierung', 'sq': 'Translation vs. Dialogue: A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling', 'tr': 'Terjime vs. Dialog: A Comparative Analysis of Ordering Modeling', 'hy': 'Translate in line edit', 'bn': 'অনুবাদ বিরুদ্ধে ডায়ালগ: সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেলিং এর তুলনামূলক বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Prevod protiv dijaloga: usporedna analiza modela sekvence do sekvence', 'sw': 'Translation vs. Dialogue: A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling', 'cs': 'Překlad vs. dialog: Srovnávací analýza modelování sekvence na sekvenci', 'am': 'ትርጉም vs. Dialog: A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling', 'et': 'Tõlkimine vs dialoog: jada-jada modelleerimise võrdlev analüüs', 'fi': 'Kääntäminen vs. dialogi: vertaileva analyysi sekvenssi-sekvenssimallinnasta', 'az': 'T…ôrc√ºm…ô vs. Dialoog: Sƒ±radan-Sƒ±radan Modell…ôndirici', 'ca': 'Traducció vs Diàleg: Un anàlisi comparatiu del modelament de seqüència a seqüència', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'sk': 'Prevajanje v primerjavi z dialogom: Primerjalna analiza modeliranja zaporedja v zaporedje', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Translation vs. Dialog: A Comparative Analysis of Sequence-to-Sequence Modeling'}
{'en': 'Understanding neural models is a major topic of interest in the deep learning community. In this paper, we propose to interpret a general neural model comparatively. Specifically, we study the sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) model in the contexts of two mainstream NLP tasksmachine translation and dialogue response generationas they both use the seq2seq model. We investigate how the two tasks are different and how their task difference results in major differences in the behaviors of the resulting translation and dialogue generation systems. This study allows us to make several interesting observations and gain valuable insights, which can be used to help develop better translation and dialogue generation models. To our knowledge, no such comparative study has been done so far.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم النماذج العصبية موضوعًا رئيسيًا للاهتمام في مجتمع التعلم العميق. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تفسير النموذج العصبي العام بشكل نسبي. على وجه التحديد ، قمنا بدراسة نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (Seq2Seq) في سياقات مهمتين رئيسيتين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية - الترجمة الآلية وتوليد استجابة الحوار - حيث يستخدم كلاهما نموذج seq2seq. نتحرى كيف تختلف المهمتان وكيف يؤدي اختلاف المهام بينهما إلى اختلافات كبيرة في سلوكيات الترجمة الناتجة وأنظمة إنشاء الحوار. تتيح لنا هذه الدراسة إجراء العديد من الملاحظات الشيقة واكتساب رؤى قيمة ، والتي يمكن استخدامها للمساعدة في تطوير نماذج أفضل للترجمة وتوليد الحوار. على حد علمنا ، لم يتم إجراء مثل هذه الدراسة المقارنة حتى الآن.', 'pt': 'Compreender os modelos neurais é um dos principais tópicos de interesse da comunidade de aprendizado profundo. Neste artigo, propomos interpretar comparativamente um modelo neural geral. Especificamente, estudamos o modelo sequência-a-sequência (Seq2Seq) nos contextos de duas tarefas principais de PNL – tradução automática e geração de resposta de diálogo – pois ambas usam o modelo seq2seq. Investigamos como as duas tarefas são diferentes e como sua diferença de tarefa resulta em grandes diferenças nos comportamentos dos sistemas de tradução e geração de diálogo resultantes. Este estudo nos permite fazer várias observações interessantes e obter insights valiosos, que podem ser usados para ajudar a desenvolver melhores modelos de tradução e geração de diálogos. Até onde sabemos, nenhum estudo comparativo desse tipo foi feito até o momento.', 'fr': "La compréhension des modèles neuronaux est un sujet d'intérêt majeur dans la communauté du deep learning. Dans cet article, nous proposons d'interpréter un modèle neuronal général de manière comparative. Plus précisément, nous étudions le modèle séquence-séquence (Seq2Seq) dans le contexte de deux tâches courantes de la PNL, la traduction automatique et la génération de réponse au dialogue, car elles utilisent toutes deux le modèle seq2seq. Nous étudions comment les deux tâches sont différentes et comment leur différence de tâches entraîne des différences majeures dans les comportements des systèmes de traduction et de génération de dialogue qui en résultent. Cette étude nous permet de faire plusieurs observations intéressantes et d'obtenir des informations précieuses, qui peuvent être utilisées pour développer de meilleurs modèles de traduction et de génération de dialogues. À notre connaissance, aucune étude comparative de ce type n'a été réalisée à ce jour.", 'es': 'La comprensión de los modelos neuronales es un tema de gran interés en la comunidad de aprendizaje profundo. En este artículo, proponemos interpretar un modelo neuronal general de forma comparativa. Específicamente, estudiamos el modelo de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq) en el contexto de dos tareas principales de la PNL, la traducción automática y la generación de respuestas de diálogo, ya que ambas utilizan el modelo seq2seq. Investigamos cómo las dos tareas son diferentes y cómo su diferencia de tareas da lugar a diferencias importantes en los comportamientos de los sistemas de traducción y generación de diálogo resultantes. Este estudio nos permite hacer varias observaciones interesantes y obtener información valiosa, que se puede utilizar para ayudar a desarrollar mejores modelos de traducción y generación de diálogos. Hasta donde sabemos, hasta ahora no se ha realizado ningún estudio comparativo de este tipo.', 'zh': '解神经深学社区感兴之大体也。 于本文中,臣等议较解神经模。 具体来说二主NLP事(机器翻译与言应生成)上下文序于序(Seq2Seq),皆用seq2seq也。 臣等考此二事何异,与其务异,译语大异。 此可以观而得之,可以助译语而成形也。 以吾所知,迄今未之有也。', 'ja': 'ニューラルモデルを理解することは、ディープラーニングコミュニティにとって重要なトピックです。本稿では、一般的なニューラルモデルを比較解釈することを提案する。具体的には、機械翻訳とダイアログ応答生成という2つの主流のNLPタスクの文脈でシーケンスツーシーケンス（ Seq 2 Seq ）モデルを研究しています。両方ともseq 2 seqモデルを使用しています。私たちは、2つのタスクがどのように異なるか、そしてタスクの違いが結果として生じる翻訳および対話生成システムの動作に大きな違いをもたらすかを調査します。この研究では、いくつかの興味深い観察を行い、より良い翻訳と対話生成モデルの開発に役立つ貴重な洞察を得ることができます。私たちの知る限り、このような比較研究は今のところ行われていない。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मॉडल को समझना गहरी सीखने वाले समुदाय में रुचि का एक प्रमुख विषय है। इस पेपर में, हम तुलनात्मक रूप से एक सामान्य तंत्रिका मॉडल की व्याख्या करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम दो मुख्यधारा के एनएलपी कार्यों-मशीन अनुवाद और संवाद प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी के संदर्भों में अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) मॉडल का अध्ययन करते हैं- क्योंकि वे दोनों seq2seq मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं। हम जांच करते हैं कि दो कार्य कैसे अलग-अलग हैं और उनके कार्य अंतर के परिणामस्वरूप अनुवाद और संवाद पीढ़ी प्रणालियों के व्यवहार में प्रमुख अंतर कैसे होते हैं। यह अध्ययन हमें कई दिलचस्प टिप्पणियां करने और मूल्यवान अंतर्दृष्टि प्राप्त करने की अनुमति देता है, जिसका उपयोग बेहतर अनुवाद और संवाद पीढ़ी मॉडल विकसित करने में मदद करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। हमारी जानकारी में, अब तक ऐसा कोई तुलनात्मक अध्ययन नहीं किया गया है।', 'ru': 'Понимание нейронных моделей является важной темой, представляющей интерес для сообщества глубокого обучения. В данной работе предлагается сравнительно интерпретировать общую нейронную модель. В частности, мы изучаем модель последовательности к последовательности (Seq2Seq) в контексте двух основных задач NLP - машинного перевода и генерации диалоговых ответов - поскольку они оба используют модель seq2seq. Мы исследуем, чем эти две задачи отличаются друг от друга и как их разница в задачах приводит к существенным различиям в поведении результирующих систем генерации перевода и диалога. Это исследование позволяет нам сделать несколько интересных наблюдений и получить ценную информацию, которая может быть использована для разработки лучших моделей генерации перевода и диалога. Насколько нам известно, такого сравнительного исследования до сих пор не проводилось.', 'ga': 'Is ábhar mór spéise sa phobal foghlama domhain é tuiscint a fháil ar shamhlacha néaracha. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn múnla ginearálta neural a léirmhíniú go comparáideach. Go sonrach, déanaimid staidéar ar an tsamhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh (Seq2Seq) i gcomhthéacs dhá thasc phríomhshrutha NLP - aistriúchán meaisín agus giniúint freagra comhphlé - de réir mar a úsáideann siad araon an tsamhail seq2seq. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an difríocht atá idir an dá thasc agus ar an gcaoi a mbíonn difríochtaí móra in iompraíochtaí na gcóras giniúna aistriúcháin agus dialóige mar thoradh ar a ndifríocht tascanna. Ligeann an staidéar seo dúinn roinnt breathnuithe suimiúla a dhéanamh agus léargais luachmhara a fháil, ar féidir iad a úsáid chun cabhrú le samhlacha giniúna aistriúcháin agus dialóige níos fearr a fhorbairt. Go bhfios dúinn, níl aon staidéar comparáideach déanta go dtí seo.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მოდელების გაგრძნობა უფრო დიდი საინტერესო საზოგადოებაში. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ საერთო ნეიროლური მოდელის გადასრულება. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ შემდეგ-დან შემდეგ (Seq2Seq) მოდელის შემდეგ ორი მნიშვნელოვანი NLP მოქმედების შემდეგ–მაქსინის შემდეგ და დიალოგის შემდეგ შემდეგ- როგორც ორივე გამოყენებენ ჩვენ შევხედავთ, როგორც ორი საქმე განსხვავებულია და როგორ მათი საქმე განსხვავებულია ძალიან განსხვავებულია შემდეგ განსხვავებული სისტემების განსხვავებაში. ეს კვლევა გვეძლია გავაკეთოთ რამდენიმე ინტერესური მონაცემები და უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები, რომელიც შეიძლია გამოყენება, რომ უფრო მსგავსი გადაწ ჩვენი ცნობილებისთვის, ასეთი კომპორაციური სწავლება ახლა არაფერიან.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση των νευρωνικών μοντέλων είναι ένα σημαντικό θέμα ενδιαφέροντος στην κοινότητα βαθιάς μάθησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε να ερμηνευθεί ένα γενικό νευρωνικό μοντέλο συγκριτικά. Συγκεκριμένα, μελετάμε το μοντέλο ακολουθίας-σε-ακολουθίας (στα πλαίσια δύο βασικών εργασιών – μηχανική μετάφραση και δημιουργία απόκρισης διαλόγου – καθώς και οι δύο χρησιμοποιούν το μοντέλο seq2seq. Ερευνούμε πώς οι δύο εργασίες είναι διαφορετικές και πώς η διαφορά εργασίας τους οδηγεί σε σημαντικές διαφορές στις συμπεριφορές των συστημάτων μετάφρασης και δημιουργίας διαλόγου που προκύπτουν. Η μελέτη αυτή μας επιτρέπει να κάνουμε αρκετές ενδιαφέρουσες παρατηρήσεις και να αποκτήσουμε πολύτιμες γνώσεις, οι οποίες μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την ανάπτυξη καλύτερων μοντέλων μετάφρασης και δημιουργίας διαλόγου. Από όσο γνωρίζουμε, δεν έχει γίνει τέτοια συγκριτική μελέτη μέχρι στιγμής.', 'hu': 'Az idegi modellek megértése fontos téma a mélytanulás közösségében. Ebben a tanulmányban egy általános neurális modell összehasonlítását javasoljuk. Konkrétan a szekvencia-szekvencia (Seq2Seq) modellt tanulmányozzuk két fő NLP feladat – gépi fordítás és párbeszéd válasz generálás – kontextusában, mivel mindketten a seq2Seq modellt használják. Vizsgáljuk, hogy a két feladat hogyan különbözik egymástól, és hogyan eredményezi a feladatkülönbség jelentős különbségeket a kapott fordítási és párbeszédgeneráló rendszerek viselkedésében. Ez a tanulmány lehetővé teszi számos érdekes megfigyelésre és értékes betekintésre, amelyek segítségével jobb fordítási és párbeszédgenerációs modelleket fejleszthetünk ki. Tudomásunk szerint eddig nem végeztek ilyen összehasonlító tanulmányokat.', 'it': 'Comprendere i modelli neurali è un argomento importante di interesse nella comunità del deep learning. In questo articolo, proponiamo di interpretare un modello neurale generale comparativamente. Nello specifico, studiamo il modello sequenza-sequenza (Seq2Seq) nei contesti di due attività principali NLP-traduzione automatica e generazione di risposta al dialogo-in quanto entrambi utilizzano il modello seq2Seq. Investighiamo in che modo i due compiti sono diversi e come la loro differenza di task si traduca in importanti differenze nei comportamenti dei sistemi di traduzione e generazione dei dialoghi risultanti. Questo studio ci permette di fare diverse osservazioni interessanti e di acquisire preziose intuizioni, che possono essere utilizzate per aiutare a sviluppare migliori modelli di traduzione e generazione di dialogo. Per quanto ci risulta, finora non è stato effettuato alcun simile studio comparativo.', 'mk': 'Understanding neural models is a major topic of interest in the deep learning community.  Во овој весник предлагаме да го интерпретираме генералниот нервен модел во споредба. Специфично, го проучуваме моделот секвенца до секвенца (Seq2Seq) во контекстот на две главни NLP задачи – машински превод и генерација на дијалог одговор – бидејќи двајцата го користат моделот seq2seq. Истражуваме како двете задачи се различни и како нивната разлика во задачите резултира со големи разлики во однесувањата на резултатите на системите за генерација на превод и дијалог. Оваа студија ни овозможува да направиме неколку интересни набљудувања и да добиеме вредни информации, кои може да се користат за да помогнат во развојот на подобри модели за превод и генерација на дијалог. Според нашето знаење, досега не е направена таква споредлива студија.', 'lt': 'Nervų modelių supratimas yra viena svarbiausių dalykų, susijusių su gilaus mokymosi bendruomene. Šiame dokumente siūlome palyginti išaiškinti bendrą nervų model į. Konkrečiai, mes tiriame sekos po sekos (Seq2Seq) model į dviejų pagrindinių NLP užduočių – mašin ų vertimo ir dialogo atsako generavimo – kontekste, nes abu naudoja sek2seq modelį. Mes tiriame, kaip šios dvi užduotys skiriasi ir kaip jų užduočių skirtumas lemia didelius išverstų vertimo ir dialogo sistemų elgesio skirtumus. This study allows us to make several interesting observations and gain valuable insights, which can be used to help develop better translation and dialogue generation models.  Mūsų žiniomis iki šiol tokio lyginamojo tyrimo nebuvo atlikta.', 'ms': 'Memahami model saraf adalah topik utama yang berminat dalam komuniti belajar dalam. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan untuk menerangkan model saraf umum secara bersamaan. Secara khusus, kami mempelajari model jujukan-ke-jujukan (Seq2Seq) dalam konteks dua tugas NLP utama-terjemahan mesin dan generasi tindak balas dialog-kerana kedua-dua menggunakan model seq2seq. Kami menyelidiki bagaimana kedua-dua tugas berbeza dan bagaimana perbezaan tugas mereka menghasilkan perbezaan besar dalam perilaku sistem terjemahan dan dialog yang menghasilkan. Ujian ini membolehkan kita membuat beberapa pengamatan menarik dan mendapatkan pandangan yang berharga, yang boleh digunakan untuk membantu mengembangkan model terjemahan dan dialog yang lebih baik. Menurut pengetahuan kita, tidak ada penelitian perbandingan seperti itu telah dilakukan sejauh ini.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നത് ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന സമൂഹത്തിന് താല്പര്യമുള്ള ഒരു പ്രധാന വി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പരിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രധാനപ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട NLP ജോലികള്\u200d- മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെയും പ്രതികരണത്തിന്റെയും തലമുറയില്\u200d സെക്ക്സെക്സി ഈ രണ്ടു ജോലികള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് വ്യത്യസ്തമായതെന്ന് നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ ജോലിയുടെ വ്യത്യാസവും ഭാവിക്കുന്നതെന്താണെ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമുക്ക് കുറച്ച് ആശ്വാസകരമായ കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാനും വിലപിടിക്കാനും അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. അത് കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും  നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന് വേണ്ടി ഇത്രയും തുല്യമായ പഠനം ഇതുവരെ ചെയ്തിട്ടില്ല.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tal-mudelli newrali huwa suġġett ewlieni ta’ interess fil-komunità ta’ tagħlim profond. In this paper, we propose to interpret a general neural model comparatively.  Speċifikament, nistudjaw il-mudell minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (Seq2Seq) fil-kuntest ta’ żewġ kompiti ewlenin tal-NLP – it-traduzzjoni tal-magna u l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons għad-djalogu – peress li t-tnejn jużaw il-mudell seq2seq. Aħna ninvestigaw kif iż-żewġ kompiti huma differenti u kif id-differenza fil-kompiti tagħhom tirriżulta f’differenzi kbar fl-imġibiet tas-sistemi ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ traduzzjoni u djalogu li jirriżultaw. Dan l-istudju jippermettilna nagħmlu diversi osservazzjonijiet interessanti u nagħmlu fehmiet siewja, li jistgħu jintużaw biex jgħinu jiżviluppaw mudelli aħjar ta’ traduzzjoni u ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ djalogu. Għall-għarfien tagħna, sa issa ma sar l-ebda studju komparattiv bħal dan.', 'mn': 'Цөмийн загварыг ойлгох нь гүн гүнзгий суралцах нийгмийн сонирхолтой сэдэв юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ерөнхий мэдрэлийн загварыг харьцуулахыг санал болно. Ялангуяа бид Seq2Seq-ын дарааллын загварын хоёр төвөгтэй NLP-ийн ажил-машины хөрөнгө болон диалогын хариу үйлдвэрлэлийг судалдаг. Тэд хоёр нь seq2seq загварыг хэрэглэдэг. Бид хоёр даалгаварыг хэрхэн ялгаатай вэ гэдгийг судалж, тэдний даалгаварын ялгаа нь үр дүнтэй орчуулах, диалог бүтээлтийн системийн харилцааны ялгааг хэрхэн үр дүнтэй болгодог вэ? Энэ судалгаа бидэнд олон сонирхолтой анзаарал, үнэ цэнэтэй ойлголт гаргах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ нь илүү сайн орчуулалт болон диалог бүтээлтийн загваруудыг хөгжүүлэхэд ашиглаж бол Бидний мэдлэгийнхээ хувьд ийм харьцуулсан судалгаа хэзээ ч хийгдсэн.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie modeli neuronowych jest głównym tematem zainteresowania społeczności głębokiego uczenia się. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy porównywalną interpretację ogólnego modelu neuronowego. W szczególności badamy model sekwencji do sekwencji (Seq2Seq) w kontekście dwóch głównych zadań NLP – tłumaczenia maszynowego i generowania odpowiedzi dialogowej – ponieważ oba używają modelu seq2seq. Badamy, w jaki sposób te dwa zadania różnią się od siebie i w jaki ich różnica zadań prowadzi do poważnych różnic w zachowaniach powstałych systemów tłumaczenia i generowania dialogów. Badanie to pozwala nam dokonać kilku ciekawych obserwacji i uzyskać cenne spostrzeżenia, które mogą być wykorzystane do opracowania lepszych modeli tłumaczenia i generowania dialogu. Z naszej wiedzy do tej pory nie przeprowadzono takich badań porównawczych.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea modelelor neurale este un subiect major de interes în comunitatea de învățare profundă. În această lucrare, propunem interpretarea comparativă a unui model neural general. În mod specific, studiem modelul secvență-la-secvență (Seq2Seq) în contextul a două sarcini principale NLP – traducerea automată și generarea de răspuns la dialog – deoarece ambele utilizează modelul seq2Seq. Investigăm modul în care cele două sarcini sunt diferite și modul în care diferența lor de sarcini duce la diferențe majore în comportamentele sistemelor de traducere și generare a dialogurilor rezultate. Acest studiu ne permite să facem mai multe observații interesante și să obținem informații valoroase, care pot fi folosite pentru a ajuta la dezvoltarea unor modele mai bune de traducere și generare a dialogului. Din câte ştim, până în prezent nu s-a efectuat un astfel de studiu comparativ.', 'sr': 'Razumevanje neuralnih modela je glavna tema interesovanja za duboko učenje zajednice. U ovom papiru predlažemo da pretumačimo generalni neuralni model usporedno. Posebno, proučavamo model sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) u kontekstima dva glavnog NLP zadataka–prevoda mašine i generacija odgovora na dijalog – kako oboje koriste seq2seq model. Istražujemo kako su dve zadatke drugačije i kako njihova razlika zadatka rezultira velikim razlikama u ponašanju rezultatnih sustava prevoda i generacije dijaloga. Ova studija nam omogućava da napravimo nekoliko zanimljivih promatranja i dobijemo vrijedne uvide, koje se mogu iskoristiti kako bi razvili bolje modele prevoda i generacije dijaloga. Za naše znanje, do sada nije urađeno takvo usporedno istraživanje.', 'kk': 'Невралдық моделдерді түсіну - түсінікті оқыту коммуналының маңызды нақышы. Бұл қағаздың жалпы невралдық үлгісін салыстыру үшін ұсынамыз. Ескерту үшін, екі негізгі NLP тапсырмалары, машинаны аудару мен диалогты жауап беру үлгісін (Seq2Seq) зерттейміз. Олар екі сек2seq үлгісін қолданады. Біз екі тапсырманың қалай айырмашылығын және олардың тапсырмаларының айырмашылығын қалай аудару және диалог жасау жүйелерінің әрекеттерінің көп айырмашылығын зерттеудім Бұл зерттеу бірнеше қызықты қарау және мәні түсініктер жасауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл жақсы аудару және диалог құру үлгілерін жасауға көмектеседі. Біздің білімімізге бұл салыстырмалы зерттеулер әзірше істелмеген.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරෝල් මෝඩේල්ස් එක තේරුම් ගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේලයක් සමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන්. විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි ප්\u200dරධාන NLP වැඩක් දෙකක් සහ සංවාදය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක නිර්මාණය සඳහා සංවාදය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක (Seq2Seq) නිර්මාණය අ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද වෙනස් වෙන්නේ කාර්ය දෙකක් හා කාර්ය වෙනස් වෙන්නේ කොහොමද ඔවුන්ගේ වැඩක් වෙනස් වෙන්න මේ පරීක්ෂණය අපිට පුළුවන් විදිහට විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සහ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ඒක හොඳ අවව අපේ දන්නවට, මේ වගේ සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණයක් දැන් කරලා නෑ.', 'so': 'Waxgarashada modelalka neurada waa mada aad u xiiseysan bulshada aad u dheer ee waxbarashada. Warqadan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa in aan turjumno tusaale guud oo neurada ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku baranaynaa muusikada xilliga (Seq2Seq) xilliga labada waaweyn ee shaqaalaha NLP-machine turjuman iyo generashada jawaabta dialog-sida ay labadooduba isticmaalaan modelka seq2seq. Waxaannu baaraynaa siduu labada shaqadu u kala duwan yihiin iyo siduu u sameeyo kala duwanaanshaha shaqadooda iyo siduu ugu sababto dabeecada turjumaadda iyo nidaamka dialogka. Waxbarashadan wuxuu inagu ogolaan karaa inaan sameeyo arago badan oo xiiseynaya, waxyaabaha qiimo leh, kaas oo lagu isticmaali karo inuu horumariyo tusaalooyin kala turjuman iyo qoraalka. Aqoontayada, waxbarashada isbarka ah tan iyo waqtigaas lama sameyn.', 'sv': 'Att förstå neurala modeller är ett stort ämne av intresse i djupinlärningssamhället. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att tolka en allmän neural modell jämförelsevis. Specifikt studerar vi sekvens-till-sekvens-modellen (Seq2Seq) i samband med två mainstream NLP-uppgifter – maskinöversättning och dialogsvarsgenerering – eftersom de båda använder seq2Seq-modellen. Vi undersöker hur de två uppgifterna skiljer sig åt och hur deras uppgiftsskillnad resulterar i stora skillnader i beteenden hos de resulterande översättnings- och dialoggenereringssystemen. Denna studie ger oss möjlighet att göra flera intressanta observationer och få värdefulla insikter, som kan användas för att utveckla bättre översättnings- och dialoggenereringsmodeller. Såvitt vi vet har ingen sådan jämförande studie hittills gjorts.', 'ta': 'புதிய மாதிரிகள் புரிந்து கொள்வது ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சமூகத்திற்கு தேவையான ஒரு மிகப் பெரிய இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான நெருக்கி மாதிரி ஒப்பீட்டில் பொருளை மாதிரிப்பது பரிந்துரை குறிப்பிட்டாக, நாம் தொடர்ச்சி இருக்கும் தொடர்ச்சி( Seq2Seq) மாதிரியை படிக்கிறோம் இரண்டு முக்கியமான NLP பணிகள்- இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்றி மற்றும் உரையாடல் பத இந்த இரண்டு பணிகள் எப்படி வேறுபாடு என்பதை நாம் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய பணி வேறுபாடு எப்படி முக்கியமான வேறு இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி சில ஆர்வத்திலுள்ள பார்வைகளை உருவாக்க அனுமதிக்கிறது மற்றும் மதிப்புள்ள பார்வைகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு, அது ச எங்கள் அறிவிற்கு, இத்தகைய ஒப்பீடு படிப்பு எதுவும் செய்யப்படவில்லை.', 'ur': 'نیورال موڈل کا سمجھنا بہت اچھا موضوع ہے جہاں سیکھنے کی کمونٹی کی علاقہ ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک عمومی نیورال موڈل کی تعبیر کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم نے دوسری مٹینٹریم NLP ٹاکس-مٹینٹ اور ڈالیٹ کی جواب کی نسل میں سq2seq موڈل (Seq2Seq) کو پڑھتے ہیں، جس طرح وہ دونوں سq2seq موڈل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ دو کام کس طرح مختلف ہیں اور ان کے کام تفریق کس طرح باعث تفریق کا نتیجہ پانے والی ترجمہ اور ڈالیٹ نسل سیسٹم کے رفتار میں بہت بڑے تفریق کا نتیجہ ہے. یہ مطالعہ ہمیں بہت اچھی نظر آزمائش بنانے اور ارزش دار نظر حاصل کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے، جو اچھی ترجمہ اور ڈیلوگو کی نسل موڈل کی تولید کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ ہمارے علم کے لئے یہاں تک ایسی مثالی تحقیق نہیں کی گئی۔', 'no': 'Forståking av neuralmodeller er ein stor emne med interesse i den dype læringssamfunnet. I denne papiret foreslår vi å tolka eit generell neuralmodell sammenlignbare. Spesielt studerer vi modellen Seq2Seq-til-sekvens i kontekstane til to hovuddelse NLP-oppgåver-omsetjing og dialogoppgåver, sidan dei begge brukar seq2seq-modellen. Vi undersøker korleis dei to oppgåva er ulike, og korleis oppgåveforskjellene sine resulterer i store forskjeller i oppføringane av dei resulterte omsetjingssystemene og dialoggenerering. Denne studien lèt oss gjera fleire interessante observasjonar og få verdileg innsikt, som kan brukast til å utvikla bedre omsetjingsmodular og dialoggenerering. For vårt kunnskap er ingen slik sammenlignbare studie gjort så langt.', 'uz': "Neural modellarini o'rganish bularning eng muhim muhimdir. Bu qogʻozda biz bir umumiy neyrol modelini o'rganishni talab qilamiz. Ko'rsatilgan, biz ikki asosiy NLP vazifalar- machin tarjima va dialog javob yaratish muvaffaqiyatlarida seq2seq (Seq2Seq) modelini o'rganamiz. Ular ikkita oddiy narsalarni ishlatishda. Biz bu ikkita vazifalar qanday o'zgarishlar, va ularning vazifa o'zgarishlari natijasida tarjima va dialog tizimlarining xuddi katta tofautiga ega qiladi. Bu o'qituvchi bizni bir necha qiziqarli ko'rinishga ruxsat beradi va qiziqarli ko'rinishga ruxsat beradi. Bu narsa yaxshi tarjima va dialog modellarini yaratishga yordam beradi. Bizning o'rganimizga bunday o'xshash o'rganishga hech qanday o'rganishmaydi.", 'vi': 'Hiểu được các mô hình thần kinh là một chủ đề quan trọng trong cộng đồng học sâu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị phiên dịch một mô hình thần kinh chung tương đối. Cụ thể, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các mô hình lặp lại (Seq2Seq) trong các đối tượng của hai công việc chính xu hướng sử dụng ngôn ngữ H8112; Chúng tôi điều tra cách hai nhiệm vụ khác nhau và làm thế nào sự khác biệt giữa nhiệm vụ của họ dẫn tới sự khác biệt lớn trong cách hành xử của hệ thống dịch chuyển và tạo ra đối thoại kết quả. Nghiên cứu này cho phép chúng ta có nhiều quan sát thú vị và có những ý tưởng có giá trị, có thể được sử dụng để phát triển các mô hình dịch chuyển và tạo ra thoại. Theo chúng tôi biết, đến giờ vẫn chưa có nghiên cứu nào giống nhau.', 'bg': 'Разбирането на невронните модели е основна тема на интерес в общността за дълбоко учене. В настоящата статия предлагаме сравнително интерпретиране на общ невронен модел. По-конкретно, изследваме модела последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq) в контекста на две основни задачи на НЛП - машинен превод и генериране на диалогов отговор - тъй като и двете използват модела seq2seq. Проучваме как двете задачи са различни и как тяхната разлика в задачите води до големи разлики в поведението на получените системи за превод и генериране на диалог. Това изследване ни позволява да направим няколко интересни наблюдения и да получим ценни прозрения, които могат да бъдат използвани за разработване на по-добри модели за превод и генериране на диалог. Доколкото знаем, досега не е направено такова сравнително проучване.', 'da': 'Forståelse af neurale modeller er et vigtigt emne af interesse i deep learning fællesskabet. I denne artikel foreslår vi at fortolke en generel neural model sammenligneligt. Specielt studerer vi sekvens-til-sekvens (Seq2Seq) modellen i sammenhænge med to mainstream NLP-opgaver - maskinoversættelse og dialog responsgenerering - da de begge bruger seq2Seq modellen. Vi undersøger, hvordan de to opgaver er forskellige, og hvordan deres opgaveforskel resulterer i store forskelle i adfærd i de resulterende oversættelses- og dialoggenereringssystemer. Denne undersøgelse giver os mulighed for at lave flere interessante observationer og få værdifuld indsigt, som kan bruges til at hjælpe med at udvikle bedre oversættelses- og dialoggenereringsmodeller. Så vidt vi ved, er der hidtil ikke foretaget en sådan sammenlignende undersøgelse.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje neuronskih modela je glavna tema interesa u dubokoj učenjskoj zajednici. U ovom papiru predlažemo da pretumačimo općeg neuralnog model a usporedno. Posebno, proučavamo model sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) u kontekstima dvije glavne prevode i generacije odgovora na NLP-ove zadatke i dijalog, jer oboje koriste model seq2seq. Istražujemo kako su dvije zadatke drugačije i kako njihova razlika zadatka rezultira velikim razlikama u ponašanju rezultatnih sustava prevoda i generacije dijaloga. Ova studija nam omogućava da napravimo nekoliko zanimljivih promatranja i dobijemo vrijedne uvide, koje se mogu koristiti za razvoj boljih modela prevoda i generacije dijaloga. Za naše znanje, do sada nije učinjeno takvo usporedno ispitivanje.', 'de': 'Das Verständnis neuronaler Modelle ist ein wichtiges Thema in der Deep Learning Community. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, ein allgemeines neuronales Modell vergleichsweise zu interpretieren. Insbesondere untersuchen wir das Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell (Seq2Seq) im Kontext zweier Mainstream-NLP-Aufgaben – maschinelle Übersetzung und Dialogantwortgenerierung – da beide das seq2seq-Modell verwenden. Wir untersuchen, wie sich die beiden Aufgaben unterscheiden und wie ihre Aufgabenunterschiede zu erheblichen Unterschieden im Verhalten der resultierenden Übersetzungs- und Dialoggenerierungssysteme führt. Diese Studie ermöglicht es uns, mehrere interessante Beobachtungen zu machen und wertvolle Erkenntnisse zu gewinnen, die zur Entwicklung besserer Übersetzungs- und Dialoggenerierungsmodelle genutzt werden können. Soweit wir wissen, wurde eine solche vergleichende Studie bisher nicht durchgeführt.', 'nl': 'Inzicht in neurale modellen is een belangrijk onderwerp van interesse in de deep learning gemeenschap. In dit artikel stellen we voor om een algemeen neuraal model relatief te interpreteren. Specifiek bestuderen we het seq2seq-model (Seq2Seq) in de contexten van twee mainstream NLP-taken – machinevertaling en dialoogresponsgeneratie – omdat beide het seq2seq-model gebruiken. We onderzoeken hoe de twee taken verschillend zijn en hoe hun taakverschillen resulteren in grote verschillen in het gedrag van de resulterende vertaal- en dialooggeneratiesystemen. Dit onderzoek stelt ons in staat om verschillende interessante observaties te maken en waardevolle inzichten te verwerven, die kunnen worden gebruikt om betere vertaal- en dialooggeneratiemodellen te ontwikkelen. Voor zover wij weten, is er tot dusver geen vergelijkend onderzoek verricht.', 'sw': 'Understanding neural models is a major topic of interest in the deep learning community.  Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza kutafsiri muundo mkuu wa neura ukilinganisha. Kwa ujumla, tunasoma muundo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo (Seq2Seq) katika mashindano ya kazi mbili kubwa ya NLP-tafsiri-mashine ya mazungumzo na mzungumzo wa jibu-wakati wote wanatumia mtindo wa seq2seq. Tunajunguza jinsi kazi hizo mbili zinavyotofautiana na jinsi mabadiliko yao yanavyotokana na tofauti kubwa katika tabia za kutafsiri na mfumo wa kizazi cha mazungumzo. Utafiti huu unaruhusu kutengeneza maoni kadhaa ya kuvutia na kupata mitazamo yenye thamani, ambayo inaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mifano bora ya tafsiri na kizazi cha mazungumzo. Kwa ufahamu wetu, hakuna utafiti kama huo uliofananisha mpaka sasa.', 'id': 'Memahami model saraf adalah topik utama yang menarik dalam komunitas belajar dalam. In this paper, we propose to interpret a general neural model comparatively.  Secara spesifik, kami mempelajari model urutan-ke-urutan (Seq2Seq) dalam konteks dua tugas NLP utama-mesin terjemahan dan dialog respons generasi-karena mereka berdua menggunakan model seq2seq. Kami menyelidiki bagaimana dua tugas berbeda dan bagaimana perbedaan tugas mereka berasal dari perbedaan besar dalam perilaku dari sistem terjemahan dan generasi dialog yang berasal. Studi ini memungkinkan kita membuat beberapa pengamatan menarik dan mendapatkan pandangan yang berharga, yang dapat digunakan untuk membantu mengembangkan model terjemahan dan dialog yang lebih baik. To our knowledge, no such comparative study has been done so far.', 'fa': 'درک مدل عصبی یک موضوع بزرگی از علاقه\u200cای در جامعه یادگیری عمیق است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم که یک مدل عصبی ژنرال را مقایسه کنیم. به طور خاصی، ما مدل سطح به سطح (Seq2Seq) را در موقعیت دو ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای اصلی NLP و نسل پاسخ دادن محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ مطالعه می\u200cکنیم، در حالی که هر دو از مدل seq2seq استفاده می\u200cکنند. ما تحقیق می کنیم که چگونه این دو وظیفه متفاوت است و چگونه تفاوت وظیفه ایشان به تفاوت های بزرگ در رفتار های سیستم تولید و نسل گفتگو نتیجه می دهد. این مطالعه به ما اجازه می دهد که چندین مشاهده های جالب و ارزشمند را انجام دهیم، که می توانند برای توسعه مدل های توسعه و توسعه نسل محاوره بهتر استفاده کنند. برای دانش ما، تا حالا هیچ مطالعه مقایسه ای انجام نشده است.', 'af': "Die verstaan van neurale modele is 'n groot onderwerp van belang in die diep leer gemeenskap. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons om 'n algemene neurale model te interpreteer vergelykbaar. Spesifieke, ons studeer die volgorde-na-volgorde (Seq2Seq) model in die konteks van twee vanstream NLP taak-masjien vertaling en dialoog antwoord generasie- as hulle beide gebruik die seq2seq model. Ons ondersoek hoe die twee taak anders is en hoe hulle taak verskil resultaat in groot verskil in die gedrag van die resulteerde vertaling en dialoog generasie stelsels. Hierdie studie laat ons toe om verskeie interessante observasies te maak en waardelike insigte te verkry, wat kan gebruik word om beter vertaling en dialoog geneeringsmodele te ontwikkel. Om ons kennis, is geen so vergelykbare studie tot toe gedoen nie.", 'am': 'Understanding neural models is a major topic of interest in the deep learning community.  In this paper, we propose to interpret a general neural model comparatively.  በተለይም፣ የseq2Seq (Seq2Seq) ሞዴል በሁለት ዋና ትልቁ የNLP ስራዎችን-machine ትርጉም እና የመስኮት ትርጓሜ ትርጓሜ እና የመስኮት መልስ ትውልድ በመጠቀም በሁለቱም seq2seq model ላይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ ሁለቱ ስራዎች እንዴት ልዩ እንደ ሆኑ እና የስራቸው ልዩነት እንዴት ትልቅ ትርጓሜ እና የመስረጃ ትርጓሜ ተርጓሜ እና የመdialog ትውልድ ስርዓቶችን እንዴት እንደሚያፈስስ እናምርዋለን፡፡ ይሄ ትምህርት የተሻለ ትርጉም እና የመስኮት ትውልድ ምሳሌዎችን ለማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ ለእውቀታችን እንዲህ ያለ ተቃዋሚ ትምህርት እስከ አሁን አልተደረገም፡፡', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i modeleve neuronale është një temë e madhe interesi në komunitetin e mësimit të thellë. Në këtë letër, propozojmë të interpretojmë një model të përgjithshëm neuronal në krahasim. Në mënyrë specifike, ne studiojmë model in sekuencë-në-sekuencë (Seq2Seq) në kontekstet e dy detyrave kryesore NLP-përkthimi-makinë dhe gjenerimi i përgjigjes së dialogut-ndërsa të dy përdorin modelin seq2seq. Ne hetojmë se si dy detyrat janë të ndryshme dhe se si dallimi i detyrave të tyre rezulton në dallime të mëdha në sjelljet e sistemeve të përkthimit dhe dialogut që rezultojnë. Ky studim na lejon të bëjmë disa vëzhgime interesante dhe të fitojmë kuptime të vlefshme, të cilat mund të përdoren për të ndihmuar zhvillimin e modeleve më të mira të përkthimit dhe të gjenerimit të dialogut. To our knowledge, no such comparative study has been done so far.', 'ko': '신경 모형을 이해하는 것은 지역 사회가 흥미를 느끼는 주요 화제이다.본고에서 우리는 통용되는 신경 모델에 대해 비교 해석을 제안한다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 두 주류 NLP 임무 기계의 번역과 대화 응답이 생성된 상하문에서 서열(Seq2Seq) 모델을 연구하는데 모두 Seq2Seq 모델을 사용하기 때문이다.우리는 이 두 가지 임무가 어떻게 다른지, 그리고 그들의 임무 차이가 어떻게 번역과 대화 생성 시스템의 행위에 중대한 차이를 초래하는지 연구했다.이 연구는 우리로 하여금 재미있는 관찰을 하고 가치 있는 견해를 얻게 하여 더욱 좋은 번역과 대화 생성 모델을 개발하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.우리가 알기로는 지금까지 이런 비교 연구가 진행된 적이 없다.', 'hy': 'Understanding neural models is a major topic of interest in the deep learning community.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ընդհանուր նյարդային մոդելը համեմատական մեկնաբանել: Հատկապես, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք SeQ2SeQ-ի մոդելը երկու հիմնական ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների թարգմանման և պատասխանի ստեղծման համատեքստում, քանի որ նրանք երկուսն էլ օգտագործում են SeQ2SeQ-ի մոդելը: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես են երկու խնդիրները տարբերվում և թե ինչպես է նրանց խնդիրների տարբերությունը հանգեցնում հետևյալ թարգմանման և երկխոսախոսական համակարգերի վարքագծի մեծ տարբերությունների: Այս ուսումնասիրությունը մեզ հնարավորություն է տալիս մի քանի հետաքրքիր հետազոտություններ անել և արժեքավոր ընկալումներ ստանալ, որոնք կարող են օգտագործվել ավելի լավ թարգմանման և երկխոսախոսության մոդելների զարգացման համար To our knowledge, no such comparative study has been done so far.', 'bn': 'বুঝতে পারছি নিউরেল মডেল গভীর শিক্ষা সম্প্রদায়ের জন্য একটি বিশাল বিষয়। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি সাধারণ নিউরেল মডেল ব্যাখ্যা করতে প্রস্তাব করি। বিশেষ করে আমরা দুই মূল কাজ-মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং ডায়ালগের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্মের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্মের প্রতিক্রিয়া গবেষণা করছি যেহেতু তারা উভয়েই সেক্স২সেক মডেল We investigate how the two tasks are different and how their task difference results in major differences in the behaviors of the resulting translation and dialogue generation systems.  এই গবেষণা আমাদের অনেক মজার পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং মূল্যবান দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি অর্জন করতে পারে, যা ভালো অনুবাদ এবং ডায়ালগ প্রজন্মের মডেল উন্নয়নের আমাদের জ্ঞানের জন্য, এতদুর পর্যন্ত কোন তুলনামূলক গবেষণা করা হয় নি।', 'tr': 'Näral nusgalary düşünmek derin öwrenmek jemgyýetinde örän gyzyklanýan temadyr. Bu kagyzda, umumy näraly nural nusgasyny görä terjime etmegi teklip edýäris. Adatça, biz seq2seq nusgynyň iki esasy taýýarlama-maşynyň terjime we reaksiýa döredigini öwrenýärik. Biz iki zadyň nähili üýtgeşik bolandygyny soradyk we olaryň görevleriniň üýtgeşikleriniň netijeli terjime we dialogyň döredilişi sistemalarynda nähili üýtgeşikleriniň netijesini çözýäris. Bu araşdyrma bize birnäçe gyzykly gözlem edip, deňli pikirleri gazanmaga mümkin edýär. Bu araşdyrma bize gowy terjime we dijal döretmek nusgalaryny geliştirmek üçin ullanýar. Bilgimize şu wagt hiç hili gurlaşyk öwrenmek edilmedi.', 'ca': "Understanding neural models is a major topic of interest in the deep learning community.  En aquest paper, proposem interpretar un model neuronal general comparativament. En concret, estudiem el model seq2Seq en els contextes de dues tasques principals NLP-traducció màquina i generació de resposta al diàleg-mentre ambdós utilitzen el model seq2seq. Investiguem com les dues tasques són diferents i com la seva diferència resulta en diferències importants en els comportaments dels sistemes de generació de traducció i diàleg resultants. Aquest estudi ens permet fer diverses observacions interessants i guanyar comprensions valioses, que poden ser utilitzades per ajudar a desenvolupar millors models de traducció i generació de diàleg. Fins ara no s'ha fet cap estudi comparatiu.", 'cs': 'Porozumění neuronovým modelům je hlavním tématem zájmu v komunitě hlubokého učení. V tomto článku navrhujeme srovnatelnou interpretaci obecného neuronového modelu. Konkrétně studujeme model sekvence-to-sekvence (Seq2Seq) v kontextu dvou hlavních NLP úloh – strojového překladu a generování dialogových reakcí – protože oba používají model seq2seq. Zkoumáme, jak se tyto dvě úkoly liší a jak jejich rozdíl úkolů vede k velkým rozdílům v chování výsledných překladových a dialogových systémů. Tato studie nám umožňuje provést několik zajímavých pozorování a získat cenné poznatky, které mohou být využity k vytvoření lepších modelů překladu a generace dialogu. Pokud víme, taková srovnávací studie zatím nebyla provedena.', 'az': 'Nöral modelləri anlamaq derin öyrənmə müddətində olan ən böyük məsələdir. Bu kağızda genel nöral modelini salışdırmaq üçün təklif edirik. Biz seq2seq modelini istifadə etdikləri üçün seq2seq model in in iki ünvanlı NLP işləri-maşına çevirilməsi və diyalə cavab verməsini təhsil edirik. Biz iki işin necə fərqli olduğunu araşdırırıq və onların işin fərqli fərqli işləri sonuçlarında tərcümə və diyal nəsil sistemlərinin davranışlarında böyük fərqli tərzlərinə nəsib edir. Bu təhsil bizə bir neçə maraqlı gözləmə və qiymətli gözləmə yaratmağı mümkün edir. Bu, daha yaxşı tercümə və dialog nəsli modellərini təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Bizim elmimizə, bu müqayisədə heç bir müqayisədə çalışma edilməmişdir.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje neuralnih modela je glavna tema interesovanja u dubokoj zajednici učenja. U ovom papiru predlažemo da pretumačimo generalni neuralni model usporedno. Posebno, proučavamo model sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) u kontekstima dvije glavne prevode NLP funkcija-mašine i generacije odgovora na dijalog, jer oboje koriste model seq2seq. Istražujemo kako su dvije zadatke drugačije i kako njihova razlika zadatka rezultira velikim razlikama u ponašanju rezultatnih sustava prevoda i generacije dijaloga. Ova studija nam omogućava da napravimo nekoliko zanimljivih promatranja i dobijemo vrijedne uvide, koje se mogu iskoristiti kako bi razvili bolje modele prevoda i generacije dijaloga. Za naše znanje, do sada nije učinjeno takvo usporedno ispitivanje.', 'et': 'Närvimudelite mõistmine on sügavõppe kogukonna peamine huviteema. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku tõlgendada üldist närvimudelit võrreldavalt. Konkreetselt uurime järjestusest järjestusse (Seq2Seq) mudelit kahe peamise NLP ülesande kontekstis – masintõlke ja dialoogi reageerimise genereerimine –, kuna mõlemad kasutavad seq2seq mudelit. Uurime, kuidas need kaks ülesannet on erinevad ja kuidas nende ülesannete erinevus põhjustab olulisi erinevusi tõlke- ja dialoogisüsteemide käitumises. See uuring võimaldab meil teha mitmeid huvitavaid vaatlusi ja saada väärtuslikke teadmisi, mida saab kasutada paremate tõlke- ja dialoogimudelite arendamiseks. Meie teada ei ole sellist võrdlevat uuringut seni tehtud.', 'fi': 'Neuromallien ymmärtäminen on syväoppimisen yhteisön tärkeä aihe. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yleisen neuromallin tulkintaa suhteellisesti. Erityisesti tutkimme sekvenssi-to-sekvenssimallia (Seq2Seq) kahden valtavirran NLP-tehtävän – konekäännöksen ja dialogivasteen tuottamisen – kontekstissa, joissa molemmat käyttävät seq2seq-mallia. Tutkimme, miten nämä kaksi tehtävää ovat erilaisia ja miten niiden tehtäväero johtaa merkittäviin eroihin käännös- ja dialogijärjestelmien käyttäytymisessä. Tämän tutkimuksen avulla voimme tehdä useita mielenkiintoisia havaintoja ja saada arvokkaita oivalluksia, joiden avulla voimme kehittää parempia käännös- ja vuoropuhelumalleja. Tietääksemme tällaista vertailevaa tutkimusta ei ole tähän mennessä tehty.', 'jv': 'Sayensi model sing nyerung kuwi sing paling dhuwur kuwi nggarap kuwi nggarap kuwi komunitas sing apik. Nanging kuwi iki, kita mudhun kanggo ngerasakno model nyerung titimbang. CURRENTCURRENT Awak dhéwé ngerasakno piye cara-cara sing gawe ngubah sampeyan karo nganggo perkaraan sing paling nggawe barang kelas kuwi, nik ngubah sistem sing itoleh karo perusahaan karo perusahaan karo sistem sing paling nggawe tarjamahan karo dialog. Awakdhéwé éné permenyang awak dhéwé nggawe akeh akeh sampek éntuk karo hal-sampek sing luwih apik, sing bisa nyebuté nggawe tarjamahan lan model sing berarti dialoog. Awakdhéwé, kuwi ora ono karo perusahaan liya sing gawé ngono ngono.', 'ha': "Ana fahimta misalin neurali yana da muhimmi mai amfani ga jamii masu ƙari da za'a sani. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãtar da mu fassara wani misãlin neural a sami. Aka ƙayyade, muna karanta misalin-zuwa-sequence (Seq2Seq) cikin muhimman aikin aiki biyu masu ƙaranci na NLP masu fassarar-mashine da masu motsi ga zauren-zauren zauren-zauren akwatin da su yi amfani da motel na seq2seq. Munã tambaya yadda waɗannan aikin biyu suke sãɓa, kuma ko da bambancin aikin su ke ƙara diffuka masu girma a cikin aikin translation da zauren zauren zauren zauren akwatin bayani. Wannan lõkaci na yarda mu ga ka sami wasu masu sha'awi da za'a iya amfani da gannai masu inganci, wanda za'a iya amfani da su ƙara motsi masu fassarar turjuya da zauren zauren zauren akwatin bayani. Ga saninmu, ba za a aikata wani irin fassarar sami ba har.", 'sk': 'Razumevanje nevronskih modelov je glavna tema, ki jo zanima skupnost globokega učenja. V tem prispevku predlagamo primerjalno interpretiranje splošnega nevronskega modela. Natančneje preučujemo model Seq2Seq (Seq2Seq) v kontekstu dveh glavnih nalog NLP – strojnega prevajanja in ustvarjanja odziva na dialog – saj oba uporabljata model seq2seq. Raziskujemo, kako sta obe nalogi različni in kako njuni nalogi povzročajo velike razlike v vedenju nastalih sistemov prevajanja in dialoga. Ta študija nam omogoča, da naredimo več zanimivih opazovanj in pridobimo dragocene vpoglede, s katerimi lahko pomagamo razviti boljše modele prevajanja in ustvarjanja dialoga. Kolikor vemo, takšne primerjalne študije še niso bile opravljene.', 'bo': 'དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་རྟོགས་ནི་སྐྱོན་རིག་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་དགའ་བའི་དོན་ཚན་ཤིག་རེད། ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དཔེ་དབུས་རིགས་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་བཤད་འདོད་ཡོད། Specifically, we study the sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) model in the contexts of two mainstream NLP tasks-machine translation and dialog response generation-as they both use the seq2seq model. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་ཇི་ལྟར་མ་འདྲ་ཡིན་མིན་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པར། དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐབས་འགའ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ This study allows us to make several interesting observations and gain valuable insights. Which can be used to help develop better translation and dialog generation models. ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ན། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་མེད་པ་རེད།', 'he': 'להבין מודלים עצביים הוא נושא עיקרי של עניין בקהילת הלימודים העמוקה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציעים לפרש מודל עצבי כללי בהשוואה. Specifically, we study the sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) model in the contexts of two mainstream NLP tasks-machine translation and dialogue response generation-as they both use the seq2seq model.  אנו חוקרים איך שני המשימות שונות ואיך ההבדל המשימות שלהם מוביל בהבדלים גדולים בהתנהגות של מערכות התרגום והדיאלוג הנוצאות. המחקר הזה מאפשר לנו לעשות כמה צפיות מעניינות ולהרוויח תובנות ערכות, אשר יכולים להשתמש כדי לעזור לפתח מודלים טובים יותר של תרגום ודיולוג דולר. To our knowledge, no such comparative study has been done so far.'}
{'en': 'Diverse dialogue generation with context dependent dynamic loss function', 'ar': 'توليد حوار متنوع مع وظيفة الخسارة الديناميكية المعتمدة على السياق', 'es': 'Generación de diálogos diversos con función de pérdida dinámica dependiente del contexto', 'pt': 'Geração de diálogos diversos com função de perda dinâmica dependente do contexto', 'fr': 'Génération de dialogues variés avec fonction de perte dynamique dépendante du contexte', 'ja': 'コンテキスト依存の動的損失関数による多様なダイアログ生成', 'zh': '有上下文相关动损函数多样化对话生成', 'hi': 'संदर्भ निर्भर गतिशील हानि समारोह के साथ विविध संवाद पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Генерация диверсифицированного диалога С зависимой ОТ контекста функцией динамических потерь.', 'ga': 'Giniúint dialóige ilghnéitheach le feidhm chaillteanas dinimiciúil ag brath ar chomhthéacs', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული დიალოგის განვითარება კონტექსტის დინამიკური დაკავშირების ფუნქცია', 'el': 'Διαφορετική δημιουργία διαλόγου με λειτουργία δυναμικής απώλειας εξαρτώμενης από το περιβάλλον', 'hu': 'Különböző párbeszédgenerálás kontextusfüggő dinamikus veszteség funkcióval', 'it': 'Generazione di dialogo diversificata con funzione di perdita dinamica dipendente dal contesto', 'mk': 'Генерација на различни дијалози со функција на динамична загуба зависна од контекст', 'lt': 'Įvairių dialogų kūrimas su sąlygų priklausančia dinaminio nuostolio funkcija', 'kk': 'Контексті динамикалық жоғалу функциясының түрлі диалогын құру', 'ms': 'Jenerasi dialog berbeza dengan fungsi kehilangan dinamik tergantung konteks', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡയലോഗ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സംഘത്തില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഡൈനാമിക് നഷ്ടപ്പെ', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ djalogu differenti b’funzjoni ta’ telf dinamiku dipendenti fuq il-kuntest', 'mn': 'Динамикийн алдагдлын функцын хамааралтай диалог бүтээлч', 'no': 'Diverser dialoggenerering med kontekstavhengig dynamisk tapsfunksjon', 'pl': 'Różnorodne generowanie dialogów z funkcją dynamicznej straty zależnej od kontekstu', 'ro': 'Generare diversă de dialog cu funcție de pierdere dinamică dependentă de context', 'sr': 'Raznovrsna generacija dijaloga sa funkcijom gubitka ovisnom o kontekstu', 'si': 'විවිධ සංවාදය නිර්මාණය සඳහා සංවාදය නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Muuqashada dialogka oo kala duduwan oo ku xiran daboolka khasaarada ku xiran', 'sv': 'Generering av olika dialoger med sammanhangsberoende dynamisk förlustfunktion', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்குதல் சார்ந்த ஊடக இழப்பு செயல்பாடுடன்', 'ur': 'مختلف ڈیالوگر پیدا کرے جو کنٹکس ڈیانیمیٹ گھاٹ فنکٹ کے مطابق ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế tạo các cuộc đối thoại khác nhau với hàm phụ thuộc', 'bg': 'Разнообразно генериране на диалог с функция за динамична загуба, зависима от контекста', 'da': 'Generering af forskellig dialog med kontekstafhængig dynamisk tabsfunktion', 'nl': 'Diverse dialooggeneratie met contextafhankelijke dynamische verliesfunctie', 'hr': 'Raznovrsna generacija dijaloga s funkcijom gubitka ovisnom o kontekstu', 'de': 'Diverse Dialogegenerierung mit kontextabhängiger dynamischer Verlustfunktion', 'id': 'Generasi dialog berbeda dengan fungsi kehilangan dinamik tergantung konteks', 'ko': '언어 환경 동적 손실 함수에 기초한 다원적 대화 생성', 'fa': 'نسل محاورۀ مختلف با عملکرد خسارت دینامیک بستگی به محیط', 'sw': 'Kizazi cha mazungumzo tofauti kinachotegemea kazi ya kupoteza', 'tr': 'Kontekst baglançy dynamik ýitirmek funksiýasy bilen därleşdirişi', 'af': 'Verskeie dialoog generasie met konteks afhanklik dinamiese verlies funksie', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i dialogut të ndryshëm me funksion të humbjes dinamike të varur nga konteksti', 'am': 'Diverse dialogue generation with context dependent dynamic loss function', 'hy': 'Տարբեր պատմություններ ստեղծելու համար, որը կախված է կորստի դինամիկ ֆունկցիայից', 'az': 'Kontekst dinamik z톛iflik funksiyas캼 il톛 m칲xt톛lif r톛q톛ml톛r n톛z톛riyy톛ti', 'bn': 'কন্টেক্সটেক্সটেন্ট নির্ভর করে ডায়ালগের প্রজন্ম দ্বারা বিভিন্ন ডায়ালগের প্রজন্ম', 'bs': 'Raznovrsna generacija dijaloga sa funkcijom gubitka ovisnom o kontekstu', 'ca': 'generació de diàleg divers amb funció de pèrdua dinàmica dependient del context', 'cs': 'Různorodé generování dialogů s funkcí dynamické ztráty závislé na kontextu', 'et': 'Mitmekesise dialoogi loomine kontekstist sõltuva dünaamilise kao funktsiooniga', 'fi': 'Monipuolinen dialogin luominen kontekstista riippuvalla dynaamisella häviötoiminnolla', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'sk': 'Različno ustvarjanje dialoga s funkcijo dinamične izgube, odvisno od konteksta', 'he': 'דור דיאלוג שונה עם תפקיד אובדן דינמי תלוי בקשר', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'འགྲེལ་བཤད་རྟེན་པའི་སྐྱོན་རུང་བ་དང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་ཁུངས་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Dialogue systems using deep learning have achieved generation of fluent response sentences to user utterances. Nevertheless, they tend to produce responses that are not diverse and which are less context-dependent. To address these shortcomings, we propose a new loss function, an Inverse N-gram loss (INF), which incorporates contextual fluency and diversity at the same time by a simple formula. Our INF loss can adjust its loss dynamically by a weight using the inverse frequency of the tokens’ n-gram applied to Softmax Cross-Entropy loss, so that rare tokens appear more likely while retaining the fluency of the generated sentences. We trained Transformer using English and Japanese Twitter replies as single-turn dialogues using different loss functions. Our INF loss model outperformed the baselines of SCE loss and ITF loss models in automatic evaluations such as DIST-N and ROUGE, and also achieved higher scores on our human evaluations of coherence and richness.', 'ar': 'حققت أنظمة الحوار التي تستخدم التعلم العميق توليد جمل استجابة بطلاقة لأقوال المستخدم. ومع ذلك ، فإنها تميل إلى إنتاج ردود غير متنوعة وأقل اعتمادًا على السياق. لمعالجة أوجه القصور هذه ، نقترح وظيفة خسارة جديدة ، وهي خسارة N-gram العكسية (INF) ، والتي تتضمن الطلاقة السياقية والتنوع في نفس الوقت من خلال صيغة بسيطة. يمكن أن يضبط فقد INF الخاص بنا خسارته ديناميكيًا عن طريق الوزن باستخدام التردد العكسي للرموز المميزة n-gram المطبقة على Softmax Cross-Entropy ، بحيث تظهر الرموز النادرة أكثر احتمالية مع الاحتفاظ بطلاقة الجمل التي تم إنشاؤها. قمنا بتدريب Transformer باستخدام ردود Twitter باللغتين الإنجليزية واليابانية كحوارات أحادية الدور باستخدام وظائف خسارة مختلفة. تفوق نموذج خسارة INF الخاص بنا على خطوط الأساس لنماذج خسارة SCE وفقدان الـ ITF في التقييمات التلقائية مثل DIST-N و ROUGE ، كما حقق أيضًا درجات أعلى في تقييماتنا البشرية للتماسك والثراء.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de dialogue utilisant le deep learning ont permis de générer des phrases de réponse fluides aux énoncés des utilisateurs. Néanmoins, ils ont tendance à produire des réponses peu diversifiées et moins dépendantes du contexte. Pour pallier ces lacunes, nous proposons une nouvelle fonction de perte, une perte de N-gramme inverse (INF), qui intègre la fluidité et la diversité contextuelles en même temps par une formule simple. Notre perte INF peut ajuster sa perte dynamiquement par un poids en utilisant la fréquence inverse du n-gramme des jetons appliqué à la perte d'entropie croisée Softmax, de sorte que les jetons rares apparaissent plus probables tout en conservant la fluidité des phrases générées. Nous avons formé Transformer en utilisant les réponses Twitter en anglais et en japonais sous forme de dialogues à tour unique utilisant différentes fonctions de perte. Notre modèle de perte INF a surperformé les valeurs de référence des modèles de perte SCE et ITF dans les évaluations automatiques telles que DIST-N et ROUGE, et a également obtenu des scores plus élevés sur nos évaluations humaines de cohérence et de richesse.", 'pt': 'Sistemas de diálogo usando deep learning conseguiram gerar sentenças de resposta fluentes para enunciados do usuário. No entanto, tendem a produzir respostas pouco diversificadas e menos dependentes do contexto. Para resolver essas deficiências, propomos uma nova função de perda, uma perda inversa de N-gram (INF), que incorpora fluência contextual e diversidade ao mesmo tempo por uma fórmula simples. Nossa perda INF pode ajustar sua perda dinamicamente por um peso usando a frequência inversa do n-gram dos tokens aplicada à perda Softmax Cross-Entropy, para que tokens raros pareçam mais prováveis, mantendo a fluência das sentenças geradas. Treinamos o Transformer usando respostas do Twitter em inglês e japonês como diálogos de um turno usando diferentes funções de perda. Nosso modelo de perda INF superou as linhas de base dos modelos de perda SCE e ITF em avaliações automáticas, como DIST-N e ROUGE, e também alcançou pontuações mais altas em nossas avaliações humanas de coerência e riqueza.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de diálogo que utilizan el aprendizaje profundo han logrado la generación de frases de respuesta fluida a las declaraciones de los usuarios. Sin embargo, tienden a producir respuestas que no son diversas y que dependen menos del contexto. Para abordar estas deficiencias, proponemos una nueva función de pérdida, una pérdida inversa de N-gramas (INF), que incorpora fluidez y diversidad contextuales al mismo tiempo mediante una fórmula simple. Nuestra pérdida de INF puede ajustar su pérdida dinámicamente mediante un peso utilizando la frecuencia inversa del n-grama de los tokens aplicado a la pérdida de entropía cruzada de Softmax, de modo que los tokens raros parecen más probables mientras se conserva la fluidez de las oraciones generadas. Entrenamos a Transformer utilizando respuestas de Twitter en inglés y japonés como diálogos de un solo turno utilizando diferentes funciones de pérdida. Nuestro modelo de pérdida de INF superó las líneas de base de los modelos de pérdida de SCE y pérdida de ITF en evaluaciones automáticas como DIST-N y ROUGE, y también obtuvo puntuaciones más altas en nuestras evaluaciones humanas de coherencia y riqueza.', 'ja': 'ディープラーニングを使用したダイアログシステムは、ユーザーの発話に対する流暢な応答文の生成を達成している。それにもかかわらず、それらは多様ではなく、文脈依存性が低い応答を生み出す傾向がある。これらの欠点に対処するために、私たちは新しい損失関数、Inverse N - gram loss (INF)を提案します。これは、単純な式によって文脈の流動性と多様性を同時に組み込んでいます。当社のINF損失は、Softmaxクロスエントロピー損失に適用されるトークンのnグラムの逆頻度を使用して重みによってその損失を動的に調整することができ、生成された文章の流動性を維持しながら、希少なトークンがより可能性が高いように見えます。英語と日本語のツイッターの返信を使用したトランスフォーマーのトレーニングを、さまざまな損失関数を使用したシングルターンダイアログとして行いました。当社のINF損失モデルは、DIST - NやROUGEなどの自動評価において、SCE損失モデルとITF損失モデルのベースラインを上回り、一貫性と豊かさのヒト評価でも高いスコアを達成しました。', 'hi': 'गहरी शिक्षा का उपयोग करने वाले संवाद प्रणालियों ने उपयोगकर्ता के कथनों के लिए धाराप्रवाह प्रतिक्रिया वाक्यों की पीढ़ी हासिल की है। फिर भी, वे उन प्रतिक्रियाओं का उत्पादन करते हैं जो विविध नहीं हैं और जो कम संदर्भ-निर्भर हैं। इन कमियों को दूर करने के लिए, हम एक नए नुकसान समारोह का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक व्युत्क्रम एन-ग्राम हानि (INF), जो एक साधारण सूत्र द्वारा एक ही समय में प्रासंगिक प्रवाह और विविधता को शामिल करता है। हमारा INF हानि सॉफ्टमैक्स क्रॉस-एन्ट्रॉपी हानि पर लागू टोकन के एन-ग्राम की व्युत्क्रम आवृत्ति का उपयोग करके वजन द्वारा गतिशील रूप से अपने नुकसान को समायोजित कर सकती है, ताकि उत्पन्न वाक्यों के प्रवाह को बनाए रखते हुए दुर्लभ टोकन अधिक संभावना दिखाई दें। हम अंग्रेजी और जापानी चहचहाना विभिन्न नुकसान कार्यों का उपयोग कर एकल बारी संवाद के रूप में जवाब का उपयोग ट्रांसफॉर्मर प्रशिक्षित. हमारे INF हानि मॉडल ने DIST-N और ROUGE जैसे स्वचालित मूल्यांकन में एससीई हानि और आईटीएफ हानि मॉडल की आधार रेखाओं को पछाड़ दिया, और सुसंगतता और समृद्धि के हमारे मानव मूल्यांकन पर उच्च स्कोर भी हासिल किया।', 'zh': '用深学之语已成用户语之流应句成。 然其生不多样化之应,而不赖于上下文。 为此一失函数,逆N-gram损(INF),因其简公式而合上下文流畅性多样性。 吾 INF 损可用于 Softmax 交熵所损令牌 n-gram 之反频率,权重调护,以奇见令牌,兼存成句之流畅性。 以英语与日语Twitter复Transformer训练为用损函数之单回合对。 吾INF损其形于DIST-NROUGE,而自料其SCE损ITF损其基线,而一致性丰富性于人。', 'ru': 'Диалоговые системы, использующие глубокое обучение, добились генерации свободно реагирующих предложений на высказывания пользователей. Тем не менее они, как правило, дают ответы, которые не являются разнообразными и в меньшей степени зависят от контекста. Для устранения этих недостатков мы предлагаем новую функцию потерь, обратную потерю N-грамм (INF), которая включает контекстуальную беглость и разнообразие одновременно по простой формуле. Наша потеря INF может динамически корректировать свою потерю на вес, используя обратную частоту n-граммы токенов, применяемую к потере Softmax Cross-Entropy, так что редкие токены появляются с большей вероятностью, сохраняя текучесть сгенерированных предложений. Мы обучали Transformer, используя английские и японские ответы Twitter в виде одноповоротных диалогов с использованием различных функций потерь. Наша модель потерь INF превзошла исходные показатели моделей потерь SCE и потерь ITF в автоматических оценках, таких как DIST-N и ROUGE, а также достигла более высоких баллов по нашим оценкам человеческой согласованности и богатства.', 'ga': 'Tá giniúint abairtí freagartha líofa ar chaint úsáideoirí bainte amach ag córais idirphlé a úsáideann an domhainfhoghlaim. Mar sin féin, is minic a thugann siad freagraí nach bhfuil ilghnéitheach agus nach mbíonn chomh hspleách ar an gcomhthéacs. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na heasnaimh seo, molaimid feidhm chaillteanais nua, caillteanas N-gram Inbhéartach (INF), a ionchorpraíonn líofacht chomhthéacsúil agus éagsúlacht ag an am céanna trí fhoirmle shimplí. Is féidir lenár gcaillteanas INF a chaillteanas a choigeartú go dinimiciúil de réir meáchain trí úsáid a bhaint as minicíocht inbhéartach n-gram na n-chomharthaí a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar chaillteanas Tras-Eantrópachta Softmax, ionas gur mó an seans go bhfeicfear comharthaí annamha agus líofacht na n-abairtí ginte á gcoinneáil. Chuireamar oiliúint ar Transformer agus úsáid á baint as freagraí Twitter Béarla agus Seapáinise mar chomhphlé aonuaire ag baint úsáide as feidhmeanna éagsúla caillteanais. D’fheidhmigh ár samhail caillteanais INF níos fearr ná na bunlínte de mhúnlaí caillteanais SCE agus caillteanais ITF i meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha ar nós DIST-N agus ROUGE, agus bhain sé scóir níos airde amach freisin ar ár meastóireachtaí daonna ar chomhleanúnachas agus saibhreas.', 'hu': 'A mélytanulást használó párbeszédrendszerek folyékony válaszmondatokat hoztak létre a felhasználók kimondásaira. Mindazonáltal hajlamosak olyan válaszokat hozni, amelyek nem különbözőek, és amelyek kevésbé kontextusfüggőek. A hiányosságok kezelésére egy új veszteségfüggvényt javasolunk, egy Inverz N-gramm veszteséget (INF), amely egyszerű képlettel magában foglalja a kontextuális folyékonyságot és diverzitást. INF veszteségünk dinamikusan tudja beállítani a veszteségét egy súly segítségével, a Softmax Cross-Entrópia veszteségre alkalmazott tokenek n-gramjának fordított frekvenciájával, így a ritka tokenek valószínűbbé válnak, miközben megőrzik a létrehozott mondatok folyékonyságát. A Transformert angol és japán Twitter válaszokkal képeztük egyfordulós párbeszédként, különböző veszteségfunkciókkal. INF veszteség modellünk felülmúlta az SCE veszteség és ITF veszteség modelljeit automatikus értékelésekben, mint például DIST-N és ROUGE, és magasabb pontszámot ért el a koherencia és gazdagság humán értékeléseiben.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα διαλόγου που χρησιμοποιούν τη βαθιά μάθηση έχουν επιτύχει τη δημιουργία εύταιρων προτάσεων απόκρισης στις προφορές των χρηστών. Ωστόσο, τείνουν να παράγουν απαντήσεις που δεν είναι διαφορετικές και οι οποίες εξαρτώνται λιγότερο από το πλαίσιο. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτές οι ελλείψεις, προτείνουμε μια νέα συνάρτηση απώλειας, μια αντίστροφη απώλεια N-γραμμάτων (η οποία ενσωματώνει τη συνοπτική ρευστότητα και την ποικιλομορφία ταυτόχρονα με έναν απλό τύπο. Η απώλεια μπορεί να προσαρμόσει δυναμικά την απώλειά της με βάρος χρησιμοποιώντας την αντίστροφη συχνότητα των γραμμάτων των σημάτων που εφαρμόζεται στην απώλεια διαγραφικής εντροπίας έτσι ώστε οι σπάνιες μάρκες να εμφανίζονται πιο πιθανές διατηρώντας παράλληλα την ευχέρεια των παραγόμενων προτάσεων. Εκπαιδευτήκαμε τον Transformer χρησιμοποιώντας Αγγλικά και Ιαπωνικά απαντήσεις στο Twitter ως διαλόγους μίας στροφής χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικές λειτουργίες απώλειας. Το μοντέλο απώλειας υπερνίκησε τις βασικές γραμμές των μοντέλων απώλειας SCE και ITF σε αυτόματες αξιολογήσεις όπως και το και πέτυχε υψηλότερες βαθμολογίες στις ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις της συνοχής και του πλούτου.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სისტემები, რომლის გამოყენება ძალიან სწავლების გამოყენებაში, მივიღეთ სისტემების წარმოდგენება მომხმარებელი სიტყვების გარე მაგრამ, ისინი უფრო ცნობიერებულია, რომლებიც არ განსხვავებულია და რომლებიც ცნობიერებული კონტექსტური დაახლოებით. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ახალი გამოცდილების ფუნქციას გადაწყენოთ, რომელიც განსხვავებული N-გრამის გამოცდილება (INF), რომელიც ერთ-ერთი დროში კონტექსტური ფუნქცია და განსხვავებას ერთადერთი ფუ ჩვენი INF დასრულება შეიძლება დინამიკურად გადასრულებას გამოყენებთ n-გრამის გადასრულება, რომელიც Softmax-Cross-Entropy დასრულებაში გამოყენებულია, ამიტომ გადასრულებული სიმბოლოები უფრო შესაძლებელია გადასრულებული ჩვენ ინგლისური და იაპონური Twitter-ის გამოყენებას გამოყენებული ტრანფორმეტრის განსწავლა, როგორც განსხვავებული ფუნქციების გამოყენებას გამოყენ ჩვენი INF მოდელის დაკავშირების მოდელია შეუძლებელია SCE დაკავშირების და ITF დაკავშირების მოდელის მაგალითი მაგალითში, როგორც DIST-N და ROUGE, და ასევე ჩვენი ადამიანის შესაძლებელობის შესაძლებელობის და ბედნიერების გადა', 'it': 'I sistemi di dialogo che utilizzano il deep learning hanno ottenuto la generazione di frasi di risposta fluenti alle parole degli utenti. Tuttavia, tendono a produrre risposte che non sono diverse e che sono meno dipendenti dal contesto. Per ovviare a queste carenze, proponiamo una nuova funzione di perdita, una perdita inversa di N-grammo (INF), che incorpora fluenza contestuale e diversità allo stesso tempo con una formula semplice. La nostra perdita INF può regolare la sua perdita dinamicamente da un peso utilizzando la frequenza inversa del n-gram dei token applicato alla perdita di Softmax Cross-Entropy, in modo che i token rari appaiano più probabili mantenendo la fluidità delle frasi generate. Abbiamo addestrato Transformer usando le risposte Twitter inglesi e giapponesi come dialoghi a turno singolo utilizzando diverse funzioni di perdita. Il nostro modello di perdita INF ha superato le linee di base dei modelli di perdita SCE e ITF in valutazioni automatiche come DIST-N e ROUGE, e ha anche ottenuto punteggi più alti sulle nostre valutazioni umane di coerenza e ricchezza.', 'kk': 'Диалог жүйелері терең оқыту арқылы пайдаланушылардың сөздеріне жылдамдық жауап сөздерін құрып кетті. Бірақ олар әртүрлі емес жауаптарды жасап, контекстік тәуелді емес. Бұл жеткіліктерді өзгерту үшін, біз жаңа жоғалу функциясын таңдаймыз, қарапайым формулалар бойынша контекстік жылдамдылық және әртүрліктерді бір уақытта бірдей жұмыс істейді. Біздің INF жоғалуымыз динамикалық өзінің жоғалуының n- граммасының қарсы жиілігін Softmax Cross- Entropy жоғалуына қолданылатын символдардың қарсы жиілігін қолдануға болады, сондықтан құрылған сөйлемелердің жылдамдығын сақтау үшін қа Біз ағылшын және жапон Твиттердің жауаптарын бір- бір аудару диалогында түрлі жоғалу функцияларын қолдану арқылы түрлендірушісін оқыдық. INF жоғалу үлгісіміз SCE жоғалуының негізгі жолын және ITF жоғалуының үлгілерін, мысалы DIST-N және ROUGE секілді автоматты оқу үлгілерінде жасады, сондай-ақ адамдардың бағалауы мен бағалауымыздың жоғары', 'ms': 'Sistem dialog menggunakan pembelajaran dalam telah mencapai generasi kalimat balas fluent kepada ungkapan pengguna. Namun, mereka cenderung menghasilkan jawapan yang tidak berbeza dan yang kurang bergantung pada konteks. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan-kekurangan ini, kami cadangkan fungsi kehilangan baru, kehilangan N-gram terbaliknya (INF), yang mengandungi keseluruhan kontekstual dan pelbagai pada masa yang sama dengan formula sederhana. Kehilangan INF kita boleh menyesuaikan kerugiannya secara dinamik dengan berat menggunakan frekuensi terbaliknya n-gram token yang dilaksanakan pada kerugian Cross-Entropy Softmax, sehingga token langka kelihatan lebih mungkin semasa menyimpan keseluruhan kalimat yang dijana. Kami melatih Transformer menggunakan jawapan Twitter bahasa Inggeris dan Jepun sebagai dialog bertukar tunggal menggunakan fungsi kehilangan yang berbeza. Our INF loss model outperformed the baselines of SCE loss and ITF loss models in automatic evaluations such as DIST-N and ROUGE, and also achieved higher scores on our human evaluations of coherence and richness.', 'mk': 'Системите за дијалог кои користат длабоко учење постигнаа генерација на реченици за течни одговори на изразите на корисникот. Сепак, тие имаат тенденција да создаваат одговори кои не се различни и кои се помалку зависни од контекст. За да ги решиме овие недостатоци, предложуваме нова функција на загуба, Инверзно загуба на N-грам (ИНФ), која вклучува контекстна течност и различност во исто време со едноставна формула. Нашата загуба на ИНФ може да ја прилагоди својата загуба динамично со тежина користејќи ја спротивната фреквенција на n-грамот на знаците применети на Softmax Cross-Entropy загубата, така што ретките знаци се поверојатни додека ја задржуваат течноста на генерираните реченици. Го трениравме Трансформерот користејќи англиски и јапонски Твитер одговори како дијалози на едно свртување користејќи различни загуби функции. Нашиот модел за загуба на ИНФ ги надмина основните линии на СКЕ загуба и ИТФ загуба модели во автоматски проценки како ДИСТ-Н и РУГЕ, и исто така постигна повисоки резултати на нашите човечки проценки на кохеренцијата и богатството.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi ta’ djalogu li jużaw tagħlim profond kisbu ġenerazzjoni ta’ sentenzi ta’ rispons fluwenti għal dikjarazzjonijiet tal-utent. Madankollu, huma għandhom it-tendenza li jipproduċu reazzjonijiet li mhumiex diversi u li huma inqas dipendenti fuq il-kuntest. Biex nindirizzaw dawn in-nuqqasijiet, nipproponu funzjoni ġdida ta’ telf, telf ta’ N-gramma inversa (INF), li tinkorpora l-fluwenza u d-diversità kuntestwali fl-istess ħin permezz ta’ formula sempliċi. It-telf INF tagħn a jista’ jaġġusta t-telf tiegħu b’mod dinamiku b’piż billi tuża l-frekwenza inversa tat-tokens’ n-gram applikati għat-telf ta’ Softmax Cross-Entropy, sabiex tokens rari jidhru aktar probabbli filwaqt li żżomm il-fluwenza tas-sentenzi ġġenerati. Taħriġna lil Transformer bl-użu tat-tweġibiet tal-Ingliż u tal-Ġappun fuq Twitter bħala djalogi b’dawra waħda bl-użu ta’ funzjonijiet differenti ta’ telf. Il-mudell tat-telf INF tagħna qabeż il-linji bażi tat-telf SCE u l-mudelli tat-telf ITF f’evalwazzjonijiet awtomatiċi bħal DIST-N u ROUGE, u kiseb ukoll punteġġi ogħla fuq l-evalwazzjonijiet tal-bniedem tagħna ta’ koerenza u rikkezza.', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ തലമുറയായി സംവിധാനങ്ങള എന്നാലും അവര്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിക്കുന്നു. അത് വ്യത്യസ്തമായിട്ടില്ലാത്ത മറുപടികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന ഈ ചുരുക്കുകളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നാം ഒരു പുതിയ നഷ്ടത്തിന്റെ ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന N-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ നഷ്ടത് സോഫ്റ്റ്മാക്സ് ക്രോസ്-എന്റ്രോപ്പി നഷ്ടത്തിനുള്ള തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങളുടെ നിര്\u200dബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായി നമ്മുടെ ഐഎഫ്  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ജപ്പാനീസും ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാരും പരിശീലിപ്പിച്ചു. വ്യത്യസ്തമായ നഷ്ടം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപ നമ്മുടെ INF നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d SCE നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ടതിന്റെയും ITF നഷ്ടത്തിന്റെയും അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു. ഡിസ്റ്റ്-N പോലെയും റൂജിന്റെയും സ', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий суралцах боломжтой диалог системүүд хэрэглэгчийн хэлэлцээнд шингэн хариу өгүүлбэрүүдийг хүртэл хүргэсэн. Гэвч тэд өөр өөр хариулт гаргаж, хариулт нь бага байдаг. Эдгээр алдагдлыг удирдахын тулд бид шинэ алдагдлын функцийг санал болгож байна. Н-граммын алдагдлыг (INF) эсрэг хэлбэртэй. Бидний INF алдагдалд өөрсдийн алдагдлыг динамик хэмжээгээр нүүрстөрөгчийн n-граммын эсрэг хэмжээг ашиглан Softmax Cross-Entropy алдагдах боломжтой болгодог. Иймээс ховор тэмдэгт үүсгэн өгүүлбэрийн шингэнийг хадгалах үед илүү боломжтой болдо Бид Англи болон Япон Твиттерүүд өөр алдагдлын функцуудыг ашиглан ганц эргэлтийн диалог болгон хариултыг ашиглан Трансформерийг суралцаж өгсөн. Бидний INF алдах загвар нь SCE алдах болон ITF алдах загварын үндсэн шулуунуудыг DIST-N болон ROUGE зэрэг автоматически дүгнэлт хийсэн бөгөөд мөн хүн төрөлхтний баялаг, баялаг байдлын талаар илүү өндөр оноо гаргасан.', 'no': 'Dialogsystemar som brukar dypt læring har oppnådd generering av fluent svarsetningar til brukarstaler. Men dei har tendens til å produsere svar som ikkje er ulike og som er mindre kontekstavhengig. For å handtera desse forskjellingane, foreslår vi ein ny tapfunksjon, eit Inverse N-gram tap (INF), som inkluderer kontekst fluktens og mangfoldighet samtidig med ein enkel formel. INF-tapen vårt kan dynamisk justera tapen av vekten ved å bruka den inverse frekvensen av n-grammet for teikna som er brukt til tap av «Softmax Cross-Entropy», slik at sjelde teikna ser meir sannsynleg ved å lagra flukten av dei genererte setningane. Vi treng transformerer med engelsk og japansk Twitter-svar som enkeltvaringsdialogar med ulike tapfunksjonar. INF-tapmodellen vårt utførte grunnlinjer av SCE-tap og ITF-tapmodeller i automatiske evalueringar som DIST-N og ROUGE, og også oppnådd høgare poeng på våre menneske evalueringar av koherens og rykkhet.', 'pl': 'Systemy dialogowe wykorzystujące głębokie uczenie osiągnęły generowanie płynnych zdań odpowiedzi na wypowiedzi użytkowników. Niemniej jednak mają one tendencję do tworzenia odpowiedzi, które nie są zróżnicowane i które są mniej zależne od kontekstu. Aby rozwiązać te niedociągnięcia, proponujemy nową funkcję strat, odwrotną stratę N-gramową (INF), która uwzględnia kontekstową płynność i różnorodność jednocześnie poprzez prostą formułę. Nasza strata INF może dynamicznie dostosować swoją stratę przez wagę przy użyciu odwrotnej częstotliwości n-gramu tokenów stosowanego do utraty Softmax Cross-Entropii, dzięki czemu rzadkie tokeny pojawiają się bardziej prawdopodobne przy zachowaniu płynności generowanych zdań. Szkoliliśmy Transformera używając angielskich i japońskich odpowiedzi Twittera jako dialogów jednorazowych z wykorzystaniem różnych funkcji strat. Nasz model strat INF przewyższył podstawowe modele strat SCE i ITF w automatycznych ocenach, takich jak DIST-N i ROUGE, a także osiągnął wyższe wyniki w ocenach spójności i bogactwa przez ludzi.', 'lt': 'Dialogo sistemos, kuriose naudojamas gilus mokymasis, sukūrė skystų atsako į naudotojų žodžius sakinių. Vis dėlto jos paprastai teikia atsakymus, kurie nėra įvairūs ir mažiau priklausomi nuo aplinkybių. To address these shortcomings, we propose a new loss function, an Inverse N-gram loss (INF), which incorporates contextual fluency and diversity at the same time by a simple formula.  Mūsų INF nuostolis gali dinamiškai koreguoti jo nuostolius pagal svorį, naudojant atvirkštinį tokenų n-gramo dažn į, taikomą Softmax kryžminiam entropijos nuostoliui, kad retieji tokenai pasirodytų labiau tikėtini išlaikant sukauptų sakinių lankstumą. We trained Transformer using English and Japanese Twitter replies as single-turn dialogues using different loss functions.  Our INF loss model outperformed the baselines of SCE loss and ITF loss models in automatic evaluations such as DIST-N and ROUGE, and also achieved higher scores on our human evaluations of coherence and richness.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de dialog care utilizează învățarea profundă au obținut generarea de propoziții fluente de răspuns la pronunțările utilizatorilor. Cu toate acestea, ele tind să producă răspunsuri care nu sunt diverse și care sunt mai puțin dependente de context. Pentru a remedia aceste deficiențe, propunem o nouă funcție de pierdere, o pierdere inversă de N-gram (INF), care încorporează fluența contextuală și diversitatea în același timp printr-o formulă simplă. Pierderea noastră INF își poate ajusta pierderea dinamic printr-o greutate folosind frecvența inversă a n-gramului jetoanelor aplicat pierderii Softmax Cross-Entropy, astfel încât jetoanele rare să apară mai probabil, păstrând fluența propozițiilor generate. Am instruit Transformer folosind răspunsuri Twitter în engleză și japoneză ca dialoguri cu un singur rând folosind diferite funcții de pierdere. Modelul nostru de pierdere INF a depășit liniile de bază ale modelelor de pierdere SCE și ITF în evaluări automate precum DIST-N și ROUGE și a obținut, de asemenea, scoruri mai mari în evaluările noastre umane de coerență și bogăție.', 'sr': 'Sistemi dijaloga koji koriste duboko učenje postigli su generaciju tečnih rečenica odgovora na govore korisnika. Ipak, oni tendiraju da proizvode odgovore koji nisu različiti i koji su manje ovisni o kontekstu. Za rješavanje tih nedostataka, predlažemo novu funkciju gubitka, gubitak Inverse N-gram a (INF), koja uključuje kontekstualnu tečnost i raznolikost istovremeno jednostavnom formulom. Naš gubitak INF može dinamički prilagoditi gubitak sa težinom koristeći obrnutu frekvenciju n-gram a znakova primjene na gubitak preko entropije Softmax, tako da se rijetki znakovi pojave vjerojatniji dok zadržavaju težinu proizvedenih rečenica. Trenirali smo Transformera koristeći engleski i japanski Twitter odgovore kao jednookreni dijalog koristeći različite funkcije gubitka. Naš model gubitka INF je nadmašio osnovne linije gubitka SCE-a i modela gubitka ITF-a u automatskim procenama poput DIST-N i ROUGE-a, a takođe je postigao veći rezultat o našim ljudskim procenama koherencije i bogatstva.', 'si': 'සංවාද පද්ධතිය භාවිතා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව ඒත් ඔවුන් වෙනස් නොවෙන ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම සංවේදනය අ අපි අලුත් නැතිවීම වැඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, විරුද්ධ N-ග්\u200dරාම් නැතිවීම (INF) කිරීම සම්පූර්ණය සහ විවිධානයක් එකම අපේ INF නැතිවෙන්න පුළුවන් එයාගේ නැතිවීම සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් බලය සඳහා බලය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වීමාව සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වීමාව සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වීමාව සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වී අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජාපානි ට්විටර් වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් වැරදි  අපේ INF නැති මොඩේලය SCE නැතිවෙලා තියෙනවා සහ ITF නැතිවෙලා තියෙනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විශ්ලේෂණ වලින් DIST-N සහ ROUGE වලින්, සහ අපේ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අවශ්\u200d', 'so': "nidaamka diyaarinta ee isticmaalaya waxbarashada aad u dheer waxay gaadheen danab ka mid ah jawaabta sameynta afka isticmaalaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay soo saaraan jawaabo aan kala duduwan oo aan ka yarayn daboolka ku xiran. Si a an u qabsado qalabkan gaaban, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa waxqabad cusub oo khasaar ah, kaas oo ku qoran dhamaantooda iyo kala duduwan isla markaasna ku qoran qaab fudud. Lacagteeda INF waxey ku hagaajin kartaa miisaanka miisaanka dib u soo celinta calaamadaha n-gram ee ku habboon lumbarka laabashada Softmax-Entropy, si ay calaamadaha ugu yaraan u muuqato marka ay sii haystaan faa'iidada ciqaabaha generay. Waxaannu tababarinnay turjubaan isticmaalka Ingiriis iyo Jabanees oo ku jawaabaya labaad oo kaliya oo isticmaalaya waxqabad khasaaro kala duduwan. Tusaalka luminta ee INF waxay samaysay asalka hoose ee luminta SCE iyo tusaalaha luminta ITF ee bilowga lagu qiimeeyo sida DIST-N iyo ROUGE, waxaana sidoo kale helay qiimeynta dadkeena ku saabsan dhamaanka iyo hodantinimada.", 'sv': 'Dialogsystem som använder djupinlärning har skapat flytande responsmeningar på användarnas uttalanden. De tenderar dock att ge svar som inte är olika och som är mindre sammanhangsberoende. För att åtgärda dessa brister föreslår vi en ny förlustfunktion, en Invers N-gramförlust (INF), som införlivar kontextuell flytning och mångfald samtidigt med en enkel formel. Vår INF-förlust kan justera sin förlust dynamiskt genom en vikt med hjälp av den omvända frekvensen av tokens n-gram som tillämpas på Softmax Cross-Entropy förlust, så att sällsynta tokens visas mer sannolikt samtidigt som de genererade meningarna behålls flytande. Vi tränade Transformer genom att använda engelska och japanska Twitter-svar som single-turn dialoger med olika förlustfunktioner. Vår INF-förlustmodell överträffade baselines för SCE-förlustmodeller och ITF-förlustmodeller i automatiska utvärderingar som DIST-N och ROUGE, och uppnådde också högre poäng på våra mänskliga bedömningar av samstämmighet och rikedom.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கற்றலை பயன்படுத்தும் உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் பயனர் சொல்லுகளுக்கு தெளிவான பதில் வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்கியத ஆனாலும், அவர்கள் வித்தியாசமான பதில்களை உருவாக்குகிறார்கள் மற்றும் சூழல் சார்ந்த சார்ந்தது குறைவாக இருக் இந்த சுருக்கங்களை விளக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய இழப்பு செயல்பாடு, ஒரு திருப்பி N- gram இழப்பு, அது ஒரே நேரத்தில் உள்ள சாதாரண விளைவுகள் மற்றும் பல்வேறு வி நம்முடைய INF இழப்பு தோல்வியுற்றது முதலீட்டு அதிர்வெளியீட்டு குறியீட்டுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட குறியீடுகளின் n- கிராம் இழப்பை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு தோற்றத்தால் தோல்விய நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தையும் ஜப்பானிய தொடர்புகளையும் பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றி பயிற்சி செய்தோம் வேறு இழப்பு செ எங்கள் INF இழப்பு மாதிரி SCE இழப்பு மற்றும் ITF இழப்பு மாதிரிகளை தானாகவே மதிப்புகளில் செய்து, DIST-N மற்றும் ROUGE போன்ற, மற்றும் அதிக மதிப்புகள் எங்கள் மனித மதிப்பு', 'ur': "عمیق تعلیم کے مطابق ڈالیلوگ سیسٹم نے استعمال کیا ہے کہ استعمال کے کلمات کے لئے سیدھی جواب دینے والی قوموں کی نسل پہنچ گئی ہے. لیکن یہ لوگ جواب دیتے ہیں جو مختلف نہیں ہیں اور کم متعلق ہیں یہ ناکام کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے ایک نئی خسارہ فعالیت کی پیشنهاد کریں، ایک Inverse N-gram loss (INF) جس میں ایک ساده فرمول کے ذریعہ ایک دوسرے وقت کنٹکسیٹ فلونٹی اور مختلف فرمول میں شامل ہوتی ہے. Our INF loss can adjust its loss dynamically by a weight using the inverse frequency of the tokens' n-gram applied to Softmax Cross-Entropy loss, so that rare tokens appear more likely while retaining the fluency of the sentences. ہم نے انگلیسی اور جاپانی ٹویٹر کے استعمال سے ترنسفور کو ایک ٹویٹر کے ڈالیوں کی جواب دیتے ہیں اور مختلف خسارہ فناوروں کے استعمال سے۔ ہمارے INF خسارہ موڈل نے SCE خسارہ اور ITF خسارہ موڈلیوں کی بنیادی خسارہ کی تھی جیسے DIST-N اور ROUGE اور ہمارے انسان کی ارزیابی اور ثروت کے بارے میں اچھی اسکور پہنچ گئے۔", 'uz': "Name Lekin, ular turli javoblarni yaratadi, va bu context-muhit ishlatmaydi. Bu qisqartmalarni boshqarish uchun yangi tap funksiyatini tahlil qilamiz. Bu paytda oddiy formula bilan boshlanadi. Bizning INF taplarimiz softmax Cross-Entropy tapiga qo'llangan nishonchalarning tarkibini qo'llashda oddiy qo'yish mumkin. Bu yerda yaratilgan so ʻzlarning suzuvligini davom etishda qisqa ko'p belgilar yaxshi ko'proq koʻrinadi. Biz Inglizcha va Япония Twitterni ishlatishda o'rganishni boshqa vazifalarni qo'llashdan foydalanish uchun bir taklif qilamiz. INF tap modelimiz SCE taplari va ITF tap modellarining asosini avtomatik qiymatlarida bajaradi va DIST-N va ROUGE kabi narsalarni bajardi va bizning inson taxminan va taxminan qiymatlarimizning eng yuqori qiymatlarimizni bajardi.", 'vi': "Các hệ thống bằng sự học sâu đã có thể từng thành các câu trả lời thông thạo với khát người. Tuy nhiên, họ có xu hướng đưa ra các phản ứng không đa dạng và phụ thuộc ít ngữ cảnh hơn. Để giải quyết những thiếu sót này, chúng tôi đề nghị một hàm thua lỗ mới, một lỗ đảo N-gram, gồm cả tính chất chung và đa dạng, đồng thời với một công thức đơn giản. Chúng ta có thể điều chỉnh độ thua của n ó một cách động động lực bằng cách sử dụng tần số phản động của ô hiệu ứng tín hiệu'n-gram được áp dụng cho mất tín hiệu phản chiếu quảng cáo quảng cáo quảng cáo mềm, để những thẻ hiếm có thể xuất hiện nhiều khả năng hơn trong khi giữ thanh lưu của các câu đã tạo ra. Chúng tôi đã huấn luyện Transformer sử dụng các câu trả lời từ Twitter của Anh và Nhật. bằng cách dùng các chức năng mất mát khác nhau. Hệ thống mất tổn nhiều nhất của chúng tôi đã hoàn thành hệ thống gốc của kiểu lỗ hổng SCE và mô hình giảm tổn thất ITF trong các bản đánh giá tự động như DIST-N và ZUGHE, và cũng đạt được điểm cao hơn trong những đánh giá nhân loại về sự đồng nhất và giàu có.", 'bg': 'Системите за диалог, използващи дълбоко обучение, са постигнали генериране на плавни изречения за отговор на потребителските изказвания. Въпреки това те са склонни да произвеждат отговори, които не са разнообразни и които са по-малко зависими от контекста. За да се справим с тези недостатъци, предлагаме нова функция за загуба, Обратна загуба на N-грама (ИНФ), която включва едновременно контекстуална плавност и разнообразие чрез проста формула. Нашата загуба може динамично да коригира загубата си чрез тегло, използвайки обратната честота на n-грама на жетоните, приложени към загуба на кръстосана ентропия, така че редките жетони да изглеждат по-вероятно, като същевременно запазват плавността на генерираните изречения. Обучихме трансформатора, използвайки английски и японски отговори в Туитър като еднократни диалози, използвайки различни функции за загуба. Нашият модел на загуба на INF надмина базовите линии на моделите на загуба на SCE и ITF при автоматични оценки като DIST-N и ROUGE, а също така постигна по-високи резултати при нашите човешки оценки за съгласуваност и богатство.', 'da': 'Dialogsystemer, der anvender dyb læring, har opnået generering af flydende responssætninger til brugernes udtalelser. Ikke desto mindre har de en tendens til at give svar, der ikke er forskellige, og som er mindre kontekstafhængige. For at afhjælpe disse mangler foreslår vi en ny tabsfunktion, et Inverse N-gram tab (INF), som indarbejder kontekstuel flydende og diversitet på samme tid ved en simpel formel. Vores INF tab kan justere sit tab dynamisk ved hjælp af en vægt ved hjælp af den omvendte frekvens af tokens n-gram anvendt til Softmax Cross-Entropy tab, så sjældne tokens vises mere sandsynlige, mens de opretholder flydende sætninger. Vi trænede Transformer ved hjælp af engelske og japanske Twitter svar som single-turn dialoger ved hjælp af forskellige tabsfunktioner. Vores INF tabsmodel overgik baselines for SCE tab og ITF tabsmodeller i automatiske evalueringer som DIST-N og ROUGE, og opnåede også højere scorer på vores menneskelige evalueringer af sammenhæng og rigdom.', 'hr': 'Sistemi dijaloga koji koriste duboko učenje postigli su generaciju tečnih odgovornih rečenica na govore korisnika. Ipak, oni tendiraju proizvesti odgovore koji nisu različiti i koji su manje ovisni o kontekstu. Za rješavanje tih nedostataka, predlažemo novu funkciju gubitka, gubitak Inverse N-gram a (INF), koja uključuje kontekstsku tekućinu i raznolikost istovremeno jednostavnom formulom. Naš gubitak INF može dinamički prilagoditi gubitak s težinom koristeći obrnutu frekvenciju n-gram a znakova primjene na gubitak preko Entropije Softmax, tako da se rijetki znakovi pojavljuju vjerojatniji tijekom zadržavanja težine proizvedenih rečenica. Obučavali smo transformera koristeći engleski i japanski Twitter odgovore kao jednookretani dijalog koristeći različite funkcije gubitka. Naš model gubitka INF-a iznosio je početne linije gubitka SCE-a i modela gubitka ITF-a u automatskim procjenama poput DIST-N i ROUGE-a, a također je postigao veći rezultat o našim ljudskim procjenama usklađenosti i bogatstva.', 'nl': 'Dialogsystemen die gebruik maken van deep learning hebben geleid tot het genereren van vloeiende responszinnen op uitspraken van gebruikers. Toch hebben ze de neiging om reacties te produceren die niet divers zijn en die minder contextafhankelijk zijn. Om deze tekortkomingen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuwe verliesfunctie voor, een Inverse N-gram loss (INF), die contextuele vloeiendheid en diversiteit tegelijkertijd integreert door middel van een eenvoudige formule. Ons INF-verlies kan het verlies dynamisch aanpassen door een gewicht met behulp van de omgekeerde frequentie van het n-gram van de tokens toegepast op Softmax Cross-Entropy verlies, zodat zeldzame tokens waarschijnlijker lijken terwijl de vloeiende zinnen behouden blijven. We hebben Transformer getraind met behulp van Engelse en Japanse Twitter antwoorden als single-turn dialogen met behulp van verschillende verlies functies. Ons INF-verliesmodel presteerde beter dan de basislijnen van SCE-verliesmodellen en ITF-verliesmodellen in automatische evaluaties zoals DIST-N en ROUGE, en behaalde ook hogere scores op onze menselijke evaluaties van samenhang en rijkdom.', 'de': 'Dialogsysteme, die Deep Learning nutzen, haben die Generierung flüssiger Antwortsätze auf Benutzeräußerungen erreicht. Dennoch neigen sie dazu, Antworten zu produzieren, die nicht vielfältig und weniger kontextabhängig sind. Um diese Mängel zu beheben, schlagen wir eine neue Verlustfunktion vor, einen Inversen N-Gramm Verlust (INF), der kontextuelle Fluenz und Diversität gleichzeitig durch eine einfache Formel berücksichtigt. Unser INF-Verlust kann seinen Verlust dynamisch durch ein Gewicht anpassen, indem er die umgekehrte Frequenz des n-Gramm der Token verwendet, die auf Softmax Cross-Entropie-Verlust angewendet wird, so dass seltene Token wahrscheinlicher erscheinen, während die Fließfähigkeit der generierten Sätze beibehalten wird. Wir trainierten Transformer mit englischen und japanischen Twitter Antworten als Single-Turn Dialoge mit verschiedenen Verlustfunktionen. Unser INF-Verlustmodell übertraf die Basislinien von SCE-Verlustmodellen und ITF-Verlustmodellen in automatischen Auswertungen wie DIST-N und ROUGE und erzielte auch höhere Scores bei unseren menschlichen Bewertungen von Kohärenz und Reichtum.', 'id': "Sistem dialog menggunakan belajar dalam telah mencapai generasi kalimat respon fluent kepada ucapan pengguna. Namun, mereka cenderung menghasilkan respon yang tidak berbeda dan yang kurang tergantung pada konteks. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan-kekurangan ini, kami mengusulkan fungsi kehilangan baru, kehilangan Inverse N-gram (INF), yang mengangkut fluency kontekstual dan diversitas pada saat yang sama dengan formula sederhana. Kehilangan INF kita dapat menyesuaikan kerugiannya secara dinamik dengan berat badan menggunakan frekuensi terbalik token 'n-gram yang diterapkan pada kerugian Softmax Cross-Entropy, sehingga token langka tampak lebih mungkin sementara menyimpan fluency kalimat yang dihasilkan. Kami melatih Transformer menggunakan jawaban bahasa Inggris dan Jepang Twitter sebagai dialog single-turn menggunakan fungsi kehilangan yang berbeda. Model kehilangan INF kami melebihi garis dasar kehilangan SCE dan model kehilangan ITF dalam evaluasi otomatis seperti DIST-N dan ROUGE, dan juga mencapai skor yang lebih tinggi pada evaluasi manusia kita dari koherensi dan kekayaan.", 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو با استفاده از یادگیری عمیق به نسل\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cای به زبانهای کاربر رسیده\u200cاند. با این حال، آنها می\u200cخواهند جواب\u200cهایی را که متفاوت نیستند و کمتر بستگی دارند. برای حل این ناتوانی، ما یک عملکرد جدید از دست دادن پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، loss of N-grams Inverse (INF) که با یک فرمول ساده\u200cای آسیب و متفاوت در همین زمان شامل می\u200cشود. خسارت INF ما می\u200cتواند با وزن از فرانسوی برعکس n-گرم نشانه\u200cهایی که به خسارت کروس-انتروپی Softmax کاربرد، به اندازه\u200cای که نشانه\u200cهای نادر بیشتری احتمال می\u200cیابند در حالی که حفظ fluency از جمله\u200cهای تولید می\u200cشود. ما تغییر دهنده را با استفاده از توئیتر انگلیسی و ژاپنی به عنوان یک تبدیل با استفاده از عملکرد خسارت متفاوت آموزش دادیم. مدل خسارت INF ما از خسارت پایین SCE و مدل خسارت ITF در ارزیابی اتوماتیک مثل DIST-N و ROUGE انجام داده است، و همچنین امتیاز بالاتری بر ارزیابی انسان ما از هماهنگی و ثروت رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mazungumzo kwa kutumia elimu ya kina imefanikiwa kizazi cha majibu ya mafanikio kwa maneno ya watumiaji. Hata hivyo, huwa wanatengeneza majibu ambayo hayana tofauti na ambayo hayategemea mazingira. Ili kukabiliana na upungufu huu, tunapendekeza kazi mpya ya kupoteza, mpya ya kupoteza vifaa vinavyobadilika N-gram (INF), ambayo inajumuisha ufanisi wa kimataifa na tofauti kwa wakati ule ule ule wa aina rahisi. Tatizo letu la INF linaweza kurekebisha hasara yake kwa uzito kwa kutumia kiwango cha uwekezaji wa mipango ya mipango ya mipango inayotumiwa n a kupoteza kwa mfumo wa Shirika la Kusini la Softmax, ili ishara chache zinaonekana kuwa na uwezekano mkubwa wakati wa kubaki ufanisi wa adhabu zilizozaliwa. Tulimfundisha Transfer kwa kutumia mtandao wa Twita wa Kiingereza na Kijapani kama majadiliano ya moja kwa moja kwa kutumia kazi mbalimbali za kupoteza. Mradi wetu wa kupoteza INF ulionyesha msingi wa hasara ya SCE na mitindo ya kupoteza ITF katika uchunguzi wa kimapenzi kama vile DIST-N na ROUGE, na pia ulipata vipimo vya juu juu juu juu juu juu ya tathmini zetu za ushirikiano na utajiri wetu wa binadamu.', 'ko': '깊이 있게 학습하는 대화 시스템을 사용하면 사용자의 말에 대한 유창한 응답을 실현할 수 있다.그럼에도 불구하고 그들은 종종 다른 반응을 일으키며 상하문에 그다지 의존하지 않는다.이러한 단점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 손실 함수인 역N-gram손실(INF)을 제시했다. 이것은 간단한 공식을 통해 언어 환경의 유창성과 다양성을 동시에 결합시켰다.우리의 INF 손실은 표기된 n-gram의 역주파수(Softmax 교차 엔트로피 손실에 적용)의 권중을 사용하여 그 손실을 동태적으로 조정할 수 있다. 이렇게 보기 드문 표기가 나타날 가능성이 더욱 크고 문장 생성의 유창성을 유지할 수 있다.우리는 영어와 일본어의 트위터를 통해 Transformer를 서로 다른 손실 함수를 사용하는 단원 대화로 훈련시켰다.우리의 INF 손실 모델은 DIST-N과 ROUGE 등 자동 평가에서SCE 손실과 ITF 손실 모델의 기선보다 우수하고 인류가 일관성과 풍부성에 대한 평가에서도 더욱 높은 점수를 얻었다.', 'tr': 'Ullanyş öwrenmeleri ulanan dialoglar ullanýan çykyş sözlerine howply jogabat sözlerini ýetirdi. Yöne-de, olar üýtgeşik däldir we daşary-bagly jogaplary üretmäge mümkin edýärler. Bu kısaytları çözmek üçin, yeni bir kaybolma fonksiyonunu teklif ediyoruz, bir Inverse N-gram kaybı (INF), benzeri bir formül tarafından contextual fluency we çeşitlikleri birdenbire içerir. INF kaybımız Softmax kriz giriş kaybın a uygun noktaların ın n-graminin tersi frekanslarını kullanarak, bu şekilde nadir işaretleri oluşturulmuş cümlelerin flukanlığını koruyarak daha büyük olabilir. Biz iňlisçe we japonça Twitter üçin beýleki ýitim fonksiyonlaryny ulanan terjime edipdik. Bizim INF ýitirmek modelimiz SCE ýitilmesi we ITF ýitilmesi modelleriniň, DIST-N we ROUGE ýaly awtomatik deňlemelerde ýokary çykypdyr we adamlarymyzyň kohereket we baglygymyzda ýokary çykypdyr.', 'af': "Dialoog stelsels wat diep leer gebruik het, het generasie van vloeiende antwoord setinge tot gebruiker uitspraak bereik. Maar hulle moet tog antwoordes produseer wat nie verskeie is en wat minder konteksafhanklik is. Om hierdie kortpad te adres, voorstel ons 'n nuwe verlies funksie, 'n Inverse N- gram verlies (INF), wat in dieselfde tyd inkorpreer contextual fluiditeit en diversiteit deur 'n eenvoudige formule. Ons InF verlies kan dynamiese sy verlies aanpasse deur 'n gewig deur te gebruik die omgekeerde frekwensie van die tokens se n- gram wat aan Softmax Kruis- Entropie verlies gebruik word, sodat rare tokens meer waarskynlik verskyn terwyl die flukwensie van die genereerde teikens hou. Ons het Transformer onderrig gebruik Engels en Japaanse Twitter antwoord as enkel- draai dialoog gebruik verskillende verlies funksies. Ons INF verloor model het die basis lyne van SCE verloor en ITF verloor modele uitgevoer in outomatiese evaluasies soos DIST-N en ROUGE, en ook hoër punte van ons menslike evaluasies van koherens en rykdom bereik.", 'am': 'ጥልቅ ትምህርት የተጠቃሚ ጥያቄ ሲስተማር የፍጥረት መልዕክቶች ለተጠቃሚ ቃላት አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ልዩ ልዩ ያልሆነውን መልስ ያቀርባሉ፣ በሥርዓት ግንኙነት በጣም ታማሹ፡፡ To address these shortcomings, we propose a new loss function, an Inverse N-gram loss (INF), which incorporates contextual fluency and diversity at the same time by a simple formula.  የኢንF ጉዳዩ የነጥብ ግንኙነት በሶፍትmax መስኮት-ኤንትሮፓ ክፍል በተጠቀም እና የክፍለ ግንኙነቶችን በመጠቀም በሚያሳስል ላይ የሚችል ክፍተታችንን በሙሉ ያሳስላል፡፡ እንግሊዝኛ እና ጃፓን ትዊተር በመጠቀም ትርጓሜዎችን በተለየ ጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በመጠቀም አስተማርነው፡፡ የINF ጠፊ ሞዴል የSCE tap እና የITF ጠፊ ሞዴላዎችን እንደ DIST-N እና ROUGE በተመሳሳይ እና በሰው ውስጥነት እና ሀብታም ላይ ከፍተኛ ደረጃዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'sq': 'Sistemet e dialogut që përdorin mësim të thellë kanë arritur gjeneratën e fjalëve të përgjigjes fluente ndaj shprehjeve të përdoruesve. Megjithatë, ato tenderojnë të prodhojnë përgjigje që nuk janë të ndryshme dhe që janë më pak të varura nga konteksti. Për të trajtuar këto mungesa, ne propozojmë një funksion të ri humbjeje, një humbje inverse N-gram (INF), e cila përfshin fluencën kontekstuale dhe diversitetin në të njëjtën kohë me një formulë të thjeshtë. Humbja jonë INF mund të rregullojë humbjen e saj dinamikisht me një peshë duke përdorur frekuencën inverse të n-gram të tokens aplikuar n ë humbjen e Softmax Cross-Entropy, në mënyrë që tokens të rralla të duken më të ngjarë ndërsa mbajnë fluencën e fjalëve të gjeneruara. We trained Transformer using English and Japanese Twitter replies as single-turn dialogues using different loss functions.  Modeli ynë i humbjes INF kaloi linjat bazë të humbjes SCE dhe modeleve të humbjes ITF në vlerësime automatike të tilla si DIST-N dhe ROUGE dhe arriti gjithashtu rezultate më të larta në vlerësimet tona njerëzore të konsistencës dhe pasurisë.', 'hy': 'Dialogue systems using deep learning have achieved generation of fluent response sentences to user utterances.  Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք հակված են ստեղծել ոչ բազմազան պատասխաններ, որոնք ավելի քիչ կախված են կոնտեքստից: Այս թերություններին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կորստի ֆունկցիա, հակառակ N-գրամ կորստի (INF), որը ներառում է կոնտեքստային հեղություն և բազմազանություն միաժամանակ պարզ բանաձևով: Մեր INF-ի կորստը կարող է դինամիկ հարմարեցնել իր կորստը կշռությամբ, օգտագործելով n-գրամի նշանների հակառակ հաճախականությունը, որը կիրառվում է soft-hmax խաչը-էնտրոպիայի կորստի վրա, այնպես որ հազվադեպ նշանները ավելի հավանական են, մինչ պահպանում են Մենք սովորեցրեցինք Թերֆորմերը օգտագործելով անգլերեն և ճապոներեն Թվիթերի պատասխանները որպես մեկ անգամ շրջանակի հաղորդակցություններ, օգտագործելով տարբեր կորստի ֆունկցիաներ: Մեր INF-ի կորստի մոդելը գերազանցել է ՍՍԵ կորստի և ITF-ի կորստի մոդելների հիմնական գծերը այնպիսի ավտոմատիկ գնահատումներում, ինչպիսիք են դիսթ-ն և Ռոգեն, ինչպես նաև ավելի բարձր գնահատականներ ստացել մեր մարդկային գնահատականների կատար', 'az': "Derin öyrənməyi işlədən Dialoog sistemləri istifadəçilərin sözlərinə təsirli cavab sözlərinin nəslinə yetişdirlər. Halbuki, onlar müxtəlif olmayan və daha az bağımlıdır cavab verməyə çalışırlar. Bu ucbatlıqları çəkmək üçün yeni zəiflik funksiyasını təbliğ edirik, bir Inverse N-gram kaybı (INF), eyni zamanda müxtəlif fərqliyyat və müxtəlif bir formül ilə birləşdirir. Bizim INF kaybımız, Softmax Cross Entropy ziyarətinə uyğulanan n-gram'ın tersi sıvırlığın ı istifadə edərək onun kaybını dinamik olaraq dəyişdirə bilər, böylece nadir möcüzələr ürəklənmiş cümlələrin sıvırlığını saxlayaraq daha mümkün görünür. Biz İngilizce və Japon Twitter ilə tək dönüş dialogları ilə müxtəlif zəiflik funksiyalarını istifadə edərək Transformer'i təhsil etdik. INF kaybımızın modeli SCE kaybının və ITF kaybının modellərinin əsas səviyyələrini DIST-N və ROUGE kimi avtomatik değerlendirmələrindən üstün etdi və insan təsiri və zənginlik değerlendirmələrində də daha yüksək dərəcələr yetirdi.", 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম ব্যবহারকারীদের বক্তব্যের জন্য ফ্লায়েন্ট প্রতিক্রিয়ার বাক্যের তবে তারা প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করে যা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন এবং যা কম প্রেক্ষাপটের নির্ভর করে। এই সমস্ত সংক্রান্ত বিষয়গুলোকে মুখোমুখি করার জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ফাংশন প্রস্তাব করি, একটি ইন্টারফার্স এন-গ্রাম হারানো (ইনিএফ), যার মধ্যে স আমাদের আইএনএফ-এর ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ক্রস-এন্ট্রোপির ক্ষতির মাধ্যমে বিনিয়োগের বিনিয়োগের ফ্রাইসি ব্যবহার করে তার ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ক্ষতির মাধ্যমে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত করা যায়, যাতে ত আমরা ইংরেজি এবং জাপানী টুইটার ব্যবহার করে ট্রান্সফার্নের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি বিভিন্ন ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত আমাদের INF হারানোর মডেল স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডিস্ট এন এবং রুজের মতো মূল্যবোধের মূল্যে এসসিসি ক্ষতি এবং আইটিএফ হারানোর মূল্যের মূল্য প্রদর্শন করেছে এবং তারা আমাদের', 'bs': 'Sistemi dijaloga koji koriste duboko učenje postigli su generaciju tečnih rečenica odgovora na govore korisnika. Ipak, oni tendiraju da proizvode odgovore koji nisu različiti i koji su manje ovisni o kontekstu. Za rješavanje tih nedostataka, predlažemo novu funkciju gubitka, gubitak Inverse N-gram a (INF), koja uključuje kontekstualnu tekućinu i raznolikost istovremeno jednostavnom formulom. Naš gubitak INF može dinamički prilagoditi gubitak sa težinom koristeći obrnutu frekvenciju n-gram a znakova primjene na gubitak preko Entropije Softmax, tako da se rijetki znakovi pojave vjerojatniji dok zadržavaju težinu proizvedenih rečenica. Trenirali smo Transformera koristeći engleski i japanski Twitter odgovore kao jednookreni dijalog koristeći različite funkcije gubitka. Naš model gubitka INF je nadmašio osnovne linije gubitka SCE-a i modela gubitka ITF-a u automatskim procjenama poput DIST-N i ROUGE-a, a također je postigao veći rezultat o našim ljudskim procjenama koherencije i bogatstva.', 'cs': 'Dialogové systémy využívající hluboké učení dosáhly generace plynulých reakčních vět na uživatelské projevy. Nicméně mají tendenci vytvářet odpovědi, které nejsou různorodé a které jsou méně závislé na kontextu. Pro řešení těchto nedostatků navrhujeme novou ztrátovou funkci, inverzní N-gramovou ztrátu (INF), která zahrnuje kontextovou plynulost a diverzitu současně jednoduchým vzorcem. Naše INF ztráta může dynamicky upravit svou ztrátu hmotností pomocí inverzní frekvence n-gramu žetonů aplikovaného na Softmax Cross-Entropie ztrátu, takže vzácné žetony se jeví pravděpodobnější a zachovává plynulost generovaných vět. Transformer jsme trénovali pomocí anglických a japonských Twitter odpovědí jako dialogů s jedním otočením pomocí různých ztrátových funkcí. Náš ztrátový model INF předčil základní linie modelů ztrát SCE a ITF v automatických hodnoceních, jako jsou DIST-N a ROUGE, a také dosáhl vyšších skóre u lidských hodnocení koherence a bohatosti.', 'ca': "Els sistemes de diàleg que utilitzen aprenentatge profund han aconseguit generar frases de resposta fluent a les expressions dels usuaris. Tot i així, tendeixen a produir respostes que no són diverses i menys dependents del context. Per abordar aquestes deficiències, proposem una nova funció de pèrdua, una pèrdua inversa de N-gram (INF), que incorpora la fluència contextual i la diversitat alhora per una fòrmula simple. Our INF loss can adjust its loss dynamically by a weight using the inverse frequency of the tokens' n-gram applied to Softmax Cross-Entropy loss, so that rare tokens appear more likely while retaining the fluency of the generated sentences.  Vam entrenar Transformer fent servir respostes angleses i japoneses a Twitter com diàlegs de gir únic fent servir diferents funcions de pèrdua. El nostre model de pèrdua INF va superar les línies de base dels models de pèrdua SCE i de pèrdua ITF en evaluacions automàtiques com DIST-N i ROUGE, i també va aconseguir més puntuacions en les nostres evaluacions humanes de coherencia i riquesa.", 'et': 'Sügavõpet kasutavad dialoogisüsteemid on saavutanud sujuvate vastuselausete loomise kasutajate sõnadele. Sellegipoolest kipuvad nad andma vastuseid, mis ei ole mitmekesised ja mis sõltuvad vähem kontekstist. Nende puuduste kõrvaldamiseks pakume välja uue kaotusfunktsiooni, pöördväärse N-grammi kaotuse (INF), mis hõlmab konteksti sujuvust ja mitmekesisust samal ajal lihtsa valemi abil. Meie INF kaotus võib oma kaotust dünaamiliselt reguleerida kaaluga, kasutades Softmax Cross-Entropy kaotusele rakendatud tokenite n-grammi pöördsagedust, nii et haruldased tokenid ilmnevad tõenäolisemalt, säilitades samas genereeritud lausete sujuvuse. Me koolitasime Transformerit kasutades inglise ja jaapani Twitteri vastuseid ühekordsete dialoogidena, kasutades erinevaid kaotusfunktsioone. Meie INF kadu mudel ületas SCE kadu ja ITF kadu mudelite lähtejooni automaatsetes hindamistes, näiteks DIST-N ja ROUGE, ning saavutas ka kõrgemad tulemused meie inimeste hindamistes sidususe ja rikkuse kohta.', 'fi': 'Syväoppimista hyödyntävät dialogijärjestelmät ovat tuottaneet sujuvan vastelauseen käyttäjien lausumiin. Ne tuottavat kuitenkin usein vastauksia, jotka eivät ole erilaisia ja jotka ovat vähemmän kontekstista riippuvaisia. Näiden puutteiden korjaamiseksi ehdotamme uutta häviöfunktiota, käänteistä N-gramman häviötä (INF), joka yhdistää kontekstuaalisen sujuvuuden ja monimuotoisuuden samaan aikaan yksinkertaisella kaavalla. INF-häviömme voi säätää häviötä dynaamisesti painon avulla käyttämällä Softmax Cross-Entropy -häviöön kohdistetun n-gramman käänteistaajuutta, jotta harvinaiset merkit näyttävät todennäköisemmiltä säilyttäen luotujen lauseiden sujuvuuden. Koulutimme Transformeria käyttäen englanninkielisiä ja japanilaisia Twitter-vastauksia yhden käännöksen dialogeina käyttäen erilaisia häviötoimintoja. INF-häviömallimme suoriutui SCE-häviömallien ja ITF-häviömallien perusviivoista automaattisissa arvioinneissa, kuten DIST-N ja ROUGE, ja saavutti myös korkeammat pisteet ihmisten johdonmukaisuuden ja rikkauden arvioinneissa.', 'jv': "Sistem dialog kang nggambar aturan deep Nanging, yo uwis mengko cah-cah sing mbukak luwih apa sing ora klebu lan nganggep penting sak kontèks-pakan. To Address this shortcom ings, we proposal a new lose funtion, an convert N-gram lose (INF), that inkompasses contextual flority and plural at the same time by a simply forma. INF kuwi alah sing dumateng n êmên ngerasaé diuwisik, diuwisik ngênêmên karo perusahaan winih sing nêmên nggo token 'n-gram' sing bisa nêmên karo Softmaximum Awak dhéwé mulai Transformer nggambar Inggris lan Tutuk Jepang kuwi dialog singular-conversatin karo perkaraan kanggo ngubah kapan kanggo ngubah bisa ngubah Rasané INF sing paling dumadhi uwong kelas barang nggawe kayané perusahaan ARE lan model sing perusahaan ARF kuwi nggawe sistem otomatik sing koyok DERT-N lan RUGE, laké sumulai dino sing luwih dumadhi uwong sing bakal terus lanjut cah dumadhi kamunyatan barêng-uwong.", 'he': 'מערכות דיאלוג בשימוש ללימודים עמוקים השיגו דור של משפטי תגובה נוזלים למילות משתמשים. למרות זאת, הם נוטים לייצר תגובות שלא מגוונות והן פחות תלויות בקשר. To address these shortcomings, we propose a new loss function, an Inverse N-gram loss (INF), which incorporates contextual fluency and diversity at the same time by a simple formula.  אובדן INF שלנו יכול לתקן את האובדן שלו דינמית על ידי משקל באמצעות תדר ההפך של n-גרם של הקלטות שהופעלו לאבדן קרוס-אנטרופיה Softmax, כך שסימנים נדירים נראים יותר סביר בזמן שמירה את הנוזל של המשפטים הנוצרים. אימנו את הטרנספורטר בשימוש בתשובות טוויטר אנגלית ויפנית בתור דיאלוגים מסיבה אחת בשימוש בתפקידים אובדן שונים. מודל האובדן של INF שלנו עבר את קווי הבסיס של אובדן SCE ו ITF מודלים אובדן בערכות אוטומטיות כמו DIST-N ו ROUGE, וגם השיג נקודות גבוהות יותר על הערכות האנושיות שלנו של הקיונציה ועשירות.', 'sk': 'Sistemi dialoga, ki uporabljajo globoko učenje, so dosegli ustvarjanje tekočih odzivnih stavkov na uporabniške izjave. Kljub temu pa ponavadi ustvarjajo odzive, ki niso različni in so manj odvisni od konteksta. Za odpravo teh pomanjkljivosti predlagamo novo funkcijo izgube, Inverzno N-gramsko izgubo (INF), ki hkrati vključuje kontekstualno tekočost in raznolikost s preprosto formulo. Naša izguba INF lahko dinamično prilagodi svojo izgubo s težo z uporabo obratne frekvence n-gramov žetonov, ki se uporabljajo za izgubo Softmax Cross-Entropy, tako da se redki žetoni pojavijo bolj verjetni, hkrati pa ohranjajo tekočost ustvarjenih stavkov. Transformer smo usposobili s pomočjo angleških in japonskih Twitter odgovorov kot dialogov z enim obratom z uporabo različnih funkcij izgube. Naš model izgube INF je v avtomatičnih ocenah, kot sta DIST-N in ROUGE, presegel osnovne vrednosti modelov izgube SCE in ITF ter dosegel višje rezultate tudi pri človeških ocenah koherence in bogastva.', 'ha': "Systemi na zauren akwatin bayanin da za'a yi amfani da amfani da amfani da yin ƙari, sun sami ƙarami masu motsi da shiryarwa zuwa magana masu amfani da shi. A lokacin da, sai su sami musamman da ba su zama dabam-dabam ba, kuma da mafi ƙaranci masu daidai. To, da za mu yi addu'a ga wannan shortcuts, za'a buƙata wani lumbar hasãra, wata tapar na N a gram (INF), wanda ke shigar da shi na fassarar da multi-nau'i da waɗancan sami da wata formula mai sauƙi. Takacin INF ya canza hasara da nau'in da za'a yi amfani da matsayin na-gram da aka yi wa hasara na SFmax-Kross-Entroy, don haka, ko da alama kaɗa n za'a iya ƙara haske a lokacin da za'a tsare mafiya yawan azãba da aka ƙãga. Mun sanar da Transformer da ke amfani da Ingiriya da Yajapanen Twitter sunã karɓa kamar zauren akwatin bayani guda da za'a yi amfani da functionin hasãra dabam. Shirin hasara na INF ya sami ƙasar hasãra na SCE da misãlai na hasara na IFF cikin misãlai farat-ƙayyade kamar distan-N da RUGE, kuma ya sami score mafi girma a kan manyan muhalli da tajirinmu.", 'bo': "སྐད་རིགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་བརྡ་སྤྱད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བུ་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་ཁོ་ཚོས་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་ཁྱད་དོན་ཡུལ་འབྲེལ་བའི་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། To address these shortcomings, we propose a new loss function, an Inverse N-gram loss (INF), which incorporates contextual fluency and diversity at the same time by a simple formula. Our INF loss can adjust its loss dynamically by a weight using the inverse frequency of the tokens' n-gram applied to Softmax Cross-Entropy loss, so that rare tokens appear more likely while retaining the fluency of the generated sentences. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག Our INF loss model outperformed the baselines of SCE loss and ITF loss models in automatic evaluations such as DIST-N and ROUGE, and also achieved higher scores on our human evaluations of coherence and richness."}
{'en': 'Towards Topic-Guided Conversational Recommender System', 'ar': 'نحو نظام التوصية للمحادثة الموجهة للموضوع', 'pt': 'Rumo ao Sistema de Recomendação Conversacional Guiado por Tópicos', 'fr': 'Vers un système de recommandation conversationnelle guidé par sujet', 'es': 'Hacia un sistema de recomendación conversacional guiado por temas', 'ja': 'トピックガイド型会話推奨システムに向けて', 'zh': '迈向主题导引对荐系统', 'hi': 'विषय-निर्देशित संवादी अनुशंसक प्रणाली की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к тематической системе рекоммендаторов для бесед', 'ga': 'I dTreo an Chórais Moltaí Comhráite a Threoraítear le Topaicí', 'ka': 'მისამართების მისამართებული პარაუზაციის შემწყვებელი სისტემა', 'hu': 'A témakörrel irányított beszélgetési ajánló rendszer felé', 'el': 'Προς το σύστημα σύστασης συζήτησης που καθοδηγείται από θέματα', 'it': 'Verso un sistema di raccomandazione conversazionale guidato dagli argomenti', 'kk': 'Нақышты бағытталған сұрақтар жүйесіне қарсы', 'lt': 'Temomis orientuotos konversacijos rekomenduotojų sistemos link', 'mk': 'Напред кон системот за препораки за конверзација насочен по тема', 'ms': 'Ke arah Sistem Penawar Perbualan Dipandang Tema', 'mn': 'Гол санааг удирдлагатай ярилцлагын зөвлөгч систем рүү', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്കു്- വഴികാട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്ന ആലോചിക സിസ്റ്റം', 'mt': "Lejn Sistema ta' Rakkomandaturi ta' Konversjoni Gwida b'Tema", 'no': 'Gå til emnehjelpetekst samtalesystemet', 'pl': 'W kierunku systemu rekomendacji konwersacji opartego na tematach', 'sr': 'Prema sistemu preporuèujuæi razgovor na temu', 'ro': 'Către un sistem de recomandări conversaționale orientat spre subiecte', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය-ප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරවේශය කතාව පද්ධතියට', 'sv': 'Mot ett ämnesinriktat samtalsrekommendationssystem', 'ta': 'தலைப்பு- வழிகாட்டப்பட்ட உரையாடல் பரிந்துரைப்பு அமைப்பு', 'so': 'Isticmaalka talobixinta', 'ur': 'موضوع کی راہ دکھائی ہوئی مکالمانی سٹم کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Về hướng dẫn đối thoại', 'bg': 'Към тематична система за препоръки за разговори', 'da': 'På vej mod emneorienteret samtaleanbefalingssystem', 'hr': 'Prema sustavu preporučujući razgovor na temi', 'nl': 'Naar een thematisch begeleid conversatiebegeleidingssysteem', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zum themengesteuerten Conversational Recommender System', 'id': 'Ke Sistem Penawar Berbicara Berpandangan Topik', 'ko': '테마 가이드를 위한 세션 추천 시스템', 'fa': 'به سمت سیستم توصیف\u200cکننده\u200cی مکالمه\u200cهای هدایت به عنوان موضوع', 'sw': 'Towards Topic-Guided Conversational Recommender System', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar Görkezilen Qonuşmalar Sistemine Göçir', 'az': 'Mevzu-t…ôr…ôf y√∂n…ôlmiŇü QonuŇüma T…ôr…ôfl…ôyici Sistem…ô t…ôr…ôf', 'hy': 'Տեմայով ուղղությամբ հաղորդակցվող համակարգը', 'bs': 'Prema sustavu predloženog razgovora na temi', 'af': 'Gaan na onderwerp-gidde gesprekslykstelsel', 'ca': 'Towards Topic-Guided Conversational Recommender System', 'sq': 'Për sistemin e rekomandimit konversacional të drejtuar nga tema', 'cs': 'Směrem k tématickému doporučovacímu systému konverzace', 'fi': 'Kohti aihekohtaista keskustelusuositusjĂ¤rjestelmĂ¤Ă¤', 'et': 'Teemapõhise vestlussoovituste süsteemi suunas', 'bn': 'বিষয়- পরিচালিত আলোচনার পরামর্শ সিস্টেম', 'he': 'לכיוון מערכת המלצות שיחה מונחת בנושא', 'jv': 'Ngawe Sistem Mix Radio', 'sk': 'K tematskemu vodenemu sistemu priporočil za pogovore', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་འདིས་འགོད་པའི་གཏམ་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་འོས་སྐོར་གྱི་མ་ལག་ལ་འགྲོ'}
{'en': 'Conversational recommender systems (CRS) aim to recommend high-quality items to users through interactive conversations. To develop an effective CRS, the support of high-quality datasets is essential. Existing CRS datasets mainly focus on immediate requests from users, while lack proactive guidance to the recommendation scenario. In this paper, we contribute a new CRS dataset named TG-ReDial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog). Our dataset has two major features. First, it incorporates topic threads to enforce natural semantic transitions towards the recommendation scenario. Second, it is created in a semi-automatic way, hence human annotation is more reasonable and controllable. Based on TG-ReDial, we present the task of topic-guided conversational recommendation, and propose an effective approach to this task. Extensive experiments have demonstrated the effectiveness of our approach on three sub-tasks, namely topic prediction, item recommendation and response generation. TG-ReDial is available at blue.TG-ReDial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog). Our dataset has two major features. First, it incorporates topic threads to enforce natural semantic transitions towards the recommendation scenario. Second, it is created in a semi-automatic way, hence human annotation is more reasonable and controllable. Based on TG-ReDial, we present the task of topic-guided conversational recommendation, and propose an effective approach to this task. Extensive experiments have demonstrated the effectiveness of our approach on three sub-tasks, namely topic prediction, item recommendation and response generation. TG-ReDial is available at bluehttps://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial.', 'ar': 'تهدف أنظمة التوصية بالمحادثة (CRS) إلى التوصية بالعناصر عالية الجودة للمستخدمين من خلال المحادثات التفاعلية. لتطوير نظام CRS فعال ، من الضروري دعم مجموعات البيانات عالية الجودة. تركز مجموعات بيانات CRS الحالية بشكل أساسي على الطلبات الفورية من المستخدمين ، بينما تفتقر إلى التوجيه الاستباقي لسيناريو التوصية. في هذه الورقة ، نساهم بمجموعة بيانات CRS جديدة تسمى TG-ReDial (توصية من خلال حوار موجه للموضوع). تحتوي مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا على ميزتين رئيسيتين. أولاً ، يدمج سلاسل المواضيع لفرض انتقالات دلالية طبيعية نحو سيناريو التوصية. ثانيًا ، تم إنشاؤه بطريقة شبه آلية ، وبالتالي فإن التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية أكثر منطقية ويمكن التحكم فيها. استنادًا إلى TG-ReDial ، نقدم مهمة التوصية بالمحادثة الموجهة بالموضوع ، ونقترح نهجًا فعالًا لهذه المهمة. أثبتت التجارب المكثفة فعالية نهجنا في ثلاث مهام فرعية ، وهي التنبؤ بالموضوع والتوصية بالعنصر وتوليد الاستجابة. يتوفر TG-ReDial باللون الأزرق <https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de recomendación conversacional (CRS) tienen como objetivo recomendar elementos de alta calidad a los usuarios a través de conversaciones interactivas. Para desarrollar un CRS eficaz, el soporte de conjuntos de datos de alta calidad es esencial. Los conjuntos de datos CRS existentes se centran principalmente en las solicitudes inmediatas de los usuarios, mientras que carecen de orientación proactiva para el escenario de recomendación. En este documento, contribuimos con un nuevo conjunto de datos de CRS llamado TG-Redial (Recomendación a través del diálogo guiado por temas). Nuestro conjunto de datos tiene dos características principales. En primer lugar, incorpora hilos temáticos para aplicar transiciones semánticas naturales hacia el escenario de recomendación. En segundo lugar, se crea de forma semiautomática, por lo que la anotación humana es más razonable y controlable. Basado en TG-Redial, presentamos la tarea de recomendación conversacional guiada por temas y proponemos un enfoque eficaz para esta tarea. Extensos experimentos han demostrado la eficacia de nuestro enfoque en tres subtareas, a saber, la predicción de temas, la recomendación de elementos y la generación de respuestas. TG-Redial está disponible en azul< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de recommandation conversationnelle (CRS) visent à recommander des éléments de haute qualité aux utilisateurs par le biais de conversations interactives. Pour développer un CRS efficace, le support d'ensembles de données de haute qualité est essentiel. Les ensembles de données CRS existants se concentrent principalement sur les demandes immédiates des utilisateurs, mais manquent de directives proactives pour le scénario de recommandation. Dans cet article, nous contribuons à un nouveau jeu de données CRS nommé TG-Redial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog). Notre ensemble de données présente deux caractéristiques principales. Tout d'abord, il intègre des fils de discussion pour appliquer des transitions sémantiques naturelles vers le scénario de recommandation. Deuxièmement, il est créé de manière semi-automatique, donc l'annotation humaine est plus raisonnable et contrôlable. Sur la base de TG-Redial, nous présentons la tâche de recommandation conversationnelle guidée par sujet et proposons une approche efficace de cette tâche. Des expériences approfondies ont démontré l'efficacité de notre approche sur trois sous-tâches, à savoir la prédiction de sujets, la recommandation d'items et la génération de réponses. TG-Redial est disponible en bleu< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.", 'pt': 'Os sistemas de recomendação conversacional (CRS) visam recomendar itens de alta qualidade aos usuários por meio de conversas interativas. Para desenvolver um CRS eficaz, o suporte de conjuntos de dados de alta qualidade é essencial. Os conjuntos de dados CRS existentes concentram-se principalmente em solicitações imediatas de usuários, mas não possuem orientação proativa para o cenário de recomendação. Neste artigo, contribuímos com um novo conjunto de dados CRS chamado TG-ReDial (Recomendation through Topic-Guided Dialog). Nosso conjunto de dados tem dois recursos principais. Primeiro, ele incorpora tópicos de tópicos para impor transições semânticas naturais para o cenário de recomendação. Em segundo lugar, ele é criado de forma semiautomática, portanto, a anotação humana é mais razoável e controlável. Com base no TG-ReDial, apresentamos a tarefa de recomendação conversacional guiada por tópicos e propomos uma abordagem eficaz para essa tarefa. Extensos experimentos demonstraram a eficácia de nossa abordagem em três subtarefas, ou seja, previsão de tópicos, recomendação de itens e geração de respostas. TG-ReDial está disponível em azul<https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>.', 'ja': '会話推奨システム（ CRS ）は、インタラクティブな会話を通じてユーザーに高品質のアイテムを推奨することを目的としています。 効果的なCRSを開発するには、高品質のデータセットのサポートが不可欠です。 既存のCRSデータセットは、主にユーザーからの即時要求に焦点を当てていますが、推奨シナリオに対する積極的なガイダンスが不足しています。 この論文では、TG - ReDial （トピックガイドダイアログによる推奨）と名付けられた新しいCRSデータセットを提供します。 当社のデータセットには2つの主要な機能があります。 第一に、トピックスレッドを組み込んで、推奨シナリオに向けて自然な意味論的遷移を強制する。 第二に、それは半自動的に作成されるため、人間の注釈はより合理的で制御可能です。 TG - ReDialに基づいて、トピック誘導型会話推奨のタスクを提示し、このタスクに対する効果的なアプローチを提案します。 広範な実験は、トピック予測、項目の推奨、および応答生成という3つのサブタスクに対する当社のアプローチの有効性を示しています。 TG - ReDialはBLUEでご利用いただけ<https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>ます。', 'zh': '言荐系统(CRS)指因交互式以荐高质量目于用户。 开有效之CRS,高质量数集之要。 今CRS数据集要用户即时请求,而阙于荐举场景者。 本文献TG-ReDial(因主题引对荐)新CRS数据集。 吾数集有二主。 先是,包含主题线程,以强制自然语义转换。 其次,以半自动式所创,故人工注释益理可控。 基于TG-ReDial,建主导之辞,而效效以成其事。 博实验已验吾法于三子之有效性,即主题占候,项目荐应。 TG-ReDial有蓝色<https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>。', 'hi': 'संवादी सिफारिशकर्ता सिस्टम (CRS) का उद्देश्य इंटरैक्टिव वार्तालापों के माध्यम से उपयोगकर्ताओं को उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले आइटमों की सिफारिश करना है। एक प्रभावी सीआरएस विकसित करने के लिए, उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले डेटासेट का समर्थन आवश्यक है। मौजूदा सीआरएस डेटासेट मुख्य रूप से उपयोगकर्ताओं से तत्काल अनुरोधों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जबकि सिफारिश परिदृश्य के लिए सक्रिय मार्गदर्शन की कमी होती है। इस पेपर में, हम टीजी-रेडियाल (विषय-निर्देशित संवाद के माध्यम से सिफारिश) नामक एक नए सीआरएस डेटासेट का योगदान करते हैं। हमारे डेटासेट में दो प्रमुख विशेषताएं हैं। सबसे पहले, यह सिफारिश परिदृश्य की ओर प्राकृतिक शब्दार्थ संक्रमण को लागू करने के लिए विषय धागे को शामिल करता है। दूसरा, यह एक अर्ध-स्वचालित तरीके से बनाया गया है, इसलिए मानव एनोटेशन अधिक उचित और नियंत्रणीय है। टीजी-रेडियाल के आधार पर, हम विषय-निर्देशित संवादी सिफारिश के कार्य को प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और इस कार्य के लिए एक प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोगों ने तीन उप-कार्यों पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन किया है, अर्थात् विषय भविष्यवाणी, आइटम सिफारिश और प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी। TG-ReDial नीले<https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial> पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Системы рекоммендаторов (CRS) нацелены на то, чтобы рекомендовать пользователям высококачественные предметы в интерактивных беседах. Для разработки эффективной CRS необходима поддержка высококачественных наборов данных. Существующие наборы данных ОСО в основном сосредоточены на срочных запросах пользователей, в то время как в них отсутствуют упреждающие рекомендации в отношении сценария рекомендаций. В этой статье мы вносим новый набор данных CRS под названием TG-ReDial (рекомендация через диалог с руководством по темам). Наш набор данных имеет две основные особенности. Во-первых, он включает тематические потоки для обеспечения естественных семантических переходов к сценарию рекомендации. Во-вторых, он создается полуавтоматическим способом, поэтому человеческая аннотация более разумна и контролируема. Основываясь на TG-ReDial, мы представляем задачу тематической разговорной рекомендации и предлагаем эффективный подход к этой задаче. Обширные эксперименты продемонстрировали эффективность нашего подхода по трем подзадачам, а именно: прогнозирование темы, рекомендация пункта и формирование ответа. TG-ReDial доступен в синем цвете<https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>.', 'ga': "Tá sé mar aidhm ag córais molta comhrá (CRS) míreanna ardchaighdeáin a mholadh d'úsáideoirí trí chomhráite idirghníomhacha. Chun CRS éifeachtach a fhorbairt, tá sé riachtanach tacair shonraí ardchaighdeáin a thacú. Díríonn tacair shonraí CRS atá ann cheana go príomha ar iarratais láithreacha ó úsáideoirí, cé go bhfuil easpa treorach réamhghníomhach acu maidir leis an gcás molta. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid tacar sonraí nua CRS darb ainm TG-ReDial (Moladh trí Chomhphlé Treoraithe le Topaicí). Tá dhá phríomhghné ag ár dtacar sonraí. Ar an gcéad dul síos, ionchorpraítear leis snáitheanna topaicí chun aistrithe shéimeantacha nádúrtha i dtreo chás an mholta a fhorfheidhmiú. Ar an dara dul síos, cruthaítear ar bhealach leath-uathoibríoch é, dá bhrí sin tá anótáil dhaonna níos réasúnta agus inrialaithe. Bunaithe ar TG-ReDial, cuirimid i láthair an tasc a bhaineann le moltaí comhráite faoi threoir ábhair, agus molaimid cur chuige éifeachtach don tasc seo. Tá éifeachtúlacht ár gcur chuige maidir le trí fhothasc léirithe ag turgnaimh fhairsing, is iad sin tuar topaicí, moladh míreanna agus giniúint freagraí. Tá TG-ReDial ar fáil ag gorm <https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>.", 'el': 'Τα συστήματα σύστασης συνομιλίας στοχεύουν να συστήσουν αντικείμενα υψηλής ποιότητας στους χρήστες μέσω διαδραστικών συνομιλιών. Για την ανάπτυξη ενός αποτελεσματικού συστήματος CRS, η υποστήριξη υψηλής ποιότητας συνόλων δεδομένων είναι απαραίτητη. Τα υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων επικεντρώνονται κυρίως σε άμεσα αιτήματα από τους χρήστες, ενώ στερούνται προληπτικής καθοδήγησης για το σενάριο σύστασης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, συνεισφέρουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που ονομάζεται Σύσταση μέσω θεματικού διαλόγου. Το σύνολο δεδομένων μας έχει δύο βασικά χαρακτηριστικά. Πρώτον, ενσωματώνει θέματα για να επιβάλει φυσικές σημασιολογικές μεταβάσεις προς το σενάριο σύστασης. Δεύτερον, δημιουργείται με ημιαυτόματο τρόπο, επομένως η ανθρώπινη παρατήρηση είναι πιο λογική και ελεγχόμενη. Με βάση το παρουσιάζουμε το έργο της θεματικής σύστασης συζήτησης και προτείνουμε μια αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση σε αυτό το έργο. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα έχουν αποδείξει την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας σε τρεις επιμέρους εργασίες, δηλαδή την πρόβλεψη θεμάτων, τη σύσταση στοιχείων και τη δημιουργία απόκρισης. Το TG-ReDial είναι διαθέσιμο στο μπλε< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ka': 'პარაუზაციონალური მომხმარებელი სისტემები (CRS) უნდა მომხმარებელებისთვის თნტრაქტიური პარაუზაციების გამოყენებას. ეფექტიური CRS-ის განვითარებისთვის, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემების მხარდაჭერა მნიშვნელოვანია. არსებობს CRS მონაცემების კონუქტირება ძირითადად მომხმარებელიდან მუშაობაში, მაგრამ პროკექტიური მონაცემების სინარიოში არსებობს. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალი CRS მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია TG-ReDial (რეკონფიგურაცია ტემიკური მონაცემების დიალოგიდან). ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია აქვს ორი მნიშვნელოვანობა. პირველად, ის აყენებს თემენტიკური სიმენტიკური გადაწყვეტილება, რომელიც შეუძლებელია მოწყვეტილების სინარიოში. მეორე, ის შექმნა ნახევატომატიკურად, ამიტომ ადამიანის ანტომაცია უფრო პარამეტურია და კონტროლურია. TG-ReDial-ის ბაზაზე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ რაოდენობა, რომელიც მივიღეთ ტემიკური გადაწყვეტილება, და მივიღეთ ეფექტიური გადაწყვეტილება ამ რაოდენობისთვის. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობა სამი სამუშაო საქმედებზე, რომელიც საქმედების განსაზღვრება, ელემენტების განსაზღვრება და რეაქტის Name https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial - ეა.', 'hu': 'A beszélgetési ajánló rendszerek célja, hogy kiváló minőségű elemeket ajánljanak a felhasználóknak interaktív beszélgetéseken keresztül. A hatékony CRS kialakításához elengedhetetlen a kiváló minőségű adatkészletek támogatása. A meglévő CRS-adatkészletek elsősorban a felhasználóktól érkező azonnali kérésekre összpontosítanak, ugyanakkor nincsenek proaktív iránymutatások az ajánlási forgatókönyvre vonatkozóan. Ebben a tanulmányban egy TG-ReDial (Ajánlás témakörrel vezetett párbeszédpanelen keresztül) új CRS adatkészletet adunk hozzá. Az adatkészletünknek két fő tulajdonsága van. Először is témaszálakat foglal magában, hogy érvényesítse a természetes szemantikai átmenetet az ajánlási forgatókönyv felé. Másodszor, félautomata módon készül, így az emberi jegyzetek ésszerűbbek és ellenőrizhetőbbek. A TG-ReDial alapján bemutatjuk a témavezetésű beszélgetési ajánlás feladatát, és hatékony megközelítést javasolunk ehhez a feladathoz. Széleskörű kísérletek bizonyították megközelítésünk hatékonyságát három alcsoportban, nevezetesen a témakörök előrejelzésében, a témakörök ajánlásában és a válasz generálásában. A TG-ReDial kék nyelven érhető el< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'mk': 'Конверзационалните препорачувачки системи (CRS) имаат за цел препорака на висококвалитетни предмети за корисниците преку интерактивни разговори. За да се развие ефикасен CRS, поддршката на висококвалитетните податоци е суштинска. Постојаните компјутери на CRS податоци се фокусираат главно на итните барања од корисниците, додека немаат проактивни упатства за сценариото за препораки. Во овој документ, придонесуваме за нов компјутер на CRS податоци наречен TG-ReDial (препорака преку дијалог управуван со тема). Нашиот податок има две главни карактеристики. Прво, вклучува темски жици за спроведување на природните семантични транзиции кон сценариото за препораки. Второ, тој е создаден на полуавтоматски начин, затоа човечката анотација е поразумна и контролирана. Базирано на ТГ-ReDial, ја претставуваме задачата на препорака за разговори со тема и предложуваме ефикасен пристап до оваа задача. Експериментите ја покажаа ефикасноста на нашиот пристап на три подзадачи, имено предвидување на темата, препорака за предмети и генерација на одговор. TG-ReDial е достапна на сина< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'it': "I sistemi di raccomandazione conversazionale (CRS) mirano a raccomandare agli utenti elementi di alta qualità attraverso conversazioni interattive. Per sviluppare un CRS efficace è essenziale il supporto di set di dati di alta qualità. I set di dati CRS esistenti si concentrano principalmente sulle richieste immediate degli utenti, mentre mancano di orientamenti proattivi sullo scenario di raccomandazione. In questo articolo, contribuiamo con un nuovo set di dati CRS denominato TG-ReDial (Raccomandazione attraverso Dialogo guidato da argomenti). Il nostro set di dati ha due caratteristiche principali. In primo luogo, incorpora thread topic per imporre transizioni semantiche naturali verso lo scenario di raccomandazione. In secondo luogo, è creato in modo semi-automatico, quindi l'annotazione umana è più ragionevole e controllabile. Sulla base di TG-ReDial, presentiamo il compito di raccomandazione conversazionale guidata da argomenti, e proponiamo un approccio efficace a questo compito. Esperimenti approfonditi hanno dimostrato l'efficacia del nostro approccio su tre sottocompiti, vale a dire predizione degli argomenti, raccomandazione degli elementi e generazione di risposta. TG-ReDial è disponibile al blu< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.", 'lt': 'Konversacinių rekomendacijų sistemų (KRS) tikslas – per interaktyvius pokalbius vartotojams rekomenduoti aukštos kokybės objektus. Siekiant sukurti veiksmingą KRS, būtina remti kokybiškus duomenų rinkinius. Dabartiniai CRS duomenų rinkiniai daugiausia dėmesio skiria tiesioginiams vartotojų prašymams, tačiau nėra iniciatyvių rekomendacijos scenarijaus gairių. Šiame dokumente prisidedame prie naujo CRS duomenų rinkinio, vadinamo TG-ReDial (rekomendacija per teminius dialogus). Mūsų duomenų rinkinys turi du pagrindinius požymius. Pirma, jame įtraukiami teminiai siūlai, kuriais siekiama įgyvendinti natūralius semantinius perėjimus prie rekomendacijos scenarijaus. Antra, jis sukuriamas pusiau automatiškai, todėl žmogaus anotacija yra protingesnė ir kontroliuojama. Remdamiesi TG-ReDial, pristatysime teminiu požiūriu pagrįstos konversacijos rekomendacijos užduotį ir siūlome veiksmingą požiūrį į šią užduotį. Išsamūs eksperimentai parodė mūsų požiūrio veiksmingumą trijose subužduotyse, būtent teminės prognozės, punkto rekomendacijos ir atsako sukūrimo. TG-ReDial galima rasti mėlynoje < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'kk': 'Сөйлесу жүйелері (CRS) интерактивті сөйлесу арқылы пайдаланушыларға сапалы жоғары нысандарды талап етеді. Эффективті CRS жасау үшін, жоғары сапалық деректер жиындарын қолдау керек. Бар CRS деректер қорларының негізінде пайдаланушылардың тұрақты сұрауларына назар ауыстырылады, бірақ рекомендациялау сценариясына proactive guidance жоқ. Бұл қағазда TG- ReDial деп аталатын жаңа CRS деректер жиынын қосымша береміз (нақышты бағытталған диалог арқылы рекомендациялау). Деректер жиының екі негізгі мүмкіндігі бар. Біріншіден, бұл тақырыптар тақырыпты семантикалық өзгерістерді таңдау сценариясына көмектесу үшін тақырыпты ілеспейді. Екіншіден, ол жарты автоматты түрде құрылады, сондықтан адамдардың жазбалары көбірек және контроллері болады. TG-ReDial бағдарламасына негізделген тақырыпты бағытталған аудармалы рекомендацияны таңдап, осы тапсырмаға эффективті тәртіпке ұсынып тастаймыз. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер біздің тәжірибеміздің үш ішкі тапсырмаларда тәжірибесін көрсетеді, мысалы, нақышты тапсырмалар, элементтердің рекомендациясы және жауа TG- ReDial көк < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ms': 'Sistem rekomendasi perbualan (CRS) bertujuan untuk mencadangkan item berkualiti tinggi kepada pengguna melalui perbualan interaktif. To develop an effective CRS, the support of high-quality datasets is essential.  Set data CRS yang wujud terutamanya fokus pada permintaan segera dari pengguna, sementara kekurangan panduan proaktif untuk skenario rekomendasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyumbangkan set data CRS baru bernama TG-ReDial (Rekomendasi melalui Dialog Berpanduan Topik). Set data kita mempunyai dua ciri-ciri utama. Pertama, ia menggabungkan benang topik untuk memaksa transisi semantik alami menuju skenario rekomendasi. Kedua, ia dicipta dengan cara semi-automatik, jadi anotasi manusia lebih masuk akal dan boleh dikawal. Berdasarkan TG-ReDial, kami memperkenalkan tugas rekomendasi perbualan yang dipimpin topik, dan melamar pendekatan yang efektif untuk tugas ini. Eksperimen luas telah menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan kita pada tiga sub-tugas, iaitu ramalan topik, rekomendasi item dan generasi balas. TG-ReDial tersedia pada biru< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi ta’ rakkomandazzjonijiet ta’ konverżjoni (CRS) għandhom l-għan li jirrakkomandaw oġġetti ta’ kwalità għolja lill-utenti permezz ta’ konverżjonijiet interattivi. To develop an effective CRS, the support of high-quality datasets is essential.  Is-settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti tas-CRS jiffokaw prinċipalment fuq talbiet immedjati mill-utenti, filwaqt li m’għandhomx gwida proattiva għax-xenarju ta’ rakkomandazzjoni. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nikkontribwixxu sett ġdid ta’ dejta tas-CRS imsejjaħ TG-ReDial (Rakkomandazzjoni permezz ta’ Djalogu Gwida b’Tema). Our dataset has two major features.  L-ewwel nett, tinkorpora ħjut tematiċi biex jinfurzaw it-tranżizzjonijiet semantiċi naturali lejn ix-xenarju tar-rakkomandazzjoni. It-tieni, jinħoloq b’mod semiawtomatiku, għalhekk l-annotazzjoni umana hija aktar raġonevoli u kontrollabbli. Abbażi tat-TG-ReDial, aħna nippreżentaw il-kompitu ta’ rakkomandazzjoni ta’ konverżjoni mmexxija mis-suġġett, u nipproponu approċċ effettiv għal dan il-kompitu. Esperimenti estensivi wrew l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna fuq tliet sottokompiti, jiġifieri t-tbassir tematiku, ir-rakkomandazzjoni tal-punt u l-ġenerazzjoni tar-rispons. TG-ReDial huwa disponibbli fuq il-blu< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ (CRS) ഉയര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ആ സാധുവായ ക്രിസ്റ്റ് സിഎസ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d, ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പിന്തുണയാണ്. നിലവിലുള്ള CRS ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉപയോക്താക്കളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉടനെ ആവശ്യപ്പെടുന്നതിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക, ശ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ടിജി- റെഡിയാള്\u200d എന്ന പേരില്\u200d നാം പുതിയ സിഎസ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു (പൊതിക്ക്- ഗൈഡ് ഡയലോഗിലൂടെ ശ Our dataset has two major features.  ആദ്യം, അത് പ്രധാനപ്രകാരം സെമാന്റിക് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക്  രണ്ടാമത്, അത് സ്വയം സ്വയമായി സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രശ്നം കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവേകമുള്ള ന ടിജി-റെഡിയാളിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രമേയത്തില്\u200d നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ആലോചനകളുടെ ജോലി കാണിച്ചു ഈ ജ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു സബ് ജോലികളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യതയുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രഖ്യാപനത്തിന്റെ പ TG- റീഡല്\u200d നീലങ്ങളില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാണു് https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'mn': 'Хариултын зөвшөөрөгч систем (CRS) нь интерактив яриагаар хэрэглэгчдэд өндөр чанартай элементүүдийг зөвлөх зорилго юм. Үнэндээ үр дүнтэй КРС боловсруулахын тулд өндөр чанартай өгөгдлийн сангийн дэмжлэх нь чухал. Existing CRS datasets mainly focus on immediate requests from users, while there is no active guidance to the recommended scenario. Энэ цаасан дээр бид TG-ReDial нэртэй шинэ CRS өгөгдлийн санг нэмж авдаг. Бидний өгөгдлийн сангууд хоёр чухал чанартай. Эхлээд, энэ нь байгалийн семантик шилжилтийг зөвлөгөөний хувилбар руу шилжүүлэх сэдвийн дарааллыг нэгтгэдэг. Хоёрдугаар, энэ нь хагас автоматик аргаар үүсгэгддэг. Иймээс хүн төрөлхтний анзаарал илүү ойлгомжтой болон хяналттай. TG-ReDial-ын үндсэнд бид сэдвээр дамжуулагдсан шилжүүлэх зөвлөлтийн даалгаварыг тайлбарлаж, үүнийг эффективны арга зааж өгдөг. Маш олон туршилтууд бидний арга хэмжээний үр дүнг гурван суб-даалгаварын талаар харуулсан. Энэ нь сэдвийн таамаглалт, биетийн зөвлөлт, хариу үйлдэл гаргасан. TG-ReDial цэнхэртэй https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'no': 'Samtaletilrådd-systemet (CRS) må tilråda høg kvalitet-element til brukarar gjennom interaktive samtaler. For å utvikla ein effektiv CRS er støtte for høgkvalitetssett viktig. Det eksisterande CRS-datasettet fokuserer hovudsakelig på direkte førespurnader frå brukarar, mens manglar proaktive retningar til anbefalingsscenarioen. I denne papiret bidra vi til ein ny CRS-dataset med namn TG-ReDial (anbefaling gjennom emnehandsvising). Datasett vårt har to hovudfunksjonar. Først inkluderer det tematråda for å gjera naturlege semantiske overgangar mot anbefalingsscenarioen. Andre, det er oppretta på ein halvautomatisk måte, derfor er menneskelige notasjon mer raskt og kontrollerbar. Basert på TG-ReDial, presenterer vi oppgåva av temahjelpet område, og foreslår ein effektiv tilnærming til denne oppgåva. Ekstra eksperimenter har demonstrert effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt på tre underoppgåver, dvs. temaforhåndsvising, oppgåve av oppgåver og oppgåver. TG-ReDial er tilgjengeleg i blå< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'ro': 'Sistemele de recomandare conversațională (CRS) urmăresc să recomande utilizatorilor elemente de înaltă calitate prin conversații interactive. Pentru a dezvolta un SIR eficient, sprijinul seturilor de date de înaltă calitate este esențial. Seturile de date CRS existente se concentrează în principal pe solicitările imediate din partea utilizatorilor, în timp ce lipsesc orientări proactive cu privire la scenariul de recomandare. În această lucrare, contribuim cu un nou set de date CRS numit TG-ReDial (Recomandare through Topic-Guided Dialog). Setul nostru de date are două caracteristici majore. În primul rând, încorporează fire tematice pentru a impune tranziții semantice naturale către scenariul de recomandare. În al doilea rând, este creat într-un mod semi-automat, prin urmare adnotarea umană este mai rezonabilă și controlabilă. Pe baza TG-ReDial, prezentăm sarcina de recomandare conversațională ghidată pe subiect și propunem o abordare eficientă a acestei sarcini. Experimentele extinse au demonstrat eficacitatea abordării noastre pe trei subsarcini, și anume predicția subiectelor, recomandarea elementelor și generarea de răspunsuri. TG-ReDial este disponibil la albastru< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'pl': 'Systemy rekomendacji konwersacji (CRS) mają na celu polecanie użytkownikom wysokiej jakości elementów poprzez interaktywne rozmowy. Aby opracować skuteczny system CRS, niezbędne jest wsparcie wysokiej jakości zbiorów danych. Istniejące zestawy danych CRS koncentrują się głównie na natychmiastowych żądaniach użytkowników, a brak proaktywnych wskazówek dotyczących scenariusza rekomendacji. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowy zestaw danych CRS o nazwie TG-ReDial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog). Nasz zestaw danych ma dwie główne cechy. Po pierwsze, zawiera wątki tematyczne w celu wymuszenia naturalnych przejść semantycznych w kierunku scenariusza rekomendacji. Po drugie, jest on tworzony w półautomatyczny sposób, dlatego ludzka adnotacja jest bardziej rozsądna i kontrolowalna. W oparciu o TG-ReDial przedstawiamy zadanie rekomendacji tematycznej konwersacji i proponujemy efektywne podejście do tego zadania. Szeroko zakrojone eksperymenty wykazały skuteczność naszego podejścia do trzech podzadań, a mianowicie przewidywania tematów, rekomendacji elementów i generowania odpowiedzi. TG-ReDial jest dostępny na niebieskim< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'sr': 'Razgovorni sistemi preporučujući sustave (CRS) su cilj da preporučuju visoke kvalitetne predmete korisnicima kroz interaktivne razgovore. Da bi razvili efikasne CRS, podrška kvalitetnih podataka je važna. Postoje podaci za CRS uglavnom se fokusiraju na trenutne zahteve korisnika, dok nedostaje proaktivne upute na scenario preporuke. U ovom papiru, doprinosimo novoj seriji podataka za CRS po imenu TG-ReDial (preporuka kroz temski vodeni dijalog). Naša kompleta podataka ima dve glavne karakteristike. Prvo, uključuje tema za primjenu prirodnih semantičkih prelaza prema scenariju preporuke. Drugo, stvara se na polu-automatski naèin, zato je ljudska annotacija razumnija i kontrolljivija. Na temelju TG-ReDiala predstavljamo zadatak preobražene preporuke na temi i predložimo efikasan pristup ovom zadatku. Eksperimenti su pokazali učinkovitost našeg pristupa na tri podzadatka, a to je predviđanje teme, preporuke predmete i generacija odgovora. TG-ReDial je dostupan na plavom< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'si': 'සංවාද ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය (CRS) අරමුණ වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස ප්\u200dරභාවිත CRS එකක් විකාශ කරන්න, උත්සත්වයේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ සහය අවශ්\u200dයයි. තියෙන CRS දත්ත සැට් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉල්ලන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝ මේ පැත්තට, අපි අළුත් CRS දත්ත සැට TG-ReDial (ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න). අපේ දත්ත සැට් එකේ ප්\u200dරධාන අවශ්\u200dය දෙකක් තියෙනවා. මුලින්ම, ඒක සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ස්වභාවික සෙමාන්තික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන් දෙවෙනි විදියට, ඒක ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඉතින් මිනිස්සු කිරීම තරම් හොඳයි පා TG-ReDial විධානයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ වැඩේට ප්\u200dරශ් විස්තර පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශනය කරලා තියෙනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සබ් වැඩක් තුන්දෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට, අයි TG-ReDial නිලු විදියට පුළුවන් https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'so': 'Isticmaalaha talo-bixinta (CRS) waxay ku talo galaan in ay isticmaalayaasha ku taliyaan alaabta qiimo-qiimo leh oo ay isticmaalaan hadal dhexe ah. Si loo horumariyo CRS waxqabad ah, kaalmada macluumaadka sare waa muhiim. Macluumaadka CRS ee joogta ayaa ugu horeyn focus on codsashada degdeg ah ee isticmaalayaasha, iyadoo aan u baahnayn hagitaan rasmi ah oo la talin karo arimaha talo-bixinta. Warqadan waxaynu ka qeybqaadannaa sawir cusub oo CRS ah oo la yidhaahdo TG-ReDial (Recommendations via dialogue-haged). Our dataset has two major features.  Marka ugu horeysa waxaa ku qoran kooxaha madaxaha si ay u sameeyaan baaritaanka dabiicadda ah oo loo soo jeedo qaabka lagu talo galay. Second, waxaa lagu abuuraa hab hoos ah, sababtoo darteed dhibaato dadku waa ka caqli badan tahay oo la maamuli karo. Sida lagu saleynayo TG-ReDial, waxaynu qabanaynaa shaqada arimaha la hagayo oo la taliyey, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qaab faa’iido ah oo u gaaraya shaqadan. Imtixaan dheeraad ah waxay muujiyaan saameyn ku saabsan sadex shaqooyin hoose, tusaale ahaan wax la sii sheegayo, arimaha laga soo jeediyo arimaha lagu soo jeedo iyo ka soo jeediyo. TG-ReDial wuxuu ku jiraa buluug< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'sv': 'Conversational Recommender System (CRS) syftar till att rekommendera högkvalitativa objekt till användare genom interaktiva samtal. För att utveckla ett effektivt CRS är det nödvändigt att stödja högkvalitativa datamängder. Befintliga CRS-datauppsättningar fokuserar främst på omedelbara förfrågningar från användare, men saknar proaktiv vägledning för rekommendationsscenariot. I denna uppsats bidrar vi med ett nytt CRS-dataset som heter TG-ReDial (Rekommendation via ämnesstyrd dialog). Vårt dataset har två huvudfunktioner. För det första innehåller den ämnestrådar för att genomdriva naturliga semantiska övergångar mot rekommendationsscenariot. För det andra skapas det på ett halvautomatiskt sätt, därför mänsklig notering är mer rimlig och kontrollerbar. Baserat på TG-ReDial presenterar vi uppgiften med ämnesstyrd samtalsrekommendation och föreslår ett effektivt tillvägagångssätt för denna uppgift. Omfattande experiment har visat hur effektivt vårt tillvägagångssätt är på tre underuppgifter, nämligen ämnesförutsägelse, objektrekommendation och responsgenerering. TG-ReDial är tillgänglig på blå < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் பரிந்துரைப்பாட்டு அமைப்பு சிஆர்.எஸ். ஐ உருவாக்குவதற்கு, உயர் தரவு அமைப்புகளுக்கு ஆதரவு முக்கியமானது. Existing CRS datasets mainly focus on immediate requests from users, while lack proactive guidance to the recommendation scenario.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் TG- ReDial பெயரிடப்பட்ட புதிய CRS தகவல் அமைப்பை பங்கு செய்கிறோம் (பொருள் நேர்வழி உரையாடல் மூலம் பரிந எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பு இரண்டு முக்கிய தன்மைகள் உள்ளது. முதலில், அது பரிந்துரைப்பு காட்சிக்கு இயல்பான பெம்பென்டிக் மாற்றங்களை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு தலைப்பு நூல்களை  இரண்டாவது, அது ஒரு அரை தானியங்கிய வழியில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதனால் மனித அறிவிப்பு மிகவும் விளக்கமுடையதாகவும் கட்டுப TG-ReDial அடிப்படையில், நாம் தலைப்பு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சு பரிந்துரைகளின் செயலை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், இந்த செயலுக்க விரிவான சோதனைகள் மூன்று துணை பணிகளின் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பொருள் முன்வாக்கு, உருப்படி பரிந் TG- மீண்டும் அழைப்பு நீலம் < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ur': 'مکالمانی سفارشی سیسٹم (CRS) کا مطابق ہے کہ کارساز کے لئے اچھی کیفیت اثرات کی توصیف کریں۔ ایک اثرات سی آئس ڈیٹسٹ کو ایجاد کرنے کے لئے، اچھی کیفیت ڈیٹسٹ کی مدد ضروری ہے۔ Existing CRS datasets mainly focus on immediate requests from users, while lack proactive guidance to the recommendation scenario. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوی سی آئس ڈیٹ سٹ کو TG-ReDial نامہ دیا ہے (توسط کی راہ دکھائی دیال کے ذریعہ) سفارش دیتے ہیں۔ ہمارے ڈاٹ سٹ کے دو بڑے فرصت ہیں۔ پہلی بار، یہ موضوع تیریڈ میں شامل ہوتا ہے کہ طبیعی سیمنٹی تغییرات کو سفارش کریں۔ دوسرا، یہ ایک آدھی-اتماٹیکی طریقہ سے پیدا کیا گیا ہے، اس لئے انسان کا اظہار زیادہ منطقی اور کنترل قابل ہے. TG-ReDial پر بنیاد ہے، ہم نے topic-guided conversational recommendation کا کام پیش کیا ہے، اور اس کام کے لئے ایک عمدہ طریقہ پیش کریں گے. اضافہ کی آزمائش نے تین سوب-ٹاکس پر ہماری طریقہ کا اثرات دکھایا ہے، یعنی موضوع کی آزمائش، اضافہ کی سفارش اور جواب کی نسل. TG-ReDial نیلی پر موجود ہے< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'uz': "Name @ info @ info Bu hujjatda TG-ReDial nomli yangi CRS maʼlumotlar tarkibini qoʻllayapmiz (Mavzu yordam berilgan oynasi orqali taʼminlovchi). Maʼlumotlarimizning ikki muhim xususiyatlari bor. Birinchi so'zda, bu mavzu soʻzlarini taʼminlovchi soniyalarning asosiy semantik vazifalarini ishga tushirish uchun qo'shiladi. Ikkinchi so'zda, bu avtomatik avtomatik yaratiladi, shunday qilib inson tadbirlik haqiqiqiy va boshqaruvchidir. TG-ReDial asosida, biz mavzu talab qilingan vazifani namoyish qilamiz va bu vazifani ishga tayyorlash imkoniyatini talab qilamiz. Koʻproq tajribalar esa uchta sub-vazifalarning hayotimizning effektligini ko'rsatadi. Bu mavzu hisoboti, element talab qilish va javob yaratish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Name https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống liên minh đối thoại (CRS) có mục đích khuyến cáo các mục tiêu chất lượng cao cho người dùng qua các cuộc trò chuyện tương tác. Để phát triển một CRT hiệu quả, sự hỗ trợ của bộ dữ liệu chất lượng cao là cần thiết. Các tập tin CRS tồn tại chủ yếu tập trung vào các yêu cầu tức thời từ người dùng, trong khi thiếu hướng dẫn tích cực về kịch bản kiến nghị. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đóng góp một tập tin CRS mới có tên là TG-Reordan (tiến cử qua Hộp thoại hướng dẫn chuột). Bộ dữ liệu của chúng tôi có hai yếu tố. Đầu tiên, nó chứa các mối về chủ đề để áp dụng sự chuyển tiếp theo theo ngữ nghĩa tự nhiên. Thứ hai, nó được tạo ra theo một cách bán tự động, do đó ghi chú con người hợp lý và dễ điều khiển hơn. Dựa trên kênh TG-ReDial, chúng tôi giới thiệu nhiệm vụ hướng dẫn đối thoại về chủ đề, và đề xuất một phương pháp hiệu quả cho nhiệm vụ này. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ đã chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp của chúng ta về ba nhiệm vụ phụ, ví dụ như dự đoán về chủ đề, tiến trình hàng đầu và sản xuất phản ứng. TG- ReDial hiện hữu tại Blue https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial -̀.', 'bg': 'Системите за препоръки за разговори имат за цел да препоръчат висококачествени елементи на потребителите чрез интерактивни разговори. За разработването на ефективна СРС е от съществено значение подкрепата на висококачествени набори от данни. Съществуващите набори от данни за СРС се фокусират главно върху незабавните искания от потребителите, като същевременно липсват проактивни насоки за сценария на препоръките. В тази статия ние допринесохме за нов набор от данни на CRS, наречен Препоръка чрез диалог с тема. Нашият набор от данни има две основни характеристики. Първо, тя включва теми за налагане на естествени семантични преходи към сценария на препоръките. Второ, тя е създадена по полуавтоматичен начин, следователно човешката анотация е по-разумна и контролирана. Въз основа на Представяме задачата за тематично ориентирана разговорна препоръка и предлагаме ефективен подход към тази задача. Обширни експерименти показаха ефективността на нашия подход по три подзадачи, а именно прогноза на темата, препоръка на артикулите и генериране на отговор. TG- ReDial се предлага в синьо < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'hr': 'Razgovorni sustavi preporučujući sustave (CRS) su cilj preporučiti visokokvalitetne predmete korisnicima kroz interaktivne razgovore. Za razvoj učinkovitih CRS-a, podrška visokokvalitetnih podataka je ključna. Postoje podaci CRS-a uglavnom se fokusiraju na hitne zahtjeve od korisnika, dok nedostaje proaktivne upute na scenario preporuke. U ovom papiru doprinosimo novoj seriji podataka CRS po imenu TG-ReDial (preporuka putem dijaloga predviđenog temom). Naša sastava podataka ima dvije glavne karakteristike. Prvo, uključuje temske trgovine za primjenu prirodnih semantičkih prelaza prema scenariju preporuke. Drugo, stvara se na polu-automatski način, stoga je ljudska annotacija razumnija i kontrolljivija. Na temelju TG-ReDial predstavljamo zadatak preobražene preporuke na temi i predložimo učinkovit pristup ovom zadatku. Prošireni eksperimenti pokazali su učinkovitost našeg pristupa na tri podzadatka, a to je predviđanje teme, preporuke predmeta i generacija odgovora. TG-ReDial je dostupan na plavoj< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'nl': 'Conversational Recommender Systems (CRS) zijn bedoeld om hoogwaardige items aan gebruikers aan te bevelen via interactieve gesprekken. Om een effectief CRS te ontwikkelen, is de ondersteuning van hoogwaardige datasets essentieel. Bestaande CRS-datasets richten zich voornamelijk op onmiddellijke verzoeken van gebruikers, terwijl het ontbreekt aan proactieve begeleiding voor het aanbevelingsscenario. In dit artikel dragen we een nieuwe CRS dataset bij, genaamd TG-ReDial (Aanbeveling door Topic-Guided Dialog). Onze dataset heeft twee belangrijke kenmerken. Ten eerste bevat het topic threads om natuurlijke semantische overgangen naar het aanbevelingsscenario af te dwingen. Ten tweede wordt het op een semi-automatische manier gemaakt, waardoor menselijke annotatie redelijker en controleerbaarder is. Op basis van TG-ReDial presenteren we de taak van topic-guided conversational recommendation, en stellen we een effectieve aanpak voor deze taak voor. Uitgebreide experimenten hebben de effectiviteit van onze aanpak aangetoond op drie deeltaken, namelijk topic prediction, item recommended en response generation. TG-ReDial is verkrijgbaar op blue< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'de': 'Conversational Recommender Systems (CRS) zielen darauf ab, Benutzern durch interaktive Gespräche qualitativ hochwertige Artikel zu empfehlen. Um ein effektives CRS zu entwickeln, ist die Unterstützung hochwertiger Datensätze unerlässlich. Bestehende CRS-Datensätze konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf sofortige Anfragen von Benutzern, während es keine proaktive Anleitung zum Empfehlungsszenario gibt. In diesem Beitrag tragen wir einen neuen CRS-Datensatz mit dem Namen TG-ReDial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog) bei. Unser Datensatz hat zwei wesentliche Merkmale. Zunächst werden Themen-Threads integriert, um natürliche semantische Übergänge zum Empfehlungsszenario zu erzwingen. Zweitens wird es halbautomatisch erstellt, daher ist menschliche Annotation vernünftiger und kontrollierbarer. Basierend auf TG-ReDial präsentieren wir die Aufgabe der themengestützten Gesprächsempfehlung und schlagen einen effektiven Ansatz für diese Aufgabe vor. Umfangreiche Experimente haben die Effektivität unseres Ansatzes bei drei Teilaufgaben nachgewiesen: Themenvorhersage, Artikelempfehlung und Antwortgenerierung. TG-ReDial ist erhältlich unter blue< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'id': 'Conversational recommender systems (CRS) aim to recommend high-quality items to users through interactive conversations.  Untuk mengembangkan CRS yang efektif, dukungan dataset kualitas tinggi adalah penting. Set data CRS yang ada terutama fokus pada permintaan segera dari pengguna, sementara kekurangan petunjuk proaktif untuk skenario rekomendasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami berkontribusi set data CRS baru bernama TG-ReDial (Rekomendasi melalui Dialog Berpanduan Topik). Set data kita memiliki dua ciri-ciri utama. Pertama, itu memasukkan benang topik untuk memaksa transisi semantis alami menuju skenario rekomendasi. Kedua, ia diciptakan dengan cara semi-otomatis, sehingga anotasi manusia lebih masuk akal dan terkendali. Berdasarkan TG-ReDial, kami mempersembahkan tugas dari rekomendasi konversasi yang dipandu topik, dan melamar pendekatan efektif untuk tugas ini. Eksperimen yang luas telah menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kita pada tiga sub-tugas, yaitu prediksi topik, rekomendasi item dan generasi respon. TG-ReDial tersedia di biru< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'da': 'Conversational Recommender Systems (CRS) sigter mod at anbefale produkter af høj kvalitet til brugerne gennem interaktive samtaler. For at udvikle et effektivt CRS er støtte til datasæt af høj kvalitet afgørende. Eksisterende CRS-datasæt fokuserer primært på øjeblikkelige anmodninger fra brugerne, mens de mangler proaktiv vejledning til anbefalingsscenariet. I denne artikel bidrager vi med et nyt CRS datasæt kaldet TG-ReDial (Anbefaling gennem Topic-Guided Dialog). Vores datasæt har to vigtige funktioner. For det første indarbejder den emnetråde for at håndhæve naturlige semantiske overgange til anbefalingsscenariet. For det andet er det skabt på en halvautomatisk måde, derfor menneskelig annotation er mere rimelig og kontrollerbar. Baseret på TG-ReDial præsenterer vi opgaven med emneorienteret samtaleanbefaling, og foreslår en effektiv tilgang til denne opgave. Omfattende eksperimenter har vist effektiviteten af vores tilgang på tre underopgaver, nemlig emne forudsigelse, emne anbefaling og responsgenerering. TG-ReDial er tilgængelig på blå< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ko': '세션 추천 시스템(CRS)은 대화식 대화를 통해 사용자에게 고품질의 상품을 추천하기 위한 것이다.효과적인 CRS를 개발하기 위해서는 고품질 데이터 세트의 지원이 중요하다.기존의 CRS 데이터 세트는 주로 사용자의 실시간 요청에 주목하고 추천 장면에 대한 주동적인 지도가 부족하다.본 논문에서 우리는 새로운 CRS 데이터 집합 TG ReDial(주제를 통해 대화를 유도하는 추천)을 제공했다.우리의 데이터 집합은 두 가지 주요 특징이 있다.우선, 주제 라인을 결합시켜 자연의 의미를 강제로 추천 장면으로 이행한다.그 다음으로 그것은 반자동적인 방식으로 만들어졌기 때문에 인류의 주석은 더욱 합리적이고 통제할 수 있다.TG-Radial을 바탕으로 주제 안내의 세션 추천 임무를 제시하고 효과적인 방법을 제시했다.대량의 실험은 이 방법이 세 가지 하위 임무에서의 유효성, 즉 주제 예측, 프로젝트 추천과 응답 생성을 증명했다.TG 재접속 가능한 파란색 <https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial>.', 'sw': 'Conversational recommender systems (CRS) aim to recommend high-quality items to users through interactive conversations.  Kujenga CRS yenye ufanisi, uungwaji wa seti za data za juu ni muhimu. Taarifa za CRS zinazopo zinajikita hasa juu ya maombi ya haraka kutoka kwa watumiaji, wakati ukosefu wa uongozi wa haraka kwenye eneo la mapendekezo. In this paper, we contribute a new CRS dataset named TG-ReDial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog).  Taarifa zetu zina vipengele viwili vikuu. Kwanza, inajumuisha matangazo ya mada ili kutekeleza mabadiliko ya kimapenzi ya asili katika eneo la mapendekezo. Second, it is created in a semi-automatic way, hence human annotation is more reasonable and controllable.  Kwa mujibu wa TG-ReDial, tunaleta jukumu la mapendekezo ya mazungumzo yanayoongozwa na mada, na tunapendekeza njia yenye ufanisi katika kazi hii. Majaribio mengi yameonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu kwenye kazi tatu za subira, ni utabiri wa mada, mapendekezo na kizazi cha majibu. TG-ReDial inapatikana kwenye bluu< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'tr': "Qonuşma teklip sistemleri (CRS) Ullançylara etkileşimli sohbetler bilen ýokary kaliwatly zady maslahat etmek üçin amaçlarýar. Etkinji CRS döretmek üçin ýokary kaliwatly datawatlaryň destegi örän wajypdyr. Öň bar CRS maglumatlary ullançylaryň derrew islegine fokus edýär, ýöne maslahat senaryony ýagdaýda aktiw gidişi ýok. Bu kagyzda TG-ReDial adlanan täze CRS maglumaty goşulýarys Maglumatlarymyz üçin iki esasy özellikler bar. Ilkinji gezek, täbiň semantik geçişini maslahat senaryýasyna geçirmek üçin meňzeş temalar goşulýar. Ikinjisi, ol ýarym-awtomatik ýolyp döredildi, şonuň üçin adamlaryň täzelikleri has dogry we kontrol edilýändir. TG-ReDial'a daýan ýan, tema görkezilen terjime maslahatlaryň zadyny görkezip we bu zada etkinji bir nusga teklip et. Döwletli deneyler biziň golaýymyzyň üç sub-zada etkinlik ukypyny görkezilýär, diýip tema öňünden geçirmek, aýtem maslahat we jogap döretmegimizi görkezilýär. TG-ReDial mavi bilen mejbur https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >", 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد\u200cکننده\u200cی مکالمات (CRS) هدف دارند که از طریق مکالمات interactive برای کاربران عناصر کیفیت بالا را پیشنهاد کنند. برای توسعه یک CRS موثر، پشتیبانی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای کیفیت بالا ضروری است. مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای CRS موجود در اصل روی خواسته\u200cهای فوری از کاربران تمرکز می\u200cکند، در حالی که هدایت\u200cهای فعالی برای سناریو پیشنهاد کم است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای CRS جدید به نام TG-ReDial (توصیف از طریق محاوره\u200cی موضوع) را شریک می\u200cدهیم. مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما دو ویژه بزرگی دارند. اول، این ترکیب موضوع را شامل می\u200cکند تا تغییرات طبیعی طبیعی به سمت سناریو پیشنهاد انجام دهد. دوم، آن را به طریق نیمه اتوماتیک آفریده می\u200cشود، بنابراین نشانه\u200cهای انسان منطقی\u200cتر و کنترل\u200cپذیرتر است. بر اساس TG-ReDial، ما وظیفه توصیف تبدیل به عنوان موضوع را پیشنهاد می کنیم، و یک روش موثری برای این وظیفه پیشنهاد می کنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای موثرت دستور ما را بر سه کار زیر نشان داده\u200cاند، یعنی پیش\u200cبینی موضوع، پیشنهاد توصیف و نسل پاسخ. TG-ReDial در آبی موجود است https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial .', 'hy': 'Խոսախոսական խորհրդատվող համակարգերը նպատակում են օգտագործողներին բարձր որակի առարկաներ խորհուրդ տալ ինտերակտիվ զրույցների միջոցով: Որպեսզի զարգացնենք արդյունավետ ԿՌՍ, բարձր որակի տվյալների համակարգերի աջակցությունը կարևոր է: Գոյություն ունի ԿՌՍ տվյալների համակարգեր, որոնք հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են օգտագործողների անմիջական խնդրանքների վրա, մինչդեռ խորհուրդ տալու սցենարի պրոակտիվ ուղղությունների պակաս են Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներդրում ենք մի նոր ԿՌՍ տվյալների համակարգ, որը կոչվում է TG-Re-Deal (Արհուրդ թեմային ուղղությամբ խորհրդատվության միջոցով): Մեր տվյալների համակարգը ունի երկու կարևոր հատկություն: Նախ և առաջ, այն ներառում է թեմային թելեր, որոնք ստիպում են բնական սեմանտիկ փոխանցումը խորհուրդ տալու սցենարիայի ուղղությամբ: Երկրորդ, այն ստեղծվում է կիսաավտոմատիկ կերպ, այսպիսով մարդկային նոտացիան ավելի խելամիտ է և վերահսկելի: Հաշվի առնելով ԹԳ-Ռեդիալին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք թեմայով հիմնված հաղորդակցման առաջարկը և առաջարկում ենք արդյունավետ մոտեցում այս խնդրին: Extensive experiments have demonstrated the effectiveness of our approach on three sub-tasks, namely topic prediction, item recommendation and response generation.  TG-ReDil-ը հասանելի է կապույտ https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'sq': 'Sistemet e rekomandimeve konversacionale (CRS) synojnë të rekomandojnë objekte të cilësisë së lartë për përdoruesit nëpërmjet bisedimeve interaktive. Për të zhvilluar një CRS efektive, mbështetja e grupeve të dhënash të cilësisë së lartë është thelbësore. Të dhënat ekzistuese CRS përqëndrohen kryesisht në kërkesat e menjëhershme nga përdoruesit, ndërsa mungon udhëzime proaktive për skenarin e rekomandimit. Në këtë letër, ne kontribuojmë me një set të ri të të dhënash CRS të quajtur TG-ReDial (rekomandim nëpërmjet dialogut të udhëzuar me temat). Të dhënat tona kanë dy karakteristika të mëdha. Së pari, ajo përfshin vija tematike për të zbatuar tranzicionet semantike natyrore drejt skenarit të rekomandimit. Së dyti, krijohet në një mënyrë gjysmë-automatike, kështu që anotacioni njerëzor është më i arsyeshëm dhe i kontrollueshëm. Bazuar në TG-ReDial, ne paraqesim detyrën e rekomandimit të bisedimeve të drejtuar nga tema dhe propozojmë një qasje efektive ndaj kësaj detyre. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara kanë demonstruar efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë në tre nëndetyra, veçanërisht parashikimin tematik, rekomandimin e objektit dhe gjenerimin e përgjigjes. TG-ReDial është në dispozicion në blu< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'az': 'Qonuşma tövsiyətlər sistemləri (CRS) istifadəçiləri interaktif söhbətlər vasitəsilə yüksək kaliteli məlumatları təbliğ etmək istəyirlər. Etkili CRS təhsil etmək üçün yüksək kaliteli veri qurğularının dəstəki mövcuddur. Existing CRS veri qurğuları istifadəçilərin tələsik istəklərinə çox odaqlanır, lakin istifadəçilərin tələsik senaryoya proaktif yol göstəricisi yoxdur. Bu kağızda TG-ReDial adlı yeni CRS veri quruluğuna kömək edirik. Məlumatlarımız iki böyük özellikləri var. İlk dəfə, təbiətli semantik dəyişiklikləri təşkil etmək üçün məsələn dəyişiklikləri təyin edir. İkincisi, bu yarı-avtomatik bir yolla yaradılır, bu yüzden insan məlumatı daha mantıklı və daha kontrolli olur. TG-ReDial vasitəsilə, məsələnin doğru yolu göstərən dəyişiklik tövsiyəsini göstərdik və bu işə effektiv bir yol təklif edirik. Əlavə təcrübələrimiz üç apa işlərdə, məsələlər təcrübəsi, məsələlər təcrübəsi və reaksiya nəsilində olan təcrübələrimizin etkinliğini göstərdi. TG-ReDial mavi olaraq faydalanır< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'af': "Gespraakte aanbevestingsstelsels (CRS) doel om hoë-kwaliteit-items aan gebruikers te aanbevestig deur interaktiewe gesprekke. Om 'n effektief CRS te ontwikkel, is die ondersteun van hoë-kwaliteit datastelle nodig. Bestaande CRS datastelle fokus hoofsaaklik op onmiddellike versoeke van gebruikers, terwyl proaktiewe gids ontbreek na die aanbeveling scenario. In hierdie papier, ons bydra 'n nuwe CRS datastel genaamd TG- ReDial (Aanvaring deur onderwerp- gids dialoog). Ons datastel het twee groot funksies. Eerste het dit onderwerpe ingesluit om natuurlike semantiese oordragte na die aanbeveling-scenario te vervolg. Tweede, dit is geskep in 'n semi-automaties manier, daarom is menslike annotasie meer redelike en kontroleer. Basies op TG-ReDial, voorsien ons die taak van onderwerp-gidde omskakelingsaanbeveling en voorstel 'n effektief toegang tot hierdie taak. Ekstensiewe eksperimente het die effektiviteit van ons toegang op drie sub-opdragte bevestig, dit is onderwerp voorskou, item aanbevesting en antwoord generasie. TG-ReDial is beskikbaar by blou< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >", 'bn': 'আন্তর্জাতিক সুপারিশার সিস্টেম (CRS) এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ব্যবহারকারীদের মধ্যে সক্রিয় আলোচনার মাধ্যমে ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য উচ কার্যকর সিআরএস তৈরি করার জন্য হাই-মানের ডাটাসেটের সমর্থন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। বর্তমান CRS ডাটাসেট মূলত ব্যবহারকারীদের দ্রুত অনুরোধের প্রতি মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করুন, যদিও পরামর্শের দৃশ্যে প্রোক্টিভিক পরিচালন In this paper, we contribute a new CRS dataset named TG-ReDial (Recommendation through Topic-Guided Dialog).  আমাদের ডাটাসেটের দুটো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্য আছে। প্রথমত, প্রাকৃতিক প্রাকৃতিক সেম্যান্টিক প্রান্তিক পরিবর্তন বাধ্য করার জন্য এটি বিষয়বস্তু থ্রিডের মধ্যে যো Second, it is created in a semi-automatic way, hence human annotation is more reasonable and controllable.  টিজি-রিডিয়ালের ভিত্তিতে আমরা বিষয়ে পরিচালিত পরামর্শ উপস্থাপন করি এবং এই কাজের কারণে কার্যকর উপায় প্রস্তাব করি। বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে তিনটি সাব-কাজের উপর আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার কার্যক্রম, যেমন বিষয়ের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী, জিনিসের পরা Name https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'cs': 'Konverzační doporučovací systémy (CRS) mají za cíl doporučit uživatelům vysoce kvalitní položky prostřednictvím interaktivních konverzací. Pro vývoj efektivního CRS je nezbytná podpora vysoce kvalitních datových sad. Stávající datové sady CRS se zaměřují především na okamžité požadavky uživatelů, přičemž chybí proaktivní pokyny ke scénáři doporučení. V tomto článku přinášíme novou datasadu CRS s názvem TG-ReDial (doporučení prostřednictvím tématického dialogu). Náš datový soubor má dvě hlavní vlastnosti. Za prvé, zahrnuje tématická vlákna pro vynucení přirozených sémantických přechodů směrem ke scénáři doporučení. Za druhé, je vytvořen poloautomatickým způsobem, proto je lidská anotace rozumnější a kontrolovatelnější. Na základě TG-ReDial prezentujeme úkol tématicky řízeného konverzačního doporučení a navrhujeme efektivní přístup k tomuto úkolu. Rozsáhlé experimenty prokázaly efektivitu našeho přístupu na třech dílčích úkolech, konkrétně predikci tématu, doporučení položek a generování reakcí. TG-ReDial je k dispozici na modré< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'am': 'የአካባቢው ጉዳይ ስርዓት (CRS) የኮርማዊ ጥያቄዎችን ለመጠቀም በተጠቃሚ ንግግር ለመጠየቅ ይችላል፡፡ To develop an effective CRS, the support of high-quality datasets is essential.  የአሁኑ የCRS ዳታ ማሰናከል በተጠቃሚ ጥያቄዎች ላይ ማጠቃለያ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ TG-ReDial (Topic-Guided Dialog) የተባለውን አዲስ የCRS ዳታተር ማሰናከል እናሳርጋለን፡፡ Our dataset has two major features.  በመጀመሪያ፣ የባሕላዊውን የsemantic ተሳታፊዎችን ለመፈለግ የውይይት መድረክ ይጨምርበታል፡፡ ሁለተኛ፣ በሰው አካባቢ እና አስተያየት ይደረጋል፡፡ በTG-ReDial በመሠረት ላይ፣ የጉዳዩ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ እናቀርባታለን፣ ለዚህም ስራ አካባቢ ሥርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ብዙዎች ፈተናዎች የሦስት ደብዳቤዎች ላይ የሥርዓታችንን አካባቢ፣ የውይይት ትንቢት፣ የኢንተርኔት ጉዳይ እና የመመለስ ትውልድ ነው፡፡ Dial is available at blue< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'bs': 'Sustavi preporučujući razgovor (CRS) su cilj preporučiti visokokvalitetne predmete korisnicima kroz interaktivne razgovore. Za razvoj efikasnih CRS-a, podrška kvalitetnih podataka je neophodna. Postoje podaci za CRS uglavnom se fokusiraju na hitne zahtjeve od korisnika, dok nedostaje proaktivne upute na scenario preporuke. U ovom papiru, doprinosimo novoj seriji podataka CRS po imenu TG-ReDial (preporuka kroz temski vodeni dijalog). Naša kompleta podataka ima dvije glavne karakteristike. Prvo, uključuje temske trgovine za primjenu prirodnih semantičkih prelaza prema scenariju preporuke. Drugo, stvara se na polu-automatski način, stoga je ljudska annotacija razumnija i kontrolljivija. Na temelju TG-ReDial, predstavljamo zadatak predloženog tematskom konverzacijskom preporukom i predložimo efikasan pristup ovom zadatku. Eksperimenti su pokazali učinkovitost našeg pristupa na tri podzadatka, a to je predviđanje teme, preporuke predmete i generacija odgovora. TG-ReDial je dostupan na plavoj< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial - Da.', 'et': 'Vestlussoovituss羹steemide (CRS) eesm瓣rk on soovitada kasutajatele interaktiivsete vestluste kaudu kvaliteetseid esemeid. T繭husa arvutip繭hise ettetellimiss羹steemi v瓣ljat繹繹tamiseks on oluline toetada kvaliteetseid andmekogumeid. Olemasolevad arvutip繭histe ettetellimiss羹steemide andmekogumid keskenduvad peamiselt kasutajate viivitamatutele taotlustele, samas puuduvad soovitusstsenaariumi kohta ennetavad suunised. K瓣esolevas t繹繹s anname oma panuse uue CRS andmekogumi nimega TG-ReDial (soovitus teemajuhise dialoogi kaudu). Meie andmekogumil on kaks peamist omadust. Esiteks sisaldab see teemal繭imeid, et j繭ustada loomulikke semantilisi 羹leminekuid soovitusstsenaariumi suunas. Teiseks on see loodud poolautomaatselt, seega on inimese m瓣rgistus m繭istlikum ja kontrollitavam. TG-ReDiali p繭hjal tutvustame teemap繭hise vestlussoovituse 羹lesannet ja pakume v瓣lja t繭husa l瓣henemisviisi sellele 羹lesandele. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid on n瓣idanud meie l瓣henemisviisi efektiivsust kolmel alam羹lesandel, nimelt teema prognoosimine, kirjete soovitus ja vastuse genereerimine. TG-ReDial on saadaval sinisel < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ca': "Conversational recommender systems (CRS) aim to recommend high-quality items to users through interactive conversations.  Per desenvolupar un sistema CRS efectiu, el suport de conjunts de dades d'alta qualitat és essencial. Existing CRS datasets mainly focus on immediate requests from users, while lack proactive guidance to the recommendation scenario.  En aquest article, contribuim a un nou conjunt de dades CRS anomenat TG-ReDial (Recomendació a través de diàleg orientat per tema). Our dataset has two major features.  First, it incorporates topic threads to enforce natural semantic transitions towards the recommendation scenario.  Segon, es crea d'una manera semi-automàtica, així que l'anotació human a és més raonable i controlable. Based on TG-ReDial, we present the task of topic-guided conversational recommendation, and propose an effective approach to this task.  Els extensos experiments han demostrat l'eficacia del nostre enfocament en tres subtasques, a saber, la predicció del tema, la recomendació del tema i la generació de resposta. TG-ReDial està disponible en blau< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.", 'fi': 'Conversational recommender systems (CRS) pyrkii suosittelemaan korkealaatuisia kohteita käyttäjille interaktiivisten keskustelujen kautta. Tehokkaan TPS:n kehittämiseksi korkealaatuisten tietoaineistojen tukeminen on olennaisen tärkeää. Nykyiset CRS-tietoaineistot keskittyvät pääasiassa käyttäjien välittömiin pyyntöihin, mutta suositusskenaarioon ei ole ennakoivaa ohjausta. Tässä artikkelissa esitämme uuden CRS-aineiston nimeltä TG-ReDial (suositus aihekohtaisen vuoropuhelun kautta). Aineistossamme on kaksi pääpiirteitä. Ensinnäkin se sisältää aiheketjuja, jotka pakottavat luonnolliset semanttiset siirtymät suositusskenaarioon. Toiseksi se luodaan puoliautomaattisella tavalla, joten ihmisen huomautus on järkevämpi ja hallittavissa. TG-ReDialin pohjalta esittelemme aihekohtaisen keskustelusuosituksen tehtävän ja ehdotamme tehokasta lähestymistapaa tähän tehtävään. Laajat kokeet ovat osoittaneet lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden kolmessa osatehtävässä, aiheen ennustamisessa, tuotesuosituksessa ja vasteen tuottamisessa. TG-ReDial on saatavilla sinisellä < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'jv': '1.2 Daftar kang nggunakake cara-cara sing efek, supoyo dataset sing wis ngawe barang. Sayensi Nang pepulan iki, kita nyusewe dataset sing dibutuhke CG-Redial (masalah ngetik Temik-Stidiwat Dialog). Punika dataset sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke Awak dhéwé, nggawe nik nggawe sawian cara-cara sing bisa mlebu kanggo ngilangno sistem semantar dumadhi iki. Yowis, iki wis kelompok ning semi-otomatik yo, dadi kapan tanggal uwong luwih apik lan nguasai sing apik. Ngawe isi mêng, GG-Redial, kita nganggo cara-ingkang conversion nggawe tema-ingkang basa, lan supoyo biasa layakno kanggo nggawe task iki. name < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'sk': 'Sistemi pogovornih priporočil (CRS) so namenjeni uporabnikom priporočanju kakovostnih elementov prek interaktivnih pogovorov. Za razvoj učinkovitega računalniškega sistema rezervacij je bistvena podpora visokokakovostnim naborom podatkov. Obstoječi nabori podatkov CRS se osredotočajo predvsem na takojšnje zahteve uporabnikov, medtem ko nimajo proaktivnih smernic glede scenarija priporočil. V tem prispevku prispevamo nov nabor podatkov CRS z imenom TG-ReDial (Priporočilo prek tematskega vodenega dialoga). Naš nabor podatkov ima dve glavni značilnosti. Prvič, vključuje teme za uveljavljanje naravnih semantičnih prehodov v scenarij priporočil. Drugič, ustvarjena je na polavtomatski način, zato je človeška opomba bolj razumna in nadzorovana. Na podlagi TG-ReDial predstavljamo nalogo tematsko vodenega pogovornega priporočila in predlagamo učinkovit pristop k tej nalogi. Obsežni eksperimenti so pokazali učinkovitost našega pristopa pri treh podnalogah, in sicer napovedovanju teme, priporočanju postavk in ustvarjanju odzivov. TG-ReDial je na voljo v modri < https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.', 'ha': "@ action: button Ji buɗe wani CRS mai inganci, yana da muhimu taimakon daidaita data masu inganci. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Ga wannan takardan, munã ƙarai da wani tsari na CRS da aka suna TG-reDial (Tafiyar da Kayan Dakatan Haki-Haƙĩƙa). Our dataset has two major features.  Kayyan da, yana shigar da ma'anar madaidaici dõmin a yi amfani da transitions na natura zuwa wurin da aka buƙata. Dukkan, an halitta shi a kan farat-farat-farat, don haka yana da mafi masu hankali da masu kanana. Basan da TG-RaDial, muna halatar da aikin wanda aka shiryar da masu magana na madaidaici, kuma munãbuɗa wata hanyor da mai amfani zuwa wannan aikin. Tajarakin da ke ƙaranci sun nuna tayari ga hanyarmu a kan aikin su sau-taskõki uku, kamar kunyar muhimmi, da shawarar ƙanni da kuma zaɓen ajiya. KCharselect unicode block name https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >", 'bo': 'གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་འོས་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་མ་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནུས དཔལ་འབྱོར་བྱས་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་CRS་ཞིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་མཐོ་རིམ གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་CRS་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚན་གྱིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གསལ་འཆར་ངོས་འཛིན་མེད་པའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ལ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་པ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་CRS སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ལ་ཞུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་ཡོད་པས་རེད། དང་པོར་བརྗོད་དོན་འདིས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆེན་དག་གི་གྲོས་ཁྱེར་ཡོད་པ གཉིས་པ། དེ་ནི་འདྲ་རྒྱ་ལྟར་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡིན། དེའི་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མི་རྣམས་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་དང་ཚད་ལྟར TG-ReDial དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་དེ། ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་གྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་གཏམ་གླེང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་གཏམ་གླེང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་འདོ རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ལུས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཡོད། TG-ReDial སྔོན་པོ< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >', 'he': 'Conversational recommender systems (CRS) aim to recommend high-quality items to users through interactive conversations.  To develop an effective CRS, the support of high-quality datasets is essential.  Existing CRS datasets mainly focus on immediate requests from users, while lack proactive guidance to the recommendation scenario.  בעיתון הזה, אנחנו תורמים קבוצת מידע CRS חדשה בשם TG-ReDial בסט המידע שלנו יש שתי תכונות גדולות. First, it incorporates topic threads to enforce natural semantic transitions towards the recommendation scenario.  Second, it is created in a semi-automatic way, hence human annotation is more reasonable and controllable.  בהתבסס על TG-ReDial, אנחנו מציגים את המשימה של המלצה של שיחה מונחת בנושא, ולהציע גישה יעילה למשימה הזאת. ניסויים רחבים הראו את היעילות של הגישה שלנו על שלושה משימות תת-משימה, כלומר חזיון נושאי, המלצה של פריטים ודור תגובה. TG-ReDial is available at blue< https://github.com/RUCAIBox/TG-ReDial >.'}
{'en': 'Summarize before Aggregate : A Global-to-local Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'fr': "Synthèse avant agrégation\xa0: un réseau d'inférence graphique hétérogène global à local pour la reconnaissance des émotions conversationnelles", 'ar': 'تلخيص قبل التجميع: شبكة استدلال بياني غير متجانسة عالمية إلى محلية للتعرف على المشاعر التخاطبية', 'pt': 'Resumir antes de agregar: uma rede de inferência de gráficos heterogêneos global para local para reconhecimento de emoções de conversação', 'es': 'Resumir antes de agregar: una red de inferencia de gráficos heterogéneos de global a local para el reconocimiento de emociones conversacionales', 'ja': '集計前に要約する：会話感情認識のためのグローバルからローカルへの異種グラフ推論ネットワーク', 'zh': '合前总结:以会话情识者全球于本地异构图推理网络', 'hi': 'समुच्चय से पहले सारांशित करें: संवादात्मक भावना पहचान के लिए एक वैश्विक-से-स्थानीय विषम ग्राफ अनुमान नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Резюмируйте перед агрегатом: глобально-локальная сеть гетерогенных графов для распознавания эмоций разговорной репутации', 'ga': 'Achoimre roimh Chomhiomlán: Líonra Tátail Ghraf Ilchineálach Domhanda-go-Áitiúil le haghaidh Aithint Mothúcháin Chomhrá', 'ka': 'კონფიგურაცია Aggregate წინ: გლობალური - ლოკალური Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'hu': 'Összefoglalja az összesítés előtt: Globális-helyi heterogén grafikonferencia hálózat a beszélgetési érzelmek felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Σύνοψη πριν από τη Σύνοψη: Ένα παγκόσμιο-τοπικό δίκτυο συμπερασμάτων ετερογενών γραφημάτων για την αναγνώριση συναισθημάτων συνομιλίας', 'it': "Riassuma prima dell'aggregazione: una rete di inferenza eterogena globale a locale per il riconoscimento delle emozioni conversazionali", 'kk': 'Бірлестіру алдында тұжырымдамасы: Жергілікті және жергілікті гетерогендық графикалық көңіл түсініктемелер желі', 'mk': 'Пред агрегетирање: Глобална на локална мрежа за гетерогенска графска инференција за препознавање на емоции', 'lt': 'Apibendrinti prieš agreguojant: pasaulinis į vietinį Heterogeninių grafinių duomenų perdavimo tinklas konversaciniam emocijų pripažinimui', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Sommarju qabel l-Aggregat: Netwerk ta’ Inferenza tal-Grafika Eteroġenuża Globali għal-Lokali għar-Rikonoxximent tal-Emożizzjoni Konversazzjonali', 'ml': 'ആഗ്രേഗെറ്റിന് മുമ്പില്\u200d ചുരുക്കം: ഒരു ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d- ലോക്കല്\u200d - ലോക്കല്\u200d ഹെറോജെനിയോ ഗ്രാഫ് ഇന്\u200dഫെരെന്\u200dസ് നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Aggregate-ын өмнө хэвлэл: Global-to-local Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie przed agregatem: globalna do lokalna sieć heterogennych wykresów do rozpoznawania emocji konwersacyjnych', 'ro': 'Rezumată înainte de agregare: O rețea globală-locală de inferență a graficului heterogen pentru recunoașterea emoțiilor conversaționale', 'no': 'Samandrag før samgregat: Eit globalt- til- lokal Heterogen- grafikkinferens- nettverk for konversjonsverking', 'sr': 'Sažete pre Aggregata: Mreža za otkrivanje razgovornih emocija', 'si': 'Aggregate කලින් සංශ්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න: ස්ථානික සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංශ්\u200dයාපනය', 'sv': 'Sammanfattning före aggregering: Ett globalt till lokalt heterogent grafinferensnätverk för konversationsmässig känsloigenkänning', 'so': 'Summary before Aggregate: A Global-to-local Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு முன் சுருக்கம்: A Global- to- local Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'ur': 'Aggregate سے پہلے جمع کریں: ایک گلوبل-سے-لوکال Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tóm tắt trước Tập đoàn: Mạng liên hệ dữ liệu dị dạng giữa to àn cầu và địa phương cho việc nhận dạng chuyển tiếp', 'bg': 'Обобщете преди агрегата: Глобална към локална мрежа за хетерогенни графики за разпознаване на емоциите на разговора', 'nl': 'Samenvatten voor Aggregate: Een wereldwijd naar lokaal heterogeen grafiek Inference Netwerk voor Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'hr': 'Sažetak prije Aggregata: Mreža za otkrivanje razgovornih emocija', 'da': 'Resumér før Aggregate: Et globalt til lokalt heterogen graf inference netværk til samtalelig følelsesgenkendelse', 'de': 'Zusammenfassen vor Aggregation: Ein global-to-local heterogenes Graph Inference Network für Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'id': 'Ringkasan sebelum Aggregate: Jaringan Inferensi Graf Heterogen Global-to-local for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری پیش از گروه\u200cگیری: شبکه\u200cی تغییرات گراف\u200cهای جهانی به محلی برای شناسایی احساسات گفتگو', 'ko': '집합 전 총결산: 회화 감정 식별에 사용되는 전역에서 국부 이구도 추리 네트워크', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa muhtasari kabla ya Aggregation: Mtandao wa Kuhamasisha Graph ya Kimataifa kwa ajili ya Kutambua Ujasusi wa Kimataifa', 'af': "Opsomming voor Aggregate: ' n Globale na- plaaslike Heterogene Graaf Inferensienetwerk vir Gespraakte Emosie herkenning", 'tr': 'Ge챌mi힊i golla힊madan 철흫in챌채 jemela: G체rl체-첵erlerde Heterogen Graph Inference Network for Conversation Emotion Recognition', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'sq': 'Përshkruaj përpara Aggregatit: Një Rrjet global-në-lokal të Inferencës së Grafikës Heterogjene për njohjen e emocioneve konversacionale', 'hy': 'Ամբողջումը համառոտագրել մինչև Ամբողջումը. համընդհանուր գլոբալ-տեղական հետերոգեն գրաֆիկ ինֆերանսիայի ցանց հաղորդակցման զգացմունքների ճանաչման համար', 'az': "Aggregate'dan əvvəl toplama: Qonuşma Emotiyon Tanıması üçün Global-Yerli Heterogen Grafik Inferensi A ğı", 'bn': 'আগগ্রেগেটের পূর্বে সামার্মিজ: বিশ্বব্যাপী থেকে স্থানীয় হিটারোজেনিয়াস গ্রাফ ইনফারেন্স নেটওয়ার্কের জন্য বি', 'bs': 'Sažetak prije Aggregata: Mreža za otkrivanje razgovornih emocija', 'ca': "Resumir abans d'agregar: Una xarxa de referència heterogène global a local per reconèixer l'emoció conversacional", 'cs': 'Shrnutí před agregátem: Globálně-lokální heterogenní grafová inferenční síť pro rozpoznávání konverzačních emocí', 'et': 'Kokkuvõte enne agregeerimist: globaalne kohalik heterogeenne graafiline järeldusvõrk vestlusemotsioonide tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Yhteenveto ennen aggregaattia: Maailmanlaajuinen ja paikallinen Heterogeeninen Graafin Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'jv': 'Cumulate before Anggregat', 'sk': 'Povzemite pred združitvijo: globalno-lokalna heterogena grafska sklepna mreža za prepoznavanje pogovornih čustev', 'bo': 'བཅུད་དོན་དང་སྔོན་གྱི་མཛུད་དུ་བསྡུས་བ: Global-to-local Heterogeneous Graph Inference Network for Conversational Emotion Recognition', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'סכם לפני התאגרוגייט: רשת מערבות גרפים טרוגניים גלובלית למקומית לזהות רגשות משוחררים'}
{'en': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) is a crucial task in Natural Language Processing (NLP) with wide applications. Prior works in CER generally focus on modeling emotion influences solely with utterance-level features, with little attention paid on phrase-level semantic connection between utterances. Phrases carry sentiments when they are referred to emotional events under certain topics, providing a global semantic connection between utterances throughout the entire conversation. In this work, we propose a two-stage Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), which seamlessly integrates inference for topic-related emotional phrases and local dependency reasoning over neighbouring utterances in a global-to-local fashion. Topic-related emotional phrases, which constitutes the global topic-related emotional connections, are recognized by our proposed heterogeneous Summarization Graph. Local dependencies, which captures short-term emotional effects between neighbouring utterances, are further injected via an Aggregation Graph to distinguish the subtle differences between utterances containing emotional phrases. The two steps of graph inference are tightly-coupled for a comprehensively understanding of emotional fluctuation. Experimental results on three CER benchmark datasets verify the effectiveness of our proposed model, which outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches.', 'pt': 'O Reconhecimento de Emoções Conversacionais (CER) é uma tarefa crucial no Processamento de Linguagem Natural (PLN) com amplas aplicações. Trabalhos anteriores em CER geralmente se concentram na modelagem de influências emocionais apenas com recursos de nível de enunciado, com pouca atenção na conexão semântica em nível de frase entre enunciados. As frases carregam sentimentos quando se referem a eventos emocionais em determinados tópicos, fornecendo uma conexão semântica global entre os enunciados ao longo de toda a conversa. Neste trabalho, propomos uma Rede de Inferência de Grafos de Sumarização e Agregação de dois estágios (SumAggGIN), que integra perfeitamente a inferência para frases emocionais relacionadas a tópicos e raciocínio de dependência local sobre enunciados vizinhos de forma global para local. Frases emocionais relacionadas a tópicos, que constituem as conexões emocionais relacionadas a tópicos globais, são reconhecidas por nosso gráfico de sumarização heterogêneo proposto. Dependências locais, que capturam efeitos emocionais de curto prazo entre enunciados vizinhos, são posteriormente injetadas por meio de um Gráfico de Agregação para distinguir as diferenças sutis entre enunciados que contêm frases emocionais. As duas etapas da inferência gráfica são fortemente acopladas para uma compreensão abrangente da flutuação emocional. Resultados experimentais em três conjuntos de dados de referência de CER verificam a eficácia do nosso modelo proposto, que supera as abordagens de última geração.', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على المشاعر التخاطبية (CER) مهمة حاسمة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) مع تطبيقات واسعة. تركز الأعمال السابقة في CER بشكل عام على نمذجة التأثيرات العاطفية فقط مع ميزات مستوى الكلام ، مع القليل من الاهتمام الذي يتم توجيهه إلى الارتباط الدلالي على مستوى العبارة بين الكلام. تحمل العبارات المشاعر عند إحالتها إلى أحداث عاطفية في إطار موضوعات معينة ، مما يوفر ارتباطًا دلاليًا عالميًا بين الكلام خلال المحادثة بأكملها. في هذا العمل ، نقترح شبكة استدلال الرسم البياني التجميعي والتلخيص على مرحلتين (SumAggGIN) ، والتي تدمج بسلاسة الاستدلال للعبارات العاطفية المتعلقة بالموضوع ومنطق التبعية المحلية على الأقوال المجاورة بطريقة عالمية إلى محلية. يتم التعرف على العبارات العاطفية المتعلقة بالموضوع ، والتي تشكل الروابط العاطفية ذات الصلة بالموضوع العالمي ، من خلال مخطط التلخيص غير المتجانس المقترح. يتم حقن التبعيات المحلية ، التي تلتقط التأثيرات العاطفية قصيرة المدى بين الكلمات المتجاورة ، عبر الرسم البياني التجميعي لتمييز الفروق الدقيقة بين الأقوال التي تحتوي على عبارات عاطفية. ترتبط خطوتان الاستدلال بالرسم البياني ارتباطًا وثيقًا من أجل فهم شامل للتقلبات العاطفية. تتحقق النتائج التجريبية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات معيارية لـ CER من فعالية نموذجنا المقترح ، والذي يتفوق على أحدث الأساليب.', 'es': 'El reconocimiento de emociones conversacionales (CER) es una tarea crucial en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) con amplias aplicaciones. Los trabajos anteriores en CER generalmente se centran en modelar las influencias emocionales únicamente con características a nivel de enunciado, con poca atención a la conexión semántica a nivel de frase entre enunciados. Las frases llevan sentimientos cuando se refieren a eventos emocionales bajo ciertos temas, proporcionando una conexión semántica global entre los enunciados a lo largo de toda la conversación. En este trabajo, proponemos una Red de Inferencia de Gráficos de Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (Sumagggin) de dos etapas, que integra a la perfección la inferencia de frases emocionales relacionadas con el tema y el razonamiento de dependencia local sobre enunciados vecinos de manera global a local. Las frases emocionales relacionadas con el tema, que constituyen las conexiones emocionales relacionadas con el tema global, son reconocidas por nuestro gráfico de resumen heterogéneo propuesto. Las dependencias locales, que capturan los efectos emocionales a corto plazo entre enunciados vecinos, se inyectan adicionalmente a través de un gráfico de agregación para distinguir las diferencias sutiles entre los enunciados que contienen frases emocionales. Los dos pasos de la inferencia gráfica están estrechamente acoplados para una comprensión integral de la fluctuación emocional. Los resultados experimentales en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia de CER verifican la eficacia de nuestro modelo propuesto, que supera a los enfoques más avanzados.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance des émotions conversationnelles (CER) est une tâche cruciale dans le traitement du langage naturel (NLP) avec de nombreuses applications. Les travaux antérieurs de CER se concentrent généralement sur la modélisation des influences émotionnelles uniquement avec des caractéristiques au niveau de l'énoncé, avec peu d'attention accordée à la connexion sémantique au niveau de la phrase entre les énoncés. Les phrases véhiculent des sentiments lorsqu'elles font référence à des événements émotionnels sous certains sujets, fournissant un lien sémantique global entre les énoncés tout au long de la conversation. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un réseau d'inférence de graphe de synthèse et d'agrégation en deux étapes (SumAgggin), qui intègre de manière transparente l'inférence pour les phrases émotionnelles liées à un sujet et le raisonnement de dépendance locale sur des énoncés voisins d'une manière globale à locale. Les phrases émotionnelles liées au sujet, qui constituent les liens émotionnels globaux liés au sujet, sont reconnues par notre graphique de synthèse hétérogène proposé. Les dépendances locales, qui capturent les effets émotionnels à court terme entre des énoncés voisins, sont ensuite injectées via un graphique d'agrégation afin de distinguer les différences subtiles entre les énoncés contenant des phrases émotionnelles. Les deux étapes de l'inférence graphique sont étroitement couplées pour une compréhension complète des fluctuations émotionnelles. Les résultats expérimentaux sur trois ensembles de données de référence CER confirment l'efficacité de notre modèle proposé, qui surpasse les approches de pointe.", 'zh': '会话情识(CER)自然语言处(NLP)有广泛应用之要务也。 CER中以前,常专于语言特徵建模情,罕关语接短语级语义。 当短语引某主题下情事,则携之以情,而全局语义接。 于是举一两段之总结,合图推理网络(SumAggGIN),以全球至本地无缝集成与主题相关之情短语推理邻语之局赖之。 与题相关之情短语,全球主题之情,由我异构总结图识。 本地恃(邻语短期)因合图注之,以别情短语语之微异。 推两步紧耦合,以周知情波。 3CER准数集上实验验吾所有效性,先之最先进者也。', 'ja': '会話的感情認識（ CER ）は、幅広い応用を持つ自然言語処理（ NLP ）における重要なタスクです。 CERにおける以前の研究は、一般的に、発話レベルの特徴のみで感情の影響をモデリングすることに焦点を当てており、発話間のフレーズレベルの意味的関連性にはほとんど注意を払っていない。 フレーズは、特定のトピックの下で感情的な出来事に言及されるときに感情を含み、会話全体を通じて発話間のグローバルな意味的つながりを提供します。 この研究では、トピック関連の感情的フレーズの推論と隣接する発話に対するローカル依存推論をグローバルからローカルにシームレスに統合する2段階の要約と集計グラフ推論ネットワーク（ SumAggGIN ）を提案します。 トピック関連の感情的なフレーズは、グローバルなトピック関連の感情的なつながりを構成し、提案されている異種の要約グラフによって認識されます。 隣接する発話間の短期的な感情効果をキャプチャする局所依存性は、感情的なフレーズを含む発話間の微妙な違いを区別するために、集計グラフを介してさらに注入される。 グラフ推論の2つのステップは、感情の変動を包括的に理解するために密接に結合されています。 3つのCERベンチマークデータセットの実験結果は、最先端のアプローチを上回る提案されたモデルの有効性を検証します。', 'hi': 'संवादात्मक भावना पहचान (सीईआर) व्यापक अनुप्रयोगों के साथ प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। सीईआर में पहले के काम आम तौर पर पूरी तरह से उच्चारण-स्तर की विशेषताओं के साथ भावनाओं के प्रभावों को मॉडलिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जिसमें उच्चारण के बीच वाक्यांश-स्तर के शब्दार्थ संबंध पर थोड़ा ध्यान दिया जाता है। वाक्यांश भावनाओं को ले जाते हैं जब उन्हें कुछ विषयों के तहत भावनात्मक घटनाओं के लिए संदर्भित किया जाता है, जो पूरी बातचीत में कथनों के बीच एक वैश्विक शब्दार्थ संबंध प्रदान करता है। इस काम में, हम एक दो-चरण सारांशीकरण और एकत्रीकरण ग्राफ अनुमान नेटवर्क (SumAggGIN) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो मूल रूप से विषय से संबंधित भावनात्मक वाक्यांशों और वैश्विक-से-स्थानीय फैशन में पड़ोसी कथनों पर स्थानीय निर्भरता तर्क के लिए अनुमान को एकीकृत करता है। विषय से संबंधित भावनात्मक वाक्यांश, जो वैश्विक विषय से संबंधित भावनात्मक कनेक्शन का गठन करते हैं, हमारे प्रस्तावित विषम सारांशीकरण ग्राफ द्वारा पहचाने जाते हैं। स्थानीय निर्भरताएं, जो पड़ोसी कथनों के बीच अल्पकालिक भावनात्मक प्रभावों को कैप्चर करती हैं, को भावनात्मक वाक्यांशों वाले कथनों के बीच सूक्ष्म अंतर को अलग करने के लिए एक एकत्रीकरण ग्राफ के माध्यम से आगे इंजेक्ट किया जाता है। ग्राफ अनुमान के दो चरण भावनात्मक उतार-चढ़ाव की व्यापक समझ के लिए कसकर युग्मित हैं। तीन सीईआर बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करते हैं, जो अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Разговорное распознавание эмоций (CER) является важнейшей задачей в обработке естественного языка (NLP) с широким применением. Предыдущие работы в CER, как правило, сосредоточены на моделировании эмоциональных влияний исключительно с помощью функций на уровне высказываний, при этом мало внимания уделяется семантической связи между высказываниями на уровне фраз. Фразы несут в себе чувства, когда они относятся к эмоциональным событиям по определенным темам, обеспечивая глобальную семантическую связь между высказываниями на протяжении всего разговора. В этой работе мы предлагаем двухступенчатую Сеть вывода суммирования и агрегирования графов (SumAggGIN), которая плавно интегрирует вывод для связанных с темой эмоциональных фраз и локальную зависимость рассуждений над соседними высказываниями глобально-локальным образом. Эмоциональные фразы, связанные с темой, которые составляют глобальные эмоциональные связи, связанные с темой, распознаются по нашему предложенному гетерогенному графику суммирования. Локальные зависимости, которые фиксируют краткосрочные эмоциональные эффекты между соседними высказываниями, далее вводятся с помощью агрегационного графика, чтобы различать тонкие различия между высказываниями, содержащими эмоциональные фразы. Два этапа вывода графа тесно связаны для всестороннего понимания эмоциональных колебаний. Экспериментальные результаты по трем базовым наборам данных ССВ подтверждают эффективность предлагаемой нами модели, которая превосходит современные подходы.', 'ga': 'Is tasc ríthábhachtach é Aitheantas Mothúcháin Chomhrá (CER) i bPróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP) le feidhmeanna leathana. Díríonn saothair roimhe seo in CER go ginearálta ar thionchair mhothúcháin a shamhaltú le gnéithe ar leibhéal cainte amháin, agus is beag aird a thugtar ar nasc séimeantach ag leibhéal frása idir nathanna cainte. Iompraíonn frásaí mothúcháin nuair a chuirtear faoi bhráid imeachtaí mothúchánacha iad faoi ábhair áirithe, ag soláthar nasc shéimeantach domhanda idir nathanna le linn an chomhrá ar fad. San obair seo, molaimid Líonra Tátail Ghraif Achoimriúcháin agus Chomhiomlánaithe dhá chéim (SumAggGIN), a chomhtháthaíonn gan uaim tátal maidir le frásaí mothúchánacha a bhaineann le topaicí agus réasúnaíocht spleáchais áitiúil ar chainteanna comharsanacha ar bhealach domhanda-go-áitiúil. Aithnítear frásaí mothúchánacha a bhaineann le topaicí, arb é atá ann naisc mhothúcháin dhomhanda a bhaineann le topaicí, lenár nGraf Achoimre ilchineálach atá beartaithe. Déantar spleáchais áitiúla, a shealbhaíonn éifeachtaí mothúchánacha gearrthéarmacha idir chainteanna comharsanacha, a instealladh tuilleadh trí Ghraf Comhiomlánaithe chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar na difríochtaí caolchúiseacha idir nathanna ina bhfuil frásaí mothúchánacha. Tá an dá chéim de thátal graif nasctha go docht chun tuiscint chuimsitheach a fháil ar luaineacht mhothúchánach. Deimhníonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thrí thacar sonraí tagarmharcála an CER éifeachtacht ár múnla molta, a sháraíonn na cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha.', 'hu': 'A beszélgetési érzelmek felismerése (CER) kulcsfontosságú feladat a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában (NLP) széles körű alkalmazásokkal. A CER korábbi munkái általában az érzelmi hatások modellezésére összpontosítanak kizárólag kifejezési szintű jellemzőkkel, kevés figyelmet fordítva a kifejezések közötti szemantikai kapcsolatra. A kifejezések érzelmeket hordoznak, amikor bizonyos témákban érzelmi eseményekre utalnak, és globális szemantikai kapcsolatot biztosítanak a beszélgetés során a kifejezések között. Ebben a munkában egy kétlépcsős Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), amely zökkenőmentesen integrálja a témához kapcsolódó érzelmi kifejezések következtetését és a helyi függőségi érvelést a szomszédos kifejezésekkel szemben globális-helyi módon. A globális témakörrel kapcsolatos érzelmi kapcsolatokat alkotó témakörrel kapcsolatos érzelmi kifejezéseket javasolt heterogén Összefoglalási grafikonunk ismeri fel. A helyi függőségeket, amelyek rövid távú érzelmi hatásokat rögzítenek a szomszédos kifejezések között, tovább fecskendezik az Aggregation Graph segítségével, hogy megkülönböztessék az érzelmi kifejezéseket tartalmazó kifejezések közötti finom különbségeket. A grafikon következtetésének két lépése szorosan összekapcsolódik az érzelmi ingadozások átfogó megértéséhez. Három CER benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények igazolják a javasolt modell hatékonyságát, amely felülmúlja a korszerű megközelítéseket.', 'ka': 'პარაციონალური ემოციონის განაცნობა (CER) არის ჩემი ენერგიის პროცესი (NLP) საშუალო პროცესიაში მნიშვნელოვანი რაოდენობა. პირველი სამუშაო CER-ში მუშაოდ მოდელური ემოციონის შესახებ მხოლოდ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუ ფრაზები წარმოიდგინენ, როდესაც ისინი ემოციონალური მოვლენები განსაკუთრებულ თემენტებით დაკავშირებულია, როდესაც გლობალური სიმენტიკური დაკავშირება საუკ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მუშაობით ორ ფაეჯის სუმპარიზაცია და აგგრეგურაცია გრაფის ინფერენციის ქსელი (SumAggGIN), რომელიც მუშაობით ინტერგურაციას ემოციონალური ფრაზების და ლოკალური დასარგებლობულობის აზრიზაციას, რომე საქმების შესახებ ემოციონალური ფრაზები, რომელიც გლობალური ტემების შესახებ ემოციონალური კავშირებების შესახებ, გვაქვს ჩვენი წინახალი ჰეტეროგენური კომპარიზა ლოკალური დადარჩენებები, რომელიც კიდევ ცხოვრებული ემოციონალური ეფექტის შესახებ შესახებ მზობელი სიტყვების შორის, უფრო მეტად ინექტირებულია Aggregation Graph-ის გამოყენებაში, რომ განს გრაფიკური ინფრენციის ორი ნაწილის შესახებ ძალიან დაკავშირებული ემოციონალური ფლუქტუაციის შესახებ. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები სამი CER ბენქმენმარკური მონაცემების მონაცემების ეფექტიურობა, რომელიც ჩვენი მონაცემებული მოდელის ეფექტიურობა, რომელიც გავაკეთებს', 'el': "Η αναγνώριση συναισθημάτων συνομιλίας (CER) είναι ένα κρίσιμο έργο στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας (NLP) με ευρείες εφαρμογές. Προηγουμένες εργασίες στο CER επικεντρώνονται γενικά στη μοντελοποίηση των επιρροών συναισθημάτων αποκλειστικά με χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο έκφρασης, με ελάχιστη προσοχή να δίνεται στη σημασιολογική σύνδεση μεταξύ των εκφράσεων σε επίπεδο φράσης. Οι φράσεις φέρουν συναισθήματα όταν αναφέρονται σε συναισθηματικά γεγονότα κάτω από ορισμένα θέματα, παρέχοντας μια παγκόσμια σημασιολογική σύνδεση μεταξύ των εκφράσεων καθ' όλη τη διάρκεια της συζήτησης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα δίχως στάδια Δίκτυο Συμπερασμάτων Συνοψίσεων και Συγκεντρωτικών Γραφείων (το οποίο ενσωματώνει απρόσκοπτα συμπεράσματα για συναισθηματικές φράσεις που σχετίζονται με θέματα και την τοπική συλλογιστική εξάρτησης σε γειτονικές εκφράσεις με έναν παγκόσμιο-τοπικό τρόπο. Οι θεματικές συναισθηματικές φράσεις, οι οποίες αποτελούν τις παγκόσμιες θεματικές συναισθηματικές συνδέσεις, αναγνωρίζονται από το προτεινόμενο ετερογενή Γράφημα Συνοψίας. Τοπικές εξαρτήσεις, οι οποίες καταγράφουν βραχυπρόθεσμες συναισθηματικές επιπτώσεις μεταξύ γειτονικών εκφράσεων, εγχέονται περαιτέρω μέσω ενός γραφήματος Συγκέντρωσης για να διακρίνουν τις λεπτές διαφορές μεταξύ των εκφράσεων που περιέχουν συναισθηματικές φράσεις. Τα δύο στάδια της συμπέρασης γραφήματος είναι στενά συνδεδεμένα για μια ολοκληρωμένη κατανόηση της συναισθηματικής διακυμάνσεως. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς επαληθεύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου, το οποίο ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις.", 'it': "Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) è un compito cruciale nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL) con ampie applicazioni. I lavori precedenti in CER generalmente si concentrano sulla modellazione delle influenze emotive esclusivamente con caratteristiche a livello di pronuncia, con poca attenzione rivolta alla connessione semantica a livello di frase tra le espressioni. Le frasi portano sentimenti quando sono riferite a eventi emotivi sotto determinati argomenti, fornendo una connessione semantica globale tra le espressioni durante l'intera conversazione. In questo lavoro, proponiamo una rete di inferenza riassuntiva e aggregativa in due fasi (SumAggGIN), che integra perfettamente l'inferenza per frasi emotive legate agli argomenti e il ragionamento di dipendenza locale sulle parole vicine in modo globale-locale. Le frasi emotive legate all'argomento, che costituiscono le connessioni emotive legate all'argomento globale, sono riconosciute dal nostro grafico di sintesi eterogeneo proposto. Le dipendenze locali, che catturano effetti emotivi a breve termine tra espressioni vicine, vengono ulteriormente iniettate tramite un grafico di aggregazione per distinguere le sottili differenze tra espressioni contenenti frasi emotive. I due passaggi dell'inferenza del grafico sono strettamente accoppiati per una comprensione completa delle fluttuazioni emotive. I risultati sperimentali su tre set di dati di benchmark CER verificano l'efficacia del modello proposto, che supera gli approcci all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Көңіл көңіл көңіл түсіну (CER) деген көңіл қолданбалармен Nature Language Processing (NLP) негізгі тапсырма. Алдыңғы CER жұмыс істеу үшін көпшілікті емоциялық модельдерді тек сөз деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктеріне көмектеседі, сөз деңгейіндегі семантикалық қосылым арасындағы сөздерді Сөздерді бір нақыштар арқылы эмоциялық оқиғаларға сәйкес бергенде, әлемдегі сәйкес арасындағы жүйелік семантикалық қосылым береді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде екі этап тұжырымдамасын және сұрақтау графикалық инференциялық желі (SumAggGIN) жұмыс ішінде ұсынып береміз. Бұл мәселелердің емоциялық сөздері және жергілікті тәуелдік сөздері жалпы-жергілікті түрд Нақыштары бар эмоциялық сөздер, бұл әлемдегі нақыштар мен эмоциялық қосылымдарды құрып тұрады, біздің жетілдірілген гетерогендық тұжырымдық графикасы түсініп тұрады. Жергілікті тәуелдіктері, көңіл сөздерінің арасындағы қысқа уақыт эмоциялық эффекттерін түсіру үшін Емоциялық сөздердің арасындағы көңіл айырмашылығын түсіру үшін Aggregation графика арқылы Графикалық инференцияның екі қадамы эмоциялық жылдамдығын толық түсіндіру үшін біріктірілген. Үш CER бағдарламалардың эксперименталық нәтижелері қолданылған моделіміздің эффективнігін тексереді. Бұл өзіміздің күйінің жағдайларына көмектесілігін тексереді.', 'lt': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) yra labai svarbi gamtos kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) su plataus masto taikymo sritimi užduotis. Prior works in CER generally focus on modeling emotion influences solely with utterance-level features, with little attention paid on phrase-level semantic connection between utterances.  Šios frazės reiškia jausmus, kai kalbama apie emocinius įvykius tam tikromis temomis, suteikiant pasaulinį semantinį ryšį tarp žodžių per visą pokalbį. Šiame darbe siūlome dviejų etapų apibendrinimo ir agregacijos grafinių nuorodų tinklą (SumAggGIN), kuris nuosekliai integruoja su tema susijusių emocinių frazių išvadas ir vietos priklausomybės pagrindimą nuo kaimyninių frazių pasauliniu ir vietos mastu. Su tema susijusios emocinės frazės, kurios sudaro su tema susijusias pasaulines emocines jungtis, pripažįstamos mūsų siūlomu heterogeniniu santraukos grafiku. Vietinės priklausomybės, kuriose gaunamas trumpalaikis emocinis poveikis kaimyniniams žodžiams, papildomai švirkščiamos per Aggregacijos grafiką, siekiant išskirti subtilus skirtumus tarp žodžių, kuriuose yra emocinių frazių. Dvi grafikos išvados etapai yra glaudžiai susieti, kad būtų visapusiškai suprantami emociniai svyravimai. Eksperimentiniai trijų CER lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių rezultatai tikrina mūsų siūlomo modelio veiksmingumą, kuris viršija naujausius metodus.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Emosi Perbualan (CER) adalah tugas penting dalam Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP) dengan aplikasi luas. Prior works in CER generally focus on modeling emotion influences solely with utterance-level features, with little attention paid on phrase-level semantic connection between utterances.  Frasa membawa perasaan apabila mereka merujuk kepada peristiwa emosional di bawah topik tertentu, menyediakan sambungan semantik global antara ungkapan sepanjang keseluruhan perbualan. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan Jaringan Inferensi Graf Aggregation (SumAggGIN) dua tahap, yang secara terus mengintegrasikan kesimpulan untuk frasa emosional berkaitan dengan topik dan alasan dependensi setempat atas ungkapan-ungkapan tetangga dalam cara global-to-local. Frasa emosional berkaitan topik, yang membentuk sambungan emosional berkaitan topik global, dikenali oleh Graf Penapisan heterogeni yang kami cadangkan. Dependensi setempat, yang menangkap kesan emosional jangka pendek diantara ungkapan-ungkapan tetangga, ditambah lagi melalui Graf Aggregation untuk membezakan perbezaan halus diantara ungkapan-ungkapan yang mengandungi frasa emosional. Dua langkah dari kesimpulan graf terpasang dengan ketat untuk memahami secara keseluruhan fluktuasi emosional. Keputusan percubaan pada tiga set data benchmark CER mengesahkan kegunaan model kami yang diusulkan, yang melebihi pendekatan terbaik.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d (NLP) വിശാലമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുമായി സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലി സിഎരില്\u200d മുമ്പ് ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നത് സാധാരണ വാക്ക്-നില വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ മാത്രമേ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ. വാക്ക വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചില വിഷയങ്ങളുടെ കീഴില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d സങ്കല്\u200dപിക്കുന്നു. സംസാരം മുഴുവന്\u200d മുഴുവന ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജിലെ വികാരങ്ങളും ഗ്രാഗ്രാഫ് ഇന്\u200dഫെരെന്\u200dസ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലോക വിഷയത്തില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലോകത്തിലുള്ള വിഷയത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദ Local dependencies, which captures short-term emotional effects between neighbouring utterances, are further injected via an Aggregation Graph to distinguish the subtle differences between utterances containing emotional phrases.  ഗ്രാഫ് അപകടത്തിന്റെ രണ്ടു ചുവടുകള്\u200d മുറുകെപ്പിടിച്ച് ഇണക്കിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വികാരപ്രശ മൂന്നു സിഎര്\u200d ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമായ ഫല', 'mt': 'Ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Emożizzjoni Konversazzjonali (CER) huwa kompitu kruċjali fl-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali (NLP) b’applikazzjonijiet wiesgħa. Ix-xogħlijiet preċedenti fis-CER ġeneralment jiffokaw fuq l-immudellar tal-influwenzi emozzjonali biss b’karatteristiċi fil-livell ta’ utteranza, b’ftit attenzjoni mogħtija fuq konnessjoni semantika fil-livell ta’ frażi bejn l-utteranzi. Il-frażijiet iġorru s-sentimenti meta jiġu riferiti għal avvenimenti emozzjonali taħt ċerti suġġetti, li jipprovdu konnessjoni semantika globali bejn l-istqarrijiet matul il-konverżjoni kollha. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu Netwerk ta’ Inferenza fil-Grafiki ta’ Sommarju u Aggregazzjoni f’żewġ stadji (SumAggGIN), li jintegra mingħajr xkiel l-inferenza għall-frażijiet emozzjonali relatati mas-suġġett u r-raġunament tad-dipendenza lokali fuq l-istqarrijiet tal-viċinat b’mod globali għal lokali. Frażijiet emozzjonali relatati mat-tema, li jikkostitwixxu konnessjonijiet emozzjonali globali relatati mat-tema, huma rikonoxxuti mill-Grafika ta’ Sommarju eteroġenu proposta tagħna. Id-dipendenzi lokali, li jaqbdu effetti emozzjonali fuq medda qasira ta’ żmien bejn l-istqarrijiet tal-viċinat, jiġu injettati aktar permezz ta’ Grafika ta’ Aggregazzjoni biex jiddistingwu d-differenzi subtili bejn l-istqarrijiet li fihom frażijiet emozzjonali. The two steps of graph inference are tightly-coupled for a comprehensively understanding of emotional fluctuation.  Riżultati sperimentali fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza CER jivverifikaw l-effettività tal-mudell propost tagħna, li jwassal għal approċċi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Хариулт мэдрэмжүүдийн танилцуулалт (CER) бол байгалийн хэл Процессорын (NLP) олон программын чухал ажил юм. Эхний CER-д ажиллаж байгаа зүйл бол сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварын төвшинд зөвхөн хэмжээний чадвартай нөлөөлдөг зүйлсийг анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Ямар нэг сэдэв дотор сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үйл явдлын тухай мэдрэмжүүдийг дамжуулах үед илтгэл хөдлөлийн холбоотой болно. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид хоёр дахь хэмжээний нийтлэл болон агрегацийн график Inference Network (SumAggGIN) гэдэгт санал болгож байна. Энэ нь дэлхий-нутгийн хэлбэрээс хамааралтай сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрүүдийн халдвар, орчин нутгийн хамааралтай хамааралтай хэлбэрүүдийг дэлхий Дэлхийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн холбоотой сэтгэл хөдлөлийн холбоотой сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрүүд бидний санал болгосон heterogeneous Summarization Graph-ээр танилцдаг. Хэргийн хэлэлцээний хоорондын богино хугацааны сэтгэл хөдлөлийн нөлөөг авч буй орчин нутгийн хамаарал нь Aggregation Graph-ээс илүү нэмэгдүүлж сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлэлцээний хоорондын дорой ялгааг ялгах гэсэн үг юм. График халдварын хоёр алхам нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн өөрчлөлтийг бүрэн ойлгохын тулд холбоотой. Гурван ЦЭР банк өгөгдлийн сангийн 3 туршилтын үр дүнг бидний санал болгон загварын үр дүнтэй байдлыг шалгаж чаддаг. Энэ нь урлагийн байдлын тусламжтайгаа илүү үр дүнтэй.', 'no': 'Samtale følelseskjenning (CER) er eit viktig oppgåve i naturspråk- handsaming (NLP) med breidde program. Førre arbeidar i CER generelt fokuserer på modellering av emosjonar påvirkar berre med uttalenivåfunksjonar, med liten oppmerksomhet betalt på semantisk tilkopling mellom uttaler. Fraser inneheld følelser når dei vert referert til emosjonelle hendingar under nokre emne, og tilbyr eit globalt semantisk tilkopling mellom uttaler i heile samtalen. I denne arbeida foreslår vi eit to stadig samandringa og samgregation grafikkInference Nettverk (SumAggGIN), som integrerer infeksjon for emosjonelle frasar og lokale avhengighetsredeksjon over nabolar i eit globalt til lokal måte. Emotiske fraser som er gjennomsiktige med emne, som opprettar den globale temarelaterte emosjonelle tilkoplingane, er gjenkjente av vår foreslått heterogenesk samandrasjonsgraf. Lokale avhengighet, som får kortårleg emosjonelle effektar mellom nærmeste uttrykk, blir injisert meir via ein Aggregation Graph for å distisera subtile forskjeller mellom uttrykk som inneheld emosjonelle fraser. Dei to stegane av grafikkinfeksjonen er styrke kopla til ein komplett forståelse av emosjonell flukt. Eksperimentale resultat på tre CER-benchmarkdatasett kontrollerer effektiviteten av vår foreslått modell, som utfører tilstanden til kunsten.', 'mk': 'Конверзационално препознавање на емоции (CER) е клучна задача во процесот на природен јазик (NLP) со широки апликации. Претходните дела во ЦЕР генерално се фокусираат на моделирање на емоционалните влијанија само со карактеристики на ниво на изразување, со мало внимание на семантичната врска на ниво на фрази помеѓу изразувањата. Фразите носат чувства кога се однесуваат на емоционални настани под одредени теми, обезбедувајќи глобална семантична врска помеѓу изразите низ целиот разговор. In this work, we propose a two-stage Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), which seamlessly integrates inference for topic-related emotional phrases and local dependency reasoning over neighbouring utterances in a global-to-local fashion.  Емоционалните фрази поврзани со темата, кои ги сочинуваат глобалните емоционални врски поврзани со темата, се признаваат од нашиот предложен хетероген график за резултати. Локалните зависности, кои ги прифаќаат краткорочните емоционални ефекти помеѓу соседните изрази, се инјектираат понатаму преку Граф на агрегација за да се разликуваат суптилните разлики помеѓу изразите кои содржат емоционални фрази. Двајцата чекори од графската конференција се цврсто поврзани за сеопфатно разбирање на емоционалните движења. Експерименталните резултати на трите компјутери на податоци од ЦЕР ја потврдуваат ефикасноста на нашиот предложен модел, кој ги надминува најсовремените пристапи.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie emocji konwersacyjnych (CER) jest kluczowym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego (NLP) z szerokimi zastosowaniami. Poprzednie prace w CER zazwyczaj koncentrują się na modelowaniu wpływów emocji wyłącznie za pomocą cech na poziomie wypowiedzi, z małą uwagą zwracano na semantyczny związek między wypowiedziami na poziomie fraz. Wyrażenia noszą sentymenty, gdy odnoszą się do wydarzeń emocjonalnych w określonych tematach, zapewniając globalny semantyczny związek między wypowiedziami w trakcie całej rozmowy. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy dwustopniową sieć wykresów sumaryzacji i agregacji (SumAggGIN), która bezproblemowo integruje wnioskowanie dla tematycznych fraz emocjonalnych oraz rozumowanie lokalne zależności od sąsiednich wypowiedzi w sposób globalny-lokalny. Tematyczne frazy emocjonalne, które stanowią globalne związki emocjonalne związane z tematem, są rozpoznawane przez nasz proponowany heterogeniczny Wykres Podsumowania. Lokalne zależności, które uwzględniają krótkoterminowe efekty emocjonalne między sąsiadującymi wypowiedziami, są dodatkowo wstrzykiwane za pomocą wykresu agregacji, aby odróżnić subtelne różnice między wypowiedziami zawierającymi zwroty emocjonalne. Dwa etapy wnioskowania wykresu są ściśle połączone, aby kompleksowe zrozumienie wahań emocjonalnych. Wyniki eksperymentalne na trzech zbiorach danych referencyjnych CER potwierdzają skuteczność proponowanego modelu, który przewyższa najnowocześniejsze podejścia.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea emoțiilor conversaționale (CER) este o sarcină crucială în procesarea limbajului natural (PNL) cu aplicații largi. Lucrările anterioare din CER se concentrează în general pe modelarea influențelor emoționale numai cu caracteristici la nivel de pronunțare, cu puțină atenție acordată conexiunii semantice la nivel de frază între pronunțări. Frazele poartă sentimente atunci când se referă la evenimente emoționale în anumite subiecte, oferind o conexiune semantică globală între pronunțări pe parcursul întregii conversații. În această lucrare, propunem o rețea de inferență a graficului de sinteză și agregare în două etape (SumAggGIN), care integrează fără probleme inferența pentru frazele emoționale legate de subiect și raționamentul de dependență locală asupra pronunțărilor vecine într-o manieră globală-locală. Frazele emoționale legate de subiect, care constituie conexiunile emoționale globale legate de subiect, sunt recunoscute de graficul nostru eterogen de sinteză propus. Dependențele locale, care captează efecte emoționale pe termen scurt între expresiile vecine, sunt injectate în continuare printr-un grafic de agregare pentru a distinge diferențele subtile dintre expresiile care conțin expresii emoționale. Cei doi pași ai inferenței grafice sunt strâns cuplați pentru o înțelegere cuprinzătoare a fluctuației emoționale. Rezultatele experimentale pe trei seturi de date de referință CER verifică eficacitatea modelului propus, care depășește abordările de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Razgovorno priznanje emocija (CER) je ključni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP) sa širom aplikacijom. Prije poslova u CER-u uglavnom se fokusiraju na modeliranje emocija utječe na samo sa karakteristikama na nivou govora, sa malo pažnje na semantičku vezu na nivou fraze između govora. Fraze nose osjećaje kada se odnose na emocionalne događaje pod određenim temama, pružajući globalnu semantičku vezu između govora tokom cijelog razgovora. U ovom poslu predlažemo sažetak i agregacionu mrežu Grafa Inferencije (SumAggGIN), koja bezvezno integriše infekciju emocionalnih fraza povezanih s temom i lokalne rasprave ovisnosti o susjednim izrazima na globalni do lokalni način. emocionalne rečenice vezane za temu, koje predstavljaju globalne emocionalne veze s temama, prepoznaju naš predloženi heterogeneski graf za sažetak. Lokalne zavisnosti, koje uključuju kratkoročne emocionalne učinke između susednih govora, dalje su injekcije putem Aggregacionog grafika kako bi razlikovali suptilne razlike između govora koje sadrže emocionalne rečenice. Dva koraka infekcije grafika su čvrsto povezani za kompletno razumevanje emocionalne fluktuacije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri baze podataka CER-a potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog modela, koji je nadmašio pristupe države umjetnosti.', 'si': 'සංවාදය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය (NLP) විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය (CER) තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නය වැඩක්. CER වල ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩ කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිතාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඔවුන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ස්ථානය සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ Aggregation Graph Inferne Network ක් (SumAggGIN), ඒක සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ස්ථ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදිය ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක්, සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවක් අතර සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවක් අතර අතර සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවක් අතර සම්පූර් ග්\u200dරාෆ් පරීක්ෂණයේ පැත්තක් දෙකක් හරියට සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් තේරුම් ගන්න. CER බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) är en viktig uppgift inom Natural Language Processing (NLP) med breda tillämpningar. Tidigare arbeten i CER fokuserar generellt på att modellera emotionella influenser enbart med yttringsnivåfunktioner, med liten uppmärksamhet på frasnivå semantisk koppling mellan yttringar. Fraser bär känslor när de hänvisas till känslomässiga händelser under vissa ämnen, vilket ger en global semantisk koppling mellan uttalanden under hela konversationen. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett tvåstegs Summarisation and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), som sömlöst integrerar slutsatser för ämnesrelaterade emotionella fraser och lokalt beroenderesonemang över närliggande uttalanden på ett globalt till lokalt sätt. Ämnesrelaterade känslomässiga fraser, som utgör de globala ämnesrelaterade känslomässiga kopplingarna, erkänns av vår föreslagna heterogena summeringsgraf. Lokala beroenden, som fångar kortsiktiga känslomässiga effekter mellan angränsande yttranden, injiceras ytterligare via en Aggregation Graph för att skilja de subtila skillnaderna mellan yttranden som innehåller känslomässiga fraser. De två stegen för grafinferens är tätt kopplade för en omfattande förståelse av emotionell fluktuation. Experimentella resultat på tre referensuppsättningar för CER verifierar effektiviteten hos vår föreslagna modell, som överträffar de senaste tillvägagångssätten.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xasaradda (CER) waa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku qoran baaritaanka afka asalka ah (NLP) oo codsiyada kala duduwan. Sida caadiga ah CER waxey ku kalsoonaan karaan sameynta fikradda, waxayna saameyn ku yeelan karaan heerka hadalka, islamarkaasna aad looga jeedo xiriirka heerka semantika ee hadalka dhexdooda. Erayadu waxay leedahay fekero, marka loo sheegayo dhacdooyin emotixaan la xiriira arrimaha qaarkood, kaas oo ka sameynaya xiriir caalami ah oo ku dhexeeya hadallada oo dhan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda ku saabsan dhamaanka iyo qabsashada arimaha iskuulka ah (SumAggGIN), taas oo si caadi ah u qabsada dhibaatada ku saabsan hadalka emotional iyo ku saabsan hadallada deriskiisa si caalamiga ah ama degmada. Hadalka la xiriira emotional ee la xiriira, kaas oo ah xiriirka emotional ee caalamiga ah, waxaa lagu aqoonsan karo Graph la soo jeeday dhamaystirka xiliga. Saamaynta deegaanka ah, oo qabsaday saameyn ku saabsan hadalka deriska ah, waxaa kaloo lagu sawiraa qoraal kale si uu u kala soocaa kala duwanaanshaha hadalka ku qoran hadalka emotional ah. Labada tallaabo oo cudurada aragtidu ay isku xiran yihiin si aad u garan karto qalabka hissiga. Imtixaanka waxaa ka mid ah saddex xafiisyo oo lagu xaqiijiyey sameynta sameynta qaababka farshaxanka.', 'ur': 'تبلیغ احساسات پتچانی (CER) کی توریخ زبان پرسس (NLP) میں ایک ضروری کام ہے۔ CER میں پہلے کام صرف کلمات سطح کے متعلق موڈلینگ احساسات پر مشکل کرتا ہے، کلمات کے درمیان کم توجه کے ساتھ کلمات سطح کے متعلق کم توجه کرتا ہے. کلمات کے درمیان کلمات کے درمیان کلمات کے درمیان ایک سراسر سیمنٹی اتصال کے ذریعہ ان کے ذریعے احساساتی اتصال کی جاتی ہیں۔ اس کام میں ہم ایک دومرحلہ جمع کرنا اور گراف انفارنس نیٹورک (SumAggGIN) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جسے موضوع کے متعلق احساسات فریزوں اور محلی اعتماد کے مطابق مشکل کے ذریعہ ایک گلوب-لوکال طریقے سے مشکل کرتا ہے۔ موضوع کے معاملہ میں احساساتی عبارت، جو گلوب ٹوپ کے معاملہ میں احساساتی اتصال ہیں، ہماری پیشنهاد کی مختلف جمع کرنا گراف سے پہچان لیا جاتا ہے. محلی اعتباری، جو آس پاس کی باتوں کے درمیان کوتاہ مدت تک احساساتی اثرات پکڑتی ہے، اس سے زیادہ ایک گراگریگان گراف کے ذریعہ تغییر کیا جاتا ہے کہ احساساتی فرشتوں کے درمیان کم تغییر اختلاف کرے۔ گراف کے دو قدموں کی بیماری مضبوط طور پر احساساتی تغییرات کے کامل سمجھنے کے لئے جمع کئے جاتے ہیں. تین سیر بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ ثابت کرتا ہے کہ ہمارے پیشنهاد مدل کے مطابقت کی تصدیق کرتی ہے، جو آهنت کے مطابق سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے.', 'ta': 'பேச்சு உணர்வு கையெழுத்தல் (CER) ஒரு முக்கியமான செயல் சிஆரில் முன்னிருப்பு வேலை பொதுவாக மாதிரியும் உணர்வுகளை மாதிரியும் பாதிப்பு மட்டுமே வாக்கி- மட்டத்தின் குணங்களுடன் மட்டுமே  சில தலைப்புகளில் உணர்வு நிகழ்வுகளை குறிப்பிடும் போது சொற்கள் உணர்வுகளை செலுத்துகிறது, முழு உரையாடல் முழுவதும் பேச்சில்  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இரண்டு நிலையில் சுருக்கம் மற்றும் சேர்ப்பு வரையறை முரண்பாடு வலைப்பின்னலை (சும்AggGIN) பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது முறையாக பொருள் தொடர்புடைய உணர்வு சொற்றொடர் பொருள் தொடர்புடைய உணர்வு வாக்கியங்கள், அது பொதுவான பொருள் தொடர்புடைய உணர்வு இணைப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது, நம்முடைய பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட உள்ளார்ந்த சார்புகள், அது அண்டைய சொல்லுக்களுக்கிடையில் சிறிய காலம் உணர்வு விளைவுகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்கிறது, ஒரு கூட்டு வரைபடத்தால் மேலும்  வரைப்படத்தின் பாதிப்பு இரண்டு படி கடுமையாக இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது உணர்வு புரிந்து கொள்ளும் உணர்வு புரியும். மூன்று CER பெங்குரு தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை சரிபார்க்கவும், அது திருப்பப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் விளைவுகளை செய்ய', 'uz': "Name Sensordagi birinchi vazifalar oddiy hissiyalarni modellashga faqat gapirish darajadagi imkoniyatlarni ishlatiladi, gapirar orasidagi semantik bogʻlanishiga juda qisqa muhit yoʻq. So'zlar bir necha mavzuda hissiyotlar hissiyotlarni yuboradi. Bu gapiradigan gapirarning butun gapiradigan gapiruvlar orasidagi umumiy semantik bogʻlanadi. Bu ishda, biz ikki darajada hisoblash va murakkab qilish grafik boshqaruvchisi tarmoq (SumAggGIN) talab qilamiz. Bu muammolar bilan bog'liq emotional imkoniyatlarini va lokal murakkablarini dunyo-lokal usulda murakkab qilish mumkin. Mavzu bilan bogʻliq ma'lumotlar, dunyo mavzu bilan bogʻ'liq bog'liqlari yaratish imkoniyatlarimiz, yaxshi ko'paytuvchilik darajasi yaratiladi. Name Grafik kasalliklarning ikki qadamlari juda juda katta g'oyalari hissiyotni tushunish uchun qo'llangan. Experimental results on three CER benchmark datasets verify the effectiveness of our proposed model, which outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches.", 'vi': 'Thừa nhận cảm xúc đối thoại (lẩn trốn) là nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong Quá trình hóa ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (lẩn trốn) với các ứng dụng rộng. Những tác phẩm trước đây ở trường dữ liệu năng hàm hồ sơ, tập trung vào những ảnh hưởng cảm xúc chỉ với những tính chất cấp phát, với ít sự chú ý về mối liên kết ngữ pháp ở cấp độ cụm từ. Những cụm từ mang cảm xúc khi họ được đề cập đến các sự kiện cảm xúc trong một số chủ đề, cung cấp một sự liên kết văn học to àn cầu giữa các lời nói trong suốt cuộc nói chuyện. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới dữ liệu liên hợp hai giai đoạn (Sum Aggy), mà hoàn to àn hòa nhập kết luận về các cụm từ cảm xúc về chủ đề và suy nghĩ phụ thuộc địa phương về những lời phát biểu xung quanh theo một cách toàn cầu-địa phương. Những cụm từ nhạy cảm theo chủ đề, vốn là kết nối cảm xúc về chủ đề toàn cầu, được xác nhận bởi đồ họa về cuộc gọi khác thường. Các quan hệ phụ thuộc địa phương, nắm bắt hiệu ứng cảm xúc ngắn hạn giữa những phát ngôn xung quanh, được tiêm thêm vào bằng đồ họa trộn để phân biệt sự khác biệt tinh tế giữa những từ cảm xúc. Hai bậc của ngụ ý đồ thị được kết hợp chặt để hiểu hoàn toàn sự bất thường cảm xúc. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên ba bộ dữ liệu số lượng dự phòng để kiểm tra hiệu quả của mô hình đã đề nghị, nó vượt trội các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'da': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) er en afgørende opgave i Natural Language Processing (NLP) med brede anvendelser. Tidligere værker i CER fokuserer generelt på modellering af følelsesmæssige påvirkninger udelukkende med udtalelsesniveau funktioner, med lidt opmærksomhed på semantisk forbindelse mellem udtalelser på sætningsniveau. Sætninger bærer følelser, når de henvises til følelsesmæssige begivenheder under visse emner, hvilket giver en global semantisk forbindelse mellem udtalelser gennem hele samtalen. I dette arbejde foreslår vi et to-trins Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), som problemfrit integrerer konklusion for emnerelaterede følelsesmæssige sætninger og lokal afhængighed ræsonnement over nabolande udtalelser på en global til lokal måde. Emnerelaterede følelsesmæssige sætninger, som udgør de globale emnerelaterede følelsesmæssige forbindelser, anerkendes af vores foreslåede heterogene summariske graf. Lokale afhængigheder, som fanger kortsigtede følelsesmæssige effekter mellem nabolandene udtalelser, injiceres yderligere via en Aggregation Graph for at skelne mellem de subtile forskelle mellem udtalelser, der indeholder følelsesmæssige sætninger. De to trin i grafens inferens er tæt koblet for en omfattende forståelse af følelsesmæssige udsving. Eksperimentelle resultater på tre CER benchmark datasæt bekræfter effektiviteten af vores foreslåede model, som overgår de nyeste metoder.', 'bg': 'Разговорното разпознаване на емоции (ЦЕР) е решаваща задача в обработката на естествения език (НЛП) с широки приложения. Предишни работи в ЦЕР обикновено се фокусират върху моделирането на емоционалните влияния единствено с функции на ниво изказване, като малко внимание се отделя на семантичната връзка на ниво фраза между изказванията. Фразите носят чувства, когато се отнасят до емоционални събития по определени теми, осигурявайки глобална семантична връзка между изказванията през целия разговор. В тази работа предлагаме двуетапна мрежа за обобщаване и агрегация на графики (която безпроблемно интегрира заключения за тематични емоционални фрази и разсъждения за локална зависимост върху съседните изказвания по глобален към местен начин. Тематичните емоционални фрази, които съставляват глобалните тематични емоционални връзки, са признати от предложената ни хетерогенна обобщена графика. Местните зависимости, които улавят краткосрочни емоционални ефекти между съседните изказвания, допълнително се инжектират чрез агрегационна графика, за да се разграничат фините разлики между изказванията, съдържащи емоционални фрази. Двете стъпки на графичното заключение са тясно свързани за цялостно разбиране на емоционалните колебания. Експерименталните резултати на три сравнителни набора данни потвърждават ефективността на предлагания модел, който превъзхожда най-съвременните подходи.', 'nl': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) is een cruciale taak in Natural Language Processing (NLP) met brede toepassingen. Eerdere werken in CER richten zich over het algemeen op het modelleren van emotionele invloeden uitsluitend met uitingsniveaukenmerken, met weinig aandacht voor semantische verbanden tussen uitingen op fraseniveau. Woorden dragen gevoelens wanneer ze worden verwezen naar emotionele gebeurtenissen onder bepaalde onderwerpen, waardoor een globale semantische verbinding tussen uitingen gedurende het hele gesprek ontstaat. In dit werk stellen we een tweetraps Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN) voor, dat naadloos inferentie integreert voor onderwerpen-gerelateerde emotionele frases en lokale afhankelijkheidsredenering over naburige uitingen op een globale-naar-lokale manier. Topic-gerelateerde emotionele zinnen, die de globale topic-gerelateerde emotionele verbindingen vormen, worden herkend door onze voorgestelde heterogene samenvattingsgrafiek. Lokale afhankelijkheden, die korte termijn emotionele effecten tussen naburige uitingen vastlegt, worden verder geïnjecteerd via een Aggregatiegrafiek om de subtiele verschillen tussen uitingen die emotionele zinnen bevatten te onderscheiden. De twee stappen van grafiekinferentie zijn nauw gekoppeld voor een uitgebreid begrip van emotionele fluctuatie. Experimentele resultaten op drie CER benchmarkdatasets bevestigen de effectiviteit van ons voorgestelde model, dat de state-of-the-art benaderingen overtreft.', 'hr': 'Razgovorna priznanja emocija (CER) je ključni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP) s širom aplikacijom. Prije djelovanja CER-a obično se fokusiraju na modeliranje emocija utjecaju samo na karakteristike na razini govora, s malo pažnje na semantičku vezu na razini fraza između izraza. Fraze nose osjećaje kada se odnose na emocionalne događaje u određenim temama, pružajući globalnu semantičku vezu između izraza tijekom cijelog razgovora. U ovom poslu predlažemo sažetak i agregacionu mrežu Grafa Inference Network (SumAggGIN), koja bez obzira integrira infekciju emocionalnih fraza povezanih s temom i lokalne rasprave ovisnosti o susjednim izrazima na globalni do lokalni način. emocionalne rečenice vezane s temom, koje predstavljaju globalne emocionalne veze s temom, prepoznaju naš predloženi heterogeneski graf sažetke. Lokalna zavisnost, koja uključuje kratkoročne emocionalne učinke između susjednih izraza, dodatno se ubrizgava putem Grafa Aggregacije kako bi razlikovala suptilne razlike između izraza koje sadrže emocionalne fraze. Dva koraka infekcije grafa su čvrsto povezani zbog sveobuhvatnog razumijevanja emocionalne fluktuacije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri baze podataka o referenciji CER-a potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog modela, koji je nadmašio pristupe stanja umjetnosti.', 'id': 'Pengenalan Emosi Konversional (CER) adalah tugas penting dalam Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP) dengan aplikasi luas. Pekerjaan sebelumnya di CER secara umum fokus pada model pengaruh emosi hanya dengan ciri-ciri tingkat ucapan, dengan sedikit perhatian dibayar pada koneksi semantis tingkat frasa antara ucapan. Frasa membawa perasaan ketika mereka direferensikan ke peristiwa emosional di bawah topik tertentu, menyediakan koneksi semantis global antara ucapan sepanjang seluruh percakapan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan dua tahap Ringkasan dan Aggregasi Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), yang secara senyap mengintegrasi kesimpulan untuk frasa emosional terkait topik dan alasan ketergantuan lokal atas ucapan tetangga dalam cara global-ke-lokal. Frasa emosional terkait topik, yang membentuk koneksi emosional terkait topik global, dikenal oleh Graf Persingkatan heterogenus yang kami sarankan. Dependensi lokal, yang menangkap efek emosional jangka pendek antara ucapan tetangga, lebih lanjut disuntik melalui Graf Aggregasi untuk membedakan perbedaan halus antara ucapan yang mengandung frasa emosional. Dua langkah dari kesimpulan grafik terhubung dengan ketat untuk memahami secara meliputi fluktuasi emosional. Hasil eksperimental pada tiga set data benchmark CER mengkonfirmasi efektivitas model kami yang diusulkan, yang melebihi pendekatan terbaik.', 'de': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) ist eine wichtige Aufgabe in der Natural Language Processing (NLP) mit breiten Anwendungen. Frühere Arbeiten im CER konzentrieren sich im Allgemeinen auf die Modellierung von Emotionseinflüssen ausschließlich mit Funktionen auf Äußerungsebene, wobei der semantischen Verbindung zwischen Äußerungen auf Phrasenebene wenig Aufmerksamkeit geschenkt wurde. Phrasen tragen Gefühle, wenn sie sich auf emotionale Ereignisse unter bestimmten Themen beziehen und stellen eine globale semantische Verbindung zwischen Äußerungen während des gesamten Gesprächs her. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein zweistufiges Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN) vor, das die Inferenz für themenbezogene emotionale Phrasen und lokales Abhängigkeitsversprechen über benachbarte Äußerungen auf global-lokale Weise nahtlos integriert. Thematische emotionale Phrasen, die die globalen themenbezogenen emotionalen Zusammenhänge bilden, werden in unserem vorgeschlagenen heterogenen Summarisationsgraph erkannt. Lokale Abhängigkeiten, die kurzfristige emotionale Effekte zwischen benachbarten Äußerungen erfassen, werden über ein Aggregationsdiagramm weiter injiziert, um die subtilen Unterschiede zwischen Äußerungen mit emotionalen Phrasen zu unterscheiden. Die beiden Schritte der Grapheninferenz sind eng gekoppelt, um ein umfassendes Verständnis emotionaler Fluktuation zu ermöglichen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an drei CER-Benchmark-Datensätzen bestätigen die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Modells, das die neuesten Ansätze übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa hisia za mazungumzo (CER) ni kazi muhimu katika mchakato wa lugha ya asili (NLP) wenye matumizi mengi. Kazi ya awali inafanya kazi katika Shirika la Serikali la Serikali kwa ujumla linashughulikia kutengeneza hisia za hisia pekee na uthibitisho wa kiwango cha lugha, na kwa kiasi kidogo kinachoonekana kwenye uhusiano wa lugha ya semantic kati ya maneno. Wasimu hubeba hisia pale wanapotajwa kwa matukio ya hisia chini ya mada fulani, na kutoa uhusiano wa kimataifa wa kimataifa kati ya hotuba nzima ya mazungumzo. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza Mtandao wa Kuzungumza na Ujumbe wa Graph ya Uunganishaji (SumAggGIN), ambalo kwa ujumla unaunganisha maambukizi yanayohusiana na maneno yanayohusiana na hisia na kutegemea kwa ajili ya kuongezea hotuba za jirani kwa njia ya dunia-mpaka-local. Neno za hisia zinazohusiana na mada, ambazo zinatengeneza mawasiliano yanayohusiana na mada ya kidunia, zinatambuliwa na Graph ya Ujumbe wa Kimataifa. Mategemeo ya wenyeji, ambayo yanachukua madhara ya hisia ya muda mfupi kati ya maneno ya jirani, yanaingizwa zaidi kupitia Graph ya Kuunganisha ili kutofautisha tofauti tofauti kati ya maneno yenye hisia. Hatua mbili za ugonjwa wa ramani zimewekwa viungo kwa ajili ya kuelewa kwa ujumla wa hali ya hisia. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye taarifa tatu za bendera za Mkurugenzi yanathibitisha ufanisi wa muundo wetu wa pendekezo, ambao unaonyesha mbinu za hali ya sanaa.', 'fa': 'شناسایی احساسات مکالمه (CER) یک کار مهم در پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) با کاربرد گسترده است. کارهای پیشینی در CER عموماً روی نمونه\u200cسازی احساسات فقط با ویژگی\u200cهای سطح سخنرانی تأثیر می\u200cدهد، با توجه کمی روی ارتباط semantic در سطح عبارت بین سخنرانی پرداخته می\u200cشود. جمله\u200cها وقتی به رویدادهای احساساتی تحت موضوع خاص ارائه می\u200cشوند، احساسات را می\u200cبرند، و یک ارتباط طبیعی جهانی بین کلمات\u200cها در تمام مکالمه می\u200cدهند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک شبکه گراف مربوط به جمع کردن و گراف مربوط به دو مرحله (SumAggGIN) که بی\u200cنظیر برای کلمات احساساتی رابطه به عنوان موضوع و دلیل بستگی محلی در مورد کلمات همسایه\u200cها در یک حالت جهانی و محلی را جمع می\u200cکند. جمله\u200cهای احساساتی رابطه به عنوان موضوع، که ارتباطات احساساتی جهانی رابطه به عنوان موضوع جهانی است، توسط گراف جمع\u200cسازی متفاوتی پیشنهاد ما شناخته می\u200cشوند. وابستگی\u200cهای محلی که تاثیرات احساساتی کوتاهی بین سخنرانی\u200cهای همسایه را گرفته می\u200cشود، از طریق یک گراف گروهی برای تفاوت\u200cهای زیبا بین سخنرانی که دارند جمله\u200cهای احساساتی را تفاوت می\u200cدهند. دو قدم آلودگی گراف برای درک کامل از تغییرات احساسی بسته شده است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای سنجیر CER، موثرت مدل پیشنهاد ما را ثابت می\u200cکند، که از نزدیک\u200cهای حالت هنر بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Nusgala Aňlamak (CER) Tibiýal Dil işlemleri (NLP) bilen möhüm zadyr. CER'de öňki işleýän işleri düýpgöter duýgyny modelleýän duýgyny diňe söz derejesi bilen täsirleýär, sözleriň arasynda azajyk üns berilýär. Meýdançalaryň içinde duýgular wajyplary ýagdaýda görkezilýän wagtlar duýgular ýaly duýgular taýýarlaýar, ähli gürrüňde sözleriniň arasynda dünýäpli semantik bir baglaşyk saýlaýar. Bu işde, biz 2-staýan Toplaýyşyk we Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN) arzanlyşyk çykyşyklary we ýerleşdirim baglanyşyklaryň sözlerini dünýä-ýerleşdirim şeklinde üýtgedýäris. Munuň suýdany duýgularyň sözlerimiz, dünýäpli tema ýaly duýgularyň baglaşyklary diýip kabul edilýär. Ýerli baglançlaryň, goňşularyň sözleriniň arasynda gysga wagt duýgymlyk eserlerini täsir edýär, duýgymly sözlerniň aýratynyň astyny tapawutlamak üçin Aggregation grafiki bilen daşyrak injekçi edilýär. Grafyň azajyklygynyň iki adım duýgyş howplygynyň bütin düşünmesi üçin gaty bir ýerleşdirildir. 3 CER etiketli hasaplanjaň netijesi biziň teklip eden nusganymyzyň etkinliýetini barlaýar, bu nusganyň durumynyň ýakynlaşygyny çykarýar.", 'sq': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) is a crucial task in Natural Language Processing (NLP) with wide applications.  Punët e mëparshme në CER përqëndrohen përgjithësisht në modelimin e ndikimeve emocionale vetëm me karakteristika të nivelit të shprehjes, me pak vëmendje të kushtuar në lidhjen semantike të nivelit të frazës midis shprehjeve. Frazat mbajnë ndjenja kur janë referuar në ngjarje emocionale nën disa temë, duke ofruar një lidhje globale semantike midis shprehjeve gjatë gjithë bisedës. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një Rrjet të Inferencës së Grafikës së Përmbledhjes dhe Përmbledhjes (SumAggGIN), i cili integron në mënyrë të pandershme përfundimet për frazat emocionale lidhur me temën dhe arsyetimin e varësisë lokale lidhur me shprehjet fqinjë në një mënyrë globale-lokale. Frazat emocionale të lidhura me temën, që përbëjnë lidhjet emocionale të lidhura me temën globale, janë njohur nga grafiku ynë i propozuar i përmbledhjes heterogjene. Varësitë lokale, që kapin efekte emocionale afat-shkurtër midis shprehjeve fqinjë, injektohen më tej nëpërmjet një Grafi të Aggregimit për të dalluar dallimet subtile midis shprehjeve që përmbajnë fraza emocionale. Dy hapat e përfundimit të grafikut janë të lidhur fort për një kuptim të plotë të fluktuacionit emocional. Rezultatet eksperimentale në tre baza të dhënash CER verifikojnë efektshmërinë e modelit tonë të propozuar, i cili tejkalon metodat më të larta.', 'af': "Gespraakte Emotie Herkenning (CER) is 'n kruipende taak in Natuurlike Taal Verwerking (NLP) met wyde toepassings. Vorige werke in CER gewoonlik fokus op modellering emosies influens net met uitspraak-vlak funksies, met klein aandag gegee op frase-vlak semantiese verbinding tussen uitspraak. Frase dra sentimente wanneer hulle na emosionele gebeurtenis onder sekere onderwerpe verwys word, verskaf 'n globale semantiese verbinding tussen uitspraak in die hele gesprek. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n twee-stadige opsommariseering en sameganjering Grafiese Inferensienetwerk (SumAggGIN), wat selfs integreer inferensie vir onderwerp verwante emosiele frase en plaaslike afhanklikheidsreaksie oor nabiedige uitdrukkings in 'n globale na-plaaslike modus. Onderwerp verwante emosiele frase wat die globale onderwerp verwante emosiele verbindings bestuur, word herken deur ons voorgestelde heterogeneese opsommariseeringsgraf. Plaaslike afhanklikhede, wat kort-tydelike emosionele effekte tussen naaste uitspraak opneem, word verder ingevoer deur 'n Aggregation Graaf om die ondersteunde verskille tussen uitspraak wat emosionele frase bevat. Die twee stappe van graaf inferensie is tig-koppel vir 'n kompleksies verstanding van emosiele fluktuasie. Eksperimentale resultate op drie CER-benchmark datastelle bevestig die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde model, wat die staat van die kunstenaar toegang uitvoer.", 'ko': '회화감정인식(CER)은 자연언어처리(NLP) 중의 중요한 임무로 광범위하게 응용되고 있다.이전의 연구는 주로 감정적 영향의 모델링에 집중되었고 언어 차원의 특징만 고려했고 언어 간의 짧은 언어 차원의 의미 관계에 주목하지 않았다.어떤 화제에서 짧은 말은 정서 사건을 가리키는데 감정을 담고 전체 대화에서 말 사이에 일종의 전 세계적인 의미 관계를 제공한다.이 작업에서 우리는 두 단계의 요약과 집합도 추리망(SUMAGIN)을 제시했다. 이 네트워크는 전체적으로 국부적인 방식으로 주제와 관련된 감정단어의 추리와 인접한 언어의 국부적 의존 추리를 빈틈없이 집적했다.주제 관련 감정 단어는 주제와 관련된 전체적인 감정 관계를 구성하고 우리가 제시한 이구적 요약도는 이런 감정 단어를 식별할 수 있다.부분적인 관련성은 서로 인접한 말 간의 단기적인 감정 효과를 포착하고 집합도를 통해 감정을 포함하는 짧은 말 간의 미세한 차이를 구분한다.정서적 파동을 전면적으로 이해하기 위해 도형 추리의 두 단계는 긴밀하게 결합된다.세 개의 CER 기준 데이터 세트에서의 실험 결과는 우리가 제시한 모델의 유효성을 검증했고 그 성능은 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다.', 'am': 'የአካባቢው ስህተት ማውቀት (CER) በተለየ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ የናብሬካዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ (NLP) የሚያስፈልግ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የፊደል ደረጃዎች በCER ላይ የሚሠራ ምሳሌ ማሳየት በንግግር-ደረጃ ፊቶችን ብቻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ ንግግሮችም በተለዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ በተመለከተ የemotional ጉዳዮች ሲያሳየፉ አቀፍ በሙሉ ንግግር መካከል የዓለም አስተያየት ግንኙነት የሚያደርጉ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የሁለተኛ ደረጃ ማጠቃለያ እና የጉዳይ የፊደል መረብ (SumAggGIN) ማጠቃቀሚያ እና የአካባቢ ቃላትን በዓለምና-local ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚነጋገር የአካባቢ ንግግር እና የአካባቢ ድረ ገጽ እና የአካባቢ ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና አካባቢነት እና አካባቢ አካላትን በመጠቀም እና ለመጠየቅ ጥያቄ እና የጉዳዩ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ግንኙነት የሚያደርገው የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢ ግንኙነት፣ በተዘጋጀው ተቃውሞ ማጠቃለያ ግራፍ ነው፡፡ የአካባቢው ንግግር መካከል የአካባቢ ቃላትን የሚያስከትል የአካባቢ ስህተት ግንኙነትን በሚያሳየው የአካባቢ ግንኙነት ግንኙነት በተለየ እና የemotional ቃላት በሚያሳየው ቃላት መካከል የሚለየውን ጥያቄ ይነክሳሉ፡፡ የሁለቱ እርምጃዎች የግራፍ ውጤት አካባቢ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ የሦስት የኢሜሪል benchmark ዳርተቶችን በመፈተና ውጤቶች የ-የ-አርእስት ግንኙነትን የሚያረጋግጥ የሞዴል ሥርዓታችንን እንዲያረጋግጥ ያረጋግጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'Խոսախոսական զգացմունքների ճանաչելը (CER) շատ կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի մշակույթի մեջ, որն ունի լայն ծրագրեր: Առաջին աշխատանքները CER-ում սովորաբար կենտրոնանում են զգացմունքների ազդեցությունների մոդելավորման վրա միայն արտահայտության մակարդակի առանձնահատկություններով, որտեղ քիչ ուշադրություն է դարձնում արտահայտությունների միջև գտնվող սեմանտիկ կապ Ֆրանսներն ունեն զգացմունքներ, երբ դրանք անվանում են որոշ թեմաների ընթացքում զգացմունքային իրադարձությունների, որոնք տրամադրում են գլոբալ սեմանտիկ կապ արտահայտությունների միջև ամբողջ զրույցի ընթացքում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու փուլում համառոտագրվող և համախմբվող գրաֆիկ ինֆերենցիայի ցանց (SumMaggGN), որը համակարգչաբար ինտեգրում է եզրակացությունը թեմայով կապված էմոցիոնալ արտահայտությունների և տեղական կախվածության մտածողության վերաբերյալ գլոբալ-տեղական ձևով: Թեմայի հետ կապված էմոցիոնալ արտահայտությունները, որոնք կազմում են գլոբալ թեմայի հետ կապված էմոցիոնալ կապերը, ճանաչում են մեր առաջարկած հետերոգեն համառոտագրման գրաֆիկի միջոցով: Տեղական կախվածությունները, որոնք ներկայացնում են հարևան արտահայտությունների միջև կարճ ժամանակահատվածն էմոցիոնալ ազդեցություններ, ավելի շատ ներարտադրվում են Ագրեգացիայի Գրաֆի միջոցով, որպեսզի տարբերակեն հուզական արտահայտություններ պարունակող արտահայտությունները: Գրաֆի երկու աստիճանները խիստ կապված են զգացմունքային շեղումների ընդհանուր հասկացության համար: Experimental results on three CER benchmark datasets verify the effectiveness of our proposed model, which outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches.', 'az': "Qonuşma Emotion Recognition (CER) təbiətli Dil İşləməsi (NLP) ilə geniş proqramlar ilə çox mövcuddur. CER'nin əvvəlki işləri modelləşdirmək hisslərinin yalnız sözlərin seviyyəti ilə təsirlənməsi üzərində, sözlərin arasındakı semantik bağlantıya baxmayaraq çox az pay verilmiş. Bütün məsələlər altında emosiyal olaraq ifadə edildikdə, sözlərin arasında küresel semantik bağlantı verir. Bu işdə, iki fərz Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN) təklif edirik ki, bu məsələlər haqqındakı emosiyal sözlər və yerli bağımlılıq dəyişiklikləri qonşu sözlər barəsində küresel-yerli şəkildə çoxluğu ilə birləşdirir. Qürbəli məsələlərlə bağlı emosiyal bağlantıları olan məsələlərlə bağlı emosiyal frazlar təklif edilmiş heterogenel Summarization Grafi tarafından tanınır. Qonşu sözlərin arasında qısa müddətli emosiyal etkisini tutan yerli bağımlılıqlar daha çox Aggregation Graph vasitəsilə, emosiyal sözlər barəsindəki sözlər arasındakı dəyişiklikləri ayırmaq üçün istifadə edilir. Grafik infeksiyonunun iki adımı duygusal fərqləşməsinin bütün anlaşılması üçün sıxıntılı bir birləşdirilmişdir. Üç CER benchmark veri qurduğu təcrübə etdiyimiz modellərin etkinliğini təsdiqləyir. Bu, sanat vəziyyətinin yaxınlıqlarını üstün edər.", 'bs': 'Razgovorna priznanja emocija (CER) je ključni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP) sa širom aplikacijom. Prije poslova u CER-u uglavnom se fokusiraju na modeliranje emocija utjecaju samo na karakteristike na nivou govora, s malo pažnje na semantičku vezu na nivou fraza između izraza. Fraze nose osjećaje kada se odnose na emocionalne događaje u određenim temama, pružajući globalnu semantičku vezu između izraza u cijelom razgovoru. U ovom poslu predlažemo sažetak i agregacionu mrežu Grafa Inference Network (SumAggGIN), koja bezobzirno integrira infekciju emocionalnih fraza povezanih s temom i lokalne rasprave o zavisnosti o susjednim izrazima na globalni do lokalni način. emocionalne rečenice vezane s temom, koje predstavljaju globalne emocionalne veze s temom, prepoznaju naš predloženi heterogeneski graf za sažetak. Lokalne zavisnosti, koje uključuju kratkoročne emocionalne učinke između susjednih govora, dalje se injiciraju putem Grafa Aggregacije kako bi razlikovali suptilne razlike između izraza koje sadrže emocionalne fraze. Dva koraka infekcije grafa su čvrsto povezani zbog sveobuhvatnog razumijevanja emocionalne fluktuacije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri baze podataka o referenciji CER-a potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog modela, koji nadmašuje pristupe države umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Konverzační rozpoznávání emocí (CER) je klíčovým úkolem v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) s širokými aplikacemi. Předchozí práce v CER se obecně zaměřují na modelování emočních vlivů pouze s vlastnostmi na úrovni výroku, přičemž malá pozornost je věnována sémantické spojení mezi výroky na úrovni fráze. Věty nesou sentimenty, když jsou odkazovány na emocionální události v rámci určitých témat, což poskytuje globální sémantické spojení mezi výroky v průběhu celé konverzace. V této práci navrhujeme dvoustupňovou souhrnnou a agregační grafovou inferenční síť (SumAggGIN), která bezproblémově integruje inferenci pro emoční fráze související s tématem a uvažování lokální závislosti nad sousedními výroky globálně-lokálním způsobem. Emoční fráze související s tématem, které tvoří globální emoční vazby související s tématem, jsou rozpoznány naším navrženým heterogenním grafem shrnutí. Lokální závislosti, které zachycují krátkodobé emoční efekty mezi sousedními výroky, jsou dále vstřikovány prostřednictvím agregačního grafu pro rozlišení jemných rozdílů mezi výroky obsahujícími emoční fráze. Oba kroky grafové inference jsou pevně propojeny pro komplexní pochopení emočních fluktuací. Experimentální výsledky na třech referenčních datových sadách CER ověřují efektivitu našeho navrhovaného modelu, který překonává nejmodernější přístupy.', 'ca': "Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) is a crucial task in Natural Language Processing (NLP) with wide applications.  Els treballs anteriors del CER es centren en modelar les influències emocionals només amb característiques de nivell d'expressió, amb poca atenció prestada a la connexió semàntica de nivell de frases entre expressions. Les frases porten sentiments quan es refereixen a esdeveniments emocionals sota determinats temes, proporcionant una connexió semàntica global entre expressions durant tota la conversa. En aquesta feina, proposem una Rede d'Inferència de Gràfics de Resumen i Aggregació (SumAggGIN), en dos etapes, que integra de manera senzilla la inferència per les frases emocionals relacionades amb el tema i el raonament de la dependencia local sobre les expressions veïnes de manera global a local. Les frases emocionals relacionades amb el tema, que constituen les connexions emocionals globals relacionades amb el tema, són reconegudes pel nostre gràfic de resum heterogene proposat. Les dependencies locals, que capturen efectes emocionals a curt termini entre les expressions veïnes, s'injecten més a través d'un Gràfic d'Aggregació per distingir les subtils diferències entre expressions que contenen frases emocionals. Les dues etapes de la inferència del gràfic estan estretament acoplades per a entendre comprensivament la fluctuació emocional. Experimental results on three CER benchmark datasets verify the effectiveness of our proposed model, which outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches.", 'bn': 'আন্তর্জাতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার (এনএলপি) একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। সিএআরতে প্রাথমিক কাজ সাধারণত ভাষার মাধ্যমে মডেল করার প্রভাব শুধুমাত্র বক্তব্য-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর মনোযোগ প্রভাব ফেলে, যেখানে কথ বাক্ষতিগুলো যখন বিশেষ বিষয়ের নিচে আবেগের ঘটনার কথা উল্লেখ করা হয়, তখন বিশ্বব্যাপী কথোপকথনের মধ্যে সারা কথোপকথনের মধ্যে বিশ্বের এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা দুই পর্যায়ে সামারিজেশন এবং গ্রাফ ইনফারেন্স নেটওয়ার্ক (সামামআগজিন) প্রস্তাব করি, যা সীমিতভাবে বিষয়ের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট আবেগের বাক্য এবং প্রতিবেশী ভাষণের বিষয়ে ব Topic-related emotional phrases, which constitutes the global topic-related emotional connections, are recognized by our proposed heterogeneous Summarization Graph.  স্থানীয় নির্ভর, যা প্রতিবেশীর ভাষার মধ্যে স্বল্প মেয়াদের আবেগের প্রভাব তুলে ধরে, তারা আবেগের কথাগুলোর মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ গ্রাফের আক্রান্ত দুটি পদক্ষেপ কঠোর সাথে জোড়ায় যাচ্ছে আবেগের বিস্ফোরণের ব্যাপারে। প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের কার্যক্রম নিশ্চিত করার পরীক্ষার ফলাফল তিনটি সিএর বেঞ্চার্ক ডাটাসেটের উপর, যা প্রস্তাবিত শিল্পের রাষ্ট্', 'fi': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) on tärkeä tehtävä luonnollisen kielen prosessoinnissa (NLP), jolla on laajat sovellukset. Aiemmat CER:ssä tehdyt työt keskittyvät yleensä emotionaalisten vaikutteiden mallintamiseen yksinomaan lausetason ominaisuuksilla, eikä lauseiden väliseen semanttiseen yhteyteen kiinnitetä juurikaan huomiota. Laukaukset kantavat tunteita, kun niitä viitataan tunnetapahtumiin tietyissä aiheissa, tarjoten globaalin semanttisen yhteyden sanontojen välillä koko keskustelun ajan. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kaksivaiheista Summarization and Aggregation Graph Inference Network (SumAggGIN), joka integroi saumattomasti aiheeseen liittyvien emotionaalisten lauseiden päättelyn ja paikallisen riippuvuuden päättelyn naapurilauseisiin globaalisti paikallisesti. Aiheeseen liittyvät emotionaaliset lauseet, jotka muodostavat maailmanlaajuisia aihekohtaisia emotionaalisia yhteyksiä, tunnistetaan ehdotetussa heterogeenisessä Summarization Graphissa. Paikallisia riippuvuuksia, jotka kuvaavat lähisanomien välisiä lyhytaikaisia emotionaalisia vaikutuksia, injektoidaan edelleen aggregaatiokaavion avulla, jotta voidaan erottaa emotionaalisia lauseita sisältävien sanomien hienovaraiset erot. Graafisen päättelyn kaksi vaihetta ovat tiiviisti sidoksissa tunteiden vaihtelun kokonaisvaltaiseen ymmärtämiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset kolmesta CER-vertailuaineistosta vahvistavat ehdotetun mallin tehokkuuden, joka ylittää uusimmat lähestymistavat.', 'et': 'Vestlusemotsioonide tuvastamine (CER) on oluline ülesanne looduskeele töötlemisel (NLP) laialdaste rakendustega. Varasemad CERi tööd keskenduvad üldiselt emotsioonimõjude modelleerimisele ainult väljendustaseme funktsioonidega, pöörates vähe tähelepanu fraasitaseme semantilisele seosele väljendite vahel. Fraasid kannavad tundeid, kui neid viidatakse emotsionaalsetele sündmustele teatud teemadel, pakkudes globaalset semantilist seost sõnade vahel kogu vestluse vältel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kaheastmelise kokkuvõtte ja agregeerimise graafiku järelduste võrgustiku (SumAggGIN), mis ühendab sujuvalt teemaga seotud emotsionaalsete fraaside järeldused ja kohaliku sõltuvuse arutlused naaberväljendite üle globaalselt kohalikule moel. Teemaga seotud emotsionaalseid fraase, mis moodustavad globaalsed teemaga seotud emotsionaalsed sidemed, tunnustab meie pakutud heterogeenne kokkuvõtlusgraafik. Kohalikke sõltuvusi, mis jäädvustavad lühiajalisi emotsionaalseid mõjusid naaberväljendite vahel, süstitakse edasi agregeerimisgraafiku kaudu, et eristada emotsionaalseid fraase sisaldavate väljendite peeneid erinevusi. Graafiku järelduse kaks etappi on tihedalt seotud emotsionaalsete kõikumiste põhjalikuks mõistmiseks. Kolme CERi võrdlusandmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused kinnitavad meie kavandatud mudeli tõhusust, mis ületab kaasaegseid lähenemisviise.', 'jv': 'Ukungguna Aomosi (SER) bukane mungkun akeh banter kanggo Perusahaan Language Daerahing (NLP) karo aplikasi sing gak wih. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo KER kudu nggawe barang seneng dipunangé supoyo modelo sing luwih apik karo perusahaan-seneng kuwi, nganggo akeh barang nggawe barang kelas-seneng dipunangé terus-seneng kuwi macem kuwi wis ana. Frasa menehi sawar kelas kuwi nggawe akèh dumadhi cara-cara sing rumpén, supoyo barang sematik maneh ning acara sematik maneh ning resmi sak cara-resmi. Nang trabah iki, kita gunakake Samararasan iki-pake lan inggregation Graph Info Network OptionGroup Gambaran lokal Genjer-genjer diunting graf kuwi nggayasar luwih dumateng iki luwih-luwih dumateng akhar. Rejalaké sing paling telu dataset nggawe CeR nggawe bener kang nggawe model sing bisa perusahaan anyar, sing wis ngerasai durung-perusahaan layang-layang.', 'sk': 'Pogovorno prepoznavanje čustev (CER) je ključna naloga v obdelavi naravnega jezika (NLP) s širokimi aplikacijami. Predhodna dela v CER se na splošno osredotočajo na modeliranje čustvenih vplivov izključno s funkcijami na ravni izgovora, pri čemer je malo pozornosti namenjena semantični povezavi med izgovori na ravni fraze. Fraze nosijo čustva, ko se nanašajo na čustvene dogodke pod določenimi temami in zagotavljajo globalno semantično povezavo med izjavami skozi celoten pogovor. V tem delu predlagamo dvostopenjsko mrežo sklepanja grafov povzetkov in agregacij (SumAggGIN), ki brezhibno združuje sklepe za tematske čustvene fraze in razmišljanje o lokalni odvisnosti nad sosednjimi izjavami na globalni in lokalni način. Temsko povezane čustvene fraze, ki predstavljajo globalne tematske čustvene povezave, prepoznava naš predlagan heterogen graf povzetka. Lokalne odvisnosti, ki zajemajo kratkoročne čustvene učinke med sosednjimi izjavami, se nadalje vbrizgajo prek grafa agregiranja, da se razlikujejo subtilne razlike med izjavami, ki vsebujejo čustvene fraze. Dva koraka sklepanja grafov sta tesno povezana za celovito razumevanje čustvenega nihanja. Poskusni rezultati treh referenčnih nizov CER potrjujejo učinkovitost našega predlaganega modela, ki presega najsodobnejše pristope.', 'he': 'Conversational Emotion Recognition (CER) is a crucial task in Natural Language Processing (NLP) with wide applications.  עבודות קודמות ב-CER מתמקדות בדרך כלל על דוגמנית השפעות רגשיות רק עם תכונות רמת מילוי, עם מעט תשומת לב שמוקמת על קשר סמנטי רמת ביטויים. פרסמות נושאות רגשות כאשר הן מתייחסות לאירועים רגשיים תחת נושאים מסוימים, מספקת קשר סמנטי גלובלי בין מילים במהלך כל השיחה. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים רשת רשת רשת רשת רשת רשת גרפים (SumAggGIN) בשתי שלבים, אשר מארגנת באופן בלתי משותף את המצאה למשפטים רגשיים קשורים לנושא והסיבה של תלויה מקומית על מילים שכונות באופן גלובלי למקומי. ביטויים רגשיים קשורים לנושא, שמרכיבים קשרים רגשיים קשורים לנושא הגלובלי, מוכרים על ידי גראפ הסומריזציה הנמצא שלנו. תלויות מקומיות, שמתפסת השפעות רגשיות לטווח קצר בין מילים שכונות, הוזרקו עוד באמצעות Graph Aggregation כדי להבדיל את ההבדלים העדינים בין מילים שמכילים ביטויים רגשיים. שני הצעדים של תוצאת הגרף קשורים לחלוטין להבנה מכילה של השתנות רגשית. תוצאות ניסיוניות על שלושה קבוצות נתונים של CER מאמת את היעילות של המודל המוצע שלנו, אשר מפעיל את גישות המיוחדות ביותר.', 'ha': "Ana sani na Taurar da Haƙĩƙa (CER) yana da muhimu aikin aiki na Taurala da Shirin Ayuka na Naraya (NLP). Primary aiki a cikin CER, yana fanati a kan motsi mai hisãbi, yana yin amfani kawai da haske-zane-zane, kuma bã da saurãre wa haɗi ga maganar-daraja na semantic tsakanin magana kawai. Phrases carry sentiments when they are referred to emotional events under certain topics, providing a global semantic connection between utterances throughout the entire conversation.  A cikin wannan aikin, Munã buɗar da Shirin Sura'awa da Aggregeration Narumun Nazarta ta biyu (SumAggGIN), wanda ke iya haɗa kafaffiyar da magana masu husũma da maɓallin hisia'a da kuma yana da muhimmi a lokacin da ke yi jãyayya a kan maganar jiransa a cikin a duniya-zuwa-lokal. Babu da masu husũma da ƙanni, wanda ke ƙididdige linki na masu husũma na madaidaici, ana gane shi na Grafi na da aka buɗa'anta na tsohon masu tsawo. Danasẽwar lokal, da ke riƙon amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu ƙaranci a tsakanin maganar jiran, za'a yi amfani da wani grafi na Aggregeration, dõmin a rarrabe gauraya tsakanin maganar da ke ƙunsa da magana na hisia. Ana haɗa hanyõyin biyu na kasar kara-grafyuta domin fahimta ta sami'a na fahimta masu hisia'a. Tajararin matsala ta kan data na GNOME na GNOME ta gaskata fikanci na misalin mu da aka buƙata, wanda ke sami tsaro-state-of-the-art.", 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་ནི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་རྟོགས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་ཡུལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལྡན་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ། སྔོན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་དབྱིབས་དབུགས་ཀྱི་སྒོ་རྒྱས་མཐུད་དེ་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན། གནད་དོན་ཤས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཆ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལས་སྐད་ཆ་སྤྲོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོངས་ལ་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་བར ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འདི་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུ་བཅོས་དང་བསྡུ་ཚོད་ཁག་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་། གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་སེམས་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏམ་གླེང་སྟེགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་། རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་དེ་ནི་ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་པར་ཐག་རིང་ཐོག་ཐག་ཏུ་འཇུག་སྲིད། རྣམ་གྲངས་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཐད་ཀར་ཡོད་པ་སྦྱར་ཡོད། CER(benchmark)ཆེན་མཁན་གསུམ་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སུ་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Deconstruct to Reconstruct a Configurable Evaluation Metric for Open-Domain Dialogue Systems', 'fr': "Déconstruction pour reconstruire une métrique d'évaluation configurable pour les systèmes de dialogue de domaine ouvert", 'ar': 'تفكيك لإعادة بناء مقياس تقييم شكلي لأنظمة حوار المجال المفتوح', 'es': 'Deconstruir para reconstruir una métrica de evaluación configurable para sistemas de diálogo de dominio abierto', 'pt': 'Desconstruir para reconstruir uma métrica de avaliação configurável para sistemas de diálogo de domínio aberto', 'ja': 'オープンドメインダイアログシステムの構成可能な評価指標を再構築するには、デコンストラクト', 'zh': '解构以重建开放域对话系统者配评估指标', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन संवाद सिस्टम के लिए एक कॉन्फ़िगर करने योग्य मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक का पुनर्निर्माण करने के लिए Deconstruct', 'ru': 'Деконструирование для восстановления настраиваемой метрики оценки для систем диалога с открытым доменом', 'ga': 'Díthógáil chun Méadracht Measúnaithe Inchumraithe a Athchruthú do Chórais Chomhphlé Fearainn Oscailte', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Ашық- домен диалог жүйелерінің баптаулық оқу метригін қайта құру үшін құрылмасын', 'el': 'Αποκonstruktion για την ανασυγκρότηση ενός ρυθμιζόμενου μέτρου αξιολόγησης για συστήματα διαλόγου ανοικτού τομέα', 'lt': 'Deconstruct to Reconstruct a Configurable Evaluation Metric for Open-Domain Dialogue Systems', 'hu': 'Konfigurálható értékelési metrika újraépítésének dekonstrukciója nyílt tartományos párbeszédrendszerekhez', 'it': 'Decostruzione per ricostruire una metrica di valutazione configurabile per sistemi di dialogo a dominio aperto', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ക്രമീകരിയ്ക്കാവുന്ന Evaluation മെറ്റിക്ക് വീണ്ടും തയ്യാറാക്കുവ', 'ms': 'Deconstruct to Reconstruct a Configurable Evaluation Metric for Open-Domain Dialogue Systems', 'mt': "Dikonstruzzjoni biex tiġi rikostrutta Metrika ta' Evalwazzjoni Konfigurabbli għal Sistemi ta' Djalogu f'Dominju Miftuħ", 'mn': 'Нэг нээлттэй диалог системийн тусламжтай дүгнэлттэй хэмжээсүүдийг дахин бүтээх', 'pl': 'Dekonstrukcja do rekonstrukcji konfigurowalnego metryka oceny dla systemów dialogowych otwartej domeny', 'ro': 'Deconstrucție pentru a reconstrui o metrică de evaluare configurabilă pentru sistemele de dialog open-domain', 'si': 'නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස මීට්\u200dරික්', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'Soo cusboonaysiiya nidaamka diyaarinta ee furan', 'mk': 'Deconstruct to Reconstruct a Configurable Evaluation Metric for Open-Domain Dialogue Systems', 'sv': 'Dekonstruktion för att rekonstruera en konfigurerbar utvärderingsmetod för öppna domändialogsystem', 'ta': 'திறந்த டொமைன் உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளுக்கான வடிவமைக்கக்கூடிய evaluation முறைமையை மீண்டும் உருவாக்க வேண்டும்', 'ur': 'Open Domain Dialog Systems (OpenDomain Dialog Systems) کے لئے ایک قابل ارزش متریک دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کے لئے ناکام کرنا', 'sr': 'Deconstrukcija za rekonstrukciju konfigurabilne metode ocjene za sisteme dialoga otvorenog domena', 'uz': 'Ochiq domen dialogi tizimlari uchun moslash muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi', 'vi': 'Cấu trúc lại cấu hình mô phỏng mô phỏng đánh giá cho hệ thống đối thoại Miền rộng', 'bg': 'Деконструкция за възстановяване на конфигурируема оценка на системи за диалогов диалог с отворен домейн', 'da': 'Dekonstruktion til rekonstruktion af en konfigurerbar evalueringsmetrik for åbne domæner dialogsystemer', 'nl': 'Deconstructie voor het reconstrueren van een configureerbare evaluatiemetriek voor open-domein dialoogsystemen', 'hr': 'Dekonstrukcija za rekonstrukciju sustava otvorenog domena dijaloga', 'fa': 'Name', 'de': 'Dekonstruktion zur Rekonstruktion einer konfigurierbaren Auswertungsmetrik für Open-Domain-Dialogsysteme', 'id': 'Dekonstruksi untuk membangun kembali Metrik Evaluasi yang dapat Dikonfigurasikan untuk Sistem Dialog Domain Buka', 'ko': '개방역 대화 시스템의 설정 가능한 평가 지표를 재구성하기 위해 해체하다', 'sw': 'Imeandaliwa tena Mfumo wa Uchunguzi wa Uchunguzi wa Utawala', 'tr': 'A챌-Domain Dialoog Systemleri 체챌in bir Ta첵첵arlan챌ylyk Metrini Ta첵첵arlamak 체챌in pe첵dalandyrma', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Dekonstrukcioni për të rindërtuar një Metrikë të vlerësimit të konfigurueshëm për Sistemet e Dialogut të Domenit të Hapur', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Բաց բնագավառի հաղորդակցման համակարգերի կարելի է վերականգնել', 'az': 'Açıq-Domain Dialoog Sistemləri üçün Yapılandırılabilir Yapılandırma Metricini Yeni Yapılandırmaq', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের জন্য কনফিগারেবার ইনভায়মেন্ট মেট্রিক পুনরায় নির্মাণ করার জন্য ডিস্ক্রাইক্', 'ca': 'Desconstruir per reconstruir un mètric de valoració configurable dels sistemes de diàleg en domini obert', 'cs': 'Dekonstrukce pro rekonstrukci konfigurovatelné hodnotící metriky pro otevřené dialogové systémy', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni dialoogisüsteemide konfigureeritava hindamismeetri taasstruktureerimine', 'bs': 'Deconstrukcija za rekonstrukciju konfigurabilne metode ocjene za sisteme dialoga otvorenog domena', 'fi': 'Muodosta uudelleen konfiguroitava arviointimittari avoimen verkkotunnuksen dialogijärjestelmille', 'jv': 'Dekontruct to rebut a configurable measurement Metric for Open-domain Dialog System', 'sk': 'Dekonstrukcija za ponovno strukturo nastavljive vrednotenjske meritve za sisteme pogovornega okna odprtega domena', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'Deconstruct to Reconstruct a Configurable Evaluation Metric for Open-Domain Dialogue Systems'}
{'en': 'Many automatic evaluation metrics have been proposed to score the overall quality of a response in open-domain dialogue. Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task. For instance, specificity is mandatory in a food-ordering dialogue task, whereas fluency is preferred in a language-teaching dialogue system. However, existing metrics are not designed to cope with such flexibility. For example, BLEU score fundamentally relies only on word overlapping, whereas BERTScore relies on semantic similarity between reference and candidate response. Thus, they are not guaranteed to capture the required aspects, i.e., specificity. To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups : understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task. We also propose a simple method to composite metrics of each aspect to obtain a single metric called USL-H, which stands for Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy. We demonstrated that USL-H score achieves good correlations with human judgment and maintains its configurability towards different aspects and metrics.', 'pt': 'Muitas métricas de avaliação automática foram propostas para pontuar a qualidade geral de uma resposta no diálogo de domínio aberto. Geralmente, a qualidade geral é composta por vários aspectos, como relevância, especificidade e empatia, e a importância de cada aspecto difere de acordo com a tarefa. Por exemplo, a especificidade é obrigatória em uma tarefa de diálogo de pedidos de alimentos, enquanto a fluência é preferida em um sistema de diálogo de ensino de idiomas. No entanto, as métricas existentes não são projetadas para lidar com essa flexibilidade. Por exemplo, a pontuação BLEU depende fundamentalmente apenas da sobreposição de palavras, enquanto o BERTScore depende da semelhança semântica entre a referência e a resposta do candidato. Assim, eles não são garantidos para capturar os aspectos necessários, ou seja, especificidade. Para projetar uma métrica que seja flexível para uma tarefa, primeiro propomos tornar essas qualidades gerenciáveis agrupando-as em três grupos: compreensibilidade, sensibilidade e simpatia, onde a simpatia é uma combinação de qualidades essenciais para uma tarefa. Também propomos um método simples para compor métricas de cada aspecto para obter uma única métrica chamada USL-H, que significa Compreensibilidade, Sensibilidade e Simpatia na Hierarquia. Demonstramos que a pontuação USL-H alcança boas correlações com o julgamento humano e mantém sua configurabilidade para diferentes aspectos e métricas.', 'es': 'Se han propuesto muchas métricas de evaluación automática para calificar la calidad general de una respuesta en el diálogo de dominio abierto. En general, la calidad general se compone de varios aspectos, como la relevancia, la especificidad y la empatía, y la importancia de cada aspecto difiere según la tarea. Por ejemplo, la especificidad es obligatoria en una tarea de diálogo para pedir comida, mientras que en un sistema de diálogo de enseñanza de idiomas se prefiere la fluidez. Sin embargo, las métricas existentes no están diseñadas para hacer frente a esa flexibilidad. Por ejemplo, la puntuación BLEU se basa fundamentalmente en la superposición de palabras, mientras que BertScore se basa en la similitud semántica entre la respuesta de referencia y la respuesta del candidato. Por lo tanto, no se garantiza que capten los aspectos requeridos, es decir, la especificidad. Para diseñar una métrica que sea flexible para una tarea, primero proponemos hacer que estas cualidades sean manejables agrupándolas en tres grupos: comprensibilidad, sensibilidad y simpatía, donde la simpatía es una combinación de cualidades que son esenciales para una tarea. También proponemos un método simple para combinar métricas de cada aspecto para obtener una única métrica llamada USL-H, que significa Comprensibilidad, Sensibilidad y Simpatía en la Jerarquía. Demostramos que la puntuación USL-H logra buenas correlaciones con el juicio humano y mantiene su capacidad de configuración hacia diferentes aspectos y métricas.', 'fr': "De nombreuses mesures d'évaluation automatiques ont été proposées pour évaluer la qualité globale d'une réponse dans un dialogue de domaine ouvert. En général, la qualité globale comprend divers aspects, tels que la pertinence, la spécificité et l'empathie, et l'importance de chaque aspect varie en fonction de la tâche. Par exemple, la spécificité est obligatoire dans une tâche de dialogue de commande de nourriture, tandis que la maîtrise de la langue est préférée dans un système de dialogue d'enseignement des langues. Cependant, les mesures existantes ne sont pas conçues pour faire face à une telle flexibilité. Par exemple, le score BLEU repose essentiellement uniquement sur le chevauchement de mots, tandis que BertScore repose sur la similitude sémantique entre la référence et la réponse du candidat. Ainsi, il n'est pas garanti qu'ils saisissent les aspects requis, c'est-à-dire la spécificité. Pour concevoir une métrique flexible par rapport à une tâche, nous proposons d'abord de rendre ces qualités gérables en les regroupant en trois groupes\xa0: compréhensibilité, sensibilité et sympathie, où la sympathie est une combinaison de qualités essentielles pour une tâche. Nous proposons également une méthode simple pour composer les métriques de chaque aspect afin d'obtenir une seule métrique appelée USL-H, qui signifie Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy. Nous avons démontré que le score USL-H établit de bonnes corrélations avec le jugement humain et maintient sa configurabilité selon différents aspects et métriques.", 'ar': 'تم اقتراح العديد من مقاييس التقييم التلقائي لتسجيل الجودة الإجمالية للاستجابة في حوار المجال المفتوح. بشكل عام ، تتكون الجودة الشاملة من جوانب مختلفة ، مثل الملاءمة والخصوصية والتعاطف ، وتختلف أهمية كل جانب وفقًا للمهمة. على سبيل المثال ، الخصوصية إلزامية في مهمة حوار ترتيب الطعام ، في حين أن الطلاقة مفضلة في نظام حوار تعليم اللغة. ومع ذلك ، فإن المقاييس الحالية ليست مصممة للتعامل مع هذه المرونة. على سبيل المثال ، تعتمد درجة BLEU بشكل أساسي على تداخل الكلمات فقط ، بينما تعتمد BERTScore على التشابه الدلالي بين المرجع واستجابة المرشح. وبالتالي ، فهي ليست مضمونة لالتقاط الجوانب المطلوبة ، أي الخصوصية. لتصميم مقياس مرن لمهمة ما ، نقترح أولاً جعل هذه الصفات قابلة للإدارة من خلال تجميعها في ثلاث مجموعات: قابلية الفهم ، والعاطفة ، وقابلية الإعجاب ، حيث يكون الإعجاب مزيجًا من الصفات الأساسية للمهمة. نقترح أيضًا طريقة بسيطة لتركيب المقاييس لكل جانب للحصول على مقياس واحد يسمى USL-H ، والذي يرمز إلى القابلية للفهم والحساسية والاحتمال في التسلسل الهرمي. لقد أظهرنا أن درجة USL-H تحقق ارتباطات جيدة مع الحكم البشري وتحافظ على قابليتها للتكوين تجاه الجوانب والمقاييس المختلفة.', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन संवाद में प्रतिक्रिया की समग्र गुणवत्ता को स्कोर करने के लिए कई स्वचालित मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं। आम तौर पर, समग्र गुणवत्ता में विभिन्न पहलुओं को शामिल किया जाता है, जैसे कि प्रासंगिकता, विशिष्टता और सहानुभूति, और प्रत्येक पहलू का महत्व कार्य के अनुसार भिन्न होता है। उदाहरण के लिए, एक खाद्य-आदेश संवाद कार्य में विशिष्टता अनिवार्य है, जबकि भाषा-शिक्षण संवाद प्रणाली में प्रवाह को प्राथमिकता दी जाती है। हालांकि, मौजूदा मैट्रिक्स इस तरह के लचीलेपन का सामना करने के लिए डिज़ाइन नहीं किए गए हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, BLEU स्कोर मूल रूप से केवल शब्द ओवरलैपिंग पर निर्भर करता है, जबकि BERTScore संदर्भ और उम्मीदवार प्रतिक्रिया के बीच शब्दार्थ समानता पर निर्भर करता है। इस प्रकार, उन्हें आवश्यक पहलुओं, अर्थात्, विशिष्टता पर कब्जा करने की गारंटी नहीं दी जाती है। एक मीट्रिक को डिजाइन करने के लिए जो किसी कार्य के लिए लचीला है, हम पहले इन गुणों को तीन समूहों में समूहीकृत करके प्रबंधनीय बनाने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: समझ, समझदारी और पसंद करने की क्षमता, जहां likability गुणों का एक संयोजन है जो किसी कार्य के लिए आवश्यक हैं। हम यूएसएल-एच नामक एक एकल मीट्रिक प्राप्त करने के लिए प्रत्येक पहलू के समग्र मीट्रिक के लिए एक सरल विधि का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो पदानुक्रम में समझ, समझदारी और पसंद करने योग्यता के लिए खड़ा है। हमने प्रदर्शित किया कि यूएसएल-एच स्कोर मानव निर्णय के साथ अच्छे सहसंबंध प्राप्त करता है और विभिन्न पहलुओं और मीट्रिक के प्रति अपनी विन्यास क्षमता को बनाए रखता है।', 'zh': '既多自料指标,以应开域之评分。 凡体质由相关性,特异性与同理心等,而各因其任而不同。 如点餐之于言也,特异性强制性也;其于言也,流利性之于首选也。 然今指标非所以应此灵活性。 如BLEU分数,根本赖于单词重,而BERTScore赖于引应之语义相似性。 故不能保其能得者,特异性也。 为计有灵活性之指标,请分为三组以治之:知性合理性亲和力,亲和力事之组也。 约法以合指标,以得USL-H之指标,层次结构中之可理解性,可感性可亲性也。 吾证USL-H评分与人决有善相关性,而守其异指标之可置性也。', 'ja': 'オープンドメインのダイアログで応答の全体的な品質を評価するために、多くの自動評価指標が提案されています。 一般に、全体的な品質は、関連性、特異性、共感性などの様々な側面で構成されており、各側面の重要性はタスクによって異なります。 例えば、食べ物を注文する対話タスクでは特異性が必須であるが、言語教育対話システムでは流暢性が好まれる。 しかし、既存の指標はそのような柔軟性に対応するようには設計されていません。 たとえば、BLEUスコアは基本的に単語の重複のみに依存していますが、BERTScoreは参照と候補応答の間の意味的な類似性に依存しています。 したがって、それらは、必要な態様、すなわち特異性を取り込むことが保証されない。 タスクに柔軟性のある指標を設計するために、まず、理解力、感性、好感度の3つのグループに分けて、これらの品質を管理可能にすることを提案します。好感度は、タスクに不可欠な品質の組み合わせです。 また、USL - Hと呼ばれる単一の指標を得るために、各態様の指標を複合化する簡単な方法も提案しています。これは、階層における理解可能性、感受性、および好感性を表しています。 USL - Hスコアは、人間の判断と良好な相関関係を達成し、異なる側面と指標に対する構成可能性を維持することを実証しました。', 'ru': 'Для оценки общего качества ответов в рамках открытого диалога было предложено использовать многие автоматические оценочные показатели. Как правило, общее качество состоит из различных аспектов, таких как релевантность, специфичность и сопереживание, и важность каждого аспекта отличается в зависимости от задачи. Например, специфичность является обязательной в задаче диалога по заказу продуктов питания, в то время как беглость предпочтительна в системе диалога по обучению языку. Однако существующие показатели не рассчитаны на такую гибкость. Например, оценка BLEU в основном основывается только на перекрытии слов, в то время как оценка BERTS основывается на семантическом сходстве между ссылкой и ответом кандидата. Таким образом, они не гарантируют отражения требуемых аспектов, т.е. специфичности. Чтобы разработать метрику, которая будет гибкой для задачи, мы сначала предлагаем сделать эти качества управляемыми, сгруппировав их в три группы: понятность, чувствительность и подобие, где подобие - это комбинация качеств, которые необходимы для задачи. Мы также предлагаем простой метод для составления метрик каждого аспекта, чтобы получить одну метрику под названием USL-H, которая обозначает понятность, чувствительность и лайливость в иерархии. Мы продемонстрировали, что балл USL-H хорошо коррелирует с человеческим суждением и сохраняет свою конфигурабельность в отношении различных аспектов и показателей.', 'ga': 'Tá go leor méadracht mheastóireachta uathoibríoch molta chun cáilíocht iomlán freagartha a scóráil in idirphlé fearainn oscailte. Go ginearálta, tá an cháilíocht iomlán comhdhéanta de ghnéithe éagsúla, mar shampla ábharthacht, sainiúlacht, agus comhbhá, agus tá difríocht idir tábhacht gach gné de réir an taisc. Mar shampla, tá sainiúlacht éigeantach i dtasc idirphlé a ordaítear bia, ach is fearr líofacht i gcóras idirphlé teagaisc teanga. Mar sin féin, níl an mhéadracht atá ann cheana deartha chun dul i ngleic le solúbthacht den sórt sin. Mar shampla, braitheann scór BLEU go bunúsach ar fhorluí focal amháin, ach braitheann BERTScore ar chosúlacht shéimeantach idir tagairt agus freagairt an iarrthóra. Mar sin, ní ráthaítear go ngabhfaidh siad na gnéithe riachtanacha, i.e., sainiúlacht. Chun méadrach atá solúbtha do thasc a dhearadh, molaimid ar dtús na tréithe seo a dhéanamh inláimhsithe trí iad a ghrúpáil i dtrí ghrúpa: sothuigtheacht, tuisceana, agus ionchollú, áit arb é atá in inteacht ná meascán de cháilíochtaí atá riachtanach do thasc. Molaimid freisin modh simplí chun méadracht ilchodach a dhéanamh ar gach gné chun méadrach amháin a fháil ar a dtugtar USL-H, a sheasann do Thuisceana, Inbhraiteacht agus Dóchúlacht san Ordlathas. Léiríomar go mbaineann scór USL-H comhghaolta maith amach le breithiúnas an duine agus go gcoimeádann sé a configurability i dtreo gnéithe agus méadracht éagsúla.', 'ka': 'ბევრი ავტომატიკური განსაზღვრების მეტრიკები მოძლევულია, რომ გახსნა დიალოგიში რეაქტის საუკეთესო კავილეტის გასაზღვრება. საერთოდ, უფრო საერთო კალგატი იქნება განსხვავებული აპექტირებისგან, როგორც მნიშვნელობა, განსაკუთრებულობა და ემპატაცია, და ყოველ აპექტირების მნიშვნელობა იქნება რაოდე მაგალითად, განსაკუთრებულობა საჭირო დაწყვეტილების დიალოგის დავალებაში უნდა იყოს, მაგრამ სისტემაში სისტემაში სისტემა საჭირო დაწყვეტილება უნდა იყოს. მაგრამ მსგავსი მეტრიკები არაა განსაზღვრებულია, რომ ამისთვის გრძნობელობას გადაწყენოთ. მაგალითად, BLEU წერტილი ფუნდამეტურად მხოლოდ სიტყვების გადარწმუნება, მაგრამ BERTScore დარწმუნება სენმანტიური განსხვავება რეფერენციის და კანდიდენტის პასუხის შორის. ამიტომ, ისინი არ არის დავარწმუნებული, რომ დაატვირთოთ მოჭირდებული აპექტიკები, თითოეული განსაზღვრება. მეტრიკის შექმნა, რომელიც დავაკეთებელია რაოდენობისთვის, ჩვენ პირველად უნდა გავაკეთებთ ამ კვალეტურებს სამი ჯგუფიში გადავყვანოთ: უცნობიერება, სინცნობიერება და სინცნობიერება, სადაც სინცნობიერებ ჩვენ ასევე უფრო მარტივი მეტრიკის კომპოზიცია ყოველ ადექტის ერთადერთი მეტრიკის მიღება, რომელიც უცნობიერება, სიგრძნობა და სიგრძნობა ჰიერაფეთში იქნება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენეთ, რომ USL-H მონაცემები მიიღება კარგი კორელაციები ადამიანის გადაწყვეტილებით და შეუძლება მისი კონფიგურაციას განსხვავებული ადამიანებისთვის და მე', 'el': 'Έχουν προταθεί πολλές αυτόματες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης για να βαθμολογήσουν τη συνολική ποιότητα μιας απάντησης στον ανοιχτό διάλογο. Γενικά, η συνολική ποιότητα αποτελείται από διάφορες πτυχές, όπως η συνάφεια, η ιδιαιτερότητα και η ενσυναίσθηση, και η σημασία κάθε πτυχής διαφέρει ανάλογα με το έργο. Για παράδειγμα, η εξειδίκευση είναι υποχρεωτική σε μια εργασία διαλόγου παραγγελιών τροφίμων, ενώ η ευχέρεια προτιμάται σε ένα σύστημα διαλόγου διδασκαλίας γλωσσών. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες μετρήσεις δεν έχουν σχεδιαστεί για να αντιμετωπίσουν τέτοια ευελιξία. Για παράδειγμα, η βαθμολογία βασίζεται βασικά μόνο στην επικάλυψη λέξεων, ενώ το BERTScore βασίζεται στη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα μεταξύ αναφοράς και υποψήφιας απόκρισης. Έτσι, δεν είναι εγγυημένα ότι θα συλλάβουν τις απαιτούμενες πτυχές, δηλαδή την ιδιαιτερότητα. Για να σχεδιάσουμε μια μετρική που να είναι ευέλικτη σε μια εργασία, προτείνουμε πρώτα να κάνουμε αυτές τις ιδιότητες διαχειρίσιμες ομαδοποιώντας τις σε τρεις ομάδες: κατανόηση, ευαισθησία και συμπαθητικότητα, όπου η συμπαθητικότητα είναι ένας συνδυασμός χαρακτηριστικών που είναι απαραίτητες για μια εργασία. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια απλή μέθοδο για τη σύνθεση μετρήσεων κάθε πτυχής για να αποκτήσουμε μια ενιαία μετρική που ονομάζεται η οποία αντιπροσωπεύει την κατανόηση, την ευαισθησία και την πιθανότητα στην ιεραρχία. Αποδείξαμε ότι η βαθμολογία επιτυγχάνει καλούς συσχετισμούς με την ανθρώπινη κρίση και διατηρεί τη δυνατότητα διαμόρφωσης του σε διαφορετικές πτυχές και μετρήσεις.', 'hu': 'Számos automatikus értékelési mutatót javasoltak a válasz általános minőségének értékelésére nyílt domain párbeszédben. Általában az általános minőség különböző aspektusokból áll, mint például relevancia, specificitás és empátia, és az egyes aspektusok fontossága a feladat függvényében különbözik. Például az élelmiszerrendelési párbeszéd esetében kötelező a sajátosság, míg a folyékonyság előnyben részesül a nyelvtanítási párbeszédrendszerben. A meglévő mutatókat azonban nem arra tervezték, hogy megbirkózzanak az ilyen rugalmassággal. Például a BLEU pontszám alapvetően csak a szó átfedésére támaszkodik, míg a BERTScore a referencia és a jelölt válasz szemantikai hasonlóságára támaszkodik. Ezért nem garantálják, hogy megragadják a szükséges szempontokat, azaz a sajátosságot. Egy feladathoz rugalmas metrika kialakításához először azt javasoljuk, hogy ezeket a tulajdonságokat kezelhetővé tegyük három csoportba: érthetőség, érzékenység és szerethetőség, ahol a szerethetőség a feladathoz elengedhetetlen tulajdonságok kombinációja. Javasoljuk továbbá egy egyszerű módszert az egyes aspektusok mutatóinak összeállítására, hogy megszerezzük az USL-H nevű metrikát, amely a hierarchiában érthetőség, érzékenység és valószínűség jelentését jelenti. Bemutattuk, hogy az USL-H pontszám jó korrelációt ér el az emberi ítélőképességgel, és fenntartja konfigurálhatóságát a különböző aspektusok és mutatók iránt.', 'it': "Molte metriche di valutazione automatiche sono state proposte per valutare la qualità complessiva di una risposta nel dialogo a dominio aperto. Generalmente, la qualità complessiva è composta da vari aspetti, come la pertinenza, la specificità e l'empatia, e l'importanza di ogni aspetto varia a seconda del compito. Ad esempio, la specificità è obbligatoria in un compito di dialogo per ordinare cibo, mentre la fluidità è preferita in un sistema di dialogo per l'insegnamento delle lingue. Tuttavia, le metriche esistenti non sono progettate per far fronte a tale flessibilità. Ad esempio, il punteggio BLEU si basa fondamentalmente solo sulla sovrapposizione di parole, mentre BERTScore si basa sulla somiglianza semantica tra riferimento e risposta candidata. Pertanto, non sono garantiti per catturare gli aspetti richiesti, cioè la specificità. Per progettare una metrica flessibile a un compito, proponiamo innanzitutto di rendere gestibili queste qualità raggruppandole in tre gruppi: comprensibilità, sensibilità e simpatia, dove la simpatia è una combinazione di qualità essenziali per un compito. Proponiamo anche un metodo semplice per comporre metriche di ogni aspetto per ottenere una singola metrica chiamata USL-H, che sta per Comprensibilità, Sensibilità e Likability in Gerarchia. Abbiamo dimostrato che il punteggio USL-H raggiunge buone correlazioni con il giudizio umano e mantiene la sua configurabilità verso diversi aspetti e metriche.", 'lt': 'Buvo pasiūlyta daug automatinių vertinimo rodiklių, skirtų įvertinti bendrą atsako kokybę atviroje srities dialoge. Apskritai bendra kokybė apima įvairius aspektus, pvz., aktualumą, specifiškumą ir empatiją, ir kiekvieno aspekto svarba skiriasi pagal užduotį. Pavyzdžiui, maisto tvarkymo dialogo užduotyje specifiškumas privalomas, o kalbų mokymo dialogo sistemoje geriau lankstumas. However, existing metrics are not designed to cope with such flexibility.  For example, BLEU score fundamentally relies only on word overlapping, whereas BERTScore relies on semantic similarity between reference and candidate response.  Thus, they are not guaranteed to capture the required aspects, i.e., specificity.  Siekiant sukurti lanksčią užduotį atitinkantį metrinį rodiklį, pirmiausia siūlome, kad šios kokybės būtų valdomos grupuodami jas į tris grupes: supratimą, protingumą ir patikimumą, kur patikimumas yra esminių užduoties kokybių derinys. We also propose a simple method to composite metrics of each aspect to obtain a single metric called USL-H, which stands for Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy.  Mes parodėme, kad USL-H rezultatas gerai koreliuoja su žmogaus vertinimu ir išlaiko jo konfigūravimą skirtingų aspektų ir metrinių rodiklių atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Многу автоматски метрики за проценка се предложени за оценка на целокупниот квалитет на одговорот во дијалогот на отворен домен. Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task.  For instance, specificity is mandatory in a food-ordering dialogue task, whereas fluency is preferred in a language-teaching dialogue system.  Сепак, постоечките метрики не се дизајнирани за да се справат со ваква флексибилност. For example, BLEU score fundamentally relies only on word overlapping, whereas BERTScore relies on semantic similarity between reference and candidate response.  Затоа, тие не се гарантирани да ги зафатат потребните аспекти, т.е. специфичноста. To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups: understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task.  Ние, исто така, предложуваме едноставен метод за композитирање на метриките на секој аспект за да се добие единствена метрика наречена УСЛ-Х, која значи разбирање, чувствителност и веројатност во хиерархијата. We demonstrated that USL-H score achieves good correlations with human judgment and maintains its configurability towards different aspects and metrics.', 'ms': 'Banyak metrik penilaian automatik telah diusulkan untuk skor kualiti keseluruhan balas dalam dialog domain terbuka. Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task.  Contohnya, spesifik adalah wajib dalam tugas dialog pengaturan makanan, manakala keseluruhan dipilih dalam sistem dialog pengajaran bahasa. Namun, metrik yang wujud tidak direka untuk menghadapi fleksibiliti tersebut. Contohnya, skor BLEU pada dasarnya hanya bergantung pada salinan perkataan, sementara BERTScore bergantung pada persamaan semantik antara rujukan dan balasan calon. Oleh itu, mereka tidak dijamin untuk menangkap aspek yang diperlukan, iaitu spesifik. Untuk merancang metrik yang fleksibel untuk tugas, pertama-tama kita cadangkan menjadikan kualiti-kualiti ini boleh dikendalikan dengan mengumpulkan mereka ke dalam tiga kumpulan: pemahaman, kebijaksanaan, dan kesenangan, di mana kesenangan adalah kombinasi kualiti yang penting untuk tugas. Kami juga mengusulkan kaedah sederhana untuk komposit metrik setiap aspek untuk mendapatkan metrik tunggal yang dipanggil USL-H, yang berdiri untuk Pemahaman, Sensibilitas, dan Kemungkinan dalam Hierarki. Kami menunjukkan bahawa skor USL-H mencapai korelasi yang baik dengan penilaian manusia dan menyimpan konfigurasi terhadap aspek dan metrik yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ഡയലോഗില്\u200d ഉള്ള പ്രതികരണത്തിന്റെ മൊത്തം സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ധാരാളം സ്വയം വിലാസപ്രകാരം മെറ Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task.  ഉദാഹരണത്തിനു്, ഭക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചു് നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമാണു്, എന്നാല്\u200d ഭാഷ പഠി എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള മെട്രിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ഇത്തരം ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുടെ കൂടെ നോക്കാന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന് ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി ബിലിയു സ്കോര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുഴുകുന്നതില്\u200d മാത്രമേ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ, ബെര്\u200dട്ടിസ്കോര്\u200d രേഖ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ആവശ്യമുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടാന്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉറപ്പുണ്ടായിട്ടില്ല, അതായത് പ്രത്യേക വിശേഷം. ഒരു ജോലിക്ക് സ്വാഭാവികമുള്ള മെട്രിക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു, അവയെ മൂന്ന് ഗ്രൂപ്പുകളിലേക്ക് കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടുന്നത യുഎസ്\u200cഎല്\u200d-H എന്ന ഒരു മെട്രിക്ക് ലളിതമായ ഒരു രീതിയും കൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിയിലെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയും, സ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, USL-H സ്കോര്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ ന്യായവിധിയുമായി നല്ല ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്ന', 'mn': 'Олон автоматически дүгнэлтийн метрик нь нээлттэй холбооны диалогт хариултын нийтлэг чанарыг тооцоолох санал болсон. Олон төрлийн сайн чанар нь олон асуудлуудаас хамааралтай, тодорхойлолт, нийгэмдэл, харилцааны ач холбоотой, бүх асуудлын чухал нь ажил дээр ялгаатай. Жишээлбэл, тодорхой тодорхойлолт нь хоол захирах диалогын ажил дээр шаардлагатай. Гэхдээ хэл захирах диалогын системд шинжлэх ухаан дуртай. Гэхдээ сууж байгаа метрик нь ийм урсгалыг зохицуулахын тулд зориулагдсан биш. Жишээлбэл, BLEU оноо нь зөвхөн үгийг давхарлахад хамаарч байгаа юм. Гэхдээ BERTScore нь хариулт болон захирагчийн хариултын хоорондох semantic тэнцүү байдал дээр хамаарч байна. Тиймээс тэд шаардлагатай асуудлыг барьж авахын тулд баталгаагүй. Бид ажлын төлөө гишүүмжтэй метрийг загварчлахын тулд эхлээд эдгээр чадварыг гурван бүлгүүдэд хамтдаа нийлүүлж чадна: ойлголт, мэдрэмжтэй, хүсэл чадвар, хүсэл чадвар, ажлын төлөө хамтдаа хүсэл чадваруудын нийлбэр юм. Мөн бид бүх асуудлын метрикийг бүрдүүлэх энгийн арга зам нь USL-H гэдэг нэг метрикийг олж чадна. Энэ нь ойлголттой, мэдрэмжтэй, шинжлэх ухааны төлөөлөл юм. Бид USL-H оноо хүн төрөлхтний шийдвэрлэлтэй сайн холбоотой болон өөр хэлбэрүүд болон метрикийн харьцаатай байдлыг баталж байна.', 'kk': 'Ашылған домен диалогында жауап беру үшін көп автоматты түрде бағалау метрикалары ұсынылды. Жалпы түрлі сапатты әртүрлі аспекттерден, мысалы, маңыздылық, тәуелдік және импаттылық, және әрбір аспектің маңыздылығы тапсырмаға сәйкес айырмайды. Мысалы, келтірілікті таңдау диалог тапсырмасында керек, бірақ тіл оқыту диалог жүйесінде қанықтығы таңдайды. Бірақ барлық метрикалар бұл гибкоттықты қарау үшін құрылмайды. Мысалы, BLEU нәтижесі тек сөздерді қайталау үшін негізделген, бірақ BERTScore сілтеме мен кандидатты жауап арасындағы семантикалық ұқсастығына тәуелді. Бұл үшін олар қажетті аспекттерді түсіруге қамтамасыз етпейді, мысалы, таңдау. Тапсырма үшін гифтикалық метрикасын құру үшін, біріншіден бұл қасиеттерді үш топта бөлу үшін басқаруға мүмкіндік беруге болады: түсініктері, сезімділіктері және қасиеттері, қасиеттері тапсырма үшін қасиеттерді бі Сонымен қатар біз әрбір аспектінің метрикалығын бір-бір USL-H деп аталатын метрикалық түсініктерді, сезімділіктерді және иерархиядағы мүмкіндіктерді құру үшін қарапайым әдісін таңдаймыз. Біз USL-H нәтижесі адамдардың дұрыстығымен жақсы қатынасын жеткізеді және оның баптаулығын түрлі аспекттерге және метрикалық қатынасын сақтайды деп көрсеттік.', 'no': 'Mange automatiske evalueringsmetrikar er foreslått å scorera heile kvaliteten til ein svar i dialogvindauget for opna domene. Generelt er den generelle kvaliteten komprimert av ulike aspektar, slik som relevant, spesifisert og empatisk, og viktigheten for kvar aspekt er ulike etter oppgåva. For eksempel er spesifikasjon obligator i eit dialogoppgåve for mat-ordning, mens flytande er førehandsvis i eit språk-læringsdialogsystem. Men eksisterande metrikar er ikkje designert for å kopla med slike fleksibilitet. For eksempel, BLEU-poeng er grunnleggjande bare på ordoverlapping, mens BERTScore er avhengig av semantisk likning mellom referansen og kandidatsvar. Dei er derfor ikkje garantiert for å henta dei nødvendige aspektane, dvs. spesifikasjonen. For å design ein metrisk som er fleksibel til ei oppgåve, først foreslår vi å gjera desse kvalitetane som kan handterast ved å gruppere dei i tre grupper: forstånad, sensiblens og likebilitet, der likebilitet er ein kombinasjon av kvalitetar som er viktig for ei oppgåve. Vi foreslår også ein enkel metode for å komplisere metrikar av kvar aspekt for å få ein enkel metrisk kalla USL-H, som står for forstånad, følsomhet og likeklikhet i hierarki. Vi demonstrerte at USL-H-poeng oppnår gode korrelasjonar med menneske sprøytebruk og vedlikehald innstillingane til ulike aspektar og metrikar.', 'pl': 'Zaproponowano wiele automatycznych wskaźników oceny, aby ocenić ogólną jakość odpowiedzi w dialogu otwartej domeny. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, ogólna jakość składa się z różnych aspektów, takich jak istotność, specyfika i empatia, a znaczenie każdego aspektu różni się w zależności od zadania. Na przykład specyfika jest obowiązkowa w zadaniu dialogu zamawiającym żywność, natomiast w systemie dialogu nauczania języka preferowana jest płynność. Jednak istniejące wskaźniki nie są przeznaczone do radzenia sobie z taką elastycznością. Na przykład wynik BLEU zasadniczo opiera się tylko na nakładaniu się słów, podczas gdy BERTScore opiera się na semantycznym podobieństwie między odniesieniem a odpowiedzią kandydata. W związku z tym nie gwarantuje się, że uwzględniają one wymagane aspekty, tj. specyfikę. Aby zaprojektować wskaźnik elastyczny dla danego zadania, najpierw proponujemy, aby te cechy były możliwe do zarządzania poprzez grupowanie ich na trzy grupy: zrozumiałość, wrażliwość i sympatię, gdzie sympatia jest połączeniem cech, które są niezbędne dla danego zadania. Proponujemy również prostą metodę składania wskaźników każdego aspektu, aby uzyskać pojedynczą metrykę o nazwie USL-H, która oznacza zrozumiałość, wrażliwość i prawdopodobieństwo w hierarchii. Wykazaliśmy, że wynik USL-H osiąga dobrą korelację z ludzką oceną oraz utrzymuje jego konfigurowalność w odniesieniu do różnych aspektów i wskaźników.', 'mt': 'Many automatic evaluation metrics have been proposed to score the overall quality of a response in open-domain dialogue.  Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task.  For instance, specificity is mandatory in a food-ordering dialogue task, whereas fluency is preferred in a language-teaching dialogue system.  However, existing metrics are not designed to cope with such flexibility.  For example, BLEU score fundamentally relies only on word overlapping, whereas BERTScore relies on semantic similarity between reference and candidate response.  Thus, they are not guaranteed to capture the required aspects, i.e., specificity.  To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups: understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task.  We also propose a simple method to composite metrics of each aspect to obtain a single metric called USL-H, which stands for Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy.  We demonstrated that USL-H score achieves good correlations with human judgment and maintains its configurability towards different aspects and metrics.', 'sr': 'Mnoge automatske procjene metrike su predložene za rezultat ukupne kvalitete odgovora u dijalogu otvorenog domena. Generalno, ukupna kvalitet se sastoji od različitih aspekta, poput relevantnosti, specifičnosti i empatije, i važnost svakog aspekta se razlikuje u skladu sa zadatkom. Na primjer, specifikacija je obavezna u zadatku dijaloga za naređivanje hrane, dok je tekućin a preferirana u sistemu dijaloga za učenje jezika. Međutim, postojeće metrije nisu dizajnirane da se suoči sa takvom fleksibilnošću. Na primjer, BLEU rezultat oslanja se samo na prelapanje reči, dok BERTScore oslanja na semantičku sličnost između referentnih i kandidatskih odgovora. Zato nisu garantirani da uhvate potrebne aspekte, tj. specifičnost. Da bismo dizajnirali metriku koja je fleksibilna za zadatak, prvo predlažemo da se ove kvalitete upravljaju grupiranjem u tri grupe: razumljivost, osetljivost i ljubavnost, gde je ljubavnost kombinacija kvaliteta koja su ključna za zadatak. Takoðe predlažemo jednostavnu metodu za kompoziciranje metrika svakog aspekta da bi dobili jedinu metriku zvanu USL-H, koja predstavlja razumljivost, osetljivost i moguænost u hijerarhiji. Pokazali smo da rezultat USL-H postiže dobre korelacije sa ljudskim presudima i održava svoju konfigurabilnost prema različitim aspektima i metrikama.', 'so': 'Waxaa lagu talo galay in aad qiimeyn karto qaababka ku qoran diyaarinta furan. Inta badan qiimaha dhamaantooda waxaa ku jira dhinacyo kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan xiriir, cayiman, iyo jimicsi, muhiimka dhinac kastana wuxuu ku bedelaa sida shaqada. Tusaale ahaan waxaa ku waajib ah shaqo ku qoran diyaarinta cuntada, iyadoo suurtagalka lagu doortaa nidaamka diyaarinta luuqada. However, existing metrics are not designed to cope with such flexibility.  Tusaale ahaan scorka BLEU waxey ku xiran tahay si aasaasi ah oo kaliya hadalka la xiriira, iyadoo BERTScore wuxuu ku xiran yahay sinnaanta u dhexeeya aragtida iyo jawaabta suurtagarka. Sidaas darteed lama garan karo inay qabsadaan arrimaha loo baahan yahay, tusaale ahaan gaar ah. Si aan u sameyno qaab u fudud shaqada, marka ugu horeysa waxaan ku talo galaynaa in qiimahooda lagu maareeyo si ay u kooxeeyaan saddex kooxood: garashada, fahamka, xilliga iyo sinnaanta, meesha ay ku leedahay isku xiran qiimaha u muhiimsan shaqada. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab fudud oo aan ku sameynno dhinac kasta metric oo la yidhaahdo USL-H, kaas oo u taagan garashada, aragnimada iyo waajibnimada Hierarchy. Waxaannu muujinnay in kooxda USL-H uu gaadho xiriir wanaagsan oo la xiriira xukunka dadka, wuxuuna haystaa awooddiisa qaabilsan xagga dhinaca kala duduwan iyo dhinaca kala duduwan.', 'ro': 'Au fost propuse numeroase măsurători automate de evaluare pentru a puncta calitatea generală a unui răspuns în dialogul pe domeniu deschis. În general, calitatea generală este compusă din diferite aspecte, cum ar fi relevanța, specificitatea și empatia, iar importanța fiecărui aspect diferă în funcție de sarcină. De exemplu, specificitatea este obligatorie într-o sarcină de dialog de comandă alimentară, în timp ce fluența este preferată într-un sistem de dialog de predare a limbilor străine. Cu toate acestea, valorile existente nu sunt concepute pentru a face față unei astfel de flexibilități. De exemplu, scorul BLEU se bazează în mod fundamental doar pe suprapunerea cuvintelor, în timp ce BERTScore se bazează pe similaritatea semantică dintre referință și răspunsul candidat. Astfel, acestea nu sunt garantate să capteze aspectele necesare, și anume specificitatea. Pentru a proiecta o metrică flexibilă pentru o sarcină, propunem mai întâi ca aceste calități să fie gestionabile grupându-le în trei grupe: înțelegere, sensibilitate și simpaticitate, unde simpaticitatea este o combinație de calități esențiale pentru o sarcină. Propunem, de asemenea, o metodă simplă de a compune măsurători ale fiecărui aspect pentru a obține o singură metrică numită USL-H, care vine de la Înțelegere, Sensibilitate și Posibilitate în Ierarhie. Am demonstrat că scorul USL-H atinge corelații bune cu judecata umană și își menține configurabilitatea față de diferite aspecte și metrice.', 'sv': 'Många automatiska utvärderingsmetoder har föreslagits för att poängtera den övergripande kvaliteten på ett svar i öppen domän dialog. Generellt består den övergripande kvaliteten av olika aspekter, såsom relevans, specificitet och empati, och betydelsen av varje aspekt varierar beroende på uppgift. Exempelvis är specificitet obligatorisk i en matbeställningsdialoguppgift, medan flytande är att föredra i ett språkundervisningsdialogsystem. Befintliga mätvärden är dock inte utformade för att klara av sådan flexibilitet. Till exempel bygger BLEU-poäng i grunden endast på överlappning av ord, medan BERTScore bygger på semantisk likhet mellan referens och kandidatsvar. De garanteras således inte att de fångar de nödvändiga aspekterna, dvs. specificiteten. För att utforma ett mått som är flexibelt för en uppgift föreslår vi först att göra dessa egenskaper hanterbara genom att gruppera dem i tre grupper: förståelse, känslighet och sympati, där sympati är en kombination av egenskaper som är väsentliga för en uppgift. Vi föreslår också en enkel metod för att sammanställa mätvärden för varje aspekt för att få ett enda mätvärde som kallas USL-H, som står för Förståelse, Känslighet och Sannolikhet i hierarki. Vi visade att USL-H-poäng uppnår goda korrelationer med mänskligt omdöme och bibehåller sin konfigurerbarhet mot olika aspekter och mått.', 'ur': 'بہت سی سیدھی ارزیابی میٹریک کی پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے کہ کھولنے والی ڈومین ڈالیوں میں ایک جواب کی عمومی کیفیت اسکور کرے۔ عمومی طور پر، عمومی کیفیت مختلف قسموں میں شامل ہوتی ہے، جیسے اضافہ، تعریف، اور شرافت، اور ہر قسم کا اضافہ کام کے مطابق مختلف ہوتا ہے. مثال، تعریف ایک کھانے کے سفارش کے کام میں ضرورت ہے، حالانکہ ایک زبان سکھانے والی диалог سیسٹم میں فائدہ ترجیح دی جاتی ہے. However, existing metrics are not designed to cope with such flexibility. مثال یہ ہے کہ BLEU اسکور صرف کلمات اورلپ پینگ پر اعتماد کرتا ہے، حالانکہ BERTScore منصفات اور منصفات کی جواب کے درمیان سیمانتی سیمانتی پر اعتماد کرتا ہے. اسی طرح ان کو مضبوط نہیں ہے کہ مضبوط طریقے کو پکڑیں۔ ایک متریک طراحی کرنے کے لئے جو ایک کام کے لئے مہربانی ہے، ہم پہلی بار ان کیفیتیوں کو تین گروہوں میں گروپ کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں: سمجھنے کی، سنجیدگی، اور پسندیدگی، جہاں پسندیدگی ایک کام کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ ہم نے بھی ایک ساده طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ ہر قسم کی متریک پیدا کرنے کے لئے USL-H کا ایک متریک حاصل کریں، جو سمجھنے والی، احساساتی اور تحقیقات کے لئے ہے۔ ہم نے دکھایا کہ USL-H اسکور انسان کے فیصلے کے ساتھ بہترین تعلقات حاصل کرتا ہے اور اس کی تعلقات مختلف طریقوں اور متریک کی طرف رکھتا ہے.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්ලේෂණ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200d සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dයය ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතාවට විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතාවක් තියෙනවා, වගේම විශේෂතාවක්, විශේෂතාවක්, සහ සාමාන්\u200d උදාහරණයෙන්, විශේෂතාවය අවශ්\u200dයයි, කෑමක් ක්\u200dරමයක් සංවාදක වැඩේ ඉන්න, ඒත් භාෂාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න සංවාදක නමුත්, තියෙන්නේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක එහෙම විශේෂතාවක් එක්ක පැහැදිලි කරන්න සැලසුම් කරලා න උදාහරණයෙන්, BLUE ස්කෝර් මූලිකයෙන් විතරයි වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි, ඒත් BERTScore ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිච ඉතින්, ඔවුන් අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට අල්ලගන්න අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ, ඉතින්, විශේෂතාවක්. මෙට්\u200dරික් විද්\u200dයාපනයක් විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න, ඔවුන්ව කණ්ඩායම් තුන් කණ්ඩායම් වලි අපි හැම ප්\u200dරකාරයෙක්ම මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක ගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා USL-H කියලා, ඒක තේරුම්ගත්වය, සං අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වුනා USL-H ස්කෝර් හොඳ සම්බන්ධයක් මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසය සමග හොඳ සම්බන්ධයක් ලැබෙනවා', 'ta': 'திறந்த டோமைன் உரையாடலில் ஒரு பதில் மொத்த தரம் மதிப்பை மதிப்பதற்கு பல தானாகவே evaluation முறைகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. பொதுவாக, மொத்த தரம் வேறு பாகங்களின் சேர்ந்துள்ளது, அதாவது தொடர்பு, குறிப்பிட்டு மற்றும் ஊக்கம், மற்றும் ஒவ்வொரு பாகங்களின் முக்கியமு உதாரணத்திற்கு, உணவு வரிசைப்படுத்தும் உரையாடல் செயலில் குறிப்பிட்ட விதிமுறையாகும், ஆனால் விளைவு மொழி பொருள் உரை ஆனால் இருக்கும் மெட்ரிக்கள் இத்தகைய flexibility கொண்டு ஒதுக்கும் போது வடிவமைக்கப்படவில்லை. எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, பிலியு மதிப்பெண்கள் அடிப்படையாக வார்த்தை மேலேற்றுதலை மட்டுமே சார்ந்து இருக்கும், பிரெட்ஸ்கோர் பாதி அதனால், அவர்கள் தேவைப்படும் பாகங்களை பிடிப்பது உறுதிப்படுத்தப்படவில்லை, அதாவது, குறிப்பிட்ட விஷயங்கள். To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups: understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task.  நாம் ஒவ்வொரு பக்கத்திலும் சுலபமான முறைகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்க ஒரு மெட்ரிக் கொண்டு வருவதற்கு முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். அது புரிந்து கொள்ளும், உணர்வு  நாம் USL-H மதிப்பெண்கள் மனித நியாயத்திற்கு நல்ல இணைப்பை பெறுகிறது மற்றும் அதன் வடிவமைப்பை வேறு பாகங்கள் மற்றும் மேட்ரிக', 'vi': 'Nhiều khả năng đánh giá tự động đã được đề nghị đạt được chất lượng tổng thể của một phản ứng trong cuộc đối thoại mở miền. Thông thường, chất lượng tổng thể bao gồm các khía cạnh khác nhau, như liên quan, đặc tính và cảm thông, và tầm quan trọng của mỗi khía cạnh khác nhau tùy thuộc vào nhiệm vụ. Ví dụ, đặc biệt là bắt buộc trong một nhiệm vụ đối thoại gọi thức ăn, trong khi sự khéo léo được ưu tiên trong một hệ thống ngôn ngữ-giảng-dạy. Tuy nhiên, âm lượng đã có không được thiết kế để đối phó với độ linh hoạt. Ví dụ, điểm của NICOU cơ bản chỉ dựa trên sự chồng chéo từ, trong khi than hạch hạch dựa trên điểm giống nhau phân biệt giữa tham khảo và ứng cử viên phản ứng. Chúng không được đảm bảo nắm bắt các khía cạnh cần thiết, tức là đặc biệt. Để thiết kế một thước đo linh hoạt trong một nhiệm vụ, trước tiên chúng tôi đề xuất làm cho những phẩm chất này dễ quản lý bằng cách kết hợp chúng thành ba nhóm: dễ hiểu, nhạy cảm, và dễ nhìn nhận, nơi mà tầm nhìn là sự kết hợp các phẩm chất cần thiết cho một nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi cũng đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản để vẽ các thước đo của mỗi khía cạnh để đạt được một thước đo duy nhất gọi là USL-H, tượng trưng cho khả năng phòng thủ, nhạy cảm, và khả năng sinh tồn trong Hieraduyệt. Chúng tôi đã chứng minh Điểm USL-H đạt kết quả tốt với quyết định con người và duy trì cấu hình của nó về các khía cạnh và đo lường khác nhau.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Umumiy, umumiy sifatida, huddi ma'lumot, hususiyat, qo'shish va qo'shish, va har bir qismining muhimligi vazifaning bir xil tarkibida ajratilgan. For instance, specificity is mandatory in a food-ordering dialogue task, whereas fluency is preferred in a language-teaching dialogue system.  Lekin, mavjud metriklar bunday fleksiblik bilan boshqarish uchun yaratilmaydi. Masalan, BLEU scori asosida faqat so'zni almashtirishga ishlatadi, ammo BERTScore taqdimot va kandida javob orasidagi semantik tenglashga ishlatadi. Шундай қилиб, улар талаб қилинган шахсларни олишга қодир эмас. Ishga qiziqarli metrikni yaratish uchun, biz birinchi marta shu loyihalarni uchta guruhga guruhga guruhlashga boshqarishimizni talab qilamiz: tushunish, hissiylik, va ishga muhim bo'lgan qiymatlarni birlashtiradi. Biz har bir aspektlarni bir metrik olish uchun oddiy usulni boshqaramiz. U Hierarchiya ta'sirlik, sezgarilik va bir qanday bir metrikni olish uchun. Biz odamning xususiyatlariga yaxshi munosabatlarni ko'rsatdik va uning boshqa aspektlarning moslamalarini va metriklarga qaramadi.", 'bg': 'Много автоматични показатели за оценка са предложени, за да се оцени цялостното качество на отговора в диалога с отворен домейн. Като цяло цялостното качество се състои от различни аспекти, като релевантност, специфичност и съпричастност, а значението на всеки аспект се различава в зависимост от задачата. Например специфичността е задължителна при задачата за диалог по поръчка на храна, докато гладкостта се предпочита в системата за диалог между преподаване на езици. Съществуващите показатели обаче не са предназначени да се справят с такава гъвкавост. Например резултатът разчита основно само на припокриване на думите, докато BERTScore разчита на семантично сходство между референтния и кандидат отговор. По този начин те не са гарантирани да обхванат необходимите аспекти, т.е. специфичността. За да създадем метрика, която е гъвкава към дадена задача, първо предлагаме да направим тези качества управляеми, като ги групираме в три групи: разбираемост, чувствителност и харесваемост, където харесваемостта е комбинация от качества, които са от съществено значение за дадена задача. Предлагаме и прост метод за комбиниране на показатели за всеки аспект, за да се получи един показател, наречен който означава разбираемост, чувствителност и вероятност в йерархията. Доказахме, че резултатът постига добри корелации с човешката преценка и поддържа конфигурацията си към различни аспекти и показатели.', 'hr': 'Mnoge automatske procjene metrike su predložene za rezultat ukupne kvalitete odgovora u dijalogu otvorenog domena. Općenito, ukupna kvalitet se sastoji od različitih aspekta, poput relevantnosti, specifičnosti i empatije, te važnost svakog aspekta se razlikuje u skladu s zadatkom. Na primjer, specifikacija je obavezna u zadatku dijaloga za naređenje hrane, dok je fluencija preferirana u sustavu dijaloga za učenje jezika. Međutim, postojeće metrije nisu dizajnirane za rješavanje takve fleksibilnosti. Na primjer, BLEU rezultat oslanja se samo na preklapanje riječi, dok BERTScore oslanja na semantičku sličnost između referentnih i kandidatskih odgovora. Dakle, oni nisu garantirani da uhvate potrebne aspekte, tj. specifičnost. Da bismo dizajnirali metriku koja je fleksibilna za zadatak, prvo predlažemo da se ove kvalitete upravljaju grupiranjem u tri grupe: razumljivost, osjetljivost i ljubavnost, gdje je ljubavnost kombinacija kvaliteta koja su ključna za zadatak. Također predlažemo jednostavnu metodu kompoziciranja metrika svakog aspekta kako bi dobili jedinu metriku zvanu USL-H, koja predstavlja razumljivost, osjetljivost i vjerojatnost u hijerarhiji. Pokazali smo da rezultat USL-H postigne dobre korelacije s ljudskim sudom i održava svoju konfigurabilnost prema različitim aspektima i metrikama.', 'nl': 'Er zijn veel automatische evaluatiestatistieken voorgesteld om de algehele kwaliteit van een reactie in open-domein dialoog te scoren. Over het algemeen bestaat de algehele kwaliteit uit verschillende aspecten, zoals relevantie, specificiteit en empathie, en het belang van elk aspect verschilt naargelang de taak. Zo is specificiteit verplicht bij een voedselbesteldialoog, terwijl vloeiendheid de voorkeur heeft in een taalonderwijsdialoogsysteem. Bestaande statistieken zijn echter niet ontworpen om deze flexibiliteit aan te kunnen. Zo baseert de BLEU score fundamenteel alleen op woordoverlapping, terwijl BERTScore gebaseerd is op semantische gelijkenis tussen referentie en kandidaat respons. Ze zijn dus niet gegarandeerd om de vereiste aspecten, d.w.z. specificiteit, vast te leggen. Om een maatstaf te ontwerpen die flexibel is voor een taak, stellen we eerst voor om deze kwaliteiten beheersbaar te maken door ze te groeperen in drie groepen: begrijpelijkheid, gevoeligheid en sympathiek, waarbij sympathiek een combinatie is van kwaliteiten die essentieel zijn voor een taak. We stellen ook een eenvoudige methode voor om metrics van elk aspect samen te stellen om een enkele metric te verkrijgen genaamd USL-H, wat staat voor Begrijpbaarheid, Gevoeligheid en Likability in Hierarchie. We hebben aangetoond dat de USL-H score goede correlaties bereikt met het menselijk oordeel en de configureerbaarheid behoudt ten opzichte van verschillende aspecten en statistieken.', 'da': 'Mange automatiske evalueringsmålinger er blevet foreslået for at score den overordnede kvalitet af et svar i åbent domæne dialog. Generelt består den overordnede kvalitet af forskellige aspekter, såsom relevans, specificitet og empati, og betydningen af hvert aspekt varierer alt efter opgaven. For eksempel er specificitet obligatorisk i en dialogopgave med madbestilling, mens flydende sprogundervisning foretrækkes i et dialogsystem. Eksisterende målinger er imidlertid ikke designet til at klare en sådan fleksibilitet. For eksempel er BLEU-score fundamentalt kun afhængig af overlapning af ord, mens BERTScore er afhængig af semantisk lighed mellem reference og kandidatsvar. Det er således ikke garanteret, at de indfanger de nødvendige aspekter, dvs. specificitet. For at designe en metric, der er fleksibel til en opgave, foreslår vi først at gøre disse kvaliteter håndterbare ved at gruppere dem i tre grupper: forståelighed, fornuft og sympati, hvor sympati er en kombination af kvaliteter, der er afgørende for en opgave. Vi foreslår også en enkel metode til at sammensætte metrics for hvert aspekt for at opnå en enkelt metric kaldet USL-H, som står for Forståelighed, Sensibility og Likability in Hierarki. Vi demonstrerede, at USL-H score opnår gode korrelationer med menneskelig dømmekraft og fastholder sin konfigurerbarhed over for forskellige aspekter og metrics.', 'de': 'Zahlreiche automatische Bewertungsmetriken wurden vorgeschlagen, um die Gesamtqualität einer Antwort im offenen Dialog zu bewerten. Generell besteht die Gesamtqualität aus verschiedenen Aspekten, wie Relevanz, Spezifität und Empathie, und die Bedeutung jedes Aspektes unterscheidet sich je nach Aufgabenstellung. Beispielsweise ist die Spezifität in einer Dialogaufgabe zur Bestellung von Lebensmitteln obligatorisch, wohingegen in einem Dialogsystem zur Sprachvermittlung flüssige Sprachkenntnisse bevorzugt werden. Bestehende Metriken sind jedoch nicht darauf ausgelegt, diese Flexibilität zu bewältigen. Beispielsweise beruht der BLEU-Score grundsätzlich nur auf der Überschneidung von Wörtern, während BERTScore auf semantischer Ähnlichkeit zwischen Referenz und Kandidatenantwort beruht. Somit ist nicht garantiert, dass sie die erforderlichen Aspekte erfassen, d.h. Spezifität. Um eine Metrik zu entwerfen, die flexibel für eine Aufgabe ist, schlagen wir vor, diese Qualitäten handhabbar zu machen, indem wir sie in drei Gruppen gruppieren: Verständlichkeit, Sensibilität und Sympathie, wobei Sympathie eine Kombination von Qualitäten ist, die für eine Aufgabe unerlässlich sind. Wir schlagen auch eine einfache Methode vor, um Metriken für jeden Aspekt zusammenzusetzen, um eine einzige Metrik namens USL-H zu erhalten, die für Verständlichkeit, Sensibleness und Likability in Hierarchie steht. Wir haben gezeigt, dass der USL-H Score gute Korrelationen mit dem menschlichen Urteilsvermögen erzielt und seine Konfigurierbarkeit gegenüber verschiedenen Aspekten und Metriken beibehält.', 'id': 'Banyak metrik evaluasi otomatis telah diusulkan untuk mencetak kualitas umum respon dalam dialog domain terbuka. Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task.  Contohnya, spesifik adalah wajib dalam tugas dialog memesan makanan, sementara fluency dipilih dalam sistem dialog pengajaran bahasa. Namun, metrik yang ada tidak dirancang untuk mengatasi fleksibilitas seperti itu. For example, BLEU score fundamentally relies only on word overlapping, whereas BERTScore relies on semantic similarity between reference and candidate response.  Jadi, mereka tidak dijamin untuk menangkap aspek yang diperlukan, yaitu spesifik. Untuk merancang metrik yang fleksibel untuk tugas, kita pertama-tama mengusulkan membuat kualitas-kualitas ini dapat dikendalikan dengan mengumpulkan mereka ke tiga kelompok: pemahaman, kebijaksanaan, dan kesenangan, di mana kesenangan adalah kombinasi kualitas yang penting untuk tugas. Kami juga mengusulkan metode sederhana untuk mengumpulkan metrik setiap aspek untuk mendapatkan metrik tunggal bernama USL-H, yang berdiri untuk Pemahaman, Sensibilitas, dan Kemungkinan dalam Hierarki. Kami menunjukkan bahwa skor USL-H mencapai korelasi yang baik dengan penilaian manusia dan mempertahankan konfigurasi terhadap aspek dan metrik yang berbeda.', 'fa': 'بسیاری از متریک\u200cهای ارزیابی خودکار پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند که کیفیت کلی پاسخ در محاورۀ محاورۀ دامنی باز باشد. معمولاً کل کیفیت از نقطه\u200cهای مختلف است، مثل مربوط به تعریف، مشخصت و همدلی، و اهمیت هر نقطه بر اساس وظیفه تفاوت می\u200cکند. برای مثال، مشخصت در یک وظیفه صحبت\u200cبندی غذایی مجبور است، در حالی که fluency در یک سیستم صحبت\u200cبندی\u200cآموزش زبان ترجیح می\u200cدهد. ولی متریک موجود برای حل کردن چنین قابلیت طراحی نیست. به عنوان مثال، امتیاز BLEU اساسا فقط بر روی کلمات تغییر زدن بستگی دارد، در حالی که BERTScore بر روی شباهت semantic بین پاسخ مربوط و کاندیده بستگی دارد. بنابراین، آنها تضمین نیستند که نقطه\u200cهای لازم را بگیرند، یعنی مشخص. برای طراحی یک متریک که برای یک کار flexible است، اول پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که این کیفیت را با گروه کردن آن\u200cها به سه گروه مدیریت کنند: درک\u200cپذیری، احساس\u200cپذیری و لذت\u200cپذیری، جایی که لذت\u200cپذیری یک ترکیب از کیفیت است که برای یک کار مهم است. ما همچنین یک روش ساده برای ترکیب متریک از هر قسمت پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا یک متریک به نام USL-H را دریافت کند که برای درک، حساس و قابلیت در حکومت است. ما نشان دادیم که امتیاز USL-H به ارتباط خوب با حکم انسان رسیده است و قابلیت پیکربندی خود را به عنوان منبع و متریک مختلف نگه می دارد.', 'ko': '많은 자동 평가 지표가 개방역 대화에서 응답의 전체적인 질을 평가하는 데 사용되었다.일반적으로 전체적인 소양은 여러 가지 측면을 포함하는데 예를 들어 관련성, 특이성과 동리심 등은 각 방면의 중요성은 임무에 따라 다르다.예를 들어 주문 대화 임무에서 특정성은 강제적이지만 언어 교육 대화 시스템에서 유창성이 우선이다.그러나 기존의 지표는 이런 유연성에 대응하기 위해 설계된 것이 아니다.예를 들어 BLEU 평점은 기본적으로 단어 중첩에만 의존하고 BERTScore는 인용과 후보 응답 사이의 의미 유사성에 의존한다.따라서 포획에 필요한 부분, 즉 특정성을 보장할 수 없다.임무에 대한 유연성을 가진 도량 기준을 설계하기 위해 우리는 먼저 이러한 품질을 세 가지로 나눌 것을 제안한다. 그것이 바로 이해성, 감지성과 사랑성이다. 그 중에서 사랑성은 임무에 매우 중요한 품질의 조합이다.우리는 또한 간단한 방법으로 각 방면의 도량을 합성하여 USL-H라고 불리는 도량을 얻었는데 이것은 차원 구조에서의 이해성, 감지성과 사랑성을 대표한다.우리는 USL-H 평점이 인간의 판단과 양호한 관련성을 가지고 서로 다른 측면과 지표상의 배치성을 유지하고 있음을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa uchunguzi wa kujitegemea umependekezwa kupunguza kiwango cha jumla cha majibu katika mazungumzo ya wazi ya ndani. Kwa ujumla, ubora wa jumla unajumuishwa na mambo mbalimbali, kama vile umuhimu, mahusiano na huruma, na umuhimu wa kila upande unatofautiana kwa mujibu wa kazi. Kwa mfano, mahususi ni lazima katika jukumu la mazungumzo ya chakula, wakati ujuzi unapendelewa katika mfumo wa mazungumzo ya lugha. Hata hivyo, mbinu zilizopo hazina lengo la kukabiliana na ujasiri wa aina hiyo. Kwa mfano, score ya BLEU inategemea kwa msingi tu juu ya upunguzi wa maneno, wakati BERTScore anategemea usawa wa kimapenzi kati ya maoni na majibu ya wagombea. Kwa hiyo, hawana uhakika wa kukamata mambo yanayohitajika, yaani, utaalam. Ili kutengeneza mbinu ambazo ni yenye uwezo wa kazi, kwanza tunapendekeza kufanya viwango hivi vya kusimamia kwa kuwaunganisha katika makundi matatu: kuelewa, ujinga, na usawa, ambapo usawa ni pamoja na viwango muhimu kwa kazi. Kadhalika tunapendekeza njia rahisi ya kutengeneza mbinu za kila upande ili kupata mbinu moja inayoitwa USL-H, ambayo inasimama kuelewa, Uhisia na Utawala katika Hierarchy. Tumeonyesha kwamba score za USL-H hufanikiwa uhusiano mzuri na uamuzi wa binadamu na kuendelea uwezo wake kwa upande tofauti na mitindo.', 'tr': 'Otomatik çözümleme metrikleri a çyk-domenyň dýalogda bir jogabatyň hemme kalitesini ýazmak üçin teklip edildi. Adatça, ähli kynçylyk dürli aspektlerden döredildi, möhüm, taýýarlyk we empatiýa ýaly, we her aspektiň wajyplygyny görevine görä üýtgeýär. mysal, taýýarlama yemekleri düzenlemek üçin bir dialog zadynda mejbur bolar, ýöne dil öwretmek sisteminde tercih edilýär. Ýöne bar metrikler beýle fleksibilitçe çözmek üçin tasarlanmaýarlar. mysal bolsa, BLES अंश diňe sözleriň üstünleşigine garaşýar, ýöne BERTScore seresasy we kandidyň jogabynyň arasyndaky semantik meňzeşigine baglanýar. Şol sebäpli, gerekli aspektleri taýýarlamak üçin garantlanmaýarlar. Bir işe fleksibil bir metrik tasarlamak üçin, ilkinji gezek olary üç topara çarpamak üçin bu wajyplary üçin üýtgetmegi teklip edýäris: düşünmek, duýumsyzlyk we rugsat bolmak üçin, bir işe üçin esasy rugsat bir wezip hasaplamadyr. Biz hem her aspektiň metriklerini birleştirmek üçin basit bir yöntem teklif edip, bir USL-H adlı metrik almak üçin bir teklif teklif edip, bu ýerde hijerarhiýada düşünseler, duyarlıklar we çözümlilik diýmekdir. Biz USL-H अंश ynsan hökmü bilen gowy ylalaşyklary başarýandygyny we özüniň düzümlerligini farklı aspektlere we metriklere garaşýandygyny görkezildik.', 'af': "Baie outomatiese evalueringsmetries is voorgestel om die hele kwaliteit van 'n antwoord in oop- domein dialoog te tel. Algemeen is die algemene kwaliteit gebruik van verskeie aspekte, soos relevansie, spesifiekheid en gemeenskap, en die belangrikheid van elke aspekt verskillig volgens die taak. Byvoorbeeld, spesifiseerde is obligatief in 'n voedorderende dialoog taak, terwyl fluiditeit verkies word in 'n taal-onderriging dialoog stelsel. Maar bestaande metries is nie ontwerp om met sodanige fleksibiliteit te koppel nie. Vir voorbeeld, BLEU-telling is fundamenteel alleen op woord oorvloei, terwyl BERTScore verlig op semantiese gelykenis tussen verwysing en kandidate antwoord. So is hulle nie garantieer om die benodige aspekte, i.e. spesifiekheid te vang nie. Om 'n metrie te ontwerp wat fleksibel is vir 'n taak, voorstel ons eerste om hierdie kwalitete te bestuur te maak deur hulle in drie groepe te groep: verstandigheid, sensiblenheid en lykbaarheid, waar lykbaarheid is 'n kombinasie van kwalitete wat nodig is vir 'n taak. Ons voorstel ook 'n eenvoudige metode om metrike van elke aspekt te komponenteer om 'n enkele metrie wat genoem USL-H te kry, wat staan vir Verstandigheid, Sensibiliteit en Likabiliteit in Hierarchy. Ons het bevestig dat USL-H-score goeie korrelasies met menslike oordeel bereik en sy konfigurasionaliteit onder verskillende aspekte en metrike onderhou.", 'am': 'በዶሜን መክፈት ውስጥ መልስ ጥያቄን ለማቆየት በብዙ አውቶማቲካዊ ማተሚያ መክፈት ተገልጦአል፡፡ በጠቅላላ፣ ሙሉ ጥሩ በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች፣ እንደተጨማሪነት፣ ጥሩ እና ስህተት፣ የሁሉም ጉዳይ ውጤት እንደ ስራው ይለየዋል፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ ቁጥጥር በቋንቋ-ማስተማር ጥያቄ በመምረጫው ስራ ግድ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሚኖሩት ማተሚያዎች እንደዚህ ባለ ብልሃት ለመቀበል አይፈጠሩም፡፡ For example, BLEU score basically relies on word overlapping, while BERTScore relies on semantic similarity between reference and candidate response. ስለዚህም የሚፈለጉትን ጉዳይ ለመያዝ መግቢያ የለባቸውም፡፡ To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups: understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task.  በሐይራርክቲ፣ ማስተዋል፣ ስህተት እና ልቅናዊነት የሚቆመውን የአሜሪካ-H የሚባልን አንድ ሚትሪክ ለማግኘት ቀላል ልማድ እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ የአሜሪካ-H score ከሰው ፍርድ ጋር መልካም ግንኙነትን እንዲያገኝ እና ልዩ ጉዳዮች እና ልዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ ጥቅም እንዲያደርጋት አሳየን፡፡', 'sq': 'Shumë metrika automatike vlerësimi janë propozuar për të shënuar cilësinë e përgjithshme të një përgjigje në dialogun e dominiu të hapur. Gjeneralisht, cilësia e përgjithshme përbëhet nga aspekte të ndryshme, të tilla si relevanca, specificiteti dhe empati dhe rëndësia e çdo aspekti ndryshon sipas detyrës. Për shembull, specificiteti është i detyrueshëm në një detyrë dialogu për urdhërimin e ushqimit, ndërsa fluenca preferohet në një sistem dialogu për mësimin e gjuhës. Megjithatë, metrikat ekzistuese nuk janë projektuar për të përballur me fleksibilitetin e tillë. Për shembull, rezultati BLEU mbështetet në thelb vetëm në mbishtypjen e fjalëve, ndërsa BERTScore mbështetet në ngjashmërinë semantike midis referencës dhe përgjigjes së kandidatit. Kështu, ata nuk janë të garantuar të kapin aspektet e kërkuara, pra specificitetin. Për të dizajnuar një metrik që është fleksibel për një detyrë, ne së pari propozojmë që këto cilësi të jenë të menaxhueshme duke i grupuar në tre grupe: kuptueshmëria, arsyeshmëria dhe dashuria, ku dashuria është një kombinim i cilësive që janë thelbësore për një detyrë. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një metodë të thjeshtë për të kompozuar metrikat e çdo aspekti për të marrë një metrik të vetëm të quajtur USL-H, i cili përfshin kuptimin, ndjeshmërinë dhe mundësinë në Hierarki. Ne demonstrojmë se rezultati USL-H arrin korrelacione të mira me gjykimin njerëzor dhe mban konfigurueshmërinë e tij drejt aspekteve dhe metrikave të ndryshme.', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন ডায়ালগে প্রতিক্রিয়ার মান স্কোর করার জন্য অনেক স্বয়ংক্রিয় মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। সাধারণত, সাধারণত মান বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যেমন প্রয়োজন, বিশেষ বিশেষ এবং সহানুভূতি এবং কাজের অনুসারে প্রত্যেক বিষয়ের গুরুত্বপ উদাহরণস্বরূপ, খাদ্য-নির্দেশাবলী ডায়ালগের কাজে বিশেষ বিশেষ বিশেষ বিষয়টি বাধ্যতামূলক, যদিও ভাষা শিক্ষা দেখানো তবে বিদ্যমান মেট্রিক এই ধরনের ফ্লিক্সিলিভিশনের সাথে মোকাবেলা করার জন্য ডিজাইন করা হয়নি। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, বিলু স্কোর মৌলিকভাবে শুধুমাত্র শব্দ অতিরিক্ত করার উপর নির্ভর করে, কিন্তু বার্টিস্কোর র রেফেন্স এবং প্রার্থীর তাই তারা প্রয়োজনীয় বিষয়গুলোকে ধরার জন্য নিশ্চিত নয়, যেমন বিশেষ বিষয়টি। একটি মেট্রিক ডিজাইন করার জন্য আমরা প্রথমে প্রস্তাব করছি যে তাদের তিন গ্রুপের মধ্যে গ্রুপ করার মাধ্যমে ব্যবস্থা করতে পারি: বুঝতে পারে, বুঝতে পারে এবং সংবেদনশীল এবং সমতা, যে এছাড়াও আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রত্যেক দিকের মেট্রিক যার নাম ইউএসএল-এইচ নামে এক মিট্রিক অর্জন করার জন্য, যা হিরেরার্কিতে বুঝতে পারে বুঝতে পারে, সেন আমরা প্রমাণ করেছি যে USL-H স্কোর মানুষের বিচারের সাথে ভাল সম্পর্ক অর্জন করে এবং বিভিন্ন দিকের প্রতি তার কনফিগারেশন রাখে।', 'hy': 'Շատ ավտոմատիկ գնահատման մետրիկներ են առաջարկվել արձագանքի ընդհանուր որակը գնահատելու համար բաց տիեզերքի երկխոսում: Generally, the overall quality is comprised of various aspects, such as relevancy, specificity, and empathy, and the importance of each aspect differs according to the task.  Օրինակ, հատուկ հատկությունը պարտադիր է սննդի կարգավորման հաղորդակցման գործում, մինչդեռ ճկունությունը նախընտրվում է լեզվի ուսուցման հաղորդակցման համակարգում: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող մետրիկները չեն նախագծված նման ճկունության հետ հաղթահարելու համար: Օրինակ, ԲԼԵՎ-ի գնահատականը հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնված է միայն բառերի փոխարկման վրա, մինչդեռ ԲԵՎ-ը հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնականում Այսպիսով, նրանք չեն վստահվում վերցնել պահանջված ասպեկտները, այսինքն, հատուկ հատկությունը: Որպեսզի ձևավորենք մի մետրիկ, որը ճկուն է խնդրի համար, առաջին հերթին մենք առաջարկում ենք, որ այս որակները կարելի է ղեկավարել, խմբավորելով դրանք երեք խմբի: հասկանալիությունը, զգացմունքը և սիրահարելիությունը, որտեղ սիրահարելիությունը հանդիսանում է մի համեմատություն որ Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ մեթոդ յուրաքանչյուր ասպեկտի մետրերը կազմելու համար, որպեսզի ստանանք մեկ մետրիկ, որը կոչվում է USL-H, որը նշանակում է Հիմացության, Զգացմունքի և Հավանականության համար: We demonstrated that USL-H score achieves good correlations with human judgment and maintains its configurability towards different aspects and metrics.', 'az': 'Açıq domenin dialogında təcavüzünün bütün keyfiyyətini göstərmək üçün bir çox avtomatik değerlendirmə metrikləri təklif edilmişdir. Həmçinin böyük keyfiyyət, məxluqatlıq, məxluqatlıq və empatik kimi müxtəlif aspektlərdən olub, hər aspektin məxluqatı işə görə fərqli olar. Məsələn, məsələlər, yemək sıralaması diyalələrində məcburiyyətdir. Halbuki dil öyrənməsi diyalələri sistemində fərqli tərz seçildir. Halbuki, mevcut metriklər böyük fleksibilik ilə çəkinmək üçün müəyyən edilməz. Misal olaraq, BLEU nöqtəsi əslində yalnız sözlərin aşağılığı üzərində təvəkkül edir, lakin BERTScore referans və kandidát cavabı arasındakı semantik məsələlərinə təvəkkül edir. Beləliklə, onlar müəyyən şəkilləri, məsələlər, məsələlər təsdiqlənmək üçün təmin edilməz. Bir iş üçün fleksibil bir metrik tasarlamaq üçün, ilk dəfə onları üç gruplara qovuşdurmaq üçün bu qüvvətləri təklif edirik: anlaşılabilir, duyarlıqlıq və sevkinlik, hansı bir işin üçün mövcuddur bir qisminin birləşdirilməsidir. Biz həmçin in hər aspektin metriklərini birləşdirmək üçün USL-H adlı bir metrik almaq üçün basit bir yolu təklif edirik. Bu da Hirarhiyada anlaşılabilir, Duyarlılıq və Likabiliyyətdir. Biz USL-H nöqtəsi insan hökmləri ilə yaxşı bağlantılara nail edir və onu müxtəlif aspektlərə və metriklərə müəyyən edir.', 'cs': 'Bylo navrženo mnoho metrik automatického hodnocení pro hodnocení celkové kvality odpovědi v otevřeném dialogu. Celková kvalita se obecně skládá z různých aspektů, jako je relevance, specificita a empatie, a význam každého aspektu se liší podle úkolu. Například specifičnost je povinná v dialogovém úkolu objednávání potravin, zatímco plynulost je upřednostňována v dialogovém systému výuky jazyků. Stávající metriky však nejsou navrženy tak, aby se vyrovnaly s touto flexibilitou. Například skóre BLEU v zásadě spoléhá pouze na překrývání slov, zatímco BERTScore se opírá o sémantickou podobnost mezi referenční a kandidátskou odpovědí. Není tedy zaručeno, že zachytí požadované aspekty, tj. specifičnost. Abychom navrhli metriku, která je flexibilní pro daný úkol, nejprve navrhujeme, aby tyto vlastnosti byly zvládnutelné seskupením do tří skupin: srozumitelnost, citlivost a sympatibilita, kde sympatibilita je kombinací vlastností, které jsou pro daný úkol nezbytné. Navrhujeme také jednoduchou metodu složení metrik každého aspektu pro získání jediné metriky zvané USL-H, což znamená porozumětelnost, citlivost a pravděpodobnost v hierarchii. Ukázali jsme, že USL-H skóre dosahuje dobré korelace s lidským úsudkem a udržuje si jeho konfigurovatelnost vůči různým aspektům a metrikám.', 'bs': 'Mnoge automatske procjene metrike su predložene za rezultat ukupne kvalitete odgovora u dijalogu otvorenog domena. Generalno, ukupna kvalitet se sastoji od različitih aspekta, poput relevantnosti, specifičnosti i empatije, i važnost svakog aspekta se razlikuje u skladu s zadatkom. Na primjer, specifikacija je obavezna u zadatku dijaloga za naređivanje hrane, dok je fluencija preferirana u sistemu dijaloga za učenje jezika. Međutim, postojeće metrije nisu dizajnirane da se suoči sa takvom fleksibilnošću. Na primjer, BLEU rezultat oslanja se samo na prelapanje riječi, dok BERTScore oslanja na semantičku sličnost između referentnih i kandidatskih odgovora. Zato nisu garantirani da uhvate potrebne aspekte, tj. specifičnost. Da bismo dizajnirali metriku koja je fleksibilna za zadatak, prvo predlažemo da ove kvalitete mogu upravljati grupiranjem u tri grupe: razumljivost, osjetljivost i ljubavnost, gdje je ljubavnost kombinacija kvaliteta koja su ključna za zadatak. Također predlažemo jednostavnu metodu da sastavimo metrike svakog aspekta kako bi dobili jednu metriku po imenu USL-H, koja predstavlja razumljivost, osjetljivost i mogućnost u hijerarhiji. Pokazali smo da rezultat USL-H postigne dobre korelacije sa ljudskim sudom i održava svoju konfigurabilnost prema različitim aspektima i metrikama.', 'et': 'Paljud automaatsed hindamismeetodid on välja pakutud, et hinnata vastuste üldist kvaliteeti avatud dialoogis. Üldiselt koosneb üldine kvaliteet erinevatest aspektidest, nagu asjakohasus, spetsiifilisus ja empaatia ning iga aspekti tähtsus erineb vastavalt ülesandele. Näiteks on spetsiifilisus kohustuslik toidu tellimise dialoogi ülesandel, samas kui keeleõppe dialoogi süsteemis eelistatakse sujuvat oskust. Olemasolevad mõõdikud ei ole siiski loodud sellise paindlikkusega toimetulekuks. Näiteks tugineb BLEU skoor põhimõtteliselt ainult sõnade kattumisele, samas kui BERTScore tugineb viite ja kandidaadi vastuse semantilisele sarnasusele. Seega ei ole tagatud, et need hõlmavad vajalikke aspekte, st spetsiifilisust. Et kujundada mõõdik, mis on paindlik ülesande jaoks, teeme esmalt ettepaneku muuta need omadused hallatavaks, rühmitades need kolme rühma: arusaadavus, tundlikkus ja meeldivus, kus meeldivus on kombinatsioon omadustest, mis on ülesande jaoks hädavajalikud. Samuti pakume välja lihtsa meetodi iga aspekti mõõdikute liitmiseks, et saada üks mõõdik nimega USL-H, mis tähendab arusaadavust, tundlikkust ja tõenäosust hierarhias. Näitasime, et USL-H skoor saavutab hea korrelatsiooni inimese otsustusvõimega ning säilitab selle konfigureeritavuse erinevate aspektide ja mõõdikute suhtes.', 'fi': 'Useita automaattisia arviointimittareita on ehdotettu vastauksen laadun arvioimiseksi avoimessa vuoropuhelussa. Yleisesti ottaen laatu koostuu eri näkökohdista, kuten relevanssista, spesifisyydestä ja empatiasta, ja kunkin näkökulman merkitys vaihtelee tehtävän mukaan. Esimerkiksi ruoan tilaamista koskevassa vuoropuhelussa erityisyys on pakollista, kun taas kieliopetusta koskevassa vuoropuhelujärjestelmässä sujuvuus on etusijalla. Nykyisiä mittareita ei kuitenkaan ole suunniteltu selviytymään tällaisesta joustavuudesta. Esimerkiksi BLEU-pistemäärä perustuu pohjimmiltaan vain sanapäällekkäisyyteen, kun taas BERTScore perustuu semanttiseen samankaltaisuuteen viittauksen ja ehdokkaan vastauksen välillä. Näin ollen niillä ei ole takeita tarvittavien näkökohtien eli spesifisyyden kuvaamisesta. Tehtävää joustavan mittarin suunnittelussa ehdotamme ensin näiden ominaisuuksien hallintaa ryhmittelemällä ne kolmeen ryhmään: ymmärrettävyys, herkkyys ja miellyttävyys, joissa miellyttävyys on yhdistelmä ominaisuuksia, jotka ovat välttämättömiä tehtävän kannalta. Ehdotamme myös yksinkertaista menetelmää kunkin aspektin metriikan yhdistämiseksi, jotta saadaan yksi metriikka nimeltä USL-H, joka tarkoittaa Ymmärrettävyys, Herkkyys ja Likability Hierarchy. Osoitimme, että USL-H-pistemäärä saavuttaa hyvät korrelaatiot ihmisen arvostelukyvyn kanssa ja säilyttää sen konfiguroitavuuden eri näkökulmien ja mittareiden suhteen.', 'ca': "S'han proposat moltes mesures d'evaluació automàtica per puntuar la qualitat global d'una resposta en el diàleg de domini obert. En general, la qualitat global està composta de diversos aspectes, com la relevància, la especificitat i l'empatia, i la importància de cada aspecte difere segons la tasca. Per exemple, l'especificitat és obligatoria en una tasca de diàleg que ordena aliments, mentre que la fluïtat es prefereix en un sistema de diàleg d'ensenyament de llenguatges. Però les mètriques existents no estan dissenyades per afrontar aquesta flexibilitat. Per exemple, la puntuació BLEU només es basa en la duplicació de paraules, mentre que BERTScore es basa en la similitud semàntica entre la referència i la resposta candidata. Així que no estan garantits per capturar els aspectes requerits, és a dir, la especificitat. To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups: understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task.  We also propose a simple method to composite metrics of each aspect to obtain a single metric called USL-H, which stands for Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy.  Hem demostrat que la puntuació USL-H aconsegueix bones correlacions amb el judici humà i manté la seva configurabilitat cap a diferents aspectes i mètriques.", 'jv': 'TODOS slacky Sample, true" and "falsetextattr Nanging, aku sing dipunangé metir sing ora bisa nggawe layang karo ngono njobho. Ballot, bloke punika dipun punika dipun punika dipun politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngawe ngubah sistem Metik sing akeh lanjut kanggo nggawe task, kita ngubah awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang-sistem sing gawe ngubah dhéwé karo taluké telu kelompok: underunderunderunderunderliness, senibLenss, lan likable, kawula likable kuwi gekombe nggawe sistem sing berarti dadi nggawe barang nggawe Awak dhéwé nglebah akeh sistem sing sampeyan kanggo sampeyan Metiks ning saben Aspek kanggo awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing USL-H, dadi wis nggawe akeh comprwisité, Sensiblenes, lan Likabilité ning akeh-akeh. Awak dhéwé éntukno USL-H sing rumangsa akeh perusahaan karo perusahaan hukum sing luwih apik lan hukum sistem sing gawe ngupakan perusahaan karo perusahaan karo Metik.', 'he': 'הרבה מטריות הערכה אוטומטיות הציעו כדי לקבוע את איכות הכללית של תגובה בדיולוג שטח פתוח. באופן כללי, האיכות הכללית מורכבת מבחינים שונים, כמו רלוונטיות, ספציפיות, ואמפטיה, וחשוב של כל היבט שונה לפי המשימה. לדוגמא, ספציפיות היא חובה במשימה של דיאלוג מזון, בעוד שקיפות מועדפת במערכת דיאלוג לימוד שפות. עם זאת, מטריות קיימות לא מעוצבות כדי להתמודד עם גמישות כזו. לדוגמה, נקודת BLEU בסיסית תלויה רק על מעקב מילים, בעוד BERTScore תלוי על דמיון סמנטי בין התייחסות לתגובה המועמדת. כך, הם לא מובטחים לתפוס את היבטים הנדרשים, כלומר, ספציפיות. כדי לעצב מטריקה שגמישה למשימה, אנו קודם מציעים להפוך את האיכויים האלה ניתן לנהל על ידי הקבוצה אותם לשלושה קבוצות: הבנה, הגיונות והאהבה, היכן אהבה היא שילוב של איכויות החיווניות למשימה. אנחנו גם מציעים שיטה פשוטה למטריקה המרכיבה של כל היבט כדי להשיג מטריקה אחת שנקראת USL-H, אשר עומדת על הבנה, רגישות, וכיוון בהיררכיה. הוכחנו כי ציון USL-H משיג קשרים טובים עם השיפוט האנושי ומחזיק את הסדרות שלו כלפי היבטים ומטריקות שונות.', 'sk': 'Predlagane so bile številne samodejne meritve ocenjevanja, da bi ocenile splošno kakovost odziva v dialogu na odprtem področju. Splošna kakovost je sestavljena iz različnih vidikov, kot so relevantnost, specifičnost in empatija, pomen vsakega vidika pa se razlikuje glede na nalogo. Specifičnost je na primer obvezna pri dialogu o naročanju hrane, medtem ko je tekoča pri dialogu med poučevanjem jezikov prednostna. Vendar obstoječe meritve niso zasnovane za obvladovanje takšne prožnosti. Rezultat BLEU na primer temeljito temelji na prekrivanju besed, medtem ko BERTScore temelji na semantični podobnosti med referenčnim in kandidatnim odzivom. Zato ni zagotovljeno, da zajemajo zahtevane vidike, tj. specifičnost. Za oblikovanje meritve, ki je prilagodljiva za nalogo, najprej predlagamo, da se te lastnosti upravljajo tako, da jih združijo v tri skupine: razumevanje, občutljivost in všečnost, kjer je všečnost kombinacija kvalitet, ki so bistvene za nalogo. Predlagamo tudi enostavno metodo za sestavljanje meritev vsakega vidika, da bi dobili eno merilo, imenovano USL-H, ki pomeni razumljivost, občutljivost in verjetnost v hierarhiji. Pokazali smo, da ocena USL-H dosega dobro korelacijo s človeško presojo in ohranja svojo konfiguracijo glede na različne vidike in meritve.', 'ha': "An buƙata masu yawa na ƙayyade metric masu yin amfani da farat ɗaya dõmin a score sifar da duk matsayin ajir cikin zauren akwatin bayanin bayani na buɗe. A jumla'a, kyauta guda ana samu'a cikin masu sakan dabam-dabam, kamar muhimmi, masu hushi, masu husũma, kuma muhimmin kõwane abu yana sãɓã wa daidain aikin. Misali, an ƙayyade ƙayyade cikin wani aikin zauren akwatin akwatin bayani na abinci, kuma an fĩfĩta mai amfani da gaskiyar zauren akwatin bayani na bara cikin harshen. A lokacin da, ba za'a designe metrics da ke iya samun wannan fleksibinci ba. Misali, score BLEU na ƙayyade a kan ƙanshin, yana dõgara kawai kan word-duffai, da kuma BERTscore yana dõgara a kan daidaita da daidaita tsakanin Reference da mai kandida. Saboda haka, bã za su ƙulla su kãma gẽfen da ake bukãta ba, misali, Ko iya designi wani metrici wanda yake mai kamfata zuwa wani aikin, tuna faranta a farkon mu sami da su zama masu shiryi a cikin jama'a uku: fahimta, ma'abũcin hankali, da masu daidaita, inda liki na zama komai da wasu sifati na da muhimu ga aikin. We also propose a simple method to composite metrics of each aspect to obtain a single metric called USL-H, which stands for Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy.  Mun nũna cewa musamman YUL-H ko zai sãmu mazauni mai kyau da ma'abũcin dam kuma yana tsare ta zuwa masu kalma dabam da metriki.", 'bo': 'Many automatic evaluation metrics have been proposed to score the overall quality of a response in open-domain dialog. སྤྱིར་བཏང་། རྒྱལ་ཐང་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཚན་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་གལ་ཆེ་བ་དང་། གསལ་བཤད་དང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་། དབུལ་ཤུགས་གཙོ་རིམ་པར་དབ དཔེར་ན། གསལ་བཤད་ནི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚད་འཛིན་དེ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་འདུག དཔེར་ན། BLEU གྲངས་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་གཞི་རྟེན་དེ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། ཁོང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་དགོས་མཁན་གྱི་ཞལ་འདུག་ལ་འཛིན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་མ་བྱེད་པར་ཐང་མེད། To design a metric that is flexible to a task, we first propose making these qualities manageable by grouping them into three groups: understandability, sensibleness, and likability, where likability is a combination of qualities that are essential for a task. We also propose a simple method to composite metrics of each aspect to obtain a single metric called USL-H, which stands for Understandability, Sensibleness, and Likability in Hierarchy. We demonstrated that USL-H score achieves good correlations with human judgment and maintains its configurability towards different aspects and metrics.'}
{'en': 'HiTrans : A Transformer-Based Context- and Speaker-Sensitive Model for Emotion Detection in Conversations', 'ar': 'HiTrans: نموذج حساس للمتحدث يعتمد على السياق والمتحدث لاكتشاف المشاعر في المحادثات', 'fr': 'HiTrans\xa0: un modèle sensible au contexte et au locuteur basé sur un transformateur pour la détection des émotions dans les conversations', 'pt': 'HiTrans: Um Modelo Sensível ao Contexto e ao Falante Baseado em Transformador para Detecção de Emoções em Conversas', 'es': 'HiTrans: un modelo basado en transformadores sensible al contexto y al orador para la detección de emociones en las conversaciones', 'ja': 'HiTrans ：会話で感情を検出するための変圧器ベースのコンテキストおよびスピーカー感受性モデル', 'hi': 'HiTrans: वार्तालापों में भावना का पता लगाने के लिए एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित संदर्भ- और स्पीकर-संवेदनशील मॉडल', 'zh': 'HiTrans曰:变压器上下文言者敏,所以检也', 'ru': 'HiTrans: чувствительная к контексту и динамику модель обнаружения эмоций в разговорах на основе трансформатора', 'ga': 'HiTrans: Múnla Comhthéacs Bunaithe ar Chlaochladán agus Cainteoir-íogair chun Mothúchán a Bhrath i gComhrá', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'HiTrans: Transzformátor alapú kontextus- és hangszóróérzékeny modell az érzelmek felismerésére a beszélgetésekben', 'el': 'Ένα μοντέλο που βασίζεται στον μετασχηματιστή για την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στις συνομιλίες', 'it': 'HiTrans: un modello sensibile al contesto e agli altoparlanti basato su trasformatori per il rilevamento delle emozioni nelle conversazioni', 'kk': 'HiTrans: Айнымалықтарда көңіл күйін анықтау үшін контексті және сөйлейтін сөйлейтін түрлендіруші негіздеген модель', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഹിട്രാന്\u200dസ്: സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'HiTrans: Mudell Sensitiv għall-Kuntest u l-Kellem ibbażat fuq it-Trasformer għad-Detezzjoni tal-Emożizzjoni fil-Konversjonijiet', 'ms': 'HiTrans: A Transformer- Based Context- and Speaker- Sensitive Model for Emotion Detection in Conversations', 'mn': 'HiTrans: Дууссан сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгохын тулд сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгохын тулд шилжүүлэгчийн үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөл - болон илтгэгч-мэдрэмжтэй загвар', 'pl': 'HiTrans: Model wykrywania emocji w rozmowach oparty na transformatorze kontekstowym i mówcy', 'ro': 'HiTrans: un model bazat pe context și difuzor pentru detectarea emoțiilor în conversații', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'HiTrans: Kontekst- i predstavnik- osetljiv model za otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima', 'si': 'හිට්\u200dරාන්ස්: සමාවාදේවල් සඳහා භාවිතාව හොයාගන්න හැකියාවක් සංවේදනයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක්', 'so': 'HiTrans: A Transformer-Based Content- and Speaker-Sensitive Model for Detection of Emotion in Conversations', 'sv': 'HiTrans: En transformatorbaserad kontext- och högtalarkänslig modell för känslodetektering i konversationer', 'ta': 'HiTrans: பேச்சுகளில் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான மாற்று அடிப்படையான சூழல்- மற்றும் பேச்சாளர்- உணர்வு மாதிரி', 'ur': 'HiTrans: ایک ترنسفور-بنیادی کنٹکسٹ- اور Speaker-Sensitive Model for Emotion Detection in Conversations', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'HiXuyên: Một hình nền biến hình, ngữ cảnh và ngôn ngữ nhạy cảm dành cho việc phát hiện trong đối thoại', 'bg': 'Модел за откриване на емоции в разговорите, базиран на трансформатори и чувствителни към говорителя', 'nl': 'HiTrans: Een Transformer-gebaseerd context- en spreker-gevoelig model voor emotionele detectie in gesprekken', 'da': 'HiTrans: En transformatorbaseret kontekst- og højttalerfølsom model til detektion af følelser i samtaler', 'hr': 'HiTrans: Kontekst- i govornik- osjetljiv model za otkrivanje emocija na transformaciji u razgovorima', 'de': 'HiTrans: Ein Transformatorbasiertes kontext- und speaker-sensitives Modell zur Emotionserkennung in Gesprächen', 'ko': 'Hitrans: 변환기 기반의 상하문과 말하는 사람의 민감한 대화 감정 검출 모델', 'id': 'HiTrans: A Transformer-Based Context- and Speaker-Sensitive Model for Emotion Detection in Conversations', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'HiTrans: Utawala wa Kizungumzo na Kizungumzaji wa Kizungumzo', 'tr': 'Durum', 'am': 'Translator: A Transformer-Based Context- and Speaker-Sensitive Model for Emotion Detection in Conversations', 'hy': 'Trans: A Trans- A Transforme- հիմնված կոնտեքստ- և խոսացողի- զգացմունքային մոդել զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար հաղորդակցություններում', 'az': 'HiTrans: Qonuşmalar içində emosyon keşif üçün Transformer-Based Context-and Speaker-Sensitive Modeli', 'bs': 'HiTrans: Kontekst- i govornik- osjetljiv model za otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima', 'sq': 'HiTrans: Një model i ndjeshëm për gjetjen e emocioneve në bisedime me bazë në kontekst dhe fjalës', 'ca': "HiTrans: Un model de detectació d'emocions en converses basat en un contexte i parlador", 'cs': 'HiTrans: kontextový a mluvčí citlivý model pro detekci emocí v konverzacích založený na transformátoru', 'bn': 'HiTrans: কথোপকথনে ইমোটেশন ডিটেক্টরের জন্য একটি ট্রান্সফার্নার- ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তু- এবং স্পেকার- সেন্সিটিভ মডেল', 'fi': 'HiTrans: Muuntajapohjainen konteksti- ja kaiutinherkkä malli tunteiden havaitsemiseen keskusteluissa', 'et': 'HiTrans: transformaatoripõhine konteksti- ja kõnelejatundlik mudel emotsioonide tuvastamiseks vestlustes', 'jv': 'Hi', 'sk': 'HiTrans: Model, ki temelji na transformatorjih in na zvočniku občutljiv za zaznavanje čustev v pogovorih', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'HiTrans: བཟོ་བཅོས་པ(Transformer-Based Context-and Speaker-Sensitive Model for Emotion Detection in Conversations)'}
{'en': 'Emotion detection in conversations (EDC) is to detect the emotion for each utterance in conversations that have multiple speakers. Different from the traditional non-conversational emotion detection, the model for EDC should be context-sensitive (e.g., understanding the whole conversation rather than one utterance) and speaker-sensitive (e.g., understanding which utterance belongs to which speaker). In this paper, we propose a transformer-based context- and speaker-sensitive model for EDC, namely HiTrans, which consists of two hierarchical transformers. We utilize BERT as the low-level transformer to generate local utterance representations, and feed them into another high-level transformer so that utterance representations could be sensitive to the global context of the conversation. Moreover, we exploit an auxiliary task to make our model speaker-sensitive, called pairwise utterance speaker verification (PUSV), which aims to classify whether two utterances belong to the same speaker. We evaluate our model on three benchmark datasets, namely EmoryNLP, MELD and IEMOCAP. Results show that our model outperforms previous state-of-the-art models.', 'ar': 'الكشف عن المشاعر في المحادثات (EDC) هو اكتشاف العاطفة لكل كلام في المحادثات التي تحتوي على عدة مكبرات صوت. يختلف عن الكشف التقليدي عن المشاعر غير التخاطبية ، يجب أن يكون نموذج EDC حساسًا للسياق (على سبيل المثال ، فهم المحادثة بأكملها بدلاً من كلام واحد) وحساس للمتحدث (على سبيل المثال ، فهم الكلام الذي ينتمي إليه المتحدث). في هذا البحث ، نقترح نموذجًا حساسًا للسياق يعتمد على المحولات ومكبرات الصوت لـ EDC ، وهو HiTrans ، والذي يتكون من محولين هرمين. نحن نستخدم BERT كمحول منخفض المستوى لإنشاء تمثيلات منطوقة محلية ، وإدخالها في محول آخر عالي المستوى بحيث تكون تمثيلات الكلام حساسة للسياق العالمي للمحادثة. علاوة على ذلك ، نحن نستغل مهمة مساعدة لجعل نموذجنا حساسًا للمتحدث ، يسمى التحقق من مكبرات الصوت المنطوقة الزوجية (PUSV) ، والذي يهدف إلى تصنيف ما إذا كان كلامان ينتميان إلى نفس المتحدث. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات معيارية ، وهي EmoryNLP و MELD و IEMOCAP. تظهر النتائج أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث النماذج السابقة.', 'pt': 'Detecção de emoção em conversas (EDC) é detectar a emoção para cada enunciado em conversas que têm vários falantes. Diferente da detecção tradicional de emoções não conversacionais, o modelo para EDC deve ser sensível ao contexto (por exemplo, entender toda a conversa em vez de um enunciado) e sensível ao falante (por exemplo, entender qual enunciado pertence a qual falante). Neste artigo, propomos um modelo sensível ao contexto e ao falante baseado em transformador para EDC, denominado HiTrans, que consiste em dois transformadores hierárquicos. Utilizamos BERT como o transformador de baixo nível para gerar representações de enunciados locais e as alimentamos em outro transformador de alto nível para que as representações de enunciados possam ser sensíveis ao contexto global da conversa. Além disso, exploramos uma tarefa auxiliar para tornar nosso modelo sensível ao falante, chamado verificação de falante de locução par a par (PUSV), que visa classificar se dois enunciados pertencem ao mesmo falante. Avaliamos nosso modelo em três conjuntos de dados de referência, ou seja, EmoryNLP, MELD e IEMOCAP. Os resultados mostram que nosso modelo supera os modelos anteriores de última geração.', 'es': 'La detección de emociones en las conversaciones (EDC) consiste en detectar la emoción de cada enunciado en conversaciones que tienen varios oradores. A diferencia de la detección tradicional de emociones no conversacional, el modelo de EDC debe ser sensible al contexto (por ejemplo, comprender toda la conversación en lugar de una expresión) y sensible al orador (por ejemplo, comprender qué expresión pertenece a cada orador). En este artículo, proponemos un modelo basado en transformadores sensible al contexto y al orador para EDC, a saber, HiTrans, que consiste en dos transformadores jerárquicos. Utilizamos BERT como el transformador de bajo nivel para generar representaciones de enunciados locales y los alimentamos a otro transformador de alto nivel para que las representaciones de enunciados puedan ser sensibles al contexto global de la conversación. Además, aprovechamos una tarea auxiliar para hacer que nuestro modelo sea sensible al orador, llamado verificación del orador por pares (PUSV), que tiene como objetivo clasificar si dos enunciados pertenecen al mismo hablante. Evaluamos nuestro modelo en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia, a saber, EMORYNLP, MELD e IEMOCAP. Los resultados muestran que nuestro modelo supera a los modelos de última generación anteriores.', 'fr': "La détection des émotions dans les conversations (EDC) consiste à détecter l'émotion de chaque énoncé dans les conversations qui ont plusieurs locuteurs. Contrairement à la détection traditionnelle des émotions non conversationnelles, le modèle pour l'ECD doit être sensible au contexte (par exemple, comprendre l'ensemble de la conversation plutôt qu'un énoncé) et sensible au locuteur (par exemple, comprendre quel énoncé appartient à quel locuteur). Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle sensible au contexte et au locuteur basé sur un transformateur pour EDC, à savoir HiTrans, qui consiste en deux transformateurs hiérarchiques. Nous utilisons BERT comme transformateur de bas niveau pour générer des représentations d'énoncés locaux et les injecter dans un autre transformateur de haut niveau afin que les représentations d'énoncé puissent être sensibles au contexte global de la conversation. De plus, nous exploitons une tâche auxiliaire pour rendre notre modèle sensible au locuteur, appelée vérification par paires de locuteurs d'énoncés (PUSV), qui vise à déterminer si deux énoncés appartiennent au même locuteur. Nous évaluons notre modèle sur trois ensembles de données de référence, à savoir EmorynLP, MELD et IEMOCAP. Les résultats montrent que notre modèle surpasse les modèles de pointe précédents.", 'ja': '会話における感情の検出（ EDC ）は、複数の話者がいる会話における発話ごとの感情を検出することです。 従来の非会話的感情検出とは異なり、EDCのモデルは、文脈依存性（例えば、1つの発話ではなく会話全体を理解する）であり、話者依存性（例えば、どの発話がどの話者に属するかを理解する）でなければならない。 本稿では、2つの階層型変圧器からなるEDC用の変圧器ベースのコンテキストとスピーカーセンシティブモデル、すなわちHiTransを提案する。 ローレベル変圧器としてBERTを使用してローカル発話表現を生成し、発話表現が会話のグローバルコンテキストに敏感になるように別のハイレベル変圧器に送ります。 さらに、私たちは、２つの発話が同じスピーカーに属するかどうかを分類することを目的とした、ペアワイズ発話スピーカー検証（ ＰＵＳＶ ）と呼ばれる、私たちのモデルのスピーカー感度を高めるための補助的なタスクを利用します。 私たちは、EmoryNLP、MELD、およびIEMOCAPという3つのベンチマークデータセットでモデルを評価します。 結果は、当社のモデルが以前の最先端モデルを上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '情检 (EDC) 以检数语之情。 非情检也,EDC体上下文敏(如也,尽言而非一言)与言者敏(,知言者何言者)。 本文有转换器EDC上下文、扬声器敏感模样,即HiTrans,两层变压器成。 吾以 BERT 为下转换器以成地语,而致之一转换器,以尽上下文敏也。 以一佐命敏吾言者,谓之成对言者验(PUSV),二言同辞者也。 三准集上质,曰EmoryNLP,MELD曰IEMOCAP。 结果表明,我先入模。', 'ru': 'Обнаружение эмоций в разговорах (EDC) - это обнаружение эмоций для каждого высказывания в разговорах с несколькими говорящими. В отличие от традиционного обнаружения эмоций, не связанных с разговором, модель для EDC должна быть чувствительной к контексту (например, понимание всего разговора, а не одного высказывания) и чувствительной к оратору (например, понимание того, какое высказывание принадлежит тому или иному оратору). В этой статье мы предлагаем чувствительную к контексту и динамику модель трансформатора для EDC, а именно HiTrans, которая состоит из двух иерархических трансформаторов. Мы используем BERT в качестве низкоуровневого трансформатора для создания локальных представлений речи и подаем их в другой высокоуровневый трансформатор, чтобы представления речи могли быть чувствительны к глобальному контексту разговора. Кроме того, мы используем вспомогательную задачу, чтобы сделать нашу модель спикера чувствительной, называемую попарной проверкой речи спикера (PUSV), которая направлена на классификацию того, принадлежат ли два слова одному и тому же спикеру. Мы оцениваем нашу модель по трем базовым наборам данных, а именно EmoryNLP, MELD и IEMOCAP. Результаты показывают, что наша модель превосходит предыдущие современные модели.', 'hi': 'वार्तालापों में भावना का पता लगाना (ईडीसी) वार्तालापों में प्रत्येक कथन के लिए भावना का पता लगाना है जिसमें कई स्पीकर होते हैं। पारंपरिक गैर-संवादात्मक भावनाओं का पता लगाने से अलग, ईडीसी के लिए मॉडल संदर्भ-संवेदनशील होना चाहिए (उदाहरण के लिए, एक उच्चारण के बजाय पूरी बातचीत को समझना) और स्पीकर-संवेदनशील (उदाहरण के लिए, यह समझना कि कौन सा कथन किस वक्ता से संबंधित है)। इस पेपर में, हम ईडीसी के लिए एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित संदर्भ- और स्पीकर-संवेदनशील मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अर्थात् हाइट्रांस, जिसमें दो पदानुक्रमित ट्रांसफार्मर होते हैं। हम स्थानीय उच्चारण प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करने के लिए निम्न-स्तरीय ट्रांसफार्मर के रूप में BERT का उपयोग करते हैं, और उन्हें एक और उच्च-स्तरीय ट्रांसफार्मर में फ़ीड करते हैं ताकि उच्चारण प्रतिनिधित्व बातचीत के वैश्विक संदर्भ के प्रति संवेदनशील हो सके। इसके अलावा, हम अपने मॉडल स्पीकर-संवेदनशील बनाने के लिए एक सहायक कार्य का फायदा उठाते हैं, जिसे पेयरवाइज उच्चारण स्पीकर सत्यापन (PUSV) कहा जाता है, जिसका उद्देश्य यह वर्गीकृत करना है कि क्या दो कथन एक ही वक्ता से संबंधित हैं। हम तीन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर अपने मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, अर्थात् EmoryNLP, MELD और IEMOCAP। परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल पिछले अत्याधुनिक मॉडलों को मात देता है।', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le braite mothúcháin i gcomhráite (EDC) an mhothúchán a bhrath do gach cainte i gcomhráite a bhfuil ilchainteoirí acu. Difriúil leis an mbrath mothúchán traidisiúnta neamhchomhrá, ba cheart go mbeadh an tsamhail le haghaidh EDC íogair don chomhthéacs (m.sh. an comhrá iomlán seachas aon chaint amháin a thuiscint) agus íogair don chainteoir (m.sh. tuiscint a fháil ar cé acu cainte lena mbaineann). Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla atá íogair ó thaobh comhthéacs agus cainteoir bunaithe ar chlaochladán don EDC, eadhon HiTrans, ina bhfuil dhá chlaochladán ordlathach. Bainimid úsáid as BERT mar an claochladán íseal-leibhéil chun léiriúcháin cainte áitiúil a ghiniúint, agus cuirimid isteach iad i gclaochladán ardleibhéil eile ionas go bhféadfadh léiriúcháin cainte a bheith tuisceanach do chomhthéacs domhanda an chomhrá. Ina theannta sin, bainimid leas as tasc cúnta chun ár múnla íogair a dhéanamh den chainteoir, ar a dtugtar fíorú cainte pairwise (PUSV), a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige a rangú an mbaineann dhá chaint leis an gcainteoir céanna. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár múnla ar thrí thacar sonraí tagarmharcála, eadhon EmoryNLP, MELD agus IEMOCAP. Léiríonn torthaí go sáraíonn ár múnla na samhlacha úrscothacha a bhí ann roimhe seo.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων σε συνομιλίες είναι η ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων για κάθε λόγο σε συζητήσεις που έχουν πολλούς ομιλητές. Διαφορετικά από την παραδοσιακή ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων μη συζήτησης, το μοντέλο για την EDC θα πρέπει να είναι ευαίσθητο στο πλαίσιο (π.χ. κατανόηση ολόκληρης της συνομιλίας και όχι μιας ομιλίας) και ευαίσθητο στον ομιλητή (π.χ. κατανόηση του ποια ομιλία ανήκει σε ποιον ομιλητή). Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο που βασίζεται στον μετασχηματιστή, το οποίο αποτελείται από δύο ιεραρχικούς μετασχηματιστές. Χρησιμοποιούμε το ως μετασχηματιστή χαμηλού επιπέδου για να παράγουμε τοπικές αναπαραστάσεις εκφοράς και να τις τροφοδοτούμε σε έναν άλλο μετασχηματιστή υψηλού επιπέδου έτσι ώστε οι αναπαραστάσεις εκφοράς να είναι ευαίσθητες στο παγκόσμιο πλαίσιο της συνομιλίας. Επιπλέον, εκμεταλλευόμαστε ένα βοηθητικό καθήκον για να καταστήσουμε το μοντέλο μας ευαίσθητο σε ομιλητές, που ονομάζεται επαλήθευση ομιλητών εκφρασίας ζεύγους (η οποία στοχεύει στην ταξινόμηση του κατά πόσον δύο ομιλίες ανήκουν στον ίδιο ομιλητή. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, δηλαδή το EmoryNLP, το MELD και το IEMOCAP. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα προηγούμενα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek felismerése a beszélgetésekben (EDC) az érzelmek felismerése a beszélgetésekben, amelyek több beszélővel rendelkeznek. A hagyományos nem beszélgetéses érzelmek felismerésétől eltérően az EDC modelljének kontextusérzékenynek kell lennie (pl. az egész beszélgetés megértése, mint egy beszéd) és a beszélő érzékenynek kell lennie (pl. annak megértése, hogy melyik beszélgetés melyik beszédhez tartozik). Ebben a tanulmányban egy transzformátor alapú kontextus- és hangszóróérzékeny EDC modellt javasolunk, nevezetesen a HiTrans-t, amely két hierarchikus transzformátorból áll. A BERT-et alacsony szintű transzformátorként használjuk, hogy helyi kimondási reprezentációkat generáljunk, és egy másik magas szintű transzformátorba juttassuk őket, hogy a kimondási reprezentációk érzékenyek legyenek a beszélgetés globális kontextusára. Ezenkívül egy kiegészítő feladatot használunk ki arra, hogy modellünket hangszóró-érzékennyé tegyük, az úgynevezett páros hangszóró-ellenőrzés (PUSV), amelynek célja, hogy osztályozza, hogy két hangszóró ugyanahhoz a hangszóróhoz tartozik-e. Modellünket három benchmark adatkészleten értékeljük: EmoryNLP, MELD és IEMOCAP. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja a korábbi korszerű modelleket.', 'ka': 'Emotion detection in conversations (EDC) is to detect the emotion for each speech in conversations that have multiple speakers. განსხვავებული რედიციონალური არ-კონტრაციოლური ემოციონის განახლებისგან, EDC-ის მოდელი უნდა იყოს კონტექსტური განახლებელი (მაგალითად, ყველა პარამეტრების გაგრძნობას, არც ერთი პარამეტრების გაგრძნობას)  ამ დომენტში ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ტრანფორმების კონტექსტური და სიტყვების შესახებ მოდელს EDC-ს, ანუ HiTrans, რომელიც ორი hiერაქტიური ტრანფორმების შეფარდება. ჩვენ BERT-ს გამოყენებთ როგორც ცოტა-დონე ტრანფორმეტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტ დამატებით, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ დახმარებელი რაოდენობა, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის სიტყვების სიტყვების შეცდომა, რომელიც უნდა კლასიფიკარება თუ ორი სიტყვები იგივე სიტყვებისთვის. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის შესახებ სამი ბენქმარკური მონაცემების შესახებ, ანუ EmoryNLP, MELD და IEMOCAP. შემდეგ ჩვენი მოდელი წინა მოდელური მოდელების შემდეგ გავაკეთება.', 'lt': 'Emocijų aptikimas pokalbiuose (EDC) yra kiekvieno išraiško emocijos aptikimas pokalbiuose, kuriuose yra keletas kalbėtojų. Skirtingai nuo tradicinio nekonferencinio emocijų nustatymo, EDC modelis turėtų būti jautrus kontekstui (pvz., suprasti visą pokalbį, o ne vieną išraišką) ir jautrus kalbėjusiam asmeniui (pvz., suprasti, kuriam kalbėjusiam asmeniui priklauso išraiška). Šiame dokumente siūlome EDC, būtent HiTrans, kuriame yra du hierarchiniai transformatoriai, model į, pagrįstą transformatoriumi ir jautru kalbėjusiam asmeniui. We utilize BERT as the low-level transformer to generate local utterance representations, and feed them into another high-level transformer so that utterance representations could be sensitive to the global context of the conversation.  Be to, mes naudojame pagalbinę užduotį, kad mūsų modelis taptų jautrus kalbėtojui, vadinamas dviejų kalbėtojų patikra (PUSV), kuria siekiama klasifikuoti, ar du žodžiai priklauso tam pačiam kalbėtojui. Vertiname savo model į pagal tris lyginamuosius duomenų rinkinius, būtent EmoryNLP, MELD ir IEMOCAP. Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis atitinka ankstesnius moderniausius modelius.', 'it': "Il rilevamento delle emozioni nelle conversazioni (EDC) consiste nel rilevare l'emozione per ogni pronuncia nelle conversazioni che hanno più altoparlanti. Diverso dal tradizionale rilevamento delle emozioni non conversazionali, il modello per EDC dovrebbe essere sensibile al contesto (ad esempio, comprendere l'intera conversazione piuttosto che un'espressione) e sensibile all'oratore (ad esempio, capire quale espressione appartiene a quale oratore). In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello basato sul contesto e sugli altoparlanti per EDC, vale a dire HiTrans, che consiste di due trasformatori gerarchici. Utilizziamo BERT come trasformatore di basso livello per generare rappresentazioni di espressione locali e inserirle in un altro trasformatore di alto livello in modo che le rappresentazioni di espressione possano essere sensibili al contesto globale della conversazione. Inoltre, sfruttiamo un compito ausiliario per rendere il nostro modello di altoparlante sensibile, chiamato pairwise Yterance Speaker Verification (PUSV), che mira a classificare se due parole appartengono allo stesso altoparlante. Valutiamo il nostro modello su tre set di dati di benchmark, ovvero EmoryNLP, MELD e IEMOCAP. I risultati mostrano che il nostro modello supera i modelli precedenti all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Детектирање на емоции во разговорите (ЕДЦ) е да се детектира емоцијата за секој израз во разговорите кои имаат повеќе говорници. За разлика од традиционалната неконверзационална детекција на емоции, моделот за ЕДЦ треба да биде контекстно-чувствителен (на пример, разбирање на целиот разговор наместо еден израз) и говорник-чувствителен (на пример, разбирање на кој израз припаѓа на кој говорник). Во овој весник предложуваме контекстен модел базиран на трансформатори и модел чувствителен на говорникот за ЕДЦ, а тоа Хитранс, кој се состои од два хиерархиски трансформатори. Ние го користиме БЕРТ како трансформатор на ниско ниво за да генерираме локални репрезентации на изразот, и да ги внесеме во друг трансформатор на високо ниво за да репрезентациите на изразот можат да бидат чувствителни на глобалниот контекст на разговорот. Покрај тоа, ја искористуваме помошната задача за да го направиме нашиот модел чувствителен на говорникот, наречен двојно верификација на говорникот (ПУСВ), кој има за цел да класификува дали два изрази припаѓаат на истиот говорник. We evaluate our model on three benchmark datasets, namely EmoryNLP, MELD and IEMOCAP.  Резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот модел е поголем од претходните најдобри модели.', 'kk': 'Сөйлейтінде (EDC) көңіл көңіл байқау - бірнеше сөйлейтінде бірнеше сөйлейтінде әр сөйлейтінде емоцияларды анықтау. ЕДК үлгісінің кәдімгі аудармалы емес емоцияларды анықтау үлгісінен айырмашылық болу керек (мысалы, бір сөйлеменің орнына толық сұрақтарын түсіну) және сөйлеменің сезімсіздігін түсіну керек (мысалы, сөйлеменің қайс Бұл қағазда, ЕДК үшін түрлендірушілердің контексті және сөйлендірушілердің түрлендірушілердің сезімдік үлгісін таңдаймыз. Мысалы, HiTrans, екі иерархиялық түрлендірушіле Біз BERT деңгейіндегі төмен деңгейіндегі түрлендіруші ретінде жергілікті сөйлендіруді құру үшін және оларды басқа жоғары деңгейіндегі түрлендіруші ретінде қолданып, сөйлендіру жалпы контекст Сонымен қатар, біз өзіміздің үлгілерімізді сөйлейтінің көмекшілік тапсырманы қолдану үшін, екі сөйлейтінің бір сөйлейтінің қатынасын анықтау үшін қолданамыз. Өзіміздің үш банкмарк деректер қорларына - EmoryNLP, MELD және IEMOCAP деген үлгімізді оқу. Нәтижелер біздің үлгіміз алдыңғы орындау үлгілерін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan emosi dalam perbualan (EDC) adalah untuk mengesan emosi bagi setiap perkataan dalam perbualan yang mempunyai berbilang pembicara. Berbeza dari pengesan emosi tradisional yang tidak berbincang, model EDC patut sensitif-konteks (cth., memahami keseluruhan perbincangan daripada satu ucapan) dan sensitif-berbincang (cth., memahami ucapan mana yang milik pembincang yang mana). Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model yang berasaskan pengubah-konteks- dan speaker-sensitif untuk EDC, iaitu HiTrans, yang terdiri dari dua pengubah hierarkis. Kami menggunakan BERT sebagai pengubah tahap rendah untuk menghasilkan perwakilan perkataan setempat, dan memberi makan kepada pengubah tahap tinggi lain supaya perwakilan perkataan boleh sensitif kepada konteks global perbualan. Selain itu, kami mengeksploitasi tugas bantuan untuk membuat model berbicara sensitif, dipanggil pengesahan pembicara perkataan pasangan (PUSV), yang bertujuan untuk mengklasifikasi sama ada dua perkataan milik pembicara yang sama. Kami menilai model kami pada tiga set data benchmark, iaitu EmoryNLP, MELD dan IEMOCAP. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa model kita lebih berharga daripada model-state-of-the-art terdahulu.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഓരോ വാക്കുകളിലും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഓരോ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള അന സംസാരിക്കാത്ത വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, യെഡിസിയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dസിറ്റിവിഷയമായിരിക്കണം (ഉദാഹരണത്തിനാല്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d യെഡിസിയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നത് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതും ഹിറാര്\u200dട്ട്രാന നമ്മള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ലോക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d താഴെ മാറ്റുന്നതായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d വാക്കുകള അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നവന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സ്പീക്ഷണര്\u200d സ്പീക്ഷണര്\u200d സ്വീക്രീകരിക്കുന്നത് പ്യൂസ്\u200cവി എന്ന് വിളിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജോ മൂന്നു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡലു', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-emozzjonijiet fil-konverżjonijiet (EDC) hija li tiġi skoperta l-emozzjoni għal kull espressjoni fil-konverżjonijiet li għandhom diversi kelliema. B’differenza mill-identifikazzjoni tradizzjonali tal-emozzjonijiet mhux konverżjonali, il-mudell g ħall-EDC għandu jkun sensittiv għall-kuntest (pereżempju, il-fehim tal-konverżjoni kollha minflok dikjarazzjoni waħda) u sensittiv għall-kelliem (pereżempju, il-fehim ta’ liema dikjarazzjoni tappartjeni lil liema kelliem). F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell sensittiv għall-EDC ibbażat fuq it-trasformatur u l-kelliema, jiġifieri HiTrans, li jikkonsisti minn żewġ trasformaturi ġerarkiċi. Aħna nużaw il-BERT bħala t-trasformatur ta’ livell baxx biex niġġeneraw rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-espressjoni lokali, u nagħmluhom trasformatur ieħor ta’ livell għoli sabiex ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-espressjoni jkunu sensittivi għall-kuntest globali tal-konverżjoni. Moreover, we exploit an auxiliary task to make our model speaker-sensitive, called pairwise utterance speaker verification (PUSV), which aims to classify whether two utterances belong to the same speaker.  Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell tagħna fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza, jiġifieri EmoryNLP, MELD u IEMOCAP. Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa ogħla mill-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati preċedenti.', 'mn': 'Дуудлаар ярилцдаг сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгох нь олон илтгэгчийн ярилцлаганд хэлэх бүрт сэтгэл хөдлөлийг мэдэх юм. Уламжлалт бус харилцааны сэтгэл хөдлөлөөс өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр байх ёстой. ЭДК-ын загвар нь харилцааны сэтгэл хөдлөл байх ёстой (жишээлбэл, нэг ярианы оронд бүх яриаг ойлгох) болон ярианы сэтгэл хөдлөл (жишээ нь хэ Энэ цаасан дээр бид EDC-д шилжүүлэгч дээр суурилуулагч, илтгэгчийн мэдрэмжтэй загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ бол HiTrans, энэ нь хоёр төрлийн шилжүүлэгч юм. Бид BERT-г бага хэмжээний шилжүүлэгч болгон орон нутгийн илтгэлийг бий болгож, тэднийг өөр өндөр хэмжээний шилжүүлэгч болгон ашиглаж, илтгэлийн илтгэлийг дэлхийн нөхцөлд мэдрэгдүүлж чадна. Мөн бид өөрсдийн загварыг илтгэгчийн мэдрэмжтэй болгохын тулд тусламжтай ажиллагааг ашигладаг. Энэ нь хоёр илтгэгчийн зөвшөөрөл (PUSV) гэдэг. Бид өөрсдийн загварыг гурван банк өгөгдлийн санд үнэлдэг. ЭмориNLP, MELD, IEMOCAP. Үүний үр дүнд бидний загвар өмнөх урлагийн загвар гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie emocji w rozmowach (EDC) polega na wykrywaniu emocji dla każdej wypowiedzi w rozmowach, które mają wielu mówców. W odróżnieniu od tradycyjnego wykrywania emocji niekonwersacyjnych, model EDC powinien być wrażliwy na kontekst (np. zrozumienie całej rozmowy, a nie jednej wypowiedzi) i wrażliwy na mówcę (np. zrozumienie, która wypowiedź należy do którego mówcy). W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model kontekstowy i głośnikowy oparty na transformatorach dla EDC, a mianowicie HiTrans, który składa się z dwóch transformatorów hierarchicznych. Wykorzystujemy BERT jako transformator niskiego poziomu do generowania lokalnych reprezentacji wypowiedzi i wprowadzamy je do innego transformatora wysokiego poziomu, aby reprezentacje wypowiedzi mogły być wrażliwe na globalny kontekst rozmowy. Ponadto wykorzystujemy zadanie pomocnicze, aby nasz model był wrażliwy na mówcę, zwane weryfikacją mówców parowych (PUSV), która ma na celu klasyfikację, czy dwie wypowiedzi należą do tego samego mówcy. Nasz model oceniamy na trzech zestawach danych referencyjnych, a mianowicie EmoryNLP, MELD i IEMOCAP. Wyniki pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa poprzednie najnowocześniejsze modele.', 'ro': 'Detectarea emoțiilor în conversații (EDC) este de a detecta emoția pentru fiecare rostire în conversații care au mai mulți vorbitori. Diferit de detectarea emoțiilor tradiționale non-conversaționale, modelul pentru EDC ar trebui să fie sensibil la context (de exemplu, înțelegerea întregii conversații mai degrabă decât a unei singure cuvinte) și sensibil la vorbitor (de exemplu, înțelegerea care cuvinte aparține cărui vorbitor). În această lucrare, propunem un model bazat pe context și difuzor sensibil pentru EDC, și anume HiTrans, care constă din două transformatoare ierarhice. Utilizăm BERT ca transformator de nivel scăzut pentru a genera reprezentări locale de pronunțare și pentru a le alimenta într-un alt transformator de nivel înalt, astfel încât reprezentările de pronunțare să fie sensibile la contextul global al conversației. Mai mult decât atât, exploatăm o sarcină auxiliară pentru a face modelul nostru sensibil la difuzor, numit verificarea difuzorului în pereche (PUSV), care are ca scop clasificarea dacă două pronunțări aparțin aceluiași difuzor. Evaluăm modelul nostru pe trei seturi de date de referință, și anume EmoryNLP, MELD și IEMOCAP. Rezultatele arată că modelul nostru depășește modelele anterioare de ultimă generație.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av følelser i samtaler (EDC) er å oppdaga følelsen for kvar uttale i samtaler som har fleire taler. Forskjellig frå den tradisjonelle ikkje-konvertasjonale emosjonske oppdaginga, må modellen for EDC vera kontekstsensitivt (f.eks. forståking av heile samtalen i staden for eitt uttale) og språk-sensitivt (f.eks. forståking av kva uttale høyrer til kva språk). I denne papiret foreslår vi eit transformeringsbasert kontekst- og sprøytebasert modell for EDC, som er HiTrans, som inneheld to hierarkiske transformeringar. Vi bruker BERT som den låg nivåtransformasjonen for å laga lokale uttrykk- representasjonar, og føre dei til ein annan høg nivåtransformasjon slik at uttrykk- representasjonar kan vera sensitiv til den globale samtalen. I tillegg bruker vi eit hjelpeoppgåve for å gjera vårt modell for å gjera det samme taler som er samme, kalla for å verifisera pare taler (PUSV), som måtar å klassifisera om to uttrykk høyrer til samme taler. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt på tre benchmarkdatasett, t.d. EmoryNLP, MELD og IEMOCAP. Resultater viser at modellen vårt utfører førre modeller for kunsten.', 'si': 'සංවාද (EDC) වලින් සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් හැම කතාවක්ම සම්බන්ධ විදිහට හොයාගන්න. වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් පාරමාණික නොවාර්ථික භාවිත හොයාගන්න, EDC වෙනුවෙන් මොඩල් සංවේදනය වෙනුවෙන් සංවේදනය වෙනුවෙන් සංවේදනය වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූ මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් අධාරිත සම්බන්ධයක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් EDC වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් සංවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකය කරන්න අපි BERT විශ්වාස කරනවා අඩු ස්ථානිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙන් ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ව තව අඩු ස්ථාන ස්ථ තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා අපේ මොඩල් ස්පීකර්-සංවේදනය කරන්න, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dර අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් තුන්දෙනුවෙන් අපේ මොඩේලය අගය කරනවා, එමෝරින්ල්, MELD සහ IEMOCAP. ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුරාවන් ස්ථානයේ කාර්ය', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqa hadallada (EDC) waa in la ogaado emoodka hadal kasta oo ku hadla hadal badan oo ku hadla. Midabka EDC waxaa haboon inuu ahaado mid aad u qalbi qabsato (tusaale ahaan garashada hadalka oo dhan ka duwan hal hadal) iyo xilsaar ku leh hadalka hadalka (tusaale ahaan garashada hadalka ka ku hadla). Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa muuqasho bedelka ah ee EDC, kaas oo ka mid ah labo bedelka hierarkiisa. Waxaynu BERT ugu isticmaalnaa bedelka heerka hoose si aan u abuurno noocyada hadalka deegaanka ah, waxaana u daajinaynaa wax kale oo beddelaya heer sare si ay noocyada hadalku ugu macaamiloon karto dabiicadda caalamiga ah. Moreover, we exploit an auxiliary task to make our model speaker-sensitive, called pairwise utterance speaker verification (PUSV), which aims to classify whether two utterances belong to the same speaker.  Tusaalkayaga waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa saddex sawirada bangiga, kuwaas oo ah EmoryNLP, MELD iyo IEMOCAP. Resultadu waxay muuqataa in modellkayagu uu sameeyo qaababka hore oo xaalada farshaxanka ah.', 'sv': 'Emotion detection in conversations (EDC) är att upptäcka känslor för varje yttring i samtal som har flera talare. Till skillnad från den traditionella icke-konversationella känslodetekteringen bör modellen för EDC vara kontextkänslig (t.ex. förstå hela konversationen snarare än ett ord) och högtalarkänslig (t.ex. förstå vilket ord som tillhör vilken talare). I denna uppsats föreslår vi en transformatorbaserad kontext- och högtalarkänslig modell för EDC, nämligen HiTrans, som består av två hierarkiska transformatorer. Vi använder BERT som lågnivåtransformator för att generera lokala yttranderepresentationer och mata in dem i en annan högnivåtransformator så att yttranderepresentationer kan vara känsliga för konversationens globala kontext. Dessutom utnyttjar vi en hjälpuppgift för att göra vår modell högtalarkänslig, kallad parvis uttömmande högtalare verifiering (PUSV), som syftar till att klassificera om två yttranden tillhör samma högtalare. Vi utvärderar vår modell på tre benchmark datauppsättningar, nämligen EmoryNLP, MELD och IEMOCAP. Resultaten visar att vår modell överträffar tidigare toppmoderna modeller.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima (EDC) je otkrivanje emocija za svaki govor u razgovorima koji imaju više govornika. Drugačije od tradicionalnog ne-konverzacionalnog otkrivanja emocija, model za EDC treba biti osjetljiv kontekst (npr. razumevanje cijelog razgovora umjesto jednog govora) i osjetljiv govornik (npr. razumevanje koji govor pripada kojem govorniku). U ovom papiru predlažemo kontekst i osjetljiv model govornika za EDC, a to je HiTrans, koji se sastoji od dva hijerarhijska transformacija. Koristimo BERT kao transformator niskog nivoa da bi stvorili lokalne predstave govora i nahranili ih u drugi transformator visokog nivoa kako bi predstave govora mogle biti osetljive na globalni kontekst razgovora. Osim toga, iskorištavamo pomoćni zadatak da bi naš model osjetljiv govornik, nazvan potvrda govornika na parovima (PUSV), koji je cilj da klasifikuje da li dve reči pripadaju istim govornikom. Procjenjujemo naš model na tri standardna seta podataka, a to je EmoryNLP, MELD i IEMOCAP. Rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi prethodne modele umetnosti.', 'ta': 'பேச்சுகளில் பல பேசுபவர்கள் இருக்கும் ஒவ்வொரு பேச்சிலும் உணர்வுகளை கண்டறிய உணர்வு. பாரம்பரிய பேசாதுபாட்டு உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதில் இருந்து வேறுபாடு, EDC க்கான மாதிரி சூழல் உணர்வுடையதாக இருக்க வேண்டும் (உ. ம், ஒரு சொல்லை விட முழு பேச்சைய இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் EDC க்கான ஒரு மாற்று சார்ந்த மாதிரி மற்றும் பேச்சு உணர்வுடைய மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது இரண்டு ஹைரேர பிரெட்டை குறைந்த மட்டத்தில் மாற்றமாக பயன்படுத்தி உள்ளூர் பேச்சு பிரதிநிதிகளை உருவாக்க, மற்றும் மற்றொரு உயர்நிலை மாற்றத்திற்கு உணவு செய்கி மேலும், நாங்கள் எங்கள் மாதிரி பேச்சாளர் உணர்வு செய்ய ஒரு செயலை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், ஜோடி விளக்கமான பேச்சு பேச்சாளர் உறுதிப்படுத்துதல் (PUSV) என்று அழை நாம் மூன்று பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், எமோரியான்எம்எல்பி, MELD மற்றும் I Results show that our model outperforms previous state-of-the-art models.', 'ur': 'مکالمات (EDC) میں احساس شناسایی ہے کہ ہر بات کے لئے مختلف صحبت کرنے والوں کے لئے احساس شناسایی کرنا ہے۔ سنتی غیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک تغییر دینے والی کائنات کی بنیاد رکھی ہے- اور اسپیکر-سنسیٹی موڈل کو EDC کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، یعنی HiTrans، جو دو حیراتریکی تغییر دینے والوں میں سے ہے. ہم BERT کو نیچے سطح کی تغییرات کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اسے محلی بات کی نمایش پیدا کریں اور اسے دوسرے بلند سطح کی تغییرات میں کھلائیں تاکہ کلام کی نمایش کلوب کی کنٹنسیٹ پر حساس ہو سکیں۔ اور اس کے بعد ہم ایک مدیر کام کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدیر speaker-sensitive بنا دیں، جسمانی بات صحبت کرنے والی تصدیق (PUSV) کا نام ہے، جس کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ دو باتیں ایک ہی صحبت کرنے والی ہیں. ہم تین بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہماری مدل کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، یعنی EmoryNLP، MELD اور IEMOCAP۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل پہلے کی حالت-آرتی مدل کو اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Суҳбатлар (EDC) da hisobot aniqlash - bir necha gapiruvchilar bor har bir so'zlarda hisobni aniqlash. Bu tabiiy talab qilmagan hissiyotni aniqlashdan har xil turli, EDC modeli tavsiya sensitive bo'lishi kerak, balki hamma suhbatni bir so'zdan o'rganish mumkin va gapiruvchi sensitive (m'eks, gapiruvchi gapiruvchiga ega bo'lishi mumkin). Bu qogʻozda biz EDC uchun o'zgartirish asosida va gapiruvchi sensitive modelni rivojlanamiz, bu ikkita hierarchik o'zgarishlardan iborat HiTrans. Biz BERT'ni qo'shimcha o'zgarishdan foydalanamiz, lokal so'zlarni tasavvur qilish uchun boshqa darajaga o'zgarishga ishlatamiz va gapirish qoidalari dunyo bo'lgan mazmuni muhit bo'lishi mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz modelimizni o'xshash, ikkita so'zlarni tasdiqlash (PUSV) deb nomlanishimiz uchun yetarli vazifani foydalanamiz. Bu ikkita so'zlar bir gapirga ega bo'lganligini aniqlash mumkin. Biz uchta benchmark maʼlumotlarimizni qiymatimiz, EmoryNLP, MELD va IEMOCAP. Natijalar bu modelimizning oldingi holatdagi sanalar modellarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện cảm xúc trong các cuộc nói chuyện (ECC) là để phát hiện cảm xúc của mỗi lời nói trong các cuộc nói có nhiều người nói. Khác với cách phát hiện cảm xúc truyền thống không có đối thoại, mô hình của ECC phải nhạy cảm với ngữ cảnh (v.d., hiểu to àn bộ cuộc đối thoại thay vì một lời phát âm) và nhạy cảm với người nói (v.d., hiểu ra lời nào thuộc về người phát ngôn nào). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình áp-đặt-biến-ra-ngữ-và-loa-nhạy cho Eddie, là HiXuyên, gồm hai bộ chuyển hóa cấp trên. Chúng tôi sử dụng BERT làm bộ máy biến đổi cấp thấp để tạo ra các biểu tượng phát âm địa phương, và chuyển chúng vào một máy biến đổi cấp cao khác để các biểu hiện giọng nói có thể nhạy cảm với bối cảnh to àn cầu của cuộc nói chuyện. Chúng tôi cũng tận dụng một nhiệm vụ trợ giúp để làm người phát ngôn kiểu mẫu nhạy cảm, gọi là sự kết hợp của người phát ngôn (POSV) để phân loại xem liệu hai phát biểu có thuộc về cùng một người phát biểu hay không. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi dựa trên ba bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, là EmoryN, MELD và IEMOCAP. Kết quả cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta đạt giới hạn tiên tiến.', 'bg': 'Откриването на емоции в разговори (ЕДК) е да открие емоцията за всяко изказване в разговори, които имат множество говорители. Различен от традиционното неразговорно откриване на емоции, моделът за ЕДК трябва да бъде чувствителен към контекста (напр. разбиране на целия разговор, а не на една реч) и чувствителен към говорителя (напр. разбиране коя реч принадлежи на кой говорител). В настоящата статия предлагаме трансформаторен контекстно-чувствителен модел за ЕДК, а именно който се състои от два йерархични трансформатора. Използваме БЕРТ като трансформатор на ниско ниво, за да генерираме местни изявления и да ги захранваме в друг трансформатор на високо ниво, така че изявленията да могат да бъдат чувствителни към глобалния контекст на разговора. Освен това използваме допълнителна задача, за да направим нашия модел чувствителен към говорителя, наречен верификация на говорителя по двойки (която има за цел да класифицира дали две изказвания принадлежат на един и същ говорител. Ние оценяваме нашия модел на базата на три сравнителни набора данни, а именно ЕморyNLP, MELD и IEMOCAP. Резултатите показват, че нашият модел надминава предишните най-съвременни модели.', 'nl': 'Emotiedetectie in gesprekken (EDC) is het detecteren van de emotie voor elke uiting in gesprekken die meerdere sprekers hebben. Anders dan de traditionele niet-conversationele emotie detectie, moet het model voor EDC contextgevoelig zijn (bijvoorbeeld het begrijpen van het hele gesprek in plaats van één uiting) en spreker-gevoelig (bijvoorbeeld begrijpen welke uiting bij welke spreker hoort). In dit artikel stellen we een transformatorgebaseerd context- en speaker-gevoelig model voor EDC voor, namelijk HiTrans, dat bestaat uit twee hiërarchische transformatoren. We gebruiken BERT als de low-level transformator om lokale uitingsresentaties te genereren en deze in een andere high-level transformator te voeren, zodat uitingsresentaties gevoelig kunnen zijn voor de wereldwijde context van het gesprek. Bovendien maken we gebruik van een ondersteunende taak om ons model speaker-sensitief te maken, genaamd pairwise äußering speaker verification (PUSV), die tot doel heeft te classificeren of twee uitingen tot dezelfde spreker behoren. We evalueren ons model op drie benchmark datasets, namelijk EmoryNLP, MELD en IEMOCAP. Uit de resultaten blijkt dat ons model beter presteert dan eerdere state-of-the-art modellen.', 'da': 'Følelsesløsning i samtaler (EDC) er at registrere følelser for hver udtalelse i samtaler, der har flere højttalere. I modsætning til den traditionelle ikke-konversationsmæssige detektion af følelser, bør modellen for EDC være kontekstfølsom (f.eks. forstå hele samtalen snarere end én udtalelse) og højttalerfølsom (f.eks. forstå hvilken udtalelse der tilhører hvilken taler). I denne artikel foreslår vi en transformer-baseret kontekst- og højttalerfølsom model for EDC, nemlig HiTrans, som består af to hierarkiske transformere. Vi bruger BERT som transformator på lavt niveau til at generere lokale ytringsrepræsentationer, og fodre dem ind i en anden transformator på højt niveau, så ytringsrepræsentationer kunne være følsomme over for samtalens globale kontekst. Desuden udnytter vi en hjælpeopgave til at gøre vores model højttaler-følsom, kaldet pairwise talerance speaker verifikation (PUSV), som har til formål at klassificere, om to udtalelser hører til den samme højttaler. Vi evaluerer vores model på tre benchmark datasæt, nemlig EmoryNLP, MELD og IEMOCAP. Resultaterne viser, at vores model overgår tidligere state-of-the-art modeller.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima (EDC) je otkrivanje emocija za svaki govor u razgovorima koji imaju više govornika. Drugačije od tradicionalnog ne-konverzacionalnog otkrića emocija, model za EDC treba biti osjetljiv kontekst (npr. razumijevanje cijelog razgovora umjesto jednog govora) i osjetljiv govornik (npr. razumijevanje kojem govorniku pripada). U ovom papiru predlažemo kontekst koji se temelji na transformaciji i osjetljiv model govornika za EDC, a to je HiTrans, koji se sastoji od dva hijerarhijska transformacija. Koristimo BERT kao transformator niskog nivoa kako bi stvorili lokalne predstave govora i nahranili ih u drugi transformator visokog nivoa kako bi predstave govora mogle biti osjetljive na globalni kontekst razgovora. Osim toga, koristimo pomoćni zadatak kako bi naš model osjetljiv govornik, nazvan potvrđenje govornika na parovima (PUSV), koji je cilj klasifikacije da li dvije riječi pripadaju istim govornikom. Procjenjujemo naš model na tri temeljne baze podataka, a to je EmoryNLP, MELD i IEMOCAP. Rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi prethodne modele umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Emotionserkennung in Unterhaltungen (EDC) ist die Erkennung der Emotion für jede Äußerung in Unterhaltungen, die mehrere Sprecher haben. Anders als bei der traditionellen Emotionserkennung ohne Konversation sollte das Modell für EDC kontextsensitiv (z.B. Verständnis der gesamten Konversation statt einer Äußerung) und speakersensiv (z.B. Verständnis, welche Äußerung zu welchem Sprecher gehört) sein. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein transformatorbasiertes kontext- und speaker-sensitives Modell für EDC vor, nämlich HiTrans, das aus zwei hierarchischen Transformatoren besteht. Wir verwenden BERT als Low-Level-Transformator, um lokale Äußerungsrepräsentationen zu generieren und sie in einen anderen High-Level-Transformator einzuspeisen, damit Äußerungsrepräsentationen für den globalen Kontext des Gesprächs sensibel sein können. Darüber hinaus nutzen wir eine Hilfsaufgabe, um unser Modell lautsprechersensibel zu machen, die sogenannte paarwise Äußerungsspeaker Verification (PUSV), die darauf abzielt, zu klassifizieren, ob zwei Äußerungen zu demselben Sprecher gehören. Wir evaluieren unser Modell anhand von drei Benchmark-Datensätzen, nämlich EmoryNLP, MELD und IEMOCAP. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell die bisherigen State-of-the-Art Modelle übertrifft.', 'ko': '대화 중 정서 검출(EDC)은 여러 말하는 사람의 대화에서 각 말의 정서를 검출하는 것이다.전통적인 비대화 정서 검측과 달리 EDC모델은 상하문이 민감해야 한다(예를 들어 한 말이 아니라 전체 대화를 이해하는 것)와 말하는 사람이 민감해야 한다(예를 들어 어떤 말이 어느 말하는 사람에게 속하는지 이해하는 것).본고에서 우리는 변환기를 바탕으로 하는 상하문과 말하는 사람의 민감한 EDC 모델, 즉 Hitrans를 제시했는데 이것은 두 개의 차원 변환기로 구성된다.우리는 BERT를 저층 변환기로 이용하여 국부적인 언어 표징을 생성하고 이를 다른 고층 변환기에 입력하여 언어 표징이 회화의 전체 상하문에 민감하게 한다.그 밖에 우리는 보조 임무를 이용하여 우리 모델이 말하는 사람에게 민감하게 하는 것이 바로 대화자 검증(PUSV)이다. 이 임무는 두 말이 같은 대화자에 속하는지 분류하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리는 세 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 우리의 모델, 즉 Emory NLP, MELD와 IEMOCAP를 평가했다.그 결과 우리의 모델은 이전의 가장 선진적인 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': 'Deteksi emosi dalam percakapan (EDC) adalah untuk mendeteksi emosi untuk setiap ucapan dalam percakapan yang memiliki berbilang pembicara. Berbeda dari deteksi emosi non-konversasi tradisional, model untuk EDC seharusnya sensitif-konteks (cth., memahami seluruh percakapan daripada satu ucapan) dan sensitif-pembicara (cth., memahami ucapan yang milik pembicara yang mana). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah model berbasis konteks- dan speaker-sensitif untuk EDC, yaitu HiTrans, yang terdiri dari dua transformator hierarkis. Kami menggunakan BERT sebagai transformator tingkat rendah untuk menghasilkan representation ekspresi lokal, dan memberi makan mereka ke transformator tingkat tinggi lainnya sehingga representation ekspresi dapat sensitif kepada konteks global percakapan. Moreover, we exploit an auxiliary task to make our model speaker-sensitive, called pairwise utterance speaker verification (PUSV), which aims to classify whether two utterances belong to the same speaker.  Kami mengevaluasi model kami pada tiga set data benchmark, yaitu EmoryNLP, MELD dan IEMOCAP. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa model kita lebih berharga dari model terbaik sebelumnya.', 'sw': 'Kugundua hisia katika mazungumzo (EDC) ni kutambua hisia kwa kila hotuba katika mazungumzo ambayo ina wazungumzaji wengi. Tofauti na kutambua hisia za kitamaduni zisizo za mazungumzo, mtindo wa EDC unapaswa kuwa na mtazamo wenye msingi (kwa mfano, kuelewa mazungumzo yote badala ya hotuba moja) na wazungumzaji wenye msimamo mkali (kwa mfano, kuelewa ni maneno gani yanahusika na mzungumzaji gani). Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza muktadha wa mabadiliko- na msemaji wenye hisia kwa EDC, yaani HiTrans, ambao ni pamoja na mabadiliko mawili ya kiuchumi. Tunatumia BERT kama mabadiliko ya kiwango cha chini ili kutengeneza wakilishi wa hotuba za ndani, na kuwafanya hivyo kuwa mabadiliko ya kiwango cha juu ili uwakilishi wa mazungumzo yanaweza kuwa makini kwa mazingira ya dunia ya mazungumzo hayo. Moreover, we exploit an auxiliary task to make our model speaker-sensitive, called pairwise utterance speaker verification (PUSV), which aims to classify whether two utterances belong to the same speaker.  Tutathmini mfano wetu kwenye seti tatu za bendera, kama EmoryNLP, MELD na IEMOCAP. Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inafanya mifano ya hali iliyopita ya sanaa.', 'fa': 'شناسایی احساسات در مکالمات (EDC) این است که احساسات برای هر سخنرانی در مکالمات با چندین سخنرانی دارند شناسایی کند. متفاوت از شناسایی احساسات غیر تغییر سنتی، مدل برای EDC باید احساسات متفاوت باشد (مثلاً فهمیدن کل گفتگو به جای یک گفتگو) و احساسات صحبت کننده (مثلاً فهمیدن کدام گفتگو به کدام سخنرانی تعلق دارد). در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل متغییر بر اساس متغییر و حساس سخنرانی برای EDC پیشنهاد می کنیم، به عنوان HiTrans، که از دو تغییر متغییر قانونی است. ما BERT را به عنوان تغییر دهنده سطح پایین برای تولید نمایش\u200cهای گفتگوی محلی استفاده می\u200cکنیم، و آنها را به یک تغییر دهنده سطح بالا تغییر می\u200cدهیم تا نمایش\u200cهای گفتگو به محیط جهانی صحبت حساس باشند. به علاوه، ما از یک کار کمک استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مدل\u200cمان را حساس\u200cکننده\u200cی سخنرانی کنیم، به نام ثابت کردن سخنرانی (PUSV) که هدف می\u200cدهد کلاس دهیم که آیا دو سخنرانی به یک سخنرانی تعلق دارند. ما مدل خود را در سه مجموعه اطلاعات صندوق ارزیابی می کنیم، یعنی EmoryNLP، MELD و IEMOCAP. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما مدل\u200cهای موقعیت هنر قبلی را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Duýdurmalarda (EDC) duýulyk aňlamak üçin bir näçe sözleri bolan sözleriň içinde bir duýulyk açmak üçin dir. Däpli taryşmaly duýgynyň deteksiýanyň üýtgeşik bolmadygyndan, EDC üçin nusgasy-duýdury (meselâ, sözleriniň ýerine ähli sözlerini düşünmek) we çykyş-duýdury (meselâ, sözleriniň nähili sözlerine degilýändigini düşünmek). Bu kagyzda, EDC üçin terjime eden bir kontekst- we sözleşici hasaplanjak nusgasyny teklip edip görýäris. Bu iki iýerarhiýaly terjime edendir. BERT'i düşük seviyede düşük düzenleyici olarak yerel ifade temsillerini oluşturmak için kullanırız ve onları başka bir yüksek seviyede düzenleyici olarak besleyiriz ki, sözlük temsilleri küresel konuşmanın küresel kontekstine hassas olabilir. Munuň üçin, biz nusgasymyzy çykyş-duýdury hasaplamak üçin bir kömek täbligini ulanýarys, diýip çarpyş sözleri (PUSV) barlamak üçin, bu iki sözleriň bir sözleriniň biri diýip sözleýändigini bejermek amaçladyr. Biz modelimizi üç benchmark sanatynda deňleýän çykýarys, ady EmoryNLP, MELD we IEMOCAP. Netijenler biziň nusgamyzyň öňki möhüm nusgalary çykarýandygyny görkezýär.", 'af': "Emotiese beskrywing in gesprekke (EDC) is om die emosie vir elke uitspraak in gesprekke wat veelvuldige sprekkers het om te beskry. Verskillende van die tradisionele nie-omskakelike emosie-ontdekking, moet die model vir EDC konteks-sensitief wees (bv. verstaan die hele gesprek eerder as een uitspraak) en sprekker-sensitief (bv. verstaan wat uitspraak aan watter sprekker behoort). In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n transformeerder-gebaseerde konteks- en sprekker-sensitief model vir EDC, naamlik HiTrans, wat bestaan van twee hierarkies transformeerders. Ons gebruik BERT as die lae vlak transformeerder om plaaslike uitspraak voorstellings te genereer, en voer hulle in 'n ander hoë vlak transformeerder sodat uitspraak voorstellings sensitief kan wees na die globale konteks van die gesprek. Ook, ons exploit 'n hulpbron taak om ons model sprekker-sensitief te maak, genoem pairwise uitspraak sprekker verifikasie (PUSV), wat doel om te klassifiseer of twee uitspraak aan dieselfde sprekker behoort. Ons evalueer ons model op drie benchmark datastelle, naamlik EmoryNLP, MELD en IEMOCAP. Resultate wys dat ons model voortgaan staat-van-kuns-modelles.", 'sq': "Detektimi i emocioneve në bisedime (EDC) është për të zbuluar emocionet për çdo shprehje në bisedime që kanë shumë folës. Ndryshe nga zbulimi tradicional i emocioneve jo-bisedimore, modeli për EDC duhet të jetë i ndjeshëm për kontekstin (për shembull, kuptimi i të gjithë bisedës në vend të një shprehjeje) dhe i ndjeshëm për zëdhënësin (për shembull, kuptimi i cilit shprehje i përket cilit flet). Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një model të ndjeshëm për EDC-në bazuar në transformues dhe fletues, veçanërisht HiTrans, i cili përbëhet nga dy transformues hierarkikë. Ne përdorim BERT si transformues të nivelit të ulët për të gjeneruar përfaqësime të shprehjes lokale, dhe t'i ushqejmë në një tjetër transformues të nivelit të lartë në mënyrë që përfaqësimet e shprehjes të mund të jenë të ndjeshme ndaj kontekstit global të bisedës. Moreover, we exploit an auxiliary task to make our model speaker-sensitive, called pairwise utterance speaker verification (PUSV), which aims to classify whether two utterances belong to the same speaker.  Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë në tre baza të dhënash, veçanërisht EmoryNLP, MELD dhe IEMOCAP. Rezultatet tregojnë se modeli ynë është më i lartë se modelet e mëparshme të moderne.", 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը հաղորդակցություններում (ԷԴԿ) զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումն է յուրաքանչյուր արտահայտության համար հաղորդակցություններում, որոնք ունեն բազմաթիվ խոսնակներ: Հատկապես ավանդական ոչ խոսակցական զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման, ԷԴԿ-ի մոդելը պետք է լինի կոնտեքստի զգացմունք (օրինակ, ամբողջ խոսակցությունը հասկանալը, ոչ թե մեկ արտահայտությունը) և խոսնակի զգացմունք (օրինակ, հասկանալը, թե որն արտահայտությունը պատկանում Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ԷԴԿ-ի վերափոխման կոնտեքստի և խոսացողի զգացմունքի մոդել, հատկապես Հիտրանսը, որը կազմված է երկու հիերարխիկ վերափոխողներից: Մենք օգտագործում ենք BER-ը որպես ցածր մակարդակի վերափոխող տեղական արտահայտություններ ստեղծելու համար և կերակրում ենք դրանք մեկ այլ բարձր մակարդակի վերափոխող, որպեսզի արտահայտությունները կարողանան զգայուն լինել խոսակցության գլոբալ կոնտեքստին: Ավելին, մենք օգտագործում ենք օգտագործող խնդիրը, որպեսզի մեր մոդելը խոսացողի զգայուն դարձնի, որը կոչվում է զույգ խոսացողի հավասարակշռություն, որը նպատակում է դասակարգել, թե արդյոք երկու արտահայտությունները պատկանում են նույն խոսացողին: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը երեք համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, հատկապես EmoreNLP, Մելդ և ԷՄՕԿՊ: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է նախորդ բարձրագույն մոդելները:', 'az': "Söhbətlər (EDC) içində emosiyalar keşfetməsi çoxlu danışanlar barəsindəki hər sözlərin emosiyalarını keşfetməkdir. EDC modelinin dəyişiklik hissləri təşkil etməsindən fərqli olaraq (məsələn, bir söz yerinə bütün söhbəti anlamaq) və söhbətçilik hissləri (məsələn, söhbətlərin hansı söhbətlərinə ait olduğunu anlamaq lazımdır). Bu kağızda, EDC üçün transformer-tabanlı kontekst-və danışmaq-duyarlıq modeli təklif edirik. Bu da HiTrans, iki hiyerarşik transformatçısıdır. Biz BERT'i düşük səviyyə transformatçısı kimi istifadə edirik ki, yerli sözlərin göstəricilərini yaratmaq və onları başqa yüksək səviyyə transformatçısına təmin edirik ki, sözlərin göstəriciləri küresel məlumatların məlumatlarına hiss edə bilər. Daha sonra, bizim modelimizi danışıcı-duyarlıq etmək üçün köməkçi bir işi istifadə edirik, iki sözlərin eyni danışıcının olmasını təsdiqləmək istəyirik. Biz modelimizi üç benchmark veri qurularında değerləşdiririk: EmoryNLP, MELD və IEMOCAP. Sonuçlarımız modellərin əvvəlki mövzunun modellərini göstərir.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima (EDC) je otkrivanje emocija za svaki govor u razgovorima koji imaju više govornika. Drugačije od tradicionalnog ne-konverzacionalnog otkrivanja emocija, model za EDC treba biti osjetljiv kontekst (npr. razumijevanje cijelog razgovora umjesto jednog govora) i osjetljiv govornik (npr. razumijevanje koji govor pripada kojem govorniku). U ovom papiru predlažemo kontekst na transformaciji i osjetljiv model govornika za EDC, a to je HiTrans, koji se sastoji od dva hijerarhijska transformacija. Koristimo BERT kao transformator niskog nivoa da bi stvorili lokalne predstave govora i nahranili ih u drugi transformator visokog nivoa kako bi predstave govora mogle biti osjetljive na globalni kontekst razgovora. Osim toga, iskorištavamo pomoćni zadatak kako bi naš model osjetljiv govornik, nazvan potvrda govornika na parovima (PUSV), koji je cilj da klasifikuje da li dvije reči pripadaju istim govornikom. Procjenjujemo naš model na tri standardna seta podataka, a to je EmoryNLP, MELD i IEMOCAP. Rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi prethodne modele umjetnosti.', 'ca': "La detecció d'emocions en converses (EDC) és detectar l'emoció per cada expressió en converses que tenen múltiples parlants. Diferent de la detecció tradicional d'emocions no conversacionals, el model d'EDC hauria de ser sensible al context (per exemple, entendre tota la conversa en comptes d'una expressió) i sensible al parlant (per exemple, entendre quina expressió pertany a quin parlant). En aquest paper, proposem un model basat en el contexte transformador i sensible a l'orator per a EDC, a saber HiTrans, que consisteix en dos transformadors jeràrquics. Utilitzem BERT com el transformador de baix nivell per generar representacions d'expressions locals i alimentar-les en un altre transformador de alt nivell per a que les representacions d'expressions puguin ser sensibles al contexte global de la conversa. A més, explotam una tasca auxiliar per fer el nostre model sensible a l'orator, anomenat Verificació de l'orator en parell (PUSV), que té l'objectiu de classificar si dues expressions pertanyen al mateix orator. Evaluam el nostre model en tres conjunts de dades de referència, a saber EmoryNLP, MELD i IEMOCAP. Els resultats mostren que el nostre model supera els models més avançats anteriors.", 'am': 'በአካባቢዎች ውስጥ የአፍሪካ ማግኘት (EDC) የሚቆጠሩ ብዙ ንግግር ያላቸው ለሁሉም ንግግር የሚደረጉትን እውቀት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ ከባሕላዊው ባሕላዊ ስብሰባ ማግኘት የተለየ፣ የEDC ሞዴል ለጽሑፍ-ስህተት (ምሳሌ፣ ሙሉ ጉዳዩን ከአንድ ንግግር ይልቅ ማስተዋል) እና ንግግር-አሳማሚ (ምሳሌ የትኛው ንግግር ለንግግር የሚገባው ማስተዋል). በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለኢ.ዲ ሲሆን ለኢ.ዲ.ሲ የተባለውን የፍትወት-ውጤት እና የንግግር-ተሳታፊ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ብኤርቴን ከታችኛው ደረጃ ለዋጭ እና የአገር ንግግር መልዕክቶችን ለመፍጠር እናደርጋቸዋለን እና ንግግር መልዕክቶች ለዓለምአቀፍ ውይይት እንዲያሳውቅ እናደርጋቸዋለን፡፡ ደግሞም ሁለትን ጥበበኛ የንግግር ተናጋሪ የሚያረጋግጥ (PUSV) የሚባል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በሦስት benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ ሞዴልናችንን እናስተዋልታለን፣ EmoryNLP፣ MELD እና IEMOCAP፡፡ Results show that our model outperforms previous state-of-the-art models.', 'cs': 'Detekce emocí v konverzacích (EDC) je detekce emocí pro každý výrok v konverzacích, které mají více řečníků. Odlišně od tradiční detekce nekonvoračních emocí by model EDC měl být kontextově citlivý (např. porozumění celé konverzaci spíše než jedné výslovnosti) a citlivý na řečníka (např. porozumění tomu, která výslova patří kterému řečníkovi). V tomto článku navrhujeme transformátorový kontextový a reproduktorově citlivý model pro EDC, konkrétně HiTrans, který se skládá ze dvou hierarchických transformátorů. BERT využíváme jako transformátor nízké úrovně k generování lokálních reprezentací výroku a přivádíme je do jiného transformátoru vysoké úrovně, aby reprezentace výroku mohla být citlivá na globální kontext konverzace. Kromě toho využíváme pomocného úkolu k tomu, aby náš model byl citlivý na mluvčí, nazývaného párové ověření mluvčího (PUSV), jehož cílem je klasifikovat, zda dvě výroky patří ke stejnému mluvčímu. Náš model hodnotíme na třech referenčních datových sadách, konkrétně EmoryNLP, MELD a IEMOCAP. Výsledky ukazují, že náš model překonává předchozí nejmodernější modely.', 'bn': 'কথোপকথনে (ইডিসি) বেশ কয়েকটি কথোপকথনে প্রত্যেক বক্তৃতার আবেগ সনাক্ত করার জন্য। ঐতিহ্যবাহী কথোপকথন না আবিষ্কারের অনুভূতির ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, ইডিসির মডেল কন্টেক্সেন্ট-সেন্টিভিস্ট (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, একই কথোপকথনের পরিবর্তে  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ইডিসির জন্য একটি পরিবর্তন-ভিত্তিক পরিস্থিতির প্রস্তাব করি- এবং বক্তৃপক্ষ-সংবেদনশীল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যার মধ্যে দুটি হিয় স্থানীয় ভাষণের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করার জন্য আমরা বিবেরেট ব্যবহার করি নীচের পরিবর্তন হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি এবং তাদেরকে আরেকটি উচ্চ পর্যায়ের পরিবর্তনে পরিণত করি যা এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের মডেলের কথাবার্তাকে সংবেদনশীল করার জন্য একটি প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবহার করি, যার নামে দুই কথাবার্তা একই কথাবার্তার অন্তর্ভুক্ত কিনা। আমরা তিনটি বেনকম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে আমাদের মডেল মূল্যায়ন করি, যেমন এমোরিএনএলপি, এমএলডি এবং ইমোকাপ। ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল পূর্ববর্তী স্টেট-অফ-শিল্পের মডেল প্রদর্শন করে।', 'fi': 'Emotion detection in conversations (EDC) tarkoittaa jokaisen puheen tunteiden havaitsemista keskusteluissa, joissa on useita puhujia. Perinteisestä ei-keskustelevasta tunteentunnistuksesta poiketen EDC:n mallin tulisi olla kontekstitunnistava (esim. koko keskustelun ymmärtäminen yhden lauseen sijaan) ja puhuja-herkkä (esim. sen ymmärtäminen, mikä lause kuuluu kumpaan puhujaan). Tässä työssä ehdotamme EDC:lle muuntajapohjaista konteksti- ja kaiutinherkkää mallia eli HiTrans-mallia, joka koostuu kahdesta hierarkkisesta muuntajasta. Käytämme BERT:tä matalan tason muuntajana paikallisten ilmaisuesitysten tuottamiseen ja syötämme ne toiseen korkean tason muuntajaan, jotta ilmaisuesitykset voisivat olla herkkiä keskustelun globaalille kontekstille. Lisäksi hyödynnämme aputehtävää tehdäksemme mallimme puhujille herkäksi, jota kutsutaan pariksi puhujaksi puhujan vahvistukseksi (PUSV), jonka tavoitteena on luokitella, kuuluvatko kaksi lausetta samalle puhujalle. Arvioimme mallia kolmesta vertailuaineistosta, EmoryNLP, MELD ja IEMOCAP. Tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu aikaisemmista huippuluokan malleista.', 'et': 'Emotsioonide tuvastamine vestlustes (EDC) on emotsioonide tuvastamine vestlustes, kus on mitu kõnelejat. Erinevalt traditsioonilisest mittevestluslikust emotsioonide tuvastamisest peaks EDC mudel olema kontekstitundlik (nt arusaam kogu vestlusest, mitte ühest sõnast) ja kõnelejatundlik (nt arusaam, milline sõnastus kuulub millisele kõnelejale). Käesolevas töös pakume välja trafopõhise konteksti- ja kõnelejatundliku mudeli EDC jaoks, nimelt HiTrans, mis koosneb kahest hierarhilisest trafost. Kasutame BERTi madala taseme trafona, et luua kohalikke kõneesindusi ja toita need teise kõrgetasemelisse trafosse, nii et kõneesindused võiksid olla tundlikud vestluse globaalse konteksti suhtes. Lisaks kasutame abiülesannet, et muuta oma mudel kõnelejatundlikuks, mida nimetatakse paarihäälse kõnelejate verifitseerimiseks (PUSV), mille eesmärk on klassifitseerida, kas kaks häält kuuluvad samale kõnelejale. Hindame oma mudelit kolme võrdlusandmekogumi alusel, nimelt EmoryNLP, MELD ja IEMOCAP. Tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel ületab varasemaid tipptasemel mudeleid.', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje čustev v pogovorih (EDC) je zaznavanje čustev za vsak izgovor v pogovorih, ki imajo več govornikov. Za razliko od tradicionalnega nepogovornega zaznavanja čustev bi moral biti model EDC občutljiv na kontekst (npr. razumevanje celotnega pogovora namesto enega izgovora) in občutljiv na govornika (npr. razumevanje, kateri izgovor pripada kateremu govorniku). V prispevku predlagamo transformatorsko-kontekstno-občutljiv model za EDC, in sicer HiTrans, ki je sestavljen iz dveh hierarhičnih transformatorjev. BERT uporabljamo kot nizko-nivojski transformator za ustvarjanje lokalnih predstavitev izgovorov in jih prenašamo v drug transformator na visoki ravni, tako da so predstavitve izgovorov občutljive na globalni kontekst pogovora. Poleg tega izkoriščamo pomožno nalogo, da bi naš model občutljiv za zvočnike, imenovan parična preverjanja govornikov (PUSV), katere cilj je razvrstiti, ali dva izgovora pripadata istemu govorniku. Naš model ocenjujemo na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov, in sicer EmoryNLP, MELD in IEMOCAP. Rezultati kažejo, da naš model presega prejšnje najsodobnejše modele.', 'he': 'זיהוי רגשות בשיחות (EDC) הוא לזהות את הרגשות לכל מילה בשיחות שיש להם הרבה רמקולים. שונה מהגילוי הרגשות המסורתית ללא שיחה, המודל של EDC צריך להיות רגיש לקונקסט (למשל להבין את כל השיחה במקום ביטוי אחד) ומרגיש לדבר (למשל להבין איזה מיטוי שייך לאיזה מדבר). בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל שמבוסס על קונטקסט ומדוגמן רגיש לרמקול עבור EDC, כלומר HiTrans, אשר מורכב משני שינויים היררכיים. אנו משתמשים בברט כמעבר רמה נמוכה כדי ליצור מייצגים מילויים מקומיים, ולהאכיל אותם למעבר רמה גבוהה נוסף כדי שייצגים מילויים יכולים להיות רגישים לקונקסט הגלובלי של השיחה. בנוסף, אנו מנצלים משימה נוספת כדי לגרום לדוגמא שלנו רגישה לדבר, שנקראת בדיקת דיבור בין זוגות (PUSV), שמתכוונת להקליף אם שני דיבורים שייכים לאותו דיבור. אנו מעריכים את הדוגמא שלנו על שלושה קבוצות נתונים רמזים, כלומר EmoryNLP, MELD ואIEMOCAP. התוצאות מראות שהמודל שלנו מוביל מודלים חדשים קודמים.', 'ha': "Zaɓi da shirin ayuka cikin majuyawa (EDC) shine ya gano hisia'in wa kõwane magana da ke da saurãren masu yawa. Di rarraba daga ganin hisia'ar da ba'a yi magana ba, shirin EDC ya kamata ya zama mai muhimmi (misali, ka fahimta mazaɓa duk a lokaci ko kuma ya yi muhimmi da mai magana (misali, da fahimta wanda na faɗi na da shi). Ga wannan takardan, muna goyyar da wata misãla mai shige-da-mai saurãre wa EDC, kamar HiTrans, wanda ke ƙunsa da juyin ta biyu. Tuna amfani da BERT kamar wata shishi mai ƙas ƙanci ga-daraja dõmin ka sami magana mai lokal, kuma Mu kiyaye su zuwa wani shishi mai dabar-daban da ke sarrafa, dõmin a iya zama mai ganiya ga mazaɓa da mazaɓa. Kayya, za mu yi amfani da wani aikin da za'a sanya misalinmu masu faɗi-mai saurari, wanda aka yi masa tabbatar da magana biyu masu bakwai-mazaɓa (PUV), wanda ke so, yana kasancẽwa ga fasalin ayuka biyu na kami da mai sauma. Kana ƙaddara misalinmu a kan danne-bayani uku, kamar EmoryNLP, MELD da IEMOCAP. Mataimakin ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana tafiyar da misãlai na zaman-halin-sanar.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo kalawartané (eD) iki dipeneksi kanggo nggawe langgar sapa pangalan ingkang sampeyan karo akeh spikere. lah Nang pepul iki, kita mudhun akeh kontext- basa gambar lan mungkerakno-senetif model kanggo eDK, nambah HiTra, sing dumadhi karo akeh sijerakis transformer Awak dhéwé ngéwangi BERT nganggo akeh barang kelas telas nang nggawe gerakan kelas telas dumadhi, lan nyimpen padha nganggo transformer liyane sing wis gantiné kanggo masalangno langkung dianteksi sing bisa kelas nang kontinubah global. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We assess the model we have on 3 bench dataset, namely EmaoryNLP, MEND and SEMOKAP. Modelan sing ngomong ke modellu kuwi banjure iso dianteke modellu state-of-the-arts', 'bo': '(EDC)གཏམ་གླེང་ནང་གི་སེམས་འཚོལ་རྟོགས་ན་སྐད་འདི་གཏམ་གླེང་པ་སྣ་མང་ཡོད་པའི་གཏམ་གླེང་ནང་གི་སེམས་འཚོལ སྔོན་སྲོལ་ནས་འཕགས་མེད་པའི་སེམས་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ནི་དང་འདྲ་བ་མཚུངས་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཁྲོད་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་BERT་ནི་ཉེ་ཆུང་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་མཁན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་མིག We evaluate our model on three benchmark datasets, namely EmoryNLP, MELD and IEMOCAP. གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོལ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'A Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model for Dialogue Breakdown Detection', 'ar': 'نموذج عصبي متعدد اللغات متعاون لاكتشاف انهيار الحوار', 'fr': 'Un modèle neuronal interlingual co-attentif pour la détection des ruptures de dialogue', 'es': 'Un modelo neuronal multilingüe co-atento para la detección de la ruptura del diálogo', 'pt': 'Um modelo neural multilíngue co-atencioso para detecção de quebra de diálogo', 'ja': 'ダイアログ故障検出のための同時注意力クロスリンガル神経モデル', 'zh': '以绝检之协同力跨语神经模形', 'hi': 'संवाद ब्रेकडाउन डिटेक्शन के लिए एक सह-चौकस क्रॉस-लिंगुअल न्यूरल मॉडल', 'ru': 'Совместно привлекательная кросс-лингвальная нейронная модель для обнаружения разбиения диалога', 'ga': 'Samhail Néaránach Thrastheangach Chomhaireach chun Miondealú a Bhrath faoi Chomhphlé', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A párbeszéd lebontásának felismeréséhez szükséges nyelvközös figyelemmel kísérő, többnyelvű neurális modell', 'el': 'Ένα συν-προσεκτικό διαγλωσσικό Νευρικό Μοντέλο για την ανίχνευση διάσπασης διαλόγου', 'it': 'Un modello neurale cross-linguale co-attento per il rilevamento delle interruzioni del dialogo', 'kk': 'Диалог бөлігін анықтау үшін бір- біріктірілген көшесілік невралдық модель', 'lt': 'Bendras aktyvus tarpkalbinis neurologinis modelis dialogo suskirstymo nustatymui', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് ബ്രെക്കോട്ട് ഡിറ്റേക്ക് ഡിറ്റിക്ടറിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു സഹജമായ ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മ', 'mn': 'Диалог Хувьсгалтын Хувьсгалтын Хувьсгалтын Сэтгэл Загвар', 'mt': 'Mudell Newrali Cross-Lingwali Ko-Attentiv għad-Detezzjoni tat-Tqassim tad-Djalogu', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Współuważny model neuronowy między językami do wykrywania załamania dialogu', 'ro': 'Un model neural interlingvistic co-atentiv pentru detectarea defalcărilor dialogului', 'sr': 'Kom-pozorni krstoLingualni neuronski model za otkrivanje razbijanja dijaloga', 'so': 'Dhiriikhda Breakdown', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En gemensam uppmärksam tvärspråklig neural modell för detektering av dialogbrytningar', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thần kinh thập-ngôn ngữ chung cho phát hiện chia sẻ ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Съвместен междулингвален неврален модел за откриване на разбивки в диалога', 'da': 'En co-opmærksom tværsproget neural model til dialog nedbrydning detektering', 'nl': 'Een Co-Attentief Cross-Linguaal Neural Model voor Detectie van Dialoog Breakdown', 'hr': 'Kome-pozorni krstoLingualni neuronski model za otkrivanje razbijanja dijaloga', 'de': 'Ein Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model zur Erkennung von Dialogabbrüchen', 'ko': '대화 중단 검출에 사용되는 공통 주의 언어 신경 모형', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Model Neural Cross-Lingual Ko-Atensif untuk Deteksi Breakdown Dialogue', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Neural wa Msalama wa Kuvunja Dialog', 'tr': 'Dialog Taýşartmaky üçin bir Taýtagry Çapraz Çaltylyk Niral Modeli', 'sq': 'A Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model for Dialogue Breakdown Detection', 'am': 'A Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model for Dialogue Breakdown Detection', 'hy': 'Միակտիվ միջլեզվային նյարդային մոդել, որը օգտագործում է դասախոսության բաժանման բացահայտումը', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Dialog Breakdown Detection üçün Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Kome-pozorni krstoLingualni neuronski model za otkrivanje razbijanja dijaloga', 'ca': 'Un model neuronal translíngua co-actiu per detectar el descomposició del diàleg', 'cs': 'Co-Attentivní crosslinguální neuronový model pro detekci poruchy dialogu', 'et': 'Kaasahelepanev keeleülene neuraalne mudel dialoogi jaotuste tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Samanaikainen kielienvälinen hermomalli dialogin hajoamisen havaitsemiseksi', 'jv': 'A co-Attentive', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'A Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model for Dialogue Breakdown Detection', 'sk': 'Soattentivni medjezikovni nevralni model za zaznavanje razčlenitev dialoga', 'bo': 'Co-Attentive Cross-Lingual Neural Model for Dialog Breakdown Detection'}
{'en': 'Ensuring smooth communication is essential in a chat-oriented dialogue system, so that a user can obtain meaningful responses through interactions with the system. Most prior work on dialogue research does not focus on preventing dialogue breakdown. One of the major challenges is that a dialogue system may generate an undesired utterance leading to a dialogue breakdown, which degrades the overall interaction quality. Hence, it is crucial for a machine to detect dialogue breakdowns in an ongoing conversation. In this paper, we propose a novel dialogue breakdown detection model that jointly incorporates a pretrained cross-lingual language model and a co-attention network. Our proposed model leverages effective word embeddings trained on one hundred different languages to generate contextualized representations. Co-attention aims to capture the interaction between the latest utterance and the conversation history, and thereby determines whether the latest utterance causes a dialogue breakdown. Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms all previous approaches on all evaluation metrics in both the Japanese and English tracks in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'pt': 'Garantir uma comunicação suave é essencial em um sistema de diálogo orientado por chat, para que um usuário possa obter respostas significativas por meio de interações com o sistema. A maioria dos trabalhos anteriores sobre pesquisa de diálogo não se concentra na prevenção da ruptura do diálogo. Um dos principais desafios é que um sistema de diálogo pode gerar uma expressão indesejada levando a uma ruptura do diálogo, o que degrada a qualidade geral da interação. Portanto, é crucial que uma máquina detecte falhas de diálogo em uma conversa em andamento. Neste artigo, propomos um novo modelo de detecção de quebra de diálogo que incorpora conjuntamente um modelo de linguagem multilíngue pré-treinado e uma rede de co-atenção. Nosso modelo proposto aproveita incorporações de palavras eficazes treinadas em cem idiomas diferentes para gerar representações contextualizadas. A coatenção visa capturar a interação entre o último enunciado e o histórico da conversa e, assim, determinar se o último enunciado causa uma quebra de diálogo. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo proposto supera todas as abordagens anteriores em todas as métricas de avaliação nas faixas japonesa e inglesa no Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 no IWSDS2019).', 'es': 'Garantizar una comunicación fluida es esencial en un sistema de diálogo orientado al chat, para que el usuario pueda obtener respuestas significativas a través de interacciones con el sistema. La mayoría de los trabajos anteriores sobre la investigación del diálogo no se centran en evitar la ruptura del diálogo. Uno de los principales desafíos es que un sistema de diálogo puede generar un enunciado no deseado que lleve a una ruptura del diálogo, lo que degrada la calidad general de la interacción. Por lo tanto, es crucial que una máquina detecte interrupciones en el diálogo en una conversación en curso. En este artículo, proponemos un novedoso modelo de detección de ruptura del diálogo que incorpora conjuntamente un modelo de lenguaje multilingüe preentrenado y una red de co-atención. Nuestro modelo propuesto aprovecha la incorporación eficaz de palabras capacitadas en cien idiomas diferentes para generar representaciones contextualizadas. La atención conjunta tiene como objetivo capturar la interacción entre el último enunciado y el historial de conversación y, por lo tanto, determina si el último enunciado provoca una ruptura del diálogo. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto supera todos los enfoques anteriores en todas las métricas de evaluación, tanto en japonés como en inglés, en Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 en IWSDS2019).', 'ar': 'يعد ضمان الاتصال السلس أمرًا ضروريًا في نظام الحوار الموجه نحو الدردشة ، بحيث يمكن للمستخدم الحصول على ردود ذات مغزى من خلال التفاعلات مع النظام. لا تركز معظم الأعمال السابقة على أبحاث الحوار على منع انهيار الحوار. يتمثل أحد التحديات الرئيسية في أن نظام الحوار قد يولد كلامًا غير مرغوب فيه يؤدي إلى انهيار الحوار ، مما يقلل من جودة التفاعل الإجمالية. ومن ثم ، فمن الأهمية بمكان أن تكتشف الآلة أعطال الحوار في محادثة مستمرة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا لاكتشاف انهيار الحوار الذي يشتمل بشكل مشترك على نموذج لغوي متعدد اللغات تم اختباره مسبقًا وشبكة انتباه مشترك. يستفيد نموذجنا المقترح من حفلات الزفاف الفعالة للكلمات المدربة على مائة لغة مختلفة لإنشاء تمثيلات حسب السياق. يهدف الاهتمام المشترك إلى التقاط التفاعل بين الحديث الأخير وسجل المحادثة ، وبالتالي تحديد ما إذا كان الحديث الأخير يتسبب في انهيار الحوار. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا المقترح يتفوق في الأداء على جميع الأساليب السابقة في جميع مقاييس التقييم في كل من المسارين الياباني والإنجليزي في Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 في IWSDS2019).', 'fr': "Il est essentiel d'assurer une communication fluide dans un système de dialogue axé sur le chat, afin que l'utilisateur puisse obtenir des réponses significatives par le biais d'interactions avec le système. La plupart des travaux antérieurs sur la recherche sur le dialogue ne se concentrent pas sur la prévention de la rupture L'un des principaux défis est qu'un système de dialogue peut générer un énoncé indésirable entraînant une rupture du dialogue, ce qui dégrade la qualité globale de l'interaction. Il est donc crucial pour une machine de détecter les ruptures de dialogue dans une conversation en cours. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau modèle de détection de rupture de dialogue qui intègre conjointement un modèle linguistique multilingue préformé et un réseau de co-attention. Le modèle que nous proposons exploite des intégrations de mots efficaces formées dans une centaine de langues différentes pour générer des représentations contextualisées. La co-attention vise à capturer l'interaction entre le dernier énoncé et l'historique de la conversation, et à déterminer ainsi si le dernier énoncé provoque une rupture du dialogue. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle proposé surpasse toutes les approches précédentes sur toutes les mesures d'évaluation dans les pistes en japonais et en anglais dans Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 à l'IWSDS2019).", 'ja': 'チャット指向の対話システムでは、ユーザーがシステムとのやり取りを通じて有意義な応答を得ることができるように、スムーズなコミュニケーションを確保することが不可欠です。 対話研究に関する以前の仕事のほとんどは、対話の破綻を防ぐことに焦点を当てていない。 対話システムが望ましくない発話を生成し、対話の破綻につながり、全体的な相互作用の質が低下することが大きな課題の1つです。 したがって、機械が進行中の会話でダイアログの故障を検出することが重要です。 本稿では，事前に訓練されたクロスリンガル言語モデルと共関心ネットワークを共同で取り入れた，新規の対話破綻検出モデルを提案する． 私たちの提案するモデルは、100種類の言語でトレーニングされた効果的な単語埋め込みを活用して、コンテキスト化された表現を生成します。 共同注目は、最新の発話と会話履歴の間の相互作用を把握し、それによって最新の発話が対話の破綻を引き起こすかどうかを判断することを目的としています。 実験結果は、Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 （ DBDC 4 at IWSDS 2019 ）の日本語と英語の両方のトラックで、提案されたモデルが、すべての評価指標に関する以前のアプローチを上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '聊天之对,保流通之信至重,则用户可以相应也。 大抵前言事不侧重于防其破裂。 其一要者,言统或生不欲之言,致言绝,而减其交质。 故其于机器也,检之于言也,绝之于言也。 本文设合预训练的言语模形和同注意力网络的对话分解检测。 吾言模形一百种异言有效,以成上下文化。 共注旨于获最新语历史记录之交,以定最新语之绝也。 实验结果表明,吾等言形故障检挑战4(IWSDS2019之DBDC4),于日语、英语轨道所有评估指标皆优于所有前法。', 'hi': 'एक चैट-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणाली में चिकनी संचार सुनिश्चित करना आवश्यक है, ताकि उपयोगकर्ता सिस्टम के साथ बातचीत के माध्यम से सार्थक प्रतिक्रियाएं प्राप्त कर सके। संवाद अनुसंधान पर अधिकांश पूर्व कार्य संवाद टूटने को रोकने पर ध्यान केंद्रित नहीं करता है। प्रमुख चुनौतियों में से एक यह है कि एक संवाद प्रणाली एक अवांछित उच्चारण उत्पन्न कर सकती है जो एक संवाद टूटने के लिए अग्रणी है, जो समग्र बातचीत की गुणवत्ता को नीचा दिखाती है। इसलिए, एक मशीन के लिए चल रही बातचीत में संवाद टूटने का पता लगाना महत्वपूर्ण है। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास संवाद ब्रेकडाउन डिटेक्शन मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें संयुक्त रूप से एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित क्रॉस-भाषी भाषा मॉडल और एक सह-ध्यान नेटवर्क शामिल है। हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक सौ अलग-अलग भाषाओं पर प्रशिक्षित प्रभावी शब्द एम्बेडिंग का लाभ उठाता है। सह-ध्यान का उद्देश्य नवीनतम कथन और वार्तालाप इतिहास के बीच बातचीत को कैप्चर करना है, और इस प्रकार यह निर्धारित करता है कि नवीनतम कथन संवाद टूटने का कारण बनता है या नहीं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल संवाद ब्रेकडाउन डिटेक्शन चैलेंज 4 (IWSDS2019 में DBDC4) में जापानी और अंग्रेजी दोनों पटरियों में सभी मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक पर सभी पिछले दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Обеспечение бесперебойного общения имеет важное значение в чат-ориентированной диалоговой системе, так что пользователь может получить значимые ответы через взаимодействие с системой. Большая часть предыдущей работы по исследованию диалога не сосредоточена на предотвращении срыва диалога. Одна из основных проблем заключается в том, что система диалога может генерировать нежелательные высказывания, приводящие к разрыву диалога, что ухудшает общее качество взаимодействия. Следовательно, очень важно, чтобы машина обнаруживала сбои диалога в текущем разговоре. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую модель обнаружения разрыва диалога, которая совместно включает в себя предварительно обученную модель межязыкового языка и сеть совместного внимания. Наша предлагаемая модель использует эффективные вставки слов, обученные на ста различных языках, чтобы генерировать контекстуализированные представления. Совместное внимание направлено на то, чтобы зафиксировать взаимодействие между последним высказыванием и историей разговора и тем самым определить, является ли последнее высказывание причиной разрыва диалога. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша предлагаемая модель превосходит все предыдущие подходы по всем оценочным показателям как на японском, так и на английском языках в задаче 4 обнаружения разбивки на диалоги (DBDC4 на IWSDS2019).', 'ga': 'Tá sé ríthábhachtach cumarsáid mhín a chinntiú i gcóras comhrá-dhírithe, ionas gur féidir le húsáideoir freagraí ciallmhara a fháil trí idirghníomhaíochtaí leis an gcóras. Ní dhíríonn an chuid is mó den obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar thaighde idirphlé ar chliseadh idirphlé a chosc. Ceann de na mórdhúshláin is ea go bhféadfadh córas idirphlé a ghiniúint chaint neamh-inmhianaithe as a dtiocfaidh cliseadh idirphlé, rud a dhíghrádaíonn cáilíocht iomlán na hidirghníomhaíochta. Mar sin, tá sé ríthábhachtach do mheaisín cliseadh idirphlé a bhrath i gcomhrá leanúnach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla nua braite miondealaithe idirphlé a ionchorpraíonn i gcomhpháirt múnla teanga tras-teanga réamhoilte agus líonra comhaire. Déanann ár múnla molta giaráil le neadú focal éifeachtach atá oilte ar céad teanga éagsúil chun léiriúcháin comhthéacsaithe a ghiniúint. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an gcomhaire an t-idirghníomhú idir an chaint is déanaí agus stair an chomhrá a ghabháil, agus ar an mbealach sin socraítear cé acu an bhfuil an chaint is déanaí ina chúis le briseadh idirphlé. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár múnla molta gach cur chuige roimhe seo ar gach méadracht mheastóireachta i rianta na Seapáine agus an Bhéarla araon i nDúshlán Braite Miondealaithe Idirphlé 4 (DBDC4 ag IWSDS2019).', 'hu': 'A zökkenőmentes kommunikáció biztosítása elengedhetetlen egy csevegésorientált párbeszédrendszerben, hogy a felhasználó a rendszerrel való interakció révén értelmes válaszokat kaphasson. A párbeszédkutatással kapcsolatos korábbi munka többsége nem a párbeszéd lebontásának megakadályozására összpontosít. Az egyik legnagyobb kihívás az, hogy egy párbeszédrendszer nem kívánt kimondást hozhat létre, ami a párbeszéd meghibásodásához vezet, ami rontja az interakció minőségét. Ezért kulcsfontosságú, hogy egy gép észlelje a párbeszéd hibáit egy folyamatban lévő beszélgetés során. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új párbeszédbontás felismerési modellt javasolunk, amely együttesen magában foglal egy előkészített nyelvi modellt és egy közös figyelemmel kísérő hálózatot. Javasolt modellünk száz különböző nyelven képzett hatékony szóbeágyazásokat használ a kontextuális reprezentációk létrehozására. A közös figyelem célja, hogy megragadja a legújabb beszélgetések és a beszélgetéstörténet közötti interakciót, és ezáltal meghatározza, hogy a legújabb beszélgetés okoz-e párbeszédzavart. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk minden korábbi megközelítést felülmúlja mind a japán, mind az angol nyelvű pályákon a Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'el': 'Η εξασφάλιση ομαλής επικοινωνίας είναι απαραίτητη σε ένα σύστημα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο στη συνομιλία, έτσι ώστε ένας χρήστης να μπορεί να λάβει ουσιαστικές απαντήσεις μέσω αλληλεπιδράσεων με το σύστημα. Οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες εργασίες σχετικά με την έρευνα διαλόγου δεν επικεντρώνονται στην πρόληψη της κατάρρευσης του διαλόγου. Μία από τις μεγαλύτερες προκλήσεις είναι ότι ένα σύστημα διαλόγου μπορεί να δημιουργήσει ανεπιθύμητες εκφράσεις που οδηγούν σε διακοπή διαλόγου, γεγονός που υποβαθμίζει τη συνολική ποιότητα αλληλεπίδρασης. Ως εκ τούτου, είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για μια μηχανή να ανιχνεύει βλάβες διαλόγου σε μια συνεχιζόμενη συζήτηση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο ανίχνευσης διάσπασης διαλόγου που ενσωματώνει από κοινού ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο και ένα δίκτυο συμπαράστασης. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο αξιοποιεί αποτελεσματικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων εκπαιδευμένες σε εκατό διαφορετικές γλώσσες για να δημιουργήσει αναπαραστάσεις με βάση το πλαίσιο. Στόχος του είναι να συλλάβει την αλληλεπίδραση μεταξύ της τελευταίας ομιλίας και του ιστορικού συνομιλίας και έτσι να καθορίσει αν η τελευταία ομιλία προκαλεί διακοπή διαλόγου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά όλες τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις σε όλες τις μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης τόσο στην ιαπωνική όσο και στην αγγλική διαδρομή στην πρόκληση ανίχνευσης διαλόγων 4 (στο IWSDS2019).', 'ka': 'სწორი კომუნიკაციის დასრულება ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია ფარატის ორიენტირებული დიალოგის სისტემაში, რადგან მომხმარებელი შეუძლიათ სისტემას ინტერფექციებით გამოყენებ დიალოგის კვლევაზე უფრო წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო არ იყენებს დიალოგის გაშვებაზე. ერთი დიალოგის სისტემა შესაძლებელია, რომ დიალოგის შესაძლებელია არაზღვრებული სიტყვების შექმნა, რომელიც დიალოგის გარეშე, რომელიც უფრო გარეშე ინტერფექციის კაalitეტის გა ამიტომ, მაქსინის განსახულება დიალოგის გარეშე განსახულებელი პარამეტრებში მნიშვნელოვანია. ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ მინდა პრომენტური დიალოგის განვიცემების მოდელი, რომელიც ერთადერთად შეიყვანეთ მრავალური ენის მოდელი და ერთადერთი ინტერნეციის ქსელი. ჩვენი მოდელეში ეფექტიური სიტყვების ინბექტირებას 100 განსხვავებული ენების შექმნა კონტექსტუალური გამოსახულებების შექმნა. ერთადერთი გონიშვნელობის მიზეზია, რომ ახალი სიტყვების და საუბრო ისტორიის შორის ინტერფექციას დააკვირთოთ, და ამიტომ განსაზღვრება, თუ ახალი სიტყვები დიალოგის გა ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება ყველა წინ გავაკეთებული მეტრიკის ყველა გავაკეთებული მეტრიკის წაპონი და ინგლისური სიტყვებში დიალოგის გავაკეთება გავაკეთება 4-ში (DBD', 'it': "Garantire una comunicazione fluida è essenziale in un sistema di dialogo orientato alla chat, in modo che un utente possa ottenere risposte significative attraverso interazioni con il sistema. La maggior parte dei lavori precedenti sulla ricerca sul dialogo non si concentra sulla prevenzione della rottura del dialogo. Una delle sfide principali è che un sistema di dialogo può generare un'espressione indesiderata che porta a un fallimento del dialogo, che degrada la qualità generale dell'interazione. Pertanto, è fondamentale per una macchina rilevare i guasti del dialogo in una conversazione in corso. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo modello di rilevamento delle interruzioni del dialogo che incorpora congiuntamente un modello linguistico multilingue pre-addestrato e una rete di co-attenzione. Il nostro modello proposto sfrutta efficaci embedding di parole addestrati su cento lingue diverse per generare rappresentazioni contestualizzate. La co-attenzione mira a catturare l'interazione tra l'ultima parola e la storia della conversazione, e quindi determina se l'ultima parola causa un crollo del dialogo. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello proposto supera tutti gli approcci precedenti su tutte le metriche di valutazione sia in giapponese che in inglese in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).", 'kk': 'Жүйелік қатынау арқылы пайдаланушының көмектесу диалог жүйесінде тәуелсіз байланысты құқықтау керек, сондықтан пайдаланушы жүйелік қатынау арқылы маңызды жауаптарды алады. Диалогты зерттеу үшін алдыңғы жұмыс диалог бөлігін бұғаттауға көмектесмейді. Ең маңызды мәселелердің бірі - диалог жүйесі таңдамаған сөйлесу диалог бөлігіне көмектеседі, бұл әрқашандағы әрқашамдылық сапатын көмектеседі. Сондықтан, жұмыс сұрақтарында диалог бөлігін анықтау машинасы үшін маңызды. Бұл қағазда, біз романдық диалогты түсіру үлгісін және біріктірілген тіл үлгісін біріктіреді. Біздің келтірілген үлгіміз контекстік түрлендіру үшін 100 тілде оқылған сөздерді ендіру мүмкіндігін көмектеседі. Соңғы сөйлеу мен сұрақ тарыхының арасындағы әрқашамдылығын түсіруге мақсат береді. Сонымен соңғы сөйлеу диалог бөлігін анықтайды. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері көрсетілген моделіміздің алдыңғы бағалау метрикаларының барлық жапон және ағылшын тіліктерінің 4- диалог бөліну табу шақырыбы (DBDC4 IWSDS2019- де).', 'lt': 'Siekiant užtikrinti sklandų ryšių palaikymą dialogo sistemoje, būtina užtikrinti, kad vartotojas galėtų gauti prasmingus atsakymus sąveikaudamas su sistema. Dauguma ankstesnių dialogo mokslinių tyrimų metu daugiausia dėmesio skiriama dialogo suskaidymo prevencijai. Vienas pagrindinių iššūkių yra tai, kad dialogo sistema gali sukelti nepageidaujamą išraišką, dėl kurios bus nutrūktas dialogas, o tai pakenktų bendrai sąveikos kokybei. Todėl labai svarbu, kad mašin a aptiktų dialogo nutrūkimus vykstančiame pokalbyje. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują dialogo suskirstymo nustatymo model į, kuris kartu apima iš anksto parengtą tarpkalbinį modelį ir bendro dėmesio tinklą. Mūsų siūlomas modelis sutelkia veiksmingą žodžių įterpimą, mokomą šimtu skirtingų kalbų, kad būtų sukurti kontekstiniai atstovai. Bendro dėmesio tikslas – užfiksuoti naujausio pareiškimo ir pokalbio istorijos sąveiką ir taip nustatyti, ar naujausias pareiškimas sukelia dialogo žlugimą. Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms all previous approaches on all evaluation metrics in both the Japanese and English tracks in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'ms': 'Memastikan komunikasi licin adalah penting dalam sistem dialog orient-sembang, supaya pengguna boleh mendapatkan balasan yang bermakna melalui interaksi dengan sistem. Kebanyakan kerja terdahulu dalam kajian dialog tidak fokus pada mencegah pecah dialog. Salah satu cabaran utama ialah bahawa sistem dialog boleh menghasilkan ungkapan tidak diinginkan yang menyebabkan kekacauan dialog, yang merusak kualiti interaksi umum. Oleh itu, ia adalah penting bagi mesin untuk mengesan pecahan dialog dalam perbualan yang sedang berlangsung. In this paper, we propose a novel dialogue breakdown detection model that jointly incorporates a pretrained cross-lingual language model and a co-attention network.  Model kami yang diusulkan menggunakan penyembedding perkataan yang efektif dilatih dalam seratus bahasa yang berbeza untuk menghasilkan perwakilan kontekstualisasi. Perhatian sama bermaksud untuk menangkap interaksi antara ungkapan terbaru dan sejarah perbualan, dan dengan itu menentukan sama ada ungkapan terbaru menyebabkan pecah dialog. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kami dilaporkan melampaui semua pendekatan terdahulu pada semua metrik penilaian dalam jejak Jepun dan Inggeris dalam Dialog Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 di IWSDS2019).', 'ml': 'സൌമ്യമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഒരു ഉപ ഡയലോഗ് പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മുമ്പുള്ള പണിയെടുക്കുന്നത് ഡയലോഗ് തകര്\u200dത്തുനിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണെന്നാല്\u200d ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വാക്ക് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത്,  അതുകൊണ്ട്, നടക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തില്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് തകര്\u200dന്നുപോകുന്നത് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു യന്ത്രം പ്രധാനമാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് ബ്രേക്ക് ഡിറ്റര്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച Our proposed model leverages effective word embeddings trained on one hundred different languages to generate contextualized representations.  ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത വാക്കും സംസാര ചരിത്രത്തിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഇടപെരുമാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുവാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d അവസാന വാക്ക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള എല്ലാ മാറ്റങ്ങളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, ജപ്പാനീസും ഇ', 'mt': 'L-iżgurar ta’ komunikazzjoni bla xkiel huwa essenzjali f’sistema ta’ djalogu orjentata lejn iċ-chat, sabiex utent ikun jista’ jikseb reazzjonijiet sinifikanti permezz ta’ interazzjonijiet mas-sistema. Il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti fuq ir-riċerka tad-djalogu ma jiffokax fuq il-prevenzjoni tat-tkissir tad-djalogu. Waħda mill-isfidi ewlenin hija li sistema ta’ djalogu tista’ tiġġenera dikjarazzjoni mhux mixtieqa li twassal għal diżastru, li jiddegrada l-kwalità ġenerali tal-interazzjoni. Għalhekk, huwa kruċjali li magna tiskopri l-ksur tad-djalogu f’konverżjoni kontinwa. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ identifikazzjoni tad-djalogu li jinkorpora b’mod konġunt mudell interlingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel u netwerk ta’ ko-attenzjoni. Il-mudell propost tagħna jiġġenera inkorporazzjonijiet effettivi ta’ kliem imħarrġa fuq mija lingwi differenti biex jiġġeneraw rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati. Co-attention aims to capture the interaction between the latest utterance and the conversation history, and thereby determines whether the latest utterance causes a dialogue breakdown.  Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell propost tagħna jwettaq l-approċċi preċedenti kollha dwar il-metriċi kollha ta’ evalwazzjoni kemm fil-binarji Ġappuniżi kif ukoll fl-Ingliż fl-Isfida ta’ Detezzjoni ta’ Analiżi tad-Djalogu 4 (DBDC4 fl-IWSDS2019).', 'mk': 'Осигурувањето на гласна комуникација е суштинско во системот на дијалог ориентиран на разговор, за корисникот да може да добие значајни одговори преку интеракции со системот. Повеќето претходни работи на истражувањето на дијалогот не се фокусираат на спречувањето на распадот на дијалогот. Еден од главните предизвици е дека дијалошкиот систем може да генерира нежелен израз кој води до распад на дијалогот, што го деградира целокупниот квалитет на интеракција. Затоа, клучно е машината да открие прекини на дијалогот во тековниот разговор. Во овој весник предложуваме нов дијалог за детективен модел кој заеднички вклучува предобучен меѓујазички модел и мрежа на ковнимание. Нашиот предложен модел влијае на ефикасни зборови вградени на стотина различни јазици за генерирање контекстуални претставувања. Совниманието има за цел да ја фати интеракцијата помеѓу последниот израз и историјата на разговорот, и со тоа да се одреди дали последниот израз предизвикува распад на дијалогот. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел ги надминува сите претходни пристапи на сите метрики на евалуација на јапонските и англиските патеки во дијалог Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 на IWSDS2019).', 'no': 'Om du sikker på glade kommunikasjon er nødvendig i eit samtaleorientert dialogsystemet, slik at ein brukar kan få meningstiltak gjennom samband med systemet. Dei fleste førre arbeida på dialogforskninga fokuserer ikkje på å forebygge dialogavbrudd. Ein av dei viktige utfordringane er at eit dialogsystemet kan laga eit uttrykk som fører til eit dialogavbryting, som avbrytar den generelle interaksjonskvaliteten. Dette er derfor viktig for å finna ein maskin avslutting av dialogvindauget i eit gjeldande samtale. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt dialogoppdagingsmodell som inkluderer samtidig eit krysspråk-modell og eit samtidige nettverk. Vårt foreslått modell leverer effektiv ordinnbygging som trengte på hundre ulike språk for å laga kontekstualiserte representasjonar. Komerksomheten må henta samhandlinga mellom den siste uttalen og samtalehistorien, og dermed bestemmer om den siste uttalen fører til ein dialogavbrudd. Eksperimentale resultat viser at vår foreslått modell utfører alle førre tilnærmingar på alle evalueringsmetrikar i både japanske og engelske spor i dialogoppdagingsutfordring 4 (DBDC4 i IWSDS2019).', 'pl': 'Zapewnienie sprawnej komunikacji jest niezbędne w systemie dialogu zorientowanym na czat, aby użytkownik mógł uzyskać znaczące odpowiedzi poprzez interakcje z systemem. Większość wcześniejszych prac nad badaniami nad dialogiem nie koncentruje się na zapobieganiu załamaniu dialogu. Jednym z głównych wyzwań jest to, że system dialogu może generować niepożądane wypowiedzi prowadzące do załamania dialogu, co pogarsza ogólną jakość interakcji. Dlatego kluczowe jest, aby maszyna wykrywała awarie dialogu w trwającej rozmowie. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy model wykrywania załamania dialogu, który wspólnie obejmuje wstępnie przeszkolony model językowy i sieć współuwagi. Nasz proponowany model wykorzystuje efektywne osadzenia słów przeszkolone na stu różnych językach do generowania kontekstowych reprezentacji. Co-attention ma na celu uchwycenie interakcji między najnowszą wypowiedzią a historią rozmowy, a tym samym określenie, czy ostatnia wypowiedź powoduje załamanie dialogu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz proponowany model przewyższa wszystkie poprzednie podejścia do wszystkich wskaźników oceny zarówno w japońskim, jak i angielskim torze Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 na IWSDS2019).', 'ro': 'Asigurarea comunicării fără probleme este esențială într-un sistem de dialog orientat spre chat, astfel încât un utilizator să poată obține răspunsuri semnificative prin interacțiuni cu sistemul. Majoritatea lucrărilor anterioare privind cercetarea dialogului nu se concentrează pe prevenirea destrămării dialogului. Una dintre provocările majore este aceea că un sistem de dialog poate genera o exprimare nedorită care duce la o degradare a dialogului, ceea ce degrada calitatea generală a interacțiunii. Prin urmare, este crucial ca o mașină să detecteze defecțiunile dialogului într-o conversație în curs de desfășurare. În această lucrare, propunem un nou model de detectare a defalcărilor dialogului, care încorporează împreună un model de limbaj translingvistic pre-instruit și o rețea de co-atenție. Modelul nostru propus utilizează încorporări eficiente de cuvinte instruite pe o sută de limbi diferite pentru a genera reprezentări contextualizate. Co-atenția își propune să surprindă interacțiunea dintre cele mai recente cuvinte și istoricul conversației, determinând astfel dacă cele mai recente cuvinte provoacă o rupere a dialogului. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru propus depășește toate abordările anterioare pe toate măsurătorile de evaluare atât în piesele japoneze cât și în limba engleză în Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 la IWSDS2019).', 'mn': 'Цахилгаан холбоотой байдал нь ярилцлагын системд чухал байдаг. Иймээс хэрэглэгч системтэй харилцааны аргаар утгатай хариулт гаргаж чадна. Дэлхийн судалгааны хамгийн өмнөх ажил диалогын ялгарлыг зогсоохын тулд төвлөрөхгүй. Хамгийн чухал сорилтуудын нэг нь диалог систем хэлэлцээгүй хэлэлцээг бүтээж чадна. Энэ нь ерөнхий харилцааны чанарыг бууруулж чадна. Тиймээс машин ярилцлаганд диалог хуваагдлыг олох нь чухал. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ диалог хуваалцах загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хэлний хэл загвар болон хамтран анхаарлын сүлжээг нэгтгэдэг. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь 100 өөр хэл дээр сургалтын үр дүнтэй үг бий болгодог. Хамтран анхаарлын зорилго нь сүүлийн яриа болон ярианы түүхийн хоорондын харилцааны хоорондын харилцааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хооронд Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар нь япон болон Англи хэлбэрийн Диалог Хувьсгалтын Шалбан 4 (IWSDS2019-д DBDC4) бүх хэмжээний тооцооллын тулд бүх арга загварыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'sr': 'Osiguranje glatke komunikacije je ključno u sistemu dijaloga orijentiranog na razgovor, tako da korisnik može dobiti smislene odgovore kroz interakcije sa sistemom. Većina prethodnog rada o istraživanju dijaloga se ne fokusira na sprječavanje razbijanja dijaloga. Jedan od najvećih izazova je da sistem dijaloga može stvoriti neočekivan reč koji vodi do razbijanja dijaloga, koji smanjuje ukupnu kvalitet interakcije. Stoga je ključno za mašinu da otkrije razbijanje dijaloga u nastavkom razgovoru. U ovom papiru predlažemo model za otkrivanje novog dijaloga koji zajedno uključuje prekršen prekršteni jezički model i komunikacijsku mrežu. Naš predloženi model utiče na učinkovito uključene reči na stotinu različitih jezika kako bi stvorili kontekstualizirane predstave. Supažnja je cilj da uhvati interakciju između najnovijih govora i istorije razgovora, i tako određuje da li najnoviji govor uzrokuje razbijanje dijaloga. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model iznosi sve prethodne pristupe na sve procjene metrike na japanskim i engleskim tragovima u izazovu otkrivanja 4. dijaloga (DBDC4 na IWSDS2019).', 'so': 'Si aad u heshid xiriirka fudud waxaa muhiim ah nidaamka talada, si uu isticmaaluhu u heli karo jawaabo faa’iido leh oo ku saabsan xiriirka nidaamka. Inta badan shaqo ka horeysan baaritaanka dialogka iskama saaro ka hortaga burburista dialogue. One of the major challenges is that a dialogue system may generate an undesired utterance leading to a dialogue breakdown, which degrades the overall interaction quality.  Sababtaas darteed waa muhiim in mashiinka la ogaado burburka dialogue marka la soconayo. Qoraalkan waxaynu horumarinaynaa model baaritaanka oo ku qoran qoraalka warqadda ah oo ku wada qoran muuqashada luuqadda afka kala duwan iyo shabakadda iskaashatada. Tusaale-ka la soo jeeday ayaa si faa’iido leh u qoraya hadal ku qoran boqol luuqadood oo kala duduwan, si ay u sameeyaan noocyo la soo bandhigayo. La-talinta waxaa loola jeedaa in uu qabsado xiriirka hadalka ugu dambeeyay iyo taariikhda hadalka islamarkaasna uu go’aaminayaa in hadalka ugu dambeeyay uu sababto labaad. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in modelkeeni la soo jeeday uu soo saaray dhamaan qaabab hore oo ku saabsan qiimeynta metriciyada oo dhan ee japaniya iyo Ingiriis tracks in Dialog Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'sv': 'Att säkerställa smidig kommunikation är viktigt i ett chattorienterat dialogsystem, så att en användare kan få meningsfulla svar genom interaktioner med systemet. Det mesta tidigare arbetet med dialogforskning fokuserar inte på att förhindra att dialogen bryts samman. En av de största utmaningarna är att ett dialogsystem kan generera ett oönskat yttrande som leder till att dialogen bryts ned, vilket försämrar den övergripande interaktionskvaliteten. Därför är det viktigt för en maskin att upptäcka dialogavbrott i en pågående konversation. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi en ny modell för identifiering av dialogbrytningar som tillsammans innefattar en förkränad språkmodell och ett nätverk för co-attention. Vår föreslagna modell utnyttjar effektiva ordinbäddningar utbildade på hundra olika språk för att generera kontextuella representationer. Samuppmärksamheten syftar till att fånga samspelet mellan det senaste yttrandet och samtalshistoriken och därmed avgöra om det senaste yttrandet orsakar ett dialogavbrott. Experimentella resultat visar att vår föreslagna modell överträffar alla tidigare metoder på alla utvärderingsmetoder i både japanska och engelska spår i Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 på IWSDS2019).', 'si': 'සුදුසු සම්බන්ධයක් පද්ධතියෙන් සංවාද පද්ධතියෙන් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඉතින් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක්ට පද්ධතියෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවය සංවාදය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ගොඩක් කලින් වැඩේ සංවාදය බිඳින්න අවධානය නොකරනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සංවාද පද්ධතියක් සංවාදයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් සංවාදයක් විනාශයකට ප්\u200dරශ්න ඉතින්, යන්ත්\u200dරයෙක්ට සංවාදයක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සංවාදයක් හොයාගන්න හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරත අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වෙනස් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු වචනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු වචන සම්බන්ධ අවධානය අවධානය අවධානය සහ කතාව ඉතිහාසය අතර සම්බන්ධයක් අල්ලගන්න, ඒ වගේම අන්තිම කියන්න සංවාද බිඳ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200d', 'ur': 'ہلکا ارتباط مضبوط کرنے کا ضرورت ہے ایک چاٹ-oriented диалог سیسٹم میں، تاکہ ایک کارساز سیسٹم کے ارتباط کے ذریعے معنی جواب حاصل کرے۔ ڈالیلوگ تحقیقات کے بارے میں بہت سے پہلے کام ڈالیلوگ برڈ ڈھونڈ کو روکنے پر تمرکز نہیں کرتا۔ سب سے بڑے چالوں میں سے ایک یہ ہے کہ ایک диалог سیسٹم ایک ناپسندیدہ کلام پیدا کرے جو ایک диалог ٹونڈ کی طرف منتقل ہوتی ہے، جس نے کل تعامل کی کیفیت کو کمزور کر دیا ہے. لہٰذا، یہ ایک ماشین کے لئے ضروری ہے کہ ایک ادامہ کی بات میں دائیلوگ ٹوٹ ڈونڈ کو پہچان سکے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نو ڈالیلوٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل ایک سو مختلف زبانوں پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے کہ متوسط نمونات پیدا کریں۔ اور اس کے ذریعہ سے اچھی بات اور صحبت تاریخ کے درمیان تعاملات کا ارتباط پکڑنے کا ارتباط ہے، اور اس کے ذریعہ تصمیم کرتا ہے کہ اچھی بات ایک صحبت کے بارے میں ہے. Experimental results show that our proposed model performs all previous approaches on all evaluation metrics in both the Japanese and English tracks in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'ta': 'எளிதான தொடர்புகளை சரிபார்ப்பது முக்கியமானது, ஒரு அரட்டை- சார்ந்த உரையாடல் முறைமையில், அதனால் பயனர் கணினியுடன் இணைப்புகள் மூலம் த உரையாடல் ஆராய்ச்சியில் பெரும்பாலான முன்னாலான வேலை முன்னாலானது உரையாடல் முறித்தலை தடுப்பதை  முக்கிய சவால்களில் ஒன்று என்னவென்றால் ஒரு உரையாடல் முறைமையில் ஒரு பேச்சு முறைமையில் உள்ள இடைவெளிப்பாட்டு தரம் குறைந்து  அதனால், நடக்கும் பேச்சில் உரையாடல் உடைவுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு இயந்திரம் முக்கியமானது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய உரையாடல் உடைவு கண்டுபிடிப்பு மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது ஒரு முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி  நூறு விதமான மொழிகளில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ள நமது முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வெளிப்பாடுகள் வார்த்தைகள சமீபத்தில் உள்ள பேச்சு மற்றும் பேச்சு வரலாற்றிற்கும் இடையேயுள்ள இடைவெளிப்பாட்டை பிடிக்கும் பொருள் மற்றும் பின்னர்  பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி அனைத்து முந்தைய முறைமைகளையும் வெளியேற்றுகிறது ஜப்பானிய மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்து தடங்களிலு', 'uz': "Name Dialogni tahrirlash uchun eng avval ishni muloqat oynalarni ajratishni foydalanish uchun foydalanmaydi. Mavzu muammolar biri - bu muloqat tizimi haqida o'zgartirilmagan so'zlarni yaratish mumkin. Bu oynalarni ajratish imkoniyatini butun interaction сифатini kamaytirish mumkin. Шундай қилиб, доимо гаплашувида dialog бутунларини аниқлаш учун муҳим мошина муҳим. Bu qogʻozda, biz yangi muloqat chiqarish modelini tahlil qilamiz va bir necha tildagi modelni birlashtirish mumkin. Bizning taʼminlovchi model yordamchilarimiz esa qo'llangan so'zlarimiz boshqa tillardan foydalanishga o'rganadi. Ko'rsatilgan tashkilotlarni yaratish uchun. Name Tajriba natijalari esa, taʼminlovchi modelimiz Yaponiya va ingliz tilidagi hamma narsalarni qiymatlashga bajaradi Dialog Breakdown Detection 4 Challenge (IWSDS2019 da DBDC4) davomida.", 'vi': 'Bảo đảm một cuộc giao tiếp ổn định là cần thiết trong một hệ thống đối thoại, để người dùng có thể có những phản ứng có ý nghĩa qua giao tiếp với hệ thống. Phần lớn công việc trước về nghiên cứu đối thoại không tập trung vào việc ngăn chặn sự sụp đổ. Một trong những thử thách lớn là một hệ thống đối thoại có thể tạo ra một lời phát âm không mong đợi dẫn tới sự sụp đổ của cuộc đối thoại, làm giảm chất lượng giao tiếp tổng thể. Do đó, rất quan trọng đối với một cỗ máy để phát hiện các sụp đổ cuộc đối thoại trong cuộc đối thoại. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình phát hiện lỗi thời của cuộc đối thoại mới, hợp với một mô hình ngôn ngữ khác nhau và một mạng đồng bộ. Cách mô hình đề xuất của chúng ta tác động hiệu quả sự nhúng từ được đào tạo trên một trăm ngôn ngữ khác nhau để tạo các biểu hiện hiện tranh luận. Trợ giúp nhằm nắm bắt sự tương tác giữa những phát ngôn mới nhất và lịch sử cuộc nói chuyện, và do đó xác định liệu những phát ngôn mới nhất có gây ra sự sụp đổ trong cuộc đối thoại. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu thử của chúng ta hoàn thành tất cả các phương pháp trước đó về tất cả các âm lượng đánh giá ở Nhật và Anh trong phần mềm Phần khai thác Phần lớn Giao Dịch Nửa 4 (DDC4 tại IWSDS99).', 'bg': 'Осигуряването на гладка комуникация е от съществено значение в чат-ориентираната диалогова система, така че потребителят да може да получи смислени отговори чрез взаимодействия със системата. Повечето предишни изследвания в областта на диалога не се фокусират върху предотвратяването на прекъсване на диалога. Едно от основните предизвикателства е, че диалоговата система може да генерира нежелано изказване, което води до прекъсване на диалога, което влошава цялостното качество на взаимодействието. Следователно е от решаващо значение машината да открива прекъсвания на диалога в текущ разговор. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов модел за откриване на разбивки на диалога, който съвместно включва предварително обучен междуезичен езиков модел и мрежа за съвместно внимание. Нашият предложен модел използва ефективни вграждания на думи, обучени на сто различни езика, за да генерира контекстуализирани представи. Съвместното внимание има за цел да улови взаимодействието между последната реч и историята на разговорите и по този начин да определи дали последната реч причинява прекъсване на диалога. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният ни модел превъзхожда всички предишни подходи по всички показатели за оценка както на японски, така и на английски език в Предизвикателство за откриване на разбивки на диалози 4 (DBDC4 в IWSDS2019).', 'nl': 'Zorgen voor een vlotte communicatie is essentieel in een chat-georiënteerd dialoogsysteem, zodat een gebruiker zinvolle reacties kan krijgen door interactie met het systeem. De meeste eerdere werkzaamheden op het gebied van dialoogonderzoek zijn niet gericht op het voorkomen van afbraak van dialoog. Een van de grote uitdagingen is dat een dialoogsysteem ongewenste uitingen kan genereren die leiden tot een storing in de dialoog, wat de algehele kwaliteit van de interactie aantast. Daarom is het cruciaal voor een machine om dialoogstoringen in een lopend gesprek te detecteren. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw detectiemodel voor voor dialoogafbraak dat gezamenlijk een vooraf getraind meertalig taalmodel en een co-attentie netwerk omvat. Ons voorgestelde model maakt gebruik van effectieve woord embeddings die zijn getraind op honderd verschillende talen om contextualiseerde representaties te genereren. Co-attention heeft als doel de interactie tussen de laatste uitspraak en de gespreksgeschiedenis vast te leggen, en zo te bepalen of de laatste uitspraak een dialoogstoring veroorzaakt. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model alle eerdere benaderingen overtreft op alle evaluatiestatistieken in zowel de Japanse als Engelse track in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 op IWSDS2019).', 'hr': 'Osiguranje glatke komunikacije je ključno u sustavu dijaloga orijentiranog na razgovor, tako da korisnik može dobiti smislene odgovore kroz interakcije s sustavom. Većina prethodnog rada o istraživanju dijaloga se ne fokusira na sprječavanje razbijanja dijaloga. Jedan od najvećih izazova je da dijalogski sustav može proizvesti neočekivan izraz koji vodi do razbijanja dijaloga, što smanjuje ukupnu kvalitet interakcije. Stoga je ključno da stroj otkrije razbijanje dijaloga u nastavku razgovora. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model otkrivanja dijaloga koji zajedno uključuje prekršen prekršteni jezički model i komunikacijsku mrežu. Naš predloženi model utiče na učinkovito uključenje riječi na stotinu različitih jezika kako bi stvorili kontekstualizirane predstave. Supažnja je cilj da uhvati interakciju između najnovijih govora i povijesti razgovora, i tako određuje da li najnoviji govor uzrokuje razbijanje dijaloga. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model iznosi sve prethodne pristupe na sve mjere procjene u japanskim i engleskim tragovima u izazovu otkrivanja otkrivanja 4. dijaloga (DBDC4 na IWSDS2019).', 'da': 'Det er afgørende at sikre en smidig kommunikation i et chat-orienteret dialogsystem, så brugeren kan få meningsfulde svar gennem interaktioner med systemet. Det meste tidligere arbejde med dialogforskning fokuserer ikke på at forhindre dialogbrud. En af de største udfordringer er, at et dialogsystem kan skabe en uønsket udtalelse, der fører til et sammenbrud i dialogen, hvilket nedbryder den overordnede interaktionskvalitet. Derfor er det afgørende for en maskine at registrere dialognedbrud i en løbende samtale. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny dialog nedbrydning detektion model, der i fællesskab inkorporerer en forudtrænet tværsproget sprogmodel og et co-opmærksomhedsnetværk. Vores foreslåede model udnytter effektive ordindlejringer trænet på hundrede forskellige sprog til at generere kontekstualiserede repræsentationer. Samopmærksomheden har til formål at fange samspillet mellem den seneste udtalelse og samtalehistorien og dermed afgøre, om den seneste udtalelse forårsager et dialogbrud. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores foreslåede model overgår alle tidligere tilgange på alle evalueringsmålinger i både japanske og engelske spor i Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 på IWSDS2019).', 'de': 'Eine reibungslose Kommunikation ist in einem Chat-orientierten Dialogsystem unerlässlich, damit ein Benutzer sinnvolle Antworten durch Interaktionen mit dem System erhalten kann. Die meisten vorangegangenen Arbeiten zur Dialogforschung konzentrieren sich nicht auf die Verhinderung eines Zusammenbruchs des Dialogs. Eine der größten Herausforderungen besteht darin, dass ein Dialogsystem unerwünschte Äußerungen erzeugen kann, die zu einem Dialogausfall führen, was die allgemeine Interaktionsqualität verschlechtert. Daher ist es für eine Maschine entscheidend, Dialogausfälle in einem laufenden Gespräch zu erkennen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges Erkennungsmodell für Dialogabbrüche vor, das gemeinsam ein vortrainiertes Sprachmodell und ein Co-Attention-Netzwerk umfasst. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell nutzt effektive Worteinbettungen, die auf hundert verschiedenen Sprachen trainiert wurden, um kontextualisierte Darstellungen zu generieren. Co-attention zielt darauf ab, die Interaktion zwischen der letzten Äußerung und der Gesprächsgeschichte zu erfassen und so festzustellen, ob die letzte Äußerung einen Dialogbruch verursacht. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell alle bisherigen Ansätze für alle Evaluationsmetriken sowohl in der japanischen als auch in der englischen Spur in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 am IWSDS2019) übertrifft.', 'fa': 'مطمئن کردن ارتباط مستقیم در یک سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ صحبت ضروری است، تا یک کاربر بتواند از طریق ارتباطات با سیستم جواب معنی را دریافت کند. بیشتر کارهای پیشینه روی تحقیقات محاورش تمرکز به جلوگیری از شکستن محاورش نمی\u200cکند. یکی از چالش های بزرگ این است که یک سیستم گفتگو ممکن است یک گفتگوی ناخواسته را تولید کند که به شکستن یک گفتگو رخ دهد، که کیفیت ارتباط عمومی را نابود می کند. بنابراین برای یک ماشین بسیار مهم است که در یک مکالمه ادامه می دهد شکستن گفتگو را تشخیص دهد. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل شناسایی دیalog جدید که با هم یک مدل زبان\u200cهای متوسط\u200cزبان و یک شبکه مشترک توجه را جمع می\u200cکند. مدل پیشنهاد ما برای تولید نمایش\u200cهای موضوع موثر کلمه\u200cای که در صد زبان متفاوت آموزش داده\u200cاند را تأثیر می\u200cدهد. تمرکز همکاری را هدف می\u200cدهد که ارتباط بین آخرین سخنرانی و تاریخ مکالمه را برگیرد، و بدین\u200cسان تصمیم می\u200cدهد که آیا آخرین سخنرانی باعث شکستن یک گفتگو است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل پیشنهاد ما تمام روش\u200cهای قبلی را بر روی تمام متریک\u200cهای ارزیابی در هر نقاط ژاپنی و انگلیسی در چالش شناسایی دیalog شکستن 4 (DBDC4 در IWSDS2019) انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '채팅을 위한 대화 시스템에서 원활한 소통을 확보하는 것이 중요하다. 그러면 사용자는 시스템과의 상호작용을 통해 의미 있는 응답을 얻을 수 있다.이전에 대화 연구에 관한 대부분의 업무는 대화의 파탄을 방지하는 데 관심을 두지 않았다.그 중 하나는 대화 시스템이 원하지 않는 말을 만들어 대화가 중단되고 전체적인 상호작용의 질을 떨어뜨릴 수 있다는 것이다.따라서 기계가 진행 중인 대화에서 대화 중단을 감지하는 것이 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 대화 중단 검측 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 예비 훈련 크로스 언어 모델과 공동 주의 네트워크를 결합시켰다.우리가 제시한 모델은 100가지 서로 다른 언어에서 훈련된 효과적인 단어를 이용하여 내생성어 경계화 표시를 삽입한다.공동주의의 목적은 최신 언어와 대화 역사 간의 상호작용을 포착하여 최신 언어가 대화를 중단시킬 수 있는지 확인하는 것이다.실험 결과 대화 고장 검출 도전4(IWSDS 2019의 DBDC4)에서 우리가 제시한 모델은 일본어와 영어 트랙의 모든 평가 지표에서 이전의 모든 방법보다 우수하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'id': 'Memastikan komunikasi lancar adalah penting dalam sistem dialog oriented chat, sehingga pengguna dapat mendapatkan respon yang berarti melalui interaksi dengan sistem. Kebanyakan pekerjaan sebelumnya pada penelitian dialog tidak fokus pada mencegah penghancuran dialog. Salah satu tantangan utama adalah bahwa sistem dialog dapat menghasilkan ucapan yang tidak diinginkan yang menyebabkan dialog merusak, yang merusak kualitas interaksi umum. Oleh karena itu, sangat penting bagi mesin untuk mendeteksi pecahan dialog dalam percakapan yang sedang berlangsung. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model deteksi penghancuran dialog baru yang bersama-sama mengandung model bahasa saling berbahasa dan jaringan perhatian. Model kami yang diusulkan menggunakan penerbangan kata yang efektif dilatih dalam seratus bahasa yang berbeda untuk menghasilkan represisi kontekstualisasi. Coperhatian bermaksud untuk menangkap interaksi antara ucapan terbaru dan sejarah percakapan, dan dengan demikian menentukan apakah ucapan terbaru menyebabkan kerusakan dialog. Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms all previous approaches on all evaluation metrics in both the Japanese and English tracks in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'sw': 'Ensuring smooth communication is essential in a chat-oriented dialogue system, so that a user can obtain meaningful responses through interactions with the system.  Kazi nyingi za kabla katika utafiti wa mazungumzo haijajikita kwenye kuzuia kuvunjwa kwa mazungumzo. Moja ya changamoto kubwa ni kwamba mfumo wa mazungumzo unaweza kutengeneza hotuba isiyo na maana yanayopelekea kuvunjwa kwa mazungumzo, ambayo inaongezea kiwango kikubwa cha mazungumzo. Kwa hiyo, ni muhimu kwa mashine kutambua mapinduzi ya mazungumzo katika mazungumzo yanayoendelea. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya kuvunjwa kwa mazungumzo ya kitaifa ambayo kwa pamoja inajumuisha muundo wa lugha yenye sura ya lugha na mtandao wa ushirikiano. Utengenezaji wetu wa muundo unaopendekezwa na maneno yenye ufanisi yanayofundishwa kwa lugha mia tofauti ili kutengeneza uwakilishi wa kisiasa. Ushirikiano unakusudia kukamata mahusiano kati ya hotuba ya hivi karibuni na historia ya mazungumzo, na hivyo kuamua ikiwa hotuba ya hivi karibuni inasababisha kuvunjika mazungumzo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu wa pendekezo unaonyesha mbinu zote zilizopita kuhusu mbinu zote za uchunguzi katika mbinu za Kijapani na Kiingereza za za Kuvunjwa Dialog Challenge 4 (DBDC4 kwenye IWSDS2019).', 'af': "Versterking van glade kommunikasie is noodsaaklik in 'n gesprek-orienteerde dialoog stelsel, sodat 'n gebruiker betekende antwoordes kan kry deur interaksies met die stelsel. Die mees voorheede werk op dialoog ondersoek fokus nie op die voorkoms van dialoog afbreek nie. Een van die groot uitdrukkings is dat 'n dialoog stelsel kan genereer 'n ongewendige uitdrukking wat na' n dialoog afbreek, wat die hele interaksie kwaliteit afbreek. Daarom is dit crucial vir 'n masjien om dialoog afbrekkings in' n voortgaande gesprek te vind. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe dialoog afbreek-opdekking model wat jointly inkorpreer 'n kruistale taal model en 'n koerensienetwerk. Ons voorgestelde model verwyder effektief woord inbêding wat op honderd verskillende tale opgelei is om contextualiseerde voorstellings te genereer. Soektog-aandag doel om die interaksie tussen die nuutste uitdrukking en die gesprekslys te vang, en daarom bepaal of die nuutste uitdrukking 'n dialoog afbreek veroorsaak. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons voorgestelde model uitvoer alle vorige toegange op alle evalueringsmetries in albei die Japaanse en Engelske snitte in Dialoog Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 by IWSDS2019).", 'tr': '횦uwa힊 komunikaci흫 g체rr체흫i 챌ap g철rkezil첵채n dijalog sisteminde 철r채n m철h체m d채l, 힊e첵le d채l채plir sistem bilen m철h체m jogaplary bolup biler. 畇龜逵剋棘均 ara힊tyrmasyny흫 철흫ki 철흫ki i힊i d철w체rmekden 철흫ki 체ns berip bilme첵채r. 횜흫 uly kyn챌ylyklardan biri, bir dyalog sistemi bo첵un챌a bir s철zleri d철redip biler, bu da b체tin t채sirli terjime kwalitesini azalt첵ar 힇ol seb채pli, 철흫ki g체rr체흫de duran s철hbetde힊de d채l철gmeleri tanamak ma힊yny흫 챌ykmasyny흫 철r채n m철h체m. Bu kagyzda, biz t채ze bir dialogdan 챌ykarmak nusgasyny teklip edip, bu 첵erlerde 철흫체nden ge챌irilen dil nusgasyny we 체ns 챌eken a 흫lygy bilen me흫ze힊dir첵채ris. Bizi흫 teklip eden nusgadymyz 체챌in 첵체z d체rli dilde okuw챌y s철zlere t채sirli 첵erle힊diril첵채r. Syklama i흫 so흫ky s철zleri흫 we g체rr체흫 taryhy arasynda etkile힊imi t채zeden bejermek ama챌lary we 힊ol seb채pli so흫ky s철zleri흫 d철w체r체힊체ne m체mkin ed첵채ndigini takykla첵ar. Experimental netijelerimiz teklip eden nusgamyzy흫 hemme japon챌a we IWSDS2019-de 채hli 철흫ki de흫lenme metriklerinde hemme nusgalary흫 체st체ne 챌yk첵andygyny g철rkez첵채r.', 'sq': 'Sigurimi i komunikimit të butë është thelbësor në një sistem dialog të orientuar në bisedë, në mënyrë që një përdorues të mund të marrë përgjigje të kuptueshme nëpërmjet ndërveprimeve me sistemin. Shumica e punës së mëparshme në kërkimin e dialogut nuk përqëndrohet në parandalimin e prishjes së dialogut. One of the major challenges is that a dialogue system may generate an undesired utterance leading to a dialogue breakdown, which degrades the overall interaction quality.  Prandaj, është vendimtare që një makinë të zbulojë shpërthimet e dialogut në një bisedë në vazhdim. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model të ri për zbulimin e shpërndarjes së dialogut që përfshin së bashku një model gjuhësh ndërgjuhësore të parastërvitur dhe një rrjet bashkëvëmendjeje. Modeli ynë i propozuar përfshin përfshirje të efektshme fjalësh të trajnuara në njëqind gjuhë të ndryshme për të gjeneruar përfaqësime kontekstuale. Bashkëvëmendja synon të kapë ndërveprimin midis shprehjes së fundit dhe historisë së bisedës dhe kështu përcakton nëse shprehja e fundit shkakton një prishje dialogu. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar përmbush të gjitha qasjet e mëparshme në të gjitha metrikat e vlerësimit në gjurmët japoneze dhe angleze në Dialogu Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 në IWSDS2019).', 'am': 'ቀላል ግንኙነት ማጠቃለያ በአካባቢ-አቀማመጥ በመስኮት ውስጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የመስኮት ምርጫዎች ላይ አብዛኛዎቹ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ መክፈቻን ለመከለከል አይጠቅሙም፡፡ ከዋናው ጥያቄዎች አንዱ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ሲሆን የdialog ቋንቋን መፍጠር የሚችል፣ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ጥያቄን የሚያሳድግ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም በመኖሪያው በአካባቢው ውስጥ የጦማሪያን ስብሰባዎችን ለማግኘት የግድ አስፈላጊ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የመረጃ አቀማመጥ ማኅበረሰብ እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል እና የተጠቃሚ ጥያቄ እና ጥያቄ መግለጫ እና ጥያቄን እናስባለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ቃላችን በመቶ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የተማረከ እና የተቃራኒ ቃላትን ለመፍጠር ያስተምራል፡፡ ሁኔታ በመጨረሻው ንግግር እና የአካባቢው ታሪክ መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመያዝ ይችላል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የባዘጋጀው ሞዴል፣ የጃፓን እና የኢንግሊዝኛ መንገዶች በጥያቄ አቅራቢያ መፍትወት ቁጥር 4 (IWSDS2019 ውስጥ DBDC4) በሚያሳየው ሁሉን አካሄድ ማድረጊያውን እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Ensuring smooth communication is essential in a chat-oriented dialogue system, so that a user can obtain meaningful responses through interactions with the system.  Անցյալ աշխատանքի մեծ մասը հաշվի առնելով խոսակցության ուսումնասիրությունները, չի կենտրոնանում խոսակցության կործանման կանխարգելու վրա: Հիմնական մարտահրավերներից մեկն այն է, որ երկխոսային համակարգը կարող է ստեղծել անցանկանալի արտահայտություն, որը հանգեցնում է երկխոսային բաժանման, ինչը դեգրավորում է ընդհանուր փոխազդեցության որակը: Այդ պատճառով, մեքենայի համար կարևոր է հայտնաբերել շարունակական խոսակցության ընթացքում խոսակցություններ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր դիախոսում բաժանված հայտնաբերման մոդել, որը միասին ներառում է նախկին վարժեցված լեզվի միջև լեզվի մոդել և համաուշադրության ցանց: Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը օգտագործում է արդյունավետ բառերի ներդրումներ, որոնք սովորեցվել են հարյուր տարբեր լեզուներով, որպեսզի ստեղծեն կոնտեքստիալ ներկայացումներ: Կարևոր ուշադրությունը նպատակում է ընկալել վերջին արտահայտությունների և խոսակցության պատմության միջև փոխազդեցությունը, և դրա միջոցով որոշում է, թե արդյոք վերջին արտահայտությունը պատճառ է հանդիսանում երկխոսության կործանումը Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms all previous approaches on all evaluation metrics in both the Japanese and English tracks in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'az': 'Söhbət tərəfindən danışmaq sistemində düzgün iletişim sistemini təmin etmək üçün istifadəçin in sistem ilə anlamlı cavab verə bilsin. Dialoog araştırmalarının ən əvvəlki işi Dialoog qırılmasını engelleməyə başlamaz. Ən böyük çətinliklərdən biri Dialoog sistemi istəməyən bir söz yaratmaq və bütün müxtəlif keyfiyyətini dəyişdirir. Beləliklə, sürəkli söhbətdə məlumatın dəyişikliklərini tanıtması maşına çox vacibdir. Bu kağızda yeni dil modeli və şəkildə ünsiyyət şəbəkəsini birlikdə birlikdə birlikdə birlikdə təşkil edən yeni dialogdan ayırma modeli təklif edirik. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz müxtəlif ifadələr yaratmaq üçün yüz müxtəlif dillərdə təhsil edilmiş ifadəli sözlər içərisində istifadə edir. Son sözlər və mühbət keçmişi arasındakı istifadə etmək məqsədilə son sözlər arasında istifadə etmək və bu səbəbdən son sözlərin dəyişdirilməsini müəyyən edir. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif etdiyimiz modellərin 4-ci Dialoog Breakdown Detection Challenge (IWSDS2019-də DBDC4-də, DBDC4-də, DWSDC4-də, Japonca və İngilizce parçalarındakı bütün ölçü metriklərinin hamısını üstün edir.', 'bn': 'স্বচ্ছতা যোগাযোগ নির্ধারণ করার জন্য একটি আড্ডাট-আদর্শিত ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যাতে ব্যবহারকারী সিস্টেমের সাথে  Most prior work on dialogue research does not focus on preventing dialogue breakdown.  একটি প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে যে একটি ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম একটি অজানা বাক্য তৈরি করতে পারে যার ফলে একটি ডায়ালগ ভাঙ্গা যায়, যা সারাটার মানে  তাই, চলতে থাকা আলোচনায় ডায়ালগ ভেঙ্গে পড়া একটি মেশিনের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নোভেল ডায়ালগ ভাঙ্গা ডিজেক্টরেশন মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা একসাথে একটি প্রেমিক ভাষার মডেল এবং একটি সহযোগিতার নেটওয়ার্ক। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল লেভারেজ কার্যকর শব্দের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যাতে প্রতিযোগিতার প্রতিনিধি তৈরি করার সাম্প্রতিক বক্তব্য এবং আলোচনার ইতিহাসের মধ্যে যুক্তি গ্রহণ করার উদ্দেশ্য, এবং এর ফলে সাম্প্রতিক কথাবার্তা নির্ধারণ করে যে ডায়ালগ ভা পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল চ্যালেঞ্জ ৪ (IWSDS2019-এ ডায়ালগ ব্রেক্টন ডিটেকশন চ্যালেঞ্জের ডিবিডিসি৪) পূর্ববর্তী মেট্রিক', 'ca': "Enseguir una comunicació senzilla és essencial en un sistema de diàleg orientat a la conversa, per tal que un usuari pugui obtenir respostes significatives mitjançant interaccions amb el sistema. La majoria dels treballs anteriors en la recerca del diàleg no es centren en prevenir el trencament del diàleg. Un dels principals reptes és que un sistema de diàleg pot generar una expressió indesejada que condueix a un descomposició del diàleg, que degrada la qualitat global de l'interacció. Per tant, és crucial que una màquina detecti descomposicions de diàleg en una conversa en curs. En aquest article, proposem un nou model de detecció del diàleg que incorpora conjuntament un model de llenguatge translingüístic i una xarxa de co-atenció. El nostre model proposat aprofita l'incorporació de paraules efectiva entrenada en cent llengües diferents per generar representacions contextualitzades. La co-atenció té l'objectiu de capturar la interacció entre la última expressió i la història de la conversa, i per tant determina si la última expressió causa un descomposició del diàleg. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model proposat supera tots els enfocaments anteriors en tots els mètrics d'evaluació, tant en el Japon com en l'anglès, en el desafiament 4 del diàleg de descomposició (DBDC4 a IWSDS2019).", 'bs': 'Osiguranje glatke komunikacije je ključno u sistemu dijaloga orijentiranog na razgovor, tako da korisnik može dobiti smislene odgovore kroz interakcije sa sistemom. Većina prethodnog rada o istraživanju dijaloga se ne fokusira na sprječavanje razbijanja dijaloga. Jedan od najvećih izazova je da dijalogski sistem može stvoriti neočekivan izraz koji vodi do razbijanja dijaloga, što smanjuje ukupnu kvalitet interakcije. Stoga je ključno za mašinu da otkrije razbijanje dijaloga u nastavkom razgovoru. U ovom papiru predlažemo model za otkrivanje novog dijaloga koji zajedno uključuje prekršen prekršteni jezički model i komunikacijsku mrežu. Naš predloženi model utiče na učinkovito uključenje riječi koje su obučene na stotinu različitih jezika kako bi stvorili kontekstualne predstave. Supažnja je cilj da uhvati interakciju između najnovijih govora i povijesti razgovora, i tako određuje da li najnoviji govor uzrokuje razbijanje dijaloga. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model iznosi sve prethodne pristupe na sve mjere procjene na japanskim i engleskim tragovima u izazovu otkrivanja 4. dijaloga (DBDC4 na IWSDS2019).', 'cs': 'Zajištění hladké komunikace je nezbytné v dialogovém systému orientovaném na chat, aby uživatel mohl získat smysluplné odpovědi prostřednictvím interakcí se systémem. Většina předchozích prací v oblasti výzkumu dialogu se nezaměřuje na prevenci rozpadu dialogu. Jednou z hlavních výzev je, že dialogový systém může vytvořit nežádoucí výslovnost vedoucí k zhroucení dialogu, což snižuje celkovou kvalitu interakce. Proto je klíčové, aby stroj detekoval poruchy dialogu v průběžné konverzaci. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový model detekce rozpadu dialogu, který společně zahrnuje předtrénovaný model křížového jazyka a síť co-pozornosti. Náš navržený model využívá efektivní vložení slov trénované na stovce různých jazycích k generování kontextualizovaných reprezentací. Cílem společné pozornosti je zachytit interakci mezi posledním projevem a historií konverzace, a tím určit, zda poslední projev způsobuje zhroucení dialogu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš navržený model překonává všechny předchozí přístupy ke všem hodnotícím metrikám v japonské i anglické stopě v dialogu Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 na IWSDS2019).', 'et': 'Tõrgeteta suhtlemine on vestlusele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemis hädavajalik, et kasutaja saaks süsteemiga suhtlemise kaudu sisulisi vastuseid. Enamik varasemaid dialoogi uurimistööd ei keskendu dialoogi katkemise vältimisele. Üks peamisi väljakutseid on see, et dialoogisüsteem võib tekitada soovimatu sõnavõtte, mis viib dialoogi katkemiseni, mis halvendab suhtluse üldist kvaliteeti. Seetõttu on oluline, et masin avastaks dialoogi katkestusi käimasolevas vestluses. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja uudse dialoogijaotuste tuvastamise mudeli, mis ühiselt hõlmab eelõpetatud keeleülest keelemudelit ja kaastähelepanu võrgustikku. Meie pakutud mudel kasutab tõhusaid sõnade manustamist, mis on koolitatud sadas erinevas keeles, et luua kontekstipõhiseid esitusi. Kaasaegse tähelepanu eesmärk on jäädvustada viimase sõnavõtte ja vestlusajaloo vastastikune mõju ning seeläbi määrata kindlaks, kas viimane sõnavõtt põhjustab dialoogi katkestuse. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud mudel ületab kõiki varasemaid lähenemisviise kõikide hindamismeetrite osas nii jaapani kui inglise keeles Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'fi': 'sujuvan viestinnﾃ､n varmistaminen on olennaista chat-keskeisessﾃ､ vuoropuhelujﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ssﾃ､, jotta kﾃ､yttﾃ､jﾃ､ voi saada merkityksellisiﾃ､ vastauksia vuorovaikutuksessa jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n kanssa. Useimmat aiemmat dialogitutkimukset eivﾃ､t keskity vuoropuhelun hajoamisen estﾃ､miseen. Yksi suurimmista haasteista on se, ettﾃ､ vuoropuhelujﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ voi synnyttﾃ､ﾃ､ ei-toivottua ilmaisua, joka johtaa vuoropuhelun hajoamiseen, mikﾃ､ heikentﾃ､ﾃ､ vuorovaikutuksen yleistﾃ､ laatua. Siksi on tﾃ､rkeﾃ､ﾃ､, ettﾃ､ kone havaitsee dialogin katkokset jatkuvassa keskustelussa. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ ehdotamme uutta dialogi breaking detection -mallia, joka sisﾃ､ltﾃ､ﾃ､ yhdessﾃ､ esikoulutetun monikielisen kielimallin ja yhteishuomioverkoston. Ehdotettu malli hyﾃｶdyntﾃ､ﾃ､ 100 eri kielellﾃ､ koulutettuja tehokkaita sanaupotuksia kontekstualisoitujen esitysten luomiseksi. Yhteishuomion tavoitteena on kuvata viimeisimmﾃ､n lauseen ja keskusteluhistorian vuorovaikutus ja siten mﾃ､ﾃ､rittﾃ､ﾃ､, aiheuttaako viimeisin lause dialogin hajoamisen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, ettﾃ､ ehdotettu malli ylittﾃ､ﾃ､ kaikki aiemmat lﾃ､hestymistavat kaikissa arviointimittareissa sekﾃ､ japanin ettﾃ､ englannin raidoissa Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness dialogs-action Mungkin sing berarti aké bukane kanggo sistem dialog iso nggawe sawian sing ora bisa ngubah dialog sing bisa ngubah, sing bisa ngrusak kuwi nggilalakno Kaya, aku ci ngopo nek sistem kanggo ditambah panjenengan ni aturan sing ngilanggar nggo resmi Nanging kuwi iki, kita supoyo model kuwi nggawe bagian dialog yang sabanjure nggawe ngubah model lan ngaweh dumatene kuwi tindang bantayan lan tambah bantayan. Laptop" and "Desktop Tool Options, Layersdock Rejuwisan sing paling nggambar kelas kuwi model sing ngendalungi nggawe layang kelas nang jebulé dolanan ingkang dolanan Jepang lan Inggris neng cuwisan Kasalutan Dialog break down detection Delenge 4 (DBDC4 nang IWSds2011).', 'ha': "Ina amfani da wajen yin husũma da sauƙi cikin wani na'urar zauren akwatin bayani na-ori, don ya so mai amfani da shi ya iya sãmu majibu masu inganci game da interaction na'ura. Babu mafi yawan aiki da ke gabatar da kan research kan zauren akwatin bayani bai zura ƙayyade ga hanyor da kakkãtse wa zauren akwatin bayani. Bayan muramman masu ƙaranci ne cẽwa, wata na zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani na zaɓe wani magana wanda ba'a yi bango ba, yana ƙarantar da tsarin aiki a gaba ɗaya. Saba'an nan, in a da amfani ga wani mashine dõmin ka gane breakuka cikin zauren akwatin bayani wanda ke tafiya. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wani misali da za'a kashe zauren akwatin bayani na nowaya wanda ke haɗa shi da shirin ya shigar da wani misali na lugha ta baka-linguin da kuma wani jerin haɗi. An sanar da misalinmu da aka buƙata shi da magana mai inganci, an sanar da shi a cikin lugha ɗari dabam-daban, dõmin ya ƙiƙiri mataimaki wanda aka jinkirtar. Ana yi amfani da yin kãma shirin maganar da aka ƙara tsakanin magana da historin mazaɓa, kuma sai ya ƙayyade, ko da magana na ƙarshen sa za'a ƙãga wani zauren zauren akwatin bayani. Mataimakin jarrabawa na nuna cewa misalinmu na buƙata duk hanyõyin da suka shige ta a gaba ɗaya a kan evaluation metrics cikin duk japanen da Ingiriya a cikin Dialog Breakdown Examination Challenge 4 (DBDC4 a IWSDS2019).", 'sk': 'Zagotavljanje nemotene komunikacije je bistvenega pomena v klepetu usmerjenem dialogskem sistemu, da lahko uporabnik pridobi smiselne odgovore preko interakcij s sistemom. Večina predhodnega dela na področju raziskav dialoga se ne osredotoča na preprečevanje prekinitve dialoga. Eden od glavnih izzivov je, da lahko sistem dialoga ustvari neželeno izgovor, ki vodi do prekinitve dialoga, kar poslabša splošno kakovost interakcije. Zato je ključnega pomena, da stroj zazna okvare dialoga v tekočem pogovoru. V prispevku predlagamo nov model odkrivanja razčlenitev dialoga, ki skupaj vključuje predtreniran medjezični jezikovni model in mrežo soozornosti. Naš predlagani model izkorišča učinkovite besedne vdelave, usposobljene v sto različnih jezikih, da ustvari kontekstualne predstavitve. Sopozornost je namenjena zajemanju interakcije med zadnjim izgovorom in zgodovino pogovorov ter s tem določi, ali zadnji izgovor povzroči prekinitev dialoga. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš predlagani model presega vse prejšnje pristope pri vseh meritvah ocenjevanja v japonskem in angleškem slogu v Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 pri IWSDS2019).', 'he': 'להבטיח תקשורת חלקה היא חיונית במערכת דיאלוג ממוקמת לשיחה, כדי שמשתמש יוכל להשיג תגובות משמעותיות דרך אינטראקציות עם המערכת. רוב העבודות הקודמות על מחקר דיאלוג לא מתמקדות במניעת התפרצות דיאלוג. אחד האתגרים הגדולים הוא שמערכת דיאלוג יכולה ליצור ביטוי בלתי רצוי שמוביל לפיצוץ דיאלוג, אשר משפיל את איכות האינטראקציה הכללית. לכן, זה קריטי למכונה לגלות פריצות דיאלוג בשיחה מתמשכת. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים דוגמנית גילוי פיצוץ דיאלוג חדשה שמכילה ביחד דוגמנית שפה משולשת מלמדה מראש ורשת תשומת לב משותפת. המודל המוצע שלנו משתמש בתכניות מילים יעילות מאומנות על מאה שפות שונות כדי ליצור ייצוגים קונטוקטואליזציאלים. תשומת לב משותפת מטורפת לתפוס את האינטראקציה בין המילה האחרונה וההיסטוריה של השיחה, ולכן לקבוע אם המילה האחרונה גורמת לשבור דיאלוג. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהמודל המוצע שלנו עולה על כל גישות קודמות על כל מטריות הערכה גם במסלול היפני וגם באנגלית באתגר הבחינה של התפרצות דיאלוג 4 (DBDC4 ב IWSDS2019).', 'bo': 'གླེང་མོལ་སྒྲོམ་ནང་ལ་འཇམ་པ་ཞིག་དག་ལ་གལ་ཅན་རེད། མ་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མ་ལག་གི་འཐབ་རིམ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ གླེང་སྒྲོམ་བརྙན་ཞིག་དང་བློ་གཏད་རྩོལ་བའི་གྲངས་སྐོར་མི་མཐུན་པས། འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་པ་ལས་གཅིག་ནི་ཌའི་ལོག་གླིང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་མ་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་རིམ་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་ དེར་བརྟེན། མ་ལག་ཅིག་གིས་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་གཏམ་གླེང་གཏོང་རུང་བར་གཏོང་ནུས་ཧ་ཅང་ག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་བ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་རྗེས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཆོས་ཉེན ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྐྱེད་པའི་བརྗོད་རིགས་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་སྔར་སྒྲིག་ཀྱང་མཐོང་ མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་ནི་འཇུག་སྣེ་མཐུན་ནི་གསལ་མཇུག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་གཏམ་གླེང་ལོ་རྒྱུས་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་མཐུན་དེ་རྟོགས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཉེ་མཇ Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms all previous approaches on all evaluation metrics in both the Japanese and English tracks in Dialogue Breakdown Detection Challenge 4 (DBDC4 at IWSDS2019).'}
{'en': 'Improving Low-Resource NMT through Relevance Based Linguistic Features Incorporation', 'ar': 'تحسين NMT منخفضة الموارد من خلال دمج الميزات اللغوية القائمة على الصلة', 'pt': 'Melhorando o NMT de poucos recursos por meio da incorporação de recursos linguísticos baseados em relevância', 'fr': "Amélioration de la NMT à faibles ressources grâce à l'intégration de caractéristiques linguistiques basées sur", 'es': 'Mejora de la NMT de bajos recursos a través de la incorporación de características lingüísticas', 'ja': '関連性ベースの言語機能の組み込みによる低リソースNMTの改善', 'zh': '因相关性言特征整合以改善低资源 NMT', 'ru': 'Улучшение малоресурсных НБ за счет включения лингвистических особенностей на основе релевантности', 'hi': 'प्रासंगिकता आधारित भाषाई विशेषताओं निगमन के माध्यम से कम संसाधन NMT में सुधार', 'ga': 'NMT Íseal-Acmhainne a Fheabhsú trí Ionchorprú Gnéithe Teangeolaíochta Bunaithe ar Ábharthacht', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους μέσω της ενσωμάτωσης γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών βάσει σχετικότητας', 'hu': 'Az alacsony erőforrású NMT javítása relevancia alapú nyelvi funkciók beépítésével', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс NMT бағытталған лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді бағыттау арқылы', 'it': "Migliorare l'NMT a basso contenuto di risorse attraverso l'incorporazione di funzionalità linguistiche basate sulla pertinenza", 'lt': 'Mažų išteklių NMT gerinimas įtraukiant atitinkamomis kalbinėmis savybėmis', 'mk': 'Подобрување на НМТ со ниски ресурси преку инкорпорација на јазички карактеристики базирани на релевантност', 'ms': 'Perbaikan NMT Sumber rendah melalui Incorporation Features Linguistic Based Relevance', 'ml': 'ബന്ധം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷതകളിലൂടെ കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d NMT മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mt': 'It-titjib tal-NMT b’Riżorsi Bażi permezz tal-Inkorporazzjoni tal-Karatteristiċi Lingwistiċi Bażati fuq ir-Relevanza', 'mn': 'Хамааралтай байдлын үндсэн хэлбэрийн боломжуудыг нэмж', 'no': 'Forbetra låg ressurs- NMT gjennom tilsvarende linguistiske funksjonar', 'pl': 'Poprawa niskich zasobów NMT poprzez włączenie funkcji językowych opartych na odpowiednich znaczeniach', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea NMT cu resurse reduse prin încorporarea caracteristicilor lingvistice bazate pe relevanță', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධතා විදියට අඩු සම්බන්ධතා NMT විශේෂය කරන්න', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje NMT sa niskim resursima putem uključivanja Lingističkih karakteristika na osnovu Relevance', 'so': 'Improving Low-Resource NMT through Relevance Based Linguistic Features Incorporation', 'sv': 'Förbättra NMT med låga resurser genom relevansbaserad språklig integration', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு அடிப்படையான இணைப்பு பண்புகள் குறைந்த மூலம் NMT மூலம் மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'نیچے رسورسوس NMT کو برابری کے ذریعہ بوسیدہ لینگ گیسٹیسک فوکتوروں میں اضافہ کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nâng cao cao công cụ ngôn ngữ học của công ty.', 'bg': 'Подобряване на нискоресурсните НМТ чрез включване на лингвистични характеристики, базирани на релевантност', 'nl': 'Verbetering van NMT met lage hulpbronnen door integratie van relevante taalkundige kenmerken', 'da': 'Forbedring af NMT med lav ressource gennem relevansbaseret sproglige funktioner Incorporation', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje NMT s niskim resursima putem uključenja Lingističkih karakteristika na temelju Relevance', 'id': 'Menembangkan NMT Sumber Terrendah melalui Inkorporasi Features Linguistic Based Relevance', 'ko': '연관된 언어 특성 기반 통합을 통해 리소스 NMT 향상', 'fa': 'بهتر کردن NMT منابع کم از طریق ارتباطی ویژه\u200cهای لینگیستیک بنیاد', 'sw': 'Kuboresha rasilimali ya chini NMT kupitia Tamko za Uhusiano', 'tr': "Relevance tabanly çyk özellikleri guralýan Açk Ressours NMT'y gowylaşdyrma", 'af': 'Verbeter Lae-Hulpbron NMT deur Relevance Based Linguistic Features Inorporasie', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Անվատ ռեսուրսների NMT-ի բարելավումը հարցերի հիմնված լեզվական առանձնահատկությունների ներառման միջոցով', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i NMT me burime të ulta nëpërmjet Korporatës së Karakteristikave gjuhësore të Bashkuara me Relevance', 'az': 'NMT düşük ressursu düzəltmək vasitəsilə bağlılıq temelli Linguistik Features Incorporation vasitəsilə', 'de': 'Verbesserung ressourcenarmer NMT durch Einbeziehung relevanzbasierter linguistischer Merkmale', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মাধ্যমে নিম্নলিখিত NMT ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje NMT sa niskim resursima putem uključenja Lingističkih karakteristika na osnovu Relevance', 'cs': 'Zlepšení NMT s nízkými zdroji prostřednictvím začlenění jazykových funkcí založených na relevantnosti', 'ca': "millorar la NMT de baix recursos a través de l'incorporació de característiques lingüístiques basades en pertinença", 'et': 'Vähese ressursiga NMT parandamine asjakohasuspõhiste keeleliste funktsioonide kaasamise kaudu', 'fi': 'Vähävaraisen NMT:n parantaminen relevance based linguistic Features Incorporation', 'jv': 'Gjelongi nambah-Ressource NMT ngegambar Relebance', 'ha': 'Improving Low-Resource NMT through Relevance Based Linguistic Features Incorporation', 'he': 'שיפור NMT משאבים נמוכים באמצעות תוכנית תכונות שפתיות מבוססות על רלוונטיות', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje NMT z nizkimi viri z vključevanjem ustreznih jezikovnih značilnosti', 'bo': 'Relevance Based Linguistic Features Improvement'}
{'en': 'In this study, linguistic knowledge at different levels are incorporated into the neural machine translation (NMT) framework to improve translation quality for language pairs with extremely limited data. Integrating manually designed or automatically extracted features into the NMT framework is known to be beneficial. However, this study emphasizes that the relevance of the features is crucial to the performance. Specifically, we propose two methods, 1) self relevance and 2) word-based relevance, to improve the representation of features for NMT. Experiments are conducted on translation tasks from English to eight Asian languages, with no more than twenty thousand sentences for training. The proposed methods improve translation quality for all tasks by up to 3.09 BLEU points. Discussions with visualization provide the explainability of the proposed methods where we show that the relevance methods provide weights to features thereby enhancing their impact on low-resource machine translation.', 'pt': 'Neste estudo, o conhecimento linguístico em diferentes níveis é incorporado à estrutura de tradução automática neural (NMT) para melhorar a qualidade da tradução para pares de idiomas com dados extremamente limitados. A integração de recursos projetados manualmente ou extraídos automaticamente na estrutura NMT é conhecida por ser benéfica. No entanto, este estudo enfatiza que a relevância dos recursos é crucial para o desempenho. Especificamente, propomos dois métodos, 1) auto-relevância e 2) relevância baseada em palavras, para melhorar a representação de características para NMT. São realizados experimentos em tarefas de tradução do inglês para oito idiomas asiáticos, com não mais de vinte mil frases para treinamento. Os métodos propostos melhoram a qualidade da tradução para todas as tarefas em até 3,09 pontos BLEU. As discussões com visualização fornecem a explicabilidade dos métodos propostos onde mostramos que os métodos de relevância fornecem pesos aos recursos aumentando assim seu impacto na tradução automática de poucos recursos.', 'ar': 'في هذه الدراسة ، تم دمج المعرفة اللغوية على مستويات مختلفة في إطار عمل الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) لتحسين جودة الترجمة للأزواج اللغوية ذات البيانات المحدودة للغاية. من المعروف أن دمج الميزات المصممة يدويًا أو المستخرجة تلقائيًا في إطار عمل NMT مفيد. ومع ذلك ، تؤكد هذه الدراسة أن أهمية الميزات أمر بالغ الأهمية للأداء. على وجه التحديد ، نقترح طريقتين ، 1) الارتباط الذاتي و 2) الصلة القائمة على الكلمات ، لتحسين تمثيل ميزات NMT. يتم إجراء التجارب على مهام الترجمة من الإنجليزية إلى ثماني لغات آسيوية ، مع ما لا يزيد عن عشرين ألف جملة للتدريب. تعمل الطرق المقترحة على تحسين جودة الترجمة لجميع المهام بما يصل إلى 3.09 نقطة BLEU. توفر المناقشات مع التصور إمكانية شرح الطرق المقترحة حيث نظهر أن الطرق الملائمة توفر أوزانًا للسمات مما يعزز تأثيرها على الترجمة الآلية منخفضة الموارد.', 'es': 'En este estudio, el conocimiento lingüístico de diferentes niveles se incorpora en el marco de la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) para mejorar la calidad de la traducción de las parejas de idiomas con datos extremadamente limitados. Se sabe que la integración de funciones diseñadas manualmente o extraídas automáticamente en el marco de NMT es beneficiosa. Sin embargo, este estudio enfatiza que la relevancia de las características es crucial para el rendimiento. Específicamente, proponemos dos métodos, 1) la relevancia personal y 2) la relevancia basada en palabras, para mejorar la representación de las características de la NMT. Se realizan experimentos sobre tareas de traducción del inglés a ocho idiomas asiáticos, con no más de veinte mil frases para la formación. Los métodos propuestos mejoran la calidad de la traducción de todas las tareas hasta en 3,09 puntos BLEU. Las discusiones con visualización proporcionan la explicación de los métodos propuestos, donde mostramos que los métodos de relevancia dan peso a las características, lo que mejora su impacto en la traducción automática de bajos recursos.', 'fr': "Dans cette étude, les connaissances linguistiques à différents niveaux sont intégrées dans le cadre de la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) afin d'améliorer la qualité de la traduction pour les paires de langues avec des données extrêmement limitées. L'intégration de fonctionnalités conçues manuellement ou extraites automatiquement dans le framework NMT est connue pour être bénéfique. Cependant, cette étude souligne que la pertinence des caractéristiques est cruciale pour la performance. Plus précisément, nous proposons deux méthodes, 1) l'auto-pertinence et 2) la pertinence basée sur les mots, afin d'améliorer la représentation des caractéristiques pour la NMT. Des expériences sont menées sur des tâches de traduction de l'anglais vers huit langues asiatiques, avec un maximum de vingt mille phrases pour la formation. Les méthodes proposées améliorent la qualité de la traduction pour toutes les tâches jusqu'à 3,09 points UEBL. Les discussions avec visualisation fournissent l'explicabilité des méthodes proposées, où nous montrons que les méthodes de pertinence apportent des pondérations aux fonctionnalités, ce qui améliore leur impact sur la traduction automatique à faibles ressources.", 'ja': 'この研究では、さまざまなレベルの言語学的知識がニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）フレームワークに組み込まれ、極めて限られたデータを持つ言語ペアの翻訳品質を向上させる。 手動で設計または自動抽出された機能をNMTフレームワークに統合することは、有益であることが知られています。 しかし、この研究では、機能の関連性がパフォーマンスにとって重要であることを強調しています。 具体的には、NMTの特徴の表現を改善するために、1)自己関連性と2)単語ベースの関連性の2つの方法を提案する。 英語から8つのアジア言語への翻訳タスクで実験が行われ、トレーニングのための文章は2万文以下です。 提案された方法は、すべてのタスクの翻訳品質を最大3.09 BLEUポイント向上させます。 視覚化との議論は、提案された方法の説明可能性を提供し、関連性のある方法が特徴に重みを提供し、それによって低資源の機械翻訳への影響を増大させることを示しています。', 'zh': '于此论之,以层次之言入神经机器翻译(NMT)框架,以重数极言之对译。 众所周知,将手动计自取者集为 NMT 框架中有益。 然本于强调,功能之相关性,于性至重。 具体来说二者,1)自相关性2)基于单词之相关性,以善NMT之征。 自英语至八亚洲语言译实验,训练不过两万句话。 所上方法,可增译至 3.09 BLEU 分。 与可视化之论为可解释性,明相关性为权重,以强其低资源机器翻译也。', 'hi': 'इस अध्ययन में, विभिन्न स्तरों पर भाषाई ज्ञान को बेहद सीमित डेटा के साथ भाषा जोड़े के लिए अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने के लिए तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) ढांचे में शामिल किया गया है। NMT ढांचे में मैन्युअल रूप से डिज़ाइन की गई या स्वचालित रूप से निकाली गई सुविधाओं को एकीकृत करना फायदेमंद माना जाता है। हालांकि, यह अध्ययन इस बात पर जोर देता है कि सुविधाओं की प्रासंगिकता प्रदर्शन के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। विशेष रूप से, हम NMT के लिए सुविधाओं के प्रतिनिधित्व में सुधार करने के लिए दो तरीकों, 1) आत्म प्रासंगिकता और 2) शब्द-आधारित प्रासंगिकता का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। अंग्रेजी से आठ एशियाई भाषाओं में अनुवाद कार्यों पर प्रयोग किए जाते हैं, जिसमें प्रशिक्षण के लिए बीस हजार से अधिक वाक्य नहीं होते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधियाँ 3.09 BLEU बिंदुओं तक सभी कार्यों के लिए अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करती हैं। विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन के साथ चर्चा प्रस्तावित विधियों की व्याख्या प्रदान करती है जहां हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रासंगिकता विधियां सुविधाओं को वजन प्रदान करती हैं जिससे कम संसाधन मशीन अनुवाद पर उनके प्रभाव को बढ़ाया जाता है।', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании лингвистические знания на различных уровнях включены в структуру нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) для улучшения качества перевода для языковых пар с чрезвычайно ограниченными данными. Известно, что интеграция разработанных вручную или автоматически извлеченных функций в структуру NMT является полезной. Однако в этом исследовании подчеркивается, что актуальность характеристик имеет решающее значение для производительности. В частности, мы предлагаем два метода: 1) саморелевантность и 2) релевантность на основе слов, чтобы улучшить представление признаков для НБ. Эксперименты проводятся на переводческих заданиях с английского на восемь азиатских языков, с не более чем двадцатью тысячами предложений для обучения. Предлагаемые методы улучшают качество перевода для всех задач до 3,09 баллов BLEU. Обсуждения с визуализацией обеспечивают объяснимость предложенных методов, где мы показываем, что методы релевантности обеспечивают весовые коэффициенты для признаков, тем самым усиливая их влияние на малоресурсный машинный перевод.', 'ga': 'Sa staidéar seo, tá eolas teangeolaíoch ar leibhéil éagsúla ionchorpraithe sa chreat néar-aistriúcháin meaisín (NMT) chun cáilíocht aistriúcháin a fheabhsú do phéirí teanga le sonraí fíor-theoranta. Is eol go bhfuil sé tairbheach gnéithe a dheartar de láimh nó a bhaintear go huathoibríoch a chomhtháthú i gcreat NMT. Mar sin féin, leagtar béim sa staidéar seo go bhfuil ábharthacht na ngnéithe ríthábhachtach don fheidhmíocht. Go sonrach, molaimid dhá mhodh, 1) féin-ábharthacht agus 2) ábharthacht focal-bhunaithe, chun feabhas a chur ar léiriú gnéithe do NMT. Déantar turgnaimh ar thascanna aistriúcháin ón mBéarla go hocht dteanga Áiseach, gan níos mó ná fiche míle abairt le haghaidh oiliúna. Feabhsaítear cáilíocht an aistriúcháin do gach tasc suas le 3.09 pointe BLEU leis na modhanna atá beartaithe. Soláthraíonn cainteanna le hamharcléiriú míniúchán ar na modhanna atá molta nuair a thaispeánaimid go dtugann na modhanna ábharthachta meáchain do ghnéithe, rud a chuireann lena dtionchar ar aistriúchán meaisín ar acmhainní íseal.', 'ka': 'ამ კვლევაში, ლუნგური მეცნიერება განსხვავებული დონეში ჩვენებულია ნეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელება (NMT) ფრამეტში, რომელიც უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ NMT პარამეტრებში ხელსახურად გამოყენებული ან ავტომატურად გამოყენებული ფუნქციების ინტერგურაცია უცნობია. მაგრამ ეს სწავლად აღწერს, რომ შესაძლებლობის მნიშვნელობა პროგრამეტზე გასაკეთებელია. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ მუშაობით ორი მეტი, 1) თავისთან მნიშვნელობა და 2) სიტყვების მნიშვნელობა, რომ NMT-ის მნიშვნელობის გამოსახულება უფრო მეტადება. ექსპერიმენტები ინგლისოდან 8 აზიატიური ენებისთვის გადაწყებულია, რომელიც უფრო მეტი 20 000 სიტყვები განსწავლებისთვის. პროგრამეტრები ყველა სამუშაო დავალებებისთვის გადაწყვეტილების საფუძველება 3.09 BLEU წერტილებით. ვიზუალიზაციის განსაკუთრებები უფრო განახსენებელია პროგრამების განახსენება, სადაც ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a különböző szintű nyelvtudás beépül az idegi gépi fordítás (NMT) keretrendszerbe, hogy javítsa a rendkívül korlátozott adatokkal rendelkező nyelvpárok fordítási minőségét. A manuálisan tervezett vagy automatikusan kivont funkciók integrálása az NMT keretrendszerbe ismert előnyös. Ez a tanulmány azonban hangsúlyozza, hogy a jellemzők relevanciája kulcsfontosságú a teljesítmény szempontjából. Konkrétan két módszert javasolunk, 1) önrelevanciát és 2) szóalapú relevanciát, amelyek javítják az NMT funkcióinak ábrázolását. Kísérleteket végeznek angolról nyolc ázsiai nyelvre történő fordítási feladatokkal, legfeljebb húszezer mondattal képzésre. A javasolt módszerek minden feladat fordítási minőségét akár 3,09 BLEU ponttal javítják. A vizualizációval folytatott megbeszélések biztosítják a javasolt módszerek magyarázhatóságát, ahol azt mutatjuk, hogy a relevancia módszerek súlyt adnak a funkcióknak, ezáltal fokozzák hatásukat az alacsony erőforrással rendelkező gépi fordításra.', 'el': 'Στη μελέτη αυτή, η γλωσσική γνώση σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα ενσωματώνεται στο πλαίσιο της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας της μετάφρασης για γλωσσικά ζεύγη με εξαιρετικά περιορισμένα δεδομένα. Η ενσωμάτωση χειροκίνητα σχεδιασμένων ή αυτόματα εξαγόμενων χαρακτηριστικών στο πλαίσιο είναι γνωστό ότι είναι ευεργετική. Ωστόσο, η μελέτη αυτή τονίζει ότι η συνάφεια των χαρακτηριστικών είναι κρίσιμη για την απόδοση. Συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε δύο μεθόδους, 1) αυτοσυνάφεια και 2) συνάφεια βάσει λέξεων, για τη βελτίωση της αναπαράστασης των χαρακτηριστικών της ΝΜΤ. Τα πειράματα διεξάγονται σε μεταφραστικές εργασίες από τα αγγλικά σε οκτώ ασιατικές γλώσσες, με όχι περισσότερες από είκοσι χιλιάδες προτάσεις για εκπαίδευση. Οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι βελτιώνουν την ποιότητα της μετάφρασης για όλα τα καθήκοντα έως και 3.09 σημεία BLEU. Οι συζητήσεις με απεικόνιση παρέχουν την εξήγηση των προτεινόμενων μεθόδων όπου αποδεικνύεται ότι οι μέθοδοι συνάφειας παρέχουν βάρη στα χαρακτηριστικά ενισχύοντας έτσι τον αντίκτυπο τους στη μηχανική μετάφραση χαμηλού πόρων.', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime kalbos žinios įvairiais lygmenimis įtraukiamos į nervinių mašinų vertimo sistemą (NMT), siekiant pagerinti kalbų poros, turinčių labai ribotus duomenis, vertimo kokybę. Žinoma, kad rankiniu būdu sukurtų ar automatiškai ištrauktų savybių integravimas į NMT sistemą yra naudingas. Tačiau šiame tyrime pabrėžiama, kad savybių svarba yra labai svarbi veiklos rezultatams. Konkrečiai siūlome du metodus: 1) savarankiškumą ir 2) žodžiu pagrįstą svarbą, siekiant pagerinti NMT savybių atstovavimą. Eksperimentai atliekami vertimo iš anglų į aštuonias Azijos kalbas užduotimis, kuriose mokomi ne daugiau kaip dvidešimt tūkstančių sakinių. Siūlomi metodai gerina vertimo kokybę visoms užduotims iki 3,09 BLEU punkto. Diskusijos su vizualizacija leidžia paaiškinti siūlomus metodus, kuriais parodomi, kad svarbos metodai suteikia svarbų savybėms ir taip didina jų poveikį mažai išteklių turinčiam mašinų vertimui.', 'it': "In questo studio, le conoscenze linguistiche a diversi livelli sono incorporate nel quadro della traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) per migliorare la qualità della traduzione per coppie di lingue con dati estremamente limitati. L'integrazione di funzioni progettate manualmente o estratte automaticamente nel framework NMT è nota per essere vantaggiosa. Tuttavia, questo studio sottolinea che la rilevanza delle caratteristiche è cruciale per le prestazioni. Nello specifico, proponiamo due metodi, 1) self relevance e 2) word-based relevance, per migliorare la rappresentazione delle caratteristiche per NMT. Vengono condotti esperimenti su compiti di traduzione dall'inglese a otto lingue asiatiche, con non più di ventimila frasi per la formazione. I metodi proposti migliorano la qualità della traduzione per tutti i compiti fino a 3,09 punti BLEU. Le discussioni con la visualizzazione forniscono l'spiegabilità dei metodi proposti in cui mostriamo che i metodi di pertinenza forniscono pesi alle funzionalità migliorando così il loro impatto sulla traduzione automatica a basso contenuto di risorse.", 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеулерде, тілдер жиіліктерінің түрлі деңгейлерінде лингвистикалық білім (NMT) негізгі механизмінің аудармасының сапатын өзгерту үшін түрлі шектелген деректерді қолданылады. Қолмен құрылған немесе автоматты түрде NMT фрейміне тарқатын мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру мүмкіндікті болады. Бірақ бұл зерттеу өзгертулердің маңыздылығы жұмыс істеу үшін маңызды. Ескерілікті, біз екі әдістерін, 1) өзіміздің маңыздылығын және 2) сөздердің маңыздылығын, NMT үшін мүмкіндіктердің таңдауын жақсарту үшін таңдаймыз. Ағылшын тілдерінен сегіз азиат тілдеріне аудару тапсырмаларында тәжірибелер істейді, олардың 20 мыңдағы мәліметтері болмайды. Барлық тапсырмалар үшін 3,09 BLEU нүктелеріне дейін аудару сапасы жақсартылады. Визуализациялық дискуссиялар біз көрсетілген әдістердің түсініктерін көрсетеді. Бұл әдістердің маңыздылық әдістері оның мүмкіндіктерін бағасы ресурстардың аудармасына көтеріп жатыр.', 'ms': 'Dalam kajian ini, pengetahuan bahasa pada tahap berbeza disertakan dalam kerangka terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) untuk meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan bagi pasangan bahasa dengan data yang sangat terbatas. Integrating manually designed or automatically extracted features into the NMT framework is known to be beneficial.  Namun, kajian ini menekankan bahawa relevan ciri-ciri adalah penting untuk prestasi. Secara khusus, kami cadangkan dua kaedah, 1) relevansi diri dan 2) relevansi berdasarkan perkataan, untuk meningkatkan perwakilan ciri-ciri untuk NMT. Eksperimen dilakukan pada tugas terjemahan dari bahasa Inggeris ke lapan bahasa Asia, dengan tidak lebih dari dua puluh ribu kalimat untuk latihan. Kaedah yang diusulkan memperbaiki kualiti terjemahan untuk semua tugas sehingga 3. 09 titik BLEU. Diskusi dengan visualisasi menyediakan penjelasan kaedah yang dicadangkan di mana kita menunjukkan bahawa kaedah relevansi menyediakan berat kepada ciri-ciri dengan demikian meningkatkan kesan mereka pada terjemahan mesin sumber rendah.', 'mk': 'In this study, linguistic knowledge at different levels are incorporated into the neural machine translation (NMT) framework to improve translation quality for language pairs with extremely limited data.  Интеграцијата на рачно дизајнирани или автоматски извадени карактеристики во рамката на НМТ е позната како корисна. Сепак, оваа студија истакнува дека релевантноста на карактеристиките е клучна за перформансата. Специфично, предложуваме два методи, 1) саморелевантност и 2) зборна релевантност, за подобрување на претставувањето на карактеристиките за НМТ. Експериментите се спроведуваат на преводни задачи од англиски на осум азиски јазици, со не повеќе од дваесет илјади реченици за обука. The proposed methods improve translation quality for all tasks by up to 3.09 BLEU points.  Дискусиите со визуелизација обезбедуваат објаснливост на предложените методи каде што покажуваме дека методите на релевантност обезбедуваат тежина на карактеристиките, со што ќе го зголемат нивното влијание на машинскиот превод со ниски ресурси.', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിജ്ഞാനത്തില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളുടെ (NMT) ഫ്രെയിമെക്കില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷ ഇണകള്\u200dക്കുള് NMT ഫ്രെയിമ്പിലേക്ക് കൈയ്യൂട്ടിയാക്കിയോ സ്വയം പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത എന്നാലും ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തിന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് രീതികള്\u200d, 1) സ്വയം ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും, 2) വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം വാക്കുകള്\u200d മു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും എട്ടു ഏഷ്യഭാഷകളിലേക്കും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കുള്ള പരിശോധന നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d എല്ലാ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും വ്യാജത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. 3 വ്യക്തമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായ രീതികളുടെ വിശദീകരണവും കാണിക്കുന്നു. പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികളുടെ വിശദീകര', 'mt': 'F’dan l-istudju, l-għarfien lingwistiku f’livelli differenti huwa inkorporat fil-qafas tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) biex tittejjeb il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni għal pari lingwistiċi b’dejta estremament limitata. L-integrazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi ddisinjati manwalment jew estratti awtomatikament fil-qafas NMT hija magħrufa bħala ta’ benefiċċju. However, this study emphasizes that the relevance of the features is crucial to the performance.  Specifically, we propose two methods, 1) self relevance and 2) word-based relevance, to improve the representation of features for NMT.  Jitwettqu esperimenti dwar kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni mill-Ingliż għal tmien lingwi Asjatiċi, b’mhux aktar minn għoxrin elf sentenza għat-taħriġ. Il-metodi proposti jtejbu l-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni għall-kompiti kollha b’sa 3.09 punti BLEU. Id-diskussjonijiet bil-viżwalizzazzjoni jipprovdu l-ispjegabbiltà tal-metodi proposti fejn naraw li l-metodi ta’ rilevanza jipprovdu piżijiet għall-karatteristiċi u b’hekk isaħħu l-impatt tagħhom fuq it-traduzzjoni ta’ magni b’riżorsi baxxi.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu wiedza językowa na różnych poziomach została włączona do struktury neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT), aby poprawić jakość tłumaczenia par językowych z bardzo ograniczonymi danymi. Integracja ręcznie zaprojektowanych lub automatycznie ekstraktowanych funkcji z frameworkiem NMT jest wiadomo, że jest korzystna. W niniejszym badaniu podkreślono jednak, że istotność tych cech ma kluczowe znaczenie dla wydajności. W szczególności proponujemy dwie metody, 1) samorelevancję i 2) znaczenie oparte na słowach, aby poprawić reprezentację cech dla NMT. Eksperymenty prowadzone są na zadaniach tłumaczeniowych z angielskiego do ośmiu języków azjatyckich, z nie więcej niż dwadzieścia tysięcy zdań do szkolenia. Proponowane metody poprawiają jakość tłumaczeń dla wszystkich zadań o punkty do 3.09 BLEU. Dyskusje z wizualizacją dostarczają wyjaśnienia proponowanych metod, w których pokazujemy, że metody istotne zapewniają wagę cech, zwiększając tym samym ich wpływ na niskie zasoby tłumaczenia maszynowe.', 'ro': 'În acest studiu, cunoștințele lingvistice la diferite niveluri sunt încorporate în cadrul traducerii automate neurale (NMT) pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea traducerii pentru perechile de limbi cu date extrem de limitate. Integrarea caracteristicilor proiectate manual sau extrase automat în cadrul NMT este cunoscută a fi benefică. Cu toate acestea, acest studiu subliniază că relevanța caracteristicilor este crucială pentru performanță. În mod specific, propunem două metode, 1) auto-relevanță și 2) relevanță bazată pe cuvinte, pentru a îmbunătăți reprezentarea caracteristicilor pentru NMT. Experimentele sunt efectuate pe sarcini de traducere din engleză în opt limbi asiatice, cu nu mai mult de douăzeci de mii de propoziții pentru formare. Metodele propuse îmbunătățesc calitatea traducerii pentru toate sarcinile cu până la 3,09 puncte BLEU. Discuțiile cu vizualizare oferă explicabilitatea metodelor propuse în cazul în care demonstrăm că metodele de relevanță oferă greutăți caracteristicilor, sporind astfel impactul acestora asupra traducerii automate cu resurse reduse.', 'no': 'I denne studien vert lingviske kunnskap på ulike nivå inkludert i rammeomsetjinga for neuralmaskin (NMT) for å forbetra omsetjingskvalitet for språkopar med ekstremt begrenset data. Innretting av manuelt designert eller automatisk ekstrahert funksjonar i NMT- rammeverket er kjent til å vera nyttig. Dette studiet tyder imidlertid på at funksjonane er viktig for utviklinga. Vi foreslår to metodar, 1) selvrelevans og 2) ordbasert relevans for å forbetra representasjonen av funksjonar for NMT. Eksperimentar vert utført på omsetjingspråk frå engelsk til åtte asiatiske språk, med ingen fleire enn tjue tusen setningar for opplæring. Førehandsviste metodane forbedra omsetjingskvalitet for alle oppgåver ved oppgåver til 3,09 BLEU-punkt. Diskusjonar med visualisering gjev forklarability av dei første metodane der vi viser at dei relevante metodane gjev vekt til funksjonar med å forbetra effekten sine på omsetjinga av lavressursmaskinen.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд, хэлний мэдлэг өөр хэмжээний түвшинд мэдлэг нь мэдээллийг маш хязгаарлагдсан мэдээллээр хөгжүүлэх хэлний хоорондын хөгжүүлэх чадварыг сайжруулахын тулд мэдээллийн мэдээллийг мэдээллээр орлу NMT хэлбэрээр гараар бүтээсэн эсвэл автоматаар автоматаар нэмэгдсэн чадваруудыг нэгтгэх нь ашигтай гэдгийг мэднэ. Гэвч энэ судалгаа хариултын чухал байдал үйл ажиллагаанд чухал гэдгийг тодорхойлж байна. Ялангуяа, бид хоёр арга зам, 1) өөрийгөө хамааралтай, 2) үгний үндсэн хамааралтай, NMT-ийн харилцааны төлөвлөлтийг сайжруулахын тулд санал өгдөг. Англи хэлнээс 8 Азийн хэлнээс илүү 20 мянган өгүүлбэрээр дасгал хөгжүүлэх үйл ажиллагаанд туршилт хийгддэг. Бүх ажлын хувьд 3.09 BLEU цэг хүртэл орчуулах арга замыг сайжруулдаг. Дүрслэлийн тухай ярилцлага нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга замыг тайлбарлах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ арга замын ач холбогдолтой арга нь машины хөрөнгө оруулалт бага боломжтой боломжтой болгодог.', 'sr': 'U ovom ispitivanju, jezičko znanje na različitim nivoima uključuje se u okvir prevoda neuralnih mašina (NMT) za poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda jezičkih parova sa izuzetno ograničenim podacima. Интеграција ручно разработана или автоматично извукана особа у рамок NMT је известна да је полезна. Međutim, ova studija naglašava da je važnost karakteristika ključna za izvođenje. Posebno, predlažemo dve metode, 1) samozbiljnost i 2) relevantnost na riječima, kako bi poboljšali predstavljanje karakteristika za NMT. Eksperimenti su provedeni na prevodnim zadacima sa engleskog na osam azijskih jezika, bez više od dvadeset hiljada rečenica za obuku. Predložene metode poboljšavaju kvalitet prevoda za sve zadatke do 3,09 BLEU bodova. Razgovori o vizualizaciji pružaju objašnjenje predloženih metoda u kojima pokazujemo da metode relevantnosti pružaju težinu za karakteristike tako povećavajući njihov utjecaj na prevod mašine s niskim resursima.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, භාෂාවික දැනය වෙනස් ස්ථානයේදී වෙනස් ස්ථානයේදී භාෂාවික පරීක්ෂණය (NMT) පරීක්ෂණයේදී ස @ info ඒත්, මේ අධ්\u200dයානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, අධ්\u200dයානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පද්ධතිය දෙකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, 1) ස්වයංග්\u200dරතිය සහ 2) වචන පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධතාවක්, NMT වෙනුවෙන ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාවෙන් ආසියානු භාෂාවට අභාවිත වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණාවට වචනය සියළුම වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් පරිවර්තනය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් සියළුම ව දර්ශනය සඳහා කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට, ඒ', 'so': "Waxbarashadan waxaa lagu qoraa aqoonta luuqadda ee heerarka kala duduwan oo lagu qorayo tarjumaadka maskinada (NMT) framework si uu u kordhiyo sifiimka turjumaadda u beddelo lammaanaha luuqada ah oo aad u xadan data. Waxaa loo yaqaan mid faa'iido leh in lagugu qabsashada qalabka NMT ay si gacan ah u qoran yihiin ama si gaar ah loo soo saaray. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashadu wuxuu ku cadaynayaa in muhiim u ah sameynta. Si gaar ah, waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba qaab, 1) oo isku xiriir ah iyo 2) si aan u hagaajinno noocyada gaarka ah ee NMT. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu sameeyaa shaqooyinka turjumaadda ee afka Ingiriiska ilaa siddeed luuqadood oo Aasiya ah, waxbarashada waxaa lagu sameeyaa wax ka badan labaatan kun oo qof. Dhammaan hawlaha oo dhan waxaa lagu hagaajiyaa hababka la soo jeedo inuu kordhiso qiimaha turjumista oo dhan ugu badnaan 3.09 barta BLEU. Talobixinta muuqashada waxay ka heleysaa faa'iidada lagu soo jeedo qaababka aan ku tusno in qaababka muhiimka ah ay miisaan ku bixiyaan, oo ay ku kordhiyaan saameyntooda ku saabsan turjumidda machadka hoose-resource.", 'sv': 'I denna studie införlivas språkkunskaper på olika nivåer i ramverket neural machine translation (NMT) för att förbättra översättningskvaliteten för språkpar med extremt begränsade data. Att integrera manuellt utformade eller automatiskt extraherade funktioner i NMT-ramverket är känt för att vara fördelaktigt. Denna studie betonar dock att relevansen av funktionerna är avgörande för prestandan. Specifikt föreslår vi två metoder, 1) självrelevans och 2) ordbaserad relevans, för att förbättra representationen av funktioner för NMT. Experiment utförs på översättningsuppgifter från engelska till åtta asiatiska språk, med högst tjugotusen meningar för utbildning. De föreslagna metoderna förbättrar översättningskvaliteten för alla uppgifter med upp till 3,09 BLEU-poäng. Diskussioner med visualisering ger förklaringen av de föreslagna metoderna där vi visar att relevansmetoderna ger vikter till funktioner och därmed ökar deras påverkan på maskinöversättning med låg resurs.', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், வேறு நிலைகளில் மொழியின் அறிவு மொழியின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரவுகளை மிகவும் வரம்பு உள்ள தகவலுடன் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரவுக் கைமுறையாக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட அல்லது தானாகவே வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட பண்புகளை NMT சட்டத்தில் சேர்க்கும் பயனுள்ளதாக அறியப்படு ஆனால், இந்த படிப்பாடு செயல்பாட்டிற்கு முக்கியமானது என்று குறிப்பிடுகிறது. குறிப்பிட்ட, நாம் இரண்டு முறைகள், 1) தன்னியக்க தொடர்பு மற்றும் 2) சொல்லை சார்ந்த தொடர்புகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, NMT க்கு தன்மைகள மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணிகளை ஆங்கிலத்திலிருந்து எட்டு ஆசிய மொழிகளில் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, பயிற்சிக்கு 20,000 வாக்கு அனைத்து பணிகளுக்கும் மேல் 3. 09 பிலியு புள்ளிகளால் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரம் மேம்படுத்தும் முறைமைகள். பார்வையுடன் பேசுதல் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமைகளின் விளக்கம் கொடுக்கும் தொடர்பு முறைகள் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிமாற்றியின் பாதி', 'ur': 'اس تحقیقات میں، زبان کی علم مختلف سطح میں نیورل ماشین کی ترجمہ (NMT) فرمود میں شامل ہوا ہے کہ زبان جوڑوں کے لئے زیادہ محدودہ ڈیٹا کے ساتھ ترجمہ کی کیفیت بہتر کرے۔ NMT فرمیٹ میں مفید ہو جانا ہے کہ ہاتھی طراحی کیا جاتا ہے یا اپنے ساتھ اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ لیکن یہ مطالعہ تفصیل کرتا ہے کہ ان شائستوں کی اثبات عملکرد کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ مخصوص طور پر، ہم دو طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، 1) خود relevance اور 2) کلمات بنیاد اخلاقیت، NMT کے لئے ویژگی کا نمونہ بہتر کرنے کے لئے۔ انگلیسی سے آٹھ آسیا زبانوں تک ترجمہ کے کاموں پر آزمائش کی جاتی ہیں، اور تمرین کے لئے بیس ہزار جماعتوں سے زیادہ نہیں۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقے تمام کاموں کے لئے ترجمہ کی کیفیت کو 3.09 BLEU پوینٹوں تک زیادہ ترجمہ کریں۔ تصویزائل کے ساتھ بحث کے طور پر پیشنهاد طریقوں کی تفصیل کے قابل توضیح دیتے ہیں جہاں ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ اہم طریقوں کے ذریعہ بوجھ کو اس کے ذریعہ سے ان کا اثر کم سرورس ماشین کی ترجمہ پر زیادہ بڑھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu o'qituda, har xil darajada lingvistika ilmoga juda chegara maʼlumot bilan tarjima qilish uchun neyrol maskin tarjimasiga (NMT) qoʻyiladi. @ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu o'qituvni hozirga tayyorlash imkoniyatlarining muhim bo'lishi mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan, biz ikki usul, 1) o'zimning shaxsiyati va 2 so'zning asosida ma'lumotni bajarish uchun NMT xususiyatlarini bajarish uchun so'zlarni bajarishimiz mumkin. Tafsilotlar inglizcha tildan sakkizcha tillardan o'zgarishlar bajarildi. Tahrirlash uchun eng 20 kun dan ortiq so'zlar yoʻq. Name Koʻrinishni tasdiqlash bilan murojaat qilish soʻzlarini koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu yerda, ma'lumot usullarning imkoniyatlarini qo'shish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong nghiên cứu này, kiến thức ngôn ngữ ở các cấp độ khác nhau được nhập vào cơ sở dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh (NMB) để cải thiện chất lượng dịch cho các cặp ngôn ngữ với dữ liệu cực hạn. Việc khai thác các tính năng được thiết kế bằng tay hoặc tự động được chiết xuất trong cấu trúc NMT là điều có ích. Tuy nhiên, nghiên cứu này nhấn mạnh rằng tính chất này rất quan trọng đối với hiệu quả. Cụ thể, chúng tôi đề xuất hai phương pháp: 1) tự trọng và 2) liên quan từ, để cải thiện sự mô tả các đặc điểm cho NMB. Các thí nghiệm được thực hiện trong các nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển từ Anh sang tám ngôn ngữ Châu Á, với không hơn hai mươi ngàn câu để đào tạo. Các phương pháp đề nghị nâng cao chất lượng dịch cho mọi công việc bằng đến 3.09 nguyên tắc. Những cuộc tranh cãi với hình ảnh cung cấp khả năng giải thích của các phương pháp được đề xuất khi chúng tôi cho thấy các phương pháp liên quan cung cấp sức nặng cho các tính năng, nhằm nâng tầm ảnh hưởng của nó lên dịch vụ máy.', 'bg': 'В това изследване езиковите знания на различни нива са включени в рамката на невронния машинен превод (НМТ), за да се подобри качеството на превода за езикови двойки с изключително ограничени данни. Интегрирането на ръчно проектирани или автоматично извличани функции в рамката е известно, че е полезно. Това проучване обаче подчертава, че релевантността на характеристиките е от решаващо значение за изпълнението. По-конкретно, предлагаме два метода, 1) самостоятелна релевантност и 2) дума-базирана релевантност, за подобряване на представянето на характеристиките за НМТ. Провеждат се експерименти по преводни задачи от английски на осем азиатски езика, с не повече от двадесет хиляди изречения за обучение. Предложените методи подобряват качеството на превода за всички задачи с до 3,09 точки. Дискусиите с визуализация дават обяснимост на предложените методи, където показваме, че методите за уместност осигуряват тежести на характеристиките, като по този начин повишават тяхното въздействие върху нискоресурсния машинен превод.', 'da': 'I denne undersøgelse indarbejdes sprogkundskaber på forskellige niveauer i den neurale maskinoversættelsesramme (NMT) for at forbedre oversættelseskvaliteten for sprogpar med ekstremt begrænsede data. Integrering manuelt designede eller automatisk udtrukne funktioner i NMT-rammerne er kendt for at være gavnlig. Dette studie understreger dog, at relevansen af funktionerne er afgørende for ydeevnen. Specielt foreslår vi to metoder, 1) selvrelevans og 2) ordbaseret relevans, for at forbedre repræsentationen af funktioner for NMT. Der udføres eksperimenter med oversættelsesopgaver fra engelsk til otte asiatiske sprog med højst tyve tusinde sætninger til uddannelse. De foreslåede metoder forbedrer oversættelseskvaliteten for alle opgaver med op til 3,09 BLEU-point. Diskussioner med visualisering giver forklareligheden af de foreslåede metoder, hvor vi viser, at relevansmetoderne giver vægt til funktioner og dermed øger deres indflydelse på maskinoversættelse med lav ressource.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju, jezičko znanje na različitim razinama uključuje se u okvir prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) za poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda jezičkih parova s izuzetno ograničenim podacima. Poznato je da je uključenje ručno dizajniranih ili automatski izvlačenih karakteristika u okvir NMT-a korisno. Međutim, ova studija naglašava da je važnost funkcija ključna za učinkovitost. Posebno predlažemo dvije metode, 1) samozbiljnost i 2) relevantnost na riječima, kako bi poboljšali predstavljanje karakteristika za NMT. Eksperimenti su provedeni na prevodnim zadacima sa engleskog na osam azijskih jezika, bez više od dvadeset tisuća rečenica za obuku. Predložene metode poboljšavaju kvalitet prevoda za sve zadatke do 3,09 bodova BLEU-a. Razgovori o vizualizaciji pružaju objašnjenje predloženih metoda u kojima pokazujemo da metode relevantnosti pružaju težinu svojim karakteristikama povećanjem njihovog utjecaja na prevod mašine s niskim resursima.', 'nl': 'In deze studie wordt taalkennis op verschillende niveaus opgenomen in het neuronale machinevertaling (NMT) framework om de vertaalkwaliteit van taalparen met extreem beperkte data te verbeteren. Het integreren van handmatig ontworpen of automatisch geëxtraheerde functies in het NMT framework staat bekend als voordelig. Deze studie benadrukt echter dat de relevantie van de kenmerken cruciaal is voor de prestaties. Specifiek stellen we twee methoden voor, 1) zelfrelevantie en 2) woordgebaseerde relevantie, om de representatie van kenmerken voor NMT te verbeteren. Experimenten worden uitgevoerd op vertaaltaken van Engels naar acht Aziatische talen, met niet meer dan twintig duizend zinnen voor training. De voorgestelde methoden verbeteren de vertaalkwaliteit voor alle taken met maximaal 3.09 BLEU-punten. Discussies met visualisatie bieden de uitlegbaarheid van de voorgestelde methoden waarbij we laten zien dat de relevantiemethoden gewichten geven aan kenmerken waardoor hun impact op low-resource machinevertaling wordt vergroot.', 'de': 'In dieser Studie werden linguistisches Wissen auf verschiedenen Ebenen in das neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungssystem (NMT) integriert, um die Übersetzungsqualität von Sprachpaaren mit extrem begrenzten Daten zu verbessern. Die Integration manuell entworfener oder automatisch extrahierter Features in das NMT-Framework ist als vorteilhaft bekannt. Diese Studie betont jedoch, dass die Relevanz der Merkmale entscheidend für die Leistung ist. Konkret schlagen wir zwei Methoden vor, 1) Selbstrelevanz und 2) wortbasierte Relevanz, um die Repräsentation von Merkmalen für NMT zu verbessern. Experimente werden an Übersetzungsaufgaben aus dem Englischen in acht asiatische Sprachen durchgeführt, wobei nicht mehr als zwanzigtausend Sätze trainiert werden müssen. Die vorgeschlagenen Methoden verbessern die Übersetzungsqualität für alle Aufgaben um bis zu 3.09 BLEU-Punkte. Diskussionen mit Visualisierung liefern die Erklärungsfähigkeit der vorgeschlagenen Methoden, wobei wir zeigen, dass die Relevanzmethoden Gewichtungen zu Merkmalen liefern und dadurch deren Einfluss auf ressourcenarme maschinelle Übersetzung erhöhen.', 'id': 'Dalam penelitian ini, pengetahuan bahasa di tingkat berbeda didalam rangkaian terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) untuk meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan untuk pasangan bahasa dengan data yang sangat terbatas. Integrasi karakteristik dirancang secara manual atau secara otomatis diekstraksi ke dalam rangka NMT dikenal sebagai berguna. Namun, penelitian ini menekankan bahwa relevansi karakteristik adalah penting untuk pertunjukan. Specifically, we propose two methods, 1) self relevance and 2) word-based relevance, to improve the representation of features for NMT.  Eksperimen dilakukan pada tugas terjemahan dari bahasa Inggris ke delapan bahasa Asia, dengan tidak lebih dari dua puluh ribu kalimat untuk latihan. Metode yang diusulkan meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan untuk semua tugas dengan sampai 3,09 poin BLEU. Diskusi dengan visualisasi menyediakan penjelasan dari metode yang diusulkan di mana kita menunjukkan bahwa metode relevansi menyediakan berat untuk fitur dengan demikian meningkatkan dampak mereka pada terjemahan mesin sumber daya rendah.', 'ko': '이 연구에서 서로 다른 차원의 언어 지식은 신경기계번역(NMT) 구조에 포함되어 데이터가 극히 제한된 언어 쌍의 번역 질을 향상시켰다.수동 설계 또는 자동 추출된 피쳐를 NMT 프레임워크에 통합하는 것이 좋습니다.그러나 본 연구는 특징의 상관성이 성능에 매우 중요하다고 강조한다.구체적으로 우리는 NMT의 특징 표시를 개선하기 위해 1) 자기 관련과 2) 단어 기반의 관련을 두 가지 방법을 제시했다.실험은 영어에서 8가지 아시아 언어까지의 번역 임무에서 진행되었는데, 훈련된 문장은 2만 문장을 넘지 않았다.제시된 방법은 모든 임무의 번역 품질을 3.09개의 BLEU 포인트로 향상시켰다.가시화된 토론은 제시한 방법의 해석성을 제공했다. 우리는 관련 방법이 특징에 권한을 부여하고 저자원 기계 번역에 대한 영향을 강화한다고 밝혔다.', 'sw': 'Katika utafiti huu, maarifa ya lugha katika ngazi tofauti yanajumuisha katika mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa (NMT) ili kuboresha kiwango cha tafsiri kwa ajili ya wanandoa wa lugha yenye data isiyo na kiwango kikubwa. Kuunganisha vipengele vya kutengenezwa mkono au kutengenezwa kwa kujitegemea katika mfumo wa NMT unajulikana kuwa na faida. Hata hivyo, utafiti huu unasisitiza kwamba umuhimu wa tabia ni muhimu kwa utendaji. Kwa ujumla, tunapendekeza njia mbili, 1) yenyewe na umuhimu wa maneno, kuboresha uwakilishi wa vipengele vya NMT. Majaribio yanaendeshwa katika kazi za kutafsiri kutoka Kiingereza hadi lugha nane za Asia, bila ya hukumu zaidi ya elfu ishirini kwa ajili ya mafunzo. mbinu zilizopendekezwa kuboresha kiwango cha tafsiri kwa kazi zote kwa kufikia pointi 3.09 BLEU. Mazungumzo na kuonyesha yanatoa ufafanuzi wa njia zilizopendekezwa ambapo tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu zinazohusiana zinatoa mizani kwa kuweza kuongeza madhara yao kwenye tafsiri ya mashine ya chini ya rasilimali.', 'tr': 'Bu aramda, diller üçin dürli derejesinde lingwistiki bilgi näyral maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) çerçevesinde çykmak üçin dil çiftleriň keyfiýetini ýüzeltmek üçin guruldy. NMT frameworkynda elimden tasarlanýan ýa-da otomatik açylýan özellikler ýeterlik bolar. Ýöne bu çalışma çözgütleriniň wajyplygyny ukyplaýar. Özellikle, iki yöntemi, 1) özlük önemlisi ve 2) kelime tabanlı önemlisi, NMT için özelliklerin temsilini geliştirmek için teklif ediyoruz. Iňlis dilinden sekiz asyatiýa dilinde terjime etmek üçin ýigrimi müň sözlem ýok täze täzeliklerde işlenýär. Mazmunlar tähli zadyň terjime etmegiň kalitesini 3.09 BLEU noktalaryna çevrilýändir. Görselleştirmek bilen diskusiýalar teklip eden yönleriň nähili kynçylyk taýýarlanmagyny ukyplaýarlar we olaryň maşynyň düşük resurslar terjimesine täsirini artýarlar.', 'fa': 'در این مطالعه، علم زبان\u200cشناسی در سطح مختلف در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار جمع کردن ویژگی\u200cهای دستی طراحی یا استخراج به خودکار در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار ولی این مطالعه تفکیر می\u200cکند که اهمیت ویژه\u200cها برای عملکرد مهم است. مخصوصا، ما دو روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، ۱) مربوط به خودم و ۲) مربوط به کلمه، تا نمایش ویژه\u200cهای NMT را بهتر کنیم. تجربه\u200cها بر روی کار ترجمه\u200cها از انگلیسی تا هشت زبان آسیا انجام می\u200cشود، با حدود ۲۰ هزار جمله برای آموزش. روش پیشنهاد کیفیت ترجمه برای همه کارها تا 3.09 نقطه BLEU بهتر می شود. بحث\u200cهایی با تصویر\u200cسازی قابلیت توضیح روش\u200cهای پیشنهاد را می\u200cدهند که ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش\u200cهای مربوط به سنگینی برای ویژه\u200cهایی که با آن تأثیر ایشان بر ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای کم منبع می\u200cدهند، ارائه می\u200cدهند', 'af': 'In hierdie studie is lingwisiese kennis op verskillende vlakke ingesluit in die neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) raamwerk om vertaling kwaliteit vir taal pare te verbeter met ekstrem beperk data. Inligting van Hand ontwerp of automaties uitgepak funksies in die NMT raamwerk is bekend om beneficieel te wees. Maar hierdie studie bepaal dat die relevansie van die funksies vir die prestasie is. Spesifieke, ons voorstel twee metodes, 1) selfrelevansie en 2) woordgebaseerde relevansie om die voorstelling van funksies vir NMT te verbeter. Eksperimente word gedoen op vertaling opdragte van Engels tot agt Asiëse tale, met geen meer as twintig duisend setings vir onderwerp nie. Die voorgestelde metodes verbeter vertalingskwaliteit vir alle werke deur tot by 3.09 BLEU punte. Gespriede met visualisering verskaf die verduidelikheid van die voorgestelde metodes waar ons wys dat die relevante metodes gewig verskaf tot funksies daarmee deur hulle invloek op lae hulpbron masjien vertaling te verbeter.', 'am': 'በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የቋንቋዊ እውቀት በተለየ ደረጃዎች ውስጥ የኔural machine ትርጉም (NMT) ፍሬማር ውስጥ ለቋንቋ ዓይነቶች ትርጓሜን ጥሩ ለማሻሻል እጅግ የተለየ ዳታ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ ነገር ግን ይህ ትምህርት የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለመፈጸም የሚያስፈልገው ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ ሁለት ዓይነት፣ 1) ራሳችንን ግንኙነት እና 2) የንግግር ግንኙነት እና የNMT ምርጫዎችን ለማሻሻል እናስጀምራለን፡፡ ከንግግሊዝኛ ጀምሮ እስከ ስምንት በእስያ ቋንቋዎች በመግለጫው ፈተናዎች ይደረጋሉ፤ ለትምህርት መግለጫ ሀያ ሺህ የሚበልጥ ፍርድ የለውም፡፡ በ3.09 BLEU ነጥቦች እንዲያሳድጉ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓቶች ላይ ትርጉም ጥሩ እንዲያሳድጉ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት በተዘጋጀው የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ማሳየትን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում տարբեր մակարդակների լեզվաբանական գիտելիքները ներառվում են նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) շրջանակում, որպեսզի բարելավեն լեզվաբանական զույգերի թարգմանման որակը չափազանց սահ Ինտեգրելը ձեռքով նախագծված կամ ավտոմատ հանված հատկանիշներ NMT-ի շրջանակի մեջ հայտնի է որպես օգտակար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս ուսումնասիրությունը նշանակում է, որ հատկանիշների կարևորությունը կարևոր է արդյունքի համար: Մասնավորապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու մեթոդ՝ 1) ինքնառելենցիա և 2) բառի հիմնված ռելենցիա, որպեսզի բարելավենք NMT-ի հատկանիշների ներկայացումը: Փորձեր են կատարվում անգլերենի թարգմանման խնդիրների վրա ութ ասիացի լեզուներից, որտեղ ոչ ավելին քան քսան հազար նախադասություններ են կատարվում կրթության համար: Առաջարկված մեթոդները բարելավում են թարգմանման որակը բոլոր առաջադրանքների համար մինչև 3.9 միավորով: Վիզուալիզացիայի միջոցով քննարկումները տալիս են առաջարկված մեթոդների բացատրելիությունը, որտեղ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նշանակալիության մեթոդները ծավալներ են տալիս հատկանիշներին, ինչը բարձրացնում է նրանց ազդեցությունը ցածր ռեսուր', 'az': 'Bu təhsil içində, dil çiftləri üçün çox sınırlı məlumatları olan dil çiftləri üçün çeviriş kalitetini daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün fərqli səviyyələrdə dil bilgi nöral maşına çevirilməsi (NMT) çevirinə daxil edilir. NMT framework ünün əlində dizayn edilən və ya avtomatik əlavə çıxarılmış fərqlərlə birləşdirmək faydalı olduğunu bilər. Ancaq bu təcrübə təcrübə edir ki, təcrübələrin mövzuluğu performans üçün çox mövzudur. Özellikle, biz iki metod, 1) özünün bağlılığı və 2) sözlərin bağlı olan bağlılığı təklif edirik, NMT üçün fəaliyyətlərin göstəricisini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün. İngilizdən sekiz asiya dilinə çevirilmiş işlərdə təhsil edilir, təhsil üçün 20 min cümlədən artıq yoxdur. Tüm işlər üçün təklif edilən metodlar 3.09 BLEU nöqtələrinə qədər tercümə keyfiyyətini artırar. vizualizasyonla müzakirələr, bizim göstərdiyimiz təklif metodların açıq-aydınlığını təsdiqləyir ki, böyük təsirlərinin düşük ressurs maşına çevirilən təsirlərini artırar.', 'sq': 'Në këtë studim, njohuritë gjuhësore në nivele të ndryshme janë përfshirë në kuadrin e përkthimit nervor të makinave (NMT) për të përmirësuar cilësinë e përkthimit për çiftet gjuhësore me të dhëna jashtëzakonisht të kufizuara. Integrimi i karakteristikave të projektuara manualisht apo të nxjerra automatikisht në kuadrin NMT është i njohur se është i dobishëm. Megjithatë, ky studim thekson se rëndësia e karakteristikave është vendimtare për performancën. Veçanërisht, ne propozojmë dy metoda, 1) vetërelevancë dhe 2) relevancë bazuar në fjalë, për të përmirësuar përfaqësimin e karakteristikave për NMT. Eksperimentet kryehen në detyrat e përkthimit nga anglisht në tetë gjuhë aziatike, me jo më shumë se njëzet mijë fjalë për trajnimin. Metodat e propozuara përmirësojnë cilësinë e përkthimit për të gjitha detyrat me deri në 3.09 pikë BLEU. Diskutimet me vizualizim ofrojnë shpjeguesinë e metodave të propozuara ku ne tregojmë se metodat e rëndësishme ofrojnë pesha për funksionet duke përmirësuar kështu ndikimin e tyre në përkthimin e makinave me burime të ulta.', 'bs': 'U ovom ispitivanju, jezičko znanje na različitim razinama uključuje se u okvir prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) za poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda jezičkih parova sa izuzetno ograničenim podacima. Integracija ručno dizajniranih ili automatski izvlačenih karakteristika u okvir NMT je poznata da je korisna. Međutim, ova studija naglašava da je važnost karakteristika ključna za izvođenje. Posebno predlažemo dvije metode, 1) samozbiljnost i 2) relevantnost na riječima, kako bi poboljšali predstavljanje karakteristika za NMT. Eksperimenti su provedeni na prevodnim zadacima sa engleskog na osam azijskih jezika, bez više od dvadeset tisuća rečenica za obuku. Predložene metode poboljšavaju kvalitet prevoda za sve zadatke do 3,09 bodova BLEU-a. Razgovori o vizualizaciji pružaju objašnjenje predloženih metoda u kojima pokazujemo da metode relevantnosti pružaju težinu za karakteristike tako povećavajući njihov utjecaj na prevod mašine s niskim resursima.', 'cs': 'V této studii jsou jazykové znalosti na různých úrovních začleněny do rámce neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) pro zlepšení kvality překladu jazykových párů s extrémně omezenými daty. Integrace ručně navržených nebo automaticky extrahovaných funkcí do NMT frameworku je známo jako přínosná. Tato studie však zdůrazňuje, že relevance vlastností je klíčová pro výkon. Konkrétně navrhujeme dvě metody, 1) seberelevance a 2) slovní relevance, ke zlepšení reprezentace prvků pro NMT. Experimenty jsou prováděny na překladatelských úkolech z angličtiny do osmi asijských jazyků, s nejvíce než dvaceti tisíc vět pro výcvik. Navrhované metody zlepšují kvalitu překladu pro všechny úkoly až o 3.09 BLEU body. Diskuze s vizualizací poskytují vysvětlitelnost navržených metod, přičemž ukazujeme, že relevantní metody poskytují váhy funkcím, čímž zvyšují jejich vliv na strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji.', 'bn': 'এই গবেষণায় ভিন্ন পর্যায়ে ভাষাগত জ্ঞান নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) ফ্রেমে যোগ দেয়া হয়েছে ভাষার অনুবাদের মান উন্নত করার জন্য যারা অত্যন্ এনএমটি ফ্রেম্যাকার্কে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডিজাইন করা অথবা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে উদ্ধার করা বৈশিষ্ট্য যুক্ত করা হয়ে তবে এই গবেষণাটি জোর দিয়েছে যে এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রভাব প্রদর্শনের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। Specifically, we propose two methods, 1) self relevance and 2) word-based relevance, to improve the representation of features for NMT.  ইংরেজি থেকে আট এশিয়ার ভাষা থেকে অনুবাদের কাজে পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে, যার প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য প্রায় ২০ হাজারেরও বেশি  প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ৩. 09 বিলিউ পয়েন্টের মাধ্যমে সকল কাজের জন্য অনুবাদের মান উন্নত করে। দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে আলোচনা প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির ব্যাখ্যা প্রদান করেছে যেখানে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রাসঙ্গিক পদ্ধতি বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য ওজন প্রদান করে যা', 'ca': "En aquest estudi, el coneixement lingüístic a diferents nivells s'incorpora al marc de traducció neural de màquines (NMT) per millorar la qualitat de traducció dels parells de llenguatges amb dades extremadament limitades. L'integració de característiques dissenyades manualment o extraides automàticament al marc de la NMT és coneguda com beneficiosa. No obstant això, aquest estudi enfatiza que la pertinencia de les característiques és crucial per al rendiment. Concretament, proposem dos mètodes: 1) autorellevancia i 2) rellevancia basada en paraules, per millorar la representació de característiques per a la NMT. Es fan experiments en tasques de traducció d'anglès a vuit llengües asiàtiques, amb no més de vint mil frases per a formar-se. Els mètodes proposats milloren la qualitat de traducció de totes les tasques fins a 3,09 punts BLEU. Les discussions amb visualització proporcionen l'explicabilitat dels mètodes proposats en què demostrem que els mètodes de relevància proporcionen pes a les característiques, millorant així el seu impacte en la traducció de màquines amb baix recursos.", 'et': 'Selles uuringus on erinevate tasemete keeleoskused lisatud neuromasintõlke raamistikku, et parandada keelepaaride tõlkekvaliteeti äärmiselt piiratud andmetega. Käsitsi projekteeritud või automaatselt ekstraheeritud funktsioonide integreerimine NMT raamistikku on teadaolevalt kasulik. Selles uuringus rõhutatakse siiski, et funktsioonide asjakohasus on jõudluse jaoks ülioluline. Konkreetselt pakume välja kaks meetodit: 1) iseolulisus ja 2) sõnapõhine asjakohasus, et parandada NMT funktsioonide esindamist. Eksperimente viiakse läbi tõlkeülesannetega inglise keelest kaheksasse Aasia keelde, kusjuures koolituseks ei ole rohkem kui kakskümmend tuhat lauset. Kavandatud meetodid parandavad tõlkekvaliteeti kõikide ülesannete puhul kuni 3,09 BLEU punkti võrra. Visualiseerimise arutelud annavad väljapakutud meetodite seletatavuse, kus näitame, et asjakohasusega meetodid annavad kaalu omadustele, suurendades seeläbi nende mõju vähese ressursiga masintõlkele.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa eri tasoinen kielitaito on sisällytetty neurokonekäännöksen (NMT) viitekehykseen parantaakseen kieliparien käännöksen laatua erittäin rajallisella datalla. Manuaalisesti suunniteltujen tai automaattisesti purettujen ominaisuuksien integrointi NMT-kehykseen tiedetään olevan hyödyllistä. Tässä tutkimuksessa korostetaan kuitenkin, että ominaisuuksien merkitys on ratkaisevan tärkeää suorituskyvyn kannalta. Erityisesti ehdotamme kahta menetelmää, 1) itserelevanssia ja 2) sanapohjaista relevanssia, joilla parannetaan NMT:n ominaisuuksien esittämistä. Kokeita tehdään käännöstehtävistä englannista kahdeksaan aasialaiseen kieleen, joissa koulutusta varten on enintään kaksikymmentä tuhatta lausetta. Ehdotetut menetelmät parantavat käännösten laatua kaikissa tehtävissä jopa 3,09 BLEU-pisteellä. Visualisoinnin kanssa käydyt keskustelut tarjoavat selitettävyyttä ehdotetuista menetelmistä, joissa osoitetaan, että relevanssimenetelmät antavat painoarvoja ominaisuuksille, mikä lisää niiden vaikutusta vähäresurssiseen konekäännökseen.', 'he': 'במחקר הזה, ידע שפתי ברמות שונות מורכבים לתרגום המכונה העצבית (NMT) כדי לשפר את איכות התרגום של זוגות שפות עם נתונים מוגבלים ביותר. הכניסה של תכונות מעוצבות ידנית או מווצאות באופן אוטומטי לתוך המסגרת NMT ידועה להיות מועילה. עם זאת, המחקר הזה מזכיר שהרלוונטיות של המאפיינים היא קריטית לביצוע. Specifically, we propose two methods, 1) self relevance and 2) word-based relevance, to improve the representation of features for NMT.  ניסויים נוהלים על משימות התרגום מאנגלית לשמונה שפות אסיאתיות, עם לא יותר מ-20,000 משפטים לאימונים. השיטות המוצעות משפר את איכות התרגום לכל המשימות עד 3.09 נקודות BLEU. דיונים עם ויזואליזציה מספקים את ההסבר של השיטות המוצעות שבו אנו מראים ששיטות הרלוונציה מספקות משקלים לאיכויים כך שיעדכו את השפעה שלהם על התרגום מכונת משאבים נמוכים.', 'ha': "Daga wannan lõkaci, aka shigar da ilimu na linguistic cikin darajõji daban, aka shigar da shi cikin fassarar masu fassarar manyan neural (NMT) dõmin ya improve tsarin translation wa nau'in mutane da data mai girma. An sani ya zama mai amfani da shi cikin firam na NMT wanda aka ƙayyade shi hannun da aka ƙayyade ko kuma aka fitar da shi farat ɗaya. A lokacin da wannan littafi ya ƙayyade cewa muhimu ne ga aikin. A ƙayyade, muna goyyade shiryoyin biyu, 1) da mutane da kuma 2) da yana da muhimmi ga maganar-da, dõmin ya gyãra sifatin masu tsari ga NMT. Ana tafiyar da jarrabori a kan aikin fassarar daga Ingiriya zuwa harshen Asiya takwas, kuma bã da sonar dubu dubu wanda ake yi wa muhalin. @ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa masu haɗuwa da kunnuwa ya bãyar da fassarar bayani ga metoden da aka yi niyyar da shi, a inda Muke nuna wa metoden muhimmanci, su bãyar da nau'i wa'anar wa'anar su da shi, kuma su ƙara matsayinsu kan fassarar manyan-resource na ƙaranci.", 'sk': 'V tej študiji je jezikovno znanje na različnih ravneh vključeno v okvir nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) za izboljšanje kakovosti prevajanja za jezikovne pare z izjemno omejenimi podatki. Znano je, da je koristno vključevanje ročno oblikovanih ali samodejno ekstrahiranih funkcij v okvir NMT. Vendar pa ta študija poudarja, da je pomembnost značilnosti ključnega pomena za zmogljivost. Predlagamo dve metodi, 1) samorelevantnost in 2) besedna relevantnost, da bi izboljšali reprezentacijo značilnosti za NMT. Izvajamo eksperimente na prevajalskih nalogah iz angleščine v osem azijskih jezikov, z največ dvajsetimi tisoč stavki za usposabljanje. Predlagane metode izboljšujejo kakovost prevajanja za vse naloge za do 3,09 točke BLEU. Razprave z vizualizacijo zagotavljajo pojasnljivost predlaganih metod, kjer pokažemo, da metode relevantnosti zagotavljajo uteži lastnostim in s tem povečujejo njihov vpliv na strojno prevajanje z nizkimi viri.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, akeh langgambar lan sampeyan sampeyan anyar sampeyan anyar tentang karo terjamahan (NMT). text-tool-action Nanging, ujaran iki dadi akcen na cigarete kuwi nggawe lan pakan cara sing kljuara nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Awak dhéwé ngerti apa-apa sing dibutuhke sistem, 1) iso dianggalakno lan 2) iso dianggalakno sing basa gambar, nggawe ngubah iso dianggalakno perusahaan NMT. Isopo sing ngejaraké karo mbutuhaké tarjamahan kanggo inggiles kanggo wolu tindang asiya, karo sepatu punika telu wisata kanggo tukang. Perintah sing dipunangguna kuwi nggawe kalité kanggo wong njaluk kanggo ngono 3.09 B sing doting Rasane karo ngilanggar yèn aplikasi kanggo ngerasakno karo perusahaan anyar tentang mrogram sing nyimpen nggawe barang nggawe barang kejahatan kanggo nggawe barang langgar sampeyan tapi pasang maning.', 'bo': 'In this study, linguistic knowledge at different levels are incorporated into the neural machine translation (NMT)framework for improvement of translation quality for language pairs with extremely limited data. NMT་གཞུང་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་ནུས་ལག་བཟོ་བ་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པའི་ཆ་ཁོངས་ཡིན་པ་ཤེས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཚབ་ལྟ་བ་འདིས་ནི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གལ་ཅན་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་གཟུགས་ཅན་དང་། ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་(1) རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་དང་། 2) ཚིག་གཟུགས དབྱིན་ཡིག་ལས་ཨིན་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལ་བརྒྱད་ལས་ཨ་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བརྒྱད་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུ་གཏང་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་ཚོར་ཡིག་གནད་དོན་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། བསྟུན་ནས་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ནུས་པ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ལམ་གལ་ཅན་ཞིག་དག་ལ་མཚ'}
{'en': 'Filtering Back-Translated Data in Unsupervised Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'تصفية البيانات المترجمة مرة أخرى في الترجمة الآلية العصبية غير الخاضعة للرقابة', 'es': 'Filtrado de datos retrotraducidos en traducción automática neuronal no supervisada', 'fr': 'Filtrage des données rétro-traduites dans la traduction automatique neuronale non supervisée', 'pt': 'Filtrando dados retraduzidos na tradução automática neural não supervisionada', 'ja': '監督されていないニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションにおけるバック翻訳データのフィルタリング', 'zh': '于无监督神经机器译中漉回译数', 'hi': 'अप्रकाशित न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद में बैक-अनूदित डेटा फ़िल्टर करना', 'ru': 'Фильтрация обратно-транслируемых данных в неконтролируемом нейронном машинном переводе', 'ga': 'Sonraí Aistrithe Ar Ais a Scagadh in Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach Gan Maoirseacht', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Visszafordított adatok szűrése felügyeletlen idegi gépi fordításban', 'el': 'Φιλτράρισμα πίσω-μεταφρασμένων δεδομένων σε μη εποπτευόμενη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Filtrare i dati retrotradotti nella traduzione automatica neurale non controllata', 'kk': 'Қайта аударылған деректерді қайта аударылмаған нейралық машинаның аудармасында сүзгілеу', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Name', 'ms': 'Penapis Data Terterjemahan-Belakang dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural Tidak Dikawal', 'mt': 'Filtrar ta’ Dejta Trasferita b’Diġà fi Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali Mhux Sorveljata', 'ml': 'പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഫില്\u200dറ്റാര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുക', 'mn': 'Хараагүй мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Filtrowanie wstecznie przetłumaczonych danych w nienadzorowanym neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'ro': 'Filtrarea datelor traduse înapoi în traducerea automată neurală nesupravegheată', 'so': 'Filtering data-translated backwards in Unsupervised Neural machine Translation', 'sv': 'Filtrera bakåtöversatta data i oövervakad neural maskinöversättning', 'sr': 'Filtriranje povratne prevodene podatke u neodređenom neuronskom prevodu mašine', 'si': 'පිටිපස්සෙන් වාර්තාවෙන දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය නැති නිර්භාවිත මැෂින් වාර්තාව', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் பின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தகவலை வடிகட்டுகிறது', 'ur': 'غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل نیورال ماشین ترجمہ میں پچھلے ترجمہ دیٹا فیلتر کیے جاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilmagan neural tarjima- maʼlumotlarni import qilish', 'vi': 'Câu trả trước trong phiên dịch lắp thần kinh', 'bg': 'Филтриране на назад преведени данни в невронен машинен превод без надзор', 'hr': 'Filtriranje povratne prevodene podatke u neodređenoj neurološkoj prevodi', 'nl': 'Terug vertaalde gegevens filteren in niet-gecontroleerde neuronale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Filtrering af tilbage-oversatte data i ukontrolleret neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Filtern von rückübersetzten Daten in der nicht überwachten neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'ko': '무감독 신경 기계 번역 중의 반역 데이터 필터', 'fa': 'پالایه داده\u200cهای ترجمه پشت در ترجمه ماشین عصبی غیرقابل حفاظت', 'id': 'Penapis Data Terterjemahan Kembali dalam Translation Mesin Neural Tidak Disupervisi', 'sw': 'Takwimu za kutafsiriwa nyuma katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa isiyotazama', 'tr': 'Geri terjime edilen Maglumaty Saýlamak Nural Makina terjimesinde süýtget', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Filtruar të dhënat e përkthyera mbrapsht në përkthimin e Makinës Neurale të Pambikqyrur', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Geri çevirilmiş məlumatları tərcümə edilməmiş nöral mašin tərcümündə filtrləyir', 'hy': 'Ֆիլտրում է վերադարձ թարգմանված տվյալները անվերահսկված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ অনুবাদের মধ্যে ব্যাক-অনুবাদের তথ্য ফিল্টার করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Filtrant les dades tornades a traduir en una traducció de màquines neurals sense supervisió', 'cs': 'Filtrování zpětně přeložených dat v neurálním strojovém překladu', 'bs': 'Filtriranje pretvorenih podataka u neodređenom neuronskom prevodu', 'et': 'Tagasitõlgitud andmete filtreerimine järelevalveta neuroaalses masintõlkes', 'fi': 'Takaisin käännettyjen tietojen suodattaminen valvomattomassa hermokonekäännöksessä', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Filtriranje nazaj prevedenih podatkov v nevrološkem strojnem prevodu', 'bo': 'སྲུང་སྐྱོད་མེད་པའི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་བསྒྱུར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན', 'he': 'מסנן נתונים משומרים בחזרה בתרגום מכונת עצבית ללא השגחה'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised neural machine translation (NMT) utilizes only monolingual data for training. The quality of back-translated data plays an important role in the performance of NMT systems. In back-translation, all generated pseudo parallel sentence pairs are not of the same quality. Taking inspiration from domain adaptation where in-domain sentences are given more weight in training, in this paper we propose an approach to filter back-translated data as part of the training process of unsupervised NMT. Our approach gives more weight to good pseudo parallel sentence pairs in the back-translation phase. We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise. We compare our approach with the current state of the art approaches for unsupervised NMT.', 'ar': 'تستخدم الترجمة الآلية العصبية غير الخاضعة للرقابة (NMT) البيانات أحادية اللغة فقط للتدريب. تلعب جودة البيانات المُعاد ترجمتها دورًا مهمًا في أداء أنظمة NMT. في الترجمة الخلفية ، كل أزواج الجمل الزائفة المتوازية التي تم إنشاؤها ليست بنفس الجودة. بالاستلهام من تكيف المجال حيث يتم إعطاء الجمل في المجال وزناً أكبر في التدريب ، نقترح في هذه الورقة نهجًا لتصفية البيانات المترجمة مرة أخرى كجزء من عملية تدريب NMT غير الخاضعة للإشراف. يعطي نهجنا وزناً أكبر لأزواج الجمل الزائفة المتوازية الجيدة في مرحلة الترجمة الخلفية. نحسب وزن كل زوج من الجمل المتوازية الزائفة باستخدام درجة BLEU ذهابًا وإيابًا في الجملة والتي يتم تطبيعها على أساس الدُفعة. نقارن نهجنا مع أحدث الأساليب الحالية لمقاربة NMT غير الخاضعة للإشراف.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal (NMT) no supervisada utiliza solo datos monolingües para el entrenamiento. La calidad de los datos retrotraducidos desempeña un papel importante en el rendimiento de los sistemas NMT. En la traducción inversa, todos los pares de oraciones pseudoparalelas generados no son de la misma calidad. Inspirándonos en la adaptación de dominios donde las oraciones dentro del dominio tienen más peso en el entrenamiento, en este artículo proponemos un enfoque para filtrar los datos retrotraducidos como parte del proceso de entrenamiento de la NMT no supervisada. Nuestro enfoque da más peso a los buenos pares de oraciones pseudoparalelas en la fase de retrotraducción. Calculamos el peso de cada par de oraciones pseudoparalelas utilizando la puntuación BLEU de ida y vuelta en forma de oración que se normaliza por lotes. Comparamos nuestro enfoque con los enfoques actuales de vanguardia para la NMT no supervisada.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale non supervisée (NMT) utilise uniquement des données monolingues pour la formation. La qualité des données rétrotraduites joue un rôle important dans les performances des systèmes NMT. En rétro-traduction, toutes les paires de phrases pseudo-parallèles générées ne sont pas de la même qualité. En nous inspirant de l'adaptation de domaine où les phrases dans le domaine ont plus de poids pendant l'entraînement, nous proposons dans cet article une approche pour filtrer les données rétro-traduites dans le cadre du processus de formation de la NMT non supervisée. Notre approche donne plus de poids aux bonnes paires de phrases pseudo-parallèles dans la phase de rétro-traduction. Nous calculons le poids de chaque paire de phrases pseudo-parallèles en utilisant le score BLEU aller-retour par phrase qui est normalisé par lots. Nous comparons notre approche avec les approches de pointe actuelles pour la NMT non supervisée.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural não supervisionada (NMT) utiliza apenas dados monolíngues para treinamento. A qualidade dos dados retrotraduzidos desempenha um papel importante no desempenho dos sistemas NMT. Na retrotradução, todos os pares de sentenças pseudo-paralelas gerados não são da mesma qualidade. Inspirando-se na adaptação de domínio onde as sentenças no domínio recebem mais peso no treinamento, neste artigo propomos uma abordagem para filtrar dados retrotraduzidos como parte do processo de treinamento de NMT não supervisionado. Nossa abordagem dá mais peso a bons pares de sentenças pseudo-paralelas na fase de retrotradução. Calculamos o peso de cada par de sentenças pseudo-paralelas usando a pontuação BLEU de ida e volta que é normalizada em lotes. Comparamos nossa abordagem com as abordagens atuais do estado da arte para NMT não supervisionado.', 'ja': '教師なしニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）は、トレーニングのために単一言語のデータのみを利用します。逆翻訳されたデータの品質は、NMTシステムのパフォーマンスに重要な役割を果たします。バックトランスレーションでは、生成されたすべての擬似並行文ペアは同じ品質ではありません。ドメイン内の文章がトレーニングでより重み付けされるドメイン適応からインスピレーションを得て、この論文では、監視されていないNMTのトレーニングプロセスの一部として、翻訳されたデータをフィルタリングするアプローチを提案します。私たちのアプローチは、バック翻訳フェーズで優れた擬似並行文ペアをより重視しています。各擬似並行文ペアの重みは、バッチごとに正規化された文ごとのラウンドトリップBLEUスコアを使用して計算する。私たちは、私たちのアプローチを、監督されていないNMTのための現在の最先端のアプローチと比較します。', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) प्रशिक्षण के लिए केवल मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा का उपयोग करता है। बैक-अनूदित डेटा की गुणवत्ता एनएमटी सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाती है। बैक-ट्रांसलेशन में, सभी उत्पन्न छद्म समानांतर वाक्य जोड़े समान गुणवत्ता के नहीं हैं। डोमेन अनुकूलन से प्रेरणा लेते हुए जहां इन-डोमेन वाक्यों को प्रशिक्षण में अधिक वजन दिया जाता है, इस पेपर में हम असुरक्षित एनएमटी की प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया के हिस्से के रूप में बैक-अनूदित डेटा को फ़िल्टर करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण बैक-ट्रांसलेशन चरण में अच्छे छद्म समानांतर वाक्य जोड़े को अधिक वजन देता है। हम वाक्य-वार राउंड-ट्रिप BLEU स्कोर का उपयोग करके प्रत्येक छद्म समानांतर वाक्य जोड़ी के वजन की गणना करते हैं जो बैच-वार सामान्यीकृत है। हम असुरक्षित एनएमटी के लिए कला दृष्टिकोण की वर्तमान स्थिति के साथ हमारे दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करते हैं।', 'zh': '无监督神经机器翻译 (NMT) 惟以单语数训练之。 回译数在 NMT 统之中起用也。 于反向译中,所有伪并行句对者不同。 从域应中汲灵,其域内句有大权重,于本文中,立漉回译数之法,以为无监督NMT训练之一。 我们的方法在反向译阶段对良伪并行句子对加了更大权重。 余以句之往返BLEU分数计伪并句之权重,当分按批处理归一化也。 以吾法较先进无监督NMT法。', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемый нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) использует только одноязычные данные для обучения. Качество данных, переводимых в обратном направлении, играет важную роль в функционировании систем НМП. При обратном переводе все сгенерированные псевдопараллельные пары предложений не имеют одинакового качества. Вдохновляясь адаптацией домена, где предложениям в домене придается больший вес в обучении, в этой статье мы предлагаем подход к фильтрации обратно переведенных данных как часть процесса обучения неконтролируемой НБ. Наш подход придает больший вес хорошим парам псевдопараллельных предложений в фазе обратного перевода. Рассчитываем вес каждой псевдопараллельной пары предложений с использованием баллов BLEU по предложению и в оба конца, которые нормируются по пакету. Мы сравниваем наш подход с современными подходами для неконтролируемой НБ.', 'ga': 'Ní úsáideann aistriúchán meaisín néarach gan mhaoirseacht (NMT) ach sonraí aonteangacha le haghaidh oiliúna. Tá ról tábhachtach ag cáilíocht na sonraí aisaistrithe i bhfeidhmiú na gcóras NMT. Sa aisaistriúchán, níl na péirí abairtí comhthreomhara bréagacha ar fad den cháilíocht chéanna. Ag glacadh inspioráid ó oiriúnú fearainn ina dtugtar níos mó meáchain do abairtí in-fearainn san oiliúint, sa pháipéar seo molaimid cur chuige chun sonraí aistrithe siar a scagadh mar chuid de phróiseas oiliúna NMT gan mhaoirseacht. Tugann ár gcur chuige níos mó meáchain do phéirí abairtí comhthreomhara pseudo maithe sa chéim ais-aistriúcháin. Ríomhaimid meáchan gach péire abairtí comhthreomhar bréagach ag baint úsáide as scór BLEU turas cruinn atá ciallmhar ó thaobh na habairte de atá gnáth-chiallmhar ó bhaisc. Déanaimid ár gcur chuige a chur i gcomparáid leis an gcur chuige úrscothach atá ann faoi láthair don NMT gan mhaoirseacht.', 'ka': 'უფრო მუშაობელი ნეიროლური მაქსინის გაგრძელება (NMT) მხოლოდ მონოლენგური მონაცემები გამოყენება განაცემებისთვის. შემდეგ გაგრძელებული მონაცემების კალგატი NMT სისტემების გამოყენებაში გასანიშნავი პროლია. ყველა შექმნილი პესედო პარალელური სიტყვების ზოგები არიან ერთი კაalitეტისგან. დემომინის ადატაციაზე, რომელიც დემომინის სიტყვები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია განსწავლებაში, ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მივეყვებთ პროგრამის გადატვირთვა მონაცემების პროცესის ნაწილი. ჩვენი პროგრამა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ძალიან კარგი პესეუდო პარალელი სიტყვების ზოგრამაში. ჩვენ ყველა პესეუდო პარალელური წევრის ზომას გამოყენებთ, რომელიც ნორმალურიზებულია ბლესო წევრის წევრის გამოყენებით. ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგორმაციას შემდგომარებით მიმდინარე სურათის მიღება NMT-ზე.', 'el': 'Η μη εποπτευόμενη νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) χρησιμοποιεί μόνο μονογλωσσικά δεδομένα για την εκπαίδευση. Η ποιότητα των μεταγλωττισμένων δεδομένων παίζει σημαντικό ρόλο στην απόδοση των συστημάτων NMT. Στην πίσω μετάφραση, όλα τα παραγόμενα ψευδο-παράλληλα ζεύγη προτάσεων δεν είναι της ίδιας ποιότητας. Με έμπνευση από την προσαρμογή του τομέα όπου οι προτάσεις εντός του τομέα αποδίδονται μεγαλύτερο βάρος στην εκπαίδευση, στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση για το φιλτράρισμα των μεταφρασμένων δεδομένων ως μέρος της εκπαιδευτικής διαδικασίας της μη εποπτικής NMT. Η προσέγγισή μας δίνει μεγαλύτερο βάρος στα καλά ψευδο-παράλληλα ζεύγη προτάσεων στη φάση της αντίστροφης μετάφρασης. Υπολογίζουμε το βάρος κάθε ψευδο-παράλληλου ζεύγους προτάσεων χρησιμοποιώντας τη βαθμολογία στρογγυλής διαδρομής που είναι κανονικοποιημένη παρτίδα. Συγκρίνουμε την προσέγγισή μας με τις τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις για μη επιτηρημένη NMT.', 'hu': 'A felügyeletlen neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) csak egynyelvű adatokat használ az edzéshez. A visszafordított adatok minősége fontos szerepet játszik az NMT rendszerek teljesítményében. Visszafordításban az összes generált pszeudo párhuzamos mondatpár nem azonos minőségű. A domain adaptációból inspirálva, ahol a domain mondatok nagyobb súlyt kapnak a képzésben, ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk a visszafordított adatok szűrését a felügyelet nélküli NMT képzési folyamatának részeként. Megközelítésünk nagyobb súlyt ad a jó pszeudo párhuzamos mondatpároknak a visszafordítási fázisban. Az egyes pszeudo párhuzamos mondatpárok súlyát mondat-bölcsességű, fordulós BLEU pontszám segítségével számoljuk ki, amely tétel-bölcsességű normalizált. Összehasonlítjuk megközelítésünket a felügyelet nélküli NMT jelenlegi korszerű megközelítéseivel.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica neurale non supervisionata (NMT) utilizza solo dati monolingue per l'allenamento. La qualità dei dati retrotradotti gioca un ruolo importante nelle prestazioni dei sistemi NMT. Nella traduzione posteriore, tutte le coppie di frasi pseudo parallele generate non sono della stessa qualità. Prendendo spunto dall'adattamento del dominio in cui le frasi in-dominio sono date più peso nella formazione, in questo articolo proponiamo un approccio per filtrare i dati tradotti indietro come parte del processo di formazione di NMT non supervisionato. Il nostro approccio dà più peso alle buone coppie di frasi pseudo parallele nella fase di traduzione posteriore. Calcoliamo il peso di ogni coppia di frasi pseudo parallele utilizzando il punteggio BLEU di andata e ritorno della frase normalizzato per batch. Confrontiamo il nostro approccio con gli attuali approcci allo stato dell'arte per NMT non supervisionato.", 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas neurologinis vertimas (NMT) mokymui naudoja tik vienkalbius duomenis. The quality of back-translated data plays an important role in the performance of NMT systems.  In back-translation, all generated pseudo parallel sentence pairs are not of the same quality.  Įkvėpiant nuo pritaikymo prie srities, kurioje mokymo srities sakiniai skiriami daugiau svarbos, šiame dokumente siūlome metodą filtruoti grįžtamuosius duomenis kaip nepastebimos NMT mokymo proceso dalį. Mūsų požiūris suteikia daugiau svarbos geroms pseudolygiagrečioms sakinių poroms atgal vertimo etape. Apskaičiuojame kiekvienos pseudolygiagrečios sakinio poros svorį, naudodami sakinio atžvilgiu apvalios kelionės BLEU tašką, kuris yra normalizuotas serijos atžvilgiu. Palyginame savo požiūrį su dabartiniais pažangiausiais požiūriais į nepastebimą NMT.', 'kk': 'Сәйкестірілмеген невралдық компьютерді аудару (NMT) тек бір тілдік деректерді оқыту үшін қолданады. Қайта аударылған деректердің сапасы NMT жүйелерінің істеу үшін маңызды рольді орындайды. Артық аудармасында, барлық құрылған псевдо параллелі сөздің екі бір сапасы жоқ. Доменде сөйлемелер көп қалыпты оқыту үшін доменге көмектесетін адамзациялаудан сүзгілеу үшін, осы қағаздың артқа аударылмаған деректерді NMT бақылау процесінің бір бөлігі ретінде сүзгілеу жағдайын та Біздің тәсіліміміз артқа аудару кезегінде жақсы псевдо параллель сөздің екеуіне көп қатты береді. Біз әрбір псевдо параллель сөйлеменің қанықтығын сөйлеменің тегін көмектесеміз. Бұл сөйлеменің тегін көмектесетін BLEU нүктесі, көмектесетін параллель сөйлеменің тегі Біз өзіміздің тәсілімімізді NMT бағдарламасының қазіргі күйіне салыстырамыз.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) tidak dikendalikan hanya menggunakan data monobahasa untuk latihan. Kualiti data terjemahan-balik bermain peran penting dalam prestasi sistem NMT. Dalam terjemahan-belakang, semua pasangan kalimat selari pseudo yang dijana tidak berkualiti yang sama. Taking inspiration from domain adaptation where in-domain sentences are given more weight in training, in this paper we propose an approach to filter back-translated data as part of the training process of unsupervised NMT.  pendekatan kita memberikan lebih berat kepada pasangan kalimat selari pseudo yang baik dalam fase terjemahan belakang. Kami menghitung berat setiap pasangan kalimat selari pseudo menggunakan skor BLEU perjalanan bulat kalimat yang normal secara batch. Kita membandingkan pendekatan kita dengan pendekatan seni semasa untuk NMT yang tidak diawasi.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуван превод на неврални машини (NMT) користи само монојазични податоци за обука. Квалитетот на преведени податоци игра важна улога во изведувањето на НМТ системите. Во задниот превод, сите генерирани псевдо паралелни реченици не се од ист квалитет. Преземајќи инспирација од адаптацијата на доменот каде речениците во доменот се даваат поголема тежина во обуката, во овој документ предлагаме пристап за филтрирање на податоци преведени назад како дел од процесот на обука на ненадгледувана НМТ. Нашиот пристап им дава поголема тежина на добрите псевдо паралелни реченици во фазата на превод. Ја пресметаме тежината на секој псевдо паралелен пар реченици користејќи реченица по круг пат БЛЕ оценка која е нормализирана по партија. Го споредуваме нашиот пристап со сегашните најнови пристапи за ненадгледувана НМТ.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali (NMT) mhux sorveljata tuża biss dejta monolingwistika għat-taħriġ. Il-kwalità tad-dejta tradotta lura għandha rwol importanti fil-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi NMT. Fit-traduzzjoni lura, il-pari kollha ta’ sentenzi psewdo paralleli ġġenerati mhumiex tal-istess kwalità. Bl-ispirazzjoni mill-adattament tad-dominju fejn is-sentenzi fid-dominju jingħataw aktar piż fit-taħriġ, f’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu approċċ biex tiġi ffiltrata dejta tradotta lura bħala parti mill-proċess ta’ taħriġ ta’ NMT mhux sorveljat. L-approċċ tagħna jagħti aktar piż lil pari tajbin ta’ sentenzi psewdo paralleli fil-fażi ta’ wara t-traduzzjoni. We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise.  Aħna nqabblu l-approċċ tagħna mal-approċċi attwali tal-aktar avvanzati għal NMT mhux sorveljat.', 'ml': 'പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള മോനോളില്\u200d ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ. തിരിച്ചറിയിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഗുണവും NMT സിസ്റ്റമുകളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പങ് In back-translation, all generated pseudo parallel sentence pairs are not of the same quality.  ഡൊമെയിനിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഭാരം കൊടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്തം എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക് നമ്മുടെ സമീപത്ത് നല്ല പെസുഡോയ്ക്ക് ഭാരം കൂടുതല്\u200d ഭാരം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. പിന്നിലെ പരാജയപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക്  എല്ലാ പെസുഡോയുടെയും തുല്യത്തിന്റെയും ഭാരം നമ്മള്\u200d കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. അത് സാധാരണ ബാച്ച് ജ്ഞാനിയാക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് ബില്യൂ റ സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ നിലവിലുള്ള കലാകാരത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടുത്തുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയോട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുട', 'mn': 'Хамгаалахгүй мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) зөвхөн ганц хэл өгөгдлийг сургалтын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Дараа нь орчуулсан өгөгдлийн сайн чанар NMT системийн үйл ажиллагаанд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Өмнөх орчуулалт бүх pseudo параллел өгүүлбэрийн хоёр нь ижил чанартай биш. Энэ цаасан дээр бид буцаад орчуулсан өгөгдлийг NMT-ийн сургалтын нэг хэсэг болгон шинжилгээ хийх боломжтой арга зам зөвлөж байна. Бидний арга хэмжээнд буцаад орчуулагдах хэмжээсүүдийг илүү жинтэй болгодог. Бид pseudo параллель өгүүлбэрийн хоёрын жин нь өгүүлбэртэй BLEU-ын тоо ашиглан тооцож байна. Бид урлагийн тусламжтай харьцуулсан NMT-ийн тусламжгүй байдалтай харьцуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Nienadzorowane neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) wykorzystuje tylko dane jednojęzyczne do treningów. Jakość przetłumaczonych wstecznie danych odgrywa ważną rolę w wydajności systemów NMT. W tłumaczeniu wstecznym wszystkie generowane para zdań pseudo równoległych nie mają tej samej jakości. Inspirując się adaptacją domeny, w której zdania wewnętrzne są nadawane większą wagę w treningu, w niniejszym artykule proponujemy podejście do filtrowania wstecznie przetłumaczonych danych jako część procesu szkoleniowego NMT bez nadzoru. Nasze podejście nadaje większą wagę do dobrych parametrów zdań pseudo równoległych w fazie tłumaczenia wstecznego. Obliczamy wagę każdej pseudo paralelnej pary zdań przy użyciu zdań okrągłego wyniku BLEU, który jest znormalizowany partiowo. Porównujemy nasze podejście z aktualnym stanem techniki dla NMT bez nadzoru.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală nesupravegheată (NMT) utilizează doar date monolingve pentru formare. Calitatea datelor traduse înapoi joacă un rol important în performanța sistemelor NMT. În traducerea din spate, toate perechile de propoziții pseudo paralele generate nu sunt de aceeași calitate. Luând inspirație din adaptarea domeniului în care propozițiile în domeniu sunt acordate mai multă importanță în formare, în această lucrare propunem o abordare pentru filtrarea datelor traduse înapoi ca parte a procesului de formare a NMT nesupravegheat. Abordarea noastră acordă mai multă importanță perechilor de propoziții pseudo paralele bune în faza de traducere înapoi. Calculăm greutatea fiecărei perechi de propoziții pseudo paralele folosind punctajul BLEU de întoarcere în sensul propoziției, care este normalizat în sensul lotului. Comparăm abordarea noastră cu abordările actuale de ultimă oră pentru NMT nesupravegheat.', 'no': 'Ustyrke neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) brukar berre monospråk data for trening. Kvaliteten på tilbakeomsette data spelar ein viktig rolle i NMT-systemet. I tilbakeomsetjinga er alle oppretta pseudoparallelle setningar ikkje med same kvalitet. For å ta inspirasjon frå domenetilpassing der setningane i domenet er gjeve meir vekt i opplæring, i denne papiret foreslår vi ein tilnærming til å filtrera tilbakeomsette data som del av opplæringsprosessen av ulike NMT. Tilnærminga vårt gjev meir vekt til god pseudoparallelle setningar i tilbakeomsetjingsfase. Vi reknar ut vekten på kvar pseudoparallell setningspar med setningsverdi rundt BLEU-poeng som er normalisert med batch-wise. Vi samanliknar tilnærminga vårt med den gjeldande tilstanden til kunsten nærmer til ulike NMT-tilnærming.', 'sr': 'Neodređeni prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) koristi samo monojezičke podatke za obuku. Kvaliteta prevedenih podataka igra važnu ulogu u provedbi NMT sistema. U povratnom prevodu, svi proizvedeni pseudoparalelni parovi rečenice nisu isti kvalitet. Uzimajući inspiraciju iz adaptacije domena u kojoj se rečenice u domenu pružaju veća težina obuke, u ovom papiru predlažemo pristup filtriranju prevedenih podataka kao deo procesa obuke neodređenog NMT-a. Naš pristup daje veću težinu dobrim pseudom paralelnim parovima rečenica u fazi prevoda. Izračunamo težinu svakog pseudo paralelnog parova rečenice koristeći rezultat BLEU-a na okružnom putu, koji je normaliziran na seriji. Uspoređujemo naš pristup sa trenutnim stanjem umetnosti pristupa nepotrebnim NMT-om.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව (NMT) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් එක භාෂාවක් තොරතු Name පිටිපස්සේ- පරිවර්තනයෙන්, සියළුම ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය pseudo සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය දෙකක් එකම විශේෂතාවක් න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්නේ ඩොමේන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ කොහොමද කියලා, මේ පැත්තේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් පසුපසුපසුපසුපසුප අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය හොඳ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය දෙන්නේ පිටිපස්සේ පරිවර්තනය ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන්. අපි හැම පිස්සුඩෝ සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය දෙකක් ගැන බර ගණන් කරනවා වාක්ය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් වාක්ය BLUE ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය වාක් අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්නේ නැති NMT එක්ක ඉන්තුර ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමග.', 'so': 'Turjumista maskinada ee aan la ilaalinayn (NMT) wuxuu u isticmaalaa macluumaadka afka oo kaliya ee waxbarashada. Tusaalaha macluumaadka dib loo turjumay ayaa qayb muhiim ah ku sameeya sameynta nidaamka NMT. Waxbarashada dib-tarjumaadda, dhamaan dhashay pseudo parallel sentence lama aha isku qiimo. Waxyaabaha laguugu soo dirayo hab-bedelka internetka, kaas oo lagu siiyo miisaan ka badan waxbarashada, warqaddan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qalabka ku baaraandegista macluumaadka dib-turjuman sida qayb ka mid ah baaritaanka waxbarashada aan la ilaalinayn NMT. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu miisaan ka badan yahay si ay ugu siman yihiin hadalka labo oo isku mid ah fasaxa turjumidda dib. Waxaynu xisaabnaynaa miisaanka isku mid ah labo labo oo ku isticmaalaya hab xigmad ah oo safar BLEU ah oo lagu caadi yahay batch-wise. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa xaalada la soo socda ee farshaxanka ee NMT aan la ilaalinayn.', 'sv': 'Icke övervakad neural maskinöversättning (NMT) använder endast enspråkiga data för träning. Kvaliteten på bakåtöversatta data spelar en viktig roll för NMT-systemens prestanda. I backöversättning är alla genererade pseudo parallella meningspar inte av samma kvalitet. Med inspiration från domänanpassning där in-domain meningar ges mer vikt i träningen föreslår vi i denna uppsats ett tillvägagångssätt för att filtrera bakåtöversatta data som en del av träningsprocessen för icke-övervakad NMT. Vårt tillvägagångssätt ger mer vikt åt bra pseudo parallella meningspar i backöversättningsfasen. Vi beräknar vikten av varje pseudo parallellt meningspar med hjälp av meningsmässig rundtripp BLEU-poäng som normaliseras batchmässigt. Vi jämför vårt tillvägagångssätt med dagens toppmoderna tillvägagångssätt för oövervakad NMT.', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி (NMT) பயிற்சிக்கு மட்டும் மட்டுமே பயன்படுத்துகிறது. திரும்ப மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரவு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில், அனைத்தும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட pseudo parallel sentence ஜோடி சமமான தரம் அல்ல. டொமைன் ஒழுங்குப்பொருளில் இருந்து திருப்பப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள வாக்கியங்கள் பயிற்சியில் அதிகமாக எடுக்கப்படுகிறது, இந்த த தாளில் நாம் பின் மொ எங்கள் அணுகாரணத்திற்கு நன்றான பியூடாவுக்கு மேலும் எடை கொடுக்கும் பின்னால் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு காலத் ஒவ்வொரு பிசுடோ இணையான வாக்கு ஜோடியின் எடையை நாம் கணக்கிடுகிறோம் வாக்கு- wise round-trip BLEU மதிப்பை பயன்படுத்தி சாதாரண பிளியு விளக பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத NMT நிலையில் தற்போதைய கலை நெருக்கத்தை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'غیر قابل تحویل کی نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کی تعلیم کے لئے صرف monolingual data استعمال کرتا ہے. پیچھے ترجمہ دیٹا کی کیفیت NMT سیسٹم کی عملکرد میں ایک اہم رول لگا رہی ہے۔ پیچھے-ترجمہ میں، تمام پیدائو پیدائو پارالیل جماعت جوڑے ایک ہی کیفیت سے نہیں ہیں. ڈومین اڈیٹم سے الهام لینے کے لئے جہاں ڈومین میں جماعت کی تعلیم میں زیادہ وزن دی جاتی ہیں، ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ واپس ترجمہ دیے جاتے ہیں ڈیٹا کو ناپاک NMT کی تدریس پرسس کے حصہ میں فیلٹر کریں. ہماری تقریبا بہترین پاسئوڈو مشابہ جماعت کے جوڑوں کے لئے زیادہ وزن دیتا ہے۔ ہم ہر پاسئوڈو پارالٹ جماعت جوڑے کی وزن کا شمار کرتے ہیں کہ کلمز کی طرح رانگ ٹریپ BLEU اسکور کے مطابق ہے جو معمول بات کی طرح ہے ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو نرمی مضبوط NMT کے لئے فعلی موقع موقعیت کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name @ info: whatsthis Name Bizning fikrimiz yaxshi ko'proq o'xshash so'zlarni o'xshash o'zlariga o'zgartiradi. We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise.  Biz muvaffaqiyatli NMT haqida xavfsiz bo'lmaydigan sanatlar holatimizni kamaytamiz.", 'vi': 'Dịch biến máy thần kinh không giám sát (NMB) chỉ sử dụng dữ liệu ngôn ngữ riêng để huấn luyện. Chất lượng dữ liệu được dịch lại có vai trò quan trọng trong việc vận hành hệ thống NMT. Trong phiên dịch ngược, tất cả các trường chữ tương tự đã tạo ra không có cùng chất lượng. Lấy cảm hứng từ việc thích nghi miền nơi câu ở miền được trao nhiều trọng lượng hơn trong việc huấn luyện, trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp lọc lại những dữ liệu dịch chảy ngược như một phần trong tiến trình đào tạo NMB không được giám sát. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi tăng trọng lượng cho một cặp câu giả thuyết tốt trong giai đoạn dịch ngược. Chúng ta tính trọng lượng của mỗi cặp câu tương tự giả sử sử dụng số lượng còn lại của một bản án bình thường. Chúng ta so sánh phương pháp của chúng ta với các phương pháp nghệ thuật hiện nay cho NMT không giám sát.', 'bg': 'Неконтролираният неврален машинен превод (НМТ) използва само едноезични данни за обучение. Качеството на обратно преведените данни играе важна роля в работата на системите за НМТ. В обратния превод, всички генерирани псевдо паралелни двойки изречения не са с едно и също качество. Вдъхновявайки се от адаптацията на домейна, където изреченията в домейна получават по-голяма тежест при тренировка, в настоящата статия предлагаме подход за филтриране на обратно преведени данни като част от процеса на обучение на ненадзорни НМТ. Нашият подход дава повече тежест на добрите псевдо паралелни двойки изречения във фазата на обратен превод. Изчисляваме теглото на всяка псевдо паралелна двойка изречения, като използваме резултата за връщане на изреченията, който се нормализира по партида. Сравняваме нашия подход с настоящите съвременни подходи за ненадзорни НМТ.', 'hr': 'Neodređeni prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT) koristi samo monojezičke podatke za obuku. kvaliteta prevedenih podataka igra važnu ulogu u provedbi sustava NMT-a. U povratnom prevodu, svi proizvedeni pseudoparalelni parovi rečenice nisu isti kvalitet. Uzimajući inspiraciju iz adaptacije domena u kojima se kazne u domenu pružaju veća težina obuke, u ovom papiru predlažemo pristup filtriranju prevedenih podataka natrag kao dio procesa obuke neodređenog NMT-a. Naš pristup daje više težine dobrim pseudoparalelnim rečenicama u fazi prevoda. Izračunamo težinu svakog pseudo paralelnog parova rečenice s obzirom na rečenicu na krug putovanja BLEU rezultat koji je normaliziran na seriji. Mi uspoređujemo naš pristup trenutnom stanju umjetnosti pristupa nepotrebnim NMT-om.', 'da': 'Uservised neural machine translation (NMT) bruger kun ensprogede data til træning. Kvaliteten af back-translated data spiller en vigtig rolle i NMT-systemernes ydeevne. I back-translation er alle genererede pseudo parallelle sætningspar ikke af samme kvalitet. Med inspiration fra domænetilpasning, hvor domænetilpasninger lægges større vægt i træningen, foreslår vi i denne artikel en tilgang til at filtrere tilbage-oversatte data som en del af træningsprocessen for ikke-overvåget NMT. Vores tilgang giver mere vægt på gode pseudo parallelle sætningspar i bagoversættelsesfasen. Vi beregner vægten af hvert pseudo parallelt sætningspar ved hjælp af sætningsmæssig rundtur BLEU score, som er normaliseret batch-vis. Vi sammenligner vores tilgang med den aktuelle state of te art tilgang til ikke-overvåget NMT.', 'nl': 'Niet-begeleide neurale machinevertaling (NMT) gebruikt alleen eentalige gegevens voor training. De kwaliteit van back-vertaalde data speelt een belangrijke rol in de prestaties van NMT-systemen. Bij back-translation zijn alle gegenereerde pseudo parallelle zinsparen niet van dezelfde kwaliteit. Geïnspireerd op domeinadaptatie waarbij in-domain zinnen meer gewicht krijgen in training, stellen we in deze paper een aanpak voor om back-vertaalde data te filteren als onderdeel van het trainingsproces van niet-begeleide NMT. Onze aanpak geeft meer gewicht aan goede pseudo parallelle zinsparen in de back-translation fase. We berekenen het gewicht van elk pseudo parallelle zinnenpaar met behulp van zinnenwijs round-trip BLEU score die batch-wise genormaliseerd is. We vergelijken onze aanpak met de huidige state of the art benaderingen voor niet-begeleide NMT.', 'de': 'Unsupervised neuronal machine translation (NMT) verwendet nur einsprachige Daten für das Training. Die Qualität der rückübersetzten Daten spielt eine wichtige Rolle für die Leistung von NMT-Systemen. Bei der Rückübersetzung sind nicht alle generierten pseudo-parallelen Satzpaare von gleicher Qualität. Inspiriert von der Domänenanpassung, bei der in-domain Sätze im Training mehr Gewicht erhalten, schlagen wir in diesem Beitrag einen Ansatz vor, rückübersetzte Daten als Teil des Trainingsprozesses von unüberwachten NMT zu filtern. Unser Ansatz verleiht guten pseudo-parallelen Satzpaaren in der Rückübersetzungsphase mehr Gewicht. Wir berechnen das Gewicht jedes pseudo-parallelen Satzpaares mit satzweisem Round-Trip BLEU Score, der batchweise normalisiert ist. Wir vergleichen unseren Ansatz mit dem aktuellen Stand der Technik Ansätze für unüberwachte NMT.', 'ko': '무감시 신경기계번역(NMT)은 한어 데이터로만 훈련한다.번역 데이터의 질은 NMT 시스템의 성능에 중요한 역할을 한다.번역에서 모든 생성된 위조 평행문 쌍의 질량은 같지 않다.훈련에서 영역 내 문장에 더 많은 권한을 부여하는 영역 적응에서 시사점을 얻었다. 본고는 번역 데이터를 필터하는 방법을 제시하여 무감독 NMT 훈련 과정의 일부로 삼았다.우리의 방법은 번역 단계에서 좋은 위평행문에 더 많은 권한을 부여했다.우리는 분할 표준화된 문장을 사용하여 BLEU 점수를 왕복하여 모든 위조 평행 문장이 맞는 권한을 계산한다.Dell의 접근 방식을 현재 가장 진보된 무감독 NMT 접근 방식과 비교합니다.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf yang tidak diawasi (NMT) hanya menggunakan data monobahasa untuk latihan. Kualitas data terjemahan kembali bermain peran penting dalam prestasi sistem NMT. Dalam terjemahan belakang, semua pasangan kalimat paralel pseudo tidak memiliki kualitas yang sama. Mengambil inspirasi dari adaptasi domain dimana kalimat dalam domain diberikan lebih berat dalam latihan, dalam kertas ini kami mengusulkan pendekatan untuk filter data terjemahan kembali sebagai bagian dari proses latihan NMT tidak diawasi. pendekatan kita memberikan lebih berat untuk pasangan kalimat paralel pseudo yang baik dalam fase terjemahan belakang. We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise.  Kita membandingkan pendekatan kita dengan pendekatan seni saat ini untuk NMT yang tidak diawasi.', 'fa': 'ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی غیرقابل تحویل (NMT) فقط داده\u200cهای یک زبان برای آموزش استفاده می\u200cکند. کیفیت داده های پشت ترجمه شده نقش مهم در انجام سیستم NMT بازی می کند. در ترجمه پشتی، همه جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای مختلف pseudo تولید شده از یک کیفیت نیستند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش برای فیلتر داده\u200cهای عقب ترجمه شده به عنوان بخشی از فرایند آموزش NMT غیرقابل تحصیل قرار داده باشیم. دستور ما برای جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای پارالی در مرحله\u200cی ترجمه پشت وزن بیشتری می\u200cدهد. ما وزن هر جفت جمله پارالی را با استفاده از نقاط BLEU در طول سفر جمله\u200cای که به صورت طبیعی به صورت طبیعی تعریف می\u200cشود محاسبه می\u200cکنیم. ما روش خود را با وضعیت فعلی هنر برای NMT ناپذیر مقایسه می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine isiyo na uzalendo (NMT) hutumia taarifa za lugha tu kwa ajili ya mafunzo. Ukubwa wa data zilizotafsiriwa nyuma unacheza nafasi muhimu katika utendaji wa mfumo wa NMT. Katika tafsiri ya nyuma, kila kitu kilichozaliwa kama vile hukumu tofauti si sawa. Kuchukua hamasa kutoka kwa mabadiliko ya ndani ambapo hukumu za ndani hupewa uzito zaidi katika mafunzo, katika gazeti hili tunapendekeza njia ya kuchuja taarifa zilizotafsiriwa kwa nyuma kama sehemu ya mafunzo ya NMT ambayo haijahifadhiwa. Hatua yetu inaleta uzito zaidi kwenye hukumu nzuri kama ilivyo kwa wanandoa katika hatua ya kutafsiri nyuma. Tunakadiria uzito wa kila hukumu inayofanana na wanaume wawili kwa kutumia score za safari za BLEU za sentence yenye akili na ujumla. Tunaunganisha mbinu yetu na hali ya sasa ya njia za sanaa kwa ajili ya NMT isiyo na uhakika.', 'tr': "Mazmunlanmady näyral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) diňe monodil maglumaty okuw üçin ulanýar. Atyndaky terjime edilen maglumatyň keyfiýeti NMT sistemleriniň eserleşmelerinde wajyp roli oýnaýar. Arkaplan terjime eden, hemme pseudo parallel sözlem çiftleri ayn keyfiňde däl. Domenýä sözleriň eğitim içinde köp ağırlyk berilýän domenýän adaptasyndan ilham almak üçin bu kagyzda yzyna terjime edilen maglumatlary NMT'yň edilmedik eğitim prosesynyň bir parçasynda süýtgetmek üçin bir nusga teklip edýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz arka terjime etmäniň ýüzünde gowy pseudo parallel sözlem çiňiklerini köpräk taýýarlaýar. Biz her pseudo parallel çiftiniň ağılygyny, sözleriň ýüzünde gezelen, BLEU अ अ sanynyň düzenli bölegi ýagdaýylar. Biziň ýaryşymyzy şu wagt NMT-a garaşylmadyk ýaryşynyň häzirki durumyna karşılaşdyrýarys.", 'af': "Onondersteunde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) gebruik slegs monolinglike data vir onderwerp. Die kwaliteit van terugvertaalde data speel 'n belangrike rol in die prestasie van NMT stelsels. In terug- vertaling, almal gegenereer pseudo parallele sin paar is nie van dieselfde kwaliteit nie. Om inspirasie van domein aanpassing te neem waar in-domein setnings meer gewig in onderwerp gegee word, in hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n toegang om terugvertaling data te filter as deel van die onderwerp proses van ononderwerp NMT. Ons toegang gee meer gewig aan goeie pseudo parallele setpaar in die terugvertaling fase. Ons bereken die gewig van elke pseudo parallele sin paar met die gebruik van sin-wyse rond-reis BLEU-poeier wat normaliseer is in batch-wys. Ons vergelyk ons toegang met die huidige staat van die kuns toegang vir onverondersteunde NMT.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi i paimbikqyrur i makinës nervore (NMT) përdor vetëm të dhënat monogjuhësore për trajnimin. Kwaliteti i të dhënave të përkthyera prapa luan një rol të rëndësishëm në performancën e sistemeve NMT. Në përkthimin mbrapa, të gjitha çiftet e fjalëve pseudo paralele nuk janë të njëjtën cilësi. Duke marrë frymëzim nga përshtatja në domeni ku fjalëve në domeni u jepet më shumë peshë në trainimin, në këtë letër ne propozojmë një qasje për të filtruar të dhënat e përkthyera mbrapa si pjesë e procesit të trainimit të NMT të pazgjidhur. Our approach gives more weight to good pseudo parallel sentence pairs in the back-translation phase.  Ne llogarisim peshën e çdo çifti pseudo paralel fjalësh duke përdorur pikën BLEU në sens të fjalëve, e cila është normalizuar në sens të serisë. Ne krahasojmë qasjen tonë me qasjet aktuale të state of the art për NMT të pazgjidhur.', 'am': 'ያልተገለበጠው የናውሬል መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) በሞሎልቋል ዳታ ለትምህርት ብቻ ይጠቅማል። The quality of back-translated data plays an important role in the performance of NMT systems.  በጀርባ-ትርጉም፣ ሁሉም የተወለዱት pseudo parallel sentence ሁለት በአንድ ጥሩ አይደሉም፡፡ ከዶሜን አዳራሽን በመቀበል የውይይት ፍርድ በሚያስተማሩበት ላይ ሚዛን እንዲጨመር በማድረግ ማሳየትን በመቀበል እናስቀድዳለን፡፡ ጥያቄያችን ለመልካም ውይይት በሚያሳየው ደብዳቤ ሁለቶችን ለመተርጓም እየጨመረ ሚዛን ይሰጣል፡፡ የፖስድዶ ሚዛን እናስቆጥራለን፡፡ የአሁኑን የዓላማ አርእስት ለመጠበቅ ጥያቄን እናሳያታለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Անվերահսկված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) կրթության համար օգտագործում է միայն միալեզու տվյալներ: Վերթարգմանված տվյալների որակը նշանակալի դեր է խաղում NMT համակարգերի կատարման մեջ: Վերջին թարգմանման ժամանակ բոլոր ստեղծված կեղծ զուգահեռ նախադասությունների զուգավորները նույն որակի չեն: Հոգեշնչվելով բնագավառի ադապտացիայից, որտեղ բնագավառի նախադասությունները ավելի մեծ կշիռ են տալիս ուսուցման մեջ, այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ֆիլտրել վերադարձված տվյալներ որպես անվերահսկված NMT-ի ուսուցման գործընթացի մաս: Մեր մոտեցումը ավելի շատ կշիռ է տալիս լավ կեղծ զույգ նախադասությունների համար վերջնական թարգմանման ֆիզմում: Մենք հաշվարկում ենք յուրաքանչյուր կեղծ զույգ նախադասությունների կշիռը, օգտագործելով նախադասության առումով շրջանակի գնահատականը, որը նորմալ է բաժանման առումով: Մենք համեմատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը ներկայիս ամենահետաքրքիր մոտեցումների հետ անվերահսկված NMT-ի համար:', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (NMT) শুধু প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য মোনোলিভাষার তথ্য ব্যবহার করে। এনএমটি সিস্টেমের প্রদর্শনের মানে পেছনে অনুবাদ করা তথ্যের মান গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে। পিছন- অনুবাদের মধ্যে সকল উৎপাদন করা পিসুডো প্যারালেল বাক্যের জোড়া একই মানে নয়। ডোমেইন আবেদন থেকে অনুপ্রেরণা গ্রহণ করছে যেখানে ডোমেইনের শাস্তি প্রশিক্ষণে আরো ওজন প্রদান করা হচ্ছে, এই পাতায় আমরা পুনরাবৃত্তির তথ্য ফিল্টার করার একটি উপায় প্রস্ আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা পিসুডোর সাথে সামান্য কারাদণ্ডের জোড়ার জন্য আরো ওজন পেয়েছে। We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise.  আমরা আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতার তুলনা করি এনএমটির সংরক্ষিত শিল্পের বর্তমান অবস্থায়।', 'az': 'Müdafiə edilməmiş nöral mašin çevirimi (NMT) təhsil üçün yalnız monodil məlumatları istifadə edir. Geri çevirilmiş məlumatların keyfiyyəti NMT sistemlərinin performansında möhüm rol oynayır. Geri-tercümə içində, bütün yaratdığı pseudo paralel cümlənin çiftləri eyni qiymətdən deyildir. Domenin məlumatlarının təhsil edilməsi üçün daha ağırlığı verilən domenin adaptasiyasından ilham almaq üçün bu kağızda təhsil edilməyən NMT təhsil procesinin bir parças ı olaraq geri çevirilən məlumatları filtrləmək üçün bir metodu təklif edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız arka çeviri fəzində yaxşı pseudo paralel cümlənin çiftlərinə daha ağırlı verir. Biz hər pseudo paralel cümlənin ağırlığını, cümlənin tərəfindən dönüş BLEU nöqtəsini ilə, normalizləndirilmiş batch tərəfindən hesablayırıq. NMT-nin müəyyən edilməyən şəkildə müəyyən edilməyən şəkildə bizim tərəfimizi ilə qarşılaşdırırıq.', 'ca': "La traducció neuromàquina no supervisada (NMT) només utilitza dades monolingües per a formar-se. La qualitat de les dades tornades juga un paper important en el desempeny dels sistemes NMT. En la traducció posterior, tots els parells de frases pseudoparallels generats no són de la mateixa qualitat. Prenant inspiració de l'adaptació del domini on les frases en domini es donen més pes en l'entrenament, en aquest paper proposem un enfocament per filtrar les dades tornades traduïdes com part del procés d'entrenament de NMT no supervisada. El nostre enfocament dóna més pes a bons parells de frases pseudoparallels en la fase de traducció posterior. We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise.  Comparem el nostre enfocament amb els enfocaments actuals d'última edat de la MTN no supervisada.", 'bs': 'Neodređeni prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT) koristi samo monojezičke podatke za obuku. kvaliteta prevedenih podataka igra važnu ulogu u provedbi NMT-ovih sustava. U povratnom prevodu, svi proizvedeni pseudoparalelni parovi rečenice nisu isti kvalitet. Uzimajući inspiraciju iz adaptacije domena u kojoj se kazne u domenu pružaju veća težina u obuci, u ovom papiru predlažemo pristup filtriranju prevedenih podataka kao dio procesa obuke neodređenog NMT-a. Naš pristup daje veću težinu dobrim pseudom paralelnim parovima rečenice u fazi prevođenja pozadine. Izračunamo težinu svakog pseudo paralelnog parova rečenice koristeći rezultat BLEU-a u okviru rečenice koji je normaliziran na seriji. Upoređujemo naš pristup sa trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti pristupa nepotrebnim NMT-om.', 'cs': 'Nehlídaný neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) využívá pro trénink pouze jednojzyčná data. Kvalita zpětně přeložených dat hraje důležitou roli ve výkonnosti NMT systémů. Ve zpětném překladu nejsou všechny vygenerované pseudo paralelní větové páry stejné kvality. Inspirací z adaptace domény, kde jsou věty v doméně přidány větší váhu v tréninku, v tomto článku navrhujeme přístup k filtrování zpětně přeložených dat jako součást tréninkového procesu NMT bez dozoru. Náš přístup dává větší váhu dobrým pseudo paralelním větovým párům ve fázi zpětného překladu. Váhu každého pseudo paralelního větového páru vypočítáme pomocí větového round-trip BLEU skóre je normalizované dávkově. Porovnáváme náš přístup se současným stavem techniky pro NMT bez dohledu.', 'fi': 'Valvontaton neurokonekäännös (NMT) hyödyntää harjoitteluun vain yksikielistä tietoa. Takaisinkäännetyn tiedon laadulla on tärkeä rooli NMT-järjestelmien suorituskyvyssä. Takaisinkäännöksessä kaikki luodut pseudorinnakkaiset lauseparit eivät ole samanlaatuisia. Tässä tutkielmassa ehdotamme lähestymistapaa taaksekäännettyjen tietojen suodattamiseen osana valvomattoman NMT:n harjoitusprosessia, jossa domeeniset lauseet saavat enemmän painoarvoa harjoittelussa. Lähestymistapamme antaa enemmän painoa hyville pseudorinnakkaisille lausepareille takakäännösvaiheessa. Laskemme jokaisen pseudorinnakkaisen lauseparin painon käyttämällä lauseviisasta Round-Trip BLEU-pisteytystä, joka normalisoidaan eräkohtaisesti. Vertaamme lähestymistapaamme valvomattoman NMT:n nykytekniikkaan.', 'et': 'Järelevalveta neuraalne masintõlk (NMT) kasutab koolituseks ainult ühekeelseid andmeid. Tagasitõlgitud andmete kvaliteet mängib olulist rolli NMT süsteemide toimimisel. Tagasitõlkes ei ole kõik genereeritud pseudoparalleelsed lausepaarid sama kvaliteediga. Tuginedes inspiratsioonile domeeni kohandamisest, kus domeenilaused saavad treeningul rohkem kaalu, pakume selles töös välja lähenemisviisi tagasitõlgitud andmete filtreerimiseks osana järelevalveta NMT treeningprotsessist. Meie lähenemine annab rohkem kaalu headele pseudoparalleelsetele lausepaaridele tagatõlke faasis. Arvutame iga pseudoparalleelse lausepaari kaalu, kasutades lause-tagasi-tagasi BLEU skoori, mis on partii-osas normaliseeritud. Me võrdleme oma lähenemisviisi praeguse tehnika tasemega lähenemisviisidega järelevalveta NMT puhul.', 'jv': 'coral kalitas berkas terus-terus dadi sing dikarol sing dikarepaké ning sistem NMT. Anyone Taking hingment from domain modification Where in-domain Sententions are given additional size in tutorial, in this paper we proposal an method to film back-translation data as parts of the Learning Procedure of unupping NMT. Name Anyone Awak dhéwé nggawe gerarané karo hal-hal sing ngenggo parang kanggo NMT kuwi ora nggawe.', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano nevronsko strojno prevajanje (NMT) uporablja samo enojezične podatke za usposabljanje. Kakovost nazaj prevedenih podatkov igra pomembno vlogo pri delovanju sistemov NMT. V nazaj prevajanju vsi ustvarjeni psevdo vzporedni stavki niso enake kakovosti. V prispevku predlagamo pristop k filtriranju nazaj prevedenih podatkov v okviru procesa usposabljanja nenadzorovanega NMT. Naš pristop daje večjo težo dobrim psevdo paralelnim stavkom v fazi nazaj prevajanja. Težo vsakega psevdo vzporednega stavka izračunamo s pomočjo rezultata BLEU v smislu stavka in povratnega izleta, ki je normalizirana v smislu serije. Naš pristop primerjamo s sedanjimi najsodobnejšimi pristopi za nenadzorovane NMT.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Tsarin data da aka fassara a bayan-fassarar, yana da wani roli mai muhimu a cikin performance na tsarin NMT. @ info Yana riƙon yin wahayi daga adaptation ɗin-Domen inda aka ba da mummunan aiki masu ƙaranci a cikin shirin aiki, cikin wannan takarda, Munã ƙayyade wata hanyoyi wa filtera-tarjiwa data da aka fassara baka-tarjiwa kamar part of the coarnar wa NMT wanda aka tsare. MataimakinMu yana da nauyi ko da mazauni mai kyau ko kuma misalin nau'i biyu a cikin fassaran bakin-translation. Ana ƙaddara nau'in duk cewa da aka yi daidaita, nau'in nau'i biyu ko kuma ba mu yi amfani da nau'in rubutun mai baƙata-mai baƙaƙƙe na BLEU mai daidaita. Munã samfane hanyarmu da halin da ke kai yanzu zuwa NMT wanda ba'a tsare shi ba.", 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་རང་ཉིད་ཆས་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བརྗོད་(NMT)འདིས་སློབ་གྲྭའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་སྤྱོད་པ རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་བསྒྱུར་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རིམ་ཐང་ནི་NMT་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲུབ་སྟངས་ནང་གལ་ཆེན་ཅིག་གཏོང་བ In back-translation, all generated pseudo parallel sentence pairs are not the same quality. Taking inspiration from domain adaptation where in-domain sentences are given more weight in training, in this paper we propose an approach to filter back-translated data as part of the training process of unsupervised NMT. ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་ཚིགས་ཀྱིས་རྗེས་སུ་ཚོད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་གི་མཐའ་དབུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་ཚན་གཅིག་མཚུངས་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་ཚང་མས་འདི་ལྟར་མཐའ་དབུས་གྱི་བསྡོད་པའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་ཀ་འདི་རྩིས་བཏུབ་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་ད་ལྟོའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཡོད།', 'he': 'Unsupervised neural machine translation (NMT) utilizes only monolingual data for training.  The quality of back-translated data plays an important role in the performance of NMT systems.  In back-translation, all generated pseudo parallel sentence pairs are not of the same quality.  Taking inspiration from domain adaptation where in-domain sentences are given more weight in training, in this paper we propose an approach to filter back-translated data as part of the training process of unsupervised NMT.  Our approach gives more weight to good pseudo parallel sentence pairs in the back-translation phase.  We calculate the weight of each pseudo parallel sentence pair using sentence-wise round-trip BLEU score which is normalized batch-wise.  We compare our approach with the current state of the art approaches for unsupervised NMT.'}
{'en': 'Lost in Back-Translation : Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'فقدت في الترجمة الخلفية: الحفاظ على العاطفة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'es': 'Perdidos en la traducción inversa: Preservación de emociones en la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Perdido na tradução reversa: preservação de emoções na tradução automática neural', 'fr': 'Lost in Back-Translation\xa0: préservation des émotions dans la traduction automatique neuronale', 'ja': 'バック翻訳で失われた：神経機械翻訳における感情の保存', 'zh': '迷于背译:神经机器翻译之情存', 'hi': 'वापस अनुवाद में खोया: तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में भावना संरक्षण', 'ru': 'Потерян в обратном переводе: сохранение эмоций в нейронном машинном переводе', 'ga': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Caomhnú Mothúcháin san Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Χαμένος στην οπισθοδρομική μετάφραση: Διατήρηση συναισθημάτων στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Elveszett a visszafordításban: Az érzelmek megőrzése a neurális gépi fordításban', 'it': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Conservazione delle emozioni nella traduzione automatica neurale', 'lt': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'kk': 'Аудару аудармасында жоғалды: Нейрондық машинаның аудармасында күй- жайын сақтау', 'mk': 'Изгубен во превод: Зачувување на емоции во превод на неврални машини', 'ms': 'Kehilangan dalam Terjemahan-Belakang: Pertahanan Emosi dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ml': 'പിന്നോട്ട്- പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ടു: നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന Emotion Preservation', 'mn': 'Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'mt': 'Telf fit-Traduzzjoni ta’ wara: Preżervazzjoni ta’ l-emozzjonijiet fit-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali', 'no': 'Tapt i tilbakeomsetjing: Beholding av emosjonar i neiral maskinsomsetjing', 'sr': 'Izgubljen u pozadinskom prevodu: zaštita emocija u Neuralnoj prevodi mašine', 'pl': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Zachowanie emocji w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'ro': 'Pierdut în spate-traducere: Conservarea emoțiilor în traducerea automată neurală', 'sv': 'Förlorad i bakåtöversättning: Känslombevarande i neural maskinöversättning', 'so': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural machine Translation', 'si': 'පිටිපස්සේ අවවාදයේ නැතිවෙලා: ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරිවර්තනයේ භාවිතාව ආරක්ෂා කරන්න', 'ta': 'பின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் இழந்துவிட்டது: நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் உணர்வு பாதுகாப்பு', 'ur': 'پیچھے ترجمہ میں گھاٹ گیا: نئورل ماشین ترجمہ میں احساسات حفاظت', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': '♪ Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation ♪', 'bg': 'Загубени в гръбначния превод: запазване на емоциите в невралния машинен превод', 'nl': 'Verloren in Back-Translation: Emotiebehoud in Neurale Machine Translation', 'de': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotionserhaltung in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'da': 'Lost in Back-Oversættelse: Bevarelse af følelser i neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Izgubljen u povratnom prevodu: zaštita emocija u Neuralnom prevodu stroja', 'ko': '번역 중 잃어버리다: 신경 기계 번역 중의 감정 보존', 'id': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'sw': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'am': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'sq': 'Humbë në përkthimin mbrapa: Mbajtja e emocioneve në përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'hy': 'Վերջին թարգմանությունը կորցրել է. զգացմունքների պահպանությունը նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանության մեջ', 'tr': 'Iňki terjimede ýitilýär: Näyral Maşynyň terjimesinde ýerleşmek', 'az': 'Geri-tercümə içində ziyana uğradı: Nöral Makinatın Tercüməsində Emotion Preservation', 'af': 'Comment', 'ca': "Perdida en traducció posterior: Preservació d'emocions en traducció de màquines neuronales", 'fa': 'گم شده در ترجمه پشت: حفاظت احساسات در ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'cs': 'Ztracení v zpětném překladu: Zachování emocí v neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'bn': 'ব্যাক- অনুবাদে হারিয়েছে: নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের ইমোটেশন সংরক্ষণ', 'et': 'Kaotatud seljatõlkes: emotsioonide säilitamine neuroaalses masintõlkes', 'fi': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Izgubljen u pozadinskom prevodu: zaštita emocija u Neuralnoj prevodi mašine', 'jv': 'Gagal nang Backing-Tarjamahan: Etengan preset nang Neral Masine Terjamahan', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'אבוד בתרגום האחורי: שמירת רגשות בתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'Lost in Back-Translation: Emotion Preservation in Neural Machine Translation', 'sk': 'Izgubljeni v hrbtnem prevodu: ohranjanje čustev v živčnem strojnem prevodu'}
{'en': 'Machine translation provides powerful methods to convert text between languages, and is therefore a technology enabling a multilingual world. An important part of communication, however, takes place at the non-propositional level (e.g., politeness, formality, emotions), and it is far from clear whether current MT methods properly translate this information. This paper investigates the specific hypothesis that the non-propositional level of emotions is at least partially lost in MT. We carry out a number of experiments in a back-translation setup and establish that (1) emotions are indeed partially lost during translation ; (2) this tendency can be reversed almost completely with a simple re-ranking approach informed by an emotion classifier, taking advantage of diversity in the n-best list ; (3) the re-ranking approach can also be applied to change emotions, obtaining a model for emotion style transfer. An in-depth qualitative analysis reveals that there are recurring linguistic changes through which emotions are toned down or amplified, such as change of modality.', 'ar': 'توفر الترجمة الآلية طرقًا قوية لتحويل النص بين اللغات ، وبالتالي فهي تقنية تتيح عالماً متعدد اللغات. ومع ذلك ، فإن جزءًا مهمًا من الاتصال يحدث على المستوى غير الافتراضى (على سبيل المثال ، الأدب والشكليات والعواطف) ، وليس من الواضح ما إذا كانت أساليب الترجمة الآلية الحالية تترجم هذه المعلومات بشكل صحيح. تبحث هذه الورقة في الفرضية المحددة بأن المستوى غير الافتراضي للعواطف قد فقد جزئيًا على الأقل في الترجمة الآلية. نجري عددًا من التجارب في إعداد الترجمة العكسية ونثبت أن (1) المشاعر ضاعت جزئيًا أثناء الترجمة ؛ (2) يمكن عكس هذا الاتجاه بالكامل تقريبًا من خلال نهج إعادة ترتيب بسيط مسترشد بمصنف عاطفي ، مع الاستفادة من التنوع في قائمة أفضل n ؛ (3) يمكن أيضًا تطبيق نهج إعادة الترتيب لتغيير المشاعر ، والحصول على نموذج لنقل نمط العاطفة. يكشف التحليل النوعي المتعمق أن هناك تغييرات لغوية متكررة يتم من خلالها تخفيف العواطف أو تضخيمها ، مثل تغيير الأسلوب.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique fournit des méthodes puissantes pour convertir du texte entre les langues et constitue donc une technologie permettant un monde multilingue. Cependant, une partie importante de la communication a lieu au niveau non propositionnel (politesse, formalité, émotions), et il est loin d'être clair si les méthodes actuelles de traduction automatique traduisent correctement ces informations. Cet article examine l'hypothèse spécifique selon laquelle le niveau d'émotions non propositionnel est au moins partiellement perdu dans la MT. Nous menons un certain nombre d'expériences dans une configuration de rétro-traduction et établissons que (1) les émotions sont effectivement partiellement perdues pendant la traduction\xa0; (2) cette tendance peut être inversée presque complètement avec une simple approche de reclassement éclairée par un classificateur d'émotions, en tirant parti de la diversité dans la liste des n-meilleurs\xa0; (3) l'approche de reclassement peut également être appliquée pour changer les émotions, en obtenant un modèle de transfert de style d'émotion. Une analyse qualitative approfondie révèle qu'il existe des changements linguistiques récurrents qui atténuent ou amplifient les émotions, tels que les changements de modalité.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática fornece métodos poderosos para converter texto entre idiomas e, portanto, é uma tecnologia que permite um mundo multilíngue. Uma parte importante da comunicação, no entanto, ocorre no nível não proposicional (por exemplo, polidez, formalidade, emoções), e está longe de ser claro se os métodos atuais de TA traduzem adequadamente essas informações. Este artigo investiga a hipótese específica de que o nível não proposicional das emoções é pelo menos parcialmente perdido na TM. Realizamos uma série de experimentos em uma configuração de retrotradução e estabelecemos que (1) as emoções são de fato parcialmente perdidas durante a tradução; (2) essa tendência pode ser revertida quase completamente com uma simples abordagem de reclassificação informada por um classificador de emoções, aproveitando a diversidade na lista dos n-melhores; (3) a abordagem de reclassificação também pode ser aplicada para mudar emoções, obtendo-se um modelo de transferência de estilo de emoção. Uma análise qualitativa aprofundada revela que há mudanças linguísticas recorrentes por meio das quais as emoções são atenuadas ou amplificadas, como a mudança de modalidade.', 'es': 'La traducción automática proporciona métodos potentes para convertir texto entre idiomas y, por lo tanto, es una tecnología que permite un mundo multilingüe. Sin embargo, una parte importante de la comunicación tiene lugar a un nivel no proposicional (por ejemplo, cortesía, formalidad, emociones), y no está nada claro si los métodos actuales de MT traducen correctamente esta información. Este artículo investiga la hipótesis específica de que el nivel no proposicional de emociones se pierde al menos parcialmente en la MT. Llevamos a cabo una serie de experimentos en una configuración de retrotraducción y establecemos que (1) las emociones se pierden parcialmente durante la traducción; (2) esta tendencia se puede revertir casi por completo con un simple enfoque de reorganización basado en un clasificador de emociones, aprovechando la diversidad en la lista de n-mejores; (3) el enfoque de reordenamiento también se puede aplicar para cambiar las emociones, obteniendo un modelo para la transferencia de estilo de emoción. Un análisis cualitativo en profundidad revela que hay cambios lingüísticos recurrentes a través de los cuales las emociones se atenúan o amplifican, como el cambio de modalidad.', 'ja': '機械翻訳は、言語間でテキストを変換するための強力な方法を提供するため、多言語の世界を可能にする技術です。 しかし、コミュニケーションの重要な部分は、非提案的なレベル（例えば、丁寧さ、形式、感情）で行われ、現在のMT方法がこの情報を適切に翻訳するかどうかは、はるかに明確ではない。 本論文では、MTでは少なくとも部分的に感情の非プロポーズレベルが失われるという具体的な仮説を検討する。 私たちは、バック翻訳の設定でいくつかの実験を行い、(1)実際に翻訳中に感情が部分的に失われることを確立します。(2)この傾向は、nベストリストの多様性を利用して、感情分類子によって情報提供される単純な再ランクアプローチでほぼ完全に逆転することができます。(3)再ランクアプローチは、感情の変化にも適用でき、感情スタイル転送のモデルを得ることができます。 深い定性的分析は、モダリティの変化など、感情がトーンダウンまたは増幅される言語的変化が繰り返されていることを明らかにします。', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद भाषाओं के बीच पाठ को परिवर्तित करने के लिए शक्तिशाली तरीके प्रदान करता है, और इसलिए एक बहुभाषी दुनिया को सक्षम करने वाली एक तकनीक है। संचार का एक महत्वपूर्ण हिस्सा, हालांकि, गैर-प्रस्तावात्मक स्तर (जैसे, विनम्रता, औपचारिकता, भावनाओं) पर होता है, और यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि वर्तमान एमटी विधियां इस जानकारी का ठीक से अनुवाद करती हैं या नहीं। यह पेपर विशिष्ट परिकल्पना की जांच करता है कि भावनाओं का गैर-प्रस्तावात्मक स्तर कम से कम आंशिक रूप से एमटी में खो गया है। हम बैक-ट्रांसलेशन सेटअप में कई प्रयोग करते हैं और स्थापित करते हैं कि (1) भावनाएं वास्तव में अनुवाद के दौरान आंशिक रूप से खो जाती हैं; (2) इस प्रवृत्ति को लगभग पूरी तरह से एक भावना क्लासिफायर द्वारा सूचित एक सरल पुन: रैंकिंग दृष्टिकोण के साथ उलटदिया जा सकता है, जो एन-बेस्ट सूची में विविधता का लाभ उठाता है; (3) भावनाओं को बदलने के लिए पुन: रैंकिंग दृष्टिकोण को भी लागू किया जा सकता है, भावना शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए एक मॉडल प्राप्त करना। एक गहन गुणात्मक विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि आवर्ती भाषाई परिवर्तन हैं जिनके माध्यम से भावनाओं को नीचे या प्रवर्धित किया जाता है, जैसे कि रूपरेखा में परिवर्तन।', 'ru': 'Машинный перевод обеспечивает мощные методы для преобразования текста между языками, и поэтому технология позволяет многоязычный мир. Однако важная часть коммуникации происходит на непозиционном уровне (например, вежливость, формальность, эмоции), и далеко не ясно, правильно ли переводят эту информацию нынешние методы МП. В данной работе исследуется конкретная гипотеза о том, что непозиционный уровень эмоций по крайней мере частично теряется в МП. Мы проводим ряд экспериментов в системе обратного перевода и устанавливаем, что (1) эмоции действительно частично теряются во время перевода; (2) эта тенденция может быть почти полностью обращена вспять с помощью простого подхода к перераспределению, основанного на классификаторе эмоций, используя преимущество разнообразия в n-лучшем списке; (3) подход к перераспределению также может быть применен для изменения эмоций, получая модель для передачи стиля эмоций. Углубленный качественный анализ показывает, что происходят повторяющиеся лингвистические изменения, посредством которых эмоции тонизируются или усиливаются, такие как изменение модальности.', 'zh': '机器翻译给言语转文本之强,故多言世界之术也。 然通要在非命题层面(如礼、正、情),目前机器翻译法正译者远矣。 本文治一特定假设,即非命题情绪水平于MT中至少失之。 设回传多实验,定(1)情于译者实失之。 (2)此势几尽逆转,因一简而重排之,情分类器信息,因n-best列表之多样性。 (3)名法亦可以情变,得情风可以移形。 深入之定性分析,反覆之言,情淡化放大,如式之变。', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn aistriúchán meaisín modhanna cumhachtacha chun téacs a thiontú idir teangacha, agus mar sin is teicneolaíocht é a chumasaíonn domhan ilteangach. Tarlaíonn cuid thábhachtach den chumarsáid, áfach, ar an leibhéal neamhthairiscint (m.sh., dea-bhéasacht, foirmiúlacht, mothúcháin), agus níl sé soiléir cé acu a aistríonn modhanna reatha MT an fhaisnéis seo i gceart. Imscrúdaíonn an páipéar seo an hipitéis shonrach go bhfuil leibhéal neamhthairgthe na mothúcháin caillte go páirteach i MT ar a laghad. Déanaimid roinnt turgnamh i socrú ais-aistriúcháin agus dearbhaímid (1) go gcailltear cuid de mhothúcháin le linn an aistriúcháin; (2) is féidir an claonadh seo a aisiompú beagnach go hiomlán le cur chuige athrangaithe simplí arna chur in iúl ag aicmitheoir mothúcháin, ag baint leasa as éagsúlacht sa liosta n-is fearr; (3) is féidir an cur chuige ath-rangú a chur i bhfeidhm freisin chun mothúcháin a athrú, múnla a fháil le haghaidh aistriú stíl mothúcháin. Nochtann anailís cháilíochtúil dhomhain go bhfuil athruithe teanga athfhillteacha ann trína ndéantar mothúcháin a thonú nó a mhéadú, mar athrú modhúlachta.', 'ka': 'მაქსინური გაგრძელება ძალიან მეტესტის შეცვლა ენების შორის ტექსტის შეცვლა, და ამიტომ არის ტექნოლოგია, რომელიც მრავალენგური მსოფლიოს შესაძ მაგრამ კომუნიკაციის მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილი იქნება არ-პროგრაციური დონეში (მაგალითად, წარმოდგენება, ფორმაციალობა, ემოციები) და არ არის წარმოდგენებელი, თუ არა მიმდინარე MT მეტის ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს განსაკუთრებული ჰიპოტეზეზა, რომ ემოციების არ-პროგრამიური დონე MT-ში უფრო ნაკლებად ნაკლებად დაკავშირდება. ჩვენ ვიყავით რამდენიმე ექსპერიმენტები პროგრამის შესაძლებ (2) ეს ტენდენცია შეიძლება უფრო სრულად გადაბრუნოთ, როგორც ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციის ინფორმაციული განსხვავებაზე n-საუკეთესო სიტყვებში გამოიყენება. (3) შეიძლება ახლა ემოციების ცვლილებისთვის გამოყენება, რომელიც ემოციონის სტილის გადატანისთვის მოდელი მიიღება. კვალიტატიური ანალიზია, რომელიც იქნება, რომ ენგონისტიკური ცვლილებები, რომლებიც ემოციები აღმოჩენიან ან აღმოჩენიან, როგორც მოდიალობის ცვლილება.', 'el': 'Η μηχανική μετάφραση παρέχει ισχυρές μεθόδους μετατροπής κειμένου μεταξύ γλωσσών και ως εκ τούτου είναι μια τεχνολογία που επιτρέπει έναν πολύγλωσσο κόσμο. Ένα σημαντικό μέρος της επικοινωνίας, ωστόσο, λαμβάνει χώρα σε μη προτασιακό επίπεδο (π.χ. ευγένεια, τυπικότητα, συναισθήματα), και δεν είναι καθόλου σαφές αν οι τρέχουσες μέθοδοι ΜΤ μεταφράσουν σωστά αυτές τις πληροφορίες. Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά τη συγκεκριμένη υπόθεση ότι το μη προτασιακό επίπεδο των συναισθημάτων χάνεται τουλάχιστον εν μέρει στη Διεξάγουμε μια σειρά πειραμάτων σε μια ρύθμιση αντίστροφης μετάφρασης και διαπιστώνουμε ότι (1) τα συναισθήματα πράγματι χάνονται εν μέρει κατά τη μετάφραση. (2) η τάση αυτή μπορεί να αντιστραφεί σχεδόν ολοκληρωτικά με μια απλή προσέγγιση αναπροσαρμογής που θα ενημερώνεται από έναν ταξινομητή συναισθημάτων, αξιοποιώντας την ποικιλομορφία στον κατάλογο ν-καλύτερων· (3) η προσέγγιση επανακατάταξης μπορεί επίσης να εφαρμοστεί στην αλλαγή συναισθημάτων, αποκτώντας ένα μοντέλο μεταφοράς στυλ συναισθημάτων. Μια εμπεριστατωμένη ποιοτική ανάλυση αποκαλύπτει ότι υπάρχουν επαναλαμβανόμενες γλωσσικές αλλαγές μέσω των οποίων τα συναισθήματα μειώνονται ή ενισχύονται, όπως η αλλαγή της τροπικότητας.', 'hu': 'A gépi fordítás hatékony módszereket kínál a szöveg nyelvek közötti konvertálására, ezért egy olyan technológia, amely lehetővé teszi a többnyelvű világ kialakítását. A kommunikáció fontos része azonban nem javaslati szinten zajlik (pl. udvariasság, formaság, érzelmek), és messze nem világos, hogy a jelenlegi MT módszerek megfelelően fordítják-e le ezt az információt. Jelen tanulmány azt a konkrét hipotézist vizsgálja, hogy az érzelmek nem javaslatos szintje legalább részben elveszett MT-ben. Számos kísérletet végzünk egy háttér-fordítási rendszerben, és megállapítjuk, hogy (1) az érzelmek valóban részben elvesznek a fordítás során; (2) ezt a tendenciát szinte teljesen meg lehet fordítani egy érzelmi osztályozó által tájékoztatott egyszerű újraértékelési megközelítéssel, kihasználva az n-legjobb lista sokszínűségét; (3) az érzelmek megváltoztatására is alkalmazható az átrendező megközelítés, az érzelmek stílusátadásának modellje. Egy részletes minőségi elemzés feltárja, hogy vannak visszatérő nyelvi változások, amelyek révén az érzelmek csökkentik vagy erősítik, mint például a modalitás változása.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica fornisce metodi potenti per convertire il testo tra le lingue ed è quindi una tecnologia che consente un mondo multilingue. Una parte importante della comunicazione, tuttavia, avviene a livello non proposizionale (ad esempio, cortesia, formalità, emozioni), ed è tutt'altro che chiaro se gli attuali metodi MT traducano correttamente queste informazioni. Questo articolo indaga l'ipotesi specifica che il livello non proposizionale delle emozioni sia almeno parzialmente perso in MT. Eseguiamo una serie di esperimenti in una configurazione di back-translation e stabiliamo che (1) le emozioni sono effettivamente parzialmente perse durante la traduzione; (2) questa tendenza può essere invertita quasi completamente con un semplice approccio di ri-ranking informato da un classificatore di emozioni, sfruttando la diversità nella lista n-best; (3) l'approccio di re-ranking può essere applicato anche per cambiare le emozioni, ottenendo un modello per il trasferimento di stile emotivo. Un'analisi qualitativa approfondita rivela che ci sono cambiamenti linguistici ricorrenti attraverso i quali le emozioni vengono attenuate o amplificate, come il cambiamento di modalità.", 'lt': 'Mašininis vertimas suteikia galingų metodų tekstui konvertuoti tarp kalbų, todėl yra technologija, leidžianti daugiakalbį pasaulį. Vis dėlto svarbi komunikacijos dalis vyksta nenumatytame lygmenyje (pvz., mandagumas, formalumas, emocijos), ir nėra aišku, ar dabartiniai MT metodai tinkamai verta šią informaciją. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama konkreti hipotezė, kad nenumatytas emocijų lygis bent iš dalies prarandamas MT. Mes atliekame keletą eksperimentų grįžtamojo vertimo sistemoje ir nustatome, kad (1) emocijos iš tikrųjų iš dalies prarandamos vertimo metu; (2) šią tendenciją galima beveik visiškai pakeisti taikant paprastą perskirstymo metodą, kurį informuoja emocijų klasifikatorius, pasinaudodamas n geriausio sąrašo įvairove; (3) perskirstymo metodas taip pat gali būti taikomas emocijų pokyčiams, įgyjant emocijų stilio perdavimo model į. An in-depth qualitative analysis reveals that there are recurring linguistic changes through which emotions are toned down or amplified, such as change of modality.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аударуы тілдер арасындағы мәтінді аудару үшін күшті әдістерді береді, сондықтан бірнеше тілдер әлемін қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Бірақ хабарламалардың маңызды бөлігі келтірілмеген деңгейінде (мысалы, сәттілік, официалдық, емоциялық) болады, және назардағы MT әдістерінің бұл мәліметті дұрыс аударып т Бұл қағаз өзгертілген емоциялардың негізгі деңгейі MT-де кемінде жоғалтылып тұрғанын тексереді. Біз қайта аудару орнатылғанда бірнеше тәжірибелерді жасап (1) емоцияларды аудару кезінде бірнеше тәжірибелерді (2) Бұл тенденциясы нәтижелеріне қарапайым қайта реттеу тәсілімі болады. Эмоциялық классификациясы, n- жақсы тізіміндегі әртүрліктердің артықшылығын қолданады. (3) Эмоцияларды өзгерту үшін қайта реттеу тәсілі қолданылады, эмоцияларды стилінің аудару үшін үлгі алу үшін. Тіпті квалификациялық анализ қайталанатын лингвистикалық өзгерістерді көрсетеді. Мысалы, емоциялық өзгерістерді өзгерту секілді.', 'mk': 'Машински превод обезбедува моќни методи за претворање на текст меѓу јазиците, и затоа е технологија која овозможува мултијазичен свет. Сепак, важен дел од комуникацијата се случува на непредложено ниво (на пример, учтивост, формалност, емоции), и далеку од јасно е дали актуелните методи на МТ ги преведуваат овие информации правилно. Овој весник ја истражува специфичната хипотеза дека непредложното ниво на емоции е барем делумно изгубено во МТ. Правиме голем број експерименти во поставување на превод и утврдиме дека (1) емоциите се всушност делумно изгубени за време на преводот; и (2) оваа тенденција може да се сврти речиси целосно со едноставен пристап на рерангирање информиран од емоционален класификатор, искористувајќи ја различноста во n-најдобрата листа; (3) пристапот за рерангирање може, исто така, да се примени и на промената на емоциите, добивајќи модел за трансфер на емоционален стил. Длабока квалитетна анализа открива дека постојат повторни лингвистички промени преку кои емоциите се намалени или засилени, како што е промената на моделноста.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin menyediakan kaedah berkuasa untuk menukar teks diantara bahasa, dan oleh itu adalah teknologi yang membolehkan dunia berbilang bahasa. Bagaimanapun, sebahagian penting komunikasi berlaku pada tahap yang tidak bertujuan (cth., kebaikan, formaliti, emosi), dan ia jauh dari jelas sama ada kaedah MT semasa diterjemahkan dengan betul maklumat ini. Kertas ini menyelidiki hipotesis spesifik bahawa aras emosi yang tidak bertujuan sekurang-kurangnya sebahagian hilang dalam MT. Kami melakukan sejumlah eksperimen dalam seting terjemahan belakang dan membuktikan bahawa (1) emosi benar-benar sebahagian hilang semasa terjemahan; (2) kecenderungan ini boleh dikembalikan hampir sepenuhnya dengan pendekatan peringkat semula sederhana yang diberitahu oleh pengklasifikasi emosi, mengambil keuntungan dari kebanyakan dalam senarai n-terbaik; (3) the re-ranking approach can also be applied to change emotions, obtaining a model for emotion style transfer.  Analisis kualitatif mendalam menunjukkan bahawa terdapat perubahan bahasa yang berulang melalui mana emosi dikurangkan atau ditambah, seperti perubahan modaliti.', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ നല്\u200dകുന്ന ശക്തിയുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d പദാവലിയെ മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരണത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗമാണെങ്കിലും പ്രായശ്ചിത്രമല്ലാത്ത നിലയില്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്നതു് (ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെ സൌന്ദര്യം, ഫോര്\u200dമിറ ഈ പേപ്പ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് പ്രോഗ്യൂഷനില്ലാത്ത വികാരങ്ങളുടെ നിലപാടുകള്\u200d എംടിയില്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞത് ഭാഗമായി നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നാണ്. പിന്നി (2) ഒരു വികാരത്തില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി അറിയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാധാരണ വീണ്ടും പുനര്\u200dനിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന നടപടിയുമായി ഈ സ്വഭാവം മുഴുവന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയ (3) വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി വീണ്ടും റാങ്ങിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രായോഗ്യം പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. വികാരങ ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ക്വാലിട്ടിവിശേഷവും വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുവഴി വികാരങ്ങള', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni bil-magna tipprovdi metodi b’saħħithom biex it-test jinbidel bejn il-lingwi, u għalhekk hija teknoloġija li tippermetti dinja multilingwi. Parti importanti tal-komunikazzjoni, madankollu, isseħħ fil-livell mhux propost (pereżempju, il-politezza, il-formalità, l-emozzjonijiet), u g ħadu mhux ċar jekk il-metodi MT attwali jittraduċux din l-informazzjoni kif suppost. Dan id-dokument jinvestiga l-ipoteżi speċifika li l-livell mhux propożizzjonali ta’ emozzjonijiet jintilef mill-inqas parzjalment fl-MT. Aħna nagħmlu għadd ta’ esperimenti fi struttura ta’ traduzzjoni lura u nistabbilixxu li (1) emozzjonijiet tabilħaqq jintilef parzjalment matul it-traduzzjoni; (2) this tendency can be reversed almost completely with a simple re-ranking approach informed by an emotion classifier, taking advantage of diversity in the n-best list;  (3) l-approċċ ta’ klassifikazzjoni mill-ġdid jista’ jiġi applikat ukoll għall-bidla fl-emozzjonijiet, billi jinkiseb mudell għat-trasferiment tal-istil tal-emozzjonijiet. Analiżi kwalitattiva fil-fond turi li hemm bidliet lingwistiċi rikorrenti li permezz tagħhom l-emozzjonijiet jitnaqqsu jew jiġu amplifikati, bħal bidla fil-modalità.', 'no': 'Motoromsetjing gjev kraftige metodar for å konvertera tekst mellom språk, og derfor er ein teknologi som slår på ein fleirspråk verd. Eit viktig del av kommunikasjon vert imidlertid plassert på ikkje-foreslåand e nivå (f.eks. politeness, formalitet, følelser), og det er langt frå klart om gjeldande MT-metodar rett oversetter denne informasjonen. Denne papiret undersøker den spesifikke hypotesien at det ikkje- foreslåande nivået av emosjonar er minst delvis tapt i MT. Vi utfører fleire eksperimenter i eit oppsett av tilbakeomsetjing og bestemmer at (1) emosjonar vert verkeleg delvis tapt under omsetjing. (2) Denne tendensen kan omvendt nesten fullstendig med ein enkel rekreaseringstilnærming som vert informert av ein følelsesklassifiserer, som brukar forskjellighet i n-beste liste. (3) Rekreaseringstilnærminga kan også brukast for å endra følelser og få eit modell for overføring av emosjonsstil. Ein kvalitativ analyse i dybde viser at det gjentar gjentaande lingviske endringar som følelser vert tond ned eller styrket, slik som endring av modalitet.', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулалт хэлний хоорондын текст шилжүүлэх хүчирхэг аргыг хандуулдаг. Тиймээс олон хэлний ертөнцийг ашиглах технологи юм. Гэхдээ харилцааны чухал хэсэг нь урам зорилгоогүй түвшинд (жишээ нь, сэтгэл хөдлөл, зорилго, сэтгэл хөдлөл), одоогийн MT аргаар энэ мэдээллийг зөвхөн хөгжүүлэх эсэхийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Энэ цаас сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төвшин бус байдлыг MT-д хамгийн бага хэсгийг алдсан гэсэн тодорхойлолтыг судалж байна. (2) Энэ тохиолдол нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн классификаторын мэдээллээр бараг бүрэн эргүүлж болно. n-н сайн жагсаалт олон янз бүрийг ашиглаж болно. (3) сэтгэл хөдлөлийг өөрчлөхөд, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэх загвар авч болно. Гүн гүнзгий мэргэжлийн шинжилгээнд сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөл доош эсвэл нэмэгдүүлж буй хэлний өөрчлөлтийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie maszynowe zapewnia skuteczne metody konwersji tekstu między językami, a zatem jest technologią umożliwiającą wielojęzyczny świat. Ważna część komunikacji odbywa się jednak na poziomie pozapropozycyjnym (np. uprzejmość, formalność, emocje), a nie jest jasne, czy obecne metody MT właściwie tłumaczą te informacje. W artykule zbadano konkretną hipotezę, że poziom niepropozycyjny emocji jest przynajmniej częściowo utracony w MT. Przeprowadzamy szereg eksperymentów w konfiguracji backtranslacji i ustalimy, że (1) emocje rzeczywiście są częściowo utracone podczas tłumaczenia; (2) tendencję tę można niemal całkowicie odwrócić poprzez proste podejście do zmiany rankingu oparte na klasyfikatorze emocji, wykorzystując różnorodność na liście n-best; (3) podejście rerankingowe może być również stosowane do zmiany emocji, uzyskując model transferu stylu emocji. Pogłębiona analiza jakościowa ujawnia, że powtarzają się zmiany językowe, poprzez które emocje są łagodzone lub wzmacniane, takie jak zmiana modalności.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată oferă metode puternice de conversie a textului între limbi și, prin urmare, este o tehnologie care permite o lume multilingvă. Cu toate acestea, o parte importantă a comunicării are loc la nivel non-propozițional (de exemplu, politețe, formalitate, emoții), și este departe de a fi clar dacă metodele MT actuale traduc corect aceste informații. Lucrarea analizează ipoteza specifică că nivelul non-propozițional al emoțiilor este cel puțin parțial pierdut în MT. Efectuăm o serie de experimente într-o configurație back-translation și stabilim că (1) emoțiile sunt într-adevăr parțial pierdute în timpul traducerii; (2) această tendință poate fi inversată aproape complet printr-o abordare simplă de re-clasificare informată de un clasificator emoțional, profitând de diversitatea din lista n-best; (3) abordarea re-ranking poate fi aplicată și pentru schimbarea emoțiilor, obținând un model de transfer al stilului emoțional. O analiză calitativă aprofundată arată că există schimbări lingvistice recurente prin care emoțiile sunt tonifiate sau amplificate, cum ar fi schimbarea modalității.', 'si': 'මැෂින් පරිවර්තන විධානයක් භාෂාවල් අතර පරිවර්තන කරන්න ශක්තිමත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා,  ඒත් වැදගත් සම්බන්ධයේ වැදගත් කොටසක් වෙන්නේ නැහැ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්ථානයේදී (උදාහරණයෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, හැතුවක් මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂා කරනවා විශේෂ හිතාවේ නොප්\u200dරස්ථාවක් ස්ථානය MT වලට අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම් වෙලා තියෙනවා. (2) මේ සාධාරණය පුළුවන් පුළුවන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ආපහු රේජින් විදිහට පත්වෙන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සඳහා හැඟීමක් ව (3) ආපහු ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් හැඟීම් වෙනස් කරන්න, හැඟීම් විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබ ගොඩක් ගොඩක් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා භාෂාවික වෙනස් තියෙනවා කියලා හැඟීම් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිකාශ', 'sr': 'Prevedenje mašine pruža moćne metode za preobraćanje teksta između jezika, i stoga je tehnologija koja omogućava multijezički svijet. Međutim, važan deo komunikacije se međutim događa na neprosudnoj nivou (npr. pristojnost, formalnost, emocije), i daleko je od jasnog da li trenutne metode MT-a pravilno prevode te informacije. Ovaj papir istražuje specifičnu hipotezu da je neupredložena nivo emocija najmanje delovično izgubljena u MT-u. Provodimo broj eksperimenata u uspostavljanju povratka prevoda i utvrđujemo da su emocije zaista delovično izgubljene tokom prevoda; (2) ova tendencija se može skoro potpuno okrenuti sa jednostavnim ponovnim prilikom za rendgiranje koje je obavijestio klasifikator emocija, koristeći raznolikost n a n-najboljoj listi; (3) ponovni pristup može se primjenjivati i za promjenu emocija, dobivanje model a prijenosa emocija stila. Duboka kvalitativna analiza pokazuje da postoje ponovne jezičke promjene kroz koje se emocije smanjuju ili pojačaju, poput promene modaliteta.', 'sv': 'Maskinöversättning ger kraftfulla metoder för att konvertera text mellan språk och är därför en teknik som möjliggör en flerspråkig värld. En viktig del av kommunikationen sker dock på icke-propositionsnivå (t.ex. artighet, formalitet, känslor), och det är långt ifrån klart om nuvarande MT-metoder korrekt översätter denna information. Denna uppsats undersöker den specifika hypotesen att känslornas icke-propositionella nivå åtminstone delvis går förlorad i MT. Vi genomför ett antal experiment i en back-translation setup och fastställer att (1) känslor faktiskt delvis går förlorade under översättning; (2) Denna tendens kan nästan helt vändas med en enkel omräkningsmetod som informeras av en känsloklassificerare och som utnyttjar mångfalden i listan över n-bästa. (3) Omrangordningen kan också tillämpas för att ändra känslor och få en modell för överföring av känslostil. En fördjupad kvalitativ analys visar att det finns återkommande språkliga förändringar genom vilka känslor tonas ner eller förstärks, såsom förändring av modalitet.', 'so': 'Turjumidda mashiinka waxaa bixiya qaabab xoog leh oo ku bedela qoraalka luuqadaha dhexdooda, sidaas darteed waa teknolojiyo oo caawinaya caalamka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qayb muhiim ah oo la xiriira waxaa lagu sameeyaa heerka aan la soo jeedin (tusaale ahaan madaxweynaanta, formality, emotions), waxayna ka fog tahay inay si fiican u taraan macluumaadkan. Warqaddan wuxuu baarayaa fikrada gaarka ah in heerarka aan la soo jeedin ay ugu yaraan qeyb ka dhuntahay MT. Waxaannu sameynaa jirrabo badan oo ku qoran qoraalka turjumidda dib-u-turjumidda kadibna waxaan xaqiiqsanaynaa (1) fikrada hubaal qeyb ka luman marka lagu turjumo; (2) this tendency can be reversed almost completely with a simple re-ranking approach informed by an emotion classifier, taking advantage of diversity in the n-best list;  (3) Sidoo kale waxaa lagu codsan karaa habka beddelka fikrada, inaad sameyn karto qaabka isbedelka fikrada. Analyska mool dheer waxaa muuqda in lagu beddelo isbedelka luuqada oo soo socda, taasoo ay ku soo dhaqdhaqaaqiyaan ama kordhisaan, tusaale ahaan beddelka qaabilaadda.', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிமாற்றி உரையை மாற்றுவதற்கு சக்தியுள்ள முறைகள் வழங்குகிறது, அதனால் இது பல மொழிகளின் உலகத்தை செயல An important part of communication, however, takes place at the non-propositional level (e.g., politeness, formality, emotions), and it is far from clear whether current MT methods properly translate this information.  இந்த தாள் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட துப்பாக்கத்தை தேடுகிறது எம்டி இல்லாத உணர்வுகள் குறைந்தது பகுதியாக இழந்தது என்று. மொழிபெயர்ப்பில்  (2) ஒரு உணர்வு வகைப்பாளரால் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு சுலபமான முறையில் இந்த செயல்பாடு முழுமையாக மாற்றப்படும், n- சிறந்த பட்டியலில் பல்வே (3) உணர்வு பாணி மாற்றத்திற்கான ஒரு மாதிரி பெறுவதற்கான மறுவரிசை செயல்பாடு பயன்படுத்தலாம். ஆழம் குறிப்பு பரிசோதிப்பு தெரியும் மொழியில் மாற்றங்கள் இருக்கிறது அதனால் உணர்வுகள் கீழே அல்லது அதிகரிக்கப்படுகின்றன, மாற்றத்', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ زبانوں کے درمیان متن کو تبدیل کرنے کے لئے طاقتور طریقے پیش کرتا ہے، اور اس لئے ایک ٹیکنالوجی ہے کہ ایک بہت سی زبان دنیا کو امکان دیتا ہے۔ لیکن ارتباط کا ایک اہم حصہ غیر قابل پیشنهاد سطح پر ہوتا ہے (مثل: اچھی طرح، اچھی طرح، احساسات) اور یہ کھلا ہوا ہے کہ موجود MT طریقے اس معلومات کو اچھی طرح ترجمہ کرتے ہیں. This paper investigates the specific hypothesis that the non-propositional level of emotions is at least partially lost in MT. We carry out a number of experiments in a back-translation setup and establish that (1) emotions are actually partially lost during translation; (2) یہ تنظیم تقریباً پورے طور پر لوٹ سکتا ہے ایک سیدھا دوبارہ رینگ طریقہ سے جو ایک احساسات کلاسیر کے ذریعہ بتائی جاتی ہے، اس طرح n بہترین لکھ میں مختلف فائدہ اٹھائی جاتی ہے۔ (3) دوبارہ رینڈینگ طریقہ بھی احساسات بدلنے کے لئے لازم کر سکتا ہے اور احساسات طریقہ بدلنے کے لئے مدل حاصل کرسکتا ہے۔ ایک عمیق کیلوٹیٹیو تحلیل ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ زبان کی تغییرات پھیر رہی ہیں جن کے ذریعے احساسات کم یا زیادہ تغییر کی جاتی ہیں، جیسے موڈیل کی تغییر.', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu qogʻoz MT'da hech qancha qismi yo'qotganligini aniqlaydi. Biz bir necha tizimni bajaramiz va tarjima tarjima etishda (1) hissiyalar qisqa yo'qotganligini aniqlamiz. @ info (3) Jildni oʻzgartirish uchun rejalashtirish usuli qoʻllaniladi. Deep qualitativ analytiki tilni takrorlash uchun o'zgarishlar mavjud. Hujjatni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy cung cấp phương pháp mạnh để chuyển đổi văn bản giữa các ngôn ngữ, và do đó là một công nghệ giúp một thế giới đa dạng. Tuy nhiên, một phần quan trọng của giao tiếp diễn ra ở mức không tuyên bố (v.d. lịch sự, thủ tục, xúc cảm) và còn chưa rõ liệu phương pháp MT hiện thời có thể dịch được thông tin này hay không. Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu giả thuyết cụ thể rằng mức độ cảm xúc không định kiến ít nhất đã bị mất một phần trong MTV. Chúng tôi thực hiện một số thí nghiệm trong một thiết lập dịch lại và xác định rằng (1) cảm xúc đã bị mất một phần trong suốt phiên dịch; (2) xu hướng n ày có thể đảo ngược gần như hoàn toàn với một cách tiếp xúc đơn giản được thông báo bởi một người phân loại cảm xúc, lợi dụng sự khác biệt trong danh sách n-best; (3) Cách tiếp cận lại có thể được áp dụng để thay đổi cảm xúc, đạt được mô hình để chuyển đổi phong cách cảm xúc. Một phân tích về tính chất sâu sắc cho thấy có những thay đổi ngôn ngữ lặp đi lặp lại, qua đó cảm xúc được giảm bớt hay khuếch đại, như đổi độ.', 'bg': 'Машинният превод осигурява мощни методи за конвертиране на текст между езици и следователно е технология, позволяваща многоезичен свят. Важна част от комуникацията обаче се осъществява на непозиционално ниво (например учтивост, формалност, емоции) и далеч не е ясно дали настоящите методи на МТ правилно превеждат тази информация. Настоящата статия изследва специфичната хипотеза, че не-претенционалното ниво на емоциите е поне частично изгубено в МТ. Извършваме редица експерименти в настройка за обратен превод и установяваме, че (1) емоциите наистина са частично изгубени по време на превода; (2) тази тенденция може да бъде обърната почти изцяло с прост подход за повторно класиране, информиран от класификатор на емоциите, като се възползва от разнообразието в списъка на най-добрите; (3) подходът за прекласиране може да се приложи и за промяна на емоциите, като се получи модел за прехвърляне на емоционален стил. Задълбочен качествен анализ разкрива, че има повтарящи се езикови промени, чрез които емоциите се тонизират или усилват, като например промяна на модалността.', 'nl': 'Machine Translation biedt krachtige methoden om tekst tussen talen te converteren en is daarom een technologie die een meertalige wereld mogelijk maakt. Een belangrijk deel van de communicatie vindt echter plaats op het niet-propositionele niveau (bijvoorbeeld beleefdheid, formaliteit, emoties), en het is verre van duidelijk of de huidige MT-methoden deze informatie goed vertalen. Dit artikel onderzoekt de specifieke hypothese dat het niet-propositionele niveau van emoties ten minste gedeeltelijk verloren gaat in MT. We voeren een aantal experimenten uit in een back-translation setup en stellen vast dat (1) emoties inderdaad gedeeltelijk verloren gaan tijdens vertaling; (2) deze tendens kan nagenoeg volledig worden omgedraaid door een eenvoudige, door een emotieclassificator geïnstrueerde benadering, waarbij gebruik wordt gemaakt van de diversiteit in de n-beste lijst; (3) de re-ranking benadering kan ook worden toegepast om emoties te veranderen, waardoor een model voor emotiestijloverdracht wordt verkregen. Een diepgaande kwalitatieve analyse laat zien dat er terugkerende taalveranderingen zijn waardoor emoties worden afgezwakt of versterkt, zoals verandering van modaliteit.', 'da': 'Maskinoversættelse giver effektive metoder til at konvertere tekst mellem sprog og er derfor en teknologi, der muliggør en flersproget verden. En vigtig del af kommunikationen foregår imidlertid på det ikke-forslagsmæssige niveau (f.eks. høflighed, formalitet, følelser), og det er langt fra klart, om de nuværende MT-metoder oversætter disse oplysninger korrekt. Denne artikel undersøger den specifikke hypotese om, at det ikke-propositielle niveau af følelser i det mindste delvist går tabt i MT. Vi udfører en række eksperimenter i en back-translation setup og fastslår, at (1) følelser faktisk delvist går tabt under oversættelse; (2) Denne tendens kan vendes næsten fuldstændigt ved hjælp af en simpel omlægningsmetode, der er informeret af en følelsesklassificator, og som drager fordel af mangfoldigheden i listen n-bedste (3) Omrangordningen kan også anvendes til at ændre følelser og opnå en model for overførsel af følelsesstil. En dybdegående kvalitativ analyse afslører, at der er tilbagevendende sproglige forandringer, hvorigennem følelser tones ned eller forstærkes, såsom ændring af modalitet.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin menyediakan metode yang kuat untuk mengubah teks antara bahasa, dan karena itu adalah teknologi yang memungkinkan dunia berbagai bahasa. Bagian penting dari komunikasi, bagaimanapun, terjadi pada tingkat tidak proposisional (contohnya, sopan hati, formalitas, emosi), dan jauh dari jelas apakah metode MT saat ini benar-benar menerjemahkan informasi ini. This paper investigates the specific hypothesis that the non-propositional level of emotions is at least partially lost in MT. We carry out a number of experiments in a back-translation setup and establish that (1) emotions are indeed partially lost during translation;  (2) this tendency can be reversed almost completely with a simple re-ranking approach informed by an emotion classifier, taking advantage of diversity in the n-best list;  (3) the re-ranking approach can also be applied to change emotions, obtaining a model for emotion style transfer.  Analisi kualitatif mendalam mengungkapkan bahwa ada perubahan bahasa yang berulang melalui mana emosi menurun atau meningkat, seperti perubahan modalitas.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین روش قدرتمندی برای تبدیل متن بین زبانها پیشنهاد می کند، و بنابراین یک تکنولوژی است که جهان بسیاری زبان را توان می کند. ولی بخشی مهم از ارتباط در سطح غیر پیشنهاد (مثلاً رضایت، رسمی، احساسات) اتفاق می\u200cافتد، و از روش\u200cهای MT فعلی این اطلاعات دور نیست که آیا این اطلاعات را درست ترجمه می\u200cکند. این کاغذ فرضیه خاصی را تحقیق می\u200cکند که سطح غیر پیشنهاد احساسات حداقل بخشی از MT گم شده است. ما تعدادی آزمایش را در یک ساختمان پشت ترجمه انجام می\u200cدهیم و ثابت می\u200cکنیم که احساسات (۱) واقعا در طول ترجمه بخشی از دست داده می\u200cشوند. (2) این ترکیب می\u200cتواند تقریباً کاملاً با یک روش ساده\u200cای که توسط یک فرآینده\u200cی احساسات اطلاع داده شده، از مختلفیت در لیست n بهترین استفاده می\u200cکند، بازگردانده شود. (۳) دستور دوباره برنامه ریزی می\u200cتواند برای تغییر احساسات تغییر دهد و یک مدل برای انتقال شیوه احساسات را دریافت کند. یک تحلیل گونه\u200cای عمیق نشان می\u200cدهد که تغییرات زبان\u200cشناسی تکرار می\u200cشود که احساسات به پایین یا افزایش می\u200cدهند، مانند تغییر موادی.', 'de': 'Maschinelle Übersetzung bietet leistungsstarke Methoden, um Text zwischen Sprachen zu konvertieren und ist daher eine Technologie, die eine mehrsprachige Welt ermöglicht. Ein wichtiger Teil der Kommunikation findet jedoch auf der nicht-propositionalen Ebene statt (z.B. Höflichkeit, Formalität, Emotionen), und es ist bei weitem nicht klar, ob aktuelle MT-Methoden diese Informationen richtig übersetzen. Diese Arbeit untersucht die spezifische Hypothese, dass die nicht-propositionale Ebene von Emotionen in MT zumindest teilweise verloren geht. Wir führen eine Reihe von Experimenten in einem Back-Translation Setup durch und stellen fest, dass (1) Emotionen tatsächlich teilweise während der Übersetzung verloren gehen. (2) Diese Tendenz kann mit einem einfachen, von einem Emotionsklassifikator inspirierten Re-Ranking nahezu vollständig umgekehrt werden, wobei die Vielfalt in der n-Best-Liste genutzt wird; (3) Der Re-Ranking-Ansatz kann auch angewendet werden, um Emotionen zu ändern und ein Modell für den Transfer von Emotionsstilen zu erhalten. Eine eingehende qualitative Analyse zeigt, dass es wiederkehrende sprachliche Veränderungen gibt, durch die Emotionen abgemildert oder verstärkt werden, wie z.B. Modalitätswechsel.', 'ko': '기계 번역은 서로 다른 언어 사이에서 텍스트를 바꾸는 강력한 방법을 제공하기 때문에 다언어 세계를 실현하는 기술이다.그러나 교류의 중요한 부분은 비명제 차원(예를 들어 예의, 공식, 감정)에서 발생하는데 현재의 기계 번역 방법이 이런 정보를 정확하게 번역했는지는 아직 분명하지 않다.본고는 감정의 비명제 수준이 기계 번역에서 최소한 일부분은 잃어버린다는 구체적인 가설을 연구했다. 우리는 번역 설정에서 대량의 실험을 실시했고 (1) 감정이 번역 과정에서 일부분은 잃어버린다는 것을 확정했다.(2) n-최적 리스트의 다양성을 이용하여 정서분류기 알림의 간단한 재배열 방법을 통해 이러한 추세를 거의 완전히 전환시킬 수 있다.(3) 순서를 재정리하는 방법도 정서를 바꾸고 정서 풍격의 이동 모델을 얻는 데 쓰일 수 있다.깊이 있는 정성 분석에 의하면 반복적으로 나타나는 언어 변화는 정서, 예를 들어 정태의 변화를 낮추거나 확대시킬 수 있다.', 'af': "Masjien vertaling verskaf kragtige metodes om teks tussen tale te omskakel, en is daarom 'n teknologie wat 'n multitaalske wêreld aktiveer. 'n belangrike deel van kommunikasie maar neem op die nie-voorstellingsvlak (bv. belangrikheid, formeeliteit, emosie), en dit is ver van duidelik of die huidige MT metodes reg hierdie inligting vertaal. Hierdie papier ondersoek die spesifieke hipotesis dat die nie-voorstellingsvlak van emosies is ten minste gedeeltelik verlore in MT. Ons uitvoer 'n aantal eksperimente in 'n terugvertaling opstelling en stel dat (1) emosies regtig gedeeltelik verlore word tydens vertaling; (2) hierdie tendensie kan amper heeltemal omgekeer word met 'n eenvoudige herrangering toegang wat deur 'n emosie klassifiseerder gegee word, deur voordeel van diversiteit in die n-beste lys te neem; (3) die herrangende toegang kan ook aanwend word om emosies te verander en 'n model vir emosiestyl oordrag te kry. 'n In-diepte kvalitatiewe analisie openbaar dat daar herhaalde lingwisiese veranderinge is deur waarmee emosies onder of versterk word, soos verandering van modaliteit.", 'tr': "Maşynyň terjime edilen diller arasynda metin üýtgetmek üçin güýçli yönlerni temin edýär. Şol sebäpli, bir multi diller dünýä mümkin edip biljek teknolojisi. Ýöne komunikaýanyň wajyp bölegi g örkezilmesi ýok derejede bolýar (mysal. mylakatlyk, formalitet, duýgyşlar), häzirki MT metodlaryň bu maglumaty dogry terjime etmeginiň ýagdaýyndan uzakdır. Bu kagyz spesifikaly duýgularyň ýok derejesi MT'de iň azyndan hem ýiter diýip pikir edýär. Biz arka terjime edilişinde birnäçe synaglary çykýarys we (1) duýgularyň hakykatdanam terjime edilişinde ýiter diýip kabul edip bilýäris; (2) Bu täsiri duýgular klasifikatçy tarapyndan bilýän basit bir ýene-dereje taýýarlamak bilen, n-iň gowy listde n äçe görnüşliklerini ulanyp bilýär; (3) Täzeden soňra duýgulary üýtgetmek üçin ýene bir nusga gollanabilir we duýgularyň stili üýtgetmek üçin bir nusga alyp biler. Derňlikde kwalitet analizi görkezýär çünki duýgular ýagdaýda görkezilýän ýa-da köpräk düşürilýän lingwistiki üýtgeşmeler ýaly.", 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine inatoa mbinu za nguvu za kubadilisha maandishi kati ya lugha, na kwa hiyo ni teknolojia inayowezesha ulimwengu wa lugha mbalimbali. Sehemu muhimu ya mawasiliano, hata hivyo, inatokea katika ngazi isiyo na pendekezo (kwa mfano, udanganyifu, utaratibu, hisia), na ni mbali na kama njia za sasa za MT zinatafsiri taarifa hii. Makala hii inachunguza nadharia maalum kwamba kiwango cha hisia ambacho hakipendeshwa kwa kiasi kidogo kimepotea katika MT. Tunafanya majaribio kadhaa katika seti ya kutafsiri kwa nyuma na kuhakikisha kwamba (1) hisia za kweli zimepoteza kwa kiasi kikubwa wakati wa tafsiri; (2) tabia hii inaweza kubadilishwa kwa karibu kabisa kwa njia rahisi ya upya inayoelezwa n a mtangazaji wa hisia, kwa kutumia utofauti wa tofauti katika orodha bora zaidi; (3) mbinu za upya zinaweza pia kutumika ili kubadili hisia, kupata mfano wa uhamishaji wa mtindo wa hisia. An in-depth qualitative analysis reveals that there are recurring linguistic changes through which emotions are toned down or amplified, such as change of modality.', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinave ofron metoda të fuqishme për të konvertuar tekstin midis gjuhëve dhe është kështu një teknologji që mundëson një botë shumëgjuhëse. Një pjesë e rëndësishme e komunikimit, megjithatë, ndodh në nivelin jo-propozitiv (për shembull polititeti, formaliteti, emocionet) dhe është larg nga e qartë nëse metodat e tanishme MT përkthyen siç duhet këtë informacion. This paper investigates the specific hypothesis that the non-propositional level of emotions is at least partially lost in MT. We carry out a number of experiments in a back-translation setup and establish that (1) emotions are indeed partially lost during translation;  (2) kjo prirje mund të kthehet pothuajse krejtësisht me një qasje të thjeshtë rindërtimi të informuar nga një klasifikues emocionesh, duke përfituar nga diversiteti n ë list ën n-më të mirë; (3) metoda e renditjes mund të aplikohet gjithashtu për të ndryshuar emocionet, duke marrë një model për transferimin e stilit emocional. Një analizë e thellë kualitative zbulon se ka ndryshime gjuhësore të përsëritura nëpërmjet të cilave emocionet tonohen ose amplifikohen, të tilla si ndryshimi i modalitetit.', 'am': 'የመኪን ትርጉም ጽሑፉን በቋንቋዎች መካከል ለመለወጥ ኃይለኛ ሥርዓት ይሰጣል፤ ስለዚህ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ዓለም የሚችል ቴክኖጂ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የግንኙነት አዋቂ ክፍል ግን በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ደረጃ (ምሳሌ ቀላል፣ ፍለጋት፣ አስተያየት፣ አስተያየት) ይደረጋል፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም በተመሳሳይ የአፍላጎት ደረጃዎች አካባቢ እውቀት እኩሌታ እየጠፋ እንደሆነ በተፈተና ይፈርዳል፡፡ (2) ይህ ሥርዓት በ-n-ዋነኛ ዝርዝር የተነገረ የአሳብ ክፍል እና የልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት በመጠቀም በተለየ ቀላል ተቃውሞ ሊመለስ ይችላል፡፡ (3) የተለየ ልውጤት ስሜቶችን ለመለወጥ ይችላል፣ የስሜት ዓይነትን ለመለወጥ ምሳሌ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ የጥልቅ qualitative analysis የቋንቋዊ ለውጦች ሲገልጥ፣ አእምሮዎች እንደተለወጡ፣ የቋንቋው ለውጦች እንዲገልጹ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Makina çevirilməsi dillərin arasında metin dönüştürmək üçün güclü metodları təmin edir, buna görə də çoxlu dil dünyasını qabilleştirir. Əlbəttə, təklif olmayan səviyyədə mühüm bir məlumat olub, bu məlumatları doğru çevirməsinin müəyyən edilməsi üçün istifadə edir. Bu kağıt, təklif olmayan hisslərin düzeyini MT-də az bir qismindən kayıb edildiyini təsdiqləyir. Biz bir neçə dəyişiklik təhrif qurğulama qurulduğu və (1) hisslərin dəyişiklik dəyişiklik təhrif edilməsində təhrif edildiyini təsdiqləyirik. (2) Bu təsiri n-ən yaxşılıq listesində müxtəlif tərzlərindən istifadə edərək, emosyon klasifikatçısı ilə bildirilmiş basit yenidən dəyişiklik approach ilə təkrar çevirə bilər. (3) Duyguları dəyişdirmək üçün yenidən dəyişdirmək tərzini də istifadə edə bilər, duygusal stil tərəfindən bir model almaq üçün. Gözünün derinlikli qabiliyyətli analizi, modaliyyətin dəyişiklikləri kimi, duyguları aşağı və genişləndirilən dil dəyişikliklərinin təkrarlanan dəyişiklikləri göstərir.', 'hr': 'Prijevod mašine pruža moćne metode za preobraćanje teksta između jezika, i stoga je tehnologija koja omogućava multijezički svijet. Međutim, važan dio komunikacije se međutim događa na neprosudnoj razini (npr. pristojnost, formalnost, emocije), i daleko je od jasnog da li postojeće MT metode pravo prevode te informacije. Ovaj papir istražuje specifičnu hipotezu da se ne predložavajuća razina emocija najmanje djelomično izgubila u MT-u. Provodimo broj eksperimenata u uspostavljanju povratnog prevoda i utvrđujemo da su emocije zaista djelomično izgubljene tijekom prevoda; (2) ova tendencija može se skoro potpuno okrenuti s jednostavnim ponovnim pristupom za rendgiranje koje je obavijestio klasifikator emocija, koristeći raznolikost u n-najboljoj popisu; (3) ponovni pristup može se primjenjivati i za promjenu emocija, dobivanje model prijenosa emocija stila. Duboka kvalitativna analiza pokazuje da postoje ponovne jezičke promjene kroz koje se emocije smanjuju ili pojačaju, poput promjene modaliteta.', 'bn': 'Machine translation provides powerful methods to convert text between languages, and is therefore a technology enabling a multilingual world.  তবে যোগাযোগের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ অনুষ্ঠিত হচ্ছে না প্রস্তাবিত স্তরে (উদাহরণ, নৈতিকতা, ফরমালিটি, অনুভূতি), এবং বর্তমান MT পদ্ধতি সঠিকভাবে এই তথ এই পত্রিকাটি বিশেষ প্রস্তাবিত অনুভূতি অনুসন্ধান করেছে যে এমটিতে অন্তত অনুভূতির সময় অনুভূতিতে অনুভূতিতে অনুভূতি প্রস্তাবিত অনুভূতিতে অনুভূতির অনুভূতি প্রদ (২) এই ধরনের প্রায় পুরোপুরি পরিবর্তন করা যাবে এক আবেগের বিভাগের তথ্য পুনরায় রেঙ্কিং চালানোর মাধ্যমে একটি সাধারণ পুনরায় প্রতিষ্ঠান (৩) আবেগ পরিবর্তনের জন্য পুনরায় রেঙ্কিং পদক্ষেপ প প্রয়োগ করা যাবে, আবেগের স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের জন্য একটি মডেল পাওয়া যাবে। গভীরে কৌতুহলিক বিশ্লেষণ প্রকাশ করেছে যে ভাষাগত পরিবর্তন পুনরাবৃত্তি হচ্ছে যার মাধ্যমে অনুভূতি কমে যাচ্ছে অথবা বৃদ্ধি পাওয়া যায়, যেমন', 'hy': 'Մեքենային թարգմանությունը հզոր մեթոդներ է տրամադրում լեզուների միջև տեքստի փոխակերպման համար, և հետևաբար այն տեխնոլոգիա է, որ հնարավորություն է տալիս բազլեզու աշխարհին: Սակայն հաղորդակցման կարևոր մասը տեղի է ունենում ոչ նախատեսված մակարդակում (օրինակ քաղաքավարությունը, ձևաչափությունը, զգացմունքները), և հեռու է պարզ, թե արդյոք ներկայիս MT մեթոդները ճիշտ են թարգմանում այս տեղեկատվությունը: Այս հոդվածը ուսումնասիրում է հատուկ հիպոթեզը, որ զգացմունքների ոչ նախադրական մակարդակը առնվազն մասամբ կորցված է ՄԹ-ում։ Մենք մի շարք փորձեր ենք կատարում հետադարձ թարգմանության մեջ և հաստատում, որ (1) զգացմունքները իրականում մասամբ կորցված (2) this tendency can be reversed almost completely with a simple re-ranking approach informed by an emotion classifier, taking advantage of diversity in the n-best list;  (3) the re-ranking approach can also be applied to change emotions, obtaining a model for emotion style transfer.  Խաղաղ որակային վերլուծությունը բացահայտում է, որ կան կրկնվող լեզվաբանական փոփոխություններ, որոնց միջոցով զգացմունքները նվազեցվում են կամ ամպլիֆեցվում են, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ մեդիալիության փոփոխությունը:', 'cs': 'Strojový překlad poskytuje výkonné metody převodu textu mezi jazyky, a proto je technologií umožňující vícejazyčný svět. Důležitá část komunikace se však odehrává na nevýrokové úrovni (např. zdvořilost, formalita, emoce) a zdaleka není jasné, zda současné metody MT tyto informace správně překládají. Tento článek zkoumá konkrétní hypotézu, že nenaproziční úroveň emocí je v MT alespoň částečně ztracena. Provádíme řadu experimentů v back-translaci nastavení a zjišťujeme, že (1) emoce jsou skutečně částečně ztraceny během překladu; (2) tato tendence může být téměř zcela zvrácena pomocí jednoduchého přehodnocení, informovaného klasifikátorem emocí, využívajícího rozmanitosti v seznamu n-best; (3) Re-ranking přístup lze aplikovat také na změnu emocí a získat model pro přenos emočního stylu. Důkladná kvalitativní analýza ukazuje, že dochází k opakujícím se jazykovým změnám, prostřednictvím nichž jsou emoce tlumeny nebo zesíleny, například změna modality.', 'fi': 'Konekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶs tarjoaa tehokkaita menetelmiﾃ､ kﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､ﾃ､ tekstiﾃ､ kielten vﾃ､lillﾃ､, ja siksi se on monikielisen maailman mahdollistava teknologia. Tﾃ､rkeﾃ､ osa viestintﾃ､ﾃ､ tapahtuu kuitenkin ei-propositiivisella tasolla (esim. kohteliaisuus, muodollisuus, tunteet), eikﾃ､ ole lﾃ､heskﾃ､ﾃ､n selvﾃ､ﾃ､, kﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､vﾃ､tkﾃｶ nykyiset MT-menetelmﾃ､t tﾃ､tﾃ､ tietoa oikein. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa tutkitaan spesifistﾃ､ hypoteesia siitﾃ､, ettﾃ､ ei-propositionaalinen tunteiden taso on ainakin osittain menetetty MT: ssﾃ､. Teemme useita kokeita taustakﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶksessﾃ､ ja toteamme, ettﾃ､ (1) tunteet todellakin hﾃ､viﾃ､vﾃ､t osittain kﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶksen aikana; (2) tﾃ､mﾃ､ suuntaus voidaan kﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､ﾃ､ lﾃ､hes kokonaan yksinkertaisella uudelleenluokittelumenetelmﾃ､llﾃ､, joka perustuu tunteiden luokittelijaan ja jossa hyﾃｶdynnetﾃ､ﾃ､n n-best-listan monimuotoisuutta; (3) uudelleensijoitusta voidaan soveltaa myﾃｶs tunteiden muuttamiseen, jolloin saadaan malli tunteiden tyylin siirtoon. Syvﾃ､llinen kvalitatiivinen analyysi osoittaa, ettﾃ､ on olemassa toistuvia kielellisiﾃ､ muutoksia, joiden kautta tunteita vaimennetaan tai vahvistetaan, kuten modaalisuuden muutos.', 'et': 'Masintõlge pakub võimsaid meetodeid teksti teisendamiseks keelte vahel ja on seetõttu tehnoloogia, mis võimaldab mitmekeelset maailma. Oluline osa kommunikatsioonist toimub aga mittepropositsioonilisel tasandil (nt viisakus, formaalsus, emotsioonid) ning pole kaugeltki selge, kas praegused MT meetodid tõlgendavad seda teavet õigesti. Käesolevas töös uuritakse konkreetset hüpoteesi, et mittepropositsionaalne emotsioonide tase on MTs vähemalt osaliselt kadunud. Teostame mitmeid eksperimente tagantõlke seadistuses ja tuvastame, et (1) emotsioonid on tõepoolest osaliselt kadunud tõlkimise käigus; (2) seda tendentsi saab peaaegu täielikult ümber pöörata, kasutades lihtsat ümberhindamist emotsioonide klassifitseerija põhjal, kasutades ära n-parima nimekirja mitmekesisust; (3) ümberhindamise lähenemisviisi saab rakendada ka emotsioonide muutmisel, omandades emotsioonilise stiili ülekande mudeli. Põhjalik kvalitatiivne analüüs näitab, et esinevad korduvad keelelised muutused, mille kaudu emotsioone leevendatakse või võimendatakse, näiteks modaalsuse muutus.', 'bs': 'Prevedenje mašine pruža moćne metode za preobraćanje teksta između jezika, i stoga je tehnologija koja omogućava multijezički svijet. Međutim, važan dio komunikacije se međutim događa na neprosudnoj nivou (npr. pristojnost, formalnost, emocije), i daleko je od jasnog da li trenutne metode MT-a pravilno prevode te informacije. Ovaj papir istražuje specifičnu hipotezu da je neprosudljiva nivo emocija najmanje djelomično izgubljena u MT-u. Provodimo broj eksperimenata u uspostavi povratnog prevoda i utvrđujemo da su emocije zaista djelomično izgubljene tijekom prevoda; (2) ova tendencija se može skoro potpuno okrenuti s jednostavnim ponovnim pristupom za rendgiranje koje je obavijestio klasifikator emocija, koristeći raznolikost n a n-najboljoj listi; (3) ponovni pristup može se primjenjivati i za promjenu emocija, dobivanje model a prijenosa emocija stila. Duboka kvalitativna analiza pokazuje da postoje ponovne jezičke promjene kroz koje se emocije smanjuju ili pojačaju, poput promjene modaliteta.', 'ca': "Machine translation provides powerful methods to convert text between languages, and is therefore a technology enabling a multilingual world.  An important part of communication, however, takes place at the non-propositional level (e.g., politeness, formality, emotions), and it is far from clear whether current MT methods properly translate this information.  Aquest article investiga la hipòtesi específica de que el nivell no proposional d'emocions es perd almenys parcialment en MT. Fem molts experiments en una configuració de retrotraducció i establem que (1) les emocions s'perden parcialment durant la traducció; (2) aquesta tendència es pot invertir gairebé completament amb un enfocament simple de re-classificació informat per un classificador emocional, aprofitant la diversitat de la llista n millor; (3) l'enfocament de re-classificació també pot ser aplicat al canvi d'emocions, obtenint un model de transfer ència d'estil emocional. Una anàlisi qualitativa en profunditat revela que hi ha canvis lingüístics recurrents a través dels quals les emocions es redueixen o s'amplifiquen, com el canvi de modalitat.", 'sk': 'Strojno prevajanje zagotavlja zmogljive metode pretvorbe besedila med jeziki in je zato tehnologija, ki omogoča večjezični svet. Pomemben del komunikacije pa poteka na nepredlogovni ravni (npr. vljudnost, formalnost, čustva) in še zdaleč ni jasno, ali sedanje metode MT pravilno prevajajo te informacije. V prispevku raziskujemo specifično hipotezo, da je neproposicionalna raven čustev v MT vsaj delno izgubljena. Izvedli smo številne eksperimente v nastavitvi nazaj prevajanja in ugotovili, da (1) čustva dejansko delno izgubijo med prevajanjem; (2) to težnjo je mogoče skoraj popolnoma obrniti s preprostim pristopom ponovne razvrstitve, ki ga obvesti klasifikator čustev, pri čemer se izkoristi raznolikost na seznamu n najboljših; (3) pristop prerazvrščanja se lahko uporablja tudi za spreminjanje čustev, pridobitev modela za prenos čustvenega sloga. Poglobljena kvalitativna analiza kaže, da obstajajo ponavljajoče se jezikovne spremembe, s katerimi se čustva umirijo ali ojačajo, kot je sprememba modalnosti.', 'jv': 'Layout Sampeyan sing dikarepaké komunikasi, dadi, ora supoyo nggawe gerakan ing layar sing ora supoyo (ex, politeness, formalite, emphasis), lan kabèh dumadhi kapan sak sistem MT saiki dadi, ora basa bon terus informasi iki. Awak iki menehi nyokot ngerasakno akeh suputes sing gak bener tentang karo hal-suputeksi sing dirampakan karo MT. (2) Pesene iki iso ngabah perusahaan êmên mat apik lan akeh sampeyan nguasai perusahaan karo hal-sampeyan sing Informus kanggo kelas alamat sampeyan sampeyan, nggawe nguasakno karo akeh lan akeh sampeyan n êmên; (3) Ngawe ngupakan ndelok sing wis aplikasi kanggo ngerintakno omosi, ngotokno model kanggo ngerintakno modèl omosi. Panjenengan langkung itog-jewih langkung dipeneksi lan banjur kuwi kapan anyar tentang karo awak dhéwé, koyo ngono kuwi modalité.', 'ha': "Tsarin manajan yana da metode mai ƙarfi wa'urar da za'a mayar matsayi tsakanin harshen, kuma don haka, yana da wani techno wanda ke amfani da wata duniya masu multilala. Babu wani rabo na haɗi da shirin ayuka, kuma amma, za'a sami da shi cikin daraja wanda ba'a faɗaɗa ba (misali, tsaro, formanci, hisãbi), kuma za'a kasa yin ɓarna ko na shiryoyin MT da yanzu za'a sarrafa wannan information properly. Wannan littafin yana tambaya wa'anar gaskiyar da aka faɗa cewa, ma'anar hisãbi da ba'a goyi ba da shi kaɗan ya ɓace cikin MT. Munã tafiyar da wasu jarrabo masu cikin tsarin bayan-tarjima kuma munã tabbatar (1) cewa, zayen hisãbi za'a ɓace rabo cikin fassarar; @ info (3) Ana iya amfani da hanyarwa mai sake-randin, don a sami wata motsi wa transfer shawarar hisãbi. Ana ƙidãya mai depth, ya bayyana cewa akwai musanyi cikin linguin da aka sake koma sau sauri ko kuma aka ƙara, kamar canza tsari.", 'bo': 'མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་དབར་ཡིག་ལ་བསྒྱུར་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། དེའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཤེས་རིག ཡིན་ནའང་། འབྲེལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་སྤྲོད་མིན་པའི་གནས་རིམ། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཟིན་བྱས་པར་བཟུང་། སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཉུང་མཐའ་ནས་MT ཡི་ནང་དུ་བརླག་སྟོར་ཞུགས་ཡོད། (2) རང་དབང་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྣེ་ཚོར་གྱིས་རྫོགས་ལས་སླེབས་པ་སྦྱོར་བའི་སྟབས་བདེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ། (3) ལོག་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱད་ནས་སེམས་ཚོར་བཟོ་བ་ཀྱང་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་གནད་མའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཡིན་པས།', 'he': 'התרגום מכונות מספק שיטות חזקות להפוך טקסט בין שפות, ולכן הוא טכנולוגיה שמאפשרת עולם רב-שפות. חלק חשוב בתקשורת, עם זאת, מתרחש ברמה לא מציעה (למשל מנומס, רשמיות, רגשות), וזה רחוק מאשר ברור אם שיטות MT הנוכחיות מתרגמות את המידע הזה כראוי. העיתון הזה חוקר את ההיפתוזיה המיוחדת שברמה לא מציעה של רגשות היא לפחות חלקית אבודה ב-MT. אנו מבצעים מספר ניסויים בתרגשות התרגשות האחורית (2) הנטיה הזאת יכולה להיהפך כמעט לחלוטין עם גישה פשוטה של שינוי הדרגה מודיעה על ידי מסווג רגשות, ניצל את מגוון ברשימה n-הטובה ביותר; (3) the re-ranking approach can also be applied to change emotions, obtaining a model for emotion style transfer.  An in-depth qualitative analysis reveals that there are recurring linguistic changes through which emotions are toned down or amplified, such as change of modality.'}
{'en': 'Context-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'ar': 'الانتباه الواعي بالسياق للترجمة غير الانحدارية', 'es': 'Atención cruzada sensible al contexto para la traducción no autorregresiva', 'fr': 'Attention croisée sensible au contexte pour la traduction non autorégressive', 'pt': 'Atenção cruzada sensível ao contexto para tradução não autorregressiva', 'ja': '非自動回帰的翻訳のためのコンテキスト認識クロスアタッチメント', 'zh': '非自归译者上下文感交关', 'hi': 'गैर-स्वत: प्रतिगामी अनुवाद के लिए संदर्भ-जागरूक क्रॉस-अटेंशन', 'ru': 'Перекрестное внимание к контексту для неавторегрессивного перевода', 'ga': 'Comhthéacs-Aware Tras-aird ar Aistriúchán Neamh-Uathchéimneach', 'el': 'Διασταύρωση προσοχής με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος για μη αυτοανακριτική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Környezettudatos keresztfigyelem a nem autoregresszív fordításra', 'ka': 'Comment', 'it': 'Attenzione incrociata consapevole del contesto per la traduzione non autoregressiva', 'mk': 'Context-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'kk': 'Автогрессивні емес аудармасының контексті- түсініктемесі', 'ml': 'Context-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'lt': 'Konteksto sąmoningas kryžminis dėmesys neautoregresiniam vertimui', 'mt': 'Context-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'ms': 'Perhatian Salib-Awas-Konteks untuk Terjemahan Tidak-Autoregresif', 'mn': 'Context-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Kontekstowa uwaga krzyżowa dla tłumaczeń nieautoresywnych', 'sr': 'Kontekst-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'ro': 'Atenție încrucișată conștientă de context pentru traducerea non-autoregresivă', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'ta': '@ info', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'Kontextmedveten korsuppmärksamhet för icke-autoregressiv översättning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ghi chú đến dịch không tự động', 'bg': 'Кръстосано внимание за неавторегресивен превод', 'hr': 'Kontekst-obavješteni krst-pažnja za ne-autoregresivni prevod', 'nl': 'Contextbewuste kruisaandacht voor niet-autoregressieve vertaling', 'da': 'Kontekstbevidst krydsfokusering for ikke-autoregressiv oversættelse', 'de': 'Kontextbezogene Cross-Attention für nicht autoregressive Übersetzungen', 'fa': 'توجه به ترجمه\u200cهای غیر خودکار', 'ko': '비자귀환 번역 중의 상하문 감지 교차 주의', 'id': 'Perhatian Cross-Aware Konteks untuk Terjemahan Non-Autoregressive', 'sw': 'Mtazamo wa Msalaba wa Kimataifa', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Otomatik gaýşartsyz terjime üçin Kontekst-Gaýşartsyz', 'sq': 'Përkthimi jo-autoregresiv', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Kontext-Aware-Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'না স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অনুবাদের জন্য বিভিন্ন- অবগত ক্রস- মনোযোগ', 'bs': 'Kontekst-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'ca': 'Atenció cruzada conscient del context per traducció no autoregressiva', 'cs': 'Kontextově orientovaná křížová pozornost pro neautoregresivní překlad', 'et': 'Kontekstiteadlik risttähelepanu mittearregressiivsele tõlkele', 'fi': 'Kontekstitietoinen ristihuomio ei-autoregressiiviseen kääntämiseen', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תשומת לב מודעת לקונקסט לתרגום לא אוטורגרסיבי', 'sk': 'Navzkrižna pozornost, ki se zaveda konteksta, za neavtoregresivni prevod', 'jv': 'context-Awake', 'bo': 'Context-Aware Cross-Attention for Non-Autoregressive Translation'}
{'en': 'Non-autoregressive translation (NAT) significantly accelerates the inference process by predicting the entire target sequence. However, due to the lack of target dependency modelling in the decoder, the conditional generation process heavily depends on the cross-attention. In this paper, we reveal a localness perception problem in NAT cross-attention, for which it is difficult to adequately capture source context. To alleviate this problem, we propose to enhance signals of neighbour source tokens into conventional cross-attention. Experimental results on several representative datasets show that our approach can consistently improve translation quality over strong NAT baselines. Extensive analyses demonstrate that the enhanced cross-attention achieves better exploitation of source contexts by leveraging both local and global information.', 'ar': 'تعمل الترجمة غير الانحدارية (NAT) على تسريع عملية الاستدلال بشكل كبير من خلال التنبؤ بالتسلسل المستهدف بأكمله. ومع ذلك ، نظرًا لعدم وجود نمذجة التبعية المستهدفة في وحدة فك التشفير ، فإن عملية التوليد المشروط تعتمد بشكل كبير على الانتباه المتبادل. في هذه الورقة ، نكشف عن مشكلة في الإدراك المحلي في الانتباه المتبادل في NAT ، والتي يصعب معها التقاط سياق المصدر بشكل مناسب. للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة ، نقترح تحسين إشارات الرموز المميزة للمصدر المجاور إلى الانتباه المتبادل التقليدي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على العديد من مجموعات البيانات التمثيلية أن نهجنا يمكن أن يحسن باستمرار جودة الترجمة عبر خطوط الأساس القوية لـ NAT. توضح التحليلات المكثفة أن الاهتمام المتبادل المعزز يحقق استغلالًا أفضل لسياقات المصدر من خلال الاستفادة من المعلومات المحلية والعالمية.', 'es': 'La traducción no autorregresiva (NAT) acelera significativamente el proceso de inferencia al predecir toda la secuencia diana. Sin embargo, debido a la falta de modelado de dependencia del objetivo en el decodificador, el proceso de generación condicional depende en gran medida de la atención cruzada. En este artículo, revelamos un problema de percepción local en la atención cruzada de NAT, para el cual es difícil capturar adecuadamente el contexto de origen. Para aliviar este problema, proponemos mejorar las señales de los tokens fuente vecinos en atención cruzada convencional. Los resultados experimentales en varios conjuntos de datos representativos muestran que nuestro enfoque puede mejorar constantemente la calidad de la traducción en comparación con bases de NAT sólidas. Los análisis exhaustivos demuestran que la atención cruzada mejorada logra una mejor explotación de los contextos de origen al aprovechar la información local y global.', 'fr': "La traduction non autorégressive (NAT) accélère considérablement le processus d'inférence en prédisant l'ensemble de la séquence cible. Cependant, en raison de l'absence de modélisation de dépendance cible dans le décodeur, le processus de génération conditionnelle dépend fortement de l'attention croisée. Dans cet article, nous révélons un problème de perception de la localisation dans l'attention croisée NAT, pour lequel il est difficile de saisir correctement le contexte source. Pour pallier ce problème, nous proposons d'améliorer les signaux des jetons sources voisins dans une attention croisée conventionnelle. Les résultats expérimentaux sur plusieurs ensembles de données représentatifs montrent que notre approche peut constamment améliorer la qualité de la traduction par rapport à des bases de référence NAT solides. Des analyses approfondies démontrent que l'attention croisée accrue permet une meilleure exploitation des contextes sources en exploitant à la fois les informations locales et mondiales.", 'pt': 'A tradução não autorregressiva (NAT) acelera significativamente o processo de inferência ao prever toda a sequência alvo. No entanto, devido à falta de modelagem de dependência de destino no decodificador, o processo de geração condicional depende muito da atenção cruzada. Neste artigo, revelamos um problema de percepção de localidade na atenção cruzada de NAT, para o qual é difícil capturar adequadamente o contexto de origem. Para aliviar esse problema, propomos melhorar os sinais de tokens de origem vizinha em atenção cruzada convencional. Resultados experimentais em vários conjuntos de dados representativos mostram que nossa abordagem pode melhorar consistentemente a qualidade da tradução em linhas de base NAT fortes. Análises extensas demonstram que a atenção cruzada aprimorada alcança uma melhor exploração dos contextos de origem, aproveitando as informações locais e globais.', 'ja': '非自己回帰翻訳（ ＮＡＴ ）は、標的配列全体を予測することによって、推論プロセスを著しく加速する。しかしながら、デコーダにおける標的依存性モデリングの欠如により、条件付き生成プロセスはクロスアテンションに大きく依存する。本稿では， NATクロスアテンションにおける局所性認識の問題を明らかにし，ソースコンテキストを適切に把握することは困難である．この問題を緩和するために、隣接ソーストークンの信号を従来のクロスアテンションに強化することを提案します。いくつかの代表的なデータセットの実験結果は、当社のアプローチが強力なNATベースラインにわたって一貫して翻訳品質を向上させることができることを示しています。広範な分析は、強化されたクロスアテンションが、ローカルおよびグローバル情報の両方を活用することによって、ソースコンテキストのより良い活用を達成することを示しています。', 'ru': 'Неавторегрессивный перевод (NAT) значительно ускоряет процесс вывода, предсказывая всю целевую последовательность. Однако из-за отсутствия моделирования целевой зависимости в декодере процесс условной генерации в значительной степени зависит от перекрестного внимания. В этой статье мы выявляем проблему восприятия локальности в перекрестном внимании к NAT, для которой трудно адекватно отразить контекст источника. Чтобы смягчить эту проблему, мы предлагаем усилить сигналы токенов соседних источников в обычное перекрестное внимание. Экспериментальные результаты по нескольким репрезентативным наборам данных показывают, что наш подход может последовательно улучшать качество перевода по сравнению с сильными базовыми линиями NAT. Широкий анализ свидетельствует о том, что усиление перекрестного внимания позволяет лучше использовать контекст источников за счет использования как местной, так и глобальной информации.', 'hi': 'गैर-autoregressive अनुवाद (NAT) काफी पूरे लक्ष्य अनुक्रम की भविष्यवाणी करके अनुमान प्रक्रिया में तेजी लाता है। हालांकि, डिकोडर में लक्ष्य निर्भरता मॉडलिंग की कमी के कारण, सशर्त पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया क्रॉस-अटेंशन पर बहुत अधिक निर्भर करती है। इस पेपर में, हम NAT क्रॉस-अटेंशन में एक स्थानीयता धारणा समस्या को प्रकट करते हैं, जिसके लिए स्रोत संदर्भ को पर्याप्त रूप से कैप्चर करना मुश्किल है। इस समस्या को कम करने के लिए, हम पारंपरिक क्रॉस-अटेंशन में पड़ोसी स्रोत टोकन के संकेतों को बढ़ाने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। कई प्रतिनिधि डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण लगातार मजबूत NAT बेसलाइन पर अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार कर सकता है। व्यापक विश्लेषण ों से पता चलता है कि बढ़ाया क्रॉस-अटेंशन स्थानीय और वैश्विक दोनों जानकारी का लाभ उठाकर स्रोत संदर्भों का बेहतर शोषण प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '非自归译 (NAT) 占候全序,著于推理。 然解码器之所少者建模,其成也大矣。 本文发NAT交性感知,难尽其上下文。 为缓之,请增邻源令牌号为旧交。 多代表性数集之实验结果表明,吾法可以强NAT基线终始重译。 博之分析表明,因其地全球息,强者益用其源。', 'ga': 'Cuireann aistriúchán neamh-uathchéimneach (NAT) dlús suntasach leis an bpróiseas tátail tríd an seicheamh sprice ar fad a thuar. Mar sin féin, mar gheall ar an easpa samhaltú spleáchais sprice sa díchódóir, braitheann an próiseas giniúna coinníollach go mór ar an tras-aird. Sa pháipéar seo, nochtaimid fadhb braistintí áitiúlachta i gcrosaire TAN, a bhfuil sé deacair comhthéacs foinseach a ghabháil go leordhóthanach ina leith. Chun an fhadhb seo a mhaolú, tá sé beartaithe againn comharthaí na n-chomharthaí foinse comharsanachta a fheabhsú go traidisiúnta tras-aire. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar roinnt tacar sonraí ionadaíocha gur féidir lenár gcur chuige cáilíocht an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú go seasta thar bhunlínte láidre TAN. Léiríonn anailísí fairsinge go mbaineann an tras-aird fheabhsaithe amach saothrú níos fearr ar chomhthéacsanna foinse trí fhaisnéis áitiúil agus dhomhanda a ghiaráil.', 'hu': 'A nem autoregresszív fordítás (NAT) jelentősen felgyorsítja a következtetési folyamatot a teljes célszekvencia előrejelzésével. A dekódolóban azonban a célfüggőség modellezésének hiánya miatt a feltételes generálási folyamat nagymértékben függ a keresztfigyelemtől. Ebben a tanulmányban feltárjuk a NAT keresztfigyelemmel kapcsolatos helyiségérzékelési problémáját, amelyhez nehéz megfelelően rögzíteni a források kontextusát. A probléma enyhítése érdekében javasoljuk, hogy a szomszédos források tokenjeinek jeleit hagyományos keresztfigyelem formájában erősítsük. Számos reprezentatív adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk folyamatosan javíthatja a fordítási minőséget az erős NAT alapvető vonalakkal szemben. A kiterjedt elemzések azt mutatják, hogy a fokozott keresztfigyelem a helyi és globális információk felhasználásával a forráskörnyezetek jobb kiaknázását eredményezi.', 'el': 'Η μη αυτοανακριτική μετάφραση επιταχύνει σημαντικά τη διαδικασία συμπερασμάτων προβλέποντας ολόκληρη την ακολουθία στόχου. Ωστόσο, λόγω της έλλειψης μοντελοποίησης εξάρτησης στόχου στον αποκωδικοποιητή, η διαδικασία παραγωγής υπό όρους εξαρτάται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από τη διασταυρούμενη προσοχή. Στην παρούσα εργασία, αποκαλύπτουμε ένα πρόβλημα αντίληψης τοπικότητας στη διασταυρούμενη προσοχή του NAT, για το οποίο είναι δύσκολο να συλληφθεί επαρκώς το πλαίσιο της πηγής. Για την ανακούφιση αυτού του προβλήματος, προτείνουμε να ενισχυθούν τα σήματα των γειτονικών σημάτων πηγής σε συμβατική διασταυρούμενη προσοχή. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε διάφορα αντιπροσωπευτικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να βελτιώσει σταθερά την ποιότητα της μετάφρασης σε σχέση με ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης NAT. Εκτεταμένες αναλύσεις καταδεικνύουν ότι η ενισχυμένη διασταυρούμενη προσοχή επιτυγχάνει καλύτερη αξιοποίηση των πηγών πλαισίων αξιοποιώντας τόσο τις τοπικές όσο και τις παγκόσμιες πληροφορίες.', 'it': "La traduzione non autoregressiva (NAT) accelera significativamente il processo di inferenza predicendo l'intera sequenza di destinazione. Tuttavia, a causa della mancanza di modelli di dipendenza target nel decoder, il processo di generazione condizionale dipende fortemente dall'attenzione incrociata. In questo articolo, riveliamo un problema di percezione del localness nella cross-attention NAT, per il quale è difficile catturare adeguatamente il contesto sorgente. Per alleviare questo problema, proponiamo di migliorare i segnali dei token di fonte vicina in un'attenzione incrociata convenzionale. I risultati sperimentali su diversi set di dati rappresentativi dimostrano che il nostro approccio può migliorare costantemente la qualità della traduzione rispetto a solide linee di base NAT. Analisi approfondite dimostrano che la maggiore attenzione incrociata consente di sfruttare meglio i contesti di origine sfruttando le informazioni locali e globali.", 'kk': 'Авто- регрессивні емес аудармалар (NAT) бүкіл мақсатты реттегін бақылап инференциялау процесін көмектеседі. Бірақ декодердің мақсатты тәуелдік моделі жоқ себебі, шарттарды құру процесі көпшілікке тәуелді. Бұл қағазда, НАТ бақылау үшін жергілікті байқау мәселесін көрсетеді. Бұл көзінің контексті дұрыс түсіну қиын. Бұл мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін, қосымша көзінің белгілерін кәдімгі көшірмесінің белгілерін көшірмелеу үшін ұсынамыз. Бірнеше негізгі деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің тәсіліміз NAT негізгі жолдардың аудармалардың сапатын өзгертуге болады. Кеңейтілген анализ, жергілікті және әлемді мәліметтерді қолдану арқылы көзгертілген көзгертілген мәліметтерді жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Неавторегресивен превод (NAT) значително го забрзува процесот на инференција со предвидување на целата целна секвенца. Сепак, поради недостатокот на моделирање на зависноста од метата во декодерот, процесот на условна генерација многу зависи од крстовниот внимание. Во овој весник откриваме проблем со перцепцијата на локалноста во NAT крстовнимание, за кое е тешко да се прифати соодветен контекст на изворот. За да го олесниме овој проблем, предлагаме да ги зголемиме сигналите на сигналите од соседните извори во конвенционално крстовнимание. Експерименталните резултати на неколку претставници на податоци покажуваат дека нашиот пристап може константно да го подобри квалитетот на превод над силните бази на НАТ. Екстензивните анализи покажуваат дека зголеменото крстовние внимание постигнува подобро искористување на изворните контексти со искористување на локалните и глобалните информации.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan bukan-autoregresif (NAT) mempercepat proses kesimpulan secara signifikan dengan meramalkan keseluruhan urutan sasaran. Namun, kerana kekurangan model dependensi sasaran dalam dekoder, proses generasi bersyarat bergantung dengan perhatian salib. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengungkapkan masalah percepsi setempat dalam perhatian salib NAT, yang mana sukar untuk menangkap konteks sumber yang sesuai. To alleviate this problem, we propose to enhance signals of neighbour source tokens into conventional cross-attention.  Keputusan percubaan pada beberapa set data mewakili menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita boleh secara konsisten meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan atas garis dasar NAT yang kuat. Analisis luas menunjukkan bahawa perhatian salib bertambah mencapai pengeksploitasi lebih baik konteks sumber dengan menggunakan maklumat setempat dan global.', 'ka': 'არ ავტორეგრესიგური გადაწყვეტილება მაგრამ, მისაღების მოდელურობის არსებობისთვის განსხვავებული მოდელურობის გამოკლებისთვის, განსხვავებული მოდელური პროცესი ძალიან დაახლოდება კრისი გონიშნობისთვის ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ პრობლემა პრობლემა პრობლემა პრობლემა პრობლემა სინამდვილეში, რომელიც ძალიან რთულია შესაძლებელად დავწეროთ ამ პრობლემას გახსნა, ჩვენ გვეძლავთ გახსნა სიგნალების შესაძლებლობა გახსნა საკუთონალური კრისტური გონიშვნელობაში. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი რამდენიმე რეცენტრატიური მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები შეუძლია შეუძლიათ გადაწყვეტილების კაalitეტის გასაკ გაფართლებული ანალიზები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ უფრო მეტი კრასტური გონტაქტის გამოყენება უფრო მეტი გამოყენება ფონტაქტის კონტექსტის გამოყენება, რომლითაც', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni mhux awtoregressiva (NAT) taċċellera b’mod sinifikanti l-proċess ta’ inferenza billi tipprevedi s-sekwenza sħiħa tal-mira. Madankollu, minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ mudell tad-dipendenza fil-mira fid-dekoder, il-proċess ta’ ġenerazzjoni kondizzjonali jiddependi ħafna mill-attenzjoni inkroċjata. F’dan id-dokument, niżvelaw problem a ta’ perċezzjoni tal-lokalità f’attenzjoni trasversali tan-NAT, li għaliha huwa diffiċli li jinqabad b’mod adegwat il-kuntest tas-sors. Biex itaffu din il-problema, nipproponu li jissaħħu s-sinjali ta’ tokens ta’ sors ġirien f’attenzjoni trasversali konvenzjonali. Riżultati esperimentali fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta rappreżentattivi juru li l-approċċ tagħna jista’ jtejjeb b’mod konsistenti l-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni fuq linji bażi b’saħħithom tan-NAT. Extensive analyses demonstrate that the enhanced cross-attention achieves better exploitation of source contexts by leveraging both local and global information.', 'mn': 'Автограгчийн орчуулалт бус (NAT) нь халдварын процессийг бүх зорилготой дарааллыг таамаглаж маш хурдан хурдана. Гэхдээ зорилготой хамааралтай загварын загвар багасгахгүй байдалд нөхцөл үеийн үйлдвэрлэл маш их анхааралтай байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид НАТ-ын олон анхаарлын тухай орон нутгийн ойлголтын асуудлыг илэрхийлдэг. Энэ нь эх үүсвэрийн тухай сайжруулахад хэцүү. Энэ асуудлыг багасгахын тулд бид хөрш эх үүсвэрийн тэмдэгтийн сигналуудыг уламжлалтай анхаарлын тулд нэмэгдүүлэхийг санал болно. Олон төлөөлөгчийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга зам нь NAT суурь шугам дээр орчуулах чадварыг үргэлж сайжруулж чадна. Өнгөрсөн анализ нь дэлхийн орон нутгийн болон дэлхийн мэдээлэл хоёулаар илүү их анхаарал хангалттай байдал нь эх үүсвэрийн нөхцөл байдлыг ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'lt': 'Neautoregresinis vertimas (NAT) reikšmingai paspartina išvados procesą, nuspėjant visą tikslinę seką. Tačiau dėl tikslinio priklausomybės modeliavimo dekoderiuje trūkumo sąlyginės gamybos procesas labai priklauso nuo kryžminio dėmesio. Šiame dokumente atskleidžiame vietos supratimo problem ą NAT kryžminiame dėmesyje, kuriam sunku tinkamai apibūdinti šaltinio kontekstą. Siekiant sušvelninti šią problem ą, siūlome sustiprinti kaimyninių šaltinių ženklų signalus į įprastą kryžminį dėmesį. Eksperimentiniai kelių reprezentatyvių duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali nuosekliai pagerinti vertimo kokybę, palyginti su tvirtais NAT baziniais duomenimis. Išsamios analizės rodo, kad didesnis kryžminis dėmesys užtikrina geresnį šaltinių aplinkybių panaudojimą, naudojant tiek vietos, tiek pasaulinės informacijos svertą.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം രേഖപ്പെടുത്താത്ത പരിഭാഷ (NAT) മുഴുവന്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നത് മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പ്ര എന്നാലും, ഡെകോഡേറിലെ ലക്ഷ്യം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കാരണമാണ്, നിശ്ചയമായ തലമുറതലമുറയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയാണ് ക്രിസ്ക് ശ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നാട്ടിലെ ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രശ്നം വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. To alleviate this problem, we propose to enhance signals of neighbour source tokens into conventional cross-attention.  പല പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം ന വിശാലമായ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്, സ്രോതസ്സ് പരിഹ', 'sr': 'Neautoregresivni prevod (NAT) značajno ubrzava proces infekcije predviđajući celu ciljnu sekvencu. Međutim, zbog nedostatka modela ciljne zavisnosti u dekoderu, proces uvjetne generacije teško zavisi od prekršne pažnje. U ovom papiru otkrivamo problem percepcije lokalnosti u NAT-u, zbog kojeg je teško adekvatno uhvatiti izvorni kontekst. Da bismo olakšali ovaj problem, predlažemo da povećamo signale susednih izvora znakova u konvencionalnu prekršnu pažnju. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko reprezentativnih seta podataka pokazuju da naš pristup može konstantno poboljšati kvalitet prevoda nad jakim osnovnim linijama NAT-a. Prošireni analizi pokazuju da povećana prekršna pažnja postiže bolja ekspluatacija izvornih konteksta, uključujući lokalne i globalne informacije.', 'si': 'නොස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වාර්ථාව (NAT) විශේෂයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය වේගය කරනවා මුළු ලක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂ නමුත්, ඉලක්ෂාව අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස නිර්මාණයක් නොහැකි නිසා, සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා NAT ක්\u200dරීස් අවධානයේ ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අල්ලගන්න අ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩුවෙන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංඥාවක් වැඩි කරන්න. ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සැටුම් වලින් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේ විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා විස්තර විස්තර අවධානය හොඳ ප්\u200dරභාවිත සංවේශ', 'pl': 'Nieautoresywne tłumaczenie (NAT) znacznie przyspiesza proces wnioskowania poprzez przewidywanie całej sekwencji docelowej. Jednak ze względu na brak modelowania zależności docelowej w dekoderze proces generowania warunków w dużej mierze zależy od uwagi krzyżowej. W niniejszym artykule ujawniono problem percepcji lokalności w NAT cross-attention, dla którego trudno jest odpowiednio uchwycić kontekst źródłowy. Aby złagodzić ten problem, proponujemy wzmocnienie sygnałów sąsiednich tokenów źródłowych na konwencjonalną uwagę krzyżową. Wyniki eksperymentalne na kilku reprezentatywnych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasze podejście może konsekwentnie poprawić jakość tłumaczeń w stosunku do silnych linii bazowych NAT. Obszerne analizy pokazują, że zwiększona uwaga krzyżowa pozwala na lepsze wykorzystanie kontekstów źródłowych dzięki wykorzystaniu informacji lokalnych i globalnych.', 'no': 'Ikkje-autoregressivt omsetjing (NAT) forskyver ein betydelig akselerasjon av infeksjonsprosessen ved å foregå heile målskjefølgje. Men på grunn av mangling av målavhengighetsmodellen i dekoderen, avhengig av kryss-oppmerksomheten er conditional genereringsprosessen kraftig. I denne papiret opnar vi eit problem for oppfatting av lokalnamn i NAT-kryss-oppmerksomheten, som er vanskeleg å henta kjeldekonteksten. For å redusera dette problemet, foreslår vi å forbetra signaler av nabokjeldekode til konvensjonell kryss-oppmerksomhet. Eksperimentale resultat på fleire reprezentativ dataset viser at tilnærminga vårt kan konsekvent forbedra omsetjingskvalitet over sterke NAT-baselinjer. Ekstra analyser viser at den forbetre kryss-oppmerksomheten gjer betre ekspluatasjon av kjeldekontekstar ved å levera både lokale og globale informasjon.', 'ro': 'Traducerea non-autoregressivă (NAT) accelerează semnificativ procesul de inferență prin prezicerea întregii secvențe țintă. Cu toate acestea, din cauza lipsei de modelare a dependenței țintă în decoder, procesul de generare condiționată depinde în mare măsură de atenția încrucișată. În această lucrare, dezvăluim o problemă de percepție a localității în atenția încrucișată NAT, pentru care este dificil să captăm în mod adecvat contextul sursei. Pentru a atenua această problemă, propunem să îmbunătățim semnalele de jetoane sursă vecine în atenția convențională încrucișată. Rezultatele experimentale pe mai multe seturi de date reprezentative arată că abordarea noastră poate îmbunătăți în mod constant calitatea traducerii în raport cu nivelurile de referință NAT puternice. Analizele ample demonstrează că atenția încrucișată sporită realizează o mai bună exploatare a contextelor surselor prin valorificarea informațiilor locale și globale.', 'so': 'Turjumidda aan autoregressive (NAT) si weyn ayuu u soo degdegaa baaritaanka cudurka, iyadoo la sii sheegayo dhamaan dhamaantood. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sababtoo ah baahida sameynta qoraalka ku xiran ee goalka, qarniga shuruudaha ah si adag waxay ku xiran tahay iskutallaabta iskutallaabta. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku muujinnaa dhibaato aragtida deegaanka ah ee NAT-ka-booqashada, taas oo ay ugu adag tahay in lagu qabsado kooxda ay ku filan tahay. Si aan u fududayno dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in ay kordhiso calaamadaha deriska ah si ay u kordhisaan iskuulka caadiga ah. Imtixaanka qaarkood oo ka mid ah macluumaadka wakiilku waxay muujiyaan in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu sii kordhin karo qiimaha turjumista oo ka sii kordhin karo saldhigyada NAT ee xoogga badan. Baaritaanka dheeraadka ah waxay muujiyaan in horumarinta koronta lagu kordhiyo uu ka faa’iido isticmaalka tartanka sourceedka si wanaagsan u sameeyo isticmaalka macluumaadka deegaanka iyo caalamiga ah.', 'sv': 'Icke-autoregressiv översättning (NAT) accelererar signifikant inferensprocessen genom att förutsäga hela målsekvensen. På grund av avsaknaden av målberoendemodellering i dekoden beror emellertid processen för villkorad generering i hög grad på korsuppmärksamheten. I denna uppsats avslöjar vi ett problem med lokalitetsuppfattning i NAT korsuppmärksamhet, för vilket det är svårt att på ett adekvat sätt fånga källkontext. För att lindra detta problem föreslår vi att signalerna från grannkällorna förstärks till konventionell korsuppmärksamhet. Experimentella resultat på flera representativa datauppsättningar visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt konsekvent kan förbättra översättningskvaliteten jämfört med starka NAT-baslinjer. Omfattande analyser visar att den ökade tväruppmärksamheten ger bättre utnyttjande av källkontexter genom att utnyttja både lokal och global information.', 'ta': 'முழு இலக்கு வரிசையை முன்பார்க்கும் பொருட்டு தானியங்கி கடினமாக மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NAT) மொழிபெயர்ப்பை விரைவாக்கு ஆனால், குறியீட்டில் சார்ந்த சார்பு மாதிரிப்பு குறியீட்டின் குறிப்பாட்டின் குறியீட்டின் குறியீட்டில்  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு உள்ளூர்ந்த பார்வைப்பு பிரச்சனையை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் NAT முறை கவனத்தில் உள்ளது, அது மூலத இந்த பிரச்சினையை முறைப்படுத்த, நாம் வழக்கமான குறிப்புகளை அணுகும் மூலத்தின் குறிக்குறிகளை மேம்படுத் பல பிரதிநிதி தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவு விரிவான ஆய்வுகள் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட குறுக்கீட்டு கவனத்தை செயல்படுத்தும் மூலசூழ்நிலைகளின் சிறந்த பயன்படுத்தலை காட்டுக', 'ur': 'غیر-autoregressive translation (NAT) کو اثر سے زیادہ تغییر دیتا ہے کہ تمام موجود سطح کو پیش بینی کریں۔ لیکن، ڈیکوڈر میں موقع اعتمادی موڈلینگ کی ناکامی کے باعث، موقع کی نسل پرسس کروس توجه پر زیادہ مضبوط ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک محلی نظر مشکل کو NAT کرس-توجه میں ظاہر کرتے ہیں، جس کے لئے مناسب طور پر سورج کنٹنس کو پکڑنا مشکل ہے. اس مسئلہ کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، ہم اسے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ مسابقات کے سورج ٹوکینوں کی سیگنالیں زیادہ کریں، معمولی کرس توجه میں۔ بہت سی نمائندس ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ مضبوط NAT بنسٹ لینوں پر قابل ترجمہ کیفیت کو زیادہ زیادہ کر سکتی ہے. اضافہ تحقیقات دکھاتے ہیں کہ اضافہ کرسٹ توجه سے بہتر سورج کنٹکسٹس کے استعمال کرنے کے ذریعہ محلی اور جهانی معلومات کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, hech qanday foydalanuvchi modelli emas sababda, holat yordamchisi jarayonlarini qo'llashga ishlatadi. In this paper, we reveal a localness perception problem in NAT cross-attention, for which it is difficult to adequately capture source context.  Bu muammolani kamaytirish uchun, biz murojaat manba signallarini oddiy bir necha marta boshqarish imkoniyatini oshirishni talab qilamiz. Bir necha taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi taʼminot natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, bizning usuli yaxshi darajada tarjima qilishimiz mumkin NAT asosiy satrlaridan foydalanishi mumkin. Tafsilotni aniqlash mumkin, qo'shimcha qo'shimcha qo'shimcha foydalanish mumkin, lokal va dunyo maʼlumot yordamida foydalanish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Dịch chuyển không tự động (NOT) tăng đáng kể quá trình nhận biết bằng cách dự đoán cả dãy mục tiêu. Tuy nhiên, vì thiếu mô hình dựa vào mục tiêu trong bộ giải mã, quá trình sản xuất phụ thuộc vào sự chú ý đối lập. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tiết lộ một vấn đề nhận thức vị trí ở địa phương trên giao diện của NATO, rất khó để nắm bắt nguồn cung cấp thông tin. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị tăng cường tín hiệu của vật thể hàng xóm vào giao tiếp thông thường. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên nhiều tập tin đại diện cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể hoàn toàn cải thiện chất dịch hơn nhiều bản mẫu Nate. Những phân tích đầy đủ cho thấy sự chú ý hơn đạt được một cách khai thác tốt hơn các môi trường nguồn bằng cách thúc đẩy thông tin địa phương và toàn cầu.', 'bg': 'Неавторегресивният превод (НАТ) значително ускорява процеса на заключение чрез прогнозиране на цялата целева последователност. Въпреки това, поради липсата на моделиране на целевата зависимост в декодера, процесът на условно генериране силно зависи от кръстосаното внимание. В настоящата статия разкриваме проблем с възприемането на локалността при кръстосаното внимание на НАТ, за който е трудно да се улови адекватно контекста на източника. За да се облекчи този проблем, предлагаме да се подобрят сигналите на съседните източници токени в конвенционално кръстосано внимание. Експерименталните резултати на няколко представителни набора от данни показват, че нашият подход може последователно да подобри качеството на превода спрямо силните базови линии на НАТ. Обширни анализи показват, че засиленото кръстосано внимание постига по-добро използване на контекста на източниците чрез използване както на местна, така и на глобална информация.', 'nl': 'Niet-autoregressieve vertaling (NAT) versnelt het inferentieproces aanzienlijk door de volledige doelsequentie te voorspellen. Door het ontbreken van doelafhankelijkheidsmodellering in de decoder is het voorwaardelijke genereringsproces echter sterk afhankelijk van de kruisaandacht. In dit artikel onthullen we een lokaal perceptieprobleem in NAT cross-attentie, waarvoor het moeilijk is om broncontext adequaat vast te leggen. Om dit probleem te verlichten, stellen we voor om signalen van buurman source tokens te verbeteren in conventionele cross-attentie. Experimentele resultaten op verschillende representatieve datasets tonen aan dat onze aanpak consistent de vertaalkwaliteit kan verbeteren boven sterke NAT baselines. Uitgebreide analyses tonen aan dat de verbeterde cross-attentie een betere exploitatie van broncontexten mogelijk maakt door gebruik te maken van zowel lokale als wereldwijde informatie.', 'hr': 'Neautoregresivni prevod (NAT) značajno ubrzava proces infekcije predviđajući cijelu ciljnu sekvencu. Međutim, zbog nedostatka modela ciljne zavisnosti u dekoderu, proces uvjetne generacije teško zavisi od prekršne pažnje. U ovom papiru otkrivamo problem percepcije lokalnosti u NAT-u kroz pažnju, zbog kojeg je teško adekvatno uhvatiti izvorni kontekst. Da bismo ublažili ovaj problem, predlažemo poboljšati signale susjednog izvora znakova u konvencionalnu prekršnu pažnju. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko predstavnika podataka pokazuju da naš pristup može konstantno poboljšati kvalitet prevoda nad jakim početnim linijama NAT-a. Prošireni analizi pokazuju da poboljšana cross-attention postigne bolju iskorištavanje izvornih konteksta uz primjenu lokalnih i globalnih informacija.', 'da': 'Ikke-autoregressiv oversættelse (NAT) accelererer inferenseprocessen betydeligt ved at forudsige hele målsekvensen. På grund af manglen på målafhængighedsmodellering i dekoderen afhænger den betingede genereringsproces imidlertid i høj grad af krydsopmærksomheden. I denne artikel afslører vi et problem med lokal opfattelse i NAT krydsopmærksomhed, hvor det er svært at fange kildekonteksten tilstrækkeligt. For at afhjælpe dette problem foreslår vi at forbedre signalerne fra naboskilder til konventionel krydsopmærksomhed. Eksperimentelle resultater på flere repræsentative datasæt viser, at vores tilgang konsekvent kan forbedre oversættelseskvaliteten i forhold til stærke NAT basislinjer. Omfattende analyser viser, at den øgede krydsopmærksomhed opnår bedre udnyttelse af kildekonflikter ved at udnytte både lokal og global information.', 'de': 'Die nicht-autoregressive Übersetzung (NAT) beschleunigt den Inferenzprozess signifikant, indem sie die gesamte Zielsequenz vorhersagt. Aufgrund der fehlenden Modellierung der Zielabhängigkeit im Decoder hängt der bedingte Generierungsprozess jedoch stark von der gegenseitigen Aufmerksamkeit ab. In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir ein Problem der Lokalitätswahrnehmung in NAT Cross-Attention auf, für das es schwierig ist, Quellenkontext adäquat zu erfassen. Um dieses Problem zu lindern, schlagen wir vor, Signale von benachbarten Quelltokens in konventionelle Cross-Attention zu verbessern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse mehrerer repräsentativer Datensätze zeigen, dass unser Ansatz die Übersetzungsqualität über starke NAT-Baselines kontinuierlich verbessern kann. Umfangreiche Analysen zeigen, dass durch die verstärkte Cross-Attention sowohl lokale als auch globale Informationen besser genutzt werden können.', 'id': 'Terjemahan non-autoregressif (NAT) secara signifikan mempercepat proses inferensi dengan memprediksi seluruh urutan sasaran. Namun, karena kekurangan model ketergantuan sasaran di dekoder, proses generasi kondisional sangat tergantung pada perhatian salib. In this paper, we reveal a localness perception problem in NAT cross-attention, for which it is difficult to adequately capture source context.  Untuk mengurangi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan untuk meningkatkan sinyal sumber token tetangga menjadi perhatian salib konvensional. Hasil eksperimental pada beberapa set data mewakili menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita dapat konsisten meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan di atas garis dasar NAT yang kuat. Analisis ekstensif menunjukkan bahwa perhatian saling meningkat mencapai eksploitasi yang lebih baik dari konteks sumber dengan menggunakan informasi lokal dan global.', 'fa': 'ترجمه\u200cهای غیر خودگریسی (NAT) با پیش\u200cبینی تمام ترجمه هدف، فرایند آلودگی را بسیار سرعت می\u200cدهد. با این حال، به دلیل lack of target dependency modelling in the decoder, the conditional generation process heavily depends on the cross-attention. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل تشخیص محلی در توجه مختلف NAT را نشان می دهیم، که برای آن محیط منبع را به اندازه کافی گرفتن سخت است. برای تخفیف این مشکل، پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که علامت منبع همسایه را به توجه متفاوت سنتی بیشتر کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نماینده\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما می\u200cتواند همیشه کیفیت ترجمه را بر پایگاه\u200cهای NAT قوی بهبود دهد. تحلیل\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که توجه\u200cهای متوسط\u200cتر به استفاده از موضوع منبع بهتر به دست می\u200cآید با توجه به اطلاعات محلی و جهانی.', 'ko': '비자귀환번역(NAT)은 전체 목표 서열을 예측함으로써 추리 과정을 현저하게 가속화시킨다.그러나 디코더에 목표 의존 모델이 부족하기 때문에 조건 생성 과정은 교차 주의에 심각하게 의존한다.본고에서 우리는NAT교차주의 중의 부분적인 섹시지 문제를 제시했는데 이 문제에 대해 원상하문을 충분히 포착하기 어렵다.이 문제를 완화하기 위해서, 우리는 인접원 영패의 신호를 일반적인 교차 주의로 강화할 것을 건의합니다.몇 가지 대표적인 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 강NAT 기선 아래에서 번역의 질을 지속적으로 향상시킬 수 있다.광범위한 분석에 의하면 강화된 교차 주의는 로컬과 전역 정보를 이용함으로써 원문 상하문에 대한 더욱 좋은 이용을 실현했다.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri isiyo ya kudhibiti kujitegemea (NAT) inaongezea kiasi kikubwa mchakato wa maambukizi kwa kutabiri mfululizo mzima wa malengo. Hata hivyo, kwa sababu ya kukosekana kwa muundo wa kutegemea malengo katika maendeleo hayo, mchakato wa kizazi cha mazingira unategemea kwa kiasi kikubwa. Katika gazeti hili, tunaonyesha tatizo la mtazamo wa ndani katika utangazaji wa NAT, ambalo ni vigumu kuikamata chanzo cha kutosha. Ili kupunguza tatizo hili, tunapendekeza kuongeza ishara za ishara za vyanzo vya jirani katika kutangazwa kwa mara ya kawaida. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti za uwakilishi kadhaa yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kuboresha kiwango cha tafsiri zaidi ya misingi imara ya NAT. Uchambuzi wa kina unaonyesha kwamba kuongezeka kwa upande wa kutangazwa unafanikiwa matumizi bora ya mikutano ya vyanzo kwa kutuma taarifa za ndani na dunia.', 'tr': "Otomatik gaýşartmaýan terjime (NAT) tüm maksadyň dizini öňünden geçirjek prosesini täsirleýär. Ýöne, dekoderde maksadat baglanylygy modellendirmeginiň ýok bolmagynyň sebäbi, şartly döwletlere görnüş ünsüne baglanýar. Bu kagyzda, NAT'yň üst ünsünde ýerleşýän pikirleriniň kynçylygyny görkeýäris. Munuň üçin çeşme kontekstini ýeterlik ýerine almak kyn. Bu sorunu azaltmak için komşular kaynaklı işaretlerini alışkanlı karışık dikkatine geliştirmek için öneririz. Birnäçe temisli veri setirlerinde örän netijeleri gurnalýan ýagdaýymyzyň NAT üýtgeli hatlaryň üstünde terjime etmegiň howpsuzlygyny gowurap biljekdigini görkezýär. Ýuwaşky analyzlary hem ýerleri hem dünýäb maglumaty üçin gowy gözleýän çeşme durumlarynyň ýüze gözleýändigini görkezýär.", 'af': "Nie- autoregressiewe vertaling (NAT) vermindelik versneller die inferensie proses deur die hele doel volgorde te voorskou. Maar vanweë die ontbreek van die doel afhanklikheid modellering in die dekoder, het die voorwaardige generasie proses swaar afhang van die kruis-aandag. In hierdie papier openbaar ons 'n plaaslike aandag probleem in NAT kruis-aandag, waarvoor dit is moeilik om die bronkontekste te neem. Om hierdie probleem te verminder, voorstel ons om signale van naaste bron tokens te verbeter in konvensionele kruis-aandag. Eksperimentale resultate op verskeie reprezentante datastelle vertoon dat ons toegang kan konsistentlik vertalingskwaliteit verbeter oor sterke NAT basisline. Ekstensiewe analiserings wys dat die verbeterde kruis-aandag beter uitbreiding van bronkontekste bereik deur beelde plaaslike en globale inligting te verwys.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi jo-autoregresiv (NAT) përshpejton ndjeshëm procesin e përfundimit duke parashikuar të gjithë sekuencën e objektivit. Megjithatë, për shkak të mungesës së modelimit të varësisë objektive në dekoder, procesi i gjenerimit të kushtuar varet shumë nga vëmendja kryqësore. Në këtë letër, ne zbulojmë një problem perceptimi të lokalitetit në vëmendjen e kryqëzuar të NAT, për të cilin është e vështirë të kapësh në mënyrë të përshtatshme kontekstin e burimit. Për të lehtësuar këtë problem, ne propozojmë të përmirësojmë sinjalet e burimeve fqinjë në vëmendjen e ndërsjelltë konvencionale. Rezultatet eksperimentale në disa grupe të dhënash përfaqësuese tregojnë se qasja jonë mund të përmirësojë vazhdimisht cilësinë e përkthimit mbi linjat bazë të forta të NAT. Analizat e zgjeruara tregojnë se vëmendja e përmirësuar kryqësore arrin shfrytëzim më të mirë të konteksteve burimore duke përdorur si informacionin lokal ashtu edhe global.', 'am': 'Non-autoregressive translation (NAT) በሙሉ ዕቅድን በመፍጠር በአስቸጋሪው ፕሮግራሙን ያስቸኩላል። ምንም እንኳን፣ የግንኙነት የአካባቢ ድምፅ ማድረግ ግንኙነት በመስቀል ላይ በሚያደገ ምክንያት የግንኙነት ትውልድ ግንኙነት በጭንቅ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የኖርብ ስሕተት ጉዳይ እናሳውቃለን፤ ስለዚህም የኩነቶች ክፍል ማሰናከል በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሻለል፣ የጎረቤቱን የኩነቶች ምልክቶች ማሻሻል እናስባለን፡፡ በጥቂት የፖስቲካ ዳታተሮች ላይ የፈተና ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳየው የግንኙነታችን ጥያቄ የNAT መቀመጫዎች ጥያቄን በሙሉ እንዲያበዛ ይችላል፡፡ የበዛ አስተያየት፣ የበለጠ የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት የኩነቶች ጥቃት በማድረግ እና የባሕላዊ መረጃዎችን በመስጠት ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ոչ-ինքնագրեսիվ թարգմանությունը (NAT) նշանակալիորեն արագացնում է հետևյալների գործընթացը կանխատեսելով ողջ նպատակային հաջորդականությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, նպատակային կախվածության մոդելավորման բացակայության պատճառով, պայմանավոր սերունդների գործընթացը շատ կախված է խաչը ուշադրության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք բացահայտում ենք տեղական հասկացության խնդիր NAT-ի խաչը ուշադրության մեջ, որի համար դժվար է բավարար կերպով ընկալել աղբյուրի կոնտեքստը: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք բարելավել հարևանի աղբյուրի նշանները ավանդական խաչը ուշադրության: Տարբեր ներկայացուցիչ տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կարող է մշտապես բարելավել թարգմանման որակը NAT-ի ուժեղ հիմնական գծերի փոխարեն: Ամբողջ վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ բարելավված խաչը ուշադրությունը ավելի լավ օգտագործում է աղբյուրների կոնտեքստները՝ օգտագործելով տեղական և գլոբալ տեղեկատվությունը:', 'az': "Otomatik-regressiv tercümə (NAT) bütün məqsəd seçməsini təmin edərək infeksiya prosesini çox hızlandırır. Halbuki, dekoderdə məqsəd bağımlılıq modellərinin yoxduğu səbəbi, şəkildə nəsil işləri çox ağır dikkatində bağlıdır. Bu kağızda, NAT'nin çox dikkati barəsində yerli görünüş problemini göstəririk, bunun üçün mənbə məlumatını yaxınlaşdırmaq çox çətin. Bu problemi yüngülləşdirmək üçün, qonşu mənbə işaretlərinin sinyallərini düzəltməyə təklif edirik. Növbəti temsilci veri qurularında təcrübə sonuçları bizim tərəfimizin güclü NAT sətirlərinin üstündə tərcüm kalitetini daha yaxşılaşdıra biləcəyini göstərir. Əlavə analizi göstərir ki, artıqlı çoxlu təsirlərin mənbə müxtəliflərinin daha xeyirli istifadə etməsini yerli və küresel məlumatların istifadə edərək daha xeyirli olar.", 'bn': 'না স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অনুবাদ (NAT) পুরো লক্ষ্যের সেকেন্ড প্রত্যাখ্যান করে দ্রুত সংক্রান্ত প্রক্রিয়াকে বেড়ে যায়। কিন্তু ক্রমবর্ধকারীর লক্ষ্যের নির্ভরশীল মডেলের অভাবের কারণে পরিস্থিতি প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়া ক্রস-মনোযোগের উপর বেশী ন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ন্যাটির ক্রস-মনোযোগে স্থানীয় দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিকার সমস্যা প্রকাশ করি, যার জন্য যথেষ্ট উৎসের প্রেক্ষাপটে  এই সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রতিবেশী উৎসের সিগন্যাল বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য। বেশ কয়েকটি প্রতিনিধি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা ক্রমাগত ভাবে অনুবাদের মান বেস বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ দেখিয়েছে যে স্থানীয় এবং বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের তথ্য প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে সোর্স প্রতিযোগিতার ব্যবহারের', 'bs': 'Neautoregresivni prevod (NAT) značajno ubrzava proces infekcije predviđajući cijelu ciljnu sekvencu. Međutim, zbog nedostatka modela ciljne zavisnosti u dekoderu, proces uvjetne generacije teško zavisi od prekršne pažnje. U ovom papiru otkrivamo problem percepcije lokalnosti u NAT-u kroz pažnju, zbog kojeg je teško adekvatno uhvatiti kontekst izvora. Da bi ublažili ovaj problem, predlažemo da povećamo signale susjednih izvora znakova u konvencionalnu prekršnu pažnju. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko reprezentativnih podataka pokazuju da naš pristup može konstantno poboljšati kvalitet prevoda nad jakim baznim linijama NAT-a. Prošireni analizi pokazuju da povećana prekršna pažnja postigne bolju ekspluataciju izvornih konteksta pod uticajem lokalnih i globalnih informacija.', 'ca': "La traducció no autoregressiva (NAT) accelera significativament el procés de inferència predint tota la seqüència d'objectius. Però, a causa de la falta de modelar la dependència de l'objectiu en el decodificador, el procés de generació condicional depèn molt de l'atenció cruzada. En aquest article, revelem un problem a de percepció de la localitat en la atenció cruzada del NAT, per al qual és difícil capturar adequadament el context de fonts. Per aliviar aquest problema, proposem millorar els senyals de fitxes de fonts veïnes en una atenció cruzada convencional. Els resultats experimentals de diversos conjunts de dades representatius mostren que el nostre enfocament pot millorar de manera constant la qualitat de la traducció sobre línies de base fortes del NAT. Extensive analyses demonstrate that the enhanced cross-attention achieves better exploitation of source contexts by leveraging both local and global information.", 'et': 'Mitte-autoregressiivne tõlge (NAT) kiirendab märkimisväärselt järelduste protsessi, ennustades kogu sihtjärjestust. Kuna dekoodris puudub sihtsõltuvuse modelleerimine, sõltub tingimusliku tootmise protsess siiski suuresti risttähelepanu andmisest. Käesolevas töös paljastame NAT risttähelepanu lokaalsuse tajumise probleemi, mille puhul on raske piisavalt analüüsida lähtekonteksti. Selle probleemi leevendamiseks teeme ettepaneku suurendada naaberallikate signaale tavapäraseks risttähelepanuks. Mitme esindusliku andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis võib pidevalt parandada tõlkekvaliteeti tugevate NAT baasliinide alusel. Laiaulatuslikud analüüsid näitavad, et tõhustatud risttähelepanu saavutab lähtekonteksti parema ärakasutamise, kasutades nii kohalikku kui ka ülemaailmset teavet.', 'cs': 'Neautoregresivní překlad (NAT) výrazně urychluje proces inference predikcí celé cílové sekvence. Nicméně vzhledem k nedostatku modelování cílové závislosti v dekodéru, proces podmíněného generování silně závisí na křížové pozornosti. V tomto článku odhalujeme problém vnímání lokality v NAT cross-pozornosti, pro který je obtížné adekvátně zachytit zdrojový kontext. Pro zmírnění tohoto problému navrhujeme posílit signály sousedních zdrojových tokenů na konvenční křížovou pozornost. Experimentální výsledky na několika reprezentativních datových sadách ukazují, že náš přístup může důsledně zlepšovat kvalitu překladu nad silnými NAT základními liniemi. Rozsáhlé analýzy ukazují, že zvýšená křížová pozornost dosahuje lepšího využití zdrojových kontextů využitím místních i globálních informací.', 'fi': 'Ei-autoregressiivinen käännös (NAT) nopeuttaa merkittävästi päättelyprosessia ennustamalla koko kohdesekvenssin. Koska dekooderissa ei ole tavoiteriippuvuusmallintaa, ehdollinen tuotantoprosessi riippuu kuitenkin suuresti ristikkäisyydestä. Tässä artikkelissa paljastamme NAT-ristikkäishuomion paikallisuushavainto-ongelman, johon lähdekontekstia on vaikea kuvata riittävästi. Tämän ongelman lievittämiseksi ehdotamme naapurin lähdekoodien signaalien lisäämistä tavanomaiseksi ristikkäiseksi huomioksi. Kokeelliset tulokset useista edustavista aineistoista osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme voi johdonmukaisesti parantaa käännösten laatua vahvojen NAT-lähtökohtien avulla. Laajat analyysit osoittavat, että tehostetun ristikkäishuomion avulla voidaan hyödyntää paremmin lähdekonteksteja hyödyntämällä sekä paikallista että maailmanlaajuista tietoa.', 'jv': 'Open source Nanging, ngentèni uwong kudu modelung kuwi nggawe aturan dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke ditambah, dadi kapan mulai kuwi nggawe aturan dipunangke dipunangke ditambah. Nang mapang iki, kéné ngerasakno perusahaan langkung pawaran ning mapang dipunanggé (panganan ingkang punika, ingkang angkang dipunanggé) nang dipunanggé kapan-kapan iki. Ngawe ngubah perbudhakan iki banget, kita supoyo nggawe seneng pisan-pakan banget tuli nggawe barang kelas token sing tatara ono wektu nggawe barang kelas Rejalaké sing paling-paling karo akeh dataset repréntasi wong kita dianggap dhéwé iso nguasai perusahaan cualiter sing ditambang nggawe barang dhéwé, sing nyelehake nggawe tarjamahan kanggo mbang nggawe dataset. Token', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da ba'a zartar da mai dõgara ga masu motsi da ke cikin kodi, zartar da kizayen halin da ba'a yi nauyi, yana dõgara ga canza-sararin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana wata matabbata ga gani na lokalci a cikin shirin NAT, da kuma ana yi nauyi da ka kãma mazaɓa mai daidai. Ga ya sauƙaƙara wannan muammãni, Munã buƙaitar da za'a ƙara alama na ayukan kilowa na jiran zuwa fassarar-zura mai kawaici. Tajararin matsala a kan wasu masu motsi na tsari ya nuna cewa hanyarmu yana iya ƙari tsarin translation koda bazacin NAT mai ƙarfi. Anarari masu ƙaranci sun nuna cewa, ƙari-fassarar-aikin za'a sãmu mafiya matuƙar wa muhimmanci na sourcen da za'a gajiya labarai da labarai a lokacin da duniya.", 'sk': 'Neavtoregresivni prevod (NAT) bistveno pospeši postopek sklepanja s predvidevanjem celotnega ciljnega zaporedja. Vendar je zaradi pomanjkanja modeliranja ciljne odvisnosti v dekoderju proces pogojne proizvodnje močno odvisen od navzkrižne pozornosti. V prispevku smo razkrili problem zaznavanja lokalnosti pri navzkrižni pozornosti NAT, za katerega je težko ustrezno zajeti kontekst vira. Za ublažitev tega problema predlagamo, da se signali sosednjih žetonov povečajo v konvencionalno navzkrižno pozornost. Eksperimentalni rezultati na več reprezentativnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da lahko naš pristop dosledno izboljša kakovost prevodov preko močnih izhodišč NAT. Obsežne analize kažejo, da okrepljena navzkrižna pozornost omogoča boljše izkoriščanje virov z izkoriščanjem lokalnih in globalnih informacij.', 'bo': 'Non-autoregressive translation (NAT)significantly accelerates the inference process by predicting the entire target sequence. By predicting the entire target sequence. ཡིན་ནའང་། དམིགས་ཡུལ་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མིན་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་མཚམས་འཇོག་པ་ལས་བརྟེན་ནས། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ། NAT་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོར་ལྟར་ དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་མིང་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ནས་མཐོང་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ས གསལ་ཅན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྤེལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱས་གཏ དམིགས་གསལ་ཅན་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཚད་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆས་ཀྱིས་རང་ཁུལ་དང་འཛམ་གླིང', 'he': 'התרגום לא אוטומגרסיבי (NAT) מאיץ באופן משמעותי את תהליך ההנחה על ידי חיזוי את כל רצף המטרה. בכל אופן, בגלל חוסר תלויות למטרה מודל בתיקון, תהליך הדור המתנאי תלוי בכבד על תשומת לב הצלב. בעיתון הזה, אנו חושפים בעיה בתפיסה מקומית בתשומת לב הצלב של NAT, עבור אשר קשה לתפוס בקשר מקור מתאים. כדי להקל על הבעיה הזאת, אנו מציעים לשפר את האות של סימני מקור שכן לתשומת לב צלב קונבנציונציונלית. תוצאות ניסויים על מספר קבוצות נתונים מייצגים מראות שהגישה שלנו יכולה לשפר באופן קבוע איכות התרגום מעל קווי בסיס חזקים של NAT. ניתוחים רחבים מראים שהתשומת לב הצלב המשותפת משיגה ניצול טוב יותר של הקשר המקורי על ידי ניצול מידע מקומי וגלובלי.'}
{'en': 'Does Gender Matter? Towards Fairness in Dialogue Systems', 'ar': 'هل الجنس مهم؟ نحو العدالة في نظم الحوار', 'pt': 'Gênero importa? Rumo à justiça nos sistemas de diálogo', 'es': '¿Importa el género? Hacia la equidad en los sistemas de diálogo', 'fr': "Le genre est-il important\xa0? Vers l'équité dans les systèmes de dialogue", 'ja': 'ジェンダーは重要か？対話システムの公平性に向けて', 'zh': '性别重乎? 于对话系统中得平', 'hi': 'क्या लिंग मायने रखता है? संवाद प्रणालियों में निष्पक्षता की ओर', 'ru': 'Имеет ли значение гендерная проблематика?', 'ga': 'An mbaineann Inscne? I dTreo na Cothroime i gCórais Idirphlé', 'el': 'Έχει σημασία το φύλο; Προς τη δικαιοσύνη στα συστήματα διαλόγου', 'ka': 'დვნეყპ მარვპ ლთ ვ? დიალოგის სისტემებში შეუძლებელობა', 'hu': 'Számít a gender? A párbeszédrendszerek méltányossága felé', 'kk': 'Жалғыз материалы бар ма? Диалог жүйелерінде қатесіздік жолына', 'it': "Il genere conta? Verso l'equità nei sistemi di dialogo", 'mk': 'Дали полот е важен? За фер во системите на дијалог', 'lt': 'Does Gender Matter?  Towards Fairness in Dialogue Systems', 'ms': 'Adakah Gender penting? Keadilan dalam Sistem Dialog', 'ml': 'സെന്റര്\u200d കാര്യം ഉണ്ടോ? Towards Fairness in Dialogue Systems', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл зүйл гэж үү? Диалог системийн эвгүй байдлын тулд', 'mt': "Is-Sess huwa importanti? Lejn Ġustizzja fis-Sistemi ta' Djalogu", 'no': 'Er det generelle matt? Gå til feilighet i dialogsystemet', 'pl': 'Czy płeć ma znaczenie? W kierunku sprawiedliwości w systemach dialogu', 'sr': 'Da li je Gender Matter? Do nepravednosti u sistemima dijaloga', 'si': 'ජෙන්ඩර් මේටර් ද? සංවාද පද්ධතියේදී අසාර්ථක විදිහට', 'ro': 'Genul contează? Către echitate în sistemele de dialog', 'so': 'Ma wax ku saabsan jinsiga? Towards Failure in dialogue systems', 'sv': 'Spelar kön roll? Mot rättvisa i dialogsystemen', 'ta': 'பெண் விஷயமா? உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளில் மேல் தோல்வியுற்றது', 'ur': 'کیا جنس موٹر ہے؟ Dialog Systems میں سفارشی کی طرف', 'uz': 'Jini muhim? Dialog tizimlarida oʻtish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi', 'vi': 'Có Gondor không? Về hướng công bằng trong hệ thống đối thoại', 'bg': 'Полът има ли значение? Към справедливост в системите за диалог', 'hr': 'Je li Gender Matter? ka nepravednosti u dijalogskim sustavima', 'nl': 'Is gender belangrijk? Naar billijkheid in dialoogsystemen', 'da': 'Betyder køn noget? Mod retfærdighed i dialogsystemer', 'id': 'Does Gender Matter?  Keadilan dalam Sistem Dialog', 'de': 'Ist Geschlecht wichtig? Fairness in Dialogsystemen', 'ko': '성별이 중요합니까?대화 제도의 공평으로 나아가다', 'fa': 'جنس موضوع؟ به سوی پاکیزه در سیستم\u200cهای دیalog', 'tr': 'Ýenşi Matyk? Dialog Systemlerinde ýüzsüzlik git', 'sw': 'Je, Jambo la jinsia? Mfumo wa Dialog', 'af': 'Het Gender Matter? Gaan na Mislukkigheid in Dialoog Stelsels', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք գենդերն կարևոր են: Պատկերացումների արդարության ուղղությամբ', 'am': 'የውይይት ጉዳይ ነውን? ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'az': 'Gender Matter? Dialoog Sisteml톛rind톛 t톛hl칲k톛sizlik t톛r톛find톛', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গের মানে? ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে ব্যর্থ', 'bs': 'Je li Gender Matter? ka nepravednosti u sistemima dijaloga', 'ca': 'Importa el gènere? Vers la justesa en els sistemes de diàleg', 'cs': 'Záleží na pohlaví? K spravedlnosti v systémech dialogu', 'et': 'Kas sugu loeb? Dialoogisüsteemide õigluse suunas', 'fi': 'Onko sukupuolella vĂ¤liĂ¤? Kohti vuoropuhelujĂ¤rjestelmien oikeudenmukaisuutta', 'sq': 'Does Gender Matter?  Për drejtësinë në sistemet e dialogut', 'jv': 'Opo kelas matèr ? ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Je spol pomemben? K pravičnosti v sistemih dialoga', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་མིའི་དོན་དག་གྲྭ་འདུག་གི་ཡིན་ནམ། ཌའི་ལོག་མ་ལག་གི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་དུ་ཉར་མེད་པར་འགྲོ་སྐབས', 'ha': 'Shin, yana da wani abu? @ action', 'he': 'האם מין משנה? לכיוון הוגנות במערכות דיאלוג'}
{'en': 'Recently there are increasing concerns about the fairness of Artificial Intelligence (AI) in real-world applications such as computer vision and recommendations. For example, recognition algorithms in computer vision are unfair to black people such as poorly detecting their faces and inappropriately identifying them as gorillas. As one crucial application of AI, dialogue systems have been extensively applied in our society. They are usually built with real human conversational data ; thus they could inherit some fairness issues which are held in the real world. However, the fairness of dialogue systems has not been well investigated. In this paper, we perform a pioneering study about the fairness issues in dialogue systems. In particular, we construct a benchmark dataset and propose quantitative measures to understand fairness in dialogue models. Our studies demonstrate that popular dialogue models show significant prejudice towards different genders and races. Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods. Experiments show that our methods can reduce the bias in dialogue systems significantly. The dataset and the implementation are released to foster fairness research in dialogue systems.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، هناك مخاوف متزايدة بشأن عدالة الذكاء الاصطناعي (AI) في تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي مثل رؤية الكمبيوتر والتوصيات. على سبيل المثال ، خوارزميات التعرف في رؤية الكمبيوتر غير عادلة للأشخاص السود مثل ضعف اكتشاف وجوههم والتعرف عليهم بشكل غير لائق على أنهم "غوريلا". كأحد التطبيقات الحاسمة للذكاء الاصطناعي ، تم تطبيق أنظمة الحوار على نطاق واسع في مجتمعنا. عادة ما يتم إنشاؤها باستخدام بيانات محادثة بشرية حقيقية ؛ وبالتالي يمكن أن يرثوا بعض قضايا الإنصاف الموجودة في العالم الحقيقي. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم التحقيق بشكل جيد في عدالة أنظمة الحوار. في هذا البحث نقوم بإجراء دراسة رائدة حول قضايا الإنصاف في أنظمة الحوار. على وجه الخصوص ، نحن نبني مجموعة بيانات معيارية ونقترح مقاييس كمية لفهم الإنصاف في نماذج الحوار. تُظهر دراساتنا أن نماذج الحوار الشعبي تُظهر تحيزًا كبيرًا تجاه الأجناس والأجناس المختلفة. إلى جانب ذلك ، للتخفيف من التحيز في أنظمة الحوار ، نقترح طريقتين بسيطتين لكن فعالتين في إزالة الحواف. تظهر التجارب أن أساليبنا يمكن أن تقلل التحيز في أنظمة الحوار بشكل كبير. تم إصدار مجموعة البيانات والتنفيذ لتعزيز أبحاث الإنصاف في أنظمة الحوار.', 'es': 'Recientemente, hay una creciente preocupación por la imparcialidad de la Inteligencia Artificial (IA) en aplicaciones del mundo real, como la visión artificial y las recomendaciones. Por ejemplo, los algoritmos de reconocimiento en la visión artificial son injustos para las personas negras, como detectar mal sus rostros e identificarlos inapropiadamente como «gorilas». Como una aplicación crucial de la IA, los sistemas de diálogo se han aplicado ampliamente en nuestra sociedad. Por lo general, se construyen con datos conversacionales humanos reales; por lo tanto, podrían heredar algunos problemas de equidad que se mantienen en el mundo real. Sin embargo, la equidad de los sistemas de diálogo no se ha investigado bien. En este artículo, realizamos un estudio pionero sobre los problemas de equidad en los sistemas de diálogo. En particular, construimos un conjunto de datos de referencia y proponemos medidas cuantitativas para entender la equidad en los modelos de diálogo. Nuestros estudios demuestran que los modelos de diálogo populares muestran un prejuicio significativo hacia los diferentes géneros y razas. Además, para mitigar el sesgo en los sistemas de diálogo, proponemos dos métodos de desvío simples pero efectivos. Los experimentos demuestran que nuestros métodos pueden reducir significativamente el sesgo en los sistemas de diálogo. El conjunto de datos y la implementación se publican para fomentar la investigación de equidad en los sistemas de diálogo.', 'pt': 'Recentemente, há preocupações crescentes sobre a justiça da Inteligência Artificial (IA) em aplicações do mundo real, como visão computacional e recomendações. Por exemplo, algoritmos de reconhecimento em visão computacional são injustos para pessoas negras, como detectar mal seus rostos e identificá-los inadequadamente como “gorilas”. Como uma aplicação crucial da IA, os sistemas de diálogo têm sido amplamente aplicados em nossa sociedade. Eles geralmente são construídos com dados reais de conversação humana; assim, eles podem herdar algumas questões de justiça que são mantidas no mundo real. No entanto, a justiça dos sistemas de diálogo não foi bem investigada. Neste artigo, realizamos um estudo pioneiro sobre as questões de justiça em sistemas de diálogo. Em particular, construímos um conjunto de dados de referência e propomos medidas quantitativas para entender a justiça nos modelos de diálogo. Nossos estudos demonstram que os modelos de diálogo popular mostram um preconceito significativo em relação a diferentes gêneros e raças. Além disso, para mitigar o viés nos sistemas de diálogo, propomos dois métodos simples, mas eficazes. Experimentos mostram que nossos métodos podem reduzir significativamente o viés nos sistemas de diálogo. O conjunto de dados e a implementação são divulgados para promover a pesquisa de justiça em sistemas de diálogo.', 'fr': "Récemment, on s'inquiète de plus en plus de l'équité de l'intelligence artificielle (IA) dans les applications du monde réel telles que la vision par ordinateur et les recommandations. Par exemple, les algorithmes de reconnaissance en vision par ordinateur sont injustes pour les Noirs, tels que la détection insuffisante de leur visage et leur identification inappropriée en tant que «\xa0gorilles\xa0». En tant qu'application cruciale de l'IA, les systèmes de dialogue ont été largement appliqués dans notre société. Ils sont généralement construits à partir de données conversationnelles humaines réelles\xa0; ils peuvent donc hériter de certains problèmes d'équité qui se posent dans le monde réel. Cependant, l'équité des systèmes de dialogue n'a pas été bien étudiée. Dans cet article, nous réalisons une étude novatrice sur les questions d'équité dans les systèmes de dialogue. En particulier, nous construisons un ensemble de données de référence et proposons des mesures quantitatives pour comprendre l'équité dans les modèles de dialogue. Nos études démontrent que les modèles de dialogue populaires montrent des préjugés importants à l'égard des différents sexes et races. En outre, pour atténuer le biais dans les systèmes de dialogue, nous proposons deux méthodes de dépolarisation simples mais efficaces. Les expériences montrent que nos méthodes peuvent réduire de manière significative les biais dans les systèmes de dialogue. L'ensemble de données et l'implémentation sont publiés pour favoriser la recherche sur l'équité dans les systèmes de dialogue.", 'ja': '最近では、コンピュータビジョンや推奨事項などの現実世界のアプリケーションにおける人工知能（ AI ）の公平性に対する懸念が高まっています。 例えば、コンピュータビジョンにおける認識アルゴリズムは、黒人の顔を不適切に検出し、「ゴリラ」として不適切に識別するなど、黒人にとって不公平である。 AIの重要な応用の一つとして、対話システムは私たちの社会に広く応用されています。 それらは通常、実際の人間の会話データを使用して構築されます。したがって、現実世界で保持されているいくつかの公平性の問題を継承することができます。 しかし、対話システムの公平性は十分に調査されていません。 本稿では、対話システムにおける公平性の問題についての先駆的な研究を行う。 特に、ベンチマークデータセットを構築し、対話モデルの公平性を理解するための定量的尺度を提案します。 私たちの研究は、人気のある対話モデルが異なる性別や人種に対する重大な偏見を示していることを示しています。 さらに、対話システムのバイアスを軽減するために、2つのシンプルで効果的なデバイアス方法を提案します。 実験は、私たちの方法が対話システムのバイアスを大幅に減らすことができることを示しています。 データセットと実装は、対話システムにおける公平性研究を促進するためにリリースされます。', 'zh': '近者,人日益注人工智能(AI)计算机视荐世界用中公平性。 如计算机视中识算法不平于黑人,如检其面部不佳,且不当谓之"大猩猩"。 为人工智能之要用,言统已博于吾世矣。 常以实人对数。 故其可以继世之平也。 然言制度者公平性未得善勘。 于本文中,对话系统之公平性,开创性之究也。 特构一准数集,并立定量,以知对模之公平性。 我们的研究明白,流行的对话模式对不同的性别和种族显见的偏见。 此外为减对话系统之偏差,我们发出两种简易而有效的去偏倚法。 实验明,吾法可以显降对统之偏差。 发数集施,所以趋言平也。', 'ru': 'В последнее время растут опасения по поводу справедливости искусственного интеллекта (ИИ) в реальных приложениях, таких как компьютерное зрение и рекомендации. Например, алгоритмы распознавания в компьютерном зрении несправедливы по отношению к чернокожим людям, таким как плохое распознавание их лиц и ненадлежащая идентификация их как «горилл». Являясь одним из важнейших видов применения ИИ, системы диалога широко применяются в нашем обществе. Обычно они построены на реальных человеческих разговорных данных; таким образом, они могут унаследовать некоторые вопросы справедливости, которые находятся в реальном мире. Однако справедливость систем диалога не была должным образом изучена. В этой статье мы проводим новаторское исследование по вопросам справедливости в системах диалога. В частности, мы строим базисный набор данных и предлагаем количественные показатели для понимания справедливости в моделях диалога. Наши исследования показывают, что модели народного диалога демонстрируют значительные предубеждения в отношении различных полов и рас. Кроме того, чтобы смягчить предвзятость в системах диалога, мы предлагаем два простых, но эффективных метода девиации. Эксперименты показывают, что наши методы могут значительно уменьшить смещение в диалоговых системах. Набор данных и информация о его внедрении публикуются в целях содействия проведению исследований по вопросам справедливости в системах диалога.', 'hi': 'हाल ही में कंप्यूटर दृष्टि और सिफारिशों जैसे वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों में आर्टिफिशियल इंटेलिजेंस (एआई) की निष्पक्षता के बारे में चिंताएं बढ़ रही हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, कंप्यूटर दृष्टि में मान्यता एल्गोरिदम काले लोगों के लिए अनुचित हैं जैसे कि उनके चेहरे का खराब पता लगाना और अनुचित रूप से उन्हें "गोरिल्ला" के रूप में पहचानना। एआई के एक महत्वपूर्ण अनुप्रयोग के रूप में, संवाद प्रणालियों को हमारे समाज में बड़े पैमाने पर लागू किया गया है। वे आमतौर पर वास्तविक मानव संवादात्मक डेटा के साथ बनाए जाते हैं; इस प्रकार वे कुछ निष्पक्षता के मुद्दों को विरासत में ले सकते हैं जो वास्तविक दुनिया में आयोजित किए जाते हैं। हालांकि, संवाद प्रणालियों की निष्पक्षता की अच्छी तरह से जांच नहीं की गई है। इस पेपर में, हम संवाद प्रणालियों में निष्पक्षता के मुद्दों के बारे में एक अग्रणी अध्ययन करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं और संवाद मॉडल में निष्पक्षता को समझने के लिए मात्रात्मक उपायों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे अध्ययनों से पता चलता है कि लोकप्रिय संवाद मॉडल विभिन्न लिंगों और जातियों के प्रति महत्वपूर्ण पूर्वाग्रह दिखाते हैं। इसके अलावा, संवाद प्रणालियों में पूर्वाग्रह को कम करने के लिए, हम दो सरल लेकिन प्रभावी debiasing विधियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे तरीके संवाद प्रणालियों में पूर्वाग्रह को काफी कम कर सकते हैं। डेटासेट और कार्यान्वयन संवाद प्रणालियों में निष्पक्षता अनुसंधान को बढ़ावा देने के लिए जारी किए जाते हैं।', 'ga': "Le déanaí tá imní ag méadú faoi chothroime na hIntleachta Saorga (AI) i bhfeidhmchláir fhíorshaolacha ar nós fís ríomhaire agus moltaí. Mar shampla, tá algartaim aitheantais i bhfís ríomhaire éagórach do dhaoine dubha amhail a n-aghaidheanna a bhrath go dona agus iad a aithint go míchuí mar “gorillas”. Mar fheidhmchlár ríthábhachtach amháin de AI, cuireadh córais idirphlé i bhfeidhm go forleathan inár sochaí. De ghnáth tógtar iad le sonraí fíor-chomhrá daonna; mar sin d'fhéadfaidís roinnt saincheisteanna cothroime a choinnítear sa saol fíor a oidhreacht le chéile. Mar sin féin, níl iniúchadh maith déanta ar chothroime na gcóras idirphlé. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ceannródaíoch ar na saincheisteanna cothroime i gcórais idirphlé. Go háirithe, tógaimid tacar sonraí tagarmharcála agus molaimid bearta cainníochtúla chun cothroime i múnlaí idirphlé a thuiscint. Léiríonn ár gcuid staidéir go léiríonn samhlacha comhphlé móréilimh dochar suntasach d'inscne agus do chiníocha éagsúla. Thairis sin, chun an laofacht i gcórais idirphlé a mhaolú, molaimid dhá mhodh díchlaonta simplí ach éifeachtacha. Léiríonn turgnaimh gur féidir lenár modhanna an claonadh i gcórais idirphlé a laghdú go suntasach. Eisítear an tacar sonraí agus an cur chun feidhme chun taighde cothroime a chothú i gcórais idirphlé.", 'hu': 'A közelmúltban egyre növekvő aggodalmak merülnek fel a mesterséges intelligencia (AI) tisztességességével kapcsolatban a valós alkalmazásokban, mint például a számítógépes látás és az ajánlások. Például a számítógépes látásban alkalmazott felismerési algoritmusok tisztességtelenek a feketékkel szemben, például rosszul felismerik az arcukat, és nem megfelelően azonosítják őket "gorilláknak". A mesterséges intelligencia egyik kulcsfontosságú alkalmazásaként a párbeszédrendszereket széles körben alkalmazzák társadalmunkban. Általában valós emberi beszélgetési adatokkal épülnek; így örökölhetnek néhány igazságossági kérdést, amelyek a való világban vannak. A párbeszédrendszerek tisztességességét azonban nem vizsgálták megfelelően. Ebben a tanulmányban úttörő tanulmányt végzünk a párbeszédrendszerek méltányossági kérdéseiről. Különösen referenciaadatokat készítünk, és mennyiségi intézkedéseket javasolunk a párbeszédmodellek tisztességességének megértésére. Tanulmányaink azt mutatják, hogy a népszerű párbeszédmodellek jelentős előítéletet mutatnak a különböző nemekkel és fajokkal szemben. Emellett a párbeszédrendszerek elfogultságának enyhítése érdekében két egyszerű, de hatékony lebontási módszert javasolunk. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy módszereink jelentősen csökkenthetik a párbeszédrendszerek elfogultságát. Az adatkészlet és a megvalósítás a párbeszédrendszerek méltányossági kutatásának előmozdítása érdekében kerül kiadásra.', 'ka': "მხოლოდ არსებობს უფრო მეტი საინტელექტიური ინტელექტიკური ინტელექტიკური (AI) პროგრამებში, როგორც კომპიუტერიური ხედი და მოწყობინებები. მაგალითად, კომპიუტერის ხედვის განაცნობა ალგორიტიმები შავი ადამიანებისთვის, როგორც ცოტა განაცნობა სახელები და არასწორად განაცნობა ისინი როგორც 'gorillas'. როგორც ერთი მნიშვნელოვანი AI-ის გამოყენება, დიალოგური სისტემები ჩვენი საზოგადოებში დიალოგური გამოყენებულია. ისინი საერთოდ ადამიანის კონტაქციონალური მონაცემებით შექმნა. ამიტომ, ისინი შეიძლება მივიღოთ რამდენიმე სამართლოში სამყაროში მსგავსი პრობლემები. მაგრამ, დიალოგის სისტემის სამართლად არ იყო კარგი პასუხი. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პიონერიური სწავლა დიალოგის სისტემებში სამართლად საკუთარი პრობლემების შესახებ. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ კონფიქტურაციის მონაცემების კონტაქტიური მონაცემები დავყენებთ და კონტაქტიური მონაცემები დიალოგის მოდელში გავიგოთ ჩვენი სწავლებები აჩვენებენ, რომ პოლიპური დიალოგის მოდელები მნიშვნელოვანია განსხვავებული გენდერი და პასების შესახებ. დამატებით, დიალოგის სისტემებში წარმოდგენების შემდეგ, ჩვენ მხოლოდ ორი უკეთესი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური დებიზაციის მეტოვები გვაქვს. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მეტები შეუძლია დიალოგური სისტემაში მნიშვნელოვანი გადასრულება. დიალოგის სისტემებში მონაცემები და გამოყენება გახსნა, რომ სწორედ განსხვავება.", 'el': 'Πρόσφατα υπάρχουν αυξανόμενες ανησυχίες σχετικά με τη δικαιοσύνη της τεχνητής νοημοσύνης (τεχνητή νοημοσύνη) σε εφαρμογές πραγματικού κόσμου, όπως η όραση υπολογιστών και οι συστάσεις. Για παράδειγμα, οι αλγόριθμοι αναγνώρισης στην όραση υπολογιστών είναι άδικοι για τους μαύρους, όπως η κακή ανίχνευση των προσώπων τους και η ακατάλληλη αναγνώριση τους ως "γορίλες". Ως μια κρίσιμη εφαρμογή της τεχνητής νοημοσύνης, τα συστήματα διαλόγου έχουν εφαρμοστεί εκτενώς στην κοινωνία μας. Συνήθως κατασκευάζονται με πραγματικά ανθρώπινα δεδομένα συνομιλίας. Έτσι θα μπορούσαν να κληρονομήσουν κάποια ζητήματα δικαιοσύνης που αντιμετωπίζονται στον πραγματικό κόσμο. Ωστόσο, η δικαιοσύνη των συστημάτων διαλόγου δεν έχει διερευνηθεί καλά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια πρωτοποριακή μελέτη σχετικά με τα ζητήματα δικαιοσύνης στα συστήματα διαλόγου. Ειδικότερα, κατασκευάζουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς και προτείνουμε ποσοτικά μέτρα για την κατανόηση της δικαιοσύνης στα μοντέλα διαλόγου. Οι μελέτες μας καταδεικνύουν ότι τα δημοφιλή μοντέλα διαλόγου δείχνουν σημαντική προκατάληψη απέναντι στα διαφορετικά φύλα και φυλές. Εξάλλου, για να μετριάσουμε την προκατάληψη στα συστήματα διαλόγου, προτείνουμε δύο απλές αλλά αποτελεσματικές μεθόδους απομάκρυνσης. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι οι μέθοδοι μας μπορούν να μειώσουν σημαντικά την προκατάληψη στα συστήματα διαλόγου. Το σύνολο δεδομένων και η εφαρμογή δημοσιεύονται για την προώθηση της έρευνας για τη δικαιοσύνη στα συστήματα διαλόγου.', 'it': 'Recentemente ci sono crescenti preoccupazioni circa l\'equità dell\'Intelligenza Artificiale (AI) nelle applicazioni del mondo reale come la visione informatica e le raccomandazioni. Ad esempio, gli algoritmi di riconoscimento nella visione computerizzata sono ingiusti nei confronti dei neri, ad esempio rilevando male i loro volti e identificandoli impropriamente come "gorilla". Come applicazione cruciale dell\'IA, i sistemi di dialogo sono stati ampiamente applicati nella nostra società. Di solito sono costruiti con dati conversazionali umani reali; così potrebbero ereditare alcune questioni di equità che si svolgono nel mondo reale. Tuttavia, l\'equità dei sistemi di dialogo non è stata studiata bene. In questo articolo, eseguiamo uno studio pionieristico sulle questioni di equità nei sistemi di dialogo. In particolare, costruiamo un set di dati di riferimento e proponiamo misure quantitative per comprendere l\'equità nei modelli di dialogo. I nostri studi dimostrano che i modelli di dialogo popolari mostrano pregiudizi significativi nei confronti dei diversi generi e razze. Inoltre, per mitigare il bias nei sistemi di dialogo, proponiamo due metodi di debiasing semplici ma efficaci. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che i nostri metodi possono ridurre significativamente il bias nei sistemi di dialogo. Il set di dati e l\'implementazione sono diffusi per promuovere la ricerca sull\'equità nei sistemi di dialogo.', 'kk': 'Соңғы уақытта компьютердің көрінісі мен рекомендациялары секілді шын әлемдегі қолданбалардағы Мысалық Интеллектер (AI) дұрыстығы туралы көңіл-көңіл көңіл жаса Мысалы, компьютердің көрінісіндегі алгоритмдері қара адамдарға ақиқат емес, мәселені қарай адамдарға, оларды "горилла" деп анықтау жарамсыз. АҚШ бағдарламасы үшін диалог жүйелеріміз қолданылады. Олар кәдімгі адамдардың конвертациялық деректерімен құрылады. Сонымен олар шын әлемдегі ақиқаттық мәселелерді орындай алады. Бірақ диалог жүйелерінің дұрыстығы дұрыс зерттеулі емес. Бұл қағазда, диалог жүйелерінде дұрыс мәселелер туралы пионерлік зерттеуді орындаймыз. Мысалы, біз диалог үлгілерінде дұрыс түсініктерді түсініңіз үшін кеңістік деректер жинағын құрып, санаттық өлшемдерді ұсынамыз. Біздің зерттеулеріміз көпшілікті диалог үлгілері әртүрлі гендерлік және растардың көпшілігін көрсетеді. Қосымша, диалог жүйелерінде қарапайым, біз екі қарапайым, бірақ эффективні дебияциялау әдістерін ұсынамыз. Тәжірибелеріміздің әдістеріміз диалог жүйелерінде тәжірибесін өзгертуге болады. Деректер жиыны және істеу диалог жүйелерінде дұрыс зерттеу үшін шығарылады.', 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu kyla vis didesnių susirūpinimų dėl dirbtinės žvalgybos (AI) teisingumo realaus pasaulio programose, pvz., kompiuterinės vizijos ir rekomendacijos. Pavyzdžiui, kompiuterio regėjimo pripažinimo algoritmai yra nesąžiningi juodaodžiams, pavyzdžiui, blogai aptinkami jų veidai ir netinkamai identifikuojami kaip "gorilai". Kaip vienas iš svarbiausių AI taikymo sričių, mūsų visuomenėje buvo plačiai taikomos dialogo sistemos. They are usually built with real human conversational data;  thus they could inherit some fairness issues which are held in the real world.  However, the fairness of dialogue systems has not been well investigated.  In this paper, we perform a pioneering study about the fairness issues in dialogue systems.  In particular, we construct a benchmark dataset and propose quantitative measures to understand fairness in dialogue models.  Mūsų tyrimai rodo, kad populiarūs dialogo modeliai daro didelę žalą skirtingoms lytims ir rasėms. Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodai gali gerokai sumažinti dialogo sistemų pusiausvyrą. The dataset and the implementation are released to foster fairness research in dialogue systems.', 'mk': 'Recently there are increasing concerns about the fairness of Artificial Intelligence (AI) in real-world applications such as computer vision and recommendations.  На пример, алгоритмите за препознавање во компјутерската визија не се фер кон црнците, како што е лошото детектирање на нивните лица и несоодветно идентификување на нив како „горили“. As one crucial application of AI, dialogue systems have been extensively applied in our society.  Обично се изградени со вистински човечки разговорни податоци; thus they could inherit some fairness issues which are held in the real world.  Сепак, правдата на дијалошките системи не е добро испитана. Во овој весник, спроведуваме пионерска студија за прашањата на правдата во дијалошките системи. In particular, we construct a benchmark dataset and propose quantitative measures to understand fairness in dialogue models.  Our studies demonstrate that popular dialogue models show significant prejudice towards different genders and races.  Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Експериментите покажуваат дека нашите методи можат значително да ја намалат предрасудата во дијалошките системи. Податоците и имплементацијата се објавуваат за поттикнување на истражувањето на правдата во дијалошките системи.', 'ms': "Recently there are increasing concerns about the fairness of Artificial Intelligence (AI) in real-world applications such as computer vision and recommendations.  For example, recognition algorithms in computer vision are unfair to black people such as poorly detecting their faces and inappropriately identifying them as 'gorillas'.  Sebagai satu aplikasi penting AI, sistem dialog telah dilaksanakan secara luas dalam masyarakat kita. Mereka biasanya dibina dengan data percakapan manusia yang sebenar; sehingga mereka boleh mewarisi beberapa masalah keadilan yang ada di dunia nyata. Namun, keadilan sistem dialog belum diselesaikan dengan baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami melakukan penelitian yang memimpin mengenai masalah keadilan dalam sistem dialog. Terutama, kita membina set data benchmark dan melamar tindakan kuantitatif untuk memahami keadilan dalam model dialog. Our studies demonstrate that popular dialogue models show significant prejudice towards different genders and races.  Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Experiments show that our methods can reduce the bias in dialogue systems significantly.  Set data dan pelaksanaan dibebaskan untuk mendukung kajian keadilan dalam sistem dialog.", 'ml': "അടുത്തുതന്നെ കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ദര്\u200dശനവും പരാമര്\u200dശിക്കുന്നതുപോലെയുള്ള ആവശ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ആര്\u200dട്ടിഫിക്കല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dറലിജെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ നീതിയെപ്പറ്റ For example, recognition algorithms in computer vision are unfair to black people such as poorly detecting their faces and inappropriately identifying them as 'gorillas'.  As one crucial application of AI, dialogue systems have been extensively applied in our society.  സാധാരണ മനുഷ്യസംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുമായി അവയെ ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് അവര്\u200dക്ക് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്ത് സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട കുറച്ച് നീതിയുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d അവക എന്നാലും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനങ്ങളുടെ നീതിയില്\u200d നന്നായി അന്വേഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലെ നീതിയുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചൊരു പഠനം നടത്തുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും ഡയലോഗ് മോഡലില്\u200d നീതിപൂര്\u200dവ്വം മനസ നമ്മുടെ പഠനം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംസാരത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേറെയും വംശങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മു ഇതിനു പുറമെ, ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലുള്ള ബിയാസുകള്\u200d മുളപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് എളുപ്പമുള്ള രണ്ട് പ്രോദേശിപ്പ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതികള്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d നീതിപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പഠനത്തിലേക്ക് വിടുന്നു.", 'mt': "Dan l-aħħar hemm tħassib dejjem akbar dwar il-ġustizzja tal-Intelliġenza Artiċipali (AI) fl-applikazzjonijiet tad-dinja reali bħall-viżjoni tal-kompjuter u r-rakkomandazzjonijiet. Pereżempju, l-algoritmi tar-rikonoxximent fil-viżjoni tal-kompjuter mhumiex ġusti għall-iswed bħalma huma l-individwazzjoni ħażina tal-wiċċ tagħhom u l-identifikazzjoni mhux xierqa tagħhom bħala 'gorillas'. Bħala applikazzjoni kruċjali waħda tal-AI, is-sistemi ta’ djalogu ġew applikati b’mod estensiv fis-soċjetà tagħna. Dawn normalment jinbnew b’dejta ta’ konverżjoni umana reali; b’hekk jistgħu jintirtu xi kwistjonijiet ta’ ġustizzja li jinżammu fid-dinja reali. Madankollu, il-ġustizzja tas-sistemi ta’ djalogu ma ġietx investigata sewwa. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu studju pionier dwar il-kwistjonijiet ta’ ġustizzja fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu. B’mod partikolari, nibnu sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza u nipproponu miżuri kwantitattivi biex nifhmu l-ġustizzja fil-mudelli ta’ djalogu. L-istudji tagħna juru li mudelli ta’ djalogu popolari juru preġudizzju sinifikanti lejn sessi u razzi differenti. Barra minn hekk, biex tnaqqas il-preġudizzju fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu, qed nipproponu żewġ metodi sempliċi iżda effettivi ta’ debizzar. L-esperimenti juru li l-metodi tagħna jistgħu jnaqqsu l-preġudizzju fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu b’mod sinifikanti. Is-sett tad-dejta u l-implimentazzjoni huma rilaxxati biex irawmu r-riċerka dwar il-ġustizzja fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu.", 'no': 'Nyleg har det økt bekymringar om rettigheten av kunstiske intelligens (AI) i verkelege program som datavising og anbefalingar. For eksempel, gjenkjenning av algoritmer i datavisinga er ikkje rett for svarte, slik som slik oppdaging av ansiktene og ikkje tilpassande identifisering av dei som «gorilar». Som ein viktig bruk av AI er dialogsystemet utvida i samfunnet vår. Dei er vanlegvis bygde med verkelege menneskelige samtaledata. slik at dei kunne få ein del rettferdige problemer som er held i verden. Det er imidlertid ikkje godt undersøkt i dialogsystemet. I denne papiret utfører vi ein pioneering studie om rettigheten i dialogsystemet. I særskilt konstruerer vi ein dataset for benchmarket og foreslår kvantitative mål for å forstå rettighet i dialogmodeller. Studiene våre viser at populære dialogmodeller viser signifikante forståking mot ulike seks og rasar. I tillegg for å redusere forsvinningane i dialogsystemet, foreslår vi to enkle, men effektive debiaseringsmetodar. Eksperimentar viser at metodane våre kan redusera forsvinningane i dialogsystemet betydelig. Datasettet og implementasjonen blir lagt til å gjere rettferdige forskning i dialogsystemet.', 'ro': 'Recent, există preocupări din ce în ce mai mari cu privire la echitatea inteligenței artificiale (AI) în aplicații din lumea reală, cum ar fi viziunea pe calculator și recomandările. De exemplu, algoritmii de recunoaștere în viziunea computerizată sunt nedrepți față de oamenii de culoare, cum ar fi detectarea slabă a fețelor lor și identificarea inadecvată a acestora ca "gorile". Ca o aplicație crucială a AI, sistemele de dialog au fost aplicate pe scară largă în societatea noastră. Ele sunt de obicei construite cu date conversaționale umane reale; Astfel, ei ar putea moșteni unele probleme de corectitudine care sunt ținute în lumea reală. Cu toate acestea, echitatea sistemelor de dialog nu a fost bine investigată. În această lucrare, realizăm un studiu de pionierat despre problemele de echitate în sistemele de dialog. În special, construim un set de date de referință și propunem măsuri cantitative pentru a înțelege echitatea modelelor de dialog. Studiile noastre demonstrează că modelele populare de dialog prezintă prejudecăți semnificative față de diferite gen și rase. În plus, pentru a atenua părtinirea în sistemele de dialog, propunem două metode simple, dar eficiente de debiasing. Experimentele arată că metodele noastre pot reduce semnificativ părtinirea sistemelor de dialog. Setul de date și implementarea sunt publicate pentru a promova cercetarea corectitudinii în sistemele de dialog.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio pojawiają się coraz większe obawy co do sprawiedliwości sztucznej inteligencji (AI) w rzeczywistych aplikacjach, takich jak wizja komputerowa i rekomendacje. Na przykład algorytmy rozpoznawania w wizji komputerowej są niesprawiedliwe wobec czarnych ludzi, takie jak słabe wykrywanie ich twarzy i niewłaściwe identyfikowanie ich jako "goryle". Jako jedno z kluczowych zastosowań AI systemy dialogu są szeroko stosowane w naszym społeczeństwie. Są one zwykle zbudowane z prawdziwych danych rozmowy ludzkiej; w ten sposób mogą odziedziczyć pewne kwestie sprawiedliwości, które mają miejsce w świecie rzeczywistym. Jednakże sprawiedliwość systemów dialogu nie została dobrze zbadana. W niniejszym artykule przeprowadzamy pionierskie badanie dotyczące kwestii sprawiedliwości w systemach dialogu. W szczególności tworzymy zbiór danych referencyjnych i proponujemy środki ilościowe w celu zrozumienia sprawiedliwości w modelach dialogu. Nasze badania pokazują, że popularne modele dialogu wykazują znaczące uprzedzenia wobec różnych płci i ras. Ponadto, aby złagodzić uprzedzenia w systemach dialogu, proponujemy dwie proste, ale skuteczne metody debiatingu. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasze metody mogą znacznie zmniejszyć uprzedzenia w systemach dialogu. Zestaw danych i ich wdrożenie są publikowane w celu wspierania badań nad sprawiedliwością w systemach dialogu.', 'mn': 'Саяхан компьютерийн үзэл болон зөвлөмж зэрэг дэлхийн хэрэглээнд уран бүтээлч (AI) зөв зан чанарын тухай асуудал нэмэгддэг. Жишээлбэл, компьютерийн харааны алгоритмыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх алгоритмыг хар арьс хүмүүст зөвхөн олж, тэднийг "горилла" гэж нэрлэж бус хүмүүст шударга байдаг. ДОХ-ын нэг чухал хэрэглээ, бидний нийгэмд диалог системүүд маш их хэрэглэгдсэн. Эдгээрийг ихэвчлэн хүн төрөлхтний ярианы мэдээллээр бий болгодог. Тиймээс тэд бодит ертөнцөд дүүрэн асуудлыг авч чадна. Гэвч диалог системийн шударга байдал сайн судалгаагүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид диалог системийн шударга ёстой асуудлын талаар анхны судалгаа хийдэг. Ялангуяа, бид багш өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж, диалог загварын шударга байдлыг ойлгохын тулд хэмжээст үйл ажиллагааг сануулдаг. Бидний судалгаанууд олон нийгмийн диалог загварууд өөр төрлийн гендер, урсгалын тухай чухал нөлөөлөл үзүүлдэг. Үүнээс гадна диалог системийн тухай ойлголтыг багасгахын тулд бид хоёр энгийн гэхдээ эффективны дүгнэлт хийх арга зааж байна. Түүнчлэл бидний арга зам нь диалог системд байдлыг маш чухал багасгаж чадна. Дасгал сангууд болон үйлдвэрлэл нь диалог системийн шударга судалгааг дэмжихийн тулд чөлөөлдөг.', 'so': "Waxa ugu dhawaaqda la xiriira sharciga arimaha farshaxanka (AI) ee codsiga caalamiga ah sida tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan. Tusaale ahaan aqoonsashada algorithm ee muuqashada kombiyuutarku ma xaqdaro dadka madowga ah, tusaale ahaan inay si xun u ogaadaan wejigooda iyo si aan hagaagsan u aqoonsan sida 'gorillas'. Sida lagu codsado AI oo muhiim ah waxaa bulshada lagu codsaday nidaamka dialogka. Inta badan waxaa lagu dhisaa macluumaad ku saabsan dadka oo dhab ah; sidaa darteed waxay dhaxli karaan arimaha caalamka ee runta ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee caddaaladda nidaamka dialogue lama baarayn si wanaagsan. Warqadan waxaynu ku sameynaa waxbarasho ku saabsan arimaha caddaaladda ee nidaamka dialogka. Si gaar ah, waxaynu dhisnaa sawirada bangiga, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qiyaas oo qiyaas ah si aan ugu garto caddaalad samooyinka dialogue. Waxbarashadayada waxay muujiyaan in qaababka dialogue-ka ee maamuus ah ay u muujiyaan khilaaf aad u weyn xagga jinsiyada kala duduwan iyo midab kala duduwan. Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Imtixaanka waxaa muujin kara in qaababkayaga ay hoos u dhigi karaan hababka nidaamka dialogka si muhiim ah. Rugta macluumaadka iyo soo dejinta waxaa loo furan karaa in lagu koriyo waxbarashada caddaaladda ee nidaamka dialogka.", 'sv': 'På senare tid finns det ökande oro över rättvisan i artificiell intelligens (AI) i verkliga tillämpningar som datorseende och rekommendationer. Till exempel är igenkänningsalgoritmer i datorseende orättvisa mot svarta människor, till exempel dåligt upptäcka deras ansikten och felaktigt identifiera dem som "gorillor". Som en avgörande tillämpning av AI har dialogsystem tillämpats i stor utsträckning i vårt samhälle. De är vanligtvis byggda med verkliga mänskliga konversationsdata; på så sätt skulle de kunna ärva vissa rättvisefrågor som hålls i den verkliga världen. Dialogsystemens rättvisa karaktär har dock inte undersökts väl. I denna uppsats genomför vi en banbrytande studie om rättvisefrågor i dialogsystem. Framför allt konstruerar vi ett referensdataset och föreslår kvantitativa åtgärder för att förstå rättvisa i dialogmodeller. Våra studier visar att populära dialogmodeller visar på betydande fördomar mot olika kön och raser. För att mildra biasen i dialogsystem föreslår vi dessutom två enkla men effektiva debiasing metoder. Experiment visar att våra metoder kan minska biasen i dialogsystem avsevärt. Datauppsättningen och implementeringen publiceras för att främja rättviseforskning i dialogsystem.', 'ta': "சமீபத்தில் கணினி பார்வையும் பரிந்துரைகளும் போன்ற கலைஞர் அறிவிப்பு நியாயத்தைப் பற்றி கவலைப்படுகிறது. எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, கணினி பார்வையில் உள்ள அடையாளம் கருப்பு மக்களுக்கு தவறான முகங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் மற்றும் சரியாக 'கோரில்ஸ்' என AI ஒரு முக்கியமான பயன்பாடு என்றால், உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் எங்கள் சமூகத்தில் விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. அவர்கள் வழக்கமாக உண்மையான மனித உரையாடல் தரவுடன் உருவாக்கப்படுகின்றன; அதனால் உண்மையான உலகத்தில் வைத்திருக்கும் சில நிலையான பிரச்சனைகளை அவர்கள் வாரிசாகக் கொள்ள However, the fairness of dialogue systems has not been well investigated.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் உரையாடல் முறைமைகளில் நியாயமான பிரச்சனைகளைப் பற்றி ஒரு முன்னிருப்பு படிப்ப குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தை உருவாக்கி உரையாடல் மாதிரிகளில் நீதியை புரிந்து கொள்ள அளவ எங்கள் ஆய்வுகள் பிரபலமான உரையாடல் மாதிரிகள் வெவ்வேறு இனம் மற்றும் இனத்திற்கும் முக்கியமான பிரச்சனைகளை க அதற்கும் தவிர, உரையாடல் முறைமைகளில் ஒழுங்குப்படையை குறைக்க, நாம் இரண்டு எளிய ஆனால் செயல்படுத்தும் பிழைகாட் பரிசோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது என்றால் உரையாடல் முறைமைகளில் எங்கள் முறைமைகளை முக்கியமாக குறைக்க மு தகவல் அமைப்பு மற்றும் செயல்பாடு உரையாடல் முறைமைகளில் நியாயமான ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு வெளியேற்றப்பட்டது.", 'ur': 'اچھے سے کامپیوٹر کی نظر اور توفیق کے بارے میں مصنوعی اطلاعات (AI) کی عدالت کے بارے میں اضافہ ہوتی ہے۔ مثال، کمپیوٹر کی آنکھوں میں پہچان الگوریتم سیاہ لوگوں کے لئے ناحق ہیں جیسے ان کے چہروں کو برائی سے پہچان رہے ہیں اور ان کو غلط طور پر پہچان رہے ہیں. AI کی ایک ضروری کاربری کے طور پر، ہمارے اجتماعی میں ڈالیٹ سیستموں کی عمدہ طور پر کاربرد کی گئی ہے۔ یہ معمولاً حقیقی انسان کی گفتگو کے ساتھ بنائے جاتے ہیں۔ اس طرح ان کا وارث ہو سکتا ہے جو دنیا میں ٹھیک ہے However, the fairness of dialogue systems has not been well investigated. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک پھیر پڑھنے کی تحقیق کررہے ہیں ڈالیٹ سیسٹم میں عدالت مسائل کے بارے میں۔ مخصوصاً ہم ایک بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ بناتے ہیں اور اندازے کے اندر عدالت کو سمجھنے کے لئے مقدار اندازے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے مطالعے دکھاتے ہیں کہ مشرکین ڈالیلوگ موڈل مختلف جنس اور رشتوں کے بارے میں بہت اہم پیشوائی دکھاتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم دو سادہ لیکن اثبات دینے کے طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے طریقے ڈالگو سیسٹم میں بہت اچھی طریقے کاٹ سکتے ہیں۔ ڈاٹا سٹ اور عملومات ڈیلوسٹ سیسٹم میں انصاف کا تحقیق پیدا کرنے کے لئے منتشر کئے جاتے ہیں.', 'sr': 'Nedavno postoji veća briga o pravednosti umjetne inteligencije (AI) u aplikacijama stvarnog svijeta kao što su kompjuterska vizija i preporuke. Na primjer, algoritmi priznanja u kompjuterskoj viziji nisu nepravedni crncima kao što su loše otkrili lica i neprikladno ih identificirali kao gorile. Kao jedna od ključnih primjena AI-a, sistemi dijaloga su prošireno primjenjeni u našem društvu. Obično su izgrađeni pravim ljudskim razgovornim podacima; tako da bi mogli naslediti neke pravedne probleme koje su održane u stvarnom svijetu. Međutim, poštenost dijalogskih sustava nije dobro istražena. U ovom papiru obavljamo pionersku studiju o pitanjima pravednosti u dijalogskim sistemima. Posebno, mi konstruiramo set podataka o referenciji i predlažemo kvantitativne mjere za razumevanje poštenosti u modelima dijaloga. Naše studije pokazuju da popularni modeli dijaloga pokazuju značajnu predrasudu prema različitim polovima i rasama. Osim toga, da smanjimo predrasude u dijalogskim sistemima, predlažemo dva jednostavna ali efikasna metoda debijacije. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naši metodi mogu značajno smanjiti pristrasnost u dijalogskim sistemima. Podaci i provedba su oslobođeni kako bi podizali istraživanje pravednosti u dijalogskim sistemima.', 'si': 'අන්තිම වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා විශ්වාසික බුද්ධිමත්වය (AI) ගැන ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව උදාහරණයෙන්, පරිගණක දර්ශනයේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් අනුවැරදි කළු මිනිස්සුන්ට, හරියටම, ඔවුන්ගේ මූණ හොයාගන්න හැටියේ නැත AI ගැන වැදගත් එකක් වැදගත් වෙනුවෙන්, සංවාද පද්ධතිය අපේ සමාජයේ විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා. ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ඇත්ත මිනිස්සු වාර්තාවක් තොරතුරු එක්ක නිර්මාණය කරනවා; ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ට ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ සාධාරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, සංවාද පද්ධතියේ සාධාරණය හොඳට පරීක්ෂා කරලා නෑ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියේ සංවාද පද්ධතියේ සාධාරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනව විශේෂයෙන්, අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සූදානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සංවාද මොඩේල් වල සාධාරණය ත අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ජාතික සංවාද මොඩේල්ස් වලින් වෙනස් ජෙන්ඩර් සහ රේස් වලට විශේෂ ප්\u200d ඒ වගේම, සංවාදය පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු කරන්න, අපි සරල දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතියේ සංවාද පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  දත්ත සැටුම් සහ පරීක්ෂණය නිදහස් කරනවා සංවාද පද්ධතියේ සාධානය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාධානය ව', 'vi': 'Gần đây có nhiều mối lo ngại về sự công bằng của trí thông minh nhân tạo (AI) trong các ứng dụng trên thế giới thực như ảo thuật và lời khuyên. Ví dụ, thuật to án nhận biết trong tầm nhìn máy tính là không công bằng với người da đen như việc phát hiện mặt kém và không thích hợp nhận dạng chúng là "khỉ đột". Là một ứng dụng chủ yếu của AI, hệ thống đối thoại đã được áp dụng rộng rãi trong xã hội. Chúng thường được xây dựng với dữ liệu cuộc đối thoại thực sự của con người. họ có thể thừa kế vài vấn đề công bằng được giữ trong thế giới thực. Sự công bằng của hệ thống đối thoại chưa được nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thực hiện một nghiên cứu tiên phong về những vấn đề công bằng trong hệ thống đối thoại. Chúng tôi xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn và đề xuất những biện pháp hàng đầu để hiểu sự công bằng trong mô hình đối thoại. Các nghiên cứu của chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình cuộc đối thoại phổ biến có ảnh hưởng lớn đến giới tính và chủng tộc. Hơn nữa, để giảm khuynh hướng trong hệ thống đối thoại, chúng tôi đề xuất hai phương pháp làm thiếu sáng sủa đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả. Thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể làm giảm tỷ lệ lệch trong hệ thống đối thoại. Bộ dữ liệu và tiến hành được phát tán để thúc đẩy sự công bằng trong hệ thống đối thoại.', 'uz': "Yaqinda, Kompyuterning tashqari va soʻzlari kabi haqida Artific Intelligence (AI) haqida o'ylab keladi. Masalan, kompyuterdagi ko'rinishidagi algoritlarni tasdiqlash muvaffaqiyatli ko'zlarini ko'rsatish mumkin va ularni gorilla sifatida ko'rsatish notoʻgʻri emas. AI uchun muhim dastur sifatida muloqat tizimi jamiyatlarimizda katta qoʻllangan. Ular odatda haqiqiqiy inson talab qiladigan maʼlumot bilan yaratiladi. shunday qilib, улар ер юзида ўртасидаги меросхўрлар меросхўрлари бўлдилар. Lekin, muloqat tizimi haqida o'xshash o'rganilmadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz dialog tizimlarida haqida gaxsiy muammolarni bajaramiz. Ko'rsatilgan, biz benchmark maʼlumotlarini yaratib, dialog modelidagi адолатни тушунтириш ўлчовларни таржима қиламиз. Bizning taʼminlovchilarimizni ko'rsatish mumkin, mashhur dialog modellari turli jinsiyalar va rasmlar bilan juda muhim prejudicial ko'rsatadi. Ko'rsatganda, dialog tizimidagi qismlarni kamaytirish uchun biz ikkita oddiy, lekin ishlab chiqarish usullarini ishlatamiz. Tajribalar tajribalarimiz dialog tizimlarida bizning usullarni juda muhimi kamaytirish mumkin. The dataset and the implementation are released to foster fairness research in dialogue systems.", 'bg': 'Напоследък нарастват опасенията за справедливостта на изкуствения интелект (ИИ) в реални приложения като компютърно зрение и препоръки. Например алгоритмите за разпознаване в компютърното зрение са несправедливи към черните хора, като например слабо откриване на лицата им и неправилно идентифициране им като "горили". Като едно от ключовите приложения на изкуствения интелект, системите за диалог са широко приложени в нашето общество. Те обикновено са изградени с реални човешки разговорни данни; По този начин те биха могли да наследят някои въпроси на справедливостта, които се провеждат в реалния свят. Честността на системите за диалог обаче не е добре проучена. В настоящата статия правим пионерско проучване на проблемите на справедливостта в диалоговите системи. По-специално, ние изграждаме сравнителен набор от данни и предлагаме количествени мерки за разбиране на справедливостта в моделите на диалог. Нашите изследвания показват, че популярните модели на диалог показват значителни предразсъдъци към различните полове и раси. Освен това, за да смекчим пристрастията в диалоговите системи, предлагаме два прости, но ефективни метода за дебиализиране. Експериментите показват, че нашите методи могат значително да намалят пристрастията в диалоговите системи. Наборът от данни и изпълнението се публикуват с цел насърчаване на справедливостта в системите за диалог.', 'nl': "De laatste tijd zijn er steeds meer zorgen over de eerlijkheid van Artificial Intelligence (AI) in real-world toepassingen zoals computervisie en aanbevelingen. Zo zijn herkenningsalgoritmen in computervisie oneerlijk tegenover zwarte mensen, zoals het slecht detecteren van hun gezicht en het onjuist identificeren van hen als 'gorilla's'. Als een cruciale toepassing van AI zijn dialogsystemen uitgebreid toegepast in onze samenleving. Ze zijn meestal gebouwd met echte menselijke gespreksgegevens; Zo zouden zij enkele billijkheidskwesties kunnen erven die in de echte wereld worden behandeld. De billijkheid van de dialoogsystemen is echter niet goed onderzocht. In dit artikel voeren we een baanbrekend onderzoek uit naar de fairness kwesties in dialoogsystemen. We bouwen met name een benchmark dataset op en stellen kwantitatieve maatregelen voor om eerlijkheid in dialogmodellen te begrijpen. Onze studies tonen aan dat populaire dialogmodellen aanzienlijke vooroordelen vertonen ten opzichte van verschillende geslachten en rassen. Om de bias in dialoogsystemen te verminderen, stellen we twee eenvoudige maar effectieve debiasing methoden voor. Experimenten tonen aan dat onze methoden de bias in dialoogsystemen aanzienlijk kunnen verminderen. De dataset en de implementatie worden vrijgegeven om eerlijkheidsonderzoek in dialoogsystemen te bevorderen.", 'da': 'For nylig er der stigende bekymringer om retfærdigheden af kunstig intelligens (AI) i virkelighedens applikationer såsom computervision og anbefalinger. For eksempel er anerkendelsesalgoritmer i computersyn uretfærdige over for sorte mennesker, f.eks. dårligt at registrere deres ansigter og uhensigtsmæssigt identificere dem som "gorillaer". Som en afgørende anvendelse af AI er dialogsystemer blevet udbredt anvendt i vores samfund. De er normalt bygget med reelle menneskelige samtaledata; Derfor kunne de arve nogle retfærdighedsspørgsmål, der findes i den virkelige verden. Dialogsystemernes retfærdighed er imidlertid ikke blevet undersøgt grundigt. I denne artikel udfører vi en banebrydende undersøgelse af fairness spørgsmål i dialogsystemer. Især udarbejder vi et benchmark datasæt og foreslår kvantitative foranstaltninger til at forstå retfærdighed i dialogmodeller. Vores undersøgelser viser, at populære dialogmodeller viser betydelige fordomme over for forskellige køn og racer. For at afbøde biasen i dialogsystemer foreslår vi desuden to enkle, men effektive debiasing metoder. Eksperimenter viser, at vores metoder kan reducere bias i dialogsystemer betydeligt. Datasættet og implementeringen frigives for at fremme fairness research i dialogsystemer.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit gibt es zunehmend Bedenken hinsichtlich der Fairness von Künstlicher Intelligenz (KI) in realen Anwendungen wie Computer Vision und Empfehlungen. Beispielsweise sind Erkennungsalgorithmen im Computer Vision unfair gegenüber Schwarzen, da sie ihre Gesichter schlecht erkennen und sie unangemessen als "Gorillas" identifizieren. Als eine entscheidende Anwendung von KI wurden Dialogsysteme in unserer Gesellschaft umfassend eingesetzt. Sie sind in der Regel mit echten menschlichen Gesprächsdaten gebaut; So könnten sie einige Fairness-Themen erben, die in der realen Welt gehalten werden. Die Fairness der Dialogsysteme wurde jedoch nicht gut untersucht. In diesem Beitrag führen wir eine wegweisende Studie zu Fairness-Themen in Dialogsystemen durch. Insbesondere erstellen wir einen Benchmark-Datensatz und schlagen quantitative Maßnahmen vor, um Fairness in Dialogmodellen zu verstehen. Unsere Studien zeigen, dass populäre Dialogmodelle erhebliche Vorurteile gegenüber verschiedenen Geschlechtern und Rassen zeigen. Um die Voreingenommenheit in Dialogsystemen abzumildern, schlagen wir zwei einfache, aber effektive Entgegenhaltungsmethoden vor. Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Methoden die Verzerrung in Dialogsystemen deutlich reduzieren können. Der Datensatz und die Implementierung werden veröffentlicht, um Fairness-Forschung in Dialogsystemen zu fördern.', 'id': "Baru-baru ini ada kekhawatiran semakin meningkat tentang keadilan Intelijen Artificial (AI) dalam aplikasi dunia nyata seperti penglihatan komputer dan rekomendasi. Contohnya, algoritma pengenalan dalam penglihatan komputer tidak adil terhadap orang kulit hitam seperti mendeteksi wajah mereka buruk dan tidak sesuai mengidentifikasi mereka sebagai 'gorila'. Sebagai satu aplikasi penting AI, sistem dialog telah diterapkan secara ekstensif di masyarakat kita. They are usually built with real human conversational data;  sehingga mereka bisa mewarisi beberapa masalah keadilan yang ada di dunia nyata. Namun, keadilan sistem dialog belum diselidiki dengan baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami melakukan penelitian tentang masalah keadilan dalam sistem dialog. Terutama, kita membangun set data benchmark dan mengusulkan tindakan kuantitatif untuk memahami keadilan dalam model dialog. Studi kami menunjukkan bahwa model dialog populer menunjukkan prasangka yang signifikan terhadap jenis dan ras yang berbeda. Selain itu, untuk mengurangi bias dalam sistem dialog, kami mengusulkan dua metode pemindahan sederhana tapi efektif. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita dapat mengurangi bias dalam sistem dialog secara signifikan. Set data dan implementasi dibebaskan untuk mendukung penelitian keadilan dalam sistem dialog.", 'ko': '최근 컴퓨터 비주얼과 추천 등 실제 응용에서 인공지능(AI)의 형평성에 대한 우려가 커지고 있다.예를 들어 컴퓨터 시각에서의 식별 알고리즘은 흑인에게 불공평하다. 예를 들어 그들의 얼굴을 잘 검출하지 못하고 고릴라로 부적절하게 식별한다.인공지능의 중요한 응용으로서 대화 시스템은 우리 사회에서 광범위하게 응용되었다.그것들은 보통 진실한 인간 대화 데이터로 구축된다.그래서 그들은 현실 세계의 공평한 문제들을 계승할 수 있다.그러나 대화 제도의 공평성은 제대로 조사되지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 대화 시스템에서의 공평 문제에 대해 창의적인 연구를 진행했다.특히 우리는 기준 데이터 집합을 구축하고 대화 모델의 공평성을 이해하는 양적 조치를 제시했다.우리의 연구에 따르면 유행하는 대화 모델은 서로 다른 성별과 종족에 대한 심각한 편견을 나타낸다.또 대화 시스템의 편견을 줄이기 위해 간단하지만 효과적인 차용 방법 두 가지를 제시했다.실험에 의하면 우리의 방법은 대화 시스템의 편견을 현저하게 줄일 수 있다.이 데이터 집합을 발표하고 그 실현은 대화 시스템의 공평성 연구를 촉진하기 위한 것이다.', 'tr': "Soňky wagtlar, kompýuter görnüşi we maslahatlar ýaly ukyplaryň, Iň umyt inteligensiýanyň adalatylygy (AI) barada endirmekler bar. Mesela, kompýuter görnüşinde tanyş algoritmalary gara adamlara, ýüzlerini ýaman tanyşdyryp bilmeýän we olary 'gorillar' diýip tanyşdyryp bilmeýän ýaly adalatsyz. AI'nin wajyp bir uygulamasy bolanda, jemgymyzda dialog sistemalary bütin ýagdaýda uygulandy. Olar adatça hakyky adamlaryň görüşme maglumatlary bilen guruldylar. şonuň üçin gerçek dünýäde ýerleşýän adalat meselelerini miras alabilirler. Ýöne, dialoglaryň adalatlygyny gowy barlamady. Bu kagyzda biz diýoly sistemalarda adalat meseleler hakynda pioneerli bir öwrenme edýäris. Özellikle, biz bir benchmark veri seti in şa edip, düzgün derecede düzgün olduğunu anlamak için kvantitatlı ölçüleri teklif ediyoruz. Biziň araştyrymyz meýdany dijalog nusgalarynyň farklı jentiller we taýýarlar bilen örän wajyp duýýandygyny görkeýär. Munuň ýagdaýda, dijalog sistemlerinde biasany azaltmak üçin iki basit ýöne täsirli debiýat yöntemini teklip edýäris. Denminatlar biziň metodlarymyz dijalog sistemalarynda nähili gabdalyklary azaltyp biljekdigini görkezýär. Veri setir we implementasiýa düzgün barlamak üçin dijalog sistemlerinde çykylýar", 'hr': 'Nedavno se povećava zabrinutost o pravednosti umjetne inteligencije (AI) u stvarnom svijetu primjene poput kompjuterske vizije i preporuke. Na primjer, algoritmi priznanja u računalnom viziju nepravedno su crncima poput loše otkrivanja lica i neprikladno ih identificiranja kao gorile. Kao jedna od ključnih primjena AI-a, dijalogski sustavi su u našem društvu široko primjenjeni. Obično su izgrađeni stvarnim ljudskim razgovornim podacima; tako da bi mogli naslijediti neke pravedne probleme koje su održane u stvarnom svijetu. Međutim, pravednost dijalogskih sustava nije dobro istražena. U ovom papiru obavljamo pionersku studiju o pitanjima pravednosti u dijalogskim sustavima. Posebno, izgradimo set podataka o kriteriji i predlažemo kvantitativne mjere za razumijevanje pravednosti u modelima dijaloga. Naše studije pokazuju da popularni dijalogski modeli pokazuju značajnu predrasudu prema različitim polovima i rasama. Osim toga, kako bismo smanjili predrasude u dijalogskim sustavima, predlažemo dva jednostavna ali učinkovita metoda debijacije. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naše metode značajno smanjuju pristrasnost u dijalogskim sustavima. Podaci i provedba oslobađaju se kako bi se unapređeno istraživanje pravednosti u dijalogskim sustavima.', 'sq': "Kohët e fundit ka shqetësime në rritje rreth drejtësisë së Inteligjencës Artistike (AI) në aplikimet e botës reale të tilla si vizioni kompjuterik dhe rekomandimet. Për shembull, algoritmet e njohjes në pamjen kompjuterike janë të padrejta ndaj njerëzve të zezë të tillë si zbulimi i keq i fytyrave të tyre dhe identifikimi i papërshtatshëm si 'gorila'. Si një aplikim vendimtar i AI, sistemet e dialogut janë aplikuar në mënyrë të gjerë në shoqërinë tonë. Ato zakonisht janë ndërtuar me të dhëna reale të bisedimit njerëzor; kështu ata mund të trashëgojnë disa çështje të drejtësisë që mbahen në botën reale. However, the fairness of dialogue systems has not been well investigated.  Në këtë letër, ne kryejmë një studim pionier rreth çështjeve të drejtësisë në sistemet e dialogut. In particular, we construct a benchmark dataset and propose quantitative measures to understand fairness in dialogue models.  Studimet tona tregojnë se modelet e dialogut popullor tregojnë paragjykim të rëndësishëm ndaj gjinorëve dhe racave të ndryshme. Përveç kësaj, për të lehtësuar paragjykimin në sistemet e dialogut, ne propozojmë dy metoda të thjeshta por efektive debizimi. Experiments show that our methods can reduce the bias in dialogue systems significantly.  The dataset and the implementation are released to foster fairness research in dialogue systems.", 'am': 'በቅርቢቱ ዘመን የዐርቢ መረጃ (AI) አካባቢ (አ) አካባቢ ጉዳይ፣ ኮምፒዩተር ራእይ እና ሽያቄዎች በሚመስል አካባቢዎች ላይ የሚጨምሩ ጉዳይ ይኖራሉ፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ የኮምፒዩተር ራእይ ማውቀት አሌጎርቲም፣ ፊቶቻቸውን ክፋት እንደምታወቁ ጥቁር ሰዎች ላይ ክፋት አይደሉም፡፡  የAI አካባቢ ፕሮግራም እንደሚሆን፣ የጦማሪያን ስርዓት በአካባችን ውስጥ በዘላለም ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ ብዙ ጊዜ የሰው ማነጋገር ዳታዎች ይሠራሉ፡፡ thus they could inherit some fairness issues which are held in the real world.  However, the fairness of dialogue systems has not been well investigated.  በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ ላይ የውሃት ጉዳይ ማነሳትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የbenchmark ዳርሰት መሠረት እና በአካባቢው ዓይነቶች ውስጥ ትክክለኛነትን ለማስተዋል የሚቆጠሩ መስኮቶችን እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ ትምህርታችን የባሕላዊ ማኅበረሰብ ምሳሌዎች ለልዩ ሥርዓቶች እና ዘሮች የተለየ ውጤት እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም የጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀላቀል፣ ሁለት ቀላል ነገር ግን የሚያስተባብል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች የባሕላዊ ጥያቄን በጥያቄ ስርዓት ውስጥ የሚጎድለውን ማሳየቱ ነው፡፡ የዳታ ሰርቨርስቲ እና ማስረጃው በጥያቄ ስርዓት ውስጥ የፍቅር ምርመራ ለማድረግ ተፈቅዶአል፡፡', 'fa': 'اخیراً نگرانی بیشتر در مورد عدالت اطلاعات مصنوعی (AI) در کاربردهای دنیای واقعی مانند دید و پیشنهاد کامپیوتر وجود دارد. برای مثال، الگوریتم شناسایی در دید کامپیوتر برای سیاه\u200cپوست ناعادلانه\u200cاند، مانند بد شناسایی چهره\u200cهایشان و نامناسب شناسایی آنها به عنوان گوریل\u200cها. به عنوان یک کاربرد مهم از AI، سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو در جامعه\u200cی ما به وسیله عملکرد شده است. معمولا با داده های صحبت انسان واقعی ساخته می شوند. پس می\u200cتوانند در دنیا واقعی مسائل عدالت را وارث کنند. با این حال، عدالت سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو خوب تحقیق نشده است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مطالعه پیشینیانی در مورد مسائل عدالت در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو انجام می\u200cدهیم. مخصوصا، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقدار ساخته می\u200cکنیم و پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم مقدار مقداری برای فهمیدن عدالت در مدل\u200cهای گفتگو. مطالعه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل\u200cهای گفتگوی محبوب به جنس\u200cها و نژاد\u200cهای مختلف پیش\u200cبینی بزرگی را نشان می\u200cدهند. علاوه بر این، برای کاهش کردن ضعیفی در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو، دو روش ساده ولی موثر تغییر دادن را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200cهای ما می\u200cتوانند طبیعیت\u200cها را در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو به طور معنی کاهش دهند. مجموعه داده\u200cها و عملکرد برای تحقیقات عدالت در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو آزاد می\u200cشوند.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս անհանգստանում են արվեստական ինտելեկտության (ԱԲ) արդարության մասին իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերում, ինչպիսիք են համակարգչային տեսողությունը և խորհուրդները: Օրինակ, համակարգչային տեսողության ճանաչման ալգորիթմները սևամորթների հանդեպ անարդար են, ինչպիսիք են, օրինակ, վատ հայտնաբերելով իրենց դեմքերը և անհարմար հայտնաբերելով դրանք որպես "գորիլաներ": As one crucial application of AI, dialogue systems have been extensively applied in our society.  Նրանք սովորաբար կառուցվում են իրական մարդկային հաղորդակցման տվյալներով, որպեսզի նրանք կարող են ժառանգել իրական աշխարհում գտնվող արդարության խնդիրները: Այնուամենայնիվ, երկխոսային համակարգերի արդարությունը լավ չի ուսումնասիրել: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք սկզբնական ուսումնասիրություն ենք կատարում խմբախոսքի համակարգերի արդարության խնդիրների մասին: Մենք հատկապես կառուցում ենք համեմատային տվյալների համակարգ և առաջարկում ենք քանակական միջոցներ, որպեսզի հասկանանք արդարությունը երկխոսության մոդելների մեջ: Our studies demonstrate that popular dialogue models show significant prejudice towards different genders and races.  Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Experiments show that our methods can reduce the bias in dialogue systems significantly.  The dataset and the implementation are released to foster fairness research in dialogue systems.', 'sw': "Hivi karibuni kuna wasiwasi unaoendelea kuhusu haki ya uchunguzi wa Kisanaa (AI) katika matumizi ya kimataifa kama vile maono ya kompyuta na mapendekezo. Kwa mfano, takwimu za kutambua katika maono ya kompyuta hazina haki kwa watu weusi kama vile wanavyoziona nyuso zao mbaya na kwa kutoa vibaya kuwatambua kama 'gorillas'. Kama matumizi muhimu ya UKIMWI, mifumo ya mazungumzo imetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa katika jamii yetu. Mara nyingi hujengwa na takwimu za mazungumzo halisi za binadamu; kwa hiyo watarithi baadhi ya masuala ya haki yanayoendeshwa katika dunia halisi. Hata hivyo, haki ya mfumo wa mazungumzo haujachunguzwa vizuri. Katika karatasi hii, tunafanya utafiti wa upasuaji kuhusu masuala ya haki katika mfumo wa mazungumzo. Kwa hakika, tunajenga seti ya taarifa za bendera na tunapendekeza hatua za kiasi ili kuelewa uadilifu katika mifano ya mazungumzo. Tafiti zetu zinaonyesha kuwa mifano maarufu ya mazungumzo yanaonyesha upendeleo mkubwa dhidi ya jinsia tofauti na rangi. Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zinaweza kupunguza upendeleo katika mfumo wa mazungumzo makubwa. Taasisi ya taarifa na utekelezaji huo imetolewa ili kukuza utafiti wa haki katika mfumo wa mazungumzo.", 'az': "Yaxınlarda bilgisayar görünüşü və təbliğlər kimi, həqiqət dünya uyğulamalarında Yaxşı İngilt (AI) ədaləti haqqında daha çox endirilənlər var. Misal olaraq, bilgisayar görünüşündəki tanıma algoritmi qaranlıqlarına bənzər üzlərini zəif tanıyır və onları 'gorillar' kimi uyğun-uyğun tanıyır. AI'nin çox möhkəm bir uyğulaması kimi, cəmiyyətimizdə müxtəlif danışma sistemləri istifadə edilmişdir. Onlar genellikle insan danışma məlumatları ilə inşa edilirlər. Beləliklə, həqiqət dünyada çəkilən ədalətli məsələlər varis edə bilərlər. Lakin, diyal sistemlərin ədaləti gözəl təşkil edilmədi. Bu kağızda, Dialog sistemlərində ədalətli məsələlər haqqında pioneering təhsil edirik. Özellikle, biz bir benchmark veri qurmağı in şa edirik və düzgünlüyü düzgünlükdə anlamaq üçün kvantitatlı ölçüləri təklif edirik. Bizim araşdırmalarımız məşhur dijalog modellərinin müxtəlif cinlərə və yarışlara qarşı möhkəm dəyişiklik göstərir. Daha çox, Dialog sistemlərində küfrü azaltmaq üçün iki basit, amma etkili debiasing metodlarını təklif edirik. Tərəbələr bizim metodlarımız dijalog sistemlərində təsirlərini çox azaltır. Verici qurğuları və tədbirləri dialog sistemlərində ədalətli təhsil etmək üçün yayınlışdırılır.", 'af': "Onlangs is daar vergroei bekommerdes oor die regverdigheid van kunstige intelligensie (AI) in regte wêreld toepassings soos rekenaar sien en aanbevelings. Byvoorbeeld, herkening algoritme in rekenaar sien is ongeregtig aan swart mense soos slegte beskrywing van hul gesigte en onregverdig identifiseer hulle as 'gorillas'. As een kruistelike toepassing van AI, is dialoog stelsels uitbreidig in ons samelewing aangepas. Hulle word gewoonlik gebou met regte menslike konversasie data; sodat hulle 'n paar regverdige probleem kan erfdeel wat in die werklike wêreld gehou word. Maar die regverdigheid van dialoog stelsels is nie goed ondersoek nie. In hierdie papier, ons uitvoer 'n pioneering studie oor die regverdigheid probleme in dialoog stelsels. Spesifieke, ons bou 'n benchmark datastel en voorstel kvantitatiewe maat om regverdigheid te verstaan in dialoog modele. Ons studie wys dat populêre dialoog modele betekende voorspoediging tot verskillende genere en rase vertoon. Ons voorstel twee eenvoudige maar effektiewe debiasing metodes om die bias in dialoog stelsels te verminder. Eksperimente vertoon dat ons metodes die bias in dialoog stelsels betekenlik kan verminder. Die datastel en die implementasie word uitgesluit om regverdige ondersoek in dialoog stelsels te versterk.", 'bs': 'Nedavno se povećava zabrinutost o pravednosti umjetne inteligencije (AI) u aplikacijama na stvarnom svijetu kao što su kompjuterska vizija i preporuke. Na primjer, algoritmi priznanja u kompjuterskoj viziji nisu nepravedni crncima poput loše otkrivanja lica i neprikladno ih identificiranja kao gorile. Kao jedna od ključnih primjena AI-a, sistemi dijaloga su se široko primjenjivali u našem društvu. Obično su izgrađeni stvarnim ljudskim razgovornim podacima; pa bi mogli naslijediti neke pravedne probleme koje su održane u stvarnom svijetu. Međutim, pravednost dijalogskih sustava nije dobro istražena. U ovom papiru, obavljamo pionersku studiju o pitanjima pravednosti u dijalogskim sistemima. Posebno, izgradimo set podataka o referenciji i predlažemo kvantitativne mjere za razumijevanje pravednosti u modelima dijaloga. Naše studije pokazuju da popularni modeli dijaloga pokazuju značajnu predrasudu prema različitim polovima i rasama. Osim toga, da bi smanjili predrasude u dijalogskim sistemima, predlažemo dva jednostavna ali efikasna metoda debijacije. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naši metodi mogu značajno smanjiti pristrasnost u dijalogskim sistemima. Podaci i provedba se oslobađaju kako bi se unapređeno istraživanje pravednosti u dijalogskim sistemima.', 'bn': "সম্প্রতি কম্পিউটারের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং পরামর্শ, যেমন কম্পিউটারের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং প্রাপ্তিশীল অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের ন্যায়পরায়ণতা For example, recognition algorithms in computer vision are unfair to black people such as poorly detecting their faces and inappropriately identifying them as 'gorillas'.  AI এর একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন হিসেবে আমাদের সমাজে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম ব্যাপক প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। তাদের সাধারণত সত্যিকার মানুষের কথোপকথন তথ্য দিয়ে তৈরি করা হয়; তাই তারা বাস্তব পৃথিবীতে কিছু ন্যায় বিষয়ের উত্তরাধিকার করতে পারে। তবে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের ন্যায়বিচার ব্যবস্থা ভালো তদন্ত করা হয় নি। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের ন্যায় বিষয়গুলোর ব্যাপারে একটি পিয়েনিয়ারিং গবেষণা করি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি বেঞ্চমার্ক ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি এবং ডায়ালগ মডেলে ন্যায়বিচার বুঝতে পরিমাণ পদক্ষেপ প প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের গবেষণা প্রমাণ করে যে জনপ্রিয় আলোচনার মডেল বিভিন্ন লিঙ্গ এবং প্রজাতন্ত্রের প্রতি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয় প এছাড়াও, ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে বিভ্রান্ত ব্যবস্থা কমানোর জন্য আমরা দুটি সাধারণ কিন্তু কার্যকর উপায় প্রস্তাব করি। পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মাধ্যমে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের বিভিন্ন ব্যবস্থা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কমিয়ে দ ডাটাসেট এবং বাস্তবতা মুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে ন্যায়বিচার গবেষণার জন্য।", 'ca': 'Recentment hi ha cada vegada més preocupació per la justesa de la Intelligencia Artificial (AI) en aplicacions del món real, com la visió informàtica i les recomendacions. Per exemple, els algoritmes de reconeixement de la visió informàtica són injustos amb els negres, com la mala detecció de les seves cares i l\'inadequada identificació com a "gorilles". As one crucial application of AI, dialogue systems have been extensively applied in our society.  Normalment es construeixen amb dades de conversació humana reals; així que podrien heretar alguns problemes d\'equitat que es troben al món real. Però la justesa dels sistemes de diàleg no s\'ha investigat bé. En aquest article, fem un estudi pionerant sobre els problemes d\'equitat dels sistemes de diàleg. En particular, construïm un conjunt de dades de referència i proposem mesures quantitatives per entendre la justesa en els models de diàleg. Els nostres estudis demostren que els models de diàleg popular mostren prejudicis significatius cap a diferents gèneres i races. Besides, to mitigate the bias in dialogue systems, we propose two simple but effective debiasing methods.  Els experiments demostren que els nostres mètodes poden reduir significativament el bias dels sistemes de diàleg. El conjunt de dades i la implementació són publicats per promoure la recerca d\'equitat en els sistemes de diàleg.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina on lisääntynyt huoli tekoälyn oikeudenmukaisuudesta reaalimaailman sovelluksissa, kuten tietokonenäkö ja suositukset. Esimerkiksi tietokonenäön tunnistusalgoritmit ovat epäreiluja mustia kohtaan, kuten heidän kasvojensa tunnistaminen huonosti ja niiden tunnistaminen "gorilloiksi" sopimattomasti. Yhtenä tekoälyn keskeisenä sovelluksena vuoropuhelujärjestelmiä on sovellettu laajasti yhteiskunnassamme. Ne on yleensä rakennettu todellisen ihmisen keskusteludatan avulla; Näin ne voisivat periä joitakin oikeudenmukaisuuskysymyksiä, joita pidetään todellisessa maailmassa. Vuoropuhelujärjestelmien oikeudenmukaisuutta ei kuitenkaan ole tutkittu kunnolla. Tässä artikkelissa teemme uraauurtavan tutkimuksen oikeudenmukaisuuskysymyksistä dialogijärjestelmissä. Erityisesti rakennamme vertailuaineiston ja ehdotamme määrällisiä toimenpiteitä oikeudenmukaisuuden ymmärtämiseksi vuoropuhelumalleissa. Tutkimuksemme osoittavat, että suositut dialogimallit osoittavat merkittäviä ennakkoluuloja eri sukupuoliin ja rotuihin nähden. Lisäksi dialogijärjestelmien ennakkoluulojen lieventämiseksi ehdotamme kahta yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta debiasointimenetelmää. Kokeet osoittavat, että menetelmämme voivat vähentää dialogijärjestelmien vääristymiä merkittävästi. Dataaineisto ja toteutus julkaistaan oikeudenmukaisuustutkimuksen edistämiseksi dialogijärjestelmissä.', 'cs': 'V poslední době rostou obavy o spravedlivost umělé inteligence (AI) v reálných aplikacích, jako je počítačové vidění a doporučení. Například algoritmy rozpoznávání v počítačovém vidění jsou nespravedlivé vůči černým lidem, například špatně detekují jejich tváře a nevhodně je identifikují jako "gorily". Jako jedna z klíčových aplikací umělé inteligence jsou dialogové systémy v naší společnosti široce uplatňovány. Obvykle jsou postaveny na základě skutečných lidských konverzačních dat; takže by mohli zdědit některé problémy spravedlnosti, které se konají v reálném světě. Spravedlivost systémů dialogu však nebyla dobře zkoumána. V tomto článku provádíme průkopnickou studii o problematice spravedlnosti v dialogových systémech. Konkrétně sestavujeme referenční datový soubor a navrhujeme kvantitativní opatření pro pochopení spravedlivosti v dialogových modelech. Naše studie ukazují, že populární modely dialogu vykazují významné předsudky vůči různým pohlavím a rasám. Kromě toho, abychom zmírnili zaujatost v dialogových systémech, navrhujeme dvě jednoduché, ale efektivní metody debiazování. Experimenty ukazují, že naše metody dokážou výrazně snížit zaujatost v dialogových systémech. Soubor dat a jejich implementace jsou zveřejněny za účelem podpory výzkumu spravedlivosti v dialogových systémech.', 'et': 'Viimasel ajal on kasvanud mure tehisintellekti õigluse pärast reaalsetes rakendustes, nagu arvutinägemine ja soovitused. Näiteks arvutinägemise algoritmid on ebaõiglased mustanahaliste suhtes, näiteks nende näo halvasti tuvastamine ja nende ebaõige identifitseerimine gorilladena. Dialoogisüsteeme on meie ühiskonnas laialdaselt rakendatud kui tehisintellekti ühte olulist rakendust. Need on tavaliselt ehitatud reaalsete inimeste vestlusandmetega; seega võiksid nad pärida mõned õigluse küsimused, mis on tegelikus maailmas. Dialoogisüsteemide õiglust ei ole siiski hästi uuritud. Käesolevas dokumendis teeme teedrajava uuringu õigluse küsimustest dialoogisüsteemides. Eelkõige koostame võrdlusandmekogumi ja pakume välja kvantitatiivseid meetmeid, et mõista õiglust dialoogimudelites. Meie uuringud näitavad, et populaarsed dialoogimudelid näitavad märkimisväärseid eelarvamusi erinevate soode ja rasside suhtes. Pealegi pakume dialoogisüsteemide erapooletuse leevendamiseks välja kaks lihtsat, kuid tõhusat debialiseerimismeetodit. Katsed näitavad, et meie meetodid võivad dialoogisüsteemide erapooletust märkimisväärselt vähendada. Andmekogum ja rakendamine avaldatakse, et edendada dialoogisüsteemide õigluse uurimist.', 'jv': 'plug-in-action Sampeyan, aksi Algorithm kanggo langgar komputer iki dadi kanggo ngilanggar dhuwur, kaya nguasai kang sampeyan karo hal-sampeyan ingkang dipepot kanggo ngilanggar sapa "gorila". Tanggang kelas aplikasi sing klêrung kanggo AI, sistem dialog kang dipunangé kapan ning acara sampeyan awak. Dheweke kabèh justificati karo data sing dikarepaké uwong; dadi, kita piye cara-piye cara iki erah iso ngejaraké perusahaan kelas opo-perusahaan sing mengko ning dunyo sing nyimpen. Nanging, sistem kutnaning pancene ora sakjane ujian. Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngertuk bantên kanggo masalah kanggo nganggo sistem dialog. Genjer-Genjer Awakdhéwé éntuk éntukno ngono kuwi model sing populer dialog kuwi nggawe perbudhakan langkung werak-wong sing kalah basa. Yo wis rampung, nggawe nyimpen biasane kanggo sistem dialog, kita supoyo biasane iki sampeyan karo apik lan jewisan biasane. Isopo sing dipontrolan nganggep kuwi tindahan dhéwé iso nggawe biasane kanggo sistem dialog sing dikarepaké. Daftar setung karo akeh gunane bakal ngewasi kanggo nguasakno perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sistem dialog.', 'ha': 'A yanzu masu ƙara da wasiyya ga masu kyautar Intel (AI) a cikin shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin duniya da gaskiya kamar misãlin gani da shawarar kwamfyuta. Misali, ganin algorityim cikin gani na kwamfyuta, bã za su zãlunce su ba daga wasu mutane mãsu haske kamar sunã gane fuskõkinsu sharri ne kuma bã ya kasancẽwa na gane su kamar "gorillas". Kama da shirin AI na muhimu, an sami\'a zauren zauren akwatin bayani mai yawa a cikin jamiyarmu. An samar da su a bayan mazaɓa masu gaskiya; Kuma sun gãdar da ita a bãyan wannan. Haƙĩƙa, ba a goyi bayani ga masu daidaita zauren akwatin bayani ba. Daga wannan takardan, Munã tafiyar wani littãfi na ƙara da ke cikin masu gaskiya a cikin masu cikin zauren akwatin bayani. Haƙĩƙa, muna samun wani danne na bangon ayuka kuma munã buɗe taki masu ƙayyade dõmin ka fahimta ãdalci a cikin misalin zauren zauren akwatin bayani. Our studies demonstrate that popular dialogue models show significant prejudice towards different genders and races.  Babu, don ka cire sauri cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayani, muna buƙata hanyoyin sauri biyu masu sauƙi, kuma da amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu yin ɓarna. Kayan jarrabai sun nuna cewa hanyoyinmu za su ƙara sauri cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayani mai girma. An sakar da shirin bayani da kuma an zartar da su zuwa a ƙara research masu ãdalci cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayani.', 'he': 'לאחרונה יש דאגות גדולות לגבי הוגנות המודיעין האמנתי (AI) בתוכניות בעולם האמיתי כמו חזון מחשב ומלצות. לדוגמא, אלגוריתמים זיהוי בחזון המחשב אינם הוגנים לאנשים שחורים כמו לזהות גרוע את פניהם ולא מזהה אותם כמו "גורילות". בתור שימוש קריטי אחד של AI, מערכות דיאלוג הופעו באופן רחב בחברה שלנו. הם בדרך כלל נבנים עם מידע שיחה אנושי אמיתי; כך הם יכולים לרשת כמה בעיות הוגנות שמחזיקות בעולם האמיתי. עם זאת, הוגנות מערכות דיאלוג לא נחקרה היטב. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מבצעים מחקר חדש על בעיות הוגנות במערכות דיאלוג. במיוחד, אנו בונים קבוצת מידע רמז ומציעים אמצעים כמוניים כדי להבין הוגנות בדוגמנים לדיולוגים. המחקרים שלנו מראים שדוגמני דיאלוג פופולריים מראים מקדמות משמעותיות כלפי מינים ומירוצים שונים. חוץ מזה, כדי להקל את ההתמחות במערכות דיאלוג, אנו מציעים שתי שיטות פשוטות, אבל יעילות. ניסויים מראים שהשיטות שלנו יכולות להפחית את ההתמחות במערכות דיאלוג באופן משמעותי. The dataset and the implementation are released to foster fairness research in dialogue systems.', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času je vse večja zaskrbljenost glede pravičnosti umetne inteligence (AI) v realnih aplikacijah, kot so računalniški vid in priporočila. Na primer, algoritmi za prepoznavanje v računalniškem vidu so nepošteni do črncev, kot so slabo zaznavanje njihovih obrazov in neustrezno prepoznavanje kot "gorile". Sistemi dialoga so bili v naši družbi obsežno uporabljeni kot ena ključnih aplikacij umetne inteligence. Običajno so zgrajeni z resničnimi človeškimi pogovornimi podatki; tako bi lahko podedovali nekatera vprašanja pravičnosti, ki se odvijajo v realnem svetu. Vendar pa pravičnost sistemov dialoga ni bila dobro raziskana. V prispevku izvajamo pionirsko študijo o vprašanjih pravičnosti v dialognih sistemih. Zlasti oblikujemo referenčni nabor podatkov in predlagamo kvantitativne ukrepe za razumevanje pravičnosti v modelih dialoga. Naše študije kažejo, da popularni modeli dialoga kažejo pomembne predsodke do različnih spolov in ras. Poleg tega, da bi ublažili pristranskost v sistemih dialoga, predlagamo dve preprosti, a učinkoviti metodi debiasiranja. Eksperimenti kažejo, da lahko naše metode bistveno zmanjšajo pristranskost v sistemih dialoga. Zbirka podatkov in izvedba se objavljata za spodbujanje raziskav pravičnosti v sistemih dialoga.', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བར་ན། འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་། རྩིས་འཁོར་ལྟ་ཀློག་དང་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏོང་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐྱེས་རྟགས་དེ་ནག AI་ཡི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་འཛམ་གླིང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བསྒྲགས་བྱས་ཡོད། འདི་དག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མིའི་སློབ་ཆེན་ལྡན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཟོ་ཚར་བ་ཡིན་པ་རེད། དེར་བརྟེན། འཛམ་གླིང་ངོ་མ་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཉེན་དོན་ཅིག་བདེ་ལེན་བོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇོག་ཐུབ། ཡིན་ནའང་མ་ལག་གི་ཆེད་དུ་བདེ་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་མ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དྲན་སྐོར་གྱི་ལས་རོལ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བདེ་ལེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཉེན་བརྡན་གྱི་ཚད་གཞི་བཙུགས་དང་། གྲངས་རྩིས་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆོས་ཉེན་ཡོད་ ང་ཚོའི་བརྩལ་ཞིག་གིས་མི་མང དེ་མིན་ན། ཌའི་ལོག་རིམ་ནང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དེ་ཆུང་དག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་སླ་གཏོང་རུང་། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་བཞིན་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་སྒེར་གྱི་རིམ་ལམ་ནང་དུ་ནད་ཡོད་ཚད་དམའ་རུ་གཏོང་། མཛུབ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ལས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་པར་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཆགས་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Knowledge Aware Emotion Recognition in Textual Conversations via Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'ar': 'التعرف على المشاعر الواعية بالمعرفة في المحادثات النصية عبر المحول التزايدي متعدد المهام', 'es': 'Reconocimiento de emociones consciente del conocimiento en conversaciones textuales a través del transformador incremental multitarea', 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de emoções consciente do conhecimento em conversas textuais via transformador incremental multitarefa', 'fr': 'Reconnaissance des émotions consciente des connaissances dans les conversations textuelles via un transformateur incrémental multitâche', 'ja': 'マルチタスク・インクリメンタル・トランスフォーマーを介したテキスト会話における知識認識感情認識', 'zh': '因多任务增量转换器行文本对语感知情识', 'ru': 'Осознание эмоций в текстовых разговорах через многозадачный инкрементный трансформатор', 'hi': 'बहु-कार्य वृद्धिशील ट्रांसफार्मर के माध्यम से पाठ्य वार्तालापों में ज्ञान जागरूक भावना पहचान', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Mothúcháin Eolais i gComhrá Téacs trí Chlaochladán Incriminteach Ilthasc', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση Συναισθηματικών Συναισθημάτων σε Κείμενες συνομιλίες μέσω Πολυ-Εργασιακού Προσωριακού Μετασχηματιστή', 'hu': 'Tudás-tudatos érzelmi felismerés a szöveges beszélgetésekben Multi-Task Incremental Transformer segítségével', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тапсырмалар үлкен түрлендіруші арқылы мәтіндік сұрақтардың көңіл күйлерін түсінбеу', 'it': 'Riconoscimento emotivo consapevole della conoscenza nelle conversazioni testuali tramite Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'mk': 'Познавање на емоции во текстуалните разговори преку повеќе задачи', 'lt': 'Knowledge Aware Emotion Recognition in Textual Conversations via Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'ml': 'പല- ടാസ്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d മുഖേന പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d അറിവുള്ള എക്സ്റ്റോ', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Emosi Awas Pengetahuan dalam Perbualan Teks melalui Penukar Penyulitan Penyulitan Beberapa Tugas', 'mt': 'Ir-Rikonoxximent ta’ l-Emożizzjoni ta’ l-Għarfien fil-Konverżjonijiet Tekstivi permezz ta’ Trasferiment inkrementali Multikompiti', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг мэдлэг мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжүүдийг олон-үйл ажиллагааны нэмэлт шилжүүлэгч', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie emocji w rozmowach tekstowych za pomocą wielozadaniowego transformatora przyrostowego', 'no': 'Kvitning gjenkjenning av emosjonskjenning i tekstsamtaler via fleire oppgåver', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea emoțională conștientă de cunoaștere în conversațiile textuale prin intermediul Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje emocija znanja u tekstualnim razgovorima putem povećanog transformatora multi-zadataka', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xasuusta xiriirka Textaal-Talooyinka ee aqoonta', 'sv': 'Kunskapsmedveten känsloigenkänning i textkonversationer via Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'ta': 'அறிவு தெரியும் உணர்வு புரியும் பொருள்களின் மூலம் பல பணி அதிகரிப்பு மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'Multi-Task Incremental Transformer کے ذریعہ تفصیل کی گفتگووں میں علم واقف ایموٹیون شناخت', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng cảm xúc trong đoạn thoại qua bộ chuyển hóa phức hợp', 'nl': 'Kennisbewuste emotionele herkenning in tekstuele gesprekken via Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'bg': 'Осъзнаване на знанието за разпознаване на емоции в текстови разговори чрез многофункционален ингрементален трансформатор', 'id': 'Pengetahuan Emosi Awas dalam Perbualan Teks melalui Transformer Incremental Multi-Task', 'da': 'Videnbevidst følelsesgenkendelse i tekstsamtaler via Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'de': 'Wissensbewusste Emotionserkennung in textuellen Gesprächen mittels Multi-Task Inkremental Transformer', 'ko': '다중 임무 증량 변환에 기반한 텍스트 대화에서의 지식 감지 감정 식별', 'tr': 'Multi-Task Ulaşma Täzeliklerde Bilgi Aşırı Tanımlayıcı', 'af': 'Kenning Beweeg Emotie Herkenning in Teks Gespraak deur Multi-Task Incremental Transformeerder', 'fa': 'شناسایی احساسات آگاهی از دانش در مکالمات متن با طریق تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cی افزایش چندین کار', 'am': 'የእውቀት ምርጫዎች', 'sw': 'Tambulisho la maarifa la Kutambua Hatua katika Mazungumzo ya Kiandishi kupitia Tafsiri ya Kuongezeka', 'az': 'Multi-Task Increasing Transformer vasitəsilə Metin Konuşmalarında Bilim Ağışı Emotiyon Tanıması', 'bn': 'বহুক্ষেত্রের ক্ষেত্রে প্রযুক্তিগত কথোপকথনের মাধ্যমে জ্ঞান সম্পর্কিত তথ্য স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে', 'sq': 'Knowledge Aware Emotion Recognition in Textual Conversations via Multi-Task Incremental Transformer', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje emocija znanja u tekstualnim razgovorima putem povećanog transformatora multi-zadataka', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání emocí v textových konverzacích prostřednictvím multiúlohového inkrementálního transformátoru', 'hy': 'Գիտությունը գիտակցական զգացմունքների ճանաչելը տեքստոլային հաղորդակցություններում բազմախնդիրների աճող փոխակերպման միջոցով', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje emocija znanja u tekstualnim razgovorima putem povećanja transformacije multi-zadataka', 'fi': 'Tietotietoinen tunteentunnistus tekstikeskusteluissa Multi-Task Incremental Transformerin avulla', 'et': 'Teadmisteadlik emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstivestlustes mitme ülesandega järjestikuse transformaatori kaudu', 'ca': "Recognició d'emocions conscients en converses textuals a través de transformadors incrementals multitascos", 'jv': 'Bilih Kemerdekaan Emasion Tanggarung Tekst Kapasasi Ngawe Multi-task Inclusal Transformer', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje čustev v besedilnih pogovorih z večopravilnim postopnim transformatorjem', 'he': 'זיהוי רגשות מודעים בשיחות טקסטיות באמצעות משימות רבות', 'bo': 'ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་གཏམ་གླེང་ཚོགས་ནང་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་སྣང་རུང་ངོས་འཛིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Emotion recognition in textual conversations (ERTC) plays an important role in a wide range of applications, such as opinion mining, recommender systems, and so on. ERTC, however, is a challenging task. For one thing, speakers often rely on the context and commonsense knowledge to express emotions ; for another, most utterances contain neutral emotion in conversations, as a result, the confusion between a few non-neutral utterances and much more neutral ones restrains the emotion recognition performance. In this paper, we propose a novel Knowledge Aware Incremental Transformer with Multi-task Learning (KAITML) to address these challenges. Firstly, we devise a dual-level graph attention mechanism to leverage commonsense knowledge, which augments the semantic information of the utterance. Then we apply the Incremental Transformer to encode multi-turn contextual utterances. Moreover, we are the first to introduce multi-task learning to alleviate the aforementioned confusion and thus further improve the emotion recognition performance. Extensive experimental results show that our KAITML model outperforms the state-of-the-art models across five benchmark datasets.', 'ar': 'يلعب التعرف على المشاعر في المحادثات النصية (ERTC) دورًا مهمًا في مجموعة واسعة من التطبيقات ، مثل التنقيب عن الآراء وأنظمة التوصية وما إلى ذلك. ومع ذلك ، فإن ERTC مهمة صعبة. لسبب واحد ، غالبًا ما يعتمد المتحدثون على السياق والمعرفة المنطقية للتعبير عن المشاعر ؛ من ناحية أخرى ، تحتوي معظم الأقوال على عاطفة محايدة في المحادثات ، ونتيجة لذلك ، فإن الخلط بين عدد قليل من الأقوال غير المحايدة والألفاظ الأكثر حيادية يقيد أداء التعرف على المشاعر. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح محولًا تزايديًا مدركًا للمعرفة مع التعلم متعدد المهام (KAITML) لمواجهة هذه التحديات. أولاً ، نبتكر آلية انتباه ثنائية المستوى للرسم البياني لزيادة المعرفة المنطقية ، والتي تزيد من المعلومات الدلالية للكلام. ثم نطبق المحول التزايدي لتشفير الكلام السياقي متعدد الأدوار. علاوة على ذلك ، نحن أول من أدخل التعلم متعدد المهام للتخفيف من الارتباك المذكور أعلاه وبالتالي تحسين أداء التعرف على المشاعر. تظهر النتائج التجريبية الشاملة أن نموذج KAITML الخاص بنا يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث النماذج عبر خمس مجموعات بيانات معيارية.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance des émotions dans les conversations textuelles (ERTC) joue un rôle important dans un large éventail d'applications, telles que l'exploration d'opinions, les systèmes de recommandation, etc. L'ERTC est toutefois une tâche ardue. D'une part, les locuteurs s'appuient souvent sur le contexte et la connaissance du bon sens pour exprimer leurs émotions\xa0; d'autre part, la plupart des énoncés contiennent des émotions neutres dans les conversations, de sorte que la confusion entre quelques énoncés non neutres et des énoncés beaucoup plus neutres restreint la performance de reconnaissance des émotions. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau transformateur incrémental sensible aux connaissances avec apprentissage multitâche (KAITML) pour relever ces défis. Tout d'abord, nous concevons un mécanisme d'attention graphique à deux niveaux pour tirer parti des connaissances de bon sens, ce qui augmente les informations sémantiques de l'énoncé. Ensuite, nous appliquons le Transformateur incrémental pour coder des énoncés contextuels multi-tours. De plus, nous sommes les premiers à introduire l'apprentissage multitâche pour atténuer la confusion susmentionnée et ainsi améliorer encore les performances de reconnaissance des émotions. Des résultats expérimentaux approfondis montrent que notre modèle KAITML surpasse les modèles de pointe dans cinq ensembles de données de référence.", 'es': 'El reconocimiento de emociones en conversaciones textuales (ERTC) desempeña un papel importante en una amplia gama de aplicaciones, como la minería de opiniones, los sistemas de recomendación, etc. Sin embargo, el ERTC es una tarea desafiante. Por un lado, los oradores a menudo se basan en el contexto y el conocimiento del sentido común para expresar emociones; por otro lado, la mayoría de los enunciados contienen emociones neutras en las conversaciones, como resultado, la confusión entre unos pocos enunciados no neutrales y otros mucho más neutrales restringe el rendimiento de reconocimiento de emociones. En este artículo, proponemos un novedoso transformador incremental consciente del conocimiento con aprendizaje multitarea (KAITML) para abordar estos desafíos. En primer lugar, diseñamos un mecanismo de atención gráfica de doble nivel para aprovechar el conocimiento de sentido común, que aumenta la información semántica del enunciado. Luego, aplicamos el Transformador Incremental para codificar enunciados contextuales de múltiples giros. Además, somos los primeros en introducir el aprendizaje multitarea para aliviar la confusión antes mencionada y así mejorar aún más el rendimiento del reconocimiento de emociones. Los extensos resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo KAITML supera a los modelos de última generación en cinco conjuntos de datos de referencia.', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento de emoções em conversas textuais (ERTC) desempenha um papel importante em uma ampla gama de aplicações, como mineração de opinião, sistemas de recomendação e assim por diante. O ERTC, no entanto, é uma tarefa desafiadora. Por um lado, os falantes geralmente confiam no contexto e no conhecimento do senso comum para expressar emoções; por outro, a maioria dos enunciados contém emoção neutra nas conversas, como resultado, a confusão entre alguns enunciados não neutros e muito mais neutros restringe o desempenho do reconhecimento de emoção. Neste artigo, propomos um novo Knowledge Aware Incremental Transformer with Multi-task Learning (KAITML) para enfrentar esses desafios. Em primeiro lugar, desenvolvemos um mecanismo de atenção gráfica de dois níveis para alavancar o conhecimento do senso comum, que aumenta a informação semântica do enunciado. Em seguida, aplicamos o Transformador Incremental para codificar enunciados contextuais multi-turn. Além disso, somos os primeiros a introduzir o aprendizado multitarefa para aliviar a confusão acima mencionada e, assim, melhorar ainda mais o desempenho do reconhecimento de emoções. Amplos resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo KAITML supera os modelos de última geração em cinco conjuntos de dados de referência.', 'ja': 'テキスト会話における感情認識（ ERTC ）は、オピニオンマイニング、推奨システムなどの幅広いアプリケーションで重要な役割を果たします。 しかし、ERTCは困難な課題です。 一つには、スピーカーは多くの場合、情動を表現するために文脈と常識的な知識に依存します。もう一つには、ほとんどの発話は会話の中に中立的な感情を含んでいるため、結果として、いくつかの非中立的な発話とはるかに中立的な発話との間の混乱は、感情認識のパフォーマンスを抑制します。 この論文では、これらの課題に対処するために、マルチタスク学習（ KAITML ）を備えた新しい知識意識増大型トランスフォーマーを提案する。 まず、共通感覚の知識を活用するためのデュアルレベルグラフの注目メカニズムを考案し、発話の意味情報を拡張します。 次に、インクリメンタルトランスフォーマーを適用して、マルチターンコンテキスト発話をエンコードします。 さらに、私たちは、前述の混乱を軽減し、感情認識のパフォーマンスをさらに向上させるために、マルチタスク学習を最初に導入しました。 広範な実験結果は、当社のKAITMLモデルが5つのベンチマークデータセットで最先端のモデルを上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '文本言情识(ERTC)广用重用,如议发掘,荐举系统等。 然ERTC者,挑战性之任也。 先演讲者者,常以语境识见情。 其一,大抵多含中性情于言中性,故非中性语与更中性语之混限也。 本文有多任务学(KAITML)新型感知增量变压器以应之。 先设双层图,以用常识,以增语语义息。 然后以增量转换器多轮上下文语编码之。 先引多任务学以解之,以进一步提高情识性也。 博实验结果表明,吾KAITML五准集优于先进。', 'ru': 'Распознавание эмоций в текстовых разговорах (ERTC) играет важную роль в широком спектре приложений, таких как аналитика мнений, рекомендательные системы и так далее. Вместе с тем задача, стоящая перед ЕЦПТ, является сложной. С одной стороны, ораторы часто полагаются на контекст и знания здравого смысла для выражения эмоций; с другой стороны, большинство высказываний содержат нейтральные эмоции в разговорах, в результате путаница между несколькими не-нейтральными высказываниями и гораздо более нейтральными ограничивает эффективность распознавания эмоций. В этой статье мы предлагаем новый инкрементный трансформатор, основанный на знаниях, с многозадачным обучением (KAITML) для решения этих проблем. Во-первых, мы разработали двухуровневый механизм привлечения внимания к графу, чтобы использовать знания здравого смысла, которые дополняют семантическую информацию высказывания. Затем мы применяем инкрементный трансформатор для кодирования многооборотных контекстных высказываний. Кроме того, мы первыми внедрили многозадачное обучение, чтобы уменьшить вышеупомянутую путаницу и, таким образом, еще больше повысить эффективность распознавания эмоций. Обширные экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель KAITML превосходит современные модели по пяти базовым наборам данных.', 'hi': 'पाठ्य वार्तालापों (ईआरटीसी) में भावना पहचान अनुप्रयोगों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाती है, जैसे कि राय खनन, सिफारिशकर्ता प्रणाली, और इसी तरह। हालांकि, ईआरटीसी एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। एक बात के लिए, वक्ता अक्सर भावनाओं को व्यक्त करने के लिए संदर्भ और सामान्य ज्ञान पर भरोसा करते हैं; दूसरे के लिए, अधिकांश कथनों में बातचीत में तटस्थ भावना होती है, नतीजतन, कुछ गैर-तटस्थ कथनों और बहुत अधिक तटस्थ लोगों के बीच भ्रम भावना मान्यता प्रदर्शन को रोकता है। इस पेपर में, हम इन चुनौतियों को संबोधित करने के लिए मल्टी-टास्क लर्निंग (KAITML) के साथ एक उपन्यास नॉलेज अवेयर इंक्रीमेंटल ट्रांसफॉर्मर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। सबसे पहले, हम कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान का लाभ उठाने के लिए एक दोहरे स्तर के ग्राफ ध्यान तंत्र को तैयार करते हैं, जो उच्चारण की शब्दार्थ जानकारी को बढ़ाता है। फिर हम बहु बारी प्रासंगिक कथन एन्कोड करने के लिए वृद्धिशील ट्रांसफार्मर लागू करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम उपर्युक्त भ्रम को कम करने के लिए बहु-कार्य सीखने को पेश करने वाले पहले व्यक्ति हैं और इस प्रकार भावना मान्यता प्रदर्शन में और सुधार करते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा KAITML मॉडल पांच बेंचमार्क डेटासेट में अत्याधुनिक मॉडल से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Tá ról tábhachtach ag aithint mothúcháin i gcomhráite téacs (ERTC) i raon leathan feidhmchlár, mar mhianadóireacht tuairimí, córais mholtóirí, agus mar sin de. Is tasc dúshlánach é ERTC, áfach. Mar rud amháin, is minic a bhíonn cainteoirí ag brath ar an gcomhthéacs agus ar an eolas ciallmhar chun mothúcháin a chur in iúl; i gcás eile, tá mothúcháin neodracha sa chuid is mó de chainteanna i gcomhráite, mar thoradh air sin, cuireann an mearbhall idir roinnt cainte neamh-neodrach agus cinn i bhfad níos neodraí srian ar fheidhmíocht aitheantais na mothúchán. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid Claochladán Incriminteach atá Feasach ar an Eolas le Foghlaim Ilthasc (KAITML) chun dul i ngleic leis na dúshláin seo. Ar an gcéad dul síos, ceapaimid meicníocht aird ghraif dé-leibhéil chun eolas ciallmhar a ghiaráil, rud a chuireann le faisnéis shéimeantach na cainte. Ansin cuirimid an Trasfhoirmeoir Incriminteach i bhfeidhm chun cainteanna comhthéacsúla il-uaine a ionchódú. Ina theannta sin, tá muid ar an gcéad duine a thug isteach foghlaim il-tasc chun an mearbhall thuasluaite a mhaolú agus mar sin feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht aitheantais mothúcháin. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha fairsinge go sáraíonn ár samhail KAITML na samhlacha úrscothacha thar chúig thacar sonraí tagarmhairc.', 'ka': 'ტექსტუალური პარამეტრებში (ERTC) ემოციონის მიღება მნიშვნელოვანი პროლემაში მნიშვნელოვანი პროლემაში, როგორც მიღება მინიშვნელოვანი, შემწყვებელი სისტემაში და ასე. ERTC, მაგრამ, არის შესაძლებელი დავალება. ერთი შესახებ, საუკეთესო საუკეთესო კონტექსტის და საუკეთესო ცნობიერების გამოსახულება ემოციების გამოსახულება; სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ პრომენტის მეცნიერების შეცდომა მრავალური სამუშაო შესწავლობა (KAITML) სწავლობათ ამ განცვლების შესახებ. პირველად, ჩვენ დავიწყეთ ორგანიზომის გრაფიკური მექანსი, რომელიც საშუალოდ ცნობილების გამოყენება, რომელიც სემონტიკური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება. შემდეგ ჩვენ განვიყენებთ კონტექსტური ტრანფორმაციის კოდისტური სიტყვებისთვის. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვართ პირველი, რომელიც მრავალ დავამწყენებთ სწავლებას, რომელიც წინასწორედ გადავიწყენებთ წინასწორედ შეცდომა და ამიტომ უფრო მეტი ემოციო ჩვენი KAITML მოდელის განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტიური მოდელები ხუთი ბანქმენტის მონაცემების განსაზღვრებით გავაკეთებს.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση συναισθημάτων σε συζητήσεις κειμένου (ERTC) διαδραματίζει σημαντικό ρόλο σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εφαρμογών, όπως η εξόρυξη γνώμης, τα συστήματα συστάσεων και ούτω καθεξής. Η ΕΡΤ, ωστόσο, αποτελεί ένα δύσκολο έργο. Για ένα πράγμα, οι ομιλητές συχνά βασίζονται στο πλαίσιο και τη γνώση κοινής λογικής για να εκφράσουν συναισθήματα. Από την άλλη, οι περισσότερες εκφράσεις περιέχουν ουδέτερο συναίσθημα στις συζητήσεις, ως αποτέλεσμα, η σύγχυση μεταξύ μερικών μη ουδέτερων και πολύ πιο ουδέτερων εκφράσεων περιορίζει την απόδοση αναγνώρισης συναισθημάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν νέο Αυξητικό Μετασχηματιστή Γνώσης με Μάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών (KAITML) για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προκλήσεων. Πρώτον, σχεδιάζουμε έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής διπλού επιπέδου γραφήματος για να αξιοποιήσουμε τη γνώση κοινής λογικής, η οποία ενισχύει τη σημασιολογική πληροφορία της έκφρασης. Στη συνέχεια, εφαρμόζουμε τον Προσωρινό Μετασχηματιστή για να κωδικοποιήσουμε περιβαλλοντικές εκφράσεις πολλαπλών στροφών. Επιπλέον, είμαστε οι πρώτοι που εισάγουμε τη μάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για να μετριάσουμε την προαναφερθείσα σύγχυση και έτσι να βελτιώσουμε περαιτέρω την απόδοση αναγνώρισης συναισθημάτων. Τα εκτεταμένα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα σε πέντε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmi felismerés a szöveges beszélgetésekben (ERTC) fontos szerepet játszik az alkalmazások széles skálájában, mint például a véleménybányászat, az ajánló rendszerek stb. Az ERTC azonban kihívást jelent. Először is, az előadók gyakran a kontextusra és a közértelmes tudásra támaszkodnak az érzelmek kifejezéséhez; Másrészről a legtöbb kifejezés semleges érzelmet tartalmaz a beszélgetésekben, ennek eredményeképpen néhány nem semleges és sokkal semlegesebb kifejezés közötti összetévesztés korlátozza az érzelmefelismerő teljesítményt. Ebben a tanulmányban egy újszerű Tudástájékoztató inkrementális transzformátort javasolunk többfeladatos tanulással (KAITML) a kihívások kezelésére. Először is kidolgozunk egy kettős szintű gráf figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmust a közérzeti tudás kihasználására, amely növeli a kimondás szemantikai információját. Ezután alkalmazzuk az Incremental Transformert a többfordulós kontextuális kimondások kódolására. Ezenkívül mi vagyunk az elsők, akik bevezetjük a többfeladatos tanulást, hogy enyhítsük a fent említett zavart, és így tovább javítsuk az érzelmek felismerésének teljesítményét. A kiterjedt kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a KAITML modellünk öt benchmark adatkészletben felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb modelleket.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento emotivo nelle conversazioni testuali (ERTC) svolge un ruolo importante in una vasta gamma di applicazioni, come opinion mining, sistemi di raccomandazione e così via. L'ERTC, tuttavia, è un compito impegnativo. Per prima cosa, i relatori spesso si affidano al contesto e alla conoscenza del senso comune per esprimere emozioni; Per un altro, la maggior parte delle espressioni contengono emozioni neutre nelle conversazioni, di conseguenza, la confusione tra alcune espressioni non neutre e quelle molto più neutre frena la performance di riconoscimento emotivo. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo Trasformatore Incrementale Consapevole della Conoscenza con Multi-Task Learning (KAITML) per affrontare queste sfide. In primo luogo, elaboriamo un meccanismo di attenzione grafico a doppio livello per sfruttare la conoscenza del senso comune, che aumenta l'informazione semantica dell'espressione. Quindi applichiamo il Trasformatore Incrementale per codificare le espressioni contestuali a più turni. Inoltre, siamo i primi a introdurre l'apprendimento multi-task per alleviare la confusione di cui sopra e quindi migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni di riconoscimento delle emozioni. Ampi risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello KAITML supera i modelli all'avanguardia in cinque set di dati benchmark.", 'lt': 'Emocijų pripažinimas tekstiniuose pokalbiuose (ERTC) atlieka svarbų vaidmenį įvairiose srityse, pavyzdžiui, nuomonės kasybos, rekomendavimo sistemų ir pan. Tačiau ERTC yra sunki užduotis. Pirma, kalbėtojai dažnai pasikliauja kontekstu ir bendromis žiniomis, kad išreikštų emocijas; Kita vertus, dauguma išraiškų yra neutralių emocijų pokalbiuose, todėl sumaišymas tarp kelių neutralių ir daug neutralesnių išraiškų riboja emocijų pripažinimo rezultatus. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują žinių sąmoningumo didėjantį transformatorių su daugiafunkciniu mokymusi (KAITML), kad būtų sprendžiami šie uždaviniai. Firstly, we devise a dual-level graph attention mechanism to leverage commonsense knowledge, which augments the semantic information of the utterance.  Tada naudojame didėjantį transformatorių koduojant daugiakalbius kontekstinius išreiškimus. Be to, mes esame pirmieji, kurie įdiegia daugiašalį mokymąsi, kad palengvintume pirmiau minėtą painiavą ir taip toliau gerintume emocijų pripažinimo rezultatus. Išsamūs eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų KAITML modelis viršija pažangiausius modelius penkiuose lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'kk': 'Мәтіндік сұрақтарды (ERTC) көңіл көңіл түсініктемелер көптеген қолданбалардың көптеген аумағында маңызды рөлі орындайды, мысалы, сұрақтар балауы, рекомендациялау ж Бірақ ERTC - мәселе тапсырма. Бір нәрсе, сөйлейткерлер көбінде көбінде емоцияларды көрсету үшін контексті және көпшілік мәліметіне тұрады. Басқа сөйлемелердің көпшілігі айтылуда нейтралық емоциялары бар, сондықтан бірнеше нейтралық сөйлемелердің арасындағы көпшілігі және көпшілікті нейтралық емоцияларды анықтау мүмкіндігін Бұл қағазда білім көп тапсырмаларды оқыту (KAITML) арқылы жаңа білім түрлендірушісін таңдап береміз. Біріншіден, біз көпшілікті білімдерді көмектесу үшін екі деңгейіндегі график механизмін құрамыз. Бұл сөздердің семантикалық мәліметін көбектеп береді. Содан кейін біз көптеген аудару түрлендірушісін көптеген контексті сөздерді кодтамыз. Сонымен қатар, біз біріншісіміз көп тапсырманың оқытуын көмектесу үшін алдыңғы көп тапсырмаларды көмектесу және сонымен қатар емоциялық түсініктерді жақсарту үші Кеңейтілген тәжірибелі нәтижелер KAITML моделіміздің бес белгілі деректер қорларының күйінің үлгілерін өзгертуге болады.', 'mk': 'Признавањето на емоциите во текстуалните разговори (ЕРТЦ) игра важна улога во голем број апликации, како што се минирање на мислења, препорачувачки системи итн. Сепак, ЕРТЦ е предизвикувачка задача. Прво, говорниците честопати се потпираат на контекст и заедничко знаење за да изразат емоции; за други, повеќето изрази содржат неутрални емоции во разговорите, како резултат на тоа, збунувањето помеѓу неколку неутрални изрази и многу повеќе неутрални изрази ја ограничува емоционалната препознавање на перформансата. Во овој весник, предложуваме нов Експерментален трансформ на свеста за знаење со Мулти-задачно учење (KAITML) за решавање на овие предизвици. Прво, ние создаваме механизам на двојно ниво на графско внимание за влијание на заедничкото знаење, што ја зголемува семантичната информација на изразот. Потоа го применуваме Експерменталниот трансформер за кодирање на повеќето контекстни изрази. Покрај тоа, ние сме првите што воведоа мултизадачно учење за олеснување на наведената збунетост и со тоа понатаму ја подобруваме резултатот на емоционалното препознавање. Експерименталните експериментални резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел KAITML ги надминува најновите модели преку пет бази на податоци.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan emosi dalam perbualan teks (ERTC) bermain peran penting dalam julat luas aplikasi, seperti penambangan pendapat, sistem rekomendasi, dan sebagainya. ERTC, bagaimanapun, adalah tugas yang mencabar. Untuk satu perkara, pembicara sering bergantung pada konteks dan pengetahuan umum untuk mengekspresikan emosi; untuk satu lagi, kebanyakan ucapan mengandungi emosi neutral dalam perbualan, sebagai hasilnya, kekeliruan antara beberapa ucapan tidak neutral dan yang jauh lebih neutral menahan prestasi pengenalan emosi. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pengetahuan novel Awas Penukar Incremental dengan Pelajaran Berbanyak-Tugas (KAITML) untuk mengatasi cabaran ini. Pertama, kita merancang mekanisme perhatian graf dua aras untuk menggunakan pengetahuan umum, yang menambah maklumat semantik perkataan. Kemudian kita gunakan Penukar Incremental untuk mengekodkan ungkapan kontekstual berbilang pusingan. Selain itu, kita adalah yang pertama untuk memperkenalkan pembelajaran multi-tugas untuk mengurangi kekeliruan yang terdahulu dan demikian meningkatkan lebih lanjut prestasi pengenalan emosi. Hasil percubaan yang luas menunjukkan bahawa model KAITML kita melampaui prestasi model-state-of-the-art melalui lima set data benchmark.', 'ml': 'പദാവലി സംസാരത്തിലെ ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുക (ERTC) വിശാലമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ് എര്\u200dടിസി, എന്നാലും ഇതൊരു വിലാസകരമായ ജോലിയാണ്. ഒരു കാര്യത്തില്\u200d, സംസാരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d എപ്പോഴും വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രകടമാക്കാന്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റൊരു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക്, സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ന്യൂട്ടല്\u200d വികാരങ്ങളുണ്ട്, അതിനാല്\u200d കുറച്ച് ന്യൂട്ടില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d കലഹം  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ചോദ്യങ്ങളെ വിളിച്ചുകൊടുക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പരിജ്ഞാനം അറിയുന്നുണ്ട്. ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ നിലയില്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെക്കനിസ്റ്റമാണ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്. അത് വാക്കിന്റെ സെ പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d അധികമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മളാണ് ആദ്യം പല ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, മുമ്പ് പറഞ്ഞ കുഴപ്പമൊക്കെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത്. അതുകൊണ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ കെAITML മോഡല്\u200d അഞ്ച് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള', 'mt': 'Emotion recognition in textual conversations (ERTC) plays an important role in a wide range of applications, such as opinion mining, recommender systems, and so on.  L-ERTC, madankollu, huwa kompitu ta’ sfida. Għal ħaġa waħda, il-kelliema spiss jiddependu fuq il-kuntest u l-għarfien komuni biex jesprimu emozzjonijiet; għal ieħor, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-espressjonijiet fihom emozzjoni newtrali fil-konversazzjonijiet, bħala riżultat, il-konfużjoni bejn ftit espressjonijiet mhux newtrali u dawk ħafna aktar newtrali tirrestrinġi l-prestazzjoni tar-rikonoxximent tal-emozzjonijiet. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu Trasformatur Aċċessiv ġdid ta’ Għarfien b’Tagħlim Multikompiti (KAITML) biex jiġu indirizzati dawn l-isfidi. L-ewwel nett, a ħna nħejju mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni grafika ta’ żewġ livelli biex inħeġġu l-għarfien komuni, li jżid l-informazzjoni semantika tal-espressjoni. Imbagħad napplikaw it-Trasformatur inkrementali biex nikkodifikaw espressjonijiet kuntestwali b’diversi dawriet. Barra minn hekk, aħna l-ewwel li nintroduċu tagħlim multikompitu biex itaffu l-konfużjoni msemmija hawn fuq u b’hekk itejbu aktar il-prestazzjoni tar-rikonoxximent tal-emozzjonijiet. Riżultati esperimentali estensivi juru li l-mudell KAITML tagħna huwa ogħla mill-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati f’ħames settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza.', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн ярилцлаганд мэдрэмжүүдийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөл нь олон олон хэрэглээнд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Гэвч ERTC бол хэцүү ажил. Нэг зүйл дээр илтгэгчид сэтгэл хөдлөлийг илэрхийлж чадахын тулд ихэвчлэн нөхцөл байдал, мэдрэмжтэй мэдлэгтэй байдаг. Өөрөөр хэлбэл, ихэнх хэлбэл ярилцлаганд сэтгэл хөдлөл байдаг. Үүнээс хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэсэгт байхгүй, илүү зайлсхийлгүй хэсэгт сэтгэл хөдлөлийг хүлээн зө Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр сорилтуудыг зохицуулахын тулд шинэ мэдлэг мэдлэг олон ажлын суралцагч (KAITML) болон олон ажлын шинжлэх ухааны түвшигч нарыг санал болгож байна. Эхлээд бид хоёр давхар түвшинд график анхаарлын механизм зохион байгуулдаг. Энэ нь ерөнхий оюун ухааны мэдлэгийг ашиглах боломжтой. Дараа нь бид олон эргүүл үеийн яриаг кодлохын тулд нэмэлт шилжүүлэгч хэрэглэдэг. Мөн бид олон ажлын сургалтыг эхлээд тайлбарлаж, өмнө нь алдагдлыг багасгаж, сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгох үйл ажиллагааг илүү сайжруулдаг. Маш олон туршилтын үр дүнд бидний KAITML загвар таван банкны өгөгдлийн санд урлагийн загварыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie emocji w rozmowach tekstowych (ERTC) odgrywa ważną rolę w szerokim zakresie zastosowań, takich jak opinion mining, systemy rekomenderów itp. ERTC jest jednak trudnym zadaniem. Po pierwsze, mówcy często polegają na kontekście i wiedzy zdrowego rozsądku, aby wyrażać emocje; Z drugiej strony, większość wypowiedzi zawiera neutralne emocje w rozmowach, w rezultacie zamieszanie kilku nieneutralnych wypowiedzi i znacznie bardziej neutralnych ogranicza wydajność rozpoznawania emocji. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy transformator przyrostowy świadomej wiedzy z wielozadaniowym uczeniem się (KAITML), aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom. Po pierwsze, opracowujemy dwupoziomowy mechanizm uwagi wykresu, aby wykorzystać wiedzę zdrowego rozsądku, która wzmacnia semantyczną informację wypowiedzi. Następnie stosujemy transformator przyrostowy do kodowania wielokrotnych kontekstowych wypowiedzi. Co więcej, jako pierwsi wprowadzamy wielozadaniowe uczenie się, aby złagodzić wyżej wymienione zamieszanie, a tym samym dalej poprawić wydajność rozpoznawania emocji. Obszerne wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model KAITML przewyższa najnowocześniejsze modele w pięciu zestawach danych referencyjnych.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea emoțională în conversațiile textuale (ERTC) joacă un rol important într-o gamă largă de aplicații, cum ar fi opinia mining, sistemele de recomandare și așa mai departe. ERTC este însă o sarcină dificilă. În primul rând, vorbitorii se bazează adesea pe context și cunoștințe de bun simț pentru a exprima emoții; De altfel, majoritatea cuvintelor conțin emoții neutre în conversații, ca urmare, confuzia dintre câteva cuvinte non-neutre și mult mai neutre restrânge performanța de recunoaștere a emoțiilor. În această lucrare, propunem un nou transformator incremental conștient de cunoaștere cu învățare multiplă (KAITML) pentru a aborda aceste provocări. În primul rând, vom concepe un mecanism de atenție grafic dual-nivel pentru a valorifica cunoștințele de bun sens, care sporește informația semantică a rostirii. Apoi aplicăm Transformatorul Incremental pentru a coda cuvintele contextuale cu mai multe rânduri. Mai mult decât atât, suntem primii care introduc învățarea multi-task pentru a atenua confuzia menționată mai sus și astfel îmbunătăți în continuare performanța de recunoaștere a emoțiilor. Rezultatele experimentale ample arată că modelul KAITML depășește modelele de ultimă generație din cinci seturi de date de referință.', 'no': 'Førehandsinnstillingar i tekstsamtaler (ERTC) spelar ein viktig rolle i eit brett rekkje av programmer, slik som minning av meningar, anbefalingssystemar og så videre. ERTC er imidlertid eit vanskeleg oppgåve. For ein ting, snakkarar ofte rely på konteksten og vanlege kunnskap for å uttrykke følelser; For ein annan, meste uttrykk inneheld nøytralt emosjon i samtaler, som resultat, forvirkinga mellom ein par ikkje-nøytralt uttrykk og mykje meir nøytralt uttrykk avgrenserer emosjonsgjenkjenninga. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt kunnskap vekk utviklingsformerer med fleire oppgåver- læring (KAITML) for å handtera desse utfordringane. Først utformar vi eit dual-nivågrafisk oppmerksmekanisme for å levera vanlege kunnskap, som aukar semantisk informasjon om uttalen. Deretter bruker vi «Incremental Transformer» til å koda fleirgjennomsiktige uttrykk. I tillegg er vi den første som introduserer fleire oppgåver med å lære å redusere forvirrende forvirrende forvirrende forvirrende oppgåver og derfor forbetra følelseskjenninga. Ekstra eksperimentelle resultat viser at vårt KAITML-modell utfører kunstmodellen over fem benchmarkdatasett.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje emocija u tekstualnim razgovorima (ERTC) igra važnu ulogu u širokom nizu aplikacija, poput rudarstva mišljenja, preporučujuće sisteme i tako dalje. ERTC je, međutim, izazovan zadatak. Za jednu stvar, govornici se često oslanjaju na kontekst i znanje zajedničkog smisla da izraze emocije; Za drugo, većin a govora sadrži neutralne emocije u razgovorima, kao rezultat toga, zbrka između nekoliko neneutralnih govora i mnogo više neutralnih ograničava učinkovitost priznanja emocija. U ovom papiru predlažemo novog znanja o povećanom transformaciji sa učenjem više zadataka (KAITML) da riješi ove izazove. Prvo, smislimo mehanizam pažnje na dvonivou grafika kako bi uticali na znanje zajedničkog smisla, koji povećava semantičku informaciju o reči. Onda primjenjujemo Incremental Transformer da kodira multi-turn kontekstualne reči. Osim toga, mi smo prvi koji predstavljamo učenje višezadataka kako bi olakšali predloženu zbrku i tako dalje poboljšali učenje priznanja emocija. Ekstensivni eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model KAITML iznosi stanje umjetničkih modela preko pet baze podataka.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xasuusta ee hadalka qoraalka ah (ERTC) wuxuu qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraa codsiyada kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan dayactirka fikirka, nidaamka hagitaanka iyo sidoo kale. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ERTC waa shaqo dhibaato leh. Maxaa yeelay, wax keliya ayaa hadalku inta badan isku halleeyaa aqoonta xiriirka iyo xirfadda si ay u muujiyaan fikrada; for another, most utterances contain neutral emotion in conversations, as a result, the confusion between a few non-neutral utterances and much more neutral ones restrains the emotion recognition performance.  Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa warqaddan aqoonta kordhinta ee aqoonta kordhinta ee la xiriira waxbarashada badan (KAITML). Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu sameynaa meysi aad u taxadar karto aqoonta shirkadda, kaas oo kordhiya macluumaadka kaleba ee hadalka. Markaas waxaynu codsanaynaa wareegashada badnaanta si aan ugu koobanno hadal kala duwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu nahay ugu horreeya in aan horay u soo bandhignayo waxbarashada shaqo badan, si aan u fududayno qasnada hore ee la soo sheegay, sidaas darteed ayagoo sii kordhinaya tababarka aqoonsiga. Imtixaanka dheeraad ah waxay muuqataa in modelkeeni KAITML uu ka muujiyaa qaababka xaaladda farshaxanka oo ka soo baxa shan kamid ah.', 'si': 'භාවිත සංවාදය (ERTC) වලින් භාවිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට,  ඒත් ERTC එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා. එක දෙයක් වෙනුවෙන්, සිපිකරුවන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සංවේදනය සහ සාමාන්\u200dයය දන්නවට හැඟීම් ප්\u200dරකාශ වෙන කිසිම දේවල් වෙනුවෙන්, ගොඩක් දේවල් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන් මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙක් (KAITML) මේ අභ්\u200dයානය විදි මුලින්ම, අපි දෙවල් ස්තූතිය ග්\u200dරාෆ් අවධාන පද්ධතියක් සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න හැකි දැනගන්න, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ස ඊට පස්සේ අපි වැඩි වැඩි වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා ගොඩක් වාර්තාවක් සංකේත කරන්න. තවත්, අපි මුලින්ම ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ KAITML මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත', 'sv': 'Emotionell igenkänning i textkonversationer (ERTC) spelar en viktig roll i ett brett spektrum av applikationer, såsom opinion mining, recommender system och så vidare. ERTC är dock en utmanande uppgift. För det första förlitar sig talare ofta på sammanhanget och allmänhetens kunskap för att uttrycka känslor; För det andra innehåller de flesta uttalanden neutrala känslor i konversationer, vilket resulterar i att förvirringen mellan några icke-neutrala och mycket mer neutrala uttalanden begränsar känsloigenkänningen. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny kunskapsmedveten inkremental transformator med multi-task learning (KAITML) för att möta dessa utmaningar. För det första utformar vi en uppmärksamhetsmekanism på två nivåer för att utnyttja allmännyttig kunskap, vilket ökar den semantiska informationen i yttrandet. Sedan använder vi Incremental Transformer för att koda kontextuella yttranden med flera varv. Dessutom är vi de första att införa multi-task lärande för att lindra den ovan nämnda förvirringen och därmed ytterligare förbättra känsloigenkänningen. Omfattande experimentella resultat visar att vår KAITML-modell överträffar de senaste modellerna över fem referensdatauppsättningar.', 'ta': 'நிரல் உரையாடல்களில் உணர்வு ஒப்புக்கொள்தல் (ERTC) ஒரு முக்கியமான விளையாட்டை விளையாடுகிறது, பார்வை குறைந்து, பரிந்துரைப்பு அமைப் ஆனால் ERTC ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் பணியாகும். ஒரு விஷயத்திற்கு, பேசுபவர்கள் பெரும்பாலாக உணர்வுகளை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு சூழல் மற்றும் தொழில்நுட மற்றொரு வார்த்தைகளுக்கு, பேச்சில் பெரும்பாலான பேச்சுகளில் புதிய உணர்வு இருக்கிறது, அதனால் சில புதிய வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே குழப்பம் மற்ற இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த சவால்களை நிர்ணயிக்க ஒரு புதிய அறிவு மாற்றும் பல பணி கற்றுக்கொண்டு (KAITML) மாற்றியமைப்பை திருந முதலில், நாம் இரண்டு மட்டத்தில் வரைப்படம் கவனம் முறைமையை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது வார்த்தையின் பாதுகாப்பு தகவலை அதிகரிக்கும். பின்னர் நாம் அதிகமான மாற்றுதலை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் பல முறை மாற்றும் தற்காலிக வார்த்தைகளை குறியீடு. முந்தைய குழப்பத்தை நீக்க முதலில் நாம் பல பணிகள் கற்றுக் கொள்ள முதல் முதல் முதலாக இருக்கிறோம் மற்றும் உணர்வு குறிப்பிடும விரிவான சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹل کی باتوں (ERTC) میں احساسات کی شناسایی ایک بہت سی کاربرد میں اہم رغم لگا رہی ہے، جیسے نظریہ مٹی، رغم دینے والی سیسٹم، اور اس کے بعد۔ ارٹسی (ERTC) ایک مشکل کام ہے۔ ایک بات کے لئے، زبان کرنے والے اکثر محیط اور معمولی علم پر اعتماد کرتے ہیں کہ احساسات بیان کریں۔ اور دوسرے کے لئے اکثر کلمات کی نسبت بحث میں نائرے احساسات ہیں، اس کے نتیجہ میں بہت کم نائرے کلمات کے درمیان اور بہت زیادہ نائرے احساسات کے ذریعے احساسات کی پہچان کرنے کی کوشش منع کرتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی علم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ان چالوں کے بارے میں مشکل کرنے کے لئے Multi-Task Learning (KAITML) کے ساتھ بڑھنے والی تغییر پھیلانے والے کو آگاہ کریں. اولوں سے ہم ایک دوسرے سطح گراف کی توجه کی مکانیزم بناتے ہیں کہ عام سمجھ کے علم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے، جو بات کی سیمانتی معلومات کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ پھر ہم بڑھنے کی تغییر دینے والے کو multi-turn contextual کلمات کے ساتھ کوڈ کریں۔ اور ہم سب سے پہلے بہت سے کاموں کی تعلیم پہنچانے والے ہیں کہ پہلے سے پہلے سے پیدا ہوا گمراہی کو آسان کر دیں اور اس طرح احساسات کی شناسایی کا کام اضافہ کریں۔ اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری KAITML موڈل پانچ بینچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعے موڈل کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng cảm xúc trong các cuộc trò chuyện kết cấu (ERTC) đóng vai trò quan trọng trong một loạt các ứng dụng, như đào bới ý kiến, hệ thống liên minh, v.v. Tuy nhiên, ERTC là một nhiệm vụ thách thức. Người nói thường dựa vào ngữ cảnh và kiến thức thông thường để thể hiện cảm xúc; Trong cuộc nói chuyện khác, hầu hết những lời thốt ra chứa cảm xúc trung lập trong cuộc nói chuyện, kết quả là sự hỗn loạn giữa vài lời nói không trung lập và những lời trung lập hơn sẽ kiềm chế hiệu quả nhận biết cảm xúc. Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi đề xuất một chương trình biến đổi Sớm Hiểu Biết Biết Biết Biết Biết Biết Để lắp Các Nhiệm vụ Truyền (KAITML) để giải quyết thử thách này. Trước hết, chúng ta sẽ phát minh ra một cơ chế đồ thị hai cấp để thúc đẩy kiến thức thông thường, nâng cao sự thông tin theo ngữ nghĩa. Sau đó chúng tôi áp dụng hệ thống biến hình Incredental để mã hóa các câu mở rộng. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi là những người đầu tiên tiến hành việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ để giảm sự bối rối này và nâng cao nhận thức cảm xúc. Những kết quả thử nghiệm dồi dào cho thấy mô hình KAITML của chúng ta vượt trội các mẫu thời đại trên năm tập tin tiêu chuẩn.', 'uz': "Name Xo'sh, ERTC bu muammolar vazifasi. For one thing, speakers often rely on the context and commonsense knowledge to express emotions;  Boshqa so'zlar bilan so'zlar davomida katta g'oyalar bor. Bu sababda, bir necha so'zlar orasidagi qanday gaplar va ko'p katta so'zlarning gaplari hissiyotni aniqlash natijasini bajaradi. Bu qogʻozda biz bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun ko'plab vazifa ta'lim (KAITML) bilan katta ta ta'siri haqida maʼlumot tizimini anglatamiz. Birinchi marta, biz kommunikassiya haqida xabar beruvchi ikki darajadagi grafik muhimligini yaratib, bu so'zning semantik maʼlumotini oshirish mumkin. Keyin biz ko'pchilik davomida bir xil gaplarni kodlash uchun katta tarjima tarjima qilamiz. Ko'rib, biz birinchi necha vazifa o'rganishni o'rganishga o'rganamiz, oldingi qanday qandaydir qanday qanday qandaydir o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Koʻproq tajriba natijalari KAITML modelimiz besh benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi holatning holatini bajaradi.", 'hr': 'Priznavanje emocija u tekstualnim razgovorima (ERTC) igra važnu ulogu u širokom nizu aplikacija, poput rudarstva mišljenja, sustava preporuke i tako dalje. ERTC je, međutim, izazovan zadatak. Za jednu stvar, govornici se često oslanjaju na kontekst i znanje zajedničkog smisla izraziti emocije; Za drugo, većin a govora sadrži neutralne emocije u razgovorima, kao rezultat toga, zbunjenje između nekoliko neoneutralnih govora i mnogo više neutralnih ograničava učinkovitost priznanja emocija. U ovom papiru predlažemo novog znanja o povećanom transformaciji s učenjem više zadataka (KAITML) kako bi se riješili ovim izazovima. Prvo, smislili smo mehanizam pažnje na dvorazini grafika kako bi utjecali na znanje običnog smisla, što povećava semantičke informacije o govoru. Onda primjenjujemo Incremental Transformer za kodiranje multi-turn contextual izraza. Osim toga, mi smo prvi koji predstavljamo učenje višezadataka kako bismo ublažili predloženu zbrku i tako dalje poboljšali učinku priznanja emocija. Prošireni eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model KAITML iznosi stanje umjetničkih modela u pet standardnih podataka.', 'nl': 'Emotieherkenning in tekstuele gesprekken (ERTC) speelt een belangrijke rol in een breed scala aan toepassingen, zoals opinion mining, aanbevelingssystemen, enzovoort. ERTC is echter een uitdagende taak. Ten eerste vertrouwen sprekers vaak op de context en gezonde kennis om emoties uit te drukken; Anderzijds bevatten de meeste uitingen neutrale emoties in gesprekken, waardoor de verwarring tussen een paar niet-neutrale uitingen en veel neutralere uitingen de prestaties van emotie herkenning beperkt. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe Knowledge Aware Incremental Transformer met Multi-Task Learning (KAITML) voor om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken. Ten eerste, ontwikkelen we een dual-level grafiekaandachtsmechanisme om gezond verstand kennis te gebruiken, die de semantische informatie van de uiting vergroot. Vervolgens passen we de Incremental Transformer toe om multi-turn contextuele uitingen te coderen. Bovendien zijn we de eerste die multitask learning introduceren om de eerder genoemde verwarring te verlichten en zo de prestaties van emotie herkenning verder te verbeteren. Uitgebreide experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons KAITML model beter presteert dan de state-of-the-art modellen in vijf benchmark datasets.', 'da': 'Følelsesgenkendelse i tekstsamtaler (ERTC) spiller en vigtig rolle i en lang række applikationer, såsom opinion mining, anbefalingssystemer osv. ERTC er imidlertid en udfordrende opgave. For det første er talere ofte afhængige af konteksten og almindelig viden til at udtrykke følelser; For det andet indeholder de fleste udtalelser neutrale følelser i samtaler, som følge heraf forvirringen mellem nogle få ikke-neutrale udtalelser og meget mere neutrale udtalelser begrænser følelsesgenkendelsens ydeevne. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny vidensbevidst Incremental Transformer med Multi-Task Learning (KAITML) til at løse disse udfordringer. For det første udtænker vi en dual-level graf opmærksomhedsmekanisme for at udnytte almindelig viden, som øger den semantiske information af udtalelsen. Derefter anvender vi Incremental Transformer til at kode kontekstuelle udtalelser med flere sving. Desuden er vi de første til at indføre multi-task læring for at lindre ovennævnte forvirring og dermed yderligere forbedre følelsesgenkendelsens ydeevne. Omfattende eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores KAITML model overgår de nyeste modeller på tværs af fem benchmark datasæt.', 'de': 'Emotionserkennung in textuellen Gesprächen (ERTC) spielt eine wichtige Rolle in einer Vielzahl von Anwendungen, wie Opinion Mining, Empfehlungssystemen usw. ERTC ist jedoch eine herausfordernde Aufgabe. Zum einen verlassen sich Redner oft auf den Kontext und das gesunde Wissen, um Emotionen auszudrücken; Zum anderen enthalten die meisten Äußerungen neutrale Emotionen in Gesprächen, wodurch die Verwechslung zwischen einigen wenigen nicht-neutralen Äußerungen und viel neutraleren Äußerungen die Emotionserkennung einschränkt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuen Knowledge Aware Inkremental Transformer mit Multi-Task Learning (KAITML) vor, um diese Herausforderungen anzugehen. Zunächst entwickeln wir einen zweistufigen Graphenaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um gesundes Wissen zu nutzen, das die semantische Information der Äußerung erweitert. Dann wenden wir den Inkremental Transformer an, um kontextuelle Äußerungen mit mehreren Drehungen zu codieren. Darüber hinaus sind wir die ersten, die Multi-Task-Learning einführen, um die erwähnte Verwirrung zu lindern und damit die Emotionserkennungsleistung weiter zu verbessern. Umfangreiche experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser KAITML-Modell in fünf Benchmark-Datensätzen die aktuellen Modelle übertrifft.', 'bg': 'Разпознаването на емоциите в текстови разговори играе важна роля в широк спектър от приложения, като например извличане на мнения, системи за препоръки и т.н. ERTC обаче е трудна задача. От една страна, говорителите често разчитат на контекста и разумното знание, за да изразят емоциите; от друга страна, повечето изказвания съдържат неутрална емоция в разговорите, в резултат на което объркването между няколко ненеутрални изказвания и много по-неутрални ограничава изпълнението на разпознаването на емоциите. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме нов информационен трансформатор, осъзнаващ знанието, с мултизадачи учене (КАИТМЛ), за да се справи с тези предизвикателства. Първо, ние разработваме механизъм на двойно ниво на графично внимание, за да се възползва от общоприетото знание, което увеличава семантичната информация на изказването. След това прилагаме ингременталния трансформатор, за да кодираме контекстуални изказвания с няколко завъртания. Освен това ние сме първите, които въвеждат многофункционално обучение, за да облекчат горепосоченото объркване и по този начин допълнително да подобрят ефективността за разпознаване на емоциите. Обширни експериментални резултати показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда най-съвременните модели в пет сравнителни набора данни.', 'sw': 'Kutambua hali ya hisia katika mazungumzo ya msingi (ERTC) inacheza nafasi muhimu katika matumizi mengi kama vile madini ya maoni, mifumo ya kupendekeza, na kadhalika. ERTC, hata hivyo, ni kazi ya changamoto. Kwa jambo moja, wazungumzaji mara nyingi hutegemea muktadha na maarifa ya umma ya kuonyesha hisia; kwa maneno mengine, maneno mengi yanahusu hisia za kiutro katika mazungumzo hayo, matokeo yake, tofauti kati ya maneno machache yasiyo ya kiutro na mengi zaidi ya katikati yanazuia utendaji wa kutambua hisia. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza maarifa ya riwaya inayofahamika na Transfer Kuongezeka kwa Ufunzi wa Mitandao (KAITML) kuhoji changamoto hizi. Kwanza, tunatengeneza mfumo wa simu za viwango viwili kwa ajili ya kutumia maarifa ya jumbe, ambayo inaongeza taarifa za sekunde za maneno. Kisha tunatumia mabadiliko ya Kuongezeka kwa ajili ya kuweka lugha nyingi za majadiliano. Zaidi ya hayo, sisi ni wa kwanza kuanzisha kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi ili kupunguza changamoto zilizotajwa hapo awali na kwa hiyo kuongeza hatua ya kutambua hisia. Matokeo mengi ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu ya KAITML inaonyesha mitindo ya sanaa katika seti za taarifa tano za bendera.', 'tr': 'Metin söhbetlerinde duýdurma tanamak (ERTC) köp işlemlerde möhüm roli oýnaýar, aklyk taýýarlamak, maslahat täsirler we şeýleler ýaly. ýöne ERTC - gaty kynçylyk täblisasidir. Bir zat üçin sözleýänler köplenç duýgyny ifade etmek üçin kontekste we umumy duýgyny bilýän bilimi ynanýarlar; Başga bir şekilde, köp sözleri gürleşmelerde neutral duýgyny bar, netijeli bir näçe neutral sözleriň arasynda ça şyrylyk we köp neutral sözleriň duýgyny tanamagyny engelleýär. Bu kagyzda, biz bu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin roman Bilgi Aware Mazmuny Taýýarlançylar (KAITML) teklip edýäris. Birinjisi, sözlerin semantik bilgilerini üýtgetmek üçin çift dereje grafik üns mekanizmasyny düzenledik. Sonra we Beýik zamanlama terjime etmegini ködlemek üçin uygulapdyrys. Munuň üçin, biz öňünden öňünden kellesini azaltmak üçin birnäçe işgär öwrenmesini tanyşdyrmak üçin ilkinji gezek bolup duýgularyň tanyşygyny gowylaşdyrýarys. Çaplanjak denetim netijesi biziň KIITML nusgamyzyň beş benchmark veri setirlerinde durumyny üstün edýändigini görkez.', 'af': "Emosie herkening in tekstuele gesprekke (ERTC) speel 'n belangrike rol in 'n groot reek van toepassings, soos opisiemining, aanbeveelderstelsels en so. ERTC is egter 'n pragtige taak. Vir een ding, sprekkers vertrou dikwels op die konteks en gewone kennis om emosies te uitdruk; vir 'n ander, die meeste uitspraak bevat neutrale emosie in gesprekke, as 'n resultaat, die verdwaling tussen 'n paar nie-neutrale uitspraak en baie meer neutrale een beheer die emosie herkening prestasie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe kennis bekend Verwyder Incremental Transformer met Multi-task Leer (KAITML) om hierdie uitdagings te adres. Eerste, ons stel 'n twee-vlak graaf aandag mekanisme om gemeenskap kennis te verwyder, wat die semantiese inligting van die uitdrukking vergroot. Dan het ons die Incremental Transformer aanwend om multi-draai contextual uitdrukkings te kodeer. Ook, ons is die eerste wat multi-taak-leer voorsien om die voorgeskryfde verskrikking te verminder en daarom verder die emosie-herkening-prestasie te verbeter. Ekstensiewe eksperimentele resultate vertoon dat ons KITML model die state-of-the-art modele oortrek oor vyf benchmark datastelle.", 'sq': "Emotion recognition in textual conversations (ERTC) plays an important role in a wide range of applications, such as opinion mining, recommender systems, and so on.  ERTC, megjithatë, është një detyrë sfiduese. Për një gjë, folësit shpesh mbështeten në kontekstin dhe njohurinë e përbashkët për të shprehur emocione; për një tjetër, shumica e shprehjeve përmbajnë emocione neutrale në bisedime, si rezultat, konfuzioni midis disa shprehjeve jo-neutrale dhe shumë më neutrale ndalon performancën e njohjes së emocioneve. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një transformues të njohura të njohur në mënyrë të rritshme me Mësim Multi-Tash (KAITML) për t'i trajtuar këto sfida. Firstly, we devise a dual-level graph attention mechanism to leverage commonsense knowledge, which augments the semantic information of the utterance.  Pastaj ne aplikojmë Transformuesin Incremental për të koduar shprehjet kontekstuale me shumë kthesa. Përveç kësaj, ne jemi të parët që futim mësimin me shumë detyra për të lehtësuar konfuzionin e përmendur më parë dhe kështu përmirësuar më tej performancën e njohjes së emocioneve. Rezultatet eksperimentale të zgjeruara tregojnë se modeli ynë KAITML-i ekzekuton modelet më të moderne nëpërmjet pesë bazave të dhënash.", 'fa': 'شناسایی احساسات در گفتگوهای متن (ERTC) نقش مهم در مجموعه\u200cای از کاربردها، مثل خریدن نظر، سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد و غیر از آن، بازی می\u200cکند. ولی ERTC یک کار مشکل است. برای یک چیز، سخنرانی اغلب بر محیط و دانش معمولی برای تعریف احساسات اعتماد دارند. برای دیگر، بیشتر سخنرانی احساسات غیرمستقل در گفتگوها، به نتیجه، اختلاف بین چند سخنرانی غیرمستقل و بسیار غیرمستقل بیشتری از عملکرد شناسایی احساسات را محدود می کند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک دانش روزنامه آگاهی تغییردهنده\u200cی افزایش با یادگیری Multitasks (KAITML) برای حل این چالش\u200cها کند. اول، ما یک مکانیسم توجه دو سطح را برای تأثیر علم معمولی طراحی می کنیم، که اطلاعات semantic از گفتار را افزایش می دهد. سپس ما تغییرگر افزایش را برای رمزگذاری سخنرانی متفاوتی تغییر دهیم. علاوه بر این، ما اولین نفر هستیم که تعلیم تعلیم چندین کار را معرفی کنیم تا آسان کردن پیچیدگی پیش از این و به این نتیجه عملکرد شناسایی احساسات را بهتر کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش گسترده\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل KAITML ما مدل\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در پنج مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنچم\u200cمارک انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '텍스트 대화에서의 감정 식별(ERTC)은 광범위한 응용에서 중요한 역할을 발휘하는데 예를 들어 발굴, 추천 시스템 등이다.그러나 ERTC는 도전적인 과제입니다.한편, 말하는 사람은 왕왕 언어 환경과 상식에 의존하여 감정을 표현한다.다른 한편, 대다수의 말은 중성적인 정서를 함유하고 있기 때문에 소수의 비중성어와 더 많은 중성어 간의 혼동은 정서 식별의 표현을 제한한다.본고에서 우리는 이러한 도전을 해결하기 위해 새로운 지식 감지 다중 임무 학습 증량 변환기(KAITML)를 제시했다.우선, 우리는 상식 지식을 활용하고 언어의 의미 정보를 증가시키는 이중도 주의 메커니즘을 설계했다.그리고 우리는 증량 변환기를 응용하여 여러 라운드의 상하문 언어를 인코딩한다.이 밖에 우리는 처음으로 다중 임무 학습을 도입하여 상술한 곤혹을 완화시키고 정서 식별 성능을 더욱 향상시켰다.대량의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 KAITML 모델은 다섯 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'hy': 'Էմոցիաների ճանաչելը տեքստալ հաղորդակցություններում (ERTC) կարևոր դեր է խաղում տարբեր ծրագրերում, ինչպիսիք են կարծիքի հանքագործումը, խորհրդատվող համակարգերը և այլն: Այնուամենայնիվ, ERCT-ը դժվար խնդիր է: Առաջին հերթին, խոսնակները հաճախ հույս են տալիս կոնտեքստին և ընդհանուր գիտելիքին, որպեսզի արտահայտեն զգացմունքները: Մեկ ուրիշի համար, արտահայտությունների մեծ մասը պարունակում է չեզոք զգացմունքներ խոսակցությունների մեջ, ինչի արդյունքում, մի քանի ոչ չեզոք արտահայտությունների և շատ ավելի չեզոք արտահայտությունների միջև շփոթմունքը սահմանում է զգացմունքների ճանաչության ար Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր գիտելիքի գիտակցության աճող վերածմանը բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրությամբ (KITML) այս մարտահրավերներին լուծելու համար: Առաջինը, մենք ստեղծում ենք երկու մակարդակի գծագրային ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք ընդհանուր գիտելիքը, որը բարձրացնում է արտահայտության սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվությունը: Այնուհետև մենք կիրառում ենք Increment Transforme-ը բազմաշարժվող կոնտեքստային արտահայտությունների կոդավորման համար: Moreover, we are the first to introduce multi-task learning to alleviate the aforementioned confusion and thus further improve the emotion recognition performance.  Մեծ փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր CAITML մոդելը գերազանցում է ամենահետաքրքիր մոդելները հինգ համեմատային տվյալների համակարգում:', 'am': 'የመስመር ማውቀት በጽሑፍ ንግግር (ERTC) በተለየ ፕሮግራሞች ብዙዎች የውጤት ማሳሰሪያ፣ የመታሰቢያ ስርዓት እና እንደዚህ በተጨማሪው ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ ያስተካክላል፡፡ ነገር ግን ERTC የችሎታዊ ስራ ነው፡፡ አንዲት ነገር ግን ንግግር የሚናገሩ ብዙ ጊዜ በአካባቢና በአካባቢ እውቀትን ለማሳየት ይታመናሉ፤ ለሌላው ንግግር ብዙዎቹ በንግግር ውስጥ የውይይት እውቀት ይኖራል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የብዙ ትምህርት ትምህርት የሚያውቀውን የዘላለም ማስታወቂያ ማወቂያ (KAITML) እነዚህን ጥቃቄዎች ለመቀበል እናስባለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ የንግግሩን የsemantic መረጃ የሚያሳድገውን የካምፓኒስነቱን እውቀት ለማድረግ የሁለት ደረጃ የግራፍ ማስታወቂያ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በኋላም ብዙዎችን የሁኔታ ንግግር ለማድረግ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ደግሞ አስቀድሞ የተባለውን ጥላቻን ለማሳየት የብዙ ስራ ትምህርትን ለመጀመሪያ እና ስለዚህም የስብሰባውን ማስታወቂያውን አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ብዙ ፈተና ውጤቶች KAITML ሞዴሌዎቻችን በአምስት benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ የሀገር-የ-art model ዎችን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'টেক্সচুয়াল আলোচনায় ইমোটেশন স্বীকৃতি প্রদর্শন করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করে, যেমন মন মন্তব্য মিনিটিং, সুপারিশ ব্যবস্থা এবং এভাবে অনু তবে এরটিসি একটা চ্যালেঞ্জাল কাজ। এক বিষয়ের জন্য, ভাষাকারীরা প্রায়শই প্রকাশের প্রেক্ষাপট এবং কমন্সেন্সের জ্ঞানের উপর নির্ভর করে; আরেকজনের বেশীর ভাষায় কথোপকথনে নিরপেক্ষ অনুভূতি রয়েছে, যার ফলে কয়েকটি নিরপেক্ষ বাক্যের মধ্যে বিভ্রান্তি এবং অনেক নিরপেক্ষ কথার বিভ্রান্তি আব এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলার প্রস্তাব করি যে সামান্য কাজ শিক্ষা দিয়ে প্রচারিত জ্ঞানের পরিচালনা করা হয়েছে। প্রথমত, আমরা দুই-স্তরের গ্রাফের মনোযোগ মেকানিস্তানের উদ্দেশ্য চিন্তা করেছি কমিউনিসেন্সের জ্ঞানের জন্য, যা এই বক্তব্যের স তারপর আমরা বৃদ্ধিমান ট্রান্সফার্নার প্রয়োগ করি বহুবার প্রতিযোগিতার কথা এনকোড করার জন্য। Moreover, we are the first to introduce multi-task learning to alleviate the aforementioned confusion and thus further improve the emotion recognition performance.  বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের কেএইচএমএল মডেল পাঁচ বেঞ্চাম্বার্ক ডেটাসেটের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প মডেলে', 'az': "Mətn söhbətlərində emosyon tanınması (ERTC) çoxlu proqramlarda möhüm rol oynayır, bəlkə fikirləşdirmək, təsirli sistemlər və bunlar kimi. Ancaq ERTC çətin bir işdir. Bir şeyə görə danışanlar çox hissləri ifadə etmək üçün müxtəlif və sıradan hisslər üzərində təvəkkül edirlər. Başqa sözlərdə çox nötrəli duyguları müzakirələrdə nötrəli duyguları barəsində, sonuç olaraq, bir neçə nötrəli sözlər arasında və daha çox nötrəli duyguların tanımasını qadağan edir. Bu kağızda, bu çətinliklərə çəkinmək üçün yeni bilgi, çoxlu işin öyrənməsi ilə çoxlu Transformer təklif edirik. İlk olaraq, sözlərin semantik məlumatını artırmaq üçün iki səviyyə grafik məlumatı yaratdıq. Sonra çoxlu dönüş müxtəlif sözləri kodlamaq üçün çoxlu Transformer'i uygulayırıq. Daha sonra, biz çoxlu işin öyrənməsini ilk təbliğ edirik ki, əvvəlcədən əvvəlki karışıqlığı azaltmaq və bu halda duyguların tanıması performansını daha da yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün. Əlavə təcrübə sonuçları, KAITML modeliyimizin beş benchmark veri quruları arasında mövcuddur.", 'id': 'Pengenalan emosi dalam percakapan tekstual (ERTC) bermain peran penting dalam jangkauan yang luas aplikasi, seperti penambangan pendapat, sistem rekomendasi, dan sebagainya. ERTC, however, is a challenging task.  Untuk satu hal, pembicara sering bergantung pada konteks dan pengetahuan umum untuk mengekspresikan emosi; untuk yang lain, kebanyakan ucapan mengandung emosi netral dalam percakapan, sebagai hasilnya, kebingungan antara beberapa ucapan tidak-netral dan yang jauh lebih netral menahan prestasi pengenalan emosi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah pengetahuan novel Aware Incremental Transformer dengan Multi-Task Learning (KAITML) untuk mengatasi tantangan-tantangan ini. Pertama, kita merencanakan mekanisme perhatian grafik dua tingkat untuk menggunakan pengetahuan umum, yang meningkatkan informasi semantis dari ucapan. Then we apply the Incremental Transformer to encode multi-turn contextual utterances.  Selain itu, kita adalah orang pertama yang memperkenalkan pembelajaran multi-tugas untuk mengurangi kekeliruan yang sebelumnya dan demikian meningkatkan lebih lanjut prestasi pengenalan emosi. Extensive experimental results show that our KAITML model outperforms the state-of-the-art models across five benchmark datasets.', 'bs': 'Priznavanje emocija u tekstualnim razgovorima (ERTC) igra važnu ulogu u širokom nizu aplikacija, poput rudarstva mišljenja, preporučujuće sustave i tako dalje. ERTC je, međutim, izazovan zadatak. Za jednu stvar, govornici se često oslanjaju na kontekst i znanje zajedničkog smisla da izraze emocije; Za drugo, većin a govora sadrži neutralne emocije u razgovorima, kao rezultat toga, zbunjenje između nekoliko neneutralnih govora i mnogo više neutralnih ograničava učinkovitost priznanja emocija. U ovom papiru predlažemo novog znanja o većem transformaciji sa učenjem multitaska (KAITML) da se riješi ovim izazovima. Prvo, smislimo mehanizam pažnje na dvorazini grafika kako bi uticali na znanje zajedničkog smisla, koji povećava semantičku informaciju o govoru. Onda primjenjujemo Incremental Transformer da kodira multi-turn contextualne izraze. Osim toga, mi smo prvi koji predstavljamo učenje višezadataka kako bi olakšali predloženu zbrku i tako dalje poboljšali učinku priznanja emocija. Provećani eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model KAITML iznosi stanje umjetničkih modela u pet baznih podataka.', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání emocí v textových konverzacích (ERTC) hraje důležitou roli v široké škále aplikací, jako je dolování názorů, doporučovací systémy atd. ERTC je však náročným úkolem. Za prvé, řečníci často spoléhají na kontext a znalosti zdravého rozumu k vyjádření emocí; Na druhé straně, většina výroků obsahuje neutrální emoce v konverzacích, což má za následek zmatenost mezi několika neutrálními a mnohem neutrálnějšími výroky omezuje výkon rozpoznávání emocí. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový inkrementální transformátor znalostního vědomí s víceúlohovým učením (KAITML) pro řešení těchto výzev. Nejprve navrhujeme dvouúrovňový mechanismus pozornosti grafu, který využívá znalosti zdravého rozumu, které rozšiřují sémantickou informaci projevu. Pak použijeme inkrementální transformátor k kódování kontextových výroků s více otočením. Kromě toho jsme první, kdo zavádí víceúlohové učení, abychom zmírnili zmírněný zmatek a tím dále zlepšili výkon rozpoznávání emocí. Rozsáhlé experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model KAITML překonává nejmodernější modely v pěti referenčních datových sadách.', 'ca': "El reconeixement emocional en converses textuals (ERTC) té un paper important en una gran varietat d'aplicacions, com la mineria d'opinió, els sistemes de recomanació, etc. Però l'ERTC és una tasca difícil. En primer lloc, els oradors sovint confien en el context i el coneixement comú per expressar emocions; for another, most utterances contain neutral emotion in conversations, as a result, the confusion between a few non-neutral utterances and much more neutral ones restrains the emotion recognition performance.  In this paper, we propose a novel Knowledge Aware Incremental Transformer with Multi-task Learning (KAITML) to address these challenges.  Primer, dissenyem un mecanisme d'atenció gràfic de doble nivell per aprofitar el coneixement comú, que augmenta la informació semàntica de l'expressió. Llavors aplicam el Transformer Incremental per codificar expressions contextuals en molts voltants. A més, som els primers a introduir aprenentatge multitascat per aliviar la confusió mencionada i, així, millorar encara més el rendiment del reconeixement emocional. Extensive experimental results show that our KAITML model outperforms the state-of-the-art models across five benchmark datasets.", 'et': 'Emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstivestlustes (ERTC) mängib olulist rolli paljudes rakendustes, nagu arvamuse kaevandamine, soovitussüsteemid jne. ERTC on siiski keeruline ülesanne. Esiteks toetuvad kõnelejad sageli emotsioonide väljendamiseks kontekstile ja mõistlikele teadmistele; Teiseks sisaldab enamik väljendeid vestlustes neutraalseid emotsioone, mistõttu segadus mõne mitteneutraalse ja palju neutraalsema väljendi vahel piirab emotsioonide äratundmist. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse teadmistepõhise arengu mitme ülesandega õppimisega (KAITML), et lahendada neid väljakutseid. Esiteks töötame välja kahetasandilise graafilise tähelepanu mehhanismi, et kasutada mõistlikke teadmisi, mis suurendab sõnavõtte semantilist infot. Seejärel rakendame Incremental Transformer, et kodeerida mitme pöördega kontekstuaalseid väljendeid. Lisaks oleme esimesed, kes tutvustavad mitme ülesandega õppimist, et leevendada eespool nimetatud segadust ja seega veelgi parandada emotsioonide tuvastamise jõudlust. Ulatuslikud eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie KAITML mudel ületab viie võrdlusandmekogumi puhul kaasaegseid mudeleid.', 'fi': 'Tunteiden tunnistuksella tekstikeskusteluissa (ERTC) on tärkeä rooli monenlaisissa sovelluksissa, kuten mielipidevaikunnassa, suositusjärjestelmissä jne. ERTC on kuitenkin haastava tehtävä. Ensinnäkin puhujat käyttävät usein kontekstia ja mielekästä tietoa tunteiden ilmaisemiseksi; Toisaalta useimmat lausumat sisältävät keskusteluissa neutraaleja tunteita, minkä seurauksena sekaannus muutamien ei-neutraalien ja paljon neutraalimpien lausumien välillä rajoittaa tunteiden tunnistamista. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme uutta Knowledge Aware Incremental Transformer with Multi-task Learning (KAITML) näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi. Ensin kehitämme kaksitasoisen graafisen huomion mekanismin, jolla hyödynnetään järjetöntä tietoa, joka lisää lauseen semanttista tietoa. Sitten käytämme Incremental Transformeria koodaamaan monimutkaisia kontekstuaalisia lauseita. Lisäksi olemme ensimmäisiä, jotka ottavat käyttöön monitehtäväoppimisen, joka lievittää edellä mainittua hämmennystä ja parantaa siten tunnetunnistusta entisestään. Laajat kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että KAITML-mallimme suoriutuu huippuluokan malleista viidessä vertailuaineistossa.', 'jv': 'Erè no Sing sing apik, wong-wong liyane sakjane nguasakno nang kontèks lan ngerasakno ora apik sing luwih apik; sanes kuwi tindakan kuwi mungkin-aman. Awak wih-wih sing menehi, akeh langgar-wih akéwé nesaturan ingkang dipuluhaan, dadi, langgar-wih akéwé ning acara gak bakal nêtraal lan tambah sing luwih nêtraal gak bakal terus tambah akéwé mengko awak dhéwé. Nang pemilit iki, kita mudhun kuwi nyumbang anu nggawe "knowknowknownAwake Incmendal Transformer" karo Multi-task Learning (KAIRML) kanggo nganggo perbudhakan iki. Nalika iku, kita ditambah sistem kuwi nggawe sistem kuwi duluga-tanggal kanggo ngilangno kesempatan kanggo ngerasahan seneng nggawe sistem sematik keamanan kuwi. UnknownMonitor vendor Lakok, awak dhéwé sing perusahaan kanggo nyenggawe multi-task kang nggawe barang kelas karo hal-hal kuwi tindakan kuwi tindakan kejahatan karo ngono uga luwih dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno awak dhéwé. AllProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'זיהוי רגשות בשיחות טקסטיות (ERTC) משחק תפקיד חשוב במערכת שימושים רחבה, כמו מכירת דעות, מערכות המלצות וכן הלאה. אך ERTC הוא משימה מאתגרת. דבר אחד, דיבורים לעתים קרובות סומכים על הקשר וידע משותף כדי להביע רגשות; לעוד אחד, רוב המאמרים מכילים רגשות נוטרליים בשיחות, כתוצאה מכך, הבלבול בין מספר המאמרים לא נוטרליים ובן הרבה יותר נוטרליים מחזיק ביצועי זיהוי הרגשות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שינוי מודע מודע לתנועה נוספת עם לימוד משימות רבות (KAITML) כדי להתמודד עם האתגרים האלה. ראשית, אנחנו מתכננים מנגנון תשומת לב גרף כפול כדי להשתמש בידע משותף, שמגביר את המידע הסמנטי של המילה. ואז אנחנו משתמשים בטרנספורטור עצום כדי לקוד מילים קונטקסטיים רבים. חוץ מזה, אנו הראשונים להציג את הלימודים של משימות רבות כדי להקל את הבלבול הנקודם ולכן לשפר את ביצועי זיהוי הרגשות. תוצאות ניסויים רחבות מראות שמודל KAITML שלנו מוביל את המודלים המיוחדים ביותר בחמישה קבוצות נתונים.', 'ha': "Ana ganin zura cikin mazaɓa na rubutu (ERTC) yana da wani roli mai muhimu a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu tsawo kamar ƙaramako da ido, da masu shawarar da kuma kamar haka. Kayya, ERTC yana wani aikin mai zartar da shi. Ga abu guda, masu magana ana dõgara a kan mazaunin muhimmanci da ma'anar mataimaki dõmin su bayyana hisãbi; Ga wani daban, masu ƙaranci na ƙunsa da hisia'a na'ura a cikin mazaɓa, kamar haka, gaɓancin a tsakanin magana kaɗan ne waɗanda ba'a yi gaskiya ba, kuma da sauran da ke ƙaranci, sai ya kange aikin tambuwa. A cikin wannan takardan, Munã buɗar da wani takardar Sann Kusan Incurrence TransTransformer with multi-aikin Learni (KAITML) dõmin su yi addu'a ga waɗannan muramman. Na farkon, za'a sami wani mekanin aikin karatun na dubu-daraja zuwa ga iyar da ilmi na kommunikascen, wanda yana ƙara ma'anar maganar. Sa'an nan kuma za mu yi amfani da Transformer na IncIncIncntal to kode wasu magana masu turɓãya. Kayya, mũ ne farkon mu fara da in karanta mulki-aikin da aka sauƙaƙara gaura da aka taɓa na zaman, kuma don haka ka ƙara wajen aikin tambuwa. Matarin jarrabãwa mai yawa na nuna cewa misalinmu KAITML yana samar da halin--sanar kowace misalin takis.", 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje čustev v besedilnih pogovorih (ERTC) igra pomembno vlogo v širokem naboru aplikacij, kot so rudarjenje mnenja, sistemi priporočil itd. Vendar pa je ERTC zahtevna naloga. Prvič, govorniki se pogosto zanašajo na kontekst in splošno znanje za izražanje čustev; Drugič, večina izgovorov vsebuje nevtralna čustva v pogovorih, zato zmedenost med nekaj nevtralnimi in mnogo bolj nevtralnimi izgovori omejuje sposobnost prepoznavanja čustev. V tem prispevku predlagamo nov pospeševalni transformator znanja z večopravilnim učenjem (KAITML) za reševanje teh izzivov. Najprej smo oblikovali mehanizem dvojne stopnje grafske pozornosti, da bi spodbudili splošno razumno znanje, ki povečuje semantične informacije izgovora. Nato uporabimo Incrementalni transformator za kodiranje kontekstualnih izgovorov z več obrati. Poleg tega smo prvi, ki uvajamo večopravilno učenje za ublažitev omenjene zmede in s tem še dodatno izboljšanje sposobnosti prepoznavanja čustev. Obsežni eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš model KAITML presega najsodobnejše modele v petih referenčnih naborih podatkov.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་Emotion རྟོགས་པ(ERTC)ནི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ ERTC ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགུལ་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་གཅིག་པ་ཞིག་ནི་སྐད་ཡུལ་གྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཤེས་ཚོར་ཤེས་ཀྱི་སྣང་ སྐད་ཡིག་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སླེབས་ཚུལ་ནང་གི་སྐྱེས་བའི་སེམས་ཚོར་ཡོད། འོག དང་པོ་མཉམ་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་དུས་འཕགས་པའི་དབྱིབས་རིས་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་རིས། དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་དཔེ་བསྒྱུར་རྩིས་པ་ལ་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པ་མ་འདྲ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་མ་ཡིན་པས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་སྔོན་ཤོས་བྱས་པ་དེ་མ་ཟད་པར། སེམས་ཚོར་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕར་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་། Extensive experimental results show that our KAITML model outperforms the state-of-the-art models across five benchmark datasets.'}
{'en': 'Leveraging Discourse Rewards for Document-Level Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من مكافآت الخطاب للترجمة الآلية العصبية على مستوى المستندات', 'pt': 'Aproveitando as recompensas do discurso para a tradução automática neural em nível de documento', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de las recompensas del discurso para la traducción automática neuronal a nivel de documento', 'fr': 'Tirer parti de Discourse Rewards pour la traduction automatique neuronale au niveau du document', 'ja': '文書レベルのニューラルマシン翻訳のためのディスカッション報酬の活用', 'zh': '因语奖文档神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़-स्तर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए प्रवचन पुरस्कार का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Использование вознаграждений за дискурс для нейронного машинного перевода на уровне документов', 'ga': 'Luaíochtaí Dioscúrsa a Ghiaráil le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach ar Leibhéal Doiciméad', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Beszédjutalmak kihasználása a dokumentum szintű neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση ανταμοιβών συζήτησης για νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση σε επίπεδο εγγράφου', 'it': 'Sfruttare i premi del discorso per la traduzione automatica neurale a livello di documento', 'lt': 'Už dokumentų lygio neurologinių mašinų vertimą mokamų diskurso atlyginimų didinimas', 'kk': 'Құжат- деңгейінің невралдық машинаның аудармасының тізбегін қайтару', 'mk': 'Разголемување на наградите за дискурс за преведување на неврални машини на ниво на документ', 'ms': 'Menegang Hadiah Perhubungan untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Aras Dokumen', 'ml': 'രേഖ- നില- നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Inżidu l-Qligħ tad-Diskors għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali fil-Livell tad-Dokument', 'mn': 'Документын түвшинд мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх сэтгэл хөдлөл', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktige diskursar tilbake for omsetjing av dokumentnivå', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie nagród dyskursowych za tłumaczenie neuronowe maszynowe na poziomie dokumentów', 'ro': 'Valorificarea recompenselor de discurs pentru traducerea automată neurală la nivel de document', 'sr': 'Privlaèenje diskursa za prevod neuroloških mašina na nivou dokumenta', 'si': 'දස්තාව- තත්වය න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා', 'so': 'Levering Discourse Rewards for Document-Level Neural Machine Translation', 'sv': 'Utnyttja diskursbelöningar för neural maskinöversättning på dokumentnivå', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'دکھانے والی نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے دیسکورس واپس کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Giảm quảng cáo về máy thần kinh cấp', 'bg': 'Възползване на дискурсните награди за невронен машинен превод на ниво документ', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af diskursbelønninger til Neural maskinoversættelse på dokumentniveau', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van discoursbeloningen voor neuronale machinevertaling op documentniveau', 'hr': 'Primjenjujući diskusije natrag za prevod neuroloških strojeva na nivou dokumenta', 'de': 'Nutzung von Diskursprämien für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung auf Dokumentenebene', 'id': 'Meningkatkan Hadiah Disors untuk Translation Mesin Neural Tingkat Dokumen', 'ko': '언어 보상을 이용하여 문서급 신경기계 번역', 'fa': 'بازگرداندن سخنرانی برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی سطح سند', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiurahisi', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Leveraging Discourse Rewards for Document-Level Neural Machine Translation', 'sq': 'Shkatërrimi i shpërblimeve të diskutimit për përkthimin e makinës nervore në nivelin e dokumentit', 'tr': 'Sened derejesi Nural Mazmunlar terjimesine üçin Ýüklemek Derjesi', 'hy': 'Leveraging Discourse Rewards for Document-Level Neural Machine Translation', 'az': 'D칬k칲mat-seviyy톛ti N칬ral Makinat캼 칂evirm톛si 칲칞칲n D톛st톛liyi Qeyd Et', 'bn': 'নথি- স্তর নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য লেভারেজিং ডিসার্স প্রত্যাবর্তন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Usporavanje diskursa za prevod neuroloških strojeva na nivou dokumenta', 'ca': 'Aumentar els recompenses del discurs per la traducció de màquines neuronals a nivell de documents', 'cs': 'Využití diskursních odměn za neurální strojový překlad na úrovni dokumentů', 'et': 'Diskursuse preemiate kasutamine dokumenditasemel neuroalse masintõlke eest', 'fi': 'Diskurssipalkkioiden hyödyntäminen dokumenttitason neurokääntämisestä', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje nagrad za diskurz za nevronski strojni prevod na ravni dokumenta', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'מגביר פרסי דיסקורס עבור תרגום של מכונת נוירולית ברמה מסמכים', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྐྱོད་པའི་བསམ་བཤེར་ལ་བསྐྱར་དུ་ཡིག་གེའི་གནས་རིམ་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཆས'}
{'en': 'Document-level machine translation focuses on the translation of entire documents from a source to a target language. It is widely regarded as a challenging task since the translation of the individual sentences in the document needs to retain aspects of the discourse at document level. However, document-level translation models are usually not trained to explicitly ensure discourse quality. Therefore, in this paper we propose a training approach that explicitly optimizes two established discourse metrics, lexical cohesion and coherence, by using a reinforcement learning objective. Experiments over four different language pairs and three translation domains have shown that our training approach has been able to achieve more cohesive and coherent document translations than other competitive approaches, yet without compromising the faithfulness to the reference translation. In the case of the Zh-En language pair, our method has achieved an improvement of 2.46 percentage points (pp) in LC and 1.17 pp in COH over the runner-up, while at the same time improving 0.63 pp in BLEU score and 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'ar': 'تركز الترجمة الآلية على مستوى المستند على ترجمة المستندات بأكملها من المصدر إلى اللغة الهدف. يعتبر على نطاق واسع مهمة صعبة لأن ترجمة الجمل الفردية في الوثيقة تحتاج إلى الاحتفاظ بجوانب الخطاب على مستوى الوثيقة. ومع ذلك ، لا يتم تدريب نماذج الترجمة على مستوى الوثائق عادة لضمان جودة الخطاب بشكل صريح. لذلك ، في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا تدريبيًا يحسن صراحة مقياسين للخطاب الراسخين ، التماسك المعجمي والتماسك ، باستخدام هدف التعلم المعزز. أظهرت التجارب التي أجريت على أربعة أزواج لغوية مختلفة وثلاثة مجالات ترجمة أن نهجنا التدريبي كان قادرًا على تحقيق ترجمات وثيقة أكثر تماسكًا وتماسكًا من الأساليب التنافسية الأخرى ، ولكن دون المساومة على الإخلاص للترجمة المرجعية. في حالة الزوج اللغوي Zh-En ، حققت طريقتنا تحسنًا قدره 2.46 نقطة مئوية (pp) في LC و 1.17 pp في COH على الوصيف ، بينما تحسنت في نفس الوقت 0.63 نقطة في درجة BLEU و 0.47 ص في F-BERT.', 'es': 'La traducción automática a nivel de documento se centra en la traducción de documentos completos de un idioma de origen a un idioma de destino. Se considera ampliamente como una tarea desafiante, ya que la traducción de las oraciones individuales del documento necesita conservar aspectos del discurso a nivel del documento. Sin embargo, los modelos de traducción a nivel de documento no suelen estar capacitados para garantizar explícitamente la calidad del discurso. Por lo tanto, en este artículo proponemos un enfoque de capacitación que optimiza explícitamente dos métricas del discurso establecidas, la cohesión léxica y la coherencia, mediante el uso de un objetivo de aprendizaje de refuerzo. Los experimentos realizados en cuatro combinaciones de idiomas diferentes y tres dominios de traducción han demostrado que nuestro enfoque de formación ha sido capaz de lograr traducciones de documentos más coherentes y coherentes que otros enfoques de la competencia, pero sin comprometer la fidelidad a la traducción de referencia. En el caso del par de idiomas Zh-En, nuestro método ha logrado una mejora de 2,46 puntos porcentuales (pp) en LC y 1,17 puntos porcentuales en COH con respecto al segundo lugar, mientras que al mismo tiempo mejora 0,63 puntos porcentuales en la puntuación BLEU y 0,47 puntos porcentuales en F-BERT.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática em nível de documento concentra-se na tradução de documentos inteiros de um idioma de origem para um idioma de destino. É amplamente considerado como uma tarefa desafiadora, uma vez que a tradução das frases individuais no documento precisa reter aspectos do discurso no nível do documento. No entanto, os modelos de tradução em nível de documento geralmente não são treinados para garantir explicitamente a qualidade do discurso. Portanto, neste artigo propomos uma abordagem de treinamento que otimiza explicitamente duas métricas de discurso estabelecidas, coesão e coerência lexicais, usando um objetivo de aprendizado por reforço. Experimentos em quatro pares de idiomas diferentes e três domínios de tradução mostraram que nossa abordagem de treinamento foi capaz de obter traduções de documentos mais coesas e coerentes do que outras abordagens competitivas, mas sem comprometer a fidelidade à tradução de referência. No caso do par de idiomas Zh-En, nosso método obteve uma melhora de 2,46 pontos percentuais (pp) em LC e 1,17 pp em COH em relação ao segundo colocado, ao mesmo tempo em que melhorou 0,63 pp na pontuação BLEU e 0,47 pp em F-BERT.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique au niveau du document se concentre sur la traduction de documents entiers d'une langue source vers une langue cible. Il est largement considéré comme une tâche difficile car la traduction des phrases individuelles dans le document doit conserver certains aspects du discours au niveau du document. Cependant, les modèles de traduction au niveau du document ne sont généralement pas formés pour garantir explicitement la qualité du discours. Par conséquent, dans cet article, nous proposons une approche de formation qui optimise explicitement deux métriques discursives établies, la cohésion lexicale et la cohérence, en utilisant un objectif d'apprentissage par renforcement. Des expériences sur quatre paires de langues différentes et trois domaines de traduction ont montré que notre approche de formation a permis d'obtenir des traductions de documents plus cohérentes et cohérentes que d'autres approches concurrentes, sans toutefois compromettre la fidélité de la traduction de référence. Dans le cas de la paire de langues Zh-En, notre méthode a permis d'obtenir une amélioration de 2,46 points de pourcentage (pp) en LC et de 1,17 pp en COH par rapport au deuxième, tout en améliorant en même temps 0,63 pp pour le score BLEU et 0,47 pp pour le F-BERT.", 'ja': 'ドキュメントレベルの機械翻訳は、ソースからターゲット言語へのドキュメント全体の翻訳に焦点を当てています。 文書内の個々の文章の翻訳は、文書レベルでの議論の側面を保持する必要があるため、広く難しい課題と見なされている。 しかし、文書レベルの翻訳モデルは、通常、話の質を明示的に確保するために訓練されていません。 したがって、本稿では、強化学習目標を使用して、2つの確立された対話指標である語彙のコヒーレンスとコヒーレンスを明示的に最適化するトレーニングアプローチを提案する。 4つの異なる言語ペアと3つの翻訳ドメインに関する実験は、当社のトレーニングアプローチが、他の競合的なアプローチよりも一貫性と一貫性のある文書翻訳を達成できたことを示していますが、参照翻訳への忠実性を損なうことはありません。 Zh - En言語ペアの場合、我々の方法は、LCで2.46パーセントポイント（ pp ）、COHで1.17 ppの改善を達成し、同時にBLEUスコアで0.63 pp、F - BERTで0.47 ppの改善を達成した。', 'zh': '文档级机器翻译侧重于将全文档从源语翻译成。 博以为一挑战性之任,文档中单句译,须在文档级存语者。 然文档译模常不经训练以明保质。 故于本文中,发一训练方法,以强化学,明优化二已立之语指标,词汇内聚和一致性。 四者异言三译之实验,比诸竞法,吾培训法能成更具凝聚力连贯性之文档,又不害参译之忠实。 Zh-En言是者,吾道成于LC2.46百分点(pp),COH中比亚军于1.17百分点,而加于BLEU得分0.63百分点,加于F-BERT0.47百分点。', 'ru': 'Машинный перевод на уровне документов фокусируется на переводе целых документов с исходного на целевой язык. Это широко рассматривается как сложная задача, поскольку перевод отдельных предложений в документе должен сохранять аспекты дискурса на уровне документа. Тем не менее, модели перевода на уровне документов обычно не обучены явному обеспечению качества дискурса. Поэтому в этой статье мы предлагаем подход к обучению, который явно оптимизирует две установленные метрики дискурса, лексическую сплоченность и согласованность, используя цель обучения усилению. Эксперименты над четырьмя разными языковыми парами и тремя областями перевода показали, что наш подход к обучению смог достичь более последовательных и последовательных переводов документов, чем другие конкурентные подходы, но без ущерба для точности эталонного перевода. В случае языковой пары Zh-En наш метод добился улучшения на 2,46 процентных пункта (pp) в LC и 1,17 pp в COH по сравнению с вторым, в то же время улучшив 0,63 pp в BLEU и 0,47 pp в F-BERT.', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़-स्तरीय मशीन अनुवाद एक स्रोत से लक्ष्य भाषा में संपूर्ण दस्तावेज़ों के अनुवाद पर केंद्रित है. इसे व्यापक रूप से एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य के रूप में माना जाता है क्योंकि दस्तावेज़ में व्यक्तिगत वाक्यों के अनुवाद को दस्तावेज़ स्तर पर प्रवचन के पहलुओं को बनाए रखने की आवश्यकता होती है। हालांकि, दस्तावेज़-स्तर के अनुवाद मॉडल आमतौर पर स्पष्ट रूप से प्रवचन की गुणवत्ता सुनिश्चित करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित नहीं होते हैं। इसलिए, इस पेपर में हम एक प्रशिक्षण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो स्पष्ट रूप से एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने के उद्देश्य का उपयोग करके दो स्थापित प्रवचन मैट्रिक्स, लेक्सिकल सामंजस्य और सुसंगतता को अनुकूलित करता है। चार अलग-अलग भाषा जोड़े और तीन अनुवाद डोमेन पर प्रयोगों से पता चला है कि हमारा प्रशिक्षण दृष्टिकोण अन्य प्रतिस्पर्धी दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में अधिक एकजुट और सुसंगत दस्तावेज़ अनुवाद प्राप्त करने में सक्षम रहा है, फिर भी संदर्भ अनुवाद के प्रति वफादारी से समझौता किए बिना। Zh-En भाषा जोड़ी के मामले में, हमारी विधि ने एलसी में 2.46 प्रतिशत अंक (पीपी) और उपविजेता पर सीओएच में 1.17 पीपी का सुधार हासिल किया है, जबकि एक ही समय में बीएलईयू स्कोर में 0.63 पीपी और एफ-बर्ट में 0.47 पीपी में सुधार हुआ है।', 'ga': 'Díríonn aistriúchán meaisín ar leibhéal doiciméad ar aistriú doiciméad iomlán ó fhoinse go sprioctheanga. Feictear go forleathan gur tasc dúshlánach é mar ní mór gnéithe den dioscúrsa a choinneáil ag leibhéal na cáipéise agus na habairtí aonair á n-aistriú. Mar sin féin, de ghnáth ní chuirtear oiliúint ar mhúnlaí aistriúcháin ar leibhéal doiciméad chun cáilíocht dioscúrsa a chinntiú go sainráite. Mar sin, molaimid sa pháipéar seo cur chuige oiliúna a uasmhéadaíonn go sainráite dhá mhéadracht dioscúrsa bunaithe, comhtháthú foclóireachta agus comhleanúnachas, trí úsáid a bhaint as cuspóir foghlama treisithe. Léiríonn turgnaimh thar cheithre phéire teanga éagsúla agus trí réimse aistriúcháin go raibh ár gcur chuige oiliúna in ann aistriúcháin doiciméad níos comhtháite agus níos comhtháite a bhaint amach ná cuir chuige iomaíocha eile, ach gan cur isteach ar dhílseacht an aistriúcháin tagartha. I gcás péire teanga Zh-En, tá feabhas de 2.46 pointe céatadáin (pp) bainte amach ag ár modh in LC agus 1.17 pp in COH thar an dara háit, agus ag an am céanna feabhas a chur ar 0.63 pp i scór BLEU agus 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'hu': 'A dokumentumszintű gépi fordítás a teljes dokumentumok forrásból célnyelvre történő fordítására összpontosít. Ezt széles körben kihívást jelentő feladatnak tekintik, mivel a dokumentumban szereplő egyes mondatok fordításának dokumentum szintjén meg kell őriznie a diskurzus aspektusait. A dokumentumszintű fordítási modelleket azonban általában nem képezik arra, hogy kifejezetten biztosítsák a diskurzus minőségét. Ezért ebben a tanulmányban olyan képzési megközelítést javasolunk, amely kifejezetten optimalizálja a két megalapozott diskurzusmérőt, a lexikai kohéziót és a koherenciát egy erősítő tanulási célkitűzéssel. Négy különböző nyelvpáron és három fordítási területen végzett kísérletek azt mutatták, hogy képzési megközelítésünk képes volt összetartóbb és koherensebb dokumentumfordítást elérni, mint más versenyképes megközelítések, mégis anélkül, hogy veszélyeztetné a referenciafordítás hűségét. A Zh-En nyelvpár esetében módszerünk 2,46 százalékponttal (pp) javult LC-ben és 1,17 százalékponttal a COH-ban a második helyen, ugyanakkor 0,63 százalékponttal javult BLEU-ban és 0,47 százalékponttal F-BERT-ben.', 'el': 'Η μηχανική μετάφραση σε επίπεδο εγγράφου επικεντρώνεται στη μετάφραση ολόκληρων εγγράφων από μια πηγή σε μια γλώσσα-στόχο. Θεωρείται ευρέως ως ένα δύσκολο έργο, δεδομένου ότι η μετάφραση των μεμονωμένων προτάσεων στο έγγραφο πρέπει να διατηρήσει πτυχές του λόγου σε επίπεδο εγγράφου. Ωστόσο, τα μεταφραστικά μοντέλα σε επίπεδο εγγράφων συνήθως δεν εκπαιδεύονται για να εξασφαλίσουν ρητά την ποιότητα του λόγου. Ως εκ τούτου, στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια εκπαιδευτική προσέγγιση που βελτιστοποιεί ρητά δύο καθιερωμένες μετρήσεις λόγου, τη λεξική συνοχή και τη συνοχή, χρησιμοποιώντας έναν ενισχυτικό μαθησιακό στόχο. Τα πειράματα σε τέσσερα διαφορετικά γλωσσικά ζεύγη και τρεις μεταφραστικούς τομείς έχουν δείξει ότι η εκπαιδευτική μας προσέγγιση έχει καταφέρει να επιτύχει πιο συνεκτικές και συνεκτικές μεταφράσεις εγγράφων από άλλες ανταγωνιστικές προσεγγίσεις, χωρίς όμως να διακυβεύεται η πιστότητα στη μετάφραση αναφοράς. Στην περίπτωση του γλωσσικού ζευγαριού Zh-En, η μέθοδος μας έχει επιτύχει βελτίωση των 2.46 ποσοστών (pp) σε LC και 1.17 σε COH κατά τη διάρκεια του δεύτερου, ενώ ταυτόχρονα βελτιώθηκε 0.63 σε βαθμολογία BLEU και 0.47 σε F-BERT.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის მაქსინის გადატვირთვა უფრო დოკუმენტების გადატვირთვაზე მუშაობაში მისაღების ენაზე. ეს უფრო ძალიან აღმოჩნდება როგორც შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა, რადგან დოკუმენტში ინდიველური სიტყვების გადაწყვეტილება უნდა დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის აპექტების მაგრამ, დოკუმენტის უფრო მხოლოდ შეცვლის მოდელები არიან განსწავლებელია, რომ განსწავლად დაახლოებით დეკუმენტის კაalitეტი. ამიტომ, ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა საკუთარი გავაკეთებთ საკუთარი გავაკეთება, რომელიც გამოიყენება ორი დაწყვეტილი დისკურსური მეტრიკა, ლექსიკალური კოჰეცია და შესაძლებელობა, რომე ოთხი განსხვავებული ენის ზოგები და სამი განსხვავებული დომენების გამოცდილებები გამოჩნდა, რომ ჩვენი განსხვავებული განსხვავება უფრო კონექციური და კონექციური დომენტის განსხვავება შეუძლებელია, მაგრამ განსხვავებული Zh-En ენის ზოგის შემთხვევაში, ჩვენი მეტი 2,46 პროცენტის წერტილი (pp) LC და 1,17 პროცენტის COH-ში პროცენტის შესაძლებლობა, მაგრამ ერთი დროში 0,63 პროცენტის შესაძლებლობა BLEU წერტილი და 0,47 პროცენტის F-BERT-ში.', 'it': 'La traduzione automatica a livello di documento si concentra sulla traduzione di interi documenti da una fonte a una lingua di destinazione. È ampiamente considerato un compito impegnativo poiché la traduzione delle singole frasi nel documento deve mantenere gli aspetti del discorso a livello di documento. Tuttavia, i modelli di traduzione a livello di documento di solito non sono formati per garantire esplicitamente la qualità del discorso. Pertanto, in questo articolo proponiamo un approccio formativo che ottimizzi esplicitamente due metriche di discorso consolidate, coesione lessicale e coerenza, utilizzando un obiettivo di apprendimento di rinforzo. Esperimenti su quattro diverse coppie linguistiche e tre domini di traduzione hanno dimostrato che il nostro approccio formativo è stato in grado di ottenere traduzioni di documenti più coese e coerenti rispetto ad altri approcci competitivi, senza però compromettere la fedeltà alla traduzione di riferimento. Nel caso della coppia linguistica Zh-En, il nostro metodo ha ottenuto un miglioramento di 2,46 punti percentuali (pp) in LC e 1,17 pp in COH rispetto al secondo classificato, migliorando allo stesso tempo 0,63 pp nel punteggio BLEU e 0,47 pp in F-BERT.', 'lt': 'Dokumentų lygio mašininis vertimas daugiausia dėmesio skiria visų dokumentų vertimui iš šaltinio į tikslinę kalbą. Tai plačiai laikoma sudėtinga užduotimi, nes atskirų sakinių vertimas dokumente turi išlaikyti diskurso aspektus dokumentų lygmeniu. Tačiau dokumentų vertimo modeliai paprastai nėra mokomi aiškiai užtikrinti diskurso kokybę. Therefore, in this paper we propose a training approach that explicitly optimizes two established discourse metrics, lexical cohesion and coherence, by using a reinforcement learning objective.  Eksperimentai su keturiomis skirtingomis kalbų poromis ir trimis vertimo sritimis parodė, kad mūsų mokymo metodas sugebėjo pasiekti nuoseklesnius ir nuoseklesnius dokumentų vertimus nei kiti konkurenciniai metodai, tačiau nekeliant pavojaus patikimumui vertimui nuoroda. Zh-En kalbos poros atveju mūsų metodas pasiekė 2,46 procentinio punkto (pp) pagerėjimą LC ir 1,17 procentinio punkto COH, palyginti su pradiniu bandymu, tuo pat metu pagerėjo 0,63 procentinio punkto BLEU ir 0,47 procentinio punkto F-BERT.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin aras dokumen fokus pada terjemahan seluruh dokumen dari sumber ke bahasa sasaran. Ia dipertimbangkan secara luas sebagai tugas mencabar kerana terjemahan kalimat individu dalam dokumen perlu menyimpan aspek diskors pada aras dokumen. Namun, model terjemahan-aras dokumen biasanya tidak dilatih untuk memastikan kualiti diskors secara eksplicit. Oleh itu, dalam kertas ini kami cadangkan pendekatan latihan yang secara eksplicit optimizasikan dua metrik diskors yang ditetapkan, persatuan leksikal dan persatuan, dengan menggunakan objektif pembelajaran kuasa. Eksperimen lebih dari empat pasangan bahasa yang berbeza dan tiga domain terjemahan telah menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan latihan kita telah mampu mencapai terjemahan dokumen yang lebih konsisten dan konsisten daripada pendekatan kompetitif lain, tetapi tanpa membahayakan kesetiaan kepada terjemahan rujukan. In the case of the Zh-En language pair, our method has achieved an improvement of 2.46 percentage points (pp) in LC and 1.17 pp in COH over the runner-up, while at the same time improving 0.63 pp in BLEU score and 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'kk': 'Құжат деңгейіндегі машинаның аударуы көзінен мақсатты тіліне толық құжаттарды аударуға назар аударады. Бұл құжаттың әрбір сөйлемелерін аудару үшін құжаттың деңгейінде дискурстың қасиеттерін сақтау керек. Бірақ құжаттың деңгейіндегі аудару үлгілері әдетте дискурстардың сапатын таңдау үшін оқылмайды. Сондықтан, бұл қағазда біз екі жасалған дискурстың метрикалық, лексикалық соғыстық және соғыстық мақсатын қолдану арқылы оқыту тәртібін қолданатын оқыту тәсілігін таңдаймыз. Төрт түрлі тіл екі және үш аудармалы домендердің тәжірибесін көрсетеді, біздің оқыту тәсіліміміздің басқа жағдайдағы жағдайдан басқа жағдайдағы құжаттардың аудармаларына арналған, бірақ сілтеменің аудармаларына сен Ж-Эн тілдерінің екі болса, біздің әдіміміз LC және COH жүйесінде 2,46 пайызын (пт) және 1,17 пт жүйесінде орындаушы үшін жұмыс істеді, бірақ бір уақытта BLEU нәтижесінде 0,63 пт жұмыс істейді және F-BERT нәтижесінде 0,47 пт жаса', 'mk': 'Document-level machine translation focuses on the translation of entire documents from a source to a target language.  Тоа е широко сметано за предизвикувачка задача бидејќи преведувањето на индивидуалните реченици во документот мора да задржи аспекти на дискурсот на ниво на документот. Сепак, моделите на превод на ниво на документи обично не се обучени за експлицитно осигурување на дискурсниот квалитет. Затоа, во овој документ предложуваме пристап на обука кој експлицитно оптимизира две воспоставени дискурсни метрики, лексичка кохезија и кохезија, со употреба на цел на зајакнување на учењето. Експериментите над четири различни јазички парови и три домени на превод покажаа дека нашиот пристап на обука успеал да постигне покохезивни и кохезивни преводи на документи отколку други конкурентни пристапи, но без да ја компромитира верноста кон референцискиот превод. Во случајот на парот јазик Zh-En, нашиот метод постигна подобрување од 2,46 процентни поени (pp) во ЛЦ и 1,17 поени во КОХ во однос на почетокот, истовремено подобрувајќи 0,63 поени во БЛЕУ поени и 0,47 поени во Ф-БЕРТ.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni bil-magna fil-livell tad-dokument tiffoka fuq it-traduzzjoni ta’ dokumenti sħa ħ minn sors għal lingwa fil-mira. Huwa meqjus b’mod wiesa’ bħala kompitu ta’ sfida peress li t-traduzzjoni tas-sentenzi individwali fid-dokument teħtieġ iżżomm aspetti tad-diskors fil-livell tad-dokument. Madankollu, mudelli ta’ traduzzjoni fil-livell tad-dokument normalment mhumiex imħarrġa biex jiżguraw b’mod espliċitu l-kwalità tad-diskors. Għaldaqstant, f’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu approċċ ta’ taħriġ li joptimizza b’mod espliċitu żewġ metriċi stabbiliti ta’ diskors, koeżjoni lexika u koerenza, bl-użu ta’ objettiv ta’ tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar. Experiments over four different language pairs and three translation domains have shown that our training approach has been able to achieve more cohesive and coherent document translations than other competitive approaches, yet without compromising the faithfulness to the reference translation.  Fil-każ tal-par tal-lingwa Zh-En, il-metodu tagħna kiseb titjib ta’ 2.46 punti perċentwali (pp) f’LC u 1.17 pp f’COH matul il-bidu, filwaqt li fl-istess ħin tejjeb 0.63 pp fil-punteġġ BLEU u 0.47 pp f’F-BERT.', 'ml': 'രേഖയില്\u200d നിന്നും ലക്ഷ്യമായ ഭാഷയിലേക്കു് മുഴുവന്\u200d രേഖകളുടെയും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d രേഖപ്പെടുത്ത രേഖയിലെ വാക്കുകളുടെ വ്യക്തിപരമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d രേഖയിലെ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d രേഖ However, document-level translation models are usually not trained to explicitly ensure discourse quality.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരിശീലന നടപടി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. വ്യക്തമായി സംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട രണ്ട് സംസാരം, ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d കൂട്ടുക നാലു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഭാഷ ജോട്ടികള്\u200dക്കും മൂന്നു പരിഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും മുകള്\u200d Zh-En ഭാഷ ജോടിയുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d 2.46 ശതമാന പോയിന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d (pp) 2.46 ശതമാന പോയിന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. 1.17 പ്പിന്\u200dറെയും കോഹില്\u200d നിന്നും 1.17 പിന്ന', 'no': 'Comment Det vert veldig betra som eit vanskeleg oppgåve sidan omsetjinga av dei individuelle setningane i dokumentet må lagra aspektane av diskursane på dokumentnivå. Men dokumentnivåomsetjingsmodular er vanlegvis ikkje utlært for å sikre på diskurskvalitet. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein treningstilnærming som eksplisivt optimaliserer to utvalde diskursmetriske, leksiske kohesisjon og koherens ved å bruka eit styrke læringsmål. Eksperiment over fire forskjellige språkopar og tre omsetjingsdområde har vist at treningstilnærminga vårt er i stand til å oppnå meir kohesitiv og koherent dokumentomsetjingar enn andre konkurentære tilnærmingar, men utan å komprimere godkjenninga til referansomsetjinga. I tillegg til språkpåret Zh-En har metoden vårt oppnådd en forbedring av 2,46 prosentpunkt (pp) i LC og 1,17 pp i COH over køyrer-opp, mens samtidig forbedring av 0,63 pp i BLEU-poeng og 0,47 pp i F-BERT.', 'mn': 'Документын түвшинд машин хөрөнгө оруулалт нь эх үүсвэрээс зорилготой хэл руу бүх баримтын хөрөнгө оруулдаг. Үүнийг баримтын хэлбэрүүдийн хөгжлийн хэлбэрүүдийг бичгийн түвшинд байлгах хэрэгтэй болсон учраас үүнийг маш хэцүү ажил гэж үздэг. Гэхдээ баримт түвшинд орчуулах загварууд ярианы сайн байдлыг тодорхой байлгахын тулд тодорхой багшлах боломжгүй. Тиймээс энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр бүтээгдэхүүний метрик, лексикийн хамтын тусламжтай холбоотой суралцах зорилго ашигласнаар суралцах арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Дөрвөн өөр хэл хоёрын туршилтын туршилт болон гурван орчуулагч хэлбэрийн талаар бидний дасгал хөгжлийн арга баримт бусад өрсөлдөөний арга баримтуудаас илүү нийгмийн болон нийгмийн баримт орчуулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулсан. Гэхдээ бидний да Ж-Эн хэл хоёрын хувьд бидний арга нь LC-д 2.46 хувь цэг (pp) болон COH-д 1.17 цэг нэмэгдсэн бөгөөд одоогийн хувьд BLEU-н тоо 0.63 цэг нэмэгдсэн бөгөөд F-BERT-д 0.47 цэг нэмэгдсэн.', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie maszynowe na poziomie dokumentów koncentruje się na tłumaczeniu całych dokumentów z języka źródłowego na język docelowy. Jest to powszechnie uważane za trudne zadanie, ponieważ tłumaczenie poszczególnych zdań w dokumencie musi zachować aspekty dyskursu na poziomie dokumentu. Jednak modele tłumaczeń na poziomie dokumentów zwykle nie są szkolone w celu wyraźnego zapewnienia jakości dyskursu. Dlatego w niniejszym artykule proponujemy podejście szkoleniowe, które wyraźnie optymalizuje dwie ustalone wskaźniki dyskursu, spójność leksykalną i spójność, wykorzystując cel uczenia się wzmacniający. Eksperymenty dotyczące czterech różnych par językowych i trzech dziedzin tłumaczeń pokazały, że nasze podejście szkoleniowe udało się osiągnąć bardziej spójne i spójne tłumaczenia dokumentów niż inne podejścia konkurencyjne, nie naruszając jednak wierności tłumaczenia referencyjnego. W przypadku pary językowej Zh-En nasza metoda osiągnęła poprawę 2,46 punktów procentowych (pp) w LC i 1,17 pp w COH w drugim miejscu, jednocześnie poprawę 0,63 pp w wyniku BLEU i 0,47 pp w F-BERT.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată la nivel de document se concentrează pe traducerea documentelor întregi de la o sursă la o limbă țintă. Este considerată pe scară largă ca o sarcină dificilă, deoarece traducerea frazelor individuale din document trebuie să păstreze aspecte ale discursului la nivel de document. Cu toate acestea, modelele de traducere la nivel de document nu sunt de obicei instruite pentru a asigura în mod explicit calitatea discursului. Prin urmare, în această lucrare propunem o abordare de formare care optimizează în mod explicit două metrice de discurs stabilite, coeziunea lexicală și coerența, prin utilizarea unui obiectiv de învățare de consolidare. Experimentele pe patru perechi de limbi diferite și trei domenii de traducere au arătat că abordarea noastră de formare a fost capabilă să obțină traduceri de documente mai coezive și coerente decât alte abordări competitive, fără a compromite fidelitatea traducerii de referință. În cazul perechii de limbi Zh-En, metoda noastră a obținut o îmbunătățire de 2,46 puncte procentuale (pp) în LC și 1,17 puncte procentuale în COH față de locul doi, în același timp îmbunătățind 0,63 puncte procentuale în scorul BLEU și 0,47 puncte procentuale în F-BERT.', 'sr': 'Prevedenje stroja na nivou dokumenta fokusira se na prevod celih dokumenta iz izvora na ciljni jezik. To se široko smatra izazovnim zadatkom jer prevod individualnih rečenica u dokumentu treba zadržati aspekte diskursa na nivou dokumenta. Međutim, modeli prevođenja na nivou dokumenta obično nisu obučeni da bi se pojasno osigurala kvalitet diskursa. Stoga, u ovom papiru predlažemo pristup obuke koji isključivo optimizira dva utvrđena diskurska metrika, leksičku koheziju i saskaņost, koristeći cilj pojačanja učenja. Eksperimenti preko četiri različite jezičke parove i tri domena prevođenja pokazali su da je naš pristup obuke bio u mogućnosti ostvariti kohezivniji i saskaņotniji prevoz dokumenta od drugih konkurentnih pristupa, a ipak bez ugrožavanja vjernosti prema referentnim prevođenju. U slučaju paira jezika Ž-En, naš metod je postigao poboljšanje od 2,46 procentnih bodova (pp) u LC i 1,17 pp u COH tokom pokretača, dok je u isto vreme poboljšanje 0,63 pp u BLEU rezultatu i 0,47 pp u F-BERT.', 'si': 'ලිපින්ත- මට්ටම් පණිවිධ පණිවිධ පණිවිධ පණිවිධ පණිවිධියක් ඉලක්ෂ භාෂාවෙන්  ඒක විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න වැඩක් විදිහට හිතන්නේ විශේෂ වචනයක් විදිහට ලොකුණු ස්තූතියේ කතාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියා නමුත්, වාර්තාව- ලේවල් වාර්තාව මදුල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැහැ වාර්තාවේ කතාවේ කුණු ඉතින්, මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ස්ථාපිත කතාවක් දෙකක්, ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක වෙනස් භාෂාවක් සහ භාෂාවක් සහ භාෂාවක් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා අපේ ප්\u200dරේෂණාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය වාර්තාවක් විත ජී-එන් භාෂාවක් ජෝඩාවක් වලින්, අපේ විදියට LC වලින් 2.46 ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ (pp) සහ COH වලින් 1.17 pp වලින් ක්\u200dරියානර් උපකරණය වලින්', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha dukumenti-level machine-translation focuses on the translation of all documents from a source to a target language. Sida darteed waxaa loo baahan yahay in turjumaadda erayada shakhsiga ah ee dukumentiga lagu jiro uu ku haysto qeybaha hadalka heerka dukumentiga. Si kastaba ha ahaatee samooyinka turjumaadda ee dukumentiga sida caadiga ah looma baranayo si cad looga caddeeyo takhasuska hadalka. Sidaa darteed warqaddan waxaynu ku soo jeedaynaa qaab waxbarasho oo bayaan u baranaya laba qaab oo hadal dhisan, isku xiriir lexico iyo isku xiriir ah, si loo isticmaalo goal barashada. Imtixaanka ka badan afar labo oo kala duduwan iyo saddex meelood oo turjumista ah waxay tuseen in qaababka waxbarashada ay gaadhi karto turjumaadyo ka badan oo ka mid ah qaabilaada kale ee iskutallaabta ah, laakiin aan kharribin aaminnimada turjumaadda referanshaha. Haddii ay ku dhacdo labada luqada Zh-En, qaabkanagu wuxuu gaadhay hagaajinta boqolkiiba 2.46 (pp) in LC iyo 1.17 pp in COH ku qoran runner-up, isla markaasna uu horumarinayo 0.63 pp in BLEU score iyo 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'sv': 'Maskinöversättning på dokumentnivå fokuserar på översättning av hela dokument från en källa till ett målspråk. Det anses allmänt som en utmanande uppgift eftersom översättningen av de enskilda meningarna i dokumentet behöver behålla aspekter av diskursen på dokumentnivå. Dock är översättningsmodeller på dokumentnivå vanligtvis inte utbildade för att uttryckligen säkerställa diskurskvalitet. Därför föreslår vi i denna uppsats ett utbildningstillvägagångssätt som uttryckligen optimerar två etablerade diskursmått, lexikal sammanhållning och samstämmighet, genom att använda ett förstärkt inlärningsmål. Experiment över fyra olika språkpar och tre översättningsområden har visat att vårt utbildningstillvägagångssätt har lyckats uppnå mer sammanhängande och sammanhängande dokumentöversättningar än andra konkurrenskraftiga tillvägagångssätt, men utan att kompromissa med trovärdigheten till referensöversättningen. När det gäller Zh-En språkparet har vår metod uppnått en förbättring på 2,46 procentenheter (pp) i LC och 1,17 procentenheter i COH över tvåa plats, samtidigt som vi förbättrat 0,63 procentenheter i BLEU-poäng och 0,47 procentenheter i F-BERT.', 'ta': 'ஆவண- நிலை இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்றி மொழிமாற்றியின் மொழிமாற்றியை மொழிமாற்றும் முழு ஆவணங்களின் மீது focus ஆவணத்தில் உள்ள தனியார் வாக்கியங்களின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு வார்த்தைகளை ஆவண நிலையில் பேச்சின் விளைவுகளை வைத்துக் கொள்ள வே ஆயினும், ஆவண- நிலை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரிகள் பொதுவாக பேச்சு தரம் உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்கு பயிற்சிக்கப்பட எனவே, இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டை நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட இரண்டு பேச்சு மெட்ரிக்கள், லெக்சிக் கூட்டுதல் மற்றும் ஒன்றிணைப்பதை  நான்கு மேற்பட்ட மொழி ஜோடி மற்றும் மூன்று மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தளங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எங்கள் பயிற்சி செயல்பாடு மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை  Zh-En மொழி ஜோடி விஷயத்தில், எங்கள் முறைமை LC ல் 2. 46 சதவிகிதம் புள்ளிகள் (pp) மற்றும் COH ல் 1. 17 pp மேலே மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது, அதே நேரத்தில் 0. 63 pp பில் BLEU மதிப்பு மேம்படுத்தும் மற்றும் F- B', 'ur': 'Document-level machine translation focuses on the translation of a whole document from a source to a target language. یہ دکھائیٹ میں ایک شخصی جماعت کی ترجمہ کی وجہ سے ایک مشکل کام کی طرح سمجھا جاتا ہے کہ دکھائیٹ سطح میں صحبت کی حفاظت رکھنے کی ضرورت ہے. لیکن، دفتر-سطح کی ترجمہ موڈل معمولاً صحبت کی کیفیت کو مضبوط طور پر ثابت کرنے کے لئے تعلیم نہیں کی جاتی۔ لہٰذا ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک تدریس طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو صریح طور پر دو مضبوط صحبت متریک، لکسیکی تعلق اور تعلق کے مطابق مضبوط طریقہ سے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ چار مختلف زبان جوڑوں اور تین ترجمہ دامنوں کے تجربے دکھائے گئے ہیں کہ ہماری تعلیم کی تقریبا بہت مشکل اور مشکل سند ترجمہ کرنے کی قادر ہے اور دوسری مسابقات کی تقریبا سے بھی، لیکن اس کے خلاف اس ترجمہ کی تعلیم کا اعتبار نہیں ہے۔ Zh-En زبان جوڑے کے مطابق، ہمارا طریقہ LC میں 2.46 فیصد پوینٹ (pp) اور COH میں 1.17 پوینٹ (pp) پر چلنے والی اوپر پہنچا گیا ہے، حالانکہ اس کے مطابق BLEU score میں 0.63 پوینٹ (pp) اور 0.47 پوینٹ (pp) کو F-BERT میں improving کیا گیا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Bản dịch cơ bản cấp tài liệu tập trung vào việc dịch to àn bộ tài liệu từ nguồn đến ngôn ngữ đích. Nó được coi là một nhiệm vụ đầy thử thách bởi vì việc dịch ra các câu cá nhân trong tài liệu cần phải giữ lại các khía cạnh của buổi diễn thuyết ở mức độ tài liệu. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình dịch cấp tài liệu thường không được đào tạo để đảm bảo tính chất. Do đó, trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp huấn luyện rõ ràng tối đa hai âm lượng ngôn ngữ đã được thiết lập, tín hiệu và sự đồng bộ bằng cách dùng một mục tiêu học tập củng cố. Thí nghiệm trên bốn cặp ngôn ngữ khác nhau và ba lĩnh vực dịch chuyển đã cho thấy rằng phương pháp huấn luyện của chúng ta đã có thể đạt đến một cách dịch văn bản đông đúc và hợp lệ hơn nhiều so với các phương pháp cạnh tranh khác nhau, mà không ảnh hưởng đến lòng trung thành với dịch tham chiếu. Trong trường hợp của cặp ngôn ngữ Zhang, phương pháp của chúng ta đã tiến triển khả năng nâng cao 2.46 phần trăm điểm chung (pp) trong LC và 1.17 pp trong COH trên dòng chảy, đồng thời nâng cao 0.63 pp trong số lượng chẵn và 0.47 trong F-BERT.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info Lekin, dokument- daraja tarjima modellari odatda suhbat sifatini tasdiqlash uchun foydalanmaydi. Shunday qilib, bu qogʻozda, biz ikkita tashkilotlar metrik, leksikal birlashtirish va bir qanchalik foydalanishni qo'shish mumkin. Tafsilotlar to'rt tillar ikki xil va uchta tarjima domenezni ko'rsatadi, bizning trening usuli boshqa murakkab hujjatlarning tarjimalarini boshqa murakkab qiladigan usullardan ko'proq tarjima qilishga ega bo'ladi, ammo o o'tkazlik tarjimalarining faqatini qo'shishmaydi. Zh-En tilning ikki xil bo'lsa, bizning usuli LC'da 2.46 foiz (pp) va COH yuqoriga 1.17 p'ni o'zgartiradi, va shu paytida BLEU scorida 0.63 pp yaxshi ko'paydi va F-BERT'da 0.47 p'ni o'zgartiradi.", 'nl': 'Machinevertaling op documentniveau richt zich op de vertaling van volledige documenten van een bron naar een doeltaal. Het wordt algemeen beschouwd als een uitdagende taak, aangezien de vertaling van de afzonderlijke zinnen in het document aspecten van het discours op documentniveau moet behouden. Vertaalmodellen op documentniveau worden echter meestal niet getraind om expliciet de kwaliteit van het discours te waarborgen. Daarom stellen we in dit artikel een trainingsaanpak voor die twee gevestigde discoursmetrics, lexicale cohesie en coherentie, expliciet optimaliseert door gebruik te maken van een versterkende leerdoelstelling. Experimenten met vier verschillende taalparen en drie vertaaldomeinen hebben aangetoond dat onze trainingsaanpak in staat is geweest om meer samenhangende en coherente documentvertalingen te bereiken dan andere concurrerende benaderingen, maar zonder afbreuk te doen aan de trouw aan de referentievertaling. In het geval van het Zh-En taalpaar heeft onze methode een verbetering bereikt van 2.46 procentpunten (pp) in LC en 1.17 pp in COH over de tweede plaats, terwijl tegelijkertijd 0.63 pp in BLEU score en 0.47 pp in F-BERT verbetert.', 'hr': 'Prevod stroja na razini dokumenta fokusira se na prevod cijelih dokumenta iz izvora na ciljni jezik. To se široko smatra izazovnim zadatkom jer prevod pojedinačnih rečenica u dokumentu mora zadržati aspekte diskusije na razini dokumenta. Međutim, modeli prevoda na razini dokumenta obično nisu obučeni kako bi se pojasno osigurala kvalitet diskusija. Stoga, u ovom papiru predlažemo pristup obuke koji explicitno optimizira dva utvrđena diskurska metrika, leksičku koheziju i saskaņost, koristeći cilj učenja pojačanja. Eksperimenti preko četiri različite jezičke pare i tri domena prevoda pokazali su da je naš pristup obuke uspio postići sasluženiji i sasluženiji prevod dokumenta od drugih konkurentnih pristupa, a ipak bez ugrožavanja vjernosti referentnom prevodu. U slučaju paira jezika Zh-En, naš metod je postigao poboljšanje od 2,46 procentnih točka (pp) u LC i 1,17 pp u COH tijekom pokretača, dok je u isto vrijeme poboljšanje 0,63 pp u BLEU rezultatu i 0,47 pp u F-BERT-u.', 'da': 'Maskinoversættelse på dokumentniveau fokuserer på oversættelse af hele dokumenter fra en kilde til et målsprog. Det betragtes bredt som en udfordrende opgave, da oversættelsen af de enkelte sætninger i dokumentet skal bevare aspekter af diskursen på dokumentniveau. Imidlertid er oversættelsesmodeller på dokumentniveau normalt ikke uddannet til eksplicit at sikre diskurskvalitet. Derfor foreslår vi i denne artikel en træningstilgang, der eksplicit optimerer to etablerede diskursmetrics, leksikisk samhørighed og sammenhæng, ved hjælp af et forstærket læringsmål. Eksperimenter over fire forskellige sprogpar og tre oversættelsesområder har vist, at vores uddannelsestilgang har været i stand til at opnå mere sammenhængende og sammenhængende dokumentoversættelser end andre konkurrencemæssige tilgange, men uden at gå på kompromis med troværdigheden af referenceoversættelsen. I tilfælde af Zh-En sprogparret har vores metode opnået en forbedring på 2,46 procentpoint (pp) i LC og 1,17 procentpoint i COH over andenpladsen, samtidig med at vi har forbedret 0,63 procentpoint i BLEU score og 0,47 procentpoint i F-BERT.', 'bg': 'Машинният превод на ниво документ се фокусира върху превода на цели документи от източник на целеви езици. Тя е широко разглеждана като предизвикателна задача, тъй като преводът на отделните изречения в документа трябва да запази аспектите на дискурса на ниво документ. Въпреки това, моделите на превод на ниво документи обикновено не са обучени, за да гарантират изрично качеството на дискурса. Ето защо в настоящата статия предлагаме обучителен подход, който изрично оптимизира две установени дискурсни показатели, лексикално сближаване и съгласуваност, като използва цел за укрепване на обучението. Експерименти в четири различни езикови двойки и три области на превода показаха, че нашият обучителен подход е способен да постигне по-последователни и съгласувани преводи на документи в сравнение с други конкурентни подходи, но без да компрометира вярността към референтния превод. В случая с езиковата двойка Ж-Ен методът ни постигна подобрение от 2,46 процентни пункта (стр.) в ЛК и 1,17 стр. в КОХ спрямо второто място, като същевременно подобри 0,63 стр. в резултат на БЛЕУ и 0,47 стр. в Ф-БЕРТ.', 'de': 'Die maschinelle Übersetzung auf Dokumentenebene konzentriert sich auf die Übersetzung ganzer Dokumente von einer Ausgangssprache in eine Zielsprache. Es wird allgemein als herausfordernde Aufgabe angesehen, da die Übersetzung der einzelnen Sätze im Dokument Aspekte des Diskurses auf Dokumentenebene beibehalten muss. Allerdings werden Übersetzungsmodelle auf Dokumentenebene meist nicht trainiert, um die Qualität des Diskurses explizit sicherzustellen. Daher schlagen wir in diesem Beitrag einen Trainingsansatz vor, der zwei etablierte Diskursmetriken, lexikalische Kohäsion und Kohärenz, explizit optimiert, indem ein Verstärkungs-Lernziel verwendet wird. Experimente mit vier verschiedenen Sprachpaaren und drei Übersetzungsbereichen haben gezeigt, dass unser Schulungsansatz in der Lage war, kohärentere und kohärentere Dokumentenübersetzungen als andere wettbewerbsfähige Ansätze zu erzielen, ohne dabei die Treue zur Referenzübersetzung zu beeinträchtigen. Im Falle des Zh-En Sprachpaares hat unsere Methode eine Verbesserung von 2,46 Prozentpunkten (pp) in LC und 1,17 pp in COH über den zweiten Platz erreicht, während gleichzeitig 0,63 pp in BLEU Score und 0,47 pp in F-BERT verbessert wurde.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin tingkat dokumen fokus pada terjemahan seluruh dokumen dari sumber ke bahasa sasaran. It is widely regarded as a challenging task since the translation of the individual sentences in the document needs to retain aspects of the discourse at document level.  Namun, model terjemahan tingkat dokumen biasanya tidak dilatih untuk secara eksplicit memastikan kualitas diskors. Oleh karena itu, di kertas ini kami mengusulkan pendekatan pelatihan yang secara eksplisit optimisasi dua metrik diskors yang ditetapkan, koeksi lexik dan koerensi, dengan menggunakan tujuan pembelajaran pemerintahan. Eksperimen lebih dari empat pasangan bahasa yang berbeda dan tiga domain terjemahan telah menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan latihan kita telah mampu mencapai terjemahan dokumen yang lebih koerente dan lebih koerente daripada pendekatan kompetitif lainnya, namun tanpa membahayakan kesetiaan pada terjemahan referensi. Dalam kasus pasangan bahasa Zh-En, metode kami telah mencapai peningkatan 2,46 poin persentasi (pp) di LC dan 1,17 poin COH di atas runner-up, sementara pada saat yang sama meningkatkan 0,63 poin di BLEU skor dan 0,47 poin di F-BERT.', 'fa': 'ترجمه دستگاه سطح سند روی ترجمه کل سند از یک منبع به یک زبان هدف تمرکز می\u200cکند. از زمانی که ترجمه جمله\u200cهای شخصی در سند نیاز به حفظ نقطه\u200cهای صحبت در سطح سند است، آن را به عنوان یک کار سخت\u200cکننده نگاه می\u200cکند. ولی مدلهای ترجمه سطح سند معمولاً برای مطمئن کردن کیفیت صحبت آموزش نمی\u200cشوند. بنابراین، در این کاغذ ما یک روش آموزش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از هدف یادگیری افزایش دو صحبت متریک، تعلق زبانی و هماهنگی استفاده می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهای بیش از چهار جفت زبان متفاوت و سه دامنه ترجمه\u200cها نشان داده\u200cاند که دستور آموزش ما قادر به ترجمه\u200cهای سند\u200cهای متقابل و هماهنگ\u200cتر از طریق\u200cهای دیگر رقابت\u200cکننده\u200cای است، ولی بدون توجه به ترجمه\u200cی اعتماد به ترجمه\u200cای است. در مورد جفت زبان Zh-En، روش ما به بهترین نقطه ۲.۴۴ درصد (pp) در LC و ۱.۱۷ pp در COH در حالی که در آن زمان به بهترین نقطه BLEU 0.63 pp و 0.47 pp در F-BERT رسیده است.', 'ko': '문서급 기계번역은 전체 문서를 원본 언어에서 목표 언어로 번역하는 데 중심을 두었다.이것은 문서의 한 문장을 번역하는 데 문서 단계에서 문장의 각 방면을 보존해야 하기 때문에 도전적인 임무로 널리 여겨진다.그러나 문서급의 번역 모델은 일반적으로 교육을 거치지 않고 문장의 질을 명확하게 확보한다.따라서 본고에서 우리는 학습 목표를 강화하고 기존의 두 가지 문장 지표, 즉 어휘의 연결과 연관성을 현식으로 최적화하는 훈련 방법을 제시했다.네 가지 서로 다른 언어가 세 가지 번역 분야에 대한 실험에서 우리의 교육 방법은 다른 경쟁 방법보다 더욱 응집력과 일관성을 가진 문서 번역을 실현할 수 있으나 참고 번역문에 대한 충실성에 영향을 주지 않는다.Zh-En 언어가 맞는 상황에서 우리의 방법은 LC에서 2.46%포인트, COH에서 1.17%포인트 각각 높인 동시에 BLEU 점수와 F-BERT 점수에서 각각 0.63%포인트, 0.47%포인트 높아졌다.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine yenye kiwango cha dokumentari inalenga kutafsiri nyaraka zote kutoka chanzo kwenda lugha ya lengo. Inachukuliwa sana kama jukumu la changamoto kwa kuwa tafsiri ya sentensi binafsi katika nyaraka inahitaji kubaki mambo ya mazungumzo hayo kwa kiwango cha nyaraka. Hata hivyo, mifano ya tafsiri yenye kiwango cha dokumentari mara nyingi huwa hazifundishwa kwa ajili ya kuhakikisha wazi usawa wa mazungumzo. Kwa hiyo, katika gazeti hili tunapendekeza mbinu za mafunzo ambazo zinawezesha wazi mbili za mazungumzo yaliyotengenezwa, ushirikiano wa leo na ushirikiano, kwa kutumia lengo la kujifunza kuimarisha. Majaribio zaidi ya wanandoa wanne tofauti wa lugha na maeneo matatu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu ya mafunzo imeweza kupata tafsiri zaidi ya utaratibu na pamoja zaidi ya mbinu nyingine za ushindani, lakini bado bila kuingia imani ya tafsiri ya maoni. In the case of the Zh-En language pair, our method has achieved an improvement of 2.46 percentage points (pp) in LC and 1.17 pp in COH over the runner-up, while at the same time improving 0.63 pp in BLEU score and 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'tr': 'Sened derejesi maşynyň terjimesine tüm senediň terjimesine görkez. Senediň sözleriniň terjime edilmesinden bäri a ňsat täsirli zady diýip görýär. Ýöne, sened derejesi terjime nusgalary diskusiýanyň keyfiyetini bozmak üçin adatça terjime edilmez. Şol sebäpli, bu kagyzda biz 2 dürli diskusiýa metriklerini, leksik kohesiýasyny we hereketlenmegi ulanarak, ukyp taýýarlanan bir golaýy teklip edýäris. Dört dürli dil çift we üç terjime sahalarynyň denminatlaryna görä biziň bilim metodumyzyň başga ýaryşy golaýyndan has gowy we ýeterli sened terjime edip bilýändigini görkezilýär, ýöne Referans terjime etmäge ynamlylygymyz ýok edip bilýär. Zh', 'am': 'Document-level machine translation focuses on the translation of all documents from a source to a target language. ሰነድ ውስጥ ካለው የግንኙነት ቃላት መግለጫ በሥርዓት ደረጃ ውስጥ ያሉትን የአካባቢ ቃላት መግለጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሰነድ-ደረጃ ትርጉም ዓይነቶች በተለየ ንግግር ጥሩ እንዲያረጋግጡ አይጠቅሙም፡፡ ስለዚህም በዚህ ካላት፣ ሁለት የተከፈቱትን ንግግር፣ የሊክሲካዊ ስብስብ እና ተማሪ አካባቢ በመጠቀም የተለየውን ትምህርት አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከአራት ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ሁለት እና ሦስት ትርጓሜዎች ላይ ፈተናዎች የግንኙነታችንን ሥርዓት ከሌሎች ተቃዋሚዎች ማግኘት የሚችል እና አብዛኛነት የሰነድ ትርጓሜዎችን ማግኘት እንዲችል አግኝቷል፡፡ In the case of the Zh-En language pair, our method has achieved an improvement of 2.46 percentage points (pp) in LC and 1.17 pp in COH over the runner-up, while at the same time improving 0.63 pp in BLEU score and 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'af': "Dokumentvlak masjien vertaling fokus op die vertaling van hele dokumente van 'n bron na' n doel taal. Dit is baie aangesien as 'n pragtige taak omdat die vertaling van die individuele teikens in die dokument moet aspekte van die diskursie op dokumentvlak hou. Maar, dokumentvlak vertalingsmodelle word gewoonlik nie onderwerp om spesifieke beskerming kwaliteit te verseker nie. Daarom, in hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n onderwerp toegang wat uitduidelik optimaliseer twee gespesifiseerde diskursie metrike, leksiese kohesie en koherens deur 'n versterking leer objek te gebruik. Eksperimente oor vier verskillende taal paar en drie vertalingsdomeine het vertoon dat ons onderwerp toegang is in staat om meer koesiewe en koherente dokument vertalings te bereik as ander mededingstoegang, maar sonder om die getrouheid te kompromiseer tot die verwysing vertaling. In die geval van die Zh-En taal paar, ons metode het 'n verbetering van 2.46 persentasie punte (pp) in LC en 1.17 pp in KoH oor die hardlooper- up, terwyl op dieselfde tyd verbetering 0.63 pp in BLEU aantal en 0.47 pp in F- BERT.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi në nivel të dokumentit përqëndrohet në përkthimin e të gjithë dokumenteve nga një burim në një gjuhë objektive. Ajo konsiderohet gjerësisht si një detyrë sfiduese pasi përkthimi i fjalëve individuale në dokument duhet të mbajë aspektet e diskursit në nivel të dokumentit. Megjithatë, modelet e përkthimit në nivel të dokumentit zakonisht nuk janë të trajnuar për të siguruar eksplicitisht cilësinë e diskursit. Therefore, in this paper we propose a training approach that explicitly optimizes two established discourse metrics, lexical cohesion and coherence, by using a reinforcement learning objective.  Experiments over four different language pairs and three translation domains have shown that our training approach has been able to achieve more cohesive and coherent document translations than other competitive approaches, yet without compromising the faithfulness to the reference translation.  Në rastin e çiftit të gjuhës Zh-En, metoda jonë ka arritur një përmirësim prej 2.46 pikë përqindjesore (pp) në LC dhe 1.17 pp në COH gjatë udhëtimit, ndërsa në të njëjtën kohë përmirëson 0.63 pp në pikën BLEU dhe 0.47 pp në F-BERT.', 'az': "Dökümət seviyyəti maşına çevirilməsi bütün belələrin çevirilməsinə məqsəd dilinə odaqlanır. Bu səhifədə təkrarlanan təkrarların təkrarlamasının səviyyəsində danışmanın aspektlərini saxlaması lazımdır. Lakin, belə səviyyədə çevirim modelləri genellikle söhbətlərin keyfiyyətini təsdiqləmək üçün təhsil edilməz. Buna görə də bu kağıtda iki düzəldilən söhbət metriklərini, leksik kohēzijlərini və birləşmələrini təsdiqləyən təhsil metodlarını təklif edirik. Dörd müxtəlif dil çift və üç tercümə sahələrindən olan təcrübəmizin yaxınlığımızın başqa təcrübə metodlarından daha cohesiv və daha coherent dökümə tercümələrini başa düşə biləcəyini göstərmişdir, amma təcrübə metodlarına sadiqlik etmədən. Zh-En dil çift olaraq, bizim metodumuz LC və COH'da 2,46 procent noktalarını daha yaxşılaşdırdı, bu anda isə BLEU nöqtəsində 0,63 pp daha yaxşılaşdı və F-BERT'də 0,47 pp daha yaxşılaşdı.", 'hy': 'Թղթերի մակարդակի մեխանիզմի թարգմանությունը կենտրոնանում է ամբողջ փաստաթղթերի թարգմանման վրա աղբյուրից դեպի նպատակային լեզու: Այն լայնորեն համարվում է դժվար խնդիր, քանի որ փաստաթղթի անհատական նախադասությունների թարգմանությունը պետք է պահպանի խոսակցության ասպեկտները փաստաթղթի մակարդակում: Այնուամենայնիվ, փաստաթղթի մակարդակի թարգմանման մոդելները սովորաբար չեն սովորեցվում խոսակցության որակի բացատրական ապահովությամբ: Այսպիսով, այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ուսուցման մոտեցում, որը բացահայտորեն օպտիմացնում է երկու հաստատուն խոսակցության չափումը, լեքսիկական կոնցենցիան և կոնցենցիան, օգտագործելով ուսուցման ուժեղացման նպատ Չորս տարբեր լեզվի զույգերի և երեք թարգմանման բնագավառների փորձերը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր ուսուցման մոտեցումը կարողացել է հասնել ավելի կոշեսիվ և համապատասխան փաստաթղթերի թարգմանություններին, քան մրցակցության այլ մոտեցումները, չնայած դրան, առանց վնասելու հա In the case of the Zh-En language pair, our method has achieved an improvement of 2.46 percentage points (pp) in LC and 1.17 pp in COH over the runner-up, while at the same time improving 0.63 pp in BLEU score and 0.47 pp in F-BERT.', 'bs': 'Prevedenje stroja na nivou dokumenta fokusira se na prevod cijelih dokumenta iz izvora na ciljni jezik. To se široko smatra izazovnim zadatkom jer prevod pojedinačnih rečenica u dokumentu treba zadržati aspekte diskursa na nivou dokumenta. Međutim, modeli prevoda na nivou dokumenta obično nisu obučeni kako bi se pojasno osigurala kvalitet diskursa. Stoga, u ovom papiru predlažemo pristup obuke koji isključivo optimizira dva utvrđena diskurska metrika, leksičku koheziju i saslušnost, koristeći cilj pojačanja učenja. Eksperimenti preko četiri različite jezičke pare i tri domena prevoda pokazali su da je naš pristup obuke bio u mogućnosti ostvariti kohezivniji i usklađeniji prevod dokumenta od drugih konkurentnih pristupa, a ipak bez ugrožavanja vjernosti referentnom prevodu. U slučaju paira jezika Zh-En, naš metod je postigao poboljšanje od 2,46 procentnih bodova (pp) u LC i 1,17 pp u COH tijekom pokretača, dok je u isto vrijeme poboljšanje 0,63 pp u BLEU rezultatu i 0,47 pp u F-BERT.', 'ca': "La traducció màquina a nivell de documents es centra en la traducció de documents senceres d'una font a una llengua d'objectiu. Es considera ampliament una tasca desafiadora, ja que la traducció de les frases individuals al document necessita mantenir aspectes del discurs a nivell documental. No obstant això, els models de traducció a nivell documental normalment no són entrenats per assegurar explícitament la qualitat del discurs. Per tant, en aquest paper proposem un enfocament de formació que optimitza explícitament dues mètriques de discurs estables, la cohesió lècsica i la coherencia, utilitzant un objectiu d'aprenentatge de reforç. Els experiments de quatre parells de llengües i tres dominis de traducció han demostrat que el nostre enfocament de formació ha pogut aconseguir traduccions de documents més coherents i coherents que altres enfocaments competitius, però sense comprometre la fidelitat a la traducció de referència. En el cas del parell de llenguatges Zh-En, el nostre mètode ha aconseguit una millora de 2,46 punts percentals (pp) en LC i 1,17 punts en COH durant el curs, alhora millorant 0,63 punts en BLEU i 0,47 punts en F-BERT.", 'bn': 'Document-level machine translation focuses on the translation of entire documents from a source to a target language.  ডকুমেন্টের ব্যক্তিগত বাক্যের অনুবাদ করার কারণ নথিতে কথোপকথনের ক্ষেত্রে ব্যাপকভাবে চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ হিসেবে ব্যাপক ভা তবে নথিপত্র-স্তরের অনুবাদ মডেল সাধারণত ভাবে কথোপকথনের মান নিশ্চিত করার জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয় না। তাই এই প্রবন্ধে আমরা একটি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রস্তাব করি যা পরিষ্কারভাবে দুটি প্রতিষ্ঠিত কথোপকথন মেট্রিক, লেক্সিক্যাল সংযোগ এবং সহযোগিতাকে ব্যবহার করে  চার ভাষার বেশী ভিন্ন ভাষার জোড়া এবং তিন অনুবাদের ডোমেনের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে আমাদের প্রশিক্ষণের পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য প্রতিযোগিতার উপায় ছাড়া আরো সমান এব জিহ-এন ভাষার জোড়ার ক্ষেত্রে আমাদের পদ্ধতি এলসি-এ ২. 46 শতাংশ বিন্দু (পি) এবং ১. ১৭ পি-এ প্রান্নার-আপের ব্যাপারে উন্নতি পেয়েছে, একই সাথে বিলু স্কোরে ০. 63 পি এবং F-BERT-তে 0.', 'cs': 'Strojový překlad na úrovni dokumentů se zaměřuje na překlad celých dokumentů ze zdrojového do cílového jazyka. Je obecně považován za náročný úkol, protože překlad jednotlivých vět v dokumentu musí zachovat aspekty diskurzu na úrovni dokumentu. Překladové modely na úrovni dokumentů však obvykle nejsou trénovány tak, aby explicitně zajistily kvalitu diskurzu. Proto v tomto článku navrhujeme tréninkový přístup, který explicitně optimalizuje dvě zavedené diskurzní metriky, lexikální soudržnost a koherenci, pomocí posilovacího cíle učení. Experimenty na čtyřech různých jazykových párech a třech překladatelských oblastech ukázaly, že náš školicí přístup dokázal dosáhnout soudržnějších a soudržnějších překladů dokumentů než jiné konkurenční přístupy, aniž by byla ohrožena věrnost referenčního překladu. V případě jazykového páru Zh-en dosáhla naše metoda zlepšení 2,46 procentních bodů (pp) v LC a 1,17 pp v COH v druhém místě, zároveň zlepšení 0,63 pp v BLEU skóre a 0,47 pp v F-BERT.', 'et': 'Dokumenditasemel masintõlge keskendub kogu dokumendi tõlkimisele allikast sihtkeelde. Seda peetakse laialdaselt keeruliseks ülesandeks, kuna dokumendi üksiklausete tõlkimine peab säilitama diskursuse aspektid dokumendi tasandil. Kuid dokumenditasemel tõlkemudeleid ei koolitata tavaliselt diskursuse kvaliteedi selgesõnaliselt tagamiseks. Seetõttu pakume käesolevas dokumendis välja koolituse lähenemisviisi, mis optimeerib selgesõnaliselt kahte väljakujunenud diskursusmeetrit, leksikaalset sidusust ja sidusust, kasutades tugevdamise õppeeesmärki. Nelja erineva keelepaari ja kolme tõlkevaldkonna eksperimendid on näidanud, et meie koolitusviis on suutnud saavutada dokumentide ühtsemad ja sidusamad tõlked kui muud konkurentsivõimelised lähenemisviisid, ilma et see ohustaks ustavust viitetõlkele. Zh-En keelepaari puhul on meie meetod saavutanud 2,46 protsendipunkti (pp) võrra LC ja 1,17 protsendipunkti võrra COH, samal ajal parandades 0,63 protsendipunkti BLEU skoori ja 0,47 protsendipunkti F-BERT.', 'fi': 'Asiakirjatason konekäännös keskittyy kokonaisten asiakirjojen kääntämiseen lähteestä kohdekielelle. Sitä pidetään laajasti haastavana tehtävänä, koska yksittäisen lauseen kääntäminen dokumentissa vaatii säilyttämään keskusteluun liittyvät näkökohdat dokumenttitasolla. Asiakirjatason käännösmalleja ei kuitenkaan yleensä kouluteta varmistamaan nimenomaisesti puheen laatua. Siksi tässä työssä ehdotamme koulutuslähestymistapaa, joka nimenomaisesti optimoi kaksi vakiintunutta diskurssimittaria, sanastollista yhteenkuuluvuutta ja johdonmukaisuutta, käyttämällä vahvistavaa oppimistavoitetta. Neljällä eri kieliparilla ja kolmella käännösalueella tehdyt kokeet ovat osoittaneet, että koulutuslähestymistapamme on pystynyt saavuttamaan johdonmukaisemmat ja johdonmukaisemmat asiakirjakäännökset kuin muut kilpailukykyiset lähestymistavat, tinkimättä kuitenkaan viitekäännöksen uskollisuudesta. Zh-En-kieliparin osalta menetelmämme on saavuttanut 2,46 prosenttiyksikköä (pp) LC:ssä ja 1,17 prosenttiyksikköä COH:ssa toisen sijan verrattuna, samalla kun BLEU:n pistemäärä on parantunut 0,63 prosenttiyksikköä ja F-BERT:ssä 0,47 prosenttiyksikköä.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Punika dipunanggé lan nganggo nggunakake sing diranggé, dadi kapan ingkang dipunanggé politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kaya, nang uwis-kuwi iki, kita nggunakake tarjamahan sing apik dhéwé basa sing luwih apik bakal sing rumangsa layanan ingkang dipulangan, kesêsesan lan saiki beraksi, lan ijol-ijolan winih lanjut. Gebudhake kapan langkung sampeyan nganggo perusahaan anyar tentang karo, sampeyan telu pangan anyar tentang kanggo diangkat awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan sampeyan ngono nggawe dokumen sing berarti kanggo kalagayaan karo akeh sampeyan sing luwih apik, sampeyan nganggo sak pasang nggawe aturan sing berarti. Genjer-genjer saiki kelas telu nggawe, kelas nyong wis rampungan 2.49 perusahaan (ppp) ing LC lan 1.7 ppp ning cor ditambah nyebutuha, sampeyan ngono nggawe 0.64 ppp sing nyebutuha sing paling blok lan 0.7 ppp ning F-BERT.', 'ha': "translation An ƙaddara shi widely kamar wani aikin mai tsõratar da shi, kamar an buƙat a fassarar magana guda cikin takardan, sai ya buƙata tsarin masu matsayin mazaɓa da daraja. Babu kuma, ko da yaushe ba a karanta misãlai masu fassarar takarda-daraja ba don a iya ƙididdige su wajen yin tsari ga tsarin magana bayyane. Saboda haka, a cikin wannan takarda, Muke bukãtar da wata aikin mafarinta wanda ke bayana mafificiyar magana biyu wanda aka tabbatar da shi, ma'anar mutane, samura da mutane, da amfani da wani abu na ƙaranci. Tajararin duk biyu na huɗu cikin harshen dabam-daban na fassarar sau suka nuna cewa hanyoyinmu sun kasance ana iya sãmun fassarar masu haɗuwa da kuma samuranci da wasu fassarar takarda masu tarayya, kuma amma bã da kamfata gaskiyar gaskiyar zuwa fassarar Reference. In case of the Zh-An language nau'in, metodenmu ya sami improve points of 2.46% in LC and 1.17 p in COH over the runner-up, sami da sami kuma ya improve 0.63 p in BLEU score and 0.47 p in F-BERT.", 'sk': 'Strojno prevajanje na ravni dokumentov se osredotoča na prevajanje celotnih dokumentov iz vira v ciljni jezik. Na splošno velja za zahtevno nalogo, saj mora prevod posameznih stavkov v dokumentu ohraniti vidike diskurza na ravni dokumenta. Vendar pa modeli prevajanja na ravni dokumentov običajno niso usposobljeni za izrecno zagotavljanje kakovosti diskurza. Zato v prispevku predlagamo pristop usposabljanja, ki izrecno optimizira dve uveljavljeni diskurzni metriki, leksikalno kohezijo in koherenco, z uporabo cilja krepitve učenja. Eksperimenti na štirih različnih jezikovnih parih in treh prevajalskih področjih so pokazali, da je naš pristop usposabljanja sposoben doseči bolj povezane in skladne prevode dokumentov kot drugi konkurenčni pristopi, vendar ne da bi ogrozili zvestobo referenčnemu prevodu. V primeru jezikovnega pare Zh-En je naša metoda dosegla izboljšanje za 2,46 odstotne točke (pp) v LC in 1,17 odstotne točke v COH v primerjavi z drugim, hkrati pa 0,63 odstotne točke v BLEU rezultatu in 0,47 odstotne točke v F-BERT.', 'he': 'תרגום מכונת ברמה מסמכים מתמקד בתרגום של מסמכים שלמים ממקור לשפה המטרה. זה נחשב באופן רחב כמשימה מאתגרת מאחר שהתרגום של המשפטים הפרטיים במסמך צריך לשמור על היבטים של הדיוק ברמה המסמך. עם זאת, דוגמני תרגום ברמה מסמכים בדרך כלל לא מאומנים כדי להבטיח באופן ברור איכות דיבורים. לכן, בעיתון הזה אנו מציעים גישה אימונים שמאופטימית באופן ברור שתי מטריות דיבורים קבועות, התשוקה לקסית וקשורנות, על ידי השימוש במטרה לימוד התגבורה. ניסויים מעל ארבעה זוגות שפות שונות ושלושה תחומות התרגום הראו שהגישה האימונית שלנו הצליחה להשיג תרגומות מסמכים מתקבלות יותר מאשר גישות תחרותיות אחרות במקרה של זוג השפה Zh-En, השיטה שלנו השיגה שיפור של 2.46 נקודות אחוזיות (pp) ב-LC ו-1.17 נקודות אחוזיות ב-COH במהלך הרוץ-up, בעוד באותו הזמן השיפור 0.63 נקודות ב-BLEU ו-0.47 נקודות ב-F-BERT.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་སྔོན་ལྗོངས་དང་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་སྐད་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པ ཡིག་ཆ་ཐོག་གི་ཚིག་རྐང་ནང་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཚོའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བ་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་ཡོད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་ཡིག་གེའི་སྐོར་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མི་བྱེད་པ Therefore, in this paper we propose a training approach that explicitly optimizes two established discourse metrics, lexical cohesion and coherence, by using a reinforcement learning objective. Experiments over four different language pairs and three translation domains have shown that our training approach has been able to achieve more cohesive and coherent document translations than other competitive approaches, but without compromising the faithfulness to the reference translation. Zh-En སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Effective Use of Target-side Context for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'الاستخدام الفعال لسياق الجانب المستهدف للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': 'Utilisation efficace du contexte côté cible pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'Uso eficaz del contexto del lado del objetivo para la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Uso eficaz do contexto do lado do alvo para tradução automática neural', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のためのターゲットサイドコンテキストの効果的な使用', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए लक्ष्य-पक्ष संदर्भ का प्रभावी उपयोग', 'zh': '有效用端上下文神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'Эффективное использование целевого контекста для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Úsáid Éifeachtach Comhthéacs Taobh Sprice le haghaidh Aistriú Meaisín Néarach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A céloldali kontextus hatékony használata a neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Uso efficace del contesto lato target per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματική χρήση του πλαισίου στόχου για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'lt': 'Veiksmingas tikslinio konteksto naudojimas neurologiniam mašinų vertimui', 'ms': 'Penggunaan Kesan Konteks Sisi Sasaran untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'kk': 'Невралдық машинаны аудару үшін мақсат жағындағы контексті эффективні қолдану', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн машины хөрөнгө дамжуулагчдын эффективны хэрэглээ', 'mt': 'Użu Effettiv tal-Kuntest fuq in-naħa tal-mira għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'mk': 'Ефективна употреба на контекст на страната на целта за преведување на неврални машини', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം- ഭാഗത്തുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കം', 'no': 'Effektivt bruk av målside- kontekst for neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'sr': 'Efektivno korištenje konteksta sa ciljanim stranama za neurološki prevod mašine', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Skuteczne wykorzystanie kontekstu docelowego do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Utilizarea eficientă a contextului țintă pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'so': 'Effective Use of Target-side Content for Neural machine Translation', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான இலக்கு- பக்கத்தின் உள்ளடக்கத்தை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும்', 'sv': 'Effektiv användning av kontext på målsidan för neural maskinöversättning', 'ur': 'نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے Target-side Context کا اثرات استعمال', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dùng hiệu quả ngữ cảnh đích cho dịch sang máy thần kinh', 'da': 'Effektiv brug af målside kontekst til neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Efektivna primjena konteksta ciljne strane za neurološki prevod strojeva', 'de': 'Effektive Nutzung von Target-Side Context für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'bg': 'Ефективно използване на контекста от целевата страна за неврален машинен превод', 'ko': '목표 언어 환경을 효과적으로 이용하여 신경 기계 번역을 하다', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wenye ufanisi wa Mitandao ya Target kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani', 'nl': 'Effectief gebruik van doelgerichte context voor neuronale machinevertaling', 'tr': 'Nural Makina Terjime üçin Mazmunlar', 'id': 'Penggunaan Efektif Konteks Sisi Target untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'استفاده تاثیر از محیط سمت هدف برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման նպատակային կոնտեքստի արդյունավետ օգտագործումը', 'az': 'N칬ral Makina 칂톛rtm톛si 칲칞칲n He칞-t톛r톛fd톛n Kontekst istifad톛si', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য টার্গেট- পার্শ্ব ব্যবহারের কার্যকর ব্যবহার', 'ca': "Utilitzar efectivament el context de l'objectiu per a la traducció de màquines neuronals", 'cs': 'Efektivní využití cílového kontextu pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'sq': 'Përdorimi efektiv i kontekstit të anës objektive për përkthimin e makinës nervore', 'et': 'Eesmärgipoolse konteksti tõhus kasutamine neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'bs': 'Efektivna uporaba konteksta sa ciljanim stranama za neurološki prevod mašine', 'fi': 'Kohdepohjaisen kontekstin tehokas käyttö hermojen konekäännöksessä', 'he': 'שימוש אפקטיבי של הקשר לצד המטרה לתרגום מכונת נוירואלית', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učinkovita uporaba ciljnega konteksta za nevralno strojno prevajanje', 'jv': 'Packages', 'bo': 'ནུས་པ་འབྱུང་བའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཁོར་ཡུག་ལ་སྤྱོད་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we deal with two problems in Japanese-English machine translation of news articles. The first problem is the quality of parallel corpora. Neural machine translation (NMT) systems suffer degraded performance when trained with noisy data. Because there is no clean Japanese-English parallel data for news articles, we build a novel parallel news corpus consisting of Japanese news articles translated into English in a content-equivalent manner. This is the first content-equivalent Japanese-English news corpus translated specifically for training NMT systems. The second problem involves the domain-adaptation technique. NMT systems suffer degraded performance when trained with mixed data having different features, such as noisy data and clean data. Though the existing methods try to overcome this problem by using tags for distinguishing the differences between corpora, it is not sufficient. We thus extend a domain-adaptation method using multi-tags to train an NMT model effectively with the clean corpus and existing parallel news corpora with some types of noise. Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with the multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نتعامل مع مشكلتين في الترجمة الآلية اليابانية-الإنجليزية للمقالات الإخبارية. المشكلة الأولى هي نوعية المؤسسات الموازية. تعاني أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) من تدهور الأداء عند تدريبها باستخدام بيانات صاخبة. نظرًا لعدم وجود بيانات موازية نظيفة يابانية-إنجليزية للمقالات الإخبارية ، فإننا نبني مجموعة أخبار موازية جديدة تتكون من مقالات إخبارية يابانية مترجمة إلى الإنجليزية بطريقة مكافئة للمحتوى. هذه هي أول مجموعة إخبارية يابانية-إنجليزية مكافئة للمحتوى مترجمة خصيصًا لتدريب أنظمة NMT. المشكلة الثانية تتعلق بتقنية تكييف المجال. تعاني أنظمة NMT من أداء متدهور عند تدريبها باستخدام بيانات مختلطة لها ميزات مختلفة ، مثل البيانات الصاخبة والبيانات النظيفة. على الرغم من أن الأساليب الحالية تحاول التغلب على هذه المشكلة باستخدام العلامات لتمييز الاختلافات بين المجموعات ، إلا أنها ليست كافية. وبالتالي نقوم بتوسيع طريقة تكييف المجال باستخدام علامات متعددة لتدريب نموذج NMT بشكل فعال مع المجموعة النظيفة ومجموعات الأخبار الموازية الحالية مع بعض أنواع الضوضاء. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن مجموعتنا تزيد من جودة الترجمة ، وأن طريقة تكييف المجال لدينا أكثر فاعلية للتعلم مع أنواع متعددة من الشركات من طرق تكييف المجال الحالية.', 'es': 'En este artículo, tratamos dos problemas en la traducción automática japonés-inglés de artículos de noticias. El primer problema es la calidad de los cuerpos paralelos. Los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) sufren un rendimiento degradado cuando se entrenan con datos ruidosos. Debido a que no hay datos paralelos japonés-inglés limpios para los artículos de noticias, creamos un novedoso corpus de noticias paralelo que consiste en artículos de noticias japoneses traducidos al inglés de manera equivalente al contenido. Este es el primer corpus de noticias japonés-inglés equivalente al contenido traducido específicamente para la formación de sistemas NMT. El segundo problema tiene que ver con la técnica de adaptación de dominios. Los sistemas NMT sufren un rendimiento degradado cuando se entrenan con datos mixtos que tienen diferentes características, como datos ruidosos y datos limpios. Aunque los métodos existentes intentan superar este problema mediante el uso de etiquetas para distinguir las diferencias entre los cuerpos, no es suficiente. Por lo tanto, ampliamos un método de adaptación de dominio utilizando etiquetas múltiples para entrenar un modelo NMT de manera efectiva con el corpus limpio y los cuerpos de noticias paralelos existentes con algunos tipos de ruido. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro corpus aumenta la calidad de la traducción y que nuestro método de adaptación al dominio es más eficaz para aprender con los múltiples tipos de corpus que los métodos de adaptación de dominio existentes.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous traitons de deux problèmes liés à la traduction automatique japonais-anglais d'articles de presse. Le premier problème concerne la qualité des corpus parallèles. Les systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) subissent une dégradation des performances lorsqu'ils sont entraînés avec des données bruyantes. Comme il n'existe pas de données parallèles propres entre le japonais et l'anglais pour les articles de presse, nous créons un nouveau corpus d'actualités parallèles composé d'articles de presse japonais traduits en anglais d'une manière équivalente au contenu. Il s'agit du premier corpus d'actualités japonais-anglais équivalent au contenu traduit spécifiquement pour la formation des systèmes NMT. Le deuxième problème concerne la technique d'adaptation de domaine. Les systèmes NMT subissent une dégradation des performances lorsqu'ils sont entraînés avec des données mixtes présentant des caractéristiques différentes, telles que des données bruyantes et des données propres. Bien que les méthodes existantes tentent de résoudre ce problème en utilisant des balises pour distinguer les différences entre les corpus, cela ne suffit pas. Nous étendons ainsi une méthode d'adaptation de domaine utilisant des balises multiples pour entraîner efficacement un modèle NMT avec le corpus propre et les corpus d'actualités parallèles existants avec certains types de bruit. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre corpus améliore la qualité de la traduction et que notre méthode d'adaptation de domaine est plus efficace pour l'apprentissage avec les multiples types de corpus que ne le sont les méthodes d'adaptation de domaine existantes.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, lidamos com dois problemas na tradução automática de artigos de notícias em japonês-inglês. O primeiro problema é a qualidade dos corpora paralelos. Os sistemas de tradução automática neural (NMT) sofrem um desempenho degradado quando treinados com dados ruidosos. Como não há dados paralelos em japonês-inglês para artigos de notícias, construímos um novo corpus de notícias paralelo que consiste em artigos de notícias em japonês traduzidos para o inglês de maneira equivalente ao conteúdo. Este é o primeiro corpus de notícias japonês-inglês equivalente a conteúdo traduzido especificamente para treinamento de sistemas NMT. O segundo problema envolve a técnica de adaptação de domínio. Os sistemas NMT sofrem degradação de desempenho quando treinados com dados mistos com recursos diferentes, como dados ruidosos e dados limpos. Embora os métodos existentes tentem superar esse problema usando tags para distinguir as diferenças entre corpora, isso não é suficiente. Assim, estendemos um método de adaptação de domínio usando multi-tags para treinar um modelo NMT efetivamente com o corpus limpo e corpora de notícias paralelos existentes com alguns tipos de ruído. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso corpus aumenta a qualidade da tradução e que nosso método de adaptação de domínio é mais eficaz para aprender com os vários tipos de corpora do que os métodos de adaptação de domínio existentes.', 'ja': '本稿では、ニュース記事の日英機械翻訳における2つの問題を扱う。 1つ目の問題は、平行コーパの品質です。 神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）システムは、ノイズの多いデータで訓練されると、パフォーマンスが低下します。 ニュース記事にはきれいな日本語と英語の並列データがないため、日本語のニュース記事を英語に翻訳したコンテンツに相当する形で、斬新な並列ニュースコーパスを構築しています。 これは、NMTシステムを訓練するために特別に翻訳された最初のコンテンツに相当する日英ニュースコーパスです。 2つ目の問題は、ドメイン適応技術です。 NMTシステムは、ノイズの多いデータやクリーンなデータなど、さまざまな機能を持つ混合データで訓練されると、パフォーマンスが低下します。 既存の方法は、コーパの違いを区別するためのタグを使用することで、この問題を克服しようとしていますが、十分ではありません。 したがって、マルチタグを使用してドメイン適応方法を拡張し、いくつかの種類のノイズを伴うクリーンなコーパスおよび既存の並列ニュースコーパスを使用してNMTモデルを効果的にトレーニングします。 実験結果は、当社のコーパスが翻訳品質を向上させ、当社のドメイン適応メソッドが既存のドメイン適応メソッドよりも、複数の種類のコーパスで学習するのに効果的であることを示しています。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы рассмотрим две проблемы в японско-английском машинном переводе новостных статей. Первая проблема - это качество параллельных тел. Системы нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) имеют ухудшенную производительность при обучении с шумными данными. Поскольку нет чистых японо-английских параллельных данных для новостных статей, мы создаем новый параллельный новостной корпус, состоящий из японских новостных статей, переведенных на английский язык эквивалентным по содержанию образом. Это первый эквивалентный контенту японо-английский новостной корпус, переведенный специально для обучения НТМ-систем. Вторая проблема связана с техникой адаптации домена. Системы NMT имеют ухудшенную производительность при обучении смешанным данным, имеющим различные характеристики, такие как шумные данные и чистые данные. Хотя существующие методы пытаются преодолеть эту проблему с помощью меток для различения различий между телами, этого недостаточно. Таким образом, мы расширяем метод адаптации домена с использованием нескольких тегов для эффективного обучения модели НМТ с чистым корпусом и существующими параллельными корпусами новостей с некоторыми типами шума. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наше тело увеличивает качество перевода, и что наш метод адаптации домена более эффективен для обучения с несколькими типами тел, чем существующие методы адаптации домена.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम समाचार लेखों के जापानी-अंग्रेजी मशीन अनुवाद में दो समस्याओं से निपटते हैं। पहली समस्या समानांतर निगम की गुणवत्ता है। तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) सिस्टम शोर डेटा के साथ प्रशिक्षित होने पर अवक्रमित प्रदर्शन का सामना करते हैं। क्योंकि समाचार लेखों के लिए कोई स्वच्छ जापानी-अंग्रेजी समानांतर डेटा नहीं है, इसलिए हम एक उपन्यास समानांतर समाचार कॉर्पस का निर्माण करते हैं जिसमें जापानी समाचार लेख होते हैं जो सामग्री-समकक्ष तरीके से अंग्रेजी में अनुवादित होते हैं। यह पहली सामग्री-समतुल्य जापानी-अंग्रेजी समाचार कॉर्पस है जो विशेष रूप से एनएमटी सिस्टम के प्रशिक्षण के लिए अनुवादित है। दूसरी समस्या में डोमेन-अनुकूलन तकनीक शामिल है। एनएमटी सिस्टम को विभिन्न विशेषताओं वाले मिश्रित डेटा के साथ प्रशिक्षित किए जाने पर अवक्रमित प्रदर्शन का सामना करना पड़ता है, जैसे कि शोर डेटा और स्वच्छ डेटा। यद्यपि मौजूदा तरीके कार्पोरा के बीच अंतर को अलग करने के लिए टैग का उपयोग करके इस समस्या को दूर करने का प्रयास करते हैं, यह पर्याप्त नहीं है। इस प्रकार हम एक डोमेन-अनुकूलन विधि का विस्तार करते हैं जो मल्टी-टैग का उपयोग करके एक एनएमटी मॉडल को स्वच्छ कॉर्पस और कुछ प्रकार के शोर के साथ मौजूदा समानांतर समाचार निगम के साथ प्रभावी ढंग से प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा कॉर्पस अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता को बढ़ाता है, और यह कि हमारी डोमेन-अनुकूलन विधि मौजूदा डोमेन-अनुकूलन विधियों की तुलना में कई प्रकार के कॉर्पोरेट के साथ सीखने के लिए अधिक प्रभावी है।', 'zh': '本文中,将论新闻文日英机器翻译中二事。 一者,并行语料库之质也。 神经机器翻译 (NMT) 系嘈杂数教习而性降。 新闻文无净日语- 英语并行数据,故构一新并行新闻语料库,含以义等效翻译成英语日语新闻文。 此专以训练NMT统译等效之日语 - 英语新闻语料库也。 其二及领域应术。 当用混合之数(如噪声数净数)教习之时,NMT 统性降。 虽今法试用标签以别语料库异以胜之,未足也。 是以广一域之宜,净语料库之噪声,并行新闻语料库训NMT。 实验结果表明,吾语料库重译,而吾域宜多种类型于今者语料库。', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, déileálaimid le dhá fhadhb maidir le haistriúchán meaisín Seapáinis-Béarla ar ailt nuachta. Is í an chéad fhadhb ná cáilíocht na gcorpas comhthreomhar. Bíonn feidhmíocht dhíghrádaithe ag baint le córais néaraistriúcháin meaisín (NMT) nuair a chuirtear oiliúint orthu le sonraí torannacha. Toisc nach bhfuil aon sonraí glan comhthreomhar Seapáinis-Béarla le haghaidh ailt nuachta, déanaimid corpas nuachta comhthreomhar úrscéal comhdhéanta d'ailt nuachta Seapáine a aistrítear go Béarla ar bhealach ábhar-coibhéis. Is é seo an chéad chorpas nuachta Seapáinis-Béarla a aistríodh go sonrach chun córais NMT a thraenáil. Baineann an dara fadhb leis an teicníc oiriúnú fearainn. Bíonn feidhmíocht dhíghrádaithe ag baint le córais NMT nuair a chuirtear oiliúint orthu agus tá gnéithe éagsúla ag sonraí measctha, amhail sonraí torannacha agus sonraí glana. Cé go ndéanann na modhanna reatha iarracht an fhadhb seo a shárú trí úsáid a bhaint as clibeanna chun na difríochtaí idir corpora a idirdhealú, ní leor é. Mar sin leathnaímid modh um oiriúnú fearainn ag úsáid il-chlibeanna chun múnla NMT a oiliúint go héifeachtach leis an gcorpas glan agus leis an gcorpas nuachta comhthreomhar atá ann cheana le roinnt cineálacha torainn. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go méadaíonn ár gcorpas cáilíocht an aistriúcháin, agus go bhfuil ár modh oiriúnaithe fearainn níos éifeachtaí chun foghlaim leis na cineálacha éagsúla corpora ná mar atá na modhanna oiriúnaithe fearainn atá ann faoi láthair.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ორი პრობლემებით გავაკეთებთ ახალგაზრულების წაპონი-ანგლისური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილებაში. პირველი პრობლემა არის პარალელი კოპორაის კაalitეტი. ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) სისტემები განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული გამოსახულება, როდესაც ბუნური მონაცემებით გაგრძელებული რადგან ახალგაზრულ ახალგაზრულ ახალგაზრულებისთვის წაპონი-ანგლისური პარალელური მონაცემები არ არსებობს, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პონალელური ახალგაზრულ კორპუსს ეს არის პირველი ინგლისური ინფორმაციის კოპპუსი, რომელსაც მუშაობელია, მუშაობელია NMT სისტემებისთვის. მეორე პრობლემა მოთავსებულია დემომინის აკაპეტაციის ტექნოგია. Name თუმცა არსებობს პრობლემების განსხვავების განსხვავების გამოყენებით, ეს უფრო მარტივია. ამიტომ ჩვენ დიომინის ადაპტიფიკაციის მეტი გამოყენებთ მრავალ ჭდეების გამოყენება NMT მოდელს ეფექტურად გასწავლა კორპუსით და მსგავსი პარალელი ნუტური კორპორაზე, რო ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი კორპუსი უფრო მეტივად გავიზრდება გადაწყვეტილება და ჩვენი დიომინის აეპოდიაცია მეტი უფრო ეფექტიურია სწავლებისთვის მრავალ', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban két problémával foglalkozunk a hírek japán-angol gépi fordításával kapcsolatban. Az első probléma a párhuzamos korpuszok minősége. Zajos adatokkal történő kiképzés esetén a neurális gépi fordító (NMT) rendszerek romlott teljesítményt szenvednek. Mivel nem állnak rendelkezésre tiszta japán-angol párhuzamos adatok a hírekhez, egy új párhuzamos hírkorpuszt építünk, amely tartalommal egyenértékű módon lefordított japán hírekből áll. Ez az első olyan tartalommal egyenértékű japán-angol hírkorpus, amelyet kifejezetten NMT rendszerek képzésére fordítottak le. A második probléma a domain adaptációs technika. Az NMT rendszerek különböző funkciókkal rendelkező vegyes adatokkal (például zajos adatokkal és tiszta adatokkal) történő kiképzéskor romlott teljesítményt szenvednek. Bár a meglévő módszerek megpróbálják leküzdeni ezt a problémát a címkék használatával a corporák közötti különbségek megkülönböztetésére, ez nem elegendő. Ezért kiterjesztjük a domain adaptációs módszert multi-tags segítségével, hogy hatékonyan képezzük az NMT modellt a tiszta korpusz és a meglévő párhuzamos hírcsoportok bizonyos típusú zajokkal. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy korpuszunk növeli a fordítási minőséget, és hogy a domain-adaptációs módszerünk hatékonyabb a többféle korpus tanulására, mint a meglévő domain-adaptációs módszerek.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, ασχολούμαστε με δύο προβλήματα στην ιαπωνική-αγγλική μηχανική μετάφραση άρθρων ειδήσεων. Το πρώτο πρόβλημα είναι η ποιότητα των παράλληλων σωμάτων. Τα συστήματα νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) υποφέρουν από υποβαθμισμένη απόδοση όταν εκπαιδεύονται με θορυβώδη δεδομένα. Επειδή δεν υπάρχουν καθαρά ιαπωνικά-αγγλικά παράλληλα δεδομένα για τα άρθρα ειδήσεων, κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο παράλληλο σώμα ειδήσεων που αποτελείται από ιαπωνικά άρθρα ειδήσεων που μεταφράζονται στα αγγλικά με ισοδύναμο τρόπο περιεχομένου. Αυτό είναι το πρώτο ισοδύναμο ιαπωνικό-αγγλικό ενημερωτικό σώμα που μεταφράζεται ειδικά για την εκπαίδευση συστημάτων NMT. Το δεύτερο πρόβλημα αφορά την τεχνική προσαρμογής του τομέα. Τα συστήματα υποφέρουν από υποβαθμισμένη απόδοση όταν εκπαιδεύονται με μικτά δεδομένα που έχουν διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά, όπως θορυβώδη δεδομένα και καθαρά δεδομένα. Αν και οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι προσπαθούν να ξεπεράσουν αυτό το πρόβλημα χρησιμοποιώντας ετικέτες για τη διάκριση των διαφορών μεταξύ των σωμάτων, δεν αρκεί. Έτσι επεκτείνουμε μια μέθοδο προσαρμογής τομέα χρησιμοποιώντας πολλαπλές ετικέτες για να εκπαιδεύσουμε αποτελεσματικά ένα μοντέλο NMT με το καθαρό σώμα και τα υπάρχοντα παράλληλα σώματα ειδήσεων με ορισμένους τύπους θορύβου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σώμα μας αυξάνει την ποιότητα μετάφρασης και ότι η μέθοδος προσαρμογής τομέα είναι πιο αποτελεσματική για την εκμάθηση με τους πολλαπλούς τύπους σωμάτων από ό,τι οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι προσαρμογής τομέα.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда жаңалық мақалалардың жапон-ағылшын мақалаларының аудармасында екі мәселелерді шешу керек. Бірінші мәселе - параллел корпораның сапасы. Нейрондық компьютердің аударуы (NMT) жүйелері дыбыс деректерімен үйренгенде деградицияланады. Себебі жаңалық мақалалар үшін жапон-ағылшын параллелі деректер жоқ, біз жапон жаңалық мақалалардан ағылшын тіліне аударылған жаңалық корпус құрамыз. Бұл NMT жүйелерін оқыту үшін алғашқы мазмұны жапон-ағылшын жаңалық корпус. Екінші мәселе домендің адаптациялау техникасында болады. NMT жүйелері аралас деректермен басқа мүмкіндіктері бар, мысалы, дыбыс деректер мен тазалау деректері, көмектеседі. Қолданыстағы әдістер, корпора арасындағы айырмашылығын айыру үшін тегтерді қолдану үшін осы мәселеді көтеруге тырысқан, бұл жеткілікті емес. Бұл үшін біз домендің адаптациялау әдісін көп тегтерді қолдану үшін NMT үлгісін таза корпус және бар параллелі жаңалық корпорасына көп түрлі дыбыс түрлері бар. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері корпус аудармалардың сапатын көтереді және домендық адаптациялау әдісіміз бар домендің адаптациялау әдістерінен бірнеше түрлері корпораға үйрену үші', 'lt': 'In this paper, we deal with two problems in Japanese-English machine translation of news articles.  The first problem is the quality of parallel corpora.  Naudojant triukšmingus duomenis, neurologinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) sistemų veiksmingumas sumažėja. Kadangi nėra švarių lygiagrečių japonų ir anglų duomenų naujienų straipsniams, mes sukuriame naują lygiagrečių naujienų korpusą, sudarytą iš japonų naujienų straipsnių, išverstų į anglų kalbą turiniu lygiaverčiu būdu. This is the first content-equivalent Japanese-English news corpus translated specifically for training NMT systems.  Antroji problema susijusi su srities pritaikymo metodu. NMT systems suffer degraded performance when trained with mixed data having different features, such as noisy data and clean data.  Though the existing methods try to overcome this problem by using tags for distinguishing the differences between corpora, it is not sufficient.  We thus extend a domain-adaptation method using multi-tags to train an NMT model effectively with the clean corpus and existing parallel news corpora with some types of noise.  Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with the multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.', 'it': "In questo articolo, ci occupiamo di due problemi nella traduzione automatica giapponese-inglese di articoli di notizie. Il primo problema è la qualità dei corpi paralleli. I sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) subiscono prestazioni degradate se addestrati con dati rumorosi. Poiché non ci sono dati paralleli giapponesi-inglesi puliti per gli articoli di notizie, costruiamo un nuovo corpus di notizie parallele composto da articoli di notizie giapponesi tradotti in inglese in modo equivalente ai contenuti. Questo è il primo corpus di notizie giapponese-inglese equivalente ai contenuti tradotto specificamente per la formazione di sistemi NMT. Il secondo problema riguarda la tecnica di adattamento del dominio. I sistemi NMT subiscono prestazioni degradate quando vengono addestrati con dati misti con caratteristiche diverse, come dati rumorosi e dati puliti. Anche se i metodi esistenti cercano di superare questo problema utilizzando tag per distinguere le differenze tra corpora, non è sufficiente. Estendiamo così un metodo di adattamento del dominio utilizzando multi-tag per addestrare efficacemente un modello NMT con il corpo pulito e corpi di notizie parallele esistenti con alcuni tipi di rumore. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro corpus aumenta la qualità della traduzione e che il nostro metodo di adattamento del dominio è più efficace per l'apprendimento con i diversi tipi di corpora rispetto ai metodi esistenti di adattamento del dominio.", 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nindirizzaw żewġ problemi fit-traduzzjoni tal-artikoli tal-aħbarijiet bil-magni Ġappuniż-Ingliż. L-ewwel problema hija l-kwalità tal-korpora parallela. Is-sistemi tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) ibatu minn prestazzjoni degradata meta mħarrġa b’dejta storbjuża. Minħabba li m’hemmx dejta parallel a nadifa Ġappuniża-Ingliża għall-artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet, aħna nibnu korpus parallelu ġdid tal-aħbarijiet li jikkonsisti f’artikoli tal-aħbarijiet Ġappuniżi tradotti fl-Ingliż b’mod ekwivalenti għall-kontenut. Dan huwa l-ewwel korpus tal-aħbarijiet Ġappuniżi-Ingliż ekwivalenti għall-kontenut tradott speċifikament għat-taħriġ tas-sistemi NMT. It-tieni problema tinvolvi t-teknika ta’ adattament għad-dominju. Is-sistemi NMT ibatu minn prestazzjoni degradata meta mħarrġa b’dejta mħallta li għandha karatteristiċi differenti, bħal dejta storbjuża u dejta nadifa. Għalkemm il-metodi eżistenti jippruvaw jegħlbu din il-problema billi jużaw tikketti biex jiddistingwu d-differenzi bejn il-korpora, mhuwiex biżżejjed. Għalhekk a ħna nistennew metodu ta’ adattament tad-dominju bl-użu ta’ tikketti multipli biex inħarrġu mudell NMT b’mod effettiv mal-korpus nadif u l-korpura tal-aħbarijiet paralleli eżistenti b’xi tipi ta’ storbju. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-korpus tagħna jżid il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni, u li l-metodu tagħna ta’ adattament għad-dominju huwa aktar effettiv għat-tagħlim mat-tipi multipli ta’ korpura milli huma l-metodi eżistenti ta’ adattament għad-dominju.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ കാര്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് ജപ്പാനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് യന്ത്രത്തില ആദ്യത്തെ പ്രശ്നമെന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയുടെ ഗുണമാണ്. ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) സിസ്റ്റം ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങളുമായി പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള പ കാരണം വിശുദ്ധമായ ജാപ്പാനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പാരാളല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ഇല്ലായിരുന്നു. വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പേരില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പാരാണല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പണ ഇതാണ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് NMT സിസ്റ്റം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനായി ജാപ്പനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്  രണ്ടാമത്തെ പ്രശ്നമാണ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ടെക്കിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നത്. വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുമുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെ ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങളും ശുദ്ധ വിവരങ്ങളുമുള്ള മികച്ച ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗി നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനെ പരാജയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയ്ക്കിടയിലെ വ്യത അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d പല ടാഗുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d രീതിയിലേക്ക് വിശുദ്ധമാക്കുന്ന ഒരു NMT മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത്തുന് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു എന്നും, നിലവിലുള്ള ഡൊമെയി', 'mk': 'Во овој весник се справуваме со два проблеми во јапонско-англискиот машински превод на вести. Првиот проблем е квалитетот на паралелната корпора. Системите за превод на неврални машини (НМТ) страдаат од деградирана резултатност кога се обучуваат со бучни податоци. Because there is no clean Japanese-English parallel data for news articles, we build a novel parallel news corpus consisting of Japanese news articles translated into English in a content-equivalent manner.  Ова е првиот јапонско-англиски новински корпус со содржина преведен специфично за обука на НМТ системите. The second problem involves the domain-adaptation technique.  NMT systems suffer degraded performance when trained with mixed data having different features, such as noisy data and clean data.  Иако постојните методи се обидуваат да го надминат овој проблем со користење на ознаки за разлика на разликите помеѓу корпората, тоа не е доволно. Така го прошируваме методот на адаптација на домените користејќи мултиознаки за да обучуваме модел на НМТ ефикасно со чистиот корпус и постојната паралелна новинска корпора со некои видови на бука. Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with the multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita menghadapi dua masalah dalam terjemahan mesin Jepun-Inggeris artikel berita. Masalah pertama adalah kualiti corpora selari. Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) menderita prestasi yang rosak bila dilatih dengan data bunyi. Kerana tiada data selari Jepun-Inggeris bersih untuk artikel berita, kami membina korpus berita selari novel yang terdiri daripada artikel berita Jepun diterjemahkan ke Inggeris dengan cara yang sama dengan kandungan. Ini adalah korpus berita Jepun-Inggeris yang bersamaan kandungan pertama diterjemahkan secara khusus untuk latihan sistem NMT. Masalah kedua melibatkan teknik penyesuaian-domain. Sistem NMT menderita prestasi yang rosak bila dilatih dengan data campuran yang mempunyai ciri-ciri yang berbeza, seperti data bunyi dan data bersih. Though the existing methods try to overcome this problem by using tags for distinguishing the differences between corpora, it is not sufficient.  We thus extend a domain-adaptation method using multi-tags to train an NMT model effectively with the clean corpus and existing parallel news corpora with some types of noise.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa korpus kita meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan, dan bahawa kaedah domain-penyesuaian kita lebih berkesan untuk belajar dengan jenis berbilang corpora daripada kaedah domain-penyesuaian yang ada.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн Япон-Англи механикийн хэвлэлийн хоёр асуудалтай холбоотой. Эхний асуудал бол параллел корпораны чанар. Дуу мэдээллээр суралцах үед сэтгэл хөдлөл (NMT) системүүд доромжтой үйл ажиллагааг унасан. Яагаад гэвэл мэдээллийн баримтуудын хувьд Япон-Англи зэрэг цэвэр мэдээллийн параллел өгөгдлийг байхгүй. Япон мэдээллийн баримтууд Англи хэл рүү төстэй төстэй байдаг. Энэ бол хамгийн анхны content-тэй Япон-Англи мэдээллийн корпус NMT системийн сургалтын тулд ялангуяа орчуулсан. Хоёр дахь асуудал нь холбоотой адилтгалын техник юм. NMT системүүд өөр өөр өөр өөр төрлийн мэдээллүүдтэй холбогдсон болон цэвэр өгөгдлийн дасгал хөгжлийн үйл ажиллагааг бууруулдаг. Хэдийгээр оршиж байгаа арга нь энэ асуудлыг дутагдахыг хичээж байгаа ч корпора хоорондын ялгааг ялгахын тулд тэмдэгүүдийг ашиглан хангалттай биш. Иймээс бид олон тегтэй ашиглаж, NMT загварыг цэвэр корпус болон байдаг параллел мэдээллийн корпора болон зарим төрлийн дуу хоолой загварыг суралцах зорилготой. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний корпус хөрөнгө оруулах чадварыг нэмэгдүүлж, бидний домжны адилтгалын арга нь суралцах олон төрлийн корпора болон суралцах арга нь суралцах арга юм.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule poruszamy dwa problemy w japońsko-angielskim tłumaczeniu maszynowym artykułów wiadomościowych. Pierwszym problemem jest jakość korpusów równoległych. Systemy neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) cierpią na obniżoną wydajność podczas treningu z głośnymi danymi. Ponieważ nie ma czystych danych równoległych japońsko-angielskich dla artykułów wiadomościowych, budujemy nowy korpus wiadomości równoległych składający się z japońskich artykułów informacyjnych przetłumaczonych na język angielski w sposób równoważny treściowy. Jest to pierwszy odpowiednik treści japońsko-angielski korpus wiadomości przetłumaczony specjalnie do szkolenia systemów NMT. Drugi problem dotyczy techniki adaptacji domeny. Systemy NMT cierpią na obniżoną wydajność podczas treningu z danymi mieszanymi o różnych funkcjach, takich jak szumowe dane i czyste dane. Chociaż istniejące metody starają się przezwyciężyć ten problem, używając tagów do rozróżniania różnic między korpusami, nie jest to wystarczające. W ten sposób rozszerzamy metodę adaptacji domeny za pomocą wieloznaczników, aby skutecznie trenować model NMT z czystym korpusem i istniejącymi równoległymi korpusami informacyjnymi o pewnych rodzajach szumów. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz korpus zwiększa jakość tłumaczenia, a nasza metoda adaptacji domeny jest skuteczniejsza do nauki z wieloma typami korpusów niż istniejące metody adaptacji domeny.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru, riješimo dva problema u Japanskom-engleskom prevodu novinskih članaka. Prvi problem je kvalitet paralelnog korporacije. Sistemi za prevod neuroloških mašina (NMT) patiju od degradiranog izvođenja kada se obuèe sa bukovim podacima. Zato što ne postoje čisti japanski-engleski paralelni podaci za novinske članke, izgradili smo nov paralelni novinski korpus koji se sastoji od japanskih novinskih članova prevedenih na engleski jezik na isti način. Ovo je prvi sadržaj ekvivalent japanski-engleski novinski korpus preveden posebno za obuku NMT sistema. Drugi problem uključuje tehniku adaptacije domena. NMT-ovi sistemi pate od degradiranog učinka kada su obučeni sa mješenim podacima koji imaju različite karakteristike, kao što su bukovi podaci i čisti podaci. Iako postojeće metode pokušavaju prevladati ovaj problem koristeći etikete za razliku između tela, to nije dovoljno. Zato proširimo metodu adaptacije domena koristeći višestruke etikete kako bi učinkovito obučili model NMT sa čistim korpusom i postojećim paralelnim novinskim korporama sa nekim vrstama buke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš korpus povećava kvalitet prevoda i da je naš metod adaptacije domena efikasniji za učenje sa višestrukim vrstama korporacije nego postojećim metodama adaptacije domena.', 'no': 'I denne papiret gjer vi to problemer i Japansk-engelsk maskinsomsetjing av nyttikler. Den første problemet er kvaliteten til parallelle korpora. @ info Fordi det ikkje finst nokon rein japansk-engelsk parallelle data for nyhetsarklar, bygger vi ein novel parallell nyhetsarkopus som inneheld Japanske nyhetsarklar omsett til engelsk på ein innhald-ekvivalent måte. Dette er den første innhaldsekvivalende japansk- engelsk nyhetskoppus omsetta spesifikke for opplæring av NMT- systemet. Den andre problemet involverer domeneadaptasjonteknikken. @ info Selv om dei eksisterande metodane prøver å overføra dette problemet ved å bruka taggar for å distisera forskjellene mellom korpora, er det ikkje nok. Vi utvidar derfor ein domeneadaptasjonsmetode med fleire taggar for å trene eit NMT-modell effektivt med den reine korpusen og den eksisterande parallelle nyhetskorpora med nokre typar støy. Eksperimentale resultat viser at korpusen vår øker omsetjingskvaliteten, og at domeneadaptasjonsmetoden vår er mer effektiv for å lære med fleire typar korpora enn eksisterande domeneadaptasjonsmetodar er.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ජාපාන්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි මැෂින් පත්තර වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා. මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පෝරාගේ කුළුවත්. න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) පද්ධතිය සඳහා ශබ්ද දත්ත සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිර්මා මොකද ජාපාන්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සමාන්ත දත්ත නැහැ වාර්තාව පිළිබඳ වලින් අපි නිර්මාණය කරනවා ජාපාන් වාර්තාව පිළිබඳ වලින්  මේක තමයි පලවෙනි සාමාන්\u200dය සමාන්\u200dය ජාපාන්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වාර්තාව කොර්පුස් විශේෂයෙන් අභිවාද කර දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. Name ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නමුත් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ටැග් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, කොර්පෝරා අතර වෙනස් වෙනුවෙ අපි ඉතින් ඩොමේන් එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න බොහොම ටැග් එක්ක NMT නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න සඳහා සමාන්\u200dය විධා පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ කෝර්පුස් විශේෂය විශේෂය විශේෂය විශේෂය කරනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම අපේ ඩොමේන', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, abordăm două probleme în traducerea automată japoneză-engleză a articolelor de știri. Prima problemă este calitatea corpurilor paralele. Sistemele de traducere automată neurală (NMT) suferă de performanțe degradate atunci când sunt instruite cu date zgomotoase. Deoarece nu există date paralele japoneze-engleze curate pentru articolele de știri, construim un corpus paralel de știri nou format din articole de știri japoneze traduse în limba engleză într-un mod echivalent cu conținutul. Acesta este primul corpus de știri echivalent cu conținut japonez-englez tradus special pentru instruirea sistemelor NMT. A doua problemă implică tehnica adaptării domeniului. Sistemele NMT suferă performanțe degradate atunci când sunt instruite cu date mixte care au caracteristici diferite, cum ar fi date zgomotoase și date curate. Deși metodele existente încearcă să depășească această problemă utilizând etichete pentru a distinge diferențele dintre corpore, nu este suficient. Astfel, extindem o metodă de adaptare a domeniului folosind mai multe etichete pentru a instrui eficient un model NMT cu corpul curat și corpurile de știri paralele existente cu anumite tipuri de zgomot. Rezultatele experimentale arată că corpul nostru crește calitatea traducerii și că metoda noastră de adaptare a domeniului este mai eficientă pentru învățarea cu mai multe tipuri de corpore decât metodele existente de adaptare a domeniului.', 'so': 'In this paper, we deal with two problems in Japanese-English machine translation of news articles.  dhibaatada ugu horreeya waa qiimaha shirkadda lambarka ah. Isticmaalka gaadiidka (NMT) ee nidaamka ah waxay ku xanuunsadaan tababar hoos ah marka lagu tababariyo macluumaadka qaylada. Because there is no clean Japanese-English parallel data for news articles, we build a novel parallel news corpus consisting of Japanese news articles translated into English in a content-equivalent manner.  Kanu waa koontaha ugu horeeyay ee isku mid ah Japonees-Ingiriis ee warqada ingiriisiga lagu turjumay si gaar ah u barashada nidaamka NMT. Dhibaatada labaad waxaa ka mid ah teknikada bedelka deegaanka. nidaamka NMT waxay ku xanuunsadaan tababar hoos u dhiga marka lagu tababariyo macluumaad isku xiran oo ay leeyihiin tayooyin kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan data qaylada iyo data nadiifsan. In kastoo qaababka joogta ah ay isku dayaan in ay dhibaatadan ka adkaadaan isticmaalka alaabta si uu u kala soocaayo kala duwanaanshaha shirkadda, ma filana. Sidaa darteed waxaynu ku fidinnaa qaab bedelka deegaanka ah oo isticmaalaya baaski badan, si a an u tababarinno model NMT oo si hagaagsan ugu tababarida koroosha daahirka ah iyo shirkadda warbixinta ee lambarka ah oo cod kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qofkeenu kordhiyo qiimaha turjumista, iyo in qaababka bedelka ee gudaha lagu beddelayo ay ka faa’iido badan tahay barashada shirkadaha noocyo badan oo ka mid ah hababka bedelka ee gudaha.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats behandlar vi två problem i japansk-engelsk maskinöversättning av nyhetsartiklar. Det första problemet är kvaliteten på parallella korporar. Neural Machine Translation (NMT) system drabbas av försämrad prestanda när de tränas med bullriga data. Eftersom det inte finns några rena japansk-engelska parallella data för nyhetsartiklar bygger vi en ny parallell nyhetskorpus bestående av japanska nyhetsartiklar översatta till engelska på ett innehållslikvärdigt sätt. Detta är den första innehållsekvivalent japansk-engelska nyhetskorpus översatt specifikt för utbildning av NMT-system. Det andra problemet handlar om domänanpassningstekniken. NMT-system drabbas av försämrad prestanda när de tränas med blandad data med olika funktioner, såsom bullriga data och rena data. Även om de befintliga metoderna försöker övervinna detta problem genom att använda taggar för att skilja skillnaderna mellan corpora, är det inte tillräckligt. Vi utökar därmed en domänanpassningsmetod med hjälp av multi-tags för att effektivt träna en NMT-modell med ren korpus och befintliga parallella nyhetskorpus med vissa typer av buller. Experimentella resultat visar att vår korpus ökar översättningskvaliteten och att vår domänanpassningsmetod är effektivare för att lära sig med de olika typerna av korpus än befintliga domänanpassningsmetoder är.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஜாப்பானிஸ்- ஆங்கிலத்தில் இரு பிரச்சினைகளைப் பற்றிக் கொள்கிறோம் செய்த முதல் பிரச்சினை இணைப்பு நிறுவனத்தின் தரம். Neural machine translation (NMT) systems suffer degraded performance when trained with noisy data.  ஏனென்றால் செய்தி கட்டுரைகளுக்கு சுத்தமான ஜப்பானிய- ஆங்கிலத்தின் இணைய தகவல் இல்லை, நாம் ஒரு புதிய இணைய செய்தி குறிப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம்,  இது முதல் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் சமமான ஜப்பானி- ஆங்கிலம் செய்தி குறிப்பிட்ட NMT அமைப்புகளை பயிற்சிக்கு மொழிபெயர்ப இரண்டாவது பிரச்சினையும் களம் ஒதுக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் உள்ளது. Name இருக்கும் முறைகள் இந்த பிரச்சனையை மீற முயற்சிக்கும் போதும் நிறுவனத்திற்கு இடையே வேறுபாடுகளை பிரித்துக் க இதைக் கொண்டு நாம் பல ஒட்டுகளை பயன்படுத்தி சுத்தமான NMT மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு டோமைன் ஒழுங்கு முறைமையை விரிவாக்குகிறோம். இருக்கும்  முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் கூர்பாஸ் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரமை அதிகரிக்கும் மற்றும் எங்கள் களம் ஒழுங்குப்பொருள் முறைமையை கற்றுக்கொள்ள பல வக', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم دو مشکلات جاپانی-انگلیسی ماشین کی نویس لکھوں کی ترجمہ میں بحث کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی مشکل مشکل ہے مشابہ کورپورا کی کیفیت۔ نائورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) سیسٹم جب آواز ڈیٹا کے ساتھ تدریس کی جاتی ہے تو دھوکے کی فعالیت پڑتی ہے. کیونکہ کوئی پاک جاپانی-انگلیسی پارالی ڈیٹا نہیں ہے، ہم نے ایک نویس پارالی نویس کورپوس بنایا ہے جس میں جاپانی نویس لکھے ہوئے انگلیسی میں منزل کے برابر طریقے سے ترجمہ کئے جاتے ہیں. یہ سب سے پہلی منصفات جیپانی-انگلیسی خبروں کی کورپوس ہے جو NMT سیستموں کی تعلیم کے لئے مخصوص ترجمہ کیا گیا ہے۔ دوسرا مسئلہ ڈومین ادامه تکنیک میں شامل ہے۔ NMT سیسٹموں کو دھوکے ہوئے کام پہنچا رہے ہیں جب مختلف فائدے کے ساتھ آموزش کی جاتی ہے، جیسے صدا ڈیٹا اور پاک ڈیٹا۔ Though the existing methods try to overcome this problem by using tags for distinguishing the differences between corpora, it is not enough. ہم اسی طرح ایک ڈومین-اڈیٹ طریقہ کے مطابق بہت سی ٹاگ استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ NMT موڈل کو پاک کرپوس کے ساتھ تطابق کریں اور موجود parallel news corpora کے ساتھ کسی طرح کی آواز کے ساتھ استعمال کریں. Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.', 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi giải quyết hai vấn đề trong việc dịch chuyển máy tiếng Nhật-Anh của các bài báo. Vấn đề đầu tiên là chất lượng của hạ sĩ song. Hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh (NMB) chịu ảnh hưởng xấu khi được huấn luyện với dữ liệu ồn ào. Vì không có dữ liệu song song đức của Nhật Bản trong sạch cho các bài báo, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập đoàn tin tức song song song, gồm các bài báo Nhật Bản được dịch thành tiếng Anh theo một cách tương đương với nội dung. Đây là tập tin tức tiếng Nhật và Anh thứ nhất được dịch để huấn luyện hệ thống NMT. Vấn đề thứ hai là kỹ thuật sửa miền. Các hệ thống NMT phải chịu ảnh hưởng xấu khi được huấn luyện bằng giao dịch với những tính năng khác nhau, như là dữ liệu ồn ào và dữ liệu sạch. Mặc dù các phương pháp tồn tại cố gắng giải quyết vấn đề này bằng thẻ để phân biệt sự khác biệt giữa hạ sĩ, nhưng nó không đủ. Chúng tôi mở rộng phương pháp sửa chữa miền dùng thẻ đại diện để huấn luyện một mô hình NMT có hiệu quả bằng cơ thể sạch và hệ thống tin tức song song song song với một số loại nhiễu. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy cơ thể của chúng ta tăng chất lượng dịch chuyển, và rằng phương pháp sửa chữa miền của chúng ta hiệu quả hơn với việc học với nhiều loại cơ thể hơn các phương pháp sửa chữa miền tồn tại.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz Japoniya- ingliz tilidagi ikkita muammolarni xabar maqolalari tarjima qilamiz. Birinchi muammo, parallel kompaniya sifatida. Name Chunki Yaponcha-Ingliz maqolalari uchun toʻgʻri ma'lumot mavjud emas, biz Japoniya maqolalari ingliz maqolalariga bir taʼminlov tilida tarjima qiladigan yangi xabar qoʻshishni yaratdik. This is the first content-equivalent Japanese-English news corpus translated specifically for training NMT systems.  Ikkinchi muammo domen-adaptation teknikotiga ega. Name Agar mavjud usullar, kompaniya орасида ўзгаришларни ajratish uchun bu muammolarni ushlab chiqarishni istaysizmi, u yetarli emas. Shunday qilib, biz bir necha tag yordamida, NMT modelini ishlatish uchun qo'shish usulini ko'proq yordam beramiz va mavjud bo'lgan narsalar kompaniyasi bir necha turli tovush bilan ishlatish uchun. Tajriba natijalari esa bizning korpus tarjima sifatini oshirish mumkin, va domen-adaptation usulining ko'plab turlari bilan o'rganish uchun juda ko'plab foydalanishimiz mumkin.", 'da': 'I denne artikel beskæftiger vi os med to problemer i japansk-engelsk maskinoversættelse af nyhedsartikler. Det første problem er kvaliteten af parallelle korpora. Neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer (NMT) lider af forringet ydeevne, når de trænes med støjende data. Da der ikke er nogen ren japansk-engelsk paralleldata for nyhedsartikler, bygger vi et nyt parallelt nyhedskorpus bestående af japanske nyhedsartikler oversat til engelsk på en indholdsækvivalent måde. Dette er det første indholdsækvivalente japansk-engelske nyhedskorpus oversat specifikt til træning af NMT-systemer. Det andet problem vedrører domænetilpasningsteknikken. NMT-systemer lider af forringet ydeevne, når de trænes med blandede data med forskellige funktioner, såsom støjende data og rene data. Selvom de eksisterende metoder forsøger at overvinde dette problem ved at bruge tags til at skelne forskellene mellem corpora, er det ikke tilstrækkeligt. Vi udvider således en domæneadapteringsmetode ved hjælp af multi-tags til effektivt at træne en NMT model med det rene korpus og eksisterende parallelle nyhedskorpuser med nogle typer støj. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores korpus øger oversættelseskvaliteten, og at vores domænetilpasningsmetode er mere effektiv til læring med de mange typer af korpus end eksisterende domænetilpasningsmetoder er.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo dva problema u prijevozu novinskih članaka japanskog-engleskog stroja. Prvi problem je kvalitet paralelnog korporacije. Sustavi za prevod neuroloških strojeva (NMT) patiju od degradiranog učinka kada su obučeni s bukovim podacima. Zato što ne postoje čisti japanski-engleski paralelni podaci za novine članke, izgradili smo nov paralelni novinski korpus koji se sastoji od japanskih novinskih članova prevedena na engleski jezik na način ekvivalentnog sadržaja. Ovo je prvi sadržaj ekvivalent japanski-engleski novinski korpus preveden posebno za obuku NMT sustava. Drugi problem uključuje tehniku adaptacije domena. NMT sustavi pati od degradiranog učinka kada su obučeni s mješenim podacima koji imaju različite karakteristike, kao što su bukovi podaci i čisti podaci. Iako postojeće metode pokušavaju prevladati ovaj problem koristeći oznake za razliku između tijela, to nije dovoljno. Stoga proširimo metodu adaptacije domena koristeći višestruke etikete kako bi učinkovito obučili model NMT sa čistim korpusom i postojećim paralelnim novinskim korporama s nekim vrstama buke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš korpus povećan kvalitet prevoda i da je naš metod adaptacije domena učinkovitiji za učenje s višestrukim vrstama tijela nego postojećih metoda adaptacije domena.', 'nl': "In dit artikel behandelen we twee problemen in de Japanse-Engelse machinevertaling van nieuwsberichten. Het eerste probleem is de kwaliteit van parallelle corpora. Neural Machine Translation (NMT)-systemen lijden onder verminderde prestaties wanneer ze worden getraind met ruisige gegevens. Omdat er geen schone Japans-Engelse parallelle data voor nieuwsartikelen is, bouwen we een nieuw parallel nieuwscorpus dat bestaat uit Japanse nieuwsartikelen die inhoudelijk gelijkwaardig in het Engels vertaald zijn. Dit is het eerste inhoudelijk equivalent Japans-Engels nieuwscorpus dat specifiek is vertaald voor training NMT-systemen. Het tweede probleem betreft de techniek van domeinaanpassing. NMT-systemen lijden onder verslechterde prestaties wanneer ze worden getraind met gemengde gegevens met verschillende functies, zoals lawaaierige gegevens en schone gegevens. Hoewel de bestaande methoden proberen dit probleem op te lossen door tags te gebruiken om de verschillen tussen corpora's te onderscheiden, is het niet voldoende. Zo breiden we een domein-adaptatie methode uit met behulp van multi-tags om een NMT model effectief te trainen met het clean corpus en bestaande parallelle nieuws corpora met sommige soorten ruis. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons corpus de vertaalkwaliteit verhoogt, en dat onze domein-adaptatie methode effectiever is voor het leren met de meerdere soorten corpora dan bestaande domein-adaptatie methoden.", 'id': 'Dalam koran ini, kita menghadapi dua masalah dalam mesin Jepang-Inggris terjemahan artikel berita. Masalah pertama adalah kualitas corpora paralel. Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) menderita prestasi yang rendah ketika dilatih dengan data yang berisik. Karena tidak ada data paralel Jepang-Inggris bersih untuk artikel berita, kami membangun sebuah korpus berita paralel novel yang terdiri dari artikel berita Jepang terjemahkan ke Inggris dengan cara yang sama dengan isi. This is the first content-equivalent Japanese-English news corpus translated specifically for training NMT systems.  Masalah kedua melibatkan teknik adaptasi domain. Sistem NMT menderita prestasi yang rendah ketika dilatih dengan data campuran memiliki ciri-ciri yang berbeda, seperti data bunyi dan data bersih. Meskipun metode yang ada mencoba untuk mengatasi masalah ini dengan menggunakan tag untuk membedakan perbedaan antara corpora, itu tidak cukup. We thus extend a domain-adaptation method using multi-tags to train an NMT model effectively with the clean corpus and existing parallel news corpora with some types of noise.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa korpus kita meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan, dan bahwa metode domain-adaptasi kita lebih efektif untuk belajar dengan berbagai jenis corpora daripada metode domain-adaptasi yang ada.', 'ko': '본문은 일영 기계 번역 중의 두 문제를 토론하였다.첫 번째 문제는 평행 어료 라이브러리의 질이다.신경기계번역(NMT) 시스템은 소음 데이터를 사용해 훈련할 때 성능이 떨어진다.뚜렷한 일영 뉴스 평행 자료가 없기 때문에 우리는 새로운 평행 뉴스 자료 라이브러리를 구축하여 내용이 대등한 일문 뉴스를 영어로 번역하였다.NMT 시스템 교육을 위해 전문적으로 번역한 내용이 일본어에 해당하는 영어 뉴스 자료 라이브러리는 이번이 처음이다.두 번째 문제는 분야 적응 기술과 관련된다.다양한 특징을 가진 혼합 데이터(예를 들어 소음 데이터와 깨끗한 데이터)를 사용하여 훈련을 진행할 때 NMT 시스템의 성능은 떨어진다.비록 기존의 방법은 라벨을 사용하여 자료 라이브러리 간의 차이를 구분함으로써 이 문제를 극복하려고 시도했지만, 이것은 부족하다.따라서 우리는 다중 라벨을 사용하는 영역 적응 방법을 확장하고 깨끗한 자료 라이브러리와 기존의 특정한 유형의 소음이 있는 병행 뉴스 자료 라이브러리를 이용하여 NMT 모델을 효과적으로 훈련시켰다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 자료 라이브러리는 번역의 질을 향상시켰고 기존의 영역 적응 방법에 비해 우리의 영역 적응 방법은 다양한 유형의 자료 라이브러리를 사용하여 학습하는 데 더욱 효과적이다.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия се занимаваме с два проблема в японско-английски машинен превод на новинарски статии. Първият проблем е качеството на паралелните корпуси. Системите за невронен машинен превод (НМТ) страдат от влошена производителност, когато се обучават с шумни данни. Тъй като няма чисти японско-английски паралелни данни за новинарски статии, ние изграждаме нов паралелен новинарски корпус, състоящ се от японски новинарски статии, преведени на английски език по равностоен на съдържание начин. Това е първият еквивалентен японско-английски новинарски корпус, преведен специално за обучение на НМТ системи. Вторият проблем е свързан с техниката за адаптация на домейна. Системите страдат от влошена производителност, когато са обучени със смесени данни с различни характеристики, като шумни данни и чисти данни. Въпреки че съществуващите методи се опитват да преодолеят този проблем, като използват тагове за разграничаване на разликите между корпусите, това не е достатъчно. По този начин разширяваме метода за адаптация на домейна, използвайки мулти тагове, за да обучим ефективно модел с чист корпус и съществуващи паралелни новинарски корпуси с някои видове шум. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият корпус повишава качеството на превода и че нашият метод за адаптация на домейна е по-ефективен за учене с множество типове корпори, отколкото съществуващите методи за адаптация на домейна.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunakabiliana na matatizo mawili katika tafsiri ya mashine ya Kijapani na Kiingereza ya makala za habari. Tatizo la kwanza ni kiwango cha kampuni inayofanana. Mfumo wa utafsiri wa mashine ya kijinsia (NMT) unakabiliwa na utendaji mkubwa wakati wa mafunzo kwa takwimu za kelele. Kwa sababu hakuna taarifa za usafi za Kijapani-Kiingereza kwa makala za habari, tunatengeneza makala ya habari yenye makala za habari za Kijapani zinazotafsiriwa katika Kiingereza kwa namna inayofanana na maudhui. Hii ni makampuni ya kwanza yanayofanana na habari za Kijapani na Kiingereza yalitafsiriwa hasa kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya mfumo wa NMT. Tatizo la pili linahusisha teknolojia ya kuboresha ndani. Mfumo wa NMT unakabiliwa na utendaji wa kiwango kikubwa pale unapofundishwa na taarifa tofauti zinazohusu, kama vile takwimu za kelele na data safi. Ingawa mbinu zilizopo zinajaribu kuishinda tatizo hili kwa kutumia alama za kutofautisha tofauti kati ya makampuni, haitoshi. Kwa hiyo tunaongeza mbinu za kubadilisha ndani kwa kutumia vifaa vingi ili kufundisha muundo wa NMT kwa ufanisi wa ufanisi na makampuni safi na vyombo vya habari vinavyofanana na aina fulani ya sauti. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa makampuni yetu yanaongezea kiwango cha kutafsiri, na kwamba mbinu yetu ya kuboresha ndani ni yenye ufanisi zaidi ya kujifunza na aina mbalimbali za makampuni kuliko njia za kuboresha ndani ni.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschäftigen wir uns mit zwei Problemen der maschinellen Übersetzung von Nachrichtenartikeln in Japanisch-Englisch. Das erste Problem ist die Qualität paralleler Korpora. Neuronale Machine Translation (NMT)-Systeme leiden unter einer Verschlechterung der Leistung, wenn sie mit lauten Daten trainiert werden. Da es keine sauberen japanisch-englischen Paralleldaten für Nachrichtenartikel gibt, bauen wir ein neuartiges paralleles Nachrichtenkorpus auf, das aus japanischen Nachrichtenartikeln besteht, die inhaltlich äquivalent ins Englische übersetzt werden. Dies ist das erste inhaltlich äquivalente japanisch-englische Nachrichtenkorpus, das speziell für das Training von NMT-Systemen übersetzt wurde. Das zweite Problem betrifft die Technik der Domänenanpassung. NMT-Systeme leiden unter einer Verschlechterung der Leistung, wenn sie mit gemischten Daten mit unterschiedlichen Funktionen trainiert werden, wie z. B. verrauschte Daten und saubere Daten. Obwohl die bestehenden Methoden versuchen, dieses Problem durch die Verwendung von Tags zu überwinden, um die Unterschiede zwischen Korpora zu unterscheiden, reicht es nicht aus. Wir erweitern daher eine Domänenanpassungsmethode mit Multi-Tags, um ein NMT-Modell effektiv mit dem sauberen Korpus und bestehenden parallelen Nachrichtenkorpora mit einigen Rauscharten zu trainieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Korpus die Übersetzungsqualität erhöht und dass unsere Domänenanpassungsmethode für das Lernen mit den verschiedenen Korpora-Typen effektiver ist als bestehende Domänenanpassungsmethoden.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, täzelikler üçin japonça-iňlisçe maşynyň terjime edilýän iki mesele çykýarys. Ilkinji mesele parallel korporanyň keyfiýeti. Nural maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) sistemalary ses maglumaty bilen eğlenýän wagtynda azajyk eseri çykýar. Çünki täzelikler üçin arassa Japonça-iňlisçe parallel maglumat ýok, biz Japonça täzelikler bilen terjime edilen ýazyl meseleler üçin parallel täzelikler gurýarys. Bu ilkinji maksady Japon-iňlisçe täze bagly korpus NMT sistemalary üçin terjime edildi. Ikinji mesele domain-adaptasyon teknikidir. Name Öň bar yöntemler bu meseläni üstden çykarmaga synanyşýan tägleri corpora aralygyň tapawutlaryny tapawutlamak üçin ýeterli däl. Bu şekilde, NMT modelini temiz korpus bilen we bar parallel haberler korporasy bilen örän gürrüň bilen öwrenmek üçin bir domen-adaptasyon yöntemini uzatıyoruz. Durmançylyk netijeleri korpusymyzyň terjime kalitesini artdyrýandygyny görkezýär we domenýämiz adilemek yöntemi bolan domenýäpli üýtgetmek üçin birnäçe türler korpora bilen öwrenmek üçin bolup täsirli däldir.', 'sq': 'Në këtë gazetë, ne merremi me dy probleme në përkthimin e artikujve të lajmeve në gjuhën japoneze-angleze. Problemi i parë është cilësia e korprës paralele. Sistemet e përkthimit të makinave nervore (NMT) vuajnë nga performanca e degraduar kur janë trajnuar me të dhëna zhurmuese. Sepse nuk ka të dhëna të pastra paralele japoneze-angleze për artikujt e lajmeve, ne ndërtojmë një korpus të ri paralel të përbërë nga artikujt e lajmeve japoneze të përkthyer në angleze në një mënyrë ekvivalente me përmbajtje. Ky është korpusi i parë i lajmeve japonez-anglez ekvivalent përmbajtjes përkthyer specifikisht për trajnimin e sistemeve NMT. Problemi i dytë përfshin teknikën e përshtatjes në domeni. Sistemet NMT vuajnë performancë të degraduara kur janë trajnuar me të dhëna të përziera që kanë karakteristika të ndryshme, të tilla si të dhënat zhurmuese dhe të dhënat e pastra. Megjithëse metodat ekzistuese përpiqen të kapërcejnë këtë problem duke përdorur etiketa për të dalluar dallimet midis korprës, nuk është e mjaftueshme. Kështu zgjerojmë një metodë përshtatjeje-domini duke përdorur shumë-etiketa për të trajnuar një model NMT efektivisht me korpusin e pastër dhe korpusin ekzistues paralel të lajmeve me disa lloje zhurme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se korpusi ynë rrit cilësinë e përkthimit dhe se metoda jonë e përshtatjes në domeni është më efektive për mësimin me llojet e shumta të korprave sesa metodat ekzistuese të përshtatjes në domeni.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما با دو مشکل در ترجمه ماشین ژاپن و انگلیسی از مجموعه های خبری حل می کنیم. اولین مشکل کیفیت شرکت پارالی است. سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) هنگامی که با داده\u200cهای صوتی آموزش داده می\u200cشود، عملکرد نابود می\u200cشود. چون اطلاعات پارالی ژاپن و انگلیسی برای مجموعه های خبری وجود ندارد، ما یک شرکت داستان خبری پارالی را ساختیم که از مجموعه های خبری ژاپن به انگلیسی ترجمه می شود به عنوان یک روش محتوای برابر است. این اولین محتوای مطابق خبرهای ژاپن و انگلیسی است که مخصوصا برای آموزش سیستم NMT ترجمه شده است. مشکل دوم درگیر تکنیک تعمیر دومین است. سیستم\u200cهای NMT وقتی با داده\u200cهای مختلف آموزش داده می\u200cشود که ویژه\u200cهای مختلف دارند، مانند داده\u200cهای صوتی و داده\u200cهای پاک رنج می\u200cدهند. اگرچه روش\u200cهای موجود سعی می\u200cکنند این مشکل را با استفاده از نقاشی برای جدایی تفاوت بین جسد کند، کافی نیست. ما به همین خاطر از طریق تغییرات دومین با استفاده از برچسب\u200cهای چند تا برای آموزش یک مدل NMT با شرکت پاک و برچسب\u200cهای خبرهای متفاوتی با برخی نوع صوت تغییر می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که کورپوس ما کیفیت ترجمه را افزایش می\u200cدهد، و این روش تغییر دومین\u200cمان برای یادگیری با نوع\u200cهای متعدد شرکت بیشتر از روش\u200cهای تغییر دومین موجود است.', 'af': "In hierdie papier is ons met twee probleme in japanse-Engels masjien vertaling van nuusartikels. Die eerste probleem is die kwaliteit van parallele korpora. Nurale masjien vertaling (NMT) stelsels lyk degradeerde prestasie wanneer opgelei word met geluide data. Omdat daar geen rein japanse-Engels parallele data vir nuus artikels is nie, bou ons 'n roman parallele nuus korpus wat bestaan van japanse nuus artikels vertaal na Engels in 'n inhoud-equivalent manier. Hierdie is die eerste inhoud- equivalent Japanese- English news corpus vertaal spesifieke vir onderwerp van NMT stelsels. Die tweede probleem verplig die domein-adaptasie tekniks. Comment Alhoewel die bestaande metodes probeer om hierdie probleem te oorwin deur etikette te gebruik om die verskille tussen korpora te onderskei, is dit nie genoeg nie. Ons so uitbrei 'n domein-adaptasie metode met multi-etikette om 'n NMT model effektief te oefen met die skoon korpus en bestaande parallele nuuskorpora met sommige tipes ruis. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons korpus die vertalingskwaliteit vergroot en dat ons domein-aanpassing metode meer effektief is vir die leer met die veelvuldige tipes van korpora as bestaande domein-aanpassing metodes is.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք երկու խնդիր՝ նորությունների մեքենայի թարգմանման ճապոներեն-անգլերեն հարցում: Առաջին խնդիրը զուգահեռ մարմնի որակն է: Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համակարգերը, երբ պատրաստվում են աղմկոտ տվյալներով, տառապում են ձանձրացված արդյունք: Որովհետև չկա մաքուր ճապոներեն-անգլերեն զուգահեռ տվյալներ նորությունների հոդվածների համար, մենք կառուցում ենք մի նոր զուգահեռ նորությունների կորպոս, որը կազմված է ճապոներեն նորությունների հոդվածներից, որոնք անգլերեն են Սա առաջին պարունակությամբ հավասար ճապոնական-անգլերեն նորությունների կորպոսն է, որը հատկապես թարգմանվում է NMT համակարգերի ուսումնասիրության համար: Երկրորդ խնդիրը կապված է տիեզերքի ադապտացիայի մեթոդով: ՆՄԹ համակարգերը տառապում են դեգրոյացված արտադրողականությունը, երբ վարժվում են խառնված տվյալներով, որոնք տարբեր հատկություններ ունեն, ինչպիսիք են աղմկոտ տվյալները և մաքուր տվյալները: Չնայած, որ գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները փորձում են հաղթահարել այս խնդիրը օգտագործելով մարմնի տարբերությունները տարբերելու համար, այն բավարար չէ: Այսպիսով, մենք ընդլայնում ենք տիեզերական ադապտացիայի մեթոդը, օգտագործելով բազմաթիվ թեգեր, որպեսզի արդյունավետ վարժեցնենք NMT մոդելը մաքուր կորպուսի և գոյություն ունեցող զուգահեռ նորությունների կորպ Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with the multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায়, আমরা জাপানী ইংরেজী মেশিনের সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের দুটি সমস্যার সাথে মিলিয়ে নেই। প্রথম সমস্যা হচ্ছে প্যারালেল কর্পোরার মান। নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সিস্টেম কমিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে যখন শব্দ তথ্য নিয়ে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়। কারণ সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের জন্য কোন পরিষ্কার জাপানী-ইংরেজী প্যারালেল তথ্য নেই, আমরা একটি সংবাদ প্যারালেল সংবাদ কোর্পাস নির্মাণ করি, যেখানে জ এটি প্রথম বিষয়বস্তুর সমান জাপানী-ইংরেজী সংবাদ কোর্পাস বিশেষ করে এনএমটি সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য অনুবাদ কর দ্বিতীয় সমস্যা ডোমেইন-আপেটশন প্রযুক্তির মধ্যে রয়েছে। এনএমটি সিস্টেম মিশ্র তথ্যের মিশ্রিত বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে, যেমন শব্দ তথ্য এবং পরিষ্কার তথ্য। যদিও বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি কোর্পোরার মধ্যে পার্থক্য বিচ্ছিন্ন করার জন্য ট্যাগ ব্যবহার করে এই সমস্যার উপর জয়ী করার চেষ্টা করে, তবে  এভাবে আমরা একটি ডোমেইন-অ্যাডাপেটশন পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি মাল্টি ট্যাগ ব্যবহার করে একটি এনএমটি মডেল কার্যকর করে পরিষ্কার কর্পাস এবং বিদ্যমান প্যারালেল সং পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের কোর্পাস অনুবাদের মান বৃদ্ধি করে এবং আমাদের ডোমেইন-অ্যাডাপেটশন পদ্ধতি বেশী কার্যকর যে কোর্পোরা বিদ্যমান ডোম', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት፣ በጃፓን-እንግሊዘኛ-የዜና ድረአምቦችን ለመግለጽ ሁለት ችግር እናቆማለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ችግር የፓርላማ ኮርፖራ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ የኔural machine translation (NMT) systems are degraded performance when trained with noise data. የጃፓን-እንግሊዘኛ የዜና ቃላት አስተያየት ዳርቻ ስለሌለ፣ የጃፓን ዜና ጽሑፎች በንግግሊዝኛ በመተካከል በተመሳሰሉ የኢንዝርት ጽሑፎች የሚተረጉትን አዋራጅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ የጃፓንኛ-ኢንጂልኛ ዜና ካርፓስ መጀመሪያ ትክክለኛ የNMT ስርዓቶች ለማስተማርት ነው፡፡ ሁለተኛው ጉዳይ የዶሜን-አካባቢ ቴክክኖጂ ነው፡፡ የNMT ስርዓት ድምፅ ዳታ እና ንጹሕ ዳታ በመስመር በተለየ ዳታ በተለየ ጊዜ የተጨማሪውን የድምፅ ስርዓት ይጨመርበታል፡፡ በኮርፖርት መካከል ያለውን ልዩነት ለመለየት ቢሞክሩ እንኳን የዚህን ጉዳይ መክፈት አይበቃውም፡፡ እንደዚሁም የዶሜን አካባቢ ሥርዓት በንጹሕ ካርፓስ እና በአካባቢው የዜና ኮርፖር በተለያዩ የድምፅ ድምፅ እናስተምር ዘንድ በብዙ ተቃውሞ የጦማር ማሳየትን እናስሰፋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የኮፕስታችንን ትርጉም ጥሩ እንዲጨምር እና የኖሜን-አካባቢ ሥርዓታችን ከኖሜን-አካባቢ ሥርዓት ይልቅ በብዙ ዓይነት ካርፖርት ለመማር የተሻለ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪzda, japonca-ńįngilizce makinel…ôrin m…ôktublarńĪn m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn iki problemi il…ô √ß…ôkirik. ńįlk problemi paralel korporanńĪn keyfiyy…ôtidir. NMT sisteml…ôri s…ôs veril…ôri il…ô t…ôhsil edildiyi zaman n√∂ral maŇüńĪna √ßevirilm…ôsi z…ôifl…ôyir. √á√ľnki haqq m…ôktullarńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn t…ômiz Japon-ńįngilizce paralel m…ôlumatlarńĪ yoxdur, biz Japon haqq m…ôktullarńĪndan istifad…ô edil…ôn yeni paralel x…ôb…ôr korpusu in Ňüa edirik. Bu, NMT sisteml…ôri t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn ilk m…ôlumat-eyni Japon-ńįngilizce x…ôb…ôr korpusu il…ô √ßevirildi. ńįkinci problemi domena-adaptasiya tekniki i√ß…ôrisind…ô. NMT sisteml…ôri qarńĪŇüńĪqlńĪ m…ôlumatlarla birlikd…ô t…ôhsil edildiyi zaman f…ôrqli m…ôlumatlar v…ô t…ômiz m…ôlumatlar kimi s…ôsl m…ôlumatlar vardńĪr. Halbuki m√∂vcud metodlar bu problemi baŇüa d√ľŇüm…ôy…ô √ßalńĪŇüńĪrlar, corpora arasńĪndakńĪ f…ôrqliyi ayńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn etiketl…ôr istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk, bu yet…ôr. Bel…ôlikl…ô, NMT modelini t…ômiz korpus v…ô mevcut paralel x…ôb…ôr korporasńĪ il…ô m√ľxt…ôlif s…ôsl…ôrl…ô t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn √ßoxlu etiketl…ôr istifad…ô etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn domain-adaptation metodlarńĪnńĪ geniŇül…ôyirik. Experimental sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪz korpusumuz t…ôrc√ľm kalitetini artńĪrmańüńĪ v…ô domain-adaptasyonu metodumuzun mevcut domain-adaptasyon metodlarńĪndan √ßoxlu c√ľr korpora il…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn daha etkilidir.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme dvěma problémy v japonsko-anglickém strojovém překladu zpravodajských článků. Prvním problémem je kvalita paralelních korpusů. Systémy neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) trpí snížením výkonu při tréninku s hlučnými daty. Protože neexistují žádná čistá paralelní japonsko-anglická data pro zpravodajské články, budujeme nový paralelní zpravodajský korpus sestávající z japonských zpravodajských článků přeložených do angličtiny obsahově ekvivalentním způsobem. Jedná se o první obsahově ekvivalentní japonsko-anglický zpravodajský korpus přeložený speciálně pro výcvik NMT systémů. Druhým problémem je technika adaptace domén. NMT systémy trpí snížením výkonu při trénování se smíšenými daty s různými funkcemi, jako jsou hlučná data a čistá data. I když se stávající metody snaží tento problém překonat pomocí tagů pro rozlišení rozdílů mezi korpusy, nestačí to. Proto rozšiřujeme metodu adaptace domén pomocí multi-tagů k efektivnímu tréninku NMT modelu s čistým korpusem a existujícími paralelními zpravodajskými korpusy s některými typy šumu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš korpus zvyšuje kvalitu překladu a že naše metoda adaptace domény je efektivnější pro učení s více typy korpusů než existující metody adaptace domény.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru, riješimo dva problema u prevodu novinskih članaka japanskog-engleskog mašine. Prvi problem je kvalitet paralelnog korporacije. Sistemi za prevod neuroloških strojeva (NMT) patiju od degradiranog učinka kada su obučeni bukovim podacima. Zato što ne postoje čisti japanski-engleski paralelni podaci za novinske članke, izgradili smo nov paralelni novinski korpus koji se sastoji od japanskih novinskih članova prevedena na engleski jezik na način istodoban sadržaj. Ovo je prvi sadržaj ekvivalent japanski-engleski novinski korpus preveden posebno za obuku NMT-ovih sustava. Drugi problem uključuje tehniku adaptacije domena. NMT-ovi sustavi patiju od degradiranog učinka kada su obučeni sa mješenim podacima koji imaju različite karakteristike, poput buknih podataka i čistih podataka. Iako postojeće metode pokušavaju prevladati ovaj problem koristeći etikete za razliku između tijela, to nije dovoljno. Stoga proširimo metodu adaptacije domena koristeći višestruke etikete kako bi učinkovito obučili model NMT sa čistim korpusom i postojećim paralelnim novinskim korporama s nekim vrstama buke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš korpus povećava kvalitet prevoda i da je naš metod adaptacije domena efikasniji za učenje sa višestrukim vrstama korporacije nego postojećim metodama adaptacije domena.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme kahta ongelmaa japani-englanti konekäännös uutisartikkeleita. Ensimmäinen ongelma on rinnakkaisten korpusten laatu. Neuroiden konekäännösjärjestelmät kärsivät huonontuneesta suorituskyvystä, kun niitä koulutetaan meluisalla datalla. Koska uutisartikkeleille ei ole olemassa puhdasta japanilais-englantilaista rinnakkaistietoa, rakennamme uuden rinnakkaisuutiskorpusen, joka koostuu japanilaisista uutisartikkeleista, jotka on käännetty englanniksi sisältöä vastaavalla tavalla. Tämä on ensimmäinen sisältöä vastaava japanilais-englantilainen uutiskorpus, joka on käännetty erityisesti NMT-järjestelmien koulutukseen. Toinen ongelma liittyy aluesopeutumistekniikkaan. NMT-järjestelmien suorituskyky heikkenee, kun niitä koulutetaan erilaisilla ominaisuuksilla, kuten meluisalla datalla ja puhtaalla datalla. Vaikka olemassa olevat menetelmät yrittävät ratkaista tämän ongelman käyttämällä tunnisteita erottaakseen korpusten väliset erot, se ei riitä. Laajennamme siten verkkotunnuksen sopeutumismenetelmää käyttämällä multi-tageja NMT-mallin tehokkaaksi kouluttamiseksi puhtaalla korpusella ja olemassa olevilla rinnakkaisilla uutiskorpusilla, joissa on tietyntyyppistä melua. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että korpus parantaa käännöksen laatua ja että domain-adaptointimenetelmämme on tehokkaampi oppimisessa monentyyppisillä korpusilla kuin olemassa olevat domain-adaptointimenetelmät.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tegeleme kahe probleemiga jaapani-inglise masintõlke uudisteartiklite. Esimene probleem on paralleelsete korpuste kvaliteet. Neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) süsteemide jõudlus halveneb, kui neid koolitatakse mürakate andmetega. Kuna uudisteartiklite jaoks puuduvad puhtad jaapani-inglise paralleelsed andmed, ehitame uue paralleelse uudistekorpuse, mis koosneb jaapani uudisteartiklitest, mis on tõlgitud inglise keelde sisuga samaväärsel viisil. See on esimene sisu ekvivalentne jaapani-inglise uudistekorpus, mis on tõlgitud spetsiaalselt NMT süsteemide koolitamiseks. Teine probleem hõlmab valdkonna kohanemise tehnikat. NMT-süsteemid kannatavad halvenenud jõudluse korral, kui neid koolitatakse erinevate omadustega segaandmetega, nagu mürakad andmed ja puhtad andmed. Kuigi olemasolevad meetodid püüavad seda probleemi lahendada, kasutades sildid erinevuste eristamiseks korpuste vahel, ei piisa sellest. Seega laiendame domeeni kohandamise meetodit, kasutades multi-silte, et koolitada NMT mudelit efektiivselt puhta korpuse ja olemasolevate paralleelsete uudistekorporatega, millel on teatud tüüpi müra. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie korpus suurendab tõlkekvaliteeti ja et meie domeeni kohandamise meetod on mitut tüüpi korpusega õppimisel efektiivsem kui olemasolevad domeeni kohandamise meetodid.', 'ca': "In this paper, we deal with two problems in Japanese-English machine translation of news articles.  El primer problema és la qualitat del corpore paral·lel. Els sistemes neuromàquines de traducció (NMT) pateixen un rendiment degradat quan s'entrenen amb dades sorolloses. Perquè no hi ha dades paralleles japonès-anglès netes per a articles de notícies, construïm un nou corpus parallel de notícies compost d'articles japonès traduits en anglès d'una manera equivalent al contingut. Aquest és el primer cos de notícies japonès-anglès equivalent al contingut traduit específicament per formar sistemes NMT. The second problem involves the domain-adaptation technique.  NMT systems suffer degraded performance when trained with mixed data having different features, such as noisy data and clean data.  Encara que els mètodes existents intenten superar aquest problema utilitzant etiquetes per distingir les diferències entre corpora, no és suficient. Així estendem un mètode d'adaptació al domini utilitzant etiquetes múltiples per formar un model NMT efectivament amb el corpus net i la corpora de notícies parallel a existent amb alguns tipus de soroll. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre cos augmenta la qualitat de traducció, i que el nostre mètode d'adaptació al domini és més efectiu per aprendre amb els múltiples tipus de corpora que els mètodes d'adaptació al domini existents.", 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã karɓi matabbata biyu a cikin fassarar harshen Kijapane-Ingiriya na fassarar da makala na lãbãri. QUESTIFIC na farko yana da sifar koronata. @ info: whatsthis Because there is no clean Japanese-English parallel data for news articles, we build a novel parallel news corpus consisting of Japanese news articles translated into English in a content-equivalent manner.  Wannan yana da farkon kayan-daidaita na-japane-Ingiriya na fassara, yana da amfani da tsarin na'urar NMT. Kikaci na biyu na haɗi matsayin adapta-Domen. @ info: status Kuma kõ da metoden da ke gaba, za'a yi amfani da tagogi dõmin ya rarrabe gaura a tsakanin koma, ba zai isa ba. Kamar wannan ne Muke shimfiɗa shirin adadin-Domen don ka yi amfani da multi-tags dõmin a sanar da wani misali na NMT mai aiki da inganci mai tsari da kuma shirin da ke samu da wasu irin na sauni. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa makarubutunmu yana ƙara tsarin fassarar, kuma hanyoyinmu na adapta-Domen yana da mafiya amfani ga learning da wasu nau'i-nau'i ko kuma da hanyon adaptanci na guda.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku se ukvarjamo z dvema težavama v japonsko-angleškem strojnem prevajanju novic. Prvi problem je kakovost vzporednih korpusov. Sistemi nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) pri usposabljanju s hrupnimi podatki trpijo slabo delovanje. Ker ni čistih japonsko-angleških vzporednih podatkov za novinarske članke, zgradimo nov vzporedni novinarski korpus, sestavljen iz japonskih novinarskih člankov, prevedenih v angleščino na enakovreden vsebinski način. To je prvi vsebinsko enakovreden japonsko-angleški korpus novic, preveden posebej za usposabljanje sistemov NMT. Drugi problem vključuje tehniko prilagajanja domeni. Sistemi NMT imajo slabo zmogljivost, če so usposobljeni z mešanimi podatki, ki imajo različne lastnosti, kot so hrupni podatki in čisti podatki. Čeprav obstoječe metode poskušajo premagati ta problem z uporabo oznak za razlikovanje razlik med korpusi, to ni dovolj. Tako razširimo metodo domenske prilagoditve z uporabo več oznak za učinkovito usposabljanje modela NMT s čistim korpusom in obstoječimi vzporednimi korpusi novic z nekaterimi vrstami hrupa. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš korpus povečuje kakovost prevajanja in da je naša metoda domenske prilagoditve učinkovitejša pri učenju z več vrstami korpusov kot obstoječe domenske prilagoditvene metode.', 'jv': 'Nang mapun iki, kéné bakal karo perbudhakan durung iki sak ning pitik-pitik Inggris barang kanggo tarjamahan barang. Olèhku tualke kuwi kaliwat perusahaan uwong. Sistem Jagat Perintah NMT kang dadi kapan kanggo diangkat kapan mulasah Soalé ora ono mulasah sing perusahaan pangan-ingkang alaman sing nganggo perusahaan anyar, awak dhéwé nggawe basa sing perusahaan karo perusahaan kelas sing katêpakan karo perusahaan pangan sing itlanjut Inggris mengko warisan. Iki karo perusahaan sing paling-perusahaan neng Hapon-Inggris barang nggawe ngupakan tanggal nggawe sistem NMT. The second question entangles the domain-modification teknik. Name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We so expand a domain-Adjustment method use multi-tags to vlan an NMT model Effectly with the Clean Body and current Paralele tidal corora with some types of sound. Test ultrasyone menehi na, kelompus unyakake kapanan ingkang kelompok, lan kelompok domain-modification method sing mas effek kanggo kelompok karo multi-types of corora than current domain-modification method are.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם שתי בעיות בתרגום מכונת יפנית-אנגלית של מאמרים חדשות. הבעיה הראשונה היא איכות הקופורה המזורית. מערכות התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT) סובלות ביצועים משפילים כאשר מאומנות עם נתונים רעשים. בגלל שאין נתונים מקבילים יפני-אנגליים נקיים למאמרים חדשות, אנו בונים קופוס חדשות מקביל רומן שמכיל מאמרים חדשות יפנים מתרגמים לאנגלית באופן שווה לתוכן. זהו הקורפוס החדשות היפני-אנגלי הראשון שיתורגם במיוחד לאימון מערכות NMT. הבעיה השנייה כוללת טכניקת ההתאמה לתחום. מערכות NMT סובלות ביצועים משפילים כאשר מאומנים עם נתונים מעורבים שיש תכונות שונות, כמו נתונים רעשים ומידע נקי. למרות שהשיטות הקיומות מנסים להתגבר על הבעיה הזאת באמצעות השימוש בתגים כדי להבדיל את ההבדלים בין הקופורה, זה לא מספיק. כך אנו ממשיכים שיטת ההתאמה לתחום באמצעות תוויות רבות כדי לאמן מודל NMT יעיל עם הקורפוס הנקי וקופורה חדשות מקבילה קיימת עם סוגים מסוימים של רעש. Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with the multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འོང་ཚོས་བརྡ་ཞིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། དཀའ་ངལ་དང་པོ་ནི་སྦུང་མཐུད་ཀྱི་རིན་ཐག་ཡོད། འཁྲུལ་གཞུང་གི་འགྱུར་འཁོར་གྱི་སྣ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་ཆས་སྐབས་ གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། བརྡ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་པ་ཞིག་མེད་པས་ང་ཚོས་ཚོའི་གསར་འགུལ་གྱི་ འདི་ནི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་པོ་ལ་མཚུངས་པ་ཡིན་པའི་ཉེན་ཡིག་གི་བརྡ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དབང་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསླབས་ཡོད། The second problem involves the domain-adaptation technique. NMT མ་ལག་གིས་མཉམ་དུ་དམ་ཟགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་བ་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ཕན་ངལ་ཡོད་པ། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོང We thus extend a domain-adaptation method using multi-tags to train an NMT model effectively with the clean corpus and existing parallel news corpora with some types of noise. Experimental results show that our corpus increases the translation quality, and that our domain-adaptation method is more effective for learning with the multiple types of corpora than existing domain-adaptation methods are.'}
{'en': 'Is MAP Decoding All You Need? The Inadequacy of the Mode in Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'هل تقوم MAP بفك تشفير كل ما تحتاجه؟ عدم كفاية الوضع في الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'es': '¿Es la decodificación de MAP todo lo que necesita? La inadecuación del modo en la traducción automática neuronal', 'fr': "Le décodage MAP est-il tout ce dont vous avez besoin\xa0? L'inadéquation du mode dans la traduction automatique neuronale", 'pt': 'A decodificação MAP é tudo o que você precisa? A inadequação do modo na tradução automática neural', 'ja': 'MAPデコードは必要ですか？神経機械翻訳におけるモードの不十分性', 'zh': 'MAP解码子之所须乎? 神经机器翻译中式之不足', 'ru': 'Декодирует ли КАРТА все, что вам нужно? Неадекватность режима в нейронном машинном переводе', 'hi': 'क्या MAP डिकोडिंग वह सब कुछ है जिसकी आपको आवश्यकता है? तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में मोड की अपर्याप्तता', 'ga': 'An bhfuil Díchódú MAP Gach Teastáil Agat? Neamhdhóthanacht an Mhóid san Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach', 'hu': 'Csak a MAP dekódolás kell? Az idegi gépi fordítás módjának hiányossága', 'ka': 'MAP დეკოდირება ყველაფერი მინდა? ნეიროლური მაქინის გადატყვების რეჟიმის შესაძლებლობა', 'el': 'Το μόνο που χρειάζεσαι είναι η αποκωδικοποίηση MAP; Η ανεπάρκεια του τρόπου στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': "La decodifica MAP è tutto ciò di cui hai bisogno? L'inadeguatezza della modalità nella traduzione automatica neurale", 'kk': 'Керегіңіздің барлығын MAP декодтау керек пе? Невралдық машинаның аудармасындағы режімінің қасиетілігі', 'mk': 'Дали MAP декодира се што ти треба? Несоодветноста на режимот во превод на неврални машини', 'lt': 'Ar MAP koduoja viską, ko jums reikia? Neuralinių mašin ų vertimo režimo nepakankamumas', 'mt': 'Is MAP Decoding All You Need? L-Inadegwatezza tal-Mod fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'mn': 'MAP таны хэрэгтэй зүйлсийг шийдвэрлэх үү? Цөмийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын горим', 'ms': 'Adakah MAP menyahkod semua yang anda perlukan? Kegagalan Mod dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെല്ലാം ആവശ്യമുണ്ടോ? നെയുറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിലെ മോഡിന്റെ അനുവാദമില്ല', 'pl': 'Czy dekodowanie MAP wszystko czego potrzebujesz? Nieadekwatność trybu w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'ro': 'E tot ce ai nevoie de decodificarea MAP? Inadecvarea modului în traducerea automată neurală', 'no': 'Er MAP- koding alt du treng? Inadekvitet for modus i neuralmaskinsomsetjinga', 'si': 'ඔයාට ඕනේ හැම දෙයක්ම MAP ඩිකොඩ් කරනවද? Name', 'so': 'Ma MAP Aqoonsiga dhamaan ee aad u baahan tahay? Shahaadada Mode in lagu turjumo maskinenta Neural', 'sr': 'Da li MAP dekodira sve što ti treba? Neadekvatnost režima u Neuralnom prevodu mašine', 'sv': 'Är MAP avkodning allt du behöver? Felaktigheten hos läget i neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Is MAP Decoding All You Need?  நெயுரல் இயந்திரத்தில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் உள்ள முறையின் தேவை', 'ur': 'کیا آپ کی ضرورت ہے سب مپ ڈیکوڈ کر رہے ہیں؟ Neural Machine Translation میں موڈ کی نابرابری', 'vi': 'Có phải chỉ giải mã MAP thôi không? Sự thiếu hợp tác của chế độ trong cấu trúc thần kinh', 'uz': '@ info: status Tarjima qilish', 'bg': 'Това ли е всичко, от което се нуждаете? Неадекватността на режима в невралния машинен превод', 'da': 'Er MAP afkodning alt hvad du behøver? Utilstrækkeligheden af tilstanden i neural maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Is MAP Decoding alles wat je nodig hebt? De ontoereikendheid van de modus in neuronale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Da li MAP dekodira sve što trebaš? Neadekvatnost režima u Neuralnom prevodu stroja', 'de': 'Ist MAP Decoding alles, was Sie brauchen? Die Unzulänglichkeit des Modus in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'id': 'Apa MAP merekodikan semua yang kau butuhkan? The Inadequacy of the Mode in Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '당신은 지도를 디코딩하기만 하면 됩니까?신경 기계 번역 중 모드의 부족', 'fa': 'تمام چيزي که لازم داري رو رمزبندي ميکنه؟ غیرعادلانه\u200cای از حالت در ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'sw': 'Je chama cha MAP kinakuandika kila unachohitaji? The Inadequacy of the Mode in Neural Machine Translation', 'tr': 'Ehlisiňiz gerekli MAP ködleme? Neural Maşynyň terjimesinde Modyň ýetersizligi', 'af': 'Is MAP Onkodering Alle jy nodig? Die ongelukheid van die Modus in Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'A është MAP duke dekodifikuar gjithçka që ju duhet? Papërshtatshmëria e Modit në Traktacionin e Makinës Neurale', 'am': 'Is MAP Decoding All You Need?  በኔural machine ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք MAP-ն անհրաժեշտ է: Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելի անհարմարությունը', 'bn': 'MAP কি আপনার সবকিছু দরকার? নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের মোডের অযোগ্য', 'az': 'ńįst…ôdiyiniz h…ôr Ňüeyi MAP DekodlayńĪr mńĪ? N√∂ral Makin √áevirm…ôsind…ôki Modun ńįfad…ôsi', 'ca': "Is MAP Decoding All You Need?  L'inadequació del mòd de traducció de màquines neurals", 'cs': 'Je MAP dekódování vše, co potřebujete? Nedostatečnost režimu v neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'et': 'Kas MAP dekodeerimine on kõik, mida vajad? Neuraalse masintõlke režiimi ebapiisavus', 'fi': 'Onko MAP dekoodaus kaikki mitä tarvitset? Tilan riittämättömyys neurokäännöksessä', 'bs': 'Da li MAP dekodira sve što trebaš? Neadekvatnost režima u neurološkom prevodu mašine', 'he': 'האם MAP מפענח כל מה שאתה צריך? לא מתאימה למצב בתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'jv': 'Mungkin kelompok Anyar? Ngucap kabeh kelas Mode nang Tarjamahan Neral', 'ha': 'Shin, MAP Mai Shiryarwa ne Duk da Kã Zaɓi? @ action', 'sk': 'Je MAP dekodiranje vse, kar potrebujete? Neustreznost načina v nevralnem strojnem prevajanju', 'bo': 'ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་དགོས་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་MAP་གསལ་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས་སམ Neural Machine Translation ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Recent studies have revealed a number of pathologies of neural machine translation (NMT) systems. Hypotheses explaining these mostly suggest there is something fundamentally wrong with NMT as a model or its training algorithm, maximum likelihood estimation (MLE). Most of this evidence was gathered using maximum a posteriori (MAP) decoding, a decision rule aimed at identifying the highest-scoring translation, i.e. the mode. We argue that the evidence corroborates the inadequacy of MAP decoding more than casts doubt on the model and its training algorithm. In this work, we show that translation distributions do reproduce various statistics of the data well, but that beam search strays from such statistics. We show that some of the known pathologies and biases of NMT are due to MAP decoding and not to NMT’s statistical assumptions nor MLE. In particular, we show that the most likely translations under the model accumulate so little probability mass that the mode can be considered essentially arbitrary. We therefore advocate for the use of decision rules that take into account the translation distribution holistically. We show that an approximation to minimum Bayes risk decoding gives competitive results confirming that NMT models do capture important aspects of translation well in expectation.', 'ar': 'كشفت الدراسات الحديثة عن عدد من أمراض أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT). تشير الفرضيات التي تشرح هذه في الغالب إلى وجود خطأ جوهري في NMT كنموذج أو خوارزمية التدريب الخاصة به ، وهو تقدير الاحتمالية القصوى (MLE). تم جمع معظم هذه الأدلة باستخدام أقصى فك تشفير لاحق (MAP) ، وهي قاعدة قرار تهدف إلى تحديد الترجمة الحاصلة على أعلى الدرجات ، أي الوضع. نجادل في أن الأدلة تؤكد عدم كفاية فك تشفير MAP أكثر من إلقاء الشك على النموذج وخوارزمية التدريب الخاصة به. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أن توزيعات الترجمة تقوم بإعادة إنتاج إحصائيات مختلفة للبيانات بشكل جيد ، لكن بحث الحزمة هذا يبتعد عن مثل هذه الإحصائيات. نظهر أن بعض الأمراض المعروفة والتحيزات لـ NMT ترجع إلى فك تشفير MAP وليس إلى افتراضات NMT الإحصائية ولا MLE. على وجه الخصوص ، نوضح أن الترجمات الأكثر احتمالية في ظل النموذج تتراكم كتلة احتمالية قليلة جدًا بحيث يمكن اعتبار الوضع تعسفيًا بشكل أساسي. لذلك نحن ندعو إلى استخدام قواعد القرار التي تأخذ في الاعتبار توزيع الترجمة بشكل شامل. لقد أظهرنا أن تقريب الحد الأدنى من فك تشفير مخاطر Bayes يعطي نتائج تنافسية تؤكد أن نماذج NMT تلتقط الجوانب المهمة للترجمة بشكل جيد في التوقع.', 'pt': 'Estudos recentes revelaram uma série de patologias dos sistemas de tradução automática neural (NMT). As hipóteses que explicam isso sugerem principalmente que há algo fundamentalmente errado com o NMT como modelo ou seu algoritmo de treinamento, estimativa de máxima verossimilhança (MLE). A maioria dessas evidências foi coletada usando a decodificação máxima a posteriori (MAP), uma regra de decisão destinada a identificar a tradução de maior pontuação, ou seja, a moda. Argumentamos que as evidências corroboram a inadequação da decodificação do MAP mais do que lançam dúvidas sobre o modelo e seu algoritmo de treinamento. Neste trabalho, mostramos que as distribuições de translação reproduzem bem várias estatísticas dos dados, mas que a busca de feixe se desvia dessas estatísticas. Mostramos que algumas das patologias e vieses conhecidos do NMT são devidos à decodificação MAP e não às suposições estatísticas do NMT nem ao MLE. Em particular, mostramos que as traduções mais prováveis sob o modelo acumulam tão pouca massa de probabilidade que o modo pode ser considerado essencialmente arbitrário. Por isso, defendemos o uso de regras de decisão que levem em conta a distribuição da tradução de forma holística. Mostramos que uma aproximação da decodificação de risco Bayes mínimo fornece resultados competitivos, confirmando que os modelos NMT capturam aspectos importantes da tradução bem na expectativa.', 'es': 'Estudios recientes han revelado una serie de patologías de los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal (NMT). Las hipótesis que explican esto en su mayoría sugieren que hay algo fundamentalmente incorrecto con la NMT como modelo o su algoritmo de entrenamiento, la estimación de máxima verosimilitud (MLE). La mayor parte de esta evidencia se recopiló utilizando la decodificación máxima a posteriori (MAP), una regla de decisión destinada a identificar la traducción con la puntuación más alta, es decir, el modo. Argumentamos que la evidencia corrobora la inadecuación de la decodificación de MAP más que arroja dudas sobre el modelo y su algoritmo de entrenamiento. En este trabajo, mostramos que las distribuciones de traducción reproducen bien varias estadísticas de los datos, pero que la búsqueda de haces se desvía de dichas estadísticas. Mostramos que algunas de las patologías y sesgos conocidos de la NMT se deben a la decodificación de MAP y no a los supuestos estadísticos de la NMT ni a la MLE. En particular, mostramos que las traducciones más probables bajo el modelo acumulan tan poca masa de probabilidad que el modo puede considerarse esencialmente arbitrario. Por lo tanto, abogamos por el uso de reglas de decisión que tengan en cuenta la distribución de la traducción de manera integral. Demostramos que una aproximación a la decodificación mínima de riesgo de Bayes da resultados competitivos que confirman que los modelos NMT capturan aspectos importantes de la traducción de manera esperada.', 'fr': "Des études récentes ont révélé un certain nombre de pathologies des systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT). Les hypothèses qui les expliquent suggèrent généralement qu'il y a quelque chose de fondamentalement faux avec la NMT en tant que modèle ou son algorithme d'apprentissage, l'estimation du maximum de vraisemblance (MLE). La plupart de ces preuves ont été recueillies à l'aide du décodage maximum a posteriori (MAP), une règle de décision visant à identifier la traduction la plus performante, c'est-à-dire le mode. Nous soutenons que les preuves corroborent l'insuffisance du décodage MAP plus que ne jettent le doute sur le modèle et son algorithme d'apprentissage. Dans ce travail, nous montrons que les lois de traduction reproduisent bien diverses statistiques des données, mais que la recherche par faisceau s'écarte de ces statistiques. Nous montrons que certaines des pathologies et des biais connus de la NMT sont dus au décodage MAP et non aux hypothèses statistiques de la NMT ni au MLE. En particulier, nous montrons que les translations les plus probables sous le modèle accumulent une masse de probabilité si faible que le mode peut être considéré comme essentiellement arbitraire. Nous préconisons donc l'utilisation de règles de décision qui tiennent compte de la distribution des traductions de manière holistique. Nous montrons qu'une approximation du décodage de risque bayésien minimum donne des résultats compétitifs confirmant que les modèles NMT saisissent bien les aspects importants de la traduction.", 'ja': '最近の研究では、神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）システムのいくつかの病理が明らかになっています。 これらを説明する仮説は、モデルとしてのNMTやそのトレーニングアルゴリズムである最大尤度推定（ MLE ）に根本的に問題があることをほとんど示唆している。 これらの証拠のほとんどは、最高得点の翻訳、すなわちモードを識別することを目的とした決定規則である事後（ MAP ）解読を使用して収集された。 我々は、その証拠は、モデルとそのトレーニングアルゴリズムに疑問を投げかける以上に、地図デコードの不十分さを裏付けていると主張する。 この研究では、翻訳分布がデータのさまざまな統計をうまく再現しているのではなく、そのような統計からビーム検索が迷走していることを示しています。 我々は、NMTの既知の病態およびバイアスのいくつかは、MAPデコードに起因するものであり、NMTの統計的仮定またはMLEに起因するものではないことを示している。 特に、モデルの下で最も可能性の高い翻訳は、モードが本質的に任意であると見なすことができるほど、ほとんどの確率質量を蓄積しないことを示しています。 したがって、翻訳配布を総合的に考慮した意思決定ルールの使用を提唱しています。 我々は、最小ベイズリスクデコードへの近似が、NMTモデルが期待の中で翻訳の重要な側面をうまく捉えていることを確認する競合的な結果をもたらすことを示している。', 'hi': 'हाल के अध्ययनों से तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) प्रणालियों की कई विकृतियों का पता चला है। इन्हें समझाते हुए परिकल्पनाएं ज्यादातर सुझाव देती हैं कि एनएमटी के साथ एक मॉडल या इसके प्रशिक्षण एल्गोरिथ्म, अधिकतम संभावना अनुमान (एमएलई) के रूप में मौलिक रूप से कुछ गलत है। इस सबूत में से अधिकांश को अधिकतम एक पश्चवर्ती (एमएपी) डिकोडिंग का उपयोग करके एकत्र किया गया था, एक निर्णय नियम जिसका उद्देश्य उच्चतम स्कोरिंग अनुवाद की पहचान करना था, यानी मोड। हम तर्क देते हैं कि सबूत मॉडल और इसके प्रशिक्षण एल्गोरिथ्म पर संदेह करने की तुलना में एमएपी डिकोडिंग की अपर्याप्तता की पुष्टि करते हैं। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि अनुवाद वितरण डेटा के विभिन्न आंकड़ों को अच्छी तरह से पुन: पेश करते हैं, लेकिन यह बीम खोज ऐसे आंकड़ों से भटकती है। हम दिखाते हैं कि एनएमटी के कुछ ज्ञात विकृति और पूर्वाग्रह एमएपी डिकोडिंग के कारण हैं और एनएमटी की सांख्यिकीय मान्यताओं और न ही एमएलई के कारण हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम दिखाते हैं कि मॉडल के तहत सबसे अधिक संभावना वाले अनुवाद इतने कम संभावना द्रव्यमान जमा करते हैं कि मोड को अनिवार्य रूप से मनमाना माना जा सकता है। इसलिए हम निर्णय नियमों के उपयोग की वकालत करते हैं जो समग्र रूप से अनुवाद वितरण को ध्यान में रखते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि न्यूनतम बेयस जोखिम डिकोडिंग के लिए एक सन्निकटन प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम देता है जो पुष्टि करता है कि एनएमटी मॉडल उम्मीद में अच्छी तरह से अनुवाद के महत्वपूर्ण पहलुओं पर कब्जा करते हैं।', 'zh': '近者研发神经机器翻译(NMT)系统诸病理学。 说此者,NMT以为法,莫大乎似然度(MLE)根本性。 其证多用大后验(MAP)解码所采,此一指识最高分译(即模式)之决法也。 臣愚以为证MAP解码之不足,非对模型及训练算法之疑也。 于此之中,明转布诚善见数统计数据,而光束搜索偏离统计数据。 吾明NMT之知病理偏见由于MAP解码,非NMT计设MLE也。 大抵模下平移积概率如此之少,至于任情可也。 是以臣等议用从整体上思译布之法。 吾明至小贝叶斯风险解码近似值争竞,证之NMT实得译之要于期会。', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования выявили ряд патологий систем нейронного машинного перевода (НМП). Гипотезы, объясняющие это, в основном предполагают, что есть что-то принципиально неправильное с НМТ как моделью или его алгоритмом обучения, оценкой максимального правдоподобия (MLE). Большая часть этих доказательств была собрана с использованием максимального апостериорного декодирования (MAP), правила принятия решений, направленного на выявление перевода с наивысшим баллом, то есть режима. Мы утверждаем, что доказательства подтверждают неадекватность декодирования КАРТЫ больше, чем ставят под сомнение модель и ее алгоритм обучения. В этой работе мы показываем, что распределения перевода действительно хорошо воспроизводят различные статистические данные, но что поиск луча отклоняется от такой статистики. Мы показываем, что некоторые из известных патологий и смещений НМТ обусловлены декодированием КАРТЫ, а не статистическими предположениями НМТ или MLE. В частности, мы показываем, что наиболее вероятные переводы под моделью накапливают настолько малую массу вероятности, что режим можно считать по существу произвольным. Поэтому мы выступаем за использование таких правил принятия решений, которые учитывали бы распределение переводов на комплексной основе. Мы показываем, что приближение к минимальному декодированию риска Байеса дает конкурентные результаты, подтверждающие, что модели НМТ хорошо отражают важные аспекты перевода в ожидании.', 'ga': 'Léirigh staidéir le déanaí roinnt paiteolaíochtaí de chórais néar-aistriúcháin meaisín (NMT). Tugann hipitéisí a mhíníonn iad seo le fios den chuid is mó go bhfuil rud éigin bunúsach mícheart le NMT mar mhúnla nó a algartam oiliúna, meastachán uasta dóchúlachta (MLE). Bailíodh an chuid is mó den fhianaise seo trí úsáid a bhaint as díchódú uasta a posteriori (MAP), riail cinnidh atá dírithe ar an aistriúchán is airde scórála a aithint, i.e. an modh. Áitímid go léiríonn an fhianaise neamhdhóthanacht díchódaithe MAP níos mó ná go gcruthaíonn sé amhras ar an tsamhail agus ar a algartam oiliúna. Sa saothar seo, léirímid go n-atáirgeann dáiltí aistriúcháin staitisticí éagsúla de na sonraí go maith, ach go dtéann cuardach léasa ar seachrán ó na staitisticí sin. Léirímid gur de bharr díchódaithe MAP atá cuid de na paiteolaíochtaí agus de na laofachtaí aitheanta NMT agus ní de bharr boinn tuisceana staidrimh NMT ná MLE. Léirímid go háirithe go gcruinníonn na haistriúcháin is dóichí faoin tsamhail chomh beag mais dóchúlachta gur féidir a mheas go bhfuil an modh treallach go bunúsach. Molaimid mar sin go n-úsáidfí rialacha cinnidh a chuireann dáileadh an aistriúcháin san áireamh ar bhealach iomlánaíoch. Léirímid go dtugann comhfhogasú d’íoschódú riosca Bayes torthaí iomaíocha a dheimhníonn go bhfuil léargas maith ag samhlacha NMT ar ghnéithe tábhachtacha den aistriúchán.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν αποκαλύψει μια σειρά παθολογιών των συστημάτων νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT). Υποθέσεις που εξηγούν αυτά συνήθως υποδηλώνουν ότι κάτι δεν πάει καλά με το NMT ως μοντέλο ή τον προπονητικό αλγόριθμο της, εκτίμηση μέγιστης πιθανότητας (MLE). Τα περισσότερα από αυτά τα στοιχεία συγκεντρώθηκαν χρησιμοποιώντας τη μέγιστη αποκωδικοποίηση (MAP), έναν κανόνα απόφασης που αποσκοπούσε στον προσδιορισμό της μετάφρασης με την υψηλότερη βαθμολογία, δηλαδή του τρόπου. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι τα στοιχεία επιβεβαιώνουν την ανεπάρκεια της αποκωδικοποίησης MAP περισσότερο από θέτουν αμφιβολίες για το μοντέλο και τον αλγόριθμο κατάρτισης του. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι διανομές μετάφρασης αναπαράγουν καλά διάφορες στατιστικές των δεδομένων, αλλά ότι η αναζήτηση ακτίνων διαφεύγει από αυτές τις στατιστικές. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι ορισμένες από τις γνωστές παθολογίες και προκατάληψη της NMT οφείλονται στην αποκωδικοποίηση MAP και όχι στις στατιστικές παραδοχές του NMT ούτε στην MLE. Ειδικότερα, δείχνουμε ότι οι πιο πιθανές μεταφράσεις κάτω από το μοντέλο συσσωρεύουν τόσο μικρή μάζα πιθανοτήτων που ο τρόπος μπορεί να θεωρηθεί ουσιαστικά αυθαίρετος. Ως εκ τούτου, υποστηρίζουμε τη χρήση κανόνων λήψης αποφάσεων που λαμβάνουν υπόψη τη διανομή της μετάφρασης ολιστικά. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι μια προσέγγιση στον ελάχιστο κίνδυνο αποκωδικοποίησης του Bayes δίνει ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα που επιβεβαιώνουν ότι τα μοντέλα NMT αποτυπώνουν σημαντικές πτυχές της μετάφρασης με καλή προσδοκία.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi tanulmányok feltárták a neurális gépi fordító (NMT) rendszerek számos patológiáját. Az ezeket magyarázó hipotézisek többnyire arra utalnak, hogy valami alapvetően nem stimmel az NMT-vel, mint modell, vagy annak edzési algoritmusával, maximális valószínűségi becsléssel (MLE). E bizonyítékok nagy részét maximális a posteriori (MAP) dekódolással gyűjtötték össze, amely a legmagasabb pontszámú fordítás, azaz a mód azonosítására irányuló döntési szabály. Azzal érvelünk, hogy a bizonyítékok alátámasztják a MAP dekódolás nem megfelelőségét, annál inkább kétségbe vonják a modellt és annak képzési algoritmusát. Ebben a munkában megmutatjuk, hogy a fordítási elosztások jól reprodukálják az adatok különböző statisztikáit, de a sugárkeresés eltér az ilyen statisztikáktól. Megmutatjuk, hogy az NMT néhány ismert patológiája és előítélete MAP dekódolásnak köszönhető, és nem az NMT statisztikai feltételezéseinek, sem az MLE-nek. Különösen azt mutatjuk meg, hogy a modell legvalószínűbb fordításai olyan kevés valószínűségi tömeget halmoznak fel, hogy a mód lényegében önkényesnek tekinthető. Ezért olyan döntési szabályok alkalmazását javasoljuk, amelyek holisztikusan figyelembe veszik a fordítási terjesztést. Megmutatjuk, hogy a Bayes kockázat minimális dekódolásának közelítése versenyképes eredményeket eredményez, amelyek megerősítik, hogy az NMT modellek jól megragadják a fordítás fontos aspektusait.', 'it': "Studi recenti hanno rivelato una serie di patologie dei sistemi neurali di traduzione automatica (NMT). Ipotesi che spiegano queste per lo più suggeriscono che c'è qualcosa di fondamentalmente sbagliato con NMT come modello o il suo algoritmo di allenamento, stima della massima probabilità (MLE). La maggior parte di queste prove è stata raccolta utilizzando la decodifica massima a posteriori (MAP), una regola decisionale volta a identificare la traduzione con il punteggio più alto, cioè la modalità. Sosteniamo che le prove corroborano l'inadeguatezza della decodifica MAP più che getta dubbi sul modello e sul suo algoritmo di addestramento. In questo lavoro, mostriamo che le distribuzioni di traduzione riproducono bene varie statistiche dei dati, ma che la ricerca del fascio si allontana da tali statistiche. Mostriamo che alcune delle patologie e pregiudizi noti di NMT sono dovuti alla decodifica MAP e non alle ipotesi statistiche di NMT né MLE. In particolare, mostriamo che le traduzioni più probabili sotto il modello accumulano così poca massa di probabilità che la modalità può essere considerata essenzialmente arbitraria. Pertanto sosteniamo l'uso di regole decisionali che tengano conto olisticamente della distribuzione delle traduzioni. Mostriamo che un'approssimazione al minimo rischio di decodifica Bayes dà risultati competitivi confermando che i modelli NMT catturano gli aspetti importanti della traduzione con buone aspettative.", 'ka': 'შემდეგ კვლევები აღმოჩნდა ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების (NMT) სისტემის რამდენიმე პოტოლოგია. ჰიპოტესები, რომლებიც ეს უფრო მეტი განახსენებენ, რომ NMT-ს ფუნდამეტურად რაღაც არაფერი არაფერი იქნება როგორც მოდელი ან მისი განახსენებული ალგორიტიმ, მაქსიმა ეს წარმოდგენების უფრო მეტი მაქსიმალური პოსტერიორი (MAP) დეკოდირებას გამოყენებული იყო, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრება, მაგალითად რეჟი ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ საკუთარი წარმოდგენია MAP-ის დეკოდირებას უფრო მეტი, ვიდრე მოდელის და მისი განაკეთებული ალგორიტიმს შესაძლებლობა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სამუშაო სტრატისტიკის განსხვავებული სტატისტიკის განსხვავება, მაგრამ ამ სამუშაო სტატისტიკ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ NMT-ის კონტაქტიკური პოტოლოგიები და წარმოდგენები MAP-ის დეკოდირება და არა NMT-ის სტატისტიკური წარმოდგენების და MLE-ის შესახებ. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მოდელის ქვემოთ უფრო შესაძლებელი გადაწყვეტილება ასე პატარა შესაძლებელი მასტი, რომ რეჟიმი შეიძლება იყოს პირდაპირად ამიტომ ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ გადაწყვეტილების წესების გამოყენებას, რომლებიც გადაწყვეტილების წესების გამოყენება, რომლებიც გადაწყვეტილების გადაწყ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მინიმალური ბეიზის რისკოდირებას მიღება კონსპექტიური შედეგები, რომლებიც NMT მოდელები დააკვირდება მნიშვნელოვანი აპექტირების შესახებ', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikti tyrimai parodė keletą nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) sistemų patologijų. Hypotheses explaining these mostly suggest there is something fundamentally wrong with NMT as a model or its training algorithm, maximum likelihood estimation (MLE).  Dauguma ši ų įrodymų surinkta naudojant maksimalų posteriori (MAP) kodavimą, sprendimų taisyklę, kuria siekiama nustatyti aukščiausio lygio vertimą, t. y. režimą. Mes teigiame, kad įrodymai patvirtina MAP dekodiavimo nepakankamumą labiau nei kelia abejonių dėl modelio ir jo mokymo algoritmo. Šiame darbe parodome, kad vertimo paskirstymai gerai atspindi įvairius duomenų statistinius duomenis, tačiau ši šviesos paieška iš tokių statistinių duomenų netenka. Mes rodome, kad kai kurios žinomos NMT patologijos ir s ąžiningumas yra dėl MAP dekodinimo, o ne dėl NMT statistinių prielaidų ir MLE. In particular, we show that the most likely translations under the model accumulate so little probability mass that the mode can be considered essentially arbitrary.  Todėl remiame sprendimų taisyklių, kuriomis visapusiškai atsižvelgiama į vertimo raštu platinimą, taikymą. Mes parodome, kad suderinus minimalią Bayes rizikos dekodavimą, gaunami konkurenciniai rezultatai, patvirtinantys, kad NMT modeliai gerai atsižvelgia į svarbius vertimo aspektus.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы зерттеулерде невралдық компьютерді аудару (NMT) жүйелердің бірнеше патологиясын көрсетті. Гипотезлер осыны түсіндіреді, көпшілігінде NMT үлгі немесе оқыту алгоритмі ретінде негізгі маңыздық нәтижесі бар деп ойлайды. Бұл мәліметтердің көпшілігі posteriori (MAP) декодтамасын қолдану үшін, ең жоғары аудармасын анықтау үшін шешім ережесі, мысалы, режімі. Біз келтіріп тұрамыз, MAP декодтамасын үлгісіне және оқыту алгоритміне көп күмәнділіктерін баптауға болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, аудармалар таратылуы деректердің бірнеше статистикасын жақсы жасайды, бірақ бұл статистикадан іздеу жоқ. Біз NMT бағдарламаларының кейбір белгілі патологияларының және бөлшектерінің MAP декодтамасынан, NMT бағдарламаларының статистикалық таңдауларына не MLE-ге емес дегенді көрсетедік Біз үлгі астындағы ең ықтималдық аудармалардың массасын біріктіреді дегенді көрсету үшін, режімі негізінде тәуелсіз деп ойлаймыз. Сондықтан біз аудармалардың үлестіріміне тәуелсіз деген шешім ережелерін қолдану үшін қолданамыз. Біз Байз тәуелсіздік декодтамасының төменгі жақын жақындау NMT үлгілерінің күтпеген аудармалардың маңызды аспектерін қабылдау үшін бақылайтын нәтижелерін көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളുടെ (NMT) സിസ്റ്റമുകളില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പാതോളജികള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെട ഈ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഹൈപ്പോറസുകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു NMT മോഡലോ അതിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം, ഏറ്റവും വലിയ സാധ് ഈ തെളിവുകളില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും ഒരു പോസ്റ്റ്രിയി (MAP) ഡികോഡിങ്ങ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു തെളിവുകള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു. അതിന്റെ മോ മോഡലിനെക്കാളും അതിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്രത്തെക്കാളും അധികം സംശയത്തെക്കാളും MAP അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന തെ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, പരിഭാഷവിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുതുക്കുന്നു,  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് NMT-ന്റെ ചില പാതകങ്ങളും പിശാചുക്കളും MAP ഡികോഡിങ്ങിന്റെ കാരണമാണെന്നും, NMT-ന്റെ സ്ഥിതികമല് In particular, we show that the most likely translations under the model accumulate so little probability mass that the mode can be considered essentially arbitrary.  അതുകൊണ്ട് നാം തീരുമാനത്തിന്റെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പരിഭാഷപ്രഭാഷണത്തെ വിതരണം  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് കുറച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d ബെയ്സിന്റെ അപകടത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തേക്കുള്ള അടുത്തുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നത് പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന', 'mt': 'Studji riċenti żvelaw għadd ta’ patoloġiji ta’ sistemi ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT). Hypotheses explaining these mostly suggest there is something fundamentally wrong with NMT as a model or its training algorithm, maximum likelihood estimation (MLE).  Il-biċċa l-kbira ta’ din l-evidenza nġabret bl-użu ta’ dekodifikazzjoni massima posteriori (MAP), regola ta’ deċi żjoni mmirata lejn l-identifikazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni bl-ogħla punteġġi, jiġifieri l-modalità. Aħna jargumentaw li l-evidenza tikkorrobora l-inadegwatezza tad-dekodifikazzjoni tal-MAP aktar milli tqajjem dubju dwar il-mudell u l-algoritmu tat-taħriġ tiegħu. F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu evidenza li d-distribuzzjonijiet tat-traduzzjoni jirriproduċu tajjeb diversi statistiki tad-dejta, iżda dak it-tiftix bir-raġġi jitneħħa minn tali statistika. Aħna nuru li wħud mill-patoloġiji u l-preġudizzji magħrufa tal-NMT huma dovuti għad-dekodifikazzjoni tal-MAP u mhux għas-suppożizzjonijiet statistiċi tal-NMT u lanqas għall-MLE. B’mod partikolari, nuru li t-traduzzjonijiet l-aktar probabbli taħt il-mudell jakkumulaw massa tant żgħira ta’ probabbiltà li l-modalità tista’ titqies essenzjalment arbitrarja. Għalhekk aħna nappoġġjaw l-użu ta’ regoli ta’ deċiżjoni li jqisu d-distribuzzjoni tat-traduzzjoni b’mod olistiku. Aħna nuru li approssimazzjoni għad-dekodifikazzjoni tar-riskju minimu ta’ Bayes tagħti riżultati kompetittivi li jikkonfermaw li l-mudelli NMT jaqbdu aspetti importanti tat-traduzzjoni tajjeb fl-istennija.', 'mn': 'Саяхан судалгаанууд мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулалтын (NMT) системийн олон эмгэгийг харуулсан. Хипотезүүд үүнийг ихэнхдээ NMT-д загвар болон сургалтын алгоритм болон хамгийн их магадлалын тооцоолол гэж үздэг. Үүний ихэнх баримтууд хамгийн өндөр хэлбэрийг олж мэдэх шийдвэр гаргах дүрмийг ашиглаж байлаа. Бид баталгаа нь MAP-ын загвар болон сургалтын алгоритмын тухай бодлоор илүү ойлгомжтой байдлыг баталдаг гэдгийг хэлж байна. Энэ ажлын тулд бид орчуулалтын хуваарилалтын статистикийг сайн үржүүлдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ тэдгээр статистикээс хайж байгаа цацраг хайж байна. Бид NMT-ийн зарим мэддэг эмгэгтэй зүйлсийн тухай MAP хуваалцах боломжтой, NMT-ийн статистикийн тодорхойлолтууд болон MLE-ийн тухай биш гэдгийг харуулж байна. Ялангуяа, бид загварын доорх хамгийн магадлалтай орчуулалт нь маш жижиг магадлал цуглуулж байгааг харуулж байна. Иймээс бид өөрсдийгөө хуваалцах шийдвэрлэлийн дүрэм хэрэглэхийг дэмжиж байна. Бид Байз эрсдэлийн хамгийн бага тохиромжтой тохиромжтой байдал нь NMT загварууд хүлээн зөвхөн хөрөнгө оруулах чухал асуудлыг харуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Nyleg har studiane opna mange patologiar av neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystemer (NMT). Hypotesar som forklarer desse mest tyder på at det er noko som grunnleggjande feil med NMT som eit modell eller den øvingsalgoritmen, maksimal sannsynlighetssestimering (MLE). Dei fleste av denne bevisen vart samla med maksimal postriori- dekoding (MAP), eit avgjøringsregl som er målt å identifisera den høgste omsetjinga som skal brukast, dvs. modus. Vi argumenterer at bevisene korriberer ikkje tilfeldigheten av MAP-koding meir enn kastar tvil på modellen og opplæringsalgoritmen. I denne arbeida viser vi at omsetjingssdistribusjonar gjenoppretter ulike statistikk av dataene godt, men søket på strålen går frå slike statistikk. Vi viser at nokre av dei kjente patologiane og forsiktane av NMT er grunn av MAP-dekoding og ikkje av NMT-statistiske antar eller MLE. I særskilt viser vi at dei mest sannsynlege omsetjingane under modellen akumulerer så lite sannsynlighetsmasse som modus kan betre som grunnleggjande tilfeldig. Vi advokerer derfor bruk av avgjøringsreglane som tar hent til den holistiske omsetjingsdeligeringa. Vi viser at ein tilnærming til minimal Bayes-risikodekoding gir konkurrentiv resultat som stadfestar at NMT-modeller inneheld viktige aspektar av omsetjing godt i forventa.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania ujawniły szereg patologii neuronowych systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT). Hipotezy wyjaśniające te przede wszystkim sugerują, że jest coś zasadniczo nie tak z NMT jako modelem lub jego algorytmem treningowym, maksymalnym oszacowaniem prawdopodobieństwa (MLE). Większość tych dowodów zebrano przy użyciu dekodowania maksymalnego a posteriori (MAP), reguły decyzyjnej mającej na celu zidentyfikowanie tłumaczenia o najwyższej ocenie, tj. trybu. Twierdzimy, że dowody potwierdzają nieadekwatność dekodowania MAP bardziej niż wątpią w model i jego algorytm treningowy. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że rozkłady tłumaczeń dobrze odtwarzają różne statystyki danych, ale że wyszukiwanie wiązki odbiega od takich statystyk. Wykazujemy, że niektóre ze znanych patologii i uprzedzeń NMT wynikają z dekodowania MAP, a nie z założeń statystycznych NMT ani MLE. W szczególności pokazujemy, że najbardziej prawdopodobne tłumaczenia w modelu gromadzą się tak mało masy prawdopodobieństwa, że tryb ten można uznać za zasadniczo arbitralny. Dlatego też opowiadamy się za stosowaniem reguł decyzyjnych uwzględniających całościowo dystrybucję tłumaczeń. Pokazujemy, że przybliżenie minimalnego dekodowania ryzyka Bayesa daje konkurencyjne wyniki potwierdzające, że modele NMT dobrze uwzględniają istotne aspekty tłumaczenia.', 'ro': 'Studiile recente au dezvăluit o serie de patologii ale sistemelor neuronale de traducere automată (NMT). Ipotezele care explică acestea sugerează că este ceva fundamental în neregulă cu NMT ca model sau algoritmul său de formare, estimarea probabilității maxime (MLE). Majoritatea acestor dovezi au fost colectate folosind decodarea maximă a posteriori (MAP), o regulă decizională menită să identifice traducerea cu cel mai mare scor, și anume modul. Susținem că dovezile confirmă inadecvarea decodării MAP mai mult decât pune la îndoială modelul și algoritmul său de formare. În această lucrare, arătăm că distribuțiile de traducere reproduc bine diferite statistici ale datelor, dar căutarea fasciculului se abate de la astfel de statistici. Arătăm că unele dintre patologiile și prejudecățile cunoscute ale NMT se datorează decodării MAP și nu ipotezelor statistice ale NMT și nici MLE. În special, arătăm că cele mai probabile traduceri din cadrul modelului acumulează o masă de probabilitate atât de mică încât modul poate fi considerat în esență arbitrar. Prin urmare, pledăm pentru utilizarea unor reguli decizionale care să ia în considerare distribuirea traducerilor în mod holistic. Arătăm că o aproximare a riscului minim de decodare Bayes oferă rezultate competitive care confirmă faptul că modelele NMT captează aspecte importante ale traducerii bine așteptate.', 'sr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje otkrilo je broj patologija neuronskih sustava prevoda (NMT). Hipoteze koji objašnjavaju ove uglavnom sugeriraju da postoji nešto fundamentalno loše u NMT kao model ili njegov algoritam obuke, maksimalna procjena mogućnosti (MLE). Većina ovih dokaza je okupljena koristeći maksimalnu dekodiranje posteriori (MAP), pravilo odluke usmjereno na identifikaciju najvišeg prevoda, tj. režima. Tvrdimo da dokazi potvrđuju nepravednost MAP dekodiranja više nego sumnja u model i njegov algoritam obuke. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da distribucije prevoda dobro razvijaju različite statistike podataka, ali ta pretraživanja zraka skreće iz takve statistike. Pokazujemo da su neki od poznatih patologa i predrasude NMT zbog dekodiranja MAP-a, a ne statističkih pretpostavki NMT-a niti MLE-a. Posebno, pokazujemo da najverovatnije prevode pod modelom skupljaju tako malo verovatnoće mase da se režim može smatrati suštinski arbitrarnim. Stoga se obraæamo za korištenje pravila odluke koje uzimaju u obzir holistički distribuciju prevoda. Pokazujemo da približavanje minimalnom Dekodiranju rizika Bayes daje konkurentne rezultate potvrđujući da modeli NMT dobro uključuju važne aspekte prevoda.', 'si': 'අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරදේශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයුරාල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) පද්ධතිය ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරති Hypotheses ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා මේ විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා NMT එක්ක මොඩල් වැරදි දෙයක් තියෙනවා නැත්න මේ ගොඩක් සාක්ෂියක් පොස්ටරියෝරි (MAP) ඩිකෝඩ් එකක් භාවිතා කරලා හිටියා, තීරණ නීතියක් හොඳම ස්කෝරින් වාර්ථාව අඳ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඒ සාක්ෂියක් MAP ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ මේ වැඩේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වාර්ථාව විතරය සංවිධානයක් දත්ත හොඳයි, නමුත් ඒ වාර්ථාව සොයාගැනීමේ සංවිධා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ NMT වලින් දන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ MAP ඩිකොඩ් එක නිසා NMT වලින් ස්ථානික විශ්නයක් නෙ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නම් මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ අපි ඉතින් විශ්වාස විදිහට පරිවිධානයක් ගැන බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අඩුම බේස් අවධානයක් අවධානය වෙනුවෙන් අවධානය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන්', 'so': "Waxbarashada la soo dhowaaday waxay muujiyeen isbitaalooyin kala duduwan oo lagu turjumo maskaxda neurada (NMT). Tusaale ahaan waxyaabaha aad u caddayso waxaa loola jeedaa wax khalad ah oo NMT ka mid ah tusaale ahaan ama qoraalka waxbarashada, qiimaha ugu dhaqsaha ah (MLE). Shahaadadan badankood waxaa lagu soo ururiyey isticmaalka ugu badnaanta codsiga posteriori (MAP), kaas oo ah go'aan uu ku qoran yahay aqoonsashada turjumaadda ugu sarreeya, waa qaabka. Waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa in caddeyntu ay sawiraan dhamaanta alaabta MAP oo aan ka filnayn shaki ku saabsan modellka iyo qoraalka waxbarashada. Shaqadan, waxaynu tusnaa in turjumista ay soo celiyaan statisticada kala duduwan ee macluumaadka, laakiin raadinta birta ayaa ka leexda statisticada caynkaas ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaar ka mid ah waddooyinka la yaqaan iyo habbooyinka NMT ay sababto u yihiin habaarka MAP, mana aha malaha statisticada ee NMT ama MLE. Si gaar ah, waxaynu tusnaynaa in turjumaadka ugu macquul ah ee modelka hoostiisa lagu soo turjumo uu soo ururiyo tirada suurtagalka ah in qaabka lagu tirin karo si caadi ah. Sidaa darteed waxaynu bixinaynaa isticmaalka sharciyada go'aanka oo ku xisaabinaya turjumidda si quduus ah. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in u dhow koobnaadda khatar ah ee Bayes uu bixinayo resultada iskutallada ah oo ku xaqiijiya in modellada NMT ay qabsadaan dhinacyo muhiim ah oo turjumaadda aad u rajaynaysa.", 'sv': 'Nyligen genomfﾃｶrda studier har avslﾃｶjat ett antal patologier av neurala maskinﾃｶversﾃ､ttningssystem (NMT). Hypoteser som fﾃｶrklarar dessa tyder mest pﾃ･ att det ﾃ､r nﾃ･got fundamentalt fel med NMT som modell eller dess trﾃ､ningsalgoritm, maximal sannolikhet estimering (MLE). De flesta av dessa bevis samlades in med hjﾃ､lp av maximum a posteriori (MAP) avkodning, en beslutsregel som syftade till att identifiera den hﾃｶgst rankade ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningen, dvs. sﾃ､ttet. Vi hﾃ､vdar att bevisen bekrﾃ､ftar otillrﾃ､ckligheten i MAP avkodning mer ﾃ､n sﾃ､tter tvivel pﾃ･ modellen och dess trﾃ､ningsalgoritm. I detta arbete visar vi att ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningsdistributioner reproducerar olika statistik av data vﾃ､l, men att strﾃ･lsﾃｶkning avviker frﾃ･n sﾃ･dan statistik. Vi visar att nﾃ･gra av de kﾃ､nda patologierna och fﾃｶrdomarna av NMT beror pﾃ･ MAP avkodning och inte pﾃ･ NMT:s statistiska antaganden eller MLE. Framfﾃｶr allt visar vi att de mest sannolika ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningarna under modellen ackumulerar sﾃ･ liten sannolikhetsmassa att lﾃ､get i huvudsak kan betraktas som godtyckligt. Vi fﾃｶresprﾃ･kar dﾃ､rfﾃｶr att man anvﾃ､nder beslutsregler som tar hﾃ､nsyn till ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningsdistributionen pﾃ･ ett helhetsgrepp. Vi visar att en approximation till minsta Bayes riskavkodning ger konkurrenskraftiga resultat som bekrﾃ､ftar att NMT-modeller fﾃ･ngar viktiga aspekter av ﾃｶversﾃ､ttning vﾃ､l i fﾃｶrvﾃ､ntan.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் படிப்புகள் புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) அமைப்புகளின் எண்ணிக்கையை காண்பித்துள்ளது. இதை பெரும்பாலாக விளக்குகிறது என்எம்டி ஒரு மாதிரி அல்லது அதன் பயிற்சி முறைமையாக ஏதாவது தவறு என்று கூறுகிறது, அதிகபட்ச ச சாத்தியமான மதிப்பு ( இந்த பெரும்பாலான தெளிவாக்கங்கள் அதிகபட்ச ஒரு போட்ரிரியி (MAP) குறியீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி ஒன்று சேர்க்கப்பட்டது, அதிக மதிப்பெண்ணின்  நாம் தர்க்கம் செய்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் என்றால், MAP குறியீட்டின் தேவையான அலங்காரம் மாதிரி மற்றும் அதன் பயிற்சி வரி இந்த வேலையில், மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பங்கீடுகள் தரவுகளின் பல புள்ளிவிவரங்களை புதுப்பிக்கும் என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். ஆனா நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் NMT-ன் சில தெரியும் பாதைகளும் மற்றும் பாதைகளும் MAP குறியீடு காரணமாக இருக்கிறது மற்றும் NMT யின் புள் In particular, we show that the most likely translations under the model accumulate so little probability mass that the mode can be considered essentially arbitrary.  எனவே நாம் தீர்ப்பு விதிகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு வழங்குகிறோம். மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பொருட்களை  நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் குறைந்தபட்ச பேய் ஆபத்து குறைவாக்கத்திற்கு அருகிலுள்ள விளைவுகள் எதிர்பார்த்துக்கொண்டு NM', 'ur': 'اگلے مطالعہ کی تعلیم نے نورول ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) سیستموں کی بہت سی پیٹولوژی ظاہر کی ہے۔ ان کی اکثریت مفصل کی تفصیل کرتی ہے کہ NMT کے ساتھ ایک موڈل یا اس کی آموزش الگوریتم کے طور پر کوئی مشکل ہے، سب سے زیادہ احتمال کا ارزش (MLE). اس کی اکثریت دلیلیں مکمل پیسٹریوری (MAP) ڈیکوڈینگ کے مطابق جمع کیے گئے ہیں، ایک فیصلہ قانون جو سب سے بلند اسکورینگ ترجمہ کی شناسایی کرنا چاہتا ہے، یعنی موڈ. ہم argue that the evidence corroborates the inadequacy of MAP decoding than casts doubt on the model and its training algorithm. ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ترجمہ تقسیم کی مختلف آمار اچھی طرح دکھاتے ہیں لیکن اس طرح کی آمار سے بیم تلاش کرتا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ NMT کے بعض معلوم پیٹولوژی اور بغیرات MAP ڈیکوڈ کے سبب ہیں اور نہ NMT کے ایسٹیسی فرضیاں اور نہ MLE کے سبب ہیں. مخصوصا، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ مدل کے نیچے سب سے زیادہ احتمالات ترجمہ اکٹھا کر رہے ہیں تو بہت ہی کم احتمالات ماس ہے کہ موڈ بنیادی طور پر قابل ذریعہ سمجھ سکتا ہے. لہٰذا ہم فیصلہ قانون کے استعمال کے لئے پکارتے ہیں جو ترجمہ تقسیم کے ذریعہ بالکل حساب لیتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ نیم بیز ریسک ڈیکوڈینگ کے نزدیک ایک تقرب کا نتیجہ دیتا ہے کہ NMT نمڈلوں کو انتظار میں بہت اہم ترجمہ کے منتظر ہیں۔', 'ms': 'kajian baru-baru ini telah mengungkapkan sejumlah patologi sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT). Hipotesa yang menjelaskan ini menunjukkan bahawa ada sesuatu yang salah dengan NMT sebagai model atau algoritma latihannya, penilaian kemungkinan maksimum (MLE). Kebanyakan bukti ini dikumpulkan menggunakan maksimum pengekodan posteriori (MAP), peraturan keputusan yang bertujuan untuk mengenalpasti terjemahan-skor tertinggi, iaitu mod. Kami menyangka bahawa bukti mengesahkan kekurangan pengekodan MAP lebih daripada melemparkan keraguan pada model dan algoritma latihannya. Dalam kerja ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa distribusi terjemahan melakukan mereproduksi berbagai statistik data dengan baik, tetapi carian cahaya tersesat dari statistik seperti itu. Kami menunjukkan bahawa beberapa patologi dan biases NMT yang diketahui adalah disebabkan penyahkodan MAP dan bukan disebabkan asumsi statistik NMT atau MLE. Terutama, kita menunjukkan bahawa terjemahan yang paling mungkin di bawah model mengumpulkan massa kemungkinan yang sedikit sehingga mod boleh dianggap secara asal-asal. Oleh itu, kami menyokong untuk menggunakan peraturan keputusan yang mempertimbangkan distribusi terjemahan secara holitik. We show that an approximation to minimum Bayes risk decoding gives competitive results confirming that NMT models do capture important aspects of translation well in expectation.', 'mk': "Неодамнешните студии открија голем број патологии на системите за превод на невровните машини (НМТ). Hypotheses explaining these mostly suggest there is something fundamentally wrong with NMT as a model or its training algorithm, maximum likelihood estimation (MLE).  Повеќето од овие докази беа собрани користејќи максимално декодирање posteriori (MAP), правило за одлука со цел идентификување на преводот со највисоки оценки, т.е. режимот. Ние тврдиме дека доказите ја потврдуваат несоодветноста на декодирањето на MAP повеќе од сомневањето во моделот и неговиот алгоритм за обука. In this work, we show that translation distributions do reproduce various statistics of the data well, but that beam search strays from such statistics.  We show that some of the known pathologies and biases of NMT are due to MAP decoding and not to NMT's statistical assumptions nor MLE.  Особено, покажуваме дека најверојатните преведувања под моделот акумулираат толку мала маса на веројатноста што режимот може да се смета за всушност арбитрален. Затоа ние се залагаме за употребата на правилата за одлуки кои ги земаат во предвид дистрибуцијата на превод холистички. Ние покажуваме дека приближувањето до декодирањето на ризикот на минималниот Бејс дава конкурентни резултати кои потврдуваат дека моделите на НМТ добро ги прифаќаат важните аспекти на преводот во очекувањата.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã phát hiện một số bệnh lý của hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh (NMB). Những giả thuyết giải thích những thứ này cho thấy có điều gì đó sai trái cơ bản với NMT là mô hình hoặc thuật toán huấn luyện của nó, khả năng ước lượng tối đa (MLE). Phần lớn bằng chứng được thu thập bằng cách giải mã tối đa sau (MAP) một nguyên tắc quyết định nhằm xác định vị trí dịch vụ đánh dấu cao nhất, tức là chế độ. Chúng tôi cho rằng bằng chứng xác thực sự thiếu kỹ thuật hóa MAV hơn đặt sự nghi ngờ của mô hình và thuật toán huấn luyện của nó. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng phân phát dịch giống nhiều thống kê dữ liệu khác nhau rất tốt, nhưng việc tìm tia di chuyển đi lạc từ các thống kê này. Chúng tôi cho thấy một s ố bệnh lý và thói giả lập của NMB đã được biết là do sản xuất của MAP và không phải do các giả định thống kê của NMB hay MLE. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi cho thấy các bản dịch có khả năng cao nhất dưới mẫu tích tụ quá ít các khối lượng xác suất đến nỗi chế độ có thể được coi là ngẫu nhiên. Vì vậy, chúng tôi ủng hộ việc sử dụng các quy tắc quyết định để ghi nhớ các phân phối bằng vị thánh. Chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng phân phối rủi ro tối thiểu của Bayes cung cấp kết quả cạnh tranh xác nhận các mô hình NMB thu thập rất nhiều khía cạnh quan trọng trong dịch vụ.', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'qituvchilar bir necha tarjima tizimni (NMT) tarjima qilishdi. Ko'pchilik bu narsalarni o'rganish mumkin, NMT modeli yoki taʼminlovchi algoritni ko'rsatish mumkin, maksimal qiymatning qiymati (MLE). Ushbu hujjatlarning ko'pchiligi maksimal posteriori (MAP) kodlash orqali birlashtirilgan edi, balki eng yuqori tarjimalarni aniqlash mumkin. Biz murakkab qilamiz, ma'lumotlar MAP'yxatini o'zgartiradi, model va o'zning taʼminlovchi algorithiga ko'proq murakkab qiladi. Bu ishda, tarjima tarjima tarjima tarjimasini yaxshi taklif qiladi, lekin bu qismi qidirish statistikasidan yoʻqoladi. Biz NMT'ning bir necha ko'pchilik yo'nalishini ko'rsatganimizni ko'rsatdik, MAP ko'paytuvchiligi va NMT'ning statistika g'oyalarini yoki MLE'ga emas. Ko'rsatganimiz, modeldagi eng eng eng muhimi tarjima tarjimonlar juda kichkina holatni birlashtiradi, bu usulni aslida arbitrary deb hisoblash mumkin. Шундай қилиб, биз маълумотни аниқ тарқатувчига ҳисоблаш учун ҳужжат қоидалари фойдаланиш учун мажбур берурмиз. Biz ko'rayapmiz, kichkina Bayes risiko kodlash uchun qisqarli natijalari NMT modellarini kutishni tasdiqlash mumkin.", 'bg': 'Последните проучвания разкриват редица патологии на невронните системи за машинен превод (НМТ). Хипотезите, обясняващи това, най-вече предполагат, че има нещо фундаментално погрешно с НМТ като модел или неговия тренировъчен алгоритъм, оценка на максималната вероятност (МЛЕ). Повечето от тези доказателства бяха събрани с помощта на максимум а posteriori декодиране (MAP), правило за вземане на решения, насочено към идентифициране на превода с най-висока оценка, т.е. режима. Ние твърдим, че доказателствата потвърждават неадекватността на декодирането на МАП повече от хвърлят съмнение върху модела и неговия тренировъчен алгоритъм. В тази работа показваме, че преводните разпределения възпроизвеждат добре различни статистики на данните, но това търсене на лъч се отклонява от такава статистика. Показваме, че някои от известните патологии и пристрастия на НМТ се дължат на декодиране на МАП, а не на статистическите предположения на НМТ, нито на МЛЕ. По-специално, ние показваме, че най-вероятните преводи по модела натрупват толкова малка вероятност маса, че режимът може да се счита за по същество произволен. Ето защо ние подкрепяме използването на правила за вземане на решения, които отчитат цялостното разпространение на преводите. Показваме, че приблизително декодирането на минималния риск на Байс дава конкурентни резултати, потвърждаващи, че моделите на НМТ улавят важни аспекти на превода добре в очакване.', 'da': "Nylige undersøgelser har afsløret en række patologier af neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer (NMT). Hypoteser, der forklarer disse, tyder mest på, at der er noget grundlæggende galt med NMT som model eller dens træningsalgoritme, maksimal sandsynlighed estimering (MLE). De fleste af disse beviser blev indsamlet ved hjælp af maksimal a posteriori (MAP) dekodning, en beslutningsregle, der sigtede mod at identificere den højest scorede oversættelse, dvs. metoden. Vi hævder, at beviserne bekræfter utilstrækkeligheden af MAP afkodning mere end skaber tvivl om modellen og dens træningsalgoritme. I dette arbejde viser vi, at oversættelsesfordelinger gengiver forskellige statistikker af dataene godt, men at strålesøgning afviger fra sådanne statistikker. Vi viser, at nogle af de kendte patologier og fordomme ved NMT skyldes MAP afkodning og ikke NMT's statistiske antagelser eller MLE. Især viser vi, at de mest sandsynlige oversættelser under modellen akkumulerer så lidt sandsynlighedsmasse, at tilstanden kan betragtes som væsentligt vilkårlig. Vi går derfor ind for, at der anvendes beslutningsregler, der tager hensyn til oversættelsesfordelingen helhedsmæssigt. Vi viser, at en tilnærmelse til minimum Bayes risiko dekodning giver konkurrencedygtige resultater, der bekræfter, at NMT modeller fanger vigtige aspekter af oversættelse godt i forventning.", 'hr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje otkrilo je broj patologa sustava prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT). Hipoteze koji objašnjavaju ove uglavnom sugeriraju da postoji nešto fundamentalno loše u NMT kao model ili njegov algoritam obuke, maksimalna procjena vjerojatnosti (MLE). Većina ovih dokaza se okupila s maksimalnim postrojnim dekodiranjem (MAP), pravilom odluke koja je ciljana identificirati najviši prevod, tj. režim. Tvrdimo da dokazi potvrđuju nepravdu dekodiranja MAP-a više od sumnje u model i njegov algoritam obuke. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da distribucije prevoda dobro reproduktiraju različite statistike podataka, ali ta pretraživanja zraka propadaju iz takvih statistika. Pokazujemo da su neki od poznatih patologa i predrasude NMT-a zbog dekodiranja MAP-a, a ne statističkih pretpostavki NMT-a niti MLE-a. Posebno pokazujemo da se najvjerojatniji prevodi pod modelom skupljaju tako malo vjerojatnosti da se režim može smatrati suštinski arbitrarnim. Stoga se obraćamo za korištenje pravila odluke koje se holistički uzimaju u obzir distribuciju prevoda. Pokazujemo da približavanje minimalnom dekodiranju rizika Bayes daje konkurentne rezultate potvrđujući da modeli NMT dobro uključuju važne aspekte prevoda.', 'de': 'Jüngste Studien haben eine Reihe von Pathologien neuronaler maschineller Translation (NMT)-Systeme aufgedeckt. Hypothesen, die diese erklären, deuten meist darauf hin, dass etwas grundlegend falsch mit NMT als Modell oder seinem Trainingsalgorithmus, Maximum Likelihood Schätzung (MLE) ist. Die meisten dieser Beweise wurden mithilfe der maximalen a posteriori (MAP)-Dekodierung gesammelt, einer Entscheidungsregel, die darauf abzielt, die am höchsten bewertete Übersetzung zu identifizieren, d.h. den Modus. Wir argumentieren, dass die Evidenz die Unzulänglichkeit der MAP-Decodierung mehr als Zweifel an dem Modell und seinem Trainingsalgorithmus wirft. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass Übersetzungsverteilungen zwar verschiedene Statistiken der Daten gut reproduzieren, aber dass die Strahlsuche von solchen Statistiken abweicht. Wir zeigen, dass einige der bekannten Pathologien und Verzerrungen von NMT auf die MAP-Dekodierung und nicht auf die statistischen Annahmen von NMT oder MLE zurückzuführen sind. Insbesondere zeigen wir, dass die wahrscheinlichsten Übersetzungen unter dem Modell so wenig Wahrscheinlichkeitsmasse akkumulieren, dass der Modus als prinzipiell willkürlich betrachtet werden kann. Wir plädieren daher für den Einsatz von Entscheidungsregeln, die die Übersetzungsverteilung ganzheitlich berücksichtigen. Wir zeigen, dass eine Annäherung an die minimale Bayes-Risikodekodierung wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse liefert, die bestätigen, dass NMT-Modelle wichtige Aspekte der Übersetzung in Erwartung gut erfassen.', 'id': "Studi baru-baru ini mengungkapkan sejumlah patologi sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT). Hypotheses explaining these mostly suggest there is something fundamentally wrong with NMT as a model or its training algorithm, maximum likelihood estimation (MLE).  Kebanyakan bukti ini dikumpulkan menggunakan maksimum dekoding posteriori (MAP), aturan keputusan yang bertujuan untuk mengidentifikasi terjemahan skor tertinggi, i.e. mode. Kami berdebat bahwa bukti mengkonfirmasi ketidaktepatan dekodifikasi MAP lebih dari melemparkan keraguan pada model dan algoritma latihannya. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa distribusi terjemahan mereproduksi berbagai statistik data dengan baik, tetapi pencarian sinar tersesat dari statistik tersebut. We show that some of the known pathologies and biases of NMT are due to MAP decoding and not to NMT's statistical assumptions nor MLE.  Terutama, kita menunjukkan bahwa terjemahan yang paling mungkin di bawah model berkumpul massa kemungkinan sedikit bahwa mode dapat dianggap secara pada dasarnya arbitrar. Oleh karena itu kami mendukung untuk menggunakan aturan keputusan yang mempertimbangkan distribusi terjemahan secara holis. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dekodasi risiko minimal Bayes memberikan hasil kompetitif yang mengkonfirmasi bahwa model NMT menangkap aspek penting terjemahan dengan baik dalam harapan.", 'ko': '최근의 연구는 신경기계번역(NMT) 시스템의 일부 병리학을 밝혀냈다.이러한 가설을 해석하는 것은 대부분 NMT가 모델이나 그 훈련 알고리즘, 즉 최대 유사 추정(MLE)으로 근본적인 오류가 존재한다는 것을 보여준다.대부분의 증거는 최대 백업 확률(MAP) 디코딩을 사용하여 수집된 것으로 이것은 결정 규칙으로 득점이 가장 높은 번역, 즉 모델을 확정하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리는 이 증거들이 모델과 훈련 알고리즘에 대한 의심만이 아니라 MAP 디코딩의 부족함을 증명했다고 생각한다.이 작업에서, 우리는 평이분포가 확실히 데이터의 각종 통계 데이터를 잘 재현하였으나, 빔 검색은 이러한 통계 데이터에서 벗어났다는 것을 발견하였다.우리는 NMT의 일부 이미 알려진 병리학과 편향은 NMT의 통계적 가설이나 MLE가 아니라 MAP 디코딩 때문이라고 밝혔다.특히 우리는 모델 아래에서 가장 가능한 평이가 누적될 확률의 질이 매우 작기 때문에 모델은 기본적으로 임의로 여겨질 수 있다.따라서 우리는 번역 분포를 종합적으로 고려한 정책 결정 규칙을 사용하는 것을 제창한다.우리는 최소 베일스 리스크 디코딩과 비슷한 방법이 경쟁력 있는 결과를 제시했고 NMT모델이 번역의 중요한 부분을 잘 포착할 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات اخیراً تعداد بیماری از سیستم ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) را نشان داده است. هیپوتس\u200cها که بیشتر این\u200cها را توضیح می\u200cدهند، پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که با NMT به عنوان یک مدل یا الگوریتم آموزش آن، تقدیم احتمال بیشتری وجود دارد. بیشتر از این مدرک با استفاده از حداکثر یک دستکاری پست\u200cریوری (MAP) جمع شدند، یک قانون تصمیم هدف به شناسایی ترجمه\u200cی بالاترین اسکورینگ، یعنی حالت. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که مدرک ناپایداری MAP دکوندن بیشتر از شک در مدل و الگوریتم آموزش آن را ثابت می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که توزیع ترجمه\u200cها آمار متفاوتی از داده\u200cها را به خوبی تبدیل می\u200cکنند، ولی آن جستجوی سیاه از چنین آمار گم می\u200cشود. ما نشان می دهیم که بعضی از بیماری\u200cهای شناخته شده و طبقات NMT به دلیل decoding MAP و نه به فرضیه\u200cهای آماری NMT و نه MLE است. مخصوصا، ما نشان می دهیم که ترجمه\u200cهای احتمالات زیر مدل بسیار کمی احتمال را جمع می\u200cکند که این مدل را در اصل تصادفی به نظر می\u200cرسد. بنابراین ما برای استفاده از قوانین تصمیم می\u200cگیریم که با توجه به توزیع فرهنگ تعریف تعریف می\u200cکنند. ما نشان می دهیم که نزدیک شدن به خطر کوچکترین بیز تغییر ریسک کمترین بیز نتایج رقابتی را می دهد که مدلهای NMT در انتظار منحصر مهم ترجمه را به خوبی می گیرند.', 'nl': 'Recente studies hebben een aantal pathologieën van neuronale machine translation (NMT) systemen aangetoond. Hypothesen die deze verklaren suggereren meestal dat er iets fundamenteel mis is met NMT als model of zijn trainingsalgoritme, maximale waarschijnlijkheidsschatting (MLE). Het grootste deel van dit bewijs werd verzameld met behulp van maximale a posteriori decodering (MAP), een beslissingsregel gericht op het identificeren van de hoogst scorende vertaling, d.w.z. de modus. We stellen dat het bewijs de ontoereikendheid van MAP-decodering meer dan twijfelt aan het model en zijn trainingsalgoritme. In dit werk laten we zien dat vertaaldistributies weliswaar verschillende statistieken van de gegevens goed reproduceren, maar dat beam search afwijkt van dergelijke statistieken. We tonen aan dat sommige van de bekende pathologieën en biases van NMT te wijten zijn aan MAP decodering en niet aan de statistische veronderstellingen van NMT noch MLE. In het bijzonder laten we zien dat de meest waarschijnlijke vertalingen onder het model zo weinig waarschijnlijkheidsmassa accumuleren dat de modus in wezen willekeurig kan worden beschouwd. Wij pleiten daarom voor het gebruik van beslissingsregels die holistisch rekening houden met de vertaaldistributie. We tonen aan dat een benadering van minimale Bayes risico decodering concurrerende resultaten oplevert die bevestigen dat NMT modellen belangrijke aspecten van vertaling goed vangen in verwachting.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa hivi karibuni umeonyesha tafsiri kadhaa za utafsiri wa mashine ya ubongo (NMT). Hefu zinazoelezea hivi kwa kiasi kikubwa inapendekeza kuwa kuna kitu cha msingi kinachotokana na NMT kama mfano au utaratibu wake wa mafunzo, kiasi kikubwa cha estimation (MLE). Wengi wa ushahidi huu ulikusanyika kwa kutumia uchunguzi wa kiasi kikubwa (MAP), utawala uliohusu kutambua tafsiri ya juu, yaani namna. Tunahoji kuwa ushahidi unaonyesha ukosefu wa kupunguza chama cha MAP zaidi ya kutoa wasiwasi juu ya mtindo na utaratibu wake wa mafunzo. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kwamba usambazaji wa tafsiri unaleta takwimu mbalimbali za taarifa nzuri, lakini utafutaji wa umeme unapotea kwenye takwimu hizo. Tunaonyesha kuwa baadhi ya njia zinazofahamika na upendeleo wa NMT ni kwa sababu ya kupunguzwa kwa MAP na sio kwa dhana za takwimu za NMT wala MLE. Kwa hakika, tunaonyesha kwamba tafsiri zinazowezekana chini ya mifano inakusanya kiwango kidogo cha uwezekano kwamba namna hiyo inaweza kuchukuliwa kama ni ya kiholela. Kwa hiyo tunatetea matumizi ya sheria za uamuzi zinazohusu usambazaji wa tafsiri kwa kiasi kikubwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba kupungua kwa hatari ya chini ya Bayes inaleta matokeo ya ushindani yanayothibitisha kuwa mitindo ya NMT yanafanikiwa mambo muhimu ya kutafsiri vizuri kwa matumaini.', 'tr': "Ýakyndaky araştyrmalar näral maşynyň (NMT) sistemleriniň birnäçe patologiýasyny görkezildi. Hipoteslar bunlary köplenç düşündirip bilýän NMT bilen nusga ýalňyşlyk bardygyny maslahat berýärler. Ýöne bu nusga örän nusga ýalňyşlyk bardygyny maslahat berýärler. Bu kanıtlaryň köpüsi posteriori (MAP) kodlemesini ullanýar, i ň ýokary atlama terjimesini tanamak üçin amaçlandyran karar düzgüni. Biz bu kanunlaryň MAP-yň ýok edilmegini nusgasynda örän we öwrenme algoritmy hakynda şübhelenmesinden köpräk taýýarlandygyny aýdýarys. Bu işde, terjime paýlaşmalaryň beýleki statistikleriniň has gowy üýtgedigini görkezýäris ýöne bu şekilde gözlemek statistiklerinden boşadylýar. NMT'nin bilinen patologiýalaryň we biaslarynyň MAP kodlamasyna nedeniň hökmünde, NMT'yň statistik çarpmalarına we MLE'nin däldigini gösteriyoruz. Özellikle, modelin altında en büyük olası terjime edilen ufak mümkün bir toplam olduğunu gösteririz. Bu şekilde modün esasy adil bir şekilde düşünebilir. Bu nedenle çeviri tatil dağıtımı kabul eden karar kurallarını kullanmak için savunuyoruz. Biz Bayyň azajyk tehlike dekodine yaklaşyk nMT modelleriniň garaşylykda örän möhüm aspektlerini gowy çekýändigini kanıtlaýan netijeleri verir.", 'af': "Onlangse studie het 'n aantal patologies van neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) stelsels geopenbaar. Hypotese wat hierdie meeste voorskryf, beveel dat daar iets fundamenteel verkeerd is met NMT as 'n model of sy onderwerp algoritme, maksimale waarskynlikheid estimatie (MLE). Die meeste van hierdie getuienis is versamel met maksimum 'n posteriori (MAP) dekodering, ' n besluit reël wat die hoogste- skoring vertaling geïdentifiseer is, bv. die modus. Ons argumenteer dat die getuienis die ongelukkigheid van MAP-dekodering meer as kaste twyfel op die model en sy onderriging algoritme corroborates. In hierdie werk, wys ons dat vertaling verskeie statistieke van die data goed herhaal, maar daardie trap soektog straai van sodanige statistiek. Ons wys dat sommige van die bekende patologies en voorspoedies van NMT is vanweë MAP-dekodering en nie aan NMT se statistiese oordelings of MLE nie. In besonderhede, wys ons dat die mees waarskynlik vertalings onder die model so klein waarskynlikheid masse wat die modus in essensieel arbitrieer kan beskou word. Ons advokeer dan vir die gebruik van besluit reëls wat die vertaling verspreiding holistieke in rekening neem. Ons wys dat 'n besondering tot minimale Bayes risiko dekodering gee mededingsresultate wat bevestig dat NMT-modelles belangrike aspekte van vertaling goed in verwagting vang.", 'sq': 'Studimet e fundit kanë zbuluar një numër patologji të sistemeve të përkthimit të makinave nervore (NMT). Hipotezat që shpjegojnë këto sugjerojnë se ka diçka që nuk shkon në thelb me NMT si model apo algoritmin e tij të stërvitjes, vlerësimin maksimal të mundësisë (MLE). Shumica e këtyre provave u mblodhën duke përdorur maksimumin e një dekodimi posteriori (MAP), një rregull vendimi që synon të identifikojë përkthimin me pikë më të larta, pra modalitetin. Argumentojmë se provat e vërtetojnë mungesën e dekodimit të MAP-së më shumë se sa hedhin dyshime në modelin dhe algoritmin e tij të trajnimit. Në këtë punë, ne tregojmë se shpërndarjet e përkthimit riprodhojnë statistikat e ndryshme të të dhënave mirë, por kërkimi i rreze humbet nga statistikat e tilla. Ne tregojmë se disa nga patologjitë dhe paragjykimet e njohura të NMT janë për shkak të dekodimit të MAP dhe jo për supozimet statistike të NMT as MLE. Në veçanti, ne tregojmë se përkthimet më të mundshme nën modelin akumulojnë aq pak masë probabiliteti që modali mund të konsiderohet në thelb arbitrar. Prandaj ne mbrojmë përdorimin e rregullave të vendimit që marrin parasysh shpërndarjen e përkthimit në mënyrë holistike. Ne tregojmë se një përafërsim ndaj dekodimit minimal të rrezikut të Bayes jep rezultate konkurruese që konfirmojnë se modelet NMT kapin aspekte të rëndësishme të përkthimit mirë në pritje.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ትምህርት የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) ስርዓቶች የተለየ ብዙዎችን የጎዳና ግንኙነት አስታወቀዋል፡፡ እነዚህን አብዛኛውን የሚናገሩ ጉዳዮች የNMT መተላለፊያ ወይም ማስተማሪ አሌጎርቲም መሆኑን በመጠቀም የተሳሳተ ስህተት አለ፡፡ ይህ ማስረጃዎች አብዛኞቹ የደረጃ ትርጓሜውን ለማግኘት የሚችል የፍርድ ሥርዓት፣ አዲስ ዓይነት ነው፡፡ ይህ ማስረጃዎች በማስተካከል የMAP ጥያቄ በሞዴል እና ማህበረሰብ ላይ ጥያቄን የሚጨምር ጥያቄ እንዲያሳድጋል እንከራከራለን፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ትርጉም ክፍተቶችን የዳራዎችን የተለየ ቁጥር እንደሚያሳየው እናሳየዋለን፤ ነገር ግን የbeam መረጃ ከዚህ ቁጥር ይጠፋል፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የNMT ጥያቄ እና የኢሜይል ጥያቄ፣ የNMT ስህተት ወይም MLE አይደለም፡፡ በተለይም፣ በሞዴል በታች ያሉት ምናልባት ትርጓሜዎች በሙሉ አካባቢ እንደሆነ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እንግዲህ ትርጉም በተለየ ቅድስነት ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን የፍርድ ሥርዓቶች ለመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ We show that an approximation to minimum Bayes risk decoding gives competitive results confirming that NMT models do capture important aspects of translation well in expectation.', 'az': "Son təhsillərdə nöral maşın çevirilməsi (NMT) sistemlərinin bir neçə patoloji göstərildi. Bunları çox a çıqlayan hipoteslar NMT'nin modeli və təhsil algoritmi olaraq əslində bir şey yanlış olduğunu iddia edir. Bu dəlillərin əksəriyyəti posteriori (MAP) kodlaması ilə birlikdə toplanmış, ən yüksək dəyişiklik tercüməsini təsdiqləmək məqsədilə hökm kuralıdır. Biz mübahisə edirik ki, dəlillər MAP kodlamasından daha çox şübhə edir, modeli və təhsil algoritmi barəsində. Bu işdə, tercümə dağıtılışları verilənlərin müxtəlif statistikasını daha yaxşı dəyişdirir, amma bu tramva arama statistikasından uzaqlaşır. Biz NMT'nin bilinmiş patolojikların və biaslarının bazıları MAP kodlaması və NMT'nin statistik zənnələrinə və MLE'nin dəyişikliklərinə görə olmadığını göstəririk. Özellikle, modellərin altındakı ən mümkün dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərin çox az mümkün olduğunu göstərdik ki, modun əslində arbitrary hesab edilə bilər. Buna görə də biz təkrarlama dağıtımı holistik olaraq hesablayan hökm kurallarını istifadə etmək üçün adlandırırıq. Biz göstəririk ki, minimal Bayes riski kodlamasına yaxınlaşması NMT modellərinin gözlədiyi tərzdə möhkəm dəyişiklik aspektlərini yaxınlaşdırır.", 'hy': "Վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները բացահայտեցին մի շարք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համակարգերի պաթոլոգիաներ: Հիպոթեզները, որոնք բացատրում են սրանք, հիմնականում առաջարկում են, որ NMT-ի որպես մոդելի կամ դրա վարժեցման ալգորիթմի հետ կապված ինչ-որ բան է սխալ, մեծագույն հավանականության գնահատման (MLE). Այս ապացույցների մեծ մասը հավաքվեց օգտագործելով մաքսիմալ պոստերիորի (MAP) կոդավորումը, որոշումների կանոնը, որի նպատակով էր հայտնաբերել ամենաբարձր գնահատման թարգմանությունը, այսինքն' ռեժիմը: We argue that the evidence corroborates the inadequacy of MAP decoding more than casts doubt on the model and its training algorithm.  Այս աշխատանքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ թարգմանման տարածումները լավ վերարտադրում են տվյալների տարբեր վիճակագրությունները, բայց այդ ճառագայթի որոնումը հեռանում է նման վիճակագրություններից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ NMT-ի հայտնի պաթոլոգիաներից որոշները և կողմնականությունները MAP-ի կոդավորման պատճառով են, ոչ NMT-ի վիճակագրական ենթադրություններից կամ MLE-ից: Մենք հատկապես ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մոդելի տակ ամենակարևոր թարգմանությունները այնքան քիչ հավանականության զանգվածն են հավաքում, որ մոդելը կարելի է համարել, ըստ էության, կամավոր: Այսպիսով, մենք պաշտպանում ենք որոշումների կանոնների օգտագործման համար, որոնք հաշվի առնում են թարգմանման տարածումը ամբողջովին: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նվազագույն Բեյզի ռիսկի կոդավորման մոտեցումը մրցակցության արդյունքներ է տալիս, որը հաստատում է, որ NMT մոդելները լավ ընդունում են թարգմանման կարևոր ասպեկտները սպասելիքներում:", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সিস্টেমের বেশ কয়েকটি প্যাটোলজি প্রকাশ করেছে। হাইপটেস ব্যাখ্যা করছে যে বেশীরভাগ পরামর্শ দেয় যে এনএমটির মৌলিক ভুল কিছু আছে যা একটি মডেল হিসেবে বা এর প্রশিক্ষণ আলগরিদম, সর্বোচ্চ সম্ভাবনা  এই প্রমাণের বেশীরভাগ সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে সর্বোচ্চ পোস্ট্রিয়ারি (MAP) কোডিং ব্যবহার করে, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে সর্বোচ্চ স্কোরিং অনুবাদ চি আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে প্রমাণ ম্যাপির অযোগ্যতার সংশোধন করেছে মডেল এবং এর প্রশিক্ষণ অ্যালগরিদমের উপর সন্দেহ প্রদান করার চেয়ে বে এই কাজে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে অনুবাদ বিতরণ তথ্যের বিভিন্ন পরিসংখ্যান পুনরায় প্রকাশ করে, কিন্তু এই বীম অনুসন্ধান এই পরিসংখ্যান থে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এনএমটির কিছু পরিচিত পাথরোগীতা এবং বৈষম্যের কারণে এমএমটির পরিসংখ্যান ধারণা এবং এমএলের কিছু প্রতিযোগিতা। বিশেষ করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মডেলের নীচে সবচেয়ে সম্ভাব্য অনুবাদ এতো সামান্য সম্ভাবনার সংগ্রহ করে যে মোডের মূল প্রধান বিরুদ্ তাই আমরা সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ম ব্যবহারের জন্য প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি যা অনুবাদ বিতরণের ব্যাপারে হিসেবে গ্রহণ করে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ন্যুনতম বেয়েসের ঝুঁকি কমানোর ক্ষেত্রে প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল প্রদান করে যাচ্ছে যে এনএমটি মডেল ভাষায় অনুবাদের গুরু', 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud on näidanud mitmeid neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) süsteemide patoloogiaid. Neid selgitavad hüpoteesid viitavad enamasti NMT-le kui mudelile või selle treeningalgoritmile, maksimaalse tõenäosuse hindamisele (MLE). Enamik neist tõenditest koguti maksimum a posteriori (MAP) dekodeerimise abil, mis on otsusereegel, mille eesmärk on määrata kindlaks kõige suurem tulemus tõlge ehk režiim. Väidame, et tõendid kinnitavad MAP dekodeerimise ebapiisavust rohkem kui heidavad kahtlust mudelile ja selle treeningalgoritmile. Selles töös näitame, et tõlke jaotused ei reprodutseeri statistikat andmeid hästi, kuid et kiire otsing kõrvale selline statistika. Näitame, et mõned teadaolevad NMT patoloogiad ja kallakud on tingitud MAP dekodeerimisest, mitte NMT statistilistest eeldustest ega MLE-st. Eelkõige näitame, et kõige tõenäolisemad tõlked mudeli all koguvad nii vähe tõenäosusmassi, et režiimi võib pidada sisuliselt meelevaldseks. Seetõttu toetame otsuseeskirjade kasutamist, mis võtavad arvesse tõlke jaotamist terviklikult. Näitame, et Bayesi minimaalse riski dekodeerimise ühtlustamine annab konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi, mis kinnitavad, et NMT mudelid hõlmavad tõlkimise olulisi aspekte hästi oodata.', 'cs': 'Nedávné studie odhalily řadu patologií systémů neuronového strojového překladu (NMT). Hypotézy vysvětlující tyto většinou naznačují, že je něco zásadně špatného s NMT jako modelem nebo jeho tréninkovým algoritmem, odhadem maximální pravděpodobnosti (MLE). Většina těchto důkazů byla shromážděna pomocí maximálního a posteriori dekódování (MAP), rozhodovacího pravidla zaměřeného na identifikaci překladu s nejvyšším skórováním, tj. režimu. Tvrdíme, že důkazy potvrzují nedostatečnost dekódování MAP více než vyvolávají pochybnosti o modelu a jeho tréninkovém algoritmu. V této práci ukazujeme, že překladové distribuce dobře reprodukují různé statistiky dat, ale že paprskové vyhledávání se od těchto statistik odchyluje. Ukazujeme, že některé ze známých patologií a předsudků NMT jsou způsobeny dekódováním MAP a nikoli statistickými předpoklady NMT ani MLE. Konkrétně ukazujeme, že nejpravděpodobnější překlady pod modelem hromadí tak malou pravděpodobnostní hmotnost, že režim lze považovat za v podstatě libovolný. Proto obhajujeme používání rozhodovacích pravidel, která zohledňují distribuci překladů komplexně. Ukazujeme, že aproximace minimálního Bayesova rizika dekódování poskytuje konkurenční výsledky potvrzující, že NMT modely zachycují důležité aspekty překladu dobře v očekávání.', 'bs': 'Nedavno ispitivanje otkrilo je broj patologa sustava prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT). Hipoteze koji objašnjavaju ove uglavnom sugeriraju da postoji nešto fundamentalno loše u NMT kao model ili njegov algoritam obuke, maksimalna procjena mogućnosti (MLE). Većina ovih dokaza je okupljena koristeći maksimalnu dekodiranje posteriori (MAP), pravilo odluke usmjereno na identifikaciju najvišeg prevoda, tj. režima. Tvrdimo da dokazi potvrđuju nepravednost MAP dekodiranja više nego sumnja u model i njen algoritam obuke. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da raspodjela prevoda reproduciraju različite statistike podataka dobro, ali ta pretraživanja zraka propada iz takve statistike. Pokazujemo da su neki od poznatih patologa i predrasude NMT zbog dekodiranja MAP-a, a ne statističkih pretpostavki NMT-a niti MLE-a. Posebno, pokazujemo da najvjerojatniji prevodi pod modelom skupljaju tako malo vjerojatnosti da se režim može smatrati suštinski arbitrarnim. Stoga se obraćamo za korištenje pravila odluke koje se holistički uzimaju u obzir distribuciju prevoda. Pokazujemo da približavanje minimalnom dekodiranju rizika Bayes daje konkurentne rezultate potvrđujući da modeli NMT dobro uključuju važne aspekte prevoda.', 'ca': "Els estudis recents han revelat una sèrie de patologies dels sistemes de traducció neural de màquines (NMT). Les hipòtesis que explicen això suggereixen que hi ha alguna cosa fonamentalment malament amb la NMT com a model o el seu algoritme de formació, estimació de la probabilitat màxima (MLE). La majoria d'aquestes evidències es van recollir fent servir la decodificació posteriori (MAP), una regla de decisió destinada a identificar la traducció amb puntuacions més alts, és a dir, el mód. Afirmem que l'evidència corrobora la inadequació de la descodificació del MAP més que duu dubte sobre el model i el seu algoritme de formació. En aquest treball, demostram que les distribucions de traducció reprodueixen moltes estadístiques de les dades bé, però aquesta busca al raig s'escapa d'aquestes estadístiques. Mostrem que algunes de les patològies i biases conegudes de la NMT es deuen a la descodificació del MAP i no a les suposicions estadístiques de la NMT ni a la MLE. En particular, demostram que les traduccions més probables sota el model acumulen tan poca massa de probabilitat que el món pot ser considerat essencialment arbitrari. Per tant, defensem l'ús de normes de decisió que tenen en compte la distribució de traducció de manera holística. Mostrem que una aproximació a la descodificació mínima del risc de Bayes dóna resultats competitius que confirmen que els models NMT capturen aspectes importants de la traducció bé en expectativa.", 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat paljastaneet useita neurologisten konek채채nn철sj채rjestelmien patologioita. N채it채 selitt채v채t hypoteesit viittaavat l채hinn채 siihen, ett채 NMT:ss채 on jotain perustavanlaatuisesti vialla mallina tai sen harjoitusalgoritmina, maksimaalisen todenn채k철isyyden estimointi (MLE). Suurin osa n채ist채 todisteista ker채ttiin k채ytt채m채ll채 maksimum a posteriori (MAP) -dekoodausta, joka on p채채t철ss채채nt철, jonka tarkoituksena oli tunnistaa eniten pisteytetty k채채nn철s eli muoto. V채it채mme, ett채 todisteet vahvistavat MAP-dekooderin riitt채m채tt철myyden enemm채n kuin kyseenalaistavat mallia ja sen harjoitusalgoritmia. T채ss채 ty철ss채 osoitamme, ett채 k채채nn철sjaksot toisintavat hyvin erilaisia tilastoja datasta, mutta ett채 palkkihaku poikkeaa t채llaisista tilastoista. Osoitamme, ett채 osa tunnetuista NMT:n patologioista ja ennakkoluuloista johtuu MAP:n dekoodauksesta eik채 NMT:n tilastollisista oletuksista eik채 MLE:st채. Erityisesti osoitamme, ett채 todenn채k철isimm채t k채채nn철kset mallin alla kertyv채t niin v채h채n todenn채k철isyysmassaa, ett채 moodia voidaan pit채채 olennaisesti mielivaltaisena. Siksi kannatamme p채채t철ksentekos채채nt철jen k채ytt철채, joissa k채채nn철sten jakelu otetaan huomioon kokonaisvaltaisesti. Osoitamme, ett채 l채hent채minen Bayesin minimiriskin dekoodaamiseen antaa kilpailukykyisi채 tuloksia, jotka vahvistavat, ett채 NMT-mallit ottavat hyvin huomioon k채채nn철ksen t채rke채t n채k철kohdat.', 'ha': "Bayani da aka sani, sun nuna wasu shiryoyi na'ura na fassarar masu ƙarami (NMT). Hyitheses, yana bayyana wannan mafi yawa shi, yana son wata ɓata a kima game da NMT kamar wata motsi ko algoritm mai amfani da shi, yana son kima mai yiwuwa (MLE). Babu mafi yawan shaidar wannan aka tãra a yi amfani da kodin posteariri (MAP), wata umurni na gane da ya gane fassarar da mafi girma, misali, shirin. Tuna jãyayya cẽwa shaidar bayani za'a samar da nake da inaki ga shirin MAP ko kuwa ya jẽfa shakka a kan misalin da algoritiyarsa. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nũna wa rabon fassarar da fassarar za'a dubuɗe statistics masu da aka sani, kuma amma, shirin fili ya ɓace daga wannan statistics. Tuna nũna cewa wasu hanyoyin da aka sani na NMT za'a sami mutane na MAP ko kuma bã da zato na NMT ko MLE. Kayyai, Munã nũna wa fassarar masu yiwuwa a ƙara cikin shirin ayuka, ana haɗa da girmar mai yiwuwa don a so kaɗan da za'a iya ƙayyade shirin a ƙayyade arbita. Saboda haka, Munã yin amfani da sharĩ'a masu yin hukunci da za'a abar da rabon fassarar ta zama halartacce. We show that an approximation to minimum Bayes risk decoding gives competitive results confirming that NMT models do capture important aspects of translation well in expectation.", 'jv': 'text-tool-action Type Banyak akèh kudu ngêngé nggawe ing nggawe sistem punika de kelepéngan punika, MAP, kawit perusahaan winih sing apik dhéwé nggawe tarjamahan sing apik dhéwé, ngon sing perusahaan langkung. Awak dhéwé ngerasai perbudhakan nggawe barang nggawe geranglangno MAP kuwi nggawe kesempatan luwih apik dhéwé kuwi model karo Algorithm kuwi wis ngerasai Nang trabah iki, kita ngomongke tindahan kanggo tarjamahan ing dadi kapan dadi iki dadi, njuk dadi winih kanggo ngubah tarjamahan kanggo dadi dadi bisa. Awak dhéwé mungkin ngerti apat-apat lan biasane NMT kuwi kayané MAP ngono nggawe dadi nggawe dadi NMT teka dadi mrE kuwi. Juara-Juara, kita ngomong nik mbukak terjamahan sing gak bakal terusan ning model aku buturan asai mbut sanal sing gak bakal modo iki dadi apik trus. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe aturan kanggo nggawe aturan aturan nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk nglanggar aturan macem sing nggawe geraksi kang bayes nganggep dino sing apik dhéwé, nik nguasai model NMT kuwi nggawe barang apik dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Nedavne študije so razkrile številne patologije sistemov nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT). Hipoteze, ki jih pojasnjujejo, večinoma kažejo, da je nekaj bistveno narobe z NMT kot modelom ali njegovim algoritmom usposabljanja, oceno največje verjetnosti (MLE). Večina teh dokazov je bila zbrana z uporabo dešifriranja maksimum a posteriori (MAP), pravila odločanja, katerega cilj je določiti prevod z najvišjo oceno, tj. način prevajanja. Trdimo, da dokazi potrjujejo neustreznost dekodiranja MAP bolj kot dvomijo na model in njegov algoritem usposabljanja. V tem delu pokažemo, da porazdelitve prevodov dobro reproducirajo različne statistike podatkov, vendar se iskanje žarka odmika od takšne statistike. Pokazali smo, da so nekatere znane patologije in pristranskosti NMT posledica dekodiranja MAP in ne statističnih predpostavk NMT niti MLE. Zlasti pokažemo, da najverjetnejši prevodi pod modelom kopičijo tako malo verjetnostne mase, da se način lahko šteje v bistvu samovoljno. Zato se zavzemamo za uporabo pravil odločanja, ki upoštevajo celostno distribucijo prevodov. Pokazali smo, da približevanje minimalnemu Bayesovemu dekodiranju tveganja daje konkurenčne rezultate, ki potrjujejo, da modeli NMT dobro zajemajo pomembne vidike prevajanja v pričakovanjih.', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ནུས་པ་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་སྒུལ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་འཁོར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཤར་བ་རེད། Hypotheses explaining these mostly suggest there is something fundamentally wrong with NMT as a model or its training algorithm, maximum likelihood estimation (MLE). ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གཙང་བཟོས་བྱེད་བཞིན་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་རྟོགས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་ཉེན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་དང་རང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་ཚིག་དབྱེ་སེལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་། ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་ནས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་འདུག NMT ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་གྲངས་སུ་གཏོང་བ་ནི་MAP་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གཏོང་དང་། NMT་གི་ཚད་རྩིས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་MLE་ལ་ཡོད ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་མཐོང་བྱས་པར། མ་དབྱིབས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་ཤོས་མཁན་གྱི་འགྱུར་བ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལུས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟེ། ང་ཚོས་ཉུང་བའི་Bayes གླེང་ཚད་ཉུང་བའི་ཉེན་ཁ་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་འབྱུང་བ་དེ་གིས་NMT དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྔོན་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ཉེན', 'he': 'מחקרים לאחרונה חשפו מספר פתולוגיות של מערכות התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT). היפותזיות שמסבירות את אלה בעיקר מציעות שיש משהו לא בסדר בסיסית עם NMT כדוגמנית או אלגוריתם האימונים שלה, הערכת סבירות מקסימה (MLE). רוב הראיות האלה נאספו באמצעות פיקוד מאקסימום posteriori (MAP), חוק החלטה שמתכוון לזהות את התרגום הגבוה ביותר, כלומר המצב. We argue that the evidence corroborates the inadequacy of MAP decoding more than casts doubt on the model and its training algorithm.  בעבודה הזו, אנו מראים שהפיצוצים של התרגום משכפלים סטטיסטיקות שונות של הנתונים היטב, אבל החיפוש בקרן הזה מתעלף מהסטטיסטיקה הזאת. אנחנו מראים שחלק מהפתולוגיות והצדדים הידועים של NMT הם בגלל פיקוד MAP ולא בגלל ההנחות הסטטיסטיות של NMT ולא MLE. במיוחד, אנחנו מראים שהתרגומות הכי סבירות תחת המודל אוספות כל כך מעט מסה סבירות שהמצב יכול להיחשב בעצם arbitrary. לכן אנו מתייחסים לשימוש חוקי החלטות שמשקלים את פיצול התרגום באופן כוליסטי. אנחנו מראים שההתקרבות לפיתוח סיכון מינימום של בייס נותנת תוצאות תחרותיות מאשרות שמודלים NMT כופסים היבטים חשובים של התרגום היטב בציפיות.'}
{'en': 'Domain Transfer based Data Augmentation for Neural Query Translation', 'ar': 'زيادة البيانات القائمة على نقل المجال لترجمة الاستعلام العصبي', 'pt': 'Aumento de dados baseado em transferência de domínio para tradução de consulta neural', 'fr': 'Augmentation des données basée sur le transfert de domaine pour la traduction de requêtes', 'es': 'Aumento de datos basado en transferencia de dominio para la traducción de consultas neuronales', 'ja': 'ニューラルクエリ翻訳のためのドメイン転送ベースのデータ拡張', 'zh': '盖域传输之神经询转数增强', 'ru': 'Расширение данных на основе переноса домена для преобразования нейронных запросов', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका क्वेरी अनुवाद के लिए डोमेन स्थानांतरण आधारित डेटा संवर्धन', 'ga': 'Méadú Sonraí Bunaithe ar Aistriú Fearainn le haghaidh Aistriúchán Néar-Cheist', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Επέκταση δεδομένων με βάση τη μεταφορά τομέα για τη μετάφραση νευρωνικού ερωτήματος', 'hu': 'Domain Transfer alapú adatbővítés Neural Query Fordításhoz', 'it': 'Aumento dei dati basato sul trasferimento di domini per la traduzione di query neurali', 'kk': 'Доменді аудару негіздеген деректерді көңіл сұраныс аудару үшін', 'lt': 'Domain Transfer based Data Augmentation for Neural Query Translation', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Domain', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d ചോദ്യം പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡോമെന്\u200d മാറ്റം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡേറ്റാ ആഗ്മെന്റേ', 'mk': 'Агментација на податоците базирани на трансфер на домен за трансфер на неврални прашања', 'mt': 'Żieda fid-Dejta bbażata fuq it-Trasferiment tad-Domain għal Traduzzjoni tat-Talba Newrali', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie danych oparte na transferze domen dla tłumaczenia zapytań neuronowych', 'no': 'Domeneoverføring basert dataaugmentasjon for neiral spørjingssluting', 'ro': 'Augmentarea datelor bazată pe transfer de domeniu pentru traducerea interogării neurale', 'sr': 'Агментација дана за превод невралног питања', 'mn': 'Домены трансферт суурилсан мэдээллийн сэтгэл сэтгэл хөрөнгө', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරල් ප්\u200dරශ්න භාවිතය සඳහා ඩොමේන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය අධාරිත දත්ත විශාලනය', 'ta': 'புதிய கேள்வி மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான தரவு கூறுதல் மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'ڈومین ترنسفور بنیادی ڈاٹ اگنٹمنٹ نیورال کوئرل ترجمن کے لئے', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha macluumaadka ee ku saleysan wareegashada Domain-Query', 'sv': 'Domain Transfer based Data Augmentation for Neural Query Translation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền dữ liệu dựa trên miền cho dịch hạch thần kinh', 'da': 'Domæneoverførselsbaseret dataudvidelse til oversættelse af neural forespørgsel', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на данни въз основа на трансфер на домейн за превод на неврални заявки', 'hr': 'Povećanje podataka na temelju prijenosa domena za neuronski prevod ispitivanja', 'nl': 'Data Augmentation op basis van domeinoverdracht voor Neural Query Translation', 'ko': '역 이동 기반 신경 조회 번역 데이터 확장', 'de': 'DomĂ¤nenĂ¼bertragungsbasierte Datenerweiterung fĂ¼r die Ăœbersetzung neuronaler Abfragen', 'id': 'Pemindahan Data Berdasarkan Domain Augmentation untuk Translation Pertanyaan Neural', 'fa': 'افزایش داده\u200cهای پایه انتقال دامنه برای ترجمه سوال عصبی', 'tr': 'Naýral Query terjimesi üçin sahypa naktar', 'sw': 'Domain Transfer based Data Augmentation for Neural Query Translation', 'af': 'Domein Oordrag Basiese Data Augmentasie vir Neurale Navraag Vertaling', 'sq': 'Rritja e të dhënave bazuar në transferimin e domenit për përkthimin e kërkesës nervore', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'az': 'Nöral Soruşma Qurulması üçün Domain Transfer Based Data Augmentation', 'bn': 'নিউরাল অনুবাদের জন্য ডোমেন ট্রান্সফারেশন ভিত্তিক তথ্য অংশগ্রহণ', 'bs': 'Povećanje podataka na temelju prijenosa domena za neuronski prevod ispitivanja', 'ca': 'Aumentació de dades basades en transferència de domini per traducció de preguntes neuronals', 'et': 'Domeeniülekandel põhinev andmete suurendamine neuropäringute tõlkimiseks', 'cs': 'Rozšíření dat založené na přenosu domén pro překlad neuronových dotazů', 'fi': 'Domain Transfer based Data Augmentation for Neural Query Translation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Povečanje podatkov na podlagi prenosa domene za prevajanje nevralnih poizvedb', 'jv': 'domain', 'bo': 'Domain Transfer based Data Augmentation for Neural Query Translation', 'he': 'תוספת נתונים מבוססת מעברת שטח לתרגום חקירה נוירולית'}
{'en': 'Query translation (QT) serves as a critical factor in successful cross-lingual information retrieval (CLIR). Due to the lack of parallel query samples, neural-based QT models are usually optimized with synthetic data which are derived from large-scale monolingual queries. Nevertheless, such kind of pseudo corpus is mostly produced by a general-domain translation model, making it be insufficient to guide the learning of QT model. In this paper, we extend the data augmentation with a domain transfer procedure, thus to revise synthetic candidates to search-aware examples. Specifically, the domain transfer model is built upon advanced Transformer, in which layer coordination and mixed attention are exploited to speed up the refining process and leverage parameters from a pre-trained cross-lingual language model. In order to examine the effectiveness of the proposed method, we collected French-to-English and Spanish-to-English QT test sets, each of which consists of 10,000 parallel query pairs with careful manual-checking. Qualitative and quantitative analyses reveal that our model significantly outperforms strong baselines and the related domain transfer methods on both translation quality and retrieval accuracy.', 'ar': 'تعمل ترجمة الاستعلام (كيو تي) كعامل حاسم في نجاح استرجاع المعلومات عبر اللغات (CLIR). نظرًا لعدم وجود عينات استعلام متوازية ، عادةً ما يتم تحسين نماذج QT القائمة على الأعصاب ببيانات تركيبية مشتقة من استعلامات أحادية اللغة واسعة النطاق. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذا النوع من النصوص الزائفة يتم إنتاجه في الغالب من خلال نموذج ترجمة للمجال العام ، مما يجعله غير كافٍ لتوجيه تعلم نموذج QT. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بتوسيع عملية زيادة البيانات من خلال إجراء نقل المجال ، وبالتالي لمراجعة المرشحين التركيبيين لأمثلة مدركة للبحث. على وجه التحديد ، تم بناء نموذج نقل المجال على محول متقدم ، حيث يتم استغلال تنسيق الطبقة والاهتمام المختلط لتسريع عملية الصقل والاستفادة من المعلمات من نموذج لغوي متعدد اللغات تم تدريبه مسبقًا. من أجل فحص فعالية الطريقة المقترحة ، قمنا بجمع مجموعات اختبار QT من الفرنسية إلى الإنجليزية ومن الإسبانية إلى الإنجليزية ، ويتكون كل منها من 10000 زوج استعلام متوازي مع فحص يدوي دقيق. تكشف التحليلات النوعية والكمية أن نموذجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس القوية وطرق نقل المجال ذات الصلة من حيث جودة الترجمة ودقة الاسترجاع.', 'es': 'La traducción de consultas (QT) es un factor fundamental para la recuperación exitosa de información multilingüe (CLIR). Debido a la falta de muestras de consultas paralelas, los modelos QT basados en neuronas generalmente se optimizan con datos sintéticos que se derivan de consultas monolingües a gran escala. Sin embargo, este tipo de pseudo corpus se produce principalmente mediante un modelo de traducción de dominio general, por lo que es insuficiente para guiar el aprendizaje del modelo QT. En este artículo, ampliamos el aumento de datos con un procedimiento de transferencia de dominio, para revisar los candidatos sintéticos a ejemplos basados en búsquedas. Específicamente, el modelo de transferencia de dominio se basa en el avanzado Transformer, en el que la coordinación de capas y la atención mixta se explotan para acelerar el proceso de refinamiento y aprovechar los parámetros de un modelo de lenguaje multilingüe previamente entrenado. Para examinar la eficacia del método propuesto, recopilamos conjuntos de pruebas QT de francés a inglés y de español a inglés, cada una de las cuales consta de 10.000 pares de consultas paralelas con una cuidadosa verificación manual. Los análisis cualitativos y cuantitativos revelan que nuestro modelo supera significativamente las bases de referencia sólidas y los métodos de transferencia de dominio relacionados tanto en la calidad de la traducción como en la precisión de la recuperación.', 'pt': 'A tradução de consulta (QT) serve como um fator crítico na recuperação bem-sucedida de informações em vários idiomas (CLIR). Devido à falta de amostras de consultas paralelas, os modelos QT baseados em neurônios geralmente são otimizados com dados sintéticos derivados de consultas monolíngues de grande escala. No entanto, esse tipo de pseudo corpus é produzido principalmente por um modelo de tradução de domínio geral, tornando-se insuficiente para orientar o aprendizado do modelo QT. Neste artigo, estendemos o aumento de dados com um procedimento de transferência de domínio, para assim revisar candidatos sintéticos a exemplos de busca. Especificamente, o modelo de transferência de domínio é construído no Transformer avançado, no qual a coordenação de camadas e a atenção mista são exploradas para acelerar o processo de refinamento e alavancar parâmetros de um modelo de idioma cruzado pré-treinado. Para examinar a eficácia do método proposto, coletamos conjuntos de testes QT de francês para inglês e espanhol para inglês, cada um dos quais consiste em 10.000 pares de consultas paralelas com verificação manual cuidadosa. Análises qualitativas e quantitativas revelam que nosso modelo supera significativamente as linhas de base fortes e os métodos de transferência de domínio relacionados tanto na qualidade da tradução quanto na precisão da recuperação.', 'fr': "La traduction des requêtes (QT) est un facteur critique dans la réussite de la récupération d'informations multilingues (CLIR). En raison de l'absence d'échantillons de requêtes parallèles, les modèles QT neuronaux sont généralement optimisés avec des données synthétiques dérivées de requêtes monolingues à grande échelle. Néanmoins, ce type de pseudo-corpus est principalement produit par un modèle de traduction de domaine général, ce qui le rend insuffisant pour guider l'apprentissage du modèle QT. Dans cet article, nous étendons l'augmentation des données avec une procédure de transfert de domaine, afin de réviser les candidats synthétiques en exemples compatibles avec la recherche. Plus précisément, le modèle de transfert de domaine repose sur un Transformer avancé, dans lequel la coordination des couches et l'attention mixte sont exploitées pour accélérer le processus de raffinement et tirer parti des paramètres d'un modèle de langage multilingue pré-entraîné. Afin d'examiner l'efficacité de la méthode proposée, nous avons collecté des ensembles de tests QT du français vers l'anglais et de l'espagnol vers l'anglais, chacun composé de 10 000 paires de requêtes parallèles avec une vérification manuelle minutieuse. Les analyses qualitatives et quantitatives révèlent que notre modèle surpasse de manière significative les bases solides et les méthodes de transfert de domaine associées en termes de qualité de traduction et de précision de récupération.", 'ja': 'クエリ翻訳（ QT ）は、言語間情報検索（ CLIR ）に成功するための重要な要素です。 並列クエリサンプルの欠如により、ニューラルベースのQTモデルは、通常、大規模なモノリンガルクエリから派生した合成データで最適化される。 それにもかかわらず、このような擬似コーパスは、ほとんどの場合、一般ドメイン翻訳モデルによって生成されるため、QTモデルの学習を導くには不十分である可能性がある。 本稿では、ドメイン転送手順を用いてデータ拡張を拡張し、合成候補を検索を意識した例に改訂する。 具体的には、ドメイン転送モデルは、高度なトランスフォーマーに基づいて構築されており、そこでは、層調整と混合注意が利用されて、洗練プロセスを高速化し、事前にトレーニングされたクロスリンガル言語モデルからのパラメータを活用します。 提案された方法の有効性を検討するために、フランス語から英語へ、スペイン語から英語へのQTテストセットを収集しました。これらはそれぞれ、慎重な手動チェックで10,000の並列クエリペアで構成されています。 定性的および定量的分析は、翻訳品質と検索精度の両方において、当社のモデルが強力なベースラインおよび関連するドメイン転送方法を大幅に上回っていることを明らかにします。', 'hi': 'क्वेरी अनुवाद (क्यूटी) सफल क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति (CLIR) में एक महत्वपूर्ण कारक के रूप में कार्य करता है। समानांतर क्वेरी नमूनों की कमी के कारण, तंत्रिका-आधारित क्यूटी मॉडल को आमतौर पर सिंथेटिक डेटा के साथ अनुकूलित किया जाता है जो बड़े पैमाने पर मोनोलिंगुअल प्रश्नों से प्राप्त होते हैं। फिर भी, इस तरह के छद्म कॉर्पस का उत्पादन ज्यादातर एक सामान्य-डोमेन अनुवाद मॉडल द्वारा किया जाता है, जिससे यह क्यूटी मॉडल के सीखने का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए अपर्याप्त हो जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक डोमेन स्थानांतरण प्रक्रिया के साथ डेटा वृद्धि का विस्तार करते हैं, इस प्रकार सिंथेटिक उम्मीदवारों को खोज-जागरूक उदाहरणों में संशोधित करने के लिए। विशेष रूप से, डोमेन स्थानांतरण मॉडल उन्नत ट्रांसफॉर्मर पर बनाया गया है, जिसमें परत समन्वय और मिश्रित ध्यान को रिफाइनिंग प्रक्रिया को गति देने और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित क्रॉस-लिंगुअल भाषा मॉडल से मापदंडों का लाभ उठाने के लिए शोषण किया जाता है। प्रस्तावित विधि की प्रभावशीलता की जांच करने के लिए, हमने फ्रेंच-टू-इंग्लिश और स्पेनिश-टू-इंग्लिश क्यूटी परीक्षण सेट एकत्र किए, जिनमें से प्रत्येक में सावधानीपूर्वक मैनुअल-चेकिंग के साथ 10,000 समानांतर क्वेरी जोड़े शामिल हैं। गुणात्मक और मात्रात्मक विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता और पुनर्प्राप्ति सटीकता दोनों पर मजबूत बेसलाइन और संबंधित डोमेन हस्तांतरण विधियों को काफी बेहतर बनाता है।', 'zh': '询译者 (QT) 成功语言信息检索 (CLIR) 之 关键因素也。 以乏而问样本,盖神经之QT模常从大单语询其合数而优化之。 然此伪语料库多出于域译,不足以导QT之学。 于本文中,因域名移序广数增强,而改合成候选者为搜索感知示例。 凡域移模立于上Transformer之上,其用重调混合以速之优化而利用于豫练之参数。 参伍其有效性,收法语于英语、西班牙语于英语之QT,每试其集由10,000并行询成,而审手动之。 定性定量分析明,译准确性显优基线关域名转移方法。', 'ru': 'Перевод запросов (QT) служит решающим фактором успешного поиска информации на разных языках (CLIR). Из-за отсутствия параллельных выборок запросов нейронные QT-модели обычно оптимизируются с помощью синтетических данных, полученных из крупномасштабных одноязычных запросов. Тем не менее, такой вид псевдокорпуса в основном производится моделью трансляции в общей области, что делает его недостаточным для руководства обучением модели QT. В этой статье мы расширяем расширение данных с помощью процедуры переноса домена, таким образом, чтобы пересмотреть синтетические кандидаты для поиска-понимающих примеров. В частности, модель передачи домена основана на продвинутом Трансформере, в котором координация уровней и смешанное внимание используются для ускорения процесса уточнения и использования параметров из предварительно обученной межъязыковой языковой модели. Для изучения эффективности предлагаемого метода мы собрали наборы тестов QT с французского на английский и с испанского на английский, каждый из которых состоит из 10 000 пар параллельных запросов с тщательной ручной проверкой. Качественные и количественные анализы показывают, что наша модель значительно превосходит сильные базовые линии и связанные с ними методы передачи домена как по качеству перевода, так и по точности поиска.', 'ga': "Feidhmíonn aistriúchán ceiste (QT) mar fhachtóir ríthábhachtach maidir le haisghabháil faisnéise tras-teangacha (CLIR). Mar gheall ar an easpa samplaí fiosrúcháin comhthreomhara, is gnách go ndéantar samhlacha néar-bhunaithe QT a bharrfheabhsú le sonraí sintéiseacha a dhíorthaítear ó cheisteanna aonteangacha ar scála mór. Mar sin féin, is samhail aistriúcháin fearainn ghinearálta den chuid is mó a tháirgtear a leithéid de bhréig-chorp, rud a fhágann nach leor é chun foghlaim na samhla QT a threorú. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid leis an méadú ar shonraí le nós imeachta aistrithe fearainn, mar sin chun iarrthóirí sintéiseacha a athbhreithniú chun samplaí a bhfuil eolas acu ar an gcuardach. Go sonrach, tógtar an tsamhail aistrithe fearainn ar ardchlaochladán, ina mbaintear leas as comhordú sraitheanna agus aird mheasctha chun an próiseas scagtha agus paraiméadair ghiarála a bhrostú ó mhúnla teanga tras-oilte réamh-oilte. D'fhonn éifeachtúlacht an mhodha atá beartaithe a scrúdú, bhailigheamar tacair tástála QT Fraincis-go-Béarla agus Spáinnis-go-Béarla, gach ceann acu comhdhéanta de 10,000 péirí fiosrúcháin comhthreomhara le seiceáil láimhe cúramach. Léiríonn anailís cháilíochtúil agus chainníochtúil go sáraíonn ár múnla go suntasach bonnlínte láidre agus na modhanna aistrithe fearainn gaolmhara maidir le cáilíocht aistriúcháin agus cruinneas aisghabhála.", 'hu': 'A lekérdezések fordítása (QT) kritikus tényezőként szolgál a sikeres, többnyelvű információlekérdezésben (CLIR). A párhuzamos lekérdezési minták hiánya miatt az idegi alapú QT modelleket általában szintetikus adatokkal optimalizálják, amelyek nagyméretű egynyelvű lekérdezésekből származnak. Ennek ellenére az ilyen fajta pszeudokorpuszt leginkább egy általános domain fordítási modell állítja elő, így nem elegendő a QT modell tanulásának irányítására. Ebben a tanulmányban az adatok kiterjesztését domain transzfer eljárással bővítjük ki, így a szintetikus jelöltek áttekintése keresési tudatos példákra. Konkrétan a domain transzfer modell a fejlett Transformerre épül, amelyben a rétegek koordinációját és a vegyes figyelmet használják ki, hogy felgyorsítsák a finomítási folyamatot és kihasználják a paramétereket egy előre képzett, többnyelvű nyelvű modellből. A javasolt módszer hatékonyságának vizsgálata érdekében francia-angol és spanyol-angol QT tesztkészleteket gyűjtöttünk össze, amelyek mindegyike 10 000 párhuzamos lekérdezési párból áll gondos manuális ellenőrzéssel. Minőségi és kvantitatív elemzések azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja az erős alapvető értékeket és a kapcsolódó domain transzfer módszereket mind a fordítási minőség, mind a visszakeresés pontossága tekintetében.', 'el': "Η μετάφραση ερωτήματος (QT) χρησιμεύει ως κρίσιμος παράγοντας για την επιτυχή ανάκτηση γλωσσικών πληροφοριών (CLIR). Λόγω της έλλειψης παράλληλων δειγμάτων ερωτήματος, τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα βελτιστοποιούνται συνήθως με συνθετικά δεδομένα που προέρχονται από μονογλωσσικά ερωτήματα μεγάλης κλίμακας. Παρ' όλα αυτά, ένα τέτοιο είδος ψευδο-σώματος παράγεται ως επί το πλείστον από ένα γενικό μεταφραστικό μοντέλο, καθιστώντας το ανεπαρκές για να καθοδηγήσει την εκμάθηση του μοντέλου QT. Στην παρούσα εργασία, επεκτείνουμε την αύξηση δεδομένων με μια διαδικασία μεταφοράς τομέων, έτσι ώστε να αναθεωρήσουμε συνθετικούς υποψηφίους σε παραδείγματα που γνωρίζουν την αναζήτηση. Συγκεκριμένα, το μοντέλο μεταφοράς τομέα βασίζεται στον προηγμένο μετασχηματιστή, στον οποίο ο συντονισμός στρώματος και η μικτή προσοχή αξιοποιούνται για να επιταχυνθεί η διαδικασία εξευγενισμού και να αξιοποιηθούν οι παράμετροι από ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο. Προκειμένου να εξεταστεί η αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου, συλλέξαμε σύνολα δοκιμών γαλλικό-αγγλικό και ισπανικό-αγγλικό, καθένα από τα οποία αποτελείται από 10.000 παράλληλα ζεύγη ερωτήματος με προσεκτικό χειροκίνητο έλεγχο. Οι ποιοτικές και ποσοτικές αναλύσεις αποκαλύπτουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις ισχυρές βάσεις και τις σχετικές μεθόδους μεταφοράς τομέα τόσο στην ποιότητα μετάφρασης όσο και στην ακρίβεια ανάκτησης.", 'ka': 'კითხვა შეტყობინება (QT) იყენება კრიტიკური ფაქტორის შემდგომარებელი კრისიკური ინფორმაციის მიღებაში (CLIR). პარალელური კითხვების მაგალითად, ნეიროლური QT მოდელები უბრალოდ ოპტიმიზებულია სინტეტიური მონაცემებით, რომლებიც დიდი მაგალითად მონოლიგური კითხვებიდან გამოიყენებულია. მაგრამ, ასეთი პესედო კორპუსი უფრო მეტად იქნება საერთო დემომინის გადაწყვეტა მოდელზე, რაც იქნება QT მოდელის გასწავლების შესაძლებლობა მუშაობელია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მონაცემების აგგენტირებას დიომენტის გადატანსების პროცესით გადავიტანოთ, რადგან სინტეტიკური კანდიდენტები გადავიტანოთ საკუთარი მაგალი განსაკუთრებულია, დიომინის გადატანსტრესტის მოდელის შექმნა განსაკუთრებული ტრანფორმეტრისტების შემდეგ, რომელიც ჩატანსტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრის ჩვენ წარმოიდგინეთ პროგრამის ეფექტიურობის შესახებ, ჩვენ ფრანუს-ანგლისურად და სპანუს-ანგლისურად QT ტესტის კონტესტის კონტესტის კონტესტის კონტესტის კონტესტის კონტეს კვალტატიური და კვალტატიური ანალიზები აღმოჩნენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო ძალიან ფესტიური ხაზები და შესახებ დიომინის გადატანსტის მეტოდოებები', 'it': "La traduzione delle query (QT) funge da fattore critico per il recupero delle informazioni cross-lingual (CLIR) di successo. A causa della mancanza di campioni di query parallele, i modelli QT basati su neurali sono solitamente ottimizzati con dati sintetici derivati da query monolingue su larga scala. Tuttavia, questo tipo di pseudo corpus è principalmente prodotto da un modello di traduzione di dominio generale, il che lo rende insufficiente per guidare l'apprendimento del modello QT. In questo articolo, estendiamo l'aumento dei dati con una procedura di trasferimento del dominio, così da rivedere i candidati sintetici ad esempi consapevoli della ricerca. In particolare, il modello di trasferimento del dominio è basato su Transformer avanzato, in cui la coordinazione dei livelli e l'attenzione mista vengono sfruttate per accelerare il processo di raffinazione e sfruttare i parametri da un modello linguistico multilingue pre-addestrato. Al fine di esaminare l'efficacia del metodo proposto, abbiamo raccolto set di test QT francese-inglese e spagnolo-inglese, ciascuno dei quali consiste di 10.000 coppie di query parallele con attento controllo manuale. Le analisi qualitative e quantitative rivelano che il nostro modello supera significativamente le solide linee di base e i relativi metodi di trasferimento di dominio sia in termini di qualità della traduzione che di accuratezza del recupero.", 'kk': 'Сұраныс аударуы (QT) бірнеше тілді мәліметті алу (CLIR) сәтті көп тілді мәліметті алу үшін қиын фактор қызметі. Параллельді сұраныс үлгілері жоқ себебі, невралдық QT үлгілері үлкен монолингілікті сұраныстардан шығарылған синтетикалық деректермен оптимизацияланады. Әйтпесе, бұл псевдо корпус көпшілігі жалпы доменді аудару үлгісі бойынша құрылады. QT үлгісін оқытуға жеткіліксіз. Бұл қағазда, біз деректерді доменге аудару процедурымен көтеріп, синтетикалық кандидаттарды іздеу үшін мысалдар үшін қайталау үшін. Ескерту үшін, доменді тасымалдау үлгісі жақсы түрлендірушіне құрылады. Қабатты координациясы мен араластырылған назарды түрлендіру процесін жылдамдықтау үшін жұмыс істеу және алдын- түрлендірілген тіл үлгісінен Келтірілген тәсілдің эффектілігін тексеру үшін, біз французға, ағылшын және испан және ағылшын тілінен QT сынақтарын жинап алдық. Әрбірінің 10 000 параллелі сұранысты қолмен тексеріп тұрады. Сапаттылық және санативтік анализ үлгіміздің күшті негізгі сызықтарын және қосымша доменге аудару сапасы мен алу дұрыстығында қатынау әдістерін өзгертеді.', 'lt': 'Klausimo vertimas (QT) yra lemiamas veiksnys sėkmingai gaunant tarpkalbinę informaciją (CLIR). Atsižvelgiant į tai, kad nėra lygiagrečių užklausos mėginių, nerviniais QT modeliais paprastai optimizuojami sintetiniai duomenys, gauti iš didelio masto monokalbinių užklausų. Vis dėlto tokio pobūdžio pseudo corpus daugiausia gaminamas bendrojo domeno vertimo modeliu, todėl nepakanka vadovautis QT modelio mokymuisi. Šiame dokumente pratęsiame duomenų didinimą taikant srities perdavimo procedūrą, taip peržiūrėdami sintetinius kandidatus ir paieškant žinomus pavyzdžius. Konkrečiai, domeno perdavimo model is grindžiamas pažangiu Transformer, kuriame naudojamas sluoksnių koordinavimas ir mišrus dėmesys siekiant paspartinti rafinavimo procesą ir iš anksto parengto tarpkalbinio modelio naudotis sverto parametrais. Siekiant išnagrinėti siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą, surinkėme prancūzų–anglų ir ispanų–anglų QT bandymų rinkinius, kurių kiekvieną sudaro 10 000 lygiagrečių klausimų poros su kruopščiu rankiniu patikrinimu. Kokybinės ir kiekybinės analizės rodo, kad mūsų modelis gerokai viršija tvirtas bazines vertes ir susijusius srities perdavimo metodus tiek vertimo kokybės, tiek surinkimo tikslumo atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Query translation (QT) serves as a critical factor in successful cross-lingual information retrieval (CLIR).  Поради недостатокот на паралелни примероци на прашање, неуралните модели на QT обично се оптимизираат со синтетички податоци кои се изведени од монојазични прашања на голема skalа. Сепак, ваков вид на псевдо корпус е претежно произведен од генерален модел на превод на домен, што го прави несоодветен за водење на учењето на QT моделот. Во овој весник, ја прошируваме зголемувањето на податоците со процедура на трансфер на домен, така да ги ревидираме синтетичките кандидати на примери кои се свесни за пребарување. Специфично, моделот за трансфер на домен е изграден на напредниот трансформер, во кој се искористува координацијата на слоевите и мешаното внимание за забрзување на процесот на рафинансирање и користење на параметрите од предобучениот крстојазичен модел на јазик. In order to examine the effectiveness of the proposed method, we collected French-to-English and Spanish-to-English QT test sets, each of which consists of 10,000 parallel query pairs with careful manual-checking.  Квалитативните и квантитативните анализи откриваат дека нашиот модел значително ги надминува силните основни линии и поврзаните методи на трансфер на домените, како за квалитетот на превод, така и за преземањето точност.', 'ms': 'Perjemahan pertanyaan (QT) berkhidmat sebagai faktor kritik dalam pemulihan maklumat saling bahasa yang berjaya (CLIR). Sebab kekurangan sampel pertanyaan selari, model QT berasaskan saraf biasanya optimasi dengan data sintetik yang berasal dari pertanyaan monobahasa skala besar. Namun, jenis pseudo corpus seperti ini kebanyakan dihasilkan oleh model terjemahan-domain umum, membuat ia tidak cukup untuk memimpin pembelajaran model QT. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperluas peningkatan data dengan prosedur pemindahan domain, jadi untuk mengubah calon sintetik kepada contoh-contoh yang sedar mencari. Secara khusus, model pemindahan domain dibangun pada Transformer maju, di mana koordinasi lapisan dan perhatian campuran dieksploitasi untuk mempercepat proses penarafan dan penggunaan parameter dari model bahasa saling-bahasa terlatih. In order to examine the effectiveness of the proposed method, we collected French-to-English and Spanish-to-English QT test sets, each of which consists of 10,000 parallel query pairs with careful manual-checking.  Analisis kualitatif dan kuantitatif menunjukkan bahawa model kita secara signifikan melebihi garis dasar yang kuat dan kaedah pemindahan domain yang berkaitan pada kualiti terjemahan dan keperluan pemulihan.', 'no': 'Spørsmål (QT) tjener som ein kritisk faktor i suksessfull krysspråk- informasjon (CLIR). Av mangling av parallelle spørsmønsterelement blir det vanlegvis optimalisert nøyralbaserte QT-modeller med syntetiske data som kjem ut frå storskala monolinguske spørsmål. Men såleis pseudo corpus er det meste produsert av eit generell domeneomsetjingsmodul, slik at det ikkje er nok å hjelpa læring av QT-modellen. I denne papiret utvidar vi data-augmentasjonen med ein domeneoverføringsprosedyr, slik at du gjer revisjon av syntetiske kandidatar for eksemplar for å søkja. Spesielt er domeneoverføringsmodulen bygd på avansert transformer, der lagkoordinasjonen og blandet oppmerksomhet vert ekspluatert for å spelere oppfyllingsprosessen og leverare parametrar frå eit føreøvinga krysspråk-modell. For å undersøke effektiviteten av den foreslåtte metoden, samla vi testsett frå fransk til engelsk og spansk til engelsk QT, kvar av dei inneheld av 10 000 parallelle spørsmålparar med forsiktig manuell kontroll. Kvalitative og kvantitative analyser viser at modellen vårt utfører større baselinjer og tilhøyrande domeneoverføringsmetoder på både omsetjingskvaliteten og retrieverkvaliteten.', 'ml': '@ info പാരാളല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചോദിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കാരണമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ കിടി മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ടിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും  എന്നാലും ഇത്തരം പെസുഡോ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ക്യൂടി മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ പഠനം കാണിക്കുന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയോടൊപ്പം ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുന്നത് നാം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് സിന്\u200dറെറ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, മുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലന മാതൃകയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രാന In order to examine the effectiveness of the proposed method, we collected French-to-English and Spanish-to-English QT test sets, each of which consists of 10,000 parallel query pairs with careful manual-checking.  ക്വാലിറ്റിവേറ്ററിവും വിശേഷതകളും വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളിലും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മാറ്റു', 'mn': 'Кверсийн орчуулалт (QT) нь олон хэл мэдээллийг авах (CLIR) амжилтын чухал хүчин зүйл болдог. Параллель квери жишээн байхдаа мэдрэлийн суурь QT загварууд ихэвчлэн том хэмжээний ганц хэлний кверитээс гарсан синтетик өгөгдлийг ашигладаг. Гэвч ийм төрлийн псевдоо корпус ихэнхдээ ерөнхий хэлбэрийн орчуулалтын загвараар бүтээж байна. QT загварын суралцах нь хангалтгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг холбоотой шилжүүлэлтийн процедур нэмэгдүүлж, тэгэхээр синтетик удирдагчийг хайртай жишээлүүддээ шинэчлэх болно. Тодорхой хэлбэрээр домены шилжүүлэлтийн загвар хөгжүүлэгч дээр бий болгодог. Гэтэл давхар координацийн болон төвөгтэй анхаарлын төвлөрөлтийг ашиглаж, хөгжүүлэх үйл явцыг хурдан хурдан ашиглах болон хэлний хэл загвараас ур Өөрчлөгдсөн аргын үр дүнг шалгахын тулд бид французтай, испан, испан, англи QT тестийн багц цуглуулсан. Энэ бүгдээрээ 10,000 параллел квери холбоотой байдаг. Манай загвар нь хүчирхэг суурь шугам болон холбоотой холбоотой оролцолын чанар болон авах зөв байдлын тухай холбоотой домаар шилжүүлэх аргыг илүү чухал болгодог.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni tat-talbiet (QT) isservi bħala fattur kritiku biex tinkiseb informazzjoni translingwistika b’suċċess (CLIR). Minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ kampjuni ta’ mistoqsijiet paralleli, mudelli tal-QT ibbażati fuq in-newrali normalment jiġu ottimizzati b’dejta sintetika li hija derivata minn mistoqsijiet monolingwi fuq skala kbira. Madankollu, dan it-tip ta’ psewdo corpus huwa l-aktar prodott minn mudell ta’ traduzzjoni tad-dominju ġenerali, u dan jagħmilha insuffiċjenti biex jiggwida t-tagħlim tal-mudell QT. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna jestendu ż-żieda fid-dejta bi proċedura ta’ trasferiment ta’ dominju, biex b’hekk irrivedu l-kandidati sintetiċi għal eżempji li jkunu konxji mit-tiftix. Specifically, the domain transfer model is built upon advanced Transformer, in which layer coordination and mixed attention are exploited to speed up the refining process and leverage parameters from a pre-trained cross-lingual language model.  Sabiex teżamina l-effettività tal-metodu propost, ġabrejna settijiet tat-test QT Franċiż-Ingliż u Spanjol-Ingliż-Spanjol-Ingliż, li kull wieħed minnhom jikkonsisti f’10,000 pari ta’ mistoqsijiet paralleli b’kontroll manwali bir-reqqa. Analiżijiet kwalitattivi u kwantitattivi juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linji bażi b’saħħithom u l-metodi relatati tat-trasferiment tad-dominju kemm fuq il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni kif ukoll fuq il-preċiżjoni tal-irkupru.', 'sr': 'Pitanje prevoda (QT) služi kao kritični faktor uspešnog prikupljanja preko jezika informacija (CLIR). Zbog nedostatka paralelnih uzorka ispitivanja, neurološki QT modeli se obično optimiziraju sintetičkim podacima koji su proizvedeni iz velike monojezičke ispitivanja. Ipak, takva vrsta pseudo korpusa se uglavnom proizvodi model prevođenja generalnog domena, čineći da nije dovoljno da vodi učenje QT model a. U ovom papiru proširimo povećanje podataka sa procedurom prenošenja domena, tako da bismo pregledali sintetičke kandidate na primjere svjesnih pretraživanja. Posebno, model prijenosa domena je izgrađen na naprednom transformatoru, u kojem se koordinacija slojeva i pomešana pažnja iskorištavaju kako bi ubrzali proces refining i parametre uticaja iz predobučenog prekograničnog jezičkog model a. Da bismo pregledali učinkovitost predložene metode, skupili smo testove francuskog na engleskom i španjolskog na engleskom QT-u, svaki od njih se sastoji od 10.000 paralelnih pitanja sa pažljivim ručnim provjerom. Kvalitativne i kvantitativne analize pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije i povezane metode prijenosa domena na kvalitetu prevođenja i tačnost prevođenja.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න භාෂාව (QT) පරිවර්තනය (CLIR) සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් විශේෂ කාරණයක් වෙනුවෙන්. සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න සැමැල්ම් නිසා නිසා, න්\u200dයූරාල් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක QT මොඩේල්ස් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් සඳහා සින්ටෙටික දත්ත අවශ නමුත්, ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරමාණ කොර්පුස් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය-ඩොමේන් වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒක QT මොඩේලයේ ඉගෙනගන්න අපරාධ වෙ මේ පැත්තට, අපි දත්ත වැඩියුම් වැඩියුත් ඩොමේන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් සඳහා, ඉතින් සංවේදනය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩියුත් පර විශේෂයෙන්ම, ඩෝමේන් ගැනීම් මොඩේල් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ව්\u200dයාපෘති වික්\u200dරීයාකරණය සහ මගුල් අවධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් වල් ඉංග්\u200dරේෂියාවට සහ ස්පැනිස් වල් ඉංග්\u200dරේෂියාවට QT පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් එක්කරලා තියෙ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂය', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie zapytań (QT) jest kluczowym czynnikiem udanego pozyskiwania informacji między językami (CLIR). Ze względu na brak równoległych próbek zapytań, neuronowe modele QT są zwykle optymalizowane przy użyciu syntetycznych danych pochodzących z dużych zapytań jednojęzycznych. Niemniej jednak tego rodzaju pseudo korpus jest w większości produkowany przez generalny model tłumaczenia domeny, co czyni go niewystarczającym do kierowania nauką modelu QT. W niniejszym artykule rozszerzamy rozszerzenie danych o procedurę transferu domen, w ten sposób zmieniając syntetycznych kandydatów na przykłady świadome wyszukiwaniu. W szczególności model transferu domeny jest zbudowany na zaawansowanym Transformerze, w którym koordynacja warstw i mieszana uwaga są wykorzystywane do przyspieszenia procesu udoskonalania i wykorzystania parametrów z wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego wielojęzycznego. W celu zbadania skuteczności proponowanej metody zebraliśmy zestawy testów QT z francusko-angielskiego i hiszpańsko-angielskiego, z których każdy składa się z 10.000 równoległych par zapytań ze staranną kontrolą ręczną. Analizy jakościowe i ilościowe pokazują, że nasz model znacznie przewyższa silne linie bazowe i powiązane metody transferu domen zarówno pod względem jakości tłumaczenia, jak i dokładności pobierania.', 'ro': 'Traducerea interogării (QT) servește ca factor critic pentru recuperarea de informații translingvistice cu succes (CLIR). Datorită lipsei probelor de interogare paralelă, modelele QT pe bază neurală sunt de obicei optimizate cu date sintetice derivate din interogări monolingve la scară largă. Cu toate acestea, un astfel de pseudo corpus este produs în principal de un model de traducere general domeniu, ceea ce îl face insuficient pentru a ghida învățarea modelului QT. În această lucrare, extindem mărirea datelor cu o procedură de transfer de domenii, astfel pentru a revizui candidații sintetici la exemple conștiente de căutare. Mai exact, modelul de transfer de domenii este construit pe Transformer avansat, în care coordonarea straturilor și atenția mixtă sunt exploatate pentru a accelera procesul de rafinare și a valorifica parametrii dintr-un model de limbaj translingvistic pre-instruit. Pentru a examina eficacitatea metodei propuse, am colectat seturi de teste QT din franceză-engleză și spaniolă-engleză, fiecare dintre ele constând din 10.000 de perechi de interogări paralele cu o verificare manuală atentă. Analizele calitative și cantitative relevă faptul că modelul nostru depășește semnificativ liniile de bază puternice și metodele conexe de transfer de domeniu atât în ceea ce privește calitatea traducerii, cât și precizia preluării.', 'so': "Turjubaan (QT) wuxuu u adeegaa sabab muhiim ah oo ku liibaanaya helitaanka macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duwan (CLIR). Sababta u baahan sameynta isbedelka lambarka ah waxaa inta badan lagu bedelaa samooyinka QT ee neurada ku saleysan, kuwaas oo laga soo jeedo su'aalaha moolooyinka afka badan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee nooca caynkaas ah oo pseudo ah waxaa inta badan soo saara model turjumaadda oo general domain, taasoo ka dhigaya in lagu hago barashada modelka QT. Warqadan ayaannu ku sii kordhinaa koritaanka macluumaadka, waxaana ku sii fidinaynaa qalabka wareejinta domain, si aan u beddelino kandidada isbedelka si ay u baaraandegaan tusaalooyin aad taqaanno. Si gaar ah waxaa loo dhisay modelka wareejinta domain, kaas oo lagu isticmaalaa koordiinta darafka iyo isku qasnaysashada darafka, si uu u degdego baaritaanka hagitaanka iyo parametre-leverage uga yimaado model afka hore oo afka kala baxsan. In order to examine the effectiveness of the proposed method, we collected French-to-English and Spanish-to-English QT test sets, each of which consists of 10,000 parallel query pairs with careful manual-checking.  Shahaadada qiimaha iyo qiyaasta waxay muuqataa in modellkayagu aad buu ugu muujiyaa saldhigyada xoogga leh iyo qaababka ku saabsan wareejinta deegaanka ee ku saabsan qiimaha turjumaadda iyo saxda helitaanka.", 'ur': 'سفارش کرس زبان معلومات حاصل کرنے (CLIR) میں کوئر کی ترجمہ (QT) ایک ضروری فکتور کے طور پر کامل ہے. parallel query samples کے ناکام ہونے کے باعث نیورال بنیاد QT موڈلے معمولاً سینٹیسی ڈاکٹی کے ساتھ اچھی طرح کیے جاتے ہیں جو بڑے اسکیل monolingual queries سے پھیرے جاتے ہیں. لیکن اس طرح کا پیوسو کورپوس اکثر ایک عمومی ڈومین کی ترجمہ موڈل سے پیدا کیا جاتا ہے، یہ QT موڈل کی تعلیم کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ڈاٹ افزایش کو ڈومین انتقال پردازی کے ساتھ پھیلاتے ہیں، اسی طرح سینٹیسی کاڈینٹوں کو جہاد کی مثال کے لئے دوبارہ پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ خاص طور پر، ڈومین ترنسیٹ موڈل پیش آمد ترنسیٹر پر بنایا جاتا ہے، جہاں لائر ترنسیٹر اور مختلف توجه کا مطابق اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے کہ پرنسیٹ پرسس کو سرعت دینے کے لئے اور پیش آموزش کرس زبان موڈل سے پارامیٹروں کو سرعت دینے اس طریقے کے مطابق تحقیق کرنے کے لئے ہم نے فرانسوی سے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی سے انگلیسی QT تست سٹوں کو جمع کیا ہے، ان میں سے ہر ایک 10,000 parallel query جوڑوں میں سے موجود ہے جو دقت کے مطابق مطابق جانچ کے ساتھ ہے. کیلوٹیٹیٹی اور منطقی تحلیل ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل مضبوط بنسٹلین اور رابطہ دار ڈومین انتقال طریقے دونوں ترجمہ کیلوٹی اور انتقال دقیق پر زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'sv': 'Query translation (QT) fungerar som en kritisk faktor för framgångsrik cross-lingual information hämtning (CLIR). På grund av avsaknaden av parallella frågeprover optimeras neuralbaserade QT-modeller vanligtvis med syntetiska data som härrör från storskaliga enspråkiga frågor. Icke desto mindre framställs en sådan pseudokorpus mestadels av en översättningsmodell för allmän domän, vilket gör den otillräcklig för att vägleda lärandet av QT-modellen. I den här uppsatsen utökar vi dataförstärkningen med ett domänöverföringsförfarande för att revidera syntetiska kandidater till sökmedvetna exempel. Specifikt bygger domänöverföringsmodellen på avancerad Transformer, där lagersamordning och blandad uppmärksamhet utnyttjas för att påskynda förfiningsprocessen och utnyttja parametrar från en förklädd språkmodell. För att undersöka effektiviteten av den föreslagna metoden samlade vi in fransk-engelska och spansk-till-engelska QT testset, som var och en består av 10 000 parallella frågepar med noggrann manuell kontroll. Kvalitativa och kvantitativa analyser visar att vår modell avsevärt överträffar starka baslinjer och tillhörande domänöverföringsmetoder både vad gäller översättningskvalitet och söknoggrannhet.', 'ta': '@ info: status இணைப்பு கேள்வி மாதிரிகளின் காரணமாக, பெரிய அளவிலிருந்து கேள்விகளிலிருந்து கொண்டு வரும் பொதுவாக QT மாதிரிகள் மாதிரிக்கப்படுகிறது. ஆனாலும், இது போன்ற வகையான பிசுடோ கார்ப்ஸ் பெரும்பாலாக ஒரு பொது டொமைன் மொழிமாற்றி மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்படுகிறது, கியுடி மாதிரிய இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தகவல் கூட்டுதலை ஒரு டோமைன் மாற்றும் செயல்முறையுடன் விரிவாக்குகிறோம், அதனால் தேடுதல் அறிந்து கொள் குறிப்பிட்டு, முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாற்றி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதில் அடுக்கு ஒருங்கிணைப்பு மற்றும் கலப்பு கவனத்தை வேகமாக பயன்படுத்தப் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறையின் விளைவை பரிசோதிக்க, நாங்கள் பிரெஞ்சில் இருந்து ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ்- முதல் ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து கியூடி சோ தரம் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட விளக்கங்கள் நமது மாதிரி முறைமையாக வலிமையான அடிப்படைகளை மற்றும் தொடர்பு களம் மாற்றும் முறைகளை மொழிமாற', 'uz': "@ info: status Name Lekin, buning turli pseudo corpus ko'pchiligi umumiy domen tarjima modeli yaratiladi, u QT modelini o'rganishga yetarli emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz domen uzatish vazifasi bilan maʼlumot qoʻshishni qoʻshishimiz mumkin, shunday qilib qoʻshimcha tizim kandidalarni qidirish mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan foydalanuvchi modeli taʼminlovchi koʻpaytirilgan tarjima bilan yaratiladi. Bu yerda qatlam birlashtirish va bir qatlamni birlashtirish jarayonini tezlashtirish va hech qatlam parametrlarini tezlashtirish uchun foydalanadi. Ko'rsatilgan usulning effektligini tekshirish uchun biz Fransuzchadan ingliz tiliga va Ispanchadan ingliz tilida QT sinov tizimni birlashdik. Bu yerda qoʻllanmalar qoʻlbola tekshirish bilan 10,000 qoʻllanma qo'llangan soʻrov soʻrov qoʻllangan. Quality va quantitativ analyzerlarimiz esa modelmiz tarjima sifatida va qayta olish imkoniyatlarida katta asboblar va bogʻ'liq domen transfer usullarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Dịch câu hỏi (QT) là một yếu tố quan trọng trong việc tìm kiếm thông tin xuyên ngôn ngữ thành công (CliR). Do thiếu các mẫu truy vấn song song, các mô hình QT dựa vào thần kinh thường được tối ưu tiên bằng các dữ liệu tổng hợp có nguồn từ các câu hỏi ngôn ngữ rộng lớn. Tuy nhiên, loại hình tượng này hầu hết được sản xuất bởi một mô hình dịch phổ biến, làm cho nó không đủ để hướng dẫn việc học mô hình QT. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mở rộng việc gia tăng dữ liệu bằng một thủ tục chuyển nhượng miền, để sửa lại những ứng viên tổng hợp để tìm kiếm ví dụ. Cụ thể, kiểu truyền tải miền được xây dựng trên một transformer cấp cao, trong đó có lớp phối hợp và sự chú ý lẫn nhau được dùng để tăng tốc quá trình lọc và tiêu chuẩn dựa trên một mô hình ngôn ngữ ngoại ngữ được đào tạo. Để kiểm tra tính hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề xuất, chúng tôi đã thu thập các bộ thử nghiệm QT kiểu Pháp-Anh và Tây Ban Nha-Anh, mỗi bộ đều gồm gồm gồm các cặp với kiểm tra bằng tay cẩn thận. Nghiên cứu về chất lượng và số lượng cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta khả năng hoàn thiện bản gốc mạnh hơn và các phương pháp truyền tải miền liên quan về chất lượng dịch và độ chính xác thu hồi.', 'da': 'Forespørgselsoversættelse (QT) tjener som en kritisk faktor for vellykket tværsproget informationshentning (CLIR). På grund af manglen på parallelle forespørgselsprøver optimeres neuralbaserede QT-modeller normalt med syntetiske data, der stammer fra storstilede ensprogede forespørgsler. Ikke desto mindre er en sådan form for pseudokorpus hovedsagelig produceret af en oversættelsesmodel, hvilket gør det ikke tilstrækkeligt til at styre indlæringen af QT-modellen. I denne artikel udvider vi dataforøgelsen med en domæneoverførselsprocedure for at revidere syntetiske kandidater til søgebevidste eksempler. Specielt er domæneoverførselsmodellen bygget på avanceret Transformer, hvor lagkoordinering og blandet opmærksomhed udnyttes til at fremskynde raffineringsprocessen og udnytte parametre fra en forududdannet tværsproget sprogmodel. For at undersøge effektiviteten af den foreslåede metode indsamlede vi fransk-til-engelsk og spansk-til-engelsk QT testsæt, som hver består af 10.000 parallelle forespørgselspar med omhyggelig manuel kontrol. Kvalitative og kvantitative analyser afslører, at vores model overstiger stærke basislinjer og de relaterede domæneoverførselsmetoder med hensyn til både oversættelseskvalitet og hentningsnøjagtighed betydeligt.', 'bg': 'Преводът на заявки (QT) служи като критичен фактор за успешното междуезично извличане на информация (CLIR). Поради липсата на паралелни извадки от заявки, невронно базираните модели обикновено са оптимизирани със синтетични данни, които се извличат от мащабни едноезични заявки. Въпреки това, този вид псевдо корпус се произвежда предимно от общоприемен преводачески модел, което го прави недостатъчен за насочване на изучаването на модела. В тази статия разширяваме увеличението на данните с процедура за трансфер на домейн, като по този начин преразглеждаме синтетичните кандидати към примери, които са запознати с търсенето. По-конкретно моделът за трансфер на домейни е изграден върху усъвършенстван трансформатор, в който координацията на слоевете и смесеното внимание се използват за ускоряване на процеса на рафиниране и използване на параметри от предварително обучен междуезичен езиков модел. За да се проучи ефективността на предложения метод, събрахме набор от тестове от френски-английски и испански-английски, всеки от които се състои от 10 000 паралелни двойки заявки с внимателно ръчно проверяване. Качествените и количествените анализи показват, че нашият модел значително превъзхожда силните базови линии и свързаните с тях методи за трансфер на домейни както по отношение на качеството на превода, така и точността на извличането.', 'nl': "Query translation (QT) is een cruciale factor voor succesvol cross-lingual information retrieval (CLIR). Door het ontbreken van parallelle query samples worden neurale QT-modellen meestal geoptimaliseerd met synthetische gegevens die zijn afgeleid van grootschalige eentalige query's. Desalniettemin wordt een dergelijk pseudo corpus meestal geproduceerd door een algemeen-domein vertaalmodel, waardoor het onvoldoende is om het leren van QT model te begeleiden. In dit artikel breiden we de data augmentatie uit met een domein transfer procedure, zodat synthetische kandidaten worden herzien naar zoekbewuste voorbeelden. Specifiek is het domein transfer model gebouwd op geavanceerde Transformer, waarin laagcoördinatie en gemengde aandacht worden benut om het verfijningsproces te versnellen en parameters te benutten van een vooraf getraind cross-lingual taalmodel. Om de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde methode te onderzoeken, verzamelden we Frans-Engels en Spaans-Engels QT testsets, die elk bestaan uit 10.000 parallelle query paren met zorgvuldige handmatige controle. Kwalitatieve en kwantitatieve analyses tonen aan dat ons model sterk presteert boven sterke baselines en de bijbehorende domeintransfermethoden op zowel vertaalkwaliteit als retrievalnauwkeurigheid.", 'hr': 'Pitanje prevoda (QT) služi kao kritični faktor uspješnog prikupljanja preko jezika informacija (CLIR). Zbog nedostatka paralelnih uzorka ispitivanja, neurološki QT modeli se obično optimiziraju sa sintetičkim podacima koji se nalaze iz velikih monojezičkih ispitivanja. Međutim, takva vrsta pseudo korpusa uglavnom proizvodi model prevoda u općem domenu, čineći da nije dovoljno voditi učenje QT model a. U ovom papiru proširimo povećanje podataka postupkom prijenosa domena, tako da bismo pregledali sintetičke kandidate na primjere svjesnih pretraživanja. Posebno, model prijenosa domena je izgrađen na naprednom transformatoru, u kojem se koordinacija slojeva i mješana pažnja iskorištavaju kako bi ubrzali proces refining i parametre učinkovitosti iz predobučenog prekograničnog jezičkog model a. Da bismo pregledali učinkovitost predložene metode, skupili smo test sete francuskog-na-engleskog i španjolskog-na-engleskog QT-a, svaki od kojih se sastoji od 10.000 paralelnih pitanja paira s pažljivim ručnim provjerom. Kvalitativne i kvantitativne analize pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije i povezane metode prijenosa domena na kvalitetu prevođenja i preciznost prevođenja.', 'de': 'Query Translation (QT) ist ein kritischer Faktor für den erfolgreichen crosslingual Information Retrieval (CLIR). Aufgrund des Fehlens von parallelen Abfrageproben werden neuronalbasierte QT-Modelle in der Regel mit synthetischen Daten optimiert, die aus großen monolingualen Abfragen abgeleitet werden. Trotzdem wird ein solcher Pseudo-Korpus meist durch ein allgemeines Domänenübersetzungsmodell erzeugt, so dass es nicht ausreicht, das Lernen des QT-Modells zu leiten. In diesem Beitrag erweitern wir die Datenaugmentation um ein Domain Transfer Verfahren, um synthetische Kandidaten auf suchbewusste Beispiele zu revidieren. Insbesondere basiert das Domänentransfermodell auf einem fortgeschrittenen Transformer, in dem Layer-Koordination und gemischte Aufmerksamkeit genutzt werden, um den Verfeinerungsprozess zu beschleunigen und Parameter aus einem vortrainierten, sprachübergreifenden Modell zu nutzen. Um die Wirksamkeit der vorgeschlagenen Methode zu untersuchen, haben wir Französisch-Englisch und Spanisch-Englisch QT-Testsätze gesammelt, die jeweils aus 10.000 parallelen Abfragepaaren mit sorgfältiger manueller Prüfung bestehen. Qualitative und quantitative Analysen zeigen, dass unser Modell sowohl hinsichtlich der Übersetzungsqualität als auch der Abrufgenauigkeit starke Baselines und die damit verbundenen Domänentransfermethoden deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Pertanyaan terjemahan (QT) layak sebagai faktor kritis dalam sukses penerimaan informasi saling bahasa (CLIR). Karena kekurangan sampel pertanyaan paralel, model QT berasasi saraf biasanya optimisasi dengan data sintetis yang berasal dari pertanyaan monobahasa skala besar. Nevertheless, such kind of pseudo corpus is mostly produced by a general-domain translation model, making it be insufficient to guide the learning of QT model.  Dalam kertas ini, kami memperluas peningkatan data dengan prosedur transfer domain, sehingga untuk mengubah kandidat sintetis untuk contoh-contoh yang sadar mencari. Secara spesifik, model transfer domain dibangun pada Transformer maju, di mana koordinasi lapisan dan perhatian campuran dieksploitasi untuk mempercepat proses rafining dan leverage parameter dari model bahasa saling berbahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya. Untuk memeriksa efektivitas metode yang diusulkan, kami mengumpulkan set ujian QT Perancis-ke-Inggris dan Spanyol-ke-Inggris, masing-masing terdiri dari 10.000 pasangan pertanyaan paralel dengan pemeriksaan manual dengan hati-hati. Analisis kualitatif dan kuantitatif mengungkapkan bahwa model kita secara signifikan melebihi garis dasar yang kuat dan metode transfer domain terkait pada kualitas terjemahan dan akurasi penghasilan.', 'sw': 'Query translation (QT) serves as a critical factor in successful cross-lingual information retrieval (CLIR).  Kutokana na ukosefu wa sampuli za utafiti tofauti, mifano ya QT yenye msingi wa uraia mara nyingi huvutiwa na taarifa za pamoja zinazotokana na maswali makubwa ya lugha. Hata hivyo, aina hii ya pseudo imetengenezwa zaidi na modeli ya tafsiri ya ndani, kwa hiyo haitoshi kuongoza kujifunza modeli ya QT. Katika gazeti hili, tunaongeza taarifa kwa mchakato wa usafirishaji wa ndani, ili kurekebisha wagombea wa pamoja ili kutafuta mifano inayofahamika. Kwa ujumla, modeli ya usafirishaji wa domain imejengwa kwa ajili ya Transfer wa maendeleo, ambapo ushirikiano na mkanganyiko wa daraja na mchanganyiko umetumiwa kwa haraka ya upya mchakato wa mageuzi na parameters of usafirishaji kutoka kwa modeli ya lugha za kabla iliyoendelea. Ili kuchunguza ufanisi wa njia hiyo ya pendekezo, tulikusanya seti za jaribio la Kifaransa-hadi-Kiingereza na Kihispania-hadi-Kiingereza za za QT, ambazo kila mmoja imejumuisha ndoa za swali 10,000 zilizofanana na kuchunguza vifaa vyema. Uchambuzi wa kiwango na kiasi kinaonyesha kuwa model yetu kwa kiasi kikubwa inafanya misingi yenye nguvu na njia za usafiri wa ndani zinazohusiana na usahihi wa tafsiri na upatikanaji wa urahisi.', 'tr': 'Sorag terjimesini (QT) geçmişi uluslary bilgi almak üçin wajyp faktor hökmünde servet. parallel sorag nusgalarynyň ýok bolmagyna sebäbi, näyral tabanly QT nusgalary adatça uly ölçekli monolingual soraglardan gelen syntetik maglumatlar bilen optimizalýar. Yine de bu şekilde pseudo korpus köplenç bir domeny terjime modeli tarapyndan üretilýär. Bu şekilde QT modelini öwrenmemek üçin ýeterlik däl. Bu kağıtda, veri yükselmesini domena aktarma prosedürleri ile uzatıyoruz, bu yüzden sintetik kandidlerimizi gözlemli örnekler için tekrar ediyoruz. Adatça, domen aktarma nusgasyny gelişmiş terjimeleriň üstine in şa edilýär. Bu ýerde gatlak koordinatýasy we karmaşgalar ünsüni terjime etmek üçin ullanylýar we öňünden eğlenen cross-dil nusgasyndan süýtgetmek üçin ullanylýar. Öň teklipden çykyş etkinligini barlamak üçin biz fransuzça-iňlisçe we ispanyola-iňlisçe QT testleri bilen birleşdirdik. Her biri 10,000 parallel sorag çiňinde dikkatli elimden barlamak bilen bar. Görnöşimli we quantitat analizlerimiz modelimiz güýçli baseçinlerden ve hem terjime kalitesinde hem de alma dogrudygynda ylalaşyk domena aktarma yöntemlerini belli ediyor.', 'ko': '쿼리 번역(QT)은 다국어 정보 검색(CLIR) 성공의 관건이다.병렬 조회 샘플이 부족하기 때문에 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 QT모델은 대개 대규모 단어 조회에서 나온 합성 데이터를 사용하여 최적화된다.그러나 이런 위어 자료 라이브러리는 대부분이 통용되는 분야의 번역 모델로 만들어진 것이기 때문에 QT모델의 학습을 지도하기에는 부족하다.본고에서 우리는 하나의 영역 이동 과정을 통해 데이터 확장을 확장하고 합성 후보 항목을 수정하여 검색 감지의 예시를 수정한다.구체적으로 말하자면 역 이동 모델은 고급 Transformer를 바탕으로 구축된 것으로 그 중에서 층 조화와 혼합 주의를 이용하여 세분화 과정을 가속화하고 미리 훈련된 다중 언어 모델 중의 파라미터를 이용한다.이 방법의 유효성을 검증하기 위해 우리는 프랑스어에서 영어, 스페인어에서 영어까지의 QT 테스트 집합을 수집했다. 각 테스트 집합은 10000개의 병렬 조회 쌍으로 구성되고 꼼꼼한 수동 검사를 거쳤다.정성과 정량 분석에 의하면 우리의 모델은 번역의 질과 검색의 정확도에 있어 강기선과 관련 분야의 이동 방법보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'fa': 'ترجمه\u200cپرسی (QT) به عنوان یک faktor مهم در بازیابی اطلاعات متوسط زبان (CLIR) خدمت می\u200cکند. به دلیل lack of parallel query samples, neural-based QT models are usually optimized with synthetic data that are derived from large-scale monolingual questions. با این وجود، این نوع کورپوس pseudo اکثریت توسط یک مدل ترجمه\u200cهای ژنرال دامنی تولید می\u200cشود، و این کار به اندازه کافی نیست که یادگیری مدل QT را هدایت کند. در این کاغذ، ما افزایش داده\u200cها را با یک روش انتقال دامنی گسترش می\u200cدهیم، بنابراین برای تغییر دادن کاندیده\u200cهای سینتاتیک برای مثال\u200cهای آگاهی جستجو. دقیقاً مدل انتقال دامین بر روی تغییرگر پیشرفته ساخته می شود، در حالی که تغییرگری لایه\u200cها و توجه مختلف برای سرعت فرایند تغییرگری و پارامترهای تغییرگری از مدل زبان\u200cهای مختلف پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشوند. برای تحقیق فعالیت روش پیشنهاد، ما مجموعه\u200cهای آزمایش QT فرانسوی به انگلیسی و اسپانیایی به انگلیسی جمع کردیم، هر کدام از آن از ۱۰۰۰۰ جفت\u200cهای پرسش متفاوتی با تحقیق دستی دقت است. تحلیل\u200cهای کیفیت و تعدادی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما خیلی بیشتر از خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای قوی و روش\u200cهای انتقال دامنی ارتباط بر کیفیت ترجمه و دقیقات بازیابی بیشتر است.', 'af': "Navraag vertaling (QT) bediener as 'n kritiese faktor in suksesvol kruistale inligting ontvang (CLIR). Dus die ontbreek van parallele navraag voorbeelde, die neurale-gebaseerde QT modele word gewoonlik optimaliseer met sintetiese data wat van groot- skaal monolinge navraag afgelei word. Maar sodanige soort pseudo corpus is meeste geproduseer deur 'n algemene- domein vertaling model, maak dit onvoldoende om die leer van QT model te lei. In hierdie papier, ons uitbrei die data augmentasie met 'n domein oordrag prosedure, sodat ons sintetiese kandidate hersien om voorbeelde te soek-kennis. Spesifieke, die domein oordragmodeel is gebou op gevorderde Transformeerder, waarin laag koordinasie en gemengde aandag word uitgebruik om die opwerking proses en die verwysing parameters van 'n vooraf-gevorderde kruistale taal model te spoed. Om die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde metode te ondersoek, het ons Frans-na-Engels en Spaanse-na-Engels QT-toets versamel, elkeen van hulle bestaan van 10,000 parallele navraag pare met versigtige hand-toets. Kwaliteit en kvantitatiewe analiserings vertoon dat ons model betekenlik sterke basisline en die verwante domeinoordragmetodes op twee vertaling kwaliteit en herhaal presisiteit uitvoer.", 'am': 'የጠያየቅ ትርጉም (QT) እንደሚያሳየፍ የቋንቋ መረጃ ማድረግ (CLIR) ይጠቅማል። በተለይ ምርጫዎች ምክንያት የጠይቅ ምሳሌዎች ባይጎድሉ፣ የኔural-based QT ሞዴላዎች በተለየ ትልቅ ስንተርናዊ ጥያቄዎች ከትልቁ ስንቲካዊ ጥያቄዎች የተገኙት ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እንደዚህ ዓይነት የኮውዶ ኮፕስ አብዛኛውን የ-ዲሜን ትርጓሜ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ የዳታ አካባቢዎችን በዶሜን ለመለወጥ ሥርዓት እናሰፋለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የዶሜን ስርቨር ሞዴል በተለየ ቅድሚያ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ውስጥ ደረጃ ማቀናቀል እና የተለየ ጥያቄ ተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ይደረጋል፡፡ ለመፈለግ ጥያቄን ለመፈለግ፣ ፈረንሳይ-ወደ እንግሊዘኛ እና የስፓኒሽ-ወደ ኢንግሊዘኛ የQT ተፈተናዎች ሰብሰብን፤ ከእነርሱም እያንዳንዳቸው 10 ሺህ ተያያያይነት የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ሁለቶችን በጥንቃቄ እየመረመሩ ነው፡፡ ጥያቄ እና ምርጫዎች ምሳሌያችን በብርቱ መሠረት እና የተገኘውን የዶሜን መዘርጋት ሥርዓት በተርጓም ጥሩ እና ማግኘት እርግጠኛ ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i kërkimit (QT) shërben si një faktor kritik në marrjen e suksesshme të informacionit ndërgjuhësor (CLIR). Për shkak të mungesës së mostrave paralele të pyetjeve, modelet QT me bazë nervore zakonisht optimizohen me të dhëna sintetike që nxirren nga pyetjet monogjuhësore në shkallë të madhe. Megjithatë, një lloj i tillë pseudo corpus prodhohet kryesisht nga një model përkthimi i përgjithshëm-domeni, duke e bërë atë të pamjaftueshëm për të udhëzuar mësimin e model it QT. Në këtë letër, ne zgjerojmë rritjen e të dhënave me një procedurë transferimi në domeni, kështu që të rishikojmë kandidatët sintetikë për shembuj të ndërgjegjshëm në kërkim. Veçanërisht, modeli i transferimit të dominit është ndërtuar mbi Transformer të avancuar, në të cilin përdoren koordinacionet e nivelit dhe vëmendja e përzier për të përshpejtuar procesin e rafinimit dhe për të nxitur parametrat nga një model gjuhësh ndërgjuhësore të paratrajnuar. Me qëllim që të shqyrtojmë efektshmërinë e metodës së propozuar, mbledhëm grupe testimi QT francez-anglez dhe spanjoll-anglez, secila prej të cilave përbëhet nga 10,000 çifte pyetjeje paralele me kontrollim të kujdesshëm manual. Analizat kualitative dhe kuantitative zbulojnë se modeli ynë mbivlerëson në mënyrë të konsiderueshme linjat bazë të forta dhe metodat e transferimit të fushës lidhur me cilësinë e përkthimit dhe saktësinë e marrjes.', 'az': 'QT məlumatı çox dilli məlumat alması (CLIR) müvəffəqiyyətində kritik faktör olaraq verir. Parallel query nümunələri yoxduğuna görə, nöral tabanlı QT modelləri genellikle böyük ölçülü monodil suallardan alınan sintetik məlumatlarla optimizlənir. Ancaq böyük pseudo korpusu genel-domen çevirim modeli ilə ürəklənir, QT modeli öyrənməyə kifayət deyildir. Bu kağızda, məlumat yükselməsini domain transfer prosedüsü ilə genişləyirik, buna görə də sintetik kandidātları gözləmə məsəllərini yenidən dəyişdirmək üçün. Özellikle, domain transfer modeli gelişmiş transformer üzerində in şa edilir, orada sütun koordinasiyası və karışıq təsiri ilə birləşdirmək prosesini hızlandırmaq və öyrənmək üçün öyrənmiş çox dil modelindən parametrləri istifadə edilir. Önülləşdirilmiş metodun etkinliğini təsdiqləmək üçün Fransızca-İngilizce-İspanyola-İngilizce QT test setlərini topladıq. Onların hər biri 10.000 paralel query çiftlərini dikkatli əl-təsdiqləməsi ilə birləşdirdi. Qıymetli və kvantitatlı analizlər modellərimizin qüvvətli sətirlər və bağlı domena qeyd metodlarının hər ikisinin tərcümə kaliteti və alış doğruluğu barəsində mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'প্রশ্ন অনুবাদ (কিউটি) সফল ভাষাভাষী তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার (CLIR) হিসেবে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কারণ হিসেবে সার্ভিস করে। প্যারালেল প্রশ্নের উদাহরণের কারণে নিউরুল ভিত্তিক কিউটি- এর মডেল সাধারণত সিন্টেটিক ডাটার সাথে সম্ভাবনা করা হয়, যা বিশাল পর্যায়ের মোনোলি তবে এই ধরনের পিসুডো কোর্পাস বেশীরভাগ একটি সাধারণ ডোমেইন অনুবাদ মডেল দ্বারা তৈরি করেছে, যাতে কিউটি মডেলের শিক্ষা নির্দেশ করার জন্য এটা  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডোমেইন পরিবর্তনের প্রক্রিয়ার সাথে তথ্য যোগাযোগ বাড়িয়ে দেই, যাতে সিন্টেটিক প্রার্থীদের অনুসন্ধান-সচে বিশেষ করে, উন্নত ট্রান্সফারের উপর ডোমেইন পরিবর্তন মডেল নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে, যেখানে স্তর সমন্বয় এবং মিশ্রিত মনোযোগ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত প্রক্রিয়া এবং ভাষার ম প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম পরীক্ষা করার জন্যে আমরা ফ্রেঞ্চ-থেকে ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ-থেকে ইংরেজি কিউটি পরীক্ষা সংগ্রহ করেছি, যার মধ্যে প্রত্যেকে Qualitative and quantitative analyses reveal that our model significantly outperforms strong baselines and the related domain transfer methods on both translation quality and retrieval accuracy.', 'hy': 'Փորձի թարգմանությունը (QT) ծառայում է որպես կարևոր գործոն հաջողության միջլեզվի տեղեկատվության վերադարձման համար (CIR). Պարամետրալ հարցումների բացակայության պատճառով նյարդային հիմնված QT մոդելները սովորաբար օպտիմացվում են սինթետիկ տվյալներով, որոնք ստացվում են մեծ մակարդակի միալեզու հարցումներից: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս տեսակի կեղծ կորպուսը հիմնականում արտադրվում է ընդհանուր բնագավառի թարգմանման մոդելի միջոցով, ինչը չի բավարար QT մոդելի ուսումնասիրության ուղղությամբ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ընդլայնում ենք տվյալների աճը բնագավառի փոխանցման գործընթացով, այսպես վերանայելով սինթետիկ թեկնածուներին՝ որոնելու գիտակցած օրինակներին: Մասնավորապես, տիեզերքի փոխանցման մոդելը հիմնված է զարգացած տրանսֆերմերի վրա, որտեղ շերտի կոորդինացիան և խառնուրդ ուշադրությունը օգտագործվում են արագացնելու գործընթացը և օգտագործելու պարամետրերը նախապատրաստված լեզվային փոխպատասխանատվող մոդելի Որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք առաջարկված մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը, մենք հավաքեցինք ֆրանսերեն-անգլերեն և իսպաներեն-անգլերեն QT թեստերի համակարգեր, որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը կազմում է 10,000 զուգահեռ հարցերի զուգահեռ, որոնց ձեռքի ստու Քալիտիվ և քանակական վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակաբար գերազանցում է ուժեղ հիմնական գծերը և դրանց հետ կապված բնագավառի փոխանցման մեթոդները թարգմանման որակի և վերադարձման ճշգրտության վրա:', 'bs': 'Pitanje prevoda (QT) služi kao kritični faktor uspješnog prikupljanja preko jezika informacija (CLIR). Zbog nedostatka paralelnih uzorka ispitivanja, neurološki QT modeli se obično optimiziraju sintetičkim podacima koji su proizvedeni iz velike monojezičke ispitivanja. Ipak, takva vrsta pseudo korpusa se uglavnom proizvodi model prevoda u generalnom domenu, čineći da nije dovoljno da vodi učenje QT model a. U ovom papiru proširimo povećanje podataka procedurom prenošenja domena, tako da bismo pregledali sintetičke kandidate na primjere svjesnih pretraživanja. Posebno, model prijenosa domena je izgrađen na naprednom transformatoru, u kojem se koordinacija slojeva i mješana pažnja iskorištavaju kako bi ubrzali proces refining i parametre učinkovitosti iz predobučenog prekograničnog jezičkog model a. Da bismo pregledali učinkovitost predložene metode, skupili smo test sete francuskog-na-engleskog i španjolskog-na-engleskog QT-a, svaki od kojih se sastoji od 10.000 paralelnih pitanja sa pažljivim ručnim provjerom. Kvalitativne i kvantitativne analize pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi jake osnovne linije i povezane metode prijenosa domena na kvalitetu prevođenja i preciznost prevođenja.', 'ca': "Query translation (QT) serves as a critical factor in successful cross-lingual information retrieval (CLIR).  A causa de la falta de mostres de preguntes parallels, els models QT basats en neurones normalment s'optimizen amb dades sintètiques derivades de preguntes monolingües a gran escala. Tot i així, aquest tipus de pseudo corpus es produeix principalment per un model de traducció de domini general, fent que no sigui suficient per guiar l'aprenentatge del model QT. En aquest article estendem el augment de les dades amb un procediment de transfer ència de dominis, per tal de revisar els candidats sintètics a exemples conscients de la recerca. Concretament, el model de transfer ència de domini està construït sobre Transformer avançat, en el qual s'explota la coordinació de la capa i l'atenció mixta per accelerar el procés de refinació i aprofitar els paràmetres d'un model de llenguatge translingüístic pré-entrenat. Per examinar l'eficacia del mètode proposat, vam recollir conjunts de tests QT francès-anglès i espanyol-anglès, cada un dels quals consisteix en 10.000 parells de preguntes parallels amb una verificació manual atenta. Anàlisis qualitativs i quantitativs revelen que el nostre model supera significativament les línies de base fortes i els mètodes de transfer ència de dominis relacionats en la qualitat de traducció i la precisió de recuperació.", 'cs': 'Překlad dotazů (QT) slouží jako klíčový faktor úspěšného vyhledávání informací mezi jazyky (CLIR). Vzhledem k nedostatku paralelních vzorků dotazů jsou neuronové QT modely obvykle optimalizovány syntetickými daty, které jsou odvozeny z rozsáhlých monojazyčných dotazů. Nicméně, takový druh pseudo korpusu je většinou produkován generálním překladovým modelem domény, takže není dostatečný pro řízení učení QT modelu. V tomto článku rozšíříme rozšíření dat o postup přenosu domén, a tím revidujeme syntetické kandidáty na příklady orientované na vyhledávání. Konkrétně je model přenosu domény postaven na pokročilém Transformeru, ve kterém je využita koordinace vrstev a smíšená pozornost k urychlení procesu rafinace a využití parametrů z předškoleného cross-jazyčného modelu. Za účelem zkoumání efektivity navrhované metody jsme shromáždili testovací sady francouzsko-anglicky a španělsko-anglicky QT, z nichž každá sestává z 10.000 paralelních dotazových párů s pečlivou manuální kontrolou. Kvalitativní a kvantitativní analýzy ukazují, že náš model výrazně překonává silné základní linie a související metody přenosu domén jak kvalitou překladu, tak přesnost vyhledávání.', 'et': 'Päringute tõlkimine (QT) on eduka keeleülese teabe hankimise (CLIR) kriitiline tegur. Paralleelsete päringunäidiste puudumise tõttu optimeeritakse neuropõhiseid QT mudeleid tavaliselt sünteetiliste andmetega, mis on saadud suuremahulistest ühekeelsetest päringutest. Sellist tüüpi pseudokorpust toodetakse siiski enamasti ülddomeenilise tõlkemudeli abil, mistõttu sellest ei piisa QT mudeli õppimisel. Käesolevas töös laiendame andmete suurendamist domeeni edastamise protseduuriga, et vaadata läbi sünteetilised kandidaadid otsinguteadlike näidete jaoks. Konkreetselt põhineb domeeniülekande mudel arenenud Transformeril, kus kihtide koordineerimist ja segatud tähelepanu kasutatakse rafineerimisprotsessi kiirendamiseks ja eelnevalt koolitatud keeleülese keele mudeli parameetrite kasutamiseks. Kavandatud meetodi efektiivsuse uurimiseks kogusime prantsuse-inglise ja hispaania-inglise QT testikomplekte, millest igaüks koosneb 10 000 paralleelsest päringupaarist hoolika käsitsi kontrollimisega. Kvalitatiivsed ja kvantitatiivsed analüüsid näitavad, et meie mudel ületab oluliselt tugevaid lähtejooni ja sellega seotud domeeniülekande meetodeid nii tõlkekvaliteedi kui ka tagasivõtmise täpsuse osas.', 'fi': 'Kyselyn käännös (QT) on kriittinen tekijä onnistuneessa monikielisessä tiedonhaussa (CLIR). Koska rinnakkaisia kyselynäytteitä ei ole, neuropohjaiset QT-mallit optimoidaan yleensä synteettisellä datalla, joka on johdettu suurista monikielisistä kyselyistä. Kuitenkin tällainen pseudo-korpus tuotetaan pääosin yleisdomeenisen käännösmallin avulla, joten se ei riitä ohjaamaan QT-mallin oppimista. Tässä artikkelissa laajennetaan datan lisäämistä verkkotunnuksen siirtomenettelyllä, jolloin synteettisiä ehdokkaita tarkistetaan hakutietoisiksi esimerkeiksi. Erityisesti verkkotunnuksen siirtomalli rakentuu kehittyneelle Transformerille, jossa kerrosten koordinointia ja sekavaa huomiota hyödynnetään jalostusprosessin nopeuttamiseksi ja parametrien hyödyntämiseksi ennalta koulutetusta kielimallista. Ehdotetun menetelmän tehokkuuden selvittämiseksi kerättiin ranska-englanti- ja espanja-englanti QT-testisarjat, joista jokainen koostuu 10 000 rinnakkaisesta kyselyparista huolellisella manuaalisella tarkistuksella. Laadulliset ja kvantitatiiviset analyysit osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi vahvemmista lähtökohdista ja niihin liittyvistä toimialueensiirtomenetelmistä sekä käännöslaadun että haun tarkkuuden osalta.', 'jv': 'Tulung anyir (qT) kang kelompok kanggo barang nggawe barang nggawe informasi bangsane kang kelompok nggawe (CLIR). Tungkin aksi karo akeh sampuran sing paraleling, model sing nêrung basa gambar, model sing di ngéwelasakno karo data senetik sing sumulakno karo akeh languang languang languang Mungkin, yo sampeyan ngono psepsepsepsepsepsepsepsepse podho piye basa manut ning model Generaldomain itolekake, dadine kuwi mpeg kanggo ngilangno kejahatan modèl In this paper, we expand the data agement with a domain transfer method, so to rese sophistogram kandates to find-awake example. Name Ngawe bisa ngubah efek-efek kanggo nyenggo yen nggunakake perangkat-ingkang karo Perancis lan kelas-ingkang-karo-ingkang kaliwati karo kantarno sing paling-kaliwati nang disebarke yen model sing ngendalikno ngono nggawe barang nggawe dolang-dolang teko nggawe dolang-dolang ngentambah kuwi kaliwati karo ingkang dolang.', 'ha': "@ info: status Dukan da ba'a sãmu da misãlai masu tambayi masu daidai, ana ƙayyade misãlai QT-based neural da ɗabi'a, ana fi amfani da data na haɗatiki wanda aka mottar daga tambayar masu motsi mai girma. A lokacin da, nau'in wannan nau'i ko kuma ana samar da shi mafi yawa wata misalin fassarar-Domen, yana kasancẽwa ga shiryarwa da misalin QT. In this paper, we extend the data augmentation with a domain transfer procedure, thus to revise synthetic candidates to search-aware examples.  A ƙayyade, an gina motel ɗin transfer ɗin Domen kan mai tsohon Transformer, a cikinsa ana yi amfani da shirin ƙanshi da haɗi wa muhimmani dõmin a yi gaggawa ga aikin mai gyare da fassarar aiki da parameteri na hewayi daga wata misalin harshen na tsohon-zaman taƙaita. Dõmin ka jarraba fikar ayuka da aka buƙata, mun samu matsayin jarraba QT ta faransa-zuwa-Inglizi da aka spanish-zuwa-Ingiriya, kõwana daga cikinsu yana da 10,000 da aka sami matsayin suriyar da sauri. Ana ƙayyade masu tsari da lissafi, sun bayyana cewa misalinmu yana samar da masu ƙarfi masu ƙaranci bakwai da shiryoyin juyi da masu husũma a kan tsarin fassarar da kuma tsarin retriewa.", 'sk': 'Prevajanje poizvedb (QT) služi kot ključni dejavnik pri uspešnem medjezičnem iskanju informacij (CLIR). Zaradi pomanjkanja vzporednih vzorcev poizvedb so nevronski QT modeli običajno optimizirani s sintetičnimi podatki, ki izhajajo iz obsežnih enojezičnih poizvedb. Vendar pa takšen psevdo korpus večinoma proizvaja model prevajanja splošne domene, zato ni zadosten za usmerjanje učenja modela QT. V tem prispevku razširimo povečanje podatkov s postopkom prenosa domene, s čimer pregledamo sintetične kandidate na primere, ki se zavedajo iskanja. Model prenosa domene temelji na naprednem transformatorju, v katerem se usklajevanje plasti in mešana pozornost izkoriščata za pospešitev procesa izpopolnjevanja in izkoriščanje parametrov iz vnaprej usposobljenega medjezičnega jezikovnega modela. Za preučitev učinkovitosti predlagane metode smo zbrali testne sklope QT francosko-angleško in špansko-angleško, od katerih je vsak sestavljen iz 10.000 vzporednih poizvedbenih parov s skrbnim ročnim preverjanjem. Kvalitativne in kvantitativne analize kažejo, da je naš model bistveno boljši od močnih izhodišč in s tem povezanih metod prenosa domen tako glede kakovosti prevajanja kot tudi točnosti pridobivanja.', 'he': 'התרגום בקשה (QT) משמש כגורם קריטי בהצלחה להשיג מידע בין שפות (CLIR). Due to the lack of parallel query samples, neural-based QT models are usually optimized with synthetic data which are derived from large-scale monolingual queries.  למרות זאת, סוג כזה של פסאודו קורפוס מוצר בעיקר על ידי מודל תרגום של שטח כללי, גורם לזה להיות לא מספיק כדי להדריך את הלימוד של מודל QT. בעיתון הזה, אנו ממשיכים את הגדלה של המידע עם תהליך העברה של שטח, כך כדי לשנות מועמדים סינטטיים לדוגמאות מודעות לחיפוש. במיוחד, מודל ההעברה של התחום נבנה על טרנספורטר מתקדם, שבה התאמה של שכבות והתשומת לב מעורבת ניצלו כדי להאיץ את תהליך המעצב ולהשתמש בפרמטרים של מודל שפה דרך שפה מאומן מראש. כדי לבדוק את היעילות של השיטה המוצעת, אספנו קבוצות בדיקות QT צרפתית לאנגלית וספרדית לאנגלית, שכל אחד מהם מורכב מ-10,000 זוגות ביקור מקבילים עם בדיקה ידנית זהירה. ניתוחים איכותיים וקוונטיביים מראים שהמודל שלנו יוצא משמעותית מעל קווי בסיס חזקים ושיטות העברה של התחום הקשורות על איכות התרגום וגם מדויקת השיגור.', 'bo': 'Query translation (QT) serves as a critical factor in successful cross-lingual information retrieval (CLIR). Due to the lack of parallel query samples, neural-based QT models are usually optimized with synthetic data which are derived from large-scale monolingual queries. However, such kind of pseudo corpus is mostly produced by a general-domain translation model, making it be insufficient to guide the learning of QT model. In this paper, we extend the data augmentation with a domain transfer procedure, thus to revise synthetic candidates to search-aware examples. Specifically, the domain transfer model is built upon advanced Transformer, in which layer coordination and mixed attention are exploited to speed up the refining process and leverage parameters from a pre-trained cross-lingual language model. To examine the effectiveness of the proposed method, we collected French-to-English and Spanish-to-English QT test sets, each of which consists of 10,000 parallel query pairs with careful manual-checking. Qualitative and quantitative analyses reveal that our model significantly outperforms strong baselines and the related domain transfer methods on both translation quality and retrieval accuracy.'}
{'en': 'Aspectuality Across Genre : A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'ar': 'الطموح عبر النوع: نهج دلالات التوزيع', 'es': 'Aspectualidad en todos los géneros: un enfoque de semántica distributiva', 'pt': 'Aspectualidade em todos os gêneros: uma abordagem de semântica distributiva', 'fr': 'Aspectualité à travers le genre\xa0: une approche sémantique distributionnelle', 'ja': 'ジャンル全体のアスペクティビティ：分布セマンティクスのアプローチ', 'zh': '跨流 Aspectuality: A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'hi': 'शैली भर में Aspectuality: एक वितरण शब्दार्थ दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Аспектность в жанре: подход к семантике распределения', 'ga': 'Gnéiúlacht Trasna Seánra: Cur Chuige Séimeantaic Dáilte', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Aspektuality Across Genre: Μια Διανεμητική Σημαντική Προσέγγιση', 'it': 'Aspectuality Across Genre: A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'hu': 'Aspectualitás a műfajok között: elosztási szemantikai megközelítés', 'mk': 'Аспектуалноста низ генерот: Дирибуционален семантичен пристап', 'kk': 'Жанр арасындағы аспектуалдық: Үлестірілген семантикалық қатынау', 'ms': 'Aspectuality Across Genre: A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'mt': 'Aspettwalità madwar is-Sess: Approċċ Semantiku Distribuzzjonali', 'lt': 'Lyčių aspektas: pasiskirstymo Semantinis metodas', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dവ്വം: ഒരു വിതരണ സെമാന്റിക്സ് സമീപത്തിലേക്കു്', 'sr': 'Aspektivnost kroz Genr: Distribucioni Semantički pristup', 'mn': 'Дөрвөлжүүлэх хэмжээний зэрэг төрлийн харьцаа: A Distribution Semantics Approach', 'ro': 'Aspectualitatea într-un gen: o abordare semantică distribuțională', 'pl': 'Aspektualność w różnych gatunkach: podejście semantyczne dystrybucyjne', 'so': 'Qofka jinsiga ah: A Distribution Semantics Approach', 'sv': 'Aspektualitet tvärs över genre: En Distributional Semantics Approach', 'ur': 'جنس کے درمیان نظریہ: ایک تقسیم سیمانٹیکس تقسیم', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ සීමාන්ටික් ලග', 'ta': 'பார்வையுடைய பொருள்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Vấn đề bao quanh Genre: Một phương pháp phân chia kỳ kỳ.', 'bg': 'Аспектуалност в жанра: подход на дистрибуционната семантика', 'da': 'Aspektualitet på tværs af genre: En fordelingssemantisk tilgang', 'hr': 'Aspektivnost kroz Genr: Distribucioni semantički pristup', 'id': 'Aspektualitas Melalui Genre: Sebuah Pendekatan Semantik Distribusional', 'nl': 'Aspectualiteit Over Genre: Een Distributionele Semantische benadering', 'de': 'Aspektualität quer durch Genre: Ein verteilter semantischer Ansatz', 'fa': 'نسبت به نوع: یک نزدیک سیمانتیک تقسیم\u200cکننده', 'sw': 'Kutokana na umuhimu: Mtazamo wa Kugawanywa', 'tr': 'Aspect ratio', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Aspektualiteti nëpërmjet gjinisë: Një metodë shpërndarëse Semantike', 'am': 'የዓይነት አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Սպեկտուալ հարաբերակցությունը գենդերում. բաշխման սեմանտիկ մոտեցում', 'az': 'Növbət arasındakı görünüş: A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'bn': 'দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতা প্রচণ্ড: বিতরণের সেমান্টিকের কাছে', 'bs': 'Aspektivnost kroz Genr: Distribucioni semantički pristup', 'ko': '장르를 뛰어넘는 장르: 분포 어의학 방법', 'ca': 'Aspectualitat a través del gènere: Un enfocament de Semàtics Distributius', 'cs': 'Aspektualita napříč žánrem: distribuční sémantický přístup', 'et': 'Aspektuaalsus žanri vahel: jaotussemantika lähenemisviis', 'fi': 'Aspectuality Across Genre: A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Aspectuality Across Genre: A Distributional Semantics Approach', 'sk': 'Aspektualnost v vseh žanrih: pristop distribucijske semantike', 'bo': 'Aspectuality Across Genre: A Distribution Semantics Approach'}
{'en': 'The interpretation of the lexical aspect of verbs in English plays a crucial role in tasks such as recognizing textual entailment and learning discourse-level inferences. We show that two elementary dimensions of aspectual class, states vs. events, and telic vs. atelic events, can be modelled effectively with distributional semantics. We find that a verb’s local context is most indicative of its aspectual class, and we demonstrate that closed class words tend to be stronger discriminating contexts than content words. Our approach outperforms previous work on three datasets. Further, we present a new dataset of human-human conversations annotated with lexical aspects and present experiments that show the correlation of telicity with genre and discourse goals.', 'es': 'La interpretación del aspecto léxico de los verbos en inglés desempeña un papel crucial en tareas como reconocer la implicación textual y aprender inferencias a nivel del discurso. Mostramos que dos dimensiones elementales de la clase aspectual, estados frente a eventos y eventos télicos frente a eventos atélicos, se pueden modelar eficazmente con semántica distributiva. Encontramos que el contexto local de un verbo es el más indicativo de su clase aspectual, y demostramos que las palabras de clase cerrada tienden a ser contextos más discriminatorios que las palabras de contenido. Nuestro enfoque supera el trabajo anterior en tres conjuntos de datos. Además, presentamos un nuevo conjunto de datos de conversaciones humano-humano anotadas con aspectos léxicos y presentamos experimentos que muestran la correlación de la telicidad con los objetivos de género y discurso.', 'fr': "L'interprétation de l'aspect lexical des verbes en anglais joue un rôle crucial dans des tâches telles que la reconnaissance des implications textuelles et l'apprentissage des inférences au niveau du discours. Nous montrons que deux dimensions élémentaires de la classe aspectuelle, les états par rapport aux événements et les événements téliques par rapport aux événements atéliques, peuvent être modélisées efficacement avec la sémantique distributionnelle. Nous trouvons que le contexte local d'un verbe est le plus révélateur de sa classe aspectuelle, et nous démontrons que les mots de classe fermée ont tendance à être plus discriminants que les mots de contenu. Notre approche surpasse les travaux précédents sur trois ensembles de données. En outre, nous présentons un nouvel ensemble de données de conversations homme-homme annotées avec des aspects lexicaux et présentons des expériences qui montrent la corrélation entre la télicité et les objectifs de genre et de discours.", 'ar': 'يلعب تفسير الجانب المعجمي للأفعال في اللغة الإنجليزية دورًا حاسمًا في مهام مثل التعرف على الاستدلال النصي وتعلم الاستدلالات على مستوى الخطاب. نظهر أنه يمكن نمذجة بعدين أساسيين للفئة الجانبية ، الحالات مقابل الأحداث ، والأحداث التليفونية مقابل الأطلسية ، بشكل فعال باستخدام دلالات التوزيع. نجد أن السياق المحلي للفعل هو الأكثر دلالة على صنفه الجانبي ، ونوضح أن كلمات الفصل المغلقة تميل إلى أن تكون سياقات تمييزية أقوى من كلمات المحتوى. يتفوق نهجنا على العمل السابق على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات. علاوة على ذلك ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة للمحادثات بين الإنسان والبشر مشروحة بالجوانب المعجمية والتجارب الحالية التي توضح ارتباط التليتكية بأهداف النوع والخطاب.', 'pt': 'A interpretação do aspecto lexical dos verbos em inglês desempenha um papel crucial em tarefas como reconhecer a vinculação textual e aprender inferências no nível do discurso. Mostramos que duas dimensões elementares de classe aspectual, estados vs. eventos, e eventos télicos vs. atélicos, podem ser modeladas efetivamente com semântica distribucional. Descobrimos que o contexto local de um verbo é mais indicativo de sua classe aspectual e demonstramos que palavras de classe fechada tendem a ser contextos discriminativos mais fortes do que palavras de conteúdo. Nossa abordagem supera o trabalho anterior em três conjuntos de dados. Além disso, apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados de conversas humano-humano anotado com aspectos lexicais e apresentamos experimentos que mostram a correlação da telicidade com objetivos de gênero e discurso.', 'ja': '英語の動詞の語彙的側面の解釈は、テキストの帰結を認識し、談話レベルの推論を学習するなどの課題において重要な役割を果たす。アスペクシャルクラスの2つの基本的な次元、状態対事象、およびテリック対アテリック事象は、分布意味論で効果的にモデル化できることを示しています。私たちは、動詞のローカルな文脈がそのアスペクシャルなクラスを最も示していることを発見し、クラスの単語はコンテンツの単語よりも強い識別的な文脈である傾向があることを示します。当社のアプローチは、3つのデータセットに関する以前の作業よりも優れています。さらに、我々は、人間と人間の会話の新しいデータセットを提示し、語彙的な側面に注釈を付け、テリシティとジャンルと話題の目標との相関を示す実験を提示する。', 'zh': '英语中动词词汇解释,在诸如识文蕴涵与学语推理中起至重之用也。 明二本维度事,及telic、atelic事,以布语义建模。 吾见动词之局语境最能代其类,且吾证闭合之词,往往胜于情词之分语境。 吾道优于前三数集上。 又有新人对语数据集,词汇为注释,并有实验,实验见telicity流语之相关性。', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी में क्रियाओं के शाब्दिक पहलू की व्याख्या पाठ्य अनिवार्यता को पहचानने और प्रवचन-स्तर के अनुमानों को सीखने जैसे कार्यों में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाती है। हम दिखाते हैं कि पहलू वर्ग के दो प्राथमिक आयाम, राज्यों बनाम घटनाओं, और टेलिक बनाम एटेलिक घटनाओं को वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ के साथ प्रभावी ढंग से मॉडलकिया जा सकता है। हम पाते हैं कि एक क्रिया का स्थानीय संदर्भ इसके पहलू वर्ग का सबसे अधिक संकेत है, और हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि बंद वर्ग के शब्द सामग्री शब्दों की तुलना में मजबूत भेदभावपूर्ण संदर्भ होते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण तीन डेटासेट पर पिछले काम को मात देता है। इसके अलावा, हम मानव-मानव वार्तालापों का एक नया डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो लेक्सिकल पहलुओं के साथ एनोटेट किया गया है और प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो शैली और प्रवचन लक्ष्यों के साथ टेलिसिटी के सहसंबंध को दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Интерпретация лексического аспекта глаголов в английском языке играет решающую роль в таких задачах, как распознавание текстового влечения и изучение выводов на уровне дискурса. Мы показываем, что два элементарных измерения аспектного класса, состояния против событий и телические против ателических событий, могут быть эффективно смоделированы с помощью семантики распределения. Мы находим, что локальный контекст глагола наиболее указывает на его аспектный класс, и мы демонстрируем, что слова закрытого класса, как правило, сильнее различающих контекстов, чем контентные слова. Наш подход превосходит предыдущую работу по трем наборам данных. Далее мы представляем новый набор данных человеко-человеческих бесед, аннотированных к лексическим аспектам, и представляем эксперименты, которые показывают корреляцию теличности с жанровыми и дискурсными целями.', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag léirmhíniú ghné fhoclóra na mbriathra sa Bhéarla i dtascanna ar nós eitleacht théacsúil a aithint agus tátail ag leibhéal dioscúrsa a fhoghlaim. Léirímid gur féidir dhá ghné bhunúsacha den aicme ghnéis, stáit vs. imeachtaí, agus teagmhais teilige vs. aitileacha, a mhúnlú go héifeachtach le séimeantaic dáileacháin. Faighimid gurb é comhthéacs áitiúil briathar is táscach dá aicme ghnéis, agus léirímid go mbíonn claonadh ag focail aicme dhúnta gur comhthéacsanna idirdhealaitheacha níos láidre ná focail ábhair. Tá feidhmíocht ár gcur chuige níos fearr ná an obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar thrí thacar sonraí. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid i láthair tacar sonraí nua de chomhráite daonna-daonna anótáilte le gnéithe foclóireachta agus cuirimid i láthair turgnaimh a léiríonn an comhghaol idir an telicity agus spriocanna seánra agus dioscúrsa.', 'el': 'Η ερμηνεία της λεξικής πτυχής των ρήμων στα αγγλικά παίζει καθοριστικό ρόλο σε εργασίες όπως η αναγνώριση κειμένων και η εκμάθηση συμπερασμάτων σε επίπεδο λόγου. Δείχνουμε ότι δύο στοιχειώδεις διαστάσεις της οπτικής τάξης, καταστάσεις εναντίον γεγονότων, και τελικά εναντίον ατελικών γεγονότων, μπορούν να μοντελοποιηθούν αποτελεσματικά με τη σημασιολογία κατανομής. Βρίσκουμε ότι το τοπικό πλαίσιο ενός ρήματος είναι πιο ενδεικτικό της συγκεκριμένης τάξης του, και αποδεικνύουμε ότι οι λέξεις κλειστής τάξης τείνουν να είναι ισχυρότερα διακριτικά πλαίσια από τις λέξεις περιεχομένου. Η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά τις προηγούμενες εργασίες σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων. Περαιτέρω, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων ανθρώπινων-ανθρώπινων συνομιλιών σχολιασμένων με λεξικές πτυχές και παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα που δείχνουν τη συσχέτιση της τελικότητας με τους στόχους του είδους και του λόγου.', 'hu': 'Az igék lexikai aspektusának angol nyelvű értelmezése döntő szerepet játszik olyan feladatokban, mint a szöveges vonatkozás felismerése és a diskurzusszintű következtetések tanulása. Megmutatjuk, hogy az aspektuális osztály két elemi dimenziója, az állapotok vs. események, valamint a telic vs. atelic események, hatékonyan modellezhető disztribúciós szemantikával. Úgy találjuk, hogy egy ige helyi kontextusa leginkább jelzi annak aspektuális osztályát, és bebizonyítjuk, hogy a zárt osztályú szavak általában erősebb megkülönböztető kontextusok, mint a tartalmi szavak. Megközelítésünk három adatkészleten végzett korábbi munkát felülmúlja. Továbbá bemutatjuk az ember-ember beszélgetések lexikális vonatkozásokkal megjegyzett új adathalmazát, valamint olyan kísérleteket, amelyek bemutatják a telicitás összefüggését a műfaj és a diskurzus céljaival.', 'ka': 'გერბების ლექსიკალური აპექტიკის ინგლისური ინტერპუქტურაცია აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი პროლემაში, როგორც ტექსტულური დაწყვეტილება და სწავლება დისკურსის დონეზე ინფრენციები ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ აპექტუალური კლასის ორი ელემენტური განზომილებები, სტატუალური განზომილებების და ტელიკური განზომილებების განზომილებების განზომილებების განზომილებების განზ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ვერბის ლოკალური კონტექსტი უფრო ინდინტიკურია მისი აპექსტური კლასის და ჩვენ გამოჩნეთ, რომ დახურებული კლასის სიტყვები უფრო ძალიან დისკრიმინ ჩვენი პროგრამა სამი მონაცემების სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემების საუბარების შესახებ, რომელიც ლექსიკალური ადამიანის განსახულებით და ახლა ექსპერიმენტებით, რომელიც ჩვენ ჩვენებენ ტელექტიის კოლექცი', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тіліндегі вербалардың лексикалық аспектінің түсінімі мәтіндік қатынау және дискурс деңгейінің бағыттауларын анықтау үшін маңызды тапсырмаларда орындалады. Біз аспектуалды класс, оқиғалар мен теликалық оқиғалардың екі элементуалды өлшемдерін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету мүмкіндігін үлестіріп, үлестірілген семантикалық үшін модел аламы Біз вербаның жергілікті контексті оның аспекті класының көбірек көрсеткіші деп ойлаймыз. Біз жабылған класс сөздері мазмұның сөздерінен көбірек дискриминациялық контексті болады. Біздің тәсіліміз үш деректер қорларында алдыңғы жұмыс істейді. Келесіден қатар, адамдар мен адамдар сөйлесудің жаңа деректер жинағын келтіреміз. Лексикалық аспекттер мен қазіргі тәжірибелер жанр мен дискурс мақсаттарының сәйкестігін көрсетеді.', 'it': "L'interpretazione dell'aspetto lessicale dei verbi in inglese svolge un ruolo cruciale in compiti come il riconoscimento del coinvolgimento testuale e l'apprendimento di inferenze a livello di discorso. Mostriamo che due dimensioni elementari della classe aspectuale, stati vs. eventi, e eventi telici vs. atelici, possono essere modellate efficacemente con la semantica distributiva. Troviamo che il contesto locale di un verbo è più indicativo della sua classe aspectuale, e dimostriamo che le parole di classe chiusa tendono ad essere contesti discriminatori più forti delle parole di contenuto. Il nostro approccio supera il lavoro precedente su tre set di dati. Inoltre, presentiamo un nuovo dataset di conversazioni uomo-uomo annotate con aspetti lessicali e presentiamo esperimenti che mostrano la correlazione della telicità con obiettivi di genere e discorso.", 'lt': 'žodžių tekstinio aspekto aiškinimas anglų kalba atlieka labai svarbų vaidmenį tokiose užduotyse kaip tekstinio įtraukimo pripažinimas ir mokymosi diskurso lygio išvados. Mes parodome, kad du elementariniai aspektų klasės aspektai, būklės ir įvykiai bei telikas ir ateliniai įvykiai, gali būti veiksmingai modeliuojami pagal paskirstymo semantiką. Mes manome, kad žodžio vietinis kontekstas labiausiai rodo jo aspektinę klasę, ir mes įrodome, kad uždaros klasės žodžiai paprastai yra labiau diskriminuojantys kontekstai nei turinio žodžiai. Mūsų požiūris viršija ankstesnį darbą dėl trijų duomenų rinkinių. Be to, pristatome naują žmogaus ir žmogaus pokalbių duomenų rinkinį, užrašytą su leksiniais aspektais, ir pristatome eksperimentus, kurie rodo telicito koreliaciją su genre ir diskurso tikslais.', 'mk': 'Интерпретацијата на лексичкиот аспект на глаголата на англиски игра клучна улога во задачите како што е признавањето на текстуалното вмешање и учењето на инференции на дискурсниот ниво. Ние покажуваме дека две елементарни димензии на аспектуалната класа, состојби против настаните, и телик против ателичките настани, може да се моделираат ефикасно со дистрибуционална семантика. Најдовме дека локалниот контекст на прозборот е најиндикативен на неговата аспектуална класа, и демонстрираме дека затворените зборови на класата имаат тенденција да бидат посилни дискриминантни контексти отколку содржините зборови. Our approach outperforms previous work on three datasets.  Покрај тоа, претставуваме нови податоци за човечки-човечки разговори анотирани со лексични аспекти и претставуваме експерименти кои покажуваат корелација на телицитот со генер и дискурсни цели.', 'mt': 'L-interpretazzjoni tal-aspett lexiku tal-verbs bl-Ingliż għandha rwol kruċjali f’kompiti bħar-rikonoxximent tal-involviment testwali u inferenzi fil-livell ta’ diskors tat-tagħlim. We show that two elementary dimensions of aspectual class, states vs. events, and telic vs. atelic events, can be modelled effectively with distributional semantics.  Aħna nsibu li l-kuntest lokali ta’ verb huwa l-aktar indikattiv tal-klassi aspettwali tiegħu, u nagħmlu xhieda li kliem magħluq tal-klassi għandhom it-tendenza li jkunu kuntesti diskriminatorji aktar b’s a ħħithom mill-kliem tal-kontenut. L-approċċ tagħna jwettaq ħidma preċedenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta. Barra minn hekk, qed nippreżentaw sett ġdid ta’ dejta ta’ konversazzjonijiet umani-umani annotati b’aspetti lexiċi u qed nippreżentaw esperimenti li juru l-korrelazzjoni tat-teliċità mal-għanijiet ta’ ġeneru u diskors.', 'ms': 'Interpretasi aspek leksikal bagi verb dalam bahasa Inggeris bermain peran penting dalam tugas seperti mengenali penyelesaian teks dan pembelajaran tahap diskors. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dua dimensi dasar kelas aspektual, keadaan vs. peristiwa, dan peristiwa telic vs. atelic, boleh dipodelkan secara efektif dengan semantik distribusi. Kami mendapati bahawa konteks tempatan verb adalah paling menunjukkan kelas aspektu, dan kami menunjukkan bahawa perkataan kelas tertutup cenderung menjadi konteks diskriminasi yang lebih kuat daripada perkataan kandungan. Pendekatan kita melebihi kerja terdahulu pada tiga set data. Selain itu, kami mempersembahkan set data baru perbualan manusia-manusia yang dicatat dengan aspek leksikal dan eksperimen yang menunjukkan korelasi telicity dengan jenis dan tujuan diskors.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ വാര്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ വ്യാഖ്യാനം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ടെക്സ്കൂളില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ രണ്ട് മൂലഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d, രാജ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് എതിരായിരിക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, ടെലിക് വിഭാഗങ്ങള നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് ഒരു വാര്\u200dബിന്റെ പ്രാദേശിക ക ക്ലാസിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നാണ്. മൂടിയ ക്ലാസ്സ് വ മൂന്നു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുനിന്ന് മുമ്പ് ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പരീക്ഷണങ', 'pl': 'Interpretacja leksykalnego aspektu czasowników w języku angielskim odgrywa kluczową rolę w zadaniach takich jak rozpoznawanie zaangażowania tekstowego i uczenie się wniosków na poziomie dyskursu. Pokazujemy, że dwa elementarne wymiary klasy aspektualnej, stany vs. zdarzenia oraz zdarzenia teliczne vs. ateliczne, można skutecznie modelować za pomocą semantyki dystrybucyjnej. Odkrywamy, że lokalny kontekst czasownika jest najbardziej wskazujący na jego klasę aspektową i pokazujemy, że słowa klasowe zamknięte mają tendencję do silniejszego rozróżniającego kontekstu niż słowa treściowe. Nasze podejście przewyższa poprzednie prace nad trzema zbiorami danych. Ponadto przedstawiamy nowy zestaw danych rozmów człowieka-człowieka z adnotacją aspektów leksykalnych oraz przedstawiamy eksperymenty, które pokazują korelację teliczności z celami gatunkowymi i dyskursowymi.', 'no': 'Interpretasjonen av den leksiske aspekten av verbar i engelsk speler ein viktig rolle i oppgåver som gjenkjenning av tekstinnstillingar og læring av diskursnivå. Vi viser at to elementære dimensjonar av aspektiske klasse, tilstandar mot hendingar og teliske mot ateliske hendingar kan modelerast effektivt med distribusjonssemantikk. Vi finn at ein verbens lokal kontekst er mest indikator av den aspektiske klassen, og vi viser at lukka klassesord har tendens til å vera sterkere diskriminerande kontekstar enn innhaldsord. Tilnærminga vårt utfører førre arbeid på tre datasett. I tillegg presenterer vi eit nytt dataset av menneske-menneske samtaler merket med leksiske aspektar og gjeldande eksperimenter som viser korrelasjonen av telicitet med genre og diskursmål.', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний хэлний лексикийн хэлбэрийн тодорхойлолт нь textual entail, learning discourse-level inferences гэх мэт үйл ажиллагаанд чухал ач холбоотой. Бид хоёр аспектийн хичээл, улс төрөлхтний эсрэг үйл явдал, теликийн эсрэг арга хэмжээсүүд нь хуваарилцааны семантикийн үр дүнтэй арга хэмжээсүүдийг харуулж чадна. Бид хэлний орон нутгийн нөхцөл байдал нь түүний асуудлын хичээлд хамгийн их харагдаж байгааг олж мэднэ. Бид түүний дараах хичээлийн үг нь Content Words-аас илүү хүчтэй байдаг. Бидний арга баримт 3 өгөгдлийн сангийн өмнөх ажил гаргадаг. Дараа нь бид хүн-хүний ярилцлагын шинэ өгөгдлийн хэлбэрүүдийг илтгэдэг. Лексийн талаар, одоогийн туршилтууд нь зэрэг, ярилцлагын зорилготой холбоотой байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Interpretarea aspectului lexical al verbelor în limba engleză joacă un rol crucial în sarcini precum recunoașterea implicării textuale și învățarea inferențelor la nivel de discurs. Aratăm că două dimensiuni elementare ale clasei aspectuale, stări vs. evenimente, și evenimente telice vs. atelice, pot fi modelate eficient cu semantica distribuțională. Considerăm că contextul local al unui verb este cel mai indicator al clasei sale aspectuale și demonstrăm că cuvintele clasei închise tind să fie contexte discriminatorii mai puternice decât cuvintele conținut. Abordarea noastră depășește lucrările anterioare pe trei seturi de date. Mai mult, prezentăm un nou set de date de conversații om-om adnotate cu aspecte lexicale și prezentăm experimente care arată corelația telicității cu obiectivele genului și discursului.', 'so': 'Turjumidda dhinaca leksikalka ee afka Ingiriiska waxaa laga dhigaa qayb muhiim ah oo ku jira shaqaalaha, tusaale ahaan aqoonsashada cilmiga dhaqanka iyo barashada cudurada heerka hadalka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in laba kooxaha hoose ee fasalka kala duduwan, dowladu ay ka jeedaan dhacdooyinka, iyo dhacdooyinka telic vs. atelic waxay si faa’iido ah u sameyn karaan qeyb-qayb ah. Waxaynu aragnaa in mukhtarka deegaanka ee qoraalku uu yahay mid ugu muuqata fasalka hore, waxaynu caddaynaynaa in hadalka la xiriiray ay ay ka xoog badan yihiin takoorista qoraalka waxyaabaha ku jira. Our approach outperforms previous work on three datasets.  Furthermore, waxaan keenaynaa koob cusub oo la hadlo dadka oo la dhibaataysan dhinaca caqliga ah iyo jirrabo la soo maray oo muujiyaya xiriirka dhaqaalaha iyo hagitaanka jinsi iyo hadal.', 'sr': 'Interpretacija leksičkog aspekta verba na engleskom jeziku igra ključnu ulogu u zadatkima poput priznanja tekstualne želje i učenja inferencija na nivou diskursa. Pokazujemo da se dve elementarne dimenzije aspektualne klase, države protiv događaja i telike protiv atelijskih događaja mogu efektivno modelirati sa distribucijskim semantikom. Smatramo da je lokalni kontekst verb a najukazivniji na njegovu aspektualnu klasu, i pokazujemo da zatvorene klase reči čine da su jači diskriminirajući konteksti nego riječi sadržaja. Naš pristup iznosi prethodni posao na tri seta podataka. Nadalje, predstavljamo novi komplet podataka o ljudskim i ljudskim razgovorima annotiranim leksičkim aspektima i sadašnjim eksperimentima koji pokazuju korelaciju teliciteta sa ciljevima genre i diskursa.', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலத்தில் சொல்லும் விளக்கம் ஆங்கிலத்தில் முக்கியமான விஷயங்களில் ஒரு முக்கியமான விளையாட்டை விளையாடுகிறது. மெக்சிக் அறிவ நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இரண்டு தனிப்பட்ட பரிமாணங்கள், நாடுகள் மற்றும் நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் டெலிக் மற்றும் atelic நிகழ்வுகள், பங்கீட்டு பாத ஒரு சொல்லின் உள்ளூர் சூழல் அதன் விளிம்பு வகுப்பின் மிகவும் குறிப்பாக இருக்கும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். மூடிய வகுப்பு வா மூன்று தரவுத் தளங்களில் முந்தைய வேலையை செய்ய நம் அணுகும். Further, we present a new dataset of human-human conversations annotated with lexical aspects and present experiments that show the correlation of telicity with genre and discourse goals.', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ වාර්තාවේ ලෙක්සිකාලික ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා වගේ වාර්තාවේ ලෙක්සිකාලික ප්\u200dරකාරයක් හරියට පාළුව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතිය දෙකක්, ස්ථානය විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ අපි හොයාගන්නවා වාර්තාවේ ස්ථානික සංවේදනයක් එයාගේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පිරිසිදු වැඩේ තුනක් තියෙන්නේ. තවත්, අපි මිනිස්සු-මිනිස්සු කතා කරපු අළුත් දත්ත සූදානයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ලෙක්සිකල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න', 'sv': 'Tolkningen av verbens lexikala aspekt på engelska spelar en avgörande roll i uppgifter som att erkänna textens innebörd och lära sig diskursnivåslutsatser. Vi visar att två elementära dimensioner av aspektuell klass, tillstånd vs händelser, och telic vs atelic händelser, kan modelleras effektivt med distributionssig semantik. Vi finner att ett verbs lokala kontext är mest indikativ på dess aspektuella klass, och vi visar att slutna klassord tenderar att vara starkare diskriminerande kontext än innehållsord. Vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar tidigare arbete på tre datauppsättningar. Vidare presenterar vi en ny datauppsättning mänskliga-mänskliga konversationer kommenterade med lexikala aspekter och presenterar experiment som visar sambandet mellan telicitet och genre- och diskursmål.', 'ur': 'انگلیسی میں باتوں کی لکسیکل الگو کی تفسیر ایک ضروری رغم ہے جیسے ٹیکسٹل کی تفسیر اور سخنرانی سطح کی تفسیر کو پہچان لیتا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ دو منطقی کلاس کی ابتدائی اندازے، ایٹیوں کے مقابلہ میں، اور ٹیلیک علیھ السّلام کے مقابلہ میں، تقسیم سیمانٹیکوں کے ساتھ موڈل کر سکتے ہیں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک کلاس کی محلی کنٹکس اس کے منظور کلاس کے زیادہ نشان دینے والی ہے، اور ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ بند کلاس کلاس کلاس کی باتیں محفوظ کلمات سے زیادہ طاقتور ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ تین ڈیٹسٹ پر پہلے کام کرتا ہے۔ اور اس کے بعد ہم انسان-انسان کی باتوں کے نو ڈیٹ سٹ کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو لکھی الگویاں اور موجود آزمائش کے ذریعہ مشورہ کئے جاتے ہیں جو جنس اور گفتگو کے موقع سے ٹیلیٹی کی تعلق کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Ingliz tilida o'zlarining leksikal aspektlarini o'zgartirish, texnologiya ta'minlovchi va gapirish darajasi kasalliklarni o'rganish mumkin vazifalarda o'ynaladi. Biz murakkab darajadagi ikkita elemental darajada, davlatlar vs. hodisalar va telik vs. atelik hodisalarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, ma'lumotning lokal muktadharining eng muhimi darajasi, va biz yopilgan sinf so'zlarini ko'rsatganimizni ko'rsatdik, tuzuvchi soʻzlarni mavzu so'zlaridan ko'proq ajratishga ega bo'ladi. Bizning qismlarimiz uchta maʼlumotlar sohasida oldin ishni bajaradi. Ko'rsatganda, biz odamlar bilan bog'liq suhbatlari bilan bir yangi maʼlumot tarkibini qo'shishimiz va hozirgi tajribalar bilan bir xil va suhbat maqolalari bilan bog'liqni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Sự diễn giải ngôn ngữ văn học của các động từ ở Anh đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong các nhiệm vụ như nhận ra tính chất và ngụ ý về ngôn ngữ học. Chúng tôi cho thấy hai kích thước cơ bản của lớp học thiên văn, các bang và các sự kiện, và các sự kiện nghệ thuật và nghệ thuật, có thể được mô hình bằng ngữ pháp phân phát. Chúng tôi thấy ngữ cảnh địa phương của động từ là yếu tố của nó, và chúng tôi chứng minh rằng những từ ngữ xã hội kín có xu hướng phân biệt nhiều hơn là ngữ cảnh nội dung. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi hoàn thành công việc trước đó. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mới về các cuộc trò chuyện người-con người được ghi chú với các khía cạnh văn học và các thí nghiệm hiện đại cho thấy sự tương quan giữa hai giống loài.', 'bg': 'Тълкуването на лексикалния аспект на глаголите в английския език играе решаваща роля в задачи като разпознаване на текстово обвързване и изучаване на заключения на ниво дискурс. Показваме, че две елементарни измерения на аспектуален клас, състояния срещу събития и телични срещу ателични събития, могат да бъдат моделирани ефективно с дистрибуционна семантика. Намираме, че локалният контекст на глагола е най-показателен за неговия аспектуален клас и демонстрираме, че думите в затворен клас са склонни да бъдат по-силно дискриминиращи контексти от думите със съдържание. Нашият подход надминава предишната работа по три набора от данни. Освен това, представяме нов набор от данни от човешко-човешки разговори, анотирани с лексикални аспекти и представяме експерименти, които показват корелацията на теличността с жанровите и дискурсните цели.', 'hr': 'Interpretacija leksičkog aspekta verba na engleskom jeziku igra ključnu ulogu u zadatkima poput priznanja tekstualne želje i učenja inferencija razine diskursa. Pokazujemo da se dvije osnovne dimenzije aspektualne klase, države protiv događaja i teličke protiv ateličkih događaja mogu učinkovito modelirati s distribucijskim semantikama. Smatramo da je lokalni kontekst verb a najindikativniji od njegove aspektualne klase, i pokazujemo da zatvorene klase riječi čine biti jači diskriminirajući konteksti nego riječi sadržaja. Naš pristup iznosi prethodni rad na tri podataka. Nadalje, predstavljamo novi skup podataka o ljudskim i ljudskim razgovorima annotiranim leksičkim aspektima i sadašnjim eksperimentima koji pokazuju korelaciju teliciteta sa ciljevima genre i diskursa.', 'da': 'Fortolkningen af det leksikske aspekt af verber på engelsk spiller en afgørende rolle i opgaver som anerkendelse af tekst involvering og læring af diskursniveau konklusioner. Vi viser, at to elementære dimensioner af aspektuel klasse, tilstande vs. begivenheder, og telic vs. atelic begivenheder, kan modelleres effektivt med distributional semantik. Vi finder ud af, at et verbs lokale sammenhæng er mest indikativ for dets aspektuelle klasse, og vi demonstrerer, at lukkede klasseord har tendens til at være stærkere diskriminerende sammenhænge end indholdsord. Vores tilgang overgår tidligere arbejde på tre datasæt. Derudover præsenterer vi et nyt datasæt af menneske-menneske samtaler kommenteret med leksikske aspekter og præsenterer eksperimenter, der viser sammenhængen mellem telicitet og genre- og diskursmål.', 'nl': 'De interpretatie van het lexicale aspect van werkwoorden in het Engels speelt een cruciale rol bij taken zoals het herkennen van tekstuele implicaties en het leren van conclusies op discoursniveau. We laten zien dat twee elementaire dimensies van aspectuele klasse, states vs. events, en telic vs. atelic events, effectief kunnen worden gemodelleerd met distributionele semantiek. We vinden dat de lokale context van een werkwoord het meest indicatief is voor zijn aspectuele klasse, en we tonen aan dat gesloten klassenwoorden meestal sterker discriminerende contexten zijn dan inhoudelijke woorden. Onze aanpak overtreft eerder werk op drie datasets. Verder presenteren we een nieuwe dataset van mens-mens gesprekken geannoteerd met lexicale aspecten en presenteren we experimenten die de correlatie van telicity met genre- en discoursdoelen tonen.', 'de': 'Die Interpretation des lexikalischen Aspekts von Verben im Englischen spielt eine entscheidende Rolle bei Aufgaben wie der Erkennung von textuellen Implikationen und dem Erlernen von Schlussfolgerungen auf Diskursebene. Wir zeigen, dass zwei elementare Dimensionen der aspektuellen Klasse, Zustände vs. Ereignisse und telische vs. atelische Ereignisse, effektiv mit Verteilungssemmeantik modelliert werden können. Wir finden, dass der lokale Kontext eines Verbs am meisten für seine aspektuelle Klasse indikativ ist, und wir zeigen, dass geschlossene Klassenwörter tendenziell stärker diskriminierende Kontexte sind als inhaltliche Wörter. Unser Ansatz übertrifft frühere Arbeiten an drei Datensätzen. Darüber hinaus präsentieren wir einen neuen Datensatz von Mensch-Mensch-Gesprächen mit lexikalischen Aspekten und stellen Experimente vor, die die Korrelation von Telizität mit Genre- und Diskurszielen aufzeigen.', 'ko': '영어 동사 어휘 방면의 해석은 문장의 함축을 식별하고 문장 추리를 배우는 등 임무에서 중요한 역할을 한다.우리는 체류의 두 가지 기본 차원, 상태와 사건, 그리고telic와atelic 사건을 증명했고 분포된 의미로 효과적으로 모델링할 수 있다.우리는 동사의 국부적인 언어 환경이 그 체류를 가장 잘 반영하는 것을 발견했고 폐쇄적인 단어가 내용어보다 언어 환경을 더 잘 구분한다는 것을 증명했다.우리의 방법은 세 개의 데이터 집합에서 이전의 작업보다 우수하다.그 밖에 우리는 새로운 인류 대화 데이터 집합을 제공했다. 이 데이터 집합은 어휘로 주석을 달았고 일부 실험을 제공하여 문장의 목적성과 문장 유형과 문장 목표의 상관성을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Interpretasi aspek lexik dari verb dalam bahasa Inggris bermain peran penting dalam tugas seperti mengakui keterlibatan tekstual dan belajar inferensi-tahap diskors. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dua dimensi dasar dari kelas aspektual, negara vs. peristiwa, dan telic vs. atelic peristiwa, dapat dimodelkan secara efektif dengan semantik distribusi. Kami menemukan bahwa konteks lokal sebuah verb adalah paling indikasif dari kelas aspektu, dan kami menunjukkan bahwa kata-kata kelas tertutup cenderung menjadi konteks diskriminasi yang lebih kuat daripada kata-kata konten. Pendekatan kita melebihi pekerjaan sebelumnya pada tiga set data. Further, we present a new dataset of human-human conversations annotated with lexical aspects and present experiments that show the correlation of telicity with genre and discourse goals.', 'fa': 'تعبیر نسبت\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی واژه\u200cهای انگلیسی نقش مهمی در کار\u200cهایی مثل شناختن آزادی\u200cهای متن و یادگیری\u200cهای سطح سخنرانی را می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که دو اندازه ابتدایی از کلاس منطقی، ایالت vs. اتفاقات، و اتفاقات تلیک vs. atelic، می توانند با سیمانتیک تقسیم موجود شوند. ما فهمیدیم که محیط محلی یک کلاس بیشتر از کلاس محیط آن نشان دهنده است، و ما نشان می دهیم که کلاس های کلاس بسته\u200cتر از کلمات محیط قوی تر است. دستور ما کار قبلی را در سه مجموعه داده انجام می دهد. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید از مکالمات انسان و انسان را نشان می دهیم که با نقطه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و آزمایش\u200cهای موجود نشان می\u200cدهند که ارتباط تلویزیتی با هدف\u200cهای ژنتر و صحبت را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mtazamo wa msisimu wa maneno katika Kiingereza inacheza jukumu la muhimu katika kazi kama vile kutambua maambukizi ya msingi na kujifunza magonjwa ya kiwango cha mazungumzo. Tunaonyesha kuwa tofauti mbili za msingi za darasa la mtazamo, serikali dhidi ya matukio, na matukio ya simu na matukio ya atelic, yanaweza kutengenezwa kwa ufanisi na mifano ya usambazaji. Tunapata kwamba mukhtadha wa maeneo ya msingi wa maneno ni ushahidi zaidi wa darasa hilo, na tunaonyesha kuwa maneno yaliyofungwa darasa huenda kuwa na nguvu ya kubagua matatizo kuliko maneno ya maudhui. Hatua yetu inafanya kazi iliyopita kwenye seti tatu za data. Further, we present a new dataset of human-human conversations annotated with lexical aspects and present experiments that show the correlation of telicity with genre and discourse goals.', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe wersiýalaryň leksiýa aspektleriniň terjime edil metin daşyrlygyny tanamak we gürrüň derejesini azaltmak üçin wajyp roli oýnaýar. Biz aspektal synpyň, döwletlere garşy we çykyşlaryň iki aspektal ölçüsi görkezip görünýärdik. Döwletlere garşy we çykyşlara baýram ýaly daýlaşylyp biler. Biz bir verbiniň ýerli konteksti özüniň aspekt synpynyň iň köp görkezilýändigini görýäris we ýapylan s özleriň sözleriniň daşary sözlerinden güýçli däldigini görkeýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz üç sany veri setirinde öňki işi çykarýar. Mundan soňra, adamlaryň-adamlaryň söhbetleriniň täze hasaplaryny leksiýa görnüşleri bilen duýýan we şu wagt suratlaryň jener we gürrüňlik maksadlarynyň täsirini görkezip berýäris.', 'af': "Die uitlegging van die leksiese aspekt van verbe in Engels speel 'n kruipende rol in opdragte soos teks aanhouding en leer diskurse-vlak inferensies. Ons wys dat twee elementêre dimensies van aspektuul klas, staatste teen gebeurtenis, en telike teen ateliese gebeurtenis kan effektief met verspreidingse semantieke modelleer word. Ons vind dat 'n verb se plaaslike konteks mees indikatief is van sy aspektieële klas, en ons wys dat toegesluit klaswoorde die sterker diskriminasie konteks is a s inhoud woorde. Ons toegang uitvoer vorige werk op drie datastel. Verder, ons stel 'n nuwe datastel van menslike-menslike gesprekke wat met leksiese aspekte en huidige eksperimente aangekies het wat die korrelasie van telisiteit met genre en diskursie doels vertoon.", 'sq': 'The interpretation of the lexical aspect of verbs in English plays a crucial role in tasks such as recognizing textual entailment and learning discourse-level inferences.  Ne tregojmë se dy dimensione elementare të klasës aspektuale, shtetet vs. ngjarjet, dhe ngjarjet telike vs. atelic, mund të modelohen efektivisht me semantikën shpërndarëse. Ne zbulojmë se konteksti lokal i një verbi është më tregues i klasës s ë tij aspektuale dhe ne demonstrojmë se fjalët e klasës së mbyllur tenderojnë të jenë kontekste më të forta diskriminuese se fjalët e përmbajtjes. Përqasja jonë është më e mirë se puna e mëparshme në tre grupe të dhënash. Për më tepër, ne paraqesim një sërë të dhënash të reja të bisedimeve njerëzore-njerëzore të anotuara me aspekte lexike dhe eksperimente të paraqitura që tregojnë korrelacionin e telicitetit me xhenerin dhe qëllimet e diskursit.', 'am': 'የንግግሊዝኛ ቋንቋዎች መተርጓሜ የጽሑፍ ማወቅ እና የንግግር ደረጃ ደካማዎችን ለማስተማር እንደሚያሳውቅ በሥርዓቶች ላይ የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ ሁለቱ የክፍለ ክፍል፣ ሀገራት እና ቴሌክቲክ እና በተካሄደው ጉዳይ፣ በተከፋፈለ ስምናሲ እና በክፍለ ግንኙነት የሚቆጠሩ ሁለታዊ ክፍሎች እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የቋንቋው ግንኙነት የቅርብ ክፍል ማሳየት ነው እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የክፍለ ቃላት ቃላት ከውይይት ቃላት ይልቅ የበረታች እንዲሆን ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ስራ በሦስት ዳታተሮች ላይ ነው:: ከዚህም በላይ፣ የሥጋና እና የንግግር አካባቢ ግንኙነት የሚያሳየው አዲስ የሰው ጉዳዮች እና አሁን ያሉትን ፈተናዎች አዲስ ዳታዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡', 'hy': 'The interpretation of the lexical aspect of verbs in English plays a crucial role in tasks such as recognizing textual entailment and learning discourse-level inferences.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տարրական դասարանի երկու տարրական չափությունը, նահանգները համեմատած իրադարձություններին, և հելիքը համեմատած աթելիկ իրադարձություններին, կարող են արդյունավետ մոդելավորվել բաշխման սեմանտիկայի միջոցով: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ բայի տեղական կոնտեքստը ամենակարևորը ցույց է տալիս իր հարաբերական դասին, և մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ փակ դասի բառերը հակված են լինել ավելի ուժեղ տարբերակող կոնտեքստներ, քան պարունակության բառերը: Մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է երեք տվյալների վերաբերյալ նախորդ աշխատանքը: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մարդկային-մարդկային զրույցների նոր տվյալներ, որոնք գրված են լեքսիկական ասպեկտներով և ներկայացնում են փորձարկումներ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս հեռախոսականության կապվածությունը գենրի և քննարկման նպատակների հետ:', 'az': 'İngilizce sözlərin leksik aspektinin yorumlanması textual haram və sözlərin seviyyəti a şağılıqlarını tanımayan işlərdə çox mövcuddur. Biz göstəririk ki, aspekt sınıfının, eyaletlərin və teliklərin və ateliklərin iki ilk ölçüsü, dağıtıcı semantik vasitəsilə modellə edilə bilər. Biz bir verbin yerli məlumatı onun aspekt s ınıfının ən çox göstərici olduğunu görürük, və biz bu sözlərin bağlı sınıf sözlərinin məlumatdan daha qüvvətli müxtəlif məlumatı olduğunu göstəririk. Bizim yaxınlığımız əvvəlki işləri üç verilən qutularda istifadə edir. Daha sonra, insan-insan söhbətlərinin yeni bir veri toplamını göstərdik, laksici aspektlərlə və həmin təcrübələrin genir və söhbət məqsədilə telicitə bağlantısını göstərən təcrübələrin.', 'bn': 'ইংরেজী ভাষার লেক্সিক্যাল প্রতিক্রিয়ার ব্যাখ্যা কাজের মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে, যেমন লেক্চুয়ালের স্বীকার করে এবং কথ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বিভিন্ন ক্লাস, রাষ্ট্রের বিরুদ্ধে ঘটনা এবং টেলিক বিরোধী ঘটনার দুটি মৌলিক মাত্রার মাত্রা কার্যকর ভাবে বিতরণের স আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে একটি ভার্বের স্থানীয় প্রেক্ষাপট তার প্রাক্তন ক্লাসের সবচেয়ে বেশী নিদর্শন, আর আমরা প্রমাণিত করছি যে বন্ধ করা ক্লাসের আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা তিন তথ্য সেটে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ করে। এছাড়াও, আমরা মানুষের মানব আলোচনার একটি নতুন ডাটা সেট উপস্থাপন করছি যা লেক্সিক্সিক প্রান্ত এবং বর্তমান পরীক্ষা দিয়ে বিরক্তিকর পরীক্ষা দিয়েছে যা', 'ca': "L'interpretació de l'aspecte lèxic dels verbs en anglès juga un paper crucial en tasques com reconèixer l'involucració textual i aprendre inferències a nivell discursiu. Mostrem que dues dimensions elementars de la classe aspectual, estats vs. esdeveniments, i esdeveniments tèlics vs. atèlics, poden ser modelades efectivament amb semàntica distribucional. Trobem que el contexte local d'un verb és més indicador de la seva classe aspectual, i demostram que les paraules de classe tancada tendeixen a ser contextes discriminatoris més forts que les paraules de contingut. El nostre enfocament supera la feina anterior en tres conjunts de dades. També presentem un nou conjunt de dades de converses human a-humana anotats amb aspectes lèxics i experiments que mostren la correlació de la telicitat amb els objectius de gènere i discurs.", 'cs': 'Interpretace lexikálního aspektu slovesa v angličtině hraje klíčovou roli při rozpoznávání textové implikace a učení diskurzních závěrů. Ukazujeme, že dvě elementární dimenze aspektuální třídy, stavy vs. události a telické vs. atelické události, lze efektivně modelovat pomocí distribuční sémantiky. Zjišťujeme, že lokální kontext slovesa je nejvíce indikační pro jeho aspektuální třídu a ukazujeme, že slova uzavřené třídy mají tendenci být silnější rozlišující kontext než slova obsahu. Náš přístup překonává předchozí práci na třech datových sadách. Dále představujeme nový datový soubor konverzací člověk-člověk anotovaný lexikálními aspekty a představujeme experimenty, které ukazují korelaci telicity s žánrovými a diskurzními cíli.', 'et': 'Inglise keeles tegusõnade leksikaalse aspekti tõlgendamine mängib olulist rolli sellistes ülesannetes nagu tekstilise kaasatuse äratundmine ja diskursuse tasemel järelduste õppimine. Näitame, et aspektuaalse klassi kaks elementaarset dimensiooni, olekud vs. sündmused ja telic vs. atelic sündmused, on võimalik efektiivselt modelleerida distributsioonisemantika abil. Leiame, et tegusõna kohalik kontekst viitab kõige rohkem selle aspektaalsele klassile ja näitame, et suletud klassi sõnad kipuvad olema tugevamad diskrimineerivad kontekstid kui sisusõnad. Meie lähenemine ületab kolme andmekogumi varasemat tööd. Lisaks esitame uue andmekogumi inim-inimese vestlustest, mis on anoteeritud leksikaalsete aspektidega, ning esitame eksperimente, mis näitavad telelisuse seost žanri ja diskursuse eesmärkidega.', 'bs': 'Interpretacija leksičkog aspekta verba na engleskom jeziku igra ključnu ulogu u zadatkima poput priznanja tekstualne želje i učenja inferencija na nivou diskursa. Pokazujemo da se dvije elementarne dimenzije aspektualne klase, države protiv događaja, i teličke protiv ateličkih događaja mogu efektivno modelirati sa distribucijskim semanticima. Nalazimo da je lokalni kontekst verb a najindikativniji od njegove aspektualne klase, i pokazujemo da zatvorene klase riječi čine da su jači diskriminirajući konteksti nego riječi sadržaja. Naš pristup iznosi prethodni posao na tri seta podataka. Nadalje, predstavljamo novi set podataka o ljudskim i ljudskim razgovorima annotiranim leksičkim aspektima i sadašnjim eksperimentima koji pokazuju korelaciju teliciteta sa ciljevima genre i diskursa.', 'fi': 'Verbien leksikaalisen näkökulman tulkinta englanniksi on ratkaisevassa asemassa esimerkiksi tekstien merkittävyyden tunnistamisessa ja diskurssitason päättelyjen oppimisessa. Osoitamme, että aspektiaalisen luokan kaksi alkeellista ulottuvuutta, tilat vs. tapahtumat ja telic vs. atelic tapahtumat, voidaan mallintaa tehokkaasti jakelusemantiikan avulla. Havaitsemme, että verbin paikallinen konteksti osoittaa eniten sen aspektiaalista luokkaa, ja osoitamme, että suljetun luokan sanat ovat yleensä vahvempia syrjiviä konteksteja kuin sisältösanat. Lähestymistapamme ylittää aiemmat kolme aineistoa koskevat työt. Lisäksi esittelemme uuden aineiston ihmisen ja ihmisen välisistä keskusteluista, joihin on lisätty sanastollisia näkökohtia, ja esittelemme kokeiluja, jotka osoittavat telisyyden korrelaation genre- ja diskurssitavoitteiden kanssa.', 'jv': 'Tarjamahan kelakong langgar punika ingkang kelas Monday Awak dhéwé nggarap bener sing sampek kelas lokal sing gak ngomong nik kelas anyar tentang karo ingkang sampek, lan kéné mulasahan kelas kuwi kapan kelas telas telas telas terakhir dhéwé isih luwih apik sing luwih apik dhéwé. section Lah berlak, kita mulai pernik nganggo dataset sing gawe nguasar-wong liyane karo hal-hal nganggo pernik saiki lan ijol-ijolan sing bisa nguasar kelangan kelangan kelangan sampeyan karo genr lan gewis ngawe gerakan.', 'ha': "Babu fassarar fanel na leksikal na verbs cikin Ingiriya yana da wani muhimu a cikin aikin kama da gane mala'a na littãfi da za'a sanar da mala'a-daraja. Tuna nũna cewa, hanyõyi biyu na ƙanshi na daban-daban, masu motsi a tsakanin ayuka, da kuma masu tsakanin ta tsakanin telik, za'a samo motsi da sakantiki masu buɗe. Muna gane cewa, mazaɓan maganar verb na ƙaranci ne mafi girma ga ma'anarsa, kuma muna nuna cewa, kalmõmi da aka rufe darafõfi, za'a zama mafi ƙaranci masu yin gaura da mazaɓa daga maganar mavzu. Mataimakinmu ta sami aikin da ya shige ta akan taki uku. Furan haka, Munã zo da wani danne na mutane da aka yi wa mazaɓa na mutane da aka yanzu da jarrabi masu sakanci da na yanzu, sunã nũna muhimmanci da ma'abũcin mutane da goayin magana.", 'sk': 'Interpretacija leksikalnega vidika glagolov v angleščini igra ključno vlogo pri nalogah, kot sta prepoznavanje besedilne posledice in učenje diskurznih sklepov. Pokazali smo, da je mogoče z distribucijsko semantiko učinkovito modelirati dve elementarni dimenziji aspektualnega razreda, stanja proti dogodkom in telični proti atelični dogodki. Ugotavljamo, da je lokalni kontekst glagola najbolj nakazujoč za njegov aspektualni razred, in dokazujemo, da so besede zaprtega razreda ponavadi močnejše diskriminacijske kontekste kot besede z vsebino. Naš pristop presega prejšnje delo na treh naborih podatkov. Poleg tega predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov človeško-človeških pogovorov z oznakami leksikalnih vidikov in predstavljamo eksperimente, ki kažejo korelacijo teličnosti z žanrskimi in diskurznimi cilji.', 'he': 'הפרשנות של היבט הלקסי של אלברים באנגלית משחקת תפקיד קריטי במשימות כמו זיהוי התעסקות טקסטליות וללמד תוצאות רמת דיבור. אנחנו מראים ששני מימדים יסודיים של שיעור ספקטורי, מדינות נגד אירועים, ואירועים טליקים נגד אטליקים, יכולים להיות מודלים באופן יעיל עם סמנטיקה פיצועית. אנו מוצאים שהקשר המקומי של פעל הוא הכי מרמז לכיתה המחוזית שלה, ואנחנו מראים שמילים בכיתה סגורות נוטים להיות קשרים מבחינים יותר חזקים ממילות תוכן. הגישה שלנו מעליפה את העבודה הקודמת על שלושה קבוצות נתונים. Further, we present a new dataset of human-human conversations annotated with lexical aspects and present experiments that show the correlation of telicity with genre and discourse goals.', 'bo': 'The interpretation of the lexical aspect of verbs in English plays a crucial role in tasks such as recognizing textual entailment and learning discourse-level inferences. ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་། གནས་ཚུལ་དང་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་མཐོང་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རང་ཁུལ་གནས་ཡུལ་དེ་རང་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་མང་ཤོས་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདིས་སྔོན་གྱི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསུམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཁྲིར་བ་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མི་རྣམས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་མི་རྣམས་ལས་སླེབས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་'}
{'en': 'Joint Persian Word Segmentation Correction and Zero-Width Non-Joiner Recognition Using BERT', 'fr': "Correction conjointe de segmentation de mots persans et reconnaissance de non-jointure de largeur nulle à l'aide du BERT", 'ar': 'تصحيح تجزئة الكلمات الفارسية المشترك والتعرف على العرض الصفري غير الموصل باستخدام BERT', 'es': 'Corrección conjunta de la segmentación de palabras persas y reconocimiento sin uniones de ancho cero mediante BERT', 'pt': 'Correção de segmentação de palavras persas conjuntas e reconhecimento de não-joiner de largura zero usando BERT', 'ja': 'BERTを使用した共同ペルシャ語単語セグメンテーション修正とゼロ幅非ジョイナー認識', 'zh': '用 BERT 合波斯语分词校正与零广非细木工识', 'ru': 'Совместная коррекция сегментации персидского слова и распознавание с нулевой шириной с использованием BERT', 'hi': 'संयुक्त फ़ारसी शब्द विभाजन सुधार और शून्य-चौड़ाई गैर-योजक पहचान BERT का उपयोग कर', 'ga': 'Comhcheartú Deighilte Focal Peirsis agus Aitheantas Neamh-Leithead Nialasach ag Úsáid BERT', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი პერსიანი სიტყვა სეგენტიკაციის რექსიცია და ნულ- სიგრძე არ- ერთადერთი განახლება BERT გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Közös perzsa szószegmentációs javítás és nulla szélességű, nem csatlakozó felismerés BERT használatával', 'el': 'Κοινή διόρθωση τμημάτων λέξεων και αναγνώριση μη-συνδέσμων μηδενικού πλάτους χρησιμοποιώντας το BERT', 'it': 'Correzione congiunta della segmentazione delle parole persiane e riconoscimento non aderente a larghezza zero utilizzando BERT', 'kk': 'Біріктірілген персиялық сөз сегментациясын түзету және біріктіруші емес келтіру BERT қолданылады', 'lt': 'Jungtinis persijos žodžių segmentacijos korekcija ir nulinio plotio nesujungiančių žodžių pripažinimas naudojant BERT', 'mk': 'Корекција на заедничката персиска секментација на зборови и нула- ширинско нејзино препознавање користејќи BERT', 'ms': 'Perkongsian Pembetulan Segmentasi Kata Persia dan Pengenalan Tidak-Joiner Lebar-Zero menggunakan BERT', 'ml': 'Joint Persian Word Segmentation Correction and Zero-Width Non-Joiner Recognition Using BERT', 'mt': 'Korrezzjoni Konġunta tas-Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem Persjan u Rikonoxximent Null-Wisa’ Mhux Joiner bl-Użu tal-BERT', 'mn': 'БЕРТ хэрэглэж байгаа Персийн үг хэвлэлтийн загвар зөвшөөрөх, Нэг-өргөн биш холбоотой хүлээн зөвшөөрөх', 'no': 'Kombinert persisk ordsegmenteringskorreksjon og nulbreidde ikkje-samsvarar- gjenkjenning ved bruk av BERT', 'pl': 'Korekta segmentacji perskiego słowa wspólna korekcja i rozpoznawanie zerowej szerokości niełączników przy użyciu BERT', 'ro': 'Corecția comună a segmentării cuvintelor persane și recunoașterea fără îmbinare la lățime zero utilizând BERT', 'sr': 'Сједнако признање непријатељања Персијских речних сегментације и непријатељање непријатељања користи BERT', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පර්සියාන් වචන සෙග්මෙන්ටමන් සහ සුරූපය ප්\u200dරමාණය නොසම්බන්ධ කිරීම සඳහා BERT භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Joint Persian word Segmentation and Zero-width Non-Joiner Recognition using BERT', 'sv': 'Gemensam korrigering av persisk ordsegmentering och noll-vidd icke-sammanfogad igenkänning med hjälp av BERT', 'ta': 'பெர்டியை பயன்படுத்தி பார்சியன் வார்த்தை பிரிப்பு திருத்தம் மற்றும் பூஜ்ய- அகலம் இல்லாத ஒழுங்கு மற்றும் பிரி', 'ur': 'Joint Persian Word Segmentation Correction and Zero-Width Non-Joiner Recognition using BERT', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Đánh dấu bằng than hồng', 'bg': 'Съвместна корекция на сегментацията на персийските думи и разпознаване на несъединители с нулева ширина', 'hr': 'Zajednička korekcija persijske riječi segmentacije i nepoznanje nulo-široke nepojednosti s korištenjem BERT-a', 'da': 'Korrigering af fælles persisk ordsegmentering og genkendelse af ikke-sammenkoblet uden bredde ved hjælp af BERT', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijke Perzische Woordsegmentatie Correctie en Zero-Width Non-Joiner Recognition met behulp van BERT', 'de': 'Gemeinsame persische Wortsegmentierungskorrektur und Nullbreite Nicht-Joiner-Erkennung mit BERT', 'id': 'Joint Persian Word Segmentation Correction and Zero-Width Non-Joiner Recognition Using BERT', 'ko': 'BERT 기반의 페르시아어 분사 교정 및 제로 너비 비연결어 식별', 'fa': 'تعیین جدایل کلمه فارسی و شناسایی غیر جابجا با استفاده از BERT', 'sw': 'Shirikisho la Kutenga Orodha ya Kirusi na Utambulisho wa Kisifili wa Kiunganisha kwa kutumia BERT', 'af': 'Gesamelend Persiese Woord Segmentasie Korreksie en Nuwe- Wydte Nie- Gesameleerder Herkenning gebruik BERT', 'tr': "BERT'i ulanan söz segmentasiýasyny düzeltmek we Nusga Giňliki Aňlamak", 'sq': 'Korrektimi i përbashkët persian i Segmentit të Fjalëve dhe njohje zero-gjerësi jo-bashkues duke përdorur BERT', 'am': 'የፋርስ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'ФІХҐХЊХЏ', 'bn': 'BERT ব্যবহার করে পার্সিয়ান শব্দ বিভাগের সংশোধন এবং শূন্য-প্রস্থ নয়-জোনার স্বীকার', 'az': 'İşləndirilən Persiyalı Söz Segmentasyonu Düzəltməsi və Sıfır genişliyi İşləndirilməsi', 'bs': 'Zajednička korekcija persijske riječi segmentacije i nepoznanje nulo-široke nepojednosti s korištenjem BERT-a', 'ca': 'Correcció conjunta de segmentació de paraules persa i reconeixement zero-ancho sense connexió utilitzant BERT', 'cs': 'Korekce segmentace společného perského slova a rozpoznávání nesouvisejících s nulovou šířkou pomocí BERT', 'et': 'Ühine Pärsia sõna segmentatsiooni parandus ja nulllaiusega mitteühendaja tuvastamine BERT-i abil', 'fi': 'Yhteinen persialainen sanasegmentoinnin korjaus ja nollaleveydellinen liittymätön tunnistus BERT:n avulla', 'jv': 'Join', 'sk': 'Popravek segmentacije besed v perziji in prepoznavanje ničelne širine brez združevalcev z uporabo BERT', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תוקן מילים פרסיות משותף והזיהוי של מילים לא מוצטרפים ברחבי אפס', 'bo': 'Joint Persian Word Segmentation Correction and Zero-Width Non-Joiner Recognition Using BERT'}
{'en': 'Words are properly segmented in the Persian writing system ; in practice, however, these writing rules are often neglected, resulting in single words being written disjointedly and multiple words written without any white spaces between them. This paper addresses the problems of word segmentation and zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) recognition in Persian, which we approach jointly as a sequence labeling problem. We achieved a macro-averaged F1-score of 92.40 % on a carefully collected corpus of 500 sentences with a high level of difficulty.', 'ar': 'الكلمات مجزأة بشكل صحيح في نظام الكتابة الفارسي ؛ ومع ذلك ، فمن الناحية العملية ، غالبًا ما يتم إهمال قواعد الكتابة هذه ، مما يؤدي إلى كتابة كلمات مفردة بشكل منفصل وكتابة كلمات متعددة دون أي مسافات بيضاء بينها. تتناول هذه الورقة مشاكل تجزئة الكلمات والتعرف على عدم الربط بعرض صفري (ZWNJ) باللغة الفارسية ، والتي نتعامل معها بشكل مشترك كمشكلة تسمية التسلسل. لقد حققنا درجة F1 بمتوسط ماكرو بلغت 92.40٪ على مجموعة مجمعة بعناية من 500 جملة بمستوى عالٍ من الصعوبة.', 'fr': "Les mots sont correctement segmentés dans le système d'écriture persan\xa0; dans la pratique, cependant, ces règles d'écriture sont souvent négligées, ce qui entraîne l'écriture de mots isolés et de multiples mots écrits sans espaces blancs entre eux. Cet article aborde les problèmes de segmentation de mots et de reconnaissance de non-jointure de largeur nulle (ZWNJ) en persan, que nous abordons conjointement comme un problème d'étiquetage de séquence. Nous avons obtenu un score F1 macro-moyen de 92,40\xa0% sur un corpus soigneusement collecté de 500 phrases avec un niveau de difficulté élevé.", 'pt': 'As palavras são segmentadas adequadamente no sistema de escrita persa; na prática, no entanto, essas regras de escrita são muitas vezes negligenciadas, resultando em palavras únicas sendo escritas de forma desarticulada e várias palavras escritas sem espaços em branco entre elas. Este artigo aborda os problemas de segmentação de palavras e reconhecimento de zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) em persa, que abordamos em conjunto como um problema de rotulagem de sequências. Alcançamos uma pontuação F1 média macro de 92,40% em um corpus cuidadosamente coletado de 500 frases com alto nível de dificuldade.', 'es': 'Las palabras están correctamente segmentadas en el sistema de escritura persa; en la práctica, sin embargo, estas reglas de escritura a menudo se descuidan, lo que da como resultado que se escriban palabras individuales de forma disjunta y que se escriban varias palabras sin espacios en blanco entre ellas. Este artículo aborda los problemas de la segmentación de palabras y el reconocimiento de no unión de ancho cero (ZWNJ) en persa, que abordamos conjuntamente como un problema de etiquetado de secuencias. Logramos una puntuación F1 macropromediada del 92,40% en un corpus cuidadosamente recopilado de 500 frases con un alto nivel de dificultad.', 'ja': '単語はペルシア語の書き込みシステムで適切にセグメンテーションされていますが、実際にはこれらの書き込みルールはしばしば無視され、結果として単一の単語が不連続に書き込まれ、それらの間に空白がない複数の単語が書き込まれます。本論文では、ペルシャ語における単語セグメンテーションとゼロ幅の非結合子（ ZWNJ ）認識の問題について述べ、これをシーケンスラベリング問題として共同でアプローチしている。私たちは、高度な難易度を持つ500文の慎重に収集されたコーパスで、92.40 ％のマクロ平均F 1スコアを達成しました。', 'zh': '单词于波斯语书系统中分割。 然在实践中之法常被忽视,单词脱节而书之,多单词无空格。 本文讨论波斯语中分词与零宽度非细木工(ZWNJ)知识,以为序记。 精采之500句语料库中得92.40%者宏观均F1分数,难以高也。', 'hi': 'शब्दों को फ़ारसी लेखन प्रणाली में ठीक से विभाजित किया गया है; व्यवहार में, हालांकि, इन लेखन नियमों को अक्सर उपेक्षित किया जाता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप एकल शब्दों को असंबद्ध रूप से लिखा जाता है और उनके बीच किसी भी सफेद स्थान के बिना कई शब्द लिखे जाते हैं। यह पेपर फारसी में शब्द विभाजन और शून्य-चौड़ाई गैर-जॉइनर (ZWNJ) मान्यता की समस्याओं को संबोधित करता है, जिसे हम एक अनुक्रम लेबलिंग समस्या के रूप में संयुक्त रूप से दृष्टिकोण करते हैं। हमने उच्च स्तर की कठिनाई के साथ 500 वाक्यों के सावधानीपूर्वक एकत्र किए गए कॉर्पस पर 92.40% का एक मैक्रो-औसत F1-स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'Слова правильно сегментированы в персидской письменности; на практике, однако, эти правила написания часто игнорируются, в результате чего отдельные слова пишутся разрозненно и несколько слов пишутся без каких-либо пробелов между ними. В данной работе рассматриваются проблемы сегментации слов и распознавания не-джойнтеров нулевой ширины (ZWNJ) на персидском языке, которые мы рассматриваем совместно как проблему маркировки последовательностей. Мы достигли макросреднего показателя F1 92,40% на тщательно собранном корпусе из 500 предложений с высоким уровнем сложности.', 'ga': 'Tá focail deighilte i gceart sa chóras scríbhneoireachta Peirsis; go praiticiúil, áfach, is minic a dhéantar faillí ar na rialacha scríbhneoireachta seo, rud a fhágann go scríobhtar focail shingil go neamhcheangailte agus go scríobhtar focail iolracha gan spásanna bána eatarthu. Tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar na fadhbanna a bhaineann le deighilt focal agus le haitheantas gan leithead nialasach (ZWNJ) sa Peirsis, a dtugaimid aghaidh uirthi i gcomhpháirt mar fhadhb lipéadaithe seichimh. Bhaineamar amach macra meánscór F1 de 92.40% ar chorpas de 500 abairt a bailíodh go cúramach agus ardleibhéal deacrachta ann.', 'ka': 'სიტყვები პერსიანი წერილის სისტემაში სეგმენტირებულია; მაგრამ ამ წერილის წესების შეცდომა, რომლებიც ერთი სიტყვებით დაწერა, და მრავალი სიტყვებით დაწერა, რომლებიც მათ შავი სიტყვებით არსებობს. ეს დომენტი აღწერს სიტყვის სექმენტირების პრობლემების და ნულ-სიტყვის არ-ერთად (ZWNJ) პერსიანში აღწერის პრობლემების პრობლემების, რომელიც ჩვენ ერთად მივიღ ჩვენ მივიღეთ მაკრო განსაზღვრებული F1-სოფლიოს 92,40%-ის მნიშვნელოვანი 500 წესების კორპუსზე, რომელიც უფრო დიდი განსაზღვრებულია.', 'el': 'Οι λέξεις είναι σωστά τμηματοποιημένες στο περσικό σύστημα γραφής. Στην πράξη, ωστόσο, αυτοί οι κανόνες γραφής συχνά παραμελούνται, με αποτέλεσμα οι μεμονωμένες λέξεις να γράφονται χωριστά και πολλές λέξεις να γράφονται χωρίς κενά μεταξύ τους. Η παρούσα εργασία ασχολείται με τα προβλήματα της κατάτμησης λέξεων και της αναγνώρισης μηδενικού πλάτους μη-συνδέσμων στα περσικά, τα οποία προσεγγίζουμε από κοινού ως πρόβλημα σήμανσης ακολουθίας. Επιτύχαμε μια μακρομέση βαθμολογία 92,40% σε ένα προσεκτικά συγκεντρωμένο σώμα 500 προτάσεων με υψηλό επίπεδο δυσκολίας.', 'hu': 'A szavak megfelelően szegmentálódnak a perzsa írási rendszerben; A gyakorlatban azonban ezeket az írási szabályokat gyakran figyelmen kívül hagyják, ami azt eredményezi, hogy egyetlen szót egymástól függetlenül írnak, és több szót írnak, fehér szóköz nélkül. Jelen tanulmány a perzsa nyelvű szószegmentáció és a zéró szélességű non-joiner (ZWNJ) felismerés problémáival foglalkozik, amelyet közösen szekvencia címkézési problémaként közelítünk meg. Egy gondosan összegyűjtött 500 mondatból álló, nagy nehézségű, gondosan összegyűjtött, 92,40%-os F1-pontszámot értünk el.', 'it': 'Le parole sono correttamente segmentate nel sistema di scrittura persiano; In pratica, tuttavia, queste regole di scrittura sono spesso trascurate, con conseguente scrittura di singole parole in modo disconnesso e scrittura di più parole senza spazi bianchi tra di esse. Questo articolo affronta i problemi della segmentazione delle parole e del riconoscimento zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) in persiano, che affrontiamo congiuntamente come un problema di etichettatura di sequenza. Abbiamo ottenuto un punteggio F1 macro-medio del 92,40% su un corpus accuratamente raccolto di 500 frasi con un alto livello di difficoltà.', 'kk': 'Сөздер Парс жазу жүйесінде дұрыс сегменттіледі; amount in units (real) Бұл жазу ережелері көбінде қалмайды, сондықтан бір сөздерді біріктіріп, бірнеше ақ бос орындар жоқ жазылмайды. Бұл қағаз сөздердің сегментациясының мәселелерін және біріктірілмегендердің нөл- ені (ZWNJ) қатынау мәселелерін Персияндағы белгілейді. Бұл қағаз біріктіріп келеді. Бұл Біз макро-орташа F1 деңгейінде 92,40% деңгейінде 500 сөздердің корпусын жеткіздік.', 'lt': 'Words are properly segmented in the Persian writing system;  tačiau praktikoje šios rašymo taisyklės dažnai yra pamirštamos, todėl vieninteliai žodžiai rašomi atskirai ir keli žodžiai rašomi be jokių baltų tarpų tarp jų. Šiame dokumente sprendžiamos žodžių segmentacijos ir nulinio plotio neprijungimo (ZWNJ) pripažinimo persų kalba problemos, kurias bendrai vertiname kaip sekos ženklinimo problem ą. Mes pasiekėme makroekonominio vidurkio F1 rezultatą 92,40 proc. kruopščiai surinktame 500 sakinių korpuse su dideliu sunkumu.', 'mk': 'Зборовите се соодветно сегментирани во персискиот пишувачки систем; во практиката, сепак, овие правила за пишување честопати се заборавени, што резултира со едноставни зборови кои се пишуваат незаеднички и повеќе зборови кои се пишуваат без никакви бели простори меѓу нив. Овој документ ги решава проблемите со сегментацијата на зборовите и признавањето на нула ширина на непријателите (ZWNJ) на персиски јазик, на кој заедно се приближуваме како проблем со етикетирање на секвенца. Ние постигнавме макро-просечен резултат на F1 од 92,40 отсто на внимателно собраниот корпус од 500 реченици со високо ниво на тешкотии.', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസിയന്\u200d എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ശരിക്കും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു; എന്നാലും ഈ എഴുതുന്ന നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ഉപേക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചു വെള ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും പാര്\u200dസിയനിലെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വീതിയില്ലാത്ത സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനെയും പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറി നമ്മള്\u200d 92.40 ശതമാനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു മാക്രോ ശരാധികം F1 സ്കോര്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. 500 വാക്കുകളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് കൂട്ടിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. അതിന', 'mt': 'Il-kliem huma segmentati kif suppost fis-sistema tal-kitba Persjana; fil-prattika, madankollu, dawn ir-regoli tal-kitba spiss jiġu injorati, li jirriżultaw fi kliem wieħed miktub b’mod mhux konġunt u kliem multiplu miktub mingħajr spazji bojod bejniethom. Dan id-dokument jindirizza l-problemi tas-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem u r-rikonoxximent ta’ żero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) fil-Persjan, li a ħna nindirizzaw b’mod konġunt bħala problem a tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza. Kisbu punteġġ F1 makro-medju ta’ 92.40% fuq korpus miġbur bir-reqqa ta’ 500 sentenza b’livell għoli ta’ diffikultà.', 'ms': 'Kata disegmen dengan betul dalam sistem tulisan Persia; dalam praktek, bagaimanapun, peraturan penulisan ini sering dilupakan, menghasilkan perkataan tunggal ditulis secara tidak bersatu dan perkataan berbilang ditulis tanpa sebarang ruang putih di antara mereka. This paper addresses the problems of word segmentation and zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) recognition in Persian, which we approach jointly as a sequence labeling problem.  Kami mencapai nilai F1 makro-rata-rata 92.40% pada korpus yang dikumpulkan dengan hati-hati 500 kalimat dengan tahap yang tinggi kesulitan.', 'mn': 'Энэ үг Персийн бичил системд зөв хэсэгтэй бөгөөд Гэхдээ эдгээр бичих хууль нь ихэвчлэн үгүйсгэгддэг. Тэдний хоорондоо цагаан орон зай байхгүй олон үг бичигддэг. Энэ цаас үг загварын асуудлуудыг харуулж байна. ЗWNJ-ээс хамтдаггүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид хэцүү хэмжээний өндөр хэмжээтэй 500 өгүүлбэртэй макро дундаж F1 хувьд 92.40% байдаг.', 'no': 'Ord er rett segmentert i persisk skrivesystemet. I praksis vert imidlertid desse skrivingsreglane ofte neglecterte, som fører til at enkelte ord blir skriven fråkopla og fleire ord skriven utan kvit mellomrom mellom dei. Denne papiret adresserer problemene på ordsegmentasjonen og ikkje-mellom null-breidd (ZWNJ) gjenkjenning i persisk, som vi nærmer saman som eit problem med merkelapp. Vi har oppnådd eit makro gjennomsnittlig F1- poeng med 92,40% på ein forsiktig samla korpus med 500 setningar med høg nivå av vanskeligheter.', 'pl': 'Słowa są odpowiednio segmentowane w perskim systemie pisma; W praktyce jednak te zasady pisania są często zaniedbane, co powoduje, że pojedyncze słowa są pisane niezłącznie i wiele słów pisane bez żadnych białych spacji między nimi. Niniejszy artykuł porusza problemy segmentacji słów i rozpoznawania bezłączników o zerowej szerokości (ZWNJ) w języku perskim, które podejmujemy wspólnie jako problem etykietowania sekwencji. Na starannie zebranym korpusie 500 zdań o wysokim poziomie trudności osiągnęliśmy makro-średni wynik F1 92,40% .', 'sr': 'Riječi su pravilno segmentirane u persijskom pisaćem sistemu; U praksi, međutim, ova pravila pisanja često se zanemaruju, što je rezultiralo da se jednostavna reč napiše nesposobno i više reči napisanih bez belih prostora između njih. Ovaj papir rješava probleme segmentacije riječi i priznanja bez pridruživanja nule široke (ZWNJ) na persijskom, koje zajedno približavamo kao problem označavanja sekvence. Postigli smo makro-srednji rezultat F1 od 92,40% na pažljivo skupljenom korpusu od 500 rečenica sa visokom nivou teškoće.', 'si': 'පර්සියාන් ලියණ පද්ධතියේ වචන සිද්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා; ඒත්, ඒ වගේම, මේ ලියුම් නීතිය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් අවස්ථාවක් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම එකම වචනයක් ලියලා තියෙන්නේ නැති ව මේ පැත්තේ පර්සියානු වචනය සහ ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ශූන්ය-ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නොය අපිට මැක්රෝ අවුරුද්ධ F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 92.40% තියෙනවා වචනයක් පරීක්ෂාවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබුණා වචනයක් 500ක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Erayada waxaa si hagaagsan loogu qeybiyaa nidaamka qorashada Persian; Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaynuunnadan waa la illoobaa, sababtoo ah waxaa loo qoray erayo keliya oo si qalloocan ah iyo erayo kala duduwan oo aan lahayn meelo cad dhexdooda lagu qoro. Warqaddan waxay ku qoran yihiin dhibaatooyin ku saabsan qeybinta hadalka iyo aqoonsashada qoraalka aan la wadan (ZWNJ), taas oo aynu si wadajir ah ugu soo dhowaanno dhibaato la xiriiro. We achieved a macro-averaged F1-score of 92.40% on a carefully collected corpus of 500 sentences with a high level of difficulty.', 'sv': 'Ord är korrekt segmenterade i det persiska skrivsystemet; I praktiken försummas dock dessa skrivregler ofta, vilket resulterar i att enstaka ord skrivs ojämnt och flera ord skrivs utan några vita mellanslag mellan dem. Denna uppsats behandlar problemen med ordsegmentering och zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) erkännande på persiska, vilket vi gemensamt behandlar som ett sekvensmärkningsproblem. Vi uppnådde en makro-genomsnittlig F1-poäng på 92,40% på en noggrant insamlad korpus på 500 meningar med hög svårighetsgrad.', 'ta': 'பார்சியன் எழுதும் அமைப்பில் வார்த்தைகள் சரியாக பிரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன; ஆனால், இந்த எழுத்து விதிகள் பெரும்பாலும் புறக்கணிக்கப்படுகிறது, அதனால் ஒரே வார்த்தைகள் வெள்ளை இடைவெள்ளை இல்லாமல் எழுதப்பட்ட இந்த தாள் பார்சியனில் உள்ள வார்த்தை பிரிவின் பிரிவின் பிரிவின் பிரிவின் பிரிவுகளின் பிரச்சனைகளை குறிக்கும் மற்றும் பூச்சிய நாங்கள் 92.40% மேக்ரோ சராசரி F1 புள்ளியை அடைந்தோம். கவனமாக சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட 500 வாக்கியங்களின் குறியீடுகள் அதிக கடினமான நிலையில் உள்', 'ur': 'کلمات پارسی لکھنے سیسٹم میں ٹھیک طرح جدائی ہوئی ہیں۔ لیکن یہ لکھنے کے قانون اکثر غفلت میں پڑے جاتے ہیں اور ان کے درمیان کسی سفید جگہ کے بغیر لکھے ہوئے بہت سے کلمات لکھے جاتے ہیں۔ یہ کاغذ لکھنے کے مشکلات اور صفر-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) کی پہچانتی کے مشکلات پر مشکل کرتا ہے، جسے ہم ایک طریقہ لکھنے کے مشکل کے طور پر ملتے ہیں. ہم نے ایک مکرو متوسط F1-اسکور 92.40% کی پاداش پہنچ گئی تھی جو 500 جماعتوں میں سے زیادہ مشکل ہے۔', 'ro': 'Cuvintele sunt segmentate corespunzător în sistemul de scriere persan; Cu toate acestea, în practică, aceste reguli de scriere sunt adesea neglijate, rezultând ca un singur cuvânt să fie scris fără legături și mai multe cuvinte să fie scrise fără spații albe între ele. Această lucrare abordează problemele segmentării cuvintelor și recunoașterii ZWNJ în limba persană, pe care le abordăm împreună ca o problemă de etichetare a secvențelor. Am obținut un scor F1 macro-mediu de 92,40% pe un corpus atent colectat de 500 de propoziții cu un nivel ridicat de dificultate.', 'uz': "so'zlar Persian yozuvchi tizimda juda o'xshash bo'lgan; Va shunday qilib, bu yozish qoidalari ko'p o'z yozib qolmadi. Bu so'zlarning orasidagi oq boʻsh joy yo'q yozib qo'yilgan bir nechta so'zlar yozib keladi. Bu qogʻoz Persizdagi soʻzni ajratishning muammolari va hech narsa qoʻshish (ZWNJ) ta'minlovchisi (ZWNJ) muammolarini boshqaradi. Biz bir necha tartibu muammolar deb o'ylaymiz. Biz 92.40% makro asosiy bir makro-asosiy F1 scori topdik. Biz juda katta qiyin darajada qiyin bo'lgan 500 so'zlar qo'shilgan qo'shga qaray keldik.", 'vi': 'Từ được tích trữ đúng cách trong hệ thống chữ viết của Ba Tư. Trong thực tế, các quy tắc viết lách này thường bị bỏ qua, dẫn đến việc đơn từ được viết tách ra và viết nhiều chữ không có khoảng trắng giữa hai chữ. Tờ giấy này đề cập đến vấn đề phân chia từ và không có chiều rộng không khớp (ZWNJ) trong tiếng Ba Tư, mà chúng ta cùng nhau coi như một vấn đề nhãn hiệu dãy. Chúng ta đã đạt được một số chiết khấu F1 số 92', 'nl': 'Woorden zijn goed gesegmenteerd in het Perzische schrijfsysteem; In de praktijk worden deze schrijfregels echter vaak verwaarloosd, wat resulteert in losse woorden en meerdere woorden zonder witte spaties. Dit artikel behandelt de problemen van woordsegmentatie en zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) herkenning in het Perzisch, die we gezamenlijk benaderen als een sequentie labeling probleem. We bereikten een macro-gemiddelde F1-score van 92,40% op een zorgvuldig verzameld corpus van 500 zinnen met een hoge moeilijkheidsgraad.', 'da': 'Ord er korrekt segmenteret i det persiske skriftsystem; I praksis er disse skriveregler imidlertid ofte forsømt, hvilket resulterer i, at enkelte ord bliver skrevet adskilt og flere ord skrevet uden hvide mellemrum mellem dem. Denne artikel omhandler problemerne med ordsegmentering og nul-bredde non-joiner (ZWNJ) anerkendelse på persisk, som vi sammen nærmer os som et sekvensmærkningsproblem. Vi opnåede et makro-gennemsnit F1-score på 92,40% på et omhyggeligt indsamlet korpus på 500 sætninger med et højt sværhedsniveau.', 'bg': 'Думите са правилно сегментирани в персийската писмена система; на практика обаче тези правила за писане често се пренебрегват, което води до това, че единични думи се пишат неразсъединено и множество думи, написани без никакви бели интервали между тях. Настоящата статия разглежда проблемите на сегментацията на думите и разпознаването на несъединителя с нулева ширина на персийски език, към които подхождаме съвместно като проблем за етикетиране на последователност. Постигнахме макросреднен резултат от 92,40% при внимателно събран корпус от 500 изречения с висока степен на трудност.', 'hr': 'Riječi su propisno segmentirane u persijskom pisaćem sustavu; U praksi, međutim, ove pravila pisanja često se zanemaruju, što je rezultiralo da se jedna riječ napiše nesposobno i više riječi pisane bez bijelih prostora između njih. Ovaj papir rješava probleme segmentacije riječi i priznanja bez pridruživanja nule široke (ZWNJ) na persijskom, koji zajedno približavamo kao problem označavanja sekvence. Došli smo do makro-srednje F1 rezultate od 92,40% na pažljivo skupljenom korpusu od 500 rečenica sa visokom razinom teškoća.', 'de': 'Wörter sind im persischen Schriftsystem richtig segmentiert; In der Praxis werden diese Schreibregeln jedoch oft vernachlässigt, was dazu führt, dass einzelne Wörter getrennt und mehrere Wörter ohne Leerzeichen geschrieben werden. Diese Arbeit befasst sich mit den Problemen der Wortsegmentierung und der Zero-Width Non-Joiner (ZWNJ) Erkennung im Persischen, die wir gemeinsam als Sequenz-Labeling Problem angehen. Auf einem sorgfältig zusammengestellten Korpus von 500 Sätzen mit hohem Schwierigkeitsgrad erreichten wir eine makro-gemittelte F1-Punktzahl von 92,40% von 92.', 'fa': 'کلمات در سیستم نوشتن فارسی به درستی جدا شده\u200cاند. با این حال، این قوانین نوشتن اغلب نادیده می\u200cشوند، و به نتیجه یک کلمه نامزدی و کلمه\u200cهای متعدد نوشته می\u200cشوند که بدون هیچ فضای سفید بین آنها نوشته می\u200cشود. این کاغذ مشکلات جدا کردن کلمات و شناسایی غیر جابجای صفر (ZWNJ) را در فارسی دریافت می\u200cکند، که ما با هم به عنوان یک مشکل برچسب برچسب نزدیک می\u200cشویم. ما یک امتیاز F1 با میکرو متوسط از 92.40 درصد را در یک جسد با دقت از ۵۰۰ جمله با سطح مشکل بالا به دست آوردیم.', 'sw': 'maneno yanagawanywa vizuri katika mfumo wa kuandika kwa Kipersia; katika mazingira, hata hivyo, sheria hizi za kuandika mara nyingi hazifutiliwa, na zinasababisha maneno moja ya kuandikwa kwa pamoja na maneno mengi yaliyoandikwa bila nafasi nyeupe kati yao. Gazeti hili linazungumzia matatizo ya kutengwa kwa neno na kutambuliwa kwa kina sifa (ZWNJ) nchini Persia, ambalo tunakaribia pamoja kama tatizo la kutambua kwa mfululizo. Tumefanikiwa kiwango cha wastani wa F1 cha asilimia 92.40 kwa makini kilichokusanywa vifungu 500 kwa kiwango kikubwa cha matatizo.', 'ko': '단어가 페르시아어 쓰기 시스템에서 정확하게 분할된다.그러나 실천에서 이러한 쓰기 규칙은 무시되어 한 단어가 끊어지고 여러 단어 사이에 빈칸이 없다.본고는 페르시아어의 분사와 제로 너비 비연결어(ZWNJ) 식별 문제를 토론하였으며, 이를 서열 표기 문제로 간주하였다.자세히 수집한 500개의 문장의 어료 라이브러리에서 우리는 92.40%의 거시적 평균 F1 점수를 얻었기 때문에 난이도가 매우 높다.', 'tr': 'Sözler Parsça ýazma sisteminde dogry böldi; Bu ýazma kurallary köplenç boýun gaýşartýar we olaryň arasynda beyaz seleňsiz ýazylýan birnäçe sözler bilen boýun gaýşartýar. Bu kagyz sözleriň segmentasiýanyň meselelerini we çykyşsyz ýok hasaplanýan (ZWNJ) Persiýanyň tanyşynyň meselelerini çözýär. Biz bu hasaplanyň bir sany etiket meselesi bolup ýarylýarys. Biz 500 sözleriň ýokary kynçylyk derejesi bilen makro ortalamasynda 92,40% düýpdir.', 'af': "Woorde is korrek in die Persiese skryfstelsel segmenteer; word Hierdie skryfreëls word egter dikwels verwerp, wat resultaat in enkele woorde geskryf word ongelukkig en veelvuldige woorde geskryf sonder enige wit spasies tussen hulle. Hierdie papier adreseer die probleme van woord segmentasie en zero-wydte non-joiner (ZWNJ) herkening in Persies, wat ons saamstig aangaan as 'n sekvensie etiket probleme. Ons het 'n makro-gemiddelde F1-telling van 92,40% op 'n versigtig versamel korpus van 500 setnings met 'n hoë vlak van moeilikheid bereik.", 'am': 'ቃላት በፋርስ ጽሑፍ ስርዓት የተለያዩ ናቸው፤ ነገር ግን ይህ ጽሕፈት ሕግ ብዙ ጊዜ ተሳሳቱ፤ ስለዚህም በመካከላቸው ነጭ ስፍራ ሳይኖር አንዲት ቃላት በተለያዩ ተጽፎአል፡፡ ይህም ገጽ የቃላትን ግንኙነት እና የ0-ስፋት-ስፋት በፋርስዊ (ZWNJ) ማስታወቂያውን ያስተካክላል፡፡ የ92.40 በመቶ የሚቆጠሩ የ500ኛ ክፍለ ክፍለ ክፍል በቁጥጥር ከፍ ያለበት የF1 ነጥብ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'sq': 'Fjalët janë segmentuar siç duhet në sistemin persian të shkrimit; in practice, however, these writing rules are often neglected, resulting in single words being written disjointedly and multiple words written without any white spaces between them.  Ky dokument trajton problemet e segmentimit të fjalëve dhe njohjes zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) në persian, të cilat ne i afrohemi së bashku si një problem të etiketave të sekuencës. Ne arritëm një makro-mesatare rezultat F1 prej 92.40% në një korpus të mbledhur me kujdes me 500 dënime me një nivel të lartë vështirësi.', 'hy': 'Բառերը ճիշտ են բաժանված պարսիական գրողական համակարգում, իրականում, այնուամենայնիվ, այս գրողական կանոնները հաճախ անտեսվում են, ինչը հանգեցնում է, որ միակ բառերը գրվում են առանձնահատուկ և բազմաթիվ բառեր, որոնք գրվում են առանց սպիտակ տարածքների միջև: Այս աշխատանքը լուծում է բառերի սեգմետրացիայի և զրոյա լայնությամբ ոչ միացող (ZW NJի) ճանաչության խնդիրները պարսիներեն, որոնց մենք միասին մոտենում ենք որպես հաջորդականության պիտակ տալու խնդիր: Մենք հասանք 92.40 տոկոսի մակարդակի միջին F1 գնահատականի 500 նախադասություններով, որոնք բարձր դժվարության մակարդակում էին:', 'bn': 'পার্সিয়ান লেখা ব্যবস্থায় শব্দের ভাগাভাগি করা হয়েছে; তবে এই লেখা নিয়ম প্রায়শই অবহেলা করা হয়, যার ফলে তাদের মধ্যে কোন সাদা জায়গা ছাড়া এক শব্দ লেখা হয়। এই পত্রিকাটি পার্সিয়ানে শব্দ বিভাগের সমস্যা এবং শূন্য-প্রস্থ অযোগ্যানের (ZWNJ) স্বীকৃতির বিষয়গুলোর বিষয়গুলোর বিষয়গুলোর কথা বলে আমরা ৯২.', 'id': 'Kata-kata disegmen dengan benar dalam sistem tulisan Persia; dalam praktek, bagaimanapun, peraturan tulisan ini sering diabaikan, yang menyebabkan kata-kata tunggal ditulis secara tidak sama dan kata-kata berbilang ditulis tanpa ruang putih antara mereka. Kertas ini mengatasi masalah segmentasi kata dan pengenalan non-joiner lebar nol (ZWNJ) dalam bahasa Persia, yang kita mendekati bersama sebagai masalah label urutan. Kami mencapai nilai F1 makro-rata-rata 92,40% pada corpus yang diambil dengan hati-hati 500 kalimat dengan tingkat tinggi kesulitan.', 'bs': 'Riječi su propisno segmentirane u persijskom pisaćem sustavu; U praksi, međutim, ovi pravila pisanja često se zanemaruju, što je rezultiralo da se jedna riječ napiše nesavršeno i više riječi napisanih bez bijelih prostora između njih. Ovaj papir rješava probleme segmentacije riječi i priznanja bez pridruživanja nule široke (ZWNJ) na persijskom, koji zajedno približavamo kao problem označavanja sekvence. Došli smo do makro-srednje F1 rezultate od 92,40% na pažljivo skupljenom korpusu od 500 rečenica sa visokom nivou teškoće.', 'az': 'Sözlər persiyalı yazma sistemində düzgün bölünmüşdür; Lakin bu yazma qaydaları çox zaman unudular, buna görə də onların arasında ağ boşluqlar olmadan təkcə bir söz yazılır və çoxlu söz yazılır. Bu kağıt sözlərin segmentasiyasının və sıfır genişliyi olmayan (ZWNJ) təşkil etməsinin problemlərini təsdiqləyir. Biz birlikdə seçmə etiketi problemi olaraq yaxınlaşırıq. Biz makro-ortalamalı F1 dərəcəsini 92,40%-dən çox çətinliklə birlikdə 500 cümlənin korpusu qəbul etdik.', 'ca': "Words are properly segmented in the Persian writing system;  en la pràctica, no obstant això, aquestes regles d'escriptura sovint són ignorades, resultant en que les paraules són escrites de forma desjuntada i múltiples paraules escrites sense espais blancs entre elles. Aquest article aborda els problemes de la segmentació de paraules i el reconeixement de no-unidor de largura zero (ZWNJ) en persa, que ens abordem conjuntament com un problem a d'etiquetar seqüències. Vam aconseguir una puntuació F1 macromitjana del 92,40% en un cos recollit atentament de 500 frases amb un alt nivell de dificultat.", 'cs': 'Slova jsou správně segmentována v perském psacím systému; V praxi jsou však tato pravidla psaní často opomíjena, což vede k tomu, že jednotlivá slova jsou psána nespojeně a více slov psána bez bílých mezer mezi nimi. Tento příspěvek se zabývá problematikou segmentace slov a rozpoznávání nulové šířky (ZWNJ) v perském jazyce, k nimž přistupujeme společně jako k problému značení sekvence. Na pečlivě shromážděném korpusu 500 vět s vysokou obtížností jsme dosáhli makro-průměrného F1 skóre 92,40% F1.', 'et': 'Pärsia kirjutamissüsteemis on sõnad korralikult segmenteeritud; Praktikas jäetakse need kirjutamisreeglid sageli tähelepanuta, mille tulemusel kirjutatakse üksikud sõnad lahutamatult ja mitu sõna kirjutatakse ilma tühimärkideta nende vahel. Käesolevas töös käsitletakse sõna segmenteerimise ja null-laiuse mitteühendaja (ZWNJ) tuvastamise probleeme pärsia keeles, millele me läheneme ühiselt kui järjestuse märgistamise probleemile. Me saavutasime makrokeskmise F1-skoori 92,40% hoolikalt kogutud 500 kõrge raskusastmega lause korpusel.', 'fi': 'Sanat ovat oikein segmentoituja persian kirjoitusjärjestelmässä; Käytännössä näitä kirjoitussääntöjä kuitenkin usein laiminlyödään, jolloin yksittäiset sanat kirjoitetaan hajanaisesti ja useita sanoja kirjoitetaan ilman valkoisia välilyöntejä. Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään sanasegmentoinnin ja nollaleveyden non-joiner (ZWNJ) tunnistamisen ongelmia persian kielellä, joita lähestymme yhdessä sekvenssimerkinnän ongelmana. Makrokeskiarvo F1-pisteeksi saatiin 92,40% huolellisesti kerätyllä 500 lauseen korpusella, jonka vaikeusaste on korkea.', 'jv': 'gambar Nanging, kuwi praksi punika dipunanggé kuwi, lan akeh-awak dhéwé kuwi kaleh luwih apik, lan basa sing bisa pasang awak dhéwé kuwi bisa pasang apik. Perintah iki dadi nggawe perusahaan kelalakno karo cah-tangi luwih-luwih (NWNNNK) nggawe Peris, dadi kita nguasakno Start Awak dhéwé wis nambah macro-waenganggo dolanan punika dipunangé F1 iki luwih kaya mau, kawula macro-waenganggo dolanan ping limangatus soko dolanan sing apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'מילים מוחלקות כראוי במערכת הכתיבה הפרסית; בכל אופן, בפרקטיקה, חוקי הכתיבה אלה לעתים קרובות נזנחים, מה שהוביל במילים אחת נכתבות באופן בלתי משותף ומילים רבות נכתבות ללא חללים לבנים ביניהם. העבודה הזאת מתייחסת לבעיות של סגמנציה מילים ובזיהוי לא מחובר לאפס (ZWNJ) בפרסית, שאנחנו מתייחסים אליה יחד כבעיה של תווית רצף. השגנו נקודת F1 בממוצע של 92.40% על גוף אוסף בזהירות של 500 משפטים עם רמה גבוהה של קשה.', 'sk': 'Besede so ustrezno segmentirane v perzijskem pisalnem sistemu; V praksi pa so ta pravila pisanja pogosto zanemarjena, zaradi česar so posamezne besede napisane ločeno in več besed napisanih brez belih presledkov med njimi. Prispevek obravnava probleme segmentacije besed in prepoznavanja ničelne širine nezdruževalcev (ZWNJ) v perzijskem jeziku, ki jih skupaj obravnavamo kot problem označevanja zaporedja. Na skrbno zbranem korpusu 500 stavkov z visoko težavnostjo smo dosegli makropovprečno oceno F1 92,40%.', 'ha': "An raba kalmõmi cikin tsarin rubutun Persian mai daidaita; A lokacin da za'a ƙyale waɗannan rubũtun ayuka ko da yawa, ko kuma za'a saba'an nan a rubũta magana guda da bakwai da wasu kalmõmi da aka rubũta, bã da wani filayer da suka yi fari a tsakaninsu. Wannan takardar ta tambayar masu zartar da jinsi-segment da sifiri-faɗi (ZWNj) sunna-shirin ba-wadangan Persian, da Muke kusantar da su haɗi kamar wata matabbata mai lissafa. Mun sami wani matsayin F1 mai tsakanin 92.40%, a kan wata kashi mai taƙaita matsayin 300 da wata daraja mai girma.", 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའང་ཚིག་རྒྱ་རི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡོད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། བྱ་ཚིག་གི་འགྲོ་སྲོལ་འདི་དག་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་བར་སྟོང་དཀར This paper addresses the problems of the word segmentation and zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ) recognition in Persian, which we approach jointly as a sequence labeling problem. ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅན་གྱིས་མིག་སྟངས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅན་གྱི་ཚོགས་པ་༢༠༠་ཙམ་ཡིན་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུར་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Syllable-based Neural Thai Word Segmentation', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات التايلاندية العصبية القائمة على المقاطع', 'fr': 'Segmentation neuronale de mots thaïlandais basée sur des syllabes', 'pt': 'Segmentação de palavras em tailandês neural baseada em sílabas', 'es': 'Segmentación de palabras tailandesas neuronales basada en sílabas', 'ja': '音節ベースの神経タイ語セグメンテーション', 'zh': '基于音节之神经泰语分词', 'hi': 'शब्दांश आधारित तंत्रिका थाई वर्ड विभाजन', 'ru': 'Сегментация нейронных тайских слов на основе слогов', 'ga': 'Deighleog Focal Néarúil Téalainnis atá bunaithe ar shiolla', 'ka': 'სილებლიური ნეირალური ტაილის სიტყვების სეგმენტია', 'hu': 'Tananyagalapú Neural Thai szószegmentáció', 'el': 'Μορφοποίηση Νευρικής Ταϊλανδέζικης λέξης με βάση συλλαβές', 'it': 'Segmentazione vocale tailandese neurale basata su sillaba', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Perkataan Thai Neural Berasas Syllable', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem Newrali Tajlandiż ibbażata fuq is-sillaba', 'ml': 'സിലാലിബിള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നെയുറല്\u200d തായി വാക്ക് വേര്\u200dഡിന്റെ വിഭാഗം', 'mn': 'Тайлбарт суурилсан мэдрэлийн Тайланд үг хэвлэлт', 'no': 'Syllabelbasert neuralt Thai- ordsegmentasjon', 'pl': 'Segmentacja neuronowego tajskiego słowa opartego na sylaborach', 'ro': 'Segmentarea vocabulară thailandeză neurală bazată pe programabile', 'sr': 'Similalno osnovana na Neuralnoj Tajlandskoj segmentaciji reči', 'si': 'Syllable- ආධාරිත න්\u200dයූරාල් තායින් වචන සෙග්මෙන්ටමනය', 'kk': 'Сызық негіздеген нейралы тайландық сөз сегментациясы', 'so': 'Isku qeybinta hadalka thailada ee asalka ah', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Kursplan baserad Neural Thai ordsegmentering', 'ur': 'سیلابل بنیاد نائرل ٹائی ویر سپٹمنٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Сегментация на неврални думи в тайландски език', 'nl': 'Op syllable gebaseerde neurale Thaise woordsegmentatie', 'hr': 'Syllable-based Neural Thai Word Segmentation', 'da': 'Sprogbaseret neural thailandsk ordsegmentering', 'id': 'Segmentasi Kata Neural Thai Berdasarkan Silabel', 'de': 'Sylble-basierte neuronale thailändische Wortsegmentierung', 'ko': '음절에 기초한 신경태국어 분사', 'fa': 'جداگاهی کلمه\u200cهای عصبی بر اساس عبارت', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i Fjalëve Neurale Tailandeze me bazë në Sillabe', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa Neural Neural Word', 'af': 'Syllable- gebaseerde Neural Thai Woord Segmentasie', 'tr': 'Sözler tabanly näyral Taýça Kelimi Segmentation', 'am': 'tab-style', 'hy': 'Սիլլաբ հիմնված նյարդային թայլանդական բառերի սեգրմացիան', 'bn': 'ভিত্তিক নিউরাল থাই শব্দ বিভাগ', 'az': 'Süleyb-tabanlı Nöral Tayland Kelimi Segmentasyonu', 'bs': 'Syllable-based Neural Thai Word Segmentation', 'et': 'Sõnalüüsipõhine neuraalne Tai sõna segmentatsioon', 'ca': 'Syllable-based Neural Thai Word Segmentation', 'cs': 'Segmentace neuronálních thajských slov založená na srážkách', 'fi': 'Taimaan kielen sanasegmentointi', 'jv': 'Cyrillic, Ukrainian', 'he': 'Syllable-based Neural Thai Word Segmentation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Seznami temelječe nevralna tajska segmentacija besed', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་ཚིགས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་དབུས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Word segmentation is a challenging pre-processing step for Thai Natural Language Processing due to the lack of explicit word boundaries. The previous systems rely on powerful neural network architecture alone and ignore linguistic substructures of Thai words. We utilize the linguistic observation that Thai strings can be segmented into syllables, which should narrow down the search space for the word boundaries and provide helpful features. Here, we propose a neural Thai Word Segmenter that uses syllable embeddings to capture linguistic constraints and uses dilated CNN filters to capture the environment of each character. Within this goal, we develop the first ML-based Thai orthographical syllable segmenter, which yields syllable embeddings to be used as features by the word segmenter. Our word segmentation system outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system in both speed and accuracy on both in-domain and out-domain datasets.', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات هي خطوة معالجة مسبقة صعبة لمعالجة اللغة التايلاندية الطبيعية بسبب عدم وجود حدود واضحة للكلمات. تعتمد الأنظمة السابقة على بنية الشبكة العصبية القوية وحدها وتتجاهل البنى اللغوية للكلمات التايلاندية. نحن نستخدم الملاحظة اللغوية بأن السلاسل التايلاندية يمكن تقسيمها إلى مقاطع ، والتي يجب أن تضيق مساحة البحث عن حدود الكلمات وتوفر ميزات مفيدة. هنا ، نقترح مقطع كلمات تايلاندي عصبيًا يستخدم الزخارف المقطعية لالتقاط القيود اللغوية واستخدام مرشحات CNN الموسعة لالتقاط بيئة كل حرف. ضمن هذا الهدف ، قمنا بتطوير أول مقطع لفظي إملائي تايلاندي قائم على ML ، والذي ينتج عنه مقاطع للزفاف لاستخدامها كميزات بواسطة كلمة مقسم. يتفوق نظام تجزئة الكلمات لدينا على أحدث النظم السابقة من حيث السرعة والدقة في كل من مجموعات البيانات داخل المجال وخارجها.', 'fr': "La segmentation des mots est une étape de prétraitement difficile pour le traitement du langage naturel thaïlandais en raison de l'absence de limites de mots explicites. Les systèmes précédents reposaient uniquement sur une architecture de réseau neuronal puissante et ignoraient les sous-structures linguistiques des mots thaïlandais. Nous utilisons l'observation linguistique selon laquelle les chaînes thaïlandaises peuvent être segmentées en syllabes, ce qui devrait réduire l'espace de recherche pour les limites des mots et fournir des fonctionnalités utiles. Nous proposons ici un segmenteur de mots thaï neuronal qui utilise des incorporations de syllabes pour capturer les contraintes linguistiques et utilise des filtres CNN dilatés pour capturer l'environnement de chaque caractère. Dans ce but, nous développons le premier segmenteur orthographique thaï de syllabes basé sur ML, qui produit des intégrations de syllabes à utiliser comme caractéristiques par le segmenteur de mots. Notre système de segmentation de mots surpasse le système de pointe précédent en termes de rapidité et de précision sur les ensembles de données dans le domaine et hors domaine.", 'es': 'La segmentación de palabras es un paso de preprocesamiento desafiante para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural tailandés debido a la falta de límites explícitos de las palabras. Los sistemas anteriores se basan únicamente en una potente arquitectura de red neuronal e ignoran las subestructuras lingüísticas de las palabras tailandesas. Utilizamos la observación lingüística de que las cadenas tailandesas se pueden segmentar en sílabas, lo que debería reducir el espacio de búsqueda de los límites de las palabras y proporcionar características útiles. Aquí, proponemos un segmentador de palabras tailandés neuronal que utiliza incrustaciones de sílabas para capturar las restricciones lingüísticas y utiliza filtros CNN dilatados para capturar el entorno de cada carácter. Dentro de este objetivo, desarrollamos el primer segmentador de sílabas ortográficas tailandesas basado en ML, que produce incrustaciones de sílabas para ser utilizadas como características por el segmentador de palabras. Nuestro sistema de segmentación de palabras supera al sistema de vanguardia anterior en velocidad y precisión en conjuntos de datos dentro y fuera del dominio.', 'pt': 'A segmentação de palavras é uma etapa de pré-processamento desafiadora para o processamento de linguagem natural tailandesa devido à falta de limites explícitos de palavras. Os sistemas anteriores contam apenas com uma arquitetura de rede neural poderosa e ignoram as subestruturas linguísticas das palavras tailandesas. Utilizamos a observação linguística de que as strings tailandesas podem ser segmentadas em sílabas, o que deve restringir o espaço de pesquisa para os limites das palavras e fornecer recursos úteis. Aqui, propomos um segmentador de palavras tailandês neural que usa embeddings de sílabas para capturar restrições linguísticas e usa filtros CNN dilatados para capturar o ambiente de cada caractere. Dentro desse objetivo, desenvolvemos o primeiro segmentador de sílabas ortográfico tailandês baseado em ML, que produz embeddings de sílabas para serem usados como recursos pelo segmentador de palavras. Nosso sistema de segmentação de palavras supera o sistema de última geração anterior em velocidade e precisão em conjuntos de dados no domínio e fora do domínio.', 'ja': '単語セグメンテーションは、明示的な単語の境界がないため、タイの自然言語処理にとって難しい前処理ステップです。以前のシステムは、強力なニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャだけに依存し、タイ語の単語の言語的下位構造を無視しています。タイ文字列は音節に分割できるという言語学的観察を活用し、単語境界の検索スペースを狭め、役立つ機能を提供します。ここでは、音節埋め込みを使用して言語的制約をキャプチャし、拡張CNNフィルタを使用して各キャラクターの環境をキャプチャするニューラルタイワードセグメンタを提案します。この目標の中で、私たちは最初のMLベースのタイ語正書法の音節セグメンタを開発しました。これは、単語セグメンタが機能として使用する音節の埋め込みをもたらします。当社のワードセグメンテーションシステムは、ドメイン内データセットとドメイン外データセットの両方で、速度と精度の両方で従来の最先端のシステムを上回っています。', 'zh': '无明单词界,分词泰语自然语言一挑战性之预处理也。 前统赖强大之神经网络架构,而略泰语单词语言结构。 以言语观之,即泰语字符串可分为音节,宜缩小单词界搜索空间而供有用之功。 于是设一神经泰语单词分割器,嵌以获言,广以CNN过滤器获字符。 开一基于ML泰语正字法音节分段器,其生节嵌,供单词分段器以为征。 其分词统域内及域外数集之速准确性皆优于前先进系统。', 'hi': 'Word विभाजन स्पष्ट शब्द सीमाओं की कमी के कारण थाई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण कदम है। पिछली प्रणालियां अकेले शक्तिशाली तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला पर भरोसा करती हैं और थाई शब्दों की भाषाई उप-संरचनाओं को अनदेखा करती हैं। हम भाषाई अवलोकन का उपयोग करते हैं कि थाई तारों को शब्दांशों में विभाजित किया जा सकता है, जिसे शब्द सीमाओं के लिए खोज स्थान को संकीर्ण करना चाहिए और सहायक विशेषताएं प्रदान करनी चाहिए। यहां, हम एक तंत्रिका थाई वर्ड सेगमेंटर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो भाषाई बाधाओं को पकड़ने के लिए शब्दांश एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है और प्रत्येक चरित्र के वातावरण को पकड़ने के लिए फैलाहुआ सीएनएन फिल्टर का उपयोग करता है। इस लक्ष्य के भीतर, हम पहला एमएल-आधारित थाई ऑर्थोग्राफिकल सिलेबल सेगमेंटर विकसित करते हैं, जो शब्द सेगमेंटर द्वारा सुविधाओं के रूप में उपयोग किए जाने वाले शब्दांश एम्बेडिंग की पैदावार करता है। हमारा शब्द विभाजन प्रणाली इन-डोमेन और आउट-डोमेन डेटासेट दोनों पर गति और सटीकता दोनों में पिछले अत्याधुनिक प्रणाली को मात देती है।', 'ru': 'Сегментация слов является сложным этапом предварительной обработки для обработки тайского естественного языка из-за отсутствия четких границ слов. Предыдущие системы полагаются только на мощную архитектуру нейронной сети и игнорируют лингвистические подструктуры тайских слов. Мы используем лингвистическое наблюдение, что тайские строки могут быть сегментированы на слоги, которые должны сузить пространство поиска для границ слова и обеспечить полезные функции. Здесь мы предлагаем нейронный тайский сегментатор слов, который использует слоговые вложения для захвата лингвистических ограничений и использует расширенные фильтры CNN для захвата среды каждого символа. В рамках этой цели мы разрабатываем первый основанный на ML тайский орфографический сегментатор слогов, который дает слоговые вложения для использования в качестве признаков сегментатором слов. Наша система сегментации слов превосходит предыдущую современную систему как по скорости, так и по точности в наборах внутридоменных и внедоменных данных.', 'ga': 'Is céim dhúshlánach réamhphróiseála é deighilt focal do Phróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha na Téalainne mar gheall ar an easpa teorainneacha focal follasacha. Braitheann na córais roimhe seo ar ailtireacht líonra néarchumhachtach amháin agus déanann siad neamhaird ar fho-struchtúir theangeolaíocha na bhfocal Téalainnis. Bainimid úsáid as an bhreathnóireacht theangeolaíoch gur féidir teaghráin Téalainnis a dheighilt ina siollaí, rud a chaolódh an spás cuardaigh do theorainneacha na bhfocal agus go gcuirfí gnéithe cabhracha ar fáil. Anseo, molaimid Deighleog Focal Téalainnis néarúil a úsáideann leabaithe siollaí chun srianta teanga a ghabháil agus a úsáideann scagairí CNN dilated chun timpeallacht gach carachtar a ghabháil. Laistigh den sprioc seo, forbraímid an chéad deighleoir siolla ortagrafach Téalainnis-bhunaithe ML, a thugann leabú siollaí le húsáid mar ghnéithe ag an bhfocal segmenter. Feidhmíonn ár gcóras deighilte focal níos fearr ná an córas úrscothach a bhí ann roimhe seo maidir le luas agus cruinneas araon ar thacair shonraí in-fhearainn agus lasmuigh.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების სეგმენტაცია არის შესაძლებელი პროცესის წინასწარმოდგენების წინასწარმოდგენისთვის ტაიდენური ენაპროცესის პროცესისთვის, რადგან არ არსებ წინა სისტემები მხოლოდ ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურაზე დააყენება და იგნორიურება ტაიდენური სიტყვების ლენგურისტიკური სპე ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ლინგურისტიკური მონაცემების, რომელიც ტაილური სიტყვებში შეიძლება სექმინტირება, რომელიც უნდა გადასრულება სიტყვების ზომის სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა და აქ, ჩვენ მინდომენეთ ნეიროლური ტაილური სიტყვა სეგმენტერი, რომელიც გამოყენებს სიტყვალური ინბედინგიები, რომელიც ლუნგური ზომილებების შესახებ და გამოყენებს გაფართლებ ამ მიზეზით ჩვენ პირველი ტაილური ორტოგრაფიური სილებლის სეგენტერის განვითარებით, რომელიც სილებლიური სეგენტირების გამოყენება, რომელიც სიტყვებლის სეგენტებით გამოყენება ჩვენი სიტყვების სედმენტაციის სისტემა უფრო გავაკეთება წინა სისტემას სისტემაში სისტემაში და სისტემაში სისტემაში და სისტემაში ორივე დიომინში და გარეშე დიომინში.', 'el': 'Η κατακερματισμός λέξεων είναι ένα δύσκολο βήμα προεπεξεργασίας για την επεξεργασία της Ταϊλανδικής φυσικής γλώσσας λόγω της έλλειψης ρητών ορίων λέξεων. Τα προηγούμενα συστήματα βασίζονται μόνο στην ισχυρή αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικών δικτύων και αγνοούν τις γλωσσικές υποδομές των ταϊλανδέζικων λέξεων. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη γλωσσική παρατήρηση ότι οι ταϊλανδικές συμβολοσειρές μπορούν να διαιρεθούν σε συλλαβές, οι οποίες θα πρέπει να περιορίσουν το χώρο αναζήτησης για τα όρια λέξεων και να παρέχουν χρήσιμα χαρακτηριστικά. Εδώ, προτείνουμε ένα νευρωνικό τμήμα λέξεων Ταϊλανδέζικο που χρησιμοποιεί ενσωμάτωση συλλαβών για να συλλάβει γλωσσικούς περιορισμούς και χρησιμοποιεί διεσταλμένα φίλτρα για να συλλάβει το περιβάλλον κάθε χαρακτήρα. Στο πλαίσιο αυτού του στόχου, αναπτύσσουμε το πρώτο ορθογραφικό τμήμα συλλαβών που βασίζεται στην Ταϊλανδέζικη γλώσσα, το οποίο δίνει ενσωμάτωση συλλαβών για να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως χαρακτηριστικά από το τμήμα λέξεων. Το σύστημα τμηματοποίησης λέξεων μας ξεπερνά το προηγούμενο σύστημα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας τόσο στην ταχύτητα όσο και στην ακρίβεια τόσο σε σύνολα δεδομένων εντός όσο και εκτός τομέα.', 'hu': 'A szövegszegmentáció kihívást jelent a thai természetes nyelv feldolgozásának előzetes lépése, mivel nincs kifejezett szóhatár. A korábbi rendszerek kizárólag erőteljes neurális hálózati architektúrára támaszkodnak, és figyelmen kívül hagyják a thai szavak nyelvi alstruktúráit. Azt a nyelvi megfigyelést használjuk, hogy a thai karakterek szótagokra szegmentálhatók, ami szűkíti a szóhatárok keresési területét és hasznos funkciókat biztosít. Itt egy neurális thai szószegmentőt javasolunk, amely szótagbeágyazásokat használ a nyelvi korlátozások rögzítésére, és kitágult CNN szűrőket használ az egyes karakterek környezetének rögzítésére. Ennek keretében kifejlesztjük az első ML alapú thai ortográfiai szótagszegmentálót, amely szótagbeágyazásokat eredményez, amelyeket a szószegmentáló funkcióként használ. Szószegmentációs rendszerünk gyorsaságban és pontosságban egyaránt felülmúlja az előző korszerű rendszert mind a domain belüli, mind a domain kívüli adatkészleteken.', 'it': "La segmentazione delle parole è una fase di pre-elaborazione impegnativa per l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale tailandese a causa della mancanza di confini espliciti delle parole. I sistemi precedenti si basano solo su una potente architettura di rete neurale e ignorano le sottostrutture linguistiche delle parole tailandesi. Usiamo l'osservazione linguistica che le stringhe thailandesi possono essere segmentate in sillabe, che dovrebbero restringere lo spazio di ricerca per i confini delle parole e fornire funzionalità utili. Qui, proponiamo un Segmenter di parole tailandese neurale che utilizza incorporazioni di sillabe per catturare vincoli linguistici e utilizza filtri CNN dilatati per catturare l'ambiente di ogni carattere. All'interno di questo obiettivo, sviluppiamo il primo segmentatore ortografico thailandese di sillabe basato su ML, che produce incorporazioni di sillabe da utilizzare come caratteristiche dal segmentatore di parola. Il nostro sistema di segmentazione delle parole supera il precedente sistema all'avanguardia sia in velocità che in precisione su set di dati interni che fuori dominio.", 'kk': 'Сөздің сегментациясы - тайлық сөздің шектері жоқ сияқты Тайландық Тәуелді тіл процессері үшін алдын- ала өзгерту шамасы. Алдыңғы жүйелер тек күшті неврал желінің архитектурасына тәуелді және тайландық сөздердің лингвистикалық суструктурасын елемейді. Тайландық жолдарды сөздер шектерінің іздеу орынын азайту және көмектесу мүмкіндіктерін келтіруге болады. Мұнда біз лингвистикалық шектеулерді алу үшін, CNN сүзгілерін келтіріп, әрбір таңбаның ортасын алу үшін силлабалы ендіруді қолданатын неврал тайланды сөз сегментерін ұсынамыз. Бұл мақсаттың ішінде бірінші ML- негіздеген тайланды ортографикалық силлаб сегментерін құрамыз. Бұл сөз сегментерінің мүмкіндіктері ретінде қолданылатын силлаб ендіруді береді. Сөздің сегментациялық жүйесіміз доменде және сыртқы домен деректер қорларында да, жылдамдықты және дұрыстығын алдыңғы орындау жүйесіне жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'žodžių segmentavimas yra sunkus Tailando gamtos kalbų perdirbimo išankstinis perdirbimo etapas, nes nėra aiškių žodžių ribų. The previous systems rely on powerful neural network architecture alone and ignore linguistic substructures of Thai words.  Naudojame kalbinę pastabą, kad Tailando eilutės gali būti suskirstytos į silabos, kurios turėtų sutrumpinti žodžio ribų paieškos erdvę ir suteikti naudingų savybių. Čia mes siūlome nervinį Tailando žodžių segmentatorių, kuris naudoja silabolių įterpimus kalbiniams apribojimams surinkti ir naudoja išplėstinius CNN filtrus kiekvieno simbolio aplinkai surinkti. Šiame tiksle mes plėtojame pirmąjį ML pagrįstą Tailando ortografinių silabolių segmentatorių, kuris suteikia silabolių įterpimus, kurie naudojami kaip žodžių segmentatoriaus savybės. Mūsų žodžių segmentacijos sistema viršija ankstesnę pažangiausią sistemą tiek greičiu, tiek tikslumu tiek domeno, tiek ne domeno duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'ms': 'Segmen perkataan adalah langkah awal-pemprosesan yang mencabar untuk Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami Thailand disebabkan kekurangan sempadan perkataan yang jelas. Sistem terdahulu bergantung pada arkitektur rangkaian saraf yang kuat sendirian dan abaikan substruktur bahasa perkataan Thai. We utilize the linguistic observation that Thai strings can be segmented into syllables, which should narrow down the search space for the word boundaries and provide helpful features.  Here, we propose a neural Thai Word Segmenter that uses syllable embeddings to capture linguistic constraints and uses dilated CNN filters to capture the environment of each character.  Dalam tujuan ini, kami mengembangkan segmen silabel ortografik Thai berdasarkan ML pertama, yang menghasilkan penyelesaian silabel untuk digunakan sebagai ciri-ciri oleh segmen perkataan. Sistem segmentasi perkataan kita melampaui sistem keadaan-semasa-semasa terdahulu dalam kelajuan dan akurat pada set data dalam domain dan luar domain.', 'mk': 'Сегментацијата на зборовите претставува предобработувачки чекор за процесот на тајландскиот природен јазик поради недостатокот на експлицитни граници на зборовите. Претходните системи се потпираат само на моќна архитектура на нервната мрежа и ги игнорираат јазичните подструктури на тајландските зборови. Ние го користиме јазичното набљудување дека тајландските линии можат да се сегментираат во слободи, кои треба да го намалат просторот за пребарување на зборовите граници и да обезбедат корисни карактеристики. Овде, предложуваме нервен тајландски зборен сегментер кој користи сложувачки вложувања за да ги фати јазичните ограничувања и користи ширени CNN филтри за да ја фати околината на секој карактер. Во рамките на оваа цел, ние го развиваме првиот тајландски ортографски сегментер на силабла базиран на ML, кој предизвикува силабелни вградувања кои треба да се користат како карактеристики од зборот сегментер. Нашиот систем за сегментација на зборови го надминува претходниот најнов систем во брзина и прецизност на податоците во домен и надвор од домен.', 'mt': 'Is-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem hija pass ta’ qabel l-ipproċessar ta’ sfida għall-Proċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali Tajlandiż minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ limiti espliċiti tal-kliem. Is-sistemi preċedenti jiddependu fuq arkitettura qawwija tan-netwerk newrali waħedha u jinjoraw is-sottostrutturi lingwistiċi tal-kliem Tajlandiż. Aħna nużaw l-osservazzjoni lingwistika li l-linji Tajlandiżi jistgħu jiġu segmentati f’silabelli, li għandhom inaqqsu l-ispazju tat-tiftix għall-limiti tal-kelma u jipprovdu karatteristiċi utli. Hawnhekk, qed nipproponu Segmentatur tal-kliem newrali Tajlandiż li juża inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sillaba biex jinqabdu restrizzjonijiet lingwistiċi u juża filtri CNN mifruxa biex jinqabdu l-ambjent ta’ kull karattru. F’dan il-għan, aħna niżviluppaw l-ewwel segmentatur tas-silaboli ortografiċi Tajlandiż ibbażat fuq ML, li jagħti inkorporazzjonijiet tas-silaboli li għandhom jintużaw bħala karatteristiċi mis-segmentatur tal-kelma. Our word segmentation system outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system in both speed and accuracy on both in-domain and out-domain datasets.', 'mn': 'Тайландын Байгалийн хэл Процессийн тулд үг хэлбэрийн хязгаарлалт байхгүй учраас хэлний хэлбэрээр ажиллах хэцүү алхам юм. Өмнөх системүүд ганцаараа хүчирхэг мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектур дээр хамаарч, Тайландын үгнүүдийн хэлний суурь бүтээгдэхүүнийг үгүйсгэдэг. Бид Тайландын мөртгийг үг хэлбэрээр хувааж чадна гэдгийг хэлний анзаарлыг хэрэглэдэг. Энэ нь үг хязгаарыг хайх орон зайг багасгаж, тусламжтай боломж олгодог. Энд бид хэлний хязгаарлалуудыг барьж, хүн бүрийн орчин тойроныг барьж авахын тулд мэдрэлийн Тайландын хэлний хэлбэрийг ашигладаг мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөгжлийг санал болгож байна. Энэ зорилготой дотор бид анхны ML-ын ортографик тэмдэглэгчийг хөгжүүлнэ. Энэ нь тэмдэглэгчийн хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг үг хэлбэрээр илэрхийллийг өгдөг. Бидний үг хэвлэх систем нь өмнөх урлагийн тогтолцоог хурдан, шударга байдлаар хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг хоёуланг', 'pl': 'Segmentacja tekstu jest wymagającym krokiem wstępnego przetwarzania języka tajskiego naturalnego ze względu na brak wyraźnych granic słów. Poprzednie systemy opierają się wyłącznie na potężnej architekturze sieci neuronowej i ignorują językowe podstruktury tajskich słów. Wykorzystujemy obserwację językową, że tajskie ciągi można podzielić na sylaby, co powinno zawęzić przestrzeń wyszukiwania granic słów i zapewnić pomocne funkcje. Tutaj proponujemy neuronowy tajski segmenter słów, który wykorzystuje osadzenia sylab do przechwytywania ograniczeń językowych i używa rozszerzonych filtrów CNN do uchwycenia środowiska każdego znaku. W ramach tego celu opracowujemy pierwszy oparty na ML tajskim segmenterze ortograficznym sylab ortograficznych, który daje osadzenia sylab do wykorzystania jako cechy przez segmenter słowa. Nasz system segmentacji słów przewyższa poprzedni najnowocześniejszy system zarówno pod względem szybkości, jak i dokładności zarówno w zestawach danych wewnątrz domeny, jak i poza domeną.', 'no': 'Ordsegmentasjon er eit vanskeleg forhandteringssteg for Thai naturspråk-handtering på grunn av mangling av eksplisitt ordgrenser. Førre systema er på kraftig neuralnettverksarkitektur alene og ignorerer lingviske substrukturer av Thai ord. Vi bruker den lingviske observasjonen at Thai- strengar kan segmenterast inn i syllar, som bør redusera søkjeområdet for ordgrensene og gjera hjelpelige funksjonar. Her foreslår vi ein neural Thai Word Segmenter som brukar syllabele innbygging for å henta linguiske begrensningar og brukar utvida CNN-filter for å henta miljøet av kvar teikn. I denne målet utviklar vi den første ortografiske syllabelsegmenteren som er basert på ML-basert på Thai, som gjer syllabelinnbygging som vert brukt som funksjonar av ordsegmenteren. Ordsegmentasjonssystemet vårt utfører den førre tilstanden av kunsten i både fart og nøyaktighet på både i domene og ut-domenedatasett.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d പിരിയുന്നത് തായി സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പുള്ള വിലാസപ്രക്രിയയാണ്. വ്യക്തമായ വാക്കുകളു മുമ്പുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം ശക്തിയുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടാര്\u200d മാത്രം ആശ്രയിക്കുകയും തായി We utilize the linguistic observation that Thai strings can be segmented into syllables, which should narrow down the search space for the word boundaries and provide helpful features.  ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതുരുതൽ തായി വാക്ക് സെഗ്മെന്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന സില്ലാലിസ്റ്റിക്ക് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പിടിക്കാന ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ എംഎല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി തായിയിലെ ഓര്\u200dട്ടോഗ്രാഫിക് സിഗ്രഫിക്കല്\u200d സിഗമെന്റര്\u200d വാക്ക് സെഗ്മെന്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്ക നമ്മുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പിന്നില്\u200d വേഗത്തിലും പുറത്തുള്ള ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും മുമ്പുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത', 'ro': 'Segmentarea cuvintelor este un pas dificil de pre-procesare pentru prelucrarea limbajului natural thailandez datorită lipsei limitelor explicite ale cuvintelor. Sistemele anterioare se bazează doar pe arhitectura puternică a rețelei neurale și ignoră substructurile lingvistice ale cuvintelor thailandeze. Utilizăm observația lingvistică că șirurile thailandeze pot fi segmentate în silabe, ceea ce ar trebui să restrângă spațiul de căutare pentru limitele cuvântului și să ofere caracteristici utile. Aici, vă propunem un segmentator neural Thai Word care utilizează încorporări silabe pentru a capta constrângerile lingvistice și utilizează filtre CNN dilatate pentru a capta mediul fiecărui caracter. În cadrul acestui obiectiv, dezvoltăm primul segmentator ortografic thailandez de silabe bazat pe ML, care oferă încorporări de silabe pentru a fi utilizate ca caracteristici de către segmentatorul de cuvânt. Sistemul nostru de segmentare a cuvintelor depășește sistemul anterior de ultimă generație atât în viteză, cât și în precizie, atât în seturile de date din domeniu, cât și în afara domeniului.', 'sv': 'Ordsegmentering är ett utmanande förbehandlingssteg för Thai Natural Language Processing på grund av avsaknaden av uttryckliga ordgränser. De tidigare systemen förlitar sig enbart på kraftfull neurala nätverksarkitektur och ignorerar språkliga substrukturer av thailändska ord. Vi använder oss av den språkliga observationen att thailändska strängar kan segmenteras i stavelser, vilket bör begränsa sökutrymmet för ordgränser och ge användbara funktioner. Här föreslår vi en neural Thai Word Segmenter som använder stavelseinbäddningar för att fånga språkliga begränsningar och använder utvidgade CNN-filter för att fånga miljön för varje tecken. Inom detta mål utvecklar vi den första ML-baserade thailändska ortografiska stavelsesegmenteringen, som ger stavelseinbäddningar som ska användas som funktioner av ordet segmentering. Vårt ordsegmenteringssystem överträffar det tidigare toppmoderna systemet när det gäller både hastighet och noggrannhet på datauppsättningar inom och utanför domänen.', 'sr': 'Segmentacija reči je izazovan korak predobrađivanja prema procesu prirodnog jezika Tajlanda zbog nedostatka pojasnih granica reči. Prethodni sistemi se oslanjaju na moćnu arhitekturu neuralne mreže sami i ignoriraju jezičke podstrukture tajanskih reči. Koristimo lingvističko posmatranje da se tajanske žice mogu segmentirati u slovke, koje bi trebalo smanjiti prostor potražnje za granicama riječi i pružiti pomoćne funkcije. Ovde predlažemo neuralni tajanski segmenter koji koristi silabelne integracije da uhvati lingviske ograničenje i koristi šireni CNN filtri da uhvati okolinu svakog karaktera. U ovom cilju razvijemo prvi tajanski ortografski segmenter na ML-u, koji daje silabelne integracije da se koriste kao karakteristike reči segmentera. Naš sistem segmentacije riječi iznosi prethodni sistem umetnosti i brzinom i preciznošću na podacima podataka u domenu i van domena.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை பிரிவு என்பது தாய் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டிற்கு ஒரு சவாலான முன் செயல்படுத்தல் படி தான் வெளிப்படையான வார்த்தை  முந்தைய அமைப்புகள் சக்தியான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கத்தை தனியாக நம்புகிறார் தாய் சரங்கள் சரங்களால் பிரிக்கப்பட முடியும் என்ற மொழிய பார்வையை நாம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அது வார்த்தை எல்லைகளுக்கு தேடும் இடங்களை குறைத இங்கே நாம் ஒரு புதிய தாய் வார்த்தை பிரிப்பானை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சொற்களின் உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்தி மொழியில் உள்ள கட்டுப்பாடுகளை பிடிக இந்த இலக்குக்குள் முதல் எம்எல் அடிப்படையில் தாய் குறிப்பிட்ட துண்டு தொகுதியின் தன்மைகளாக பயன்படுத்தப்படும். எங்கள் வார்த்தை பிரிப்பு அமைப்பு முந்தைய நிலையில் உள்ள வேகத்தில் மற்றும் வெளியேறும் தரவுத்தளங்களில் இருந்தும் சரியான', 'so': 'Heshiiska afka asalka ah ee Thailand waa jardiino dhibaato ah oo ka hor baaraandegista hadalka, sababtoo ah baahida xuduudaha caddeysan ee hadalka. Isticmaalkii hore waxay ku xiran yihiin dhismaha internetka ee xoogga badan ee neurada oo kaliya, wuxuuna ka jeedi karaa qalabka luuqadaha ee hadalka Thailaha. Waxaynu isticmaalaynaa aragtida afka, in xadhigga Thailand lagu qeyb-qeyb-dhigi karo, kaas oo waajib ah in goobta raadinta ee hadalka looga koobi karo xuduudaha kaleba ku qoran karo waxyaabaha caawinta ah. Halkan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal neural ah oo ku isticmaalaya qalabka qofka ah si uu u qabsado xadhka luqada oo uu u isticmaalo baaritaanka CNN si uu u qabsado xaraf kasta. Halkaas darteed waxaynu horumarinnaa kooxaha ugu horeysa ee AML-ku saleysan ee thailay, kaasoo soo bixinaya meelaha lagu isticmaalo si ay u isticmaalaan waxyaabaha ereyga qeybiyeeya. Sirkayada qeybinta ayaa ka muuqata nidaamka hore ee farshaxanta iyo si saxda ah oo ku qoran danbiyada gudaha iyo meelaha dibadda ah.', 'ur': 'کلمات سگرمیٹ ایک مشکل پیش پردازی قدم ہے تائیل کی طبیعی زبان پردازی کے لئے صریح کلمات کی حدیں کمی کی وجہ سے۔ پہلے سیسٹم صرف طاقتور نیورل نیٹ ورک معماری پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں اور تائیل کلمات کی زبان تعمیر کو غفلت کرتے ہیں۔ ہم زبان نظارت کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ تائیل استرینگ سیلیبلوں میں ٹکڑے کر دیے جائیں، جو کلمات کے حدوں کے لئے جگہ جگہ تنگ کرنا چاہیے اور مددگار خصوصیت کرنا چاہیے۔ یہاں، ہم ایک نئورل ٹائی ورڈ سپمنٹر کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو زبان کی محدودیت کو پکڑنے کے لئے سیلابل ایمبڈینگ استعمال کرتا ہے اور ہر شخص کی محدودیت کو پکڑنے کے لئے پھیلا ہوا سی ان فیلٹر استعمال کرتا ہے. اس مقصد میں، ہم پہلی ML بنیادی تائیل اورٹوگرافیکی سیلابل سپٹیر کو ایجاد کرتے ہیں، جو کلمات سپٹیر کے ذریعے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں ہمارے کلمات سپٹمنٹ سیسٹم پہلے کی حالت آرتی سیسٹم کو سرعت اور دقیق دونوں ڈومین میں اور بیرون ڈاٹمنٹ سٹم میں عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'si': 'වචන විශේෂණය තමයි තායින් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශේෂ වචන සීමාවක් නැති විසි මුලින් පද්ධතියේ ශක්තිමත් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාතික විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් තනියම විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම තායිස් ව අපි භාෂාත්මක බලන්න පුළුවන් තායින් ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස්ට්රින්ස් සිල්බල් වලට සැකසුම් කරනවා කියලා භාෂාත්මක සීමාව සඳහා ප මෙතන, අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් තායි වචන සෙග්මෙන්ටර් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා කියලා භාෂාවික සීමාව අල්ලගන්න භාවිතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය මේ ඉලක්කයෙන්, අපි පලවෙනි ML-අධාරිත තායින් අධාරිත ශ්\u200dරේෂික ශ්\u200dරේෂික ශ්\u200dරේෂික ශ්\u200dරේෂික ශ්\u200dරේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ක අපේ වචන සැකසුම් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා පළවෙනි ස්ථිතියේ වේගය සහ සැකසුම් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණ දත', 'uz': "Name Oldingi tizimlar faqat yaxshi neyrol tarmoqni ishlab chiqaradi va Tay so'zlarining tillar qismlarini eʼtibor beradi. Biz tillarini foydalanamiz, Taycha strenlar jamoatlariga teng bo'lishi mumkin. Bu so'z so'zlar chegarasini kamaytirish va yordam xususiyatlarni koʻrsatish kerak. Here, we propose a neural Thai Word Segmenter that uses syllable embeddings to capture linguistic constraints and uses dilated CNN filters to capture the environment of each character.  Bu maqsadda, biz Tay asosida birinchi ML asosida ortografik belgilangan qismni yaratib, bu so'zning qismlarini birinchi qismlarga foydalanish mumkin. Biz so'zning qismlarimiz tizimi oldingi sanat holatida, domen va domen maʼlumotlar bazasidagi tezlik va aniqlanishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Từ phân đoạn là một bước thử thách cho việc xử lý bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên Thái vì không có giới hạn từ rõ ràng. Những hệ thống trước dựa trên một kiến trúc thần kinh hùng mạnh và lờ đi cấu trúc ngôn ngữ của từ Thái Lan. Chúng tôi sử dụng quan sát ngôn ngữ rằng sợi dây Thái có thể được chia thành các âm tiết, nó sẽ thu hẹp không gian tìm kiếm các ranh giới từ và cung cấp các tính năng hữu ích. Ở đây, chúng tôi đề xuất một đoạn theo từ thần kinh Thái mà sử dụng sự nhúng vào âm tiết để bắt giữ các giới hạn ngôn ngữ và sử dụng bộ lọc CNN giãn để ghi nhận môi trường của mỗi cá nhân. Bên trong mục tiêu này, chúng tôi phát triển... một âm tiết lớn theo dạng MLB đầu tiên, nó tạo ra các cài ghép âm tiết để được dùng làm các tính năng của từ gián tiếp. Hệ thống phân chia từ của chúng tôi vượt qua hệ thống truyền thống cũ trong cả tốc độ và độ chính xác, cả trong và ngoài miền.', 'bg': 'Сегментацията на думи е трудна стъпка за предварителна обработка на тайландски естествен език поради липсата на изрични граници на думите. Предишните системи разчитат само на мощна архитектура на невронната мрежа и игнорират лингвистичните субструктури на тайландските думи. Използваме лингвистичното наблюдение, че тайландските струни могат да бъдат сегментирани в срички, което трябва да стесни пространството за търсене на границите на думата и да осигури полезни функции. Тук предлагаме неврален тайландски словесен сегмент, който използва вграждания на срички за улавяне на езикови ограничения и използва разширени филтри за улавяне на средата на всеки знак. В рамките на тази цел разработваме първия тайландски ортографски сегментатор на срички, който дава вграждания на срички, които да бъдат използвани като особености от думата сегментатор. Нашата система за сегментиране на думи надминава предишната най-съвременна система както по скорост, така и по точност както в домейн, така и извън домейн набори от данни.', 'da': 'Ordsegmentering er et udfordrende forbearbejdningstrin for Thai Natural Language Processing på grund af manglen på eksplicitte ordgrænser. De tidligere systemer er afhængige af kraftfuld neural netværksarkitektur alene og ignorerer sproglige understrukturer af thailandske ord. Vi bruger den sproglige observation, at thailandske strenge kan segmenteres i stavelser, hvilket bør indsnævre søgepladsen for ordgrænserne og give nyttige funktioner. Her foreslår vi en neural Thai Word Segmenter, der bruger stavelsesbelejringer til at fange sproglige begrænsninger og bruger udvidede CNN-filtre til at fange miljøet for hvert tegn. Inden for dette mål udvikler vi den første ML-baserede thailandske ortografiske stavelsessegmenter, som giver stavelsesbelejringer, der skal bruges som funktioner af ordet segmenter. Vores ordsegmenteringssystem overgår det tidligere state-of-the-art system i både hastighed og nøjagtighed på både in-domæne og out-domæne datasæt.', 'nl': 'Woordsegmentatie is een uitdagende pre-processing stap voor Thaise Natural Language Processing vanwege het ontbreken van expliciete woordgrenzen. De vorige systemen vertrouwen alleen op krachtige neurale netwerkarchitectuur en negeren taalkundige substructuren van Thaise woorden. We maken gebruik van de taalkundige observatie dat Thaise strings kunnen worden segmenteerd in lettergrepen, die de zoekruimte voor de woordgrenzen moeten beperken en nuttige functies moeten bieden. Hier stellen we een neurale Thaise Word Segmenter voor die gebruik maakt van lettergrepen insluitingen om linguïstische beperkingen vast te leggen en verwijde CNN filters gebruikt om de omgeving van elk teken vast te leggen. Binnen dit doel ontwikkelen we de eerste op ML gebaseerde Thaise orthografische lettergrepen segmenter, die lettergrepen insluitingen oplevert die gebruikt kunnen worden als kenmerken door de woordsegmenter. Ons woordsegmentatiesysteem overtreft het vorige state-of-the-art systeem in snelheid en nauwkeurigheid op zowel in-domein als buiten-domein datasets.', 'hr': 'Segmentacija riječi je izazovan korak predobrazovanja prema procesu prirodnog jezika Tajlanda zbog nedostatka pojasnih granica riječi. Prethodni sustavi se oslanjaju na moćnu arhitekturu neuralne mreže sam i ignoriraju jezičke podstrukture tajanskih riječi. Koristimo jezičko promatranje da se tajanske žice mogu segmentirati u slovke, što bi trebalo smanjiti prostor potražnje za granicama riječi i pružiti pomoćne funkcije. Ovdje predlažemo neuralni tajanski segmenter riječi koji koristi silabelne integracije kako bi uhvatili jezičke ograničenje i koristili šireni CNN filtri kako bi uhvatili okolinu svakog karaktera. U ovom cilju razvijemo prvi tajanski ortografski segmenter na ML-u, koji daje špilovne integracije koje će koristiti kao karakteristike riječi segmentera. Naš sustav segmentacije riječi iznosi prethodni sustav umjetnosti i brzinom i preciznošću na podacima domena i van domena.', 'id': 'Segmentasi kata adalah langkah yang menantang untuk proses bahasa alami Thailand karena kekurangan batas kata eksplicit. Sistem sebelumnya bergantung pada arsitektur jaringan saraf yang kuat sendirian dan mengabaikan substruktur bahasa dari kata-kata Thailand. Kami menggunakan pengamatan bahasa bahwa tali Thailand dapat disegmen menjadi silabel, yang seharusnya mempersempit ruang pencarian untuk batas kata dan menyediakan fitur yang berguna. Di sini, kami mengusulkan segmenter kata neural Thai yang menggunakan penyembedding syllable untuk menangkap batasan bahasa dan menggunakan filter CNN yang dilapangkan untuk menangkap lingkungan setiap karakter. Dalam tujuan ini, kami mengembangkan segmen silabel ortografik Thailand berdasarkan ML pertama, yang menghasilkan embedding silabel untuk digunakan sebagai fitur oleh segmen kata. Sistem segmentasi kata kita melebihi sistem state-of-the-art sebelumnya dalam kecepatan dan akurasi pada set data both in-domain dan out-domain.', 'ko': '명확한 단어 경계가 부족하기 때문에 분사는 태국 자연 언어 처리에서 도전적인 예처리 절차이다.이전의 시스템은 강력한 신경 네트워크 구조에만 의존하고 태국어 단어의 언어 서브 구조를 무시했다.언어학적 관찰을 통해 태국 문자열은 음절로 나눌 수 있는데 이는 검색 공간의 단어 경계를 좁히고 유용한 기능을 제공해야 한다.여기서 우리는 언어의 제약을 포착하기 위해 음절 삽입을 사용하고, 확장된 CNN 필터를 사용하여 모든 문자의 환경을 포착하는 신경 태국 분사기를 제시했다.이 목표 아래 우리는 처음으로 ML 기반의 태국 정자법 음절 절분기를 개발했는데 이 절분기는 음절 삽입을 분사기로 하는 특징을 나타낼 수 있다.역내와 역외 데이터 집합에서 우리의 분사 시스템은 속도와 정확성에서 이전의 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Wortsegmentierung ist ein anspruchsvoller Vorbearbeitungsschritt für die Thai Natural Language Processing, da es keine expliziten Wortgrenzen gibt. Die bisherigen Systeme basieren allein auf einer leistungsfähigen neuronalen Netzwerkarchitektur und ignorieren linguistische Unterstrukturen thailändischer Wörter. Wir nutzen die linguistische Beobachtung, dass thailändische Strings in Silben unterteilt werden können, was den Suchraum für die Wortgrenzen eingrenzen und hilfreiche Funktionen bieten soll. Hier schlagen wir einen neuronalen Thai Word Segmenter vor, der Silbeneinbettungen verwendet, um sprachliche Einschränkungen zu erfassen und erweiterte CNN Filter verwendet, um die Umgebung jedes Zeichens zu erfassen. Im Rahmen dieses Ziels entwickeln wir den ersten ML-basierten thailändischen orthographischen Silbensegmenter, der Silbeneinbettungen liefert, die vom Wortsegmenter als Merkmal verwendet werden können. Unser Wortsegmentierungssystem übertrifft das bisherige State-of-the-Art-System sowohl in der Geschwindigkeit als auch in der Genauigkeit von In-Domain-Datensätzen.', 'fa': 'جدا کردن کلمه یک قدم پیش\u200cپردازش سخت برای پردازش زبان طبیعی تایید به دلیل ناتوانی محدودیت کلمه\u200cهای مشخص است. سیستم های قبلی تنها بر معماری شبکه عصبی قدرتمند اعتماد دارند و ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی از کلمات تایید را نادیده بگیرند. ما مشاهده زبان\u200cشناسی را استفاده می\u200cکنیم که استفاده از استفاده کردن استفاده می\u200cکنند که استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفا اینجا، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک بخش\u200cکننده\u200cی کلمه\u200cهای عصبی تایید که از محدودیت\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی استفاده می\u200cکند و از فیلترهای CNN گسترده برای گرفتن محیط هر شخصیت استفاده می\u200cکند. در این هدف، ما اولین بخش\u200cدهنده\u200cی الگوگرافیک تائیل را بر اساس ML توسعه می\u200cکنیم که به عنوان ویژگی\u200cهای الگوگرافیک استفاده می\u200cشود. سیستم جدا کردن کلمه\u200cهای ما سیستم اولین هنری را با سرعت و دقیق در هر دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دامنی و خارج دامنی انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Kelime segmentasy Taýça Doýal Dil işlemesi üçin täsirli öňe işlemeli adım. Öňki sistemler ýeke güýçli näyral şebeke arhitekturyna ynanýarlar we Taýça sözleriniň lingwistiki guramalaryny görmezden çykar. Biz Taýlanan hatlary sözlere bölmek üçin lingwistiki gözlemäge ulanýarys. Bu sözler üçin gözleme ýerini azaltmaly we faydaly özelliklere üýtgetmeli. Bu ýerde, biz bir näural Taýça Kelimi Segmenter dillerini almak üçin syllable taýýarlamak üçin ullanýan we her karakteriň çevresini almak üçin ýerleşýän CNN filtrolaryny ulanýarys. Bu maksadyň içinde biz ilkinji ML-dan tabanly Taýça ortografiýaly syllable segmenter öwrenýärdik. Bu syllable içine söz segmenter tarapyndan ullanylýan özelliklere üýtgedýär. Biziň söz segmentasiýa sistemimiz bugün süýşiklik sisteminde hem tiz we dogry derejesinde-de hem domain we daş-domain veri setirlerinde geçmişi işe yarar.', 'sw': 'Kugawanywa kwa neno ni hatua inayochanganya kabla ya upasuaji wa lugha ya asili ya Thailand kutokana na ukosefu wa mipaka ya neno wazi. Mifumo iliyopita zinategemea ujenzi wenye nguvu wa mtandao wa neura peke yake na kupuuza viungo vya lugha vya maneno ya Ki-Thai. Tunatumia mtazamo wa lugha kuwa misingi ya Thailand inaweza kutengwa katika misingi, ambayo inapaswa kupunguza nafasi ya utafutaji kwa ajili ya mipaka ya maneno na kutoa tabia za kusaidia. Hapa, tunapendekeza mtangazaji wa neno la kisasa la Thailand ambalo hutumia vifaa vinavyotumika kwa kutumia vizuizi vya lugha na kutumia vifaa vya CNN vilivyotengenezwa ili kupata mazingira ya kila tabia. Ndani ya malengo haya, tunaendelea mgengenezaji wa kwanza wa ML anayeishi nchini Thailand wa kihistoria, ambacho kinaleta vifaa vinavyotumiwa kama vipengele vya maneno. Mfumo wa kujitenga kwa neno letu unaonyesha hali iliyopita ya sanaa kwa kasi na sahihi katika seti za taarifa za ndani na nje ya ndani.', 'af': "Woord segmentasie is 'n pragtige voorprosessering stap vir Thai Natuurlike Taal Prosessering vanweë die ontbreek van eksplisiese woord grense. Die vorige stelsels vertrou op kragtige neuralnetwerk arkitektuur alleen en ignoreer lingwisiese onderstrukke van Thaise woorde. Ons gebruik die lingwisiese opsigting dat Thai strings in syllabels segmenteer kan word, wat moet die soektog spasie afdruk vir die woorde grense en hulp funksies verskaf. Hier, ons voorstel 'n neurale Thai Woord Segmenter wat syllabele inbêding gebruik om lingwisiese beheinings te vang en gebruik verspreidige CNN filters om die omgewing van elke karakter te vang. Binne hierdie doel, ontwikkel ons die eerste ML-gebaseerde Thai orthografiese syllable segmenter, wat die syllable inbêding gee om gebruik te word as funksies deur die woord segmenter. Ons woord segmentasie stelsel uitvoer die vorige state-of-the-art stelsel in beide spoed en presies op beide in-domein en uit-domein datastelle.", 'sq': 'Segmentimi i fjalëve është një hap sfidues paraprocesimi për Procesimin e Gjuhave Natyrore Tailandeze për shkak të mungesës së kufijve të shprehur të fjalëve. Sistemet e mëparshëm mbështeten vetëm në arkitekturën e fuqishme të rrjetit nervor dhe injorojnë nënstrukturat gjuhësore të fjalëve tailandeze. Ne përdorim vëzhgimin gjuhësor se vijat tailandeze mund të segmentohen në silabe, e cila duhet të ngushtojë hapësirën e kërkimit për fjalët kufij dhe të ofrojë karakteristika të dobishme. Këtu, ne propozojmë një Segmenter të Fjalave Neurale Tailandeze që përdor përfshirje të sinjaleve për të kapur kufizime gjuhësore dhe përdor filtra të zgjeruar CNN për të kapur mjedisin e çdo karakteri. Brenda këtij qëllimi, ne zhvillojmë segmenterin e parë të sinjalave ortografike tailandeze bazuar në ML, i cili jep përfshirje të sinjalave që do të përdoren si karakteristika nga segmenteri i fjalës. Sistemi ynë i segmentimit të fjalëve ekziston në sistemin e mëparshëm të rendit në shpejtësi dhe saktësi si në të dhënat në domeni dhe jashtë domeni.', 'hy': 'Բառերի սեգմետրացիան թայլանդացի բնական լեզվի մշակույթի համար դժվար քայլ է բառերի բացահայտ սահմանների բացակայության պատճառով: Նախորդ համակարգերը միայն հիմնված են ուժեղ նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետության վրա և անտեսում են թայլանդական բառերի լեզվաբանական ենթակառուցվածքները: We utilize the linguistic observation that Thai strings can be segmented into syllables, which should narrow down the search space for the word boundaries and provide helpful features.  Այստեղ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի թայլանդական բառերի նյարդային սեգմենտրեր, որը օգտագործում է խոսքերի ներդրումներ լեզվաբանական սահմանափակումների վերցնելու համար և օգտագործում է լայնացված CNN ֆիլտրեր յուրաքանչյուր կերպարի միջավայրի վերցնելու համար: Այս նպատակի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք առաջին ML-ով հիմնված թայլանդական օրտոգրաֆիկ սիլբալ սեգմետրը, որը հանգեցնում է սիլբալ ներդրումներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են որպես բառերի սեգմետրի հատկանիշներ: Մեր բառերի սեգմետրացիայի համակարգը գերազանցում է նախորդ բարձրագույն համակարգը և արագությամբ, և ճշգրտությամբ, և տիեզերքում, և ոչ տիեզերքում:', 'am': 'የንግግር ግንኙነት የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ስርዓት ግንኙነት ምክንያት ግልጹ የቃላት ድንበር ባለመሆኑን ለመቀናቀል የሚችል ደረጃ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ስርዓቶች በኃይለኛው የናቡር መረብ መሠረት ማድረግ ብቻውን ይታመናሉ እናም ከታይያ ቃላት የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢዎችን ትተዋሉ፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካሄዱን የተለየ ታይያ ግንኙነት ወደ ተጨማሪዎች ይለካል፡፡ ወደዚህ፣ የቻይና ቃላት አካባቢዎችን ለመያዝ የቋንቋዊ ግንኙነትን ለመያዝ እና የCNN አጣራዎችን ለመያዝ የቻይሎችን አካባቢ አካባቢ ለመያዝ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ Within this goal, we develop the first ML-based Thai orthographical syllable segmenter, which yields syllable embeddings to be used as features by the word segmenter.  የቃላችን ግንኙነት ስርዓት የቀድሞውን የዐርድ ሥርዓት በጥቅምነት እና ውጤት በዶሜን እና ውጭ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ ውስጥ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Söz segmentasiyası, a çıq-aydın söz sınırları olmadığı üçün Tayland təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün çətin ön işləmə adımdır. Əvvəlki sistemlər yalnız güclü nöral ağ arhitektarına təvəkkül edir və Thai sözlərin dil altyapısını görməyə çalışır. Biz dillərin gözləməsini istifadə edirik ki, Tailiyin səhifələri sözlərə bölünə bilər, sözlərin səhifələrinin arama alanını azaltıb faydalı özellikləri təmin edərlər. Burada, hər karakterin çevresini tutmaq üçün sözləri istifadə etmək üçün nöral Thai Word Segmenter təklif edirik. Bu məqsəd içində ilk ML tabanlı Tayland ortografiski silahlı segmentçisini təşkil edirik ki, söz segmentçisi təşkil olaraq istifadə ediləcək silahlı inbingləri təşkil edir. Bizim söz segmentasiyası sistemimiz əvvəlki sanat sisteminin hər ikisinin hızlı və dəqiqliyində də domain veri qurğuları ilə istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'থাই প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্ষিপ্ত শব্দের সীমানার অভাবের কারণে শব্দ বিভক্ত করা একটি চ্যালেঞ্জারের পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার প্রক্ পূর্ববর্তী সিস্টেম শক্তিশালী নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর উপর নির্ভর করে এবং থাই শব্দের ভাষার ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যাবল আমরা ভাষাগত পর্যবেক্ষণ ব্যবহার করি যে থাই স্ট্রিঙ্গ স্থানে বিভক্ত করা যাবে, যা শব্দের সীমানার জন্য অনুসন্ধানের সীমানা কমিয়ে দেবে এবং সাহায্য এখানে আমরা একটি নিউরুল থাই ওয়ার্ড সেগমেন্টার প্রস্তাব করছি যেটি ভাষার নিয়ম ব্যবহার করে ভাষাগত বৈধ এবং সিএনএন ফিল্টার ব্যবহার করে প্রত্যেক অক্ষরের পরিবে এই লক্ষ্যের মধ্যে আমরা প্রথম এমএল ভিত্তিক থাই অরটোগ্রাফিক্যাল সিঙ্গেন্টার উন্নয়ন করি, যা শব্দের বিভিন্ন ব্যবহারের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে ব্যবহার কর আমাদের শব্দ বিভক্তি সিস্টেম পূর্ববর্তী শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প সিস্টেমের দ্রুত এবং ডোমেইন এবং বাইরে ডাটাসেটের উভয়ে', 'bs': 'Segmentacija riječi je izazovan korak predobrazovanja prema procesu prirodnog jezika Tajlanda zbog nedostatka pojasnih granica riječi. Prethodni sistemi se oslanjaju na moćnu arhitekturu neuralne mreže sam i ignoriraju jezičke podstrukture tajanskih riječi. Koristimo jezičku promatranje da se tajanske žice mogu segmentirati u slovke, koje bi trebalo smanjiti prostor potražnje za granicama riječi i pružiti pomoćne funkcije. Ovdje predlažemo neuralni Tajlandski segmenter riječi koji koristi silabelne integracije kako bi uhvatili lingviske ograničenja i koristili šireni CNN filtri kako bi uhvatili okolinu svakog karaktera. U ovom cilju razvijemo prvi tajanski ortografski segmenter na ML-u, koji daje slobodne integracije koje će koristiti kao karakteristike riječi segmentera. Naš sistem segmentacije riječi iznosi prethodni sistem umjetnosti i brzinom i preciznošću na podacima u domenu i van domena.', 'cs': 'Segmentace slova je náročným krokem předzpracování thajského přírodního jazyka kvůli nedostatku explicitních slovních hranic. Předchozí systémy spoléhají pouze na výkonnou architekturu neuronové sítě a ignorují jazykové substruktury thajských slov. Využíváme jazykového pozorování, že thajské řetězce mohou být segmentovány do slabik, což by mělo zúžit vyhledávací prostor pro hranice slova a poskytnout užitečné funkce. Zde navrhujeme neuronový thajský segmentátor slov, který používá slabikové vložení k zachycení jazykových omezení a používá rozšířené filtry CNN k zachycení prostředí každého znaku. V rámci tohoto cíle vyvíjíme první ML-založený thajský ortografický segmentér slabik, který poskytuje slabikové vložení, které budou použity jako prvky slovního segmentéru. Náš systém segmentace slov překonává předchozí nejmodernější systém v rychlosti a přesnosti jak v doménových, tak mimo doménových datových sadách.', 'et': 'Sõnade segmenteerimine on Tai loodusliku keele töötlemisel keeruline eeltöötluse etapp, sest sõnade piirid puuduvad. Varasemad süsteemid tuginevad ainult võimsale närvivõrgu arhitektuurile ja ignoreerivad Tai sõnade keelelisi alusstruktuure. Kasutame keelelist tähelepanu, et Tai stringid on võimalik silpideks segmenteerida, mis peaks kitsendama sõnapiiride otsinguruumi ja pakkuma kasulikke omadusi. Siin pakume välja Tai sõnasegmenteri, mis kasutab silpide manustamist keeleliste piirangute jäädvustamiseks ja laiendatud CNN filtreid iga märgi keskkonna jäädvustamiseks. Selle eesmärgi raames töötame välja esimese ML-põhise Tai ortograafilise silbisegmenteri, mis annab silbisegmenteerimise, mida sõna segmenter omadustena kasutab. Meie sõna segmenteerimise süsteem ületab eelmise tipptasemel süsteemi nii domeenisiseste kui ka väliste andmekogumite kiiruse kui täpsuse poolest.', 'fi': 'Sanan segmentointi on haastava esikäsittelyvaihe thain luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä, koska sanarajat puuttuvat. Aiemmat järjestelmät luottavat pelkästään voimakkaaseen neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuriin ja sivuuttavat thai-sanojen kielelliset alarakenteet. Hyödynnämme kielellistä havaintoa siitä, että thai-kielet voidaan segmentoida tavuiksi, mikä kaventaa sanarajojen hakua ja tarjoaa hyödyllisiä ominaisuuksia. Tässä ehdotamme neuromaista thai-sanasegmenteriä, joka käyttää tavuupotuksia kielellisten rajoitusten tallentamiseen ja käyttää laajennettuja CNN-suodattimia kunkin merkin ympäristön tallentamiseen. Tämän tavoitteen puitteissa kehitämme ensimmäisen ML-pohjaisen thai-ortografisen tavusegmentoinnin, joka tuottaa tavuupotuksia sanan segmentoinnin ominaisuuksiksi. Sanasegmentointijärjestelmämme on nopeampi kuin edellinen huipputekninen järjestelmä sekä sisäisessä että ulkoisessa aineistossa.', 'ca': "La segmentació de paraules és un pas de pré-processament difícil per la processació de llenguatges naturals thailandès a causa de la falta de límits explícits de paraules. Els sistemes anteriors confien només en una arquitectura poderosa de xarxa neural i ignoren les substructures lingüístices de les paraules tailandeses. Utilitzem l'observació lingüística de que les cadenes tailandeses poden ser segmentades en sílabes, que haurien de reduir l'espai de cerca dels límits de paraules i proporcionar característiques útils. Aquí proposem un segmentador neural de paraules tailandeses que utilitza integracions sílabes per capturar restriccions lingüístices i utilitza filtres CNN dilatats per capturar l'entorn de cada caràcter. Within this goal, we develop the first ML-based Thai orthographical syllable segmenter, which yields syllable embeddings to be used as features by the word segmenter.  El nostre sistema de segmentació de paraules supera el sistema més avançat en velocitat i precisió dels conjunts de dades en domini i fora de domini.", 'sk': 'Segmentacija besed je zahteven korak predhodne obdelave za tajsko obdelavo naravnega jezika zaradi pomanjkanja eksplicitnih meja besed. Prejšnji sistemi se zanašajo samo na močno arhitekturo nevronskih omrežij in ignorirajo jezikovne podstrukture tajskih besed. Uporabljamo jezikovno opazovanje, da je tajske strune mogoče segmentirati v zloge, kar bi moralo zožiti iskalni prostor za meje besed in zagotoviti koristne lastnosti. Predlagamo nevronski tajski segmenter besed, ki uporablja zloge za zajemanje jezikovnih omejitev in uporablja razširjene CNN filtre za zajemanje okolja vsakega znaka. V okviru tega cilja smo razvili prvi tajski ortografski segmenter zlogov, ki temelji na ML, ki omogoča vdelavo zlogov, ki jih lahko uporabi kot značilnosti besede segmenter. Naš sistem segmentacije besed presega prejšnji najsodobnejši sistem tako v hitrosti kot natančnosti tako v domenskih kot zunajdomenskih naborih podatkov.', 'he': 'סגמנציה מילים היא צעד מאתגר לפני העבודה עבור מעבדת שפת טבעית תאילנדית בגלל חוסר גבולות מילים ברורים. המערכות הקודמות סומכות על ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית חזקה לבד ולהתעלם ממבנות שפתיים של מילים תאילנדיות. אנו משתמשים באמצעות ההצגה השפתית כי חוטים תאילנדים יכולים להיות מוחלקים למילות, אשר צריך לצמצם את מרחב החיפוש לגבולות המילים ולספק תכונות מועילות. Here, we propose a neural Thai Word Segmenter that uses syllable embeddings to capture linguistic constraints and uses dilated CNN filters to capture the environment of each character.  בתוך המטרה הזאת, אנחנו מפתחים את המחלק הראשון של מילים אורטוגרפיים תאילנדים המבוסס על ML, שמביא תוספות מילים שימשכו כתכונות על ידי המחלק המילים. מערכת התחלוקת המילים שלנו עולה על מערכת המדינה הקודמת, במהירות ודיוקת, גם על קבוצות נתונים בתחום וגם מחוץ לתחום.', 'ha': "Tsarin maganar ta kasance wata tsohon gaba-aiki na zaman zartar da aiki na Lugha Kiasal na Tailai sabada ba'a da tsarin magana mai bayyanãwa ba. Tiziman da suka gaba, yana dõgara kan masu ƙarfi na tsarin tarayyan neural na kangara kowane kuma ana ƙyale masu cikin harshistic na'ura. Tuna amfani da tsarin linguin da za'a iya raba strings cikin salummai, wanda ya kamata yin filin fili da za'a yi amfani da tsarin kalmõmi kuma Mu ƙayyade misãlai masu taimako. Wannan, Munã buɗa wani salon maganar taƙaita da za'a yi amfani da matsayin taƙaita dõmin ya kãma tsarin linguistic kuma za'a yi amfani da filteriyar da aka buɗe wa CNN dõmin ya kãma mazaɓan kowace takardar. Daga wannan goa, Munã ƙãga tsohon sigogi na farkon ML wanda ke asansa da taƙaita, wanda ke iya ƙara cikin salon da za'a yi amfani da shi kamar misãlai ga kalmar segment. Tsarin jini da kalmõminMu na samar da halin na farko na-halin-sanar cikin farat da gaske ko kuma tsari kan tsarin da ke cikin-Domen da wanda ke fita.", 'jv': 'segmentation Sistem sing rawuh dumadhi karo akeh hukum sing nggawe aturan alat sing luwih dumadhi lan kelangan langkung sampeyan liyane Awak dhéwé ngéwangi perusahaan anyar nggambar luwih-perusahaan liyane Awak dhéwé ngerasai un segmenter Nyural Taj Word segmenter sing gambar barang sampeyan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang-alat lan usungé barang-alat sing gawe barang-alat nang sampeyan gawe cara-alat sing apik dhéwé. Ref Start"), ("Left side middle of the reference box"), "ref" and "ref We word segmentation sistem out output the previous state-of-the', 'bo': 'ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་ཆ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་གསལ་བཤད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་Thai ནད་ཅུང་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་གི་གོང་འཕེལ་དང་ལེན་པའི་སྔོ སྔོན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་དེ་སྟོང་ཆེ་བའི་ནུས་ཡུལ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བཟོ་བཀོད་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྟངས་འདི་Thai ཡི་ཡིག་རྒྱུད་ཀྱི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། འདིར་ངེད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ མི་རྣམས་Thai Word Segmenter་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡིག In this goal, we develop the first ML-based Thai orthographical syllable segmenter, which yields syllable embeddings to be used as features by the word segmenter. Our word segmentation system outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system in both speed and accuracy on both in-domain and out-domain datasets.'}
{'en': 'Morphological disambiguation from stemming data', 'ar': 'توضيح مورفولوجي من البيانات المشتقة', 'es': 'Desambiguación morfológica a partir de datos derivados', 'fr': "Désambiguïsation morphologique à partir des données d'origine", 'pt': 'Desambiguação morfológica de dados de derivação', 'ja': 'データからの形態学的な曖昧さ解消', 'hi': 'स्टेमिंग डेटा से रूपात्मक disambiguation', 'zh': '从词干数中消形态学歧义', 'ru': 'Морфологическое расплывчатость по результирующим данным', 'ga': 'Athdhébhriú moirfeolaíoch ó shonraí eascaire', 'ka': 'მოპოლოგიური განსხვავება მონაცემებისგან', 'hu': 'Morfológiai egyértelműsítés a származó adatokkal', 'el': 'Μορφολογική αποσαφήνιση από τα δεδομένα που προέρχονται', 'it': 'Disambiguazione morfologica dai dati derivati', 'lt': 'Morfologinis neatitikimas nuo gautų duomenų', 'mk': 'Морфолошка дебабигуација од потекнувачките податоци', 'kk': 'Марфологикалық мәліметтерден өзгерту', 'ms': 'Penjelasan morfologik dari data yang berasal', 'mt': 'Żambigwazzjoni morfoloġika mid-dejta li ġejja', 'mn': 'Марфологик хэмжээсүүд нь', 'ro': 'Deambiguizarea morfologică de la datele provenite', 'pl': 'Rozporządzenie morfologiczne od danych źródłowych', 'no': 'Morphological disambiguation from stemming data', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റോമിങ്ങ് ഡേറ്റായില്\u200d നിന്നും മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d ഡിസ്റ്റ്മിങ്ങ്', 'sr': 'Morfološka disambiguacija iz podataka', 'si': 'මොර්ෆෝලික් අවස්ථාවක් නිර්මාණය', 'so': 'Qeymeysiga qoyska', 'sv': 'Morfologisk ogiltigförklaring från stamdata', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிடும் தரவிலிருந்து மாறுபாடு', 'ur': 'ڈیٹا کی پیدائش سے زیادہ غیر منطقی غیر منطقی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu tạo hóa từ các dữ liệu', 'bg': 'Морфологично разграничаване от произтичащите данни', 'da': 'Morfolisk forståelse fra stammende data', 'nl': 'Morfologische aanduiding van stamming data', 'hr': 'Morfološka disambiguacija iz podataka', 'de': 'Morphologische Begriffsklärung von Stammdaten', 'id': 'Pengambiguasi morfologis dari data yang berasal', 'ko': '어간 데이터의 형태 변조', 'tr': 'Data öňünden näsazlyk ýok edip bilmek', 'sw': 'Kutofautiana na vifolojia kutoka taarifa za kupiga kura', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'ناپدید کردن مورفولاژیک از اولین داده\u200cها', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիական բացատրություն տվյալներից,', 'sq': 'Disambiguacioni morfologjik nga të dhënat që vijnë', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Məlumatlardan Morphological Disambiguation', 'bn': 'ডাটা থেকে মরোফোলজিক্যাল বিভ্রান্তিগুয়েশন', 'ca': 'La desambiguació morfològica de les dades que surten', 'cs': 'Morfologické rozcestnění od příchozích dat', 'et': 'Morfoloogiline eristamine andmete kogumisest', 'bs': 'Morfološka disambiguacija iz podataka', 'fi': 'Morfologinen erottelu lähtötietojen perusteella', 'jv': 'buddy', 'sk': 'Morfološka razločitev iz izhajajočih podatkov', 'he': 'ניתוח מורפולוגי ממידע נוצר', 'ha': 'QRegExp', 'bo': 'Morphological disambiguation from stemming data'}
{'en': 'Morphological analysis and disambiguation is an important task and a crucial preprocessing step in natural language processing of morphologically rich languages. Kinyarwanda, a morphologically rich language, currently lacks tools for automated morphological analysis. While linguistically curated finite state tools can be easily developed for morphological analysis, the morphological richness of the language allows many ambiguous analyses to be produced, requiring effective disambiguation. In this paper, we propose learning to morphologically disambiguate Kinyarwanda verbal forms from a new stemming dataset collected through crowd-sourcing. Using feature engineering and a feed-forward neural network based classifier, we achieve about 89 % non-contextualized disambiguation accuracy. Our experiments reveal that inflectional properties of stems and morpheme association rules are the most discriminative features for disambiguation.', 'ar': 'يعد التحليل الصرفي وإزالة الغموض مهمة مهمة وخطوة معالجة مسبقة حاسمة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية للغات الغنية شكليًا. Kinyarwanda ، لغة غنية شكليًا ، تفتقر حاليًا إلى أدوات التحليل الصرفي الآلي. بينما يمكن تطوير أدوات الحالة المحدودة المنسقة لغويًا بسهولة للتحليل الصرفي ، فإن الثراء المورفولوجي للغة يسمح بإنتاج العديد من التحليلات الغامضة ، مما يتطلب توضيحًا فعالًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تعلم كيفية إزالة الغموض شكليًا عن الأشكال اللفظية للكينيارواندا من مجموعة بيانات مشتقة جديدة تم جمعها من خلال التعهيد الجماعي. باستخدام هندسة الميزات ومصنف قائم على الشبكة العصبية للتغذية الأمامية ، نحقق حوالي 89٪ من دقة توضيح غير السياقية. تكشف تجاربنا أن الخصائص التصريفية للسيقان وقواعد ارتباط التشكل هي أكثر السمات تمييزًا لإزالة الغموض.', 'es': 'El análisis morfológico y la desambiguación son una tarea importante y un paso de preprocesamiento crucial en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural de lenguajes ricos morfológicamente. El kinyarwanda, un lenguaje rico en morfología, actualmente carece de herramientas para el análisis morfológico automatizado. Si bien las herramientas de estado finito seleccionadas lingüísticamente se pueden desarrollar fácilmente para el análisis morfológico, la riqueza morfológica del lenguaje permite producir muchos análisis ambiguos, lo que requiere una desambiguación efectiva. En este artículo, proponemos aprender a desambiguar morfológicamente las formas verbales kinyarwanda a partir de un nuevo conjunto de datos de derivación recopilados a través de crowdsourcing. Mediante el uso de la ingeniería de características y un clasificador basado en redes neuronales feed-forward, logramos una precisión de desambiguación no contextualizada del 89%. Nuestros experimentos revelan que las propiedades de inflexión de los tallos y las reglas de asociación de morfemas son las características más discriminatorias para la desambiguación.', 'pt': 'A análise e desambiguação morfológica é uma tarefa importante e uma etapa crucial de pré-processamento no processamento de linguagem natural de línguas morfologicamente ricas. Kinyarwanda, uma linguagem morfologicamente rica, atualmente carece de ferramentas para análise morfológica automatizada. Embora as ferramentas de estado finito com curadoria linguística possam ser facilmente desenvolvidas para análise morfológica, a riqueza morfológica da linguagem permite que muitas análises ambíguas sejam produzidas, exigindo uma desambiguação eficaz. Neste artigo, propomos aprender a desambiguar morfologicamente as formas verbais do Kinyarwanda a partir de um novo conjunto de dados de derivação coletado por meio de crowdsourcing. Usando engenharia de recursos e um classificador baseado em rede neural feed-forward, alcançamos cerca de 89% de precisão de desambiguação não contextualizada. Nossos experimentos revelam que propriedades flexionais de radicais e regras de associação de morfemas são as características mais discriminativas para desambiguação.', 'fr': "L'analyse morphologique et la désambiguïsation constituent une tâche importante et une étape cruciale du prétraitement dans le traitement du langage naturel des langues riches en morphologie. Le kinyarwanda, un langage riche en morphologie, manque actuellement d'outils pour l'analyse morphologique automatisée. Alors que des outils d'états finis organisés linguistiquement peuvent être facilement développés pour l'analyse morphologique, la richesse morphologique du langage permet de produire de nombreuses analyses ambiguës, nécessitant une désambiguïsation efficace. Dans cet article, nous proposons d'apprendre à désambiguïser morphologiquement les formes verbales kinyarwanda à partir d'un nouveau jeu de données sur les racines collectées par le crowd-sourcing. Grâce à l'ingénierie des caractéristiques et à un classificateur basé sur un réseau de neurones à rétroaction, nous atteignons une précision de désambiguïsation non contextualisée d'environ 89\xa0%. Nos expériences révèlent que les propriétés flexionnelles des tiges et les règles d'association des morphèmes sont les caractéristiques les plus discriminantes pour la désambiguïsation.", 'ru': 'Морфологический анализ и дезагрегирование - важная задача и решающий этап предварительной обработки в обработке естественного языка морфологически богатых языков. Kinyarwanda, морфологически богатый язык, в настоящее время не имеет инструментов для автоматизированного морфологического анализа. В то время как лингвистически курируемые инструменты конечного состояния могут быть легко разработаны для морфологического анализа, морфологическое богатство языка позволяет производить много неоднозначных анализов, требующих эффективной дезагрегации. В этой статье мы предлагаем научиться морфологически отделять вербальные формы киньяруанда от нового стекающего набора данных, собранных с помощью краудсорсинга. Используя конструкцию признаков и классификатор на основе нейронной сети с прямой связью, мы достигаем примерно 89% неконтекстуализированной точности дезактивации. Наши эксперименты показывают, что инфлекторные свойства стеблей и правила ассоциации морфем являются самыми дискриминационными признаками для расчленения.', 'hi': 'रूपात्मक विश्लेषण और बहुविकल्पी एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है और रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं के प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक महत्वपूर्ण पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण कदम है। Kinyarwanda, एक रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषा, वर्तमान में स्वचालित रूपात्मक विश्लेषण के लिए उपकरणों की कमी है। जबकि भाषाई रूप से क्यूरेट किए गए परिमित राज्य उपकरणों को रूपात्मक विश्लेषण के लिए आसानी से विकसित किया जा सकता है, भाषा की रूपात्मक समृद्धि कई अस्पष्ट विश्लेषणों का उत्पादन करने की अनुमति देती है, जिसके लिए प्रभावी बहुविकल्पी की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम भीड़-सोर्सिंग के माध्यम से एकत्र किए गए एक नए स्टेमिंग डेटासेट से किन्यारवांडा मौखिक रूपों को रूपात्मक रूप से विभाजित करने के लिए सीखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। फीचर इंजीनियरिंग और एक फीड-फॉरवर्ड न्यूरल नेटवर्क आधारित क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करके, हम लगभग 89% गैर-प्रासंगिक बहुविकल्पीय सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि उपजी और morpheme एसोसिएशन नियमों के inflectional गुण disambiguation के लिए सबसे भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताएं हैं।', 'zh': '形之分除歧义形之多言也自然语言处之一务,机之预处理也。 Kinyarwanda者,形态学之盛言也,今乏于自形态学之具。 虽语言学画有限之具,可以易发于形态学,而言形态学丰富性许多模糊之说,须有效者消歧义。 本文,议从众包收新词干数集中学习除Kinyarwanda动词文之歧义。 用特工及前馈神经网络分器,约89%非上下文消歧义准确率。 臣等实验明,词干与语素关格者,消歧义之最异也。', 'ja': '形態学的分析と曖昧さ解消は、形態学的に豊富な言語の自然言語処理における重要なタスクであり、重要な前処理ステップである。形態学的に豊富な言語であるキニャルワンダ語は、現在、自動化された形態分析のためのツールを欠いている。言語学的にキュレーションされた有限状態ツールは、形態学的分析のために容易に開発することができるが、言語の形態学的豊かさは、効果的な曖昧さ解消を必要とする多くの曖昧な分析を生成することを可能にする。この論文では、クラウドソーシングを通じて収集された新しい派生データセットからキニャルワンダ語形を形態学的に曖昧にすることを提案します。フィーチャーエンジニアリングとフィードフォワード型ニューラルネットワークベースの分類器を使用して、約89 ％の非文脈化された曖昧さ解消精度を達成します。我々の実験は、茎の屈曲特性とモルフェーム関連則が、曖昧さを解消するための最も判別可能な特徴であることを明らかにした。', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach agus céim ríthábhachtach réamhphróiseála é anailís mhoirfeolaíoch agus dí-athbhrí i bpróiseáil nádúrtha teangacha atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de. Tá easpa uirlisí le haghaidh anailíse moirfeolaíoch uathoibrithe ar Kinyarwanda, teanga atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de. Cé gur féidir uirlisí stáit críochta atá coimeádta go teanga a fhorbairt go héasca le haghaidh anailíse moirfeolaíoch, ceadaíonn saibhreas moirfeolaíoch na teanga go leor anailísí débhríoch a dhéanamh, rud a éilíonn dí-athbhrí éifeachtach. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn foghlaim conas foirmeacha briathartha Kinyarwanda a dhídhébhriú go moirfeolaíoch ó thacar sonraí eascair nua a bhailítear trí slua-fhoinsiú. Ag baint úsáide as innealtóireacht gné agus aicmitheoir líonra néar-chothaithe ar aghaidh bunaithe, bainimid amach thart ar 89% cruinneas dí-athbhrí neamh-chomhthéacsúla. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh gurb iad airíonna infhillteacha gais agus rialacha comhlachais moirféime na gnéithe idirdhealaitheacha is mó le haghaidh dí-athbhrí.', 'hu': 'A morfológiai elemzés és egyértelműsítés fontos feladat és fontos előfeldolgozási lépés a morfológiailag gazdag nyelvek természetes nyelvi feldolgozásában. A Kinyarwanda, egy morfológiailag gazdag nyelv, jelenleg hiányzik az automatizált morfológiai elemzéshez szükséges eszközök. Míg a nyelvtanilag kurátorozott véges állapotú eszközök könnyen fejleszthetők morfológiai elemzéshez, a nyelv morfológiai gazdagsága lehetővé teszi számos kétértelmű elemzés készítését, amelyek hatékony egyértelműsítést igényelnek. Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy megtanuljuk a kinyarwanda verbális formák morfológiailag egyértelművé tételét a crowd-sourcing útján összegyűjtött új stamming adatkészletből. A funkciótervezés és a feed-forward neurális hálózat alapú osztályozó segítségével körülbelül 89%-os kontextuális egyértelműsítési pontosságot érünk el. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a szárak hajlékonysági tulajdonságai és a morfém asszociációs szabályok a megkülönböztető jellemzők.', 'el': 'Η μορφολογική ανάλυση και αποσαφήνιση είναι ένα σημαντικό έργο και ένα κρίσιμο βήμα προεπεξεργασίας στην επεξεργασία της φυσικής γλώσσας των μορφολογικά πλούσιων γλωσσών. Η Κινυάρβάντα, μια μορφολογικά πλούσια γλώσσα, σήμερα στερείται εργαλείων για αυτοματοποιημένη μορφολογική ανάλυση. Ενώ γλωσσικά επιμελημμένα εργαλεία πεπερασμένης κατάστασης μπορούν εύκολα να αναπτυχθούν για μορφολογική ανάλυση, ο μορφολογικός πλούτος της γλώσσας επιτρέπει την παραγωγή πολλών διφορούμενων αναλύσεων, που απαιτούν αποτελεσματική αποσαφήνιση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε την εκμάθηση της μορφολογικής αποσαφήνισης των λεκτικών μορφών από ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που συλλέγονται μέσω του κοινού. Χρησιμοποιώντας μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών και έναν ταξινομητή βασισμένο σε νευρωνικό δίκτυο, επιτυγχάνουμε περίπου 89% ακρίβεια αποσαφήνισης χωρίς πλαίσιο. Τα πειράματά μας αποκαλύπτουν ότι οι καμπυλωτικές ιδιότητες των στελεχών και οι κανόνες συσχέτισης μορφέμων είναι τα πιο διακριτικά χαρακτηριστικά για την αποσαφήνιση.', 'ka': 'მორფოლოგიური ანალიზია და განამბიგუაცია არის მნიშვნელოვანი რაოდენობა და მნიშვნელოვანი პრეპროცესი ნაწილის მორფოლოგიურად ღარიბული ენების პროცესი. Name თუმცა ენგუფისტიკურად დასრულებული სტატის ხელსაწყოები შეიძლება მორპოლოგიური ანალიზაციისთვის ადვილად განვითარება, ენის მორპოლოგიური ბედნიერება უნდა გამოიყენება მრავალური ან ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ მორპოლოგიურად განსხვავებას Kinyarwanda გერბალური ფორმების განსხვავებას, რომელიც ახალი გადასხვავებული მონაცემების სეტიდან, რომელიც მუშაობის გამ ფუნქციების ინეზინერიცია და ნეიროლური ქსელის კლასიფიკაცია გამოყენება, ჩვენ 89% უნდა კონტექსტუალურად განსხვავებული წარმოდგენა. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩნენ, რომ სტუმენტების და მორფემების აზოციაციის წესების ინფექტუციონალური შესახებ უფრო დისკრიმინალური შესახებ', 'it': "L'analisi morfologica e la disambiguazione sono un compito importante e un passo fondamentale di pre-elaborazione del linguaggio naturale di linguaggi morfologicamente ricchi. Kinyarwanda, un linguaggio morfologicamente ricco, attualmente manca di strumenti per l'analisi morfologica automatizzata. Mentre strumenti di stato finito curati linguisticamente possono essere facilmente sviluppati per l'analisi morfologica, la ricchezza morfologica del linguaggio consente di produrre molte analisi ambigue, che richiedono una disambiguazione efficace. In questo articolo, proponiamo di imparare a disambiguare morfologicamente le forme verbali Kinyarwanda da un nuovo set di dati stamming raccolti attraverso il crowd-sourcing. Utilizzando l'ingegneria delle funzionalità e un classificatore basato sulla rete neurale feed-forward, otteniamo circa l'89% di accuratezza della disambiguazione non contestualizzata. I nostri esperimenti rivelano che le proprietà inflessionali degli steli e le regole di associazione dei morfemi sono le caratteristiche più discriminatorie per la disambiguazione.", 'lt': 'Morphological analysis and disambiguation is an important task and a crucial preprocessing step in natural language processing of morphologically rich languages.  Kinjarwanda, morfologiškai turtinga kalba, šiuo metu neturi automatinės morfologinės analizės priemonių. Nors kalbiniu požiūriu patobulintos ribotos būklės priemonės gali būti lengvai sukurtos morfologinei analizei, kalbos morfologinis turtingumas leidžia atlikti daugelį dviprasmiškų analizių, reikalaujančių veiksmingo nedviprasmiškumo. Šiame dokumente siūlome mokytis morfologiškai atskirti Kinjarwandos žodines formas iš naujo duomenų rinkinio, surinkto naudojant visuomenės šaltinius. Naudojant savybių inžineriją ir išankstinį nervų tinklo klasifikatorių, pasiekiame apie 89 proc. nesusijusio neapibrėžtumo tikslumo. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad kamienių ir morfų asociacijos taisyklės yra labiausiai diskriminuojančios nedviprasmiškumo savybės.', 'kk': 'Морфологикалық анализ және белсендіру - маңызды тапсырма және табиғи тілдерді морфологиялық баяны тілдерді өңдеу үшін маңызды қадам. Киняруанда, морфологиялық баяны тіл, қазіргі уақытта автоматты морфологиялық анализ үшін құралдар жоқ. Тілдің морфологиялық анализ үшін лингвистикалық аяқталған күй- жай құралдары оңай жасауға мүмкін, тілінің морфологиялық бағасы көп анализ жасауға мүмкіндік береді, әсер етілікті де Бұл қағазда, Киняруанды морфологиялық түрде көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілікті арқылы жинақталған жаңа көпшілік деректер жинағының вербалдық формаларын өзгерту үшін Функциялық инженерлік және ақпараттағы невралдық желіне негізделген классификаторын қолдану үшін, 89% контекстуалды дезамбигациялық дұрыстығын жеткіземіз. Біздің тәжірибеміздің стимдер мен морфемді байланыстыру ережелерінің ең дискриминациялық қасиеттері дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Analisis morfologik dan penyelesaian adalah tugas penting dan langkah pemprosesan penting dalam pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi bahasa yang kaya morfologik. Kinyarwanda, bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik, kini kekurangan alat untuk analisis morfologik automatik. Walaupun alat keadaan tertentu yang dikurasikan secara bahasa boleh mudah dikembangkan untuk analisis morfologik, kekayaan morfologik bahasa membolehkan banyak analisis yang ambiguh dihasilkan, memerlukan penyelesaian yang efektif. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan belajar untuk memadamkan bentuk verbal Kinyarwanda secara morfologik dari set data yang baru yang dikumpulkan melalui crowd-sourcing. Using feature engineering and a feed-forward neural network based classifier, we achieve about 89% non-contextualized disambiguation accuracy.  Eksperimen kami mengungkapkan bahawa ciri-ciri pengangkutan stem dan peraturan persekutuan morpheme adalah ciri-ciri yang paling diskriminatif untuk tidak ambiguasi.', 'mk': 'Морфолошката анализа и раздвоумувањето претставуваат важна задача и клучен предпроцесивен чекор во природното обработување на јазици на морфолошки богати јазици. Кинјарванда, морфолошки богат јазик, моментно недостасува алатки за автоматизирана морфолошка анализа. И покрај тоа што јазички курираните ограничени државни алатки може лесно да се развијат за морфолошка анализа, морфолошката богатост на јазикот овозможува да се произведуваат многу двогумни анализи, кои бараат ефикасна дебабигуација. Во овој весник, предлагаме да се научи морфолошки да ги раздвои вербалните форми на Кинјарванда од нов потекнувачки податок собран преку публички извори. Using feature engineering and a feed-forward neural network based classifier, we achieve about 89% non-contextualized disambiguation accuracy.  Our experiments reveal that inflectional properties of stems and morpheme association rules are the most discriminative features for disambiguation.', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണവും വിഭാഗവും ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ്. സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ സമ്പന്ന കിന്യാര്\u200dവാണ്ട, ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നമായ ഭാഷ, ഇപ്പോള്\u200d സ്വയം മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണത്തിനുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണത്തിനായി ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d എളുപ്പമായി സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, ഭാഷയുടെ മ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d കിന്യാര്\u200dവാണ്ടാവിന്റെ വാര്\u200dമ്മില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ സ്റ്റിംഗ് ഡാറ് Using feature engineering and a feed-forward neural network based classifier, we achieve about 89% non-contextualized disambiguation accuracy.  നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു സ്റ്റേമിന്റെയും മോര്\u200dഫീമിന്റെയും സംഘത്തിന്റെയും നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമ', 'pl': 'Analiza morfologiczna i rozproszona jest ważnym zadaniem i kluczowym etapem wstępnego przetwarzania języka naturalnego języka bogatego morfologicznie. Kinyarwanda, bogaty morfologicznie język, obecnie brakuje narzędzi do zautomatyzowanej analizy morfologicznej. Podczas gdy językowo kuracjonowane narzędzia stanu skończonego mogą być łatwo opracowane do analizy morfologicznej, bogactwo morfologiczne języka pozwala na przygotowanie wielu niejednoznacznych analiz, wymagających skutecznego rozproszenia. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy naukę morfologicznego rozdzielania form werbalnych Kinyarwanda z nowego zbioru danych stamming zebranych poprzez crowdsourcing. Wykorzystując inżynierię funkcji i klasyfikator oparty na sieci neuronowej, uzyskujemy około 89% niekontekstualizowanej dokładności dyskryminacji. Nasze eksperymenty ujawniają, że właściwości przekształcenia łodyg i reguły skojarzeń morfemów są najbardziej dyskryminującymi cechami dyskryminacyjnymi.', 'no': 'Morfologisk analyse og disambiguasjon er ein viktig oppgåve og ein viktig forhandteringssteg i naturspråk-handtering av morfologisk rike språk. Kinyarwanda, eit morfologisk rikt språk, manglar no verktøy for automatisk morfologisk analyse. Mens språket er korrigert, avslutta tilstandsverktøy kan enkelt utvikla for morfologisk analyse, kan morfologiske rykkhet av språket gjere at mange avslutta analyser kan produserast og kreve effektivt disambiguasjon. I denne papiret foreslår vi læring om å morfologisk forskyve Kinyarwanda verbale formar frå eit nytt stemmingsdataset samla gjennom crowd sourcing. I bruk av funksjonsengineering og ein klassifiserer basert på kjeldenettverk, oppnår vi omtrent 89% ikkje-kontekstualisert forskyvingsakkurat. Eksperimentane våre viser at infleksjonelle eigenskapar av stemmer og morphemetilknytingsreglar er dei mest diskriminasjonale eigenskapane for disambiguasjon.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi morfoloġika u d-diżambiguazzjoni huma kompitu importanti u pass kruċjali ta’ preproċessar fl-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi rikki morfoloġikament. Kinyarwanda, lingwa morfoloġikament rikka, bħalissa m’għandhiex għodod għall-analiżi morfoloġika awtomatizzata. Filwaqt li għodod tal-istat finit ikkurati lingwistikament jistgħu jiġu żviluppati faċilment għall-analiżi morfoloġika, ir-rikkezza morfoloġika tal-lingwa tippermetti li jiġu prodotti ħafna analiżi ambigwi, li teħtieġ diżambigwazzjoni effettiva. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu t-tagħlim biex jiġu diżambigwati b’mod morfoloġiku l-forom verbali ta’ Kinyarwanda minn sett ġdid ta’ dejta li jinħoloq miġbur permezz ta’ crowd sourcing. Bl-użu ta’ inġinerija tal-karatteristiċi u klassifikatur ibbażat fuq netwerk newrali feed-forward, inkisbu madwar 89% preċiżjoni ta’ diżambigwazzjoni mhux kuntestwalizzata. Our experiments reveal that inflectional properties of stems and morpheme association rules are the most discriminative features for disambiguation.', 'ro': 'Analiza morfologică și dezambiguizarea sunt o sarcină importantă și un pas crucial de pre-procesare în procesarea limbajului natural a limbilor bogate din punct de vedere morfologic. Kinyarwanda, un limbaj bogat din punct de vedere morfologic, lipsește în prezent instrumente pentru analiza morfologică automatizată. Deși instrumentele de stare finită curate lingvistic pot fi dezvoltate cu ușurință pentru analiza morfologică, bogăția morfologică a limbajului permite producerea multor analize ambigue, necesitând o dezambiguizare eficientă. În această lucrare, vă propunem să învățați să dezambiguizați morfologic formele verbale Kinyarwanda dintr-un nou set de date de staming colectat prin crowd-sourcing. Folosind ingineria caracteristicilor și un clasificator bazat pe rețele neurale feed-forward, obținem aproximativ 89% precizie de dezambiguizare non-contextualizată. Experimentele noastre dezvăluie că proprietățile inflexionale ale tulpinilor și regulile de asociere a morfemelor sunt cele mai discriminatorii trăsături pentru dezambiguizare.', 'mn': 'Морфологик шинжилгээ, буруутгах нь чухал ажил, байгалийн хэл болон морфологик баян хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн чухал алхам юм. Киньяруанда, морфологийн баян хэл, одоо автоматжуулсан морфологик шинжилгээнд хэрэгсэл байхгүй. Хэдийгээр хэлний төгсгөл байр суурилсан төгсгөлийн хэрэгсэл морфологик шинжилгээнд амархан хөгжүүлж болох ч хэлний морфологик баялаг нь олон хэмжээний шинжилгээг бүтээж, үр дүнтэй эмгэгтэй байдал шаард Энэ цаасан дээр бид Киньяруандын үгийн хэлбэрээс шинэ эхлэл өгөгдлийн санаагаар цуглуулагдсан шинэ өгөгдлийн санаануудыг өөрчлөх сургалтыг санал болгож байна. Хэрэглэгчийн инженерчлэл болон мэдрэлийн тархины сүлжээнд суурилсан хэлбэрийг ашиглан бид нөхцөл байдлын бус нөхцөл байдлын тодорхойлолтгүй 89% хүртэл хүргэж чадна. Бидний туршилтууд Стемс болон Морфем холбоотой дүрмийн нөлөөлөл байдлын хувьд хамгийн ялгаатай байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'sr': 'Marfološka analiza i disambiguacija su važan zadatak i ključni korak preobrađivanja prirodnog jezika obrađivanja morfološki bogatih jezika. Kinyarwanda, morfološki bogat jezik, trenutno nedostaje alata za automatsku morfološku analizu. Iako se lingvistički završeni državni alati mogu lako razviti za morfološku analizu, morfološka bogatstva jezika omogućava da se proizvode mnoge ambigutne analize, zahtevajući efikasnu disambiguaciju. U ovom papiru predlažemo da naučimo morfološki disambiguirati Kinyarwandu verbalne forme iz novog nastanka podataka koji su prikupljeni putem izvora gužve. Koristeći inženjerstvo funkcija i klasifikaciju neuralne mreže, postigli smo oko 89% neprekontekstualizirane tačnosti disambiguacije. Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju da su inflekcionalna vlasništva matičnih i morfičkih pravila asocijacije najdiskriminirajuća karakteristika za disambigaciju.', 'si': 'මොර්ෆෝලික් විශ්ලේෂණය සහ අසංක්\u200dරීය විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි වැදගත් වැඩක් සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරීයාත Name භාෂාවික විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා භාෂාවික ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ලේසියෙන් විකෘති වෙන්න පුළුවන්, භාෂාවික විශ්ල මේ පත්තරේ අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කින්යාර්වාන්ඩා වාර්ථාවික විදියට කින්යාර්වාන්ඩා වාර්ථාවික විදියට අලුත් සැ භාවිතාවක් ඉංජින්ජිනියර් සහ ෆීඩ් ෆෝර්වාර්ඩ් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය අධාරිත විශේෂකයෙක් භාවිත කරනවා,  අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා ස්ටීම් සහ මෝර්ෆේම් සම්බන්ධ නීතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණත්වය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ', 'so': "baaritaanka morphologiga iyo kala duwanaanta waa shaqo muhiim ah iyo baaritaanka ka baaraandegista afka asalka ah oo ku baaraandegista luqada hodanka ah. Kinyarwanda, a morphologically rich language, currently lacks tools for automated morphological analysis.  Inta lagu sameeyo qalabka dowladda ee afka Finnishka ah si fudud looga horumariyo baaritaanka morphologiga ah, baaritaanka afka ayaa fasaxa in la sameeyo baaritaano badan oo faa'iido leh, oo loo baahan yahay mid faa'iido leh. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aad si morphological ah u barato noocyada afka badan ee Kinyarwanda ka soo bandhigto taariikhda cusub oo lagu soo ururiyo kooxaha dadweynaha. Isku isticmaalaya injiilka tayada ah iyo fasaxa shabakadda neurada ee ku saleysan cunto-forward, waxaan gaadhaa qiyaastii 89% oo aan la mid aheyn saxda burburka. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in xuquuqda saameyn ku yeelashada xeerarka iyo dhinaca ay yihiin takooridda ugu wada takoorista.", 'sv': 'Morfologisk analys och disambiguation är en viktig uppgift och ett avgörande förbearbetande steg i naturlig språkbearbetning av morfologiskt rika språk. Kinyarwanda, ett morfologiskt rikt språk, saknar idag verktyg för automatiserad morfologisk analys. Även om språkligt kuraterade verktyg för finita tillstånd lätt kan utvecklas för morfologisk analys, tillåter språkets morfologiska rikedom många tvetydiga analyser att produceras, vilket kräver effektiv åtskillnad. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att lära oss att morfologiskt skilja Kinyarwanda verbala former från en ny stamdata insamlad genom crowdsourcing. Med hjälp av funktionsteknik och en feed-forward neural nätverksbaserad klassificering uppnår vi cirka 89% icke-kontextualiserad upplösning noggrannhet. Våra experiment avslöjar att böjande egenskaper hos stammar och morfemassociationsregler är de mest diskriminerande dragen för en otvetydig definition.', 'ta': 'Morphological analysis and discrimination is an important task and a crucial preprocessing step in natural language processing of morphologically rich languages. கினார்வாண்டா மொழியில் சுருக்கப்பட்ட மாநிலை கருவிகள் மொழியை ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு எளிதாக உருவாக்க முடியும் போது, மொழியின் மொழியின் மொழியில் நிறைய அலட்சியம இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கின்யார்வாண்டாவின் வார்த்தை வடிவங்களை புதிய தொடர்பு தரவுத்தளத்திலிருந்து கற்றுக்கொள்ள நினைவுற குணங்கள் பொறியியல் மற்றும் ஒரு feed- forward புதிய பிணையத்தின் வகைப்பாளரை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் குறைந்த 89% பிரிவில்லாத பிரிவினை சரியை ப நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் தொடர்கள் மற்றும் குறிப்பு விதிகளின் தேவைப்படும் விதிகள் என்று குறிப்பிடுகிறது பிரிவினை செய்ய மி', 'ur': 'Morphological analysis and disambiguation are an important task and a crucial preprocessing step in natural language processing of morphology rich languages. کینیارونڈا، ایک مورفولوژیکی ثروت زبان ہے، اکثر اپنے ساتھ مورفولوژیکی تحلیل کے لئے ابزار کم ہیں. حالانکہ زبان کے ذریعہ مطمئن سٹیٹ ٹیٹ تولیس کے لئے آسان طرح طرح کی جاسکتی ہے، زبان کی مورپولوژیکی ثروت کی اجازت دیتی ہے کہ بہت سی مختلف تحلیل پیدا کئے جائیں، جو اثر انصاف کے لئے ضرورت ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے کینیاروڈ کو سیکھنے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ کینیاروڈ کے ذریعہ ایک نئی سٹم ڈیٹ سٹ سے ایک نئی سٹم ڈیٹ سٹ سے جمع کیا گیا ہے۔ فائدٹر انجینژی اور فیڈ فورڈ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کے سامنے کلاسیر کی استعمال کرتا ہے، ہم 89% غیر کنٹکسٹیٹ کی دقیق حاصل کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری آزمائش ظاہر کرتی ہے کہ سٹم اور مورفیم شرکت قانون کے اثرات کے سب سے زیادہ بغیر تفریق کے علائم ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Name While linguistically curated finite state tools can be easily developed for morphological analysis, the morphological richness of the language allows many ambiguous analyses to be produced, requiring effective disambiguation.  Bu qogʻozda, biz Kinyarwanda sohalar formatlarini o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganishni boshlashimiz mumkin. Umumiy sourceri orqali guruhlash orqali yangi tashqi maʼlumotlar tarkibida olingan. Tashqi muhandiya va faqat tarmoqning asosida neyron tarmoqni foydalanishda, biz 89% davom etilmagan deb o'xshash imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi, o'zgarishlar va qoidalar qoidalarining eng cheksiz ajoyib bo'lgan xususiyatlar.", 'vi': 'Phân tích và biến dạng Morphological là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng và là một bước tiến quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ bẩm sinh của các ngôn ngữ có triển vọng. The Kinyarbanda, một ngôn ngữ giàu lịch sự, hiện nay thiếu công cụ để tự động phân tích lịch học. Trong khi các công cụ thể xác định giới hạn được giáo dục ngôn ngữ có thể dễ dàng phát triển cho việc phân tích lịch sử, nhưng sự giàu có của ngôn ngữ cho phép sản xuất nhiều phân tích mơ hồ, đòi hỏi biến dạng hiệu quả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị học cách hóa biến dạng ngôn ngữ của Kinyarbwa từ một bộ dữ liệu nội gián mới thu thập qua nguồn hàng đông. Sử dụng bộ chế tạo đặc trưng và phân loại mạng thần kinh truyền, chúng ta đạt độ chính xác không thể thao túng. Những thí nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy tính chất uốn ngược của các gốc cây và các quy tắc tổ chức biến dạng là yếu tố phân biệt nhất.', 'bg': 'Морфологичният анализ и разграничаването е важна задача и решаваща стъпка на предварителната обработка на естествения език на морфологично богати езици. Киняранда, морфологично богат език, понастоящем липсват инструменти за автоматизиран морфологичен анализ. Докато лингвистично курирани инструменти за крайно състояние могат лесно да бъдат разработени за морфологичен анализ, морфологичното богатство на езика позволява да бъдат направени много двусмислени анализи, изискващи ефективно разграничаване. В настоящата статия предлагаме обучение за морфологично разграничаване на словесните форми на Киняранда от нов набор от данни, събрани чрез crowd sourcing. Използвайки функционален инженеринг и класификатор, базиран на невронна мрежа, ние постигаме около 89% неконтекстуализирана точност на разграничаване. Нашите експерименти разкриват, че наклонителните свойства на стъблата и морфемните асоциации са най-дискриминационните характеристики за разграничаване.', 'nl': 'Morfologische analyse en verduidelijking is een belangrijke taak en een cruciale voorverwerkingsstap in natuurlijke taalverwerking van morfologisch rijke talen. Kinyarwanda, een morfologisch rijke taal, mist momenteel tools voor geautomatiseerde morfologische analyse. Terwijl linguïstisch gecureerde eindige state tools gemakkelijk kunnen worden ontwikkeld voor morfologische analyse, maakt de morfologische rijkdom van de taal het mogelijk om veel dubbelzinnige analyses te produceren, die effectieve verduidelijking vereisen. In dit artikel stellen we voor om morfologisch te leren scheiden Kinyarwanda verbale vormen uit een nieuwe stamming dataset verzameld via crowdsourcing. Met behulp van feature engineering en een feed-forward neural network based classifier, bereiken we ongeveer 89% niet-contextualiseerde disambiguation nauwkeurigheid. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de buigingseigenschappen van stengels en morfeme associatieregels de meest discriminerende kenmerken zijn voor verduidelijking.', 'da': 'Morfologisk analyse og forståelse er en vigtig opgave og et afgørende forbearbejdningstrin i naturlig sprogbehandling af morfologisk rige sprog. Kinyarwanda, et morfologisk rigt sprog, mangler i øjeblikket værktøjer til automatiseret morfologisk analyse. Mens sprogligt kuraterede finite state-værktøjer nemt kan udvikles til morfologisk analyse, tillader sprogets morfologiske rigdom mange tvetydige analyser at blive produceret, hvilket kræver effektiv adskillelse. I denne artikel foreslår vi at lære at adskille Kinyarwanda verbale former morfologisk fra et nyt stamming datasæt indsamlet gennem crowd-sourcing. Ved hjælp af feature engineering og en feed-forward neuralt netværk baseret klassificering, opnår vi omkring 89% ikke-kontekstualiseret adskillelsesnøjagtighed. Vores eksperimenter afslører, at bøjelige egenskaber af stængler og morfem associationsregler er de mest diskriminerende træk for forståelse.', 'hr': 'Marfološka analiza i disambiguacija su važan zadatak i ključni korak preobrađivanja prirodnog jezika obrađivanja morfološki bogatih jezika. Kinyarwanda, morfološki bogat jezik, trenutno nedostaje alata za automatsku morfološku analizu. Iako se za morfološku analizu lako razvijaju terminalni državni alati jezika, morfološka bogatstva jezika omogućava proizvesti mnoge ambigutne analize, zahtijevajući učinkovitu disambigaciju. U ovom papiru predlažemo naučiti morfološki disambiguirati Kinyarwandu verbalne oblike iz novog nastanka podataka okupljenog putem izvora masovnih izvora. Koristeći inženjerstvo stručnjaka i klasifikaciju neuralne mreže, postigli smo oko 89% ne-kontekstualizirane tačnosti disambiguacije. Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju da su inflekcionalna vlasništva matičnih i morfičkih pravila asocijacije najdiskriminirajuća osobina za disambigaciju.', 'id': 'Analisis morfologi dan penyelesaian adalah tugas penting dan langkah penting yang memproses dalam proses bahasa alami bahasa yang kaya morfologi. Kinyarwanda, bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis, saat ini kekurangan alat untuk analisis morfologis otomatis. Sementara alat-alat negara terbatas yang dikurasi secara bahasa dapat mudah dikembangkan untuk analisis morfologi, kekayaan morfologi bahasa memungkinkan banyak analisis yang ambigus untuk diproduksi, membutuhkan pengambilan efektif. In this paper, we propose learning to morphologically disambiguate Kinyarwanda verbal forms from a new stemming dataset collected through crowd-sourcing.  Menggunakan teknik karakteristik dan klasifikasi jaringan saraf feed-forward berdasarkan, kami mencapai sekitar 89% akurasi desambiguasi tidak kontekstualisasi. Eksperimen kami mengungkapkan bahwa properti infleksional dari stems dan aturan asosiasi morpheme adalah karakteristik paling diskriminatif untuk tidak ambiguasi.', 'ko': '형태가 풍부한 언어의 자연 언어 처리에서 형태 분석과 변조는 중요한 임무이자 관건적인 예처리 절차이다.Kinyarwanda는 형태가 풍부한 언어로 현재 자동 형태 분석에 사용할 도구가 부족하다.형태 분석을 위해 언어 기획의 유한한 상태 도구를 쉽게 개발할 수 있지만 언어의 형태 풍부성은 많은 잘못된 의미 분석을 생성할 수 있기 때문에 효과적인 오류 제거가 필요하다.이 논문에서 우리는 형태학적으로 지니아 르완다어 동사 형식의 잘못된 뜻을 없애고 새로운 어간 데이터 집합을 패키지로 수집하는 것을 배울 것을 제안한다.특징 공학과 피드백 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 분류기를 사용하여 우리는 약 89%의 비상문 변조 정밀도를 실현했다.우리의 실험은 어간의 굴절 특성과 어소 관련 규칙이 가장 구별되는 소멸 특징이라는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'de': 'Morphologische Analyse und Disambiguation ist eine wichtige Aufgabe und ein entscheidender Vorverarbeitungsschritt in der natürlichen Sprachverarbeitung morphologisch reicher Sprachen. Kinyarwanda, eine morphologisch reiche Sprache, fehlt derzeit an Werkzeugen für automatisierte morphologische Analysen. Während linguistisch kuratierte Finite State Tools für die morphologische Analyse leicht entwickelt werden können, ermöglicht der morphologische Reichtum der Sprache viele mehrdeutige Analysen, die eine effektive Disambiguation erfordern. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, Kinyarwanda-verbale Formen aus einem neuen Stamming-Datensatz morphologisch zu unterscheiden, der durch Crowdsourcing gesammelt wurde. Mit Feature Engineering und einem feed-forward neuronalen Netzwerk basierten Klassifikator erreichen wir etwa 89% nicht kontextualisierte Disambiguation Genauigkeit. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass Flexionseigenschaften von Stängeln und Morphem-Assoziationsregeln die diskriminierendsten Merkmale für die Begriffsklärung sind.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Kimorphological na kutokubalika ni kazi muhimu na hatua muhimu ya upasuaji katika upasuaji wa lugha za asili kwa lugha za kiutajiri. Kinyarwanda, lugha yenye utajiri wa kimorphologically, kwa sasa hauna vifaa vya uchambuzi wa kimaadili. Wakati vifaa vinavyofungwa kwa lugha vinaweza kutengenezwa kwa urahisi kwa uchambuzi wa kimaadilojia, utajiri wa kifolojia wa lugha unaruhusu uchambuzi mwingi wa kutosha, unaohitaji kutofautisha kwa ufanisi. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza kujifunza kwa vifo vya kimaadilojia kutofautisha aina mbalimbali ya Kinyarwanda kutoka kwenye seti mpya ya kura zilizokusanywa kupitia vyanzo vya umma. Kwa kutumia miundo mbinu na mwangazaji wa mtandao wa neura anayeishi mbele, tunafanikiwa takriban asilimia 89 ya ukosefu wa kutofautisha. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa utaratibu wenye ushawishi wa misitu na sheria za umoja wa kifo ni vipengele vinavyotofautiana zaidi.', 'tr': 'Marfolojik analýzy we çykyş etmek möhüm zadyr we tebigy dilleriň morfolojik baý dilleriniň işlemesinde örän möhüm hereketlerdir. Kinyarwanda, morfologiýaly baý dil, häzirçe awtomatik morfolojik analizi üçin esbaplar ýok. Dillerde boýunça durum guramlary morfolojik analýusiýa üçin aňsat döredilip biler, diliň morfolojik baýramçylygy birnäçe wajyp analýusiýa döretmäge rugsat berýär we täsirli bir şekilde täsirli ýok edip biler. Bu kagyzda, biz Kinyarwandany köp sourcing bilen toplanýan täze başlangyç veri setirinden morpholojik şeklinde üýtgetmegi teklip edip otyrýarys Features engineering we feed-forward neural network klassifikatçisini ullanýarys, 89% contextualized disambiguation dogrylygyny başarýarys. Bizim deneylerimiz, süzme we morfüm birleşme kurallarynyň etkileşimli özellikleriniň azalmak üçin iň diskrimi özellikleridir.', 'af': "Morfologiese analisie en ontsammings is 'n belangrike taak en 'n cruciaal voorprosessering stap in natuurlike taal verwerking van morfologiese ryk tale. Name Alhoewel lingwisieslik uitgeleide eindelike staat nutsprogramme maklik ontwikkeld kan word vir morfologiese analisie, laat die morfologiese rykdom van die taal baie ongelukkige analisies toe om te produseer, wat effektief ontsamminging benodig word. In hierdie papier stel ons voorstel om te leer om Kinyarwanda verbale vorms te morfologiese ontsamplig van 'n nuwe stammende datastel wat deur skare-sourcing versamel word. Gebruik ons funksie inženiering en 'n feed-vorentoe neuralnetwerk gebaseerde klassifiseerder, het ons omtrent 89% nie-contextualiseerde ontsammings-presies bereik. Ons eksperimente openbaar dat infleksionele eienskappe van stamme en morfome assosiasie reëls die mees diskriminasiewe eienskappe vir ontsammings is.", 'sq': 'Analiza morfologjike dhe çambiguacioni është një detyrë e rëndësishme dhe një hap vendimtar paraprocesues në procesimin natyror të gjuhëve morfologjikisht të pasura. Kinyarwanda, një gjuhë morfologjikisht e pasur, aktualisht nuk ka mjete për analizë morfologjike automatike. Ndërsa mjetet e kufizuara në mënyrë gjuhësore mund të zhvillohen lehtë për analizë morfologjike, pasuria morfologjike e gjuhës lejon të prodhohen shumë analiza të qarta, duke kërkuar çambiguacion efektiv. Në këtë letër, propozojmë mësimin për të çambiguar në mënyrë morfologjike format verbale Kinyarwanda nga një grup i ri i të dhënave që rrjedhin mbledhur nëpërmjet burimeve publike. Duke përdorur inxhinierinë e karakteristikave dhe një klasifikues të rrjetit nervor feed-forward, ne arrijmë rreth 89% saktësinë jo-kontekstuale të çambiguacionit. Eksperimentet tona zbulojnë se pronat e rrënjës dhe rregullat e shoqërimit të morfemës janë karakteristikat më diskriminuese për çambiguacionin.', 'fa': 'تحلیل مورفولوژیکی و نامبوغگویی یک کار مهم و یک قدم پیش پردازش مهم در پردازش زبان طبیعی از زبانهای مورفولوژیکی ثروتمند است. Kinyarwanda, a morphologically rich language, currently lacks tools for automated morphological analysis. در حالی که ابزارهای وضعیت محدودیت زبان\u200cشناسی برای تحلیل مورفولوژیکی آسان توسعه می\u200cشود، ثروت مورفولوژیکی زبان اجازه می\u200cدهد بسیاری از تحلیل\u200cهای مختلف تولید شود، و نیاز به ناپدید کردن موثر است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که یادگیری برای مورفولوژیکی از فرم\u200cهای کلماتی کینیارواندا را از یک مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای جدیدی که از طریق سرمایه\u200cگذاری جمعیت جمعیت جمعیت می\u200cآورند را ناتوان کنیم. استفاده از مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای ویژه و یک شبکه\u200cهای عصبی که بر اساس طبقه\u200cای روشن می\u200cشود، تقریباً ۹۸ درصد دقیقات ناآزمایش غیر موقعیت را می\u200cرسانیم. آزمایش های ما نشان می دهند که ویژه های اثراتی از قوانین مرکزی و مرکزی تغییر تغییر تغییر دهنده\u200cترین ویژه\u200cهای تغییر تغییر دهنده است.', 'am': 'የሞርፎሎጂ ትምህርት እና ግንኙነት አስፈላጊ ስራ ነው፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ውስጥ ባለጠጋ ቋንቋዎች ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልገው የፍጥረት ደረጃ ነው፡፡ ኪንያሩዋንዳ፣ የሞሮፎሎጂ ባለጠጋ ቋንቋ፣ አሁን ለራሱ ሞሮፎሎጂ ትምህርት አለበት፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ የተዘጋጀ የሀገር መሣሪያዎች ለሞፎሎጂ ትምህርት ለመፍጠር ቀላል ሲችል፣ የቋንቋው ሞሮፎሎጂ ትክክል ብዙዎችን ፍላጎት የሚያስፈልጋቸው እና ጥቅም እንዲያስፈልጋቸው ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የኮንጆውና አዲስ የድምፅ አካባቢ ድምፅ በተሰበሰቡ አዲስ የድምፅ አካባቢ ድርጅት ላይ ለመማር እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ የፊደል ኢንጂንጂንተር እና የፍሬት የኒዌር መረብ ክፍላፊዎችን በመጠቀም፣ 89 በመቶ ያልተቃወመ ውጤት አግኝተናል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የድምጾች እና የሞፊሜ ጉዳይ ሥርዓቶች የባሕላዊ ምርጫዎች ናቸው፡፡', 'bn': 'মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণ এবং বিভ্রান্ত বিশ্লেষণ একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প কিনার্যান্ডান্ডা, মোর্ফোলজিক ভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা, বর্তমানে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মরোফোলিকাল বিশ্লেষণের জন্য টু যদিও ভাষার ভাষার ভাষাভাষীভাবে মুদ্রিত রাষ্ট্রের টুল সহজে মোরফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণের জন্য উন্নয়ন করা যায়, তবে ভাষার মরোফোলগিক্যাল সম্পদ অনেক বিশ্লে এই পত্রিকায় আমরা কিনারওয়ান্ডারের ভার্বালিক ফর্ম থেকে শিক্ষা শিখতে প্রস্তাব করি জনগণের সোর্সের মাধ্যমে সংগ্রহ করা একটি নতুন সংগ্রহের বৈশিষ্ট্য ইঞ্জিনিয়ন এবং ফিডিউট-ফিডার নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীবিষয়ক ব্যবহার করে, আমরা প্রায় ৮৯% অযোগ্য বৈষম আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে স্টেম এবং মৃত্যুর সংগঠন নিয়মের প্রভাবশালী বৈষম্যের সবচেয়ে বৈষম্য।', 'az': "Morfolojik analizi və disambiguasyon möhüm bir iş və təbiətli dillərin morfolojik zəngin dillərin işləməsində çox möhüm təhsil edilməsi adımdır. Kinyarwanda, morfolojik zəngin dili, artıq otomatik morfolojik analizi üçün vasitələri yoxdur. Dil müəyyən edilmiş müəyyən durum vasitələri morfolojik analizi üçün asanlıqla təhsil edilə bilərlər, dilin morfolojik zenginliği çoxlu müəyyən analizi təhsil etməyə imkan verir və effektiv disambiguasyona ehtiyac edir. Bu kağızda, Kinyarwanda'nın yeni istiqamət veri qutusu ilə toplanmış yeni istiqamət qutusundan morpholojik olaraq öyrənməsini təklif edirik. Müxtəlif inženjeri və nöral a ğ tərəfindən qurulmuş klassifikatçı istifadə edərək, 89% tərəfindən müxtəlif olmayan inženjerlik doğruluğuna nail olarıq. Bizim təcrübələrimiz istiqamətlərin və morfüm birlikçilik kurallarının etkileşimli özelliklərinin ən diskriminasiyyətli özellikləridir.", 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծությունը և անբացատրությունը կարևոր խնդիր է և կարևոր առաջընթացքային քայլ է մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուների բնական վերլուծության մեջ: Kinyarwanda, a morphologically rich language, currently lacks tools for automated morphological analysis.  Մինչդեռ լեզվաբանական կորտերացված սահմանափակ վիճակական գործիքները հեշտությամբ կարող են զարգանալ մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության համար, լեզվի մորֆոլոգիական հարստությունը թույլ է տալիս արտադրել բազմաթիվ երկիմաստ վերլուծություններ, որոնք պահանջո Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք սովորել մորֆոլոգիապես բացատրել Քինիայի արձագանքային ձևերը ամբոխի միջոցով հավաքված նոր հիմնական տվյալների համակարգից: Օգտագործելով հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտությունը և առաջնային նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված դասակարգիչը, մենք հասնում ենք 89 տոկոսի ոչ կոնտեքստիլյացված բացատրության ճշգրտությունը: Our experiments reveal that inflectional properties of stems and morpheme association rules are the most discriminative features for disambiguation.', 'bs': 'Marfološka analiza i disambiguacija su važan zadatak i ključni korak preobrađivanja prirodnog jezika obrađivanja morfološki bogatih jezika. Kinyarwanda, morfološki bogat jezik, trenutno nedostaje alata za automatsku morfološku analizu. Iako se za morfološku analizu lako razvijaju ograničeni državni alati jezika, morfološka bogatstva jezika omogućava da se proizvode mnoge ambigutne analize, zahtijevajući učinkovitu disambigaciju. U ovom papiru predlažemo da naučimo morfološki disambiguirati Kinyarwandu verbalne forme iz novog nastanka podataka koji su prikupljeni putem crowd sourcing. Koristeći inženjerstvo funkcija i klasifikaciju neuralne mreže, postigli smo oko 89% ne-kontekstualizirane tačnosti disambiguacije. Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju da su inflekcionalna vlasništva matičnih i morfičkih pravila asocijacije najdiskriminirajuća karakteristika za disambigaciju.', 'ca': "L'an àlisi morfològica i la desambiguació són una tasca important i un pas crucial de preparació en el processament natural de llengües morfològicament rics. Kinyarwanda, una llengua rica morfològicament, actualment no té eines per a l'anàlisi morfològic automatitzat. Mentre les eines d'estat finit curades lingüísticament es poden desenvolupar fàcilment per a l'anàlisi morfològica, la riquesa morfològica del llenguatge permet produir moltes anàlisis ambigues, necessitant una desambiguació efectiva. En aquest article, proposem aprendre a desambiguar morfològicament les formes verbals Kinyarwanda d'un nou conjunt de dades que apareixen recollits a través de crowd sourcing. Utilitzant l'enginyeria de característiques i un classificador basat en una xarxa neural avançada, aconseguem una precisió de desambiguació no contextualitzada del 89%. Els nostres experiments revelen que les propietats inflexionals dels troncs i les normes d'associació de morfes són les característiques més discriminatives de la desambiguació.", 'cs': 'Morfologická analýza a disambiguace je důležitým úkolem a klíčovým krokem předzpracování přirozeného jazyka morfologicky bohatých jazyků. Kinyarwanda, morfologicky bohatý jazyk, v současné době postrádá nástroje pro automatizovanou morfologickou analýzu. Zatímco lingvisticky kurované nástroje konečného stavu lze snadno vyvinout pro morfologickou analýzu, morfologické bohatství jazyka umožňuje vytvořit mnoho nejednoznačných analýz, které vyžadují efektivní rozlišení. V tomto článku navrhujeme naučit se morfologicky rozlišovat Kinyarwanda verbální formy z nové datové sady shromážděné prostřednictvím crowdsourcingu. Pomocí funkčního inženýrství a klasifikátoru založeného na neuronové síti dosahujeme asi 89% nekontextualizované disambiguační přesnosti. Naše experimenty ukazují, že flexiční vlastnosti stonků a pravidla asociace morfemů jsou nejvíce diskriminačními rysy pro rozcestnění.', 'et': 'Morfoloogiline analüüs ja selgitamine on oluline ülesanne ja oluline eeltöötluse samm morfoloogiliselt rikkalike keelte looduskeelte töötlemisel. Kinyarwanda, morfoloogiliselt rikas keel, puudub praegu automatiseeritud morfoloogilise analüüsi vahendid. Kuigi keeleliselt kureeritud piiritletud oleku tööriistu saab morfoloogiliseks analüüsiks kergesti välja töötada, võimaldab keele morfoloogiline rikkus teha mitmeid ebaselgeid analüüse, mis nõuab tõhusat selgitamist. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku õppida morfoloogiliselt eristama Kinyarwanda verbaalseid vorme rahvahulga kogumise kaudu kogutud uuest stemming andmekogumist. Funktsioonitehnoloogia ja edasise närvivõrgu põhise klassifikaatori abil saavutame ligikaudu 89% kontekstualiseerimata eristamise täpsuse. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et varrede paindlikud omadused ja morfeemide seose reeglid on kõige diskrimineerivamad tunnused eristamisel.', 'fi': 'Morfologinen analyysi ja erottelu on tärkeä tehtävä ja tärkeä esiprosessointivaihe morfologisesti rikkaiden kielten luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Kinyarwanda, morfologisesti rikas kieli, ei tällä hetkellä ole työkaluja automaattiseen morfologiseen analyysiin. Vaikka kielellisesti kuratoituja finite state -työkaluja voidaan helposti kehittää morfologiseen analyysiin, kielen morfologinen rikkaus mahdollistaa monien epäselvien analyysien tuottamisen, mikä edellyttää tehokasta erottelua. Tässä työssä ehdotamme, että opitaan morfologisesti erottamaan Kinyarwandan verbaaliset muodot joukkohankinnan avulla kerätystä uudesta stemming-aineistosta. Feature Engineeringin ja feed-forward neural network based classifier avulla saavutamme noin 89% kontekstualisoimattoman erottelutarkkuuden. Kokeet osoittavat, että varsien taivutusominaisuudet ja morfeemien assosiaatiosäännöt ovat erottuvimpia piirteitä erottelussa.', 'he': 'הניתוח המורפולוגי והניתוח הוא משימה חשובה ושלב חיוני בהתחלה בעבודת שפה טבעית של שפות עשירות מורפולוגית. קיניארוונדה, שפה עשירה באופן מורפולוגי, כרגע חסרת כלים לניתוח מורפולוגי אוטומטי. בעוד כלי המדינה הגבוהה שפתיים יכולים לפתח בקלות לניתוח מורפולוגי, העשירות המורפולוגית של השפה מאפשרת לייצר ניתוחים ספורים רבים, דורשים ניתוח יעיל. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים ללמוד לנתק באופן מורפולוגי צורות מילוליות קיניארוונדה מתוך קבוצת נתונים חדשה שנאספת דרך מקורות קהל. בשימוש בהנדסה של תכונות ורשת עצבית מבוססת בהזדמנות, אנו משיגים מדויקה של 89% בלתי קונטוקטואליזציה. הניסויים שלנו חושפים כי תכונות חסות של גזעים וחוקי איגוד מופרפים הם המיוחדים ביותר עבור הפרעת ספרות.', 'jv': 'Ndelengke dipilengke karo Mbak-Mbak saiki bukane mung task lan akeh banter-pake nganggep kuwi diapakane ning aturan karo perusahaan anyar lengkang modorologi. Name Along sampeyan ingkang dipunanggé state-of-language gawe nguasai kang dianggawe kanggo nguasai kapan modorologi, akeh modorologi punika ingkang alih basa sing bisa dianggawe akeh sampeyan kanggo dianggawe, njuk dhéwé énjebudakno. Nang kuwi iki, kita supoyo cilihan kanggo ngerwih tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar-tarjamahan Using character design and a fill-forward Neral network supported category, we success about 64% not-contextual dismbiguation charged. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno ngomong nik kabèh wong liyane karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo hal-hal kuwi wis dislukene sing gak dhéwé urip gak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Morfološka analiza in razločitev je pomembna naloga in ključen korak predobdelave naravnega jezika morfološko bogatih jezikov. Kinyarwanda, morfološko bogat jezik, trenutno nima orodij za avtomatizirano morfološko analizo. Medtem ko je jezikovno kurirana orodja končnega stanja mogoče zlahka razviti za morfološko analizo, morfološko bogastvo jezika omogoča izdelavo številnih dvoumnih analiz, ki zahtevajo učinkovito razločitev. V prispevku predlagamo učenje morfološko razločitve verbalnih oblik Kinyarwande iz novega nabora podatkov o izvoru iz množice. Z uporabo funkcijskega inženiringa in klasifikatorja, ki temelji na prenosu nevronskega omrežja, dosežemo približno 89% nekontekstualizirane natančnosti razločitve. Naši eksperimenti razkrivajo, da so inflekcijske lastnosti stebel in pravila morfemske asociacije najbolj diskriminativne lastnosti za razločitev.', 'ha': "Ana yi fassarar mutfologi da bambanci yana da wani aikin muhimmi kuma wata matsayi na muhimu a cikin jarraba lugha na natura da matalauci. Kinyarwanda, wata harshe na morfologically tajiri, yanzu yana da zance wa analyi na farat ɗaya. A lokacin da aka buɗe zanen kayan aiki na state na finite cikin harshen, za'a iya buɗe shi da sauƙi wa anaƙatan morfologi, kuma mataimaki na harshen na yarda a samar da wasu fassara masu buƙata, sunã da buƙata mai fasahawa. In this paper, we propose learning to morphologically disambiguate Kinyarwanda verbal forms from a new stemming dataset collected through crowd-sourcing.  Yi amfani da masu inganci da wani zane-zanen tarayya na feed-forward neural, za'a sami daidai asilimiin 89 wanda bai zama dacewa ba. Kayan jarrabõyinmu sun bayyana cewa masu yin husũma na dangiya da mutane na mutane ne mafi taƙaita masu yin ɓarna.", 'bo': 'རྨན་གཞུང་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་གནོད་འགྲོ་བརྟན་ནི་གལ་ཅན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། རང་རིས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་མཐུན རིག་ཡུལ་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལུགས་ཆེ་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཆགས་པ་ཡིན། While linguistically curated finite state tools can be easily developed for morphological analysis, the morphological richness of the language allows many ambiguous analyses to be produced, requiring effective disambiguation. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོས་གཞུང་གིས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ལ་གཏོང་གཏོང་། Using feature engineering and a feed-forward neural network based classifier, we achieve about 89% non-contextualized disambiguation accuracy. ང་ཚོའི་experiments་དག་གིས་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིབས་དང་བསྡུས་པའི་ངོ་བོ'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Transfer Learning for Grammatical Error Correction', 'ar': 'تعلم التحويل عبر اللغات لتصحيح الأخطاء النحوية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe para la corrección de errores gramaticales', 'fr': 'Apprentissage par transfert multilingue pour la correction des erreurs grammaticales', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de transferência multilíngue para correção de erros gramaticais', 'ja': '文法的誤り訂正のためのクロスリンガル転送学習', 'zh': '以语法纠错跨语迁学', 'hi': 'व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग', 'ru': 'Обучение межязычному переводу для коррекции грамматических ошибок', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Aistrithe Trastheangach le haghaidh Ceartú Earráide Gramadaí', 'ka': 'გრამიტური შეცდომის კონფიგურაციისთვის შეცდომა', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű transzfer tanulás nyelvtani hibajavításhoz', 'el': 'Διγλωσσική μάθηση μεταφοράς για τη διόρθωση γραμματικών σφαλμάτων', 'it': 'Trasferimento di apprendimento multilingue per la correzione degli errori grammaticali', 'kk': 'Грамматикалық қатені түзету үшін бірнеше тілді транформ оқытуы', 'mk': 'Cross-lingual Transfer Learning for Grammatical Error Correction', 'lt': 'Kelių kalbų perkėlimo mokymasis gramatinių klaidų koregavimui', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Selata-Bahasa Belajar untuk Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment Translingwali għal Korrezzjoni ta’ Żbalji Grammatiċi', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമ്മാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ക് മാറ്റുന്ന പഠിപ്പി', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрүүлэхийн тулд олон хэлний трансфер суралцах', 'no': 'Læring av krysspråk overføring for gramatiske feilretting', 'ro': 'Învățare translingvă pentru corectarea erorilor gramaticale', 'pl': 'Transferowe uczenie się wielojęzyczne dla korekcji błędów gramatycznych', 'so': 'Waxbarashada iskuulka u wareejinta luqada', 'sr': 'Учање трансфера за граматично исправиње грешка', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාමාටිකල් දෝෂාව සඳහා ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික ස්ථානය', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkigt överföringslärande för korrigering av grammatiska fel', 'ta': 'சிறப்பு பிழை திருத்தமுறை', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học lây qua ngôn ngữ học cho lỗi biểu học', 'bg': 'Междуезично обучение за трансфер за корекция на граматични грешки', 'hr': 'Prejezično učenje prijenosa za korištenje greške', 'nl': 'Cross-lingual Transfer Learning voor grammaticale foutcorrectie', 'da': 'Overførsel på tværs af sprog til korrektion af grammatiske fejl', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifendes Transferlernen zur grammatischen Fehlerkorrektur', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Transfer saling bahasa untuk Koreksi Galat Grammatik', 'ko': '문법 오류 수정에 사용되는 다중 언어 이동 학습', 'fa': 'تعلیم انتقال زبانی برای اصلاح خطای گراماتیک', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Uhamiaji wa lugha kwa ajili ya Uharibifu wa Tamko', 'tr': 'Grammatikal Hata Düzeltmek üçin Çot-Dilli Transfer Öwrenmek', 'af': 'Kryslingse Oordrag Leer vir Gramatiese Fout Korreksie', 'sq': 'Cross-lingual Transfer Learning for Grammatical Error Correction', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Gramatik x톛ta d칲z톛ltm톛si 칲칞칲n 칞ox dilli Transfer 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'hy': 'Գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղության համար լեզվի փոխանցման սովորելը', 'bn': 'গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি সংস্কারের জন্য ক্রস- ভাষা পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Projezično učenje prijenosa za korištenje greške', 'cs': 'Přenosové učení mezi jazyky pro korekci gramatických chyb', 'ca': 'Aprendiment translingüístic per a corregir errors gramàtics', 'et': 'Keeleülene siirdeõpe grammatiliste vigade parandamiseks', 'fi': 'Kielten välinen siirtooppiminen kielioppivirheiden korjaamiseen', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'sk': 'Medjezično učenje prenosa za popravljanje slovničnih napak', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'לימוד מעברת שפתיים לצורך תיקון שגיאות גרמטיות', 'bo': 'ཚུན་འབྲེ་བའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བདེ་སྒྲིག་ལ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་སྐུད་སྒྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'In this study, we explore cross-lingual transfer learning in grammatical error correction (GEC) tasks. Many languages lack the resources required to train GEC models. Cross-lingual transfer learning from high-resource languages (the source models) is effective for training models of low-resource languages (the target models) for various tasks. However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident. Therefore, we investigate cross-lingual transfer learning methods for GEC. Our results demonstrate that transfer learning from other languages can improve the accuracy of GEC. We also demonstrate that proximity to source languages has a significant impact on the accuracy of correcting certain types of errors.', 'ar': 'في هذه الدراسة ، نستكشف تعلم النقل عبر اللغات في مهام تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية (GEC). تفتقر العديد من اللغات إلى الموارد اللازمة لتدريب نماذج GEC. يعد تعلم النقل عبر اللغات من اللغات عالية الموارد (نماذج المصدر) فعالاً لتدريب نماذج اللغات منخفضة الموارد (النماذج المستهدفة) لمختلف المهام. ومع ذلك ، في مهام GEC ، فإن إمكانية نقل المعرفة النحوية (مثل الوظائف النحوية) عبر اللغات ليست واضحة. لذلك ، نحن نتحرى طرق تعلم التحويل عبر اللغات لـ GEC. تظهر نتائجنا أن نقل التعلم من اللغات الأخرى يمكن أن يحسن دقة GEC. نثبت أيضًا أن القرب من لغات المصدر له تأثير كبير على دقة تصحيح أنواع معينة من الأخطاء.', 'fr': "Dans cette étude, nous explorons l'apprentissage par transfert interlinguistique dans les tâches de correction d'erreurs grammaticales (GEC). De nombreuses langues ne disposent pas des ressources nécessaires pour former les modèles GEC. L'apprentissage par transfert interlinguistique à partir de langues à ressources élevées (les modèles sources) est efficace pour les modèles de formation de langues à faibles ressources (les modèles cibles) pour diverses tâches. Cependant, dans les tâches du GEC, la possibilité de transférer des connaissances grammaticales (par exemple, des fonctions grammaticales) entre les langues n'est pas évidente. C'est pourquoi nous étudions les méthodes d'apprentissage par transfert multilingue pour GEC. Nos résultats démontrent que l'apprentissage par transfert à partir d'autres langues peut améliorer la précision du GEC. Nous démontrons également que la proximité des langues sources a un impact significatif sur la précision de la correction de certains types d'erreurs.", 'es': 'En este estudio, exploramos el aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe en tareas de corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC). Muchos idiomas carecen de los recursos necesarios para entrenar los modelos de GEC. El aprendizaje por transferencia multilingüe de idiomas de altos recursos (los modelos fuente) es eficaz para entrenar modelos de idiomas de bajos recursos (los modelos objetivo) para diversas tareas. Sin embargo, en las tareas de GEC, la posibilidad de transferir conocimientos gramaticales (por ejemplo, funciones gramaticales) entre idiomas no es evidente. Por lo tanto, investigamos los métodos de aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe para GEC. Nuestros resultados demuestran que transferir el aprendizaje de otros idiomas puede mejorar la precisión de los GEC. También demostramos que la proximidad a los idiomas de origen tiene un impacto significativo en la precisión de la corrección de ciertos tipos de errores.', 'pt': 'Neste estudo, exploramos o aprendizado de transferência multilíngue em tarefas de correção de erros gramaticais (GEC). Muitas linguagens não possuem os recursos necessários para treinar modelos GEC. O aprendizado de transferência multilíngue de idiomas de alto recurso (os modelos de origem) é eficaz para treinar modelos de idiomas de baixo recurso (os modelos de destino) para várias tarefas. No entanto, em tarefas GEC, a possibilidade de transferência de conhecimento gramatical (por exemplo, funções gramaticais) entre línguas não é evidente. Portanto, investigamos métodos de aprendizagem de transferência multilíngue para GEC. Nossos resultados demonstram que o aprendizado de transferência de outros idiomas pode melhorar a precisão do GEC. Também demonstramos que a proximidade com os idiomas de origem tem um impacto significativo na precisão da correção de certos tipos de erros.', 'ja': 'この研究では、文法的誤り訂正（ GEC ）タスクにおけるクロスリンガル転送学習を探求します。多くの言語では、GECモデルのトレーニングに必要なリソースが不足しています。高リソース言語（ソースモデル）からのクロスリンガル転送学習は、さまざまなタスクのための低リソース言語（ターゲットモデル）のモデルをトレーニングするのに効果的である。しかし、GECタスクでは、文法的知識（例えば、文法機能）を言語間で移転する可能性は明らかではない。そこで， GECのためのクロスリンガル転送学習法を検討した．私たちの結果は、他の言語からの転送学習がGECの精度を向上させることができることを示しています。また、ソース言語に近いことは、特定のタイプのエラーを修正する精度に大きな影響を与えることを実証しています。', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании мы исследуем кросс-лингвистическое трансферное обучение в задачах грамматической коррекции ошибок (GEC). Многим языкам не хватает ресурсов, необходимых для обучения моделям GEC. Межъязыковое трансферное обучение с высокоресурсных языков (исходные модели) эффективно для обучающих моделей малоресурсных языков (целевые модели) для различных задач. Однако в задачах ГЭК возможность передачи грамматических знаний (например, грамматических функций) между языками не очевидна. Поэтому мы изучаем методы межъязыкового трансферного обучения для GEC. Наши результаты показывают, что передача обучения с других языков может повысить точность GEC. Мы также демонстрируем, что близость к исходным языкам оказывает значительное влияние на точность исправления определенных типов ошибок.', 'zh': '于此论之,吾讨论语法纠错(GEC)语迁学。 多言缺乏训练 GEC 模形所须。 自高资言语(源)跨语迁学低资源语言模()有效。 然GEC之任,言语移语法(如语法,)性不明。 故治GEC语迁学。 臣等论结果表明,从他语迁学可以崇GEC准确性。 又验其近言性对纠正其谬者准确性有大损益。', 'hi': 'इस अध्ययन में, हम व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (जीईसी) कार्यों में क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग का पता लगाते हैं। कई भाषाओं में जीईसी मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए आवश्यक संसाधनों की कमी है। उच्च-संसाधन भाषाओं (स्रोत मॉडल) से क्रॉस-भाषी स्थानांतरण सीखने विभिन्न कार्यों के लिए कम-संसाधन भाषाओं (लक्ष्य मॉडल) के प्रशिक्षण मॉडल के लिए प्रभावी है। हालांकि, जीईसी कार्यों में, भाषाओं में व्याकरणिक ज्ञान (जैसे, व्याकरणिक कार्य) को स्थानांतरित करने की संभावना स्पष्ट नहीं है। इसलिए, हम जीईसी के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग विधियों की जांच करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि अन्य भाषाओं से सीखने के हस्तांतरण से जीईसी की सटीकता में सुधार हो सकता है। हम यह भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि स्रोत भाषाओं की निकटता का कुछ प्रकार की त्रुटियों को ठीक करने की सटीकता पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रभाव पड़ता है।', 'ga': 'Sa staidéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar fhoghlaim aistrithe tras-teanga i dtascanna um cheartú earráide gramadaí (GEC). Tá easpa acmhainní ag go leor teangacha chun samhlacha GEC a oiliúint. Tá an fhoghlaim aistrithe tras-teangach ó theangacha ard-acmhainne (na múnlaí foinseacha) éifeachtach chun samhlacha oiliúna a bhaineann le teangacha íseal-acmhainne (na spriocmhúnlaí) le haghaidh tascanna éagsúla. I dtascanna GEC, áfach, ní léir go bhféadfaí eolas gramadaí a aistriú (m.sh. feidhmeanna gramadaí) trasna teangacha. Mar sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar mhodhanna foghlama aistrithe tras-teangacha don GEC. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí gur féidir le foghlaim aistrithe ó theangacha eile cruinneas GEC a fheabhsú. Léirímid freisin go mbíonn tionchar suntasach ag cóngaracht do theangacha foinse ar chruinneas cineálacha áirithe earráidí a cheartú.', 'ka': 'ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ სამუშაო ენგრამიკური შეცდომა შეცდომა (GEC) პარამეტრებში. GEC მოდელების შემწავლობისთვის ბევრი ენების რესურსები არსებობს. მრავალური სატრანსტრესტის სასწავლობა მარტივი რესურსის ენებიდან (მხოლოდ მოდელებიდან) ეფექტიურია მარტივი რესურსის ენების მოდელებისთვის (მიზემი მოდელების) განს მაგრამ GEC დავალებში გრამიკალური ცნობილების გადატვირთვა (მაგალითად, გრამიკალური ფუნქციები) ენაში არ არის ჩვენებული. ამიტომ, ჩვენ GEC-ის გასწავლისთვის გასწავლისთვის კრისი ენგური გასწავლისთვის მეტოვები. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ სხვა ენებიდან გასწავლების შესაძლებელია GEC-ის წარმოდგენება. ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდ', 'it': "In questo studio, esploriamo l'apprendimento cross-lingual transfer nelle attività di correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC). Molte lingue mancano delle risorse necessarie per formare i modelli GEC. L'apprendimento translinguale di trasferimento da lingue ad alto contenuto di risorse (i modelli di origine) è efficace per i modelli di formazione delle lingue a basso contenuto di risorse (i modelli di destinazione) per vari compiti. Tuttavia, nei compiti GEC, la possibilità di trasferire conoscenze grammaticali (ad esempio funzioni grammaticali) tra le lingue non è evidente. Pertanto, studiamo metodi di apprendimento translinguale per GEC. I nostri risultati dimostrano che il trasferimento di apprendimento da altre lingue può migliorare l'accuratezza di GEC. Dimostriamo inoltre che la vicinanza alle lingue di origine ha un impatto significativo sull'accuratezza della correzione di alcuni tipi di errori.", 'el': 'Στην παρούσα μελέτη, διερευνούμε τη γλωσσική μάθηση μεταφοράς σε εργασίες διόρθωσης γραμματικών σφαλμάτων (GEC). Πολλές γλώσσες στερούνται των πόρων που απαιτούνται για την κατάρτιση μοντέλων GEC. Η εκμάθηση διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς από γλώσσες υψηλού δυναμικού (τα μοντέλα πηγής) είναι αποτελεσματική για μοντέλα κατάρτισης γλωσσών χαμηλού δυναμικού (τα μοντέλα στόχων) για διάφορες εργασίες. Ωστόσο, στα καθήκοντα του GEC, η δυνατότητα μεταφοράς γραμματικών γνώσεων (π.χ. γραμματικών συναρτήσεων) μεταξύ γλωσσών δεν είναι προφανής. Ως εκ τούτου, ερευνούμε τις μεθόδους εκμάθησης μεταξύ γλωσσών για τη ΓΕΚ. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η εκμάθηση μεταφοράς από άλλες γλώσσες μπορεί να βελτιώσει την ακρίβεια της ΓΕΚ. Αποδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι η εγγύτητα στις γλώσσες προέλευσης έχει σημαντικό αντίκτυπο στην ακρίβεια της διόρθωσης ορισμένων τύπων σφαλμάτων.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a nyelvtani hibakorrekciós (GEC) feladatokban vizsgáljuk a nyelvi transzfer tanulást. Sok nyelven hiányoznak a GEC modellek képzéséhez szükséges erőforrások. A nagy erőforrásokat igénylő nyelvekről (a forrásmodellek) szóló, nyelvközi transzfer tanulás hatékony az alacsony erőforrásokat igénylő nyelvek (a célmodellek) képzési modelljeihez különböző feladatokhoz. A GEC feladatokban azonban nem nyilvánvaló a nyelvtani ismeretek (például nyelvtani függvények) nyelvek közötti átadásának lehetősége. Ezért vizsgáljuk a nyelvek közötti transzfer tanulási módszereket a GEC számára. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy más nyelvekről történő tanulás átvitele javíthatja a GEC pontosságát. Azt is bizonyítjuk, hogy a forrásnyelvekhez való közelség jelentős hatással van bizonyos típusú hibák kijavításának pontosságára.', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеулерде, біз грамматикалық қателерді түзету (GEC) тапсырмаларында тілді аудару оқытуды зерттейміз. Көп тіл GEC үлгілерін оқыту үшін керек ресурстар жоқ. Жоғары ресурс тілдерінен (көзінің үлгілері) аудару тілдерінің (мақсатты үлгілері) түрлі тапсырмалар үшін төмен ресурс тілдерінің (мақсатты үлгілері) үлгілеріне әсер етеді Бірақ GEC тапсырмаларында грамматикалық білім (мысалы, грамматикалық функциялар) тілдерге аудару мүмкін емес. Сондықтан, GEC үшін тілді аудару әдістерін зерттейміз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз басқа тілдерден оқыту үшін GEC дұрыстығын жақсарту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Мұндай-ақ біз көзінің тілдерінің жақындағы қателерді түзету дұрыстығына маңызды нәтижесі бар дегенді көрсетейміз.', 'mk': 'In this study, we explore cross-lingual transfer learning in grammatical error correction (GEC) tasks.  Many languages lack the resources required to train GEC models.  Кросјазичниот трансфер на учење од јазици со високи ресурси (изворни модели) е ефикасен за обуката на моделите на јазици со ниски ресурси (метни модели) за различни задачи. However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident.  Затоа, ги истражуваме методите за учење на трансфер на меѓујазик за ГЕЦ. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека трансферот на учење од други јазици може да ја подобри точноста на ГЕЦ. Исто така, демонстрираме дека близината до изворните јазици има значително влијание врз точноста на корекцијата на одредени видови грешки.', 'ms': 'Dalam kajian ini, kami menjelajahi pembelajaran pemindahan saling bahasa dalam tugas penyesuaian ralat grammatik (GEC). Banyak bahasa kekurangan sumber yang diperlukan untuk melatih model GEC. Pemindahan saling bahasa belajar dari bahasa sumber-tinggi (model sumber) berkesan untuk pelatihan model bahasa-sumber-rendah (model sasaran) untuk berbagai tugas. Namun, dalam tugas GEC, kemungkinan untuk memindahkan pengetahuan grammatik (cth., fungsi grammatik) ke dalam bahasa tidak jelas. Oleh itu, kami menyelidiki kaedah pembelajaran pemindahan saling bahasa untuk GEC. Our results demonstrate that transfer learning from other languages can improve the accuracy of GEC.  We also demonstrate that proximity to source languages has a significant impact on the accuracy of correcting certain types of errors.', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ക്രിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d പഠനം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. GEC മോഡലുകളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകളും ഇല്ല. ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വിഭവഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d (സോര്\u200dസ്സ് മോഡല്\u200d) വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷകളുട എന്നാലും GEC ജോലികളില്\u200d, ഭാഷകളില്\u200d മുഴുവനും ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d അറിവ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധ്യതമല്ല. അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങില്\u200d നിന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു മറ്റു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠനം മാറ്റുന്നത് ജിസിയുടെ കൃത്യം മെച്ചപ് സ്രോതസ്സ് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് അടുത്ത സാമീപ്യം ഉണ്ടെന്നും കാണിക്കുന്നു കുറച്ചു തരം തെറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിഹാരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ക', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime mes tiriame tarpkalbinį mokymąsi gramatinių klaidų koregavimo (GEC) užduotyse. Daugeliui kalbų trūksta išteklių, reikalingų GEC modeliams mokyti. Tarpkalbinis mokymosi iš didelių išteklių kalbų perdavimas (šaltinio modeliai) yra veiksmingas mokymo modeliams mažai išteklių turinčiomis kalbomis (tiksliniai modeliai) skirtingoms užduotims atlikti. Tačiau GEC užduočių atveju nėra akivaizdu, kad gramatinės žinios (pvz., gramatinės funkcijos) gali būti perduodamos visoms kalboms. Todėl mes tiriame GEC tarpkalbinio mokymosi metodus. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad mokymosi iš kitų kalbų perdavimas gali pagerinti GEC tikslumą. Taip pat įrodome, kad artimumas prie kilmės kalbų turi didelį poveikį tam tikrų klaidų ištaisymo tikslumui.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд бид грамматикийн алдаа засах (GEC) үйлдлийг олон хэлний шилжүүлэх сургалтыг судалж байна. Олон хэл GEC загваруудыг суралцах шаардлагатай баялаг байхгүй. Өндөр боловсролын хэлээс (эх үүсвэрийн загвар) суралцах нь бага боловсролын хэл (зорилго загварын загвар) бага боловсролын загварын загварын тулд үр дүнтэй. Гэхдээ GEC даалгавруудын тулд грамматикийн мэдлэг (жишээ нь грамматикийн функцүүдийг) хэл дээр шилжүүлэх боломжгүй. Тиймээс бид GEC-ын олон хэлний шилжүүлэлтийн аргыг судалж байна. Бидний үр дүнд бусад хэл дээр суралцах үйлдэл нь GEC-ын зөв байдлыг сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Мөн бид эх үүсвэрийн хэлний ойролцоо нь зарим төрлийн алдаа засах зөв нөлөөлдөг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'I denne studien utforskar vi læring av krysspråk overføring i grammatiske feilretting (GEC) oppgåver. Mange språk manglar ressursane som krevst for å trenja GEC-modeller. Læring av krysspråk frå høg ressursspråk (kjeldemodeller) er effektiv for å trenga modeller av låg ressursspråk (målmodeller) for ulike oppgåver. I GEC-oppgåver er imidlertid ikkje det synleg å overføra grammatiske kunnskap (f.eks. grammatiske funksjonar) på språk. Derfor undersøker vi fleirspråkslæringsmetodar for GEC. Resultatet våre viser at overføring av læring frå andre språk kan forbetra nøyaktigheten av GEC. Vi viser også at nærleiken til kjeldespråk har ein signifikant effekt på nøyaktighet for korrigering av nokre typar feil.', 'ro': 'În acest studiu, explorăm învățarea translingvistică în sarcinile de corectare a erorilor gramaticale (GEC). Multe limbi nu au resursele necesare pentru instruirea modelelor GEC. Învățarea translingvistică de transfer din limbi cu resurse ridicate (modelele sursă) este eficientă pentru modelele de formare a limbilor cu resurse reduse (modelele țintă) pentru diferite sarcini. Cu toate acestea, în sarcinile GEC, posibilitatea transferului cunoștințelor gramaticale (de exemplu, funcțiile gramaticale) între limbi nu este evidentă. Prin urmare, investigăm metodele de învățare translingvistică pentru GEC. Rezultatele noastre demonstrează că transferul de învățare din alte limbi poate îmbunătăți acuratețea GEC. De asemenea, demonstrăm că apropierea de limbile sursă are un impact semnificativ asupra acurateții corectării anumitor tipuri de erori.', 'sr': 'U ovoj studiji istražujemo učenje preko jezika prevođenja u gramatičkim zadacima korekcije grešaka (GEC). Mnogi jezici nedostaju resurse potrebne za obuku GEC modela. Prejezično učenje prijenosa iz visokih jezika resursa (izvornih modela) je efikasno za obuku modela jezika niskih resursa (ciljnih modela) za različite zadatke. Međutim, u GEC zadatkima, mogućnost prebacivanja gramatičkih znanja (npr. gramatičkih funkcija) na jezike nije jasna. Stoga istražujemo metode učenja preko jezika za GEC. Naši rezultati pokazuju da prijenos sa drugih jezika može poboljšati tačnost GEC-a. Takođe pokazujemo da blizina jezika izvora ima značajan uticaj na tačnost ispravljanja određenih vrsta grešaka.', 'mt': 'F’dan l-istudju, nistudjaw it-tagħlim translingwistiku tat-trasferiment f’kompiti ta’ korrezzjoni ta’ żbalji grammatiċi (GEC). Many languages lack the resources required to train GEC models.  It-trasferiment translingwistiku tat-tagħlim minn lingwi b’riżorsi għoljin (il-mudelli tas-sors) huwa effettiv għal mudelli ta’ taħriġ ta’ lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi (il-mudelli fil-mira) għal diversi kompiti. However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident.  Għalhekk, ninvestigaw metodi ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment translingwi għall-GEC. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li t-trasferiment tat-tagħlim minn lingwi oħra jista’ jtejjeb il-preċiżjoni tal-GEC. We also demonstrate that proximity to source languages has a significant impact on the accuracy of correcting certain types of errors.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu badamy naukę transferową między językami w zadaniach korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC). W wielu językach brakuje zasobów niezbędnych do szkolenia modeli GEC. Uczenie się transferu wielojęzycznego z języków o wysokim zasobie (modele źródłowe) jest skuteczne dla modeli szkoleniowych języków o niskim zasobie (modele docelowe) dla różnych zadań. Jednak w zadaniach GEC możliwość przenoszenia wiedzy gramatycznej (np. funkcji gramatycznych) między językami nie jest oczywista. W związku z tym badamy metody uczenia się transferowego między językami dla GEC. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że transfer nauki z innych języków może poprawić dokładność GEC. Wykazujemy również, że bliskość języków źródłowych ma istotny wpływ na dokładność korygowania niektórych rodzajów błędów.', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan waxaynu ka baaraannaa waxbarashada iskuulka luuqadaha kala duwan ee lagu barto hagitaanka khaladda grammatika (GEC). Luqado badan waxay u baahan yihiin hanti loo baahan yahay in lagu tababaro modelalka GEC. Waxbarashada luuqadda iskuulka ah ee luuqadaha iskuulka ah (noocyada asalka) waxey faa’iido u leedahay waxbarashada tusaalaha luuqadaha hoose-resource (models-goal) oo shaqooyin kala duduwan. However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident.  Sidaa darteed waxaynu baaraynaa qaababka waxbarashada ee lagu beddelo luuqadaha kala duwan ee GEC. Abaalkayaga waxay caddaysaa in waxbarashada luuqadaha kale laga wareejiyo waxay kordhin kartaa saxda GEC. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in ku dhowaanshada luuqadaha ay ku jirto saameyn weyn oo ku saabsan saxda hagaajinta cayiman qaladyada ah.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ග්\u200dරාමාතික වැරදිලි වැරදිලි වැරදිලි වැරදිලි වැරදිලි වැඩේ  ගොඩක් භාෂාවට GEC මොඩේල්ස් කිරීමට අවශ්\u200dයයි. විවිධ භාෂාවන්ත භාෂාවන් වලින් විශේෂ භාෂාවන් වලින් ක්\u200dරිස්ත භාෂාවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක නමුත්, GEC වැඩක් වලින්, භාෂාවල් වලින් ස්ථානය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ඉතින්, අපි GEC වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නයි අනිත් භාෂාවන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් GEC ගේ හරියට වැඩ කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම මුළු භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා කිසිම වර්ගයක් හරියට', 'sv': 'I denna studie undersöker vi tvärspråkigt överföringslärande i grammatiska felkorrigeringsuppgifter (GEC). Många språk saknar de resurser som krävs för att utbilda GEC-modeller. Tvärspråkigt lärande från språk med hög resurs (källmodellerna) är effektivt för utbildningsmodeller för språk med låg resurs (målmodellerna) för olika uppgifter. I GEC-uppgifter är dock möjligheten att överföra grammatiska kunskaper (t.ex. grammatiska funktioner) mellan språk inte uppenbar. Därför undersöker vi tvärspråkliga överföringsinlärningsmetoder för GEC. Våra resultat visar att överföring av lärande från andra språk kan förbättra noggrannheten hos GEC. Vi visar också att närhet till källspråk har en betydande inverkan på noggrannheten i att korrigera vissa typer av fel.', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் கிராம்பியல் பிழை திருத்தம் (GEC) பணிகளில் கற்றுக் கொள்ள பல மொழிகள் மாற்றுதலை தேடுகிற GEC மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய பல மொழிகளுக்கு தேவையான வளங்கள் இல்லை. உயர்மூலத்தின் மொழிகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கிராஸ்- மொழி மாற்றம் (மூல மாதிரி) பல பணிகளுக்கு குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மாதிரிகளின் பயிற்சி மாத எனினும், GEC பணிகளில், மொழிகள் முழுமையாக மாற்றும் சாத்தியம் தெளிவாக இல்லை. எனவே, நாம் ஜிஎன்சிக்கான பல மொழிகள் மாற்றி கற்றல் முறைமைகளை ஆராய்ச்சி. முடிவு மூல மொழிகளுக்கு நெருக்கமான பாதிப்பு காண்பிக்கிறது சில வகையான பிழைகளை சரிபார்க்கும் சரியில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பா', 'ur': 'اس مطالعہ میں، ہم کرس زبان ترنسفور کی تعلیم کو گرامٹیک خطا اصلاح (GEC) کے کاموں میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں. بہت سی زبانوں کو GEC موڈل کی تعلیم کے لئے ضرورت کی منابع نہیں ہے۔ بہت سی کاموں کے لئے کم منبع زبانوں کی (موجودات) نمڈلوں کی (موجودات ماڈلوں کی) نمڈلوں کی آموزش کے لئے مفید ہے۔ However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident. لہٰذا ہم GEC کے لئے مختلف زبان ترافس سیکھنے کے طریقے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ دوسری زبانوں سے سیکھنے کا انتقال GEC کا دقیق بہتر کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ سراسر زبانوں کے نزدیک تعداد کے مطابق غلطوں کی اصلاح کی دقیق پر اثر اضافہ ہے.', 'uz': "Bu taʼminotda, biz grammatikal xato toʻgʻri vazifalarda o'rganishni o'rganishni boshqa tillar tarjima qilamiz. GEC modellarini o'rganish uchun ko'pchilik tillar uchun manbalar yo'q. Name Lekin GEC vazifalarida grammatik илмni ajratish imkoniyatini ko'rsatish mumkin emas. Shunday qilib, biz GEC uchun o'rganish o'rganish usullarini o'rganamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz boshqa tillardan o'rganishni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini GEC haqida oshirish mumkin. Биз ҳам кўрсатамиз, орқали тилларга яқинлаштириш маълумотлар хатога тўғрилашни аниқ таъсир беришга муҳим таъсир кўрсатади.", 'vi': 'Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi khám phá việc học chuyển nhượng qua ngôn ngữ trong các nhiệm vụ sửa sai ngữ pháp (GEC). Nhiều ngôn ngữ thiếu nguồn lực để huấn luyện mô hình GED. Giao dịch xuyên ngôn ngữ học từ các ngôn ngữ chất lượng cao (các mẫu nguồn) có hiệu quả trong việc huấn luyện các mô hình ngôn ngữ có ít nguồn (các mẫu đích) cho các nhiệm vụ khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, trong các nhiệm vụ của Uỷ ban, khả năng chuyển giao kiến thức ngôn ngữ (v.d., các chức năng ngôn ngữ) qua các ngôn ngữ không rõ ràng. Do đó, chúng tôi điều tra các phương pháp học chuyển truyền qua ngôn ngữ. Những kết quả của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng việc học chuyển nhượng từ các ngôn ngữ khác có thể cải thiện George. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng gần các ngôn ngữ nguồn có tác động đáng kể đến độ chính xác sửa chữa một số loại lỗi.', 'bg': 'В това проучване изследваме интерезичното трансферно обучение в задачите за корекция на граматични грешки (ГЕК). Много езици нямат ресурсите, необходими за обучението на модели ГЕК. Междуезичното трансферно обучение от езици с висок ресурс (изходните модели) е ефективно за модели на обучение на езици с нисък ресурс (целеви модели) за различни задачи. При задачите на ГЕК обаче възможността за прехвърляне на граматически знания (например граматически функции) между езиците не е очевидна. Затова изследваме методите за трансферно обучение между езиците за ГЕК. Нашите резултати показват, че трансферното обучение от други езици може да подобри точността на ГЕК. Също така демонстрираме, че близостта до изходните езици оказва значително влияние върху точността на коригирането на определени видове грешки.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju istražujemo učenje preko jezika prijenosa u zadatkima gramatičke korekcije grešaka (GEC). Mnogi jezici nedostaju resursi potrebne za obuku modela GEC-a. Prejezično učenje prijenosa iz jezika visokih resursa (izvornih modela) učinkovito je za obuku modela jezika niskih resursa (ciljnih modela) za različite zadatke. Međutim, u zadatkima GEC-a mogućnost prebacivanja gramatičkih znanja (npr. gramatičkih funkcija) na jezike nije jasna. Stoga istražujemo metode učenja preko jezika GEC-a. Naši rezultati pokazuju da prijenos iz drugih jezika može poboljšati preciznost GEC-a. Također pokazujemo da blizina jezika izvora ima značajan utjecaj na preciznost ispravljanja određenih vrsta grešaka.', 'nl': 'In deze studie onderzoeken we cross-lingual transfer learning in grammatical error correction (GEC) taken. Veel talen missen de middelen die nodig zijn om GEC-modellen te trainen. Cross-lingual transfer learning vanuit high-resource talen (de bronmodellen) is effectief voor het trainen van modellen van low-resource talen (de doelmodellen) voor verschillende taken. Bij GEC-taken is de mogelijkheid om grammaticale kennis (bijv. grammaticale functies) over talen over te dragen echter niet evident. Daarom onderzoeken we meertalige transferleermethoden voor GEC. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat transferleren van andere talen de nauwkeurigheid van GEC kan verbeteren. We tonen ook aan dat de nabijheid van brontalen een aanzienlijke invloed heeft op de nauwkeurigheid van het corrigeren van bepaalde soorten fouten.', 'da': 'I dette studie undersøger vi tværsproget overførselslæring i grammatisk fejlkorrektion (GEC) opgaver. Mange sprog mangler ressourcer til at træne GEC-modeller. Tværsproget overførsel af læring fra sprog med høj ressource (kildemadellerne) er effektivt til uddannelsesmodeller af sprog med lav ressource (målmodellerne) til forskellige opgaver. I GEC-opgaver er muligheden for at overføre grammatisk viden (f.eks. grammatiske funktioner) på tværs af sprog ikke tydelig. Derfor undersøger vi tværsprogede transferlæringsmetoder for GEC. Vores resultater viser, at overførsel af læring fra andre sprog kan forbedre nøjagtigheden af GEC. Vi viser også, at nærheden til kildesprog har en betydelig indvirkning på nøjagtigheden af at korrigere visse typer fejl.', 'de': 'In dieser Studie untersuchen wir das sprachübergreifende Transferlernen in grammatischen Fehlerkorrekturaufgaben (GEC). In vielen Sprachen fehlen die Ressourcen, um GEC-Modelle zu trainieren. Das sprachübergreifende Transferlernen aus ressourcenintensiven Sprachen (die Quellmodelle) ist effektiv für die Schulung von ressourcenarmen Sprachen (die Zielmodelle) für verschiedene Aufgaben. In GEC-Aufgaben ist jedoch die Möglichkeit, grammatikalisches Wissen (z.B. grammatikalische Funktionen) sprachübergreifend zu übertragen, nicht ersichtlich. Daher untersuchen wir sprachübergreifende Transferlernmethoden für GEC. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Transferlernen aus anderen Sprachen die Genauigkeit von GEC verbessern kann. Wir zeigen auch, dass die Nähe zu Quellsprachen einen erheblichen Einfluss auf die Genauigkeit der Korrektur bestimmter Arten von Fehlern hat.', 'id': 'Dalam penelitian ini, kami mengeksplorasi pembelajaran trans-bahasa dalam tugas koreksi kesalahan gramatik (GEC). Banyak bahasa kekurangan sumber daya yang diperlukan untuk melatih model GEC. Transfer saling bahasa belajar dari bahasa sumber daya tinggi (model sumber) efektif untuk pelatihan model bahasa sumber daya rendah (model sasaran) untuk berbagai tugas. However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident.  Oleh karena itu, kami menyelidiki metode belajar transfer saling bahasa untuk GEC. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa transfer belajar dari bahasa lain dapat meningkatkan akurasi GEC. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa dekat dengan bahasa sumber memiliki dampak yang signifikan pada akurasi untuk mengkoreksi tipe kesalahan tertentu.', 'ko': '이 연구에서 우리는 문법 오류 수정(GEC) 임무 중의 다중 언어 이동 학습을 탐구했다.많은 언어들이 GEC 모델을 훈련하는 데 필요한 자원이 부족하다.고자원 언어(원 모델)의 다중 언어 이동 학습은 저자원 언어(목표 모델)의 각종 임무 훈련 모델에 효과적이다.그러나 GEC 임무에서 언어 간에 문법 지식(예를 들어 문법 기능)을 전달할 가능성은 뚜렷하지 않다.그래서 우리는 GEC의 다중 언어 이동 학습 방법을 연구했다.우리의 연구 결과는 다른 언어로부터의 이동 학습이 GEC의 정확성을 높일 수 있다는 것을 보여 준다.우리는 또한 근접원어가 특정 유형의 오류를 바로잡는 정확성에 중대한 영향을 미친다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'در این مطالعه، ما یادگیری از انتقال متوسط زبان را در کار اصلاح خطای گراماتیک (GEC) تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. بسیاری از زبانها منابع نیاز برای آموزش مدل GEC کمک می کنند. تغییر دادن زبانهای متوسط از زبانهای منابع بالا (مدل منبع) برای آموزش مدل های زبانهای منابع کم (مدل هدف) برای کار مختلف موثر است. ولی در وظیفه\u200cهای GEC احتمال انتقال علم گرامیک (مثال فعالیت گرامیک) در زبانها مشخص نیست. بنابراین، ما روش یادگیری از انتقال متوسط زبان برای GEC تحقیق می کنیم. نتایج ما نشان می دهند که یادگیری از زبانهای دیگر می تواند دقیق GEC را بهتر کند. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که نزدیک به زبانهای منبع تاثیر بزرگی بر دقیق اصلاح چند نوع اشتباهی دارد.', 'sw': 'Katika utafiti huu, tunachunguza kuhamisha lugha mbalimbali kujifunza katika kazi za usahihishaji wa makosa ya kigrammatika (GEC). Lugha nyingi hazina rasilimali zinazohitajika kufundisha mifano ya GEC. Uhamiaji wa lugha za cross-language kujifunza kutoka lugha za rasilimali zilizo juu (mifano ya chanzo) ni muhimu kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya mifano ya lugha duni za rasilimali (mifano ya lengo) kwa kazi mbalimbali. Hata hivyo, katika kazi za GEC, uwezekano wa kuhamisha maarifa ya kiuchumi (kwa mfano, kazi za kigrammatika) katika lugha zote hazikuwa wazi. Kwa hiyo, tunachunguza mbinu za kuhamisha lugha mbalimbali za kujifunza kwa ajili ya GEC. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa uhamishaji wa kujifunza kutoka lugha nyingine unaweza kuboresha ukweli wa GEC. Pia tunaonyesha kuwa karibu na lugha zina athari kubwa kwa ukweli wa kurekebisha aina fulani ya makosa.', 'sq': 'Në këtë studim, ne eksplorojmë mësimin e transferit ndërgjuhësor në detyrat e korrigjimit të gabimeve grammatike (GEC). Shumë gjuhë mungon burimet e nevojshme për të trajnuar modelet GEC. Cross-lingual transfer learning from high-resource languages (the source models) is effective for training models of low-resource languages (the target models) for various tasks.  Megjithatë, në detyrat e GEC, mundësia e transferimit të njohurive grammatike (për shembull funksionet grammatike) nëpër gjuhë nuk është e qartë. Prandaj, ne hetojmë metodat e mësimit të transferimit ndërgjuhësor për GEC. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se transferimi i mësimit nga gjuhë të tjera mund të përmirësojë saktësinë e GEC. Ne gjithashtu demonstrojmë se afërsia ndaj gjuhëve burimore ka një ndikim të rëndësishëm në saktësinë e korrigjimit të disa llojeve të gabimeve.', 'af': "In hierdie studie, ondersoek ons kruistale oordrag leer in grammatiese fout korreksie (GEC) opdragte. Baie tale het die hulpbronne nodig om GEC-modele te tref. Kruistale oordrag leer van hoë- hulpbron tale (die bron modele) is effektief vir onderwerp modele van lae- hulpbron tale (die doel modele) vir verskillende taak. Maar in GEC-opdragte is die moontlik van oordra van grammatiese kennis (bv. grammatiese funksies) oor tale nie duidelik nie. Daarom, ons ondersoek kruistale oordragmetodes vir GEC. Ons resultate wys dat die oordrag van leer van ander tale die presisie van GEC kan verbeter. Ons bevestig ook dat nabytigheid na bron tale 'n betekende invloek het op die presisie van sekere tipes foute korrigeer.", 'tr': 'Bu çalışmada gramatik hata düzeltmesi (GEC) işinde çoklu dilli transferler öwrenmesini gözləýäris. GEC nusgalary öwrenmek üçin köp diller ýok. Yüksek ressurs dillerinden öwrenmek üçin çoklu diller geçirilýär (çeşme modelleri) düşük ressurs dili modelleriniň (maksady modelleri) dürli zadlar üçin täsirlidir. Ýöne GEC g örevlerinde gramatik bilgi (meselâ, gramatik funksiýalary) dillerde göçürmek belli däl. Şol sebäpli, GEC üçin çarpaz diller transfers öwrenmek yöntemlerini inceleýäris. Biziň netijelerimiz başga dillerden öwrenmek üçin GEC dogrudygyny gowulaşdyryp biler. Biz hem çeşme dilleriniň ýakynlaşynyň belli hili ýalňyşlyklary düzeltmegiň dogrylygyna bir täsiri bar.', 'am': 'በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ስህተት ትምህርትን ለመፈለግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ብዙ ቋንቋዎች GEC ምሳሌዎችን ለማስተማር ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ከከፍተኛ resource ቋንቋዎች (የsource models) ለማስተማርና ለልዩ ሥርዓቶች ማህበረሰብ ጥቅረት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በGEC ስራ ውስጥ በቋንቋዎች ላይ የgrammatical እውቀትን ለመለስ (ለምሳሌ grammatical functions) መቻል አይገለጽም። ስለዚህም የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የGEC ትምህርት ማድረጊያን እንመርመራለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ከሌሎች ቋንቋዎች ትምህርትን ለመለወጥ የGEC እርግጠኛ ማድረግ እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡ ለቋንቋዎች ማቅረብ የሚቀርበው የአንዳንድ ዓይነት ስህተቶችን በማስተካከል ውስጥነት ላይ ታላቅ ጥቅም እንዳለው እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք լեզվի փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը գրամատիկական սխալների ուղղությամբ: Շատ լեզուներ չունեն այն ռեսուրսները, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են ԳԵԿ մոդելների ուսուցման համար: Cross-lingual transfer learning from high-resource languages (the source models) is effective for training models of low-resource languages (the target models) for various tasks.  Այնուամենայնիվ, ԳԵԿ-ի առաջադրանքներում գրամատիկական գիտելիքների (օրինակ գրամատիկական ֆունկցիաների) փոխանցման հնարավորությունը լեզուների միջև ակնհայտ չէ: Այսպիսով, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկլեզվային փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության մեթոդները ԳԵԿ-ի համար: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այլ լեզուներից սովորելու փոխանցումը կարող է բարելավել ԳԵԿ-ի ճշգրիտությունը: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ աղբյուր լեզուների մոտիկությունը մեծ ազդեցություն ունի որոշ սխալների ճշգրիտության վրա:', 'az': "Bu təcrübədə, grammatik xəta düzəltməsi (GEC) işlərində çox dilli transfer öyrənməsini keşfetirik. GEC modellərini təhsil etmək üçün çox dillərin istifadəsi yoxdur. Yüksek ressurs dillərindən öyrənmək öyrənməsi (mənbə modellərindən) düşük ressurs dillərinin (məqsəd modellərinin) modellərinin təhsil etməsi üçün faydalandır. Ancaq GEC işlərində, gramatik bilgi (məsələn, gramatik funksiyalar) dillərin arasına daşınması mümkün deyil. Beləliklə, GEC üçün çox dilli transfer öyrənmə metodlarını incidirik. Bizim sonuçlarımız digər dillərdən öyrənmək GEC'nin doğruluğunu yaxşılaşdırır. Biz də göstəririk ki, mənbə dillərinin yaxınlığı bəzi xətaların düzəltməsinin doğruluğuna möhkəm bir etkisi var.", 'bs': 'U ovoj studiji istražujemo učenje preko jezika prijenosa u zadatkima gramatičke korekcije grešaka (GEC). Mnogi jezici nedostaju resurse potrebne za obuku GEC modela. Prejezično učenje prijenosa iz visokih jezika resursa (izvornih modela) učinkovito je za obuku modela jezika niskih resursa (ciljnih modela) za različite zadatke. Međutim, u zadatkima GEC-a mogućnost prebacivanja gramatičkih znanja (npr. gramatičkih funkcija) na jezike nije jasna. Stoga istražujemo metode učenja preko jezika za GEC. Naši rezultati pokazuju da prijenos sa drugih jezika može poboljšati preciznost GEC-a. Također pokazujemo da blizina jezika izvora ima značajan uticaj na preciznost ispravljanja određenih vrsta grešaka.', 'bn': 'এই গবেষণায় আমরা গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল ত্রুটিক সংস্কার (GEC) কাজের মধ্যে শিক্ষা প্রদান করি। Many languages lack the resources required to train GEC models.  উচ্চ সম্পদ ভাষা থেকে ক্রস-ভাষা পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা (সোর্স মডেল) বিভিন্ন কাজের জন্য কম-সম্পদ ভাষার প্রশিক্ষণ মডেল (লক্ষ্য মডেল) কার্যকর। তবে জিসির কাজে গ্রামাটিক্যাল জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের সম্ভাবনা প্রকাশিত নয় (যেমন গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল ফাংশন)। তাই আমরা জিএসসির জন্য ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী পরিবর্তনের শিক্ষা পদ্ধতি অনুসন্ধান করি। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে অন্য ভাষা থেকে শিক্ষা বিনিময়ে জিসির সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করতে পারে। আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে সূত্র ভাষার কাছে কাছাকাছি প্রভাব রয়েছে কিছু ধরনের ভুল সংশোধনের জন্য।', 'ca': "En aquest estudi, explorem aprenentatge translingüístic en tasques de correcció d'errors gramàtics (GEC). Moltes llengües careixen dels recursos requerits per formar models GEC. La transfer ència translingüística d'aprenentatge de llengües d'alt recurso (els models de fonts) és eficaç per a formar models de llengües de baix recurso (els models d'objectiu) per diverses tasques. No obstant això, en les tasques del GEC, la possibilitat de transferir coneixements gramàtics (per exemple funcions gramàtiques) a les llengües no és evident. Per tant, investigam mètodes d'aprenentatge translingüístic de transfer ència per a GEC. Els nostres resultats demostren que la transfer ència d'aprenentatge d'altres llengües pot millorar la precisió del GEC. També demostram que la proximitat a les llengües de font té un impacte significatiu en la precisió de corregir certs tipus d'errors.", 'cs': 'V této práci zkoumáme mezijazyčné transferové učení v úlohách gramatické korekce chyb (GEC). Mnoho jazyků chybí zdroje potřebné pro trénink modelů GEC. Výuka mezijazyčného transferu z jazyků s vysokými zdroji (zdrojové modely) je efektivní pro školení modelů jazyků s nízkými zdroji (cílové modely) pro různé úkoly. U úkolů GEC však není zřejmá možnost přenosu gramatických znalostí (např. gramatických funkcí) napříč jazyky. Proto zkoumáme metody transferu mezi jazyky pro GEC. Naše výsledky ukazují, že transfer učení z jiných jazyků může zlepšit přesnost GEC. Dokazujeme také, že blízkost zdrojových jazyků má významný vliv na přesnost opravy určitých typů chyb.', 'et': 'Käesolevas uuringus uurime keeleülest siirdeõpet grammatilise veaparanduse (GEC) ülesannetes. Paljudel keeltel puuduvad GEC mudelite koolitamiseks vajalikud ressursid. Keeleülene siirdeõpe suure ressursiga keeltest (lähtemudelid) on tõhus vähese ressursiga keelte (sihtmudelid) koolitamiseks erinevate ülesannete jaoks. GEC ülesannete puhul ei ole aga ilmne võimalus edastada grammatilisi teadmisi (nt grammatilised funktsioonid) keelte vahel. Seetõttu uurime keeleüleseid siirdeõppe meetodeid GEC jaoks. Meie tulemused näitavad, et siirdeõpe teistest keeltest võib parandada GEC täpsust. Samuti näitame, et lähtekeelte lähedusel on märkimisväärne mõju teatud tüüpi vigade parandamise täpsusele.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa tutkitaan kieliopillisen virhekorjauksen (GEC) tehtäviä kieliopillisen siirtooppimisen avulla. Monilta kieliltä puuttuu GEC-mallien kouluttamiseen tarvittavat resurssit. Monikielinen siirtooppiminen korkean resurssin kielistä (lähdemallit) on tehokas vähävaraisten kielten (kohdemallit) koulutusmalleissa eri tehtävissä. GEC-tehtävissä ei kuitenkaan ole selvää mahdollisuutta siirtää kieliopillista tietoa (esim. kieliopilliset toiminnot) eri kielille. Siksi tutkimme monikielisiä siirtooppimismenetelmiä GEC:ssä. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että siirtooppiminen muilta kieliltä voi parantaa GEC:n tarkkuutta. Osoitamme myös, että lähdekielten läheisyys vaikuttaa merkittävästi tietyntyyppisten virheiden korjaamisen tarkkuuteen.', 'jv': 'Where are you from? Akèh langkung ora ono akeh penguné sing kudu nggawe model GEC. Progress politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kaya, awak dhéwé nyulung kelas perangkat sabanjuré karo GEC. Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngertuk kanggo ngerasah dilané sing wis ana bakal nggawe GEC barang nggawe barang. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno kanggo kelas kanggo langkung sampeyan luwih hayo nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno sing erampen.', 'he': 'במחקר הזה, אנו חוקרים את הלימודים של העברת שפתיים בין משימות תיקון שגיאות גרמטית (GEC). לשפות רבות חסרות המשאבים הנדרשים לאימון דוגמני GEC. העברה דרך שפת ללמוד שפות משאבים גבוהים (דוגמני המקור) יעילה לאימון דוגמנים של שפות משאבים נמוכות (דוגמני המטרה) למשימות שונות. עם זאת, במשימות GEC, האפשרות להעביר ידע גרמטי (למשל תפקידים גרמטיים) לאורך שפות אינה ברורה. לכן, אנו חוקרים שיטות לימוד מעברת שפתיים לצד GEC. התוצאות שלנו מראות כי ההעברה ללמוד משפות אחרות יכולה לשפר את מדויקת GEC. We also demonstrate that proximity to source languages has a significant impact on the accuracy of correcting certain types of errors.', 'ha': "Daga wannan lõkaci, munã ƙidãya da za'a iya amfani da shiryarwa cikin aikin ɓata na grammatisk (GEC). Da harshen wasu na'ura bã su da rasilin da ake buƙata dõmin a sanar da misãlai na GEC. Motsa mai amfani da shirin fassarar-harshen na-nau'in (misãlai na source) na da amfani don ya yi wa amfani da misãlai na lugha masu ƙasƙanci na-resource (misãlai masu amfani da shi). However, in GEC tasks, the possibility of transferring grammatical knowledge (e.g., grammatical functions) across languages is not evident.  Saboda haka, munã ƙidãya hanyoyin ta'ura da za'a shige ta cikin harshen na'ura na GEC. MatamayinMu sun nuna cewa ana motsa zane-zane daga harshen wasu, za'a ƙara tsarin GEC. Tuna nũna cewa kusanta zuwa lugha masu ci yana da matsayi mai girma ga tsarin wasu irin ɓata.", 'sk': 'V tej študiji raziskujemo medjezično prenosno učenje v nalogah slovničnega popravljanja napak (GEC). Mnogi jeziki nimajo sredstev, potrebnih za usposabljanje modelov GEC. Medjezično prenosno učenje iz jezikov z visokimi viri (izvorni modeli) je učinkovito za modele usposabljanja jezikov z nizkimi viri (ciljni modeli) za različne naloge. Pri nalogah GEC pa možnost prenosa slovničnega znanja (npr. slovničnih funkcij) med jeziki ni očitna. Zato raziskujemo metode medjezičnega transfernega učenja za GEC. Naši rezultati kažejo, da lahko prenosno učenje iz drugih jezikov izboljša natančnost GEC. Dokazujemo tudi, da bližina izvornih jezikov pomembno vpliva na točnost popravljanja določenih vrst napak.', 'bo': 'In this study, we explore cross-language transfer learning in grammatical error correction (GEC) tasks. སྐད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་GEC མ་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་གཏོང་དགོས་པའི་རྒྱུ་ཆས་མང་ཙམ་མེད། Cross-lingual transfer learning from high-resource languages (the source models) is effective for training models of low-resource languages (the target models) for various tasks. ཡིན་ནའང་། GEC་ལས་ཀ་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་སྔོན་པ་ཞིག་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡིན། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཙལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།GEC ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་སྐད་རིགས་གཞན་ནས་གནས ང་ཚོས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཉེ་འགྲམ་བའི་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཉེན་འགྱུར་བ་ཏུ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡིན་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'ContraCAT : Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation', 'ar': 'ContraCAT: النماذج التحليلية للمرجعيات المقارنة للترجمة الآلية', 'fr': 'ContracAt\xa0: modèles analytiques de coréférence contrastive pour la traduction automatique', 'es': 'ContraCat: plantillas analíticas de correferencia contrastiva para traducción automática', 'pt': 'ContraCAT: Modelos Analíticos de Correferência Contrastiva para Tradução Automática', 'ja': 'ContraCAT ：機械翻訳のためのコントラストコアレファレンス分析テンプレート', 'hi': 'ContraCAT: मशीन अनुवाद के लिए Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates', 'zh': 'ContraCAT:机器翻译对比性共推理析模板', 'ru': 'ContraCAT: Контрастные Аналитические Шаблоны Ядра для Машинного Перевода', 'ga': 'ContraCAT: Teimpléid Anailíse Croílár Codarsnacha le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'ContraCAT: Kontrasztív Coreferencia analitikai sablonok gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Αντιστατικά αναλυτικά πρότυπα για μηχανική μετάφραση', 'kk': 'КонтраCAT: Машин аудармасының контрастық түрлі баптаулары аналитикалық үлгілері', 'it': 'ContraCAT: Modelli analitici di coreferenza contrastante per la traduzione automatica', 'lt': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastiniai koreferencijos analizės modeliai mašinų vertimui', 'mk': 'ContraCAT: Контрастивни аналитички шаблони за превод на машина', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dട്രാക്രാസ്റ്റീവ് കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'ContraCAT: Templat Analitik Koreferensi Kontras untuk Terjemahan Mesin', 'mn': 'ContraCAT: Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation', 'mt': 'ContraCAT: Modelli Analitiċi Kontrastivi ta’ Koreferenza għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'pl': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastywne szablony analityczne Coreference dla tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'ContraCAT: Șabloane analitice de corefență contrastivă pentru traducerea automată', 'no': 'Comment', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිකරණය: ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිකරණ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණය', 'sr': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastivne analitičke šablone za prevod mašine', 'so': 'ContraCAT: Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation', 'sv': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastiva Coreference Analytiska mallar för maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'ContraCAT: இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான வார்ப்புருக்களை தொடர்புடைய மாற்று', 'ur': 'ContraCAT: Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'ContraCAT: bản phản loạn Coreference Analytical Templlates for Machine Translation', 'bg': 'Аналитични шаблони за контрастивни кореференции за машинен превод', 'hr': 'ContraCAT: Analitični šabloni kontrastivne korisnosti za prevod strojeva', 'nl': 'ContraCAT: Contrastive Coreference analytische sjablonen voor machinevertaling', 'de': 'ContraCAT: Contrastive Coreference Analysevorlagen für maschinelle Übersetzungen', 'da': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastive Coreference analytiske skabeloner til maskinoversættelse', 'id': 'ContraCAT: Model Analytis Koreferensi Kontrastif untuk Translation Machine', 'ko': 'ContraCAT: 기계 번역을 위한 비교 공지 분석 템플릿', 'sw': 'ContraCAT: Templates for Translation of Mashine', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk', 'fa': 'ContraCAT: نمونه\u200cهای تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cی پیشنهاد متفاوت برای ترجمه ماشین', 'af': 'Kontrakkaat: Kontrasteef Koreferensie Analytiese Werkvoorbeeld vir Masjien Vertaling', 'am': 'ይዞታዎች', 'bn': 'ContraCAT: মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য কন্ট্রাক্টিভ কোরেফেন্স বিশ্লেষক মন্দির', 'sq': 'ContraCAT: Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation', 'bs': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastivne analitičke šablone za prevod mašine', 'ca': 'ContraCAT: Models Contrastive Coreference Analytical Models for Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastivní Coreference analytické šablony pro strojový překlad', 'et': 'ContraCAT: masintõlke kontrastiivsed koreferensi analüütilised mallid', 'az': 'ContraCAT', 'fi': 'ContraCAT: Kontrastisia Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation', 'jv': 'contrastCaT:', 'sk': 'ContraCAT: Analitične predloge kontrastne Coreference za strojno prevajanje', 'he': 'Comment', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ContraCAT：Contrastive Coreference Analytical Templates for Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Recent high scores on pronoun translation using context-aware neural machine translation have suggested that current approaches work well. ContraPro is a notable example of a contrastive challenge set for EnglishGerman pronoun translation. The high scores achieved by transformer models may suggest that they are able to effectively model the complicated set of inferences required to carry out pronoun translation. This entails the ability to determine which entities could be referred to, identify which entity a source-language pronoun refers to (if any), and access the target-language grammatical gender for that entity. We first show through a series of targeted adversarial attacks that in fact current approaches are not able to model all of this information well. Inserting small amounts of distracting information is enough to strongly reduce scores, which should not be the case. We then create a new template test set ContraCAT, designed to individually assess the ability to handle the specific steps necessary for successful pronoun translation. Our analyses show that current approaches to context-aware NMT rely on a set of surface heuristics, which break down when translations require real reasoning. We also propose an approach for augmenting the training data, with some improvements.', 'ar': 'أشارت الدرجات العالية الأخيرة في ترجمة الضمير باستخدام الترجمة الآلية العصبية الواعية للسياق إلى أن الأساليب الحالية تعمل بشكل جيد. يعد ContraPro مثالًا بارزًا على مجموعة التحدي التباين للترجمة الإنجليزية → الألمانية للضمير. قد تشير الدرجات العالية التي حققتها نماذج المحولات إلى أنها قادرة على تصميم مجموعة معقدة من الاستدلالات المطلوبة لتنفيذ ترجمة الضمير بشكل فعال. يستلزم ذلك القدرة على تحديد الكيانات التي يمكن الإشارة إليها ، وتحديد الكيان الذي يشير إليه ضمير اللغة المصدر (إن وجد) ، والوصول إلى الجنس النحوي للغة الهدف لهذا الكيان. لقد أظهرنا أولاً من خلال سلسلة من الهجمات العدائية المستهدفة أن الأساليب الحالية في الواقع ليست قادرة على نمذجة كل هذه المعلومات بشكل جيد. يعتبر إدخال كميات صغيرة من المعلومات المشتتة للانتباه كافيًا لتقليل الدرجات بقوة ، وهو ما لا ينبغي أن يكون عليه الحال. نقوم بعد ذلك بإنشاء مجموعة اختبار قالب جديدة ContraCAT ، مصممة لتقييم القدرة على التعامل مع الخطوات المحددة اللازمة لترجمة الضمائر بشكل فردي. تُظهر تحليلاتنا أن المناهج الحالية لـ NMT الواعية بالسياق تعتمد على مجموعة من الاستدلالات السطحية ، والتي تتفكك عندما تتطلب الترجمات تفكيرًا حقيقيًا. نقترح أيضًا نهجًا لزيادة بيانات التدريب ، مع بعض التحسينات.', 'pt': 'As pontuações altas recentes na tradução de pronomes usando a tradução automática neural sensível ao contexto sugeriram que as abordagens atuais funcionam bem. ContraPro é um exemplo notável de um desafio contrastivo definido para tradução de pronome inglês→alemão. As altas pontuações alcançadas pelos modelos transformadores podem sugerir que eles são capazes de modelar efetivamente o complicado conjunto de inferências necessárias para realizar a tradução de pronomes. Isso implica a capacidade de determinar quais entidades podem ser referidas, identificar a qual entidade um pronome do idioma de origem se refere (se houver) e acessar o gênero gramatical do idioma de destino para essa entidade. Primeiro, mostramos por meio de uma série de ataques adversários direcionados que, de fato, as abordagens atuais não são capazes de modelar bem todas essas informações. A inserção de pequenas quantidades de informações distrativas é suficiente para reduzir fortemente as pontuações, o que não deveria ser o caso. Em seguida, criamos um novo conjunto de teste de modelo ContraCAT, projetado para avaliar individualmente a capacidade de lidar com as etapas específicas necessárias para uma tradução de pronomes bem-sucedida. Nossas análises mostram que as abordagens atuais para NMT sensível ao contexto dependem de um conjunto de heurísticas de superfície, que se desfazem quando as traduções exigem raciocínio real. Também propomos uma abordagem para aumentar os dados de treinamento, com algumas melhorias.', 'es': 'Las altas puntuaciones recientes en la traducción de pronombres mediante traducción automática neuronal sensible al contexto han sugerido que los enfoques actuales funcionan bien. ContraPro es un ejemplo notable de un desafío de contraste establecido para la traducción de pronombres inglés→alemán. Las altas puntuaciones alcanzadas por los modelos de transformadores pueden sugerir que son capaces de modelar eficazmente el complicado conjunto de inferencias necesarias para llevar a cabo la traducción de pronombres. Esto implica la capacidad de determinar a qué entidades se puede hacer referencia, identificar a qué entidad se refiere un pronombre en el idioma fuente (si corresponde) y acceder al género gramatical del idioma de destino para esa entidad. Primero demostramos a través de una serie de ataques adversarios selectivos que, de hecho, los enfoques actuales no son capaces de modelar bien toda esta información. Insertar pequeñas cantidades de información que distraiga es suficiente para reducir considerablemente las puntuaciones, lo que no debería ser el caso. Luego creamos un nuevo conjunto de pruebas de plantilla ContraCat, diseñado para evaluar individualmente la capacidad de manejar los pasos específicos necesarios para una traducción exitosa de pronombres. Nuestros análisis muestran que los enfoques actuales de la NMT sensible al contexto se basan en un conjunto de heurísticas de superficie, que se descomponen cuando las traducciones requieren un razonamiento real. También proponemos un enfoque para aumentar los datos de entrenamiento, con algunas mejoras.', 'fr': "Les récents scores élevés sur la traduction des pronoms à l'aide de la traduction automatique neuronale sensible au contexte suggèrent que les approches actuelles fonctionnent bien. ContraPro est un exemple remarquable de défi contrasté pour la traduction des pronoms anglais→allemand. Les scores élevés obtenus par les modèles de transformateurs peuvent suggérer qu'ils sont capables de modéliser efficacement l'ensemble complexe d'inférences requises pour effectuer la traduction des pronoms. Cela implique la capacité de déterminer les entités auxquelles il est possible de faire référence, d'identifier l'entité à laquelle un pronom de langue source fait référence (le cas échéant) et d'accéder au genre grammatical de la langue cible pour cette entité. Nous montrons d'abord, à travers une série d'attaques antagonistes ciblées, qu'en fait, les approches actuelles ne sont pas en mesure de modéliser correctement toutes ces informations. L'insertion de petites quantités d'informations distrayantes suffit à réduire fortement les scores, ce qui ne devrait pas être le cas. Nous créons ensuite un nouveau modèle de test ContraCat, conçu pour évaluer individuellement la capacité à gérer les étapes spécifiques nécessaires à la réussite de la traduction des pronoms. Nos analyses montrent que les approches actuelles de la NMT sensible au contexte reposent sur un ensemble d'heuristiques de surface, qui se décomposent lorsque les traductions nécessitent un véritable raisonnement. Nous proposons également une approche pour augmenter les données d'entraînement, avec quelques améliorations.", 'ja': '文脈認識ニューラル機械翻訳を使用した代名詞翻訳に関する最近の高いスコアは、現在のアプローチがうまく機能することを示唆している。 ContraProは、英語と→ドイツ語の代名詞翻訳のための対照的なチャレンジセットの顕著な例です。 変圧器モデルによって達成された高いスコアは、代名詞翻訳を実行するために必要な複雑な推論のセットを効果的にモデル化することができることを示唆し得る。 これには、参照可能なエンティティを決定し、ソース言語の代名詞が参照するエンティティを特定し（もしあれば）、そのエンティティのターゲット言語の文法的性別にアクセスする能力が含まれます。 まず、一連のターゲットを絞った対抗攻撃を通じて、実際には、現在のアプローチでは、この情報をすべてうまくモデル化することができないことを示します。 少量の気を散らす情報を挿入するだけで、スコアを大幅に減らすことができますが、そうではありません。 次に、成功した代名詞翻訳に必要な特定のステップを処理する能力を個別に評価するように設計された新しいテンプレートテストセットContraCATを作成します。 私たちの分析によると、文脈認識型NMTへの現在のアプローチは、翻訳が実際の推論を必要とする場合に分解される一連の表面ヒューリスティックに依存していることが示されています。 また、トレーニングデータを拡張するためのアプローチも提案しています。', 'zh': '近用上下文感知神经机器翻译者代词译者高分明,目前法行善。 ContraPro者,英语→德语代词译之比也。 变压器模得者高分明其有效于行代词译者杂推理集建模之。 此须定何实体可引,识源语代词谓何实体(若有言),并访其体语言法性别。 首以列针对性对抗性攻,实不能尽拟。 插少分意足以大大降低分数,而事实不然。 然后创一新模板试集 ContraCAT,指在独评成功代词译者特定步骤之能。 臣等之分析表明,上下文知NMT之法,赖于表启发式,译须真理,其道崩溃。 又增练数术,多所改进。', 'hi': 'संदर्भ-जागरूक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद का उपयोग करके सर्वनाम अनुवाद पर हाल ही में उच्च स्कोर ने सुझाव दिया है कि वर्तमान दृष्टिकोण अच्छी तरह से काम करते हैं। ContraPro अंग्रेजी→जर्मन सर्वनाम अनुवाद के लिए सेट एक contrastive चुनौती का एक उल्लेखनीय उदाहरण है। ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल द्वारा प्राप्त उच्च स्कोर यह सुझाव दे सकते हैं कि वे सर्वनाम अनुवाद करने के लिए आवश्यक अनुमानों के जटिल सेट को प्रभावी ढंग से मॉडल करने में सक्षम हैं। यह निर्धारित करने की क्षमता पर जोर देता है कि किन संस्थाओं को संदर्भित किया जा सकता है, यह पहचानें कि स्रोत-भाषा सर्वनाम किस इकाई को संदर्भित करता है (यदि कोई हो), और उस इकाई के लिए लक्ष्य-भाषा व्याकरणिक लिंग तक पहुंचता है। हम पहले लक्षित प्रतिकूल हमलों की एक श्रृंखला के माध्यम से दिखाते हैं कि वास्तव में वर्तमान दृष्टिकोण इस सभी जानकारी को अच्छी तरह से मॉडल करने में सक्षम नहीं हैं। ध्यान भंग करने वाली जानकारी की छोटी मात्रा में सम्मिलित करना स्कोर को दृढ़ता से कम करने के लिए पर्याप्त है, जो मामला नहीं होना चाहिए। फिर हम एक नया टेम्पलेट परीक्षण सेट ContraCAT बनाते हैं, जिसे व्यक्तिगत रूप से सफल सर्वनाम अनुवाद के लिए आवश्यक विशिष्ट चरणों को संभालने की क्षमता का आकलन करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि संदर्भ-जागरूक एनएमटी के लिए वर्तमान दृष्टिकोण सतह ह्यूरिस्टिक्स के एक सेट पर भरोसा करते हैं, जो अनुवाद के वास्तविक तर्क की आवश्यकता होने पर टूट जाते हैं। हम कुछ सुधारों के साथ प्रशिक्षण डेटा को बढ़ाने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавние высокие баллы по переводу местоимений с использованием контекстно-осознанного нейронного машинного перевода позволяют предположить, что текущие подходы работают хорошо. ContraPro является примечательным примером набора контрастных испытаний для перевода местоимений английского и→ немецкого языков. Высокие баллы, достигнутые трансформаторными моделями, могут свидетельствовать о том, что они способны эффективно моделировать сложный набор выводов, необходимых для осуществления перевода местоимений. Это подразумевает возможность определить, на какие сущности можно ссылаться, определить, на какую сущность ссылается местоимение на исходном языке (если таковое имеется), и получить доступ к грамматическому полу на целевом языке для этой сущности. Сначала мы показываем с помощью серии целенаправленных враждебных атак, что на самом деле нынешние подходы не в состоянии хорошо смоделировать всю эту информацию. Вставлять небольшие объемы отвлекающей информации достаточно, чтобы значительно снизить баллы, чего не должно быть. Затем мы создаем новый набор тестов ContraCAT, предназначенный для индивидуальной оценки способности обрабатывать конкретные шаги, необходимые для успешного перевода местоимений. Наши анализы показывают, что современные подходы к контекстно-зависимой NMT опираются на набор поверхностных эвристик, которые ломаются, когда переводы требуют реальных рассуждений. Мы также предлагаем подход к расширению данных о подготовке с некоторыми улучшениями.', 'ga': 'Tugann scóir arda le déanaí ar aistriúchán forainm ag baint úsáide as aistriúchán meaisín nóral atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs go n-oibríonn cur chuige reatha go maith. Is sampla suntasach é ContraPro de dhúshlán codarsnachta atá leagtha síos don aistriúchán forainm Béarla → Gearmáinis. B’fhéidir go dtugann na scóir arda a ghnóthaíonn múnlaí claochladáin le tuiscint go bhfuil siad in ann an tacar casta tátail a theastaíonn chun aistriúchán forainm a dhéanamh a shamhaltú go héifeachtach. Áiríonn sé seo an cumas a chinneadh cé na heintitis a bhféadfaí tagairt a dhéanamh dóibh, an t-aonán a dtagraíonn forainm foinse-teanga dó (más ann dó) a shainaithint, agus rochtain a fháil ar inscne gramadaí na sprioctheanga don aonán sin. Léirímid ar dtús trí shraith ionsaithe sáraíochta spriocdhírithe nach bhfuil cur chuige reatha in ann an fhaisnéis seo go léir a shamhaltú go maith. Is leor méideanna beaga faisnéise a tharraingíonn aird a chur isteach chun scóir a laghdú go láidir, rud nár cheart a bheith amhlaidh. Ansin cruthaímid tacar tástála teimpléad nua ContraCAT, atá deartha chun measúnú aonair a dhéanamh ar an gcumas chun na céimeanna sonracha a láimhseáil atá riachtanach d’aistriúchán rathúil forainm. Léiríonn ár n-anailísí go mbraitheann cuir chuige reatha i leith NMT atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs ar shraith heuristics dromchla, a bhriseann síos nuair a bhíonn fíor-réasúnaíocht ag teastáil le haghaidh aistriúcháin. Molaimid freisin cur chuige chun na sonraí oiliúna a mhéadú, le roinnt feabhsuithe.', 'hu': 'A környezettudatos neurális gépi fordítással kapcsolatos névmások fordításával kapcsolatos legfrissebb pontszámok azt sugallják, hogy a jelenlegi megközelítések jól működnek. A ContraPro egy figyelemreméltó példa arra, hogy az angol német névmásnévfordítás kontrasztos kihívást jelent. A transzformátormodellek által elért magas pontszámok arra utalhatnak, hogy képesek hatékonyan modellezni a névmások fordításához szükséges bonyolult következtetéseket. Ez magában foglalja annak meghatározását, hogy mely entitásokra lehet hivatkozni, azonosítani, hogy melyik entitásra utal egy forrásnyelvű névmásra (ha van ilyen), és hozzáférni az adott entitás célnyelvű nyelvtani neméhez. Először egy sor célzott ellenséges támadással mutatjuk meg, hogy a jelenlegi megközelítések valójában nem képesek mindezt az információt jól modellezni. Kis mennyiségű zavaró információ behelyezése elegendő ahhoz, hogy erősen csökkentse a pontszámokat, ami nem lehet így. Ezután létrehozunk egy új ContraCAT tesztkészletet, amelynek célja, hogy egyénileg felmérje a sikeres névmások fordításához szükséges konkrét lépéseket. Elemzéseink azt mutatják, hogy a kontextustudatos NMT jelenlegi megközelítései a felületi heurisztika sorozatára támaszkodnak, amelyek lebomlanak, amikor a fordítások valódi érvelést igényelnek. Javasoljuk továbbá az edzési adatok bővítésére vonatkozó megközelítést, néhány fejlesztéssel.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες υψηλές βαθμολογίες στη μετάφραση αντωνυμίας χρησιμοποιώντας νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος έχουν δείξει ότι οι τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις λειτουργούν καλά. Το ContraPro είναι ένα αξιοσημείωτο παράδειγμα μιας αντιφατικής πρόκλησης που τίθεται για τη μετάφραση της αγγλικής γερμανικής αντωνυμίας. Οι υψηλές βαθμολογίες που επιτυγχάνονται από τα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών μπορεί να υποδηλώνουν ότι είναι σε θέση να μοντελοποιήσουν αποτελεσματικά το περίπλοκο σύνολο συμπερασμάτων που απαιτούνται για τη μετάφραση αντωνυμίας. Αυτό συνεπάγεται την ικανότητα να προσδιορίζεται σε ποιες οντότητες θα μπορούσε να αναφερθεί, να προσδιορίζεται σε ποια οντότητα αναφέρεται μια αντωνυμία γλώσσας προέλευσης (εάν υπάρχει) και να έχει πρόσβαση στο γραμματικό φύλο της γλώσσας-στόχου για την εν λόγω οντότητα. Πρώτα δείχνουμε μέσα από μια σειρά στοχευμένων εχθρικών επιθέσεων ότι στην πραγματικότητα οι τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις δεν είναι σε θέση να μοντελοποιήσουν όλες αυτές τις πληροφορίες καλά. Η εισαγωγή μικρών ποσοτήτων πληροφοριών που αποσπούν την προσοχή είναι αρκετή για να μειωθεί σημαντικά η βαθμολογία, κάτι που δεν θα πρέπει να συμβαίνει. Στη συνέχεια, δημιουργούμε ένα νέο σετ δοκιμών προτύπων, σχεδιασμένο για να αξιολογεί ατομικά την ικανότητα χειρισμού των συγκεκριμένων βημάτων που απαιτούνται για την επιτυχή μετάφραση αντωνυμίας. Οι αναλύσεις μας δείχνουν ότι οι τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος βασίζονται σε ένα σύνολο επιφανειακών heuristics, οι οποίες διασπώνται όταν οι μεταφράσεις απαιτούν πραγματική συλλογιστική. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια προσέγγιση για την αύξηση των δεδομένων κατάρτισης, με ορισμένες βελτιώσεις.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე დიდი წერტილები, რომლებიც კონტექსტური მაქინის გაგრძნობის გამოყენებაში გამოიყენება, მიმდინარე წარმოდგენების მუშაობა. ContraPro არის კონტრასტიური გამოცდილების მაგალითი, რომელიც ანგლისური გერმანური პრონუნის გარგუნებისთვის დაყენებულია. შეიძლება შეგიძლიათ, რომ ისინი ეფექტიურად შეუძლიათ მოდელურად მოდელურად მოდელურად მოდელურად მოდელურად მოდელურად მოდელურად შეუძლიათ შეუძლიათ მოდელურად გადა ეს იქნება შესაძლებლობა განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ინტერტიების შესაძლებლობა შეიძლება იყოს, განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ინტერტი მხოლოდ ენერგიის განსაზღვრება იქნება (თუ არა, თუ არა) და მიზედან მიზე ჩვენ პირველად ჩვენ ჩვენ მოვაჩვენებთ რამდენიმე მისაღებული ანგარიალური არაფექციების სერიოში, რომ მიმდინარე მისაღება არ შეუძლებელია ყველა ეს ინფორმაციის მოდე პატარა ინფორმაციის გადაყენება უფრო ძალიან შემცირებელია, რომელიც არ უნდა იყოს. შემდეგ ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი შაბლონის ტესტის შენახვა ContraCAT, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულად განსაზღვრებელად განსაზღვრებელად შესაძლებელად გადავწეროთ სპექტიკური ჩვენი ანალიზები აჩვენებენ, რომ მიმდინარე კონტექსტური დაახლოებით, NMT დაახლოებით სამუშაო ჰერისტიკის ნაწილი, რომელიც გადაწყალება, როდესაც სამუშაო ჩვენ ასევე მინდომებით გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების გაზრუქმება, რამდენიმე გაზრუქმებით.', 'lt': 'Pastarojo meto aukšti aiškio vertimo rezultatai naudojant kontekste suprantamą neurologinį vertimą rodo, kad dabartiniai metodai veikia gerai. ContraPro yra akivaizdus kontrastinio iššūkio pavyzdys, nustatytas anglų kalbos vokiečių žodžio vertimui. Dideli transformatorių modelių rezultatai gali rodyti, kad jie gali veiksmingai modeliuoti sudėtingą išvadų rinkinį, reikalingą aiškiam vertimui atlikti. This entails the ability to determine which entities could be referred to, identify which entity a source-language pronoun refers to (if any), and access the target-language grammatical gender for that entity.  Pirmiausia per kelis tikslinius priešingus išpuolius parodome, kad dabartiniai požiūriai iš tikrųjų negali gerai modeliuoti visos šios informacijos. Įterpti nedidelį dėmesį skiriančios informacijos kiekį pakanka, kad būtų galima smarkiai sumažinti rezultatus, o taip neturėtų būti. Tada sukuriame naują bandymų šabloną ContraCAT, skirtą atskirai įvertinti gebėjimą imtis konkrečių veiksmų, būtinų sėkmingam aiškiam vertimui. Mūsų analizės rodo, kad dabartiniai požiūriai į aplinkybes suprantamą NMT grindžiami paviršiaus heuristikų rinkiniu, kuris suskaičiuojamas, kai vertimai reikalauja tikro pagrįstumo. Taip pat siūlome metodą, kaip didinti mokymo duomenis ir tam tikrus patobulinimus.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните високи резултати за превод со промени користејќи превод на нервни машини со контекст, покажаа дека сегашните пристапи функционираат добро. ContraPro е извонреден пример на контрастивен предизвик поставен за англиски германски превод на речни речени. Високите резултати постигнати од трансформаторските модели можат да покажат дека тие можат ефикасно да го моделираат комплицираниот сет на инференции потребни за извршување на јасен превод. Ова вклучува способност да се одреди на кој ентитет може да се посочи, да се идентификува на кој ентитет се посочува прогносот на изворот-јазик (ако постои), и да се пристапи на граматичкиот пол на целниот јазик за тој ентитет. Прво покажуваме низ серија насочени непријателски напади дека моменталните пристапи не можат да ги моделираат сите овие информации добро. Внесувањето мали количини на одвлекувачки информации е доволно за силно да се намалат резултатите, што не треба да се случи. Потоа ќе создадеме нов сет на тестирање на шаблони ContraCAT, дизајниран за индивидуално да ја процени способноста да се справи со специфичните чекори потребни за успешен превод. Нашите анализи покажуваат дека актуелните пристапи кон контекстно свесни НМТ зависат од сет на површина хеористика, која се распадна кога преводите бараат вистински разум. Ние, исто така, предложуваме пристап за зголемување на податоците за обука, со некои подобрувања.', 'ms': 'Skor tinggi baru-baru ini pada terjemahan pronun menggunakan terjemahan mesin saraf yang sedar-konteks telah menyarankan bahawa pendekatan semasa berfungsi dengan baik. ContraPro adalah contoh terkenal bagi cabaran bertentangan ditetapkan untuk terjemahan pronun bahasa Inggeris Jerman. Skor tinggi yang dicapai oleh model pengubah mungkin menyarankan bahawa mereka mampu memmodelkan secara efektif set kesimpulan yang rumit yang diperlukan untuk melaksanakan terjemahan pronun. This entails the ability to determine which entities could be referred to, identify which entity a source-language pronoun refers to (if any), and access the target-language grammatical gender for that entity.  Kami pertama-tama menunjukkan melalui seri serangan musuh sasaran bahawa sebenarnya pendekatan semasa tidak mampu model semua maklumat ini dengan baik. Masukkan jumlah kecil maklumat mengalihkan perhatian cukup untuk mengurangkan skor dengan kuat, yang tidak sepatutnya berlaku. We then create a new template test set ContraCAT, designed to individually assess the ability to handle the specific steps necessary for successful pronoun translation.  Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan semasa kepada NMT yang sedar-konteks bergantung pada set heuristik permukaan, yang pecah apabila terjemahan memerlukan alasan sebenar. Kami juga menyarankan pendekatan untuk menambah data latihan, dengan beberapa peningkatan.', 'it': "I recenti punteggi più alti sulla traduzione dei pronomi utilizzando la traduzione automatica neurale consapevole del contesto hanno suggerito che gli approcci attuali funzionano bene. ContraPro è un esempio notevole di sfida contrastante per la traduzione del pronome tedesco inglese. I punteggi più alti ottenuti dai modelli trasformatori possono suggerire che sono in grado di modellare efficacemente il complesso insieme di inferenze necessario per eseguire la traduzione del pronome. Ciò comporta la capacità di determinare a quali entità si potrebbe fare riferimento, identificare a quale entità si riferisce un pronome della lingua di origine (se presente) e accedere al genere grammaticale della lingua di destinazione per tale entità. Per prima cosa mostriamo attraverso una serie di attacchi avversi mirati che in realtà gli approcci attuali non sono in grado di modellare bene tutte queste informazioni. L'inserimento di piccole quantità di informazioni distrattive è sufficiente per ridurre fortemente i punteggi, il che non dovrebbe essere il caso. Creiamo quindi un nuovo set di test template ContraCAT, progettato per valutare individualmente la capacità di gestire i passaggi specifici necessari per la traduzione di pronomi di successo. Le nostre analisi mostrano che gli attuali approcci alla NMT consapevoli del contesto si basano su un insieme di euristiche superficiali, che si scompongono quando le traduzioni richiedono un ragionamento reale. Proponiamo anche un approccio per aumentare i dati di allenamento, con alcuni miglioramenti.", 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің аудармаларын қолдану үшін жаңа аудармалардың жоғары нөмірлері қазіргі жақсы жұмыс істейтін жұмыс істейді. ContraPro - ағылшын тіліндің ағылшын тіліндік аудармасының контрастық мәселесі. Түрлендіру үлгілерінде жеткізілген жоғары нәтижелер өзгерту үшін қажетті түрлендіру үшін қажетті түрлендіру жиынын әсер етеді деп ойлайды. Бұл қайсы нысандарды анықтауға мүмкіндік береді, көзінің тілдері қайсы нысанды анықтауға болады (егер болса) және оның мақсатты тілдерінің грамматикалық гендеріне қатынау мүмкіндігі болады. Біз біріншіден бұл мәліметтің барлығын жақсы үлгілеуге болмайды. Кішкене бөлек мәліметті ендіру нәтижелерді көбейту үшін, бұл үлкен болмауы мүмкін. Содан кейін ContraCAT- тің жаңа үлгі сынақтарын құрамыз. Бұл әрбір тіркелген аудару үшін керек ерекше қадамдарды бақылау үшін құрылған. Біздің анализациямыз, NMT контексті түсініктерге қазіргі жағдайда қазіргі жағдайда қазіргі көздердің геуристикасына тұрады. Бұл аудармалардың шын сезімі керек болса Мұндай-ақ біз оқыту деректерін көбейту және кейбір жақсартуларды қолданып тұрамыз.', 'ml': 'പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന നെയൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രധാനപരിഭാഷണത്തില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കായി സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ഉദാഹരണമാണിത്. മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മാറ്റിയിട്ടുള്ള ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സ്കോര്\u200dസ് അവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള സജ ഏതു വസ്തുക്കളെക്കുറിച്ചാണ് ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ശക്തിയാണ് അതിനുള്ളത്, സോര്\u200dസ്സ്- ഭാഷ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതെന We first show through a series of targeted adversarial attacks that in fact current approaches are not able to model all of this information well.  വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ചെറിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് സ്കോര്\u200d കുറവാക്കുന്നതിന് ശക്തമായി മതി, അത് കേസ് അല്ല. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ വാചക പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് വിജയകരമായ പരിഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി ആവശ്യമ നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന NMT-ന്റെ അടുത്തേക്ക് വരുന്നുണ്ട ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും കുറച്ച് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയുണ്ടാക്', 'pl': 'Ostatnie wysokie wyniki w zakresie tłumaczenia zaimków przy użyciu kontekstowego tłumaczenia maszynowego sugerują, że obecne podejścia działają dobrze. ContraPro jest znaczącym przykładem kontrastywnego zestawu wyzwań dla tłumaczenia zaimków angielskich niemieckich. Wysokie wyniki osiągane przez modele transformatorów mogą sugerować, że są one w stanie skutecznie modelować skomplikowany zestaw wniosków wymaganych do przeprowadzenia tłumaczenia zaimków. Oznacza to możliwość określenia, do których podmiotów można się odwołać, określenia, do którego podmiotu odnosi się zaimek języka źródłowego (jeśli istnieje) oraz dostępu do płci gramatycznej w języku docelowym dla tego podmiotu. Najpierw poprzez serię ukierunkowanych ataków przeciwników pokazujemy, że w rzeczywistości obecne podejścia nie są w stanie dobrze modelować wszystkich tych informacji. Wprowadzanie niewielkich ilości rozpraszających informacji wystarczy, aby zdecydowanie zmniejszyć wyniki, co nie powinno się mieć miejsca. Następnie tworzymy nowy zestaw testów szablonów ContraCAT, przeznaczony do indywidualnej oceny zdolności do obsługi konkretnych kroków niezbędnych do udanego tłumaczenia zaimków. Nasze analizy pokazują, że obecne podejście do kontekstowego NMT opiera się na zestawie heurystyk powierzchniowych, które rozpadają się, gdy tłumaczenia wymagają rzeczywistego rozumowania. Proponujemy również podejście do poszerzania danych szkoleniowych, z pewnymi ulepszeniami.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед тодорхойлолтын үндсэн хэмжээсүүд нь мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн механикийн хөрөнгө оруулалт дээр ажиллаж байгааг сануулсан. ContraPro бол Англи Германы хэлэлцээний хэлэлцээний эсрэг сорилтын жишээ юм. Шингэрлэлтийн загвараар гарсан өндөр тоонууд нь тодорхойлолтыг дамжуулахад шаардлагатай төвөгтэй хэмжээсүүдийг эффективно загварчлах боломжтой байж болно. Энэ нь ямар байгууллагуудыг тодорхойлж чадах боломжтой, эх үүсвэрийн хэл хэлний нэр тодорхойлж буй байгууллагуудыг тодорхойлж чадах боломжтой, тэр байгууллагын төлөө зорилготой хэлний грамматик гендерийг хүртэл хүрт Эхлээд бид эдгээр бүх мэдээллийг сайн загварчлах боломжгүй олон зориулсан эсрэг дайснуудыг харуулж байна. Маш жижиг хэмжээний сэргээлтэй мэдээллийг оруулах нь тоонуудыг багасгах хангалттай. Энэ нь тохиолдолд байхгүй. Дараа нь бид ContraCAT шинэ шалгалтын шалгалтыг бүтээж, хүн бүр амжилттай орчуулахын тулд хэрэгтэй тодорхой шалгалтыг баталж чадах зориулагдсан. Бидний шинжилгээнд орчин үеийн мэдрэмжтэй NMT-ийн ойлголт нь гадаргуу хюристик хэсэг дээр байдаг. Энэ нь орчуулах үед жинхэнэ шалтгаан шаардлагатай. Мөн бид суралцах өгөгдлийг нэмэгдүүлэх, зарим сайжруулах арга зам зөвлөж байна.', 'ro': 'Scorurile recente la traducerea pronumelor folosind traducerea automată neurală conștientă de context au sugerat că abordările actuale funcționează bine. ContraPro este un exemplu notabil de provocare contrastivă setată pentru traducerea pronumelui german englez. Punctajele mari obținute de modelele transformatoare pot sugera că acestea sunt capabile să modeleze eficient setul complicat de deducții necesare pentru a efectua traducerea pronumelor. Aceasta implică capacitatea de a determina la ce entități se poate referi, de a identifica entitatea la care se referă un pronum în limba sursă (dacă există) și de a accesa sexul gramatical în limba țintă pentru entitatea respectivă. Mai întâi demonstrăm printr-o serie de atacuri adversare țintite că, de fapt, abordările actuale nu sunt capabile să modeleze toate aceste informații bine. Introducerea unor cantități mici de informații distractive este suficientă pentru a reduce puternic scorurile, ceea ce nu ar trebui să fie cazul. Creăm apoi un nou set de teste ContraCAT, conceput pentru a evalua individual capacitatea de a gestiona pașii specifici necesari pentru traducerea pronumelor de succes. Analizele noastre arată că abordările actuale ale NMT conștiente de context se bazează pe un set de euristice de suprafață, care se descompun atunci când traducerile necesită raționament real. Propunem, de asemenea, o abordare pentru sporirea datelor de formare, cu unele îmbunătățiri.', 'sr': 'Nedavno visoki rezultati o prevodu pronoun koristeći prevod neuralne mašine na kontekstu sugeriše da trenutni pristupi dobro funkcionišu. ContraPro je poznati primjer kontrastivnog izazova koji je postavljen za prevod njemačkog pronoun a na engleskom jeziku. Visoki rezultati koji su postignuti modelima transformera mogu sugerirati da su u stanju efektivno modelirati komplikovani set inferencija potrebnih za izvršavanje prevoda. To uključuje sposobnost određivanja na koje entitate bi se mogle odnijeti, identifikovati na koje entitete izvorno-jezičko pronalaženje odnosi (ako postoji), i pristupiti gramatičkom spolu ciljnog jezika za tu entitetu. Prvo pokazujemo niz ciljnih neprijateljskih napada da trenutni pristupi ne mogu dobro modelirati sve te informacije. Ubacivanje malih količina informacija o distraktiranju dovoljno je da se snažno smanji rezultate, što ne bi trebalo biti slučaj. Zatim stvorimo novi test šablona ContraCAT, dizajniran kako bi individualno procenili sposobnost da podnesemo specifične korake potrebne za uspešan prevod pronoun. Naši analizi pokazuju da trenutni pristupi kontekstsvesnim NMT oslanjaju se na setu površinske heuristike, koja se raspada kada prevodi zahtevaju pravu razumnost. Takođe predlažemo pristup povećanju podataka o obuci, sa nekim poboljšanjem.', 'mt': 'Punteġġi għoljin riċenti dwar traduzzjoni pronta bl-użu ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali konxji mill-kuntest issuġġerew li l-approċċi attwali jaħdmu tajjeb. ContraPro huwa eżempju notevoli ta’ sfida kuntrastiva stabbilita għat-traduzzjoni prononta Ingliża Ġermaniża. Il-punteġġi għoljin miksuba permezz ta’ mudelli ta’ trasformatur jistgħu jissuġġerixxu li huma kapaċi jimmudellaw b’mod effettiv is-sett ikkumplikat ta’ inferenzi meħtieġa biex iwettqu traduzzjoni pronta. Dan jinvolvi l-kapaċità li jiġi ddeterminat liema entitajiet jistgħu jiġu riferiti, li jiġi identifikat liema entità jirreferi għal pronom tal-lingwa tas-sors (jekk ikun hemm), u li jkun hemm a ċċess għas-sess grammatiku tal-lingwa fil-mira għal dik l-entità. L-ewwel nett nuru permezz ta’ serje ta’ attakki avversarji mmirati li fil-fatt l-approċċi attwali mhumiex kapaċi jimmudellaw tajjeb din l-informazzjoni kollha. L-introduzzjoni ta’ ammonti żgħar ta’ informazzjoni distrattorja hija biżżejjed biex jitnaqqsu b’mod qawwi l-punteġġi, li m’għandux ikun il-każ. We then create a new template test set ContraCAT, designed to individually assess the ability to handle the specific steps necessary for successful pronoun translation.  L-analiżi tagħna turi li l-approċċi attwali għall-NMT konxji mill-kuntest jiddependu fuq sett ta’ ġewristiċi tal-wiċċ, li jinqasmu meta t-traduzzjonijiet jeħtieġu raġunament reali. Aħna nipproponu wkoll approċċ biex tiżdied id-dejta dwar it-taħriġ, b’xi titjib.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත වාර්ථාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත වාර්ථාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචිත වාර්ථාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට අ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරම්ප්\u200dරෝස් තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජර්මාන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  වෙනස් මොඩේල් වලින් ලැබුණ උපරිම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝ මේකෙන් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් කියලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් තියෙන්න, ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් කියලා  අපි මුලින්ම පෙන්වන්නේ අරමුණු විරෝධ විරෝධ විරෝධ විරෝධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඇත්තටම ප්\u200dරස්තු පුංචි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඇතුළත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු ඇතුළත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අඩ අපි ඊට පස්සේ අළුත් ටෙම්ප්ලේට් පරීක්ෂණයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා, වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුව අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් නැති NMT අවස්ථාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ පුළුවන් හෙයුරිස්ටික්  අපි සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දත්ත වැඩ කරන්න, සමහරවිශ්නයක් තියෙන්න.', 'so': "Waxbarashada qoraalka aad u dhow ee turjumista aad u baahan ee ku isticmaalaya qoraalka koonfureed ee maskaxda neurada ayaa soo jeeday in soo dhowaadaan si wanaagsan u shaqeeyaan. ContraPro waa tusaale caadi ah oo ay leedahay dhibaatooyin ka gees ah oo loo qoray turjumista afka Ingiriiska oo Jarmalka ah. Iskuulaadka bedelka waxaa laga yaabaa in ay muuqan karaan in ay si faa’iido leh u sameyn karto kooxda cudurada adag oo loo baahan yahay in lagu sameynayo turjumaadda saxda ah. Taas waxaa loola jeedaa awoodda go'aanka aqoonsashada, aqoonsada jinsiga lagu magacaabi karo luqada aad ku qoran karto (haddii kale) iyo inaad u heshid jinsiga xarunta luqada ee loogu talogaley. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu muujinnaa dhacdooyinka cadaawayaasha ah oo la jeeday in dhaqdhaqaaqyada la soo socday ayan si wanaagsan u sameyn karin macluumaadkan oo dhan. Inta yar oo macluumaad qalloocan ah lagu daro waxaa ku filan inaad si adag ugu hoosayso scoraha, taas oo aan aheyn inay ahaato xaalad. Markaas waxaynu sameynaa imtixaan cusub oo qoran ContraCAT, taasoo loo qoray si gaar ah loo qiimeeyo awoodda u qabashada tallaabooyin gaar ah oo loo baahan yahay turjumista guud. Analyadaada waxay muuqanaysaa in haatan u soo dhowaadaa qoraal-aqoon NMT waxay ku tiirsan tahay koox ciid ah, taasoo burburinaya marka turjubaanka loo baahan yahay sabab dhab ah. Waxaynu sidoo kale soo jeedinaynaa qaab ku kordhiya macluumaadka waxbarashada, horumarinta qaarkood.", 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் உயர்ந்த மதிப்பெண்கள் உயர்ந்த மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் உள்ள மொழிபெயர்ப்பை பயன்படுத்தி சூழல் பாதுகாப்பு ப கொர்ட்ராப்ரோ ஒரு குறிப்பான எடுத்துகாட்டாகும் ஆங்கிலம் ஜெர்மன் பொருள் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு அமைக்கப மாற்றும் மாதிரிகளால் அடைந்த அதிக மதிப்பெண்கள் மாற்றும் மாதிரிகளால் மாதிரிக்க முடியும் என்பது தெரிவிக்கும் சிக்கல் நோ இதில் எந்த பொருள் குறிப்பிட முடியும் என்பதை தீர்மானிக்கும், எந்த உண்மையின் மூல- மொழி பொருள் குறிப்பிடும் (இருந்தால்) என்பதை கண்டுபிடி நாம் முதலில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட எதிரிகள் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட துன்பங்கள் மூலம் காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் தற்போதைய முறைகள்  பிரச்சனை தகவல்களின் சிறிய அளவை சொருகுகுகிறது, மதிப்பெண்களை கடுமையாக குறைக்க போதுமானது, அது நிகழாது. பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு புதிய வார்ப்புருவின் சோதனை அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம், தனிப்பட்டுள்ள மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு தேவைப்படும Our analyses show that current approaches to context-aware NMT rely on a set of surface heuristics, which break down when translations require real reasoning.  நாம் பயிற்சி தரவை அதிகரிக்க ஒரு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், சில முன்னேற்றங்களுடன்.', 'sv': 'Senaste höga poäng på pronomens översättning med kontextmedveten neural maskinöversättning har antytt att nuvarande metoder fungerar bra. ContraPro är ett anmärkningsvärt exempel på en kontrasterande utmaning uppsättning för översättning av engelska tyska pronomen. De höga poängen med transformatormodeller kan tyda på att de effektivt kan modellera den komplicerade uppsättning slutsatser som krävs för att utföra pronomens översättning. Detta innebär förmågan att avgöra vilka entiteter som kan refereras till, identifiera vilken entitet ett källspråks pronomen refererar till (om det finns) och få tillgång till målspråkets grammatiska kön för den entiteten. Vi visar först genom en rad riktade motståndareattacker att nuvarande metoder faktiskt inte kan modellera all denna information väl. Att infoga små mängder distraherande information räcker för att kraftigt minska poängen, vilket inte bör vara fallet. Vi skapar sedan en ny malltestuppsättning ContraCAT, utformad för att individuellt bedöma förmågan att hantera de specifika steg som krävs för en framgångsrik pronomen översättning. Våra analyser visar att nuvarande förhållningssätt till kontextmedveten NMT bygger på en uppsättning ytheuristik, som bryts ner när översättningar kräver verkliga resonemang. Vi föreslår också ett tillvägagångssätt för att utöka träningsdata, med vissa förbättringar.', 'no': 'Nyleg høg poeng på omsetjinga ved bruk av kontekst- kjent neuralmaskinsomsetjing har foreslått at gjeldande tilnærmingar fungerer godt. ContraPro er eit merkelig eksempel på eit kontrastiv utfordring sett for engelsk tysk utfordring. Det høge poeng som er oppretta av transformeringsmodeller kan foreslå at dei kan effektivt modellere det kompliserte settet av inferenssar som krevst for å utføra uttrykk uttrykk. Dette inneheld kapasiteten for å bestemme kva eininga som kan verta referert til, identifisere kva eininga som eit kjeldespråkspronoun refererer til (dersom det er noko), og tilgang til målspråksgrammatisk seks for det eininga. Vi viser først gjennom ein serie målrette adversariske ataka at faktisk nærmingane ikkje kan modellere alle denne informasjonen godt. Sett inn små mengdar av distraksjonsinformasjon er nok for å redusera poeng sterkt, som ikkje bør vera tilfelle. Vi lagar så eit nytt mal- test set ContraCAT, designed for individual assessment of the ability to handle the specific steps necessary for successful pronoun translation. Analysene våre viser at nærmere nærmingar til kontekstvart NMT er på eit sett av overflate heuristikk, som brytar ned når omsetjingar krev ekte grunnlag. Vi foreslår også ein tilnærming for å auka opplæringsdata, med nokre forbetringar.', 'ur': 'اچھے سے اچھے اسکورٹ پرنسون کی ترجمہ کے ذریعے کنٹنس-آگاہ نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے مطابق اچھی سیکورٹ کا معلوم کیا گیا ہے کہ موجود نزدیک اچھی طرح کام کرتا ہے. کنٹروپرو ایک مشخص مثال ہے انگلیسی جرمن کی تعبیر کے لئے ایک کنٹروسٹی چال کے لئے. تبدیل کرنے والے موڈل کے ذریعے پہنچ جانے والی اسکورٹ بتائی جاتی ہے کہ وہ اثبات کے ساتھ موڈل کر سکتے ہیں کہ اسکورٹ نسل کے لئے ضرورت کی پیچیدہ سٹٹ کے مطابق قابل ہیں. یہ مقرر کرنے کی طاقت ہے کہ کس چیزوں کی طرف متوجہ ہو سکتی ہے، کس چیز کی تعریف کرسکتی ہے، کس چیز کی طرف متوجہ ہو سکتی ہے، کس چیز کی طرف متوجہ ہو سکتی ہے (اگر کوئی ہو سکتا ہے)، اور اس چیز کے لئے موجود زبان کی گراماتیکی جنس کی دسترسی کرسکتی ہے ہم پہلی بار نشان دیتے ہیں ایک سری مقابلہ مقابلہ حملہ کے ذریعہ کہ حقیقت یہ ہے کہ موجود تقریبا اس تمام معلومات کو اچھی طرح مدل نہیں کر سکتے۔ اندھیرے پھیرنے والی اطلاعات کے اندازے چھوٹے اندازے میں داخل کرنا کافی ہے کہ اسکور کو مضبوطی سے کم کرے، یہ کیس نہ ہونا چاہیے۔ پھر ہم نے ایک نئی ٹیپلٹ ٹیپلٹ ٹیپلٹ سٹ ContraCAT پیدا کیا ہے، جو شخصی طرح طرح کیا گیا ہے کہ ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ مصمم ترجمہ کے لئے ضروری کے مطابق مخصوص قدموں کو ادارہ کرے۔ ہمارے تحقیقات کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود NMT کو متوجہ ہونے کے لئے پہنچ جاتا ہے ایک سطح حوریستیک پر بھروسہ رکھتا ہے، جسے ترجمہ کی حقیقی دلیل کی ضرورت ہوتی ہے۔ ہم نے بھی تعلیم دادہ کو بڑھانے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، بعض اصلاح کے ساتھ۔', 'vi': 'Những điểm số cao gần đây trong dịch chuyển đại từ bằng dịch thiết bị thần kinh có nhận diện ngữ cảnh cho thấy các phương pháp hiện thời hoạt động tốt. ContraPro là một ví dụ đáng chú ý của một thách thức tương đối được đặt trong phiên dịch đại từ tiếng Anh. Những điểm số cao được tạo ra bởi các mô hình biến đổi có thể cho thấy họ có khả năng mô tả hiệu quả các số ngụ ý phức tạp cần thiết để thực hiện dịch chuyển đại từ. Điều này đòi hỏi khả năng xác định các thực thể nào có thể được tham khảo, xác định thực thể nào mà đại từ ngôn ngữ nguồn (nếu có) gọi là (nếu có) và truy cập giới tính ngữ pháp đích cho thực thể đó. Trước hết, chúng ta cho thấy qua một loạt các cuộc tấn công đối nghịch nhằm mục đích rằng các phương pháp hiện tại không thể mô tả thông tin này tốt. Việc thêm một lượng nhỏ các thông tin phân tâm là đủ để giảm mạnh điểm, điều không nên xảy ra. Sau đó chúng ta sẽ tạo một bộ thử mẫu mới ContraCAT, được thiết kế để đánh giá độc lập khả năng xử lý các bước cụ thể cần thiết để dịch thành công đại từ. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy các phương pháp hiện thời để đạt điểm NMT nhận diện ngữ cảnh dựa trên một chùm thần kinh bề mặt, mà lại vỡ ra khi dịch cần lý lẽ thật sự. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một phương pháp cải tiến dữ liệu về huấn luyện.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name Oʻzgartirish modellari orqali yuqori qiymatlar qo'shilga oshirilgan qiymatlar mumkin, ularning murakkab tarjima qilish kerak boʻlgan murakkab kasalliklarning ko'plagini modellashi mumkin. This entails the ability to determine which entities could be referred to, identify which entity a source-language pronoun refers to (if any), and access the target-language grammatical gender for that entity.  Biz birinchi ko'pchilik tashkilotlar orqali ko'ramiz, hozir holatda bu hamma maʼlumotlarni bajarish mumkin emas. @ info: whatsthis Keyin biz muvaffaqiyatli tarjima uchun kerakli qatlamni boshqarish uchun yangi namunani yaratimiz ContraCAT'ni yaratishmiz. Analytiklarimizni ko'rsatadi, ma'lumotni taʼminlovchi NMT tashkilotlariga tashkilotga ishlatadi, va tarjimalar haqiqiqiy sabablar kerak boʻlsa, ularni chiqish mumkin. Biz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni oshirish va bir necha yaxshi o'zlari bilan oshirish usulni taqdim qilamiz.", 'bg': 'Последните високи оценки при превода на местоимения с помощта на контекст-съзнателен неврален машинен превод предполагат, че настоящите подходи работят добре. КонтраПро е забележителен пример за контрастивно предизвикателство, поставено за превод на английски немски местоимения. Високите резултати, постигнати от трансформаторните модели, могат да предположат, че те са в състояние ефективно да моделират сложния набор от заключения, необходими за извършване на превод на местоимението. Това включва възможността да се определи кои единици могат да бъдат посочени, да се определи кои единици се отнася местоимението на изходния език (ако има такива) и да се получи достъп до граматическия пол на целевия език за тази единица. Първо показваме чрез серия от целенасочени атаки, че в действителност настоящите подходи не са в състояние да моделират добре цялата тази информация. Вмъкването на малки количества разсейваща информация е достатъчно, за да намали значително оценките, което не трябва да бъде така. След това създаваме нов тест комплект шаблони предназначен да оцени индивидуално способността да се справи с конкретните стъпки, необходими за успешен превод на местоимения. Анализите ни показват, че настоящите подходи към НМТ разчитат на набор от повърхностни евристика, която се разгражда, когато преводите изискват реални разсъждения. Предлагаме и подход за увеличаване на данните за обучение, с някои подобрения.', 'da': 'Seneste høje scorer på stedord oversættelse ved hjælp af kontekstbevidst neural maskinoversættelse har antydet, at nuværende tilgange fungerer godt. ContraPro er et bemærkelsesværdigt eksempel på en kontrasterende udfordring sat for engelsk tysk stedord oversættelse. De høje scorer opnået af transformatormodeller kan tyde på, at de er i stand til effektivt at modellere det komplicerede sæt af konklusioner, der kræves for at udføre pronomen oversættelse. Dette indebærer evnen til at bestemme, hvilke enheder der kan henvises til, identificere, hvilken enhed et kildesproget stedord henviser til (hvis noget) og få adgang til målsprogets grammatiske køn for den pågældende enhed. Vi viser først gennem en række målrettede modstandsangreb, at nuværende tilgange faktisk ikke er i stand til at modellere alle disse oplysninger godt. Indsættelse af små mængder distraherende oplysninger er nok til at reducere scorerne kraftigt, hvilket ikke bør være tilfældet. Vi skaber derefter et nyt skabelon testsæt ContraCAT, designet til individuelt at vurdere evnen til at håndtere de specifikke trin, der er nødvendige for en vellykket oversættelse af stedord. Vores analyser viser, at nuværende tilgange til kontekstbevidst NMT er afhængige af et sæt overfladeheuristik, som bryder sammen, når oversættelser kræver reel ræsonnement. Vi foreslår også en tilgang til udvidelse af træningsdata med nogle forbedringer.', 'nl': 'Recente hoge scores op de vertaling van voornaamwoorden met behulp van contextbewuste neurale machinevertaling hebben gesuggereerd dat de huidige benaderingen goed werken. ContraPro is een opmerkelijk voorbeeld van een contrastieve uitdaging set voor Engels Duits voornaamwoord vertaling. De hoge scores van transformatormodellen kunnen suggereren dat ze in staat zijn om de ingewikkelde reeks conclusies die nodig zijn om voornaamwoorden te vertalen effectief te modelleren. Dit omvat de mogelijkheid om te bepalen naar welke entiteiten verwezen kan worden, te identificeren naar welke entiteit een brontaalvoornaamwoord verwijst (indien van toepassing), en toegang te krijgen tot het grammaticale geslacht van de doeltaal voor die entiteit. We laten eerst door middel van een reeks gerichte tegenstrijdige aanvallen zien dat de huidige benaderingen eigenlijk niet in staat zijn om al deze informatie goed te modelleren. Het toevoegen van kleine hoeveelheden afleidende informatie is voldoende om scores sterk te verminderen, wat niet het geval zou moeten zijn. Vervolgens maken we een nieuwe template testset ContraCAT, ontworpen om individueel te beoordelen of de specifieke stappen die nodig zijn voor een succesvolle vertaling van voornaamwoorden kunnen worden uitgevoerd. Onze analyses tonen aan dat de huidige benaderingen van contextbewuste NMT berusten op een reeks oppervlakteheuristieken, die afbreken wanneer vertalingen reëel redeneren vereisen. We stellen ook een aanpak voor om de trainingsgegevens te verbeteren, met enkele verbeteringen.', 'hr': 'Nedavno visoki rezultati o pronoun prevodu koristeći prevod neuroloških strojeva na kontekstu sugerirali su da trenutni pristupi dobro funkcioniraju. ContraPro je poznati primjer kontrastivnog izazova postavljenog za prevod njemačkog pronoun a na engleskom jeziku. Visoki rezultati koji su postigli modeli transformera mogu sugerirati da su u mogućnosti učinkovito modelirati komplicirani skup inferencija potrebnih za provođenje pronounoun prevoda. To uključuje sposobnost određivanja kojim bi se entitetima mogle nazvati, identificirati kojim entitetima izvorno-jezičkom pronalaženju odnosi (ako postoji) i pristupiti gramatičkom spolu ciljnog jezika za taj entitet. Prvo pokazujemo niz ciljnih neprijateljskih napada da trenutni pristupi ne mogu dobro modelirati sve te informacije. Uključenje malih količina informacija o distraktiranju dovoljno je da se snažno smanji rezultati, što ne bi trebalo biti slučaj. Zatim stvorimo novi test šablona ContraCAT, dizajniran kako bi individualno procijenio sposobnost rješavanja specifičnih koraka potrebnih za uspješan prevod pronoun. Naši analizi pokazuju da trenutni pristupi kontekstualnom NMT oslanjaju na setu površine heuristike, koja se raspada kada prevodi zahtijevaju pravu razumnost. Također predlažemo pristup povećanju podataka o obuci, s nekim poboljšanjem.', 'de': 'Jüngste Highscores bei der Pronomen-Übersetzung mit kontextbewusster neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung deuten darauf hin, dass aktuelle Ansätze gut funktionieren. ContraPro ist ein bemerkenswertes Beispiel für eine kontrastive Herausforderung für die englische Pronomen Übersetzung. Die hohen Werte, die Transformatormodelle erzielen, deuten darauf hin, dass sie in der Lage sind, die komplizierten Schlussfolgerungen, die für die Pronomen-Übersetzung erforderlich sind, effektiv zu modellieren. Dies beinhaltet die Fähigkeit zu bestimmen, auf welche Entitäten Bezug genommen werden könnte, zu identifizieren, auf welche Entität sich ein Pronomen in der Ausgangssprache bezieht (falls vorhanden) und auf das grammatische Geschlecht der Zielsprache für diese Entität zuzugreifen. Zunächst zeigen wir durch eine Reihe gezielter gegnerischer Angriffe, dass aktuelle Ansätze nicht in der Lage sind, all diese Informationen gut zu modellieren. Das Einfügen kleiner Mengen ablenkender Informationen reicht aus, um die Punktzahl stark zu reduzieren, was nicht der Fall sein sollte. Anschließend erstellen wir ein neues Template-Testset ContraCAT, das individuell die Fähigkeit beurteilt, die spezifischen Schritte zu bewältigen, die für eine erfolgreiche Pronomen-Übersetzung erforderlich sind. Unsere Analysen zeigen, dass aktuelle Ansätze für kontextbewusste NMT auf einer Reihe von Oberflächenheuristiken beruhen, die zerfallen, wenn Übersetzungen reales Denken erfordern. Wir schlagen auch einen Ansatz zur Erweiterung der Trainingsdaten mit einigen Verbesserungen vor.', 'fa': 'امتياز بالا اخيرا در مورد ترجمه\u200cي ترجمه\u200cي مطلوب با ترجمه\u200cي ماشين\u200cهاي عصبي که در کنترل متوجه هستند، پيشنهاد کرده\u200cاند که نزديک\u200cهاي فعلي خوب کار مي\u200cکند. ContraPro یک مثال مشخص از یک چالش مخالف برای ترجمه آلمانی انگلیسی است. امتیاز بالا که توسط مدل تغییر دهنده\u200cها رسیده می\u200cشود می\u200cتواند پیشنهاد دهند که آنها قادر به موثرت مجموعه پیچیده\u200cای از آلودگی\u200cها که نیاز دارند برای انجام ترجمه\u200cهای قانونی باشند مدل دهند. این توانایی برای تعیین کردن کدام یک entity می تواند به آن ارائه شود، تعیین کردن کدام یک entity به زبان منبع ارائه می دهد (اگر وجود دارد) و دسترسی به جنس گراماتیک زبان هدف برای آن entity. اول از طریق یک سری حمله های مخالف هدف را نشان می دهیم که در واقع نزدیک های فعلی قادر نیستند همه این اطلاعات را خوب مدل کنند. وارد کردن مقدار کوچک اطلاعات پراکنده به اندازه کافی است تا ثبت\u200cها را به شدت کاهش دهد، که نباید این مورد باشد. سپس یک تنظیم تست نمونه جدید ContraCAT را ایجاد می\u200cکنیم، که برای individually ارزیابی توانایی بررسی کردن قدم\u200cهای خاص نیاز برای ترجمه موفقیت موفق است. تحلیل\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که نزدیک\u200cهای فعلی به عنوان NMT آگاهی محیط بر مجموعه حوریستیک سطح اعتماد دارد، که وقتی ترجمه\u200cها به دلیل واقعی نیاز دارند شکسته می\u200cشوند. ما همچنین یک دستور برای افزایش داده های آموزش با برخی بهتر پیشنهاد می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Recent high scores on pronoun translation using context-aware neural machine translation have suggested that current approaches work well.  ContraPro ni mfano maarufu wa changamoto mbadala zilizowekwa kwa ajili ya tafsiri ya Kiingereza inayotambuliwa na Kijerumani. Viwango vya juu vilivyofanikiwa na mifano ya mabadiliko inaweza kuonyesha kwamba wanaweza kufanya mifano muhimu ya magonjwa yanayohitajika kufanya tafsiri ya umma. This entails the ability to determine which entities could be referred to, identify which entity a source-language pronoun refers to (if any), and access the target-language grammatical gender for that entity.  Tunaonyesha kwa mara ya kwanza kupitia mfululizo wa mashambulizi yanayolengwa na upinzani kwamba kwa hakika hatua za sasa hazijaweza kuunda taarifa zote hizi vizuri. Kuingiza kiasi kidogo cha taarifa zinazopoteza kinatosha kupunguza vipindi vizuri, ambavyo haviwi hivyo. Kisha tunatengeneza jaribio mpya la malalamiko la ContraCAT, lililolengwa ili kutathmini uwezo wa kukabiliana na hatua maalum zinazohitajika kwa ajili ya tafsiri yenye mafanikio. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kwamba hivi sasa huingilia kwa muktadha wa NMT inategemea mfululizo wa maeneo ya juu, ambapo tafsiri zinahitaji sababu halisi. Pia tunapendekeza mbinu ya kuongeza takwimu za mafunzo, na baadhi ya maboresho.', 'tr': "Ýakynda näyral maşynyň terjime edilen aýratyn ýokarynda näyral maşynyň terjime edilen has gowy işleýändigini düşündirler. Iňlis dilini terjime etmek üçin täsirli kynçylygyň ýaly. Üýtgedir modelleri tarapyndan ýetip kalan iň yükselen notlar çykyş terjime etmek üçin gerekli karmaşık düzümlerniň eseri çykaryp biljeklerini maslahat berer. Bu hili guramlaryň haýsy diýip atlandyrylmagy mümkin edýär, munuň çeşme dilinden habaryň(bir bolsa bolsa) we munuň üçin hedef dilinden gramatik jenesine goll et. Ilkinji gezek şu wagtyň golaýlarynyň hemmesini gowy nusga çykyp bilmeýändigini görkezýäris. Çaltylyk hatlary gaýşartmak üçin kiçi sanlary daşartmak, kiçi sanlary azaltmak üçin ýeterdir. Bu kiçi bolmaly däl. Sonra başarılı terjime etmek üçin gerekli ähli adımları çözmek üçin bir nusga düzenleme kontraCAT'y bejerdik. Biziň analyzlarymyz häzirki NMT-iň kontekst bilen tanyşyrlygyna golaýlaşýandygyny görkezýär. Bu terjimeler hakyky sebäbi gerekli wagtlar boýunça uçurýar. Biz hem okuw maglumatyny azaltmak we käbir gelişmeler bilen golaýy teklip edýäris.", 'af': "Onlangse hoë telling op pronoun vertaling gebruik konteks- bewys neurale masjien vertaling het voorgestel dat huidige toegang goed werk. Name Die hoë telling wat deur transformer modelles bereik word kan voorstel dat hulle kan effektief model die kompliseerde stel van inferensies wat benodig is om voorskrifte vertaling uit te voer. Hierdie bedoel die moontlik om te bepaal watter entiteite kan verwys word, identifiseer watter entiteit 'n bron-taal verkonding verwys na (indien enige), en toegang tot die doel-taal-grammatiese geneem vir daardie entiteit. Ons vertoon eerste deur 'n reeks van gemaakte teenstandaariale atake dat in werklikheid huidige toegang nie goed hierdie inligting kan model nie. Voeg by klein hoeveelheid afwysing inligting is genoeg na sterk verduur telling, wat nie die geval moet wees nie. Ons skep dan 'n nuwe sjabloon toets stel ContraCAT, ontwerp om individueel te asseer die moontlik na hanteer die spesifieke stappe wat benodig is vir suksesvol voorspronoun vertaling. Ons analiseerdes vertoon dat huidige toegang tot konteks-bevestig NMT vertrou op 'n stel van oorspronklike heuristiek, wat afbreek wanneer vertalings regte redening benodig. Ons het ook 'n toegang voorgestel om die onderwerp data te vergroot, met sommige verbeteringe.", 'sq': 'Rezultatet e fundit të larta në përkthimin e shquar duke përdorur përkthimin e makinës nervore të ndërgjegjshme në kontekst kanë sugjeruar se qasjet aktuale funksionojnë mirë. ContraPro is a notable example of a contrastive challenge set for English German pronoun translation.  Rezultatet e larta të arritura nga modelet e transformuesve mund të sugjerojnë se ato janë në gjendje të modelojnë efektivisht grupin e komplikuar të përfundimeve të kërkuara për të kryer përkthimin e qartë. This entails the ability to determine which entities could be referred to, identify which entity a source-language pronoun refers to (if any), and access the target-language grammatical gender for that entity.  Ne së pari tregojmë nëpërmjet një serie sulmesh kundërshtare të synuara se në fakt qasjet aktuale nuk janë në gjendje të modelojnë mirë të gjitha këto informacione. Inserting small amounts of distracting information is enough to strongly reduce scores, which should not be the case.  Pastaj krijojmë një set të ri të testit të modelit ContraCAT, të dizajnuar për të vlerësuar individualisht aftësinë për të trajtuar hapat specifike të nevojshëm për përkthimin e suksesshëm të shprehur. Analizat tona tregojnë se afrimet aktuale ndaj NMT-së të ndërgjegjshme për kontekst mbështeten në një sërë heuristikësh të sipërfaqes, të cilat prishen kur përkthimet kërkojnë arsyetim të vërtetë. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një qasje për rritjen e të dhënave të trainimit, me disa përmirësime.', 'ko': '최근 상하문 감지신경기계로 대사를 번역하는 데 있어서의 높은 점수는 현재의 방법이 효과가 좋다는 것을 보여준다.ContraPro는 영국과 독일의 대명사 번역 비교 도전의 현저한 예이다.transformer 모델이 얻은 높은 점수는 대명사 번역에 필요한 복잡한 추리집을 효과적으로 모의할 수 있음을 나타낼 수 있다.이것은 어떤 실체가 인용될 수 있는지 확인하고 원시 언어 대명사가 인용한 실체를 식별하며 이 실체의 목표 언어 문법적 성별을 방문할 수 있어야 한다.우리는 우선 일련의 맞춤형 대항 공격을 통해 사실상 현재의 방법은 모든 정보를 잘 모의할 수 없다는 것을 보여 준다.주의력을 분산시키는 소량의 정보를 삽입하면 점수를 크게 낮출 수 있지만 사실은 그렇지 않다.그런 다음 성공적인 대명사 번역을 처리하는 데 필요한 특정 단계를 개별적으로 평가할 수 있는 새 템플릿 테스트 세트 ContraCAT를 만듭니다.우리의 분석에 의하면 현재 상하문에서 NMT를 감지하는 방법은 하나의 표면 계발식에 의존하고 번역이 진정한 추리를 필요로 할 때 이러한 표면 계발식은 효력을 상실할 것이다.우리는 훈련 데이터를 늘리는 방법도 제시했고 개선도 했다.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች በጥሩ ትርጓሜ በመጠቀም በጽሑፍ-ታዋቂው የደዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም በመጠቀም ላይ ከፍ ያለ ደረጃ scores በመጠየቅ ትርጓሜ ላይ መግለጫ ያስታወቃቸዋል፡፡ ContraPro ለኢንጂልኛ የጀርመን ትርጓሜ የተደረገው ተቃዋሚ የግንኙነት ምሳሌ ነው፡፡ The high scores achieved by transformer models may suggest that they are able to effectively model the complicated set of inferences required to carry out pronoun translation.  ይህ አካላዊ ቋንቋ ማንኛውን ሊታወቅ የሚችሉትን ማረጋገጥ ያስፈልጋል፣ ማንኛውም ቢሆን (ቢሆንም) የሚታወቀው የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ማድረጊያውን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በመጀመሪያ በተቃዋሚው ተቃዋሚዎች ላይ እናሳየዋለን፤ አሁን የሚደረገውን የዚህን መረጃ ሁሉ በመሻል አይችሉም፡፡ የመጨዋታውን ቁጥር በመጨመር ቁጥር በመጨመር ላይ ማስታወሻ ይበቃል፡፡ አዲስ የጭብጥ ፈተና ፍጠርን ለፍላጎት ለማግኘት የግለጹ እርምጃዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን አካሄድ ለማስተካከል ለራሳቸው አካሄድን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ Analyzerቻችን የአሁኑ የNMT ግንኙነት እና የአፍሪካዊ ጉዳይ መሆኑን ያሳየናል፤ ትርጉም እውነተኛ ምክንያት ሲፈልግ የሚያፈርስ ነው፡፡ እና የግንኙነቱን ዳታዎችን ለመጨመር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին բարձր գնահատականները բառերի թարգմանման համար, օգտագործելով կոնտեքստի գիտակցած նեյրոնային մեքենայի թարգմանումը, առաջարկեցին, որ ներկայիս մոտեցումները լավ են աշխատում: Կոնտապրոն անգլերեն արտահայտության հակադրական մարտահրավերի նշանակալի օրինակ է: Փոփոխման մոդելների միջոցով հասած բարձր գնահատականները կարող են առաջարկել, որ նրանք կարողանում են արդյունավետ մոդելավորել բարդ հետևանքները, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են արտահայտված թարգմանման համար: Սա ներառում է հնարավորություն որոշել, թե որպիսի կազմակերպություններ կարող են նշել, որոշել, թե որպիսի կազմակերպություն է նշանակում աղբյուր-լեզու պրոնոնը (եթե կա), և հասնել այդ կազմակերպության գրամատիկ սեռին նշանակելու համար: We first show through a series of targeted adversarial attacks that in fact current approaches are not able to model all of this information well.  Մի փոքր քանակությամբ շեղող տեղեկատվություն ներդրելը բավարար է, որպեսզի կարողանա նվազեցնել արդյունքները, ինչը չպետք է լինի: Այնուհետև մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր փորձարկումների համակարգ ԿոնտաԿատ, որը ստեղծվում է անհատականորեն գնահատելու հնարավորությունը կառավարել հատուկ քայլերը, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են հաջողությամբ թարգման Մեր վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ NMT-ի ներկայիս մոտեցումները կախված են մակերեսային հորիստիկայի մի շարք, որոնք բաժանում են, երբ թարգմանությունները իրական մտածողություն են պահանջում: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք մի մոտեցում կրթության տվյալների բարելավման համար որոշ բարելավումների հետ:', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক অনুবাদের ব্যবহার করে কন্টেক্সট- সচেতন নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ ব্যবহার করে উচ্চ স্কোর পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে বর্ কন্ট্রাপ্রোর একটি বিরোধী চ্যালেঞ্জের উদাহরণ যা ইংরেজী জার্মানী অনুবাদের জন্য নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে। পরিবর্তনের মডেল দ্বারা অর্জন করা উচ্চ স্কোর সম্ভবত পরামর্শ দিতে পারে যে তারা কার্যকর ভাবে ভালোভাবে অনুবাদ করতে পারে যে সমস্ত রোগের জটি এর মাধ্যমে কোন বস্তুকে উল্লেখ করতে পারে সেটা নির্ধারণ করার ক্ষমতা রয়েছে যে সোর্স-ভাষার কথা উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে (যদি কেউ থাকে) এবং এই বস্তুর জন্য গ্রামাটি We first show through a series of targeted adversarial attacks that in fact current approaches are not able to model all of this information well.  বিভ্রান্ত তথ্য প্রবেশ করার জন্য স্কোর কমানোর জন্য যথেষ্ট যথেষ্ট, যা কেস নয়। We then create a new template test set ContraCAT, designed to individually assess the ability to handle the specific steps necessary for successful pronoun translation.  আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে বর্তমান পরিসংখ্যান-সচেতন এনএমটির কাছে নির্ভর করা হচ্ছে বিভিন্ন মাসের উপর, যা অনুবাদের সত্যিক প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি কিছু উন্নতি দিয়ে।', 'bs': 'Nedavno visoki rezultati o prevodu pronoun koristeći prevod neuralnih strojeva na kontekstu sugerirali su da trenutni pristupi dobro funkcionišu. ContraPro je poznati primjer kontrastivnog izazova postavljenog za prevod njemačkog proroka engleskog jezika. Visoki rezultati koji su postigli modeli transformera mogu sugerirati da su u mogućnosti učinkovito modelirati komplicirani skup inferencija potrebnih za provođenje pronounoun prevoda. To uključuje sposobnost određivanja na koje entitate bi se mogle odnijeti, identificirati na koje entitete izvorno-jezičko pronoun odnosi na (ako postoji) i pristupiti gramatičkom spolu ciljnog jezika za tu entitetu. Prvo pokazujemo niz ciljnih neprijateljskih napada da trenutni pristupi ne mogu dobro modelirati sve te informacije. Uključenje malih količina informacija o distraktiranju dovoljno je da se snažno smanji rezultati, što ne bi trebalo biti slučaj. Zatim stvorimo novi test šablona ContraCAT, dizajniran kako bi individualno procijenio sposobnost za rješavanje specifičnih koraka potrebnih za uspješan prevod pronoun. Naši analizi pokazuju da trenutni pristupi kontekstsvesnim NMT oslanjaju se na setu površine heuristike, koja se raspada kada prevodi zahtijevaju pravu razumnost. Također predlažemo pristup povećanju podataka o obuci, s nekim poboljšanjem.', 'ca': "Les últimes puntuacions sobre traducció pronunciada amb traducció neural conscient del context han suggerit que els enfocaments actuals funcionen bé. ContraPro és un exemple notable d'un repte contrastiu que es pose per a la traducció de pronons alemanès en anglès. Els grans puntuatges obtenits pels models transformadors poden suggerir que són capaços de modelar efectivament el conjunt complicat de inferències requerit per a fer traducció pronunciada. Això implica l'habilitat de determinar a quines entitats es podria referir, identificar a quina entitat es refereix un pronòm de llenguatge-fonts (si hi ha), i accedir al gènere gramàtic del llenguatge-alvo d'aquesta entitat. Primer demostram a través d'una sèrie d'atacs adversaris mirats que, de fet, els enfocaments actuals no són capaços de modelar bé tota aquesta informació. Inxertar petites quantitats d'informació distraent és suficient per reduir fortament les puntuacions, que no hauria de ser el cas. Després creem un nou conjunt de proves de models ContraCAT, dissenyat per avaluar individualment l'habilitat de gestionar les etapes específices necessàries per a una traducció pronunciada amb èxit. Els nostres anàlisis demostren que els enfocaments actuals a la NMT conscient del context es basan en un conjunt d'heurístics de superfície, que es trenquen quan les traduccions necessiten raonament real. També proposem un enfocament per augmentar les dades d'entrenament, amb algunes millores.", 'az': 'Qısqa məlumatlardan tanıdıqları nöral maşına çevirilməsi istifadə edərək təkrarlanan yüksək nöqtələr müəyyən edilmişdir. ContraPro İngilizce Almanca sözlərinin çevirilməsi üçün müxtəlif çətinliklərin məsəlinədir. Ən yüksək nöqtələr, transformer modelləri ilə başa düşən yüksək nöqtələr, sözləri tərcümə etmək üçün lazım olan kompleks nöqtələrin çoxluğunu təşkil edə biləcəklərini göstərə bilər. Bu, hansı məxluqat təyin edilə biləcəyini, hansı mənbə dili təyin ediləcəyini təyin edə biləcəyini təyin edə biləcəyini və bu məxluqat üçün məqsəd dili gramatik cinsi təyin edə biləcəyini təmin edir. Biz ilk dəfə məqsədilə düşmənçilik saldıqlarını göstərdik ki, əslində bu məlumatların bütün modellərini yaxşı göstərə bilməzlər. Qüçük dağıtıcı məlumatların daxil edilməsi çətinlikləri azaltmaq üçün kifayətdir. Bu məlumat olmamalı. Sonra yeni şablon sınamasını yaratdıq ContraCAT, başarılı təkrarlama üçün ehtiyacı olan müəyyən adımları idarə etmək üçün təkrarlanan təkrarlar təkrarlanması üçün təkrarlanmış. Bizim analizlərimiz həmişə NMT-nin kontekst-bilikli tərzlərinə yaxınlaşdığını göstərir ki, tərzimlərə həqiqət fikirləşdirmək lazımdır. Biz də təhsil məlumatlarını artırmaq üçün bir yol təklif edirik, bəzi təhsil ilə.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset korkeat pisteet pronominkäännöksessä kontekstitietoista neurokonekäännöstä käyttäen ovat osoittaneet, että nykyiset lähestymistavat toimivat hyvin. ContraPro on merkittävä esimerkki englannin saksan pronominkäännöksen kontrastiivisesta haasteesta. Muuntajamallien korkeat pisteet voivat viitata siihen, että ne pystyvät tehokkaasti mallintamaan monimutkaisia päättelyjä, joita pronominin kääntäminen edellyttää. Tämä edellyttää kykyä määrittää, mihin entiteetteihin voidaan viitata, tunnistaa, mihin entiteetteihin lähdekielen pronomini viittaa (jos sellainen on) ja käyttää kohdekielen kielioppista sukupuolta kyseiselle entiteetille. Osoitamme ensin kohdistettujen vastustajien hyökkäysten kautta, että nykyiset lähestymistavat eivät itse asiassa pysty mallintamaan kaikkea tätä tietoa hyvin. Pieni määrä häiritsevää tietoa riittää vähentämään pisteitä voimakkaasti, mitä ei pitäisi tapahtua. Tämän jälkeen luomme uuden mallin testisarjan ContraCAT, joka on suunniteltu arvioimaan yksilöllisesti kykyä käsitellä tiettyjä vaiheita, jotka tarvitaan onnistuneen pronominin kääntämisen kannalta. Analyysimme osoittavat, että nykyiset lähestymistavat kontekstitietoiseen NMT:hen perustuvat pintaheuristiikkaan, joka hajoaa, kun käännökset vaativat todellista päättelyä. Ehdotamme myös toimintatapaa koulutustietojen lisäämiseksi ja joitakin parannuksia.', 'cs': 'Nedávné vysoké skóre překladu zájmen pomocí kontextového neuronového strojového překladu naznačují, že současné přístupy fungují dobře. ContraPro je pozoruhodným příkladem kontrastivní výzvy sady pro anglický německý překlad zájmen. Vysoké skóre dosažené transformátorovými modely mohou naznačovat, že jsou schopny efektivně modelovat složitý soubor závěrů potřebných k provedení překladu zájmen. To zahrnuje schopnost určit, na které entity lze odkazovat, určit, na kterou entitu se zájmeno zdrojového jazyka vztahuje (pokud existuje) a získat přístup k gramatickému pohlaví cílového jazyka pro danou entitu. Nejprve prostřednictvím série cílených nepřátelských útoků ukážeme, že současné přístupy nejsou schopny všechny tyto informace dobře modelovat. Vložení malého množství rušivých informací stačí k výraznému snížení skóre, což by nemělo být případ. Následně vytvoříme novou šablonovou testovací sadu ContraCAT, určenou k individuálnímu posouzení schopnosti zvládnout konkrétní kroky potřebné pro úspěšný překlad zájmen. Naše analýzy ukazují, že současné přístupy k kontextově orientované NMT spoléhají na sadě povrchových heuristik, které se rozpadají, když překlady vyžadují reálné uvažování. Navrhujeme také přístup k rozšíření tréninkových dat s určitými zlepšeními.', 'et': 'Hiljutised kõrged tulemused asesõnade tõlkimisel kontekstiteadliku neuraalse masintõlke abil on näidanud, et praegused lähenemisviisid toimivad hästi. ContraPro on märkimisväärne näide kontrastiivsest väljakutsest inglise saksa pronouni tõlkimisel. Transformaatormudelitega saavutatud kõrged tulemused võivad viitada sellele, et nad suudavad tõhusalt modelleerida keerulisi järeldusi, mis on vajalikud pronouni tõlkimiseks. See tähendab võimalust määrata, millistele üksustele võib viidata, määrata kindlaks, millisele üksusele lähtekeele asesõna viitab (kui see on olemas) ja pääseda ligi selle üksuse sihtkeele grammatilisele soole. Esmalt näitame mitmete sihipäraste vastasrünnakute kaudu, et praegused lähenemisviisid ei suuda kogu seda teavet hästi modelleerida. Väikese hulga häiriva teabe lisamine on piisav tulemuste oluliseks vähendamiseks, mis ei tohiks nii olla. Seejärel loome uue malli testikomplekti ContraCAT, mis on mõeldud individuaalselt hindama suutlikkust käsitleda konkreetseid samme, mis on vajalikud edukaks asenime tõlkimiseks. Meie analüüsid näitavad, et praegused lähenemisviisid kontekstiteadlikule NMT-le tuginevad pinnaheuristikale, mis lagunevad, kui tõlked nõuavad reaalset arutlust. Samuti pakume välja lähenemisviisi koolitusandmete täiendamiseks koos mõningate parandustega.', 'id': 'Skor tertinggi baru-baru ini pada terjemahan pronon menggunakan terjemahan mesin saraf yang sadar konteks telah menyarankan bahwa pendekatan saat ini bekerja dengan baik. ContraPro adalah contoh yang terkenal dari tantangan kontras yang ditetapkan untuk terjemahan bahasa Inggris bahasa Jerman. Skor tinggi yang dicapai oleh model transformer mungkin menyarankan bahwa mereka dapat memmodelir secara efektif set rumit dari kesimpulan yang diperlukan untuk melakukan terjemahan pronoun. Hal ini mengandung kemampuan untuk menentukan entitas mana yang dapat direferensikan, mengidentifikasi entitas mana pronun bahasa-sumber yang direferensikan (jika ada), dan mengakses gender grammatik bahasa-sasaran untuk entitas itu. Kami pertama-tama menunjukkan melalui seri serangan musuh yang ditujukan bahwa pada kenyataannya pendekatan saat ini tidak mampu untuk model semua informasi ini dengan baik. Inserting small amounts of distracting information is enough to strongly reduce scores, which should not be the case.  Kemudian kami menciptakan set tes templat baru ContraCAT, dirancang untuk secara individu menilai kemampuan untuk menangani langkah-langkah spesifik yang diperlukan untuk terjemahan pronon sukses. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan saat ini untuk NMT yang sadar-konteks bergantung pada set heuristik permukaan, yang merusak ketika terjemahan membutuhkan alasan nyata. We also propose an approach for augmenting the training data, with some improvements.', 'sk': 'Nedavni visoki rezultati pri prevajanju zaimkov z uporabo kontekstnega nevronskega strojnega prevoda kažejo, da trenutni pristopi dobro delujejo. ContraPro je pomemben primer kontrastnega izziva za prevod angleškega nemškega zaimka. Visoki rezultati, doseženi s transformatorskimi modeli, lahko kažejo, da so sposobni učinkovito modelirati zapletene sklepe, potrebne za izvedbo prevajanja zaimkov. To vključuje sposobnost določanja, na katere entitete se lahko sklicuje, določanja, na katero entiteto se nanaša (če obstaja) izvorni jezik in dostopa do slovničnega spola ciljnega jezika za to entiteto. Najprej pokažemo s serijo ciljnih nasprotnih napadov, da sedanji pristopi dejansko niso sposobni dobro modelirati vseh teh informacij. Vstavljanje majhnih količin motečih informacij je dovolj za močno zmanjšanje rezultatov, kar ne bi smelo biti tako. Nato ustvarimo nov testni komplet predlog ContraCAT, zasnovan za individualno oceno sposobnosti obvladovanja posebnih korakov, potrebnih za uspešen prevod zaimka. Naše analize kažejo, da se sedanji pristopi k kontekstu zavedanju NMT zanašajo na niz površinskih heuristik, ki se razgradijo, ko prevodi zahtevajo resnično razlago. Predlagamo tudi pristop za povečanje podatkov o usposabljanju z nekaterimi izboljšavami.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis ContraPro is a notable example of a conflictive competitive conflict set for English pronunn translation. The high scores achieved by transformer models may suggest that they are able to effectively model the complicated set of inferences required to carry out pronoun translation.  Wannan na ƙunsa da abinci wa ka ƙayyade wanne masu tsari, ka gane wanne abun da aka faɗa ɗa lugha-source zuwa (idan ba da haka ba), kuma ka sami matsayin jinin grammati na-harshen wanda aka yi amfani da shi. Muna nũna farkon da ke cikin wasu irin attacki masu motsi da aka yi amfani da su, cewa masu motsi da ake kai yanzu ba za'a iya sami duk wannan macsara da mazaɓa ba. Idan an shigar da gwargwadon nau'in information mai ɓarna, yã isa zai ƙara nau'i mai ƙarfi, don haka kuma ba ya kamata. Sa'an nan kuma za Mu ƙãga wani jarrabi na buƙata ContraCAT, don an yi amfani da shi kodi yana iya iya ƙayyade abincin da za'a yi amfani da hanyõyin da aka ƙayyade wa fassarar-fassaran da aka ci nasara. AnalyyinMu na nũna cẽwa yanzu masu kusantar da matsayin-da-san NMT yana dõgara a kan wani set of bakin heuristics, da wanda ke tsattsãwa idan fassarar za'a buƙata sabo da gaske. Kayya, Munã goyya da wata hanyoyi wa ƙara data na ƙidãya, da wasu improvements.", 'he': 'Recent high scores on pronoun translation using context-aware neural machine translation have suggested that current approaches work well.  ContraPro הוא דוגמא משמעותית של אתגר נגד התרגום לאנגלית גרמנית. התוצאות הגבוהות שנוצאות על ידי דוגמנים משתנים עלולות להציע שהם מסוגלים לדוגמא יעילה את הקבוצה המסובכת של המסקנות הנדרשת כדי לבצע תרגום ברור. זה מכוון את היכולת לקבוע לאיזו יחידה ניתן להזכיר, לזהות לאיזו יחידה שפת מקור מתייחס אליה (אם יש), ולהגיע למין גרמטי שפת המטרה של היחידה הזאת. ראשית אנחנו מראים דרך סדרה של התקפים יריבים ממוקדים כי למעשה גישות הנוכחיות לא מסוגלות לדוגמא את כל המידע הזה היטב. להכניס כמויות קטנות של מידע הסחת דעת מספיק כדי להפחית חזק את הציונים, מה שלא צריך להיות כך. ואז נוצר קבוצת מבחן מודל חדשה ContraCAT, תוכננה כדי להעריך באופן אישי את היכולת להתמודד עם צעדים ספציפיים הנדרשים לתרגום מוצלח. הניתוחים שלנו מראים שהגישות הנוכחיות ל NMT מודע לקונקסט תלויים על קבוצה של היוריסטיקה על פני השטח, אשר מתפרצות כאשר התרגשות דורשות הגיון אמיתי. אנחנו גם מציעים גישה כדי להגדיל את נתוני האימונים, עם כמה שיפורים.', 'jv': 'text-tool-action contrast Puntuan sing wis dipunangé karo model sing transformer bisa supoyiné supoyiné supoyiné supoyiné supoyiné supoyiné ka dianggap cerêt sing nêmêr omplikasi kanggo dianggap ujaran ujaran. Iki akèh mengko iso nggawe sampeyan kang sampeyan akeh sampeyan urip, iso nggoleki cara sampeyan kang sampeyan kelas-urip nggawe (meh sampeyan ngono), lan ngakses akeh sampeyan urip nggawe gerakno karo akeh-urip. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nganggo perusahaan aksi perusahaan pakan anyar tentang gak nggawe barang nggawe aksi iki ora bisa model gak informasi iki ngono. InsertInsert" [Entry] "at the beginning Mungkin nggawe sistem sing paling kelompok nang daftar, contrast Rasane sing dipunangke Awak dhéwé mungko ngerasakno dadi nggawe luwih nggawe dadi nggawe, lan didasakno sing apik nyeramé.', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་མིང་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུ ContraPro་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་དོན་ཕན་ཚུལ་ལྡན་གྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་རེས། The high scores achieved by transformer models may suggest that they are able to effectively model the complicated set of inferences required to carry out pronoun translation. འདིས་དང་འབྲེལ་རྒྱལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གང་ཡིན་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་གནད་དོན་དམིགས་འབེབས་བྱས་པའི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བ་དེ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན Inserting small amounts of distracting information is enough to strongly reduce scores, which should not be the case. We then create a new template test set ContraCAT, designed to individually assess the ability to handle the specific steps necessary for successful pronoun translation. Our analyses show that current approaches to context-aware NMT rely on a set of surface heuristics, which break down when translations require real reasoning. ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིག་དག་བརྗོད་པར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'ar': 'تقييم بشري لأنظمة الجيل من AMR إلى اللغة الإنجليزية', 'pt': 'Uma Avaliação Humana de Sistemas de Geração AMR para Inglês', 'es': 'Una evaluación humana de los sistemas de generación de AMR a inglés', 'fr': "Une évaluation humaine des systèmes de génération AMR vers l'anglais", 'ja': 'AMR - to - English Generation Systemsのヒューマン評価', 'zh': '其AMR-to-English发电系统之人工评估', 'hi': 'एएमआर-टू-इंग्लिश जनरेशन सिस्टम का मानव मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Человеческая оценка систем поколения AMR-to-English', 'ga': 'Measúnú Daonna ar Chórais Ghiniúint AMR-go-Béarla', 'ka': 'ადამიანის განსაზღვრება AMR- დან ანგლისური განვითარების სისტემების', 'hu': 'Az AMR-angol generációs rendszerek emberi értékelése', 'el': 'Ανθρώπινη Αξιολόγηση Συστημάτων Παραγωγής από ΑΜR σε Αγγλικά', 'it': 'Una valutazione umana dei sistemi di generazione AMR-to-English', 'kk': 'AMR- мен ағылшын жасау жүйелерінің адамның оқиғасы', 'lt': 'Žmogiškas AMR-anglų generacijos sistemų vertinimas', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'AMR- ലേക്ക്- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ജനിപ്പ് സിസ്റ്റം', 'mn': 'АМР-ээс Англи хэлний үеийн системийн хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээ', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni mill-Bniedem tas-Sistemi ta’ Ġenerazzjoni AMR għall-Ingliż', 'ro': 'O evaluare umană a sistemelor de generație AMR în limba engleză', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-Ingiriis Generation Systems', 'sr': 'Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'ta': 'A human evaluation of AMR- to- English Generation Systems', 'sv': 'En mänsklig utvärdering av AMR-till-engelska generationssystem', 'ur': 'AMR-to-English Generation Systems کے انسان کا ارزش', 'pl': 'Ludzka ocena systemów generacji AMR na angielski', 'uz': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'vi': 'A thiệt hại mạng trên mạng.', 'bg': 'Човешка оценка на системите за генериране на AMR-към-английски', 'hr': 'Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'nl': 'Een menselijke evaluatie van AMR-naar-Engels generatie systemen', 'da': 'En menneskelig evaluering af AMR-til-engelske generationssystemer', 'de': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'id': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '영어 생성 시스템에 대한 인류의 AMR 평가', 'sw': 'Tathmini ya binadamu ya Mfumo wa Uzazi wa Kiingereza', 'sq': 'Një vlerësim njerëzor i sistemeve të gjeneratave AMR-në-Anglisht', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'AMR-we-Iňlisçe Jemi Systemleriniň Taýýarlama', 'hy': 'ԱՄՌ-ի անգլերեն սերունդների մարդկային գնահատականը', 'am': 'አ-አ-አ-ኢንግሊዝኛ የኢንጂል ትውልድ ድምፅ', 'az': 'ńįnsanlarńĪn AMR-d…ôn ńįngiliz…ô n…ôsil sisteml…ôrinin deńüerlendirm…ôsi', 'bn': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'ca': 'Una evaluació humana dels sistemes de generació AMR a anglès', 'cs': 'Lidské hodnocení AMR-to-English generačních systémů', 'et': 'AMR-inglise generatsioonisüsteemide inimhindamine', 'bs': 'Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'fi': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'הערכה אנושית של מערכות הגנרציה AMR-לאנגלית', 'sk': 'A Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Human Evaluation of AMR-to-English Generation Systems'}
{'en': 'Most current state-of-the art systems for generating English text from Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) have been evaluated only using automated metrics, such as BLEU, which are known to be problematic for natural language generation. In this work, we present the results of a new human evaluation which collects fluency and adequacy scores, as well as categorization of error types, for several recent AMR generation systems. We discuss the relative quality of these systems and how our results compare to those of automatic metrics, finding that while the metrics are mostly successful in ranking systems overall, collecting human judgments allows for more nuanced comparisons. We also analyze common errors made by these systems.', 'ar': 'تم تقييم معظم الأنظمة الحديثة لتوليد النص الإنجليزي من تمثيل المعنى المجرد (AMR) فقط باستخدام المقاييس الآلية ، مثل BLEU ، والتي من المعروف أنها تمثل مشكلة لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية. في هذا العمل ، نقدم نتائج تقييم بشري جديد يجمع درجات الطلاقة والكفاية ، بالإضافة إلى تصنيف أنواع الأخطاء للعديد من أنظمة توليد مقاومة مضادات الميكروبات الحديثة. نناقش الجودة النسبية لهذه الأنظمة وكيف تقارن نتائجنا بنتائج المقاييس التلقائية ، ووجدنا أنه بينما تنجح المقاييس في الغالب في أنظمة التصنيف بشكل عام ، فإن جمع الأحكام البشرية يسمح بمقارنات أكثر دقة. نقوم أيضًا بتحليل الأخطاء الشائعة التي تسببها هذه الأنظمة.', 'fr': "La plupart des systèmes de pointe actuels pour générer du texte anglais à partir de la représentation abstraite de signification (AMR) ont été évalués uniquement à l'aide de mesures automatisées, telles que BLEU, qui sont connues pour être problématiques pour la génération du langage naturel. Dans ce travail, nous présentons les résultats d'une nouvelle évaluation humaine qui recueille des scores de fluidité et d'adéquation, ainsi que la catégorisation des types d'erreurs, pour plusieurs systèmes récents de génération de RAM. Nous discutons de la qualité relative de ces systèmes et de la façon dont nos résultats se comparent à ceux des métriques automatiques, en constatant que même si les métriques réussissent généralement à classer les systèmes dans leur ensemble, la collecte de jugements humains permet des comparaisons plus nuancées. Nous analysons également les erreurs courantes commises par ces systèmes.", 'es': 'La mayoría de los sistemas actuales de última generación para generar texto en inglés a partir de la Representación de Significado Abstracto (AMR) se han evaluado solo mediante métricas automatizadas, como BLEU, que se sabe que son problemáticas para la generación de lenguaje natural. En este trabajo, presentamos los resultados de una nueva evaluación humana que recoge puntuaciones de fluidez y adecuación, así como la categorización de los tipos de error, para varios sistemas de generación de RAM recientes. Discutimos la calidad relativa de estos sistemas y cómo nuestros resultados se comparan con los de las métricas automáticas, y descubrimos que, si bien las métricas son en su mayoría exitosas en los sistemas de clasificación en general, recopilar juicios humanos permite realizar comparaciones más matizadas. También analizamos los errores comunes que cometen estos sistemas.', 'pt': 'A maioria dos sistemas atuais de última geração para gerar texto em inglês a partir de Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) foram avaliados apenas usando métricas automatizadas, como BLEU, que são conhecidas por serem problemáticas para a geração de linguagem natural. Neste trabalho, apresentamos os resultados de uma nova avaliação humana que coleta escores de fluência e adequação, bem como categorização de tipos de erro, para vários sistemas recentes de geração de AMR. Discutimos a qualidade relativa desses sistemas e como nossos resultados se comparam aos das métricas automáticas, descobrindo que, embora as métricas sejam mais bem-sucedidas na classificação geral dos sistemas, a coleta de julgamentos humanos permite comparações mais sutis. Também analisamos erros comuns cometidos por esses sistemas.', 'ja': '抽象意味表現（ ＡＭＲ ）から英語テキストを生成するための最新のシステムのほとんどは、自然言語生成に問題があることが知られているＢＬＥＵなどの自動メトリックを使用してのみ評価されている。本研究では、最近のいくつかのAMR生成システムについて、流動性スコアと妥当性スコア、およびエラータイプの分類を収集する新しい人間評価の結果を提示します。これらのシステムの相対的な品質と、自動メトリックの結果との比較について説明します。メトリックはほとんどの場合、システム全体のランク付けに成功していますが、人間の判断を収集することで、より微妙な比較が可能になることがわかりました。また、これらのシステムによる一般的なエラーも分析します。', 'ru': 'Большинство современных систем генерации английского текста из абстрактного смыслового представления (AMR) были оценены только с использованием автоматизированных метрик, таких как BLEU, которые, как известно, являются проблематичными для генерации естественного языка. В этой работе мы представляем результаты новой человеческой оценки, которая собирает баллы беглости и адекватности, а также категоризацию типов ошибок для нескольких последних систем генерации AMR. Мы обсуждаем относительное качество этих систем и то, как наши результаты сравниваются с автоматическими метриками, обнаруживая, что, хотя метрики в основном успешны в ранжировании систем в целом, сбор человеческих суждений позволяет проводить более детальные сравнения. Мы также анализируем распространенные ошибки, сделанные этими системами.', 'zh': '方今大抵以抽象之义(AMR)生英语文本之最先进者,惟用自指标(如BLEU)评估,指标已知自然语言生矣。 凡此诸事,举新人一事,当评估收近数AMR生成系统之流畅性,与充分性分数,及差类之类。 论其统之相质,与吾之自指标何如,虽指标多成功于一体,而聚人决可以为细矣。 我们还分别了这种系统所生的常见错误。', 'hi': 'सार अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (एएमआर) से अंग्रेजी पाठ उत्पन्न करने के लिए अधिकांश वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों का मूल्यांकन केवल स्वचालित मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके किया गया है, जैसे कि BLEU, जो प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए समस्याग्रस्त होने के लिए जाने जाते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक नए मानव मूल्यांकन के परिणामों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो प्रवाह और पर्याप्तता स्कोर एकत्र करता है, साथ ही साथ कई हालिया एएमआर पीढ़ी प्रणालियों के लिए त्रुटि प्रकारों का वर्गीकरण भी करता है। हम इन प्रणालियों की सापेक्ष गुणवत्ता पर चर्चा करते हैं और हमारे परिणाम स्वचालित मीट्रिक की तुलना में कैसे तुलना करते हैं, यह पाते हुए कि मीट्रिक ज्यादातर रैंकिंग सिस्टम में सफल होते हैं, जबकि समग्र रूप से रैंकिंग सिस्टम में मेट्रिक्स सफल होते हैं, मानव निर्णय एकत्र करना अधिक सूक्ष्म तुलना के लिए अनुमति देता है। हम इन प्रणालियों द्वारा की गई सामान्य त्रुटियों का भी विश्लेषण करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Ní dhearnadh meastóireacht ar fhormhór na gcóras úrscothach atá ann faoi láthair chun téacs Béarla a ghiniúint ó Léiriú Brí Teibí (AMR) ach úsáid a bhaint as méadracht uathoibrithe, mar BLEU, arb eol go bhfuil fadhbanna acu maidir le giniúint nádúrtha teanga. San obair seo, cuirimid i láthair torthaí meastóireachta daonna nua a bhailíonn scóir líofachta agus leordhóthanachta, chomh maith le catagóiriú na gcineálacha earráide, do roinnt córas giniúna AMR le déanaí. Déanaimid plé ar cháilíocht choibhneasta na gcóras seo agus ar an gcaoi a gcuireann ár dtorthaí i gcomparáid le torthaí méadrachta uathoibríocha, ag fáil amach cé go n-éiríonn leis an méadracht den chuid is mó i rangú na gcóras iomlán, ceadaíonn bailiú breithiúnais daonna comparáidí níos nuaí a dhéanamh. Déanaimid anailís freisin ar earráidí coitianta a dhéanann na córais seo.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიკური განსაზღვრებადან ინგლისური ტექსტის შექმნა მნიშვნელოვანი სისტემის განსაზღვრება (AMR) მხოლოდ ავტომატიკური მეტრიკის გამოყენება, როგორც BLEU, რომელიც იცით პრობლემატიურია სახე ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ახალი ადამიანის განსაზღვრების შედეგი, რომელიც ფუნქცია და ადამიანის მონაცემების შედეგი, და შეცდომის ტიპების კატეგორიზაცია, რამდენიმე ახალი AMR წარმოდ ჩვენ ამ სისტემის შესაბამისი კაalitეტის და როგორ ჩვენი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი ავტომატიკური მეტრიკის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი გავაკეთებთ, როცა მეტრიკები უფრო წარმატებულია სისტემის რენექტირებში, ადამია ჩვენ ასევე ამ სისტემებით გავაკეთებთ საერთო შეცდომები.', 'hu': 'A legtöbb modern, angol szöveg előállítására szolgáló rendszert az Absztrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) használatából kizárólag automatizált mérőszámok használatával értékelték, mint például a BLEU, amelyek problémásak a természetes nyelv előállításában. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk egy új emberi értékelés eredményeit, amely több újabb AMR generációs rendszer folyékonysági és megfelelőségi pontszámát gyűjti össze, valamint a hibatípusok kategorizálását. Megvitatjuk ezen rendszerek relatív minőségét és eredményeink összehasonlítását az automatikus mérőszámokkal, megállapítva, hogy miközben a mérőszámok többnyire sikeresek a rangsorolásban, az emberi ítéletek összegyűjtése sokkal árnyaltabb összehasonlítást tesz lehetővé. Ezen rendszerek által elkövetett gyakori hibákat is elemezzük.', 'el': 'Τα περισσότερα σύγχρονα συστήματα παραγωγής αγγλικού κειμένου από την αναπαράσταση αφηρημένης έννοιας αξιολογήθηκαν μόνο χρησιμοποιώντας αυτοματοποιημένες μετρήσεις, όπως είναι γνωστό ότι είναι προβληματικές για τη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα μιας νέας ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης που συλλέγει βαθμολογίες ρευστότητας και επάρκειας, καθώς και κατηγοριοποίηση τύπων σφαλμάτων, για αρκετά πρόσφατα συστήματα παραγωγής ΑΜR. Συζητούμε τη σχετική ποιότητα αυτών των συστημάτων και πώς συγκρίνονται τα αποτελέσματά μας με εκείνα των αυτόματων μετρήσεων, διαπιστώνοντας ότι ενώ οι μετρήσεις είναι ως επί το πλείστον επιτυχείς στα συστήματα κατάταξης συνολικά, η συλλογή ανθρώπινων κρίσεων επιτρέπει πιο διαφοροποιημένες συγκρίσεις. Αναλύουμε επίσης κοινά λάθη που γίνονται από αυτά τα συστήματα.', 'it': "La maggior parte degli attuali sistemi all'avanguardia per generare testo inglese da Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) sono stati valutati solo utilizzando metriche automatizzate, come BLEU, che sono note per essere problematiche per la generazione del linguaggio naturale. In questo lavoro presentiamo i risultati di una nuova valutazione umana che raccoglie i punteggi di fluidità e adeguatezza, nonché la categorizzazione dei tipi di errore, per diversi sistemi di generazione AMR recenti. Discutiamo la qualità relativa di questi sistemi e come i nostri risultati si confrontano con quelli delle metriche automatiche, scoprendo che mentre le metriche hanno maggior successo nel ranking dei sistemi nel complesso, la raccolta dei giudizi umani consente confronti più sfumati. Analizziamo anche gli errori comuni commessi da questi sistemi.", 'kk': 'Ағылшын мәтінді жасау үшін назардағы сурет жүйелерінің көпшілігі Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) дегеннен тек автоматты метрикалық, мысалы BLEU, табиғи тілдерді құру үшін мәселелер деп белгіледі. Бұл жұмыста, біз жаңа адамдардың оқиғасының нәтижелерін көрсетедік. Бірнеше жаңа AMR жасау жүйелері үшін қате түрлерінің санаттарын және адамдардың оқиғасының нәтижелерін жинап Біз бұл жүйелердің салыстырмалы сапатты және нәтижелеріміз автоматты метрикалармен қалай салыстырып, метрикалардың көпшілігі жалпы жүйелерде сәтті болғанда, адамдардың тәртіптерін жинау үшін көп салыстыр Бұл жүйелер жасалған жалпы қателерді де анализ етеді.', 'lt': 'Dauguma dabartinių pažangiausių anglų teksto iš Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) kūrimo sistemų buvo vertinamos tik naudojant automatizuotus metrikus, pvz., BLEU, kurie žinoma, yra probleminiai gamtos kalbų kūrimui. In this work, we present the results of a new human evaluation which collects fluency and adequacy scores, as well as categorization of error types, for several recent AMR generation systems.  Mes diskutuojame apie santykinę šių sistemų kokybę ir apie tai, kaip mūsų rezultatai palyginami su automatinių metrijų rezultatais, nustatydami, kad nors metrijos iš esmės sėkmingai vertinamos sistemose apskritai, renkant žmogaus sprendimus galima atlikti labiau nuancijuotus palyginimus. Taip pat analizuojame bendras šių sistemų padarytas klaidas.', 'mk': 'Повеќето актуелни најсовремени системи за генерирање англиски текст од Апстрактна претстава на значењето (АМР) се проценети само со употреба на автоматизирани метрики, како што е БЛЕУ, кои се познати како проблематични за генерацијата на природен јазик. Во оваа работа, ги претставуваме резултатите од новата човечка оценка која собира оценки за течност и адекватност, како и категоризација на типовите на грешки, за неколку неодамнешни системи на генерација на АМР. Разговараме за релативниот квалитет на овие системи и како нашите резултати се споредуваат со резултатите на автоматската метрика, откривајќи дека иако метриката е претежно успешна во рангирањето на системите вкупно, собирањето на човечки пресуди овозможува понуанцирани споредби Ние, исто така, анализираме заеднички грешки направени од овие системи.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan sistem state-of-the-art semasa untuk menghasilkan teks bahasa Inggeris dari Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt (AMR) telah diuji hanya menggunakan metrik automatik, seperti BLEU, yang diketahui sebagai masalah untuk generasi bahasa alami. Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan keputusan penilaian manusia yang baru yang mengumpulkan skor kesempurnaan dan kesempurnaan, serta kategorisasi jenis ralat, untuk beberapa sistem generasi AMR baru-baru ini. Kita membincangkan kualiti relatif sistem ini dan bagaimana hasil kita dibandingkan dengan hasil metrik automatik, mencari bahawa walaupun metrik kebanyakan berjaya dalam memperkirakan sistem secara keseluruhan, mengumpulkan penilaian manusia membolehkan perbandingan yang lebih nuansi. We also analyze common errors made by these systems.', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tas-sistemi moderni attwali għall-ġenerazzjoni tat-test Ingliż mir-Rappreżentanza tat-Tip Abstrat (AMR) ġew evalwati biss bl-użu ta’ metriċi awtomatizzati, bħall-BLEU, li huma magħrufa li huma problematiċi għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali. In this work, we present the results of a new human evaluation which collects fluency and adequacy scores, as well as categorization of error types, for several recent AMR generation systems.  Aħna niddiskutu l-kwalità relattiva ta’ dawn is-sistemi u kif ir-riżultati tagħna jitqabblu ma’ dawk tal-metriċi awtomatiċi, u nsibu li filwaqt li l-metriċi fil-biċċa l-kbira jirnexxu fis-sistemi ta’ klassifikazzjoni b’mod ġenerali, il-ġbir ta’ sentenzi umani jippermetti paraguni aktar nuanzati. Nianalizzaw ukoll żbalji komuni magħmula minn dawn is-sistemi.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх орчин үед Англи хэлний текст бий болгох урлагийн систем Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) нь зөвхөн автоматжуулагдсан метрикийг ашиглан багалийн хэлний үеийн асуудал гэж нэрлэдэг. Энэ ажлын дараа бид хүн төрөлхтний шинэ оюутнуудын үр дүнг харуулж байна. Энэ нь шингэн, адилхан тоонуудыг цуглуулдаг. Мөн алдаа төрөлхтний хэлбэрүүдийг цуглуулдаг. Бид эдгээр системийн харьцангуй чанарыг ярьж, үр дүн нь автоматикийн метрикийн харьцангуй хэрхэн харьцуулдаг вэ гэхээр метрикийн ихэнхдээ үндсэн системд амжилттай байхад хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжүүдийг цуглуулж, илүү төвөгтэй харьцуулах болом Бид мөн эдгээр системээр хийсэн нийтийн алдаа шинжилгээ хийдэг.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള കലാക്ഷ സിസ്റ്റമുകളില്\u200d മിക്കവും അസ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫ്യൂഷനിസ്കോര്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പ ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ചാര്\u200dച്ചയുടെ വ്യവസ്ഥയെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് സ്വയം മെട്രിക്കുകളെക്കുറിച്ച് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പൊതുവായ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Dei fleste gjeldande kunstigssystema for å laga engelsk tekst frå abstrakt middelverdingsrepresentasjon (AMR) er evaluert berre ved hjelp av automatiske metrikar, slik som BLEU, som er kjent til å vera problematisk for naturspråk. I dette arbeidet viser vi resultatet av ein ny menneskelig evaluering som samler fluency og adekvitetspoeng, og kategorisering av feiltypar for fleire nyleg AMR-genereringssystemer. Vi diskuterer relativt kvalitet på desse systema og korleis resultatene våre sammenlignar med dei automatiske metrikane, og finn at mens metrikane er hovudsakelig suksessfulle i rangeringssystemet overalt, samling av menneske sprøytebrukar tillater fleire nuanserte sammenligningar. Vi analyserer også felles feil gjeven av desse systema.', 'pl': 'Większość najnowocześniejszych systemów generowania tekstu angielskiego z Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) została oceniona jedynie przy użyciu zautomatyzowanych wskaźników, takich jak BLEU, które są znane jako problematyczne dla generowania języka naturalnego. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy wyniki nowej oceny ludzkiej, która gromadzi wyniki płynności i adekwatności, a także kategoryzację typów błędów dla kilku najnowszych systemów generacji AMR. Omawiamy względną jakość tych systemów i jak nasze wyniki porównują się z wynikami automatycznymi, stwierdzając, że chociaż wskaźniki te są głównie udane w systemach rankingowych ogólnie, zbieranie osądów ludzkich pozwala na bardziej niuansowane porównania. Analizujemy również częste błędy popełniane przez te systemy.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea sistemelor actuale de ultimă generare a textului în limba engleză din reprezentarea abstractă a semnificației (AMR) au fost evaluate numai folosind metrici automatizate, cum ar fi BLEU, care sunt cunoscute a fi problematice pentru generarea limbajului natural. În această lucrare, prezentăm rezultatele unei noi evaluări umane care colectează scorurile de fluență și adecvare, precum și clasificarea tipurilor de eroare, pentru mai multe sisteme recente de generație AMR. Discutăm calitatea relativă a acestor sisteme și modul în care rezultatele noastre se compară cu cele ale măsurătorilor automate, constatând că, în timp ce măsurătorile au succes în general în clasificarea sistemelor, colectarea judecăților umane permite comparații mai nuanțate. De asemenea, analizăm erorile comune făcute de aceste sisteme.', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පද්ධතිය අවස්ථාවයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පද්ධතිය නිර්මාණය (AMR) වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සඳහා ස්වයංග්\u200dරීය භාෂ මේ වැඩේ අපි අලුත් මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත අපි මේ පද්ධතියේ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවය සහ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපි මේ පද්ධති වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය වැරදි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා.', 'sr': 'Većina trenutnih sistema umetnosti za proizvodnju engleskog teksta iz abstrakta značajnog predstavljanja (AMR) procjenjena je samo koristeći automatske metrike, poput BLEU, koje se poznaju da su problematične za generaciju prirodnog jezika. U ovom poslu predstavljamo rezultate novog ljudskog procjene koji skuplja rezultate tekućine i odgovarajuće rezultate, kao i kategorizaciju vrsta grešaka, za nekoliko nedavnih sistema generacije AMR-a. Razgovaramo o relativnoj kvaliteti tih sustava i kako se naši rezultati uspoređuju s automatskim metrikama, otkrivajući da dok su metrika uglavnom uspješna u registracijskim sistemima, skupljanje ljudskih osuđivanja omogućava više nuanciranih usporedba. Takođe analiziramo zajedničke greške koje su napravile ovi sistemi.', 'so': 'Inta badan nidaamka farshaxanka ah ee la sameeyo qoraalka Ingiriiska ee laga soo jeedo (AMR) waxaa lagu qiimeeyay isticmaalka maamulka ah oo kaliya, sida BLEU, kuwaas oo loo yaqaan inay dhibaato u tahay qarniga afka dabiicadda ah. Shaqadan waxan ku soo bandhignaa resultinta qiimeynta cusub ee biniaadamka, taasoo soo ururista aqoonta iyo qiimeynta ku filan, iyo kooxa noocyada qaladka, nidaamka u dhowaad ee AMR-ka. Waxaynu kala sheekeynaa qiimaha u dhow nidaamkan iyo sidaan resultiyadayaga u barbardhigno kuwa maamulka ah, waxaynu ogaanaynaa in marka lagu liibaanayo nidaamka meelaha lagu qorayo oo dhan, in xukunka dadku soo ururiyo uu u ogolaado is-barbarbaro badan. Sidoo kale waxaynu fasalcinnaa qaladka caadiga ah ee nidaamkan sameeyay.', 'sv': 'De flesta aktuella state-of-the-art system för att generera engelsk text från Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) har utvärderats endast med hjälp av automatiserade mätvärden, såsom BLEU, som är kända för att vara problematiska för generering av naturligt språk. I detta arbete presenterar vi resultaten av en ny mänsklig utvärdering som samlar in fluens- och adekvatspoäng, samt kategorisering av feltyper, för flera nya AMR-generationssystem. Vi diskuterar den relativa kvaliteten på dessa system och hur våra resultat jämför med de automatiska mätvärdena, och konstaterar att medan mätvärdena mestadels är framgångsrika i rankningssystem generellt, möjliggör insamling av mänskliga bedömningar mer nyanserade jämförelser. Vi analyserar också vanliga fel som görs av dessa system.', 'ur': 'بیشک اکثر موجود ایٹیٹ سیسٹم انگلیسی پیغام پیدا کرنے کے لئے ابسٹرک مینٹ نمایش (AMR) کے ذریعہ سے انگلیسی پیغام پیدا کرنے کے لئے محسوس کیا گیا ہے، صرف اتوماٹ میٹریک کے استعمال سے، جیسے BLEU، جو طبیعی زبان پیدا کرنے کے اس کام میں ہم نے ایک نو انسان کی ارزیابی کا نتیجہ دکھایا ہے جو فلنست اور مناسب اسکور جمع کرتا ہے اور بہت اگلے AMR کی نسل سیستموں کے لئے خطاؤں کے طریقوں کا تقسیم کرتا ہے۔ ہم ان سیسٹموں کی نسبت کیفیت اور ہمارے نتیجے اتماٹی میٹریک کے ساتھ کس طرح مقایسہ کرتے ہیں، اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ جب میٹریک اکثر رقم سیسٹموں میں کامیاب ہوتے ہیں، انسان کے فیصلے جمع کرتا ہے، اس سے زیادہ مٹریک مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم نے بھی ان سیستموں سے کامل خطاؤں کا تحقیق کیا ہے۔', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கான தற்போதைய கலை அமைப்புகளில் பெரும்பாலான நிலைமையில் இருந்து பிரித்தெடுக்கும் பெரும்பாலான மெட்ரிக்களை மட்டும் தானாக மத இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய மனித மதிப்பின் முடிவுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது விளைவுகளையும் தேவையான மதிப்பெண்களையும் சேகரிக்கும், மற்றும இந்த அமைப்புகளின் சார்ந்த தரம் மற்றும் எங்கள் முடிவுகள் தானியங்கி மெட்ரிக்களை ஒப்பிடுவது எப்படி விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் என்று கண்டுபிடிக்கும் போது மெட்ரிக இந்த அமைப்புகளால் செய்யப்பட்ட பொது பிழைகளை நாம் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம்.', 'vi': 'Hầu hết các hệ thống nghệ thuật hiện thời để tạo ra văn bản Anh từ Abstract meaning Representation (AMR) đã được đánh giá chỉ bằng cách đo lường tự động, ví dụ đại diện nguyên tử, mà được biết là rất khó để tạo ra ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đưa ra kết quả của một đánh giá nhân loại mới thu thập tỉ số lưu động và mức độ phù hợp, cũng như phân loại lỗi, cho nhiều hệ thống sản sinh AMR gần đây. Chúng ta thảo luận về chất lượng tương đối của các hệ thống này và cách kết quả so sánh với kết quả đo lường tự động, phát hiện ra rằng dù thước đo có khả năng cao trong việc xếp hạng hệ thống tổng thể, thu thập các phán quyết con người cho phép so sánh khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích lỗi chung của hệ thống này.', 'uz': "Most current state-of-the art systems for generating English text from Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) have been evaluated only using automated metrics, such as BLEU, which are known to be problematic for natural language generation.  Bu ishda, biz yangi inson qiymatlarining natijalarini hozir qilamiz. Bu bir necha necha AMR yaratish tizimlari uchun faqat va yetarli qiymatni olib tashlanadi. Biz bu tizimning qiymatini va natijalarimizni avtomatik metriklarga kamaytirishimiz haqida javob beramiz. Agar metriklarga ko'p chegara tizimlarda muvaffaqiyatli bo'lganda, inson xukunalarni birlashtirish imkoniyatlariga qo'shish imkoniyatini beradi. Biz bu tizimlar uchun umumiy xatolarni analyzeriz.", 'bg': 'Повечето съвременни системи за генериране на английски текст от Абстрактна представа на значението (АМР) са оценени само с помощта на автоматизирани показатели, като например за които е известно, че са проблематични за генерирането на естествен език. В тази работа представяме резултатите от нова човешка оценка, която събира оценки за плавност и адекватност, както и категоризация на типовете грешки за няколко скорошни системи за генериране на АМР. Обсъждаме относителното качество на тези системи и как нашите резултати се сравняват с тези на автоматичните показатели, като установим, че макар показателите да са предимно успешни в системите за класиране като цяло, събирането на човешки преценки позволява по-нюансирани сравнения. Анализираме и често срещаните грешки, допуснати от тези системи.', 'nl': 'De meeste huidige state-of-the-art systemen voor het genereren van Engelse tekst uit Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) zijn alleen geëvalueerd met behulp van geautomatiseerde metrics, zoals BLEU, die bekend staan als problematisch voor het genereren van natuurlijke taal. In dit werk presenteren we de resultaten van een nieuwe menselijke evaluatie die vloeiende en adequaatheidsscores verzamelt, evenals categorisering van fouttypen, voor verschillende recente AMR-generatiesystemen. We bespreken de relatieve kwaliteit van deze systemen en hoe onze resultaten vergeleken worden met die van automatische metrics, waarbij we vaststellen dat hoewel de metrics meestal succesvol zijn in ranking systemen over het algemeen, het verzamelen van menselijke beoordelingen mogelijk maakt meer genuanceerde vergelijkingen. Ook analyseren we veelvoorkomende fouten van deze systemen.', 'da': 'De fleste nuværende state-of-the-art systemer til generering af engelsk tekst fra Abstrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) er kun blevet evalueret ved hjælp af automatiserede målinger, såsom BLEU, som er kendt for at være problematiske for generering af naturligt sprog. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi resultaterne af en ny menneskelig evaluering, der indsamler flydenheds- og tilstrækkelighedsscorer samt kategorisering af fejltyper for flere nyere AMR-generationssystemer. Vi diskuterer den relative kvalitet af disse systemer, og hvordan vores resultater sammenlignes med resultaterne af automatiske målinger, og finder ud af, at mens målene primært er vellykkede i rangeringssystemer generelt, indsamling af menneskelige vurderinger giver mulighed for mere nuancerede sammenligninger. Vi analyserer også almindelige fejl begået af disse systemer.', 'hr': 'Većina trenutnih sustava umjetnosti za proizvodnju engleskog teksta iz abstrakta značajnog predstavljanja (AMR) procijenjena je samo koristeći automatske metrike, poput BLEU, koje se poznaju da su problematične za proizvodnju prirodnog jezika. U ovom poslu predstavljamo rezultate novog ljudskog procjene koji skuplja rezultate tekućine i odgovarajuće rezultate, kao i kategorizacija vrsta grešaka, za nekoliko nedavnih sustava generacije AMR-a. Razgovaramo o relativnoj kvaliteti tih sustava i kako se naši rezultati uspoređuju s onima automatske metrike, otkrivajući da, dok su metrike uglavnom uspješne u cijelom redovanju sustava, skupljanje ljudskih sudova omogućava više nuanciranih usporedba. Također analiziramo zajedničke greške koje su napravile ovi sustavi.', 'de': 'Die meisten modernen Systeme zur Generierung englischer Texte aus Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) wurden ausschließlich anhand automatisierter Metriken wie BLEU evaluiert, die als problematisch für die Erzeugung natürlicher Sprache bekannt sind. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir die Ergebnisse einer neuen menschlichen Evaluation vor, die Fluency- und Adäquacy-Scores sowie die Kategorisierung von Fehlertypen für mehrere aktuelle AMR-Generationssysteme sammelt. Wir diskutieren die relative Qualität dieser Systeme und wie unsere Ergebnisse mit denen automatischer Metriken verglichen werden. Dabei stellen wir fest, dass die Metriken zwar im Ranking-System insgesamt größtenteils erfolgreich sind, das Sammeln menschlicher Beurteilungen jedoch differenziertere Vergleiche ermöglicht. Wir analysieren auch häufige Fehler dieser Systeme.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan sistem state-of-the-art saat ini untuk menghasilkan teks Inggris dari Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) telah diuji hanya menggunakan metrik otomatis, seperti BLEU, yang dikenal sebagai masalah untuk generasi bahasa alam. In this work, we present the results of a new human evaluation which collects fluency and adequacy scores, as well as categorization of error types, for several recent AMR generation systems.  Kita mendiskusikan kualitas relatif sistem ini dan bagaimana hasil kita dibandingkan dengan hasil metrik otomatis, menemukan bahwa sementara metrik kebanyakan sukses dalam sistem peringkat secara keseluruhan, mengumpulkan penilaian manusia memungkinkan untuk perbandingan yang lebih nuansi. Kami juga menganalisa kesalahan umum yang dibuat oleh sistem ini.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa sasa wa sanaa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza ujumbe wa maandishi ya Kiingereza kutoka kwa Representation (AMR) umepitiwa tu kwa kutumia mbinu za kujitegemea, kama vile BLEU, ambazo zinafahamika kuwa tatizo kwa kizazi cha lugha asili. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha matokeo ya uchunguzi mpya wa binadamu ambao unakusanya ufanisi na vipimo vya kutosha, pamoja na kuchaguliwa kwa aina za makosa, kwa mfumo wa uzalishaji wa AMR hivi karibuni. Tunajojiana na ubora wa mfumo huu na jinsi matokeo yetu yanavyolinganisha na wale wa mbinu za kujitegemea, tunagundua kuwa wakati mbinu hizo zinafanikiwa zaidi katika mfumo wa rangi kwa ujumla, kukusanya hukumu za binadamu zinaruhusu kulinganisha zaidi. Pia tunachambua makosa yanayotokana na mfumo huu.', 'ko': '현재 대부분 추상적 의미 표현(AMR)에서 영어 텍스트를 생성하는 최첨단 시스템은 자동 도량만 사용해 평가한다. 예를 들어 BLEU는 자연 언어 생성에 문제가 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 최근 몇 개의 AMR 생성 시스템의 유창성과 충분성 점수, 그리고 오류 유형의 분류를 수집한 새로운 인류 평가 결과를 보여 주었다.우리는 이러한 시스템의 상대적인 품질, 그리고 우리의 결과와 자동 지표의 결과를 어떻게 비교하는지 토론했다. 비록 이런 지표들이 전체적으로 시스템을 랭킹할 때 기본적으로 성공적이지만 인류의 판단을 수집하면 더욱 미세한 비교를 허용할 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 또 이 시스템들의 흔한 오류를 분석했다.', 'sq': 'Shumica e sistemeve aktuale më të larta për gjenerimin e tekstit anglez nga Përfaqësuesja Abstract Meaning (AMR) janë vlerësuar vetëm duke përdorur metrika automatike, të tilla si BLEU, të cilat janë të njohura të jenë problematike për gjenerimin natyror të gjuhës. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim rezultatet e një vlerësimi të ri njerëzor që mbledh rezultatet e fluencës dhe përshtatshmërisë si dhe kategorizimin e llojeve të gabimeve për disa sisteme të fundit të gjenerimit AMR. Ne diskutojmë cilësinë relative të këtyre sistemeve dhe se si rezultatet tona krahasohen me ato të metrikave automatike, duke gjetur se ndërsa metrikat janë kryesisht të suksesshme në renditjen e sistemeve përgjithësisht, mbledhja e gjykimeve njerëzore lejon për krahasime më të nuancuara. Ne analizojmë gjithashtu gabimet e përbashkëta të bërë nga këto sisteme.', 'af': "Die meeste huidige staat-van-die kuns stelsels vir die genereer van Engelske teks van Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) is slegs gemaak met automatiseerde metries, soos BLEU, wat bekend word om problematiese te wees vir natuurlike taal genereering. In hierdie werk stel ons die resultate van 'n nuwe menslike evaluasie wat fluiditeit en adekuateitstelling versamel, en ook kategoriseering van fouttipes vir verskeie onlangse AMR generasiestelsels. Ons bespreek die relatiewe kwaliteit van hierdie stelsels en hoe ons resultate vergelyk met die wat van outomatiese metries is, en vind dat terwyl die metries mees suksesvol is in ranking stelsels totaal, versamel menslike vergelykings toelaat vir meer nuanced vergelykings. Ons analiseer ook algemene foute wat deur hierdie stelsels gemaak is.", 'am': 'Most current state-of-the art systems for generating English text from Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) have been evaluated only using automated metrics, such as BLEU, which are known to be problematic for natural language generation.  በዚህ ሥራ፣ አዲስ የሰው ማስታወቂያ ውጤቶችን እና የእውነትን ቁጥር እና የስህተት ዓይነቶችን ለጥቂት የአሜሪር ትውልድ ስርዓት የሚሰበስብ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የእነዚህን ስርዓቶች የቅርብ ጥሩ እና ፍሬዎቻችን ከautomatic ማተሚያዎች ጋር እንዴት እንደተያሳየፉ እናውቃለን፤ ምትርኮቹ በሙሉ ስርዓት ውስጥ ብዙውን የሚከናወን ሲሆኑ የሰውን ፍርድ ማከማቸት ይችላል፡፡ እነዚህን ስርዓቶች የተደረጉትን የተሳሳቱትን እናስተምር፡፡', 'hy': 'Անգլերեն տեքստ ստեղծելու ներկայիս լավագույն համակարգերի մեծամասնությունը Աբստրակտ նշանակության ներկայացումից (AMR) գնահատվել է միայն օգտագործելով ավտոմատիկ մետրիկներ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ ԲԼԵՎ, որոնք հայտնի են որպես խնդիր բնական լեզվի Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք մարդկային նոր գնահատման արդյունքները, որոնք հավաքում են ճկունության և հարմարավետության գնահատականներ, ինչպես նաև սխալների տեսակների կատեգորիզացիա վերջերս ԱՄՌ սերունդների մի քանի համակարգերի համար: We discuss the relative quality of these systems and how our results compare to those of automatic metrics, finding that while the metrics are mostly successful in ranking systems overall, collecting human judgments allows for more nuanced comparisons.  Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք այս համակարգերի կողմից արված ընդհանուր սխալները:', 'az': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) ilə İngilizə mətnlərini oluşturmaq üçün əsas sistemlərinin çoxunu təbiətli dil nəsillərinə problematik olaraq bilən BLEU kimi automatik metriklərini istifadə edir. Bu işdə, biz yeni insan değerlendirməsinin sonuçlarını göstəririk ki, bir neçə yeni AMR nəticəsi sistemlərinə sıxıntı və uyğunluğu göstərir. Biz bu sistemlərin qohumluq keyfiyyətini və sonuçlarımızın avtomatik metriklərlə necə qarşılaşdığını mübahisə edirik, metriklər çox səviyyətli sistemlərdə başarılı olduğuna görə, insan hökmlərini toplayaraq daha çox nuancaq salınmağa imkan verir. Biz də bu sistemlərdən etdikləri ortaq xətaları analiz edirik.', 'tr': 'Abstrakt Iňlis metini janlaşdyrmak üçin häzirki möhüm sistemalary Abstrakt Iňlis metini (AMR) diňe otomatik metini ullanýar, ýaly BLEU, dogal diller döredilişinde problematik bar. Bu çalışmada, yeni bir insan değerlendirmesinin sonuçlarını gösteriyoruz ki, aklını ve derecede noktalarını toplayan, hata türlerini de, son zamanlarda AMR jenerasyonu sistemleri için topluyor. Biz bu sistemalaryň relative kalitesini we netijelerimiz awtomatik metrikler bilen nähili karşılaştyrylýandygyny gürrüň edýäris. Metikleriň köp bölegi ýokary sistemalarda üstünlik gazanýan bolsa, adamlaryň yargılamlary ýygnamak üçin köpräk karşılaştyrmalara mümkin edýäris. Biz hem bu sistemalar tarapyndan edilen orta hatalary çözürýäris.', 'bs': 'Većina trenutnih umjetničkih sustava za proizvedenje engleskog teksta iz abstrakta značajnog predstavljanja (AMR) procjenjena je samo koristeći automatske metrike, poput BLEU, koje se poznaju da su problematične za generaciju prirodnog jezika. U ovom poslu predstavljamo rezultate novih ljudskih procjena koji skuplja rezultate tekućine i adekvatnosti, kao i kategorizacija vrsta greške, za nekoliko nedavnih sistema generacije AMR-a. Razgovaramo o relativnoj kvaliteti tih sustava i kako se naši rezultati uspoređuju s onima automatske metrike, otkrivajući da, dok su metrike uglavnom uspješne u cijelom redovanju sustava, skupljanje ljudskih osuđenja omogućava više nuanciranih usporedba. Također analiziramo zajedničke greške koje su napravile ovi sistemi.', 'fa': 'بیشتر سیستم\u200cهای هنری فعلی برای تولید متن انگلیسی از نمایش معنی آب\u200cاستراک (AMR) تنها با استفاده از متریک\u200cهای خودکار، مانند BLEU، ارزیابی شده\u200cاند که برای تولید زبان طبیعی مشکلی است. در این کار، نتایج یک ارزیابی جدید انسان را نشان می دهیم که نقطه\u200cهای طبیعت و مناسب را جمع می\u200cکند، همچنین ترکیب نوع خطا، برای سیستم\u200cهای نسل AMR اخیر. ما در مورد کیفیت نسبت به این سیستم و چگونه نتیجه\u200cهایمان با متریک\u200cهای خودکار مقایسه می\u200cکنند، بحث می\u200cکنیم که در حالی که متریک\u200cها بیشتر موفق در سیستم\u200cهای درجه\u200cگیری هستند، جمع کردن قضاوت\u200cهای انسان به مقایسه\u200cهای بیشتری اجازه می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین اشتباه های مشترک را توسط این سیستم تحلیل می کنیم.', 'bn': 'বিলিউ-এর মতো প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রজন্মের জন্য প্রতিনিধিত্বের মানে ইংরেজি টেক্সট তৈরি করার জন্য বর্তমান পরিস্থিতি ব্যবস্থার বেশীরভাগ মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। এই কাজে আমরা নতুন মানুষের মূল্যের ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করি যা সংগ্রহ করে ফ্যাফিসি এবং যথাযথ স্কোর সংগ্রহ করে এবং সাম্প্রতিক এক এমআর প্রজন্ম সিস্টেমের জন্য ভ আমরা এই সিস্টেমের আত্মিক মান নিয়ে আলোচনা করি এবং কিভাবে আমাদের ফলাফল স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেট্রিকের সাথে তুলনা করে তুলে ধরি, তারা খুঁজে পেয়েছে যে যখন মেট্রিক সারা রেঙ্কিং আমরা এই সিস্টেমের দ্বারা সাধারণ ভুল বিশ্লেষণ করি।', 'ca': "Most current state-of-the art systems for generating English text from Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) have been evaluated only using automated metrics, such as BLEU, which are known to be problematic for natural language generation.  En aquesta feina, presentem els resultats d'una nova evaluació human a que recolliu puntuacions de fluïdesa i adequació, així com la categorització de tipus d'error, per a diversos sistemes de generació recents d'AMR. Discutem sobre la qualitat relativa d'aquests sistemes i com els nostres resultats es comparan amb els de les mètriques automàtiques, descobrint que, mentre que les mètriques tenen molt èxit en els sistemes de classificació en general, recollir judicis humans permet comparacions més nuances. També analitzem errors comuns fets per aquests sistemes.", 'cs': 'Většina současných nejmodernějších systémů pro generování anglického textu z Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) byla hodnocena pouze pomocí automatizovaných metrik, jako je BLEU, které jsou známé jako problematické pro generování přirozeného jazyka. V této práci jsou prezentovány výsledky nového lidského hodnocení, které shromažďuje skóre plynulosti a adekvátnosti, stejně jako kategorizace typů chyb pro několik systémů současné generace AMR. Diskutujeme o relativní kvalitě těchto systémů a o tom, jak se naše výsledky srovnávají s výsledky automatických metrik. Zjišťujeme, že i když jsou metriky většinou úspěšné v celkovém hodnocení systémů, shromažďování lidských úsudků umožňuje nuancovanější srovnání. Analyzujeme také běžné chyby těchto systémů.', 'et': 'Enamikku kaasaegseid sﾃｼsteeme ingliskeelse teksti genereerimiseks abstraktsest tﾃ､henduserepresentatsioonist (AMR) on hinnatud ainult automatiseeritud mﾃｵﾃｵdikute abil, nagu nﾃ､iteks BLEU, mis on teadaolevalt looduskeele genereerimisel probleemsed. Kﾃ､esolevas tﾃｶﾃｶs tutvustame uue inimliku hindamise tulemusi, mis kogub mitmete hiljutiste AMR generatsiooni sﾃｼsteemide sujuva ja adekvaatsuse skoorid ning veatﾃｼﾃｼpide kategooriat. Arutleme nende sﾃｼsteemide suhtelist kvaliteeti ja seda, kuidas meie tulemused vﾃｵrreldakse automaatsete mﾃｵﾃｵdikutega, leides, et kuigi mﾃｵﾃｵdikud on enamasti edukad jﾃ､rjestussﾃｼsteemides ﾃｼldiselt, vﾃｵimaldab inimlike hinnangute kogumine vﾃｵrrelda nﾃｼanssidega. Analﾃｼﾃｼsime ka nende sﾃｼsteemide tehtud sagedasi vigu.', 'fi': 'Useimpia nykyaikaisia järjestelmiä englanninkielisen tekstin tuottamiseksi Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) on arvioitu vain automatisoiduilla mittareilla, kuten BLEU, joiden tiedetään olevan ongelmallisia luonnollisen kielen tuottamiselle. Tässä työssä esitellään tulokset uudesta ihmisarvioinnista, joka kerää sujuvuus- ja riittävyyspisteet sekä virhetyyppien luokittelun useista viimeaikaisista AMR-järjestelmistä. Keskustelemme näiden järjestelmien suhteellisesta laadusta ja siitä, miten tuloksia verrataan automaattisten mittausten tuloksiin. Havaitsemme, että vaikka mittarit menestyvät enimmäkseen ranking-järjestelmissä, inhimillisten arviointien kerääminen mahdollistaa monipuolisemman vertailun. Analysoimme myös näiden järjestelmien yleisiä virheitä.', 'jv': 'Tulung sistem sing perusahaan langkung sampeyan kanggo nggéwa teks Inggris nang absolute means representation (AM R) iki dadi nyimpen dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem sing automatik, kaya bleUE, awak dhéwé iso ngejaraké perusahaan bangsa anyar. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita mbukaké sistem sing gawe nggawe sistem sing perbudhakan bakal terus nggawe winih sing bakal terus nggawe gerakan kanggo kowé uga, terus kategorisi sing eror, gawe bakal terus sistem sing uwis nggawe sistem sing perbudhakan mrêr. Awak dhéwé pisan karo kalitas kuwi nggawe sistem iki lan segala punika dipolerané awak dhéwé iki, nik awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe sistem sing perusahaan karo sistem sing gawe nêmêr, winih dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé, perusahaan hukum sistem sing gawe nggawe gerakan unyar nggawe gerakan wih Awak dhéwé ngerasakno nuné akeh barang kanggo sistem iki.', 'ha': "Babu mafi yawan halin da ke yanzu-na'urar da za'a ƙiƙiro matsayin Ingiriya daga Abtract Mai yiwuwa (AMR) ba'a ƙaddara su yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka farat ɗaya, kamar BLEU, wanda aka sani yana da matalauta wa kizalin harshen na asili. Daga wannan aikin, Munã halatar da matsalar rayon mutane na yanzu wanda ke samun abinci da matsayi masu inganci, da kuma category-nau'in ɓata, wa'adin wasu na'urar zauren AMR na farko. Munã jãyayya masu dangantar tsarin wannan na'ura da matsalanmu sami da waɗanda ke kamfatan metric farat ɗaya, kuma tuna cewa, a lokacin da metric masu ci mafiya girma a cikin masu tsari na danganta a jumla, kuma masu haɗi hukuncin mutãne yana yarda da misalin da yawa. Kayya, Munã rarraba misãlai masu jama'a da waɗannan na'ura suka aikata.", 'he': 'רוב המערכות המאומנות הנוכחיות לייצור טקסט אנגלי מייצגת משמעות אבסטרטקטית (AMR) הוערכו רק באמצעות מטריקה אוטומטית, כמו BLEU, הידועה שהיא בעייתית ליצירת שפה טבעית. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציגים את תוצאות הערכה האנושית החדשה אשר אוספת נקודות נוזלים ומתאימות, כמו גם הקטגוריזציה של סוגי טעויות, עבור מספר מערכות דור AMR לאחרונה. אנחנו מדברים על איכות יחסית של המערכות האלה ואיך התוצאות שלנו משוואות לאלה של מטריקה אוטומטית, למצוא שבזמן שהמטריקה בעיקר מצליחה במערכות הדרגה באופן כללי, אוסף שיפוטים אנושיים מאפשר להשוואות נואנציות יותר. אנחנו גם מנתחים טעויות משותפות שעשויות על ידי המערכות הללו.', 'sk': 'Najsodobnejši sistemi za generiranje besedila v angleščini iz Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) so ocenjevali le z avtomatiziranimi metrikami, kot je BLEU, za katere je znano, da so problematične za generiranje naravnega jezika. V tem delu predstavljamo rezultate nove človeške ocene, ki zbira ocene tekočosti in ustreznosti ter kategorizacijo vrst napak za več novih sistemov AMR generacije. Razpravljamo o relativni kakovosti teh sistemov in kako se naši rezultati primerjajo z rezultati avtomatičnih meritev, ugotovimo, da so meritve večinoma uspešne v sistemih razvrščanja na splošno, zbiranje človeških presoj pa omogoča bolj niansirane primerjave. Analiziramo tudi pogoste napake teh sistemov.', 'bo': 'Most current state-of-the art systems for generating English text from Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) have been evaluated only using automated metrics, such as BLEU, which are known to be problematic for natural language generation. In this work, we present the results of a new human evaluation which collects fluency and adequacy scores, as well as categorization of error types, for several recent AMR generation systems. We discuss the relative quality of these systems and how our results compare to those of automatic metrics, finding that while the metrics are mostly successful in ranking systems overall, collecting human judgments allows for more nuanced comparisons. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་འདི་དག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Manual Clustering and Spatial Arrangement of Verbs for Multilingual Evaluation and Typology Analysis', 'ar': 'التجميع اليدوي والترتيب المكاني للأفعال لتقييم متعدد اللغات وتحليل التصنيف', 'es': 'Agrupación manual y disposición espacial de verbos para la evaluación multilingüe y el análisis de tipología', 'fr': "Regroupement manuel et disposition spatiale des verbes pour l'évaluation multilingue et l'analyse typologique", 'pt': 'Agrupamento manual e arranjo espacial de verbos para avaliação multilíngue e análise de tipologia', 'ja': '多言語評価とタイプ分析のための動詞の手動クラスタリングと空間配置', 'zh': '动词之手动聚类与空列,以多言质类型学', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी मूल्यांकन और टाइपोलॉजी विश्लेषण के लिए क्रियाओं की मैनुअल क्लस्टरिंग और स्थानिक व्यवस्था', 'ru': 'Ручная кластеризация и пространственное расположение глаголов для многоязычной оценки и типологического анализа', 'ga': 'Cnuasú Lámhleabhar agus Socrú Spásúlachta Briathra le haghaidh Meastóireacht Ilteangach agus Anailís Tíopeolaíochta', 'hu': 'Kézi klaszterezés és igék térbeli elrendezése többnyelvű értékeléshez és típuselemzéshez', 'el': 'Χειροκίνητη ομαδοποίηση και χωρική διάταξη ρήμων για πολυγλωσσική αξιολόγηση και τυπολογική ανάλυση', 'ka': 'მრავალენგიური განსაზღვრება და ტიპოლოგიური ანალიზაციისთვის ხელსახური კლასტერირება და სივრცელი განსაზღვრება', 'it': "Clustering manuale e disposizione spaziale dei verbi per la valutazione multilingue e l'analisi della tipologia", 'kk': 'Көптілік оқу және типологиялық анализ үшін зерттеулердің қолмен кластерингі және бос орын түрлендіру', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbio vertinimo ir tipologijos analizės žodžių klasifikavimas ir erdvės nustatymas rankiniu būdu', 'mk': 'Рачно распоредување и просторно организирање на реченици за повеќејазична евалуација и анализа на типологија', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni Manwali u Arranġament Spazjali tal-Verbi għall-Evalwazzjoni Multilingwi u l-Analiżi tat-Tipoloġija', 'ms': 'Pemkumpulan Manual dan Peraturan Ruang bagi Verb untuk Pemindahan Berbahasa dan Analisi Tipologi', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിനും ടൈപ്പോളോഗിയുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч Клустеринг, Хэрэглэгч хэлний оюун үнэлгээ болон Хэрэглэгч Шалгаан', 'no': 'Manuell klastering og mellomromsett av verb for fleirspråk evaluering og typologianalyse', 'ro': 'Gruparea manuală și aranjarea spațială a verbelor pentru evaluarea multilingvă și analiza tipologiei', 'pl': 'Ręczne klastrowanie i układ przestrzenny czasowników do oceny wielojęzycznej i analizy typologicznej', 'sr': 'Ruèno okupljanje i svemirska rasprava verba za multijezičku evaluaciju i analizu tipologije', 'si': 'විශාල විශේෂණය සහ විශේෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ විශේෂණය සඳහා ලැබුණු ක්\u200dලාස්ටරින් සහ ස්පේසියල් සැ', 'so': 'Kalkaalisada sawirada luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo baaritaanka qoraalka shaqaalaha iyo iskuulka', 'sv': 'Manuell klustring och rumslig utformning av verb för flerspråkig utvärdering och typologisk analys', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகள் பரிசோதனைக்கான கைமுறை மூடுதல் மற்றும் தடுப்பு ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'Multilingual Evaluation and Typology Analysis for Verbs Manual Clustering and Spatial Arrangement of Verbs', 'uz': 'Bir necha tillar tasdiqlash va Typologi Analysi uchun qoʻlbola boshqaruv va Ispaniya Arrangement', 'vi': 'Tóm tắt bằng thủ công và dàn dựng văn bản các thành đơn cho phân tích đa ngôn ngữ và quy mô học', 'bg': 'Ръчно клъстериране и пространствено подреждане на глаголите за многоезична оценка и типологичен анализ', 'da': 'Manual Clustering and Spatial Arrangement of Verbs for Flersproget Evaluering and Typology Analyse', 'hr': 'Ručna skupljanja i prostorna rasprava verba za multijezičku ocjenu i analizu tipologije', 'nl': 'Handmatige clustering en ruimtelijke ordening van werkwoorden voor meertalige evaluatie en typologische analyse', 'de': 'Manuelle Clusterierung und räumliche Anordnung von Verben für mehrsprachige Evaluation und Typologieanalyse', 'ko': '다중 언어 평가와 유형 분석에 사용되는 동사 수동 집합과 공간 배열', 'id': 'Pengkumpulan Manual dan Peraturan Ruang Verb untuk Evaluasi Berbahasa dan Analisi Tipologi', 'fa': 'کلاستر دستی و ترکیب فضایی ورب برای ارزیابی و تحلیل گونه\u200cشناسی چندین زبان', 'sw': 'Maandamano ya Manual na Maandamano ya Hispania kwa ajili ya Uchunguzi wa lugha nyingi na Uchambuzi wa Utoaji', 'af': 'Hand Klastering en Spasiele Arrangement van Verbe vir Veelvuldige Evaluering en Tikolologie Analisie', 'tr': 'Çoklu diller Taýýarlama we Tikology Taýýarlama üçin süýtgeşmeler we ýerleşdirim', 'sq': 'Rregullimi manual i fjalëve për vlerësimin shumëgjuhës dhe analizën e tipologjisë', 'am': 'የፊደል ቋንቋዎች እና የቲፖሎጂ Analysis', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil değerlendirməsi və Tikoloji Analizi üçün əlli Clustering və Spatial Arrangement of Verbs', 'bn': 'বহুভাষাভাষী মূল্যায়ন এবং টাইপলোজি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য ভার্বের মাধ্যমে ক্লাস্টিং এবং স্পেয়াল অ্যাঙ্গেমেন্ট', 'bs': 'Ručna skupljanja i prostorna organizacija verba za multijezičku evaluaciju i analizu tipologije', 'cs': 'Manuální klastrování a prostorové uspořádání sloves pro vícejazyčné hodnocení a typologickou analýzu', 'et': 'Verbide käsitsi klastrite ja ruumiline paigutus mitmekeelseks hindamiseks ja tüpoloogiaanalüüsiks', 'ca': 'Manual Clustering and Spatial Arrangement of Verbs for Multilingual Evaluation and Typology Analysis', 'fi': 'Verbien manuaalinen klusterointi ja paikkakunnallinen järjestely monikielistä arviointia ja typologian analysointia varten', 'hy': 'Բազլեզվի գնահատման և տիպոլոգիայի վերլուծության բառերի ձեռական խմբավորումն ու տարածական դասավորումը', 'jv': 'Manual clustering lan Sparial arrowangement of Verb for Multilanguage invaluation and Typogram Test', 'sk': 'Ročno grozdje in prostorska ureditev glagolov za večjezično evalvacijo in tipološko analizo', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Manual Clustering and Spatial Arrangement of Verbs for Multilingual Evaluation and Typology Analysis', 'he': 'הרכיבה ידנית והסדר מקומי של מילים לבדיקה רבת-שפתית וניתוח טיפולוגיה'}
{'en': 'We present the first evaluation of the applicability of a spatial arrangement method (SpAM) to a typologically diverse language sample, and its potential to produce semantic evaluation resources to support multilingual NLP, with a focus on verb semantics. We demonstrate SpAM’s utility in allowing for quick bottom-up creation of large-scale evaluation datasets that balance cross-lingual alignment with language specificity. Starting from a shared sample of 825 English verbs, translated into Chinese, Japanese, Finnish, Polish, and Italian, we apply a two-phase annotation process which produces (i) semantic verb classes and (ii) fine-grained similarity scores for nearly 130 thousand verb pairs. We use the two types of verb data to (a) examine cross-lingual similarities and variation, and (b) evaluate the capacity of static and contextualised representation models to accurately reflect verb semantics, contrasting the performance of large language specific pretraining models with their multilingual equivalent on semantic clustering and lexical similarity, across different domains of verb meaning. We release the data from both phases as a large-scale multilingual resource, comprising 85 verb classes and nearly 130k pairwise similarity scores, offering a wealth of possibilities for further evaluation and research on multilingual verb semantics.', 'ar': 'نقدم أول تقييم لإمكانية تطبيق طريقة الترتيب المكاني (SpAM) على عينة لغة متنوعة نسبيًا ، وإمكانية إنتاج موارد التقييم الدلالية لدعم البرمجة اللغوية العصبية متعددة اللغات ، مع التركيز على دلالات الفعل. نبرهن على فائدة الرسائل الاقتحامية (SPAM) في السماح بإنشاء مجموعات بيانات تقييم واسعة النطاق بشكل سريع من الأسفل إلى الأعلى والتي توازن بين المحاذاة بين اللغات وخصوصية اللغة. بدءًا من عينة مشتركة مكونة من 825 فعلًا باللغة الإنجليزية ، مترجمة إلى الصينية واليابانية والفنلندية والبولندية والإيطالية ، نطبق عملية شرح من مرحلتين تنتج (1) فئات فعل دلالية و (2) درجات تشابه دقيقة لما يقرب من 130 ألف زوج من الأفعال. نحن نستخدم نوعين من بيانات الفعل من أجل (أ) فحص أوجه التشابه والتباين عبر اللغات ، و (ب) تقييم قدرة نماذج التمثيل الثابت والسياق لتعكس دلالات الأفعال بدقة ، مع مقارنة أداء نماذج ما قبل التدريب الخاصة بلغة كبيرة مع هذه النماذج. مكافئ متعدد اللغات في التجميع الدلالي والتشابه المعجمي ، عبر مجالات مختلفة لمعنى الفعل. نصدر البيانات من كلتا المرحلتين كمورد متعدد اللغات واسع النطاق ، يتألف من 85 فئة فعل وما يقرب من 130 ألف نقاط تشابه زوجي ، مما يوفر ثروة من الاحتمالات لمزيد من التقييم والبحث حول دلالات الأفعال متعددة اللغات.', 'es': 'Presentamos la primera evaluación de la aplicabilidad de un método de disposición espacial (SpAM) a una muestra de lenguaje tipológicamente diversa, y su potencial para producir recursos de evaluación semántica para apoyar la PNL multilingüe, con un enfoque en la semántica de los verbos. Demostramos la utilidad de SpAMs al permitir la creación rápida ascendente de conjuntos de datos de evaluación a gran escala que equilibran la alineación multilingüe con la especificidad del idioma. Partiendo de una muestra compartida de 825 verbos en inglés, traducidos al chino, japonés, finlandés, polaco e italiano, aplicamos un proceso de anotación de dos fases que produce (i) clases de verbos semánticos y (ii) puntuaciones de similitud detalladas para casi 130 mil pares de verbos. Utilizamos los dos tipos de datos verbales para (a) examinar las similitudes y variaciones multilingües, y (b) evaluar la capacidad de los modelos de representación estáticos y contextualizados para reflejar con precisión la semántica de los verbos, contrastando el rendimiento de los modelos de preentrenamiento específicos del lenguaje grande con su multilingüe equivalente en agrupamiento semántico y similitud léxica, en diferentes dominios del significado de los verbos. Publicamos los datos de ambas fases como un recurso multilingüe a gran escala, que comprende 85 clases de verbos y casi 130 000 puntuaciones de similitud por pares, lo que ofrece una gran cantidad de posibilidades para una mayor evaluación e investigación sobre la semántica de los verbos multilingües.', 'fr': "Nous présentons la première évaluation de l'applicabilité d'une méthode d'arrangement spatial (SpAM) à un échantillon de langue typologiquement diversifié, et de son potentiel à produire des ressources d'évaluation sémantique pour prendre en charge la PNL multilingue, en mettant l'accent sur la sémantique des verbes. Nous démontrons l'utilité de SpAM en permettant la création ascendante rapide d'ensembles de données d'évaluation à grande échelle qui équilibrent l'alignement interlinguistique avec la spécificité linguistique. À partir d'un échantillon partagé de 825 verbes anglais, traduits en chinois, japonais, finnois, polonais et italien, nous appliquons un processus d'annotation en deux phases qui produit (i) des classes de verbes sémantiques et (ii) des scores de similarité précis pour près de 130 000 paires de verbes. Nous utilisons les deux types de données verbales pour (a) examiner les similitudes et les variations interlinguistiques, et (b) évaluer la capacité des modèles de représentation statiques et contextualisés à refléter avec précision la sémantique des verbes, en opposant les performances des modèles de pré-apprentissage spécifiques à une langue étendue avec leur multilingue équivalent sur le regroupement sémantique et la similitude lexicale, dans différents domaines de la signification des verbes. Nous publions les données des deux phases sous la forme d'une ressource multilingue à grande échelle, comprenant 85 classes de verbes et près de 130 000 scores de similarité deux à deux, offrant une multitude de possibilités d'évaluation et de recherche supplémentaires sur la sémantique des verbes multilingues.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos a primeira avaliação da aplicabilidade de um método de arranjo espacial (SpAM) para uma amostra linguística tipologicamente diversa, e seu potencial para produzir recursos de avaliação semântica para apoiar a PNL multilíngue, com foco na semântica verbal. Demonstramos a utilidade do SpAM em permitir a criação rápida de baixo para cima de conjuntos de dados de avaliação em grande escala que equilibram o alinhamento entre idiomas com a especificidade do idioma. A partir de uma amostra compartilhada de 825 verbos em inglês, traduzidos para chinês, japonês, finlandês, polonês e italiano, aplicamos um processo de anotação de duas fases que produz (i) classes de verbos semânticos e (ii) pontuações de similaridade refinadas para quase 130 mil pares de verbos. Usamos os dois tipos de dados verbais para (a) examinar semelhanças e variações entre línguas e (b) avaliar a capacidade de modelos de representação estáticos e contextualizados para refletir com precisão a semântica verbal, contrastando o desempenho de modelos de pré-treinamento específicos de grandes idiomas com seus equivalente multilíngue em agrupamento semântico e similaridade lexical, em diferentes domínios de significado verbal. Nós liberamos os dados de ambas as fases como um recurso multilíngue em grande escala, compreendendo 85 classes de verbos e quase 130k pontuações de similaridade em pares, oferecendo uma variedade de possibilidades para avaliação e pesquisa adicionais sobre semântica verbal multilíngue.', 'ja': '我々は、空間配置法（ ＳＰＡＭ ）の類型的に多様な言語サンプルへの適用性の最初の評価と、動詞意味論に焦点を当てて、多言語ＮＬＰをサポートするための意味論的評価リソースを生成する可能性を提示する。 私たちは、言語特異性とクロスリンガルアライメントのバランスをとる大規模な評価データセットの素早いボトムアップ作成を可能にするSpAMの有用性を実証します。 中国語、日本語、フィンランド語、ポーランド語、イタリア語に翻訳された825の英語動詞の共有サンプルから始まり、(i)セマンティック動詞クラスと(ii) 13万近くの動詞ペアの細かい類似性スコアを生成する2段階の注釈プロセスを適用します。 私たちは、2種類の動詞データを使用して、(a)クロスリンガルの類似性とバリエーションを調べ、(b)静的および文脈化された表現モデルの能力を評価して、動詞の意味を正確に反映し、大規模な言語固有の事前訓練モデルのパフォーマンスを、動詞の意味の異なるドメイン間で、意味的クラスタリングと語彙的類似性に関する多言語同等のものと対比します。 85の動詞クラスと13万近くのペアでの類似性スコアからなる大規模な多言語リソースとして、両方のフェーズのデータをリリースし、多言語動詞意味論のさらなる評価と研究のための豊富な可能性を提供します。', 'zh': '首估空间排列之法(SpAM)多样化言样本之适用性,及其生语义估资源以支多言之NLP,重者动词语义也。 余证之SpAM许自下而上速创大评数集之实用性,此数集可以平跨言语对齐语特异性。 自825英语动词之共样本,翻译成中文,日语芬兰语,波兰语与意大利语,宜用两段注事,其事(i)语义动词类(ii)近13万个动词细粒度相似性分数。 用此二者动词数以(a)省言语之相似性变异性,与(b)评静上下之文,以正动词语义之能,以特定言与语义聚类词汇相似性多言等效物,越动词义域。 以两段之数为大言资发,85动词类近13万对相似性分数,更加评究多言动词语义供其丰赡。', 'hi': 'हम एक स्थानिक व्यवस्था विधि (SpAM) की प्रयोज्यता का पहला मूल्यांकन एक टाइपोलॉजिकल रूप से विविध भाषा के नमूने के लिए प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और क्रिया शब्दार्थ पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के साथ बहुभाषी एनएलपी का समर्थन करने के लिए शब्दार्थ मूल्यांकन संसाधनों का उत्पादन करने की इसकी क्षमता। हम बड़े पैमाने पर मूल्यांकन डेटासेट के त्वरित बॉटम-अप निर्माण की अनुमति देने में एसपीएएम की उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं जो भाषा विशिष्टता के साथ क्रॉस-लिंगुअल संरेखण को संतुलित करते हैं। चीनी, जापानी, फिनिश, पोलिश और इतालवी में अनुवादित 825 अंग्रेजी क्रियाओं के एक साझा नमूने से शुरू करते हुए, हम एक दो-चरण एनोटेशन प्रक्रिया लागू करते हैं जो (i) शब्दार्थ क्रिया वर्गों और (ii) लगभग 130 हजार क्रिया जोड़े के लिए ठीक-ठीक समानता स्कोर का उत्पादन करता है। हम दो प्रकार के क्रिया डेटा का उपयोग (ए) क्रॉस-लिंगुअल समानताओं और भिन्नता की जांच करने के लिए करते हैं, और (बी) क्रिया शब्दार्थ को सटीक रूप से प्रतिबिंबित करने के लिए स्थिर और प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल की क्षमता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, जो बड़ी भाषा विशिष्ट प्रीट्रेनिंग मॉडल के प्रदर्शन के विपरीत है, जो कि सिमेंटिक क्लस्टरिंग और लेक्सिकल समानता पर उनके बहुभाषी समकक्ष के साथ, क्रिया अर्थ के विभिन्न डोमेन में है। हम दोनों चरणों से डेटा को बड़े पैमाने पर बहुभाषी संसाधन के रूप में जारी करते हैं, जिसमें 85 क्रिया वर्ग और लगभग 130k युग्मवार समानता स्कोर शामिल हैं, जो बहुभाषी क्रिया शब्दार्थ पर आगे के मूल्यांकन और अनुसंधान के लिए संभावनाओं का खजाना प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем первую оценку применимости метода пространственного расположения (SpAM) к типологически разнообразной языковой выборке, и его потенциал для получения семантических ресурсов оценки для поддержки многоязычной NLP, с акцентом на семантику глагола. Мы демонстрируем полезность SpAM, позволяющую быстро создавать крупномасштабные оценочные наборы данных снизу вверх, которые уравновешивают межъязыковое согласование с языковой спецификой. Начиная с общей выборки из 825 английских глаголов, переведенных на китайский, японский, финский, польский и итальянский языки, мы применяем двухфазный процесс аннотации, который производит (i) классы семантических глаголов и (ii) мелкозернистые оценки сходства для почти 130 тысяч пар глаголов. Мы используем два типа данных глагола для (а) изучения кросс-лингвистического сходства и вариации и (б) оценки способности статических и контекстуализированных моделей представления точно отражать семантику глагола, сравнивая производительность моделей предобучения, специфичных для большого языка, с их многоязычным эквивалентом по семантической кластеризации и лексическому сходству в различных областях значения глагола. Мы выпускаем данные обеих фаз в виде крупномасштабного многоязычного ресурса, состоящего из 85 классов глаголов и почти 130 тысяч парных оценок сходства, предлагая множество возможностей для дальнейшей оценки и исследования многоязычной семантики глаголов.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid an chéad mheastóireacht ar infheidhmeacht modh socraithe spásúlachta (SpAM) i láthair do shampla teanga atá éagsúil ó thaobh na clódóireachta de, agus a chumas acmhainní meastóireachta séimeantaigh a tháirgeadh chun tacú le NLP ilteangach, le fócas ar shéimeantaic na mbriathra. Léirímid áisiúlacht SpAM maidir le cruthú tapa ó bhun aníos ar thacair sonraí meastóireachta ar mhórscála a chothromaíonn ailíniú tras-teangach le sainiúlacht teanga. Ag tosú le sampla comhroinnte de 825 briathar Béarla, aistrithe go Sínis, Seapáinis, Fionlainnis, Polainnis, agus Iodáilis, cuirimid i bhfeidhm próiseas anótála dhá chéim a tháirgeann (i) aicmí briathra shéimeantacha agus (ii) scóir chosúlachta míne le haghaidh beagnach. 130 míle péirí briathar. Bainimid úsáid as an dá chineál sonraí briathar chun (a) cosúlachtaí agus éagsúlachtaí tras-teangacha a scrúdú, agus (b) meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar chumas samhlacha ionadaíochta statach agus comhthéacsaithe chun séimeantaic briathar a léiriú go beacht, ag codarsnacht idir feidhmíocht na múnlaí móra réamhoiliúint a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga lena gcuid. coibhéis ilteangach ar bhraisliú shéimeantach agus cosúlacht léacsach, thar réimsí éagsúla de bhrí briathar. Eisímid na sonraí ón dá chéim mar acmhainn mhórscála ilteangach, comhdhéanta de 85 rang briathar agus beagnach 130k scór cosúlachta péireáilte, ag tairiscint neart féidearthachtaí le haghaidh tuilleadh measúnaithe agus taighde ar shéimeantaic briathar ilteangach.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη αξιολόγηση της εφαρμογής μιας μεθόδου χωρικής διευθέτησης σε ένα τυπολογικά ποικίλο γλωσσικό δείγμα, καθώς και τη δυνατότητά της να παράγει σημασιολογικούς πόρους αξιολόγησης για την υποστήριξη πολυγλωσσικών με έμφαση στη σημασιολογία των ρήμων. Επιδεικνύουμε τη χρησιμότητα του στο να επιτρέπει τη γρήγορη από κάτω προς τα πάνω δημιουργία συνόλων δεδομένων αξιολόγησης μεγάλης κλίμακας που εξισορροπούν τη διαγώνια ευθυγράμμιση με τη γλωσσική ιδιαιτερότητα. Ξεκινώντας από ένα κοινό δείγμα 825 αγγλικών ρήμων, μεταφρασμένα στα κινέζικα, ιαπωνικά, φινλανδικά, πολωνικά και ιταλικά, εφαρμόζουμε μια διαδικασία σχολιασμού δύο φάσεων που παράγει (i) σημασιολογικές τάξεις ρήματος και (ii) λεπτόκοκκες βαθμολογίες ομοιότητας για σχεδόν 130 χιλιάδες ζεύγη ρήμων. Χρησιμοποιούμε τους δύο τύπους δεδομένων ρήματος για (α) να εξετάσουμε τις γλωσσικές ομοιότητες και τις παραλλαγές, και (β) να αξιολογήσουμε την ικανότητα των στατικών και πλαισιωμένων μοντέλων αναπαράστασης να αντικατοπτρίζουν με ακρίβεια τη σημασιολογία των ρήμων, σε αντίθεση με την απόδοση των μεγάλων γλωσσικών προτύπων προεπιλογής με το πολύγλωσσο ισοδύναμό τους για τη σημασιολογική ομαδοποίηση και τη λεξική ομοιότητα, σε διαφορετικούς τομείς της έννοιας των ρήμων. Απελευθερώνουμε τα δεδομένα και από τις δύο φάσεις ως πολύγλωσσος πόρος μεγάλης κλίμακας, που περιλαμβάνει 85 κλάσεις ρήματος και σχεδόν 130βαθμολογίες ομοιότητας ζεύγους, προσφέροντας πληθώρα δυνατοτήτων για περαιτέρω αξιολόγηση και έρευνα σχετικά με την πολυγλωσσική σημασιολογία ρήματος.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk egy térbeli elrendezési módszer (SpAM) tipológiailag változatos nyelvmintára való alkalmazhatóságának első értékelését, valamint annak lehetőségét, hogy szemantikai értékelési erőforrásokat hozzon létre a többnyelvű NLP támogatására, különös tekintettel az igék szemantikára. Bemutatjuk a SpAM hasznosságát abban, hogy lehetővé tegye a gyors alulról építkező nagyszabású értékelési adatkészletek létrehozását, amelyek egyensúlyozzák a nyelvek közötti összehangolást a nyelvi specifikussággal. A 825 angol igéből álló, kínai, japán, finn, lengyel és olasz nyelvre fordított közös mintából kiindulva kétfázisú jegyzetelési folyamatot alkalmazunk, amely (i) szemantikai igék osztályokat és (ii) finomszemű hasonlósági pontszámokat eredményez közel 130 ezer igépárra. A két igét használjuk arra, hogy (a) vizsgáljuk a nyelvek közötti hasonlóságokat és variációkat, és (b) értékeljük a statikus és kontextuális reprezentációs modellek kapacitását, hogy pontosan tükrözzék az igék szemantikáját, ellentétben a nagy nyelvspecifikus előkészítési modellek teljesítményét a szemantikai klaszterezés és lexikai hasonlóság többnyelvű megfelelőjével, az ige jelentésének különböző területein. Mindkét fázisból származó adatokat nagyszabású, többnyelvű erőforrásként bocsátjuk ki, amely 85 igeosztályból és közel 130 ezer páros hasonlósági pontszámból áll, és számos lehetőséget kínál a többnyelvű igeszemantikával kapcsolatos további értékelésre és kutatásra.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებული ტიპოლოგიურად განსხვავებული ენების მონაცემების პირველი გავამუშავებთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებულობის პროგრამის პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა სმენტიკური გავამუშავ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ SpAM-ის სუტილიტება, რომლის შესაძლებლობად ძალიან მარტივი განსაზღვრება დიდი განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების შექმნა, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან სიტყვების 825 ინგლისური გერბების ნაწილიდან დავიწყებული, ჩინეთი, წონეთი, ფინური, პოლიქური და იტალიური წილიდან, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ორ ფეზის ანტორაციის პროცესი, რომელიც გამოვიყენება (i) სმენტიკური გერბის კლასები და (ii) ძალიან სწ ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ ორი ტიპის გერბის მონაცემების a) კრისი ენგური სხვადასხვების და განცემებების შესახებ, და b) სტატიკური და კონტექსტუალური განცემების მოდელების შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც წარმოიდგინოთ გერბის სმენტიკის შესახებ, რომლებიც დიდი ენგური სპექტი განსხვავებული კომენტების გერბის ნიშნავს. ჩვენ ორივე ფაზიდან მონაცემები გახსნა, როგორც დიდი მულტილური რესურსი, როგორც 85 გერბური კლასები და დამატებით 130k მსგავსი მსგავსი მსგავსი სიმანტიკის მონაცემების შესაძლებლობების ბედნიერება', 'it': "Presentiamo la prima valutazione dell'applicabilità di un metodo di disposizione spaziale (SpAM) a un campione di lingue tipologicamente diversificato, e del suo potenziale per produrre risorse di valutazione semantica a supporto della PNL multilingue, con particolare attenzione alla semantica verbale. Dimostriamo l'utilità di SpA nel consentire una rapida creazione bottom-up di set di dati di valutazione su larga scala che bilanciano l'allineamento multilingue con la specificità linguistica. Partendo da un campione condiviso di 825 verbi inglesi, tradotti in cinese, giapponese, finlandese, polacco e italiano, applichiamo un processo di annotazione in due fasi che produce (i) classi di verbi semantici e (ii) punteggi di somiglianza a grana fine per quasi 130mila coppie di verbi. Usiamo i due tipi di dati verbali per (a) esaminare somiglianze e variazioni cross-lingual, e (b) valutare la capacità dei modelli di rappresentazione statici e contestualizzati di riflettere accuratamente la semantica verbale, contrapponendo le prestazioni dei modelli di pretraining specifici di grandi lingue con il loro equivalente multilingue sul clustering semantico e sulla somiglianza lessicale, attraverso diversi domini di significato dei verbi. Rilasciamo i dati da entrambe le fasi come una risorsa multilingue su larga scala, comprendente 85 classi di verbi e quasi 130k punteggi di somiglianza coppia, offrendo una vasta gamma di possibilità per ulteriori valutazioni e ricerche sulla semantica dei verbi multilingue.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame pirmąjį erdvinio susitarimo metodo (SPAM) taikymo tipologiškai įvairaus kalbų mėginio vertinimą ir jo potencialą sukurti semantinius vertinimo išteklius daugiakalbei NLP remti, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant žodžių semantikai. Mes parodome, kad SPAM yra naudinga, leidžiant greitai iš apačios į viršų kurti didelio masto vertinimo duomenų rinkinius, kurie suderintų tarpkalbinį suderinimą su kalbos specifiškumu. Pradedant i š bendro 825 anglų žodžių mėginio, išversto į kinų, japonų, suomių, lenkų ir italų kalbas, mes taikome dviejų etapų anotacijos procesą, kuris gamina i) semantinių žodžių klases ir ii) smulkiai grūdintus panašumo taškus beveik 130 tūkstančių žodžių poroms. Naudojame dviejų rūšių žodžių duomenis: a) išnagrinėdami tarpkalbinius panašumus ir variantus, ir b) įvertindami statinių ir kontekstinių atstovavimo modelių gebėjimus tiksliai atspindėti žodžių semantiką, kontrastuojant didelės kalbos specifinių išankstinio mokymo modelių veiksmingumą su jų daugiakalbiniu lygiaverčiu semantiniam klasterizavimui ir leksiniam panašumui, - įvairiose žodžio reikšmės srityse. We release the data from both phases as a large-scale multilingual resource, comprising 85 verb classes and nearly 130k pairwise similarity scores, offering a wealth of possibilities for further evaluation and research on multilingual verb semantics.', 'kk': 'Біз бірінші жергілікті түрлі тіл үлгісіне (СПМ) жергілікті түрлі баптау әдісінің бірінші баптауын таңдаймыз және оның көптілікті NLP қолдау үшін semantic баптау ресурстарын жасау мүмкіндігін, верба Біз SpAM- тың утилитасын тіл келтірімдерімен біріктіретін үлкен масштабтау деректер қорларын жасауға мүмкіндік береді. 825 ағылшын вербаларының ортақ үлгісінен бастап, қытайша, япониялық, финск, польша және итальянық тілдеріне аударылған, біз жұмыс ішінде (i) семантикалық вербалар классын жасайтын екі этап белгілеу процесін қолданамыз және (ii) жұмыс ішінд Біз екі түрлі верб деректерін (а) көптілікті ұқсас тілдер мен айырмашылықтарын тексеру үшін қолданамыз. b) статикалық және контекстуалды түрлендіру моделдерінің көпшілігін тексеру үшін верб семантикасын дұрыс түрлендіру үшін, көптілік кластер мен лексикалық ұқсас үшін көптіл Верб мағынасының түрлі домендерінде. Біз деректерді екі этапдан үлкен көптілік ресурс ретінде шығарып, 85 верб классы және жақын 130k көпшілік ұқсас нәтижелері болып, көптілік верб семантикалық зерттеу және зерттеу мүмкіндіктерін қолданып берем', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan penilaian pertama mengenai kemudahan kaedah pengaturan ruang (SpAM) kepada sampel bahasa yang berbeza secara tipologi, dan potensi untuk menghasilkan sumber penilaian semantik untuk menyokong NLP berbilang bahasa, dengan fokus pada semantik verb. Kami menunjukkan utiliti SpAM dalam membenarkan penciptaan cepat dari bawah ke atas set data penilaian skala besar yang seimbang penyesuaian saling bahasa dengan spesifik bahasa. Mulai dari sampel berkongsi 825 verb Inggeris, diterjemahkan ke bahasa Cina, Jepun, Finlandia, Polandia, dan Itali, kami melaksanakan proses anotasi dua-fasa yang menghasilkan (i) kelas verb semantik dan (ii) skor kesamaan dengan gandum untuk hampir 130 ribu pasangan verb. Kami menggunakan dua jenis data verb untuk (a) memeriksa persamaan dan variasi saling bahasa, dan (b) menilai kapasitas model perwakilan statik dan kontekstualisasi untuk mencerminkan secara tepat semantik verb, mengembangkan prestasi model pretraining khusus bahasa besar dengan persamaan berbilang bahasa mereka pada clustering semantik dan persamaan leksikal, - melalui domain yang berbeza maknanya verb. Kami melepaskan data dari kedua-dua fasa sebagai sumber berbilang bahasa skala besar, yang mengandungi 85 kelas verb dan skor persamaan hampir 130k pasangan, menawarkan banyak kemungkinan untuk penilaian dan kajian lanjut tentang semantik verb berbilang bahasa.', 'mk': 'Ние ја претставуваме првата евалуација на апликабилноста на методот на просторски аранжман (СПАМ) на типологички различни јазички примероци, и нејзиниот потенцијал за производство семантични ресурси за евалуација за поддршка на мултијазичниот НЛП, со фокус Ние ја демонстрираме корисноста на СПАМ во овозможувањето брзо создавање од долу нагоре на големи податоци за проценка кои го балансираат прекујазичното пристапување со јазичното специфичност. Почнувајќи од заеднички примерок од 825 англиски резултати, преведени на кинески, јапонски, фински, полски и италијански резултати, применуваме двофазивен процес на анотација кој произведува (i) семантички класи на резултати на резултати на сличност за скоро 130 000 резултати. Ние ги користиме двата вида податоци за (a) да ги испитаме прекујазичните сличности и варијации, и (b) да го процениме капацитетот на статичките и контекстуалните модели на претставување за точно да ја одразат семантиката на јазиците, контрастирајќи ја изведувањето на големите модели за претренирање специфични јазици со нивниот мултијазичен еквивалент на семан Преку различни домени со значење на глаголот. Ги објавуваме податоците од двете фази како голем мултијазичен ресурс, кој вклучува 85 класи на јазици и скоро 130 килограми поени на парови сличност, нудејќи многу можности за понатамошна проценка и истражување на мултијазичката семантика на јазици.', 'ml': 'We present the first evaluation of the applicability of a spatial arrangement method (SpAM) to a typologically diverse language sample, and its potential to produce semantic evaluation resources to support multilingual NLP, with a focus on verb semantics.  നമ്മള്\u200d സ്പാഎമിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രത്യേക വേഗത്തിലുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിന് വേഗം വ ചൈനീസ്, ജപ്പാനീസ്, ഫിനിഷ്, പോളിഷ്, ഇറ്റാലിയനിലേക്ക് പരിഭാഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട 825 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാര്\u200dപ്പങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ഒരു ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും തുടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന് നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു തരം വേര്\u200dബ് ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (a) ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷയുടെ സമമാക്രമങ്ങളെയും വേരിയണങ്ങളെയും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു (b) സ്റ്റേറ്റിക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് മോഡലുകളുടെ കഴിവിനെയും വ വ്യത്യസ്ത അർത്ഥത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെനുകളിൽ. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു ക്രമത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങളായി വിടുന്നു. 85 വെര്\u200dവ് ക്ലാസുകളും ഏകദേശം 130ക്ക് ജോടി പോലെയുള്ള സ്കോര്\u200dസുകളും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw l-ewwel evalwazzjoni tal-applikabbiltà ta’ metodu ta’ arranġament ġeografiku (SpAM) għal kampjun tal-lingwi tipoloġikament diversifikat, u l-potenzjal tiegħu li jipproduċi riżorsi ta’ evalwazzjoni semantika biex jappoġġja NLP multilingwi, b’enfasi fuq semantika tal-verbs. Aħna nuru l-utilità tal-SpAM biex tippermetti l-ħolqien rapidu minn isfel għal fuq ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni fuq skala kbira li jibbilanċjaw l-allinjament translingwistiku mal-ispeċifiċità tal-lingwa. Mill-kampjun kondiviż ta’ 825 verb Ingliż, tradott fiċ-Ċiniż, il-Ġappuniż, il-Finlandiż, il-Pollakk u t-Taljan, a ħna napplikaw proċess ta’ annotazzjoni f’żewġ fażijiet li jipproduċi (i) klassijiet semantiċi ta’ verbs u (ii) punteġġi ta’ similarità ta’ ħbub fin għal kważi 130,000 par ta’ verbs. Aħna nużaw iż-żewġ tipi ta’ dejta tal-verbs biex (a) jeżaminaw similaritajiet u varjazzjoni translingwi, u (b) jevalwaw il-kapaċità ta’ mudelli ta’ rappreżentazzjoni statiċi u kuntestwalizzati biex jirriflettu b’mod preċiż is-semantika tal-verbs, li jikkontrastu l-prestazzjoni ta’ mudelli ta’ taħriġ minn qabel speċifiċi għal lingwi kbar mal-ekwivalenti multilingwi tagħhom dwar raggruppament semantiku u similarità lexika,  across different domains of verb meaning.  Aħna nirrilaxxaw id-dejta miż-żewġ fażijiet bħala riżorsa multilingwi fuq skala kbira, li tinkludi 85 klassi ta’ verbs u kważi 130k punteġġ ta’ similarità bejn il-pari, li joffru ħafna possibbiltajiet għal aktar evalwazzjoni u riċerka dwar semantika multilingwi ta’ verbs.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer den første evalueringa av tilgjengeligheten av eit mellomromsetjingsmetode (SpAM) til eit typologisk forskjellig språksprøver, og den potensialen til å produsere semantiske evalueringsressursar for å støtte fleirspråk NLP, med fokus på verbsemantikk. Vi demonstrerer SpAM- verktøyet i tillegg til å laga rask nedover- opp datasett for store skala evalueringsverdiar som balanserer krysspråksjustering med språkspesifikat. Starting from a shared sample of 825 English verbs, translated into Chinese, Japanese, Finnish, Polish and Italian, we apply a two-phase annotation process which produces (i) semantic verb classes and (ii) fine-grained similarity scores for nearly 130 thousand verb pairs. Vi bruker dei to typane verb data til a) å undersøke krysspråk liknande og variasjonar, og b) evaluerer kapasiteten for statiske og kontekstualiserte representasjonsmodular for å nøyaktig refleksera verbsemantikk, og kontrasttrerer utviklinga av store språk spesifikke pretrainingsmodeller med dei fleire språk ekvivalente på semantiske klassering og leksiske liknande, gjennom ulike domene med verbbetydning. Vi løyser data frå begge fasane som eit stor fleirspråksressurs, som inneheld 85 verbklasser og nesten 130k par liknande poeng, og tilbyr ein veldig mykje muligheter for meir evaluering og forskning om fleirspråkssemantikk.', 'mn': 'Бид орон зай төлөвлөгөөний (СПАМ) аргын анхны шалгалтыг типтологийн төрлийн хэл жишээнд үзүүлж, олон хэл NLP-г дэмжих боломжтой semantic evaluation нөөцийг бүтээх боломжтой болгодог. Бид СПАМын хэрэглэгчийг хэлний тодорхойлолтой баланслах хэлний хэлбэртэй олон хэлний тодорхойлолтын том хэмжээний үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн сангуудыг хурдан бүтээх боломжтой болгодог. 825 Англи хэлний хэлний жишээнээс эхлээд Хятад, Япон, Финляндын, Польшин, Италиан руу орчуулсан хоёр дахь дахь дахь хэлний хичээл болон i i) жижиг хэлний жишээнээс бараг 130 мянган хэлний хувьд төстэй хэмжээсүүдийг ашигладаг. Бид хоёр төрлийн хэлний өгөгдлийг a) хэлний ижил хэлний төстэй болон өөрчлөлтийг шалгаж, б) статик болон contextualized representation загварын чадварыг тодорхой харуулахын тулд тодорхой хэлний семантикийг тодорхой харуулахын тулд, олон хэлний ижил хэлний зэрэгцээ нь ижил хэлний зэрэгцээ болон лексик төстэй байдалтай харьцуул хэлний утгатай олон хэсэгт. Бид өгөгдлийг хоёр дахь талаас том хэлний олон хэлний баялаг болгож, 85 хэлний хичээл болон бараг 130k хоёр төстэй тэнцүү хэмжээсүүд болгож, олон хэлний хэлний шинжлэх ухааны тухай баялаг үнэлэх боломжтой боломжтой болгож, судалгаа', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy pierwszą ocenę zastosowania metody aranżacji przestrzennej (SpAM) do typologicznie zróżnicowanej próby języka oraz jej potencjału do wytworzenia zasobów oceny semantycznej wspierających wielojęzyczne NLP, ze szczególnym uwzględnieniem semantyki czasowników. Pokazujemy użyteczność SpAM w pozwalającej na szybkie tworzenie oddolne zbiorów danych oceniających na dużą skalę, które równoważą dostosowanie między językami i specyfiką językową. Zaczynając od wspólnej próby 825 angielskich czasowników, przetłumaczonych na chiński, japoński, fiński, polski i włoski, stosujemy dwufazowy proces adnotacji, który tworzy (i) semantyczne klasy czasowników i (ii) drobnoziarniste punkty podobieństwa dla blisko 130 tysięcy par czasowników. Wykorzystujemy dwa rodzaje danych czasowników do (a) badania podobieństw i zmienności między językami oraz (b) oceny zdolności statycznych i kontekstowych modeli reprezentacji do dokładnego odzwierciedlenia semantyki czasowników, kontrastując wydajność modeli wstępnego treningu specyficznego dużego języka z ich wielojęzycznym odpowiednikiem w zakresie klastrowania semantycznego i podobieństwa leksykalnego, w różnych dziedzinach znaczenia czasownika. Dane z obu faz udostępniamy jako wielojęzyczny zasób wielojęzyczny, obejmujący 85 klasy czasowników i niemal 130k punkty podobieństwa parowego, oferujący bogactwo możliwości dalszej oceny i badań nad wielojęzyczną semantyką czasowników.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm prima evaluare a aplicabilității unei metode de aranjare spațială (SpAM) la un eșantion de limbă tipologic divers și potențialul său de a produce resurse de evaluare semantică pentru susținerea PNL multilingv, cu accent pe semantica verbelor. Demonstrăm utilitatea SpAM în a permite crearea rapidă de jos în sus a seturilor de date de evaluare la scară largă, care echilibrează alinierea translingvistică cu specificul limbii. Pornind de la un eșantion comun de 825 de verbe engleze traduse în chineză, japoneză, finlandeză, poloneză și italiană, aplicăm un proces de adnotare în două faze care produce (i) clase de verbe semantice și (ii) punctaje de similitudine cu granule fine pentru aproape 130 mii de perechi de verbe. Utilizăm cele două tipuri de date verbale pentru a (a) examina similaritățile și variațiile interlingvistice și (b) evalua capacitatea modelelor de reprezentare statică și contextualizată de a reflecta cu exactitate semantica verbelor, contrastând performanța modelelor de pre-formare specifice limbilor mari cu echivalentul lor multilingv privind clusterizarea semantică și similaritatea lexicală, în diferite domenii ale semnificației verbelor. Eliberăm datele din ambele faze ca o resursă multilingvă la scară largă, cuprinzând 85 de clase de verbe și aproape 130k punctaje de similitudine pereche, oferind o multitudine de posibilități de evaluare și cercetare suplimentară a semanticii verbelor multilingve.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qiimeynta ugu horraysa qaababka dhismaha kala duduwan (SpAM) sameynta luuqada kala duduwan, waxaana suurtagal ah in loo soo saaro manfacyada qiimeynta semantika si ay u kaalmeeyaan asalka afka kala duduwan ee NLP, kaas oo aad ku kalsoonaan karto qoraalka semantika. Waxaynu muujinnaa isticmaalka SpAM in aan u ogolaanno in dhaqso u sameynta sawirada qiimeynta oo aad u weyn, taasoo balan u dhigta isbedelka luqada ku qoran si gaar ah. Sidii aad ka bilowdo tusaale ahaan luuqadaha Ingiriiska ee 825 oo lagu turjumay Shiino, Jabanees, Finnishka, Boolishka iyo Talyaaniga, waxaan codsanaynaa jardiino dhibaato ah oo ka soo baxa fasalka qoraalada (i) semantika iyo (ii) iskuulada isku mid ah oo u eg 130 kun oo qoraal ah. Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa labada noocyo oo qoraal ah (a) si aan u baarayno siman luuqadaha kala duwan iyo is-bedelka, waxaana qiimeynaynaa awoodda qaabka u dhigashada iyo tusaalaha si saxda ah si saxda ah u fiirsashada qoraalka qoraalka, si ka duwan tababarka afka weyn oo gaar ah oo u eg tusmooyinkooda luuqada kala duduwan oo isku mid ah qoraalka iyo siman leksiga, Meelaha kala duduwan ee macnaheedka afka. Macluumaadka labada fasaladooda waxaan ka soo bixinnaa asal badan oo kala duduwan, kaas oo ka mid ah 85 fasalka verb iyo qiyaastii 130k oo isku mid ah, waxaana bixiyaa suurtagal badan oo ka sii qiimeynaya iyo waxbarasho ku saabsan qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar den första utvärderingen av tillämpningen av en spatial arrangement method (SpAM) på ett typologiskt mångfaldigt språkprov, och dess potential att producera semantiska utvärderingsresurser för att stödja flerspråkig NLP, med fokus på verbsemantik. Vi demonstrerar SpAM:s användbarhet när det gäller att möjliggöra snabb nedifrån och upp-skapande av storskaliga utvärderingsdata som balanserar korsspråklig anpassning med språkspecificitet. Med utgångspunkt i ett gemensamt urval av 825 engelska verb, översatta till kinesiska, japanska, finska, polska och italienska, tillämpar vi en tvåfas anteckningsprocess som producerar (i) semantiska verbklasser och (ii) finkorniga likhetspoäng för nästan 130 tusen verbpar. Vi använder de två typerna av verbdata för att (a) undersöka korspråkiga likheter och variation, och (b) utvärdera kapaciteten hos statiska och kontextualiserade representationsmodeller för att korrekt återspegla verbsemantik, kontrastera prestandan hos stora språkspecifika förkortningsmodeller med deras flerspråkiga motsvarighet på semantisk klustring och lexikal likhet, över olika domäner av verbmening. Vi släpper ut data från båda faserna som en storskalig flerspråkig resurs, bestående av 85 verbklasser och nästan 130k parvisa likhetspoäng, vilket erbjuder en mängd möjligheter till ytterligare utvärdering och forskning om flerspråkig verbsemantik.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo prvu procjenu primjene metode spacijalnog aranžmana (SpAM) tipološki različitim jezičkim uzorcima, i njegov potencijal da proizvodi semantičke resurse procjene za podršku multijezičkih NLP-a, s fokusom na verbalne semantike. Pokazujemo korisnost SpAM-a u omogućivanju brzog kreiranja podataka o velikoj skali procjene koje ravnotežavaju krstojezičku poravnanje sa specifičnošću jezika. Počevši od zajedničkog uzoraka 825 engleskih verb a, prevedenog na kineske, japanske, finske, poljske i italijanske, primjenjujemo proces annotacije od dve faze koji proizvodi semantičke klase verba i ii) rezultate sličnosti sa gotovo 130 hiljada verba. Koristimo dve vrste verbalnih podataka na a) pregledavanje međujezičkih sličnosti i varijacija, i b) procjenjujemo kapacitet statičnih i kontekstualiziranih modela predstavljanja da precizno odražimo semantiku verba, suprotstavljajući učinkovitost velikih jezičkih specifičnih modela predstavljanja sa svojim multijezičkim ekvivalentom na semantičkoj klasteriranju i leksičkoj sličnosti, Preko različitih domena značenja verba. Puštamo podatke iz obe faze kao veliki multijezički resurs, uključujući 85 klase verb a i skoro 130k rezultata sličnosti, nudimo bogatstvo mogućnosti za daljnju procjenu i istraživanje o multijezičkim semanticima.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරථම විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සැමැල්ලම් වලට ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරථම විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සැමැල්ලම් කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා සෙම අපි SpAM ගේ උපයෝජනය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශේෂණ දත්ත සැකස් සඳහා ඉක්මනින් ඉක්මනින් පහළ සි පටන් ගන්නේ 825 ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වාර්තාවක් සැමැල්පයක් ඉන්න, චීනි, ජාපානි, ෆිනිෂ්, පොලිෂ්, සහ ඉතාලියාන් වලට, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්නේ දෙකක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සඳහා සැමැන් අපි භාවිතා කරන්නේ වර්ක්ෂ දත්ත දෙකක් වගේ (a) ක්\u200dරිස්ටල් භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධතා සහ වෙනස්, සහ (b) විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ස්ථිර ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසයේ ස්ථිර ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසය සහ ලෙක්ස වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලින් විශේෂ අදහසක් තියෙන්නේ. අපි දත්ත දෙන්නම් පද්ධතියෙන් ලොකු විශාල භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාශ කරනවා, වර්ගය 85 ක්ලාස් වලින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වලින් 130k ක් වගේ', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک فضائی ترتیب کے مطابق (SpAM) کی پہلی ارزیابی کا مطابق ایک ٹیپٹولوژیک طرح طرح طرح طرح کی زبان نمونہ پر پیش کیا ہے اور اس کی امکانات کہ ملتی زبان NLP کی مدد کرے، اور اس کی امکانات کہ کلی زبان سیمانٹیکوں پر فوकस کرے۔ ہم اسپیم کے استعمال کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ بڑے اسکیل کے ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹ کی جلدی دکھانے کی اجازت دیتے ہیں جو زبان کی ویژگی کے ساتھ کرس-زبان کا ارزیابی ہے. 825 انگلیسی ویروں کی شروع کی ایک شروع نمونہ سے، چینی, جاپانی, فنلاندی, پولیش اور ایتالیایی میں ترجمہ کیا گیا ہے، ہم ایک دوفاز انگلیسی پیدائش پر لازم کرتے ہیں جس نے (i) سیمنٹی ویروں کلاس پیدا کیا ہے اور (ii) تقریباً 130 ہزار ویروں کے جوڑوں کے لئے بہترین انگلیسی سکوٹ پیدا کئے ہم ان دونوں کلیزوں کی مثالیں استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ان کے کثیر زبان کی مثالیں اور تغییرات کی آزمائش کریں اور (b) ایستی اور کنٹکسٹیزول کی مثالیں مثالیں مثالیں کریں کہ ان کے کثیر زبان کی مثالیں دقیق تغییر کریں اور ان کے کثیر زبان کی مثالیں مثالیں دقیق تغییر کریں اور ان کے کثیر زبان کی مثالیں م کلام کا مطلب مختلف دامنوں میں۔ ہم دونوں مرحلے سے ڈاٹ کو ایک بڑے مزید زبان کے منبع کے طور پر چھوڑ دیتے ہیں، 85 ورب کلاس اور تقریباً 130k جوڑے مزید مزید مزید مزید ارزیابی اور تحقیق کے لئے بہت سی امکانات پیش کرتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு வழக்கமாக வேறு மொழி மாதிரி முறையின் பயன்பாட்டின் முதல் மதிப்பினைக் காண்பிக்கிறோம். அதில் இரு மொழி NLP க்கு ஆதரிக்கும் பெரும்பாலான மதிப்பின் மூலம் அமை மொழி குறிப்பிட்ட மொழியின் ஒழுங்குப்பொருத்தம் மூலம் மொழியின் குறிப்பிட்டு விரைவான கீழ் மேலே உருவாக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகள 825 ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து ஒரு பகிர்ந்த மாதிரியிலிருந்து தொடங்குகிறது, சீனா, ஜப்பானிஸ், பினிஷ், போலிஷ் மற்றும் இத்தாலியனிலிருந்து மொழிபெயர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, நாம் ஒரு இரண்டு வக (a) முழு மொழி ஒத்தியையும் மாறியையும் பரிசோதிக்க, மற்றும் (b) நிலையான மற்றும் தற்காலிக்கப்பட்ட பிரிவின் மாதிரிகளின் இயல்பானதையும் சரியாக ஒத்திசைப்படுத்த வேண்டும், பெரிய மொழியின் சிறிய மாதிரி வேறு வித்தியாசமான மூலங்களில் உள்ளன. நாம் இவ்விரண்டு வகுப்பிலிருந்து தகவல்களை ஒரு பெரிய அளவு பல மொழி மூலத்தாக வெளியேற்றுகிறோம், அதில் 85 வார்ப் வகுப்புகள் மற்றும் கிட்டத்தட்ட 130க்கு ஜோடி புள்ளிகள் சமம', 'uz': "Биз фосила таркиб қилиш усули (SpAM) учун биринчи қийматни тақдим этамиз, одатда турли тил намунага ва унинг қонунчилик NLP қонунлигини қўллаб-қувват учун қимматик қийматни яратиш мумкин, деб ҳисоблаймиз, у фойдаланиш мумкин, аммо фойдали нуқталарни фойдаланиш мумкин. Biz SpAM asboblarining foydalanishini ko'rsatamiz. Bu tilning xossalari bilan juda tez qiymatlar maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlashga ruxsat beramiz. Starting from a shared sample of 825 English verbs, translated into Chinese, Japanese, Finnish, Polish, and Italian, we apply a two-phase annotation process which produces (i) semantic verb classes and (ii) fine-grained similarity scores for nearly 130 thousand verb pairs.  Biz ikkita tur verb maʼlumotdan foydalanamiz (a) bir necha tillar bir xil tilni o'xshash va o'zgarishni o'rganamiz va (b) statik va taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi modellarning qobiliyatini aniqlash imkoniyatini aniqlash mumkin. Bu tilning juda katta tilning foydalanishini bir necha tilda o'xshash o'xshash o'xshash va leksikal bir xil tilda va har xil tarkibini o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz ikkita darajadagi ma'lumotlarni bir necha tillar Resource sifatida chiqaramiz, 85 verb sinflari bilan bir xil xil qo'l qo'l qo'llangan, ko'plab tili semantika davomida qo'l qiymati va qidirish imkoniyatlariga ko'proq imkoniyatlar beradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra đánh giá đầu tiên về phương pháp sắp đặt không gian (S.M.A.M) có thể áp dụng cho các mẫu ngôn ngữ khác nhau theo phân loại, và khả năng nó sản xuất các nguồn đánh giá ngữ học hỗ trợ ngôn ngữ đa dạng. Chúng tôi chứng minh s ự hữu ích của Spaam trong việc dễ dàng tạo ra dữ liệu đánh giá lớn để cân bằng sự thẳng đứng ngôn ngữ với đặc điểm ngôn ngữ. Bắt đầu từ mẫu có chung của 85 các động từ Anh, dịch thành từ Trung Quốc, Nhật Bản, Phần Lan, Ba Lan, Ý, chúng tôi áp dụng một tiến trình ghi chú hai giai đoạn sản xuất (i) các lớp động từ ngữ nghĩa (động) và (ii) đi ểm giống nhau nhỏ với gần 130 ngàn động từ. Chúng tôi sử dụng hai loại dữ liệu từ tới a) kiểm tra các điểm tương đồng ngôn ngữ khác nhau và sự khác biệt, và b) đánh giá khả năng của các mô hình thể phân biệt tĩnh thường và tương ứng với nhau để phản ánh chính xác từ ngữ, so sánh hiệu suất của các mô- đun quy định dạng ngôn ngữ đặc biệt lớn với ngôn ngữ rộng tương tự về cụm từ và nét văn b ản, trên mỗi miền khác nhau của ý nghĩa động từ. Chúng tôi công bố dữ liệu từ cả hai giai đoạn như một nguồn ngôn ngữ đa dạng rộng bao gồm 85 các lớp động từ và gần 130k kết hợp điểm tương đồng, cung cấp rất nhiều khả năng để đánh giá và nghiên cứu về ngữ pháp đa dạng.', 'bg': 'Представяме първата оценка на приложимостта на метода на пространствено подреждане (СПАМ) към типологично разнообразна езикова извадка и потенциала му за създаване на семантични ресурси за оценка в подкрепа на многоезичното НЛП, с фокус върху глаголната семантика. Ние демонстрираме полезността на СпАМ за бързо създаване отдолу нагоре на мащабни набори от данни за оценка, които балансират междуезичното подравняване с езиковата специфичност. Започвайки от споделена извадка от 825 английски глагола, преведени на китайски, японски, финландски, полски и италиански, ние прилагаме двуфазен процес на анотация, който произвежда (и) семантични класове глаголи и (ii) фини оценки за сходство за близо 130 хиляди двойки глаголи. Използваме двата вида данни за глаголите, за да (а) изследваме междуезичните прилики и вариации, и (б) оценяваме капацитета на статичните и контекстуализираните модели за представяне да отразяват точно семантиката на глаголите, контрастирайки ефективността на големите езикови специфични модели за предобучение с техния многоезичен еквивалент за семантично клъстериране и лексикално сходство, в различни области на значението на глаголите. Ние публикуваме данните от двете фази като мащабен многоезичен ресурс, включващ 85 класа глаголи и близо 130 хил. точки за сходство по двойки, предлагайки богато разнообразие от възможности за по-нататъшна оценка и изследване на многоезичната семантика на глаголите.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo prvu procjenu primjene metode spacijalnog aranžmana (SpAM) tipološki različitim uzorkom jezika i njezin potencijal proizvodnje semantičkih sredstava procjene za podršku multijezičkih NLP-a s fokusom na verbalne semantike. Pokazujemo sposobnost SpAM-a u omogućivanju brzog kreiranja podataka o velikoj mjeri procjene koje se ravnotežavaju međujezičkom poravnanju s specifičnošću jezika. Počevši od zajedničkog uzoraka 825 engleskih verb a, prevedenog na kineske, japanske, finske, poljske i italijanske, primjenjujemo proces annotacije od dvije faze koji proizvodi semantičke klase verba i ii) rezultate sličnosti sa gotovo 130 tisuća verba. Koristimo dvije vrste verbalnih podataka na a) pregledavanje međujezičkih sličnosti i varijacija, i b) procjenjivanje kapaciteta statičnih i kontekstualiziranih modela predstavljanja kako bi precizno odrazili semantiku verba, suprotstavljajući učinkovitost velikih jezičkih specifičnih modela predstavljanja s njihovim multijezičkim ekvivalentom na semantičkoj skustering i leksičkoj sličnosti, Preko različitih domena značenja verba. Puštamo podatke iz obje faze kao velike multijezičke resurse, uključujući 85 klase verb a i skoro 130k rezultata sličnosti, nudimo bogatstvo mogućnosti za daljnju procjenu i istraživanje o semantiku multijezičkih verba.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de eerste evaluatie van de toepasbaarheid van een Spatial Arrangement Method (SpAM) op een typologisch divers taalmonster, en het potentieel ervan om semantische evaluatiebronnen te produceren om meertalige NLP te ondersteunen, met een focus op werkwoordssemantiek. We demonstreren het nut van SpAM om snelle bottom-up creatie van grootschalige evaluatiedatasets mogelijk te maken die cross-lingual alignment met taalspecificiteit in evenwicht brengen. Uitgaande van een gedeeld voorbeeld van 825 Engelse werkwoorden, vertaald in het Chinees, Japans, Fins, Pools en Italiaans, passen we een tweefasig annotatieproces toe dat (i) semantische werkwoordenklassen en (ii) fijnkorrelige vergelijkingsscore produceert voor bijna 130 duizend werkwoordenparen. We gebruiken de twee soorten werkwoordgegevens om (a) taaloverschrijdende overeenkomsten en variatie te onderzoeken, en (b) de capaciteit van statische en contextualiseerde representatiemodellen te evalueren om werkwoordssemantiek nauwkeurig te reflecteren, waarbij de prestaties van grote taalspecifieke pretraining modellen worden vergeleken met hun meertalige equivalent op semantische clustering en lexicale gelijkenis, tussen verschillende domeinen van werkwoorden betekenis. We geven de gegevens uit beide fasen vrij als een grootschalige meertalige bron, bestaande uit 85 werkwoordklassen en bijna 130k parerwise vergelijkingsscore, die een schat aan mogelijkheden biedt voor verdere evaluatie en onderzoek naar meertalige werkwoordssemantiek.', 'da': "Vi præsenterer den første evaluering af anvendeligheden af en spatial arrangement metode (SpAM) på en typologisk forskelligartet sprogprøve, og dens potentiale til at producere semantiske evalueringsressourcer til at understøtte flersproget NLP, med fokus på verbsemantik. Vi demonstrerer SpAM's nytte i at muliggøre hurtig bottom-up oprettelse af store evalueringsdatasæt, der balancerer tværsproget tilpasning med sprogspecifikke. Med udgangspunkt i et fælles eksempel på 825 engelske udsagnsord, oversat til kinesisk, japansk, finsk, polsk og italiensk, anvender vi en tofaset annotationsproces, der producerer (i) semantiske udsagnsordsklasser og (ii) finkornede lighedsscorer for næsten 130 tusinde udsagnsord par. Vi bruger de to typer verbedata til at (a) undersøge tværsprogede ligheder og variation, og (b) evaluere kapaciteten af statiske og kontekstualiserede repræsentationsmodeller til nøjagtigt at afspejle verbsemantik, hvilket kontrasterer ydeevnen af store sprogspecifikke pre-training modeller med deres flersprogede tilsvarende om semantisk klyngning og leksikalsk lighed, på tværs af forskellige områder af verbets betydning. Vi frigiver data fra begge faser som en storstilet flersproget ressource, der omfatter 85 udsagnsordsklasser og næsten 130.000 parvise lighedsscorer, hvilket tilbyder et væld af muligheder for yderligere evaluering og forskning i flersproget udsagnsord semantik.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren die erste Bewertung der Anwendbarkeit einer Spatial Arrangement Method (SpAM) auf eine typologisch vielfältige Sprachprobe und ihres Potenzials, semantische Auswertungsressourcen zur Unterstützung mehrsprachiger NLP zu produzieren, mit einem Schwerpunkt auf Verbsemantik. Wir demonstrieren die Nützlichkeit von SpAM bei der schnellen Bottom-up-Erstellung großer Evaluationsdatensätze, die die sprachübergreifende Ausrichtung mit der sprachlichen Spezifität in Einklang bringen. Ausgehend von einem gemeinsamen Beispiel englischer 825 Verben, übersetzt in Chinesisch, Japanisch, Finnisch, Polnisch und Italienisch, wenden wir einen zweiphasigen Annotationsprozess an, der (i) semantische Verbklassen und (ii) feinkörnige Ähnlichkeitswerte für fast 130-tausend Verbpaare erzeugt. Wir verwenden die beiden Arten von Verbdaten, um (a) sprachübergreifende Ähnlichkeiten und Variationen zu untersuchen und (b) die Fähigkeit statischer und kontextualisierter Repräsentationsmodelle zu bewerten, Verbsemantik genau zu reflektieren, wobei die Leistung großsprachiger Prätraining-Modelle mit ihrem mehrsprachigen Äquivalent auf semantische Clustering und lexikalische Ähnlichkeit verglichen wird. über verschiedene Bereiche der Verbbedeutung. Wir veröffentlichen die Daten aus beiden Phasen als große mehrsprachige Ressource, bestehend aus 85-Verbklassen und fast 130k paarweisen Ähnlichkeitsscores, und bieten eine Fülle von Möglichkeiten zur weiteren Auswertung und Erforschung mehrsprachiger Verbsemantik.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan evaluasi pertama dari aplikabilitas metode pengaturan ruang (SpAM) pada sampel bahasa tipologis yang berbeda, dan potensi untuk menghasilkan sumber daya evaluasi semantis untuk mendukung NLP berbilang bahasa, dengan fokus pada semantik verb. Kami menunjukkan utilitas SpAM dalam memungkinkan penciptaan cepat dari bawah ke atas dataset evaluasi skala besar yang seimbang penyesuaian saling bahasa dengan spesifik bahasa. Mulai dari sampel berbagi 825 verb Inggris, diterjemahkan ke bahasa Cina, Jepang, Finlandia, Polandia, dan Italia, kami menerapkan proses annotasi dua fase yang memproduksi (i) kelas verb semantis dan (ii) skor perbedaan dengan gandum hampir 130 ribu pasangan verb. Kami menggunakan dua jenis data verb untuk (a) memeriksa persamaan dan variasi saling bahasa, dan (b) mengevaluasi kapasitas model representation statis dan kontekstualisasi untuk menerangkan secara akurat semantik verb, bertentangan dengan prestasi model pretraining spesifik bahasa besar dengan ekvivalen multibahasa mereka pada clustering semantik dan persamaan lexik, - melalui domain yang berbeda arti verb. Kami melepaskan data dari kedua fase sebagai sumber daya multibahasa skala besar, yang mengandung 85 kelas verb dan skor persamaan hampir 130k pasangan, menawarkan banyak kemungkinan untuk evaluasi dan penelitian lanjut tentang semantik verb multibahasa.', 'fa': 'ما اولین ارزیابی کاربردی روش سازی فضایی (SpAM) را به نمونه\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای مختلف گونه\u200cشناسی نشان می\u200cدهیم، و توانایی آن برای تولید منابع ارزیابی semantic برای پشتیبانی NLP چندین زبان، با تمرکز روی semantics verb. ما استفاده از اسپام را نشان می دهیم که برای آفرینش سریع پایین بالا از مجموعه\u200cهای ارزیابی مقیاس بزرگ که تعادل کردن متوسط زبان با ویژگی زبان تعادل می\u200cکند. از نمونه مشترک 825 کلاس انگلیسی که به چینی, ژاپنی, فنلاندی, لهستان و ایتالیایی ترجمه می\u200cشود، ما یک فرایند آگاهی دو مرحله را تأثیر می\u200cدهیم که کلاس\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی (i) را تولید می\u200cکند و (ii) نمونه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیز نیکو برای تقریباً 130 هزار جفت\u200cهای زبان\u200cشن ما از دو نوع اطلاعات verb استفاده می کنیم تا (a) مشابه و تغییرات متفاوت زبان را تحقیق کنیم، و (b) توانایی مدل نمایش ثابت و متفاوت را ارزیابی می کنیم تا دقیقاً فعالیت semantics verb بزرگ را تغییر دهیم، با نمایش مدل\u200cهای مخصوص تغییر زبان بزرگ با مشابه\u200cهای متفاوت زبان\u200cهایشان بر مشابه\u200cهای کل در سرزمینهای متفاوت معنی عبارت است. ما اطلاعات را از هر دو مرحله به عنوان یک منابع بسیار زیادی زبان آزاد می\u200cکنیم که از کلاس ۸۵ کلاس زبان و نزدیک ۳۰۰ کیلومتر نمونه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیزی دارد، به عنوان یک ثروت احتمال برای ارزیابی و تحقیقات بیشتری در مورد سنتی\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای زیادی', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka tathmini ya kwanza ya upatikanaji wa njia ya mikakati ya angani (SpAM) kwa sampuli mbalimbali za lugha, na uwezekano wake wa kutengeneza rasilimali za uchunguzi wa sekunde ili kuunga mkono NLP kwa lugha nyingine, yenye lengo la mifano ya lugha. Tunaonyesha matumizi ya SpAM katika kuruhusu kutengeneza taarifa za uchunguzi kwa haraka za chini kwa takwimu kubwa zinazotengeneza usambazaji wa lugha kwa utaalamu wa lugha. Kuanzia kwenye sampuli ya maneno ya Kiingereza 825, yanayotafsiriwa kwa Kichina, Kijapani, Kifinni, Wapola na Kiitalia, tunatumia mchakato wa kuchangaza vifaa viwili vinavyozalisha darasa la simu za viganjani na (i i) vipande vizuri vya viganjani kwa takribani viwili 130,000. Tunatumia aina mbili za takwimu za lugha (a) kuchunguza vifananifu na mabadiliko ya lugha, na (b) kutathmini uwezo wa uwakilishi wa takwimu na mbili zilizotajwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kutafakarisha mifano ya kiungo, ukilinganisha utendaji wa lugha vikubwa mahususi ya kutengeneza mifano yenye lugha tofauti sawa na lugha nyingine inayofanana na viungo vya sekunde na vifaa vya lexico, katika maeneo mbalimbali ya maana ya maneno. Tunatoa taarifa kutoka daraja zote hizo kama rasilimali kubwa za lugha nyingine, ikiwa ni pamoja na darasa 85 za maneno na takribani vipindi vya viwili 130 vya usawa, kutoa uwezekano mkubwa wa kutathmini na tafiti kuhusu mifano ya lugha mbalimbali.', 'ko': '우리는 처음으로 공간 배열 방법(Spam)이 유형이 다양한 언어 견본에 대한 적용성을 평가했고, 다언어 NLP를 지원하기 위한 의미 평가 자원을 만들어 동사의 의미에 중점을 두었다.우리는 Spam이 빠른 속도로 아래에서 위로 대규모 평가 데이터 집합을 만들 수 있도록 하는 실용성을 보여 주었다. 이 데이터 집합들은 크로스 언어 정렬과 언어 특이성을 균형 있게 한다.중국어, 일본어, 핀란드어, 폴란드어, 이탈리아어로 번역된 825개의 영어 동사의 공유 샘플을 시작으로 우리는 2단계 주석 과정을 응용했다. 이 과정은 (i)어의 동사류와 (ii) 13만 개에 가까운 동사 쌍의 세립도 유사성 점수를 형성했다.우리는 이 두 가지 유형의 동사 데이터를 사용하여 (a) 다중 언어의 유사성과 변이성을 검사하고 (b) 정태와 어경화 표징 모델이 동사의 의미를 정확하게 반영하는 능력을 평가하며 대형 특정 언어의 예비 훈련 모델과 다중 언어 등 가물이 의미 집합과 어휘의 유사성에 대한 표현을 비교한다.동사의 의미의 다른 영역을 뛰어넘다.우리는 이 두 단계의 데이터를 대규모의 다언어 자원으로 발표할 것이다. 85개의 동사류와 130k에 가까운 대유사성 점수를 포함하여 다언어 동사의 의미를 더욱 평가하고 연구하는 데 풍부한 가능성을 제공했다.', 'af': "Ons stel die eerste evaluasie van die toepassing van 'n spasielle arrangensie metode (SpAM) aan 'n tipologiese verskeie taal voorbeeld, en sy potensieal om semantiese evaluasie hulpbronne te produseer om multilinglike NLP te ondersteun, met 'n fokus op verb semantieke. Ons wys SpAM se nutsprogram in toelaat vir vinnige ondersteunde skepping van groot-skaal evalueringsdatastel wat kruistale oplyn met taal spesifiekheid balans. Beginne van 'n gedeelde voorbeeld van 825 Engelske verbe, vertaal na Sjinees, Japanse, Finnish, Poolse en Italiese, ons het 'n twee fase annotasie proses aanwend wat (i) semantiese verb klasse en (ii) fin-graindese gelykenis telling vir byna 130 duisend verb paar produseer. Ons gebruik die twee tipes verb data om (a) kruistale gelykenisse en veranderinge te ondersoek, en (b) evalueer die kapasiteit van statiese en contextualiseerde verteenwoordingsmodele om geregtig verb semantieke te reflekteer, teenstelling van die prestasie van groot taal spesifieke pretraining modele met hul multilinglike gelykenis op semantiese clustering en leksiese gelykenis, deur verskillende domeine van verb betekening. Ons verlos die data van beide fase as 'n groot-skaal multitaalske hulpbron, met 85 verb klasse en byna 130k paarsgelykheidspunte, wat 'n rykdom van moontlikhede vir verdere evaluering en ondersoek oor multitaalske verb semantieke gee.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim vlerësimin e parë të aplikabilitetit të një metode të rregullimit hapësiror (SpAM) në një kampion gjuhësh tipologjikisht të ndryshëm dhe potencialin e tij për të prodhuar burime të vlerësimit semantik për të mbështetur NLP shumëgjuhës, me një fokus në semantikën e verb ëve. Ne demonstrojmë përdorimin e SpAM në lejimin e krijimit të shpejtë nga poshtë lart të të dhënave të vlerësimit në shkallë të madhe që balancojnë përshtatjen ndërgjuhësore me specificitetin e gjuhës. Duke filluar nga një mostra e përbashkët e 825 verb ëve angleze, të përkthyer në kinez, japonez, finlandez, polak dhe italian, ne aplikojmë një proces anotacioni dy-fazor që prodhon (i) klasa semantike verbësh dhe (ii) pika të ngjashmërisë të hollësishme për pothuajse 130 mijë par verbësh. Ne përdorim të dy llojet e të dhënave të verb ëve për (a) të shqyrtojmë ngjashmëritë dhe variacionet ndërgjuhësore, dhe (b) të vlerësojmë aftësinë e modeleve të përfaqësimit statik dhe kontekstual për të pasqyruar saktësisht semantikën e verbëve, në kontrast me performancën e modeleve të mëdha të parastërvitjes specifike gjuhës me ekvivalentin e tyre shumëgjuhësor në grupimin semantik dhe ngjashmërinë lexike, Në domene të ndryshme të kuptimit të verb ëve. Ne i lëshojmë të dhënat nga të dy fazat si një burim shumëgjuhës në shkallë të madhe, që përfshin 85 klasa verb ësh dhe gati 130k pika të ngjashmërisë në dy palë, duke ofruar një pasuri mundësi për vlerësim të mëtejshëm dhe kërkim mbi semantikën e verbëve shumëgjuhës.', 'tr': "Biz uzay düzenleme yönteminiň (SpAM) üçin ilkinji gezek nusgasyna taýýarlanmagyny täpli bir dil nusgasyna görkezip berýäris we ol bir semantik düzenleme çeşmelerini çoklu dilli NLP'i desteklemek üçin önüne alyp bilýäris we verb semantiklerine fokus etmelidir. Biz SpAM'iň uygulamyny diller takyklygy bilen çalt alt-üstden çykarmak üçin bejermek üçin önüne görkez. 825 Iňlisçe verbleriň jemlasyndan başlanýan, hytaý, japonça, finlandça, polonça we italiýa çevirine terjime edilen, biz 2-fäsi sözleşme prosesinden geçirip otyrýarys we (i i) ýakyn 130 müň sany verb çift üçin gözlenen çykyş sanlaryny ulanýarys. Biz iki tür verb berüvlerini (a) çarpaz dil meňzeşlikleri we çeşitliklerini barlaýarys, we (b) semantik klustering we leksiýal meňzeşlikleri bilen uly dil takyk süýtgetme modelleriniň ukypyny düzgün terjime etmek üçin ullanýarys. Çaltylyk anlamsatyň farklı alanlarynda. Biz bu sahyplardan hem uly bir multi-dil çeşmeleri çykarýarys, 85-nji verb synplary we yaklaýyk 130k sany diňe meňzeşlik notlary bar, multi-dil verb semantiklerinde bir deňlemek we barlamak üçin mümkinçilik mümkinçiliklerini berýäris.", 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տիպոլոգիապես բազմազան լեզվի նմուշի համար տարածական կազմակերպման մեթոդի (spPM) կիրառելիության առաջին գնահատումը և դրա պոտենցիալը ստեղծելու սեմանտիկ գնահատման ռեսուրսներ բազլեզու ՆԼՊ-ի աջակցությանը, կենտրոն We demonstrate SpAM's utility in allowing for quick bottom-up creation of large-scale evaluation datasets that balance cross-lingual alignment with language specificity.  Սկսելով 82 5 անգլերեն բայերի ընդհանուր նմուշից, թարգմանված չինական, ճապոներեն, ֆինլանդերեն, պոլանդերեն և իտալանդերեն, մենք կիրառում ենք երկու փուլում նմուշված գործընթաց, որը ստեղծում է (i) սեմանտիկ բայերի դասեր և (II) գեղեցիկ նմանությունների գնահատականներ մոտ 130 հազար բա Մենք օգտագործում ենք բայերի երկու տեսակի տվյալները՝ a) ուսումնասիրելու միջլեզվային նմանությունները և տարբերությունները, և b) գնահատելու կարողությունը ստատիկ և կոնտեքստիալ ներկայացման մոդելների, որպեսզի ճշգրիտ արտացոլում են բայերի սեմանտիկան, հակադրելով մեծ լեզվային մասնավոր նախադասության մոդելների արտադրողությունը սեմանտիկ խմբ բայի իմաստի տարբեր ոլորտներում: Մենք արտադրում ենք երկու դեպքերից տեղեկատվությունը որպես մեծ բազլեզու ռեսուրսներ, որոնք կազմում են 85 բայի դասեր և մոտ 130 կմ զույգ նմանության գնահատականներ, որոնք հնարավորություններ են առաջարկում ավելի շատ գնահատելու և հետազոտության համար բայի սեմանտիկայի վերաբերյալ:", 'am': 'We present the first evaluation of the applicability of a spatial arrangement method (SpAM) to a typologically diverse language sample, and its potential to produce semantic evaluation resources to support multilingual NLP, with a focus on verb semantics.  በቋንቋ-ቋንቋ በተለየ ቋንቋ አካላይነት የደረጃ ዳታዎችን ለመፍጠር ፈጥኖ መሠረትን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ወደ ቻይና፣ ጃፓን፣ ፊንጻዊ፣ ፖሊስ እና ጣሊያንኛ ከ825 እንግሊዘኛ ቃላት የተካፈለ ምሳሌ ጀምረን፣ የሁለት ደረጃ ማስታወቂያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሁለት ዓይነት ቃላት (a) ለልዩ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ እና ለልዩነት እና ለመመርመርመር እና (b) የstatic እና በተቃዋሚ መልዕክት ዓይነቶችን በትክክል እንዲያስተካክሉ እና የተቃውሞ የቋንቋ አካላትን እና ለልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋ እና ለሌክሲካዊ ብጤት በተለየ ትልቁ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በተቃወሙ፣ በተለየ ቋንቋ ማህበረሰብ ውስጥ ከሁለቱም ደረጃዎች ዳውቶችን እንደ ትልቅ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሀብት እናስወግዳለን፤ 85 የverb ክፍሎች እና በ130 ሺሕ ዓይነቶች የሚተያያየው እና በብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ማስታወቂያ እና ትምህርት ላይ የተመሳሰለውን ሀብት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Biz uzay düzenleme metodlarının (SpAM) ilk müxtəlif dil nümunələrinə və çoxlu dil NLP dəstəklərini dəstəkləmək üçün semantik düzenleme resurslarını ürəkləmək üçün imkansız təsirlərini göstəririk. Biz SpAM'nin istifadəsini göstəririk ki, dil müəyyənləşdirilməsi ilə çox dəyişiklik değerlendirmə verilər qurulmasına müvəffəq edə bilər. 825 İngilizə verblərinin paylaşılan nümunələrindən başladıq, Çincə, Japonca, Finlandiya, Polonca və İtalyanca çevirilmiş, iki fəz annotasyon prosesini uyguladıq ki, i) semantik verb sınıflarını və ii) yaxın 130 min verb çift üçün gözəl çəkilmə nümunələri yaratdı. Biz hər iki növü verb verilənlərini a) dillərin çoxlu b ənzərini və dəyişikliklərini incitmək üçün istifadə edirik. b) statik və contextualized representation modellərin kapasitəsini, verb semantiklərini düzgün təcrübə etmək üçün, böyük dillərin müxtəlif pretraining modellərinin performansını, semantik clustering və lektik bənzərinin çoxlu dilləri ilə müqayisədə müqayisədə təcrübə edirik. fərqli məsələlər arasında. Biz hər iki fəsadan çox ölçülü çoxlu dil resursu olaraq veririk, 85 verb sınıfları və yaklaşık 130k çift similarlıq nöqtələri olaraq, çoxlu dilli verb semantik barəsində daha çox değerlənmək və araştırma mümkünlüyü təklif edirik.", 'bn': 'আমরা স্পেশিয়াল বিভিন্ন ভাষার উদাহরণের প্রয়োজনীয়তার প্রথম মূল্য উপস্থাপন করেছি এবং তার সম্ভাবনা বিভিন্ন ভাষার মানুষের প্রতি সেম্যান্টিক মুল্যায়নের সম্ভাবনা তৈরি করা আমরা স্প্যামের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শন করি দ্রুত নিম্নলিখিত তথ্য মুল্যায়নের সৃষ্টি করার জন্য দ্রুত স্প্যামের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শন করি যা ভাষার বিশ চীন, জাপানী, ফিনিশ, পোলিশ এবং ইতালিয়ান ভাষায় অনুবাদ করা ৮২৫ ইংরেজি ভার্ভের একটি নমুনা থেকে শুরু করা শুরু করেছে, আমরা একটি দুই পর্যায়ের বিজ্ঞাপন প্রক্রিয়া প্রয়োগ করি যা সেম্পেন্টি আমরা এই দুটি ধরনের ভার্ব ডাটা ব্যবহার করি (a) ক্রাশ-ভাষার সমতুল্য এবং ভিন্ন পরীক্ষা করি, এবং (b) স্টেটিক এবং প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মডেলের ক্ষমতা পরীক্ষা করি, যাতে সঠিকভাবে ভার্ব সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিফলিত বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ডোমেনের মানে। আমরা উভয় পর্যায়ের তথ্য বিশাল মাল্টিভাষার মূল্য হিসেবে মুক্ত করি, যার মধ্যে ৮৫ টি ভার্ব ক্লাস এবং প্রায় ১৩০ কোটি জোড়া একই সংখ্যা রয়েছে, তারা বহুভাষী ভার্ব সেম্যা', 'cs': 'Představujeme první vyhodnocení použitelnosti metody prostorového uspořádání (SpAM) na typologicky rozmanitý jazykový vzorek a její potenciál produkovat sémantické hodnotící zdroje pro podporu vícejazyčného NLP se zaměřením na slovesovou sémantiku. Demonstrujeme užitečnost SpAM při umožňování rychlého vytváření rozsáhlých hodnotících datových sad, které vyváží mezijazyčné sladění s jazykovou specificitou. Na základě sdíleného vzorku 825 anglických slovesů přeložených do čínštiny, japonštiny, finštiny, polštiny a italštiny aplikujeme dvoufázový proces anotace, který vytváří (i) třídy sémantických slovesů a (ii) jemné skóre podobnosti pro téměř 130 tisíc slovesných párů. Používáme dva typy dat slovesových dat k (a) zkoumání podobností a variace v různých jazycích a (b) vyhodnocování schopnosti statických a kontextualizovaných reprezentačních modelů přesně odrážet slovesovou sémantiku, kontrastujících výkonnost velkých jazykových specifických předtréninkových modelů s jejich vícejazyčným ekvivalentem na sémantické shlukování a lexikální podobnost, napříč různými oblastmi významu slovesa. Data z obou fází uvolňujeme jako rozsáhlý vícejazyčný zdroj, zahrnující 85 slovesných tříd a téměř 130k skóre podobnosti párů, nabízející bohaté možnosti pro další hodnocení a výzkum vícejazyčné slovesémantiky.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo prvu procjenu primjene metode spacijalnog aranžmana (SpAM) tipološki različitim uzorak jezika, i njegov potencijal da proizvede semantičke resurse procjene za podršku multijezičkih NLP-a, s fokusom na verbalne semantike. Pokazujemo korisnost SpAM-a u omogućivanju brzog kreiranja podataka o velikoj skali procjene koje balanciraju krstojezičku poravnanje sa specifičnošću jezika. Počevši od zajedničkog uzoraka 825 engleskih verb a, prevedenog na kineske, japanske, finske, poljske i italijanske, primjenjujemo proces annotacije od dvije faze koji proizvodi semantičke klase verba i ii) rezultate sličnosti sa finokograđenim rezultatima skoro 130.000 verba. Koristimo dvije vrste verbalnih podataka na a) pregledavanje međujezičkih sličnosti i varijacija, i b) procjenjujemo kapacitet statičnih i kontekstualiziranih modela predstavljanja kako bi precizno odrazili semantiku verba, suprotstavljajući učinkovitost velikih jezičkih specifičnih modela predstavljanja s njihovim multijezičkim ekvivalentom na semantičkoj klasteriranju i leksičkoj sličnosti, Preko različitih domena značenja verba. Puštamo podatke iz obje faze kao veliki multijezički resurs, uključujući 85 klase verb a i skoro 130k rezultata sličnosti, nudimo bogatstvo mogućnosti za daljnju procjenu i istraživanje o multijezičkim semanticima.', 'et': 'Esitleme esimest hinnangut ruumilise korralduse meetodi (SpAM) rakendatavuse kohta tüpoloogiliselt mitmekesise keele valimi puhul ning selle potentsiaali toota semantilisi hindamisressursse mitmekeelse NLP toetamiseks, keskendudes verbsemantikale. Näitame SpAM-i kasulikkust võimaldades kiiresti alt-üles luua suuremahulisi hindamisandmekogumeid, mis tasakaalustavad keeleülese vastavuse keele spetsiifilisusega. Alustades 825 inglise tegusõna jagatud valimist, mis on tõlgitud hiina, jaapani, soome, poola ja itaalia keelde, rakendame kahefaasilist annoteerimisprotsessi, mis annab (i) semantiliste tegusõnade klassid ja (ii) peenete sarnasuse skoorid ligi 130 tuhande tegusõnavaari kohta. Me kasutame kahte tüüpi tegusõnade andmeid, et a) uurida keeleüleseid sarnasusi ja variatsioone ning b) hinnata staatiliste ja kontekstiliste esitusmudelite suutlikkust täpselt kajastada tegusõnade semantikat, võrreldes suurte keeleõppeeelsete mudelite jõudlust nende mitmekeelse ekvivalendiga semantilise klastrite ja leksikaalse sarnasuse osas, eri valdkondades tegusõnade tähendus. Andmed avaldame mõlemast etapist laiaulatusliku mitmekeelse ressursina, mis koosneb 85 verbiklassist ja ligi 130 000 paari sarnasuse skoori, pakkudes hulgaliselt võimalusi mitmekeelse verbi semantika edasiseks hindamiseks ja uurimiseks.', 'ca': "Presentam la primera evaluació de l'aplicabilitat d'un mètode d'arreglament espacial (SPAM) a una mostra de llenguatges tipològicament diversa, i el seu potencial de produir recursos d'evaluació semàntica per sostenir la NLP multillengua, centrant-se en la semàntica de verbs. Demonstrem l'utilitat de l'SpAM en permetre crear ràpidament conjunts de dades d'evaluació a gran escala que equilibrin l'alliniament translingüístic amb l'especificitat del llenguatge. Starting from a shared sample of 825 English verbs, translated into Chinese, Japanese, Finnish, Polish, and Italian, we apply a two-phase annotation process which produces (i) semantic verb classes and (ii) fine-grained similarity scores for nearly 130 thousand verb pairs.  Utilitzem els dos tipus de dades de verbs per a (a) examinar similituds i variacions translingües, i (b) evaluar la capacitat dels models de representació estatics i contextualitzats per reflexionar amb precisió la semàntica dels verbs, contrastant el rendiment de models de pré-formació específics en gran llenguatge amb el seu equivalent multilingüe en agrupament semàntic i similitud lexical, a través de dominis diferents de significat de verbs. Vam publicar les dades de les dues fases com un recurso multillenguatge a gran escala, compost de 85 classes de verbs i gairebé 130k puntuacions de similitud en parell, oferint una riquesa de possibilitats per a més avaluació i investigació sobre la semàntica de verbs multillenguatges.", 'fi': 'Esitämme ensimmäisen arvioinnin spatiaalisen järjestelymenetelmän (SpAM) soveltuvuudesta typologisesti monimuotoiseen kieliotokseen ja sen potentiaalista tuottaa semanttisia arviointiresursseja monikielisen NLP:n tueksi verbi-semantiikkaan keskittyen. Osoitamme SpAM:n hyödyllisyyden mahdollistaa nopean alhaalta ylöspäin suuntautuvan suuren mittakaavan arviointiaineiston luomisen, joka tasapainottaa kielirajat ja kielispesifisyyden. Aloitamme 825 englannin verbin jaetusta otoksesta, jotka on käännetty kiinaksi, japaniksi, suomeksi, puolaksi ja italiaksi, kaksivaiheisen merkintäprosessin, joka tuottaa (i) semanttiset verbiluokat ja (ii) hienorakeiset samankaltaisuuspisteet lähes 130 tuhannelle verbiparille. Käytämme näitä kahta verbitietotyyppiä (a) tutkiaksemme monikielisiä yhtäläisyyksiä ja variaatioita ja (b) arvioidaksemme staattisten ja kontekstualisoitujen esitysmallien kykyä heijastaa tarkasti verbien semantiikkaa, vertaamalla suurten kielispesifisten esikoulutusmallien suorituskykyä niiden monikieliseen vastineeseen semanttiseen klusterointiin ja leksikaaliseen samankaltaisuuteen. verbien merkityksen eri osa-alueilla. Julkaisemme aineiston molemmista vaiheista laajamittaisena monikielisenä resurssina, joka sisältää 85 verbiluokaa ja lähes 130 000 parikohtaista samankaltaisuuspistettä, tarjoten runsaasti mahdollisuuksia monikielisen verbisemantiikan jatkoarviointiin ja tutkimukseen.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo prvo oceno uporabnosti metode prostorske ureditve (SpAM) v tipološko raznolikem jezikovnem vzorcu in njenega potenciala za proizvodnjo semantičnih evalvacijskih virov za podporo večjezičnemu NLP s poudarkom na glagolni semantiki. Prikazujemo uporabnost SpAM-a pri hitrem ustvarjanju obsežnih vrednotenjskih podatkov od spodaj navzgor, ki uravnotežijo medjezično usklajenost z jezikovno specifičnostjo. Iz skupnega vzorca 825 angleških glagolov, prevedenih v kitajsko, japonsko, finsko, poljsko in italijansko, uporabimo dvofazni postopek označevanja, ki ustvarja (i) semantične razrede glagolov in (ii) drobnozrnate podobnosti za skoraj 130 tisoč parov glagolov. Uporabljamo dve vrsti podatkov o glagolih za (a) preučitev medjezičnih podobnosti in variacije ter (b) ocenjevanje zmogljivosti statičnih in kontekstualiziranih modelov reprezentacije, da natančno odražajo semantiko glagolov, pri čemer primerjamo zmogljivost velikih jezikovnih specifičnih modelov predpoučevanja z njihovim večjezičnim ekvivalentom o semantičnem združevanju in leksikalni podobnosti, na različnih področjih pomena glagolov. Podatke iz obeh faz objavljamo kot obsežen večjezični vir, ki obsega 85 glagolskih razredov in skoraj 130.000 parov podobnosti, kar ponuja številne možnosti za nadaljnje vrednotenje in raziskave večjezične semantike glagolov.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da farkon evaluation of the application of a metode-ɗabi'a cikin spaspaspati (SAM) zuwa a samulin misali mai dabar-daban, da ƙarfinsa ya samu'a wa misãlai masu turɓãya, kuma ana samu da mataimaki ya samu'ar ta ƙidãya masu semantic ga ƙarami multi-lingui na NLP, da fokus a kan semantiki na verb. Tuna nuna amfani da SAM in yarda da fara-ƙari-ƙari fara-ƙari na ƙidãya data masu girma da za'a daidaita tsawo-linguin da ƙayyade cikin harshen. Fara daga wani misali da aka raba masu nau'i cikin Ingiriya 825, aka fassara zuwa China, japane, Finnish, Polish, kuma Italian, za'a yi amfani da wani jarrabo mai sanarwa na fassara biyu wanda ke fitar (i) daraja masu semantic verb da (ii) mai daidai matsayin na rubutu wa taki 130 000 nau'i. Tuna yi amfani da wasu nau'i biyu na verb (a) domin jarraba misãlai masu daidaita da linguin-na-daban, kuma (b) ka ƙaddara abincin misãlai na halartacce da wanda za'a yi watayya da shi da watannin da ke daidai, kuma ka yi motsar da aikin littafan da ke ƙayyade misãlai masu cikin lugha mai girma da misalin mulki-lingui masu daidaita na ƙararrar da kuma misalin leksi, domin duk kasuka daban-dabam na cikin ma'anan verb. Munã sakar da data daga duk fasa biyu kamar ma'auni mai girma na mulki-lugha, mai haɗi fassarar 85 da taki-nau'i 130 ko'i biyu masu daidaita, kuma Munã bãyar da mulki'in mutane na ƙarami.", 'bo': 'We present the first evaluation of the application of a spatial arrangement method (SpAM) to a typologically diverse language sample, and its potential to produce semantic evaluation resources to support multilingual NLP, with a focus on verb semantics. འུ་ཅག་གིས་མགྱོག་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་ལྡན་གྱི་སྤྱོད་ཆ་སྒྲིག Starting from a shared sample of 825 English verbs, translated into Chinese, Japanese, Finnish, Polish, and Italian, we apply a two-phase annotation process which produces (i) semantic verb classes and (ii) fine-grained similarity scores for nearly 130 thousand verb pairs. ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་ཅིག་གཟུགས་སུ་ཨིན། བྱ་ཚིག་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་པའི་དྲ་ཁྱད་པར་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་། We release the data from both phases as a large-scale multilingual resource, comprising 85 verb classes and nearly 130k pairwise similarity scores, offering a wealth of possibilities for further evaluation and research on multilingual verb semantics.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את הערכה הראשונה של אפשרות שיטת ארגון מרחבי (SpAM) לדגימת שפה טיפולוגית מגוונת, והפוטנציאל שלה לייצר משאבי הערכה סמנטיים כדי לתמוך NLP רבולוגית, עם התמקדות על סמנטיקה של מילים. אנו מראים את השימוש של SpAM בהאפשרות לייצור מהיר מלמטה למעלה של קבוצות מידע עריכה גדולות שמתאים התאמה לשפתיים עם ספציפיות שפה. בהתחלה מדגימה משותפת של 825 רבים אנגליים, התרגמות לסינים, יפנים, פינים, פולנים ואיטלקים, אנו משתמשים בתהליך ציונים בשתי שלבים שמפיק (i) שיעורי רבים סמנטיים (ii) ציונים דמיונים עצומים של כמעט 130 אלף זוגות רבים. אנו משתמשים בשני סוגי נתונים של אלברים כדי (a) לבדוק דמיונים ודמיונים בין שפות, ולב) להעריך את היכולת של דוגמנים של ייצוג סטטי וקונטליזציאלי ברחבי תחומות שונות של משמעות איברים. אנו משחררים את הנתונים משני השלבים כמשאב רב-שפתי בקנה מידה גדולה, שמכיל 85 שיעורי פרים וכמעט 130 אלף נקודות דומים בין זוגות, מציעים עושר של אפשרויות להערכה נוספת ומחקר על סמנטיקה רבת-שפתית של פרים.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno tualke nggawe aplikasi kanggo nggawe sistem spasiyang karo perusahaan (spAM) sak basa gambar nggawe uga luwih-perusahaan, lan akeh potansi kanggo nggawe semanti kuwi nggawe sistem semanti nggawe NLP multi-lenguangkat, lan kedalke nggawe barang semanti kuwi verb. Monday Mulai kane sampeyan sing dibenalke warni-warni iki banget karo verb Inggris, terulih dumaten Chinese, Chinese, Finsh, polih, lan italian, kita ngubah dhéwé ngerasakno sawar dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem durung kelompok data nggo translation" means "shift" / "displacement Awak dhéwé nggawe data sak hal-hal karo hal-hal multilenguang, ditawak dhéwé kuwi padha sekolah bantuga sing gawe nguasai cah-cah bener lan mênêmêr, gawe ngubah dhéwé kuwi tindakan sing perusahaan kanggo Kemerdekaan karo perusahaan langgar sami tindakan.'}
{'en': 'Measuring Correlation-to-Causation Exaggeration in Press Releases', 'fr': "Mesure de l'exagération de la corrélation avec la causalité dans les communiqués de presse", 'ar': 'قياس المبالغة في الارتباط بالسببية في البيانات الصحفية', 'es': 'Medición de la exageración de la correlación con la causalidad en los comunicados de prensa', 'pt': 'Medindo o exagero de correlação com a causa em comunicados à imprensa', 'ja': 'プレスリリースにおける相関関係と原因の誇張の測定', 'zh': '量新闻稿之与因果关系者增之', 'hi': 'प्रेस विज्ञप्ति में सहसंबंध-से-कारण अतिशयोक्ति को मापना', 'ru': 'Измерение корреляции с преувеличением причинно-следственной связи в пресс-релизах', 'ga': 'Áibhéil Chomhghaol-go-Cás a Thomhas i bPreaseisiúintí', 'el': 'Μέτρηση της επίθεσης συσχέτισης με αιτία σε δελτία τύπου', 'ka': 'კოლეციაციის გახსნა გახსნა', 'hu': 'Az okozati korreláció mérése a sajtóközleményekben', 'mk': 'Мерање на зголемувањето на корелацијата со причината во соопштенијата за печатот', 'it': "Misurare l'esasperazione correlazione-causa nei comunicati stampa", 'kk': 'Басып шығаруларындағы түзету- түзету- түзету эксагерациясы', 'ms': 'Mengukur Pengesahan Hubungan-Kejadian dalam Laporan Teks', 'lt': 'Pranešimuose spaudai nustatyti koreliacijos su priežastimi padidėjimą', 'mn': 'Дараагийн дамжуулалтын дамжуулалтыг хэмжих', 'ml': 'പ്രസ്സ് വിട്ടുവീഴ്ചകളിലുള്ള ബന്ധത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അളന്നുകൊടുക്കുക', 'mt': 'Il-kejl tal-aggravar tal-korrelazzjoni mal-kawża fl-istqarrijiet għall-istampa', 'ro': 'Măsurarea exagerării corelației cu cauză în comunicatele de presă', 'no': 'Å måle korrekteringsutveksling i trykk-utgåver', 'sr': 'Mjerenje ispitivanja korelacije-na-kauziranja u oslobađanju štampe', 'pl': 'Pomiar zwiększenia korelacji z przyczyną w komunikatach prasowych', 'sv': 'Mätning av korrelation-till-orsak Exaggering i pressmeddelanden', 'ta': 'Press Release', 'ur': 'پرس رسیلز میں اصلاح-سے-کاوسیس اضطراب مزید کرتا ہے', 'so': 'Measures Correlation to-Causation Extaggeration in Press Releases', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරිස්ට් නිදහස් වලින් සුදුසුම් වෙන්න', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra Hàn-than-gây-nhiễm trong Thông cáo báo chí', 'bg': 'Измерване на корелацията спрямо причините в прессъобщения', 'da': 'Måling af korrelation-til-årsagsforhøjelse i pressemeddelelser', 'nl': 'Meet Correlatie-to-Causatie Exaggeration in Persberichten', 'id': 'Measuring Correlation-to-Causation Exaggeration in Press Releases', 'de': 'Messung der Korrelation-zu-Causations-Exaggeration in Pressemitteilungen', 'ko': '보도 자료에서 인과관계가 과장된 상관성을 평가하다', 'fa': 'اندازه\u200cبندی تغییرات و تغییرات در آزادی فشار', 'sw': 'Upasuaji wa Kuhusiana na Utumiaji wa Matumizi katika Uhuru wa vyombo vya habari', 'tr': 'Basmak Hatlarynda Düzeltmek Hatlary Hat Etmek', 'sq': 'Measuring Correlation-to-Causation Exaggeration in Press Releases', 'af': 'Maat Korreksie- na- Causation Uitbreiding in Druk Verlossing', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'az': 'Yaz캼m 칂톛tinlikl톛rind톛 d칲z톛ltm톛-to-Causation Exaggeration', 'hy': 'Measuring Correlation-to-Causation Exaggeration in Press Releases', 'hr': 'Izmjerenje isprave za korištenje do kazne u oslobađanju tiska', 'cs': 'Měření zvýšení korelace s příčinou v tiskových zprávách', 'et': 'Korrelatsiooni ja põhjuse liialdamise mõõtmine pressiteadetes', 'bn': 'প্রেসের মুক্তির মধ্যে সংশ্লিষ্ট সংশ্লিষ্ট-থেকে ক্যাশেশন ব্যবস্থা পরিমাপ করা হচ্ছে', 'fi': 'Korrelaation-to-causation liioittelun mittaaminen lehdistötiedotteissa', 'ca': 'Measuring Correlation-to-Causation Exaggeration in Press Communications', 'bs': 'Mjerenje ispitivanja korištenja do kazne u oslobađanju tiska', 'jv': 'Ngubah Kemerdekaan Karo Keusasi Kemerdekaan Dino Kemerdekaan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'למדוד מחמיר קשר לגורם בתודעות עיתונאים', 'sk': 'Merjenje povezanosti s povzročitvijo v sporočilih za javnost', 'bo': 'མཐའ་འཁོར་ལ་ཉར་བཟོ་བྱེད་མིན་པའི་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་ནང་གི་ཚད་གཞི་བཟོ་རྩིས་མཁན་'}
{'en': 'Press releases have an increasingly strong influence on media coverage of health research ; however, they have been found to contain seriously exaggerated claims that can misinform the public and undermine public trust in science. In this study we propose an NLP approach to identify exaggerated causal claims made in health press releases that report on observational studies, which are designed to establish correlational findings, but are often exaggerated as causal. We developed a new corpus and trained models that can identify causal claims in the main statements in a press release. By comparing the claims made in a press release with the corresponding claims in the original research paper, we found that 22 % of press releases made exaggerated causal claims from correlational findings in observational studies. Furthermore, universities exaggerated more often than journal publishers by a ratio of 1.5 to 1. Encouragingly, the exaggeration rate has slightly decreased over the past 10 years, despite the increase of the total number of press releases. More research is needed to understand the cause of the decreasing pattern.', 'ar': 'البيانات الصحفية لها تأثير قوي بشكل متزايد على التغطية الإعلامية للبحوث الصحية ؛ ومع ذلك ، فقد وجد أنها تحتوي على ادعاءات مبالغ فيها بشكل خطير يمكن أن تضلل الجمهور وتقوض ثقة الجمهور في العلوم. في هذه الدراسة ، نقترح نهج معالجة اللغات الطبيعية لتحديد الادعاءات السببية المبالغ فيها الواردة في البيانات الصحفية الصحية التي تشير إلى الدراسات القائمة على الملاحظة ، والتي تم تصميمها لتأسيس نتائج ارتباطية ، ولكن غالبًا ما يتم المبالغة فيها على أنها سببية. لقد طورنا مجموعة جديدة ونماذج مدربة يمكنها تحديد الادعاءات السببية في البيانات الرئيسية في بيان صحفي. بمقارنة الادعاءات الواردة في بيان صحفي مع الادعاءات المقابلة في ورقة البحث الأصلية ، وجدنا أن 22٪ من البيانات الصحفية قدمت ادعاءات سببية مبالغ فيها من النتائج الارتباطية في الدراسات القائمة على الملاحظة. علاوة على ذلك ، بالغت الجامعات أكثر من ناشري المجلات بنسبة 1.5 إلى 1. ومن المشجع أن معدل المبالغة قد انخفض بشكل طفيف خلال السنوات العشر الماضية ، على الرغم من زيادة العدد الإجمالي للبيانات الصحفية. هناك حاجة إلى مزيد من البحث لفهم سبب النمط المتناقص.', 'pt': 'Os comunicados de imprensa têm uma influência cada vez mais forte na cobertura da mídia da pesquisa em saúde; no entanto, verificou-se que contêm alegações seriamente exageradas que podem desinformar o público e minar a confiança pública na ciência. Neste estudo, propomos uma abordagem de PNL para identificar alegações causais exageradas feitas em comunicados de imprensa de saúde que relatam estudos observacionais, que são projetados para estabelecer resultados correlacionais, mas muitas vezes são exageradas como causais. Desenvolvemos um novo corpus e treinamos modelos que podem identificar alegações causais nas principais declarações de um press release. Ao comparar as alegações feitas em um comunicado à imprensa com as alegações correspondentes no trabalho de pesquisa original, descobrimos que 22% dos comunicados à imprensa fizeram alegações causais exageradas a partir de descobertas correlacionais em estudos observacionais. Além disso, as universidades exageraram com mais frequência do que os editores de periódicos em uma proporção de 1,5 para 1. De forma encorajadora, a taxa de exagero diminuiu ligeiramente nos últimos 10 anos, apesar do aumento do número total de comunicados à imprensa. Mais pesquisas são necessárias para entender a causa do padrão decrescente.', 'fr': "Les communiqués de presse ont une influence de plus en plus forte sur la couverture médiatique de la recherche en santé\xa0; cependant, ils contiennent des allégations fortement exagérées qui peuvent désinformer le public et miner la confiance du public dans la science. Dans cette étude, nous proposons une approche de la PNL pour identifier les allégations causales exagérées faites dans les communiqués de presse sur la santé qui font état d'études observationnelles, qui sont conçues pour établir des résultats corrélationnels, mais qui sont souvent exagérées en tant que causales. Nous avons développé un nouveau corpus et des modèles formés qui peuvent identifier les allégations causales dans les principales déclarations d'un communiqué de presse. En comparant les affirmations faites dans un communiqué de presse avec les affirmations correspondantes dans le document de recherche original, nous avons constaté que 22\xa0% des communiqués de presse contenaient des allégations causales exagérées à partir de résultats corrélationnels dans des études d'observation. En outre, les universités ont exagéré plus souvent que les éditeurs de revues dans un ratio de 1,5 pour 1. Fait encourageant, le taux d'exagération a légèrement diminué au cours des 10 dernières années, malgré l'augmentation du nombre total de communiqués de presse. Des recherches supplémentaires sont nécessaires pour comprendre la cause de cette tendance à la baisse.", 'es': 'Los comunicados de prensa tienen una influencia cada vez mayor en la cobertura mediática de la investigación en salud; sin embargo, se ha descubierto que contienen afirmaciones muy exageradas que pueden desinformar al público y socavar la confianza del público en la ciencia. En este estudio proponemos un enfoque de PNL para identificar afirmaciones causales exageradas hechas en comunicados de prensa de salud que informan sobre estudios observacionales, que están diseñados para establecer hallazgos correlacionales, pero que a menudo se exageran como causales. Desarrollamos un nuevo corpus y modelos capacitados que pueden identificar reclamos causales en las declaraciones principales de un comunicado de prensa. Al comparar las afirmaciones hechas en un comunicado de prensa con las afirmaciones correspondientes del artículo de investigación original, descubrimos que el 22% de los comunicados de prensa hicieron afirmaciones causales exageradas a partir de hallazgos correlacionales en estudios observacionales. Además, las universidades exageraron más a menudo que los editores de revistas en una proporción de 1,5 a 1. Es alentador que la tasa de exageración haya disminuido ligeramente en los últimos 10 años, a pesar del aumento del número total de comunicados de prensa. Se necesita más investigación para entender la causa del patrón decreciente.', 'ja': 'プレスリリースは、医療研究のメディア報道にますます強い影響を及ぼします。しかし、それらには、大衆に誤った情報を提供し、科学に対する国民の信頼を損なう可能性のある重大な誇張された主張が含まれていることが判明しています。 この研究では、相関的な知見を確立するように設計されているが、しばしば因果関係として誇張されている観察研究について報告する健康プレスリリースで行われた誇張された因果関係の主張を特定するためのNLPアプローチを提案します。 私たちは、プレスリリースの主な声明の中で因果関係の主張を識別できる新しいコーパスとトレーニングされたモデルを開発しました。 プレスリリースでの主張とオリジナルの研究論文での主張を比較すると、プレスリリースの22%が観察研究での相関的知見から誇張された因果関係の主張を行っていることが分かりました。 さらに、大学はジャーナル出版社よりも1.5対1の比率で誇張されることが多かった。 プレスリリースの総数が増加しているにもかかわらず、過去10年間で誇張率はわずかに減少している。 パターンの減少の原因を理解するためには、より多くの研究が必要である。', 'hi': 'प्रेस विज्ञप्ति स्वास्थ्य अनुसंधान के मीडिया कवरेज पर तेजी से मजबूत प्रभाव पड़ता है; हालांकि, उन्हें गंभीर रूप से अतिरंजित दावों को शामिल करने के लिए पाया गया है जो जनता को गलत जानकारी दे सकते हैं और विज्ञान में सार्वजनिक विश्वास को कमजोर कर सकते हैं। इस अध्ययन में हम स्वास्थ्य प्रेस विज्ञप्ति में किए गए अतिरंजित कारण दावों की पहचान करने के लिए एक एनएलपी दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो अवलोकन संबंधी अध्ययनों पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं, जो सहसंबंध निष्कर्षों को स्थापित करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए हैं, लेकिन अक्सर कारण के रूप में अतिरंजित होते हैं। हमने एक नया कॉर्पस और प्रशिक्षित मॉडल विकसित किया है जो एक प्रेस विज्ञप्ति में मुख्य बयानों में कारण दावों की पहचान कर सकता है। मूल शोध पत्र में संबंधित दावों के साथ एक प्रेस विज्ञप्ति में किए गए दावों की तुलना करके, हमने पाया कि 22% प्रेस विज्ञप्तियों ने अवलोकन अध्ययनों में सहसंबंध निष्कर्षों से अतिरंजित कारण दावे किए। इसके अलावा, विश्वविद्यालयों ने 1.5 से 1 के अनुपात से पत्रिका प्रकाशकों की तुलना में अधिक बार अतिरंजित किया। उत्साहजनक रूप से, प्रेस विज्ञप्तियों की कुल संख्या में वृद्धि के बावजूद, पिछले 10 वर्षों में अतिशयोक्ति दर में थोड़ी कमी आई है। घटते पैटर्न के कारण को समझने के लिए अधिक शोध की आवश्यकता है।', 'zh': '新闻稿于媒体报道卫生益大。 然而见增益之说,或误公众而坏公科学之信。 于此论之,NLP法以识康健新闻稿增益因果声明,新闻稿以观性研究,指立相关性见,而常增大因果关系。 开一新语料库,识新闻稿中因果关系。 以新闻稿之声明较之,见22%之新闻稿,增益因果关系声。 此外,大学比期刊出版商更向夸大其词,比例为1.5:1。 令人鼓舞者,虽新闻稿有所增益,然往10年中,增其词率少降。 须更多究知降式。', 'ru': 'Пресс-релизы оказывают все более сильное влияние на освещение средствами массовой информации медицинских исследований; однако было установлено, что они содержат сильно преувеличенные утверждения, которые могут дезинформировать общественность и подорвать доверие общественности к науке. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем подход NLP для выявления преувеличенных причинно-следственных связей, сделанных в пресс-релизах о состоянии здоровья, в которых сообщается об обсервационных исследованиях, предназначенных для установления корреляционных результатов, но часто преувеличенных как причинно-следственные связи. Мы разработали новый корпус и обученные модели, которые могут идентифицировать причинные претензии в основных заявлениях в пресс-релизе. Сравнивая утверждения, сделанные в пресс-релизе, с соответствующими утверждениями в первоначальной исследовательской работе, мы обнаружили, что 22% пресс-релизов содержали завышенные причинно-следственные связи из корреляционных выводов в наблюдательных исследованиях. Кроме того, университеты чаще преувеличивали число издателей журналов в соотношении 1,5 к 1. Обнадеживает то, что за последние 10 лет показатель преувеличения несколько снизился, несмотря на увеличение общего числа пресс-релизов. Необходимы дополнительные исследования, чтобы понять причину ухудшающейся картины.', 'ga': 'Bíonn tionchar níos láidre ag preasráitis ar chlúdach na meán ar thaighde sláinte; Fuarthas amach, áfach, go bhfuil éilimh áibhéil dáiríre iontu a d’fhéadfadh an pobal a chur ar an eolas go mícheart agus a bhainfeadh an bonn de mhuinín an phobail san eolaíocht. Sa staidéar seo molaimid cur chuige NLP chun éilimh chúiseacha áibhéalacha a aithint a dhéantar i bpreaseisiúintí sláinte a thuairiscíonn ar staidéir bhreathnaithe, atá deartha chun torthaí comhghaolmhara a bhunú, ach a ndéantar áibhéil orthu go minic mar chúisí. D’fhorbraíomar corpas nua agus múnlaí oilte ar féidir éilimh chúiseacha a aithint sna príomhráitis i bpreaseisiúint. Trí chomparáid a dhéanamh idir na héilimh a rinneadh i bpreaseisiúint agus na héilimh chomhfhreagracha sa bhunpháipéar taighde, fuaireamar amach go ndearna 22% de na preaseisiúintí éilimh chúiseacha áibhéalacha ó thorthaí comhghaolmhara i staidéir bhreathnaithe. Ina theannta sin, rinne ollscoileanna áibhéil níos minice ná foilsitheoirí irisleabhair le cóimheas 1.5 go 1. Is ábhar misnigh é, tá laghdú beag tagtha ar an ráta áibhéil le 10 mbliana anuas, in ainneoin méadú ar líon iomlán na bpreaseisiúintí. Tá gá le tuilleadh taighde chun an chúis atá leis an bpatrún laghdaitheach a thuiscint.', 'el': 'Τα δελτία τύπου έχουν ολοένα και μεγαλύτερη επιρροή στην κάλυψη των μέσων ενημέρωσης σχετικά με την έρευνα για την υγεία. Ωστόσο, διαπιστώθηκε ότι περιέχουν σοβαρά υπερβολικούς ισχυρισμούς που μπορούν να παραπληρώσουν το κοινό και να υπονομεύσουν την εμπιστοσύνη του κοινού στην επιστήμη. Στην παρούσα μελέτη προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση για τον εντοπισμό υπερβολικών αιτιακών ισχυρισμών που διατυπώνονται σε δελτία τύπου υγείας που αναφέρονται σε παρατηρητικές μελέτες, οι οποίες έχουν σχεδιαστεί για να καθορίσουν συσχετιστικά ευρήματα, αλλά συχνά υπερβάλλονται ως αιτιώδεις. Αναπτύξαμε ένα νέο σώμα και εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα που μπορούν να εντοπίσουν αιτιώδεις αξιώσεις στις κύριες δηλώσεις ενός δελτίου τύπου. Συγκρίνοντας τους ισχυρισμούς που διατυπώθηκαν σε ένα δελτίο τύπου με τους αντίστοιχους ισχυρισμούς στην αρχική ερευνητική εργασία, διαπιστώσαμε ότι 22% των δελτίων τύπου προέβαλαν υπερβολικούς αιτιώδεις ισχυρισμούς από συσχετιστικά ευρήματα σε παρατηρητικές μελέτες. Επιπλέον, τα πανεπιστήμια υπερβάλλουν πιο συχνά από τους εκδότες περιοδικών με αναλογία 1.5 προς 1. Είναι ενθαρρυντικό ότι το ποσοστό υπερβολής έχει μειωθεί ελαφρώς τα τελευταία δέκα χρόνια, παρά την αύξηση του συνολικού αριθμού των ανακοινώσεων τύπου. Χρειάζεται περισσότερη έρευνα για να κατανοήσουμε την αιτία της μείωσης του μοτίβου.', 'it': "I comunicati stampa hanno un'influenza sempre più forte sulla copertura mediatica della ricerca sanitaria; Tuttavia, è stato riscontrato che contengono affermazioni gravemente esagerate che possono disininformare il pubblico e minare la fiducia pubblica nella scienza. In questo studio proponiamo un approccio NLP per identificare affermazioni causali esagerate fatte nei comunicati stampa sulla salute che riportano su studi osservazionali, che sono progettati per stabilire risultati correlazionali, ma sono spesso esagerati come causali. Abbiamo sviluppato un nuovo corpus e modelli addestrati in grado di identificare le affermazioni causali nelle dichiarazioni principali di un comunicato stampa. Confrontando le affermazioni fatte in un comunicato stampa con le affermazioni corrispondenti nel documento di ricerca originale, abbiamo scoperto che il 22% dei comunicati stampa ha fatto affermazioni causali esagerate da risultati correlati in studi osservazionali. Inoltre, le università esagerano più spesso degli editori di riviste con un rapporto di 1,5 a 1. Incoraggiante, il tasso di esagerazione è leggermente diminuito negli ultimi 10 anni, nonostante l'aumento del numero totale di comunicati stampa. Sono necessarie ulteriori ricerche per capire la causa del modello decrescente.", 'hu': 'A sajtóközlemények egyre erősebb befolyást gyakorolnak az egészségügyi kutatások média lefedettségére; azonban megállapították, hogy ezek súlyosan túlzott állításokat tartalmaznak, amelyek félrevezethetik a nyilvánosságot, és alááshatják a közvélemény tudományba vetett bizalmát. Ebben a tanulmányban egy NLP megközelítést javasolunk az egészségügyi sajtóközleményekben tett túlzott okozati állítások azonosítására, amelyek megfigyelési vizsgálatokról szólnak, és amelyek korrelációs eredmények megállapítására szolgálnak, de gyakran okozati összefüggésként túlzottak. Kifejlesztettünk egy új korpuszt és képzett modelleket, amelyek képesek azonosítani az okozati állításokat egy sajtóközleményben. A sajtóközleményben tett állításokat összehasonlítva az eredeti kutatási tanulmányban megfogalmazott állításokkal, megállapítottuk, hogy a sajtóközlemények 22%-a túlzott okozati állításokat tett a megfigyelési vizsgálatok korrelációs eredményeiből. Továbbá az egyetemek gyakrabban túlztak, mint a folyóiratok kiadói, 1,5-1 arányban. Bátorító módon a túlzási arány az elmúlt 10 évben kissé csökkent, a sajtóközlemények számának növekedése ellenére. További kutatásokra van szükség a csökkenő minta okának megértéséhez.', 'kk': 'Басып шығарулары медиа саулық зерттеулерінің мәліметтеріне көп күш әсері бар. Бірақ олардың көпшілігін қайталап, көпшілікті ғылымда сенімді қайталап, көпшілікті қайталап, көпшілік сенімді қайталап тұрады. Бұл зерттеулерде біз NLP бағдарламасын медицински пресс жұмысындағы көптеген себептерді анықтау үшін көптеген көптеген себептерді таңдау үшін жұмыс істейміз. Бұл бағдарламалық зерттеулердің туралы хабарламалард Біз басып шығаруда негізгі мәліметтерді анықтай алатын жаңа корпус және оқылған моделдерді жасадық. Бастапқы зерттеу қағазындағы сәйкесті жағдайларды салыстырып, 22% пресс релизацияларының көмектесілік зерттеулерінің корелациялық тапсырмалардың көмектесіліктерінен өзгертілген себептер Сонымен қатар, университеттер күнделік басып шығарушылардан көп жұмыс істейді 1,5- 1 қатынасы. Басып шығарудың жалпы санын өзгерту үшін, соңғы 10 жыл бойынша бөлшектеу жиілігі көбейтіп келеді. Өлшейту үлгісінің себебін түсіну үшін бірнеше зерттеу керек.', 'ka': 'პროცენტის გახსნა უფრო ძალიან ძალიან მოვლენება მედიაში სიჯანმრთვის შესახებ; მაგრამ, ისინი აღმოჩნენ, რომ ისინი მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოადგენება, რომლებიც შეუძლია გაუცნობა ადამიანის და გაუცნობა ადამიანის მეცნიერებას. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ NLP-ის პროგრამა, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია სინამდვილეობის პრესში გამოსახულებული წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია კოლელაციული მონაცემებისთვის, მაგ ჩვენ განვითარეთ ახალი კორპუს და განვითარებული მოდელები, რომლებიც შეუძლიათ განვითარება მიზეზიდან მიზეზიდან მიზეზიდან წარმოდგენების მიზეზიდა შემდგომარებით, რომლებიც პრესტის გამოსახულებაში გავაკეთებულია, რომლებიც შემდგომარებულია განსხვავებებით ორიგინალური სწავლობის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კ დამატებით, სუნივერსიტეტები უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენა, ვიდრე დურნალის პოვექტორებისგან 1,5-ის 1-ის განმავლობით. უფრო დარწმუნებელია, გადარწმუნებული სიმაღლე შემდეგ 10 წლის განმავლობაში ცოტა გადარწმუნებელია, თუმცა პრესი გადარწმუნებული სიმაღლე გადარწმუნებელია. უფრო მეტი შესწავლობა უნდა იცოდეთ მიზეზი, რომელიც შემცირებული სტრუქტის მიზეზი.', 'mk': 'Изјавите за печатот имаат сé поголемо влијание врз медиумското покривање на здравственото истражување; Сепак, се откри дека тие содржат сериозно претерани тврдења кои можат да ја погрешат јавноста и да ја поткопуваат довербата на јавноста во науката. Во оваа студија предложуваме пристап на НЛП за идентификување на претераните причинни тврдења издадени во соопштенијата за медиумите за здравство кои го објавија извештајот за набљудувачките студии, кои се дизајнирани за воспоставување корелационални откритија, но честопати се Развивме нов корпус и обучени модели кои можат да ги идентификуваат причинните тврдења во главните изјави во соопштението за печатот. Со споредба на тврдењата на медиумите во соопштението за печатот со соодветните тврдења во оригиналниот истражувачки документ, откривме дека 22 отсто од соопштенијата за печатот дадоа претерани причинни тврдења од корелационалните откритија во набљудувачки Покрај тоа, универзитетите повеќе често претеруваа отколку издавачите на дневниците за однос од 1,5 до 1. Охрабрувачки, стапката на претерување малку се намали во текот на изминатите 10 години, и покрај зголемувањето на вкупниот број на соопштенија за печатот. Повеќе истражувања се потребни за да се разбере причината за намалувањето на шемата.', 'lt': 'Press releases have an increasingly strong influence on media coverage of health research;  tačiau nustatyta, kad jose yra rimtai pernelyg didelių teiginių, kurie gali klaidingai informuoti visuomenę ir pakenkti visuomenės pasitikėjimui mokslu. Šiame tyrime siūlome NLP metodą nustatyti pernelyg didelius priežastinius teiginius, pateiktus pranešimuose spaudai apie sveikatą, kuriuose pateikiama stebėjimo tyrimų ataskaita, kuria siekiama nustatyti koreliacines išvadas, tačiau dažnai yra pernelyg dideli kaip priežastiniai. Sukūrėme naują korpusą ir parengėme mokymus, kurie pagrindiniuose pranešime spaudai gali nustatyti priežastinius teiginius. Palygindami pranešime spaudai pateiktus teiginius su atitinkamais teiginiais pradiniame mokslinių tyrimų dokumente, nustatėme, kad 22 proc. pranešimų spaudai pateikė pernelyg didelius priežastinius teiginius, gautus remiantis koreliaciniais stebėjimo tyrimų rezultatais. Be to, universitetai dažniau nei žurnalų leidėjai pernelyg padidėjo santykiu nuo 1,5 iki 1. Per pastaruosius 10 metų pernelyg didelis pranešimų spaudai skaičius šiek tiek sumažėjo. Reikia daugiau mokslinių tyrimų, kad būtų suprantama mažėjančio modelio priežastis.', 'mt': 'L-istqarrijiet għall-istampa għandhom influwenza dejjem aktar qawwija fuq il-kopertura tal-midja tar-riċerka dwar is-saħħa; madankollu, instab li fihom dikjarazzjonijiet esaġerati serjament li jistgħu jinfurmaw ħażin lill-pubbliku u jimminaw il-fiduċja pubblika fix-xjenza. F’dan l-istudju qed nipproponu approċċ tal-NLP biex jiġu identifikati dikjarazzjonijiet kawżali esaġerati magħmula fi stqarrijiet għall-istampa dwar is-saħħa li jirrapportaw dwar studji ta’ osservazzjoni, li huma mfassla biex jistabbilixxu sejbiet korrelazzjonali, iżda ta’ spiss huma esaġerati bħala kawżali. We developed a new corpus and trained models that can identify causal claims in the main statements in a press release.  Billi tqabblu l-istqarrijiet magħmula fi stqarrija għall-istampa mal-istqarrijiet korrispondenti fid-dokument oriġinali tar-riċerka, sabu li 22% tal-istqarrijiet għall-istampa għamlu stqarrijiet kawżali esaġerati minn sejbiet korrelazzjonali fi studji osservazzjonali. Barra minn hekk, l-universitajiet eża ġeraw aktar spiss mill-pubblikaturi tal-ġurnali bi proporzjon ta’ 1.5 sa 1. B’mod inkoraġġanti, ir-rata ta’ eżaġerazzjoni naqset ftit matul l-aħħar 10 snin, minkejja ż-żieda fin-numru totali ta’ stqarrijiet għall-istampa. Hemm bżonn ta’ aktar riċerka biex tinftiehem il-kawża tax-xejra li qed tonqos.', 'ms': 'Laporan pers mempunyai pengaruh semakin kuat pada penyamaran media penyelidikan kesehatan; bagaimanapun, mereka telah ditemukan mengandungi klaim yang terlalu berlebihan yang boleh salah maklumat masyarakat dan merusak kepercayaan masyarakat dalam sains. Dalam kajian ini kami cadangkan pendekatan NLP untuk mengenalpasti penyebab yang berlebihan yang dibuat dalam laporan media kesehatan yang melaporkan tentang kajian pengawasan, yang direka untuk menetapkan penemuan korelasi, tetapi sering berlebihan sebagai penyebab. Kami mengembangkan korpus baru dan model terlatih yang boleh mengenalpasti klaim penyebab dalam pernyataan utama dalam laporan pers. Dengan membandingkan klaim yang dibuat dalam laporan pers dengan klaim yang sepadan dalam kertas penyelidikan asal, kami mendapati bahawa 22% laporan pers membuat klaim penyebab berlebihan dari penemuan korelasi dalam kajian pengawasan. Selain itu, universiti lebih sering melebihi daripada penerbit jurnal dengan nisbah 1.5 kepada 1. Menarik sekali, kadar pelecehan telah sedikit menurun dalam 10 tahun terakhir, walaupun jumlah jumlah pemberitahuan pers meningkat. More research is needed to understand the cause of the decreasing pattern.', 'ml': 'പ്രസ്സ് സ്വതന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ആശ്വാസത്തിന്\u200dറെ പരിശോധനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള് എന്നാലും അവര്\u200dക്ക് കാണാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് ജനങ്ങളെ തെറ്റായി അറിയിക്കാനും ശാസ്ത്രത്തിലെ പൊതുവിശ്വാസം കുറച്ച് ക ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു NLP പ്രായോഗ്യം നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ആശ്വാസ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന് We developed a new corpus and trained models that can identify causal claims in the main statements in a press release.  ഒരു പ്രസിഡന്\u200d വിട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d മുഖേന റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു ആദ്യ പഠനത്തില്\u200d 22 അതിനുശേഷം, വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികങ്ങള്\u200d 1.5 ല്\u200d നിന്നും 1 ല്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രകടന്മാരെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രാധാന്യം കൂടുതല വളരെ സന്തോഷത്തോടെ, കഴിഞ്ഞ പത്തു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കുറച്ച് കുറച്ച് കുറച്ച് കുറവ് വരുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. മൊത്തം പ്രസ്സ് സ കുറച്ചു കൂടി നോക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കാരണം മനസ്സിലാക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്.', 'pl': 'Komunikaty prasowe mają coraz silniejszy wpływ na media dotyczące badań zdrowotnych; Jednakże stwierdzono, że zawierają one poważnie przesadzone twierdzenia, które mogą błędnie informować społeczeństwo i podważyć zaufanie społeczeństwa do nauki. W niniejszym opracowaniu proponujemy podejście NLP do identyfikacji przesadnych twierdzeń przyczynowych zawartych w komunikatach prasowych dotyczących zdrowia, które opisują badania obserwacyjne, które mają na celu ustalenie wyników korelacji, ale często są przesadzone jako przyczynowe. Opracowaliśmy nowy korpus i przeszkolone modele, które mogą zidentyfikować roszczenia przyczynowe w głównych oświadczeniach w komunikacie prasowym. Porównując twierdzenia zawarte w komunikacie prasowym z odpowiednimi twierdzeniami zawartymi w oryginalnym artykule badawczym, stwierdziliśmy, że 22% komunikatów prasowych zawierało przesadne twierdzenia przyczynowe z wyników korelacji w badaniach obserwacyjnych. Ponadto uniwersytety częściej przesadzały niż wydawcy czasopism o stosunek 1,5 do 1. Co zachęcające, wskaźnik przesady nieznacznie spadł w ciągu ostatnich dziesięciu lat, mimo wzrostu ogólnej liczby komunikatów prasowych. Potrzebne są więcej badań, aby zrozumieć przyczynę malejącego wzorca.', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн хэвлэл нь эрүүл мэндийн судалгааны мэдээлэл дээр илүү их хүчтэй нөлөөлдөг. Гэхдээ тэд олон нийтийн шинжлэх ухаанд итгэлтэй буруу болон нийтийн итгэлтэй буруу байдлаар үнэхээр хэцүү утгатай байдаг. Энэ судалгаанд бид NLP-ийн арга зам нь эрүүл мэндийн хэвлэлд хийгдсэн хүчирхийллийн шалтгааныг тодорхойлдохын тулд харилцааны ололтуудын тухай мэдээллийн тухай мэдээллийг илэрхийлж байна. Энэ нь харилцааны ололтуудыг бүтээх зорилготой, гэхдээ Бид сэтгүүлийн хэвлэлийн үндсэн хэвлэлүүдийн шалтгааныг тодорхойлж чадах шинэ корпус болон сургалтын загварыг бүтээсэн. Судалгааны хэвлэлд хийсэн утга харьцуулахад бид анхны судалгааны хэвлэлийн харьцуулалтын 22% нь ажиглах судалгааны харьцуулалтын харьцуулалтын харьцуулалтын шалтгааныг нэмэгдүүлсэн. Үүнээс гадна сургуулиуд сэтгүүлийн хэвлэгчдийн хувьд 1.5-1 хувьд ихэвчлэн илүү ихэвчлэн нэмэгдсэн. Хамгийн сэтгэл хөдлөл, өнгөрсөн 10 жилийн турш нийт хэвлэлийн нэмэгдсэн тоо ч бага багасгасан. Илүү олон судалгаа багасгах загварын шалтгааныг ойлгохын тулд хэрэгтэй.', 'no': 'Press releases have an increasingly strong influence on media coverage of health research; Dei har imidlertid funne å innehalda alvorleg overfordrede tiltak som kan misforma offentlege og understreka offentlege tillit på vitenskap. I denne studien foreslår vi ein NLP-tilnærming for å identifisera overfor årsakelsetterspørsmål som er gjort i helsetruk, gjer det rapportert om observasjonsstudier, som er lagt til å oppretta korrelasjonsvindauge, men ofte blir overført som grunn. Vi utvikla eit nytt korpus og trengte modell som kan identifisera grunnleggjande uttrykk i hovuduttrykket i ein press release. På samanlikning av etterspørsmålene som er gjort i ein press-utskrift med tilsvarande etterspørsmålene i den opprinnelige forskningspapiret, fann vi at 22 % av trykk-utskriftene er gjort forbetra årspørsmålene frå korrelasjonelle finningar i observasjonsstudiar. I tillegg har universitetet overslagt meir ofte enn dagbokstavarar med forholdet mellom 1,5 til 1. I tillegg til økningen av totalt tal på utslipp av trykk, har overraskingsstarten nedgang i løpet av dei siste 10 år. Det er nødvendig å forstå meir forskning for å forstå årsaken av mønsteret som reduserer.', 'ro': 'Comunicatele de presă au o influență din ce în ce mai puternică asupra acoperirii mass-media a cercetării în domeniul sănătății; Cu toate acestea, s-a constatat că acestea conțin afirmații grav exagerate care pot informa greșit publicul și submina încrederea publică în știință. În acest studiu propunem o abordare PNL pentru identificarea afirmațiilor cauzale exagerate făcute în comunicatele de presă de sănătate care raportează studii observaționale, care sunt concepute pentru a stabili constatările corelationale, dar sunt adesea exagerate ca cauzale. Am dezvoltat un corpus nou și modele instruite care pot identifica afirmațiile cauzale în declarațiile principale dintr-un comunicat de presă. Comparând afirmațiile făcute într-un comunicat de presă cu afirmațiile corespunzătoare din lucrarea de cercetare originală, am constatat că 22% din comunicatele de presă au făcut afirmații cauzale exagerate din constatările corelationale din studiile observaționale. În plus, universitățile au exagerat mai des decât editorii de reviste cu un raport de 1,5 la 1. Încurajator, rata exagerării a scăzut ușor în ultimii 10 ani, în ciuda creșterii numărului total de comunicate de presă. Mai multe cercetări sunt necesare pentru a înțelege cauza modelului descrescător.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් විශාලයෙන් විශාලයෙන් මධ්\u200dයම ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ් ඒත්, ඔවුන්ට සොයාගත්තා විද්\u200dයාවයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී අපි NLP ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ස්වාස්ත්වය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් විශ්වාස කරපු හේතුවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා  අපි අලුත් කොර්පස් එකක් විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වි මුලින් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් කරපු ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් සමග සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරති ඉතින්, විශ්වාස්ත්වය 1.5 වෙනුවෙන් 1 වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරකාශකයන්ට වඩා වඩා විශ්වාස කරනවා. සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අවුරුදු 10 කින් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙනවා. වැඩි පරීක්ෂණාව අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා විනාශ කරපු ප්\u200dරමාණය තේරුම් ගන්න.', 'so': 'Saamaynta pressuriyadu waxey ku saameyn dheeraad ah ku leedahay macluumaadka ku saabsan waxbarashada caafimaadka; Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa laga helaa in ay ku jirto dacwado aad u xadgudbay oo si qalloocan u sheegi karo dadyowga kalsoonaanta cilmiga. Waxbarashadan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qalabka NLP si aan u caddeyno cadaawayaasha sababta ah ee ay dardaaran daryeelka caafimaadka lagu sameeyo ay wargeliyaan waxbarashada observation, taas oo loo qoray in la dhiso heshiiska xiriirka, laakiin inta badan waxaa loo sii kordhaa sabab. Waxaannu korinay qaab cusub oo lagu tababaray, oo ku caddeyn karo dacwad sabab ah oo ku saabsan furriinka waandishka. Markii aan isbarbardhigno dacwadihii lagu soo dejiyey furriinka waandishka oo ku haboon codsigii hore ee warqada waxbarashada, waxaan ogaanay in 22 % oo ka mid ah warqada waandishku ay ka soo baxeen dacwado sabab ah oo ka soo saaray heshiiska xiriirka waxbarashada. Intaas waxaa dheer in jaamacadu ay marar badan ka sii badnaayeen warqada jardiinada oo ay ka tirsan yihiin 1.5-1. Farax leh, in kastoo ay kordhiso tirada guud ee press la xiriiray ay badnaan tahay 10 sano ee soo dhaafay. Waxbarasho dheeraad ah waxaa loo baahan yahay in la fahamo sababta uu soo kordhiyo qaababka.', 'sr': 'Puštanja tiska imaju sve jači uticaj na medijsko pokrivanje istraživanja zdravlja; međutim, pronađeni su da sadrže ozbiljno pretjerane tvrdnje koje mogu pogrešno formirati javnost i podnići javno povjerenje u nauku. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo pristup NLP-a za identifikaciju pretjeranih uzročnih tvrdnji koji su napravljeni u tisku zdravstva, koji prijavljuju o promatranjima ispitivanja, koji su dizajnirani za uspostavljanje korelacijskih nalaza, ali često su pretjerani kao uzrok. Razvili smo novi korpus i obučeni modeli koji mogu identifikovati uzrokovane tvrdnje u glavnim izjavama u objavljivanju novinara. Uspoređujući tvrdnje koje su napravljene u objavljivanju štampe sa odgovarajućim tvrdbama iz originalnog istraživačkog papira, otkrili smo da 22% objavljivanja štampa čini pretjerano uzrokovane tvrdnje od korelacijskih nalaza u promatračnim ispitivanjima. Osim toga, univerziteti su češće pretjerali od izdavača dnevnika po odnosu od 1,5 do 1. Zanimljivo, stopa pretjeranja se malo smanjila u proteklih 10 godina, uprkos povećanju ukupnog broja otpuštanja novinara. Treba još istraživanja da bi razumeli uzrok smanjivanja obrazaca.', 'sv': 'Pressmeddelanden har ett allt större inflytande på mediebevakningen av hälsoforskningen. De har emellertid konstaterats innehålla allvarligt överdrivna påståenden som kan missinformera allmänheten och undergräva allmänhetens förtroende för vetenskapen. I denna studie föreslår vi en NLP-metod för att identifiera överdrivna orsakssammanhang som görs i hälsopressmeddelanden som rapporterar om observationsstudier, vilka är utformade för att fastställa korrelationsresultat, men ofta överdrivna som orsakssammanhang. Vi utvecklade en ny korpus och utbildade modeller som kan identifiera orsakssamband i huvuduttalandena i ett pressmeddelande. Genom att jämföra påståendena i ett pressmeddelande med motsvarande påståenden i den ursprungliga forskningsartikeln fann vi att 22% av pressmeddelandena gjorde överdrivna orsaksåtgärder från korrelationsresultat i observationsstudier. Dessutom överdrev universiteten oftare än tidskriftsförlag med ett förhållande på 1,5 till 1. Uppmuntrande har överdriften minskat något under de senaste tio åren, trots ökningen av det totala antalet pressmeddelanden. Mer forskning behövs för att förstå orsaken till det sjunkande mönstret.', 'ur': 'فشار رسولوں کے ذریعے میڈیا کی سلامتی تحقیقات کی پردہ پر زیادہ سخت اثر ہے۔ لیکن ان کو معلوم ہو گیا ہے کہ وہ بہت زیادہ زیادہ مہربانی کی ادعات رکھتے ہیں جو سب لوگوں کو غلط طریقہ بنا سکتے ہیں اور سائنس کے اعتماد کو کمزور کر سکتے ہیں۔ اس تحقیقات میں ہم نے NLP طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کی ہے کہ سلامتی پرسس میں بہت زیادہ دلیل ادعا کریں جو اظہار کی تحقیقات کے بارے میں گزاری جاتی ہیں، جو مرتبہ اظہار کرنے کے لئے طراحی کی جاتی ہیں، لیکن اغلبہ دلیل سے زیادہ زیادہ اضافہ کئے جاتے ہیں. ہم نے ایک نوی کورپوس اور تعلیم کی موڈل پیدا کی ہے جو ایک پرس پریزل میں اصلی باتوں میں دلیل کی تعلیم پہچان سکتی ہے۔ ہم نے پایا کہ پرس پرس پریلس میں مقابلہ کرنے کے ذریعہ سے مساوی تحقیقات کاغذ میں مقابلہ کرنے والی ادعات کے مطابق 22 فیصد پریلس پریلس کی تعلیمات کی تعلیمات کی نسبت زیادہ زیادہ دلیل ادعات کی۔ اس کے علاوہ، یونیورسٹی ۱.۵ سے ۱ کی نسبت مجلس پھیلانے والوں سے زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ افزایش کی گئی۔ اچھے 10 سالوں میں بہت کم کم کم ہو چکا ہے، اگرچہ جمعی جمعی جمعی جمعی رخصت کے بڑھنے کی وجہ سے۔ اور بہت زیادہ تحقیقات کی ضرورت ہے کہ کم کرنے کے سبب کو سمجھ سکیں.', 'ta': 'அழுத்தும் வெளியீடுகளுக்கு இன்னும் வலிமையான பாக்கியம் ஊடகங்களின் மருத்துவ ஆராய்ச்சியின் மேல்  ஆனால், அவர்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள் என்றாலும் அது மக்களை தவறான அறிவிப்பு மற்றும் அறிவியல் நம்பிக்கை குறைவாக இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் நாம் ஒரு NLP முறைமையை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் அதிகப்படுத்தப்பட்ட காரணத்தின் காரணங்களை உடன்படுத்த நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய கோர்ப்ஸ் மற்றும் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கினோம். அது ஒரு பத்திரிக்கை வெளியீட்டில் காரணத By comparing the claims made in a press release with the corresponding claims in the original research paper, we found that 22% of press releases made exaggerated causal claims from correlational findings in observational studies.  அதற்கு மேலும், பல்கலைப்பார்விகள் 1.5 அடுத்து 1 விகிதத்தால் பத்திரிகையாளர்களை விட அதிகப்படுத்தினார்கள். மொத்த பத்து வருடங்களின் எண்ணிக்கை அதிகரித்தாலும், அதிகரிப்பு விகிதம் கடந்த 10 வருடங்களில் குறைந்து விட்டது. குறைந்த முறையின் காரணத்தை புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும்.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, ularda odamlarni xato haqida ko'rsatish va ilmiy muammolarni qanday ishlatish mumkin. Bu taʼminotida biz saqlash jarayonini aniqlash uchun NLP ta'minlovchisi qo'llanmagan tizimini aniqlashni istaysiz. Bu taʼminlovchi taʼminotlar haqida qo'llanmagan narsalarni o'zgartirish uchun qo'llanmagan, lekin ko'pincha ma'lumotlar sabablarga ko'rsatadi. Biz yangi kopus va taʼminlovchi modellarni yaratdik. Mavjud soʻzlarning asosiy davomida sabablarni aniqlash mumkin. Аслида текширишлаш саҳифаидаги мувофиқ жавобларини қўшиб қўйишган жавоблар билан тўсиқ кўриб чиқди, биз бу ишда 22% мазкур саҳифалар аъзоларидан маълумотлар ўзгартимос маълумотлардан маълумотларга эга бўлишини кўриб чиқдик. Ko'rsatganda, universitetlar 1.5 dan 1 qismidan ko'p kundalik nashriyotlaridan ko'p ko'proq ko'p ko'p ko'p ko'p edi. Ko'rib chiqishni anglatadi, boshqarish soni ko'paytirishda oxirigi 10 yil ichida ko'rib chiqaradi. Koʻproq taʼminlovchi modelning sababini tushunish kerak.", 'vi': 'Báo chí có ảnh hưởng mạnh hơn về lĩnh vực truyền thông về nghiên cứu sức khỏe. Tuy nhiên, họ đã được tìm thấy để kiềm chế những lời tuyên bố cực kỳ phóng đại có thể làm xấu công chúng và làm mất niềm tin của người dân vào khoa học. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp ngôn ngữ chọc dò định mức nguyên nhân phóng đại trong các thông cáo báo chí y tế về các nghiên cứu quan sát được thiết kế để xác định các kết quả liên quan, nhưng thường bị kích thích như nguyên nhân. Chúng tôi đã phát triển một tập đoàn mới và mô hình được huấn luyện có thể xác định nguyên nhân của các báo cáo chính trong thông cáo báo chí. Chúng tôi so sánh những yêu cầu được đưa ra trong bài phát hành báo chí với những yêu cầu tương ứng trong nghiên cứu ban đầu, và phát hiện ra rằng 22 không còn nhân tố đáng kể từ các nghiên cứu quan sát. Hơn nữa, trường đại học thường phóng đại hơn các nhà xuất bản tạp chí bằng tỉ lệ 1.5-1. Khá đáng tin, tỉ lệ phóng đại đã giảm đi một chút trong suốt mười năm qua, mặc dù số lượng tổng các thông cáo báo chí tăng lên. Cần nhiều nghiên cứu hơn để hiểu nguyên nhân của mô hình đang giảm dần.', 'bg': 'Съобщенията за пресата оказват все по-силно влияние върху медийното отразяване на здравните изследвания; Установено е обаче, че те съдържат сериозно преувеличени твърдения, които могат да подкопаят общественото доверие в науката. В това проучване ние предлагаме подход на НЛП за идентифициране на преувеличени причинно-следствени претенции, направени в здравни прессъобщения, които докладват за наблюдателни проучвания, които са предназначени да установят корелационни находки, но често са преувеличени като причинно-следствени. Разработихме нов корпус и обучени модели, които могат да идентифицират причинно-следствените твърдения в основните изявления в прессъобщение. Сравнявайки твърденията, направени в съобщение за пресата, със съответните твърдения в първоначалния изследователски доклад, установихме, че 22% от съобщенията за пресата правят преувеличени причинно-следствени твърдения въз основа на корелационни констатации от наблюдателни проучвания. Освен това университетите преувеличават по-често от издателите на списания със съотношение 1,5 към 1. Окуражаващо е, че процентът на преувеличение леко намалява през последните 10 години, въпреки увеличението на общия брой прессъобщения. Необходими са повече изследвания, за да се разбере причината за намаляващия модел.', 'nl': 'Persberichten hebben een steeds grotere invloed op de media-berichtgeving over gezondheidsonderzoek; Ze bevatten echter ernstig overdreven beweringen die het publiek verkeerd kunnen informeren en het vertrouwen van het publiek in de wetenschap kunnen ondermijnen. In deze studie stellen we een NLP-benadering voor om overdreven causale claims in gezondheidspersberichten te identificeren die rapporteren over observationele studies, die bedoeld zijn om correlationele bevindingen vast te stellen, maar vaak overdreven zijn als causaal. We ontwikkelden een nieuw corpus en getrainde modellen die causale claims kunnen identificeren in de belangrijkste verklaringen in een persbericht. Door de beweringen in een persbericht te vergelijken met de overeenkomstige beweringen in het oorspronkelijke onderzoeksartikel, ontdekten we dat 22% van de persberichten overdreven causale beweringen maakte uit correlationele bevindingen in observationele studies. Bovendien overdreven universiteiten vaker dan tijdschriftuitgevers met een verhouding van 1,5 tot 1. Het overdrijvingspercentage is de afgelopen tien jaar bemoedigend, ondanks de toename van het totale aantal persberichten. Meer onderzoek is nodig om de oorzaak van het afnemende patroon te begrijpen.', 'da': 'Pressemeddelelser har en stadig stærkere indflydelse på mediedækningen af sundhedsforskning. Det er imidlertid konstateret, at de indeholder alvorligt overdrevne påstande, der kan misinformere offentligheden og underminere offentlighedens tillid til videnskaben. I denne undersøgelse foreslår vi en NLP tilgang til at identificere overdrevne årsagspåstande fremsat i sundheds pressemeddelelser, der rapporterer om observationsundersøgelser, der er designet til at etablere korrelationsfund, men ofte er overdrevet som årsagssammenhæng. Vi har udviklet et nyt korpus og uddannede modeller, der kan identificere årsagspåstande i hovedudtalelserne i en pressemeddelelse. Ved at sammenligne påstandene i en pressemeddelelse med de tilsvarende påstande i det oprindelige forskningspapir fandt vi, at 22% af pressemeddelelserne fremsatte overdrevne årsagspåstande fra korrelationelle resultater i observationsundersøgelser. Endvidere overdrev universiteterne oftere end tidsskriftsforlag med et forhold på 1,5 til 1. Opmuntrende er overdrivelsesgraden faldet lidt i løbet af de sidste 10 år, trods stigningen i det samlede antal pressemeddelelser. Der er brug for mere forskning for at forstå årsagen til det faldende mønster.', 'de': 'Pressemitteilungen haben einen immer stärkeren Einfluss auf die mediale Berichterstattung über die Gesundheitsforschung; Es wurde jedoch festgestellt, dass sie ernsthaft übertriebene Behauptungen enthalten, die die Öffentlichkeit falsch informieren und das Vertrauen der Öffentlichkeit in die Wissenschaft untergraben können. In dieser Studie schlagen wir einen NLP-Ansatz vor, um übertriebene kausale Behauptungen in Gesundheitspressemitteilungen zu identifizieren, die über Beobachtungsstudien berichten, die darauf abzielen, korrelationale Befunde zu etablieren, aber oft als kausal übertrieben werden. Wir entwickelten ein neues Korpus und trainierten Modelle, die kausale Ansprüche in den wichtigsten Aussagen einer Pressemitteilung identifizieren können. Durch den Vergleich der in einer Pressemitteilung gemachten Behauptungen mit den entsprechenden Behauptungen in der ursprünglichen Forschungsarbeit fanden wir heraus, dass 22% der Pressemitteilungen übertriebene kausale Behauptungen aus Korrelationsergebnissen in Beobachtungsstudien enthielten. Darüber hinaus übertrieben Universitäten häufiger als Zeitschriftenverlage um ein Verhältnis von 1,5 zu 1. Erfreulicherweise ist die Übertreibungsrate in den letzten zehn Jahren trotz der Zunahme der Gesamtzahl der Pressemitteilungen leicht zurückgegangen. Mehr Forschung ist erforderlich, um die Ursache des abnehmenden Musters zu verstehen.', 'ko': '뉴스 원고가 건강 연구에 대한 매체 보도에 대한 영향이 갈수록 커지고 있다.그러나 사람들은 그것이 심각한 과장설을 포함하고 있어 대중을 오도하고 과학에 대한 대중의 신뢰를 파괴할 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.이 연구에서 우리는 관찰적 연구를 보도하는 건강 보도 원고에서 과장된 인과를 식별하는 NLP 방법을 제시했는데, 이러한 관찰적 연구는 관련 발견을 위한 것이지만 종종 인과관계로 과장된다.우리는 새로운 어료 라이브러리와 훈련을 거친 모델을 개발하여 뉴스 원고의 주요 진술 중의 인과 관계를 식별할 수 있다.뉴스 원고 중의 성명을 원시 연구 논문 중의 상응하는 성명과 비교한 결과 22%의 뉴스 원고가 관찰적 연구 중의 관련 발견에 따라 과장된 인과 성명을 한 것을 발견했다.이 밖에 대학이 간행물 출판사보다 과장된 비율은 1.5:1이다.고무적인 것은 뉴스 원고 수가 늘었음에도 불구하고 지난 10년 동안 과장률이 약간 떨어졌다는 것이다.이런 하강 패턴의 원인을 이해하기 위해서는 더 많은 연구가 필요하다.', 'id': 'Press releases have an increasingly strong influence on media coverage of health research;  namun, mereka telah ditemukan mengandung klaim serius yang berlebihan yang dapat salah informasi masyarakat dan merusak kepercayaan masyarakat dalam ilmu pengetahuan. Dalam penelitian ini kami mengusulkan pendekatan NLP untuk mengidentifikasi klaim penyebab yang berlebihan yang dibuat dalam laporan pers kesehatan yang melaporkan tentang penelitian pengawasan, yang direncanakan untuk menetapkan penemuan korelasi, tetapi sering berlebihan sebagai penyebab. Kami mengembangkan sebuah korpus baru dan model terlatih yang dapat mengidentifikasi klaim penyebab dalam pernyataan utama dalam laporan pers. Dengan membandingkan klaim yang dibuat dalam laporan pers dengan klaim yang cocok dalam kertas penelitian asli, kami menemukan bahwa 22% laporan pers membuat klaim penyebab yang berlebihan dari penemuan korelasi dalam penelitian observasi. Selain itu, universitas lebih sering berlebihan daripada penerbit jurnal dengan nisbah 1,5 hingga 1. Menarik sekali, tingkat kelebihan telah sedikit menurun selama 10 tahun terakhir, meskipun jumlah total pemberitahuan pers meningkat. Lebih banyak penelitian diperlukan untuk memahami penyebab pola menurun.', 'sw': 'Kuachiliwa huru kwa vyombo vya habari zina ushawishi mkubwa zaidi kwenye vyombo vya habari kuhusu utafiti wa afya; Hata hivyo, wamegunduliwa kuwepo na madai yanayozidi kuongezeka kwa kiasi kikubwa ambazo zinaweza kutoa taarifa za umma na kuharibu imani ya umma katika sayansi. Katika utafiti huu tunapendekeza mbinu ya NLP kutambua madai yanayotokana na sababu zilizosababishwa katika vyombo vya habari vya afya kuachia taarifa kuhusu utafiti wa ufuatiliaji, ambazo zinalengwa kuanzisha matokeo ya mahusiano, lakini mara nyingi huzidi kuwa sababu. Tumeunda makampuni mpya na mifano yenye mafunzo yanayoweza kutambua madai yanayosababishwa katika tamko kuu la vyombo vya habari. Kwa kulinganisha madai yaliyotolewa kwenye taarifa ya vyombo vya habari na madai yanayojibu katika karatasi ya awali ya utafiti, tuligundua kuwa asilimia 22 ya waandishi wa habari zilichukua madai yanayotokana na matokeo yanayohusiana na mahusiano katika tafiti za kiuchunguzi. Zaidi ya hayo, vyuo vikuu vilizidi zaidi ya waandishi wa habari kwa kiwango cha 1.5 hadi 1. Kwa kushangaza, kiwango cha kuongezeka kwa kiasi kikubwa kimepungua kwa miaka 10 iliyopita, pamoja na kuongezeka kwa idadi ya vyombo vya habari kuachiliwa. Utafiti zaidi unahitaji kuelewa sababu ya kupungua kwa mtindo.', 'af': "Druk verlossing het 'n grootste kragtige influens op media aandekking van gesondige ondersoek; maar hulle is gevind om ernstig verhoog aansoek te bevat wat die openbare en publieke vertrou in wetenskap kan misformeer. In hierdie studie voorstel ons 'n NLP toegang om te identifiseer oorweldige oorsaaklike voorskrifte wat in gesondike druk gemaak word, wat raporteer op observasionele studie, wat ontwerp word om korrelasionele onderskrifte te stel, maar is dikwels oorweldig as redelik. Ons het 'n nuwe korpus en opgelei modele ontwikkel wat veroorsaaklike aandrukkings kan identifiseer in die hoofde uitdrukkings in 'n drukklosie. Deur vergelyking van die aandrukkinge wat in 'n druk verspreiding gemaak het met die ooreenkomstige aandrukkinge in die oorspronklike ondersoek papier, het ons gevind dat 22% van druk verspreidings vergroot oorsaaklike aandrukkinge gemaak het van korrelasionele vindings in observasionele studie. Verder het universiteite meer dikwels verhoog as joernaal publeerders deur 'n verhouding van 1.5 tot 1. Omkommendig het die oorvloediging tempo in die verlede 10 jaar klein verklein, ten spyt van die vergroot aantal drukklossies. Nog is meer ondersoek nodig om die oorsaak van die verklein patroon te verstaan.", 'hr': 'Puštanja tiska imaju sve jači utjecaj na prekrivanje medija istraživanja zdravlja; Međutim, pronađeni su da sadrže ozbiljno pretjerane tvrdnje koje mogu pogrešno formirati javnost i potaknuti javno povjerenje u nauku. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo pristup NLP-a za identifikaciju pretjeranih uzročnih zahtjeva koji su napravljeni u tisku zdravstva, koji prijavljuju o promatranjima ispitivanja, koje su dizajnirane za uspostavljanje korelacijskih nalaza, ali često su pretjerani kao uzrok. Razvili smo novi korpus i obučeni modeli koji mogu identificirati uzročne tvrdnje u glavnim izjavama u objavljivanju tiska. Uspoređujući tvrdnje koje su napravljene u objavljivanju štampe s odgovarajućim tvrdbama iz originalnog istraživačkog papira, otkrili smo da 22% objavljivanja štampa čini pretjerano uzročne tvrdnje od korelacijskih nalaza u promatračnim ispitivanjima. Osim toga, univerziteti su češće pretjerali od izdavača dnevnika u odnosu od 1,5 do 1. Ujačavajući, stopa pretjeranja se u proteklih 10 godina malo smanjila, uprkos povećanju ukupnog broja otpuštanja novinara. Potrebno je više istraživanja da bi razumjeli uzrok smanjenja obrazaca.', 'sq': 'Njoftimet e shtypit kanë një ndikim gjithnjë e më të fortë në mbulimin e medias të kërkimeve shëndetësore; megjithatë, ata janë gjetur të përmbajnë pretendime seriozisht të eksaguara që mund të keqinformojnë publikun dhe të dëmtojnë besimin publik në shkencë. Në këtë studim ne propozojmë një qasje NLP për të identifikuar pretendimet e ekzagjeruara shkakuese të bërë në njoftimet e shtypit shëndetësor që raportojnë mbi studimet vëzhguese, të cilat janë projektuar për të vendosur gjetje korrelacionale, por shpesh janë ekzagjeruar si shkakuese. Kemi zhvilluar një korpus të ri dhe modele të trajnuar që mund të identifikojnë pretendimet shkaqësore në deklaratat kryesore në një njoftim për shtyp. Duke krahasuar pretendimet e bëra në një njoftim për shtyp me pretendimet korrespondente në gazetën origjinale të kërkimit, gjetëm se 22% e njoftimeve për shtyp bënë pretendime të ekzagjeruara shkakuese nga gjetjet korrelacionale në studimet vëzhguese. Përveç kësaj, universitetet ekzagjeruan më shpesh se botuesit e gazetave me një raport prej 1.5 në 1. Për shkak inkurajues, norma e ekzagjerimit ka rënë pak gjatë 10 viteve të fundit, pavarësisht nga rritja e numrit të përgjithshëm të njoftimeve për shtyp. Më shumë kërkime janë të nevojshme për të kuptuar shkakun e modelit në rënie.', 'am': 'የፕሬስ ውጤቶች የጤና ትምህርት ግንኙነት በማድረግ ላይ በማድረግ ላይ የበረታች መጠቀሚያ ይኖራል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የህዝቡን ስሕተት እና የህዝቡን ትምህርት በሳይንቀት ላይ የሚያሳስቡ ጥያቄዎችን በጭንቀት መቀበል ተገኝተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የግንኙነት ፍላጎቶችን ለማረጋገጥ የጤናዊ ፕሬዚዳንት የሚደረገውን የረኀብ ጉዳይ ለማረጋገጥ የNLP ጥያቄን ለመፍጠር እናስባለን፡፡ አዲስ ኮርፓስ እና የተማረ ሞዴል መፍጠርን በፕሬስ ፈቃድ ውስጥ የዋነኛው ንግግር ውሳኔዎችን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በመጀመሪያው ትምህርት ገጾች ውስጥ ባለው ጥያቄዎችን በማስተካከል የፕሬዚዳንት ፈቃድ ካደረገው ጥያቄዎችን በመተያየት አግኝተናል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ዩንቨርስቲዎች ከጋዜጠኞች ይልቅ በ1.5 እስከ 1. በአደናቂው፣ ባለፉት አሥር ዓመታት የፕሬስ ቁጥር ቁጥር ምንም እንኳ አነሳቀው፡፡ የበዛ ምርመራ የሚያጎድለውን ምሳሌ ለማስተዋል ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'ԶԼՄ-ները ավելի ուժեղ ազդեցություն ունեն առողջապահության հետազոտությունների լրատվամիջոցների վրա: այնուամենայնիվ, պարզվել է, որ դրանք պարունակում են լուրջ չափազանց չափազանցված հայտարարություններ, որոնք կարող են սխալ տեղեկացնել հանրությունը և քանդել հանրության վստահությունը գիտության վրա: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք ՆԼՊ-ի մոտեցում, որպեսզի բացահայտենք առողջապահության մամուլի հայտարարություններում արված չափազանց մեծ պատճառները, որոնք հայտարարվում են հետազոտության ուսումնասիրությունների մասին, որոնք նախագծված են հաղորդակցման արդյու Մենք զարգացրեցինք նոր կորպուս և պատրաստված մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են բացահայտել պատճառային հայտարարությունները մամուլի հայտարարության հիմնական հայտարարություններում: Համեմատելով մամուլի հայտարարության փաստարկները սկզբնական հետազոտության թղթի համապատասխան փաստարկների հետ, մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ մամուլի հայտարարությունների 22 տոկոսը չափազանց մեծ պատճառային փաստարկներ էին արել հետազոտության ուսումնասիրությունների կոռել Ավելին, համալսարանները ավելի հաճախ գերազանցեցին, քան ամսագրերի հրատարակիչները 1.5-1 հարաբերականով: Encouragingly, the exaggeration rate has slightly decreased over the past 10 years, despite the increase of the total number of press releases.  More research is needed to understand the cause of the decreasing pattern.', 'bn': 'স্বাস্থ্য গবেষণার প্রচার মাধ্যমে প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্রভাব বাড়তে থাকে; তবে তাদেরকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দাবীর মধ্যে পাওয়া গেছে যারা জনগণকে ভুল জানাতে পারে এবং বিজ্ঞানের উপর জনতার বিশ্বাসের এই গবেষণায় আমরা স্বাস্থ্য সংবাদ প্রচার মাধ্যমে বেশী কারণের দাবি চিহ্নিত করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করছি যে পর্যবেক্ষণ গবেষণা সম্পর্কে রিপোর্ট করা হয়েছে, যা সম্ আমরা একটি নতুন কোর্পাস এবং প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল তৈরি করেছি যা প্রেস মুক্তিতে প্রধান বিবৃতিতে কারণের দাবী চিহ্নিত করতে  প্রেসের মুক্তির সাথে প্রাথমিক গবেষণার প্রতিক্রিয়ার দাবিগুলোর সাথে সংশোধনী দাবীদের তুলনা করে আমরা দেখেছি যে ২২% সংবাদ মুক্তি পেয়েছে  এছাড়াও, বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় ১. ৫ থেকে ১ পর্যন্ত সাংবাদিক প্রকাশিকদের চেয়ে প্রায়শই বেড়ে উঠেছে। উৎসাহিত হচ্ছে, গত দশ বছরে বাড়ানোর হার কমে গেছে, যদিও সংবাদপত্রের মোট সংখ্যা বাড়তে থাকে। আরো গবেষণার প্রয়োজন হলো কমে যাওয়ার কারণ।', 'ca': "Els comunicats de premsa tenen una influència cada cop més forta en la cobertura dels mitjans de comunicació de recerca sanitària; no obstant això, s'ha descobert que contenen afirmacions seriosament exagerades que poden falsificar el públic i socavar la confiança pública en la ciència. En aquest estudi proposem un enfocament de la NLP per identificar les afirmacions causals exagerades formulades en comunicats de prensa sanitaris que informen sobre estudis observacionals, dissenyats per establir descobriments correlacionals, però sovint exagerades com a causals. Vam desenvolupar un nou corpus i models entrenats que poden identificar reclamacions causals en les principals declaracions d'un comunicat de premsa. Comparant les afirmacions d'un comunicat de premsa amb les afirmacions correspondents del paper original de recerca, vam descobrir que el 22% dels comunicats de premsa feien afirmacions causals exagerades a partir de descobriments correlacionals en estudis observacionals. A més, les universitats exageraven més sovint que els editors de revistes en una proporció de 1,5 a 1. Encantadorament, la tasa d'exageració ha disminuït lleugerament en els darrers 10 anys, malgrat l'augment del nombre total d'anuncis de premsa. Es necessita més recerca per entendre la causa del patró decreixent.", 'bs': 'Puštanja tiska imaju sve jači utjecaj na prekrivanje medija istraživanja zdravlja; Međutim, pronađeni su da sadrže ozbiljno pretjerane tvrdnje koje mogu pogrešno formirati javnost i potaknuti javno povjerenje u nauku. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo pristup NLP-a za identifikaciju pretjeranih uzročnih tvrdnji koji su napravljeni u tisku zdravstva, koji prijavljuju o promatranjima ispitivanja, koje su dizajnirane za utvrđivanje korelacijskih nalaza, ali često su pretjerani kao uzrok. Razvili smo novi korpus i obučeni modeli koji mogu identificirati uzrokovane tvrdnje u glavnim izjavama u objavljivanju novinara. Uspoređujući tvrdnje koje su napravljene u objavljivanju štampe sa odgovarajućim tvrdbama iz originalnog istraživačkog papira, otkrili smo da 22% objavljivanja štampa čini pretjerano uzročne tvrdnje od korelacijskih nalaza u promatračnim ispitivanjima. Osim toga, univerziteti su češće pretjerali od izdavača dnevnika u odnosu od 1,5 do 1. Zanimljivo, stopa pretjeranja se malo smanjila u proteklih 10 godina, uprkos povećanju ukupnog broja otpuštanja novinara. Potrebno je više istraživanja da bi razumeli uzrok smanjivanja obrazaca.', 'tr': 'Bas çykyşlary saglygy araştyrmasynyň üstüne örän güýçli täsiri bar; Ýöne olar milletiň ýalňyşyny ýalňyşdyryp bilen adamlaryň ynamyny alyp bilmeýän iddialaryny daşartmak üçin ýok boldylar. Bu aramda biz NLP ýalaýyşyny saglyk basynda diýjek sebäpli hasaplanýan hasaplaryň bardygyny görnüş aramalar hakynda rapor edeni teklip edýäris. Bu ýalaýyşyň çykmalary düzenlemek üçin tassyklanýar, ýöne köplenç sebäpli üýtgedilýär. Biz täze korpus we bilim sistemasyny basynyň esasy a ýdyşynda sebäpli hasaplamalary tanap biljek nusgalary düzenledik. Bassa basynda ýazylýan iddialaryny original ylmy kagyzynda ýakynlaşdyryp, biz basynyň 22% sany observasyon aramalarynda görnüşdürilýän netijeleriniň sebäpli hasaplamalaryny diýip pikir etdik. Mundan soňra uniwersitetler günlük editörlerinden 1.5 we 1-den köp üýtgedýärler. Gyzyksyz bolsa, basyñ azalyşynyň kop sanynyň azalyşynda soňky 10 ýyldan bäri biraz azalypdyr. Açmak sebäbini düşünmek üçin köp ylmy gerek.', 'fa': 'توسعه\u200cهای مطبوعات اثر قوی\u200cتر بر حفاظت رسانه\u200cها تحقیقات سلامتی دارند. با این حال، آنها را یافته\u200cاند که درباره\u200cی اعتراض جدی زیادی افزوده شده\u200cاند که می\u200cتوانند عمومی را غلط کنند و اعتماد عمومی را به علم نابود کنند. در این مطالعه، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش NLP برای شناسایی ادعای دلایل\u200cهای زیادی که در مطالعه\u200cهای سلامتی ساخته شده\u200cاند، گزارش می\u200cدهند که در مورد تحقیقات نظارت می\u200cکنند، که طراحی شده\u200cاند تا پیدا کردن نتیجه\u200cهای مرتبط باشند، اما اغلب ما یک قالب جدید و مدل آموزش آموزش را توسعه دادیم که می تواند درخواست\u200cهای دلایل را در اظهارات اصلی در آزادی مطبوعات شناسایی کند. با مقایسه کردن ادعای که توسط آزادی مطبوعات با ادعای متفاوت در کاغذ تحقیقات اصلی انجام شده، ما فهمیدیم که ۲۲ درصد اخطار مطبوعات باعث افزایش توسط پیدا کردن پیدا های متفاوتی در تحقیقات نظارت شده است. علاوه بر این، دانشگاه\u200cها اغلب بیشتر از انتشار دهنده\u200cهای روزنامه با نسبت ۱.۵ تا ۱ افزایش دادند. با وجود افزایش تعداد عمومی از اخراج مطبوعات بیشتر در ۱۰ سال گذشته کمتر شده است. تحقیقات بیشتری برای فهمیدن دلیل الگوی کاهش نیاز دارد.', 'az': 'Basın yayınları sağlığın təhsil araştırmalarının media örtüklərinə daha qüvvətli təsir edir. Halbuki, insanların elmi təvəkkülünü yanlış dəyişdirə biləcək və halqlıq təvəkkülünü dəyişdirə biləcək çox böyük iddialar içərisində bulundular. Bu təcrübədə NLP tərzini təklif edirik ki, sağlamlıq basıncılarında təşkil edilmiş təcrübələrin təşkil edildiyi təcrübələrin təşkil edilməsini təsdiqləyirik. Bu təcrübə təcrübəsində, əlaqələri təşkil etmək üçün təşkil edilmiş, amma çox səbəb olara Biz yeni korpus və təhsil edilmiş modelləri təşkil etdik ki, basın yayınlamasında başqa ifadələr təşkil edə bilər. Başqaları araştırma kağıdında müəyyən edilən iddiaları ilə basın yayınlamasına qarşılaşdıran kimi, basın yayınlamalarının 22%-in in gözləmə araştırmalarında correlasyon tapılmalarından nəticə etibarlıqlarını artırdığını gördük. Daha sonra, üniversitlər günlük yazıcılarından daha çox ödənilmişlər, 1,5-1 ilə. İncil olaraq, son 10 il boyunca həddi aşma oranı azaldı, basın yayılmasının toplam sayısını artırmağa rağmen. Daha çox araştırma düşürmək səbəbi anlamaq üçün lazımdır.', 'cs': 'Tiskové zprávy mají stále silnější vliv na mediální pokrytí o zdravotním výzkumu; Bylo však zjištěno, že obsahují vážně přehnaná tvrzení, která mohou špatně informovat veřejnost a podkopat důvěru veřejnosti ve vědu. V této studii navrhujeme NLP přístup k identifikaci přehnaných kauzálních tvrzení ve zdravotních tiskových zprávách, které zpracovávají pozorovatelské studie, které mají za cíl stanovit korelační nálezy, ale jsou často přehnané jako kauzální. Vyvinuli jsme nový korpus a vyškolili modely, které dokážou identifikovat kauzální tvrzení v hlavních prohlášeních tiskové zprávy. Porovnáním tvrzení uvedených v tiskové zprávě s odpovídajícími tvrzeními v původním výzkumném článku jsme zjistili, že 22% tiskových zpráv obsahuje přehnané kauzální tvrzení z korelačních zjištění v pozorovacích studiích. Univerzity navíc přeháněly častěji než vydavatelé časopisů o poměr 1,5 k 1. Povzbuzující je, že míra nadsázky se v posledních deseti letech mírně snížila i přes zvýšení celkového počtu tiskových zpráv. K pochopení příčiny klesajícího vzorce je zapotřebí dalšího výzkumu.', 'et': 'Pressiteadetel on üha tugevam mõju terviseuuringute meediakajastusele; Siiski on leitud, et need sisaldavad tõsiselt liialdatud väiteid, mis võivad avalikkust valesti informeerida ja õõnestada avalikkuse usaldust teaduse vastu. Käesolevas uuringus pakume välja NLP lähenemisviisi, et tuvastada ülemäärased põhjuslikud väited, mis on esitatud tervishoiu pressiteadetes, milles esitatakse vaatlusuuringuid, mis on mõeldud korrelatsiooniliste leidude kindlakstegemiseks, kuid sageli liialdatakse põhjusliku seosena. Töötasime välja uue korpuse ja koolitasime mudelid, mis suudavad tuvastada põhjuslikke väiteid pressiteates. Võrreldes pressiteates esitatud väideid esialgses uurimistöös esitatud väidetega, leidsime, et 22% pressiteadetest esitasid vaatlusuuringute korrelatsiooniliste tulemuste põhjal liialdatud põhjuslikke väiteid. Lisaks liialdasid ülikoolid sagedamini kui ajakirjade kirjastajad suhtarvuga 1,5-1. Julgustavalt on liialdamismäär viimase 10 aasta jooksul veidi vähenenud, vaatamata pressiteadete koguarvu suurenemisele. Vaja on rohkem uuringuid, et mõista kahaneva mustri põhjust.', 'fi': 'Lehdistötiedotteilla on yhä voimakkaampi vaikutus terveystutkimuksen medianäkyvyyteen. Niiden on kuitenkin todettu sisältävän vakavasti liioiteltuja väitteitä, jotka voivat antaa yleisölle väärää tietoa ja heikentää yleisön luottamusta tieteeseen. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotamme NLP-lähestymistapaa havainnointitutkimuksista kertovissa terveystiedotteissa esitettyjen liioiteltujen kausaalisten väitteiden tunnistamiseen, mutta usein liioiteltujen kausaalisten löydösten toteamiseen. Kehitimme uuden korpusen ja koulutettuja malleja, joilla voidaan tunnistaa syy-syyt lehdistötiedotteen keskeisissä lausunnoissa. Vertailemalla lehdistötiedotteessa esitettyjä väitteitä alkuperäisen tutkimusartikkelin vastaaviin väitteisiin huomasimme, että 22 prosenttia lehdistötiedotteista esitti havainnointitutkimusten korrelaatiolöydöksistä liioiteltuja syy-yhteyttä koskevia väitteitä. Lisäksi yliopistot liioittelivat useammin kuin lehden kustantajat suhteessa 1,5:1. On rohkaisevaa, että liioittelu on vähentynyt hieman viimeisen kymmenen vuoden aikana huolimatta lehdistötiedotteiden kokonaismäärän kasvusta. Lisää tutkimusta tarvitaan, jotta voidaan ymmärtää laskukaavan syy.', 'he': 'הודעות לעיתונות יש השפעה חזקה יותר ויותר על כיסוי התקשורת של מחקר בריאות; עם זאת, נמצאו שהם מכילים טענות מוגזמות ברצינות שיכולות להעיד את הציבור ולפגע באמון הציבור במדע. במחקר הזה אנו מציעים גישה NLP לזהות טענות סיבות מוגזמות עשויות בתודעות עיתונאי בריאות כי דווח על מחקרי צפייה, אשר נועדו כדי לקבוע מציאות קרולציאליות, אך לעתים קרובות מוגזמות כסיבות. פיתחנו גופוס חדש ומודלים מאומנים שיכולים לזהות טענות סיבותיות בהצהרות העיקריות בהודעה לעיתונות. על ידי להשוות את הטענות שנעשו בתודעה לעיתונות עם הטענות המתאימות בעיתון המקורי של המחקר, מצאנו ש-22 אחוז מהתודעות לעיתונות עשו טענות סיבותיות מוגזמות ממציאות קרלאציאליות במחקרים צפיים. בנוסף, אוניברסיטות הגזמו לעתים קרובות יותר מאשר מפרסמים יומנים על ידי יחס של 1.5 ל-1. Encouragingly, the exaggeration rate has slightly decreased over the past 10 years, despite the increase of the total number of press releases.  צריך עוד מחקר כדי להבין את סיבת הדפוס המפחיד.', 'sk': 'Sporočila za javnost vse močneje vplivajo na medijsko pokritost zdravstvenih raziskav; vendar je bilo ugotovljeno, da vsebujejo resno pretirane trditve, ki lahko napačno obveščajo javnost in spodkopavajo zaupanje javnosti v znanost. V tej študiji predlagamo pristop NLP za ugotavljanje pretiranih vzročnih trditev v sporočilih za javnost v zdravstvu, ki poročajo o opazovalnih študijah, ki so namenjene ugotavljanju korelacijskih ugotovitev, vendar so pogosto pretirane kot vzročne. Razvili smo nov korpus in usposobljeni modeli, ki lahko identificirajo vzročne trditve v glavnih izjavah v sporočilu za javnost. S primerjavo trditev v sporočilu za javnost z ustreznimi trditvami v prvotnem raziskovalnem članku smo ugotovili, da 22% sporočil za javnost vsebuje pretirane vzročne trditve iz korelacijskih ugotovitev v opazovalnih študijah. Poleg tega so univerze bolj pretiravale kot založniki revij za razmerje 1,5 proti 1. Spodbudno je, da se je stopnja pretiranosti v zadnjih desetih letih nekoliko zmanjšala, kljub povečanju skupnega števila sporočil za javnost. Več raziskav je potrebnih za razumevanje vzroka zmanjšanja vzorca.', 'ha': "Press releases have an increasingly strong influence on media coverage of health research;  A lokacin da, an gane su da daidai da za'a zaɓace wa mutane kuma za su ƙara aminci ga mutane a kan ilmi. A cikin wannan littafin da Muke bukãtar da wata aikin NLP dõmin ka gane daidaita ta sabo da aka sa a cikin mafarin da za'a sa'an nan sai ta sakar da shi a kan jarrabi masu tsari, wanda aka ƙayyade wajen karatun masu tsari, kuma amma ana ƙara maras a matsayi. Mun ƙãga wata sabo da aka sanar da shi na samun misãlai wanda ke iya iya gane mataimaki a cikin bayani masu ƙaranci. Ga samfani da daidai da aka faɗa a cikin wani marubuci da daidai mai daidai a cikin takardan tafiti na farko, muka gane cẽwa 22% daga mawadãta suka saurara matsayin da suka yi mataimaki daga matsayin da suka samu da mataimaki a cikin karatun taƙaita. Furan haka, universiti na sarrafa mafiya yawa daga fasada 1.5 zuwa 1. Ina yi farin ciki, haske ya yi ƙari kaɗan a cikin shekara 10 da suka shige, kuma ingawa na ƙari da yawan mutane na umarni. Ana ƙayyade yin ƙaranci dõmin a fahimta sababin da ke ƙarantawa.", 'jv': 'Yukono Perusahaan anyar tentang kahang nggawe ngupakan anyir kapan media sakjane perusahaan resmaning resmaning resmaning; kuwi mau Nanging, dheweke sampeyan nganggep kuwi mesthi tau ngomong nik akeh apik banget nggawe publika lan nganggep kuwi nglanggar siyenge kuwi mau. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo perusahaan NLP kanggo nambah kang alam sing beraksi perusahaan winih sing erakme kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan Rong Neftar winih Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem anyar karo model sing wis arep lan ijol-ijolan sing bisa nguasai perusahaan winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan kejahatan Ngawe Perintaha mengko perusahaan winih dhéwé nggawe gerambut karo perusahaan winih sing perusahaan winih, Awak dhéwé kuwi 22% kebutuhan perusahaan pulis yenditawak dhéwé, ngono hal-hal sing paling nggawe gerambut perusahaan langgar sampeyan operasi akhar. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), there is a change ("assertive Sistem Jagad-Jagad undo-type', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཞུ་གཏོང་བཤེར་གྱི་ནང ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོར་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མི་རྣམས་པས་མང་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གཏོང་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་NLP འི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནུས་མཚམས་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་གཏོང་འཕེལ ང་ཚོས་སྒེར་གྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་དང་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱས་ཏེ། མཁའ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སུ་ཚོར་བ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། སློབ་ཆེན་ཚོའི་ནང་སྐྱེས་འདི་དཔོན་རིགས་པ་ཚོའི་ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་གཅིག་ལས་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེས་འདུག འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་སྐྱེལ་བཞིན་པའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཀྱིས་འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་བཅུ་ཐག་ཅིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བར་ཇེ་ཆུང་ཡོད། དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཚད་དམའ་རིམ་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་རྟོགས་དགོས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology : A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'ar': 'تضخيم ملاءمة الموضوع مع الأيديولوجيا: دراسة حالة لانحياز الأيديولوجية السياسية في نماذج الكشف عن الموضوعات الاجتماعية', 'fr': "Inflation de la pertinence d'un sujet avec l'idéologie\xa0: une étude de cas sur le biais idéologique politique dans les modèles de détection de sujets sociaux", 'es': 'Inflar la relevancia del tema con la ideología: un estudio de caso de sesgo de ideología política en los modelos de detección de temas sociales', 'pt': 'Inflando a Relevância do Tópico com a Ideologia: Um Estudo de Caso do Viés da Ideologia Política em Modelos de Detecção de Tópicos Sociais', 'ja': 'イデオロギーとのトピックの関連性を膨らませる：社会的トピック検出モデルにおける政治的イデオロギーのバイアスのケーススタディ', 'zh': '增大言相关性与意识形态——以世言检测模形意识形态偏见为例', 'ru': 'Накачивание актуальности темы с помощью идеологии: тематическое исследование предвзятости политической идеологии в моделях обнаружения социальной темы', 'hi': 'विचारधारा के साथ विषय प्रासंगिकता को बढ़ाना: सामाजिक विषय का पता लगाने के मॉडल में राजनीतिक विचारधारा पूर्वाग्रह का एक मामला अध्ययन', 'ga': 'Ábharthacht na dTopaic a Ardú leis an Idé-eolaíocht: Cás-Staidéar ar Laofacht Idé-eolaíocht Pholaitiúil i Múnlaí Braite Ábhair Shóisialta', 'ka': 'თევოლოგიის შესაბამისი თემის შესაბამისი: პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგიის შესაბამისი მოდელი სოციალური თემიკური მოდელში', 'hu': 'Felfújó téma relevancia az ideológiával: A politikai ideológiai tényezők esettanulmánya a társadalmi téma detektálási modellekben', 'el': 'Διογκώνοντας Θέμα Σχετικότητα με την Ιδεολογία: Μια Μελέτη περίπτωσης Πολιτικών Ιδεολογικών Προσλήψεων στα Μοντέλα Ανίχνευσης Κοινωνικών Θεμάτων', 'it': "Influenza della rilevanza degli argomenti con l'ideologia: un caso di studio delle bias dell'ideologia politica nei modelli di rilevamento degli argomenti sociali", 'lt': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'mk': 'Инфлацирачка тематска релеванција со идеологијата: Случајна студија на политичките идеолошки промени во моделите за детектирање на социјалните теми', 'kk': 'Идеологиялық мәселелерді инфляциялау: Қоғамдық нақыштарды табу үлгілерінде саясаты идеологиялық биялық оқу үлгілері', 'ms': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d വിഷയം ഡിറ്റിക്ടറിയുന്ന മോഡലില്\u200d ഒരു കേസ് സ്ട്രിട്ടി ഓഫ് രാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശയോളജി ബിയാസിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം', 'mt': 'L-Inflazzjoni tar-Relevanza Topika mal-Ideoloġija: Studju ta’ Każ ta’ Żvantaġġi fl-Ideoloġija Politika fil-Mudelli ta’ Detezzjoni Topika Soċjali', 'no': 'Inflating emne Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'pl': 'Nadmuchiwanie znaczenia tematycznego z ideologią: studium przypadku uprzedzeń ideologicznych politycznych w modelach wykrywania tematów społecznych', 'mn': 'Идеологийнхаа хамааралтай сэдэв: Нийгмийн сэдэв тайлбарлах загваруудын судалгаа', 'ro': 'Relevanța subiectelor inflamatorii cu ideologie: un studiu de caz al Bias-urilor ideologiei politice în modelele de detectare a subiectelor sociale', 'si': 'InfLating Subject erlevance with ideology: A case study of Police ideology Bias in Public Subject Detection Models', 'sr': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'so': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'sv': 'Inflammande ämnesrelevans med ideologi: En fallstudie av politisk ideologi Bias i sociala ämnesdetektionsmodeller', 'ta': 'பொருள் தொடர்புடன் உள்ளிடுகிறது: சமூக பொருள் கண்டுபிடிப்பு முறைமைகளில் ஒரு விசாரண படிப்பு ராசியல் ஆய்வு பையாஸ்', 'ur': 'ایڈیولوژی کے ساتھ تخلیق کا موضوع معاملہ ہے: ایک کیس سیاسی ایڈیولوژی بیس کی مطالعہ سیاسی موضوع شناسایی موڈل میں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự liên quan của quyển sách với cẩm nang: Một nghiên cứu về cẩm nang chính trị tham gia vào các mô hình phát hiện vật chủ đề xã hội', 'bg': 'Подуване на темата с идеологията: казус на политическите идеологични наклонности в моделите за откриване на социални теми', 'hr': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'nl': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: Een Case Study van Politieke Ideologie Bias in Sociale Topic Detection Modellen', 'da': 'Oppustende emnerelevans med ideologi: Et casestudie af politisk ideologi bias i sociale emneovervågningsmodeller', 'de': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'id': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'ko': '이데올로기로 화제 관련성 팽창: 사회 화제 검측 모델에서 정치 이데올로기 편견의 개안 연구', 'fa': 'ارتباط موضوع درگیری با ایده\u200cشناسی: یک مطالعه پرونده ایده\u200cشناسی سیاسی در مدل\u200cهای شناسایی موضوع اجتماعی', 'sw': 'Kuanza Kuhusiana na Ideo: Utafiti wa Masuala ya Kisiasa Bias katika Utafiti wa Mada ya Kijamii', 'tr': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'af': 'Inflating Thematic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'sq': 'Futja e rëndësisë tematike me ideologjinë: Një studim rasti i dëmtimeve të ideologjisë politike në modelet e zbulimit të temave sociale', 'am': 'አዲስ የፖለቲካ አዳራሲ ቢዮ ውስጥ ማኅበራዊ ጥያቄ Detection Models', 'hy': 'Գաղաբանության հետ կապված թեմային ներխուժումը. քաղաքական գաղափարաբանության շեղումների դեպքերի ուսումնասիրությունը սոցիալական թեմային հայտնաբերելու մոդելներում', 'az': 'ńįdeoloji il…ô birlikd…ô olan m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr: Sosial Topic Detection Modell…ôrind…ô Siyasi ńįdeoloji BiyasńĪ √Ėyr…ônm…ôsi', 'bn': 'আইডিওলজির সাথে বিষয়ের সম্পর্ক: সামাজিক বিষয়ের সনাক্তি মোডেলে একটি কেস স্টিডি অফ রাজনৈতিক আইডিওলজি বিয়াসের মামলা', 'bs': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'ca': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'cs': 'Případová studie politických ideologických předsudků v modelech detekce sociálních témat', 'et': 'Täiuslik teema asjakohasus ideoloogias: poliitilise ideoloogia kallakute juhtumiuuring sotsiaalsete teemade tuvastamise mudelites', 'fi': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models', 'ha': 'An case Research of political Ideology Bias in social Topic Discection Models', 'jv': 'InfoLatng Subject Relewance with ide logi: A Case Learning of political ide logi Bias in Digital Subject detection model', 'he': 'משפיעת עניין עם אידיאולוגיה: מחקר תיקים של אידיאולוגיה פוליטית שבמודלים גילוי נושאים חברתיים', 'sk': 'Napihnjena tematska relevantnost z ideologijo: študija primera politične ideologije v modelih za odkrivanje družbenih tematik', 'bo': 'Inflating Topic Relevance with Ideology: A Case Study of Political Ideology Bias in Social Topic Detection Models'}
{'en': 'We investigate the impact of political ideology biases in training data. Through a set of comparison studies, we examine the propagation of biases in several widely-used NLP models and its effect on the overall retrieval accuracy. Our work highlights the susceptibility of large, complex models to propagating the biases from human-selected input, which may lead to a deterioration of retrieval accuracy, and the importance of controlling for these biases. Finally, as a way to mitigate the bias, we propose to learn a text representation that is invariant to political ideology while still judging topic relevance.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في تأثير تحيزات الأيديولوجية السياسية في بيانات التدريب. من خلال مجموعة من دراسات المقارنة ، قمنا بفحص انتشار التحيزات في العديد من نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المستخدمة على نطاق واسع وتأثيرها على دقة الاسترجاع الإجمالية. يسلط عملنا الضوء على قابلية النماذج الكبيرة والمعقدة لنشر التحيزات من المدخلات التي يختارها الإنسان ، والتي قد تؤدي إلى تدهور دقة الاسترجاع ، وأهمية التحكم في هذه التحيزات. أخيرًا ، كطريقة لتخفيف التحيز ، نقترح تعلم تمثيل نصي ثابت للأيديولوجية السياسية مع الاستمرار في الحكم على ملاءمة الموضوع.', 'es': 'Investigamos el impacto de los sesgos de la ideología política en los datos de capacitación. A través de un conjunto de estudios comparativos, examinamos la propagación de sesgos en varios modelos de PNL ampliamente utilizados y su efecto en la precisión general de la recuperación. Nuestro trabajo destaca la susceptibilidad de los modelos grandes y complejos a propagar los sesgos de las entradas seleccionadas por humanos, lo que puede conducir a un deterioro de la precisión de la recuperación, y la importancia de controlar estos sesgos. Finalmente, como una forma de mitigar el sesgo, proponemos aprender una representación textual que sea invariante para la ideología política y, al mismo tiempo, juzgar la relevancia del tema.', 'pt': 'Investigamos o impacto dos vieses da ideologia política nos dados de treinamento. Por meio de um conjunto de estudos de comparação, examinamos a propagação de vieses em vários modelos de PNL amplamente usados e seu efeito na precisão geral da recuperação. Nosso trabalho destaca a suscetibilidade de modelos grandes e complexos para propagar os vieses da entrada selecionada por humanos, o que pode levar a uma deterioração da precisão da recuperação, e a importância de controlar esses vieses. Por fim, como forma de mitigar o viés, propomos aprender uma representação textual que seja invariante à ideologia política, sem deixar de julgar a relevância do tópico.', 'fr': "Nous étudions l'impact des biais idéologiques politiques dans les données de formation. À travers une série d'études comparatives, nous examinons la propagation des biais dans plusieurs modèles de PNL largement utilisés et son effet sur la précision globale de la récupération. Nos travaux mettent en évidence la susceptibilité des grands modèles complexes à propager les biais provenant d'entrées sélectionnées par l'homme, ce qui peut entraîner une détérioration de la précision de la récupération, et l'importance de contrôler ces biais. Enfin, afin d'atténuer le biais, nous proposons d'apprendre une représentation textuelle invariante à l'idéologie politique tout en jugeant de la pertinence du sujet.", 'ja': '私たちは、トレーニングデータにおける政治思想の偏見の影響を調査します。一連の比較研究を通じて、我々は、いくつかの広く使用されているNLPモデルにおけるバイアスの伝播と、全体的な検索精度への影響を検討する。私たちの研究は、人間が選択した入力からバイアスが伝播し、検索精度が低下する可能性があることに対する大規模で複雑なモデルの影響を強調し、これらのバイアスを制御することの重要性を示しています。最後に、バイアスを軽減する方法として、トピックの関連性を判断しながら、政治イデオロギーに不変のテキスト表現を学ぶことを提案します。', 'zh': '臣等考其政意识形态偏见训练之数。 考之以群,考之以广NLP偏传以检准确性。 臣等杂模,于人工所选输传播偏差之敏感性,或检准确性降杀,及制偏差之要。 最后,为轻偏见之法,建议学一与政意识形态不变之文,仍决主题之相关性。', 'hi': 'हम प्रशिक्षण डेटा में राजनीतिक विचारधारा के पूर्वाग्रहों के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। तुलना अध्ययनों के एक सेट के माध्यम से, हम कई व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले एनएलपी मॉडल में पूर्वाग्रहों के प्रसार और समग्र पुनर्प्राप्ति सटीकता पर इसके प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। हमारा काम मानव-चयनित इनपुट से पूर्वाग्रहों का प्रचार करने के लिए बड़े, जटिल मॉडल की संवेदनशीलता पर प्रकाश डालता है, जिससे पुनर्प्राप्ति सटीकता में गिरावट आ सकती है, और इन पूर्वाग्रहों के लिए नियंत्रित करने का महत्व हो सकता है। अंत में, पूर्वाग्रह को कम करने के तरीके के रूप में, हम एक पाठ प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो राजनीतिक विचारधारा के लिए अपरिवर्तनीय है, जबकि अभी भी विषय प्रासंगिकता का न्याय करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем влияние предвзятости политической идеологии на учебные данные. С помощью набора сравнительных исследований мы изучаем распространение смещений в нескольких широко используемых моделях NLP и его влияние на общую точность поиска. Наша работа подчеркивает восприимчивость больших, сложных моделей к распространению смещений от выбранных человеком входных данных, что может привести к ухудшению точности поиска, и важность контроля для этих смещений. Наконец, в качестве способа смягчения предвзятости мы предлагаем выучить текстовое представление, которое является инвариантным по отношению к политической идеологии, но при этом оцениваем актуальность темы.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar thionchar laofachtaí idé-eolaíochta polaitiúla i sonraí oiliúna. Trí thacar staidéar comparáide, scrúdaímid iomadú laofachta i roinnt samhlacha NLP a úsáidtear go forleathan agus a éifeacht ar chruinneas iomlán aisghabhála. Aibhsíonn ár gcuid oibre an claonadh atá ag samhlacha móra casta i leith na laofachta a iomadú ó ionchur a roghnaítear ag an duine, a bhféadfadh meath a bheith mar thoradh ar chruinneas aisghabhála, agus an tábhacht a bhaineann le rialú do na laofachtaí sin. Mar fhocal scoir, mar bhealach leis an gclaonadh a mhaolú, tá sé beartaithe againn léiriú téacs a fhoghlaim atá difriúil ón idé-eolaíocht pholaitiúil agus ag an am céanna ag déanamh breithiúnais ar ábharthacht topaicí.', 'hu': 'Vizsgáljuk a politikai ideológiai előítéletek hatását a képzési adatokban. Összehasonlító tanulmányok során számos széles körben használt NLP modellben megvizsgáljuk az előítéletek terjedését és annak hatását az általános visszakeresési pontosságra. Munkánk rávilágít arra, hogy a nagy, összetett modellek érzékenyek az ember által kiválasztott bemenetekből származó előítéletek terjesztésére, ami a visszakeresés pontosságának romlásához vezethet, valamint az előítéletek ellenőrzésének fontosságára. Végül, az elfogultság enyhítésének módjaként azt javasoljuk, hogy tanuljunk meg egy olyan szövegábrázolást, amely nem változik a politikai ideológiával szemben, miközben még ítéljük meg a téma relevanciáját.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε τον αντίκτυπο των προκατειλημμένων πολιτικών ιδεολογιών στα δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Μέσα από μια σειρά συγκριτικών μελετών, εξετάζουμε την διάδοση των προκατάληψης σε αρκετά ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενα μοντέλα και την επίδρασή της στη συνολική ακρίβεια ανάκτησης. Η εργασία μας υπογραμμίζει την ευαισθησία των μεγάλων, πολύπλοκων μοντέλων στη διάδοση των προκαταλήψεων από την επιλεγμένη από τον άνθρωπο εισαγωγή, η οποία μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε υποβάθμιση της ακρίβειας ανάκτησης, καθώς και τη σημασία του ελέγχου αυτών των προκαταλήψεων. Τέλος, ως τρόπος να μετριάσουμε την προκατάληψη, προτείνουμε να μάθουμε μια αναπαράσταση κειμένου που είναι αμετάβλητη στην πολιτική ιδεολογία ενώ ακόμα κρίνει τη σημασία του θέματος.', 'it': "Investighiamo l'impatto dei pregiudizi dell'ideologia politica nei dati di formazione. Attraverso una serie di studi comparativi, esaminiamo la propagazione dei bias in diversi modelli NLP ampiamente utilizzati e il suo effetto sulla precisione complessiva del recupero. Il nostro lavoro evidenzia la suscettibilità di modelli grandi e complessi alla propagazione dei pregiudizi da input selezionati dall'uomo, che può portare a un deterioramento della precisione di recupero, e l'importanza di controllare questi pregiudizi. Infine, come modo per mitigare il pregiudizio, proponiamo di imparare una rappresentazione testuale che sia invariante all'ideologia politica pur giudicando la rilevanza dell'argomento.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგიური წარმოდგენების შესახებ მონაცემებში. შემდგომარებული კვლევების ნაწილად, ჩვენ გავუკეთებთ რამდენიმე მზად გამოიყენებული NLP მოდელში პროპაგიაციას და მისი ეფექტი ყველა მიღებული მართლაზე. ჩვენი სამუშაო აღწერს დიდი, კომპლექსიკური მოდელების შესაძლებლობა, რომ ადამიანის მონიშნული მონაცემების წინასწარმატების გახსნა, რომელიც შეიძლება გახსნა წინასწარმატების გახსნა და ამ წინასწარმა საბოლოოდ, როგორც გზავნის შემცირება, ჩვენ გვეძლია გავისწავლოთ ტექსტის გამოსახულება, რომელიც პოლიტიკური იდეოლოგიაზე გაუკეთესებელია, რომელიც სხვა სხვა თემის შე', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame politinių ideologinių pusiausvyrų poveikį mokymo duomenims. Atliekant palyginamųjų tyrimų rinkinį, mes nagrinėjame, kaip įvairiuose plačiai naudojamuose NLP modeliuose skleidžiami nukrypimai ir kaip jis daro poveikį bendram atkūrimo tikslumui. Mūsų darbe pabrėžiamas didelių, sudėtingų modelių jautrumas išplitimui iš žmogaus pasirinktų įnašų, dėl kurių gali pablogėti surinkimo tikslumas ir šių įnašų kontrolės svarba. Finally, as a way to mitigate the bias, we propose to learn a text representation that is invariant to political ideology while still judging topic relevance.', 'kk': 'Біз саяси идеологиялық мәліметтерінің нәтижесін зерттейміз. Бірнеше салыстыру зерттеулері арқылы бірнеше қолданылған NLP үлгілерінде бөліктердің пропагациясын және оның эффекті жалпы алу дәрежесіне тексереміз. Жұмыс істегеніміз үлкен, комплекс моделдердің қарсылығын адамдардың таңдалған енгізімінен өзгерту үшін таңдалған қарсылығын таңдайды. Бұл қарсылығының дұрыстығын қалпына келтіру мүмкін, осы қарсылықтард Соңында, тақырыпты көшірмелеу үшін біз саяси идеологиялық мәтін түсініктемесін оқытуға мүмкіндік береміз.', 'ms': 'Kami menyelidiki kesan bias ideologi politik dalam data latihan. Melalui set kajian perbandingan, kami memeriksa perbatasan bias dalam beberapa model NLP yang digunakan secara luas dan kesannya pada keseluruhan ketepatan pemulihan. Kerja kami menentukan kelemahan model yang besar dan kompleks untuk memperluas biases dari input yang dipilih oleh manusia, yang mungkin menyebabkan peningkatan akurasi pemulihan, dan penting mengawal biases ini. Akhirnya, sebagai cara untuk mengurangi bias, kami cadangkan untuk belajar mewakili teks yang tidak sesuai dengan ideologi politik sementara masih menilai relevan topik.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശയോഗ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കൂട്ടം തുല്യമായ പഠനങ്ങളിലൂടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d പലതും വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന NLP മോഡലുകളില്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതും അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം മൊ മനുഷ്യര്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രകടനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ജോലി വലിയ, സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മോഡലുകളുടെ സംശയത്തെ പ്ര അവസാനം, ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ കുറച്ചു കൂട്ടാനുള്ള വഴിയായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധിയെ', 'mk': 'Го истражуваме влијанието на политичките идеолошки предрасуди во обуката на податоците. Преку сет споредбени студии, ја испитуваме проширувањето на предрасудите во неколку широко употребени НЛП модели и нејзиниот ефект на целокупната прецизност на преземање. Нашата работа ја истакнува чувствителноста на големи, комплексни модели за пропагација на предрасудите од човековите избрани влози, што може да доведе до влошување на прецизноста на преземањето и важноста на контролата за овие предрасуди. Конечно, како начин да се намали предрасудата, предлагаме да се научи текстово претставување кое е непријатно за политичката идеологија, истовремено осудувајќи ја релевантноста на темата.', 'mt': 'Investigaw l-impatt tal-preġudizzji tal-ideoloġija politika fid-dejta tat-taħriġ. Permezz ta’ sett ta’ studji ta’ tqabbil, a ħna jeżaminaw il-propagazzjoni ta’ preġudizzji f’diversi mudelli NLP użati b’mod wiesa’ u l-effett tiegħu fuq il-preċiżjoni ġenerali tal-irkupru. Ix-xogħol tagħna jenfasizza s-suxxettibilità ta’ mudelli kbar u kumplessi għall-propagazzjoni tal-preġudizzji minn input magħżul mill-bniedem, li jistgħu jwasslu għal deterjorament tal-preċiżjoni tal-irkupru, u l-importanza tal-kontroll għal dawn il-preġudizzji. Fl-a ħħar nett, bħala mod biex jitnaqqas il-preġudizzju, qed nipproponu li titgħallem rappreżentazzjoni tat-test li hija invarjanti għall-ideoloġija politika filwaqt li għadha qed tiġġudika r-rilevanza tas-suġġett.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker effekten av politiske ideologiske forvirkningar i opplæringsdata. Gjennom eit sett samanlikningsstudar, er vi undersøkt utviklinga av forsvinningar i fleire breidde brukte NLP-modeller og effekten på den generelle tilhendinga nøyaktigheten. Arbeidet vårt syntiserer førspørseligheten til store, komplekse modeller for å propagara førspørselsene frå menneskelige inndata, som kan føre til ein feilsøking av rettigheten og viktigheten for å kontrollera desse førspørselsene. Etter slutt, som ein måte å redusere biasen, foreslår vi å lære eit tekstrepresentasjon som er invariant til politiske ideologi mens det fortsatt gjer fram om temarelevant.', 'pl': 'Badamy wpływ uprzedzeń ideologicznych politycznych na dane treningowe. Poprzez zestaw badań porównawczych badamy propagację uprzedzeń w kilku powszechnie stosowanych modelach NLP i jej wpływ na ogólną dokładność pobierania. Nasze prace podkreślają podatność dużych, złożonych modeli na propagowanie uprzedzeń z wybranych przez człowieka danych wejściowych, co może prowadzić do pogorszenia dokładności pobierania oraz znaczenie kontroli tych uprzedzeń. Wreszcie, jako sposób na złagodzenie uprzedzeń proponujemy nauczyć się reprezentacji tekstowej niezmiennej dla ideologii politycznej, jednocześnie oceniając istotność tematu.', 'ro': 'Investigăm impactul părtinirilor ideologiei politice în datele de formare. Printr-un set de studii de comparație, examinăm propagarea prejudecăților în mai multe modele de PNL utilizate pe scară largă și efectul acestuia asupra acurateții generale de recuperare. Lucrarea noastră evidențiază sensibilitatea modelelor mari și complexe la propagarea prejudecăților din input-ul selectat de om, care poate duce la o deteriorare a acurateții de recuperare, precum și importanța controlului pentru aceste prejudecăți. În cele din urmă, ca o modalitate de atenuare a prejudecății, propunem să învățăm o reprezentare a textului care este invariantă ideologiei politice, judecând în același timp relevanța subiectului.', 'mn': 'Бид улс төрийн ойлголтын үр дүнг суралцах өгөгдлийн талаар судалж байна. Хэрэв харьцуулах судалгаанаас бид олон нийтлэг NLP загварын загварын тухай харьцуулах зөв нөлөөг судалж байна. Бидний ажил хүн төрөлхтний сонгогдсон орнуудаас гайхалтай байдлыг дэлгэрүүлэхэд том, төвөгтэй загваруудын тухай хүндрэлтэй байдлыг илэрхийлдэг. Энэ нь хүн төрөлхтний зөв байдлыг бууруулж чадна. Эцэст нь, бид улс төрийн ойлголтыг багасгах арга болгон сэдвээс хамааралтай байдлыг шалгаж байгаад улс төрийн ойлголтын тухай илэрхийлэл сурах гэсэн санал өгдөг.', 'so': 'Waxaynu baaraynaa saamaynta fikrada siyaasadeed ee waxbarashada. Waxbarashooyin is-barbardhig ah ayaannu ku baaraynaa ogeysiiska tababarida ee noocyo badan oo lagu isticmaalay NLP iyo saamaynta ku saabsan saxda helitaanka oo dhan. Shaqo-keentayadu wuxuu ka muuqanayaa shakilnaanta modelalka waaweyn oo adag, si uu u sii sheego khilaafka laga soo doortay injiilka dadka, taasoo sabab u noqon karta koritaanka saxda soo celinta iyo muhiimka u ah in la maamulo khiyaanadaas. Ugu dambaysta, sida qaab ay dib u dhigto tababarka, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aad barto macluumaad qoraal ah oo aan ku habboonayn fikrada siyaasadeed inta ay weli xukumaan arrimaha la xiriira.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ රජාත්\u200dරික අදහස් පරීක්ෂණයේ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණාවක් වලින්, අපි පරීක්ෂණා කරනවා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මකය NLP මොඩේල් වලින් විශේෂ අපේ වැඩේ ලොකු සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා මිනිස්සු තෝරාගත්ත ඇතුලට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ව අන්තිමට, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ඒක රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක අදහස් විදිහට අවශ්\u200dයයි, තව', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker effekten av politiska ideologiska fördomar i utbildningsdata. Genom en uppsättning jämförelsestudier undersöker vi spridningen av fördomar i flera allmänt använda NLP-modeller och dess effekt på den övergripande insamlingsnoggrannheten. Vårt arbete belyser känsligheten hos stora, komplexa modeller för att sprida fördomar från mänskligt utvald input, vilket kan leda till en försämring av insamlingsnoggrannheten, samt vikten av att kontrollera för dessa fördomar. Slutligen, som ett sätt att mildra biasen, föreslår vi att lära oss en textrepresentation som är invariant för politisk ideologi samtidigt som vi bedömer ämnesrelevans.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo uticaj političkih predrasuda ideologije u podacima obuke. Kroz skup ispitivanja usporedbe, pregledali smo propagaciju predrasude u nekoliko široko korištenih NLP modela i njegov učinak na ukupnu tačnost povratka. Naš rad ukazuje na osetljivost velikih, kompleksnih modela da se proširi predrasude od odabranog ljudskog ulaza, što može dovesti do pogoršanja tačnosti povratka i važnosti kontrole za te predrasude. Na kraju, kao način da smanjimo predrasude, predlažemo naučiti tekstsku predstavu koja je invalidna za političku ideologiju, dok još uvek osuđujemo na temu relevantnost.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் பயிற்சி தரவில் அரசியல் யோசனையாடியல் பிரச்சனைகளின் விளைவை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். ஒரு சில ஒப்பிடும் படிப்புகள் மூலம், நாம் பல விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட NLP மாதிரிகளில் பிரச்சினைகளை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். அதன் விளைவு மொத எங்கள் வேலை பெரிய, சிக்கலான மாதிரிகளின் சந்தேகத்தைக் குறிப்பிடுகிறது, மனித த தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டிலிருந்து பிரச்சனைகளை வெளிப்படுத இறுதியில், பியாஸ் குறைக்க ஒரு வழியாக, நாம் ஒரு உரை பிரதிநிதியை கற்றுக்கொள்ள பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது இன்னும் தலைப்பு தொடர்பு தீ', 'ur': 'ہم سیاسی ایڈیولوجی کی تاثیر کی تحقیق کررہے ہیں ایک مقایسہ مطالعہ کے ذریعہ ہم نے بہت سی مطالعہ مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے بغیر مطالعہ کی پھیلائی کا تحقیق کیا ہے اور اس کا اثر صرف حاصل کے دقیق پر ہے۔ ہمارا کام بڑے پیچیدہ موڈل کے احساسات کو تفصیل دیتا ہے کہ انسان کو منتخب کیا گیا ہے اور اس کے ذریعہ ان کی کنٹرول کرنے کا اہم ہے۔ آخر میں، ایک طریقہ کے طور پر، ہم نے ایک ٹیکسٹ کی نمایش سکھائی ہے جو سیاسی ایڈیولوژی کے لئے ناپسند ہے، حالانکہ ابھی بھی موضوع کے معاملہ کا فیصلہ کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Maʼlumotni tajriba qilish uchun siyasaviy fikologiy qandaydir effektini o'rganamiz. Ko'pchilik o'qituvchilar orqali biz bir necha qancha foydalanilgan NLP modellarida o'zgarishni ko'rib chiqqamiz va uning hamma xabarga olish imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Bizning ishimizning katta, murakkab modellarning shaklni ko'rsatadi. Bu inson tanlangan input ichidagi vazifalarni qayta tasdiqlash imkoniyatini ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu ta'minlovchilarni boshqarish muhimligini ko'rsatadi. Finally, as a way to mitigate the bias, we propose to learn a text representation that is invariant to political ideology while still judging topic relevance.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi điều tra tác động của các tư tưởng chính trị giả trong dữ liệu đào tạo. Qua một loạt nghiên cứu so sánh, chúng tôi nghiên cứu độ lây lan của bệnh tật trong nhiều mô hình Chọc NLP phổ biến và ảnh hưởng của nó lên độ chính xác phục hồi tổng thể. Công việc của chúng tôi nhấn mạnh khả năng phát tán các mô hình phức tạp lớn từ các giả lập được chọn người, và nó có thể dẫn đến một sự thay đổi độ chính xác thu hồi, và tầm quan trọng của kiểm soát cho các giả lập này. Cuối cùng, để giảm bớt khuynh hướng, chúng tôi đề nghị học một đại diện văn bản luôn bất lực đối với tư tưởng chính trị, trong khi vẫn đánh giá mối liên quan về chủ đề.', 'bg': 'Проучваме влиянието на политическите идеологични пристрастия в данните за обучение. Чрез набор от сравнителни проучвания изследваме разпространението на пристрастия в няколко широко използвани модела на НЛП и неговото въздействие върху цялостната точност на извличането. Нашата работа подчертава чувствителността на големи, сложни модели за разпространение на отклоненията от избрания от човека вход, което може да доведе до влошаване на точността на извличането, както и важността на контрола за тези отклонения. И накрая, като начин за смекчаване на пристрастията, предлагаме да научим текстово представяне, което е неизменно на политическата идеология, докато все още съдим тематичната релевантност.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken de impact van politieke ideologische vooroordelen in trainingsdata. Door middel van een reeks vergelijkingsstudies onderzoeken we de propagatie van biases in verschillende veelgebruikte NLP modellen en het effect ervan op de algehele retrieval nauwkeurigheid. Ons werk benadrukt de gevoeligheid van grote, complexe modellen voor het verspreiden van de biases van door de mens geselecteerde input, wat kan leiden tot een verslechtering van de nauwkeurigheid van het ophalen, en het belang van controle voor deze biases. Tenslotte stellen we voor om de vooroordelen te verzachten een tekstweergave te leren die onveranderlijk is voor politieke ideologie, terwijl we nog steeds de relevantie van onderwerpen beoordelen.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger effekten af politiske ideologiske fordomme i træningsdata. Gennem et sæt sammenligningsundersøgelser undersøger vi udbredelsen af biases i flere almindeligt anvendte NLP modeller og dens effekt på den samlede hentningsnøjagtighed. Vores arbejde fremhæver følsomheden af store, komplekse modeller for at sprede fordommene fra menneskeligt valgte input, hvilket kan føre til en forringelse af hentningsnøjagtigheden, og vigtigheden af at kontrollere disse fordomme. Endelig foreslår vi, som en måde at afbøde biasen på, at lære en tekstrepræsentation, der er invariant for politisk ideologi, samtidig med at vi stadig bedømmer emnets relevans.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo utjecaj političkih predrasuda ideologije u podacima obuke. Kroz skup ispitivanja usporedbe, pregledali smo propagaciju predrasude u nekoliko široko korištenih NLP modela i njegov učinak na ukupnu tačnost povratka. Naš rad naglašava osjetljivost velikih, kompleksnih modela kako bi se proširila predrasude odabranog ljudskog ulaza, što bi moglo dovesti do pogoršanja tačnosti povratka i važnosti kontrole za te predrasude. Na kraju, kao način za smanjenje predrasude, predlažemo naučiti tekst zastupanje koji je invalidan za političku ideologiju, dok još uvijek osuđujemo na temu relevantnost.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen den Einfluss politischer ideologischer Vorurteile auf Trainingsdaten. Durch eine Reihe von Vergleichsstudien untersuchen wir die Ausbreitung von Verzerrungen in mehreren weit verbreiteten NLP-Modellen und ihren Einfluss auf die Gesamtwiederholgenauigkeit. Unsere Arbeit beleuchtet die Anfälligkeit großer, komplexer Modelle für die Ausbreitung von Verzerrungen aus vom Menschen ausgewählten Eingaben, die zu einer Verschlechterung der Abrufgenauigkeit führen können, und die Bedeutung der Kontrolle dieser Verzerrungen. Schließlich schlagen wir vor, eine Textrepräsentation zu erlernen, die invariant zur politischen Ideologie ist und gleichzeitig die Relevanz des Themas beurteilt.', 'fa': 'ما تحقیق تاثیر ایده\u200cشناسی سیاسی در داده\u200cهای آموزش تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. از طریق یک مجموعه مطالعه مقایسه، ما توسعه پیشرفت\u200cها را در چند مدل NLP استفاده می\u200cکنیم و اثر آن بر دقیق بازیابی عمومی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. کارمون حساسيت مدل هاي بزرگ و پيچيده رو روشن ميکنه تا جلوگيري از ورودي هاي انتخاب شده بشر رو گسترش بده که ممکنه به خسارت دقيق بازگيري و مهم کنترل براي اين جلوگيري بالاخره، به عنوان راهی برای تخفیف پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک نمایش متن را یاد بگیریم که به نظر سیاسی بی\u200cنیاز است در حالی که هنوز مسئولیت موضوع را قانع می\u200cکنیم.', 'id': 'Kami menyelidiki dampak dari bias ideologi politik dalam data latihan. Melalui set studi perbandingan, kami memeriksa propagasi bias dalam beberapa model NLP yang sangat digunakan dan efeknya pada akurasi penulisan umum. Pekerjaan kami menunjukkan kelemahan dari model yang besar dan kompleks untuk memperluas biases dari masukan yang dipilih manusia, yang mungkin menyebabkan deteriorasi akurasi penerimaan, dan penting mengendalikan biases ini. Finally, as a way to mitigate the bias, we propose to learn a text representation that is invariant to political ideology while still judging topic relevance.', 'ko': '우리는 정치 이데올로기 편견이 교육 데이터에 미친 영향을 조사했다.비교 연구를 통해 우리는 여러 가지 광범위하게 사용되는 NLP 모델에서 편차의 전파와 전체 검색 정밀도에 대한 영향을 검증했다.우리의 업무는 대형 복잡한 모델이 인류가 선택한 입력의 편차를 전파하는 것에 대한 민감성을 강조하는데 이것은 검색 정밀도의 하락과 이런 편차를 통제하는 중요성을 초래할 수 있다.마지막으로 편견을 경감시키는 방법으로서 우리는 정치 이데올로기에 대한 변하지 않는 텍스트 표현을 배우는 동시에 주제의 관련성을 판단하는 것을 권장한다.', 'sw': 'Tunatachunguza madhara ya upendeleo wa kisiasa katika mafunzo ya data. Kwa njia ya tafiti mbalimbali za kulinganisha, tunachunguza propaganda za upendeleo katika mitindo kadhaa ya NLP zilizotumika kwa kiasi kikubwa na athari yake juu ya uhakika wa kupokea kwa ujumla. Kazi yetu inaonyesha wasiwasi wa mifano makubwa, magumu ya kutangaza upendeleo kutoka kwenye kituo hicho kinachochaguliwa kwa binadamu, ambacho kinaweza kusababisha mabaya ya ukweli wa kurejea, na umuhimu wa kudhibiti upendeleo huu. Mwisho, kama njia ya kupunguza upendeleo huo, tunapendekeza kujifunza uwakilishi wa maandishi ambayo haina uvumi wa mawazo ya kisiasa wakati bado tunahukumu umuhimu wa mada.', 'tr': 'Biz syýasy ideologiýasynyň maglumatlarynda täsirini barlaýarys. Birnäçe karşılaşyk öwrenmeleri bilen, birnäçe köp ulanylan NLP nusgalarynda biaslaryň üýtgedigini we onuň iň bütin galan dogrudygyny bardyk. Çalışmalarymyz uly, karmaşık nusgalaryň üýtgeşigini, adam saýlanan girişinden biasleri döwletlendirmek üçin ýagtylygy ýagtylaýar. Bu durum çykarmak dogrylygyny azaltar we bu biaslar üçin bejermek üçin wajyplygyny ýagtylaýar. Soňunda, sowgatlary azaltmak üçin bir ýoly bolup syýasy ideologiýasyna söwürmek üçin meseläni häli etmek üçin mäsirli bir metin temsilini öwrenmegi teklip berýäris.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die effekt van politieke ideologie-biases in onderwerp data. Deur 'n stel vergelyking studies, ondersoek ons die propagasie van voorspoedies in verskeie vaste gebruikte NLP modele en sy effek op die hele herhaal waarskynlik. Ons werk verlig die aanvaardigheid van groot, komplekse modele om die voorspoedighede van die mens gekose invoer te spreek, wat dalk kan lei na 'n verduur van verkry waardigheid en die belangrikheid van beheer vir hierdie voorspoedighede. Eindelik, as 'n manier om die voorspoedigheid te verminder, voorstel ons om 'n teks-voorspoedigheid te leer wat onveranderlik is aan politieke ideologie terwyl nog 'n besluit van onderwerp relevansie.", 'am': 'የፖለቲካዊ አካባቢ የስህተት ግንኙነትን በማስተማር ላይ እናምርመራለን፡፡ በተስተያየት ትምህርት፣ በብዙ ስፋት በተጠቀም የNLP ሞዴላዎችን የውስደትን አዋጅ እና በሙሉ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሥራችን የሰው ተመርጠው ጥያቄን ለማሳየት የሚችል ትልቅ፣ ተቃውሞው ሞዴላዎችን የሚያሳውቀው ጥያቄ እና ለዚህ ሁኔታዎች መቆጣጠር የሚያስፈልገውን ጥያቄ የሚያሳውቀው ነው፡፡ Finally, as a way to mitigate the bias, we propose to learn a text representation that is invariant to political ideology while still judging topic relevance.', 'sq': 'Ne hetojmë ndikimin e paragjykimeve të ideologjisë politike në trainimin e të dhënave. Nëpërmjet një sëre studimesh krahasimi, ne shqyrtojmë përhapjen e paragjykimeve në disa modele NLP të përdorura gjerësisht dhe efektin e saj në saktësinë e përgjithshme të marrjes. Our work highlights the susceptibility of large, complex models to propagating the biases from human-selected input, which may lead to a deterioration of retrieval accuracy, and the importance of controlling for these biases.  Më në fund, si një mënyrë për të lehtësuar paragjykimin, ne propozojmë të mësojmë një përfaqësim teksti që është invariant ndaj ideologjisë politike duke gjykuar ende relevancën e temës.', 'az': 'Biz siyasi ideoloji t…ôhsil m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn t…ôsirl…ôrinin t…ôsirini incidirik. Birc…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik m…ôhsullarńĪ il…ô, √ßoxlu geniŇül…ônmiŇü NLP modell…ôrd…ô t…ôsirl…ôrin yayńĪlmasńĪnńĪ v…ô b√ľt√ľn t…ôsirl…ôrinin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrin…ô baxńĪrq. Bizim iŇüimiz b√∂y√ľk, kompleks modell…ôrin t…ôsirl…ôrini insanlarńĪn se√ßilmiŇü giriŇüind…ôn uzaqlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôsirl…ôrini t…ôŇükil edir ki, bu t…ôsirl…ôrin d…ôqiqliyin…ô d√ľŇü…ôc…ôyini v…ô bu t…ôsirl…ôrin m√ľhafiz…ôsini t…ôŇükil ed…ô bil…ôr. Sonunda, t…ôsiri azaltma yolu kimi, m…ôs…ôl…ônin m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ h√∂km ed…ôrk…ôn siyasi ideoloji t…ôsiri olmayan m…ôtn t…ôsirini √∂yr…ônm…ôyi t…ôklif edirik.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք քաղաքական գաղափարաբանության կողմնականությունների ազդեցությունը կրթության տվյալների մեջ: Համեմատության մի շարք ուսումնասիրությունների միջոցով մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք կողմնականությունների տարածումը բազմաթիվ լայնորեն օգտագործված ՆԼՊ մոդելներում և դրա ազդեցությունը ընդհանուր վերականգնման ճշգրտության վրա: Մեր աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է մեծ, բարդ մոդելների խոցելիությունը մարդկային ընտրված ներմուծքի կողմնականությունների տարածման համար, ինչը կարող է հանգեցնել վերադարձման ճշգրտության վատթարանմանը և այս կողմնականությունների վերահսկման կարևորությունը: Վերջապես, որպես միջոց, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք կողմնականությունը, մենք առաջարկում ենք սովորել տեքստի ներկայացումը, որը քաղաքական գաղափարախոսություններին անընդհատ է, մինչդեռ դատում է թեմային կարևորությունը:', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যে রাজনৈতিক ধারণার প্রভাব তদন্ত করি। বেশ কিছু তুলনায় গবেষণার মাধ্যমে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ব্যবহৃত এনএলপি মডেলে বিভিন্ন বৈষম্যের প্রচারণা পরীক্ষা করি এবং সাধারণত পুনরুদ্ধারের Our work highlights the susceptibility of large, complex models to propagating the biases from human-selected input, which may lead to a deterioration of retrieval accuracy, and the importance of controlling for these biases.  শেষ পর্যন্ত, এই বিষয়টি কমিয়ে দেওয়ার একটি উপায় হিসেবে আমরা একটি টেক্সট প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে প্রস্তাব করছি যা রাজনৈতিক চিন্তার জন্য অমান্য,', 'bs': 'Istražujemo uticaj političkih predrasuda ideologije u podacima obuke. Kroz skup ispitivanja usporedbe, pregledali smo propagaciju predrasude u nekoliko široko korištenih NLP modela i njegov učinak na ukupnu tačnost povratka. Naš rad naglašava osjetljivost velikih, kompleksnih modela kako bi se proširila predrasude odabranog ljudskog ulaza, što bi moglo dovesti do pogoršanja tačnosti povratka i važnosti kontrole za te predrasude. Na kraju, kao način da smanjimo predrasude, predlažemo naučiti tekst predstavljanje koja je invalidna za političku ideologiju dok još uvijek osuđujemo relevantnost teme.', 'ca': "Investiguem l'impacte dels prejudicis de la ideologia política en les dades d'entrenament. A través d'un conjunt d'estudis de comparació, examinem la propagació de biases en varis models generalitzats de NLP i el seu efecte en la precisió global de recuperació. La nostra feina destaca la sensibilitat dels models grans i complexes a la propagació dels prejudicis de l'entrada seleccionada per l'home, que pot portar a un deteriorament de la precisió de recuperació, i la importància de controlar aquests prejudicis. Finalment, com a manera de mitigar el bias, proposem aprendre una representació de text invariant a la ideologia política mentre encara juguem la pertinencia del tema.", 'cs': 'Zkoumáme vliv politických ideologických předsudků na tréninková data. Prostřednictvím sady srovnávacích studií zkoumáme šíření biasů v několika široce používaných NLP modelech a jejich vliv na celkovou přesnost vyhledávání. Naše práce zdůrazňuje náchylnost velkých, komplexních modelů k šíření předsudků z člověkem vybraných vstupů, které mohou vést ke zhoršení přesnosti vyhledávání, a důležitost kontroly těchto předsudků. A konečně, jako způsob, jak zmírnit zaujatost, navrhujeme naučit se textové reprezentace, která je invariantní k politické ideologii a současně posuzovat relevantnost tématu.', 'et': 'Uurime poliitiliste ideoloogiliste eelarvamuste mõju koolitusandmetele. Võrdlusuuringute kogumi kaudu uurime kallakute levikut mitmes laialdaselt kasutatavas NLP mudelis ja selle mõju üldisele tagasivõtmise täpsusele. Meie töö rõhutab suurte, keerukate mudelite tundlikkust inimese valitud sisendist tulenevate kallakute levitamisele, mis võib viia tagasivõtmise täpsuse halvenemiseni, ning nende kallakute kontrollimise tähtsust. Lõpuks, kuidas leevendada eelarvamusi, teeme ettepaneku õppida teksti representatsioon, mis on poliitilise ideoloogia suhtes invariantne, hinnates samal ajal teema asjakohasust.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme poliittisten ideologisten ennakkoluulojen vaikutusta koulutusdataan. Vertailututkimusten avulla selvitämme harhan leviämistä useissa laajasti käytetyissä NLP-malleissa ja sen vaikutusta kokonaishakutarkkuuteen. Työssämme korostetaan suurten, monimutkaisten mallien alttiutta levittää ihmisen valitsemasta syötteestä peräisin olevia harhakuvia, jotka voivat johtaa haun tarkkuuden heikkenemiseen, sekä näiden harhajen hallinnan tärkeyttä. Lopuksi, keinona lieventää puolueellisuutta, ehdotamme oppivamme tekstin esitystä, joka on invariantti poliittiselle ideologialle mutta silti arvioi aiheen merkitystä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nyolesi nggambar barang politik-ingkang biasane kuwi nggawe dadi. Dhewe nganggo gampang karo perusahaan mrudhakan karo hal piyambak Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan susceptualisé ning awak dhéwé, kuwi komplex model sing gak nggawe biasane iki dadi bisa diuwisan input uwong, sing bisa nguasai perduhaan kuwi susceptualisé, lan akeh lani nggawe nguasai biasane iki. Lha wigat, nganggo maneh sing beraksi biasane, awake dhewe ngerusaha gambaran seneng pisan politik sing invariant kanggo ide-politik sing isih njaluk dhéwé ngerasah cara-cara sing isiné.', 'sk': 'Raziskujemo vpliv političnih ideoloških pristranskosti na podatke o usposabljanju. S pomočjo nabora primerjalnih študij preučujemo razmnoževanje pristranskosti v več široko uporabljenih modelih NLP in njegov vpliv na splošno natančnost pridobivanja. Naše delo poudarja občutljivost velikih, kompleksnih modelov za širjenje pristranskih vhodov, ki jih je izbral človek, kar lahko vodi v poslabšanje natančnosti pridobivanja, in pomen nadzora nad temi pristranskimi vhodi. Nazadnje, kot način ublažitve pristranskosti, predlagamo, da se naučimo besedilne reprezentacije, ki je invariantna za politično ideologijo, medtem ko še vedno presojamo relevantnost teme.', 'ha': "Ina ƙidãya musamman matsayin zagon siyasaci a cikin danne. Ga wasu fassara masu daidaita, Munã jarraba bayani na ci cikin misãlai masu amfani da NLP masu yawa da ake yi wa amfani da shi, da fassararsa a kan tabbatarwa na sami. Kayinmu yana ƙayyade shakka ga misãlai masu girma, masu husũma dõmin su yi bayani ga sauri daga cikin shirin mutum wanda aka zãɓe, wannan yana kasancẽwa ta ƙara wani haske na tsari da za'a samu, kuma muhimu da za'a yi musulunta wa wannan taƙalumai. Gani, kamar hanyar da za'a yi ƙaranci ga fassaran, tuna bukãta a karɓi wani matsayi wanda ba ta taɓa ba zuwa ga fikayaikin siyasa a lokacin da za'a yi hukunci da muhimmi na madaidaita.", 'he': 'אנחנו חוקרים את ההשפעה של ההתמחות האידיאולוגיות הפוליטיות בנתונים האימונים. באמצעות קבוצת מחקרי השוואה, אנו בודקים את ההתפשטות של היחידות במספר דוגמנים NLP משתמשים רחוק וההשפעה שלה על מדויקת השיגור הכללית. העבודה שלנו מזכירה את הרגישות של דוגמנים גדולים ומסובכים להפיץ את ההתמחות מהכניסה שנבחרה ע"י האדם, אשר עלולה להוביל לשדרה של מדויקת השיגה, וחשוב השליטה על ההתמחות הללו. סוף סוף, כדרך להקל את ההתמחות, אנו מציעים ללמוד מייצג טקסט ששונה לאידיאולוגיה פוליטית בזמן שעדיין לשפוט את רלוונטיות הנושא.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་དབུལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཉམ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པའི་བརྗོད་དུ་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཚང་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་འགྱུར་བར་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལུགས་སྣང་འདྲ་ཞིག་གཙོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ངེད་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་རྟོགས་པ་ཞིག་ལབ་རྒྱུ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Balanced Joint Adversarial Training for Robust Intent Detection and Slot Filling', 'ar': 'تدريب خصامي مشترك متوازن لاكتشاف قوي للنية وتعبئة الفتحات', 'es': 'Entrenamiento conjunto de adversarios equilibrado para una detección de intención sólida y llenado de espacios', 'fr': "Formation contradictoire conjointe équilibrée pour une détection d'intention robuste et un remplissage des fentes", 'pt': 'Treinamento Adversário Conjunto Equilibrado para Detecção de Intenção Robusta e Preenchimento de Slots', 'ja': '堅牢な意図検出とスロット充填のためのバランスの取れた共同対抗訓練', 'ru': 'Сбалансированная совместная тренировка противника для надежного обнаружения намерений и заполнения слотов', 'zh': '平衡关节抗训练,强意检槽填', 'hi': 'मजबूत इरादे का पता लगाने और स्लॉट भरने के लिए संतुलित संयुक्त प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण', 'ga': 'Comhoiliúint Sáraíochta Chothrom le haghaidh Braite Intinn Láidir agus Líonadh Sliotán', 'el': 'Ισορροπημένη κοινή εχθρική εκπαίδευση για την εύρωστη ανίχνευση προθέσεων και την πλήρωση αυλακώσεων', 'ka': 'ბალანსტიური ერთადერთი კონტერსარიალური განახლება პრობსტის ინტენტინტის განახლებისთვის და Slot Filling', 'hu': 'Kiegyensúlyozott közös ellenvetési képzés a robusztus szándék felismeréséhez és a nyílás töltéséhez', 'kk': 'Робустық жеткілікті анықтау және слотты толтыру үшін балансы біріктірілген конверсариялық оқыту', 'lt': 'Balanced Joint Adversarial Training for Robust Intent Detection and Slot Filling', 'it': 'Formazione avversaria congiunta bilanciata per rilevamento di intenti e riempimento di slot', 'mk': 'Разбалансирана заедничка непријатна обука за детективирање на силни намери и полнење на слотови', 'ml': 'റോബസ്റ്റ് ഇന്റെന്റ് ഡിറ്ററിങ്ഷനും സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുമായി മാന്യമായ യുദ്ധ പരിശീലി', 'mn': 'Баланслагдсан нийлүүлэлтийн дасгал хөдөлгөөн', 'mt': 'Taħriġ Adversarju Konġunt Bilanċjat għall-Iskejjel b’Intenzjoni Robusta u l-Imla tas-Slots', 'ms': 'Pelatihan Perlawanan Perkongsian Berseimbang untuk pengesan niat kuat dan penuhian Slot', 'pl': 'Zrównoważone wspólne szkolenie przeciwników dla solidnego wykrywania intencji i wypełniania szczelin', 'sr': 'Balanciran zajednički savezni trening za robotu intenzivnu detekciju i ispunjavanje slota', 'no': 'Balansert samanlig rekursarial trening for robust intent-oppdaging og slot-fylling', 'ro': 'Instruire adversară comună echilibrată pentru detectarea intențiilor robuste și umplerea fantelor', 'sv': 'Balanserad gemensam adversarial utbildning för robust avsiktsdetektering och fyllning av spår', 'so': 'Waxbarashada wadajirka ah ee la xiriiray iskuulka baaritaanka shaqada iyo buuxinta', 'ta': 'ராப்ஸ்ட் உள்ளடக்க கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் சாற்று நிரப்புவதற்கான மேம்பட்ட பயிற்சி', 'si': '喾冟窂喽膏窂喽编穵鈥嵿逗 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喽脆穵鈥嵿痘喾佮穵喽编逗', 'ur': 'مضبوط اضطراری پیدا کرنے اور اسلوٹ بھرنے کے لئے برالینسٹ یونٹ کنڈرساری ٹرینینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Huấn luyện văn phòng quân sự cân bằng cho thiết kế bền và lọc độ dốc', 'bg': 'Балансирано съпътстващо обучение за стабилно откриване на намерения и запълване на слотове', 'da': 'Afbalanceret fælles advarsel træning til robust intention detektion og slot fyldning', 'nl': 'Balanced Joint Adversarial Training voor Robuuste Intent Detection en Slot Vulling', 'hr': 'Balancirano zajedničko poručničko obučenje za jaku intenzivnu detekciju i ispunjavanje slota', 'fa': 'تعلیم مشترک مشترک برای شناسایی مشترک و پر کردن نرم', 'de': 'Ausgewogenes gemeinsames Angriffstraining für robuste Absichtserkennung und Schlitzfüllung', 'id': 'Pelatihan Adversarial Berbalans untuk Deteksi Kekuatan Intentif dan Penisi Perlambat', 'sw': 'Mafunzo ya Ushirikiano kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Ujasusi na Kujaza Ujadala', 'tr': 'Robust Haýyklyk Deteksi we Slot dolymy üçin Gurbalanmış Gezgi Taýramy', 'af': 'Gebalanse Gesamelede Adversariale Oefening vir Robust Intent Deteksie en Slot Opvulling', 'am': 'Balanced Joint Adversarial Training for Robust Intent Detection and Slot Filling', 'sq': 'Trainimi i përbashkët kundërshtar i balancuar për zbulimin e intencioneve të forta dhe mbushjen e ngadalëve', 'az': 'Qüvvətli Intent Detection və Slot Filling üçün müəyyən edilmiş Joint Adversarial Training', 'hy': 'Համեկշռություն առկա հակառակ վարժանք ուժեղ մտքերի հայտնաբերման և դանդաղի լրացման համար', 'bn': 'রোবাস্ট ইন্টেন্ট ডিটেক্টর এবং স্লোট পূর্ণ করার জন্য ব্যালেন্ড সংযুক্ত প্রশিক্ষণ', 'bs': 'Balanciran zajednički savezni trening za robotu intenzivnu detekciju i ispunjavanje slota', 'ko': '강력한 의도 탐지와 슬롯 채우기에 적합한 균형 잡힌 공동 대항 훈련', 'cs': 'Vyvážený společný nepřátelský trénink pro robustní detekci záměru a plnění drážek', 'ca': "Formació adversaria conjunta equilibrada per la detecció de intencions robustes i el rellenç d'intervals", 'et': 'Tasakaalustatud liigeste kahjulik koolitus tugeva kavatsuse tuvastamiseks ja pesade täitmiseks', 'fi': 'Tasapainoinen nivelten vastainen koulutus vankkaan aikomusten havaitsemiseen ja aukkojen täyttämiseen', 'jv': 'balance', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Uravnoteženo neželeno usposabljanje sklepov za robustno zaznavanje namena in polnjenje rež', 'he': 'אימון נוגדי משותף מאוזן לגילוי כוונה חזקה וממלא תאריכים', 'bo': 'Balanced Joint Adversarial Training for Robust Intent Detection and Slot Filling'}
{'en': 'Joint intent detection and slot filling has recently achieved tremendous success in advancing the performance of utterance understanding. However, many joint models still suffer from the robustness problem, especially on noisy inputs or rare / unseen events. To address this issue, we propose a Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model to improve the robustness of joint intent detection and slot filling, which consists of two parts : (1) automatically generating joint adversarial examples to attack the joint model, and (2) training the model to defend against the joint adversarial examples so as to robustify the model on small perturbations. As the generated joint adversarial examples have different impacts on the intent detection and slot filling loss, we further propose a Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) model that applies a balance factor as a regularization term to the final loss function, which yields a stable training procedure. Extensive experiments and analyses on the lightweight models show that our proposed methods achieve significantly higher scores and substantially improve the robustness of both intent detection and slot filling. In addition, the combination of our BJAT with BERT-large achieves state-of-the-art results on two datasets.', 'ar': 'حقق الاكتشاف المشترك للنوايا وملء الفتحات مؤخرًا نجاحًا هائلاً في تطوير أداء فهم الكلام. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال العديد من النماذج المشتركة تعاني من مشكلة المتانة ، خاصة في المدخلات الصاخبة أو الأحداث النادرة / غير المرئية. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نموذج تدريب عدائي مشترك (JAT) لتحسين متانة اكتشاف النية المشتركة وملء الفتحات ، والتي تتكون من جزأين: (1) إنشاء أمثلة عدائية مشتركة تلقائيًا لمهاجمة النموذج المشترك ، و (2) ) تدريب النموذج على الدفاع ضد أمثلة الخصومة المشتركة لتقوية النموذج في الاضطرابات الصغيرة. نظرًا لأن أمثلة الخصومة المشتركة التي تم إنشاؤها لها تأثيرات مختلفة على الكشف عن النية وخسارة ملء الفتحات ، فإننا نقترح أيضًا نموذجًا للتدريب الخصامي المشترك المتوازن (BJAT) الذي يطبق عامل التوازن كمصطلح تنظيم لوظيفة الخسارة النهائية ، مما ينتج عنه تدريب مستقر إجراء. تُظهر التجارب والتحليلات المكثفة على النماذج خفيفة الوزن أن طرقنا المقترحة تحقق درجات أعلى بشكل ملحوظ وتحسن بشكل كبير متانة كل من اكتشاف النية وملء الفتحات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن الجمع بين BJAT و BERT-large يحقق نتائج متطورة على مجموعتي بيانات.', 'fr': "La détection conjointe de l'intention et le remplissage des cases ont récemment connu un énorme succès dans l'amélioration des performances de compréhension des énoncés. Cependant, de nombreux modèles d'articulation souffrent toujours du problème de robustesse, en particulier sur les entrées bruyantes ou les événements rares/invisibles. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un modèle de formation contradictoire conjointe (JAT) pour améliorer la robustesse de la détection d'intention conjointe et du remplissage des créneaux, qui comprend deux parties\xa0: (1) générer automatiquement des exemples contradictoires conjoints pour attaquer le modèle d'articulation, et (2) entraîner le modèle à se défendre contre l'articulation des exemples contradictoires afin de renforcer le modèle sur les petites perturbations. Comme les exemples contradictoires conjoints générés ont des impacts différents sur la détection d'intention et la perte de remplissage des créneaux, nous proposons également un modèle d'entraînement contradictoire conjoint équilibré (BJAT) qui applique un facteur d'équilibre comme terme de régularisation à la fonction de perte finale, ce qui donne une procédure de formation stable. Des expériences et des analyses approfondies sur les modèles légers montrent que les méthodes que nous proposons obtiennent des scores nettement plus élevés et améliorent considérablement la robustesse de la détection d'intention et du remplissage des fentes. De plus, la combinaison de notre BJAT avec BERT-Large permet d'obtenir des résultats de pointe sur deux ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'A detecção de intenção conjunta e o preenchimento de slots alcançaram recentemente um tremendo sucesso no avanço do desempenho da compreensão de enunciados. No entanto, muitos modelos de juntas ainda sofrem com o problema de robustez, especialmente em entradas ruidosas ou eventos raros/invisíveis. Para resolver esse problema, propomos um modelo Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) para melhorar a robustez da detecção de intenção conjunta e preenchimento de slots, que consiste em duas partes: (1) geração automática de exemplos de adversários conjuntos para atacar o modelo conjunto e (2) ) treinando o modelo para se defender contra os exemplos adversários conjuntos, de modo a robustecer o modelo em pequenas perturbações. Como os exemplos adversários conjuntos gerados têm impactos diferentes na detecção de intenção e na perda de preenchimento de slot, propomos ainda um modelo de Treinamento Adversário Conjunto Equilibrado (BJAT) que aplica um fator de equilíbrio como um termo de regularização à função de perda final, o que produz um treinamento estável procedimento. Extensos experimentos e análises nos modelos leves mostram que nossos métodos propostos alcançam pontuações significativamente mais altas e melhoram substancialmente a robustez da detecção de intenção e do preenchimento de slots. Além disso, a combinação de nosso BJAT com BERT-large alcança resultados de última geração em dois conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'La detección de intención conjunta y el llenado de ranuras han logrado recientemente un enorme éxito en el avance del rendimiento de la comprensión de enunciados. Sin embargo, muchos modelos de articulaciones todavía sufren el problema de robustez, especialmente en entradas ruidosas o eventos raros/invisibles. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un modelo de Entrenamiento Conjuntivo Adversarial (JAT) para mejorar la solidez de la detección de intención conjunta y el llenado de espacios, que consta de dos partes: (1) generar automáticamente ejemplos conjuntos de adversarios para atacar el modelo conjunto, y (2) entrenar al modelo para defenderse contra el conjunto ejemplos contradictorios para robustecer el modelo en pequeñas perturbaciones. Como los ejemplos de confrontación conjunta generados tienen diferentes impactos en la detección de intención y la pérdida de llenado de espacios, proponemos además un modelo de Entrenamiento Conjuntivo Adversarial Equilibrado (BJAT) que aplica un factor de equilibrio como término de regularización a la función de pérdida final, lo que produce un procedimiento de entrenamiento estable. Los exhaustivos experimentos y análisis de los modelos ligeros muestran que nuestros métodos propuestos logran puntuaciones significativamente más altas y mejoran sustancialmente la solidez de la detección de intención y el llenado de ranuras. Además, la combinación de nuestro BJAT con Bert-large logra resultados de vanguardia en dos conjuntos de datos.', 'ja': '共同意図検出とスロット充填は、発話理解のパフォーマンスを向上させることに最近大きな成功を収めています。 しかしながら、多くのジョイントモデルは依然として堅牢性の問題に悩まされており、特にノイズの多い入力やまれな/見えないイベントでは問題となる。 この問題に対処するために、共同対抗訓練（ JAT ）モデルを提案し、共同意図検出とスロット充填の堅牢性を向上させます。これは、（ 1 ）共同モデルを攻撃するために共同対抗例を自動的に生成することと、（ 2 ）小さな摂動に関するモデルを堅牢にするために、共同対抗例を防御するためにモデルを訓練することの2つの部分から構成されています。 生成された関節対抗例は、意図検出とスロット充填損失に異なる影響を与えるため、最終損失関数に正規化項としてバランス係数を適用し、安定したトレーニング手順をもたらすBalanced Joint Adversarial Training （ BJAT ）モデルをさらに提案する。 軽量モデルの広範な実験と分析は、提案された方法が有意に高いスコアを達成し、インテント検出とスロット充填の両方の堅牢性を実質的に改善することを示しています。 さらに、当社のBJATとBERT - largeの組み合わせは、2つのデータセットで最先端の結果を達成します。', 'ru': 'Обнаружение совместных намерений и заполнение слотов недавно достигли огромного успеха в улучшении понимания речи. Тем не менее, многие совместные модели все еще страдают от проблемы надежности, особенно на шумных входах или редких/невидимых событиях. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем модель совместного обучения соперников (JAT) для улучшения надежности обнаружения совместных намерений и заполнения слотов, которая состоит из двух частей: (1) автоматическое создание совместных примеров соперников для атаки на модель соперников и (2) обучение модели защите от совместных примеров соперников, чтобы сделать модель более надежной при небольших возмущениях. Поскольку сгенерированные совместные сопернические примеры по-разному влияют на обнаружение намерения и потерю заполнения слота, мы далее предлагаем модель сбалансированного совместного состязательного обучения (BJAT), которая применяет фактор баланса в качестве термина регуляризации к конечной функции потери, что дает стабильную процедуру обучения. Обширные эксперименты и анализы на легких моделях показывают, что наши предлагаемые методы достигают значительно более высоких баллов и существенно улучшают устойчивость как обнаружения намерений, так и заполнения слотов. Кроме того, комбинация нашего BJAT с BERT-large достигает самых современных результатов на двух наборах данных.', 'zh': '合意检槽填近得巨大成功。 然诸合模鲁棒性,尤在嘈杂/罕见之事。 为此者,举一以合(JAT),以重其鲁棒性,两者为之:(1)自合者示例以攻合之,与(2)教之,以御敌示例,以壮其小扰。 合对抗性示例检槽位,损益不同,更立衡合(BJAT),以平因子为正则化项用于终损函数,以定训练。 轻量化模形之大实验分析表明,所立之法著于检填之鲁棒性。 此外,吾BJAT与BERT-large合,两数集上最先进也。', 'hi': 'संयुक्त इरादे का पता लगाने और स्लॉट भरने ने हाल ही में उच्चारण समझ के प्रदर्शन को आगे बढ़ाने में जबरदस्त सफलता हासिल की है। हालांकि, कई संयुक्त मॉडल अभी भी मजबूती की समस्या से पीड़ित हैं, विशेष रूप से शोर इनपुट या दुर्लभ / अनदेखी घटनाओं पर। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम संयुक्त इरादे का पता लगाने और स्लॉट भरने की मजबूती में सुधार करने के लिए एक संयुक्त प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण (जेएटी) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें दो भाग होते हैं: (1) संयुक्त मॉडल पर हमला करने के लिए स्वचालित रूप से संयुक्त प्रतिकूल उदाहरण उत्पन्न करना, और (2) संयुक्त प्रतिकूल उदाहरणों के खिलाफ बचाव के लिए मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करना ताकि छोटे व्यवधानों पर मॉडल को मजबूत किया जा सके। जैसा कि उत्पन्न संयुक्त प्रतिकूल उदाहरणों में इरादे का पता लगाने और स्लॉट भरने के नुकसान पर अलग-अलग प्रभाव पड़ता है, हम आगे एक संतुलित संयुक्त प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण (बीजेटी) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो अंतिम हानि समारोह के लिए नियमितीकरण शब्द के रूप में एक संतुलन कारक लागू करता है, जो एक स्थिर प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया उत्पन्न करता है। हल्के मॉडल पर व्यापक प्रयोगों और विश्लेषणों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित तरीके काफी अधिक स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं और इरादे का पता लगाने और स्लॉट भरने दोनों की मजबूती में काफी सुधार करते हैं। इसके अलावा, BERT-large के साथ हमारे BJAT का संयोजन दो डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': "Le déanaí d'éirigh thar barr le braite comhintinn agus líonadh sliotán chun feidhmíocht na tuisceana cainte a chur chun cinn. Mar sin féin, tá fadhb na stóinseachta fós ag baint le go leor samhlacha comhpháirteacha, go háirithe maidir le hionchuir fhuaimiúla nó teagmhais neamhchoitianta/neamhfheicthe. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid múnla Comh-Oiliúint Sáraíochta (JAT) chun feabhas a chur ar stóinseacht bhrath comhintinn agus líonadh sliotán, atá comhdhéanta de dhá chuid: (1) samplaí sáraíochta comhpháirteacha a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch chun ionsaí a dhéanamh ar an múnla comhpháirteach, agus (2 (e) an tsamhail a oiliúint chun cosaint a thabhairt i gcoinne na gcomhshamplaí sáraíochta chun an tsamhail a neartú ar mhion-suaiteachas. Toisc go bhfuil tionchair éagsúla ag na comhshamplaí sáraíochta a ghintear ar bhrath intinn agus ar chaillteanas líonadh sliotán, molaimid freisin samhail um Oiliúint Chomhordaithe Sáraíochta (BJAT) a chuireann fachtóir cothromaíochta i bhfeidhm mar théarma rialtachta ar an bhfeidhm caillteanais deiridh, rud a thugann oiliúint chobhsaí. nós imeachta. Léiríonn turgnaimh agus anailísí fairsinge ar na samhlacha éadroma go mbaineann ár modhanna molta scóir i bhfad níos airde amach agus go bhfeabhsaítear go suntasach stóinseacht braite rún agus líonadh sliotán. Ina theannta sin, baintear torthaí úrscothacha ar dhá thacar sonraí mar gheall ar ár BJAT a chomhcheangal le BERT-large.", 'el': 'Η κοινή ανίχνευση προθέσεων και η πλήρωση αυλακώσεων έχουν επιτύχει πρόσφατα τεράστια επιτυχία στην προώθηση της απόδοσης της κατανόησης έκφρασης. Ωστόσο, πολλά κοινά μοντέλα εξακολουθούν να υποφέρουν από το πρόβλημα ανθεκτικότητας, ειδικά σε θορυβώδεις εισόδους ή σπάνια/αόρατα γεγονότα. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο Κοινής Αντιθετικής Εκπαίδευσης (για να βελτιωθεί η ανθεκτικότητα της ανίχνευσης κοινών προθέσεων και της πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων, το οποίο αποτελείται από δύο μέρη: (1) αυτόματη δημιουργία κοινών αντιθετικών παραδειγμάτων για να επιτεθεί στο κοινό μοντέλο, και (2) εκπαίδευση του μοντέλου για να υπερασπιστεί ενάντια στα κοινά αντιθετικά παραδείγματα έτσι ώστε να εδραιωθεί το μοντέλο σε μικρές διαταραχές. Δεδομένου ότι τα παραγόμενα κοινά αντικρουόμενα παραδείγματα έχουν διαφορετικές επιπτώσεις στην ανίχνευση προθέσεων και την απώλεια πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων, προτείνουμε περαιτέρω ένα μοντέλο ισορροπημένης κοινής αντικρουστικής εκπαίδευσης (που εφαρμόζει έναν παράγοντα ισορροπίας ως όρο κανονικοποίησης στην τελική λειτουργία απώλειας, το οποίο αποδίδει μια σταθερή διαδικασία κατάρτισης. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα και αναλύσεις στα ελαφριά μοντέλα δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι επιτυγχάνουν σημαντικά υψηλότερες βαθμολογίες και βελτιώνουν σημαντικά την ανθεκτικότητα τόσο της ανίχνευσης προθέσεων όσο και της πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων. Επιπλέον, ο συνδυασμός του με το επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'A közös szándék felismerése és a rések kitöltése a közelmúltban óriási sikert ért el a beszédmegértés teljesítményének előmozdításában. Sok ízületi modell azonban még mindig szenved a robusztus problémától, különösen zajos bemeneteknél vagy ritka/láthatatlan eseményeknél. A probléma megoldása érdekében javasoljuk a közös szándék észlelésének és a rések kitöltésének robusztusságát javító Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) modellt, amely két részből áll: (1) automatikusan generál közös ellenséges példákat a közös modell megtámadására, és (2) kiképzése a modell védelmére a közös ellenséges példák ellen, hogy megbízhatóvá tegye a modellt kis zavarokra. Mivel a generált közös ellentétes példák különböző hatással vannak a szándék felismerésére és a réstöltési veszteségre, javasoljuk továbbá a Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BjAT) modellt, amely a végső veszteség funkciójához egyensúlyi tényezőt alkalmaz, ami stabil képzési eljárást eredményez. A könnyű modelleken végzett kiterjedt kísérletek és elemzések azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszereink jelentősen magasabb pontszámot érnek el, és jelentősen javítják mind a szándék felismerésének, mind a rések kitöltésének robusztusságát. Ezenkívül a BJAT és a BERT-large kombinációja két adatkészleten is korszerű eredményeket ér el.', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი საზოგადომის განახლება და სპოტის დასაყენება ახლა უკეთესი წარმატებით გავაკეთეთ საზოგადომის წარმატებით. მაგრამ, ბევრი ერთადერთი მოდელები უკეთესი პრობლემების შემდეგ, განსაკუთრებით სიმაღლედ მონაცემების შემდეგ ან წარმოიცემების შემდეგ. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მუშაობით ერთადერთი კომპერაციალური განსწავლება (JAT) მოდელს, რომელიც ერთადერთი მინდომის განსწავლების ძალიან ძალიან მოქმედების და სოტაციის შესაძლებლობას, რომელიც ორი ნაწილიდან შექმნა: (1) ავტომატურად დავიწყებთ ერთადერთი განსაცვლელი მაგალითები როგორც შექმნილი ერთადერთი ანგარესიალური მაგალითები აქვს განსხვავებული მოვლენების განსახულებაში და სოტის დასახულებაში, ჩვენ დავიწყეთ ბალანსური ერთადერთი ანგარესიალური განახულება (BJAT) მოდელს, რომელიც ბალანსიალური ფაქტორის გამოყენება როგორც რეგი განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები და ანალიზაციები მარტივი მოდელში ჩვენი მოძლევებული მენეტები უფრო მეტი გააკეთებენ და ძალიან უფრო მეტი გააკეთებენ საზოგადოება განაკეთება და დამატებით, ჩვენი BJAT-ის კომბიზაცია, რომელიც BERT-ს დიდი, მიიღება ორი მონაცემების შედეგები.', 'it': "Il rilevamento congiunto degli intenti e il riempimento delle fessure hanno recentemente raggiunto un enorme successo nel migliorare le prestazioni della comprensione dell'espressione. Tuttavia, molti modelli articolari soffrono ancora del problema di robustezza, specialmente in ingressi rumorosi o eventi rari/invisibili. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un modello di Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) per migliorare la robustezza del rilevamento degli intenti congiunti e del riempimento delle fessure, che consiste in due parti: (1) generando automaticamente esempi avversi congiunti per attaccare il modello congiunto, e (2) addestrando il modello per difendersi dagli esempi avversi congiunti in modo da rafforzare il modello su piccole perturbazioni. Poiché gli esempi di adversarial congiunti generati hanno impatti diversi sulla rilevazione degli intenti e sulla perdita di riempimento delle slot, proponiamo inoltre un modello Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) che applica un fattore di equilibrio come termine di regolarizzazione alla funzione di perdita finale, che fornisce una procedura di allenamento stabile. Esperimenti approfonditi e analisi sui modelli leggeri dimostrano che i nostri metodi proposti raggiungono punteggi significativamente più alti e migliorano notevolmente la robustezza sia del rilevamento degli intenti che del riempimento delle fessure. Inoltre, la combinazione del nostro BJAT con BERT-large consente di ottenere risultati all'avanguardia su due set di dati.", 'lt': 'Bendrų ketinimų nustatymas ir laiko tarpsnių užpildymas neseniai labai sėkmingai padidino žodžio supratimą. Tačiau daugelis jungtinių modelių vis dar kenčia nuo patikimumo problemos, ypač dėl triukšmingų žaliavų ar retų ar nematomų reiškinių. To address this issue, we propose a Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model to improve the robustness of joint intent detection and slot filling, which consists of two parts: (1) automatically generating joint adversarial examples to attack the joint model, and (2) training the model to defend against the joint adversarial examples so as to robustify the model on small perturbations.  As the generated joint adversarial examples have different impacts on the intent detection and slot filling loss, we further propose a Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) model that applies a balance factor as a regularization term to the final loss function, which yields a stable training procedure.  Išsamūs lengvųjų modelių eksperimentai ir analizės rodo, kad mūsų siūlomi metodai pasiekia gerokai didesnius rezultatus ir gerokai pagerina ketinimų nustatymo ir laiko tarpsnių užpildymo patikimumą. Be to, mūsų BJAT ir BERT-large derinys duoda naujausius rezultatus dviejuose duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'kk': 'Бірлескен мақсатты анықтау және слотты толтыру соңғы уақытта сөздерді түсініктеу үшін көп сәтті жетті. Бірақ көп жалпы модельдер әлі қатты мәселеге қарайды, осылай-ақ дыбыс келтірілген жүйелер не кейбір/көрінбеген оқиғалар. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін біріктірілген конверсариялық оқыту (JAT) үлгісін ұсынамыз. Бұл екі бөліктен біріктірілген жұмыс анықтау мен слоттарды толтыру үшін, біріктірілген үлгісіне қарсы мәселелерді автоматты түрде құру үшін, және (2) үлгісін біріктірілген қарсы мәселелерді қамтамас Жасалған жалпы неграмарлық мысалдар мақсатты анықтау мен слотты толтыру үшін әртүрлі нәрселерді көрсету үшін, біз соңғы жоғалу функциясына баланс факторының балансы ретінде қолданылатын баланс балансы (BJAT) үлгісін қолдану үлгісін қолданатын баланс факторын Өзгертілген тәжірибелер мен оңай үлгілер туралы анализ керек тәжірибелеріміздің ұсынылған тәжірибелеріміз өте жоғары нәтижелерді жеткізеді және қолданылатын тәжірибелерді анықтау Қосымша, біздің BJAT-міздің BERT-дің үлкен біріктіріміздің екі деректер жиынының күйінің нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на заедничките намери и исполнувањето на слотови неодамна постигна огромен успех во напредокот на извршувањето на разбирањето на изразот. Сепак, многу заеднички модели сé уште страдаат од проблемот со robustness, особено во врска со гласните внесувања или ретки/невидени настани. За решавање на ова прашање, предложуваме заеднички противречни обуки (ЈАТ) модел за подобрување на силноста на детекцијата на заедничките намери и полнувањето на слотови, кој се состои од два дела: (1) автоматски генерирање заеднички противречни примери за напад на заедничкиот модел, и (2) обука на моделот за одбрана против заедничките противречни примери за зајакнување на мо Бидејќи генерираните заеднички непријателски примери имаат различни влијанија врз откривањето на намерата и загубата на полнувањето на слотови, понатаму предложуваме балансиран заеднички непријателски обук (БЈАТ) модел кој применува баланс фактор како регулирационен термин на финалната загуба функција, што пред Експериментите и анализите на лесните модели покажуваат дека нашите предложени методи постигнуваат значително повисоки оценки и значително ја подобруваат силноста на детекцијата на намерата и полнувањето на вредностите. Покрај тоа, комбинацијата на нашиот БЈАТ со БЕРТ-голем постигнува најдобри резултати на два податоци.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan tujuan bersama dan penuhian slot baru-baru ini telah mencapai kejayaan yang luar biasa dalam meningkatkan prestasi pemahaman perkataan. Namun, banyak model kongsi masih menderita dari masalah kepekatan, terutama pada input bunyi atau peristiwa jarang/tidak kelihatan. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan model Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) untuk meningkatkan kekuatan pengesan tujuan kongsi dan penuhian slot, yang terdiri dari dua bahagian: (1) secara automatik menghasilkan contoh musuh kongsi untuk menyerang model kongsi, dan (2) melatih model untuk mempertahankan contoh musuh kongsi untuk menegakkan model pada gangguan kecil. Sebagaimana contoh musuh bersama yang dijana mempunyai kesan yang berbeza pada pengesan niat dan kehilangan penuhian slot, kami melanjutkan melamar model Pelatihan Musuh Berimbang (BJAT) yang melaksanakan faktor keseimbangan sebagai istilah pengaturan kepada fungsi kehilangan akhir, yang memberikan prosedur pelatihan yang stabil. Eksperimen dan analisis luas pada model berat ringan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami diusulkan mencapai skor yang jauh lebih tinggi dan meningkatkan kekuatan kedua-dua pengesan niat dan penuhian slot. Selain itu, kombinasi BJAT kita dengan BERT-besar mencapai keputusan terbaik pada dua set data.', 'ml': 'സംസാരം മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രകടനത്തിനുള്ള പ്രകടനത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനും സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയു എന്നാലും, ഒരുപാട് സഹപ്രധാന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും റോബസ്റ്റ് പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും അനുഭവിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്  ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു യൂണ്ട് അഡ്വാര്\u200dസറിയല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ (ജെട്ടി) മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് രണ്ട് ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്ള യൂണ്ട് കണ്ടെത്തുവാനും സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതി സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട യൂട്ട് വിരോധമായ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളുണ്ട് കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും സ്ലോട്ട് നഷ്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെയും നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d, നമ്മള എളുപ്പമുള്ള മോഡലുകളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും അന്വേഷണങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d വളരെ ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സ്കോര്\u200d നേടു കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ BJAT ബെര്\u200dട്ടി-വലിയ സംഘത്തോടൊപ്പം രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാക', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-intenzjoni konġunta u l-mili tas-slots reċentement kisbu suċċess enormi fl-avvanz tal-prestazzjoni tal-fehim tal-espressjoni. Madankollu, ħafna mudelli konġunti għadhom ibatu mill-problema ta’ robustezza, speċjalment fuq inputs storbjużi jew avvenimenti rari/mhux osservati. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu mudell ta’ Taħriġ Adversarju Konġunt (JAT) biex itejjeb ir-robustezza tad-detezzjoni tal-intenzjoni konġunta u l-mili tas-slots, li jikkonsisti f’żewġ partijiet: (1) jiġġeneraw awtomatikament eżempji ta’ avversarji konġunti biex jattakkaw il-mudell konġunt, u (2) jitħarrġu l-mudell biex jiddefendi kontra eżempji avversarji konġunti sabiex jiġi robustifikat il-mudell dwar perturbazzjonijiet As the generated joint adversarial examples have different impacts on the intent detection and slot filling loss, we further propose a Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) model that applies a balance factor as a regularization term to the final loss function, which yields a stable training procedure.  Esperimenti u analiżi estensivi fuq mudelli ħfief juru li l-metodi proposti tagħna jiksbu punteġġi ogħla b’mod sinifikanti u jtejbu b’mod sostanzjali r-robustezza kemm tal-iskoperta bl-intenzjoni kif ukoll tal-mili tas-slots. Barra minn hekk, il-kombinazzjoni tal-BJAT tagħna mal-BERT-large tikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'ro': 'Detectarea intențiilor comune și umplerea sloturilor au obținut recent succes extraordinar în avansarea performanței înțelegerii pronunțării. Cu toate acestea, multe modele articulare suferă încă de problema robusteții, în special la intrări zgomotoase sau evenimente rare/nevăzute. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem un model de formare adversară comună (JAT) pentru a îmbunătăți robustețea detectării intențiilor comune și umplerii sloturilor, care constă din două părți: (1) generarea automată de exemple adversare comune pentru a ataca modelul comun și (2) instruirea modelului pentru a se apăra împotriva exemplelor adversare comune, astfel încât să consolideze modelul asupra perturbărilor mici. Deoarece exemplele adversariale comune generate au impact diferit asupra detectării intenției și pierderii de umplere a sloturilor, propunem, de asemenea, un model Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BYAT) care aplică un factor de echilibru ca termen de regularizare funcției de pierdere finală, care oferă o procedură de formare stabilă. Experimentele și analizele extinse pe modelele ușoare arată că metodele noastre propuse obțin scoruri semnificativ mai mari și îmbunătățesc substanțial robustețea detectării intențiilor și umplerii fantelor. În plus, combinaţia dintre BYAT şi BERT-large obţine rezultate de ultimă generaţie pe două seturi de date.', 'mn': 'Нэгдсэн зорилго олох, слотын дүүргэх нь саяхан илтгэл ойлгохын тулд маш их амжилттай болсон. Гэхдээ ихэнх нийлбэр загварууд хүчтэй асуудлыг шаналж байна. Ялангуяа чимээгүй орлуулалт эсвэл ховор/харагдахгүй үйл явдлуудын тухай. Энэ асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд бид хоёр хэсэгт нэгдсэн эсрэг загварыг дайрах зорилготой (JAT) загварын загварыг санал болгодог. Энэ загварын тулд хоёр хэсэгт нэгдсэн бөгөөд хоёр хэсэгт нэгдсэн бөгөөд (1) холбоотой загварын эсрэг зорилготой загварын тулд хамгаалах загварын загварыг автоматжруулах зорилготой. Эдгээр нийлүүлсэн эсрэг жишээлүүд нь зорилго олж, слотын дүүргэх алдаа өөр нөлөөтэй байдаг учраас бид баланслагдсан нийлүүлэлтийн дасгал суралцах (BJAT) загварын загварыг төгсгөлийн алдагдах функцын хувьд баланслаг үйлдвэрлэх загварын хувьд баланслаг үйлдвэ Хялбар жингийн загварын талаар олон туршилтууд болон шинжилгээ үзүүлэх нь бидний санал өгсөн арга загварууд үнэхээр өндөр оноо гаргаж, зорилгоор олох, слотын дүүргэх чадварыг ихэвчлэн сайжруулдаг. Үүнээс гадна бидний BJAT-ын холбоотой БЕРТ-тэй холбоотой хоёр өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд урлагийн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Wspólne wykrywanie intencji i wypełnianie szczelin osiągnęły ostatnio ogromny sukces w poprawie wydajności zrozumienia wypowiedzi. Jednak wiele modeli połączeń nadal cierpi z powodu problemu wytrzymałości, zwłaszcza w przypadku głośnych wejść lub rzadkich/niewidocznych zdarzeń. Aby rozwiązać tę kwestię, proponujemy model Joint Adversarial Training (JAT), który poprawia solidność wykrywania intencji wspólnych i wypełniania szczelin, składający się z dwóch części: (1) automatycznego generowania wspólnych przykładów przeciwnych do ataku wspólnego modelu oraz (2) szkolenia modelu w celu obrony przed wspólnymi przykładami przeciwnymi tak, aby stabilizować model w przypadku małych zakłóceń. Ponieważ generowane przykłady wspólnych przeciwników mają różny wpływ na wykrywanie intencji i utratę wypełniania slotów, proponujemy również model Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT), który stosuje współczynnik równowagi jako termin regularyzacji do końcowej funkcji straty, co daje stabilną procedurę treningową. Obszerne eksperymenty i analizy na modelach lekkich pokazują, że proponowane przez nas metody osiągają znacznie wyższe wyniki i znacznie poprawiają solidność zarówno detekcji intencji, jak i wypełniania szczelin. Ponadto połączenie naszego BJAT z BERT-large uzyskuje najnowocześniejsze wyniki na dwóch zbiorach danych.', 'no': 'Dette har nyleg oppnådd enorme suksess for å forstørra utviklinga av taleforståelse. Men mange fleire samlingsmodular blir fortsatt kjørt frå problemet med kraftighet, spesielt på støy inndata eller sjelde/ukjende hendingar. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi ein model for joint Adversarial Training (JAT) for å forbetra kraftigheten av joint intent detection and slot filling, som consisterer av to deler: (1) automatisk lagar joint adversarial examples for å attack the joint model, og (2) treng modellen for å beskytte mot de joint adversarial examples slik at modellen skal styrke på små turbasjonar. Etter at den genererte samanlige adversarialske eksemplene har ulike påvirkningar på forskjellige målsettingar for å oppdaga og fylle tapt på plass, fører vi fram ein balansert samanlige konservarialske øvingsmodell (BJAT), som brukar ein balansefaktor som ein reguleringsuttrykk til den siste tapsfunksjonen, som fører til ein stabil øvingsprosedyr. Ekstra eksperimenter og analyser på lettvektsmodelane viser at våre foreslåande metoder når det gjer mykje høgare poeng og utviklar størrelsen av både oppdaging og fylling av plass. I tillegg, kombinasjonen av BJAT vårt med BERT-stor oppnår tilstanden av kunsten på to datasett.', 'sr': 'Zajednička namjera otkrivanja i ispunjavanje slota nedavno je postigao ogroman uspjeh u unapređivanju učinka razumevanja govora. Međutim, mnogi zajednički modeli još uvijek pate od problema sa pljačkom, posebno o bukovim ulazima ili rijetkim/nevidljivim događajima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo model zajedničkog saveznog treninga (JAT) za poboljšanje snage zajedničkog otkrivanja namjera i ispunjavanja slot a, koji se sastoji od dva dijela: 1) automatski generiranje zajedničkih neprijateljskih primjera za napad zajedničkog modela, i 2) obuku modela za branu protiv zajedničkih neprijateljskih primjera kako bi se opustio model na male perturbacije. Pošto su generirani zajednički neprijateljski primjeri imali različite utjecaje na namjeru otkrivanja i gubitak ispunjavanja slot a, dalje predlažemo Balancirani zajednički savezni trening (BJAT) model koji primjenjuje faktor ravnoteže kao regularizacijski termin konačnoj funkciji gubitka, koji predstavlja stabilnu proceduru obuke. Eksperimenti i analizi o modelima lagane težine pokazuju da naše predložene metode postignu značajno veće rezultate i značajno poboljšavaju robotu i namjere otkrivanja i ispunjavanja slota. Osim toga, kombinacija našeg BJAT sa velikim BERT-om postiže rezultate umetnosti na dve baze podataka.', 'so': 'Hadii ugu dhowaad buuxinta daryeelka qalabka iyo daryeelka aad u weyn ayaa ku guulaystay horumarinta sameynta waxgarashada hadalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalooyin badan oo wadajir ah ayaa weli dhibaatada khatarka ah ka xanuunsadaa, khusuusan dhacdooyinka qaylada ama dhacdooyinka qarsoon/qarsoon. Si aan arrintan ula macaamiloono, waxaan horumarinaynaa Tusaale Joint Trainin (JAT) si uu u hagaajiyo qalabka ka buuxiyo qalabka wadajirka ah oo ka mid ah labada qeybood: (1) si automatic ah ayaannu u abuurnaa tusaale cadaawayaasha wadajirka ah si ay u weeraraan muusikada wadajirka ah, iyo (2) waxbarashada modelka si ay u ilaaliyaan tusaalaha wadajirka ah oo ka gees ah, si uu u robisto modelka ku saabsan wadooyinka yar. Sida ay tusaalayaasha wadajirka ah ka muuqatay waxay saameyn kala duduwan ku leeyihiin aqoonsiga iyo khasaarada dhamaanka, waxaynu haddana horumarinaynaa modelka waxbarashada wadajirka ah (BJAT) oo u bedelaya qalabka balansiga ah, kaas oo u bedelaya xiliga rasmi-soorida ilaa shaqada ugu dambaysta lumbashada, kaas oo bixinaya xiliga waxbarashada stabi ah. Extensive experiments and analyses on the lightweight models show that our proposed methods achieve significantly higher scores and substantially improve the robustness of both intent detection and slot filling.  Intaas waxaa dheer, wadajirka BJAT iyo BERT-weyn waxay ku guulaysaa xaaladda farshaxanka labada databaset.', 'ta': 'சேர்ந்து கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் செருகுவாய் நிரப்புவது சமீபத்தில் பேச்சு புரியும் வெற்றியை மேம்படுத்திய ஆயினும், பல இணைய மாதிரிகள் இன்னும் ராஸ்டிஸ் பிரச்சனையில் இருந்து பாதிக்கும், குறிப்பாக சப்தமான உள்ளீடுகள இந்த பிரச்சினையை விளக்க, நாம் ஒரு Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) மாதிரியும் முன்நிர்வகிக்கிறோம் அது இரண்டு பகுதிகளில் உள்ள தன்மையை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, அது இரண்டு பகுதிகளில் உள்ளது: (1) இணைப்பு மாதிரியை தாக்க வேண்டும் இணைப்பு ம உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கூட்டு எதிரிகள் உதாரணங்களில் வேறு வித்தியாசமான விளைவுகள் கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் செருகுவாய் நிரப்பும் இழப்பின் தாக்கள் இருக்கும் போது, நாம் மேலும் மாதிரி ஒரு ந விரிவான சோதனைகள் மற்றும் ஒளி மாதிரிகளில் ஆய்வுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நம் பரிந்துரைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைகள் முக்கியமான அதிக மதிப்பெண்களை  மேலும், BERT-பெரிய முடிவுகளுடன் எங்கள் BJAT இணைப்பு இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளின் மாநிலையை பெறுகிறது.', 'sv': 'Gemensam avsiktsdetektering och fyllning av spår har nyligen uppnått enorm framgång när det gäller att förbättra prestandan av yttrandeförståelse. Många ledmodeller lider dock fortfarande av robusthetsproblemet, särskilt vid bullriga ingångar eller sällsynta/osedda händelser. För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår vi en JAT-modell (Joint Adversarial Training) för att förbättra robustheten hos gemensam avsiktsdetektering och fyllning av spår, som består av två delar: (1) automatiskt genererar gemensamma motstridsexempel för att attackera den gemensamma modellen, och (2) utbildar modellen för att försvara sig mot gemensamma motstridsexempel för att stärka modellen vid små störningar. Eftersom de genererade gemensamma kontradiktoriska exemplen har olika effekter på avsiktsdetektering och förlust av hålfyllning föreslår vi vidare en Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) modell som tillämpar en balansfaktor som regulariseringsterm till slutförlustfunktionen, vilket ger ett stabilt träningsförfarande. Omfattande experiment och analyser på lättviktsmodellerna visar att våra föreslagna metoder uppnår betydligt högre poäng och avsevärt förbättrar robustheten i både avsiktsdetektion och hålfyllning. Kombinationen av vår BJAT med BERT-large ger dessutom toppmoderna resultat på två dataset.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ අදහස් පරීක්ෂණය සහ ස්ලෝට් පුරවන්න අවසානයෙන් ගොඩක් සාර්ථක පරීක්ෂණය ලැබුණා. නමුත්, ගොඩක් සංවිධාන මොඩේල් තාමත් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, විශේෂ විශේෂයෙන් සිද්ධ විදිහ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ජන්ට් ව්\u200dයාපාරකය ප්\u200dරශ්නය (JAT) මොඩේල්ස් විශ්වාස කරනවා කොටස් දෙකක් (1) ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්නය කරනවා ජන්ට් ව්\u200dයාපාරකය ප්\u200dරශ්නය, සහ (2) ප්\u200dරශ්නය as the generous shared adversarial examples have Diffects Impact on the object Detection and slot fulling Loss, we more advise a BALAND JOINT සමාන්\u200dය සාධාරණ සාධාරණ සාධාරණය (BJAT) මොඩේල් එකක් භාවිත කරනවා ඒ වගේම සාධාරණ සාධාරණ අවස්ථාවක් ව විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය ලොකු විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට විශේෂ විදිහට වඩා විශේෂ විදි ඒ වගේම, අපේ BJAT සම්බන්ධය BERT-ලොකු විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා දත්ත සේට් දෙකට.', 'ur': 'Joint intention detection and slot filling has recently achieved enormous success in advance of speech understanding. اگرچہ بہت سی مشترکین مدلکوں کو اپنا مشکل دچار ہے، مخصوصاً آواز اٹھانے والی یا نادر/غیبت حادثہ پر۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک مشترک مخالف ترینینگ (JAT) موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ joint intent detection and slot filling کی طاقت کو زیادہ دکھائے، جو دو قسموں میں سے ہے: (1) اپنے ساتھ مشترک مخالف مثالیں پیدا کریں کہ مشترک موڈل پر حملہ کریں، اور (2) مدل کو مشترک مخالف مثالوں سے دفاع کریں تاکہ مدل کو چھوٹے مصیبتوں پر دفاع کریں۔ جیسے پیدا کئے گئے مشترک مخالف مثالیں مقصد شناسایے اور اسلوٹ بھرنے کے خسارہ پر مختلف اثرات ہیں، ہم اس سے زیادہ ایک Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں جو ایک برال فکتور کو آخری خسارہ فعالیت کے لئے ایک قابل تدبیر کی توفیق کے طور پر لازم کرتا ہے، جو ایک ثابت تدبیر پر ہلکا وزن موڈل پر اضافہ کی آزمائش اور تحقیق دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقے بہت زیادہ بالا سکونٹ پہنچ جاتے ہیں اور ان دونوں کے مطابق اضافہ شناسایی اور لٹ بھلائی کی قوت کو بہت زیادہ بہتر کر دیتے ہیں. اس کے علاوہ، ہمارے BJAT کی ترکیب BERT-بزرگ کے ساتھ دو ڈاٹ سٹ پر موجود ہے.', 'vi': 'Phát hiện và điền vào khe có mục đích gần đây đã đạt được một thành công lớn trong việc nâng cao khả năng phát biểu. Tuy nhiên, nhiều mô hình ghép vẫn phải chịu đựng vấn đề về độ bền vững, đặc biệt là về những mũi tiêm ồn ào hay những sự kiện hiếm thấy. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình Cơ Đốc Giáo dục Đồng thời (JAT) nhằm cải thiện uy lực của việc khám phá và điền vào các khớp, gồm có hai phần: 1) tự động tạo ra các ví dụ đối nghịch nhau để tấn công các mô hình khớp, và (2) đào tạo các mô hình để phòng thủ chống lại các trường hợp đồng để củng cố mô hình về các phiền nhỏ. Do những ví dụ giữa đối thủ tạo ra có tác động khác nhau đến việc phát hiện ý định và lỗ hổng có khe hở, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình huấn luyện Cơ Quan Cơ Đốc Tháp Đồng Cân bằng (BJAT) áp dụng một nhân tố cân bằng như một thuật ngữ quy tắc với chức năng mất mát cuối cùng, nó tạo ra một thủ tục huấn luyện ổn định. Những thí nghiệm và phân tích đầy đủ về các mô hình nhỏ cho thấy các phương pháp đã đề nghị đạt được điểm cao đáng kể và nâng cao độ bền vững của việc phát hiện ý đồ và điền vào khe hở. Hơn nữa, sự kết hợp của BJAT với BERT-large đạt đến kết quả hiện đại trên hai tập tin dữ liệu.', 'uz': "Yaqinda gapirishni tasdiqlash uchun birlashtirish va slot toʻgʻri muvaffaqiyatli bajardi. However, many joint models still suffer from the robustness problem, especially on noisy inputs or rare/unseen events.  Bu muammo bilan murojaat qilish uchun biz bir Joint Adversarial Training modelini yaxshi ko'raymiz, bir ikki qismini aniqlash va slot to ʻldirishni oshirish uchun imkoniyat qilamiz: (1) Birlashtirish modelini shamol qilish uchun avtomatik foydalanish, va (2) bir bir xil misollariga himoyalash uchun foydalanish modelini taʼminlovchimiz va kichik turbatlarda modelni tezlashtirish uchun. Bu bir birlashtirilgan bir munosabatlarni aniqlash va slot to ʻldirish uchun har xil muammolar bor. Biz boshqa bir bir bir xil vositasi (BJAT) modelini ishlatish mumkin. Bu qo'shish funksiyasining oxirgi qo'shish vazifasini qo'llash imkoniyatini qo'llash imkoniyatini qo'llash imkoniyatini yaratadi. Ko'pchilik modellarida kengaytirilgan tajribalar va analyzerlar koʻrsatiladi, yaxshi ko'paytirilgan usullar juda katta darajaga erishiladi va eng muhimi aniqlash va soʻzni toʻldirishni oshirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, BJAT bilan birlashtirish BERT-katta taʼminlovchisi ikki maʼlumotlar sahifasi holatiga muvaffaqiyatli bajaradi.", 'bg': 'Съвместното откриване на намерения и запълване на слотове наскоро постигнаха огромен успех в напредъка на изпълнението на разбирането на изказването. Въпреки това, много съвместни модели все още страдат от проблема с здравината, особено при шумни входове или редки / невидими събития. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме модел за съвместно противоречиво обучение (за подобряване на здравината на съвместното откриване на намерения и запълване на слотове, който се състои от две части: (1) автоматично генериране на съвместни противоречиви примери за атака на съвместния модел и (2) обучение на модела за защита срещу съвместните противоречиви примери, така че да се укрепи моделът при малки смущения. Тъй като генерираните съвместни противоречиви примери имат различно въздействие върху откриването на намерение и загубата на запълване на слотове, ние допълнително предлагаме модел на балансирано съвместно противоречиво обучение (БЖАТ), който прилага балансов фактор като срок за регламентиране на крайната функция на загуба, което дава стабилна процедура на обучение. Обширни експерименти и анализи на леките модели показват, че предложените от нас методи постигат значително по-високи оценки и значително подобряват здравината както на откриването на намерения, така и на запълването на слотове. В допълнение, комбинацията на нашия БЖАТ с постига най-съвременни резултати на два набора от данни.', 'da': 'Fælles intention detektion og slot fyldning har for nylig opnået enorm succes med at fremme ydeevnen af ytringsforståelse. Mange fællesmodeller lider dog stadig af robusthedsproblemet, især ved støjende indgange eller sjældne/usynlige begivenheder. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en JAT-model (Joint Adversarial Training) for at forbedre robustheden af fælles hensigtsdetektion og fyldning af slots, som består af to dele: (1) automatisk genererer fælles modstandseksempler til angreb på den fælles model, og (2) træning af modellen til at forsvare mod fælles modstandseksempler for at styrke modellen på små forstyrrelser. Da de genererede fælles adversarial eksempler har forskellige virkninger på intention detection og slot fyldning tab, foreslår vi yderligere en Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BYAT) model, der anvender en balancefaktor som en regulering term til den endelige tabsfunktion, hvilket giver en stabil træningsprocedure. Omfattende eksperimenter og analyser på letvægtsmodellerne viser, at vores foreslåede metoder opnår betydeligt højere scorer og forbedrer robustheden af både intent detection og slot fyldning betydeligt. Kombinationen af vores BJAT med BERT-large opnår desuden topmoderne resultater på to datasæt.', 'ko': '최근 연합의도검측과 틈새충전은 말의 이해 성능을 높이는 데 큰 성공을 거두었다.그러나 많은 관절 모델에는 여전히 노봉성 문제가 존재하는데, 특히 소음 입력이나 보기 드물거나 보이지 않는 사건에 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 연합의도 검측과 틈새 충전의 노봉성을 높이기 위해 연합대항훈련(JAT)모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 두 부분으로 구성된다. (1) 연합대항 예시를 자동으로 생성하여 공격연합모델을 만든다. (2) 훈련모델은 연합대항 예시를 방어하고 소요동에서 모델에 대해 노봉성 검증을 한다.생성된 연합 대항 예가 의도 검측과 시간 충전 손실에 서로 다른 영향을 미치기 때문에 우리는 균형 연합 대항 훈련(BJAT) 모델을 제기했다. 이 모델은 균형 인자를 정규화 항목으로 최종 손실 함수에 응용하여 안정적인 훈련 과정을 형성한다.경량급 모델에서의 대량의 실험과 분석에 의하면 우리가 제시한 방법은 현저하고 높은 점수를 얻었고 의도적인 검측과 틈새 충전의 노봉성을 현저히 높였다.그 밖에 우리의 BJAT와 BERT large의 결합은 두 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 실현했다.', 'hr': 'Zajednička namjera otkrivanja i ispunjavanje slota nedavno je postigao ogroman uspjeh u unapređivanju učinka razumijevanja govora. Međutim, mnogi zajednički modeli još uvijek pate od problema s pljačkom, posebno o za bučne ulaze ili rijetke/nevidljive događaje. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo model zajedničkog poručničkog vježbanja (JAT) kako bi se poboljšala snažnost otkrivanja zajedničkih namjera i ispunjavanja slot a, koji se sastoji od dva dijela: (1) automatski stvoriti zajedničke neprijateljske primjere kako bi napali zajednički model, i (2) obučavanje modela kako bi se branili protiv zajedničkih neprijateljskih primjera kako bi se pojačala model na malim turbacijama. Pošto su generirani zajednički neprijateljski primjeri imali različite utjecaje na otkrivanje namjere i gubitak ispunjavanja slot a, dalje predlažemo Balancirani zajednički savezni trening (BJAT) model koji primjenjuje faktor ravnoteže kao regularizacijski termin konačnoj funkciji gubitka, koji donosi stabilnu proceduru obuke. Prošireni eksperimenti i analizi o modelima lagane težine pokazuju da naši predloženi metodi postignu značajno veće rezultate i značajno poboljšavaju snagu i otkrivanja namjera i ispunjavanja slota. Osim toga, kombinacija našeg BJAT-a s velikim BERT-om postiže rezultate umjetnosti na dvije baze podataka.', 'af': "Gekoppelde doel opdekking en slot opvulling het onlangs groot sukses bereik in die voorspoediging van die uitspraak verstanding. Maar baie joint models lyk nog steeds van die kragtige probleme, veral op geluidige inputs of selfde/ongesiende gebeurtenis. Om hierdie probleem te besluit, voorstel ons 'n Gesamelende Rekursariële Oefening (JAT) model om die kragtigheid van saamgevoeg doel opmekaar en slot opvulling te verbeter, wat bestaan van twee dele: (1) automaties genereer saamgevormige teëstandariële voorbeelde om die saamgevormige model te vaar, en (2) onderwerp die model om teen die saamgevormige teëstandariële voorbeelde te beskerm sodat die model op klein perturb As die genereerde gemeenskappe teenstandaaries voorbeelde verskillende impakte het op die doel opdekking en slot opvulling verlies, voorstel ons verder 'n Balanse Geeenskappe Adversariële Oefening (BJAT) model wat 'n balans faktor as 'n regularisasie term toewend aan die eindelike verlies funksie, wat gee 'n stabile onderwerking prosedure. Ekstensiewe eksperimente en analiseer op die liggewig modele vertoon dat ons voorgestelde metodes betekenlik hoër punte bereik en betekenlik die kragtigheid van beide doel opdekking en slot opvulling verbeter. In addition, the combination of our BJAT with BERT-large achieves state-of-the-art results on two datasets.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক যুক্ত উদ্দেশ্যের উদ্দেশ্য পরিচিতি এবং স্লোট পূরণ করা সম্প্রতি বক্তৃতা বুঝতে পারে বিশাল সফল হয়েছে। তবে অনেক যোগাযোগ মডেল এখনো রোবস্টের সমস্যা থেকে কষ্ট পাচ্ছে, বিশেষ করে আওয়াজ প্রদানের বিষয়টি বা বিদায়/অদৃশ্য ঘটন এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি যুক্ত অ্যাডভারেরিয়াল প্রশিক্ষণ (জেটি) মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যার মধ্যে দুটি অংশ রয়েছে: (1) যুক্ত মডেল আক্রমণ করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় উদাহরণ সৃষ্টি করে এবং (2) যুক্ত বিরোধী উদাহরণের বিরুদ্ধে  যেহেতু তৈরি হয়েছে যুদ্ধ বিরোধী উদাহরণের ফলে গন্তব্য এবং স্লোট পূর্ণ ক্ষতির উপর বিভিন্ন প্রভাব রয়েছে, আমরা আরো প্রস্তাব করছি ব্যালেন্সেড জোয়েন্ট এডভারেরিয়াল প্রশিক্ষণ (বিজেট) মডেল যা চ হাল্কা মডেলের উপর বিশেষ পরীক্ষা এবং বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ স্কোর অর্জন করে এবং উভয়ের গন্তব্য সনাক্তি এবং  এছাড়াও, আমাদের বিজেট বিবের্ট-বিশাল সংযোগ দুটি ডাটাসেটের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'am': 'የአጠቃላይ ማስታወቂያ እና የስሎት መሞላ በቅርብ ጊዜ የንግግርን ማስተዋል በማሻሻል ታላቅ ድል አግኝቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ብዙዎች የብሔራዊ ሞዴላዎች ግን የድምፅ ውጤቶች ወይም ትንሽ/ያልታወቀ ጉዳይ ላይ መከራ ይኖራሉ፡፡ ወደዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የJoint Adversarial Trainin (JAT) ሞዴላዎችን ለመሻል እና የሁለቱ ክፍሎች የሚቆጠሩ የአካባቢ ማስታወቂያ እና የመስመር ሙላት እንዲያበጅል እና በሁለቱ ክፍሎች ላይ ነው:(1) የአካባቢ ምሳሌን ለመጋረጥ እና (2) ምሳሌውን በተቃራኒ ተቃዋሚዎች ምሳሌዎች ላይ ለመጠበቅ እና ምሳሌውን በትንሽ ተቃዋሚዎች ላይ ለመጠንቀቅ ማቅረብ ያስጀምራል፡፡ በተወለዱት ተቃዋሚዎች ምሳሌዎች ለጥያቄ ማግኘት እና የመስመር ጉዳይ ጉዳይ የሞላበት ክፍሎች እንዳላቸው፣ ደግሞም የጥላቅ ትምህርት ትምህርት (BJAT) ሞዴል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በብዛት ፈተናዎች እና ማስታወቂያው በሚያነዱበት ዓይነቶች ላይ የተዘጋጀን ሥርዓታችን ትልቅ ደረጃዎችን እንዲያገኙ እና የዓይነት ማቀናቀል እና ስርዓት መሞላውን እንዲያበጅል ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ BJAT ከBERT-ትልቅ ትልቁ ፍሬዎችን በሁለቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'nl': 'Joint intent detection en slot vulling hebben onlangs enorm succes geboekt in het verbeteren van de prestaties van het begrip van uitspraken. Veel joint modellen hebben echter nog steeds last van het robuustheidsprobleem, vooral bij lawaaierige ingangen of zeldzame/ongeziene gebeurtenissen. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model voor om de robuustheid van gezamenlijke intentiedetectie en sleufvulling te verbeteren, dat bestaat uit twee delen: (1) het automatisch genereren van gezamenlijke tegenstrijdige voorbeelden om het gezamenlijke model aan te vallen, en (2) het trainen van het model om te verdedigen tegen de gezamenlijke tegenstrijdige voorbeelden om het model te robuusten op kleine storingen. Aangezien de gegenereerde gezamenlijke tegenstrijdige voorbeelden verschillende effecten hebben op de intentiedetectie en slot vulling verlies, stellen we verder een Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) model voor dat een balansfactor als regularisatieterm toepast op de uiteindelijke verliesfunctie, wat een stabiele trainingsprocedure oplevert. Uitgebreide experimenten en analyses op de lichtgewicht modellen tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methoden significant hogere scores behalen en de robuustheid van zowel intentiedetectie als sleuvenvulling aanzienlijk verbeteren. Bovendien bereikt de combinatie van onze BJAT met BERT-large state-of-the-art resultaten op twee datasets.', 'hy': 'Միացյալ մտադրությունների հայտնաբերումը և վայրերի լրացումը վերջերս հսկայական հաջողություն է հասել արտահայտության հասկանալու առաջընթացքում: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ միավոր մոդելներ դեռևս տառապում են ուժեղության խնդիրից, հատկապես աղմկոտ ներմուծների կամ հազվադեպ և անտեսանելի իրադարձությունների դեպքում: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք Միացյալ հակառակ վարժությունների (JԱT) մոդել, որպեսզի բարելավենք ընդհանուր մտադրությունների հայտնաբերման և լրացման ուժեղությունը, որը կազմված է երկու մասից: (1) ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծելու ընդհանուր հակառակ օրինակներ միասին մոդելի հարձակման համար, և (2) մոդելի վարժեցնելու, որպեսզի պաշտպանվի ըն Քանի որ ստեղծված ընդհանուր հակառակորդական օրինակները տարբեր ազդեցություններ ունեն մտադրության հայտնաբերման և վայրերի լրացման կորստի վրա, մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք հավասարակշռության ընդհանուր հակառակորդական վարժման (BJT) մոդել, որը կիրառում է հավասարակշռության գործոն որպես վերջնական կորստի գործ Շատ լայն փորձարկումներ և թեթև մոդելների վերլուծություններ ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մեթոդները հասնում են ավելի բարձր գնահատականների և նշանակալի բարձրացնում են նպատակի հայտնաբերման և անկյունների լցման ուժեղությունը: Ավելին, մեր ԲՋԱԹ-ի և ԲԵՌԹ-մեծ համադրումը երկու տվյալների համակարգերի միջոցով հասնում է ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ:', 'ca': "La detecció d'intencions comunes i el rellenç de slots han aconseguit recentment un gran èxit en avançar el rendiment de l'enteniment de l'expressió. Tot i així, molts models conjunts encara pateixen el problema de robustetat, especialment en entrades ruidoses o en esdeveniments rars/invisibles. To address this issue, we propose a Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model to improve the robustness of joint intent detection and slot filling, which consists of two parts: (1) automatically generating joint adversarial examples to attack the joint model, and (2) training the model to defend against the joint adversarial examples so as to robustify the model on small perturbations.  Com que els exemples adversaris conjunts generats tenen impactes diferents en la detecció de l'intenció i la pèrdua de llençament de slots, proposem també un model de capacitació adversaria conjunta equilibrat (BJAT) que aplica un factor d'equilibri com a terme de regularizació a la funció de pèrdua final, que produeix un procediment de capacitació estable. Els extensos experiments i anàlisis dels models lleugers mostren que els nostres mètodes proposats aconsegueixen puntuacions significativament més alts i milloren substancialment la robustet de la detecció d'intencions i el rellenç de slots. A més, la combinació del BJAT amb el BERT-large aconsegueix resultats més avançats en dos conjunts de dades.", 'cs': 'Společná detekce záměru a plnění slotů dosáhly v poslední době obrovského úspěchu při pokroku výkonu porozumění výroků. Mnoho modelů kloubů však stále trpí problémem robustnosti, zejména u hlučných vstupů nebo vzácných nebo neviditelných událostí. Pro řešení této problematiky navrhujeme model Joint Adversarian Training (JAT), který se skládá ze dvou částí: (1) automatického generování společných adversariálních příkladů pro útok na společný model a (2) školení modelu na obranu proti společným adversariálním příkladům tak, aby model byl robustní při malých perturbacích. Vzhledem k tomu, že generované společné příklady mají různé dopady na detekci záměru a ztrátu plnění slotů, navrhujeme model Balanced Joint Adversarian Training (BJAT), který aplikuje rovnovážný faktor jako regularizační termín na konečnou ztrátovou funkci, což přináší stabilní tréninkový postup. Rozsáhlé experimenty a analýzy na lehkých modelech ukazují, že naše navrhované metody dosahují výrazně vyšších skóre a podstatně zlepšují robustnost detekce záměru i plnění drážek. Kromě toho kombinace našeho BJAT s BERT-large dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků na dvou datových sadách.', 'fa': 'کشف و پر کردن نقطه\u200cهای مشترک اخیرا موفقیت بزرگی در پیشرفت عملکرد درک سخنرانی به دست آورده است. ولی بسیاری از مدلهای مشترک هنوز از مشکل دقت رنج می\u200cبرند، مخصوصاً در ورودهای صوتی یا اتفاقات نادر/غیب است. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک مدل آموزش مشترک مشترک (JAT) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا استعداد کشف و پر کردن نقطه\u200cهای مشترک را بهتر کند، که از دو قسمت شامل است: (۱) خودکار برای تولید نمونه\u200cهای مخالف مشترک برای حمله به مدل مشترک، و (۲) مدل را آموزش می\u200cدهیم تا از نمونه\u200cهای مخالف مشترک دفاع کند تا مدل را بر تغییرات کوچک ثابت کند. به عنوان مثالهای مخالف مشترک تولید شده، اثرات متفاوتی بر کشف و خسارت کردن نقطه\u200cای دارند، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل آموزش مشترک مشترک (BJAT) مقایسه\u200cای که یک faktor مقایسه را به عنوان یک مدل عدم\u200cسازی برای عملکرد نهایی از دست دادن، که یک روش آموزش استوار می\u200cدهد. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده و تحلیل\u200cها در مورد مدل\u200cهای سنگین سبک نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200cهای پیشنهاد ما امتیاز\u200cهای بسیار بالاتر را می\u200cرسانند و بسیار قوی\u200cترین کشف و پر کردن نقطه\u200cها را بهبود می\u200cدهند. علاوه بر این، ترکیب BJAT ما با بزرگ BERT نتیجه\u200cهای ایالت هنر در دو مجموعه داده می\u200cرسد.', 'id': 'Deteksi tujuan kongsi dan penuh slot baru-baru ini telah mencapai sukses yang luar biasa dalam meningkatkan prestasi pemahaman utterance. However, many joint models still suffer from the robustness problem, especially on noisy inputs or rare/unseen events.  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan model Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) untuk meningkatkan kekuatan deteksi tujuan kongsi dan penuhian slot, yang terdiri dari dua bagian: (1) secara otomatis menghasilkan contoh musuh kongsi untuk menyerang model kongsi, dan (2) melatih model untuk mempertahankan diri dari contoh musuh kongsi untuk memperkuatkan model pada perturbasi kecil. Sebagai contoh musuh yang dihasilkan bersama memiliki dampak yang berbeda pada deteksi niat dan kehilangan penuhian slot, kami melanjutkan melaporkan model Pelatihan Musuh Berimbang (BJAT) yang menggunakan faktor keseimbangan sebagai istilah regularisasi untuk fungsi kehilangan akhir, yang memberikan prosedur pelatihan stabil. Eksperimen dan analisis yang luas pada model ringan menunjukkan bahwa metode kami yang diusulkan mencapai skor yang jauh lebih tinggi dan meningkatkan kepekatan dari deteksi tujuan dan penuhian slot. Selain itu, kombinasi BJAT kita dengan BERT-besar mencapai hasil terbaik pada dua set data.', 'tr': 'Soňra bir maksady tanamak we ýer dolamak üçin sözlerini düşünmek üçin örän başarnygy ýetdi. Yöne köp nusgalar gaty kynçylyk meselesinden çykýar, ýöne gürrüň girişi ýa nadir/görmezli wajyplarda bolýar. Bu meselede çözmek üçin, bir jemgyýetli söhbetçi eğitim (JAT) nusgasyny bilelikde bir nusgasy tapmak we slot dolumynyň güýçligini gowuramak üçin bir nusgasyny teklip edip görýäris: (1) Birleşik nusgasyna salmagy üçin bir nusgasyny otomatik bilen döretýär we (2) nusgasyny bir nusgasyna garşy etmek üçin nusgasyny kiçi baglanyşlar üçin nusgasyny ýüklemek üçin nusgasyny Ýüklendirilen toplumça teňkil örnekleri bolan maksadyň tanyşynyň we slot dolumynyň ýitişinde farklı täsirler bar, we soňra çykyş etmek üçin balans bir nusgasy düzenlemeli bir nusgasyny (BJAT) nusgasyna golaýlaýan bir nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Ýuwaşky experimentler we ýagtylyk nusgalarynda çözümler biziň teklip eden yönlerimiziň has üst notlaryny ýetip biljekdigini görkezýär we hem maksadyň deteksiyonyň, hem slot dolumynyň ýigrendigini gowylaşdyrýar. Beýleki bolsa, BERT bilen biziň BJAT-miziň birleşigimiz iki sanat setiriniň durumyny ýeňýär.', 'de': 'Gemeinsame Absichtserkennung und Slot-Füllung haben kürzlich enorme Erfolge bei der Verbesserung der Leistung des Äußerungsverständnisses erzielt. Viele Gelenkmodelle leiden jedoch immer noch unter dem Robustheitsproblem, insbesondere bei lauten Eingängen oder seltenen/unsichtbaren Ereignissen. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) Modell vor, um die Robustheit von Joint Intent Detection und Slot Filling zu verbessern, das aus zwei Teilen besteht: (1) automatische Generierung von Joint Adversarial Beispielen, um das Joint Model anzugreifen, und (2) Training des Modells, um sich gegen die Joint Adversarial Beispiele zu verteidigen, um das Modell bei kleinen Störungen zu robusten. Da die generierten Joint Adversarial-Beispiele unterschiedliche Auswirkungen auf die Intent Detection und Slot Filling Loss haben, schlagen wir ein Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) Modell vor, das einen Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) als Regularisierungsbegriff auf die endgültige Verlustfunktion anwendet, was zu einem stabilen Trainingsprozess führt. Umfangreiche Experimente und Analysen an den Leichtbaumodellen zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagenen Methoden signifikant höhere Scores erzielen und die Robustheit sowohl der Intent Detection als auch der Nutfüllung wesentlich verbessern. Darüber hinaus erzielt die Kombination unseres BJAT mit BERT-large modernste Ergebnisse auf zwei Datensätzen.', 'sw': 'Kugundua kwa lengo la pamoja na kuujaza sauti hivi karibuni imefanikiwa mafanikio makubwa katika kukuza ufanisi wa kuelewa maneno. Hata hivyo, mitindo mingi ya pamoja bado yanakabiliwa na matatizo ya kibinadamu, hususani kwa matukio ya kelele au nadra/yasiyojulikana. To address this issue, we propose a Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model to improve the robustness of joint intent detection and slot filling, which consists of two parts: (1) automatically generating joint adversarial examples to attack the joint model, and (2) training the model to defend against the joint adversarial examples so as to robustify the model on small perturbations.  Wakati mifano ya pamoja yanayozaliwa yanaathiri tofauti katika kutambua lengo na kupoteza kwa mstari, tunapendekeza zaidi mtindo wa mafunzo ya pamoja ya Ushirikiano wa Biashara (BJAT) unaotumia kiwango cha mizani kama muhula wa kudhibiti kwa kazi ya mwisho ya kupoteza, ambayo inaleta mchakato wa mafunzo imara. Majaribio mengi na uchambuzi katika mifano ya uzito inaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa zinafanikiwa vipimo vya juu na kuboresha ubora wa uchunguzi na ujazo wa madini. Zaidi ya hayo, muunganiko wa BJAT na BERT mkubwa unafanikiwa hali ya matokeo ya sanaa kwenye seti mbili za data.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i qëllimeve të përbashkëta dhe mbushja e kohëve të fundit ka arritur sukses të madh në përparimin e performancës së kuptimit të shprehjes. Megjithatë, shumë modele të përbashkëta vuajnë ende nga problemi i robustësisë, veçanërisht në hyrje zhurmuese apo ngjarje të rralla/të padukshme. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një model të përbashkët stërvitjeje kundërshtare (JAT) për të përmirësuar fuqinë e zbulimit të qëllimeve të përbashkëta dhe mbushjes së kohëve të caktuara, i cili përbëhet nga dy pjesë: (1) automatikisht krijimi i shembujve të përbashkëta kundërshtarësh për të sulmuar modelin e përbashkët dhe (2) stërvitja e modelit për të mbrojtur kundër shembujve të përbashkëta kundërshtarësh në mënyrë që Ndërsa shembujt e përbashkët kundërshtarë të gjeneruar kanë ndikime të ndryshme në zbulimin e qëllimeve dhe humbjen e mbushjes së slot ëve, ne propozojmë më tej një model të ekuilibruar të përbashkët të trajnimit kundërshtar (BJAT) që aplikon një faktor ekuilibri si një term ë rregullalizimi në funksionin e humbjes përfundimtare, që jep një procedurë të qëndrueshme trajnimi. Eksperimentet e gjera dhe analizat e modeleve të lehta tregojnë se metodat tona të propozuara arrijnë rezultate më të larta dhe përmirësojnë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme fuqinë e zbulimit të qëllimeve dhe mbushjes së intervaleve. In addition, the combination of our BJAT with BERT-large achieves state-of-the-art results on two datasets.', 'az': 'Sözlük anlaşılmasını artırmaq üçün çox böyük başarılı oldu. Ancaq çoxlu birlikdə modellər hələ də güclülük problemindən çəkilir, özlərinə də səs inputləri və nadir/görmədikləri olaraq. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, joint Adversarial Training (JAT) modeli təklif edirik ki, joint intent detection and slot filling, bu iki parçadan olub: 1) birlikdə modeli salmaq üçün birlikdə bir düşmənçilik məsəllərini avtomatik olaraq təklif edir, və 2) modeli birlikdə düşmənçilik məsəllərinə qarşı müdafiə etmək üçün modeli təklif edirik ki, kiçik düşmənçilik məsəllərinə səbəb olsun. Yaratılmış müxtəlif məsəllərdə niyyəti keçmək və slot doldurulması zərəri üzərində farklı təsirlər vardır, biz daha sonra müəyyən olunmuş müxtəlif müəllif təhsil (BJAT) modeli təklif edirik ki, sonuncu ziyanın fəaliyyətinə müəyyən edilmə müddəti olaraq balançılıq faktoru istifadə edər, bu da stabil təhsil prosedürünü Geçici modellər barəsində geniş təcrübələr və analizi göstərir ki, təklif etdiyimiz metodlarımız çox yüksək nöqtələri başa düşər və hər iki niyyətin keşfetməsi və slot dolmasının gücünü artırar. BJAT-ımızın birləşdirilməsi də BERT-in böyüklüyü ilə iki verilən qutusu ilə mövcuddur.', 'bs': 'Zajednička namjera otkrivanja i ispunjavanje slota nedavno je postigao ogroman uspjeh u unapređenju učinka razumijevanja govora. Međutim, mnogi zajednički modeli još uvijek pati od problema sa pljačkom, posebno o bukovim ulazima ili rijetkim/nevidljivim događajima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo model zajedničkog saveznog treninga (JAT) kako bi poboljšali robotu otkrivanja zajedničkih namjera i ispunjavanja slot a, koji se sastoji od dva dijela: (1) automatski stvoriti zajedničke neprijateljske primjere za napad zajedničkog modela, i (2) obuku modela za branu protiv zajedničkih neprijateljskih primjera kako bi se opustio model na male perturbacije. Pošto su generirani zajednički adversarni primjeri imali različite utjecaje na otkrivanje namjere i gubitak ispunjavanja slot a, dalje predlažemo Balancirani zajednički savezni trening (BJAT) model koji primjenjuje faktor ravnoteže kao termin regularizacije konačnoj funkciji gubitka, koji predstavlja stabilnu proceduru obuke. Eksperimenti i analizi o modelima lagane težine pokazuju da naši predloženi metodi postignu značajno veće rezultate i značajno poboljšavaju snagu i otkrivanja namjera i ispunjavanja slota. Osim toga, kombinacija našeg BJAT sa velikim BERT-om postiže rezultate umjetnosti na dva dataseta.', 'et': 'Ühine kavatsuste tuvastamine ja pesade täitmine on hiljuti saavutanud tohutu edu kõnede mõistmise edendamisel. Siiski kannatavad paljud ühendusmudelid ikka veel vastupidavuse probleemi all, eriti mürakate sisendite või haruldaste/nähtamatute sündmuste korral. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja ühise vastastikuse koolituse (Joint Adversarial Training, JAT) mudeli, mis koosneb kahest osast: (1) automaatselt ühiste vastastikuste näidete genereerimine ühismudeli ründamiseks ja (2) mudeli väljaõpetamine ühiste vastastikuste näidete eest kaitsmiseks, et tugevdada mudelit väikeste häirete korral. Kuna loodud ühiste vastaste näidete mõju kavatsuste tuvastamisele ja teenindusaja täitmise kaotusele on erinev, pakume välja tasakaalustatud ühiste vastaste koolituste mudeli (BJAT), mis rakendab tasakaalustatud ühiste vastaste koolituste funktsioonile regulariseerimistähtajana tasakaalustamistegurit, mis annab stabiilse koolitusprotseduuri. Laiaulatuslikud katsed ja analüüsid kergete mudelitega näitavad, et meie kavandatud meetodid saavutavad oluliselt kõrgemaid tulemusi ja parandavad oluliselt nii kavatsuste tuvastamise kui ka pesade täitmise tugevust. Lisaks saavutab BJATi ja BERT-large kombineerimine kahe andmekogumi puhul kaasaegseid tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Yhteinen aikomusten havaitseminen ja slotin täyttö ovat viime aikoina saavuttaneet valtavan menestyksen ilmaisun ymmärtämisen edistämisessä. Monet nivelmallit kärsivät kuitenkin edelleen kestävyysongelmasta, erityisesti meluisissa tuloissa tai harvinaisissa/näkymättömissä tapahtumissa. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) -mallia, jolla parannetaan yhteisen aikomusten havaitsemisen ja slot filling -järjestelmän kestävyyttä. Malli koostuu kahdesta osasta: (1) tuottaa automaattisesti yhteisiä vastustajia koskevia esimerkkejä yhteisen mallin hyökkäykseksi ja (2) kouluttaa mallia puolustamaan yhteisiä vastustajia vastaan siten, että mallia voidaan vahvistaa pienissä häiriöissä. Koska luoduilla yhteisillä vastakkainasetteluesimerkeillä on erilainen vaikutus intent detection- ja slot filling -häviöön, ehdotamme lisäksi Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) -mallia, joka soveltaa tasapainokerrointa lopulliseen tappiofunktioon, joka tuottaa vakaan harjoitusprosessin. Kevyillä malleilla tehdyt laajat kokeet ja analyysit osoittavat, että ehdotetut menetelmät saavuttavat huomattavasti korkeammat pisteet ja parantavat merkittävästi sekä intent detection että slot täyttö kestävyyttä. Lisäksi BJATin ja BERT-largen yhdistelmä tuottaa huippuluokan tuloksia kahdessa aineistossa.', 'sk': 'Skupno zaznavanje namena in polnjenje rež sta v zadnjem času dosegla izjemen uspeh pri napredku razumevanja izgovorov. Vendar pa številni modeli spojev še vedno trpijo zaradi težav z robustnostjo, zlasti pri hrupnih vhodih ali redkih/nevidnih dogodkih. Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo model skupnega nasprotnega usposabljanja (JAT) za izboljšanje robustnosti skupnega odkrivanja namenov in polnjenja rež, ki je sestavljen iz dveh delov: (1) avtomatsko ustvarjanje skupnih nasprotnih primerov za napad skupnega modela in (2) usposabljanje modela za obrambo pred skupnimi nasprotnimi primeri, da bi se model okrepil pri majhnih motnjah. Ker generirani primeri skupnih kontradiktorjev različno vplivajo na odkrivanje namena in izgubo polnjenja rež, nadalje predlagamo model uravnoteženega skupnega adversarialnega usposabljanja (BJAT), ki uporablja faktor ravnotežja kot rok za regulacijo funkcije končne izgube, kar zagotavlja stabilen postopek usposabljanja. Obsežni eksperimenti in analize lahkih modelov kažejo, da naše predlagane metode dosegajo bistveno višje ocene in bistveno izboljšajo robustnost tako zaznavanja namena kot polnjenja rež. Poleg tega kombinacija našega BJAT z BERT-large dosega najsodobnejše rezultate na dveh naborih podatkov.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, masu yawa masu motsi da wadangan su bada suna cũtar a cikin matabbata na nau'i, hususan a kan sauri masu shiga cikin ayuka ko da rare/ɓoyewa. To, idan ana yi magana a kan wannan masu al'amarin, za mu buƙata wani misãlai na Johannar Trainin (JAT) dõmin ya improve tufãfin ya cika matsakan na haɗi na gano da kuma filin slot, wanda ke ƙunsa daga shekara biyu: (1) kanana ƙara misãlai masu motsi na haɗi dõmin ya shafe shirin da ke haɗi, kuma (2) ya sanar da motel dõmin ya tsare shi kan misãlai masu motsi na haɗi, dõmin ya yi amfani da misãlai kan manyan turbatori masu ƙarami. As the generated joint adversarial examples have different impacts on the intent detection and slot filling loss, we further propose a Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) model that applies a balance factor as a regularization term to the final loss function, which yields a stable training procedure.  Cirari masu ƙaranci da anaƙalumai kan misãlai masu haske sun nuna cewa hanyoyinmu da ake ƙayyade za'a sami score mai girma kuma ya kyautata gunan tufãfin da za'a cika zafi da slot. Da wannan, da shirin BJAT da BERT-babban ya sami matsalar-na-kunna biyu.", 'he': 'גילוי כוונות משותפת וממלא מקומות השיגו לאחרונה הצלחה עצומה בהתקדמות ביצוע הבנה של הבנה. עם זאת, דוגמנים משותפים רבים עדיין סובלים מבעית החזקה, במיוחד על כניסות רעשות או אירועים נדירים/בלתי נראים. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים מודל של אימון נוגדי משותף (JAT) כדי לשפר את החזקה של זיהוי כוונות משותפת וממלא המקומות, שמכיל משני חלקים: (1) לייצר אוטומטית דוגמאות נוגדים משותפים לתקוף את המודל המשותף, ו (2) לאימן את המודל כדי להגן נגד דוגמאות נוגדים משותפים כדי לחזק את המודל על הפרעות קטנות. כיוון שלדוגמאות הריבי המשותפות שנוצרות יש השפעות שונות על גילוי הכוונה ואבד המלאה של המקומות, אנו מציעים עוד מודל אימון הריבי המשותף המשותף (BJAT) שמשתמש גורם איזון בתור מונח קבוע לפונקציית האובדן הסופית, מה שמביא תהליך אימון יציב. ניסויים רחבים וניתוחים על הדוגמנים הקלים מראים שהשיטות המוצעות שלנו משיגות נקודות גבוהות יותר באופן משמעותי בנוסף, שילוב BJAT שלנו עם BERT-גדול משיג תוצאות מוקדמות על שני קבוצות נתונים.', 'jv': 'Join Ingat tho, akeh model sing paling-paling saiki ditambah mengko perbudhakan ning njobho kesempatan, supaya njobho kapan pangan o wariane kuwi mau. To Address this question, we proposal a Joint Advertary Learning Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing paling-perusahaan karo perusahaan karo hal-hal karo nggawe winih nggawe buktuan winih sabên, dhéwé nggawe sistem sing beraksi sabên Joint Advertary Learning AllProgressBarUpdates Nambah, dibungano BJaT-namung karo BERT-namung gawe dataset duwé', 'bo': 'བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྷན་གྱིས་གཏོང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་པ། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆེ་མཐུན་ཁང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་བརྩོན་བ་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ཁག་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་བརྟེན་ནས།ཁྱད་དུ་གཏོང་ཁང་མཐུན་སྣང་ To address this issue, we propose a Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model to improve the robustness of joint intent detection and slot filling, which consists of two parts: (1) automatically generating joint adversarial examples to attack the joint model, and (2) training the model to defend against the joint adversarial examples so as to robustify the model on small perturbations. To address this issue, we propose a Joint Adversarial Training (JAT) model to defend against the joint adversarial examples so as to robustify the model on small perturbations. As the generated joint adversarial examples have different impacts on the intent detection and slot filling loss, we further propose a Balanced Joint Adversarial Training (BJAT) model that applies a balance factor as a regularization term to the final loss function, which yields a stable training procedure. Extensive experiments and analyses on the lightweight models show that our proposed methods achieve significantly higher scores and substantially improve the robustness of both intent detection and slot filling. འོན་ཀྱང་། BJAT ཚོ་དང་BERT ་ཆེ་བའི་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ནང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Understanding Unnatural Questions Improves Reasoning over Text', 'ar': 'فهم الأسئلة غير الطبيعية يحسن التفكير في النص', 'fr': 'Comprendre les questions non naturelles améliore le raisonnement par rapport au texte', 'pt': 'Compreender perguntas não naturais melhora o raciocínio sobre o texto', 'es': 'Entender preguntas antinaturales mejora el razonamiento sobre el texto', 'ja': '不自然な質問を理解することで、テキストよりも推論力が向上します', 'zh': '知非自然可改善文本推理', 'hi': 'अप्राकृतिक प्रश्नों को समझना पाठ पर तर्क में सुधार करता है', 'ru': 'Понимание неестественных вопросов улучшает рассуждение над текстом', 'ga': 'Feabhsaíonn Tuiscint ar Cheisteanna Mínádúrtha Réasúnú thar Téacs', 'ka': 'ნვნაპირადი კითხვების გაგრძნობა ტექსტის მიზეზი', 'hu': 'A természetellenes kérdések megértése javítja az érvelést a szöveg felett', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση των ασυνήθιστων ερωτήσεων βελτιώνει τη λογική έναντι του κειμένου', 'kk': 'Табиғи сұрақтарын түсіну мәтіннің сезімін жақсы көмектеседі', 'it': 'Comprendere le domande innaturali migliora la ragione rispetto al testo', 'lt': 'Understanding Unnatural Questions Improves Reasoning over Text', 'mk': 'Understanding Unnatural Questions Improves Reasoning over Text', 'ms': 'Memahami soalan tidak semulajadi meningkatkan Rasa atas Teks', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നത് പദാവലിയുടെ മേല്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200d', 'mt': "Il-fehim ta' mistoqsijiet mhux naturali jtejjeb ir-raġunament fuq it-test", 'mn': 'Байгалийн асуултуудыг ойлгох нь', 'no': 'Forståking av ikkje naturlege spørsmål forbedrar grunnen over tekst', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie nienaturalnych pytań poprawia rozumowanie nad tekstem', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea întrebărilor anormale îmbunătățește raționamentul față de text', 'sr': 'Razumevanje neoprirodnih pitanja poboljšava razloge preko teksta', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරාකෘතික ප්\u200dරශ්න අවස්ථාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් පාළුවෙන් හේතුවක් විශේෂ', 'so': "Waxgarashada su'aalaha asalka ah Improves Reading over Text", 'sv': 'Att förstå naturliga frågor förbättrar resonemanget framför text', 'ta': 'இயல்பான கேள்விகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியவில்லை உரையின் மேல் செயல்படுத்தலை மேம்படுத்து', 'ur': 'غیر طبیعی سوال سمجھنے کے باعث متن پر Reasoning improves', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hiểu được câu hỏi không tự nhiên Cải thiện lẽ lý qua văn bản', 'bg': 'Разбирането на неестествените въпроси подобрява разума пред текста', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje neoprirodnih pitanja poboljšava razloge preko teksta', 'nl': 'Onnatuurlijke vragen begrijpen verbetert redeneren boven tekst', 'da': 'Forståelse af unormale spørgsmål forbedrer begrundelsen i forhold til tekst', 'de': 'Unnatürliche Fragen verstehen verbessert die Vernunft über Text', 'id': 'Memahami Pertanyaan Tidak Alami Menyukur Menyebabkan Menyebabkan Teks', 'ko': '부자연스러운 문제를 이해하면 텍스트에 대한 추리력을 높일 수 있다', 'fa': 'درک سوالات غیرطبیعی، دلایل\u200cهای متن را بهتر می\u200cکند', 'sw': 'Kuelewa na maswali yasiyo ya asili yanabadilisha kujifunza', 'af': 'Onnatuurlike vrae verstaan verbeter rede oor teks', 'sq': 'kuptimi i pyetjeve jo natyrore përmirëson arsyetimin lidhur me tekstin', 'tr': 'Doňsuz soraglary düşünmek Metin üstünde sebäbi gowurar', 'hy': 'Չբնական հարցերի հասկանալը բարելավում է տեքստի վերաբերյալ պատճառը', 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtsiz suallarńĪ anlamaq m…ôktub √ľz…ôrind…ô Reason Improved', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্ন বুঝতে পারে টেক্সটের উপর প্রস্তুতি প্রাপ্ত হয়েছে', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje neoprirodnih pitanja poboljšava razloge preko teksta', 'et': 'Ebaloomulike küsimuste mõistmine parandab teksti mõistmist', 'cs': 'Porozumění nepřirozeným otázkám zlepšuje odůvodnění oproti textu', 'ca': 'Entendre preguntes poc naturals millora la raonació sobre el text', 'fi': 'Epäluonnollisten kysymysten ymmärtäminen parantaa järkeilyä tekstiin verrattuna', 'jv': 'Rasané Keberaksi Gak Kebudhakan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razumevanje nenaravnih vprašanj izboljša razumevanje besedila', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མེད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གིས་རྟོགས་ན་ཡི་གེ་ལ་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པ', 'he': 'להבין שאלות לא טבעיות משפר את הגיון על טקסט'}
{'en': 'Complex question answering (CQA) over raw text is a challenging task. A prominent approach to this task is based on the programmer-interpreter framework, where the programmer maps the question into a sequence of reasoning actions and the interpreter then executes these actions on the raw text. Learning an effective CQA model requires large amounts of human-annotated data, consisting of the ground-truth sequence of reasoning actions, which is time-consuming and expensive to collect at scale. In this paper, we address the challenge of learning a high-quality programmer (parser) by projecting natural human-generated questions into unnatural machine-generated questions which are more convenient to parse. We firstly generate synthetic (question, action sequence) pairs by a data generator, and train a semantic parser that associates synthetic questions with their corresponding action sequences. To capture the diversity when applied to natural questions, we learn a projection model to map natural questions into their most similar unnatural questions for which the parser can work well. Without any natural training data, our projection model provides high-quality action sequences for the CQA task. Experimental results show that the QA model trained exclusively with synthetic data outperforms its state-of-the-art counterpart trained on human-labeled data.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة على الأسئلة المعقدة (CQA) على النص الخام مهمة صعبة. يعتمد النهج البارز لهذه المهمة على إطار عمل المبرمج-المترجم ، حيث يقوم المبرمج بتعيين السؤال في سلسلة من الإجراءات المنطقية ثم يقوم المترجم الفوري بتنفيذ هذه الإجراءات على النص الخام. يتطلب تعلم نموذج CQA الفعال كميات كبيرة من البيانات المشروحة من قبل الإنسان ، والتي تتكون من تسلسل الحقيقة الأساسية لإجراءات الاستدلال ، والتي تستغرق وقتًا طويلاً وتكلفة جمعها على نطاق واسع. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول التحدي المتمثل في تعلم مبرمج عالي الجودة (محلل) من خلال إسقاط الأسئلة الطبيعية التي يولدها الإنسان في أسئلة غير طبيعية تنتجها الآلة وتكون أكثر ملاءمة لتحليلها. نقوم أولاً بإنشاء أزواج تركيبية (سؤال ، تسلسل عمل) بواسطة مولد بيانات ، وندرب محللًا دلاليًا يربط الأسئلة التركيبية بتسلسلات الإجراءات المقابلة لها. لالتقاط التنوع عند تطبيقه على الأسئلة الطبيعية ، نتعلم نموذج إسقاط لرسم خريطة للأسئلة الطبيعية في الأسئلة غير الطبيعية الأكثر تشابهًا والتي يمكن للمحلل العمل بشكل جيد من أجلها. بدون أي بيانات تدريب طبيعية ، يوفر نموذج الإسقاط الخاص بنا تسلسلات عمل عالية الجودة لمهمة CQA. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذج ضمان الجودة المُدرَّب حصريًا على البيانات التركيبية يتفوق في الأداء على نظيره الأحدث المُدرَّب على البيانات التي تحمل علامات بشرية.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas complejas (CQA) sobre texto sin formato es una tarea desafiante. Un enfoque destacado de esta tarea se basa en el marco programador-intérprete, donde el programador mapea la pregunta en una secuencia de acciones de razonamiento y el intérprete luego ejecuta estas acciones en el texto sin procesar. Aprender un modelo de CQA eficaz requiere grandes cantidades de datos anotados por humanos, que consisten en la secuencia de la verdad fundamental de las acciones de razonamiento, que requiere mucho tiempo y es costosa de recopilar a escala. En este artículo, abordamos el desafío de aprender un programador de alta calidad (analizador) proyectando preguntas naturales generadas por humanos en preguntas antinaturales generadas por máquinas que son más convenientes de analizar. En primer lugar, generamos pares sintéticos (pregunta, secuencia de acción) mediante un generador de datos y entrenamos un analizador semántico que asocia preguntas sintéticas con sus secuencias de acción correspondientes. Para capturar la diversidad cuando se aplica a preguntas naturales, aprendemos un modelo de proyección para mapear preguntas naturales en sus preguntas antinaturales más similares para las que el analizador puede funcionar bien. Sin ningún dato de entrenamiento natural, nuestro modelo de proyección proporciona secuencias de acción de alta calidad para la tarea de CQA. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el modelo de control de calidad entrenado exclusivamente con datos sintéticos supera a su homólogo de última generación entrenado en datos etiquetados por humanos.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions complexes (CQA) sur du texte brut est une tâche difficile. Une approche importante de cette tâche est basée sur le framework programmeur-interprète, où le programmeur mappe la question en une séquence d'actions de raisonnement et l'interpréteur exécute ensuite ces actions sur le texte brut. L'apprentissage d'un modèle d'AQC efficace nécessite de grandes quantités de données annotées par l'homme, consistant en une séquence de raisonnement basée sur la vérité de terrain, qui est longue et coûteuse à collecter à grande échelle. Dans cet article, nous abordons le défi de l'apprentissage d'un programmeur de haute qualité (analyseur) en projetant des questions naturelles générées par l'homme dans des questions artificielles générées par des machines qui sont plus pratiques à analyser. Nous générons d'abord des paires synthétiques (question, séquence d'action) par un générateur de données, et formons un analyseur sémantique qui associe des questions synthétiques à leurs séquences d'action correspondantes. Pour saisir la diversité appliquée à des questions naturelles, nous apprenons un modèle de projection pour cartographier les questions naturelles dans leurs questions non naturelles les plus similaires pour lesquelles l'analyseur peut fonctionner correctement. Sans données d'entraînement naturelles, notre modèle de projection fournit des séquences d'action de haute qualité pour la tâche CQA. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle d'assurance qualité entraîné exclusivement avec des données synthétiques surpasse son homologue de pointe formé sur des données étiquetées par l'homme.", 'pt': 'A resposta a perguntas complexas (CQA) sobre texto bruto é uma tarefa desafiadora. Uma abordagem proeminente para essa tarefa é baseada na estrutura programador-intérprete, onde o programador mapeia a questão em uma sequência de ações de raciocínio e o intérprete executa essas ações no texto bruto. Aprender um modelo CQA eficaz requer grandes quantidades de dados anotados por humanos, consistindo na sequência real de ações de raciocínio, que é demorada e cara para coletar em escala. Neste artigo, abordamos o desafio de aprender um programador de alta qualidade (parser) projetando perguntas naturais geradas por humanos em perguntas não naturais geradas por máquina que são mais convenientes para analisar. Primeiramente, geramos pares sintéticos (pergunta, sequência de ação) por um gerador de dados e treinamos um analisador semântico que associa perguntas sintéticas com suas sequências de ação correspondentes. Para capturar a diversidade quando aplicada a perguntas naturais, aprendemos um modelo de projeção para mapear perguntas naturais em suas perguntas não naturais mais semelhantes para as quais o analisador pode funcionar bem. Sem nenhum dado de treinamento natural, nosso modelo de projeção fornece sequências de ação de alta qualidade para a tarefa CQA. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o modelo de QA treinado exclusivamente com dados sintéticos supera seu equivalente de última geração treinado com dados rotulados por humanos.', 'ja': 'RAWテキスト上の複雑な質問への回答（ CQA ）は、困難な課題です。 このタスクに対する顕著なアプローチは、プログラマインタプリタフレームワークに基づいており、プログラマは質問を推論アクションのシーケンスにマッピングし、インタプリタは生テキスト上でこれらのアクションを実行します。 効果的なCQAモデルを学習するには、大規模に収集するのに時間と費用がかかる推論行動の真実のシーケンスからなる大量の人間が注釈したデータが必要です。 本稿では，解析しやすい不自然な機械生成の質問に自然な人間生成の質問を投影することで，高品質のプログラマ（構文解析器）を学ぶ課題に取り組む． まず、データ生成器によって合成（質問、アクションシーケンス）ペアを生成し、合成の質問を対応するアクションシーケンスに関連付けるセマンティック構文解析器をトレーニングします。 自然な質問に適用される多様性を把握するために、私たちは自然な質問を最も似た不自然な質問にマッピングするための投影モデルを学び、パーサーがうまく機能することができます。 自然なトレーニングデータなしで、当社のプロジェクションモデルは、CQAタスクのための高品質のアクションシーケンスを提供します。 実験結果は、合成データのみで訓練されたQAモデルが、ヒト標識データで訓練された最先端のモデルよりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '杂问本 (CQA) 一挑战性之任也。 此一术者,程序员解释器框架也,程序员映列推理操作,然后解释器行之。 学有效者CQA大须人工注数,此数由理地真序成,此既耗时而贵,不可大收也。 夫文者,因自然之人而投景于便解析非自然机器生而决学高质量程序员(解析器)之挑战也。 先因生成器生成合(,操序)对,练一语义解析器,将合而序之。 为天之多样性,学一投影,射之于天,解析器可以善事。 无自然之数,投景为 CQA 高质量之序。 实验结果表明,专用合数QA优于人纪数之最先进者应物。', 'ru': 'Ответы на сложные вопросы (CQA) над необработанным текстом - сложная задача. Заметный подход к этой задаче основан на фреймворке программист-интерпретатор, где программист отображает вопрос в последовательность аргументационных действий, а интерпретатор затем выполняет эти действия над необработанным текстом. Изучение эффективной модели КПК требует больших объемов аннотированных человеком данных, состоящих из последовательности действий по обоснованию истины, которая занимает много времени и является дорогостоящей для сбора в масштабе. В этой статье мы рассматриваем проблему обучения высококачественного программиста (парсера), проецируя естественные человеческие вопросы в неестественные машинные вопросы, которые удобнее анализировать. Сначала мы генерируем синтетические (вопрос, последовательность действий) пары с помощью генератора данных и обучаем семантический парсер, который связывает синтетические вопросы с их соответствующими последовательностями действий. Чтобы отразить разнообразие при применении к естественным вопросам, мы изучаем модель прогнозирования для отображения естественных вопросов в их наиболее похожих неестественных вопросах, для которых анализатор может работать хорошо. Без каких-либо естественных данных о тренировках наша проекционная модель обеспечивает высококачественные последовательности действий для задачи КПК. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что модель ОК, обученная исключительно синтетическим данным, превосходит ее современный аналог, обученный по данным, помеченным человеком.', 'hi': 'कच्चे पाठ पर जटिल प्रश्न उत्तर (CQA) एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। इस कार्य के लिए एक प्रमुख दृष्टिकोण प्रोग्रामर-दुभाषिया ढांचे पर आधारित है, जहां प्रोग्रामर प्रश्न को तर्क कार्यों के अनुक्रम में मैप करता है और दुभाषिया तब कच्चे पाठ पर इन कार्यों को निष्पादित करता है। एक प्रभावी सीक्यूए मॉडल सीखने के लिए बड़ी मात्रा में मानव-एनोटेटेड डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है, जिसमें तर्क कार्यों का जमीनी-सत्य अनुक्रम शामिल होता है, जो पैमाने पर एकत्र करने के लिए समय लेने वाला और महंगा होता है। इस पेपर में, हम प्राकृतिक मानव-जनित प्रश्नों को अप्राकृतिक मशीन-जनित प्रश्नों में प्रोजेक्ट करके एक उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रोग्रामर (पार्सर) को सीखने की चुनौती को संबोधित करते हैं जो पार्स करने के लिए अधिक सुविधाजनक हैं। हम सबसे पहले एक डेटा जनरेटर द्वारा सिंथेटिक (प्रश्न, कार्रवाई अनुक्रम) जोड़े उत्पन्न करते हैं, और एक शब्दार्थ पार्सर को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं जो सिंथेटिक प्रश्नों को उनके संबंधित कार्रवाई अनुक्रमों के साथ जोड़ता है। प्राकृतिक प्रश्नों पर लागू होने पर विविधता को पकड़ने के लिए, हम प्राकृतिक प्रश्नों को उनके सबसे समान अप्राकृतिक प्रश्नों में मैप करने के लिए एक प्रक्षेपण मॉडल सीखते हैं जिसके लिए पार्सर अच्छी तरह से काम कर सकता है। किसी भी प्राकृतिक प्रशिक्षण डेटा के बिना, हमारा प्रक्षेपण मॉडल CQA कार्य के लिए उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले एक्शन सीक्वेंस प्रदान करता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि सिंथेटिक डेटा के साथ विशेष रूप से प्रशिक्षित क्यूए मॉडल मानव-लेबल डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित अपने अत्याधुनिक समकक्ष को मात देता है।', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é freagra casta ceisteanna (CQA) thar amhthéacs. Tá cur chuige feiceálach i leith an taisc seo bunaithe ar an gcreat ríomhchláraitheoir-ateangaire, áit a mapálann an ríomhchláraitheoir an cheist i seicheamh de ghníomhartha réasúnaíochta agus ansin déanann an t-ateangaire na gníomhartha seo ar an mbuntéacs. Chun samhail éifeachtach CQA a fhoghlaim, tá gá le méideanna móra de shonraí daonna-nótáilte, arb é atá iontu seicheamh bunfhírinne na ngníomhartha réasúnaíochta, a thógann am agus costasach le bailiú ar scála. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an dúshlán a bhaineann le ríomhchláraitheoir (parsálaí) ardchaighdeáin a fhoghlaim trí cheisteanna nádúrtha a ghineann an duine a theilgean isteach i gceisteanna mínádúrtha a ghineann meaisín agus atá níos áisiúla le parsáil. Ar dtús gineann muid péirí sintéiseacha (ceist, seicheamh gníomhaíochta) trí ghineadóir sonraí, agus traenáilimid parsálaí shéimeantach a nascann ceisteanna sintéiseacha lena seichimh ghníomhaíochta comhfhreagracha. Chun an éagsúlacht a ghabháil nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar cheisteanna nádúrtha í, foghlaimímid samhail teilgin chun ceisteanna nádúrtha a mhapáil ina gceisteanna mínádúrtha is cosúla a bhféadfaidh an parsálaí oibriú go maith ina leith. Gan aon sonraí oiliúna nádúrtha, cuireann ár múnla teilgean seichimh ghníomhaíochta ardchaighdeáin ar fáil do thasc an CQA. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go n-éiríonn níos fearr leis an tsamhail QA atá oilte go heisiach le sonraí sintéiseacha ná a macasamhail den scoth atá oilte ar shonraí lipéadaithe daonna.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση σύνθετων ερωτήσεων πάνω από ακατέργαστο κείμενο είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο. Μια εξέχουσα προσέγγιση σε αυτό το έργο βασίζεται στο πλαίσιο προγραμματιστή-διερμηνέα, όπου ο προγραμματιστής χαρτογραφεί το ερώτημα σε μια ακολουθία ενεργειών συλλογισμού και ο διερμηνέας εκτελεί αυτές τις ενέργειες στο ακατέργαστο κείμενο. Η εκμάθηση ενός αποτελεσματικού μοντέλου απαιτεί μεγάλες ποσότητες δεδομένων με σχόλια από ανθρώπους, που αποτελούνται από την ακολουθία λογικών ενεργειών, η οποία είναι χρονοβόρα και δαπανηρή στη συλλογή σε κλίμακα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε την πρόκληση της εκμάθησης ενός υψηλής ποιότητας προγραμματιστή (αναλυτή) προβάλλοντας φυσικές ερωτήσεις που δημιουργούνται από τον άνθρωπο σε αφύσικες ερωτήσεις που παράγονται από τη μηχανή, οι οποίες είναι πιο βολικές στην ανάλυση. Αρχικά δημιουργούμε συνθετικά ζεύγη (ερωτήματα, ακολουθία ενεργειών) από μια γεννήτρια δεδομένων και εκπαιδεύουμε έναν σημασιολογικό αναλυτή που συσχετίζει συνθετικές ερωτήσεις με τις αντίστοιχες ακολουθίες ενεργειών τους. Για να αποτυπώσουμε την ποικιλομορφία όταν εφαρμόζεται σε φυσικά ερωτήματα, μαθαίνουμε ένα μοντέλο προβολής για να χαρτογραφήσουμε φυσικά ερωτήματα στα πιο παρόμοια αφύσικα ερωτήματα τους για τα οποία ο αναλυτής μπορεί να λειτουργήσει καλά. Χωρίς φυσικά δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης, το μοντέλο προβολής μας παρέχει υψηλής ποιότητας ακολουθίες δράσης για την εργασία CQA. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο QA εκπαιδευμένο αποκλειστικά με συνθετικά δεδομένα ξεπερνά το σύγχρονο αντίστοιχο του εκπαιδευμένο σε δεδομένα με ανθρώπινη σήμανση.', 'hu': 'A bonyolult kérdésválasz (CQA) nyers szöveg felett kihívást jelent. A feladat kiemelkedő megközelítése a programozó-tolmács keretrendszeren alapul, ahol a programozó a kérdést érvelési műveletek sorozatába térképezi, majd a tolmács végrehajtja ezeket a műveleteket a nyers szövegen. Egy hatékony CQA modell megtanulása nagy mennyiségű, emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott adatot igényel, amelyek az érvelési tevékenységek alapvető igazságsorozatából állnak, amely időigényes és nagyságrendű összegyűjtése. Ebben a tanulmányban a kiváló minőségű programozó (elemző) tanulásának kihívásával foglalkozunk azzal, hogy természetes ember által generált kérdéseket vetítünk természetellenes, gép által generált kérdésekbe, amelyek kényelmesebb elemezni. Először szintetikus (kérdés, akciósorozat) párokat generálunk egy adatgenerátorral, és egy szemantikai elemzőt képezünk, amely a szintetikus kérdéseket a megfelelő akciósorozatokkal társítja. A természetes kérdésekre alkalmazott sokszínűség megörökítéséhez megtanulunk egy vetítési modellt, amely segítségével a természetes kérdéseket a leghasonlóbb természetellenes kérdésekbe térképezhetjük, amelyeknél az elemző jól működik. Természetes edzési adatok nélkül vetítési modellünk kiváló minőségű akciósorozatokat biztosít a CQA feladathoz. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a kizárólag szintetikus adatokkal képzett minőségbiztosítási modell felülmúlja az emberi jelöléssel ellátott adatokra képzett legkorszerűbb megfelelőjét.', 'ka': 'Name ამ დავალების მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრამეტრის ინტერპექტირების ფრამეტზე დაბაზიან, სადაც პროგრამეტრი კითხვას არსებული მოქმედების წერტილში და ინტერპექტირების შემდეგ ამ მოქმედებები წერტილი ტექსტი ეფექტიური CQA მოდელის შესწავლობა უნდა ადამიანის ანოტირებული მონაცემების დიდი რაოდენობები, რომლებიც არსებულების განსაზღვრებული მოქმედების მსოფლიოდ შექმნა, რომელიც დროს გამოყენება და ძ ამ დოგუმენში, ჩვენ მივიღეთ გამოსახულება, რომელიც უფრო საკმაოდ გამოსახულებელი პროგრამეტრის (პანუზერი) სწავლების გამოსახულებას, რომელიც პროგრამეტურად ადამიანის შექმნა კ ჩვენ პირველად შევქმნით სინტეტიკური (კითხვა, მოქმედების წერტილება) ზოგილები მონაცემების генენერატორის გამოყენება და სემონტიკური პანსერატორის გამოყენება, რომელიც სინტეტიკური განსხვავებას, როდესაც ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნაირადი კითხვებისთვის, ჩვენ ვისწავლით პროექციის მოდელი, რომელიც მივიღეთ ნაირადი კითხვებისთვის, რომელსაც პროექციის მუშაობ ჩვენი პროგექციის მოდელი უფრო კარგად მოქმედება CQA დავალებისთვის. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენებს, რომ QA მოდელი სკლექციურად სინტეტიური მონაცემებით უფრო გავაკეთება თავის სინტეტიური მონაცემებით, რომელიც ადამიანის მონაცემებით', 'it': "La risposta complessa alle domande (CQA) su testo grezzo è un compito impegnativo. Un approccio prominente a questo compito è basato sul framework programmatore-interprete, dove il programmatore mappa la domanda in una sequenza di azioni di ragionamento e l'interprete esegue queste azioni sul testo grezzo. L'apprendimento di un modello CQA efficace richiede grandi quantità di dati annotati dall'uomo, costituiti dalla sequenza di azioni di ragionamento di base-verità, che richiede tempo e costoso da raccogliere su larga scala. In questo articolo, affrontiamo la sfida di imparare un programmatore di alta qualità (parser) proiettando domande naturali generate dall'uomo in domande innaturali generate dalla macchina che sono più convenienti da analizzare. In primo luogo generiamo coppie sintetiche (domanda, sequenza d'azione) da un generatore di dati, e addestriamo un parser semantico che associa domande sintetiche alle loro sequenze d'azione corrispondenti. Per catturare la diversità quando applicata alle domande naturali, impariamo un modello di proiezione per mappare le domande naturali nelle loro domande innaturali più simili per le quali il parser può funzionare bene. Senza alcun dato di allenamento naturale, il nostro modello di proiezione fornisce sequenze di azione di alta qualità per il compito CQA. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il modello di QA addestrato esclusivamente con dati sintetici supera la sua controparte all'avanguardia addestrata su dati etichettati con l'uomo.", 'kk': 'Мәтін үстінде толық сұрақ (CQA) жауап беру - әсер ететін тапсырма. Бұл тапсырманың маңызды тәсілі бағдарламалық интерпретердің қоршауына негізделген. Бағдарламалық тапсырманы түсіндіру әрекеттерінің ретінде картасын және интерпретердің бұл әрекеттерін жазылған мәтінде орында Эффективті CQA үлгісін үйрену үшін адамдардың белгіленген деректерінің үлкен сандарын талап етеді. Бұл масштабтағы үлкен уақыт пайдалану және жинақтау үшін көп сандары. Бұл қағазда, біз табиғи адамның құрылған сұрақтарын табиғи машина құрылмаған сұрақтарды талдау үшін көңіл сапатты бағдарламаларды оқыту үшін көңіл сапатты сұрақтарды өзгертеміз. Біз біріншіден деректер генераторымен синтетикалық (сұрақ, әрекеттер ретінде) екі жасап, синтетикалық сұрақтарды сәйкесті әрекеттердің ретінде сәйкесті синтетикалық сұрақтарды қосып беретін семанти Табиғи сұрақтарына қолданылатын айырмашылығын түсіндіру үшін, біз табиғи сұрақтарын өзінің ең ұқсас емес сұрақтарына картасын үйренеміз. Бұл табиғи оқыту деректері болмаса, өзіміздің проектация үлгісіміз CQA тапсырмасының көп сапатты әрекеттердің әдістерін көрсетеді. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері QA моделі синтетикалық деректермен тек оқылған деп көрсетеді, оның адамдар жарлық деректерінде оқылған суреттің күйінің күйіне жеткізілді.', 'lt': 'Sudėtingas atsakymas į klausimus (CQA) dėl žaliavinio teksto yra sudėtinga užduotis. Pagrindinis požiūris į šią užduotį grindžiamas programuotojo ir vertėjo žodžiu sistema, kurioje programuotojas šį klausimą apibūdina į pagrįstų veiksmų seką, o vertėjas tuomet vykdo šiuos veiksmus pagal žaliavinį tekstą. Naudojant veiksmingą CQA model į reikalingas didelis kiekis žmonėms užrašytų duomenų, sudarytų iš esminės pagrįstumo veiksmų sekos, kuri yra daug laiko ir brangi rinkti mastu. In this paper, we address the challenge of learning a high-quality programmer (parser) by projecting natural human-generated questions into unnatural machine-generated questions which are more convenient to parse.  Pirmiausia sukuriame sintetines (klausimų, veiksmų sekos) poros iš duomenų generatoriaus ir mokome semantinį analizatorių, kuris sujungia sintetinius klausimus su atitinkamomis veiksmų sekomis. Siekiant suvokti įvairovę, kai ji taikoma gamtiniams klausimams, mes išmokome projektavimo model į, pagal kurį gamtiniai klausimai būtų paveikslinti panašiais nenaturiniais klausimais, kuriems analizatorius gali gerai dirbti. Be jokių gamtinių mokymo duomenų, mūsų projektavimo modelis suteikia aukštos kokybės veiksmų sekas CQA užduotims atlikti. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad QA modelis, apmokytas išimtinai su sintetiniais duomenimis, yra didesnis už jo naujausią priešingą, apmokytą žmogaus ženklinimu pažymėtais duomenimis.', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan kompleks (CQA) atas teks mentah adalah tugas yang mencabar. Pendekatan terkemuka untuk tugas ini berdasarkan kerangka pemrogram-interpreter, di mana pemrogram petakan soalan ke dalam urutan tindakan alasan dan interpreter kemudian melaksanakan tindakan ini pada teks mentah. Mempelajari model CQA yang berkesan memerlukan jumlah besar data yang dicatat oleh manusia, yang terdiri dari urutan dasar-kebenaran tindakan alasan, yang memakan masa dan mahal untuk dikumpulkan pada skala. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi cabaran untuk belajar pemrogram kualiti tinggi (penghurai) dengan memprojek soalan alam yang dihasilkan oleh manusia ke dalam soalan yang dihasilkan oleh mesin yang tidak biasa yang lebih sesuai untuk dihasilkan. Kami pertama-tama menghasilkan pasangan sintetik (soalan, urutan tindakan) oleh generator data, dan melatih penghurai semantik yang mengaitkan soalan sintetik dengan urutan tindakan yang sepadan. Untuk menangkap kebanyakan apabila dilaksanakan kepada soalan semulajadi, kita belajar model projeksi untuk memetakan soalan semulajadi ke dalam soalan yang paling tidak semulajadi yang mana penghurai boleh bekerja dengan baik. Tanpa data latihan semulajadi, model projeksi kami menyediakan urutan tindakan kualiti tinggi untuk tugas CQA. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model QA dilatih secara eksklusif dengan data sintetik melampaui peringkat-peringkat kontrak dilatih pada data-label manusia.', 'mk': 'Комплексниот одговор на прашања (CQA) над суровиот текст е предизвикувачка задача. Позначен пристап до оваа задача се базира на рамката за програмери-интерпретачи, каде програмерите го мапираат прашањето во секвенца на размислувачки дејства, а потоа интерпретачот ги извршува овие дејства на суровиот текст. За да се научи ефикасен модел на CQA се потребни големи количини на податоци кои се анотирани од човек, кои се состојат од секвенцијата на природна вистина на размислувачките дејства, која потрошува време и е скапа за собирање на скала. Во овој весник, го решаваме предизвикот на учењето на висококвалитетен програмер (анализатор) со проектирање на природни прашања генерирани од човекот во неприродни прашања генерирани од машина кои се поудобни за анализа. Прво генерираме синтетички парови (прашање, акциска секвенца) од генератор на податоци, и обучуваме семантичен анализатор кој ги поврзува синтетичките прашања со нивните соодветни акциски секвенци. За да ја зафатиме различноста кога се применуваат на природните прашања, научиме проекциски модел за да ги мапираме природните прашања во нивните најслични неприродни прашања за кои анализаторот може да функционира добро. Без никакви природни податоци за обука, нашиот проекциски модел обезбедува висококвалитетни акциони секвенции за задачата CQA. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека моделот QA обучен ексклузивно со синтетички податоци го надминува својот најнов колега обучен на податоци означени со човек.', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet kumplessi (CQA) fuq it-test mhux ipproċessat hija kompitu ta’ sfida. Approċċ prominenti għal dan il-kompitu huwa bbażat fuq il-qafas tal-programmator-interpretu, fejn il-programmator jimmappa l-kwistjoni f’sekwenza ta’ azzjonijiet ta’ raġunament u l-interpretu mbagħad jeżegwixxi dawn l-azzjonijiet fuq it-test mhux ipproċessat. It-tagħlim ta’ mudell effettiv ta’ CQA jeħtieġ ammonti kbar ta’ dejta annotata mill-bniedem, li jikkonsistu mis-sekwenza tal-ground-truth ta’ azzjonijiet ta’ raġunament, li jieħdu ħafna żmien u jiswew ħafna biex jinġabru fuq skala. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw l-isfida tat-tagħlim ta’ programmator ta’ kwalità għolja (analizzatur) billi nipproġettaw mistoqsijiet naturali ġġenerati mill-bniedem f’mistoqsijiet mhux naturali ġġenerati mill-magni li huma aktar konvenjenti għall-analizzazzjoni. L-ewwel nett niġġeneraw pari sintetiċi (mistoqsija, sekwenza ta’ azzjoni) minn ġeneratur tad-dejta, u nħarrġu analizzatur semantiku li jassoċja mistoqsijiet sintetiċi mas-sekwenzi ta’ azzjoni korrispondenti tagħhom. Biex inqabdu d-diversità meta applikati għal mistoqsijiet naturali, nitgħallmu mudell ta’ projezzjoni biex inmappjaw mistoqsijiet naturali fl-aktar mistoqsijiet mhux naturali simili li għalihom il-analizzatur jista’ jaħdem tajjeb. Mingħajr dejta ta’ taħriġ naturali, il-mudell ta’ projezzjoni tagħna jipprovdi sekwenzi ta’ azzjoni ta’ kwalità għolja għall-kompitu CQA. Experimental results show that the QA model trained exclusively with synthetic data outperforms its state-of-the-art counterpart trained on human-labeled data.', 'ml': 'ചുരുക്കുന്ന പദാവലിയുടെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം (സിക്യൂഎ) ചോദ്യം വിലാസകരമായ ഒരു ജോലിയാണ്. ഈ ജോലിയിലേക്കുള്ള ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സമ്മാനം പ്രോഗ്രാമീറ്റര്\u200d വ്യാഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. അവിടെ പ്രോഗ്രാമി സിക്യൂഎ മോഡല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രശ്നം വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യസന്ധമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉള്ള വി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സ്വാഭാവികമായ പ്രോഗ്രാമീറ്റര്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാലം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പാര്\u200dസ് ച ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഡേറ്റാ ജെനററിയാല്\u200d സിന്തെറ്റിക്ക് ജോടികളെ (ചോദ്യം, പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനം) സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ പൊര സ്വാഭാവികമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രോജക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പഠിക്കു സ്വാഭാവികമായ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ, നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗ്രേഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d സിക്യൂഎയുടെ ജോലിക്ക് ഉയര പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ക്യൂഎ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകം പരിശീലിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നത് മാത്രമാണ് സിന്തിറ്റിക്ക് ഡേ', 'no': 'Komplett spørsmål (CQA) over råtekst er eit vanskeleg oppgåve. Eit viktig tilnærming til denne oppgåva er basert på programmer-interpreteringsrammeverket, der programmeren karterer spørsmålet inn i ei rekkjefølgje av undersøkingshandlingar og tolkaren køyrer desse handlingane på råteksten. Læring av ein effektiv CQA-modell krev stor menneskelige data, som inneheld av bakgrunnsannhetsrekkjefølgja av grunnsannhetshandlingar, som er tidsbruka og dykka for å samla i skala. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta utfordringa til å lære eit høg kvalitetsprogrammer (tolkar) ved å prosjektera naturleg menneskeoppretta spørsmål til uavhengige maskineoppretta spørsmål som er meir vanleg for å tolka. Vi lagar først syntetiske (spørsmål, handlingsekvens) par av ein data generator, og treng ein semantisk tolkar som tilknyttar syntetiske spørsmål med dei tilsvarande handlingsekvensane. For å henta ulikheten når det er brukt til naturleg spørsmål, lærer vi eit projeksjonsmodul for å kartera naturleg spørsmål i dei mest liknande ukjente spørsmålene som tolkaren kan arbeide godt for. Utan noen naturlege treningsdata, vil vårt projeksjonsmodul gje høg kvalitetsekvensar for CQA-oppgåva. Eksperimentale resultat viser at QA-modellen trent eksklusivt med syntetiske data utfører sin tilstand til kunsten som treng på menneskelige data.', 'mn': 'Хариулт (CQA) хэлбэрийн текст дээр төвөгтэй асуулт бол шаардлагатай ажил. Энэ ажил дээрх хамгийн чухал арга барилга нь програмчлагчдын тольцоологчийн хэлбэрээр суурилсан. Програмчлагчдын асуултыг ойлгох үйл явдлын дараа дараа нь энэ үйл явдлыг суурилуулдаг. Эффективны CQA загварын загварыг сурах нь хүн төрөлхтний анзаарсан мэдээллийн маш их хэмжээний мэдээллийг хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь ойлголтын үнэний дарааллаас бүрддэг. Энэ нь цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэж, хугацаанд үнэтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өндөр чадвартай програмчийг сурах асуудлыг тайлбарлаж байгалийн хүн төрөлхтний үүсгэсэн асуултуудыг байгалийн машин үүсгэдэг асуултууд болгон хуваалцах нь илүү удирдлагатай. Эхлээд бид өгөгдлийн генераторын синтетик (асуулт, үйл ажиллагааны дарааллаар) хоёрыг бүтээж, синтетик асуултуудыг тэдний харьцуулсан үйл ажиллагааны дарааллаар холбоотой семантик хуваарч суралцаж байна Байгалийн асуултуудад хэрэглэгдэхэд бид байгалийн асуултуудад байгалийн асуултуудаа газрын зураг зурах загварын загвар суралцдаг. Байгалийн суралцах өгөгдлийн аль ч байдаггүй, бидний төсөөлөл загвар нь CQA ажлын өндөр чанартай үйл ажиллагааны дарааллыг хангадаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд QA загвар нь хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн хувьд сургалтын байр сургалтыг багшлах боломжтой байдаг.', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź na złożone pytania (CQA) nad tekstem surowym jest trudnym zadaniem. Wyraźne podejście do tego zadania opiera się na frameworku programista-interpretera, w którym programista mapuje pytanie na sekwencję działań rozumowania, a interpreter wykonuje je na tekście surowym. Nauka skutecznego modelu CQA wymaga dużych ilości danych opisanych przez człowieka, składających się z sekwencji podstawowych działań rozumowania, które są czasochłonne i kosztowne w zbieraniu na skalę. W niniejszym artykule podejmujemy wyzwanie nauki wysokiej jakości programisty (parser) poprzez projektowanie naturalnych pytań generowanych przez człowieka w nienaturalne pytania generowane maszynowo, które są wygodniejsze do analizy. Najpierw generujemy pary syntetyczne (pytania, sekwencje akcji) przez generator danych i szkolimy parser semantyczny, który kojarzy pytania syntetyczne z odpowiednimi sekwencjami działania. Aby uchwycić różnorodność stosowaną do pytań naturalnych, uczymy się modelu projekcji, aby mapować naturalne pytania w ich najbardziej podobne nienaturalne pytania, dla których parser może dobrze pracować. Bez żadnych naturalnych danych treningowych, nasz model projekcji zapewnia wysokiej jakości sekwencje akcji do zadania CQA. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że model QA trenowany wyłącznie z danymi syntetycznymi przewyższa najnowocześniejszy odpowiednik szkolony na danych oznaczonych przez człowieka.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul complex la întrebări (CQA) peste text brut este o sarcină dificilă. O abordare proeminentă a acestei sarcini se bazează pe cadrul programator-interpret, unde programatorul mapează întrebarea într-o secvență de acțiuni de raționament, iar interpretul execută apoi aceste acțiuni pe textul brut. Învățarea unui model eficient de CQA necesită cantități mari de date adnotate de om, constând în secvența de bază-adevăr a acțiunilor de raționament, care este consumatoare de timp și costisitoare de colectat la scară. În această lucrare, abordăm provocarea de a învăța un programator de înaltă calitate (parser) proiectând întrebări naturale generate de om în întrebări nenaturale generate de mașină, care sunt mai convenabile de analizat. În primul rând generăm perechi sintetice (întrebări, secvențe de acțiune) de către un generator de date și antrenăm un parser semantic care asociază întrebări sintetice cu secvențele lor de acțiune corespunzătoare. Pentru a surprinde diversitatea atunci când este aplicată întrebărilor naturale, învățăm un model de proiecție pentru a cartografia întrebările naturale în cele mai similare întrebări nenaturale pentru care parserul poate lucra bine. Fără date naturale de antrenament, modelul nostru de proiecție oferă secvențe de acțiune de înaltă calitate pentru sarcina CQA. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul QA instruit exclusiv cu date sintetice depășește omologul său de ultimă generație instruit pe date etichetate cu om.', 'so': "jawaabta su'aalaha Complex (CQA) oo ku qoran text raw waa shaqo dhibaataysan. Shaqadan waxaa ku saleysan qorshaha turjubaanka, kaas oo barnaamijku ku sawiraa su'aalka si ay u noqoto falimaha sababta ah iyo turjubaanka kadibna uu sameeyo falimahaas ku qoran qoraalka saxda ah. Tusaale faa’iido ah oo CQA waxaa loo baahan yahay macluumaad tiro badan oo dadka la caddeeyey, kaas oo ka mid ah daboolka runta ah, kaas oo ah isticmaalka wakhtiga iyo kharashka la soo ururiyo. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku sheekaynaynaa dhibaatada barashada barnaamijka sare (Parsar) oo lagu soo bandhigayo su'aalo dabiicadda ah oo dabeecada ah oo lagu sameeyo su'aalo aan caadi aheyn, kuwaas oo ugu haboon inay baaritaan. Marka ugu horeysa waxaan soo bandhignaa synthetic (su'aal, action sequence) labo ah oo dhashay macluumaad, waxaynu tababarinaynaa semantic Parser oo la wadata su'aalaha synthetic la xiriira xiliga waxqabadka. Si aan u qabsado kala duduwan marka lagu codsado su'aalaha asalka ah, waxaynu barnaa tusaale la soo qorayo in lagu karo su'aalaha asalka ah oo u eg su'aalaha aan la mid ahayn, taas oo ay ku shaqeyn karto si wanaagsan. Lagama jirin macluumaad waxbarasho dabiicadda ah, qaababkayaga wax soo saarista ayaa u diyaarinaya shaqo-takhasuska sare ee CQA. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaabka QA lagu tababariyey oo kali ka mid ah macluumaadka synthetic ayaa soo saara xaaladda farshaxanka lagu baray macluumaadka dadka-labeled.", 'sv': 'Komplex frågeställning (CQA) över obehandlad text är en utmanande uppgift. Ett framträdande tillvägagångssätt för denna uppgift är baserat på ramverket programmerare-tolk, där programmeraren kartlägger frågan i en sekvens av resonemang åtgärder och tolken sedan utför dessa åtgärder på råtexten. Att lära sig en effektiv CQA-modell kräver stora mängder mänskligt kommenterade data, bestående av grundsanningssekvensen av resonemang åtgärder, vilket är tidskrävande och dyrt att samla in i stor skala. I denna uppsats tar vi upp utmaningen att lära sig en högkvalitativ programmerare (parser) genom att projicera naturliga människogenererade frågor till onaturliga maskingenererade frågor som är bekvämare att tolka. Först genererar vi syntetiska (fråga, åtgärdssekvens) par av en datagenerator, och tränar en semantisk parser som associerar syntetiska frågor med deras motsvarande åtgärdssekvenser. För att fånga mångfalden när den tillämpas på naturliga frågor lär vi oss en projektionsmodell för att kartlägga naturliga frågor till deras mest likartade onaturliga frågor som tolkaren kan fungera bra för. Utan naturliga träningsdata ger vår projektionsmodell högkvalitativa åtgärdssekvenser för CQA-uppgiften. Experimentella resultat visar att QA-modellen som tränats uteslutande med syntetiska data överträffar sin toppmoderna motsvarighet utbildad på humanmärkta data.', 'sr': 'Kompleks odgovor na pitanje (CQA) na sirov tekst je izazovni zadatak. Veliki pristup ovom zadatku je baziran na okviru programera interpreter a, gde programer mapira pitanje u sekvencu razumnih akcija, a interpreter onda izvršava ove akcije na sirovom tekstu. Učenje učinkovitog modela CQA zahteva velike količine podataka o ljudima, koji su sastavljeni od sekvence razumnih akcija, koja je potrošnja vremena i skupa za skupljanje na skali. U ovom papiru, obraćamo se izazovu učenja visokokvalitetnog programera (parser a) projekcijom prirodnih pitanja, proizvedenih ljudima, u neprirodna pitanja, proizvedena od mašine, koje su prikladnije za analizu. Prvo stvaramo sintetičke pare (pitanje, akcijska sekvencija) generatorom podataka, i treniramo semantičkog analizatora koji povezuje sintetičke pitanja sa njihovim odgovarajućim akcijskim sekvencijama. Da bi uhvatili raznolikost kada se primjenjuje na prirodna pitanja, naučili smo model projekcije da mapiramo prirodna pitanja u njihova najsličnija neprirodna pitanja za koje analizator može dobro raditi. Bez bilo kakvih prirodnih podataka o obuci, naš model projekcije pruža visoke kvalitetne sekvence akcije za zadatak CQA. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da model QA obučen ekskluzivno sa sintetičkim podacima iznosi svoj državni kolega umjetnosti obučen na podacima označenim ljudima.', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් (CQA) වර්ණ පාළුවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මේ වැඩේට ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dරේෂකය-අන්වාර්ථකය ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයක් විදියට, ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගකය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ප්\u200dරභාවිත CQA මොඩල් එකක් ඉගෙන ගන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි, මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරභාවිත දත්ත ගොඩක් ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ප්\u200dරභාවිත සත්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාවක්  මේ පැත්තට, අපි උත්සත්වයක් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න අවශ්\u200dයය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙක් (විකල්පකයෙක්) ස්වභාවික මිනිස් නිර්මාණය ක අපි මුලින්ම සංවිධානය (ප්\u200dරශ්න, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරමය) ජාතිකයෙක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරශ්න සමඟ සංව ස්වභාවික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අල්ලගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ ස්වභාවික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ස්වභාවික ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණාත්මක දත්ත නැතුව, අපේ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණාත්මක මදුල් CQA වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් උත්සත්වක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ QA මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සින්ටෙටික් දත්ත වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා', 'ta': 'Name இந்த செயலுக்கு ஒரு பெரிய செயல் நிரலாளர்- மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர் சட்டத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, அதில் நிரல் கேள்வியை குறிப்பிடும் செயல்கள் மற்றும ஒரு விருப்பமான சிகியூஏ மாதிரி கற்றுக்கொள்வது மனிதன் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் பெரிய அளவு தேவைப்படுகிறது, நிலத்தில் உண்மையான செயல்களின் வரிசையில் உள்ளது, அது  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு உயர்தரமான நிரல் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சவால்க்கத்தை விளக்குகிறோம் இயற்கையான மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகளை வழங் முதலில் நாம் ஒரு தரவு உருவாக்கியினால் கூட்டிணைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம் (கேள்வி, செயல் வரிசையில்) ஜோடிகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம், மற்றும் ஒரு  இயல்பான கேள்விகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள பல்வேறுபாடுகளை பிடிக்க, நாம் ஒரு திட்டப்பணி முறைமையை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம், அவர்கள எந்த இயற்கையான பயிற்சி தரவும் இல்லாமல், எங்கள் திட்டப்பணி மாதிரி சிகியூஏ பணிக்கு உயர்தரமான செயல் வரிசைகளை வழ சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது QA மாதிரி ஒருங்கிணைப்பு தகவலுடன் மட்டுமே பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பது மனித குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல', 'ur': 'پیچیدہ سؤال جواب دینے (CQA) کرا ٹیکسٹ پر ایک چالٹ کام ہے. اس کام کی ایک بڑی طریقہ پرروگر-تربیٹر فرم پر بنیاد ہے جہاں پروگرامر نے سؤال کو منطقی اقدامات کے سطح میں نقشه بنایا ہے اور تربیٹر نے اس کے بعد ان اقدامات کو روئے متن پر چلایا ہے. سفارشی CQA موڈل کی تعلیم کی ضرورت ہے کہ انسان کے ذریعہ مضبوط دکھانے کی بہت سی اندازے ہیں، جو مفصلات کی سفارش کی سفارش میں ہے، جو ساعت مصرف کرتا ہے اور مزید مصرف کرتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک عالی کیفیت پروگرامر (پارچر) کی تعلیم کی چال سے مشورہ کریں گے، اس کے ذریعہ سے طبیعی انسان کے پیدا کئے ہوئے سوالات کو ناطبیعی ماشین کے پیدا کئے ہوئے سوالات میں پروژیٹ کریں جو پارچر کے لئے زیادہ منا ہم پہلی بار ایک ڈیٹا جینراٹر کے ذریعے سینٹیسی (سوال، اقدام) جوڑے پیدا کرتے ہیں، اور ایک سیمنٹی پارچر کو ترینس کرتے ہیں جو ان کے مطابق اقدام کے سفارش سے سینٹیسی سوالوں کو شریک کرتا ہے۔ جب طبیعی سؤال کے لئے کاربرد ہوتے ہیں تو ہم ایک پروژیکशन موڈل سکتے ہیں کہ طبیعی سؤال کو ان کے بہترین مشابہ غیرطبیعی سؤال میں نقشه بنا سکتے ہیں جن کے لئے پارچر بہتر کام کرسکتا ہے. اس کے بغیر کوئی طبیعی تطارین ڈیٹا، ہماری پروژیکشن موڈل CQA کے کام کے لئے بہت سی کیفیت کے اقدام سطاریوں کو پیش کرتا ہے. آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ QA موڈل کو صرف سینٹیسی ڈیٹے کے ساتھ آموزش کی جاتی ہے اس کی حالت کی آهنت کی کنٹرپارت کو انسان کے لابلیٹ ڈیٹے پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu vazifa uchun katta usul dastur tarjima qiluvchi freymi asosida, bu yerda dastur muammolarning sabablar amallar va tarjima qiladigan tarjima va bu amallarni raqam matnni bajaradi. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz yuqori darajada o'rganish dasturini o'rganish (paras) rivojlanishimiz muammolarini asosiy qo'shilgan savollarni o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Bu savollarni o'zgartirish uchun juda qismi. Birinchi marta biz maʼlumot generator bilan bir nechta synthetik (savol, amal chegarasi) yaratishiz va semantik parametrlarini o'rganamiz va ularning mos keladigan amalning chegaralari bilan birga bog'liq maslahatlarni birlashtiramiz. Natalik savollarni qo'llashda turli so'zlarni olish uchun, biz asosiy savollarni qarash modelini o'rganamiz. Bu uchun parametrlar yaxshi ishlaydi mumkin. Fayl taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar yo'q, projektsiya modelimiz CQA vazifa uchun yuqori taʼminlovchi amal seksiyatlarini yaratadi. Name", 'vi': 'Trả lời câu hỏi phức tạp (COQA) với văn bản thô là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn. Một phương pháp quan trọng cho nhiệm vụ này là dựa trên cơ sở lập trình viên giải thích, nơi lập trình đã vẽ câu hỏi thành một chuỗi các hành động lập trình và người giải thích thực hiện những hành động này trên bản gốc. Học một mô hình CQA hiệu quả đòi hỏi một lượng lớn dữ liệu được ghi chú con người, bao gồm chuỗi trình lý lẽ chân đất của các hành động lập luận, mà đòi hỏi thời gian và tốn kém để thu thập theo quy mô. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết thử thách học một lập trình viên chất lượng cao, bằng cách đưa câu hỏi sinh ra từ con người vào các câu hỏi máy tạo ra không tự nhiên, mà sẽ dễ phân tích hơn. Đầu tiên chúng ta tạo ra các cặp nhân tạo (câu hỏi, chuỗi hành động) của một máy phát điện dữ liệu, và huấn luyện một phân tích cơ bản liên kết các câu hỏi tổng hợp với các chuỗi hành động tương ứng. Để nắm bắt sự đa dạng khi áp dụng vào các câu hỏi tự nhiên, chúng ta học một mô hình hình hình dự đoán để vẽ các câu hỏi tự nhiên vào những câu hỏi tương tự nhau, mà vị phân tích có thể làm việc tốt. Không có dữ liệu đào tạo tự nhiên, mô hình cung cấp các dãy hành động chất lượng cao cho nhiệm vụ CQA. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình QA được đào tạo độc nhất với dữ liệu tổng hợp vượt qua thực hiện bản tương tác cao nhất được rèn luyện trên các dữ liệu được đánh dấu người.', 'bg': 'Сложното отговаряне на въпроси върху суров текст е предизвикателна задача. Известен подход към тази задача се основава на рамката програмист-интерпретатор, където програмистът картографира въпроса в последователност от действия на разсъждение и интерпретаторът след това изпълнява тези действия върху суровия текст. Научаването на ефективен модел изисква големи количества човешки анотирани данни, състоящи се от последователност от действия на разсъждение, която отнема време и е скъпа за събиране в мащаб. В тази статия ние разглеждаме предизвикателството да научим висококачествен програмист (анализатор), като проектираме естествени човешки въпроси в неестествени машинно генерирани въпроси, които са по-удобни за анализ. Първо генерираме синтетични двойки (въпрос, последователност на действие) чрез генератор на данни и обучаваме семантичен анализатор, който свързва синтетичните въпроси със съответните последователности на действие. За да уловим разнообразието, когато се прилага към естествени въпроси, ние научаваме модел на проекция, за да картографираме естествените въпроси в техните най-подобни неестествени въпроси, за които анализаторът може да работи добре. Без никакви естествени данни за тренировка, нашият модел на проекция осигурява висококачествени последователности на действие за задачата. Експерименталните резултати показват, че моделът за контрол на качеството, обучен изключително със синтетични данни, превъзхожда най-съвременния си колега, обучен върху данни, маркирани от човека.', 'nl': 'Complexe vragen beantwoorden (CQA) boven ruwe tekst is een uitdagende taak. Een prominente benadering van deze taak is gebaseerd op het programmer-interpreter framework, waarbij de programmeur de vraag in een reeks redeneeracties in kaart brengt en de interpreter deze acties vervolgens uitvoert op de ruwe tekst. Het leren van een effectief CQA-model vereist grote hoeveelheden door mensen geannoteerde gegevens, bestaande uit de grond-waarheidssequentie van redeneeracties, die tijdrovend en duur is om op schaal te verzamelen. In dit artikel gaan we de uitdaging aan om een hoogwaardige programmeur (parser) te leren door natuurlijke door mensen gegenereerde vragen te projecteren in onnatuurlijke, machine-gegenereerde vragen die gemakkelijker te parsen zijn. We genereren eerst synthetische (vraag, actiereeks) paren door een gegevensgenerator, en trainen een semantische parser die synthetische vragen associeert met hun overeenkomstige actiereeksen. Om de diversiteit bij toepassing op natuurlijke vragen vast te leggen, leren we een projectiemodel om natuurlijke vragen in kaart te brengen in hun meest vergelijkbare onnatuurlijke vragen waarvoor de parser goed kan werken. Zonder natuurlijke trainingsgegevens levert ons projectiemodel hoogwaardige actiesequenties voor de CQA-taak. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het QA-model dat uitsluitend is getraind met synthetische gegevens beter presteert dan zijn state-of-the-art tegenhanger die is getraind op menselijke gelabelde gegevens.', 'da': 'Kompleks spørgsmål besvarelse (CQA) over rå tekst er en udfordrende opgave. En fremtrædende tilgang til denne opgave er baseret på programmør-tolk framework, hvor programmøren kortlægger spørgsmålet i en række ræsonnement handlinger, og tolken derefter udfører disse handlinger på råteksten. At lære en effektiv CQA-model kræver store mængder menneskelige-annoterede data, der består af grundsandhedssekvensen af ræsonnement handlinger, som er tidskrævende og dyrt at indsamle i skala. I denne artikel tager vi fat på udfordringen ved at lære en programmør af høj kvalitet (parser) ved at projicere naturlige menneskeskabte spørgsmål i unaturlige maskingenererede spørgsmål, som er mere bekvemme at fortolke. Vi genererer først syntetiske (spørgsmål, handlingssekvens) par af en datagenerator, og træner en semantisk fortolker, der associerer syntetiske spørgsmål med deres tilsvarende handlingssekvenser. For at fange mangfoldigheden, når den anvendes på naturlige spørgsmål, lærer vi en projektionsmodel til at kortlægge naturlige spørgsmål i deres mest lignende unaturlige spørgsmål, som fortolkeren kan fungere godt til. Uden naturlige træningsdata giver vores projektionsmodel action sekvenser af høj kvalitet til CQA-opgaven. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at QA-modellen, der udelukkende er uddannet med syntetiske data, overgår sin state-of-the-art modpart, der er uddannet på menneskeligt mærkede data.', 'de': 'Komplexe Fragebeantwortung (CQA) über Rohtext ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe. Ein prominenter Ansatz für diese Aufgabe basiert auf dem Programmierer-Interpreter-Framework, bei dem der Programmierer die Frage in eine Abfolge von Argumentationsaktionen abbildet und der Interpreter diese Aktionen dann auf dem Rohtext ausführt. Das Erlernen eines effektiven CQA-Modells erfordert große Mengen von human-annotierten Daten, bestehend aus der Ground-Truth-Sequenz von Argumentationsaktionen, die zeitaufwändig und kostspielig ist, um diese im Maßstab zu erfassen. In diesem Beitrag adressieren wir die Herausforderung, einen hochwertigen Programmierer (Parser) zu lernen, indem wir natürliche, vom Menschen generierte Fragen in unnatürliche maschinell generierte Fragen projizieren, die bequemer zu parsen sind. Zunächst generieren wir synthetische Paare (Frage, Aktionssequenz) durch einen Datengenerator und trainieren einen semantischen Parser, der synthetische Fragen mit ihren entsprechenden Aktionssequenzen verknüpft. Um die Vielfalt bei der Anwendung auf natürliche Fragen zu erfassen, lernen wir ein Projektionsmodell, um natürliche Fragen in ihre ähnlichsten unnatürlichsten Fragen abzubilden, für die der Parser gut arbeiten kann. Ohne natürliche Trainingsdaten liefert unser Projektionsmodell hochwertige Handlungsabläufe für die CQA-Aufgabe. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das QA-Modell, das ausschließlich mit synthetischen Daten trainiert wird, sein hochmodernes Pendant übertrifft, das auf human-labeled Daten trainiert wurde.', 'hr': 'Kompleks odgovor na pitanje (CQA) na sirov tekst je izazovni zadatak. Veliki pristup ovom zadatku je temeljen na okviru programera interpreter a, gdje programer mapira pitanje u sekvencu razumnih akcija, a onda interpreter izvršava te akcije na sirovom tekstu. Učenje učinkovitog modela CQA zahtijeva velike količine podataka s ljudskim annotiranjem, sastavljajući se iz sekvence temeljnih istina razumnih akcija, što je potrošenje vremena i skupo za skupljanje na skali. U ovom papiru rješavamo izazov učenja visokokvalitetnog programera (analizatora) projektiranjem prirodnih pitanja proizvedenih ljudskim ljudima u neprirodna pitanja proizvedena od stroja koja su prikladnija za analizu. Prvo stvaramo sintetičke pare (pitanje, akcijska sekvencija) generatorom podataka i treniramo semantičkog analizatora koji povezuje sintetičke pitanja sa njihovim odgovarajućim akcijskim sekvencijama. Da bi uhvatili raznolikost kada se primjenjuje na prirodna pitanja, naučili smo model projekcije kako bi mapirali prirodna pitanja u njihova najsličnija neprirodna pitanja za koje analizator može dobro raditi. Bez bilo kakvih prirodnih podataka o obuci, naš model projekcije pruža visoke kvalitetne akcijske sekvence za zadatak CQA-a. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da model QA obučen ekskluzivno s sintetičkim podacima iznosi svoj stanje umjetničkog kolega obučen na podacima označenim ljudima.', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال پیچیده (CQA) بر روی متن خالی یک کار سخت است. یک روش بزرگی برای این کار بر اساس چهارچوب ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی برنامه\u200cدهنده است، جایی که برنامه\u200cدهنده سوال را به عنوان یک دسته\u200cی اقدامات منطقی و ترجمه\u200cدهنده این اقدامات را روی متن خالی انجام می\u200cدهد. یاد گرفتن یک مدل CQA موثر نیاز به تعداد زیادی از داده های شناسایی به انسان است که از طریق حقیقت منطقی اقدامات منطقی وجود دارد، که برای جمع کردن در مقیاس زمان سوخت و گرون است. در این کاغذ، ما چالش یادگیری یک برنامه\u200cکننده\u200cی کیفیت بالا را با پروژه\u200cسازی سوالات تولید شده\u200cی انسان طبیعی به سوالات تولید شده\u200cی ماشین ناطبیعی درباره\u200cی یادگیری می\u200cکنیم که برای تقسیم کردن مناسب\u200cتر است. اولین بار جفت\u200cهای سینتیک (سوال، ترکیب عمل) را توسط یک ژنراتور داده ایجاد می\u200cکنیم، و یک متخصص سیمانتی را آموزش می\u200cدهیم که سوال\u200cهای سینتیک را با ترکیب\u200cهای حرکت\u200cهایشان متصل می\u200cکند. برای گرفتن مختلفیت وقتی به سوالات طبیعی کاربرد می\u200cکنیم، ما یک مدل پروژه\u200cسازی را یاد می\u200cگیریم تا سوالات طبیعی را نقشه\u200cبندی کند در سوالات غیرطبیعی\u200cترین مشابه\u200cهایشان که برای آن بازیگر می\u200c بدون هیچ اطلاعات آموزش طبیعی، مدل پروژه\u200cهای ما برای کار CQA به عنوان دستورالعمل های کیفیت بالا پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل QA به طور خاص با داده\u200cهای سناتیک آموزش داده شده است که شرکت هنرش را بر روی داده\u200cهای انسان آموزش داده می\u200cشود.', 'ko': '원본 텍스트 기반의 복잡한 질의응답(CQA)은 까다로운 작업입니다.이 작업의 두드러진 방법은 프로그래머 - 해석기 프레임워크를 바탕으로 프로그래머가 문제를 일련의 추리 동작으로 비추고 해석기가 원시 텍스트에서 이 동작을 수행하는 것이다.효과적인 CQA 모델을 배우려면 대량의 인류 주석 데이터가 필요하다. 이런 데이터는 추리 행위의 기본적인 진실 서열로 구성되어 대규모 수집은 시간도 소모되고 비싸다.본고에서 우리는 자연의 인공 생성 문제를 더욱 쉽게 해석할 수 있는 비자연적인 기계 생성 문제에 투영함으로써 고품질 프로그래머(해석기)의 도전을 해결한다.우리는 먼저 데이터 생성기를 통해 합성(문제, 동작 서열) 쌍을 생성하고 의미 해석기를 훈련시켜 합성 문제와 대응하는 동작 서열을 연결시킨다.자연 문제에 응용될 때의 다양성을 포착하기 위해 우리는 투영 모형을 배워서 자연 문제를 해석기에 비추어 가장 비슷한 비자연적인 문제를 잘 처리할 수 있도록 했다.어떠한 자연 훈련 데이터도 없는 상황에서 우리의 투영 모델은 CQA 임무에 고품질의 동작 서열을 제공했다.실험 결과 합성 데이터 훈련만 사용하는 QA 모델이 인간 표기 데이터 훈련을 사용하는 최신 QA 모델보다 낫다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'sw': 'Swali la kompleksi la kujibu (CQA) kwa sababu ya ujumbe usio sawia ni kazi ya changamoto. Mtakatifu maarufu wa kazi hii unategemea mfumo wa programu-tafsiri, ambapo programu inaramani swali hilo katika mfululizo wa vitendo vya maana na tafsiri kisha huendesha vitendo hivi kwenye maandishi mabaya. Kujifunza mfumo wa CQA wenye ufanisi unahitaji kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa zinazotajwa na binadamu, ikiwa ni pamoja na mfululizo wa ukweli wa vitendo vya uchunguzi, ambavyo ni matumizi ya muda na gharama ya kukusanya kwa kiwango kikubwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia changamoto ya kujifunza mpango wa ubora wa juu (mchambuzi) kwa kutengeneza maswali yanayozaliwa asili ya binadamu kuwa maswali yasiyo na lazima yaliyotengenezwa na mashine ambayo ni rahisi zaidi ya kuendesha. Kwanza tunatengeneza muungano (swali, mfululizo wa hatua) na mtengenezaji wa taarifa, na kufundisha mjumbe wa chama kinachohusiana na maswali ya pamoja na mfululizo wa vitendo vyao. Kukamata tofauti pale wanapotumika kwenye maswali ya asili, tunajifunza muundo wa mradi wa ramani maswali ya asili katika maswali yanayofanana na mambo yasiyo ya kawaida ambayo wanachambua anaweza kufanya kazi vizuri. Bila taarifa yoyote ya mafunzo ya asili, mtindo wetu wa miradi unatoa mfululizo wa kiwango kikubwa wa kazi ya CQA. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli ya QA ilifundishwa pekee kwa taarifa za pamoja zinaonyesha hali ya aina ya wapinzani wa sanaa waliofundishwa kwenye taarifa za binadamu.', 'id': 'Jawaban pertanyaan kompleks (CQA) atas teks mentah adalah tugas yang menantang. Sebuah pendekatan terkenal untuk tugas ini berdasarkan kerangka programmer-interpreter, di mana programmer memetakan pertanyaan ke dalam urutan tindakan reasoning dan interpreter kemudian mengeksekusi tindakan ini pada teks mentah. Mempelajari model CQA yang efektif membutuhkan jumlah besar data yang dicatat oleh manusia, yang terdiri dari urutan dasar-kebenaran tindakan pemikiran, yang memakan waktu dan mahal untuk dikumpulkan pada skala. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi tantangan untuk belajar program kualitas tinggi (parser) dengan memproyeksikan pertanyaan alam yang dihasilkan manusia ke pertanyaan yang dihasilkan oleh mesin yang tidak alami yang lebih nyaman untuk dihasilkan. We firstly generate synthetic (question, action sequence) pairs by a data generator, and train a semantic parser that associates synthetic questions with their corresponding action sequences.  Untuk menangkap keagamaan ketika diterapkan pada pertanyaan alami, kita belajar sebuah model proyeksi untuk memetakan pertanyaan alami ke pertanyaan yang paling tidak alami yang serupa mereka yang mana parser dapat bekerja dengan baik. Tanpa data pelatihan alami, model proyeksi kita menyediakan urutan aksi kualitas tinggi untuk tugas CQA. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model QA dilatih eksklusif dengan data sintetis melampaui prestasi rekan-rekan state-of-the-art dilatih pada data labeled manusia.', 'af': "Kompleks vraag antwoord (CQA) oor raai teks is 'n pragtige taak. 'n prominente toegang tot hierdie taak is gebaseer op die program-interpreter raamwerk, waar die programmeer die vraag in 'n volgorde van redekende aksies en die uitlegger dan uitvoer hierdie aksies op die raai teks. Die leer van 'n effektief CQA model benodig groot hoeveelheid mens-annotateerde data, wat bestaan van die grond-waarheid volgorde van redekende aksies, wat is tyd-gebruik en koste om op skaal te versamel. In hierdie papier, word ons die uitdaging van die leer van 'n hoë-kwaliteit-programmeerder (parser) deur die projeksie van natuurlike menslike genereerde vrae in ongenatuurlike masjien genereerde vrae wat meer moontlik is om te verwerk. Ons genereer eerste sintetiese (vraag, aksie volgorde) paar deur 'n data genereerder, en trein 'n semantiese analyseer wat sintetiese vrae saamgegee met hulle ooreenstemmende aksie volgorde. Om die verskeidigheid te vang wanneer aan natuurlike vrae aangepas word, leer ons 'n projeksie model om natuurlike vrae te kaap in hul mees gelykende onnatuurlike vrae waarvan die ontwerker goed kan werk. Sonder enige natuurlike oefening data, ons projeksie model verskaf hoë-kwaliteit aksie sekwensies vir die CQA taak. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat die QA model eksklusief opgelei het met sintetiese data uitvoer sy staat-van-die-kunstenaar teen die mens-etiketeerde data.", 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve komplekse (CQA) mbi tekstin e papërpunuar është një detyrë sfiduese. Një qasje e shquar ndaj kësaj detyre është bazuar në kuadrin e programuesit-interpretuesit, ku programuesi harton pyetjen në një sekuencë veprimesh arsyetimi dhe interpretuesi pastaj ekzekuton këto veprime në tekstin e papërpunuar. Mësimi i një modeli të efektshëm CQA kërkon sasi të mëdha të dhënash të anotuara nga njerëzit, që përbëhen nga sekuenca toka-e vërteta e veprimeve arsyetimi, e cila është kohë-konsumuese dhe e shtrenjtë për të mbledhur në shkallë. Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë sfidën e mësimit të një programuesi të cilësisë së lartë (analizues) duke projektuar pyetje natyrore të gjeneruara nga njerëzit në pyetje të gjeneruara nga makina jo natyrore që janë më të përshtatshme për analizimin. We firstly generate synthetic (question, action sequence) pairs by a data generator, and train a semantic parser that associates synthetic questions with their corresponding action sequences.  Për të kapur diversitetin kur aplikohet në pyetje natyrore, ne mësojmë një model projektimi për të hartuar pyetjet natyrore në pyetjet më të ngjashme jo natyrore për të cilat analizuesi mund të funksionojë mirë. Pa asnjë të dhënë natyrore trajnimi, modeli ynë i projektimit ofron sekuenca veprimi të cilësisë së lartë për detyrën CQA. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli QA i trajnuar ekskluzivisht me të dhëna sintetike kalon homologun e tij më të lartë të trajnuar në të dhënat me etiketë njerëzore.', 'am': 'የኮምፕዩክ ጥያቄ መልስ (CQA) ከጥሩ ጽሑፍ በላይ የጥላቻ ስራ ነው፡፡ ወደዚህ ስራ የሚያደርገው ግንኙነት የፕሮግራም-ትርጉም ፍሬም የተመሠረተ ነው፤ ፕሮግራም ጥያቄውን በጥያቄ ሥራ እና ትርጓሜ እና በተርጓሚው በጥሩ ጽሑፍ ላይ የሚያደርገውን ይሠራል፡፡ የCQA ሞዴል ማምረጥ የመሬት-እውነት የመስመር ጥያቄ የሚቆጠሩ የሰው ብዙዎች አካባቢ ዳታዎች ያስፈልጋል፤ ይህ የመሬት-አካሄድ ክፍል ነው፤ በጊዜው የሚጠቀም እና በሚያከማቹ ዋጋ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ከፍተኛ ደረጃ ፕሮግራም ማውቀትን (ተማሪ) የፍጥረታዊ የሰው ፍጥረታዊ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር ጥያቄ እናስባለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ ሳንቲክን (ጥያቄ፣ የሥርዓት ቁጥር) ሁለት ዓይነቶችን በዳታ አዲስ አፈጣሪ እናስተምረዋለን፣ የሴሜንቲክ ተሳታፊ ጥያቄዎችን በመቀናቀል በሥርዓት ግንኙነት እናስተማራለን፡፡ ለፍጥረታዊ ጥያቄዎች በተጠያየቁ ጊዜ የልዩ ልዩነትን ለመያዝ፣ የፍጥረት ጥያቄዎችን ማርናለን፡፡ ባሕላዊ ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ ባይኖር የፕሮጀክት ሞዴል ለCQA ስራ ከፍተኛ ጥያቄ ሥርዓት ይሰጣል፡፡ Experimental results show that the QA model trained exclusively with synthetic data outperforms its state-of-the-art counterpart trained on human-labeled data.', 'tr': 'Dyggat metin üstünde kompleks soragy jogap (CQA) çykyş metiniň üstünde täsirli iş. Bu zada örän möhüm nusga programçi-terjimeçi çerçewçilige daýanýar, ol ýerde programçi soragy razylyk emelleriniň dizigine görkez we terjimeçi bu emelleri hat metinde eserleýär. Etkin bir CQA nusgasyny öwrenmek üçin adama ýazyklanan hasaplanýan hatlaryň uly kantlaryny gerek, ýer-dogry düzgün hereketleriň ardaýynda geçirmek üçin wagt ullanýan we çylgadyr. Bu kagyzda biz ýokary kwalitet programçisini öwrenmäge kynçylyklary çykaryp, tebigy adam döredilen soraglary tebigy masynyň döredilmegi üçin beýleki soraglary tassyklap edýäris. Biz ilkinji gezek sintetik (sorag, aksiyon sequencer) çizgini bir data jeneratörüne döredip, we sintetik soraglaryny öz nädogry aksiyon sequenceleri bilen birleştirilýän semantik tanatçylary öwredip otyrdyk. Doğal soraglara uygulanan näçeşitligini çekmek üçin, tebigy soraglaryny beýleki görnüşdürmek üçin bir projeksion modelini öwrenip, tansiýan soraglaryny beýleki ýagdaýy soraglaryny gowy işleyebilir. Haýsy tebigy okuw maglumaty bolmasa, biziň tassyklama modelimiz CQA zady üçin ýokary kaliwatly hereketlere süýtgedýär. Aramanyň netijeleri görkezýär ki, QA nusgasy syntetik maglumaty bilen diňe bilim çekilýän hasaplanyň durumynda adam bilen ýazylýan maglumaty üçin ýok edip bilýär.', 'hy': 'Խնդիչ խնդիր է պատասխանել (CQA) ոչ թմրային տեքստի վերաբերյալ: Այս խնդրի հանդեպ հայտնի մոտեցումը հիմնված է ծրագրավորող-թարգմանիչ շրջանակի վրա, որտեղ ծրագրավորողը քարտեզագրում է հարցը մտածողական գործողությունների մի հաջորդականությամբ, իսկ թարգմանիչը հետո կատարում է այս գործողությունները ոչ թ Արդյունավետ CQA մոդելի սովորելը պահանջում է մեծ քանակությամբ մարդկային գրված տվյալներ, որոնք կազմված են մտածողական գործողությունների հիմնական-ճշմարտության հաջորդականությունից, որը ժամանակ է պահանջում և թանկ է ընդլայնելու համար: In this paper, we address the challenge of learning a high-quality programmer (parser) by projecting natural human-generated questions into unnatural machine-generated questions which are more convenient to parse.  Սկզբում մենք ստեղծում ենք սինթետիկ (հարց, գործողության հաջորդականություն) զույգեր տվյալների գեներատորի կողմից, և ուսուցանում ենք սինթետիկ վերլուծում, որը կապում է սինթետիկ հարցեր իրենց համապատասխան գործողության հաջորդականությունների հետ: Բնական հարցերին օգտագործելու համար բազմազանությունը նկարագրելու համար մենք սովորում ենք պրոեկցիոն մոդել, որպեսզի քարտեզագրենք բնական հարցերը նրանց ամենատարբեր անբնական հարցերին, որոնց համար վերլուծումը կարող է լավ աշխատել: Առանց որևէ բնական ուսուցման տվյալներ, մեր պրոեկցիոն մոդելը հնարավորություն է տալիս բարձր որակի գործողության հաջորդականություններ CQA-ի համար: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ QA մոդելը, որն ուսուցանված է միայն սինթետիկ տվյալներով, արտադրում է իր ամենաբարձր համագործակցությունը, որն ուսուցանված է մարդկային նշաններով:', 'az': 'Sıfır metinin üstündə kompleks sual cevapı (CQA) çətin bir işdir. Bu işin ən böyük tərzini proqramcı-yorumlayıcı çerçevesinə dayandırır. Proqramlayıcı soruyu dəyişiklik eylemlərinin seçgisinə göndərir və yorumlayıcı bu eylemlərin səviyyə metinə istifadə edir. Etkili CQA modeli öyrənmək insan bildirilmiş məlumatların böyük dəyişikliklərinə ehtiyacı vardır. Bu, dəyişiklik vaxt istifadəsi və dəyişiklikdir. Bu kağızda, təbiətli insan yaratdığı sualları təbiətli maşın yaratdığı suallara daha faydalanır. Biz ilk dəfə məlumat generatörü ilə sintetik (sual, eyni sıralama) çift yaratdıq və sintetik sualları onların uyğun eyni sıralamalarıyla birləşdirən bir semantik parçacını təhsil edirik. Təbiətli suallara uyğunlaşdığımız zaman, təbiətli sualların ən bənzər təbiətli suallarına xəbər vermək üçün təbiətli modeli öyrənirik. Təbiətli təhsil məlumatları olmadan, projeksiyonumuz modeli CQA işləri üçün yüksək kaliteli eyni seçmələr təhsil edir. QA modeli sintetik məlumatları ilə təhsil edilən QA modelinin insan etiketli məlumatları ilə təhsil edilən şəkildə müəyyən edilməsini göstərir.', 'bn': 'ভূল লেখার প্রতি কমপ্লেক্স প্রশ্নের উত্তর (সিকিউএ) একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ। A prominent approach to this task is based on the programmer-interpreter framework, where the programmer maps the question into a sequence of reasoning actions and the interpreter then executes these actions on the raw text.  একটি কার্যকর সিকিউএ মডেল শিখার প্রয়োজন মানুষের বিশাল পরিমাণ মানুষ-বিরক্তিকর তথ্যের প্রয়োজন, যার মধ্যে মাটি সত্যিকার কাজের ক্ষেত্রে যুক্তিগত কাজ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা উচ্চমান প্রোগ্রামার (প্যারাজার) শিক্ষার চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলি প্রাকৃতিক মানুষের তৈরি করা প্রশ্নের প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে  প্রথমে আমরা একটি ডাটা জেনারেটরের দ্বারা সিন্টেটিক (প্রশ্ন, কাজের সেকেন্ড) জোড়া তৈরি করি এবং একটি সেমেন্টিক প্যারেজার প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশ প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্নের কাছে প্রয়োজন করার সময় বৈচিত্র্য ধরার জন্য আমরা একটি প্রকল্প মডেল শিখতে পারি প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্নের মানচিত্রে তাদ কোন প্রাকৃতিক প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ছাড়া আমাদের প্রকল্প মডেল সিকিউএ কাজের জন্য উচ্চমান কার্যক্রমের ক্ষেত্র পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কিউ এ মডেল শুধুমাত্র সিন্টেটিক ডাটা বাইরে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে মানুষ-লেবেলেড ডাটায় প্রশিক্', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes complexes (CQA) sobre text brut és una tasca desafiadora. A prominent approach to this task is based on the programmer-interpreter framework, where the programmer maps the question into a sequence of reasoning actions and the interpreter then executes these actions on the raw text.  Aprendre un model eficaç d'AQC requereix grans quantitats de dades anotates per a l'humà, que consisteixen en la seqüència terrestre-veritat d'accions de raonament, que consumeixen temps i costoses per recollir a escala. En aquest paper, ens ocupem del repte d'aprendre un programador d'alta qualitat (analitzador) projectant preguntes naturals generades per humans en preguntes generades per màquines que són més convenients d'analitzar. Primer generam parells sintètics (pregunta, seqüència d'acció) per un generador de dades, i entrenem un analitzador semàntic que associa preguntes sintètiques amb les seves seqüències d'acció correspondents. Per capturar la diversitat quan s'aplica a preguntes naturals, aprenem un model de projecció per mapejar preguntes naturals en les seves preguntes no naturals més similars per a les quals l'analitzador pot funcionar bé. Sense dades naturals d'entrenament, el nostre model de projecció proporciona seqüències d'acció d'alta qualitat per a la tasca CQA. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el model QA entrenat exclusivament amb dades sintètiques supera la seva homologue última entrenada en dades etiquetades per humans.", 'cs': 'Komplexní odpovědi na otázky (CQA) přes surový text je náročný úkol. Významný přístup k tomuto úkolu je založen na frameworku programátor-interpret, kde programátor mapuje otázku do sekvence uvažovacích akcí a interpret tyto akce pak provede na surovém textu. Naučení se efektivního CQA modelu vyžaduje velké množství lidských anotovaných dat, sestávajících ze základní pravdy sekvence uvažovacích akcí, která je časově náročná a nákladná na shromažďování v měřítku. V tomto článku se zabýváme výzvou učení vysoce kvalitního programátoru (parser) promítáním přirozených lidských otázek do nepřirozených strojově generovaných otázek, které jsou pohodlnější analyzovat. Nejprve generujeme syntetické (otázkové, akční sekvence) páry pomocí datového generátoru a trénujeme sémantický parser, který spojuje syntetické otázky s odpovídajícími akčními sekvencemi. Abychom zachytili rozmanitost při aplikaci na přirozené otázky, naučili jsme se projekční model mapovat přirozené otázky do jejich nejpodobnějších nepřirozených otázek, pro které může parser dobře fungovat. Bez jakýchkoli přirozených tréninkových dat poskytuje náš projekční model vysoce kvalitní akční sekvence pro úkol CQA. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že model QA trénovaný výhradně se syntetickými daty překonává svůj nejmodernější protějšek trénovaný na lidských značkách.', 'et': 'Keeruline küsimustele vastamine toorteksti üle on keeruline ülesanne. Silmapaistev lähenemisviis sellele ülesandele põhineb programmeerija-tõlgi raamistikul, kus programmeerija kaardistab küsimuse mõtlemise toimingute jadaks ja tõlg seejärel teostab need toimingud toortekstil. Tõhusa CQA mudeli õppimine nõuab suurt hulka inimmärkidega andmeid, mis koosnevad põhjalikust tõest põhjendatud tegevuste jadast, mida on aeganõudev ja ulatuslikult kulukas koguda. Käesolevas dokumendis käsitleme kvaliteetse programmeerija (parser) õppimise väljakutset, projiseerides loomulikud inimese tekitatud küsimused ebaloomulikeks masinagenereeritud küsimusteks, mida on mugavam parsida. Esiteks genereerime andmegeneraatori abil sünteetilised paarid (küsimus, toimingujada) ja treenime semantilist parserit, mis seostab sünteetilised küsimused nende vastavate toimingujadadega. Looduslikele küsimustele rakendatava mitmekesisuse jäädvustamiseks õpime projektsioonimudeli, mis kaardistab looduslikke küsimusi nende kõige sarnasematesse ebaloomulikumatesse küsimustesse, mille puhul parser hästi töötab. Ilma looduslike treeninguandmeteta pakub meie projektsioonimudel kvaliteetseid tegevusjuhiseid CQA ülesandeks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et ainult sünteetiliste andmetega koolitatud kvaliteedi tagamise mudel on parem kui inimmärgistatud andmetel koolitatud tipptasemel mudel.', 'bs': 'Kompleks odgovor na pitanje (CQA) na sirov tekst je izazovni zadatak. Veliki pristup ovom zadatku je baziran na okviru programera-interpreter a, gdje programer mapira pitanje u sekvencu razumnih akcija, a onda interpreter izvršava te akcije na sirovom tekstu. Učenje učinkovitog modela CQA zahtijeva velike količine podataka o ljudskim noterima, sastavljajući se iz sekvence temeljnih istina razumnih akcija, što je potrošenje vremena i skupo za skupljanje na skali. U ovom papiru rješavamo izazov učenja visokokvalitetnog programera (analizatora) projekcijom prirodnih pitanja stvorenih ljudskim ljudima u neprirodna pitanja stvaranja strojeva koje su prikladnije za analizu. Prvo stvaramo sintetičke pare (pitanje, akcijska sekvencija) generatorom podataka, i treniramo semantičkog analizatora koji povezuje sintetičke pitanja sa njihovim odgovarajućim akcijskim sekvencijama. Da bi uhvatili raznolikost kada se primjenjuje na prirodna pitanja, naučili smo model projekcije kako bi mapirali prirodna pitanja u njihova najsličnija neprirodna pitanja za koje analizator može dobro raditi. Bez bilo kakvih prirodnih podataka o obuci, naš model projekcije pruža visoke kvalitetne sekvence akcije za zadatak CQA-a. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da model QA obučen ekskluzivno sa sintetičkim podacima iznosi svoj državni kolega umjetnosti obučen na podacima s ljudskim etiketama.', 'fi': 'Monimutkainen kysymys vastaaminen raakatekstin yli on haastava tehtävä. Merkittävä lähestymistapa tähän tehtävään perustuu ohjelmoija-tulkki-viitekehykseen, jossa ohjelmoija kartoittaa kysymyksen päättelytoimien sarjaan ja tulkki sitten suorittaa nämä toimet raakatekstillä. Tehokkaan CQA-mallin oppiminen vaatii suuria määriä ihmisen merkitsemää dataa, joka koostuu päättelytoimien pohjatotuusjaksosta, joka on aikaa vievää ja kallista kerätä mittakaavassa. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme korkealaatuisen ohjelmoijan (parser) oppimista projisoimalla ihmisen luontaisia kysymyksiä epäluonnollisiin konegeneroituihin kysymyksiin, joita on helpompi tulkita. Ensin luomme synteettisiä (kysymys, toiminta sekvenssi) pareja datageneraattorilla ja koulutamme semanttisen jäsentäjän, joka yhdistää synteettiset kysymykset niiden vastaaviin toiminta sekvensseihin. Luontokysymyksiin sovellettaessa monimuotoisuutta opimme projisointimallin kartoittamaan luonnolliset kysymykset niiden samankaltaisimpiin epäluonnollisiin kysymyksiin, joihin jäsentäjä voi toimia hyvin. Ilman luonnollista harjoitusdataa projektiomme tarjoaa laadukkaat toimintajaksot CQA-tehtävään. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että yksinomaan synteettisellä datalla koulutettu laadunvarmistusmalli on parempi kuin ihmisen merkitsemillä tiedoilla koulutettu uusin vastine.', 'he': 'Complex question answering (CQA) over raw text is a challenging task.  הגישה הבהירה למשימה הזו מבוססת על המסגרת של מתכנן-מתרגם, שבו המתכן מפה את השאלה לתוך רצף של פעולות הגיון והמתרגם אז מבצע את הפעולות האלה על הטקסט האדום. ללמוד מודל CQA יעיל דורש כמויות גדולות של נתונים שנמצאים בני אדם, שמתכילים מהרצף האמת-האדמה של פעולות הגיון, שהיא לוקחת זמן ויקרה לאסוף בקנה מידה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמודדים עם האתגר של ללמוד מתוכנת איכות גבוהה (מעבד) על ידי פרוייקציה של שאלות טבעיות שנוצרו ע"י בני אדם לשאלות לא טבעיות שנוצרו ע"י מכונות ראשית אנחנו יוצרים זוגות סינטטיות (שאלה, רצף פעולה) על ידי גנרטור נתונים, ואימונים מעבד סמנטי שמקשר שאלות סינטטיות עם רצפי פעולה המתאימים שלהם. כדי לתפוס את המגווון כאשר נעשה שימוש על שאלות טבעיות, אנחנו לומדים מודל פרוייקציה כדי למפות שאלות טבעיות לשאלות לא טבעיות דומות ביותר שלהם ללא כל נתונים אימונים טבעיים, מודל הפרויקציה שלנו מספק רצפי פעולה איכות גבוהה למשימה CQA. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהמודל QA מאומן בלעדית עם נתונים סינטטיים מוביל את השותף הממוקדם שלו מאומן על נתונים עם תווים אנושיים.', 'sk': 'Kompleksno odgovarjanje na vprašanja (CQA) nad surovim besedilom je zahtevna naloga. Viden pristop k tej nalogi temelji na okviru programer-tolmača, kjer programer kartira vprašanje v zaporedje razmišljanja dejanj in tolmač nato izvede ta dejanja na surovem besedilu. Učenje učinkovitega modela CQA zahteva velike količine podatkov z oznakami človeka, ki so sestavljeni iz zaporedja dejanj razmišljanja o osnovni resnici, ki je dolgotrajno in drago zbirati v obsegu. V prispevku obravnavamo izziv učenja visokokakovostnega programerja (parser), tako da projiciramo naravna vprašanja, ki jih ustvari človek, v nenaravna strojno ustvarjena vprašanja, ki jih je bolj priročno razčleniti. Najprej generiramo sintetične pare (vprašanje, akcijsko zaporedje) z generatorjem podatkov in treniramo semantični razčlenjevalec, ki sintetična vprašanja povezuje z ustreznimi akcijskimi zaporedji. Da bi zajeli raznolikost pri uporabi naravnih vprašanj, se naučimo projekcijskega modela za mapiranje naravnih vprašanj v njihova najbolj podobna nenaravna vprašanja, za katera lahko razčlenjevalec dobro deluje. Brez podatkov o naravnem treningu naš projekcijski model zagotavlja visokokakovostna akcijska zaporedja za nalogo CQA. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da model kakovosti, usposobljen izključno s sintetičnimi podatki, presega najsodobnejši model, usposobljen na podlagi podatkov, označenih s človekom.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi kanggo nggunaké iki dadi saben nggunaké program-kanggo tarjamahan, nêmêr Program kang mapan kesempatan kanggo ngerusahaan aksi sing beraksi lan mbukakipun terusahaan dhéwé, njuk iso nggunaké aksi iki ning titil bantuan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness deep Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan senetik (suaraning, aksi sekondirno) lan nganggo sistem data Generer, lan ngêlêngêngêngêngêng semanti karo sistem sing nêmên senetik sing isinêt karo sistem sing dibutêrané aksi wis nguasakno. Jejaring text-tool-action Resulongé sing paling kelompok punika dipatensi barang, akeh mèdiung kelompok ngono data sing dadi sing perusahaan barang-perusahaan kuwi ngregani martalah', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Wata shiryarwa mai girma zuwa wannan aikin, yana kan kan framen shirin-mai fassarar da shirin ayuka, inda shirin ayuka yana karya tambayar zuwa wani sequence wa masu hankali da fassarar, sa'an nan yana tafiyar da waɗannan aikin kan matsayin raw. Aka karanta wata misalin CQA mai amfani, yana ƙayyade yawan mutane masu girma da aka sanar da mutum, mai ƙunsa da bakin-gaskiyar aikin aiki masu hankali, wanda ya zama mai amfani da lokaci kuma yana da kyauta mai samun shi a lissafa. Daga wannan takardan, Munã tambayar wa'anar da za'a sanar da wani shirin mai tsaro (Parser) a cikin shirin ka nuna masu tambayar mutane da aka haife kanana zuwa masu tambayar an da ba'a zartar da shi ba, masu daidai da yin parse. Kayyar da sunotetic (tambayi, sequence na aiki) biyu na mai ƙidãya ga mai zakata data, kuma Mu kõre wani parse na semantic wanda ke haɗa masu tambayar synthetic da ke sami da manyan aiki mai daidai. To capture the diversity when applied to natural questions, we learn a projection model to map natural questions into their most similar unnatural questions for which the parser can work well.  Bai da data masu tsari na natura, misalinmu na samar da matsayin aiki mai girma wa aikin CQA. Matarin da aka jarraba ya nuna cewa misalin QA wanda aka yi wa shirin shi kawai da data na synthetisk ya nuna halin-the-art wanda aka sanar da shi kan data na-labet.", 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་མཇུག་གི་འདྲི་ཚིག་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་འཇུག་སྐབས་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་ཞིག་རེད བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་གནད་སྤྲོད་མི་ཁག་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་རིམ་པ་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གཞུང་ཐོག་ཏེ། བྱ་རིམ་པ་དེ་གིས་འདྲི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གོ་ར ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་CQA རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་སློབ་ནུས་མེད་པའི་མིང་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་དགོས་མཁོ་ཡིན་པས། In this paper, we address the challenge of learning a high-quality programmer (parser)by projecting natural human-generated questions into unnatural machine-generated questions which are more convenient to parse. ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་མཇུག་གིས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་དབྱེ་བ་(འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་) གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ནས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་མ རང་བཟོས་ཀྱི་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐབས་སྐབས་སྣེ་ཚོགས་འཛིན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་རུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་འཆར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྤྱད་ནས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གང་ཡང་མེད་པར། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འཆར་སྣང་གིས་CQA ལས་ཀ་ལ་མཐུན་ཚད Experimental results show that the QA model trained exclusively with synthetic data outperforms its state-of-the-art counterpart trained on human-labeled data.'}
{'en': 'A Mixture-of-Experts Model for Learning Multi-Facet Entity Embeddings', 'fr': "Un modèle mixte d'experts pour l'apprentissage des intégrations d'entités multifacettes", 'es': 'Un modelo de mezcla de expertos para el aprendizaje de incrustaciones de entidades multifacéticas', 'ar': 'نموذج مختلط من الخبراء لتعلم حفلات الكيانات متعددة الأوجه', 'pt': 'Um modelo de mistura de especialistas para aprender incorporações de entidades multifacetadas', 'zh': '用学多方实体嵌入的专家混合模样', 'ja': 'マルチファセットエンティティの埋め込みを学習するための専門家のミクスチャーモデル', 'hi': 'मल्टी-फेस एंटिटी एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए एक मिश्रण-के-विशेषज्ञ मॉडल', 'ru': 'Модель сочетания экспертных знаний для изучения вложений многофакторных сущностей', 'ga': 'Samhail Meascán de Shaineolaithe chun Leabaithe Aonáin Ilghnéitheacha a Fhoghlaim', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα μοντέλο ανάμειξης εμπειρογνωμόνων για την εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης οντοτήτων πολλαπλών όψεων', 'hu': 'Szakértők keverékének modell a több arcú entitás beágyazásának tanulásához', 'it': "Un modello misto di esperti per l'apprendimento di incorporazioni di entità multi-facet", 'mk': 'A Mixture-of-Experts Model for Learning Multi-Facet Entity Embeddings', 'lt': 'Mokymosi daugialypių subjektų įdėjinių ekspertų mišinio modelis', 'kk': 'Көп- Face нысандарды үйрену үшін эксперттердің аралас үлгісі', 'ms': 'Model Mixture-of-Experts for Learning Multi-Facet Entity Embedding', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Taħlita ta’ Esperti għat-Tagħlim ta’ Intrapriżi b’Entitajiet Multifaċċati', 'ml': 'Multi- Facet Entity Embedding', 'mn': 'Олон-Face Entity-ын суралцах мэргэжилтнүүдийн төвөгтэй загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un model de amestec de experți pentru învățarea încorporărilor de entități multi-fețe', 'pl': 'Model mieszanki ekspertów do nauki wielofunkcyjnych osadzeń jednostek', 'sr': 'Model mješanja eksperta za učenje udruženja višelica', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Mixture-of-Experts Model for Learning Enterprise', 'sv': 'En blandning av experter modell för lärande av flerFacet Entity Embeddings', 'ta': 'பல- முகப்பு முகப்பு உள்ளீடுகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள ஒரு கூட்டுதல் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Multi Facet Entity Embedding سکھانے کے لئے ایک مکسرٹ کی مدل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình tổ hợp chuyên gia về Nhúng tổ chức giáo dục', 'hr': 'Model mješavine stručnjaka za učenje udruženja višelica', 'bg': 'Модел на смесване от експерти за изучаване на вграждания на многофазни обекти', 'da': 'En blanding af eksperter model til læring af multi-facet enhedsindlejringer', 'nl': 'Een mix-van-experts model voor het leren van multi-facet entity embeddings', 'de': 'Ein Expertenmischungsmodell zum Lernen von Multi-Facet Entity Embeddings', 'id': 'Model Mixture-of-Experts for Learning Multi-Facet Entity Embeddings', 'ko': '다방면 실체가 박힌 혼합 전문가 모형을 배우다', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Mikutano kwa ajili ya Kufundisha Mazungumzo ya Mikutano', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Birnäçe-ýüzler taýdan öwrenmek üçin bir Mixing-of-Experts Modeli', 'sq': 'A Mixture-of-Experts Model for Learning Multi-Facet Entity Embeddings', 'hy': 'Համախումբ մասնագետների մոդելը բազմապատկած հասակների ներգրավման համար', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Multi-Face Entity 캻fad톛l톛rini 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n Misal-of-Experts Modeli', 'bn': 'Multi- Facet Entity Embedding', 'cs': 'Model směsi odborníků pro učení multi-facet entity embeddings', 'ca': "Un model de combinació d'experts per aprendre incorporacions multifacetes", 'bs': 'Model mješavine stručnjaka za učenje udruženja višelica', 'et': 'Ekspertide segamuudel mitmepoolsete üksuste manustamise õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Asiantuntijoiden sekoitusmalli monimuotoisten kokonaisuuksien sulauttamisen oppimiseen', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Model mešanice strokovnjakov za učenje vključevanja večobraznih entitet', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདྲི་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་མཚོན་རྟགས'}
{'en': 'Various methods have already been proposed for learning entity embeddings from text descriptions. Such embeddings are commonly used for inferring properties of entities, for recommendation and entity-oriented search, and for injecting background knowledge into neural architectures, among others. Entity embeddings essentially serve as a compact encoding of a similarity relation, but similarity is an inherently multi-faceted notion. By representing entities as single vectors, existing methods leave it to downstream applications to identify these different facets, and to select the most relevant ones. In this paper, we propose a model that instead learns several vectors for each entity, each of which intuitively captures a different aspect of the considered domain. We use a mixture-of-experts formulation to jointly learn these facet-specific embeddings. The individual entity embeddings are learned using a variant of the GloVe model, which has the advantage that we can easily identify which properties are modelled well in which of the learned embeddings. This is exploited by an associated gating network, which uses pre-trained word vectors to encourage the properties that are modelled by a given embedding to be semantically coherent, i.e. to encourage each of the individual embeddings to capture a meaningful facet.', 'ar': 'تم بالفعل اقتراح طرق مختلفة لتضمين الكيانات التعليمية من أوصاف النص. تُستخدم مثل هذه الزخارف بشكل شائع لاستنتاج خصائص الكيانات ، للتوصية والبحث الموجه نحو الكيان ، ولحقن المعرفة الخلفية في البنى العصبية ، من بين أمور أخرى. تعمل عمليات دمج الكيانات بشكل أساسي كتشفير مضغوط لعلاقة تشابه ، لكن التشابه هو مفهوم متعدد الأوجه بطبيعته. من خلال تمثيل الكيانات كنواقل فردية ، تترك الأساليب الحالية الأمر للتطبيقات النهائية لتحديد هذه الأوجه المختلفة ، واختيار أكثرها صلة بالموضوع. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا يتعلم بدلاً من ذلك عدة نواقل لكل كيان ، يلتقط كل منها بشكل حدسي جانبًا مختلفًا من المجال المدروس. نحن نستخدم تركيبة مكونة من مزيج من الخبراء للتعرف بشكل مشترك على هذه الزخارف الخاصة بالوجه. يتم تعلم حفلات الزفاف للكيان الفردي باستخدام متغير من نموذج GloVe ، والذي يتمتع بميزة أنه يمكننا بسهولة تحديد الخصائص التي تم تصميمها جيدًا في أي من حفلات الزفاف المكتسبة. يتم استغلال ذلك من خلال شبكة بوابات مرتبطة ، والتي تستخدم متجهات كلمات مدربة مسبقًا لتشجيع الخصائص التي تم تصميمها بواسطة تضمين معين لتكون متماسكة لغويًا ، أي لتشجيع كل من الزخارف الفردية لالتقاط وجه ذي مغزى.', 'es': 'Ya se han propuesto varios métodos para aprender incrustaciones de entidades a partir de descripciones de texto. Estas incrustaciones se utilizan comúnmente para inferir propiedades de entidades, para recomendaciones y búsquedas orientadas a entidades, y para inyectar conocimientos básicos en arquitecturas neuronales, entre otros. Las incrustaciones de entidades sirven esencialmente como una codificación compacta de una relación de similitud, pero la similitud es una noción intrínsecamente multifacética. Al representar las entidades como vectores únicos, los métodos existentes dejan que las aplicaciones posteriores identifiquen estas diferentes facetas y seleccionen las más relevantes. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo que, en cambio, aprende varios vectores para cada entidad, cada uno de los cuales captura intuitivamente un aspecto diferente del dominio considerado. Utilizamos una formulación de mezcla de expertos para aprender conjuntamente estas incrustaciones específicas de facetas. Las incrustaciones de entidades individuales se aprenden utilizando una variante del modelo GloVe, que tiene la ventaja de que podemos identificar fácilmente qué propiedades se modelan bien en cuáles de las incrustaciones aprendidas. Esto es aprovechado por una red de puertas asociada, que utiliza vectores de palabras previamente entrenados para fomentar que las propiedades que se modelan mediante una incrustación dada sean semánticamente coherentes, es decir, para alentar a cada una de las incrustaciones individuales a capturar una faceta significativa.', 'fr': "Diverses méthodes ont déjà été proposées pour l'intégration d'entités d'apprentissage à partir de descriptions textuelles. Ces intégrations sont couramment utilisées pour déduire les propriétés d'entités, pour la recommandation et la recherche orientée entité, et pour injecter des connaissances de base dans des architectures neuronales, entre autres. Les intégrations d'entités servent essentiellement de codage compact d'une relation de similarité, mais la similitude est une notion intrinsèquement multiforme. En représentant les entités sous forme de vecteurs uniques, les méthodes existantes laissent aux applications en aval le soin d'identifier ces différentes facettes et de sélectionner les plus pertinentes. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle qui apprend plusieurs vecteurs pour chaque entité, chacun capturant intuitivement un aspect différent du domaine considéré. Nous utilisons une formule composée d'experts pour apprendre ensemble ces intégrations spécifiques à chaque facette. Les intégrations d'entités individuelles sont apprises à l'aide d'une variante du modèle Glove, ce qui présente l'avantage de pouvoir facilement identifier quelles propriétés sont bien modélisées dans lequel des intégrations apprises. Ceci est exploité par un réseau de portillonnage associé, qui utilise des vecteurs de mots préentraînés pour encourager les propriétés modélisées par une intégration donnée à être sémantiquement cohérentes, c'est-à-dire pour encourager chacun des intégrations individuelles à capturer une facette significative.", 'pt': 'Vários métodos já foram propostos para aprender a incorporação de entidades a partir de descrições de texto. Tais embeddings são comumente usados para inferir propriedades de entidades, para recomendação e busca orientada a entidade, e para injetar conhecimento prévio em arquiteturas neurais, entre outros. Embeddings de entidades servem essencialmente como uma codificação compacta de uma relação de similaridade, mas a similaridade é uma noção inerentemente multifacetada. Ao representar entidades como vetores únicos, os métodos existentes deixam para os aplicativos a jusante identificar essas diferentes facetas e selecionar as mais relevantes. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo que aprende vários vetores para cada entidade, cada um dos quais captura intuitivamente um aspecto diferente do domínio considerado. Usamos uma formulação de mistura de especialistas para aprender em conjunto essas incorporações específicas de facetas. As incorporações de entidades individuais são aprendidas usando uma variante do modelo GloVe, que tem a vantagem de podermos identificar facilmente quais propriedades são bem modeladas em quais das incorporações aprendidas. Isso é explorado por uma rede de portas associada, que usa vetores de palavras pré-treinados para encorajar as propriedades que são modeladas por uma determinada incorporação para serem semanticamente coerentes, ou seja, para encorajar cada uma das incorporações individuais a capturar uma faceta significativa.', 'ja': 'テキスト記述からエンティティ埋め込みを学習するための様々な方法がすでに提案されている。 そのような埋め込みは、とりわけ、エンティティの特性を推測するため、推奨およびエンティティ指向の検索のため、ならびに背景知識をニューラルアーキテクチャに注入するために一般的に使用される。 エンティティ埋め込みは、基本的に類似関係のコンパクトなエンコードとして機能しますが、類似性は本質的に多面的な概念です。 エンティティを単一のベクトルとして表すことにより、既存の方法は、これらの異なるファセットを識別し、最も関連性の高いファセットを選択するためのダウンストリームアプリケーションに任せます。 この論文では、各エンティティについていくつかのベクトルを学習し、それぞれが考慮されたドメインの異なる側面を直感的に捉えるモデルを提案します。 専門家のミックス配合を使用して、これらのファセット固有の埋め込みを共同で学びます。 個々のエンティティの埋め込みは、GloVeモデルのバリアントを使用して学習されます。これには、学習された埋め込みのうち、どのプロパティがうまくモデル化されているかを簡単に特定できるという利点があります。 これは、事前に訓練された単語ベクトルを使用して、所与の埋め込みによってモデル化されるプロパティが意味的にコヒーレントであることを促し、すなわち、個々の埋め込みの各々が意味のあるファセットを取り込むことを促す、関連付けられたゲーティングネットワークによって利用される。', 'hi': 'पाठ विवरण से एंटिटी एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए विभिन्न विधियों को पहले ही प्रस्तावित किया गया है। इस तरह के एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग आमतौर पर संस्थाओं के गुणों का अनुमान लगाने के लिए, सिफारिश और इकाई-उन्मुख खोज के लिए, और दूसरों के बीच तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर में पृष्ठभूमि ज्ञान को इंजेक्ट करने के लिए किया जाता है। एंटिटी एम्बेडिंग अनिवार्य रूप से एक समानता संबंध के कॉम्पैक्ट एन्कोडिंग के रूप में कार्य करती है, लेकिन समानता एक स्वाभाविक रूप से बहुआयामी धारणा है। एकल वैक्टर के रूप में संस्थाओं का प्रतिनिधित्व करके, मौजूदा तरीके इन विभिन्न पहलुओं की पहचान करने के लिए और सबसे प्रासंगिक लोगों का चयन करने के लिए इसे डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोगों पर छोड़ देते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो इसके बजाय प्रत्येक इकाई के लिए कई वैक्टर सीखता है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक सहजता से माना जाने वाले डोमेन के एक अलग पहलू को कैप्चर करता है। हम संयुक्त रूप से इन पहलू-विशिष्ट एम्बेडिंग को सीखने के लिए एक मिश्रण-विशेषज्ञ सूत्रीकरण का उपयोग करते हैं। व्यक्तिगत इकाई एम्बेडिंग को GloVe मॉडल के एक संस्करण का उपयोग करके सीखा जाता है, जिसका लाभ यह है कि हम आसानी से पहचान सकते हैं कि कौन से गुणों को अच्छी तरह से मॉडल किया जाता है, जिसमें सीखा एम्बेडिंग में से कौन सा है। यह एक संबद्ध गेटिंग नेटवर्क द्वारा शोषण किया जाता है, जो उन गुणों को प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द वैक्टर का उपयोग करता है जो किसी दिए गए एम्बेडिंग द्वारा शब्दार्थ सुसंगत होने के लिए मॉडल किए जाते हैं, यानी प्रत्येक व्यक्ति एम्बेडिंग को एक सार्थक पहलू पर कब्जा करने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए।', 'ru': 'Уже были предложены различные методы для встраивания обучаемых объектов из текстовых описаний. Такие вложения обычно используются для вывода свойств сущностей, для рекомендательного и ориентированного на сущность поиска и для введения фоновых знаний в нейронные архитектуры, среди прочих. Вложения сущностей по существу служат компактной кодировкой отношения сходства, но сходство является по своей сути многогранным понятием. Представляя сущности как единые векторы, существующие методы оставляют на усмотрение последующих приложений идентификацию этих различных граней и выбор наиболее релевантных. В этой статье мы предлагаем модель, которая вместо этого изучает несколько векторов для каждой сущности, каждый из которых интуитивно захватывает отдельный аспект рассматриваемой области. Мы используем смесь экспертных формулировок для совместного изучения этих фасет-специфичных вложений. Индивидуальные вложения сущностей изучаются с использованием варианта модели GloVe, которая имеет то преимущество, что мы можем легко определить, какие свойства хорошо смоделированы, в каком из изученных вложений. Это используется связанной сетью гейтирования, которая использует предварительно обученные векторы слов, чтобы стимулировать свойства, которые моделируются данным вложением, быть семантически согласованными, то есть побуждать каждое из отдельных вложений захватывать значимую грань.', 'zh': '已发诸法,于文本中学实体嵌入。 此嵌常用于推实体之属性,以荐向实体之搜索,及以背景知识注神经架构等。 嵌者,相似性之凑编码;相似性者,多其名也。 以实体为单向量,今留其下流应用程序以识其异,而择其最关者。 于本文中,我们发出一个模样,该模样可以每个实体学习多向量,每向量直观地获所思虑的不同。 用专家混合配方来共学此特定于小平面嵌。 单质嵌 GloVe 模样变体学,其善者轻识何性建模良。 此由联门控网络之用,宜网络用预练之词向量以劝给定嵌建模之属性于语义一也,劝每独销获有义也。', 'ga': 'Tá modhanna éagsúla molta cheana féin chun aonáin a leabú ó théacs-thuairiscí. Úsáidtear leabaithe den sórt sin go coitianta chun airíonna aonáin a bhaint amach, chun moltaí a dhéanamh agus chun cuardach a dhéanamh ar aonán, agus chun eolas cúlra a instealladh isteach in ailtireachtaí néaracha, i measc nithe eile. Feidhmíonn leabaithe aonáin go bunúsach mar ionchódú dlúth ar ghaol cosúlachta, ach is coincheap ilghnéitheach ó dhúchas é cosúlacht. Trí aonáin a léiriú mar veicteoirí aonair, fágtar faoi na modhanna atá ann cheana feidhmchláir iartheachtacha chun na gnéithe éagsúla sin a shainaithint, agus na cinn is ábhartha a roghnú. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla a fhoghlaimíonn ina ionad sin roinnt veicteoirí do gach aonán, agus a ghlacann gach ceann acu go hintuigthe gné eile den fhearann a mheastar. Bainimid úsáid as foirmliú meascán-saineolaithe chun na leabaithe gné-shonracha seo a fhoghlaim le chéile. Foghlaimítear na leabuithe aonáin aonair trí leas a bhaint as leagan eile den mhúnla GloVe, a bhfuil an buntáiste aige gur féidir linn a aithint go héasca cé na hairíonna atá múnlaithe go maith cé acu de na leabaithe foghlamtha. Saothraítear é seo trí ghréasán geataí gaolmhar, a úsáideann veicteoirí focal réamhoilte chun na hairíonna a mhúnlaítear trí leabú ar leith a spreagadh le bheith comhleanúnach go séimeantach, i.e. gach ceann de na leabaithe aonair a spreagadh chun gné bhríoch a ghabháil.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის გამოსაწერებიდან განსხვავებული მეტოვები უკვე იყენებულია. ასეთი ინტერტიკების განსაზღვრებისთვის, განსაზღვრებისთვის და განსაზღვრებისთვის ძიებისთვის, და ინტერტიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის ინტერქციისთვის ინტერქციისთვის გამოყენება. ინტერტის შებრუნებები ძალიან იყენებენ როგორც კომპოქტური კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია, მაგრამ სხვადასხვა არის განსაზღვრებით როგორც ერთი გვექტორის განსაზღვრებით, მიმდინარე პროგრამების გადასვლა ამ განსხვავებული ფექტის განსაზღვრებისთვის და ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ მოდელი, რომელიც ყოველ ინტევიტიურად ვისწავლის რამდენიმე გვეკუნტები, რომელიც ყველა ინტევიტიურად აღმოჩნდება განსხვავებული დიომინის არს ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ განსხვავებული ექსპერტის ფორმულაციას, რომ ერთადერთად სწავლათ ამ ფექტის სპექტიფიკური ინბევინები. ინდივეტური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური შესწავლია Glove მოდელის განრავლენტის გამოყენებით, რომელიც აქვს გამოსახულება, რომელიც ჩვენ ადვილ ეს გამოვიყენება დაკავშირებული ქსელის გამოყენებაში, რომელიც გამოყენება წინ დაკავშირებული სიტყვის გვექტორებით, რომელიც გამოყენება განახლებული სიტყვის, რომელიც მოდელირებულია განახლებული სიტყვის, რომელიც სემენტიკურად დაკა', 'hu': 'Már különböző módszereket javasoltak a szövegleírásokból származó entitások beágyazásának tanulására. Az ilyen beágyazásokat gyakran használják entitások tulajdonságainak következtetésére, ajánlások és entitás-orientált keresésre, valamint háttér-ismeretek bejuttatására többek között neurális architektúrákba. Az entitások beágyazása lényegében egy hasonlósági viszony kompakt kódolásaként szolgál, de a hasonlóság egy eredendően sokoldalú fogalom. Azáltal, hogy az entitásokat egyetlen vektorként reprezentálják, a meglévő módszerek a downstream alkalmazásokra hagyják, hogy azonosítsák ezeket a különböző aspektusokat, és kiválasszák a legrelevánsabb aspektusokat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan modellt javasolunk, amely ehelyett több vektort tanul meg minden egyes entitáshoz, amelyek mindegyike intuitív módon rögzíti a figyelembe vett domain egy másik aspektusát. Szakértők keverékét használjuk, hogy közösen megismerjük ezeket az aspektspecifikus beágyazásokat. Az egyes entitások beágyazását a GloVe modell egy változatával tanuljuk meg, amelynek előnye, hogy könnyen azonosíthatjuk, mely tulajdonságok modelleződnek jól, melyik tanult beágyazások közül. Ezt egy kapcsolódó kapuhálózat használja ki, amely előre képzett szóvektorokat használ arra, hogy ösztönözze az adott beágyazás által modellezett tulajdonságok szemantikailag koherensek legyenek, azaz arra ösztönözze az egyes beágyazásokat, hogy értelmes aspektusokat rögzítsenek.', 'el': "Έχουν ήδη προταθεί διάφορες μέθοδοι για την ενσωμάτωση μαθησιακής οντότητας από περιγραφές κειμένου. Τέτοιες ενσωματώσεις χρησιμοποιούνται συνήθως για την εξαγωγή ιδιοτήτων οντοτήτων, για την αναζήτηση συστάσεων και οντοτήτων, καθώς και για την εισαγωγή γνώσεων υποβάθρου σε νευρωνικές αρχιτεκτονικές, μεταξύ άλλων. Οι ενσωματώσεις οντοτήτων χρησιμεύουν ουσιαστικά ως συμπαγής κωδικοποίηση μιας σχέσης ομοιότητας, αλλά η ομοιότητα είναι μια εγγενώς πολύπλευρη έννοια. Αντιπροσωπεύοντας οντότητες ως μεμονωμένα διανύσματα, οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι αφήνουν στις μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές να εντοπίσουν αυτές τις διαφορετικές πτυχές και να επιλέξουν τις πιο σχετικές. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο που αντ' αυτού μαθαίνει διάφορα διανύσματα για κάθε οντότητα, καθένα από τα οποία συλλαμβάνει διαισθητικά μια διαφορετική πτυχή του εξεταζόμενου τομέα. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μείγμα εμπειρογνωμόνων για να μάθουμε από κοινού αυτές τις συγκεκριμένες πτυχές ενσωμάτωσης. Οι μεμονωμένες ενσωματώσεις οντότητας μαθαίνονται χρησιμοποιώντας μια παραλλαγή του μοντέλου το οποίο έχει το πλεονέκτημα ότι μπορούμε εύκολα να προσδιορίσουμε ποιες ιδιότητες μοντελοποιούνται καλά σε ποια από τις μαθειμένες ενσωματώσεις. Αυτό αξιοποιείται από ένα συνδεδεμένο δίκτυο πύλης, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί προ-εκπαιδευμένα διανύσματα λέξεων για να ενθαρρύνει τις ιδιότητες που μοντελοποιούνται από μια δεδομένη ενσωμάτωση να είναι σημασιολογικά συνεκτικές, δηλαδή να ενθαρρύνει κάθε μία από τις μεμονωμένες ενσωματώσεις για να συλλάβει μια σημαντική πτυχή.", 'it': "Vari metodi sono già stati proposti per l'apprendimento di incorporazioni di entità da descrizioni di testo. Tali incorporazioni sono comunemente usate per inferire proprietà di entità, per la ricerca orientata alle raccomandazioni e alle entità, e per iniettare conoscenze di fondo nelle architetture neurali, tra gli altri. Le incorporazioni di entità servono essenzialmente come codifica compatta di una relazione di somiglianza, ma la somiglianza è una nozione intrinsecamente sfaccettata. Rappresentando le entità come singoli vettori, i metodi esistenti lasciano alle applicazioni a valle di identificare questi diversi aspetti e selezionare quelli più rilevanti. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello che apprende invece diversi vettori per ogni entità, ognuno dei quali cattura intuitivamente un aspetto diverso del dominio considerato. Usiamo una formulazione mista di esperti per imparare congiuntamente questi incorporamenti sfaccettati. Le singole incorporazioni di entità vengono apprese utilizzando una variante del modello GloVe, che ha il vantaggio di poter facilmente identificare quali proprietà sono modellate bene in quali degli incorporamenti appresi. Questo viene sfruttato da una rete di gating associata, che utilizza vettori di parole pre-addestrati per incoraggiare le proprietà modellate da un dato embedding ad essere semanticamente coerenti, vale a dire per incoraggiare ciascuno dei singoli embedding a catturare un aspetto significativo.", 'kk': 'Мәтін сипаттамасынан бірнеше әдістерді үйрену үшін қолданылды. Бұл ендіру кәдімгі нысандардың қасиеттерін, рекомендациялау және нысандардың бағытталған іздеу үшін және аясының білімін невралдық архитектураларына инжекциялау үшін қолданылады. Бөліктерді ендіру негізінде ұқсас қатынасының сәйкес кодтамасы ретінде қызмет, бірақ ұқсас - көп қатынасы. Бір вектор ретінде нысандарды келтіру арқылы, барлық әдістер қолданбаларды төмендету үшін бұл әртүрлі беттерді анықтауға және ең маңызды таңдауға болады. Бұл қағаздың орнына бірнеше векторды оқу үшін бірнеше векторды үйренетін үлгісін ұсынып, әрбірінің интуитивті деген доменнің басқа бөлігін түсіндіреді. Біз бұл жұмыс белгілерін біріктіру үшін эксперттердің аралас формулациясын қолданамыз. Бір жалпы құрылғылар Glove моделінің айнымалысын қолдануға үйреніледі. Бұл қасиеттерді оңай анықтауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл сәйкесті желінен қолданылады. Бұл өзгертілген сөздер векторларын өзгерту үшін келтірілген ендірудің қасиеттерін семантикалық қасиеттеріне сәйкесті болу үшін қолданылады. Мысалы, әрбір индіргендің әрбірін маңызды мәліметті', 'mk': 'Разни методи веќе се предложени за вградување на ентитети за учење од текстови описи. Such embeddings are commonly used for inferring properties of entities, for recommendation and entity-oriented search, and for injecting background knowledge into neural architectures, among others.  Вклучувањата на ентитетите во суштина служат како компактна кодирање на сличност однос, но сличноста е природно мултифактична идеја. Со претставувањето на ентитетите како единствени вектори, постоечките методи ги оставаат на понатамошните апликации да ги идентификуваат овие различни факти и да ги изберат најрелевантните. Во овој документ предложуваме модел кој наместо тоа научи неколку вектори за секој ентитет, од кои секој интуитивно го зазема различен аспект на разгледуваниот домен. Користиме мешавина на експерти за заеднички да ги научиме овие специфични мешавини. Индивидуалните вградувања на ентитетите се научија користејќи варијант на моделот GloVe, кој има предност што лесно можеме да идентификуваме кои сопствености се моделирани добро во кој од научените вградувања. Ова е искористено од поврзана мрежа за гатирање, која користи предобучени вектори за зборови за да ги охрабри сопственостите кои се моделирани од одредена вградба да бидат семантично коеорентни, т.е. да ги охрабрат секоја од индивидуалните вградби да фатат значителен факт.', 'lt': 'Iš teksto aprašymų įtrauktiems mokymosi subjektams jau siūlomi įvairūs metodai. Tokie įdėjimai dažnai naudojami nustatant subjektų savybes, rekomenduojant ir į subjektus orientuotą paiešką ir, be kita ko, įterpiant fonines žinias į neurologines architektūras. Subjektų įdėjiniai iš esmės naudojami kaip kompaktinis panašaus santykio kodavimas, tačiau panašumas yra iš esmės daugialypė sąvoka. Atsižvelgiant į subjektus kaip vienus vektorius, esami metodai leidžia tolesnėms programoms nustatyti šiuos skirtingus aspektus ir pasirinkti svarbiausius. Šiame dokumente siūlome model į, kuris užuot išmokęs kelis vektorius kiekvienam subjektui, kiekvienas iš jų intuityviai apima kitą svarstomos srities aspektą. Naudojame ekspertų mišinį, kad bendrai išmoktume šiuos aspektus. Atskirų subjektų įterpimas mokomas naudojant GloVe modelio variant ą, kuris turi pranašumą, kad mes lengvai galime nustatyti, kurios savybės gerai modeliuojamos, kuriose iš išmoktų įterpimų. Ši ą veiklą naudoja susijęs gating tinklas, kuris naudoja iš anksto parengtus žodžių vektorius, kad būtų skatinamos savybės, modeliuojamos pagal tam tikrą įterpimą, būti semantiškai nuoseklios, t. y. skatinti kiekvieną atskirą įterpimą sugauti prasmingą aspektą.', 'ms': 'Various methods have already been proposed for learning entity embeddings from text descriptions.  Pencampuran tersebut biasanya digunakan untuk menyimpulkan ciri-ciri entiti, untuk rekomendasi dan carian-orientasi entiti, dan untuk menyuntik pengetahuan latar belakang ke dalam arkitektur saraf, antara lain. Penampilan entiti pada dasarnya berkhidmat sebagai pengekodan kompakt bagi hubungan persamaan, tetapi persamaan adalah satu konsep berbilang-facet. Dengan mewakili entiti sebagai vektor tunggal, kaedah sedia ada meninggalkannya kepada aplikasi bawah untuk mengenalpasti muka berbeza ini, dan untuk memilih yang paling berkaitan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model yang sebaliknya belajar beberapa vektor untuk setiap entiti, yang mana secara intuitif menangkap aspek yang berbeza dari domain yang dianggap. We use a mixture-of-experts formulation to jointly learn these facet-specific embeddings.  Pencampuran entiti individu belajar menggunakan varian model GloVe, yang mempunyai keuntungan bahawa kita boleh mudah mengenali ciri-ciri yang dimodelkan dengan baik di mana penyampuran belajar. Ini dieksploitasi oleh rangkaian gating berkaitan, yang menggunakan vektor perkataan terlatih-terlatih untuk mendorong ciri-ciri yang dipodelkan oleh penyembedding yang diberi untuk menjadi semantikal konsisten, iaitu untuk mendorong setiap penyembedding individu untuk menangkap facet yang bermakna.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വിശദീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതി ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള പ്രവൃത്തികള്\u200d സാധാരണ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രേതികങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും, ശുപാര്\u200dശ്വതവും സാധാരണ തിരച്ചിലേക്കും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, മറ്റുള്ളവര്\u200dക് എന്റിറ്റിറ്റിയുടെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരേ ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ കോമ്പ്കോക്റ്റ് എന്\u200dകോഡിങ് ആയി സേവിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ  ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത മുഖം തിരിച്ചറിയാനും ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാനും നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d നിലവിലുള ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിനു പകരം ഓരോ വസ്തുവിനും പല വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഓരോരുത നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മിഷ്ട്രിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു ഈ ഫെസ്റ്റ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള അംഗീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d. ഗ്ലോവി മോഡലിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വ്യക്തിപരമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രേയം എളുപ്പമായി നമുക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴ ഇതൊരു ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഗേറ്റിങ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്ന സ്വത്തുക്കള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ', 'mt': 'Diġà ġew proposti diversi metodi għall-inkorporazzjoni ta’ entitajiet ta’ tagħlim minn deskrizzjonijiet tat-test. Dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet jintużaw b’mod komuni biex jiġu inferiti l-proprjetajiet tal-entitajiet, għar-rakkomandazzjoni u t-tiftix orjentat lejn l-entitajiet, u għall-injezzjoni tal-għarfien fl-isfond f’arkitetturi newrali, fost oħrajn. L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-entitajiet essenzjalment iservu bħala kodifikazzjoni kompatta ta’ relazzjoni ta’ similarità, iżda s-similarità hija kunċett inerenti b’diversi aspetti. By representing entities as single vectors, existing methods leave it to downstream applications to identify these different facets, and to select the most relevant ones.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell li minflok jitgħallem diversi vetturi għal kull entità, li kull waħda minnhom intwittivament taqbad aspett differenti tad-dominju kkunsidrat. Aħna nużaw formulazzjoni ta’ taħlita ta’ esperti biex jitgħallmu b’mod konġunt dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet speċifiċi għall-aspetti. L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-entitajiet individwali jitgħallmu bl-użu ta’ varjant tal-mudell GloVe, li għandu l-vantaġġ li nistgħu faċilment nidentifikaw liema proprjetajiet huma mmudellati sewwa f’liema mill-inkorporazzjonijiet imgħallmu. Dan jiġi sfruttat minn netwerk ta’ gating assoċjat, li juża vetturi tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel biex jinkoraġġixxi l-proprjetajiet li huma mmudellati minn inkorporazzjoni partikolari biex ikunu semantikament koerenti, jiġifieri biex jinkoraġġixxu kull wieħed mill-inkorporazzjonijiet individwali biex jaqbad aspett sinifikanti.', 'mn': 'Өөр төрлийн арга баримтуудыг текст тодорхойлолтоос суралцах үйл ажиллагаанд суралцах боломжтой болсон. Ийм нэгжүүдийн шинжлэх ухаан, зөвлөгөө, нэгжүүдийн ориентиролт хайрт, сэтгэл хөдлөл мэдлэгийг сэтгэл хөдлөл архитектур руу инжекци хийх үед ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Объектын холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой тохиромжтой кодлог гэдэг. Гэхдээ тэнцүү байдал нь олон нүдний ойлголт юм. Объектуудыг нэг вектор гэж үзүүлэхээр, суурилсан арга нь эдгээр өөр хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлох, хамгийн чухал зүйлсийг сонгох хэрэгслээр доошлох боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг бүрт хэдэн векторуудыг суралцах загварыг суралцах загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ бүрт ойлгомжтой тохиолдолын өөр хэсэг барьдаг. Бид эдгээр нүүрний тодорхойлолтуудыг хамтдаа суралцахын тулд мэргэжилтнүүдийн томъёо ашигладаг. Гловойн загварын өөрчлөлтийг ашиглаж суралцдаг. Гловойн загварын өөрчлөлтийг ашиглаж чадна. Энэ нь холбоотой хамтын сүлжээнд хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь өмнө сургалтын үг векторуудыг ашигладаг. Энэ нь тодорхойлолтой холбоотой шинж тэмдэглэгддэг шинж тэмдэглэгддэг шинж тэмдэглэгддэг шинж тэмдэглэгддэг шинж тэмдэглэгдэхүүнд тусалдаг', 'no': 'Dei fleire metodane er allereie foreslått for å lære innbygging av einingar frå tekstskildringar. Desse innbyggingar vert vanlegvis brukte for å få inn eigenskapar av einingar, for anbefaling og entitetsorientert søk, og for å injesera bakgrunnsverktøy til neuralarkitektur, medan andre. Innebygging av einingar er i hovudsak ein kompakt koding av ei tilsvarende forhold, men liknande er ein eigentleg fleire oppmerking. Ved å representera einingar som enkelte vektorar, la dei eksisterande metodane gå ned til programmet for å identifisera desse forskjellige ansiktane, og for å velja dei mest relevante. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit modell som i staden lærer fleire vektorar for kvar entitet, kvar av dei som intuitivt får ein annan aspekt av domenet. Vi bruker ei blandingsformasjon av ekspertar for å lære saman desse innbyggingane med ansiktspesifikke. Innebygging av individuelle entiteter er lært med ein variant av Glove- modellen, som har fordel som vi kan enkelt identifisera kva eigenskapar som er modelte godt i kva av dei lærte innbygginga. Dette vert ekspluatert av eit tilknytte gating- nettverk, som brukar før- trengte ordvektorar for å oppretta eigenskapane som er modellert av eit gitt innbygging for å vera semantisk samanlig, dvs. for å oppretta kvar av dei individuelle innbygginga for å henta ein betydelig ansikt.', 'pl': 'Zaproponowano już różne metody osadzania jednostek uczących się z opisów tekstowych. Takie osadzenia są powszechnie stosowane m.in. do wnioskowania właściwości jednostek, do rekomendacji i wyszukiwania zorientowanego na jednostki, a także do wstrzykiwania wiedzy podstawowej do architektur neuronowych. Osadzenia jednostek służą zasadniczo jako kompaktowe kodowanie relacji podobieństwa, ale podobieństwo jest z natury wieloaspektowym pojęciem. Przedstawiając podmioty jako pojedyncze wektory, istniejące metody pozostawiają aplikacjom kolejnym identyfikację tych różnych aspektów i wybór najbardziej istotnych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model, który zamiast tego uczy się kilku wektorów dla każdej jednostki, z których każdy intuicyjnie uchwyci inny aspekt rozważanej domeny. Używamy mieszanki ekspertów, aby wspólnie uczyć się tych specyficznych aspektów osadzeń. Poszczególne osadzenia jednostek uczą się przy użyciu wariantu modelu GloVe, co ma tę zaletę, że możemy łatwo zidentyfikować, które właściwości są dobrze modelowane w którym z nauczonych osadzeń. Jest to wykorzystywane przez powiązaną sieć gatingową, która wykorzystuje wstępnie przeszkolone wektory słów, aby zachęcić właściwości modelowane przez dane osadzenie do bycia semantycznie spójne, tj. aby zachęcić każde z poszczególnych osadzeń do uchwycenia znaczącego aspektu.', 'ro': 'Diferite metode au fost deja propuse pentru învățarea încorporărilor entităților din descrierile de text. Astfel de încorporări sunt utilizate în mod obișnuit pentru deducerea proprietăților entităților, pentru recomandări și căutare orientată spre entitate și pentru injectarea cunoștințelor de fundal în arhitecturi neurale, printre altele. Încorporările entităților servesc în esență ca o codificare compactă a unei relații de similitudine, dar similaritatea este o noțiune inerent multifațetată. Prin reprezentarea entităților ca vectori unici, metodele existente lasă aplicațiilor din aval să identifice aceste fațete diferite și să le selecteze pe cele mai relevante. În această lucrare, propunem un model care în schimb învață mai mulți vectori pentru fiecare entitate, fiecare dintre care capturează intuitiv un aspect diferit al domeniului luat în considerare. Folosim o formulă de amestec de experți pentru a învăța împreună aceste încorporări specifice fațetelor. Integrările individuale ale entităților sunt învățate folosind o variantă a modelului GloVe, care are avantajul că putem identifica cu ușurință ce proprietăți sunt modelate bine în care dintre încorporările învățate. Acest lucru este exploatat de o retea de gating asociata, care utilizeaza vectori de cuvinte pre-instruiti pentru a incuraja proprietatile modelate de o anumita incorporare sa fie semantic coerente, adica pentru a incuraja fiecare dintre incorporarile individuale sa capteze o fata semnificativa.', 'si': 'වෙනස් විධාන විධානය දැනටමත් පාළ විස්තරයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්. මේ සංවිධානය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම භාවිතා වෙන්නේ අයිතිවල් ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් සඳහා අයිතිවල් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පසුබිම දන්නවක්  ඉන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සේවා කරන්න, ඒත් සම්බන්ධතාවක එකම වෙක්ටර් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන විදියට, තියෙන්න තියෙන විදියට ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන විදියට, මේ වෙනස් මුහුණු අඳ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වෙක්ටර් වලින් වෙක්ටර් වලින් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා හැම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්ම හැම ප්\u200dරයෝ අපි මේ මුහුණු විශේෂයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය අංශ්\u200dය සංවිධානය සංවිධානයක් Glove මොඩේලයේ වෙනස් භාවිතානයක් භාවිත කරලා ඉගෙන ගන්නවා, ඒකෙන් අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝ මේක සම්බන්ධ ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචන වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා දෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් සම්බ', 'sr': 'Već su predložene različite metode za uključenje entiteta iz tekstskih opisa. Takve integracije se uobičajeno koriste za uvođenje vlasništva entiteta, za preporuku i pretragu orijentiranu na entitete, i za ubrizganje pozadinskih znanja u neuralne arhitekture, među ostalima. U suštini ugrađenja jedinica služi kompaktno kodiranje odnosa sličnosti, ali sličnost je posebno višelična ideja. Predstavljajući entitate kao jedinstvene vektore, postojeće metode dopuštaju da spuste aplikacije da identifikuju te različite lica i da odaberete najvažnije. U ovom papiru predlažemo model koji umesto toga nauči nekoliko vektora za svaku entitet, od kojih svaka intuitivno uhvati različit aspekt domena. Koristimo formulaciju mešanja stručnjaka kako bi zajedno naučili te integracije specifičnih lica. Individualni integraciji se uče korištenjem varijanta model a Glove, koja ima prednost koju možemo lako identifikovati koje su vlasništvo dobro modelirane u kojoj su naučene integracije. To je iskorišteno povezanom mrežom prijevoza, koja koristi predobučene rečne vektore kako bi ohrabrila vlasništvo koje su modelirale određeni integracija da bude semantički sasvim sasvim sasvim sasvim, to je da bi poticala svaku individualnu integraciju da uhvati smisleno lice.', 'so': "Waxaa horay loogu talo galay qaabooyin kala duduwan oo ay u soo bandhigtaan aqoonta qoraalka qoraalka. Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa in ay dhimiraan hantidii ay leeyihiin, in lagu talo siiyo iyo raadinta qofka la hago iyo in lagu soo rido aqoonta bakhtiga ah oo lagu qoro dhismaha neurada. Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo adeegaa kaarka xiriirka isku mid ah, laakiin sidoo kale waa fikrad aad u leedahay. Waxyaabaha ay leeyihiin sida jidhka hal jidh ah, qaababka joogta ayaa ka daaya codsiga hoose-durka si ay u aqoonsadaan wejiyadaas kala duduwan iyo in loo doorto kuwa ugu muhiimsan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa tusaale, taas oo ka badala barta wadooyin badan oo ay leedahay jidh kasta, taasoo mid kastaaba si caqli ah u qabsadaa dhinac kala duwan oo lagu fiiriyo. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa koorasyo khabiir ah si aan u barno wadajir ka mid ah qalabka facabka. Meelaha gaarka ah waxaa lagu bartaa noocyada GloVe oo kala duduwan, kaas oo faa'iido ah oo aan si fudud u ogaan karno nooca gaarka ah oo lagu sameynayo noocyada bartay. Tan waxaa lagu isticmaalaa shabakad la xiriira, kaas oo isticmaalaya waddooyinka hadalka horay loo tababaray si ay u dhiirrigeliso hantida loo tusiyo in uu u noqdo mid ka mid ah hal isku mid ah si uu u qabsado wejiga waxyaabaha leh.", 'sv': 'Olika metoder har redan föreslagits för att lära entitetsinbäddningar från textbeskrivningar. Sådana inbäddningar används ofta för att härleda egenskaper hos entiteter, för rekommendation och entitetsorienterad sökning, och för att injicera bakgrundskunskap i neurala arkitekturer, bland annat. Entitetsinbäddningar fungerar huvudsakligen som en kompakt kodning av en likhetsrelation, men likhet är en inneboende mångfacetterad föreställning. Genom att representera entiteter som enskilda vektorer lämnar befintliga metoder det till nedströmsapplikationer att identifiera dessa olika aspekter och välja de mest relevanta. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en modell som istället lär sig flera vektorer för varje entitet, som var och en intuitivt fångar en annan aspekt av den aktuella domänen. Vi använder en blandning av experter formulering för att gemensamt lära oss dessa facetspecifika inbäddningar. De enskilda entitetsinbäddningarna lärs med hjälp av en variant av GloVe-modellen, vilket har fördelen att vi enkelt kan identifiera vilka egenskaper som modelleras väl i vilka av de lärda inbäddningarna. Detta utnyttjas av ett associerat gatingnätverk, som använder förkunskaperade ordvektorer för att uppmuntra de egenskaper som modelleras av en given inbäddning att vara semantiskt sammanhängande, dvs att uppmuntra var och en av de enskilda inbäddningarna att fånga en meningsfull aspekt.', 'ur': 'مختلف طریقے پہلے سے ایک ٹیکسٹ کی توصیف سے انڈینگ سکھانے کے لئے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں. یہ انڈیینگ اکثر انٹیٹیوں کی خصوصیت کے ذریعے، سفارش اور انٹیٹیوں کی جگہ کے لئے اور نیورال معماریوں میں پچھلی علم کے ذریعے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں. Entity embeddings essentially serve as a compact encoding of a similar relationship, but similarity is a inherently multifaced notion. ایک ویکتروں کے طور پر ایٹینٹیوں کو نمایش دینے کے ذریعہ، موجود طریقے اسے ڈونسٹریم کاربریاں کے لئے چھوڑ دیتے ہیں کہ ان مختلف چہروں کو پہچان سکیں، اور سب سے اچھے منتخب کرنے کے لئے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس کے بدلے ہر ایک ایٹنی کے لئے چند ویکتروں کو سکھاتے ہیں، ان میں سے ہر ایک کو نظریہ طور پر سمجھا ہوا ڈومین کی مختلف منظور پکڑتا ہے. ہم ایک مخلوقات کے مطابق مطابق فرمول کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ان موجودات کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق سکھائیں۔ گلووی موڈل کے متفاوت کے مطابق ایک شخصی ایٹینٹ ڈینگ کو سکھایا جاتا ہے، جس کے لئے فائدہ ہے کہ ہم آسان طور پر پہچان سکتے ہیں کہ کس گواٹیوں کو اچھی طرح دکھایا جاتا ہے جو سیکھی ہوئی ایڈینگ میں سے کون ہے۔ یہ ایک مشترک گٹنگ نیٹ ورک سے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، جو پہلے تدریس کی لفظ ویکتروں کو استعمال کرتا ہے، اس لئے کہ ایک مطلب صورت کو پکڑنے کے لئے ایک مطلب صورت کے مطابق نمودار بنایا جاتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'உரை விவரிப்புகளில் இருந்து உள்ளிடும் பொருள் கற்றுக்கொள்ள பல்வேறு முறைகள் ஏற்கனவே பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டு இவ்வாறு உள்ளடக்கங்கள் பொதுவாக பொருள்களின் பண்புகளை பாதிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, பரிந்துரைப்புகள் மற்றும் பொருள் தேடுதல், மற்றும் புதிய ப முழுமையான உள்ளடக்கங்கள் பொருத்தமாக ஒரு ஒத்துமையான உறவு குறியீட்டாக சேவை செய்கிறது, ஆனால் அதே தான் பல முகத்திலுள்ள கருத்து. பொருள்களை ஒற்றை வெக்டாராக குறிப்பிடுவதால், தற்போதைய முறைகள் இருக்கும் முறைகள் இவற்றை வெவ்வேறு முகங்களை குறிப்பிடுவதற இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ஒவ்வொரு பொருளுக்கும் பதிலாக பல வெக்டார்கள் கற்று கொள்கிறார் நாம் இந்த முகத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதிகளை ஒன்றாக கற்றுக் கொள்ள ஒரு கலப்பு விளக்கம் வடிவமைப்ப கிளோவே மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி தனிப்பட்ட பொருள் உள்ளீடுகள் கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளன, அது எளிதாக எந்த பண்புகள் மாதிரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை கண்டுபிடி இது தொடர்புடைய பிணையத்தால் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, அது முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை வெக்டார்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சொத்துக்கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பண்புகளை மாதிரியா', 'uz': "@ info Bu parametrlar hodisalarning xossalarini yaratish uchun oddiy foydalanadi, talab qilish va taʼminlovchi qidirish uchun, va orqa fon taʼlumotini qo'shish uchun boshqa dasturlarga kiritish uchun. @ info: whatsthis Name Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha vectorni o'rganamiz va har bir narsa juda qiziqarli bo'lgan modul bilan o'rganamiz. Biz bu facetning foydalanuvchilarini birlashtirishga o'rganamiz. Ko'pchilikning bir tashkilotlari GloVe modelidagi variant bilan o'rganadi. Bu bilan, biz qo'shilgan xossalarni o'rganish imkoniyatlarimiz imkoniyatlariga qo'llaniladi. This is exploited by an associated gating network, which uses pre-trained word vectors to encourage the properties that are modelled by a given embedding to be semantically coherent, i.e. to encourage each of the individual embeddings to capture a meaningful facet.", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp khác đã được đề nghị cho các tổ chức học tập nhập từ mô tả văn bản. Những sự gắn kết này thường được sử dụng cho các thực thể có tính chất dẫn dụ, nghiên cứu về thực thể, và cung cấp kiến thức nền vào kiến trúc thần kinh. Những sự nhúng đầu đơn hầu như là một mật mã gọn của một mối quan hệ giống nhau, nhưng điểm chung là một khái niệm phức tạp. Bằng cách đại diện các thực thể như một cỗ máy độc lập, các phương pháp tồn tại để phụ thuộc vào các ứng dụng nối để xác định các mặt khác nhau, và chọn các mặt hợp nhất. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mà thay vào đó học nhiều véc- tơ cho mỗi thực thể, mỗi thứ tự chọn một khía cạnh khác nhau của miền được xem xét. Chúng tôi dùng thảo luận của các chuyên gia để cùng nhau học những cài ghép này. Những tổ chức khác nhau được học sử dụng một biến thể của mô hình GloVe, nó có lợi thế dễ dàng xác định các thuộc tính được mô hình đúng theo kiểu của sự gia nhập đã học. Việc này được khai thác bởi một mạng lưới phân tích gắn kết, dùng các cỗ máy phát từ được đào tạo trước để khuyến khích các thuộc tính được mô hình hóa bởi sự nhúng tay đã được tạo ra để có thể theo ngữ nghĩa, tức là khuyến khích mỗi sự nhúng tay cá nhân nắm bắt một mặt có ý nghĩa.', 'bg': 'Вече са предложени различни методи за вграждане на учебни обекти от текстови описания. Такива вграждания обикновено се използват за извличане на свойства на субекти, за препоръки и ориентирано към субекти търсене, както и за инжектиране на фонови знания в неврални архитектури, наред с други. Интегрираните елементи по същество служат като компактно кодиране на сходна връзка, но сходството е по своята същност многостранно понятие. Като представят entiтетите като единични вектори, съществуващите методи оставят на приложенията надолу по веригата да идентифицират тези различни аспекти и да изберат най-подходящите. В тази статия предлагаме модел, който вместо това научава няколко вектора за всяко същество, всеки от които интуитивно улавя различен аспект на разглеждания домейн. Ние използваме смес от експерти формулировка, за да научим съвместно тези фасетни специфични вграждания. Индивидуалните вграждания на единици се научават с помощта на вариант на модела който има предимството, че лесно можем да идентифицираме кои свойства са моделирани добре в кои от научените вграждания. Това се експлоатира от свързана мрежа за свързване, която използва предварително обучени вектори на думи, за да насърчи свойствата, моделирани от дадено вграждане, да бъдат семантично съгласувани, т.е. да насърчи всяко отделно вграждане да улови смислен аспект.', 'hr': 'Već su predložene različite metode za učenje objekata iz tekstskih opisa. Takve integracije se uobičajeno koriste za ulaganje vlasništva subjekta, za preporuku i pretragu usmjerenu na entitet i za ubrizgavanje pozadinskih znanja u neuralne arhitekture, među ostalim. Unajmljenje podataka u suštini služe kao kompaktno kodiranje odnosa sličnosti, ali sličnost je inherentno višelicna pojma. Predstavljajući subjekte kao jedinstvene vektore, postojeće metode dopuštaju da snize aplikacije kako bi identifikovali te različite lica i odabrali najvažnije. U ovom papiru predlažemo model koji umjesto toga nauči nekoliko vektora za svaku entitet, od kojih svaka intuitivno uhvati različit aspekt razmatranog domena. Koristimo formulaciju mješavine stručnjaka kako bi zajedno naučili te ugrađenje specifičnih lica. Osobni objekti se uče koristeći variant model a Glove, koja ima prednost koju možemo lako identificirati koje su vlasništvo dobro modelirane u kojoj su naučene integracije. To iskorištava povezana mreža prijevoza, koja koristi predobučene riječne vektore kako bi potaknula vlasništva koje su modelirane određenim prijevozom da bude semantički saskaņovana, tj. da bi potaknula svaku od pojedinačnih prijevoza kako bi uhvatila smisleno lice.', 'nl': 'Er zijn al verschillende methoden voorgesteld voor het inbedden van leerentiteiten uit tekstbeschrijvingen. Dergelijke embeddings worden vaak gebruikt voor het afleiden van eigenschappen van entiteiten, voor aanbeveling en entiteitsgericht zoeken, en voor het injecteren van achtergrondkennis in neurale architecturen, onder andere. Entity embeddings dienen in wezen als een compacte codering van een gelijkenisrelatie, maar gelijkenis is een inherent veelzijdige notie. Door entiteiten als afzonderlijke vectoren te vertegenwoordigen, laten bestaande methoden het aan downstreamtoepassingen over om deze verschillende facetten te identificeren en de meest relevante te selecteren. In dit artikel stellen we een model voor dat in plaats daarvan meerdere vectoren leert voor elke entiteit, die elk intuïtief een ander aspect van het overwogen domein vastlegt. We gebruiken een mix van experts om deze facet-specifieke embeddings gezamenlijk te leren. De individuele entiteitsinbeddingen worden geleerd met behulp van een variant van het GloVe model, wat als voordeel heeft dat we gemakkelijk kunnen identificeren welke eigenschappen goed gemodelleerd zijn in welke van de geleerde inbeddingen. Dit wordt uitgebuit door een geassocieerd gating netwerk, dat vooraf getrainde woordvectoren gebruikt om de eigenschappen die door een bepaalde embedding worden gemodelleerd aan te moedigen semantisch coherent te zijn, d.w.z. om elk van de individuele embeddings aan te moedigen om een zinvol facet vast te leggen.', 'da': 'Der er allerede foreslået forskellige metoder til indlejring af enheder fra tekstbeskrivelser. Sådanne indlejringer bruges almindeligt til at udlede egenskaber af enheder, til anbefaling og entitetsorienteret søgning, og til at injicere baggrundsviden i neurale arkitekturer, blandt andre. Enhedsindlejringer tjener hovedsageligt som en kompakt kodning af en lighedsrelation, men lighed er en i sig selv multifacetteret begreb. Ved at repræsentere enheder som enkelte vektorer overlader eksisterende metoder det til downstream applikationer at identificere disse forskellige facetter og vælge de mest relevante. I denne artikel foreslår vi en model, der i stedet lærer flere vektorer for hver enhed, som intuitivt fanger et andet aspekt af det betragtede domæne. Vi bruger en blanding af eksperter formulering til i fællesskab at lære disse facetspecifikke indlejringer. De enkelte entitetsindlejringer læres ved hjælp af en variant af GloVe modellen, hvilket har den fordel, at vi nemt kan identificere, hvilke egenskaber der er modelleret godt i hvilke af de lærte indlejringer. Dette udnyttes af et tilknyttet gating-netværk, som bruger forududdannede ordvektorer til at opfordre de egenskaber, der er modelleret af en given indlejring til at være semantisk sammenhængende, dvs. til at opfordre hver enkelt indlejring til at fange en meningsfuld facet.', 'de': 'Für die Einbettung von Lerneinheiten aus Textbeschreibungen wurden bereits verschiedene Methoden vorgeschlagen. Solche Einbettungen werden unter anderem für die Ableitung von Eigenschaften von Entitäten, für empfehlungs- und entitätsorientierte Suche und für die Injektion von Hintergrundwissen in neuronale Architekturen verwendet. Entitäteneinbettungen dienen im Wesentlichen als kompakte Kodierung einer Ähnlichkeitsbeziehung, aber Ähnlichkeit ist ein inhärent vielschichtiger Begriff. Durch die Darstellung von Entitäten als einzelne Vektoren überlässt es bestehende Methoden nachgelagerten Anwendungen, diese verschiedenen Facetten zu identifizieren und die relevantesten auszuwählen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein Modell vor, das stattdessen mehrere Vektoren für jede Entität lernt, von denen jeder intuitiv einen anderen Aspekt der betrachteten Domäne erfasst. Wir nutzen eine Mischung aus Experten, um diese facettenspezifischen Einbettungen gemeinsam zu erlernen. Die einzelnen Entity-Einbettungen werden anhand einer Variante des GloVe-Modells gelernt, was den Vorteil hat, dass wir leicht identifizieren können, welche Eigenschaften in welcher der gelernten Einbettungen gut modelliert werden. Dies wird von einem zugehörigen Gating-Netzwerk ausgenutzt, das vorgetrainierte Wortvektoren verwendet, um die Eigenschaften, die durch eine gegebene Einbettung modelliert werden, semantisch kohärent zu machen, d.h. um jede einzelne Einbettung zu ermutigen, eine sinnvolle Facette zu erfassen.', 'id': 'Berbagai metode telah diusulkan untuk mempelajari embedding entitas dari deskripsi teks. Penampilan tersebut biasanya digunakan untuk menyimpulkan properti entitas, untuk rekomendasi dan pencarian orientasi entitas, dan untuk menyuntik pengetahuan latar belakang ke arsitektur saraf, diantara lainnya. Entity embeddings essentially serve as a compact encoding of a similarity relation, but similarity is an inherently multi-faceted notion.  Dengan mewakili entitas sebagai vektor tunggal, metode yang ada meninggalkannya pada aplikasi turun untuk mengidentifikasi wajah yang berbeda ini, dan untuk memilih yang paling relevan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model yang sebaliknya mempelajari beberapa vektor untuk setiap entitas, masing-masing intuitif menangkap aspek yang berbeda dari domain yang dianggap. Kami menggunakan formulasi campuran-ahli untuk bersama-sama belajar bentuk spesifik-facet ini. Pencampuran entitas individu belajar menggunakan varian dari model GloVe, yang memiliki keuntungan bahwa kita dapat mudah mengidentifikasi properti yang dimodelkan dengan baik di mana penyampuran belajar. Ini dieksploitasi oleh jaringan gating yang terkait, yang menggunakan vektor kata yang dilatih-dilatih untuk mendorong properti yang dipodelkan oleh penerbangan tertentu untuk semantis konsisten, i.e. untuk mendorong setiap penerbangan individu untuk menangkap facet yang berarti.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای مختلف پیشنهاد داده شده است برای یادگیری از توصیف\u200cهای متن شرکت\u200cهای entities. این وسیله\u200cها معمولا برای تعیین ویژه\u200cهای اجتماعی، برای توصیف و جستجوی به عنوان یک اجتماعی، و برای تزریق علم پشتیبانی به معماری عصبی، بین دیگر استفاده می\u200cشوند. شرکت\u200cهایی در اصل به عنوان یک رمزبندی پیچیده از ارتباط شبیه\u200cای خدمت می\u200cکنند، ولی شبیه\u200cسازی یک فکری مختلف است. با توجه به عنوان یک ویکتور، روش\u200cهای موجود آن را برای شناسایی این چهره\u200cهای مختلف به پایین\u200cترین کاربردها می\u200cگذارند و برای انتخاب کردن مهمترین\u200cها. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به جای آن چند ویکتور را برای هر یک واحد یاد می\u200cگیرد، هر یک از آن به طور نظیر یک منطقه متفاوتی از دامنه\u200cای که به نظر می\u200cرسد را گرفته می\u200cشود. ما از یک فرمول مختلف متخصص استفاده می کنیم تا با هم این وسیله\u200cهای مختلف صورت را یاد بگیریم. استفاده از متفاوت مدل گلووی یاد گرفته می\u200cشود که می\u200cتوانیم به آسانی مشخص کنیم که کدام ویژه\u200cهای خوب در کدام یک مدل یاد گرفته می\u200cشوند. این استفاده از یک شبکه درگیری ارتباطی است که از ویکتورهای کلمه پیش آموزش داده شده استفاده می\u200cکند تا ویژگی\u200cهایی را که توسط یک درگیری داده شده مدول می\u200cکند به عنوان نسبتا هماهنگ باشد، یعنی برای تشویق هر یک از انجمن\u200cهای فردی تا یک صورت معنی بگیرد.', 'ko': '텍스트 묘사에서 실체가 삽입되는 것을 배우는 여러 가지 방법이 이미 제기되었다.이런 삽입은 일반적으로 실체의 속성을 추정하고 추천하며 실체를 대상으로 하는 검색, 배경 지식을 신경 구조에 주입하는 데 쓰인다.실체 삽입은 본질적으로 비슷한 관계의 치밀한 인코딩이지만 유사성은 본질적으로 다방면의 개념이다.실체를 단일 벡터로 표시함으로써 기존의 방법은 하류 응용 프로그램이 이러한 서로 다른 부분을 식별하고 가장 관련된 부분을 선택하도록 한다.본고에서 우리는 하나의 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 모든 실체가 여러 개의 벡터를 학습하고 각 벡터는 고려하는 영역의 다양한 측면을 직관적으로 포착한다.우리는 전문가 공식을 혼합해서 이런 방면의 특정한 삽입을 공동으로 배운다.장갑 모형의 변체를 사용하여 단일 실체 삽입을 학습하는데 그 장점은 우리가 어떤 속성이 학습의 삽입에서 모델링이 양호한지 쉽게 확인할 수 있다는 것이다.관련 선택 네트워크는 이 점을 이용했다. 이는 미리 훈련된 어향량을 사용하여 삽입된 모델링의 속성이 의미적으로 일치하도록 격려한다. 즉, 모든 단독 삽입이 의미 있는 부분을 포획하도록 격려한다.', 'sw': 'Tamko mbalimbali tayari zimependekezwa kwa ajili ya kujifunza vifaa vinavyoingia kwenye maelezo ya maandishi. Such embeddings are commonly used for inferring properties of entities, for recommendation and entity-oriented search, and for injecting background knowledge into neural architectures, among others.  Ujumbe unaoendelea kwa kiasi kikubwa unatumika kama mfumo wa kubuni wa uhusiano wa usawa, lakini sawa ni wazo linalokabiliwa na watu wengi. Kwa kuwawakilisha vifaa kama vector moja, njia zilizopo zinaiacha kutumia matumizi ya chini ya mto kutambua sura hizi tofauti, na kuchagua vyenye muhimu zaidi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mtindo ambao badala yake hujifunza vectori kadhaa kwa kila entity, kila mmoja anachukua kwa ufanisi wa namna tofauti ya maeneo yanayochukuliwa. Tunatumia mchanganyiko wa wataalam wa pamoja ili kujifunza mazingira haya maalum ya facebook. Kuingiliwa kwa vifaa binafsi hujifunza kwa kutumia tofauti ya mifano ya GloVe, ambayo in a faida kwamba tunaweza kutambua vifaa vipi vizuri vinavyoundwa vizuri na nani kati ya wale waliojifunza. Hii inatumiwa na mtandao wa usafiri unaohusika, ambalo hutumia vectors wa maneno yaliyo na mafunzo ya awali ili kuhamasisha utaratibu ambao unaonyeshwa na kiungo kinachopewa ili kuwa na ushirikiano wa kimapenzi, yaani kuhamasisha kila mmoja aliyefungua sura inayomaanisha.', 'tr': 'Metin deskriplerinden bir näçe wajyp öwrenmek üçin öwrenmek üçin täzeden üýtgedildi. Bütin ýagdaýlar birnäçe taýýarlaryň häsiýetlerini çykarmak üçin, maslahatlar we entitet orientatly gözlemek üçin ullanýar we arkada bilgileri neiral arhitekturlaryna sykynlamak üçin ullanýar. Maksad gaýşartmalar görnöşinde bir sykyn bir baglaýyşyň kompakt ködlemesi hökmünde ködlemeler, ýöne meýdança bir näpli yüzlü düşündirildir. Bir vektör olary çalşyrak bilen, bar ähli işlemlerde bu farklı suratlary tanyşdyrmak üçin we iň möhüm işlemleri saýlamak üçin puşlar. Bu kağıt içinde, her bir madde birkaç vektör öğrenmesinin yerine, her biri düşünen domenin farklı noktasını alır. Biz bu facet-iň takyky düzmekleri bilen öwrenmek üçin karışyk uzmanlaryň formasyny ulanýarys. Galak guramlary Glove modeliniň wariantyny ulanyp öwrenip bilýär. Bu biziň özümiziň gowy görkezilen hasaplarynyň haýsysynda gowy görkezilýän zadyny a ňsatjag tanap bileris. Bu, bilinen gating a ğ tarafından kullanılır ve bilinen bir i çeri tarafından örneklendirilen özellikleri semantik bir araya getirmek için bilinen kelime vektörleri kullanır.Yani, her birini anlamlı bir yüzü yakalamak için desteklenmek için kullanılan bir gating ağ tarafından kullanılır.', 'af': "Verskeie metodes het reeds voorgestel vir leer entiteit inbêring van teks beskrywings. Hierdie inbêdings word gewoonlik gebruik om eienskappe van entiteite te verwyder, vir aanbeveling en entiteitorienteerde soek en vir agtergrond kennis in neurale arkitektuure, tussen ander. Entiteit inbêding bedien essensieel as 'n kompakte enkodering van 'n gelykenis verhouding, maar gelykenis is 'n inherent multi-gesig notie. Deur entiteite as enkele vektore te verteenwoordig, laat bestaande metodes dit laat gaan na onderstreem toepassings om hierdie verskillende aangesigte te identifiseer en die mees relevante metodes te kies. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n model wat in plaas leer verskeie vektores vir elke entiteit, elkeen van wat intuitief 'n ander aspekt van die aangeneem domein opneem. Ons gebruik 'n mixture-of-experts formulasie om hierdie aangesig-spesifieke inbêding te leer. Die individuele entiteit inbettings word geleer deur 'n variant van die Glove model te gebruik, wat het die voordeel wat ons maklik kan identifiseer watter eienskappe goed modelleer word in watter van die geleerde inbettings. Hierdie is uitgebruik deur 'n geassosieerde gating netwerk, wat gebruik voor-oefen woord vektore om die eienskappe wat deur 'n gegewe inbêding modelleer word om semantiese koerend te wees, t.d. om elke van die individuele inbêding te bevestig om 'n betekende gesig te vang.", 'sq': 'Metoda të ndryshme janë propozuar tashmë për përfshirjen e njësive mësuese nga përshkrimet e tekstit. Të tilla përfshirje përdoren zakonisht për të përfshirë pronësitë e njësive, për rekomandime dhe kërkime të orientuara ndaj njësive dhe për të injektuar njohuri të sfondit në arkitektura nervore, midis të tjerëve. Ndërtesat e njësisë shërbejnë në thelb si një kodim kompakt i një marrëdhënie të ngjashme, por ngjashmëria është një koncept me shumëfaqe. Duke përfaqësuar njësitë si vektorë të vetme, metodat ekzistuese e lënë atë në aplikimet poshtë rrjedhës për të identifikuar këto aspekte të ndryshme dhe për të zgjedhur ato më të rëndësishme. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model që në vend të kësaj mëson disa vektorë për çdo njësi, secila prej të cilave intuitivisht kapet një aspekt tjetër të domenit të konsideruar. Ne përdorim një përzierje të ekspertëve për të mësuar së bashku këto përzierje specifike. Ndërtesat individuale të njësisë mësohen duke përdorur një variant të modelit GloVe, i cili ka përparësinë që mund të identifikojmë lehtë cilët prona janë modeluar mirë në cilën nga përfshirjet e mësuara. This is exploited by an associated gating network, which uses pre-trained word vectors to encourage the properties that are modelled by a given embedding to be semantically coherent, i.e. to encourage each of the individual embeddings to capture a meaningful facet.', 'hy': "Տարբեր մեթոդներ արդեն առաջարկվել են տեքստի նկարագրություններից ներառվող ուսուցման միավորների համար: Այս ներդրումները սովորաբար օգտագործվում են առանձնահատկությունների հետևանքների, խորհուրդների և առանձնահատուկ որոնման համար, ինչպես նաև նյարդային ճարտարապետությունների մեջ ներարտադրելու համար: Entity embeddings essentially serve as a compact encoding of a similarity relation, but similarity is an inherently multi-faceted notion.  Եթե միավորները ներկայացնենք որպես միակ վեկտոր, գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները թողնում են այն ներքևի ծրագրերին, որպեսզի բացահայտեն այս տարբեր կողմերը և ընտրեն ամենակարևոր կողմերը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որը փոխարենը սովորում է տարբեր վեկտորներ յուրաքանչյուր անհատականության համար, որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը ինտուիտիվ ընկալում է հաշվի առկա վայրի տարբեր ասպեկտները: Մենք օգտագործում ենք մասնագետների խառնուրդ ձևավորում, որպեսզի միասին սովորենք այս կոնֆեկտիվ ներդրումները: Հիմնական էության ներդրումները սովորվում են օգտագործելով Global մոդելի տարբերակը, որը ունի առավելություն, որ մենք հեշտությամբ կարող ենք բացահայտել, թե որպիսի հատկություններ լավ են մոդելավորված սովորված ներդրումներից որտեղ: Սա օգտագործվում է կապված գետինգ ցանցի կողմից, որը օգտագործում է նախապատրաստված բառերի վեկտորներ' խրախուսելու այն հատկությունները, որոնք ձևավորվում են տվյալ ներառման միջոցով, որպեսզի լինեն սեմանտիկ կոնցենտիկ, այսինքն' խրախուսելու անհատական ներառումներից յուրաքանչյուրը", 'bn': 'টেক্সট বর্ণনা থেকে বিভিন্ন বস্তুকে শিখার জন্য ইতোমধ্যে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। সুপারিশ এবং বস্তুর পরিচালিত অনুসন্ধানের জন্য এবং অন্যদের মধ্যে নিউরুল আর্কিটিকেটে পটভূমির জ্ঞান প্রবেশ করার জন্য সাধারণত বিষয়বস্তুর বৈশি প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলো প্রধানভাবে একই সম্পর্কের কোম্পেক্ট এনকোডিং হিসেবে সাহায্য করে, কিন্তু একই ধরনের অন্তর্ভুক্ত এক ধারণা। একটি ভেক্টর হিসেবে বস্তুকে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার মাধ্যমে বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন মুখোমুখি চিহ্নিত করার জন্য এবং সবচেয়ে বেশী প্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যে পরিবর্তে প্রত্যেক বস্তুর জন্য বেশ কিছু ভেক্টর শিখতে পারে, যেখানে প্রত্যেকটি উল্লেখযোগ্ আমরা এক মিশ্রিয়-অফ-বিশেষজ্ঞদের ব্যবহার করি যাতে এই ফেসবুক-নির্দিষ্ট প্রতিবেদন শিখতে পারি। গ্লোভের মডেলের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রতিষ্ঠান শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যার সুবিধা আছে যে আমরা সহজে পরিচয় করতে পারি কোন বৈশিষ্ট্যে একটি সম্পর্কিত গেটিং নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা এটি ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, যা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ভেক্টর ব্যবহার করে একটি প্রদত্ত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য উৎসাহিত করতে পারে, যেটি দ', 'az': 'Mətn tanımlamalarından dəyişiklik tərzlərini öyrənmək üçün çox cür metodlar təklif edilmişdir. Bütün bunlar, təsirlər və təsirlər tərəfindən təsirlənmək üçün, arxa plan bilgiləri nöral arhitektələrinə təsirlənmək üçün yayınlaşırlar. Entity inşalları əslində bənzər bir bağlantının kompakt kodlaması kimi istifadə edir, amma bənzər bir çoxlu yüzlü fikirdir. Bütün vektörlər kimi təsdiqləyici olaraq, mövcud metodlar bu cür üzlərini tanıtmaq və ən mövcud olanları seçmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edərlər. Bu kağızda, hər bir şey üçün bir neçə vektör öyrəndiyi modeli təklif edirik, hər birinin düşünülmüş domenin başqa hissəsini intuitiv edər. Biz bu cüzələri birlikdə öyrənmək üçün müxtəlif xəbərdarlıqlar formülünü istifadə edirik. Bütün məlumatlar Glove model in in variablarını istifadə edərək öyrənirlər. Bu, öyrəndiyimiz məlumatlardan hansı özelliklərin yaxşı modelləşdirilməsini asanlıqla tanıyabiliriz. Bu, müəyyən edilmiş söz vektörlərini, semantik müəyyən olmaq üçün modelləşdirilmiş xüsusiyyətləri təşkil etmək üçün, əlbəttə, hər birini təşkil etmək üçün təşkil edilmiş söz vektörlərindən istifadə edir.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ጽሑፎች ማስተማር አካሄዱን ለመማር የተዘጋጀ ሁኔታ ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ እንደነዚህ አካባቢዎች አካባቢዎች፣ ማስታወቂያ እና አካባቢ እውቀትን ለመግለጽ እና ለሌሎችም የደዌብ መሠረት እውቀትን ለመስጠት ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ Entity embeddings essentially serve as a compact encoding of a similarity relation, but similarity is an inherently multi-faceted notion.  አካባቢዎችን እንደ አንዲት መንገዶች በማሳየት፣ የሚኖሩት ሥርዓቶች እነዚህን የተለያዩ ፊቶችን ለማሳየት እና የተጠቃሚ ተሟጋቾችን ለመምረጥ ይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለሁሉም አካባቢ ብዙ መንገዶች የሚማር ምሳሌ እናስባለን፣ እያንዳንዳቸውም በተወሰነ የዶሜን መልክ በተለየ ነው፡፡ እነዚህን የፌስቡት አካባቢዎች ለመማር በተጨማሪነት እናስቀራለን፡፡ የአንዱ አካባቢ ግንኙነት የGloVe ሞዴል በተለየ ይማራሉ፤ የትኛውም ምርጫዎች የትኛውን አካባቢ መሆኑን እናውቃለን፡፡ ይህ የተጠቃሚ የንግግር መረብ ነው፣ የፊተኛውን የቃላት መቃኛ vectors የሚጠቅመውን የስርዓት አካባቢ በክፍል የተመሳሰሉትን አካባቢ እንዲያበረት ነው፡፡', 'ca': "Ja s'han proposat diversos mètodes per a incorporar entitats d'aprenentatge a partir de descripcions de text. Aquestes incorporacions s'utilitzen comunament per inferir propietats d'entitats, per recomanar i buscar orientades a entitats, i per injectar coneixements de fons en arquitectures neuronals, entre altres. L'incorporació d'entitats serveix essencialment com una codificació compact a d'una relació de similitud, però la similitud és una noció inherentment multifacetada. Representant les entitats com a vetors únics, els mètodes existents deixan a aplicacions avall identificar aquestes diferents facetes i seleccionar les més rellevants. En aquest paper, proposem un model que en canvi aprenen diversos vectors per cada entitat, cada una de les quals intuïtivament captura un aspecte diferent del domini considerat. Utilitzem una formulació de combinació d'experts per aprendre conjuntament aquestes incorporacions específices per aspectes. The individual entity embeddings are learned using a variant of the GloVe model, which has the advantage that we can easily identify which properties are modelled well in which of the learned embeddings.  Això és explotat per una xarxa gating associada, que utilitza vectors de paraules pré-entrenats per animar les propietats modelades per una incorporació determinada per ser semànticament coherents, és a dir, per animar cada una de les incorporacions individuals a capturar una faceta significativa.", 'cs': 'Byly již navrženy různé metody pro vkládání výukových entit z textových popisů. Takové vložení se běžně používají mimo jiné pro odvozování vlastností entit, pro doporučení a entity orientované vyhledávání a pro vkládání pozadí znalostí do neuronových architektur. Vložení entit slouží v podstatě jako kompaktní kódování podobnostního vztahu, ale podobnost je z podstaty mnohostranný pojem. Představením entit jako jednotlivých vektorů, existující metody ponechávají následným aplikacím identifikovat tyto různé aspekty a vybrat ty nejdůležitější. V tomto článku navrhujeme model, který se místo toho naučí několik vektorů pro každou entitu, z nichž každý intuitivně zachycuje jiný aspekt uvažované domény. Používáme směs odborníků formulaci, abychom se společně naučili tyto aspektově specifické vložení. Vložení jednotlivých entit se naučí pomocí varianty GloVe modelu, což má tu výhodu, že můžeme snadno identifikovat, které vlastnosti jsou modelovány dobře ve kterém z naučených vložení. Toho využívá přidružená gatingová síť, která používá předem trénované slovní vektory k podpoře vlastností, které jsou modelovány daným vložením, aby byly sémanticky koherentní, tj. aby povzbudily každé z jednotlivých vložení k zachycení smysluplného aspektu.', 'bs': 'Već su predložene različite metode za uključenje entiteta iz tekstskih opisa. Takve integracije se uobičajeno koriste za ulaganje vlasništva entitata, za preporuku i pretragu orijentiranu na entitate, i za ubrizgavanje pozadinskih znanja u neuralne arhitekture, među ostalim. Udruženje podataka u suštini služi kao kompaktno kodiranje odnosa sličnosti, ali sličnost je posebno višelicna ideja. Predstavljajući entitate kao jedinstvene vektore, postojeće metode ostavljaju ga da spusti aplikacije da identifikuju te različite lica i da izaberete najvažnije. U ovom papiru predlažemo model koji umjesto toga nauči nekoliko vektora za svaku entitet, svaka od kojih intuitivno uhvati drugačiji aspekt domena. Koristimo formulaciju mješavine stručnjaka kako bi zajedno naučili te integracije specifičnih lica. Individualni integraciji se uče koristeći variant model a Glove, koja ima prednost koju možemo lako identificirati koje su vlasništvo dobro modelirane u kojoj su naučene integracije. To koristi povezana mreža prijevoza, koja koristi predobučeni vektori riječi kako bi ohrabrila vlasništvo koje se modeliraju određenim prijevozom da bude semantički saskaņovano, tj. da bi poticala svaku od pojedinačnih prijevoza da uhvati smisleno lice.', 'et': 'Tekstikirjeldustest õppeüksuste manustamiseks on juba välja pakutud mitmeid meetodeid. Selliseid manustamisi kasutatakse tavaliselt olemite omaduste järeldamiseks, soovituste ja olemile orienteeritud otsinguteks ning taustateadmiste süstimiseks neuraalarhitektuuridesse. Olemi manustamine on sisuliselt sarnasuse suhte kompaktne kodeering, kuid sarnasus on olemuslikult mitmekülgne mõiste. Olemasolevad meetodid, mis esindavad olemeid üksikute vektoritena, jätavad nende erinevate tahkude tuvastamise ja kõige asjakohasemate väljavalimise järgnevate rakenduste hooleks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja mudeli, mis selle asemel õpib iga olemi kohta mitu vektorit, millest igaüks hõlmab intuitiivselt vaatlusaluse domeeni erineva aspekti. Kasutame ekspertide segu, et ühiselt õppida neid aspektispetsiifilisi manustamisi. Üksikute olendite manustamist õppitakse GloVe mudeli variandi abil, mille eeliseks on see, et saame hõlpsasti tuvastada, millised omadused on hästi modelleeritud millises õppitud manustamises. Seda kasutab ära seotud väravavõrk, mis kasutab eelnevalt väljaõpetatud sõnavaktoreid, et julgustada konkreetse manustamisega modelleeritud omadusi semantiliselt sidusaks, st julgustada iga üksiku manustamisega seotud aspekti hõlmama.', 'fi': 'Tekstikuvauksista on jo ehdotettu erilaisia menetelmiä oppimiskokonaisuuksien upottamiseen. Tällaisia upotuksia käytetään yleisesti entiteettien ominaisuuksien päättelyyn, suositus- ja entiteettihakuun sekä taustatiedon syöttämiseen neuroarkkitehtuuriin. Entiteettiupotukset toimivat lähinnä samankaltaisuussuhteen kompaktina koodauksena, mutta samankaltaisuus on luonnostaan monipuolinen käsite. Esittämällä entiteettejä yksittäisinä vektoreina nykyiset menetelmät jättävät jatkojalostuksen sovellusten tehtäväksi tunnistaa nämä eri näkökohdat ja valita sopivimmat. Tässä työssä ehdotamme mallia, joka sen sijaan oppii useita vektoreita kullekin entiteetille, joista jokainen intuitiivisesti kaappaa tarkasteltavan toimialueen eri aspektin. Käytämme asiantuntijoiden yhdistelmää oppiaksemme yhdessä nämä aspektikohtaiset upotukset. Yksilölliset entiteettiupotukset opitaan GloVe-mallin muunnoksella, jonka etuna on, että voimme helposti tunnistaa, mitkä ominaisuudet mallinnetaan hyvin missä opituissa upotuksissa. Tätä hyödyntää liitännäisverkosto, joka käyttää ennalta koulutettuja sanavektoreita kannustaakseen tietyllä upotuksella mallinnettuja ominaisuuksia semanttisesti johdonmukaisiksi eli kannustaakseen jokaista yksittäistä upotusta ottamaan huomioon merkityksellinen osa.', 'he': 'כבר הציעו שיטות שונות ללמוד נקודות מתיאורי טקסט. תוכניות כאלה משתמשות בדרך כלל למוציאת תכונות של יחידות, למלצה וחיפוש ממוקד על יחידות, ולהזריק ידע רקע לארכיטקטורות עצביות, בין אחרות. תוכניות יחידות בעצם משמשות כקוד חום של יחסי דומה, אבל דומה היא רעיון מורכב פנים. על ידי מייצג יחידות כווקטורים בודדים, שיטות קיימות משאירות אותה ליישומים למטה לזהות את הפינקטים השונים האלה, ולבחר את הפינקטים הרלוונטיים ביותר. In this paper, we propose a model that instead learns several vectors for each entity, each of which intuitively captures a different aspect of the considered domain.  אנו משתמשים במערכת של מומחים כדי ללמוד ביחד את התערבות המסופרות על פנים אלה. היחידות היחידות המולמדות באמצעות שינוי של מודל גלובה, שיש לו יתרון שאנחנו יכולים לזהות בקלות אילו תכונות מודלים היטב באיזה מהתוכניות המולמדות. This is exploited by an associated gating network, which uses pre-trained word vectors to encourage the properties that are modelled by a given embedding to be semantically coherent, i.e. to encourage each of the individual embeddings to capture a meaningful facet.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness embedding Entty Jejaring In this paper, we proposal a model that instead of Learns Multiple vectors for every unit, every of that entwisically Captes a new perspective of the contextual domain. Awak dhéwé nggunakake karbote-karbote punika ingkang ngerasakno karo pakan-pakan. embedding politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': "An riga an buƙata wasu shiryoyin ayuka da aka sanar da masu cikin tsarin rubutu. Yi amfani da wannan embargo ana yi amfani da su zartar da properties na abun-abun, wa'anar shawarar da kuma da kuma a shigar da ilmi na bangon cikin tsarin neura, da wasu. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Ina nuna abun kamar shiryoyi guda, za'a bar metoden da ke cikin shirin ayuka masu buƙata don ya gane wasu fuskõki daban-daban, kuma za'a zãɓe su masu da muhimmi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata motsi da za'a sanar da wasu shiryoyi wa duk abubuwa, inda kowace ta kãma wani wuni na daban da aka yi bincike. Tuna amfani da wani abu mai haɗa-masu fitarwa dõmin mu sanar da waɗannan bakwai-bayani. An sanar da kewayen abun mutum guda a yi amfani da wani variant na shirin GloV, wanda yana da amfani da shi wanda za mu iya iya gane ko da sauƙi a gane wa wanne takardan kayan da za'a samar da shi masu buƙata. Wannan an a amfani da wani shirin mai haɗa zuwa zuwa garwaya, wanda ke yi amfani da shiryoyi masu yin wa'amar magana ta gabã ɗaya dõmin su yi wa'amar amfani da properties wanda aka yi motsi da shi ya zama mai haɗi da shi na semantically, misali, dõmin ya ƙara kowace fanikin filen da ke da muhimu.", 'sk': 'Predlagane so že različne metode za vdelavo učnih entitet iz opisov besedila. Takšne vdelave se pogosto uporabljajo za sklepanje lastnosti entitet, za priporočilo in entitetno usmerjeno iskanje ter za vbrizganje ozadja v nevralne arhitekture, med drugim. Vgradnje entitet v bistvu služijo kot kompaktno kodiranje podobnega razmerja, vendar je podobnost sama po sebi večplasten pojem. S predstavljanjem entitet kot posameznih vektorjev obstoječe metode prepuščajo aplikacijam nadaljnje verige, da identificirajo te različne vidike in izberejo najpomembnejše. V prispevku predlagamo model, ki se namesto tega nauči več vektorjev za vsako entiteto, od katerih vsak intuitivno zajame drugačen vidik obravnavane domene. Uporabljamo mešanico strokovnjakov za skupno učenje teh fasetnih vgradnj. Vgradnje posameznih entitet se naučimo z uporabo različice modela GloVe, ki ima prednost, da lahko preprosto prepoznamo, katere lastnosti so dobro modelirane v kateri od naučenih vgradnj. To izkorišča povezano omrežje za prehode, ki uporablja vnaprej usposobljene besedne vektorje za spodbujanje semantično koherentnih lastnosti, ki jih modelira določena vdelava, tj. za spodbujanje vsake posamezne vdelave, da zajame pomemben vidik.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནས་དབུལ་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་ནས་དབུལ་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདྲ་བ་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ཚར་བ གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་དག་ནི་དབུགས་ཀྱི་ངོ་བོ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པ། Entity embeddings essentially serve as a compact encoding of a similarity relation, but similarity is an inherently multi-faced notion. དབུལ་དག་ཚང་དག་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་དང་གནས་ཡུལ In this paper, we propose a model that instead learns several vectors for each entity, each of which intuitively captures a different aspect of the considered domain. ང་ཚོས་གདོང་རིས་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱད་ནས་ ཨ་རིའི་གཞུང་ཚབ་ཀྱིས་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ། འདི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ།'}
{'en': 'Classifier Probes May Just Learn from Linear Context Features', 'ar': 'قد تتعلم مجسات المصنف فقط من ميزات السياق الخطي', 'es': 'Las sondas clasificadoras pueden aprender de las funciones de contexto lineal', 'fr': 'Les sondes de classification peuvent simplement apprendre des caractéristiques contextuelles linéaires', 'pt': 'As sondas do classificador podem aprender com os recursos de contexto linear', 'ja': '分類子プローブは、線形コンテキスト機能から学ぶことができます', 'ru': 'Зонды классификатора могут просто учиться на линейных контекстных особенностях', 'zh': '分类器探测器盖从线性上下文特徵中学也', 'hi': 'क्लासिफायर प्रोब सिर्फ रैखिक संदर्भ सुविधाओं से सीख सकते हैं', 'ga': 'Is féidir le Tóraithe Aicmitheora Foghlaim ach ó Ghnéithe Comhthéacs Líneach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Οι ανιχνευτές ταξινομητών μπορεί να μάθουν ακριβώς από τα χαρακτηριστικά γραμμικού πλαισίου', 'hu': 'Az osztályozó szondák csak tanulhatnak a lineáris kontextusból', 'it': 'Le sonde degli annunci possono semplicemente imparare dalle caratteristiche del contesto lineare', 'lt': 'Classifier Probes May Just Learn from Linear Context Features', 'mk': 'Класификаторските сонди можат само да научат од линијарните карактеристики на контекст', 'ms': 'Ujian Klasifikasi Boleh Belajar Dari Ciri-ciri Konteks Linear', 'mt': 'Classifier Probes May Just Learn from Linear Context Features', 'ml': 'Classifier Probes May Just Learn from Linear Context Features', 'no': 'Klassifikatorprober kan berre lære frå lineær kontekstfunksjonar', 'pl': 'Sondy klasyfikacyjne mogą po prostu uczyć się z funkcji kontekstu liniowego', 'kk': 'Классификатор сынақтары сызық контекстің мүмкіндіктерінен оқып бере алады', 'sr': 'Klasifikatorske probe mogu samo naučiti iz linijskog konteksta.', 'ro': 'Sondele de clasificare pot învăța doar din caracteristicile contextului liniar', 'so': 'Dhibaatooyinka tababarka', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Klassificeringssonder kan bara lära sig av linjära kontextfunktioner', 'mn': 'Классификатор судалгаанууд Зөвхөн Сургуулийн Сургууль Сургууль', 'ta': 'வகைப்படுத்துபவர் பிரச்சனைகள் மட்டும் Linear Context பண்புகளிலிருந்து கற்றலாம்', 'ur': 'کلاسفائر امتحان صرف لینیر کنٹکسٹ فرصت سے سیکھ سکتے ہیں', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'da': 'Klassificeringssonder kan bare lære af lineære kontekst funktioner', 'bg': 'Сондите на класификатора могат просто да се научат от функциите на линейния контекст', 'hr': 'Klasifikatorske probe mogu samo naučiti iz linijskog konteksta', 'nl': 'Classifiersondes kunnen net leren van lineaire contextfuncties', 'de': 'Klassifizierungssonden könnten gerade von linearen Kontextfunktionen lernen', 'id': 'Ujian Klasifikator Bisa Belajar Dari Karakteristik Konteks Linear', 'ko': '분류기 탐지는 선형 상하문 특징에서만 배울 수 있다', 'fa': 'Ш§Щ…ШӘШӯШ§ЩҶ Ъ©Щ„Ш§ШівҖҢШҜЩҮЩҶШҜЩҮ Щ…ЫҢвҖҢШӘЩҲШ§ЩҶШҜ ШӘЩҶЩҮШ§ Ш§ШІ ЩҲЫҢЪҳЩҮвҖҢЩҮШ§ЫҢ Щ…ЩҲШ¶ЩҲШ№ Ш®Ш·ЫҢ ЫҢШ§ШҜ ШЁЪҜЫҢШұШҜ', 'sw': 'Mashambulizi yanaweza kujifunza tu kutoka Tamko za Linear Context', 'tr': 'Sınıflar Barlamaklary Hat Kontekst özelliklerinden öwrenip biler', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Probat e klasifikuesve mund të mësojnë nga funksionet e kontekstit linear', 'hy': 'Տեղադասավորման փորձերը կարող են պարզապես սովորել գծային կոնտեքստի հատկություններից', 'af': 'Klassifier Probes May Just Learn from Linear Context Features', 'az': 'S캼n캼f칞캼 S캼namalar S캼n캼f Kontext 칐z칲nd톛n 칐yr톛n톛 bil톛r', 'bs': 'Klasifikatorske probe mogu samo naučiti iz linijskog konteksta', 'bn': 'শুধুমাত্র লিঙ্কের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী থেকে শিখুন', 'cs': 'Klasifikační sondy se mohou jen učit z lineárních kontextových funkcí', 'fi': 'Luokituksen luotaimet voivat vain oppia lineaarisesta kontekstista ominaisuudet', 'ca': 'Les probes classificadores poden aprendre de les característiques del context linear', 'et': 'Klassifikaatori sondid võivad lihtsalt õppida lineaarse konteksti funktsioonid', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razglaševalske sonde se lahko samo naučijo iz linearnega konteksta značilnosti', 'he': 'סודות מסווגים יכולות ללמוד מהתכונות קונטקסט Linear', 'bo': 'Classifier Probes May Just Learn from Linear Context Features'}
{'en': 'Classifiers trained on auxiliary probing tasks are a popular tool to analyze the representations learned by neural sentence encoders such as BERT and ELMo. While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations and learning the probing task, the validity of probing methods calls for further research. Using a neighboring word identity prediction task, we show that the token embeddings learned by neural sentence encoders contain a significant amount of information about the exact linear context of the token, and hypothesize that, with such information, learning standard probing tasks may be feasible even without additional linguistic structure. We develop this hypothesis into a framework in which analysis efforts can be scrutinized and argue that, with current models and baselines, conclusions that representations contain linguistic structure are not well-founded. Current probing methodology, such as restricting the classifier’s expressiveness or using strong baselines, can help to better estimate the complexity of learning, but not build a foundation for speculations about the nature of the linguistic structure encoded in the learned representations.', 'ar': 'المصنفات المدربة على مهام التحقيق المساعدة هي أداة شائعة لتحليل التمثيلات التي تعلمتها مشفرات الجملة العصبية مثل BERT و ELMo. بينما يدرك العديد من المؤلفين صعوبة التمييز بين "استخلاص البنية اللغوية المشفرة في التمثيلات" و "تعلم مهمة التحقيق" ، فإن صحة طرق الاستقصاء تتطلب مزيدًا من البحث. باستخدام مهمة التنبؤ بهوية الكلمات المجاورة ، نوضح أن عمليات دمج الرمز المميز التي تعلمتها مشفرات الجملة العصبية تحتوي على قدر كبير من المعلومات حول السياق الخطي الدقيق للرمز المميز ، ونفترض أنه باستخدام هذه المعلومات ، قد يكون تعلم مهام التحقيق القياسية أمرًا ممكنًا حتى بدون هيكل لغوي إضافي. نحن نطور هذه الفرضية إلى إطار عمل يمكن من خلاله فحص جهود التحليل ونجادل أنه مع النماذج الحالية وخطوط الأساس ، فإن الاستنتاجات التي تحتوي على بنية لغوية ليست لها أسس جيدة. يمكن أن تساعد منهجية الفحص الحالية ، مثل تقييد تعبير المصنف أو استخدام خطوط أساسية قوية ، في تقدير مدى تعقيد التعلم بشكل أفضل ، ولكن لا تبني أساسًا للتكهنات حول طبيعة البنية اللغوية المشفرة في التمثيلات المكتسبة.', 'fr': "Les classificateurs formés aux tâches de sondage auxiliaires sont un outil populaire pour analyser les représentations apprises par les encodeurs de phrases neuronales tels que BERT et ElMo. Alors que de nombreux auteurs sont conscients de la difficulté de distinguer «\xa0l'extraction de la structure linguistique codée dans les représentations\xa0» et «\xa0l'apprentissage de la tâche de sondage\xa0», la validité des méthodes de sondage appelle des recherches plus approfondies. En utilisant une tâche de prédiction d'identité de mot voisin, nous montrons que les intégrations de jetons apprises par les codeurs de phrases neuronales contiennent une quantité importante d'informations sur le contexte linéaire exact du jeton, et supposons que, avec de telles informations, des tâches de sondage standard d'apprentissage peuvent être réalisables même sans structure linguistique supplémentaire. Nous développons cette hypothèse dans un cadre dans lequel les efforts d'analyse peuvent être passés au crible et soutenons que, avec les modèles et les lignes de base actuels, les conclusions selon lesquelles les représentations contiennent une structure linguistique ne sont pas fondées. La méthodologie de sondage actuelle, telle que la restriction de l'expressivité du classificateur ou l'utilisation de bases de référence solides, peut aider à mieux estimer la complexité de l'apprentissage, mais pas à jeter les bases de spéculations sur la nature de la structure linguistique codée dans les représentations apprises.", 'es': 'Los clasificadores entrenados en tareas de sondeo auxiliares son una herramienta popular para analizar las representaciones aprendidas por los codificadores de oraciones neuronales como BERT y eLMO. Si bien muchos autores son conscientes de la dificultad de distinguir entre «extraer la estructura lingüística codificada en las representaciones» y «aprender la tarea de sondeo», la validez de los métodos de sondeo exige una mayor investigación. Usando una tarea de predicción de identidad de palabras vecinas, mostramos que las incrustaciones de token aprendidas por los codificadores de oraciones neuronales contienen una cantidad significativa de información sobre el contexto lineal exacto del token, y planteamos la hipótesis de que, con tal información, el aprendizaje de tareas de sondeo estándar puede ser factible incluso sin una estructura lingüística adicional. Desarrollamos esta hipótesis en un marco en el que los esfuerzos de análisis pueden ser analizados y argumentamos que, con los modelos y las líneas de base actuales, las conclusiones de que las representaciones contienen una estructura lingüística no están bien fundadas. La metodología de sondeo actual, como restringir la expresividad del clasificador o usar líneas de base sólidas, puede ayudar a estimar mejor la complejidad del aprendizaje, pero no a construir una base para especulaciones sobre la naturaleza de la estructura lingüística codificada en las representaciones aprendidas.', 'pt': 'Classificadores treinados em tarefas de sondagem auxiliares são uma ferramenta popular para analisar as representações aprendidas por codificadores de sentenças neurais como BERT e ELMo. Embora muitos autores estejam cientes da dificuldade de distinguir entre “extrair a estrutura linguística codificada nas representações” e “aprender a tarefa de sondagem”, a validade dos métodos de sondagem exige mais pesquisas. Usando uma tarefa de predição de identidade de palavras vizinhas, mostramos que as incorporações de token aprendidas por codificadores de sentenças neurais contêm uma quantidade significativa de informações sobre o contexto linear exato do token e hipotetizamos que, com essas informações, aprender tarefas de sondagem padrão pode ser viável mesmo sem estrutura linguística adicional. Desenvolvemos essa hipótese em uma estrutura na qual os esforços de análise podem ser examinados e argumentamos que, com os modelos e linhas de base atuais, as conclusões de que as representações contêm estrutura linguística não são bem fundamentadas. A metodologia de sondagem atual, como restringir a expressividade do classificador ou usar linhas de base fortes, pode ajudar a estimar melhor a complexidade do aprendizado, mas não construir uma base para especulações sobre a natureza da estrutura linguística codificada nas representações aprendidas.', 'zh': '佐治之器是流行之具,所以析BERTELMo神经句编码器所学也。 虽众意难分"取表征编码语言结构"、"学问探事",其有效性须更加研究。 用邻词以卜事,明神经句编码器学者令牌嵌含令牌之信线性上下文,设虽无外言,用之可也。 吾等设为一框架,于此框架中,析事可审,以为形势基线,言不足据也。 今之探术,如限分类器之表现力用强基线,可以助意学之复杂性,而不可以测学之编码言结构之性始基也。', 'ja': '補助プロービングタスクで訓練された分類子は、BERTやELMoなどの神経文エンコーダによって学習された表現を分析するための人気のあるツールである。 多くの著者は、「表現に符号化された言語構造の抽出」と「探索タスクの学習」を区別することが困難であることを認識しているが、探索方法の妥当性はさらなる研究を必要とする。 隣接する単語アイデンティティ予測タスクを使用して、私たちは、ニューラル文章エンコーダによって学習されたトークン埋め込みが、トークンの正確な線形コンテキストに関するかなりの量の情報を含んでいることを示し、そのような情報を使用して、追加の言語構造なしでも標準的なプロービングタスクを学習することが実現可能であり得ると仮定する。 この仮説を分析の取り組みを精査できる枠組みに発展させ、現在のモデルとベースラインでは、表現が言語的構造を含んでいるという結論は十分な根拠がないと主張する。 分類子の表現性を制限したり、強力なベースラインを使用したりするなど、現在の探索方法論は、学習の複雑さをよりよく推定するのに役立ちますが、学習された表現にコード化された言語構造の性質に関する推測の基礎を構築することはできません。', 'hi': 'सहायक जांच कार्यों पर प्रशिक्षित क्लासिफायर एक लोकप्रिय उपकरण है जो BERT और ELMo जैसे तंत्रिका वाक्य एन्कोडर द्वारा सीखे गए अभ्यावेदनों का विश्लेषण करता है। जबकि कई लेखकों को "प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोडेड भाषाई संरचना को निकालने" और "जांच कार्य सीखने" के बीच अंतर करने में कठिनाई के बारे में पता है, जांच विधियों की वैधता आगे के शोध के लिए कहती है। एक पड़ोसी शब्द पहचान भविष्यवाणी कार्य का उपयोग करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि तंत्रिका वाक्य एन्कोडर द्वारा सीखे गए टोकन एम्बेडिंग में टोकन के सटीक रैखिक संदर्भ के बारे में महत्वपूर्ण मात्रा में जानकारी होती है, और यह अनुमान लगाया जाता है कि, ऐसी जानकारी के साथ, मानक जांच कार्यों को सीखना अतिरिक्त भाषाई संरचना के बिना भी संभव हो सकता है। हम इस परिकल्पना को एक ढांचे में विकसित करते हैं जिसमें विश्लेषण के प्रयासों की जांच की जा सकती है और तर्क दिया जा सकता है कि, वर्तमान मॉडल और बेसलाइन के साथ, निष्कर्ष है कि प्रतिनिधित्व में भाषाई संरचना अच्छी तरह से स्थापित नहीं है। वर्तमान जांच पद्धति, जैसे कि क्लासिफायर की अभिव्यंजकता को सीमित करना या मजबूत आधार रेखाओं का उपयोग करना, सीखने की जटिलता का बेहतर अनुमान लगाने में मदद कर सकता है, लेकिन सीखा प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोडेड भाषाई संरचना की प्रकृति के बारे में अटकलों के लिए एक नींव नहीं बना सकता है।', 'ru': 'Классификаторы, обученные вспомогательным задачам зондирования, являются популярным инструментом для анализа представлений, изучаемых нейронными кодировщиками предложений, такими как BERT и ELMo. В то время как многие авторы осознают трудность проведения различия между «извлечением лингвистической структуры, закодированной в представлениях» и «изучением задачи зондирования», обоснованность методов зондирования требует дальнейших исследований. Используя соседнюю задачу прогнозирования идентичности слов, мы показываем, что вложения токена, изученные нейронными кодировщиками предложений, содержат значительный объем информации о точном линейном контексте токена, и выдвигаем гипотезу о том, что при такой информации изучение стандартных задач зондирования может быть осуществимо даже без дополнительной лингвистической структуры. Мы превращаем эту гипотезу в рамки, в которых могут быть проанализированы усилия по анализу, и утверждаем, что с нынешними моделями и исходными линиями выводы, которые представляют собой лингвистическую структуру, не являются обоснованными. Нынешняя методология зондирования, такая как ограничение выразительности классификатора или использование сильных базовых линий, может помочь лучше оценить сложность обучения, но не создать основу для спекуляций о природе лингвистической структуры, закодированной в изученных представлениях.', 'ga': 'Uirlis coitianta is ea aicmitheoirí a gcuirtear oiliúint orthu ar thascanna cúnta le hanailís a dhéanamh ar na huiríll atá foghlamtha ag ionchódóirí pianbhreithe néaracha mar BERT agus ELMo. Cé go bhfuil go leor údair ar an eolas faoin deacracht atá ann idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir “asbhaint an struchtúir teanga atá ionchódaithe sna hionadaíochtaí” agus “an tasc fiosraithe a fhoghlaim,” teastaíonn tuilleadh taighde ó bhailíocht na modhanna iniúchta. Ag baint úsáide as tasc comharsanachta um fhéiniúlacht focal a thuar, léirímid go bhfuil méid suntasach faisnéise faoi chomhthéacs líneach beacht an chomharthaí sna leabaithe comharthaí a d’fhoghlaim ionchódóirí néar-abairtí, agus déanaimid hipitéis, le faisnéis den sórt sin, go bhféadfadh sé go mbeadh sé indéanta fiú tascanna caighdeánacha iniúchta a fhoghlaim. gan struchtúr teanga breise. Forbróimid an hipitéis seo ina creatlach inar féidir iarrachtaí anailíse a scrúdú agus áitíonn muid, le samhlacha reatha agus bonnlínte, nach bhfuil bunús maith leis na conclúidí go bhfuil struchtúr teanga sna hionadaíochtaí. Is féidir leis an modheolaíocht scrúdaitheora reatha, mar shrianadh sainléiritheacht an aicmitheora a shrianadh nó bonnlínte láidre a úsáid, cuidiú le castacht na foghlama a mheas níos fearr, ach gan bonn a thógáil le haghaidh tuairimíochta faoi nádúr an struchtúir teanga atá ionchódaithe sna huiríll foghlamtha.', 'ka': "კლასიფერები, რომლებიც დახმარებული პრობენტის მოქმედებისთვის განაკეთებულია, პოლიოლური ხელსაწყოფილი, რომლებიც BERT და ELMo-ს განაკეთებულია ნეიროლური სიტყვების კოდერე ბევრი ავტორები იცნობენ თუ რამდენიმე შესაძლებლობა განსხვავების განსხვავება, რომელიც 'ლინგურისტიკური სტრუქტურაციის გამოკლება' და 'განსხვავების მომხმარებაში' და 'განსხვავების მომხმარებას მო გამოყენებული სიტყვების განსაზღვრება საქმე, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ნეიროლური სიტყვების კოდენტირებით ვისწავლილი სიტყვების ინფორმაციის მნიშვნელოვანი ზოგიერთი სიტყვების ინფორმაციის შესახებ და ჰიპოტესტიზებთ, რომ, ასეთი ინფორმაციით ჩვენ განვითარებთ ეს ჰიპოტეზეზა ფრამეტში, რომელიც ანალიზეზის ძალადობა შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ და აღწეროთ, რომ, მიმდინარე მოდელები და ბაზეზეზებით, გადაწყვეტილებები, რომელიც ლუნგურ მიმდინარე პრობენტის მეტოდოლოგია, როგორც კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულება ან ძალიან ფესტური ხაზების გამოყენება, შეიძლება უფრო უფრო დააწეროთ სწავლების კომპლექციის კომპლექცია, მაგრამ არა დააყენოთ ფ", 'hu': 'A kiegészítő szondázási feladatokra képzett osztályozók népszerű eszközök a neurális mondatkódolók, mint például a BERT és az ELMo által tanult reprezentációk elemzésére. Bár sok szerző tisztában van azzal, hogy nehéz megkülönböztetni a "reprezentációkban kódolt nyelvi struktúra kinyerése" és a "vizsgálati feladat megtanulása" között, a vizsgálati módszerek érvényessége további kutatásokat igényel. Egy szomszédos szóidentitás-előrejelzési feladat segítségével megmutatjuk, hogy a neurális mondatkódolók által tanult token beágyazások jelentős mennyiségű információt tartalmaznak a token pontos lineáris kontextusáról, és feltételezzük, hogy ilyen információkkal a standard mérési feladatok tanulása további nyelvi struktúra nélkül is megvalósítható. Ezt a hipotézist olyan keretrendszerré alakítjuk ki, amelyben elemzési erőfeszítéseket lehet vizsgálni, és azzal érvelünk, hogy a jelenlegi modellekkel és alapvető vonalakkal a következtetések, miszerint a reprezentációk nyelvi struktúrát tartalmaznak, nem megalapozottak. A jelenlegi vizsgálati módszertan, mint például az osztályozó kifejezőképességének korlátozása vagy erős alapvonalak alkalmazása, segíthet jobban megbecsülni a tanulás összetettségét, de nem építhet alapot a tanult reprezentációkban kódolt nyelvi struktúra természetével kapcsolatos spekulációkhoz.', 'el': 'Οι ταξινομητές εκπαιδευμένοι σε βοηθητικές εργασίες ανίχνευσης είναι ένα δημοφιλές εργαλείο για την ανάλυση των αναπαραστάσεων που μαθαίνονται από τους νευρωνικούς κωδικοποιητές προτάσεων όπως το BERT και το ELMo. Ενώ πολλοί συγγραφείς γνωρίζουν τη δυσκολία διάκρισης μεταξύ "εξαγωγής της γλωσσικής δομής που κωδικοποιείται στις αναπαραστάσεις" και "εκμάθησης της ερευνητικής εργασίας", η εγκυρότητα των μεθόδων ανίχνευσης απαιτεί περαιτέρω έρευνα. Χρησιμοποιώντας μια γειτονική εργασία πρόβλεψης ταυτότητας λέξεων, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι ενσωμάτωση συμβολαίων που μαθαίνονται από τους κωδικοποιητές νευρωνικών προτάσεων περιέχουν σημαντική ποσότητα πληροφοριών σχετικά με το ακριβές γραμμικό πλαίσιο του συμβολαίου, και υποθέτουμε ότι, με τέτοιες πληροφορίες, η εκμάθηση τυποποιημένων εργασιών ανίχνευσης μπορεί να είναι εφικτή ακόμη και χωρίς πρόσθετη γλωσσική δομή. Αναπτύσσουμε αυτή την υπόθεση σε ένα πλαίσιο στο οποίο οι προσπάθειες ανάλυσης μπορούν να εξεταστούν και υποστηρίζουμε ότι, με τα σημερινά μοντέλα και τις γραμμές βάσης, τα συμπεράσματα ότι οι αναπαραστάσεις περιέχουν γλωσσική δομή δεν είναι βάσιμα. Η τρέχουσα μεθοδολογία διερεύνησης, όπως ο περιορισμός της εκφραστικότητας του ταξινομητή ή η χρήση ισχυρών γραμμών βάσης, μπορεί να βοηθήσει στην καλύτερη εκτίμηση της πολυπλοκότητας της μάθησης, αλλά όχι στη δημιουργία βάσεων για εικασίες σχετικά με τη φύση της γλωσσικής δομής που κωδικοποιείται στις διδαγμένες αναπαραστάσεις.', 'kk': 'Көмектесу тапсырмаларында оқылған классификаторлар - BERT және ELMo секілді невралдық сөз кодерлерінің түсініктерін анализиялау құралы. Көпшілік авторлар "көрсетілімдерде кодталған лингвистикалық құрылғыны тарқату" және "сынақтау тапсырмасын үйрену" арасындағы айырмашылығын біледі, тексеру әдістерінің дұрыстығы қосымша зерттеу үшін шақы Соңғы сөздің идентификациялық тапсырмасын бақылау тапсырмасын қолдану үшін, невралдық сөздің кодерлерінде үйренген тегін ендіру тапсырмалардың тегіс мәліметі бар екенін көрсетеді, және бұл мәліметпен стандартты тегіс тапсырмаларды қосымша лингвисти Біз бұл гипотезаны анализ әрекеттерін тексеруге болады және қазіргі үлгілер мен негізгі сызықтарымен, лингвистикалық құрылымдар дұрыс құрылмайды. Қазіргі тексеру методологиясы, классификацияның өрнектілігін шектеу немесе күшті негізгі сызықтарды қолдану үшін, оқыту тәуелдігін жақсы бағалау үшін көмектесе алады, бірақ оқылған мәліметтерде кодталған лингвистикалық құр', 'it': 'Gli annunci addestrati sulle attività di sondaggio ausiliario sono uno strumento popolare per analizzare le rappresentazioni apprese da encoder di frasi neurali come BERT e ELMo. Mentre molti autori sono consapevoli della difficoltà di distinguere tra "estrarre la struttura linguistica codificata nelle rappresentazioni" e "imparare il compito di sondare", la validità dei metodi di sondare richiede ulteriori ricerche. Utilizzando un\'attività di predizione dell\'identità di parola vicina, mostriamo che le incorporazioni di token apprese dai codificatori di frasi neurali contengono una quantità significativa di informazioni sull\'esatto contesto lineare del token, e ipotizziamo che, con tali informazioni, l\'apprendimento di compiti di sondaggio standard può essere fattibile anche senza ulteriore struttura linguistica. Sviluppiamo questa ipotesi in un quadro in cui gli sforzi di analisi possono essere esaminati e sosteniamo che, con i modelli e le linee di base attuali, le conclusioni secondo cui le rappresentazioni contengono una struttura linguistica non sono fondate. L\'attuale metodologia di indagine, come limitare l\'espressività del classificatore o utilizzare solide linee di base, può aiutare a stimare meglio la complessità dell\'apprendimento, ma non costruire una base per speculazioni sulla natura della struttura linguistica codificata nelle rappresentazioni apprese.', 'ms': "Pengarah dilatih dalam tugas penyelidikan bantuan adalah alat populer untuk menganalisis perwakilan yang belajar oleh pengekod kalimat saraf seperti BERT dan ELMo. Sementara banyak penulis sedar kesulitan untuk membezakan antara 'mengekstrak struktur bahasa yang dikodifikasikan dalam perwakilan' dan 'belajar tugas penyelidikan', kehendak kaedah penyelidikan memanggil penyelidikan lanjut. Dengan menggunakan tugas ramalan identiti perkataan tetangga, kita menunjukkan bahawa penyembedding token yang belajar oleh pengekod kalimat saraf mengandungi jumlah maklumat yang signifikan mengenai konteks linear tepat token, dan hipotesis bahawa, dengan maklumat seperti itu, tugas penyelidikan piawai belajar mungkin boleh dilakukan walaupun tanpa struktur bahasa tambahan. Kami mengembangkan hipotesis ini menjadi kerangka di mana usaha analisis boleh diperiksa dan membantah bahawa, dengan model semasa dan garis dasar, kesimpulan bahawa persembahan mengandungi struktur bahasa tidak berdasarkan dengan baik. Metodologi penyelidikan semasa, seperti mengendalikan ekspresif pengklasifikasi atau menggunakan garis dasar yang kuat, boleh membantu untuk memperkirakan lebih rumit pembelajaran, tetapi tidak membina dasar untuk spekulasi tentang sifat struktur bahasa yang dikodifikasikan dalam perwakilan belajar.", 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും എഎല്\u200dമോയും പോലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉപകരണമാണ്. "പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകസ്ഥാനത്തെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനെയും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനെയും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെയും തമ്മില്\u200d വ്യത് Using a neighboring word identity prediction task, we show that the token embeddings learned by neural sentence encoders contain a significant amount of information about the exact linear context of the token, and hypothesize that, with such information, learning standard probing tasks may be feasible even without additional linguistic structure.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റസിയെ ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമ്പിലേക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ശ്രമങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതും വാദിക്കുന്നതും ഇപ്പോ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന രീതി', 'mt': "Classifiers trained on auxiliary probing tasks are a popular tool to analyze the representations learned by neural sentence encoders such as BERT and ELMo.  Filwaqt li ħafna awturi huma konxji mid-diffikultà biex jiddistingwu bejn 'l-estrazzjoni tal-istruttura lingwistika kkodifikata fir-rappreżentazzjonijiet' u 't-tagħlim tal-kompitu ta' sondaġġ', il-validità tal-metodi ta' sondaġġ titlob għal aktar riċerka. Using a neighboring word identity prediction task, we show that the token embeddings learned by neural sentence encoders contain a significant amount of information about the exact linear context of the token, and hypothesize that, with such information, learning standard probing tasks may be feasible even without additional linguistic structure.  Aħna niżviluppaw din l-ipoteżi f’qafas li fih l-isforzi ta’ analiżi jistgħu jiġu skrutinjati u jargumentaw li, bil-mudelli u l-linji bażi attwali, il-konklużjonijiet li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet fihom struttura lingwistika mhumiex ibbażati sew. Il-metodoloġija attwali ta’ sondaġġ, bħar-restrizzjoni tal-espressività tal-klassifikatur jew l-użu ta’ linji bażi b’s a ħħithom, tista’ tgħin biex tiġi stmata aħjar il-kumplessità tat-tagħlim, iżda mhux biex tinbena bażi għal spekulazzjonijiet dwar in-natura tal-istruttura lingwistika kkodifikata fir-rappreżentazzjonijiet imgħallma.", 'lt': "Klasifikatoriai, apmokyti atliekant pagalbines tyrimo užduotis, yra populiari priemonė, skirta analizuoti nuotraukas, įgytas naudojant nervinius sakinius koduojančius kodus, pvz., BERT ir ELMo. While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between 'extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations' and 'learning the probing task,' the validity of probing methods calls for further research.  Naudodami kaimyninio žodžio tapatybės prognozavimo užduotį, mes parodome, kad simbolių įdėjimai, išmokyti neurologinių sakinių kodatoriais, turi didelę informaciją apie tikslų linijinį simbolio kontekstą, ir hipotezuojame, kad su tokia informacija mokymosi standartinės probingo užduotys gali būti įmanomos net be papildomos kalbinės struktūros. Šią hipotezę sukuriame į sistemą, pagal kurią analizės pastangos gali būti išnagrinėtos ir tvirtiname, kad dabartiniais modeliais ir baziniais principais nėra pagrįstos išvados, kad atstovybės turi kalbinę struktūrą. Dabartinė tyrimo metodika, pavyzdžiui, klasifikatoriaus išraiškumo apribojimas arba tvirtų bazinių linijų naudojimas, gali padėti geriau įvertinti mokymosi sudėtingumą, bet nesukurti pagrindo spekuliacijoms apie kalbinės struktūros pobūdį, koduotą mokomose atstovybėse.", 'no': 'Klassifikarar trengte på hjelpeprøveoppgåver er eit populært verktøy for å analysera representasjonane lærte av neuralsetkodarar som BERT og ELMo. Mens mange utviklarane er klar på at vanskeligheten skal distiserast mellom « pakke ut den lingviske strukturen koda i representasjonane » og « lære proberingsoppgåva », vil valiteten av proberingsmetodane kalla til fleire forskning. Bruk eit forhåndsvising av nærmeste ord- identiteten viser vi at innbygginga av token lærte av neuralsetningskooder inneheld ein betydelig mengd informasjon om nøyaktig lineær kontekst av token, og hypotiserer at med slike informasjon kan lære standardsproberingsoppgåver vere feilige sjølv utan ekstra lingviske struktur. Vi utviklar denne hipotesen inn i eit rammeverk der analyserte forsøk kan kontrollerast og argumenterast at, med gjeldande modeller og baselinjer, konklusjonar som representasjonar inneheld lingviske struktur er ikkje godt basert. Gjeldande proberingsmetodologija, slik som avgrensing av klassifiserens uttrykk eller bruk sterke baselinjer, kan hjelpa til å bedre vurdere kompleksiteten for læring, men ikkje bygge ein grunnlag for spekulasjonar om naturen av den lingviske strukturen koda i lærte representasjonane.', 'mk': "Classifiers trained on auxiliary probing tasks are a popular tool to analyze the representations learned by neural sentence encoders such as BERT and ELMo.  While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between 'extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations' and 'learning the probing task,' the validity of probing methods calls for further research.  Користејќи задача за предвидување на идентитетот на соседните зборови, покажуваме дека вложувањата на знаци научени од нервните реченици кодери содржат значителна количина информации за точниот линијарен контекст на знакот, и хипотезираме дека, со вакви информации, стандардните задачи за проверка може да бидат остварливи дури и без дополни Ја развиваме оваа хипотеза во рамка во која може да се проверат напорите за анализа и да се тврди дека, со сегашните модели и основните линии, заклучоците дека претставувањата содржат јазична структура не се добро основани. Current probing methodology, such as restricting the classifier's expressiveness or using strong baselines, can help to better estimate the complexity of learning, but not build a foundation for speculations about the nature of the linguistic structure encoded in the learned representations.", 'pl': 'Klasyfikatory przeszkolone w pomocniczych zadaniach sondowania są popularnym narzędziem do analizy reprezentacji uczonych przez neuronowe kodery zdań, takie jak BERT i ELMo. Podczas gdy wielu autorów zdaje sobie sprawę z trudności w rozróżnieniu między "wydobyciem struktury językowej zakodowanej w reprezentacjach" a "uczeniem się zadania sondującego", ważność metod sondujących wymaga dalszych badań. Korzystając z sąsiedniego zadania przewidywania tożsamości słów, pokazujemy, że osadzenia tokenów nauczone przez neuronowe kodery zdań zawierają znaczną ilość informacji o dokładnym liniowym kontekście tokenu i hipotezę, że przy takich informacjach nauka standardowych zadań sondowania może być możliwa nawet bez dodatkowej struktury językowej. Rozwijamy tę hipotezę w ramy, w której można analizować wysiłki analityczne i twierdzić, że przy obecnych modelach i liniach bazowych wnioski, że reprezentacje zawierają strukturę językową, nie są dobrze uzasadnione. Obecna metodologia sondowania, taka jak ograniczenie ekspresywności klasyfikatora lub wykorzystanie silnych linii bazowych, może pomóc lepiej oszacować złożoność uczenia się, ale nie budować podstawy do spekulacji o charakterze struktury językowej zakodowanej w nauczonych reprezentacjach.', 'ro': 'Clasificatorii instruiți cu privire la sarcini auxiliare de sondare sunt un instrument popular pentru a analiza reprezentările învățate de codificatoarele neuronale de propoziții, cum ar fi BERT și ELMo. Deși mulți autori sunt conștienți de dificultatea de a face distincția între "extragerea structurii lingvistice codificate în reprezentări" și "învățarea sarcinii de sondare", validitatea metodelor de sondare necesită cercetări suplimentare. Folosind o sarcină de predicție a identității cuvintelor vecine, arătăm că încorporările token învățate de codificatorii de propoziții neurale conțin o cantitate semnificativă de informații despre contextul liniar exact al token-ului și ipotezăm că, cu astfel de informații, sarcinile standard de învățare pot fi fezabile chiar și fără structură lingvistică suplimentară. Dezvoltăm această ipoteză într-un cadru în care eforturile de analiză pot fi examinate și susținem că, cu modelele și liniile de bază actuale, concluziile că reprezentările conțin structură lingvistică nu sunt bine întemeiate. Metodologia actuală de sondare, cum ar fi limitarea expresivității clasificatorului sau utilizarea unor linii de bază puternice, poate ajuta la o mai bună estimare a complexității învățării, dar nu la crearea unei baze pentru speculații cu privire la natura structurii lingvistice codificate în reprezentările învățate.', 'mn': 'БЕРТ болон ЕЛМО зэрэг мэдрэлийн шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны ажил дээр сургалтын классификаторын ажиллагааг шинжилдэг нь алдартай хэрэгсэл юм. Ихэнх зохиолчдын "хэлний бүтэц" болон "судалгааны ажлыг сурах" хоорондоо ялгах хэцүү байдлыг мэдэж байгаа ч, судалгааны арга баримтууд илүү судалгаа хийх шаардлагатай. Хэрэг тойрон үгийг тодорхойлохын тулд бид мэдрэлийн шинжлэх ухааны үйл ажиллагааг ашиглаж, мэдрэлийн шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны үйл ажиллагааг нэмэлт хэлний бүтээгдэхүүнээс ч байж болох боломжтой гэж үздэг. Бид үүнийг шинжилгээний хичээл шалгаж, одоогийн загварууд болон суурь шугамын тухай хэлний бүтцийг дүгнэж байгаа шинжилгээ үүсгэдэг. Одоогийн судалгааны методологи, хэлбэрийн илэрхийллийг хязгаарлах эсвэл хүчтэй суурь шугамыг ашиглах мэт, суралцах төвөгтэй байдлыг илүү тодорхойлж чадна. Гэхдээ суралцсан үзүүлэлтийн хэлний бүтээгдэхүүний байдлын талаар бодох суурь биш.', 'sv': 'Annonsﾃｶrer utbildade pﾃ･ hjﾃ､lpsonderingsuppgifter ﾃ､r ett populﾃ､rt verktyg fﾃｶr att analysera representationer som lﾃ､rts av neurala meningskodare som BERT och ELMo. ﾃёen om mﾃ･nga fﾃｶrfattare ﾃ､r medvetna om svﾃ･righeten att skilja mellan "utvinna den sprﾃ･kliga struktur som kodas i representationerna" och "lﾃ､ra sig sonderingsuppgiften", krﾃ､ver validiteten av sonderingsmetoder ytterligare forskning. Med hjﾃ､lp av en nﾃ､rliggande uppgift fﾃｶr prediktion av ordidentitet visar vi att token inbﾃ､ddningar som lﾃ､rts av neurala meningskoder innehﾃ･ller en betydande mﾃ､ngd information om den exakta linjﾃ､ra kontexten av token, och hypoteser att, med sﾃ･dan information, inlﾃ､rning av standardsonderingsuppgifter kan vara genomfﾃｶrbara ﾃ､ven utan ytterligare sprﾃ･klig struktur. Vi utvecklar denna hypotes till ett ramverk dﾃ､r analysarbetet kan granskas och hﾃ､vdar att slutsatserna att representationer innehﾃ･ller sprﾃ･klig struktur inte ﾃ､r vﾃ､lgrundade med nuvarande modeller och baslinjer. Nuvarande undersﾃｶkningsmetoder, som att begrﾃ､nsa klassificerarens uttrycksfullhet eller anvﾃ､nda starka baslinjer, kan bidra till att bﾃ､ttre uppskatta inlﾃ､rningens komplexitet, men inte bygga en grund fﾃｶr spekulationer om arten av den sprﾃ･kliga struktur som kodas i de lﾃ､rda representationerna.', 'so': 'Shahaadada lagu tababariyey shaqooyinka lagu imtixaamo waa qalabka maamulka ah in lagu sawiro qofka lagu barto qoraalka xukunka neurada sida BERT iyo ELMo. Inta badan oo qoraal ah ay garanayaan dhibaatada ay kala soocaan “soo saaridda dhismaha luuqadda ee lagu qoray” iyo “barashada shaqada imtixaanka”, xaqiiqnimada qaababka imtixaanka ayaa u yeedhaya waxbarasho dheeraad ah. Isku isticmaalidda aqoonsiga hadalka deriska ah, waxaynu tusnaynaa in calaamada lagu barto qoraalka neurada ah ay ku jirto macluumaad aad u weyn oo ku saabsan kooxaha saxda qoriga ah, iyo hypothesiz, taas oo macluumaad ah, waxbarashada waxaa suurtogal ah in xittaa laga yaabo in la helo shaqada standard imtixaanka ah oo aan laga helin dhismo luuqad dheer ah. Waxaynu horumarinaa fikiritaankan, taas oo lagu sameyn karo samooyin lagu baarayo, islamarkaasna waxaynu ka doodaynaa in, tusaalayaal iyo hoose, dhamaadyo ku qoran kooxaha ku qoran dhismaha luuqada aan si wanaagsan loo aasin karin. Isticmaalka la imtixaamo ee hada, tusaale ahaan ku xadiriya muuqashada fasaxa ama isticmaalka asalka xoogga leh, waxay caawin karaan inuu si fiican u qiimeeyo complexda waxbarashada, laakiin aan u dhisin aasaaska si aan u sameyn fikiro dabiicadda noocyada luuqada ee lagu qoray qaabka barashada.', 'ta': 'பிரெட் மற்றும் ELMo போன்ற புதிய வாக்கியம் குறியீடுகள் படிக்கப்பட்ட பங்களை பரிசோதிக்க பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ள வகுப்பாடுகள் பிரபல பல ஆசிரியர் ஒரு அண்டைய வார்த்தை அடையாளம் முன்னோட்டு பணியை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் புதிய வாக்கியம் குறியீட்டால் கற்றப்பட்ட குறியீடுகள் குறியீட்டின் சரியான வரிசை சூழல் பற்றிய தகவல்கள் மி நாம் இந்த hypothesis ஒரு சட்டத்தில் உருவாக்குகிறோம். அதில் ஆராய முயற்சிகளை ஆய்வு செய்ய முடியும். தற்போதைய மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் அடிப்படைகளில் குறிப்பி தற்போதைய சோதிப்பு முறைமை', 'sr': 'Klasifikatori koji su obučeni za pomoćne probe su popularni alat za analizu predstavljanja koje su naučili koderi neuralne rečenice poput BERT i ELMo. Iako mnogi autori znaju teškoće da se razlikuju između "izvlačenja jezičke strukture kodirane u predstavljanjima" i "učenje istraživanja zadatka", validnost metoda istraživanja poziva na daljnje istraživanje. Koristeći zadatak predviđanja identiteta u susjednim riječima, pokazujemo da uključenje znakova koje su naučili koderi neuralne rečenice sadrže značajnu količinu informacija o tačnom linearnom kontekstu znaka i hipoteziju da, sa takvim informacijama, učenje standardnih probnih zadataka može biti moguće čak i bez dodatne lingvističke strukture. Razvijamo ovu hipotezu u okviru u kojem se analiziraju napori i tvrdimo da, sa trenutnim modelima i osnovnim linijama, zaključki da predstavljanja sadrže jezičku strukturu nisu dobro osnovane. Trenutna metodika istraživanja, poput ograničenja ekspresivnosti klasifikatora ili upotrebe jakih osnovnih linija, može pomoći da bolje proceni kompleksnost učenja, ali ne izgradi temelj za spekulacije o prirodi jezičke strukture kodirane u učenim predstavljanjima.', 'si': "ක්ලාසිෆායිර්ස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක් ගොඩක් ලේඛකයන් දැනගෙන ඉන්නවා කියලා 'භාෂාවික ස්ථාපනය' සහ 'පරීක්ෂණ වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න' සඳහා 'භාෂාවික ස්ථාපනය' සඳහා විශේෂ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නිමුණු වචන පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නිමුණු වාක්ය කෝඩාර්ස් වලින් ඉගෙන ගත්ත තොක්කේන්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ තොක්කේන්ගේ  අපි මේ විශ්වාසය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පරීක්ෂණය කරලා බලන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරස්තූත විශ්වාස කරන්න,  ප්\u200dරස්තූතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නය විද්\u200dයාවය, වගේම විද්\u200dයාපකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරනවා නැත්නම්, උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් ඉගෙනීමේ", 'ur': "کلاسفائر جو مددگار پرڈینگ کے کاموں پر آموزش کی گئی ہے ایک محبوب تولیل ہے کہ نئورل جماعت کوڈر جیسے BERT اور ELMo کے ذریعے سیکھے ہوئے نمائش کا تحلیل کریں. اگرچہ بہت سے لکھنے والوں کو معلوم ہے کہ مشکل کا اختلاف کرنا مشکل ہے کہ 'زبان کی ساختاری نکالنا' اور 'پرڈینگ کے کام کی تعلیم کرنا' کے درمیان کیا گیا ہے، پرڈینگ طریقوں کی طاقت اضافہ کرنا چاہتا ہے. ہم نے ایک دوسرے لفظ کی پہنچانے کے کام کے مطابق نشان دیتے ہیں کہ نئورل لفظ کوڈر کے ذریعہ سیکھے ہوئے ٹوکنے کے مطابق سیکھے ہوئے ٹوکنے کی سیکھی معلومات میں ایک بڑی گنتی معلومات رکھتی ہے اور یہ سمجھ لیتے ہیں کہ ایسی معلومات کے ساتھ استاندارڈ پرینگ ٹوکیٹوں کی تعلیم سکھائی ہم نے اس فرضی کو ایک فرضی میں تخلیق کیا ہے جس میں تحلیل کی کوشش اچھی طرح کی جاتی ہے اور جھگڑ سکتی ہے کہ، موجود مدلکوں اور بنیاس لینوں کے ساتھ، معلومات کے ذریعے زبان کی ساختار میں شامل ہوتی ہیں، بہت اچھی طرح نہیں بنا سکتے۔ موجود تحقیقات کے مطابق، جیسے کلاسپیٹر کی تعریف یا قوی بنسس لینوں کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے، سیکھنے کی پیچیدگی کا اچھا اندازہ لینے کے لئے مدد کر سکتا ہے، لیکن زبان کی ساختاری کی پیچیدگی کے بارے میں کوئی بنسس نہیں بنا سکتا ہے جو علم کی تعریف میں کدھی ہوئی زبان کی ساختار", 'uz': "Name While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between 'extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations' and 'learning the probing task,' the validity of probing methods calls for further research.  Name Biz bu hypoteyasini ajratib olamiz. Ularning jarayonlarini aniqlash mumkin va qidirish mumkin. Joriy modellar va asosiy qoidalar bilan, tillarning tizimi tuzilishi mumkin emas. Joriy tajriba usuli, masalan classifiserning imkoniyatini kamaytirish yoki sterk asboblarni ishlatish mumkin, ta'limning murakkablarini aniqlashga yordam beradi, lekin o'rganish taʼminlovchilarida koʻpaytirilgan lingvistik tuzuvlarining xususiyati haqida o'zgarishni yaratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Những chuyên gia nghiên cứu các công việc thăm dò phụ là một công cụ phổ biến để phân tích các biểu tượng được học bởi mã hóa câu thần kinh như BERT và ElMo. Trong khi nhiều tác giả nhận thức được khó khăn để phân biệt "khai thác cấu trúc ngôn ngữ được mã hóa trong các bộ trình bày" và "học các nhiệm vụ thăm dò", giá trị của các phương pháp thăm dò đòi hỏi thêm nghiên cứu. Sử dụng một nhiệm vụ dự đoán danh tính từ láng giềng, chúng tôi cho thấy việc tổ chức tượng trưng được học bởi bộ mã hóa câu thần kinh chứa một số thông tin quan trọng về hoàn cảnh tuyến tính của vật tượng, và giả thuyết rằng, với những thông tin đó, việc tìm hiểu các công việc thăm dò tiêu chuẩn có thể được thực hiện dù không có cấu trúc ngôn ngữ khác. Chúng tôi phát triển giả thuyết này thành một khung cảnh có thể xem xét kỹ lưỡng các nỗ lực phân tích và khẳng định rằng, với các mô hình và nền tảng hiện tại, kết luận về các biểu hiện có kiến trúc ngôn ngữ không được sáng tạo. Phương pháp thăm dò hiện tại, như hạn chế khả năng diễn tả của người phân phối, hoặc s ử dụng các nền tảng vững chắc, có thể giúp ước lượng về sự phức tạp của học hành tốt hơn, nhưng không tạo ra một nền tảng cho sự suy đoán về bản chất của cấu trúc ngôn ngữ được mã hóa trong các diễn văn học tập.', 'bg': 'Класификаторите, обучени за допълнителни задачи за сондиране, са популярен инструмент за анализ на изображенията, научени от неврални кодери на изречения като BERT и ELMo. Въпреки че много автори са наясно с трудността да се направи разграничение между "извличане на езиковата структура, кодирана в репрезентациите" и "изучаване на задачата за сондиране", валидността на методите за сондиране изисква допълнителни изследвания. Използвайки задача за предсказване на идентичността на съседните думи, ние показваме, че вгражданията на символи, научени от невралните кодери на изречения съдържат значително количество информация за точния линеен контекст на символа, и предполагаме, че с такава информация обучението на стандартни задачи за сондиране може да бъде осъществимо дори без допълнителна лингвистична структура. Разработваме тази хипотеза в рамка, в която усилията за анализ могат да бъдат разгледани и твърдим, че с настоящите модели и базови линии заключенията, че представителствата съдържат лингвистична структура, не са добре обосновани. Настоящата методология за сондиране, като ограничаване на изразителността на класификатора или използване на силни базови линии, може да помогне за по-добра оценка на сложността на ученето, но не и да изгради основа за спекулации относно естеството на езиковата структура, кодирана в научените представи.', 'da': 'Klassifikater, der er uddannet i hjælpeopgaver, er et populært værktøj til at analysere de repræsentationer, der læres af neurale sætningskodere som BERT og ELMo. Selv om mange forfattere er opmærksomme på vanskelighederne ved at skelne mellem "at udvinde den sproglige struktur, der er kodet i repræsentationerne", og "at lære sonderingsopgaven", kræver validiteten af sonderingsmetoder yderligere forskning. Ved hjælp af en nærliggende ordidentitetsforudsigelsesopgave viser vi, at de token-indlejringer, der læres af neurale sætningskodere, indeholder en betydelig mængde oplysninger om den nøjagtige lineære kontekst af token, og antager, at med sådanne oplysninger kan læring standard probing opgaver være muligt selv uden yderligere sproglig struktur. Vi udvikler denne hypotese til en ramme, hvor analyseinsatsen kan undersøges og argumenterer for, at konklusioner om, at repræsentationer indeholder sproglig struktur, med nuværende modeller og baselines, ikke er velbegrundede. Nuværende undersøgelsesmetode, såsom begrænsning af klassificererens udtryksevne eller brug af stærke basislinjer, kan bidrage til bedre at vurdere kompleksiteten af læring, men ikke bygge et fundament for spekulationer om arten af den sproglige struktur, der er kodet i de lærte repræsentationer.', 'hr': 'Klasifikatori obučeni na pomoćne probe su popularni alat za analizu predstavljanja koje su naučili koderi neuralne rečenice poput BERT i ELMo. Iako mnogi autori znaju teškoće različiti između "izvlačenja jezičke strukture kodirane u predstavljanjima" i "učenje zadatka za probu", validnost metoda istraživanja poziva na daljnje istraživanje. Koristeći zadatak predviđanja identiteta u susjednim riječima, pokazujemo da uključujući značajnu količinu informacija o točnom linearnom kontekstu znaka, i hipoteziju da, s takvim informacijama, učenje standardnih ispitivanja može biti moguće čak i bez dodatne jezičke strukture. Mi razvijamo ovu hipotezu u okviru u kojem se može analizirati napori i tvrditi da, s trenutnim modelima i osnovnim linijama, zaključki da predstavljanja sadrže jezičku strukturu nisu dobro osnovane. Trenutna metodika ispitivanja, poput ograničenja ekspresivnosti klasifikatora ili upotrebe jakih osnovnih linija, može pomoći bolje procijeniti kompleksnost učenja, ali ne izgraditi temelj za spekulacije o prirodi jezičke strukture kodirane u učenim predstavljanjima.', 'de': 'Klassifizierer, die auf Hilfsaufgaben trainiert sind, sind ein beliebtes Werkzeug, um die von neuronalen Satzsensoren wie BERT und ELMo erlernten Darstellungen zu analysieren. Während sich viele Autoren der Schwierigkeit bewusst sind, zwischen "Extraktion der sprachlichen Struktur, die in den Repräsentationen kodiert ist" und "Erlernen der Sondieraufgabe" zu unterscheiden, erfordert die Gültigkeit von Sondierungsmethoden weitere Forschung. Anhand einer benachbarten Wortidentitätsvorhersageaufgabe zeigen wir, dass die Token-Einbettungen, die von neuronalen Satzkodierern erlernt werden, eine signifikante Menge an Informationen über den exakten linearen Kontext des Tokens enthalten, und vermuten, dass mit solchen Informationen das Erlernen von Standard-Sondierungsaufgaben auch ohne zusätzliche sprachliche Struktur möglich sein kann. Wir entwickeln diese Hypothese zu einem Rahmen, in dem Analyseanstrengungen hinterfragt werden können und argumentieren, dass mit aktuellen Modellen und Baselines Schlussfolgerungen, dass Repräsentationen sprachliche Strukturen enthalten, nicht fundiert sind. Aktuelle Untersuchungsmethoden, wie die Einschränkung der Ausdruckskraft des Klassifikators oder die Verwendung starker Baselines, können helfen, die Komplexität des Lernens besser einzuschätzen, aber keine Grundlage für Spekulationen über die Art der sprachlichen Struktur bilden, die in den erlernten Repräsentationen kodiert ist.', 'nl': "Classifiers die getraind zijn op hulpsondetaken zijn een populair hulpmiddel om de representaties te analyseren die geleerd worden door neurale zinnencoders zoals BERT en ELMo. Hoewel veel auteurs zich bewust zijn van de moeilijkheid om onderscheid te maken tussen 'het extraheren van de linguïstische structuur die in de representaties is gecodeerd' en 'het leren van de tastende taak', vraagt de geldigheid van tastende methoden om verder onderzoek. Met behulp van een naburige woordidentiteitsvoorspellingstak laten we zien dat de tokeninbeddingen die door neurale zinnencoders worden geleerd, een aanzienlijke hoeveelheid informatie bevatten over de exacte lineaire context van het token, en stellen we de hypothese dat, met dergelijke informatie, het leren van standaard soningtaken mogelijk is, zelfs zonder extra taalstructuur. We ontwikkelen deze hypothese tot een raamwerk waarin analyseinspanningen kunnen worden onderzocht en stellen dat, met huidige modellen en basislijnen, conclusies dat representaties taalstructuur bevatten niet gegrond zijn. De huidige onderzoeksmethodologie, zoals het beperken van de expressiviteit van de classificator of het gebruik van sterke baselines, kan helpen om de complexiteit van het leren beter in te schatten, maar geen basis te leggen voor speculaties over de aard van de taalstructuur die in de geleerde representaties is gecodeerd.", 'id': "Klasifikasi dilatih dalam tugas penyelidikan bantuan adalah alat populer untuk menganalisis representation belajar oleh pengangkat saraf seperti BERT dan ELMo. Sementara banyak penulis menyadari kesulitan untuk membedakan antara 'ekstraksi struktur bahasa yang terkode dalam representation' dan 'belajar tugas penyelidikan,' validitas metode penyelidikan memanggil penelitian lanjut. Menggunakan tugas prediksi identitas kata tetangga, kami menunjukkan bahwa penyembedding token yang dipelajari oleh pengangkat kalimat saraf mengandung jumlah informasi yang signifikan tentang konteks linear yang tepat token, dan hipotesis bahwa, dengan informasi seperti itu, belajar tugas penyelidikan standar mungkin bisa dilakukan bahkan tanpa struktur bahasa tambahan. Kami mengembangkan hipotesis ini menjadi sebuah rangka di mana usaha analisis dapat diperiksa dan berdebat bahwa, dengan model dan garis dasar saat ini, kesimpulan bahwa representation mengandung struktur bahasa tidak berdasarkan. Metodologi penyelidikan saat ini, seperti membatasi ekspresivitas klasifikasi atau menggunakan garis dasar yang kuat, dapat membantu memperkirakan lebih baik kompleksitas belajar, tetapi tidak membangun dasar untuk spekulasi tentang sifat struktur bahasa yang terkodifikasi dalam representati belajar.", 'sw': "Waonyeshaji waliofundishwa katika kazi za kuthibitisha ni zana maarufu ya kuwachambua uwakilishi waliojifunza na kupunguza hukumu za uraia kama vile BERT na ELMo. While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between 'extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations' and 'learning the probing task,' the validity of probing methods calls for further research.  Kwa kutumia jukumu la utabiri wa neno la jirani, tunaonyesha kuwa taarifa zinazojifunza na idadi ya hukumu za uraia zina taarifa muhimu kuhusu muktadha sahihi wa msingi wa alama hiyo, na unafikiri kwamba, kwa taarifa kama hizo, kazi za kujifunza za za kawaida zinaweza uwezekano hata bila ujenzi wa lugha za ziada. Tunaendeleza nadharia hii katika mfumo ambao uchambuzi wa juhudi zinaweza kuchunguzwa na kusema kuwa, kwa mifano na misingi ya sasa, hitimisho ambalo uwakilishi una muundo wa lugha hazijaanzishwa vizuri. Utawala wa kudhibiti kwa s as a, kama vile kuzuia muundo wa kutangaza au kutumia misingi yenye nguvu, unaweza kusaidia kutathmini vigumu vya kujifunza, lakini sio kujenga msingi wa dhana kuhusu asili ya muundo wa lugha ulioandikwa katika uwakilishi wa elimu.", 'fa': 'کلاس\u200cشناس\u200cها روی کارهای تحقیقات کمک آموزش داده شده\u200cاند، یک ابزار محبوب برای تحلیل نمایش\u200cهایی که توسط رمز\u200cکنندگان مجازات عصبی یاد گرفته\u200cاند، مانند BERT و ELMo هستند. در حالی که بسیاری از نویسندگان از مشکلات جدا کردن بین «استخراج ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی که در نمایش\u200cهای کودک شده» و «یاد گرفتن کار تحقیقات» آگاه هستند، قابلیت روش\u200cهای تحقیقات برای تحقیقات بیشتری می\u200cخواهد. با استفاده از یک کار پیش\u200cبینی هویت کلمه همسایه، نشان می\u200cدهیم که پیوند\u200cگیری\u200cهای معجزه\u200cای که توسط زبان\u200cدهنده\u200cهای عصبی یاد گرفته\u200cاند، تعداد زیادی از اطلاعات در مورد محیط خطی دقیق نشان می\u200cدهند، و فرض می\u200cکنیم که با این اطلاعات، یاد گرفتن کار\u200cهای استاندارد تحقیق می\u200cکنند حتی ما این فرضیه را به عنوان یک چهارچوب توسعه می\u200cکنیم که تلاش تحلیل می\u200cتوانند تحقیق کنند و بحث کنند که با مدل\u200cهای فعلی و خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی، نتیجه\u200cهایی که توسعه\u200cهای توسعه\u200cهای ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی دارند، خوب ساخت روش تحقیقات فعلی، مثل محدود کردن تعریفیت کلاسیک یا استفاده از خطوط بنیادی قوی، می تواند کمک کند تا پیچیدگی یادگیری را بهتر تحقیق کند، ولی بنیادی برای تخمین کردن در مورد طبیعت ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی که در نمایش\u200cهای یاد گرفته شده\u200cاند بسازد.', 'tr': 'BERT we ELMo ýaly öwrenmegi tarapyndan öwrenmek üçin kömekleyici denetim işinde bilinen klassiflerdir. Köp awtoriler "görkezilişinde kodlanýan lingwistiki strukturyň açylmagy" we "synaglama zadyny öwrenmek üçin kyndygyny bilýärler, synaglama metodlaryň kärelerini başga bir arama üçin çagyr. Soňra bir söz kimligi öngörüm täblisasyny ullanýarys, biz neural sözleşmeleri tarapyndan öwrenen token ködlemeleri token hakyndaky hatda gaty çizgi kontekst barada möhüm maglumaty bar we şübheleýäris ki, şeýle bir maglumaty bilen, standart probleme täblisasyny öwrenmek gerekli dil struktursyz hem edip biler. Biz bu hökmü çözümleme çabalaryny çözümleme we çözümleme çerçevesine geliştirip, häzirki modeller we baz çözümleri bilen, bu çözümlerde lingwistiki strukturda düzgün döredilmez. Häzirki synaglama metodologiýasy, klasifikatyň ifadesini ýa-da güýçli bazarlaryny ulanmakda kömek edip biler, öwrenmeniň sarhoşlygyny gowy çaklamak üçin kömek edip biler, ýöne öwrenenlerde kodulan lingwistiki strukturyň tebigatynyň bir tabany döretmäge kömek edip biler.', 'ko': "보조 탐지 임무에 훈련하는 분류기는 BERT와 ELMO 등 신경문장 인코더가 학습한 표징을 분석하는 데 유행하는 도구다.많은 작가들이'추출 표징에서 인코딩된 언어 구조'와'학습 탐지 임무'를 구분하는 어려움을 의식하고 있지만 탐지 방법의 유효성은 좀 더 연구해야 한다.인접어 신분 예측 임무를 사용함으로써 우리는 신경문장 인코더 학습의 표기 삽입이 표기의 정확한 선형 상하문에 대한 정보를 대량으로 포함하고 있음을 증명했다. 또한 이러한 정보가 있으면 별도의 언어 구조가 없어도 학습 표준 탐지 임무가 가능하다고 가정했다.우리는 이 가설을 하나의 틀로 발전시켜 이 틀에서 분석 작업을 자세하게 검사할 수 있고 현재의 모델과 기선에 따라 언어 구조를 포함한다는 결론은 충분한 근거가 없다고 생각한다.현재의 탐지 방법, 예를 들어 분류기의 표현 능력을 제한하거나 강한 기선을 사용하면 학습의 복잡성을 더욱 잘 예측할 수 있으나 학습 표시에서 인코딩된 언어 구조의 성질을 추측하는 데 기반을 다질 수 없다.", 'am': "በጠቅላላ ግንኙነት አካባቢ (BERT) እና ELMo በሚል የደብዳቤ ቃላት የሆኑትን መልዕክቶች የሚያስተምሩ የግልፅ ማድረጊዎች ናቸው፡፡ While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between 'extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations' and 'learning the probing task,' the validity of probing methods calls for further research.  በአካባቢው ቃላት የፊደል ማወቂያ ስራ በመጠቀም፣ በኔርያዊ ደንዳቤ የሆኑት ምልክት የሚታወቀው ግንኙነት የጽሑፍ ቀለም ውይይት እና በተጨማሪው ቋንቋዊ ክፍል ሳይኖር የተማርነው የግንኙነት አካባቢ መረጃ እንዲኖርበት እና በተጨማሪም ቋንቋ አካባቢ እንዲቻል ነው፡፡ ይህንን hypothesis በቋንቋዊ አካባቢ ውስጥ መፍትሄን ለመፍረስ እና ለመፍረስ የሚችል ትርጉም፣ አሁን ያሉት ዓይነቶች እና መደገፊያዎች የቋንቋዊ አካባቢዎች መሠረት መልካም አይደለም የሚል ውይይይት ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን መግለጫ፣ እንደተማሪዎቹ የቋንቋዊ ሥርዓት ወይም ኃይለኛ መሠረት በመጠቀም፣ ትምህርትን አካባቢነት ለመጠቀም ይችላል፣ ነገር ግን በተማሩት መልዕክቶች ላይ የቋንቋዊው ሥርዓት ሥርዓት ላይ የተዘጋጀውን መሠረት አይሠራም፡፡", 'sq': "Klasifikuesit e trajnuar në detyrat ndihmëse të sondazhit janë një mjet popullor për të analizuar përfaqësimet e mësuara nga koduesit e fjalëve nervore të tillë si BERT dhe ELMo. Ndërsa shumë autorë janë të ndërgjegjshëm për vështirësinë për të dalluar midis 'nxjerrjes së strukturës gjuhësore të koduar në përfaqësime' dhe 'mësimit të detyrës sondaje,' vlerësia e metodave sondaje kërkon kërkime të mëtejshme. Duke përdorur një detyrë të parashikimit të identitetit të fjalës fqinjë, ne tregojmë se përfshirjet e token të mësuara nga koduesit e fjalëve neurale përmbajnë një sasi të rëndësishme informacioni rreth kontekstit ekzakt linear të token, dhe hipotezojmë se, me informacion të tillë, mësimi i detyrave standarte të sondazhit mund të jetë i realizueshëm edhe pa strukturë gjuhësore shtesë. Ne e zhvillojmë këtë hipotezë në një kuadër në të cilin përpjekjet e analizës mund të shqyrtohen dhe argumentojnë se, me modelet e tanishme dhe linjat bazë, përfundimet se përfaqësimet përmbajnë strukturën gjuhësore nuk janë të themeluara mirë. Metodologjia aktuale e hetimit, të tillë si kufizimi i shprehjes s ë klasifikuesit apo përdorimi i linjave bazë të forta, mund të ndihmojë për të vlerësuar më mirë kompleksitetin e mësimit, por jo për të ndërtuar një bazë për spekullimet rreth natyrës së strukturës gjuhësore të koduar në përfaqësimet e mësuara.", 'af': "Klassifisiers wat op hulpbrekende probering opgeleer is, is 'n populêre hulpmiddel om die voorstellings wat deur neural setkoders geleer word te analyseer soos BERT en ELMo. Alhoewel baie outeure bevestig is van die moeilikheid om tussen 'uitpak van die lingwisiese struktuur wat in die voorstellings gekodeer is' en 'leer die probeertaak,' die geldigheid van probeermetode roep vir verdere ondersoek. By gebruik van 'n naaste woord identiteit voorskou taak, wys ons dat die token inbettings geleer deur neurale setkoders bevat 'n betekende hoeveelheid inligting oor die egte lineêre konteks van die token en hipotesis dat, met so inligting, die leer van standaard probeer taak kan wees feilik selfs sonder addisionele lingwisiese struktuur. Ons ontwikkel hierdie hipotesis in 'n raamwerk waarin analiseerde versoeke kan kontroleer word en arguseer dat, met huidige modele en basisline, die conclusions wat voorstellings bevat lingvisse struktuur is nie goed gefundeerd nie. Huidige probeermetodologie, soos die klassifiseerder se uitdrukkigheid of sterke basisline gebruik, kan help om die kompleksiteit van leer te beter vurdering, maar nie 'n fondasie vir spekulasies oor die natuur van die lingwisiese struktuur wat in die geleerde voorstellings gekodeer is nie.", 'bn': "প্রশিক্ষকদের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা এক জনপ্রিয় টুল, যারা নিউরেল শাস্তি এনকোডারের মত বিবের্ট এবং এলমো এর মতো প্রতিনিধিদের বিশ্লেষণ করে। যদিও অনেক লেখক জানে যে 'প্রতিনিধিত্বে লিখিত ভাষাগত কাঠামো বের করে নিয়ে যাওয়া' এবং 'পরীক্ষা করার শিক্ষা শিখতে' এর মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন করার কঠিন ব্যবস্থা সম প্রতিবেশী শব্দের পরিচয় ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী কাজ ব্যবহার করে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে নিউরেল শাস্তি এনকোডার দ্বারা শিক্ষিত চিহ্নিত বিষয়গুলোর মধ্যে প্রায় বিশাল তথ্য রয়েছে প্রমাণের সঠিক লাইনের প্রেক আমরা এই হাইপিথিসিকে একটি ফ্রেমে তৈরি করি যেখানে বিশ্লেষণের প্রচেষ্টা পরীক্ষা করা যাবে এবং যুক্তি প্রদান করা যাবে যে বর্তমান মডেল এবং বেসেলাইনের মাধ্ বর্তমান পরীক্ষার পদ্ধতি যেমন শ্রেণীবিভাষার প্রকৃতি নিষিদ্ধ করা অথবা শক্তিশালী বেসাইন ব্যবহার করা সাহায্য করতে পারে শিক্ষার বিষয়টির জটিলতা ভালোভাবে হিসেবে বিবেচনা করতে", 'ca': "Els classificadors entrenats en tasques auxiliars de sondages són una eina popular per analitzar les representacions aprengutes amb codificadors neuronals com BERT i ELMo. Mentre que molts autors són conscients de la dificultat de distingir entre 'extrair l'estructura lingüística codificada en les representacions' i 'aprendre la tasca d'investigació', la validez dels mètodes d'investigació necessita més investigació. Utilitzant una tasca de predicció d'identitat de paraules veïnes, demostram que les incorporacions de fitxes aprengutes pels codificadors de frases neurals contén una quantitat significativa d'informació sobre el contexte linear exacte de la fitxa, i hipòtesis que, amb aquesta informació, aprendre tasques normalitzades de sondagem pot ser viable fins i tot sense estructura lingüística adicional. We develop this hypothesis into a framework in which analysis efforts can be scrutinized and argue that, with current models and baselines, conclusions that representations contain linguistic structure are not well-founded.  La metodologia actual d'investigació, com la restricció de l'expressivitat del classificador o l'ús de línies de base fortes, pot ajudar a estimar millor la complexitat de l'aprenentatge, però no construir una base per a especular sobre la naturalesa de l'estructura lingüística codificada en les representacions aprendides.", 'az': 'Yardımcıl sınama işlərində təhsil edilən klassifirlər BERT və ELMo kimi nöral sözlər kodlayıcıların öyrəndiklərini analiz etmək üçün məşhur bir vasitədir. Həqiqətən, çox yazıcılar "göstəricilərdə kodlanmış dil quruluğu çıxartmaq" və "prob işini öyrənmək" arasında ayırmaq çətinliklərini bilərlər, prob metodlarının daha çox araştırmalarını istəyirlər. Komşu sözlərin kimlik öyrənməsi işi ilə, nöral sözlərin kodlayıcıların öyrəndiyi token inşallarının dəyişiklik məlumatlarının dəyişiklik dəyişiklik məlumatlarının daxilində olduğunu göstərdik və bu məlumatlar ilə öyrənmək standart probing işlərinin daha çox dil strukturları olmadan belə mümkün ola bilər. Biz bu hipotezi çətinliklərə təşkil edirik ki, analiz çabalarını təşkil edə bilər və mübahisə edə bilər ki, hökmən modellər və baz çətinliklərlə, təşkil edilənlərin dil strukturası barəsindəki sonuçların yaxşı qurululmamışdır. Şimdiki s ınama metodolojisi, klasifikatının ifadesini və qüvvətli baz çətinlərini istifadə etmək kimi, öyrənmənin sarmaqlığını daha yaxşı hesablamaq üçün kömək edə bilər, amma öyrəndiyi ifadələrdə kodlanmış dil strukturunun təbiəti haqqında spekulasyonlar üçün bir fundu in şa etməz.', 'bs': 'Klasifikatori obučeni na pomoćne probe su popularni alat za analizu predstavljanja koje su naučili koderi neuralne rečenice poput BERT i ELMo. Iako mnogi autori znaju teškoće različiti između "izvlačenja jezičke strukture kodirane u predstavljanjima" i "učenje zadatka za probu", validnost metoda istraživanja poziva na daljnje istraživanje. Koristeći zadatak predviđanja identiteta u susjednim riječima, pokazujemo da uključivanje znakova koje su naučili koderi neuralne rečenice sadrže značajnu količinu informacija o točnom linearnom kontekstu znaka, i hipoteziju da, s takvim informacijama, učenje standardnih probnih zadataka može biti moguće čak i bez dodatne lingvističke strukture. Razvijemo ovu hipotezu u okviru u kojem se može analizirati napori i tvrditi da, sa trenutnim modelima i osnovnim linijama, zaključki da predstavljanja sadrže jezičku strukturu nisu dobro osnovane. Trenutna metodika istraživanja, poput ograničenja ekspresivnosti klasifikatora ili upotrebe jakih osnovnih linija, može pomoći bolje procijeniti kompleksnost učenja, ali ne izgraditi temelj za spekulacije o prirodi jezičke strukture kodirane u učenim predstavljanjima.', 'et': 'Klassifikaatorid, kes on koolitatud abiproovidega, on populaarne vahend neurolausekodeerijate, näiteks BERT ja ELMo poolt õppitud representatsioonide analüüsimiseks. Kuigi paljud autorid on teadlikud raskustest eristada "esitustes kodeeritud keelestruktuuri ekstraheerimisel" ja "uurimisülesande õppimisel", nõuab uurimismeetodite kehtivus edasisi uuringuid. Kasutades naabersõna identiteedi ennustamise ülesannet, näitame, et närvilausekodeerijate poolt õppitud märgised sisaldavad märkimisväärselt teavet märgise täpse lineaarse konteksti kohta ja oletame, et sellise teabe korral võivad standardsed proovimisülesanded olla teostatavad isegi ilma täiendava keelelise struktuurita. Me arendame selle hüpoteesi raamistikuks, kus analüüsipüüdlusi saab kontrollida ja väidame, et praeguste mudelite ja lähtejoonte puhul ei ole järeldused, et esindused sisaldavad keelelist struktuuri, hästi põhjendatud. Praegune uurimismetoodika, näiteks klassifitseerija väljendusvõime piiramine või tugevate lähtejoonte kasutamine, võib aidata paremini hinnata õppimise keerukust, kuid mitte luua alust spekulatsioonidele õppitud esitustes kodeeritud keelestruktuuri olemuse kohta.', 'cs': 'Klasifikátory trénované na pomocných sondovacích úlohách jsou oblíbeným nástrojem pro analýzu reprezentací naučených neuronovými snímači vět, jako jsou BERT a ELMo. Zatímco mnozí autoři si uvědomují obtížnost rozlišovat mezi "extrakcí jazykové struktury kódované v reprezentacích" a "učením se sondovacího úkolu", platnost sondovacích metod vyžaduje další výzkum. Pomocí sousední úlohy predikce identity slova ukazujeme, že vkládání tokenů získané neuronovými snímači vět obsahuje značné množství informací o přesném lineárním kontextu tokenu a hypotézu, že s těmito informacemi může být učení standardních úloh sondování proveditelné i bez další lingvistické struktury. Vyvíjíme tuto hypotézu do rámce, ve kterém lze analytické úsilí zkoumat a argumentovat, že u současných modelů a základních linií nejsou závěry, že reprezentace obsahují jazykovou strukturu, dobře opodstatněné. Současná metodika sondování, jako je omezení expresivity klasifikátoru nebo použití silných základních linek, může pomoci lépe odhadnout složitost učení, nikoli však vytvořit základ pro spekulace o povaze jazykové struktury zakódované v učených reprezentacích.', 'fi': 'Apuluotaimiin koulutetut luokittelijat ovat suosittu työkalu analysoida neurolausekoodereiden, kuten BERT- ja ELMo-tyyppisten representaatioiden oppimista. Vaikka monet kirjoittajat ovat tietoisia siitä, että on vaikea erottaa toisistaan "esitysten koodatun kielellisen rakenteen purkaminen" ja "koetustehtävän oppiminen", koetusmenetelmien pätevyys vaatii lisätutkimuksia. Viereisen sanaidentiteetin ennustamistehtävän avulla osoitamme, että neurolausekoodereilla opitut tunnuksen upotukset sisältävät merkittävän määrän tietoa tunnuksen täsmällisestä lineaarisesta kontekstista, ja otaksumme, että tällaisilla tiedoilla standardiluotaustehtävät voivat olla toteutettavissa myös ilman ylimääräistä kielellistä rakennetta. Kehitämme tämän hypoteesin viitekehykseksi, jossa analyysiponnisteluja voidaan tarkastella ja väitämme, että nykyisten mallien ja lähtölinjojen perusteella päätelmät siitä, että esitykset sisältävät kielellistä rakennetta, eivät ole perusteltuja. Nykyinen luotausmenetelmä, kuten luokittelijan ekspressiivisyyden rajoittaminen tai vahvojen lähtölinjojen käyttäminen, voi auttaa arvioimaan paremmin oppimisen monimutkaisuutta, mutta ei rakentaa perustaa spekulaatioita opittuihin representaatioihin koodatun kielellisen rakenteen luonteesta.', 'hy': "Օգնական ուսումնասիրության խնդիրների վրա սովորեցված դասակարգերը հայտնի գործիք են նյարդային նախադասությունների կոդերների միջոցով սովորված ներկայացումների վերլուծության համար, ինչպիսիք են BER և ELMo: While many authors are aware of the difficulty to distinguish between 'extracting the linguistic structure encoded in the representations' and 'learning the probing task,' the validity of probing methods calls for further research.  Օգտագործելով հարևան բառի ինքնության կանխատեսման խնդիրը, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նյարդային նախադասությունների կոդերներով սովորված նշանների ներդրումները պարունակում են նշանակալի քանակությամբ տեղեկատվություն նշանի ճշգրիտ գծային կոնտեքստի մասին, և ենթադրում ենք, որ նման տեղեկատվության հետ սովորելու ստանդարտ ուսումնասի Մենք զարգանում ենք այս հիպոթեզը մի շրջանակի, որտեղ վերլուծության ջանքները կարող են վերլուծվել և փաստարկել, որ ներկայիս մոդելների և հիմքերի միջոցով եզրակացությունները, որ ներկայացումները պարունակում են լեզվական կառուցվածք, լավ չեն հիմնված Այսօրվա ուսումնասիրության մեթոդոլոգիան, ինչպիսիք են դասակարգչի արտահայտության սահմանափակումները կամ ուժեղ հիմքերի օգտագործումը, կարող է օգնել ավելի լավ գնահատել ուսումնասիրության բարդությունը, սակայն ոչ թե հիմք կառուցել ուսումնասիրելի ներկայացումներում կոդավորված լեզվաբանական կառուցվա", 'ha': "Masana'a da aka sanar da shi a kan aikin bonobin da aka lissafa shi, shi ne wani zanar jama'a dõmin su yi anarrani ga dukkan matsayin da aka sanar da shi na kodinga kalma na ƙaranci kamar BERT da ELMo. Waka da mãsu yawa masu rubuci sun san cewa matabbata a rarrabe tsakanin 'kuɓutar da tsarin linguistic wanda aka kodi cikin mazaɓan' da 'leari aikin jarraba', da gaskiyar metode masu jarraba yana kira a ƙara research. Yi amfani da wani aikin shaidar kalma na jiran, muna nuna cewa alama da aka sanar da shi na kodi ɗin neural ana ƙunsa da ma'aunin maɓalli mai girma a cikin muhimmin lissafar da ke cikin alama na gaske, da pithesize, da wannan zane, za'a iya iya iya iya amfani da aikin jarraba na daidaita, ko kuma amma idan ba da wata ƙara cikin linguistic. Tuna buɗe wannan hisori zuwa wani firam wanda za'a yi anadi a cikinsa, kuma munã jãyayya, lalle, da misãlai na yanzu, ƙarshen masu gaya da tsarin linguistic ba za'a samar da shi ba. Tsarin da ake jarraba yanzu kamar kanana tsari'ar mai fasihi ko kuma ya yi amfani da baƙa ƙƙe masu ƙarfi, yana iya amfani da kwamfyutan muhimmanci wa lõkaci, kuma amma, bã ya sami wani asalin da za'a yi zafi game da jini na tsarin linguistic wanda aka kodi cikin masu motsi da za'a sani.", 'sk': 'Razvrščevalci, usposobljeni za pomožne naloge sondiranja, so priljubljeno orodje za analizo reprezentacij, ki jih naučijo nevralni kodirniki stavkov, kot sta BERT in ELMo. Medtem ko se mnogi avtorji zavedajo težavnosti razlikovanja med "ekstrakcijo jezikovne strukture, kodirane v reprezentacijah" in "učenjem naloge sondiranja", veljavnost metod sondiranja zahteva nadaljnje raziskave. S pomočjo naloge napovedovanja identitete sosednjih besed pokažemo, da vdelave žetonov, ki jih naučijo nevralni kodirniki stavkov, vsebujejo znatno količino informacij o natančnem linearnem kontekstu žetona, in hipotetiziramo, da so s takšnimi informacijami učenje standardnih opravil sondiranja izvedljive tudi brez dodatne jezikovne strukture. To hipotezo razvijamo v okvir, v katerem je mogoče pregledati analizna prizadevanja in trdimo, da z obstoječimi modeli in izhodišči ugotovitve, da reprezentacije vsebujejo jezikovno strukturo, niso utemeljene. Trenutna metodologija raziskovanja, kot je omejevanje izraznosti klasifikatorja ali uporaba močnih osnovnih črt, lahko pomaga bolje oceniti kompleksnost učenja, ne pa graditi temeljev za špekulacije o naravi jezikovne strukture, kodirane v učenih reprezentacijah.', 'he': 'Classifiers trained on auxiliary probing tasks are a popular tool to analyze the representations learned by neural sentence encoders such as BERT and ELMo.  בעוד הרבה סופרים מודעים לקשיקות להבדיל בין "החולץ את המבנה השפתי מוצפן ביציגות" וללמד את המשימה של חקירה, "קבילות שיטות חקירה דורשת מחקר נוסף. בשימוש במשימת חיזוי זהות של מילים שכונות, אנחנו מראים שהקישורים של סימנים שנלמדו על ידי קודם משפטים עצביים מכילים כמות משמעותית של מידע על הקשר לינרי המדויק של הסימן, וההיפותזיה ש, עם מידע כזה, למידה סטנדרטית משימות חיפוש עשויות להיות אפשריות אפילו ללא מבנה שפתי נוסף. אנו מפתחים את ההיפתוזה הזו למסגרת שבה ניתוח מאמצים יכולים לבדוק ולטוען כי, עם דוגמנים ונושאים הבסיסים הנוכחים, מסקנות כי מייצגים מכילים מבנה שפתי אינם מבוססים היטב. מטודולוגיה הנוכחית של חקירה, כמו הגבלה ביטוי של המקלסס או השימוש בקווי בסיס חזקים, יכולה לעזור להעריך טוב יותר את מורכבות הלימוד, אך לא לבנות בסיס לשערות על טבע המבנה הלשוני המקודם בתציגות הלמדות.', 'jv': 'iCalImp Ere hal akeh autor sing ngerti nggawe kesalakno sing nggawe diuluk \'Ngubah nggawe Stringkap Linguistik\' lan \'ngubah njaluk dhéwé kesempatan", ngubah dhéwé iso ngubah gambar uwong. Ngawe nguwe Perintah Panjenengan langgar sampeyan wigatiné Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan wiéaks iki luwih panelusuran karo nggawe nguasai perusahaan karo hal modèl lan basa sawar nggawe, karo model lan saiki, akeh sampek kawit karo repréntasi sing sumulakno dumadhi nggawe nguasai dumadhi sak ora bisa dianggawe. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi, kaya perusahaan nggawe gerakan kelas nang nguasai winih dhéwé, iso ngéwangi nggawe akeh luwih apik dhéwé, pero nggawe macem kuwi nggawe macem nggawe gerakan dhéwé kesempalahan kanggo masara awak dhéwé dumadhi sak kelas nggawe gerakan.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིག་གིས་ཕན་ཆེན་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགན་སྨན་པའི་འཛིན་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིབ་ཡིན། རྩོམ་པ་པོ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་དཀའ Using a neighboring word identity prediction task, we show that the token embeddings learned by neural sentence encoders contain a significant amount of information about the exact linear context of the token, and hypothesize that, with such information, learning standard probing tasks may be feasible even without additional linguistic structure. We develop this hypothesis into a framework in which analysis efforts can be scrutinized and argue that, with current models and baselines, conclusions that representations contain linguistic structure are not well-founded. ད་ལྟོའི་དཔྱད་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ། དཔེར་ན། དབྱེ་བ་ཡིག་གི་གསལ་བརྗོད་དམ་བསམ་བྱེད་པའམ་ཤེས་གཞི་རྩོལ་བ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Priorless Recurrent Networks Learn Curiously', 'fr': 'Les réseaux récurrents sans priorité apprennent avec curiosité', 'ar': 'الشبكات المتكررة غير المسبوقة تعلم بفضول', 'pt': 'Redes recorrentes sem prioridade aprendem curiosamente', 'es': 'Las redes recurrentes sin priorless aprenden curiosamente', 'ja': '前例のない繰り返しネットワークが好奇心旺盛に学ぶ', 'ru': 'Приоритетные периодические сети с любопытством учатся', 'zh': '无先验循环网络好奇而学', 'hi': 'Priorless आवर्तक नेटवर्क उत्सुकता से जानें', 'ga': 'Foghlaimíonn Líonraí Athfhillteacha Priorless go Aisteach', 'el': 'Τα επαναλαμβανόμενα δίκτυα χωρίς προτεραιότητα μαθαίνουν περίεργα', 'ka': 'პრორიმენტები განვითარებული ქსელები', 'hu': 'Elsődleges ismétlődő hálózatok Tanuljon kíváncsian', 'kk': 'Кездейсіз қайталанатын желілер қызықты оқу', 'mk': 'Неприоритетни рекурентни мрежи учат интересно', 'lt': 'Neprioritetiniai kartotiniai tinklai įdomiai mokosi', 'it': 'Reti ricorrenti senza priorità Impara in modo curioso', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Berulang Tanpa Mula Belajar Dengan Menarik', 'mt': 'In-Netwerks Rikorrenti mingħajr Prijorità jitgħallmu b’Curiosity', 'mn': 'Өмнөх дахин дахин дахин шилжүүлэгч', 'ml': 'Priorless Recurrent Networks Learn Curiously', 'no': 'Lær nysgjerrige tidlegare gjentaande nettverk', 'ro': 'Rețele recurente fără prioritate Aflați curios', 'pl': 'Sieci powtarzające się bez przerwy Naucz się ciekawie', 'sr': 'Неприоритно повторене мреже научавају', 'sv': 'Prioritetslösa återkommande nätverk Lär dig nyfiket', 'ta': 'தற்போது முதலில்லாத நிகழ்ந்த வலைப்பின்னல்களை கற்றுக்கொள்', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන ආපහු වෙනස් ජාලය සංවිධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Baro waqtiga hore', 'ur': 'بے اگلے دوبارہ نیٹورک سیکھتے ہیں', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Cần thiết lập liên tục', 'bg': 'Безвъзмездни повтарящи се мрежи научават любопитно', 'nl': 'Priorloze terugkerende netwerken Leer nieuwsgierig', 'da': 'Priorless Recurrent Networks Lær nysgerrig', 'hr': 'Neobične povratne mreže uče znatiželjno', 'de': 'Priorless Recurrent Networks Lernen Sie neugierig', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای دوباره\u200cای پیش\u200cبینی، جالب یاد می\u200cگیرند', 'id': 'Rangkaian Berulang Tanpa Priori Belajar dengan Curiosus', 'ko': '선험이 없는 순환 네트워크는 학습하기 매우 이상하다', 'af': 'Ongelees Herhaalde Netwerke Leer Nuuskies', 'sq': 'Rrjetet e Përparshme', 'sw': 'Priorless Recurrent Networks Learn Curiously', 'az': '∆Źvv…ôlc…ô GediŇüan Ańülar', 'hy': 'Հետաքրքիր է սովորել աննախաձեռն կրկնվող ցանցերը', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'bs': 'Neobične povratne mreže uče znatiželjno', 'ca': 'Les xarxes recurrents sense priori aprenen Curiosament', 'bn': 'Priorless Recurrent Networks Learn Curiously', 'fi': 'Priorless Toistuvat verkot Opi uteliaasti', 'tr': 'Geçersiz Gaýd Edilmeler', 'cs': 'Bezpřednostní opakované sítě Naučte se zvláštně', 'et': 'Priorless korduvad võrgud Õppige huvitavalt', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'sk': 'Ponavljajoča se omrežja Priorless Naučite se radovedno', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Jaringan', 'he': 'רשתות חוזרות ללא קודמות ללמוד באופן מוזר', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མེད་པའི་དྲ་བ་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'Recently, domain-general recurrent neural networks, without explicit linguistic inductive biases, have been shown to successfully reproduce a range of human language behaviours, such as accurately predicting number agreement between nouns and verbs. We show that such networks will also learn number agreement within unnatural sentence structures, i.e. structures that are not found within any natural languages and which humans struggle to process. These results suggest that the models are learning from their input in a manner that is substantially different from human language acquisition, and we undertake an analysis of how the learned knowledge is stored in the weights of the network. We find that while the model has an effective understanding of singular versus plural for individual sentences, there is a lack of a unified concept of number agreement connecting these processes across the full range of inputs. Moreover, the weights handling natural and unnatural structures overlap substantially, in a way that underlines the non-human-like nature of the knowledge learned by the network.', 'es': 'Recientemente, se ha demostrado que las redes neuronales recurrentes de dominio general, sin sesgos inductivos lingüísticos explícitos, reproducen con éxito una variedad de comportamientos del lenguaje humano, como predecir con precisión la concordancia numérica entre sustantivos y verbos. Demostramos que tales redes también aprenderán la concordancia numérica dentro de estructuras de oraciones antinaturales, es decir, estructuras que no se encuentran en ningún lenguaje natural y que los humanos luchan por procesar. Estos resultados sugieren que los modelos están aprendiendo de sus aportaciones de una manera sustancialmente diferente a la adquisición del lenguaje humano, y realizamos un análisis de cómo el conocimiento aprendido se almacena en los pesos de la red. Encontramos que, si bien el modelo tiene una comprensión efectiva del singular frente al plural para oraciones individuales, falta un concepto unificado de acuerdo numérico que conecte estos procesos en toda la gama de entradas. Además, los pesos que manejan estructuras naturales y no naturales se superponen sustancialmente, de una manera que subraya la naturaleza no humana del conocimiento aprendido por la red.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، ثبت أن الشبكات العصبية المتكررة ذات النطاق العام ، بدون تحيزات استقرائية لغوية صريحة ، قد نجحت في إعادة إنتاج مجموعة من السلوكيات اللغوية البشرية ، مثل التنبؤ الدقيق باتفاق الأرقام بين الأسماء والأفعال. نظهر أن مثل هذه الشبكات ستتعلم أيضًا اتفاق الأرقام داخل هياكل الجملة غير الطبيعية ، أي الهياكل غير الموجودة في أي لغة طبيعية والتي يكافح البشر لمعالجتها. تشير هذه النتائج إلى أن النماذج تتعلم من مدخلاتها بطريقة تختلف اختلافًا جوهريًا عن اكتساب اللغة البشرية ، ونجري تحليلًا لكيفية تخزين المعرفة المكتسبة في أوزان الشبكة. نجد أنه في حين أن النموذج لديه فهم فعال للمفرد مقابل الجمع للجمل الفردية ، إلا أن هناك نقصًا في مفهوم موحد لاتفاق الأرقام الذي يربط هذه العمليات عبر النطاق الكامل من المدخلات. علاوة على ذلك ، تتداخل الأوزان التي تتعامل مع الهياكل الطبيعية وغير الطبيعية بشكل كبير ، بطريقة تؤكد الطبيعة غير الشبيهة بالبشر للمعرفة التي تعلمتها الشبكة.', 'fr': "Récemment, il a été démontré que les réseaux neuronaux récurrents généraux de domaine, sans biais linguistique inductifs explicites, reproduisent avec succès une gamme de comportements langagiers humains, tels que la prédiction précise de l'accord des nombres entre les noms et les verbes. Nous montrons que de tels réseaux apprendront également la concordance numérique au sein de structures de phrases non naturelles, c'est-à-dire des structures qui ne se trouvent dans aucun langage naturel et que les humains ont du mal à traiter. Ces résultats suggèrent que les modèles apprennent à partir de leur entrée d'une manière sensiblement différente de l'acquisition du langage humain, et nous entreprenons une analyse de la façon dont les connaissances apprises sont stockées dans les poids du réseau. Nous constatons que, bien que le modèle comprenne efficacement le singulier et le pluriel pour les phrases individuelles, il n'existe pas de concept unifié de concordance des nombres reliant ces processus à travers l'ensemble des entrées. De plus, les poids manipulant des structures naturelles et non naturelles se chevauchent sensiblement, d'une manière qui souligne la nature non humaine des connaissances acquises par le réseau.", 'pt': 'Recentemente, redes neurais recorrentes de domínio geral, sem vieses indutivos linguísticos explícitos, demonstraram reproduzir com sucesso uma variedade de comportamentos da linguagem humana, como prever com precisão a concordância numérica entre substantivos e verbos. Mostramos que essas redes também aprenderão a concordância numérica dentro de estruturas de sentenças não naturais, ou seja, estruturas que não são encontradas em nenhuma linguagem natural e que os humanos lutam para processar. Esses resultados sugerem que os modelos estão aprendendo com suas entradas de uma maneira substancialmente diferente da aquisição da linguagem humana, e realizamos uma análise de como o conhecimento aprendido é armazenado nos pesos da rede. Descobrimos que, embora o modelo tenha uma compreensão efetiva do singular versus plural para sentenças individuais, há uma falta de um conceito unificado de concordância numérica conectando esses processos em toda a gama de entradas. Além disso, os pesos que lidam com estruturas naturais e não naturais se sobrepõem substancialmente, de uma forma que destaca a natureza não humana do conhecimento aprendido pela rede.', 'ja': '最近、明示的な言語的帰納的バイアスを伴わない一般的な領域再帰ニューラルネットワークは、名詞と動詞との間の数の一致を正確に予測するなど、一連の人間の言語行動を成功裏に再現することが示されている。 このようなネットワークはまた、不自然な文章構造、すなわち、どの自然言語にも見られず、人間が処理するのに苦労している構造内での数の一致を学習することを示しています。 これらの結果は、モデルが人間の言語習得とは大きく異なる方法で彼らの入力から学習していることを示唆しており、学習された知識がネットワークの重みにどのように保存されるかの分析を行っている。 我々は、モデルが個々の文の単数対複数の効果的な理解を持っている一方で、入力の全範囲にわたってこれらのプロセスを結びつける数値合意の統一された概念が欠如していることを発見した。 さらに、自然および不自然な構造を扱う重みは、ネットワークによって学習された知識の非人間のような性質を強調する方法で、実質的に重なり合っている。', 'zh': '近者,未有明言归偏差之域递归神经网络已验可以成功复见人言行,如准名动词之间数一致性。 吾明此网络将学非自然之数一致性,即一切自然语言中不可得而人难处也。 此结果表明方以一言习得截然从其输学,而所学何以储网络之权重也。 虽有一效于复数,而无一统之数一致性,属于诸输。 又处自然之权重,以网络所学之非人类性也。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, डोमेन-सामान्य आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, स्पष्ट भाषाई आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रहों के बिना, मानव भाषा के व्यवहारों की एक श्रृंखला को सफलतापूर्वक पुन: पेश करने के लिए दिखाया गया है, जैसे कि संज्ञा और क्रियाओं के बीच संख्या समझौते की सटीक भविष्यवाणी करना। हम दिखाते हैं कि ऐसे नेटवर्क अप्राकृतिक वाक्य संरचनाओं के भीतर संख्या समझौते को भी सीखेंगे, यानी संरचनाएं जो किसी भी प्राकृतिक भाषाओं के भीतर नहीं पाई जाती हैं और जिन्हें मनुष्य संसाधित करने के लिए संघर्ष करते हैं। इन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि मॉडल अपने इनपुट से इस तरह से सीख रहे हैं जो मानव भाषा अधिग्रहण से काफी अलग है, और हम इस बात का विश्लेषण करते हैं कि सीखा ज्ञान नेटवर्क के वजन में कैसे संग्रहीत किया जाता है। हम पाते हैं कि जबकि मॉडल में व्यक्तिगत वाक्यों के लिए एकवचन बनाम बहुवचन की प्रभावी समझ है, इनपुट की पूरी श्रृंखला में इन प्रक्रियाओं को जोड़ने वाली संख्या समझौते की एक एकीकृत अवधारणा की कमी है। इसके अलावा, प्राकृतिक और अप्राकृतिक संरचनाओं को संभालने वाले वजन काफी हद तक ओवरलैप होते हैं, एक तरह से जो नेटवर्क द्वारा सीखे गए ज्ञान की गैर-मानव जैसी प्रकृति को रेखांकित करता है।', 'ru': 'В последнее время было показано, что общие доменные рекуррентные нейронные сети без явных лингвистических индуктивных искажений успешно воспроизводят ряд видов поведения человеческого языка, таких как точное предсказание совпадения чисел между существительными и глаголами. Мы показываем, что такие сети также будут учиться согласованию чисел в неестественных структурах предложений, то есть структурах, которые не найдены ни в одном из естественных языков и которые люди с трудом обрабатывают. Эти результаты свидетельствуют о том, что модели извлекают уроки из своего вклада таким образом, который существенно отличается от освоения человеческого языка, и мы проводим анализ того, как полученные знания хранятся в весах сети. Мы обнаружили, что, хотя модель имеет эффективное понимание единственного числа по сравнению с множественным числом для отдельных предложений, отсутствует единая концепция согласования чисел, связывающая эти процессы по всему диапазону входных данных. Кроме того, веса, обрабатывающие природные и неестественные структуры, существенно перекрываются, что подчеркивает нечеловекоподобный характер знаний, изучаемых сетью.', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, léiríodh go n-athchruthaíonn líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha ginearálta fearainn, gan laofachtaí ionduchtaithe teangeolaíocha follasacha, raon iompraíochtaí teanga daonna, ar nós comhaontú uimhreach idir ainmfhocail agus briathra a thuar go beacht. Léirímid go bhfoghlaimeoidh líonraí dá leithéid comhaontú uimhreach laistigh de struchtúir abairtí mínádúrtha, i.e. struchtúir nach bhfuil le fáil laistigh d’aon teanga nádúrtha agus a mbíonn deacrachtaí ag daoine iad a phróiseáil. Tugann na torthaí seo le tuiscint go bhfuil na samhlacha ag foghlaim óna n-ionchur ar bhealach atá an-difriúil le sealbhú teanga an duine, agus déanaimid anailís ar an gcaoi a stóráiltear an t-eolas foghlamtha i meáchain an ghréasáin. Is léir dúinn, cé go bhfuil tuiscint éifeachtach ag an múnla ar uimhir uatha in aghaidh iolra d’abairtí aonair, go bhfuil easpa coincheap aontaithe de chomhaontú uimhreach ag nascadh na bpróiseas seo thar raon iomlán na n-ionchur. Ina theannta sin, forluíonn na meáchain a láimhseáil struchtúir nádúrtha agus mínádúrtha go substaintiúil, ar bhealach a leagann béim ar nádúr neamhchosúil leis an duine san eolas a fhoghlaimíonn an líonra.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα, επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα γενικού τομέα, χωρίς ρητές γλωσσικές επαγωγικές προκατάληψη, έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι αναπαράγουν επιτυχώς μια σειρά συμπεριφορών ανθρώπινης γλώσσας, όπως η ακριβής πρόβλεψη της συμφωνίας αριθμών μεταξύ ουσιαστικών και ρήμων. Δείχνουμε ότι τέτοια δίκτυα θα μάθουν επίσης τη συμφωνία αριθμών μέσα σε αφύσικες δομές προτάσεων, δηλαδή δομές που δεν βρίσκονται σε καμία φυσική γλώσσα και τις οποίες οι άνθρωποι αγωνίζονται να επεξεργαστούν. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά υποδηλώνουν ότι τα μοντέλα μαθαίνουν από την εισαγωγή τους με τρόπο που είναι ουσιαστικά διαφορετικός από την απόκτηση ανθρώπινης γλώσσας, και αναλαμβάνουμε μια ανάλυση του πώς αποθηκεύεται η διδασκόμενη γνώση στα βάρη του δικτύου. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι ενώ το μοντέλο έχει μια αποτελεσματική κατανόηση του μοναδικού έναντι του πληθυντικού για μεμονωμένες προτάσεις, υπάρχει έλλειψη ενιαίας έννοιας της συμφωνίας αριθμών που συνδέει αυτές τις διαδικασίες σε όλο το φάσμα των εισροών. Επιπλέον, τα βάρη που χειρίζονται φυσικές και αφύσικες δομές επικαλύπτονται σημαντικά, με τρόπο που υπογραμμίζει την μη ανθρώπινη φύση της γνώσης που αποκτά το δίκτυο.', 'hu': 'A közelmúltban az általános domain-általános visszatérő neurális hálózatok, explicit nyelvi induktív előítéletek nélkül, sikeresen reprodukálják az emberi nyelvi viselkedéseket, mint például a főnevek és igék közötti számok pontos előrejelzése. Megmutatjuk, hogy az ilyen hálózatok természetellenes mondatszerkezetekben is megtanulják a számok megállapodását, azaz olyan struktúrákon belül, amelyek nem találhatók meg semmilyen természetes nyelven, és amelyek feldolgozásáért az emberek küzdenek. Ezek az eredmények azt sugallják, hogy a modellek az emberi nyelv elsajátításától lényegesen eltérő módon tanulnak, és elemzést végzünk arról, hogyan tárolják a megtanult ismereteket a hálózat súlyában. Úgy találjuk, hogy bár a modell hatékony megértést nyújt az egyes mondatok egyéni kontra többes számára, hiányzik a számszerződés egységes fogalma, amely összekapcsolja ezeket a folyamatokat a bemenetek teljes skáláján. Ezenkívül a természetes és természetellenes struktúrákat kezelő súlyok jelentősen átfednek, oly módon, hogy hangsúlyozzák a hálózat által tanult tudás nem emberi jellegét.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე დომინური რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელები, რომლებიც წარმოიდგინეთ ენგურისტიკური ინდექტიური წარმოდგინება, მოჩვენებულია, რომ წარმოდგინეთ ადამიანური ენგურაციის ქცევების დისონე, რო ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი ქსელები ასევე დავისწავლოთ რიცხვების შედგომარების შედგომარება, რომლებიც არ მოიძებნა ნებისმიერი ენაში და რომლებიც ადამიანები პროცესისთვი ამ შედეგების შესახებ, რომ მოდელები მათი მონაცემებისგან სწავლობენ, რომელიც ადამიანის ენის მონაცემებისგან ძალიან განსხვავებულია, და ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ანალიზაციას, როგორ მონაცემების ცოცხლებ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ მოდელში ერთადერთი სიტყვებისთვის პროცესების ეფექტიური გაგრძნობა, როდესაც ინდიველური სიტყვებისთვის პროცესების ყველა სიტყვებისთვის ერთადერთი კონცეს დამატებით, სიმაღლეები, რომლებიც ბუნებრივი და ბუნებრივი სტრუქტურებების გარეშე ძალიან გადარწმუნდება, რომლებიც ქსელიდან ვისწავლეთ ცნობილების მსგავსი არაფერ', 'it': "Recentemente, le reti neurali ricorrenti di dominio generale, senza pregiudizi induttivi linguistici espliciti, hanno dimostrato di riprodurre con successo una serie di comportamenti del linguaggio umano, come la previsione accurata dell'accordo numerico tra sostantivi e verbi. Mostriamo che tali reti impareranno anche l'accordo numerico all'interno di strutture di frase innaturali, cioè strutture che non si trovano all'interno di alcun linguaggio naturale e che gli esseri umani faticano a elaborare. Questi risultati suggeriscono che i modelli stanno imparando dal loro input in un modo sostanzialmente diverso dall'acquisizione del linguaggio umano, e intraprendiamo un'analisi di come le conoscenze apprese sono memorizzate nei pesi della rete. Troviamo che mentre il modello ha una comprensione efficace del singolare contro il plurale per singole frasi, c'è una mancanza di un concetto unificato di accordo numerico che collega questi processi attraverso l'intera gamma di input. Inoltre, i pesi che maneggiano strutture naturali e innaturali si sovrappongono sostanzialmente, in modo da sottolineare la natura non umana delle conoscenze apprese dalla rete.", 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu buvo įrodyta, kad dažnai pasikartojantys nerviniai tinklai iš bendro domeno, be aiškių kalbinių induktyvių nukrypimų, sėkmingai atskleidžia įvairius žmogaus kalbų elgesius, pvz., tiksliai nuspėja skaičių tarp vardų ir žodžių. Mes parodysime, kad tokie tinklai taip pat i šmoks susitarti dėl skaičiaus nenaturiose sakinių struktūrose, t. y. struktūrose, kurios nėra rastos jokiose natūraliose kalbose ir kurios žmonėms sunku apdoroti. Šie rezultatai rodo, kad modeliai mokosi iš jų įnašų taip, kad iš esmės skiriasi nuo žmogaus kalbos įgijimo, ir mes atliekame analizę, kaip mokomos žinios saugomos tinklo svoriuose. Mes manome, kad nors model is veiksmingai supranta atskirų sakinių vienintelę ir daugialypę sąvoką, trūksta vieningos skaičiaus susitarimo sąvokos, jungiančios šiuos procesus visame įvedimų spektre. Be to, svoriai, kuriais tvarkomos natūralios ir nenaturinės struktūros, iš esmės sutampa, taip pabrėžiant, kad tinkle įgytos žinios nėra panašios į žmogų pobūdį.', 'kk': 'Жуырда, доменге қайталанатын невралды желілер, тілі индукциялық индукциялық өзгерістер болмаса, адамдардың тіл әрекеттерін сәтті қайталауға болады, мәліметтер мен вербалардың арасындағы сандардың келесімдерін дұрыс та Біз бұл желілерді басқа табиғи тілдерде табылмаған, адамдар өзгерту үшін көмектесетін сандардың түсініктемесін үйрене аламыз. Бұл нәтижелер үлгілерді адамдардың тілдерін алу арқылы білім беру арқылы үйренеді. Біз білім мәліметтерді желінің тегістерінде қалай сақтау арқылы анализ береміз. Біз үлгісінде бөлек сөйлемелер үшін бір-бірінші және көпшілікті түсінікті болғанда, бұл процестерді толық жазу аралығында біріктірілген сандардың біріктірілген түсінікті жоқ. Сонымен қатар, табиғи және табиғи құрылғыларды көбірек жасау үшін, желінен үйренген білім емес адамдардың тәуелдігін бағыттайды.', 'mk': 'Неодамна, генералните рецидентни невровни мрежи на домен, без експлицитни јазички индуктивни предрасуди, се покажаа дека успешно се репродуктираат различни однесувања на човечкиот јазик, како што е прецизното предвидување на броевниот договор помеѓу именици и дективи. Ние покажуваме дека ваквите мрежи, исто така, ќе научат броевен договор во неприродните структури на реченици, односно структури кои не се најдени во ниеден природен јазик и кои луѓето се борат да ги процесираат. These results suggest that the models are learning from their input in a manner that is substantially different from human language acquisition, and we undertake an analysis of how the learned knowledge is stored in the weights of the network.  Најдовме дека иако моделот има ефикасно разбирање на единствената против множина за индивидуалните реченици, постои недостаток на единствен концепт на броевен договор кој ги поврзува овие процеси низ целиот опсег на внесувања. Покрај тоа, тежините кои се справуваат со природните и неприродните структури значително се преплавуваат, на начин кој ја истакнува нечовечката природа на знаењето што го научи мрежата.', 'ms': 'Baru-baru ini, rangkaian saraf berkurun-umum domain, tanpa bias induktif bahasa yang jelas, telah dipaparkan untuk mengembalikan dengan sukses julat perilaku bahasa manusia, seperti meramalkan persatuan nombor antara nama dan verb. Kami menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian tersebut juga akan belajar persetujuan nombor dalam struktur kalimat yang tidak biasa, iaitu struktur yang tidak ditemui dalam mana-mana bahasa alam dan yang manusia berjuang untuk memproses. Hasil-hasil ini menunjukkan bahawa model belajar dari input mereka dengan cara yang sangat berbeza dari pengakuan bahasa manusia, dan kita melakukan analisis bagaimana pengetahuan belajar disimpan dalam berat-berat rangkaian. Kami mendapati bahawa walaupun model mempunyai pemahaman yang efektif dari satu lawan berbilang untuk kalimat individu, terdapat kekurangan konsep persetujuan nombor yang menyambungkan proses ini melalui julat penuh input. Lagipun, berat badan yang mengendalikan struktur semulajadi dan tidak semulajadi bertutup secara mendalam, dengan cara yang menegakkan sifat yang tidak seperti manusia pengetahuan yang dipelajari oleh rangkaian.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ജനറല്\u200d പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ഭാഷ വ്യവസ്ഥകളില്ലാതെ വിജയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഭാഷ പ്രവണങ്ങളെ വ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നുവെന്റുകള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്പര്\u200d സമ്മതം പഠിക്കുന്നതും സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d കാ ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നത് അവയുടെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നിന്ന് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അത് മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഭാഷ കിട്ടുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്. ശ്രദ്ധിച്ച അറിവ നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു ഈ മോഡലിന് ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒറ്റയ്ക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെട്ടതിനെക്കുറി അതുകൊണ്ടും, സ്വാഭാവികമായും അസാധാരണയില്ലാത്ത കൃത്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ വലുതാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. നെറ്റ', 'mt': 'Recently, domain-general recurrent neural networks, without explicit linguistic inductive biases, have been shown to successfully reproduce a range of human language behaviours, such as accurately predicting number agreement between nouns and verbs.  Aħna nuru li dawn in-netwerks se jitgħallmu wkoll ftehim dwar in-numri fi ħdan strutturi mhux natural i tas-sentenzi, jiġifieri strutturi li ma jinstabux fi ħdan l-ebda lingwa naturali u li l-bnedmin għandhom diffikultà biex jipproċessaw. Dawn ir-riżultati jissuġġerixxu li l-mudelli qed jitgħallmu mill-input tagħhom b’mod li huwa sostanzjalment differenti mill-akkwist tal-lingwa umana, u nagħmlu analiżi ta’ kif l-għarfien miksub jinħa żen fil-piżijiet tan-netwerk. Aħna nsibu li filwaqt li l-mudell għandu fehim effettiv ta’ sentenzi singoli kontra plurali individwali, hemm nuqqas ta’ kunċett unifikat ta’ ftehim tan-numru li jgħaqqad dawn il-proċessi fil-firxa sħiħa ta’ inputs. Barra minn hekk, il-piżijiet li jimmaniġġjaw l-istrutturi naturali u mhux naturali jikkoinċidu sostanzjalment, b’mod li jissottolinja n-natura mhux simili għall-bniedem tal-għarfien miksub min-netwerk.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед домены ерөнхий дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний хувьд тодорхой хэлний сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлаар хүмүүсийн хэл үйл ажиллагааг амжилттай үржүүлэх боломжтой болсон. Бид ийм сүлжээг мөн байгалийн хэл дотор олж чадахгүй, хүмүүс ямар ч байгалийн хэл дотор олж чадахгүй тооны зөвшөөрөл суралцах болно. Эдгээр үр дүнүүд нь загварууд хүний хэл худалдан авч үзэхээс илүү өөр өөрчлөгдөж байгааг ойлгож байна. Бид сурсан мэдлэг хэрхэн хадгалдаг талаар шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид загвар нь нэг хэлбэрийн эсвэл олон хэлбэрийн тухай эффективний ойлголтыг олж мэддэг байхдаа эдгээр үйл явцуудыг бүхэл хэлбэрээр холбоотой тооны зөвлөлтийн нэгдсэн ойлголтын тухай байхгүй байна. Мөн байгалийн болон байгалийн байгалийн бүтцийг удирдах жин нь хүн төрөлхтний мэдлэг бус байгалийг сургалтын сүлжээнд сурсан.', 'no': 'Nyleg har domenegenerell gjentakelige neuralnettverk, utan eksplisitt språk induktiv forsikt, vist for å gjenoppretta eit rekkjefølgje av menneskelige språk, slik som nøyaktig forhåndsvising av nummeravtale mellom namn og verbar. Vi viser at slike nettverk vil også lære taleavtale innen utnaturlege setningsstrukturar, t.d. strukturer som ikkje er funne i nokon naturleg språk og kva mennesker kjem for å handsama. Desse resultatene tyder på at modelane lærer frå inndata sine på ein måte som er stort forskjellig frå innbygging av menneskelige språk, og vi undersøker ein analyse av korleis den lærte kunnskapen er lagra i vektene på nettverket. Vi finn at mens modellen har ein effektiv forståelse av enkelær versus plural for individuelle setningar, er det ein mangling av eit enkelt konsept av taleavtale som koplar desse prosessene over heile rekkjefølgja av inndata. I tillegg overlapper vektene som handterar naturlege og ubenaturlege strukturer vanskeleg, på ein måte som understrekar den ikkje-menneskelige naturen av kunnskapen lærte av nettverket.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio wykazano, że powtarzające się sieci neuronowe, bez wyraźnych językowych uprzedzeń indukcyjnych, z powodzeniem reprodukują szereg zachowań języka ludzkiego, takich jak dokładne przewidywanie zgodności liczbowej między rzeczownikami a czasownikami. Pokazujemy, że takie sieci nauczą się również zgodności liczbowej w nienaturalnych strukturach zdań, czyli strukturach, które nie występują w żadnym języku naturalnym i które ludzie zmagają się z przetwarzaniem. Wyniki te sugerują, że modele uczą się ze swojego wkładu w sposób znacząco różni się od nabywania języka ludzkiego i podejmujemy analizę tego, w jaki sposób zdobyta wiedza jest przechowywana w wagach sieci. Odkrywamy, że choć model ma skuteczne zrozumienie liczby pojedynczej i mnogiej dla poszczególnych zdań, brakuje jednolitej koncepcji porozumienia liczbowego łączącego te procesy w całym zakresie danych wejściowych. Ponadto wagi obsługujące struktury naturalne i nienaturalne znacznie się nakładają, w sposób, który podkreśla nieludzki charakter wiedzy zdobytej przez sieć.', 'sr': 'Nedavno se pokazalo da su općenita domena rekonstruirana neuralna mreža, bez objašnjenja jezičkih induktivnih predrasuda, uspešno reprodukovala niz ljudskih jezičkih ponašanja, kao što je tačno predviđanje sporazuma o broju između imena i verba. Pokazujemo da će takve mreže takođe naučiti sporazum brojeva u strukturi neoprirodne rečenice, tj. strukture koje nisu pronađene u bilo kojem prirodnom jeziku i koje se ljudi bore za proces. Ovi rezultati ukazuju na to da se modeli uče od njihovog ulaza na način na koji je značajno različit od prikupljanja ljudskih jezika, i poduzimamo analizu kako se naučeno znanje čuva u težini mreže. Nalazimo da, dok model ima efikasno razumevanje jednostavnih i pluralnih rečenica za pojedinačne rečenice, nedostaje jedinstvenog koncepta sporazuma o broju koji povezuje ove procese preko punog raspona ulaganja. Osim toga, težin a koja se bavi prirodnim i neprirodnim strukturama se značajno preklapa na način na koji naglašava ne-ljudsku prirodu znanja koje je naučila mreža.', 'ro': 'Recent, rețelele neurale recurente ale domeniului general, fără prejudecăți inductive lingvistice explicite, au fost demonstrate că reproduc cu succes o serie de comportamente ale limbajului uman, cum ar fi prezicerea corectă a acordului de numere între substantive și verbe. Arătăm că astfel de rețele vor învăța, de asemenea, acordul numeric în structuri nenaturale de propoziții, adică structuri care nu se găsesc în niciun limbaj natural și pe care oamenii se luptă să le proceseze. Aceste rezultate sugerează că modelele învăță din contribuția lor într-un mod care este substanțial diferit de dobândirea limbii umane și efectuăm o analiză a modului în care cunoștințele învățate sunt stocate în greutatea rețelei. Descoperim că, în timp ce modelul are o înțelegere eficientă a singularului versus plural pentru propoziții individuale, există o lipsă a unui concept unificat de acord numeric care conectează aceste procese în întreaga gamă de intrări. Mai mult decât atât, greutățile care manipulează structurile naturale și nenaturale se suprapun substanțial, într-un mod care subliniază natura non-umană a cunoștințelor învățate de rețea.', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන්, ඩොමේන්-සාමාන්\u200dය ආපහු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය නිර්මාණ ජාතික ජාතික, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නැතුව, සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේ ජාල ජාලයේ අනාවර්\u200dය වාක්ෂා සංවිධානයේ සංවිධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඉතින් ස්වභ මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දේවල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මොඩේල් ඔවුන්ගේ ඇතුල් එකෙන් ඉගෙනගන්නේ මිනිස්සු භාෂාව අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, අපි ඉ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dර ඒවගේම, ස්වභාවික සහ නිර්භාවික ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා, ජාලයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත දැනගන්න බැරි මිනිස්සු වග', 'so': 'Hadii ugu dhowayd shabakado neurada ah oo gudaha ku soo socda, iyadoo aan cayiman oo muuqanayn dabeecada afka dadka oo kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan wax si sax ah u sii sheegaya heshiiska nuurada ee u dhexeeya noocyada iyo shaqooyinka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in shabakado caynkaas ah ay sidoo kale ka baran doonaan heshiis lambara ah oo ku jirta dhismaha xukunka ah, tusaale ahaan dhismaha aan laga helin luuqadaha dabiiciga ah iyo in dadku u u dagaalamayo si ay u baaraandegaan. Sabuulladan waxay ka jeedaan in modellada laga barto injiilkooda qaab aad u kala duwan karo koritaanka luqada dadka, waxaana baaraynaa baaritaanka sida aqoonta la barto loogu kaydiyo miisaanka shabakadda. Waxaynu ognahay in marka sameyntu ay leedahay garasho faa’iido ah oo ay leedahay halka mid ah oo ka mid ah fursad kali ah, hal ka baahna fekerka heshiiska lambarada ee la xiriira baaritaanka oo dhan. Sidoo kale miisaanka dabiicadda iyo dhismaha caadiga ah ayaa si weyn u kor saara qaab hoos u dhigta dabiicadda aqoonta u eg ee shabakadda lagu baray.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், களம்- பொது நிகழ்வு நிலையான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்கள், வெளிப்படையான மொழி செயல்பாடுகள் இல்லாமல், வெற்றிகரமாக மனித மொழி நடத்தைகளை வெற்றிகரமாக மாற்ற வேண நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அந்த வலைப்பின்னல்கள் வாக்கியமில்லாத கட்டங்களில் எண்ணிக்கை ஒப்பந்தம் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும், அதாவது, எந்த இயற் இந்த முடிவுகள் மாதிரிகளின் உள்ளீட்டிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்கிறார்கள் என்பது முறைமையாக மனித மொழி பெறுவதிலிருந்து மாறுபட்டுள்ளது என்று தெரி இந்த மாதிரியில் தனியார் வாக்கியங்களுக்கு ஒற்றைப்படையான புரிந்து கொள்ளும் போது, இந்த செயல்பாடுகள் முழு விளைவுகளுக்கு இணைக்கும் எண் ஒப்ப மேலும், இயற்கையான மற்றும் வித்தியாசமான அமைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்தும் எடைகள் பெரியதாக மூடுகிறது, வலைப்பிணையமைப்பில் கற்றுக் கொண்', 'sv': 'Nyligen har domängenerella återkommande neurala nätverk, utan explicita språkliga induktiva fördomar, visat sig framgångsrikt reproducera en rad mänskliga språkbeteenden, såsom korrekt förutsägelse av talöverenskommelser mellan substantiv och verb. Vi visar att sådana nätverk också kommer att lära sig talöverenskommelse inom onaturliga meningsstrukturer, dvs strukturer som inte finns inom något naturligt språk och som människor kämpar för att bearbeta. Resultaten tyder på att modellerna lär sig av deras input på ett sätt som skiljer sig väsentligt från mänskligt språkförvärv, och vi gör en analys av hur den lärda kunskapen lagras i nätverkets vikter. Vi finner att även om modellen har en effektiv förståelse av singular kontra plural för enskilda meningar, saknas det ett enhetligt koncept för numreravtal som kopplar samman dessa processer över hela spektrumet av inmatningar. Dessutom överlappar vikterna som hanterar naturliga och onaturliga strukturer avsevärt, på ett sätt som understryker den icke-mänskliga naturen hos den kunskap som lärts av nätverket.', 'ur': 'اچھے وقت، ڈومین-عمومی دوبارہ نئورل نیٹورل نیٹورک، بغیر صریح زبان انڈیوسٹی انڈیوسٹی کی بغیر، مصمم طور پر انسان کی زبان رفتاروں کو دوبارہ پیدا کرنے کے لئے دکھائے گئے ہیں، جیسے نوم اور وربوں کے درمیان مضبوط نقطہ مع ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ یہ نیٹورک بھی ناطبیعی جماعت ساختاروں میں شمارہ موافقت کی تعداد سکھائے گی، یعنی ساختاریں جو کسی طبیعی زبانوں میں نہیں پائیں گے اور جو انسانوں نے پردازش کی کوشش کی ہیں۔ یہ نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ مدل ان کے سوال سے سیکھ رہے ہیں ایک طریقہ سے جو انسان کی زبان حاصل سے زیادہ مختلف ہے، اور ہم نے ایک تحلیل لیا ہے کہ علم کی طرح نیٹ ورک کے وزن میں رکھی جاتی ہے. ہمیں یہ معلوم ہے کہ جب موڈل ایک فرق نسبت بہت سی جماعتوں کے لئے اثری سمجھ رہا ہے تو ایک تعداد تعداد کے معاملہ میں ایک تعداد کا اندازہ نہیں ہے جو ان پروسسوں کو پورے اندازے کے درمیان اتصال کرتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، وزن طبیعی اور غیرطبیعی ساختاروں کو زیادہ پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا پورا ہوتا ہے، جس طرح نیٹ ورک سے علم کی غیر انسان کی طرح پوری پوری پوری', 'vi': 'Gần đây, mạng thần kinh thường xuyên thuộc miền, mà không có biến dạng tự mãn ngôn ngữ rõ ràng, đã thành công mô phỏng thành công một loạt các hành vi ngôn ngữ con người, như khả năng dự đoán mật mã giữa danh từ và động từ. Chúng tôi cho thấy các mạng lưới như vậy cũng sẽ học được thỏa thuận số trong các cấu trúc hình chữ không tự nhiên, tức là các cấu trúc không tồn tại trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và con người phải đấu tranh để tiến hành. Những kết quả này cho thấy các mô hình đang học hỏi từ nội dung của họ theo một cách rất khác so với việc nhận dạng ngôn ngữ con người, và chúng tôi tiến hành một cuộc phân tích cách thức học tập được lưu giữ trong các vật nặng của mạng lưới. Chúng tôi thấy rằng mặc dù mô hình có một sự hiểu biết hiệu quả về số khác biệt đối với số nhiều cho các câu cá nhân, nhưng không có một khái niệm thống nhất về hợp đồng số kết nối các tiến trình này qua toàn bộ các nội dung. Hơn nữa, chất lượng vận hành các cấu trúc tự nhiên và không tự nhiên chồng chéo nhau rất nhiều, theo một cách nhấn mạnh bản chất không-con-người của kiến thức được học hỏi từ mạng lưới.', 'uz': "Yaqinda domen- umumiy tarmoqni tahrirlash uchun foydalanuvchi tarmoqlar, aniqlik tillar ishlab chiqaruvchisi yo'q, juda muvaffaqiyatli inson tilining xususiyatlarini qaytadan qayta olishni koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu fanlar va ishlarning orasidagi sonlarni aniqlash mumkin. Biz shu tarmoqni ko'rsatamiz, bu tarmoqlar esa umumiy so'zlar tuzuvlarida raqamli heshimini o'rganadi, balki maktab tilda topilmagan tuzuvlar va odamlar jarayonlariga harakat qiladi. Bu natijalar esa modellar o'rganishni o'rganadi, inson tilni olishdan o'xshash o'zgarishga o'rganadi, va biz o'rganishlar ta'limni tarmoqning o'smilarida qanday saqlanadi. Biz o'ylaymiz, modelda bir hil so'zlar uchun singalik va bir necha so'zlarni o'rganishga tayyorlik tushunishi mumkin, bu jarayonlarning butun tartib tartibi bilan bog'liqdiradigan raqam yetarligi emas. Ko'pchilik, asosiy va umumiy strukturalarni boshqaruvchi vektlar tarmoq orqali o'rganishga o'xshash ma'lumot tarmoqda o'rganishga o'xshash ma'lumot tarmoqni o'zgartiradi.", 'bg': 'Напоследък, домейн-общи повтарящи се невронни мрежи, без изрични лингвистични индуктивни предразсъдъци, успешно възпроизвеждат редица човешки езикови поведения, като точното предсказване на числовото съгласие между съществителни и глаголи. Показваме, че такива мрежи ще научат и числово съгласие в неестествени структури на изречения, т.е. структури, които не се намират в естествените езици и които хората се борят да обработват. Тези резултати предполагат, че моделите се учат от своя принос по начин, който значително се различава от придобиването на човешки език, и ние правим анализ на това как наученото знание се съхранява в тежестите на мрежата. Установяваме, че макар моделът да има ефективно разбиране на единичното спрямо множественото число за отделните изречения, липсва единна концепция за съгласие на числата, свързваща тези процеси в целия диапазон от входящи данни. Освен това тежестите, работещи с естествени и неестествени структури, се припокриват значително по начин, който подчертава нечовешкото естество на знанията, придобити от мрежата.', 'nl': 'Recent is aangetoond dat domein-algemene terugkerende neurale netwerken, zonder expliciete linguïstische inductieve vooroordelen, succesvol een reeks van menselijk taalgedrag reproduceren, zoals het nauwkeurig voorspellen van getalovereenkomst tussen zelfstandige naamwoorden en werkwoorden. We laten zien dat dergelijke netwerken ook getallenovereenstemming zullen leren binnen onnatuurlijke zinnenstructuren, dat wil zeggen structuren die niet in een natuurlijke taal voorkomen en waar mensen moeite mee hebben om te verwerken. Deze resultaten suggereren dat de modellen leren van hun input op een manier die wezenlijk verschilt van menselijke taalverwerving, en we voeren een analyse uit van hoe de geleerde kennis wordt opgeslagen in de gewichten van het netwerk. Hoewel het model een effectief begrip heeft van enkelvoud versus meervoud voor individuele zinnen, ontbreekt er een uniform concept van nummerovereenkomst die deze processen verbindt over het volledige bereik van inputs. Bovendien overlappen de gewichten die natuurlijke en onnatuurlijke structuren hanteren substantieel, op een manier die het niet-menselijke karakter van de door het netwerk opgedane kennis onderstreept.', 'da': 'For nylig har domænenes generelle tilbagevendende neurale netværk uden eksplicitte sproglige induktive fordomme vist sig at reproducere en række menneskelige sprogadfærd, såsom præcist at forudsige talaftale mellem substantiver og verber. Vi viser, at sådanne netværk også vil lære talaftale inden for unaturlige sætningsstrukturer, dvs. strukturer, der ikke findes i noget naturligt sprog, og som mennesker kæmper for at behandle. Resultaterne tyder på, at modellerne lærer af deres input på en måde, der er væsentligt anderledes end menneskelig sprogerhvervelse, og vi foretager en analyse af, hvordan den lærte viden gemmes i vægten af netværket. Vi finder ud af, at selvom modellen har en effektiv forståelse af singular versus plural for individuelle sætninger, er der en mangel på et samlet koncept for talaftale, der forbinder disse processer på tværs af hele viften af input. Desuden overlapper de vægte, der håndterer naturlige og unaturlige strukturer betydeligt, på en måde, der understreger den ikke-menneskelige karakter af den viden, som netværket lærer.', 'hr': 'Nedavno se pokazalo da su opće rekonstruirane neuralne mreže domena, bez objašnjenja jezičkih induktivnih predrasuda, uspješno reproduktirale niz ljudskih jezičkih ponašanja, kao što je to čno predviđanje sporazuma o broju između imena i verba. Pokazujemo da će takve mreže također naučiti sporazum brojeva u strukturi neoprirodne kazne, tj. strukture koje nisu pronađene u bilo kojem prirodnom jeziku i koje se ljudi bore za proces. Ovi rezultati sugeriraju da se modeli uče od njihovog ulaza na način na koji je značajno različit od prikupljanja ljudskih jezika, i poduzet ćemo analizu kako se učeno znanje čuva u težini mreže. Pronašli smo da, iako model ima učinkovito razumijevanje jednostavnih i pluralnih rečenica za pojedinačne rečenice, nedostaje jedinstvenog koncepta sporazuma o broju povezivanja tih procesa u potpunom rasponu ulaganja. Osim toga, težine koje se bave prirodnim i neprirodnim strukturama značajno preklapaju na način na koji naglašava ne-ljudska priroda znanja koje je naučila mreža.', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, jaringan saraf recurrent secara umum domain, tanpa bias induktif bahasa secara eksplicit, telah menunjukkan untuk berhasil mereproduksi jangkauan perilaku bahasa manusia, seperti persyaratan nomor yang tepat diantara nama dan verb. Kami menunjukkan bahwa jaringan tersebut juga akan belajar kesepakatan nomor dalam struktur kalimat tidak alami, i.e. struktur yang tidak ditemukan dalam bahasa alami apapun dan yang manusia berjuang untuk memproses. Hasil-hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa model belajar dari input mereka dengan cara yang sangat berbeda dari pengakuan bahasa manusia, dan kami melakukan analisis bagaimana pengetahuan belajar disimpan dalam beban jaringan. Kami menemukan bahwa sementara model memiliki pemahaman efektif dari singular versus plural untuk kalimat individu, ada kekurangan konsep persetujuan nomor yang menyatukan proses-proses ini melalui jangkauan penuh masukan. Selain itu, berat badan yang mengatasi struktur alami dan tidak alami bergabung secara mendasarkan, dengan cara yang menyatakan alam yang tidak seperti manusia dari pengetahuan yang dipelajari oleh jaringan.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit konnte gezeigt werden, dass domänengemeinschaftlich rezidivierende neuronale Netze, ohne explizite linguistische induktive Verzerrungen, erfolgreich eine Reihe menschlicher Sprachverhaltensweisen reproduzieren, wie z.B. die genaue Vorhersage der Zahlenkommunikation zwischen Substantiven und Verben. Wir zeigen, dass solche Netzwerke auch in unnatürlichen Satzstrukturen, d.h. Strukturen lernen, die in keiner natürlichen Sprache zu finden sind und die der Mensch nur schwer verarbeiten kann. Diese Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass die Modelle von ihrem Input in einer Weise lernen, die sich wesentlich vom menschlichen Spracherwerb unterscheidet, und wir analysieren, wie das erlernte Wissen in den Gewichten des Netzwerks gespeichert wird. Während das Modell ein effektives Verständnis von Singular versus Plural für einzelne Sätze hat, fehlt es an einem einheitlichen Konzept der Zahlenabkommen, die diese Prozesse über den gesamten Bereich der Eingaben miteinander verbinden. Darüber hinaus überlappen sich die Gewichte, die natürliche und unnatürliche Strukturen handhaben, erheblich, so dass die nicht-menschliche Natur des durch das Netzwerk erlernten Wissens unterstrichen wird.', 'fa': 'اخیرا، شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره\u200cی دوباره\u200cی دوباره\u200cی دوباره\u200cی دوباره\u200cی دامین، بدون توجه\u200cهای فعال\u200cکننده\u200cی زبان\u200cشناسی مشخص شده، به موفقیت نشان داده می\u200cشوند که یک مجموعه رفتار زبان\u200cهای انسان را تولید می\u200cکند، مثل پیش\u200cبینی دقیق تواف ما نشان می دهیم که این شبکه ها در ساختار مجازات غیرطبیعی، همچنین توافق عدد را یاد می گیرند، یعنی ساختار های طبیعی که در هیچ زبان طبیعی پیدا نشده و که انسان در آن جهت می کنند. این نتیجه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که مدل\u200cها از ورودشان به طریقی یاد می\u200cگیرند که زیاد متفاوت است از خریدن زبان\u200cهای انسان، و ما تحلیل می\u200cکنیم از طریق ذخیره دانش یافته در وزن شبکه چگونه ذخیره می\u200cشود. ما متوجه می\u200cشویم که در حالی که مدل درک موثری از یک فرد نسبت به چندین فرد برای جمله\u200cهای فرد دارد، یک نظر متحد از توافق تعداد تعداد وجود دارد که این فرایندها را در طول مجموعه کامل واردات ارتباط می\u200cدهد. بعلاوه، وزن\u200cهایی که ساختارهای طبیعی و غیرطبیعی را در نظر می\u200cگیرند، به صورت زیادی که طبیعی غیر انسان\u200cمانند دانش\u200cهایی که توسط شبکه یاد گرفته\u200cاند را تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 분야에서 통용되는 귀속신경 네트워크는 뚜렷한 언어 귀납 편견이 없는 상황에서 일련의 인류 언어 행위, 예를 들어 명사와 동사 간의 디지털 일치성을 정확하게 예측하는 데 성공했다.우리는 이러한 네트워크는 비자연적인 문장 구조 중의 디지털 일치성, 즉 어떤 자연 언어에서도 찾을 수 없는 구조를 배워서 인류가 이런 구조를 처리하기 어렵다는 것을 보여준다.이러한 결과에 따르면 모델이 입력에서 학습하는 방식은 인류 언어가 습득하는 방식과 크게 다르다. 우리는 학습한 지식이 어떻게 네트워크의 중요성에 저장되는지 분석했다.우리는 이 모델이 한 문장의 단수와 복수를 효과적으로 이해했지만 모든 입력 범위 내에서 이 과정을 연결하는 숫자의 일치성에 대한 통일된 개념이 부족하다는 것을 발견했다.그 밖에 자연과 비자연 구조를 처리하는 권한이 기본적으로 중첩되어 인터넷에서 배운 지식의 비인간성을 두드러지게 한다.', 'sw': 'Recently, domain-general recurrent neural networks, without explicit linguistic inductive biases, have been shown to successfully reproduce a range of human language behaviours, such as accurately predicting number agreement between nouns and verbs.  Tunaonyesha kuwa mitandao hayo pia yatajifunza makubaliano ya namba ndani ya miundombinu isiyo na uwezo wa hukumu, yaani miundombinu ambayo hayapatikana ndani ya lugha yoyote ya asili na ambayo binadamu wanajitahidi kufanya kazi. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha kuwa mifano inajifunza kutoka kwenye inzani wao kwa namna ambayo ni tofauti sana na kupata lugha ya binadamu, na tunafanya uchambuzi wa jinsi maarifa yanavyohifadhiwa katika mizani ya mtandao. Tunapata kwamba wakati mfano huo una ufanisi wa kuelewa kuwa na upande wa pekee ukilinganisha na taratibu za sentensi binafsi, kuna ukosefu wa dhana ya makubaliano ya namba yanayounganisha mchakato huu katika maeneo yote. Zaidi ya hayo, mizigo inayokabiliana na miundombinu ya asili na yasiyo na lazima yanazidi kupunguza kwa kiasi kikubwa, kwa namna ambayo inapinga ubunifu wa maarifa yanayofanana na binadamu yanayojifunza na mtandao wa intaneti.', 'af': "Onlangs het domein-algemene herhaalde neuralnetwerke, sonder eksplisiese lingwisiese induktiewe biases, vertoon om suksesvol 'n reek van menslike taal gedrag te reproduseer, soos presies getal ooreenkoms tussen noume en verbe te voorskou. Ons wys dat sulke netwerke sal ook getalleooreenkoms leer binne onnatuurlike setingsstrukture, bv. strukture wat nie binne enige natuurlike tale gevind word nie en wat mense struikel om te proses nie. Hierdie resultate stel voorstel dat die modele van hulle invoer geleer word op 'n manier wat betekens verskillend is van menslike taal aanvang, en ons neem 'n analiseer van hoe die geleerde kennis in die gewigte van die netwerk gestoor is. Ons vind dat terwyl die model 'n effektief verstanding van eenvoudige verskillende verskillende plurale vir individuele setnings het, daar is 'n mankaak van' n eenvoudige konsepte van getalle ooreenkoms wat hierdie prosesse verbind deur die volle reek van inputs. Ook, die gewigte wat natuurlike en onnatuurlike strukture behandel, oorvloei substantief, op 'n manier wat die nie-menslike natuur van die kennis wat deur die netwerk geleer is, onderstreep.", 'tr': 'Soňky günlerde, domençe tekrarly näral şebekeleri, explicit dil täsirli terjimeler bolmadyk, adam dilleriniň bir görnüşlerini üstüne ýetişdirmek üçin görkezildi, şol ýaly isimler we verbler arasyndaky sanlaryň ylalaşygyny dogry çaklama ýaly. Şol ýagdaýlar tebigat dili i çinde tapylmadyk we adamlar proses etmek üçin mücadele edýän sanlaryň ylalaşygyny hem öwrenip biljekdigini görkeýäris. Bu netijeler modelleriň girişinden ynsan dillerini almakdan has üýtgeşik şeklinde öwrenip otyrýandygyny teklip edip bilýärler we biz şebekiň a ğırlygynda öwrenmeli bilim nädip goýulýandygyny çözümleýäris. Munuň nusgasynda birnäçe sözler üçin bir plural düşünmesi bar ýaly, bu proseslaryň doly görnüşlerinde bir sany ylalaşma düşünmesi ýok. Ýagynda, tebigat we tebigat düzümlerini daşary edip bilmeýän bilim ýaly adamlaryň taryhyny a ňladýar.', 'sq': 'Recently, domain-general recurrent neural networks, without explicit linguistic inductive biases, have been shown to successfully reproduce a range of human language behaviours, such as accurately predicting number agreement between nouns and verbs.  Ne tregojmë se rrjetet e tilla do të mësojnë gjithashtu marrëveshje numërash brenda strukturave të pakuptimta të dënimeve, pra strukturat që nuk gjenden brenda asnjë gjuhe natyrore dhe që njerëzit luftojnë për të procesuar. Këto rezultate sugjerojnë se modelet janë duke mësuar nga hyrja e tyre në një mënyrë që është thelbësisht e ndryshme nga blerja e gjuhës njerëzore dhe ne bëjmë një analizë se si njohuria e mësuar është ruajtur në peshat e rrjetit. Ne zbulojmë se ndërsa modeli ka një kuptim të efektshëm të vetmuar kundër shumicës për fjalët individuale, ka një mungesë të një koncepti të unifikuar të marrëveshjes numërore që lidh këto procese nëpër gamën e plotë të hyrjeve. Përveç kësaj, peshat që trajtojnë strukturat natyrore dhe jo-natyrore kapërcehen thelbësisht, në një mënyrë që thekson natyrën jo-njerëzore të njohurive të mësuara nga rrjeti.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս ցույց է տվել, որ ընդհանուր բնագավառներում կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերը, առանց բացահայտ լեզվաբանական ինդուկտիվ կողմնականությունների, հաջողակ են վերարտադրում մարդկային լեզվաբանական վարքագծեր, ինչպիսիք են անունների և բայերի միջև ճշգրիտ թվերի համաձա We show that such networks will also learn number agreement within unnatural sentence structures, i.e. structures that are not found within any natural languages and which humans struggle to process.  Այս արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մոդելները սովորում են իրենց ներմուծներից այնպես, որ կարևոր տարբերվում է մարդկային լեզուների ձեռքերից, և մենք վերլուծում ենք, թե ինչպես են սովորված գիտելիքները պահպանվում ցանցի կշիռներում: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մինչ մոդելը ունի առանձին նախադասությունների առանձին համեմատական և բազմաթիվ հասկացություն, թվային համաձայնության միասնական գաղափարի պակաս կա, որը կապում է այս գործընթացները ներմուծների ամբողջ շարքում: Ավելին, բնական և ոչ բնական կառուցվածքները բնական և ոչ բնական ծավալները նշանակալիորեն փոխանցվում են, այնպես, որ ենթադրում են ցանցի սովորած գիտելիքների ոչ մարդկային նման բնույթը:', 'az': 'Son zamanlarda, domain-general recurrent neural networks, explicit dil inductive biases olmadan, bir çox insan dillərinin davranışlarını müvəffəqiyyətlə yenidən yaratmaq üçün göstərilmişdir, çünki nömrələr və verblər arasındakı nömrə anlaşmasını tam təmin edirlər. Biz bu şəbəkələrin həmçinin təbiir dillərdə tapılmayan və insanların i şləməyə cürbəcür müharibələr içində sayı anlaşmalarını öyrənəcəklərini göstəririk. Bu növbətlər modellərin gizli dil alınmasından çox farklı bir yolla öyrənməsini təsdiqləyir. Biz öyrəndiyimiz bilgilərin a ğırlığında necə qoruyacağını analizi çəkirik. Modelin individual cümlələr üçün təkcə plural ilə təkcə təkcə təkcə bir anlaşılması olmasına rağmen, bu prosesləri bütün inputlər arasında birləşdirmək üçün birləşdirilmiş bir sayı anlaşması yoxdur. Əksinə, təbiətli və təbiətsiz quruluşlar, a ğ tərəfindən öyrəndiyi elmdən bənzər olmayan insan təbiətini təsdiqləyən bir şekilde çox çəkirlər.', 'am': 'በቅርቢቱ ዘመን፣ የዶሜን-አቀናዊ የነዌብ መረብ፣ ግልፅ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተግባር ሳይኖር፣ በቁጥጥር እና በቋንቋዎች መካከል ቁጥጥርን በመስጠት የሚታወቅ ቁጥጥር በመስጠት የተገለጠ ነው፡፡ እንደነዚህ መረብ ቁጥጥር ከግንኙነት ግንኙነት ውስጥ እንዳይማሩ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እነዚህም ፍሬዎች ምሳሌዎቹ ከሰው ቋንቋ ማግኘት በተለየ ዓይነት የሚማሩ ናቸው፤ እናም ተማሪዎቹ እውቀትን እንዴት በመረብ ሚዛኖች ውስጥ እንደሚያቆም እናስተምር፡፡ ምሳሌው ለብቻው የውይይት ክፍሎች በተለየ ብሔራዊ ተቃውሞ የሚያስተውል እንደሆነ እናገኘዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የፍጥረታዊ እና ያልተፈላጊ መሠረቶችን በመቀነስ ሚዛኖችን በመድረክ የተማረውን እውቀትን እንደምትመስል እውቀትን በሚያሳልፍ መንገድ አበዛል፡፡', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি ডোমেইন-জেনারেল পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, স্পষ্ট ভাষা শিল্পী বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন মানুষের ভাষার আচরণ পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য দেখা যাচ্ছে, যেমন স আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ধরনের নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর মধ্যে নাম্বার চুক্তি শিখতে পারবে, যেমন কোন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় পাওয়া যায় না এবং কোন মানু এই ফলাফল পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে মডেলগুলো তাদের ইনপুট থেকে শিখতে পাচ্ছে এমন ভাবে যা মানুষের ভাষা পেতে পারে বেশ ভিন্ন, আর আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি যে শিক্ষিত জ্ঞা আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে যখন মডেলটি ব্যক্তিগত বাক্যের বিরুদ্ধে একাত্মতার বিষয়টি বুঝতে পারে, তখন পুরো প্রক্রিয়ার সাথে এই প্রক্রিয়ার সাথে যোগাযোগ করার এছাড়াও, প্রাকৃতিক এবং অস্বাভাবিক কাঠামোগুলোর মাধ্যমে প্রাকৃতিক এবং অগ্রগতিক কাঠামোগুলো বাড়িয়ে দেয়, যেভাবে নেটওয়ার্ক', 'ca': "Recentment, s'ha demostrat que les xarxes neurals recurrents en el domini general, sense prejudicis inductius lingüístics explícits, reprodueixen amb èxit una gama de comportaments de llenguatge humà, com predir exactament l'acord de nombres entre noms i verbs. Mostrem que aquestes xarxes aprendren també acord en números dins e structures de frases no naturals, és a dir, estructures que no es troben dins cap llengua natural i que els humans lluiten per processar. Aquests resultats suggereixen que els models aprenen a partir de la seva entrada d'una manera que és substancialment diferent de l'adquisició de llenguatge humà, i fem una an àlisi de com el coneixement aprengut es emmagatzema als pesos de la xarxa. Trobem que, mentre que el model té una comprensió efectiva del singular i plural per a les frases individuals, no existeix un concepte unificat d'acord number àtic que connecti aquests processos a tot arreu de les entrades. A més, els pesos que manejen estructures naturals i no naturals es sobreponen substancialment, d'una manera que sublinui la naturalesa no human a del coneixement aprengut per la xarxa.", 'cs': 'V poslední době bylo prokázáno, že doménově-generální recidivující neuronové sítě, bez explicitních lingvistických indukčních předsudků, úspěšně reprodukují řadu chování lidského jazyka, jako je přesné předpovědi číselné shody mezi podstatnými jmény a slovesy. Ukazujeme, že takové sítě se naučí číselnou shodu i v nepřirozených větových strukturách, tedy strukturách, které nejsou nalezeny v žádném přirozeném jazyce a které se lidé snaží zpracovat. Tyto výsledky naznačují, že se modely učí ze svých vstupů způsobem, který se podstatně liší od osvojování lidského jazyka, a provádíme analýzu toho, jak jsou naučené znalosti uloženy v hmotnostech sítě. Zjišťujeme, že zatímco model má efektivní pochopení singulárního versus množného čísla pro jednotlivé věty, neexistuje jednotný koncept dohody čísel propojující tyto procesy napříč celou škálou vstupů. Kromě toho se závaží manipulující s přirozenými a nepřirozenými strukturami značně překrývají způsobem, který podtrhuje nelidskou povahu znalostí získaných sítí.', 'et': 'Hiljuti on näidatud, et domeeni üldised korduvad närvivõrgud, ilma selgesõnaliste induktiivsete kallakuteta, reprodutseerivad edukalt erinevaid inimkeelekäitumisi, näiteks täpselt ennustavad arvude kokkuleppeid subsõnade ja tegusõnade vahel. Näitame, et sellised võrgustikud õpivad arvu kokkulepet ka ebaloomulikes lausestruktuurides, st struktuurides, mida ei leidu üheski looduslikus keeles ja mida inimesed vaevavad töödelda. Need tulemused näitavad, et mudelid õpivad oma sisendist viisil, mis erineb oluliselt inimkeele omandamisest, ning analüüsime, kuidas õppitud teadmised salvestatakse võrgu kaaludes. Leiame, et kuigi mudelil on tõhus arusaam üksikute lausete ainsusest versus mitmusest, puudub ühtne numbrikokkuleppe kontseptsioon, mis ühendab neid protsesse kogu sisendite valikus. Lisaks kattuvad looduslikke ja ebaloomulikke struktuure käsitlevad kaalud märkimisväärselt, rõhutades võrgustiku poolt omandatud teadmiste mitteametlikku olemust.', 'bs': 'Nedavno se pokazalo da su općenito rekonstruirane neuralne mreže domena, bez objašnjenja jezičkih induktivnih predrasuda, uspješno reproduktirale niz ljudskih jezičkih ponašanja, kao što je to čno predviđanje sporazuma o broju između imena i verba. Pokazujemo da će takve mreže također naučiti sporazum brojeva u strukturi neoprirodne rečenice, tj. strukture koje nisu pronađene u bilo kojem prirodnom jeziku i koje se ljudi bore za proces. Ovi rezultati sugeriraju da se modeli uče od njihovog ulaza na način na koji je značajno različit od prikupljanja ljudskih jezika, i poduzećemo analizu kako se naučeno znanje čuva u težini mreže. Nalazimo da, dok model ima efikasno razumijevanje jednostavnih i pluralnih rečenica za pojedinačne rečenice, nedostaje jedinstvenog koncepta sporazuma o broju povezivanja tih procesa preko punog opsega ulaganja. Osim toga, težine koje se bave prirodnim i neprirodnim strukturama značajno preklapaju na način na koji naglašava prirodu znanja koja nije ljudska lična na mrežu.', 'fi': 'Äskettäin domain-yleisten toistuvien hermoverkkojen, ilman eksplisiittisiä induktiivisia taipumuksia, on osoitettu tuottavan menestyksekkäästi erilaisia ihmisen kielikäyttäytymisiä, kuten ennustavan tarkasti substantiivien ja verbien välisiä lukueroja. Osoitamme, että tällaiset verkostot oppivat myös lukuyhteisymmärryksen epäluonnollisissa lauserakenteissa eli rakenteissa, joita ei löydy mistään luonnollisesta kielestä ja joita ihminen kamppailee käsittelemään. Tulokset viittaavat siihen, että mallit oppivat panoksestaan tavalla, joka eroaa merkittävästi ihmisen kielen hankinnasta, ja teemme analyysin siitä, miten opittu tieto tallennetaan verkoston painoihin. Havaitsemme, että vaikka mallilla on tehokas käsitys singularista ja monikosta yksittäisissä lauseissa, ei ole yhtenäistä käsitystä lukusopimuksesta, joka yhdistäisi nämä prosessit koko syötteiden alueella. Lisäksi luonnollisia ja luonnottomia rakenteita käsittelevät painot ovat hyvin päällekkäisiä, mikä korostaa verkoston oppiman tiedon luonnetta, joka ei ole ihmisen kaltainen.', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času je bilo dokazano, da domenska splošna ponavljajoča se nevronska omrežja brez eksplicitnih jezikovnih induktivnih pristranskosti uspešno reproducirajo vrsto vedenj človeškega jezika, kot je natančno napovedovanje številčnega sporazuma med samostalniki in glagoli. Pokazujemo, da se bodo takšne mreže naučile tudi številčnega sporazuma znotraj nenaravnih stavkovnih struktur, tj. struktur, ki jih ne najdemo v nobenem naravnem jeziku in ki jih ljudje težko obdelujejo. Ti rezultati kažejo, da se modeli učijo iz svojih vnosov na način, ki se bistveno razlikuje od pridobivanja človeškega jezika, zato smo opravili analizo, kako se naučeno znanje shranjuje v uteži mreže. Ugotavljamo, da čeprav ima model učinkovito razumevanje enotnosti proti množini za posamezne stavke, primanjkuje enotnega koncepta številčnega dogovora, ki povezuje te procese v celotnem obsegu vnosov. Poleg tega se uteži, ki upravljajo z naravnimi in nenaravnimi strukturami, bistveno prekrivajo, tako da poudarja nečloveško naravo znanja, pridobljenega v mreži.', 'ha': "A yanzu, an nuna tarogi na fara-jama'ar neural da ke koma cikin guda, bã da wani tabar da ke bayyana, cikin linguistic, an sami babban rabo masu ƙididdigo na lugha na mutane, kamar misãlin da gaske ke ke ƙayyade yardar lambu a tsakanin nau'i da verbs. Tuna nũna wa waɗancan garwaya za su iya karanta makubalci na lambu a cikin tsarin sigar da ba'a taƙaita ba, misali, tsaro waɗanda ba a gane su a cikin wasu harshe na asili da kuma masu kwamfyuta da mutane sunã yin aiki. Haƙĩƙa masu yiwuwa ne, misãlai za su iya karanta daga matsayinsu a cikin shirin da ke da mai sãɓãni mai girma daga ganin lugha mutum, kuma mu yi anarra a kan jinsi an adana ilmin da aka sani a cikin ma'anar zanen tarayyan. Tuna gane cewa, a lokacin da misãlani yana da fahimta mai inganci da ɗai versa sura ga mutane, don kuma yana da wani ƙunci na haɗi da wa'adin lambu da ke haɗa wannan aikin da ke cikakken mataimaka. Za dabam, masu nauyi da matsayin da ba'a zartar da halin da na zartar da shi mai girma, a cikin hanyar da ke ƙara masu kama da mazaɓan ilmi wanda aka sanar da shi na garwaya.", 'he': 'לאחרונה, רשתות עצביות חוזרות בתחום גנרלי, ללא ההתמחות השפתיים המפורסמות, הוכחו שיחזרו בהצלחה מגוון של התנהגות בשפה האנושית, כמו צפייה מדויקת של הסכם מספר בין השמות ואברים. אנחנו מראים כי רשתות כאלה גם ללמוד הסכם מספר בתוך מבנים משפטים לא טבעיים, כלומר מבנים שלא נמצאים בתוך שום שפות טבעיות ואיהם בני אדם נאבקים לתהליך. התוצאות האלה מציעות שהדוגמנים לומדים מהכניסה שלהם באופן שונה באופן משמעותי מהרכישה של שפת אנושית, ואנחנו עושים ניתוח של איך הידע הלמד מאוחסן במשקלים של הרשת. We find that while the model has an effective understanding of singular versus plural for individual sentences, there is a lack of a unified concept of number agreement connecting these processes across the full range of inputs.  חוץ מזה, המשקלים שמטפלים במבנים טבעיים ולא טבעיים מתקפלים בצורה משמעותית, בדרך שמדגישה את הטבע הלא-אנושי של הידע שנלמד על ידי הרשת.', 'jv': 'plug-in-action Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi kanggo ngerasakno nunggo perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo tukang winih, ta ngomong sampek sing ora ono mulasakno tentang ing sakjane kanggo nguasakno tentang sampek. Rejaling iki supoyo wong mengkar kuwi model sing nyimpen kelas nang ingkang sampeyan bener tentang karo kesempatan, lan awak dhéwé nggawe edas ndelah apik dhéwé wisasai sakjané awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerti, nik awak modèl kuwi nggawe sistem sing beraksi luwih akeh singular antara plural kanggo kabèh sing endibadi, kuwi ora ono akeh conjugal antara sing gawe nêmêr, sampeyan nambah akeh operasi sing gawe ngubah iso nggawe barang awak dhéwé Mangkane, awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe aturan lan akeh dumadhi aturan sing paling apik, lan nganggo sing dino awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasai aturan biya nêmên karo awak dhéwé.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་གསོག་ཀྱིས་domain-general recurrent neural networks་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་སྒོ་གཏོང་གི་འགྱུར་བ་མིན་པ་ཤར་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་དེ་བཞིན་ཡུལ་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ནང་གི་ཨང་ཀིའི་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་། རྐྱེན་འབྲས་འདི་དག་གི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྩལ་བ་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ནང་ཁག་ལས་ཕན་འབྲས་མེད་པའི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིའི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ཡན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པའི་སྐབས་ལ། དེའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་རང་རིས་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Identifying Motion Entities in Natural Language and A Case Study for Named Entity Recognition', 'es': 'Identificación de entidades de movimiento en lenguaje natural y estudio de caso para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas', 'pt': 'Identificando entidades de movimento em linguagem natural e um estudo de caso para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada', 'ar': 'تحديد الكيانات المتحركة في اللغة الطبيعية ودراسة حالة للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة', 'fr': "Identification des entités de mouvement en langage naturel et étude de cas pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées", 'ja': '自然言語でのモーションエンティティの識別と名前付きエンティティ認識のためのケーススタディ', 'zh': '于自然语言中识运实体及名实体识例究之', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा में गति संस्थाओं की पहचान करना और नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए एक केस स्टडी', 'ru': 'Идентификация движущихся объектов на естественном языке и тематическое исследование для распознавания именованных объектов', 'ga': "Aonáin Ghluaisne a Aithint sa Teanga Nádúrtha agus Cás-Staidéar d'Aithint Aonáin Ainmnithe", 'el': 'Αναγνώριση κινητών οντοτήτων στη φυσική γλώσσα και μελέτη περίπτωσης αναγνώρισης ονομαστών οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'Mozgó entitások azonosítása természetes nyelven és esettanulmány a nevezett entitások elismerésére', 'ka': 'მოძრაობის ელემენტების მოძრაობა Natural Language და A Case Study for Named Entity Recognition', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілінде және аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін әріптерді оқу', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos judėjimo subjektų identifikavimas ir pavadinimo subjekto pripažinimo atvejų tyrimas', 'it': 'Identificare le entità motorie in linguaggio naturale e un caso di studio per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate', 'mk': 'Идентификување на ентитетите за движење во природен јазик и студија на случаи за признавање на именуван ентитет', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Entiti Gerakan dalam Bahasa Alami dan Studi Kes untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni ta’ Entitajiet ta’ Moviment fil-Lingwa Naturali u Studju ta’ Każ għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള മോഷന്\u200d എന്റിറ്റികള്\u200d സ്വാഭാഷയിലും ഒരു കേസ് സ്ട്രിഡി', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэлний хөдөлгөөн үйл ажиллагааны тодорхойлолт, нэрлэгдсэн үйл ажиллагааны судалгаа', 'no': 'Identifiserer bevegelseiningar i naturspråk og ein bokstav- studie for gjenkjenning av namnet einingar', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja podmiotów ruchowych w języku naturalnym i studium przypadku rozpoznawania podmiotów nazwanych', 'ro': 'Identificarea entităților de mișcare în limbajul natural și un studiu de caz pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite', 'sr': 'Identifikacija pokreta na prirodnom jeziku i studija slučajeva za priznanje imenovanih entiteta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga qofka afka asalka ah iyo Waxbarashada xaaladda ee loogu magacaabay aqoonsiga ganacsiga', 'sv': 'Identifiera rörelseenheter i naturligt språk och en fallstudie för erkännande av namngivna enheter', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழியிலுள்ள தேடுதல் உள்ளீடுகளை அடையாளம் மற்றும் பெயரிடப்பட்ட செய்தியின் பெயர் உள்ளீடு அறிமுகம்', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان میں چلنے والی ایٹیونیٹوں کی شناسایی کرتی ہے اور نام دار ایٹیونیٹ شناسایی کے لئے کیس تحقیق کرتی ہے', 'vi': 'Xác định các đơn vị vận động bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và một nghiên cứu về các loài có tên.', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на движещи се субекти по естествен език и казус за разпознаване на названите субекти', 'hr': 'Identifikacija pokreta na prirodnom jeziku i istraživanje slučajeva za priznanje imenovanih podataka', 'da': 'Identificering af bevægelsesenheder i naturligt sprog og en case study til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder', 'nl': 'Identificeren van bewegingsentiteiten in natuurlijke taal en een casestudy voor naamsbekendheid', 'de': 'Identifizierung bewegter Entitäten in natürlicher Sprache und eine Fallstudie zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten', 'ko': '자연 언어에서 운동 실체의 식별 및 명명 실체 식별 실례 연구', 'fa': 'شناسایی شرکتهای حرکت در زبان طبیعی و یک مطالعه پرونده برای شناسایی شرکت نامیده', 'id': 'Identifikasi Entitas Gerakan dalam Bahasa Alami dan Studi Kasus untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama', 'sw': 'Kutambua Vituo vya Upinzani katika lugha ya asili na Utafiti wa Kesi kwa ajili ya Kutambua Ujumbe wa Kiraia', 'tr': 'Natal Dilinde Görniş Opşenler we Adynyň A ňlamak üçin Keseler', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i njësive lëvizjeje në gjuhën natyrore dhe një studim rasti për njohjen e njësisë së emëruar', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা এবং একটি কেস স্টিডি নামের এন্টিটি চিহ্নিত করা হবে', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի շարժման միավորների հայտնաբերումը և անվանված միավորների հայտնաբերման օրինակի ուսումնասիրությունը', 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtli Dild…ô h…ôr…ôk…ôt Entit…ôl…ôrini t…ôsdiql…ôyici v…ô AdlńĪ Entit Recognition', 'bs': 'Identifikacija motivacijskih subjekta na prirodnom jeziku i istraživanje slučajeva za priznanje imenovanih subjekta', 'ca': "Identificar les entitats de moviment en llenguatge natural i un estudi de cas per a la reconeixement d'entitats anomenades", 'cs': 'Identifikace pohybových entit v přirozeném jazyce a případová studie pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Liikumisüksuste tuvastamine loomulikus keeles ja juhtumiuuring nimetatud üksuse tunnustamiseks', 'fi': 'Liikkeellisten entiteettien tunnistaminen luonnollisella kielellä ja tapaustutkimus nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamiseksi', 'sk': 'Identifikacija gibalnih subjektov v naravnem jeziku in študija primera za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'זיהוי יחידות תנועה בשפה טבעית ומחקר תיקים לזהות יחידות בשם', 'jv': 'Notification Removals', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་Entity Recognition'}
{'en': 'Motion recognition is one of the basic cognitive capabilities of many life forms, however, detecting and understanding motion in text is not a trivial task. In addition, identifying motion entities in natural language is not only challenging but also beneficial for a better natural language understanding. In this paper, we present a Motion Entity Tagging (MET) model to identify entities in motion in a text using the Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) dataset for training and evaluating the model. Then we propose a new method to split clauses and phrases from complex and long motion sentences to improve the performance of our MET model. We also present results showing that motion features, in particular, entity in motion benefits the Named-Entity Recognition (NER) task. Finally, we present an analysis for the special co-occurrence relation between the person category in NER and animate entities in motion, which significantly improves the classification performance for the person category in NER.', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على الحركة أحد القدرات المعرفية الأساسية للعديد من أشكال الحياة ، ومع ذلك ، فإن اكتشاف وفهم الحركة في النص ليس مهمة تافهة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن تحديد الكيانات الحركية في اللغة الطبيعية لا يمثل تحديًا فحسب ، بل إنه مفيد أيضًا لفهم اللغة الطبيعية بشكل أفضل. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نموذج وضع علامات على الكيانات المتحركة (MET) لتحديد الكيانات المتحركة في نص باستخدام مجموعة بيانات Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) للتدريب وتقييم النموذج. ثم نقترح طريقة جديدة لفصل الجمل والعبارات من الجمل المعقدة والطويلة الحركة لتحسين أداء نموذج MET الخاص بنا. نقدم أيضًا نتائج توضح أن ميزات الحركة ، على وجه الخصوص ، الكيان المتحرك يفيد مهمة التعرف على الكيان المسمى (NER). أخيرًا ، نقدم تحليلًا لعلاقة التواجد الخاصة بين فئة الشخص في NER والكيانات المتحركة المتحركة ، مما يحسن بشكل كبير أداء التصنيف لفئة الشخص في NER.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance de mouvement est l'une des capacités cognitives de base de nombreuses formes de vie, mais la détection et la compréhension du mouvement dans un texte ne sont pas une tâche anodine. En outre, l'identification des entités de mouvement en langage naturel est non seulement difficile, mais également bénéfique pour une meilleure compréhension du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous présentons un modèle de marquage d'entité de mouvement (MET) permettant d'identifier les entités en mouvement dans un texte à l'aide de l'ensemble de données LiMit (Literal-Motion-in-Text) pour l'entraînement et l'évaluation du modèle. Ensuite, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour séparer les clauses et les phrases des phrases complexes et longues afin d'améliorer les performances de notre modèle MET. Nous présentons également des résultats montrant que les caractéristiques de mouvement, en particulier l'entité en mouvement, bénéficient de la tâche de reconnaissance d'entité nommée (NER). Enfin, nous présentons une analyse de la relation de co-occurrence spéciale entre la catégorie de personne dans NER et les entités animées en mouvement, ce qui améliore considérablement les performances de classification pour la catégorie de personne dans NER.", 'es': 'El reconocimiento de movimiento es una de las capacidades cognitivas básicas de muchas formas de vida, sin embargo, detectar y comprender el movimiento en el texto no es una tarea trivial. Además, identificar entidades de movimiento en el lenguaje natural no solo es un desafío, sino que también es beneficioso para una mejor comprensión del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, presentamos un modelo de etiquetado de entidades de movimiento (MET) para identificar entidades en movimiento en un texto utilizando el conjunto de datos de movimiento literal en texto (LiMiT) para entrenar y evaluar el modelo. A continuación, proponemos un nuevo método para separar cláusulas y frases de oraciones complejas y de movimiento largo para mejorar el rendimiento de nuestro modelo MET. También presentamos resultados que muestran que las funciones de movimiento, en particular, la entidad en movimiento, benefician la tarea de reconocimiento de entidad nombrada (NER). Finalmente, presentamos un análisis de la relación especial de co-ocurrencia entre la categoría de persona en NER y las entidades animadas en movimiento, lo que mejora significativamente el rendimiento de la clasificación para la categoría de persona en NER.', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento de movimento é uma das capacidades cognitivas básicas de muitas formas de vida, no entanto, detectar e entender o movimento no texto não é uma tarefa trivial. Além disso, identificar entidades de movimento em linguagem natural não é apenas desafiador, mas também benéfico para uma melhor compreensão da linguagem natural. Neste artigo, apresentamos um modelo de Motion Entity Tagging (MET) para identificar entidades em movimento em um texto usando o conjunto de dados Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) para treinar e avaliar o modelo. Em seguida, propomos um novo método para separar cláusulas e frases de sentenças complexas e longas para melhorar o desempenho do nosso modelo MET. Também apresentamos resultados mostrando que os recursos de movimento, em particular, entidade em movimento, beneficiam a tarefa de Reconhecimento de Entidades Nomeadas (NER). Por fim, apresentamos uma análise para a relação especial de coocorrência entre a categoria pessoa no NER e entidades animadas em movimento, o que melhora significativamente o desempenho da classificação para a categoria pessoa no NER.', 'ja': '動き認識は、多くの生命体の基本的な認知能力の1つですが、テキストで動きを検出して理解することは、些細な作業ではありません。 加えて、自然言語における動きの実体を特定することは、挑戦的であるだけでなく、より良い自然言語理解にも有益である。 本稿では、モデルを訓練および評価するためのLiteral - Motion - in - Text （ LiMiT ）データセットを使用して、テキスト内の動くエンティティを識別するためのMotion Entity Tagging （ MET ）モデルを提示する。 そして、METモデルのパフォーマンスを向上させるために、複雑で長い動きの文章から句やフレーズを分割する新しい方法を提案します。 また、動作機能、特に動作中のエンティティが、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）タスクに利益をもたらすことを示す結果も提示します。 最後に、NERにおける人物カテゴリーと動きのあるアニメイトエンティティとの特殊な共起関係について分析を行い、NERにおける人物カテゴリーの分類パフォーマンスを大幅に向上させた。', 'zh': '夫动识者,众生之本知一也,然而检解文本之动并非易事。 此外,识运实体于自然语言中,非唯有挑战性,且利于自然语言解。 于本文中,立一行实标(MET)模形,以用文本之动(LiMiT)据集以识其运动之实体,以练估模形。 然后举将子句短语离于杂长,以崇MET形之性。 申之以行,利以识(NER)。 最后论NER中人物动画实体之殊共现,著NER中人物之别。', 'hi': 'गति मान्यता कई जीवन रूपों की बुनियादी संज्ञानात्मक क्षमताओं में से एक है, हालांकि, पाठ में गति का पता लगाना और समझना एक तुच्छ कार्य नहीं है। इसके अलावा, प्राकृतिक भाषा में गति संस्थाओं की पहचान करना न केवल चुनौतीपूर्ण है, बल्कि बेहतर प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए भी फायदेमंद है। इस पेपर में, हम मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन के लिए शाब्दिक-मोशन-इन-टेक्स्ट (LiMiT) डेटासेट का उपयोग करके एक पाठ में गति में संस्थाओं की पहचान करने के लिए एक मोशन एंटिटी टैगिंग (एमईटी) मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। फिर हम अपने एमईटी मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए जटिल और लंबे गति वाक्यों से खंडों और वाक्यांशों को विभाजित करने के लिए एक नई विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम यह भी दिखाते हुए परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं कि गति विशेषताएं, विशेष रूप से, गति में इकाई नामित-इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) कार्य को लाभ पहुंचाती हैं। अंत में, हम एनईआर में व्यक्ति श्रेणी और गति में एनिमेट संस्थाओं के बीच विशेष सह-घटना संबंध के लिए एक विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो एनईआर में व्यक्ति श्रेणी के लिए वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'Распознавание движения является одной из основных когнитивных возможностей многих форм жизни, однако обнаружение и понимание движения в тексте не является тривиальной задачей. Кроме того, идентификация движущихся объектов на естественном языке не только сложна, но и полезна для лучшего понимания естественного языка. В этой статье мы представляем модель маркировки движущихся объектов (MET) для идентификации движущихся объектов в тексте с использованием набора данных Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) для обучения и оценки модели. Затем мы предлагаем новый метод разделения пунктов и фраз из сложных и длинных предложений для улучшения производительности нашей модели МЕТ. Мы также представляем результаты, показывающие, что особенности движения, в частности, движущаяся сущность, приносят пользу задаче распознавания именованных сущностей (NER). Наконец, мы представляем анализ для особого отношения совместного возникновения между категорией человека в NER и оживляющими сущностями в движении, что значительно улучшает классификационную производительность для категории человека в NER.', 'ga': 'Tá aithint tairiscint ar cheann de na cumais chognaíocha bhunúsacha atá ag go leor foirmeacha saoil, áfach, ní tasc fánach é tairiscint a bhrath agus a thuiscint i dtéacs. Ina theannta sin, ní hamháin go bhfuil sé dúshlánach aonáin ghluaisne a shainaithint i dteanga nádúrtha ach tá sé tairbheach freisin do thuiscint teanga nádúrtha níos fearr. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid múnla Clibeáil Aonáin Tairisceana (MET) i láthair chun aonáin atá ag gluaiseacht i dtéacs a aithint a úsáideann an tacar sonraí Litriúil Tairiscint-i-Téacs (LiMiT) chun an tsamhail a oiliúint agus chun an tsamhail a mheasúnú. Ansin molaimid modh nua chun clásail agus frásaí a roinnt ó abairtí casta agus fada tairiscinte chun feidhmíocht ár samhail MET a fheabhsú. Cuirimid torthaí i láthair freisin a thaispeánann go dtéann gnéithe gluaisne, go háirithe, aonán gluaiseachta chun tairbhe don tasc um Aithint Aonán Ainmnithe (NER). Mar fhocal scoir, cuirimid i láthair anailís don ghaol comhtharlaithe speisialta idir an chatagóir duine i NER agus eintitis bheochana atá ag gluaiseacht, rud a chuireann feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht rangaithe don chatagóir duine in NER.', 'ka': 'მოძრაობის განაცნობა არის მრავალი ცხოვრების ფორმების ფონტიგური კონტიგური შესაძლებლობა, მაგრამ ტექსტში მოძრაობის განაცნობა და განაცნობა არ არის ტრივიალური დავალება დამატებით, მოძრაობის ინტერტიკების განსაზღვრება ნახვა ენერგიაში არა მხოლოდ განსაზღვრებელია, მაგრამ უფრო სარგებლო ენერგიათვის შესაძლებელია. ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ მოძრაობის ელემენტის მონიშნული მოდულის მოდულის მოდელი, რომ ტექსტში მოძრაობული ელემენტის განსაზღვრება ტექსტში გამოყენებული Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების მო შემდეგ ჩვენ ახალი მეთოდის გაყოფილი კლასები და ფრაზები კომპლექსი და ძალიან მოძრაობის წესებიდან დავიწყებთ ჩვენი MET მოდელის მუშაობას. ჩვენ ასევე გავაჩვენეთ შედეგი, რომ მოძრაობის ფუნქციები, განსაკუთრებით, მოძრაობის ინტერტიკის გამოიყენება სახელი ინტერტიკის განახლება (NER) დავამუშავებს. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული კონფიგურაციის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც NER-ში ადამიანის კატეგურაციის შორის და ანიმეტური განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც მნიშ', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση κίνησης είναι μια από τις βασικές γνωστικές ικανότητες πολλών μορφών ζωής, ωστόσο, η ανίχνευση και κατανόηση της κίνησης στο κείμενο δεν είναι μια ασήμαντη εργασία. Επιπλέον, ο εντοπισμός κινητών οντοτήτων στη φυσική γλώσσα δεν είναι μόνο πρόκληση αλλά και ωφέλιμος για μια καλύτερη κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο για τον εντοπισμό οντοτήτων σε κίνηση σε ένα κείμενο χρησιμοποιώντας το σύνολο δεδομένων κυριολεκτικής κίνησης-σε-κείμενο (LiMiT) για την εκπαίδευση και την αξιολόγηση του μοντέλου. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο διαχωρισμού ρητών και φράσεων από σύνθετες και μακρινές προτάσεις για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης του μοντέλου ΚΟΤ. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης αποτελέσματα που δείχνουν ότι τα χαρακτηριστικά κίνησης, ιδίως η οντότητα σε κίνηση, ωφελεί την εργασία Αναγνώριση Ονόματος-Οντότητας. Τέλος, παρουσιάζουμε μια ανάλυση για την ειδική σχέση συνεμφάνισης μεταξύ της κατηγορίας προσώπων στο ΝΕΡ και των κινούμενων οντοτήτων, η οποία βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση ταξινόμησης για την κατηγορία προσώπων στο ΝΕΡ.', 'hu': 'A mozgás felismerése sok életforma egyik alapvető kognitív képessége, azonban a mozgás felismerése és megértése a szövegben nem triviális feladat. Ezenkívül a mozgó entitások azonosítása a természetes nyelven nemcsak kihívást jelent, hanem előnyös is a természetes nyelv jobb megértéséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy Motion Entity Tagging (MET) modellt, amely segítségével azonosítja a mozgásban lévő entitásokat egy szövegben a Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) adatkészletet használva a modell képzéséhez és értékeléséhez. Ezután egy új módszert javasolunk a komplex és hosszú mozgású mondatok záradékainak és kifejezéseinek felosztására, hogy javítsuk MET modellünk teljesítményét. Olyan eredményeket is bemutatunk, amelyek azt mutatják, hogy a mozgás jellemzői, különösen a mozgásban lévő entitás előnyös a Nevezett entitás felismerése (NER) feladat. Végezetül bemutatunk egy elemzést a NER személykategória és mozgásban lévő animált entitások közötti speciális együttes előfordulási kapcsolatról, ami jelentősen javítja a NER személykategória osztályozási teljesítményét.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento del movimento è una delle capacità cognitive di base di molte forme di vita, tuttavia, rilevare e comprendere il movimento nel testo non è un compito banale. Inoltre, identificare entità di movimento nel linguaggio naturale non è solo impegnativo, ma anche utile per una migliore comprensione del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, presentiamo un modello di Motion Entity Tagging (MET) per identificare le entità in movimento in un testo utilizzando il set di dati Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) per la formazione e la valutazione del modello. Quindi proponiamo un nuovo metodo per dividere clausole e frasi da frasi complesse e lunghe per migliorare le prestazioni del nostro modello MET. Presentiamo anche risultati che dimostrano che le caratteristiche di movimento, in particolare, l'entità in movimento avvantaggia l'attività di Riconoscimento delle Entità Nomate (NER). Infine, presentiamo un'analisi per la speciale relazione di co-occorrenza tra la categoria di persone in NER e le entità animate in movimento, che migliora significativamente le prestazioni di classificazione per la categoria di persone in NER.", 'lt': 'Judėjimo pripažinimas yra vienas iš pagrindinių daugelio gyvenimo formų pažintinių gebėjimų, tačiau judėjimo aptikimas ir supratimas tekste nėra trivialus uždavinys. Be to, judėjimo subjektų nustatymas natūralia kalba yra ne tik sudėtingas, bet ir naudingas geresniam natūralaus kalbos supratimui. Šiame dokumente pristatome judėjimo subjektų ženklinimo (MET) model į, skirtą identifikuoti judančius subjektus tekste, naudojant literalinio judėjimo tekste (LiMiT) duomenų rinkinį mokymui ir modelio vertinimui. Tada siūlome naują metodą, skirtą dalinti išlygas ir frazes iš sudėtingų ir ilgalaikių sakinių, siekiant pagerinti mūsų MET modelio veiksmingumą. Taip pat pateikime rezultatus, rodančius, kad judėjimo savybės, visų pirma judantis subjektas, naudingas vardinio subjekto pripažinimo (NER) užduotis. Galiausiai pateiksime analizę dėl ypatingo NER kategorijos asmenų ir judančių animacinių subjektų bendro įvykio santykio, kuris gerokai pagerina NER kategorijos asmenų klasifikavimo charakteristikas.', 'mk': 'Признавањето на движењето е една од основните когнитивни способности на многу животни форми, сепак, откривањето и разбирањето на движењето во текстот не е тривијална задача. Покрај тоа, идентификувањето на ентитетите за движење на природен јазик не е само предизвикувачки, туку и корисно за подобро разбирање на природниот јазик. Во овој весник, претставуваме модел за означување на ентитетите за движење (MET) за идентификување на ентитетите во движење во текст со користење на датотеката на литерално движење во текст (LiMiT) за обука и евалуација на моделот. Потоа предложуваме нов метод за поделба на клаузулите и фразите од комплексни и долги реченици со движење за подобрување на нашиот модел на МЕТ. Ние, исто така, претставуваме резултати кои покажуваат дека фигурностите на движењето, особено, ентитетот во движење, имаат корист од задачата за препознавање на именуваниот ентитет (НЕР). Конечно, претставуваме анализа за специјалната однос на соопштество помеѓу категоријата на личност во НЕР и анимитирање на ентитетите во движење, што значително ја подобрува класификацијата на категоријата на личност во НЕР.', 'kk': 'Бірақ мәтіндегі жылдамдығын анықтау - көптеген өмір пішімдерінің негізгі байқау мүмкіндіктерінің бірі, бірақ мәтіндегі жылдамдығын анықтау және түсіну - үлкен тапсырм Қосымша, табиғи тілдегі жылжыту мүмкіндіктерін анықтау ғана қажетті емес, сондай-ақ табиғи тілді түсініктерге де пайдалы болады. Бұл қағазда, үлгісін оқыту мен оқу үшін Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) деректер жиынын қолданатын мәтінде жылжытатын нысандарды анықтау үшін жылжыту нысандарын таңдаймыз. Содан кейін, МЕТ үлгісін жақсарту үшін клауз мен сөздерді комплекс және ұзын жылжыту сөздерінен бөлу үшін жаңа әдіс келтіреміз. Сонымен қатар, жылжыту мүмкіндіктерін көрсету нәтижелерін көрсетеді, осылай қатар, жылжыту мүмкіндіктері аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) тапсырмасына пайда болады. Соңында біз NER санатындағы адамдар санатының арасындағы арнайы қатынастық қатынасын анализ көрсеткіздік. Бұл NER санатындағы адамдар санатының классификациясының көбірек жасауын өзгертеді.', 'ml': 'മോഷന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് വളരെ ജീവിത രൂപത്തിലെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ അറിവുള്ള കഴിവുകളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ്. എന്നാലും പദാവലിയിലെ നീക്കം കണ്ടെത്തു സ്വാഭാഷയിലുള്ള നീക്കം സാധാരണ ഭാഷയിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് വെറുമൊന്നുമല്ല, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോഷന്\u200d എന്റിറ്റി ടാഗിങ്ങിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലനത്തിനും പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ലൈറ്റര്\u200d മോണിറ്റി പിന്നീട് നമ്മുടെ MET മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രകടനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നീണ്ട നീണ്ട വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന് നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ശേഷം നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നാം കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d നെആരിലെ പ്രത്യേക ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രത്യേക ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു അന്വേഷണം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. നെആരിലെ വ്യക്തിക വിഭാഗത്തിന്', 'ms': 'Pengenalan pergerakan adalah salah satu kemampuan kognitif asas banyak bentuk kehidupan, bagaimanapun, pengesan dan pemahaman pergerakan dalam teks bukanlah tugas kecil. Selain itu, pengenalan entiti gerak dalam bahasa semulajadi tidak hanya menantang tetapi juga berguna untuk pemahaman bahasa semulajadi yang lebih baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model Tagging Entiti Gerakan (MET) untuk mengenalpasti entiti dalam gerakan dalam teks menggunakan set data Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) untuk latihan dan menilai model. Kemudian kita cadangkan kaedah baru untuk membahagi klausul dan frasa dari kalimat gerakan kompleks dan panjang untuk meningkatkan prestasi model MET kita. Kami juga memperkenalkan keputusan menunjukkan bahawa ciri gerakan, terutamanya, entiti dalam gerakan berguna tugas Pengenalan Entiti Nama (NER). Akhirnya, kami memperkenalkan analisis untuk hubungan persamaan istimewa antara kategori orang dalam NER dan animasikan entiti dalam gerakan, yang meningkatkan secara signifikan prestasi klasifikasi bagi kategori orang dalam NER.', 'mn': 'Хөдөлгөөн хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нь олон амьдралын хэлбэрийн үндсэн оюун ухааны чадварын нэг юм. Текст дээр хөдөлгөөн мэдэх, ойлгох нь бага зэрэг биш. Түүнчлэн, байгалийн хэл дээр хөдөлгөөн байгууллагын нэгжүүдийг тодорхойлох нь зөвхөн шаардлагатай биш, бас байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд ашигтай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хөдөлгөөн Entity Tagging (MET) загварын загварыг суралцах, оюутнуудыг ашиглах Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) өгөгдлийн санг тодорхойлох, хөдөлгөөн байгууллагын загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. МЕТ загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд цогц, урт хөдөлгөөн өгүүлбэрээс хуваалцах шинэ арга зам санал болгоно. Мөн бид үүнийг харуулж байгаа нөлөөлөлт нь хөдөлгөөн үйл ажиллагаа, ялангуяа хөдөлгөөн үйл ажиллагаанд нэрлэгдсэн үйл ажиллагаа (NER) ашигтай. Эцэст нь бид NER-ын хүн төрөлхтний харилцааны ялгаатай харилцааны шинжилгээг харуулж байна. Энэ нь NER-ын хүн төрөлхтний хуваалцааны хуваалцааны үйл ажиллагааг үнэхээр сайжруулдаг.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent tal-moviment huwa wieħed mill-kapaċitajiet konjittivi bażiċi ta’ ħafna forom ta’ ħajja, madankollu, l-individwazzjoni u l-fehim tal-moviment fit-test mhumiex kompitu trivjali. Barra minn hekk, l-identifikazzjoni ta’ entitajiet ta’ moviment fil-lingwa naturali mhijiex biss ta’ sfida iżda wkoll ta’ benefiċċju għal fehim a ħjar tal-lingwa naturali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw mudell ta’ Tagging tal-Entità tal-Moviment (MET) biex nidentifikaw entitajiet li qegħdin jiċċaqilqu f’test bl-użu tad-dataset Literal-Movement-in-Text (LiMiT) għat-taħriġ u l-evalwazzjoni tal-mudell. Imbagħad nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-qsim tal-klawżoli u l-frażijiet minn sentenzi kumplessi u fit-tul ta’ mozzjoni biex tittejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna tat-TES. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll riżultati li juru li l-karatteristiċi tal-moviment, b’mod partikolari, entità f’moviment jibbenefikaw mill-kompitu tar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER). Fl-aħħar nett, qed nippreżentaw analiżi għar-relazzjoni speċjali ta’ kookkorrenza bejn il-kategorija tal-persuna f’NER u l-entitajiet animati li qed jiċċaqilqu, li ttejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni għall-kategorija tal-persuna f’NER.', 'no': 'Førehandsvisinga er ein av dei grunnleggjande kognitive kapasitetene for mange livformar, men å oppdaga og forstå flytting i teksten er ikkje ein trivial oppgåve. I tillegg er identifisering av bevegelseiningar i naturspråk ikkje berre vanskeleg, men også nyttig for ein bedre naturspråk forståelse. I denne papiret presenterer vi eit modell for merking av flyttingseiningar (MET) for å identifisera einingar som flyttar i eit tekst med datasettet Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) for opplæring og evaluering av modellen. Så fører vi ein ny metode for å dele klausar og frasar frå komplekse og lang bevegelssetningar for å forbetra utviklinga av vår MET-modell. Vi viser også resultat som viser at flyttingsfunksjonar, spesielt, eininga i bevegelse, nyttar oppgåva med namnet entitetskjenning (NER). I slutt presenterer vi ein analyse for den spesielle samtidige samtidige relasjonen mellom personkategorien i NER og animasjonar i flytting, som betydelig forbedrar klassifikasjonen for personkategorien i NER.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie ruchu jest jedną z podstawowych możliwości poznawczych wielu form życia, jednak wykrywanie i zrozumienie ruchu w tekście nie jest trywialnym zadaniem. Ponadto identyfikacja jednostek ruchowych w języku naturalnym jest nie tylko wyzwaniem, ale także korzystne dla lepszego zrozumienia języka naturalnego. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy model Motion Entity Tagging (MET) umożliwiający identyfikację podmiotów w ruchu w tekście przy użyciu zbioru danych Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) do treningu i oceny modelu. Następnie proponujemy nową metodę dzielenia klauzul i fraz ze złożonych i długich zdań ruchowych w celu poprawy wydajności naszego modelu MET. Przedstawiamy również wyniki pokazujące, że cechy ruchu, w szczególności jednostka w ruchu, korzystają z zadania Rozpoznawania Nazwanych Podmiotów (NER). Na koniec przedstawiamy analizę szczególnej relacji współwystępowania pomiędzy kategorią osoby w NER a animowanymi podmiotami w ruchu, co znacząco poprawia wydajność klasyfikacji kategorii osoby w NER.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea mișcării este una dintre capacitățile cognitive de bază ale multor forme de viață, cu toate acestea, detectarea și înțelegerea mișcării în text nu este o sarcină banală. În plus, identificarea entităților de mișcare în limbajul natural nu este doar o provocare, ci și benefică pentru o mai bună înțelegere a limbajului natural. În această lucrare, prezentăm un model MET (Motion Entity Tagging) pentru identificarea entităților în mișcare într-un text folosind setul de date Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) pentru instruirea și evaluarea modelului. Apoi propunem o nouă metodă de separare a clauzelor și frazelor din propoziții complexe și lungi de mișcare pentru a îmbunătăți performanța modelului nostru MET. De asemenea, prezentăm rezultate care arată că caracteristicile de mișcare, în special, entitatea în mișcare beneficiază de activitatea de recunoaștere a entităților denumite (NER). În cele din urmă, prezentăm o analiză a relației speciale de co-apariție între categoria de persoane în NER și entitățile animate în mișcare, care îmbunătățește semnificativ performanța clasificării categoriei de persoane în NER.', 'so': "Aqoonsashada hooyadu waa mid ka mid ah awoodda aasaasiga ah ee noocyada nololeed oo badan, habase yeeshee baaritaanka iyo waxgarashada ku qoran waxyaabaha fudud ma aha. Intaas waxaa dheer in aqoonsashada hay'adaha dhaqdhaqaalaha oo afka dabiicadda ah ma ahan dhibaato keliya, laakiin waxaa kaloo faa’iido u leh garashada afka asalka ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaynaa muusikada waxqabadka (MET) si aan u aqoonsanno waxyaabaha ku dhaqdhaqaaqiya qoraal, kaasoo lagu isticmaalayo macluumaadka qoraalka-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) ee waxbarashada iyo qiimeynaya modelka. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedinnaa qaab cusub si aan uga kala qeybinno fasaxyada iyo hadallada dhibaatada iyo dhaadheerka si aan u hagaajino sameynta modeleena MET. We also present results showing that motion features, in particular, entity in motion benefits the Named-Entity Recognition (NER) task.  Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa baaritaanka gaarka ah ee ku dhexeeya kooxaha NER iyo waxyaabaha dhaqdhaqaaqa ah, kaas oo si weyn u hagaajiya fasaxa qofka ku jira NER.", 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje pokreta je jedna od osnovnih kognitivnih sposobnosti mnogih oblika života, međutim, otkrivanje i razumevanje pokreta teksta nije trivialni zadatak. Osim toga, identifikacija kretanja na prirodnom jeziku nije samo izazovna, već i korisna za bolje prirodno razumevanje jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model oznake za pokretanje podataka (MET) za identifikaciju podataka koji se kreću u tekstu koristeći kompletu literalnog pokreta u tekstu (LiMiT) za obuku i procjenu model a. Onda predlažemo novu metodu da podelimo klauzule i rečenice iz složenih i dugih rečenica za pokret da poboljšamo učinkovitost našeg model a MET-a. Takođe predstavljamo rezultate koji pokazuju da karakteristike pokreta, posebno, entitet u pokretu koristi zadatak priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER). Napokon, predstavljamo analizu za posebnu povezanost sa saradnjom između kategorije osoba u NER-u i animativnih entitata u pokretu, koja značajno poboljšava klasifikaciju za kategoriju osoba u NER-u.', 'sv': 'Rörelseigenkänning är en av de grundläggande kognitiva förmågorna hos många livsformer, men att upptäcka och förstå rörelse i text är inte en trivial uppgift. Dessutom är identifiering av rörelseenheter i naturligt språk inte bara utmanande utan också fördelaktig för en bättre förståelse av naturligt språk. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en MET-modell (Motion Entity Tagging) för att identifiera entiteter i rörelse i en text med hjälp av LiMiT-datauppsättningen (Literal-Motion-in-Text) för utbildning och utvärdering av modellen. Sedan föreslår vi en ny metod för att dela upp satser och fraser från komplexa och långa rörelsemeningar för att förbättra prestandan hos vår MET-modell. Vi presenterar också resultat som visar att rörelsefunktioner, särskilt entitet i rörelse gynnar uppgiften Named-Entity Recognition (NER). Slutligen presenterar vi en analys för det speciella sambandet mellan personkategorin i NER och animerade enheter i rörelse, vilket avsevärt förbättrar klassificeringsprestandan för personkategorin i NER.', 'si': 'ජීවිත වර්ගයක් ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය සහ තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන්ගේ මූලික පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන්  ඒ වගේම, ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවේ හැකියාව අනුමුත්තක් තියෙන්නේ නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නෙවෙයි නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ් මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා පැත්තක් භාවිත කරන්න පැත්තක් ඇතුළු හැකීම සඳහා හැකීම සඳහා හැකීම සඳහා හැකීම් අ ඊට පස්සේ අපි අළුත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා අපේ MET මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වැඩ කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන්, සිද්ධ විශේෂයෙන්, නාම-අන්තිත්වය අන්තිමේදී, අපි විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධතාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ NER වලින් විශේෂ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ජීවිත', 'ur': 'حرکت کی شناسایی بہت سی زندگی فرموں کی بنیادی شناسایی کی قابلیت میں سے ایک ہے، لیکن پیغام میں حرکت شناسایی اور سمجھنے کی کوشش ایک کم کام نہیں ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، طبیعی زبان میں حرکت کے اختیار کا پہچان نہ صرف مشکل ہے بلکہ بہتر طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے بھی فائدہ اٹھانے والا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک موٹیون اینٹیٹ ٹیگ (MET) موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک متن میں موٹیوں کو پہچان سکیں اور موڈل کے لئے استعمال کریں اور مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے لیٹرل-موٹن-ان-ٹیکسٹ (LiMiT) ڈیٹ سٹ کے استعمال کریں۔ پھر ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کریں کہ کلاس اور عبارت کو پیچیدہ اور طویل حرکت جماعتوں سے تقسیم کرنے کے لئے ہمارے MET موڈل کے عملکرد کو بہتر کریں۔ ہم نے بھی نتیجے پیش کیے ہیں کہ حرکت کے فرصت، مخصوصاً حرکت کے متعلق ایک ٹیٹی کے کام کے فائدہ اٹھائے جاتے ہیں. آخر میں ہم نے ایک تحلیل پیش کیا ہے کہ NER میں شخص کاٹیوں کے درمیان ایک مخصوص اتفاق کا ارتباط کرتا ہے اور نیر میں انیٹیوں کے درمیان چلنے کی جگہ ہے، جو NER میں شخص کاٹیوں کے لئے کلاسیفوں کا عملکرد بہتر کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'எதிர்பார்ப்பு அடிப்படை அறிவிப்பு இயல்புகளின் அடிப்படையான இயல்புகளில் ஒன்றாகும், ஆனால், உரையில் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் இயக்கம் ஒரு  மேலும், இயல்பான மொழியில் நகர்வு பொருள்களை கண்டுபிடிப்பது சவால் மட்டும் அல்ல, ஆனால் சிறந்த இயற்கையான மொழிய இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு Motion Entity Tagging (MET) மாதிரியை காண்பிக்கிறோம் முறைமையில் ஒரு உரையில் உள்ள உறுப்புகளை நகர்த்தும் பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறையை பிரிக்க வேண்டும் சிக்கல் மற்றும் நீண்ட நகர்வு வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து வாக்கியங்களை பிர நாம் முடிவுகளைக் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அது நகர்த்தல் குணங்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, குறிப்பாக, நகர்த்தல் உறுப்பு இறுதியில், நாம் NER மற்றும் அசைவூட்ட பொருள்களுக்கிடையே நபர் வகுப்புகளுக்கும் இடையே ஒரு சிறப்பு இணைப்புக்கு ஒரு ஆய்வு கொடுக்கிறோம், அது NER-ல் உள்ள', 'uz': "Tashqi tasdiqlashni ko'p hayot formatlarining asosiy xususiyatlaridan biri, ammo matnning harakatini aniqlash va tushunish juda qisqarli vazifa emas. Ko'pchilik, tabiiy tildagi tashkilotlarni aniqlash uchun faqat murakkab emas, balki nafaqat tilni o'rganish uchun yaxshi foydali. Bu hujjatda, biz modelni qidirish va qiymatlash uchun matnni ishlatish uchun quyidagi narsalarni aniqlash mumkin. Keyin biz MET modelimizni bajarish uchun murakkab va uzun harakat qilish imkoniyatlaridan bir yangi usulni ajratish uchun boshqa usulni talab qilamiz. Ko'rib chiqish natijalarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Hullas, harakat xususiyatlarini koʻchirish muvaffaqiyatlariga foydalanadi. Endi, biz NER va animatlik jamoasidagi odamning shaxsiy bir qanchalik bir xil munosabatlariga aniqlash uchun analyzerni hozir qilamiz. Bu huddi NER guruhidagi odamning darajasining jarayonini juda ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự nhận biết vận động là một trong những khả năng nhận thức cơ bản của nhiều dạng sống, tuy nhiên việc phát hiện và hiểu biết chuyển động trong văn bản không phải là một nhiệm vụ tầm thường. Ngoài ra, việc xác định các thực thể chuyển động trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên không chỉ là thách thức mà còn có lợi cho việc hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên tốt hơn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi trình bày một mẫu Thân thể Chuyển động (MET) để xác định các thực thể đang hoạt động trong một văn bản dùng dữ liệu mảng Văn học vận động Văn bản (LiMiT) để đào tạo và đánh giá mô hình. Sau đó, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mới để chia rẽ các chữ và các trường hợp từ các câu chuyển động phức tạp và dài để nâng cao tiến trình hiện trường của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi cũng trình bày kết quả cho thấy các tính năng chuyển động, đặc biệt, thực thể chuyển động sẽ có tác dụng nhận dạng người có tên (NER). Sau cùng, chúng tôi đưa ra một kết quả phân tích về mối quan hệ tình cờ đặc biệt giữa phân loại người trong các thực thể NER và hoạt động thú y, nó sẽ cải thiện hiệu suất phân hạng của người trong cái máy.', 'da': 'Bevægelsesgenkendelse er en af de grundlæggende kognitive evner i mange livsformer, men detektering og forståelse af bevægelse i tekst er ikke en triviel opgave. Desuden er det ikke kun udfordrende at identificere bevægelsesenheder i naturligt sprog, men også gavnligt for en bedre naturlig sprogforståelse. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en Motion Entity Tagging (MET) model til at identificere enheder i bevægelse i en tekst ved hjælp af Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) datasættet til træning og evaluering af modellen. Derefter foreslår vi en ny metode til at opdele sætninger og sætninger fra komplekse og lange bevægelsessætninger for at forbedre ydeevnen af vores MET model. Vi præsenterer også resultater, der viser, at bevægelsesfunktioner især enhed i bevægelse gavner opgaven Navngivet Entity Recognition (NER). Endelig præsenterer vi en analyse af den særlige samhørighedsforhold mellem personkategorien i NER og animerede enheder i bevægelse, hvilket markant forbedrer klassificeringen af personkategorien i NER.', 'nl': 'Bewegingsherkenning is een van de fundamentele cognitieve mogelijkheden van veel levensvormen, maar het detecteren en begrijpen van beweging in tekst is geen triviale taak. Daarnaast is het identificeren van bewegende entiteiten in natuurlijke taal niet alleen uitdagend, maar ook voordelig voor een beter begrip van natuurlijke taal. In dit artikel presenteren we een Motion Entity Tagging (MET) model om entiteiten in beweging te identificeren in een tekst met behulp van de Literal Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) dataset voor training en evaluatie van het model. Vervolgens stellen we een nieuwe methode voor om clausules en zinnen te splitsen van complexe en lange motiezinnen om de prestaties van ons MET-model te verbeteren. We presenteren ook resultaten waaruit blijkt dat bewegingskenmerken, in het bijzonder entiteit in beweging, ten goede komen aan de NER-taak (Named-Entity Recognition). Tot slot presenteren we een analyse voor de speciale co-incident relatie tussen de person category in NER en animate entiteiten in beweging, wat de classificatieprestaties voor de person category in NER aanzienlijk verbetert.', 'bg': 'Разпознаването на движението е една от основните когнитивни способности на много форми на живот, но откриването и разбирането на движението в текста не е тривиална задача. Освен това идентифицирането на движещи се обекти в естествен език е не само предизвикателство, но и полезно за по-добро разбиране на естествения език. В настоящата статия представяме модел за маркиране на движещи се обекти (МЕТ) за идентифициране на движещи се обекти в текст, използвайки набор от данни ЛиMiT за обучение и оценка на модела. След това предлагаме нов метод за разделяне на клаузи и фрази от сложни и дълги изречения с движение, за да подобрим ефективността на нашия модел. Представяме и резултати, които показват, че характеристиките на движението, по-специално субектът в движение, облагодетелстват задачата за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР). На последно място, представяме анализ на специалната взаимовръзка между категорията личност в НЕР и анимираните субекти в движение, което значително подобрява класификационните показатели на категорията личност в НЕР.', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje pokreta je jedna od osnovnih kognitivnih sposobnosti mnogih oblika života, međutim, otkrivanje i razumijevanje pokreta teksta nije trivialni zadatak. Osim toga, identifikacija područja pokreta na prirodnom jeziku nije samo izazovna, već i korisna za bolje razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model oznake pokretačkih podataka (MET) za identifikaciju podataka koji se kreću u tekstu koristeći kompletu podataka za obuku i procjenu model a. Onda predlažemo novu metodu da podelimo klauzule i fraze iz složenih i dugih prijevoza za poboljšanje učinka našeg model a TER-a. Također predstavljamo rezultate koji pokazuju da karakteristike pokreta, posebno, entitet u pokretu koristi zadatak priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER). Na kraju, predstavljamo analizu posebnog sposobnog odnosa između kategorije osoba u NER-u i pokretanih animativnih subjekta, što značajno poboljšava klasifikacijsku učinku za kategoriju osoba u NER-u.', 'de': 'Bewegungserkennung ist eine der grundlegenden kognitiven Fähigkeiten vieler Lebensformen, aber das Erkennen und Verstehen von Bewegungen im Text ist keine triviale Aufgabe. Darüber hinaus ist die Identifizierung von Bewegungseinheiten in natürlicher Sprache nicht nur eine Herausforderung, sondern auch vorteilhaft für ein besseres Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein Motion Entity Tagging (MET)-Modell vor, mit dem Entitäten in Bewegung in einem Text mithilfe des Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT)-Datensatzes identifiziert werden können, um das Modell zu trainieren und zu evaluieren. Dann schlagen wir eine neue Methode vor, um Sätze und Sätze aus komplexen und langen Bewegungssätzen zu trennen, um die Leistung unseres MET-Modells zu verbessern. Wir präsentieren auch Ergebnisse, die zeigen, dass Bewegungsmerkmale, insbesondere Entity in Motion, der Aufgabe Named-Entity Recognition (NER) zugutekommen. Abschließend präsentieren wir eine Analyse für die besondere Koexistenzbeziehung zwischen der Personenkategorie in NER und animierten Entitäten in Bewegung, die die Klassifikationsleistung für die Personenkategorie in NER signifikant verbessert.', 'ko': '운동 식별은 많은 생명 형태의 기본적인 인지 능력 중 하나이지만 텍스트의 운동을 검측하고 이해하는 것은 간단한 임무가 아니다.또한 자연언어 중의 운동 실체를 식별하는 것은 도전적일 뿐만 아니라 자연언어를 더욱 잘 이해하는 데 도움이 된다.본고에서 우리는 텍스트의 문자 운동(LiMiT) 데이터 집합을 이용하여 텍스트의 운동 실체를 식별하여 이 모델을 훈련하고 평가하는 데 사용되는 운동 실체 표기(MET) 모델을 제시했다.그리고 우리는 복잡하고 긴 운동문에서 자구와 단어를 분할하여 MET모델의 성능을 향상시키는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.동작 특성, 특히 동작의 솔리드가 명명된 솔리드 인식(NER) 임무에 유리하다는 결과도 보여줍니다.마지막으로 우리는 NER 중의 인물 유형과 운동 중의 애니메이션 실체 간의 특수한 공생 관계를 분석했는데 이것은 NER 중의 인물 유형의 분류 성능을 현저히 향상시켰다.', 'sw': 'Kutambua upinzani ni moja ya uwezo wa msingi wa utambulisho wa a in a nyingi za maisha, hata hivyo, kutambua na kuelewa harakati za maandishi si kazi ndogo. Zaidi ya hayo, kutambua vitu vya harakati katika lugha ya asili si changamoto tu bali pia ni faida kwa kuelewa lugha bora ya asili. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka modeli ya Uhamiaji (MET) ya kutambua vitu vinavyohamasika katika maandishi kwa kutumia taarifa za maandishi ya Kifasihi-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) kwa ajili ya mafunzo na kutathmini mtindo huo. Kisha tunapendekeza njia mpya ya kugawanya maelezo na maneno kutoka kwenye sentensi ngumu na hatua ndefu ili kuboresha utendaji wa modeli wetu wa MET. Pia tunaleta matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba harakati hizo, hususani entity in motion inasaidia kazi ya kutambua Ujadala (UKIMWI). Mwisho, tunaweka uchambuzi wa mahusiano maalum yanayotokea kati ya kundi hilo la mtu na vitu vya viumbe vya kimapenzi vinavyoendelea, ambacho kinabadilisha ufanisi wa usambazaji kwa ajili ya kundi la mtu nchini NER.', 'tr': "Direktor tanamak birnäçe durmuşy biçimleriniñ esasy pikirlenýän ukyplarynyň biri, ýöne metinde hereket tanamak we düşünmek üçin täsirli bir zady däl. Beýleki, tebigy dilde hereket etmäge tanyş diňe çözüm däl, ýöne tebigy dil düşünmesi üçin has gowy bir nusga ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz özümiziň bellenen taýýarlama we çykarmak üçin bir metin içinde hereket etjek taýýarlama nusgasyny tesbit etmek üçin hareket taýýarlama nusgasyny görkeýäris Sonra köpürli we uzak sözlerimizden clawulary we a ýlamak üçin täze bir yöntem teklip edip görýäris. Mundan soňra görkezilýän netijelerimiz görkezilýän hereket edip görkezilýän hereket edil Ady-Entity Recognition (NER) zadynyň faydaly bar. Soňunda, NER'de kişiň kategoriýasynyň arasynda ýakyn bir baglaýyşyň barlygyny çykýarys. Bu nusga NER'de kişiň kategoriýasynda ýazym taýýarlandyrylygyny örän gowuraýar.", 'fa': 'شناسایی حرکت یکی از توانایی بنیادی شناسایی بسیاری از فرم\u200cهای زندگی است، ولی شناسایی و درک حرکت در متن یک وظیفه سه\u200cگانه نیست. علاوه بر این، شناسایی واحدهای حرکت در زبان طبیعی تنها سخت\u200cگیری نیست، بلکه برای فهمیدن زبان طبیعی بهتر منافع است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل برچسب اجزای حرکت (MET) را برای شناسایی اجزایی که در یک متن حرکت می\u200cکنند با استفاده از مجموعه داده\u200cهای حرکت Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) برای آموزش و ارزیابی مدل نشان می\u200cدهیم. سپس ما یک روش جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا کلاس\u200cها و جمله\u200cها را از جمله\u200cهای پیچیده و طولانی تقسیم کنیم تا عملکرد مدل MET ما را بهبود دهیم. ما همچنین نتیجه\u200cهایی را نشان می\u200cدهیم که ویژه\u200cهای حرکت، مخصوصاً واحد در حرکت، به کار شناسایی واحد نام (NER) سود می\u200cدهد. بالاخره، ما یک تحلیل برای ارتباط مشابه خاصی بین گروه شخصی در NER و گروه\u200cهای جنبندی در حرکت پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که عملکرد گروه\u200cشناسی برای گروه شخصی در NER significantly improves the classification performance for the person category in NER.', 'af': "Beweg herkening is een van die basiese kognitiewe kapasiteite van baie lewe vorms, maar die beskrywing en verstaan beweging in teks is nie 'n triviale taak nie. In addition, the identification of motion entities in natural language is not only challenging but also beneficial for a better natural language understanding. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n Beweg Entiteit Merking (MET) model om entiteite in beweging in 'n teks te identifiseer met die Literal- Motion- in- Text (LiMiT) datastel vir onderwerp en evalueer die model. Toe voorstel ons 'n nuwe metode om klauses en frase van kompleks en lang beweging setings te skei om die prestasie van ons MET model te verbeter. Ons bevat ook resultate wat wys dat beweging funksies, in besonderhede, entiteit in beweging voordeel die Naam-Entiteit-herkening (NER) taak. Eindelik stel ons 'n analisie voor die spesiale samevenemingsverhouding tussen die persoon kategorie in NER en animasieer entiteite in beweging, wat betekenlik die klasifikasie-prestasie vir die persoon kategorie in NER verbeter.", 'am': 'የአሰናብት ማውቀት ብዙዎች የሕይወት ፎርማቶች መሠረት መሠረት አንዲቱ ነው፣ ነገር ግን በጽሑፍ መቀናቀል እና ማስተዋል የተመሳሰል ስራ አይፈጸም፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አካባቢዎችን ለማሳየት የሚሻል የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ አካባቢ የኢንተርት ተግታ (MET) ሞዴል አካባቢዎችን በመንቀሳቀስ በጽሑፍ በመንቀሳቀስ እና የሐሳብ-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) ዳታዎችን ለማስተማርና ለማስተምር እና በሞዴል ላይ ለማስተዋል በመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የሜቴል ሞዴል አካሄዱን ለማሻሻል እና ቃላትን ከጭንቀት እና ረጅም መንቀሳቀስ ቃላት ለመለያየት አዲስ ልማድ እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ አካባቢው ለመንቀሳቀስ ስርዓት (NER) የሚጠቅመውን ስራ የሚጠቅመውን ፍሬቶች እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም በNER እና በአየር አካባቢ አካባቢዎች መካከል የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እና በመንቀሳቀስ ላይ የሚያሳውቀውን አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Շատ կյանքի ձևերի հիմնական ճանաչողական հնարավորություններից մեկն է, սակայն տեքստում շարժման հայտնաբերումը և հասկանալը փոքրիկ խնդիր չէ: Ավելին, բնական լեզվով շարժման միավորների հայտնաբերումը ոչ միայն դժվար է, այլ նաև օգտակար է ավելի լավ բնական լեզվի հասկանալու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք շարժման կազմակերպության նշանակման (ՄԵԹ) մոդել, որպեսզի տեսնենք շարժման կազմակերպությունները տեքստում, օգտագործելով գրական-շարժման-տեքստում (ԼիՄԻԹ) տվյալների համակարգը մոդելի ուսուցման և գնահատ Then we propose a new method to split clauses and phrases from complex and long motion sentences to improve the performance of our MET model.  Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք արդյունքներ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ շարժման առանձնահատկությունները, հատկապես շարժման մեջ գտնվող առանձնահատկությունները օգտագործում են Ներված Անձնահատկությունների Հայտնագիտելիք Վերջապես, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի վերլուծություն անհատական համապատահականության հարաբերության մասին, որը կազմում է անհատական կատեգորիայի և անիմատիվ կազմակերպությունների միջև, ինչը նշանակալիորեն բարելավում է անհատական կատեգորիայի դասակարգումների', 'az': 'Həyat tanıması bir çox yaşam formların əsl bilikli qabiliyyətlərindəndir, amma məktubların hərəkətini keşfetmek və anlamaq üçlü bir iş deyildir. Təbiətli dildə hərəkət məlumatlarını təsdiqləndirmək yalnız çətin deyildir, lakin daha yaxşı təbiətli dil anlama üçün faydalı deyildir. Bu kağızda, modeli təhsil etmək və değerlendirmək üçün Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) məlumatlarını istifadə etmək üçün hərəkət Entity Tagging (MET) modelini göstəririk. Sonra biz müxtəlif və uzun sürətli cümlələrdən clausu və sözləri parçalamaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik ki, MET modelinin performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün. Biz də göstəririk ki, hərəkət tərzlərinin, özlərinə də, hərəkət tərzlərinin adı-Entity Recognition (NER) işin ə fayda verər. Sonunda, NER kategoriyasındakı insan kategoriyasının və animasyonda hissələrin arasındakı xüsusi hissəsinin analizi göstəririk. Bu, NER kategoriyasının klasifikasiya performansını çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'মোশন স্বীকার হচ্ছে অনেক জীবন ফর্মের মৌলিক চিন্তা ক্ষমতা, তবে টেক্সটের প্রচারণা খুঁজে বুঝতে ও বুঝতে পারে ত্রিমিল কাজ নয়। এছাড়াও প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় আন্দোলনের বিষয়গুলোকে চ্যালেঞ্জ করা শুধুমাত্র চ্যালেঞ্জ নয়, কিন্তু সেগু এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মোশন এন্টিটি ট্যাগিং মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যাতে সাহিত্য-মোশন-ইন-টেক্সট ব্যবহার করে প্রশিক্ষণ ও মডেল মূল্যায়নের জন্য একটি টেক্সটে বস্তুকে চ তারপর আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যাতে আমাদের MET মডেলের প্রভাব উন্নত করার জন্য জটিল এবং দীর্ঘদিনের বাক্য থেকে বিভক্ত করা এবং ব আমরা বর্তমানের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছি যে আন্দোলনের বৈশিষ্ট্য, বিশেষ করে যে প্রতিষ্ঠান নাম-এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির (NER) কাজের সুবিধা  শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা একটি বিশেষ বিশ্লেষণ উপস্থাপন করছি যা নেরার ব্যক্তি এবং অ্যানিমেট বিষয়গুলোর মধ্যে ব্যক্তিগত সংশ্লিষ্ট সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্কের জন্য বিশেষ বি', 'id': 'Pengenalan gerakan adalah salah satu kemampuan kognitif dasar dari banyak bentuk kehidupan, bagaimanapun, mendeteksi dan memahami gerakan dalam teks bukan tugas kecil. Selain itu, mengidentifikasi entitas gerakan dalam bahasa alam tidak hanya menantang tetapi juga berguna untuk pemahaman bahasa alam yang lebih baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan model Tagging Entitas Gerakan (MET) untuk mengidentifikasi entitas bergerak dalam teks menggunakan set data Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) untuk latihan dan evaluasi model. Kemudian kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk membagi klausul dan frasa dari kalimat gerakan kompleks dan panjang untuk meningkatkan prestasi model MET kami. Kami juga mempersembahkan hasil menunjukkan bahwa fitur gerakan, terutama, entitas dalam gerakan berguna tugas Pengenalan Entitas Nama (NER). Finally, we present an analysis for the special co-occurrence relation between the person category in NER and animate entities in motion, which significantly improves the classification performance for the person category in NER.', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje pokreta je jedna od osnovnih kognitivnih sposobnosti mnogih oblika života, međutim, otkrivanje i razumijevanje pokreta teksta nije trivialni zadatak. Osim toga, identifikacija kretanja na prirodnom jeziku nije samo izazovna, već i korisna za bolje prirodno razumijevanje jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model oznake pokretanja entiteta (MET) kako bi identifikovali entitate koji se kreću u tekstu koristeći kompletu podataka Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) za obuku i procjenu model a. Onda predlažemo novu metodu da podelimo klauzule i fraze iz složenih i dugih rečenica za pokret kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost našeg model a MET-a. Također predstavljamo rezultate koji pokazuju da karakteristike pokreta, posebno, entitet u pokretu, koristi zadatak priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER). Na kraju, predstavljamo analizu za posebnu povezanost sa saradnjem događaja između kategorije osoba u NER-u i kretanja animativnih entitata, koja značajno poboljšava klasifikaciju za kategoriju osoba u NER-u.', 'ca': "Motion recognition is one of the basic cognitive capabilities of many life forms, however, detecting and understanding motion in text is not a trivial task.  A més, la identificació de les entitats de moviment en llenguatge natural no només és desafiadora, sino també beneficiosa per a una millor comprensió del llenguatge natural. En aquest article, presentem un model d'etiqueta d'entitats de moviment (MET) per identificar entitats en moviment en un text utilitzant el conjunt de dades Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) per a formar i evaluar el model. Llavors proposem un nou mètode per separar clàusules i frases de frases de moviment complexes i llargs per millorar el rendiment del nostre model de TEM. També presentem resultats que demostren que les característiques del moviment, en particular, l'entitat en moviment beneficien la tasca de Recognició de Nomada Entitat (NER). Finalment, presentem una an àlisi de la relació especial de coincidència entre la categoria de persona en NER i les entitats animades en moviment, que millora significativament el rendiment de classificació de la categoria de persona en NER.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání pohybu je jednou ze základních kognitivních schopností mnoha forem života, nicméně detekce a porozumění pohybu v textu není triviální úkol. Kromě toho je identifikace pohybových entit v přirozeném jazyce nejen náročná, ale také přínosná pro lepší porozumění přirozenému jazyce. V tomto článku představujeme model Motion Entity Tagging (MET) pro identifikaci entit v pohybu v textu pomocí datové sady Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) pro trénink a hodnocení modelu. Následně navrhujeme novou metodu rozdělení vět a frází ze složitých a dlouhých vět a zlepšení výkonnosti našeho MET modelu. Dále prezentujeme výsledky ukazující, že pohybové prvky, zejména entity in motion, přinášejí výhody úlohy Rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER). Na závěr představujeme analýzu speciálního koexistenčního vztahu mezi kategorií osob v NER a animovanými entitami v pohybu, což výrazně zlepšuje klasifikační výkon pro kategorii osob v NER.', 'et': 'Liikumise tuvastamine on paljude eluvormide üks peamisi kognitiivseid võimeid, kuid liikumise tuvastamine ja mõistmine tekstis ei ole tühine ülesanne. Lisaks on liikumisüksuste tuvastamine looduskeeles mitte ainult keeruline, vaid ka kasulik looduskeele paremaks mõistmiseks. Käesolevas töös tutvustame liikuvate entiteetide märgistamise mudelit (MET), et tuvastada tekstis liikuvaid üksusi, kasutades sõna-liikumise-tekstis (LiMiT) andmekogumit mudeli koolitamiseks ja hindamiseks. Seejärel pakume välja uue meetodi, mille abil jagada klaused ja fraasid keerulistest ja pikkadest liikuvatest lausetest, et parandada meie MET mudeli jõudlust. Samuti esitame tulemused, mis näitavad, et liikumisfunktsioonid, eelkõige liikuv oleme kasulikud nimetatud olemi tunnustamise (NER) ülesandele. Lõpuks esitame analüüsi NER-i isikukategooria ja liikuvate elusolendite vahelise erilise koosesinemissuhte kohta, mis parandab oluliselt isikukategooria klassifitseerimist NER-is.', 'fi': 'Liikentunnistus on yksi monien elämänmuotojen kognitiivisista kyvyistä, mutta liikkeen havaitseminen ja ymmärtäminen tekstissä ei ole vähäpätöinen tehtävä. Lisäksi liikekokonaisuuksien tunnistaminen luonnollisessa kielessä ei ole vain haastavaa vaan myös hyödyllistä luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisen kannalta. Tässä työssä esittelemme liiketunnistusmallin (MET), jolla tunnistetaan tekstissä liikkuvia entiteettejä käyttäen Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) -aineistoa mallin kouluttamiseksi ja arvioimiseksi. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme uutta menetelmää lauseiden ja lauseiden jakamiseen monimutkaisista ja pitkistä liikelauseista MET-mallimme suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Esitämme myös tuloksia, jotka osoittavat, että liikeominaisuudet, erityisesti liikkeessä oleva kokonaisuus, hyödyttävät Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistus (NER) -tehtävää. Lopuksi esitämme analyysin NER:n henkilöluokan ja liikkeessä olevien elävien entiteettien välisestä erityisestä rinnakkaisesiintymissuhteesta, joka parantaa merkittävästi NER:n henkilöluokan luokittelukykyä.', 'sq': 'Njohja e lëvizjes është një nga aftësitë bazë kognitive të shumë forme jete, megjithatë, zbulimi dhe kuptimi i lëvizjes në tekst nuk është një detyrë e vogël. Përveç kësaj, identifikimi i njësive të lëvizjes në gjuhën natyrore nuk është vetëm sfidues por gjithashtu përfitim për një kuptim më të mirë natyror të gjuhës. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një model etiketash të njësisë së lëvizjes (MET) për të identifikuar njësitë në lëvizje në një tekst duke përdorur grupin e të dhënave Literal-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) për trajnimin dhe vlerësimin e modelit. Then we propose a new method to split clauses and phrases from complex and long motion sentences to improve the performance of our MET model.  Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu rezultate që tregojnë se funksionet e lëvizjes, veçanërisht, njësia në lëvizje përfitojnë detyrën e njohjes së njësisë së emëruar (NER). Më në fund, ne paraqesim një analizë për lidhjen e veçantë të bashkëndodhjes midis kategorisë së personit në NER dhe të animacionit të njësive në lëvizje, gjë që përmirëson ndjeshëm paraqitjen e klasifikimit për kategorinë e personit në NER.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé Nambah, nambah kang dibenakake kapan-kapan kanggo alih dumadhi kaya kuwi nggawe barang apik, kaya apik dhéwé kuwi basa sing luwih apik. Nang mapir iki, kita nambah model Moton Enty tagging Amarok supoyo sistem sing dibutuhke perusahaan kanggo dianggap karo perusahaan sing komplikasi lan galaksi langkung penting nggawe ngubah akeh modèl MET Awak dhéwé éntuk sawetara cara-cara sing wis nggambar nggawe nguasakno karo nggawe barang nggawe barang Named-Entty Ero, awak dhéwé éntuk anjelisaké kanggo sabên gerarané itéwé karo kategori persilangan ingkang "neré" lan "arti anime" sing berarti, segala macem nggawe barang nggawe gerarané sak kategori persilangan karo "neré".', 'he': 'זיהוי תנועה הוא אחד מהיכולות הקוניטיבית הבסיסיות של צורות חיים רבות, עם זאת, גילוי והבנה תנועה בטקסט הוא לא משימה טריוויאלית. בנוסף, לזהות יחידות תנועה בשפה טבעית היא לא רק מאתגרת, אלא גם מועילה להבנה טבעית טובה יותר. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים דוגמא של תווית איכות תנועה (MET) כדי לזהות איכויות בתנועה בטקסט באמצעות קבוצת נתונים של תנועה Literal-in-Text (LiMiT) לאימון ולהערכה של הדוגמא. ואז אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה לחלק פסקים ומאמרים משפטי תנועה מורכבים וארוכים כדי לשפר את ההופעה של מודל MET שלנו. אנחנו גם מציגים תוצאות שמראות כי תכונות תנועה, במיוחד, יחידה בתנועה מועילות המשימה של זיהוי יחידה בשם (NER). סוף סוף, אנחנו מציגים ניתוח על יחסי התרחשות המשותפת המיוחדת בין הקטגוריה של האדם ב NER ואנימיציה של יחידות בתנועה, אשר משפר באופן משמעותי את ביצועי הקטגוריה של האדם בקטגוריה של NER.', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje gibanja je ena osnovnih kognitivnih sposobnosti številnih življenjskih oblik, vendar zaznavanje in razumevanje gibanja v besedilu ni trivialna naloga. Poleg tega prepoznavanje gibalnih entitet v naravnem jeziku ni le izziv, ampak tudi koristno za boljše razumevanje naravnega jezika. V prispevku predstavljamo model označevanja gibljivih entitet (MET) za identifikacijo entitet v gibanju v besedilu z uporabo nabora podatkov Literalno-gibanje-v-besedilu (LiMiT) za usposabljanje in vrednotenje modela. Nato predlagamo novo metodo za razdelitev stavkov in stavkov iz kompleksnih in dolgih gibljivih stavkov, da bi izboljšali delovanje našega modela MET. Predstavljamo tudi rezultate, ki kažejo, da funkcije gibanja, zlasti subjekt v gibanju, koristijo nalogi prepoznavanja imenovanih subjektov (NER). Na koncu predstavljamo analizo posebnega sočasnega razmerja med osebno kategorijo v NER in animiranimi entitetami v gibanju, kar bistveno izboljša klasifikacijsko uspešnost osebne kategorije v NER.', 'ha': "Suna ganin Motion is one of the essence of coagnitive abilities of many forms of life, amma, gane and fahimci move in text bai zama wani aikin sauki ba. Da wannan, a bayan ka gane abubuwa masu motsi cikin harshen asimi ba ta zama mai zartar da kawai kuma amma yana da amfani ga mafiya kyau ga fahimta harshen asili. Ga wannan takarda, Munã nuna wata motsi na Taganin Motion Entity (MET) dõmin Mu gane abubuwa wanda ke tafiyar da cikin wani matsayi, da amfani da danne-Motion-in-Text (LiMiT) don ya yi amfani da shirin yin shirin da kuma ana ƙayyade motel. Sa'an nan kuma muna goyyar da wata hanyowa na daban dõmin ya rarraba fasalin ayuka da misãlai na MET daga azãba mai tsanani da sauri dõmin ya kyautata aikin misalin mu. Kuma Munã halatar da fassarar da ke nuna cewa masu motsi, hususann, abun cikin tafiyar da ke amfani da aikin sunan-Entity Recognition (NER). Ga ƙarshe, Munã bãyar da wani anayyari wa masu husũma masu haɗi da mazaunin mutane na cikin NER da abubuwa wanda ke tafiyar da shi, wanda yana mai girma ga gyarawa ga fasalin na mutane na cikin NER.", 'bo': 'རྒུལ་སྤྱོད་རྟོགས་ནི་མི་ཤེས་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཅིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མི་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་རྩོལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང ད་དུང་མཐུན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་ཡོད་པའི་སྒུལ་སྒྲིག་ཅིག་ངོས་འཛིན་པ་དེ་ལས་དཀའ་ངལ་མེད་པར། མ་རྐྱེན་པས་ནུས་པ་ས འོག་གི་ཤོག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དབྱིབས་ཀྱིས་སྒུལ་སློང་ཆོས་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་པ། Finally, we present an analysis for the special occurrence of the person category in NER and animate entities in motion. This significantly improves the classification performance for the person category in NER.'}
{'en': 'User Memory Reasoning for Conversational Recommendation', 'ar': 'ذاكرة المستخدم التفكير المنطقي للتوصية المحادثة', 'fr': 'Raisonnement de la mémoire utilisateur pour la recommandation conversationnelle', 'pt': 'Raciocínio da memória do usuário para recomendação de conversação', 'es': 'Razonamiento de la memoria del usuario para la recomendación conversacional', 'ja': '会話推奨のためのユーザーメモリ推論', 'zh': '言荐者用户记推理', 'hi': 'संवादी सिफारिश के लिए उपयोगकर्ता स्मृति तर्क', 'ru': 'Пользовательская память Обоснование для разговорной рекомендации', 'ga': 'Cuimhne Úsáideora Réasúnaíocht le Moladh Comhrá', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი მეხსიერების მიზეზი პარაციონალური შემწყვებისთვის', 'hu': 'Felhasználói memória A beszélgetési ajánlás indokolása', 'el': 'Λόγος μνήμης χρήστη για σύσταση συνομιλίας', 'kk': 'Сөйлейтін таңдау үшін пайдаланушының жады себебі', 'it': "Motivazione della memoria dell'utente per la raccomandazione di conversazione", 'lt': 'Naudotojo atminties motyvas konversacinei rekomendacijai', 'mk': 'Причина за меморијата на корисникот за препорака за конверзација', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ മെമ്മറി വായിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Alasan Memori Pengguna untuk Rakomendasi Perbualan', 'mt': 'Raġuni tal-Memorja tal-Utent għar-Rakkomandazzjoni Konversazzjonali', 'no': 'Reaksjon for brukarminne for samtaletilrådd', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн Memory Reason for Conversational Recommendation', 'ro': 'Motivarea memoriei utilizatorului pentru recomandarea conversațională', 'pl': 'Użytkownik pamięci powód rekomendacji konwersacyjnej', 'sr': 'Razlog uspomene korisnika za razgovor preporuke', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජකය මතකය හේතුව සංවාද ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'so': 'Sameynta xusuusta ee la talinta', 'sv': 'Användarminne Motivering för konversationsrekommendation', 'ta': 'பேச்சு பரிந்துரைக்கான பயனர் நினைவகம் வாசிப்பது', 'ur': 'مکالمانی سفارش کے لئے کارساز مہمانی رائونڈ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Lí do ký ức người dùng cho lời khuyên đối thoại', 'bg': 'Обосновка на паметта на потребителя за препоръка за разговор', 'de': 'User Memory Gründe für Conversational Recommendation', 'nl': 'Redenen van het gebruikersgeheugen voor een conversatie', 'da': 'Brugerhukommelse Årsag til samtaleanbefaling', 'id': 'User Memory Reasoning for Conversational Recommendation', 'sw': 'Msomano wa Kumbukumbu kwa Mapendekezo ya mazungumzo', 'ko': '세션 추천 사용자 기억 추리', 'tr': 'Mix Radio', 'sq': 'Arsyeja e kujtesës së përdoruesit për rekomandimin konversacional', 'af': 'Gebruiker Geheue Redigeerder vir Gespraak Aanvaring', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Օգտագործողի հիշողության պատճառը հաղորդակցման համար', 'az': 'Qonuşma Qurğuları üçün İstifadəçi Yadını Reason', 'hr': 'Razlog sjećanja korisnika za razgovornu preporuku', 'ca': "Motivació de la memòria de l'usuari per la recomanació conversacional", 'cs': 'Uživatelská paměť Důvody pro konverzační doporučení', 'fa': 'دلیل حافظه کاربر برای توصیح گفتگوی', 'bn': 'কথোপকথন পরামর্শের জন্য ব্যবহারকারীর মেমরি পাঠ করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Kasutaja mälu põhjendus vestlussoovituse jaoks', 'bs': 'Razlog uspomene korisnika za razgovor preporuke', 'fi': 'Käyttäjämuistin perustelut keskustelusuositukselle', 'jv': 'Mix Radio', 'sk': 'Razlog uporabniškega pomnilnika za priporočilo za pogovor', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'סיבה לזיכרון משתמש למלצת שיחה', 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་གི་སྤྲོད་བརྗོད་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དྲན་འཛིན་རྒྱུ་མཚན'}
{'en': 'We study an end-to-end approach for conversational recommendation that dynamically manages and reasons over users’ past (offline) preferences and current (online) requests through a structured and cumulative user memory knowledge graph. This formulation extends existing state tracking beyond the boundary of a single dialog to user state tracking (UST). For this study, we create a new Memory Graph (MG)-Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus called MGConvRex with 7K+ human-to-human role-playing dialogs, grounded on a large-scale user memory bootstrapped from real-world user scenarios. MGConvRex captures human-level reasoning over user memory and has disjoint training / testing sets of users for zero-shot (cold-start) reasoning for recommendation. We propose a simple yet expandable formulation for constructing and updating the MG, and an end-to-end graph-based reasoning model that updates MG from unstructured utterances and predicts optimal dialog policies (eg recommendation) based on updated MG. The prediction of our proposed model inherits the graph structure, providing a natural way to explain policies. Experiments are conducted for both offline metrics and online simulation, showing competitive results.', 'ar': 'ندرس نهجًا شاملاً للتوصية بالمحادثة الذي يدير بشكل ديناميكي وتفسير التفضيلات السابقة (غير المتصلة) والطلبات الحالية (عبر الإنترنت) من خلال مخطط معرفة ذاكرة المستخدم المنظم والتراكمي. تعمل هذه الصيغة على توسيع تعقب الحالة الموجودة خارج حدود مربع حوار واحد لتعقب حالة المستخدم (UST). في هذه الدراسة ، قمنا بإنشاء رسم بياني جديد للذاكرة (MG) - مجموعة توصيات محادثة متوازية تسمى MGConvRex مع 7K + حوارات لعب الأدوار من إنسان إلى إنسان ، تستند إلى ذاكرة مستخدم واسعة النطاق تم تمهيدها من سيناريوهات مستخدم في العالم الحقيقي. تلتقط MGConvRex الاستدلال على مستوى الإنسان على ذاكرة المستخدم ولديها مجموعات تدريب / اختبار منفصلة من المستخدمين لمنطق إطلاق النار (البداية الباردة) للتوصية. نقترح صياغة بسيطة لكنها قابلة للتوسيع لبناء وتحديث MG ، ونموذج تفكير قائم على الرسم البياني من البداية إلى النهاية يقوم بتحديث MG من الأقوال غير المنظمة ويتنبأ بسياسات الحوار المثلى (مثل التوصية) بناءً على MG المحدث. يرث توقع نموذجنا المقترح بنية الرسم البياني ، مما يوفر طريقة طبيعية لشرح السياسات. يتم إجراء التجارب لكل من المقاييس غير المتصلة بالإنترنت والمحاكاة عبر الإنترنت ، مما يُظهر نتائج تنافسية.', 'fr': "Nous étudions une approche de bout en bout pour la recommandation conversationnelle qui gère et raisonne dynamiquement les préférences passées (hors ligne) et les demandes actuelles (en ligne) des utilisateurs grâce à un graphique de connaissances de la mémoire utilisateur structuré et cumulé. Cette formulation étend le suivi d'état existant au-delà de la limite d'un dialogue unique au suivi de l'état utilisateur (UST). Pour cette étude, nous créons un nouveau corpus parallèle Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation appelé MGConvrex avec plus de 7 000 boîtes de dialogue de jeu de rôle interhumain, basé sur une mémoire utilisateur à grande échelle amorcée à partir de scénarios utilisateur réels. MGConvrex capture le raisonnement au niveau humain sur la mémoire de l'utilisateur et dispose d'ensembles de formation/test disjoints d'utilisateurs pour le raisonnement zéro (démarrage à froid) pour recommandation. Nous proposons une formulation simple mais extensible pour construire et mettre à jour le MG, ainsi qu'un modèle de raisonnement basé sur des graphiques de bout en bout qui met à jour MG à partir d'énoncés non structurés et prédit des politiques de dialogue optimales (par exemple, recommandation) sur la base de MG mis à jour. La prédiction de notre modèle proposé hérite de la structure graphique, offrant ainsi une façon naturelle d'expliquer les politiques. Les expériences sont menées à la fois pour des mesures hors ligne et des simulations en ligne, montrant des résultats compétitifs.", 'es': 'Estudiamos un enfoque integral para la recomendación conversacional que administra y razona dinámicamente las preferencias pasadas (fuera de línea) y las solicitudes actuales (en línea) de los usuarios a través de un gráfico de conocimiento de la memoria del usuario estructurado y acumulativo. Esta formulación amplía el seguimiento del estado existente más allá del límite de un solo diálogo al seguimiento del estado del usuario (UST). Para este estudio, creamos un nuevo corpus paralelo de Memory Graph (MG) - Recomendación conversacional llamado MGConvrex con más de 7K diálogos de juego de roles de persona a persona, basado en una memoria de usuario a gran escala iniciada desde escenarios de usuarios del mundo real. MGConvrex captura el razonamiento a nivel humano sobre la memoria del usuario y tiene conjuntos de entrenamiento/pruebas disjuntos de usuarios para el razonamiento de recomendación cero (arranque en frío). Proponemos una formulación simple pero ampliable para construir y actualizar el MG, y un modelo de razonamiento basado en gráficos de extremo a extremo que actualiza MG de enunciados no estructurados y predice políticas de diálogo óptimas (por ejemplo, recomendación) basadas en MG actualizados. La predicción de nuestro modelo propuesto hereda la estructura gráfica, lo que proporciona una forma natural de explicar las políticas. Se realizan experimentos tanto para métricas fuera de línea como para simulación en línea, que muestran resultados competitivos.', 'pt': 'Estudamos uma abordagem de ponta a ponta para recomendação de conversação que gerencia e raciocina dinamicamente sobre as preferências anteriores (offline) e solicitações atuais (online) dos usuários por meio de um gráfico de conhecimento de memória do usuário estruturado e cumulativo. Esta formulação estende o rastreamento de estado existente além do limite de um único diálogo para rastreamento de estado do usuário (UST). Para este estudo, criamos um novo corpus paralelo de Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation chamado MGConvRex com mais de 7K de diálogos de interpretação de pessoa para pessoa, baseados em uma memória de usuário em larga escala inicializada a partir de cenários de usuário do mundo real. O MGConvRex captura o raciocínio em nível humano sobre a memória do usuário e possui conjuntos de treinamento/teste de usuários separados para raciocínio de tiro zero (inicialização a frio) para recomendação. Propomos uma formulação simples, mas expansível para construir e atualizar o MG, e um modelo de raciocínio baseado em grafos de ponta a ponta que atualiza o MG a partir de enunciados não estruturados e prevê políticas de diálogo ótimas (por exemplo, recomendação) com base no MG atualizado. A previsão do nosso modelo proposto herda a estrutura do gráfico, fornecendo uma maneira natural de explicar as políticas. São realizados experimentos tanto para métricas offline quanto para simulação online, mostrando resultados competitivos.', 'ja': '私たちは、構造化された累積的なユーザーメモリナレッジグラフを通じて、ユーザーの過去（オフライン）の好みと現在（オンライン）の要求を動的に管理し、理由を説明する、会話的推奨のためのエンドツーエンドのアプローチを研究しています。 この処方は、単一のダイアログの境界を超えて既存の状態トラッキングをユーザー状態トラッキング（ UST ）に拡張します。 この研究では、現実のユーザーシナリオからブートストラップされた大規模なユーザーメモリに基づいて、7 K +人間間のロールプレイングダイアログを備えたMGConvRexと呼ばれる新しいメモリグラフ（ MG ）-会話的推奨パラレルコーパスを作成します。 MGConvRexは、ユーザーメモリ上の人間レベルの推論をキャプチャし、推奨のためのゼロショット（コールドスタート）推論のためのユーザーの不整合トレーニング/テストセットを備えています。 MGの構築と更新のためのシンプルでありながら拡張可能な定式化と、非構造化発話からMGを更新し、更新されたMGに基づいて最適なダイアログポリシー（例えば、推奨）を予測するエンドツーエンドのグラフベースの推論モデルを提案する。 提案されたモデルの予測は、グラフ構造を継承し、ポリシーを説明する自然な方法を提供します。 オフラインメトリクスとオンラインシミュレーションの両方で実験を行い、競争力のある結果を示します。', 'zh': '臣等考一端到端之对荐,当以结构化积用户记知图谱动理用户往(离线)偏好(在线)请。 此公式以见状踪迹于单边之外用户与境外之 (UST)。 于是创新记图(MG) - 荐并行语料库,谓之MGConvRex,有7K +人角色扮演对,基于真实世界用户大用户内存。 MGConvRex因用户内存获人推理,并有不交之用户训练/试集,以行零发(冷启动)推理以荐之。 建一简而广公式以构新MG,及图形之端而推理模型,从非结构化语而新MG,因新MG之至策(如荐)。 我们说的模样的测量继承了图形结构,给了一种自然的解释。 拟实验离线指标在线,以示争竞。', 'hi': 'हम संवादी सिफारिश के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड दृष्टिकोण का अध्ययन करते हैं जो गतिशील रूप से एक संरचित और संचयी उपयोगकर्ता स्मृति ज्ञान ग्राफ के माध्यम से उपयोगकर्ताओं की पिछली (ऑफ़लाइन) प्राथमिकताओं और वर्तमान (ऑनलाइन) अनुरोधों का प्रबंधन और कारण है। यह सूत्रीकरण उपयोगकर्ता राज्य ट्रैकिंग (यूएसटी) के लिए एक एकल संवाद की सीमा से परे मौजूदा राज्य ट्रैकिंग का विस्तार करता है। इस अध्ययन के लिए, हम एक नया मेमोरी ग्राफ (एमजी) बनाते हैं - संवादी सिफारिश समानांतर कॉर्पस जिसे MGConvRex कहा जाता है, जिसमें 7K + मानव-से-मानव भूमिका निभाने वाले संवाद होते हैं, जो वास्तविक दुनिया के उपयोगकर्ता परिदृश्यों से बड़े पैमाने पर उपयोगकर्ता मेमोरी बूटस्ट्रैप पर आधारित होते हैं। MGConvRex उपयोगकर्ता स्मृति पर मानव-स्तरीय तर्क को कैप्चर करता है और सिफारिश के लिए शून्य-शॉट (कोल्ड-स्टार्ट) तर्क के लिए उपयोगकर्ताओं के असंयुक्त प्रशिक्षण / परीक्षण सेट है। हम एमजी के निर्माण और अद्यतन करने के लिए एक सरल अभी तक विस्तार योग्य सूत्रीकरण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और एक एंड-टू-एंड ग्राफ-आधारित तर्क मॉडल जो असंरचित कथनों से एमजी को अपडेट करता है और अपडेट किए गए एमजी के आधार पर इष्टतम संवाद नीतियों (जैसे सिफारिश) की भविष्यवाणी करता है। हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल की भविष्यवाणी ग्राफ संरचना को विरासत में मिलती है, जो नीतियों की व्याख्या करने का एक प्राकृतिक तरीका प्रदान करती है। ऑफ़लाइन मैट्रिक्स और ऑनलाइन सिमुलेशन दोनों के लिए प्रयोग किए जाते हैं, जो प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем сквозной подход к рекомендации разговора, который динамически управляет и объясняет прошлые (офлайн) предпочтения пользователей и текущие (онлайн) запросы с помощью структурированного и кумулятивного графика знаний о пользовательской памяти. Эта формулировка распространяет существующее отслеживание состояния за пределы одного диалога на отслеживание состояния пользователя (UST). Для этого исследования мы создаем новый параллельный корпус Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation под названием MGConvRex с 7K+ ролевыми диалогами между людьми, основанный на масштабной пользовательской памяти, загруженной из реальных пользовательских сценариев. MGConvRex фиксирует рассуждения на уровне человека в отношении пользовательской памяти и имеет разрозненные обучающие/тестирующие наборы пользователей для нулевых рассуждений (холодный запуск) для рекомендации. Мы предлагаем простую, но расширяемую формулировку для построения и обновления MG, а также сквозную модель рассуждений на основе графов, которая обновляет MG из неструктурированных высказываний и прогнозирует оптимальные диалоговые политики (например, рекомендации) на основе обновленных MG. Прогнозирование предлагаемой нами модели унаследовало структуру графика, обеспечив естественный способ объяснения политики. Эксперименты проводятся как для офлайн-метрик, так и для онлайн-моделирования, показывая конкурентные результаты.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar chur chuige ceann-go-deireadh maidir le moladh comhrá a bhainistíonn go dinimiciúil roghanna úsáideoirí (as líne) san am atá caite agus iarratais reatha (ar líne) trí ghraf eolas cuimhne úsáideora struchtúrtha agus carnach. Síneann an foirmiú seo rianú stáit atá ann cheana féin thar theorainn aon dialóige amháin chuig rianú staid úsáideora (UST). Don staidéar seo, cruthaímid Corpas Comhthreomhar nua ar a dtugtar MGConvRex ar Ghraf Cuimhne (MG) nua ar a dtugtar MGConvRex le dialóga rólghlacadh 7K+ duine-go-duine, bunaithe ar chuimhne úsáideora ar scála mór atá bunaithe ar chásanna úsáideora sa saol fíor. Gabhann MGConvRex réasúnaíocht ar leibhéal an duine thar chuimhne an úsáideora agus tá tacair oiliúna/tástála dí-chomhpháirteach úsáideoirí le haghaidh réasúnaíocht náid (tosú fuar) le moladh. Molaimid foirmliú simplí ach inleathnaithe chun an MG a thógáil agus a nuashonrú, agus samhail réasúnaíochta bunaithe ar ghraif ó cheann go ceann a nuashonraíonn MG ó chainteanna neamhstruchtúrtha agus a thuar na beartais dialóige is fearr (m.sh. moladh) bunaithe ar MG nuashonraithe. Tá struchtúr na ngraif mar oidhreacht ag tuar ár múnla molta, rud a thugann bealach nádúrtha chun polasaithe a mhíniú. Déantar turgnaimh le haghaidh méadrachta as líne agus ionsamhlúchán ar líne, a léiríonn torthaí iomaíocha.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε μια ολοκληρωμένη προσέγγιση για τη σύσταση συνομιλίας που διαχειρίζεται δυναμικά και αιτιολογεί τις προηγούμενες (εκτός σύνδεσης) προτιμήσεις των χρηστών και τα τρέχοντα (διαδικτυακά) αιτήματα μέσω ενός δομημένου και σωρευτικού γραφήματος γνώσης μνήμης χρηστών. Αυτή η διατύπωση επεκτείνει την παρακολούθηση υφιστάμενης κατάστασης πέρα από τα όρια ενός ενιαίου διαλόγου στην παρακολούθηση κατάστασης χρήστη. Για τη μελέτη αυτή, δημιουργούμε ένα νέο Παράλληλο Σώμα Σύσταση Συζητήσεων με 7διαλόγους ανθρώπινου-ανθρώπινου ρόλου, βασισμένο σε μια μεγάλης κλίμακας μνήμη χρήστη που εκκινείται από σενάρια πραγματικού κόσμου. Το συλλαμβάνει τον συλλογισμό ανθρώπινου επιπέδου πέρα από τη μνήμη του χρήστη και έχει χωριστά σύνολα εκπαίδευσης/δοκιμών χρηστών για τη λογική μηδενικής βολής (ψυχρής εκκίνησης) για σύσταση. Προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά επεκτάσιμη διατύπωση για την κατασκευή και την ενημέρωση του και ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο λογικής βασισμένο σε γραφήματα που ενημερώνει το από μη δομημένες εκφράσεις και προβλέπει βέλτιστες πολιτικές διαλόγου (π.χ. σύσταση) βασισμένες σε ενημερωμένες. Η πρόβλεψη του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου κληρονομεί τη δομή του γραφήματος, παρέχοντας έναν φυσικό τρόπο για να εξηγήσουμε τις πολιτικές. Τα πειράματα διεξάγονται τόσο για μετρήσεις εκτός σύνδεσης όσο και για προσομοίωση σε απευθείας σύνδεση, δείχνοντας ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα.', 'hu': 'Egy end-to-end megközelítést tanulmányozunk a beszélgetési ajánlásokhoz, amely dinamikusan kezeli és indokolja a felhasználók múltbeli (offline) preferenciáit és aktuális (online) kéréseit strukturált és kumulatív felhasználói memória ismeretgrafikonon keresztül. Ez a képlet kiterjeszti a meglévő állapotkövetést egyetlen párbeszédablak határain túl a felhasználói állapot követésére (UST). Ehhez a tanulmányhoz létrehozunk egy új Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation párhuzamos korpuszt MGConvRex nevű 7K+ ember-ember szerepjáték párbeszédekkel, amelyek egy nagyméretű felhasználói memóriára épülnek, amely valós felhasználói forgatókönyvekből indult. Az MGConvRex emberi szintű érvelést rögzít a felhasználói memória felett, és külön képzési / tesztelési készletekkel rendelkezik a felhasználók nulla lövés (hideg indítás) indokolására. Javasolunk egy egyszerű, mégis bővíthető formulát az MG felépítéséhez és frissítéséhez, valamint egy end-to-end gráf alapú érvelési modellt, amely frissíti az MG strukturálatlan kimondásokról és optimális párbeszédpolitikákat (pl. ajánlást) előrejelzi a frissített MG alapján. Javasolt modellünk előrejelzése örökli a grafikonszerkezetet, ami természetes módot biztosít a politikák magyarázatára. Kísérleteket végeznek offline mutatók és online szimulációk esetében, amelyek versenyképes eredményeket mutatnak.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევსწავლოთ კონტრაციონალური რეკუმენტაციისთვის გადასწავლობა, რომელიც დინამიკურად მომხმარებლის წინასწავლის (offline) პროგრამეტრების და მიმდინარე (online) პროგრამეტრების და მიმდინარე ამ ფორმულაციაში ერთი დიალოგის მიზედან მსგავსი სტატუსის შენახვა (UST) სტატუსაციას გაფართება. ამ სწავლებისთვის ჩვენ შექმნა ახალი მეხსიერი გრაფი (MG) - პარალელი კოპორსს, რომელიც სახელი MGConvRex, 7K+ ადამიანის პროლის თავისწავლა დიალოგიებით, რომელიც გამოიყენებელი მეხსიერების გადატანა, რომელიც რეალური მსოფლი MGConvRex მომხმარებლის მეხსიერების განმავლობაზე ადამიანის დონეზე არსებობს და მომხმარებლის განმავლობაში არსებობს მომხმარებლის განმავლობაში/ტესტის კონფიგურაციაში არსებობს ( ჩვენ მუშაობით მარტივი, მაგრამ უფრო გაფართლებელი ფორმაცია, რომელიც MG-ს კონტრუქტურაცია და განახლება, და დასაწყებელი გრაფიკური განახლებელი მოდელი, რომელიც განახლება MG-ს არსტრუქტურაციული სიტყვების ჩვენი მოდელის წარმოდგენება გრაფიკური სტრუქტურას მივიღებს, რომელიც პოლიტიკური განახსნა მიზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზება. ექსპერიმენტები იქნება ორივე ფონლინური მეტრიკაში და online სიმულაციისთვის, რომელიც კონკენტებური შედეგების ჩვენება.', 'lt': "We study an end-to-end approach for conversational recommendation that dynamically manages and reasons over users' past (offline) preferences and current (online) requests through a structured and cumulative user memory knowledge graph.  Ši formuluotė išplečia esamą būsenos sekimą už vieno dialogo ribų iki naudotojo būsenos sekimo (UST). For this study, we create a new Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus called MGConvRex with 7K+ human-to-human role-playing dialogs, grounded on a large-scale user memory bootstrapped from real-world user scenarios.  MGConvRex gauna žmogaus lygmens pagrįstumą dėl naudotojo atminties ir turi naudotojų mokymo ir (arba) bandymų rinkinius, skirtus rekomendacijai pagrįsti nuliniu (šalto paleidimo) pagrįstumu. We propose a simple yet expandable formulation for constructing and updating the MG, and an end-to-end graph-based reasoning model that updates MG from unstructured utterances and predicts optimal dialog policies (eg recommendation) based on updated MG.  Mūsų pasiūlyto modelio prognozė paveldo grafikos struktūrą ir suteikia natūralų būdą paaiškinti politiką. Eksperimentai atliekami tiek už interneto ribų esančioms metrinėms medžiagoms, tiek simuliuojant internetu, rodantys konkurencinius rezultatus.", 'kk': 'Біз пайдаланушылардың өткен (offline) параметрлерін және назардағы (online) сұрауларын құрылған және кумулятты пайдаланушылардың жады білім графикасы арқылы динамикалық түрде басқару және себептерін басқару үшін аяқтау жа Бұл формулация бір диалогтың шегінен артық күйді қадағалау (UST) үшін пайдаланушының күйін қадағалау үшін қосылады. Бұл зерттеу үшін біз жаңа жады жады график (MG) құрамыз - MGConvRex деп аталатын параллель корпус, 7K+ адамдарға және адамдарға роль ойнататын диалогтармен, шын әлемдегі пайдаланушылардың сценариясынан алып тастаған үлкен масштабтағы па MGConvRex пайдаланушының жады арқылы адамдық деңгейінің сезімін түсіндіреді және мәлімет үшін нөл- шоу (тез бастау) сезімі үшін пайдаланушылардың оқыту/сынау жиындарына б Біз MG құрылып жаңарту мен жаңарту үшін қарапайым және кеңейтілетін формулацияны жұмыс істейміз, графикалық аяқталу үлгісіне негізделген рационализация үлгісін жаңарту үлгісін және жаңарту үлгісіне негізделген оптимал диал Біздің келтірілген моделіміздің бағдарламасы графикалық құрылғысын орындайды, саясаттарды түсіндіру үшін табиғдарлық жолын береді. Желіден тыс метрикалық және онлайн симуляциясы үшін тәжірибелер жасалған, әртүрлі нәтижелерді көрсетеді.', 'it': "Studiamo un approccio end-to-end per la raccomandazione conversazionale che gestisce e spiega dinamicamente le preferenze passate (offline) degli utenti e le richieste attuali (online) attraverso un grafico strutturato e cumulativo della conoscenza della memoria utente. Questa formulazione estende il monitoraggio dello stato esistente oltre il limite di una singola finestra di dialogo al monitoraggio dello stato utente (UST). Per questo studio, creiamo un nuovo corpus parallelo Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation chiamato MGConvRex con 7K+ dialoghi di ruolo umano-umano, basato su una memoria utente su larga scala bootstrap da scenari utente reali. MGConvRex cattura il ragionamento a livello umano sulla memoria dell'utente e dispone di gruppi di formazione / test disgiunti di utenti per il ragionamento zero-shot (avviamento a freddo) per raccomandazione. Proponiamo una formulazione semplice ma espandibile per la costruzione e l'aggiornamento della MG, e un modello di ragionamento end-to-end basato su grafici che aggiorna MG da dichiarazioni non strutturate e prevede politiche di dialogo ottimali (es. raccomandazione) basate sulla MG aggiornata. La previsione del modello proposto eredita la struttura del grafico, fornendo un modo naturale per spiegare le politiche. Vengono condotti esperimenti sia per metriche offline che per simulazioni online, mostrando risultati competitivi.", 'mk': 'Студираме крај-крај пристап за конверзационална препорака која динамично менаџира и причинува поради преференциите на корисниците во минатото (надвор од линија) и тековните (онлајн) барања преку структуриран и кумулативен граф на знаење на корисничката меморија. Оваа формулација го проширува постојаното следење на состојбата надвор од границата на еден дијалог до следење на состојбата на корисникот (UST). For this study, we create a new Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus called MGConvRex with 7K+ human-to-human role-playing dialogs, grounded on a large-scale user memory bootstrapped from real-world user scenarios.  MGConvRex го прифаќа размислувањето на човеково ниво околу корисничката меморија и има опреми за обука/тестирање на корисниците за размислување со нула (ладен старт) за препорака. Ние предложуваме едноставна, но проширена формулација за изградба и ажурирање на MG, и модел на размислување базиран на граф од крај до крај кој го ажурира MG од неструктурирани изрази и предвидува оптимални дијалошки политики (np. препорака) базиран на ажуриран MG. Предвидувањето на нашиот предложен модел ја наследува структурата на графот, обезбедувајќи природен начин да се објасни политиката. Експериментите се спроведуваат за метрика надвор од линија и онлајн симулација, покажувајќи конкурентни резултати.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari pendekatan akhir-akhir untuk rekomendasi perbualan yang dinamik mengelola dan alasan atas keutamaan (luar talian) masa lalu pengguna dan permintaan semasa (online) melalui graf pengetahuan memori pengguna struktur dan kumulatif. Formulasi ini memperluas pengesan keadaan yang wujud diluar sempadan dialog tunggal ke pengesan keadaan pengguna (UST). Untuk kajian ini, kami mencipta Graf Memori (MG) baru - Corpus paralel Recommendation Conversational corpus yang dipanggil MGConvRex dengan dialog permainan peran manusia-manusia 7K+, didasarkan pada memori pengguna skala besar bootstrapped dari skenario pengguna dunia nyata. MGConvRex menangkap alasan-aras manusia atas ingatan pengguna dan mempunyai set latihan/ujian tidak bersatu pengguna untuk alasan 0-shot (permulaan-sejuk) untuk rekomendasi. Kami cadangkan bentuk mudah tetapi boleh dikembangkan untuk membina dan kemaskini MG, dan model alasan berasaskan graf akhir-akhir yang kemaskini MG dari ungkapan tidak terstruktur dan meramalkan kebijakan dialog optimal (cth. rekomendasi) berasaskan MG kemaskini. Ramalan model yang diusulkan kita mewarisi struktur graf, menyediakan cara biasa untuk menjelaskan polisi. Eksperimen dilakukan untuk metrik luar talian dan simulasi online, menunjukkan hasil kompetitif.', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw approċċ minn tarf għal tarf għal rakkomandazzjoni ta’ konverżjoni li jimmaniġġja b’mod dinamiku u r-raġunijiet fuq il-preferenzi tal-imgħoddi (offline) tal-utenti u t-talbiet attwali (onlajn) permezz ta’ grafika strutturata u kumulattiva tal-għarfien tal-memorja tal-utenti. Din il-formulazzjoni testendi t-traċċar tal-istat eżistenti lil hinn mill-limitu ta’ djalogu wieħed għat-traċċar tal-istat tal-utent (UST). For this study, we create a new Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus called MGConvRex with 7K+ human-to-human role-playing dialogs, grounded on a large-scale user memory bootstrapped from real-world user scenarios.  MGConvRex jaqbad ir-raġunament fil-livell tal-bniedem dwar il-memorja tal-utent u għandu settijiet ta’ taħriġ/ittestjar tal-utenti mhux konġunti għar-raġunament b’użu żero (startjar kiesaħ) għar-rakkomandazzjoni. Aħna nipproponu formulazzjoni sempliċi iżda espansibbli għall-bini u l-a ġġornament tal-MG, u mudell ta’ raġunament ibbażat fuq grafika minn tmiem sa tmiem li jaġġorna l-MG minn dikjarazzjonijiet mhux strutturati u jipprevedi politiki ta’ djalogu ottimali (eż. rakkomandazzjoni) ibbażati fuq MG aġġornat. It-tbassir tal-mudell propost tagħna jintiret l-istruttura tal-grafika, li tipprovdi mod naturali biex jiġu spjegati l-politiki. Jitwettqu esperimenti kemm għall-metriċi offline kif ukoll għas-simulazzjoni onlajn, li juru riżultati kompetittivi.', 'mn': 'Бид хэрэглэгчийн өнгөрсөн (offline) сонголтуудыг, одоогийн (online) талаар бүтээгдэхүүн болон нийлүүлэгдэх санааны мэдлэг графикийн аргаар хөгжүүлэх зөвлөлтийн тайлбарын төгсгөл хүрээний төгсгөл болон төгсгөл хүрээний арга Энэ томъёо нь нэг диалогын хил хязгаарын гадна оршиж буй байр сууриллагааг хэрэглэгчийн байр сууриллагаа (UST) руу шилжүүлнэ. Энэ судалгаанд бид нэг шинэ Memory Graph (MG) бий болгож байна. Дэлхийн хэрэглэгчийн хувилбараас гарсан том хэмжээний хэрэглэгчийн санах санамжлалтын хувилбар дээр MGConvRex гэдэг параллел корпус бий болгож байна. MGConvRex хэрэглэгчийн санамж дээр хүн төрөлхтний урьдчилан хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой болсон бөгөөд зөвшөөрөлтийн шалгалтын шалгалтын тулд хэрэглэгчийн сургалт/шалгалтын багцуудыг Бид MG-г бүтээж, шинэчлэхийн тулд энгийн боловч нэмэгдэж чадахгүй томъёо, график дээр төгсгөлд суурилсан утгын загвар, MG-г бүтээгдэхүүнгүй хэлбэрээс нэмэгдүүлж, шинэчлэгдсэн MG-н үндсэн эерэг диалог бодлого (жишээ нь зөвлө Бидний санал өгсөн загварын тодорхойлолт нь график бүтцийг авч, бодлого тайлбарлахын тулд байгалийн арга хангалттай. Офлайн метрик болон онлайн шинэчлэл дээр туршилт хийгддэг. Дөрвөлжийн үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Vi studerer ein slutttilnærming for konvertering som dynamisk styrer og grunner over brukarar siste (fråkopla) innstillingar og gjeldande (online) forespørsmål gjennom eit strukturert og kumulativ brukaramnetningsgraf. Denne formelen utvidar eksisterande tilstandspunkt over grensen på ein enkelt dialogvindauge til brukarstattrekking (UST). For denne studien lager vi eit nytt minningsgraf (MG) - Samtale tilrådd parallell korpus kalla MGConvRex med 7K+ menneske-til-menneske rollespilleringsdialogar, basert på ein stor skala minne på brukaren som startar frå verkeleg brukarsenario. MGConvRex får opp menneskelivårasjon over brukarminne og har forskjellige opplæring/testsett av brukarar for nullsatt (kallstart) rasjonar for anbefaling. Vi foreslår eit enkelt, men utvidbare formasjon for konstruksjon og oppdatering av MG-en, og ein grafikkbasert rasjonsmodul som oppdaterer MG frå utstrukturerte uttaler og foreslår optimal dialogpolitikk (eksempel anbefaling) basert på oppdaterte MG. Forhåndsvising av vår foreslått modell får grafstrukturen, og tilbyr ein naturleg måte å forklare politikk. Eksperiment vert gjennomført for både fråkopla metrikar og nettsimulering, viser konkurentære resultat.', 'ro': 'Studiem o abordare end-to-end pentru recomandarea conversațională care gestionează dinamic și analizează preferințele anterioare (offline) ale utilizatorilor și solicitările curente (online) printr-un grafic structurat și cumulativ de cunoaștere a memoriei utilizatorilor. Această formulă extinde urmărirea stării existente dincolo de limita unui dialog unic la urmărirea stării utilizatorului (UST). Pentru acest studiu, am creat un nou corpus paralel Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation denumit MGConvRex cu 7K+ dialoguri de joc de rol uman-uman, bazat pe o memorie de utilizator la scară largă pornită din scenarii utilizatorilor din lumea reală. MGConvRex capturează raționamentul la nivel uman asupra memoriei utilizatorului și are seturi de instruire / testare separate de utilizatori pentru raționamentul zero-shot (pornire rece) pentru recomandare. Propunem o formulă simplă, dar extensibilă pentru construirea și actualizarea MG și un model de raționament end-to-end bazat pe grafice, care actualizează MG de la afirmațiile nestructurate și prezice politici optime de dialog (de exemplu recomandarea) bazate pe MG actualizat. Predicția modelului propus moștenește structura grafică, oferind o modalitate naturală de explicare a politicilor. Experimentele sunt efectuate atât pentru măsurătorile offline, cât și pentru simularea online, prezentând rezultate competitive.', 'pl': 'Badamy kompleksowe podejście do rekomendacji konwersacyjnych, które dynamicznie zarządza i uzasadnia przeszłe (offline) preferencje użytkowników i bieżące (online) żądania za pomocą zorganizowanego i skumulowanego wykresu wiedzy pamięci użytkownika. Formuła ta rozszerza śledzenie istniejącego stanu poza granicę jednego dialogu dialogowego do śledzenia stanu użytkownika (UST). Do tego badania stworzyliśmy nowy korpus pamięci (MG, Conversational Recommendation Parallel Corpus o nazwie MGConvRex z 7K+ dialogami odgrywania roli człowieka do człowieka, oparty na dużej skali pamięci użytkownika bootstrapowanej z rzeczywistych scenariuszy użytkowników. MGConvRex przechwytuje rozumowanie na poziomie ludzkim w pamięci użytkownika i posiada rozłączne zestawy treningowe/testujące użytkowników dla uzasadnienia zero-shot (zimny start) dla rekomendacji. Proponujemy prostą, ale rozszerzalną formułę do budowy i aktualizacji MG oraz kompleksowy model rozumowania oparty na wykresie, który aktualizuje MG z nieustrukturyzowanych wypowiedzi i przewiduje optymalne zasady dialogu (np. rekomendacje) w oparciu o zaktualizowane MG. Przewidywanie naszego proponowanego modelu dziedziczy strukturę wykresu, zapewniając naturalny sposób na wyjaśnienie polityki. Eksperymenty są przeprowadzane zarówno dla wskaźników offline, jak i symulacji online, pokazując konkurencyjne wyniki.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo krajnji do kraja pristup konverzacijskom preporukom koji dinamički upravlja i razlogom preko preferencija korisnika prošlosti (offline) i trenutnih (online) zahteva kroz strukturirani i kumulativni grafik znanja memorije korisnika. Ova formulacija proširi postojeće praćenje država izvan granice jednog dijaloga do praćenja država korisnika (UST). Za ovu studiju, stvaramo novi Memory Graph (MG) - paralelni korpus za razgovor koji se zove MGConvRex sa 7K+ dijalogima koji igraju ljudske i ljudske uloge, temeljeni na velikoj skali uspomene korisnika koji su izbacili iz scenarija korisnika realnog svijeta. MGConvRex uhvati razgovor na ljudskom nivou nad uspomenom korisnika i ima raspoređene obuke/testiranje seta korisnika za razloge za preporuku nula pucnjave (hladno početak). Predlažemo jednostavnu, ali proširenu formulaciju za konstrukciju i aktualizaciju MG-a, i model razumljivosti na grafiku kraja na kraju koji aktualizuje MG iz neostrukturnih reči i predviđa optimalnu politiku dijaloga (npr. preporuku) na osnovu aktualiziranog MG-a. Predviđanje našeg predloženog model a naslijeđuje grafsku strukturu, pružajući prirodan način da objasnimo politiku. Eksperimenti su provedeni za offline metrike i online simulaciju, pokazujući konkurentne rezultate.', 'si': 'අපි අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවස්ථාවක් ඉගෙන ගත්තා වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂකයාගේ අතීතය (අ මෙම සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ ස්ථිතිය පරීක්ෂණය (UST) විසින් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ සංවාදයක් සීමා මේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා, අපි අළුත් මතක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් (MG) නිර්මාණය කරනවා - සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පස් කියලා MGConvRex කියලා 7K+ මිනිස්සුන්ගෙන් මිනිස්සුන MGConvRex පාවිච්චි මතකය ගැන මිනිස්සු ස්තූතිය හේතුවක් අල්ලගන්නවා ඒ වගේම පාවිච්චි ස්ථානය/පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සුන්ධ අපි MG නිර්මාණය සහ අවසානය කරන්න සරල නමුත් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් සූදානම් සහ අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා MG නිර්මාණය අපේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථනා කරපු මෝඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංස්ථානය පිළිගන්නවා, ප්\u200dරාකෘතික විද අෆ්ලායින් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් සහ අන්ලයින් සිම්යුලේෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙනවා, තර්ජනය ප්\u200dර', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு முடிவு முடிவு செயல்பாட்டை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம் அது பயனரின் முந்தைய முன்னுரிமைகள் மற்றும் தற்போதைய முன்னுரிமைகள் மேலாண்மை மற்றும்  Name இந்த ஆராய்ச்சிக்காக, நாம் ஒரு புதிய நினைவு வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் - உரையாடல் பரிந்துரைப்பு இணைய கோர்ப்பு எம்ஜிகான்வ்ரெக்ஸ் என்று சொல்லப்பட்டது 7K+ மனித முதல் விள MGConvRex பயனர் நினைவகத்திற்கு மனித நிலையின் காரணங்களை பிடித்து பரிந்துரைகளுக்கு காரணமாக பயிற்சி/சோதனையின் அமைப்புகளை வெட்டுக MG உருவாக்குதல் மற்றும் புதுப்பிக்கும் முடிவு அடிப்படையான காரணங்கள் மாதிரி முறைமையை புதுப்பி எங்கள் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வரைப்படத்தை உருவாக்குகிறது, கொள்கைகளை விளக்க ஒரு இயல்பான வழி வழங்குக தோல்வியான முடிவுகளை காண்பிக்கும் விளைவுகளை இருவரும் இணைய மெட்ரிக்கும் பாவனையிலும் சோதனைகள் செய்யப்பட்', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ശുപാര്\u200dശ്യയ്ക്കുള്ള അവസാനത്തിനുള്ള അവസാന പരിശോധനത്തിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ കഴിഞ്ഞുപോയ (ഓഫ്ലൈന്\u200d) മുന്\u200dഗണ ഈ ഫോര്\u200dമാലേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്കിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഒരു ഡയലോഗിന്റെ അതിര്\u200dക്കുമീതെ നിലവിലുള ഈ പഠനത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മെമ്മറി ഗ്രാഫ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു- ആഭ്യസംഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് എംജികോണ്\u200dവ്രെക്സ് എന്ന് പേരിട്ട് 7K+ മനുഷ്യര്\u200d മുതല്\u200d മനുഷ എംജികോണ്\u200dവ്രെക്സ് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ മെമ്മറിയെക്കുറിച്ച് മനുഷ്യരുടെ നില വാക്കുകളെ പിടികൂടുന്നു. ശുപാര്\u200dശിക്കുന്നതിനുള് എംജി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും പുതുക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിനായി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. എംജി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാത്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ പ്രവചനം ഗ്രാഫ് ഘടനയുടെ അവകാശികളാകുന്നു. നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കാ ഓഫ്ലൈന്\u200d മെറ്റ്രിക്കും ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സിമുലേഷനും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണി', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک پایان و پایان طریقہ کی تلاش کی ہے جو ایک ساختہ اور جمعیت یادگار یادگار علم گراف کے ذریعہ سے ڈینامی طریقہ سے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ This formulation extends existing state tracking beyond the boundary of a single dialog to user state tracking (UST). اس مطالعہ کے لئے ہم نے ایک نوی مہمانی گراف (MG) پیدا کیا ہے - مGConvRex کے نام سے مہمانی ریکس کا مطالعہ پارالٹ کرپوس بنایا ہے، جس میں 7K+ انسان سے انسان کی رول-بازی دیالوگر کے ساتھ ہے، جو ایک بڑی اسکیل یوسٹر کی مہمانی بوٹ پر بنیاد رکھا ہے جو واقعی-دنیا MGConvRex کارساز یاد کے ذریعے انسان سطح کا منطق پکڑتا ہے اور صفر-شٹ (ٹھنڈ-شروع) کے ذریعے کارساز کی تطارین/امتحان سٹ کے لئے منطقی ہے. ہم ایک ساده مگر پھیلانے والی فرمول کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں MG بنانے اور آدھیرنے کے لئے، اور ایک آخر-to-end گراف-to-end گراف-based reasoning model جو MG کو غیر ساختہ کلمات سے آدھیر دیتا ہے اور اچھی ڈالیلوگ پولیس (جیسے پیشنهاد) کو آدھیرا ہوا MG پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے. ہمارے پیشنهاد مدل کی پیش بینی گراف ساختار کے وارث ہوتی ہے، سیاست کی توضیح کے لئے ایک طبیعی طریقہ پیدا کرتی ہے۔ آزمائش اوفولاین میٹریک اور آنلاین سیمولیٹ کے لئے ہے، مصاحب نتیجے دکھائے جاتے ہیں.', 'so': 'Waxaynu baranaynaa qaab ugu dhammaad dhammaad ah ee talo-bixinta, in dhaqsiyo lagu maamulo iyo sababo ku saabsan horumarinta isticmaalayaasha (offline) iyo horumarinta (online) ee isticmaalayaasha iyo codsiga aqoonta xusuusta ee dhisan oo cudud leh. Muuqashadan wuxuu u fidiyaa wadiiqooyinka joogta oo ka baxsan xuduudaha daaqada kaliya ee isticmaalaha dowladda tracking (UST). Tan waxbarashadan, waxaynu sameynaa xarunta cusub ee xasuusta (MG) - Talobixinta isbarbar ah oo la yidhaahdo MGConvRex with 7K+ dialogues-role-human-to-human-to-play-dialogues, boosted on xusuusta badan oo isticmaalayaal ah oo ka buuxa scenarios-real-world-user. MGConvRex wuxuu qabsadaa darajada biniaadamka xusuusta isticmaalaha, wuxuuna qabanqaabiyay koobo isticmaalayaal ah waxbarasho/imtixaan si uu u jeedo nooca-shoot (qabow-start). Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal fudud oo weli ballaadhan oo u sahlan dhisidda iyo cusboonaysiinta MG, iyo model ku saabsan fasaxa ugu dambeeya ee ku cusboonaysa MG oo ka soo sawira hadallada a an la dhiseyn iyo waxaynu sii sheegnaa siyaasada dialogka optimal ah (eg recommendations) oo ku saleysan cusboonaysiinta MG. Aqoonta modelkeeni la soo jeeday wuxuu dhaxalsaday dhismaha sawirka, wuxuuna keenay qaab dabiiciga ah oo loo caddeeyo siyaasadaha. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu sameeyaa shabakada internetka iyo sidoo kale sameynta shabakadda, waxaana lagu tusaa resultada iskutallada ah.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar ett end-to-end-tillvägagångssätt för konversationsrekommendation som dynamiskt hanterar och resonerar över användares tidigare (offline) preferenser och aktuella (online) förfrågningar genom en strukturerad och kumulativ användarminneskunskapsgraf. Denna formulering utökar befintlig tillståndsspårning bortom gränsen för en enda dialogruta till användartillståndsspårning (UST). För denna studie skapar vi en ny Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallell korpus kallad MGConvRex med 7K + mänskliga rollspelsdialoger, baserade på ett storskaligt användarminne uppstart från verkliga användarscenarier. MGConvRex fångar resonemang på mänsklig nivå över användarminnet och har delade tränings / testuppsättningar av användare för noll-shot (kallstart) resonemang för rekommendation. Vi föreslår en enkel men utbyggbar formulering för att konstruera och uppdatera MG, och en end-to-end grafbaserad resonemodell som uppdaterar MG från ostrukturerade uttalanden och förutsäger optimala dialogpolicyer (t.ex. rekommendation) baserat på uppdaterad MG. Förutsägelsen av vår föreslagna modell ärver grafstrukturen, vilket ger ett naturligt sätt att förklara policyer. Experiment utförs för både offline-mätningar och online-simulering, vilket visar konkurrenskraftiga resultat.', 'uz': "Biz tashqi soʻzlar uchun tuzuvchi soʻzni o'rganamiz, oddiy foydalanuvchilar past (offline) parametrlarini boshqarish va sabablarni boshqarish va joriy (online) soʻzlarini yaratish va tuzuvchi foydalanuvchi xotira maʼlumot grafik orqali murojaat qiladi. Name Bu taʼminlov uchun, biz MGConvRex (MG) nomli muloqat xotira yangi xotira yaratimiz, boshqaruv soʻzlari 7K+ odamning boshqaruv muloqat oynalari bilan MGConvRex (7K+ oddiy o'ynash muloqat bilan boshlanadi, bu xabar foydalanuvchi xotira boshlanadi. Name We propose a simple yet expandable formulation for constructing and updating the MG, and an end-to-end graph-based reasoning model that updates MG from unstructured utterances and predicts optimal dialog policies (eg recommendation) based on updated MG.  Ko'rib chiqish modelimizning tasavvuri grafik struktureni arzuvchi bo'ladi va qoidalarni o'rganish asosiy yo'l qiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu phương pháp kết thúc cho các lời khuyên đối thoại được điều khiển theo một cách động tĩnh, và các lý do hơn cả những sở thích trước đây của người dùng (ngoại tuyến) và các yêu cầu hiện tại (trực tuyến) qua một đồ thị kiến thức người dùng tích đầy đủ cấu trúc. Phần bổ sung này mở rộng khả năng theo dõi trạng thái tồn tại vượt ra khỏi giới hạn của một hộp thoại cho việc theo dõi trạng thái người dùng (UST). Đối với nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi tạo ra một bộ đồ dữ liệu mới cho bộ nhớ tạm thời được gọi là MGconRex cùng với 7K+ chơi vai người sang người, dựa trên một bộ nhớ người dùng trên diện rộng, được khởi động từ viễn cảnh người dùng thực tế. Với mô tả mô tả trình độ người dùng trên bộ nhớ người dùng, nhặt nhạnh huấn luyện và thử nghiệm các bộ phận người dùng để tiến cử. Chúng tôi đề xuất một công trình đơn giản nhưng mở rộng để xây dựng và cập nhật máy thu phát triển, và một mô hình lập trình dựa trên đồ thị, kết thúc, cập nhật MG từ những phát biểu không xây dựng và dự đoán các chính sách thoại tối ưu dựa trên máy phát triển dự trữ dự án A. Dự đoán của mẫu đề xuất này thừa kế cấu trúc đồ thị, cung cấp một cách giải thích tự nhiên cho các chính sách. Các thí nghiệm được tiến hành cho cả các lượng tử ngoại tuyến và mô phỏng online, với kết quả cạnh tranh.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo krajnji do kraja pristup konverzacijskom preporukom koji dinamički upravlja i razlogom preko preferencija korisnika prošlosti (offline) i trenutnih (online) zahtjeva kroz strukturirani i kumulativni grafik znanja sjećanja korisnika. Ova formulacija proširi postojeće praćenje država izvan granice jednog dijaloga do praćenja država korisnika (UST). Za ovu studiju, stvorimo novi Memory Graph (MG) - paralelni korpus za razgovor koji se zove MGConvRex s 7K+ dijalogima koji igraju ljudske i ljudske uloge, temeljeni na velikoj mjeri sjećanja korisnika koji se izbaci iz scenarija korisnika realnog svijeta. MGConvRex uhvati razgovor na razini na ljudskom nivou nad sjećanjem korisnika i ima rasključene skupine korisnika obuke/testiranja za razloge za preporuku nula pucnjave (hladno početak). Predlažemo jednostavnu, ali proširenu formulaciju za konstrukciju i aktualizaciju MG-a i razumljivog modela na grafiku kraja do kraja koji aktualizira MG-a iz neostrukturnih izraza i predviđa optimalnu politiku dijaloga (npr. preporuku) na temelju updatiranog MG-a. Predviđanje našeg predloženog model a naslijeđuje strukturu grafika, pružajući prirodan način da objasnimo politiku. Eksperimenti su provedeni za offline metrike i online simulaciju, pokazujući konkurentne rezultate.', 'nl': "We bestuderen een end-to-end benadering voor conversatie aanbeveling die dynamisch beheert en redeneert over eerdere (offline) voorkeuren van gebruikers en huidige (online) verzoeken door middel van een gestructureerde en cumulatieve gebruikersgeheugen kennisgrafiek. Deze formulering breidt het bijhouden van bestaande status uit buiten de grens van een enkel dialoogvenster tot het bijhouden van gebruikersstatus (UST). Voor deze studie maken we een nieuw Memory Graph (MG) parallel corpus genaamd MGConvRex met 7K+ human-to-human rolplaying dialogen, gebaseerd op een grootschalig gebruikersgeheugen dat is opgestart uit real-world gebruikersscenario's. MGConvRex vangt redenering op menselijk niveau op over het gebruikersgeheugen en heeft disjoint training/test sets van gebruikers voor zero-shot (koude start) redenering voor aanbeveling. We stellen een eenvoudige maar uitbreidbare formulering voor voor het bouwen en bijwerken van de MG, en een end-to-end grafiek-gebaseerd redeneringsmodel dat MG bijwerkt van ongestructureerde uitingen en optimale dialoogbeleid voorspelt (bijv. aanbeveling) gebaseerd op bijgewerkte MG. De voorspelling van ons voorgestelde model erft de grafiekstructuur, wat een natuurlijke manier biedt om beleid uit te leggen. Experimenten worden uitgevoerd voor zowel offline statistieken als online simulatie, die concurrerende resultaten tonen.", 'bg': 'Изследваме подход от край до край за разговорска препоръка, който динамично управлява и мотивира предишните (офлайн) предпочитания на потребителите и текущите (онлайн) заявки чрез структурирана и кумулативна графика на познанията за потребителската памет. Тази формулировка разширява съществуващото проследяване на състоянието отвъд границата на един диалогов прозорец до проследяване на състоянието на потребителя (УСТ). За това проучване ние създаваме нов паралелен корпус с 7К+ диалози за ролева игра между човек и човек, основан на широкомащабна потребителска памет, стартирана от реални потребителски сценарии. Улавя разсъждения на човешко ниво над потребителската памет и има разделени тренировъчни/тестващи групи от потребители за нулев изстрел (студен старт) разсъждения за препоръка. Предлагаме проста, но разширяема формулировка за изграждане и актуализиране на МГ, както и модел на мислене край до край, базиран на графика, който актуализира МГ от неструктурирани изказвания и прогнозира оптимални диалогови политики (напр. препоръка) въз основа на актуализирани МГ. Прогнозирането на нашия предложен модел наследява структурата на графиката, осигурявайки естествен начин за обяснение на политиките. Провеждат се експерименти както за офлайн показатели, така и за онлайн симулация, показващи конкурентни резултати.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen einen End-to-End-Ansatz für Konversationsempfehlungen, der die früheren (Offline-) Präferenzen und aktuellen (Online-) Anfragen von Benutzern dynamisch verwaltet und anhand eines strukturierten und kumulativen User Memory Knowledge Graph begründet. Diese Formulierung erweitert die Bestandszustandsverfolgung über die Grenzen eines einzelnen Dialogs hinaus auf die Benutzerzustandsverfolgung (UST). Für diese Studie erstellen wir einen neuen Memory Graph (MG) mit dem Namen MGConvRex mit 7K+ Human-to-Human Rollenspiel Dialogen, basierend auf einem großen Benutzerspeicher, der aus realen Benutzerszenarien bootstrapt wurde. MGConvRex erfasst das Denken auf menschlicher Ebene über das Benutzergedächtnis und verfügt über getrennte Trainings-/Testsets von Benutzern für Zero-Shot (Kaltstart) Argumentation zur Empfehlung. Wir schlagen eine einfache, aber erweiterbare Formulierung für den Aufbau und die Aktualisierung des MG vor, und ein End-to-End graph-basiertes Argumentationsmodell, das MG von unstrukturierten Äußerungen aktualisiert und optimale Dialogrichtlinien vorhersagt (z.B. Empfehlung) basierend auf aktualisierten MG. Die Vorhersage unseres vorgeschlagenen Modells erbt die Graphenstruktur und bietet eine natürliche Möglichkeit, Richtlinien zu erklären. Experimente werden sowohl für Offline-Metriken als auch für Online-Simulationen durchgeführt, die wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse zeigen.', 'da': 'Vi studerer en end-to-end tilgang til samtaleanbefaling, der dynamisk administrerer og begrunder brugernes tidligere (offline) præferencer og aktuelle (online) anmodninger gennem en struktureret og kumulativ brugerhukommelse viden graf. Denne formulering udvider eksisterende tilstandssporing ud over grænsen for en enkelt dialog til brugertilstandssporing (UST). Til dette studie skaber vi en ny Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel korpus kaldet MGConvRex med 7K + menneske-til-menneske rollespil dialoger, baseret på en storstilet brugerhukommelse bootstrap fra virkelige brugerscenarier. MGConvRex indfanger menneskelige ræsonnementer over brugerhukommelsen og har splittede træning / test sæt af brugere til nul-shot (koldstart) ræsonnement til anbefaling. Vi foreslår en enkel, men udvidelig formulering til konstruktion og opdatering af MG, og en end-to-end grafbaseret ræsonnement model, der opdaterer MG fra ustrukturerede udtalelser og forudsiger optimale dialogpolitikker (f.eks. anbefaling) baseret på opdaterede MG. Forudsigelsen af vores foreslåede model arver grafstrukturen, hvilket giver en naturlig måde at forklare politikker på. Eksperimenter udføres for både offline målinger og online simulering, der viser konkurrencedygtige resultater.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari pendekatan akhir-akhir untuk rekomendasi konversasi yang dinamik mengelola dan alasan atas keutamaan (offline) pengguna masa lalu dan permintaan (online) saat ini melalui grafik pengetahuan memori pengguna yang struktur dan kumulatif. Formulasi ini memperluas pelacakan keadaan yang ada diluar batas dialog tunggal ke pelacakan keadaan pengguna (UST). Untuk studi ini, kami menciptakan sebuah Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus bernama MGConvRex dengan 7K+ dialog permainan peran manusia-manusia, berdasarkan memori pengguna skala besar bootstrapped dari skenario pengguna dunia nyata. MGConvRex captures human-level reasoning over user memory and has disjoint training/testing sets of users for zero-shot (cold-start) reasoning for recommendation.  Kami mengusulkan formulasi sederhana namun dapat diperbesar untuk membangun dan memperbaharui MG, dan model alasan berbasis grafik akhir-akhir yang memperbaharui MG dari ungkapan tidak terstruktur dan memprediksi kebijakan dialog optimal (contohnya rekomendasi) berdasarkan MG yang terbaru. Prediksi model yang diusulkan kita mewarisi struktur grafik, menyediakan cara alami untuk menjelaskan kebijakan. Eksperimen dilakukan untuk metrik offline dan simulasi online, menunjukkan hasil kompetitif.', 'ko': '우리는 단계별 세션 추천 방법을 연구했다. 이 방법은 구조화되고 누적된 사용자 기억 지식도, 동적 관리와 사용자의 과거(오프라인) 선호와 현재(온라인) 요구를 추리한다.이 방정식은 기존 상태 추적을 개별 대화 상자의 경계를 벗어나 사용자 상태 추적(UST)으로 확장합니다.이 연구에서 우리는 새로운 기억도(MG) - 대화 추천 평행 자료 라이브러리인 MGCONVERX를 만들었는데 그 중에서 7K+인과 사람 역할 연기 대화상자를 포함하고 실제 세계 사용자 장면에서의 대규모 사용자 기억 안내를 바탕으로 한다.MGCONVERX는 사용자 기억에 대한 인간적 추리를 포획하고 교차하지 않는 사용자 교육/테스트 집합을 가지고 있으며 추천하는 제로 트리거(콜드 스타트) 추리에 사용된다.우리는 간단하지만 확장 가능한 공식을 제시하여 MG를 구성하고 갱신하며, 이 모델은 비구조화된 언어에서 MG를 갱신하고, 갱신된 MG를 바탕으로 최상의 대화 전략을 예측한다. (예: 추천)우리가 제시한 모델의 예측은 도형 구조를 계승하여 정책을 해석하는 데 자연스러운 방식을 제공했다.오프라인 지표와 온라인 시뮬레이션을 실험해 경쟁력 있는 결과를 보였다.', 'fa': 'ما روش پایان و پایان را برای توصیف گفتگو مطالعه می کنیم که با دینامیک مدیریت و دلایل در گذشته (خارج از خط) کاربران و درخواست\u200cهای جاری (آنلاین) از طریق یک گراف دانش حافظه کاربران ساخته و جمع شده است. این فرمول ردیابی وضعیت موجود فراتر از مرز یک محاوره به ردیابی وضعیت کاربر (UST) گسترش می\u200cدهد. برای این مطالعه، ما یک گراف حافظه جدید (MG) را ایجاد می\u200cکنیم. توصیح\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cای همراه با نام MGConvRex با محاورهای نقش\u200cبازی\u200cکننده\u200cی نقش\u200cهای انسان به\u200cانسان 7K+ بر اساس یک حافظه\u200cی حافظه\u200cی کاربر بزرگ از سیناریو\u200cهای کاربر جهانی واقعی پاره MGConvRex دلیل سطح انسان را بر حافظه کاربر می\u200cگیرد و مجموعه\u200cهای آموزش/آزمایش کاربر را برای دلیل\u200cهای پیشنهاد صفر (شروع سرد) برای تأکید می\u200cکند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم فرمول ساده\u200cای که قابل تغییر قابل توسعه برای ساختن و updating MG، و یک مدل دلیل توسعه\u200cای که قابل توسعه\u200cی گراف\u200cهای پایان به پایان می\u200cرسد که MG را از سخنرانی\u200cهای غیر ساخته\u200cشده آغاز می\u200cکند و سیاست\u200cهای گفتگوی optimal (م پیش\u200cبینی از مدل پیشنهاد ما ساختار گراف را وارث می\u200cکند و راه طبیعی برای توضیح سیاست می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cها برای متریک\u200cهای offline و شبیه\u200cسازی آنلاین انجام می\u200cشوند، نشان دادن نتایج رقابتی.', 'tr': "Ullançylaryň geçmişi (offline) tercihleri we häzirki (online) bir strukturly we kumulativy ulanylaryň yada grafiki bilen düzenleyen çykyşlar üçin soňra-soňra bir teklip öwrenýärdik. Bu formül bar durum gözlemegini ullançy Ullançy durum gözlemegine (UST) sahypalaryndan öňünde uzatýar Bu araşdyrma üçin, biz täze bir Memory Graph (MG) döredik. Qonuşmalar parallel korpus diýip atlandyrylýar. MGConvRex 7 K+ adama-ynsan rol oýnuna görkezilýän dialoglar we çykyş üstünde ullanýar. MGConvRex Ullançy ýagdaýynyň üstünde adam derejesi sebäplerini taýýarlar we arkalançy üçin 0-aty (sowuk başlangy) sebäpleri üçin üýtgetmek/testi gabdalýar. Biz MG'i düzenlemek we güncellemek üçin basit we katyp döredilebilir bir formülasy teklip edip, we grafda soňra baýlayan razylyg nusgasyna görýäris ki MG'i düzenlemeden täzeleştirip, we güncelleştirilmeýän MG'a daýran optimal dialog politikasyny (örän teklip) tahmin edip bilýäris. Biziň teklip eden nusganymyzyň önüşümi grafik strukturuny miras edip, tebigy ýagdaýlary düşündirmek üçin bir nusga berer. Döwletler hem offline metriýa hem online simulasyýa üçin edilýär, ýaryşykly netijeleri görkezilýär.", 'af': "Ons studeer 'n einde-na-einde toegang vir omskakelike aanbeveling wat dinamies bestuur en redes oor gebruikers se verlede (offline) voorkeure en huidige (online) versoeke deur 'n struktureerde en kumulatiewe gebruiker geheue kennis graf. Hierdie formulasie verbeter bestaande staat agtervolg buite die grens van 'n enkele dialoog na gebruiker staat agtervolg (UST). Vir hierdie studie skep ons 'n nuwe Geheue Graaf (MG) - Gepraatstellende Aanvaring parallele korpus genoem MGConvRex met 7K+ menslike-na-menslike rol-speel dialoog, gegrónd op 'n groot-skaal gebruiker geheue opstart van reël-wêreld gebruiker scenarios. MGConvRex vang mensvlak redening oor gebruiker geheue en het afsluit onderwerp/toets stelle van gebruikers vir nul-skoot (koue-begin) redering vir aanbeveling. Ons voorstel 'n eenvoudige nog uitbreidigbare formasie vir konstruksie en opdatering van die MG, en 'n einde-na-einde graafgebaseerde redemodel wat MG opdateer van onstruktureerde uitdrukkings en voorskou optimale dialoog beleid (bv. aanbevesting) gebaseer op opdateerde MG. Die voorskou van ons voorgestelde model beërf die graafstruktuur en verskaf 'n natuurlike manier om beleide te verduidelik. Eksperimente word gedoen vir beide offline metries en online simulasie, wat mededingsresultate vertoon word.", 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջ-վերջ մոտեցումը հաղորդակցման խորհուրդների համար, որը դինամիկ կերպով ղեկավարում է օգտագործողների անցյալի (անցանց) նախընտրությունների և ներկայիս (առցանց) խնդրանքների վերաբերյալ, օգտագործողների հիշողության կառուցվածքային և համա This formulation extends existing state tracking beyond the boundary of a single dialog to user state tracking (UST).  Այս ուսումնասիրության համար մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր Հիշողության Գրաֆ (MG) – Կարգադրական խորհուրդ զուգահեռ կորպուս, որը կոչվում է MGConRex 7K+ մարդկային-մարդկային դեր խաղալու համար, հիմնված մեծ մասշտաբ օգտագործողի հիշողության վրա, որը տեղադրվում է իրական աշխարհի օգտագործողների սցենարի MGConRex-ը վերցնում է մարդկային մակարդակի մտածողականությունը օգտագործողի հիշողության մասին և ունի օգտագործողների խառնաշարժ ուսուցման և փորձարկումների համակարգեր զրոյի (սառը սկիզբ) մտածողականության համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ, սակայն ընդլայնելի բանաձևություն MG-ի կառուցման և վերականգնման համար, և մի վերջ-վերջ գծագրի հիմնված մտածողության մոդել, որը վերականգնում է MG-ը անկառուցված արտահայտություններից և կանխատեսում է օպտիմալ պատկերացումների քաղաքականությունը (օրինակ խո Մեր առաջարկած մոդելի կանխատեսումը ժառանգում է գրաֆիկի կառուցվածքը, ապահովում է բնական միջոց քաղաքականության բացատրելու համար: Experiments are conducted for both offline metrics and online simulation, showing competitive results.', 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë një qasje nga fundi në fund për rekomandimin bisedimor që menaxhon dinamikisht dhe arsyeton mbi preferencat e kaluara (jashtë linje) të përdoruesve dhe kërkesat aktuale (në internet) nëpërmjet një grafiku të strukturuar dhe kumulativ të njohurive të kujtesës së përdoruesve. Kjo formulim zgjeron gjurmimin ekzistues të gjendjes përtej kufirit të një dialog të vetëm për gjurmimin e gjendjes së përdoruesit (UST). Për këtë studim, ne krijojmë një Graf të ri të Kujtimeve (MG) - Korpus paralel të rekomandimit konversational të quajtur MGConvRex me 7K+ dialoge të luajtjes së rolit njerëzor-njerëzor, bazuar në një kujtesë të madhe përdoruesi të bootstrapped nga skenarët e përdoruesve të botës reale. MGConvRex captures human-level reasoning over user memory and has disjoint training/testing sets of users for zero-shot (cold-start) reasoning for recommendation.  We propose a simple yet expandable formulation for constructing and updating the MG, and an end-to-end graph-based reasoning model that updates MG from unstructured utterances and predicts optimal dialog policies (eg recommendation) based on updated MG.  Parashikimi i modelit tonë të propozuar trashëgon strukturën e grafikut, duke ofruar një mënyrë natyrore për të shpjeguar politikat. Eksperimentet kryehen si për metrikat jashtë linje ashtu edhe për simulimin në internet, duke treguar rezultate konkurruese.', 'az': "Biz müzakirçilərin keçmişi (offline) seçimləri və a ğıllı (online) istəkləri ilə dinamik olaraq müzakirçilik tövsiyə üçün son-to-son tərzini təhsil edirik. Bu formül, mövcud durum izləməsini yalnız bir dialog ın sınırından uzaqlaşdırır (UST) istifadəçi durumu izləməsinə. Bu təhsil üçün yeni Memory Graph (MG) yaratdıq - MGConvRex adlı müzakirçi paralel korpusu 7K+ insan-və-insan rol-oyun dialogları ilə yaratdıq, həqiqətən dünya istifadəçi senaryoylarından çəkilmiş böyük ölçülü istifadəçi yaddaşlarının yaddaşlarını yükləndirdik. MGConvRex istifadəçi yaddaşları üzərində insan səviyyəsini dəyişdirir və sıfır-vuruş (soğuk-başlanğıç) dəyişiklik üçün istifadəçilərin dəyişiklik/sınama qurğularını dəyişdirir. Biz MG'yi inşa etmək və güncelləmək üçün basit, hətta genişləndirilə bilən bir formül təklif edirik, həmçinin grafik-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona-sona- Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərin tədbirimiz grafik strukturasını varis edir, siyasətləri a çıqlamaq üçün təbiətli bir yol verir. Həmçinin offline metrikləri və online simulasyonu üçün təcrübə edir, müəllif sonuçları göstərir.", 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীদের অতীতের (অফলাইন) পছন্দ এবং বর্তমান (অনলাইন) ব্যবহারকারী মেমরি জ্ঞান গ্রাফের মাধ্যমে ব্যবহারকারীদের কাছে একটি কাঠামো এবং কুমালিক ব্যবহারকারীর স এই ফর্মুলেশন ব্যবহারকারীর রাষ্ট্র ট্র্যাকিং এর সীমানার বাইরে বিদ্যমান রাষ্ট্র ট্র্যাকিং ব্যবহারকারীর সীমান এই গবেষণার জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন মেমোরি গ্রাফ (এমজি) - কথোপকথনের পরামর্শের প্যারাল কোর্পাস যার নাম এমজিকনভেরেক্স নামে ৭কে+ মানুষ-মানুষের ভূমিকা খেলার ডায়ালগের সাথে বিশা এমজিকনভ্রেক্স ব্যবহারকারীর মেমরির ব্যাপারে মানুষের মাধ্যমে যুক্তি তুলে ধরেছে এবং সুপারিশের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ/পরীক্ষার সেট ব্যবহারক আমরা এমজি নির্মাণ এবং আপডেট করার জন্য একটি সহজ এবং ব্যাপকভাবে প্রস্তাব করি, আর একটি শেষ পর্যন্ত গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক কারণ মডেল যা এমজি আপডেট করা ভাষা থেকে আপডেট করে এবং নতুন করে এমজি ভিত্তিক ভাষ আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী গ্রাফ কাঠামোর উত্তরাধিকারী হয়ে যায়, যা নীতি ব্যাখ্যা করার একটি প্র Experiments are conducted for both offline metrics and online simulation, showing competitive results.', 'ca': "We study an end-to-end approach for conversational recommendation that dynamically manages and reasons over users' past (offline) preferences and current (online) requests through a structured and cumulative user memory knowledge graph.  Aquesta formulació estén el seguiment d'estat existent més enllà de la frontera d'un únic diàleg fins al seguiment d'estat d'usuari (UST). Per aquest estudi, creem un nou gràfic de memòria (MG) - Recomendació paral·lel corpus anomenat MGConvRex amb diàlegs de jugament de paper entre humans i humans 7K+, basat en una memòria d'usuari a gran escala arrancada d'escenaris d'usuaris del món real. MGConvRex captura el raonament a nivell humà sobre la memòria d'usuari i té conjunts d'entrenaments/proves de descomposició d'usuaris per raonament de començament fred. Proposem una formulació simple però expandible per a construir i actualitzar el MG, i un model de raonament basat en gràfics de final a final que actualitza el MG de frases no estructuradas i prediu polítiques de diàleg óptims (per exemple recomanació) basats en MG actualitzat. The prediction of our proposed model inherits the graph structure, providing a natural way to explain policies.  Els experiments es fan tant per a la mètrica offline com per a la simulació en línia, mostrant resultats competitius.", 'cs': 'Studujeme end-to-end přístup pro konverzační doporučení, který dynamicky spravuje a odůvodňuje minulé (offline) preference uživatelů a aktuální (online) požadavky prostřednictvím strukturovaného a kumulativního grafu znalostí uživatelské paměti. Tato formulace rozšiřuje sledování stávajícího stavu za hranice jednoho dialogu na sledování stavu uživatele (UST). Pro tuto studii vytvoříme nový paměťový graf (MG, Konverzační doporučení paralelní korpus s názvem MGConvRex s 7K+ dialogy pro hraní rolí člověka, založený na rozsáhlé uživatelské paměti zaváděné z reálných uživatelských scénářů. MGConvRex zachycuje uvažování na lidské úrovni přes uživatelskou paměť a má rozdělené tréninkové/testovací sady uživatelů pro nulové (studený start) uvažování pro doporučení. Navrhujeme jednoduchou, ale rozšiřitelnou formulaci pro konstrukci a aktualizaci MG a komplexní model uvažování založený na grafech, který aktualizuje MG z nestrukturovaných výroků a předpovídá optimální dialogové politiky (např. doporučení) založené na aktualizovaném MG. Predikce našeho navrženého modelu zdědí strukturu grafu, což poskytuje přirozený způsob vysvětlení politik. Experimenty jsou prováděny jak pro offline metriky, tak pro online simulaci, které ukazují konkurenční výsledky.', 'et': 'Me uurime vestlussoovituste täielikku lähenemisviisi, mis dünaamiliselt haldab ja põhjendab kasutajate varasemaid (offline) eelistusi ja praegusi (online) päringuid struktureeritud ja kumulatiivse kasutajamälu teadmiste graafiku kaudu. See vorming laiendab olemasoleva oleku jälgimise ühe dialoogi piirist kasutaja oleku jälgimisele (UST). Selle uuringu jaoks loome uue Mälugraafiku (MG) - Vestlussoovituse paralleelse korpuse nimega MGConvRex koos 7K+ inimese rollimängu dialoogidega, mis põhineb suuremahulisel kasutajamälul, mis on kasutatud reaalmaailma kasutajastsenaariumidest. MGConvRex jäädvustab inimese tasandil mõtlemise üle kasutaja mälu ja sellel on eraldiseisvad kasutajate treeningu/testimise komplektid null-shot (külmkäivitus) mõtlemiseks soovituste jaoks. Pakume välja lihtsa, kuid laiendatava sõnastuse MG konstrueerimiseks ja uuendamiseks ning lõpust lõpuni graafikul põhineva arutlusmudeli, mis värskendab MG struktureerimata väljenditest ja prognoosib optimaalset dialoogipoliitikat (nt soovitus), mis põhineb uuendatud MG-l. Meie kavandatud mudeli prognoosimine pärib graafilise struktuuri, pakkudes loomulikku viisi poliitikate selgitamiseks. Eksperimente viiakse läbi nii offline mõõdikute kui ka online simulatsiooni jaoks, näidates konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi.', 'bs': 'Proučavamo krajnji do kraja pristup konverzacijskom preporukom koji dinamički upravlja i razlogom preko preferencija (offline) korisnika i trenutnih (online) zahtjeva kroz strukturirani i kumulativni grafik znanja sjećanja korisnika. Ova formulacija proširi postojeće praćenje država izvan granice jednog dijaloga do praćenja država korisnika (UST). Za ovu studiju stvaramo novi grafik Memory Grafa (MG) - paralelni korpus za razgovor koji se zove MGConvRex sa 7K+ dijalogima koji igraju ljudske i ljudske uloge, temeljeni na velikoj skali sjećanja korisnika koji se izbaci iz scenarija korisnika realnog svijeta. MGConvRex uhvati razgovor na ljudskom nivou nad sjećanjem korisnika i ima rasključene skupine korisnika obuke/testiranja za razloge za preporuku nula pucnjave (hladno početak). Predlažemo jednostavnu, ali proširenu formulaciju za konstrukciju i aktualizaciju MG-a, i model razumljivosti na grafiku kraja na kraju koji aktualizira MG-a iz neostrukturnih izraza i predviđa optimalnu politiku dijaloga (npr. preporuku) na temelju updatiranog MG-a. Predviđanje našeg predloženog model a naslijeđuje grafsku strukturu, pružajući prirodan način da objasnimo politiku. Eksperimenti su provedeni za offline metrike i online simulaciju, pokazujući konkurentne rezultate.', 'sw': 'Tunafuatilia mbinu ya mwisho ya mapendekezo ya mazungumzo kwamba huongoza na sababu za upendeleo wa watumiaji wa zamani (mtandaoni) na maombi ya sasa (mtandaoni) kupitia grafu ya maarifa ya kumbukumbu iliyoanzishwa na yenye ufanisi mkubwa. This formulation extends existing state tracking beyond the boundary of a single dialog to user state tracking (UST).  Kwa utafiti huu, tunatengeneza Graph mpya ya Kumbukumbu (MG) - Mapendekezo ya mazungumzo yanayofanana na makampuni yanayoitwa MGConvRex na mazungumzo ya jukumu la binadamu kwa ajili ya watu 7K+ kuelekea kwenye mazungumzo ya kibinadamu, iliyoandaliwa na kumbukumbu kubwa ya mtumiaji ulioanzishwa kutoka kwenye eneo la watumiaji wa dunia halisi. MGConvRex anachukua hali ya juu ya kumbukumbu ya binadamu na imekuwa na mafunzo ya pamoja na majaribio ya watumiaji kwa kutumia risasi sifa (mwanzo wa baridi) kwa sababu ya mapendekezo. Tunazipendekeza ubunifu rahisi lakini unapangezeka kwa ajili ya ujenzi na upya mpya wa MG, na modeli yenye msingi wa ufahamu wa mwisho wa picha inayoleta upya MG kutoka kwenye hotuba zisizo na kutabiri sera za mazungumzo mazuri (mfano mapendekezo) kwa kutumia MG mpya mpya mpya. Utabiri wa muundo wetu wa pendekezo unarithi muundo wa ramani, na kutoa njia ya asili ya kuelezea sera. Majaribio yanafanywa kwa ajili ya mbinu za mtandaoni na simulizi za mtandaoni, zinaonyesha matokeo ya ushindani.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን የፍጻሜ ጥያቄ እና የመጨረሻ ጥያቄ ለመጠየቅ በተጠቃሚዎች ያለፈውን (የኦፎلائን) ምርጫዎች እና የአሁኑን (የመስመር) ምርጫዎች በተመሠረቱና በተመሳሳይ የተጠቃሚ የማስታወሻ እውቀት ግራፍ እንዲያስተክሉ እናስተምር፡፡ This formulation extends existing state tracking beyond the boundary of a single dialog to user state tracking (UST).  For this study, we create a new Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus called MGConvRex with 7K+ human-to-human role-playing dialogs, grounded on a large-scale user memory bootstrapped from real-world user scenarios.  MGConvRex በሚጠቃሚ ማስታወሻ ላይ የሰው ደረጃን ማስታወቂያ ይያዛል፡፡ MG-ን ከማንሻለል እና ለማሻሻል እና ለማሻሻሻል እና የመጨረሻ የክፍል ክፍተት ሞዴል ማሻሻል እና ማሻሻለል ከማይታወስ ንግግር እና ማሻሻለል የማስታወቂያውን የdialog ፖሊሲ (ምሳሌ ምሳሌ) በማሻሻሻል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የፊርክ ሥርዓት ይወርሳል፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤቶችን ለማሳየት የመስመር ሚትሪክ እና የመረብ ምሳሌ ይደረጋል፡፡', 'fi': 'Tutkimme kokonaisvaltaista lähestymistapaa keskustelusuositukseen, joka hallitsee ja perustelee dynaamisesti käyttäjien aiempia (offline) mieltymyksiä ja nykyisiä (online) pyyntöjä jäsennellyn ja kumulatiivisen käyttäjätietokaavion avulla. Tämä muotoilu laajentaa olemassa olevan tilan seurannan yhden valintaikkunan rajan ulkopuolelle käyttäjän tilan seurantaan (UST). Tätä tutkimusta varten luotiin uusi Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus nimeltään MGConvRex, jossa on 7K+ ihmisestä ihmiseen -roolipelidialogeja, jotka perustuvat laajamittaiseen käyttäjämuistiin, joka on varustettu todellisista käyttäjäskenaarioista. MGConvRex tallentaa ihmisen tason päättelyn käyttäjän muistin yli ja sillä on erillisiä harjoitus-/testaussarjoja nollalaukauksen (kylmäkäynnistyksen) päättelyä varten suositukseksi. Ehdotamme yksinkertaista mutta laajennettavaa formulaatiota MG:n rakentamiseen ja päivittämiseen sekä end-to-end graafiseen päättelymalliin, joka päivittää MG:n strukturoimattomista lauseista ja ennustaa optimaaliset dialogipolitiikat (esim. suositus) päivitetyn MG:n pohjalta. Ehdotetun mallin ennuste perii graafisen rakenteen, joka tarjoaa luonnollisen tavan selittää politiikkoja. Kokeita tehdään sekä offline-mittareille että online-simuloinnille, jotka osoittavat kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé gadoh aturan end-to-end kanggo tukang mrangkang conversion nggawe jinalaman sistem dadi offline nggawe Peringatan pengaturan karo nggawe online Wurung iki perusahaan langgambar aturan sing gawe ngubah perusahaan dialoog tek gawe Daerah Langgalih (UST). Daftar iné, kita sampeyan nggawe sistem sistem Anyar MGSonVRex tentang peringatan pangan-uwong ing mempernik nganggep sistem sing gak tentang/ujian Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan seneng kesempil gak bukasar seneng nggawe nggawe lan atualizasi MG, lan nganggep sistem end-to-end nggawe geraksi model sing bisa atualizasi MG tentang kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan gak nggawe tarjamahan lan geulakno dumadhi winih sing titimbal dumadhi nggawe MG nggawe Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing nggawe barang nggawe sistem graf, iso nggawe modus pribadi kanggo ngerasar politik. Gebudhakan langkung dibenakake nggo rerakno sistem offline karo semulasi online, iso nggambar barang sing perusahaan', 'ha': "Tuna karatun wata hanyoyi ta ƙari zuwa ga shawarar da ke shawarar da za'a yi amfani da su kanana ana yin tafiyar da kwanan bayan masu amfani da (offline) masu shawarar (offline) da kuma masu so yanzu (Online) don a sami grafi na fassarar da masanin da ake amfani da shi da aka samar da kuma ya cumulative. Wannan ƙayyade yana shimfiɗa shiryoyin halin da ke gaba ɗaya beyond grensa na zauren zauren akwatin bayani guda zuwa shiryin halin mai amfani da (UNT). Daga wannan aikin kwarari, Munã halitta wata takardar Narrafi (MG) - Kayyardar da masu shawara da aka yi MGConvrex da zauren akwatin bayani na masu yin aiki na 7 K+ zuwa mutum, an bake a kan kumbar mai amfani da shi mai girma wanda aka riƙe daga fasario na mai amfani da shi. MGConvrex na kãma kima-daraja mai inganci wa mutum game da kumbar mai amfani da shi kuma ya raba shiryarwa/jarraba daidaita masu amfani da shi wa masu shawara wa sifuri (kwanan-fara) wa shawara. Tuna buɗe wani lokaci mai sauƙi kuma da ake shimfiɗe wa shirin ayuka na MG, da kuma a ƙari-bakin mazaɓa na rubutun rubutu wanda za'a samar da MG daga magana wanda ba'a tsare ba, kuma munã ƙidãya siyafan zauren zauren akwatin bayani (misali shawara) a kan yanda MG. Kayyar da misalin da aka buɗa, yana gãna matsayin grafi, kuma yana da wata hanya na natsi da za'a bayyana siyafa. Ana tafiyar jarrabo don metrics da samun motsi na ɗayan kwamfyuta da ke nuna matsalar masu motsi.", 'sk': 'Preučujemo pristop od konca do konca za pogovorna priporočila, ki dinamično upravlja in razloži pretekle (offline) preference uporabnikov in trenutne (online) zahteve prek strukturiranega in kumulativnega grafikona znanja o uporabniškem pomnilniku. Ta formulacija razširi sledenje obstoječemu stanju preko meje enega pogovornega okna na sledenje stanju uporabnika (UST). Za to študijo smo ustvarili nov vzporedni korpus Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation imenovan MGConvRex s 7K+ dialogi za igranje vlog med človekom in človekom, temelječimi na obsežnem uporabniškem pomnilniku, ki ga zagnati iz resničnih uporabniških scenarijev. MGConvRex zajema razmišljanje na človeški ravni preko uporabniškega pomnilnika in ima ločene nabore treningov/testiranja uporabnikov za razmišljanje brez strela (hladni zagon) za priporočilo. Predlagamo enostavno, vendar razširljivo formulacijo za konstrukcijo in posodobitev MG ter model razmišljanja, ki posodablja MG iz nestrukturiranih izgovorov in napoveduje optimalne dialogne politike (npr. priporočilo), ki temelji na posodobljenem MG. Napoved našega predlaganega modela podeduje strukturo grafov, ki zagotavlja naraven način pojasnjevanja politik. Izvedeni so eksperimenti za meritve brez povezave in spletno simulacijo, ki kažejo konkurenčne rezultate.', 'he': 'אנו לומדים גישה סוף-סוף למלצה שיחה שמנהלת דינמית וסיבות מעל העדיפות (מחוץ לשידור) של המשתמשים בעבר (מחוץ לשידור) ובבקשות הנוכחיות (באינטרנט) דרך גרף ידע מזכר משתמש מבוסס וקומולטיבי. התצורה הזאת מגבירה את מעקב המצב הנוכחי מעבר לגבול של דיאלוג אחד לאתר המצב המשתמש (UST). עבור המחקר הזה, אנחנו יוצרים גרף זיכרון חדש (MG) - המלצה שינותית קורפוס מקביל שנקרא MGConvRex עם 7K+ דיאלוגים משחק תפקידים אנושיים לאנושיים, מבוססים על זיכרון משתמש בקנה מידה גדולה מונע מתרחשים משתמשים בעולם האמיתי. MGConvRex תופס הגיון ברמה אנושית על זיכרון משתמש ויש לו קבוצות אימונים/בדיקות לא משותפים של משתמשים לגיון אפס (התחלה קרה) למלצה. אנו מציעים צורה פשוטה, אך אפשרית להתרחב, לבנייה ולעדכון את MG, ומודל הגיון מבוסס בגרף סוף-סוף שמעדכן MG מבטאות לא מבושלות ולחזות מדיניות דיאלוג אופטימיות (למשל המלצה) מבוססת על MG מעודכן. החזוי של המודל המוצע שלנו יורש את מבנה הגרף, מספק דרך טבעית להסביר מדיניות. ניסויים נוהלים גם למטריקה מחוץ לאינטרנט וגם לסימולציה באינטרנט, מראים תוצאות תחרותיות.', 'bo': "We study an end-to-end approach for conversational recommendation that dynamically manages and reasons over users' past (offline) preferences and current (online) requests through a structured and cumulative user memory knowledge graph. This formulation extends existing state tracking beyond the boundaries of a single dialog to user state tracking (UST). For this study, we create a new Memory Graph (MG) - Conversational Recommendation parallel corpus called MGConvRex with 7K+ human-to-human role-playing dialogs, grounded on a large-scale user memory bootstrapped from real-world user scenarios. MGConvRex ཡིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དྲན་ཚད་ལ་མི་མཐུན་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We propose a simple yet expandable formulation for constructing and updating the MG, and an end-to-end graph-based reasoning model that updates MG from unstructured utterances and predicts optimal dialog policies (eg recommendation) based on updated MG. ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་གིས་བཀོད་རིས་དང་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་གསལ་བ དྲ་བ་དང་དྲ་བ་དང་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྒེར་ཞུགས་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་གྲངས་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གྲ་སྒྲིག"}
{'en': 'Diverse and Non-redundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs', 'ar': 'استخلاص مجموعة إجابات متنوعة وغير مكررة على ضمان الجودة في المجتمع بناءً على DPPs', 'es': 'Extracción de conjuntos de respuestas diverso y no redundante en el control de calidad de la comunidad basado', 'pt': 'Extração de conjunto de respostas diversas e não redundantes no controle de qualidade da comunidade com base em DPPs', 'fr': "Extraction d'ensembles de réponses diversifiée et non redondante sur l'assurance qualité de la communauté basée sur des D", 'zh': '基于 DPP 社区 QA 多元且无冗余案集取', 'ja': 'DPPに基づくコミュニティQAの多様で非冗長な回答セット抽出', 'ru': 'Разнообразный и нерезервированный набор ответов на вопросы QA сообщества на основе DPPS', 'hi': 'DPPs के आधार पर समुदाय QA पर विविध और गैर-अनावश्यक उत्तर सेट निष्कर्षण', 'ga': 'Tacair Freagraí Éagsúla agus Neamhiomarcacha Eastóscadh ar QA Pobail bunaithe ar DPPanna', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული და არასწორი პასუხი დააყენება საზოგადოებო QA საზოგადოებო', 'hu': 'Különböző és nem redundáns válaszkészlet-kivonás DPP-k alapján a közösségi minőségi felelősségvállaláson', 'el': 'Διαφορετική και μη περιττή εξαγωγή συνόλου απαντήσεων σχετικά με την κοινοτική QS με βάση τα DPP', 'it': 'Estrazione di set di risposte diverse e non ridondanti sulla qualità comunitaria basata sui DPP', 'kk': 'Түрлі және қайталамаған жауап DPPs негіздеген QA бағдарламасына тарқату', 'lt': 'Įvairių ir nereikalingų atsakymų rinkinio ekstrakcija dėl Bendrijos kokybės vertinimo pagal DPP', 'mk': 'Различен и непотребен набор одговори за екстракција на QA на заедницата врз основа на DPP', 'ms': 'Setkan Pengekstraksi Jawapan Berberbeza dan Tidak Terredundant pada QA Komuniti berdasarkan DPP', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni tas-Sett ta’ Tweġibiet Diversi u Mhux Ħruġ fuq QA tal-Komunità bbażata fuq DPPs', 'mn': 'ДПП-ын үндсэн төрлийн QA дээр олон болон бусад хариултгүй хариулт', 'ml': 'ഡിപിപിപികളെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ കമ്മിറ്റി ക്യൂഎ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഉത്തരം അല്ലാത്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളും വ', 'no': 'Diverse og ikkje-redundant svar Vel utpakking på QA-fellesskapet basert på DPP', 'sr': 'Raznolikosti i nesredundantni odgovori postavljaju izvlačenje na QA zajednice na temelju DPP-a', 'ro': 'Extragere diversă și non-redundantă a setului de răspunsuri pe baza răspunsurilor comunitare bazate pe DPP', 'pl': 'Zróżnicowany i niezbędny zestaw odpowiedzi na społeczność w oparciu o DPP', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ නොප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය DPPs අධාරිත QA සමාජ QA සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සැකසුම', 'so': 'QA ku saleysan qofka DPPs', 'sv': 'Utdrag av olika och icke-redundanta svarssatser på gemenskapens QA baserat på DPP', 'ta': 'டிபிபிகளை அடிப்படையில் சார்ந்த சமுதாயத்தின் மீது வெளியேறுதலை அமை', 'ur': 'مختلف اور غیر ردundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Lý do cá nhân', 'bg': 'Разнообразен и неизлишен набор от отговори извличане на информация за качеството на Общността въз основа на ДЗД', 'da': "Uddrag af forskellige og ikke-overflødige svarsæt på fællesskabskvalitetsvurderinger baseret på DPP'er", 'hr': 'Različiti i neodređeni odgovor postavi izvlačenje na QA zajednice na temelju DPP-a', 'nl': "Diverse en niet-redundante extractie van antwoordsets op basis van DPP's", 'ko': 'DPPs 기반 커뮤니티 Q&amp;A 다양성 비중복 답안 세트 추출', 'fa': 'پاسخ\u200cهای مختلف و غیرقابل تغییر داده\u200cای بر QA اجتماعی بر اساس DPPs تنظیم کنید', 'sw': 'Majibu ya tofauti na isiyopungua Mitengo kwa Jamii ya QA kwa msingi wa chama cha DPP', 'tr': "Çeşitli we gaýd edilmedik jogaby DPP'e daýan", 'af': 'Verskeie en nie- rooi antwoord stel uitpakking op gemeenskap QA gebaseer op Dpi', 'sq': 'Përgjigjet e ndryshme dhe jo të tepërta vendosin ekstraksion mbi QA të komunitetit bazuar në DPP', 'id': 'Diverse and Non-redundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs', 'am': 'Diverse and Non-redundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs', 'de': 'Diverse und nicht redundante Extraktion von Antwortsätzen auf Basis von DPPs in der Community', 'hy': 'Diverse and Non-redundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs', 'az': "Dpi'l톛r톛 dayanan m칲xt톛lif v톛 qeyri-m칲xt톛lif cavab", 'bn': 'ডিপিপির উপর ভিত্তিক কমিউনিটি কিউএ বিভিন্ন এবং না কমিউনিটি উত্তর নির্ধারণ করুন', 'cs': 'Rozmanité a neredundantní extrakce sady odpovědí na základě komunitních kontrol kvality založených na DPP', 'et': 'Mitmekesine ja mitte üleliigne vastusekomplekt kogukonna kvaliteedi tagamise kohta andmekaitseprogrammide põhjal', 'bs': 'Različiti i neodređeni odgovor postavi izvlačenje na QA zajednice na temelju DPP-a', 'ca': 'Extracció diversa i no redundant del conjunt de respostes sobre la QA comunitaria basada en DPP', 'fi': 'Monipuolinen ja ei-tarpeeton vastausjoukko poimitus yhteisön laadunvarmistuksesta DPP:n perusteella', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Diverse and Non-redundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs', 'sk': 'Raznolikost in nepresežen nabor odgovorov na podlagi zagotavljanja kakovosti Skupnosti na podlagi DPP', 'bo': 'Diverse and non-redundant Answer Set Extraction on Community QA based on DPPs'}
{'en': 'In community-based question answering (CQA) platforms, it takes time for a user to get useful information from among many answers. Although one solution is an answer ranking method, the user still needs to read through the top-ranked answers carefully. This paper proposes a new task of selecting a diverse and non-redundant answer set rather than ranking the answers. Our method is based on determinantal point processes (DPPs), and it calculates the answer importance and similarity between answers by using BERT. We built a dataset focusing on a Japanese CQA site, and the experiments on this dataset demonstrated that the proposed method outperformed several baseline methods.', 'ar': 'في الأنظمة الأساسية للإجابة على الأسئلة المستندة إلى المجتمع (CQA) ، يستغرق المستخدم وقتًا للحصول على معلومات مفيدة من بين العديد من الإجابات. على الرغم من أن أحد الحلول هو طريقة ترتيب الإجابات ، إلا أن المستخدم لا يزال بحاجة إلى قراءة الإجابات ذات الترتيب الأعلى بعناية. تقترح هذه الورقة مهمة جديدة لاختيار مجموعة إجابات متنوعة وغير زائدة عن الحاجة بدلاً من ترتيب الإجابات. تعتمد طريقتنا على عمليات النقطة المحددة (DPPs) ، وتحسب أهمية الإجابة والتشابه بين الإجابات باستخدام BERT. لقد أنشأنا مجموعة بيانات تركز على موقع CQA ياباني ، وأظهرت التجارب على مجموعة البيانات هذه أن الطريقة المقترحة تفوقت على عدة طرق أساسية.', 'fr': "Dans les plateformes communautaires de réponse aux questions (CQA), il faut du temps à un utilisateur pour obtenir des informations utiles parmi de nombreuses réponses. Bien qu'une solution soit une méthode de classement des réponses, l'utilisateur doit toujours lire attentivement les réponses les mieux classées. Cet article propose une nouvelle tâche consistant à sélectionner un ensemble de réponses diversifié et non redondant plutôt que de classer les réponses. Notre méthode est basée sur des processus de points déterminants (PDP), et elle calcule l'importance des réponses et la similitude entre les réponses à l'aide du BERT. Nous avons créé un jeu de données axé sur un site japonais d'AQC, et les expériences sur cet ensemble de données ont démontré que la méthode proposée surpassait plusieurs méthodes de référence.", 'es': 'En las plataformas de respuesta a preguntas (CQA) basadas en la comunidad, el usuario necesita tiempo para obtener información útil de entre muchas respuestas. Aunque una solución es un método de clasificación de respuestas, el usuario debe leer cuidadosamente las respuestas mejor calificadas. Este documento propone una nueva tarea de seleccionar un conjunto de respuestas diverso y no redundante en lugar de clasificar las respuestas. Nuestro método se basa en procesos puntuales determinantes (DPP) y calcula la importancia de la respuesta y la similitud entre las respuestas mediante BERT. Creamos un conjunto de datos centrado en un sitio de CQA japonés, y los experimentos en este conjunto de datos demostraron que el método propuesto superó a varios métodos de referencia.', 'pt': 'Em plataformas de resposta a perguntas baseadas na comunidade (CQA), leva tempo para um usuário obter informações úteis entre muitas respostas. Embora uma solução seja um método de classificação de respostas, o usuário ainda precisa ler atentamente as respostas mais bem classificadas. Este artigo propõe uma nova tarefa de selecionar um conjunto de respostas diversificado e não redundante em vez de classificar as respostas. Nosso método é baseado em processos de pontos determinantes (DPPs) e calcula a importância da resposta e a similaridade entre as respostas usando o BERT. Construímos um conjunto de dados com foco em um site CQA japonês, e os experimentos nesse conjunto de dados demonstraram que o método proposto superou vários métodos de linha de base.', 'ja': 'コミュニティベースの質問応答（ CQA ）プラットフォームでは、ユーザーが多くの回答の中から有用な情報を取得するのに時間がかかります。1つのソリューションは回答ランキング方法ですが、ユーザーはトップランクの回答を注意深く読む必要があります。本稿では、答えをランク付けするのではなく、多様で非冗長な答えセットを選択する新しいタスクを提案する。我々の方法は、決定論的点過程（ DPP ）に基づいており、BERTを用いて回答の重要性と回答間の類似性を計算する。我々は日本のCQAサイトに焦点を当てたデータセットを構築し、このデータセットの実験は、提案された方法がいくつかのベースライン方法よりも優れていることを実証した。', 'zh': '社区问答(CQA)台,用户须岁月多。 虽一解决方案为答案排名之法,然用户犹须仔细看排名靠前答案。 本文举一新任,即择一多样化而非冗余者集之,非对案排名也。 吾法基于行列式点(DPP),其用BERT计其要害,与答案之相似性。 构一以日本CQA站点为重数集,其数实验明,所上优于数基线。', 'ru': 'В общинных платформах ответов на вопросы (CQA) пользователю требуется время, чтобы получить полезную информацию из множества ответов. Хотя одним из решений является метод ранжирования ответов, пользователю все равно нужно внимательно прочитать ответы с самыми высокими оценками. В настоящем документе предлагается новая задача выбора разнообразного и не избыточного набора ответов, а не ранжирования ответов. Наш метод основан на процессах детерминантных точек (DPPS) и вычисляет важность ответа и сходство между ответами с помощью BERT. Мы построили набор данных, сосредоточившись на японском сайте КПК, и эксперименты с этим набором данных показали, что предлагаемый метод превосходит несколько базовых методов.', 'hi': 'समुदाय-आधारित प्रश्न उत्तर (CQA) प्लेटफार्मों में, उपयोगकर्ता को कई उत्तरों के बीच से उपयोगी जानकारी प्राप्त करने में समय लगता है। यद्यपि एक समाधान एक उत्तर रैंकिंग विधि है, फिर भी उपयोगकर्ता को शीर्ष-रैंक वाले उत्तरों के माध्यम से ध्यान से पढ़ने की आवश्यकता है। यह पेपर उत्तरों को रैंकिंग करने के बजाय एक विविध और गैर-अनावश्यक उत्तर सेट का चयन करने का एक नया कार्य प्रस्तावित करता है। हमारी विधि निर्धारक बिंदु प्रक्रियाओं (DPPs) पर आधारित है, और यह BERT का उपयोग करके उत्तर महत्व और उत्तरों के बीच समानता की गणना करता है। हमने एक जापानी सीक्यूए साइट पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हुए एक डेटासेट बनाया, और इस डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों ने प्रदर्शित किया कि प्रस्तावित विधि ने कई बेसलाइन विधियों को पछाड़ दिया।', 'ga': 'Ar ardáin pobalbhunaithe freagartha ceisteanna (CQA), tógann sé am ar úsáideoir faisnéis úsáideach a fháil ó go leor freagraí. Cé gur modh rangú freagraí é réiteach amháin, ní mór don úsáideoir fós na freagraí is airde a léamh go cúramach. Molann an páipéar seo tasc nua maidir le sraith freagraí ilghnéitheacha agus nach bhfuil iomarcach a roghnú seachas na freagraí a rangú. Tá ár modh bunaithe ar phróisis phointe cinntitheacha (DPPanna), agus ríomhann sé an tábhacht a bhaineann le freagraí agus cosúlachtaí idir freagraí trí úsáid a bhaint as BERT. Thógamar tacar sonraí ag díriú ar shuíomh CQA Seapánach, agus léirigh na turgnaimh ar an tacar sonraí seo gur sháraigh an modh molta roinnt modhanna bonnlíne.', 'ka': 'საზოგადოებო კითხვების პასუხისთვის (CQA) პლატატრამებში, მომხმარებელი საჭირო დრო იქნება, რომ მომხმარებელი მრავალ პასუხისთვის გამოი მაგრამ ერთი პასუხი არის პანჯრენტის მიზეზი, მომხმარებელი უნდა დაუკითხვა მარტივი პასუხებით. ამ დოკუნტის ახალი დავალება განსხვავებული და არაფერი განსხვავებული პარამეტრების არჩევა, ვიდრე განსხვავებული პარამეტრები. ჩვენი პროცემი განსაზღვრებული წიგნის პროცესების დაბაზია, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული მნიშვნელობა და განსაზღვრების განსხვავება BERT გამოყენებით გამოყენებული. ჩვენ დავყენეთ მონაცემების სექტი, რომელიც იპონციონური CQA საიტის გარეშე, და ექსპერიმენტები ამ მონაცემების სექტიდან გამოწვება, რომ მონაცემებული მეტი', 'el': 'Στις πλατφόρμες απάντησης ερωτήσεων με βάση την κοινότητα, χρειάζεται χρόνος για έναν χρήστη να πάρει χρήσιμες πληροφορίες από πολλές απαντήσεις. Αν και μια λύση είναι μια μέθοδος κατάταξης απαντήσεων, ο χρήστης πρέπει να διαβάσει προσεκτικά τις απαντήσεις με την κορυφαία κατάταξη. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα νέο καθήκον επιλογής ενός διαφορετικού και μη περιττού συνόλου απαντήσεων αντί της ταξινόμησης των απαντήσεων. Η μέθοδος μας βασίζεται σε καθοριστικές διεργασίες σημείου (DPP), και υπολογίζει τη σημασία της απάντησης και την ομοιότητα μεταξύ των απαντήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας BERT. Δημιουργήσαμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που επικεντρώνεται σε μια ιαπωνική τοποθεσία CQA, και τα πειράματα σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων έδειξαν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνούσε αρκετές βασικές μεθόδους.', 'hu': 'A közösségi alapú kérdésválaszoló platformokon időbe telik, hogy a felhasználó hasznos információkat kapjon a sok válasz közül. Bár az egyik megoldás a válaszok rangsorolási módszer, a felhasználónak még mindig gondosan át kell olvasnia a legmagasabb rangú válaszokat. Ez a tanulmány egy új feladatot javasol a válaszok rangsorolása helyett egy változatos és nem redundáns válaszkészlet kiválasztására. Módszerünk a meghatározó pontfolyamatokon alapul, és BERT segítségével kiszámítja a válasz fontosságát és hasonlóságát a válaszok között. Egy japán CQA oldalra összpontosító adatkészletet építettünk, és az ezen adatkészleten végzett kísérletek kimutatták, hogy a javasolt módszer több alapvető módszert felülmúlt.', 'it': "Nelle piattaforme di risposta alle domande basate sulla comunità (CQA), un utente richiede tempo per ottenere informazioni utili tra le molte risposte. Anche se una soluzione è un metodo di classificazione delle risposte, l'utente deve comunque leggere attentamente le risposte in alto. Questo articolo propone un nuovo compito di selezionare un insieme di risposte diversificate e non ridondanti piuttosto che classificare le risposte. Il nostro metodo si basa sui processi determinanti dei punti (DPP), e calcola l'importanza della risposta e la somiglianza tra le risposte utilizzando BERT. Abbiamo costruito un dataset focalizzato su un sito CQA giapponese, e gli esperimenti su questo dataset hanno dimostrato che il metodo proposto ha superato diversi metodi di base.", 'lt': 'Bendrijos atsakymo į klausimus platformose vartotojui reikia laiko gauti naudingą informaciją iš daugelio atsakymų. Nors vienas sprendimas yra atsakymų klasifikavimo metodas, naudotojas vis dar turi atidžiai perskaityti aukščiausio lygio atsakymus. Šiame dokumente siūloma pasirinkti įvairius ir nereikalingus atsakymus, o ne nustatyti atsakymus. Mūsų metodas grindžiamas lemiamųjų taškų procesais (DPP), ir jis apskaičiuoja atsakymų svarbą ir panašumą naudojant BERT. We built a dataset focusing on a Japanese CQA site, and the experiments on this dataset demonstrated that the proposed method outperformed several baseline methods.', 'mk': 'Во платформите за одговори на прашања (CQA) со седиште на заедницата, потребно е време за корисникот да добие корисни информации од меѓу многу одговори. Иако едно решение е метод за рангирање на одговорите, корисникот сé уште мора внимателно да ги прочита највисоките одговори. Овој документ предложува нова задача за избор на различни и непотребни одговори наместо рангирање на одговорите. Нашиот метод е базиран на процеси со одредени точки (ДПП), и го пресметува важноста на одговорот и сличноста помеѓу одговорите со користење на БЕРТ. Изградивме компјутер на податоци фокусирани на јапонска сајт ЦКА, и експериментите на овој компјутер покажаа дека предложениот метод ги надмина неколку основни методи.', 'ms': 'Dalam platform menjawab soalan berdasarkan komuniti (CQA), ia mengambil masa untuk pengguna untuk mendapatkan maklumat berguna dari antara banyak jawapan. Walaupun satu penyelesaian adalah kaedah rangkaian jawapan, pengguna masih perlu membaca melalui jawapan tertinggi dengan hati-hati. Kertas ini mencadangkan tugas baru untuk memilih set jawapan yang berbeza dan tidak berlebihan daripada menandakan jawapan. Kaedah kita berdasarkan proses titik determinantal (DPP), dan ia menghitung kepentingan jawapan dan persamaan antara jawapan dengan menggunakan BERT. Kami membina set data yang fokus pada laman CQA Jepun, dan eksperimen pada set data ini menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan melampaui beberapa kaedah asas.', 'kk': 'Компатты негіздеген сұрақ (CQA) платформаларында пайдаланушының көп жауаптардан пайдаланушының мәліметін алу үшін уақыт керек. Бір шешім - жауап жоғарлау әдісі, пайдаланушы әлі жоғары жоғары жоғары жауаптар арқылы оқу керек. Бұл қағаз жауаптарды реттеу орнына әртүрлі және қайталамаған жауапты таңдау үшін жаңа тапсырманы таңдайды. Біздің әдіміміз белгілі нүктеу процестеріне негізделген. Бұл жауаптардың маңыздылығын және жауаптардың арасындағы ұқсастығын BERT арқылы есептеп береді. Біз жапон CQA сайтына көздейтін деректер жинағын құрдық. Бұл деректер жинағындағы тәжірибелер таңдалған тәжірибенің бірнеше негізгі тәжірибелерін өзгертеді.', 'mt': 'Fil-pjattaformi tat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq il-komunità (CQA), jeħtieġ żmien biex utent jikseb informazzjoni utli minn fost ħafna tweġibiet. Għalkemm soluzzjoni waħda hija metodu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-tweġibiet, l-utent għad irid jaqra bir-reqqa t-tweġibiet tal-ogħla klassifikazzjoni. Dan id-dokument jipproponi kompitu ġdid li jagħżel sett ta’ tweġibiet differenti u mhux żejda minflok jikklassifika t-tweġibiet. Il-metodu tagħna huwa bbażat fuq proċessi ta’ punti determinanti (DPPs), u jikkalkula l-importanza tat-tweġiba u s-similarità bejn it-tweġibiet bl-użu tal-BERT. Bniejna sett ta’ dejta li jiffoka fuq sit Ġappuniż ta’ CQA, u l-esperimenti fuq dan is-sett ta’ dejta wrew li l-metodu propost qabeż diversi metodi ta’ bażi.', 'ml': 'സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം (സിക്യൂഎ) പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളില്\u200d, പല ഉത്തരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക് ഒരു തീരുമാനം ഒരു ഉത്തരം റാങ്ങിങ്ങ് രീതിയാണെങ്കിലും ഉപയോക്താവിന് മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഉത്തരം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ച് വ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d റെഞ്ച് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് പകരം വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന് പുതി നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന പോയിന്റ് പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. അതിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഉത്തരം പ്ര ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ജാപ്പനീസ് സിക്യൂഎ സൈറ്റില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കി. ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു', 'pl': 'Na platformach społecznościowych odpowiedzi na pytania (CQA) użytkownik uzyskuje przydatne informacje spośród wielu odpowiedzi. Chociaż jednym z rozwiązań jest metoda rankingu odpowiedzi, użytkownik nadal musi uważnie przeczytać najwyższej rangi odpowiedzi. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nowe zadanie polegające na wyborze zróżnicowanego i niezbędnego zbioru odpowiedzi zamiast rankingu odpowiedzi. Nasza metoda opiera się na procesach determinant point process (DPP) i oblicza znaczenie odpowiedzi i podobieństwo pomiędzy odpowiedziami za pomocą BERT. Zbudowaliśmy zbiór danych skupiający się na japońskiej witrynie CQA, a eksperymenty na tym zbiorze danych wykazały, że proponowana metoda przewyższa kilka metod bazowych.', 'ro': 'În platformele de răspuns la întrebări bazate pe comunitate (CQA), este nevoie de timp pentru un utilizator pentru a obține informații utile dintre multe răspunsuri. Deși o soluție este o metodă de clasificare a răspunsurilor, utilizatorul trebuie să citească cu atenție răspunsurile de top clasate. Această lucrare propune o nouă sarcină de selectare a unui set de răspunsuri divers și neredundant, mai degrabă decât de clasificare a răspunsurilor. Metoda noastră se bazează pe procesele punctuale determinante (DPP) și calculează importanța răspunsului și similitudinea dintre răspunsuri utilizând BERT. Am construit un set de date axat pe un site japonez CQA, iar experimentele pe acest set de date au demonstrat că metoda propusă a depășit mai multe metode de bază.', 'no': 'I tilfellesskapsbasert spørsmål (CQA) er det nødvendig for å få nyttig informasjon frå mange svarar. Selv om ein løysing er ein svarrankingsmetode, må brukaren fortsatt lesa gjennom den øvre rangerte svara forsiktig. Denne papiret foreslår eit ny oppgåve for å velja ein ulike og ikkje-redundant svar i staden for å rankera svara. Metoden vårt er basert på determinantpunktprosessar (DPP), og det beregner svarsvarviktigheten og liknandhet mellom svar ved bruk av BERT. Vi bygde eit datasett som fokuserer på ein japansk CQA-nettstad, og eksperimentene på denne datasetten viste at den foreslåde metoden utførte fleire baseline-metodar.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн суурь суурь асуулт (CQA) хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгчийн олон хариултаас ашигтай мэдээллийг авах цаг зарцуулдаг. Нэг шийдэл нь хариултын дарааллын арга хэдий ч хэрэглэгч дээд хэмжээний хариултаар анхаарал унших хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаас хариултыг шалгахын оронд өөр олон, бусад хариултыг сонгох шинэ ажил сануулдаг. Бидний арга нь тодорхойлолтой цэгийн процесс дээр суурилсан бөгөөд энэ нь хариултын чухал болон хариултын хоорондын адилтгалыг BERT ашиглан тооцож байна. Бид Японы CQA сайт дээр төвлөрсөн өгөгдлийн санг бүтээсэн. Энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд санал өгсөн арга нь олон суурь шугам арга зэрэг үйлдвэрлэсэн.', 'si': 'සමාජිකයේ අධාරිත ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න (CQA) ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙක්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න වෙලාව අව එක ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණයක් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ පද්ධතියක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා තවමත් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තෝරගන්න අළුත් වැඩක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තෝරගන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර අපේ විධානය නිර්දේශ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව (DPPs) පරීක්ෂණයේ අධාරිත වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඒක BERT භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ සම අපි ජාපානිය CQA සැයිට් එකක් බලන්න දත්ත සැට් එකක් හදලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ දත්ත සැට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුව', 'sv': 'I community-baserade frågesvarsplattformar (CQA) tar det tid för en användare att få användbar information bland många svar. Även om en lösning är en svarsräkningsmetod behöver användaren fortfarande läsa igenom de topprankade svaren noggrant. Denna uppsats föreslår en ny uppgift att välja en mångsidig och icke-redundant svarsuppgift snarare än att rangordna svaren. Vår metod är baserad på determinantpunktprocesser (DPP), och den beräknar svarets betydelse och likhet mellan svar med hjälp av BERT. Vi byggde en dataset med fokus på en japansk CQA-plats, och experimenten på denna dataset visade att den föreslagna metoden presterade bättre än flera baslinjemetoder.', 'so': 'Jawaabta su’aalaha ee kooxaha bulshada (CQA) waxaa loo baahan yahay in uu isticmaalaha ka helo macluumaad faa’iido leh jawaabo badan. In kastoo ay isku xal ah tahay qaab ka sameynta, isticmaaluhu waa inuu si taxadar leh ugu akhriyaa jawaabaha sare. Kanu wuxuu soo jeedaa shaqo cusub oo doorta jawaabo kala duduwan oo aan la kooban in ay ka bedeshaan jawaabaha. Metalkeenu waxay ku saleysan tahay baaritaanka goobta (DPPs), waxayna xisaabaysaa muhiimka jawaabta iyo isku mid u dhexeeya jawaabaha isticmaalka BERT. Waxaan dhisnay sawir la xiriira bogga CQA oo Japanese ah, imtixaanada taariikhdan ayaana caddaynay in qaabkii la soo jeeday ay ay sameeyeen qaabooyin badan oo hoose ah.', 'sr': 'U platformama odgovora na pitanje na zajednici (CQA), potrebno je vremena da korisnik dobije korisne informacije iz mnogih odgovora. Iako je jedno rješenje metoda odgovora, korisnik još uvek mora pažljivo pročitati kroz najviši odgovori. Ovaj papir predlaže novi zadatak izabranja različitih i neuredundantnih odgovora umjesto režiranja odgovora. Naša metoda je bazirana na određenim procesima tačke (DPP), i izračuna važnost odgovora i sličnost između odgovora koristeći BERT. Napravili smo set podataka fokusiran na japanski CQA sajt, i eksperimenti na ovom setu podataka pokazali su da je predložena metoda izvršila nekoliko osnovnih metoda.', 'ta': 'சமூகத்தில் சார்ந்த கேள்வி பதில் (CQA) தளங்களில், பல பதில்களில் இருந்து பயனுள்ள தகவல் பெற பயனருக்கு நேரம் எடுக்கும். ஒரு தீர்வு எனினும் ஒரு பதில் வரிசைப்படுத்தல் முறைமையாக இருந்தாலும், பயனர் இன்னும் மேல் வரிசையில் உள்ள பதில் இந்த காகிதத்தில் பதில்களை வரிசைப்பதற்கு பதில் வேறு வேறு மற்றும் குறைந்த அல்லாத விடை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க புதிய பண எங்கள் முறைமை தீர்மானிப்பு புள்ளி செயல்கள் (DPPs) அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, அது BERT பயன்படுத்தி விடைகளுக்கு முக்கியம் மற்றும் சமமாக நாங்கள் ஒரு ஜப்பானிய சிகியூஏ தளத்தின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்தும் தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம், இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தின் சோதனைகள் செய்த', 'ur': 'کمونٹی بنیاد سوال کے جواب (CQA) پٹرومٹوں میں، ایک کارساز کے لئے بہت سی جواب سے فائدہ معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے وقت لازم ہے. اگرچہ ایک حل ایک جواب رینگ طریقہ ہے، کارساز اب بھی بالا رینگ جواب سے پڑھنے کی ضرورت ہے. This paper proposes a new task of selecting a different and non-redundant answer set rather than ranking answers. ہمارا طریقہ مقررہ پوینٹ پرسس (DPP) پر بنیاد ہے، اور یہ جواب کا اہم اور برابری کا شمار کرتا ہے BERT کے استعمال سے۔ ہم نے ایک ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا جو ایک جاپانی CQA سایت پر تمرکز کرتی ہے، اور اس ڈاٹ سٹ کے آزمائش نے دکھائی کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ بہت سی بنیس لین طریقوں سے کام لیا ہے.', 'uz': 'In community-based question answering (CQA) platforms, it takes time for a user to get useful information from among many answers.  Agar bir ҳалқа кўтарилган жавоб турувчи усулдир, foydalanuvchi эса, yuqori chegara boʻlgan javoblar bilan taʼminlov qilishi kerak. Ushbu qogʻoz javoblarni saralash uchun har xil va hech qanday javob tanlash uchun yangi vazifani koʻrsatiladi. Бизнинг усулимиз аниқ нуқталар (DPPs) параметрлари асосида бўлган ва у BERT фойдаланиб жавоб берадиган жавобнинг муҳим ва жавоблари орасидаги баробарликни ҳисоблайди. Biz Japoniya CQA saytida foydalanuvchi maʼlumot satrini yaratdik, bu maʼlumotlar satrining imtiyozlari bir necha baʼzi bazal usullarni bajarishga tushundi.', 'vi': 'Trong lĩnh vực trả lời câu hỏi dựa trên cộng đồng, người dùng cần thời gian để lấy thông tin hữu ích từ nhiều câu trả lời. Tuy rằng một giải pháp là phương pháp xếp hạng trả lời, nhưng người dùng vẫn cần đọc cẩn thận các câu trả lời xếp hạng cao. Tờ giấy này đề nghị một nhiệm vụ mới là lựa chọn một câu trả lời đa dạng và không thừa thải hơn là xếp hạng các câu trả lời. Phương pháp của chúng tôi dựa trên các tiến trình xác định điểm (PSP) và nó tính toán tầm quan trọng trả lời và nét giống nhau giữa các câu trả lời bằng cách sử dụng BERT. Chúng tôi đã xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu tập trung vào một trang CQA của Nhật Bản, và các thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu này đã chứng minh rằng phương pháp đề nghị đã hoàn thành nhiều phương pháp cơ bản.', 'bg': 'В платформите за отговор на въпроси, базирани на общността, отнема време потребителят да получи полезна информация измежду много отговори. Въпреки че едно решение е метод за класиране на отговори, потребителят все още трябва да прочете внимателно отговорите на най-високо класираните. Тази статия предлага нова задача за избор на разнообразен и неизлишен набор от отговори, вместо класиране на отговорите. Методът ни се основава на детерминационни точкови процеси (ДПП) и изчислява значението на отговорите и сходството между отговорите с помощта на BERT. Създадохме набор от данни, фокусиран върху японски сайт за оценка на качеството и експериментите с този набор от данни показаха, че предложеният метод надминава няколко базови метода.', 'nl': "In community-based question responsing (CQA)-platforms kost het tijd voor een gebruiker nuttige informatie uit vele antwoorden krijgt. Hoewel één oplossing een methode is voor het rangschikken van antwoorden, moet de gebruiker de hoogste antwoorden nog steeds zorgvuldig doorlezen. In dit document wordt een nieuwe taak voorgesteld om een gevarieerde en niet-redundante antwoordset te selecteren in plaats van de antwoorden te rangschikken. Onze methode is gebaseerd op determinante puntprocessen (DPP's), en het berekent het antwoordbelang en de gelijkenis tussen antwoorden met behulp van BERT. We bouwden een dataset gericht op een Japanse CQA site, en de experimenten op deze dataset toonden aan dat de voorgestelde methode verscheidene baseline methoden overtrof.", 'da': "I fællesskabsbaserede spørgsmålsbesvarelsesplatforme (CQA) tager det tid for en bruger at få nyttig information blandt mange svar. Selvom en løsning er en svarranking metode, skal brugeren stadig læse de bedst rangerede svar grundigt igennem. Dette dokument foreslår en ny opgave med at vælge et forskelligartet og ikke-overflødigt svarsæt frem for at rangere svarene. Vores metode er baseret på determinantpunktprocesser (DPP'er), og den beregner svarets betydning og lighed mellem svarene ved hjælp af BERT. Vi byggede et datasæt med fokus på et japansk CQA site, og eksperimenterne med dette datasæt viste, at den foreslåede metode oversteg flere basismetoder.", 'de': 'In Community-basierten Fragebeantwortungsplattformen (CQA) dauert es Zeit, bis ein Benutzer nützliche Informationen aus vielen Antworten erhält. Obwohl eine Lösung eine Antwortranking-Methode ist, muss der Benutzer die am besten platzierten Antworten immer noch sorgfältig durchlesen. In diesem Papier wird eine neue Aufgabe vorgeschlagen, eine vielfältige und nicht redundante Antwortgruppe auszuwählen, anstatt die Antworten zu rangieren. Unsere Methode basiert auf Determinant Point Processes (DPPs) und berechnet die Antwortbedeutung und Ähnlichkeit zwischen Antworten mithilfe von BERT. Wir bauten einen Datensatz, der sich auf einen japanischen CQA-Standort konzentrierte, und die Experimente an diesem Datensatz zeigten, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode mehrere Basismethoden übertraf.', 'hr': 'U platformama odgovora na pitanje na temelju zajednice (CQA), potrebno je vrijeme da korisnik dobije korisne informacije iz mnogih odgovora. Iako je jedna rješenje metoda postavljanja odgovora, korisnik još uvijek mora pažljivo pročitati kroz najviši odgovori. Ovaj papir predlaže novi zadatak izabranja različitih i neuredundantnih odgovora umjesto redoviranja odgovora. Naša metoda je temeljena na određenim procesima bodova (DPPs), i proračuna važnost odgovora i sličnost između odgovora koristeći BERT. Napravili smo komplet podataka fokusiran na japanskom mjestu CQA-a, a eksperimenti na ovom kompletu podataka pokazali su da je predložena metoda iznosila nekoliko početnih metoda.', 'id': 'Dalam platform yang menjawab pertanyaan berdasarkan komunitas (CQA), butuh waktu bagi pengguna untuk mendapatkan informasi berguna dari antara banyak jawaban. Meskipun satu solusi adalah metode penangkapan jawaban, pengguna masih perlu membaca melalui jawaban tertinggi dengan hati-hati. Kertas ini mengusulkan tugas baru untuk memilih sebuah jawaban yang berbeda dan tidak redundant set daripada mengatur jawaban. Metode kami berdasarkan proses titik determinan (DPP), dan ia menghitung penting jawaban dan persamaan antara jawaban dengan menggunakan BERT. Kami membangun dataset yang fokus pada situs CQA Jepang, dan eksperimen pada dataset ini menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan melampaui beberapa metode dasar.', 'ko': '커뮤니티 기반 질의응답(CQA) 플랫폼에서 사용자는 많은 답안에서 유용한 정보를 얻는 데 시간이 필요하다.한 가지 해결 방안이 답안 순위 방법이지만 사용자들은 상위권의 답안을 꼼꼼히 읽어야 한다.본고는 답안을 정렬하는 것이 아니라 다양하고 불필요한 답안집을 선택하는 새로운 임무를 제시했다.우리의 방법은 행렬식 점 프로세스(DPPs)를 바탕으로 BERT를 사용하여 답안의 중요성과 답안 간의 유사성을 계산하는 것이다.우리는 일본 CQA 사이트를 중심으로 한 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 이 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 이 방법이 몇 가지 기선 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'در پاسخ پرسش\u200cهای جامعه (CQA) جامعه، برای یک کاربر زمان می\u200cبرد تا اطلاعات مفید از بین بسیاری از جواب\u200cها برگیرد. اگرچه یک راه حل یک روش پاسخی است، کاربر هنوز باید از پاسخهای بالا با دقت بخواند. این کاغذ یک کار جدید برای انتخاب پاسخ مختلف و غیرقابل تغییر دادن را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند به جای رشته جواب\u200cها. روش ما بر فرایند نقطه مقرر مقرر (DPPs) بنیاد دارد، و آن با استفاده از BERT مهم و شباهت جواب را محاسبه می\u200cکند. ما یک مجموعه داده ساختیم که روی یک سایت CQA ژاپنی تمرکز می\u200cکند، و آزمایش\u200cها روی این مجموعه داده\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش پیشنهاد چندین روش\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط را بیشتر انجام داد.', 'sw': 'Katika majibu ya maswali yenye jamii (CQA), inachukua muda wa mtumiaji kupata taarifa za manufaa kutoka katika majibu mengi. Ingawa suluhisho moja ni njia ya kujibu, mtumiaji bado anahitaji kusoma kupitia majibu ya juu kwa makini. This paper proposes a new task of selecting a diverse and non-redundant answer set rather than ranking the answers.  Utawala wetu umejikita na michakato ya uamuzi (DPPs), na inakadiria umuhimu wa jibu na usawa kati ya majibu kwa kutumia BERT. Tumejenga seti ya taarifa inayolenga kwenye tovuti ya CQA ya Japani, na majaribio kwenye seti hii ya data yalionyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zilifanya njia kadhaa za msingi.', 'tr': 'Toplumaty tabanly soraglaryň jogaplary (CQA) platformlarynda, ullançylaryň köp jogabalardan faydaly maglumatlary almak üçin wagt gerek. Bir çözüm çykyş çykyş çykyş yöntemidir, wužiwar entägem üst çykyş jogablary ünsli okamaly. Bu kagyz jogaby düzenlemek yerine, dürli we çykyş jogaby saýlamak üçin täze bir täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze teklip edip bilýär Biziň metodamyz takyk noktalar proseslerine daýanýar we bu jogabyň hökmüni we beýlekiligini BERT ulanyp hasaplar. Biz japonça CQA meýdançasynda üns berilýän veri setirini döredik we munyň munyň teklip eden çäreleriň birnäçe esaslar ýoly üstüne çykandygyny görkezildi.', 'am': 'በአህበራዊ ጥያቄ መልስ (CQA) ፕላጦማር ውስጥ በብዙ መለያቶች ውስጥ የሚጠቅመውን መረጃ ለማግኘት ጊዜ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አንዲት መፍትሄ መልስ አካሄድ ቢሆን፣ ተጠቃሚው ግን በላይ በተደረገ መልስ በጥንቃቄ እንዲያነብ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም መልሶችን ከመቀጠል ይልቅ የተለየ ልዩ እና የማይጎድለውን መልስ ለመምረጥ አዲስ ስራ ያሳያል፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ጥያቄ ጥያቄ (DPPs) መሠረት ነው፣ የመልሱንም ውስጥና በመጠቀም በBERT ጥያቄ ይቆጥራል፡፡ የጃፓን CQA ድረ ገጽ ላይ የሚታወቅ የዳታተር setup ሠርተናል፡፡', 'af': "In gemeenskapsgebaseerde vraag antwoord (CQA) platforme, neem dit tyd vir 'n gebruiker om nuttige inligting te kry onder baie antwoorde. Alhoewel een oplossing is 'n antwoord ranking metode, moet die gebruiker nog steeds lees deur die boonste rangeerde antwoorde versigtig. Hierdie papier stel 'n nuwe taak voorstel om 'n verskeie en nie-rooi antwoord te kies eerder as die rangering van die antwoorde. Ons metode is gebaseer op bepaalde punt prosesse (DPP), en dit bereken die antwoord belangrikheid en gelykheid tussen antwoorde deur BERT te gebruik. Ons het 'n datastel gebou met fokus op 'n Japaanse CQA tuiste, en die eksperimente op hierdie datastel het bevestig dat die voorgestelde metode verskeie basisline metodes uitgevoer het.", 'bn': 'সম্প্রদায়ের ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর (সিকিয়াএ) প্ল্যাটফর্মে অনেক উত্তর থেকে কার্যকর তথ্য পেতে সময় লাগবে। যদিও একটি সমাধান একটি উত্তর রেঙ্কিং পদ্ধতি হলেও ব্যবহারকারীকে সাবধানে পাঠ করতে হবে। এই পত্রিকাটি উত্তর রেঞ্জ করার পরিবর্তে বিভিন্ন এবং অহংকারী উত্তর নির্বাচনের একটি নতুন কাজ প্রস্তাব করেছে। আমাদের পদ্ধতি সিদ্ধান্ত নির্দিষ্ট পয়েন্ট প্রক্রিয়ার (ডিপিপি) ভিত্তিক এবং এটি বার্টি ব্যবহার করে উত্তরের মাধ্যমে জরুরী এবং  আমরা জাপানি সিকিউএ সাইটের দিকে মনোযোগ দিয়ে একটি ডাটাসেট তৈরি করেছি এবং এই ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা প্রমাণিত করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ব', 'az': 'CQA (CQA) platformlarında, insanların çoxlu cevaplardan faydalı məlumatları alması üçün istifadəçinin vaxt alır. Hətta bir çətinlik cavab sıralama metodu olsa da, istifadəçinin hələ də üst sıralar cevapları ilə oxunması lazımdır. Bu kağıt cavabları seçmək yerinə müxtəlif və çox çəkilməz bir cavab təbliğ edir. Bizim metodumuz müəyyən edilən nöqtə işləri (DPP) üzərində dayanılır. Bu, BERT vasitəsilə cevap mövcuddur və cavabların arasındakı similitəsini hesablar. Biz Japon CQA sitəsinə təsirli verilən bir quruluş inşa etdik. Bu verilən quruluş təsirlərin təsirli metodların çoxlu sətir metodlarından üstün olduğunu göstərdi.', 'ca': "En plataformes de resposta a preguntes basades en la comunitat, un usuari necessita temps per obtenir informació útil d'entre moltes respostes. Encara que una solució és un mètode de classificació de respostes, l'usuari encara ha de llegir atentament les respostes de la millor posició. Aquest paper propon una nova tasca de seleccionar una resposta diversa i no redundant en comptes de classificar les respostes. El nostre mètode es basa en processos de punts determinants (DPPs), i calcula la importància de la resposta i la similitud entre les respostes utilitzant BERT. Vam construir un conjunt de dades centrat en un lloc de CQA japonès, i els experiments d'aquest conjunt de dades demostraven que el mètode proposat superava diversos mètodes de base.", 'bs': 'U platformama odgovora na pitanja na temelju zajednice (CQA), potrebno je vremena da korisnik dobije korisne informacije iz mnogih odgovora. Iako je jedna rješenje metoda reda odgovora, korisnik još uvek mora pažljivo pročitati kroz najviši odgovori. Ovaj papir predlaže novi zadatak izabranja različitih i neodređenih odgovora umjesto režiranja odgovora. Naša metoda je temeljena na određenim procesima tačke (DPP), i izračuna važnost odgovora i sličnost između odgovora koristeći BERT. Napravili smo set podataka usredotočen na japanski CQA stranicu, i eksperimenti na ovom setu podataka pokazali su da je predložena metoda iznosila nekoliko osnovnih metoda.', 'cs': 'Na platformách pro odpověď na otázky založených na komunitě (CQA) uživatel potřebuje čas, než získá užitečné informace z mnoha odpovědí. Ačkoli jedním z řešení je metoda hodnocení odpovědí, uživatel si stále musí pečlivě přečíst nejlepší odpovědi. Tento článek navrhuje nový úkol výběru různorodé a nepřebytečné sady odpovědí spíše než hodnocení odpovědí. Naše metoda je založena na determinantních bodových procesech (DPP) a vypočítá důležitost odpovědi a podobnost mezi odpověďmi pomocí BERT. Vytvořili jsme datovou sadu zaměřenou na japonskou CQA lokalitu a experimenty na této sadě ukázaly, že navrhovaná metoda předčila několik základních metod.', 'et': 'Kogukonnapõhistes küsimustele vastamise platvormides kulub kasutajal aega, et saada kasulikku teavet paljude vastuste seast. Kuigi üks lahendus on vastuste järjestamise meetod, peab kasutaja siiski kõrgemate vastuste hoolikalt läbi lugema. Käesolevas dokumendis tehakse ettepanek valida vastuste järjestuse asemel mitmekesine ja mitte üleliigne komplekt. Meie meetod põhineb määravatel punktiprotsessidel (DPP) ning arvutab vastuste tähtsuse ja sarnasuse BERT-i abil. Me ehitasime Jaapani CQA saidile keskenduva andmekogumi ning selle andmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitasid, et kavandatud meetod ületas mitmeid baasmeetodeid.', 'sq': 'Në platformet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të bazuara në komunitet (CQA), duhet kohë që një përdorues të marrë informacion të dobishëm nga shumë përgjigje. Although one solution is an answer ranking method, the user still needs to read through the top-ranked answers carefully.  Ky dokument propozon një detyrë të re të zgjedhjes së një përgjigje të ndryshme dhe jo të tepërt në vend të renditjes së përgjigjeve. Metoda jonë bazohet në proceset e pikave përcaktuese (DPP) dhe llogarit rëndësinë e përgjigjes dhe ngjashmërinë midis përgjigjeve duke përdorur BERT. Ne ndërtuam një set të dhënash që përqëndrohet në një faqe të CQA japoneze dhe eksperimentet në këtë set të dhënash treguan se metoda e propozuar kaloi disa metoda bazë.', 'fi': 'Yhteisöpohjaisissa kysymyksissä (CQA) käyttäjällä kestää aikaa saada hyödyllistä tietoa monien vastausten joukosta. Vaikka yksi ratkaisu on vastausten luokittelumenetelmä, käyttäjän on silti luettava parhaat vastaukset huolellisesti. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotetaan uutta tehtävää valita monipuolinen ja ei-tarpeeton vastausjoukko vastausten paremmuusjärjestyksen sijaan. Menetelmämme perustuu määrääviin pisteprosesseihin (DPP), ja se laskee vastausten tärkeyden ja samankaltaisuuden BERT-menetelmällä. Rakensimme japanilaiseen CQA-sivustoon keskittyvän aineiston, jonka kokeet osoittivat, että ehdotettu menetelmä ylitti useita perusmenetelmiä.', 'hy': "In community-based question answering (CQA) platforms, it takes time for a user to get useful information from among many answers.  Չնայած մեկ լուծում պատասխանների դասավորման մեթոդ է, օգտագործողը դեռևս պետք է ուշադիր կարդալ ամենաբարձր դասավորված պատասխանների միջոցով: Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է նոր խնդիր' ընտրել բազմազան և ոչ ավելացի պատասխաններ, ոչ թե պատասխանների դասավորման: Մեր մեթոդը հիմնված է որոշիչ կետի գործընթացների վրա, և այն հաշվարկում է պատասխանների կարևորությունը և նմանությունը BER-ի միջև: Մենք կառուցեցինք մի տվյալների համակարգ, որը կենտրոնացավ ճապոնական CQA կայքի վրա, և այս տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումները ցույց տվեցին, որ առաջարկած մեթոդը գերազանցել է որոշ հիմնական մեթոդներ:", 'sk': 'V platformah za odgovarjanje na vprašanja, ki temeljijo na skupnosti (CQA), je potreben čas, da uporabnik dobi koristne informacije med mnogimi odgovori. Čeprav je ena rešitev metoda razvrščanja odgovorov, mora uporabnik še vedno natančno prebrati najbolj razvrščene odgovore. Ta prispevek predlaga novo nalogo izbire raznolikega in nepresežnega nabora odgovorov namesto razvrščanja odgovorov. Naša metoda temelji na determinantnih točkovnih procesih (DPP) in izračuna pomen odgovorov in podobnost med odgovori z uporabo BERT. Zgradili smo nabor podatkov, osredotočen na japonsko mesto CQA, in poskusi na tem naboru podatkov so pokazali, da je predlagana metoda presegla več osnovnih metod.', 'he': 'בפלטפורמות שעובדות על שאלות קבוצתיות (CQA), לוקחים זמן למשתמש להשיג מידע שימושי בין תשובות רבות. למרות שפתרון אחד הוא שיטת הדרגה של תשובות, המשתמש עדיין צריך לקרוא דרך התשובות הדרגה העליונה בזהירות. העבודה הזו מציעה משימה חדשה לבחור תשובה מגוונת ולא מוגבלת במקום להצביע את התשובות. השיטה שלנו מבוססת על תהליכים נקודות קבועות (DPP), והיא מחשבת את חשיבות התשובה והדומה בין התשובות באמצעות BERT. בנינו קבוצת נתונים שמתמקדת באתר סי.קי.איי היפני, והניסויים על קבוצת נתונים הזו הראו שהשיטה המוצעת עברה כמה שיטות בסיסיות.', 'jv': 'Nang sithik gambar komunitas ing ngganti gambar (CqA), iki bakal teka lawang kanggo kelas nggawe informasi sing luwih dumadhi sing apik maneh. Sampeyan kotak mbuluk sing ditambah manut, pengguna isih kudu ngewehi sak ngerasah barang sing apik. Awak iki supoyo nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke sistem sing gak perusahaan karo pakeh gak ngubah method Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset sing dipunksi kanggo sithik CqA japongan, lan ngono sing ujaran kanggo dataset iki ngono nggawe ngerasah yang ngerasakno dadi wis ngerasai sistem sing dipunksi dadi sing bisa dianggap.', 'ha': "Yana riƙon mai amfani da mai amfani da amfani daga wasu majiɓinta masu yawa. Kuma kõ da sulkiya guda ya zama wata metode mai fassara, sai ya kamata mai amfani da shi sai ya iya karanta karãtun jawabun da aka danne a saman-ransa carewa. Wannan takardar aiki na buƙata wani aikin da za'a zãɓi wani jibar dabam-daban da ba'a saurara musamman ba. Tsarinmu na ƙaddara a kan jarrabar point na ƙayyade (daidai Ps), kuma yana ƙaddara muhimu da kuma daidai a tsakanin majibu da ya yi amfani da BERT. We built a dataset focusing on a Japanese CQA site, and the experiments on this dataset demonstrated that the proposed method outperformed several baseline methods.", 'bo': 'ཚོགས་སྡེའི་གཞི་བརྟེན་གྱི་འདྲི་ཞིག་ལ་གནད་སྤྲོད་མི་(CQA)གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ལན་གསལ ཡིན་ནའང་ཐབས་ཤེས་གཅིག་ནི་ལན་གསལ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དེ་ལས་མཐོང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལ་སྔར་སྐྱོང་བ་དང་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གདམ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཚད་འཛིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་གལ་ཅན་མེད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱོང་རྩིས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་CQA དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་པས། བརྟག་ཞིབ་སྐྱེལ་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་'}
{'en': 'An empirical analysis of existing systems and datasets toward general simple question answering', 'ar': 'تحليل تجريبي للأنظمة ومجموعات البيانات الموجودة تجاه الإجابة على الأسئلة البسيطة العامة', 'es': 'Un análisis empírico de los sistemas y conjuntos de datos existentes para responder a preguntas simples y generales', 'fr': 'Une analyse empirique des systèmes et des ensembles de données existants vers des réponses générales simples aux questions', 'zh': '今有系统及数据集之实证,以成其略问', 'ja': '一般的な簡単な質問への回答に向けた既存のシステムとデータセットの実証的分析', 'pt': 'Uma análise empírica de sistemas e conjuntos de dados existentes para responder a perguntas simples gerais', 'ru': 'Эмпирический анализ существующих систем и наборов данных для общего простого ответа на вопрос', 'hi': 'सामान्य सरल प्रश्न उत्तर देने की दिशा में मौजूदा प्रणालियों और डेटासेट का एक अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís eimpíreach ar na córais agus na tacair shonraí atá ann cheana i dtreo ceisteanna simplí ginearálta a fhreagairt', 'ka': 'არსებობს სისტემების და მონაცემების ემპერიკური ანალიზაცია საერთო მარტივი კითხვის გასაგებლად', 'el': 'Μια εμπειρική ανάλυση υφιστάμενων συστημάτων και συνόλων δεδομένων προς την κατεύθυνση της γενικής απλής απάντησης ερωτήσεων', 'hu': 'A meglévő rendszerek és adatkészletek empirikus elemzése az általános egyszerű kérdések megválaszolása érdekében', 'it': "Un'analisi empirica di sistemi e set di dati esistenti verso una semplice risposta generale alle domande", 'lt': 'Esamų sistemų ir duomenų rinkinių empirinė analizė, kuria siekiama bendrų paprastų klausimų atsakymo', 'mk': 'Емпирична анализа на постоечките системи и податоци кон општите едноставни одговори на прашања', 'kk': 'Бар жүйелер мен деректер қорларының импирикалық анализ жалпы сұрақ жауап беру үшін', 'ms': 'Analisis empirik sistem dan set data yang wujud menuju jawapan soalan sederhana umum', 'mt': 'Analiżi empirika tas-sistemi u s-settijiet tad-dejta eżistenti lejn tweġiba ġenerali għal mistoqsijiet sempliċi', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള സിസ്റ്റംകളും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും സാധാരണ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിലേക്കുള്ള ഒരു ശ', 'mn': 'Бүгдээрээ байгаа систем болон өгөгдлийн сангуудын эмперикийн шинжилгээ нь ерөнхий энгийн асуултын хариулт руу', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Analiza empiryczna istniejących systemów i zbiorów danych w kierunku ogólnej prostej odpowiedzi na pytania', 'sr': 'Empirička analiza postojećih sistema i seta podataka ka općem jednostavnom odgovoru na pitanje', 'ro': 'O analiză empirică a sistemelor și seturilor de date existente spre răspunsul general simplu la întrebări', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් සහ දත්ත සැකසුම්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිශ්නයක්', 'so': "Analyo fudud oo ku saabsan nidaamka iyo danbiyada xagga jawaabta su'aalaha fudud", 'sv': 'En empirisk analys av befintliga system och dataset mot generellt enkelt frågesvar', 'ta': 'An empirical analysis of existing systems and datasets toward general simple question answering', 'ur': 'موجود سیسٹم اور ڈیٹ سٹم کا ایک عمومی تحلیل ساده سؤال کے جواب کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một tất cả các hệ thống đã có và giải dữ liệu để trả lời câu trả lời đơn giản', 'bg': 'Емпиричен анализ на съществуващите системи и набори от данни към общ прост отговор на въпроси', 'nl': 'Een empirische analyse van bestaande systemen en datasets naar algemene eenvoudige vragen beantwoorden', 'hr': 'Empirička analiza postojećih sustava i seta podataka ka općem jednostavnom odgovoru na pitanje', 'da': 'En empirisk analyse af eksisterende systemer og datasæt mod generel enkel spørgsmålsbesvarelse', 'de': 'Eine empirische Analyse bestehender Systeme und Datensätze zur einfachen Beantwortung allgemeiner Fragen', 'fa': 'یک تحلیل امپراتیک از سیستم\u200cهای موجود و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها به سمت جواب سوال ساده\u200cای عمومی', 'ko': '기존 시스템과 데이터 집합에 대한 실증 분석', 'id': 'Analisi empirik sistem dan dataset yang ada menuju jawaban pertanyaan sederhana umum', 'tr': 'Öň bar sistemleriň we veri setirleriniň umumy basit soragyň jogabyna görä empirik analizi', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ስርዓቶች እና ዳታዎችን ለመቀበል ቀላል ጥያቄ የሚመልስ', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող համակարգերի և տվյալների համակարգերի էմպիրիկ վերլուծությունը ընդհանուր պարզ հարցերի պատասխանելու համար', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa msisitizo wa mifumo na seti za taarifa kwa majibu ya swali rahisi', 'az': 'Mevcut sisteml톛rin v톛 veri qurular캼n캼n 칞oxlu basit suala cavab verm톛k 칲칞칲n empirik analizi', 'bs': 'Empirička analiza postojećih sustava i seta podataka ka općem jednostavnom odgovoru na pitanje', 'sq': 'Një analizë empirike e sistemeve ekzistuese dhe të dhënave drejt përgjigjes së pyetjeve të thjeshta të përgjigjura', 'bn': 'An empirical analysis of existing systems and datasets toward general simple question answering', 'cs': 'Empirická analýza stávajících systémů a datových souborů směrem k obecné jednoduché odpovědi na otázky', 'et': 'Olemasolevate süsteemide ja andmekogumite empiiriline analüüs üldise lihtsa küsimustele vastamise suunas', 'fi': 'Empiirinen analyysi olemassa olevista järjestelmistä ja aineistoista yleiseen yksinkertaiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen', 'ca': 'Una anàlisi empírica dels sistemes i conjunts de dades existents cap a una resposta general a preguntes simples', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': "Ana ƙidãya wa masu tsari na'ura da tsari zuwa jibin tambayar mai sauri na ɗabi'a", 'sk': 'Empirična analiza obstoječih sistemov in naborov podatkov v smeri splošnega preprostega odgovora na vprašanja', 'he': 'ניתוח אמפרי של מערכות וקבוצות מידע קיימות לכיוון תשובות לשאלות פשוטות כלליות', 'bo': 'གནས་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་དང་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཚད་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལ་མཐུན'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we evaluate the progress of our field toward solving simple factoid questions over a knowledge base, a practically important problem in natural language interface to database. As in other natural language understanding tasks, a common practice for this task is to train and evaluate a model on a single dataset, and recent studies suggest that SimpleQuestions, the most popular and largest dataset, is nearly solved under this setting. However, this common setting does not evaluate the robustness of the systems outside of the distribution of the used training data. We rigorously evaluate such robustness of existing systems using different datasets. Our analysis, including shifting of training and test datasets and training on a union of the datasets, suggests that our progress in solving SimpleQuestions dataset does not indicate the success of more general simple question answering. We discuss a possible future direction toward this goal.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتقييم التقدم المحرز في مجالنا نحو حل أسئلة بسيطة عن الحقائق الواقعية على قاعدة المعرفة ، وهي مشكلة مهمة عمليًا في واجهة اللغة الطبيعية لقاعدة البيانات. كما هو الحال في مهام فهم اللغة الطبيعية الأخرى ، فإن الممارسة الشائعة لهذه المهمة هي تدريب وتقييم نموذج على مجموعة بيانات واحدة ، وتشير الدراسات الحديثة إلى أن SimpleQuestions ، وهي مجموعة البيانات الأكثر شيوعًا والأكبر ، يتم حلها تقريبًا في ظل هذا الإعداد. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذا الإعداد المشترك لا يقيم متانة الأنظمة خارج توزيع بيانات التدريب المستخدمة. نحن نقيِّم بدقة مثل هذه المتانة للأنظمة الحالية باستخدام مجموعات بيانات مختلفة. يشير تحليلنا ، بما في ذلك تغيير مجموعات بيانات التدريب والاختبار والتدريب على اتحاد مجموعات البيانات ، إلى أن تقدمنا في حل مجموعة بيانات SimpleQuestions لا يشير إلى نجاح إجابة الأسئلة البسيطة الأكثر عمومية. نناقش الاتجاه المستقبلي المحتمل نحو هذا الهدف.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, avaliamos o progresso de nosso campo para resolver questões factóides simples sobre uma base de conhecimento, um problema praticamente importante na interface de linguagem natural para banco de dados. Como em outras tarefas de compreensão de linguagem natural, uma prática comum para essa tarefa é treinar e avaliar um modelo em um único conjunto de dados, e estudos recentes sugerem que SimpleQuestions, o conjunto de dados mais popular e maior, está quase resolvido nessa configuração. No entanto, essa configuração comum não avalia a robustez dos sistemas fora da distribuição dos dados de treinamento usados. Avaliamos rigorosamente essa robustez dos sistemas existentes usando diferentes conjuntos de dados. Nossa análise, incluindo a mudança dos conjuntos de dados de treinamento e teste e o treinamento em uma união dos conjuntos de dados, sugere que nosso progresso na resolução do conjunto de dados SimpleQuestions não indica o sucesso de respostas a perguntas simples mais gerais. Discutimos uma possível direção futura em direção a esse objetivo.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous évaluons les progrès de notre domaine vers la résolution de questions factuelles simples sur une base de connaissances, un problème pratiquement important dans l'interface en langage naturel avec la base de données. Comme pour les autres tâches de compréhension du langage naturel, une pratique courante pour cette tâche consiste à entraîner et à évaluer un modèle sur un seul ensemble de données, et des études récentes suggèrent que SimpleQuestions, le jeu de données le plus populaire et le plus important, est presque résolu dans ce contexte. Cependant, ce paramètre commun n'évalue pas la robustesse des systèmes en dehors de la distribution des données d'entraînement utilisées. Nous évaluons rigoureusement la robustesse des systèmes existants à l'aide de différents ensembles de données. Notre analyse, y compris le déplacement des ensembles de données de formation et de test et la formation sur une union des ensembles de données, suggère que nos progrès dans la résolution de l'ensemble de données SimpleQuestions n'indiquent pas le succès d'une réponse plus générale aux questions simples. Nous discutons d'une orientation future possible vers cet objectif.", 'es': 'En este artículo, evaluamos el progreso de nuestro campo hacia la resolución de preguntas de datos simples sobre una base de conocimientos, un problema prácticamente importante en la interfaz del lenguaje natural con la base de datos. Al igual que en otras tareas de comprensión del lenguaje natural, una práctica común para esta tarea es entrenar y evaluar un modelo en un solo conjunto de datos, y estudios recientes sugieren que SimpleQuestions, el conjunto de datos más grande y popular, casi se resuelve en este entorno. Sin embargo, esta configuración común no evalúa la solidez de los sistemas fuera de la distribución de los datos de entrenamiento utilizados. Evaluamos rigurosamente la solidez de los sistemas existentes utilizando diferentes conjuntos de datos. Nuestro análisis, incluido el cambio de los conjuntos de datos de entrenamiento y pruebas y la capacitación en una unión de los conjuntos de datos, sugiere que nuestro progreso en la resolución del conjunto de datos SimpleQuestions no indica el éxito de las respuestas a preguntas simples más generales. Discutimos una posible dirección futura hacia este objetivo.', 'ja': '本稿では，データベースへの自然言語インタフェースにおける実質的に重要な問題である知識ベース上の単純な事実的質問の解決に向けた分野の進捗状況を評価する。他の自然言語理解タスクと同様に、このタスクの一般的な実践は、単一のデータセット上でモデルを訓練して評価することです。最近の研究では、最も人気があり、最大のデータセットであるSimpleQuestionsは、この設定でほぼ解決されていることが示唆されています。ただし、この共通設定は、使用されたトレーニングデータの分布外のシステムの堅牢性を評価するものではありません。さまざまなデータセットを使用して、既存システムのこのような堅牢性を厳密に評価します。トレーニングとテストデータセットのシフト、およびデータセットの結合に関するトレーニングを含む当社の分析は、SimpleQuestionsデータセットの解決の進捗が、より一般的な単純な質問への回答の成功を示すものではないことを示唆しています。この目標に向けた今後の可能性のある方向性について話し合います。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы оцениваем прогресс нашей области в решении простых фактических вопросов по базе знаний, что является практически важной проблемой в интерфейсе естественного языка с базой данных. Как и в других задачах понимания естественного языка, обычной практикой для этой задачи является обучение и оценка модели на одном наборе данных, и недавние исследования показывают, что SimpleQuestions, самый популярный и самый большой набор данных, почти решен в этой настройке. Тем не менее, эта общая настройка не оценивает надежность систем за пределами распределения используемых данных обучения. Мы тщательно оцениваем такую устойчивость существующих систем, используя различные наборы данных. Наш анализ, включая перенос обучающих и тестовых наборов данных и обучение объединению наборов данных, предполагает, что наш прогресс в решении набора данных SimpleQuestions не свидетельствует об успехе более общего простого ответа на вопрос. Мы обсуждаем возможное будущее направление к этой цели.', 'zh': '于本文之中,估吾领知识库之简事,此自然语言界面数据库之实要也。 与诸自然语言解事同,其常见法在单数集上练料形势,近者研明,最流行及大集SimpleQuestions于此设之几可解。 然通用不在所用练数之外评估系统之稳健性。 我们用不同的数据集严估现有系统的鲁棒性。 臣等所论,包练习测试数据集之移,并集之数,明吾等SimpleQuestions数集之进,非明简答之功也。 我们议论了这一向。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक ज्ञान के आधार पर सरल तथ्यात्मक प्रश्नों को हल करने की दिशा में अपने क्षेत्र की प्रगति का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, जो डेटाबेस के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफ़ेस में एक व्यावहारिक रूप से महत्वपूर्ण समस्या है। अन्य प्राकृतिक भाषा समझने वाले कार्यों की तरह, इस कार्य के लिए एक सामान्य अभ्यास एक एकल डेटासेट पर एक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित और मूल्यांकन करना है, और हाल के अध्ययनों से पता चलता है कि SimpleQuestions, सबसे लोकप्रिय और सबसे बड़ा डेटासेट, इस सेटिंग के तहत लगभग हल हो गया है। हालाँकि, यह सामान्य सेटिंग उपयोग किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा के वितरण के बाहर सिस्टम की मजबूती का मूल्यांकन नहीं करती है। हम विभिन्न डेटासेट का उपयोग करके मौजूदा प्रणालियों की ऐसी मजबूती का कड़ाई से मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे विश्लेषण, जिसमें प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण डेटासेट के स्थानांतरण और डेटासेट के एक संघ पर प्रशिक्षण शामिल है, से पता चलता है कि SimpleQuestions डेटासेट को हल करने में हमारी प्रगति अधिक सामान्य सरल प्रश्न उत्तर देने की सफलता का संकेत नहीं देती है। हम इस लक्ष्य की दिशा में एक संभावित भविष्य की दिशा पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid measúnú ar dhul chun cinn ár réimse i dtreo ceisteanna simplí fíricí a réiteach thar bhunachar eolais, fadhb atá beagnach tábhachtach i gcomhéadan teanga nádúrtha leis an mbunachar sonraí. Mar a dhéantar i dtascanna nádúrtha eile a bhaineann le tuiscint teanga, cleachtas coiteann don tasc seo ná múnla a oiliúint agus a mheas ar thacar sonraí amháin, agus tugann staidéir le déanaí le fios go bhfuil SimpleQuestions, an tacar sonraí is mó tóir agus is mó, beagnach réitithe faoin socrú seo. Mar sin féin, ní dhéanann an comhshocrú seo meastóireacht ar stóinseacht na gcóras lasmuigh de dháileadh na sonraí oiliúna a úsáideadh. Déanaimid dian-mheasúnú ar stóinseacht na gcóras atá ann cheana féin ag baint úsáide as tacair shonraí éagsúla. Tugann ár n-anailís, lena n-áirítear aistriú tacair sonraí oiliúna agus tástála agus oiliúint ar aontas de na tacair sonraí, le fios nach léiríonn ár ndul chun cinn maidir le réiteach tacar sonraí SimpleQuestions cé chomh maith agus a d’éirigh le ceisteanna simplí níos ginearálta a fhreagairt. Déanaimid plé ar threo féideartha amach anseo i dtreo na sprice seo.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban értékeljük a területünk előrehaladását az egyszerű tényleges kérdések megoldása felé egy tudásbázison keresztül, ami gyakorlatilag fontos probléma a természetes nyelvi interfészben az adatbázissal. Mint más természetes nyelvértési feladatok esetében, ennek a feladatnak a leggyakoribb gyakorlata az, hogy egyetlen adatkészleten képzünk és értékeljük a modellt, és a legfrissebb tanulmányok azt sugallják, hogy a SimpleQuestions, a legnépszerűbb és legnagyobb adatkészlet, majdnem megoldódik ebben a beállításban. Ez a közös beállítás azonban nem értékeli a rendszerek robusztusságát a felhasznált képzési adatok terjesztésén kívül. Szigorúan értékeljük a meglévő rendszerek ilyen robusztusságát különböző adatkészletekkel. Elemzésünk, beleértve a képzési és tesztadatkészletek áthelyezését, valamint az adatkészletek egyesítésével kapcsolatos képzést, arra utal, hogy a SimpleQuestions adatkészlet megoldásában elért előrelépésünk nem jelzi az általánosabb egyszerű kérdésválasz sikerét. Megvitatjuk a jövőbeli irányt ennek a célnak a felé.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, αξιολογούμε την πρόοδο του πεδίου μας προς την επίλυση απλών πραγματικών ερωτήσεων πάνω από μια βάση γνώσεων, ένα πρακτικά σημαντικό πρόβλημα στη διασύνδεση φυσικής γλώσσας με βάση δεδομένων. Όπως και σε άλλες εργασίες κατανόησης φυσικής γλώσσας, μια κοινή πρακτική για αυτό το έργο είναι να εκπαιδεύσει και να αξιολογήσει ένα μοντέλο σε ένα μόνο σύνολο δεδομένων, και πρόσφατες μελέτες δείχνουν ότι το πιο δημοφιλές και μεγαλύτερο σύνολο δεδομένων, λύνεται σχεδόν κάτω από αυτό το περιβάλλον. Ωστόσο, αυτή η κοινή ρύθμιση δεν αξιολογεί την ανθεκτικότητα των συστημάτων εκτός της διανομής των χρησιμοποιούμενων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Αξιολογούμε αυστηρά την ανθεκτικότητα των υφιστάμενων συστημάτων χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Η ανάλυσή μας, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της μετατόπισης των συνόλων δεδομένων κατάρτισης και δοκιμών και της κατάρτισης σε μια ένωση των συνόλων δεδομένων, υποδηλώνει ότι η πρόοδό μας στην επίλυση του συνόλου δεδομένων δεν δείχνει την επιτυχία της γενικότερης απλής απάντησης ερωτήσεων. Συζητούμε μια πιθανή μελλοντική κατεύθυνση προς αυτόν τον στόχο.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ ჩვენი პანელის პროგრესის გავაკეთებთ საუკეთესო ფექტიოდის კითხვების გადაწყვებაზე, პრაქტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა თავისუფალური როგორც სხვა თავისუფალური ენერგიის განსხვავებაში, ამ დავალებისთვის საერთო პრაქტიკური პროგრამია არის ერთი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის მოდულის შესაბამისთვის და შემდეგ კვლევების შესაბამისთვის, რომ საერთო პრო მაგრამ ეს საერთო შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი სისტემების ძალიან გარეშე გამოიყენებული შესაბამისი მონაცემების გარეშე არაა. ჩვენ ძალიან ძალიან გავამუშავებთ ასეთი ძალიან ძალიან სისტემის განსხვავებული მონაცემების გამოყენება. ჩვენი ანალიზია, რომელიც განაცემის და ტესტის მონაცემების შეცვლა და განაცემის შეცვლა მონაცემების საერთო შეცვლაში, იყველას, რომ ჩვენი პროგრესი განახლებაში Simple Questions მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მომავალე მიზეზი ამ მიზეზის მიზეზით.', 'it': "In questo articolo, valutiamo il progresso del nostro campo verso la risoluzione di semplici domande fattuali su una base di conoscenze, un problema praticamente importante nell'interfaccia del linguaggio naturale al database. Come in altri compiti di comprensione del linguaggio naturale, una pratica comune per questo compito è quella di formare e valutare un modello su un singolo set di dati, e studi recenti suggeriscono che SimpleQuestions, il set di dati più popolare e più grande, è quasi risolto in questa impostazione. Tuttavia, questa impostazione comune non valuta la robustezza dei sistemi al di fuori della distribuzione dei dati di formazione utilizzati. Valutiamo rigorosamente tale robustezza dei sistemi esistenti utilizzando diversi set di dati. La nostra analisi, compreso lo spostamento di set di dati di formazione e test e la formazione su un'unione di set di dati, suggerisce che i nostri progressi nella risoluzione di set di dati SimpleQuestions non indicano il successo di una risposta più generale alle domande semplici. Discutiamo di una possibile direzione futura verso questo obiettivo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз өріміздің қарапайым фактоид сұрақтарын білім негізінде шешуге, табиғи тіл интерфейсінің деректер қорының негізгі мәселесін бағалаймыз. Басқа табиғи тілдерде тапсырмаларды түсіндіру үшін, бұл тапсырманың жалпы практикасы бір деректер жинағында үлгісін оқыту және оқыту үшін, жуырдағы зерттеулері жалпы сұрақтар, ең жалпы және ең ү Бірақ бұл жалпы параметр қолданылған оқыту деректерінің бөлімінен шығыс жүйелердің құндылығын бағаламайды. Біз басқа деректер жиындарын қолданатын жүйелердің құндылығын дұрыс бағалаймыз. Қарапайым Сұрақтар деректер жиынын шешу үшін жалпы сұрақтар жауаптарының сәттілігін көрсетпейді. Біз бұл мақсатта болашақ бағытты талқылаймыз.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente vertiname mūsų srities pažangą sprendžiant paprastus faktoidinius klausimus žinių bazėje, kuri yra praktiškai svarbi problem a natūralioje kalbų sąsajoje su duomenų baze. As in other natural language understanding tasks, a common practice for this task is to train and evaluate a model on a single dataset, and recent studies suggest that SimpleQuestions, the most popular and largest dataset, is nearly solved under this setting.  Tačiau šioje bendroje sistemoje nenustatyta sistemų patikimumo, išskyrus naudojamų mokymo duomenų platinimą. Mes griežtai vertiname tokią esamų sistemų patikimumą naudojant skirtingus duomenų rinkinius. Mūsų analizė, įskaitant mokymo ir bandymų duomenų rinkinių perkėlimą ir duomenų rinkinių sąjungos mokymą, rodo, kad mūsų pažanga sprendžiant paprastųjų klausimų duomenų rinkinį neparodo paprastesnio atsakymo į klausimus sėkmės. Mes aptariame galimą ateities kryptį siekiant šio tikslo.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го проценуваме напредокот на нашето поле кон решавање на едноставни фактоидни прашања преку базата на знаење, практично важен проблем во природниот јазик интерфејс на базата на податоци. Како и во другите природни задачи за разбирање на јазикот, заедничката практика за оваа задача е да се обучува и да се процени модел на еден сет на податоци, и неодамнешните студии укажуваат на тоа дека SimpleQuestions, најпопуларниот и најголемиот сет на податоци, е речиси решен во овој сет. Сепак, ова заедничко поставување не ја оценува силноста на системите надвор од дистрибуцијата на употребените податоци за обука. Ригорозно ја проценуваме ваквата силност на постоечките системи користејќи различни податоци. Нашата анализа, вклучувајќи го и префрлањето на обуките и тестовите на податоци и обуката за унија на податоците, покажува дека нашиот напредок во решавањето на податоците за едноставни прашања не покажува успех на поопшто едноставно одговорување на прашања. Разговараме за можна идна насока кон оваа цел.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita menilai kemajuan medan kita ke arah penyelesaian soalan faktoid sederhana melalui pangkalan pengetahuan, masalah yang sangat penting dalam antaramuka bahasa semulajadi ke pangkalan data. Seperti dalam tugas pemahaman bahasa semulajadi lain, praktek biasa untuk tugas ini adalah untuk melatih dan menilai model pada set data tunggal, dan kajian baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa SimpleQuestions, set data yang paling popular dan terbesar, hampir diselesaikan di bawah tetapan ini. Namun, tetapan umum ini tidak menilai kepekatan sistem diluar distribusi data latihan yang digunakan. Kami menilai dengan teliti kepekatan sistem yang ada menggunakan set data yang berbeza. Analisis kami, termasuk perubahan set data latihan dan ujian dan latihan pada satu persatuan set data, menunjukkan kemajuan kami dalam penyelesaian set data SimpleQuestions tidak menunjukkan keberhasilan menjawab soalan yang lebih sederhana umum. Kita bincangkan arah masa depan yang mungkin ke arah tujuan ini.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ ഫീല്\u200dഡിന്റെ പ്രോഗസ്ഥിതിയെ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ബേസിലേക്കുള്ള സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള മറ്റു സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d വിവേകം മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുകയും വിലയിക്കുകയും ചെയ എങ്കിലും ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനു പുറത്തുള്ള സിസ്റ്റീമുകളുടെ വസ്ത്രം വില We rigorously evaluate such robustness of existing systems using different datasets.  നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം, പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെയും പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെയും പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെയും പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെയും ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിന്റെയും മാറ്റിവെക്കുന്നതി നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലേക്ക് ഒരു ഭാവിയുടെ നേരെ സംസാരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna jevalwaw il-progress tal-qasam tagħna lejn is-soluzzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet fattojdi sempliċi fuq bażi ta’ għarfien, problem a prattikament importanti fl-interfaċċja lingwistika naturali għad-database. Bħal f’kompiti oħra ta’ fehim tal-lingwi naturali, prattika komuni għal dan il-kompitu hija t-taħriġ u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ mudell fuq sett ta’ dejta uniku, u studji riċenti jissuġġerixxu li Mistoqsijiet Simpli, l-aktar sett ta’ dejta popolari u l-akbar, huwa kważi solvut taħt dan l-ambjent. Madankollu, dan l-ambjent komuni ma jevalwax ir-robustezza tas-sistemi barra mid-distribuzzjoni tad-dejta tat-taħriġ użata. Aħna jevalwaw b’mod rigoruż tali robustezza tas-sistemi eżistenti bl-użu ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta differenti. Our analysis, including shifting of training and test datasets and training on a union of the datasets, suggests that our progress in solving SimpleQuestions dataset does not indicate the success of more general simple question answering.  Aħna niddiskutu direzzjoni futura possibbli lejn dan il-għan.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид салбарын хөгжлийг мэдлэг суурь дээр энгийн фактоид асуултуудыг шийдэхэд үнэлдэг. Байгалийн хэл интерфейст өгөгдлийн сан дээр маш чухал асуудал юм. Өөр байгалийн хэлний ажиллагааг ойлгохын тулд, энэ ажиллагааны ерөнхий дасгал нь нэг өгөгдлийн сангийн загварыг суралцаж, үнэлэх ба саяхан судалгаагаар энгийн асуултууд, хамгийн алдартай болон хамгийн том өгөгдлийн сангийн тулд бараг шийдвэрлэг Гэхдээ энэ ерөнхий тохиолдол нь хэрэглэгдсэн сургалтын өгөгдлийн хуваалцааны гадна системийн хүчтэй байдлыг үнэлгээгүй. Бид өөр өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан оршиж буй системийн маш хүчтэй байдлыг баталж байна. Бидний шинжилгээ, боловсрол, туршилтын өгөгдлийн санг шилжүүлэх, өгөгдлийн сангийн холбоотой сургалтын хөгжлийг бидний энгийн асуулт өгөгдлийн санг шийдэх хөгжлийг илүү энгийн асуулт хариултын амжилтыг илэрхийлж чадахгүй гэдгийг сан Бид энэ зорилго руу ирээдүйн замаар ярилцаж байна.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, evaluăm progresul domeniului nostru spre rezolvarea întrebărilor simple factoid peste o bază de cunoștințe, o problemă practic importantă în interfața limbajului natural cu baza de date. Ca și în alte sarcini de înțelegere a limbii naturale, o practică comună pentru această sarcină este de a instrui și de a evalua un model pe un singur set de date, iar studiile recente sugerează că SimpleQuestions, cel mai popular și cel mai mare set de date, este aproape rezolvat în această setare. Cu toate acestea, acest cadru comun nu evaluează robustețea sistemelor în afara distribuirii datelor de formare utilizate. Evaluăm riguros această robustețe a sistemelor existente folosind seturi de date diferite. Analiza noastră, inclusiv schimbarea seturilor de date de instruire și testare și formare pe o uniune a seturilor de date, sugerează că progresul nostru în rezolvarea seturilor de date SimpleQuestions nu indică succesul unui răspuns mai general la întrebări simple. Discutăm o posibilă direcție viitoare spre acest obiectiv.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule oceniamy postępy naszej dziedziny w kierunku rozwiązywania prostych pytań faktycznych poprzez bazę wiedzy, praktycznie istotny problem w interfejsie języka naturalnego z bazą danych. Podobnie jak w przypadku innych zadań rozumienia języka naturalnego, powszechną praktyką tego zadania jest trenowanie i ocena modelu na pojedynczym zbiorze danych, a najnowsze badania sugerują, że SimpleQuestions, najpopularniejszy i największy zbiór danych, jest prawie rozwiązany w tym ustawieniu. Jednak to wspólne ustawienie nie ocenia solidności systemów poza dystrybucją wykorzystywanych danych szkoleniowych. Rygorystycznie oceniamy taką solidność istniejących systemów przy użyciu różnych zbiorów danych. Nasza analiza, w tym przesunięcie zbiorów danych szkoleniowych i testowych oraz szkolenie na połączeniu zbiorów danych, sugeruje, że nasze postępy w rozwiązywaniu zbioru danych SimpleQuestions nie wskazują na sukces bardziej ogólnego prostego odpowiedzi na pytania. Omawiamy możliwy kierunek w przyszłości w kierunku tego celu.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru procjenjujemo napredak našeg polja u rješavanju jednostavnih faktoidnih pitanja na bazi znanja, praktično važan problem prirodnog jezika interfejsa baze podataka. Kao i u drugim zadacima razumevanja prirodnog jezika, zajednička praksa za ovaj zadatak je trenirati i proceniti model na jednom setu podataka, a nedavna studija ukazuju na to da se jednostavna pitanja, najpopularnija i najveća seta podataka, skoro rešila pod ovim postavkom. Međutim, ovaj zajednički nastav ne procjenjuje robustnost sustava izvan distribucije korištenih podataka o obuci. Strašno procjenjujemo takvu snagu postojećih sistema koristeći različite sete podataka. Naša analiza, uključujući prebacivanje obuke i testiranja podataka i obuku na sindikatu podataka, ukazuje na to da naš napredak u rješavanju seta podataka jednostavnih pitanja ne ukazuje na uspjeh općeg jednostavnijeg odgovora na pitanje. Razgovaramo o mogućem budućem smjeru prema ovom cilju.', 'no': 'I denne papiret evaluerer vi framgang i feltet vårt til å løyse enkle faktoidspørsmål over ein kunnskapsbasen, eit praktisk viktig problem i naturleg språk grensesnitt til databasen. Som i andre naturlege språk forstår oppgåver, er ein vanleg praksis for denne oppgåva å trenga og evaluera eit modell på ei enkelt dataset, og nyleg studier tyder på at enkelte spørsmål, den populærste og største dataset, er nesten løyst under denne innstillinga. Denne vanlege innstillinga vurderer imidlertid ikkje kraftigheten av systemet utenfor distribusjonen av dei brukte øvingsdata. Vi evaluerer såleis kraftighet av eksisterande systemar med ulike datasett. Analysen vårt, inkludert forskyving av opplæring og testdatasett og opplæring på ein union av datasett, foreslår at framgang vårt i løysing av enkelte spørsmål-datasett inneheld ikkje suksess på meir enkelt spørsmål. Vi diskuterer ein mulig framtidig retning mot dette målet.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තියේ අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරධානය ගැන අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැනගන්න, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ අනිත් ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම් වැඩක් වලින්, මේ වැඩකට සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා අව නමුත්, මේ සාමාන්\u200dය සැකසුම් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ පද්ධතියට පිටත් පිටත් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න අපි වෙනස් දත්ත සෙට් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතියේ මෙච්චර ශක්තිමත් විශේෂ කරනවා. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය, පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය දත්ත සටහන් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධයෙන් තියෙන්නේ, අපේ  අපි පුළුවන් අනාගතයක් කතා කරනවා මේ අරමුණට.', 'so': "Warqadan, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa horumarinta beertayada xagga xalliga su'aalaha sahlan ee ku saabsan basaaska aqoonta, dhibaato muhiim ah oo ku saabsan luqada dabiicadda ah xagga basaaska macluumaadka. Sida hawlaha waxgarashada afka kale ee dabiicadda ah, shaqadaas waa in lagu barto oo lagu qiimeeyo tusaale kamid ah, waxbarashada ugu dambeeyana waxay ka muuqataa in Questions Simple, kooxda macluumaadka ee ugu wada populan iyo ugu weyn, waa in lagu xalaalaalaa marka lagu jiro. Si kastaba ha ahaatee habkan caadiga ah ma qiimeeyo hababka nidaamka oo ka baxsan qaybinta macluumaadka waxbarashada lagu isticmaalayo. Si rasmi ah ayaannu ugu qiimeynaynaa qalabka nidaamka joogta ah oo isticmaalaya sawirada kala duduwan. Analyskayaga, including beddelinta waxbarashada iyo baaritaanka macluumaadka iyo waxbarashada ku saabsan ururada macluumaadka, wuxuu ka jeedinayaa in horumarinayo in aan xalli ka dhigno macluumaadka su'aalaha ee siman looma muujiyo liibaanka jawaabta su'aalka ugu fudud. Waxaynu ka sheekeynaynaa wado suurtagal ah oo u jeeda goalkan.", 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen utvärderar vi framstegen inom vårt område mot att lösa enkla faktafrågor över en kunskapsbas, ett praktiskt viktigt problem i naturligt språkgränssnitt till databas. Precis som i andra naturspråksuppgifter är en vanlig praxis för denna uppgift att träna och utvärdera en modell på en enda datauppsättning, och nyligen genomförda studier tyder på att SimpleQuestions, den mest populära och största datauppsättningen, nästan är löst under denna inställning. Denna gemensamma inställning utvärderar dock inte systemens robusthet utanför spridningen av de använda utbildningsuppgifterna. Vi utvärderar noggrant befintliga systems robusthet med hjälp av olika datauppsättningar. Vår analys, inklusive förflyttning av utbildnings- och testdatauppsättningar och utbildning i en union av datauppsättningar, tyder på att våra framsteg med att lösa SimpleQuestions-datauppsättningen inte indikerar framgång med mer generellt enkelt frågesvar. Vi diskuterar en möjlig framtida riktning mot detta mål.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் எங்கள் புலத்தின் முன்னேற்றத்தை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும் எளிய கேள்விகளை அறிவு அடிப்படையில் தீர்வு செய்யும மற்றொரு இயல்பான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பணிகளில், இந்த செயலுக்கான பொதுவான பயிற்சி ஒரு தரவு அமைப்பில் ஒரு மாதிரி பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பிடலாம். சமீபத்தில் பட ஆயினும், இந்த பொது அமைப்புகள் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பயிற்சி தரவை வழங்குவதற்கு வெளியே அமைப்புகளின் ஆட்டையை மதிப்பி நாம் வேறு தரவு அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி இருக்கும் அமைப்புகளின் இத்தகைய ஆட்சிரியலை சரியாக மதிப்பிடுகி எங்கள் ஆய்வு, பயிற்சி மற்றும் சோதனை தரவுத்தளங்கள் மாற்றுதல் மற்றும் பயிற்சி ஒரு தரவுத்தளத்தின் ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்டது, எளிய கேள்விகள் தரவுத்தளத்தை  நாம் இந்த இலக்குக்கு ஒரு சாத்தியமான எதிர்கால திசையை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم اپنے کھیتی کی پیشرفت کا ارزش کرتے ہیں ایک علم بنسس پر ساده فکتوئیڈ سؤال حل کرنے کے لئے، ایک طبیعی زبان انٹرنفس میں ایک ضروری مسئلہ ڈیٹانفس کے لئے۔ جیسے دوسری طبیعی زبان کی سمجھ کے کاموں میں، اس کام کے لئے ایک ایک ڈاٹ سٹ پر ایک نمڈل کی تعلیم اور ارزیابی کرنا ہے، اور اچھی تحقیقات کی نشانیاں دیتے ہیں کہ ساده سوال، سب سے زیادہ محبوب اور بزرگترین ڈاٹ سٹ، قریب تھا کہ اس تنظیم کے اندر However, this common setting does not evaluate the robustness of the systems outside the distribution of the used training data. ہم اس طرح موجود سیستموں کی طاقت کے مطابق مختلف ڈاٹسٹ کے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری تحلیل، ٹرینگ اور ٹیسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کی تغییر اور ٹرینگ ڈیٹ سٹ کی تعلیم میں شامل ہوتی ہے، یہ بات کرتا ہے کہ سادھے سوال ڈیٹ سٹ کے حل میں ہماری پیشرفت کو زیادہ سادھے سوال کے جواب کے کامیابی کی نشان نہیں دی ہم اس مقصد کی طرف ایک امکان مستقبل مستقبل سے بحث کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, bizning maydonimizning jarayonlarimizni qiymatimiz oddiy faktoid savollarini o'zgartirishimiz mumkin, aslida tabiiy tilning tarkibi maʼlumot bazasidagi muhim muammolar. Boshqa tilni o'rganish vazifalarda, bu vazifa uchun umumiy narsa bu bir maʼlumotlar tizimida modelni o'rganish va qiymatish mumkin. Keyingi taʼminlovchilar esa oddiy muammolar va eng katta maʼlumotlar tizimi bu moslamadan foydalanishi mumkin. Lekin, bu umumiy moslama foydalanilgan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni ajratishdan keyin tizimning ustunini qiymatmaydi. Biz har xil maʼlumot tizimlari bilan foydalanish uchun bu tizimning ko'rinishini qiymatimiz. Analyzerimiz, maʼlumotlar sohasida taʼminlovchi va sinov maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartirish va taʼminlovchi soʻrovimiz oddiy soʻrov soʻrovlar soʻrovini aniqlash muvaffaqiyatini anglatmaydi. Biz bu maqsadga keladigan kelajakdagi oyna bilamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đánh giá bước tiến của lĩnh vực này để giải quyết các câu hỏi Factionless trên một căn cứ kiến thức, một vấn đề quan trọng về giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên với cơ sở dữ liệu. Giống như các nhiệm vụ hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên khác, một tập tin phổ biến cho nhiệm vụ này là huấn luyện và đánh giá một mô hình trên một bộ dữ liệu riêng, và các nghiên cứu gần đây cho thấy rằng Đơn giản Câu hỏi, bộ dữ liệu phổ biến và lớn nhất, gần như đã được giải quyết trong cài đặt này. Tuy nhiên, môi trường chung này không đánh giá sự vững chắc của hệ thống nằm ngoài việc phân phối dữ liệu huấn luyện đã dùng. Chúng tôi đánh giá cẩn thận độ bền vững của hệ thống tồn tại nhờ các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau. Phân tích của chúng tôi, bao gồm việc chuyển đổi dữ liệu huấn luyện và thử nghiệm và huấn luyện về một sự kết hợp của các tập tin, cho thấy sự tiến bộ trong việc giải quyết các câu hỏi đơn giản hơn không cho thấy thành công của câu trả lời đơn giản hơn. Chúng ta sẽ bàn về hướng đi tương lai dẫn đến mục tiêu này.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия оценяваме напредъка на нашата област към решаване на прости фактоидни въпроси върху база от знания, практически важен проблем в интерфейса на естествения език към базата данни. Както при други задачи за разбиране на естествения език, често срещана практика за тази задача е да се обучава и оценява модел върху един набор от данни, а последните проучвания показват, че най-популярният и най-голям набор от данни, е почти решен при тази настройка. Тази обща настройка обаче не оценява здравината на системите извън разпространението на използваните данни за обучение. Ние стриктно оценяваме такава здравина на съществуващите системи, използвайки различни набори от данни. Нашият анализ, включително изместване на наборите от данни за обучение и тестове и обучение на обединение от набори от данни, показва, че напредъкът ни в решаването на набора от данни "Прости въпроси" не показва успеха на по-общия прост отговор на въпроси. Обсъждаме възможна бъдеща посока към тази цел.', 'da': 'I denne artikel evaluerer vi fremskridt i vores felt mod at løse simple faktiske spørgsmål over en vidensbase, et praktisk vigtigt problem i naturligt sprog interface til database. Som i andre natursprogforståelsesopgaver er en almindelig praksis for denne opgave at træne og evaluere en model på et enkelt datasæt, og nyere undersøgelser tyder på, at SimpleQuestions, det mest populære og største datasæt, næsten er løst under denne indstilling. Denne fælles indstilling vurderer imidlertid ikke systemernes robusthed uden for distributionen af de anvendte træningsdata. Vi vurderer grundigt eksisterende systemers robusthed ved hjælp af forskellige datasæt. Vores analyse, herunder flytning af trænings- og testdatasæt og træning i en forening af datasæt, tyder på, at vores fremskridt med at løse SimpleQuestions datasæt ikke indikerer succes med mere generel enkel spørgsmålsbesvarelse. Vi diskuterer en mulig fremtidig retning mod dette mål.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag bewerten wir den Fortschritt unseres Fachgebiets zur Lösung einfacher Faktenfragen über eine Wissensbasis, ein praktisch wichtiges Problem in der Schnittstelle natürlicher Sprache zu Datenbanken. Wie bei anderen Aufgaben des Verständnisses natürlicher Sprache besteht eine gängige Praxis für diese Aufgabe darin, ein Modell auf einem einzigen Datensatz zu trainieren und zu bewerten. Neuere Studien deuten darauf hin, dass SimpleQuestions, der beliebteste und größte Datensatz, unter dieser Einstellung fast gelöst wird. Diese gemeinsame Einstellung bewertet jedoch nicht die Robustheit der Systeme außerhalb der Verteilung der verwendeten Trainingsdaten. Diese Robustheit bestehender Systeme bewerten wir rigoros anhand verschiedener Datensätze. Unsere Analyse, einschließlich Verschiebung von Trainings- und Testdatensätzen und Training auf eine Vereinigung der Datensätze, deutet darauf hin, dass unsere Fortschritte bei der Lösung von SimpleQuestions-Datensätzen nicht auf den Erfolg einer allgemeineren einfachen Beantwortung von Fragen hinweisen. Wir diskutieren eine mögliche zukünftige Richtung auf dieses Ziel.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel evalueren we de vooruitgang van ons vakgebied naar het oplossen van eenvoudige factoïde vragen over een kennisbank, een praktisch belangrijk probleem in de natuurlijke taal interface naar database. Net als bij andere taken voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal, is een gebruikelijke praktijk voor deze taak om een model te trainen en te evalueren op een enkele dataset, en recente studies suggereren dat SimpleQuestions, de meest populaire en grootste dataset, bijna is opgelost onder deze instelling. Deze gemeenschappelijke instelling evalueert echter niet de robuustheid van de systemen buiten de distributie van de gebruikte trainingsgegevens. We evalueren deze robuustheid van bestaande systemen grondig met behulp van verschillende datasets. Onze analyse, inclusief verschuiving van trainings- en testdatasets en training op een unie van de datasets, suggereert dat onze vooruitgang in het oplossen van SimpleQuestions dataset geen indicatie is van het succes van meer algemene eenvoudige vragen beantwoorden. We bespreken een mogelijke toekomstige richting richting dit doel.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru procjenjujemo napredak našeg polja u rješavanju jednostavnih faktoidnih pitanja na bazi znanja, praktično važan problem prirodnog jezičkog interfejsa baze podataka. Kao i u drugim zadacima razumijevanja prirodnog jezika, zajednička praksa za ovaj zadatak je trenirati i procijeniti model na jednom setu podataka, a nedavna ispitivanja ukazuju na to da se jednostavna pitanja, najpopularnija i najveća seta podataka, skoro rješava pod tim postavkom. Međutim, ovaj zajednički nastav ne procjenjuje robotu sustava izvan distribucije korištenih podataka o obuci. Jako procjenjujemo takvu snagu postojećih sustava s različitim podacima. Naša analiza, uključujući pomjenu obuke i testnih seta podataka i obuku o sindikatu podataka, ukazuje na to da naš napredak u rješavanju seta podataka jednostavnih pitanja ne ukazuje na uspjeh općeg jednostavnijeg odgovora na pitanje. Razgovaramo o mogućem budućem smjeru prema ovom cilju.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشرفت زمینه\u200cمان را به راه حل سؤال ساده\u200cهای فاکتوئید بر روی یک پایگاه دانش ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، یک مشکل تقریباً مهم در ارتباط زبان طبیعی به پایگاه دادگاه. همانطور که در other languages understanding tasks, a common practice for this task is to train and evaluate a model on a single data set, and recent studies suggest that Simple Questions, the most popular and largest data set, are almost solved under this setting. با این حال، این تنظیم مشترک قدرتمندی سیستم\u200cها بیرون تقسیم داده\u200cهای آموزش استفاده می\u200cکنند را ارزیابی نمی\u200cکند. ما با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف این قدرتمندی از سیستم\u200cهای موجود را به شدت ارزش می\u200cدهیم. تحلیل ما، شامل تغییر داده\u200cهای آموزش و آزمایش و آموزش روی یک اتحاد داده\u200cهای ما، پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که پیشرفت ما در حل مجموعه داده\u200cهای ساده سوال\u200cها موفقیت پاسخ\u200cهای ساده\u200cتر از سوال\u200cهای ساده\u200cتر را نشان نمی\u200cدهد. ما در مورد یک مسیر امکان آینده به سمت این هدف صحبت می کنیم.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 우리의 분야가 지식 라이브러리의 간단한 인수 문제를 해결하는 데 있어서의 진전을 평가했다. 이것은 자연 언어와 데이터베이스 인터페이스의 실제적인 중요한 문제이다.다른 자연 언어 이해 임무와 마찬가지로 이 임무의 흔한 방법은 단일 데이터 집합에서 훈련하고 평가하는 모델이다. 최근의 연구에 따르면 가장 유행하고 가장 큰 데이터 집합인 Simple Questions는 이런 상황에서 거의 해결할 수 있다고 한다.그러나 훈련 데이터의 분포를 제외하고는 이런 통용적인 설정은 시스템의 노봉성을 평가하지 않는다.우리는 서로 다른 데이터 집합을 사용하여 기존 시스템의 노봉성을 엄격하게 평가한다.우리의 분석은 훈련과 테스트 데이터 집합의 이동과 데이터 집합에 대한 연합 훈련을 포함하여SimpleQuestions 데이터 집합을 해결하는 데 있어서의 진전이 더 일반적인 간단한 질문에 대한 대답의 성공을 나타내지 않는다는 것을 나타낸다.우리는 이 목표를 실현하는 미래의 가능한 방향을 토론했다.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons evalueer die vordering van ons veld tot eenvoudige faktoide vrae te los oor 'n kennis basis, 'n praktiese belangrike probleem in natuurlike taal koppelvlak tot databasis. Soos in ander natuurlike taal verstaan opdragte, 'n gemeenskaplike praksie vir hierdie taak is om 'n model op 'n enkele datastel te oefen en te evalueer, en onlangse studie voorstel dat Eenvoudige Vrades, die mees populêre en grootste datastel, onder hierdie opstelling naby opgelos word. Hierdie gemeenskaplike opstelling doen nie die kragtigheid van die stelsels buite van die verspreiding van die gebruikte onderwerp data evalueer nie. Ons regtig evalueer sodanige kragtigheid van bestaande stelsels deur verskillende datastelle te gebruik. Ons analisie, insluitend verskuif van onderwerp en toets datastelle en onderwerp op 'n union van die datastelle, stel voorstel dat ons vordering in die oplossing van eenvoudige vraag datastel nie die sukses van meer algemene eenvoudige vraag antwoord aanwys nie. Ons bespreek 'n moontlik toekomstige rigting teenoor hierdie doel.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunatathmini maendeleo ya uwanja wetu kwa kutatua maswali rahisi ya ukweli juu ya msingi wa maarifa, tatizo muhimu sana katika lugha ya asili kwa kutumia taarifa. Kama ilivyokuwa katika kazi nyingine za kuelewa lugha za asili, mazoea ya kawaida kwa kazi hii ni kufundisha na kutathmini muundo kwenye seti ya taarifa moja, na tafiti za hivi karibuni zinaonyesha kwamba maswali ya Simu, seti ya data maarufu zaidi na kubwa zaidi, inakaribia kutatuliwa chini ya mazingira haya. Hata hivyo, hali hii ya kawaida haitathmini ubora wa mifumo nje ya usambazaji wa data za mafunzo. Tunatathmini vizuri vifaa hivyo vya mifumo iliyopo kwa kutumia seti tofauti za taarifa. Uchambuzi wetu, ikiwa ni pamoja na mabadiliko ya mafunzo na taarifa za kujaribu na mafunzo katika muungano wa seti za data, unapendekeza kwamba maendeleo yetu katika kutatua seti ya maswali ya Simu hayajaonyesha mafanikio ya kujibu swali moja kwa moja. Tunajadili mwelekeo wa mustakabali kwa lengo hili.', 'sq': 'In this paper, we evaluate the progress of our field toward solving simple factoid questions over a knowledge base, a practically important problem in natural language interface to database.  Si në detyrat e tjera natyrore të kuptimit të gjuhës, një praktikë e përbashkët për këtë detyrë është të trajnohet dhe vlerësohet një model në një set të vetëm të dhënash dhe studimet e fundit sugjerojnë se SimpleQuestions, set më popullor dhe më i madh i të dhënash, është gati zgjidhur nën këtë setting. Megjithatë, kjo vendosje e përbashkët nuk vlerëson fuqinë e sistemeve jashtë shpërndarjes së të dhënave të trajnimit të përdorur. Ne vlerësojmë në mënyrë rigoroze aq të fortë të sistemeve ekzistuese duke përdorur grupe të dhënash të ndryshme. Analiza jonë, duke përfshirë zhvendosjen e treinimit dhe testimit të të dhënave dhe treinimin në një bashkim të të dhënave, sugjeron se përparimi ynë në zgjidhjen e të dhënave të çështjeve të thjeshta nuk tregon suksesin e përgjigjes më të përgjithshme të pyetjeve të thjeshta. Ne diskutojmë një drejtim të mundshëm të ardhshëm drejt këtij qëllimi.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz öz alanymyzyň ösütini bilgi üýtgetmek üçin basit faktoid soraglaryny bilgi üýtgetmek üçin deňleýäris, tebigy dil interfejesinde database üçin wajyp mesele. Başga tebigat dilinde düşünýän zadlary ýaly, bu zadyň umumy üçin bir sanat setirinde bir nusga öwrenmek we çözümlenmek üçin düzenlemekdir. Soňky öwrenmeler "Simple Questions", "iň meşhur we iň uly sanat setirinde" diýip çaklanýarlar. Ýöne bu orta çykyş sistemlerin ýüzünde ullanýan öwrenme maglumatyň daşyndaky güýçligini çykarmaz. Biz bar sistemalaryň beýleki maglumatlary ulanyp bardygyny dogry çykýarys. Biziň analýusymyz, okuw we test setirlerini we veri setirleriniň birleşiginde okuw taýýarlanmagymyz, basit soraglaryň çözmegimiziň ösümligimiz bejerilmegi belli etmeýär. Biz bu maksadyň tarapyna mümkin gelejekde ýokary gürrüň berýäris.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የምድራታችንን የውሃት ጥያቄን ለማፍረስ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በሌላ አካባቢ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስራዎችን እንደሚያስተምሩ፣ ለዚህ ስራ የተለየ ትምህርት ሞዴል በአንድ ዳታ ማስተምርና ማስተምር ነው፣ የቀድሞውም ትምህርት ጥያቄዎች፣ በጣም ትልቁ እና ትልቁ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ ከዚህ ሥርዓት በታች ሊፈጸም ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ የተጠቃሚ ግንኙነት የተጠቃሚ ዳታዎችን ከመከልከል ውጭ የስርዓቱን ልብስ አያስተምርም፡፡ We rigorously evaluate such robustness of existing systems using different datasets.  ትምህርታችን፣ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ እና የዳታዎችን ማቀናጃ እና ትምህርት ማቀናኘት እና የዳታ ማኅበረሰብ፣ ቀላል ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍታት የግንኙነታችንን ማቀናኘት የሚያስታውቃል፡፡ ወደዚህ አቃውሞ የሚቻለውን የቀድሞውን መንገድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengevaluasi kemajuan bidang kami menuju memecahkan pertanyaan faktoid sederhana melalui pangkalan pengetahuan, masalah praktis penting dalam antaramuka bahasa alam ke pangkalan data. Seperti dalam tugas pemahaman bahasa alam lainnya, praktek umum untuk tugas ini adalah melatih dan mengevaluasi model pada set data tunggal, dan studi baru-baru ini menyarankan bahwa SimpleQuestions, set data yang paling populer dan terbesar, hampir diselesaikan di bawah set ini. Namun, pengaturan umum ini tidak mengevaluasi kepekatan sistem diluar distribusi data pelatihan yang digunakan. We rigorously evaluate such robustness of existing systems using different datasets.  Analisis kami, termasuk pemindahan dari pelatihan dan tes dataset dan pelatihan pada sebuah persatuan dataset, menunjukkan bahwa kemajuan kami dalam memecahkan set data SimpleQuestions tidak menunjukkan sukses dari menjawab pertanyaan sederhana secara umum. Kita membahas kemungkinan arah masa depan menuju tujuan ini.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আমাদের ক্ষেত্রের উন্নয়নের পরিমাণ মূল্যায়ন করি একটি জ্ঞানের বেসের উপর সাধারণ ফ্যাক্টোইড প্রশ্ন সমাধানের জন্য। এটি  অন্যান্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় বুঝতে পারার কাজের মত, এই কাজের জন্য একটি সাধারণ প্রশিক্ষণ এবং একটি ডাটাসেটে মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ ও মূল্যায়ন করার জন্য, আর সম্প্রতি গবেষণা পরামর্শ দ তবে এই সাধারণ বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করা প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য বিতরণের বাইরে সিস্টেমের পোশাকের মূল্য মান নেই। আমরা বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে বিদ্যমান বিভিন্ন সিস্টেমের এই ধরনের রাস্তার মূল্যায়ন করি। আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা সংক্রান্ত তথ্য পরিবর্তন এবং প্রশিক্ষণ এবং ডাটাসেটের একটি ইউনিয়নের প্রশিক্ষণ, পরামর্শ দেয় যে সাধারণ আমরা এই লক্ষ্যের দিকে সম্ভাব্য ভবিষ্যতের দিকে আলোচনা করি।', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, sahamızın tədbirini bilgi üssünün üstündə basit faktoid suallarını çəkmək üçün, təbiətli dil интерфейсin in məlumatını təhsil edirik. Başqa təbiətli dil anlama işləri kimi, bu işin ortaq praksisi tək veri qutusunda modeli təhsil etmək və değerlendirməkdir. Sonrakı təhsil işləri, ən qüvvətli və ən böyük veri qutusu, bu qutunun altında basit suallar çəkilir. Lakin bu ortaq qurğu istifadə edilən təhsil məlumatının dağılmasından başqa sistemlərin sərtliyini değerləşdirmir. Biz müxtəlif veri qurğuları ilə müxtəlif sistemlərin böyük güclüyünü çox değerləşdiririk. Bizim analizimiz, təhsil, sınama veri setlərini və veri setlərin birlikdə təhsil edilməsini də dahil edərək, Simple Questions veri setlərini çəkmək üçün təhsil etməmizin daha çox asan sual cavabını göstərməsini iddia edir. Biz bu məqsədilə mümkün olaraq gələcək yolu mübahisə edirik.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru procjenjujemo napredak našeg polja u rješavanju jednostavnih faktoidnih pitanja na bazi znanja, praktično važan problem prirodnog jezika interfejsa baze podataka. Kao i u drugim zadacima razumijevanja prirodnog jezika, zajednička praksa za ovaj zadatak je trenirati i procijeniti model na jednom setu podataka, a nedavna studija ukazuju na to da se jednostavna pitanja, najpopularnija i najveća seta podataka, skoro riješi u ovom stanju. Međutim, ovaj zajednički nastav ne procjenjuje robotu sustava izvan distribucije korištenih podataka o obuci. Jako procjenjujemo takvu snagu postojećih sustava koristeći različite datasete. Naša analiza, uključujući prebacivanje obuke i testnih seta podataka i obuku na sindikatu podataka, ukazuje da naš napredak u rješavanju seta podataka jednostavnih pitanja ne ukazuje na uspjeh općeg jednostavnijeg odgovora na pitanje. Razgovaramo o mogućem budućem smjeru prema ovom cilju.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku hodnotíme pokrok našeho oboru směrem k řešení jednoduchých faktických otázek prostřednictvím znalostní báze, prakticky důležitého problému v rozhraní přirozeného jazyka s databází. Stejně jako u jiných úkolů porozumění přirozenému jazyku, běžnou praxí pro tento úkol je trénovat a vyhodnocovat model na jediné datové sadě a nedávné studie naznačují, že SimpleQuestions, nejpopulárnější a největší datová sada, je téměř řešena v tomto nastavení. Toto společné nastavení však nehodnotí robustnost systémů mimo distribuci použitých tréninkových dat. Pečlivě hodnotíme tuto robustnost stávajících systémů pomocí různých datových sad. Naše analýza, včetně posunu tréninkových a testovacích dat a školení na sjednocení datových sad, naznačuje, že náš pokrok v řešení datových sad SimpleQuestions nenaznačuje úspěch obecnějších jednoduchých odpovědí na otázky. Diskutujeme o možném budoucím směru k tomuto cíli.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös hindame oma valdkonna edusamme lihtsate faktiliste küsimuste lahendamisel teadmistebaasi üle, mis on praktiliselt oluline probleem looduskeele liideses andmebaasiga. Nagu teiste looduskeele mõistmise ülesannete puhul, on selle ülesande tavaliseks tavaks koolitada ja hinnata mudelit ühe andmekogumi põhjal ning hiljutised uuringud näitavad, et SimpleQuestions, kõige populaarsem ja suurim andmekogum, on selle seadme puhul peaaegu lahendatud. Selles ühises sättes ei hinnata siiski süsteemide töökindlust väljaspool kasutatud koolitusandmete levitamist. Hindame rangelt olemasolevate süsteemide tugevust erinevate andmekogumite abil. Meie analüüs, sealhulgas koolitus- ja testiandmekogumite ümberpaigutamine ning koolitus andmekogumite liidu kohta, näitab, et meie edusammud SimpleQuestions andmekogumi lahendamisel ei näita üldisemate lihtsate küsimuste vastuste edukust. Arutame võimalikku tuleviku suunda selle eesmärgi suunas.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä arvioimme kenttämme edistymistä yksinkertaisten faktoiden kysymysten ratkaisemisessa tietopohjan kautta, joka on käytännössä tärkeä ongelma luonnollisen kielen rajapinnassa tietokantaan. Kuten muissakin luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisen tehtävissä, yleinen käytäntö tässä tehtävässä on kouluttaa ja arvioida mallia yksittäisen aineiston pohjalta, ja viimeaikaiset tutkimukset viittaavat siihen, että SimpleQuestions, suosituin ja suurin aineisto, on lähes ratkaistu tässä tilanteessa. Tämä yhteinen asetus ei kuitenkaan arvioi järjestelmien kestävyyttä käytettyjen koulutustietojen jakelun ulkopuolella. Arvioimme tarkasti olemassa olevien järjestelmien kestävyyttä eri tietoaineistojen avulla. Analyysimme, mukaan lukien koulutus- ja testiaineistojen siirtäminen ja tietoaineistojen yhteenliittymään liittyvä koulutus, viittaa siihen, että edistyminen SimpleQuestions-aineiston ratkaisemisessa ei osoita yleisempien yksinkertaisten kysymysten vastaamisen onnistumista. Keskustelemme mahdollisesta tulevasta suunnasta kohti tätä tavoitetta.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք գնահատում ենք մեր ոլորտի առաջընթացը պարզ փակտոիդ հարցերի լուծման համար գիտելիքի հիմքի միջոցով, որը գրեթե կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի ինտերֆեյսը բազայի վրա: Ինչպես նաև այլ բնական լեզվի հասկանալու խնդիրներում, այս խնդիրը ընդհանուր գործընթացն է մեկ տվյալների համակարգի մոդելի ուսումնասիրելն ու գնահատումը, և վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ պարզ հարցերը, ամենահայտնի և ամենամեծ տվյալների համակարգը Այնուամենայնիվ, այս ընդհանուր միջոցը չի գնահատում օգտագործված ուսումնասիրության տվյալների տարածումից դուրս գտնվող համակարգերի կայունությունը: Մենք խիստ գնահատում ենք գոյություն ունեցող համակարգերի այդպիսի կայունությունը օգտագործելով տարբեր տվյալներ: Մեր վերլուծությունը, ներառյալ ուսումնասիրության և փորձարկումների տվյալների համակարգերի տեղափոխումը և տվյալների համակարգերի միավորման ուսումնասիրությունը, առաջարկում է, որ մեր առաջընթացը պարզ հարցերի տվյալների համակարգի լուծման մեջ չի նշանակում ավելի ընդհանուր պարզ Մենք քննարկում ենք ապագայի հնարավոր ուղղությունը այս նպատակի ուղղությամբ:', 'ca': "En aquest paper, evaluem el progrès del nostre camp cap a resoldre preguntes simples de factoides sobre una base de coneixement, un problema pràcticament important en la interfície natural de llenguatge a la base de dades. Com en altres tasques naturals de comprensió del llenguatge, una pràctica comú d'aquesta tasca és treinar i evaluar un model en un únic conjunt de dades, i estudis recents suggereixen que SimpleQuestions, el conjunt de dades més popular i més gran, és gairebé resolt en aquest conjunt. No obstant això, aquest entorn comú no evalua la robustet dels sistemes fora de la distribució de les dades d'entrenament utilitzades. We rigorously evaluate such robustness of existing systems using different datasets.  La nostra anàlisi, incloent el canvi de conjunts de dades d'entrenament i prova i l'entrenament en una unió de conjunts de dades, suggereix que el nostre progrés en resoldre el conjunt de dades SimpleQuestions no indica l'èxit d'una resposta a preguntes més senzilla. We discuss a possible future direction toward this goal.", 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙaddara mafarin firgita zuwa a sola masu tambayar faktoid masu sauƙi a kan basin wani ilmi, wata ma'abuci na muhimu a cikin fassarar harshe na natsuwa zuwa ga database. Kama cikin wasu aikin masu fahimtar maganar harshen na natura, aikin ɗabi'a yana tafiyar da su kuma a kan hanci wata misãlai kan daidaita ɗayan database, kuma masu ƙari karatun sunan cẽwa, Istagan na Similar, da mafi yawan jama'a da mafi girma, za'a bayyana shi a ƙarƙashin wannan daidaita. Amma, wannan daidaita ɗabi'a bã ya iya ƙayyade nau'in na'urar tsarin na'urar da ake amfani da. Ina ƙaddara wannan tufãfin na'urar na'ura da ake amfani da tsari dabam-daban. Anayyayinmu, kamar shirin shiftin mafarin na tsari da aka jarraba danne-danne da shirin haɗiya na danne-danganta, yana ƙarantar cewa gabatarmu a cikin kure ga masu Similar tambayar Istagan ba ta ƙayyade babban rabo da matsala masu sauki. Munã jãyayya wata direction mai iya gaba ga wannan goani.", 'sk': 'V prispevku ocenjujemo napredek našega področja pri reševanju preprostih dejanskih vprašanj preko baze znanja, ki je praktično pomemben problem v naravnem jeziku vmesnika do baze podatkov. Kot pri drugih nalogah razumevanja naravnega jezika je običajna praksa za to nalogo usposabljanje in vrednotenje modela na enem samem naboru podatkov, nedavne študije pa kažejo, da je SimpleQuestions, najbolj priljubljen in največji nabor podatkov, skoraj rešen v tej nastavitvi. Vendar ta skupna nastavitev ne ocenjuje robustnosti sistemov zunaj distribucije uporabljenih podatkov o usposabljanju. Tovrstno robustnost obstoječih sistemov strogo ocenjujemo z uporabo različnih naborov podatkov. Naša analiza, vključno s premikom naborov podatkov o usposabljanju in testiranju ter usposabljanjem o združitvi naborov podatkov, kaže, da naš napredek pri reševanju nabora podatkov SimpleQuestions ne kaže na uspeh splošnejšega preprostega odgovora na vprašanja. Razpravljamo o možni prihodnji usmeritvi k temu cilju.', 'jv': 'Nang mapang iki, kita deweke nggawe perusahaan kanggo langgar sampeyan kang nggawe perusahaan bakal kang sampeyan pangong matanjakan, kuwi supoyo sing apik dhéwé Where is the language Taning ing ing perbudhakan langkung sabên langgar sampeyang operasi yang segala macem, kawula pratik sing mengkar nggawe sistem kuwi nggawe dataset sing bakal, karo akeh basa sing ngerasakno banget "Simplequestion", sing paling awak dhéwé, populêr lan tambah dataset sing gak dhéwé, sak ngetau alah sak nyong iki. Nanging, kaletedekaan iki ora deweke nggawe sistem sing wis nggawe dadi nyong nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno ning akeh sistem sing gak adhil ngono dataset sing perusahaan. Panjenenganipun dhéwé, mulai mbukakipun teka-teka lan aturan dataset sing beraksi perusahaan dataset, supoyo nggawe perusahaan kanggo ngilanggar dataset Simplequestion Awak dhéwé pisan nganggo langkung sampeyan kanggo iki.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מעריכים את התקדמות של השדה שלנו לפתור שאלות פקטואידיות פשוטות על בסיס ידע, בעיה חשובה למעשה במשקף שפה טבעי למאגר נתונים. כמו במשימות הבנה של שפת טבעיות אחרות, פרקטיקה משותפת למשימה הזאת היא לאמן ולעריך מודל על קבוצת נתונים אחת, ומחקרים לאחרונה מציעים ששאלות פשוטות, קבוצת נתונים הכי פופולרית והגדולה ביותר, כמעט נפתרה תחת הסטה הזאת. However, this common setting does not evaluate the robustness of the systems outside of the distribution of the used training data.  אנו מעריכים באופן מדויק את החזקה כזו של מערכות קיימות באמצעות קבוצות נתונים שונות. הניתוח שלנו, כולל העברה של תאימות ומערכת נתונים מבחנים ואימונים על איגוד של קבוצות נתונים, מציע שההתקדמות שלנו בפתרון קבוצת נתונים של שאלות פשוטות לא מצביעה על הצלחה של תשובות לשאלות פשוטות יותר. אנחנו מדברים על כיוון עתיד אפשרי לכיוון המטרה הזאת.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་སྒེར་གྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དེ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་བའི་དོན་དག་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏུ་གཏ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གིས་ལྟ་བུའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་གནད་སྡུད་ཅིག་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་ཚད་འཛིན་ཐབས་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ན། ཡིན་ནའང་། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འདིས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་མི་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་མ་འདྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་པར་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་རིགས་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇལ་རྩིས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་། གློག་འཕྲིན་དང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས ང་ཚོས་འབྱུང་སྲིད་པའི་མ་འོངས་པར་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་ಕಡོག་ཁར་ཅིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Scientific Keyphrase Identification and Classification by Pre-Trained Language Models Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'ar': 'التعرف على عبارة المفاتيح العلمية وتصنيفها من خلال نماذج لغوية مُدربة مسبقًا تعلم نقل المهام الوسيطة', 'es': 'Identificación y clasificación de frases clave científicas mediante modelos lingüísticos preentrenados Aprendizaje intermedio de transferencia de tareas', 'pt': 'Identificação e Classificação Científicas de Frases-Chave por Modelos de Linguagem Pré-treinados Aprendizagem de Transferência de Tarefa Intermediária', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルによる科学的キーフレーズの識別と分類中間タスク転送学習', 'zh': '以预训言科学要短语识类 中级迁学', 'fr': 'Identification et classification des phrases clés scientifiques par des modèles linguistiques préformés Apprentissage par transfert de tâches intermédiaires', 'ru': 'Идентификация и классификация научной ключевой фразы по предварительно обученным языковым моделям Промежуточное обучение передаче задач', 'hi': 'वैज्ञानिक Keyphrase पहचान और वर्गीकरण द्वारा पूर्व प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल मध्यवर्ती कार्य स्थानांतरण सीखने', 'ga': 'Aithint agus Aicmiú Eochairfhrása Eolaíoch de réir Múnlaí Teanga RéamhOilte Foghlaim Aistrithe Tasc Meánrang', 'ka': 'მეცნიერი კლავიფიზაცია და კლასიფიზაცია წინ შესწავლობული ენის მოდელების ინტერმედიაცია სამუშაო გატანსტრიქცია', 'hu': 'Tudományos kulcskifejezések azonosítása és osztályozása előkészített nyelvi modellek szerint Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση και ταξινόμηση επιστημονικών λέξεων-κλειδιών με βάση τα προσχεδιασμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα Ενδιάμεση μεταφορά εργασιών Μάθηση', 'it': 'Identificazione e classificazione scientifica delle frasi chiave secondo modelli linguistici pre-formati', 'lt': 'Mokslinės pagrindinės frazės identifikavimas ir klasifikavimas pagal iš anksto parengtus kalbos modelius Tarpinis užduočių perdavimo mokymasis', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілерінің ғылыми кілттерді идентификациялау және классификациялау', 'mk': 'Scientific Keyphrase Identification and Classification by Pre-Trained Language Models Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'ml': 'Scientific Keyphrase Identification and Classification by Pre-Trained Language Models Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-frażi ewlenija xjentifika skont mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel Tagħlim intermedju tat-trasferiment tal-kompiti', 'ms': 'Pengenalan dan Klasifikasi Frasa Kunci Saintifik Oleh Model Bahasa Latihan-Latihan Pemindahan Tugas Pertengahan', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлох болон ангилах хэл загваруудын дундаж ажил дамжуулах суралцах', 'no': 'Identifikasjon og klassifikasjon av vitenskapelige nøkkelfrasar ved føreøvinga språk- modeller mellom læring av oppgåveoverføring', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja i klasyfikacja fraz kluczowych naukowych według modeli językowych Wstępnie przeszkolonych', 'sr': 'Znanstvena ključna fraza identifikacija i klasifikacija predobučenih jezičkih modela', 'ro': 'Identificarea și clasificarea frazelor cheie științifice după modele lingvistice pregătite', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාන්\u200dය වාක්යාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සහ ක්ලාසිකේෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවක් මොඩිල්ස් අතරික්ෂණය වාර්තාව', 'ta': 'அறிவியல் விசைப்பலகை அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் முன்பு பயிற்சி மொழி மோடத்தால் நடுநிலை பணி மாற்றி கற்றல்', 'so': 'Identification and Classification by pre-Trained Luqada Models Intermediate Transfer Task', 'sv': 'Identifiering och klassificering av vetenskapliga nyckelfraser enligt färdigutbildade språkmodeller Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'ur': 'سائنسیٹ کیفریز شناسایت اور کلاسیفٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Nhận diện và Đánh dấu bằng thẻ căn bản:', 'bg': 'Научна ключова фраза Идентификация и класификация по предварително обучени езикови модели Междинно обучение за трансфер на задачи', 'hr': 'Znanstvena ključna fraza Identifikacija i klasifikacija predobučenih jezičkih modela', 'da': 'Identifikation og klassificering af videnskabelige nøglesætninger efter førstetrænede sprogmodeller Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'nl': 'Wetenschappelijke sleutelzin Identificatie en Classificatie door Vooropgeleide Taalmodellen Intermediair Taakoverdracht Leren', 'de': 'Wissenschaftliche Keyphrasen-Identifikation und Klassifizierung durch vortrainierte Sprachmodelle Intermediate Task Transfer Learning', 'id': 'Identifikasi dan Klasifikasi Frasa Kunci ilmiah oleh Model Bahasa Berlatihan Pra-Belajar Transfer Tugas Intermediate', 'fa': 'شناسایی و کلید شناسایی کلید علمی توسط مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبان متوسط یادگیری انتقال کار', 'ko': '예비 훈련 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 과학 키워드 식별과 분류 중간 임무 이동 학습', 'sw': 'Utambulisho na Kuhitimisha Tamko la Sayansi na Utafiti na Modeli wa Tafsiri wa Lugha', 'af': 'Wetenskaplike sleutelfrase Identifikasie en Klassifikasie deur vooraf-oefende taal model Intermediate Opdrag Oordrag Leer', 'sq': 'Identifikimi dhe klasifikimi i frazës kyçe shkencore nga modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhës Mësimi ndërmjet transferimit të detyrave', 'tr': 'Ilmi Mody Çykyş', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Գիտական հիմնական արտահայտությունը և դասակարգումը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների օգնությամբ', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə Eğitimli Dil Modellərinin İşləndirməsi İşləndirməsi İşləndirməsi İşləndirməsi', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা মোডেল ইন্টারমেডিয়েট কাজ পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Znanstvena ključna fraza identifikacija i klasifikacija predobučenih jezičkih modela', 'cs': 'Identifikace a klasifikace vědeckých klíčových frází podle předškolených jazykových modelů', 'ca': 'Identificació i classificació científices de frases clau per models de llenguatge pré-capacitats Aprendiment intermedi de transferència de tasques', 'et': 'Teadusliku võtmerfraasi identifitseerimine ja klassifitseerimine eelõpetatud keelemudelite järgi', 'fi': 'Tieteellinen avainlause Tunnistaminen ja luokittelu esikoulutettujen kielimallien mukaan Väliaikainen tehtävien siirto Oppiminen', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Identifikacija in klasifikacija znanstvenih ključnih fraz po predusposabljenih jezikovnih modelih Vmesno učenje prenosa nalog', 'jv': 'Validity', 'he': 'זיהוי ומסגרת משפטים מדעיים על ידי דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིག་གིས་གཙོ་ཚིག་ངོས་འཛིན་དང་དབྱེ་རིམ'}
{'en': 'Scientific keyphrase identification and classification is the task of detecting and classifying keyphrases from scholarly text with their types from a set of predefined classes. This task has a wide range of benefits, but it is still challenging in performance due to the lack of large amounts of labeled data required for training deep neural models. In order to overcome this challenge, we explore pre-trained language models BERT and SciBERT with intermediate task transfer learning, using 42 data-rich related intermediate-target task combinations. We reveal that intermediate task transfer learning on SciBERT induces a better starting point for target task fine-tuning compared with BERT and achieves competitive performance in scientific keyphrase identification and classification compared to both previous works and strong baselines. Interestingly, we observe that BERT with intermediate task transfer learning fails to improve the performance of scientific keyphrase identification and classification potentially due to significant catastrophic forgetting. This result highlights that scientific knowledge achieved during the pre-training of language models on large scientific collections plays an important role in the target tasks. We also observe that sequence tagging related intermediate tasks, especially syntactic structure learning tasks such as POS Tagging, tend to work best for scientific keyphrase identification and classification.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد الكلمات الرئيسية العلمية وتصنيفها مهمة الكشف عن العبارات المفتاحية من النص الأكاديمي وتصنيفها مع أنواعها من مجموعة من الفئات المحددة مسبقًا. تتمتع هذه المهمة بمجموعة واسعة من الفوائد ، لكنها لا تزال تمثل تحديًا في الأداء بسبب نقص كميات كبيرة من البيانات المصنفة المطلوبة لتدريب النماذج العصبية العميقة. للتغلب على هذا التحدي ، نستكشف نماذج اللغة BERT و SciBERT المدربة مسبقًا مع تعلم نقل المهام الوسيطة ، باستخدام 42 مجموعة مهام ذات هدف وسيط غنية بالبيانات. نكشف أن تعلم نقل المهام الوسيطة على SciBERT يحث على نقطة انطلاق أفضل للضبط الدقيق للمهمة المستهدفة مقارنةً بـ BERT ويحقق أداءً تنافسيًا في تحديد الكلمات الرئيسية العلمية وتصنيفها مقارنة بكل من الأعمال السابقة وخطوط الأساس القوية. ومن المثير للاهتمام ، أننا نلاحظ أن BERT مع تعلم نقل المهام الوسيطة يفشل في تحسين أداء التعرف على عبارة المفاتيح العلمية وتصنيفها بسبب النسيان الكارثي الكبير. تسلط هذه النتيجة الضوء على أن المعرفة العلمية التي تحققت أثناء التدريب المسبق للنماذج اللغوية على مجموعات علمية كبيرة تلعب دورًا مهمًا في المهام المستهدفة. نلاحظ أيضًا أن المهام الوسيطة ذات الصلة بترميز التسلسل ، وخاصة مهام تعلم البنية النحوية مثل علامات نقاط البيع ، تميل إلى العمل بشكل أفضل لتحديد عبارة المفاتيح العلمية وتصنيفها.', 'pt': 'A identificação e classificação de frases-chave científicas é a tarefa de detectar e classificar frases-chave de texto acadêmico com seus tipos de um conjunto de classes predefinidas. Essa tarefa tem uma ampla gama de benefícios, mas ainda é um desafio no desempenho devido à falta de grandes quantidades de dados rotulados necessários para treinar modelos neurais profundos. Para superar esse desafio, exploramos modelos de linguagem pré-treinados BERT e SciBERT com aprendizado de transferência de tarefa intermediária, usando 42 combinações de tarefas de destino intermediário relacionadas ricas em dados. Nós revelamos que o aprendizado de transferência de tarefas intermediárias no SciBERT induz um melhor ponto de partida para o ajuste fino da tarefa alvo em comparação com o BERT e alcança um desempenho competitivo na identificação e classificação de frases-chave científicas em comparação com trabalhos anteriores e linhas de base fortes. Curiosamente, observamos que o BERT com aprendizado de transferência de tarefa intermediária não melhora o desempenho da identificação e classificação científica da frase-chave potencialmente devido ao esquecimento catastrófico significativo. Esse resultado destaca que o conhecimento científico alcançado durante o pré-treinamento de modelos de linguagem em grandes coleções científicas desempenha um papel importante nas tarefas-alvo. Também observamos que tarefas intermediárias relacionadas à marcação de sequência, especialmente tarefas de aprendizado de estrutura sintática, como marcação POS, tendem a funcionar melhor para identificação e classificação científica de frases-chave.', 'es': 'La identificación y clasificación de frases clave científicas es la tarea de detectar y clasificar frases clave del texto académico con sus tipos de un conjunto de clases predefinidas. Esta tarea tiene una amplia gama de beneficios, pero sigue siendo un desafío en cuanto al rendimiento debido a la falta de grandes cantidades de datos etiquetados necesarios para entrenar modelos neuronales profundos. Para superar este desafío, exploramos los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados BERT y SciBERT con aprendizaje intermedio de transferencia de tareas, utilizando 42 combinaciones de tareas de objetivo intermedio relacionadas con abundantes datos. Revelamos que el aprendizaje intermedio de transferencia de tareas en SciBERT induce un mejor punto de partida para el ajuste de las tareas objetivo en comparación con BERT y logra un rendimiento competitivo en la identificación y clasificación de frases clave científicas en comparación con trabajos anteriores y bases de referencia sólidas. Curiosamente, observamos que BERT con aprendizaje intermedio de transferencia de tareas no logra mejorar el rendimiento de la identificación y clasificación de frases clave científicas, potencialmente debido a un olvido catastrófico significativo. Este resultado destaca que el conocimiento científico alcanzado durante la formación previa de modelos lingüísticos en grandes colecciones científicas desempeña un papel importante en las tareas objetivo. También observamos que las tareas intermedias relacionadas con el etiquetado de secuencias, especialmente las tareas de aprendizaje de la estructura sintáctica, como el etiquetado POS, tienden a funcionar mejor para la identificación y clasificación de frases clave científicas.', 'fr': "L'identification et la classification scientifiques des phrases clés consistent à détecter et à classer les phrases clés d'un texte scientifique avec leurs types à partir d'un ensemble de classes prédéfinies. Cette tâche présente de nombreux avantages, mais elle reste difficile en termes de performances en raison du manque de grandes quantités de données étiquetées requises pour l'entraînement de modèles neuronaux profonds. Afin de surmonter ce défi, nous explorons des modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés BERT et SciBERT avec apprentissage par transfert de tâches intermédiaires, en utilisant 42 combinaisons de tâches intermédiaires et cibles associées riches en données. Nous révélons que l'apprentissage par transfert de tâches intermédiaires sur SciBERT induit un meilleur point de départ pour l'affinement de la tâche cible par rapport au BERT et permet d'obtenir des performances compétitives dans l'identification et la classification scientifiques des phrases clés par rapport aux travaux précédents et aux bases de référence solides. Fait intéressant, nous observons que le BERT avec apprentissage par transfert de tâches intermédiaires ne parvient pas à améliorer les performances d'identification et de classification scientifiques des phrases clés, potentiellement en raison d'un oubli catastrophique important. Ce résultat souligne que les connaissances scientifiques acquises lors de la pré-formation de modèles linguistiques sur de grandes collections scientifiques jouent un rôle important dans les tâches cibles. Nous observons également que les tâches intermédiaires liées au marquage de séquence, en particulier les tâches d'apprentissage de la structure syntaxique telles que le marquage POS, ont tendance à mieux fonctionner pour l'identification et la classification scientifiques des phrases clés.", 'ja': '科学的キーフレーズの識別と分類は、事前定義されたクラスのセットから、学術的なテキストからキーフレーズとそのタイプを検出して分類する作業です。 このタスクには幅広い利点がありますが、ディープニューラルモデルのトレーニングに必要な大量のラベル付きデータが不足しているため、パフォーマンスが依然として難しいです。 この課題を克服するために、私たちは42のデータ豊富な関連する中間目標タスクの組み合わせを使用して、中間タスク転送学習を備えた事前トレーニングされた言語モデルBERTとSciBERTを探求します。 SciBERTの中間タスク転送学習は、BERTと比較してターゲットタスク微調整のためのより良い出発点を誘導し、以前の作品と強力なベースラインの両方と比較して、科学的キーフレーズの識別と分類において競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成することを明らかにしました。 興味深いことに、私たちは、中間的なタスク転送学習を伴うBERTが、重大な壊滅的忘却に起因する可能性のある科学的なキーフレーズの識別と分類のパフォーマンスを改善することができないことを観察します。 この結果は、大規模な科学コレクションに関する言語モデルの事前トレーニング中に達成された科学的知識が、ターゲットタスクにおいて重要な役割を果たすことを強調している。 また、シーケンスタグ付けに関連する中間タスク、特にPOSタグ付けなどの構文構造学習タスクは、科学的キーフレーズの識別と分類に最適である傾向があることも観察しています。', 'hi': 'वैज्ञानिक कीफ्रेज़ पहचान और वर्गीकरण पूर्वनिर्धारित कक्षाओं के एक सेट से अपने प्रकार के साथ विद्वानों के पाठ से कीफ़्रेज़ का पता लगाने और वर्गीकृत करने का कार्य है। इस कार्य में लाभों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला है, लेकिन गहरे तंत्रिका मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण के लिए आवश्यक लेबल डेटा की बड़ी मात्रा की कमी के कारण यह अभी भी प्रदर्शन में चुनौतीपूर्ण है। इस चुनौती को दूर करने के लिए, हम 42 डेटा-समृद्ध संबंधित मध्यवर्ती-लक्ष्य कार्य संयोजनों का उपयोग करके मध्यवर्ती कार्य हस्तांतरण सीखने के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल BERT और SciBERT का पता लगाते हैं। हम बताते हैं कि SciBERT पर मध्यवर्ती कार्य हस्तांतरण सीखने BERT की तुलना में लक्ष्य कार्य ठीक ट्यूनिंग के लिए एक बेहतर प्रारंभिक बिंदु को प्रेरित करता है और पिछले कार्यों और मजबूत बेसलाइन दोनों की तुलना में वैज्ञानिक कीफ्रेज़ पहचान और वर्गीकरण में प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। दिलचस्प बात यह है कि, हम देखते हैं कि मध्यवर्ती कार्य हस्तांतरण सीखने के साथ BERT वैज्ञानिक keyphrase पहचान और वर्गीकरण के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने में विफल रहता है संभावित रूप से महत्वपूर्ण विनाशकारी भूल के कारण। यह परिणाम इस बात पर प्रकाश डालता है कि बड़े वैज्ञानिक संग्रहों पर भाषा मॉडल के पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण के दौरान प्राप्त वैज्ञानिक ज्ञान लक्ष्य कार्यों में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। हम यह भी देखते हैं कि अनुक्रम टैगिंग से संबंधित मध्यवर्ती कार्य, विशेष रूप से वाक्यात्मक संरचना सीखने के कार्य जैसे पीओएस टैगिंग, वैज्ञानिक कीफ्रेज़ पहचान और वर्गीकरण के लिए सबसे अच्छा काम करते हैं।', 'zh': '科学要短语知类者,检术之要也短语及其类出于义者也。 此务有博利,而训练深乏神经模形所须,多有标数,故性犹有挑战性。 为此挑战,探有中迁习之预训BERTSciBERT,以42数合之。 吾见BERT之于SciBERT也,迁学于中,而善于前,比于强基线,短语于科学,取竞争力于别。 有趣者,观有迁徙之BERT,或不能崇科学要短语识类之性,或以大灾难性忘也。 突出表明此者,科学馆藏之言科学知识得之大者也。 观序之间,尤句法构学,如POS标记,往往最宜科学键短语识类。', 'ru': 'Научная идентификация и классификация ключевых фраз - задача обнаружения и классификации ключевых фраз из научного текста с их типами из набора предопределенных классов. Эта задача имеет широкий спектр преимуществ, но она все еще сложна в производительности из-за отсутствия больших объемов маркированных данных, необходимых для обучения глубоких нейронных моделей. Чтобы преодолеть эту проблему, мы исследуем предварительно обученные языковые модели BERT и SciBERT с обучением передаче промежуточных задач, используя 42 богатые данными комбинации промежуточных целевых задач. Мы показываем, что обучение переносу промежуточных задач на SciBERT стимулирует лучшую отправную точку для тонкой настройки целевых задач по сравнению с BERT и достигает конкурентоспособных результатов в идентификации и классификации научных ключевых фраз по сравнению как с предыдущими работами, так и с сильными базовыми линиями. Интересно отметить, что БЕРТ с промежуточным обучением переноса задач не может улучшить производительность научной идентификации и классификации ключевых фраз потенциально из-за значительного катастрофического забывания. Этот результат подчеркивает, что научные знания, достигнутые в ходе предварительного обучения языковых моделей на больших научных коллекциях, играют важную роль в целевых задачах. Мы также отмечаем, что задачи, связанные с тегами последовательностей, особенно задачи изучения синтаксической структуры, такие как тегирование POS, как правило, лучше всего подходят для научной идентификации и классификации ключевых фраз.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le sainaithint agus rangú eochairfhrásaí eolaíocha ná eochairfhrásaí ó théacs léannta a bhrath agus a rangú lena gcineálacha ó thacar ranganna réamhshainithe. Tá raon leathan buntáistí ag baint leis an tasc seo, ach tá sé fós dúshlánach i bhfeidhmíocht mar gheall ar an easpa méideanna móra sonraí lipéadaithe a theastaíonn chun samhlacha néaracha domhain a oiliúint. Chun an dúshlán seo a shárú, déanaimid iniúchadh ar mhúnlaí teanga réamh-oilte BERT agus SciBERT le foghlaim aistrithe tasc idirmheánach, ag baint úsáide as 42 teaglaim tasc-sprioc-spriocanna idirmheánacha a bhaineann le sonraí saibhir. Léirímid go n-eascraíonn foghlaim aistrithe tasc idirmheánach ar SciBERT pointe tosaigh níos fearr do mhionchoigeartú tasc sprice i gcomparáid le CRET agus go n-éiríonn léi feidhmíocht iomaíoch a bhaint amach i sainaithint agus i rangú eochairfhrása eolaíochta i gcomparáid le saothair roimhe seo agus bonnlínte láidre. Is díol suntais é, tugaimid faoi deara go dteipeann ar BERT le foghlaim aistrithe tasc idirmheánach feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht aithint agus rangú eochairfhrása eolaíoch a d’fhéadfadh a bheith mar gheall ar dhearmadú tubaisteach suntasach. Léiríonn an toradh seo go bhfuil ról tábhachtach ag an eolas eolaíoch a baineadh amach le linn réamhoiliúint a chur ar mhúnlaí teanga ar bhailiúcháin mhóra eolaíocha sna sprioc-thascanna. Breathnaímid freisin go n-oibríonn clibeáil seicheamhach tascanna idirmheánacha gaolmhara, go háirithe tascanna foghlama struchtúir chomhréire ar nós Clibeáil POS, is fearr chun eochairfhrása eolaíochta a aithint agus a rangú.', 'el': 'Η επιστημονική αναγνώριση και ταξινόμηση φράσεων-κλειδιών είναι το καθήκον της ανίχνευσης και ταξινόμησης φράσεων-κλειδιών από επιστημονικό κείμενο με τους τύπους τους από ένα σύνολο προκαθορισμένων τάξεων. Αυτή η εργασία έχει ένα ευρύ φάσμα πλεονεκτημάτων, αλλά εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση στην απόδοση λόγω της έλλειψης μεγάλων ποσοτήτων επισημασμένων δεδομένων που απαιτούνται για την εκπαίδευση βαθέων νευρωνικών μοντέλων. Για να ξεπεράσουμε αυτή την πρόκληση, εξερευνούμε προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα με μάθηση ενδιάμεσης μεταφοράς εργασιών, χρησιμοποιώντας 42 συνδυασμούς εργασιών πλούσιους σε δεδομένα. Αποκαλύπτουμε ότι η εκμάθηση ενδιάμεσης μεταφοράς εργασιών στο προκαλεί ένα καλύτερο σημείο εκκίνησης για τον συντονισμό των εργασιών στόχου σε σύγκριση με το και επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις στον προσδιορισμό και την ταξινόμηση επιστημονικών λέξεων-κλειδιών σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες εργασίες και ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης. Ενδιαφέρον είναι ότι παρατηρούμε ότι η εκμάθηση με ενδιάμεση μεταφορά εργασιών αποτυγχάνει να βελτιώσει την απόδοση του επιστημονικού προσδιορισμού και ταξινόμησης λέξεων-κλειδιών πιθανώς λόγω σημαντικής καταστροφικής λησμονής. Το αποτέλεσμα αυτό υπογραμμίζει ότι η επιστημονική γνώση που επιτυγχάνεται κατά την προεκπαίδευση γλωσσικών μοντέλων σε μεγάλες επιστημονικές συλλογές διαδραματίζει σημαντικό ρόλο στα καθήκοντα-στόχους. Παρατηρούμε επίσης ότι οι ενδιάμεσες εργασίες που σχετίζονται με τη σήμανση ακολουθίας, ειδικά οι εργασίες εκμάθησης συντακτικής δομής όπως η σήμανση τείνουν να λειτουργούν καλύτερα για τον προσδιορισμό και την ταξινόμηση επιστημονικών λέξεων-κλειδιών.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერო კლავიფიზაცია და კლასიფიზაცია არის კლასიფიზაცია კლავიფიზაციის კლასიფიზაცია და კლასიფიზაცია კლასიფიზაცია სწავლობულ ტექსტიდან თავის ტიპებით საუკვე გან ეს დავალება უფრო დიდი გამოსახულებები აქვს, მაგრამ ეს უფრო შესაძლებელია, რადგან დიდი მარტივი მონაცემების არაა, რომელიც საჭირო დიდი ნეიროლური მოდელებისთვის განაკეთ ამ გამოცდილების გადავიწყვებისთვის, ჩვენ BERT და SciBERT წინასწარმოადგენებული ენის მოდელების გამოყენება, 42 მონაცემების ბეჭდვით საშუალო მონაცემების კომბიზაციას გამოყენებთ. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სკიბერტის საშუალებო დავასწავლობის შესწავლობა შემდეგ უკეთესი გადასწავლობის წინასწავლობის წინასწავლობის წინასწავლობის წინასწავლობის წინასწავლობის წინასწავლობის წინას საინტერესოდ, ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ BERT-ს საშუალოდ დავასწავლეთ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო გასწავლეთ ეს შედეგი აღწერს, რომ მეცნიერო მეცნიერება, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ ენის მოდელების წინ განაკეთებაში დიდი მეცნიერო კოლექციებისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია მი ჩვენ შევხედავთ, რომ სინტაქტიური სტრუქტურის სწავლის დავალებები, როგორც POS Tagging, უფრო უფრო მუშაობს მეცნიერო კლავიფიკაციაში და კლასიფიკაციაში.', 'hu': 'A tudományos kulcskifejezések azonosítása és osztályozása a tudományos szövegből származó kulcskifejezések felismerése és osztályozása előre meghatározott osztályokból. Ennek a feladatnak számos előnye van, de még mindig kihívást jelent a teljesítmény tekintetében, mivel a mélyneurális modellek képzéséhez szükséges nagy mennyiségű feliratozott adat hiánya miatt. Ennek a kihívásnak a leküzdése érdekében 42 adatban gazdag, köztes feladatátviteli tanulással rendelkező, előre képzett BERT és SciBERT nyelvi modelleket fedezünk fel. Feltártuk, hogy a SciBERT-en végzett közbenső feladatátviteli tanulás jobb kiindulópontot biztosít a célfeladatok finomhangolásához a BERT-hez képest, és versenyképes teljesítményt ér el a tudományos kulcsszavak azonosításában és osztályozásában mind a korábbi munkákhoz, mind pedig az erős alapvonalakhoz képest. Érdekes módon megfigyeljük, hogy a BERT közbenső feladatátviteli tanulással nem javítja a tudományos kulcsszavak azonosításának és osztályozásának teljesítményét potenciálisan jelentős katasztrofális felejtés miatt. Ez az eredmény rávilágít arra, hogy a nagy tudományos gyűjtemények nyelvi modelljeinek előkészítése során elért tudományos ismeretek fontos szerepet játszanak a célfeladatokban. Megfigyeljük továbbá, hogy a szekvencia-címkézéssel kapcsolatos köztes feladatok, különösen a szintaktikus struktúra tanulási feladatok, mint például a POS-címkézés, általában a legjobban működnek a tudományos kulcskifejezések azonosításához és osztályozásához.', 'kk': 'Ғылыми перне сөздерді идентификациялау және классификациялау - алдыңғы анықталған класстардың түрлерінен перне сөздерді анықтау және классификациялау тапсырмасы. Бұл тапсырманың көп пайдаланушылары бар, бірақ бұл әлі невралдық моделлерді оқыту үшін керек жарлық деректердің көп саны жоқ себебі көп жарлық мәліметтерді көмектесу үшін ә Бұл өзгерістерді көтеру үшін біз BERT және SciBERT тіл үлгілерін орташа тапсырмаларды аудару оқыту үшін 42 деректердің баяндамалы орташа- мақсатты тапсырмалар комбинациясын қолданып зерттейміз. Біз SciBERT туралы тапсырмалардың орташалық аудару оқытуының бағдарламасын BERT- мен салыстырып, нақты тапсырмаларды баптау үшін жақсы бастау нүктесін түсіндіреді, және алдыңғы жұмыс мен күшті негізгі сызықтард Ең қызықты, біз BERT тапсырмаларды орташалық тапсырмаларды аудару оқыту үшін ғылыми пернелерді идентификациялау және классификациялау мүмкіндігін маңызды катастрофиялық ұмыттау үшін жақсарт Бұл нәтижесі үлкен ғылым жинақтардың тіл моделдерінің алдын- оқыту үшін ғылым білімдері мақсатты тапсырмаларда маңызды роль орындалады. Мұндай-ақ біз басқа орташалық тапсырмаларды тегтерді, осылай-ақ POS тегтері секілді синтактикалық құрылғы оқыту тапсырмаларды, ғылыми пернелерді идентификациялау мен классификациялау үшін е', 'it': "L'identificazione e la classificazione scientifica delle frasi chiave è il compito di rilevare e classificare le frasi chiave dal testo accademico con i loro tipi da un insieme di classi predefinite. Questo compito ha una vasta gamma di vantaggi, ma è ancora difficile nelle prestazioni a causa della mancanza di grandi quantità di dati etichettati necessari per l'addestramento di modelli neurali profondi. Per superare questa sfida, esploriamo modelli linguistici pre-formati BERT e SciBERT con apprendimento intermedio di trasferimento delle attività, utilizzando 42 combinazioni di attività intermedie-target correlate ricche di dati. Riveliamo che l'apprendimento intermedio di trasferimento delle attività su SciBERT induce un punto di partenza migliore per la messa a punto delle attività target rispetto a BERT e raggiunge prestazioni competitive nell'identificazione e classificazione scientifica delle keyphrase rispetto sia ai lavori precedenti che alle linee di base forti. È interessante notare che il BERT con l'apprendimento intermedio di trasferimento delle attività non riesce a migliorare le prestazioni di identificazione e classificazione scientifica delle frasi chiave potenzialmente a causa di un significativo dimenticamento catastrofico. Questo risultato evidenzia che le conoscenze scientifiche acquisite durante la pre-formazione di modelli linguistici su grandi collezioni scientifiche svolgono un ruolo importante nei compiti target. Osserviamo anche che i compiti intermedi correlati al tag di sequenza, in particolare i compiti di apprendimento della struttura sintattica come il tag POS, tendono a funzionare meglio per l'identificazione e la classificazione scientifica delle parole chiave.", 'lt': 'Mokslinis raktų frazės identifikavimas ir klasifikavimas yra užduotis nustatyti ir klasifikuoti raktų frazes moksliniame tekste su jų tipais iš iš iš anksto apibrėžtų klasių. Ši užduotis teikia įvairių privalumų, tačiau ji vis dar sunki, nes trūksta didelių ženklintų duomenų, reikalingų giliųjų nervų modelių mokymui. Siekdami įveikti šį iššūkį, tiriame iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius BERT ir SciBERT su tarpiniu užduočių perdavimo mokymu, naudojant 42 duomenų turinčius tarpinius tikslinius užduočių derinius. Nurodome, kad tarpinis mokymasis dėl SciBERT užduočių perdavimo skatina geriau tikslinių užduočių tikslinio koregavimo pradžią, palyginti su BERT, ir siekia konkurencinių rezultatų nustatant ir klasifikuojant mokslines pagrindines frazes, palyginti su ankstesniais darbais ir tvirtais baziniais principais. Interestingly, we observe that BERT with intermediate task transfer learning fails to improve the performance of scientific keyphrase identification and classification potentially due to significant catastrophic forgetting.  Šiuo rezultatu pabrėžiama, kad mokslinės žinios, įgytos rengiant kalbų modelius didelėse mokslinėse kolekcijose, atlieka svarbų vaidmenį tikslinėse užduotyse. Taip pat pastebime, kad su tarpinėmis užduotimis, ypač sintaksinės struktūros mokymosi užduotims, pvz., POS ženklinimui, seka geriausiai veikia nustatant ir klasifikuojant mokslines pagrindines frazes.', 'mk': 'Научна идентификација и класификација на клучната фраза е задачата за детектирање и класификација на клучните фрази од научниот текст со нивните типови од сет преддефинирани класи. Оваа задача има широк опсег на бенефиции, но сé уште е предизвикувачка во врска со перформансата поради недостатокот на големи количини обележани податоци потребни за обука на длабоките нервни модели. За да го надминеме овој предизвик, ги истражуваме предобучените јазички модели BERT и SciBERT со меѓувремено учење за трансфер на задачи, користејќи 42 комбинации на меѓувремени задачи поврзани со богатите податоци. Ние откриваме дека меѓувременото учење за трансфер на задачи на SciBERT индукционира подобра почетна точка за финетизирање на задачите во споредба со BERT и постигнува конкурентна резултат во идентификацијата и класификацијата на научната клучна фраза во споредба со претходните дел Интересно е што забележуваме дека БЕРТ со меѓувремено учење за трансфер на задачи не успева да ја подобри перформансата на научната идентификација и класификација на клучната фраза потенцијално поради значително катастрофално заборавање. Овој резултат истакнува дека научното знаење постигнато за време на предобуката на јазичките модели на големите научни колекции игра важна улога во целните задачи. Исто така, набљудуваме дека секвенциските означувања на поврзани меѓувремени задачи, особено синтактичките задачи за учење на структурата како што е означувањето на POS, тенденцираат да работат најдобро за научна идентификација и класификација на кл', 'ms': 'Pengenalan dan klasifikasi frasa kunci saintifik adalah tugas mengesan dan klasifikasi frasa kunci dari teks saintis dengan jenis mereka dari set kelas terdefinisi. Tugas ini mempunyai julat yang luas keuntungan, tetapi ia masih mencabar dalam prestasi kerana kekurangan jumlah besar data ditabel yang diperlukan untuk melatih model saraf dalam. Untuk mengatasi cabaran ini, kami mengeksplorasi model bahasa BERT dan SciBERT yang dilatih-dilatih dengan pembelajaran pemindahan tugas sementara, menggunakan 42 kombinasi tugas sasaran-tengah yang berkaitan dengan kaya data. Kami mengungkap bahawa pembelajaran pemindahan tugas sementara pada SciBERT mengakibatkan titik permulaan yang lebih baik untuk penyesuaian tugas sasaran dibandingkan dengan BERT dan mencapai prestasi kompetitif dalam pengenalan dan klasifikasi frasa kunci saintifik dibandingkan dengan kedua-dua kerja sebelumnya dan garis dasar yang kuat. Menarik, kami memperhatikan bahawa BERT dengan pembelajaran pemindahan tugas sementara gagal untuk meningkatkan prestasi pengenalan dan klasifikasi frasa kunci saintifik mungkin disebabkan lupaan bencana yang signifikan. Hasil ini menyatakan bahawa pengetahuan saintifik yang dicapai semasa pralatihan model bahasa pada koleksi saintifik besar bermain peran penting dalam tugas sasaran. Kami juga memperhatikan bahawa urutan menata tugas sementara berkaitan, terutama tugas pembelajaran struktur sintaktik seperti Tagging POS, cenderung bekerja dengan baik untuk pengenalan dan klasifikasi frasa kunci saintifik.', 'ml': 'ശാസ്ത്ര വാക്കുകളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷനും സ്കൂളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും വ്യക്തമാക ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d വിശാലമായ ഉപകരണങ്ങളുണ്ട്, പക്ഷെ ആഴമുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിന് ആവശ്യമുള്ള വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കാരണമായി ഇത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കു ഈ സങ്കേതം വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും സ്കിബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഇടയിലുള്ള ജോലി മാറ്റുന്നതിനു നമ്മള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, സ്കിബെര്\u200dട്ടിലെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ജോലി മാറ്റാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള നല്ല തുടക്കത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു നല തമാശയാല്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ജോലി മാറ്റുന്നതില്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പരാജയപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്രീയ കീവോര്\u200d ഇതിന്റെ ഫലം വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഭാഷ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര ജ്ഞാനം ലഭിച്ച ശാസ്ത്രീയ ജോല പോസ് ടാഗിങ്ങ് പോലെ പഠിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് സിക്കന്റിക്ക് ടാഗിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന സിക്കന്\u200dസിക് കീവ്രേസ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-frażi ewlenija xjentifika huma l-kompitu li jiġu identifikati u kklassifikati l-frażijiet ewlenija minn test xjentifiku mat-tipi tagħhom minn sett ta’ klassijiet predefiniti. Dan il-kompitu għandu firxa wiesgħa ta’ benefiċċji, iżda għadu ta’ sfida fil-prestazzjoni minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ ammonti kbar ta’ dejta ttikkettata meħtieġa għat-taħriġ ta’ mudelli newrali profondi. Sabiex tingħeleb din l-isfida, aħna nesploraw mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel BERT u SciBERT b’tagħlim intermedju tat-trasferiment tal-kompiti, bl-użu ta’ 42 kombinazzjoni ta’ kompiti intermedji fil-mira relatati b’ħafna dejta. Aħna niżvelaw li t-tagħlim intermedju tat-trasferiment tal-kompiti fuq SciBERT jinduċi punt tat-tluq a ħjar għall-aġġustament tal-kompiti fil-mira meta mqabbel mal-BERT u jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva fl-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-frażi ewlenija xjentifika meta mqabbel kemm max-xogħlijiet preċedenti kif ukoll mal-linji bażi b Interessant, ninsabu li l-BERT bit-tagħlim intermedju tat-trasferiment tal-kompiti jonqos milli jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-frażi ewlenija xjentifika potenzjalment minħabba li tinsa katastrofika sinifikanti. Dan ir-riżultat jenfasizza li l-għarfien xjentifiku miksub matul it-taħriġ minn qabel tal-mudelli lingwistiċi dwar kollezzjonijiet xjentifiċi kbar għandu rwol importanti fil-kompiti fil-mira. We also observe that sequence tagging related intermediate tasks, especially syntactic structure learning tasks such as POS Tagging, tend to work best for scientific keyphrase identification and classification.', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлох, хуваалцах нь эрдэмтэн текстээс түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг олох, хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаа юм. Энэ ажил маш олон ашигтай, гэхдээ мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварын сургалтын шаардлагатай маш их хэмжээний нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн алдаагүй учраас ажиллагаанд хэцүү байна. Энэ сорилтыг давхарлахын тулд бид өмнө сургалтын хэл загварыг BERT болон SciBERT зэрэгцээ ажлын шилжүүлэх сургалтыг ашиглаж 42 өгөгдлийн баян орчин зорилготой ажлын нийлүүлэлтийг ашиглаж байна. Бид SciBERT-ын орчин даалгаварын даалгаварын даалгаварын дамжуулалт суралцах нь BERT-тай харьцуулахад илүү сайн эхлэх цэгийг үүсгэдэг ба шинжлэх ухааны түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлох, хуваалцах болон хүчтэй суурь шугам хоёулаас Хамгийн сонирхолтой нь бид БЕРТ-г дундаж ажлын шилжүүлэх сургалтын тухай шинжлэх ухааны түлхүүр үгийг тодорхойлох болон хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадахгүй гэдгийг анзаарсан. Үүний үр дүнд шинжлэх ухааны мэдлэг олон шинжлэх ухааны цуглуулалт дээр хэл загварын өмнө суралцах үед олон шинжлэх ухааны загварууд зорилготой ажил дээр чухал үүрэг тоглодо Мөн бид дарааллын холбоотой дундаж ажил, ялангуяа POS Tagging шинжлэх ухааны түлхүүрүүдийг тодорхойлох болон хуваалцахад хамгийн сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг анзаарсан.', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja i klasyfikacja naukowych fraz kluczowych to zadanie wykrywania i klasyfikacji fraz kluczowych z tekstu naukowego wraz z ich typami z zestawu predefiniowanych klas. Zadanie to ma szeroki zakres korzyści, ale nadal jest wyzwaniem pod względem wydajności ze względu na brak dużych ilości oznaczonych danych wymaganych do treningu głębokich modeli neuronowych. Aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu, badamy wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe BERT i SciBERT z uczeniem się transferu zadań o pośrednim poziomie, wykorzystując 42-bogate w dane kombinacje zadań średnio-docelowych. Ujawniamy, że uczenie się transferu zadań pośrednich na SciBERT indukuje lepszy punkt wyjścia do dostosowywania zadań docelowych w porównaniu z BERT i osiąga konkurencyjność w identyfikacji i klasyfikacji naukowych fraz kluczowych w porównaniu z poprzednimi pracami i silnymi liniami bazowymi. Co ciekawe, zauważamy, że BERT z uczeniem się w zakresie transferu zadań pośrednio nie udaje się poprawić wydajności identyfikacji i klasyfikacji naukowych fraz kluczowych potencjalnie z powodu znaczącego katastrofalnego zapomnienia. Wynik ten podkreśla, że wiedza naukowa uzyskana podczas szkolenia wstępnego modeli językowych na dużych zbiorach naukowych odgrywa ważną rolę w realizacji docelowych zadań. Obserwujemy również, że zadania pośrednie związane z tagowaniem sekwencji, zwłaszcza zadania uczenia się struktury składni, takie jak tagowanie POS, najlepiej sprawdzają się w naukowej identyfikacji i klasyfikacji fraz kluczowych.', 'no': 'Vitskapelige nøkkelfrasar- identifikasjon og klassifikasjon er oppgåva for å oppdaga og klassifisera nøkkelfrasar frå stipende tekst med dei typane frå eit sett av føredefinerte klassar. Denne oppgåva har eit stor område av nyttighet, men det er fortsatt vanskeleg i utføring på grunn av manglar stor mengda merkelige data nødvendig for å trenja dype neuralmodeller. For å overføra denne utfordringen, utforskar vi føretrainerte språk-modeller BERT og SciBERT med middelt oppgåveoverføring med 42 data-rikke mellommålskombinasjonar. Vi opnar at mellombels oppgåveoverføringsling på SciBERT induserer ein bedre startpunkt for å finne oppgåve i samanlikning med BERT og når det gjer konkurentivt utvikling i vitenskapelige nøkkelfrasar identifisering og klassifisering samanlikna med både førre arbeidar og sterke baselinjer. I interessant måte vi observerer at BERT med mellombels oppgåveoverføring mislukkast å forbedra utviklinga av vitenskapelige nøkkelfrasar- identifikasjon og klassifikasjon potensielt på grunn av signifikante katastrofisk glemme. Dette resultatet markerer at vitenskapelige kunnskap som er oppnådd i føreøvinga av språk-modeller på store vitenskapelige samlingar spelar ein viktig rolle i måloppgåva. Vi observerer også at sekvensmerking av tilhøyrande mellomtidige oppgåver, spesielt syntaksiske strukturlæringsoppgåver som POS- merking, har tendens til å arbeide best for vitenskapelige nøkkelfrasar- identifikasjon og klassifikasjon.', 'ro': 'Identificarea și clasificarea științifică a frazelor cheie este sarcina de a detecta și clasifica frazele cheie din text științific cu tipurile lor dintr-un set de clase predefinite. Această sarcină are o gamă largă de beneficii, dar este încă o provocare în performanță datorită lipsei de cantități mari de date etichetate necesare pentru instruirea modelelor neuronale profunde. Pentru a depăși această provocare, explorăm modelele lingvistice pre-instruite BERT și SciBERT cu învățare intermediară a transferului de sarcini, utilizând 42 de combinații de sarcini intermediare-țintă conexe bogate în date. Dezvăluim că învățarea intermediară a transferului de sarcini pe SciBERT induce un punct de plecare mai bun pentru reglarea fină a sarcinilor țintă comparativ cu BERT și obține performanțe competitive în identificarea și clasificarea frazelor cheie științifice comparativ atât cu lucrările anterioare, cât și cu liniile de bază puternice. Interesant, observăm că BERT cu învățare intermediară a transferului de sarcini nu reușește să îmbunătățească performanța identificării și clasificării frazelor cheie științifice potențial din cauza uitării catastrofale semnificative. Acest rezultat evidențiază faptul că cunoștințele științifice obținute în timpul pregătirii modelelor lingvistice pe mari colecții științifice joacă un rol important în sarcinile țintă. Observăm, de asemenea, că sarcinile intermediare legate de etichetarea secvențelor, în special sarcinile de învățare a structurii sintactice, cum ar fi etichetarea POS, tind să funcționeze cel mai bine pentru identificarea și clasificarea frazelor cheie științifice.', 'sr': 'Znanstvena identifikacija i klasifikacija ključnih fraza je zadatak otkrivanja i klasifikacije ključnih fraza iz naučnog teksta sa njihovim tipovima iz skupa predodređenih klasa. Ovaj zadatak ima širok niz koristi, ali još uvek je izazovan na provedbi zbog nedostatka velikih količin a označenih podataka potrebnih za obuku dubokih neuralnih modela. Da bismo prekinuli ovaj izazov, istražujemo predobučene jezičke modele BERT i SciBERT sa prosječnim učenjem prebacivanja zadataka, koristeći 42 kombinacije međuciljnih zadataka povezanih sa podacima. Otkrivamo da prosječni učenje prebacivanja zadataka o SciBERT izaziva bolju poèetnu taèku za finaliziranje ciljnih zadataka u usporedbi sa BERT-om i postiže konkurentne funkcije u identifikaciji i klasifikaciji znanstvenih ključnih fraza u usporedbi sa prethodnim radovima i jakim osnovnim linijama. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da BERT sa prosječnim učenjem prebacivanja zadataka ne može poboljšati učinku identifikacije znanstvenih ključnih fraza i klasifikacije potencijalno zbog značajnog katastrofskog zaboravljanja. Ovaj rezultat ukazuje na to da znanstveno znanje postignuto tokom predobuke jezičkih modela na velikim naučnim kolekcijama igra važnu ulogu u ciljnim zadatkima. Takoðe posmatramo da sekvencija označavanja povezanih međuvremenskih zadataka, posebno zadataka za učenje sintaktièke strukture kao što je označavanje POS-a, najbolje radi za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju znanstvenih ključnih fraza.', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාණික යතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශය පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් විද්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශය මේ වැඩේ විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා, නමුත් ඒක තාමත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා ලේබල් කරපු තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය නියු මේ අභ්\u200dයානය ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් BERT සහ SciBERT සමඟ අභ්\u200dයානය කරපු වැඩක් ප්\u200dරධානය අභ්\u200dයානය කරන්න, දත්ත අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා ස්කිබෙර්ට් වල ඉගෙනගන්න හොඳ පටන් ගන්න පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳයක් පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට BERT වලින් සම්බන විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි බලන්නේ BERT එක්ක අතරාධ වැඩක් ගැනීමක් ඉගෙනීමේ විද්\u200dයාඥාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනය අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාත්මක පරික්ෂණය සහ ව මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා විද්\u200dයාත්මක දන්නවම ලොකු විද්\u200dයාත්මක සංමූතියේ භාෂා මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා  අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කියලා, විශේෂයෙන්ම සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාවක් සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාවක් ටැග් කරනවා, විශේෂයෙන්ම සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයා', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga kalluumeyska ee cilmigu waa shaqada ku baaraandegista iyo fasalka kaleba qoraalka barashada iyo noocyadooda ka soo baxa fasalka hore. Shaqadan waxay leedahay kaalmooyin badan oo kala duduwan, laakiin waxay weli dhibaato ku leedahay sameynta, sababtoo ah baahida macluumaad badan oo loo baahan yahay waxbarasho tusaalooyinka neurada dheer. Si aan u guuleyso dhibaatadan, waxaynu baaraynaa noocyada afka hore ee lagu baray BERT iyo SciBERT, waxbarashada iskuulka dhexdhexe ah, waxaana isticmaalnaa 42-data-rich-related intermediate-target shaqo. Waxaynu muujinnaa in waxbarashada iskuulka dhexe ee SciBERT uu ka soo bandhigaa goob ka wanaagsan oo la bilaabo shaqo wanaagsan oo la barbarto BERT, wuxuuna sameynaa shaqo ku saabsan aqoonsiga furashada cilmiga ah iyo fasax, iyadoo la barbarbarto labada shaqaalaha hore iyo saldhigyada xoogga badan. Interestingly, we observe that BERT with intermediate task transfer learning fails to improve the performance of scientific keyphrase identification and classification potentially due to significant catastrophic forgetting.  Taas sababtu waxay ka muuqataa in aqoonta cilmiga lagu helay marka lagu baranayo modelalka afka hore oo ku saabsan ururada cilmiga waaweyn wuxuu ka dhigaa qayb muhiim ah goobaha loogu talagalay. Sidoo kale waxaynu fiirinaynaa in shaqooyinka la xiriira shaqada dhexe, khusuusan shaqada waxbarashada iskuulka ah, sida POS Tagging, waxay u shaqeeyaan si fiican u aqoonsiga sayniska iyo fasax.', 'sv': 'Vetenskaplig nyckelfrasidentifiering och klassificering är uppgiften att upptäcka och klassificera nyckelfraser från vetenskaplig text med deras typer från en uppsättning fördefinierade klasser. Denna uppgift har ett brett utbud av fördelar, men det är fortfarande utmanande i prestanda på grund av bristen på stora mängder märkta data som krävs för att träna djupa neurala modeller. För att övervinna denna utmaning utforskar vi färdigutbildade språkmodeller BERT och SciBERT med mellanliggande uppgiftsöverföring, med hjälp av 42 datarika relaterade mellanliggande uppgiftskombinationer. Vi avslöjar att mellanliggande uppgiftsöverföring lärande på SciBERT ger en bättre utgångspunkt för finjustering av måluppgifter jämfört med BERT och uppnår konkurrenskraftig prestanda i vetenskaplig nyckelfrasidentifiering och klassificering jämfört med både tidigare arbeten och starka baslinjer. Intressant nog konstaterar vi att BERT med mellanliggande uppgiftsöverföring misslyckas med att förbättra prestanda för vetenskaplig nyckelfrasidentifiering och klassificering potentiellt på grund av betydande katastrofala glömska. Detta resultat belyser att vetenskaplig kunskap som uppnåtts vid fortbildning av språkmodeller på stora vetenskapliga samlingar spelar en viktig roll i måluppgifterna. Vi observerar också att sekvensmärkningsrelaterade mellanliggande uppgifter, särskilt syntaktiska strukturinlärningsuppgifter som POS Tagging, tenderar att fungera bäst för vetenskaplig nyckelfrasidentifiering och klassificering.', 'ta': 'அறிவியல் விசைச்சொற்றொடர் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் என்பது கல்வி உரையிலிருந்து விசைச்சொற்றொடர்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும் வகுப்புகளில இந்த செயலில் நிறைய பயன்பாடுகள் இருக்கிறது, ஆனால் இது செயல்பாட்டில் சவால் செய்கிறது ஆனால் ஆழமான புதிரை மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சிக்கு தே இந்த சவாலை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளை பிரெட் மற்றும் ஸ்கிபிரெட் இடைவெளி செயல் மாற்றி கற்றுக்கொண்டு தேடுகிறோம், 42 தர நாம் வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் என்றால் சிபிரெட்டின் மீது இடையேற்ற செயல் மாற்றி கற்றத்தை வெளிப்படுத்தும் பிரெட்டிக்கு ஒப்பிடும் செயல் நன்றாக துவங்கும் புள்ளி சுவாரசியமாக, நாம் பெர்ட் இடையே செயல் மாற்றி கற்றுக் கொண்டு பிரிட்டு செய்ய இயலாது அறிவியல் விசைச்சொற்றொடர் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகுப்பு முக்கியம இந்த முடிவு குறிப்பிடுகிறது பெரிய அறிவியல் தொகுப்புகளில் மொழி மாதிரிகளின் முன் பயிற்சியில் அடைந்த அறிவியல் அறிவு கொண்டத நாம் பார்க்க வேண்டும் என்று தொடர்ந்து ஒத்திசைக்கும் இடையேற்ற செயல்களுடன் ஒத்திசைக்கும் அமைப்பு கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பணிகளை போஸ் ஒட்டுக', 'ur': 'سائنس کلیفوں کی شناسایی اور کلیفوں کا کلیفوں کی شناسایی اور کلیفوں کا کام ہے جو علمی پیغام سے ان کی طریقوں سے پہلے مقرر کیا گیا کلیسوں سے لکھنے اور کلیزوں کا کام ہے. اس کام کے لئے بہت سے فائدے ہیں، لیکن یہ عملکرد میں بھی مشکل ہے کیونکہ عمیق نیورال موڈل کی آموزش کے لئے لابلیٹ کی بہت سی اندازے کے لئے لابلیٹ ڈیٹے کی کمی کی وجہ سے۔ اس چال پر غالب ہونے کے لئے، ہم پہلے تدریس کی زبان مدل BERT اور SciBERT کو میانہ ٹاکس ٹرنس کی تعلیم کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں، 42 ڈاٹا-ثروت متوسط-ٹاکس ٹاکس کی تعلیم کے مطابق۔ ہم ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ SciBERT کے متوسط ٹاکس ٹرنسٹ کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ ایک بہتر شروع پوینٹ کی ابتدا کرتا ہے BERT کے مقابلہ میں اور سائنس کلیف فریز کی شناسایی اور کلیسی کے مقابلہ میں ایک بہتر شروع پوینٹ کی ابتدا کرتا ہے۔ علاقمند ہے، ہم نے دیکھا کہ BERT کو میانہ ٹاکس ٹرنیسٹ کی تعلیم کے ساتھ سیکھنے کے لئے ناکام ہوتا ہے کہ سائنسیٹ کلیفوں کی شناسایی اور کلیسٹ کا عملکرد زیادہ مصیبت کے سبب بہت اضافہ ہوتا ہے۔ اس کا نتیجہ اس بات کو واضح کرتا ہے کہ علم علم جو زبان مدلکوں کی پیش آموزش میں حاصل ہوئی تھی بڑے سائنسی جملکیوں میں موجود کاموں میں ایک اہم رول لگا رہا ہے. ہم نے بھی دیکھ لیا ہے کہ سطح ٹاگ کے ساتھ رابطہ دار میڈیرے کام، مخصوصاً سینٹاکتیک ساختار کی تعلیم کے کام جیسے POS ٹاگ گینگ، علمی کلیف شناسایی اور کلیسی کے لئے بہترین کام کرنا چاہتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu vazifa juda ko'p foydalanuvchilar bor, ammo bu bajarish uchun juda katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yetarlicha sababchi bo'lgan narsalar yordamida murakkab qiladi. Bu qiymatni oshirish uchun biz bir o'rganishdan oldin tilning modellarini BERT va SciBERT bilan o'rganish bilan boshqa vazifani o'rganish uchun 42 ta'lim bilan bog'liq vazifaning intermediate vazifasi birlashtirishdan foydalanamiz. Biz SciBERT'da o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganishni anglatamiz, BERT bilan o'rganishga yaxshi boshlashni boshlaydi va ilmiy kalitlarni aniqlash va darajalashtirishni oldingi ish va yaxshi asboblar bilan o'rganish mumkin. Shunday qiziqarli, biz o'rganishni o'rganishda BERT o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi, ilmiy kalitlarning identifikatsiya va classifikasini bajarishini bajarishimiz mumkin, bu juda katta katak o'zgartirish sababini o'rganish mumkin. Bu natijasi, katta ilmiy kompyuterlarda ilmiy илм modellari o'rganishdan oldin foydalanishga ega bo'lganligini anglatadi. Biz esa ko'rib chiqqamiz, boshqa o'rtacha vazifalar bilan bog'liq narsalarni ko'rib chiqqamiz, hususan POS tagging kabi ishlarni o'rganish imkoniyatlarini, ilmiy kalitlarning identification va classification uchun eng yaxshi ishlayapmiz.", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng và phân loại các cụm từ khoa học là nhiệm vụ phát hiện và phân loại các cụm từ từ ngữ học cùng các kiểu của các lớp đã xác định trước. Nhiệm vụ này có rất nhiều lợi ích, nhưng nó vẫn thử thách trong khả năng do thiếu một lượng lớn các dữ liệu nhãn cần thiết để huấn luyện các mô hình thần kinh sâu. Để vượt qua thử thách này, chúng ta sẽ nghiên cứu các mô hình ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện trước, BERT và SciBERT cùng với việc phân bổ huấn luyện tập huấn để chuyển giao nhiệm vụ, sử dụng sự kết hợp phân công việc 42. Chúng tôi tiết lộ rằng việc tập trung chuyển nhiệm vụ về khoa học Vớ vẩn tạo ra một điểm khởi đầu tốt hơn cho việc nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng đối với BERT và đạt được thành quả cạnh tranh trong việc xác định và phân loại từ khoá khoa học so với cả các công trình trước và các nền tảng vững chắc. Thật thú vị, chúng tôi thấy rằng BERT với việc học chuyển giao nhiệm vụ tạm thời không thể cải thiện hiệu quả của việc xác định các cụm từ khóa khoa học và phân loại các thành ngữ có thể do thảm họa đáng chú ý. Kết quả này nhấn mạnh rằng kiến thức khoa học được cung cấp trong quá trình huấn luyện các mô hình ngôn ngữ trên các bộ sưu tập khoa học lớn đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong các nhiệm vụ đích. Chúng tôi cũng nhận thấy các công việc sắp xếp phân loại tương đương, đặc biệt các công việc học cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu tạo tạo.', 'bg': 'Научната идентификация и класификация на ключови фрази е задачата за откриване и класифициране на ключови фрази от научния текст с техните типове от набор от предварително определени класове. Тази задача има широк спектър от ползи, но все още е предизвикателство по отношение на ефективността поради липсата на големи количества етикетирани данни, необходими за обучение на дълбоки невронни модели. За да преодолеем това предизвикателство, ние изследваме предварително обучените езикови модели с междинно обучение за трансфер на задачи, като използваме 42 комбинации от междинни задачи, богати на данни. Разкриваме, че обучението по трансфер на междинни задачи на SciBERT индуцира по-добра отправна точка за фино настройване на целевите задачи в сравнение с BERT и постига конкурентни резултати в идентифицирането и класификацията на научните ключови фрази в сравнение с предишните и силните базови линии. Интересно е, че с обучението за трансфер на задачи междинно не успява да подобри ефективността на идентифицирането и класификацията на научната ключова фраза потенциално поради значително катастрофално забравяне. Този резултат подчертава, че научните знания, постигнати по време на предварителното обучение на езикови модели в големи научни сборници, играят важна роля в целевите задачи. Също така наблюдаваме, че последователното етикетиране на свързаните междинни задачи, особено задачите за синтактично обучение на структурата, като например етикетирането на ПОС, са склонни да работят най-добре за идентифициране и класифициране на научни ключови фрази.', 'nl': 'Wetenschappelijke sleutelzin identificatie en classificatie is de taak van het opsporen en classificeren van sleutelzin uit wetenschappelijke tekst met hun typen uit een reeks vooraf gedefinieerde klassen. Deze taak heeft een breed scala aan voordelen, maar het is nog steeds uitdagend in prestaties vanwege het ontbreken van grote hoeveelheden gelabelde gegevens die nodig zijn voor het trainen van diepe neurale modellen. Om deze uitdaging het hoofd te bieden, verkennen we voorgetrainde taalmodellen BERT en SciBERT met intermediate taakverdracht leren, met behulp van 42 datarijke gerelateerde intermediate-target taakcombinaties. We onthullen dat het leren van tussentijdse taakverdracht op SciBERT een beter uitgangspunt voor het finetunen van doeltaken induceert in vergelijking met BERT en concurrerende prestaties op het gebied van wetenschappelijke sleutelzin identificatie en classificatie bereikt in vergelijking met zowel eerdere werken als sterke baselines. Interessant is dat BERT met intermediair task transfer learning niet in staat is om de prestaties van wetenschappelijke sleutelzin identificatie en classificatie mogelijk te verbeteren als gevolg van significant catastrofal vergeten. Dit resultaat benadrukt dat wetenschappelijke kennis verkregen tijdens de voorbereiding van taalmodellen op grote wetenschappelijke collecties een belangrijke rol speelt bij de doeltaken. We zien ook dat sequentie tagging gerelateerde tussentaken, vooral syntactische structurele leertaken zoals POS tagging, meestal het beste werken voor wetenschappelijke sleutelzin identificatie en classificatie.', 'hr': 'Identifikacija i klasifikacija znanstvenih ključnih fraza je zadatak otkrivanja i klasifikacije ključnih fraza iz znanstvenih teksta s njihovim vrstama iz skupa predodređenih klasa. Ovaj zadatak ima širok niz koristi, ali još uvijek je izazovan na provedbi zbog nedostatka velikih količin a označenih podataka potrebnih za obuku dubokih neuronskih modela. Kako bismo preuzeli ovaj izazov, istražujemo predobučene jezičke modele BERT i SciBERT s prosječnim učenjem prijenosa zadataka, koristeći 42 kombinacije međuciljnih zadataka povezanih s podacima. Otkrivamo da prosječni učenje prijenosa zadataka o SciBERT izaziva bolju početnu tačku za finaliziranje ciljnih zadataka u usporedbi s BERT-om i postigne konkurentne učinke u identifikaciji i klasifikaciji znanstvenih ključnih fraza u usporedbi s prethodnim radovima i jakim osnovnim linijama. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da BERT s prosječnim učenjem prijenosa zadataka ne poboljšava učinku identifikacije znanstvenih ključnih fraza i klasifikacije potencijalno zbog značajnog katastrofskog zaboravljanja. Taj rezultat ukazuje na to da znanstveno znanje postignuto tijekom predobuke jezičkih modela o velikim znanstvenim kolekcijama igra važnu ulogu u ciljnim zadatkima. Također posmatramo da se sekvencija označava povezani međuvremeni zadatak, posebno zadatak za učenje sintaktičke strukture poput označavanja POS-a, najbolje radi za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju znanstvenih ključnih fraza.', 'da': 'Videnskabelig nøglesætning identifikation og klassificering er opgaven at detektere og klassificere nøglesætninger fra videnskabelig tekst med deres typer fra et sæt foruddefinerede klasser. Denne opgave har en bred vifte af fordele, men det er stadig udfordrende i ydeevnen på grund af manglen på store mængder mærkede data, der kræves til træning af dybe neurale modeller. For at overvinde denne udfordring undersøger vi forududdannede sprogmodeller BERT og SciBERT med mellemliggende opgaveoverførselslæring ved hjælp af 42 datarige relaterede mellemliggende opgavekombinationer. Vi afslører, at læring om mellemliggende opgaveoverførsel på SciBERT giver et bedre udgangspunkt for finjustering af målopgaver sammenlignet med BERT og opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater inden for videnskabelig identifikation og klassificering af nøglesætninger sammenlignet med både tidligere værker og stærke basislinjer. Interessant nok bemærker vi, at BERT med mellemliggende opgaveoverførselsindlæring ikke kan forbedre ydeevnen af videnskabelig identifikation og klassificering af nøglesætninger potentielt på grund af betydelig katastrofal glemmelse. Resultatet fremhæver, at videnskabelig viden opnået under foruddannelsen af sprogmodeller på store videnskabelige samlinger spiller en vigtig rolle i målopgaverne. Vi observerer også, at sekvensmærkning relaterede mellemliggende opgaver, især syntaktiske struktur læringsopgaver som POS Tagging, har tendens til at fungere bedst til videnskabelig nøglesætning identifikation og klassificering.', 'de': 'Wissenschaftliche Schlüsselphrasen-Identifikation und Klassifizierung ist die Aufgabe, Schlüsselphrasen aus wissenschaftlichem Text mit ihren Typen aus einer Reihe vordefinierter Klassen zu erkennen und zu klassifizieren. Diese Aufgabe hat eine Vielzahl von Vorteilen, ist aber aufgrund des Fehlens großer Mengen an markierten Daten, die für das Training tiefer neuronaler Modelle erforderlich sind, weiterhin leistungsherausfordernd. Um diese Herausforderung zu meistern, erforschen wir vortrainierte Sprachmodelle BERT und SciBERT mit Intermediate Task Transfer Learning, wobei 42 datenreiche verwandte Intermediate-Target Task Kombinationen verwendet werden. Wir zeigen, dass Intermediate Task Transfer Learning auf SciBERT einen besseren Ausgangspunkt für die Zielaufgaben Feinabstimmung im Vergleich zu BERT induziert und wettbewerbsfähige Leistungen in der wissenschaftlichen Keyphrase Identifikation und Klassifizierung im Vergleich zu früheren Arbeiten und starken Baselines erzielt. Interessanterweise beobachten wir, dass BERT mit mittlerem Aufgabentransfer-Lernen die Leistung der wissenschaftlichen Keyphrase-Identifikation und Klassifizierung möglicherweise aufgrund erheblicher katastrophaler Vergessenheit nicht verbessert. Dieses Ergebnis zeigt, dass wissenschaftliche Erkenntnisse, die bei der Vorausbildung von Sprachmodellen auf großen wissenschaftlichen Sammlungen erzielt werden, eine wichtige Rolle bei den Zielaufgaben spielen. Wir beobachten auch, dass Sequenz-Tagging-bezogene Zwischenaufgaben, insbesondere syntaktische Strukturlernen-Aufgaben wie POS-Tagging, tendenziell am besten für die wissenschaftliche Keyphrase-Identifikation und Klassifizierung funktionieren.', 'id': 'Identifikasi dan klasifikasi frasa kunci ilmiah adalah tugas untuk mendeteksi dan klasifikasi frasa kunci dari teks ilmiah dengan jenis mereka dari set kelas terdefinisi. Tugas ini memiliki jangkauan yang luas keuntungan, tetapi masih menantang dalam prestasi karena kekurangan jumlah besar data yang diperlukan untuk melatih model saraf dalam. Untuk mengatasi tantangan ini, kami mengeksplorasi model bahasa BERT dan SciBERT yang terlatih-terlatih dengan belajar transfer tugas intermedium, menggunakan 42 kombinasi tugas intermedium yang berkaitan dengan kaya data. Kami mengungkapkan bahwa pembelajaran transfer tugas sementara pada SciBERT mendorong titik awal yang lebih baik untuk penyesuaian tugas sasaran dibandingkan dengan BERT dan mencapai prestasi kompetitif dalam identifikasi dan klasifikasi frasa kunci ilmiah dibandingkan dengan kerja sebelumnya dan garis dasar yang kuat. Menarik, kami memperhatikan bahwa BERT dengan pengajaran transfer tugas sementara gagal untuk meningkatkan prestasi identifikasi dan klasifikasi frasa kunci ilmiah potensial karena melupakan bencana yang signifikan. Hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa pengetahuan ilmiah yang dicapai selama prapelatihan model bahasa pada koleksi ilmiah besar bermain peran penting dalam tugas sasaran. Kami juga memperhatikan bahwa urutan tagging tugas intermedium yang berhubungan, terutama tugas belajar struktur sintaksi seperti POS Tagging, cenderung bekerja terbaik untuk identifikasi dan klasifikasi frasa kunci ilmiah.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa maneno ya kisayansi na kutafsiri ni jukumu la kutambua na kutafsiri maneno kutoka kwenye maandishi ya kitaaluma na aina zao kutoka katika darasa lililopita. Kazi hii in a faida nyingi sana, lakini bado inachangamoto katika utendaji huo kwa sababu ya ukosefu wa idadi kubwa ya taarifa zinazohitajika kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya mifano ya ndani ya ubongo. Ili kushinda changamoto hili, tunachunguza mifano ya lugha zilizo na mafunzo ya zamani ya BERT na SciBERT kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa juhudi za kati, kwa kutumia muunganiko wa kazi za kati 42 zinazohusiana na takwimu zenye taarifa za kati. Tunaonyesha kwamba uhamishaji wa kazi za kati kwa ajili ya SciBERT unatengeneza hatua bora ya kuanzisha kwa ajili ya malengo mazuri yanayolinganishwa na BERT na kupata ufanisi wa ushindani katika utambulisho wa maneno ya sayansi na usambazaji ukilinganishwa na kazi zilizopita na misingi yenye nguvu. Inafurahisha, tunaona kwamba BERT kwa uhamishaji wa kazi za kati inashindwa kuboresha ufanisi wa utambulisho wa maneno ya kisayansi na usambazaji kwa sababu ya kusahau maafa makubwa. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha kwamba maarifa ya kisayansi yaliyofanikiwa wakati wa mafunzo ya mitindo ya lugha katika mikusanyiko makubwa ya kisayansi inacheza nafasi muhimu katika kazi za malengo. We also observe that sequence tagging related intermediate tasks, especially syntactic structure learning tasks such as POS Tagging, tend to work best for scientific keyphrase identification and classification.', 'fa': 'شناسایی و کلید کلید علمی کار شناسایی و تشکیل کلید از متن دانشمندی با نوع\u200cهایشان از مجموعه کلاس پیش\u200cتعریف است. این وظیفه به عنوان کمبود مقدار زیادی از اطلاعات نقاشی که نیاز دارند برای آموزش مدل\u200cهای عصبی عمیق دارند، فایده\u200cهای زیادی دارد، ولی هنوز در انجام کار مشکل دارد. برای تغییر دادن این چالش، ما مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی BERT و SciBERT را با یادگیری انتقال وظیفه بین وسیع تحقیق می کنیم، با استفاده از ترکیب 42 دسته های متوسط و هدف مربوط به اطلاعات ثروت می کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که یادگیری انتقال وظیفه بین\u200cالمللی روی SciBERT یک نقطه شروع بهتر برای تنظیم کردن هدف با BERT و انجام رقابت در شناسایی و تنظیم کلید علمی در مقایسه با کار گذشته و خطوط پایین\u200cهای قوی به مقایسه می\u200cرسد. Interestingly, we observe that BERT with intermediate task transfer learning fails to improve the performance of scientific keyphrase identification and classification potentially due to significant catastrophic forget. این نتیجه نشان می دهد که دانش علمی که در طول آموزش پیش از آموزش مدلهای زبان در مجموعه های علمی بزرگ در وظیفه هدف رسیده است نقش مهمی را در کار می کند. ما همچنین مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که برچسب کردن برچسب\u200cهای مرتبط مرتبط، مخصوصاً برچسب\u200cهای یادگیری ساختار سنتاکتیک مثل برچسب POS، برای شناسایی و برچسب\u200cهای کلید علمی بهتر کار می\u200cکنند.', 'ko': '과학적인 키워드 식별과 분류는 한 그룹의 미리 정의된 클래스에서 학술 텍스트의 키워드와 유형을 검측하고 분류하는 임무이다.이 임무는 광범위한 장점이 있지만 심층신경모델을 훈련하는 데 필요한 대량의 표기 데이터가 부족하기 때문에 성능상 여전히 도전적이다.이러한 도전을 극복하기 위해 우리는 42가지 데이터가 풍부한 관련 중간 목표 임무 조합을 사용하여 예비 훈련 언어 모델인 BERT와 SciBERT, 그리고 중간 임무 이동 학습을 탐색했다.우리는 BERT에 비해 SciBERT의 중간 임무 이전 학습이 목표 임무의 미세 조정에 더욱 좋은 출발점을 제공했고 과학 키워드 식별과 분류에 있어 이전의 업무와 강한 기준선과 비교할 수 있는 경쟁력을 얻었다는 것을 발견했다.흥미로운 것은 현저한 재난성 망각으로 인해 중간 임무 이동 학습을 가진 BERT가 과학 키워드 식별과 분류의 성능을 향상시키지 못한다는 것을 관찰했다.이 결과는 대형 과학관에 소장된 언어 모형 예훈련에서 얻은 과학 지식이 목표 임무에서 중요한 역할을 한다는 것을 보여준다.우리는 또한 서열 표기와 관련된 중간 임무, 특히 문법 구조 학습 임무, 예를 들어 어성 표기는 과학적인 키워드 식별과 분류에 가장 적합하다는 것을 관찰했다.', 'tr': "Ilmi faýllary tanyşdyrma we klasifikasy öň bellenen klaslardan kelli frazleri tanyşdyrma we klasifikasydir. Bu zadyň kän bir nusgasy bar, ýöne ol halda nusgasy nusgasyny öwrenmek üçin gerekli etiket alýan maglumatlary ýok üçin täzeden kynçylyk bar. Bu kynçylyky üstine çykmak üçin, BERT we SciBERT öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden gelen dil nusgalaryny öwrenmek üçin, 42 data bagly öňünden meýdança-maksadyň birleşmelerini ulanýarys. Biz SciBERT hakynda öwrenmegiň aralygy taýýarlama öwrenmesini BERT bilen görä galam taýýarlama üçin has gowy başlangyç noktasyny etýäris we bilim klusy frazleriň tanyşdyrmasynyň we klasifikasynda ýaryşykly täsirli täsirini ýetirýäris. Öňki işleriň we güýçli esaslary Gyzykly bolsa, BERT'iň öňünden geçen täzim transfer öwrenmegi ýok edip bilýäris. Ilmi kähil frazlerin kimligini we klasifikasynyň üstüne düzeltmegini boýunça ýatdan çykyp biler. Bu netijede bilim bilen uly bilim toplumlarda bilim nusgalarynyň öň-okuwçysynda ýetip bolan bilim sistemalarynyň uly bilim toplumlarda möhüm zady bar. Biz hem birlikte olaryň arasyndaky işleri, özellikle POS etiketlemesi ýaly sintaktik yapılar öwrenmesi üçin en iyisi işe yarar.", 'am': 'የሳይንስ ቃላት መግለጫ እና መግለጫ ነው፤ ከታማሪው ጽሑፍ የተገኘ ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና በመለፍ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ ይህ ስራ ብዙ ጥቅሞችን አቀረበ፤ ነገር ግን ጥልቅ የናውሬል ዓይነቶች ለማስተማርት በሚያስፈልገው የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች ጥልቅ ጥያቄ በማድረግ የሚቻል ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጥቃት ለማሸንፍ፣ በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች BERT እና SciBERT በመካከለኛ ስራ ትምህርት እና 42 ዳታ-ሀብታም የተጠቃሚ የመካከለኛ ተቃውሞ ስራ ትምህርት በመጠቀም እንፈልጋለን፡፡ እናሳውቀዋለን። በSciBERT ላይ የመካከለኛ ስራ ትምህርት መጀመሪያ ነጥብ BERT በተደረገው እና በሳይንቀሳዊ የፊደል ቃላት ማረጋገጫ እና መጻሕፍት ከቀድሞው ሥራ እና ኃይለኛ መሠረት መሠረት ማድረግ የሚሻለውን የመጀመሪያ ነጥብ ማድረግ ማግኘት ያስችላል፡፡ በአጠቃሚ ነገር፣ BERT በመካከለኛው ስራ ለመቀናቀል ትምህርት የሳይንቀሳዊ የክፍለ ቃላትን ማሳየት እና መፍታትን በመጠንቀቂያ ግንኙነት በመጠንቀቅ ስህተት ትክክል መፍታት በማድረግ አይችልም፡፡ ይህ ፍላጎት የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በተቀድሞ ማስተማር ላይ የሳይንዊ እውቀት በተደረገው ትልቁ የሳይንስ ስብስብ በሚያሳየው ስርዓቶች ውስጥ ያስታያል፡፡ We also observe that sequence tagging related intermediate tasks, especially syntactic structure learning tasks such as POS Tagging, tend to work best for scientific keyphrase identification and classification.', 'hy': 'Գիտական բառերի հայտնաբերումն ու դասակարգումը գիտական տեքստի բառերի հայտնաբերումն ու դասակարգումը նախասահմանված դասերի ընթացքում իրենց տեսակների հետ է: Այս խնդիրն ունի բազմաթիվ առավելություններ, բայց այն դեռևս դժվար է արդյունքում, քանի որ խորը նյարդային մոդելների ուսումնասիրելու համար անհրաժեշտ է մեծ քանակությամբ պիտակուցված տվյալներ: Այս մարտահրավերի հաղթահարելու համար մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները BER և գիտական BER միջնակարգ աշխատանքի փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությամբ, օգտագործելով 42 տվյալների հարուստ միջնակարգ աշխատանքի համադրումներ: Մենք բացահայտում ենք, որ միջին հանձնարարությունների փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը Սիբերթ-ի վրա ավելի լավ սկզբնական կետ է առաջացնում նպատակային հանձնարարությունների բարձրացման համար, համեմատած Բերթ-ի հետ, և հասնում է մրցակցության արդյունքների գիտական բառերի հայտնա Հետաքրքիր է, որ մենք նկատում ենք, որ BER-ը միջին խնդիրների փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությամբ չի կարողանում բարելավել գիտական բառերի հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման արդյունքը, պոտենցիալ նշանակալի քանդակային մոռացության պատճառով: Այս արդյունքը ցույց է տալիս, որ գիտական գիտելիքները, որոնք ստացվել են լեզվի մոդելների նախապատրաստման ժամանակ մեծ գիտական հավաքածուների վրա, կարևոր դեր են խաղում նպատակային առաջադրանքներում: Մենք նաև նկատում ենք, որ հաջորդականությունը նշում է կապված միջին խնդիրները, հատկապես սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքի ուսուցման խնդիրները, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ POS նշում, հակված են աշխատել լավագույնը գիտական բառերի հայտնաբերման և', 'af': "Wetenskaplike sleutelfrase identifikasie en klasifikasie is die taak van beskrywing en klassifisering van sleutelfrase van wetenskaplike teks met hul tipes van 'n stel van vooraf bepaalde klasse. Hierdie taak het 'n wyde reek van voordele, maar dit is nog steeds aanvaardig in prestasie vanweë die ontbreek van groot hoeveelheid etiketeerde data benodig vir die onderwerp van diep neurale modele. In order to overcome this challenge, we explore pre-trained language models BERT and SciBERT with intermediate task transfer learning, using 42 data-rich related intermediate-target combinations. Ons vertoon dat die middelste taak oordrag leer op SciBERT 'n beter begin punt vir die doel opdrag fin-tuning vergelyk met BERT en bereik mededingstekenigheid in wetenskaplike sleutefrase identifikasie en klasifikasie vergelyk met beide vorige werke en sterke basisline. Interesante, ons observer dat BERT met middelste taak oordrag leer misluk om die prestasie van wetenskaplike sleutefrase identifikasie en klasifikasie te verbeter, potensielik vanweë betekende katastrofiese vergeet. Hierdie resultaat verlig dat wetenskaplike kennis gedoen het tydens die voor-oefening van taal modele op groot wetenskaplike samlings 'n belangrike rol in die doel opdragte speel. Ons het ook aanmerk dat sekvensie merking verwante intermediate opdragte, spesifieke sintaktieke struktuur leer opdragte soos POS merking, beter werk vir wetenskaplike sleutefrase identifikasie en klasifikasie.", 'sq': 'Identifikimi dhe klasifikimi i frazës kyçe shkencore është detyra e zbulimit dhe klasifikimit të frazës kyçe nga teksti shkencor me tipet e tyre nga një sërë klasash të paracaktuara. Kjo detyrë ka një gamë të gjerë përfitimesh, por është ende sfiduese në performancë për shkak të mungesës së sasive të mëdha të të dhënave të etiketuara të kërkuara për trajnimin e modeleve të thella neuronale. Për të kapërcyer këtë sfidë, ne eksplorojmë modelet e gjuhës së paratrajnuar BERT dhe SciBERT me mësim të ndërmjetësuar transferimi i detyrave, duke përdorur 42 kombinime të detyrave të ndërmjetësuara të pasura me të dhëna. Ne zbulojmë se mësimi i transferimit të detyrave të ndërmjetësuara në SciBERT indukton një pikë fillimi më të mirë për rregullimin e detyrave objektive krahasuar me BERT dhe arrin performancë konkurruese në identifikimin dhe klasifikimin e frazës kyçe shkencore krahasuar me punët e mëparshme dhe linjat bazë të forta. Interestingly, we observe that BERT with intermediate task transfer learning fails to improve the performance of scientific keyphrase identification and classification potentially due to significant catastrophic forgetting.  This result highlights that scientific knowledge achieved during the pre-training of language models on large scientific collections plays an important role in the target tasks.  Ne gjithashtu vëzhgojmë se sekuenca e etiketave të detyrave të ndërmjetësuara të lidhura, veçanërisht detyrat sintaktike të mësimit të strukturës, të tilla si etiketat POS, tenderojnë të punojnë më mirë për identifikimin dhe klasifikimin e frazës kyçe shkencore.', 'bn': 'বৈজ্ঞানিক কীব্রের পরিচয় এবং শ্রেণীকরণ হচ্ছে স্কুলের টেক্সট থেকে কীবোর্ড খুঁজে বের করা এবং বিশ্লেষণ করার কাজ হচ্ছে তাদের টাইপ থেকে আগে কিন্তু গভীর নিউরেল মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় বিশাল পরিমাণ তথ্যের অভাবের কারণে এই কাজের প্রচুর সুবিধা প্রদান করা হয়েছে। এই চ্যালেঞ্জের বিজয়ী করার জন্য আমরা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল বিরেট এবং স্কিবেরেট বিভিন্ন মাধ্যমের মধ্যেকার কাজ পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা দিয়ে বিভিন আমরা প্রকাশ করেছি যে স্কিবেরেটের মধ্যে কাজ পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা শুরু করার একটি ভালো শুরু বিন্দু তৈরি করেছে বিবেরেটের তুলনায় লক্ষ্যবস্তুর জন্য এবং বৈজ্ঞানিক কীব্রের পরিচিতি এব মজার ব্যাপারে আমরা দেখছি যে বেরেটি মাঝামাঝি কাজ পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে শিক্ষা ব্যর্থ হয়েছে বিজ্ঞানিক কীবার্তা পরিচিতি এবং বিশেষ বিপর্যয় ভুলে যাওয় এর ফলে উল্লেখ করে যে বিশাল বৈজ্ঞানিক সংগ্রহের পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের সময় ভাষার বৈজ্ঞানিক জ্ঞান অর্জন করা হয়েছে তারা লক্ষ্যবস্তুতে গুর We also observe that sequence tagging related intermediate tasks, especially syntactic structure learning tasks such as POS Tagging, tend to work best for scientific keyphrase identification and classification.', 'az': "Bilimli anahtar sözləri tanımlama və klasifikasiya ilk dəfə müəyyən edilmiş sınıflardan anahtar sözləri keşfetmə və klasifikasyona məcburidir. Bu işin çox faydası var, amma hələ də böyük nöral modellərini təhsil etmək üçün lazım olan etiketli məlumatlar yoxdur. Bu çətinlikdən üstün gəlmək üçün, BERT və SciBERT dil modellərini araşdırmaq üçün, 42 veri baxıb arası məqsəd-məqsəd işləri birlikdə istifadə edirik. Biz bildiririk ki, SciBERT barəsindəki öyrənmək öyrənməsi, BERT ilə qarşılaşdığı məqsəd işləri düzəltmək üçün daha yaxşı başlangıç noktasını təşkil edir və əvvəlki işlər və qüvvətli səhifələr ilə qarşılaşdığı bilimsel anahtar frazlərin təşkil edilməsi və klasifik İlginç olaraq, BERT'nin öyrənməsi ilə öyrənməsi olaraq, bilimsel anahtar frazlərin tanıtması və klasifikasyonu mümkün olaraq böyük katastrofi unutması üzündən yaxşılaşdırılmadığını görürük. Bu növbəti elmi bilgilərin böyük elmi koleksiyonların dil modellərinin əvvəlcə təhsil edilməsində gəlib çatdığını göstərir. Biz də seçdik ki, seçmə müxtəlif məlumatları, özlərinə də POS etiketi kimi sintaktik strukturlu öyrənmə məlumatları, bilimsel anahtar frazlərini tanıtmaq və klasifikasiya üçün ən yaxşı işləyir.", 'bs': 'Znanstvena identifikacija i klasifikacija ključnih fraza je zadatak otkrivanja i klasifikacije ključnih fraza iz znanstvenog teksta sa njihovim tipovima iz skupa predodređenih klasa. Ovaj zadatak ima širok niz koristi, ali još uvijek je izazovan na provedbi zbog nedostatka velikih količin a označenih podataka potrebnih za obuku dubokih neuronskih modela. Da bismo prekinuli ovaj izazov, istražujemo predobučene jezičke modele BERT i SciBERT sa prosječnim učenjem prebacivanja zadataka, koristeći 42 kombinacije međuciljnih zadataka povezanih s podacima. Otkrivamo da prosječni učenje prebacivanja zadataka o SciBERT izaziva bolju početnu tačku za finaliziranje ciljnih zadataka u usporedbi sa BERT-om i ostvarila konkurentne učinke u identifikaciji i klasifikaciji znanstvenih ključnih fraza u usporedbi s prethodnim radovima i jakim osnovnim linijama. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da BERT sa prosječnim učenjem prijenosa zadataka ne poboljšava učinku identifikacije i klasifikacije znanstvenih katastrofskih zaboravljanja. Taj rezultat ukazuje na to da znanstveno znanje postignuto tijekom predobuke jezičkih modela na velikim naučnim kolekcijama igra važnu ulogu u ciljnim zadatkima. Također posmatramo da sekvencija označavanja povezanih međuvremenskih zadataka, posebno zadataka za učenje sintaktičke strukture poput označavanja POS-a, najbolje radi za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju znanstvenih ključnih fraza.', 'ca': "Scientific keyphrase identification and classification is the task of detecting and classifying keyphrases from scholarly text with their types from a set of predefined classes.  Aquesta tasca té una gran varietat de beneficis, però encara és difícil en el rendiment, a causa de la falta de grans quantitats de dades etiquetades requerides per formar models neuronals profunds. Per superar aquest repte, explorem models lingüístics pré-entrenats BERT i SciBERT amb aprenentatge intermedi de transfer ència de tasques, utilitzant 42 combinacions de tasques intermedies relacionades amb moltes dades. revelem que l'aprenentatge intermedi de transfer ència de tasques en SciBERT indueix un punt de partida millor per a ajustar la tasca alvo en comparació amb BERT i aconsegueix un rendiment competitiu en l'identificació i la classificació de frases clau científices comparats amb treballs anteriors i línies de base fortes. Interessant, observem que el BERT amb l'aprenentatge intermedi de transfer ència de tasques fracassa en millorar el rendiment de l'identificació i la classificació científices de frases clau potencialment degut a l'oblidar catastròfic significatiu. Aquest resultat destaca que el coneixement científic aconseguit durant la pré-capacitació de models lingüístics en grans col·leccions científices juga un paper important en les tasques d'objectiu. També observem que la seqüència d'etiquetar tasques intermedies relacionades, especialment tasques d'aprenentatge d'estructura sinàctica com l'etiquetar POS, tendeix a funcionar millor per identificar i classificar frases clau científices.", 'et': 'Teadusliku võtmerfraasi identifitseerimine ja klassifitseerimine on ülesanne tuvastada ja klassifitseerida võtmerfraase teaduslikust tekstist koos nende tüüpidega eelnevalt määratletud klassidest. Sellel ülesandel on lai valik eeliseid, kuid see on ikka veel keeruline, kuna puuduvad suured märgistatud andmed, mida on vaja sügavate närvimudelite treenimiseks. Selle väljakutse ületamiseks uurime eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudeleid BERT ja SciBERT vahepealse ülesandeülekande õppega, kasutades 42 andmerikka vahepealse sihtülesande kombinatsiooni. Näitame, et vaheülesannete ülekande õppimine SciBERTis indutseerib parema lähtepunkti sihtülesannete täpsustamiseks võrreldes BERTiga ning saavutab konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse teadusliku võtmerfraasi identifitseerimisel ja klassifitseerimisel võrreldes nii varasemate tööde kui ka tugevate lähtejoontega. Huvitavalt märgime, et BERT ei suuda olulise katastroofilise unustamise tõttu parandada teadusliku võtmerfraasi identifitseerimise ja klassifitseerimise tulemuslikkust vahepealse ülesandeülekande õppega. See tulemus rõhutab, et keelemudelite eelkoolitusel suurtes teaduskogudes saavutatud teaduslikud teadmised mängivad sihtülesannete täitmisel olulist rolli. Samuti täheldame, et järjestuse märgistamisega seotud vaheülesanded, eriti süntaktilised struktuuriõppe ülesanded, nagu POS märgistamine, kipuvad kõige paremini töötama teadusliku võtmerfraasi identifitseerimisel ja klassifitseerimisel.', 'cs': 'Identifikace a klasifikace vědeckých klíčových frází je úkolem detekovat a klasifikovat klíčové fráze z vědeckého textu s jejich typy ze sady předem definovaných tříd. Tento úkol má širokou škálu výhod, ale stále je náročný ve výkonu kvůli nedostatku velkého množství označených dat potřebných pro trénink hlubokých neuronových modelů. Abychom tuto výzvu překonali, zkoumáme předškolené jazykové modely BERT a SciBERT s učením pro střední přenos úkolů pomocí 42 kombinací úkolů, které jsou bohaté na data. Zjišťujeme, že pokročilé učení přenosu úkolů na SciBERT vede k lepšímu výchozímu bodu pro jemné ladění cílových úkolů ve srovnání s BERT a dosahuje konkurenčního výkonu při identifikaci a klasifikaci vědeckých klíčových frází ve srovnání s předchozími pracemi a silnými základními liniemi. Zajímavé je, že BERT s pokročilým přenosem úkolů nedokáže zlepšit výkon identifikace a klasifikace vědeckých klíčových frází potenciálně kvůli významnému katastrofickému zapomenutí. Tento výsledek ukazuje, že vědecké poznatky dosažené při předškolení jazykových modelů na velkých vědeckých sbírkách hrají důležitou roli v cílových úkolech. Dále pozorujeme, že sekvenční tagování související střední úlohy, zejména úlohy syntaktické struktury učení, jako je POS tagování, mají tendenci nejlépe fungovat pro vědeckou identifikaci a klasifikaci klíčových frází.', 'fi': 'Tieteellinen avainlauseiden tunnistus ja luokittelu on tehtävä tunnistaa ja luokitella avainlauseet tieteellisestä tekstistä niiden tyyppeineen ennalta määritellyistä luokista. Tällä tehtävällä on monia etuja, mutta se on edelleen haastava suorituskyvyltään, koska syvähermomallien harjoitteluun tarvittavaa suurta määrää merkittyä dataa ei tarvita. Haasteen voittamiseksi tutkimme esikoulutettuja BERT- ja SciBERT-kielimalleja, joissa on välitehtävänsiirto-oppimista, käyttäen 42 dataa sisältävää välitehtäväyhdistelmää. Osoitamme, että välitehtävien siirtooppiminen SciBERTin avulla tuo paremman lähtökohdan kohdetehtävän hienosäätöön verrattuna BERT-järjestelmään ja saavuttaa kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn tieteellisessä avainlauseiden tunnistamisessa ja luokittelussa verrattuna sekä aiempiin että vahvoihin lähtökohtiin. Mielenkiintoista on huomata, että BERT ei pysty parantamaan tieteellisen avainlauseen tunnistamisen ja luokittelun suorituskykyä merkittävästi katastrofaalisen unohtamisen vuoksi. Tuloksena korostuu, että kielimallien esikoulutuksessa suurissa tieteellisissä kokoelmissa saavutettu tieteellinen tieto on tärkeässä roolissa kohdetehtävissä. Havaitsemme myös, että sekvenssimerkintään liittyvät välitehtävät, erityisesti syntaktiset rakenneoppimistehtävät, kuten POS Tagging, toimivat parhaiten tieteellisessä avainlauseiden tunnistamisessa ja luokittelussa.', 'ha': "Shaidar maɓallin Aiki da sifikanci yana da aikin ka gane kuma mai rarraba maɓallin kibaɓa daga matsayin da aka sanar da su daga wasu darafõfi na gaba ɗaya. Wannan aikin yana da wasu amfani masu yawa, kuma amma yana ƙaranci cikin aikin da za'a yi buƙata, haske da yawan data mai girma da aka buƙata dõmin ya yi amfani da misãlai masu ƙaranci na neural. In order to overcome this challenge, we explore pre-trained language models BERT and SciBERT with intermediate task transfer learning, using 42 data-rich related intermediate-target task combinations.  Tuna bayyana cewa muhimmin aikin da za'a iya amfani da aikin mai tsakanin da aka sami aikin da aka yi amfani da shi ga aikin mai kyau da sami da BERT kuma yana sãmu mai yin fassara a cikin shaidar maɓalli da fassarar da kuma a sami da duk aikin da suka gabata. Ina mai amfani da haka, Munã ganin BERT da muhimmin aikin mai transfer aiki da kuma an kasa kyautata aikin shaidar maɓallin sayansi da rarrabẽwa, mai yiwuwa ne da haske mai girma ta manta. Wannan ƙarshen ta ƙayyade cewa ilimin da aka samar da shi a lokacin da aka yi wa motsi na misalin harshe a kan dukkan masu sakan da aka sani, yana play wani muhimu a cikin aikin aikin goan. Tuna ganin cewa masu tagogi da ke samun aikin masu tsakanin da ke samu'a, da mafiya amfani da aikin shiryoyin ayuka masu iya haɗuwa da su a cikin shirin da ake samu kamar shirin PoS Taging, sunã aiki mafi kyãwo ga shaidar maɓallin sayansi da kuma tsofatarwa.", 'sk': 'Identifikacija in klasifikacija znanstvenih ključnih fraz je naloga odkrivanja in klasifikacije ključnih fraz iz znanstvenega besedila z njihovimi tipi iz nabora vnaprej določenih razredov. Ta naloga ima širok nabor prednosti, vendar je še vedno izziv glede zmogljivosti zaradi pomanjkanja velikih količin označenih podatkov, potrebnih za vadbo globokih nevronskih modelov. Da bi premagali ta izziv, raziskujemo vnaprej usposobljene jezikovne modele BERT in SciBERT z vmesnim učenjem prenosa nalog z uporabo 42 kombinacij vmesnih ciljnih nalog, bogatih s podatki. Razkrivamo, da vmesno učenje prenosa nalog na SciBERT inducira boljše izhodišče za natančno nastavitev ciljne naloge v primerjavi z BERT in dosega konkurenčno uspešnost pri identifikaciji in klasifikaciji znanstvenih ključnih fraz v primerjavi s prejšnjimi deli in močnimi osnovnimi linijami. Zanimivo je, da BERT z vmesnim učenjem prenosa nalog ne izboljša uspešnosti znanstvene identifikacije in klasifikacije ključnih fraz zaradi znatnega katastrofalnega pozabljanja. Ta rezultat poudarja, da ima znanstveno znanje, doseženo med predusposabljanjem jezikovnih modelov na velikih znanstvenih zbirkah, pomembno vlogo pri ciljnih nalogah. Ugotavljamo tudi, da vmesna naloga, povezana z označevanjem zaporedja, zlasti sintaktična naloga učenja strukture, kot je označevanje POS, najbolje delujejo pri znanstveni identifikaciji in klasifikaciji ključnih fraz.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Opong-task iki nduwe akeh akeh bener, njuk saiki wis nggawe gerang-kowe ngono nggawe barang langgar sampek akeh pisan Manual sing butakon akeh data seneng nggawe model Neral sampek. Ngubah kanggo nggawe perbudhakan iki, kita sak luwih-luwih model sing berarti BERT karo sciBERT karo intermediate task transfer lengrung, nggunakake 34 data-weakness tambah intermediate-goal combinings Awak dhéwé éntuk nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar nggawe sciBERT dumadhi kaya basa sing luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe Tarjamahan nggo nggawe barang kelas BERT karo perusahaan langgar sampek iso nggawe Tarjamahan kanggo nguasai perusahaan seneng cah-anaran langgar sampek winih lan nggo hasil dumadhi iki Nyong ngomong: BERT kuwi nggambar tarjamahan task transfer kuwi nggawe ngupakan ngerasar seneng pisan kelas usul Punika ingkang dipoleh sing paling-ingkang dipunangé kuwi nggawe ngerasakno sing luwih apik tur nguasai model sing luwih kuwi nggawe sampek bantuan sakjane kanggo nggawe galakno. Monday', 'he': 'זיהוי ומסגרת משפטים מדעיים הוא המשימה של זיהוי ומסגרת משפטים מפתחים מטקסט מדעי למשימה הזו יש מגוון רחב של יתרונות, אך היא עדיין מאתגרת ביצועים בגלל חוסר כמויות גדולות של נתונים מסוימים שנדרשים לאימון דוגמנים עצביים עמוקים. כדי להתגבר על האתגר הזה, אנו חוקרים דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש BERT וסייברט עם לימוד העברת משימה בינוני, בשימוש 42 שילובים משימה בינוניים עשירים בנתונים. אנו חושפים שלמדת העברת משימות בינונית על SciBERT מעוררת נקודת התחלה טובה יותר לתאים משימות מטרה בהשוואה עם BERT ולהשיג ביצועים תחרותיים בזיהוי ובזיהוי מילים מדעיים ומסגרת בהשוואה לשני עבודות קודמות ובסימנים חזקים. מעניין, אנו שומרים על BERT עם לימוד העברת משימה בינוני נכשל לשפר את ההפעלה של זיהוי המפתח המדעי והקליפורציה פוטנציאלית בגלל שכחות קטסטרופית משמעותית. התוצאה הזאת מזכירה כי ידע מדעי שנשג במהלך האימונים הקדמיים של דוגמני שפה על אוסף מדעי גדול משחק תפקיד חשוב במשימות המטרה. אנו גם שומרים על כך שהרצף של תגיגות משימות בינוניים קשורות, במיוחד משימות לימוד מבנה סינטקטי כמו תגיגות POS, נוטים לעבוד הכי טוב לזהות ומסגרת מילים מדעיים.', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིག་གི་གཙོ་ཚིག This task has a wide range of benefits, but it is still challenging in performance due to the lack of large amounts of labeled data required for training deep neural models. གདོང་ལེན་འདི་ལ་འཕར་རིམ་བཟོ་དགོས་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་གཞི་BERT དང་། SciBERT རྣམས་བརྟན་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ས SciBERT ནང་དུ་འཇུག་ཟམ་གནས་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་འགོ་བཙུགས་པ་དེ་ལས་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡུལ་དང་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་མཁན་དབྱེ་བ་དང་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་མཉ Interestingly, we observe that BERT with intermediate task transfer learning fails to improve the performance of scientific keyphrase identification and classification potentially due to significant catastrophic forgetting. གནད་དོན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ནི་ཚན་རིག་གིས་སྔོན་གྲངས་རིག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དཔེར་ན POS Tagging །'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Microblog Conversation Structures to Detect Rumors', 'pt': 'Explorando estruturas de conversação de microblog para detectar rumores', 'fr': 'Exploiter les structures de conversation du microblog pour détecter les rumeurs', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de las estructuras de conversación de microblogs para detectar rumores', 'ar': 'استغلال هياكل محادثة المدونات الصغيرة لكشف الشائعات', 'ru': 'Использование структур микроблогов для обнаружения слухов', 'ja': '噂を検出するためのマイクロブログ会話構造の利用', 'zh': '因微博对构以检讹言', 'hi': 'अफवाहों का पता लगाने के लिए Microblog वार्तालाप संरचनाओं का शोषण', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Struchtúir Comhrá Micr-Bhlag chun Ráflaí a Bhrath', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A mikroblog beszélgetési struktúrák kiaknázása pletykák észlelésére', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση δομών συνομιλίας για την ανίχνευση φήμων', 'it': 'Sfruttare le strutture di conversazione di Microblog per rilevare le voci', 'kk': 'Суреттерді табу үшін микроблог сөйлесу құрылғыларын экспорттау', 'lt': 'Mikroblogų konversacijos struktūrų naudojimas, siekiant nustatyti gandus', 'mk': 'Искористувањето на структурите за конверзија на микроблогот за да се откријат гласини', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Struktur Perbualan Microblog untuk Mengesan Rumor', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d മൈക്രോബോഗ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംഘടിതം', 'mt': 'L-isfruttar ta’ Strutturi ta’ Konverżjoni tal-Mikroblogi biex jiġu identifikati s-Rumori', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Майкроблог ярилцлагын бүтцийг дуудлага олж мэдэхэд', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie struktury konwersacji mikroblogów do wykrywania plotek', 'ro': 'Exploatarea structurilor de conversație Microblog pentru a detecta zvonurile', 'si': 'මයික්රොබ්ලෝග් කතාවාද සංවාදනය පරික්ෂා කරනවා කියලා', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući strukture razgovora mikrobloga za otkrivanje glasina', 'so': 'Exploding Microblog Conversations Structures to Detect Rumors', 'sv': 'Utnyttja mikrobloggs konversationsstrukturer för att upptäcka rykten', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'میکروبلوگ کی بات کی ساختاری روشن کرنے کے لئے پھیلائی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát nổ cấu trúc khủng bố', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af Microblog samtalestrukturer til at opdage rygter', 'bg': 'Използване на структурите за разговори на микроблога за откриване на слухове', 'nl': 'Microblog conversatiestructuren gebruiken om geruchten op te sporen', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući strukture razgovora mikrobloga za otkrivanje glasina', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi struktur konversasi Microblog untuk mendeteksi rumor', 'ko': '웨이보 대화 구조를 이용하여 헛소문을 탐지하다', 'de': 'Nutzung von Microblog-Konversationsstrukturen zur Erkennung von Gerüchten', 'fa': 'استفاده از ساختارهای مکالمات میکروبلاگ برای شناسایی شایعه\u200cها', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Mazungumzo ya Microblog kwa ajili ya Kugundua Uzungumzo', 'tr': 'Mikroblog Qonuşma Yapılaryny Aňlamak üçin ullanýar', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i strukturave të konversimit të mikroblogut për të zbuluar thashethemet', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Süleymanları keşfetmək üçün Mikroblog Qonuşma Qurğuları Exploiting', 'hy': 'Միկրոբլոգի հաղորդակցման կառուցվածքների օգտագործումը լսերի հայտնաբերելու համար', 'bn': 'গুজব সনাক্ত করার জন্য মাইক্রোব্লগ আলোচনার কাঠামো প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući strukture razgovora mikrobloga za otkrivanje glasina', 'ca': 'Utilitzant estructures de conversació de microblogs per detectar rumors', 'cs': 'Využití mikroblogových konverzačních struktur k detekci zvěstí', 'et': 'Mikroblogi vestlusstruktuuride kasutamine kuulujuttude tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Mikroblogien keskustelurakenteiden hyödyntäminen huhujen havaitsemiseksi', 'jv': 'Ngubah Jecah-Jecah Daftar Pethuk kanggo Ketoke Rwih', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje struktur pogovorov za mikroblog za odkrivanje govoric', 'he': 'ניצל מבני שינוי מיקרובלוג כדי לגלות שמועות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཟིན་བྲིས་གླེང་སྒྲུང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'As one of the most popular social media platforms, Twitter has become a primary source of information for many people. Unfortunately, both valid information and rumors are propagated on Twitter due to the lack of an automatic information verification system. Twitter users communicate by replying to other users’ messages, forming a conversation structure. Using this structure, users can decide whether the information in the source tweet is a rumor by reading the tweet’s replies, which voice other users’ stances on the tweet. The majority of rumor detection researchers process such tweets based on time, ignoring the conversation structure. To reap the benefits of the Twitter conversation structure, we developed a model to detect rumors by modeling conversation structure as a graph. Thus, our model’s improved representation of the conversation structure enhances its rumor detection accuracy. The experimental results on two rumor datasets show that our model outperforms several baseline models, including a state-of-the-art model', 'ar': 'باعتباره أحد أشهر منصات التواصل الاجتماعي ، أصبح تويتر مصدرًا رئيسيًا للمعلومات للعديد من الأشخاص. لسوء الحظ ، يتم نشر كل من المعلومات الصحيحة والشائعات على Twitter بسبب عدم وجود نظام آلي للتحقق من المعلومات. يتواصل مستخدمو Twitter من خلال الرد على رسائل المستخدمين الآخرين ، وتشكيل بنية محادثة. باستخدام هذه البنية ، يمكن للمستخدمين تحديد ما إذا كانت المعلومات الواردة في تغريدة المصدر شائعة من خلال قراءة ردود التغريدة ، والتي تعبر عن مواقف المستخدمين الآخرين في التغريدة. يقوم غالبية الباحثين في الكشف عن الشائعات بمعالجة مثل هذه التغريدات بناءً على الوقت ، متجاهلين بنية المحادثة. لجني فوائد بنية المحادثة على Twitter ، قمنا بتطوير نموذج لاكتشاف الشائعات من خلال نمذجة بنية المحادثة كرسم بياني. وبالتالي ، فإن تمثيل نموذجنا المحسّن لهيكل المحادثة يعزز دقة اكتشاف الشائعات. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية لمجموعتي بيانات للشائعات أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على العديد من النماذج الأساسية ، بما في ذلك أحدث نموذج', 'fr': "En tant que l'une des plateformes de médias sociaux les plus populaires, Twitter est devenu une source d'information principale pour de nombreuses personnes. Malheureusement, des informations valides et des rumeurs sont propagées sur Twitter en raison de l'absence d'un système de vérification automatique des informations. Les utilisateurs de Twitter communiquent en répondant aux messages des autres utilisateurs, formant ainsi une structure de conversation. Grâce à cette structure, les utilisateurs peuvent décider si les informations contenues dans le tweet source sont une rumeur en lisant les réponses du tweet, qui expriment les positions des autres utilisateurs sur le tweet. La majorité des chercheurs en détection de rumeurs traitent ces tweets en fonction du temps, sans tenir compte de la structure de la conversation. Pour profiter des avantages de la structure de conversation Twitter, nous avons développé un modèle pour détecter les rumeurs en modélisant la structure des conversations sous forme de graphique. Ainsi, la représentation améliorée de la structure de la conversation par notre modèle améliore la précision de détection des rumeurs. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données de rumeurs montrent que notre modèle surpasse plusieurs modèles de base, y compris un modèle de pointe", 'pt': 'Como uma das plataformas de mídia social mais populares, o Twitter se tornou a principal fonte de informação para muitas pessoas. Infelizmente, tanto informações válidas quanto rumores são propagados no Twitter devido à falta de um sistema automático de verificação de informações. Os usuários do Twitter se comunicam respondendo às mensagens de outros usuários, formando uma estrutura de conversação. Usando essa estrutura, os usuários podem decidir se a informação no tweet de origem é um boato lendo as respostas do tweet, que expressam as posições de outros usuários sobre o tweet. A maioria dos pesquisadores de detecção de rumores processa esses tweets com base no tempo, ignorando a estrutura da conversa. Para colher os benefícios da estrutura de conversação do Twitter, desenvolvemos um modelo para detectar rumores modelando a estrutura da conversa como um gráfico. Assim, a representação aprimorada do nosso modelo da estrutura de conversação aumenta a precisão da detecção de rumores. Os resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados de rumores mostram que nosso modelo supera vários modelos de linha de base, incluindo um modelo de última geração', 'es': 'Como una de las plataformas de redes sociales más populares, Twitter se ha convertido en la principal fuente de información para muchas personas. Desafortunadamente, tanto la información válida como los rumores se propagan en Twitter debido a la falta de un sistema automático de verificación de información. Los usuarios de Twitter se comunican respondiendo a los mensajes de otros usuarios, formando una estructura de conversación. Con esta estructura, los usuarios pueden decidir si la información del tuit fuente es un rumor leyendo las respuestas del tuit, que expresan las posturas de otros usuarios sobre el tuit. La mayoría de los investigadores de detección de rumores procesan dichos tuits en función del tiempo, ignorando la estructura de la conversación. Para aprovechar los beneficios de la estructura de conversación de Twitter, desarrollamos un modelo para detectar rumores modelando la estructura de la conversación como un gráfico. Por lo tanto, la representación mejorada de la estructura de conversación de nuestro modelo mejora la precisión de la detección de rumores. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos de rumores muestran que nuestro modelo supera a varios modelos de referencia, incluido un modelo de última generación', 'ja': '最も人気のあるソーシャルメディアプラットフォームの1つとして、Twitterは多くの人々にとって主要な情報源となっています。 残念ながら、自動情報検証システムがないため、有効な情報と噂の両方がTwitterで伝播しています。 Twitterユーザーは、他のユーザーのメッセージに返信し、会話構造を形成することでコミュニケーションをとります。 この構造を使用して、ユーザーは、ツイートの返信を読むことによって、ソースツイート内の情報が噂であるかどうかを判断することができます。これは、ツイートに対する他のユーザーのスタンスの声です。 噂検出研究者の大半は、会話構造を無視して、時間に基づいてそのようなツイートを処理します。 Twitterの会話構造の利点を活用するために、会話構造をグラフとしてモデリングすることで噂を検出するモデルを開発しました。 したがって、私たちのモデルの会話構造の改善された表現は、噂の検出精度を向上させます。 2つの噂のデータセットの実験結果は、当社のモデルが最先端のモデルを含むいくつかのベースラインモデルよりも優れていることを示しています', 'hi': 'सबसे लोकप्रिय सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों में से एक के रूप में, ट्विटर कई लोगों के लिए जानकारी का प्राथमिक स्रोत बन गया है। दुर्भाग्य से, एक स्वचालित सूचना सत्यापन प्रणाली की कमी के कारण ट्विटर पर वैध जानकारी और अफवाहें दोनों प्रचारित की जाती हैं। चहचहाना उपयोगकर्ताओं को अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं के संदेशों का जवाब देकर संवाद, एक वार्तालाप संरचना बनाने. इस संरचना का उपयोग करके, उपयोगकर्ता यह तय कर सकते हैं कि स्रोत ट्वीट में जानकारी ट्वीट के उत्तरों को पढ़कर एक अफवाह है या नहीं, जो ट्वीट पर अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं के रुख को आवाज देती है। अफवाह का पता लगाने वाले शोधकर्ताओं के बहुमत समय के आधार पर इस तरह के ट्वीट्स को संसाधित करते हैं, बातचीत की संरचना को अनदेखा करते हैं। चहचहाना वार्तालाप संरचना के लाभों को काटने के लिए, हमने एक ग्राफ के रूप में बातचीत संरचना को मॉडलिंग करके अफवाहों का पता लगाने के लिए एक मॉडल विकसित किया। इस प्रकार, वार्तालाप संरचना का हमारे मॉडल का बेहतर प्रतिनिधित्व इसकी अफवाह का पता लगाने की सटीकता को बढ़ाता है। दो अफवाह डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल कई बेसलाइन मॉडलों को मात देता है, जिसमें अत्याधुनिक मॉडल भी शामिल है', 'zh': '最受欢迎社交媒体台之一,Twitter为众人大要。 不幸者,以乏自信验系统,有效信及讹言皆传于Twitter。 Twitter用户因报他用户消息交流,以成对构。 用此结构,用户可读推文报以定源推文中信息是非讹言,此复他用户推文也。 多讹言检测人以时处此推文,略相结构。 为得Twitter对构之利,开一模样,因将结构建模为图表以检讹言。 是以模样改入对构,增其讹言检测之准确性。 两讹言数集之实验结果表明,吾形优于数基线,最为先进。', 'ru': 'Как одна из самых популярных платформ социальных сетей, Twitter стал основным источником информации для многих людей. К сожалению, как достоверная информация, так и слухи распространяются в Twitter из-за отсутствия автоматической системы проверки информации. Пользователи Twitter общаются, отвечая на сообщения других пользователей, формируя структуру разговора. Используя эту структуру, пользователи могут решить, является ли информация в исходном твите слухом, прочитав ответы на твит, которые озвучивают позиции других пользователей в твите. Большинство исследователей по выявлению слухов обрабатывают такие твиты по времени, игнорируя структуру разговора. Чтобы воспользоваться преимуществами структуры общения в Twitter, мы разработали модель для обнаружения слухов путем моделирования структуры общения в виде графика. Таким образом, улучшенное представление структуры разговора в нашей модели повышает точность обнаружения слухов. Экспериментальные результаты по двум наборам данных слухов показывают, что наша модель превосходит несколько базовых моделей, включая современную модель', 'ga': "Mar cheann de na hardáin meáin shóisialta is coitianta, tá Twitter anois ina phríomhfhoinse faisnéise do go leor daoine. Ar an drochuair, iomadaítear faisnéis bhailí agus ráflaí ar Twitter mar gheall ar an easpa córas uathoibríoch fíoraithe faisnéise. Déanann úsáideoirí Twitter cumarsáid trí fhreagra a thabhairt ar theachtaireachtaí úsáideoirí eile, rud a chruthaíonn struchtúr comhrá. Ag baint úsáide as an struchtúr seo, is féidir le húsáideoirí cinneadh a dhéanamh cibé an ráfla atá san fhaisnéis sa tweet foinse trí fhreagraí an tweet a léamh, a chuireann seasamh úsáideoirí eile ar an tweet. Próiseálann formhór na dtaighdeoirí braite ráflaí tweets den sórt sin bunaithe ar am, gan aird a thabhairt ar struchtúr an chomhrá. Chun leas a bhaint as na buntáistí a bhaineann le struchtúr comhrá Twitter, d'fhorbraíomar múnla chun ráflaí a bhrath trí struchtúr comhrá a shamhaltú mar ghraf. Mar sin, cuireann léiriú feabhsaithe ár múnla ar an struchtúr comhrá lena cruinneas braite ráflaí. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí ráflaí go sáraíonn ár múnla roinnt samhlacha bonnlíne, lena n-áirítear samhail den scoth.", 'hu': 'Az egyik legnépszerűbb közösségi média platformként a Twitter sok ember elsődleges információforrásává vált. Sajnos mind az érvényes információkat, mind a pletykákat terjesztik a Twitteren az automatikus információellenőrző rendszer hiánya miatt. A Twitter felhasználók más felhasználók üzeneteire adott válaszokkal kommunikálnak, beszélgetési struktúrát alkotva. Ezzel a struktúrával a felhasználók eldönthetik, hogy a forrás tweetben szereplő információ pletyka-e, ha elolvassák a tweet válaszait, amelyek hangot adnak más felhasználók álláspontjának a tweetben. A pletyka észlelési kutatók többsége az ilyen tweeteket idő alapján dolgozza fel, figyelmen kívül hagyva a beszélgetési struktúrát. A Twitter beszélgetési struktúra előnyeinek kiaknázása érdekében kifejlesztettünk egy modellt a pletykák felismerésére a beszélgetési struktúra grafikonként történő modellezésével. Így modellünk jobb megjelenítése a beszélgetési struktúrát javítja a pletyka észlelésének pontosságát. Két pletyka adathalmaz kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a modellünk több alapvető modellt felülmúl, köztük egy korszerű modellt is.', 'ka': 'როგორც ერთი უფრო პოლუბური სოციალური მედია პლატატი, Twitter უფრო მეტი ადამიანებისთვის იყო ინფორმაციის პირველი ფესტი. მართლად, ორივე საჭირო ინფორმაცია და ხმები Twitter-ში გახსნა, რადგან ავტომატური ინფორმაციის შემოწმება სისტემა არსებობა. Name ამ სტრუქტურაციის გამოყენება, მომხმარებელი შეუძლია გადაწყენოთ თუ ინფორმაცია სისტემაში არის სისტემა, რომელიც სისტემაში სხვა მომხმარებელი სტრუქტურაციის სტრუქტურა მეტი სიტყვანის განვიცნობის მსწავლობელი განსხვავების პროცესება ასეთი ტივიტები, რომელიც დროის დაბაზეულია, საუკუნო სტრუქტურაციის Twitter საუბრის სტრუქტურაციის გამოსახულებების შესაძლებლობად, ჩვენ მოდელის განვითარება, რომელიც საუბრის სტრუქტურაციის მოდელურად განვითარება. ამიტომ, ჩვენი მოდელის უფრო მეტად გამოსახულების სტრუქტურაციის გამოსახულება უფრო მეტად მისი სიტყვების გამოსახულება. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ორი სიტყვების მონაცემების მონაცემებით ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება რამდენიმე მხარეს მოდელების შესახებ', 'el': 'Ως μια από τις πιο δημοφιλείς πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων, το Twitter έχει γίνει μια κύρια πηγή πληροφοριών για πολλούς ανθρώπους. Δυστυχώς, τόσο έγκυρες πληροφορίες όσο και φήμες διαδίδονται στο Twitter λόγω της έλλειψης αυτόματου συστήματος επαλήθευσης πληροφοριών. Οι χρήστες του Twitter επικοινωνούν απαντώντας σε μηνύματα άλλων χρηστών, σχηματίζοντας μια δομή συνομιλίας. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτή τη δομή, οι χρήστες μπορούν να αποφασίσουν αν οι πληροφορίες στο πηγαίο tweet είναι μια φήμη διαβάζοντας τις απαντήσεις του tweet, οι οποίες εκφράζουν τις θέσεις άλλων χρηστών σχετικά με το tweet. Η πλειοψηφία των ερευνητών ανίχνευσης φήμων επεξεργάζεται τέτοια tweets με βάση το χρόνο, αγνοώντας τη δομή συνομιλίας. Για να αποκομίσουμε τα οφέλη της δομής συνομιλίας αναπτύξαμε ένα μοντέλο για την ανίχνευση φήμων μοντελοποιώντας τη δομή συνομιλίας ως γράφημα. Έτσι, η βελτιωμένη αναπαράσταση της δομής συνομιλίας του μοντέλου μας ενισχύει την ακρίβεια ανίχνευσης φήμων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων φήμων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά αρκετά μοντέλα βάσης, συμπεριλαμβανομένου ενός μοντέλου τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'lt': 'Kaip viena populiariausių socialinės žiniasklaidos platformų, Twitter tapo pagrindiniu daugelio žmonių informacijos šaltiniu. Deja, dėl automatinės informacijos tikrinimo sistemos trūkumo Twitter skleidžiama ir galiojanti informacija, ir gandai. Twitter naudotojai bendrauja atsakydami į kitų naudotojų pranešimus ir formuodami pokalbių struktūrą. Naudodamiesi šia struktūra naudotojai gali nuspręsti, ar informacija šaltinio tweete yra ganda skaitydami tweeto atsakymus, kuriuose kalbama apie kitų naudotojų pozicijas tweete. Dauguma garsų aptikimo tyrėjų tokius tweetus tvarko remiantis laiku, ignoruodamos pokalbių struktūrą. Siekdami pasinaudoti Twitter pokalbių struktūros teikiama nauda, sukūrėme model į, skirtą atrasti gandus modeliuodami pokalbių struktūrą kaip grafiką. Taigi, pagerintas mūs ų modelio atstovavimas pokalbio struktūrai padidina jo gandų aptikimo tikslumą. Dviejų gandų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis atitinka keletą pagrindinių modelių, įskaitant naujausią model į.', 'mk': 'Како една од најпопуларните платформи на социјалните медиуми, Твитер стана примарен извор на информации за многу луѓе. За жал, важните информации и гласини се пропалирани на Твитер поради недостатокот на автоматски систем за верификација на информациите. Корисниците на Твитер комуницираат со одговор на пораките на другите корисници, формирајќи структура за разговор. Користејќи ја оваа структура, корисниците можат да одлучат дали информациите во изворот на Твитер се гласини со читање на одговорите на Твитерот, кои ги гласаат ставовите на другите корисници на Твитерот. Повеќето истражувачи за детекција на гласини процесираат вакви твитови врз основа на времето, игнорирајќи ја структурата на разговорот. За да ги искористиме бенефициите од структурата на разговорот на Твитер, развивме модел за детектирање на гласини со моделирање на структурата на разговорот како граф. Така, подобреното претставување на нашиот модел на структурата на разговорот ја зголемува неговата прецизност за детекција на гласини. Експерименталните резултати на двата група на податоци за гласини покажуваат дека нашиот модел надминува неколку основни модели, вклучувајќи и најнов модел', 'kk': 'Көпшілік адамдардың негізгі мәліметі болды. Кешіріңіз, автоматты мәліметті тексеру жүйесі жоқ себебі Твиттерде дұрыс мәлімет мен дыбыс екеуі қолданылады. Твиттердің пайдаланушылары сұхбат құрылғысын басқа пайдаланушылардың хаттарына жауап беріп байланысты. Бұл құрылғыны қолдану үшін, пайдаланушылар көзінің tweet- тың мәліметі tweet- тың жауаптарын оқу үшін оқу үшін айтуға болады. Көпшілігі сұрақтарды анықтау зерттеушілері уақытта негізделген, сұрақтар құрылымын елемейді. Твиттердің сөйлесу құрылымының мүмкіндіктерін жасау үшін, сөйлесу құрылымын график ретінде модельді анықтау үшін үлгі жасадық. Біздің үлгіміздің сұхбат құрылымының жақсы түсініктері түсініктерінің дұрыстығын өзгертеді. Екі жаңалық деректер қорларының тәжірибелі нәтижелері біздің үлгіміздің бірнеше негізгі үлгілерін өзгертуге болады.', 'ms': 'Sebagai salah satu platform media sosial yang paling popular, Twitter telah menjadi sumber utama maklumat bagi ramai orang. Malangnya, kedua-dua maklumat yang sah dan khabar angin tersebar di Twitter kerana kekurangan sistem pengesahan maklumat automatik. Pengguna Twitter berkomunikasi dengan menjawab mesej pengguna lain, membentuk struktur perbualan. Dengan menggunakan struktur ini, pengguna boleh memutuskan sama ada maklumat dalam tweet sumber adalah khabar angin dengan membaca jawapan tweet, yang mana suara pendapat pengguna lain pada tweet. Kebanyakan penyelidik pengesan khabar angin memproses tweet tersebut berdasarkan masa, mengabaikan struktur perbualan. Untuk mengambil keuntungan dari struktur perbualan Twitter, kami mengembangkan model untuk mengesan khabar angin dengan memmodelkan struktur perbualan sebagai graf. Oleh itu, perwakilan model kita yang lebih baik dari struktur perbualan meningkatkan ketepatan pengesan khabar angin. Keputusan percubaan pada dua set data khabar angin menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui beberapa model asas, termasuk model yang paling baik', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളില്\u200d ഒരാളായിരുന്നു ടൂട്ടര്\u200d പലര്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, സ്വയം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പുവരുത്തുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമില്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും വാക്കുകളും പ്ര മറ്റുള്ള ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ സന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ ഈ സ്ഥാനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് സ്രോതസ്സ് ട്വീറ്റിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നവരില്\u200d അധികപേരും സമയത്തിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഇങ്ങനെ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. സം ടൂട്ടര്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കി. സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് ഗ് അതുകൊണ്ട്, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത The experimental results on two rumor datasets show that our model outperforms several baseline models, including a state-of-the-art model', 'mt': 'Bħala waħda mill-pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali l-aktar popolari, Twitter sar sors primarju ta’ informazzjoni għal ħafna nies. Sfortunatament, kemm informazzjoni valida kif ukoll rumori huma propagati fuq Twitter minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ sistema ta’ verifika awtomatika tal-informazzjoni. L-utenti tat-Twitter jikkomunikaw billi jwieġbu għall-messaġġi tal-utenti l-oħra, u jiffurmaw struttura ta’ konverżjoni. Bl-użu ta’ din l-istruttura, l-utenti jistgħu jiddeċiedu jekk l-informazzjoni fit-tweet tas-sors hijiex rumor billi jaqraw it-tweġibiet tat-tweet, li jagħtu vuċi lill-pożizzjonijiet tal-utenti l-oħra fit-tweet. Il-maġġoranza tar-riċerkaturi għall-individwazzjoni ta’ rumori jipproċessaw tali tweets ibbażati fuq iż-żmien, filwaqt li jinjoraw l-istruttura tal-konverżjoni. To reap the benefits of the Twitter conversation structure, we developed a model to detect rumors by modeling conversation structure as a graph.  Għalhekk, ir-rappreżentanza mtejba tal-mudell tagħna tal-istruttura tal-konverżjoni ttejjeb il-preċiżjoni tal-individwazzjoni ta’ rumori tagħha. Ir-riżultati sperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta dwar rumori juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż diversi mudelli ta’ linja bażi, inkluż mudell l-aktar avvanzat', 'mn': 'Хамгийн алдартай нийгмийн хэвлэлийн платформуудын нэг нь Твиттер олон хүмүүсийн анхны мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр болсон. Харамсалтай нь автоматически мэдээллийн шалгалтын систем байхгүй учраас Twitter дээр зөв мэдээллийн болон сонсолтууд хоёуланг дэвшүүлж байна. Твиттерийн хэрэглэгчид бусад хэрэглэгчдийн хуудас руу хариулж, ярианы бүтэц үүсгэдэг. Энэ бүтцийг ашиглаж, хэрэглэгчид эх үүсвэр tweet дээрх мэдээлэл нь tweet-ын хариултыг уншиж, бусад хэрэглэгчийн нөхцөл байдлыг tweet дээр сонсож байгаа эсэхийг шийдэж болно. Үүний ихэнх сонсолт олох судлаачид цаг хугацааны үндсэн tweets хийдэг бөгөөд ярилцлагын бүтцийг огт мэдэхгүй байдаг. Твиттерийн ярилцлагын бүтцийн ашиг гаргахын тулд бид ярилцлагын бүтцийг график хэлбэрээр зохион байгуулахын тулд нэг загвар бүтээсэн. Тиймээс бидний загварын загвар нь ярианы бүтцийн илэрхийлэл нь түүний ярианы нээлттэй тодорхойлолтыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Хоёр дуу өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь олон суурь шугам загваруудыг дамжуулдаг.', 'it': "Essendo una delle piattaforme di social media più popolari, Twitter è diventata una fonte primaria di informazioni per molte persone. Purtroppo, sia informazioni valide che voci vengono propagate su Twitter a causa della mancanza di un sistema automatico di verifica delle informazioni. Gli utenti Twitter comunicano rispondendo ai messaggi degli altri utenti, formando una struttura di conversazione. Utilizzando questa struttura, gli utenti possono decidere se le informazioni contenute nel tweet sorgente sono una voce leggendo le risposte del tweet, che esprimono la posizione degli altri utenti sul tweet. La maggior parte dei ricercatori di rilevamento delle voci elaborano tali tweet in base al tempo, ignorando la struttura della conversazione. Per sfruttare i vantaggi della struttura delle conversazioni di Twitter, abbiamo sviluppato un modello per rilevare le voci modellando la struttura delle conversazioni come grafico. Pertanto, la migliore rappresentazione della struttura della conversazione da parte del nostro modello migliora la sua precisione di rilevamento delle voci. I risultati sperimentali su due dataset di rumor mostrano che il nostro modello supera diversi modelli di base, incluso un modello all'avanguardia", 'no': 'Som ein av dei populærste sosiale media-plattformene, har Twitter blitt ein hovudkilde for informasjon for mange menneske. Dessverre vert både gyldig informasjon og rumorer spretta på Twitter på grunn av manglar eit automatisk informasjonsverifikasjonssystem. Twitter-brukarar kommuniserer ved å svara til andre brukarar sin meldingar, som formar eit samtalestruktur. Bruk denne strukturen kan brukarar bestemme om informasjonen i kjeldetweetet er ein rumor ved å lesa svara på tweetet, som stemmer oppstandane til andre brukarar på tweetet. Dei fleste av forskere for oppdaging av rumorer prosesserer slike tweeter basert på tid og ignorerer samtalestrukturen. For å opprette fordelene av samtalestrukturen på Twitter, utvikla vi eit modell for å finna rumorer ved å modellere samtalestrukturen som graf. Derfor er modellen vårt forbetra representasjon av samtalestrukturen forbedra spesifikasjonen av rumoreoppdaging. Eksperimentale resultatet på to rumoredatasett viser at modellen vår utfører fleire baseline modeller, inkludert eit kunstmodell', 'pl': 'Jako jedna z najpopularniejszych platform mediów społecznościowych, Twitter stał się głównym źródłem informacji dla wielu osób. Niestety, zarówno ważne informacje, jak i plotki są rozpowszechniane na Twitterze ze względu na brak automatycznego systemu weryfikacji informacji. Użytkownicy Twittera komunikują się poprzez odpowiedź na wiadomości innych użytkowników, tworząc strukturę konwersacji. Korzystając z tej struktury użytkownicy mogą zdecydować, czy informacje zawarte w tweecie źródłowym są plotką, czytając odpowiedzi tweeta, które wyrażają stanowiska innych użytkowników na tweet. Większość badaczy wykrywających plotki przetwarza takie tweety w oparciu o czas, ignorując strukturę rozmowy. Aby czerpać korzyści ze struktury konwersacji na Twitterze, opracowaliśmy model wykrywania plotek poprzez modelowanie struktury konwersacji jako wykresu. W ten sposób ulepszona reprezentacja struktury rozmowy naszego modelu zwiększa dokładność wykrywania plotek. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch zbiorach danych plotek pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa kilka modeli bazowych, w tym najnowocześniejszy model', 'ro': 'Fiind una dintre cele mai populare platforme de social media, Twitter a devenit o sursă principală de informații pentru mulți oameni. Din păcate, atât informații valide, cât și zvonuri sunt propagate pe Twitter din cauza lipsei unui sistem automat de verificare a informațiilor. Utilizatorii Twitter comunică răspunzând la mesajele altor utilizatori, formând o structură de conversație. Folosind această structură, utilizatorii pot decide dacă informația din tweetul sursă este un zvon citind răspunsurile tweetului, care exprimă poziția altor utilizatori cu privire la tweet. Majoritatea cercetătorilor de detectare a zvonurilor procesează astfel de tweeturi pe baza timpului, ignorând structura conversației. Pentru a profita de avantajele structurii conversației Twitter, am dezvoltat un model pentru detectarea zvonurilor prin modelarea structurii conversației ca grafic. Astfel, reprezentarea îmbunătățită a structurii conversației de către modelul nostru sporește acuratețea detectării zvonurilor. Rezultatele experimentale pe două seturi de date de zvonuri arată că modelul nostru depășește mai multe modele de bază, inclusiv un model de ultimă generație', 'sr': 'Kao jedan od najpopularnijih platformi društvenih medija, Twitter je postao glavni izvor informacija za mnoge ljude. Nažalost, i važne informacije i glasine su proširene na Twitteru zbog nedostatka automatskog sustava provjere informacija. Korisnici Twitter komuniciraju odgovarajući na poruke drugih korisnika, formirajući strukturu razgovora. Koristeći ovu strukturu, korisnici mogu odlučiti da li je informacija iz izvornog tweet a glasina èitanjem odgovora tweeta, koja glasa stanja drugih korisnika na tweetu. Većina istraživača za otkrivanje glasina procesuje takve tweete na temelju vremena, ignorirajući strukturu razgovora. Da bi dobili prednost strukture razgovora Twitter, razvili smo model da otkrijemo glasine modelirajući strukturu razgovora kao graf. Dakle, naš model je poboljšan predstavljanje strukture razgovora povećava tačnost otkrivanja glasina. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka glasina pokazuju da naš model iznosi nekoliko osnovnih model a, uključujući stanje umjetnosti.', 'so': "Sida mid ka mid ah jardiinada macluumaadka bulshada bulshada, Twitter wuxuu u noqday macluumaad ugu horeeya dadka badan. Nasiib la’aanta waxaa Twitterka lagu ogeysiiyaa macluumaad shaqeyn iyo warar, sababtoo ah baahida nidaamka caddeynta macluumaadka rasmiga ah darteed. Isticmaalayaasha Twitterka waxay ku xiriiraan warqadaha kale ee isticmaalayaasha, iyagoo sameynaya dhismo hadal ah. Isku isticmaalka dhismahan, isticmaalayaasha ayaa go’aan ka gaari kara macluumaadka Tweetka iyo in uu yahay war uu ku qorayo jawaabaha Tweetka, kaas oo codaya xaalada kale ee isticmaalayaasha Tweetka. Inta badan cilmi-baaritaanta hadalka ayaa isticmaalaya tweetka oo saacadda ku saleysan, iskaga tagaya dhismaha hadalka. Si aan u soo ururiyo faa'iidada dhismaha hadalka ee Twitterka, waxaynu u sameynnay modelin si aan u ogaano warqado loo sameynayo dhismaha hadalka sida sawir. Sidaa darteed, modellkayaga ayaa hormariyey aragtida dhismaha hadalka ayaa kordhisa saxda la garto wararka. arimaha imtixaanka ee labada macluumaad ku saabsan waxay muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu sameeyo tusaalo badan oo basaaska ah, kaas oo ku jira tusaale-ka-farshaxanta", 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදිහට ට්විටර් ගොඩක් මිනිස්සු වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණික තො අවාසනාවට, වැදගත් තොරතුරු සහ කියවන්න දෙන්නම් ට්විටර් එක්ක ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය තොරතුරු පද්ධතියක් නැති නිස Twitter ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අනිත් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ පණිවිඩයට පිළිතුරු කිරීමෙන් සම්බන්ධ මේ සංවිධානය භාවිත කරන්න, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ තීරණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට විස වෙලාවට අධිකරණය කතා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, කතා කරන්න ස්ථානය අවස්ථාවක් නැත ට්විටර් කතාව සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විසිද්ධ ක ඉතින්, අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ සංවාදයේ සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැඩි වෙලා තියෙන්නේ එයාගේ අවශ්\u200dය සොයාගන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් විසින් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විසින් වි', 'sv': 'Som en av de mest populära sociala medieplattformarna har Twitter blivit en primär informationskälla för många människor. Tyvärr sprids både giltig information och rykten på Twitter på grund av avsaknaden av ett automatiskt informationsverifieringssystem. Twitter-användare kommunicerar genom att svara på andra användares meddelanden och bilda en konversationsstruktur. Med hjälp av denna struktur kan användarna avgöra om informationen i källtweeten är ett rykte genom att läsa tweetens svar, vilka röstar andra användares ståndpunkter om tweeten. Majoriteten av forskare som upptäcker rykten bearbetar sådana tweets baserat på tid och ignorerar konversationsstrukturen. För att dra nytta av Twitters konversationsstruktur utvecklade vi en modell för att upptäcka rykten genom att modellera konversationsstruktur som en graf. Således förbättrar vår modells förbättrade representation av konversationsstrukturen dess noggrannhet för att upptäcka rykten. Experimentella resultat på två ryktesdata visar att vår modell presterar bättre än flera basmodeller, inklusive en state-of-the-art modell', 'ta': 'பிரபலமான சமூக ஊடகங்களில் ஒன்றாக, தொடர்பு பல மக்களுக்கு தகவல் முதன்மை மூலமாக ஆகிவிட்டது. துரதிருஷ்டவசமாக, இருவரும் செல்லுபடியான தகவல் மற்றும் குறிப்புகளும் தானியங்கி தகவல் உறுதிப்படுத்தல் அமைப்பின் காரணம தொடர்பு பயனர்கள் மற்ற பயனரின் செய்திகளுக்கு பதிலளித்து, பேச்சு அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினார்கள். இந்த அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி பயனர் மூலம் tweet தகவல் ஒரு குறிப்பாக தீர்மானிக்க முடியும், அது மற்ற பயனர் நிலையில் இருக்கும் குரல் இருக்கிறதா என் பெரும்பாலான குரல் கண்டறிதல் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் நேரத்தை அடிப்படையாக இத்தகைய tweets செயல்படுத்துகிறது, உரையாடல் அம Twitter உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தின் பயன்பாடுகளை மீண்டும் குறிக்க, வரைபடத்தின் மூலம் பேச்சு உருவாக்கும் பேச்சு உருவாக்கும எனவே, எங்கள் மாதிரி உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தின் மேம்படுத்தல் முன்னேற்றப்பட்டது அதன் கூற்று கண்டறிதல் சரியை அதிகரிக்க இரண்டு குரல் தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெரியும்', 'ur': 'بہترین مشهور سوسیلی میڈیا پٹرومٹ میں سے ایک ہے، ٹویٹر بہت سے لوگوں کے لئے اولین اطلاعات کا سورج ہو گیا ہے۔ بدبختی، دونوں معلومات اور غلاموں کو توئیٹر پر پھیلایا گیا ہے، اس وجہ سے کہ اتوماتیک معلومات کی تصدیق سیسٹم کی ناکامی ہے. ٹویٹر کارساز دوسرے کارساز کے پیغام پر جواب دیتے ہیں، ایک صحبت ساختار بناتے ہیں. اس ساختار کے مطابق، کارساز مطابق فیصلہ کر سکتے ہیں کہ سورج ٹویٹ کی اطلاعات ایک شہوت ہے کہ ٹویٹ کی جواب پڑھنے کے ذریعہ، جو ٹویٹ میں دوسرے کارساز کی موقعیت آواز دیتا ہے. افسانہ شناسایی کے اکثریت تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے ایسے ٹویٹوں کو زمانہ پر بنیاد رکھا ہے جو بات ساختار کو نادانی کرتے ہیں۔ ٹویٹر کی صحبت ساختاری کے فائدہ اٹھانے کے لئے ہم نے ایک موڈل پیدا کیا ہے کہ صحبت ساختاری کو ایک گراف کے طور پر موڈل کریں۔ اسی طرح، ہمارے مدل کی بات ساختار کی بہترین نمونہ اس کی آواز شناسایی دقیق کو بڑھاتی ہے۔ دو رومور ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا نمڈل چند بنسٹ لین نمڈلوں سے نکلتا ہے', 'uz': "Twitter ko'pchilik odamlar uchun ma'lumot asosiy manbasiga bo'lgan. Afsuski, haqiqiqiy maʼlumot va so'zlari haqiqiy maʼlumot tizimini avtomatik tekshirish muvaffaqiyatsiz sababini Twitterda propagandaydi. Name @ info Ko'pchilik o'qituvchilar o'qituvchilari vaqt asosida bunday Twittlarni ishlab chiqaradi, gapiruvchi tuzuvni saqlash imkoniyatini eʼtibor beradi. Twitterni taʼminlovchi soʻzlarning foydalanishini o'rganish uchun biz diagram sifatida gapiruvchi tizimni aniqlash modeli yaratdik. Shunday qilib, bizning modelimizning mazoqotlar tuzilishimizni yaxshi ko'paytirish mumkin, bu gapiruvni aniqlash imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Ikki so'zlar maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning modelimiz bir necha asosiy modellarini bajaradi, bu holatning sohasi modelida", 'vi': 'Là một trong những sân ga truyền thông xã hội nổi tiếng nhất, Twitter đã trở thành nguồn thông tin chính cho nhiều người. Không may là cả tin tức và tin đồn hợp lệ được lan truyền trên Twitter vì thiếu hệ thống kiểm tra thông tin tự động. Người dùng Twitter thông báo bằng cách đáp lại thông điệp của người dùng khác, hình thành một cấu trúc cuộc đối thoại. Sử dụng cấu trúc này, người dùng có thể quyết định xem thông tin trên Twitter có phải là tin đồn không bằng cách đọc câu trả lời của Twitter, giọng nói của người dùng khác trên Twitter. Hầu hết các nhà nghiên cứu tìm tin đồn tiến hành loại tweet này dựa trên thời gian, phớt lờ cấu trúc đối thoại. Để tận hưởng lợi ích từ cấu trúc cuộc đối thoại trên Twitter, chúng tôi đã phát triển một mô hình để phát hiện tin đồn bằng cách mô hình kết cấu cuộc đối thoại. Do đó, mô hình của người mẫu được nâng cao đại diện cuộc đối thoại tăng cường độ chính xác xác xác nhận tin đồn. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu tin đồn cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta vượt trội hơn nhiều mô hình cơ sở, bao gồm một mô hình hiện đại.', 'da': 'Som en af de mest populære sociale medieplatforme er Twitter blevet en primær kilde til information for mange mennesker. Desværre spredes både gyldige oplysninger og rygter på Twitter på grund af manglen på et automatisk informationsverifikationssystem. Twitter-brugere kommunikerer ved at besvare andre brugeres beskeder og danne en samtalestruktur. Ved hjælp af denne struktur kan brugerne beslutte, om oplysningerne i kildetweeten er et rygte ved at læse tweetens svar, som stemmer andre brugeres holdning til tweeten. Størstedelen af rygtedetekniske forskere behandler sådanne tweets baseret på tid og ignorerer samtalestrukturen. For at høste fordelene ved Twitter samtalestrukturen har vi udviklet en model til at opdage rygter ved at modellere samtalestrukturen som en graf. Således forbedrer vores models forbedrede repræsentation af samtalestrukturen dens rygtedetektering nøjagtighed. De eksperimentelle resultater på to rygtedatasæt viser, at vores model overgår flere basismodeller, herunder en state-of-the-art model', 'bg': 'Като една от най-популярните социални медийни платформи, Туитър се превърна в основен източник на информация за много хора. За съжаление, както валидна информация, така и слухове се разпространяват в Туитър поради липсата на автоматична система за проверка на информацията. Потребителите на Туитър комуникират чрез отговор на съобщенията на други потребители, формирайки структура на разговор. Използвайки тази структура, потребителите могат да решат дали информацията в източния туит е слух, като прочетат отговорите на туита, които изразяват позициите на други потребители в туита. По-голямата част от изследователите за откриване на слухове обработват такива туитове въз основа на времето, игнорирайки структурата на разговора. За да извлечем ползите от структурата на разговорите в Туитър, разработихме модел за откриване на слухове чрез моделиране на структурата на разговорите като графика. По този начин подобреното представяне на структурата на разговора от нашия модел подобрява точността на откриването на слухове. Експерименталните резултати на два съвкупности от слухове показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда няколко базови модела, включително най-модерния модел.', 'hr': 'Kao jedna od najpopularnijih platformi društvenih medija, Twitter je postao glavni izvor informacija za mnoge ljude. Nažalost, i validna informacija i glasine su proširene na Twitter zbog nedostatka automatskog sustava provjere informacija. Korisnici Twitter komuniciraju odgovarajući na poruke drugih korisnika, formirajući strukturu razgovora. Koristeći ovu strukturu, korisnici mogu odlučiti da li je informacija iz izvornog tweet a glasina čitajući odgovore tweeta, koje glasaju stanje drugih korisnika na tweetu. Većina istraživača za otkrivanje glasina postupa takve tweets na temelju vremena, ignorirajući strukturu razgovora. Da bi dobili koristi strukture razgovora Twitter, razvili smo model za otkrivanje glasina modelizacijom strukture razgovora kao graf. Dakle, naš model je poboljšan predstavljanje strukture razgovora povećava preciznost otkrivanja glasina. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka glasina pokazuju da naš model iznosi nekoliko osnovnih model a, uključujući stanje umjetnosti', 'nl': 'Als een van de meest populaire social media platforms is Twitter uitgegroeid tot een primaire bron van informatie voor veel mensen. Helaas worden zowel geldige informatie als geruchten verspreid op Twitter vanwege het ontbreken van een automatisch informatieverificatiesysteem. Twitter-gebruikers communiceren door te reageren op berichten van andere gebruikers en vormen een conversatiestructuur. Met behulp van deze structuur kunnen gebruikers beslissen of de informatie in de brontweet een gerucht is door de antwoorden van de tweet te lezen, die de standpunten van andere gebruikers over de tweet uitdrukken. De meerderheid van de geruchtdetectie onderzoekers verwerkt dergelijke tweets op basis van tijd, waarbij de gespreksstructuur wordt genegeerd. Om de voordelen van de Twitter conversatiestructuur te plukken, ontwikkelden we een model om geruchten te detecteren door conversatiestructuur als grafiek te modelleren. Zo verbetert de verbeterde weergave van de gespreksstructuur van ons model de nauwkeurigheid van de geruchtdetectie. De experimentele resultaten op twee geruchtdatasets tonen aan dat ons model meerdere basismodellen overtreft, waaronder een state-of-the-art model.', 'de': 'Als eine der beliebtesten Social-Media-Plattformen ist Twitter für viele Menschen zu einer primären Informationsquelle geworden. Leider werden sowohl gültige Informationen als auch Gerüchte auf Twitter verbreitet, da es kein automatisches Informationsprüfungssystem gibt. Twitter-Nutzer kommunizieren, indem sie auf die Nachrichten anderer Nutzer antworten und eine Konversationsstruktur bilden. Mit dieser Struktur können Benutzer entscheiden, ob die Informationen im Quell-Tweet ein Gerücht sind, indem sie die Antworten des Tweets lesen, die die Standpunkte anderer Nutzer zum Tweet äußern. Die Mehrheit der Forscher zur Geruchserkennung verarbeitet solche Tweets auf der Grundlage der Zeit und ignoriert die Konversationsstruktur. Um die Vorteile der Twitter-Konversationsstruktur zu nutzen, haben wir ein Modell entwickelt, um Gerüchte zu erkennen, indem wir die Konversationsstruktur als Diagramm modellieren. So verbessert die verbesserte Darstellung der Konversationsstruktur unseres Modells die Genauigkeit der Gerüchteerkennung. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zweier Gerüchtedatensätze zeigen, dass unser Modell mehrere Basismodelle übertrifft, einschließlich eines hochmodernen Modells', 'id': "Sebagai salah satu platform media sosial yang paling populer, Twitter telah menjadi sumber informasi utama bagi banyak orang. Sayangnya, informasi yang valid dan rumor tersebar di Twitter karena kekurangan sistem verifikasi informasi otomatis. Twitter users communicate by replying to other users' messages, forming a conversation structure.  Menggunakan struktur ini, pengguna dapat memutuskan apakah informasi dalam tweet sumber adalah rumor dengan membaca jawaban tweet, yang suara posisi pengguna lain di tweet. Kebanyakan peneliti deteksi rumor memproses tweet tersebut berdasarkan waktu, mengabaikan struktur percakapan. Untuk mengambil keuntungan dari struktur percakapan Twitter, kami mengembangkan model untuk mendeteksi rumor dengan memmodelir struktur percakapan sebagai grafik. Dengan demikian, model kita memperbaiki perwakilan struktur percakapan meningkatkan akurasi deteksi rumor. Hasil percobaan pada dua set data rumor menunjukkan bahwa model kita melampaui beberapa model dasar, termasuk model terbaik", 'ko': '트위터는 가장 인기 있는 소셜미디어 플랫폼 중 하나로서 이미 많은 사람들의 주요 정보원이 되었다.불행하게도 자동 정보 검증 시스템이 부족해 효과적인 정보와 루머가 트위터에 퍼지고 있다.트위터 이용자는 다른 이용자의 메시지에 답장을 주고받으며 일종의 대화 구조를 형성한다.이런 구조를 이용하면 사용자는 트윗의 답변을 읽어 원본 트윗의 정보가 루머인지 여부를 결정할 수 있는데, 이런 답변은 트윗에서 다른 사용자의 입장을 나타낸다.대부분의 유언비어 검출 연구원들은 이런 추문을 시간에 따라 처리하고 대화 구조를 소홀히 한다.트위터 대화 구조의 장점을 얻기 위해 대화 구조를 도형으로 만들어 루머를 탐지하는 모델을 개발했다.따라서 우리 모델은 회화 구조 개선에 대해 루머 검출의 정확성을 높였다.두 개의 루머 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면, 우리의 모델은 몇 개의 기선 모델보다 우수하며, 가장 선진적인 모델을 포함한다', 'fa': 'به عنوان یکی از برنامه\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی مشهور، توئیتر یک منبع اصلی اطلاعات برای بسیاری از مردم تبدیل شده است. متأسفانه، هر دو اطلاعات و شایعه\u200cهای قابل استفاده در توئیتر به دلیل lack of a automatic information verification system. کاربران توئیتر با پاسخ به پیام\u200cهای کاربران دیگر ارتباط می\u200cگیرند و یک ساختار مکالمه می\u200cسازند. استفاده از این ساختار، کاربران می\u200cتوانند تصمیم بگیرند که آیا اطلاعات توئیت منبع شایعه\u200cای است با خواندن پاسخهای توئیت، که وضعیت کاربران دیگر در توئیت صدا می\u200cدهد. اکثر محققان شناسایی شایعه\u200cها چنین توئیت\u200cها را بر اساس زمان فرایند می\u200cدهند، که ساختار مکالمه را نادیده می\u200cدهند. برای پیدا کردن منافع ساختار صحبت توئیتر، ما یک مدل توسعه کردیم که شایعه\u200cها را با ساختار مکالمه به عنوان یک گراف شناسایی کنیم. بنابراین، نمونه\u200cهای ما از ساختار صحبت بهتر شده، دقیقات شناسایی شایعه\u200cهایش را افزایش می\u200cدهد. نتایج آزمایشی در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای شایعه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما چند مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط را انجام می\u200cدهد، شامل یک مدل موقعیت هنر', 'sw': "Kama moja ya majukwaa maarufu zaidi ya mitandao ya kijamii, Twita imekuwa chanzo cha msingi cha taarifa kwa watu wengi. Kwa bahati mbaya, taarifa na uvumi wote huchapishwa kwenye mtandao wa Twita kutokana na ukosefu wa mfumo wa taarifa wa kujithibitisha. Watumiaji wa Twita wanawasiliana kwa kuwajibu ujumbe wa watumiaji wengine, kutengeneza muundo wa mazungumzo. Kwa kutumia muundo huu, watumiaji wanaweza kuamua kama taarifa katika twiti ya chanzo ni uvumi kwa kusoma majibu ya twita, ambayo inawasilisha hali ya watumiaji wengine kwenye twita. Wengi wa watafiti wa uvumi wanaendesha twiti hizo kwa kutumia muda, wakipuuza muundo wa mazungumzo. Ili kuvuna faida za muundo wa mazungumzo ya Twita, tuliunda mtindo wa kugundua uvumi kwa kutengeneza muundo wa mazungumzo kama picha. Thus, our model's improved representation of the conversation structure enhances its rumor detection accuracy.  Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti mbili za uvumi inaonyesha kwamba mtindo wetu unafanya mifano kadhaa ya msingi, ikiwa ni pamoja na muundo wa hali ya sanaa", 'tr': 'Iň meşhur sosyal medýä platformlarynyň biri bolsa, Twitter köp adamlar üçin esasy maglumatyň çeşmesi bolup geçdi. Gynansakda, hem gowy maglumat hem aýdyşy Twitter-da awtomatik maglumat sistemasy ýok bolmagy üçin üýtgedildi. Twitter Ullançylary başga Ullançylaryň hatlaryna jogap bermek üçin habarlaşýarlar. Bu struktury ulanarak, ullançylar çeşme tweetindeki maglumatyň a ýdyşy ýagdaýynyň jogaplaryny okap bilmeýändigini karar berip bilerler. Aýratyn tanyşlyklaryň köp bölegi wagtyna daýan tweets edip, gürrüň strukturyny görmeýärler. Twitter gürrüňler strukturynyň faydalyny ýetirmek üçin, gürrüňler strukturyny grafik ýaly çaplamak üçin bir nusga a çdyk. Bu şekilde, bizim modelimiz sohbet yapıs ının gelişmiş şeklinde diňe sözleşme hasaplaması dogrylygyny geliştirir. Iki döwürler üçin synanyşdyrylýan netijelerimiz nusgasymyz birnäçe basit nusgasyny çykarýar, hatda sungatyň durumyndan hem çykarýan nusgasyny çykarýar', 'af': "As een van die mees populêre sosiale media platforme, het Twitter 'n primêre bron van inligting geword vir baie mense. Ongelukkig word beide geldige inligting en rumore op Twitter uitgepropagasie vanweë die ontbreek van 'n outomatiese inligting verifikasie stelsel. Name Gebruik hierdie struktuur, kan gebruikers besluit of die inligting in die bron tweet 'n rumor is deur die tweet se antwoorde te lees, wat stem ander gebruikers se staanse op die tweet. Die meeste van rumor opdekking ondersoekers proses sodanige tweete gebaseer op tyd, wat die gesprekstruktuur ignoreer. Om die voordele van die Twitter gesprek struktuur te maak, ontwikkel ons 'n model om rumore te ontdek deur gesprek struktuur as 'n graf te modelleer. So, ons model se verbeterde verteenwoordigheid van die gesprekstruktuur verbeter sy rumor-beskrywing waarskynlik. Die eksperimentale resultate op twee rumor datastelle vertoon dat ons model verskeie basisline modele uitvoer, insluitend 'n staat-van-kuns-model", 'sq': 'Si një nga platformet më popullore të medias sociale, Twitter është bërë burim kryesor i informacionit për shumë njerëz. Fatkeqësisht, si informacioni i vlefshëm ashtu edhe thashethemet janë përhapur në Twitter për shkak të mungesës së një sistemi automatik të verifikimit të informacionit. Përdoruesit e Twitter komunikojnë duke u përgjigjur mesazheve të përdoruesve të tjerë, duke formuar një strukturë bisedimi. Duke përdorur këtë strukturë, përdoruesit mund të vendosin nëse informacioni në tweet in e burimit është një thashethemi duke lexuar përgjigjet e tweetit, që zërin qëndrimet e përdoruesve të tjerë në tweet. Shumica e kërkuesve të zbulimit të thashethemeve procesojnë të tilla tweete bazuar në kohë, duke injoruar strukturën e bisedës. Për të fituar përfitimet e strukturës së bisedës në Twitter, ne zhvilluam një model për të zbuluar thashethemet duke modeluar strukturën e bisedës si një grafik. Kështu, përfaqësimi i përmirësuar i modelit tonë i strukturës s ë bisedës përmirëson saktësinë e zbulimit të thashethemeve. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy grupe të dhënash tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron disa modele bazë, duke përfshirë një model më të lartë', 'am': "ትዊተር ለብዙዎች የዜና መረጃ የመጀመሪያ ምንጭ ሆኖአል፡፡ በአካባቢ መረጃ ማረጋገጫ ስርዓት ስህተት ምክንያት የሀብት መረጃ እና ውሸቶች በትዊተር ላይ አካባቢ ናቸው፡፡ ትዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች ሌሎችን ተጠቃሚዎች መልዕክቶች በመስጠት ይግለጹ፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት በመጠቀም ተጠቃሚዎች የሌሎች ተጠቃሚዎች ድምፅ በትዊተር ላይ የሚደረገውን የTwitteet መልስ በማነብ የመረጃ ውይይት መሆኑን ይፈርዳሉ፡፡ የመርሱት ምርመራዎች ብዙዎቹ እንደነዚህ ትዊተሮችን በጊዜው በመጠቀም፣ የንግግር ግንኙነቱን ትርጉም በማሳየት ይደረጋሉ፡፡ የትዊተር ንግግር አካባቢ ጥቅም ለማድረግ፣ የንግግር አካባቢ ምሳሌ መግለጫ ማግኘት ምሳሌ አደረግን፡፡ Thus, our model's improved representation of the conversation structure enhances its rumor detection accuracy.  የሁለት የውጤት ዳታተሮች ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳየው ሞዴሌያችን የሀገር-የ-art ሞዴል እና ብዙዎችን የሳታይና ሞዴል የሚያሳየው", 'hy': 'Որպես ամենահայտնի սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներից մեկը, Թվիթերը դարձավ շատ մարդկանց համար տեղեկատվության հիմնական աղբյուր: Դժբախտաբար, երկուսն էլ ճշգրիտ տեղեկատվություն են տարածվում Թվիթերում, քանի որ տեղեկատվության ավտոմատիկ ստուգումների համակարգի պակաս է: Թվիթերի օգտագործողները հաղորդակցվում են պատասխանելով այլ օգտագործողների հաղորդագրություններին, ստեղծելով խոսակցության կառուցվածք: Օգտագործելով այս կառուցվածքը, օգտագործողները կարող են որոշել, թե արդյոք աղբյուրի թվիթերի տեղեկատվությունը լսություն է, կարդալով թվիթերի պատասխանները, թե ինչ են ձայները այլ օգտագործողների դիրքերը թվիթերի վրա: Խոսքերի հայտնաբերման հետազոտողների մեծամասնությունը պրոցեսում է այդպիսի թվիթեր ժամանակի վրա, անտեսելով խոսակցության կառուցվածքը: To reap the benefits of the Twitter conversation structure, we developed a model to detect rumors by modeling conversation structure as a graph.  Այսպիսով, մեր մոդելի բարելավված ներկայացումը խոսակցության կառուցվածքին բարելավում է լսերի հայտնաբերման ճշգրտությունը: Երկու խոսքերի տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է որոշ հիմնական մոդելներ, ներառյալ ամենաբարձր մոդելը,', 'az': 'Ən məşhur sosyal media platformlarından biri kimi, Twitter çoxlu insanlar üçün ilk məlumat mənbəsi oldu. Necə ki, otomatik məlumat təsdiqləmə sistemi yoxduğuna görə Twitter-da hər ikisinin dəyərli məlumatları və dedikləri yayılır. Twitter istifadəçiləri digər istifadəçilərin ismarışlarına cavab verərək, söhbət quruluşu yararlar. Bu quruluş vasitəsilə istifadəçilərin tweet in məlumatının tweetin cavablarını oxuyaraq, başqa istifadəçilərin durumlarını tweetin üstündə s əsləyib deyirlər. Söylənmə quruluşunu dərk edənlərin əksəriyyəti böyük twetlər işlədir. Tövratdakı müzakirə quruluşunun faydalarını yaratmaq üçün, müzakirə quruluşu grafı olaraq modelləri keşfetmək üçün bir model təhsil etdik. Beləliklə, modellərimizin müzakirə quruluşunun daha yaxşı göstərilməsi s əslərinin keşfetməsi doğruluğunu artırar. İki səslər verilənlərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları modellərimizin bir neçə təcrübə modeli ilə istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'সবচেয়ে জনপ্রিয় সামাজিক মিডিয়া প্লাটফর্ম হিসেবে টুইটার অনেক মানুষের জন্য তথ্যের প্রধান উৎস হিসেবে পরি দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, টুইটারে বৈধ তথ্য ও গুজব প্রচার করা হয়েছে স্বয়ংক্রিয় তথ্য পরিচালনা ব্যবস্থার অভাবে। টুইটার ব্যবহারকারীরা অন্যান্য ব্যবহারকারীদের বার্তার প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদান করে যোগাযোগ করে, যারা আলোচনার এই কাঠামোটি ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহারকারীরা টুইটের তথ্য পাঠ করার মাধ্যমে সিদ্ধান্ত নিতে পারেন, যা টুইটে অন্যান্য ব্যবহারকারীর অবস্থান পাঠ করে  বেশীরভাগ গুজব সন্ধান গবেষকেরা এই ধরনের টুইটের প্রক্রিয়া সময়ের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক করে, যারা আলোচনার কাঠা টুইটারের কথোপকথন কাঠামোর সুবিধা পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য আমরা একটি মডেল তৈরি করেছিলাম যেটা গুজব আবিষ্কার করার জন্য, যেটি একট তাই, আমাদের মডেল এই কথোপকথন কাঠামোর প্রতিনিধিত্ব উন্নত হয়েছে যে গুজব সন্ধানের সঠিকভাবে বৃদ্ধি পেয়েছে। দুই গুজব ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল বেশ কয়েকটি বেসাইলাইন মডেল প্রদর্শন করে, যার মধ্যে একটি রাষ্ট্র', 'bs': 'Kao jedna od najpopularnijih platformi društvenih medija, Twitter je postao glavni izvor informacija za mnoge ljude. Nažalost, obje vrijedne informacije i glasine su proširene na Twitter zbog nedostatka automatskog sustava provjere informacija. Korisnici Twitter komuniciraju odgovarajući na poruke drugih korisnika, formirajući strukturu razgovora. Koristeći ovu strukturu, korisnici mogu odlučiti da li je informacija iz izvornog tweet a glasina čitajući odgovore tweeta, koje glasaju stanje drugih korisnika na tweetu. Većina istraživača za otkrivanje glasina procesira takve tweete na temelju vremena, ignorirajući strukturu razgovora. Da bi dobili prednost strukture razgovora Twitter, razvili smo model za otkrivanje glasina modelizacijom strukture razgovora kao graf. Dakle, naš model je poboljšan predstavljanje strukture razgovora povećava tačnost otkrivanja glasina. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka glasina pokazuju da naš model iznosi nekoliko osnovnih model a, uključujući i model umjetnosti.', 'ca': "As one of the most popular social media platforms, Twitter has become a primary source of information for many people.  Malauradament, tant la informació válida com els rumors es propaguen a Twitter a causa de la falta de sistema de verificació automàtica de la informació. Els usuaris de Twitter comunican responent als missatges d'altres usuaris, formant una estructura de conversa. Utilitzant aquesta estructura, els usuaris poden decidir si la informació del tweet de fonts és una rumor a llegint les respostes del tweet, que veuen les posicions dels altres usuaris en el tweet. La majoria dels investigadors de detecció de rumors processen aquests tweets basats en el temps, ignorant l'estructura de conversa. Per aprofitar els beneficis de l'estructura de conversa a Twitter, vam desenvolupar un model per detectar rumors modelant l'estructura de conversa com a gràfic. Així, la millor representació del nostre model de l'estructura de conversa millora la precisió de la seva detecció de rumor s. Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades rumores mostren que el nostre model supera varis models de base, incloent un model d'última generació", 'cs': 'Jako jedna z nejpopulárnějších sociálních médií se Twitter stal hlavním zdrojem informací pro mnoho lidí. Bohužel jsou na Twitteru šířeny jak platné informace, tak zvěsti, protože neexistuje automatický systém ověřování informací. Uživatelé Twitteru komunikují tím, že odpovídají na zprávy jiných uživatelů a vytvářejí strukturu konverzace. Pomocí této struktury mohou uživatelé rozhodnout, zda informace ve zdrojovém tweetu jsou fámy, čtením odpovědí tweetu, které vyjadřují postoje ostatních uživatelů k tweetu. Většina výzkumníků detekce drbů zpracovává takové tweety na základě času a ignoruje strukturu konverzace. Abychom využili výhod struktury konverzace na Twitteru, vyvinuli jsme model pro detekci drbů modelováním struktury konverzace jako grafu. Vylepšená reprezentace struktury konverzace našeho modelu tak zvyšuje přesnost detekce drbů. Experimentální výsledky dvou datových sad pověstí ukazují, že náš model překonává několik základních modelů, včetně nejmodernějšího modelu', 'et': 'Ühe populaarsema sotsiaalmeedia platvormina on Twitter muutunud paljude inimeste jaoks peamiseks teabeallikaks. Kahjuks levitatakse Twitteris nii kehtivat teavet kui ka kuulujutte automaatse infokontrollisüsteemi puudumise tõttu. Twitteri kasutajad suhtlevad teiste kasutajate sõnumitele vastates, moodustades vestlusstruktuuri. Selle struktuuri abil saavad kasutajad otsustada, kas lähtesäutsu teave on kuulujutt, lugedes säutsu vastuseid, mis hääletavad teiste kasutajate seisukohti säutsu kohta. Enamik kuulujutte avastamise uurijatest töötleb selliseid säutseid aja põhjal, ignoreerides vestlusstruktuuri. Twitteri vestlusstruktuuri eeliste ärakasutamiseks töötasime välja mudeli kuulujuttude tuvastamiseks, modelleerides vestlusstruktuuri graafikuna. Seega suurendab meie mudeli parem vestlusstruktuuri esindamine kuulujutte tuvastamise täpsust. Kahe kuulujutu andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel ületab mitmeid baasmudeleid, sealhulgas kaasaegset mudelit.', 'fi': 'Yhtenä suosituimmista sosiaalisen median alustoista Twitter on tullut ensisijainen tietolähde monille ihmisille. Valitettavasti sekä päteviä tietoja että huhuja levitetään Twitterissä automaattisen tietojen todentamisjärjestelmän puuttumisen vuoksi. Twitter-käyttäjät kommunikoivat vastaamalla muiden käyttäjien viesteihin muodostaen keskustelurakenteen. Käyttämällä tätä rakennetta käyttäjät voivat päättää, onko lähdetwiitin tieto huhu lukemalla twiitin vastaukset, jotka ilmaisevat muiden käyttäjien kantoja twiittiin. Suurin osa huhujen havaitsemisen tutkijoista käsittelee tällaisia tweettejä ajan perusteella sivuuttaen keskustelun rakenteen. Hyödyntääksemme Twitter-keskustelurakenteen etuja kehitimme mallin huhujen havaitsemiseen mallintamalla keskustelurakenteen kaaviona. Näin ollen mallimme parempi esitystapa keskustelurakenteesta parantaa sen huhujen havaitsemisen tarkkuutta. Kokeelliset tulokset kahdesta huhuaineistosta osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu useasta perusmallista, mukaan lukien uusin malli.', 'sk': 'Twitter je kot ena izmed najbolj priljubljenih platform socialnih medijev postal glavni vir informacij za mnoge ljudi. Na žalost se tako veljavne informacije kot govorice razširjajo na Twitterju zaradi pomanjkanja avtomatskega sistema preverjanja informacij. Uporabniki Twitterja komunicirajo tako, da odgovarjajo na sporočila drugih uporabnikov in oblikujejo strukturo pogovora. Z uporabo te strukture se lahko uporabniki odločijo, ali so informacije v izvornem tweetu govorice, tako da preberejo odgovore tweeta, ki izražajo stališča drugih uporabnikov na tweetu. Večina raziskovalcev za odkrivanje govoric takšne tweete obdeluje na podlagi časa in ignorira strukturo pogovora. Da bi izkoristili prednosti strukture pogovorov na Twitterju, smo razvili model za odkrivanje govoric z modeliranjem strukture pogovorov kot graf. Tako izboljšana predstavitev strukture pogovora našega modela povečuje natančnost zaznavanja govoric. Eksperimentalni rezultati dveh naborov govoric kažejo, da naš model presega več osnovnih modelov, vključno z najsodobnejšim modelom.', 'ha': "Kama ɗayan fasafan mitandai na jamii mafiya umakinta, Twitter ta kasance yanzu'in haske ga mutane mãsu yawa. Babu'anar haka, za'a bayyana labarai da kure masu inganci a Twitter saba da ƙaranci na tsarin gaske farat ɗaya. Twitter users communicate by replying to other users' messages, forming a conversation structure.  Yi amfani da wannan shirin, masu amfani da shi, sunã iya yin hukunci, shin, information cikin jumbe na'ura ta zama wani rabo na karanta jibar Twitter, da sautin sunan wasu masu amfani da shi kan Twitter. Akwai mãsu yawa mãsu ƙidãya masu ƙidãya na saurãre, suna aikatãwar waɗannan Twitter a kan bayan lokaci, kuma yana ƙorin bakin mazaɓan. To, in kuɓutar da amfani da tsarin mazaɓa na Twitter, sai muka develope wani motsi dõmin mu gane rumors da za'a samu'a sami tsarin mazaɓa kamar grafi. Daga haka, misalinmu na ƙara mazaɓa wa muhimmin mazaɓa na ƙara tabbatarsa na ganin rumor. Matarin jarraba ta kan danne biyu na rumor ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da wasu misãlai masu basuɗe, tare da wani misalin-state-of-the-art", 'jv': 'Tulung ning saben sing paling maneh sing populer media media, Google dumadhi bukané informasi luwih dumadhi kanggo akèh wong liya. Nglanggar-Nglanggar, akeh informasi lan siji-siji sing dibutuhke nang Google nganggo sistem di bekasar informasi ora ono. Tuttering Ngawe ngubah sistem iki, pengguna bisa nembé ing informasi ning tuwit mengko percoyo Ketoke Mbok nggawe bener kanggo ngilanggar sampek anyar tentang Nambah, modelo sing nyupir suarané nggawe ngubah tarjamahan nggawe gerakan dadi sabên ono wektu nggawe gerarané. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'כאחד מהפלטפורמות המדיה החברתית הכי פופולריות, טוויטר הפך למקור ראשי של מידע עבור הרבה אנשים. למרבה הצער, גם מידע קבוע ושמועות פורסמים בטוויטר בגלל חוסר מערכת אבחנת מידע אוטומטית. משתמשים בטוויטר מתקשרים על ידי תשובה להודעות של משתמשים אחרים, ליצור מבנה שיחה. בשימוש במבנה הזה, משתמשים יכולים להחליט אם המידע בטיוויט המקורי הוא שמועה על ידי קריאת תשובות הטיוויט, אשר קולות עמדות משתמשים אחרים בטיוויט. רוב חוקרי גילוי שמועות מעבדים טוויטים כאלה מבוססים על הזמן, מתעלמים ממבנה השיחה. To reap the benefits of the Twitter conversation structure, we developed a model to detect rumors by modeling conversation structure as a graph.  כך, הדגמה המשופרת של המודל שלנו של מבנה השיחה משפר את בדיקת גילוי השמועות שלה. התוצאות הניסוייות על שני קבוצות מידע שמועות מראות שהדוגמא שלנו עולה על מספר דוגמנים בסיסיים, כולל דוגמא מצוינת', 'bo': 'ཆེས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་ ཡིན་ནའང་ནི་ཕན་འབྲས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་rumors་གཉིས་པོ་དེ་ཌིས་ཌིར་བརྡ་སྟོན་གྱི་མ་ལག་པ་ལས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཡོད། ཌིས་ཌིར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་འཕྲིན་དོན་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་བསྟེན་ནས་འབྲེལ་བ་འདུག སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་ཐོག་མའི་གླེང་ཐོག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཀྲོག་གཏམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན། དཀྲོག་གཏམ་འཆར་བཤེར་གྱི་གྲངས་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་རྟོགས་བཤེར་མཁན་ནས་དུས་ཚོད་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས། གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་དབ ང་ཚོས་ཌིས་ཌིར་གཏམ་གླེང་སྡོམ་གྱི་ལས་འཕགས་ཚུལ་དང་ལྟ་བུ་ཡར་སྐྱེས་བ་ཞིག་གིས་གཏམ་གླེང་ལ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུང་གིས་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་རྒྱས་གཏོང་དང་། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་འཁོད་བྱ་བ་དག་གི་མིག་ཆས་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་ཆས་གཞི་རྩལ་གཞི་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ས'}
{'en': 'Words are the Window to the Soul : Language-based User Representations for Fake News Detection', 'ar': 'الكلمات هي نافذة الروح: تمثيلات المستخدم القائمة على اللغة لاكتشاف الأخبار الزائفة', 'es': 'Las palabras son la ventana al alma: representaciones de usuarios basadas en el lenguaje para la detección de noticias falsas', 'fr': 'Words are the Window to the Soul\xa0: représentations des utilisateurs basées sur la langue pour la détection des fausses nouvelles', 'pt': 'As palavras são a janela para a alma: representações de usuário baseadas em linguagem para detecção de notícias falsas', 'ja': '言葉は魂の窓：フェイクニュース検出のための言語ベースのユーザー表現', 'zh': '文字者,通魂之窗牖:假新闻检者,言语之用户也', 'hi': 'शब्द आत्मा के लिए खिड़की हैं: नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए भाषा-आधारित उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'Слова - это окно в душу: Языковые представления пользователей для обнаружения фейковых новостей', 'ga': 'Focail is ea Fuinneog don Soul: Léirithe Úsáideora Teanga-bhunaithe le haghaidh Braite Nuachta Bréige', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Οι λέξεις είναι το Παράθυρο της Ψυχής: Οι γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις χρηστών για την ανίχνευση πλαστών ειδήσεων', 'hu': 'A szavak a lélek ablaka: Nyelvi felhasználói reprezentációk hamis hírek felismeréséhez', 'it': "Le parole sono la finestra dell'anima: Rappresentazioni degli utenti basate sul linguaggio per il rilevamento di notizie false", 'kk': 'Сөздер - Дыбыс терезесі: тіл негіздеген пайдаланушылардың таңбалары', 'ms': 'Kata-kata adalah Tetingkap ke Jiwa: Perwakilan Pengguna berdasarkan bahasa untuk pengesan berita palsu', 'ml': 'ആത്മാവിന്റെ ജാലകത്തിലേക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d: ഭാഷയിലുള്ള ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'lt': 'Žodžiai yra Žmogaus langas: kalbomis pagrįstos naudotojų atstovybės klaidingų naujienų aptikimui', 'mn': 'Үг бол сэтгэл хөдлөлийн цонхлог: Холбооны үндсэн хэрэглэгчийн төлөөлөл нь хуурамч мэдээллийн нээлт', 'mt': 'Il-kliem huma t-Tieqa lejn l-Isfel: Rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-Utenti bbażati fuq il-lingwa għall-Iskopri tal-Aħbarijiet Falsi', 'no': 'Ord er vindauget til sollen: Språkbaserte brukarrepresentasjonar for fake news-oppdaging', 'pl': 'Słowa są oknem do duszy: językowe reprezentacje użytkowników dla wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości', 'sr': 'Rijeèi su prozor na duši: predstavljanja korisnika na jeziku za lažno otkrivanje novina', 'ro': 'Cuvintele sunt fereastra către suflet: Reprezentarea utilizatorilor bazată pe limbă pentru detectarea știrilor false', 'sv': 'Ord 채r f철nstret till sj채len: Spr책kbaserade anv채ndarrepresentationer f철r detektering av falska nyheter', 'so': 'Ereydu waa daaqada nafta: Isticmaalaha ee luqada ku saleysan ee u baaraandegista warqada beenta ah', 'mk': 'Зборовите се прозорецот на душата: Претставувања на корисниците базирани на јазик за детекција на лажни вести', 'si': 'භාෂාව අධාරිත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය විදිහට කවුළුව හමුවීමට භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය', 'ta': 'சாளரத்திற்கு சாளரம்: பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான மொழி அடிப்படையிலான பயனீட்டாளர் பிரதிநிதிகள்', 'ur': 'Words are the Window to the Soul: Language-based User Representations for Fake News Detection', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ là cửa sổ phát hiện bản tin giả', 'nl': 'Woorden zijn het venster naar de ziel: Taalgebaseerde gebruikersvertegenwoordigingen voor nepnieuws detectie', 'da': 'Ord er vinduet til sjælen: Sprogbaserede brugerrepræsentationer til registrering af falske nyheder', 'de': 'Wörter sind das Fenster zur Seele: Sprachbasierte Benutzerdarstellungen zur Erkennung von Fake News', 'ko': '문자는 마음의 창: 언어를 바탕으로 하는 가짜 뉴스 검출 사용자 표시', 'id': 'Kata-kata adalah jendela ke jiwa: Perwakilan Pengguna berdasarkan bahasa untuk Deteksi Kabar palsu', 'bg': 'Думите са прозорецът към душата: езикови потребителски представи за откриване на фалшиви новини', 'hr': 'Riječi su prozor na duši: predstavljanje korisnika na jeziku za lažnu otkrivanju vijesti', 'tr': "Sözler Ruh'yň Penceresi: Dilden Buýruk Haýsy Aňlamak üçin Ullançy Temsilleri", 'fa': 'کلمات پنجره روح است: نمایش کاربر بر زبان برای شناسایی اخبار غلط', 'af': 'Woorde is die Venster na die Soul: Taal-gebaseerde gebruiker-voorstellings vir Verfalse Nuusbeskrywing', 'sq': 'Fjalët janë dritarja për shpirtin: Përfaqësuesit e përdoruesve bazuar në gjuhë për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme', 'hy': 'Բառերը Հոգի պատուհանն են. լեզվով հիմնված օգտագործողների ներկայացումները կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'Sözlər Ruhların Penceresidir: Dil-tabanlı İstifadəçilərin Xahiş Haqları İşləməsi', 'bn': 'শব্দগুলো আত্মার উইন্ডোর কাছে: ভাষাভিত্তিক ব্যবহারকারীর প্রতিনিধি', 'sw': 'Maneno ni Window kwa Soul: Representations by mtumiaji anayeishi lugha kwa ajili ya Kutambua Habari potofu', 'cs': 'Slova jsou oknem k duši: jazykově založené uživatelské reprezentace pro detekci falešných zpráv', 'et': 'Sõnad on aken hinge: keelepõhised kasutajate esindused valeuudiste tuvastamiseks', 'am': 'ቃላት ለነፍሱ መስኮት ነው፤ ቋንቋ-based ተጠቃሚ ምረጡ ለውሸት ዜና ማግኘት', 'fi': 'Sanat ovat ikkuna sieluun: Kielipohjaiset käyttäjäedustukset väärien uutisten havaitsemiseen', 'ca': "Les paraules són la Ventana al Déu: Representacions d'Usuaris basades en llenguatge per la detecció de notícies falses", 'bs': 'Riječi su prozor na duši: Predstavljanja korisnika na jeziku za lažno otkrivanje vijesti', 'ha': 'Kalma sunan Taga zuwa Nafi: Repositories of the user-based language for Canfield News', 'he': 'מילים הן החלון לנשמה: מייצגים משתמשים מבוססים בשפה לגלות חדשות מזויפות', 'jv': 'Spanish', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་ཚོ་ནི་སྒེའུ་ཁུང་ལ་སྒེའུ་ཁུང་འདུག：སྐད་ཡིག་རྟེན་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་Representations for Fake News Detection', 'sk': 'Besede so okno v dušo: jezikovna predstavitev uporabnikov za odkrivanje lažnih novic'}
{'en': 'Cognitive and social traits of individuals are reflected in language use. Moreover, individuals who are prone to spread fake news online often share common traits. Building on these ideas, we introduce a model that creates representations of individuals on social media based only on the language they produce, and use them to detect fake news. We show that language-based user representations are beneficial for this task. We also present an extended analysis of the language of fake news spreaders, showing that its main features are mostly domain independent and consistent across two English datasets. Finally, we exploit the relation between language use and connections in the social graph to assess the presence of the Echo Chamber effect in our data.', 'ar': 'تنعكس السمات المعرفية والاجتماعية للأفراد في استخدام اللغة. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن الأفراد الذين يميلون إلى نشر أخبار كاذبة عبر الإنترنت يتشاركون في كثير من الأحيان سمات مشتركة. بناءً على هذه الأفكار ، نقدم نموذجًا ينشئ تمثيلات للأفراد على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي بناءً على اللغة التي ينتجونها فقط ، ويستخدمها للكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة. نظهر أن تمثيلات المستخدم المستندة إلى اللغة مفيدة لهذه المهمة. نقدم أيضًا تحليلًا موسعًا للغة ناشري الأخبار المزيفة ، مما يوضح أن ميزاتها الرئيسية هي في الغالب مستقلة عن المجال ومتسقة عبر مجموعتي بيانات باللغة الإنجليزية. أخيرًا ، نستغل العلاقة بين استخدام اللغة والوصلات في الرسم البياني الاجتماعي لتقييم وجود تأثير غرفة الصدى في بياناتنا.', 'es': 'Los rasgos cognitivos y sociales de las personas se reflejan en el uso del lenguaje. Además, las personas que son propensas a difundir noticias falsas en línea a menudo comparten rasgos comunes. Sobre la base de estas ideas, presentamos un modelo que crea representaciones de personas en las redes sociales basándose únicamente en el lenguaje que producen, y las utilizamos para detectar noticias falsas. Demostramos que las representaciones de los usuarios basadas en el idioma son beneficiosas para esta tarea. También presentamos un análisis extenso del lenguaje de los propagadores de noticias falsas, que muestra que sus características principales son en su mayoría independientes del dominio y consistentes en dos conjuntos de datos en inglés. Finalmente, explotamos la relación entre el uso del lenguaje y las conexiones en el gráfico social para evaluar la presencia del efecto Cámara de Eco en nuestros datos.', 'pt': 'Traços cognitivos e sociais dos indivíduos são refletidos no uso da linguagem. Além disso, indivíduos propensos a espalhar notícias falsas on-line geralmente compartilham traços comuns. Com base nessas ideias, apresentamos um modelo que cria representações de indivíduos nas mídias sociais com base apenas na linguagem que produzem e as utiliza para detectar notícias falsas. Mostramos que representações de usuário baseadas em linguagem são benéficas para esta tarefa. Também apresentamos uma análise estendida da linguagem dos propagadores de notícias falsas, mostrando que suas principais características são principalmente independentes de domínio e consistentes em dois conjuntos de dados em inglês. Por fim, exploramos a relação entre uso da linguagem e conexões no gráfico social para avaliar a presença do efeito Câmara de Eco em nossos dados.', 'fr': "Les traits cognitifs et sociaux des individus se reflètent dans l'utilisation de la langue. De plus, les personnes qui sont enclines à diffuser de fausses nouvelles en ligne partagent souvent des traits communs. Sur la base de ces idées, nous introduisons un modèle qui crée des représentations d'individus sur les réseaux sociaux uniquement en fonction du langage qu'ils produisent, et les utilisons pour détecter les fausses nouvelles. Nous montrons que les représentations utilisateur basées sur la langue sont bénéfiques pour cette tâche. Nous présentons également une analyse approfondie de la langue des diffuseurs de fake news, montrant que ses principales caractéristiques sont pour la plupart indépendantes du domaine et cohérentes entre deux ensembles de données anglais. Enfin, nous exploitons la relation entre l'utilisation de la langue et les connexions dans le graphique social pour évaluer la présence de l'effet Echo Chamber dans nos données.", 'ja': '個人の認知的および社会的特性は、言語の使用に反映される。さらに、フェイクニュースをネットで拡散しやすい個人は、共通の特性を持っていることが多い。これらのアイデアに基づいて、ソーシャルメディアで個人の表現を作成し、フェイクニュースを検出するために使用するモデルを紹介します。言語ベースのユーザー表現は、このタスクにとって有益であることを示しています。また、フェイクニューススプレッダーの言語の拡張分析を提示し、その主な機能はほとんどがドメインに依存せず、2つの英語データセットにわたって一貫していることを示しています。最後に、ソーシャルグラフの言語使用と接続の関係を利用して、データ内のエコーチャンバー効果の存在を評価します。', 'hi': 'व्यक्तियों के संज्ञानात्मक और सामाजिक लक्षण भाषा के उपयोग में परिलक्षित होते हैं। इसके अलावा, जो लोग ऑनलाइन नकली समाचार फैलाने के लिए प्रवण हैं, वे अक्सर सामान्य लक्षण साझा करते हैं। इन विचारों पर निर्माण करते हुए, हम एक मॉडल पेश करते हैं जो केवल उनके द्वारा उत्पादित भाषा के आधार पर सोशल मीडिया पर व्यक्तियों के प्रतिनिधित्व का निर्माण करता है, और नकली समाचारों का पता लगाने के लिए उनका उपयोग करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि भाषा-आधारित उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिनिधित्व इस कार्य के लिए फायदेमंद हैं। हम नकली समाचार प्रसारकों की भाषा का एक विस्तारित विश्लेषण भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि इसकी मुख्य विशेषताएं ज्यादातर डोमेन स्वतंत्र और दो अंग्रेजी डेटासेट में सुसंगत हैं। अंत में, हम अपने डेटा में इको चैंबर प्रभाव की उपस्थिति का आकलन करने के लिए सामाजिक ग्राफ में भाषा के उपयोग और कनेक्शन के बीच संबंध का शोषण करते हैं।', 'zh': '人之知与世之知 此外易传于网假新闻者往往有同征。 吾等引入一模,但随其所生之言,创之于社交媒体,而用之检假新闻。 吾言者,言用户有益也。 又广析假新闻传播者言,明其大体多独立于域,而两英语数合也。 最后,我们用语言用与社交图谱中接连之间,以评数中回声室效应的存在。', 'ru': 'Когнитивные и социальные черты личности отражаются в использовании языка. Более того, люди, склонные к распространению фейковых новостей в Интернете, часто имеют общие черты. Основываясь на этих идеях, мы вводим модель, которая создает представления людей в социальных сетях, основанные только на языке, который они производят, и использует их для обнаружения фейковых новостей. Мы показываем, что языковые представления пользователей являются полезными для этой задачи. Мы также представляем расширенный анализ языка распространителей фейковых новостей, показывающий, что его основные функции в основном не зависят от домена и согласуются между двумя наборами данных на английском языке. Наконец, мы используем связь между использованием языка и связями в социальном графике для оценки наличия эффекта Эхо-камеры в наших данных.', 'ga': 'Léirítear tréithe cognaíocha agus sóisialta daoine aonair in úsáid na teanga. Ina theannta sin, is minic a bhíonn tréithe coitianta ag daoine aonair a bhfuil seans acu nuacht bhréige a scaipeadh ar líne. Ag tógáil ar na smaointe seo, tugaimid isteach múnla a chruthaíonn léirithe daoine aonair ar na meáin shóisialta bunaithe ar an teanga a tháirgeann siad amháin, agus a úsáideann iad chun nuacht bhréige a bhrath. Léirímid go bhfuil ionadaíochtaí teanga-bhunaithe úsáideoirí tairbheach don tasc seo. Cuirimid i láthair freisin anailís leathnaithe ar theanga na leathadh nuachta bréige, ag taispeáint go bhfuil a phríomhghnéithe den chuid is mó neamhspleách ar an bhfearann agus comhsheasmhach thar dhá thacar sonraí Béarla. Ar deireadh, bainimid leas as an ngaol idir úsáid teanga agus naisc sa ghraf sóisialta chun láithreacht éifeacht an tSeomra Echo inár sonraí a mheas.', 'hu': 'Az egyének kognitív és társadalmi vonásai tükröződnek a nyelvhasználatban. Ezenkívül az egyének, akik hajlamosak hamis híreket terjeszteni online, gyakran közös vonásokkal rendelkeznek. Ezekre az elképzelésekre építve bemutatunk egy olyan modellt, amely csak az általuk készített nyelv alapján hozza létre az egyének reprezentációit a közösségi médián, és ezeket használja a hamis hírek felismerésére. Megmutatjuk, hogy a nyelvi alapú felhasználói reprezentációk előnyösek ehhez a feladathoz. Bemutatjuk továbbá a hamis hírek terjesztőinek nyelvének kiterjesztett elemzését is, amely azt mutatja, hogy fő jellemzői többnyire domain függetlenek és következetesek két angol adatkészletben. Végül kihasználjuk a nyelvhasználat és a kapcsolatok közötti kapcsolatot a társadalmi grafikonban, hogy felmérjük az Echo Chamber hatás jelenlétét adatainkban.', 'ka': 'ადამიანების კონციენტიური და სოციალური განსხვავებები ენების გამოყენებაში გამოყენება. დამატებით, ადამიანები, რომლებიც წარმოადგენიან ტალქტური ინფორმაციების გაფართლებას ინტერნეტი, ზოგიერთად საერთო განსხვავებას გა ამ იდეების შესახებ, ჩვენ მოდელის შესახებ, რომელიც სოციალური მედიაში ადამიანების გამოყენება მხოლოდ ისინი გამოყენებენ ენაზე და გამოყენებენ ტალქტური ინფორმაციას. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ენაზე დამუშავებული მომხმარებელი გამოყენებები ამ დავალებისთვის გამოსახულებელია. ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ ტალქტური ინფორმაციის გარეშების ენაზიის გარეშე ანალიზიცია, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მისი მნიშვნელოვანი პირველ ფუნქციები უფრო დი საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ვკომპორტირებთ ენის გამოყენება და კავშირებების შესახებ სოციალური გრაფიკში, რომელიც ჩვენი მონაცემებში Echo Chamber-ის ეფექტის მისახებ.', 'kk': 'Тілдердің білікті және әлемдік қасиеттері тілдерді қолдану үшін көрсетіледі. Қосымша, онлайн жалғыз жаңалықтарды жалғыз жаңалықтарды көбірек жалғыз қасиеттерді ортақтастырады. Бұл идеяларды құру үшін біз социалдық медиақтардың тәсілдерін жасайтын, тек олардың жасайтын тілдеріне негізделген, оларды жалғыз жаңалықтарды табу үшін қолданатын үлгілерді таңда Біз тілде негізделген пайдаланушылардың тапсырмаларын көрсету үшін пайдаланушыларды көрсету. Сонымен қатар, жалғыз жаңалық таратушыларының тілінің кеңейтілген анализ көрсетіп, оның негізгі мүмкіндіктері көбінде доменге тәуелді және екі ағылшын деректер қорларында т Соңында, біз тілдерді қолдану мен қосылымдардың арасындағы қатынасын қолдану үшін Ехо палатасының деректерімізде қатынасын оқу үшін қолданамыз.', 'el': 'Τα γνωστικά και κοινωνικά χαρακτηριστικά των ατόμων αντικατοπτρίζονται στη χρήση της γλώσσας. Επιπλέον, τα άτομα που είναι επιρρεπείς στη διάδοση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων στο διαδίκτυο συχνά μοιράζονται κοινά χαρακτηριστικά. Βασιζόμενοι σε αυτές τις ιδέες, εισάγουμε ένα μοντέλο που δημιουργεί αναπαραστάσεις ατόμων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης με βάση μόνο τη γλώσσα που παράγουν και τα χρησιμοποιεί για να ανιχνεύσει ψεύτικα νέα. Δείχνουμε ότι οι γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις χρηστών είναι ευεργετικές για αυτό το έργο. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης μια εκτεταμένη ανάλυση της γλώσσας των πλαστών ειδήσεων, δείχνοντας ότι τα κύρια χαρακτηριστικά της είναι ως επί το πλείστον ανεξάρτητα από τον τομέα και συνεπή σε δύο αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Τέλος, αξιοποιούμε τη σχέση μεταξύ της χρήσης της γλώσσας και των συνδέσεων στο κοινωνικό γράφημα για να αξιολογήσουμε την παρουσία της επίδρασης του Επιμελητηρίου Έκο στα δεδομένα μας.', 'it': "I tratti cognitivi e sociali degli individui si riflettono nell'uso della lingua. Inoltre, gli individui che sono inclini a diffondere notizie false online spesso condividono tratti comuni. Partendo da queste idee, introduciamo un modello che crea rappresentazioni di individui sui social media basate solo sul linguaggio che producono, e li usiamo per rilevare le fake news. Mostriamo che le rappresentazioni degli utenti basate sul linguaggio sono utili per questo compito. Presentiamo anche un'analisi estesa del linguaggio dei fake news spreader, mostrando che le sue caratteristiche principali sono per lo più indipendenti dal dominio e coerenti su due set di dati inglesi. Infine, sfruttiamo la relazione tra uso del linguaggio e connessioni nel grafico sociale per valutare la presenza dell'effetto Echo Chamber nei nostri dati.", 'mk': 'Когнитивните и социјалните знаци на поединците се рефлектирани во употребата на јазикот. Покрај тоа, поединците кои се навикнати да шират лажни вести онлајн често делат заеднички знаци. Користејќи ги овие идеи, воведуваме модел кој создава претставувања на поединци на социјалните медиуми базирани само на јазикот кој го произведуваат, и ги користиме за детектирање лажни вести. We show that language-based user representations are beneficial for this task.  Ние, исто така, претставуваме проширена анализа на јазикот на лажните новински ширечи, покажувајќи дека нејзините главни карактеристики се претежно независни од домените и константни низ двата англиски податоци. Конечно, ја искористуваме врската помеѓу употребата на јазикот и врските во социјалниот график за да го процениме присуството на ефектот на Ехо комората во нашите податоци.', 'ms': 'Ciri-ciri pengetahuan dan sosial individu tersembunyi dalam penggunaan bahasa. Selain itu, individu yang cenderung menyebarkan berita palsu online sering berkongsi ciri-ciri umum. Membangun pada idea-idea ini, kami memperkenalkan model yang mencipta perwakilan individu di media sosial berdasarkan bahasa yang mereka hasilkan, dan menggunakannya untuk mengesan berita palsu. Kami menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan pengguna berdasarkan bahasa berguna untuk tugas ini. Kami juga mempersembahkan analisis lanjutan bahasa penyebar berita palsu, menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri utamanya adalah kebanyakan domain independen dan konsisten melalui dua set data Inggeris. Akhirnya, kita mengeksploitasi hubungan antara penggunaan bahasa dan sambungan dalam graf sosial untuk menilai kehadiran kesan Kamar Echo dalam data kita.', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തികളുടെ സാമൂഹ്യത്തിന്റെയും സാമൂഹിക ക്രമങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷയില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. വ്യാജവാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈനില്\u200d പരത്താന്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിക്കുന്ന വ്യക്തികള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും സാധാരണ കഷ്ടപ്പാടു ഈ ആശയങ്ങളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന് മാത്രം നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് സാമൂഹ്യമേഡിയില്\u200d വ്യക്തികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധ We show that language-based user representations are beneficial for this task.  കള്ള വാര്\u200dത്ത വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകളുടെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d നാം ഒരു വിശേഷവും കാണിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മിക്കവും സ്വ അവസാനം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധവും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d എക്കോ ചേമ്പര്\u200d പ', 'mt': 'Il-karatteristiċi konoxxittivi u soċjali tal-individwi huma riflessi fl-użu tal-lingwa. Barra minn hekk, individwi li huma suxxettibbli li jxerrdu aħbarijiet foloz onlajn spiss jaqsmu karatteristiċi komuni. Abbażi ta’ dawn l-ideat, a ħna nintroduċu mudell li joħloq rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ individwi fuq il-midja soċjali bbażati biss fuq il-lingwa li jipproduċu, u nużahom biex jinstabu aħbarijiet foloz. Aħna nuru li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-utenti bbażati fuq il-lingwa huma ta’ benefiċċju għal dan il-kompitu. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll analiżi estiża tal-lingwa ta’ spreaders tal-aħbarijiet foloz, li turi li l-karatteristiċi ewlenin tagħha huma l-aktar indipendenti mid-dominju u konsistenti f’żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta Ingliżi. Fl-aħħar nett, nisfruttaw ir-relazzjoni bejn l-użu tal-lingwi u l-konnessjonijiet fil-grafika soċjali biex jivvalutaw il-preżenza tal-effett tal-Kamra Eko fid-dejta tagħna.', 'no': 'Kognitiv og sosiale eigenskapar av individuar er reflektert i språkbruk. I tillegg kan individuane som er nærleis å spre falske nyhetar på nettet ofte dele felles eigenskapar. Bygg vi på desse ideane, introduserer vi eit modell som lagar representasjonar av individuar på sosiale media bare basert på språket dei produserer, og bruker dei for å finna falske nyhetar. Vi viser at språkbaserte brukarsrepresentasjonar er nyttig for denne oppgåva. Vi presenterer også eit utvida analyse av språket av falske nyhetsprogrammer, som viser at hovudfunksjonane henne er mest domene uavhengige og konsistent over to engelske datasett. I slutt bruker vi forbindelsen mellom språkbruk og tilkoplingar i sosialgrafen for å vurdere eksisterende effekten på Echo Chamber i våre data.', 'ro': 'Trăsăturile cognitive și sociale ale indivizilor se reflectă în utilizarea limbii. Mai mult decât atât, persoanele care sunt predispuse să răspândească știri false on-line împărtășesc adesea trăsături comune. Bazându-ne pe aceste idei, introducem un model care creează reprezentări ale indivizilor pe rețelele de socializare bazate numai pe limba pe care o produc și le folosim pentru a detecta știrile false. Arătăm că reprezentările utilizatorilor bazate pe limbă sunt benefice pentru această sarcină. De asemenea, prezentăm o analiză extinsă a limbii difuzorilor de știri false, arătând că principalele sale caracteristici sunt în mare parte independente de domenii și consecvente în două seturi de date engleze. În cele din urmă, exploatăm relația dintre utilizarea limbii și conexiunile din graficul social pentru a evalua prezența efectului Echo Chamber în datele noastre.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний мэдэх, нийгмийн чанар хэл хэрэглээнд харагдаж байна. Үүнээс гадна хуурамч мэдээг онлайн салбарт тарааж байгаа хүмүүс ихэвчлэн нийтлэг чанарыг хуваалцдаг. Эдгээр санаануудын тулд бид нийгмийн мэдээллийн хувьд хүн төрөлхтнүүдийг бий болгодог загвар бий болгодог. Зөвхөн тэдний үйлдвэрлэх хэл дээр суурилуулж, хуурамч мэдээг олж мэдэхэд аш Бид хэл дээр суурилсан хэрэглэгчдийн илтгэл энэ үйл ажилд ашигтай гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид хуурамч мэдээлэл тараагчдын хэл дээр нэмэгдсэн шинжилгээг харуулж байна. Үүний гол чанар ихэвчлэн хоёр Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн санд тус хамааралтай байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эцэст нь бид хэл хэрэглэх болон нийгмийн график дээрх холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой. Эхо өрөөний нөлөөг бидний өгөгдлийн талаар үнэлэхээр.', 'si': 'භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ සාමාජික විශේෂතාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ. තවත්, බොරු වාර්තාව ඇන්ලයින් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් අයින් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් සමාන මේ අදහස් වලින් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඔවුන් නිර්මාණය කරපු භාෂ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ භාෂාව අධාරිත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණය මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප අපි සමහරවිට විශාල විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ බොරු වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ භාෂාව, පෙන්වන්නේ ඒකේ ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂ අන්තිමේදී, අපි භාෂාව භාවිතා සහ සම්බන්ධය අතර සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සමාජික ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකේ සම්බන්ධය අතර', 'lt': 'Asmenų pažintinės ir social in ės savybės atspindi kalbos naudojimą. Be to, asmenys, kurie dažnai skleidžia suklastotas žinias internetu, dažnai turi bendrų požymių. Remdamiesi šiomis idėjomis, įvedame model į, kuris sukuria asmenų atstovavimą socialinėje žiniasklaidoje, grindžiamą tik jų gaminama kalba, ir naudojame jas suklastotoms naujienoms aptikti. Mes rodome, kad kalbomis pagrįsti naudotojų atstovai yra naudingi šiam uždaviniui. We also present an extended analysis of the language of fake news spreaders, showing that its main features are mostly domain independent and consistent across two English datasets.  Galiausiai išnaudojame kalbų naudojimo ir ryšių social in ėje grafikoje santykį, kad įvertintume, ar mūsų duomenys rodo Echo rūmų poveikį.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka aqoonta iyo sooshaalka ee qofka ah waxaa lagu fiiriyaa isticmaalka luuqada. Sidoo kale waxaa dheer in qofka looga baahan yahay inay warar been ah ku fidiyaan shabakadda, inta badan waxay qaybsadaan dhacdooyinka caadiga ah. Markaan dhisno fikradan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa tusaale qof ka soo jeeda macluumaadka bulshada oo kaliya ku saleysan luqada ay sameeyaan, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa in ay ogaato war been ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in noocyada isticmaalaha luuqada ku saleysan ay faa’iido u leeyihiin shaqadan. Anagaa sameynaya baaritaan dheeraad ah oo ku qoran luqada warbixiyuhu been yahay, waxaynu tusnaynaa in khaaska gaarka ah ay yihiin deegaanka iyagoo xor ah oo isku mid ah labada kooban ee ingiriisiga. Ugu dambaysta waxaan isticmaalka luuqada iyo xiriirka ku qoran xarunta sooshalka si aan u qiimeynayno dhamaanka saameynta koobka Echo ee macluumaadkayaga.', 'sr': 'Kognitivne i socijalne osobine pojedinaca odražavaju se u upotrebi jezika. Osim toga, pojedinci koji su spremni širiti lažne vesti na internetu često dijele zajedničke osobine. Na temelju tih ideja, predstavljamo model koji stvara predstave pojedinaca na društvenim medijima na temelju samo jezika koji proizvode i koristi ih da bi otkrili lažne vesti. Pokazujemo da su predstave korisnika na jeziku korisne za ovaj zadatak korisne. Takođe predstavljamo proširenu analizu jezika lažnih novinskih šiljača, pokazujući da su njegove glavne karakteristike uglavnom domene nezavisne i konsistentne u dva Engleska dataseta. Konačno, koristimo vezu između upotrebe jezika i veza u socijalnom grafiku kako bi procenili prisustvo učinka Echo Chamber u našim podacima.', 'ur': 'انسانوں کے معلوم اور اجتماعی گواہی زبان کے استعمال میں تفسیر کیے جاتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، افراد جو غلط خبریں آنلاین کے پھیلانے کے قریب ہیں اکثر اکثر مشترک حقائق میں شریک ہیں۔ یہ ایڈیوں پر بناتے ہیں، ہم ایک مدل معلوم کرتے ہیں جو سوسیل میڈیا میں شخصوں کی نمونش پیدا کرتا ہے، صرف ان کی زبان پر جو وہ پیدا کرتی ہیں، اور ان کو جھوٹی خبریں پہچان کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم اسے دکھاتے ہیں کہ زبان پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے کارساز نمونات اس کام کے لئے فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی جھوٹی خبریں پھیلانے والوں کی زبان کی بڑی تحلیل پیش کی ہے، اس کی اصلی ویژگی کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان کی اکثریت ڈومین کے معاملہ میں مستقل ہے اور دو انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ میں موجود ہیں. آخر میں، ہم زبان استعمال اور اتصال کے درمیان اس رابطہ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ہمارے دادہ میں اکو چمبر کے موجود موجود ہونے کے لئے آزمائش کریں.', 'sv': 'Kognitiva och sociala drag hos individer återspeglas i språkanvändningen. Dessutom delar individer som är benägna att sprida falska nyheter på nätet ofta gemensamma drag. Utifrån dessa idéer introducerar vi en modell som skapar representationer av individer på sociala medier baserat enbart på det språk de producerar, och använder dem för att upptäcka falska nyheter. Vi visar att språkbaserade användarrepresentationer är fördelaktiga för denna uppgift. Vi presenterar också en utökad analys av språket för falska nyhetsspridare, vilket visar att dess huvudfunktioner mestadels är domänoberoende och konsekventa över två engelska datauppsättningar. Slutligen utnyttjar vi relationen mellan språkanvändning och kopplingar i den sociala grafen för att bedöma förekomsten av Echo Chamber-effekten i våra data.', 'pl': 'Cechy poznawcze i społeczne osób znajdują odzwierciedlenie w używaniu języka. Ponadto osoby, które są podatne na rozpowszechnianie fałszywych wiadomości online, często mają wspólne cechy. Opierając się na tych pomysłach, wprowadzamy model, który tworzy reprezentacje osób w mediach społecznościowych wyłącznie na podstawie wytwarzanego języka i wykorzystuje je do wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości. Pokazujemy, że językowe reprezentacje użytkowników są korzystne dla tego zadania. Przedstawiamy również rozszerzoną analizę języka fałszywych wiadomości, pokazując, że jego główne cechy są w większości niezależne od domen i spójne w dwóch angielskich zbiorach danych. Wreszcie wykorzystujemy relację między użyciem języka a powiązaniami w wykresie społecznym do oceny obecności efektu Echo Chamber w naszych danych.', 'ta': 'சிலரின் அறிவியல் மற்றும் சமூக பாதைகள் மொழியின் பயன்பாட்டில் பிரதிபலிக்கப்படுகின்றன. மேலும், பொய் செய்திகளை இணையத்தில் பரப்ப வேண்டும் பொதுவான பொதுவான விஷயங்களை பங்கிடுகிறார்கள். இந்த கருத்துக்களை உருவாக்குவது, பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். மொழி அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பயனர் பிரதிநிதிகள் இந்த பணிக்கு நன்மையாக இருக்கும் என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகி பொய் செய்தி விரிப்பவர்களின் மொழியை நாம் ஒரு விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட ஆராய்வை கொண்டிருக்கிறோம், அதன் முக்கிய தன்மைகள் பொருத்தமாக உள் இறுதியில், நாம் மொழி பயன்பாடு மற்றும் இணைப்புகளுக்கிடையே தொடர்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் எங்கள் தரவில் Echo Chamber விளைவுகளை மதிப்', 'uz': "Shaxsiy shaxsiy va jamiyatlar tildagi foydalanuvchiga ko'rsatilgan. Ko'pchilik, yolg'on xabar tarkibini tarjima qilish uchun odamlar ko'p oddiy narsalarni o'zgartiradi. Bu g'oyalarni yaratishda, biz faqat yaratish tilida odamlarning shakllarini yaratish mumkin, va ularni falsk news aniqlash uchun foydalanamiz. We show that language-based user representations are beneficial for this task.  Biz o'zimning asosiy xususiyatlarining asosiy xossalari domen'ning ko'pchiligi qo'llangan va ikkita ingliz maʼlumotlar tarkibida bir xil tarkibi. Endi, biz ma'lumotlarimizga Echo Chamber effektining hayotini qidirish uchun tilning foydalanuvchi va jamiyat grafikdagi aloqalarni o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Đặc điểm nhận thức và xã hội của cá nhân được phản ánh trong cách dùng ngôn ngữ. Những cá nhân có xu hướng truyền tin giả trực tuyến thường chia sẻ đặc điểm chung. Dựa trên những ý tưởng này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một mô hình tạo ra các biểu tượng của cá nhân trên các phương tiện xã hội chỉ dựa trên ngôn ngữ họ tạo ra, và sử dụng chúng để phát hiện tin giả. Chúng tôi cho thấy các đài phát ngôn ngữ có lợi cho nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra một bản phân tích mở rộng ngôn ngữ của các nhà báo giả, cho thấy những tính năng chính của nó hầu hết là độc lập miền và thống nhất trong hai bộ dữ liệu Anh. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi tận dụng quan hệ giữa sử dụng ngôn ngữ và kết nối trong đồ thị xã hội để đánh giá sự hiện diện của hiệu ứng phòng ngủ Echo trong dữ liệu của chúng tôi.', 'nl': 'Cognitieve en sociale kenmerken van individuen worden weerspiegeld in taalgebruik. Bovendien delen individuen die geneigd zijn om nepnieuws online te verspreiden vaak gemeenschappelijke kenmerken. Voortbouwend op deze ideeën introduceren we een model dat representaties van individuen op sociale media creëert op basis van de taal die ze produceren, en deze gebruikt om fake news te detecteren. We laten zien dat taalgebaseerde gebruikersrepresentaties nuttig zijn voor deze taak. We presenteren ook een uitgebreide analyse van de taal van fake news spreaders, waaruit blijkt dat de belangrijkste kenmerken meestal domeinonafhankelijk en consistent zijn over twee Engelse datasets. Ten slotte gebruiken we de relatie tussen taalgebruik en verbindingen in de sociale grafiek om de aanwezigheid van het Echo Chamber effect in onze gegevens te beoordelen.', 'bg': 'Когнитивните и социалните черти на индивида се отразяват в използването на езика. Освен това, хората, които са склонни да разпространяват фалшиви новини онлайн, често споделят общи черти. Въз основа на тези идеи, ние въвеждаме модел, който създава представителства на индивидите в социалните медии, базирани само на езика, който произвеждат, и ги използва за откриване на фалшиви новини. Показваме, че езиковите потребителски представи са полезни за тази задача. Представяме и разширен анализ на езика на разпространяващите фалшиви новини, който показва, че основните му характеристики са предимно независими от домейна и последователни в два английски набора данни. И накрая, ние използваме връзката между използването на езика и връзките в социалната графика, за да оценим наличието на ефекта на Ехо камерата в нашите данни.', 'da': 'Individers kognitive og sociale træk afspejles i sprogbrugen. Desuden deler personer, der er tilbøjelige til at sprede falske nyheder online ofte fælles træk. Med udgangspunkt i disse idéer introducerer vi en model, der skaber repræsentationer af enkeltpersoner på sociale medier udelukkende baseret på det sprog, de producerer, og bruger dem til at opdage falske nyheder. Vi viser, at sprogbaserede brugerrepræsentationer er gavnlige for denne opgave. Vi præsenterer også en udvidet analyse af sproget for fake news spredere, der viser, at dets vigtigste funktioner hovedsageligt er domæneafhængige og konsekvente på tværs af to engelske datasæt. Endelig udnytter vi forholdet mellem sprogbrug og forbindelser i den sociale graf til at vurdere tilstedeværelsen af Echo Chamber-effekten i vores data.', 'de': 'Kognitive und soziale Merkmale von Individuen spiegeln sich im Sprachgebrauch wider. Darüber hinaus teilen Personen, die anfällig sind, Fake News online zu verbreiten, oft gemeinsame Merkmale. Aufbauend auf diesen Ideen stellen wir ein Modell vor, das Repräsentationen von Individuen in sozialen Medien nur auf der Grundlage der Sprache erstellt, die sie produzieren, und sie verwenden, um Fake News zu erkennen. Wir zeigen, dass sprachbasierte Benutzerdarstellungen für diese Aufgabe von Vorteil sind. Wir präsentieren auch eine erweiterte Analyse der Sprache von Fake News Spreadern, die zeigt, dass ihre Hauptmerkmale größtenteils domänenunabhängig und konsistent über zwei englische Datensätze sind. Schließlich nutzen wir die Beziehung zwischen Sprachgebrauch und Zusammenhängen im sozialen Graphen, um das Vorhandensein des Echo Chamber Effekts in unseren Daten zu bewerten.', 'id': 'Ciri-ciri kognitif dan sosial dari individu terrefleksi dalam penggunaan bahasa. Selain itu, individu yang cenderung menyebarkan berita palsu online sering berbagi ciri-ciri umum. Berdasarkan ide-ide ini, kami memperkenalkan model yang menciptakan persembahan individu di media sosial berdasarkan bahasa yang mereka hasilkan, dan menggunakannya untuk mendeteksi berita palsu. Kami menunjukkan bahwa representation pengguna berdasarkan bahasa berguna untuk tugas ini. Kami juga mempersembahkan analisis panjang bahasa penyebar berita palsu, menunjukkan bahwa fitur utamanya kebanyakan domain independen dan konsisten melalui dua set data Inggris. Akhirnya, kita mengeksploitasi hubungan antara penggunaan bahasa dan koneksi di grafik sosial untuk menilai kehadiran efek Kamar Echo dalam data kita.', 'ko': '개인의 인지와 사회 특징은 언어 사용에 반영된다.그 밖에 인터넷에서 허위 뉴스를 전파하기 쉬운 개인은 종종 공통된 특징을 가지고 있다.이러한 생각을 토대로 우리는 하나의 모델을 도입했다. 이 모델은 개인이 사용하는 언어를 바탕으로 소셜 미디어에서 개인의 표시를 만들고 이를 이용하여 허위 뉴스를 검출하는 것이다.우리는 언어 기반의 사용자가 이 임무에 유익하다는 것을 증명했다.우리는 또한 허위 뉴스 전파자의 언어를 확장 분석한 결과 그 주요 특징은 두 영어 데이터의 집중은 주로 분야가 독립적이고 일치하는 것으로 나타났다.마지막으로 우리는 사교도에서 언어 사용과 연계 간의 관계를 이용하여 데이터 중의 메아리실 효과의 존재를 평가한다.', 'sw': 'Matukio ya watu yanayotambua na kijamii yanaonekana kwa matumizi ya lugha. Moreover, individuals who are prone to spread fake news online often share common traits.  Kujenga mawazo haya, tunaonyesha mfano ambao unatengeneza uwakilizaji wa watu kwenye mitandao ya kijamii pekee kwa lugha wanazozalisha, na tunatumia kugundua habari potofu. Tunaonyesha uwakilishi wa mtumiaji wa lugha ni faida kwa kazi hii. Pia tunaweka uchambuzi mkubwa wa lugha ya waandishi wa habari potofu, tunaonyesha kuwa vipengenezo vyake vikuu vinavyojitegemea na vinaendelea katika seti mbili za Kiingereza. Mwisho, tunatumia uhusiano kati ya matumizi ya lugha na mawasiliano katika mtandao wa kijamii ili kutathmini uwepo wa matumizi ya chama cha Echo katika takwimu zetu.', 'af': "Kognitiewe en sosiale eienskappe van individuele is reflekteer in taal gebruik. Ook, individuele wat voorspoedig is om falske nuus online te sprei, dikwels gemeenskare eienskappe te deel. Op hierdie idee gebou ons 'n model voorsien wat verteenwoordigheid van individuele op sosiale media gebaseer word net op die taal wat hulle produseer, en gebruik hulle om falske nuus te ontdek. Ons wys dat taal-gebaseerde gebruiker voorstellings nuttig is vir hierdie taak. Ons stel ook 'n uitgebreide analiseer van die taal van falske nuusspreiders, wat vertoon dat sy hooffunksies meeste domein onveilig en konsistent is oor twee Engels datastelle. Eindelik word ons die verwanting tussen taal gebruik en verbindings in die sosiale graf uitgebruik om die aangesig van die Echo-kamer effek in ons data te vure.", 'hr': 'Kognitivne i društvene osobe pojedinaca odražavaju se u upotrebi jezika. Osim toga, pojedinci koji su spremni širiti lažne vijesti na internetu često dijele zajedničke osobine. Na temelju tih ideja, predstavljamo model koji stvara predstave pojedinaca na društvenim medijima na temelju samo jezika koji proizvode i koristi ih da bi otkrili lažne vijesti. Pokazujemo da su predstave korisnika na jeziku korisne za ovaj zadatak korisne. Također predstavljamo proširenu analizu jezika lažnih vijesti širenja, pokazujući da su njegove glavne karakteristike uglavnom domena nezavisni i konsistentni u dva Engleska dataseta. Konačno, koristimo vezu između upotrebe jezika i veza u društvenom grafiku kako bi procijenili prisustvo učinka Echo Chamber u našim podacima.', 'sq': 'Trajtikat njohëse dhe sociale të individëve pasqyrohen në përdorimin e gjuhës. Përveç kësaj, individët që janë të aftë të përhapin lajme të rreme në internet shpesh ndajnë karakteristika të përbashkëta. Duke u ndërtuar në këto ide, ne paraqesim një model që krijon përfaqësime të individëve në media sociale bazuar vetëm në gjuhën që prodhojnë dhe i përdorim për të zbuluar lajme të rreme. We show that language-based user representations are beneficial for this task.  Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu një analizë të zgjeruar të gjuhës së përhapësve të lajmeve të rreme, duke treguar se karakteristikat kryesore të saj janë kryesisht të pavarura në domeni dhe konsistente nëpërmjet dy grupeve të dhënash angleze. Më në fund, ne shfrytëzojmë marrëdhëniet midis përdorimit të gjuhës dhe lidhjeve në grafikun social për të vlerësuar praninë e efektit të Dhomës Eko në të dhënat tona.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት እና ማኅበራዊ ጉዳይ በቋንቋ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የሐሰት ዜናዎችን በመስመር የሚዘጋጁት ሰዎች ብዙ ጊዜ የድጋፍ ጉዳይ ያጋራሉ፡፡ እነዚህን አሳቤዎች ላይ በመሠረት፣ የውሸት ዜናዎችን ለማግኘት ብቻ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሚቆጠሩትን ሰዎች ምሳሌ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ቋንቋ-አካባቢ ተጠቃሚ መልዕክቶች ለዚህ ስራ ጥቅም እንዲሆኑ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የሐሰት ዜና ሰራፊዎች ቋንቋ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ Finally, we exploit the relation between language use and connections in the social graph to assess the presence of the Echo Chamber effect in our data.', 'tr': 'Adamlaryň bilim we sosial özellikleri dil ullanyşynda görkezilýär. Munuň ýagdaýynda, ýalňyş haberleri internetde köplenç orta özellikleri paýlaşýarlar. Bu ideýalar üçin guruldyk, sosyal medýýatlarda ynsanlaryň suratyny diňe üretýän dillerine daýan etmän we olaryny sahte haberler tapmak üçin ullanýarys. Biz dilden daşary ulananlaryň temizleriniň bu zada etmäge faydaly bolandygyny görkez. Biz hem sahte täzelikleriň dilinde ýalňyş täzelikleriniň esasy özellikleriniň adatça domenyň boýunça we iki iňlisçe datasetleriniň arasynda täsirli bolmagyny görkeýäris. Soňunda, biz esaslarymyzda dil ulanmaklaryň we sosial grafdaky baglaşmalaryň barlygyny etmäge çykarýarys.', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিদের চিন্তা এবং সামাজিক ভাষায় প্রতিফলিত হয়েছে। এছাড়াও, যারা মিথ্যা সংবাদ অনলাইনে ছড়িয়ে দেয়ার জন্য প্রায়শই সাধারণ ব্যবস্থা শেয়ার করে। এই চিন্তা নির্মাণ করার জন্য আমরা একটি মডেল চিহ্নিত করি যা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে ব্যক্তির প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করে শুধুমাত্র তারা তৈ We show that language-based user representations are beneficial for this task.  আমরা মিথ্যা সংবাদ ছড়িয়ে দেখাচ্ছি মিথ্যা সংবাদ প্রচারকারীদের ভাষার বিশ্লেষণ, যেখানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এর প্রধান বৈশিষ্ট্যে অবশেষে, আমরা ভাষা ব্যবহার এবং সামাজিক গ্রাফের সাথে যোগাযোগের সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করি আমাদের তথ্যে ইকো চ্যাম্বারের প্রভাবের উপস্', 'hy': 'Ահատների ճանաչողական և սոցիալական առանձնահատկությունները արտացոլում են լեզվի օգտագործման մեջ: Ավելին, անհատները, ովքեր հակված են կեղծ նորություններ տարածելու առցանց, հաճախ կիսում են ընդհանուր հատկություններ: Հիմնվելով այս գաղափարների վրա, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոդել, որը ստեղծում է անհատների ներկայացումներ սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում, հիմնված միայն նրանց ստեղծված լեզուների վրա և օգտագործում է դրանք կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերելու համար Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ լեզվով հիմնված օգտագործողների ներկայացումները օգտակար են այս խնդրի համար: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք կեղծ նորությունների տարածողների լեզվի ընդլայնված վերլուծությունը, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ դրա հիմնական հատկությունները հիմնականում բնագավառի անկախ են և համապատասխանում են երկու անգլերեն տվյալների համակար Վերջապես, մենք օգտագործում ենք լեզվի օգտագործման և կապերի հարաբերությունը սոցիալական գրաֆիկի մեջ, որպեսզի գնահատենք էկո սենյակի ազդեցությունը մեր տվյալներում:', 'az': 'İnsanların bilikli və sosyal özellikləri dil istifadəsində təsirlənir. Daha sonra, online sahte xəbərlər yayınmağa layiq olan kişilər çox yayınlıq xüsusiyyətləri paylaşırlar. Bu fikirlərin üstünə inşa etdiyimiz, sosyal media içində yalnızca ürəklərinin dilinə dayanan kişilərin göstərilməsini və sahte xəbərləri keşfetmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz dil tabanlı istifadəçilərin bu işin faydalı olduğunu göstəririk. Biz həmçinin sahte xəbər yayıcıların dilinin genişləndirilmiş analizi göstəririk ki, onun ən böyük xüsusiyyətləri çox domain bağımsız və iki İngilizə veri qutusu arasında müəyyən edir. Sonunda, biz məlumatlarımızda Echo Chamber etkisinin varlığını değerləşdirmək üçün dil istifadəsi və bağlantıların arasındakı bağlantısını istifadə edirik.', 'fa': 'ویژگی\u200cهای شناخته و اجتماعی فرد در استفاده از زبان تفکیر می\u200cشوند. علاوه بر این، افرادی که مقاومت دارند اخبار دروغگویی را در اینترنت گسترش دهند، اغلب ویژه\u200cهای مشترک را شریک می\u200cکنند. بر روی این ایده ها، ما یک مدل معرفی می کنیم که روی رسانه های اجتماعی فقط بر روی زبانی که تولید می کنند، و از آن استفاده می کنیم تا اخبار دروغ را شناسایی کند. ما نشان می دهیم که نمایش\u200cهای کاربر بر زبان برای این کار سودمند است. ما همچنین یک تحلیل گسترده از زبان گسترده\u200cکننده\u200cهای خبرهای دروغ را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که ویژه\u200cهای اصلی آن بیشتر از دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای انگلیسی مستقل و مستقل است. بالاخره، ما ارتباط بین استفاده از زبان و ارتباط\u200cها در گراف اجتماعی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا موقعیت اتفاق محل اکو در داده\u200cهای ما را ارزیابی کنیم.', 'ca': "Les característiques cognitives i socials dels individus s'reflecteixen en l'ús del llenguatge. A més, els individus que tenen tendència a difundir notícies falses en línia sovint comparteixen trets comuns. Construïnt-nos en aquestes idees, introduïm un model que crea representacions d'individus als mitjans socials basades només en la llengua que produeixen i les utilitzem per detectar notícies falses. Mostrem que les representacions dels usuaris basades en llenguatges són beneficioses per aquesta tasca. També presentem una an àlisi estesa del llenguatge dels difusors de notícies falses, mostrant que les seves característiques principals són principalment independents de dominis i consistents en dos conjunts de dades angleses. Finalment, explotam la relació entre l'ús del llenguatge i les connexions del gràfic social per avaluar la presença de l'efecte de la Càmara Echo en les nostres dades.", 'cs': 'Kognitivní a sociální rysy jednotlivců se odrážejí v používání jazyka. Kromě toho jedinci, kteří jsou náchylní k šíření falešných zpráv online, často sdílejí společné rysy. Na základě těchto myšlenek představujeme model, který vytváří reprezentace jednotlivců na sociálních médiích pouze na základě jazyka, který produkují, a používá je k detekci falešných zpráv. Ukazujeme, že jazykově založená uživatelská reprezentace jsou pro tento úkol výhodná. Dále představujeme rozšířenou analýzu jazyka falešných zpráv, která ukazuje, že jeho hlavní vlastnosti jsou většinou doménově nezávislé a konzistentní napříč dvěma anglickými datovými sadami. Nakonec využíváme vztah mezi jazykovým používáním a souvislostmi v sociálním grafu k posouzení přítomnosti efektu Echo Chamber v našich datech.', 'fi': 'Yksilön kognitiiviset ja sosiaaliset piirteet heijastuvat kielen käytössä. Lisäksi henkilöillä, jotka ovat alttiita levittämään valeuutisia verkossa, on usein yhteisiä piirteitä. Näiden ideoiden pohjalta esittelemme mallin, joka luo yksilöiden representaatioita sosiaalisessa mediassa vain heidän tuottamansa kielen perusteella ja käyttää niitä väärien uutisten havaitsemiseen. Osoitamme, että kielipohjaiset käyttäjien esitykset ovat hyödyllisiä tässä tehtävässä. Esitämme myös laajan analyysin fake news levittäjien kielestä, joka osoittaa, että sen pääpiirteet ovat enimmäkseen verkkotunnuksista riippumattomia ja yhdenmukaisia kahden englanninkielisen aineiston välillä. Lopuksi hyödynnämme sosiaalisen kaavion kielen käytön ja yhteyksien välistä suhdetta arvioidaksemme Echo Chamber -ilmiön esiintymistä tiedoissamme.', 'et': 'Inimeste kognitiivsed ja sotsiaalsed tunnused kajastuvad keelekasutuses. Lisaks jagavad üksikisikud, kes on kalduvad levitama valeuudiseid internetis, sageli ühiseid tunnuseid. Nende ideede põhjal tutvustame mudelit, mis loob sotsiaalmeedias üksikisikute esindusi ainult nende toodetud keele põhjal ja kasutab neid valeuudiste tuvastamiseks. Näitame, et keelepõhised kasutajate esitused on selle ülesande jaoks kasulikud. Esitleme ka valeuudiste levitajate keele laiendatud analüüsi, mis näitab, et selle peamised omadused on enamasti domeenisõltumatud ja järjepidevad kahes inglise andmekogumis. Lõpuks kasutame keelekasutuse ja sotsiaalse graafiku seoseid, et hinnata Echo Chamber efekti olemasolu meie andmetes.', 'bs': 'Kognitivne i socijalne osobine pojedinaca odražavaju se u upotrebi jezika. Osim toga, pojedinci koji su spremni širiti lažne vijesti na internetu često dijele zajedničke osobine. Na temelju tih ideja, predstavljamo model koji stvara predstave pojedinaca na društvenim medijima na temelju samo jezika koji proizvode i koristi ih da bi otkrili lažne vijesti. Pokazujemo da su predstave korisnika na jeziku korisne za ovaj zadatak korisne. Također predstavljamo proširenu analizu jezika lažnih novinskih šiljača, pokazujući da su njegova glavna karakteristika uglavnom domena nezavisna i konsistentna u dva Engleska dataseta. Konačno, koristimo vezu između upotrebe jezika i veza u socijalnom grafiku kako bi procenili prisustvo učinka Echo Chamber u našim podacima.', 'sk': 'Kognitivne in družbene lastnosti posameznikov se odražajo v uporabi jezika. Poleg tega imajo posamezniki, ki so nagnjeni k širjenju lažnih novic na spletu, pogosto skupne lastnosti. Na podlagi teh idej predstavljamo model, ki ustvarja reprezentacije posameznikov na družbenih omrežjih samo na podlagi jezika, ki ga ustvarjajo, in jih uporablja za odkrivanje lažnih novic. Pokazali smo, da so jezikovne uporabniške predstavitve koristne za to nalogo. Predstavljamo tudi razširjeno analizo jezika razširjalcev lažnih novic, ki kaže, da so njegove glavne značilnosti večinoma neodvisne od domene in dosledne v dveh angleških naborih podatkov. Nazadnje izkoriščamo povezavo med uporabo jezika in povezavami v socialnem grafu, da bi ocenili prisotnost učinka Echo Chamber v naših podatkih.', 'ha': "An yi wa misalin mutane da masu sani a cikin harshe. Ko da haka, mutane da ke samun su wãtsa zance ƙarya a cikin Online, ko da yawa sunã share fatauci na dabam. Kana samar da waɗannan idãnun, Munã ƙara wani motel wanda ke halitta shugabannin wasu mutane a kan mitandai da jamii, a kan harshen su samu'a, kuma Muke amfani da su dõmin su gani lãbãri na ƙarya. Munã nũna misalin mai amfani da misalin harshe da ke da amfani ga wannan aikin. Kayya, Munã halatar da rabon da aka shimfiɗa harshen waɗanda ke wãtsa na lãbãri na ƙarya, sunã nũna cewa masu hushi ne mafiya yawa, su zama daidai da kuma sunã daidai a cikin tarakin biyu na Ingiriya. Haƙĩƙa, Munã amfani da muhimmanci a tsakanin isticmin harshen da haɗi cikin grafyutan jamii dõmin Mu ƙaddara presence of the Echo Chairman cikin data.", 'jv': 'Attribute sing akèh lan saiki perbudhakan bakal terus-terus kuwi jenis ning langgar. Labah, wong-wong sing meh kuwi nglarakno layanan liyane mungkun kesempatan karo nganggo cara sing mengkun. Ngawe nggawe ide sing iki, awak dhéwé ngerewakake model sing tumbagi bisa nguasal Perkara-Perkara sing uwis barang media sotiki dadi iki bakal nguasal kelangan winih dhéwé, lan ujaran dhéwé kanggo kebebasan basa sing teka. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno kang gagal-seneng pengguna kuwi nggawe barang nggo nggawe barang. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan nyong nggawe perusahaan karo perusahaan kelas barang nggawe, winih dhéwé kuwi perintahaan sing nyelehake sak nguasakno karo perusahaan langkung sampeyan iki dataset Inggris. Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan seneng nggambar nggambar luwih lan nggambar barang komunikasi kanggo nggeranggap kanggo ngilangno echo room dadi awak dhéwé', 'he': 'תכונות מזהה וחברתיות של אנשים משקפים בשימוש בשפה. חוץ מזה, אנשים שנושאים להפיץ חדשות מזויפות באינטרנט לעתים קרובות חולקים תכונות משותפות. בניין על הרעיונות האלה, אנחנו מציגים מודל שיוצר מייצגים של אנשים בתקשורת חברתית מבוססים רק על השפה שהם יוצרים, ושימושים בה כדי לגלות חדשות מזויפות. אנחנו מראים שהמייצגים משתמשים מבוססים בשפה מועילים למשימה הזאת. אנחנו גם מציגים ניתוח מורחב של שפת מפרסמים חדשות מזויפות, שמראה שהתכונות העיקריות שלה הן בעיקר בתחום עצמאי ותקביל בין שני קבוצות נתונים אנגליות. סוף סוף, אנו מנצלים את היחסים בין השימוש בשפה לקשר בגרף החברתי כדי להעריך את נוכחות השפעה של חדר האקו במידע שלנו.', 'bo': 'སྒེར་ཚོའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་སྤྱོད་ནང་རྣམས་བརྗེས ད་དུང་། དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལྟ་བུའི་གསར་འགྲིད་པ་རྒྱ་འགྲེལ་གྱི་རྒྱུན་རྟགས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་འདི་དག་ལ་བཟོ་བ་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཐོག་ལས་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་དུ་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཕན་ཚུན་བརྡ་ཞུགས་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་ཕན་ཡོད་བྱས་པ་ལྟར་བཤད་ན། འོག་གི་རྩ་ མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ། ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora : On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'ar': 'كن بسيطًا وقم بالتدريب المسبق على مجموعات محددة المجال: حول دور بيانات التدريب لتصنيف النص', 'pt': 'Seja Simples e Pré-Treine em Corpora Específicos de Domínio: Sobre o Papel dos Dados de Treinamento para Classificação de Texto', 'fr': 'Passez à la simplicité et préentraînez-vous sur des corpus spécifiques à un domaine\xa0: sur le rôle des données de formation pour la classification de texte', 'es': 'Simplifique y precapacite en corpus específicos de dominio: sobre el papel de los datos de entrenamiento para la clasificación de textos', 'ja': 'ドメイン固有のコーポラに関するシンプルな事前トレーニング：テキスト分類のためのトレーニングデータの役割について', 'zh': '简而豫练特定域之语料库:其数在文本分类之用', 'hi': 'डोमेन-विशिष्ट कॉर्पोरेट पर सरल और पूर्व-ट्रेन जाओ: पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा की भूमिका पर', 'ru': 'Простой и предварительный тренинг по корпорациям, относящимся к конкретным доменам: о роли обучающих данных для классификации текста', 'ga': 'Téigh Simplí agus Réamhthraenáil ar Chorpóra a Bhaineann go Sonrach le Fearainn: Ar Ról Sonraí Oiliúna d’Aicmiú Téacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μετάβαση Απλή και Προεκπαίδευση σε Ειδικό Σώμα Τομέα: Για τον Ρόλο των Εκπαιδευτικών Δεδομένων για την Ταξινόμηση Κειμένου', 'hu': 'Egyszerű és előkészítő képzés a tartományspecifikus Corporán: a képzési adatok szerepéről a szövegosztályozáshoz', 'kk': 'Домендегі ерекше құрылғының қарапайым және алдыңғы оқыту: Мәтін классификациясының оқыту деректерінің рөлі', 'it': 'Go Simple e Pre-Train su Corpora specifica del dominio: sul ruolo dei dati di formazione per la classificazione dei testi', 'lt': 'Perkelti paprastą ir išankstinį mokymą konkrečiai sričiai skirtoje korporacijoje dėl mokymo duomenų, skirtų teksto klasifikacijai, vaidmens', 'mk': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d ലളിതമായ പ്രയോഗത്തിനും മുമ്പു് പോകുക: പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ', 'ms': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'mt': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'mn': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Go Simple and Pre-Tren on Domain-Specific Corpora: Rola danych szkoleniowych dla klasyfikacji tekstu', 'ro': 'Du-te simplu și pregătește-te pe Corpora specifică domeniului: despre rolul datelor de formare pentru clasificarea textelor', 'sr': 'Idi jednostavno i pre-voz na domenu-specijalnu korporu: o ulozi podataka obuke za klasifikaciju teksta', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන කෝපෝරා වල ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන කෝපෝරාවට යන්න: පාළුවන් විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධ', 'so': 'Go fudud iyo horumarinta korporada gaarka ah: On the Role of Data Training for Classification Text', 'sv': 'Gå enkelt och förbered dig på domänspecifik korpora: Om rollen för utbildningsdata för textklassificering', 'ta': 'டொமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட கூட்டத்தில் சுலபமான மற்றும் முன் பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'ڈومین-مخصوص کورپور پر ساده اور پیشترین ترین جاؤ: ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفی کے لئے ترینینگ ڈاٹ کے رول پر', 'uz': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'vi': 'Đi Đi Đi Đi Tập đoàn đơn giản và chuẩn bị về Cơ thể đặc biệt miền: Về vai trò của dữ liệu đào tạo cho việc mô tả văn bản', 'bg': 'Опростено и предварително обучение на специфични за домейн корпора: за ролята на обучителните данни за класификация на текста', 'da': 'Go Simple og Pre-Train på domænespecifikke Corpora: Om rollen af træningsdata til tekstklassifikation', 'nl': 'Ga eenvoudig en pre-trainen op domeinspecifiek corpora: over de rol van trainingsgegevens voor tekstclassificatie', 'hr': 'Idite jednostavno i prije voza na specijalnu korporu domena: o ulozi podataka obuke za klasifikaciju teksta', 'de': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: Zur Rolle von Trainingsdaten für die Textklassifizierung', 'id': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'ko': '특정 영역의 어료 라이브러리에 대한 간단한 예비 훈련: 훈련 데이터가 텍스트 분류에서의 역할', 'fa': 'بروید ساده و پیش\u200cآموزش در شرکت\u200cهای مخصوص دامنه: روی نقش داده\u200cهای آموزش برای کلاس\u200cسازی متن', 'tr': 'Basit we Öňki Trençylyk Objekti Aýratyn Ewezi Maglumaty', 'sq': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'af': 'Gaan Eenvoudige en Voorsoek op Domein- Spesifieke Korpora: Op die rol van Oefening Data vir Teks Klassifikasie', 'am': 'በዶሜን-Specific Corpora ላይ ቀላል እና ቅድሚያ Train: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'hy': 'Go պարզ և նախապատրաստ գնալ բնագավառի մասնավոր կորպորա վրա. Տեքստի դասակարգման ուսուցման տվյալների դերի վրա', 'az': "Domain-Specific Corpora'nın Basit və Ön-Tren: Metin Klasifikasiyası üçün Eğitim Verilərinin Roli", 'bn': 'ডোমেইন- নির্দিষ্ট কোর্পোরায় সহজ এবং পূর্ববর্তী ট্রেন যাও: টেক্সট ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্যের রূপে:', 'bs': 'Idi jednostavno i pre-voz na domenu-specijalnu korporu: o ulozi podataka obuke za klasifikaciju teksta', 'ca': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'sw': 'Nendeni mfululizo rahisi na Kapora maalumu ya Domain: Katika hatua ya mafunzo ya data kwa ajili ya kutangaza maandishi', 'cs': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: O roli tréninkových dat pro klasifikaci textu', 'et': 'Mine lihtne ja eeltreeni domeenispetsiifilistel korpustel: koolitusandmete roll teksti klassifitseerimisel', 'fi': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: Training Data for Text Classification', 'jv': 'Go Simple and First-Line on domain-Specic', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Pojdite preprosto in pred usposabljanjem na domensko specifičnih korpusih: o vlogi podatkov o usposabljanju za klasifikacijo besedila', 'he': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification', 'bo': 'Go Simple and Pre-Train on Domain-Specific Corpora: On the Role of Training Data for Text Classification'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained language models provide the foundations for state-of-the-art performance across a wide range of natural language processing tasks, including text classification. However, most classification datasets assume a large amount labeled data, which is commonly not the case in practical settings. In particular, in this paper we compare the performance of a light-weight linear classifier based on word embeddings, i.e., fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), versus a pre-trained language model, i.e., BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), across a wide range of datasets and classification tasks. In general, results show the importance of domain-specific unlabeled data, both in the form of word embeddings or language models. As for the comparison, BERT outperforms all baselines in standard datasets with large training sets. However, in settings with small training datasets a simple method like fastText coupled with domain-specific word embeddings performs equally well or better than BERT, even when pre-trained on domain-specific data.', 'ar': 'توفر نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا الأسس لأحدث أداء عبر مجموعة واسعة من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، بما في ذلك تصنيف النص. ومع ذلك ، تفترض معظم مجموعات بيانات التصنيف قدرًا كبيرًا من البيانات المصنفة ، وهو ما لا يحدث عادةً في الإعدادات العملية. على وجه الخصوص ، في هذه الورقة ، قارنا أداء المصنف الخطي خفيف الوزن بناءً على تضمين الكلمات ، أي نص سريع (Joulin et al. ، 2017) ، مقابل نموذج لغة مُدرَّب مسبقًا ، أي BERT (Devlin et al. ، 2019) ، عبر مجموعة واسعة من مجموعات البيانات ومهام التصنيف. بشكل عام ، تُظهر النتائج أهمية البيانات غير المسماة الخاصة بالمجال ، سواء في شكل تضمين الكلمات أو نماذج اللغة. بالنسبة للمقارنة ، يتفوق BERT على جميع خطوط الأساس في مجموعات البيانات القياسية مع مجموعات التدريب الكبيرة. ومع ذلك ، في الإعدادات التي تحتوي على مجموعات بيانات تدريب صغيرة ، فإن طريقة بسيطة مثل fastText إلى جانب تضمين الكلمات الخاصة بالمجال تؤدي بشكل جيد أو أفضل من BERT ، حتى عندما يتم تدريبها مسبقًا على بيانات خاصة بالمجال.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados fornecem as bases para um desempenho de última geração em uma ampla variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, incluindo classificação de texto. No entanto, a maioria dos conjuntos de dados de classificação assume uma grande quantidade de dados rotulados, o que geralmente não é o caso em configurações práticas. Em particular, neste artigo comparamos o desempenho de um classificador linear leve baseado em incorporação de palavras, ou seja, fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), versus um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado, ou seja, BERT (Devlin et al. , 2019), em uma ampla variedade de conjuntos de dados e tarefas de classificação. Em geral, os resultados mostram a importância de dados não rotulados específicos de domínio, tanto na forma de incorporação de palavras quanto em modelos de linguagem. Quanto à comparação, o BERT supera todas as linhas de base em conjuntos de dados padrão com grandes conjuntos de treinamento. No entanto, em configurações com pequenos conjuntos de dados de treinamento, um método simples como fastText acoplado a embeddings de palavras específicas de domínio tem desempenho igual ou melhor que BERT, mesmo quando pré-treinado em dados específicos de domínio.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés fournissent les bases d'une performance de pointe pour un large éventail de tâches de traitement du langage naturel, y compris la classification de texte. Cependant, la plupart des ensembles de données de classification supposent une grande quantité de données étiquetées, ce qui n'est généralement pas le cas dans des contextes pratiques. En particulier, dans cet article, nous comparons les performances d'un classificateur linéaire léger basé sur l'intégration de mots, c'est-à-dire FastText (Joulin et al., 2017), par rapport à un modèle de langage pré-formé, c'est-à-dire BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), pour un large éventail d'ensembles de données et de tâches de classification. En général, les résultats montrent l'importance des données non étiquetées spécifiques à un domaine, à la fois sous la forme d'intégrations de mots ou de modèles linguistiques. En ce qui concerne la comparaison, BERT surpasse toutes les lignes de base dans les ensembles de données standard avec de grands ensembles de formation. Toutefois, dans les environnements avec de petits ensembles de données d'apprentissage, une méthode simple telle que FastText associée à des intégrations de mots spécifiques à un domaine fonctionne aussi bien ou mieux que BERT, même lorsqu'elle est pré-entraînée sur des données spécifiques à un domaine.", 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos preentrenados proporcionan las bases para un rendimiento de vanguardia en una amplia gama de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, incluida la clasificación de textos. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los conjuntos de datos de clasificación suponen una gran cantidad de datos etiquetados, lo que no suele ser el caso en entornos prácticos. En particular, en este artículo comparamos el rendimiento de un clasificador lineal ligero basado en incrustaciones de palabras, es decir, FastText (Joulin et al., 2017), con un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado, es decir, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), en una amplia gama de conjuntos de datos y tareas de clasificación. En general, los resultados muestran la importancia de los datos no etiquetados específicos del dominio, tanto en forma de incrustaciones de palabras como de modelos de lenguaje. En cuanto a la comparación, BERT supera todas las líneas de base en los conjuntos de datos estándar con grandes conjuntos de entrenamiento. Sin embargo, en entornos con pequeños conjuntos de datos de entrenamiento, un método simple como FastText junto con incrustaciones de palabras específicas del dominio funciona igual o mejor que BERT, incluso cuando se ha entrenado previamente en datos específicos del dominio.', 'zh': '先训语言模型为诸自然语言理务(兼文本分类)先进性定矣。 然多类聚都假多标数,此于实置中常不然也。 其在本文,较之词轻量级线性分类器(即fastText(Joulin等,2017)与预练语体(即BERT(Devlin等,2019))于广数集分。 凡结果显示特定于域未标数之要,以词嵌语言模样。 若夫BERT 集之数,优于诸基线。 然于小练数集之中,如 fastText 之法,与特定于域词嵌合,虽特定于域数预练,性亦与 BERT 同善。', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングを受けた言語モデルは、テキスト分類を含む幅広い自然言語処理タスクにおける最先端のパフォーマンスの基盤を提供します。 しかしながら、ほとんどの分類データセットは、実際の場面では一般的にはそうではない、大量のラベル付けされたデータを想定している。 特に、この論文では、幅広いデータセットと分類タスクにわたって、単語埋め込みに基づく軽量線形分類子、すなわちfastText （ Joulin et al., 2017 ）と事前に訓練された言語モデル、すなわちBERT （ Devlin et al., 2019 ）のパフォーマンスを比較します。 一般に、結果は、単語埋め込みまたは言語モデルの両方の形式で、ドメイン固有のラベル付けされていないデータの重要性を示しています。 比較については、BERTは大規模なトレーニングセットを備えた標準データセットのすべてのベースラインを上回っています。 ただし、小さなトレーニングデータセットの設定では、ドメイン固有のデータを事前にトレーニングした場合でも、ドメイン固有の単語埋め込みと組み合わせたfastTextのようなシンプルな方法は、BERTよりも優れています。', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные языковые модели обеспечивают основу для современной производительности в широком спектре задач по обработке естественного языка, включая классификацию текста. Однако большинство классификационных наборов данных предполагают большой объем маркированных данных, чего обычно не происходит в практических условиях. В частности, в данной работе мы сравниваем производительность легкого линейного классификатора на основе вложений слов, т.е. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), с предварительно обученной языковой моделью, т.е. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), по широкому спектру наборов данных и задач классификации. В целом, результаты показывают важность специфических для домена немаркированных данных, как в виде вложений слов, так и языковых моделей. Что касается сравнения, то BERT превосходит все базовые линии в стандартных наборах данных с большими обучающими наборами. Тем не менее, в условиях небольших обучающих наборов данных простой метод, такой как fastText в сочетании с встраиванием слов для конкретного домена, работает так же хорошо или лучше, чем BERT, даже если он предварительно обучен данным для конкретного домена.', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल पाठ वर्गीकरण सहित प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन के लिए नींव प्रदान करते हैं। हालांकि, अधिकांश वर्गीकरण डेटासेट एक बड़ी मात्रा में लेबल किए गए डेटा को मानते हैं, जो आमतौर पर व्यावहारिक सेटिंग्स में मामला नहीं होता है। विशेष रूप से, इस पेपर में हम शब्द एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर एक हल्के वजन वाले रैखिक क्लासिफायर के प्रदर्शन की तुलना करते हैं, यानी, fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), बनाम एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल, यानी, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), डेटासेट और वर्गीकरण कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में। सामान्य तौर पर, परिणाम डोमेन-विशिष्ट अनलेबल डेटा के महत्व को दिखाते हैं, दोनों शब्द एम्बेडिंग या भाषा मॉडल के रूप में। तुलना के लिए, BERT बड़े प्रशिक्षण सेट के साथ मानक डेटासेट में सभी बेसलाइन को मात देता है। हालांकि, छोटे प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट के साथ सेटिंग्स में डोमेन-विशिष्ट शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ युग्मित फास्टटेक्स्ट जैसी एक सरल विधि BERT की तुलना में समान रूप से अच्छी तरह से या बेहतर प्रदर्शन करती है, भले ही डोमेन-विशिष्ट डेटा पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित हो।', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn samhlacha teanga réamhoilte an dúshraith le haghaidh feidhmíochta den scoth thar raon leathan de thascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha, lena n-áirítear rangú téacs. Mar sin féin, glacann an chuid is mó de thacair sonraí aicmithe le méid mór sonraí lipéadaithe, rud nach minic a bhíonn i socruithe praiticiúla. Go háirithe, sa pháipéar seo déanaimid comparáid idir feidhmíocht aicmitheora líneach éadrom-mheáchan bunaithe ar leabaithe focal, ie fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), i gcomparáid le samhail teanga réamhoilte, ie, BERT (Devlin et al. , 2019), thar raon leathan tacar sonraí agus tascanna aicmithe. Go ginearálta, léiríonn torthaí an tábhacht a bhaineann le sonraí a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann gan lipéad, i bhfoirm leabaithe focal nó samhlacha teanga. Maidir leis an gcomparáid, sáraíonn BERT gach bonnlíne i dtacar sonraí caighdeánacha le tacair mhóra oiliúna. Mar sin féin, i suíomhanna le tacair shonraí oiliúna beaga feidhmíonn modh simplí cosúil le fastText mar aon le leabaithe focal a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann ar leith chomh maith nó níos fearr ná BERT, fiú agus é réamhoilte ar shonraí a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann.', 'hu': 'Az előképzett nyelvi modellek megalapozzák a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt a természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatok széles skálájában, beleértve a szövegosztályozást is. A legtöbb osztályozási adatkészlet azonban nagy mennyiségű címkézett adatot feltételez, ami gyakorlati beállításokban általában nem így van. Ebben a tanulmányban egy könnyű lineáris osztályozó teljesítményét hasonlítjuk össze a szóbeágyazásokon alapuló, azaz a fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), és egy előre képzett nyelvi modell, azaz a BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) teljesítményét számos adatkészletben és osztályozási feladatban. Általánosságban az eredmények mutatják a tartományspecifikus címke nélküli adatok fontosságát, mind szóbeágyazások, mind nyelvi modellek formájában. Ami az összehasonlítást illeti, a BERT nagyméretű képzési készletekkel felülmúlja az összes alapvető vonalat a szabványos adatkészletekben. A kis képzési adatkészletekkel rendelkező beállításokban azonban egy olyan egyszerű módszer, mint a fastText és a tartományspecifikus szóbeágyazások, ugyanolyan jól vagy jobban teljesít, mint a BERT, még akkor is, ha a tartományspecifikus adatokra vonatkozó előzetes képzés esetén is.', 'el': 'Τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα παρέχουν τα θεμέλια για την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ταξινόμησης κειμένου. Ωστόσο, τα περισσότερα σύνολα δεδομένων ταξινόμησης υποθέτουν μια μεγάλη ποσότητα επισημασμένων δεδομένων, κάτι που συνήθως δεν συμβαίνει στις πρακτικές ρυθμίσεις. Ειδικότερα, στην παρούσα εργασία συγκρίνουμε την απόδοση ενός ελαφρού γραμμικού ταξινομητή βασισμένου σε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, δηλαδή σε ένα προσχεδιασμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο, δηλαδή σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα συνόλων δεδομένων και εργασιών ταξινόμησης. Γενικά, τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν τη σημασία των δεδομένων χωρίς ετικέτα σε συγκεκριμένο τομέα, τόσο με τη μορφή ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων όσο και γλωσσικών μοντέλων. Όσον αφορά τη σύγκριση, ο BERT ξεπερνά όλες τις γραμμές βάσης σε τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων με μεγάλα σύνολα εκπαίδευσης. Ωστόσο, σε ρυθμίσεις με μικρά σύνολα δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης, μια απλή μέθοδος όπως το γρήγορο κείμενο σε συνδυασμό με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων συγκεκριμένου τομέα αποδίδει εξίσου καλά ή καλύτερα από το ακόμη και όταν έχει προετοιμαστεί για δεδομένα συγκεκριμένου τομέα.', 'ka': 'პირველ განსწავლილი ენის მოდელები ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში განსაზღვრებულებების ფუნდამეტრებების განსაზღვრებულებაში ჩვენ განსაზღვრებულია. მაგრამ, უფრო მეტი კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემების კონფიკურაცია მონაცემების დიდი რაოდენობა, რომელიც პრაქტიკური პარამეტრებში არ არის. განსაკუთრებულია, ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ გადასწორებთ სიტყვების ინტებიზაციის სიტყვებისთვის სიტყვებისთვის, როგორც fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), ანუ წინასწორებული ენის მოდელზე, ანუ, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), დიდი დიდი დიატურის და კლასიფიკაციის დავალების განმა საერთოდ, შედეგი მონაცემების მნიშვნელობა დემომინის სპექტიფიკური მონაცემების, ორივე სიტყვების შემდეგ ან ენის მოდელების ფორმაში. შემდგომარებისთვის, BERT უფრო გავაკეთებს ყველა ბაზი ხაზების სტანდარტული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, რომელიც დიდი შემდგომარებ მაგრამ, პატარა მონაცემების მონაცემების პარამეტრებში, როგორც fastText, როგორც დიომინს სპექტიფიკური სიტყვებით დაკავშირებული სიტყვებით, უფრო კარგი ან უფრო კარგი გამოყენება', 'it': "Modelli linguistici pre-formati forniscono le basi per prestazioni all'avanguardia in un'ampia gamma di attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, inclusa la classificazione del testo. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei set di dati di classificazione assume una grande quantità di dati etichettati, cosa che di solito non è il caso nelle impostazioni pratiche. In particolare, in questo articolo confrontiamo le prestazioni di un classificatore lineare leggero basato su incorporazioni di parole, cioè fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), rispetto a un modello linguistico pre-addestrato, cioè BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), attraverso una vasta gamma di set di dati e attività di classificazione. In generale, i risultati mostrano l'importanza dei dati non etichettati specifici per un dominio, sia sotto forma di incorporazioni di parole che di modelli linguistici. Per quanto riguarda il confronto, BERT supera tutte le linee di base in set di dati standard con set di formazione di grandi dimensioni. Tuttavia, in impostazioni con piccoli set di dati di formazione un metodo semplice come fastText accoppiato con incorporazioni di parole specifiche per dominio funziona altrettanto bene o meglio di BERT, anche se pre-addestrato su dati specifici per dominio.", 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai suteikia pagrindą naujausiems rezultatams įvairiose gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotyse, įskaitant teksto klasifikaciją. Tačiau dauguma klasifikavimo duomenų rinkinių turi didelį kiekį pažymėtų duomenų, o tai paprastai praktinėse aplinkybėse nėra. Visų pirma šiame dokumente palyginame lengvųjų linijinių klasifikatorių, grindžiamų žodži ų įterpimu, t. y. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), rezultatus su iš anksto parengtu kalbos modeliu, t. y. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), įvairiuose duomenų rinkiniuose ir klasifikavimo užduotyse. Apskritai rezultatai rodo konkrečiai sričiai skirtų nepažymėtų duomenų svarbą tiek žodžių įtraukimo, tiek kalbų modelių pavidalu. Palyginimo atveju BERT viršija visas bazines linijas standartiniuose duomenų rinkiniuose su dideliais mokymo rinkiniais. Tačiau nustatymuose su mažais mokymo duomenų rinkiniais paprastas metodas, kaip antai fastText, kartu su konkrečiam domenui skirtais žodžiais, veikia taip pat gerai arba geriau nei BERT, net jei iš anksto mokomi konkrečiam domenui skirtais duomenimis.', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілері, мәтін классификациясы қоса, табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларының көптеген аумағының негізін келтіреді. Бірақ, классификациялық деректер жиындарының көпшілігі үлкен мәліметтерді есептеп береді, бұл көпшілік параметрлерде болмайды. Әрине осы қағазда біз сөздерді ендіру негізінде, яғни fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), алдындағы тіл үлгісіне қарсы, мысалы, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), деректер жинақтары мен классификациялық тапсырмалардың көпшілігін салыстырамыз. Жалпы нәтижелер доменге ерекше келтірілмеген деректердің маңыздысын көрсетеді. Екі сөздерді ендіру не тіл үлгілерінің түрінде де. Салыстыру үшін, BERT стандартты деректер қорларының барлық негізгі сызықтарын үлкен оқыту жиындарына арналған. Бірақ, кішкентай оқыту деректер баптауларында, доменге арнаулы мәліметтер үшін қарапайым мәлімет, біріктірілген доменге арнаулы сөздерді ендіру үшін, BERT- ден бірдей немесе жақсы жұмыс істейді,', 'mk': 'Преобучените јазички модели ги обезбедуваат основите за најновите резултати низ широк опсег на природни задачи за обработување јазик, вклучувајќи ја и класификацијата на текстот. Сепак, повеќето податоци за класификација претпоставуваат голема количина обележани податоци, што обично не е случај во практични поставувања. Посебно, во овој весник ја споредуваме изведбата на лесен линијарен класификатор базиран на зборови вградени, т.е. брз текст (Joulin и ал., 2017), во споредба со предобучен јазички модел, т.е., BERT (Devlin и ал., 2019), во широк опсег на податоци и класификациски задачи. Генерално, резултатите ја покажуваат важноста на податоците без обележување специфични за доменот, како во форма на зборови вградени или јазички модели. Што се однесува до споредбата, БЕРТ ги надминува сите бази во стандардните податоци со големи обуки. Сепак, во поставувањата со мали податоци за обука едноставен метод како брз Текст coupled with domain-specific word embeddings performs equally well or better than BERT, even when pre-trained on domain-specific data.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa terlatih-awal menyediakan dasar untuk prestasi state-of-the-art melalui julat luas tugas pemprosesan bahasa alam, termasuk kelasukan teks. Namun, kebanyakan set data klasifikasi menganggap jumlah besar data yang ditabel, yang biasanya bukan kes dalam tetapan praktik. Secara khususnya, dalam kertas in i, kita membandingkan prestasi pengklasifikasi linear berat ringan berdasarkan pembenaman perkataan, iaitu FasText (Joulin et al., 2017), melawan model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih, iaitu BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), melalui julat luas set data dan tugas pengklasifikasi. Secara umum, keputusan menunjukkan kepentingan data tidak berlebihan spesifik domain, kedua-dua dalam bentuk penyambungan perkataan atau model bahasa. Bagi perbandingan, BERT melampaui semua baris dasar dalam set data piawai dengan set latihan besar. Bagaimanapun, dalam tetapan dengan set data latihan kecil kaedah sederhana seperti FasText ditambah dengan penyampaian perkataan spesifik domain berjalan dengan baik atau lebih baik daripada BERT, walaupun bila dilatih-dilatih pada data spesifik domain.', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്സ എന്നാലും ഏറ്റവും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രാക്കിക്കല്\u200d സ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്ത് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d താല്\u200dക്കാലികമാക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള വ പൊതുവായി, ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d - പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതു് കാണിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്കോ ഭാഷ മോഡല താല്\u200dപ്പര്യത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി സാധാരണ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ എല്ലാ ബേസ്റ്റലൈനുകളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ എന്നാലും, ചെറിയ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ഡേറ്റാന്\u200d ഡേറ്റിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉപയോഗപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണമായ രീതിയില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പ', 'mt': 'Mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel jipprovdu l-pedamenti għall-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata f’firxa wiesgħa ta’ kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali, inkluża l-klassifikazzjoni tat-test. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tas-settijiet tad-dejta ta’ klassifikazzjoni jassumu ammont kbir ta’ dejta ttikkettata, li normalment mhuwiex il-każ f’ambjenti prattiċi. B’mod partikolari, f’dan id-dokument inqabblu l-prestazzjoni ta’ klassifikatur linear i ħafif ibbażat fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, jiġifieri FasText (Joulin et al., 2017), kontra mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel, jiġifieri BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta u kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni. B’mod ġenerali, ir-riżultati juru l-importanza ta’ dejta bla tikketta speċifika għad-dominju, kemm fil-forma ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem jew mudelli lingwistiċi. Fir-rigward tat-tqabbil, il-BERT jaqbeż il-linji bażi kollha f’settijiet ta’ dejta standard b’settijiet kbar ta’ taħriġ. Madankollu, f’ambjenti b’settijiet żgħar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ, metodu sempliċi bħal fast Text flimkien ma’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem speċifiċi għad-dominju jwettaq prestazzjoni ugwalment tajba jew a ħjar mill-BERT, anki meta mħarreġ minn qabel fuq dejta speċifika għad-dominju.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварууд нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйлдвэрлэлийн үндсэн олон хэлбэрийн үйлдвэрлэлийн ажил, мөн текст хэлбэрээр бүрдүүлдэг. Гэхдээ ихэнх хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн сангууд нь маш их хэмжээний тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийг тодорхойлдог. Энэ нь практикийн тохиолдолд ихэвчлэн биш. Ялангуяа, энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний хөгжлийн хэлбэрээс өмнө сургалтын хэлний загвар, т.е. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), олон хэлбэрээр өгөгдлийн сангууд болон хуваалтын ажлыг харьцуулж байна. Ерөнхийдөө, үр дүнг нь тодорхой тодорхой тодорхойгүй мэдээллийн чухал чухал зүйлийг харуулж байна. Хоёулаа нь үг нэвтрүүлэх эсвэл хэл загварын хэлбэртэй. Хэрэв харьцуулахад, БЕРТ стандарт өгөгдлийн сангийн суурь шулуунуудыг том сургалтын сургалтын суурь цуглуулдаг. Гэвч жижиг сургалтын өгөгдлийн сангийн тохиолдолд fast-Text шиг нэгэн энгийн арга юм. Домены тодорхой өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын өмнө нь сайн эсвэл сайн ажилладаг.', 'no': 'Førehandsvis språk- modeller gjev grunnlegginga for status- of- the- art- performance over eit brett rekkje av naturspråk- handsamar- oppgåver, inkludert tekstklassifikasjon. Dei fleste klassifikasjonsdatabane gjer imidlertid eit stor mengda med merkelappe, som oftast ikkje er tilfelle i praktiske innstillingar. I denne papiret sammenlignar vi utviklinga av e in lysverke lineær klassifisering basert på ordinnbygging, t.d. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), mot eit først trengt språk-modell, t.d. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), over eit brett rekkje av datasett og klassifikasjonar. Generelt viser resultat viktigheten til domenespesifikke ubeabelte data, både i form av ordinnbygging eller språk-modeller. I tillegg til sammenlikninga, BERT utfører alle baselinjer i standardsetar med store øvingssett. I innstillingane med små øvingsdatasett kan imidlertid eit enkelt metode som fastText kopla med domenespesifikke ord innebygging utføra like godt eller bedre enn BERT, sjølv når det er forelært på domenespesifikke data.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe stanowią podstawę dla najnowocześniejszej wydajności w szerokim zakresie zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego, w tym klasyfikacji tekstu. Jednak większość zestawów danych klasyfikacyjnych zakłada dużą ilość oznaczonych danych, co zwykle nie ma miejsca w ustawieniach praktycznych. W szczególności w niniejszym artykule porównujemy wydajność lekkiego klasyfikatora liniowego opartego na osadzeniach słów, tj. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), w porównaniu z wstępnie przeszkolonym modelem językowym, tj. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), w szerokim zakresie zbiorów danych i zadań klasyfikacyjnych. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, wyniki wskazują na znaczenie danych nieoznakowanych dla domeny, zarówno w postaci osadzeń słów, jak i modeli językowych. Jeśli chodzi o porównanie, BERT przewyższa wszystkie linie bazowe w standardowych zbiorach danych z dużymi zestawami treningowymi. Jednakże w ustawieniach z małymi zestawami danych szkoleniowymi prosta metoda, taka jak fastText w połączeniu z osadzeniami słów specyficznych dla domeny, działa równie dobrze lub lepiej niż BERT, nawet gdy została wstępnie przeszkolona na danych specyficznych dla domeny.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite oferă bazele pentru performanțe de ultimă generație în cadrul unei game largi de sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural, inclusiv clasificarea textului. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea seturilor de date de clasificare presupun o cantitate mare de date etichetate, ceea ce de obicei nu este cazul în setările practice. În special, în această lucrare comparăm performanța unui clasificator liniar ușor bazat pe încorporări de cuvinte, adică FastText (Joulin et al., 2017), comparativ cu un model lingvistic pre-instruit, adică BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), într-o gamă largă de seturi de date și sarcini de clasificare. În general, rezultatele arată importanța datelor fără etichete specifice domeniului, atât sub forma încorporărilor de cuvinte, cât și a modelelor lingvistice. În ceea ce privește comparația, BERT depășește toate liniile de referință din seturile de date standard cu seturi mari de instruire. Cu toate acestea, în setările cu seturi mici de date de instruire, o metodă simplă, cum ar fi FastText, cuplată cu încorporări de cuvinte specifice domeniului, performează la fel de bine sau mai bine decât BERT, chiar și atunci când este pre-instruită pe date specifice domeniului.', 'sr': 'Pre-obučeni jezički modeli pružaju temelje za provedbu stanja umjetnosti u širokom nizu prirodnih zadataka za obrađivanje jezika, uključujući klasifikaciju teksta. Međutim, većin a klasifikacijskih podataka pretpostavlja veliku količinu označenih podataka, što uobičajeno nije slučaj u praktičnim nastavama. Posebno, u ovom papiru uspoređujemo učinkovitost linearnog klasifikatora lagane težin e na osnovu uključenih rečima, tj. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), protiv predobučenog jezičkog model a, tj. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), preko širokog niza seta podataka i klasifikacijskih zadataka. Generalno, rezultati pokazuju važnost podataka specifičnih domena, neobičnih podataka, kako u obliku uključenja reči ili jezičkih modela. Što se tiče usporedbe, BERT iznosi sve osnovne linije u standardnim podacima sa velikim obukom. Međutim, u postavkama sa malim podacima obuke jednostavan metod poput fastText povezan sa domena specifičnim rečima ugrađenje jednako dobro ili bolje od BERT, čak i kada su predobučeni na specifičnim podacima domena.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂාව මොඩේල් ස්ථානය- of- the- art ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කර නමුත්, ගොඩක් විශේෂණ දත්ත සෙට්ටුව ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන දත්ත, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝ විශේෂයෙන්, මේ පැත්තේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලයිට්වේජ් ලේනියාර් ක්\u200dරිසිපරීක්ෂකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වචන සංවිධානය, ඉතින්, FastText (Joule et al., 2017), versus a pre-Trained language Model, i.e.,  සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා, BERT ලොකු ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණික දත්ත සේට් වල සියළුම ප්\u200dරමාණික ලේඛණ ප්\u200dරම නමුත්, පුංචි ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා දත්ත සඳහා සැකසුම් වලින් FastText වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් සම්බන්ධ විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරනවා BERT වඩ', 'so': 'Tusaalada afka hore oo la tababaray waxaa laga bixiyaa aasaasyo u ah sameynta farshaxanta dowladda iyo shaqooyin kala duduwan oo kala duduwan oo luqada dabiiciga ah, kuwaas oo ku jira fasaxa qoraalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tirada takhasusku waxay leeyihiin macluumaad aad u badan oo la qoray, taas oo caadiga ah ma aha xaalada lagu qorayo xarumaha tababarka. Si gaar ah, warqadan waxaynu isbarbardhignaa muuqashada qoraal-liner oo ku saleysan hadal embeddings, tusaale ahaan fast Text (Joulin et al., 2017), oo ka gees ah model afka hore oo la baray, tusaale ahaan BERT (Devlin et, 2019) oo ka mid ah shaqooyin badan oo macluumaad kala duduwan iyo fasax. Inta guud, resultiyada waxaa tusiya muhiimka macluumaadka gaarka ah ee domain ee aan la aqoon karin, taas oo ah qaabka hadalka ku soo bandhig ama tusaale ahaan luuqada. Isbarbardhigga, BERT wuxuu ka bixinayaa dhammaan aasaasiga ah oo ka mid ah kaararka databaseyaasha oo ku qoran koorasyada waxbarashada oo waaweyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka loo sameeyo macluumaadka waxbarashada yar, waxaa loo sameeyaa qaab fudud sida fast Text oo la xiriiray domain-specific word embeddings si siman ama ka fiican BERT, xataa marka laga hormarin karo macluumaad gaar ah ee domain-specific.', 'sv': 'Förutbildade språkmodeller utgör grunden för toppmodern prestanda inom ett brett spektrum av naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter, inklusive textklassificering. De flesta klassificeringsdatauppsättningar förutsätter dock en stor mängd märkta data, vilket vanligtvis inte är fallet i praktiska inställningar. I den här uppsatsen jämför vi prestandan hos en lättvikts linjär klassificerare baserad på ordinbäddningar, dvs. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), jämfört med en färdigutbildad språkmodell, dvs. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), över ett brett spektrum av datauppsättningar och klassificeringsuppgifter. Generellt visar resultaten vikten av domänspecifika omärkta data, både i form av ordinbäddningar eller språkmodeller. När det gäller jämförelsen överträffar BERT alla baslinjer i standarddatauppsättningar med stora träningsuppsättningar. Men i inställningar med små utbildningsdatauppsättningar fungerar en enkel metod som fastText tillsammans med domänspecifika ordinbäddningar lika bra eller bättre än BERT, även om den är färdigutbildad på domänspecifika data.', 'ta': 'முன்பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகள் உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் சொல்லும் வித்தியாசமான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளுக்கான அடித்தளம் ஆனால், பெரும்பாலான வகைப்படுத்தல் தரவுத்தளங்கள் செயல்பாட்டு அமைப்புகளில் உள்ள மிகப்பெரிய அளவு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தக குறிப்பிட்ட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் அடிப்படையில் ஒளி எடை வரி வகுப்பாளரின் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், அதாவது, fast Text (Joulin et al., 2017), முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியில பொதுவாக, முடிவுகள் டோமைன்- குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிடாத தரவின் முக்கியம், வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கும் அல்லது மொழி மாதிரி As for the comparison, BERT outperforms all baselines in standard datasets with large training sets.  ஆனால், சிறிய பயிற்சி தரவுகளுடன் உள்ள அமைப்புகளில், fast Text போன்ற ஒரு சுலபமான முறைமையை அமைக்கிறது, டோமைன்- குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தை உடையுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள', 'ur': 'اس سے پہلے ترسین کی زبان نمڈلوں نے ایک طرح طرح طرح کی زبان پردازی کے کاموں میں متن کلاسیفوں کے شامل ایک طرح کی استعمال کی بنیاد دی ہے. However, most classification data sets assume a large amount labeled data, which is usually not the case in practical settings. مخصوصا، اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ہلکا وزن لینیاری کلاسیر کے عملکرد کو تفریح دیتے ہیں، یعنی فاسٹ ٹیکسٹ (Joulin et al., 2017) اور ایک پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل، یعنی BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), ایک گھیرے ڈیٹ سٹ اور کلاسیفون کے کاموں میں۔ عمومی طور پر، نتیجے ڈومین کے مطابق غیر پڑھے ہوئے ڈاٹے کا اہم دکھاتے ہیں، دونوں کلمات ابڈینگ یا زبان مدل کی شکل میں۔ مقایسہ کے مطابق، BERT نے استاندارڈ ڈاٹ سٹ میں تمام بنسس لینوں کو بہت بڑے ترینس سٹ کے ساتھ انجام دیتا ہے. However, in settings with small training datasets a simple method like fastText combined with domain-specific word embeddings equally well or better performs BERT, even when pre-trained on domain-specific data.', 'uz': "Oldingi taʼminlovchi tillar modellari matn klassifisi bilan bir necha xil tilni boshqarish vazifalari uchun asosiy asoslarini yaratadi. Ammo, ko'pchilik darajalashtirish maʼlumotlari juda katta belgilangan maʼlumot bor. Bu oddiy foydalanuvchi moslamalarda emas. Hullas, bu hujjatda biz bir necha tarkibi maʼlumot tizimlari va klassifik vazifalari bilan bir qanchalik ko'plab boshlanadigan soʻzning (Joulin et, 2017) asosida, fast Text (Joulin et, al., 2017) bilan birinchi o'rganilgan tillar modeliga (BERT (Devlin et, 2019). Umumiy, natijalar domen- specific notoʻgʻri maʼlumotning muhimligini koʻrsatish mumkin, soʻz ichidagi yoki tillar modellarida. As for the comparison, BERT outperforms all baselines in standard datasets with large training sets.  Lekin, kichkina taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar maʼlumoti bilan moslash uchun oddiy usulni koʻrsatish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Những mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo đã tạo ra nền tảng cho những thành tựu hiện đại trong nhiều nhiệm vụ xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, gồm cả phân loại văn bản. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các tập tin phân loại cho rằng một lượng lớn các dữ liệu được đánh dấu, thường không phải như trong thiết lập thực tế. Đặc biệt, trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi so sánh hiệu quả của một phân loại đường trọng lượng nhẹ dựa trên sự nhúng vào từ, tức là cấu hình nhanh (Joulin et al., tê 7), với một mô hình ngôn ngữ được rèn luyện trước, gọi là BERT (Devlin et., 209) trong một loạt các công việc phân loại dữ liệu và phân loại rộng. Thông thường, kết quả cho thấy tầm quan trọng của dữ liệu chưa được tải bởi miền, cả bằng cách nhập từ hay các mô hình ngôn ngữ. Thí dụ như so sánh, BERT hoàn thành tất cả các đường hầm trong bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn với các tập tin lớn. Tuy nhiên, trong các thiết lập với các dữ liệu tập tin nhỏ một phương pháp đơn giản như cấu hình chữ nhanh kết hợp với những từ được nhúng trong miền cũng tốt hay tốt hơn BERT, thậm chí khi được đào tạo trước trên dữ liệu đặc trưng miền.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените езикови модели осигуряват основите за най-съвременно изпълнение в широк спектър от задачи по обработка на естествения език, включително класификация на текста. Въпреки това, повечето класификационни набори от данни приемат голямо количество етикетирани данни, което обикновено не е така в практически условия. По-специално, в тази статия сравняваме ефективността на линеен класификатор с лека тежест, базиран на вграждане на думи, т.е. бърз текст (Джулин и др., 2017), спрямо предварително обучен езиков модел, т.е. в широк спектър от набори от данни и задачи за класификация. Като цяло резултатите показват значението на специфичните за домейна немаркирани данни, както под формата на вграждане на думи, така и на езикови модели. Що се отнася до сравнението, BERT надминава всички базови линии в стандартните набори от данни с големи набори от обучение. Въпреки това, в настройки с малки набори от данни за обучение един прост метод като съчетан с вграждания на думи, специфични за домейн, работи еднакво добре или по-добре от BERT, дори когато предварително е обучен за специфични за домейн данни.', 'da': 'Forududdannede sprogmodeller danner grundlaget for avanceret ydeevne på tværs af en lang række naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver, herunder tekstklassifikation. De fleste klassificeringsdatasæt antager imidlertid en stor mængde mærkede data, hvilket normalt ikke er tilfældet i praktiske indstillinger. Især i denne artikel sammenligner vi ydeevnen af en letvægts lineær klassifikation baseret på ordindlejringer, dvs. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), i forhold til en prætrænet sprogmodel, dvs. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), på tværs af en bred vifte af datasæt og klassifikationsopgaver. Generelt viser resultaterne vigtigheden af domænespecifikke ikke-mærkede data, både i form af ordindlejringer eller sprogmodeller. Med hensyn til sammenligningen overgår BERT alle basislinjer i standarddatasæt med store træningssæt. Men i indstillinger med små træningsdatasæt fungerer en enkel metode som fastText kombineret med domænespecifikke ordindlejringer lige så godt eller bedre end BERT, selv når den er forududdannet i domænespecifikke data.', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide taalmodellen bieden de basis voor state-of-the-art prestaties voor een breed scala aan verwerkingstaken van natuurlijke talen, waaronder tekstclassificatie. De meeste classificatiedatasets veronderstellen echter een grote hoeveelheid gelabelde gegevens, wat meestal niet het geval is in praktische instellingen. In dit artikel vergelijken we met name de prestaties van een lichtgewicht lineaire classificator op basis van woord embeddings, dat wil zeggen fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), versus een vooraf getraind taalmodel, dat wil zeggen BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), voor een breed scala aan datasets en classificatietaken. Over het algemeen tonen de resultaten het belang aan van domeinspecifieke gegevens zonder label, zowel in de vorm van woordinsluitingen als taalmodellen. Wat de vergelijking betreft, BERT overtreft alle baselines in standaard datasets met grote trainingssets. Echter, in instellingen met kleine trainingsdatasets presteert een eenvoudige methode zoals fastText in combinatie met domeinspecifieke woordinsluitingen even goed of beter dan BERT, zelfs wanneer vooraf getraind op domeinspecifieke gegevens.', 'hr': 'Preobučeni jezički modeli pružaju temelje za učinkovitost stanja umjetnosti u širokom nizu zadataka prirodnog obrazovanja jezika, uključujući klasifikaciju teksta. Međutim, većin a podataka klasifikacije preduzimaju veliku količinu označenih podataka, što uobičajeno nije slučaj u praktičnim nastavama. Posebno, u ovom papiru uspoređujemo učinkovitost linearnog klasifikatora lagane težin e na temelju uključenih riječima, tj. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), protiv predobučenog jezičkog model a, tj. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), preko širokog niza podataka i klasifikacijskih zadataka. Generalno, rezultati pokazuju važnost podataka specifičnih domena, neobičnih podataka, kako u obliku uključenja riječi ili jezičkih modela. Što se tiče usporedbe, BERT iznosi sve osnovne linije u standardnim podacima s velikim obukom. Međutim, u postavkama s malim podacima obuke jednostavan metod poput fastText povezan s domena specifičnim riječima ugrađenjem jednako dobro ili boljim od BERT-a, čak i kada su predobučeni na podacima specifičnih domena.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Sprachmodelle bilden die Grundlage für eine Vielzahl natürlicher Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben, einschließlich der Textklassifizierung. Die meisten Klassifizierungsdatensätze setzen jedoch eine große Menge beschrifteter Daten voraus, was in praktischen Einstellungen normalerweise nicht der Fall ist. Insbesondere vergleichen wir in diesem Beitrag die Leistung eines leichten linearen Klassifikators basierend auf Wort-Einbettungen, d.h. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), mit einem vortrainierten Sprachmodell, d.h. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), über ein breites Spektrum von Datensätzen und Klassifizierungsaufgaben. Generell zeigen die Ergebnisse die Bedeutung domänenspezifischer, nicht beschrifteter Daten, sowohl in Form von Worteinbettungen als auch Sprachmodellen. Beim Vergleich übertrifft BERT alle Baselines in Standarddatensätzen mit großen Trainingssätzen. In Settings mit kleinen Trainingsdatensätzen funktioniert eine einfache Methode wie fastText in Verbindung mit domänenspezifischen Worteinbettungen jedoch genauso gut oder besser als BERT, selbst wenn sie auf domänenspezifischen Daten vortrainiert wurde.', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모델은 각종 자연 언어 처리 임무(텍스트 분류 포함)의 최신 성능에 기반을 다졌다.그러나 대부분의 분류 데이터 집합은 대량의 표기 데이터가 있다고 가정하는데 이것은 실제 환경에서 보통 그렇지 않다.특히 본고에서 우리는 단어에 삽입된 경형 선형 분류기의 성능, 즉fastText(Joulin et al., 2017), 사전 훈련된 언어 모델, 즉 BERT(Devlin et al., 2019)와 광범위한 데이터 집합과 분류 임무에서의 성능을 비교했다.전반적으로 말하면 특정 영역에 표시되지 않은 데이터의 중요성을 나타낸다. 단어로 삽입하든 언어 모델로 삽입하든 상관없다.비교적 대형 훈련집을 갖춘 표준 데이터 집중에서 BERT는 모든 기선보다 우수하다.그러나 훈련 데이터 집합이 비교적 작은 상황에서fastText와 같은 간단한 방법에 특정된 영역의 단어를 삽입하면 특정한 영역의 데이터를 미리 훈련할 때도 BERT와 마찬가지로 표현이 좋거나 좋다.', 'id': 'Model bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya menyediakan dasar untuk prestasi state-of-the-art melalui jangkauan lebar dari tugas proses bahasa alam, termasuk klasifikasi teks. Namun, kebanyakan set data klasifikasi menganggap jumlah besar data yang ditabel, yang biasanya tidak terjadi dalam pengaturan praktis. Terutama, dalam kertas in i kita membandingkan prestasi dari klasifikasi linear berat ringan berdasarkan pembangunan kata, i.e., FasText (Joulin et al., 2017), dibandingkan model bahasa yang terlatih, i.e., BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), melalui jangkauan lebar dari set data dan tugas klasifikasi. Secara umum, hasil menunjukkan penting dari data tidak berlebihan spesifik domain, keduanya dalam bentuk penyampilan kata atau model bahasa. Bagi perbandingan, BERT melampaui semua garis dasar dalam set data standar dengan set latihan besar. Namun, dalam pengaturan dengan dataset pelatihan kecil metode sederhana seperti FasTex ditambah dengan penerbangan kata spesifik domain berhasil sama baik atau lebih baik dari BERT, bahkan ketika dilatih-dilatih pada data spesifik domain.', 'fa': 'مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی برای انجام وضعیت هنری در یک مجموعه از کار های پرداخت زبان طبیعی، شامل classification متن، بنیادی را می\u200cدهد. ولی بیشتر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختصری یک مقدار بزرگی با برچسب یافته می\u200cگیرند که معمولاً این مورد در تنظیمات عملی نیست. مخصوصاً در این کاغذ عملکرد یک گروهی خط\u200cشناسی سبک بر اساس کلمه\u200cهای ابتدایی، یعنی fastText (Joulin et al., 2017) را نسبت به یک مدل زبان پیش آموزش داده شده، یعنی BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) در مجموعه\u200cای از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و کارهای گروه\u200cشناسی مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. در general, نتیجه\u200cها اهمیت داده\u200cهای غیر قابل نوشته شده\u200cای را نشان می\u200cدهند، هر دو در شکل ابتدایی کلمه یا مدل زبان. در مورد مقایسه، BERT تمام خطوط پایین\u200cهای استاندارد را با مجموعه\u200cهای آموزش بزرگ انجام می\u200cدهد. با این حال، در تنظیمات با داده های آموزش کوچک یک روش ساده مانند FastText که با جمع کردن کلمه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای به دامنه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای به طور درست یا بهتر از BERT انجام می\u200cدهد، حتی وقتی پیش از آموزش داده\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای به دامنه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای', 'sw': 'Mradi wa lugha zilizofundishwa kabla hutoa msingi wa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa katika kazi mbalimbali za utaratibu wa lugha za asili, ikiwa ni pamoja na usambazaji wa maandishi. Hata hivyo, seti nyingi za taarifa za usambazaji zinadhani kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa zinazoonyesha, ambazo kwa kawaida sio kesi katika mazingira ya kihalisi. Katika karatasi hii tunalinganisha ufanisi wa mwangaza wa mstari wa mwanga unaofanana na maneno, yaani fast Text (Joulin et al., 2017), kinyume na model i ya lugha iliyoendeshwa kabla, yaani BERT (Devlin et, 2019), katika maeneo mengi ya vituo vya taarifa na kazi za usambazaji. Kwa ujumla, matokeo yanaonyesha umuhimu wa taarifa za ndani ambazo hazijitambuliwa, hata kwa namna ya maneno yanayofungwa au mifano ya lugha. Kuhusu kulinganisha, BERT anafanya misingi yote katika seti za data za standard yenye seti kubwa za mafunzo. Hata hivyo, katika mazingira ya taarifa ndogo ya mafunzo inatengeneza njia rahisi kama vile mfumo wa fast Text unaohusishwa na maneno maalum ya ndani yanafanya vizuri au vizuri zaidi ya BERT, hata pale ambapo mafunzo ya awali kwenye taarifa maalum za ndani.', 'af': "Vorige opgelei taal modele verskaf die fondamente vir state-of-the-art prestasie oor 'n wyse reek van natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte, insluitend teks klassifikasie. Maar, mees klassifikasie datastelle aanvaar 'n groot hoeveelheid gemerkte data, wat is gewoonlik nie die geval in praktiese instellings nie. In hierdie papier vergelyk ons die prestasie van 'n liggewig lineêre klassifiseerder gebaseer op woorde inbêring, t.d., fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), teenoor 'n vooraf-opgelei taal model, t.d., BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), deur 'n wyde reek datastelle en klassifiseerde taak. Algemeen, die resultate vertoon die belangrikheid van domein-spesifieke ongeabelde data, beide in die vorm van woord inbêring of taal modele. Soos vir die vergelyking, BERT uitvoer alle basisline in standaard datastelle met groot onderwerking stelle. Maar in instellings met klein onderwerking datastel is 'n eenvoudige metode soos fastText gekoppel met domein-spesifieke woord inbêdings gelyk of beter as BERT, selfs wanneer voor-onderwerp op domein-spesifieke data.", 'sq': 'Modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhës ofrojnë themelet për shfaqjen më të lartë në një gamë të gjerë detyrash natyrore të përpunimit të gjuhës, duke përfshirë klasifikimin e tekstit. Megjithatë, shumica e të dhënave klasifikuese marrin një sasi të madhe të dhënash të etiketuara, e cila zakonisht nuk është rasti në rregullime praktike. Në veçanti, në këtë letër ne krahasojmë performancën e një klasifikuesi linear me peshë të lehtë bazuar në përfshirjet e fjalëve, pra, fast Text (Joulin et al., 2017), në krahasim me një model gjuhësh të paratrajnuar, pra, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), në një gamë të gjerë të të dhënave dhe detyrave klasifikuese. Në përgjithësi, rezultatet tregojnë rëndësinë e të dhënave pa etiketë specifike për domenin, si në form ën e përfshirjes së fjalëve apo modeleve gjuhësore. Sa për krahasimin, BERT kryen të gjitha linjat bazë në grupet standarde të të dhënave me grupe të mëdha trajnimi. However, in settings with small training datasets a simple method like fastText coupled with domain-specific word embeddings performs equally well or better than BERT, even when pre-trained on domain-specific data.', 'tr': "Öňki bilinmeli dil nusgalary tebigy diller işlemek üçin esasy taýýarlamak üçin esasy berer. Ýöne, iň köp sanlaşdyrma maglumaty etitlenýän maglumaty kabul edip bilýär. Bu iş pratik düzümlerde kiçi/beýik harpa eserden däl. Adatça, bu kagyzda çyzgyly çyzgylyň klasifikatyny sözleriň girişinde daýanýar, i ň. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), öňünden öňünden e ğlenen dil nusgasyna görýäris, oň. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), söz düzümleriniň we klasifikasyň netijesinde görýäris. Umumy bolsa, netijeler sözleri we dil nusgalarynyň şeklinde, domenýä takyklanmaýan maglumatyň wajyplygyny görkezýär. Döwletlere görä, BERT standart veri setirlerinde bütin okuwçylyk bilen ähli baseçinleri çykar. Ýöne, kiçi okuwçy maglumatlary bilen düzümlerde FastText ýaly bir sistem modi, domen has spesifik sözleri bilen birleştirilýär. BERT'den gowy ýa-da gowy işleýär, hem domen has spesifik maglumatlarynda öň-okuwçy bolsa hem.", 'am': 'በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች የሥርዓት-የ-የቋንቋ ሥርዓት መሠረትን እና ጽሑፍ መግለጫ እና በተለየ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ሥርዓቶችን ለማድረግ መሠረት ይሰጣቸዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን አብዛኛዎቹ የክፍል ዳታ ማተሚያዎች ብዛት የጽሑፍ ዳታዎችን ያስተካክሉታል፡፡ በተለይም፣ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የብርሃን ሚዛን ክፍለ አካባቢ፣ የጾም ጽሑፍ (ዮulin et al., 2017) በተለየ በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋ ሞዴል፣ ብኤርT (Devlin et, 2019) በተለየ ብዙዎች የዳታ መስመር እና በተለያዩ ስራዎችን እና ትክክል ነው፡፡ በጠቅላላ ውጤቶች፣ የዶሜን-አካባቢ ያልታወቀ ዳታዎችን በአካባቢ ወይም በቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማሳየት ውስደትን ያሳያል፡፡ በአስተያየት፣ BERT የድምፅ መደበኛ ዳታዎችን በመስመር ላይ ትልቅ ትምህርት መስመር ይደረጋል፡፡ However, in settings with small training datasets a simple method like fastText coupled with domain-specific word embeddings performs equally well or better than BERT, even when pre-trained on domain-specific data.', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները տալիս են հիմքեր լավագույն արդյունքների համար բնական լեզվի վերամշակումների լայն տարբերակում, ներառյալ տեքստի դասակարգման: Այնուամենայնիվ, դասակարգման տվյալների համակարգերի մեծ մասը ենթադրում է մեծ քանակությամբ պիտակուցված տվյալներ, ինչը սովորաբար ոչ թե գործնական միջոցներում: Հատկապես, այս թղթի մեջ մենք համեմատում ենք թեթև կշիռ գծային դասակարգչի արտադրությունը, որը հիմնված է բառերի ներդրման վրա, այսինքն՝ արագ տեքստի (Joinin et al., 2017), համեմատությամբ նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի, այսինքն BER (Devin et al., 2019), տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի և դասակարգման խնդիրն In general, results show the importance of domain-specific unlabeled data, both in the form of word embeddings or language models.  Ինչ վերաբերում է համեմատության դեպքում, BER-ը գերազանցում է բոլոր հիմնական գծերը ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերում, որոնք ունեն մեծ մարզիչ համակարգեր: Այնուամենայնիվ, փոքր ուսումնասիրության տվյալների համակարգերում պարզ մեթոդը, ինչպիսին է «արագ տեքստը» և «վայրի կոնկրետ» բառերի ներգրավումները, նույնքան լավ կամ ավելի լավ է աշխատում, քան «BER»-ը, նույնիսկ երբ նախկինում ուսումնասիրում են վա', 'az': '∆Źvv…ôlc…ô t…ôhsil edilmiŇü dil modell…ôri t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ô iŇül…ôrinin √ßoxlu s…ôviyy…ôsind…ô t…ôbi…ôtli t…ôhsil iŇül…ôm…ô iŇül…ôrind…ô, m…ôtn klasifikasyonu d…ô dahil ed…ôrl…ôr. Lakin √ßox klasifikasiya veril…ôn qurńüularńĪ b√∂y√ľk d…ôyiŇüik etiketli veril…ôn m…ôlumatlarńĪ q…ôbul edir, ki bu √ßox olaraq praktik qurńüularda deyil. √Ėzellikle, bu kańüńĪzda, s√∂zl…ôrin i √ß…ôrisind…ô daxil edilm…ôsi v…ô klasifikasyon iŇül…ôri il…ô √ßox geniŇü d…ôyiŇüiklik t…ôhsil edilmiŇü dil model in in, yani BERT (Devlin et al., 2019). Genel olaraq, sonu√ßlar domain-specific m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ômiŇü m…ôlumatlarńĪn m√ľnasib…ôtini g√∂st…ôr…ôr, h…ôr ikisi d…ô s√∂zl…ôrin i√ßind…ô v…ô ya dil modell…ôrinin formasńĪnda. Q…ôrcl…ôndiril…ônd…ô, BERT standart veril…ônl…ôr qurularńĪnda b√∂y√ľk t…ôhsil qurularńĪ il…ô b√ľt√ľn temel √ß…ôtinl…ôri istifad…ô edir. Lakin, ki√ßik t…ôhsil veri quruluŇülarńĪ il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü domain-specific s√∂zl…ôri il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü fastText kimi, BERT-d…ôn daha yaxŇüńĪ v…ô ya daha yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôyir, domain-specific m…ôlumatlarńĪndan …ôvv…ôl t…ôhsil edilmiŇü olsa da.', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ, যার মধ্যে লেখা বিভাগের মধ্যে  তবে বেশীরভাগ গ্রাফিকেশন ডাটাসেট বিশাল পরিমাণ লেবেলেটের তথ্য অনুমান করে, যা ব্যবহার করা বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বৈশিষ্ট্ বিশেষ করে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে একটি হাল্কা ওজন লাইনিয়ার শ্রেণীর প্রদর্শনের তুলনা করি, যেমন ফোস্ট ট টেক্সট (জোলিন এন্ট এল, ২০১৭), পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল, যেমন সাধারণত, ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট নির্দিষ্ট তথ্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, উভয় শব্দের প্রবেশ করা  তুলনায় বিবার্ট স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ডাটাসেটের সকল বেসারেলাইন প্রদর্শন করে বিশাল ট্রেনিং সেট দিয়ে। কিন্তু ছোট ট্রেনিং ডেট্রেনিং এর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মধ্যে একটি সাধারণ পদ্ধতি নির্ধারণ করে ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট শব্দ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বিআরটির চেয়ে ভাল অথবা ভা', 'bs': 'Preobučeni jezički modeli pružaju temelje za provedbu stanja umjetnosti u širokom nizu zadataka prirodnog obrazovanja jezika, uključujući klasifikaciju teksta. Međutim, većin a klasifikacijskih podataka pretpostavlja veliku količinu označenih podataka, što uobičajeno nije slučaj u praktičnim nastavama. Posebno, u ovom papiru uspoređujemo učinkovitost linearnog klasifikatora lagane težin e na osnovu uključenih riječima, tj. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), protiv predobučenog jezičkog model a, tj. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), preko širokog niza seta podataka i klasifikacijskih zadataka. Generalno, rezultati pokazuju važnost podataka specifičnih domena, bez imenovanih podataka, kako u obliku uključenja riječi ili jezičkih modela. Što se tiče usporedbe, BERT iznosi sve osnovne linije u standardnim podacima sa velikim obukom. Međutim, u postavkama sa malim podacima obuke jednostavan metod poput fastText povezan s domena specifičnim rečima ugrađenja jednako dobro ili bolje od BERT, čak i kada su predobučeni na specifičnim podacima domena.', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatge pré-entrenats proporcionen les bases del desempeny més avançat a través d'una gran varietat de tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges, incloent la classificació de text. Però la majoria dels conjunts de dades de classificació suposen una gran quantitat de dades etiquetades, que normalment no és el cas en condicions pràctiques. En particular, en aquest paper comparem el desempeny d'un classificador linear lliure basat en incorporacions de paraules, és a dir, fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), en comparació amb un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat, és a dir, BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), a través d'una amplia gama de conjunts de dades i tasques de classificació. En general, els resultats mostren l'importància de dades no etiquetades específices per domini, tant en forma d'incorporació de paraules com de models de llenguatge. Quant a la comparació, BERT supera totes les línies de base en conjunts de dades estandards amb grans conjunts de capacitació. No obstant això, en configuracions amb petites dades d'entrenament un mètode senzill com FasTex acoplat amb incorporacions de paraules específices per domini funciona igualment bé o millor que BERT, fins i tot quan es pré-entrena en dades específices per domini.", 'cs': 'Předškolené jazykové modely poskytují základy pro nejmodernější výkon v široké škále úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka, včetně klasifikace textu. Nicméně většina klasifikačních datových sad předpokládá velké množství označených dat, což běžně není případ v praktickém nastavení. Konkrétně v tomto článku porovnáváme výkon lehkého lineárního klasifikátoru založeného na vložení slov, tj. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), s předškoleným jazykovým modelem, tj. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), v široké škále datových sad a klasifikačních úloh. Obecně platí, že výsledky ukazují význam doménově specifických neznačkovaných dat, a to jak ve formě vložení slov, tak jazykových modelů. Pokud jde o porovnání, BERT překonává všechny základní linie ve standardních datových sadách s velkými tréninkovými sadami. Nicméně v nastaveních s malými datovými sadami školení funguje jednoduchá metoda, jako je fastText spojená s vložením slov specifických pro doménu, stejně dobře nebo lépe než BERT, i když je předem trénována na údajích specifických pro doménu.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut kielimallit tarjoavat perustan nykyaikaiselle suorituskyvylle monenlaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä, mukaan lukien tekstin luokittelu. Useimmat luokitteluaineistot kuitenkin edellyttävät suurta määrää merkittyä dataa, mikä ei yleensä ole totta käytännön tilanteissa. Tässä artikkelissa vertaillaan erityisesti sanaupotuksiin perustuvan kevyen lineaarisen luokittelijan eli fastTextin (Joulin et al., 2017) suorituskykyä esikoulutettuun kielimalliin eli BERT:hen (Devlin et al., 2019) monenlaisissa tietoaineistoissa ja luokittelutehtävissä. Yleisesti ottaen tulokset osoittavat verkkotunnuskohtaisen merkitsemättömän tiedon merkityksen sekä sanaupotusten että kielimallien muodossa. Vertailun osalta BERT suoriutuu kaikista peruslinjoista tavallisissa tietosarjoissa suurilla koulutussarjoilla. Pienten harjoitustietokokonaisuuksien asetuksissa yksinkertainen menetelmä, kuten fastText yhdistettynä verkkotunnuskohtaiseen sanaupotukseen, toimii kuitenkin yhtä hyvin tai paremmin kuin BERT, vaikka se olisi esikoulutettu verkkotunnuskohtaiseen dataan.', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud keelemudelid annavad aluse tipptasemel jõudlusele paljudes looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetes, sealhulgas teksti klassifitseerimisel. Enamik klassifitseerimisandmekogumeid eeldab siiski suurt hulka märgistatud andmeid, mis tavaliselt praktilistes tingimustes nii ei ole. Eelkõige võrdleme käesolevas töös sõna manustamisel põhineva kerge lineaarse klassifikaatori, st fastText (Joulin jt., 2017) jõudlust eelõpetatud keelemudeliga, st BERT (Devlin jt., 2019), erinevate andmekogumite ja klassifitseerimisülesannetega. Üldiselt näitavad tulemused domeenipõhiste märgistamata andmete tähtsust nii sõna manustamise kui keelemudelite kujul. Võrdluse puhul on BERT suuremate koolituskomplektidega standardsete andmekogumite kõigist lähtejoontest suurem. Kuid väikeste koolitusandmekogumitega seadetes toimib lihtne meetod nagu fastText koos domeenipõhiste sõnade manustamisega võrdselt hästi või paremini kui BERT, isegi kui domeenipõhiseid andmeid on eelnevalt koolitatud.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת מאומנים מראש מספקים את הבסיסים להופעה המאודמת ברחבי מגוון רחב של משימות עיבוד שפת טבעית, כולל מסווג טקסט. בכל אופן, רוב קבוצות נתונים מסווגים לוקחים כמות גדולה של נתונים מסווגים, שזה בדרך כלל לא המקרה במסדרות מעשיות. במיוחד, בעיתון הזה אנחנו משוותים את ההופעה של מסגר לינרי קל מבוסס על מילים, כלומר FasText (Joulin et al., 2017), מול מודל שפה מאומן מראש, כלומר BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), ברחבי מגוון רחב של קבוצות נתונים ומשימות מסגרת. באופן כללי, התוצאות מראות את החשובה של נתונים לא מסויימים לתחום, גם בצורה של קיצוב מילים או דוגמני שפה. בנוגע לשוואה, BERT מבצע את כל קווי הבסיס בסטנדרטים של קבוצות נתונים בסטנדרטים עם קבוצות אימונים גדולות. בכל אופן, במסדרות עם מידע אימונים קטנים שיטה פשוטה כמו FasText מוצג עם מילים מיוחדות ספציפיות לתחום מבצעים באותה מידה טובה או טובה יותר מאשר BERT, אפילו כאשר מאומנים מראש על מידע ספציפי לתחום.', 'ha': "Modellun harshe na zaman-mai amfani da shi yana samar da asalin wa mai fassarar-sanar da ke cikin wasu aikin masu aikin aiki na fassarar harshen na asili, kamar sifilafin matsayi. Babu kasa, kowa masu tsari na fasarin ayuka sun ƙunsa da yawan 'ya'yan alama' da aka rubũta, da kuma bã da daidai ba a cikin daidaita masu yin amfani da shi. Kayyaki, cikin wannan takarda, muna samfanar aikin wani mai nau'i-nau'in linjeri mai haske a kan maganar embeddinga, misali, FasText (Joulin et al., 2017), versa wani misalin harshen da aka yi wa zaman-tunkuɗe, misali, BERT (Devlin et, 2019), kan duk wasu aikin bayani na haɗi da kuma fassarar aiki mai yawa. A jumla'a, matsalar za'a nuna muhimu wa data na Domen-ke da ba'a yi rubutu ba, duk cikin tsarin maganar da aka shigar da su ko misalin harshen. To da kula, BERT yana tafiyar da duk layin bayani cikin daidaita data na daidaita da daidaita mai girma. Amma, a cikin daidaita da data masu amfani da ƙarami, yana daidaita wata hanya mai sauƙi kamar Fast Text coubled da ɗamfyuta-specific word embeddings, mai aiki daidai ko mafi alhẽri daga BERT, kõ dã an yi fara-tun kan data na-ɗabi'a.", 'sk': 'Predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli zagotavljajo temelje za najsodobnejše delovanje v širokem naboru nalog obdelave naravnega jezika, vključno z klasifikacijo besedila. Vendar pa večina zbirk podatkov o razvrstitvi predvideva veliko količino označenih podatkov, kar v praktičnih okoliščinah običajno ni tako. Zlasti v tem prispevku primerjamo učinkovitost lahkega linearnega klasifikatorja, ki temelji na vgradnji besed, tj. fastText (Joulin et al., 2017), s predhodno usposobljenim jezikovnim modelom, tj. BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), v širokem naboru podatkov in opravil klasifikacije. Na splošno rezultati kažejo pomen neoznačenih domenskih podatkov, tako v obliki vgradnje besed kot jezikovnih modelov. Kar zadeva primerjavo, BERT presega vse osnovne linije v standardnih naborih podatkov z velikimi nabori usposabljanja. Vendar pa v nastavitvah z majhnimi nabori podatkov o usposabljanju enostavna metoda, kot je fastText skupaj z vdelavami besed za posamezno domeno, deluje enako dobro ali bolje kot BERT, tudi če je predhodno usposobljena za podatke za posamezno domeno.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness section Ere ngomong, ning paper iki kita ngerasakno nggawe barang langgar luwih-luwih basa ning kelas embedding, i.e. fast-Text In General, output show the Importance of domain-special Unlaped data, all in the format of word embedding or language modes. Tanggang nggo urjamahan, BERT iso nggawe kabeh luwih dumateng podho sing nyelehake dadi iki banget The first argument is \'round\' and \'round\' means \'round\' and \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means \'round\' means\'', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྐུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག However, most classification datasets assume a large amount labeled data, which is commonly not the case in practical settings. དམིགས་བསལ། ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་པུའི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མིང་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ། གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་ཙམ་ཡིན་པའི་domain-specific non-labeled data(data)གི་གལ་ཆ་ཉིད་ཅིག་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས། མཐའ་མཇུག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྨང་གཞིའི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་ཚད་གཞིའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་སྒྲིག However, in settings with small training datasets a simple method like fastText coupled with domain-specific word embeddings performs equally well or better than BERT, even when pre-trained on domain-specific data.'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Narrative Context and A Priori Knowledge of Categories in Textual Emotion Classification', 'ar': 'استغلال السياق السردي والمعرفة المسبقة للفئات في تصنيف العاطفة النصية', 'fr': 'Exploiter le contexte narratif et la connaissance a priori des catégories dans la classification des émotions textuelles', 'pt': 'Explorando o Contexto Narrativo e o Conhecimento A Priori de Categorias na Classificação de Emoções Textuais', 'es': 'Explotación del contexto narrativo y el conocimiento a priori de las categorías en la clasificación textual de emociones', 'ja': '文章感情分類における説明文脈とカテゴリの先行知識の活用', 'hi': 'कथा संदर्भ का शोषण करना और पाठ्य भावना वर्गीकरण में श्रेणियों का एक प्राथमिकता ज्ञान', 'ru': 'Использование нарративного контекста и априорного знания категорий в текстовой классификации эмоций', 'zh': '因叙事语境情类先验知', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Comhthéacs Inste agus Réamheolas ar Chatagóirí in Aicmiú Mothúcháin Téacsúil', 'ka': 'ტექსტუალური ემოციების კლასიფიკაციაში პრიორი კონტექსტის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A narratív kontextus kiaknázása és a kategóriák elsődleges ismerete a szöveges érzelmi osztályozásban', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση του αφηγητικού πλαισίου και της γνώσης των κατηγοριών στην ταξινόμηση των κειμένων συναισθημάτων', 'it': 'Sfruttare il contesto narrativo e una conoscenza prioritaria delle categorie nella classificazione delle emozioni testuali', 'kk': 'Мәтіндік көңіл көңіл көңіл классификациясындағы наративті контексті және алдыңғы санаттарды білу', 'mk': 'Искористувањето на приказната за контекст и претходно знаење за категориите во класификацијата на текстуалните емоции', 'lt': 'Naudoti siaurų kontekstą ir A išankstinę žinią apie kategorijas tekstinės emocijos klasifikacijoje', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Konteks Narratif dan Pengetahuan Sebelumnya Kategori dalam Klasifikasi Emosi Teks', 'ml': 'വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-isfruttar tal-Kuntest Narrattiv u Għarfien Prijori tal-Kategoriji fil-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Emożizzjoni Tekstuża', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрүүдийн анхны мэдлэг болон', 'no': 'Eksploserer narrativ kontekst og ein prioritær kjenning av kategoriar i klassifikasjon av tekstfølelser', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie kontekstu narracyjnego i znajomość kategorii Priori w klasyfikacji emocji tekstowych', 'ro': 'Exploatarea contextului narativ și cunoașterea prioritară a categoriilor în clasificarea emoțiilor textuale', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući Narrativni kontekst i Priorni znanje kategorija u klasifikaciji tekstualnih emocija', 'so': 'Qorrarrative Content and A Priori Knowledge of Categories in Textual Emotion Classification', 'sv': 'Utnyttja berättande sammanhang och en Priori kunskap om kategorier i textmässig känsloklassificering', 'si': 'පිළිබඳ සම්බන්ධය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන දන්නවක් වර්ගයේ ප්\u200dරධාන දන්නවක්', 'ta': 'உரை உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலில் வகைகளின் முன்னிருப்பு அறிவிப்பை வெளியிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'تفصیل احساسات کلاسیفٹ میں کلاسیفٹ کے کلاسیفٹ کے کلاسیفٹ کی مخصوص کنٹکس اور ایک پہلی علم', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Phát triển hộp âm nhạc và A ưu tiên kiến về phân loại trong mật khẩu cảm xúc.', 'bg': 'Експлоатация на разказващия контекст и Приори познания за категориите в текстовата емоционална класификация', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af fortællingssammenhæng og en prioriteret viden om kategorier i tekstfølelsesklassificering', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van narratieve context en een priori kennis van categorieën in tekstuele emotionele classificatie', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući Narrativni kontekst i priorno znanje kategorija u klasifikaciji tekstualnih emocija', 'de': 'Ausnutzung von narrativem Kontext und Prioriwissen über Kategorien in der textuellen Emotionsklassifikation', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi Konteks Narratif dan A Priori Knowledge of Categories in Textual Emotion Classification', 'fa': 'انفجار محیط مصنوعی و شناختن پیشینی از گونه\u200cها در کلاس\u200cشناسی احساسات متن\u200c', 'ko': '텍스트 감정 분류에서 서사적 언어 환경과 유형별 선험 지식을 이용하다', 'sw': 'Kutumia Mazungumzo ya Kipindi na Ujuzi wa Makaguzi', 'tr': 'Narrativ Kontekst we Metin Emotifikasy Kategoriýasynyň Öňki Bilişi', 'af': "Voorskou Narratiewe Konteks en 'n Priore kennis van Kategorie in Tekstuele Emosie Klassifikasie", 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i Kontekstit Narrativ dhe njohurisë së parë të kategorive në klasifikimin e emocioneve tekstuale', 'hy': 'Տեքստյուալ զգացմունքների դասակարգում գտնվող տեսակների նախկին գիտելիքների օգտագործումը', 'az': 'Mətn Emotiyonu Sınıflaşdırılmasında Kategoriyaların əvvəlki Bilməsi', 'am': 'Categories', 'bn': 'টেক্স্টুয়াল ইমোটেশন ক্লাসিফেশনের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভাগের তথ্য প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući Narrativni kontekst i Priorni znanje kategorija u klasifikaciji tekstualnih emocija', 'cs': 'Využití narativního kontextu a priori znalosti kategorií v klasifikaci textových emocí', 'et': 'Jutustava konteksti ja kategooriateadmiste kasutamine tekstiemotsioonide klassifikatsioonis', 'ca': "Exploitar el contexte narratiu i el coneixement previ de les categories de la classificació de l'emoció textual", 'fi': 'Kertovan kontekstin hyödyntäminen ja A Priori-tietämys luokkista tekstitunneluokituksessa', 'jv': 'Ngubah ndheke Narratve Kontext lan kelas prioriti kanggo Kemerdekaan Tekst', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje pripovednega konteksta in priorskega znanja kategorij v besedilni čustveni klasifikaciji', 'he': 'ניצל קונטקסט נרטיבי ומדע קודם של קטגוריות בכיתוי רגשות טקסטאליים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཚོར་བ་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་ཐིག་ཁྲམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིས་ཚོའི་སྔོན་རིམ་སྟོན་པ།'}
{'en': 'Recognition of the mental state of a human character in text is a major challenge in natural language processing. In this study, we investigate the efficacy of the narrative context in recognizing the emotional states of human characters in text and discuss an approach to make use of a priori knowledge regarding the employed emotion category system. Specifically, we experimentally show that the accuracy of emotion classification is substantially increased by encoding the preceding context of the target sentence using a BERT-based text encoder. We also compare ways to incorporate a priori knowledge of emotion categories by altering the loss function used in training, in which our proposal of multi-task learning that jointly learns to classify positive / negative polarity of emotions is included. The experimental results suggest that, when using Plutchik’s Wheel of Emotions, it is better to jointly classify the basic emotion categories with positive / negative polarity rather than directly exploiting its characteristic structure in which eight basic categories are arranged in a wheel.', 'ar': 'يمثل التعرف على الحالة العقلية للشخصية البشرية في النص تحديًا كبيرًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الدراسة ، نحقق في فعالية السياق السردي في التعرف على الحالات العاطفية للشخصيات البشرية في النص ومناقشة نهج للاستفادة من المعرفة المسبقة فيما يتعلق بنظام فئة العاطفة المستخدم. على وجه التحديد ، أظهرنا بشكل تجريبي أن دقة تصنيف المشاعر تزداد بشكل كبير عن طريق ترميز السياق السابق للجملة المستهدفة باستخدام مشفر النص المستند إلى BERT. نقارن أيضًا طرق دمج المعرفة المسبقة لفئات المشاعر من خلال تغيير وظيفة الخسارة المستخدمة في التدريب ، حيث يتم تضمين اقتراحنا للتعلم متعدد المهام الذي يتعلم بشكل مشترك لتصنيف القطبية الإيجابية / السلبية للعواطف. تشير النتائج التجريبية إلى أنه عند استخدام عجلة العواطف في بلوتشيك ، من الأفضل تصنيف فئات المشاعر الأساسية بشكل مشترك مع قطبية إيجابية / سلبية بدلاً من استغلال هيكلها المميز مباشرة حيث يتم ترتيب ثماني فئات أساسية في عجلة.', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento do estado mental de um personagem humano no texto é um grande desafio no processamento de linguagem natural. Neste estudo, investigamos a eficácia do contexto narrativo em reconhecer os estados emocionais de personagens humanos no texto e discutimos uma abordagem para fazer uso de conhecimento a priori sobre o sistema de categorias de emoção empregado. Especificamente, mostramos experimentalmente que a precisão da classificação de emoções é substancialmente aumentada pela codificação do contexto anterior da frase alvo usando um codificador de texto baseado em BERT. Também comparamos formas de incorporar o conhecimento a priori das categorias de emoção alterando a função de perda usada no treinamento, no qual está incluída nossa proposta de aprendizado multitarefa que aprende em conjunto a classificar a polaridade positiva/negativa das emoções. Os resultados experimentais sugerem que, ao utilizar a Roda das Emoções de Plutchik, é melhor classificar conjuntamente as categorias básicas de emoção com polaridade positiva/negativa do que explorar diretamente sua estrutura característica em que oito categorias básicas estão dispostas em uma roda.', 'es': 'El reconocimiento del estado mental de un personaje humano en el texto es un desafío importante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este estudio, investigamos la eficacia del contexto narrativo para reconocer los estados emocionales de los personajes humanos en el texto y discutimos un enfoque para hacer uso del conocimiento a priori con respecto al sistema de categorías de emociones empleado. Específicamente, demostramos experimentalmente que la precisión de la clasificación de emociones aumenta sustancialmente al codificar el contexto anterior de la oración objetivo utilizando un codificador de texto basado en Bert. También comparamos formas de incorporar el conocimiento a priori de las categorías de emociones alterando la función de pérdida utilizada en el entrenamiento, en la que se incluye nuestra propuesta de aprendizaje multitarea que aprende conjuntamente a clasificar la polaridad positiva/negativa de las emociones. Los resultados experimentales sugieren que, al utilizar la Rueda de las emociones de Plutchik, es mejor clasificar conjuntamente las categorías de emociones básicas con polaridad positiva/negativa en lugar de explotar directamente su estructura característica en la que ocho categorías básicas están dispuestas en una rueda.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance de l'état mental d'un personnage humain dans un texte constitue un défi majeur dans le traitement du langage naturel. Dans cette étude, nous étudions l'efficacité du contexte narratif dans la reconnaissance des états émotionnels des personnages humains dans le texte et discutons d'une approche permettant d'utiliser les connaissances a priori concernant le système de catégories d'émotions employé. Plus précisément, nous montrons expérimentalement que la précision de la classification des émotions est considérablement accrue en codant le contexte précédent de la phrase cible à l'aide d'un encodeur de texte basé sur BERT. Nous comparons également les façons d'intégrer la connaissance a priori des catégories d'émotions en modifiant la fonction de perte utilisée dans la formation, dans laquelle notre proposition d'apprentissage multitâche qui apprend conjointement à classer la polarité positive/négative des émotions est incluse. Les résultats expérimentaux suggèrent que, lors de l'utilisation de la Roue des émotions de Plutchik, il est préférable de classer conjointement les catégories d'émotions de base avec une polarité positive/négative plutôt que d'exploiter directement sa structure caractéristique dans laquelle huit catégories de base sont disposées dans une roue.", 'zh': '知文本者,自然语言理之主也。 论叙事语境识文本,论情类别系统先验知。 具体来说以实验明,以用BERT之本编码器以招句之上下文,以类之准确性大大提高。 又校其损益函数以整合情类先验知之方,建多任务学之议,当学共学/极极性类。 实验结果表明用Plutchik之情轮,莫若以正/负极性之情类合类,而不因其特征结构,其八本在一轮中。', 'ja': 'テキストにおける人間の性格の精神状態の認識は、自然言語処理における大きな課題である。 この研究では、テキスト内の人間のキャラクターの感情状態を認識する際の物語的文脈の有効性を調査し、採用されている感情カテゴリシステムに関する事前知識を利用するためのアプローチについて説明します。 具体的には、ＢＥＲＴベースのテキストエンコーダを使用してターゲット文の先行するコンテキストをエンコードすることによって、感情分類の精度が実質的に増加することを実験的に示す。 また、トレーニングで使用される損失関数を変更することによって、感情カテゴリの事前知識を組み込む方法を比較します。そこには、感情の正/負の極性を分類することを共同で学習するマルチタスク学習の提案が含まれています。 実験結果は、PlutchikのWheel of Emotionsを使用する場合、8つの基本的なカテゴリがホイールに配置されているその特徴的な構造を直接利用するよりも、プラス/マイナスの極性を持つ基本的な感情カテゴリを共同で分類する方が良いことを示唆している。', 'hi': 'पाठ में मानव चरित्र की मानसिक स्थिति की पहचान प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक बड़ी चुनौती है। इस अध्ययन में, हम पाठ में मानव पात्रों की भावनात्मक स्थितियों को पहचानने में कथा संदर्भ की प्रभावकारिता की जांच करते हैं और नियोजित भावना श्रेणी प्रणाली के बारे में एक प्राथमिकता ज्ञान का उपयोग करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण पर चर्चा करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम प्रयोगात्मक रूप से दिखाते हैं कि भावना वर्गीकरण की सटीकता एक BERT-आधारित पाठ एन्कोडर का उपयोग करके लक्ष्य वाक्य के पूर्ववर्ती संदर्भ को एन्कोडिंग करके काफी हद तक बढ़ जाती है। हम प्रशिक्षण में उपयोग किए जाने वाले हानि समारोह को बदलकर भावना श्रेणियों के प्राथमिक ज्ञान को शामिल करने के तरीकों की भी तुलना करते हैं, जिसमें बहु-कार्य सीखने का हमारा प्रस्ताव जो संयुक्त रूप से भावनाओं की सकारात्मक / नकारात्मक ध्रुवीयता को वर्गीकृत करना सीखता है, शामिल है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि, प्लूचिक के व्हील ऑफ इमोशंस का उपयोग करते समय, इसकी विशेषता संरचना का सीधे शोषण करने के बजाय सकारात्मक / नकारात्मक ध्रुवीयता के साथ मूल भावना श्रेणियों को संयुक्त रूप से वर्गीकृत करना बेहतर होता है जिसमें आठ बुनियादी श्रेणियों को एक पहिया में व्यवस्थित किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Распознавание психического состояния человеческого характера в тексте является серьезной проблемой в обработке естественного языка. В этом исследовании мы исследуем эффективность нарративного контекста в распознавании эмоциональных состояний человеческих персонажей в тексте и обсуждаем подход к использованию априорных знаний относительно используемой системы категорий эмоций. В частности, мы экспериментально показываем, что точность классификации эмоций существенно повышается за счет кодирования предыдущего контекста целевого предложения с помощью текстового кодировщика на основе BERT. Мы также сравниваем способы включения априорных знаний о категориях эмоций путем изменения функции потерь, используемой в обучении, в которое включено наше предложение о многозадачном обучении, которое совместно учится классифицировать положительную/отрицательную полярность эмоций. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что при использовании «Колеса эмоций» Плутчика лучше совместно классифицировать основные категории эмоций с положительной/отрицательной полярностью, чем непосредственно использовать его характерную структуру, в которой восемь основных категорий расположены в колесе.', 'ga': 'Is dúshlán mór i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha é staid mheabhrach carachtar daonna a aithint i dtéacs. Sa staidéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar éifeachtúlacht an chomhthéacs insinte maidir le staid mhothúchánach carachtair dhaonna a aithint i dtéacs agus pléimid cur chuige chun úsáid a bhaint as eolas a priori maidir leis an gcóras catagóirí mothúchán fostaithe. Go sonrach, léirímid go turgnamhach go méadaítear cruinneas an aicmithe mothúcháin go suntasach trí chomhthéacs na sprice roimhe seo a ionchódú ag baint úsáide as ionchódóir téacs bunaithe ar BERT. Déanaimid comparáid freisin ar bhealaí chun eolas priori ar chatagóirí mothúcháin a ionchorprú tríd an bhfeidhm chaillteanais a úsáidtear san oiliúint a athrú, ina gcuimsítear ár moladh d’fhoghlaim ilthasc a fhoghlaimíonn le chéile chun polaraíocht mhothúcháin dearfach/diúltach a rangú. Tugann na torthaí turgnamhacha le fios, nuair a bhíonn Roth Mothúcháin Plutchik in úsáid, is fearr na bunchatagóirí mothúcháin a chomhaicmiú le polaraíocht dhearfach/dhiúltach seachas leas a bhaint as a struchtúr sainiúil ina bhfuil ocht gcatagóir bhunúsacha eagraithe i roth.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση της ψυχικής κατάστασης ενός ανθρώπινου χαρακτήρα στο κείμενο αποτελεί σημαντική πρόκληση στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, διερευνούμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του αφηγηματικού πλαισίου στην αναγνώριση των συναισθηματικών καταστάσεων των ανθρώπινων χαρακτήρων στο κείμενο και συζητάμε μια προσέγγιση αξιοποίησης εκ των προτέρων γνώσεων σχετικά με το χρησιμοποιούμενο σύστημα κατηγοριών συναισθημάτων. Συγκεκριμένα, πειραματικά αποδεικνύουμε ότι η ακρίβεια της ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων αυξάνεται σημαντικά με την κωδικοποίηση του προηγούμενου πλαισίου της πρότασης στόχου χρησιμοποιώντας έναν κωδικοποιητή κειμένου βασισμένο στο BERT. Συγκρίνουμε επίσης τρόπους ενσωμάτωσης εκ των προτέρων γνώσης των κατηγοριών συναισθημάτων αλλάζοντας τη λειτουργία απώλειας που χρησιμοποιείται στην εκπαίδευση, στην οποία περιλαμβάνεται η πρότασή μας για εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών που μαθαίνει από κοινού να ταξινομεί θετική/αρνητική πολικότητα συναισθημάτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι, όταν χρησιμοποιείτε τον Τροχό Συναισθημάτων του Πλούτσικ, είναι καλύτερα να ταξινομήσετε από κοινού τις βασικές κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων με θετική/αρνητική πολικότητα παρά να εκμεταλλευτείτε άμεσα τη χαρακτηριστική δομή του, στην οποία οκτώ βασικές κατηγορίες είναι τοποθετημένες σε έναν τροχό.', 'hu': 'Az emberi jellem mentális állapotának felismerése a szövegben nagy kihívást jelent a természetes nyelvfeldolgozásban. Jelen tanulmányban a narratív kontextus hatékonyságát vizsgáljuk az emberi karakterek érzelmi állapotának felismerésében a szövegben, és megvitatjuk az alkalmazott érzelmi kategória rendszerrel kapcsolatos a priori ismeretek felhasználására irányuló megközelítést. Kísérletileg azt mutatjuk, hogy az érzelmi osztályozás pontossága jelentősen növekszik, ha a célmondat előző kontextusát BERT alapú szövegkódoló segítségével kódoljuk. Összehasonlítjuk továbbá az érzelmi kategóriák a priori ismeretének beépítését az edzésben használt veszteségfunkció megváltoztatásával, amelyben az érzelmek pozitív/negatív polaritásának együttes osztályozására irányuló többfeladatos tanulási javaslatunk is szerepel. A kísérleti eredmények azt sugallják, hogy Plutchik Érzelmek Kereke használatakor jobb együttesen osztályozni az alapvető érzelmi kategóriákat pozitív/negatív polaritással, ahelyett, hogy közvetlenül kihasználnák annak jellegzetes struktúráját, amelyben nyolc alapkategória van elrendezve egy kerékben.', 'ka': 'ტექსტში ადამიანის სიცოცხლის მენტალური სიცოცხლის განაცნობა უფრო დიდი გამოცნობა, რომელიც თავისუფალური ენის პროცესიაში. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ სიტყვის კონტექსტის ეფექტიურობას ტექსტში ადამიანის ადამიანის ემოციონალური ღირებების და განსხვავებთ პროგრამის გამოყენება პროგრამის მეცნიერებას, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტიურად გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციის წესიერება ძალიან უფრო მეტია, რომელიც კოდირებით უფრო მეტია მიზეზეზი სიტყვების წინ ჩვენ ასევე შემწყვებით გზები, რომელიც ამოცანების პროგორია კოტეგორიების მეცნიერებაში გამოიყენებული ფუნქციის შეცვლა, რომელიც ჩვენი მრავალური დავასწავლების პროგორიცია, რომელიც ერთადერთად ვისწავლის ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები იტყვებს, რომ, როცა Plutchik-ის ემოციების კვალის გამოყენება, უფრო უკეთესია ერთადერთად კლასიფიკაცია ფოსტიური ემოციების კატეგორია პოსტიური/negatifური პოლარიტით, მაგრამ მისი პროგ', 'it': "Il riconoscimento dello stato mentale di un personaggio umano nel testo è una grande sfida nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. In questo studio, si indaga l'efficacia del contesto narrativo nel riconoscere gli stati emotivi dei personaggi umani nel testo e si discute di un approccio per fare uso di conoscenze a priori riguardanti il sistema di categorie emotive impiegato. Nello specifico, dimostriamo sperimentalmente che l'accuratezza della classificazione emotiva è notevolmente aumentata codificando il contesto precedente della frase target utilizzando un codificatore di testo basato su BERT. Confrontiamo anche modi per incorporare a priori la conoscenza delle categorie emotive alterando la funzione di perdita utilizzata nell'allenamento, in cui è inclusa la nostra proposta di apprendimento multi-task che impara congiuntamente a classificare la polarità positiva/negativa delle emozioni. I risultati sperimentali suggeriscono che, utilizzando la Ruota delle Emozioni di Plutchik, è meglio classificare congiuntamente le categorie di emozioni di base con polarità positiva/negativa piuttosto che sfruttare direttamente la sua struttura caratteristica in cui otto categorie di base sono disposte in una ruota.", 'kk': 'Мәтіндегі адам таңбаның психикалық күйін анықтау - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін негізгі мәселе. Бұл зерттеулерде біз мәтіндегі адамдардың емоциялық күйін түсініп, жұмыс істеген емоциялық санаттар жүйесі туралы алдыңғы білімді қолдану үшін тәжірибесін зерттеп тұрмыз. Ескерту үшін, біз емоциялық классификациясының дұрыстығын BERT- негіздеген мәтін кодтамасын кодтамасыз арқылы алдыңғы мәтін контексті кодтамасынан көтергенін көрсетедік. Біз сондай-ақ эмоциялық санаттарын алдыңғы білім үшін көп тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін, оқыту үшін қолданылған жоғалу функциясын өзгертіп, көп тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін бірге оқыту үшін емоциялық Эксперименталдық нәтижелер Плутчик көңіл көңіл желігін қолданғанда негізгі эмоциялық санаттарын оң/ негізгі поляриялық санаттарының негізгі санаттарын біріктіру жақсы болады, сегіз негізгі санаттарында тұратын құрылымын тұрып, т', 'lt': "Žmogaus psichikos būklės pripažinimas tekste yra pagrindinis iššūkis natūralaus kalbų apdorojimo srityje. Šiame tyrime mes tiriame istorinio konteksto veiksmingumą pripažindami žmogaus charakterių emocinę būklę tekste ir aptariame metodą, kaip pasinaudoti a priori žiniomis apie naudojamą emocinės kategorijos sistemą. Konkrečiai eksperimentiškai parodome, kad emocijų klasifikacijos tikslumas gerokai padidėja koduojant ankstesnius tikslinio sakinio kontekstus naudojant BERT pagrįstą teksto kodatorių. Taip pat palyginame būdus įtraukti a priori žinias apie emocijų kategorijas keičiant mokymo metu naudojamą praradimo funkciją, į kurią įtrauktas mūsų pasiūlymas dėl daugiafunkcinio mokymosi, kuris kartu mokosi klasifikuoti teigiamą ir (arba) neigiamą emocijų poliarumą. The experimental results suggest that, when using Plutchik's Wheel of Emotions, it is better to jointly classify the basic emotion categories with positive/negative polarity rather than directly exploiting its characteristic structure in which eight basic categories are arranged in a wheel.", 'mk': 'Признавањето на менталната состојба на човечкиот карактер во текстот е голем предизвик во природното обработување на јазиците. Во оваа студија ја истражуваме ефикасноста на раскажувачкиот контекст во препознавањето на емоционалните состојби на човечките ликови во текстот и разговараме за пристапот за користење на претходно знаење во врска со употребениот систем на емоционални категории. Специфично, експериментално покажуваме дека точноста на емоционалната класификација е значително зголемена со кодирање на претходниот контекст на реченицата на целта користејќи текст кодер базиран на BERT. Ние, исто така, ги споредуваме начините за вклучување на претходното знаење на емоционалните категории со промена на функцијата на загуба користена во обуката, во која е вклучен нашиот предлог за мултизадачно учење кое заедно научи да класификува позитивна/негативна поларитет на емоц Експерименталните резултати укажуваат на тоа дека, кога се користи Колото на емоции на Плучик, подобро е заеднички да се класификуваат основните емоционални категории со позитивна/негативна поларитет наместо директно да се искористи нејзината карактеристичка структура во која се организираат осум', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയിലെ മനുഷ്യന്റെ മാനസിക സ്ഥിതിയെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തന ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി വിചാരിക്കുന്ന വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ വികാര്യങ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കോഡെര്\u200dഡ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വികാരത്തിന്റെ മ പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നഷ്ടത്തിന്റെ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തെ മാറ്റിവെക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പുള്ള വികാരങ്ങളുടെ അറിവുകള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് ചേര്\u200dക്കാനുള്ള വഴികള്\u200d നമ് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നത് പ്ലാച്ചിക്കിന്റെ ഹീല്\u200d ഓഫ് ഇമോട്ടിഷനുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സാധാരണ വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d നേര്\u200dച്ചയായ/നേരിവ് പോരിറ്റിയില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Recognition of the mental state of a human character in text is a major challenge in natural language processing.  F’dan l-istudju, ninvestigaw l-effikaċja tal-kuntest narrattiv fir-rikonoxximent tal-istati emozzjonali tal-karattri umani fit-test u niddiskutu approċċ biex isir użu minn għarfien a priori rigward is-sistema tal-kategorija tal-emozzjonijiet użata. B’mod speċifiku, a ħna juru b’mod sperimentali li l-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet tiżdied b’mod sostanzjali billi jiġi kkodifikat il-kuntest preċedenti tas-sentenza fil-mira bl-użu ta’ kodifikatur tat-test ibbażat fuq BERT. Aħna nqabblu wkoll modi kif inkorporaw għarfien a priori tal-kategoriji tal-emozzjonijiet billi nbidlu l-funzjoni tat-telf użata fit-taħriġ, li fiha tiġi inkluża l-proposta tagħna ta’ tagħlim multikompitu li flimkien jitgħallem jikklassifika polarità pożittiva/negattiva tal-emozzjonijiet. Ir-riżultati sperimentali jissuġġerixxu li, meta jintuża r-Rota tal-Emożjonijiet ta’ Plutchik, huwa a ħjar li b’mod konġunt jiġu kklassifikati l-kategoriji bażiċi tal-emozzjonijiet b’polarità pożittiva/negattiva minflok li tiġi sfruttata direttament l-istruttura karatteristika tagħha li fiha tmien kategoriji bażiċi huma rranġati f’rota.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan keadaan mental karakter manusia dalam teks adalah cabaran utama dalam pemprosesan bahasa alam. Dalam kajian ini, kami menyelidiki kegunaan konteks cerita dalam mengenali keadaan emosional aksara manusia dalam teks dan membincangkan pendekatan untuk menggunakan pengetahuan a priori mengenai sistem kategori emosi yang digunakan. Secara khusus, kami secara eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa ketepatan klasifikasi emosi meningkat secara mendasarkan dengan mengekodkan konteks terdahulu kalimat sasaran menggunakan pengekod teks berasaskan BERT. Kami juga membandingkan cara untuk menggabungkan pengetahuan a priori tentang kategori emosi dengan mengubah fungsi kehilangan yang digunakan dalam latihan, di mana cadangan kami untuk belajar berbilang-tugas yang bersama-sama belajar untuk mengklasifikasi polariti positif/negatif emosi termasuk. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa, apabila menggunakan Roda Emosi Plutchik, lebih baik untuk berklasifikasi bersama-sama kategori emosi asas dengan polaritas positif/negatif daripada secara langsung mengeksploitasi struktur karakteristiknya di mana lapan kategori asas diatur dalam roda.', 'mn': 'Текст дахь хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай мэдэх нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн чухал сорилт юм. Энэ судалгаанд бид хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн байдлыг таньж, ажилладаг сэтгэл хөдлөлийн системийн тухай өмнө мэдлэгийг ашиглах арга замыг ярилцдаг. Тухайлбал, бид туршилтаар сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтыг BERT-д суурилсан текст коддогч ашиглан зориулагдсан үгийг коддог байдлаар ихэвчлэн нэмэгдүүлж байна. Мөн бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн категориудын алдагдлын функцийг өөрчлөхөд урьдчилан мэдрэмжтэй холбогдох арга замыг харьцуулдаг. Энэ үед бидний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн эерэг/сөрөг сэтгэл хөдлөлийн эерэг/сөрөг зайлсхийг хи Эдгээр туршилтын үр дүнд Плутчикийн хөдөлгөөн хөдөлгөөнийг ашиглах үед үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн категориудыг эерэг/сөрөг зай байдалтай хуваалцах нь сайн байдаг гэдгийг сануулдаг.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznanie stanu psychicznego ludzkiego charakteru w tekście jest dużym wyzwaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. W niniejszym opracowaniu badamy skuteczność kontekstu narracyjnego w rozpoznawaniu stanów emocjonalnych ludzkich postaci w tekście oraz omawiamy podejście do wykorzystania a priori wiedzy dotyczącej zastosowanego systemu kategorii emocji. W szczególności eksperymentalnie pokazujemy, że dokładność klasyfikacji emocji jest znacznie zwiększona poprzez kodowanie poprzedniego kontekstu zdania docelowego za pomocą kodera tekstowego opartego na BERT. Porównujemy również sposoby włączenia a priori wiedzy o kategoriach emocji poprzez zmianę funkcji straty stosowanej w treningu, w której uwzględniona jest nasza propozycja wielozadaniowego uczenia się wspólnie klasyfikować pozytywną/negatywną polaryzację emocji. Wyniki eksperymentalne sugerują, że korzystając z Koła Emocji Plutchika, lepiej jest wspólnie klasyfikować podstawowe kategorie emocji z polaryzacją pozytywną/negatywną, niż bezpośrednio wykorzystywać jego charakterystyczną strukturę, w której osiem podstawowych kategorii są ułożone w koło.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea stării mentale a unui caracter uman în text este o provocare majoră în procesarea limbajului natural. În acest studiu, investigăm eficacitatea contextului narativ în recunoașterea stărilor emoționale ale personajelor umane în text și discutăm o abordare de utilizare a cunoștințelor a priori privind sistemul de categorii emoționale angajate. Mai exact, demonstrăm experimental că acuratețea clasificării emoțiilor este crescută substanțial prin codificarea contextului precedent al propoziției țintă folosind un codificator de text bazat pe BERT. Comparăm, de asemenea, modalitățile de a integra a priori cunoașterea categoriilor emoționale prin modificarea funcției de pierdere utilizate în antrenament, în care este inclusă propunerea noastră de învățare multi-task care învață împreună să clasifice polaritatea pozitivă/negativă a emoțiilor. Rezultatele experimentale sugerează că, atunci când utilizați Roata Emoțiilor a lui Plutchik, este mai bine să clasificați în comun categoriile emoționale de bază cu polaritate pozitivă/negativă, mai degrabă decât să exploatați direct structura sa caracteristică în care opt categorii de bază sunt aranjate într-o roată.', 'no': 'Kjenning av mentalt tilstand til ein menneskelig teikn i teksten er ein stor utfordring i naturspråkshandtering. I denne studien undersøker vi effektiviteten av den narrative konteksten i å gjenkjenna emosjonelle tilstandane til menneske teikn i tekst og diskutera ein tilnærming til å bruka ein priori kunnskap om den arbeiderte emosjonskategorisystemet. Spesielt viser vi eksperimentelt at nøyaktigheten til emosjonsklassifikasjonen er større ved å koda førre konteksten til målsettinga med ein BERT-basert tekstkoder. Vi sammenliknar også måtar å inkludere ein priori kunnskap om følelseskategoriar ved å endra tapsfunksjonen brukt i opplæring, der vår forslag om fleire oppgåver læring som kopla lærer å klassifisera positiv/negativ polaritet av følelser er inkludert. Eksperimentale resultatet tyder på at når Plutchikos hjul av emosjonar brukar, er det bedre å klassifisera grunnleggjande emosjonskategoriar med positiv/negativ polaritet i staden for å direkte bruka karakteristiske strukturen der åtte grunnleggjande kategoriar er ordna i ein hjul.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje mentalnog stanja ljudskog karaktera u tekstu je veliki izazov u procesu prirodnog jezika. U ovom studiju istražujemo efikasnost priče u priznanju emocionalnih stanja ljudskih karaktera u tekstu i razgovaramo o pristupu korištenju priorijskog znanja u vezi sustava zaposlenog kategorije emocija. Posebno, eksperimentalno pokazujemo da je preciznost klasifikacije emocija značajno povećana kodiranjem prethodnog konteksta ciljne rečenice koristeći koder teksta na osnovu BERT-a. Takođe uspoređujemo načine da uključimo priori znanje o kategorijama emocija izmjenom funkcije gubitka koja se koristi u obuci, u kojoj se uključuje naš prijedlog multizadatačkog učenja koji zajedno uči da klasifikuje pozitivnu/negativnu polarnost emocija. Eksperimentalni rezultati ukazuju na to da je bolje zajedno klasifikirati osnovne kategorije emocija s a pozitivnom/negativnom polarnošću, a ne direktno iskoristiti svoju karakterističnu strukturu u kojoj se osam osnovnih kategorija organizuju u to čku.', 'so': "Recognition of the mental state of a human character in text is a major challenge in natural language processing.  Waxbarashadan, waxaynu baaraynaa faa’iidada taariikhda oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada xaaladaha emotional ee ku qoran qoraalka dadka, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa qalabka lagu isticmaalo aqoonta hore ee ku saabsan kooxda xisaabta shaqaalaha. Si gaar ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in saxda kalluumeynta aad u korodhsan sida loo kordhiyo qoraalka hore ee loogu qorayo qoraalka qoraalka ku qoran BERT. Sidoo kale waxaynu isbarbardhignaa jidadka ku qoran aqoonta horay loo yaqaan kooxo xisaabta, si aan u beddelno tababarka khasaarada lagu isticmaalay, taas oo lagu qorayo talo-barashada waxbarashada badan ee iskuulka u barashada si wadajir ah u barashada fasaxa farxada positive/negativ ah. Midhaha imtixaanka waxaa laga jeedaa in marka la isticmaalo Plutchik's Wheel of Emotions, waxaa ka wanaagsan in si wadajir ah loo kala soocayyo kooxo dabiicadda ah oo aan si toos ah u isticmaalin dhismaha shakhsiga ah oo siddeed kooxood oo aasaasiga ah lagu qabanayo dhaqdhaqaaq.", 'sv': 'Erkännande av en mänsklig karaktär mentalt tillstånd i text är en stor utmaning i naturlig språkbehandling. I denna studie undersöker vi effekten av det narrativa sammanhanget när det gäller att känna igen känslomässiga tillstånd hos mänskliga karaktärer i text och diskuterar ett tillvägagångssätt för att utnyttja a priori kunskap om det använda känslokategorisystemet. Specifikt visar vi experimentellt att noggrannheten i känsloklassificeringen ökar avsevärt genom att koda det föregående sammanhanget i målmeningen med hjälp av en BERT-baserad textkodare. Vi jämför också sätt att införliva a priori kunskap om känslokategorier genom att ändra förlustfunktionen som används i träning, där vårt förslag om multi-task lärande som gemensamt lär sig att klassificera positiv/negativ polaritet av känslor ingår. Experimentella resultat tyder på att det, när Plutchiks Wheel of Emotions används, är bättre att gemensamt klassificera de grundläggande känslokategorierna med positiv/negativ polaritet snarare än att direkt utnyttja dess karakteristiska struktur där åtta grundläggande kategorier är ordnade i ett hjul.', 'si': "මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරකාරයක් තියෙන මානසික ප්\u200dරතිකාරයේ මානසික ස්ථිතිය අඳුරගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන අභ්\u200dයාවයක මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ කතාවක් සංවේදනයේ හැකියාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මිනිස්සු අක්ෂරාවන්ගේ හැකියාවක් පරීක්ෂණයේ ලි විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පෙන්වන්නේ හැඟීම් විශේෂණය ගැන සැකසුම් විශේෂය විශේෂය විශේෂය විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය ක අපි සමහර විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට භාවිත විදියට භාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ Plutchik's Wheel of Emotions ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු වෙලාවට, ඒක හොඳයි සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ භාවිත වර්ගයක් සමග ස", 'ur': 'پیغام میں ایک انسان شخص کی روانی حالت کی پہچان کرنا طبیعی زبان پردازی میں ایک بڑی چال ہے۔ اس مطالعہ میں، ہم تفصیل کی تاریخ کی موقعیت کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں تاریخ میں انسان شخصوں کے احساسات موقعیت کو پہچان لیتے ہیں اور ایک طریقہ سے بحث کرتے ہیں کہ مطالعہ کیا جاتا ہے کہ مطالعہ سیسٹم کے بارے میں ایک پہلی علم کا استعمال کرے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم آزمائش کے طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ احساسات کلاسیفوں کی دقیق بہت زیادہ اضافہ کی جاتی ہے کہ ایک BERT بنیادی ٹیکسٹ کوڈر کے مطابق موقع کا پہلے کنٹکس کوڈ کرتا ہے. ہم نے بھی طریقے مقایسہ کر دیے ہیں کہ احساسات کائٹیوں کی ایک پہلی علم میں تدریس میں استعمال کیا گیا خسارہ کا فعالیت بدل کر، جہاں ہمارے بہت سے دنیا کی تعلیم کا پیشنهاد ہے جو ایک ساتھ سکھاتا ہے احساسات مثبت/منفی قطعیت کا کلاس کرنا۔ آزمائش کا نتیجہ یہ سفارش کرتا ہے کہ جب پلٹچک کی چوب احساسات کا استعمال کرتا ہے تو اس سے بہتر ہے کہ مستقیماً مثبت/منفی قطعات کے ذریعہ بنیادی احساسات کا کلاس کرنا اس کے خصوصی صنعت کا استعمال کرنا جہاں آٹھ بنیادی قطعات ایک چوب میں ٹھہرائے جاتے', 'ta': 'உரையில் ஒரு மனித எழுத்தின் மனநிலையை அறிந்து கொள்ளும் என்பது இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலில் மிகப்பெரிய இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் விவரமான சூழலின் விளைவை அறிந்து கொள்கிறோம் உரையில் மனித உணர்வு கூற்றுகளின் உணர்வு நிலைகளை அறிந்து மற்றும் வேலை ச குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் சோதனையில் காண்பிக்கிறோம் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலின் சரிபார்வை பெரிதாகவே அதிகரிக்கப்படுகிறது முந்தைய சூழ்ச்சியின பயிற்சியில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட இழப்பு செயல்பாட்டை மாற்றி நாம் உணர்வு வகுப்புகளை முன்னால் ஒப்பிட வேண்டும் வழிகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், அதில் நாம் உணர்வுகளை வகைப்பட சோதனை முடிவு', 'uz': "Matnning ma'lum belgini aniqlash imkoniyatini asl tilni boshqarish uchun muhim murakkab qilish. Bu o'qituda, biz ma'lumotning ma'lumotlarini matnning hissiyotning holatini aniqlashda o'rganamiz va ishlab chiqaradigan hissiyotning kategori tizimi haqida bir birinchi ma'lumotni foydalanishga harakat qilamiz. Ko'rsatganda, biz hissiyotning darajasini aniqlash imkoniyatini BERT asosida matn kodlash usuli yordamida oldingi maxsus soʻzni kodlash mumkin. Biz hissiyot turlarini o'rganish uchun birinchi darajaga o'rganishni o'zgartirish orqali o'zgartirish orqali o'rganish uchun bir necha vazifa o'rganish imkoniyatini bir necha vazifa o'rganishga o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganishga o'rganamiz. Tasavvur natijalari esa Plutchikning Emotions Wheltini ishlatilganda, asosiy hissiyotning turlarini yaxshi/negativ polarini birlashtirishdan foydalanish juda яхшироқдир. Bu yerda sakkiz asosiy guruhlari qo'llangan tashkilotni birlashtirishdan foydalanish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng tinh thần của một nhân vật trong văn bản là một thách thức lớn trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi điều tra hiệu quả của ngữ cảnh cốt truyện trong việc nhận ra trạng thái xúc cảm của nhân vật trong văn bản và thảo luận một phương pháp để sử dụng kiến thức ưu việt về hệ thống phân loại cảm xúc được sử dụng. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi thí nghiệm cho thấy độ chính xác của việc phân loại cảm xúc được tăng đáng kể bằng cách mã hóa văn bản được xếp hình trước khi dùng mã hóa văn bản nền BERT. Chúng ta cũng so sánh cách bao gồm ưu tiên kiến thức về các loại cảm xúc bằng cách thay đổi chức năng mất mát được sử dụng trong huấn luyện, trong đó có đề nghị của chúng ta về việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ cùng nhau phân loại những cực cảm xúc tích cực/tiêu cực được bao gồm. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy, khi s ử dụng Bàn Tay cảm xúc của Plutarch, thì việc phân loại cảm xúc cơ bản với một cực dương/âm dương hơn là khai thác trực tiếp cấu trúc đặc trưng nơi mà tám loại cơ bản được xếp theo bánh xe.', 'hr': 'Priznavanje mentalnog stanja ljudskog karaktera u tekstu je veliki izazov u procesu prirodnog jezika. U ovom ispitivanju istražujemo učinkovitost priče u priznanju emocionalnih stanja ljudskih karaktera u tekstu i razgovaramo o pristupu korištenju priorijskog znanja u vezi sustava zaposlenog kategorije emocija. Posebno, eksperimentalno pokazujemo da je preciznost klasifikacije emocija značajno povećana kodiranjem prethodnog konteksta ciljne rečenice koristeći koder teksta osnovanog na BERT-u. Također uspoređujemo načine da uključimo priori znanje o kategorijama emocija mijenjajući funkciju gubitka koja se koristi u obuci, u kojem se uključuje naš prijedlog učenja multizadataka koji zajedno uči klasifikirati pozitivnu/negativnu polarnost emocija. Eksperimentalni rezultati ukazuju na to da je bolje zajedno klasifikirati osnovne kategorije emocija s a pozitivnom/negativnom polarnošću umjesto direktno iskoristiti svoju karakterističnu strukturu u kojoj se osam osnovnih kategorija organiziraju u to čaku.', 'nl': "Het herkennen van de mentale toestand van een menselijk karakter in tekst is een grote uitdaging bij de verwerking van natuurlijke talen. In deze studie onderzoeken we de effectiviteit van de narratieve context bij het herkennen van de emotionele toestanden van menselijke karakters in tekst en bespreken we een aanpak om gebruik te maken van a priori kennis over het gebruikte emotiecategoriesysteem. Specifiek laten we experimenteel zien dat de nauwkeurigheid van emotieclassificatie aanzienlijk wordt verhoogd door de voorafgaande context van de doelzin te coderen met behulp van een BERT-gebaseerde tekstencoder. We vergelijken ook manieren om a priori kennis van emotiecategorieën op te nemen door de verliesfunctie die gebruikt wordt in training te veranderen, waarin ons voorstel van multitask leren dat gezamenlijk leert om positieve/negatieve polariteit van emoties te classificeren is opgenomen. De experimentele resultaten suggereren dat het bij het gebruik van Plutchik's Wheel of Emotions beter is om de basisemotiecategorieën gezamenlijk te classificeren met positieve/negatieve polariteit in plaats van direct gebruik te maken van de karakteristieke structuur waarin acht basiscategorieën in een wiel zijn gerangschikt.", 'bg': 'Разпознаването на психическото състояние на човешкия характер в текста е голямо предизвикателство в обработката на естествения език. В настоящото изследване изследваме ефикасността на разказващия контекст при разпознаването на емоционалните състояния на човешките герои в текста и обсъждаме подход за използване на а priori знания относно използваната система от категории емоции. По-конкретно, експериментално показваме, че точността на класификацията на емоциите значително се увеличава чрез кодиране на предходния контекст на целевото изречение с помощта на текстов кодер базиран на BERT. Сравняваме и начините за включване на a priori познаване на емоционалните категории чрез промяна на функцията за загуба, използвана в обучението, в която е включено нашето предложение за многозадачно обучение, което съвместно се учи да класифицира положителната/отрицателната полярност на емоциите. Експерименталните резултати предполагат, че при използването на Колелото на емоциите на Плучик е по-добре да се класифицират основните емоционални категории с положителна/отрицателна полярност, отколкото директно да се използва характерната структура, в която осем основни категории са подредени в колело.', 'da': 'Anerkendelse af den mentale tilstand af en menneskelig karakter i tekst er en stor udfordring i naturlig sprogbehandling. I dette studie undersøger vi effekten af den narrative kontekst i at genkende de følelsesmæssige tilstande af menneskelige karakterer i tekst og diskuterer en tilgang til at gøre brug af a priori viden om det anvendte følelseskategorisystem. Specielt viser vi eksperimentelt, at nøjagtigheden af følelsesklassificering øges betydeligt ved at kode den foregående kontekst af målsætningen ved hjælp af en BERT-baseret tekstkoder. Vi sammenligner også måder at indarbejde a priori viden om følelseskategorier ved at ændre tabsfunktionen anvendt i træning, hvor vores forslag om multi-task learning, der i fællesskab lærer at klassificere positiv/negativ polaritet af følelser, er inkluderet. De eksperimentelle resultater tyder på, at det ved brug af Plutchiks Wheel of Emotions er bedre i fællesskab at klassificere de grundlæggende følelseskategorier med positiv/negativ polaritet frem for direkte at udnytte dens karakteristiske struktur, hvor otte grundkategorier er arrangeret i et hjul.', 'de': 'Das Erkennen des geistigen Zustandes eines menschlichen Charakters im Text ist eine große Herausforderung in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir die Wirksamkeit des narrativen Kontextes bei der Erkennung der emotionalen Zustände menschlicher Charaktere im Text und diskutieren einen Ansatz, um a priori Wissen über das verwendete Emotionskategoriensystem zu nutzen. Insbesondere zeigen wir experimentell, dass die Genauigkeit der Emotionsklassifikation durch Codierung des vorangegangenen Kontexts des Zielsatzes mit einem BERT-basierten Textkodierer wesentlich erhöht wird. Wir vergleichen auch Möglichkeiten, um a priori Wissen über Emotionskategorien zu integrieren, indem wir die im Training verwendete Verlustfunktion ändern, in der unser Vorschlag des Multi-Task-Lernens enthalten ist, das gemeinsam lernt, positive/negative Polarität von Emotionen zu klassifizieren. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass es bei der Verwendung von Plutchiks Rad der Emotionen besser ist, die grundlegenden Emotionskategorien gemeinsam mit positiver/negativer Polarität zu klassifizieren, anstatt direkt seine charakteristische Struktur auszunutzen, in der acht Grundkategorien in einem Rad angeordnet sind.', 'id': 'Pengenalan keadaan mental karakter manusia dalam teks adalah tantangan utama dalam proses bahasa alam. In this study, we investigate the efficacy of the narrative context in recognizing the emotional states of human characters in text and discuss an approach to make use of a priori knowledge regarding the employed emotion category system.  Secara spesifik, kami secara eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa akurasi klasifikasi emosi meningkat secara substansial dengan mengekodikan konteks sebelumnya dari kalimat sasaran menggunakan pengekodi teks berdasarkan BERT. Kami juga membandingkan cara untuk mengikorporasi pengetahuan priori tentang kategori emosi dengan mengubah fungsi kehilangan yang digunakan dalam latihan, di mana proposisi kami untuk belajar multi-tugas yang bersama belajar untuk mengklasifikasi polaritas positif/negatif emosi termasuk. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa, ketika menggunakan Roda Emosi Plutchik, lebih baik untuk bersama-sama mengklasifikasi kategori emosi dasar dengan polaritas positif/negatif daripada secara langsung mengeksploitasi struktur karakteristiknya di mana delapan kategori dasar diatur dalam roda.', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리에서 텍스트 속 인물의 심리 상태를 식별하는 것은 중대한 도전이다.이 연구에서 우리는 서사적 언어 환경이 텍스트에서 인류 역할의 감정 상태를 식별하는 데 유효성을 조사했고 사용된 감정 범주 체계에 대한 선험 지식을 활용하는 방법을 토론했다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리의 실험은 버트를 바탕으로 한 텍스트 인코더를 사용하여 목표 문장의 앞의 상하문을 인코딩함으로써 감정 분류의 정확성이 현저히 높아졌다는 것을 보여 주었다.우리는 훈련에서 사용하는 손실 함수를 바꾸어 정서 유형의 선험지식을 통합시키는 방법을 비교했다. 그 중에서 우리가 제시한 다중 임무 학습, 즉 연합 학습이 정서의 양과 음의 극성에 대해 분류하는 것을 포함한다.실험 결과에 따르면 Plutchik의 정서 바퀴를 사용할 때 양과 음의 극성 연합으로 기본 정서 유형을 분류하는 것이 그 특징 구조, 즉 8개의 기본 유형을 한 바퀴에 배열하는 것이 가장 좋다고 한다.', 'fa': 'شناختن وضعیت روانی شخصیت انسان در متن یک چالش بزرگی در پردازش زبان طبیعی است. در این مطالعه، ما موثرت محیط داستان را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا وضعیت احساساتی شخصیت\u200cهای انسان را در متن شناسایی کنیم و در مورد یک طریق برای استفاده از دانش پیشینی در مورد سیستم مجموعه\u200cی احساسات استخدام کنیم. به طور خاصی، ما به طور آزمایشی نشان می دهیم که دقیقات کلیسازی احساسات با رمز کردن محیط پیشینی از جمله هدف با استفاده از یک رمز متن بنیاد BERT بیشتر شده است. ما همچنین روش\u200cهایی را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم که از طریق تغییر عملکرد خسارت در آموزش استفاده می\u200cشود که پیشنهاد ما از یادگیری چندین کاری که با هم یاد می\u200cگیرد که قطعیت مثبت/منفی احساسات را درباره\u200cی کلاس\u200cگذاری کند. نتایج آزمایشی پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که وقتی از چرخ احساسات پلوتچیک استفاده می\u200cکند، بهتر است که با همدیگر قسمت\u200cهای احساسات بنیادی را با قطعیت مثبت/منفی به جای مستقیماً استفاده از ساختار ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cاش استفاده کنید که هشت قطعه بنیادی در یک چرخ راهن', 'sw': 'Kutambua hali ya akili ya mhusika wa binadamu katika maandishi ni changamoto kubwa katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Katika utafiti huu, tunachunguza ufanisi wa muktadha wa simulizi katika kutambua hali ya hisia za wahusika wa binadamu katika maandishi na kujadili namna ya kutumia maarifa ya awali kuhusu mfumo wa hisia unaoendeshwa. Kwa hakika, tunaonyesha kwamba ukweli wa usambazaji wa hisia umeongezeka kwa kuongeza muktadha uliopita wa hukumu ya malengo kwa kutumia mfumo wa ujumbe wa maandishi anayeishi BERT. Pia tunalinganisha njia za kuingiza maarifa ya awali ya hisia kwa kubadilisha kazi ya kupoteza iliyotumika katika mafunzo, ambapo pendekezo letu la kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi ambalo kwa pamoja linajifunza kuhusiana na uchaguzi chanya/hasi wa hisia zinajumuishwa. Matokeo ya majaribio yanapendekeza kuwa, wakati kwa kutumia Vituo vya Uhamiaji wa Plutchik, ni bora zaidi kuunganisha makundi ya msingi ya hisia yenye uchaguzi chanya/hasi badala ya moja kwa moja kutumia muundo wake wa mahusiano ambapo makundi nane ya msingi yanawekwa katika kipindi cha kitanda.', 'af': "Herkenning van die menslike toestand van 'n menslike karakter in teks is 'n groot uitdrukking in natuurlike taal verwerking. In hierdie studie, ondersoek ons die effektiviteit van die narratiewe konteks in die herken van die emosiele staatste van menslike karakters in teks en bespreek 'n toegang om gebruik te maak van 'n priori kennis aangaande die gebruikte emosiekategorie stelsel. Spesifieke, ons eksperimenteel wys dat die presies van emosie klassifikasie is substantieel vergroot deur kodering van die voorheende konteks van die teiken seting gebruik 'n BERT-gebaseerde teks enkoder. Ons vergelyk ook maniere om 'n voorspoedige kennis van emosie kategorie te inkorpreer deur die verlies funksie wat gebruik word in onderwerp te verander, waarin ons voorstel van multi-taak leer wat saamstig leer om positiewe/negatiewe polarisie van emosie te klassifiseer is. Die eksperimentale resultate stel voorstel dat, wanneer Plutchik se Wheel van Emotisies gebruik word, is dit beter om die basiese emosie kategories met positiewe/negatiewe polariteit saam te klassifiseer, eerder a s direk die uitbreiding van sy karakteristiese struktuur waarin agt basiese kategories in 'n wiel geregtig word.", 'tr': 'Metin içinde adamlaryň karakterleriniň ruhsatynyň tanyşyny tebigy dil işlemesinde örän kynçylyk däldir. Bu aramda, biz çykyş sistemasynda ynsan karakterleriniň duýgularyny tanap bilmek üçin a ýdym taýýarlaryň etkinligini inceleýäris we işgärli duýgular sistemasy barada öňki bilgi ullanmak üçin bir nusga çykýarys. Adatça, biz experimental olarak duýgyş klasifikasyň dogrylygyny BERT tabanly metin kodçysynyň öňki kontekstini ködlemek bilen ködleşip artar. Biz hem duýgular kategoriýasyny öňki bilgi bilen üýtgetmek üçin ýitirmek funksiýasyny üýtgetmek üçin, bu ýerde duýgularyň pozitiv/negativ polarityny diýmek üçin öwrenen köp zadyň öwrenmegimiziň teklibimizi çykarýarys. Deneysel netijeler Plutchikyň Duýgularyň gyzgyny ulananda, ol duýgularyň esasy kategoriýasyny pozitif/negatif polaritet bilen tussaga geçirmek gowy bolar we ol ýerde sekiz sany kategoriýalaryň ýerleşýän çykyşyny ulanmakdan has gowy bolar.', 'sq': 'Njohja e gjendjes mentale të një karakteri njerëzor në tekst është një sfidë e madhe në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Në këtë studim, ne hetojmë efektshmërinë e kontekstit tregues në njohjen e gjendjeve emocionale të personave njerëzore në tekst dhe diskutojmë një qasje për të përdorur njohurinë a priori lidhur me sistemin e kategorisë së emocioneve të punësuara. Veçanërisht, ne eksperimentalisht tregojmë se saktësia e klasifikimit të emocioneve rritet thelbësisht duke koduar kontekstin e mëparshëm të fjalës objektive duke përdorur një kodues teksti bazuar në BERT. Ne gjithashtu krahasojmë mënyrat për të përfshirë një njohuri priori të kategorive emocionale duke ndryshuar funksionin e humbjes të përdorur në trainimin, në të cilin përfshihet propozimi ynë i mësimit multidetyror që së bashku mëson të klasifikojë polaritetin pozitiv/negativ të emocioneve. Rezultatet eksperimentale sugjerojnë se, kur përdoret Rrulla e Emocioneve e Pluçikut, është më mirë të klasifikohen s ë bashku kategoritë bazë emocionale me polaritet pozitiv/negativ sesa të shfrytëzojnë drejtpërdrejt strukturën e saj karakteristike në të cilën tetë kategoritë bazë janë rregulluar në një rrotë.', 'am': 'በጽሑፍ የሰው ብሔራዊ ሥርዓት ማውቀት በአካባቢው ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ታላቅ ችግር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የታሪክ ጽሑፎችን በጽሑፍ የሚያውቅ የስህተት ግንኙነትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ የስሜት ክፍል አካባቢ የፊተኛውን የክፍል ጽሑፍ የሆኑን ጽሑፍ አካባቢ በመቀበል የሚጨመር እውቀት እንዲያሳየን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተማሪዎች ውስጥ የተጠቃውን የስብሰባ ክፍል በመለወጥ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናው ፍሬዎች፣ ፕላንክክ የኢትዮጵያ መንቀሳቅስ በተጠቀም ጊዜ፣ በመንኰራኵር ውስጥ ስምንት የተመሳሳይ ክፍሎች በተመሳሳይ፣ የኢትዮጵያ ዓይነቶች በመጠቀም/የnegative ፖለቲካዊነት በመጠቀም ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Տեքստում մարդու հոգեկան վիճակի ճանաչելը գլխավոր մարտահրավեր է բնական լեզվի վերլուծում: In this study, we investigate the efficacy of the narrative context in recognizing the emotional states of human characters in text and discuss an approach to make use of a priori knowledge regarding the employed emotion category system.  Հատկապես, մենք փորձարկումներով ցույց ենք տալիս, որ զգացմունքների դասակարգման ճշգրիտությունը նշանակաբար աճում է օրինակելով նպատակային նախադասության նախորդ կոնտեքստը BER-ով հիմնված տեքստի կոդեր: Մենք նաև համեմատում ենք միջոցներ, որոնց միջոցով կարող ենք ներգրավել նախկին զգացմունքների կատեգորիաների գիտելիքները փոփոխելով կրթության ընթացքում օգտագործվող կորստի ֆունկցիան, որտեղ ներառվում է մեր առաջարկը բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության, որը միասին սովորում է Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ օգտագործելով Պլատչի զգացմունքների շղթան, ավելի լավ է միասին դասակարգել հիմնական զգացմունքների կատեգորիաները դրական և բացասական բնակչությամբ, քան անմիջապես օգտագործել իր բնորոշ կառուցվածքը, որտեղ ութ հիմնական կատե', 'az': "Təbiətli dil işləməsində insan karakterinin ruhsal vəziyyətini tanıma çox çətindir. Bu təhsil içində, insanların məktub karakterlərinin emosiyal vəziyyətlərini tanıtmaq və istifadə edilmiş emosiyal kategoriya sistemi haqqında əvvəlki bilgi istifadə etmək üçün bir yol mübahisə edirik. Özellikle, biz təcrübə olaraq göstəririk ki, duygusal klasifikasiyanın doğruluğu BERT tabanlı metin kodlayıcısı ilə əvvəlki cümlənin kodlaması ilə çox yüksəldir. Biz həmçin in həmçinin təhsil etməsində istifadə edilən çoxlu işlər öyrənməsini öyrənən çoxlu təhsil öyrənməsini çoxlu təhsil etmək üçün emosyon kategoriyalarının əvvəlki bilgi ilə birləşdirmək yollarını ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Müxtəlif sonuçlar Plutchik'in Duygularını istifadə edərkən, s əkkiz temel kategoriyaların rotada düzenlənməsindən əvvəl pozitiv/negativ polaritə olan temel duyguların kategoriyalarını birlikdə dəyişdirmək daha yaxşıdır.", 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje mentalnog stanja ljudskog karaktera u tekstu je veliki izazov u procesu prirodnog jezika. U ovom studiju istražujemo učinkovitost priče u priznanju emocionalnih stanja ljudskih karaktera u tekstu i razgovaramo o pristupu korištenju priorijskog znanja u vezi sustava zaposlenog kategorije emocija. Posebno, eksperimentalno pokazujemo da je preciznost klasifikacije emocija značajno povećana kodiranjem prethodnog konteksta ciljne rečenice koristeći koder teksta na osnovu BERT-a. Također uspoređujemo načine da uključimo priori znanje o kategorijama emocija mijenjajući funkciju gubitka koja se koristi u obuci, u kojem se uključuje naš prijedlog multizadatačnog učenja koji zajedno uči klasifikaciju pozitivne/negativne polarnosti emocija. Eksperimentalni rezultati ukazuju na to da je bolje zajedno klasifikirati osnovne kategorije emocija s a pozitivnom/negativnom polarnošću umjesto direktno iskoristiti svoju karakterističnu strukturu u kojoj se osam osnovnih kategorija organizuju u to čku.', 'ca': "Recognition of the mental state of a human character in text is a major challenge in natural language processing.  En aquest estudi, investigam l'eficacia del context narratiu en reconèixer els estats emocionals dels personatges humans en el text i discutem un enfocament per utilitzar coneixements a priori en relació amb el sistema de categoria emocional empregat. Especificament, experimentalment demostram que la precisió de la classificació emocional s'augmenta substancialment codificant el context anterior de la frase alvo utilitzant un codificador de text basat en BERT. També comparam maneres d'incorporar un coneixement a priori de les categories emocionals canviant la funció de pèrdua utilitzada en l'entrenament, en la qual s'inclou la nostra proposta d'aprenentatge multitascat que ensenya a classificar la polaritat positiva/negativa de les emocions. Els resultats experimental s suggereixen que, quan utilitzem la roda d'emocions de Plutchik, és millor classificar conjuntament les categories d'emocions bàsiques amb polaritat positiva/negativa en lloc d'explotar directament la seva estructura característica en la qual vuit categories bàsiques estan organitzades en una roda.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznání duševního stavu lidského charakteru v textu je velkou výzvou při zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V této práci zkoumáme efektivitu narativního kontextu při rozpoznávání emočních stavů lidských postav v textu a diskutujeme přístup k využití a priori znalostí používaného systému emočních kategorií. Konkrétně experimentálně ukazujeme, že přesnost klasifikace emocí je výrazně zvýšena kódováním předchozího kontextu cílové věty pomocí textového kodéru založeného na BERT. Dále porovnáváme způsoby začlenění a priori znalostí emočních kategorií změnou ztrátové funkce používané v tréninku, do níž je zahrnuta návrh multi-tasking learning, který se společně učí klasifikovat pozitivní/negativní polaritu emocí. Experimentální výsledky naznačují, že při použití Plutchikova kolo emocí je lepší společně klasifikovat základní emoční kategorie s pozitivní/negativní polaritou, než přímo využít její charakteristické struktury, ve které je v kole uspořádáno osm základních kategorií.', 'et': 'Inimiseloomu vaimse seisundi tunnustamine tekstis on loomuliku keele töötlemisel suur väljakutse. Käesolevas uuringus uurime narratiivse konteksti efektiivsust inimtegelaste emotsionaalsete seisundite tuvastamisel tekstis ja arutleme, kuidas kasutada a priori teadmisi kasutatava emotsioonikategooria süsteemi kohta. Täpsemalt näitame eksperimentaalselt, et emotsioonide klassifitseerimise täpsust suureneb märkimisväärselt sihtlause eelmise konteksti kodeerimine BERT-põhise tekstikodeerija abil. Samuti võrdleme võimalusi, kuidas integreerida a priori tundmisi emotsioonikategooriatest, muutes treeningutes kasutatavat kaotusfunktsiooni, millesse on lisatud meie ettepanek mitmeülesandelisest õppimisest, mis õpib ühiselt klassifitseerima emotsioonide positiivset/negatiivset polaarsust. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et Plutšiku emotsiooniratta kasutamisel on parem klassifitseerida põhilised emotsioonikategooriad positiivse/negatiivse polaarsusega, mitte otseselt ära kasutada selle iseloomulikku struktuuri, milles kaheksa põhikategooriat on rattas paigutatud.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় মানুষের মানসিক অবস্থার স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করা একটি প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই গবেষণায় আমরা কাজ করা আবেগ বিভাগের ব্যাপারে মানুষের অনুভূতির ব্যাপারের কার্যক্রম স্বীকৃতি জানানোর জন্য তদন্ত করি এবং কাজ করা অনুভূতি ব্যবস্থা সম বিশেষ করে, আমরা পরীক্ষায় দেখাচ্ছি যে বিবেরেট-ভিত্তিক টেক্সট এনকোডার ব্যবহার করে আবেগের বিভিন্ন ক্লাসেফেশনের সঠিকভাবে বেশী বৃদ্ধি পা প্রশিক্ষণে ব্যবহৃত ক্ষতি পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে আমরা আবেগের বিভাগের জ্ঞানের পূর্ববর্তী বিভাগের সাথে তুলনা করি যেভাবে আমাদের অনুভূতির ইতিবাচক/নেতিবাচক দূরীতিকে  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে যখন প্লাটকিকের হুয়েল অফ ইমুটেশন ব্যবহার করে, তখন মৌলিক আবেগের শ্রেণীগুলোকে যুক্ত করার জন্য ভালো হবে যারা তাদের চরিত্রিক ক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে সেখা', 'fi': 'Ihmishahmon henkisen tilan tunnistaminen tekstissä on suuri haaste luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Tässä tutkimuksessa selvitämme narratiivisen kontekstin tehoa ihmishahmojen tunteiden tilan tunnistamisessa tekstissä ja keskustelemme lähestymistavasta, jolla hyödynnetään a priori tietoa käytetystä tunnekategoriajärjestelmästä. Kokeellisesti osoitamme, että tunteiden luokittelun tarkkuutta parannetaan merkittävästi koodaamalla kohdelauseen edellinen konteksti BERT-pohjaisella tekstikooderilla. Vertailemme myös tapoja sisällyttää a priori tuntemus tunteista muuttamalla harjoittelussa käytettyä menetystoimintoa, johon sisältyy ehdotuksemme monitehtäväoppimisesta, joka yhdessä oppii luokittelemaan tunteiden positiivisen/negatiivisen polariteetin. Kokeelliset tulokset viittaavat siihen, että Plutšikin Tunteiden Pyörää käytettäessä on parempi luokitella yhdessä emotionaaliset perusluokat positiivisella/negatiivisella napaisuudella kuin hyödyntää suoraan sen ominaista rakennetta, jossa pyörään on järjestetty kahdeksan perusluokkaa.', 'ha': "Ana sani halin mazaɓa na mutane a cikin littãfin, yana da muhimmi mai musammo a cikin fassarar harshe na natura. A cikin wannan lõkaci, Munã yin ƙidãya da aikin muhimmin lãbãri a gane halin na masu hisia'awa na mutane cikin matsayin kuma munãyi jayayya a yi amfani da wani matsayi ya gabatar da wani sani na zamani game da system na aikin da aka yi aikin da shi. Aka ƙayyade, munã nuna cewa, tsarin kallon aikin da aka ƙara shi mai girma ana ƙara shi da kodi na farko da cewa na goani da ya yi amfani da kodin matsayin na BERT-bane. Tuna samfani da hanyõyin za mu shigar da wani masani na zaman jama'a da za'a musanya aikin hasãra da aka yi amfani da shi a cikin aikin, a cikinsa, masu buƙata masu amfani da aikin mulki-aikin da za'a sami da in rarraba fara-wani/negative na hisia, za'a shigar da shi. Matarin jarrabai yana son cẽwa, idan an yi amfani da Plathik'in Taurar da Imtizo, shi ne mafi alhẽri in rarraba jama'ar hisãbi masu bastarwa da haske/negative, kuma don ya yi amfani da shi gaba ɗaya na rubutunsa mai takarda, a cikin wani girgije.", 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje duševnega stanja človeškega značaja v besedilu je velik izziv pri obdelavi naravnega jezika. V študiji raziskujemo učinkovitost pripovednega konteksta pri prepoznavanju čustvenih stanj človeških likov v besedilu in razpravljamo o pristopu k uporabi a priori znanja o uporabljenem sistemu čustvenih kategorij. Natančneje, eksperimentalno pokažemo, da se natančnost klasifikacije čustev bistveno poveča s kodiranjem prejšnjega konteksta ciljnega stavka z uporabo besedilnega kodirnika BERT-a. Primerjamo tudi načine vključevanja a priori znanja čustvenih kategorij s spreminjanjem funkcije izgube, ki se uporablja pri treningu, v katero je vključen naš predlog večopravilnega učenja, ki se skupaj uči klasifikacije pozitivne/negativne polarnosti čustev. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je pri uporabi Plučikovega kolesa čustev bolje skupaj razvrstiti osnovne čustvene kategorije s pozitivno/negativno polarnostjo, kot pa neposredno izkoristiti njeno značilno strukturo, v kateri je v kolesu razporejenih osem osnovnih kategorij.', 'jv': 'Tanggang hal-hal kuwi sing paling-hal kanggo kelas kamanungsan nêmên kuwi susahe sing apik tur alêmêr. Nang ujaran iki, awak dhéwé nyosesi nggawe efekat kanggo nguasakno aturan anyar tentang kanggo ngerasakno kalagayan empatan kanggo nguasakno cara-cara sing nêmên karo nganggep kuwi bisa nerusahan kanggo ngerasakno awak dhéwé, gawe nguasakno sistem sing beraksi sing gak Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntuk kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno asai seneng pisan langut gak dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk karo tindakan kanggo ngerasakno karo perusahaan langgar kuwi tindakan karo perusahaan langgar kuwi tindakan, ning kegayutan awak dhéwé multi Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngerasakno, pas kuwi wis nggambar kelas perasaan puk Puntchik, wong sing luwih nggawe masasu ingkang éntuk kategori empatif sing gunakake karo polarity sing luwih/nêtas kuwi padha mengko iso nggawe layakno sak kategori wis ambang awak dhéwé ning sekondiré.', 'he': "זיהוי המצב הנפשי של דמות אנושית בטקסט הוא אתגר גדול בעבודת שפת טבעית. במחקר הזה, אנו חוקרים את היעילות של הקשר הסיפורי בזהות המצבים הרגשיים של הדמויות האנושיות בטקסט ודיונים על גישה כדי להשתמש בידע קודם לכן בנוגע למערכת הקטגוריה הרגשית המשתמשת. במיוחד, אנו מראים מבחינה ניסיונית שהמדויקת מסווג רגשות מועדפת באופן משמעותי על ידי הקוד הקודם של המשפט המטרה באמצעות קודם טקסט מבוסס על BERT. אנחנו משוותים גם דרכים להשתלב הידע קודם לכן של קטגוריות רגשות על ידי שינוי הפונקציה של האובדן המשתמשת באימונים, שבה ההצעה שלנו ללמוד במשימות רבות התוצאות הניסיוניים מציעות שכאשר משתמשים בגלגל רגשות של פלאצ'יק, עדיף לשווג ביחד את הקטגוריות הרגשות הבסיסיות עם קוטביות חיובית/שלילית במקום לנצל ישירות את המבנה האופייני שלה שבה שמונה הקטגוריות הבסיסיות מאורגנות בגלגל.", 'bo': "ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་མིའི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གནས་ལུགས་རྟོགས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་སྦྱོར་བཞིན་པའི་ལྟ་བུ་གདོང འོན་ཀྱང་། ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་བཟོ་ཚོང་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་དང་། མི་ཚོའི་ཡིག་རྟགས་ཚོའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཤ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྟབས་བདེན་བཤད་བྱས་ན་སྒེར་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་རྣམས་BERT་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་རྟགས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་སྔ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐོར་དང་སྔོན་མ་ཤེས་པའི་དབྱེ་རིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་བསྒྱུར་ཐབས་ཤིག་བྱས་པ་དང་། experimental results suggest that when using Plutchik's Wheel of Emotions, it is better to jointly classify the basic emotion categories with positive/negative polarity rather than directly exploit its characteristic structure in which eight basic categories are arranged in a wheel."}
{'en': 'Few-Shot Text Classification with Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network-Based Prototypical Network', 'pt': 'Classificação de texto de poucas fotos com gráfico de rotulagem de bordas de rede neural baseada em rede prototípica', 'es': 'Clasificación de texto de pocos disparos con gráfico de etiquetado de bordes Red prototípica basada en redes neuronales', 'ar': 'تصنيف نصي قليل اللقطات مع الشبكة النموذجية القائمة على الشبكة العصبية لرسومات Edge-Labeling', 'fr': "Classification de texte en quelques étapes avec un réseau prototypique basé sur un réseau de neurones de graphe d'étiquetage de bord", 'hi': 'एज-लेबलिंग ग्राफ न्यूरल नेटवर्क-आधारित प्रोटोटाइपिकल नेटवर्क के साथ कुछ-शॉट टेक्स्ट वर्गीकरण', 'zh': '盖边缘标记图神经网络近镜头文本分类也', 'ja': 'エッジラベリンググラフニューラルネットワークベースのプロトタイプネットワークを使用した数少ないテキスト分類', 'ru': 'Классификация нескольких снимков текста с прототипической сетью на основе нейронной сети графа с маркировкой по краям', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Téacs ar Mheá Urchar le Líonra Fréamhshamhail Bunaithe ar Ghraif Imeall Lipéadaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Néhány felvételű szövegosztályozás élcímkézéssel Neurális hálózati alapú prototípus hálózat', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση κειμένου λίγων-πυροβολισμών με γράφημα ακρών-επισήμανσης Νευρικό δίκτυο βασισμένο στο πρωτότυπο δίκτυο', 'it': 'Classificazione del testo a pochi scatti con Edge-Labeling Graph', 'kk': 'Шегі- жарлық графикалық негіздеген нейралық желіндегі прототипикалық желіName', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Teks Sedikit Tembak dengan Rangkaian Prototipik Berasas Rangkaian Neural Graf Labeling-Edge', 'ml': 'എഡ്ജ്- ലാബിലിംഗ് ഗ്രാഫ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നെറ്റോട്ടോട്ടിക്കല്\u200d നെറ്റോട്ട', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test Few-Shot b’Netwerk Prototipiku bbażat fuq in-Netwerk Newrali tal-Graff tat-Tikkettar fuq ix-Xfar', 'mn': 'Маш багахан Текст Классификация Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network-Based Prototypical Network', 'no': 'Få-skytte tekstklassifikasjon med kantetikettingsgraf, neuralnettverksbasert prototypisk nettverk', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja tekstu niewielu ujęć z wykresem oznaczania krawędzi neuronowej sieci prototypowej', 'ro': 'Clasificarea textului cu câteva fotografii cu grafic de etichetare a marginilor Rețea prototipică neurală bazată pe rețea', 'so': 'Bannaanta qoraalka ee Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network-Based Prototypical Network', 'sr': 'Malo snimljene klasifikacije teksta sa snimkom grafika neuronske mreže na osnovu prototipske mreže', 'si': 'පැත්ත- ලේබිලින් ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය- ආධාරිත ප්\u200dරොටෝපික ජාල', 'sv': 'Kategorisering av text med några bilder med kantmärkning Neuralt nätverksbaserat prototypiskt nätverk', 'ur': 'اندازہ لیبلینگ گراف نیورال نیٹ ورک-Based پروٹوٹیپ نیٹ ورک', 'ta': 'Comment', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Hạng văn bản với miệng đồ họa thần kinh mạng lưới Prototype', 'bg': 'Класификация на текста с няколко снимки с графика за етикетиране на ръбове Неврална мрежова прототипна мрежа', 'hr': 'Sklasifikacija teksta s ografijom oznake na rubu neuronske mreže na temelju prototipske mreže', 'nl': 'Weinig-shot tekstclassificatie met Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network Based Prototypic Network', 'da': 'Few-Shot tekst klassificering med kantmærkning graf Neural netværksbaseret prototypisk netværk', 'ko': '테두리 표기도 신경 네트워크 기반의 소렌즈 텍스트 분류 원형 네트워크', 'de': 'Weniger-Shot Text Klassifizierung mit Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network Based Prototypic Network', 'fa': 'کلاس\u200cسازی متن کمی تیر با شبکه\u200cی نقطه\u200cای پایه\u200cی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200c', 'sw': 'Makala machache yenye Mtandao wa Prototypical', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar Metin Sınıflandyrmasy', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'የተለመደው ጭብጥ', 'az': 'Qırt-Labeling Grafiki Nöral Ağ-Bağlı Prototipik Ağ', 'bn': 'এজ- লেবেলিং গ্রাফ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক- ভিত্তিক প্রটোটোটাইকিল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Sklasifikacija teksta sa neografskom mrežom na osnovu neuronske mreže', 'hy': 'Comment', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Teks Beberapa Tembakan dengan Jaringan Prototipis Berdasarkan Jaringan Neural Graf Labeling', 'cs': 'Klasifikace textu s grafem označování hran Neurální síť založená na prototypické síti', 'et': 'Vähese pildi teksti klassifitseerimine serva märgistamise graafikuga Neuraalne võrgupõhine prototüüpiline võrk', 'fi': 'Muutaman kuvan tekstiluokitus reunamerkintäkaaviolla Neuraalinen verkostopohjainen prototyypillinen verkko', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i Tekstit me Rrjet Prototipik të Bazuar në Rrjetin Neural', 'ca': "Classificació de text poc fet amb una xarxa prototípica basada en xarxa neuronal basada en el gràfic d'etiqueta de costat", 'sk': 'Razvrščanje besedila z nekaj posnetki z grafikonom označevanja robov Nevralno omrežno prototipno omrežje', 'jv': 'Few-shot Text', 'he': 'Few-Shot Text Classification with Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network-Based Prototypical Network', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Few-Shot Text Classification with Edge-Labeling Graph Neural Network-Based Prototypical Network'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a new few-shot text classification method. Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data. To achieve this goal, we take advantage of advanced pre-trained language model to extract the semantic features of each document. Furthermore, we utilize an edge-labeling graph neural network to implicitly models the intra-cluster similarity and the inter-cluster dissimilarity of the documents. Finally, we take the results of the graph neural network as the input of a prototypical network to classify the unlabeled texts. We verify the effectiveness of our method on a sentiment analysis dataset and a relation classification dataset and achieve the state-of-the-art performance on both tasks.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لتصنيف النص بعدة لقطات. بالمقارنة مع طرق التعلم الخاضعة للإشراف والتي تتطلب مجموعة كبيرة من المستندات ذات العلامات ، تهدف طريقتنا إلى جعل من الممكن تصنيف النص غير المصنف باستخدام القليل من البيانات المصنفة. لتحقيق هذا الهدف ، نستفيد من نموذج اللغة المتقدم المدرب مسبقًا لاستخراج الميزات الدلالية لكل مستند. علاوة على ذلك ، نحن نستخدم شبكة عصبية لرسم بياني لوضع العلامات على الحواف لنمذجة ضمنيًا التشابه داخل المجموعة والاختلاف بين المجموعات في المستندات. أخيرًا ، نأخذ نتائج الشبكة العصبية للرسم البياني كمدخل لشبكة نموذجية لتصنيف النصوص غير المسماة. نتحقق من فعالية طريقتنا في مجموعة بيانات تحليل المشاعر ومجموعة بيانات تصنيف العلاقة ونحقق أحدث أداء في كلتا المهمتين.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo método de clasificación de textos de pocos planos. En comparación con los métodos de aprendizaje supervisado que requieren un gran corpus de documentos etiquetados, nuestro método tiene como objetivo hacer posible clasificar el texto sin etiqueta con pocos datos etiquetados. Para lograr este objetivo, aprovechamos el modelo de lenguaje avanzado previamente entrenado para extraer las características semánticas de cada documento. Además, utilizamos una red neuronal de gráficos de etiquetado de bordes para modelar implícitamente la similitud entre clústeres y la disimilitud entre clústeres de los documentos. Finalmente, tomamos los resultados de la red neuronal gráfica como la entrada de una red prototípica para clasificar los textos sin etiqueta. Verificamos la eficacia de nuestro método en un conjunto de datos de análisis de sentimientos y un conjunto de datos de clasificación de relaciones y logramos el rendimiento más avanzado en ambas tareas.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode de classification de texte en quelques étapes. Par rapport aux méthodes d'apprentissage supervisé qui nécessitent un vaste corpus de documents étiquetés, notre méthode vise à permettre de classer du texte non étiqueté contenant peu de données étiquetées. Pour atteindre cet objectif, nous tirons parti d'un modèle de langage avancé pré-entraîné pour extraire les caractéristiques sémantiques de chaque document. De plus, nous utilisons un réseau neuronal de graphe d'étiquetage de bord pour modéliser implicitement la similitude intra-cluster et la dissimilitude inter-cluster des documents. Enfin, nous prenons les résultats du réseau de neurones du graphe comme entrée d'un réseau prototype pour classer les textes non étiquetés. Nous vérifions l'efficacité de notre méthode sur un ensemble de données d'analyse des sentiments et un ensemble de données de classification des relations et atteignons des performances de pointe pour les deux tâches.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um novo método de classificação de texto de poucas tomadas. Comparado com métodos de aprendizado supervisionado que requerem um grande corpus de documentos rotulados, nosso método visa tornar possível classificar textos não rotulados com poucos dados rotulados. Para atingir esse objetivo, aproveitamos o modelo avançado de linguagem pré-treinada para extrair as características semânticas de cada documento. Além disso, utilizamos uma rede neural de grafos de rotulagem de bordas para modelar implicitamente a similaridade intra-cluster e a dissimilaridade inter-cluster dos documentos. Por fim, tomamos os resultados da rede neural de grafos como entrada de uma rede prototípica para classificar os textos não rotulados. Verificamos a eficácia do nosso método em um conjunto de dados de análise de sentimentos e um conjunto de dados de classificação de relações e alcançamos o desempenho de última geração em ambas as tarefas.', 'zh': '本文中,有新少数镜头文本分类之法。 比于督文档之法,旨在使用少标数于未标之本而类可也。 所以然者,以高言取文档之语义也。 此外因边缘标记图神经网络以隐式拟文档集群内相似性、集群间差异性。 最后,以图神经网络为原型网络输,分类文本。 吾验吾法于情析数集和类数集上之有效性,而致先进之性于二务。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक नई कुछ-शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के तरीकों की तुलना में, जिनके लिए लेबल किए गए दस्तावेजों के एक बड़े कॉर्पस की आवश्यकता होती है, हमारी विधि का उद्देश्य कुछ लेबल किए गए डेटा के साथ बिना लेबल वाले पाठ को वर्गीकृत करना संभव बनाना है। इस लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने के लिए, हम प्रत्येक दस्तावेज़ की शब्दार्थ विशेषताओं को निकालने के लिए उन्नत पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल का लाभ उठाते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम इंट्रा-क्लस्टर समानता और दस्तावेजों की अंतर-क्लस्टर असमानता को स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडल करने के लिए एक एज-लेबलिंग ग्राफ न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करते हैं। अंत में, हम ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के परिणामों को एक प्रोटोटाइपिकल नेटवर्क के इनपुट के रूप में लेते हैं ताकि लेबल रहित ग्रंथों को वर्गीकृत किया जा सके। हम एक भावना विश्लेषण डेटासेट और एक संबंध वर्गीकरण डेटासेट पर हमारी विधि की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करते हैं और दोनों कार्यों पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем новый метод классификации текста с несколькими выстрелами. По сравнению с методами обучения под наблюдением, которые требуют большого объема маркированных документов, наш метод направлен на то, чтобы позволить классифицировать немаркированный текст с небольшим количеством маркированных данных. Для достижения этой цели мы используем расширенную предварительно обученную языковую модель для извлечения семантических особенностей каждого документа. Кроме того, мы используем графную нейронную сеть, обозначенную краями, чтобы неявно моделировать внутрикластерное сходство и межкластерное различие документов. Наконец, мы берем результаты нейронной сети графа в качестве входных данных прототипической сети для классификации немаркированных текстов. Мы проверяем эффективность нашего метода на наборе данных анализа настроений и наборе данных классификации отношений и достигаем самых современных результатов по обеим задачам.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh nua aicmithe téacs cúpla lámhaigh. I gcomparáid le modhanna foghlama maoirsithe a éilíonn corpas mór de dhoiciméid lipéadaithe, tá sé mar aidhm ag ár modh gur féidir téacs gan lipéad a rangú ar bheagán sonraí lipéadaithe. Chun an sprioc seo a bhaint amach, bainimid leas as ardmhúnla teanga réamhoilte chun gnéithe séimeantacha gach doiciméid a bhaint amach. Ina theannta sin, bainimid úsáid as gréasán néarach graif lipéadaithe imeall-chun samhlacha a dhéanamh go hintuigthe ar chosúlacht laistigh den bhraisle agus ar dhifríocht idir-chnuasach na ndoiciméad. Ar deireadh, glacaimid torthaí an ghra-ghréasáin néarachais mar ionchur líonra fréamhshamhail chun na téacsanna neamhlipéadaithe a rangú. Deimhnímid éifeachtacht ár modh ar thacar sonraí anailíse meon agus ar thacar sonraí aicmithe caidrimh agus bainimid amach an fheidhmíocht úrscothach ar an dá thasc.', 'ja': '本稿では、新たな数ショットテキスト分類法を提案する。多数のラベル付き文書を必要とする監督学習法と比較して、当社の方法は、ラベル付きデータの少ないラベルなしテキストの分類を可能にすることを目指しています。この目標を達成するために、高度な事前トレーニングを受けた言語モデルを活用して、各ドキュメントのセマンティック機能を抽出します。さらに、エッジ標識グラフのニューラルネットワークを利用して、ドキュメントのクラスター内の類似性とクラスター間の異同を暗黙的にモデル化します。最後に、グラフニューラルネットワークの結果をプロトタイプネットワークの入力として、ラベル付けされていないテキストを分類します。センチメント分析データセットとリレーションシップ分類データセットに対するメソッドの有効性を検証し、両方のタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ახალი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მეტი. ჩვენი მეთოდის მიზეზი იქნება შესაძლებელად კლასიფიკაცია არაფერი ტექსტის ცოტატით, რომელიც საჭიროდ დიდი კოპუსი მარტივი დოკუმენტების შესახებ. ამ მიზეზის გავაკეთოთ, ჩვენ ყველა დოკუმენტის სიმემანტიკური ფუნქციების გამოყენებას გამოვიყენებთ წინასწარმოადგენული ენის მოდელზე. დამატებით, ჩვენ გამოიყენებთ წინ-ლაბლიერების ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც ინტერე-კლასტრის სხვადასხვა და დოკუმენტის შორის კლასტრის განსხვავება. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ გრაფიკის ნეიროლური ქსელის შესახებ როგორც პროტიპური ქსელის შესახებ, როგორც კლასიფიკური ტექსტის შესახებ. ჩვენ დავწერეთ ჩვენი მეტის ეფექტიურობა სენტიმენტების ანალიზიციის მონაცემების და კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემების კონფიკაციის კონფიკაციის კონფიკაციის კონფიკაციის კონფიკაცია', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új néhány felvételű szövegosztályozási módszert javasolunk. A felügyelt tanulási módszerekkel összehasonlítva, amelyek nagy mennyiségű címkézett dokumentumokat igényelnek, módszerünk célja, hogy lehetővé tegye a címke nélküli szövegek csekély címkézett adattal történő osztályozását. E cél eléréséhez a fejlett, előre képzett nyelvi modellt használjuk ki, hogy kivonjuk az egyes dokumentumok szemantikai jellemzőit. Továbbá egy élcímkéző gráf neurális hálózatot használunk arra, hogy implicit módon modellezzük a klaszteren belüli hasonlóságot és a klaszterek közötti eltéréseket. Végezetül a gráf neurális hálózat eredményeit egy prototípus hálózat bemenetének vesszük a címke nélküli szövegek osztályozására. Ellenőrizzük módszerünk hatékonyságát sentiment elemzési adatkészleten és kapcsolatosztályozási adatkészleten, és mindkét feladatban elérjük a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο ταξινόμησης κειμένου λίγων πυροβολισμών. Σε σύγκριση με τις εποπτευόμενες μεθόδους μάθησης που απαιτούν ένα μεγάλο σώμα επισήμαντων εγγράφων, η μέθοδος μας στοχεύει να καταστήσει δυνατή την ταξινόμηση του μη επισήμαντου κειμένου με λίγα επισήμαντα δεδομένα. Για την επίτευξη αυτού του στόχου, αξιοποιούμε το προηγμένο προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο γλώσσας για την εξαγωγή των σημασιολογικών χαρακτηριστικών κάθε εγγράφου. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο γραφήματος για να μοντελοποιήσουμε έμμεσα την ομοιότητα εντός συμπλέγματος και την ανομία μεταξύ συμπλέγματος. Τέλος, παίρνουμε τα αποτελέσματα του νευρωνικού δικτύου γραφήματος ως την εισαγωγή ενός πρωτοτύπου δικτύου για να ταξινομήσουμε τα μη επισημασμένα κείμενα. Ελέγχουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων και σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων ταξινόμησης σχέσεων και επιτυγχάνουμε την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση και στις δύο εργασίες.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di classificazione del testo a poche riprese. Rispetto ai metodi di apprendimento supervisionati che richiedono un ampio corpus di documenti etichettati, il nostro metodo mira a rendere possibile la classificazione di testi non etichettati con pochi dati etichettati. Per raggiungere questo obiettivo, utilizziamo un modello linguistico avanzato pre-addestrato per estrarre le caratteristiche semantiche di ogni documento. Inoltre, utilizziamo una rete neurale del grafico edge-labeling per modellare implicitamente la somiglianza intra-cluster e la dissimilità inter-cluster dei documenti. Infine, prendiamo i risultati della rete neurale grafica come input di una rete prototipale per classificare i testi non etichettati. Verifichiamo l'efficacia del nostro metodo su un set di dati di analisi sentiment e su un set di dati di classificazione delle relazioni e raggiungiamo le prestazioni all'avanguardia su entrambi i compiti.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naują kelių nuotraukų teksto klasifikavimo metodą. Palyginti su prižiūrimais mokymosi metodais, kuriems reikalingas didelis etiketėmis pažymėtų dokumentų rinkinys, mūsų metodu siekiama sudaryti galimybę neklasifikuoti neklasifikuotą tekstą su nedaug pažymėtų duomenų. Kad pasiektume šį tikslą, naudosimės pažangiu iš anksto parengtu kalbos modeliu, kad ištrauktume kiekvieno dokumento semantines savybes. Be to, mes naudojame kraštus žymintį grafinį nervinį tinklą netiesiogiai modeliuojant klasterio panašumą ir dokumentų skirtingumą. Galiausiai mes vertiname grafiko nervinio tinklo rezultatus kaip prototipinio tinklo įėjimą klasifikuoti nenurodytus tekstus. Patikriname savo metodo veiksmingumą su sentiment ų analizės duomenų rinkiniu ir santykių klasifikavimo duomenų rinkiniu ir siekiame pažangiausių rezultatų abiejose užduotyse.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник предложуваме нов метод за класификација на неколку снимки. Во споредба со надгледуваните методи на учење кои бараат голем куп обележани документи, нашиот метод има за цел да овозможи класификација на необележан текст со малку обележани податоци. To achieve this goal, we take advantage of advanced pre-trained language model to extract the semantic features of each document.  Покрај тоа, употребуваме графична нервна мрежа за имплицитно да ја моделираме внатрешната сличност на групата и интергрупната разлика на документите. Конечно, ги земаме резултатите од нервната мрежа на графот како влог на прототипична мрежа за да ги класификуваме неозначените тексти. Ја верификуваме ефективноста на нашиот метод на сентиментална анализа на податоци и класификациска податока на односите и ја постигнуваме најновата извршност на двете задачи.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз жаңа бірнеше мәтін классификациясының әдісін ұсынамыз. Құжаттардың үлкен корпус қажет ететін бақылау әдістерімен салыстырылып, әдіміз кейбір мәтінді белгілі деректермен классификациялау мүмкін болады. Бұл мақсатты жеткізу үшін, біз әрбір құжаттың semantiкалық қасиеттерін тарқату үшін алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгісінің артықшылығын қолданамыз. Қосымша, біз график жарлығын белгілеу графикасын құжаттардың ішкі кластердің ұқсастығын және кластердің арасындағы ұқсастығын үлгілеу үшін қолданамыз. Соңында, графикалық невралдық желінің нәтижесін прототипикалық желінің келтіріміз үшін келтірілмеген мәтіндерді классификациялау үшін аламыз. Біз өзіміздің әдіміміздің сезімдік анализ деректер жиынына және қатынастық классификациялық деректер жиынын тексеріп, екі тапсырмалардың күйінде жұмыс істеу әрекетін жеткіземіз.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah pengeklasifikasi teks beberapa tembakan baru. Berbanding dengan kaedah pembelajaran yang dikendalikan yang memerlukan tubuh besar dokumen yang ditabel, kaedah kami bermaksud untuk memungkinkan untuk mengklasifikasikan teks tidak ditabel dengan sedikit data ditabel. Untuk mencapai tujuan ini, kita mengambil keuntungan dari model bahasa terlatih-terlatih maju untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri semantik setiap dokumen. Selain itu, kami menggunakan rangkaian saraf graf yang mengetikkan pinggir untuk secara implicit model persamaan intra-cluster dan ketidaksamaan antara cluster dokumen. Akhirnya, kita ambil keputusan rangkaian saraf graf sebagai input rangkaian prototipik untuk mengklasifikasikan teks tanpa label. Kami mengesahkan kegunaan kaedah kami pada set data analisis perasaan dan set data klasifikasi hubungan dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada kedua-dua tugas.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ചില വെടിയുടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഒരു വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, കുറച്ച് ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് ഡേറ്റ ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം എത്തിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ ഉപയോഗം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ രേഖയുടെയും സെമ അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മുകളിലുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് ലേബിള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. രേഖകളുടെ ഇന്റര്\u200d-ക്ലസ്റ്റിന്റെ പോലെയും  അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിക്കല്\u200d നെറ്റെര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കിലെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ആക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയുടെ പ്രവർത്തിയാണ്, ഒരു വികാരശ്വാസവും ഒരു ബന്ധവിഭാഗവിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റും നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test b’ftit fotografiji. Meta mqabbel ma’ metodi ta’ tagħlim sorveljati li jeħtieġu korpus kbir ta’ dokumenti ttikkettati, il-metodu tagħna għandu l-għan li jagħmilha possibbli li jiġi kklassifikat test mhux ittikkettat b’ftit dejta ttikkettata. Biex nilħqu dan l-għan, aħna nużaw mudell ta’ lingwa avvanzat imħarreġ minn qabel biex nistraħħu l-karatteristiċi semantiċi ta’ kull dokument. Barra minn hekk, aħna nużaw netwerk newrali tal-grafika li tikketta t-tarf biex jimmudellaw impliċitament is-similarità intra-raggruppament u d-dissimilarità bejn raggruppamenti tad-dokumenti. Fl-a ħħar nett, aħna nieħdu r-riżultati tan-netwerk newrali tal-graff bħala l-input ta’ netwerk prototipiku biex nikklassifikaw it-testi mingħajr tikketta. Aħna jivverifikaw l-effettività tal-metodu tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta dwar l-analiżi tas-sentimenti u sett ta’ dejta dwar il-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet u niksbu l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fiż-żewġ kompiti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг шинэ хэдэн зураг бичсэн хэвлэлийн аргыг санал болгож байна. Эхлээдэг суралцах аргыг харьцуулахад бидний арга нь томоохон бичил баримт хэрэгтэй том корпус юм. Бидний арга нь хэд хэдэн нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийг бичиж чадахгүй бичил бичиг бичиж чаддаг. Энэ зорилго хүртэхийн тулд бид баримт бүрийн семантик чанарыг гаргах хөгжсөн хэл загварын ашиг ашигладаг. Үүнээс гадна бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний гадаргуу-маркингийн график ашиглаж баримтуудын доторх хэлбэртэй адилтгалыг загварчлахын тулд баримтуудын доторх хэлбэртэй адилтгалыг ашиглаж байна. Эцэст нь бид графикийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үр дүнг ангилах боломжгүй текстүүдийг ангилах прототик сүлжээний оролцоо гэж үздэг. Бид сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээний өгөгдлийн сангийн үр дүнтэй байдлыг шалгаж, хуваалцах өгөгдлийн сангийн холбоотой холбоотой байдлын үйл ажиллагааг хоёр даалгаврыг хүргэж чадна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową metodę klasyfikacji tekstów kilku ujęć. W porównaniu z metodami nauki nadzorowanej, które wymagają dużego korpusu oznakowanych dokumentów, nasza metoda ma na celu umożliwienie klasyfikacji tekstu nieoznakowanego z niewieloma oznakowanymi danymi. Aby osiągnąć ten cel, wykorzystujemy zaawansowany wstępnie przeszkolony model językowy do wyodrębnienia cech semantycznych każdego dokumentu. Ponadto wykorzystujemy wykres znakowania krawędzi do domyślnego modelowania podobieństwa wewnątrz klastra i różnicy między klastrami dokumentów. Na koniec bierzemy wyniki sieci neuronowej wykresu jako wejście prototypowej sieci do klasyfikacji nieoznakowanych tekstów. Weryfikujemy skuteczność naszej metody na zbiorze danych analizy sentymentów i klasyfikacji relacji oraz osiągamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki w obu zadaniach.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny tekstklassifikasjonsmetode. Sammenlignet med oversikte læringsmetodar som krev ein stor korpus av merkelige dokument, målet vår metode gjer det mulig å klassifisera ikkje merkelige tekst med få merkelige data. For å oppnå dette målet, bruker vi avansert språk- modell for å pakka ut semantiske funksjonane av kvar dokument. I tillegg bruker vi eit kantetikettingsgraf for neuralnettverk for å implisitert modellere ulikheten med inneklosteret og ulikheten av dokumenta. I slutt, vi tar resultatet av grafen for neuralnettverket som inndata av eit prototypisk nettverk for å klassifisera dei ubemerkte tekstane. Vi kontrollerer effektiviteten av metoden vårt på ein dataset for sentimentanalyser og ein relasjonsklassifikasjonsdata og oppnår det er tilstanden for kunsten på begge oppgåver.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o nouă metodă de clasificare a textelor cu câteva fotografii. În comparație cu metodele de învățare supravegheate care necesită un corp mare de documente etichetate, metoda noastră își propune să facă posibilă clasificarea textului fără etichete cu puține date etichetate. Pentru a atinge acest obiectiv, profităm de modelul lingvistic avansat pre-instruit pentru a extrage caracteristicile semantice ale fiecărui document. Mai mult decât atât, utilizăm o rețea neurală grafică de etichetare a marginilor pentru a modela implicit similitudinea intra-cluster și diferența inter-cluster a documentelor. În cele din urmă, luăm rezultatele rețelei neurale grafice ca intrare a unei rețele prototipice pentru clasificarea textelor fără etichete. Verificăm eficacitatea metodei noastre pe un set de date de analiză sentimentală și pe un set de date de clasificare a relațiilor și obținem performanțe de ultimă generație în ambele sarcini.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu klasifikacije teksta. U usporedbi s nadzornim metodama učenja koji zahtevaju veliki korpus označenih dokumenta, naša metoda je cilj da omogućuje klasifikaciju nenabeliranog teksta sa nekoliko označenih podataka. Da bismo postigli ovaj cilj, iskoristili smo napredni predobučeni jezički model da izvučemo semantične karakteristike svakog dokumenta. Osim toga, iskoristili smo neuralnu mrežu grafa označavanja granica da bi implicitno modeli sličnost unutar klastara i međuklasternu nesličnost dokumenta. Konačno, uzimamo rezultate grafa neuralne mreže kao ulaz prototipične mreže da klasifikujemo neopisene tekste. Potvrđujemo učinkovitost našeg metoda na setu podataka za analizu sentiment a i setu podataka za klasifikaciju odnosa i ostvarimo stanje umjetnosti na oba zadatka.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් වෙඩි තියාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂණ විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණය කරලා ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමඟ සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන ලේබල් කරලා තියෙ මේ අරමුණ වෙනුවෙන්, අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල් එක්ක හැම ලිපිණියේ සෙම තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලේබලින් ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් භාවිතා කරනවා ඇතුළු ක්ලාස්ටර් වගේ සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සහ ලේබ අන්තිමේදි, අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරොටෝපික ජාලයේ ඇතුළු විදියට ගත්තා අනිකිරීම් ලිපිම් වල්  අපි අපේ විධානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ දත්ත සැට සහ සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණ දත්ත සැට සම්බන්ධයක් පරීක්ෂණ කරනව', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qoran, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab kale oo qoraal-fasax ah. Isbarbardhig ahaan qaababka waxbarashada oo loo baahan yahay dukumentiyada waaweyn oo la qoray, qaabkeenkeenu wuxuu u baahan yahay in ay u fasaxo macluumaad aan la lab lahayn oo ay ku qoran macluumaad yar oo la qoray. Si aan u gaadhno goalkan, waxaynu u isticmaalaynaa modelka afka hore oo la tababaray si aan u soo bixino tababarka labada dukumenti. Furthermore, waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakadda neurada ee qoriga ah si aan u sameynno tusaale ahaan u siman xarunta iyo isbedelashada dukumentiyada dhexdooda. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu u qaadannaa midhihiisa shabakadda neurada ah sida input ka mid ah shabakadda tusaale ahaan si aan u fasaxno qoraalka aan la qorin. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa awooddayada ku saabsan baaritaanka kaleemeysiga iyo taariikhda fasalka ee xiriirka iyo sameynta sameynta farshaxanka labada shaqaalaha.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi en ny metod för textklassificering. Jämfört med övervakade inlärningsmetoder som kräver en stor samling märkta dokument syftar vår metod till att göra det möjligt att klassificera otydlig text med få märkta data. För att uppnå detta mål drar vi nytta av avancerad förklädd språkmodell för att extrahera de semantiska funktionerna i varje dokument. Dessutom använder vi ett edge-labeling graf neuralt nätverk för att implicit modellera intra-kluster likhet och inter-kluster olikhet mellan dokumenten. Slutligen tar vi resultaten av grafens neurala nätverk som ingång till ett prototypiskt nätverk för att klassificera de omärkta texterna. Vi verifierar effektiviteten av vår metod på ett sentimentalanalysdataset och en relationsklassificeringsdataset och uppnår den senaste prestandan på båda uppgifterna.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய சில துடைக்கப்பட்ட உரை வகுப்பு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கல்விப்பாட்டு முறைகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறது, அது ஒரு பெரிய குறிப்பிட்ட ஆவணங்கள் தேவைப்படுகிறது, எங்கள் முறையில் அதை சில குறிப்ப இந்த இலக்கை நிறைவேற்ற, நாம் முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி ஒவ்வொரு ஆவணத்தின் அரைப்புரிய தன்மைகளை வெளியேற அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் ஒரு விளிம்பு வரைபடத்தின் புதிய பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் அதே போன்ற மாதிரிகளை மாதிரிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் ஆவணங்களின்  Finally, we take the results of the graph neural network as the input of a prototypical network to classify the unlabeled texts.  நாம் ஒரு உணர்வு ஆய்வு தகவல் அமைப்பு மற்றும் ஒரு தொடர்பு வகைப்பு தரவு அமைப்பில் எங்கள் முறையின் விளைவை சரிபார்க்கிறோம் மற்றும் இரு பணிகள', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک نوی تھوڑی سیٹ ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں۔ ان کی مطابق نظارت کی سیکھنے کی طریقے سے مقایسہ ہوتے ہیں جو لکھی ہوئی دفتروں کی ایک بڑی کورپوس کی ضرورت رکھتے ہیں، ہمارے طریقے کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ اس طریقے سے بہت کم لکھی ہوئی دفتروں کے ساتھ بغیر لکھی ہوئی مت اس مقصد کو پہنچانے کے لئے، ہم ہر دفتر کے سیمانٹی ویٹیوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے پیش آموزش کی زبان کی مدل سے فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک کنارہ لیبلینگ گراف نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ان کے درمیان کلسٹر کی مثالی اور مدارک کے درمیان کلسٹر کی مختلفیت کی مدارک کریں۔ آخر میں، ہم گراف نیورال نیٹ ورک کے نتائج کو ایک پروٹوٹیپٹی نیٹ ورک کے اندر لیتے ہیں کہ بغیر معلوم پیغام کو کلاس کریں۔ ہم اپنے طریقے کے مثبت کو ایک احساس تحلیل ڈیٹ سٹ اور ایک رابطہ کرلیسی ڈیٹ سٹ پر ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں اور دونوں کاموں پر موجود رہتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz yangi bir necha ko'pchilik matn classifikasining usulini davom qilamiz. Koʻrsatilgan o'rganish usullar bilan bir katta qoʻshish qoʻllanmalar kerak boʻlgan, bizning usuli yordamida qo'shimcha maʼlumot yordamida hech qancha qoʻllanmagan matnni moslash mumkin. Bu maqsad amalga oshirish uchun, biz bir hujjatning semantik xususiyatlarini olish uchun oldin o'rganilgan tillar modelidan foydalanamiz. Ko'rsatganda, biz qo'yish grafik neyron tarmoqdan foydalanamiz, bu hujjatlarning tarkibini o'xshash va qo'llangan tarmoqning orasidagi tarmoqni o'zgartirish mumkin. Endi, biz tegilmagan matnlarni classifash uchun grafik neyrol tarmoqning natijalarini prototypical tarmoqning input qilamiz. Biz hisob-aniqlash maʼlumotlarini va taʼminlovchi taʼminotlar sohasini tekshirimiz va ikkita vazifalarga shaxsiy bajarish holatini bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp phân loại văn bản mới. So với các phương pháp học được giám sát cần một tập lớn các tài liệu dán nhãn, phương pháp của chúng ta nhằm làm cho nó có thể phân loại văn bản không được dán nhãn với ít dữ liệu. Để đạt được mục tiêu này, chúng tôi tận dụng những mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo cao để trích nét chữ cổ điển của mỗi tài liệu. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi sử dụng một mạng lưới thần kinh cạnh hiệu để ngấm ngầm mô phỏng nét giống nhau trong cụm và sự khác nhau của các tài liệu. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi lấy kết quả của mạng lưới thần kinh đồ thị làm nội dung của một mạng lưới nguyên mẫu để phân loại các văn bản chưa được lắp. Chúng tôi kiểm tra xem phương pháp của chúng tôi có hiệu quả trong một bộ dữ liệu phân tích đa cảm và một bộ dữ liệu phân tích liên quan và đạt được thành quả tối tân về cả hai nhiệm vụ.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за класификация на текста с няколко изстрела. В сравнение с методите на контролирано обучение, които изискват голям корпус от етикетирани документи, нашият метод има за цел да направи възможно класифицирането на неетикетиран текст с малко етикетирани данни. За да постигнем тази цел, ние се възползваме от усъвършенстван предварително обучен езиков модел, за да извлечем семантичните характеристики на всеки документ. Освен това, ние използваме нервна мрежа за графично маркиране на ръбове, за да имплицитно моделираме вътрешноклъстерната сходство и междуклъстерната дисидентичност на документите. Накрая, вземаме резултатите от графичната невронна мрежа като вход на прототипна мрежа за класифициране на немаркираните текстове. Проверяваме ефективността на метода си върху набор от данни за анализ на сентимента и набор от данни за класификация на отношенията и постигаме най-съвременните резултати и при двете задачи.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe few-shot tekstclassificatiemethode voor. Vergeleken met begeleide leermethoden die een groot corpus gelabelde documenten vereisen, beoogt onze methode het mogelijk te maken om ongelabelde tekst met weinig gelabelde gegevens te classificeren. Om dit doel te bereiken, maken we gebruik van geavanceerd voorgetraind taalmodel om de semantische kenmerken van elk document te extraheren. Verder gebruiken we een edge-labeling graph neural network om impliciet de intra-cluster gelijkenis en de inter-cluster ongelijkheid van de documenten te modelleren. Tot slot nemen we de resultaten van het grafiekneurale netwerk als de input van een prototypisch netwerk om de niet-gelabelde teksten te classificeren. We verifiëren de effectiviteit van onze methode op een sentimentanalyse dataset en een relatieklassificatie dataset en bereiken de state-of-the-art prestaties op beide taken.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu klasifikacije teksta. U usporedbi s nadzornim metodama učenja koji zahtijevaju veliki korpus označenih dokumenta, naša metoda je cilj omogućiti klasifikaciju nenabeliranog teksta sa nekoliko označenih podataka. Da bi postigli ovaj cilj, iskoristili smo napredni predobučeni jezički model kako bi izvukli semantičke karakteristike svakog dokumenta. Osim toga, koristimo graf označavanja granica neuralne mreže kako bi implicitno modeli sličnost unutar klastara i međuskupinu različitosti dokumenta. Konačno, uzimamo rezultate grafa neuralne mreže kao ulaz prototipične mreže kako bi klasifikirali neuobilježene tekste. Potvrđujemo učinkovitost našeg metoda na setu podataka za analizu osjećaja i setu podataka za klasifikaciju odnosa i ostvarimo učinkovitost stanja umjetnosti na oba zadatka.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny tekstklassifikationsmetode. Sammenlignet med overvågede læringsmetoder, der kræver et stort korpus af mærkede dokumenter, har vores metode til formål at gøre det muligt at klassificere ikke-mærket tekst med få mærkede data. For at nå dette mål udnytter vi avanceret forududdannet sprogmodel til at udtrække de semantiske funktioner i hvert dokument. Desuden bruger vi et edge-labeling graf neuralt netværk til implicit at modellere intra-klynge lighed og inter-klynge forskellighed mellem dokumenterne. Endelig tager vi resultaterne af grafens neurale netværk som input af et prototypisk netværk til at klassificere de ikke-mærkede tekster. Vi verificerer effektiviteten af vores metode på et sentimentalanalysedatasæt og et relationsklassificeringsdatasæt og opnår den nyeste ydeevne på begge opgaver.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neue Methode der Textklassifizierung vor. Im Vergleich zu überwachten Lernmethoden, die einen großen Korpus beschrifteter Dokumente erfordern, zielt unsere Methode darauf ab, unbeschrifteten Text mit wenigen beschrifteten Daten zu klassifizieren. Um dieses Ziel zu erreichen, nutzen wir fortgeschrittene vortrainierte Sprachmodelle, um die semantischen Merkmale jedes Dokuments zu extrahieren. Darüber hinaus verwenden wir ein Edge-Labeling Graph neuronales Netzwerk, um implizit die Intra-Cluster Ähnlichkeit und Inter-Cluster Ungleichheit der Dokumente zu modellieren. Schließlich nehmen wir die Ergebnisse des neuronalen Graphen-Netzes als Eingabe eines prototypischen Netzes, um die nicht beschrifteten Texte zu klassifizieren. Wir verifizieren die Effektivität unserer Methode auf einem Stimmungsanalyse-Datensatz und einem Relationsklassifikationsdatensatz und erreichen die State-of-the-Art Performance bei beiden Aufgaben.', 'ko': '본고는 새로운 소렌즈 텍스트 분류 방법을 제시했다.대량의 표기 문서를 필요로 하는 감독 학습 방법에 비해 우리의 방법의 목표는 표기 데이터가 비교적 적은 상황에서 표기되지 않은 텍스트를 분류하는 것이다.이 목표를 실현하기 위해 우리는 고급 예훈련 언어 모델을 이용하여 모든 문서의 의미 특징을 추출한다.그 밖에 우리는 가장자리 표기도 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 문서의 簇 내 유사성과 簇 간의 차이성을 은밀하게 모델링한다.마지막으로 우리는 도형신경 네트워크의 결과를 원형 네트워크의 입력으로 삼아 표시되지 않은 텍스트를 분류한다.우리는 정서 분석 데이터 집합과 관계 분류 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법의 유효성을 검증했고 이 두 가지 임무에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia mpya ya usambazaji wa maandishi yanayopigwa risasi. Kulinganishwa na mbinu za kujifunza zinazohitaji viungo vikubwa vya nyaraka zilizowekwa, njia yetu inalenga kufanya iwezekanavyo kutangaza maandishi yasiyopatikana na takwimu chache zilizowekwa. Ili kufikia lengo hili, tunatumia utoaji wa mifano ya lugha iliyoendelea kabla ya kujifunza ili kutengeneza vipengele vya sekunde vya kila nyaraka. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatumia mtandao wa neura unaotumia maarufu wa upande wa picha ili kuonyesha kwa ufafanuzi wa viungo vya ndani na utofauti wa nyaraka. Mwisho, tunachukua matokeo ya mtandao wa neurali wa grafu kama input wa mtandao wa mitandao ya mifano kwa ajili ya kutangaza ujumbe usioeleweka. Tunaweza kuthibitisha ufanisi wa njia yetu katika uchambuzi wa taarifa za hisia na taarifa za usambazaji wa mahusiano na kupata hali ya sanaa katika kazi zote hizo.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش جدید مختصات متن جدید. در مقایسه با روش یادگیری که نیاز به یک قالب بزرگ از سند یادگیری شده است، روش ما هدف می\u200cکند که بتوانیم متن غیرقابل نوشته را با چند داده\u200cهای یادگیری کلاس کنیم. برای رسیدن به این هدف، ما از مدل پیش آموزش زبان پیشرفته استفاده می کنیم تا ویژه های semantic از هر سند خارج کنیم. علاوه بر این، ما یک شبکه عصبی با برچسب برچسب\u200cهای لبه استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا به صورت مثال شبیه\u200cی داخل کلاستر و اختلاف بین کلاستر از مدارک\u200cها را بصورت مثال بصورت قابل توجه کنیم. بالاخره، نتیجه شبکه عصبی گراف را به عنوان ورودی شبکه پروتطبیعی برای کلاس کردن متن غیرقابل نوشته می گیریم. ما فعالیت روش خود را بر یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای تحلیل احساسات و یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مختصات رابطه ثابت می\u200cکنیم و به انجام وضعیت هنر در هر دو وضعیت رسیدیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz täze birnäçe atly metin klasifikasy yöntemi teklip edýäris. Etiketlenmiş desktaplar üçin uly korpus gerekli öwrenmek yöntemleri bilen karşılaştyrylýar. Biziň metodamyz, sözlemeýän metinleri birnäçe etitlenmiş data bilen klasifik etmek üçin mümkin edýär. Bu maksady ýetmek üçin, her senediň semantik özelliklerini açmak üçin öňünden öňünden öňünden bilim nusgyny ulanýarys. Daha da, biz bir çizgi etiketlemeli grafik nöral ağdan intra-cluster benzeri hatlaryny ve klastörler arasynda senediň beňikliklerini ullanýarys. Soňunda, çizginiň netijesini prototipik a ňyň girişi bolup ýazylmayan metinleri klasifik etmek üçin grafikiň netijesini alýarys. Biz duýgular analyzasynda durmuşymyzyň etkinliýetini we klasifikasiýa veri setirinde barlap barlaşyklaryny barlaýarys we her iki zadyň durumyny ýetip bileris.', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe paar skoot teks klassifikasie metode. Vergelyk met ondersoekte leermeetode wat 'n groot korpus van gemerkte dokumente benodig, ons metode doen doen dit moontlik om ongemerkte teks te klassifiseer met paar gemerkte data. Om hierdie doel te bereik, neem ons voordeel van gevorderde taal model om die semantiese funksies van elke dokument te uitpak. Ons gebruik ook 'n rand-etiket graaf neuralnetwerk om inplisite modele te model die intra-cluster gelykbaarheid en die inter-cluster verskynlik van die dokumente. Eindelik neem ons die resultate van die graaf neuralnetwerk as die invoer van 'n prototipiese netwerk om die ongeabelde teks te klassifiseer. Ons bevestig die effektiviteit van ons metode op 'n sentimentanaliseerdatasset en 'n verwanting klassifiseerdatasset en die staat-van-kunstens-prestasie op beide taak bereik.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re klasifikimi teksti me disa foto. Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data.  To achieve this goal, we take advantage of advanced pre-trained language model to extract the semantic features of each document.  Përveç kësaj, ne përdorim një rrjet nervor grafik që etiketon kufijtë për të modeluar implicitisht ngjashmërinë brenda klasterit dhe dallimin ndërklasterit e dokumenteve. Më në fund, ne marrim rezultatet e rrjetit nervor grafik si hyrje e një rrjeti prototipik për të klasifikuar tekstet pa etiketë. Ne verifikojmë efektshmërinë e metodës sonë në një sërë të dhënash për analizën e ndjenjave dhe një sërë të dhënash për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve dhe arrijmë performancën më të lartë në të dy detyrat.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ አዲስ አዲስ የጽሑፍ መክፈቻ ማድረግ እናስባለን፡፡ በተጠበቀው ትምህርት ሥርዓት የቆርፎ ሰነድ ማድረግ በሚያስፈልገው ትልቅ ሥርዓት ይተካክል፣ የሥርዓታችን ጽሑፍ በጥቂት የጽሑፍ ዳታ መክፈት እንዲችል ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን አግዳጅ ለማግኘት፣ ለፊተኛ ተማሪ የቋንቋ ሞዴል ለሁሉም ሰነድ የsemantic ፊደሎች ለመውጣት እናጠቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ፣ የግልፍ ባሕላዊ መረብ እና የሰነዱን ሰነዱን እና በክፍለ ግንኙነት እና የክፍለ ጉንኙነቱን ትልቅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ የግራፍ ናውራዊ መረብ ፍሬዎችን ለመዘርጋት ያልተጻፈውን ጽሑፎች ለመግለጥ የፕሮቶግራሚካል መረብ ውስጥ እንደሚገባ እንወስዳለን፡፡ የስሜት አዳራሲ እና የግንኙነት የመለኪያ ዳታዎችን እና በሁለቱም ስራ ላይ የአርድ-አርእስትን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নতুন কিছু গুলি টেক্সট ক্লাস্ফিকেশন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি। পর্যবেক্ষিত শিক্ষা পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনায়, যা লেবেলেড ডকুমেন্টের বিশাল কোর্পাসের প্রয়োজন, আমাদের মাধ্যমের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে যে এটি কিছু লেবেল এই লক্ষ্য অর্জনের জন্য আমরা পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের সুবিধা ব্যবহার করি প্রত্যেক নথির সেমেন্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি প্রান্ত-লেবেলিং নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করি এই নথিগুলোর মধ্যে ক্লাস্টারের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ধরনের মডে শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা গ্রাফ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের ফলাফল গ্রহণ করি একটি প্রোটোটোটিপিক্যাল নেটওয়ার্কের ইনপুট হিসেবে, যাতে আমরা অলাইন লেবেল আমরা অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের তথ্য এবং সম্পর্ক ক্লাসাফিকেশন ডাটাসেটের উপর আমাদের পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম নিশ্চিত করি এবং দুই কাজের উপর শিল্পের অবস্থা প', 'az': 'Bu kağızda yeni bir neçə şəkildə mətn klasifikasyonu təklif edirik. Növbəti öyrənmək metodları ilə qarşılaşdırılmışdır ki, böyük bir korpus etiketlənmiş dökümlərə ehtiyac edir. Bizim metodumuz, etiketlənmiş bir neçə məlumatla etiketlənmiş məlumatları klasifikə etmək istəyir. Bu məqsədi başa çatmaq üçün, hər dökümünün semantik özelliklərini çıxartmaq üçün öyrənmiş dil modelinin faydasını alırıq. Daha əlavə, biz səhifələrin arasındakı səhifələrin bənzərini və səhifələrin arasındakı səhifələri imkansız olaraq çöpü etiketli grafik nöral ağını istifadə edirik. Sonunda, grafının nöral a ğının sonuçlarını prototipik ağının girişi olaraq yazılmadığı məktubları classifik etmək üçün alırıq. Bizim metodumuzun hiss analizi veri quruluğu və ilişkisi klasifikasiya veri quruluğunu təsdiqləyirik və hər iki işdə sanat performansını yerinə yetiririk.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu klasifikacije teksta. U usporedbi s nadzornim metodama učenja koji zahtijevaju veliki korpus označenih dokumenta, naša metoda je cilj da omogućuje klasifikaciju nenabeliranog teksta sa nekoliko označenih podataka. Da bismo postigli ovaj cilj, iskoristili smo napredni predobučeni jezički model da izvučemo semantičke karakteristike svakog dokumenta. Osim toga, koristimo graf označavanja granica neuralne mreže da bi implicitno modeli sličnost unutar klastara i međuklasternu nesličnost dokumenta. Konačno, uzimamo rezultate grafa neuralne mreže kao ulaz prototipične mreže da klasifikujemo neopisene tekste. Potvrđujemo učinkovitost našeg metoda na setu podataka za analizu osjećanja i setu podataka za klasifikaciju odnosa i ostvarimo postupak države umjetnosti na oba zadatka.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu klasifikace několika záběrů textu. Ve srovnání s metodami supervizorovaného učení, které vyžadují velký korpus označených dokumentů, naše metoda si klade za cíl umožnit klasifikaci neoznačeného textu s několika označenými daty. K dosažení tohoto cíle využíváme pokročilý předškolený jazykový model k extrakci sémantických rysů každého dokumentu. Dále používáme grafovou neuronovou síť s označováním hran k implicitnímu modelování podobnosti intra-clusteru a meziclusterové odlišnosti dokumentů. Nakonec bereme výsledky grafové neuronové sítě jako vstup prototypické sítě pro klasifikaci neoznačených textů. Ověřujeme efektivitu naší metody na datovém souboru analýzy sentimentu a klasifikaci vztahů a dosahujeme nejmodernějšího výkonu obou úkolů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja uue mõne kaadri teksti klassifitseerimise meetodi. Võrreldes juhendatud õppemeetoditega, mis nõuavad suurt märgistatud dokumentide korpust, on meie meetod võimalik klassifitseerida märgistamata teksti vähese märgistatud andmetega. Selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks kasutame täiustatud eelõpetatud keelemudelit, et välja selgitada iga dokumendi semantilised omadused. Lisaks kasutame servamärgisega graafilise närvivõrku, et kaudselt modelleerida klastrisisest sarnasust ja klastridevahelist erinevust dokumentides. Lõpuks võtame graafilise närvivõrgu tulemused prototüüpilise võrgu sisendina, et klassifitseerida märgistamata tekste. Kontrollime oma meetodi efektiivsust sentimentaalüüsi andmekogumil ja seosklassifikatsiooni andmekogumil ning saavutame mõlemal ülesandel kaasaegse tulemuse.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta muutaman kuvan tekstin luokittelumenetelmää. Verrattuna ohjattuihin oppimismenetelmiin, jotka edellyttävät paljon merkittyjä asiakirjoja, menetelmämme pyrkii mahdollistamaan merkitsemättömän tekstin luokittelun pienellä merkinnällä varustetulla tiedolla. Tämän tavoitteen saavuttamiseksi hyödynnämme edistynyttä esikoulutettua kielimallia kunkin asiakirjan semanttisten ominaisuuksien selvittämiseksi. Lisäksi käytämme reunamerkintäkäyrän neuroverkkoa implisiittisesti mallintamaan klusterien sisäistä samankaltaisuutta ja klusterien välistä eroavaisuutta. Lopuksi otamme graafisen neuroverkon tulokset prototyypillisen verkon syötteenä luokittelemaan merkitsemättömät tekstit. Varmistamme menetelmämme tehokkuuden tunteiden analyysiaineistossa ja suhdeluokitusaineistossa ja saavutamme huipputason suorituskyvyn molemmissa tehtävissä.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode klasifikasi teks beberapa gambar baru. Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data.  Untuk mencapai tujuan ini, kita mengambil keuntungan dari model bahasa yang terlatih awal untuk mengekstrak fitur semantis setiap dokumen. Selain itu, kami menggunakan jaringan saraf grafik yang mengetikkan pinggir untuk secara implisitas model persamaan intra-klaster dan ketidakpersamaan interklaster dokumen. Akhirnya, kita mengambil hasil dari jaringan saraf grafik sebagai input dari jaringan prototipik untuk mengklasifikasi teks tanpa label. Kita mengkonfirmasi efektivitas metode kita pada set data analisis sentimen dan dataset klasifikasi hubungan dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada kedua tugas.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր թեքստի դասակարգման մեթոդ: Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data.  To achieve this goal, we take advantage of advanced pre-trained language model to extract the semantic features of each document.  Ավելին, մենք օգտագործում ենք գծագրային նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի միանգամայն մոդելավորենք փաստաթղթերի ինտեր-խմբերի նմանությունը և խմբերի ինտեր-խմբերի տարբերությունը: Վերջապես, մենք վերցնում ենք գրաֆիկի նեյրոնային ցանցի արդյունքները որպես նախատիպիկ ցանցի ներմուծք, որպեսզի դասակարգենք անգծված տեքստերը: Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը զգացմունքների վերլուծության տվյալների համակարգի և հարաբերությունների դասակարգման տվյալների համակարգի վրա և հասնում ենք երկու խնդիրների ամենաբարձր արդյունավետության:', 'ca': "In this paper, we propose a new few-shot text classification method.  Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data.  To achieve this goal, we take advantage of advanced pre-trained language model to extract the semantic features of each document.  A més, utilitzem una xarxa neural gràfica que etiqueta la vora per modelar implícitament la similitud intra-agrupació i la dissimilaritat entre agrupaments dels documents. Finally, we take the results of the graph neural network as the input of a prototypical network to classify the unlabeled texts.  Verifiquem l'eficacia del nostre mètode en un conjunt de dades d'anàlisi de sentiments i en un conjunt de dades de classificació de relacions i aconsegueixem el desempeny més avançat en ambdues tasques.", 'ha': "In this paper, we propose a new few-shot text classification method.  @ label: listbox Dõmin ku isa wannan goa, za mu yi amfani da misalin harshen da aka yi wa zaman-hakari dõmin mu fitar masu tsari na semantic na kowace takardar. Furan haka, za mu yi amfani da zanen jerin grafi mai taƙaita don ya sami daidai da intaa-clust da tsakanin-clust-tsakanin takardun. Ga ƙarshe, muna sami matsala na jerin neural kamar an shigar da wata shiri na misãlai dõmin su rarraba matsayin da ba'a rubutu ba. Tuna gaskata tayari na hanyoyinmu a kan anayyar danne na hisia da danne-danne da mazaɓa na danne-danganci kuma za'a sami halin-sanar kan aikin dukansu.", 'jv': 'Nang pebuk iki, kita mudhun jejaring Methode nggawe barang kelas-wae. Samsul karo sistem limitisan Mbok kuwi nggawe buku iki, awake dh챕w챕 luwih apik lan banjur kuwi model sing apik terus apik t챗pakan karo sematik dh챕w챕 nggawe tokkum. Label L챕wica, kita wis mbutuhak dadi mbutuhak graf nek netek dadi input sampek prototipik netek kanggo kelas liwih dumateng textin. Awak dh챕w챕 ng챗kak챕 efek barang ng챕w챕 챕ntuk dh챕w챕 ning dataset dadi nggawe barang nggambar ng챕w챕 kuwi tindakan dh챕w챕-ng챕w챕 kanggo ngerasakno state-of-the-arts seneng gawe nguasai winih dh챕w챕.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת קליפורת טקסט קטנה חדשה. Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data.  כדי להשיג את המטרה הזאת, אנו מנצלים מודל שפה מתקדם מואמן מראש כדי להוציא את האופיינים הסמנטיים של כל מסמך. חוץ מזה, אנו משתמשים ברשת עצבית של גראפ עם תווית קצה כדי לדוגמא באופן מילוי את הדמיון בתוך הקבוצה והדמיון בין הקבוצה של המסמכים. סוף סוף, אנו לוקחים את התוצאות של רשת העצבים הגרפית כתוצאה של רשת פרוטיפית כדי להקליף את הטקסטים הלא מוסמנים. אנו מאשרים את היעילות של השיטה שלנו על קבוצת נתוני ניתוח רגשות ומקבוצת נתוני סיווג יחסים ולהשיג את ההופעה המאודמת בשני המשימות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་འདྲ་པར་ཆས་པ་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་གསརཔ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Compared with supervised learning methods which require a large corpus of labeled documents, our method aims to make it possible to classify unlabeled text with few labeled data. དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལ་རྒྱས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་རེ་རེད་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང Furthermore, we use an edge-labeling graph neural network to implicitly models the intra-cluster similarity and the inter-cluster dissimilarity of the documents. མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཚོས་འབྲས་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲིག་གི་རྣམ་འགྱུར་བའི་མཐུད་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཞིག་ལ་སླར་འབྱུང་། ང་ཚོས་sentiment analysis dataset་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་ཅིག་བདེན་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predlagamo novo metodo klasifikacije besedila v nekaj posnetkih. V primerjavi z metodami nadzorovanega učenja, ki zahtevajo velik korpus označenih dokumentov, naša metoda želi omogočiti klasifikacijo neoznačenega besedila z malo označenih podatkov. Za dosego tega cilja izkoristimo napredni vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni model, da izvlečemo semantične značilnosti vsakega dokumenta. Za implicitno modeliranje podobnosti znotraj grozda in medgrozdne razlike dokumentov uporabljamo nevronsko omrežje za označevanje robov grafov. Rezultate grafičnega nevronskega omrežja vzamemo kot vhod prototipskega omrežja za klasifikacijo neoznačenih besedil. Učinkovitost naše metode preverjamo na naboru podatkov analize sentimentalnih analiz in naboru podatkov klasifikacije relacij ter dosegamo najsodobnejše delovanje pri obeh nalogah.'}
{'en': 'Automatically Identifying Words That Can Serve as Labels for Few-Shot Text Classification', 'ar': 'التعرف تلقائيًا على الكلمات التي يمكن أن تكون بمثابة تسميات لتصنيف نصي بلقطات قليلة', 'fr': "Identification automatique des mots pouvant servir d'étiquettes pour la classification de texte en quelques plans", 'pt': 'Identificando automaticamente palavras que podem servir como rótulos para classificação de texto de poucas fotos', 'es': 'Identificación automática de palabras que pueden servir como etiquetas para la clasificación de textos de pocas tomas', 'ja': '少ないショットのテキスト分類のラベルとして機能する単語を自動的に識別する', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूप से उन शब्दों की पहचान करना जो कुछ-शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए लेबल के रूप में कार्य कर सकते हैं', 'ru': 'Автоматическая идентификация слов, которые могут служить в качестве меток для классификации из нескольких снимков текста', 'zh': '自动识别可作少镜头文本分标单词', 'ga': 'Aithint Uathoibríoch Focail ar Féidir Fónamh leo mar Lipéid le haghaidh Aicmiú Téacs ar Is beag Urchar', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკურად განსაზღვრება სიტყვები, რომელიც შეუძლიათ გავამუშავოთ როგორც ცოტა ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის ლაბელი', 'el': 'Αυτόματη αναγνώριση λέξεων που μπορούν να χρησιμεύσουν ως ετικέτες για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών', 'hu': 'Szavak automatikus azonosítása, amelyek címkékként szolgálhatnak a kevés felvételes szövegosztályozáshoz', 'it': 'Identificazione automatica delle parole che possono servire come etichette per la classificazione di testo in pochi scatti', 'lt': 'Automatically Identifying Words That Can Serve as Labels for Few-Shot Text Classification', 'kk': 'Кейбір түрлі мәтін классификациясы үшін қызмет етілген сөздерді автоматты түрде анықтау', 'mk': 'Автоматски идентификување на зборови кои можат да служат како етикети за класификација на текст со неколку снимки', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni awtomatika ta’ kliem li jista’ jservi bħala Tikketti għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test bi Ftit Riżultati', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti perkataan yang boleh dilayani sebagai Label untuk Klasifikasi Teks Beberapa Tembakan secara Automatik', 'mn': 'Автоматтыг бага зэрэг хэлбэрийн тэмдэглэх үгсийг автоматаар мэдэх', 'no': 'Automatisk identifisering av ord som kan tenesta som merkelappar for små tekstklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Automatyczne identyfikowanie słów, które mogą służyć jako etykiety dla klasyfikacji tekstu niewielu ujęć', 'ro': 'Identificarea automată a cuvintelor care pot servi ca etichete pentru clasificarea textului cu câteva fotografii', 'sr': 'Автоматично идентифицирају речи које могу да служи као маркети за класификацију текста мало пута', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් පිළිබඳ ලේබෙල් වලින් සේවා කරන්න පුළුවන් වචන ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විශේෂය', 'so': 'Kalluumeyaasha si gaar ah loo aqoonsado', 'sv': 'Identifiera automatiskt ord som kan fungera som etiketter för textklassificering med några bilder', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tự động xác định từ có thể dùng làm nhãn cho hạng văn bản ít ảnh', 'bg': 'Автоматично идентифициране на думи, които могат да служат като етикети за класификация на няколко снимки текст', 'da': 'Automatisk identificering af ord, der kan fungere som etiketter til tekstklassificering med få billeder', 'nl': 'Automatisch identificeren van woorden die kunnen dienen als etiketten voor weinige tekstclassificatie', 'hr': 'Automatično identificiranje riječi koje mogu služiti kao etikete za klasifikaciju teksta manje pucanja', 'de': 'Automatische Identifizierung von Wörtern, die als Etiketten für die Klassifizierung von wenigen Bildern dienen können', 'id': 'Mengidentifikasi kata-kata yang dapat dilayani secara otomatis sebagai Label untuk Klasifikasi Teks Beberapa Tembakan', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '소량의 텍스트 분류 라벨로 사용할 수 있는 단어를 자동으로 식별하다', 'sw': 'Kutambua maneno ambayo yanaweza kutumika kama alama kwa ajili ya kutangaza maandishi madogo', 'tr': 'Aza Metin Sözleri üçin Etiketler ýaly Diňleri Otomatik Gaýd Edilýär', 'sq': 'Identifikimi automatik i fjalëve që mund të shërbejnë si etiketa për klasifikimin e tekstit me pak gjuajtje', 'af': "Automaties identifiseer woorde wat kan dien as etikette vir 'n paar skoot teks klassifisering", 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Automatic ID of Words', 'az': 'Yaxınlıq Metin Sınıfları üçün Etiketlər olaraq İfadə edə biləcək Sözləri Avtomatik Təşkil Et', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত শব্দ যা লেবেল হিসেবে সার্ভিস করতে পারে', 'bs': 'Automatski identificiranje riječi koje mogu služiti kao etikete za klasifikaciju teksta manje pucanja', 'ca': 'Identificar automàticament les paraules que poden servir com etiquetes per a la classificació de text amb poques fotos', 'cs': 'Automatická identifikace slov, která mohou sloužit jako štítky pro klasifikaci textu s několika záběry', 'et': 'Sõnade automaatne tuvastamine, mis võivad kasutada sildina vähese pildi teksti klassifitseerimisel', 'fi': 'Automaattinen tunnistaminen sanoja, jotka voivat toimia etiketeinä muutaman kuvan tekstin luokittelussa', 'jv': 'dockable-action', 'he': 'מזהה באופן אוטומטי מילים שיכולות לשרת כתובות להקליфікаציה טקסטית במעט יריות', 'sk': 'Samodejno prepoznavanje besed, ki lahko služijo kot oznake za razvrstitev besedila z nekaj posnetki', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐེངས་བསུབ་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་ཤོག་བྱང་སྦྱར་ཐུབ་པའི་ཡིག', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'A recent approach for few-shot text classification is to convert textual inputs to cloze questions that contain some form of task description, process them with a pretrained language model and map the predicted words to labels. Manually defining this mapping between words and labels requires both domain expertise and an understanding of the language model’s abilities. To mitigate this issue, we devise an approach that automatically finds such a mapping given small amounts of training data. For a number of tasks, the mapping found by our approach performs almost as well as hand-crafted label-to-word mappings.', 'ar': 'تتمثل الطريقة الحديثة لتصنيف النص في لقطات قليلة في تحويل المدخلات النصية لإخفاء الأسئلة التي تحتوي على شكل من أشكال وصف المهمة ، ومعالجتها باستخدام نموذج لغة تم اختباره مسبقًا وتعيين الكلمات المتوقعة إلى تسميات. يتطلب تحديد هذا التعيين يدويًا بين الكلمات والتسميات خبرة في المجال وفهمًا لقدرات نموذج اللغة. للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة ، نبتكر نهجًا يجد تلقائيًا مثل هذا التعيين في ضوء كميات صغيرة من بيانات التدريب. بالنسبة لعدد من المهام ، يؤدي التعيين الذي تم العثور عليه من خلال نهجنا تقريبًا كما هو الحال مع عمليات تعيين التسمية إلى كلمة المصنوعة يدويًا.', 'es': 'Un enfoque reciente para la clasificación de textos de pocos planos es convertir las entradas de texto en preguntas cloze que contienen algún tipo de descripción de tareas, procesarlas con un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado y asignar las palabras predichas a las etiquetas. La definición manual de este mapeo entre palabras y etiquetas requiere tanto experiencia en el dominio como comprensión de las habilidades del modelo lingüístico. Para mitigar este problema, diseñamos un enfoque que encuentra automáticamente dicho mapeo teniendo en cuenta pequeñas cantidades de datos de entrenamiento. Para una serie de tareas, el mapeo encontrado por nuestro enfoque funciona casi tan bien como los mapeos de etiqueta a palabra hechos a mano.', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem recente para classificação de texto de poucos tiros é converter entradas textuais em perguntas fechadas que contêm alguma forma de descrição de tarefa, processá-las com um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado e mapear as palavras previstas para rótulos. Definir manualmente esse mapeamento entre palavras e rótulos requer conhecimento de domínio e compreensão das habilidades do modelo de linguagem. Para mitigar esse problema, desenvolvemos uma abordagem que encontra automaticamente esse mapeamento com pequenas quantidades de dados de treinamento. Para várias tarefas, o mapeamento encontrado por nossa abordagem funciona quase tão bem quanto os mapeamentos de rótulo para palavra feitos à mão.', 'fr': "Une approche récente pour la classification de texte en petit nombre consiste à convertir les entrées textuelles en questions de clôture contenant une forme quelconque de description de tâche, à les traiter avec un modèle de langage préformé et à mapper les mots prédits sur des étiquettes. La définition manuelle de cette correspondance entre les mots et les étiquettes nécessite à la fois une expertise dans le domaine et une compréhension des capacités du modèle linguistique. Pour pallier ce problème, nous concevons une approche qui trouve automatiquement un tel mappage en fonction de petites quantités de données d'entraînement. Pour un certain nombre de tâches, le mappage trouvé par notre approche fonctionne presque aussi bien que les mappages étiquettes-mots fabriqués à la main.", 'zh': '近者少镜头文本分类之法,转输以封事,以预训语处之,映射单词标。 手动定义单词、标签之间,须专业知识域、言语相能。 为此一法,可于少量训练数自得之。 其于许多任务,吾法得映射几与工标单词映射同。', 'ja': '数ショットのテキスト分類の最近のアプローチは、テキスト入力を何らかの形式のタスク記述を含む質問に変換し、事前に訓練された言語モデルで処理し、予測された単語をラベルにマッピングすることです。単語とラベルの間のこのマッピングを手動で定義するには、ドメインの専門知識と言語モデルの能力の理解の両方が必要です。この問題を軽減するために、少量のトレーニングデータを考慮して、そのようなマッピングを自動的に見つけるアプローチを考案します。多くのタスクでは、私たちのアプローチによって見つかったマッピングは、手作業で作成されたラベルから単語へのマッピングとほぼ同じように実行されます。', 'hi': 'कुछ-शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए एक हालिया दृष्टिकोण पाठ्य इनपुट को क्लोज़ प्रश्नों में परिवर्तित करना है जिसमें कार्य विवरण के कुछ रूप होते हैं, उन्हें एक पूर्वप्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के साथ संसाधित करते हैं और अनुमानित शब्दों को लेबल में मैप करते हैं। शब्दों और लेबल के बीच इस मैपिंग को मैन्युअल रूप से परिभाषित करने के लिए डोमेन विशेषज्ञता और भाषा मॉडल की क्षमताओं की समझ दोनों की आवश्यकता होती है। इस समस्या को कम करने के लिए, हम एक दृष्टिकोण तैयार करते हैं जो स्वचालित रूप से प्रशिक्षण डेटा की छोटी मात्रा को देखते हुए इस तरह के मानचित्रण को पाता है। कई कार्यों के लिए, हमारे दृष्टिकोण द्वारा पाया गया मानचित्रण लगभग हाथ से तैयार किए गए लेबल-टू-वर्ड मैपिंग के साथ-साथ प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Недавним подходом к классификации текстов с несколькими снимками является преобразование текстовых входных данных для закрытия вопросов, которые содержат ту или иную форму описания задачи, их обработка с помощью предварительно обученной языковой модели и сопоставление прогнозируемых слов с метками. Ручное определение этого сопоставления между словами и метками требует как экспертизы домена, так и понимания способностей языковой модели. Чтобы смягчить эту проблему, мы разрабатываем подход, который автоматически находит такое отображение, учитывая небольшие объемы обучающих данных. Для ряда задач отображение, найденное нашим подходом, выполняет почти так же хорошо, как и отображение от метки к слову, выполненное вручную.', 'ga': 'Cur chuige le déanaí maidir le haicmiú téacs cúpla seat is ea ionchuir téacs a thiontú go ceisteanna a chuimsiú ina bhfuil cineál éigin de chur síos ar thasc, iad a phróiseáil le múnla teanga réamhoilte agus na focail thuartha a mhapáil go lipéid. Teastaíonn saineolas fearainn agus tuiscint ar chumas na samhla teanga chun an léarscáiliú seo idir focail agus lipéid a shainiú de láimh. Chun an tsaincheist seo a mhaolú, ceapaimid cur chuige a aimsíonn léarscáiliú den sórt sin go huathoibríoch i bhfianaise méideanna beaga sonraí oiliúna. I gcás roinnt tascanna, feidhmíonn an mhapáil a aimsíonn ár gcur chuige beagnach chomh maith le mapáil lipéad-go-focal lámhdhéanta.', 'hu': 'A néhány felvételű szövegosztályozás legújabb megközelítése a szöveges bemenetek átalakítása olyan kérdésekre, amelyek valamilyen formájú feladatleírást tartalmaznak, feldolgozzák őket egy előkészített nyelvmodell segítségével, és feltérképezik az előrejelzett szavakat címkékre. A szavak és címkék közötti leképezés manuális meghatározásához mind a domain szakértelmet, mind pedig a nyelvi modell képességeinek megértését igényli. A probléma enyhítése érdekében olyan megközelítést dolgozunk ki, amely a képzési adatok kis mennyiségének köszönhetően automatikusan megtalálja az ilyen térképet. Számos feladathoz a megközelítésünk által talált leképezés majdnem olyan jól végez, mint a kézzel készített címke-szó leképezések.', 'ka': 'ახალი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის ახალი პროგრამა არის ტექსტულ შემოწყობილობების გადაცვლა, რომელიც საკუთარ პარამეტრების გამოსახულების ფორმა აქვს, რომელიც განსახულებული ენის მოდელზე გადაპროც ეს მარტივის განსაზღვრება სიტყვების და ლაბეტების შორის ექსპერტიფიკაცია და ენის მოდელის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობას მოჭირდება. ამ პრობლემას შემცირებისთვის, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ მოხმარება, რომელიც ავტომატურად აღმოიძებნა ასეთი კაპრაფიკაცია, რომელიც განაკეთებული პატარა ზომა გან რამდენიმე დავალებისთვის, ჩვენი მოხმარებისთვის მიღებული კაპრაფიკაცია გავაკეთება დამატებით, როგორც ხელსაწყისთვის კაპრაფიკაცია.', 'el': 'Μια πρόσφατη προσέγγιση για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου με λίγες λήψεις είναι να μετατρέψετε τις εισαγωγές κειμένου σε ερωτήσεις που περιέχουν κάποια μορφή περιγραφής εργασιών, να τις επεξεργαστείτε με ένα προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο γλώσσας και να χαρτογραφήσετε τις προβλεπόμενες λέξεις σε ετικέτες. Ο χειροκίνητος ορισμός αυτής της αντιστοίχισης μεταξύ λέξεων και ετικετών απαιτεί τόσο την εξειδίκευση στον τομέα όσο και την κατανόηση των ικανοτήτων του γλωσσικού μοντέλου. Για να μετριάσουμε αυτό το ζήτημα, σχεδιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση που αυτόματα βρίσκει μια τέτοια χαρτογράφηση δεδομένης μικρών ποσοτήτων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Για μια σειρά εργασιών, η χαρτογράφηση που εντοπίστηκε από την προσέγγισή μας εκτελεί σχεδόν εξίσου καλά με τις χειροποίητες αντιστοιχίσεις ετικετών σε λέξεις.', 'it': 'Un approccio recente per la classificazione del testo a poche riprese è quello di convertire gli input testuali per bloccare le domande che contengono una qualche forma di descrizione delle attività, elaborarle con un modello linguistico pre-addestrato e mappare le parole previste su etichette. Definire manualmente questa mappatura tra parole ed etichette richiede sia competenze di dominio che una comprensione delle capacità del modello linguistico. Per mitigare questo problema, elaboriamo un approccio che trova automaticamente una tale mappatura data una piccola quantità di dati di allenamento. Per una serie di compiti, la mappatura trovata dal nostro approccio esegue quasi altrettanto mapping label-to-word artigianali.', 'kk': 'Кейбір түрлі мәтін классификациясының жаңа тәсілі - тапсырманың сипаттамасының кейбір түрлі сұрақтарын классификациялау үшін мәтін келтіріп, оларды алдын- алдын тіл үлгісімен өзгерту ж Сөздер мен жарлықтар арасындағы картасын қолмен анықтау домендің көбіректілігі мен тіл үлгісінің мүмкіндіктерін түсініктіру керек. Бұл мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін, біз автоматты түрде бұл сәйкес келтірілген кішкентай бөлім деректерін табу арқылы құрамыз. Кейбір тапсырмалар үшін, біздің қасиеттеріміздің картасының көмегімен қолмен құрылған белгілер мен сөздердің картасының көмегімен жасайды.', 'lt': 'Neseniai naudojamas kelių nuotraukų teksto klasifikavimo metodas yra tekstinių įrašų konvertavimas siekiant uždaryti klausimus, kuriuose yra tam tikros užduoties aprašymo formos, apdoroti juos iš anksto apmokytu kalbos modeliu ir paversti prognozuojamus žodžius etiketėmis. Šis žodžių ir etikečių žemėlapių nustatymas rankiniu būdu reikalauja tiek srities kompetencijos, tiek kalbos modelio gebėjimų supratimo. Siekdami sušvelninti šį klausimą, parengiame metodą, kuris automatiškai surastų tokį žemėlapį, atsižvelgiant į nedidelį mokymo duomenų kiekį. Tam tikroms užduotims mūsų metodu rastas žemėlapiavimas atliekamas beveik taip pat rankiniu būdu pažymėtas žemėlapis iš vieno žodžio į kitą.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешниот пристап за неколку снимки на класификација на текст е да се претворат текстуалните внесувања во затворање прашања кои содржат некоја форма на опис на задачата, да се процесираат со предобучен јазички модел и да се мапираат предвидени зборови на етикети. Рачно дефинирање на оваа мапа помеѓу зборовите и етикетите бара експертиза на доменот и разбирање на способностите на јазичкиот модел. За да го олесниме ова прашање, создаваме пристап кој автоматски ќе го најде ваквото мапирање со оглед на мали количини податоци за обука. За голем број задачи, мапирањето пронајдено од нашиот пристап извршува скоро исто како и рачно направени мапирања од етикета до збор.', 'ms': 'Pendekatan baru-baru ini untuk klasifikasi teks beberapa tembakan adalah untuk menukar input teks untuk menutup soalan yang mengandungi beberapa bentuk keterangan tugas, memprosesnya dengan model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu dan peta perkataan yang dijangka ke label. Mengefinisikan pemetaan ini secara manual diantara perkataan dan label memerlukan keahlian domain dan pemahaman kemampuan model bahasa. To mitigate this issue, we devise an approach that automatically finds such a mapping given small amounts of training data.  Untuk beberapa tugas, pemetaan yang ditemui oleh pendekatan kita melakukan hampir sama dengan pemetaan label-kepada-kata yang dibuat-tangan.', 'ml': 'ചില ജോലി വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്ന ചില ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി കുറച്ച് വെടിവാക്കുകളുടെ അടുത്തേക്കുള്ള ഒരു അടുത്ത പ്രായോഗ്യം മാറ വാക്കുകളും ലേബിളുകളും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഈ മാപ്പിങ്ങ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷവും ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ കഴിവുകളും മനസ് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ മുളക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ചെറിയ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുത്ത ഒരു മ ഒരുപാട് ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി, നമ്മുടെ അടുക്കല്\u200d നിന്നും കണ്ടെത്തിയ മാപ്പിങ്ങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കൈകൊണ്ടു', 'mt': 'Approċċ reċenti għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test b’ftit fotografiji huwa li l-inputs testwali jiġu kkonvertiti biex jingħalqu mistoqsijiet li fihom xi form a ta’ deskrizzjoni tal-kompitu, jiġu pproċessati b’mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel u jiġu mmappjati l-kliem imbassar fuq it-tikketti. Id-definizzjoni manwali ta’ dan l-immappjar bejn il-kliem u t-tikketti teħtieġ kemm għarfien espert fid-dominju kif ukoll fehim tal-ħiliet tal-mudell lingwistiku. Biex nimmitigaw din il-kwistjoni, a ħna nħejju approċċ li jsib awtomatikament tali mmappjar minħabba ammonti żgħar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. Għal għadd ta’ kompiti, l-immappjar misjub mill-approċċ tagħna jwettaq kważi kif ukoll immappjar bit-tikketta bil-kliem bl-idejn.', 'mn': 'Хэдхэн зурагтай текст хуваалцааны саяхан арга нь ажлын тодорхойлолтын нэг хэлбэртэй асуултуудыг хуваалцах боломжтой, тэднийг өмнөх хэл загвартай үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой үгсийг тэмдэглэх боломжтой. Энэ зураг үг болон маркилгуудын хоорондын холбоотой газрын зураг нь хэл загварын чадварыг ойлгох хэрэгтэй. Энэ асуудлыг багасгахын тулд бид автоматаар ийм газрын зураг олж чадах жижиг хэмжээний сургалтын өгөгдлийг олох арга зам төсөөлдөг. Зарим ажлын тулд бидний арга хэмжээний газрын зураг бараг бараг гар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй тэмдэглэгдсэн зураг зураг хийдэг.', 'no': 'Ein nyleg tilnærming for få-bilete tekstklassifikasjon er å konvertera tekstinndata til å klozera spørsmål som inneheld nokre form av oppgåvebeskrivelse, handterar dei med eit prøvespråk- modell og kartera dei foregåande ord til merkelappar. Å definere denne kartet manuelt mellom ord og merkelappar krev både domeneekspertisering og forståelse av praktiske modellen. For å redusera dette problemet, finn vi ein tilnærming som automatisk finn slik ei kartering gjeven små mengda opplæringsdata. For mange oppgåver utfører kartmappinga funnen av tilnærminga vårt nesten og handtekraft merkelappe til ordmappingar.', 'pl': 'Najnowszym podejściem do klasyfikacji tekstu kilku ujęć jest konwersja wejść tekstowych do zamykania pytań zawierających pewną formę opisu zadań, przetwarzanie ich za pomocą wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego i mapowanie przewidywanych słów na etykiety. Ręczne zdefiniowanie tego mapowania między słowami i etykietami wymaga zarówno wiedzy domeny, jak i zrozumienia umiejętności modelu językowego. Aby złagodzić ten problem, opracowujemy podejście, które automatycznie znajduje takie mapowanie przy niewielkich ilościach danych treningowych. W przypadku wielu zadań mapowanie znalezione przez nasze podejście wykonuje niemal równie dobrze, jak ręcznie tworzone mapowanie etykiety do słowa.', 'ro': 'O abordare recentă pentru clasificarea textului cu câteva împușcături este de a converti intrările textuale pentru a bloca întrebările care conțin o formă de descriere a sarcinii, de a le procesa cu un model de limbaj pre-instruit și de a mapa cuvintele anticipate pe etichete. Definirea manuală a acestei mapări între cuvinte și etichete necesită atât expertiză în domeniu, cât și o înțelegere a abilităților modelului lingvistic. Pentru a atenua această problemă, concepem o abordare care găsește automat o astfel de cartografiere dată fiind cantități mici de date de formare. Pentru o serie de sarcini, cartografierea găsită de abordarea noastră efectuează aproape la fel de bine ca cartografierea manuală etichetă-cuvânt.', 'sr': 'Nedavni pristup klasifikaciji teksta za nekoliko snimanja je preobraćati tekstualne ulaznice na kloziranje pitanja koje sadrže neki oblik opisa zadataka, obrađivati ih sa pretvorenim jezičkim modelom i mapirati predviđene reči na etikete. Ručno definiranje ove mape između riječi i etiketa zahteva stručnost domena i razumijevanje sposobnosti jezičkog modela. Da bismo smanjili ovaj problem, smislili smo pristup koji automatski pronađe takvu mapu podataka o maloj količini obuke. Za nekoliko zadataka, mapiranje našim pristupom obavlja skoro kao i mapiranje etikete na reèi.', 'si': 'Name මේ වචනය සහ ලේබෙල් අතර අතර මේ සිතුරු විශේෂය සහ භාෂා මෝඩෙල්ගේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වගේ අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට අවශ්\u200d මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩංගුවන්න, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප වැඩක් ගොඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් හොයාගෙන හොයාගෙන හොයාගෙන තියෙන ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වගේම අත් ප්\u200dරව', 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaaq ugu dambeysan qoraal-tababarid qoraal ah waa in lagu beddelo qoraalo qoraal ah si uu u qabsado su'aalo ku qoran sawir cayiman oo shaqo ah, lagula baaraandeeyo model afka hore ah iyo karto erayo la sii sheegay oo looga baahdo. Manually defining this mapping between words and labels requires both domain expertise and an understanding of the language model's abilities.  Si a an u fududayno arrintan, waxaynu u sameynaa qaab aan si automati ah u helno kartooyinka oo kale oo la siiyey tiro yar oo waxbarasho ah. Shaqooyin badan waxaa lagu sameeyaa sawirada lagu helo qaababkayaga, sidoo kale sawirada ay gacanta ku shaqeeyaan.", 'sv': 'Ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för enkeltextklassificering är att konvertera textinmatningar till att dölja frågor som innehåller någon form av uppgiftsbeskrivning, bearbeta dem med en förklädd språkmodell och kartlägga de förutspådda orden till etiketter. Att manuellt definiera denna kartläggning mellan ord och etiketter kräver både domänexpertis och förståelse för språkmodellens förmågor. För att mildra denna fråga utformar vi ett tillvägagångssätt som automatiskt hittar en sådan kartläggning med tanke på små mängder träningsdata. För ett antal uppgifter utför den kartläggning som vårt tillvägagångssätt nästan lika bra som handgjorda etikett-till-ord-mappning.', 'ta': 'சில செயல் விளக்கத்தில் இருக்கும் கேள்விகளை மூடுவதற்காக ஒரு சமீபத்தில் செயல்படுத்தும் சில மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மற்றும் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை கைமுறையாக இந்த வரைப்படத்தை வரையறு To mitigate this issue, we devise an approach that automatically finds such a mapping given small amounts of training data.  சில செயல்களுக்கு, எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட வரைப்படம் கிட்டத்தட்ட கையில் இருந்து வார்த்தை வரைபடம் செ', 'ur': 'تھوڑے شاٹ ٹیکسٹ کلاسپیٹ کے لئے اخیر طریقہ یہ ہے کہ ٹیکسٹول اینپوٹ کو کلاسپیٹ کرنے کے لئے تبدیل کرنا ہے جو کچھ کام کا فرم ہے اور ان کو ایک پہلی زبان موڈل کے ساتھ پردازی کرنا ہے اور پیش بینی کی باتوں کو لابلوں میں نقشه بنانا ہے کلمات اور لابل کے درمیان اس مکاپیٹ کی جانشین کی ضرورت ہے دونوں ڈومین کا علم اور زبان موڈل کے قابلیت کا سمجھنا۔ اس مسئلہ کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک طریقہ تدبیر کرتے ہیں جو اپنے ساتھ ایسی نقشه پیدا کرتا ہے جو چھوٹی تعلیم دادہ کی کمزوری کی مقدار پائی جاتی ہے. بہت سی کاموں کے لئے، ہمارے تقریبا کے ذریعہ سے پائی جاتی ہے، نقشه نقشه تقریباً اور ہاتھ-کرم لیبل-to-word نقشه کرتی ہے۔', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp gần đây cho việc phân loại văn bản ít ảnh là chuyển đổi các nội dung văn bản để kết thúc các câu hỏi chứa một dạng mô tả nhiệm vụ nào đó, xử lý chúng với một mô hình ngôn ngữ trước và vẽ các từ được dự đoán thành nhãn. Việc định dạng bản đồ này giữa từ và nhãn cần cả chuyên môn miền lẫn hiểu về khả năng của mô hình ngôn ngữ. Để giảm thiểu vấn đề này, chúng tôi lập ra một phương pháp tự động tìm thấy một bản đồ như vậy dựa trên một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu về huấn luyện. Đối với một số việc, bản đồ được tìm thấy theo phương pháp này thực hiện gần như cũng như bản đồ của nhãn-đối-từ làm thủ công.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu muammolani kamaytirish uchun biz avtomatik avtomatik raqamlarni o'rganadigan kichkina taʼminlovchi maʼlumot soni topishini aniqlashga qaramamiz. Koʻpburchak vazifalar uchun, bizning tuyg'izga murojaat qiladigan rasmlar esa qo'llangan yorliq va so'zlar bilan qoʻllaniladi.", 'bg': 'Съвременен подход за класификация на няколко кадъра текст е конвертирането на текстови входове в запушване на въпроси, които съдържат някаква форма на описание на задачата, обработката им с предварително обучен езиков модел и картографирането на прогнозираните думи към етикетите. Ръчното определяне на това картографиране между думи и етикети изисква както опит в областта, така и разбиране на способностите на езиковия модел. За да смекчим този проблем, разработваме подход, който автоматично намира такова картографиране при малки количества данни за обучение. За редица задачи картографирането, намерено от нашия подход, изпълнява почти толкова добре, колкото ръчно изработените картографиране етикет към дума.', 'nl': 'Een recente benadering voor het classificeren van tekst met weinig opnamen is om tekstinvoer om te zetten naar cloze vragen die een of andere vorm van taakbeschrijving bevatten, ze te verwerken met een vooraf getraind taalmodel en de voorspelde woorden in kaart te brengen aan labels. Het handmatig definiëren van deze toewijzing tussen woorden en labels vereist zowel domeinexpertise als begrip van de capaciteiten van het taalmodel. Om dit probleem te beperken, bedenken we een aanpak die automatisch een dergelijke mapping vindt op basis van kleine hoeveelheden trainingsgegevens. Voor een aantal taken presteert de mapping die door onze aanpak wordt gevonden bijna net zo goed als handgemaakte label-to-word mappings.', 'de': 'Ein neuerer Ansatz für die Klassifizierung von Texten mit wenigen Aufnahmen besteht darin, Texteingaben in Cloze-Fragen zu konvertieren, die eine Form von Aufgabenbeschreibung enthalten, sie mit einem vortrainierten Sprachmodell zu verarbeiten und die vorhergesagten Wörter auf Beschriftungen abzubilden. Die manuelle Definition dieser Zuordnung zwischen Wörtern und Labels erfordert sowohl Fachwissen in der Domäne als auch ein Verständnis der Fähigkeiten des Sprachmodells. Um dieses Problem abzumildern, entwickeln wir einen Ansatz, der eine solche Zuordnung bei geringen Mengen an Trainingsdaten automatisch findet. Für eine Reihe von Aufgaben funktioniert das Mapping unseres Ansatzes fast genauso gut wie handgefertigte Label-to-Word-Mappings.', 'id': 'Pendekatan baru-baru ini untuk klasifikasi teks beberapa gambar adalah untuk mengubah masukan teks untuk menutup pertanyaan yang mengandung beberapa bentuk deskripsi tugas, memprosesnya dengan model bahasa yang dilatih dan peta kata yang diprediksi ke label. Mengefinisikan pemetaan ini secara manual antara kata-kata dan label membutuhkan keahlian domain dan pemahaman kemampuan model bahasa. Untuk mengurangi masalah ini, kita membuat pendekatan yang secara otomatis menemukan peta seperti itu diberikan jumlah kecil data latihan. Untuk sejumlah tugas, peta yang ditemukan oleh pendekatan kami melakukan hampir juga peta label-to-word yang dibuat tangan.', 'ko': '최근의 소렌즈 텍스트 분류 방법은 텍스트 입력을 특정한 형식의 작업 설명을 포함하는 완형 빈칸 채우기 문제로 전환하고 미리 훈련된 언어 모델로 처리하며 예측된 단어를 라벨에 비추는 것이다.단어와 라벨 사이의 매핑을 수동으로 정의하는 데는 분야의 전문 지식도 필요하고 언어 모델을 이해하는 능력도 필요하다.이 문제를 완화시키기 위해 우리는 소량의 훈련 데이터를 주어진 상황에서 이러한 반사를 자동으로 찾을 수 있는 방법을 설계했다.많은 임무에 대해, 우리의 방법에서 발견한 비주얼은 거의 수동으로 만든 라벨에서 단어로 비추는 것과 같다.', 'fa': 'یک دستور اخیر برای گروه\u200cبندی متن چند شلیک است که واردات متن را تبدیل کند تا سوال\u200cهای مخلوط کند که شامل یک شکل توصیف کار باشند، آنها را با مدل زبانی پیش\u200cفرض کند و کلمات پیش\u200cفرض را به برچسب نقشه کنید. با دست تعریف این نقشه بین کلمات و نقشه\u200cها نیاز دارد که هر دو دانش\u200cشناسی دامنه و درک توانایی مدل زبان باشد. برای تخفیف این مسئله، ما یک روش را تولید می کنیم که به طور خودکار یک نقشه\u200cبندی به اندازه اندکی از داده\u200cهای آموزش را پیدا می\u200cکند. برای تعدادی از کار، نقشه\u200cبندی که توسط دسترسی ما پیدا شده تقریباً همچنین نقشه\u200cبندی\u200cهای نقشه\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cهای دست به کلمه انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'da': 'En nylig tilgang til enkeltstående tekstklassifikation er at konvertere tekstinput til at lukke spørgsmål, der indeholder en eller anden form for opgavebeskrivelse, behandle dem med en forudtrænet sprogmodel og kortlægge de forudsigede ord til etiketter. Manuel definering af denne kortlægning mellem ord og etiketter kræver både domænekompetence og forståelse af sprogmodellens evner. For at afhjælpe dette problem udarbejder vi en tilgang, der automatisk finder en sådan kortlægning givet små mængder træningsdata. Til en række opgaver udfører kortlægningen i vores tilgang næsten lige så godt som håndlavede label-to-word kortlægninger.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa hivi karibuni wa kutangazwa kwa maandishi machache ni kubadilisha matokeo ya kimataifa ili kufungia maswali yanayohusu aina fulani ya kazi, kuifanya hivyo kwa mfano wa lugha iliyopigwa na ramani ya maneno yanayotabiriwa kwa alama. Kuelezea ramani hii kwa mikononi kati ya maneno na maabara inahitaji kuelewa uwezo wa mifano ya lugha. Ili kupunguza suala hili, tunatengeneza mbinu ambazo kwa wenyewe hugundua ramani kama hizo ambazo ni kiasi kidogo cha taarifa za mafunzo. Kwa kazi kadhaa, ramani iliyopatikana na mbinu yetu inafanya kama vile ramani zilizo mikononi mwa maneno.', 'tr': 'K체챌체k-resim metin klasifikasyonaty흫 so흫ky 첵az힊y 체챌in metin giri힊ini t채blisa흫 bir 힊ekli tasvir etmek 체챌in 체첵tgetmek, olary흫 철nlenen s철zleri etiketlere g철rkezmek 체챌in d채ldir. Bu haritalary흫 s 철zler we etiketler arasynda elimden takyklamak hem domen흫 uzmanysyny we dil nusgany흫 ba힊ary힊laryny d체힊체nmek gerek. Bu meseleni azaltmak 체챌in, bu 힊ekilde 철z체nden bu 힊ekilde g철rkezilen ki챌i sanlary okuw챌y maglumatlaryny otomatik bilen tap첵an bir 첵az힊y tasarl첵arys. Bir n채챌e i힊e g철re, bizi흫 yakla힊ymyzda bulunan haritalar elimizde 첵a 힊an etiket-t채-s철z haritalaryny de et첵채r.', 'hr': 'Nedavni pristup klasifikaciji teksta za nekoliko snimanja je preobraćati tekstualne ulaznice na kloziranje pitanja koja sadrže neki oblik opisa zadataka, obraćati ih s pretvorenom jezičkom modelom i mapirati predviđene riječi na etikete. Ručno definiranje ove mape između riječi i etiketa zahtijeva stručnost domena i razumijevanje sposobnosti jezičkog modela. Da bismo smanjili ovaj problem, smislili smo pristup koji automatski pronalazi takvu mapiranje podataka o maloj količini obuke. Za broj zadataka, mapiranje našim pristupom čini skoro kao i mapiranje etikete na riječi.', 'am': "የጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን ለማቀናኘት የቅርብ ጥያቄ የጽሑፍ ጥያቄዎችን ለመለወጥ የሥርዓት ጥያቄዎችን ለማቀናቀል ነው፤ መልዕክቶች የስራ ትርጉም እንዲኖሩ፣ በተዘጋጀ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ እና ለተቀጠቀው ቃላት ወደ ምልክቶች ማሳያ ነው። Manually defining this mapping between words and labels requires both domain expertise and an understanding of the language model's abilities.  ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማቅረብ፣ እንደዚህ ያሉትን የግንኙነት ማረፊያ ታናሽ የተሰጠውን የዘጠናዊ ዳታዎችን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን ሥርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለብዙ ሥርዓቶች፣ በመግቢያችን የተገኘውን ካርታ እና በእጃቸው ለቃላት መክፈቻ ይደረጋል፡፡", 'sq': 'Një qasje e fundit për klasifikimin e tekstit me pak foto është të konvertohet hyrjet tekstuale për të mbyllur pyetjet që përmbajnë një form ë përshkrimi të detyrës, të procesojnë a to me një model gjuhësh të parastërvitur dhe të hartojnë fjalët e parashikuara në etiketa. Përcaktimi manual i këtij hartimi midis fjalëve dhe etiketave kërkon si ekspertizë në domeni, ashtu edhe një kuptim të aftësive të modelit gjuhësor. Për të lehtësuar këtë çështje, ne krijojmë një qasje që automatikisht gjen një hartim të tillë duke dhënë sasi të vogla të dhënash treinimi. Për një numër detyrash, hartimi i gjetur nga qasja jonë kryen pothuajse si dhe hartimet me letra në fjalë.', 'af': "'n Onlangse toegang vir 'n paar- skoot teks klasifikasie is om teks inputs te omskakel na klose vrae wat sommige vorm van taak beskrywing bevat, proses hulle met 'n voorrein taal model en kaart die voorskoude woorde na etikette. Hand definieer hierdie kaart tussen woorde en etikette, benodig beide domein ekspertiseer en 'n verstanding van die taal model se moontlikhede. Om hierdie probleem te verminder, ontwerp ons 'n toegang wat automaties so 'n kaart gegee klein hoeveelheid onderwerp data vind. Vir 'n aantal taak, die kaart wat deur ons toegang gevind word, uitvoer amper as ook die hand-crafted label-to-word kaart.", 'hy': "Մի քանի նկարների տեքստի դասակարգման վերջին մոտեցումն այն է, որ հաղորդակցվում են տեքստային ներմուծները, որպեսզի անջատեն հարցեր, որոնք պարունակում են որոշակի տեսակ աշխատանքի նկարագրություն, մշակում են դրանք նախադասավորված լեզվի մոդելի միջո Manually defining this mapping between words and labels requires both domain expertise and an understanding of the language model's abilities.  Այս խնդիրը նվազեցնելու համար մենք ստեղծում ենք մոտեցում, որը ինքնաբերաբար գտնում է այդպիսի քարտեզագրություն, հաշվի առնելով փոքր քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալներ: Մեր մոտեցումների միջոցով գտնվող քարտեզագրությունը մի շարք խնդիրների համար կատարում է գրեթե նույնպես, ինչպես նաև ձեռքով ստեղծված քարտեզագրություններ:", 'az': 'Qısqa-vuruş metin klasifikasiyasının yeni bir yolu, bəzi işlərin tanımlaması barəsindəki sualları klovlaşdırmaq, onları önlənmiş dil modeli ilə işləmək və önlənmiş sözləri etiketlərə kartlamaq. Sözlər və etiketlər arasındakı bu haritaları öz əlində təsdiqləyici kimi domena təhsil etməsi və dil modelinin yetkinliklərini anlaması lazımdır. Bu məsələni azaltmaq üçün, bu məsələnin böyük mapasını avtomatik olaraq görür. Bir neçə iş üçün, bizim yaxınlığımız tərəfindən tapılmış xəritə yaxınlaşdırılmış etiket-to-söz maplərini də müəyyən edir.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে টেক্সচুয়াল ইনপুট বন্ধ করার জন্য, যার মধ্যে কিছু ধরনের কাজের বর্ণনা রয়েছে, তাদের প্রক্রিয়া করা হয়েছে ভাষার মডেল দিয়ে এবং লেবেলে শব্দ এবং লেবেলের মধ্যে এই মানচিত্র নির্ধারণ করা দরকার ডোমেইনের বিশেষজ্ঞ এবং ভাষার মডেলের ক্ষমতা সম্পর্কে বুঝতে হবে। এই বিষয়টি মাত্রা করার জন্য আমরা একটি উপায় তৈরি করি যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এই ধরনের মানচিত্র পাওয়া যায় যা ছোট ট ট্রেনিং ডাট বেশ কয়েকটি কাজের জন্য, আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার মানচিত্র প্রায় পাওয়া গেছে এবং হাত-ক্ষমতার লেবেল-থেকে শব্দ ম্যাপিং', 'bs': 'Nedavni pristup klasifikaciji teksta za nekoliko snimanja je preobraćati tekstualne ulaznice na kloziranje pitanja koja sadrže neke oblike opisa zadataka, obraćati ih sa pretvorenim jezičkim modelom i mapirati predviđene riječi na etikete. Ručno definiranje ove mape između riječi i etiketa zahtijeva stručnost domena i razumijevanje sposobnosti jezičkog modela. Da bismo smanjili ovaj problem, smislili smo pristup koji automatski pronađe takav mapiranje određene male količine podataka o obuci. Za nekoliko zadataka, mapiranje našim pristupom obavlja skoro kao i mapiranje etikete na riječi.', 'ca': "Un enfocament recent per a la classificació de textos amb poces fotos és convertir les entrades textuals per cloure preguntes que contén alguna forma de descripció de tasca, processarles amb un model de llenguatge preconformat i mapejar les paraules previstes a etiquetes. Definir manualment aquest mapatge entre paraules i etiquetes requereix tant experiència en dominis com una comprensió de les habilitats del model de llenguatge. To mitigate this issue, we devise an approach that automatically finds such a mapping given small amounts of training data.  Per a moltes tasques, el mapatge trobat pel nostre enfocament fa gairebé bé com el mapatge d'etiquetes a paraules a mà.", 'cs': 'Nedávným přístupem pro klasifikaci textu s několika záběry je převést textové vstupy na blokování otázek, které obsahují určitou formu popisu úkolů, zpracovat je s předtrénovaným jazykovým modelem a mapovat předpokládaná slova na štítky. Ruční definování tohoto mapování mezi slovy a štítky vyžaduje jak odborné znalosti v oblasti, tak porozumění schopnostem jazykového modelu. Abychom tento problém zmírnili, navrhli jsme přístup, který automaticky najde takové mapování vzhledem k malému množství tréninkových dat. Pro řadu úkolů provádí mapování nalezené naším přístupem téměř stejně dobře jako ručně vytvořené mapování štítků na slovo.', 'et': 'Hiljutine lähenemisviis vähese pildi teksti klassifitseerimiseks on teisendada tekstisisendid mingisugust ülesandekirjeldust sisaldavateks küsimusteks, töödelda neid eeltreenitud keelemudeliga ja kaardistada prognoositavad sõnad siltidesse. Selle sõnade ja sildide kaardistamise käsitsi määratlemine nõuab nii domeeniteadmisi kui ka keelemudeli oskuste mõistmist. Selle probleemi leevendamiseks töötame välja lähenemisviisi, mis leiab automaatselt sellise kaardistamise, arvestades väikest koolitusandmete kogust. Mitmete ülesannete puhul toimib meie lähenemisviisi abil leitud kaardistamine peaaegu sama hästi kui käsitsi valmistatud sildist sõnasse kaardistamine.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikainen lähestymistapa muutaman kuvan tekstin luokitteluun on muuntaa tekstisyötteet jonkin tyyppistä tehtäväkuvausta sisältäviksi tukahduttaviksi kysymyksiksi, käsitellä ne esikoulutetulla kielimallilla ja kartoittaa ennustetut sanat tarroihin. Tämän sanojen ja nimien välisen kartoituksen manuaalinen määrittely edellyttää sekä toimialueen asiantuntemusta että kielimallin kykyjen ymmärtämistä. Tämän ongelman lieventämiseksi kehitämme lähestymistavan, joka löytää automaattisesti tällaisen kartoituksen pienistä koulutustiedoista. Useissa tehtävissä lähestymistapamme löytämä kartoitus suorittaa lähes yhtä hyvin kuin käsin tehdyt tarra sanaan -kartoitukset.', 'sk': 'Nedavni pristop k klasifikaciji besedila z nekaj posnetki je pretvorba besedilnih vhodov v zamaševanje vprašanj, ki vsebujejo neko obliko opisa opravil, jih obdelava s predtreniranim jezikovnim modelom in mapiranje predvidenih besed v oznake. Ročno opredelitev tega kartiranja med besedami in oznakami zahteva tako domensko strokovno znanje kot razumevanje sposobnosti jezikovnega modela. Da bi ublažili to težavo, oblikujemo pristop, ki samodejno najde takšno kartiranje ob majhnih količinah podatkov o usposabljanju. Pri številnih opravilih kartiranje, ki ga najdemo z našim pristopom, izvaja skoraj tako dobro kot ročno izdelano preslikavo oznak v besedo.', 'ha': "Wata hanyarwa na farko wa sigarin matsayin da aka kamata, ya zama ana mayar da matsayin na matsayi dõmin ya rufe masu tambayar da ke ƙunsa da wani irin shawara na aikin, ka aiki su da wani misali da aka kiyaye zuwa alama na ƙayyade. Idan an bayyana wannan ramani da hannun da aka ƙayyade tsakanin ayuka da alama, yana buƙata masu yaƙĩni ga duk masu cikin Domen da wani gane wa misalin harshe. To, idan an cire wannan masu al'amarin, sai mu ƙayyade wata hanyarwa wanda ke iya gano farat ɗaya, yana iya gano kamar wani ramani da aka bai wa ƙarami ƙarami masu tsarin data. Ga mãsu ƙidãya wa aikin, ramani da aka samar da shi na hanyonmu yana tafiyar da shi kamar da hannayen-hannayen-zuwa-word maps.", 'bo': "A recent approach for few-shot text classification is to convert textual inputs to cloze questions that contain some form of task description, process them with a pretrained language model and map the predicted words to labels. A recent approach for few-shot text classification is to convert textual inputs to cloze questions that contain some form of task description, process them with a pretrained language model and map the predicted words to labels. Manually defining this mapping between words and labels requires both domain expertise and an understanding of the language model's abilities. དོན་དག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལ་ཉེན་ཅུང་བྱེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དེ་བཞིན་གྱིས་རྣམས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ཆུང་ བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གྲངས་ཀ་ཞིག་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་ཡང་དུས་ཆེན་ཡིན་པ།", 'jv': 'section Manual Defining this maping amongst words and label Name Mapping', 'he': 'הגישה לאחרונה לסיפור טקסט עם כמה צילומים היא להפוך כניסות טקסטיות כדי לסגור שאלות שמכילות סוג כלשהו של תיאור משימה, לעבד אותן עם דוגמא שפה מלאה ומפות את המילים הנצפויות לתוויות. הגדרת המפה הזאת בין מילים לתוויות דורשת גם מומחיות בתחום וגם הבנה של היכולות של מודל השפה. כדי להקל על הנושא הזה, אנחנו מתכננים גישה שמוצאה באופן אוטומטי מפה כזו בהתחשב בכמות קטנות של נתוני אימון. למספר משימות, המפה שמצאה על ידי הגישה שלנו מבצעת כמעט כמו גם מיפות תווית מילים בידיים.'}
{'en': 'IntKB : A Verifiable Interactive Framework for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ar': 'IntKB: إطار تفاعلي يمكن التحقق منه لإكمال قاعدة المعرفة', 'fr': 'IntKB\xa0: un cadre interactif vérifiable pour compléter la base de connaissances', 'pt': 'IntKB: uma estrutura interativa verificável para conclusão da base de conhecimento', 'es': 'IntKB: Un marco interactivo verificable para completar la base de conocimientos', 'ja': 'IntKB ：ナレッジベース完了のための検証可能なインタラクティブフレームワーク', 'hi': 'IntKB: नॉलेज बेस पूर्णता के लिए एक सत्यापन योग्य इंटरैक्टिव फ्रेमवर्क', 'zh': 'IntKB:以成知识库可验证交互式框架', 'ru': 'IntKB: Проверяемая интерактивная структура для завершения создания базы знаний', 'ga': 'IntKB: Creat Idirghníomhach Infhíoraithe chun Bunús Eolais a Chríochnú', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ένα επαληθεύσιμο διαδραστικό πλαίσιο για την ολοκλήρωση της γνώσης βάσης', 'hu': 'IntKB: Ellenőrizhető interaktív keretrendszer a tudásbázis befejezéséhez', 'lt': 'IntKB: Tikrinama sąveiki žinių bazės užbaigimo sistema', 'kk': 'IntKB: Білім негізінің толтыру үшін тексерілетін интерактивті фреймдер', 'it': 'IntKB: un framework interattivo verificabile per il completamento della Knowledge Base', 'ms': 'IntKB: Sebuah kerangka interaktif boleh diperiksa untuk Penyempurnaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'mt': 'IntKB: Qafas Interattiv Verifikabbli għat-Tlestija tal-Bażi tal-Għarfien', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mk': 'IntKB: Верификабилна интерактивна рамка за комплетирање на базата на знаење', 'no': 'IntKB: Ein stadfestig interaktiv rammeverk for kunnskapsbasefullføring', 'pl': 'IntKB: Weryfikowalne interaktywne ramy uzupełniania bazy wiedzy', 'mn': 'IntKB: Мэдлэг суурь бүтээлтийн шалгалтын интерактив Фрейм', 'ro': 'IntKB: Un cadru interactiv verificabil pentru finalizarea bazei de cunoștințe', 'so': 'IntKB: A Verifiable Interactive Framework for Completion of Knowledge Base', 'sr': 'IntKB: Verifiable Interactive Framework for Knowledge Base Completion', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'IntKB: Ett verifierbart interaktivt ramverk för slutförande av kunskapsbasen', 'ur': 'IntKB: علم Base Completion کے لئے ایک تصدیق کرنے والی ایٹراکسٹیو فورمورک', 'ta': 'IntKB: அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை முடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு சிறப்பு உள்ளீட்டு சட்டம்', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'IntkB: A Veriphiable Interactivve Modern for Knowing Base Completion', 'bg': 'Проверена интерактивна рамка за завършване на базата данни от знания', 'da': 'IntKB: En verificerbar interaktiv ramme til færdiggørelse af videnbasen', 'nl': 'IntKB: Een verifieerbaar interactief kader voor de voltooiing van de kennisbank', 'hr': 'IntKB: Verificable Interactive Framework for Knowledge Base Completion', 'de': 'IntKB: Ein verifizierbares interaktives Framework zur Vervollständigung der Wissensdatenbank', 'ko': 'IntKB: 검증된 대화형 지식 라이브러리 완성 프레임워크', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'IntKB: Sebuah Framework Interaktif yang dapat Diverifikasi untuk Penyelesaian Basa Pengetahuan', 'sw': 'IntKB: Miundombi yenye ufanisi wa moja kwa moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya Kutimiza Ufahamu', 'tr': 'IntKB: Bilim Basi Tamamlandyrmasy üçin barlanan interaktif Framework', 'af': "IntKB: ' n Geldigbare Interaktiewe Raamwerk vir kennis Basis Voltooiïng", 'sq': 'IntKB: Një Kornizë Interaktive e Verifikueshme për kompletimin e bazës së njohurive', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'IntKB', 'bn': 'ইন্টেকেবি: জ্ঞানের ভেস সম্পূর্ণের জন্য একটি চমৎকার ইন্টারেক্টিভ ফ্রেমার্ক', 'bs': 'IntKB: Verificable Interactive Framework for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ca': 'IntKB: Un marc interactiu verificable per a completar la base de coneixements', 'cs': 'IntKB: Ověřitelný interaktivní rámec pro dokončování znalostní báze', 'et': 'IntKB: Kontrollitav interaktiivne raamistik teabebaasi lõpetamiseks', 'fi': 'IntKB: Varmistettava interaktiivinen kehys tietokantojen täydentämiseen', 'sk': 'IntKB: Preverljiv interaktivni okvir za dokončanje zbirke znanja', 'bo': 'IntKB: ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་ཁ་བསྡུས་པར་བྱེད་རུང་བའི་Interactive Framework for Knowledge Base Completion', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'Language'}
{'en': 'Knowledge bases (KBs) are essential for many downstream NLP tasks, yet their prime shortcoming is that they are often incomplete. State-of-the-art frameworks for KB completion often lack sufficient accuracy to work fully automated without human supervision. As a remedy, we propose : a novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline. Our framework is tailored to the specific needs of a human-in-the-loop paradigm : (i) We generate facts that are aligned with text snippets and are thus immediately verifiable by humans. (ii) Our system is designed such that it continuously learns during the KB completion task and, therefore, significantly improves its performance upon initial zero- and few-shot relations over time. (iii) We only trigger human interactions when there is enough information for a correct prediction. Therefore, we train our system with negative examples and a fold-option if there is no answer. Our framework yields a favorable performance : it achieves a hit@1 ratio of 29.7 % for initially unseen relations, upon which it gradually improves to 46.2 %.', 'fr': "Les bases de connaissances (KB) sont essentielles pour de nombreuses tâches de PNL en aval, mais leur principal inconvénient est qu'elles sont souvent incomplètes. Les infrastructures de pointe pour l'achèvement des bases de connaissances manquent souvent de précision pour fonctionner de manière entièrement automatisée sans supervision humaine. Pour y remédier, nous proposons\xa0: un nouveau cadre interactif pour compléter la base de connaissances à partir d'un texte basé sur un pipeline de réponses aux questions. Notre cadre est adapté aux besoins spécifiques d'un paradigme de l'homme dans la boucle\xa0: (i) Nous générons des faits qui sont alignés sur des extraits de texte et sont donc immédiatement vérifiables par les humains. (ii) Notre système est conçu de telle sorte qu'il apprend en permanence pendant la tâche de complétion de la base de connaissances et, par conséquent, améliore considérablement ses performances lors des relations initiales de zéro et de petit plan au fil du temps. (iii) Nous ne déclenchons des interactions humaines que lorsqu'il y a suffisamment d'informations pour une prédiction correcte. Par conséquent, nous entraînons notre système avec des exemples négatifs et une option de pliage s'il n'y a pas de réponse. Notre framework génère une performance favorable\xa0: il atteint un ratio hit @1 de 29,7\xa0% pour les relations initialement inédites, sur lequel il s'améliore progressivement pour atteindre 46,2\xa0%.", 'pt': 'As bases de conhecimento (KBs) são essenciais para muitas tarefas downstream de PNL, mas sua principal deficiência é que muitas vezes são incompletas. Estruturas de última geração para conclusão de KB muitas vezes carecem de precisão suficiente para funcionar totalmente automatizada sem supervisão humana. Como solução, propomos: uma nova estrutura interativa para conclusão de KB a partir de texto com base em um pipeline de resposta a perguntas. Nossa estrutura é adaptada às necessidades específicas de um paradigma humano no circuito: (i) Geramos fatos que são alinhados com trechos de texto e, portanto, são imediatamente verificáveis por humanos. (ii) Nosso sistema é projetado de forma que ele aprenda continuamente durante a tarefa de conclusão da KB e, portanto, melhore significativamente seu desempenho nas relações iniciais de zero e poucos tiros ao longo do tempo. (iii) Só acionamos interações humanas quando há informações suficientes para uma previsão correta. Portanto, treinamos nosso sistema com exemplos negativos e uma opção de fold se não houver resposta. Nossa estrutura apresenta um desempenho favorável: atinge um índice hit@1 de 29,7% para relações inicialmente não vistas, após o qual melhora gradualmente para 46,2%.', 'ar': 'قواعد المعرفة (KBs) ضرورية للعديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP) ، ومع ذلك فإن عيبها الرئيسي هو أنها غالبًا ما تكون غير مكتملة. غالبًا ما تفتقر أطر العمل الحديثة لإكمال قاعدة المعارف إلى الدقة الكافية للعمل آليًا بالكامل دون إشراف بشري. كعلاج ، نقترح: إطار عمل تفاعلي جديد لإكمال قاعدة المعارف من النص بناءً على خط أنابيب يجيب على الأسئلة. تم تصميم إطار عملنا وفقًا للاحتياجات المحددة لنموذج الإنسان في الحلقة: (1) نقوم بتوليد الحقائق التي تتماشى مع مقتطفات النص وبالتالي يمكن التحقق منها على الفور بواسطة البشر. (2) تم تصميم نظامنا بحيث يتعلم باستمرار أثناء مهمة إكمال قاعدة المعارف ، وبالتالي ، يحسن أداءه بشكل كبير عند العلاقات الأولية الصفرية والقليلة بمرور الوقت. (3) نحن نطلق التفاعلات البشرية فقط عندما تكون هناك معلومات كافية للتنبؤ الصحيح. لذلك ، نقوم بتدريب نظامنا بالأمثلة السلبية وخيار الطي إذا لم تكن هناك إجابة. يعطي إطار عملنا أداءً جيدًا: فهو يحقق نسبة إصابة @ 1 تبلغ 29.7٪ للعلاقات غير المرئية في البداية ، والتي تتحسن بناءً عليها تدريجياً إلى 46.2٪.', 'es': 'Las bases de conocimiento (KB) son esenciales para muchas tareas posteriores de la PNL, pero su principal defecto es que a menudo están incompletas. Los marcos de vanguardia para la finalización de la base de conocimientos a menudo carecen de la precisión suficiente para funcionar de forma totalmente automatizada Como solución, proponemos: un marco interactivo novedoso para completar la base de conocimientos a partir del texto basado en una canalización de respuestas a preguntas. Nuestro marco se adapta a las necesidades específicas de un paradigma human-in-the-loop: (i) Generamos hechos que están alineados con fragmentos de texto y, por lo tanto, son verificables inmediatamente por los humanos. (ii) Nuestro sistema está diseñado de tal manera que aprende continuamente durante la tarea de finalización de la base de conocimientos y, por lo tanto, mejora significativamente su rendimiento en las relaciones iniciales de cero y de pocos disparos a lo largo del tiempo. (iii) Solo activamos interacciones humanas cuando hay suficiente información para una predicción correcta. Por lo tanto, entrenamos nuestro sistema con ejemplos negativos y una opción de retirada si no hay respuesta. Nuestro marco produce un rendimiento favorable: logra una ratio hit @1 del 29,7% para las relaciones inicialmente invisibles, tras lo cual mejora gradualmente hasta el 46,2%.', 'ru': 'Базы знаний (БЗ) имеют важное значение для многих последующих задач NLP, однако их главный недостаток заключается в том, что они часто являются неполными. Современные структуры для завершения КБ часто не обладают достаточной точностью, чтобы работать полностью автоматизированно без надзора со стороны человека. В качестве средства исправления мы предлагаем : новую интерактивную структуру для завершения КБ из текста на основе конвейера ответов на вопросы. Наша система адаптирована к конкретным потребностям парадигмы «человек в петле»: (i) мы генерируем факты, которые совпадают с фрагментами текста и, таким образом, немедленно проверяются людьми. (ii) наша система спроектирована таким образом, что она непрерывно учится во время выполнения задачи по завершению КБ и, следовательно, значительно улучшает свою производительность при начальных соотношениях «ноль» и «несколько выстрелов» с течением времени. (iii) Мы запускаем человеческие взаимодействия только тогда, когда есть достаточно информации для правильного прогнозирования. Поэтому мы тренируем нашу систему с негативными примерами и складывающимся вариантом, если нет ответа. Наш фреймворк дает благоприятные результаты: он достигает коэффициента хит@1 29,7% для изначально невидимых отношений, после чего постепенно улучшается до 46,2%.', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस (केबी) कई डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए आवश्यक हैं, फिर भी उनकी प्रमुख कमी यह है कि वे अक्सर अधूरे होते हैं। KB पूरा करने के लिए अत्याधुनिक ढांचे में अक्सर मानव पर्यवेक्षण के बिना पूरी तरह से स्वचालित काम करने के लिए पर्याप्त सटीकता की कमी होती है। एक उपाय के रूप में, हम प्रस्ताव करते हैं: एक प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाली पाइपलाइन के आधार पर पाठ से KB पूरा करने के लिए एक उपन्यास इंटरैक्टिव फ्रेमवर्क। हमारा ढांचा मानव-इन-द-लूप प्रतिमान की विशिष्ट आवश्यकताओं के अनुरूप है: (i) हम ऐसे तथ्यों को उत्पन्न करते हैं जो पाठ स्निपेट के साथ संरेखित होते हैं और इस प्रकार मनुष्यों द्वारा तुरंत सत्यापित किए जाते हैं। (ii) हमारी प्रणाली को इस तरह से डिज़ाइन किया गया है कि यह KB पूरा करने के कार्य के दौरान लगातार सीखता है और इसलिए, समय के साथ प्रारंभिक शून्य- और कुछ-शॉट संबंधों पर अपने प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार करता है। (iii) हम केवल मानव इंटरैक्शन को ट्रिगर करते हैं जब सही भविष्यवाणी के लिए पर्याप्त जानकारी होती है। इसलिए, हम अपने सिस्टम को नकारात्मक उदाहरणों और एक गुना-विकल्प के साथ प्रशिक्षित करते हैं यदि कोई जवाब नहीं है। हमारा ढांचा एक अनुकूल प्रदर्शन उत्पन्न करता है: यह शुरू में अनदेखे संबंधों के लिए 29.7% का hit@1 अनुपात प्राप्त करता है, जिस पर यह धीरे-धीरे 46.2% तक बढ़ जाता है।', 'zh': '知识库(KB)于下流NLP务至重,而大病常不全。 所以成知识库先进者框架常乏足准确性,无以尽自动化于无工。 补救措施曰:一新之交互式框架,以KB于问管。 吾框架以人环范式特定求量身制:(i)吾生与文本片段同事实,故可立验也。 (ii) 吾属计使在知识库成事之间不绝学问,故随时推移,显于初零次少之间。 (iii)足信,触人互动。 故无对案,以否例与折叠选项以练吾统。 吾框架生善性:于初不见,其成29.7%hit@1率,渐至于46.2%。', 'ja': 'ナレッジベース（ KB ）は、多くの下流NLPタスクに不可欠ですが、その主な欠点は、しばしば不完全であることです。 KB完了のための最先端のフレームワークは、人間の監督なしに完全に自動化された作業を行うのに十分な精度を欠いていることが多い。 是正策として、質問応答パイプラインに基づくテキストからのKB完了のための新しい対話型フレームワークを提案します。 当社のフレームワークは、人間のループパラダイムの特定のニーズに合わせて調整されています。(i)テキストスニペットと整列されているため、人間がすぐに検証できる事実を生成します。(ii)当社のシステムは、KB完了タスク中に継続的に学習するように設計されており、したがって、時間の経過とともに初期のゼロとほとんどショットの関係でパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させます。(iii)正確な予測に十分な情報がある場合にのみ、人間のやり取りをトリガーします。 したがって、マイナスの例と答えがない場合の折り畳みオプションでシステムをトレーニングします。 当社のフレームワークは良好なパフォーマンスを発揮します。当初は見えていなかった関係のヒット率@ 1を29.7%で達成し、その後徐々に46.2%に改善していきます。', 'ga': 'Tá bunanna eolais (KBanna) riachtanach do go leor tascanna NLP iartheachtacha, ach is é an príomheasnamh atá acu ná go mbíonn siad neamhiomlán go minic. Is minic nach mbíonn dóthain cruinnis ag creataí úrscothacha chun KB a chomhlánú chun oibriú go hiomlán uathoibrithe gan maoirseacht dhaonna. Mar leigheas, molaimid : creat idirghníomhach nua chun KB a chomhlánú ó théacs bunaithe ar phíblíne freagraí ceisteanna. Tá ár gcreat sainoiriúnaithe do shainriachtanais paraidím daonna sa lúb: (i) Ginimid fíricí atá ailínithe le sleachta téacs agus atá infhíoraithe láithreach ag daoine dá réir. (ii) Tá ár gcóras deartha sa chaoi is go bhfoghlaimíonn sé go leanúnach le linn thasc críochnaithe KB agus, mar sin, feabhsaítear go suntasach a fheidhmíocht ar chaidreamh tosaigh náid agus cúpla seat le himeacht ama. (iii) Ní chuirimid tús le hidirghníomhaíochtaí daonna ach amháin nuair a bhíonn go leor eolais ann chun tuar ceart a dhéanamh. Mar sin, déanaimid ár gcóras a oiliúint le samplaí diúltacha agus le rogha fillte mura bhfuil freagra ann. Tá feidhmíocht fhabhrach ag ár gcreat: baineann sé amach cóimheas hit@1 de 29.7% do chaidreamh nach bhfacthas riamh roimhe, ar a bhfeabhsaítear de réir a chéile go 46.2%.', 'el': 'Οι βάσεις γνώσεων (ΚΒ) είναι απαραίτητες για πολλές μεταγενέστερες εργασίες NLP, ωστόσο το κύριο μειονέκτημά τους είναι ότι συχνά είναι ελλιπείς. Τα σύγχρονα πλαίσια ολοκλήρωσης της ΚΒ συχνά στερούνται επαρκούς ακρίβειας ώστε να λειτουργούν πλήρως αυτοματοποιημένα χωρίς ανθρώπινη επίβλεψη. Ως θεραπεία, προτείνουμε: ένα νέο διαδραστικό πλαίσιο για την ολοκλήρωση της ΚΒ από κείμενο βασισμένο σε έναν αγωγό απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις. Το πλαίσιο μας είναι προσαρμοσμένο στις συγκεκριμένες ανάγκες ενός παραδείγματος ανθρώπου-στον-βρόχο: (Δημιουργούμε γεγονότα που ευθυγραμμίζονται με αποσπάσματα κειμένου και είναι έτσι άμεσα επαληθεύσιμα από τον άνθρωπο. (Το σύστημά μας είναι σχεδιασμένο έτσι ώστε να μαθαίνει συνεχώς κατά τη διάρκεια της εργασίας ολοκλήρωσης της ΚΒ και, ως εκ τούτου, βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοσή του σε αρχικές σχέσεις μηδενικού και ελάχιστου πυροβολισμού με την πάροδο του χρόνου. (ενεργοποιούμε ανθρώπινες αλληλεπιδράσεις μόνο όταν υπάρχουν αρκετές πληροφορίες για μια σωστή πρόβλεψη. Ως εκ τούτου, εκπαιδεύουμε το σύστημά μας με αρνητικά παραδείγματα και μια επιλογή διπλώματος εάν δεν υπάρχει απάντηση. Το πλαίσιο μας αποδίδει μια ευνοϊκή απόδοση: επιτυγχάνει ένα hit@1 αναλογία 29,7% για αρχικά αόρατες σχέσεις, στις οποίες βελτιώνεται σταδιακά σε 46,2%.', 'hu': 'A tudásbázisok számos további NLP-feladathoz elengedhetetlenek, de elsődleges hiányosságuk az, hogy gyakran hiányosak. A KB kiegészítéséhez szükséges korszerű keretrendszerek gyakran hiányoznak elegendő pontossággal ahhoz, hogy emberi felügyelet nélkül teljesen automatizált munkát végezzenek. Javaslatként egy új interaktív keretrendszert javasolunk a KB kiegészítéséhez, amely egy kérdésre válaszvezetéken alapul. Keretrendszerünk az ember-in-the-loop paradigma speciális igényeihez igazított: (i) Olyan tényeket generálunk, amelyek összhangban vannak a szövegrészletekkel, és így azonnal ellenőrizhetők az emberek számára. (ii) Rendszerünk úgy lett kialakítva, hogy folyamatosan tanuljon a KB befejezési feladat során, és így jelentősen javítsa teljesítményét a kezdeti nulla és kevés lövéses kapcsolatok esetén idővel. (iii) Csak akkor váltjuk ki az emberi interakciókat, ha elegendő információ áll rendelkezésre a helyes előrejelzéshez. Ezért negatív példákkal és fold-opcióval képezzük rendszerünket, ha nincs válasz. Keretrendszerünk kedvező teljesítményt nyújt: elér egy hit@1 29,7%-os arány az eredetileg láthatatlan kapcsolatok esetében, amelyek után fokozatosan 46,2%-ra emelkedik.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების ბაზები (KBs) არის მნიშვნელოვანი NLP დავალებისთვის, მაგრამ მათი პირველ დაბრუნება იყო, რომ ისინი ბევრად უკეთესია. KB დასრულებისთვის კონტაქტის სტატის ფემპორკები ზოგიერთად არსებობს მხოლოდ მარტივის დასრულება, რომ ადამიანის ნართვის გარეშე მუშაობის შესაძლებლობა როგორც რექსიმენტი, ჩვენ მინდომა: KB დასრულებაზე ტექსტის დასრულებაზე პრომენტი ინტერქექტიური ფრამეტრი. ჩვენი პარამეტრები განსაზღვრებულია ადამიანის პრადიგმის განსაზღვრებული ნუზებისთვის: ii) ჩვენი სისტემა განაზღვრებულია, რომ ის კი.ბ. დასრულება სამუშაო დასრულება და ამიტომ მნიშვნელოვანად გაუკეთება სამუშაო პირველი ნულის და პატარა შესახებ. iii) ჩვენ მხოლოდ ადამიანის ინტერფექციაციას გამოყენებთ, როდესაც სამართლად მსგავსი ინფორმაცია არსებობს. ამიტომ, ჩვენ სისტემის გაგრძნობას მინუს მაგალითებით და გაგრძნობას, თუ არსებობს პასუხი. ჩვენი პარამეტრი მივიღეთ საკუთარი პროგრამეტს: ეს მივიღეთ hit@1 29.7% პროცენტის დასაწყისოდ არაჩვენებული შესახებებისთვის, რომელსაც 46.2% უფრო წარმოქმედება.', 'it': "Le basi di conoscenza (KBs) sono essenziali per molte attività a valle del PNL, ma il loro principale difetto è che sono spesso incomplete. I framework all'avanguardia per il completamento delle KB spesso mancano di una precisione sufficiente per lavorare completamente automatizzati senza supervisione umana. Come rimedio, proponiamo: un nuovo framework interattivo per il completamento di KB da testo basato su una pipeline di risposta alle domande. Il nostro framework è adattato alle esigenze specifiche di un paradigma umano-in-the-loop: (i) Generamo fatti allineati con frammenti di testo e quindi immediatamente verificabili dagli esseri umani. (ii) Il nostro sistema è progettato in modo tale che apprenda continuamente durante l'attività di completamento KB e, quindi, migliora significativamente le sue prestazioni sulle relazioni iniziali zero e pochi colpi nel tempo. (iii) Attivamo interazioni umane solo quando ci sono informazioni sufficienti per una corretta previsione. Pertanto, addestriamo il nostro sistema con esempi negativi e un'opzione di fold se non c'è risposta. Il nostro framework produce una performance favorevole: raggiunge un hit@1 rapporto del 29,7% per le relazioni inizialmente invisibili, sulle quali migliora gradualmente al 46,2%.", 'lt': 'Daugeliui tolesnių NLP užduočių labai svarbios žinių bazės, tačiau jų pagrindinis trūkumas yra tas, kad jos dažnai yra neišsamios. Naujausioms KB užbaigimo sistemoms dažnai trūksta pakankamai tikslumo dirbti visiškai automatizuotai be žmogaus priežiūros. Kaip taisomąją priemonę siūlome: naują interaktyvią KB užpildymo sistemą iš teksto, pagrįsto klausimų atsakymo vamzdynu. Mūsų sistema pritaikyta specifiniams žmogaus-ciklo paradigmos poreikiams: i) sukuriame faktus, kurie yra suderinti su teksto gabaritais ir todėl yra nedelsiant tikrinami žmonės. ii) Mūsų sistema suprojektuota taip, kad ji nuolat mokytųsi atliekant KB užbaigimo užduotį, todėl ji gerokai pagerina savo veiklos rezultatus pradiniuose nuliniuose ir nedideliuose santykiuose laikui bėgant. iii) Mes sukeliame žmonių sąveiką tik tada, kai yra pakankamai informacijos teisingai prognozuoti. Therefore, we train our system with negative examples and a fold-option if there is no answer.  Mūsų sistema duoda palankių rezultatų: ji siekia hit@1 Iš pradžių nematomų santykių santykis yra 29,7 %, o palaipsniui didėja iki 46,2 %.', 'kk': 'Мәлімет негізі (КБ) NLP тапсырмаларының көпшілігін төмендету үшін маңызды, бірақ олардың негізгі кездесу - көпшілігі толық емес. КБ- толтыру үшін күй- жайындағы суреттің фреймворлары көбінде адамдарды бақылау арқылы толық автоматты түрде жұмыс істеу үшін жеткілікті дұрыс жоқ. КБ- тың мәтінді толтыру үшін жаңа интерактивті қоршауын қолданамыз. Сұрақ жолына негізделген сұрақ жолына негізделген. Біздің фрейміміз адамдардың қажеттеріне адамдардың қажеттері: i) Мәтін сниптеріне сәйкес келген факттерді құрамыз және адамдардың көмегімен тексеруге болады. ii) Біздің жүйеіміз КБ- тің толтыру тапсырмасында әрқашанда үйреніп, сондықтан кейбір уақытта нөл және кейбір сәйкестік қатынасында жұмыс істеу үшін өте жақсы жасайды. iii) Мәлімет дұрыс таңдау үшін ғана адамдардың әрқашамдылығын бастаймыз. Сондықтан, біз жүйемізді негативті мысалдар мен жауап жоқ болса, қапшық параметрлермен үйренеміз. Біздің қоршауымыз жақсы жұмыс істейді: hit@1 Бастапқы көрсетілмеген қатынастар үшін 29,7% қатынасы, оның қатынасы 46,2% деп жақсы жасайды.', 'mk': 'Базите на знаење (КБ) се суштински за многу понатамошни задачи на НЛП, но нивниот главен недостаток е дека честопати се нецелосни. Стандардните рамки за комплетирање на КБ честопати немаат доволна точност за да работат целосно автоматизирани без човечки надзор. As a remedy, we propose : a novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline.  Нашата рамка е прилагодена на специфичните потреби на човековиот парадигм во циклус: (i) Генерираме факти кои се прилагодени со текстовите исечоци и затоа се веднаш верификувачки од страна на луѓето. (ii) Нашиот систем е дизајниран така што континуирано учи за време на задачата за завршување на КБ и, затоа, значително ја подобрува својата перформанса по почетните односи со нула и неколку снимки со текот на времето. (iii) Ние ги активираме човечките интеракции само кога има доволно информации за правилно предвидување. Затоа, го тренираме нашиот систем со негативни примери и опција за пливање ако нема одговор. Нашата рамка предизвикува услуга: постигнува hit@1 Односот од 29,7 отсто за првично невидливите односи, по кои постепено се подобрува на 46,2 отсто.', 'ms': 'Pangkalan pengetahuan (KBs) adalah penting untuk banyak tugas NLP turun, namun kekurangan utama mereka adalah bahawa mereka sering tidak lengkap. Bingkai-bingkai state-of-the-art untuk selesai KB sering kekurangan ketepatan yang cukup untuk bekerja secara automatik tanpa pengawasan manusia. Sebagai penawar, kami melamar : kerangka interaktif baru untuk selesaikan KB dari teks berdasarkan garis paip menjawab soalan. kerangka kami disesuaikan untuk keperluan khusus paradigm a manusia dalam loop: (i) Kami menghasilkan fakta yang disesuaikan dengan snippets teks dan oleh itu secara segera boleh disahkan oleh manusia. (ii) Our system is designed such that it continuously learns during the KB completion task and, therefore, significantly improves its performance upon initial zero- and few-shot relations over time.  (iii) Kami hanya memicu interaksi manusia apabila ada maklumat yang cukup untuk ramalan yang betul. Oleh itu, kita melatih sistem kita dengan contoh negatif dan pilihan-lipat jika tidak ada jawapan. kerangka kami memberikan prestasi yang baik: ia mencapai hit@1 nisbah 29.7% untuk hubungan yang tidak terlihat awalnya, yang secara perlahan-lahan meningkat kepada 46.2%.', 'mt': "Il-bażijiet tal-għarfien (KBs) huma essenzjali għal ħafna kompiti downstream tal-NLP, iżda n-nuqqas ewlieni tagħhom huwa li spiss mhumiex kompluti. L-oqfsa l-aktar avvanzati għat-tlestija tal-KB spiss ma għandhomx preċiżjoni biżżejjed biex jaħdmu awtomatizzati bis-sħiħ mingħajr superviżjoni umana. Bħala rimedju, nipproponu : qafas interattiv ġdid għat-tlestija tal-KB mit-test ibbażat fuq linja ta' risposta għall-mistoqsijiet. Il-qafas tagħna huwa mfassal għall-ħtiġijiet speċifiċi ta’ paradigm a umana fil-loop: (i) Aħna niġġeneraw fatti li huma allinjati ma’ snippets tat-test u għalhekk huma immedjatament verifikabbli mill-bniedem. (ii) Is-sistema tagħna hija ddisinjata b’tali mod li titgħallem kontinwament matul il-kompitu ta’ tlestija tal-KB u, għalhekk, ittejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tagħha fuq relazzjonijiet inizjali ta’ żero u ftit skopijiet maż-żmien. (iii) Nixprunaw interazzjonijiet umani biss meta jkun hemm biżżejjed informazzjoni għal tbassir korrett. Għalhekk, a ħna nħarrġu s-sistema tagħna b’eżempji negattivi u b’alternattiva doppja jekk ma jkunx hemm risposta. Our framework yields a favorable performance: it achieves a  hit@1  ratio of 29.7% for initially unseen relations, upon which it gradually improves to 46.2%.", 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d (കെബിഐ) പലര്\u200dക്കും താഴ്വരയിലെ NLP ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. പക്ഷെ അവരുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കുറവ കെബി പൂര്\u200dത്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി കെബിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു നോവല്\u200d interactive framework നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമേജ് മനുഷ്യന്റെ പ്രത്യേക ആവശ്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രത്യേക ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പിന്തുടര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്നു: (i) വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്നിപ്പിറ്റുകള്\u200d  (ii) നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. കെബി പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d അത് തുടര്\u200dന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്ന (i) ഒരു ശരിയായ പ്രവചനത്തിന് വേണ്ടി വിവരങ്ങളുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഇടപാടുകള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്നു അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് നേരിയ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളും മറുപടി ഇല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നു. Our framework yields a favorable performance: it achieves a  hit@1 ആദ്യത്തെ അദൃശ്യമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി 29.7 ശതമാനത്തിന്റെ വിഭാഗമാണ്, അതിന്റെ വിഭാഗം പതുക്കെയും 46.2%.', 'pl': 'Bazy wiedzy (KBs) są niezbędne dla wielu dalszych zadań NLP, jednak ich głównym brakiem jest to, że często są one niekompletne. Najnowocześniejsze ramy realizacji KB często brakują wystarczającej dokładności do pracy w pełni zautomatyzowanej bez nadzoru człowieka. Jako środek zaradczy proponujemy: nowe interaktywne ramy uzupełniania KB z tekstu oparte na rurociągu odpowiedzi na pytania. Nasze ramy są dostosowane do specyficznych potrzeb paradygmatu człowieka w pętli: (i) Generujemy fakty, które są dostosowane do fragmentów tekstu i tym samym są natychmiast weryfikowalne przez ludzi. (ii) Nasz system jest zaprojektowany w taki sposób, aby stale uczył się podczas zadania zakończenia KB i tym samym znacząco poprawiał jego wydajność przy początkowych relacjach zerowych i kilku strzałów z upływem czasu. (iii) Wywołujemy interakcje z człowiekiem tylko wtedy, gdy istnieje wystarczająca ilość informacji do prawidłowego przewidywania. Dlatego trenujemy nasz system z negatywnymi przykładami i opcją foldu, jeśli nie ma odpowiedzi. Nasze ramy dają korzystną wydajność: osiąga on hit@1 stosunek 29,7% dla początkowo niewidocznych relacji, po czym stopniowo poprawia się do 46,2%.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь (КБ) нь олон нийтлэг NLP даалгавруудын тулд чухал. Гэхдээ тэдний анхны тохиромжтой байдал нь ихэвчлэн төгс байдаг. КБ-ын төгсгөлийн төгсгөлийн улс орнуудын хэмжээсүүд хүн төрөлхтний удирдаггүй бүрэн автоматжуулан ажиллах хангалттай зөв байдал байхгүй. Бид үүнийг эмчилгээний хувьд: КБ-ын төгсгөлийн шинэ интерактив хэлбэрүүдийг хариултын хоолойн шугам дээр суурилсан асуулт юм. Бидний үйл ажиллагаа нь хүн төрөлхтний парадигмын тухай тодорхой хэрэгцээнд солигдож байна: ii) Бидний систем КБ-ын төгсгөлийн ажлын үед үргэлж суралцаж байгаа бөгөөд тэр нь цаг хугацаанд эхний 0 болон хэдэн зурагт харилцааны үйл ажиллагааг үнэхээр сайжруулдаг. iii) Бид зөвхөн хүн төрөлхтний харилцааныг зөвхөн зөвхөн таамаглах хангалттай мэдээлэл гаргадаг. Тиймээс бид системийг сөрөг жишээ болон хариулт байхгүй бол олон сонголтыг суралцах юм. Бидний үйл ажиллагаа сайхан үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. hit@1 Эхлээд харилцааны харилцааны харьцаа 29.7%-ын харьцаа нь 46.2%.', 'no': 'Kvitensbaser (KBs) er nødvendig for mange nedstrømte NLP-oppgåver, men dei primære kortekombane er at dei ofte er ufulle. Statusrammeverk for KB- fullføring manglar ofte nok nøyaktig for å arbeide fullstendig automatisk utan menneskeovervaking. Som ei rettaring, foreslår vi: eit nytt interaktivt rammeverk for KB- fullføring frå teksten basert på eit spørsmål som svarar på rørslinje. Rammeverket vårt er tilpassa til dei spesifikke behov for ein paradigm for menneske i løpet: i) Vi generer faktar som er tilpassa tekstsnippet og er derfor direkte kontrollerbart av menneske. ii) Sistemet vårt er utvikla slik at han fortsatt lærer under KB- fullføringsoppgåva og derfor forbetrar utviklinga på første null- og få- skjultrelasjonar over tid. iii) Vi startar berre menneskelige interaksjonar når det finst nok informasjon for eit rett foregåve. Derfor treng vi systemet vårt med negative eksemplar og ei fold-val dersom det ikkje er svar. Rammeverket vårt gjev eit favoritt utvikling: den oppnår ein hit@1 Forholdet mellom 29,7 % for første ukjende relasjonar, der han gradvis forbetrar til 46,2 %.', 'ro': 'Bazele de cunoștințe (KBs) sunt esențiale pentru multe sarcini din aval ale PNL, însă principala lor deficiență este că sunt adesea incomplete. Cadrele de ultimă generație pentru completarea KB lipsesc adesea suficientă precizie pentru a lucra complet automatizat fără supraveghere umană. Ca remediu, propunem: un nou cadru interactiv pentru completarea KB din text bazat pe o conductă de răspuns la întrebări. Cadrul nostru este adaptat nevoilor specifice ale unei paradigme umane-in-the-loop: (i) generăm fapte care sunt aliniate cu fragmente de text și sunt astfel imediat verificabile de către oameni. (ii) Sistemul nostru este proiectat astfel încât să învețe continuu în timpul sarcinii de finalizare KB și, prin urmare, să își îmbunătățească semnificativ performanța la relațiile inițiale zero și puține lovituri în timp. (iii) Declanșăm interacțiuni umane numai atunci când există suficiente informații pentru o predicție corectă. Prin urmare, ne antrenăm sistemul cu exemple negative și o opțiune de fold dacă nu există niciun răspuns. Cadrul nostru oferă o performanță favorabilă: atinge o performanță favorabilă hit@1 raportul de 29,7% pentru relațiile inițial nevăzute, după care se îmbunătățește treptat la 46,2%.', 'sr': 'Znanstveni bazi (KB) su ključni za mnoge spuštene NLP zadatke, ali njihov prvi nedostatak je da su često nepotpuni. State-of-the-art frameworks for KB completion often lack sufficient precision to work fully automated without human supervision. Kao remek, predlažemo: novi interaktivni okvir za završavanje KB-a sa teksta na osnovu pitanja koji odgovara na cijevi. Naš okvir je prilagođen specifičnim potrebama paradigme ljudskog unutar petlja: i) Generiramo činjenice koje su usklađene sa tekstskim snippetama i tako su odmah potvrđene ljudima. ii) Naš sistem je dizajniran tako da stalno uči tijekom zadatka završetka KB-a i stoga značajno poboljšava svoj izvod na početnim odnosima nule i nekoliko pucnjava tijekom vremena. iii) Mi samo aktiviramo ljudske interakcije kada postoje dovoljno informacija za ispravno predviđanje. Zato treniramo naš sistem negativnim primjerima i opcijom, ako nema odgovora. Naš okvir pruža omiljenu predstavu: postiže hit@1 U odnosu od 29,7% za početno nevidljive odnose, na kojima se postupno poboljšava do 46,2%.', 'so': "Qorshaha aqoonta (KBs) waa muhiim u ah shaqada NLP oo badan hoose ka socda, laakiin dhamaadka ugu horeeya waa in inta badan dhamaan. Qoraalka farshaxanka ee KB dhamaadka inta badan ma baahna sax ku filan si aad u shaqeyso si buuxda loo maamulo iyadoon ilaalinayn dadka. Sida caafimaad ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa: qoraal Interactive framework for KB oo ka dhamaystirayo text based on su'aalo ka jawaabaya biil. Shaqoolkayaga waxaa lagu koobay baahida gaarka ah ee baahida qofka looga baahan yahay:(i) Waxaynu abuurnaa xaqiiqyada ku qoran xariijiyada qoraalka, sidaasana markiiba waxaa lagu xaqiijin karaa dadka. (ii) Our system is designed such that it continuously learns during the KB completion task and, therefore, significantly improves its performance upon initial zero- and few-shot relations over time.  (iii) Waxaynu bilownay iskaashatada dadka oo kaliya marka ay jirto macluumaad ku filan in la sii sheego xaqiiq ah. Sidaa darteed, waxaynu nidaamka ku tababarinnaa tusaalooyin negative ah iyo fursad maro, haddii aan jawaab jirin. Shaqooyinkayada ayaa soo saara tababar wanaagsan: waxay gaadhaa hit@1 Qaybta 29,7 boqolkiiba waxay ugu horeysay xiriirka aan la arkaynin, taasoo si taxadar ah ugu kordhaya 46,2 boqolkiiba.", 'sv': 'Kunskapsbaser (KBs) är väsentliga för många av NLP-uppgifter i senare led, men deras främsta brist är att de ofta är ofullständiga. Toppmoderna ramverk för komplettering av KB saknar ofta tillräcklig noggrannhet för att fungera helt automatiserat utan mänsklig övervakning. Som ett botemedel föreslår vi: ett nytt interaktivt ramverk för KB komplettering från text baserat på en frågesvarsledning. Vårt ramverk är skräddarsytt för de specifika behoven hos ett human-in-the-loop paradigm: (i) Vi genererar fakta som är anpassade till textutdrag och därmed omedelbart kan verifieras av människor. (ii) Vårt system är utformat så att det kontinuerligt lär sig under KB-kompletteringsuppgiften och därmed avsevärt förbättrar sin prestanda vid inledande noll- och få-skott-relationer över tid. (iii) Vi utlöser bara mänskliga interaktioner när det finns tillräckligt med information för en korrekt förutsägelse. Därför tränar vi vårt system med negativa exempel och ett vikalternativ om det inte finns något svar. Vårt ramverk ger ett gynnsamt resultat: det uppnår en hit@1 andelen 29,7% för inledningsvis osynliga relationer, där den gradvis förbättras till 46,2%.', 'si': 'Name Name අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධිරූපයෙන් KB සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා අ අපේ පරීක්ෂණයක් විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරදේශයක්: (i) අපි පරික්ෂණය ස්නිපෙට්ට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන (i) අපේ පද්ධතිය සිද්ධිය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒක KB සම්පූර්ණ වැඩේ ඉගෙනගන්න කියලා, ඉතින්, ඒ වගේම, වෙලාවේ පටන් ගත්ත සුන්ධ (Ii) අපි මිනිස්සුන් සම්බන්ධ විතරයි විතරයි හරියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ඇති තොරතුරු තියෙන් ඉතින්, අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය අනතුරු උදාහරණය සහ පොල්ඩ් විකල්පයක් පුළුවන් නැත්නම්. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා hit@1 මුලින් අනතුරු නැති සම්බන්ධතාවට 29.7% විශේෂය, ඒ වගේම ඒක 46.2% විශේෂය කරනවා.', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படைகள் (KBs) நிறைய கீழ்நோக்கி NLP பணிகளுக்கு முக்கியமானது, ஆனால் அவர்களின் முதன்மை சுருக்கம் பெரும்பாலாக முட KB முடிவுக்கான மாநிலை- கலை சட்டங்கள் பெரும்பாலும் மனித கண்காணிப்பு இல்லாமல் முழுமையாக தானியங்கி வேலை செய ஒரு சிகிச்சையாக நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்: ஒரு புதிய இடைவெளிச்செயல் சட்டம் KB முடிவு உரையிலிருந்து ஒரு கேள்வி  எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் ஒரு மனிதனின் குறிப்பிட்ட தேவைகளுக்கு வரையறுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: (i) நாம் உரை குறிப்புகள் உடனே மனிதர்களால் சரிபார்க்கப்படும். (ii) எங்கள் கணினியின் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அது KB முடிவு செய்யும் போது தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் மற்றும் நேரத்தில் முதல் பூஜ்ஜியில (iii) We only trigger human interactions when there is enough information for a correct prediction.  எதிர்மறை உதாரணங்கள் மற்றும் அடைவு விருப்பத்தேர்வு இல்லையென்றால், நாம் எங்கள் அமைப்பினை பயிற்சிக் எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் ஒரு விருப்பமான செயல்பாட்டை கொடுக்கிறது: அது ஒரு பெருக்கிறது hit@1 முதலில் மறைக்கப்படாத தொடர்புகளுக்கான 29.7% விகிதத்தின் விகிதம், அது மேலும் மேலும் 46.2%.', 'ur': 'علم bases (KBs) بہت سی NLP کاموں کے لئے ضرورت ہے، لیکن ان کی اولین کمی یہ ہے کہ وہ اکثر غیر کامل ہیں۔ کیب مکمل کے لئے ایٹیٹ کے فرمورک کبھی انسان کی نظر کے بغیر کام کرنے کے لئے کافی دقیق کام کرنے کے لئے کافی دقیق نہیں ہے. ہم ایک رومیڈی کے طور پر پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں : ایک نو پیپ لین کے جواب دینے والی سؤال کی پابندی پر بنیاد کیب کی مکمل کے لئے ایک پیغام پیدا کرنے والی رومیڈ۔ ہمارا چوکاٹ ایک انسان کی لائق پارادیگ کے مطابق تدبیر کیا گیا ہے: (i) ہم نے حقیقت پیدا کیے ہیں جو پیغام سنپیٹوں کے ساتھ تدبیر کیے جاتے ہیں اور اسی طرح انسانوں کے ذریعہ تدبیر کر سکتے ہیں۔ (ii) ہماری سیسٹم ایسی طراحی کی گئی ہے کہ اس نے کب کی کامل کی کوشش میں ہمیشہ سکھایا ہے اور لہٰذا اس کی عملکرد زمانہ کے بارے میں اچھی صفر اور تھوڑی شاٹ رابطہ پر اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ (iii) ہم تو صرف انسان کی تعاملات کو پھیلاتے ہیں جب ایک درست پیش آنے کے لئے کافی معلومات ہوتی ہے۔ لہٰذا ہم اپنے سیستم کو منفی مثال کے ساتھ تطالب کرتے ہیں اور اگر کوئی جواب نہیں ہوتا تو پولڈ اختیار کریں۔ ہمارا فرمود ایک پسندیدہ عمل پیدا کرتا ہے hit@1 29.7% کی نسبت آغاز سے غیر دیکھی رابطہ کے لئے ہے، جس پر اس نے 46.2% تک تدریج کیا ہے۔', 'uz': "Maʼlumot bazasi (KBs) NLP vazifalari ko'pchilik asosida muhim, ammo ularning asosiy qiymati ko'p narsalar toʻxtatilmaydi. Name Mavzulik sifatida, biz talab qilamiz: Pipelin asosida, KB tugatishi uchun novel interactive frame. Biz freymmiz odamning qo'shilga paradigm keraklariga qo'yiladi: (i) Matn snippetlari bilan birlashtirilgan narsalarni yaramiz va shunday qilib odamlar bilan tasdiqlanamiz. (ii) Bizning tizimmiz bu tizimimiz KB tuzuvchi vazifani davom etishda o'rganadi va shunday qilib, vaqtdan boshlab nuqt va bir necha xil aloqalarni bajaradi. (iii) Biz faqat odamning interfeyslarini toʻgʻri diqqat qilish uchun yetarli maʼlumot borayotganda bajaramiz. Shunday qilib, biz tizimimizni negativ misollar bilan o'rganamiz va javob yo'q bo'lsa, jildni o'rganamiz. Ular hit@1 Bitta boshlangan aloqalar uchun 29.7% foiz, bu darajada 46.2%gaoshadi.", 'vi': 'Các căn cứ kiến thức (KBs) là điều cần thiết cho nhiều công việc tại dòng địa phương, nhưng điểm thiếu sót chính của họ là họ thường không hoàn thiện. Quá trình nâng cao nghệ thuật cho việc hoàn thành KB thường thiếu độ chính xác đủ để làm việc hoàn to àn tự động mà không có người giám sát. Như một phương thuốc, chúng tôi đề nghị... một hệ thống tương tác mới cho việc hoàn thành KB từ một bản văn bản dựa trên một đường dẫn trả lời câu hỏi. Cơ chế của chúng tôi được phù hợp với nhu cầu đặc biệt của một mô hình nhân tạo trên dòng thời gian: i) Chúng tôi tạo ra các dữ kiện được kết hợp với các đoạn trích dẫn văn bản và do đó ngay lập tức được xác định bởi con người. Hệ thống của chúng tôi được thiết kế để học liên tục trong suốt nhiệm vụ hoàn thành của KB và do đó, khả năng của nó tăng lên đáng kể so với các mối quan hệ số không và ít. (III) Chúng ta chỉ kích hoạt giao tiếp của con người khi có đủ thông tin để dự đoán chính xác. Chúng tôi đào tạo hệ thống với những ví dụ tiêu cực và một lựa chọn gấp đôi nếu không có câu trả lời. Cơ sở của chúng tôi đạt được một lợi thế thuận lợi: hit@1 tỉ lệ 29', 'da': 'Videnbaser (KBs) er afgørende for mange efterfølgende NLP-opgaver, men deres primære mangel er, at de ofte er ufuldstændige. State-of-the-art rammer for KB-færdiggørelse mangler ofte tilstrækkelig nøjagtighed til at arbejde fuldt automatiseret uden menneskelig tilsyn. Som et middel foreslår vi: en ny interaktiv ramme for KB komplettering fra tekst baseret på en spørgsmål besvarelse pipeline. Vores ramme er skræddersyet til de specifikke behov i et menneske-in-the-loop paradigme: (i) Vi genererer fakta, der er afstemt med tekststykker og dermed umiddelbart kan verificeres af mennesker. (ii) Vores system er designet således, at det løbende lærer under KB-færdiggørelsesopgaven og derfor forbedrer sin ydeevne betydeligt ved indledende nul- og få-skud-relationer over tid. (iii) Vi udløser kun menneskelige interaktioner, når der er tilstrækkelig information til en korrekt forudsigelse. Derfor træner vi vores system med negative eksempler og en fold-option, hvis der ikke er noget svar. Vores rammer giver en gunstig præstation: det opnår en hit@1 forholdet på 29,7% for oprindeligt usynlige relationer, hvor det gradvist forbedres til 46,2%.', 'nl': 'Kennisbanken (KBs) zijn essentieel voor veel downstream NLP-taken, maar hun grootste tekortkoming is dat ze vaak onvolledig zijn. State-of-the-art frameworks voor KB voltooiing missen vaak voldoende nauwkeurigheid om volledig geautomatiseerd te werken zonder menselijk toezicht. Als remedie stellen we voor: een nieuw interactief raamwerk voor KB invulling op basis van tekst op basis van een vragenbeantwoordingspipeline. Ons framework is afgestemd op de specifieke behoeften van een human-in-the-loop paradigma: (i) We genereren feiten die zijn afgestemd op tekstfragmenten en dus direct controleerbaar zijn door mensen. (ii) Ons systeem is zodanig ontworpen dat het continu leert tijdens de KB voltooiingstaak en daardoor zijn prestaties aanzienlijk verbetert bij aanvankelijke zero- en few-shot relaties na verloop van tijd. (iii) We activeren menselijke interacties alleen wanneer er voldoende informatie is voor een correcte voorspelling. Daarom trainen we ons systeem met negatieve voorbeelden en een fold-optie als er geen antwoord is. Ons framework levert een gunstige prestatie op: het bereikt een hit@1 verhouding van 29,7% voor aanvankelijk onzichtbare relaties, waarop deze geleidelijk verbetert tot 46,2%.', 'bg': 'Базите от знания (КБ) са от съществено значение за много задачи по НЛП надолу по веригата, но основният им недостатък е, че те често са непълни. Съвременните рамки за завършване на КБ често нямат достатъчна точност, за да работят напълно автоматизирани без човешки надзор. Като средство за защита предлагаме: нова интерактивна рамка за попълване на КБ от текст въз основа на тръбопровод за отговори на въпроси. Нашата рамка е съобразена със специфичните нужди на парадигмата "човек в цикъла": (Нашата система е проектирана така, че непрекъснато да се учи по време на задачата за завършване на КБ и следователно значително да подобрява ефективността си при първоначалните нулеви и неколкократни отношения с течение на времето. Ние задействаме взаимодействията с хората само когато има достатъчно информация за правилното предсказване. Затова тренираме нашата система с негативни примери и опция за сгъване, ако няма отговор. Нашата рамка дава благоприятно представяне: тя постига hit@1 съотношение от 29,7% за първоначално невидими отношения, при което постепенно се подобрява до 46,2%.', 'hr': 'Znanstveni bazi (KB) su ključni za mnoge zadatke u NLP-u, ali njihov prvi nedostatak je da su često nepotpuni. State-of-the-art frameworks for KB completion često nedostaje dovoljna preciznost za potpuno automatski rad bez ljudskog nadzora. Kao lijek, predlažemo : novi interaktivni okvir za završavanje KB-a s teksta na temelju pitanja odgovarajućeg cijevina. Naš okvir je prilagođen specifičnim potrebama paradigme ljudskog unutar kruga: i) Generiramo činjenice koje su usklađene s snippetom teksta i tako su odmah potvrđene ljudima. (ii) Naš sustav je dizajniran tako da se stalno uči tijekom zadatka završetka KB-a i stoga značajno poboljšava svoj učinak na početnim odnosima nule i nekoliko snimaka tijekom vremena. iii) Mi aktiviramo ljudske interakcije samo kada postoje dovoljno informacija za ispravnu predviđanje. Stoga treniramo naš sistem negativnim primjerima i opcijom priključavanja ako nema odgovora. Naš okvir pruža omiljenu predstavu: postiže hit@1 U odnosu od 29,7% za početno nevidljive odnose, na kojima se postupno poboljšava do 46,2%.', 'de': 'Knowledge Bases (KBs) sind für viele nachgelagerte NLP-Aufgaben unerlässlich, doch ihr größter Mangel besteht darin, dass sie oft unvollständig sind. Modernste Frameworks für die KB-Fertigstellung fehlen oft an der Genauigkeit, um ohne menschliche Aufsicht vollautomatisch zu arbeiten. Als Abhilfe schlagen wir vor: ein neuartiges interaktives Framework für die KB-Vervollständigung aus Text basierend auf einer Frageantwortpipeline. Unser Framework ist auf die spezifischen Bedürfnisse eines Human-in-the-Loop Paradigmas zugeschnitten: (i) Wir generieren Fakten, die an Textschnipseln ausgerichtet sind und somit vom Menschen sofort nachvollziehbar sind. (ii) Unser System ist so konzipiert, dass es während der KB-Abschlussaufgabe kontinuierlich lernt und somit seine Leistung bei anfänglichen Null- und Wenig-Schuss-Beziehungen im Laufe der Zeit erheblich verbessert. (iii) Wir lösen menschliche Interaktionen nur aus, wenn genügend Informationen für eine korrekte Vorhersage vorhanden sind. Deshalb trainieren wir unser System mit negativen Beispielen und einer Falt-Option, wenn es keine Antwort gibt. Unser Framework liefert eine günstige Leistung: es erreicht eine hit@1 Verhältnis von 29,7% für zunächst unsichtbare Beziehungen, auf denen es sich allmählich auf 46,2% verbessert.', 'id': 'Pangkalan pengetahuan (KB) penting untuk banyak tugas NLP turun, namun kekurangan utama mereka adalah bahwa mereka sering tidak lengkap. Bingkai terbaik untuk menyelesaikan KB sering tidak cukup akurasi untuk bekerja sepenuhnya otomatis tanpa pengawasan manusia. As a remedy, we propose : a novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline.  Our framework is tailored to the specific needs of a human-in-the-loop paradigm: (i) We generate facts that are aligned with text snippets and are thus immediately verifiable by humans.  (ii) Sistem kita dirancang sehingga ia terus belajar selama tugas selesai KB dan, oleh itu, meningkatkan prestasinya dengan signifikan pada hubungan awal nol dan sedikit tembakan dengan waktu. (iii) Kami hanya memicu interaksi manusia ketika ada cukup informasi untuk prediksi yang benar. Oleh karena itu, kita melatih sistem kita dengan contoh negatif dan pilihan lipat jika tidak ada jawaban. kerangka kami memberikan prestasi yang baik: ia mencapai hit@1 nisbah 29,7% untuk hubungan yang tidak terlihat awalnya, di mana secara perlahan-lahan meningkat ke 46,2%.', 'sw': 'Mazingira ya maarifa (KBs) ni muhimu kwa kazi nyingi za NLP za chini, lakini ukosefu wao wa msingi ni kwamba mara nyingi haujakamilika. Miundombinu ya sanaa inayotumiwa na KB mara nyingi hazina uhakika wa kutosha kufanya kazi bila kudhibiti binadamu. As a remedy, we propose : a novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline.  Mfumo wetu umejikita na mahitaji maalum ya mvuto wa binadamu katika upepo wa rangi: (i) tunatengeneza ukweli ambao unaunganishwa na vidole vya maandishi na kwa hiyo tunathibitiwa mara moja na binadamu. (二) Mfumo wetu umeundwa kama vile unavyojifunza wakati wa kazi ya kumaliza KB na kwa hiyo, inaboresha ufanisi wake kwa kiasi kikubwa katika mahusiano ya mwanzo sifuri na michache yanayopigwa kwa muda. (iii) Tunaanzisha mahusiano ya binadamu pale ambapo kuna taarifa za kutosha kwa utabiri sahihi. Kwa hiyo, tunafundisha mfumo wetu kwa mifano hasi na chaguo la viungo kama hakuna jibu. Mifumo yetu inaleta utendaji mzuri: inafanikiwa hit@1 - kiwango cha asilimia 29.7 kwa mahusiano yasiyoonekana mwanzoni, ambacho kwa taratibu inaongezeka hadi asilimia 46.2.', 'ko': "지식 라이브러리 (KBs) 는 많은 하위 NLP 작업에 매우 중요하지만, 그것들의 주요 단점은 그것들이 종종 완전하지 않다는 것이다.지식 라이브러리에 사용되는 가장 선진적인 구조는 일반적으로 충분한 정확성이 부족하여 인공 감독 없이 완전히 자동화하여 일을 할 수 없다.보완 조치로서 우리는 문답 파이프라인을 바탕으로 하는 텍스트 지식 라이브러리의 상호작용 구조를 보완했다.우리의 구조는'사람이 돌아가는'범례의 특정한 수요에 따라 맞춤형으로 만들어진 것이다. (i) 우리는 텍스트 부분과 일치하는 사실을 생성하기 때문에 인류는 즉각 검증할 수 있다.(ii) 우리 시스템은 KB가 임무를 완성하는 동안 지속적으로 공부하도록 설계되었기 때문에 시간의 추이에 따라 초기의 0박자와 소박자의 관계에서 그의 성능이 현저히 향상되었다.(iii) 충분한 정보가 정확한 예측을 할 때만 우리는 인류의 상호작용을 촉발할 수 있다.따라서 우리는 부정적인 예로 시스템을 훈련하고 답이 없으면 접기 옵션을 선택할 수 있다.우리의 프레임워크는 좋은 성능을 낳았다. 그것은 실현되었다hit@1애초 보이지 않았던 관계의 비율은 29.7%였으나 이후 46.2%로 점차 높아졌다.", 'fa': 'پایگاه\u200cهای دانش (KB) برای بسیاری از کارهای NLP پایین\u200cترین پایین\u200cترین هستند، ولی نقطه\u200cی نخستین آنها این است که اغلب کامل هستند. فرم\u200cهای ایالت هنری برای تموم کردن KB اغلب دقیق کافی برای کار کامل بی\u200cنظارت انسان کمک می\u200cشود. به عنوان یک درمانی، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: یک چهارچوب تابع برای کامل کردن KB از متن بر اساس یک سوال جواب دادن لوله. چهارچوب ما به نیازهای مخصوص یک پارادیگ انسان در داخل چوب تغییر داده شده است: (i) حقیقت\u200cها را تولید می\u200cکنیم که با نقطه\u200cهای متن تغییر داده می\u200cشوند و بدین\u200cسان فوراً توسط انسان\u200cها قابل تحقیق می\u200cشوند. (ii) سیستم ما طراحی شده است که در طول عملیات کامل KB همیشه یاد می\u200cگیرد و بنابراین عملیات خود را در ارتباطات صفر و کمی در طول زمان بسیار بهتر می\u200cکند. (iii) ما فقط در حالی که اطلاعات کافی برای پیش بینی درست وجود دارد، تعاملات انسان را فعال می\u200cکنیم. بنابراین، ما سیستم خود را با مثالهای منفی و یک گزینه\u200cی تقسیم آموزش می\u200cدهیم اگر پاسخی وجود ندارد. چهارچوب ما یک عملکرد مورد علاقه ای را می دهد: آن به یک hit@1 نسبت ۲۹.۷ درصد برای اول رابطه\u200cهای غیرقابل مشاهده است که در آن به طور تدریج به ۴۴.۲ درصد بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "Bilim baseleri Kibi tamamlamak üçin stat frameworklary köplenç adam gözlemsizde işlemek üçin ýeterlik dogrylygyny ýetmeýär. Taýýarlama şeklinde , biz KB-iň tamamlanmasy üçin täze bir sistem teklip berýäris. Bizim çerçevemiz, insan dönüşünde paradigm'in özel ihtiyaçlarına uyuyor: (i) Metin snippetlere doğrulanmış ve bu şekilde insan tarafından gerçekleri oluşturur. (ii) Biziň sistemamyz KB-iň tamamlama işi wagtynda öwrenmäge meýilleşdirilýär we şonuň üçin başlangyç işlerini wagtyň başyndaky 0 we biraz ýigrimizi gowuraýar. (iii) Biz diňe adamlaryň täsirlerini dogry tahmin üçin ýeterlik maglumaty bardygynda başlaýarys. Şol sebäpli sistemamyzy negatif mysal bilen öwredýäris we çözüm ýok bolsa çarpma seçenekleri bilen öwredýäris. Biziň çarpakymyz gowy bir hereket etýär: ol ýetip bilýär hit@1 Ilkinji görnüş görnüşleri üçin 29.7%-iň derejesi, bu sebäpli ýuwaşlyk bilen 46.2%.", 'am': 'የእውቀት መቀመጫዎች (KBs) ለብዙ ፈሳሾች NLP ስራዎችን ያስፈልጋል፤ ነገር ግን መጀመሪያ ግጭታቸው ብዙ ጊዜ ያልተፈጸመ ነው፡፡ የKB ፍሬማት የሀገር-የ-አርእስት ፍሬም ብዙ ጊዜ የሰው ማኅበረሰብ ሳይኖር በሙሉ ማስታወቂያ አይጎድልበትም፡፡ በጥያቄ መልስ ጥያቄን በመጠየቅ ላይ የተደረገ የKB ተሟጋቾች የጽሑፍ ፍሬማት ነው፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ የሰው ግንኙነት አካባቢ ነው:(i) በጽሑፍ መንቀሳቅስ እናደርጋለን እና እንደዚህም በሰው ፈቃድ እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ (ii) ስርዓታችን በKB ሙሉ ስራ ውስጥ የሚማር እንደሆነ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም በመጀመሪያው 0 እና ጥቂት ጥያቄ ግንኙነት በጊዜው ያበረታታል፡፡ (iii) ለሰው ግንኙነት ማቀናኘት የሚበቃ መረጃ ቢኖር ብቻ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ስለዚህ ስብሰባችንን በአካባቢ ምሳሌ እና መልስ ባይኖር በአካባቢ ምርጫ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የፍሬማችን ትክክል ፍትወት ያሳድጋል፤ ይደረጋል hit@1 ለመጀመሪያ ያልታወቀው ግንኙነት 29.7 በመቶ ክፍል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Bazat e njohurive (KB) janë thelbësore për shumë detyra të NLP-së poshtë, megjithatë mungesa kryesore e tyre është se ato shpesh janë jo të plota. Kornizat më të larta për përfundimin e KB shpesh mungon saktësia e mjaftueshme për të punuar plotësisht automatizuar pa mbikqyrjen njerëzore. Si mjet, ne propozojmë: një kuadër interaktiv të ri për përfundimin e KB-së nga teksti bazuar në një tubacion përgjigjesh për pyetje. Korniza jonë është e përshtatshme ndaj nevojave specifike të një paradigme njerëzore-në-loop: (i) Ne krijojmë fakte që janë të përshtatshme me shkurtimet e tekstit dhe janë kështu menjëherë të verifikuara nga njerëzit. (ii) Sistemi ynë është projektuar në mënyrë që të mësojë vazhdimisht gjatë detyrës së përfundimit të KB-së dhe, kështu, përmirëson në mënyrë të konsiderueshme performancën e tij në marrëdhëniet fillestare zero-e pak-gjuajtje gjatë kohës. (iii) We only trigger human interactions when there is enough information for a correct prediction.  Prandaj, ne trajnojmë sistemin tonë me shembuj negativ dhe një opsion plikimi nëse nuk ka përgjigje. Korniza jonë jep një shfaqje të favorshme: ajo arrin një hit@1 Përqindje prej 29.7% për marrëdhëniet fillimisht të padukshme, mbi të cilat ajo përmirësohet gradualisht në 46.2%.', 'hy': 'Knowledge bases (KBs) are essential for many downstream NLP tasks, yet their prime shortcoming is that they are often incomplete.  Կ.Բ-ի ավարտին կատարելու ամենաբարձր համակարգերը հաճախ բավարար ճշգրտություն չունեն, որպեսզի աշխատեն լիովին ավտոմատիկ առանց մարդկային վերահսկողության: Որպես բուժման միջոց, մենք առաջարկում ենք․ ԿԲ-ի ավարտելու նոր ինտերակտիվ շրջանակ տեքստից, որը հիմնված է խողովակաշարի պատասխանատվող հարցերի վրա։ Մեր շրջանակը պատրաստված է մարդկային շրջանակի պարադիգմայի հատուկ կարիքներին. i) Մենք ստեղծում ենք փաստեր, որոնք համապատասխանում են տեքստի կտորների հետ և որոնք անմիջապես ստուգելի են մարդկանց կողմից: (II) Մեր համակարգը այնպես է նախագծված, որ այն շարունակաբար սովորի ԿԲ-ի ավարտական խնդրի ընթացքում, և դրա արդյունքում կարևոր բարելավում է իր արտադրողությունը ժամանակի ընթացքում սկզբնական զրո- և քիչ-կրակի հարաբերությունների (III) Մենք միայն մարդկային փոխազդեցություններ ենք առաջացնում, երբ ճիշտ կանխատեսման համար բավարար տեղեկատվություն կա: Այսպիսով, մենք մեր համակարգը վարժեցնում ենք բացասական օրինակներով և բաժանման տարբերակով, եթե պատասխան չկա: Մեր շրջանակը հանգեցնում է բարելավելի արդյունք. այն հասնում է hit@1 Սկզբում անտեսանելի հարաբերությունների 29.7 տոկոսի հարաբերությունը, որի վրա այն աստիճանաբար բարելավվում է 46.2 տոկոսի:', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের বেস (কেবিএস) অনেকের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এনএলপি কাজের জন্য, কিন্তু তাদের প্রধান সংক্ষিপ্ত কাজ হলো তারা প্রায়শ সম কেবি সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফ্রেম প্রায়শই যথেষ্ট পরিস্থিতির অভাব নেই মানুষের পর্যবেক্ষণ ছা একটি প্রতিক্রিয়া হিসেবে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি: পাইপেলাইনের উত্তরের ভিত্তিতে কেবি টেক্সট থেকে পূর্ণ করার জন্য একটি নvel ইন্টা আমাদের কাঠামো মানুষের লুপ প্যারাডিমের নির্দিষ্ট প্রয়োজনের প্রতি তৈরি করা হয়েছে: (i) আমরা বাস্তবতা তৈরি করি যা লেখা স্নিপেট দিয়ে সংযুক্ত (২) আমাদের সিস্টেমের ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে যে এটি কেবি পূর্ণ কাজের সময় ক্রমাগত জানতে পারে এবং তাই তার প্রাথমিক শূন্য এবং সামান্য কিছু গুলি সম্পর (ই) আমরা শুধুমাত্র মানুষের ইন্টারেক্টরেশন তুলে ধরি যখন সঠিক ভবিষ্যতের জন্য যথেষ্ট তথ্য রয়েছে। তাই আমরা নেতিবাচক উদাহরণ এবং ফোল্ড-অপশন দিয়ে আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণ করি যদি কোন উত্তর নেই। আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো একটা ভালো প্রদর্শন করে: এটা অর্জন করে hit@1 প্রাথমিক অদৃশ্য সম্পর্কের জন্য ২৯. ৭ শতাংশের হার, যার মধ্যে এটি ধীরে ৪৬.', 'bs': 'Znanstveni bazi (KB) su ključni za mnoge spuštene NLP zadatke, ali njihov prvi nedostatak je da su često nepotpuni. State-of-the-art frameworks for KB completion često nedostaje dovoljna preciznost da se potpuno automatski radi bez ljudskog nadzora. Kao remek, predlažemo : novi interaktivni okvir za završavanje KB-a iz teksta na temelju pitanja odgovarajućeg cijevina. Naš okvir je prilagođen specifičnim potrebama paradigme ljudskog unutar kruga: i) Generiramo činjenice koje su usklađene sa snippetom teksta i tako su odmah potvrđene ljudima. (ii) Naš sistem je dizajniran tako da stalno uči tijekom zadatka završetka KB-a i stoga značajno poboljšava svoj učinak na početnim odnosima nule i nekoliko metaka tijekom vremena. iii) Mi samo aktiviramo ljudske interakcije kada postoje dovoljno informacija za ispravnu predviđanje. Stoga treniramo naš sistem negativnim primjerima i opcijom, ako nema odgovora. Naš okvir pruža dobru predstavu: postiže hit@1 U odnosu od 29,7% za početno nevidljive odnose, na kojima se postupno poboljšava do 46,2%.', 'az': 'Bilim üssələri (KB) bir çox aşağı NLP işləri üçün vacib deyildir, amma onların ilk zəifliyi çox sıfırla tamamlanmışdır. KB tamamlama üçün sanat frameworkləri çox insan gözləmədən tamamlanmaq üçün yeterli ədaləti yoxdur. İdarə etdiyimiz kimi: KB tamamlanması üçün yeni interaktiv frameworklər təklif edirik. Bizim qurğumuz insan-in-loop paradigmanın məxluqatını təmizləndirir: (ii) Bizim sistemimiz KB tamamlama işləri sırasında öyrənmək üçün hazırlanmışdır və buna görə də başlangıç sıfır və az sıfır əlaqələri zamanında çox yaxşılaşdırır. (iii) Biz yalnız insan əlaqələrini doğru tədbir üçün yeterli məlumat olduğu zaman başladırıq. Buna görə də sistemimizi negatif məsəllərlə təhsil edirik. Əgər cevap yoxdur, bir fold-options ilə təhsil edirik. Bizim qurğumuz yaxşılıq göstəricisi yetirir: hit@1 Başlangıçta görmədiyim ilişkilerin 29.7%-inin oranı, bu da 46.2%.', 'ca': "Les bases de coneixements (KB) són essencials per a moltes tasques avançades del NLP, però la principal deficiència és que sovint són incompletes. Els marcs més moderns per a completar KB sovint no tenen suficient precisió per treballar totalment automatitzat sense supervisió humana. Com a remedi, proposem: un nou marc interactiu per a la completació de KB a partir del text basat en un sistema de resposta a preguntes. El nostre marc està adaptat a les necessitats específices d'un paradigma humà en circuit: (i) generam fets allinjats amb fragments de text i són immediatament verificables pels humans. ii) El nostre sistema està dissenyat de tal manera que aprenga continuament durant la tasca de completament de KB i, per tant, millora significativament el seu rendiment en relacions inicials de zero i pocs tiros amb el temps. iii) Només provoquem interaccions humanes quan hi ha prou informació per a una predicció correcta. Per tant, entrenem el nostre sistema amb exemples negatius i una opció de doble si no hi ha resposta. Our framework yields a favorable performance: it achieves a  hit@1 La proporció del 29,7% per les relacions inicialment invisibles, amb la qual s'millora gradualment al 46,2%.", 'cs': 'Znalostní báze (KBs) jsou nezbytné pro mnoho následných úkolů NLP, avšak jejich hlavním nedostatkem je, že jsou často neúplné. Moderní rámce pro dokončování KB často postrádají dostatečnou přesnost, aby mohly pracovat plně automatizovaně bez lidského dohledu. Jako nápravu navrhujeme nový interaktivní rámec pro doplňování KB z textu založený na odpovědi na otázky. Náš rámec je přizpůsoben specifickým potřebám paradigmatu člověka ve smyčce: (i) Generujeme fakta, která jsou sladěna s textovými úryvky a jsou tak okamžitě ověřitelná lidmi. (ii) Náš systém je navržen tak, aby se neustále učil během úkolu dokončení KB, a tím výrazně zlepšoval svůj výkon při počátečních vztazích nulových a několika výstřelů v průběhu času. (iii) Spouštíme lidské interakce pouze tehdy, když je dostatek informací pro správnou predikci. Proto trénujeme náš systém s negativními příklady a fold-option, pokud neexistuje žádná odpověď. Náš rámec přináší příznivý výkon: dosahuje hit@1 poměr 29,7% pro původně neviděné vztahy, na kterém se postupně zlepšuje na 46,2%.', 'et': 'Teadmistebaasid on olulised paljude uue tööprogrammi järgnevate ülesannete jaoks, kuid nende peamine puudus on sageli mittetäielik. Tipptasemel raamistikud KB lõpetamiseks ei ole sageli piisavalt täpsed, et töötada täielikult automatiseeritud ilma inimese järelevalveta. Parandusmeetmena pakume välja uudse interaktiivse raamistiku KB täitmiseks tekstist, mis põhineb küsimustele vastamise kanalil. Meie raamistik on kohandatud inimese silmuses paradigma spetsiifilistele vajadustele: (i) Me loome fakte, mis on kooskõlas tekstilõigetega ja on seega inimestele koheselt kontrollitavad. (ii) Meie süsteem on projekteeritud nii, et see õpib pidevalt KB lõpetamise ülesande käigus ja parandab seetõttu oluliselt oma jõudlust esialgsetel null- ja vähese pildi suhetel aja jooksul. (iii) Me käivitame inimeste suhtluse ainult siis, kui on piisavalt informatsiooni õigeks prognoosimiseks. Seetõttu treenime oma süsteemi negatiivsete näidetega ja kokkupandava valikuvõimalusega, kui vastust ei ole. Meie raamistik annab soodsa tulemuslikkuse: see saavutab hit@1 algselt nähtamatute suhete puhul 29,7%, mille puhul see järk-järgult paraneb 46,2%ni.', 'af': "Kenningsbases (Kb) is noodsaaklik vir baie onderstreem NLP-opdragte, maar hulle voorste kortpad is dat hulle dikwels onvoldoende is. State-of-the-art raamwerke vir Kb voltooiing dikwels ontbreek voldoende presisie om volledig outomaties te werk sonder menslike supervisie. As 'n hersteling, voorstel ons :  ' n roman interaktief raamwerk vir Kb voltooiing van teks gebaseer op ' n vraag antwoord met pyplyn. Ons raamwerk is versterk tot die spesifieke behoeftes van 'n mens-in-die-loop paradigme: i) Ons genereer fakte wat met teks snippets gelyk is en dan is onmiddellik bevestig deur mense. (ii) Ons stelsel is ontwerp sodat dit voortdurende leer tydens die Kb voltooiing opdrag en, dus, betekeurig verbeter sy prestasie op die aanvanklike nul- en paar-skoot relasies oor tyd. (iii) Ons aktiveer slegs menslike interaksies wanneer daar genoeg inligting is vir 'n korrekte voorskou. Daarom, ons tref ons stelsel met negatiewe voorbeelde en 'n vouopsie as daar geen antwoord is nie. Ons raamwerk gee 'n gunstelike prestasie: dit bereik hit@1 Verhouding van 29.7% vir aanvanklik ongesien verhouding, waarop dit gradief verbeter tot 46.2%.", 'fi': 'Tietotietokannat (KB) ovat välttämättömiä monille jatkojalostustehtäville, mutta niiden tärkein puute on se, että ne ovat usein puutteellisia. Tietokantatietoaineiston valmistumisen viimeisintä tekniikkaa edustavat puitteet eivät useinkaan ole riittävän tarkkoja toimimaan täysin automatisoidusti ilman ihmisen valvontaa. Korjaukseksi ehdotamme uutta interaktiivista kehystä tietoaineiston täydentämiseksi tekstistä, joka perustuu kysymysputkeen. Kehyksemme on räätälöity human in the loop -paradigman erityistarpeisiin: (i) Luomme faktoja, jotka ovat linjassa tekstikatkelmien kanssa ja jotka ovat siten ihmisten välittömästi todennettavissa. (ii) Järjestelmämme on suunniteltu siten, että se oppii jatkuvasti KB-suorituksen aikana ja näin ollen parantaa merkittävästi suorituskykyään alkuvaiheen nolla- ja muutaman laukauksen suhteen aikana ajan mittaan. (iii) Käynnistämme ihmisten vuorovaikutuksen vain silloin, kun tietoja on riittävästi oikean ennusteen tekemiseen. Siksi koulutamme järjestelmäämme negatiivisilla esimerkeillä ja fold-optiolla, jos vastausta ei ole. Kehyksemme tuottaa suotuisan suorituskyvyn: se saavuttaa hit@1 Alunperin näkymättömien suhteiden suhde on 29,7 prosenttia, jolloin se vähitellen paranee 46,2 prosenttiin.', 'ha': "Babu sanin da aka sani (KBs) yana da muhimu wa masu aikin mãsu yawa na ƙarami na NLP, kuma amma ƙarami sunan da ba'a sani ba da yawa ba su cika. @ item: inmenu Text Completion As an kashe, za'a buƙata: wata samar masu husũma na yanzu mai amfani da KB ya cika daga matsayi, a kan wani tambayi ya tambayi gabatar da misalin. An baka firam kanmu zuwa ga mahitancin mutum wanda ke cikin-loop: (i) Muna sami masu gaskiya wanda aka samu da takardar rubutu kuma kamar wannan ne ke tabbatar da mutum. To, aka designe na'asarmu kamar yana iya karanta shi a lokacin da ake cika aikin KB, kuma don haka, ya kyautata aikin sa idan na fara tsarin lokaci- da kaɗan. Shi ne Muke fara aiki ga mutum kawai idan an is a ga wani lãbãri mai gaskatãwa. Saboda haka, munã ƙidãya kanmu da misãlai nega da shirin jigon-duffai idan ba na da jibar ba. Firmakonmu ta bãyar da wani aikin mai kyau; yana sãmu a hit@1 rabo na 29,7% wa dangantaka na farko, inda yana ƙara zuwa 46.2%.", 'he': 'בסיסי הידע (KBs) הם חיוניים למשימות רבות של NLP למטה, אך החסר הראשי שלהם הוא שהם לעתים קרובות לא מלאים. המסגרות המאומנות המאומנות לשימוש KB לעתים קרובות חסרות מדויקת מספיקה לעבוד באוטומטית לחלוטין ללא פיקוח אנושי. As a remedy, we propose : a novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline.  המסגרת שלנו מתאימה לצורכים המיוחדים של פרדיגמה אנושית בתוך המעגל: (i) אנחנו יוצרים עובדות שמתאימות לחתיכות טקסט ולכן מיד ניתן לאמת על ידי בני אדם. (ii) המערכת שלנו מתוכננת כך שהיא לומדת כל הזמן במהלך משימה השלמת KB ולכן משפר באופן משמעותי את ביצועיה על מערכות יחסים ראשונות של אפס ומעט יריות במהלך הזמן. (iii) אנחנו מפעילים אינטראקציות אנושיות רק כאשר יש מספיק מידע לחזוי נכון. לכן, אנחנו מאמן את המערכת שלנו עם דוגמאות שליליות ואפשרות כפילה אם אין תשובה. המסגרת שלנו נותנת ביצועים טובים: היא משיגה hit@1  ratio of 29.7% for initially unseen relations, upon which it gradually improves to 46.2%.', 'sk': 'Zbirke znanja so bistvenega pomena za številne nadaljnje naloge NLP, vendar je njihova glavna pomanjkljivost, da so pogosto nepopolne. Najsodobnejši okviri za dokončanje KB pogosto nimajo dovolj natančnosti za delo popolnoma avtomatizirano brez človeškega nadzora. Kot rešitev predlagamo: nov interaktivni okvir za dokončanje KB iz besedila, ki temelji na cevovodu za odgovore na vprašanja. Naš okvir je prilagojen specifičnim potrebam paradigme človeka v zanki: (i) Ustvarjamo dejstva, ki so usklajena z odlomki besedila in jih takoj lahko ljudje preverijo. (ii) Naš sistem je zasnovan tako, da se stalno uči med opravilom dokončanja KB in s tem bistveno izboljšuje njegovo zmogljivost ob začetnih ničelnih in malih odnosih skozi čas. (iii) Medsebojno delovanje ljudi sprožimo le, če je na voljo dovolj informacij za pravilno napoved. Zato naš sistem usposabljamo z negativnimi primeri in zložljivo opcijo, če ni odgovora. Naš okvir prinaša ugodno učinkovitost: doseže hit@1 razmerje 29,7% za prvotno nevidne odnose, pri čemer se postopoma izboljšuje na 46,2%.', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཤེས་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན(KBs)ནི་ཉེ་གནས་ཀྱི་NLP ལས་ཀ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་འདི་ར KB་མཇུག་བསྡུ་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་དེ། As a remedy, we propose : a novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline. A novel interactive framework for KB completion from text based on a question answering pipeline. Our framework is tailored to the specific needs of a human-in-the-loop paradigm: (i) We generate facts that are aligned with text snippets and are thus immediately verifiable by humans. (ii) ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་དུས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ལས (iii) ང་ཚོས་མི་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཅིག་གི་མཐུན་སྐྱེལ་དང་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཐད་ཡོད་པ་རེད། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་དང་ཡིག་སྣོད་གདམ ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞིས་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་སྐྱེན་གྱི་སྐྱེས་སྟངས་ཤིག་དང་། hit@1 སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འགོ་བཙུགས་མེད་པ་དེ་འགོ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་29.7% དང་མཉམ་དུ་46.2%.', 'jv': 'Siji-Siji (kbs) sing dianggo barang kanggo akeh operasi NLP butuh, dadi iki dadi sing perkoro akeh liyane structural navigation Sampeyan nganggo perbudhakan, kita supoyo: ungan negori dadi interactive kanggo Kebungke mulai nggo teks sing basa nang panggayong sing bisa bantuan. Genjer-genjer diagram sing dumatenggo nggawe barang kelas barang-barêng. (ii) Sistem-sistem sing ditambah penting kanggo masalah iki dadi ono mulai terus nggawe Sistem bukanjure potong, dadi, njuk vewih akeh iso nggawe barang sistem sing sampeyan balé- lan kelas-kotang iso nggawe ngupakan uwis. (iii) Awak dhéwé mengko iso nggawe interaksi uwong sampeyan karo informasi sing gak barêng nggawe tarjamahan. Kaya, kéné milih sistem dhéwé nganggo baléné, lan akeh-option sing ora ono balén. Kita andhaduk sing nduwe akeh wong liya sing nduwe akeh apik: iso nggawe barang apik hit@1 ratio sampeyan 30.7% kanggo ditambah tanggal, dadi iki dadi luwih basa sampeyan karo 49.2%.'}
{'en': 'Multimodal Sentence Summarization via Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'es': 'Resumen de oraciones multimodal mediante codificación selectiva multimodal', 'fr': 'Synthèse de phrases multimodale par codage sélectif multimodal', 'ar': 'تلخيص الجملة متعدد الوسائط عبر التشفير الانتقائي متعدد الوسائط', 'pt': 'Sumarização de sentenças multimodais via codificação seletiva multimodal', 'zh': '多模态选择性编码多模态句', 'ja': 'マルチモーダル選択エンコーディングによるマルチモーダル文章の要約', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल चयनात्मक एन्कोडिंग के माध्यम से बहुआयामी वाक्य सारांशीकरण', 'ru': 'Суммирование мультимодального предложения с помощью мультимодального селективного кодирования', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar Phianbhreith Ilmhódach trí Ionchódú Roghnach Ilmhódach', 'ka': 'მულტიმედიალური სიტყვების საზოგადომიზაციაName', 'hu': 'Multimodális mondatok összefoglalása multimodális szelektív kódolással', 'el': 'Πολυmodale Σύνοψη προτάσεων μέσω πολυμmodaler επιλεκτικής κωδικοποίησης', 'it': 'Sintesi delle frasi multimodali tramite codifica selettiva multimodale', 'kk': 'КөпModal таңдау кодтамасы арқылы көптеген сөз тұжырымдамасы', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšio sakinio santrauka naudojant daugiarūšio atrankinį kodavimą', 'mk': 'Multimodal Sentence Summarization via Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Hukuman Multimodal melalui Pengekodan Pemilihan Multimodal', 'mt': 'Sommarju tas-Sentenzi Multimodali permezz tal-Kodifikazzjoni Selettiva Multimodali', 'mn': 'Олон загварын өгүүлбэр дээр олон загварын сонголтын кодлого', 'ml': 'Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'pl': 'Multimodalne podsumowanie zdań za pomocą multimodalnego kodowania selektywnego', 'no': 'Multimodal samandrag av teikn via multimodal utvalte koding', 'ro': 'Rezumatul propoziției multimodale prin codificare selectivă multimodală', 'sr': 'Multimodalna sažetka izraza putem multimodalnog selektivnog kodiranja', 'si': 'ගොඩමෝඩල් වචන සංකේතය', 'so': 'Xiriiriga dhaqdhaqaaqa kala duduwan oo lagu isticmaalo kaararka doorashada kala duduwan', 'sv': 'Multimodal meningssammanfattning via multimodal selektiv kodning', 'ta': 'Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'ur': 'Multimodal Sentence Summarization via Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng', 'bg': 'Многомодално обобщаване на изречението чрез мултимодално селективно кодиране', 'nl': 'Multimodale zinssamenvatting via multimodale selectieve codering', 'hr': 'Multimodalna sažetka izraza putem multimodalnog selektivnog kodiranja', 'da': 'Multimodal sætningsopsummering via multimodal selektiv kodning', 'id': 'Ringkasan Sentensi Multimodal melalui Pengekodan Selektif Multimodal', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Udhibiti wa Sensi kwa kupitia Ujumbe wa Kuchagua', 'de': 'Multimodale Satzsummung mittels multimodaler selektiver Codierung', 'ko': '다중모드 선택 인코딩 기반의 다중모드 문장 요약', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری کلمه\u200cهای چندmodal via Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Saýlaw Ködleme Aralygy', 'am': 'ምርጫ', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Multimodal Sentence Summarization via Multimodal Selective Encoding', 'az': 'Multimodal Seçici Kodlama vasitəsilə Multimodal Sözü Toplaşdırma', 'bn': 'বহুমোডাল নির্বাচিত এনকোডিং মাধ্যমে মাল্টিমোডাল শাস্তি সামারিজেশন', 'cs': 'Multimodální shrnutí věty pomocí multimodálního selektivního kódování', 'ca': 'Resumen de sentences multimodals mitjançant codificació selectiva multimodal', 'bs': 'Multimodalna sažetka izraza putem multimodalnog selektivnog kodiranja', 'et': 'Multimodaalne lause kokkuvõte multimodaalse selektiivse kodeerimise kaudu', 'hy': 'Comment', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen lauseen yhteenveto multimodaalisen selektiivisen koodauksen avulla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Multimodalni povzetek stavkov prek multimodalnega selektivnega kodiranja', 'bo': 'སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཚོར་བ་སྣང་ཚོགས་མཛེས་ཁུངས་འདྲ་བྱེད་སྟངས', 'he': 'סדרת משפטים רבות מודליות באמצעות קידוד בחירה רבות מודלית', 'jv': 'iCalImp'}
{'en': 'This paper studies the problem of generating a summary for a given sentence-image pair. Existing multimodal sequence-to-sequence approaches mainly focus on enhancing the decoder by visual signals, while ignoring that the image can improve the ability of the encoder to identify highlights of a news event or a document. Thus, we propose a multimodal selective gate network that considers reciprocal relationships between textual and multi-level visual features, including global image descriptor, activation grids, and object proposals, to select highlights of the event when encoding the source sentence. In addition, we introduce a modality regularization to encourage the summary to capture the highlights embedded in the image more accurately. To verify the generalization of our model, we adopt the multimodal selective gate to the text-based decoder and multimodal-based decoder. Experimental results on a public multimodal sentence summarization dataset demonstrate the advantage of our models over baselines. Further analysis suggests that our proposed multimodal selective gate network can effectively select important information in the input sentence.', 'ar': 'تدرس هذه الورقة مشكلة إنشاء ملخص لزوج معين من صورة الجملة. تركز مناهج التسلسل إلى التسلسل الحالية المتعددة الوسائط بشكل أساسي على تعزيز وحدة فك التشفير عن طريق الإشارات المرئية ، مع تجاهل أن الصورة يمكن أن تحسن قدرة المشفر على تحديد أبرز حدث إخباري أو مستند. وبالتالي ، فإننا نقترح شبكة بوابة انتقائية متعددة الوسائط تأخذ في الاعتبار العلاقات المتبادلة بين السمات المرئية النصية ومتعددة المستويات ، بما في ذلك واصف الصورة العالمية وشبكات التنشيط ومقترحات الكائن ، لتحديد أبرز الأحداث عند تشفير الجملة المصدر. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقدم تنظيمًا للطريقة لتشجيع الملخص على التقاط النقاط البارزة المضمنة في الصورة بشكل أكثر دقة. للتحقق من تعميم نموذجنا ، نعتمد البوابة الانتقائية متعددة الوسائط إلى وحدة فك التشفير القائمة على النص ووحدة فك التشفير القائمة على الوسائط المتعددة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة بيانات عامة لتلخيص الجملة متعددة الوسائط ميزة نماذجنا على الخطوط الأساسية. يشير التحليل الإضافي إلى أن شبكة البوابة الانتقائية متعددة الوسائط المقترحة يمكنها تحديد المعلومات المهمة بشكل فعال في جملة الإدخال.', 'es': 'Este artículo estudia el problema de generar un resumen para un par sentencia-imagen dado. Los enfoques multimodales de secuencia a secuencia existentes se centran principalmente en mejorar el decodificador mediante señales visuales, al tiempo que ignoran que la imagen puede mejorar la capacidad del codificador para identificar puntos destacados de un evento de noticias o un documento. Por lo tanto, proponemos una red de puertas selectivas multimodal que considera las relaciones recíprocas entre las características visuales textuales y multinivel, incluido el descriptor de imagen global, las cuadrículas de activación y las propuestas de objetos, para seleccionar los aspectos más destacados del evento al codificar la oración fuente. Además, introducimos una modalidad de regularización para fomentar que el resumen capture los puntos destacados incrustados en la imagen con mayor precisión. Para verificar la generalización de nuestro modelo, adoptamos la puerta selectiva multimodal para el decodificador basado en texto y el decodificador basado en multimodal. Los resultados experimentales en un conjunto de datos de resumen de oraciones multimodal público demuestran la ventaja de nuestros modelos sobre las líneas de base. Un análisis más detallado sugiere que nuestra red de puertas selectivas multimodal propuesta puede seleccionar eficazmente información importante en la oración de entrada.', 'fr': "Cet article étudie le problème de la génération d'un résumé pour une paire phrase-image donnée. Les approches multimodales séquence-séquence existantes se concentrent principalement sur l'amélioration du décodeur par des signaux visuels, tout en ignorant que l'image peut améliorer la capacité du codeur à identifier les points forts d'un événement d'actualité ou d'un document. Ainsi, nous proposons un réseau de portes sélectives multimodales qui prend en compte les relations réciproques entre les caractéristiques visuelles textuelles et multiniveaux, y compris le descripteur d'image global, les grilles d'activation et les propositions d'objets, afin de sélectionner les points forts de l'événement lors du codage de la phrase source. De plus, nous introduisons une modalité de régularisation pour encourager le résumé à capturer plus précisément les hautes lumières intégrées dans l'image. Pour vérifier la généralisation de notre modèle, nous adoptons le portail sélectif multimodal vers le décodeur basé sur texte et le décodeur multimodal. Les résultats expérimentaux d'un ensemble de données public de synthèse de phrases multimodales démontrent l'avantage de nos modèles par rapport aux bases de référence. Une analyse plus approfondie suggère que notre réseau de portes sélectives multimodales peut sélectionner efficacement des informations importantes dans la phrase d'entrée.", 'pt': 'Este artigo estuda o problema de gerar um resumo para um determinado par frase-imagem. As abordagens multimodais de sequência a sequência existentes concentram-se principalmente no aprimoramento do decodificador por sinais visuais, ignorando que a imagem pode melhorar a capacidade do codificador de identificar destaques de um evento de notícias ou um documento. Assim, propomos uma rede de portas seletivas multimodal que considera relações recíprocas entre recursos textuais e visuais multiníveis, incluindo descritor de imagem global, grades de ativação e propostas de objetos, para selecionar destaques do evento ao codificar a sentença fonte. Além disso, introduzimos uma modalidade de regularização para incentivar o resumo a capturar os destaques incorporados na imagem com mais precisão. Para verificar a generalização do nosso modelo, adotamos a porta seletiva multimodal para o decodificador baseado em texto e o decodificador baseado em multimodal. Resultados experimentais em um conjunto de dados de sumarização de sentença multimodal pública demonstram a vantagem de nossos modelos sobre as linhas de base. Uma análise mais aprofundada sugere que nossa rede de portas seletiva multimodal proposta pode efetivamente selecionar informações importantes na sentença de entrada.', 'ja': 'この論文では、特定の文-画像ペアの要約を生成する問題を研究している。 既存のマルチモーダルシーケンスツーシーケンスアプローチは、主に、画像がニュースイベントまたはドキュメントのハイライトを識別するエンコーダの能力を向上させることができることを無視しながら、視覚信号によってデコーダを強化することに焦点を当てる。 したがって、私たちは、ソース文を符号化するときにイベントのハイライトを選択するために、グローバル画像記述子、アクティベーショングリッド、およびオブジェクト提案を含む、テキストとマルチレベルの視覚特徴の間の相互関係を考慮するマルチモーダル選択ゲートネットワークを提案します。 さらに、画像に埋め込まれたハイライトをより正確にキャプチャするように要約を促すモダリティ規則化を導入します。 モデルの一般化を検証するために、テキストベースのデコーダとマルチモーダベースのデコーダにマルチモーダ選択ゲートを採用しています。 公開されたマルチモーダル文章要約データセットの実験結果は、ベースラインに対する当社のモデルの利点を示しています。 さらなる分析は、我々が提案したマルチモーダル選択ゲートネットワークが入力文の重要な情報を効果的に選択できることを示唆している。', 'ru': 'В этой статье изучается проблема создания резюме для данной пары предложение-образ. Существующие мультимодальные последовательные подходы в основном сосредоточены на улучшении декодера визуальными сигналами, в то же время игнорируя, что изображение может улучшить способность кодера идентифицировать основные моменты новостного события или документа. Таким образом, мы предлагаем мультимодальную селективную шлюзовую сеть, которая рассматривает взаимные взаимосвязи между текстовыми и многоуровневыми визуальными признаками, включая глобальный дескриптор изображения, сетки активации и предложения объектов, для выбора выделений события при кодировании исходного предложения. Кроме того, мы вводим регуляризацию модальности, чтобы стимулировать обобщение для более точного отражения ярких моментов, встроенных в изображение. Чтобы проверить обобщение нашей модели, мы принимаем мультимодальные селективные ворота к текстовому декодеру и мультимодальному декодеру. Экспериментальные результаты по общедоступному набору данных для обобщения мультимодальных предложений демонстрируют преимущество наших моделей над базовыми линиями. Дальнейший анализ показывает, что предлагаемая нами мультимодальная селективная сеть ворот может эффективно выбирать важную информацию во входном предложении.', 'zh': '本文研为给定句- 图像生成摘要。 今之多模态序于序者侧重于以视号增解码器,而忽于图像可以崇编码器识新闻事文档亮点之能。 故多模态选择性门网络,当网络思文本、多视(全局图形述符,激活网格与所议)相关,以择事于编码源句之亮点。 又引入一模态正则化,以劝摘要益得嵌像之亮点。 以验模形之广,用多模态选择性门到于文本解码器基于多模态之解码器。 公共多模态句摘要数集实验验吾形相对基线之势。 更分析表明多模态选择性门网络择句中要信。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर किसी दिए गए वाक्य-छवि जोड़ी के लिए सारांश उत्पन्न करने की समस्या का अध्ययन करता है। मौजूदा मल्टीमॉडल अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम दृष्टिकोण मुख्य रूप से दृश्य संकेतों द्वारा डिकोडर को बढ़ाने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जबकि यह अनदेखा करते हुए कि छवि एक समाचार घटना या दस्तावेज़ के हाइलाइट्स की पहचान करने के लिए एन्कोडर की क्षमता में सुधार कर सकती है। इस प्रकार, हम एक बहुआयामी चयनात्मक गेट नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो स्रोत वाक्य को एन्कोडिंग करते समय ईवेंट के हाइलाइट्स का चयन करने के लिए वैश्विक छवि डिस्क्रिप्टर, सक्रियण ग्रिड और ऑब्जेक्ट प्रस्तावों सहित पाठ्य और बहु-स्तरीय दृश्य सुविधाओं के बीच पारस्परिक संबंधों पर विचार करता है। इसके अलावा, हम छवि में एम्बेडेड हाइलाइट्स को अधिक सटीक रूप से कैप्चर करने के लिए सारांश को प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए एक रूपरेखा नियमितीकरण पेश करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल के सामान्यीकरण को सत्यापित करने के लिए, हम पाठ-आधारित विकोडक और मल्टीमॉडल-आधारित डिकोडर के लिए मल्टीमॉडल चयनात्मक गेट को अपनाते हैं। एक सार्वजनिक बहुआयामी वाक्य सारांश डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बेसलाइन पर हमारे मॉडल के लाभ को प्रदर्शित करते हैं। आगे के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मल्टीमॉडल चयनात्मक गेट नेटवर्क इनपुट वाक्य में महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी का प्रभावी ढंग से चयन कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le hachoimre a ghiniúint le haghaidh péire abairt-íomhá tugtha. Díríonn cur chuige seicheamh-go-seicheamh ilmhódach atá ann faoi láthair go príomha ar fheabhas a chur ar an díchódóir trí chomharthaí amhairc, agus aird á tabhairt gur féidir leis an íomhá feabhas a chur ar chumas an ionchódóra buaicphointí imeacht nuachta nó doiciméid a aithint. Mar sin, molaimid líonra geata roghnach ilmhódach a bhreithníonn caidrimh chómhalartacha idir gnéithe amhairc téacsúla agus il-leibhéil, lena n-áirítear tuairisceoir íomhá domhanda, greillí gníomhachtaithe, agus tograí oibiachta, chun buaicphointí an imeachta a roghnú agus an abairt fhoinseach á ionchódú. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid isteach rialtacht modha chun an achoimre a spreagadh chun na buaicphointí atá leabaithe san íomhá a ghabháil ar bhealach níos cruinne. Chun ginearálú ár múnla a fhíorú, glacaimid an geata roghnach ilmhódach chuig an díchódóir téacsbhunaithe agus an díchódóir ilmhódach-bhunaithe. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacar sonraí poiblí achoimre abairtí ilmhódúil an buntáiste a bhaineann lenár samhlacha thar bhunlínte. Tugann anailís bhreise le fios gur féidir lenár ngréasán geata ilmhódach roghnaitheach atá beartaithe faisnéis thábhachtach a roghnú go héifeachtach san abairt ionchuir.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy adott mondat-kép párra vonatkozó összefoglaló készítésének problémáját vizsgálja. A meglévő multimodális szekvencia-szekvencia megközelítések elsősorban a dekóder vizuális jelekkel történő javítására összpontosítanak, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyják, hogy a kép javíthatja a kódoló képességét egy hírek vagy egy dokumentum kiemelt pontjainak azonosítására. Ezért olyan multimodális szelektív kapuhálózatot javasolunk, amely figyelembe veszi a szöveges és a többszintű vizuális jellemzők kölcsönös kapcsolatait, beleértve a globális képleírót, az aktiválási rácsokat és az objektumjavaslatokat, hogy kiválassza az esemény kiemelkedő pontjait a forráskód kódolásakor. Ezenkívül bevezetünk egy módszerszabályozást, amely ösztönzi az összefoglalót, hogy pontosabban rögzítse a képbe ágyazott kiemeléseket. Modellünk általánosításának ellenőrzése érdekében a multimodális szelektív kaput alkalmazzuk a szövegalapú dekóderhez és multimodális alapú dekóderhez. Egy nyilvános multimodális mondatgyűjtő adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják modelleink előnyét a kiindulási vonalakkal szemben. További elemzések azt sugallják, hogy javasolt multimodális szelektív kapuhálózatunk hatékonyan kiválaszthatja a fontos információkat a bemeneti mondatban.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία μελετά το πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας μιας σύνοψης για ένα δεδομένο ζευγάρι πρότασης-εικόνας. Οι υπάρχουσες πολυπροπικές προσεγγίσεις αλληλουχίας-αλληλουχίας εστιάζουν κυρίως στην ενίσχυση του αποκωδικοποιητή με οπτικά σήματα, ενώ αγνοούν ότι η εικόνα μπορεί να βελτιώσει την ικανότητα του κωδικοποιητή να εντοπίζει τα σημεία αναφοράς ενός ειδησεογραφικού γεγονότος ή ενός εγγράφου. Έτσι, προτείνουμε ένα πολυπροπικό επιλεκτικό δίκτυο πυλών που λαμβάνει υπόψη τις αμοιβαίες σχέσεις μεταξύ κειμένων και πολλαπλών επιπέδων οπτικών χαρακτηριστικών, συμπεριλαμβανομένου του παγκόσμιου περιγραφέα εικόνας, των πλέγματος ενεργοποίησης και των προτάσεων αντικειμένων, για να επιλέξετε τα σημεία του γεγονότος κατά την κωδικοποίηση της πρότασης προέλευσης. Επιπλέον, εισάγουμε μια ρύθμιση τρόπων για να ενθαρρύνουμε την περίληψη να καταγράψει με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια τα σημεία που ενσωματώνονται στην εικόνα. Για να επαληθεύσουμε τη γενίκευση του μοντέλου μας, υιοθετούμε την πολυπροπική επιλεκτική πύλη στον αποκωδικοποιητή με βάση το κείμενο και τον πολυπροπικό αποκωδικοποιητή. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε ένα δημόσιο σύνολο δεδομένων σύνοψης προτάσεων καταδεικνύουν το πλεονέκτημα των μοντέλων μας έναντι των γραμμών βάσης. Περαιτέρω ανάλυση δείχνει ότι το προτεινόμενο πολυπροπικό επιλεκτικό δίκτυο πυλών μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να επιλέξει σημαντικές πληροφορίες στην πρόταση εισαγωγής.', 'ka': 'Name არსებობს მულტიმოდიალური სიგნალებით განსხვავებული სიგნალებით განსხვავებაზე ფონსკურება, როცა გამოსახულება შეუძლია გამოსახულებელი ინფორმაციის შესაძლებლობას განსხვავება ახალი მოვლენტის ან დოკუმენტის განსხვავებაზე ამიტომ, ჩვენ მლიტიმოდიალური მონიშნული გარეშე ქსელი, რომელიც ტექსუალური და მრავალური დონეზე ვიზუალური ფუნქციების შორის შესახებ, რომელიც გლობალური გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულ დამატებით, ჩვენ მოდიალურობის რეგილარიზაციას ჩვენ ჩვენ დავიყენებთ, რომ საზოგადომის შესაძლებელად დავწეროთ გამოსახულებაში უფრო მარტივი სიმბოლოები. ჩვენი მოდელის გენერალიზაციის დარწმუნებისთვის, ჩვენ ტექსტის გარეშე და მულტიმოდელის გარეშე დეკოდირებისთვის მივიღეთ მულტიმოდიალური რექსირების გარეშე. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები საერთო მულტიმოდიალური სიმბოლოების საზოგადოება მონაცემების საზოგადოება ჩვენი მოდელების გასაკეთესება ბაზის ხაზები დამატებული ანალიზია, რომ ჩვენი მულტიმოდიალური არჩეულების ქსელექტიური ქსელექტიური შესაძლებელია ეფექტიურად გადაიყენოთ მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორ', 'it': "Questo articolo studia il problema di generare un riassunto per una data coppia frase-immagine. Gli approcci multimodali sequenza-sequenza esistenti si concentrano principalmente sul miglioramento del decoder tramite segnali visivi, ignorando che l'immagine può migliorare la capacità dell'encoder di identificare i punti salienti di un evento di notizie o di un documento. Pertanto, proponiamo una rete multimodale selettiva di gate che considera le relazioni reciproche tra caratteristiche visive testuali e multilivello, tra cui descrittore di immagine globale, griglie di attivazione e proposte di oggetti, per selezionare i punti salienti dell'evento durante la codifica della frase sorgente. Inoltre, introduciamo una regolarizzazione modale per incoraggiare il riepilogo a catturare più accuratamente i punti salienti incorporati nell'immagine. Per verificare la generalizzazione del nostro modello, adottiamo il gate selettivo multimodale al decoder testuale e al decoder multimodale basato. I risultati sperimentali su un set di dati di sintesi multimodale pubblico dimostrano il vantaggio dei nostri modelli rispetto alle linee di base. Un'ulteriore analisi suggerisce che la nostra proposta di rete multimodale selettiva di gate può selezionare efficacemente informazioni importanti nella frase di input.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama tam tikros sakinio ir vaizdo poros santraukos sukūrimo problem a. Dabartiniai daugiarūšio pobūdžio metodai daugiausia sutelkiami į dekoderio stiprinimą vaizdiniais signalais, ignoruojant, kad atvaizdas gali pagerinti koduotojo gebėjimą nustatyti naujienų renginio ar dokumento svarbiausius požymius. Taigi siūlome daugiarūšio atrankinio vartų tinklą, kuriame būtų svarstomi abipusiai tekstinių ir daugiapakopių vizualinių savybių ryšiai, įskaitant visuotinį vaizdo aprašymą, aktyvinimo tinklus ir objektų pasiūlymus, kad būtų galima pasirinkti įvykio svarbiausius aspektus koduojant pradinį sakinį. Be to, įvedame tvarkos reguliavimą, skatinantį santrauką tiksliau surinkti į paveikslą įtrauktus svarbiausius aspektus. Siekiant patikrinti mūsų modelio generalizaciją, mes priimame daugiarūšį atrankinį vartą prie tekstu pagrįsto dekoderio ir daugiarūšio dekoderio. Experimental results on a public multimodal sentence summarization dataset demonstrate the advantage of our models over baselines.  Tolesnė analizė rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas daugiarūšio atrankinis vartų tinklas gali veiksmingai pasirinkti svarbią informaciją įvadiniame sakinyje.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија го проучува проблемот со генерирањето на резиме за даден пар реченици- слики. Постојаните мултимодилни пристапи од секвенца до секвенца се фокусираат главно на подобрувањето на декодерот со визуелни сигнали, иако игнорираат дека сликата може да ја подобри способноста на кодерот да ги идентификува точките на новинскиот настан или документот. Затоа, предложуваме мултимедална селективна мрежа на порти која ги разгледува реципрочните односи помеѓу текстуалните и мултимедалните визуелни карактеристики, вклучувајќи го и глобалниот дискриптор на сликите, активирачките мрежи и предлозите за објекти, за избор на основни точки Покрај тоа, ние воведуваме регуларизација на моделноста за да го охрабриме сумирањето да ги фати точните точки вклучени во сликата попрецизно. За да ја потврдиме генерализацијата на нашиот модел, ја усвоивме мултимодилната селективна порта на текстовиот декодер и мултимодилниот декодер. Експерименталните резултати на јавната мултимодална реченица резултати покажуваат предност на нашите модели во однос на основните линии. Понатамошната анализа покажува дека нашата предложена мултимодилна селективна мрежа на врати може ефикасно да избере важни информации во вводната реченица.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз келтірілген сұлбаның екі жинағын құру мәселесін зерттеді. Бар көп модельді реттеу мен реттеу дегенге негізінде көрінетін сигналдар бойынша декодтордың деңгейін көтеру үшін көңіл түсіндіреді. Кескінді жаңалық оқиға не құжаттың бояулауларын анықтау үшін кодтардың мүмкіндігін жа Бұл үшін біз мәтін мен көп деңгейіндегі көрініс қасиеттері арасындағы бірнеше қатынасын таңдау желіне ұсынамыз, жүйелік кескіндердің сипаттамасы, белсендіру торлары және нысандарды таңдау үшін, көздегі сөзді кодтағанда о Қосымша, біз кескінде ендірілген бояулауларды дұрыс түрде түзету үшін үлгілікті тәртібін келтіреміз. Өзіміздің жалпы үлгісін тексеру үшін біз мәтін негіздеген декодерге және көп модалдық декодерге көп модельді таңдау қапшығын қолданамыз. Көпшілікті көпшілікті мәліметтік сөздерді жазылу деректер жиынында эксперименталдық нәтижелері негізгі жолдарда үлгілеріміздің артықшылығын көрсетеді Қосымша анализ біздің көпModal таңдау желімізде маңызды мәліметті келтіруге болады.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mempelajari masalah menghasilkan ringkasan bagi pasangan imej-kalimat yang diberi. Pendekatan urutan-ke-urutan multimodal yang wujud terutamanya fokus pada meningkatkan dekoder dengan isyarat visual, sementara mengabaikan bahawa imej boleh meningkatkan kemampuan pengekod untuk mengenalpasti tonjolan peristiwa berita atau dokumen. Oleh itu, kami cadangkan rangkaian pintu selektif berbilang modal yang mempertimbangkan hubungan reciprok antara ciri-ciri visual teks dan berbilang-tahap, termasuk penerangan imej global, grid aktivasi, dan cadangan objek, untuk memilih tamparan peristiwa apabila mengekodkan kalimat sumber. Selain itu, kami memperkenalkan pengaturan modaliti untuk mendorong ringkasan untuk menangkap sorotan yang terlibat dalam imej dengan lebih tepat. Untuk mengesahkan generalisasi model kami, kami mengadopsi gerbang selektif multimodal ke dekoder berasaskan teks dan dekoder berasaskan multimodal. Keputusan percubaan pada set data pengringkasan kalimat multimodal awam menunjukkan keuntungan model kita daripada garis dasar. Analisis lanjut menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian pintu selektif multimodal yang kami cadangkan boleh secara efektif memilih maklumat penting dalam kalimat input.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jistudja l-problem a tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ sommarju għal pari ta’ sentenza-immaġni partikolari. L-approċċi eżistenti ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza multimodali jiffukaw prinċipalment fuq it-titjib tad-dekoder permezz ta’ sinjali viżivi, filwaqt li jinjoraw li l-immaġni tista’ ttejjeb il-kapaċità tal-kodifikatur li jidentifika l-punti ewlenin ta’ avveniment tal-a ħbarijiet jew ta’ dokument. Għalhekk, qed nipproponu netwerk selettiv multimodali tal-portijiet li jikkunsidra relazzjonijiet reċiproċi bejn karatteristiċi viżivi testwali u ta’ diversi livelli, inkluż deskrittur globali tal-immaġni, grilji ta’ attivazzjoni, u proposti ta’ oġġetti, biex jintgħa żlu l-punti ewlenin tal-avveniment meta tiġi kkodifikata s-sentenza tas-sors. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nintroduċu regolarizzazzjoni tal-modalità biex in ħeġġu s-sommarju biex jinqabdu l-punti ewlenin inkorporati fl-immaġni b’mod aktar preċiż. Biex tivverifika l-ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna, aħna niddottaw il-porta selettiva multimodali għad-dekoder ibbażat fuq it-test u d-dekoder ibbażat fuq il-multimodali. Riżultati esperimentali fuq sett ta’ dejta dwar is-sommarju tas-sentenzi multimodali pubbliċi juru l-vantaġġ tal-mudelli tagħna fuq il-linji bażi. Analiżi ulterjuri tissuġġerixxi li n-netwerk selettiv multimodali propost tagħna jista’ effettivament jagħżel informazzjoni importanti fis-sentenza input.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь өгүүлбэр-зураг хоёрын жишээг бий болгох асуудлыг судалдаг. Ингэснээр олон моделийн дарааллаас дарааллаар байгаа хүмүүс ихэвчлэн дүрслэлийн сигналуудыг илүү сайжруулахын тулд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Зураг нь мэдээллийн үйл явдал эсвэл баримтын тодорхойлолтыг тодорхойлж, кодчуудын чадварыг илүү сайжру Иймээс бид олон моделийн сонголт хаалганы сүлжээ, мөн олон түвшин харилцааны харилцааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хооронд Мөн бид зураг дээр илүү тодорхой тодорхойлогдсон тодорхойлолтуудыг авахын тулд дүгнэлт багасгах загварыг илтгэнэ. Бидний загварын ерөнхийлөгчийг шалгахын тулд бид текст дээр суурилсан загвар болон олон модал дээр суурилсан загварыг ашигладаг. Олон төрлийн хэмжээний өгөгдлийн цуглуулалтын туршилтын үр дүнг бидний загварын үндсэн шугам дээр харуулдаг. Дараагийн шинжилгээ нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн олон моделийн сонголт хаалганы сүлжээнд нэмэгдсэн өгүүлбэрт чухал мэдээллийг эцэст нь сонгож чадна.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d കൊടുത്ത വാക്ക്-ഇമേജ് ജോട്ടിനുള്ള ഒരു ചുരുക്കം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രശ്നമാണ നിലവിലുള്ള പലിമോഡല്\u200d സെക്രഞ്ചിനുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടാണ് കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സിഗ്നലുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ടെക്സ്ട്ടുളിലും പല-നിലയിലുമുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d റെക്സിപ്രോക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു multimodal തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഗേറ്റ് ശേഖരിക്കുന്ന കൂടാതെ, ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന എക്സ്ലൈറ്റുകള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു മോഡിയലിറ്റ് നിയന്ത്രണത്തെ പരിശോധ To verify the generalization of our model, we adopt the multimodal selective gate to the text-based decoder and multimodal-based decoder.  ഒരു പൊതുവായ വാക്കിന്റെ സംസ്കാരം ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d അന്വേഷണം പറയുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല്ലിമോഡല്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഗേറ്റ് നെറ്റ്റ', 'no': 'Denne papiret studerer problemet med å laga eit samandrag for eit gitt setningsbiletet. Det eksisterande multimodal sekvens-til-sekvens nærmer hovudsakelig fokus på å forbetra dekoderen med synlege signalar, mens du ignorerer at biletet kan forbetra kapasiteten til koderen for å identifisera syntaksmerking av ein nyhetsvindauge eller eit dokument. Dette foreslår vi eit multimodal selektiv gatnettverk som ser ut for å velja merking av hendinga ved koding av kjeldesetninga mellom tekstuelle og fleirnivåsynlege funksjonar, inkludert globale biletskryptering, aktiveringsruter og objektforslag. I tillegg introduserer vi ein reguleringsmodus for å oppfordre sammendragen for å få framhevingane som er innebygd i biletet meir nøyaktig. For å kontrollere generelliseringen av modellen vår, kan vi bruke multimodal selektive porten til tekstbasert dekoder og multimodal-basert dekoder. Eksperimentale resultat på eit offentleg multimodal setningsdata viser fordel av våre modeller over baselinjer. Dei fleire analysene tyder på at vår foreslått multimodal selektive gate-nettverk kan velja viktige informasjon i innsetjinga.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada problem generowania podsumowania dla danej pary zdania-obrazu. Istniejące multimodalne podejścia sekwencji do sekwencji koncentrują się głównie na wzmocnieniu dekodera sygnałami wizualnymi, ignorując jednocześnie, że obraz może poprawić zdolność kodera do identyfikowania najważniejszych punktów wydarzenia wiadomościowego lub dokumentu. Proponujemy zatem multimodalną selektywną sieć bram, która uwzględnia wzajemne relacje między tekstowymi i wielopoziomowymi cechami wizualnymi, w tym globalny deskryptor obrazu, siatki aktywacyjne i propozycje obiektów, aby wybrać światła zdarzenia podczas kodowania zdania źródłowego. Dodatkowo wprowadzamy regularyzację modalną, aby zachęcić podsumowanie do dokładniejszego uchwycenia punktów osadzonych w obrazie. Aby zweryfikować uogólnienie naszego modelu, przyjmujemy multimodalną bramę selektywną do dekodera tekstowego i dekodera multimodalnego. Wyniki eksperymentalne na publicznym multimodalnym zestawie danych podsumowania zdań pokazują przewagę naszych modeli nad liniami bazowymi. Dalsza analiza sugeruje, że nasza proponowana multimodalna sieć bram selektywnych może skutecznie dobrać ważne informacje w zdaniu wejściowym.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir proučava problem stvaranja sažetka za određeni par rečenica. Postojeći multimodalni pristupi sekvenciji do sekvencije uglavnom se fokusiraju na poboljšanje dekodera vizuelnim signalom, dok ignorišu da slika može poboljšati sposobnost kodera da identifikuje osvjetljenja novinskog događaja ili dokumenta. Zato predlažemo multimodalnu selektivnu mrežu vrata koja smatra reciprocalnim odnosima između tekstualnih i višeniverskih vizualnih karakteristika, uključujući globalnog opisača slika, aktivacijskih mreža i predloga objekata, da odaberemo osvjetljenja događaja kada kodiraju izvornu rečenicu. Osim toga, predstavljamo regularizaciju modaliteta kako bi potaknuli sažetak da uhvatimo tačnije osvjetljenje ugrađene na sliki. Da bismo proverili generalizaciju našeg modela, usvojili smo multimodalnu selektivnu kapiju na dekoderu na tekstu i multimodalnu dekoderu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na sažetku podataka o javnoj multimodalnoj rečenici pokazuju prednost naših modela preko osnovnih linija. Daljnja analiza ukazuje na to da naša predložena multimodalna selektivna mreža vrata može efektivno odabrati važne informacije u rečenici za ulazak.', 'so': "Warqaddaas wuxuu ku baranayaa dhibaatada soo saaridda summar, kaas oo lagu qoray labo sawir ah. Waxyaabaha uu ku jiraa xiliga kala duduwan waxey u soo bandhigaan marka ugu horeysa ku kordhista codsiga calaamada muuqashada, isagoo halmaanaya in sawirku uu kordhin karo awoodka codsiga si uu u caddeeyo iftiinka dhacdooyinka warqada ama dukumenti. Sidaas darteed waxaan soo jeedaynaa shabakadda doorashada oo kala duduwan oo ka fiirsan karta xiriirka qaabilsan ee u dhexeeya dhaqanka iyo farsamada farsamada oo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah qoraalka sawirka caalamiga ah, qeybta dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo waxyaabaha la soo jeedo, si aan u dooranno iftiimada dhacdooyinka marka aad qorsheyso ciqaabka. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa nidaamka qaabilsan si aan u qabsanno iftiimaha sawirka ku qoran si si saxda ah. Si aan u xaqiijinno qaabka modeleena, waxaynu dooranaynaa iridda doorashada kala duduwan ee qoraalka ku saleysan deynta qoraalka iyo deynta kala duduwan. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka qeybta ee dadweynaha lagu soo qorayo waxay muujiyaan faa'iidada modellkayaga ku qoran saldhigyada. Further analysis suggests that our proposed multimodal selective gate network can effectively select important information in the input sentence.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare studiază problema generării unui rezumat pentru o anumită pereche de propoziție-imagine. Abordările multimodale existente secvență-secvență se concentrează în principal pe îmbunătățirea decodorului prin semnale vizuale, ignorând în același timp faptul că imaginea poate îmbunătăți capacitatea codificatorului de a identifica punctele culminante ale unui eveniment de știri sau a unui document. Astfel, propunem o rețea multimodală de poartă selectivă care ia în considerare relațiile reciproce între caracteristicile vizuale textuale și multinivel, inclusiv descriptorul global de imagine, grilele de activare și propunerile de obiecte, pentru a selecta punctele culminante ale evenimentului atunci când codifica propoziția sursă. În plus, introducem o regularizare a modalității pentru a încuraja rezumatul să capteze evidențele încorporate în imagine mai precis. Pentru a verifica generalizarea modelului nostru, adoptăm poarta selectivă multimodală către decodorul text și decodorul multimodal. Rezultatele experimentale ale unui set de date public multimodal de sintetizare a frazelor demonstreaza avantajul modelelor noastre fata de liniile de baza. Analizele suplimentare sugerează că rețeaua noastră multimodală de porți selective propusă poate selecta în mod eficient informații importante în propoziția de introducere.', 'si': 'Name ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් විශේෂ සංඥාවක් සඳහා ඩිකොඩර් විශාලනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා වි ඉතින්, අපි ගොඩක් මොඩිමෝඩාල් තෝරාගැනීම් ගේට් ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකය සහ ගොඩක් තෝරාගැනීම් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සැලසුම් කරනවා, ජාතික පින්තූර විස්තර,  ඒ වගේම, අපි පින්තූරයෙන් ඇතුළත් පින්තූරයෙන් ඇතුළත් පින්තූරයෙන් ඇතුළත් පින්තූරයෙන් අල්ලගන්න සාමාන අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ලිපින් අධාරිත විශ්වාස කරන්න බොහොමෝඩාල් තෝරණ ගේට්ටුව පාළ සාමාජික වාර්තාවික වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණ දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩ තවත් විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරපු විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අපේ ග', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats studerar problemet med att generera en sammanfattning för ett givet mening-bild par. Befintliga multimodala sekvens-till-sekvensmetoder fokuserar främst på att förbättra avkodaren med visuella signaler, samtidigt som man bortser från att bilden kan förbättra kodarens förmåga att identifiera höjdpunkter i en nyhetshändelse eller ett dokument. Därför föreslår vi ett multimodalt selektivt gatenätverk som beaktar ömsesidiga relationer mellan text- och multinivåvisuella funktioner, inklusive global bilddeskriptor, aktiveringsrutor och objektförslag, för att välja höjdpunkter i händelsen när källmeningen kodas. Dessutom introducerar vi en modalitetsreglering för att uppmuntra sammanfattningen att fånga höjdpunkterna som är inbäddade i bilden mer exakt. För att verifiera generaliseringen av vår modell använder vi den multimodala selektiva porten till textbaserad dekoder och multimodal-baserad dekoder. Experimentella resultat på ett offentligt multimodalt meningssammanfattningsdata visar fördelen med våra modeller jämfört med baselines. Ytterligare analyser tyder på att vårt föreslagna multimodala selektiva grindnätverk effektivt kan välja viktig information i inmatningsmeningen.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கு-பிம்பத்தின் ஜோடிக்கான சுருக்கம் உருவாக்கும் பிரச்சனை இருக்கும் பல தொடர்ச்சி- இருக்கும் வரிசையில் முக்கியமாக குறியீட்டை அதிகரிக்கும் பொதுவாக கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது, பிம்பத்தை மறந்து விடுமானால் பிம்பம் செய்தி  எனவே, நாம் மென்நிரல் மற்றும் பல- மட்டத்திற்கும் இடையே மற்றும் பார்வை குறிப்பிடும் பொருள் செயல்படுத்தும் கட்டங்கள் மற்றும் பொருள் பரிந்துரைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க ஒரு பல்மு மேலும், பிம்பத்தில் உள்ள முன்னிருப்புகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்வதற்கு சுருக்கத்தை உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு வகையான விதிமுற எங்கள் மாதிரியின் பொதுவாக்கத்தை சரிபார்க்க, நாம் உரையின் அடிப்படையான குறியீட்டாளர் மற்றும் பல்முறை அடிப்படையிலான குறிய Experimental results on a public multimodal sentence summarization dataset demonstrate the advantage of our models over baselines.  மேலும் விளக்கம் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பல தேர்வு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வலைப்பின்னல் உள்ளீட்டு வாக்கியத்தி', 'ur': 'This paper studies the problem of generating a summary for a given sentence-image pair. Existing multimodal sequence-to-sequence approach mainly on enhancing the decoder by visual signals, while ignoring that the image can improve the ability of the encoder to identify a news event or a document. اسی طرح، ہم ایک multimodal selector gate نیٹ ورک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو متوسط اور متوسط سطح کے بیچ ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزی اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم ایک موڈلیٹ قانونی معرفی کرتے ہیں کہ اسم کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ صحیح طریقے پر داخل ہوئے ہیلائیٹ کو پکڑنے کے لئے ترغیب دیتے ہیں. ہمارے مدل کی عمومی تعریف کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے، ہم متن بنیادی ڈیکوڈر اور متن مدل بنیادی ڈیکوڈر کے لئے multimodal selective دروازے کو قبول کرتے ہیں. ایک عمومی multimodal sentence summarization dataset پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے مدلکوں کے فائدہ بنسس لین پر دکھاتے ہیں. اور اضافہ تحلیل کی بات یہ ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد ملتی موڈال انتخاب کرنے والی گریٹ نیٹورک اثرات کے ساتھ اضافہ معلومات کا انتخاب کرے۔', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu vấn đề tạo ra một bản tóm tắt cho một cặp ảnh. Các phương pháp sắp xếp đa chiều tồn tại chủ yếu tập trung vào việc tăng cường bộ giải bằng tín hiệu hình ảnh, mặc dù không biết rằng ảnh có thể nâng cao khả năng của bộ mã hóa để xác định các điểm nổi của một sự kiện tin tức hay một tài liệu. Do đó, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới cổng hàng loạt các phương tiện chọn các mối quan hệ đối lập giữa các tính năng hình thức và đa cấp, bao gồm mô tả ảnh to àn cầu, lưới kích hoạt, và các đề nghị đối tượng, để chọn những điểm nổi bật của sự kiện khi mã hóa câu chữ gốc. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiểu chỉnh hóa để khuyến khích bản tóm tắt để ghi lại những điểm nổi bật trong ảnh một cách chính xác hơn. Để xác định tổng hợp mô hình của chúng tôi, chúng tôi chọn cổng lựa chọn đa phương cho bộ giải mã dựa trên văn bản và đa phương. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên một tập tin đầy đủ các mô tả đa phương rộng công cộng chứng minh sự lợi thế của các mô-đun so với đường hầm. Phân tích thêm cho thấy mạng lưới cổng lựa chọn đa phương có khả năng chọn thông tin quan trọng trong câu nói nhập.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz koʻrsatilgan gapir-rasm ikki xabarlarni yaratish muammolarini o'rganadi. Kodlash usuli Shunday qilib, biz texnologiya va ko'plab darajadagi ko'plab-darajadagi xususiyatlar orasidagi multimodal tanlangan portning tarmoqni taqdim qilamiz. Umumiy rasm descriptor, aktiv chiziqlar va obʼektlarni kodlash imkoniyatini tanlash mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz rasmdagi kichkinalarni aniqlash uchun moduli boshqarishni anglatamiz. Modelning generalizini tekshirish uchun, biz matn asosida yaratilgan multimodal tanlangan portni va multimodal asosida kodlash orqali ishlatamiz. Name Koʻproq taʼminlovchi esa, yaxshi ko'plab tanlangan portning tarmoqni kiritish imkoniyatini juda muhim maʼlumot tanlash mumkin.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва проблема с генерирането на резюме за дадена двойка изречение-изображение. Съществуващите мултимодални подходи последователност към последователност се фокусират главно върху подобряване на декодера чрез визуални сигнали, като същевременно пренебрегват, че изображението може да подобри способността на кодера да идентифицира акцентите на събитие или документ. По този начин предлагаме мултимодална селективна портална мрежа, която разглежда реципрочните взаимоотношения между текстови и многостепенни визуални характеристики, включително глобален дескриптор на изображението, активационни мрежи и предложения за обекти, за да избере акцентите на събитието при кодиране на изходното изречение. В допълнение, въвеждаме модалната регулировка, за да насърчим резюмето да заснеме акцентите, вградени в изображението по-точно. За да проверим обобщението на нашия модел, ние възприемаме мултимодалната селективна врата към текстово-базирания декодер и мултимодално-базирания декодер. Експерименталните резултати на публичен мултимодален набор от данни за обобщаване на изречения демонстрират предимството на нашите модели пред базовите линии. Допълнителният анализ предполага, че предложената мултимодална селективна портална мрежа може ефективно да избере важна информация във входното изречение.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir proučava problem stvaranja sažetka za određeni par rečenica. Postojeći multimodalni pristupi sekvenciji do sekvencije uglavnom se fokusiraju na poboljšanje dekodera vizuelnim signalom, dok ignoriraju da slika može poboljšati sposobnost kodera da identificira osvjetljenja vijestinskog događaja ili dokumenta. Stoga predlažemo multimodalnu selektivnu mrežu vrata koja smatra reciprocalnim odnosima između tekstualnih i višeniverskih vizualnih karakteristika, uključujući globalnog opisivača slika, aktivacijskih mreža i prijedloga objekata, kako bi odabrali osvjetljenja događaja kada kodiraju izvornu rečenicu. Osim toga, predstavljamo regularizaciju modaliteta kako bi potaknuli sažetak da uhvatimo preciznije osvjetljenje ugrađene na sliki. Da bismo potvrdili generalizaciju našeg modela, usvojili smo multimodalnu selektivnu kapiju na dekoderu na tekstu i multimodalnu dekoderu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na sažetku podataka o javnoj multimodalnoj rečenici pokazuju prednost naših modela preko početnih linija. Daljnja analiza ukazuje na to da naša predložena multimodalna selektivna mreža vrata može učinkovito odabrati važne informacije u ulaznoj rečenici.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel bestudeert het probleem van het genereren van een samenvatting voor een gegeven zin-beeld paar. Bestaande multimodale sequence-to-sequence benaderingen richten zich voornamelijk op het verbeteren van de decoder door visuele signalen, terwijl het negeert dat het beeld het vermogen van de encoder kan verbeteren om hoogtepunten van een nieuwsfeest of een document te identificeren. Daarom stellen we een multimodaal selectief gatenetwerk voor dat rekening houdt met wederzijdse relaties tussen tekstuele en multi-level visuele kenmerken, inclusief globale afbeeldingsdiscriptor, activeringsrasters en objectvoorstellen, om hoogtepunten van de gebeurtenis te selecteren bij het coderen van de bronzin. Daarnaast introduceren we een modaliteitsregularisatie om de samenvatting aan te moedigen om de hoogtepunten die in het beeld zijn ingebed nauwkeuriger vast te leggen. Om de generalisatie van ons model te verifiëren, gebruiken we de multimodale selectieve poort naar de tekstgebaseerde decoder en multimodale decoder. Experimentele resultaten op een publieke multimodale zinssamenvattingsdataset tonen het voordeel van onze modellen ten opzichte van baselines aan. Verdere analyse suggereert dat ons voorgestelde multimodale selectieve poortnetwerk effectief belangrijke informatie in de invoerzin kan selecteren.', 'da': 'Denne artikel undersøger problemet med at generere et resumé for et givet sætning-billedpar. Eksisterende multimodale sekvens-til-sekvens tilgange fokuserer hovedsageligt på at forbedre dekoderen ved hjælp af visuelle signaler, mens man ignorerer, at billedet kan forbedre koderens evne til at identificere højdepunkter i en nyhedshændelse eller et dokument. Således foreslår vi et multimodalt selektivt gatenetværk, der overvejer gensidige relationer mellem tekst- og multiniveau visuelle funktioner, herunder global billeddeskriptor, aktiveringsgitre og objektforslag, for at vælge højdepunkter af begivenheden, når kildesætningen kodes. Derudover introducerer vi en modalitetsregulering for at opfordre resuméet til at fange højdepunkterne indlejret i billedet mere præcist. For at bekræfte generaliseringen af vores model, vedtager vi den multimodale selektive port til den tekstbaserede dekoder og multimodal-baserede dekoder. Eksperimentelle resultater på et offentligt multimodalt sætningsopsummeringsdatasæt viser fordelen ved vores modeller i forhold til baselines. Yderligere analyser tyder på, at vores foreslåede multimodale selektive gatenet effektivt kan vælge vigtige oplysninger i input sætningen.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit untersucht das Problem, eine Zusammenfassung für ein gegebenes Satz-Bild-Paar zu generieren. Bestehende multimodale Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Ansätze konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf die Verbesserung des Decoders durch visuelle Signale, während ignoriert wird, dass das Bild die Fähigkeit des Encoders verbessern kann, Highlights eines Nachrichtenereignisses oder eines Dokuments zu identifizieren. Daher schlagen wir ein multimodales selektives Gate-Netzwerk vor, das wechselseitige Beziehungen zwischen textuellen und mehrstufigen visuellen Merkmalen berücksichtigt, einschließlich globaler Bilddeskriptor, Aktivierungsraster und Objektvorschläge, um Highlights des Ereignisses bei der Kodierung des Quellsatzes auszuwählen. Darüber hinaus führen wir eine Modalitätsregularisierung ein, um die Zusammenfassung zu ermutigen, die im Bild eingebetteten Highlights genauer zu erfassen. Um die Verallgemeinerung unseres Modells zu überprüfen, verwenden wir das multimodale selektive Gate zum textbasierten Decoder und multimodalen Decoder. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an einem öffentlichen multimodalen Satz Zusammenfassung Datensatz zeigen den Vorteil unserer Modelle gegenüber Baselines. Weitere Analysen deuten darauf hin, dass unser vorgeschlagenes multimodales selektives Gate-Netzwerk wichtige Informationen im Eingabesatz effektiv auswählen kann.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempelajari masalah menghasilkan ringkasan untuk pasangan gambar kalimat tertentu. Pendekatan multimodal dari urutan ke urutan yang ada terutama fokus pada meningkatkan dekoder dengan sinyal visual, sementara mengabaikan bahwa gambar dapat meningkatkan kemampuan pengekoder untuk mengidentifikasi highlights dari acara berita atau dokumen. Thus, we propose a multimodal selective gate network that considers reciprocal relationships between textual and multi-level visual features, including global image descriptor, activation grids, and object proposals, to select highlights of the event when encoding the source sentence.  Selain itu, kami memperkenalkan regularisasi modalitas untuk mendorong ringkasan untuk menangkap highlights yang terlibat dalam gambar dengan lebih akurat. Untuk memverifikasi generalisasi model kita, kita mengadopsi gerbang selektif multimodal ke dekoder berdasarkan teks dan dekoder berdasarkan multimodal. Hasil percobaan dari sebuah dataset pengiraan kalimat multimodal publik menunjukkan keuntungan model kita dibanding garis dasar. Analisis lanjut menunjukkan bahwa jaringan gerbang selektif multimodal kami yang diusulkan dapat secara efektif memilih informasi penting dalam kalimat masukan.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشکل تولید کردن یک جمعیت برای جفت جمعیت داده شده را مطالعه می\u200cکند. در حالی که تصویر می\u200cتواند توانایی کودهر را بهبود دهد، برای شناسایی مشخص یک رویداد یا یک سند، بهتر کند. بنابراین، ما یک شبکه دروازه چندین مدال انتخاب کننده را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که رابطه\u200cهای مختلف بین ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای متن و متعدد سطح، شامل توصیف\u200cکننده تصویر جهانی، گره\u200cهای فعالیت و پیشنهاد\u200cهای شیء، برای انتخاب برق\u200cها از رویداد هنگامی که رمزبندی جمله منبع علاوه بر این، ما یک قانونی قانونی را برای تشویق به جمعیت برای گرفتن مشخص\u200cها در تصویر دقیقاً معرفی می\u200cکنیم. برای ثابت کردن ژنرال مدل ما، دروازه چند مدل انتخاب کننده را به dekoder متن بنیاد می گیریم و دکورد متعدد بنیاد می گیریم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جمعیت مجموعه\u200cهای عمومی از مدل\u200cهای ما بر خط\u200cهای پایین نشان می\u200cدهد. تحلیل بیشتری پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که شبکه دروازه\u200cهای انتخاب\u200cکننده\u200cی چندmodal ما می\u200cتواند به طور تاثیر اطلاعات مهم را در جمله ورودی انتخاب کند.', 'ko': '본고는 주어진 문장 이미지에 대한 요약 생성에 대한 문제를 연구했다.기존의 다중모드 서열은 서열 방법에 대해 시각 신호를 통해 디코더를 강화하는 데 중심을 두었고 이미지를 소홀히 하면 인코더가 뉴스 이벤트나 문서의 하이라이트를 식별하는 능력을 향상시킬 수 있다.따라서 우리는 다중모드적 선택문 네트워크를 제기했다. 이 네트워크는 텍스트와 다중시각적 특징 간의 상호 관계를 고려했고 전역 이미지 묘사자, 격자 활성화와 대상 제안을 포함하여 원본 문장을 인코딩할 때 이벤트의 하이라이트를 선택했다.그 밖에 우리는 요약이 이미지에 박힌 하이라이트를 더욱 정확하게 포착하도록 모드 정규화를 도입했다.모델의 범용성을 검증하기 위해 우리는 텍스트 기반의 디코더와 다중모드 기반의 디코더에서 다중모드 선택문을 사용했다.공공 다중모드 문장 요약 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.진일보한 분석에 의하면 우리가 제시한 다중모드적 선택문 네트워크는 입력 문장 중의 중요한 정보를 효과적으로 선택할 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz berilen sözlem suratynyň çift üçin hulaty bejermek meselesini öwrenýär. Öň bar multimodal sequence-to Böylece, biz multimodal seçmeleri çykyş a ňlygy teknisal we multi-düýp görsel özellikler arasynda, dünýäpli surat tassyklayıcısı, aktiwasyon grisleri we zadyň teklipleri, çeşme sözlerini kodlaýand a ýagtylamaklary saýlamak üçin teklip berýäris. Üstelik, resimde dağıtılan ýagtyları düzenlemek üçin modalitet düzenlemesini tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň modelimiziň jenerallygyny barlamak üçin, metin tabanly dekodere we multimodal dekodere multimodal seçmeleri geçirmek üçin ullandyrys. Halkara multimodal sözlerin jemgyýetlenme dataýasynyň netijesi biziň modellerimiziň baz hatlaryň üstünde tapawutlygyny görkezýär. Daha gowy analyz biziň teklip eden multimodal saýlaw hatlarymyz giriş sözlerinde wajyp maglumaty saýlap biler.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inasoma tatizo la kutengeneza muhtasari kwa ajili ya wanandoa waliopewa hukumu-picha. Kutokea kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mara nyingi unaingia kwa lengo la kuongeza decodi kwa ishara za kuona, wakati akisahau kwamba picha inaweza kuboresha uwezo wa kodi kutambua mwanga wa tukio la habari au nyaraka. Kwa hiyo, tunapendekeza mtandao wa mitandao ya mlango mbalimbali inayofikiria mahusiano ya kupokea kati ya vipengele vya kuandika na viwango vya ngazi mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na maelezo ya picha ya kimataifa, kutengeneza vifaa vya kutengeneza vifaa, na pendekezo la vitu, ili kuchagua hasira za tukio hilo wakati wa kuingilia hukumu ya chanzo. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha utaratibu wa utamaduni wa kuhamasisha muhtasari wa kuangalia mwanga ulioandaliwa katika picha hiyo kwa sahihi zaidi. Ili kuthibitisha uzalishaji wa mifano yetu, tunachukua mlango wa kuchagua mbalimbali kwenye kodi ya maandishi na decodi inayotokana na mifano mingi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na takwimu za muhtasari wa hukumu za umma za kidunia zinaonyesha faida ya mifano yetu kwenye misingi ya msingi. Uchambuzi zaidi unapendekeza kuwa Mtandao wetu wa kuchaguliwa wa mtandao wa mitandao mbalimbali unaweza kuchagua taarifa muhimu katika hukumu ya input.', 'af': "Hierdie papier leer die probleem van die genereer van 'n opsomming vir' n gegewe sentence- image pair. Bestaande multimodale volgorde- na- volgorde naby voorstel fokus op die dekoder te verbeter deur visuele sinjaale, terwyl die beeld ignoreer dat die beeld kan die moontlikheid van die enkoder verbeter om verligting van 'n nuus gebeurtenis of 'n dokument te identifiseer. So, ons voorstel 'n multimodaal selektiewe poort netwerk wat ondersteun reciprocal verwantings tussen teks en multivlak visuele funksies, insluitend globaal beeldbeskrywer, aktieweringstramme en voorwerp voorstellings, om verligting van die gebeurtenis te kies wanneer die bron se kodering is. In addition, we introduce a modality regularization to encourage the summary to capture the highlights embedded in the image more accurately. Om die generellisering van ons model te bevestig, aanvaar ons die multimodaal selektiewe poort na die teksbaseerde dekoder en multimodaal-gebaseerde dekoder. Eksperimentele resultate op 'n publieke multimodaal setopsomming datastel vertoon die voordeel van ons modele oor basisline. Verdere analisie beveel dat ons voorgestelde multimodale selektiewe poortnetwerk effektief belangrike inligting in die invoer seting kan kies.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument studion problemin e gjenerimit të një përmbledhjeje për një çift të caktuar fjali-imazhi. Existing multimodal sequence-to-sequence approaches mainly focus on enhancing the decoder by visual signals, while ignoring that the image can improve the ability of the encoder to identify highlights of a news event or a document.  Kështu, ne propozojmë një rrjet të portës selektive multimodale që konsideron marrëdhënie reciproke midis karakteristikave tekstuale dhe vizuale të shumënivelit, duke përfshirë përshkrimtarin global të imazhit, rrjetet aktivizuese dhe propozimet e objekteve, për të zgjedhur pikëpamjet e ngjarjes kur kodohet fjalia burimore. Përveç kësaj, ne futim një rregullalizim modaliteti për të inkurajuar përmbledhjen për të kapur më saktësisht theksimet e përfshira në imazh. Për të vërtetuar gjeneralizimin e modelit tonë, ne miratojmë portën selektive multimodale për dekoderin me bazë teksti dhe dekoderin me bazë multimodale. Rezultatet eksperimentale në një grup të dhënash publik të përmbledhjes së fjalëve multimodale tregojnë përparësinë e modeleve tona ndaj linjave bazë. Analiza e mëtejshme sugjeron se rrjeti ynë i propozuar multimodal selektiv i portave mund të zgjedhë në mënyrë efektive informacion të rëndësishëm në fjalimin e hyrjes.', 'am': 'ይህች ገጽ በተሰጠው የክፍለ-ምስል ሁለት ጉዳይ የሚያሳውቀውን ጉዳይ ያስተምራል፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች ስለዚህም በዓለምአቀፍ ምስል መጻፊያ፣ የአካባቢ ዝርዝር እና የአካባቢ ደብዳቤዎች እና የአካባቢ ደብዳቤዎችን ለመምረጥ የፊደል ግንኙነትን በጽሕፈት እና በብዙ ደረጃዎች መካከል የሚያስተባብል ግንኙነትን እና የመስመር ዝርዝርዝሮች እና የጉዳይ ዝርዝሮች በመምረጥ እና የጉዳዩ ጉዳይ መምረጫዎችን ለመም በተጨማሪም፣ የቁጥጥር ጉዳይ እናሳብቃለን፡፡ የሞዴልናችንን አቀማመጥ ለማረጋገጥ፣ የብዙ ምርጫ በር ወደ ጽሑፍ መሠረት እና በብልቲሙዳል መሠረት አቀማመጥ፡፡ የህዝብ ብዙኃን አቀማመጥ ዳታዎችን በመስመር ላይ የሞክሮት ውጤቶች በመስመር ላይ የሞዴላዎቻችንን ጥቅም ያሳያል፡፡ Further analysis is suggests that our proposed multimodal selection network can effectively select the important information in the input sentence.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ուսումնասիրում է նախադասության և պատկերի մի զույգի համառոտագրություն ստեղծելու խնդիրը: Գոյություն ունի բազմամոդել հաջորդականություն հաջորդականության մոտեցումներ, որոնք հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են տեսողական ազդանշանների օգնությամբ բարելավելու վրա, չնայած, որ նկարը կարող է բարելավել կոդերի կարողությունը նորությունների կամ փաստաթղթի բարձրացման վրա Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմամոդալ ընտրական դարպասի ցանց, որը հաշվի առնում է համընդհանուր հարաբերությունները տեքստալ և բազմամամամակարդակի տեսողական հատկությունների միջև, ներառյալ գլոբալ պատկերի նկարագրողը, ակտիվացման ցանցերը և օբյեկտների առաջարկումները, որ Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեթոդիայի վերահսկողականություն, որպեսզի խրախուսենք համառոտագրությունը ավելի ճշգրիտ վերցնել պատկերում ներառված նշանները: Մեր մոդելի ընդհանուր ընդլայնումը ստուգելու համար մենք ընդունում ենք բազմամոդալ ընտրական դարպասը տեքստի հիմնված դեկոդերի և բազմամոդալ դեկոդերի համար: Հանրային բազմամոդային նախադասությունների համառոտագրման փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոդելների առավելությունը հիմնական գծերի նկատմամբ: Ավելի վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված բազմամոդալ ընտրական դարպասի ցանցը կարող է արդյունավետ ընտրել կարևոր տեղեկատվություն ներմուծի նախադասության մեջ:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt verilən cümə-surat çift üçün istiqamət yaratma problemini öyrənir. Əvvəlki çoxlu modal sequence-to-sequence çoxluğu vizül sinyalləri ilə dekoderi artırmaq üzerində təsirlənir, görüntü bir vaxt vaxtının ya da beləliklə işıqlandırmaq üçün kodlayıcının yetkinliğini yaxşılaşdıra bilər. Beləliklə, biz bir çoxlu modal seçici qapı a ğını təklif edirik ki, məlumat cümləsini kodlamaq vaxtında, məlumat cümləsinin çoxlu səviyyə şəkillərin arasındakı əlaqələri seçir. Əvvəlcə, şəkillərdə daha nöqsanlıqla daxil olunan şəkilləri almaq üçün qurbanlıqlıq düzgünlüyünü təşkil etmək üçün bir modalitə düzgünlüyü təşkil edirik. Modelimizin generalizasyonu təsdiqləmək üçün, metin tabanlı dekoder və çoxlu modal tabanlı dekoderin çoxlu modal seçici qapısını qəbul edirik. Həqiqətən, çoxlu modal cümlələr təmizlənməsi verilər qutusunda təcrübə sonuçları modellərimizin mənfəətini baselines üstündə göstərir. Daha çox analizi təbliğ etdiyimiz çoxlu modal seçici qapı ağımızın giriş cümləsində möhkəm məlumatları seçir.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে একটি প্রদত্ত বাক্য-ছবি জোড়ার জন্য একটি সার্গার তৈরি করার সমস্যা গবেষণা করছে। বিদ্যমান মাল্টিমোডাল সেকেন্সেকেন্সের মূলত দৃশ্য সিগন্যাল দ্বারা ডেকোডার বৃদ্ধি করার প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে, এবং উপেক্ষা করা হচ্ছে যে ছবি একটি সংবাদ অনুষ্ঠা কাজেই আমরা একটি বহুটিমোডাল নির্বাচিত গেট নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি যা টেক্সটুয়াল এবং বহুস্তরের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির মধ্যে রিপিপিক্রোক্যাল সম্পর্ক বিবেচনা করে, যার মধ্যে বিশ্বের এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি মোডিয়াল নিয়মিত বিধানের পরিচালিত করেছি যাতে এই ছবিতে বিভিন্ন বিষয়টিকে আরো সঠিকভাবে আটকে রাখার জন্য সারস আমাদের মডেলের জেনারেলিজেশন নিশ্চিত করার জন্য, আমরা টেক্সট ভিত্তিক ডেকোডার এবং মাল্টিমোডাল ভিত্তিক ডেকোডারের কাছে মাল্ Experimental results on a public multimodal sentence summarization dataset demonstrate the advantage of our models over baselines.  আরো বিশ্লেষণ পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বহুবিধ নির্বাচিত গেট নেটওয়ার্ক ইনপুটের বাক্যে গুরুত্বপূর', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir proučava problem stvaranja sažetka za određeni par rečenica. Postojeći multimodalni pristupi sekvenciji do sekvencije uglavnom se fokusiraju na poboljšanje dekodera vizuelnim signalima, dok ignoriraju da slika može poboljšati sposobnost kodera da identificira osvjetljenja novinskog događaja ili dokumenta. Stoga predlažemo multimodalnu selektivnu mrežu vrata koja smatra reciprocalnim odnosima između tekstualnih i višeniverskih vizualnih karakteristika, uključujući globalnog opisivača slika, aktivacijskih mreža i predloga objekata, da odaberemo osvjetljenja događaja kada kodiraju izvornu rečenicu. Osim toga, predstavljamo regularizaciju modaliteta kako bi potaknuli sažetak da uhvatimo preciznije osvjetljenje ugrađene na sliki. Da bismo proverili generalizaciju našeg modela, usvojili smo multimodalnu selektivnu kapiju na dekoderu na tekstu i multimodalnu dekoderu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na sažetku podataka o javnoj multimodalnoj rečenici pokazuju prednost naših modela preko početnih linija. Daljnja analiza ukazuje na to da naša predložena multimodalna selektivna mreža vrata može učinkovito odabrati važne informacije u uvodnoj rečenici.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá problematikou generování souhrnu pro daný pár vět-obraz. Stávající multimodální přístupy sekvence na sekvenci se zaměřují především na vylepšení dekodéru vizuálními signály, přičemž ignorují, že obraz může zlepšit schopnost snímače identifikovat hlavní body zprávy nebo dokumentu. Proto navrhujeme multimodální selektivní bránovou síť, která zohledňuje vzájemné vztahy mezi textovými a víceúrovňovými vizuálními prvky, včetně globálního popisu obrazu, aktivačních mřížek a návrhů objektů, pro výběr zvýraznění události při kódování zdrojové věty. Kromě toho představujeme regularizaci modality, která podpoří shrnutí k přesnějšímu zachycení světlých vrstev vložených do snímku. Pro ověření zobecnění modelu přijímáme multimodální selektivní bránu k textovému dekodéru a multimodálnímu dekodéru. Experimentální výsledky na veřejném multimodálním souhrnu vět ukazují výhodu našich modelů oproti základním liniím. Další analýza naznačuje, že naše navrhovaná multimodální selektivní bránová síť může efektivně vybrat důležité informace ve vstupní větě.', 'ca': "Aquest article estudia el problem a de generar un resum per un parell de frases-imatges. Existing multimodal sequence-to-sequence approaches mainly focus on enhancing the decoder by visual signals, while ignoring that the image can improve the ability of the encoder to identify highlights of a news event or a document.  Així que proposem una xarxa de porta selectiva multimodal que consideri les relacions recíproces entre característiques visuals textuals i multinivells, incloent el descriptor d'imatge global, les xarxes d'activació i les propostes d'objectes, per seleccionar els punts més importants de l'eventquan codifiquem la frase fontal. A més, introduïm una regularizació de la modalitat per animar el resum a capturar més exactament els punts destacats incorporats a la imatge. Per verificar la generalització del nostre model, adoptem la porta selectiva multimodal al decodificador basat en text i el decodificador multimodal. Els resultats experimentals d'un conjunt de dades públic de resum multimodal de frases demostren l'avantatge dels nostres models en comparació amb les línies de base. Una altra anàlisi suggereix que la nostra xarxa selectiva multimodal proposada pot seleccionar efectivament informació important en la frase d'entrada.", 'et': 'Käesolev töö uurib probleemi genereerida kokkuvõte antud lause-pildi paar. Olemasolevad multimodaalsed järjestusest järjestuseni lähenemisviisid keskenduvad peamiselt dekooderi täiustamisele visuaalsete signaalide abil, ignoreerides samas, et pilt võib parandada kodeerija võimet tuvastada uudistesündmuse või dokumendi tipptasemed. Seega pakume välja mitmeliigilise valikulise väravavõrgu, mis arvestab vastastikuseid seoseid teksti- ja mitmetasandiliste visuaalsete omaduste vahel, sealhulgas globaalse pildi deskriptori, aktiveerimisvõrgustike ja objektiettepanekute vahel, et valida sündmuse tipphetked lähtelause kodeerimisel. Lisaks võtame kasutusele modaalsuse regulariseerimise, et julgustada kokkuvõtet jäädvustama pildile paigaldatud esiletõstmised täpsemalt. Mudeli üldistamise kontrollimiseks võtame kasutusele mitmeliigilise valikulise värava tekstipõhisele dekooderile ja mitmeliigilisele dekooderile. Avaliku multimodaalse lause kokkuvõtte andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad meie mudelite eeliseid lähtejoonte ees. Täiendav analüüs näitab, et meie pakutud mitmeliigiline valikuline väravavõrk suudab sisendlauses tõhusalt valida olulist teavet.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli tutkii ongelmaa luoda yhteenveto tietylle lause-kuva parille. Nykyiset multimodaaliset sekvenssi-sekvenssiin -lähestymistavat keskittyvät pääasiassa dekooderin parantamiseen visuaalisilla signaaleilla unohtamatta, että kuva voi parantaa kooderin kykyä tunnistaa uutistapahtuman tai asiakirjan kohokohdat. Tämän vuoksi ehdotamme multimodaalista valikoivaa porttiverkostoa, joka tarkastelee vastavuoroisia suhteita tekstuaalisten ja monitasoisten visuaalisten ominaisuuksien välillä, mukaan lukien globaali kuvankuvaaja, aktivointiruudukot ja objektiehdotukset, valitakseen tapahtuman kohokohdat lähdelauseen koodauksessa. Lisäksi otamme käyttöön modaalisuussäännöstelyn, joka kannustaa yhteenvetoa kuvaan upotettujen kohokohtien tallentamiseen tarkemmin. Mallimme yleistymisen varmistamiseksi otamme käyttöön multimodaalisen valikoivan portin tekstipohjaiseen dekooderiin ja multimodaaliseen dekooderiin. Kokeelliset tulokset julkisesta multimodaalisesta lauseyhteenvetoaineistosta osoittavat malliemme etulyöntiaseman perusviivoista. Lisäanalyysit viittaavat siihen, että ehdotettu multimodaalinen valikoiva porttiverkosto voi tehokkaasti valita tärkeän tiedon syöttölauseesta.', 'jv': 'Name multimodal politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Genjer-genjer deep Perintah sing paling maneh karo akeh multimodal sing dadi resumen dataset kuwi nggawe perusahaan karo perusahaan sampek dadi maning. langgar penting', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na karanta matsayin ya ƙãga wani kure wa wani surar-zane. Ana iya samar da saurin-dubi'in-sequence, yana amfani da fokus wa ƙaranci koden na da alama masu gani, kuma idan yana ƙyale, zanen zai iya ƙara awon kode don ya gane haske na wani takarda. Kamar haka, Muke goyyade wani jerin shirin kirangyar ta multi-multi wanda ke ƙayyade danganta masu motsi a tsakanin matsalan da masu tsari masu cikin daraja masu yawa, kamar descriptor na zane-zane, masu kanana girgije da abun da za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin haske na tukio idan an kode cewa kwanan. Da wannan, za mu introduce jurisdictori masu tsaro dõmin mu yi ƙari ga ka kãma haske da aka shigar da shi cikin zanen kafin da inganci. To, dõmin Mu gaskata shirin ayukanmu, sai mu ɗauki ƙõfõfin na multiodal zuwa kodkoder na rubutun da multi-rubodal. Matarin jarraba kan danne na ƙararin cire multiodal sun nuna kyautar misalinmu a kan basalin. Ana ƙari yana gaya cewa, shirin shirinmu wanda aka buɗa wa zane multi-multi, yana iya amfani da yin zartar da zane tsari masu muhimu cikin maganar inputan.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek proučuje problem ustvarjanja povzetka za določen par stavka-slike. Obstoječi multimodalni pristopi od zaporedja do zaporedja se osredotočajo predvsem na izboljšanje dekoderja z vizualnimi signali, pri čemer ne upoštevajo, da lahko slika izboljša sposobnost kodirnika, da prepozna vrhunce novic ali dokumenta. Zato predlagamo multimodalno selektivno mrežo vrat, ki upošteva vzajemne odnose med besedilnimi in večnivojskimi vizualnimi značilnostmi, vključno z globalnim deskriptorjem slike, aktivacijskimi mrežami in predlogi objektov, da bi izbrali vrhunce dogodka pri kodiranju izvornega stavka. Poleg tega uvajamo regulacijo modalnosti, ki spodbuja povzetek, da natančneje zajame poudarke, vgrajene v sliko. Za preverjanje posploševanja našega modela sprejmemo multimodalna selektivna vrata do besedilnega dekoderja in multimodalnega dekoderja. Eksperimentalni rezultati javnega multimodalnega nabora podatkov za povzetek stavkov kažejo prednost naših modelov pred osnovnimi črtami. Nadaljnja analiza kaže, da lahko naše predlagano multimodalno selektivno omrežje vrat učinkovito izbere pomembne informacije v vhodnem stavku.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གཅིག་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་བ་དང་ Existing multimodal sequence-to-sequence approaches mainly on enhancing the decoder by visual signals, while ignoring that the image can improve the ability of the encoder to identify a news event or a document. དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་དང་འདྲ་བའི་མཐོང་ཆ་རྣམས་མཐོང་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་གྱིས་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་མཐུན་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ས སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་རྩལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ དབྱེ་ཞིབ་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་བྱེད་ཡོད་པ', 'he': 'העיתון הזה לומד את הבעיה של ליצור סכם לזוג משפט-תמונה מסוים. הגישות הרצף הרצף הרצף הרצף קיימות מתמקדות בעיקר על השיפור של המתקן באמצעות אותים ויזואליים, בזמן שהתמונה יכולה לשפר את היכולת של המתקן לזהות התעלות של אירוע חדשות או מסמך. לכן, אנו מציעים רשת שער מולטומודלית שבגללה יחסים משותפים בין תכונות ויזואליות טקסטליות ומרבות רמות, כולל תיאור תמונות גלובלית, רשתות הפעילות, וההצעות אובייקטיביות, כדי לבחור מרכזים של האירוע כשקודם את המשפט המקורי. בנוסף, אנו מציגים ניתוח רפואי כדי לעודד את הסכם כדי לתפוס את הרמזים המוכנים בתמונה בצורה מדויקת יותר. כדי לאמת את הגנרליזציה של הדוגמנית שלנו, אנו מאמצים את השער המולטומודאלי בחרותי לקודר המבוסס בטקסט וקודר המולטומודאלי. תוצאות ניסיוניות על קבוצת מידע מסוממת משפטים רבים ציבורית מראות את יתרון הדוגמנים שלנו מעל קווי הבסיס. Further analysis suggests that our proposed multimodal selective gate network can effectively select important information in the input sentence.'}
{'en': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'ar': 'كيف تؤثر مصطلحات المجال على أداء تلخيص الاجتماع', 'pt': 'Como a terminologia do domínio afeta o desempenho da sumarização da reunião', 'fr': 'Comment la terminologie du domaine affecte les performances de synthèse des réunions', 'es': 'Cómo afecta la terminología de dominio al rendimiento de la resu', 'ja': 'ドメイン用語が会議の要約パフォーマンスにどのように影響するか', 'zh': '域术语何以动会议摘要性能', 'hi': 'डोमेन शब्दावली मीटिंग सारांशीकरण प्रदर्शन को कैसे प्रभावित करती है', 'ru': 'Как терминология домена влияет на эффективность суммирования собраний', 'ga': 'Mar a théann Téarmaíocht Fearainn i bhfeidhm ar Fheidhmíocht Achoimre Cruinnithe', 'ka': 'როგორ დემონის ტერმინოლოგიის შესახებ შეხვედრის კომპანიზაციის პერფორმაცია', 'el': 'Πώς η ορολογία τομέα επηρεάζει την απόδοση συνοψίσματος συναντήσεων', 'hu': 'Hogyan befolyásolja a domain terminológia a találkozók összefoglalási teljesítményét', 'it': 'Come la terminologia del dominio influisce sulle prestazioni di riepilogo delle riunioni', 'kk': 'Домен терминологиясының тұжырымдамасының жұмыс істеуі қалай', 'lt': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'ms': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'mk': 'Како терминологијата на доменот влијае врз резултатот на резултатите на состанокот', 'mt': 'Kif it-Terminoloġija tad-Dominju taffettwa l-Prestazzjoni tas-Sommarju tal-Laqgħa', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി എങ്ങനെയാണ് മീറ്റിങ്ങ് ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ പ്രാധാന്യം', 'mn': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'no': 'Korleis domeneterminologien påvirkar samandrag', 'pl': 'Jak terminologia domen wpływa na wydajność podsumowania spotkań', 'ro': 'Cum afectează terminologia domeniului performanța de rezumare a întâlnirilor', 'so': 'Sidee Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'sr': 'Kako je provedba sažetanja domena terminologije uticala na sastanak', 'sv': 'Hur domänterminologin påverkar mötessammanfattningens prestanda', 'si': 'කොහොමද ඩෝමේන් අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාව සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්නේ?', 'ur': 'ڈومین ترمیمینولوژی کیسے میٹنی جمع کرنا کامپیوتر اثر دیتی ہے', 'ta': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Lý lịch học đại học Lãnh địa', 'bg': 'Как терминологията на домейна влияе върху резюмето на събранието', 'nl': 'Hoe domeinterminologie de prestaties van vergaderingen beïnvloedt', 'da': 'Hvordan domæneterminologi påvirker resultaterne for opsummering af møder', 'de': 'Wie sich Domain Terminologie auf die Zusammenfassungsleistung von Meetings auswirkt', 'ko': '분야 용어가 회의 요약 성능에 어떻게 영향을 미치는가', 'fa': 'چگونه تأثیرات Terminology Domain Effects Summarization Meeting', 'hr': 'Kako funkcioniranje sažetka na sastanku utjecaja na terminologiju domena', 'tr': 'Taýça Terminologiýasy Etkilerini Ýyglaýyşy', 'af': 'Hoe Domein Terminologie Effekte Vergadering Opsomming Performasie', 'id': 'Bagaimana Terminologi Domain Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'am': 'እንዴት ዶሜን ተርሚኖጂ በጉዳዩ ማጠቃለያ Performance', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս է բնագավառի տերմինոլոգիան ազդում հանդիպման համառոտագրման արդյունքներին', 'az': '䑯浥湡⁔敲浩湯汯杩祡珄넠呯灬懅齤쒱牭愠쒰摡狉饴椠仉餠쎼쎧쎼渊', 'sw': 'Jinsi gani Terminalology Inavyoathiri Mkutano wa Uchunguzi', 'bn': 'কিভাবে ডোমেইন টার্মিনোলজি মিটিং সামারিজেশন প্রভাব ফেলেছে', 'ca': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'sq': 'Si Terminologjia e Domenit ndikon në përmbushjen e rezultateve të përmbledhjes', 'fi': 'Miten verkkotunnuksen terminologia vaikuttaa kokouksen yhteenvedon suorituskykyyn', 'bs': 'Kako je provedba sažetanja domena terminologije utjecala na sastanak', 'et': 'Kuidas domeeniterminoloogia mõjutab koosoleku kokkuvõtte tulemuslikkust', 'cs': 'Jak terminologie domény ovlivňuje výkon shrnutí schůzek', 'jv': 'yata Tolikan Terminal Inomologi AfEffects Meeting Cummarialization Care', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'How Domain Terminology Affects Meeting Summarization Performance', 'sk': 'Kako terminologija domen vpliva na uspešnost povzetka srečanja', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཁོངས་མཚམས་འཇུག་སྣེ་བརྗོད་ལ་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་དང་སྤྲད་སྐུལ་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་བྱ་རིམ།'}
{'en': 'Meetings are essential to modern organizations. Numerous meetings are held and recorded daily, more than can ever be comprehended. A meeting summarization system that identifies salient utterances from the transcripts to automatically generate meeting minutes can help. It empowers users to rapidly search and sift through large meeting collections. To date, the impact of domain terminology on the performance of meeting summarization remains understudied, despite that meetings are rich with domain knowledge. In this paper, we create gold-standard annotations for domain terminology on a sizable meeting corpus ; they are known as jargon terms. We then analyze the performance of a meeting summarization system with and without jargon terms. Our findings reveal that domain terminology can have a substantial impact on summarization performance. We publicly release all domain terminology to advance research in meeting summarization.', 'ar': 'الاجتماعات ضرورية للمنظمات الحديثة. يتم عقد العديد من الاجتماعات وتسجيلها يوميًا ، أكثر مما يمكن فهمه في أي وقت مضى. يمكن أن يساعد نظام تلخيص الاجتماع الذي يحدد الكلمات البارزة من النصوص لإنشاء محاضر الاجتماع تلقائيًا. إنه يمكّن المستخدمين من البحث والتفتيش بسرعة من خلال مجموعات الاجتماعات الكبيرة. حتى الآن ، لا يزال تأثير مصطلحات المجال على أداء تلخيص الاجتماع غير مدروس ، على الرغم من أن الاجتماعات غنية بمعرفة المجال. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بإنشاء شروح بمعيار ذهبي لمصطلحات المجال في مجموعة اجتماعات كبيرة ؛ تُعرف بمصطلحات المصطلحات. ثم نقوم بتحليل أداء نظام تلخيص الاجتماع باستخدام مصطلحات المصطلحات أو بدونها. تكشف النتائج التي توصلنا إليها أن مصطلحات المجال يمكن أن يكون لها تأثير كبير على أداء التلخيص. نصدر جميع مصطلحات المجال بشكل علني لتعزيز البحث في تلخيص الاجتماع.', 'pt': 'As reuniões são essenciais para as organizações modernas. Inúmeras reuniões são realizadas e gravadas diariamente, mais do que jamais pode ser compreendido. Um sistema de resumo de reunião que identifica enunciados salientes das transcrições para gerar automaticamente as atas da reunião pode ajudar. Ele permite que os usuários pesquisem e analisem rapidamente grandes coleções de reuniões. Até o momento, o impacto da terminologia de domínio no desempenho da sumarização de reuniões permanece pouco estudado, apesar de as reuniões serem ricas em conhecimento de domínio. Neste artigo, criamos anotações padrão-ouro para terminologia de domínio em um corpus de reunião considerável; eles são conhecidos como termos de jargão. Em seguida, analisamos o desempenho de um sistema de sumarização de reuniões com e sem termos de jargão. Nossas descobertas revelam que a terminologia de domínio pode ter um impacto substancial no desempenho da sumarização. Liberamos publicamente toda a terminologia de domínio para avançar a pesquisa na sumarização de reuniões.', 'es': 'Las reuniones son esenciales para las organizaciones modernas. Diariamente se celebran y graban numerosas reuniones, más de lo que nunca se puede comprender. Un sistema de resumen de reuniones que identifique las declaraciones más importantes de las transcripciones para generar automáticamente las actas de la reunión puede ayudar. Permite a los usuarios buscar y examinar rápidamente grandes colecciones de reuniones. Hasta la fecha, el impacto de la terminología de dominio en el desempeño de los resúmenes de reuniones sigue siendo poco estudiado, a pesar de que las reuniones son ricas en conocimiento del dominio. En este artículo, creamos anotaciones con el estándar de oro para la terminología de dominio en un corpus de reuniones considerable; se conocen como términos de jerga. Luego analizamos el rendimiento de un sistema de resumen de reuniones con y sin términos de jerga. Nuestros hallazgos revelan que la terminología de dominio puede tener un impacto sustancial en el rendimiento de los resúmenes. Publicamos públicamente toda la terminología de dominio para avanzar en la investigación en el resumen de las reuniones.', 'fr': "Les réunions sont essentielles aux organisations modernes. De nombreuses réunions sont tenues et enregistrées quotidiennement, plus que ce que l'on peut jamais comprendre. Un système de résumé de réunion qui identifie les énoncés saillants des transcriptions afin de générer automatiquement des procès-verbaux de réunion peut aider. Il permet aux utilisateurs de rechercher et de parcourir rapidement de grandes collections de réunions. À ce jour, l'impact de la terminologie du domaine sur la performance de la synthèse des réunions reste peu étudié, bien que les réunions soient riches en connaissances du domaine. Dans cet article, nous créons des annotations de référence pour la terminologie de domaine sur un important corpus de réunions\xa0; ce sont des termes de jargon. Nous analysons ensuite les performances d'un système de résumé de réunion avec et sans termes de jargon. Nos résultats révèlent que la terminologie des domaines peut avoir un impact important sur les performances de synthèse. Nous publions la terminologie de tous les domaines afin de faire progresser la recherche dans la synthèse des réunions.", 'ja': '会議は現代の組織にとって不可欠である。多くの会議が毎日開催され、記録されています。これまで以上に理解することができます。トランスクリプトから顕著な発話を識別して会議の議事録を自動的に生成するミーティングサマリゼーションシステムが役立ちます。大規模な会議コレクションを素早く検索してふるい分けることができます。これまで、ミーティングにはドメイン知識が豊富であるにもかかわらず、ミーティングの要約のパフォーマンスに対するドメイン用語の影響はまだ十分に研究されていません。この論文では、私たちはかなりの規模の会議コーパスでドメイン用語のゴールドスタンダード注釈を作成します。それらは専門用語として知られています。次に、専門用語の有無にかかわらず、会議のまとめシステムのパフォーマンスを分析します。私たちの調査結果は、ドメイン用語が要約パフォーマンスに大きな影響を与える可能性があることを明らかにしました。会議の要約の研究を進めるために、すべてのドメイン用語を公開します。', 'zh': '会议于今为重。 每日行记诸会议,多于人所解。 会议摘要统识成绩单之著言,以自生会议纪要,可以资助。 使用户能疾搜大会。 迄今为止虽会议多蕴领域,而领域术语于会议总结绩效未尽究也。 于本文中,大会议语料库上为域术语创黄金格注。 谓之行话术语。 然后论议摘要行话术语之性。 臣等考结果表明,域术语可以大化摘要性。 宣布域术语,以进会议。', 'hi': 'बैठकें आधुनिक संगठनों के लिए आवश्यक हैं। कई बैठकें आयोजित की जाती हैं और दैनिक रूप से दर्ज की जाती हैं, जितना कभी भी समझा जा सकता है उससे अधिक। एक मीटिंग सारांशीकरण प्रणाली जो स्वचालित रूप से मीटिंग मिनट जनरेट करने के लिए टेपों से मुख्य कथनों की पहचान करती है, मदद कर सकती है. यह उपयोगकर्ताओं को बड़े मीटिंग संग्रहों के माध्यम से तेजी से खोजने और छानने का अधिकार देता है। आज तक, मीटिंग सारांशीकरण के प्रदर्शन पर डोमेन शब्दावली का प्रभाव कम अध्ययन किया गया है, इसके बावजूद कि मीटिंग डोमेन ज्ञान के साथ समृद्ध हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक बड़े मीटिंग कॉर्पस पर डोमेन शब्दावली के लिए स्वर्ण-मानक एनोटेशन बनाते हैं; उन्हें शब्दजाल शब्दों के रूप में जाना जाता है। फिर हम शब्दजाल शर्तों के साथ और बिना एक मीटिंग सारांशीकरण प्रणाली के प्रदर्शन का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हमारे निष्कर्षों से पता चलता है कि डोमेन शब्दावली का सारांश प्रदर्शन पर पर्याप्त प्रभाव पड़ सकता है। हम सार्वजनिक रूप से सभी डोमेन शब्दावली को जारी करने के लिए बैठक summarization में अनुसंधान अग्रिम.', 'ru': 'Совещания имеют важное значение для современных организаций. Ежедневно проводятся и записываются многочисленные заседания, о которых невозможно понять. Помочь может система резюмирования собраний, которая идентифицирует основные высказывания из стенограмм, чтобы автоматически генерировать протоколы собраний. Это позволяет пользователям быстро искать и просеивать большие коллекции собраний. На сегодняшний день влияние терминологии предметной области на ход подготовки резюме совещаний по-прежнему недостаточно изучено, несмотря на то, что совещания богаты знаниями предметной области. В этой статье мы создаем золотые стандартные аннотации для терминологии домена на значительном корпусе собрания; они известны как жаргонные термины. Затем мы анализируем эффективность системы обобщения встреч с терминами жаргона и без них. Наши выводы показывают, что терминология предметной области может оказывать существенное влияние на производительность обобщения. Мы публично публикуем всю терминологию по предметным областям, чтобы продвинуть исследования в обобщении встреч.', 'ga': 'Tá cruinnithe riachtanach d’eagraíochtaí nua-aimseartha. Reáchtáiltear agus déantar taifead ar iliomad cruinnithe go laethúil, níos mó ná mar is féidir a thuiscint riamh. Is féidir cabhrú le córas achoimre cruinnithe a shainaithníonn nathanna suntasacha ó na tras-scríbhinní chun miontuairiscí cruinnithe a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch. Cuireann sé ar chumas úsáideoirí cuardach tapa agus scagadh a dhéanamh trí bhailiúcháin mhóra cruinnithe. Go dtí seo, níor tugadh dóthain staidéir ar an tionchar atá ag téarmaíocht an fhearainn ar fheidhmíocht achoimre cruinnithe, in ainneoin go bhfuil saibhreas eolais fearainn ag cruinnithe. Sa pháipéar seo, cruthaímid nótaí órchaighdeán do théarmaíocht fearainn ar chorpas cruinnithe mór; tugtar téarmaí béarlagair orthu. Déanaimid anailís ansin ar fheidhmíocht córais achoimre cruinnithe le téarmaí béarlagair agus gan iad. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhféadfadh tionchar suntasach a bheith ag téarmaíocht an fhearainn ar fheidhmíocht achoimre. Eisímid go poiblí gach téarmaíocht fearainn chun taighde a chur chun cinn maidir le hachoimriú cruinnithe.', 'el': 'Οι συναντήσεις είναι απαραίτητες για τους σύγχρονους οργανισμούς. Πολλές συναντήσεις πραγματοποιούνται και καταγράφονται καθημερινά, περισσότερο από ποτέ. Ένα σύστημα σύνοψης συσκέψεων που εντοπίζει σημαντικές δηλώσεις από τα πρακτικά της συνεδρίασης για να δημιουργήσει αυτόματα πρακτικά της συνεδρίασης μπορεί να βοηθήσει. Δίνει τη δυνατότητα στους χρήστες να αναζητούν γρήγορα και να ψάχνουν σε μεγάλες συλλογές συσκέψεων. Μέχρι σήμερα, ο αντίκτυπος της ορολογίας τομέων στην απόδοση της σύνοψης συναντήσεων παραμένει ανεπαρκής, παρά το γεγονός ότι οι συναντήσεις είναι πλούσιες σε γνώσεις τομέα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, δημιουργούμε σημειώσεις χρυσού προτύπου για ορολογία τομέων σε ένα μεγάλο σώμα συναντήσεων. Είναι γνωστοί ως ορολογικοί όροι. Στη συνέχεια αναλύουμε την απόδοση ενός συστήματος σύνοψης συναντήσεων με και χωρίς ορολογία. Τα ευρήματά μας αποκαλύπτουν ότι η ορολογία τομέων μπορεί να έχει ουσιαστικό αντίκτυπο στην απόδοση συνοψίας. Δημοσιεύουμε δημόσια όλη την ορολογία του τομέα για να προωθήσουμε την έρευνα στην περίληψη των συναντήσεων.', 'hu': 'A találkozók elengedhetetlenek a modern szervezeteknek. Naponta számos találkozót tartanak és rögzítenek, többet, mint valaha is érthető. Segíthet egy értekezlet-összefoglaló rendszer, amely azonosítja a másolatokból származó kiemelkedő kimondásokat, hogy automatikusan létrehozza az értekezlet jegyzőkönyveit. Lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy gyorsan keressenek és átvizsgálják a nagy értekezletgyűjteményeket. A mai napig a domain terminológia hatása a találkozók összefoglalásának teljesítményére továbbra sem tanulmányozott, annak ellenére, hogy a találkozók gazdag domain ismeretekkel. Ebben a tanulmányban aranyszabású megjegyzéseket készítünk a domain terminológiához egy jelentős találkozókorpuszon; Ezeket zsargonként ismerik. Ezután elemezzük egy találkozóösszefoglaló rendszer teljesítményét zsargonkifejezésekkel és anélkül. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a domain terminológia jelentős hatással lehet az összefoglaló teljesítményre. Az összes domain terminológiát nyilvánosan közzétesszük, hogy elősegítsük a kutatást a találkozók összefoglalásában.', 'ka': 'შეხვედრები მოდინარე ორგანიზაციებისთვის მნიშვნელოვანია. რამდენიმე შეხვედრები იყენება და დაწერება ყოველდღეში, უფრო მეტი ვიდრე შეიძლება იყენება. Name ეს ძალიან ძალიან მომხმარებელი ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან დიდი შეხვედრა კოლექცი ახლა დემომინის ტერმინოლოგიის გამოცდილება შეხვედომის სიმბოლოების გამოცდილებაზე უკეთესებულია, თუმცა შეხვედომები დემომინის ცოდნიერებით ბეჭდვით. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ დავაქმნეთ დოლანური სტანდარტატური ანოტაციები დიომინოლოგიის ტერმინოლოგიაზე, რომელიც დიდი შეხვედნენი კორპუს ისინი იაპონონის სიტყვებით ვიცით. შემდეგ ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ შეხვედრის სისტემის გარეშე სისტემის გარეშე, რომელიც წერდონის გარეშე და გარეშე. ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები აღმოჩნენ, რომ დემომინის ტერმინოლოგია შეიძლება ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი გააკეთება საკუთარი შესაძლებლობაზე. ჩვენ საუკეთესოდ ყველა დიომინური ტერმინოლოგია გახსნა, რომ გავაკეთებთ სურათების შესახებ.', 'it': "Le riunioni sono essenziali per le organizzazioni moderne. Numerose riunioni si tengono e si registrano ogni giorno, più che mai si possa comprendere. Un sistema di riepilogo delle riunioni che identifica le dichiarazioni salienti dalle trascrizioni per generare automaticamente i verbali delle riunioni può aiutare. Consente agli utenti di cercare e vagliare rapidamente le grandi raccolte di riunioni. Ad oggi, l'impatto della terminologia del dominio sulle prestazioni della sintesi delle riunioni rimane sottostimato, nonostante gli incontri siano ricchi di conoscenza del dominio. In questo articolo, creiamo annotazioni gold-standard per la terminologia del dominio su un corpus congressuale considerevole; sono noti come termini gergo. Analizziamo quindi le prestazioni di un sistema di riepilogo delle riunioni con e senza termini in gergo. I nostri risultati rivelano che la terminologia del dominio può avere un impatto sostanziale sulle prestazioni di sintesi. Pubblichiamo pubblicamente tutta la terminologia del dominio per avanzare la ricerca nella sintesi delle riunioni.", 'lt': 'Susitikimai yra labai svarbūs šiuolaikinėms organizacijoms. Numerous meetings are held and recorded daily, more than can ever be comprehended.  Susitikimų santraukų sistema, kuria nustatomi pagrindiniai žodžiai iš transkriptų, kad būtų galima automatiškai generuoti susitikimo protokolus, gali padėti. Ji suteikia vartotojams galimybę greitai paieškoti ir peržiūrėti didelius susitikimų rinkinius. Iki šiol srities terminologijos poveikis susitikimų santraukos rezultatams vis dar nežinomas, nepaisant to, kad susitikimai turi daug žinių apie sritis. Šiame dokumente mes sukuriame aukso standartinius užrašus domeno terminologijai didelio susitikimo korpuso; they are known as jargon terms.  Tada analizuojame susitikimų santraukų sistemos rezultatus su žorgonu ir be jo. Mūsų išvados rodo, kad srities terminologija gali turėti didelį poveikį santraukų rezultatams. Viešai skelbiame visą srities terminologiją, kad pažangėtume mokslinius tyrimus rengiant santraukas.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі бағдарламалар үшін тапсырмалар маңызды. Бірнеше тұлбалар күнделік тұрып жазылады. Бірнеше тұлбаларды түсінуге болады. Транскрипттерден автоматты түрде тапсырма минуттарын құру үшін тапсырма тұжырымдамасын анықтайтын жүйесі көмектесе алады. Бұл пайдаланушыларды үлкен жұмыс жинақтарымен тез іздеу және түрлендіру үшін көмектеседі. Қазіргі уақытта, тұлбалар доменге білім берілген болса да, доменге тұлбалардың тұлбаттауының нәтижесі жалғастырылады. Бұл қағазда, біз доменнің терминологиясының алтын стандартты жазбаларын құрамыз. олар жаргон термині деп белгіледі. Содан кейін біз тапсырманың тұжырымдама жүйесінің жұмысын жұмысын жазып, жазылмай анализ. Біздің іздегеніміз доменнің терминологиясының күнделіктердің күнделіктеріне көп нәрсе болуын көрсетеді. Барлық доменнің терминологиясын бақылау тәртібінде зерттеу үшін жалғастырамыз.', 'mk': 'Состаноците се суштински за модерните организации. Голем број состаноци се одржуваат и снимаат секој ден, повеќе отколку што некогаш може да се разбере. A meeting summarization system that identifies salient utterances from the transcripts to automatically generate meeting minutes can help.  Тоа им овозможува на корисниците брзо да пребаруваат и да проверуваат низ големи собири на состаноци. Досега, влијанието на терминологијата на доменот врз изведувањето на резултатот на состаноците останува недостигнато, и покрај тоа што состаноците се богати со знаење на доменот. Во овој весник, создаваме златни стандардни анотации за терминологијата на доменот на голем состанок корпус; се познати како јаргонски термини. Потоа ги анализираме изведувањата на системот за резултати на состаноците со и без јаргонски термини. Нашите откритија откриваат дека терминологијата на доменот може да има значително влијание врз резултатите на резултатите на резултатите. Јавно ја објавуваме терминологијата на сите домени за да го напредуваме истражувањето во состанокот со резултатите.', 'ml': 'ആധുനിക സംഘടനകള്\u200dക്ക് മീറ്റിങുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമാണ്. എണ്ണം മീറ്റിങുകള്\u200d ദിവസവും റെക്കോര്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഒരിക്കലും മനസ്സിലാക്കാന A meeting summarization system that identifies salient utterances from the transcripts to automatically generate meeting minutes can help.  അത് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വേഗത്തില്\u200d തിരയുകയും വലിയ മീറ്റിംഗ് സംഘടിപ്പിലൂടെ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാനും സാ ഇന്ന് വരെ മീറ്റിംഗിന്റെ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനിലോളജിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസാധാരണ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വലിയ മീറ്റിംഗ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d; അവയെ ജാര്\u200dഗോണ്\u200d വിധികളായി അറിയുന്നു. പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മീറ്റിംഗിന്റെ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ജാര്\u200dഗോണ്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇല് നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജിയില്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ചുരുക നമ്മള്\u200d എല്ലാ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജിയെയും പ്രസിദ്ധമായി വിടുന്നു. ചുരുക്കിയുള്ള പരിശോധന നടത്ത', 'ms': 'Pertemuan penting bagi organisasi modern. Banyak mesyuarat yang dilakukan dan direkam sehari-hari, lebih dari yang pernah boleh dipahami. Sistem penghuraian mesyuarat yang mengenalpasti ungkapan salient dari transkrip untuk menghasilkan minit mesyuarat secara automatik boleh membantu. Ia memungkinkan pengguna untuk mencari dan menggerakkan koleksi pertemuan besar dengan cepat. Sehingga kini, kesan terminologi domain pada prestasi penghuraian mesyuarat masih belum diketahui, walaupun mesyuarat adalah kaya dengan pengetahuan domain. In this paper, we create gold-standard annotations for domain terminology on a sizable meeting corpus;  mereka dikenali sebagai terma jargon. Kemudian kita menganalisis prestasi sistem penghuraian mesyuarat dengan dan tanpa terma jargon. Penemuan kami mengungkapkan bahawa terminologi domain boleh mempunyai kesan yang besar pada prestasi ringkasan. Kami secara awam melepaskan semua terminologi domain untuk maju kajian dalam pertemuan ringkasan.', 'mt': "Il-laqgħat huma essenzjali għall-organizzazzjonijiet moderni. Jinżammu u jiġu rreġistrati bosta laqgħat kuljum, aktar minn qatt qabel. A meeting summarization system that identifies salient utterances from the transcripts to automatically generate meeting minutes can help.  Dan jagħti s-setgħa lill-utenti biex ifittxu malajr u jgħaddu minn kollezzjonijiet kbar ta’ laqgħat. Sal-lum, l-impatt tat-terminoloġija tad-dominju fuq il-prestazzjoni tas-sommarju tal-laqgħat għadu nieqes, minkejja li l-laqgħat huma rikki fl-għarfien tad-dominju. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nħolqu annotazzjonijiet standard tad-deheb għat-terminoloġija tad-dominju fuq korpus ta’ laqgħat daqstant; huma magħrufa bħala termini tal-jargon. Imbagħad nagħmlu analiżi tal-prestazzjoni ta’ sistema ta’ sommarju tal-laqgħat b’termini tal-jargon u mingħajrhom. Is-sejbiet tagħna juru li t-terminoloġija tad-dominju jista’ jkollha impatt sostanzjali fuq il-prestazzjoni tas-sommarju. Aħna nħelsu pubblikament it-terminoloġija kollha tad-dominju biex nimxu 'l quddiem ir-riċerka fis-sommarju tal-laqgħat.", 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн байгууллагуудад уулзалтууд чухал. Олон уулзалтууд өдөр тутмын тухай ойлгоход илүү олон уулзалтууд байдаг. Холбооны жинхэнэ систем хэвлэлээс автоматаар уулзалтын минут үүсгэхэд туслах боломжтой болно. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчиддээ том уулзалтын цуглуулалтын аргаар хурдан хайж, шилжиж чадна. Өнөөдөр уулзалтын мэдлэгтэй баян байхдаа холбоотой терминологийн нөлөө нь уулзалтын жинхэнэ хэмжээний үйлдвэрлэлд байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэмжээний уулзалтын корпус дээр алтын стандарт анзаарлыг бий болгодог. эдгээр нь загварын хэлбэрүүд гэж нэрлэдэг. Дараа нь бид уулзалтын жинхэнэ системийн үйл ажиллагааг жинхэнэ хэмжээсгүйгээр шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлс нь томъёоны терминологи жинхэнэ үйл ажиллагаанд маш чухал нөлөө үзүүлж чадна. Бид олон нийтэд бүх хүрээний терминологийг уулзалтын дунд судалгааг хөгжүүлэхэд илгээдэг.', 'no': 'Møter er viktig for moderne organisasjonar. Mange møtar er held og registrert daglig, meir enn noen gong kan forstårast. Name Det styrer brukarar å søkja og siftere raskt gjennom store møtssamlingar. Til dag er effekten av domeneterminologien på gjennomføringen av sammendraging av møter understudiert, selv om møtene er rikke med domenekunnskap. I denne papiret lager vi gull-standard merknader for domeneterminologi på ein stor møte korpus; dei er kjent som jargonterme. Vi analyserer derfor utviklinga av eit møtssamanseringssystem med og utan avstandsstyrke. Finningane våre viser at domeneterminologien kan ha ein betydelig effekt på sammendraging. Vi publiserer alle domeneterminologiane for å forbetra forskning i sammendrag av møter.', 'pl': 'Spotkania są niezbędne dla nowoczesnych organizacji. Codziennie odbywają się liczne spotkania i rejestrowane są, bardziej niż kiedykolwiek można zrozumieć. System podsumowania spotkań, który identyfikuje istotne wypowiedzi z transkrypcji w celu automatycznego generowania protokołów spotkań, może pomóc. Umożliwia użytkownikom szybkie wyszukiwanie i przeszukiwanie dużych kolekcji spotkań. Do tej pory wpływ terminologii domenowej na wydajność podsumowania spotkań pozostaje niezbadany, mimo że spotkania są bogate w wiedzę domenową. W niniejszym artykule tworzymy złote standardowe adnotacje dla terminologii domenowej na dużym korpusie spotkań; są znane jako terminy żargonowe. Następnie analizujemy wydajność systemu podsumowywania spotkań z terminami żargonowymi i bez nich. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że terminologia domenowa może mieć istotny wpływ na wydajność podsumowania. Publicznie publikujemy całą terminologię domeny w celu rozwoju badań w zakresie podsumowania spotkań.', 'ro': 'Întâlnirile sunt esenţiale pentru organizaţiile moderne. Numeroase întâlniri sunt organizate și înregistrate zilnic, mai mult decât se poate înțelege vreodată. Un sistem de rezumare a întâlnirilor care identifică cuvintele importante din transcrieri pentru a genera automat procesele-verbale ale întâlnirii poate ajuta. Acesta permite utilizatorilor să caute rapid și să cernă prin colecții mari de întâlniri. Până în prezent, impactul terminologiei domeniului asupra performanței rezumatului întâlnirilor rămâne dublat, în ciuda faptului că întâlnirile sunt bogate în cunoștințe de domeniu. În această lucrare, creăm adnotări gold-standard pentru terminologia domeniului pe un corpus de întâlniri considerabil; Sunt cunoscuţi sub numele de termeni jargon. Apoi analizăm performanța unui sistem de rezumare a întâlnirilor cu și fără termeni jargon. Rezultatele noastre arată că terminologia domeniului poate avea un impact substanțial asupra performanțelor rezumate. Publicăm public toată terminologia domeniului pentru a avansa cercetarea în rezumarea întâlnirilor.', 'si': 'මුණගැනීම් අද්\u200dයුතික සංවිධානයට අවශ්\u200dයයි. ගොඩක් හමුවීම් හැමදාම අල්ලගත්තා හැමදාම ලිපිනය කරලා තේරෙන්න පුළුවන් වඩා වැඩියි. ස්වයංක්\u200dරිප්ටයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විනාඩි මිනිත්තුවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය කරගන්න ඒකෙන් පාවිච්චිකරුවන්ට ලොකු හමුවීම් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඉක්මනින් හොයාගන්න සහ සැලසුම් කරන් අවස්ථානයෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මුණගැනීමේ සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු විදියට ඉන්නවා,  මේ පත්තරේ අපි රත්තර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරමාණ විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදිහට මුණගැහෙ ඔවුන් ජර්ගෝන් වර්ගයක් කියලා දන්නවා. ඊට පස්සේ අපි මුණගැනීම් සංවිධානයක් සංවිධානයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා ජාර්ගෝන් වර්ගයක්  අපේ හොයාගන්න පෙන්වන්නේ ඩෝමින් වර්තනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සියළුම විද්\u200dයාපණ විද්\u200dයාපණ විද්\u200dයාපණ විද්\u200dයාපණ විද්\u200dයාපණය කරනව', 'sv': 'Möten är viktiga för moderna organisationer. Många möten hålls och spelas in dagligen, mer än någonsin kan begripas. Ett mötessammanfattningssystem som identifierar viktiga uttalanden från utskrifterna för att automatiskt generera mötesprotokoll kan hjälpa till. Det ger användarna möjlighet att snabbt söka och söka igenom stora mötessamlingar. Hittills är domänterminologins inverkan på resultatet av mötessammanfattning fortfarande dubblad, trots att mötena är rika på domänkunskap. I denna uppsats skapar vi guldstandard-anteckningar för domänterminologi på en stor möteskorpus; De kallas jargontermer. Därefter analyserar vi resultatet av ett mötessammanfattningssystem med och utan jargontermer. Våra resultat visar att domänterminologin kan ha en betydande inverkan på sammanfattningens resultat. Vi publicerar all domänterminologi offentligt för att främja forskningen i mötessammanfattning.', 'sr': 'Sastanci su ključni za moderne organizacije. Brojne sastanke se održavaju i snimaju svakodnevno, više nego što se ikada može shvatiti. Sistem sažetanja sastanaka koji identifikuje salične reči iz transkripta da bi automatski stvorili minute sastanka mogla pomoći. Ono omogućava korisnike da brzo pretraže i šire kroz velike kolekcije sastanaka. Do sada, uticaj terminologije domena na provedbu sažetanja sastanaka ostaje pod proučavanjem, uprkos tome što su sastanci bogati znanjem domena. U ovom papiru stvaramo zlatne standardne annotacije za terminologiju domena o veličanstvenom sastanku korpusa; poznati su kao džargonski termin. Onda analiziramo izvršnost sažetkog sistema sastanka sa i bez uslova žargona. Naši nalazi otkrivaju da terminologija domena može imati značajan uticaj na rezimetiranje. Publično objavljujemo sve terminologije domena da napredujemo istraživanje u sažetku sastanka.', 'so': 'Kulamadu waxay muhiim u yihiin ururada asalka ah. Maalin walba waxaa la qabanqaabiyaa ururo badan, waxaana la soo qoraa wax ka badan oo la garan karo. Xiriiridda shirka oo aqoonsan hadallada dabaqa ee warqadaha qoraalka ah iyo si rasmi ah u abuuridda shirka ayaa caawinaya daqiiqada shirka. Waxay isticmaalayaasha u xoogaysaa in ay si dhaqso u raadinaan oo ay u kala qeybiyaan ururo badan. Tan iyo waqtiga, saamaynta terminology ee gudaha ku saabsan dhamaadka kulanka xiliga ah waxey sii baahan tahay, in kastoo ay kulamada ku hodan yihiin aqoonta deegaanka. In this paper, we create gold-standard annotations for domain terminology on a sizable meeting corpus;  waxaa loo yaqaan sida jargon oo kale. Markaas waxaynu baaraynaa sameynta nidaamka shirka oo ku qoran iyo baahida jargon. Faahritaankeenu waxay muuqataa in terminology deegaanka uu saameyn weyn ku yeelan karo sameynta dhameystirka. Dhammaan baaritaanka internetka ayaannu si aan u horumarinno baaritaanka kulanka summarinta.', 'ta': 'அமர்ந்த நிறுவனங்களுக்கு முக்கியமானது. எண்ணிக்கைகள் நாள் மற்றும் பதிவு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, எப்போதும் புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியாது. குறிப்புகளிலிருந்து தானாகவே உருவாக்க ஒரு சந்திப்பு சுருக்கம் அமைப்பு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட சொல்லை குறிப்ப அது பயனர்களை விரைவாக தேடி மற்றும் பெரிய தொகுப்பு தொகுப்புகள் மூலம் அகற்ற பயன்படுத்துகிறது. சந்திப்பு சுருக்கம் செய்யும் செயல்பாட்டின் தாக்கத்தின் டொமைன் முனைய விளைவு இன்னும் பார்த்துக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது, என இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு அளவான கூட்டத்திற்கான தங்கம் நிலையான அறிவிப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அவர்கள் ஜார்கோன் வாக்கியங்கள் என்று அறியப்படுகிறார்கள். பிறகு நாம் ஒரு சந்திப்பு சுருக்கும் அமைப்பின் செயல்பாட்டை ஆராய்வு செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் ஜார்க்ன்  எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் தெரிவிக்கின்றன, களம் முனையத்தை சுருக்கும் செயல்பாட்டின் மீது பெரிய பாதிப் நாங்கள் அனைத்து களத்தின் முனையத்தை பொதுவாக வெளியேற்றுகிறோம் சுருக்கமாக கூட்டத்தில் ஆராய்', 'ur': 'ملاقات مدرنی سازمانوں کے لئے ضرورت ہے۔ بہت سی ملاقات روزہ حاضر کئے جاتے ہیں اور لکھی جاتی ہیں اور اس سے زیادہ سمجھ سکتے ہیں Name یہ استعمال کرنے والوں کو بہت بڑے ملاقات جماعتوں کے ذریعے جلدی تلاش اور سیٹ کرنے کی قدرت دیتا ہے. یہاں تک، ملاقات کی تعریف پر ڈومین ٹریمولوجی کا اثر کم تحقیق ہوتا ہے، اگرچہ ملاقات ڈومین علم کے ساتھ ثروتمند ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک سائز میٹ کورپوس پر سونے کی استاندارڈ ٹرمینولوژی کے لئے سونے کی استاندارڈ اظہارات بناتے ہیں، وہ جرگون کی قوموں کا نام ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک ملاقات کی تعریف سیسٹم کی عملکرد کا تحقیق کر رہے ہیں جنگ شرط کے ساتھ اور بغیر. ہمارے نتیجے ظاہر کر رہے ہیں کہ ڈومین ٹریمولوجی ایک بڑا اثر کرسکتی ہے۔ ہم سب ڈومین ٹریمولوجی کو آغاز کرنے کے لئے آغاز کریں گے۔', 'vi': 'Gặp gỡ là điều cần thiết cho tổ chức hiện đại. Nhiều cuộc họp được tổ chức và ghi lại hàng ngày, nhiều hơn bao giờ hết. Một hệ thống tóm tắt các cuộc gặp xác định những lời phát ra từ các bản sao để tự động tạo ra các phút họp có thể giúp ích. Nó cho phép người dùng tìm kiếm nhanh chóng trong các bộ sưu tập họp lớn. Cho tới nay, tác động của thuật ngữ lãnh thổ lên kết quả của cuộc họp sẽ được chia sẻ, mặc dù cuộc họp có nhiều kiến thức về lãnh thổ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tạo ra biên bản tiêu chuẩn vàng cho các thuật ngữ miền trên một tập thể đáng kể; chúng được biết đến như thuật ngữ ấy. Sau đó phân tích kết quả của một hệ thống tóm tắt cuộc họp với và không có thuật ngữ chuẩn. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng thuật ngữ miền có thể có ảnh hưởng lớn đến kết quả. Chúng tôi công khai công bố mọi thuật ngữ về lãnh thổ để tiến hành nghiên cứu.', 'uz': "Muddati yangi tashkilotlar uchun muhim. Ko'pchiliklar har kuni yozib olingan va har kuni yozib olingan, hamda ko'proq o'rganish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Bu foydalanuvchilar katta жамоатлар tomonidan tez qidirish va qidirish imkoniyatini beradi. Bu kuni davom etish uchun domen terminologiyasining qismlari jarayonini bajarish natijasida o'sha narsalar davomida o'tibor beradi. Bu qogʻozda, biz domen terminologiyasi uchun gull-standard taʼminotlarni katta yuqori kamaytirish korpusida yaramiz; ularning jargon sohasi deb nomlanadi. Keyin biz bir møte hisoblanuvchi tizimning natijasini o'ylab, jargon soʻzlari bilan taʼlumot qilamiz. Bizning murakkablarimiz, domen terminologiyasi muhim tashkilotni bajarishiga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Biz hamma domen terminologiyasini o'zgartirib o'rganish uchun o'rganishni ko'paymiz.", 'nl': 'Vergaderingen zijn essentieel voor moderne organisaties. Dagelijks worden talloze vergaderingen gehouden en vastgelegd, meer dan ooit te begrijpen. Een vergadersamenvattingssysteem dat opvallende uitspraken uit de transcripten identificeert om automatisch vergadernotulen te genereren, kan helpen. Het stelt gebruikers in staat om snel grote vergadercollecties te zoeken en te doorzoeken. Tot op heden is de impact van domeinterminologie op de prestaties van vergadersamenvattingen onvoldoende bestudeerd, ondanks dat vergaderingen rijk zijn aan domeinkennis. In dit artikel maken we goudstandaard annotaties voor domeinterminologie op een omvangrijk vergadercorpus; Ze staan bekend als jargon termen. Vervolgens analyseren we de prestaties van een meeting summarization systeem met en zonder jargon termen. Onze bevindingen tonen aan dat domeinterminologie een aanzienlijke impact kan hebben op de samenvattingsprestaties. We publiceren alle domeinterminologie publiekelijk om onderzoek in vergadersamenvattingen te bevorderen.', 'bg': 'Срещите са от съществено значение за съвременните организации. Многобройни срещи се провеждат и записват ежедневно, повече от всякога може да се разбере. Система за обобщаване на събранията, която идентифицира важни изказвания от транскрипциите, за да генерира автоматично протоколи от събранието, може да помогне. Той дава възможност на потребителите бързо да търсят и пресяват големи колекции от срещи. Към днешна дата въздействието на терминологията на домейна върху ефективността на обобщаването на събранията остава недостатъчно проучено, въпреки че срещите са богати на познания за домейна. В тази статия създаваме анотации със златен стандарт за терминологията на домейна върху значителен корпус от събрания; Те са известни като жаргонски термини. След това анализираме ефективността на система за обобщаване на събранията с и без жаргон термини. Нашите констатации разкриват, че терминологията на домейна може да окаже значително влияние върху ефективността на обобщаването. Публично оповестяваме цялата терминология на домейна, за да напреднем в изследванията за обобщаване на срещите.', 'hr': 'Sastanci su ključni za moderne organizacije. Brojne sastanke se održavaju i snimaju svakodnevno, više nego što se ikada može shvatiti. Sistem sažetanja sastanka koji identificira salične izreke iz transkripta kako bi automatski stvorili minute sastanka mogla pomoći. On omogućava korisnike brzo pretražiti i širiti kroz velike skupine sastanaka. Do sada, utjecaj terminologije domena na provedbu sažetka sastanka ostaje pod proučavanjem, uprkos tome što su sastanke bogati znanjem domena. U ovom papiru stvaramo zlatne standardne annotacije za terminologiju domena o veličanstvenom sastanku korpusa; poznati su kao žargonski termini. Onda analiziramo učinkovitost sustava sažetka sastanka sa i bez uslova žargona. Naši nalazi otkrivaju da terminologija domena može imati značajan utjecaj na rezervaciju. Publično objavljujemo sve terminologije domena kako bi napredovali istraživanje u sažetku sastanka.', 'da': 'Møder er afgørende for moderne organisationer. Mange møder afholdes og registreres dagligt, mere end nogensinde kan forstås. Et mødesammenfattende system, der identificerer vigtige udtalelser fra udskrifterne for automatisk at generere mødeprotokoller, kan hjælpe. Det giver brugerne mulighed for hurtigt at søge og gennemse store mødesamlinger. Indtil videre er domæneterminologiens indvirkning på resultaterne af mødeformuleringen fortsat understuderet, selv om møderne er rige med domæneterminal. I denne artikel udarbejder vi gold-standard annotationer til domæneterminologi på et stort mødekorpus; De er kendt som jargontermer. Derefter analyserer vi resultaterne af et mødesammenfattende system med og uden jargontermer. Vores resultater afslører, at domæneterminologi kan have en væsentlig indvirkning på resultaterne af opsummeringen. Vi offentliggør al domæneterminologi for at fremme forskningen i mødesammenfatning.', 'ko': '회의는 현대 조직에 매우 중요하다.매일 수차례 회의를 열어 기록하는 것은 우리가 이해할 수 없는 일이다.하나의 회의 요약 시스템은 회의 기록에서 중요한 말을 식별하여 자동으로 회의 기록을 생성할 수 있다.그것은 사용자로 하여금 대형 회의 집합을 신속하게 검색하고 선별할 수 있게 한다.지금까지 회의는 풍부한 분야 지식을 가지고 있었지만 분야 용어가 회의 요약 성능에 미친 영향은 여전히 충분한 연구를 받지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 상당히 큰 회의 자료 라이브러리에서 분야 용어를 위한 황금 표준 주석을 만들었다.그것들은 행화술어라고 불린다.그리고 우리는 회의 요약 시스템이 용어를 사용하거나 사용하지 않을 때의 성능을 분석했다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 분야 용어는 요약 성능에 중대한 영향을 미칠 수 있다.우리는 회의 요약 연구를 추진하기 위해 모든 분야의 용어를 공개적으로 발표했다.', 'fa': 'جلسه\u200cها برای سازمان\u200cهای مدرن ضروری دارند. تعداد جلسه\u200cها روزانه در حال حاضر و ثبت می\u200cشوند، بیشتر از هرگز می\u200cتوانند درک شوند. Name این به کاربران قدرت می\u200cدهد که سریع از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای بزرگ جستجو و جستجو کنند. تا حالا، تاثیر ترمینالوژی دامنی روی عملکرد جمع کردن جلسه با وجود اینکه جلسه\u200cها با دانش دامنی ثروتمند هستند، تحقیق می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما نوشته های طلا استاندارد برای ترمینالوژی دامنی در یک قالب ملاقات قابل اندازه ایجاد می کنیم. آنها به عنوان شرایط جارگون شناخته می شوند. سپس عملکرد یک سیستم جمع کردن جلسه را با و بدون شرایط جارگون تحلیل می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که ترمینالوژی دامنی می\u200cتواند اثر بسیار بزرگی بر عملکرد جمع\u200cآوری داشته باشد. ما به طور عمومی تمام ترمینالوژی دامنی را برای پیشرفت تحقیقات در جمع کردن جلسه آزاد می کنیم.', 'de': 'Meetings sind für moderne Organisationen unerlässlich. Täglich werden zahlreiche Meetings abgehalten und aufgezeichnet, mehr denn je nachvollziehbar. Ein Besprechungszusammenfassungssystem, das wichtige Äußerungen aus den Transkripten identifiziert, um automatisch Besprechungsprotokolle zu generieren, kann hilfreich sein. Es ermöglicht Benutzern, schnell große Meetingsammlungen zu durchsuchen und zu durchsuchen. Bis heute ist der Einfluss der Domänenbegriffung auf die Leistung der Zusammenfassung von Meetings noch nicht untersucht, obwohl Meetings reich an Domänenwissen sind. In diesem Beitrag erstellen wir Goldstandard-Anmerkungen für Domänenbegriffe auf einem großen Meetingkorpus; Sie sind als Jargon Begriffe bekannt. Anschließend analysieren wir die Leistung eines Zusammenfassungssystems für Meetings mit und ohne Fachbegriffe. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Domänenbegriffe einen erheblichen Einfluss auf die Zusammenfassungsleistung haben können. Wir veröffentlichen alle Domänenbegriffe öffentlich, um die Forschung in der Zusammenfassung von Meetings voranzutreiben.', 'id': 'Pertemuan penting bagi organisasi modern. Numerous meetings are held and recorded daily, more than can ever be comprehended.  Sistem penerangan pertemuan yang mengidentifikasi ucapan yang penting dari transkrip untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan menit pertemuan dapat membantu. Ini memungkinkan pengguna untuk dengan cepat mencari dan menggerakkan koleksi pertemuan besar. Sehingga saat ini, dampak dari terminologi domain pada prestasi penerangan pertemuan masih belum dipahami, meskipun pertemuan kaya dengan pengetahuan domain. In this paper, we create gold-standard annotations for domain terminology on a sizable meeting corpus;  mereka dikenal sebagai istilah jargon. Kemudian kita menganalisis prestasi dari sistem perhitungan pertemuan dengan dan tanpa terma jargon. Penemuan kami mengungkapkan bahwa terminologi domain dapat memiliki dampak besar pada prestasi ringkasan. Kami publik melepaskan semua terminologi domain untuk melanjutkan penelitian dalam pertemuan ringkasan.', 'sw': 'Mkutano ni muhimu kwa mashirika ya kisasa. Mikutano mengi yanafanyika na yanarekodiwa kila siku, zaidi ya kutambuliwa. Mfumo wa muhtasari wa mkutano ambao unaonyesha hotuba zinazotumika kutoka kwenye maandishi ya mabadiliko ili kutengeneza dakika chache za mkutano unaweza kusaidia. Inawawezesha watumiaji kutafuta kwa haraka na kuchapisha kupitia mikusanyiko makubwa. Mpaka sasa, madhara ya utambulisho wa ndani juu ya ufanisi wa mkutano wa muhtasari bado yanaendelea kufahamu, pamoja na kuwa mikutano ni matajiri na maarifa ya ndani. Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza matatizo ya dhahabu kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa ndani kwa makutano makubwa; wanajulikana kama vipengele vya jargoni. Kisha tunachambua utendaji wa mfumo wa muhtasari wa mkutano na bila matumizi ya jargoni. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kwamba utambulisho wa ndani unaweza kuwa na madhara makubwa katika utendaji wa muhtasari. Tunaachia hadharani tamaduni zote za ndani ili kuendelea tafiti katika mkutano wa muhtasari.', 'sq': 'Takimet janë thelbësore për organizatat moderne. Takime të shumta mbahen dhe regjistrohen çdo ditë, më shumë se sa mund të kuptohen ndonjëherë. Një sistem përmbledhjesh takimi që identifikon shprehje të rëndësishme nga transkriptet për të gjeneruar automatikisht minutat e takimit mund të ndihmojë. Ajo mundëson përdoruesit të kërkojnë shpejt dhe të zhvillojnë përmes koleksioneve të mëdha të takimeve. Deri tani, ndikimi i terminologjisë së fushës mbi performancën e përmbledhjes së takimeve mbetet i pakujdesshëm, pavarësisht se takimet janë të pasura me njohuri të fushës. Në këtë letër, krijojmë anotacione të standardeve të artë për terminologjinë e domenit në një korpus të madh takimi; janë të njohur si terma xhargon. Pastaj analizojmë shfaqjen e një sistemi të përmbledhjes së takimeve me dhe pa terma xhargon. Our findings reveal that domain terminology can have a substantial impact on summarization performance.  Ne publikisht lëshojmë të gjithë terminologjinë e fushës për të përparuar kërkimin në takimin e përmbledhjes.', 'tr': 'Ýygymlar häzirki gurşamlar üçin wajyply. Köp sany ýygnaklar günde bellenilýär we ýazylýar. Ýygnak milliwatlary otomatik bilen ýygnak minutlary bejermek üçin çykyş sözlerni tanap ýerleşýän ýygnak sistemi. Ullançylara uly ýygnaklar bilen çalt gözlemegi we süýşirmegi ukyp edýär. Häzirçe, toplantyň hulaýatynyň başarylygyna netijesi boýun bir şekilde öwrenmeli. Bu kagyzda, ululyk ýygnak korpusynyň üstünde domin terminologiýasy üçin altyn standart duýýarlar döredik; Olar därgon sözleri diýip tanalýarlar. Sonra ýygnak jemgyýetleme sistemasyny jargon şertleri bilen we bolmasa çözümlendirik. Çalışmalarımız, domen terminolojisinin toplama eserinin önemli bir etkisi olabileceğini gösteriyor. Toplantılar toplantısında araştırmaları geliştirmek üçin bütün domain terminologiýasyny publika yayınlatırız.', 'af': "Vergadering is noodsaaklik vir moderne organisasies. Nommer meetings word dag gehou en opgeneem, meer as ooit kan verstaan word. Name Dit mag gebruikers vinnig soek en syf deur groot vergadering versamelings. Op dag, die invloek van domeinterminologie op die prestasie van samekoms bly ondersteun, veral dat samekoms ryk is met domeinkennis. In hierdie papier skep ons goud-standaard annotasies vir domein terminologie op 'n groottebaar vergadering corpus; hulle is bekend as jargon terme. Ons analyseer dan die prestasie van 'n vergadering opsomming stelsel met en sonder jargon terme. Ons gevinde vertoon dat domeinterminologie 'n groot invloek kan hê op opsommingsprestasie. Ons verlos alle domeinterminologie openbaar om forsoek in samekoms te voorspoedig.", 'az': 'Toplantılar modern organizasyonlar üçün vacib olandır. Daha çox toplantılar günlük müəyyən edilir və yazılır. Birləşmə dəqiqələrini avtomatik olaraq yaratmaq üçün transkriptlərdən süslü sözləri tanımayan toplantı təmizləmə sistemi kömək edər. Bu istifadəçiləri böyük toplantı koleksiyonlarından tez axtarmağa və çəkməyə qadir edir. Şimdiye qədər, toplantılar domena elmi ilə baxımından baxmayaraq domena terminologiyasının təsiri ilə toplantılmasının təsiri dəyişdirilmişdir. Bu kağızda, böyük bir toplantı korpusu üzerində domena terminologiyası üçün altın-standart annotatiyonlar yaratdıq. onlar dövlət şəkili kimi tanıdırlar. Sonra qarşılaşma qurğulama sisteminin müəyyən edilməsini dövründə və çəkilmədən analiz edirik. Bizim tapındıqlarımız domain terminologiyasının yığışdırma performansına böyük bir təsiri olaraq göstərir. Biz bütün domeinin terminologiyasını toplantı toplantısında araştırmalarını öyrənmək üçün yayınlıq edirik.', 'hy': 'Հանդիպումները ժամանակակից կազմակերպությունների համար կարևոր են: Շատ հանդիպումներ են կատարվում և գրանցվում ամեն օր, ավելի քան երբևէ հասկանալի է: A meeting summarization system that identifies salient utterances from the transcripts to automatically generate meeting minutes can help.  Այն հնարավորություն է տալիս օգտագործողներին արագ որոնել և տեղափոխել հանդիպման մեծ հավաքածուներ: Այսօր բնագավառի տերմինոլոգիայի ազդեցությունը հանդիպումների համառոտագրման արդյունքի վրա դեռևս թերագնահատված է, չնայած նրան, որ հանդիպումները հարուստ են բնագավառի գիտելիքներով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք ոսկու ստանդարտ նոտացիաներ բնագավառի տերմինոլոգիայի համար մի մեծ հանդիպման կորպուսի վրա: դրանք հայտնի են որպես ժարգոնական տերմիններ: Այնուհետև մենք վերլուծում ենք հանդիպման համառոտագրման համակարգի արտադրողությունը առանց և առանց ժարգոնի տերմինների: Մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ բնագավառի տերմինոլոգիան կարող է նշանակալի ազդեցություն ունենալ համառոտագրման արդյունքների վրա: Մենք հանրային առումով հրապարակում ենք բոլոր բնագավառների տերմինոլոգիան, որպեսզի զարգացնենք հետազոտությունները հանդիպման համառոտագրման մեջ:', 'am': 'ስብሰባዎች ለአዲስ ድርጅቶች ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ ከዘላለም ይልቅ የሚታወቅ ብዙ ጉባኤ በየዕለቱ ይታሰራል ይታሰቡማል። የግንኙነት አቀማመጥ ሲስተም ከጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተጨማሪውን ቃላት የሚያሳውቅ የግንኙነት አቀማመጥ ሲስተም የስብሰባ ደቂቃ ደቂቃዎች ማቀናጃ ይችላል፡፡ በተጠቃሚ ጉብሰባ ውስጥ ፈጥኖ ለመፈለግ እና ማሰናከል ይችላል፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ የዶሜን ተርሚኖሎጂ ጉዳዩ ማስታወቂያውን በማድረግ ላይ የሚደረገው ነገር ግን ሰብስብሰባዎች ከውይይት እውቀት ጋር ባለ ጠጎች ቢሆኑ ይታያል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለውይይት ተርሚኖሎጂ የወርቅ ድረ-standard ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይታወቃሉ በኋላም የጉዳዩ አቀማመጥ ስርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን የውይይት ተርሚኖሎጂ በቁጥጥር ውጤት ላይ የበለጠ ጉዳይ ይችላል፡፡ የዶሜን ተርሚኖሎጂን ሁሉ በተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ላይ ለመፍጠር እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Sastanci su ključni za moderne organizacije. Brojne sastanke se održavaju i snimaju svakodnevno, više nego što se ikada može shvatiti. Sistem sažetanja sastanka koji identificira salične izreke iz transkripta da bi automatski stvorili minute sastanka mogla pomoći. On omogućava korisnike brzo pretražiti i širiti kroz velike kolekcije sastanaka. Do sada, utjecaj terminologije domena na provedbu sažetka sastanka ostaje pod proučavanjem, uprkos tome što su sastanke bogati znanjem domena. U ovom papiru stvaramo zlatne standardne annotacije za terminologiju domena o veličanstvenom sastanku korpusa; poznati su kao žargonski termini. Onda analiziramo učinkovitost sažetkog sistema sastanka sa i bez žargonskim uslovima. Naši nalazi otkrivaju da terminologija domena može imati značajan uticaj na rezimetiranje. Publično objavljujemo sve terminologije domena kako bi napredovali istraživanje u sažetku sastanka.', 'bn': 'আধুনিক সংস্থার জন্য মিটিং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। অনেক মিটিং আয়োজন করা হয় এবং দিনের রেকর্ড করা হয়, যা কখনও বুঝতে পারে না। স্বয়ংক্রিপ্ট থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মিটিং নির্মাণ করার জন্য ব্যবস্থা সংক্ষেপের ব্যবস্থা যা সংক্ষেপের কথা চ এটি ব্যবহারকারীদের বিশাল মিটিং সংগ্রহের মাধ্যমে দ্রুত অনুসন্ধান এবং স্থাপন করার ক্ষমতা দেয়। এখন পর্যন্ত ডোমেইন টার্মিনোলজির প্রভাব ডোমেইনের সার্মিজারেশনের প্রভাব বিস্তারিত হয়ে গেছে, যদিও এই সভা ডোমেইনের জ্ঞানের সাথে সম এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডোমেইন টার্মিনিলজির জন্য সোনার-স্ট্যান্ডার্ডেন্ড ব্যাপার তৈরি করি একটি বড় সভা কোর্পাসে তাদের জারগোনের শর্ত হিসেবে পরিচিত। তারপর আমরা মিটিং সংক্ষেপের ব্যবস্থা বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং জারগোনের শর্ত ছাড়া। Our findings reveal that domain terminology can have a substantial impact on summarization performance.  আমরা প্রকাশ্যে সকল ডোমেইন টার্মিনোলজিকে প্রকাশ্যে মুক্তি দিচ্ছি সার্মিজেশনে গবেষণার জন্য।', 'ca': "Les reunions són essencials per a les organitzacions modernes. Numeroses reunions es celebren i s'enregistren diariament, més que mai poden entendre. Un sistema de resum de reunions que identifica expressions salients de les transcripcions per generar automàticament minuts de reunions pot ajudar. Empodera als usuaris a buscar i analitzar ràpidament grans col·leccions de reunions. Fins ara, l'impacte de la terminologia de domini en el desempeny de la resumització de reunions segueix subestimat, malgrat que les reunions són rics de coneixement de domini. En aquest article creem anotacions d'or per a la terminologia de domini en un gran cos de reunions; they are known as jargon terms.  Després analitzem el rendiment d'un sistema de resum de reunions amb i sense termes d'jargon. Els nostres descobriments revelen que la terminologia de domini pot tenir un impacte substancial en el rendiment de la resumensió. Publicament divulguem tota la terminologia de domini per avançar la recerca en reunir la resumida.", 'cs': 'Setkání jsou nezbytné pro moderní organizace. Každý den se koná a zaznamenává četná setkání, více než kdy jindy lze pochopit. Pomůže systém shrnutí schůzek, který identifikuje významné výroky z přepisů a automaticky generuje zápisy ze schůzky. Umožňuje uživatelům rychle vyhledávat a prohledávat velké sbírky schůzek. Doposud zůstává dopad doménové terminologie na výkonnost shrnutí schůzek nedostatečně zkoumán, přestože schůzky jsou bohaté na doménové znalosti. V tomto článku vytváříme zlaté standardní anotace pro doménovou terminologii na velkém korpusu schůzek; Jsou známé jako žargonové termíny. Následně analyzujeme výkonnost systému shrnutí schůzek s termíny žargonu i bez něj. Naše zjištění ukazují, že doménová terminologie může mít významný vliv na výkonnost shrnutí. Veřejně zveřejňujeme veškerou doménovou terminologii, abychom pokročili výzkum v souhrnu schůzek.', 'et': 'Koosolekud on kaasaegsete organisatsioonide jaoks hädavajalikud. Iga päev peetakse ja salvestatakse arvukaid koosolekuid, mida on võimalik aru saada. Abiks võib olla koosoleku kokkuvõtlussüsteem, mis tuvastab transkriptsioonidest olulised sõnad ja genereerib automaatselt koosoleku protokollid. See võimaldab kasutajatel kiiresti otsida ja sõeluda suuri koosolekute kollektsioone. Praeguseks on domeeniterminoloogia mõju koosolekute kokkuvõtliku koostamise tulemuslikkusele vähe uuritud, vaatamata sellele, et koosolekud on rikkalikud domeeniteadmistega. Käesolevas töös loome domeeniterminoloogiale kuldstandardilised märkused suure koosoleku korpusele; Neid tuntakse žargooni terminitena. Seejärel analüüsime koosoleku kokkuvõtlussüsteemi toimimist žargooni terminitega ja ilma. Meie tulemused näitavad, et domeeniterminoloogia võib oluliselt mõjutada kokkuvõtlikkust. Avaldame avalikult kogu domeeniterminoloogia, et edendada koosolekute kokkuvõtlikkust.', 'fi': 'Tapaamiset ovat välttämättömiä nykyaikaisille organisaatioille. Lukuisia kokouksia pidetään ja tallennetaan päivittäin, enemmän kuin koskaan voidaan ymmärtää. Kokouksen yhteenvetojärjestelmä, joka tunnistaa tärkeimmät puheet transkriptioista ja luo automaattisesti kokouspöytäkirjat, voi auttaa. Sen avulla käyttäjät voivat nopeasti etsiä ja seulata suuria kokouskokoelmia. Tähän mennessä toimialueen terminologian vaikutusta kokousten yhteenvedon tuloksellisuuteen ei ole tutkittu, vaikka kokouksissa on runsaasti toimialueen osaamista. Tässä artikkelissa luomme kultaisia huomautuksia verkkotunnuksen terminologiaan mittavaan kokouskorpukseen. Niitä kutsutaan jargoniksi. Tämän jälkeen analysoimme kokouksen yhteenvetojärjestelmän toimivuutta jargontermeillä ja ilman sitä. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että toimialueen terminologialla voi olla merkittävä vaikutus yhteenvetojen suorituskykyyn. Julkaisemme julkisesti kaikki verkkotunnuksen terminologiat edistääksemme kokousten yhteenvedon tutkimusta.', 'jv': 'Dino-Ngeveh sing klêrung kuwi nggo rerampungan modèrn Dino nganggo punika dipunanggo lan ditawak, akeh liyane wis dipunanggo siji-siji. 1" (msg. "panel:i1 Mangka-Mangka kuwi nggawe pengguna kanggo ngilanggar lan ijol-ijolan winih ning acara To date, the effect of domain terminal on the success of Meeting sumification is underread, Despt that Meeting are wealth with domain information. In this paper, we create golf-Standard anntations for domain terminal on a size able Meeting Body; and Perintah sing dipunanggé kuwi "jargon". Awak dhéwé ngerti cara-cara sistem sing ditambahak perusahaan karo "jargon". We find tions show that domain terminal can have a basic effect on sumification success. We Publily Relay all domain terminal to advance R&D in Meeting Cumulate', 'sk': 'Srečanja so bistvena za sodobne organizacije. Številna srečanja potekajo in beležijo dnevno, več kot je mogoče razumeti. Sistem za povzetek srečanja, ki prepozna pomembne izjave iz prepisov in samodejno ustvari zapisnike srečanja, lahko pomaga. Uporabnikom omogoča hitro iskanje in presejanje velikih zbirk srečanj. Vpliv domenske terminologije na uspešnost povzetka srečanj do danes ostaja premalo raziskan, kljub temu, da so srečanja bogata z domenskim znanjem. V tem prispevku ustvarimo zlati standard opombe za domensko terminologijo na velikem korpusu srečanja; Znani so kot žargonski izrazi. Nato analiziramo uspešnost sistema za povzetek sestankov z žargonskimi izrazi in brez njih. Naše ugotovitve kažejo, da lahko domenska terminologija bistveno vpliva na uspešnost povzetka. Javno objavljamo vso domensko terminologijo za napredovanje raziskav v povzetku sestankov.', 'ha': "Kulinattu na da muhimu zuwa asasi na yanzu. Akwai manyan haɗuwa za'a samun da ake rubũta a yinin, ko da yawa ba za a iya fahimta ba. Tsarin kurarin zaman shawara da ke gane magana masu sali daga transcripts zuwa ya ƙiƙiro dakika ika ika haɗuwa farat ɗaya, za ya iya amfani. Ina iya amfani da masu amfani da su nẽmi gaugãwa da su gaura cikin sunayen haɗuwa mai girma. Ga yanzu, haƙin tarminogi na guda a kan jarrabin haɗuwa na ƙarami yana ƙaranci, kuma ingawa da haɗuwa sun wadãta da ilmi guda. Ga wannan takardan, za'a samu taƙaita taƙaitori na zĩnãriya a kan taƙaita ta guda a kan komai mai girma; Ina sanar su kamar karari. Sa'an nan kuma muna anayyar aikin muhimmada da kuma bã da jargon. FantayinMu sun bayyana cewa tamariyoyi na Domin yana iya sami matsayin mai girma a kan aikin muhimmanci. Munã sakar da kowane taƙailogi na Domen dõmin a gabatar da research a cikin haɗi ga kurarin.", 'he': "פגישות חשובות לארגונים מודרניים. פגישות רבות מתקיימות ויקלטות יומית, יותר מאשר אי פעם אפשר להבין. מערכת מיזוג פגישות שמזיהה ביטויים משמעותיים מהתרשומות כדי ליצור באופן אוטומטי דקות פגישה יכולה לעזור. זה מאפשר למשתמשים לחפש ומעביר במהירות דרך אוסף פגישות גדול. עד כה, ההשפעה של הטרמינולוגיה בתחום על ההופעה של המסכם של פגישות נשארת מתעלמת, למרות שהפגישות עשירות עם ידע בתחום. בעיתון הזה, אנו יוצרים ציונים סטנדרטיים זהב לטרמונולוגיה בתחום על קורפוס פגישה גדול; הם ידועים בתנאים ג'רגונים. ואז אנו מנתחים את ההופעה של מערכת מיזוג פגישות עם ובלי תנאי ג'רגון. Our findings reveal that domain terminology can have a substantial impact on summarization performance.  אנו משחררים בפומבי את כל הטרמונולוגיה של התחום כדי להתקדם מחקר במסכם פגישות.", 'bo': 'མཇའ་ཁུངས་འདི་ད་ལྟོའི་སྒྲིག་སྡེ་ཚོར་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་དང་གལ་ཆེན་ཡོད། མི་གྲངས་བསྡུ་ཚར་བ་དེ་བསྟན་ནས་དུས་བཀོད་ཡོད། ཚིག དེ་ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚོགས་ཁུངས་ཆེན་པོ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དང་སྦྱར་བར་ཆོག To date, the impact of domain terminology on the performance of meeting summarization remains understudied, despite that meetings are rich with domain knowledge. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་ཚོགས་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གྲངས་སུ་རྩིས་བ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འདི་དག་ནི་ཕལ་རིས་ཀྱི་ས་དོན་དག་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོར་ཚོགས་སྡུད་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲུབ་སྟངས་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our findings reveal that domain terminology can have a substantial impact on summarization performance. ང་ཚོས་ཚོགས་སྡུད་བརྗོད་ཆེན་ཡོངས་བསྒྲགས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་མང་ཆོག་འཆར་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'On the Faithfulness for E-commerce Product Summarization', 'ar': 'حول الإخلاص لتلخيص منتجات التجارة الإلكترونية', 'es': 'Sobre la fidelidad para el resumen de productos de comercio electrónico', 'fr': 'À propos de la fidélité pour la synthèse des produits du commerce électronique', 'pt': 'Sobre a fidelidade para resumo de produtos de comércio eletrônico', 'ja': 'Eコマース製品サマリゼーションの忠実さについて', 'hi': 'ई-कॉमर्स उत्पाद सारांशीकरण के लिए वफादारी पर', 'zh': '浅谈电子商务产之忠实度总结', 'ru': 'О верности подведению итогов по продуктам электронной коммерции', 'ga': 'Ar an Dílseacht don Achoimre ar Tháirgí Ríomhthráchtáil', 'ka': 'E-commerce პროექტის კომპანიზაციაზე', 'hu': 'Az e-kereskedelem hűségességéről Termék összefoglalásáról', 'el': 'Για την Πίστη για την Περίληψη Προϊόντων Ηλεκτρονικού Εμπορίου', 'kk': 'Name', 'it': "Sulla Fedeltà per l'E-commerce Sintesi dei prodotti", 'lt': 'Dėl sąžiningumo e. prekybos produktams santraukos', 'mk': 'За резултатот на верувањето на производите од електронската трговија', 'ms': 'Tentang Kepercayaan untuk Penapisan Produk Kummersi-E', 'mn': 'E-худалдааны бүтээгдэхүүний хэмжээний үнэндээ', 'ml': 'എ- കമ്പനിസ് പ്രൊട്ടിക്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള വിശ്വസ്തതയില്\u200d', 'mt': 'On the Faithfulness for E-commerce Product Summarization', 'pl': 'W sprawie wierności dla produktów handlu elektronicznego', 'no': 'På sikkerheten på e-kommerksproduktsamarisering', 'sr': 'O vjernosti za sažetak e-komercijalnih proizvoda', 'ro': 'Despre credința pentru comerțul electronic Sumarizarea produselor', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Xaqiiqada koritaanka E-ganacsiga', 'sv': 'Om trofasthet för e-handel Produktsammanfattning', 'ta': 'E- வியாபாரத்தின் சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'E-commerce Product Summarization کے حق پر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Về độ chung thủy đối với thương mại E...', 'da': 'Om Trofastheden for E-handel Produktresumé', 'nl': 'Over de Trouw voor E-commerce Product Samenvatting', 'bg': 'За верността на електронната търговия обобщаване на продуктите', 'hr': 'O vjernosti za sažetak proizvoda e-trgovine', 'de': 'Über die Treue für E-Commerce Produktzusammenfassung', 'id': 'On the Faithfulness for E-commerce Product Summarization', 'ko': '전자상거래 제품 요약의 충실성을 논하다', 'fa': 'در مورد اعتقادی برای جمع\u200cآوری مواد فروش', 'sw': 'Kuhusu Ukweli kwa ajili ya Mkutano wa Kuzalisha Biashara', 'af': 'Op die Geldigheid vir E-kommerksie Produk Opsomming', 'tr': 'E-commerce Produkt Toplaýyşy', 'sq': 'Për sinqeritetin e besnikërisë për përmbledhjen e prodhimeve të tregtisë elektronike', 'am': 'የኢሜሪካ ፕሮጀክት ማጠቃለያ', 'hy': 'Էլեկտրոնային առևտրի արդյունքների համառոտագրման հավատարմության մասին', 'az': 'E-ticarət məhsullarının təbliğ etməsi barəsində', 'bn': 'ই-বাণিজ্যিক প্রযুক্তি সামারিজেশনের বিশ্বাস', 'et': 'E-kaubanduse usaldusväärsuse kohta Tootekokkuvõte', 'ca': 'En el Resume de la Feialitat per al Comerci electrònic de Productes', 'cs': 'Souhrn produktů o věrnosti elektronickém obchodování', 'bs': 'O vjernosti za sažetak e-trgovinskih proizvoda', 'fi': 'Verkkokaupan uskollisuudesta Tuotteen yhteenveto', 'ha': 'On the Faithfulness for E-commerce Product Summarization', 'sk': 'O zvestobi elektronskega trgovanja Povzetek izdelkov', 'jv': 'Nang Panjenengan kanggo Keamanan E-komersisi Sumanggu', 'he': 'על האמינות לסומר אלקטרוני', 'bo': 'E-commerce་མཛུབ་སྡུད་རྗེས་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡིད་རྟོན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this work, we present a model to generate e-commerce product summaries. The consistency between the generated summary and the product attributes is an essential criterion for the ecommerce product summarization task. To enhance the consistency, first, we encode the product attribute table to guide the process of summary generation. Second, we identify the attribute words from the vocabulary, and we constrain these attribute words can be presented in the summaries only through copying from the source, i.e., the attribute words not in the source can not be generated. We construct a Chinese e-commerce product summarization dataset, and the experimental results on this dataset demonstrate that our models significantly improve the faithfulness.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نقدم نموذجًا لإنشاء ملخصات منتجات التجارة الإلكترونية. يعد التناسق بين الملخص الذي تم إنشاؤه وسمات المنتج معيارًا أساسيًا لمهمة تلخيص منتج التجارة الإلكترونية. لتعزيز الاتساق ، أولاً ، نقوم بتشفير جدول سمات المنتج لتوجيه عملية إنشاء الملخص. ثانيًا ، نحدد كلمات السمة من المفردات ، ونقيد كلمات السمة هذه في الملخصات فقط من خلال النسخ من المصدر ، أي أنه لا يمكن إنشاء كلمات السمة غير الموجودة في المصدر. نقوم ببناء مجموعة بيانات لتلخيص منتجات التجارة الإلكترونية الصينية ، وتوضح النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة البيانات هذه أن نماذجنا تعمل بشكل كبير على تحسين الإخلاص.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous présentons un modèle pour générer des résumés de produits de commerce électronique. La cohérence entre le résumé généré et les attributs du produit est un critère essentiel pour la tâche de résumé des produits de commerce électronique. Pour améliorer la cohérence, nous codons d'abord la table attributaire du produit afin de guider le processus de génération de résumés. Deuxièmement, nous identifions les mots d'attribut à partir du vocabulaire, et nous limitons que ces mots d'attribut peuvent être présentés dans les résumés uniquement par copie à partir de la source, c'est-à-dire que les mots d'attribut ne figurant pas dans la source ne peuvent pas être générés. Nous construisons un ensemble de données de synthèse de produits de commerce électronique chinois, et les résultats expérimentaux de cet ensemble de données démontrent que nos modèles améliorent considérablement la fidélité.", 'es': 'En este trabajo, presentamos un modelo para generar resúmenes de productos de comercio electrónico. La coherencia entre el resumen generado y los atributos del producto es un criterio esencial para la tarea de resumen de productos de comercio electrónico. Para mejorar la coherencia, primero codificamos la tabla de atributos del producto para guiar el proceso de generación de resúmenes. En segundo lugar, identificamos las palabras de atributo del vocabulario, y restringimos que estas palabras de atributo se presenten en los resúmenes solo copiándolas de la fuente, es decir, no se pueden generar las palabras de atributo que no estén en la fuente. Construimos un conjunto de datos de resumen de productos de comercio electrónico chino, y los resultados experimentales de este conjunto de datos demuestran que nuestros modelos mejoran significativamente la fidelidad.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, apresentamos um modelo para gerar resumos de produtos de e-commerce. A consistência entre o resumo gerado e os atributos do produto é um critério essencial para a tarefa de resumo do produto de comércio eletrônico. Para melhorar a consistência, primeiro codificamos a tabela de atributos do produto para orientar o processo de geração de resumo. Em segundo lugar, identificamos as palavras de atributo do vocabulário e restringimos que essas palavras de atributo possam ser apresentadas nos resumos apenas copiando da fonte, ou seja, as palavras de atributo que não estão na fonte não podem ser geradas. Construímos um conjunto de dados de sumarização de produtos de comércio eletrônico chinês e os resultados experimentais nesse conjunto de dados demonstram que nossos modelos melhoram significativamente a fidelidade.', 'ja': 'この作業では、eコマース製品サマリーを生成するモデルを提示します。生成されたサマリーと製品属性の一貫性は、eコマース製品サマリータスクの重要な基準です。一貫性を高めるために、まず製品属性テーブルをエンコードして、要約生成のプロセスを導きます。第二に、語彙から属性単語を識別し、これらの属性単語は、ソースからのコピーによってのみ要約に提示できる、すなわち、ソースにない属性単語を生成できないように制約する。私たちは中国のeコマース製品の要約データセットを構築し、このデータセットの実験結果は、私たちのモデルが忠実度を大幅に向上させていることを示しています。', 'zh': '于是设电子商务产摘要形。 摘要物之间一致性电子商务摘要务之本也。 强一致性先之,编码之以道摘要。 其次识性词于词汇表,约束于从源复制见于摘要,不成不在性也。 我构一中国电子商务产品总数据集,该数集之实验结果表明,模样显著忠实度。', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы представляем модель для создания резюме продуктов электронной коммерции. Согласованность между сгенерированным резюме и атрибутами продукта является важным критерием для задачи обобщения продукта электронной коммерции. Для повышения согласованности, во-первых, мы кодируем таблицу атрибутов продукта, чтобы направлять процесс создания сводки. Во-вторых, мы идентифицируем атрибутивные слова из словарного запаса, и ограничиваем эти атрибутивные слова, которые могут быть представлены в сводках только путем копирования из источника, т.е. атрибутные слова не могут быть сгенерированы. Мы создаем китайский набор сводных данных о продуктах электронной коммерции, и экспериментальные результаты на этом наборе данных показывают, что наши модели значительно улучшают точность.', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम ई-कॉमर्स उत्पाद सारांश उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। उत्पन्न सारांश और उत्पाद विशेषताओं के बीच संगतता ई-कॉमर्स उत्पाद सारांशीकरण कार्य के लिए एक आवश्यक मानदंड है। स्थिरता को बढ़ाने के लिए, सबसे पहले, हम सारांश पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए उत्पाद विशेषता तालिका को एन्कोड करते हैं। दूसरा, हम शब्दावली से विशेषता शब्दों की पहचान करते हैं, और हम इन विशेषता शब्दों को सीमित करते हैं, केवल स्रोत से प्रतिलिपि बनाने के माध्यम से सारांश में प्रस्तुत किए जा सकते हैं, यानी, स्रोत में विशेषता शब्द उत्पन्न नहीं किए जा सकते हैं। हम एक चीनी ई-कॉमर्स उत्पाद सारांश डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं, और इस डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल वफादारी में काफी सुधार करते हैं।', 'ga': 'San obair seo, cuirimid múnla i láthair chun achoimrí táirgí ríomhthráchtála a ghiniúint. Is critéar riachtanach é an chomhsheasmhacht idir an achoimre ghintear agus tréithe an táirge don tasc ríomhthráchtála achoimrithe. Chun an chomhsheasmhacht a fheabhsú, ar dtús, déanaimid an tábla tréithe táirge a ionchódú chun an próiseas giniúna achoimre a threorú. Ar an dara dul síos, sainaithnímid na focail aitreabúide ón stór focal, agus cuirimid srian nach féidir na focail airí seo a chur i láthair sna hachoimrí ach amháin trí chóipeáil ón bhfoinse, i.e., ní féidir na focail aitreabúide nach bhfuil san fhoinse a ghiniúint. Déanaimid tacar sonraí achoimrithe táirgí ríomhthráchtála na Síne, agus léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar an tacar sonraí seo go bhfeabhsaítear dílseacht ár samhlacha go suntasach.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მოდელის შექმნა e-კომპორდის რეზიუმენტის შექმნა. წარმოიქმნილი რეზიუმენტის და პროექტის ატრიბუტების შემდეგ კრიტერია ეკომენტიკური პროექტის რეზიუმენტიკური დავალებისთვის. ჩვენ პროდისტის ატრიბუტის ცხოვრებას გავაკეთებთ, რომ გავაკეთებთ რეზიუტის წარმოდგენის პროცესის პროცესი. მეორე, ჩვენ ატრიბულის სიტყვების ატრიბულის სიტყვების განსაზღვრება, და ჩვენ ამ ატრიბუტის სიტყვების განსაზღვრებაში შეგვიძლია გაჩვენოთ მხოლოდ სიტყვების კოპერაციის გამოყენებით, მაგალითად ჩვენ ჩინეთის ელეკომპორდიციის რესუმენტიზაციის მონაცემები შექმნა და ამ მონაცემების რესუმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელები ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო მე', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk az e-kereskedelmi termékek összefoglalóinak készítésére szolgáló modellt. A létrehozott összefoglaló és a termék attribútumok közötti összhang alapvető kritérium az e-kereskedelmi termékek összefoglalásának feladatához. A konzisztencia javítása érdekében először is kódoljuk a termék attribútumtáblázatot, hogy irányítsa az összefoglaló generálás folyamatát. Másodszor azonosítjuk az attribútumszavakat a szókincsből, és korlátozzuk, hogy ezeket az attribútumszavakat csak a forrásból történő másolással lehet bemutatni, azaz a forrásban nem szereplő attribútumszavakat nem lehet generálni. Kínai e-kereskedelmi termék összefoglaló adatkészletet építünk, és ezen adatkészlet kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy modelleink jelentősen javítják a hűséget.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία συνοπτικών προϊόντων ηλεκτρονικού εμπορίου. Η συνέπεια μεταξύ της παραγόμενης σύνοψης και των χαρακτηριστικών του προϊόντος αποτελεί βασικό κριτήριο για την εργασία σύνοψης προϊόντων ηλεκτρονικού εμπορίου. Για να ενισχύσουμε τη συνέπεια, αρχικά, κωδικοποιούμε τον πίνακα χαρακτηριστικών προϊόντος για να καθοδηγήσουμε τη διαδικασία της δημιουργίας σύνοψης. Δεύτερον, προσδιορίζουμε τις λέξεις χαρακτηριστικών από το λεξιλόγιο και περιορίζουμε ότι αυτές οι λέξεις χαρακτηριστικών μπορούν να παρουσιαστούν στις περιλήψεις μόνο μέσω αντιγραφής από την πηγή, δηλαδή οι λέξεις χαρακτηριστικών που δεν βρίσκονται στην πηγή δεν μπορούν να δημιουργηθούν. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα κινεζικό σύνολο δεδομένων σύνοψης προϊόντων ηλεκτρονικού εμπορίου, και τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων αποδεικνύουν ότι τα μοντέλα μας βελτιώνουν σημαντικά την πιστότητα.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, presentiamo un modello per generare riassunti di prodotti e-commerce. La coerenza tra il riepilogo generato e gli attributi del prodotto è un criterio essenziale per l'attività di riepilogo del prodotto e-commerce. Per migliorare la coerenza, in primo luogo, codifichiamo la tabella degli attributi del prodotto per guidare il processo di generazione del riepilogo. In secondo luogo, identifichiamo le parole attribute dal vocabolario, e limitiamo queste parole attribute possono essere presentate nei riassunti solo copiando dalla fonte, cioè le parole attribute non nella fonte non possono essere generate. Costruiamo un set di dati di sintesi dei prodotti e-commerce cinese, e i risultati sperimentali su questo set di dati dimostrano che i nostri modelli migliorano significativamente la fedeltà.", 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде, эл. торговлық продукттардың тұжырымдамасын құру үшін үлгі көрсетеді. Жасалған тұжырымдама мен продукттың атрибуттарының арасындағы тұжырымдама - экоммерциялық продукттарды тұжырымдама тапсырмасының негізгі критериясы. Біріншіден, біріншіден, продукттың атрибуттық кестесін құру процесін бағыттау үшін кодтамыз. Екіншіден, біз сөздердің атрибуттарын анықтаймыз, бұл атрибуттар сөздеріне шектеп тұрамыз, тек көзінен көшірмелеу арқылы, т.е. көзінде емес атрибуттар сөздері құрылмайды. Біз қытайша эл-торговлық продукттарды жазылу деректер жиынын құрамыз. Бұл деректер жиынының тәжірибелі нәтижелері, өзіміздің үлгілеріміздің сенімділігін өзгерту', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe pristatome e. prekybos produktų santraukų kūrimo model į. Gamintos santraukos ir produkto požymių nuoseklumas yra esminis kriterijus ekologinės prekės produkto santraukos uždaviniui. Siekiant padidinti nuoseklumą, pirmiausia koduojame produkto požymių lentelę, kuria vadovaujamasi santraukų gamybos procesui. Antra, mes identifikuojame žodyno požymių žodžius ir apribojame šiuos požymių žodžius santraukose galima pateikti tik kopijuojant i š šaltinio, t. y. požymių žodžių, kurie nėra šaltinio, negalima generuoti. Sukūrome Kinijos e. prekybos produktų santraukų duomenų rinkinį, o eksperimentiniai šio duomenų rinkinio rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modeliai gerokai pagerina patikimumą.', 'mk': 'In this work, we present a model to generate e-commerce product summaries.  Конзистентноста помеѓу генерираното сумирање и атрибутите на производот е суштински критериум за задачата за сумирање на производот на екокомерцијалната трговија. За да ја зголемиме конзистентноста, прво, ја кодираме табелата за атрибути на производот за да го водиме процесот на генерација на резултати. Второ, ги идентификуваме зборовите на атрибутот од речникот, и ги ограничуваме овие зборови на атрибутот може да се претстават во резултатите само преку копирање од изворот, т.е. зборовите на атрибутот кои не се во изворот не можат да се генерираат. Конструираме компјутер на податоци за резултатите на кинеската електронска трговија со производи и експерименталните резултати на овој компјутер покажуваат дека нашите модели значително ја подобруваат верноста.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan model untuk menghasilkan ringkasan produk e-commerce. Kesempatan diantara ringkasan yang dijana dan atribut produk adalah kriteria penting untuk tugas ringkasan produk eko. Untuk meningkatkan konsistensi, pertama, kita kodkan jadual atribut produk untuk membimbing proses generasi ringkasan. Kedua, kita mengenalpasti perkataan atribut dari vocabulari, dan kita halang perkataan atribut in i boleh dipaparkan dalam ringkasan hanya melalui salinan dari sumber, iaitu perkataan atribut yang tidak dalam sumber tidak dapat dijana. Kami membina set data ringkasan produk perdagangan e-China, dan hasil percubaan pada set data ini menunjukkan bahawa model kami meningkatkan kesetiaan secara signifikan.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു, ഇ-കമ്പനിസ് പ്രൊട്ടിന്\u200dറെ വേര്\u200dപ്പ് ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d. സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെയും പ്രൊജറ്റിന്റെയും കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെയും തമ്മിലുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെയും സാധ്യതയാണ്  ആദ്യം നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊജട്ടിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയയെ മാര്\u200dഗദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രോജക്റ്റ് ഗുണതലമുറയിലേക് രണ്ടാമതായി, സ്രോതസ്സില്\u200d നിന്നും പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ വിശേഷവാക്കുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിക്കുന്നു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ചൈനീസ് ഇ-കമ്പനിസ് പ്രൊജറ്റ് ചുരുക്കം ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nippreżentaw mudell biex niġġeneraw sommarji tal-prodotti tal-kummerċ elettroniku. Il-konsistenza bejn is-sommarju ġġenerat u l-attributi tal-prodott hija kriterju essenzjali għall-kompitu ta’ sommarju tal-prodott ekokummerċjali. Biex tissaħħaħ il-konsistenza, l-ewwel nett, aħna nkodifikaw it-tabella tal-attributi tal-prodott biex niggwidaw il-proċess tal-ġenerazzjoni fil-qosor. It-tieni nett, nidentifikaw il-kliem tal-attribut mill-vokabulari, u nirrestrinġu dawn il-kliem tal-attribut jistgħu jiġu ppreżentati fis-sommarji biss permezz tal-kopja mis-sors, jiġifieri, il-kliem tal-attribut mhux fis-sors ma jistgħux jiġu ġġenerati. Aħna nibnu sett ta’ dejta dwar is-sommarju tal-prodotti tal-kummerċ elettroniku Ċiniż, u r-riżultati sperimentali fuq dan is-sett ta’ dejta juru li l-mudelli tagħna jtejbu b’mod sinifikanti l-fiduċja.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажил дээр бид электрон худалдааны бүтээгдэхүүнийг бий болгохын тулд загвар тайлбарлаж байна. Эконометр бүтээгдэхүүний жинхэнэ хэмжээний болон бүтээгдэхүүний харилцааны хоорондын нэгтгэл нь эдийн засгийн бүтээгдэхүүний жинхэнэ хэмжээний шаардлагатай. Эхлээд бид бүтээгдэхүүний атрибутын хүснэгтийг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд жинхэнэ үеийн процессийг удирдах хэрэгтэй. Хоёрдугаар, бид үгсийн атрибутын үгийг тодорхойлдог. Бид эдгээр атрибутын үгийг тодорхойлдог. Зөвхөн эх үүсвэрээс хуулбарлаж, яг эх үүсвэрээс биш атрибутын үгийг бий болгож чадахгүй. Бид Хятадын эл-худалдааны бүтээгдэхүүний жинхэнэ өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж байна. Энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загварууд үнэн итгэлийг маш чухал сайжруулдаг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy model generowania podsumowań produktów e-commerce. Spójność pomiędzy generowanym podsumowaniem a atrybutami produktu jest niezbędnym kryterium podsumowania produktu e-commerce. Aby zwiększyć spójność, najpierw kodujemy tabelę atrybutów produktu, aby kierować procesem generowania podsumowań. Po drugie, identyfikujemy słowa atrybutów ze słownictwa i ograniczamy, że te słowa atrybutów mogą być prezentowane w podsumowaniach tylko poprzez kopiowanie ze źródła, tzn. słowa atrybutów nie znajdujące się w źródłu nie mogą być generowane. Budujemy chiński zestaw danych podsumowujących produkty e-commerce, a wyniki eksperymentalne na tym zestawie danych pokazują, że nasze modele znacznie poprawiają wierność.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un model pentru generarea rezumatelor produselor de e-commerce. Coerența dintre rezumatul generat și atributele produsului este un criteriu esențial pentru sarcina de sintetizare a produsului de comerț electronic. Pentru a spori consistența, în primul rând, codăm tabelul atributelor produsului pentru a ghida procesul de generare a rezumatului. În al doilea rând, identificăm cuvintele atribute din vocabular, și restricționăm aceste cuvinte atribute pot fi prezentate în rezumate numai prin copierea din sursă, adică cuvintele atribute care nu sunt în sursă nu pot fi generate. Construim un set de date chinezesc de sintetizare a produselor de comerț electronic, iar rezultatele experimentale ale acestui set de date demonstrează că modelele noastre îmbunătățesc semnificativ fidelitatea.', 'no': 'I dette arbeidet viser vi eit modell for å laga sammendragar for e-komercialprodukt. Konsekvensen mellom den genererte sammendraga og produktattributtene er ein viktig kriteriet for sammendraga av ekomerksprodukt. For å forbetra konsistensitet, først koder vi produktattributttabellen for å hjelpa prosessen for samandrag. Andre, vi identifiserer attributtord frå ordboka, og vi begrenser desse attributtord kan berre visast i samandringane gjennom kopiering frå kjelden, dvs. attributtord som ikkje er i kjelden kan ikkje lagast. Vi konstruerer ein kinesisk e-kommerksjonsdatabanset for sammendraging av e-kommerksjon, og eksperimentelle resultatene på denne datasetten viser at våre modeller betydelig forbedrar sannheten.', 'so': 'Shaqodaas waxan sameynaa tusaale aan soo saarno dhaqaalaha ganacsiga. Isku-socoshada u dhexeeya dhamaanka soo baxay iyo hantida dhaqaalaha waa mid qiimeyn muhiim ah oo u ah shaqada heerka soo saarista dhaqaalaha. Si aan u kordhiyo dhamaanka, marka hore waxaynu koobannaa miiska dhaqaalaha si aan u hagno baaritaanka qarniga soo dhoweeya. Second, waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa erayada macluumaadka, waxaana ku qasbaynaa hadalladan gaarka ahna waxaa la soo bandhigi karaa xiliga marka lagu soo qorayo qoraalka asalka ah, taas oo ah erayada qaabka ah e e aan afka asalka ku jirin lagama abuuri karo. Waxaynu dhisnay kooxda summarinta ah e e macluumaadka ganacsiga ee Shiinaha, resultiyada imtixaanka ee sawiradan ayaa caddaynaya in modelalkayagu aad u bedeshaa aaminnimada.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete presenterar vi en modell för att generera produktresuméer för e-handel. Konsekvensen mellan den genererade sammanfattningen och produktattributen är ett viktigt kriterium för e-handelsproduktsammanfattningen. För att förbättra konsistensen kodar vi först produktattributtabellen för att vägleda processen för sammanfattning. För det andra identifierar vi attributorden från ordförrådet, och vi begränsar dessa attributord kan presenteras i sammanfattningarna endast genom kopiering från källan, dvs attributorden som inte finns i källan kan inte genereras. Vi konstruerar en sammanfattningsdataset för kinesisk e-handel, och de experimentella resultaten på denna dataset visar att våra modeller avsevärt förbättrar trofastheten.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo model kako bi stvorili sažetke proizvoda e-komercije. Konformitet između proizvedenog sažetka i atributa proizvoda je ključni kriterij za sažetak ekomerske proizvode. Da bi poboljšali konsekvenciju, prvo, kodirali smo stol atributa proizvoda kako bi vodili proces generacije sažetaka. Drugo, identifikujemo atributne reči iz rečnika, i ograničavamo ove atributne reči mogu biti predstavljene u sažetcima samo kroz kopiranje iz izvora, to je da se atributne reči koje nisu u izvoru mogu stvoriti. Izgradimo sažetak podataka o kineskoj e-komerciji, i eksperimentalni rezultati na ovom setu podataka pokazuju da naši modeli značajno poboljšavaju vernost.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි නිර්මාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ e-ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරදේශයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන සාමාව සහ උත්පත්ත විශේෂතාවය අතර සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂතාවක්. මුලින්ම සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරගන්න ප්\u200dරකාර ප්\u200dරකාර කරනවා. දෙවෙනි විශේෂ වචන අඳුරගන්න, අපි මේ විශේෂ වචන්ද සංශේෂ වචන් සංශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් මුළු වලින් ප්\u200dරතිලිපත අපි චීනි e-ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරදේශයක් සුමාරු දත්ත සූදානයක් හදනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ දත්ත සූදානයේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිච', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் முனையத்தை வைத்துள்ளோம். உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்கம் மற்றும் பொருள் குணங்களுக்கும் இடையேயுள்ள தொடர்பு பொருள் சுருக்கும் செயல் தொடர்பை அதிகரிக்க, முதலில், சுருக்கமான தலைமுறையின் செயல்பாட்டை நேர்வழி காட்டுவதற்கான பொருள் குணங்கள் அட இரண்டாவது, நாம் சொல்வளத்திலிருந்து குணங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க, மற்றும் நாம் இந்த குணங்கள் சுருக்கத்தில் மட்டும் மூலத்திலிருந்து நகலெடுத்து மட் நாங்கள் ஒரு சீனா மின்னஞ்சல் பொருள் சுருக்கல் தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கி, மற்றும் இந்த தகவல் அமைப்பின் சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اس کام میں ہم ایک مدل پیش کرتے ہیں کہ e-commerce produkt summaries پیدا کرے۔ پیدا کیے گئے پیدا کیے گئے پیدا کیے گئے پیدا کیے گئے اور پیدا کیے گئے پیدا کیے ہوئے پیدا کیے کے لئے ایک ضروری مقدار ہے. پہلے ہم محصولات کے آبروٹ ٹیبل کو سیدھی راہ دکھانے کے لئے محصولات کی پیدائش کے لئے سیدھی کریں گے۔ دوسرا، ہم کلمات کا اثبات پہچان لیتے ہیں، اور ہم یہ اثبات کلمات کو محدود کرتے ہیں، صرف سورج سے کپی کرنا کے ذریعہ، یعنی، سورج میں نہیں ہوئی اثبات کلمات پیدا کر سکتے ہیں. ہم نے ایک چین ی-تجارت مواد کے سامنے ڈیٹ سٹ بنایا ہے، اور اس ڈیٹ سٹ کے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدلے یقینی کو اثر سے زیادہ بہتر کر دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu ishda, biz e-commerce produktining qismlarini yaratish modelini hosil qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Davom etish uchun birinchi marta, birinchi marta, kichkinagi avlod jarayonini koʻrsatish uchun tuzuvchi hisob jadvalini kodlash mumkin. Ikkinchi so'zning xossalarini aniqlash va bu soʻzlarni qidirish kerak. Shunday tugmalar manbasiga nusxa olish mumkin. Biz Xitoycha elektr produkt tahrirlash maʼlumotini yaratdik, va bu maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi tajriba natijalari bu modellarimizning ishni juda muhimiy yaxshi ko'radi.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đưa ra một mô hình để tạo các bản tóm tắt sản phẩm email. Sự tương đồng giữa tổng kết đã tạo ra và thuộc tính sản phẩm là một tiêu đề quan trọng cho nhiệm vụ tổng kết sản phẩm điện tử. Để tăng cường độ đồng nhất, trước tiên, chúng tôi mã hóa bảng hiệu chất lượng hàng hóa để hướng dẫn tiến trình sản xuất tổng hợp. Thứ hai, chúng ta xác định các từ thuộc tính từ từ từ vựng, và chúng ta khống chế các từ thuộc này chỉ có thể được hiển thị trong các bản tóm tắt bằng cách chép từ nguồn, tức là các từ không thể tạo ra. Chúng tôi xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu tổng hợp sản phẩm thương mại qua Trung Quốc, và kết quả thử nghiệm trên tập tin này chứng minh rằng các mẫu của chúng tôi cải thiện đáng tin.', 'bg': 'В тази работа представяме модел за генериране на обобщения на продукти за електронна търговия. Съответствието между генерираното резюме и атрибутите на продукта е основен критерий за задачата за обобщаване на продуктите в електронната търговия. За да подобрим последователността, първо кодираме таблицата с атрибутите на продукта, за да ръководим процеса на генериране на обобщение. Второ, идентифицираме атрибутните думи от речника и ограничаваме тези атрибутни думи, които могат да бъдат представени в резюметата само чрез копиране от източника, т.е. атрибутните думи, които не са в източника, не могат да бъдат генерирани. Ние конструираме китайски набор от данни за обобщаване на продукти за електронна търговия, а експерименталните резултати на този набор от данни показват, че нашите модели значително подобряват вярността.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo model kako bi stvorili sažetke proizvoda e-trgovine. Dodržnost između proizvedenog sažetka i atributa proizvoda je ključni kriterij za sažetak ekomerske proizvode. Za poboljšanje konsekvencije, prvo, kodiramo tablu atributa proizvoda kako bi vodili proces generacije sažetaka. Drugo, identificiramo riječi atributa iz rečnika, i ograničavamo te atributnih riječi mogu se predstaviti u sažetkama samo kroz kopiranje iz izvora, tj. riječi atributa koje nisu iz izvora, ne mogu se proizvesti. Napravili smo sažetak podataka o kineskoj e-trgovini, i eksperimentalni rezultati na ovom setu podataka pokazuju da naši modeli značajno poboljšavaju vjernost.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en model til generering af e-handelsproduktresuméer. Konsistensen mellem det genererede resumé og produktattributterne er et væsentligt kriterium for opgaven med produktresumé i e-handel. For at forbedre konsistensen koder vi først produktattributtabellen for at styre processen med generering af resuméer. For det andet identificerer vi attributordene fra ordforrådet, og vi begrænser disse attributord kan kun præsenteres i resuméerne ved kopiering fra kilden, dvs. attributordene ikke i kilden kan ikke genereres. Vi konstruerer et kinesisk e-handelsproduktresumédatasæt, og de eksperimentelle resultater på dette datasæt viser, at vores modeller forbedrer trofastheden betydeligt.', 'nl': 'In dit werk presenteren we een model om e-commerce productsamenvattingen te genereren. De consistentie tussen de gegenereerde samenvatting en de productkenmerken is een essentieel criterium voor de samenvattingstaak van e-commerceproducten. Om de consistentie te verbeteren, coderen we eerst de productattributentabel om het proces van het genereren van samenvattingen te begeleiden. Ten tweede identificeren we de attribuutwoorden uit de woordenschat, en we beperken dat deze attribuutwoorden alleen kunnen worden gepresenteerd in de samenvattingen door kopiëren van de bron, d.w.z. de attribuutwoorden die niet in de bron zitten, kunnen niet worden gegenereerd. We bouwen een Chinese e-commerce product samenvatting dataset, en de experimentele resultaten op deze dataset tonen aan dat onze modellen de betrouwbaarheid aanzienlijk verbeteren.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit stellen wir ein Modell vor, um E-Commerce Produktzusammenfassungen zu generieren. Die Konsistenz zwischen der generierten Zusammenfassung und den Produktattributen ist ein wesentliches Kriterium für die E-Commerce-Produktzusammenfassungsaufgabe. Um die Konsistenz zu verbessern, kodieren wir zunächst die Produktattributtabelle, um den Prozess der Summary-Generierung zu leiten. Zweitens identifizieren wir die Attributwörter aus dem Vokabular, und wir beschränken, dass diese Attributwörter in den Zusammenfassungen nur durch Kopieren aus der Quelle dargestellt werden können, d.h. die Attributwörter, die nicht in der Quelle enthalten sind, können nicht generiert werden. Wir konstruieren einen chinesischen E-Commerce-Produktzusammenfassungsdatensatz, und die experimentellen Ergebnisse auf diesem Datensatz zeigen, dass unsere Modelle die Treue signifikant verbessern.', 'id': 'In this work, we present a model to generate e-commerce product summaries.  Konsistensi antara ringkasan yang dihasilkan dan atribut produk adalah kriteria penting untuk tugas ringkasan produk ekokomersial. Untuk meningkatkan konsistensi, pertama, kita mengkode tabel atribut produk untuk memimpin proses generasi ringkasan. Kedua, kita mengidentifikasi kata atribut dari vokabular, dan kita membatasi kata atribut in i dapat dipaparkan dalam ringkasan hanya melalui salinan dari sumber, i.e., kata atribut tidak di sumber tidak dapat dihasilkan. Kami membangun sebuah set data ringkasan produk e-commerce Cina, dan hasil percobaan pada set data ini menunjukkan bahwa model kami meningkatkan kesetiaan secara signifikan.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما یک مدل را برای تولید جمع\u200cآوری محصولات e-commerce پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. هماهنگی بین جمع تولید شده و ویژه\u200cهای محصولات یک مقدار ضروری برای کار جمع کردن محصولات اقتصادی است. برای افزایش هماهنگی، اول، میز ویژه\u200cهای محصولات را برای هدایت فرایند نسل جمعیت کودکان می\u200cکنیم. دوم، کلمات ویژگی را از کلمات عبارت شناسایی می\u200cکنیم، و این کلمات ویژگی را محدود می\u200cکنیم، تنها با کپی کردن از منبع، یعنی کلمات ویژگی که در منبع نیستند، نمی\u200cتوانند تولید شود. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جمع کردن محصولات ایالت تجارت چینی را ساختیم، و نتیجه آزمایشی روی این مجموعه داده ها نشان می دهند که مدلهای ما به طور معنی اعتماد کردند.', 'ko': '이 업무에서 우리는 전자상거래 제품의 요약을 생성하는 모델을 제시했다.생성된 요약과 제품 속성 간의 일치성은 전자상거래 제품 요약 임무의 기본 표준이다.일치성을 높이기 위해 우리는 먼저 제품 속성표를 인코딩하여 요약 생성 과정을 지도한다.그 다음에 우리는 어휘표에서 속성어를 식별하고 이러한 속성어는 원본에서만 복제하여 요약에 나타낼 수 있도록 제한한다. 즉, 원본에 없는 속성어를 생성할 수 없다.우리는 중국 전자상거래 제품 요약 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 이 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 신뢰도를 현저히 높였다.', 'tr': 'Bu işde e-komerca üretmek üçin bir nusga görkezýäris Ýöretilen topar we produkt atributleri arasyndaky durmuşy ekomersiýa produkt toplamak zadynyň esasy kriteridir. Birnäçe, durmuşy bejermek üçin, önümizde hasaplanjak täblisini taýýarlamak üçin cödleýäris Ikinjisi, sözlerden hasaplanyň sözlerini tanyýarys we bu hasaplanyň sözlerini sumlarda diňe çe şmeden kop eden sözleri döredip bilmeýäris. Biz Çinçe e-komersiýa önümlerini sumatlandyrýarys we munyň barlag netijesi biziň modellerimiziň dogruçylygyny örän köpräk uzlaşdyrýandygyny görkez.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunaweka mfano wa kutengeneza muhtasari wa bidhaa za biashara. Msimamo kati ya kipindi kilichozaliwa na vifaa vya uzalishaji ni kiwango muhimu cha ufumbuzi wa uzalishaji wa kompyuta. Ili kuongeza umuhimu huo, kwanza, tunajumuisha meza ya uzalishaji ili kuongoza mchakato wa kizazi cha muhimu. Second, we identify the attribute words from the vocabulary, and we constrain these attribute words can be presented in the summaries only through copying from the source, i.e., the attribute words not in the source cannot be generated.  Tunajenga taarifa za muhtasari wa bidhaa za Kichina, na matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti hii ya data yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inaboresha imani.', 'af': "In hierdie werk voorsien ons 'n model om e-commerce-produkt opsommings te genereer. Die konsistensie tussen die genereerde opsomming en die produkt eienskappe is 'n nuwe kriterie vir die ekomerksie produktopsomming taak. Om die konsistensie te verbeter, eerste, ons kodeer die produkt eienskappe tabel om die proses van opsomming generasie te lei. Tweede, ons identifiseer die eienskappe woorde van die woordeboek, en ons beperk hierdie eienskappe woorde in die opsomming kan net deur kopie van die bron, i.e. die eienskappe woorde wat nie in die bron is nie genereer word nie. Ons konstrukteer 'n Sjinese e-kommerksie produkt opsomming datastel, en die eksperimentale resultate op hierdie datastel wys dat ons modele betekeurig die getrouheid verbeter.", 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një model për të gjeneruar përmbledhje të prodhimeve të tregtisë elektronike. Konsistenca midis përmbledhjes së gjeneruar dhe atributeve të prodhimit është një kriter thelbësor për detyrën e përmbledhjes së prodhimit eko-tregtar. Për të përmirësuar konsistencën, së pari, ne kodojmë tabelën e atributeve të prodhimit për të udhëzuar procesin e gjenerimit të përmbledhur. Së dyti, ne identifikojmë fjalët e atributit nga fjalorin, dhe i kufizojmë këto fjalë të atributit mund të paraqiten në përmbledhje vetëm duke kopjuar nga burimi, pra fjalët e atributit që nuk janë në burim nuk mund të gjenerohen. Ne ndërtojmë një grup të dhënash të përmbledhjes së prodhimeve kineze të tregtisë elektronike dhe rezultatet eksperimentale në këtë grup të dhënash tregojnë se modelet tona përmirësojnë ndjeshëm besnikërinë.', 'hy': 'In this work, we present a model to generate e-commerce product summaries.  Գործված համառոտագրության և արտադրյալ առանձնահատկությունների միջև կատարելիությունը էկոմրցիայի արտադրյալ համառոտագրման խնդիր է: Առաջինը, որպեսզի բարելավենք համապատասխանությունը, մենք կոդավորում ենք արտադրության առանձնահատկությունների աղյուսակը, որպեսզի կատարենք համառոտագրական սերունդների գործընթացը: Երկրորդ, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք բառերը բառերից, և սահմանափակում ենք բառերը, որոնք կարող են ներկայացվել համառոտագրություններում միայն կոպիայից, այսինքն, բառերը, որոնք չեն աղբյուրից, չեն կարող ստեղծվել: Մենք կառուցում ենք չինական էլեկտրոնային առևտրի ապրանքների համառոտագրման տվյալներ, և այս տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելները նշանակալի բարելավում են հավատը:', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ የኢሜይል የንግድ ጉዳዩ አቋራጭ ለመፍጠር ሞዴል እናቀርባለን፡፡ The consistency between the generated summary and the product attributes is an essential criterion for the ecommerce product summarization task.  መጀመሪያ የጥያቄውን ትውልድ ተግባር ለመመራት የሀብት ማድረጊያውን እናቆጥረዋለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የአካላት ቃላትን እናሳውቃለን፣ ይህችንም አካባቢ ቃላት ከክፍለ መልዕክት በመቀበል ብቻ እንዲገልጽ እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የቻይና የነጋዴ ፍሬት ማሳነቂያ ዳታዎችን እናደርጋለን፤ የዚህም ዳታሰር ፍሬቶች ምሳሌዎቻችን እውነተኛነትን በኩል ያሳድራሉ፡፡', 'ca': "En aquesta feina, presentem un model per generar resumes de productes del comerç electrònic. La consistencia entre el resum generat i els atributs del producte és un criteri essencial per a la tasca de resum del producte ecològic. To enhance the consistency, first, we encode the product attribute table to guide the process of summary generation.  Segon, identificem les paraules d'atributs del vocabulari, i restringim aquestes paraules d'atributs només es poden presentar als resums a través de la còpia a partir de la font, és a dir, les paraules d'atributs no a la font no poden ser generades. Construim un conjunt de dades de resum de productes del comerç electrònic xinès, i els resultats experimentals d'aquest conjunt demostren que els nostres models milloren significativament la fidelitat.", 'az': 'Bu işdə e-ticarət ürəklərini yaratmaq üçün modeli göstəririk. Məxluqatı və ürək xüsusiyyətlərinin arasındakı müəyyənləşdirilməsi ekometrik ürəklərinin yığışdırma işləri üçün əsas bir kriteridir. İlk dəstəkliyi artırmaq üçün, proqramın atribut tablosunu sıralama nəsillərinin prosesini doğru yola yönəltmək üçün kodlayırıq. İkincisi, sözlərin təhsil sözlərini təsdiqləyirik, bu təhsil sözlərini təsdiqləyirik, ancaq mənbədən kopyalama vasitəsilə, yox. mənbədə olmayan təhsil sözlərini təsdiqləyirik. Biz Çinli e-ticarət ürəklərinin yığışdırma verilən verilən qutusu inşa edirik. Bu verilən qutusundakı experimental sonuçlar modellərimizin sadiqliyini çox yaxşılaşdırdığını göstərir.', 'cs': 'V této práci představujeme model pro generování souhrnů produktů e-commerce. Konzistence mezi generovaným souhrnem a atributy produktu je základním kritériem pro úlohu souhrnu produktu elektronického obchodu. Pro zvýšení konzistence nejprve kódujeme tabulku atributů produktu, která vede proces generování souhrnu. Za druhé identifikujeme atributová slova ze slovní zásoby a omezujeme, že tato atributová slova mohou být prezentována v souhrnech pouze kopírováním ze zdroje, tj. atributová slova, která nejsou ve zdroji, nelze generovat. Vytváříme souhrnnou datovou sadu čínských produktů e-commerce a experimentální výsledky na této sadě ukazují, že naše modely výrazně zlepšují věrnost.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা একটা মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি ই-বাণিজ্যিক পণ্যের সামার্গার তৈরি করার জন্য। উৎপাদনের সারসংক্ষেপ এবং পণ্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে সংশ্লিষ্ট সংক্ষেপের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মূল্য। সামার্ক প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়া পরিচালিত করার জন্য প্রথমে আমরা প্রজেক্টের বৈশিষ্ট্য টেবিলের সংক্ষেপের জন দ্বিতীয়, আমরা শব্দভাণ্ডার থেকে বৈশিষ্ট্য শব্দ চিহ্নিত করি এবং আমরা এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের কথাগুলোকে সার্গারে উপস্থাপন করতে পারি কেবল উৎস থেকে অনুলিপি করে  আমরা চীনা ই-বাণিজ্য পণ্যের সার্মিজেশন ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি এবং এই ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিশ্বা', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo model kako bi stvorili sažetke proizvoda e-komercije. Konformitet između proizvedenog sažetka i atributa proizvoda je ključni kriterij za sažetak ekomerske proizvode. Da bi poboljšali konsekvenciju, prvo, kodirali smo stol atributa proizvoda kako bi vodili proces generacije sažetaka. Drugo, identificiramo atributne riječi iz rečnika, i ograničavamo ove atributne riječi mogu se predstaviti u sažetkama samo kroz kopiranje iz izvora, tj. atributnih riječi koje nisu u izvoru, ne mogu se stvoriti. Izgradimo sažetak podataka o kineskoj e-komerciji, i eksperimentalni rezultati na ovom setu podataka pokazuju da naši modeli značajno poboljšavaju vjernost.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame mudeli e-kaubanduse toodete kokkuvõtete koostamiseks. Koostatud kokkuvõtte ja tooteatribuutide kooskõla on e-kaubanduse toodete kokkuvõtte ülesande oluline kriteerium. Järjepidevuse suurendamiseks kodeerime esmalt toote atribuutide tabeli, et juhtida kokkuvõtte genereerimise protsessi. Teiseks tuvastame sõnavara atribuudisõnad ja piirame nende atribuudisõnade esitamist kokkuvõtetes ainult allikast kopeerimise teel, st atribuudisõnu, mis ei ole allikas, ei saa genereerida. Me ehitame Hiina e-kaubanduse toodete kokkuvõtliku andmekogumi ning selle andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudelid parandavad oluliselt ustavust.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään malli sähköisen kaupankäynnin tuoteyhteenvetojen tuottamiseksi. Luodun tiivistelmän ja tuoteattribuuttien välinen johdonmukaisuus on olennainen kriteeri verkkokaupan tuoteyhteenvetotehtävässä. Johdonmukaisuuden parantamiseksi koodaamme ensin tuotteen attribuuttitaulukon ohjaamaan yhteenvetoprosessia. Toiseksi tunnistamme attribuutin sanat sanastosta ja rajoitamme näiden attribuutin sanojen esittämistä yhteenvedoissa vain kopioimalla lähteestä, ts. attribuutin sanoja, jotka eivät ole lähteessä, ei voida luoda. Rakennamme kiinalaisen verkkokaupan tuoteyhteenvetoaineiston, jonka kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat malliemme parantavan merkittävästi luotettavuutta.', 'sk': 'V tem delu predstavljamo model za ustvarjanje povzetkov izdelkov e-trgovine. Skladnost med ustvarjenim povzetkom in atributi izdelka je bistveno merilo za opravilo povzetka izdelkov v elektronski trgovini. Da bi izboljšali doslednost, najprej kodiramo tabelo atributov izdelka, ki vodi proces ustvarjanja povzetkov. Drugič, identificiramo atributne besede iz besedišča in omejimo te atributne besede, ki jih je mogoče predstaviti v povzetkih le s kopiranjem iz vira, tj. atributnih besed, ki niso v viru, ni mogoče ustvariti. Izdelujemo kitajski nabor podatkov o povzetku izdelkov za e-trgovino in eksperimentalni rezultati na tem naboru podatkov kažejo, da naši modeli bistveno izboljšujejo zvestobo.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita sampeyan model kanggo ngelaran resmi dadi e-komersi Samsul njaluk Sampeyan, kita diwuksi pergambar attributan nang kelas, lan kita diwuksi pergambar kelas Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset nyeangké alat-nyeangké sing nyeangké paran karo ingkang éntuk dadi iki bakal maneh da bisa modelan awak dhéwé ngomong bantuan kanggo ngerasakno sing nggawe barang nggawe.', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་དང་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དེ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བརྟན་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་པོ་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས གཉིས་པུ། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཐོག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚིག་དག་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་ངེད་ཚོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་ཚོ་རྣམས་འབྲེལ་ཐོག་ལས་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་e-commerce་ནང་གི་མཛུབ་སྡུད་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'ha': "Ga wannan aikin, Munã samun wani misali da za'a iya samun 'ya'anta na-fatauci. The consistency between the generated summary and the product attributes is an essential criterion for the ecommerce product summarization task.  To, za mu ƙãra matsayi, a farkon, za'a kode zanen matsayi da za'a shiryar da aikin kizalin da ke ƙara. Second, we identify the attribute words from the vocabulary, and we constrain these attribute words can be presented in the summaries only through copying from the source, i.e., the attribute words not in the source cannot be generated.  Tuna samar da danne masu ƙararin umarni na-fatauci na China, kuma matsalan jarrabawa na wannan dataset ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana ƙara gaskiyar gaskiyar.", 'he': 'In this work, we present a model to generate e-commerce product summaries.  The consistency between the generated summary and the product attributes is an essential criterion for the ecommerce product summarization task.  כדי לשפר את התקבילות, ראשית, אנחנו קודמים את שולחן תכונות המוצר כדי להדריך את תהליך הדור של סכם. שנית, אנו מזהה את מילים התכונות מהמילון, ואנחנו מכריחים את מילים התכונות האלה ניתן להציג בסרטונים רק באמצעות העתק מהמקור, כלומר, מילים התכונות לא במקור לא ניתן ליצור. אנו בונים קבוצת נתונים של מסחר אלקטרוני סיני, והתוצאות הניסוייות על קבוצת נתונים זו מראות שהדוגמנים שלנו משתפרים באופן משמעותי את האמינות.'}
{'en': 'Variation in Coreference Strategies across Genres and Production Media', 'ar': 'الاختلاف في استراتيجيات Coreference عبر الأنواع ووسائط الإنتاج', 'es': 'Variación en las estrategias de correferencia entre géneros y medios de producción', 'pt': 'Variação nas estratégias de correferência entre gêneros e mídias de produção', 'fr': 'Variation des stratégies de coréférence selon les genres et les supports de production', 'ja': 'ジャンルと生産メディアにわたるコアレファレンス戦略のバリエーション', 'zh': '跨流与作媒体协理之异', 'hi': 'शैलियों और उत्पादन मीडिया में Coreference रणनीतियों में भिन्नता', 'ru': 'Различия в базовых стратегиях для различных жанров и производственных средств массовой информации', 'ga': 'Athrú ar Straitéisí Croílárnacha trasna Seánraí agus Meáin Léiriúcháin', 'ka': 'სტრატიგიების შესახებ სექსტურაციის გარეშე', 'kk': 'Жалпы және производылық медиақтардың қасиеттер стратегиясының айнымалысы', 'lt': 'Lyčių ir gamybos žiniasklaidos bendrųjų konferencijų strategijų pokyčiai', 'it': 'Variazione nelle strategie di coreferenza tra generi e media di produzione', 'ms': 'Variasi dalam Strategi Keutamaan melalui Genres dan Media Produksi', 'hu': 'Koreferencia stratégiák változása műfajok és termelési média között', 'ml': 'ജെന്ററുകളിലും പ്രൊട്ടിക്ഷന്\u200d മീഡിയയിലും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് സ്ട്രേറ്റേജിയിലെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Varjazzjoni fl-Istrateġiji ta’ Koreferenza bejn is-Sessi u l-Midja tal-Produzzjoni', 'el': 'Μεταβολή στις στρατηγικές συνεργασίας μεταξύ των ειδών και των μέσων παραγωγής', 'mn': 'Шинэ болон үйлдвэрлэлийн мэдээллийн дамжуулагч стратегийн өөрчлөлт', 'ro': 'Variaţia strategiilor de corefenţă între genuri şi medii de producţie', 'sr': 'Varijacija u strategiji korisnosti širom svih genija i medija proizvodnje', 'si': 'ජීන්ස් සහ නිර්මාණ මිඩියාවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය', 'so': 'Variation in Coreference Strategies across Genre and Production Media', 'mk': 'Variation in Coreference Strategies across Genres and Production Media', 'ta': 'மரபணுக்கள் மற்றும் தயாரிப்பு ஊடகங்கள் முழுவதும் மாறுதல்', 'ur': 'جنس اور پیدائش میڈیا کے درمیان مختلف استراتژی میں تغییر', 'pl': 'Zmiany strategii współpracy między gatunkami i mediami produkcyjnymi', 'no': 'Variasjon i koreferansen- strategiar gjennom sjønner og produksjonsmediar', 'sv': 'Variation i Coreferencestrategier mellan genrer och produktionsmedier', 'uz': 'Variation in Coreference Strategies across Genres and Production Media', 'vi': 'Biến đổi trong Các chiến lược quốc phòng qua Generes and Production Media', 'bg': 'Промяна в стратегиите за кореференция между жанровете и производствените медии', 'hr': 'Razlika u strategiji korisnosti širom svih genija i medija proizvodnje', 'id': 'Variasi dalam Strategi Koreference melalui Genres dan Production Media', 'da': 'Variation i Coreference Strategier på tværs af genrer og produktionsmedier', 'nl': 'Variatie in coreference strategieën tussen genres en productiemedia', 'fa': 'تغییرات در استراتژی\u200cهای ارتباطی در سراسر جنس و رسانه\u200cهای تولید', 'de': 'Variation der Coreference-Strategien über Genres und Produktionsmedien hinweg', 'af': 'Verandering in Koreferensie Strategies oor Genre en Produksie Media', 'tr': 'Çeneler we üretim Maglumaty arasynda Kareferensiýa Strateýasy', 'sq': 'Variacioni në Strategjitë e Koreferencës nëpërmjet Gjenerave dhe Mediave të Prodhimit', 'hy': 'Կորեֆերանսի ռազմավարությունների տարբերությունը գենդերում և արտադրման մեդիայում', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko katika mikakati ya Mabadiliko katika Vyombo vya Habari vya Uzazi', 'ko': '서로 다른 장르와 제작 매체의 공통된 전략적 차이', 'am': 'በኮሬፍሬንስ እና ፕሮጀክት ሚዲያ ውስጥ የተለየ', 'bs': 'Varijacija u strategiji korisnosti širom svih genija i medija proizvodnje', 'cs': 'Variace strategií koreference napříč žánry a produkčními médii', 'az': 'C…ônn…ôtl…ôr v…ô Produktiv MediyalarńĪ arasńĪndakńĪ Koreferens Stratexikl…ôrind…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik', 'ca': 'Variation in Coreference Strategies across Genres and Production Media', 'et': 'Coreference strateegiate erinevus žanrite ja tootmismeedia lõikes', 'fi': 'Coreference-strategioiden vaihtelu eri genreissä ja tuotantomedioissa', 'bn': 'জেন্স এবং প্রজন্ম মিডিয়া জুড়ে কোরেফেন্স স্ট্রেটিজির বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন', 'jv': 'Variation in coreferns', 'he': 'שינוי באסטרטגיות קומפרנס בין גנים ומדיה של יצירה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་བ་དང་སྒྲ་བརྙན་ནང་དུ་མཐོ་རྩིས་མཐུན་གྱི་འཇུག་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ', 'sk': 'Spremembe strategij Coreference po žanrih in produkcijskih medijih'}
{'en': 'In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations. Using a set of measures that previously have been applied individually to different data sets, we find fairly clear patterns of behavior for the different genres / media. Besides their role for psycholinguistic investigation (why do we employ different coreference strategies when we write or speak) and for the placement of Twitter in the spokenwritten continuum, we see our results as a contribution to approaching genre-/media-specific coreference resolution.', 'ar': 'استجابةً لـ (1) النتائج غير الحاسمة في الأدبيات المتعلقة بخصائص سلاسل المرجع في اللغة المكتوبة مقابل اللغة المنطوقة ، و (2) النقص العام في العمل على حل المرجع التلقائي على كل من اللغة المنطوقة ووسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، نقوم بإجراء دراسة مرجعية تتضمن أقسام الأنواع المختلفة من Ontonotes ، ومجموعة Switchboard ، ومجموعة من محادثات Twitter. باستخدام مجموعة من المقاييس التي تم تطبيقها سابقًا بشكل فردي على مجموعات بيانات مختلفة ، وجدنا أنماطًا واضحة إلى حد ما من "السلوك" للأنواع / الوسائط المختلفة. إلى جانب دورهم في التحقيق اللغوي النفسي (لماذا نستخدم استراتيجيات مرجعية مختلفة عندما نكتب أو نتحدث) ومن أجل وضع Twitter في السلسلة المتصلة المكتوبة المنطوقة ، فإننا نرى نتائجنا كمساهمة في التعامل مع حل المرجع النوع / الوسائط المحددة .', 'pt': 'Em resposta a (i) resultados inconclusivos na literatura quanto às propriedades das cadeias de correferência na linguagem escrita versus falada e (ii) uma falta geral de trabalho na resolução automática de correferência na linguagem falada e nas mídias sociais, realizamos um estudo de corpus envolvendo as várias seções de gênero de Ontonotes, o corpus Switchboard e um corpus de conversas do Twitter. Usando um conjunto de medidas que anteriormente foram aplicadas individualmente a diferentes conjuntos de dados, encontramos padrões bastante claros de “comportamento” para os diferentes gêneros/mídia. Além de seu papel para a investigação psicolinguística (por que empregamos diferentes estratégias de correferência quando escrevemos ou falamos) e para a colocação do Twitter no continuum falado-escrito, vemos nossos resultados como uma contribuição para abordar a resolução de correferência específica de gênero/mídia .', 'fr': "En réponse à (i) des résultats peu concluants dans la littérature quant aux propriétés des chaînes de coréférence dans la langue écrite par rapport à la langue parlée, et (ii) à un manque général de travail sur la résolution automatique des coréférences à la fois sur la langue parlée et sur les réseaux sociaux, nous entreprenons une étude de corpus impliquant les différentes sections de genre de Ontonotes, le corpus Switchboard et un corpus de conversations Twitter. À l'aide d'un ensemble de mesures précédemment appliquées individuellement à différents ensembles de données, nous trouvons des modèles de «\xa0comportement\xa0» assez clairs pour les différents genres/médias. Outre leur rôle dans l'investigation psycholinguistique (pourquoi utilisons-nous différentes stratégies de coréférence lorsque nous écrivons ou parlons) et pour le placement de Twitter dans le continuum oral-écrit, nous considérons nos résultats comme une contribution à l'approche de la résolution de coréférence spécifique au genre/au média.", 'es': 'En respuesta a (i) los resultados no concluyentes en la literatura en cuanto a las propiedades de las cadenas de correferencia en el lenguaje escrito frente al hablado, y (ii) una falta general de trabajo sobre la resolución automática de correferencias tanto en el lenguaje hablado como en las redes sociales, realizamos un estudio de corpus que involucra las diversas secciones de género de Ontonotes, el corpus de Switchboard y un corpus de conversaciones en Twitter. Utilizando un conjunto de medidas que anteriormente se habían aplicado individualmente a diferentes conjuntos de datos, encontramos patrones de «comportamiento» bastante claros para los diferentes géneros y medios. Además de su papel en la investigación psicolingüística (por qué empleamos diferentes estrategias de correferencia cuando escribimos o hablamos) y para colocar Twitter en el continuo hablado y escrito, vemos nuestros resultados como una contribución para abordar la resolución de correferencias específica del género y los medios de comunicación.', 'ja': '(i)文献における、書かれた言語と口語のコアレファレンスチェーンの特性に関する結論の出ない結果、および(ii)口語とソーシャルメディアの両方での自動コアレファレンス解決に関する一般的な作業が欠如していることを受けて、私たちは、オントノート、スイッチボードコーパス、およびTwitter会話のコーパスのさまざまなジャンルのセクションを含むコーパス研究を行います。さまざまなデータセットに個別に適用されてきた一連の尺度を使用して、さまざまなジャンル/メディアの「行動」の明確なパターンを見つけます。心理言語学的調査（なぜ私たちが書いたり話したりするときに異なるコアレファレンス戦略を採用するのか）や、口頭で書かれた連続体へのTwitterの配置のための役割に加えて、私たちはその結果をジャンル/メディア固有のコアレファレンス解決への貢献と見なしています。', 'zh': '为回应(i)文献书面语与口语中核心引性者不定,及(ii)于口语及社交媒体上遍乏自核引解析之事,臣等行一语料库研究,以及Ontonotes,Switchboard语料库Twitter语料库诸流派。 用前独用异数集之度,见异类/媒体行相若也。 非其心语言学察之用(何为异同共指策)及置Twitter于口 - 书面连续体中,视为近流/媒体特定共指解决方案之效。', 'hi': '(i) लिखित बनाम बोली जाने वाली भाषा में सह-सम्मेलन श्रृंखलाओं के गुणों के रूप में साहित्य में अनिर्णायक परिणामों के जवाब में, और (ii) बोली जाने वाली भाषा और सोशल मीडिया दोनों पर स्वचालित सह-सम्मेलन संकल्प पर काम की सामान्य कमी, हम एक कॉर्पस अध्ययन करते हैं जिसमें ऑनटनोट्स, स्विचबोर्ड कॉर्पस और ट्विटर वार्तालापों के एक कॉर्पस के विभिन्न शैली वर्गों को शामिल किया जाता है। उपायों के एक सेट का उपयोग करना जो पहले अलग-अलग डेटा सेटों पर व्यक्तिगत रूप से लागू किए गए हैं, हमें विभिन्न शैलियों / मीडिया के लिए "व्यवहार" के काफी स्पष्ट पैटर्न मिलते हैं। मनोवैज्ञानिक जांच के लिए उनकी भूमिका के अलावा (जब हम लिखते हैं या बोलते हैं तो हम अलग-अलग कोरेफेरेंस रणनीतियों को क्यों नियोजित करते हैं) और बोली जाने वाली-लिखित निरंतरता में ट्विटर के प्लेसमेंट के लिए, हम अपने परिणामों को शैली-/ मीडिया-विशिष्ट सह-सम्मेलन संकल्प के करीब आने में योगदान के रूप में देखते हैं।', 'ru': 'В ответ на (i) неубедительные результаты в литературе в отношении свойств кореференциальных цепочек в письменном и устном языке и (ii) общее отсутствие работы по автоматическому разрешению кореференции как на разговорном языке, так и в социальных сетях, мы проводим исследование корпуса, включающее различные жанровые разделы Онтонот, корпус коммутатора и корпус разговоров в Twitter. Используя набор мер, которые ранее применялись индивидуально к различным наборам данных, мы находим достаточно четкие закономерности «поведения» для различных жанров/средств массовой информации. Помимо их роли в психолингвистических исследованиях (почему мы используем различные стратегии ориентации на ядро, когда мы пишем или говорим) и для размещения Twitter в устном континууме, мы рассматриваем наши результаты как вклад в приближение к разрешению ориентации на ядро, специфичному для жанра/среды.', 'ga': 'Mar fhreagra ar (i) torthaí neamhchonclúideacha sa litríocht maidir le hairíonna na slabhraí croí-chomhdhála sa teanga scríofa in aghaidh na teanga labhartha, agus (ii) easpa ginearálta oibre ar réiteach uathoibríoch croíchomhdhála ar an teanga labhartha agus ar na meáin shóisialta araon, déanaimid staidéar corpais. ina raibh na rannóga seánraí éagsúla de Ontonotes, corpas an lasc-chláir, agus corpas de chomhráite Twitter. Trí úsáid a bhaint as sraith beart a cuireadh i bhfeidhm go haonarach roimhe seo ar thacair sonraí éagsúla, aimsímid patrúin “iompraíochta” atá measartha soiléir do na seánraí/meáin éagsúla. Seachas a ról maidir le himscrúdú síctheangeolaíoch (cén fáth a mbainimid úsáid as straitéisí croílárnacha éagsúla agus muid ag scríobh nó ag labhairt) agus chun Twitter a shocrú sa chontanam labhartha-scríofa, feicimid ár dtorthaí mar rannchuidiú le dul i ngleic le réiteach croíchomhdhála a bhaineann go sonrach le seánra/meán. .', 'hu': 'Válaszul (i) az irodalomban szereplő nem meggyőző eredményekre az írásbeli és beszélt nyelvben a coreferencia láncok tulajdonságaira vonatkozóan, valamint (ii) az automatikus coreferencia feloldására irányuló munka általános hiányára mind a beszélt nyelven, mind a közösségi médián, korpusz tanulmányt végzünk az Ontonotes különböző műfaji szakaszaival, a Switchboard korpuszával és a Twitter beszélgetések korpuszával. A különböző adatkészletekre korábban egyénileg alkalmazott intézkedések segítségével meglehetősen egyértelmű viselkedési mintákat találunk a különböző műfajok/médiumok esetében. A pszicholingvistikus kutatásban betöltött szerepük mellett (miért alkalmazunk különböző coreferencia stratégiákat íráskor vagy beszélgetéskor), illetve a Twitter elhelyezésében a beszélt folytonosságban, eredményeinket a műfaj-/média-specifikus coreferencia megoldáshoz való hozzájárulásnak tekintjük.', 'it': "In risposta a (i) risultati inconcludenti in letteratura sulle proprietà delle catene di coreferenza nella lingua scritta contro parlata, e (ii) una generale mancanza di lavoro sulla risoluzione automatica della coreferenza sia sulla lingua parlata che sui social media, intraprendiamo uno studio di corpus che coinvolge le varie sezioni di genere di Ontonotes, il corpus Switchboard e un corpus di conversazioni su Twitter. Utilizzando una serie di misure che in precedenza sono state applicate individualmente a diversi set di dati, troviamo modelli abbastanza chiari di 'comportamento' per i diversi generi / media. Oltre al loro ruolo per l'indagine psicolinguistica (perché utilizziamo diverse strategie di coreferenza quando scriviamo o parliamo) e per il posizionamento di Twitter nel continuum parlato-scritto, vediamo i nostri risultati come un contributo all'approccio alla risoluzione di coreferenza specifica per genere/media.", 'ka': "(i) კონკლისური წარმოდგენების შესახებ ლეტებერიის შესახებ, რომელიც კონფერენციის წარმოდგენების შესახებ წარმოდგენების შესახებ, და (ii) საერთო წარმოდგენების სამუშაო არსებელობა სამუშაო წარმოდგენების განსხვავებაში და სოციალური მედიაზე, ჩვენ კონფუსს გამოყენება წინ განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენ განსხვავებული გენერები/მედიაში 'ქც მათი პროლია ფსიკოლენგურისტიკური პასუხისთვის (რატომ ვიყენებთ განსხვავებული კოლეფერენციის სტრატიგიები, როდესაც ჩვენ წერით ან ვიყენებთ) და Twitter-ის დაყენებას საკუთარ წერილი მუშაობაში, ჩვენ ვხედავთ ჩვენი წარმოდგენ", 'lt': 'In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  Naudojant priemonių rinkinį, kuris anksčiau buvo taikomas atskirai skirtingiems duomenų rinkiniams, mes randame gana aiškius įvairių genrų ir (arba) žiniasklaidos elgesio modelius. Besides their role for psycholinguistic investigation (why do we employ different coreference strategies when we write or speak) and for the placement of Twitter in the spoken-written continuum, we see our results as a contribution to approaching genre-/media-specific coreference resolution.', 'kk': "(i) әдебиеттің қасиеттері жазылған тілде жазылған әдебиеттің қасиеттері және (ii) сөйлейтін тілде және социаллық медиақтардың автоматты түрде жұмыс қасиеттері жұмыс істемейді, біз онтоттардың, Швейцариялық корпус және Твиттердің айтылуларының корпус зерттеулерін жасаймыз. Бірінші деректер жиына әрқашанда әрқашанда әрқашанда әрқашанда қолданылған мерзімдер жиынын қолдану үшін, біз басқа жанрлар/медиақтар үшін 'әрекеттер' үлгілерін тазаламы Психолингвистикалық зерттеу үшін олардың рөлін басқа (жазу не сөйлеп жатқанда біз немесе Твиттерді жазып жатқанда әртүрлі бағдарламалық стратегияларды жұмыс істейміз) және сөйлейтін жазылған жұмыс істеу үшін, нәтижелерімізді генр-/", 'ml': '(i) എഴുതിയ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് ചങ്ങലകളുടെ സ്വഭാവത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രാധാന്യത്തിന് ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിനും, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയിലും സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയിലും സ്വയമായ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ സ്വഭാവത്തിന്\u200dറെയും പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും, സ് മുമ്പ് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്ത ജീനികള്\u200d/മീഡി Besides their role for psycholinguistic investigation (why do we employ different coreference strategies when we write or speak) and for the placement of Twitter in the spoken-written continuum, we see our results as a contribution to approaching genre-/media-specific coreference resolution.', 'ms': "In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  Dengan menggunakan set tindakan yang sebelumnya telah dilaksanakan secara individu pada set data yang berbeza, kami mendapati corak 'perilaku' yang cukup jelas untuk jenis/media yang berbeza. Selain peran mereka untuk penyelidikan psikologis (mengapa kita menggunakan strategi persamaan yang berbeza apabila kita menulis atau bercakap) dan untuk menempatkan Twitter dalam kontinum yang ditulis-bercakap, kita melihat hasil kita sebagai kontribusi untuk mendekati resolusi persamaan yang spesifik jenis/media.", 'mt': 'Bi tweġiba għal (i) riżultati inkonklużivi fil-letteratura dwar il-karatteristiċi tal-katini ta’ koreferenza fil-lingwa miktuba kontra miktuba, u (ii) nuqqas ġenerali ta’ ħidma fuq riżoluzzjoni awtomatika ta’ koreferenza kemm fil-lingwa mitkellma kif ukoll fil-midja soċjali, a ħna nieħdu studju corpus li jinvolvi d-diversi sezzjonijiet ta’ ġeneru ta’ Ontonotes, il-korpus Switchboard, u korpus ta’ konverżjonijiet fuq Twitter. Bl-użu ta’ sett ta’ miżuri li qabel kienu applikati individwalment għal settijiet differenti ta’ dejta, isibu mudelli pjuttost ċari ta’ ‘imġiba’ għall-ġeneri/midja differenti. Besides their role for psycholinguistic investigation (why do we employ different coreference strategies when we write or speak) and for the placement of Twitter in the spoken-written continuum, we see our results as a contribution to approaching genre-/media-specific coreference resolution.', 'mn': "(i) уран зохиолын үр дүнд бичигдсэн хэл эсвэл илтгэл хэлний харьцангуй харьцангуй байдал болон (ii) ярианы хэл болон нийгмийн мэдээллийн тухай автоматически зэрэгцээний шийдвэрлэлд байхгүй үйл ажиллагаа хийж, Ontonotes, Швейцарийн корпус болон Твиттерийн ярианы корпус болох корпус судалгаа хийсэн. Өмнө нь өөр өгөгдлийн хэлбэрт хэрэглэгдсэн хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглан бид өөр төрлийн жанр/медиа дээр 'үйл ажиллагааны' хэлбэрүүдийг маш тодорхой олж байна. Тэдний психолингийн судалгааны үүрэг (яагаад бичвэл, ярьж байхад бид өөр өөр хүндрэл стратегийг ашиглаж байгаа юм бэ) болон Twitter-г бичсэн үргэлжлүүлэлт дээр орлуулахын тулд бид үр дүнг жанр/медиа-тодорхой хүндрэл шийдвэрлэхэд тусалдаг.", 'no': 'I svar på i) inklusiv resultat i litteratur om eigenskapane av koreferanse kjeder i skriven mot talet språk, og ii) ein generell mangling av arbeid på automatisk koreferanse oppløysing på både talet språk og sosiale media, har vi eit korpusstudie med dei ulike generelle delene av Ontonotes, Sveitsbordkorpus og ein korpus av Twitter-samtaler. Bruk eit sett mål som tidlegare er brukt individuelt på ulike datasett, finn vi ganske tømme mønsterelement for «oppførsel» for dei ulike generane/media. I tillegg til deres rolle for psykologisk forsøk (hvorfor bruker vi forskjellige strategier for koreferanse når vi skriv eller snakker) og for plassering av Twitter i den spretta kontinueret, ser vi resultatene våre som bidrag til å nærme oppløysing av koreferanse for gener-/media-spesifikke.', 'pl': 'W odpowiedzi na (i) niejednoznaczne wyniki w literaturze dotyczące właściwości łańcuchów koreferencji w języku pisanym i mówionym oraz (ii) ogólny brak pracy nad automatycznym rozwiązywaniem koreferencji zarówno w języku mówionym, jak i w mediach społecznościowych, podejmujemy badanie korpusowe obejmujące różne sekcje gatunkowe Ontonotes, korpus Switchboard oraz korpus rozmów na Twitterze. Korzystając z zestawu miarów, które wcześniej były stosowane indywidualnie do różnych zbiorów danych, znajdujemy dość jasne wzorce "zachowania" dla różnych gatunków/mediów. Oprócz ich roli w badaniach psycholingwistycznych (dlaczego stosujemy różne strategie koreferencji podczas pisania lub mówienia) oraz w umieszczaniu Twittera w kontinuum mówiono-mówiono, nasze wyniki postrzegamy jako wkład w podejście do rozwiązywania koreferencji specyficznych dla gatunku/mediów.', 'ro': 'Ca răspuns la (i) rezultate neconcludente în literatură cu privire la proprietățile lanțurilor de corefență în limba scrisă versus vorbită și (ii) o lipsă generală de muncă privind rezolvarea automată a corefenței atât pe limba vorbită, cât și pe rețelele sociale, efectuăm un studiu de corpuri care implică diferitele secțiuni de gen ale Ontonotes, corpul Switchboard și un corpus de conversații Twitter. Folosind un set de măsuri care anterior au fost aplicate individual diferitelor seturi de date, găsim modele destul de clare de "comportament" pentru diferitele genuri / media. Pe lângă rolul lor în investigarea psiholingvistică (de ce folosim diferite strategii de corefență atunci când scriem sau vorbim) și pentru plasarea Twitter în continuumul vorbit-scris, vedem rezultatele noastre ca o contribuție la abordarea corefenței specifice genului/media.', 'sr': 'U odgovoru na i) neslužbene rezultate u literaturi o vlasništvu lanca dobrodošlosti napisanog protiv govornog jezika, i ii) općem nedostatku rada na rešenju automatske dobrodošlosti i govornih jezika i društvenih medija, poduzimamo korpus studiju koja uključuje različite genre sekcije Ontonota, Švicarskog korpusa i korpus razgovora o Twitter. Koristeći niz mjera koje su prethodno primjenjene individualno na različite sete podataka, nalazimo prilično jasne obrasce "ponašanja" za različite genre/medije. Osim njihove uloge za psihologističku istragu (zašto koristimo različite strategije za pristojnost kada pišemo ili govorimo) i za stavljanje Twitter u pisani kontinuum, mi smatramo našim rezultatima kao doprinos pristupanju rezoluciji za pristupanje određenoj pristojnosti genera/medija.', 'so': 'In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  Sida aan isticmaalno qaablo badan oo horay loo isticmaalay si gaar ah loo isticmaalo sawirada kala duduwan, waxaynu helnaa noocyo cadcad oo ka mid ah dabeecada kala duduwan. Shaqo ka sokow baaritaanka cilmiga maskaxda (maxaan u shaqaynaynaa qorshaha heeganka oo kala duduwan markaan qorno ama aan hadlo) iyo meesha uu Twitterka ku dhigo qoraalka qoran, waxaan ka aragnaa resultigayada oo faa’iido ah inay u soo dhowaadaan go’aanka gaarka ah ee jinsiga-media.', 'sv': 'Som svar på (i) oklara resultat i litteraturen om egenskaperna hos coreferencekedjor i skriftligt kontra talat språk, och (ii) en allmän brist på arbete med automatisk coreferencelösning på både talat språk och sociala medier, genomför vi en korpustudie som omfattar de olika genresektionerna i Ontonotes, Switchboard-korpusen och en korpus av Twitter-konversationer. Med hjälp av en uppsättning mått som tidigare tillämpats individuellt på olika datauppsättningar finner vi ganska tydliga beteendemönster för de olika genrerna/medierna. Förutom deras roll för psykolingvistisk undersökning (varför använder vi olika corefeferensstrategier när vi skriver eller talar) och för placeringen av Twitter i det muntliga kontinuumet ser vi våra resultat som ett bidrag till att närma oss genre-/mediespecifik corefeferenslösning.', 'el': 'Σε απάντηση (i) σε ασαφή αποτελέσματα στη λογοτεχνία ως προς τις ιδιότητες των αλυσίδων συναρμολόγησης στη γραπτή και προφορική γλώσσα, και (ii) σε γενική έλλειψη εργασίας για την αυτόματη επίλυση συναρμολόγησης τόσο στην προφορική γλώσσα όσο και στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, αναλαμβάνουμε μια μελέτη σωμάτων που περιλαμβάνει τα διάφορα τμήματα ειδών των Οντόνωτες, το σώμα του πίνακα μεταγωγής και ένα σώμα συνομιλιών στο Twitter. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνολο μέτρων που προηγουμένως έχουν εφαρμοστεί ξεχωριστά σε διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων, βρίσκουμε αρκετά σαφή μοτίβα "συμπεριφοράς" για τα διαφορετικά είδη/μέσα ενημέρωσης. Εκτός από το ρόλο τους στην ψυχογλωσσική διερεύνηση (γιατί χρησιμοποιούμε διαφορετικές στρατηγικές συγχορήγησης όταν γράφουμε ή μιλάμε) και στην τοποθέτηση του στο προφορικό-γραπτό συνεχές, βλέπουμε τα αποτελέσματά μας ως συμβολή στην προσέγγιση της επίλυσης της συγχορήγησης ειδικά για το είδος/τα μέσα ενημέρωσης.', 'ta': "(i) முழுமையான முடிவுகளுக்கு பதிலாக எழுதப்பட்ட பேச்சு மொழியில் உள்ள கார்பெயர்ச்சிகளின் பண்புகள் பற்றி எழுதப்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் (ii) பேசும் மொழியில் மற்றும் சமூக ஊடகங்களிலும் தானாக்கி வேலை தெளிவுபடுத்தும்  முன்னால் தனிப்பட்ட தரவு அமைப்புகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒரு அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி வேறு மரபணுக்கள்/ஊடகங்களுக்கு 'நடத்தையின்' வ நாங்கள் ஏன் வேறு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட திட்டங்களை எழுதும் பேசும் போது வேறு முறைகளை வேலை செய்ய வேண்டும் என்றும் கூறும் தொடர்பில் இருந்து Twitter நிறுவனத்திற்கும் விளை", 'mk': "In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  Using a set of measures that previously have been applied individually to different data sets, we find fairly clear patterns of 'behavior' for the different genres/media.  Освен нивната улога за психолингвистичка истрага (зошто користиме различни стратегии за соодветност кога пишуваме или зборуваме) и за ставање на Твитер во говорниот континуум, ги гледаме нашите резултати како придонес за пристапување до резолуцијата за соодветност специфична за генер/медиуми.", 'si': "In Answer to වෙනස් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන මාර්ගයක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි වෙනස් ජනර්/මිඩියාවට 'වැ මනුස්සික භාෂාවික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ඔවුන්ගේ භාවිතාව (ඇයි අපි වෙනස් කෝරෙෆෙරෙන්ස් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය භාවිතා කරන්නේ අපි ලියවන්න හෝ කතා කරවන්නේ) සහ ට්විටර් එක", 'ur': "اور (i i) کلام کی زبان اور سوسیل میڈیا کے بارے میں جو بات کی زبان اور سوسیل میڈیا کے بارے میں اتماٹی مہربانی کے ذریعہ سے کام نہیں کرتا، ہم ایک کورپوس کی تحقیق کریں گے جو ان دونوں انٹنوٹس، سوئیچ بورد کورپوس اور ٹویٹر کی مختلف قسموں میں شامل ہے۔ ایک مجموعہ سے استعمال کرتے ہیں جو پہلے مختلف ڈیٹ سٹوں پر ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ کاروبار کیا گیا ہے، ہم مختلف جنر/میڈیا کے لئے 'رفتار' کے مطابق واضح طریقے پاتے ہیں. ان کی رونق زبان کی تحقیقات کے لئے ان کی رونق کے علاوہ (جب ہم لکھتے ہیں یا بولتے ہیں تو ہم مختلف مہربانی استراتژی کیوں استعمال کرتے ہیں) اور توئیٹ کی جگہ لکھی جاتی ہے، ہم اپنے نتائج کو جنر-/میڈیا کے خاص مہربانی رخصت کے نزدیک حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک حصہ سمجھتے ہیں۔", 'vi': 'Đáp lại (i) kết quả không xác định về các tính chất của các dây hạn (hạn hạn hẹp) trong ngôn ngữ được viết ra so với ngôn ngữ đã nói, và (i) thiếu liên quan đến giải pháp dập tắt tự động về ngôn ngữ và truyền thông xã hội, chúng tôi thực hiện một nghiên cứu tập thể có liên quan đến các phần thể loại khác của Ontonotes, the Switchard Corpus, và một nhóm đối thoại trên Twitter. Sử dụng một loạt các biện pháp trước đây từng được áp dụng riêng cho các tập tin khác nhau, chúng tôi tìm thấy các mô hình "hành vi" khá rõ ràng cho các thể loại/phương tiện khác nhau. Bên cạnh vai trò nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ học tâm lý (tại sao chúng ta sử dụng các chiến lược hạn hẹp khác nhau khi viết hay nói) và cho việc đăng tải Twitter trong dòng liên tục được viết ra, chúng ta xem kết quả như là một đóng góp để tiếp cận các giải pháp hồng cầu tiêu chuẩn.', 'uz': '(i) ma\'lum natijaga javob berish, yozuvchi bir xil bog\'liqlarning xossalariga, va (ii) gapiradigan tillar va jamiyat media haqida avtomatik ravishda ishni bajarish yoʻq, biz Ontonotes, Switchboard kompyuterning har xil qismlari, Twitterning muloqotlarining bir xil qismlari bilan bog\'liq qismini bajaramiz. Davom etishdan oldin boshqa maʼlumotlar tarkibida qoʻllanilgan tartiblar bilan ishlatiladi, biz har xil genre/media uchun "tab\'iyatlarni" ko\'rsatuvchimiz. Menyulik tajribasining qidirishlari (biz yozishimiz yoki gapirayotganda boshqa xizmatning strategiyasini ishlayapmiz) va Twitterga yozilgan davomida bo\'lishimiz uchun, biz natijalarimizni genre-/media-specific corefeference resolution\'ga qaramasdan foydalanamiz.', 'da': "Som svar på (i) ufuldstændige resultater i litteraturen vedrørende egenskaberne af coreferencekæder i skriftligt versus talt sprog, og (ii) en generel mangel på arbejde med automatisk coreferenceopløsning på både talt sprog og sociale medier, gennemfører vi en korpustudie, der involverer de forskellige genresektioner af Ontonotes, Switchboard korpus og et korpus af Twitter-samtaler. Ved hjælp af et sæt målinger, der tidligere er blevet anvendt individuelt på forskellige datasæt, finder vi temmelig klare mønstre for 'adfærd' for de forskellige genrer/medier. Ud over deres rolle for psykolingvistisk undersøgelse (hvorfor anvender vi forskellige coreference strategier, når vi skriver eller taler) og for placeringen af Twitter i det taleskrevne kontinuum, ser vi vores resultater som et bidrag til at nærme genre-/mediespecifik coreference resolution.", 'bg': 'В отговор на (i) неубедителни резултати в литературата по отношение на свойствата на веригите за кореференция в писмен и говорим език и (ii) обща липса на работа по автоматична резолюция на кореференция както на говоримия език, така и на социалните медии, ние предприемаме корпусно проучване, включващо различните жанрови секции на Корпуса и корпус от разговори в Туитър. Използвайки набор от мерки, които преди това са били прилагани индивидуално към различни набори от данни, откриваме доста ясни модели на "поведение" за различните жанрове/медии. Освен ролята им за психолингвистичното изследване (защо използваме различни стратегии за кореференция, когато пишем или говорим) и за поставянето на Туитър в речно-написания континуум, виждаме нашите резултати като принос към приближаването на жанрово-специфичната кореференция.', 'de': 'Als Reaktion auf (i) nicht schlüssige Ergebnisse in der Literatur über die Eigenschaften von Koreferenzketten in geschriebener und gesprochener Sprache und (ii) einen generellen Mangel an Arbeit zur automatischen Koreferenzauflösung sowohl in gesprochener Sprache als auch in sozialen Medien, führen wir eine Korpusstudie durch, die die verschiedenen Genreabschnitte von Ontonotes, das Switchboard-Korpus und einen Korpus von Twitter-Gesprächen einbezieht. Anhand einer Reihe von Maßnahmen, die bisher individuell auf verschiedene Datensätze angewendet wurden, finden wir ziemlich klare Verhaltensmuster für die verschiedenen Genres/Medien. Neben ihrer Rolle für die psycholinguistische Untersuchung (warum verwenden wir beim Schreiben oder Sprechen unterschiedliche Coreferenzstrategien) und für die Platzierung von Twitter im gesprochenen-geschriebenen Kontinuum sehen wir unsere Ergebnisse als Beitrag zur Annäherung an genre-/medienspezifische Coreferenzauflösung.', 'ko': "(i) 문헌에서 서면어와 구어 중 손가락체인의 성질에 대한 불확정한 결과와 (ii) 구어와 소셜미디어에서 자동으로 공통적으로 손가락질을 해소하는 보편적인 부족에 대응하기 위해 우리는 Ontonotes의 각종 장르 부분, 총 기기 자료 라이브러리와 트위터 대화 자료 라이브러리에 대한 연구를 실시했다.이전에 서로 다른 데이터 집합에 단독으로 적용되었던 도량을 사용하면 우리는 서로 다른 유형/매체의'행위'모델이 상당히 명확하다는 것을 알 수 있다.심리언어학 연구(왜 우리가 글을 쓰거나 말을 할 때 서로 다른 공지 전략을 사용하는가)와 구어-서면 연속체에 트위터를 놓는 작용을 제외하고는 장르/매체의 특정한 공지 해소에 도움이 된다고 본다.", 'nl': "In reactie op (i) onduidelijke resultaten in de literatuur over de eigenschappen van coreferentieketens in geschreven versus gesproken taal, en (ii) een algemeen gebrek aan werk aan automatische coreferentieresolutie op zowel gesproken taal als sociale media, voeren we een corpusstudie uit met betrekking tot de verschillende genresecties van Ontonotes, het Switchboardcorpus en een corpus van Twitter gesprekken. Met behulp van een reeks maatregelen die eerder individueel zijn toegepast op verschillende datasets, vinden we vrij duidelijke patronen van 'gedrag' voor de verschillende genres/media. Naast hun rol voor psycholinguïstisch onderzoek (waarom gebruiken we verschillende coreference strategieën wanneer we schrijven of spreken) en voor de plaatsing van Twitter in het gesproken-geschreven continuüm, zien we onze resultaten als een bijdrage aan het benaderen van genre-/media-specifieke coreference resolutie.", 'hr': 'U odgovoru na i) nesposobne rezultate u književnosti o vlasništvu lanca dobrote napisanog protiv govornog jezika, i ii) općem nedostatku rada na rješavanju automatske dobrote na govornom jeziku i društvenim medijima, poduzimamo korpus studiju uključujući razne grupe genre Ontonotes a, Švicarskog korpusa i korpus razgovora o Twitter-u. Koristeći niz mjera koje su prethodno primjenjene individualno na različite sete podataka, nalazimo prilično jasne obrasce "ponašanja" za različite genre/medije. Osim njihove uloge za psihologističku istragu (zašto koristimo različite strategije za pristojnost kada pišemo ili govorimo) i za stavljanje Twitter u pisano napisano kontinuum, smatramo našim rezultatima kao doprinos pristupanju rezoluciji za pristojnost određenoj pristojnosti genira/medija.', 'fa': 'در پاسخ به (i) نتیجه\u200cهای غیرقابل توجه به ادبیات درباره\u200cی ویژه\u200cهای زنجیرهای پسندیده\u200cای در زبان نوشته\u200cشده و (ii) ناتوانی عمومی در راه حل\u200cسازی همراه با زبان و رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی صحبت می\u200cشود، ما یک مطالعه کورپوس را انجام می\u200cدهیم که شامل قسمت\u200cهای مختلف ژنتی از آنتونات، کورپوس سوئیچ\u200cبورد و یک کور استفاده از مجموعه\u200cای از اندازه\u200cهایی که قبلاً به مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف کاربرد شده\u200cاند، برای مجموعه\u200cهای متفاوت/رسانه\u200cهای مختلف الگوهای «رفتار» کاملا روشن پیدا می\u200cکنیم. علاوه بر نقش آنها برای تحقیقات روانی زبان\u200cشناسی (چرا ما استراتژی\u200cهای متفاوتی را وقتی می\u200cنویسیم یا صحبت می\u200cکنیم) استفاده می\u200cکنیم، و برای جایگزینش توئیتر در ادامه نوشته شده، نتیجه\u200cهایمان را به عنوان رضایت به نزدیک کشف\u200cکننده\u200cی رضایت ویژه\u200cای/رسانه\u200cها می\u200c', 'af': "In antwoord na (i) inklusiewe resultate in die literaat as die eienskappe van koreferensie kettings in geskrywe teen gepraat taal, en (ii)  'n algemene mislukking van werk op automatiese koreferensie oplossing op beide praat taal en sosiale media, ons aanvang 'n korpus studie wat die verskillende genre artikels van Ontonotes, die Switchboard corpus en 'n korpus van Twitter gespreksies invoer. Gebruik van 'n stel maat wat voorheen individueel aan verskillende data stelle aangepas is, vind ons regtig duidelik patrone van 'gedrag' vir die verskillende genre/media. Ons sien ons resultate as 'n bydraag om genre-/media-spesifieke koreferensie-oplossing te nader.", 'id': "Sebagai respon kepada (i) hasil yang tidak konklusif dalam literatur tentang properti rantai koreferensi dalam tulis versus bahasa berbicara, dan (ii) kekurangan umum pekerjaan pada resolusi koreferensi otomatis pada bahasa berbicara dan media sosial, kami melakukan sebuah studi corpus yang melibatkan berbagai jenis bagian Ontonotes, korpus Switchboard, dan korpus dari percakapan Twitter. Menggunakan set tindakan yang sebelumnya telah diterapkan secara individu pada set data yang berbeda, kami menemukan pola cukup jelas 'perilaku' untuk genre/media yang berbeda. Selain peran mereka untuk penyelidikan psikologis (mengapa kita menggunakan strategi koreferensi yang berbeda ketika kita menulis atau berbicara) dan untuk menempatkan Twitter dalam kontinum tulis berbicara, kita melihat hasil kita sebagai kontribusi untuk mendekati resolusi koreferensi spesifik genre/media.", 'am': '(i) በተቃወመ ቋንቋ ላይ በተጻፈው የኮርፌንስ ሰንሰለቶች ስርዓት እና (ii) በተናገረ ቋንቋ እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የራሳቸውን የክፍለ ጉዳይ ማድረግ ጉዳይ በመጠቀም፣ በተለዩት ቋንቋ እና ማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ በተለያዩ የኦንቶኖት ክፍሎች፣ የስዊትቦርድ ኮንፕስ እና የትዊተር ንግግር ማነሳያ የቆርፓስ ጥያቄን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ለብቻው ለዳታ ማዕከላዎች የተጠቀሙትን መጠቀሚያ በመጠቀም፣ ለልዩ ሥርዓቶች/ሚዲያ የተለየ ‘ሁኔታ’ የተለየ መልዕክቶችን እናገኛለን፡፡ በሲኮልቋንቋዊ ምርመራ ላይ የሚደረገውን (ስለምን የምንጻፍ ወይም እናነጋገር) እና በተጻፈው ሁኔታ ላይ በትዊተር ማሰሪያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Որպես պատասխան i) գրականության անհամոզմունքային արդյունքներին գրված և խոսված լեզվի հարաբերության շղթաների հատկությունների մասին, և i) աշխատանքի ընդհանուր բացակայությունը հենց խոսված լեզվի և սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների մասին, մենք կատարում ենք մարմնի ուսումնասիրություն, որը ներառում է Օնտոնոթի, Շվիթբուրթի մարմնի տարբեր գեներային հատվածները և Թվիթերի հաղո Օգտագործելով մի շարք չափումներ, որոնք նախկինում անհատապես կիրառվել են տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, մենք բավականին պարզ ձևեր ենք գտնում տարբեր գենդերում և մեդիայում: Բացի հոգեբանական ուսումնասիրության նրանց դերից (ինչու՞ մենք օգտագործում ենք տարբեր կորեֆերանսի ռազմավարություններ, երբ մենք գրում ենք կամ խոսում ենք) և Թվիթերի տեղադրման խոսում գրված շարունակության մեջ, մենք տեսնում ենք մեր արդյունքները որպես ներդրում գենդերային և լրատվամիջոցների կորեֆերանսի լուծության մոտեցում:', 'az': "i) müəyyən edilməz səhifələrin yazılmış və danışmış dillərdə yazılmış müəyyən zincirlərin özellikləri barəsində, və ii) danışmış dil və sosyal mediyalar barəsindəki avtomatik müəyyən çəkişmə çəkişməsi barəsindəki hər hansı bir i ş yoxdur, Ontonotes, Switchboard korpusu və Twitter danışmalarının müxtəlif çeşitli çeşitləri ilə birlikdə korpus təhsil etdik. Daha əvvəl təkcə müxtəlif məlumat qurmaqlarına uyğunlanan ölçü qurmaqlarını istifadə edirək, müxtəlif genr/mediya üçün 'davranış' qurmaqlarının çox a çıq şəkillərini görürük. Psikolingvistiki araştırmaların rolünün istifadəsindən başqa (yazıb danışdığımız və ya danışdığımız zaman fərqli mərhəmət stratejilərini niyə istifadə edirik) və Twitter'i söylədiyimiz yazılmış sürətdə yerləşdirmək üçün, sonuçlarımızı genre-/media-specific mərhəmət çətinliklərinə yaxınlaşmaq üçün bir qismi kimi görürük", 'bn': "In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  Using a set of measures that previously have been applied individually to different data sets, we find fairly clear patterns of 'behavior' for the different genres/media.  মানসিক ভাষার তদন্তের জন্য তাদের ভূমিকা ছাড়া (আমরা কেন বিভিন্ন কোরেফেন্স কৌশলগুলো চাকরি যখন লিখি অথবা কথা বলি) এবং লেখা চলচ্চিত্রের টুইটারের অবস্থানের জন্য টুইটারের জন্য, আমরা আমাদ", 'sq': "Si përgjigje ndaj (i) rezultateve jo përfshirëse në letërsinë lidhur me pronësitë e zinxhirëve të korreferencës në gjuhën e shkruar kundër gjuhës së folur dhe (ii) mungesës së përgjithshme të punës mbi rezolutën automatike të korreferencës si në gjuhën e folur, ashtu edhe në mediat sociale, ne kryejmë një studim korpus që përfshin seksionet e ndryshme të gjenerit të Ontonotes, korpus Switchboard dhe një korpus bisedimesh në Twitter. Duke përdorur një sërë masash që më parë janë aplikuar individualisht për sërat e të dhënave të ndryshme, gjejmë modele mjaft të qarta të 'sjelljes' për gjenerët e ndryshme/media. Përveç rolit të tyre për hetimin psikologjik (pse ne përdorim strategji të ndryshme koreference kur shkruajmë apo flasim) dhe për vendosjen e Twitter në vazhdimin e shkruar të folur, ne shohim rezultatet tona si një kontribut në afrimin e rezolutës koreference të gjenerit/të medias specifike.", 'tr': "I 첵azyl첵an dilde n채razy netijesi bolan edebi첵aty흫 첵azyl첵an we g체rle첵채n dilde (i i) hem g체rle첵채n dil hem sosyal med첵첵atlar hakynda awtomatik 첵olyk 챌철zg체tle힊m채ge mejbur 첵ok bolmagy 체챌in, biz Ontonotelary흫, 힇we 첵tony흫 korpusyny흫 we Twitter geple힊iklerinde da힊ary bir korpus ara힊tyrmasyny 챌yk첵arys. 횜흫ki birn채챌e da첵lar d체zenlerine 체첵tgedilen 챌채releri ullan첵arys. Biz be첵leki 챌채reler/med첵채w 체챌in 'davran캇힊' d체z체mlerini belli edip g철r첵채ris. Psikolingwistiki barlamak 체챌in olary흫 rolyny흫 (첵azyp 첵azmak 첵a-da g체rle힊첵채n wagtlary) we Twitter-y흫 첵azyl첵an dowam edilmegi 체챌in nusgalarymyzy d철retm채ge n채me 체챌in 체첵tge첵채ris.", 'sw': "Kujibu (i) matokeo yasiyo na maana yanayotokana na fasihi kuhusu utaalam wa viungo vikuu vilivyoandikwa dhidi ya lugha inayozungumzwa, na (ii) ukosefu wa kazi kwa ujumla kuhusu suluhisho la kibinafsi kuhusu lugha na mitandao ya kijamii, tunafanya utafiti wa makampuni yanayohusiana na sehemu mbalimbali za jinsia za Ontonotes, makampuni ya Board ya Switchboard, na makampuni ya mazungumzo ya Twita. Using a set of measures that previously have been applied individually to different data sets, we find fairly clear patterns of 'behavior' for the different genres/media.  Pamoja na jukumu lao la uchunguzi wa lugha za kisaikolojia (kwa nini tunatumia mikakati tofauti ya msingi tunapoandika au kuongea) na kuweka kwenye mtandao wa Twita katika mfululizo unaoandikwa, tunaona matokeo yetu kama mchango wa kufikia suluhisho la msingi-wa-vyombo vya habari maalum.", 'cs': 'V reakci na (i) neprůkazné výsledky v literatuře ohledně vlastností koreferenčních řetězců v psaném a mluveném jazyce a (ii) obecný nedostatek práce na automatickém řešení koreferencí v mluveném jazyce i na sociálních médiích, provádíme korpusovou studii zahrnující různé žánrové sekce Ontonotes, korpus Switchboard a korpus konverzací na Twitteru. Pomocí sady opatření, která byla dříve aplikována individuálně na různé datové sady, nalezneme poměrně jasné vzorce "chování" pro různé žánry/média. Kromě jejich role v psycholingvistickém vyšetřování (proč používáme různé strategie koreference při psaní nebo mluvení) a umístění Twitteru do mluveného-psaného kontinua, vnímáme naše výsledky jako příspěvek k přístupu k žánrově/mediálně specifickému řešení koreference.', 'bs': 'U odgovoru na i) neslužbene rezultate u književnosti o vlasništvu lanca dobrote napisanog protiv govornog jezika, i ii) općem nedostatku rada na rezoluciji automatske dobrote na govornom jeziku i društvenim medijima, poduzimamo korpus studiju koja uključuje razne grupe genre Ontonota, korpusa Švicarskog broda i korpus razgovora o Twitter. Koristeći niz mjera koje su prethodno primjenjene individualno na različite sete podataka, nalazimo prilično jasne obrasce "ponašanja" za različite genre/medije. Osim njihove uloge za psihologističku istragu (zašto koristimo različite strategije za pristojnost kada pišemo ili govorimo) i za stavljanje Twitter u pisani kontinuum, mi smatramo našim rezultatima kao doprinos pristupanju rezoluciji za pristupanje određenoj pristojnosti genera/medija.', 'fi': 'Vastauksena (i) kirjallisuuden tulokseen koreferenssiketjujen ominaisuuksista kirjoitetussa ja puhutussa kielessä sekä (ii) automaattisen koreferenssiresoluution puutteeseen sekä puhutussa kielessä että sosiaalisessa mediassa toteutamme korpustutkimuksen, jossa on mukana Ontonotes-genreosiot, Switchboard-korpus ja Twitter-keskustelujen korpus. Käyttämällä mittareita, joita on aiemmin sovellettu erikseen eri tietoryhmiin, löydämme melko selkeät käyttäytymismallit eri genreille/medialle. Niiden roolin lisäksi psykolingvistisessa tutkimuksessa (miksi käytämme erilaisia koreferenssistrategioita kirjoittaessamme tai puhuessamme) ja Twitterin sijoittamisessa puhuttuun kirjoitettuun jatkumoon, näemme tulokset panoksena genre-/mediakohtaisen koreferenssiresoluution lähestymiseen.', 'et': 'Vastuseks (i) kirjanduse ebaselgetele tulemustele, mis puudutavad kirjaliku ja räägitava keele koosseisu ahelate omadusi, ja (ii) töö automaatse koosseisu lahendamise üldisele puudumisele nii räägitavas keeles kui ka sotsiaalmeedias, teostame korpusuuringu, mis hõlmab Ontonotes\'i eri žanri sektsioone, Switchboard korpuse ja Twitteri vestluste korpuse. Kasutades erinevatele andmekogumitele eraldi rakendatud meetmeid, leiame üsna selged "käitumismudelid" erinevate žanrite/meedia jaoks. Lisaks nende rollile psühholingvistilises uurimises (miks me kasutame kirjutamisel või rääkimisel erinevaid koreferenssi strateegiaid) ja Twitteri paigutamisel kõneleva kirjutatud kontiinuumi näeme oma tulemusi panusena žanri-/meediaspetsiifilise koreferensi lahendamisele.', 'ca': "In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  Using a set of measures that previously have been applied individually to different data sets, we find fairly clear patterns of 'behavior' for the different genres/media.  Besides their role for psycholinguistic investigation (why do we employ different coreference strategies when we write or speak) and for the placement of Twitter in the spoken-written continuum, we see our results as a contribution to approaching genre-/media-specific coreference resolution.", 'jv': "Nanging respon (i) kaya tanggal perusahaan kanggo didasara urip lan kaya perusahaan karo hal-hal nganggo perusahaan kanggo masara urip, lan (i i) kapan tanggal gak perusahaan langkung werang nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan sesuk sabanjuré karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan sak komunitas, kita nguasai perusahaan kanggo ngilanggar samihan winih kanggo ngilanggar-samihan winih Onton otes, petan Switch Ngawe ngubah sistem sing perusahaan nganggep sistem dadi sing gak dadi, awak dhéwé buturan perusahaan 'sawar' kanggo kalih genr/media sing gak bener. Nyong berarti karo perusahaan kelas nggunakake sing luwih(leh awak dhéwé iso nggunakake karo nggalakno sing mengko nggawe layang-layang) lan nganggep nglanggar tuytir iki dadi sing diralukaké kontinuhaan, kita ndelok dhéwé dadi tanggal nggawe gerakan beraksi sing nggawe gerakan karo nggunakake sing berarti sing dibutungan genar-/media", 'sk': "V odgovor na (i) nedokončne rezultate literature glede lastnosti koreferenčnih verig v pisnem in govorjenem jeziku in (ii) splošno pomanjkanje dela na avtomatski koreferenčni resoluciji tako na govorjenem jeziku kot na družbenih omrežjih izvajamo korpusno študijo, ki vključuje različne žanrske odseke Ontonotes, korpus Switchboard in korpus Twitterjevih pogovorov. Z uporabo nabora ukrepov, ki so se prej uporabljali individualno za različne nabore podatkov, najdemo dokaj jasne vzorce 'vedenja' za različne zvrsti/medije. Poleg njihove vloge pri psiholingvističnem raziskovanju (zakaj uporabljamo različne koreferenčne strategije pri pisanju ali govoru) in pri umeščanju Twitterja v govorjeno pisano kontinuum, naše rezultate vidimo kot prispevek k približevanju žanrsko/medijsko specifični koreferenčni resoluciji.", 'he': "In response to (i) inconclusive results in the literature as to the properties of coreference chains in written versus spoken language, and (ii) a general lack of work on automatic coreference resolution on both spoken language and social media, we undertake a corpus study involving the various genre sections of Ontonotes, the Switchboard corpus, and a corpus of Twitter conversations.  באמצעות קבוצה של אמצעים שהשתמשו בעבר באופן פרטי על קבוצות נתונים שונות, אנו מוצאים דפוסים די ברורים של 'התנהגות' לגנרס/תקשורת שונים. חוץ מהתפקיד שלהם לחקירה פסיכולוגית (מדוע אנחנו משתמשים באסטרטגיות משונות שונות כאשר אנחנו כותבים או מדברים) ולהשימוש של טוויטר בממשך הכתוב המפורסם, אנו רואים את התוצאות שלנו כתרומה להתקרב לפתרון משונות מסוים לגנר/מדיה.", 'ha': "In a jibar da fassarar da ba'a koma ba na fassarar littãfi kamar properties of sarge-sarge wanda aka rubũta a versus harshen da aka yi wa magana, da (i i) kuma gaba ɗaya na ƙaranci na aikin aiki a kan rabo farat ɗaya a kan masu faɗi na lugha da mitandai da jamii, za'a karɓi wani littafi na huɗu da wasu jama'a na Ontonotes, da nauna'in na Sakamata na Twitter. Yi amfani da tsari masu yin amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da aka amfani da shi gaba ɗaya zuwa masu tsari masu daban-daban, za'a sãmi tsari masu bayyanawa na 'aikin ƙwarai' wa jini/mutane daban. Babu wani role wa yin tambayi akan aikin aikinsa (don me za mu yi amfani da takwai masu mutane idan muna rubutu ko kuma mu yi magana) kuma da sakin da Twitter a cikin dacewa da aka rubũta shi, Munã ganin matsalayinmu kamar ƙarami ga makusanci na rabon-mutane na genre-media.", 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། སྔོན་མ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སོ་སོའི་ནང་དུ་སྒེར་རྣམས་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ psycholinguistic investigation་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དེ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Using Eye-tracking Data to Predict the Readability of Brazilian Portuguese Sentences in Single-task, Multi-task and Sequential Transfer Learning Approaches', 'ar': 'استخدام بيانات تتبع العين للتنبؤ بإمكانية قراءة الجمل البرتغالية البرازيلية في نهج تعلم مهمة واحدة ومتعددة المهام ومتسلسلة', 'pt': 'Usando dados de rastreamento ocular para prever a legibilidade de frases do português brasileiro em abordagens de aprendizagem de uma única tarefa, multitarefa e transferência sequencial', 'fr': "Utilisation des données de suivi oculaire pour prédire la lisibilité des phrases en portugais brésilien dans des approches d'apprentissage par transfert à tâche unique, multitâche et séquentielle", 'ja': 'シングルタスク・マルチタスク・シーケンシャル転送学習アプローチにおけるブラジルポルトガル語の文章の読みやすさを予測するためのアイトラッキングデータの使用', 'es': 'Uso de datos de seguimiento ocular para predecir la legibilidad de las oraciones en portugués brasileño en enfoques de aprendizaje de transferencia secuencial, de una sola tarea y de múltiples tareas', 'zh': '用眼动追踪数占巴西葡萄牙语句在单任、多任务、序迁学之可读性', 'hi': 'एकल-कार्य, बहु-कार्य और अनुक्रमिक स्थानांतरण सीखने के दृष्टिकोण में ब्राजील के पुर्तगाली वाक्यों की पठनीयता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए आंख-ट्रैकिंग डेटा का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Использование данных отслеживания глаз для прогнозирования читабельности бразильских португальских предложений в однозадачных, многозадачных и последовательных подходах к обучению передаче', 'ga': 'Sonraí Rianaithe Súl a Úsáid chun Inléiteacht abairtí Portaingéile na Brasaíle a Thuar i gCur Chuige Foghlama Tasc Aonair, Ilthasc agus Aistriú Seicheamhach', 'el': 'Χρήση δεδομένων παρακολούθησης ματιών για την πρόβλεψη της αναγνωσιμότητας των βραζιλιάνικων πορτογαλικών ποινών σε προσεγγίσεις μάθησης μίας εργασίας, πολλαπλών εργασιών και διαδοχικής μεταφοράς', 'hu': 'Szemkövető adatok használata a brazil portugál mondatok olvashatóságának előrejelzésére egyfeladatos, többfeladatos és szekvenciális tanulási megközelítésekben', 'ka': 'მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენება ბრაზილური პორტეგური სიტყვების კითხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სამუ', 'kk': 'Бір тапсырма, көп тапсырма және келесі тапсырмалардың оқу мүмкіндігін Бразилиялық португальз сөздерінің оқу мүмкіндігін алдын ала аласыз', 'it': 'Utilizzo dei dati Eye-tracking per prevedere la leggibilità delle frasi portoghesi brasiliane in approcci di apprendimento monotask, multi-task e trasferimento sequenziale', 'mk': 'Користење на податоци за следење на очите за предвидување на читливоста на бразилските португалски реченици во пристапите на еднозадачно, мултизадачно и секвенционално пренесување', 'ml': 'ബ്രാസീലിയന്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീസ് ശിക്ഷകളുടെ പുനരുത്ഥാനത്തിനായി കണ്ണിന്റെ ട്രാക്കിങ്ങ് ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരേ ജോലിയില്\u200d, പല- ജോല', 'mn': 'Нүдний дагах мэдээллийг ашиглаж Бразилийн Португалийн нэг ажил, олон ажил, дараагийн дагаварын сурах ойлголтын унших боломжтой байдлыг анзаарах', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ Dejta dwar it-Traċċar tal-Għajnejn biex jipprevedi l-leġibbiltà tas-Sentenzi Portugiżi Brażiljani f’Approċċi ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Kompitu Uniku, Multikompitu u Trasferiment Sekwenzjali', 'ms': 'Mengguna Data Pengejaran Mata untuk meramalkan pembacaan perkataan Portugis Brazil dalam pendekatan Belajar Pemindahan Bersatu-Tugas, Berberbilang-Tugas dan Sekuensional', 'lt': 'Naudojant akių sekimo duomenis Brazilijos portugalų sakinių skaitomumui numatant vienos užduoties, kelių užduočių ir sekacinio mokymosi metodus', 'ro': 'Utilizarea datelor de urmărire a ochilor pentru a anticipa lizibilitatea sentințelor portugheze braziliene în abordări de învățare cu o singură sarcină, cu mai multe sarcini și cu transfer secvențial', 'no': 'Bruk øysporingsdata for å foreslå lesabiliteten til Brasilianske portugisiske setningar i enkelt oppgåve, fleire oppgåver og sekvensiske læringstilnærmingar', 'sr': 'Koristeći podatke za praćenje očiju da predviđaju čitljivost Brazilskih portugalskih kazna u jednom zadatku, višezadatku i sekvencijalnim pristupima učenja prijenosa', 'si': 'Eye-tracing Data පාවිච්චි කරන්න බ්\u200dරාජිලියාන් පොර්ටුජිලියාන් පොර්ටුජිලි වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නතාවය ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie danych Eye-tracking do przewidywania czytelności brazylijskich zdań portugalskich w podejściu do nauki pojedynczego, wielozadaniowego i sekwencyjnego transferu', 'so': 'Isku isticmaalaya macluumaadka indhaha-tracking to Predict the Reaability of Burtuqiis Sentences of Brazil in single-task, Multi-task and subsequent Learning Learning', 'sv': 'Använda ögonspårningsdata för att förutsäga läsbarheten av brasilianska portugisiska meningar i inlärningsmetoder med en uppgift, flera uppgifter och sekventiell överföring', 'ur': 'Eye-tracking Data کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ برازیل پورچل کے پڑھنے کی قابلیت واحد، Multi-Task اور سکنویل ٹرنسفر سیکھنے کی تقریبا میں', 'ta': 'Using Eye-tracking Data to Predict the Readability of Brazilian Portuguese Sentences in Single-task, Multi-task and Sequential Transfer Learning Approaches', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sử dụng dữ liệu theo dõi con mắt để dự đoán mức độ chịu đựng của các câu án Bồ Đào Nha Brazil trong các nhiệm vụ đơn, đa nhiệm vụ và tiếp cận truyền giáo', 'bg': 'Използване на данни за проследяване на очите за прогнозиране на четливостта на бразилски португалски изречения в подходи за обучение с една задача, многозадачи и последователни трансфери', 'nl': 'Eye-tracking data gebruiken om de leesbaarheid van Braziliaanse Portugese zinnen te voorspellen in single-task, multitask en sequential transfer learning benaderingen', 'hr': 'Koristeći podatke o praćenju očiju za predviđanje čitljivosti brazilskih portugalskih kazna u jednom zadatku, višezadatku i sljedećim pristupima učenja prijenosa', 'da': 'Brug af eyetracking-data til at forudsige læsbarheden af brasilianske portugisiske sætninger i læringsmetoder med én opgave, fleropgave og sekventiel overførsel', 'id': 'Menggunakan Data pelacakan mata untuk memprediksikan pembacaan hukuman Portugis Brazil dalam pendekatan Belajar Transfer Sekuensional, Multi-Task', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia taarifa za ufuatiliaji macho kwa ajili ya Kutangaza Hukumu ya Marekani ya Kireno ya Brazili katika kazi moja, kazi nyingi na kujifunza Uhamiaji', 'ko': '눈동자 추적 데이터를 이용하여 단일 임무, 다중 임무와 순서 이동 학습 중의 브라질 포르투갈어 문장의 가독성을 예측하다', 'de': 'Verwendung von Eye-Tracking-Daten zur Vorhersage der Lesbarkeit brasilianisch-portugiesischer Sätze in Einzel-, Mehraufgaben- und Sequenziellen Transfer-Lernansätzen', 'af': 'Gebruik Oog- agtervolg Data om die Leesbaard van Braziliaanse Portugese Uitdrukkings in Enkel- taak, Multi-task en Sequential Transfer Learning Approaches te voorskryf', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i të dhënave të ndjekjes së syve për të parashikuar lexueshmërinë e dënimeve portugale të Brazilit në qasjet e mësimit me një detyrë të vetme, me shumë detyra dhe me transferim të vazhdueshëm', 'fa': 'استفاده از اطلاعات ردیابی چشم برای پیشنهاد خواندن قابلیت سخنرانی پورتوژیک برزیلیایی در یک وظیفه، چندین وظیفه و دسترسی یادگیری ردیابی', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով աչքերի հետևման տվյալներ՝ նախատեսելով Բրազիլիայի պորտուգալիացի նախադասությունների կարելի կարդալ մեկ խնդրի, բազմախնդիրների և հաջորդական հաղորդակցման մոտեցումների մեջ', 'am': 'የዓይን-tracking Data used to predictate the Reaability of Brazilian Portuguese Sentences in single-task, Multi-task and Sequently Transfer Learn Approaches', 'tr': 'Gözleri gözlemek Maglumaty Braziliýa Portugalça Sözleri Tek-zada, Birnäçe Görevler we Seglanyş Öwrenmek Tukymlaryny Öňlemek üçin ön bellemek üçin ullanýar', 'bn': 'ব্রাজিলীয় পর্তুগীজ শাস্তির প্রত্যাবর্তনের জন্য চোখের ট্র্যাকিং ডাটা ব্যবহার করে একক ক কাজ, বহুকাজ এবং পরবর্তী পরিবহন শিক্ষা শিক্ষা প্রা', 'ca': "Utilitzant dades de seguiment ocular per predir la llegibilitat de les sentences portugueses brasiles en enfocaments d'aprenentatge de transferència senzilla, multitasca i secuencial", 'et': 'Silma jälgimise andmete kasutamine Brasiilia portugali lausete loetavuse prognoosimiseks ühe ülesande, mitme ülesande ja järjestikuse ülekande õppe meetodites', 'az': 'Eye-tracking Data istifadə etmək üçün Braziliyalı Portugalca Sözünün oxuyabilməsini tək-iş, çoxlu-iş və Sequential Transfer Öyrənmə Yaxınlıqlarında Öyrənmək üçün', 'cs': 'Použití Eye-trackingových dat k predikci čitelnosti brazilských portugalských vět v přístupu k učení s jedním úkolem, víceúkolem a sekvenčním přenosem', 'fi': 'Katseenseurantatietojen käyttäminen Brasilian portugalin lauseiden luettavuuden ennustamiseen yhden tehtävän, monitehtävän ja peräkkäisen siirtooppimisen lähestymistavoissa', 'bs': 'Koristeći podatke za praćenje očiju kako bi predvidjeli čitljivost Brazilskih portugalskih kazna u jednom zadatku, višezadatku i sekvencijalnim pristupima učenja prijenosa', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'sk': 'Uporaba podatkov za sledenje oči za napovedovanje berljivosti brazilske portugalske stavke v pristopih učenja z enim opravilom, večopravilom in zaporednim prenosom', 'he': 'Using Eye-tracking Data to Predict the Readability of Brazilian Portuguese Sentences in Single-task, Multi-task and Sequential Transfer Learning Approaches', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah OKE-tracking data kanggo Kebebasan Gambar Kemerdekaan Putuk Bracilian Sentensi Single-task, Multi-task lan Sekondian transfer Learning Methods', 'bo': 'Eye-tracking Data་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱིས་བྷི་རིས་པ་portuguese(Brazilian Portuguese)ཡི་སྒྲ་ཚུལ་གཅིག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Sentence complexity assessment is a relatively new task in Natural Language Processing. One of its aims is to highlight in a text which sentences are more complex to support the simplification of contents for a target audience (e.g., children, cognitively impaired users, non-native speakers and low-literacy readers (Scarton and Specia, 2018)). This task is evaluated using datasets of pairs of aligned sentences including the complex and simple version of the same sentence. For Brazilian Portuguese, the task was addressed by (Leal et al., 2018), who set up the first dataset to evaluate the task in this language, reaching 87.8 % of accuracy with linguistic features. The present work advances these results, using models inspired by (Gonzalez-Garduno and Sgaard, 2018), which hold the state-of-the-art for the English language, with multi-task learning and eye-tracking measures. First-Pass Duration, Total Regression Duration and Total Fixation Duration were used in two moments ; first to select a subset of linguistic features and then as an auxiliary task in the multi-task and sequential learning models. The best model proposed here reaches the new state-of-the-art for Portuguese with 97.5 % accuracy 1, an increase of almost 10 points compared to the best previous results, in addition to proposing improvements in the public dataset after analysing the errors of our best model.', 'fr': "L'évaluation de la complexité des phrases est une tâche relativement nouvelle dans le traitement du langage naturel. L'un de ses objectifs est de mettre en évidence dans un texte quelles phrases sont plus complexes pour faciliter la simplification du contenu pour un public cible (par exemple, les enfants, les utilisateurs déficients cognitifs, les locuteurs non natifs et les lecteurs peu alphabétisés (Scarton et Specia, 2018)). Cette tâche est évaluée à l'aide d'ensembles de données de paires de phrases alignées, y compris la version complexe et simple de la même phrase. Pour le portugais brésilien, la tâche a été abordée par (Leal et al., 2018), qui a mis en place le premier ensemble de données pour évaluer la tâche dans cette langue, atteignant 87,8\xa0% de précision avec les caractéristiques linguistiques. Le présent travail fait progresser ces résultats, en utilisant des modèles inspirés par (Gonzalez-Gardun̈o et Søgaard, 2018), qui sont à la pointe de la technologie pour la langue anglaise, avec un apprentissage multitâche et des mesures de suivi oculaire. La durée du premier passage, la durée de régression totale et la durée totale de fixation ont été utilisées en deux temps\xa0; d'abord pour sélectionner un sous-ensemble de caractéristiques linguistiques, puis comme tâche auxiliaire dans les modèles d'apprentissage multitâche et séquentiel. Le meilleur modèle proposé ici atteint la nouvelle technologie pour le portugais avec une précision de 97,5\xa0% 1, soit une augmentation de près de 10 points par rapport aux meilleurs résultats précédents, en plus de proposer des améliorations dans l'ensemble de données public après analyse des erreurs de notre meilleur modèle.", 'ar': 'تقييم تعقيد الجمل هو مهمة جديدة نسبيًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. يتمثل أحد أهدافها في إبراز الجمل الأكثر تعقيدًا في النص لدعم تبسيط المحتويات للجمهور المستهدف (على سبيل المثال ، الأطفال ، والمستخدمين المعاقين إدراكيًا ، والمتحدثين غير الأصليين والقراء ذوي المعرفة المنخفضة بالقراءة والكتابة (Scarton and Specia ، 2018) ). يتم تقييم هذه المهمة باستخدام مجموعات البيانات من أزواج من الجمل المتوافقة بما في ذلك النسخة المعقدة والبسيطة من نفس الجملة. بالنسبة للبرتغالية البرازيلية ، تمت معالجة المهمة بواسطة (Leal et al.، 2018) ، الذي أنشأ مجموعة البيانات الأولى لتقييم المهمة بهذه اللغة ، حيث وصلت دقة الميزات اللغوية إلى 87.8٪. يعمل العمل الحالي على تقدم هذه النتائج ، باستخدام نماذج مستوحاة من (Gonzalez-Gardun̈o and Søgaard ، 2018) ، والتي تحمل أحدث ما توصلت إليه اللغة الإنجليزية ، مع إجراءات تعلم متعددة المهام وتتبع العين. تم استخدام مدة المرور الأول وإجمالي مدة الانحدار وإجمالي مدة التثبيت في لحظتين ؛ أولاً تحديد مجموعة فرعية من الميزات اللغوية ثم كمهمة مساعدة في نماذج التعلم المتعددة المهام والمتسلسلة. يصل أفضل نموذج مقترح هنا إلى أحدث طراز للبرتغاليين بدقة 97.5٪ 1 ، بزيادة قدرها 10 نقاط تقريبًا مقارنة بأفضل النتائج السابقة ، بالإضافة إلى اقتراح تحسينات في مجموعة البيانات العامة بعد تحليل أخطاء أفضل نموذج لدينا.', 'es': 'La evaluación de la complejidad de oraciones es una tarea relativamente nueva en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Uno de sus objetivos es destacar en un texto qué oraciones son más complejas para apoyar la simplificación de los contenidos para un público objetivo (por ejemplo, niños, usuarios con discapacidades cognitivas, hablantes no nativos y lectores con bajo nivel de alfabetización (Scarton y Specia, 2018)). Esta tarea se evalúa mediante conjuntos de datos de pares de oraciones alineadas que incluyen la versión compleja y simple de la misma oración. Para el portugués brasileño, la tarea fue abordada por (Leal et al., 2018), quienes crearon el primer conjunto de datos para evaluar la tarea en este idioma, alcanzando una precisión del 87,8% con características lingüísticas. El presente trabajo avanza en estos resultados, utilizando modelos inspirados en (Gonzalez-Gardun̈o y Søgaard, 2018), que mantienen la vanguardia del idioma inglés, con medidas de aprendizaje multitarea y seguimiento ocular. La duración del primer paso, la duración total de la regresión y la duración total de la fijación se utilizaron en dos momentos; primero para seleccionar un subconjunto de características lingüísticas y luego como tarea auxiliar en los modelos de aprendizaje multitarea y secuencial. El mejor modelo propuesto aquí alcanza el nuevo estado de la técnica para el portugués con una precisión del 97,5% 1, un aumento de casi 10 puntos en comparación con los mejores resultados anteriores, además de proponer mejoras en el conjunto de datos públicos después de analizar los errores de nuestro mejor modelo.', 'pt': 'A avaliação da complexidade da sentença é uma tarefa relativamente nova no Processamento de Linguagem Natural. Um de seus objetivos é destacar em um texto quais frases são mais complexas para apoiar a simplificação de conteúdos para um público-alvo (por exemplo, crianças, usuários com deficiência cognitiva, falantes não nativos e leitores de baixa alfabetização (Scarton e Specia, 2018) ). Esta tarefa é avaliada usando conjuntos de dados de pares de frases alinhadas, incluindo a versão complexa e simples da mesma frase. Para o português brasileiro, a tarefa foi abordada por (Leal et al., 2018), que montou o primeiro conjunto de dados para avaliar a tarefa nesse idioma, atingindo 87,8% de acerto com recursos linguísticos. O presente trabalho avança esses resultados, usando modelos inspirados em (Gonzalez-Gardun̈o e Søgaard, 2018), que detêm o estado da arte para a língua inglesa, com aprendizagem multitarefa e medidas de rastreamento ocular. Duração da Primeira Passagem, Duração Total da Regressão e Duração Total da Fixação foram utilizados em dois momentos; primeiro para selecionar um subconjunto de características linguísticas e depois como uma tarefa auxiliar nos modelos de aprendizagem multitarefa e sequencial. O melhor modelo aqui proposto atinge o novo estado da arte para o português com 97,5% de acerto 1 , um aumento de quase 10 pontos em relação aos melhores resultados anteriores, além de propor melhorias no conjunto de dados público após analisar os erros de nosso melhor modelo.', 'ja': '文章の複雑性評価は、自然言語処理における比較的新しい課題です。 その目的の1つは、ターゲット読者（例えば、子供、認知障害のあるユーザー、非ネイティブスピーカー、および低識字率の読者）のためのコンテンツの簡素化をサポートするために、どの文章がより複雑であるかをテキストで強調することです（ Scarton and Specia, 2018 ）。 このタスクは、同じ文の複雑で単純なバージョンを含む整列された文のペアのデータセットを使用して評価されます。 ブラジルポルトガル語では、このタスクは(Leal et al., 2018)によって取り組まれ、この言語でタスクを評価するための最初のデータセットを設定し、言語学的特徴を持つ正確さの87.8%に達した。 本研究は、マルチタスク学習とアイトラッキング対策を用いて、英語の最先端を握るGonzalez - Gardun （ Gonzalez - Gardun ）とSøgaard （ Søgaard、2018 ）にインスパイアされたモデルを用いて、これらの結果を進展させている。 ファーストパス持続時間、総回帰持続時間、および総固定持続時間を2つの瞬間で使用した。最初に言語学的特徴のサブセットを選択し、次にマルチタスクおよび逐次学習モデルの補助タスクとして使用した。 ここで提案された最良のモデルは、最良のモデルの誤差を分析した後にパブリックデータセットの改善を提案することに加えて、97.5%の精度1でポルトガル語の新しい最先端のモデルに到達し、以前の最良の結果と比較してほぼ10ポイント増加しました。', 'hi': 'वाक्य जटिलता मूल्यांकन प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक अपेक्षाकृत नया कार्य है। इसके उद्देश्यों में से एक एक पाठ में हाइलाइट करना है जो एक लक्षित दर्शकों के लिए सामग्री के सरलीकरण का समर्थन करने के लिए वाक्य अधिक जटिल हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, बच्चे, संज्ञानात्मक रूप से बिगड़ा हुआ उपयोगकर्ता, गैर-देशी वक्ताओं और कम साक्षरता वाले पाठकों (स्कार्टन और स्पेसिया, 2018))। इस कार्य का मूल्यांकन एक ही वाक्य के जटिल और सरल संस्करण सहित संरेखित वाक्यों के जोड़े के डेटासेट का उपयोग करके किया जाता है। ब्राजील के पुर्तगाली के लिए, कार्य को (लील एट अल. 2018) द्वारा संबोधित किया गया था, जिन्होंने इस भाषा में कार्य का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए पहला डेटासेट स्थापित किया था, जो भाषाई विशेषताओं के साथ सटीकता के 87.8% तक पहुंच गया था। वर्तमान कार्य इन परिणामों को आगे बढ़ाता है, (गोंजालेज-गार्डुनियो और सोगार्ड, 2018) से प्रेरित मॉडल का उपयोग करके, जो बहु-कार्य सीखने और आंखों पर नज़र रखने के उपायों के साथ अंग्रेजी भाषा के लिए अत्याधुनिक है। प्रथम-पास अवधि, कुल प्रतिगमन अवधि और कुल निर्धारण अवधि का उपयोग दो क्षणों में किया गया था; पहले भाषाई विशेषताओं के सबसेट का चयन करने के लिए और फिर बहु-कार्य और अनुक्रमिक सीखने के मॉडल में एक सहायक कार्य के रूप में। यहां प्रस्तावित सबसे अच्छा मॉडल 97.5% सटीकता 1 के साथ पुर्तगाली के लिए नए अत्याधुनिक तक पहुंचता है, जो हमारे सबसे अच्छे मॉडल की त्रुटियों का विश्लेषण करने के बाद सार्वजनिक डेटासेट में सुधार का प्रस्ताव करने के अलावा, सबसे अच्छे पिछले परिणामों की तुलना में लगभग 10 अंकों की वृद्धि है।', 'zh': '句复杂性评估自然语言处中一对新务。 其一于文本中突出何句更杂,以扶向受众(如儿童,认知障碍用户,非母语士低识字读者)简(ScartonSpecia,2018))。 用对齐句子对数集评估,兼一句之杂简版本。 其于巴西葡萄牙语,当任(Leal等,2018)决之,立首数集来评其语言之任,其准确性至87.8%。 今事因(Gonzalez-Gardun̈oSøgaard,2018)启而进之,有先进之英语,有多任务学眼动迹。 用初过持续时间,总归持续时间、总定持续时间。 先择子集,次多任务次学以为辅。 凡此诸最新葡萄牙水平,准确率为97.5%1,比于前者近10百分点,又析其尤者而改公共数据集。', 'ru': 'Оценка сложности предложения является относительно новой задачей в обработке естественного языка. Одна из его целей заключается в том, чтобы выделить в тексте, какие предложения являются более сложными для поддержки упрощения содержания для целевой аудитории (например, дети, когнитивно неполноценные пользователи, неродные носители языка и читатели с низкой грамотностью (Scarton and Specia, 2018)). Эта задача оценивается с использованием наборов данных пар выровненных предложений, включая сложную и простую версию одного и того же предложения. Для бразильского португальского эта задача была решена (Leal et al., 2018), который настроил первый набор данных для оценки задачи на этом языке, достигнув 87,8% точности с лингвистическими признаками. Настоящая работа продвигает эти результаты, используя модели, вдохновленные (Гонсалес-Гардун и Сёгаард, 2018), которые содержат самые современные для английского языка, с многозадачным обучением и мерами слежения за зрением. Продолжительность первого прохода, Общая продолжительность регрессии и Общая продолжительность фиксации использовались в два момента: сначала для выбора подмножества лингвистических признаков, а затем в качестве вспомогательной задачи в многозадачной и последовательной моделях обучения. Лучшая модель, предложенная здесь, достигает нового уровня развития португальского языка с точностью до 97,5% 1 , увеличившись почти на 10 пунктов по сравнению с лучшими предыдущими результатами, в дополнение к предлагаемым улучшениям в публичном наборе данных после анализа ошибок нашей лучшей модели.', 'ga': 'Tasc réasúnta nua i bPróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha is ea measúnú castachta abairtí. Ar cheann de na haidhmeanna atá aige is ea a aibhsiú i dtéacs cé na habairtí atá níos casta chun tacú le simpliú na n-ábhar do spriocghrúpa (m.sh., leanaí, úsáideoirí lagaithe cognaíocha, cainteoirí neamhdhúchasacha agus léitheoirí íseal-litearthachta (Scarton agus Specia, 2018) ). Déantar an tasc seo a mheas ag baint úsáide as tacair shonraí de phéirí abairtí ailínithe lena n-áirítear an leagan casta simplí den abairt chéanna. Maidir le Portaingéilis na Brasaíle, thug (Leal et al., 2018) aghaidh ar an tasc, a bhunaigh an chéad tacar sonraí chun an tasc a mheas sa teanga seo, ag baint amach 87.8% de chruinneas le gnéithe teanga. Cuireann an saothar reatha na torthaí seo chun cinn, ag baint úsáide as samhlacha arna n-inspioráid ag (Gonzalez-Gardun̈o agus Søgaard, 2018), a choinníonn an ceann is nua-aimseartha don Bhéarla, le bearta foghlama ilthascanna agus rianaithe súl. Baineadh úsáid as Fad an Chéad Phas, Fad Aischéimnithe Iomlán agus Fad an Fhosúcháin Iomlán in dhá nóiméad; ar dtús chun fothacar de ghnéithe teangeolaíochta a roghnú agus ansin mar thasc cúnta sna samhlacha ilthasc agus foghlama seicheamhaí. Sroicheann an tsamhail is fearr a mholtar anseo an staid nua-aimseartha do na Portaingéile le cruinneas 97.5% 1 , méadú de bheagnach 10 bpointe i gcomparáid leis na torthaí is fearr roimhe seo, chomh maith le feabhsuithe a mholadh ar an tacar sonraí poiblí tar éis anailís a dhéanamh ar na hearráidí de. ár múnla is fearr.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების კომპლექსიტეტის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი ახალი დავალება Natural Language Processing-ში. ერთი მიზეზი არის აღწეროთ ტექსტში, რომელიც სიტყვები უფრო კომპლექსია, რომ მიზედომის აუდიტორიისთვის შემხოლობა (მაგალითად, ბავშვები, კონციგურად დაკავშირებული მომხმარებელი, არ მიზედომი სიტყვებელ ეს დავალება განსაზღვრებულია იგივე სიტყვის კომპლექსი და მარტივი ვერსია. ბრაზილური პორტეგუტებისთვის დავალება (Leal et al., 2018), რომელიც პირველი მონაცემების სექტის დააყენება ამ ენაში დავამუშაოთ რაოდენობას, რომელიც ლინგუტიკური განსაზღვრებით 87.8%-ის წარმო მიმდინარე სამუშაო მუშაობა ამ შედეგების გარეშე, გამოყენებული მოდელების გამოყენება (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), რომლებიც ინგლისური ენერგიისთვის მრავალური მოსწავლება და მონაცემულების გარეშე მუშაობ პირველი გადასვლის სიგრძე, საერთო რეგრესის სიგრძე და საერთო დასწორებული სიგრძე ორი მონუსში გამოყენებულია; პირველად ლენგურისტიკური ფუნქციების სესესესეტის მონიშნოთ და შემდეგ მრავალური დავალების და სესექციური სწავლების მოდელში დახმარება. საუკეთესო მოდელი, რომელიც აქ ახლა წარმოიდგინეთ პორტეგური წარმოდგინეთს ახალი წარმოდგინეთის შესახებ 97,5% წარმოდგინეთებით 1, პირდაპირად 10 წარმოდგინეთების შესახებ უფრო უკეთესო წარმოდგინეთები', 'el': 'Η αξιολόγηση της πολυπλοκότητας των προτάσεων είναι μια σχετικά νέα εργασία στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Ένας από τους στόχους του είναι να αναδείξει σε ένα κείμενο ποιες προτάσεις είναι πιο σύνθετες ώστε να υποστηρίξει την απλοποίηση του περιεχομένου για ένα κοινό-στόχο (π.χ. παιδιά, χρήστες με νοητική διαταραχή, μη φυσικοί ομιλητές και αναγνώστες με χαμηλό γραμματισμό (Σκάρτον και Σπία, 2018)). Αυτή η εργασία αξιολογείται χρησιμοποιώντας σύνολα δεδομένων ζευγαριών ευθυγραμμισμένων προτάσεων συμπεριλαμβανομένης της σύνθετης και απλής έκδοσης της ίδιας πρότασης. Για τα βραζιλιάνικα πορτογαλικά, το έργο αντιμετωπίστηκε από (ο Leal et al., 2018), ο οποίος δημιούργησε το πρώτο σύνολο δεδομένων για την αξιολόγηση της εργασίας σε αυτή τη γλώσσα, επιτυγχάνοντας 87,8% ακρίβειας με γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά. Η παρούσα εργασία προωθεί τα αποτελέσματα αυτά, χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα εμπνευσμένα από (Gonzalez-Gardun o και S gaard, 2018), τα οποία κατέχουν την αιχμή της αγγλικής γλώσσας, με μέτρα εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών και παρακολούθησης των ματιών. Η διάρκεια πρώτου περάσματος, η συνολική διάρκεια αναδρομής και η συνολική διάρκεια καθορισμού χρησιμοποιήθηκαν σε δύο στιγμές. πρώτα να επιλέξει ένα υποσύνολο γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών και στη συνέχεια ως βοηθητική εργασία στα μοντέλα πολλαπλών εργασιών και διαδοχικής μάθησης. Το καλύτερο μοντέλο που προτείνεται εδώ φθάνει στη νέα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για τα πορτογαλικά με ακρίβεια 97,5% 1 και αύξηση σχεδόν δέκα σημείων σε σύγκριση με τα καλύτερα προηγούμενα αποτελέσματα, εκτός από την πρόταση βελτίωσης στο δημόσιο σύνολο δεδομένων μετά την ανάλυση των σφαλμάτων του καλύτερου μοντέλου μας.', 'hu': 'A mondatok összetettségének értékelése viszonylag új feladat a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában. Egyik célja, hogy egy szövegben kiemelje, mely mondatok bonyolultabbak a célközönség tartalmának egyszerűsítéséhez (pl. gyermekek, kognitív sérült felhasználók, nem anyanyelvűek és alacsony írástudású olvasók) (Scarton és Specie, 2018)). Ezt a feladatot összehangolt mondatpárok adatkészleteivel értékeljük, beleértve ugyanannak a mondatnak az összetett és egyszerű verzióját. A brazil portugál esetében a feladatot (Leal et al., 2018) állították össze, akik a feladat ezen a nyelven történő értékelésére szolgáló első adatkészletet hozták létre, és a nyelvi jellemzők 87,8%-os pontosságot értek el. A jelen munka ezeket az eredményeket (Gonzalez-Gardun o és S gaard, 2018) inspirált modelleket használ, amelyek az angol nyelv korszerűségét tartják, többfeladatos tanulási és szemkövető intézkedésekkel. Az első átmeneti időtartamot, a teljes regressziós időtartamot és a teljes rögzítési időtartamot két pillanatban használták; először kiválasztja a nyelvi jellemzők egy részhalmazát, majd kiegészítő feladatként a többfeladatos és szekvenciális tanulási modellekben. Az itt javasolt legjobb modell 97,5%-os pontossággal éri el a portugál új korszerűséget, ami a korábbi legjobb eredményekhez képest közel 10 pontos növekedést jelent, emellett javaslatot tesz a nyilvános adatkészletben a legjobb modellünk hibáinak elemzése után.', 'it': "La valutazione della complessità delle frasi è un compito relativamente nuovo nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Uno dei suoi obiettivi è quello di evidenziare in un testo quali frasi sono più complesse per sostenere la semplificazione dei contenuti per un pubblico target (ad esempio, bambini, utenti con disabilità cognitiva, non madrelingua e lettori con scarsa alfabetizzazione (Scarton e Specie, 2018)). Questa attività viene valutata utilizzando set di dati di coppie di frasi allineate, compresa la versione complessa e semplice della stessa frase. Per il portoghese brasiliano, il compito è stato affrontato da (Leal et al., 2018), che ha creato il primo dataset per valutare il compito in questa lingua, raggiungendo l'87,8% di accuratezza con le caratteristiche linguistiche. Il presente lavoro avanza questi risultati, utilizzando modelli ispirati a (Gonzalez-Gardun o e S gaard, 2018), che rappresentano lo stato dell'arte per la lingua inglese, con l'apprendimento multi-task e misure eye-tracking. La durata del primo passaggio, la durata totale della regressione e la durata totale della fissazione sono stati utilizzati in due momenti; prima selezionare un sottoinsieme di caratteristiche linguistiche e poi come attività ausiliaria nei modelli di apprendimento multi-task e sequenziale. Il miglior modello qui proposto raggiunge il nuovo stato dell'arte per il portoghese con una precisione del 97,5% 1 , un aumento di quasi 10 punti rispetto ai migliori risultati precedenti, oltre a proporre miglioramenti nel dataset pubblico dopo aver analizzato gli errori del nostro migliore modello.", 'ms': 'Sentence complexity assessment is a relatively new task in Natural Language Processing.  One of its aims is to highlight in a text which sentences are more complex to support the simplification of contents for a target audience (e.g., children, cognitively impaired users, non-native speakers and low-literacy readers (Scarton and Specia, 2018)).  Tugas ini diteliti menggunakan set data pasangan kalimat yang dijajar termasuk versi kompleks dan sederhana kalimat yang sama. For Brazilian Portuguese, the task was addressed by (Leal et al., 2018), who set up the first dataset to evaluate the task in this language, reaching 87.8% of accuracy with linguistic features.  The present work advances these results, using models inspired by (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), which hold the state-of-the-art for the English language, with multi-task learning and eye-tracking measures.  Panjang Laluan Pertama, Panjang Total Regresi dan Panjang Total Pembetulan digunakan dalam dua saat; pertama-tama untuk memilih subset ciri-ciri bahasa dan kemudian sebagai tugas bantuan dalam model pembelajaran berbilang-tugas dan urutan. Model terbaik yang diusulkan di sini mencapai state-of-the-art baru untuk Portugis dengan ketepatan 97.5% 1, meningkat hampir 10 titik dibandingkan dengan keputusan terbaik sebelumnya, selain mengusulkan peningkatan dalam set data awam selepas menganalisis ralat model terbaik kita.', 'lt': 'Sentence complexity assessment is a relatively new task in Natural Language Processing.  Vienas iš jos tikslų – tekste pabrėžti, kad sakiniai yra sudėtingesni siekiant paremti tikslinės auditorijos turinio supaprastinimą (pvz., vaikai, pažinties sutrikimai turintys vartotojai, neturtiniai kalbėtojai ir mažo raštingumo skaitytojai (Scarton ir Specia, 2018 m.). Ši užduotis vertinama naudojant suderintų sakinių porų duomenų rinkinius, įskaitant sudėtingą ir paprastą to paties sakinio versiją. For Brazilian Portuguese, the task was addressed by (Leal et al., 2018), who set up the first dataset to evaluate the task in this language, reaching 87.8% of accuracy with linguistic features.  The present work advances these results, using models inspired by (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), which hold the state-of-the-art for the English language, with multi-task learning and eye-tracking measures.  First-Pass Duration, Total Regression Duration and Total Fixation Duration were used in two moments;  pirmiausia pasirinkti kalbinių savybių pogrupį, o vėliau kaip pagalbinę užduotį daugiafunkciniuose ir sekaciniuose mokymosi modeliuose. Geriausias čia siūlomas modelis pasiekia naują pažangiausią portugalų kalbos padėtį 97,5 % tikslumu 1, t. y. beveik 10 punktų padidėjimą, palyginti su geriausiais ankstesniais rezultatais, be pasiūlymo patobulinti viešuosius duomenis analizavus geriausio modelio klaidas.', 'mk': 'Проценката на комплексноста на речениците е релативно нова задача во процесот на природен јазик. Една од нејзините цели е да се истакне во текст кој речениците се покомплексни за поддршка на поедноставувањето на содржината за целна публика (на пример, деца, корисници со когнитивно поголема влијание, не-родни говорници и читатели со ниска литература (Scarton and Specia, 2018)). Оваа задача е проценета со користење на датотеки од парови изедначени реченици вклучувајќи ја комплексната и едноставна верзија на истата реченица. За бразилскиот португалски, задачата беше решена од (Leal et al., 2018), кој го постави првиот податок за проценка на задачата на овој јазик, достигнувајќи 87,8 отсто од точноста со јазични карактеристики. Сегашната работа ги унапредува овие резултати, користејќи модели инспирирани од (Gonzalez-Gardun o и S gaard, 2018), кои ја држат најновата технологија за англискиот јазик, со мултизадачно учење и мерки за следење на очите. Траење на првата паса, вкупно траење на регресија и вкупно траење на фиксација беа употребени за два моменти; прво да избере подгрупа јазички карактеристики и потоа како помошна задача во мултизадачите и секвенцијалните модели на учење. Најдобар модел предложен тука достигнува нова најнова технологија за португалците со 97,5 отсто точност 1 , зголемување од скоро 10 поени во споредба со најдобрите претходни резултати, покрај предлогот за подобрувања во јавните податоци по анализата на грешките на нашиот најдобар модел.', 'kk': 'Сөздердің тәжірибесін бағалау - Тәуелсіздік тіл процессінде салыстырмалы жаңа тапсырма. Оның бірінші мақсаттары мақсатты аудиторияның мазмұнын қарапайым көңілдеу үшін мәтінді бояулау (мысалы, балалар, көңіл белсенді пайдаланушылар, негізгі сөйлемелер және оқытушылар (Scarton және Specia, 2018). Бұл тапсырма бір сұлбаның комплекс және қарапайым нұсқасының деректер қорларын қолданып бағалады. Бразилиялық португалшылық үшін тапсырманы (Leal et al., 2018) адрес етілді. Бұл тілде тапсырманы оқу үшін бірінші деректер жиынын орнатып, лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктермен 87,8% дұрыс жеткізді. Қазіргі жұмыс бұл нәтижелерді өзгертеді, бірнеше тапсырма оқыту мен көздерді қадағалау мерзімдері арқылы (Gonzalez-Gardun o және S gaard, 2018 жылы), ағылшын тілінің орындау күйінің күйінің күйінің күйінің к Бірінші жүктеу ұзақтығы, жалпы регрессия ұзақтығы мен жалпы жүктеу ұзақтығы екі уақытта қолданылды; біріншіден лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді таңдау және келесі оқыту үлгілерінде көмекші тапсырма ретінде таңдау үшін. Мұнда ұсынылған ең жақсы үлгі португальзға 97,5% деген дұрыс 1 деген жаңа орындау күйіне жеткізеді. Біздің ең жақсы үлгілеріміздің қателерін анализиядан кейін жалғастыру үшін әлемдік деректер жиынының жақсартуларын жұмы', 'no': 'Uttrykk for kompleksitet er ein relativt ny oppgåve i naturspråk- handsaming. Eit av dei målane er å markere i eit tekst som setningar er meir komplekse for å støtte enklaringa av innhaldet for e in målpublikum (f.eks. barn, kognitivt påvirka brukarar, ikkje-native taler og låg-bokstavarslesarar (Scarton og Specia, 2018). Denne oppgåva er evaluert med datasett av par justerte setningar, inkludert den komplekse og enkle versjonen av det same setninga. For Brasiliansk portugisisk oppgåva vart adressert av (Leal et al., 2018), som setja opp den første datasettet for å evaluera oppgåva i denne språket, og når 87,8 % av nøyaktighet med språk. Den gjeldande arbeidet forbedrar disse resultatene med modeller inspirert av (Gonzalez-Gardun o og S gaard, 2018), som held tilstanden til kunsten for engelsk språk, med fleire oppgåver læring og øysporing. Tid for første passar, totalt regresjonsgrad og totalt fikkingsgrad vart brukt i to minutt; for første for å velja ein del av språkstiske funksjonar og så som ein hjelpeoppgåve i fleire oppgåver og sekvensiske læringsmodelane. Den beste modellen som er foreslått her når det nye kunsttilstanden for portugisisk med 97,5% nøyaktighet 1, en økning av nesten 10 punkt sammenlignet med dei beste førre resultatene, i tillegg til å foreslå forbedringar i offentlige datasettet etter å analysera feilen i vår beste modell.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണസങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലിയാണ്. ലക്ഷ്യശ്രദ്ധികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കം ലളിതമാക്കാന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒന്നിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ്. കുട്ടികള്\u200d,  ഈ ജോലി ഒരേ വാക്കിന്റെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ രണ്ട് ജോഡികളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിലാസപ്രകാര ബ്രാസീലിയന്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ട്ഗുഗീസിന് വേണ്ടി ഈ ഭാഷയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് സ്ഥാപിച്ചിരുന്നു. 87. 8% ശരിയായ വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ ഭാ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ജോലിയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (ഗോണ്\u200dസാലേസ്-ഗാര്\u200dദുന്\u200d ഓ, എസ് ഗാര്\u200dഡ്, 2018), ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള സ്റ് ആദ്യ- പാസ് കാലം, മൊത്തം റിഗ്രഷന്\u200d സമയവും മൊത്തം ഫിക്സിഷന്\u200d സമയവും രണ്ടു നിമിഷത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു; first to select a subset of linguistic features and then as an auxiliary task in the multi-task and sequential learning models.  ഇവിടെ നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷിന്റെ പുതിയ സ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് എത്തുന്നു. 97. 5% കൃത്യം 1, നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡലിന്റെ പിശകുകള്\u200d പരിശോ', 'pl': 'Ocena złożoności zdań jest stosunkowo nowym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Jednym z jego celów jest podkreślenie w tekście, które zdania są bardziej złożone, aby wspierać uproszczenie treści dla odbiorców docelowych (np. dzieci, użytkownicy z upośledzeniem poznawczym, osoby niebędące native speakerami oraz czytelników o niskim poziomie pisania czytania (Scarton i Specia, 2018)). Zadanie to jest oceniane za pomocą zbiorów danych par wyrównanych zdań, w tym złożonej i prostej wersji tego samego zdania. W przypadku portugalskiego brazylijskiego zadanie zostało zajęte (Leal et al., 2018), który stworzył pierwszy zestaw danych do oceny zadania w tym języku, osiągając 87,8% dokładności z cechami językowymi. Niniejsza praca rozwija te wyniki, wykorzystując modele inspirowane (Gonzalez-Gardun o i S gaard, 2018), które posiadają najnowocześniejsze dla języka angielskiego, z wielozadaniowymi środkami uczenia się i śledzenia oczu. Czas trwania pierwszego przejścia, całkowity czas trwania regresji i całkowity czas trwania ustawienia zostały użyte w dwóch momentach; Najpierw wybrać podzbiór cech językowych, a następnie jako zadanie pomocnicze w modelach uczenia się wielozadaniowego i sekwencyjnego. Najlepszy proponowany tutaj model osiąga nowy state-of-the-art dla portugalskiego z dokładnością 97,5% o wzrost prawie dziesięciu punktów w porównaniu z najlepszymi poprzednimi wynikami, oprócz proponowania ulepszeń publicznego zbioru danych po analizie błędów naszego najlepszego modelu.', 'mt': 'Il-valutazzjoni tal-kumplessità tas-sentenzi hija kompitu relattivament ġdid fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Wieħed mill-g ħanijiet tiegħu huwa li jenfasizza f’test li s-sentenzi huma aktar kumplessi biex jappoġġjaw is-simplifikazzjoni tal-kontenut għal udjenza fil-mira (pereżempju, tfal, utenti b’indeboliment konjittiv, kelliema mhux nattivi u qarrejja b’litteriżmu baxx (Scarton u Specia, 2018)). Dan il-kompitu huwa evalwat bl-użu ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi allinjati inklużi l-verżjoni kumplessa u sempliċi tal-istess sentenza. Għall-Portugiż Brażiljan, il-kompitu ġie indirizzat minn (Leal et al., 2018), li stabbilixxa l-ewwel sett ta’ dejta biex jevalwa l-kompitu f’dan il-lingwa, u laħaq 87.8% tal-preċiżjoni b’karatteristiċi lingwistiċi. Ix-xogħol preżenti javvanza dawn ir-riżultati, bl-użu ta’ mudelli ispirati minn (Gonzalez-Gardun o u S gaard, 2018), li jżommu l-aktar avvanzati għall-lingwa Ingliża, b’miżuri ta’ tagħlim multikompitu u ta’ monitoraġġ tal-għajnejn. It-Tul tal-Ewwel Pass, it-Tul Totali tar-Regressjoni u t-Tul Totali tal-Fissazzjoni ntużaw f’żewġ minuti; first to select a subset of linguistic features and then as an auxiliary task in the multi-task and sequential learning models.  L-aħjar mudell propost hawnhekk jilħaq l-aġġornament il-ġdid għall-Portugiż b’97,5 % preċiżjoni 1, żieda ta’ kważi 10 punti meta mqabbel mal-aħjar riżultati preċedenti, flimkien mal-proposta ta’ titjib fis-sett pubbliku tad-dejta wara l-analiżi tal-iżbalji tal-aħjar mudell tagħna.', 'mn': 'Үүний төвөгтэй байдлын хэл процесс дээр харьцангуй шинэ ажил юм. Үүний нэг зорилго нь өгүүлбэрийг илүү нарийн тодорхойлох нь зорилготой сонсогчдын биетийг хялбарчлах (жишээ нь хүүхдүүд, ухааны нөлөөлдөг хэрэглэгчид, орон нутгийн илтгэгчид болон уншигчид бага хэмжээний уншигчид (Скартон болон Специа, 2018)). Энэ үйл ажиллагаа ижил өгүүлбэрийн комплекс болон энгийн хувилбарыг ашиглан өгөгдлийн хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглан үнэлдэг. Бразилийн Португалийн хувьд үүнийг (Leal et al., 2018) хэлний ажлыг үнэлэх анхны өгөгдлийн санг зохион байгуулсан бөгөөд хэлний хувьд 87.8% нь зөв байдалтай хүртсэн. Одоо байгаа ажлын үр дүнг хөгжүүлдэг. Олон ажлын суралцах, нүдний дагах үйл ажиллагааг ашиглаж байгаа загваруудыг ашиглаж байна. Нэгт хаягийн хугацаанд, нийт хаягдлын хугацаанд, нийт хаягдлын хугацаанд хоёр минутанд хэрэглэгдсэн. анх хэлний чадварыг сонгож, дараа нь олон ажлын, дараагийн суралцах загварын тусламжтай ажил болсон. Хамгийн шилдэг загвар нь Португалийн шинэ урлагийн хувьд 97.5% зөв 1 байдаг. Хамгийн сайн загварын алдаа шинжилгээний дараа олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн сангийн сайжруулалтын сайжруулалтын дараа бараг 10 цэг нэмэгдсэн.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta dhibaatada daryeelku waa shaqo cusub oo ku saabsan baaritaanka afka asalka ah. Mid ka mid ah waxyaabaha uu ku hagaajiyo qoraal ay ku qoran yihiin in aad ka adag tahay in ay kaalmeeyaan fududaada waxyaabaha ay ku jirto dhegaha la jeedo (tusaale ahaan carruurta, isticmaalayaasha aqoonta naafada leh, hadalka aan hooyo ahayn iyo akhriyayaasha hoos u qoran (sayniska iyo khaas, 2018). Shaqadan waxaa lagu qiimeynayaa isticmaalka macluumaadka labada is-noocyo oo isku qoran erayo, kaas oo ah versiyaha adag iyo fudud ee isku geyman. Shaqada Brazilian oo Burtuqiis ah waxaa lagu sameeyay (Leal et al., 2018), kaas oo qotomiyey kooxda macluumaadka ugu horeeyay si uu u qiimeeyo shaqada afkan, wuxuuna gaadhay 87.8% si saxda ah oo ku saxda aqoonta luuqada. The present work advances these results, using models inspired by (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), which hold the state-of-the-art for the English language, with multi-task learning and eye-tracking measures.  Waqtiga ugu horeysa ee baasabka, waqtiga diiwaangelinta guud iyo waqtiga la soo jiiday dhamaan labada saacadood; marka ugu horeysa in aad doorato koob ka mid ah aqoonta luuqadda, kadibna aad u sameyneyso samooyinka waxbarashada kala duduwan iyo sidoo kale. Tusaale ugu wanaagsan ee halkan lagu soo jeeday wuxuu gaadhaa xaalada cusub ee Burtuqiis oo ku qoran 97.5 boqolkiiba saxda 1, wuxuuna korodaa qiyaastii 10 barbaar oo isbarbarbardhiga resultiyada ugu wanaagsan ee hore, taas oo dheer in lagu hagaajiyo hagaajinta macluumaadka dadweynaha kadib, baaritaanka qaladka modellkayaga ugu wanaagsan kadib.', 'sv': 'Bedömning av meningskomplexitet är en relativt ny uppgift inom Natural Language Processing. Ett av dess mål är att i en text lyfta fram vilka meningar som är mer komplexa för att stödja förenkling av innehåll för en målgrupp (t.ex. barn, kognitivt nedsatta användare, icke-infödda talare och lågläskunniga läsare (Scarton och Specie, 2018)). Denna uppgift utvärderas med hjälp av datauppsättningar av par av justerade meningar inklusive den komplexa och enkla versionen av samma mening. För brasiliansk portugisiska hanterades uppgiften av (Leal m.fl., 2018), som skapade den första datauppsättningen för att utvärdera uppgiften på detta språk och nådde 87,8% av noggrannheten med språkliga egenskaper. Detta arbete lyfter fram dessa resultat genom att använda modeller inspirerade av (Gonzalez-Gardun o och S gaard, 2018), som håller det senaste inom engelska språket, med multi-task lärande och eyetracking åtgärder. Första passets längd, total regressionstid och total fixeringstid användes i två ögonblick; först för att välja en delmängd språkliga funktioner och sedan som en hjälpuppgift i modellerna för fleruppgifts- och sekventiell inlärning. Den bästa modellen som föreslås här når den nya toppmoderna för portugisiska med 97,5% noggrannhet 1 , en ökning med nästan 10 poäng jämfört med de bästa tidigare resultaten, förutom att föreslå förbättringar i den offentliga datauppsättningen efter analys av felen i vår bästa modell.', 'ro': 'Evaluarea complexității sentințelor este o sarcină relativ nouă în procesarea limbajului natural. Unul dintre obiectivele sale este de a evidenția într-un text propozițiile care sunt mai complexe pentru a sprijini simplificarea conținutului pentru un public țintă (de exemplu, copii, utilizatori cu deficiențe cognitive, vorbitori non-nativi și cititori cu alfabetizare scăzută (Scarton și Specie, 2018)). Această activitate este evaluată folosind seturi de date de perechi de propoziții aliniate, inclusiv versiunea complexă și simplă a aceleiași propoziții. Pentru portugheza braziliană, sarcina a fost abordată de (Leal et al., 2018), care a creat primul set de date pentru evaluarea sarcinii în această limbă, atingând 87,8% din acuratețe cu caracteristicile lingvistice. Lucrarea de față avansează aceste rezultate, folosind modele inspirate din (Gonzalez-Gardun o și S gaard, 2018), care dețin stadiul de ultimă oră pentru limba engleză, cu învățare multi-task și măsuri de monitorizare a ochilor. Durata primului pas, durata regresiei totale si durata fixarii totale au fost utilizate in doua momente; mai întâi pentru a selecta un subset de caracteristici lingvistice și apoi ca sarcină auxiliară în modelele de învățare multi-sarcină și secvențială. Cel mai bun model propus aici ajunge la noul state-of-the-art pentru portugheză cu o acuratețe de 97,5% 1 , o creștere de aproape 10 puncte comparativ cu cele mai bune rezultate anterioare, pe lângă propunerea de îmbunătățiri în setul de date publice după analizarea erorilor celui mai bun model al nostru.', 'ta': 'Sentence complexity assessment is a relatively new task in Natural Language Processing.  இலக்கு பார்ப்பவர்களுக்கு உள்ளடக்கத்தை எளிதாக்குவதற்கு வாக்குகள் மிகவும் சிக்கலானது என்பது ஒரு உரையில் ஒன்றை தனிப்படுத்த வேண்டும் (உ. ம். குழந்தைகள், அறிவில்லாத பேச்சாளர்கள், தா இந்த செயல் ஒரே வாக்கியத்தின் சிக்கல் மற்றும் எளிய பதிப்பு ப்ராசிலியன் போர்த்துகீசிஷுக்காக இந்த மொழியில் செயலை மதிப்பிட முதல் தகவல் அமைத்து, 87. 8% சரியான மொழி குணங்களுடன் அடைந்தது. தற்போதைய வேலை இந்த முன்னேற்றத்தை முன்னேறுகிறது, மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது (Gonzalez- Gardun o மற்றும் S gaard, 2018), அது ஆங்கிலத்திற்கான கலைஞர் நிலைமையை பிடித் முதல் கடவுச் செல்லும் கால, மொத்த பதிவுக் கால அளவு மற்றும் மொத்த வரிசைப்படுத்தல் கால இடைவெளி மொழி குணங்களை தேர்ந்தெடு இங்கே பரிந்துரைக்கப்படும் சிறந்த மாதிரி போர்த்துகீசிஷ் புதிய நிலையில் அடையும் 97. 5% சரியாக 1, கிட்டத்தட்ட 10 புள்ளிகளின் அதிகம் முந்தைய முடிவுகளை ஒப்பிடும்,', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සංවේදනය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණයේ අලුත් වැඩක්. One of its Targes is to Highlight in a text that Words are more comprehensed to assist the strairification of contingencies for a Targe Auditor (e.g., ළමයි, පරීක්ෂණික පරීක්ෂකයි, non-native speakers and low-litterability readers (Scaerton and espea, 2018)). මේ කාර්ය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ එකම වාක්යේ සංකෘත සහ සරල සංකෘතිය සඳහා දත්ත සෙට් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. බ්\u200dරාජිලියානු පොර්තුතුජියානු වෙනුවෙන්, කාර්ය (Leal et al., 2018), මේ භාෂාවේ පළමු දත්ත සූදානය සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ මේ භාෂාවේ ව මේ වැඩේ මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරවේශයක්, 2018 වල පළමු පාස් කාලය, සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සහ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙ මුලින්ම භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් තෝරාගන්න, ඊට පස්සේ විශේෂ වැඩක් සහ පස්සේ ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදිහට උ මෙතන හොඳම මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පොර්ටුගුලිස් වලට අළුත් ස්ථානයක් ලැබෙනවා 97.5% සිද්ධතාවක් 1 සඳහා, පොර්ටුගුලිස් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 10 ක් වැ', 'sr': 'Procjena kompleksnosti kazne je relativno novi zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Jedan od njenih ciljeva je da istakne tekst koji su rečenice kompleksnije da podrži pojednostavljenje sadržaja ciljne publike (npr. djece, kognitivno oštećene korisnike, neproditelji govornici i čitači niskog pisanja (Scarton i Specia, 2018)). Ovaj zadatak se procjenjuje koristeći kompleksni i jednostavnu verziju iste rečenice. Za Brazilski portugalski zadatak je rešio (Leal et al., 2018), koji je postavio prvi set podataka za procjenu zadataka na ovom jeziku, ostvario 87,8% tačnosti sa jezičkim karakteristikama. Sadašnji rad napreduje te rezultate, koristeći modele inspirisane od strane (Gonzalez-Gardun o i S gaard, 2018), koji drže držanje umjetnosti za engleski jezik, sa mnogim mjerama učenja i praćenja oka. Prvi prolaz, ukupno trajanje regresije i ukupno trajanje fiksiranja korišteno je u dva trenutka; prvo izabrati podskup jezičkih karakteristika i onda kao pomoćni zadatak u multi task i sekvencijalnim modelima učenja. Najbolji model koji je predložen ovde stigao je do novog stanja umjetnosti za portugalce sa tačnošću 97,5% 1, povećanje skoro 10 bodova u usporedbi sa najboljim prethodnim rezultatima, osim predloženja poboljšanja u javnom setu podataka nakon analiziranja grešaka našeg najboljeg modela.', 'ur': 'سنت پیچیدگی آزمائش ایک نسبتا نئی تابع ہے طبیعی زبان پرسس میں. اس کی ایک هدف یہ ہے کہ ایک متن میں ہیلاکت کریں جس کا کلمہ ایک موجود اڈیوس کے لئے موجود موجود موجود کے سادھاتے کی مدد کرنا زیادہ پیچیدہ ہے۔ یہ کام ایک ہی جماعت کے پیچیدہ اور ساده نسخہ کے مطابق ڈاٹ سٹ کے جوڑوں کے مطابق ارزش کیا جاتا ہے. برازیلی پورتوګیز کے لئے یہ کام (Leal et al., 2018) کے ذریعے (لیل et al., 2018) کے ذریعے اضافہ کیا گیا تھا جو اس زبان میں کام کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے پہلے ڈیٹ سٹ بنایا گیا تھا، اور زبان ویژگی ویژگی کے ساتھ 87.8% دقیق پہنچ گیا یہ موجود عمل ان نتائج کو آگے بڑھتا ہے، اس طرح (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018) کے ذریعے الفظ کے مطابق مثالیں استعمال کرتے ہیں، جو انگلیسی زبان کے لئے انگلیسی زبان کے لئے استعمال کرتی ہیں، بہت سے کاموں کی تعلیم اور آنکھوں کی تعلیم کے مطابق۔ پہلی پاس کی مدت، کل ریگرس کی مدت اور کل فیکسٹس کی مدت دو دقیقه میں استعمال کی گئی تھی; سب سے پہلے زبان شناسی فوائل کا ایک سوسٹ انتخاب کرنا اور پھر multi-task اور سفارشی سیکھنے کی موڈل میں ایک مددگار کام بنانا۔ یہاں سب سے بہترین مدل پہنچا گیا ہے کہ پورتوگل کے لئے نئی حالت کی آرتی پورتوگل کے لئے 97.5% دقیق 1 کے ساتھ پہنچ جاتی ہے، تقریباً 10 نقطے کی زیادتی پہلے کے نتیجے کے مقابلہ میں، اور ہمارے بہترین مدل کی خطائیں تحلیل کے بعد پورتوگل کے لئے عمومی ڈیٹ', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi phức tạp là một nhiệm vụ tương đối mới trong Quá trình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Một trong những mục tiêu của nó là nhấn mạnh trong một văn bản mà câu án phức tạp hơn để hỗ trợ sự đơn giản của nội dung đối với một khán giả bị ảnh hưởng (ví dụ, trẻ em, người dùng bị suy giảm nhận thức, người nói không dân tộc và người đọc chữ ít chữ cái (Scarton và Specia, 2008). Nhiệm vụ này được đánh giá bằng các tập tin các câu được nối, gồm cả phiên bản phức tạp và đơn giản của cùng một câu. Đối với người Bồ Đào Nha Brazil, nhiệm vụ được thực hiện bởi người đã thiết lập một bộ dữ liệu đầu tiên để đánh giá nhiệm vụ trong ngôn ngữ này, tiến đến 87.8. độ chính xác với các tính năng ngôn ngữ. Công việc hiện nay phát triển kết quả dựa trên các mô hình được truyền cảm hứng từ: Gonzales-Gardun và S gaard, thẩm mĩ), sở hữu phương pháp dạy học nhiều nhiệm vụ và the o dõi mắt. Thời gian thứ nhất, Thời gian Hồi phục tổng hợp và Thời gian trọn đè đã được sử dụng trong hai khoảnh khắc. Trước tiên chọn một nhóm các tính năng ngôn ngữ và sau đó là một nhiệm vụ phụ thuộc trong các mô hình học đa nhiệm vụ và nối tiếp. Cách tốt nhất ở đây là đạt đến mức độ chính xác cao nhất của Bồ Đào Nha với 97.5.5.1, một tăng số điểm gần mười so với kết quả tốt nhất trước đây, thêm vào đề xuất cải tiến bộ bộ dữ liệu công cộng sau khi phân tích sai lầm của mô hình tốt nhất của chúng ta.', 'uz': "Name Bu tilning biri maqsadi, bu so'zlar maqsadlarning tarkibini foydalanuvchilarga qo'llashni qo'llash uchun juda murakkab bo'lgan matnni koʻrsatish mumkin (m. g. bolalar, natijadagi foydalanuvchilar, mahalliy tillar va haqiqida taʼminlik oʻquvchilar (Skarton va Diqqat, 2018). @ info Braziliya portugisiga ishni qiymatish uchun birinchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini boshlagan edi. Lugʻatdagi imkoniyatlar bilan 87.8% imkoniyatlarni aniqlash mumkin. Joriy ish natijalari bu natijalarni bajaradi, boshqa vazifa o'rganish va ko'plab o'rganish amallar bilan ishlatiladi (Gonzalez-Gardun o va S gaard, 2018), bir necha vazifa o'rganish va ko'zlarni o'rganish amallari bilan foydalanadi. Birinchi vaqt birinchi tillar xossalarini tanlash uchun birinchi darajada, keyin muloqat va keyin o'rganish modellarida yetarli vazifani tanlash uchun. Bu yerda ilova qilingan eng yaxshi modeli Portugalcha yangi sanat holatiga yetishadi 97.5% aniqligi 1 bilan, yaxshi 10 pointning ko'payishi oldingi eng yaxshi natijaga kamaytirish, eng yaxshi darajaga o'zgarishni tasavvur qilishdan keyin umumiy maʼlumotlar tartibini taʼminlovchi soʻzlarga o'zgartirish.", 'da': 'Vurdering af sætningskompleksibilitet er en relativt ny opgave i Natural Language Processing. Et af dens formål er i en tekst at fremhæve, hvilke sætninger der er mere komplekse for at understøtte forenklingen af indholdet for en målgruppe (f.eks. børn, kognitivt nedsatte brugere, ikke-indfødte talere og læsere med lav læsefærdighed (Scarton og Specie, 2018)). Denne opgave evalueres ved hjælp af datasæt af par af justerede sætninger, herunder den komplekse og enkle version af samme sætning. For brasiliansk portugisisk blev opgaven løst af (Leal et al., 2018), som oprettede det første datasæt til at evaluere opgaven på dette sprog og nåede 87,8% af nøjagtigheden med sproglige træk. Det nuværende arbejde fremmer disse resultater ved hjælp af modeller inspireret af (Gonzalez-Gardun o og S gaard, 2018), som holder det nyeste for engelsk sprog, med multi-task learning og eyetracking foranstaltninger. First-Pass Varighed, Total Regression Varighed og Total Fixation Varighed blev brugt i to øjeblikke; først at vælge en delmængde sproglige funktioner og derefter som en hjælpeopgave i flere opgaver og sekventielle læringsmodeller. Den bedste model, der foreslås her, når den nye state-of-the-art for portugisisk med 97,5% nøjagtighed 1 , en stigning på næsten 10 point i forhold til de bedste tidligere resultater, ud over at foreslå forbedringer i det offentlige datasæt efter analyse af fejlene i vores bedste model.', 'hr': 'Procjena složenosti kazne je relativno novi zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Jedan od njihovih ciljeva je istaknuti u tekstu koji su rečenice složenije za podršku pojednostavljenja sadržaja ciljne publike (npr. djece, kognitivno oštećene korisnike, neproditelji govornici i čitači niskog pisanja (Scarton i Specia, 2018)). Ovaj zadatak se procjenjuje koristeći kompleksni i jednostavne verzije iste rečenice podataka par poravnanih rečenica. Za Brazilski portugalski zadatak je riješio (Leal et al., 2018), koji je postavio prvu dataset za procjenu zadataka na ovom jeziku, ostvario 87,8% tačnosti sa jezičkim karakteristikama. Sadašnji rad napreduje te rezultate, koristeći modele inspirisane od strane (Gonzalez-Gardun o i S gaard, 2018), koji drže držanje umjetnosti za engleski jezik, s mnogim mjerama učenja i praćenja o čiju. Trenutak prvog prolaza, ukupno trajanje regresije i ukupno trajanje popravke korišteno je u dva trenutka; prvo izabrati podskup jezičkih karakteristika, a zatim kao pomoćni zadatak u multi task i sekvencijalnim modelima učenja. Najbolji model koji je predložen ovdje stigao je do novog stanja umjetnosti portugalca s preciznošću 97,5% 1 , povećanje skoro 10 bodova u usporedbi s najboljim prethodnim rezultatima, osim predloženja poboljšanja u javnom setu podataka nakon analiziranja grešaka našeg najboljeg modela.', 'bg': 'Оценката на сложността на изречението е сравнително нова задача в обработката на естествения език. Една от целите му е да се подчертае в текста кои изречения са по-сложни, за да се подпомогне опростяването на съдържанието за целевата аудитория (например деца, потребители с увредено съзнание, чуждоезикови и читатели с ниска грамотност (Скартън и Специя, 2018)). Тази задача се оценява с помощта на набори от данни от двойки подравнени изречения, включително сложната и проста версия на едно и също изречение. За бразилския португалски, задачата бе адресирана от (Лейл и др., 2018), които създадоха първия набор от данни за оценка на задачата на този език, достигайки 87,8% точност с лингвистични характеристики. Настоящата работа постига тези резултати, като използва модели, вдъхновени от (Гонзалес-Гардун о и С гард, 2018), които държат най-съвременните технологии за английския език, с многозадачи за учене и проследяване на очите. Продължителност на първо преминаване, продължителност на общата регресия и продължителност на общата фиксиране бяха използвани в два момента; първо да изберете поднабор от езикови характеристики, а след това като спомагателна задача в многозадачите и последователните модели на обучение. Най-добрият модел, предложен тук, достига до новото състояние на изкуството за португалския с 97.5% точност 1 , увеличение с почти 10 пункта спрямо най-добрите предишни резултати, освен че предлага подобрения в обществения набор от данни след анализ на грешките на нашия най-добър модел.', 'de': 'Die Beurteilung der Komplexität von Sätzen ist eine relativ neue Aufgabe in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Eines seiner Ziele ist es, in einem Text hervorzuheben, welche Sätze komplexer sind, um die Vereinfachung der Inhalte für eine Zielgruppe (z.B. Kinder, kognitiv beeinträchtigte Nutzer, Nicht-Muttersprachler und Leser mit geringer Alphabetisierung (Scarton und Specia, 2018)) zu unterstützen. Diese Aufgabe wird anhand von Datensätzen von Paaren von aufeinander abgestimmten Sätzen ausgewertet, einschließlich der komplexen und einfachen Version desselben Satzes. Für Brasilianisches Portugiesisch wurde die Aufgabe von (Leal et al., 2018) bearbeitet, der den ersten Datensatz zur Auswertung der Aufgabe in dieser Sprache einrichtete und 87,8% der Genauigkeit mit linguistischen Merkmalen erreichte. Die vorliegende Arbeit führt diese Ergebnisse voran, indem sie Modelle verwendet, die inspiriert sind von (Gonzalez-Gardun o und S gaard, 2018), die den Stand der Technik für die englische Sprache halten, mit Multi-Task-Learning und Eye-Tracking-Maßnahmen. First-Pass Duration, Total Regression Duration und Total Fixation Duration wurden in zwei Momenten verwendet; Zunächst wird eine Teilmenge sprachlicher Merkmale ausgewählt und dann als Hilfsaufgabe in den Mehraufgaben- und sequenziellen Lernmodellen. Das beste Modell, das hier vorgeschlagen wird, erreicht den neuen Stand der Technik für Portugiesisch mit 97,5% Genauigkeit 1,eine Erhöhung von fast zehn Punkten im Vergleich zu den besten vorherigen Ergebnissen, zusätzlich schlägt es Verbesserungen im öffentlichen Datensatz vor, nachdem die Fehler unseres besten Modells analysiert wurden.', 'ko': '문장의 복잡성 평가는 자연 언어 처리에서 상대적으로 새로운 임무이다.그 목적 중 하나는 텍스트에서 어떤 문장이 더 복잡한지 강조하여 목표 시청자(예를 들어 어린이, 인지장애 사용자, 비모국어인과 저식자율 독자)를 위해 내용을 간소화하는 것이다(Scarton and Special, 2018).이 작업은 같은 문장의 복잡함과 간단한 버전을 포함하여 문장을 정렬하는 데이터 집합으로 평가한다.브라질 포르투갈어에 대해 임무는 (Leal et al., 2018)에 의해 완성되었다. 그는 처음으로 이런 언어로 임무를 평가하는 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 언어 특징의 정확도는 87.8%에 달했다.현재의 연구는 곤잘레즈 가두노와 Sgaard(2018)가 제시한 모델을 활용해 이러한 결과를 추진하고 있으며, 이 모델은 영어 언어의 최첨단 수준을 갖추고 있어 멀티태스킹 학습과 눈 추적 조치를 취했다.두 시간에 처음으로 지속 시간, 총 회귀 지속 시간과 총 주시 지속 시간을 사용한다.먼저 언어 특징 서브집합을 선택한 다음에 다중 임무와 순서 학습 모델의 보조 임무로 한다.여기에 제시된 최적 모델은 포르투갈어의 최신 수준에 이르렀고 정확도는 97.5%로 이전의 최적 결과보다 10%포인트 가까이 증가했다. 또한 최적 모델의 오류를 분석한 후에 공공 데이터 집합에 대한 개선도 제시했다.', 'nl': 'Het beoordelen van de complexiteit van zinnen is een relatief nieuwe taak in Natural Language Processing. Een van de doelstellingen is om in een tekst te benadrukken welke zinnen complexer zijn om de vereenvoudiging van de inhoud voor een doelgroep te ondersteunen (bijvoorbeeld kinderen, cognitief gehandicapten, niet-moedertaalsprekers en lezers met lage geletterdheid (Scarton en Specia, 2018)). Deze taak wordt geëvalueerd met behulp van datasets van paren uitgelijnde zinnen, inclusief de complexe en eenvoudige versie van dezelfde zin. Voor Braziliaans Portugees werd de taak aangepakt door (Leal et al., 2018), die de eerste dataset heeft opgezet om de taak in deze taal te evalueren en 87,8% van nauwkeurigheid met taalkundige kenmerken bereikte. Het huidige werk verbetert deze resultaten, met behulp van modellen geïnspireerd op (Gonzalez-Gardun o en S gaard, 2018), die de state-of-the-art voor de Engelse taal houden, met multi-task learning en eye-tracking maatregelen. First-Pass Duur, Totale Regressie Duur en Totale Fixatie Duur werden gebruikt in twee momenten; Eerst een subset taalkundige kenmerken selecteren en vervolgens als hulptaak in de multitask- en sequentiële leermodellen. Het beste model dat hier wordt voorgesteld bereikt de nieuwe state-of-the-art voor Portugees met 97,5% nauwkeurigheid 1,een verhoging van bijna tien punten ten opzichte van de beste eerdere resultaten, naast het voorstellen van verbeteringen in de publieke dataset na analyse van de fouten van ons beste model.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa utata wa sentenca ni kazi mpya kwa kiasi kikubwa katika mchakato wa lugha ya asili. Moja ya malengo yake ni kuonyesha katika maandishi ambayo hukumu ni ngumu zaidi kuunga mkono urahisi wa maudhui kwa ajili ya hadhira ya lengo (mfano, watoto, watumiaji wasio na asili na wasomaji wa elimu ya chini (Sayansi na Tafsiri, 2018). Kazi hii inapitishwa kwa kutumia seti za takwimu mbili za hukumu zilizotengenezwa ikiwa ni pamoja na toleo la tatizo na rahisi la hukumu hiyo. Kwa Kireno ya Brazil, kazi hiyo ilitumiwa na (Leal et al., 2018), ambaye aliweka seti ya kwanza ya takwimu ili kutathmini kazi katika lugha hii, akifikia asilimia 87.8 ya uhakika na tabia za lugha. Kazi za sasa zinaboresha matokeo haya, kwa kutumia mifano inayohamasishwa na Gonzalez-Gardun o na S gaard, 2018, ambayo inabeba hali ya sanaa kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, kwa njia ya kujifunza na kuchunguza macho. Dura ya Pass ya kwanza, Dura ya Udhibiti Mkuu na Uchunguzi wa jumla ulitumika katika dakika mbili; first to select a subset of linguistic features and then as an auxiliary task in the multi-task and sequential learning models.  Mfano bora ulipendekezwa hapa unafikia hali mpya ya sanaa ya Kireno yenye asilimia 97.5 ya sahihi 1 , kuongezeka kwa karibu pointi 10 ukilinganisha na matokeo bora yaliyopita, pamoja na kupendekeza maboresho katika seti ya takwimu za umma baada ya uchambuzi wa makosa ya mifano yetu bora.', 'tr': 'Sözleriň karmaşıklyklyklyk çözümlenmesi Tebiýal dil işleminde relativ täze bir täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täze. Onuň amasynyň biri sözleriň maksady publikasynyň (meselä, çagalar, bilinämli hasaplanýan ullanyşlar, ene çykyşlar we düşük-edeňsiz okuwçylary (Scarton we Specia, 2018). Bu zady bir sözleniň karmaşık we basit wersiýasynda çyzyglanylan çift sanlaryny ullanýar Braziliýa portugalça üçin bu zady (Leal et al., 2018) tarapyndan berildi. Olar bu dilde bu zady çözmek üçin ilkinji dataseti guruldy, dil özellikleri bilen dogrylyklygynyň 87.8%-ine ýet ýär. Häzirki işi şu netijeleri gelip ýörän, Gonzalez-Gardun o we S gaard(2018-nji ýyl) tarapyndan ilham alyp gelen nusgalary ullanýarlar. Bu iňlisçe dilde birnäçe işi öwrenmek we göz izlemek isleýän nusgalary bar. Ilkinji gezek Wagtlaýyşy, Halkara Regression Wagtlaýyşy we Halkara Azlyk Wagtlaýyşy iki minutda ullanýardy; Ilkinji dil hatlarynyň bir toparyny saýlamak üçin, soňra birnäçe-täblik we soňky öwrenme nusgalarynda kömek etmek üçin bir işi saýlamak üçin. Bu ýerde teklip eden iň gowy nusga Portugalça taýýarlanmasy 97.5% derejesi 1 bilen ýetýär, iň gowy nusgalarymyzdan soňra 10 punkt art ýar.', 'af': "Soektog kompleksiteit-evaluering is 'n relativief nuwe taak in Natuurlike Taal-Prosessering. Een van sy doel is om in 'n teks te verlig wat setings meer kompleks is om die eenvoudiging van inhoud vir 'n doel publiek te ondersteun (bv. kinders, kognitief invloekte gebruikers, nie-native sprekkers en lae-literasie lesers (Scarton en Specia, 2018)). Hierdie taak is uitgewerk met gebruik van datastelle van paar gelykde setnings insluitend die kompleks en eenvoudige weergawe van dieselfde seting. Vir Braziliaanse Portugees was die taak aangesit deur (Leal et al., 2018), wat die eerste datastel opgestel het om die taak in hierdie taal te evalueer, en 87.8% van waarheid met lingvisse funksies bereik het. Die huidige werk verder hierdie resultate deur te gebruik van model inspireerd deur (Gonzalez-Gardun o en S gaard, 2018), wat die staat-van-die-kuns vir die Engelske taal hou, met multi-taak leer en oog-agtervolg maatskappe. Eerste- pas Duur, Totaal Regresie Duur en Totaal Regstelling Duur was gebruik in twee oomblikke; eerste om 'n subartikel van lingwisiese funksies te kies en dan as 'n hulpbron taak in die multi-taak en sekwensiele leer modele te kies. Die beste model wat hier voorgestel het, bereik die nuwe state-of-the-art vir Portugees met 97.5% waarskynlik 1, 'n vergroot van amper 10 punte vergelyk met die beste vorige resultate, in addition to proposing improvements in the public dataset after analysing the errors of our best model.", 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i kompleksitetit të dënimeve është një detyrë relativisht e re në procesimin e gjuhës natyrore. Një nga qëllimet e tij është të theksojë në një tekst që fjalët janë më komplekse për të mbështetur thjeshtësimin e përmbajtjes për një publik objektiv (për shembull, fëmijët, përdoruesit me dëm kognitiv, folësit jo-vendas dhe lexuesit me shkrim të ulët (Scarton dhe Specia, 2018)). Kjo detyrë vlerësohet duke përdorur grupe të dhënash për çifte fjalësh të rreshtuara duke përfshirë versionin kompleks dhe të thjeshtë të të njëjtit fjalim. Për portugalin brazilian, detyra u trajtua nga (Leal et al., 2018), i cili ngriti kompletin e parë të dhënash për të vlerësuar detyrën në këtë gjuhë, duke arritur 87.8% të saktësisë me karakteristika gjuhësore. Puna e tanishme përparon këto rezultate duke përdorur modele të frymëzuar nga (Gonzalez-Gardun o dhe S gaard, 2018), të cilat mbajnë gjendjen më të lartë për gjuhën angleze, me mësim shumë-detyrash dhe masa vëzhguese sysh. Durimi i kalimit të parë, Durimi i Regresionit Total dhe Durimi i Fiksionit Total u përdorën për dy minuta; së pari për të zgjedhur një nëngrup karakteristike gjuhësore dhe pastaj si një detyrë ndihmëse në modelet e mësimit me shumë detyra dhe sekuencë. Modeli më i mirë i propozuar këtu arrin në gjendjen e re të teknologjisë për portugalët me 97.5% saktësi 1, një rritje me gati 10 pikë krahasuar me rezultatet më të mira të mëparshme, përveç propozimit të përmirësimeve në kompletin publik të të dhënave pas analizimit të gabimeve të modelit tonë më të mirë.', 'fa': 'ارزیابی پیچیدگی سخنرانی یک کار نسبتا جدید در پردازش زبان طبیعی است. یکی از هدف\u200cهایش اینه که در متن که جمله\u200cها پیچیده\u200cتر هستند برای حمایت ساده\u200cسازی محتویات برای یک حضار هدف (مثال: بچه\u200cها، کاربران\u200cهای مصنوعی، سخنرانی\u200cهای غیر طبیعی و خواننده\u200cهای نوشته\u200cای پایین\u200cسازی (Scarton و Specia, 2018)). این کار با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها از جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای متصل شده، شامل نسخه پیچیده و ساده\u200cای از یک جمله ارزیابی می\u200cشود. برای پورتوژیک برزیلی، این وظیفه توسط (Leal et al., 2018) که اولین مجموعه داده ها را برای ارزیابی کار در این زبان آماده کرد، به 87.8% دقیق با ویژه\u200cهای زبان رسید. این کار در حال حاضر این نتیجه\u200cها را پیشرفت می\u200cکند، با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای الهام داده شده (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018) که ایالت هنر را برای زبان انگلیسی نگه می\u200cدارد، با اندازه\u200cهای یادگیری بسیاری از کار و مراقبت چشم\u200cها. طول اولین گذشته، طول عمومی تکرار و طول عمومی ثابت کردن در دو لحظه استفاده می\u200cکردند; اول برای انتخاب زیر ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و بعدش به عنوان وظیفه\u200cی کمک در مدل\u200cهای یادگیری چندین وظیفه\u200cای. بهترین مدل پیشنهاد اینجا به وضعیت هنری جدید برای پورتوژیک با دقیق 97.5 درصد ۱ رسیده است، افزایش تقریباً ۱۰ نقطه در مقایسه با بهترین نتایج قبلی، علاوه بر پیشنهاد بهترین توسعه در مجموعه داده های عمومی بعد از تحلیل اشتباهی بهترین مدل ما.', 'id': 'Penilaian kompleksitas kalimat adalah tugas relatif baru dalam Proses Bahasa Alami. Salah satu tujuannya adalah menyatakan dalam teks kalimat yang lebih kompleks untuk mendukung penyimplifikasi isi bagi penonton sasaran (contohnya, anak-anak, pengguna dengan cacat kognitif, pembicara bukan-asli dan pembaca kebijaksanaan rendah (Scarton and Specia, 2018)). Tugas ini dievaluasi menggunakan set data dari pasangan kalimat yang disesuaikan termasuk versi kompleks dan sederhana kalimat yang sama. Bagi Portugis Brazil, tugas tersebut ditujukan oleh (Leal et al., 2018), yang mengatur dataset pertama untuk mengevaluasi tugas dalam bahasa ini, mencapai 87,8% akurasi dengan ciri-ciri bahasa. Pekerjaan saat ini melanjutkan hasil-hasil ini, menggunakan model yang diinspirasi oleh (Gonzalez-Gardun o dan S gaard, 2018), yang memegang state-of-the-art bahasa Inggris, dengan belajar multi-tugas dan tindakan pelacakan mata. Durasi Pas Pertama, Total Durasi Regresi dan Total Durasi Fiksasi digunakan dalam dua saat; pertama-tama untuk memilih subset dari ciri-ciri bahasa dan kemudian sebagai tugas bantuan dalam model belajar multitugas dan urutan. The best model proposed here reaches the new state-of-the-art for Portuguese with 97.5% accuracy 1 , an increase of almost 10 points compared to the best previous results, in addition to proposing improvements in the public dataset after analysing the errors of our best model.', 'am': 'የሥርዓት ውጤት ግንኙነት አካሄድ በአዳባዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም አዲስ ስራ ነው፡፡ የአንዱ ጉዳዩ የድምፅ ጽሑፍ፣ ለጉዳዩ አዳማጮች የሆኑን ቀላል ለማድረግ ይጨምረዋል፡፡ ይህ ስራ በአንድ ደብዳቤ እና ቀላል ስርዓት በተጨማሪው የዳታ setን ሁለት ዓይነቶች በተለየ ድርጊቶች ይታሰራል፡፡ ለብራዚላዊ ፖርቱጋልኛ፣ ስራው የቋንቋውን ለማስተዋል የመጀመሪያውን ዳታተር ሰርቨር አቀረበ፣ በቋንቋው እውቀት 87.8 በመቶ እርግጠኛ አግኝቷል፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥራ እነዚህን ፍጥረቶች ያሳድጋል፣ በይንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ የኢንዝርት የ-የ-የፊደል ቋንቋ እና በብዙ-ስራ ትምህርት እና የዓይን ትምህርት ሥርዓት በመጠቀም (Gonzalez-Gardun o እና S gaard, 2018)፡ የፋይል ስም መጀመሪያ የቋንቋዊ ምርጫዎችን ለመምረጥ እና በብዙ-ስራ እና በኋላ በተማሪ ሞዴላዎችን ለመምረጥ ነው፡፡ The best model proposed here reaches the new state-of-the-art for Portuguese with 97.5% accuracy 1 , an increase of almost 10 points compared to the best previous results, in addition to proposing improvements in the public dataset after analysing the errors of our best model.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় শাস্তির জটিল মূল্য হচ্ছে একটি নতুন কাজ। তার একটি লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি লেখায় যে বিষয়বস্তুকে লক্ষ্যবস্তুদের সাহায্য করার জন্য বিষয়বস্তুর সুস্পষ্ট সমর্থন করা আরো জটিল (উদাহরণস্বরূপ শিশু, স্বতন্ত্রের ব্যবহারকারীদের ক্ষতিগ এই কাজটি একই বাক্যের জটিল এবং সহজ সংস্করণ ব্যবহার করে ডাটাসেটগুলো সংযুক্ত করা হয়েছে। ব্রাজিলিয়ান পর্তুগীজের জন্য এই কাজের মূল্যায়নের প্রথম তথ্য স্থাপন করা হয়েছিল। ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে ৮7.8% সঠিকভাবে পৌঁছায়। The present work advances these results, using models inspired by (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), which hold the state-of-the-art for the English language, with multi-task learning and eye-tracking measures.  প্রথম পাসের সময়, মোট রেগ্রেশনের সময় এবং মোট ফিক্সিশনের সময় দুই মুহূর্তের মধ্যে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে; প্রথমে ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশেষ বিশেষ বিষয়গুলো নির্বাচন করার জন্য এবং তারপর বহুক্ষেত্র এবং পরবর্তী শিক্ষা মডেলের একটি অনু এখানে প্রস্তাবিত সবচেয়ে ভাল মডেল পর্তুগীজের নতুন শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রে পৌঁছায় ৭. ৫% সঠিকভাবে ১, প্রায় ১০ পয়েন্টের বৃদ্ধি হয়েছে পূর্বের সবচেয়ে ভাল ফলাফলের তুলনা', 'az': 'Söz kompleksitəsi təcrübəsi təbiətli dil işləməsində çox yeni bir işdir. Onun məqsədilindən birisi, cümlələr məqsəd auditorisinin sadəcə olaraq sadəcə olaraq sadəcə olaraq dəstəklənmək üçün daha kompleks bir mətndə işıqlandırmaq məqsədildir (məsələn, uşaqlar, bilikli təsirli istifadəçilər, yerli danışanlar və düşük yazılı oxuyanlar (Scarton və Specia, 2018). Bu iş, həmçinin kompleks və basit cümlənin verilən çift cümlələrin istifadəsində istifadə edilən verilənlər ilə değerlənir. Braziliyalı portugalca üçün bu işi (Leal et al., 2018) tərəfindən çəkildi, bu dildə ilk verilən qurduğu məlumat qurdu, dil özellikləri ilə 87.8% ədalətinə çatdı. Şimdiki işin bu sonuçlarını art ırar, çoxlu işin öyrənməsi və göz izləmə ölçüləri ilə ( Gonzalez-Gardun o və S gaard, 2018-ci ildə ) təşkil edilən modellərlə istifadə edir. İlk keçiş Uzunları, Toplam Reqresiya Uzunları və Toplam Qıdırma Uzunları İki dəfə istifadə edildi; ilk dil özelliklərinin bir hissəsini seçmək və sonra çoxlu işin və sonrakı öyrənmə modellərində köməkçi bir iş olaraq. Burada təbliğ edilən ən ən yaxşı model Portugalca yeni məlumatı olaraq 97,5% ədaləti 1 ilə gəlir . Ən yaxşı modelimizin hatalarını analiz etdikdən sonra halkı məlumat qutusu ilə yaxşılıqlarını təbliğ edir.', 'cs': 'Hodnocení složitosti vět je relativně novým úkolem ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Jedním z jeho cílů je zdůraznit v textu, které věty jsou složitější, aby podpořily zjednodušení obsahu pro cílovou skupinu (např. děti, kognitivně postižené uživatele, nerodilé mluvčí a čtenáře s nízkou gramotností (Scarton a Specia, 2018)). Tato úloha je vyhodnocena pomocí datových sad párů zarovnaných vět včetně komplexní a jednoduché verze stejné věty. Pro brazilskou portugalštinu byl tento úkol řešen (Leal et al., 2018), který vytvořil první datovou sadu pro vyhodnocení úkolu v tomto jazyce a dosáhl 87,8% přesnosti s jazykovými rysy. Tato práce pokračuje v těchto výsledcích s využitím modelů inspirovaných (González-Gardun o a S gaard, 2018), které drží nejmodernější anglický jazyk, s víceúkolovými učeními a eye-trackingovými opatřeními. Doba trvání prvního průchodu, celková doba trvání regrese a celková doba trvání fixace byly použity ve dvou okamžicích; nejprve vybrat podmnožinu jazykových rysů a poté jako pomocný úkol v modelech víceúkolového a sekvenčního učení. Nejlepší model navržený zde dosahuje nového stavu techniky pro portugalštinu s 97,5% přesností o 1,5% zvýšení téměř deseti bodů ve srovnání s nejlepšími předchozími výsledky, navíc navrhuje zlepšení veřejného datového souboru po analýze chyb našeho nejlepšího modelu.', 'bs': 'Procjena složenosti kazne je relativno novi zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Jedan od njenih ciljeva je istaknuti u tekstu koji su rečenice složenije za podršku pojednostavljenja sadržaja ciljne publike (npr. djece, kognitivno oštećenih korisnika, neproditeljskih govornika i čitača niskog pisanja (Scarton i Specia, 2018)). Ovaj zadatak se procjenjuje koristeći kompleksni i jednostavnu verziju iste rečenice. Za Brazilski portugalski zadatak je riješio (Leal et al., 2018), koji je postavio prvi set podataka za procjenu zadataka na ovom jeziku, ostvario 87,8% tačnosti sa jezičkim karakteristikama. Sadašnji rad napreduje te rezultate, koristeći modele inspirisane od strane (Gonzalez-Gardun o i S gaard, 2018), koji drže držanje umjetnosti za engleski jezik, sa mnogim mjerama učenja i praćenja o čiju. Vrijeme prvog prolaza, ukupno trajanje regresije i ukupno trajanje popravke korišteno je u dva trenutka; prvo izabrati podskup jezičkih karakteristika i onda kao pomoćni zadatak u multi task i sekvencijalnim modelima učenja. Najbolji model koji je predložen ovdje stigao je do novog stanja umjetnosti za portugalce sa preciznošću 97,5% 1 , povećanje skoro 10 bodova u usporedbi sa najboljim prethodnim rezultatima, osim predloženja poboljšanja u javnom setu podataka nakon analiziranja grešaka našeg najboljeg modela.', 'et': 'Lause keerukuse hindamine on suhteliselt uus ülesanne loodusliku keele töötlemisel. Üheks selle eesmärgiks on rõhutada tekstis, millised laused on keerulisemad, et toetada sisu lihtsustamist sihtrühma jaoks (nt lapsed, kognitiivse puudega kasutajad, mitte-emakeelsed kõnelejad ja madala kirjaoskusega lugejad (Scarton ja Specia, 2018)). Seda ülesannet hinnatakse joondatud lausete paaride andmekogumite abil, sealhulgas sama lause keerulise ja lihtsa versiooni abil. Brasiilia portugali keele puhul tegeles ülesandega (Leal et al., 2018), kes koostas esimese andmekogumi ülesande hindamiseks selles keeles, saavutades keeleliste omaduste täpsuse 87,8%. Käesolev töö arendab neid tulemusi, kasutades mudeleid, mis on inspireeritud (Gonzalez-Gardun o ja S gaard, 2018), mis hoiavad kaasaegset inglise keele, koos mitmeülesannetega õppimise ja silmade jälgimise meetmetega. Esimese läbimise kestust, kogu regressiooni kestust ja kogu fikseerimise kestust kasutati kahes hetkes; kõigepealt valida keeleliste omaduste alamhulk ja seejärel abiülesandeks mitme- ja järjestikuse õppe mudelites. Parim siinkohal pakutud mudel jõuab Portugali jaoks 97,5% täpsusega uue tehnika tasemeni 1 , mis on peaaegu 10 punkti võrra suurem võrreldes parimate varasemate tulemustega, lisaks pakub avaliku andmekogumi parandamist pärast meie parima mudeli vigade analüüsimist.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeen monimutkaisuuden arviointi on suhteellisen uusi tehtävä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Yksi sen tavoitteista on korostaa tekstissä, mitkä lauseet ovat monimutkaisempia tukemaan sisällön yksinkertaistamista kohdeyleisöä varten (esim. lapsia, kognitiivisesti heikentyneitä käyttäjiä, ei-äidinkielenään puhuvia ja vähän lukutaitoisia lukijoita (Scarton ja Specia, 2018)). Tehtävää arvioidaan käyttämällä tasattujen lauseiden parien datakokonaisuuksia, mukaan lukien saman lauseen monimutkainen ja yksinkertainen versio. Brasilian portugalin osalta tehtävää käsitteli (Leal et al., 2018), joka perusti ensimmäisen aineiston tehtävän arvioimiseksi tällä kielellä ja saavutti 87,8 prosentin tarkkuuden kielellisten ominaisuuksien osalta. Tässä työssä kehitetään näitä tuloksia käyttäen malleja, jotka ovat saaneet inspiraationsa (Gonzalez-Gardun o ja S gaard, 2018), jotka pitävät sisällään englannin kielen viimeisintä tekniikkaa, monitehtäväoppimiseen ja silmäseurantaan liittyviä toimenpiteitä. Ensimmäisen läpäisyn kestoa, regression kestoa ja korjauksen kestoa käytettiin kahdessa sekunnissa. Ensin valitaan kielellisten ominaisuuksien alaryhmä ja sitten aputehtävänä monitehtävä- ja peräkkäisissä oppimismalleissa. Parhaalla tässä ehdotetulla mallilla saavutetaan portugalin uuden huipputekniikan 97,5 prosentin tarkkuudella 1 , mikä on lähes 10 pisteen lisäys parhaisiin aiempiin tuloksiin verrattuna, ja siinä ehdotetaan parannuksia julkiseen aineistoon analysoituaan parhaan mallimme virheitä.', 'hy': 'Պատասխանների բարդության գնահատումը հարաբերականորեն նոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի մշակում: One of its aims is to highlight in a text which sentences are more complex to support the simplification of contents for a target audience (e.g., children, cognitively impaired users, non-native speakers and low-literacy readers (Scarton and Specia, 2018)).  Այս խնդիրը գնահատվում է օգտագործելով հավասար նախադասությունների զույգերի տվյալներ, ներառյալ նույն նախադասության բարդ և պարզ տարբերակը: Բրազիլիացի պորտուգալերենի դեպքում այս խնդիրը լուծվել է (Լիել և այլն., 2018 թվականը), ովքեր հիմնեցին առաջին տվյալների համակարգը, որպեսզի գնահատեն խնդիրը այս լեզվով, հասնելով լեզվական հատկանիշների ճշգրտության 87.8 տոկոսին: The present work advances these results, using models inspired by (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), which hold the state-of-the-art for the English language, with multi-task learning and eye-tracking measures.  Առաջին անցումի տևողությունը, ընդհանուր ռեգրեսիայի տևողությունը և ընդհանուր ֆիքսավորման տևողությունը օգտագործվել էին երկու րոպեում: նախ լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունների մի ենթախումբ ընտրելու և հետո որպես օգնական խնդիր բազմախնդիրների և հաջորդականների ուսումնասիրության մոդելների մեջ: Այստեղ առաջարկված լավագույն մոդելը հասնում է պորտուգալերենի նոր տեխնոլոգիային 97.5 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ 1, գրեթե 10 միավոր աճ համեմատած նախորդ լավագույն արդյունքների հետ, բացի հանրային տվյալների համակարգում բարելավումների առաջարկումից մեր լավագույն մոդելի սխալների վերլու', 'ca': "L'avaluació de la complexitat de les sentences és una tasca relativament nova en el processament de llenguatges naturals. One of its aims is to highlight in a text which sentences are more complex to support the simplification of contents for a target audience (e.g., children, cognitively impaired users, non-native speakers and low-literacy readers (Scarton and Specia, 2018)).  Aquesta tasca es valora fent servir conjunts de dades de parells de frases alliniades incloent la versió complexa i senzilla de la mateixa frase. Per al portuguès brasiler, la tasca va ser abordada per (Leal et al., 2018), que van crear el primer conjunt de dades per evaluar la tasca en aquest llenguatge, arribant al 87,8% de la precisió amb característiques lingüístices. L'actual treball avança aquests resultats, utilitzant models inspirats (Gonzalez-Gardun o S gaard, 2018), que tenen l'última tecnologia de la llengua anglesa, amb mesures d'aprenentatge multitasca i de seguiment ocular. First-Pass Duration, Total Regression Duration and Total Fixation Duration were used in two moments;  primer per seleccionar un subconjunt de característiques lingüístices i després com a tasca auxiliar en els models d'aprenentatge multitascat i seqüencial. El millor model proposat aquí arriba al nou avançat en portuguès amb la precisió del 97,5% 1, un augment de gairebé 10 punts en comparació amb els millors resultats anteriors, a més de proposar millors en el conjunt de dades públices després d'analitzar els errors del nostre millor model.", 'sk': 'Ocena kompleksnosti stavka je relativno nova naloga v obdelavi naravnega jezika. Eden od njegovih ciljev je v besedilu poudariti, kateri stavki so bolj kompleksni, da bi podprli poenostavitev vsebin za ciljno občinstvo (npr. otroci, kognitivno okvarjeni uporabniki, tujerodni govorci in bralci z nizko pismenostjo (Scarton in Specia, 2018)). To opravilo se ocenjuje z uporabo naborov podatkov parov poravnanih stavkov, vključno s kompleksno in preprosto različico istega stavka. Za brazilsko portugalščino je nalogo obravnaval (Leal et al., 2018), ki je sestavil prvi nabor podatkov za oceno naloge v tem jeziku in dosegel 87,8% natančnosti z jezikovnimi značilnostmi. Pričujoče delo te rezultate napreduje z uporabo modelov, ki jih navdihujejo (Gonzalez-Gardun o in S gaard, 2018), ki imajo najsodobnejše za angleški jezik, z večopravilnim učenjem in ukrepi za sledenje oči. V dveh trenutkih so bili uporabljeni trajanje prvega prehoda, trajanje skupne regresije in trajanje skupne fikcije; Najprej izberemo podnabor jezikovnih značilnosti, nato pa kot pomožno nalogo v večopravilnih in zaporednih modelih učenja. Najboljši tu predlagani model doseže nov najsodobnejši model za portugalsko z 97,5-odstotno natančnostjo 1 , kar pomeni skoraj 10 točk večje v primerjavi z najboljšimi prejšnjimi rezultati, poleg tega pa predlaga izboljšave javnega nabora podatkov po analizi napak našega najboljšega modela.', 'he': 'הערכת מורכבת המשפט היא משימה חדשה יחסית בתהליך שפת טבעית. אחת המטרות שלה היא להדגיש בטקסט שבו המשפטים מורכבים יותר לתמוך בהפשטה של התוכן לקהל המטרה (למשל ילדים, משתמשים פגומים קוגניטיביים, מדברים לא-מקומיים וקוראים בספרות נמוכה (Scarton and Specia, 2018)). המשימה הזאת מוערכת באמצעות קבוצות נתונים של זוגות משפטים ממוקמים כולל גרסה מורכבת ופשוטה של אותו משפט. עבור פורטוגזית ברזילאית, המשימה הוכחה על ידי (Leal et al., 2018), אשר קים את קבוצת המידע הראשונה כדי להעריך את המשימה בשפה הזאת, הגיעה ל-87.8% מהמדויקה עם תכונות שפתיים. העבודה הנוכחית מתקדמת את התוצאות האלה, באמצעות דוגמנים שנושאים על ידי (Gonzalez-Gardun o and S gaard, 2018), אשר מחזיקים את המצב המיוחד של השפה האנגלית, עם לימוד במשימות רבות ואמצעי מעקב עיניים. אורך הפסקה הראשונה, אורך הפסקה הכללית ואורך הקישור הכללי השתמשו בשני רגעים; קודם כדי לבחור תחתונה של תכונות שפתיים ואז בתור משימה עזרית במודלים של למידה רבות משימות ורציפיות. הדוגמא הטובה ביותר שהצעה כאן מגיעה למצב החדש של המידע הפורטוגזי עם מדויקת 97.5% 1, הגידול של כמעט 10 נקודות בהשוואה לתוצאות הקודמות הטובות ביותר, בנוסף להצעה שיפורים במערכת הנתונים הציבורית לאחר ניתוח שגיאות הדוגמא הטובה ביותר שלנו.', 'ha': "Ana ƙaddara wa muhimman aikin zartar da zaman shawara, yana da gwargwadon aiki na Taural. Bayani da aimaimaimakinsa ya nuna cikin wani matsayi wanda aka gaura masu kamfata su ƙara taimakon saurãren kayan ƙunci wa saurãre na goani (misali, masu amfani da masu bastarwa da ke da haske a wajen wani abu, masu saurãre na asili da ma'abũcin littãfi (Saarton da Speciaci, 2018). Ana ƙayyade wannan aikin a yi amfani da tsarin danasãri biyu masu haɗuwa da salon maganar da ke ƙunsa da nau'in rubutu da sauƙi. Ga Kirangisi na Breziliya, aka raba aikin shi na (Leal et al., 2018), wanda ya daidaita matsayin na farkon da ya canza aikin wannan lugha, yana sãmu 87.8% na daidaita da wasu fassaran linguistic. Kayan aikin da ke gabatar da waɗannan matsalar, a yi amfani da misãlai da aka yi wahayi zuwa Gonzalez-Gardun o da S Gard, 2018), wanda ke riƙon the state-of-art for harshen Ingirinsa, da tsarin yin aiki mai yawa da shiryarwa. Duration farkon ka zãɓi wani ƙarani na fassarar cikin linguistic kuma ka zama wani aikin mataimaki a cikin misalin multi-aikin da ke daban. Babbar motel da aka buƙata a nan, yana zuwa halin-sanar-na-Portugalis da 97.5% tabbatacce 1, yana ƙaranci gaba ɗaya 10 points sami da mafi kyaun matsalar da suka gabata, da ƙari ya ƙarfafa mafarinta cikin tsarin danganta umalum a bayan ya yi anayyar ɗin misalinmu.", 'jv': 'Wurung kelas komplikasi nggambar kapan kelas anyar Omahé awak dhéwé wis nguasai nglanggar sampeyan seneng sing berarti juara awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan sing dikarepaké karo perkoro sing nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kehidaké awak dhéwé (bisa, cilik, iso nguasai perusahaan, iso nguasai luwih-perusahaan lan basa-perusahaan sing paling-perusahaan (scape lan Specia, 2013). task kanggo portugis Bracilian, nggawe ngupakan ndelok (Lel et al, 2008), sing nambah dataset sing isih kanggo jera nggawe gerasi kapan kanggo langkung iki, nambah tanggal asêpakan karo pawaran langkung. Ora barêng-barêng langêr uwong gawé urip iki, nik nggambar model sing bisa kelangan lan alam sing bisa nggambar nggambar (Ganjales-gardun o karo S gard, 2008), sing nganggo stado-keduluran kanggo langêng Inggris, lan tambah bantêr-task lan tambah bantêr-langêr. Waktu Cihadi Awak dhéwé ngepilihan hukum sing paling-itik lan tambah nganggo sak ngejaraké ning multi-task lan model kuwi layar-layar. Isih model sing paling nggawe karo hal-kaluwar kanggo dianggap sistem sing luwih dumadhi kaya pertualangan karo 1997.5% sing kelas 1, dadi nyimpen dhéwé 10 punt kanggo ngerasakno dadi sing luwih apik, dadi supoyo perusahaan langkung dianggap kanggo dianggap banjuré publika nung kakipun maneh sing beraksi akeh nyo', 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་ཆེ་བ་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལས་ཀ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་རེད། དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་གཅིག་ནི་ཡིག་གེ་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་རྐང་འདི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཉར་མཁན་གྱི་ནང་དོན་ཁ་ཤས་ཧ་ཅང་བོ་ཞིག་དང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུ བྷི་ར་ཛིལ་ཡུལ་སྐོར་གྱི་བརྗོད་སྐོར་ལ་བྱས་ན། དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག མཉམ་ལས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་ཚོར་རྒྱས་ཁབ་འདི་དག་ལས་མཐོང་སྣང་པ་(Gonzalez-Gardun o)དང་S gaard(2018)ལ་ཡོད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལས་འཕར་རིས་ཐབས་ཤིག་བྱས་ཏེ། འཚོལ་བཤེར་དང་པོར་བརྟན་དུས་ཚོད། བསྡུས་ཐབས་འཇུག་རུང་དང་བསྡུས་བརྟན་པར་མཚམས་བརྟན་དུས་ཚོད་སྤྱོད་ཚར སྐད་རིགས འདིའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཏོན་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གསརཔ་ཞིག་གི་མཐའ་ནས་97.5% accuracy 1ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': 'Retrieving Skills from Job Descriptions : A Language Model Based Extreme Multi-label Classification Framework', 'ar': 'استرجاع المهارات من الأوصاف الوظيفية: إطار تصنيف متطرف متعدد العلامات قائم على النموذج اللغوي', 'es': 'Recuperación de habilidades de las descripciones de puestos: un marco de clasificación multietiqueta extremo basado en modelos lingüísticos', 'fr': 'Récupérer les compétences à partir des descriptions de poste\xa0: un cadre de classification multi-étiquette extrême basé sur un modèle linguistique', 'pt': 'Recuperando Habilidades de Descrições de Cargos: Uma Estrutura de Classificação Multi-rótulo Extrema Baseada em Modelo de Linguagem', 'ja': '職務記述書からスキルを取得する：言語モデルベースの極端なマルチラベル分類フレームワーク', 'zh': '自职状中检索技能:基于言语模样的极端多标签分类框架', 'hi': 'नौकरी विवरण से कौशल प्राप्त करना: एक भाषा मॉडल आधारित चरम बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'Получение навыков из должностных инструкций: языковая модель, основанная на экстремальной многоуровневой системе классификации', 'ga': 'Scileanna a Fháil ó Shaintuairiscí: Creat Aicmithe Foircní Illipéid Bunaithe ar Mhúnla Teanga', 'ka': 'სამუშაო აღწერებიდან პარამეტრების მიღება', 'hu': 'Készségek visszaszerezése a munkaköri leírásokból: Nyelvi modell alapú extrém többcímkés osztályozási keretrendszer', 'el': 'Ανάκτηση δεξιοτήτων από περιγραφές εργασίας: Ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο βασισμένο σε ακραίο πλαίσιο ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών', 'it': 'Recuperare competenze dalle descrizioni del lavoro: un modello linguistico basato su Extreme Multi-Label Classification Framework', 'kk': 'Тапсырмалардың сипаттамасын алу: Тіл үлгісін негіздеген көп белгілер классификациясы', 'mk': 'Отворање вештини од описите на задачата: Рамка за класификација на екстремен мултиетик базиран на јазички модел', 'lt': 'Įgūdžių įgijimas iš darbo aprašymų: kalbos modeliu pagrįsta ekstremali daugiametė klasifikavimo sistema', 'ml': 'ജോലിയുടെ വിവരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്ക്ലിനുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നു: A Language Model Based Extremely Multi- label Classification Frame', 'mn': 'Ажилтын тайлбарлалтуудыг авах: A Language Model Based Extreme Multi-label Classification Framework', 'ms': 'Menerima Kekuatan Dari Huraian Kerja: Sebuah Qafas Pengklasifikasi Berdasarkan Model Bahasa Extreme Multi-label', 'mt': 'Il-kisba ta’ Ħiliet mid-Deskrizzjonijiet tax-Xogħol: Qafas ta’ Klassifikazzjoni Extreme Multi-label Ibbażat fuq Mudell tal-Lingwa', 'ro': 'Obținerea abilităților din descrierile locului de muncă: un cadru de clasificare extrem bazat pe modele lingvistice', 'no': 'Hentar skilnader frå jobbskildringar: Eit språk-modell basert ekstremt fleire merkelapper klassifiseringsframme', 'pl': 'Pobieranie umiejętności z opisów pracy: Ekstremalne ramy klasyfikacji oparte na modelu językowym', 'sr': 'Dobivanje pratnje iz opisa posla: jezički model baziran ekstremni višeetički okvir klasifikacije klasifikacije', 'si': 'වැඩ විස්තරණයෙන් ස්කිල්ල් ලැබෙනවා: භාෂා මොඩල් අධාරිත විස්තරය ගොඩක් ලේබල් ක්\u200dලාසිකේෂණ් ක්\u200dරමව්\u200dය', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha qoraalka shaqada: A Model Based Based Extreme Multi-label Classification Framework', 'sv': 'Att hämta färdigheter från jobbbeskrivningar: En språkmodell baserad Extreme Multi-Label Classification Framework', 'ta': 'பணி விவரங்களிலிருந்து திரைகளை திரும்புகிறது: A Language Model Based Extremely Multi- label Classification Frame', 'ur': 'Job Descriptions سے Skills پھیر لیا جاتا ہے: ایک زبان موڈل بنیادی اضطراب Multi-label Classification Framework', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thu thập các kỹ năng từ các mô tả công việc: Một bộ mô tả ngôn ngữ căn bản Lời mạnh có nhãn', 'bg': 'Извличане на умения от описания на длъжността: Езиков модел, базиран на екстремна многоетикетна класификационна рамка', 'da': 'Hente færdigheder fra jobbeskrivelser: En sprogmodel baseret ekstrem multi-label klassificeringsramme', 'hr': 'Dobivanje pratnje iz opisa posla: jezički model baziran ekstremni višeetički okvir klasifikacije', 'nl': 'Het ophalen van vaardigheden uit functiebeschrijvingen: Een taalmodel gebaseerd extreem multi-label classificatiekader', 'ko': '작업 설명에서 기술 추출: 언어 모델 기반의 극단적인 다중 라벨 분류 프레임워크', 'de': 'Retrieving Skills from Job Descriptions: Ein sprachmodellbasiertes Extreme Multi-Label Classification Framework', 'sw': 'Retrieving Skills from Job Descriptions: A Language Model Based Extreme Multi-label Classification Framework', 'id': 'Menerima keterampilan dari Deskripsi Tugas: Sebuah Model Bahasa Berdasarkan Bingkai Klasifikasi Extreme Multi-label', 'tr': 'Taýdan çykyşlar alynlýa: A language Model Based on Multi-label', 'af': "Herhaal Skillings van Werk Beskrywings: ' n Taal Model Basiseer Extreme Multi- label Klassifikasie Raamwerk", 'fa': 'دریافت Skills از توضیح کارها: یک مدل زبان بر اساس چهارۀ کلاس\u200cشناسی چندین برچسب', 'sq': 'Duke marrë aftësitë nga përshkrimet e punës: A Language Model Based Extreme Multi-label Classification Framework', 'am': 'A Language Model Based Extremely Multi-label Classification Framework', 'az': 'ΡΑ≈ü Tafsil…ôl…ôrind…ôn Ο•yr…ônir: A Language Model Based Extreme Multi-label Classification Framework', 'bn': 'কাজের বর্ণনা থেকে স্কিল পুনরুদ্ধার করা হচ্ছে:', 'cs': 'Získání dovedností z popisů pracovních míst: Extrémní multi-label klasifikační rámec založený na jazykovém modelu', 'hy': 'Աշխատի նկարագրություններից հմտություններ ստանալը', 'et': 'Oskuste hankimine töökirjeldustest: keelemudelil põhinev ekstreemne mitmemärgiseline klassifitseerimisraamistik', 'fi': 'Taitojen hakeminen työnkuvauksista: Kielimalliin perustuva äärimmäinen monimerkkinen luokituskehys', 'bs': 'Dobivanje praznika iz opisa posla: jezički model baziran ekstremni višeetički okvir klasifikacije klasifikacije', 'ca': 'Obtenir habilitats a partir de descripcions de treball: Un marc de classificació multietiquetat extrem basat en un model lingüístic', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje spretnosti iz opisov delovnih mest: jezikovni model, ki temelji na ekstremnem večoznaknem razvrstitvenem okvirju', 'jv': 'Ngubah Menu Layout', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'קיבלת מיומנות מתיאורי עבודה: מסגר שינוי מבוסס על מודל שפה', 'bo': 'ལས་ཀ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ལས་སྣང་མེད་ཚུལ་འདོར་བཞིན་པ：སྐད་རིགས་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་བརྗོད་སྟངས་མང་བོའི་ཁ་བྲལ་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a deep learning model to learn the set of enumerated job skills associated with a job description. In our analysis of a large-scale government job portal mycareersfuture.sg, we observe that as much as 65 % of job descriptions miss describing a significant number of relevant skills. Our model addresses this task from the perspective of an extreme multi-label classification (XMLC) problem, where descriptions are the evidence for the binary relevance of thousands of individual skills. Building upon the current state-of-the-art language modeling approaches such as BERT, we show our XMLC method improves on an existing baseline solution by over 9 % and 7 % absolute improvements in terms of recall and normalized discounted cumulative gain. We further show that our approach effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed out in the job postings by taking into account the structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process. We further show that our approach, to ensure the BERT-XMLC model accounts for structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process, effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed out in the job postings. To facilitate future research and replication of our work, we have made the dataset and the implementation of our model publicly available.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذج التعلم العميق لتعلم مجموعة المهارات الوظيفية المحددة المرتبطة بالوصف الوظيفي. في تحليلنا لبوابة الوظائف الحكومية واسعة النطاق mycareersfuture.sg ، نلاحظ أن ما يصل إلى 65٪ من التوصيفات الوظيفية تفتقد إلى وصف عدد كبير من المهارات ذات الصلة. يعالج نموذجنا هذه المهمة من منظور مشكلة شديدة في التصنيف متعدد العلامات (XMLC) ، حيث تكون الأوصاف هي الدليل على الصلة الثنائية لآلاف المهارات الفردية. بناءً على مناهج النمذجة اللغوية الحديثة مثل BERT ، نظهر أن طريقة XMLC الخاصة بنا تتحسن على حل أساسي حالي بنسبة تزيد عن 9٪ و 7٪ من حيث التحسينات المطلقة من حيث الاسترجاع والمكاسب التراكمية المخفضة المعيارية. نوضح كذلك أن نهجنا يعالج بشكل فعال مشكلة المهارات المفقودة ، ويساعد في استعادة المهارات ذات الصلة التي فُقدت في إعلانات الوظائف من خلال مراعاة التمثيل الدلالي المنظم للمهارات وتواجدها المشترك من خلال عملية الإقلاع الواعي للارتباط. نوضح أيضًا أن نهجنا ، لضمان أن نموذج BERT-XMLC يراعي التمثيل الدلالي المنظم للمهارات وتواجدها المشترك من خلال عملية الإقلاع الواعي للارتباط ، ويعالج بفعالية مشكلة المهارات المفقودة ، ويساعد في استعادة المهارات ذات الصلة التي فُقدت. في إعلانات الوظائف. لتسهيل البحث المستقبلي وتكرار عملنا ، أنشأنا مجموعة البيانات و\nتنفيذ نموذجنا متاح للجمهور.', 'ja': 'ジョブ記述に関連する一連の列挙されたジョブスキルを学習するためのディープラーニングモデルを導入します。 大規模な政府職務ポータルmycareersfuture.sgの分析では、職務記述書の65 ％が、関連スキルのかなりの数を記述していないことが観察されます。 私たちのモデルは、極端なマルチラベル分類（ XMLC ）問題の観点からこの課題に取り組んでいます。ここでは、記述は、何千もの個々のスキルのバイナリ関連性の証拠です。 BERTなどの現在の最先端の言語モデリングアプローチに基づいて、XMLCメソッドは、リコールと正規化された割引累積利得の観点から、既存のベースラインソリューションで9 ％以上、7 ％以上の絶対的な改善を改善することを示しています。 私たちはさらに、私たちのアプローチが欠けているスキルの問題に効果的に対処し、相関認識ブートストラッププロセスを通じてスキルの構造化された意味表現とその共起を考慮することによって、求人ポストで見逃されていた関連スキルを回復するのに役立つことを示します。 さらに、BERT - XMLCモデルが、相関認識ブートストラッププロセスを通じてスキルとその同時発生の構造化された意味表現を説明し、欠落しているスキルの問題に効果的に対処し、求人で見逃された関連スキルの回復に役立つことを示します。 将来の研究と作業の複製を容易にするために、データセットと\n公開されているモデルの実装。', 'es': 'Introducimos un modelo de aprendizaje profundo para aprender el conjunto de habilidades laborales enumeradas asociadas con una descripción de trabajo. En nuestro análisis de un portal de empleo gubernamental a gran escala mycareersfuture.sg, observamos que hasta el 65% de las descripciones de puestos no describen un número significativo de habilidades relevantes. Nuestro modelo aborda esta tarea desde la perspectiva de un problema de clasificación multietiqueta extrema (XMLC), en el que las descripciones son la evidencia de la relevancia binaria de miles de habilidades individuales. Sobre la base de los enfoques actuales de modelado lingüístico de última generación, como BERT, demostramos que nuestro método XMLC mejora una solución de referencia existente en más del 9% y el 7% de mejoras absolutas en términos de recuperación y ganancia acumulada con descuento normalizado. Además, demostramos que nuestro enfoque aborda eficazmente el problema de las habilidades faltantes y ayuda a recuperar las habilidades relevantes que se perdieron en las ofertas de trabajo, teniendo en cuenta la representación semántica estructurada de las habilidades y sus co-ocurrencias a través de un proceso de Bootstrapping consciente de la correlación. Además, demostramos que nuestro enfoque, para garantizar que el modelo BERT-XMLC tenga en cuenta la representación semántica estructurada de las habilidades y sus co-ocurrencias a través de un proceso de Bootstrapping consciente de la correlación, aborda eficazmente el problema de las habilidades faltantes y ayuda a recuperar las habilidades relevantes que se perdieron en las ofertas de trabajo. Para facilitar la investigación futura y la replicación de nuestro trabajo, hemos creado el conjunto de datos y el\nimplementación de nuestro modelo disponible públicamente.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo de aprendizado profundo para aprender o conjunto de habilidades de trabalho enumeradas associadas a uma descrição de trabalho. Em nossa análise de um portal de empregos governamental de grande escala mycareersfuture.sg, observamos que até 65% das descrições de cargos não descrevem um número significativo de habilidades relevantes. Nosso modelo aborda essa tarefa da perspectiva de um problema extremo de classificação multi-rótulo (XMLC), onde as descrições são a evidência da relevância binária de milhares de habilidades individuais. Com base nas atuais abordagens de modelagem de linguagem de última geração, como BERT, mostramos que nosso método XMLC melhora uma solução de linha de base existente em mais de 9% e 7% de melhorias absolutas em termos de recuperação e ganho cumulativo descontado normalizado. Mostramos ainda que nossa abordagem aborda efetivamente o problema de habilidades ausentes e ajuda a recuperar habilidades relevantes que foram perdidas nas postagens de emprego, levando em consideração a representação semântica estruturada de habilidades e suas co-ocorrências por meio de um processo Bootstrapping com reconhecimento de correlação. Mostramos ainda que nossa abordagem, para garantir que o modelo BERT-XMLC leve em consideração a representação semântica estruturada de habilidades e suas co-ocorrências por meio de um processo de Bootstrapping com reconhecimento de correlação, aborda efetivamente o problema de habilidades ausentes e ajuda na recuperação de habilidades relevantes que foram perdidas nas vagas de emprego. Para facilitar futuras pesquisas e replicação de nosso trabalho, fizemos o conjunto de dados e o\nimplementação do nosso modelo disponível publicamente.', 'zh': '我们引入了一个深度学习模样来学与工夫相关的一样。 mycareersfuture.sg 政府门户网站,观65%不言能。 吾模自极多标类(XMLC)解其事,其言数千人技能二元相关性证也。 盖先进之言建模法(如 BERT),示我 XMLC 法于召率标准化折扣积益于今基线解决方案改进 9% 、 7% 以上绝矣。 吾益明吾道之得失,而以相关性感知虑其结构化语义与其共现,而有助于招聘启事之漏者。 吾道者,保BERT-XMLC以相关性感知虑技之结构化语义,决其阙失,而助招聘启事之漏也。 以便吾事者,复制作数集和\n吾道明可用也。', 'fr': "Nous introduisons un modèle d'apprentissage profond pour apprendre l'ensemble des compétences professionnelles énumérées associées à une description de poste. Dans notre analyse d'un portail d'emploi gouvernemental à grande échelle mycareersfuture.sg, nous observons que 65\xa0% des descriptions de poste ne décrivent pas un nombre significatif de compétences pertinentes. Notre modèle aborde cette tâche du point de vue d'un problème extrême de classification multi-étiquettes (XMLC), où les descriptions sont la preuve de la pertinence binaire de milliers de compétences individuelles. En nous appuyant sur les approches actuelles de modélisation linguistique de pointe telles que BERT, nous montrons que notre méthode XMLC améliore une solution de base existante de plus de 9\xa0% et 7\xa0% d'améliorations absolues en termes de rappel et de gain cumulé actualisé normalisé. Nous montrons également que notre approche aborde efficacement le problème des compétences manquantes et aide à récupérer les compétences pertinentes qui ont été manquées dans les offres d'emploi en tenant compte de la représentation sémantique structurée des compétences et de leurs co-occurrences grâce à un processus d'amorçage sensible à la corrélation. Nous montrons également que notre approche, qui vise à garantir que le modèle BERT-XMLC tient compte de la représentation sémantique structurée des compétences et de leurs co-occurrences par le biais d'un processus d'amorçage sensible à la corrélation, traite efficacement le problème des compétences manquantes et aide à récupérer les compétences pertinentes qui ont été manquées dans les offres d'emploi. Pour faciliter les recherches futures et la reproduction de nos travaux, nous avons créé le jeu de données et le\nmise en œuvre de notre modèle accessible au public.", 'hi': 'हम नौकरी के विवरण से जुड़े गणना किए गए नौकरी कौशल के सेट को सीखने के लिए एक गहरा सीखने का मॉडल पेश करते हैं। एक बड़े पैमाने पर सरकारी नौकरी पोर्टल mycareersfuture.sg के हमारे विश्लेषण में, हम देखते हैं कि नौकरी के विवरण के 65% के रूप में अधिक से अधिक प्रासंगिक कौशल की एक महत्वपूर्ण संख्या का वर्णन याद आती है। हमारा मॉडल इस कार्य को एक चरम बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण (XMLC) समस्या के परिप्रेक्ष्य से संबोधित करता है, जहां विवरण हजारों व्यक्तिगत कौशल की बाइनरी प्रासंगिकता के लिए सबूत हैं। BERT जैसे वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक भाषा मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोणों पर निर्माण करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी XMLC विधि एक मौजूदा बेसलाइन समाधान पर 9% से अधिक और 7% पूर्ण सुधारों को याद करने और सामान्यीकृत रियायती संचयी लाभ के संदर्भ में सुधार करती है। हम आगे दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण प्रभावी ढंग से लापता कौशल समस्या को संबोधित करता है, और प्रासंगिक कौशल को पुनर्प्राप्त करने में मदद करता है जो एक सहसंबंध जागरूक बूटस्ट्रैपिंग प्रक्रिया के माध्यम से कौशल के संरचित शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व और उनके सह-घटनाओं को ध्यान में रखते हुए नौकरी की पोस्टिंग में चूक गए थे। हम आगे दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण, BERT-XMLC मॉडल को सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कौशल के संरचित शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व और एक सहसंबंध जागरूक बूटस्ट्रैपिंग प्रक्रिया के माध्यम से उनकी सह-घटनाओं के लिए खाता है, प्रभावी रूप से लापता कौशल समस्या को संबोधित करता है, और प्रासंगिक कौशल को पुनर्प्राप्त करने में मदद करता है जो नौकरी पोस्टिंग में चूक गए थे। भविष्य के अनुसंधान और हमारे काम की प्रतिकृति को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए, हमने डेटासेट और\nहमारे मॉडल का कार्यान्वयन सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Мы вводим модель глубокого обучения для изучения набора перечисленных профессиональных навыков, связанных с должностной инструкцией. В нашем анализе крупномасштабного правительственного портала вакансий mycareersfuture.sg мы отмечаем, что в 65% должностных инструкций не хватает описания значительного количества соответствующих навыков. Наша модель решает эту задачу с точки зрения проблемы экстремальной многоуровневой классификации (XMLC), где описания являются доказательством двоичной релевантности тысяч индивидуальных навыков. Опираясь на современные подходы к языковому моделированию, такие как BERT, мы показываем, что наш метод XMLC улучшает существующее базовое решение более чем на 9% и 7% абсолютных улучшений с точки зрения отзыва и нормализованной дисконтированной совокупной прибыли. Мы также показываем, что наш подход эффективно решает проблему недостающих навыков и помогает восстановить соответствующие навыки, которые были упущены в вакансиях, принимая во внимание структурированное семантическое представление навыков и их совпадение с помощью процесса корреляции, осознающего бутстреппинг. Мы также показываем, что наш подход, чтобы гарантировать, что модель BERT-XMLC учитывает структурированное семантическое представление навыков и их совпадений посредством процесса Correlation Aware Bootstrapping, эффективно решает проблему недостающих навыков и помогает восстановить соответствующие навыки, которые были упущены в вакансиях. Чтобы облегчить будущие исследования и тиражирование нашей работы, мы сделали набор данных и\nреализация нашей модели в открытом доступе.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid múnla domhain foghlama isteach chun an fhoireann scileanna áirimh a bhaineann le cur síos poist a fhoghlaim. Inár n-anailís ar thairseach poist rialtais ar mhórscála mycareersfuture.sg, tugaimid faoi deara go bhfuil suas le 65% de na tuairiscí poist caillte ag cur síos ar líon suntasach scileanna ábhartha. Tugann ár múnla aghaidh ar an tasc seo ó thaobh fíorfhadhb aicmithe illipéid (XMLC) de, áit a bhfuil tuairiscí mar fhianaise ar ábharthacht dhénártha na mílte scil aonair. Ag tógáil ar na cineálacha cur chuige samhaltaithe teanga úrscothacha mar BERT, léirímid go bhfuil feabhas níos mó ná 9% agus 7% ar ár modh XMLC ar réiteach bonnlíne atá ann cheana féin maidir le hathghairm agus gnóthachan carnach lascainithe. Léirímid freisin go dtugann ár gcur chuige aghaidh go héifeachtach ar fhadhb na scileanna atá in easnamh, agus cabhraíonn sé le scileanna ábhartha a aisghabháil a cailleadh amach sna postálacha poist trí léiriú struchtúrtha shéimeantach scileanna agus a gcomhtharluithe a chur san áireamh trí phróiseas Comhghaolaithe Aware Bróidnéireacht. Léirímid freisin go dtugann ár gcur chuige, chun a chinntiú go dtugann samhail BERT-XMLC cuntas ar léiriú struchtúrtha shéimeantach scileanna agus a gcomhtharlú trí phróiseas Comhghaolú Aware Bootstrapping, go dtugann sé aghaidh go héifeachtach ar fhadhb na scileanna atá in easnamh, agus go gcabhraíonn sé le scileanna ábhartha ar baineadh amach iad a ghnóthú. sna postálacha poist. Chun taighde agus macasamhlú ár gcuid oibre a éascú amach anseo, tá an tacar sonraí déanta againn agus an\ncur i bhfeidhm ár múnla ar fáil go poiblí.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης για να μάθουμε το σύνολο των απαριθμημένων δεξιοτήτων εργασίας που σχετίζονται με μια περιγραφή εργασίας. Στην ανάλυσή μας μιας μεγάλης κλίμακας κυβερνητικής πύλης εργασίας mycareerfuture. Παρατηρούμε ότι μέχρι και 65% από τις περιγραφές θέσεων εργασίας δεν περιγράφουν σημαντικό αριθμό σχετικών δεξιοτήτων. Το μοντέλο μας αντιμετωπίζει αυτό το έργο από την προοπτική ενός ακραίου προβλήματος ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών (XMLC), όπου οι περιγραφές αποτελούν απόδειξη για τη δυαδική συνάφεια χιλιάδων ατομικών δεξιοτήτων. Βασιζόμενοι στις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, όπως η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνεται σε σχέση με μια υπάρχουσα λύση βάσης κατά πάνω από 9% και 7% απόλυτες βελτιώσεις όσον αφορά την ανάκληση και το ομαλοποιημένο αθροιστικό κέρδος. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας αντιμετωπίζει αποτελεσματικά το πρόβλημα ελλείψεων δεξιοτήτων, και βοηθά στην ανάκτηση σχετικών δεξιοτήτων που παραλείφθηκαν στις δημοσιεύσεις εργασίας λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τη δομημένη σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση των δεξιοτήτων και των συμπεριφερειών τους μέσα από μια διαδικασία Ανταλλαγής. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας, για να διασφαλίσουμε ότι το μοντέλο λαμβάνει υπόψη τη δομημένη σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση των δεξιοτήτων και των συμπτωμάτων τους μέσω μιας διαδικασίας Αντισυσχέτισης, αντιμετωπίζει αποτελεσματικά το πρόβλημα ελλείψεων δεξιοτήτων και βοηθά στην ανάκτηση σχετικών δεξιοτήτων που έχασαν στις δημοσιεύσεις εργασίας. Για να διευκολυνθεί η μελλοντική έρευνα και αναπαραγωγή του έργου μας, έχουμε δημιουργήσει το σύνολο δεδομένων και\nεφαρμογή του μοντέλου μας δημοσίως διαθέσιμο.', 'it': "Introduciamo un modello di deep learning per imparare l'insieme delle competenze professionali enumerate associate a una descrizione del lavoro. Nella nostra analisi di un portale di lavoro governativo su larga scala mycareers future. sg, osserviamo che ben il 65% delle descrizioni di lavoro manca di descrivere un numero significativo di competenze rilevanti. Il nostro modello affronta questo compito dalla prospettiva di un problema di classificazione multipla estrema (XMLC), dove le descrizioni sono la prova della rilevanza binaria di migliaia di competenze individuali. Basandoci sugli attuali approcci di modellazione linguistica all'avanguardia come BERT, mostriamo che il nostro metodo XMLC migliora una soluzione di base esistente di oltre il 9% e il 7% di miglioramenti assoluti in termini di richiamo e guadagno cumulativo scontato normalizzato. Dimostriamo inoltre che il nostro approccio affronta efficacemente il problema delle competenze mancanti e aiuta a recuperare le competenze rilevanti che sono state perse negli annunci di lavoro tenendo conto della rappresentazione semantica strutturata delle competenze e delle loro co-occorrenze attraverso un processo di Correlation Aware Bootstrapping. Dimostriamo inoltre che il nostro approccio, per garantire che il modello BERT-XMLC tenga conto della rappresentazione semantica strutturata delle competenze e delle loro co-occorrenze attraverso un processo di Correlation Aware Bootstrapping, affronta efficacemente il problema delle competenze mancanti e aiuta a recuperare le competenze rilevanti che sono state perse nelle inserzioni di lavoro. Per facilitare la ricerca futura e la replica del nostro lavoro, abbiamo realizzato il dataset e il\nattuazione del nostro modello accessibile al pubblico.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღებთ ძალიან სწავლებელი მოდელ, რომელიც სამუშაო გამოსახულებელი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო შესახებ. ჩვენი ანალიზაციაში დიდი სამუშაო სამუშაო პორტალის მიკარიერების შესახებ. sg, ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ 65% სამუშაო აღწერების გამოსახულება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესაძლებლობების რაოდენობა. ჩვენი მოდელი ამ დავალების პერსტიფიკაციის განსაზღვრებით ექსტრემი მრავალური კლასიფიკაციის (XMLC) პრობლემების პრობლემების განსაზღვრებით, სადაც განსაზღვრებით არის ბინარი კოდენტი მიმდინარე სახელის მოდელების შესახებ, როგორც BERT, ჩვენ ჩვენი XMLC მეტი აღმოჩნდება, რომელიც არსებობს სახელის გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე 9% და 7% აბსოლუტური დაახლოების შესახებ და ნორმალურად გარეშე კუმულატიური ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა ეფექტიურად განსხვავებული კონტაქტების პრობლემას გადაწყენებს, და დახმარებს შესაძლებელი კონტაქტიური კონტაქტების შესახებ, რომლებიც სამუშაო სტრუქტურული სმენტიკური გამოსა ჩვენ დავაჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროცესი, რომ BERT-XMLC მოდელის წიგნის სტრუქტურებული სმენტიკური გამოსახულებაზე და ისინი ერთადერთი გამოსახულებების პროცესი კოლექციის შესახებ, ეფექტიურად განსხვავებული კოლექტურების პროცესის გასახულება,  ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო შესაძლებლობად მომავალეთ შესწავლობა და რეპოვაცია, ჩვენ მონაცემების სამუშაო და\nჩვენი მოდელის გავაკეთება საშუალოდ ხელსაწყოფილი.', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy mélytanulási modellt, hogy megismerjük az állásleíráshoz kapcsolódó felsorolt munkakészségeket. Egy nagyszabású kormányzati állásportál elemzésében a jövőben. sg, megfigyeljük, hogy a munkaköri leírások 65%-a hiányzik jelentős számú releváns készség leírása. Modellünk ezt a feladatot egy extrém multi-label osztályozási (XMLC) probléma szempontjából kezeli, ahol a leírások bizonyítják több ezer egyéni készség bináris relevanciáját. A jelenlegi korszerű nyelvmodellezési megközelítésekre építve, mint például a BERT, bemutatjuk, hogy XMLC módszerünk több mint 9%-os és 7%-os abszolút javulással javul egy meglévő alapvető megoldáshoz képest a visszahívás és a normalizált diszkontált kumulatív nyereség tekintetében. Megmutatjuk továbbá, hogy megközelítésünk hatékonyan kezeli a hiányzó készségek problémáját, és segít visszaszerezni azokat a releváns készségeket, amelyeket az álláshirdetések során kimaradtak, figyelembe véve a készségek strukturált szemantikai ábrázolását és azok együttes előfordulását egy korrelációs tudatos Bootstraping folyamat révén. Megmutatjuk továbbá, hogy megközelítésünk annak biztosítása érdekében, hogy a BERT-XMLC modell a készségek strukturált szemantikai ábrázolását és azok együttes előfordulását korrelációs tudatos indítási folyamaton keresztül biztosítsa, hatékonyan kezeli a hiányzó készségek problémáját, és segít visszaszerezni a releváns készségeket, amelyek az álláshirdetésekben kimaradtak. Munkánk jövőbeli kutatásának és replikációjának megkönnyítése érdekében elkészítettük az adatkészletet és a\na nyilvánosan elérhető modellünk végrehajtása.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame gilaus mokymosi model į, skirtą išsiaiškinti išvardytų darbo įgūdžių, susijusių su darbo aprašymu, rinkinį. Mūsų didelės apimties vyriausybės darbo portalo analizėje mano karjeros ateitis. sg, pastebime, kad 65 proc. darbo aprašymų nepakanka aprašyti daug atitinkamų įgūdžių. Mūsų modelis sprendžia šią užduotį atsižvelgiant į ekstremalią daugiametės klasifikacijos (XMLC) problem ą, kurioje aprašymai rodo, kad tūkstančiai atskirų įgūdžių yra dvigubai svarbūs. Remdamiesi dabartiniais naujausiais kalbų modeliavimo metodais, pavyzdžiui, BERT, parodome, kad XMLC metodas pagerina esamą pradinį sprendimą daugiau kaip 9 % ir 7 % absoliučiu pagerėjimu atšaukimo ir normalizuoto diskontuoto kumuliacinio pelno atšaukimo požiūriu. Be to, parodome, kad mūsų požiūris veiksmingai sprendžia trūkstamų įgūdžių problem ą ir padeda atkurti atitinkamus įgūdžius, kurie buvo prarasti komandiruojant darbą, atsižvelgiant į struktūruotą semantinį įgūdžių ir jų bendrų įvykių atstovavimą taikant koreliacijos sąmoningumo skatinimo procesą. Be to, mes parodome, kad mūsų požiūris, siekiant užtikrinti BERT-XMLC modelio struktūrinį semantinį įgūdžių ir jų bendrų įvykių atstovavimą taikant koreliacijos sąmoningumo skatinimo procesą, veiksmingai sprendžia trūkstamų įgūdžių problem ą ir padeda atkurti atitinkamus įgūdžius, kurie buvo prarasti komandiruojant darbą. Siekdami palengvinti būsimus mokslinius tyrimus ir mūsų darbo replikaciją, sukūrėme duomenų rinkinį ir\nimplementation of our model publicly available.', 'kk': 'Біз жұмыс сипаттамасына сәйкес келген тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін түсінікті оқыту үшін үлкен оқыту үлгісін келтіреміз. Үлкен өлшемді үкімет жұмыс порталының анализациясы. sg, біз 65% тапсырманың сипаттамасының маңызды тапсырмаларды сипаттамасыз. Біздің үлгіміз бұл тапсырманы бірнеше жарлық классификациясының (XMLC) перспективінен көрсетеді. Бұл тапсырманы бірнеше жарлық тапсырмалардың бинарлық маңыздылығының сипаттамасы. БЕРТ секілді назардағы суреттік тілдерді моделдеу керектеріне көмектесу үшін, біз XMLC әдіміміздің негізгі жол шешіміне 9% және 7% деген абсолютті жақсартылығын еске салу және кәдімгі дискуляциялық көмектесу ү Біз біздің тәжірибеміздің көмегіміз жоқ тәжірибелердің мәселесін шешуге көмектеседі, жұмыс жіберілген жіберілгендерді қайтаруға көмектеседі. Құрастырылған семантикалық тәжірибелерді және олардың біріктіріліктерін тү Енді біз BERT-XMLC үлгісін құрастырылған семантикалық тәжірибелерді және олардың біріктіру процесін түзету үшін өзіміздің тәжірибелерімізді қамтамасыз ету үшін беRT-XMLC үлгісін қамтамасыз ету үшін көрсетедік. Жұмыс жіберіліктерінде жо Болашақ зерттеулерді жұмыс істеуді көмектесу үшін, біз деректер жинағын жасадық.\nқол жеткізетін үлгілерді орындау үшін.', 'mk': 'Ние го воведуваме моделот на длабоко учење за да го научиме сетот на наведени работни вештини поврзани со описот на работата. Во нашата анализа на голем владин работен портал мојата кариерска иднина. СГ, набљудуваме дека 65 отсто од описите на работата пропуштаат опишување на значителен број релевантни вештини. Нашиот модел ја решава оваа задача од перспектива на екстремен проблем со мултиетикетната класификација (XMLC), каде што описите се докази за бинарната релевантност на илјадници индивидуални вештини. Користејќи ги актуелните пристапи на моделирање на јазиците како што е БЕРТ, покажуваме дека нашиот метод XMLC се подобрува на постоечкото основно решение за повеќе од 9 и 7 отсто апсолутно подобрување во поглед на повлекување и нормализиран сконтиран кумулативен добивка. Понатаму покажуваме дека нашиот пристап ефикасно го решава проблемот со недостасувачките вештини и помага во обновувањето на релевантните вештини кои беа пропуштени во поставувањата на работа со земање во предвид структурираното семантично претставување на вештините и нивните соопстаноци преку процес на корелационална свест Понатаму покажуваме дека нашиот пристап, за да се осигури дека моделот BERT-XMLC смета за структурирано семантично претставување на вештините и нивните соопштествени настани преку процес на корелациона свест за стапици, ефикасно се решава проблемот со недостасувачките вештини и помага во обновувањето на релевантните вештини кои беа пропу To facilitate future research and replication of our work, we have made the dataset and the\nимплементација на нашиот модел јавно достапен.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model belajar dalam untuk belajar set kemahiran kerja yang terhitung berkaitan dengan keterangan kerja. Dalam analisis kami tentang portal kerja kerajaan besar masa depan karier saya. sg, kita memperhatikan bahawa sebanyak 65% dari deskripsi kerja terlepas menjelaskan bilangan yang signifikan kemahiran yang berkaitan. Model kami menghadapi tugas ini dari perspektif masalah kelasukan berbilang-label ekstrim (XMLC), di mana deskripsi adalah bukti untuk relevan binari ribuan kemampuan individu. Membangun pada pendekatan model bahasa semasa seperti BERT, kami menunjukkan kaedah XMLC kami meningkatkan pada penyelesaian as as yang wujud dengan lebih dari 9% dan 7% peningkatan mutlak dalam terma pengingat dan peningkatan kumulatif dikurangkan normal. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami secara efektif mengatasi masalah kemahiran yang hilang, dan membantu dalam mengembalikan kemahiran yang berkaitan yang terlepas dalam posting kerja dengan mempertimbangkan perwakilan semantik struktur kemahiran dan persamaan mereka melalui proses Perangkapan Boots Awas Korelasi. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami, untuk memastikan akaun model BERT-XMLC untuk mewakili semantik struktur kemampuan dan kejadian mereka sambil melalui proses penyelesaian Bootstrapping Awas Korelasi, secara efektif mengatasi masalah kemampuan yang hilang, dan membantu mengembalikan kemampuan berkaitan yang terlepas dalam posting kerja. Untuk memudahkan penyelidikan masa depan dan replikasi kerja kami, kami telah membuat set data dan\npelaksanaan model kita yang tersedia secara awam.', 'ml': 'ജോലി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d കണക്കാക്കുന്ന ജോലിക്കുള്ള കഴിവുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഒര ഒരു വലിയ സർക്കാരുടെ ജോലി പോര്\u200dട്ടല്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടിള്\u200d ജോലിയെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d. ജോലി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d 65% കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരിജ്ഞാനങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് കാണുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഏറ്റവും വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ (എക്സ്\u200cഎംഎല്\u200dസി) പ്രശ്നത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാഴ്ചപ്പാടില്\u200d നിന്നും വിശദീകരിക് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ്ങ് മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d പോലെയാണ്, നിലവിലുള്ള ബെസ്ലൈനില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്ത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദം കാണിക്കുന്നത്, കാണാത്ത കഴിവുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച്, ജോലിപ്പോസ്റ്റില്\u200d  We further show that our approach, to ensure the BERT-XMLC model accounts for structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process, effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed out in the job postings.  നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയുടെ ഭാവിയുടെ പഠനത്തിനും പകര്\u200dപ്പിനും സൌകര്യപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിനെ\nനമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തികമായി ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein dyp læringsmodell for å lære settet av nummererte jobbkvalitetar assosiert med ei jobbskildring. I vårt analyse av ein stor regjeringsjobbportal mykarieringsutforming. sg, vi observerer at så mykje 65% av jobbskildringar manglar å skildra eit betydelig tal av relevante ferdighetar. Modellen vårt adresserer denne oppgåva frå perspektiven av eit ekstremt multimerkelapplasseringsproblem (XMLC), der beskrivelser er bevisene for det binære relevante av tusenvis av individuelle ferdighetar. Avbygging av den gjeldande tilstanden av kunstspråk-modellering tilnærmar som BERT, viser vi XMLC-metoden vårt forbedrar på ein eksisterande baseline løysing med over 9 % og 7 % absolutt forbedringar ved høve til å rekna opp og normaliserte kumulative forskjell. Vi viser meir at tilnærminga vårt gjer effektivt oppretting av manglande ferdigheitsproblemet, og hjelper til å gjenoppretta relevant ferdigheiter som vart gått ut i jobbpostingane ved å ta opp den strukturerte semantiske representasjonen av ferdigheiter og samtidige tilnærminga sine gjennom ein korrelasjonsforskyvingsprosess. Vi viser meir at tilnærminga vårt, for å sikre på at BERT-XMLC-modellen skal gjere strukturert semantisk representasjon av ferdigheit og samtidige tilnærmingane sine gjennom ein korrelasjonsforstørringsprosesse, gjer effektivt den manglande kvalitetsprosessen, og hjelper til å gjenoppretta relevant ferdigheiter som vart mangla ut i jobbpostene. For å letta framtidige forskning og kopiering av arbeidet vårt, har vi lagt datasettet og\nimplementering av modellen vårt offentlig tilgjengeleg.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy model głębokiego uczenia, aby poznać zestaw wyliczonych umiejętności pracy związanych z opisem stanowiska. W naszej analizie dużego rządowego portalu pracy mycareerfuture. SG, zauważamy, że aż 65% opisów stanowisk nie opisuje znacznej liczby istotnych umiejętności. Nasz model odnosi się do tego zadania z perspektywy ekstremalnego problemu klasyfikacji wieloznakowych (XMLC), gdzie opisy są dowodem na binarne znaczenie tysięcy indywidualnych umiejętności. Opierając się na obecnych najnowocześniejszych metodach modelowania językowego, takich jak BERT, pokazujemy, że nasza metoda XMLC poprawia się w stosunku do istniejącego rozwiązania bazowego o ponad 9% i 7% absolutną poprawę w zakresie wycofania i znormalizowanego zdyskontowanego kumulatywnego zysku. Ponadto pokazujemy, że nasze podejście skutecznie rozwiązuje problem brakujących umiejętności i pomaga w odzyskaniu odpowiednich umiejętności, które zostały pominięte w ogłoszeniach pracy, uwzględniając strukturyzowaną semantyczną reprezentację umiejętności i ich współwystępowanie poprzez proces Correlation Aware Bootstrapping. Ponadto pokazujemy, że nasze podejście, aby zapewnić, że model BERT-XMLC uwzględnia strukturyzowaną semantyczną reprezentację umiejętności i ich współwystępowania poprzez proces Correlation Aware Bootstrapping, skutecznie rozwiązuje problem brakujących umiejętności i pomaga w odzyskaniu istotnych umiejętności, które zostały pominięte w ogłoszeniach pracy. Aby ułatwić przyszłe badania i replikację naszej pracy, stworzyliśmy zbiór danych i\nwdrożenie naszego modelu publicznie dostępnego.', 'mn': 'Бид ажлын тайлбарлалттай холбогдсон тооны ажлын чадварыг суралцахын тулд гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварыг танилцуулдаг. Бидний шинжилгээнд засгийн газрын ажлын захирал дээр миний ажлын төлөө. sg, бид ажлын тодорхойлолтын 65% нь маш чухал чадварыг тайлбарлаж чадахгүй гэдгийг анзаарсан. Бидний загварын загварыг олон загварын хуваалтын (XMLC) асуудлын тодорхойлолтоос харуулдаг. Харин тодорхойлолт нь мянга мянган хүний чадварын хоёр давхар хамааралтай баталгаа юм. БЕРТ шиг одоогийн урлагийн хэл загварын арга барилгын тулд бид XMLC арга барилгын суурь шугамын шийдвэр дээр 9% болон 7% дундаж санах болон энгийн нийтлэгдсэн нийтлэг ашигтай хувьд сайжруулж байна. Бид дахиад бидний арга зам нь алдагдсан чадварын асуудлыг эффективно удирдаж, ажлын захиралд алдагдсан хамааралтай чадварыг сэргээхэд тусалдаг. Бид бас өөрсдийн арга зам, BERT-XMLC загварын багш нарын багш нарын чадвар болон түүний хамтран ажиллах үйл явцын тулд бүтээгдэхүүний төлөвлөгөөг батлах боломжтой болгон харуулж байна. Бид ирээдүйн судалгаа, ажлыг дахин дахин давтахын тулд өгөгдлийн сан болон\nолон нийтийн загварын үйлдвэрлэл.', 'mt': "Aħna nintroduċu mudell ta’ tagħlim profond biex nitgħallmu s-sett ta’ ħiliet tal-impjiegi elenkati assoċjati ma’ deskrizzjoni tal-impjieg. Fl-analiżi tagħna ta’ portal tal-impjiegi tal-gvern fuq skala kbira, il-futur tal-karrieri tiegħi. sg, nagħmlu osservazzjoni li sa 65 % tad-deskrizzjonijiet tal-impjiegi ma jidhrux fid-deskrizzjoni ta’ numru sinifikanti ta’ ħiliet rilevanti. Il-mudell tagħna jindirizza dan il-kompitu mill-perspettiva ta’ problema estrema ta’ klassifikazzjoni multitikketta (XMLC), fejn id-deskrizzjonijiet huma l-evidenza tar-rilevanza binarja ta’ eluf ta’ ħiliet individwali. Filwaqt li nibnu fuq l-approċċi attwali ta’ mudellar tal-lingwi l-aktar avvanzati bħall-BERT, nagħmlu evidenza li l-metodu XMLC tagħna jtejjeb fuq soluzzjoni bażi eżistenti b’aktar minn 9% u 7% titjib assolut f’termini ta’ ġbir lura u qligħ kumulattiv skont normalizzat. Aħna nagħmlu aktar evidenza li l-approċċ tagħna jindirizza b’mod effettiv il-problem a tal-ħiliet nieqsa, u jgħin fl-irkupru tal-ħiliet rilevanti li ma ntlaħqux fl-istazzjonamenti tax-xogħol billi tqis ir-rappreżentanza semantika strutturata tal-ħiliet u l-kookkorrenzi tagħhom permezz ta’ proċess ta’ Trażżin ta’ Għarfien dwar il-Korelazzjoni. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-approċċ tagħna, biex niżguraw li l-mudell BERT-XMLC jikkunsidra rappreżentazzjoni semantika strutturata tal-ħiliet u l-kookkorrenzi tagħhom permezz ta' proċess ta' qbid ta' sensibilizzazzjoni dwar il-korrelazzjoni, jindirizza b'mod effettiv il-problem a tal-ħiliet nieqsa, u jgħin fl-irkupru tal-ħiliet rilevanti li ma ntlaħqux fl-istazzjonar tax-xogħol. To facilitate future research and replication of our work, we have made the dataset and the\nl-implimentazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna disponibbli pubblikament.", 'ro': 'Introducem un model de învățare profundă pentru a învăța setul de abilități enumerate de locuri de muncă asociate cu o descriere a locului de muncă. În analiza noastră a unui portal guvernamental de locuri de muncă la scară largă, viitorul meu domeniu. sg, observăm că până la 65% din descrierile locurilor de muncă ratează descrierea unui număr semnificativ de competențe relevante. Modelul nostru abordează această sarcină din perspectiva unei probleme extreme de clasificare multi-label (XMLC), unde descrierile reprezintă dovada relevanței binare a mii de abilități individuale. Bazându-ne pe abordările actuale de modelare lingvistică de ultimă generație, cum ar fi BERT, arătăm că metoda XMLC îmbunătățește o soluție de bază existentă cu peste 9% și 7% îmbunătățiri absolute în ceea ce privește rechemarea și câștigul cumulativ redus normalizat. De asemenea, demonstrăm că abordarea noastră abordează în mod eficient problema competențelor lipsă și ajută la recuperarea competențelor relevante care au fost ratate în postările de locuri de muncă, luând în considerare reprezentarea semantică structurată a competențelor și a evenimentelor lor concomitente printr-un proces de corelație Aware Bootstraping. De asemenea, demonstrăm că abordarea noastră, pentru a asigura că modelul BERT-XMLC ține cont de reprezentarea semantică structurată a competențelor și a evenimentelor asociate acestora printr-un proces de bootstrapping conștient de corelație, abordează în mod eficient problema competențelor lipsă și ajută la recuperarea competențelor relevante care au fost ratate în timpul postărilor de locuri de muncă. Pentru a facilita cercetarea și replicarea viitoare a activității noastre, am realizat setul de date și\npunerea în aplicare a modelului nostru disponibil public.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model dubokog učenja kako bi naučili setu brojnih vještina posla povezanih sa opisom posla. U našoj analizi velike vladinih poslovnih portal a mikarjere. sg, primećujemo da 65% opisa posla nedostaje opisivanje značajnog broja relevantnih vještina. Naš model rješava ovaj zadatak iz perspektive ekstremne multi-etiketne klasifikacije (XMLC) problema, gde su opisi dokazi za binarnu relevanciju hiljada pojedinačnih vještina. Na temelju trenutnih pristupa modelima jezika kao što je BERT, pokazujemo da se naš metod XMLC poboljšava na postojećem početnom rješenju za preko 9% i 7% apsolutnog poboljšanja u smislu sećanja i normaliziranog kumulativnog dobića. Dalje pokazujemo da naš pristup efektivno rješava problem nestalih vještina i pomaže u oporavljanju relevantnih vještina koji su nestali na poslovnim postupcima, uzimajući u obzir strukturiranu semantičku predstavu vještina i njihovih saradnjih događaja kroz proces korilacije Aware Bootstrapping. Dalje pokazujemo da naš pristup, kako bi osigurali model BERT-XMLC računa za strukturiranu semantičku predstavljanje vještina i njihovih saradnjih događaja kroz proces korištenja obavještajnih poduzeća, efektivno rješava probleme sa nestalim vještinama i pomagala u oporavljanju relevantnih vještina koje su nestale na poslovima. Da bismo olakšali buduće istraživanje i replikaciju našeg rada, napravili smo komplet podataka i\nprovedba našeg modela javno dostupno.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en modell för djupinlärning för att lära sig uppsättningen uppräknade jobbfärdigheter förknippade med en jobbbeskrivning. I vår analys av en storskalig statlig jobbportal mycareers future. sg, vi konstaterar att så mycket som 65% av jobbbeskrivningarna saknar att beskriva ett betydande antal relevanta färdigheter. Vår modell behandlar denna uppgift utifrån ett extremt multi-label klassificeringsproblem (XMLC), där beskrivningar är bevis för den binära relevansen av tusentals individuella färdigheter. Baserat på nuvarande toppmoderna språkmodelleringsmetoder som BERT visar vi att vår XMLC-metod förbättrar en befintlig baslinjelösning med över 9% och 7% absoluta förbättringar när det gäller återkallelse och normaliserad rabatterad kumulativ vinst. Vi visar vidare att vårt tillvägagångssätt effektivt tar itu med det saknade kompetensproblemet och hjälper till att återställa relevanta färdigheter som missades i jobbannonserna genom att ta hänsyn till den strukturerade semantiska representationen av färdigheter och deras samtidigheter genom en korrelationsmedveten Bootstrapping process. Vi visar vidare att vårt tillvägagångssätt, för att säkerställa att BERT-XMLC-modellen tar hänsyn till strukturerad semantisk representation av färdigheter och deras samtidiga händelser genom en korrelationsmedveten startprocess, effektivt tar itu med de saknade kompetensproblemen och hjälper till att återställa relevanta färdigheter som missades i jobbannonserna. För att underlätta framtida forskning och replikering av vårt arbete har vi gjort datauppsättningen och\ngenomförandet av vår modell som är tillgänglig för allmänheten.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දැනගන්නවා වැඩක් විස්තරයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් සූදානම් කරන්න. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයේ රජාධාර වැඩපොර්ටල් මගේ කාර්යාර්ජික විස්තරයක්. sg, අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා කියලා කාර්ය විස්තර 65% කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වෙනවා කියලා. අපේ මෝඩේල් මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, කොහෙද විස්තරණය සාක්ෂිත සාක්ෂි BERT වගේ ප්\u200dරස්ථානයේ ස්ථානය-of-the-art භාෂා මොඩලින් අවස්ථාවක් වගේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ XMLC විධානය 9% සහ 7% විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විසිත අපි තවත් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ අවස්ථාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න උදව් කරනවා ක්\u200dරියාලයේ පොස්ටම් වලින් අත අපි තවදුරටත් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට, BERT-XMLC මොඩල් ගණන්තුවක් සඳහා සංස්ථාපනය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ අපේ වැඩේ අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව සහය කරන්න, අපි දත්ත සෙට් එක සහ\nඅපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්.', 'so': "Tusaale dheer oo waxbarasho ah ayaannu soo bandhignaynaa si aan u barto heerka aqoonta shaqada oo la xiriira tilmaamaha shaqada. baaritaanka mustaqbalka arimaha shaqada ee dowladnimada oo weyn. sg, waxaynu aragnaa in qiyaastii 65% ka mid ah qoraalka shaqada ayadoo ka baaqan aqoonta aad u muhiimsan. Tusaale'yadayada ayaa ka sheekaynaya aragtidan dhibaatada kala duduwan (XMLC) oo ah dhibaatada kala duduwan, kaas oo lagu qorayo calaamado ku saabsan labaatanka kun oo aqoon oo gaar ah. Bulshada qoraalka qoraalka afka farshaxanka ah sida BERT, waxan tusnaa qaababka XMLC ah oo uu horumarinayo xafiiska hoose ee ku jirta 9% iyo 7% horumarinta oo dhamaanka ah, si loo xusuusto iyo si caadi ah u horumarinayo faa'iidada dhaqaalaha ah oo aan la dhamayn karin. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu si caqli ah u macaamiloodo dhibaatada aqoonta la’aanta, waxayna caawinaysaa in la soo celiyo xirfadaha la xiriira ee laga waayay goobaha shaqada, si aan loo xisaabinno kooxaha la dhisay xirfadaha iyo dhacdooyinkooda wadajirka ah ee korrelation aqoonta bootstrapping. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayaga, si aan u xaqiijinno qaababka modelka BERT-XMLC ee dhismaha semantika ah ee aqoonta iyo dhacdooyinkooda la mid ah, si faa’iido leh loo qabto dhibaatada aqoonta la'aanta, wuxuuna caawinayaa in la soo celiyo xirfadaha la xiriira ee ka baaqan goobaha shaqada. si aan u fududayno waxbarashada mustaqbalka ah iyo bedelka shaqadeeda, waxaan sameynay sawirada iyo\nin lagu sameeyo modellkayaga si bayaan ah loo heli karo.", 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ள மாதிரி ஒரு வேலை விவரிப்புடன் தொடர்புடைய எண்ணிக்கப்பட்ட பணி திறமைகளை கற்றுக் கொள ஒரு பெரிய அரசாங்க வேலை துறைய விருப்பங்கள் எதிர்காலத்தில் எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சியில். ஜி என்பதை நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் 65% வேலை விவரிப்புகளில் மிகவும் முக்கியமான தொழில்நுட்பத்தை விவரிப்பதில் குறிப் எங்கள் மாதிரி முக்கியமான பல்லேட் வகைப்படுத்தல் (XMLC) பிரச்சனையிலிருந்து இந்த செயலை முகவரிக்கிறது, இதில் விவரிப்புகள் ஆயிரக்கணக்கான தனித்தி BERT போன்ற தற்போதைய நிலை- கலை மொழி மாதிரி முறைமையை உருவாக்கும் போது, நாம் எங்கள் XMLC முறைமையை காட்டுகிறோம் தற்போதைய அடிப்படையில் தீர்வு 9% மற்றும் 7% முழ நாம் மேலும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் அணுக்கம் காண்பிக்கப்பட்ட திறமைகளை விட்டுப் பிரச்சனையை வெளியேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் வேலைக்குறிப்புகளில் தவறிய திறமைகளை மீட்டெட பிரெட்-எக்ஸ்எம்எல்சி மாதிரி கணக்குகளை உறுதிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட திறமைகள் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய சேர்ந்த நிகழ்வுகள் மூலம் தெரிந்து அறியும் புத்தகக்குறிப்புகள் செயல்படுத்தும் மூலம், காணவில்லா எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சி மற்றும் எங்கள் வேலையை மாற்றுவதற்கு, நாங்கள் தரவு அமைப்புகளையும் செய்து\nஎங்கள் மாதிரியை பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک عمیق تعلیم مدل کو معرفی کرتے ہیں کہ ایک کام کی توصیف کے ساتھ تعلیم کی تعلیم کریں۔ ہماری تحلیل میں ایک بڑے مقدار حکومت کے کام پورٹل کی میری کاری کا سامان ہے۔ sg، ہم نے دیکھا ہے کہ 65% کے کام کی توصیف کے مطابق بہت اچھی تعداد کی تعداد کی توصیف کے مطابق منتظر ہیں. ہمارا مدل اس کام کو ایک بہت سی لابل کلاسیفون (XMLC) مسئلہ کی تصویر سے سمجھتا ہے جہاں توصیف ہزاروں شخصی طاقتوں کے دوئینی اثرات کے لئے نشانیاں ہیں. ہم نے اپنے XMLC روش کو 9% سے زیادہ اور 7% سے زیادہ مطلوب سوداگری یاد کرنا اور عامل ذخیره ہونے کے معاملہ میں دفع کیا ہے۔ ہم اس کے بعد نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ مفید طور پر گم ہونے کی طاقتوں کے مسئلہ کے بارے میں مشکل کرتی ہے، اور ان کی تعلق کی طاقتوں کو اچھی طریقہ سے اچھی طریقہ کے ذریعہ مشکل کرتی ہے جو کام پوسٹینگ میں چھوڑ دیئے گئے ہیں، ہم اس کے علاوہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ، BERT-XMLC موڈل کا مضبوطی کرنے کے لئے استعمال اور ان کے ساتھ حاضر ہونے کے لئے استعمال کی ساختہ سیمانٹیکی نمونٹ کا حساب رکھنے کے لئے، ایک اصلاح Aware Bootstrapping پرسس کے ذریعہ، اثبات کے ساتھ گم ہونے کے طاقت مسئلہ کے بارے میں مشکل کرتا ہے، اور ان کے معاملہ کی است ہم نے اگلے دنیا کی تحقیق اور جواب کے لئے آسان کیا ہے، ہم نے ڈیٹسٹ اور\nہمارے مدل کی عمدہ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz ishning taʼrifoti bilan bog'liq bo'lgan ishni o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini o'rganish mumkin. Bu katta taʼminlovchi xavfli vazifaning portal fikrlari kelajasida. sg, biz ishning taʼriflariga 65% ko'p muhim darajalarni taʼrif qilishni o'rganamiz. Bizning modelimiz bu vazifani juda katta ko'plab-ko'plab darajalashtirish (XMLC) muammolarining fikrini boshqaradi. Bu yerda taʼriflar minglab minglab shaxsiy huquqlarning ikkinchi darajaga bog'liqdir. Joriy holatda, BERT kabi rasm modellash usullarini yaratish mumkin, biz XMLC usulini taʼminlovchi soʻzni 9% va 7% dan ortiq o'zgartirish va oddiy ishlab chiqarilmagan mulovativ muvaffaqiyatlarni koʻrsatish mumkin. Ko'rib chiqqamiz, bizning murakkablarimiz yoʻq tajribani tasavvur qiladi va ishning postlarida yo'qotgan muhim imkoniyatlarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga yordam beramiz. Ulanish tajribalari bilan bog'liq qo'llanmalar va bir xil holatlarini tasdiqlash jarayonini hisoblash mumkin. We further show that our approach, to ensure the BERT-XMLC model accounts for structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process, effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed out in the job postings.  Keyingi kelajakdagi tahrircha va ishni almashtirishga foydalanish uchun, biz maʼlumot set va\nbizning modelimizni ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình học sâu sắc để học tập các kỹ năng làm việc được liệt kê liên quan đến mô tả công việc. Trong phân tích về một cánh cổng công việc lớn của chính phủ. chúng tôi nhận thấy rằng cũng như sự mô tả làm việc còn thiếu mô tả một số kỹ năng liên quan. Trong mô hình của chúng tôi, nhiệm vụ này được giải quyết dựa trên một vấn đề phân loại đa nhãn cực lớn (XMLC) ở nơi mô tả là bằng chứng về sự liên quan nhị phân của hàng ngàn kỹ năng cá nhân. Dựa trên phương pháp bào chế ngôn ngữ hiện đại như BERT, chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp XMLC của chúng ta đã cải thiện một giải pháp cơ bản đã có. Hơn chín. và 7. Sự cải tiến tuyệt đối về việc thu hồi và đạt mức tích lũy tích tụ. Chúng tôi cho thấy cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi thực sự giải quyết vấn đề thiếu kỹ năng, và giúp khôi phục những kỹ năng liên quan bị bỏ sót trong các bài báo làm việc, nhờ có sự phân tích theo ngữ nghĩa cơ cấu của kỹ năng và các đối tác của chúng qua quá trình nâng lên báo chí tương ứng. Chúng tôi cho thấy cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi, để đảm bảo mô hình giao thức thiếu kỹ năng được mô tả theo ngữ pháp cơ cấu trúc về các kỹ năng và sự hiện diện của chúng qua một quá trình phóng bổng tương tự, thực sự giải quyết vấn đề về kỹ năng thiếu kỹ năng, và giúp khôi phục những kỹ năng liên quan đã mất trong các vị trí làm việc. Để dễ dàng nghiên cứu và tái diễn công trình của chúng ta, chúng ta đã tạo ra bộ dữ liệu và...\nthực hiện mô hình của chúng ta công khai.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме модел на дълбоко обучение, за да научим набора от изброени работни умения, свързани с описанието на длъжността. В нашия анализ на мащабен правителствен портал за работа моето бъдеще. наблюдаваме, че 65% от длъжностните описания пропускат да описват значителен брой подходящи умения. Нашият модел разглежда тази задача от гледна точка на един екстремен проблем с многоетикетна класификация (КМЛК), където описанията са доказателство за двоичната релевантност на хиляди индивидуални умения. Въз основа на съвременните подходи за езиково моделиране като показва, че методът ни подобрява съществуващото базово решение с над 9% и 7% абсолютни подобрения по отношение на изземването и нормализираната дисконтирана кумулативна печалба. Освен това показваме, че нашият подход ефективно решава проблема с липсващите умения и помага за възстановяване на съответните умения, които са пропуснати в обявленията за работа, като взема предвид структурираното семантично представяне на уменията и техните съвместни прояви чрез процес на осъзнаване на корелацията. Освен това показваме, че нашият подход, за да гарантираме, че моделът отчита структурираното семантично представяне на уменията и техните съвместни прояви чрез процес, осъзнаващ корелацията, ефективно решава проблема с липсващите умения и помага за възстановяване на съответните умения, които са пропуснати в обявленията за работа. За да улесним бъдещите изследвания и репликация на нашата работа, ние създадохме набора от данни и\nвнедряване на нашия модел публично достъпен.', 'de': 'Wir führen ein Deep-Learning-Modell ein, um die Anzahl der aufgezählten beruflichen Fähigkeiten zu erlernen, die mit einer Stellenbeschreibung verbunden sind. In unserer Analyse eines großen staatlichen Jobportals mycareerfuture. Wir stellen fest, dass bis zu 65% der Stellenbeschreibungen eine signifikante Anzahl relevanter Fähigkeiten fehlen. Unser Modell befasst sich mit dieser Aufgabe aus der Perspektive eines Extrem Multi-Label Classification (XMLC)-Problems, bei dem Beschreibungen der Beweis für die binäre Relevanz tausender individueller Fähigkeiten sind. Aufbauend auf den aktuellen State-of-the-Art-Ansätzen zur Sprachmodellierung wie BERT zeigen wir, dass unsere XMLC-Methode gegenüber einer bestehenden Basislösung um über 9% und 7% absolute Verbesserungen in Bezug auf Rückruf und normalisierten diskontierten kumulativen Gewinn verbessert. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass unser Ansatz effektiv das Problem fehlender Fähigkeiten adressiert und hilft, relevante Fähigkeiten wiederherzustellen, die in den Stellenausschreibungen verpasst wurden, indem wir die strukturierte semantische Darstellung von Fähigkeiten und deren Zusammentreffen durch einen Correlation Aware Bootstrapping Prozess berücksichtigen. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass unser Ansatz, sicherzustellen, dass das BERT-XMLC-Modell strukturierte semantische Repräsentation von Fähigkeiten und deren Co-Vorkommen durch einen Correlation Aware Bootstrapping-Prozess berücksichtigt, effektiv das Problem fehlender Fähigkeiten adressiert und hilft, relevante Fähigkeiten wiederherzustellen, die in den Stellenausschreibungen verpasst wurden. Um zukünftige Forschung und Replikation unserer Arbeit zu erleichtern, haben wir den Datensatz und die\nUmsetzung unseres Modells öffentlich zugänglich.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model dubokog učenja kako bi naučili skup brojnih vještina posla povezanih s opisom posla. U našoj analizi velike vladinih poslovnih portal a mikarjere. sg, primećujemo da 65% opisa posla nedostaje opisivanje značajnog broja relevantnih vještina. Naš model rješava ovaj zadatak iz perspektive ekstremne multietičke klasifikacije (XMLC) problema, gdje su opisi dokazi za binarnu relevantnost tisuća pojedinačnih vještina. Na temelju trenutnih pristupa modelima jezika kao što je BERT, pokazujemo da se naša metoda XMLC poboljšava na postojećem početnom rješenju za preko 9% i 7% apsolutnog poboljšanja u smislu sjećanja i normaliziranog kumulativnog dobića. Dalje pokazujemo da naš pristup učinkovito rješava problem nestalih vještina i pomaže u oporavci relevantnih vještina koji su nestali na poslovnim postupcima uzimajući u obzir strukturirano semantičko predstavljanje vještina i njihovih saradnjih događaja kroz proces korištenja obavještajnih poduzeća. Dalje pokazujemo da je naš pristup, kako bi osigurali model BERT-XMLC račun za strukturiranu semantičku predstavljanje vještina i njihovih saradnjih događaja kroz proces korištenja obavještajnih poduzeća, učinkovito rješavao probleme s nestalim vještinama i pomagao u oporavljanju relevantnih vještina koje su propuštene u postignućima posla. Da bismo olakšali buduće istraživanje i replikaciju našeg rada, napravili smo sastanak podataka i\nprovedba našeg modela javno dostupno.', 'ko': '우리는 업무 설명과 관련된 일련의 열거된 업무 기능을 배우기 위해 심도 있는 학습 모델을 도입했다.대형 정부 일자리 포털 마이 커리어스 퓨처스에 대한 분석 중입니다.우리가 관찰한 바에 의하면, 65퍼센트에 달하는 업무 묘사는 대량의 관련 기능을 묘사하지 않았다.우리의 모델은 극단적인 다중 라벨 분류(XMLC) 문제의 측면에서 이 임무를 해결했는데 그 중에서 수천 개의 개인 기능의 이원적 관련성을 묘사한 증거이다.현재 가장 선진적인 언어 모델링 방법(예를 들어 BERT)을 토대로 우리는 우리의 XMLC 방법이 리콜율과 표준화 할인 누적 이득 방면에서 기존의 기본 해결 방안보다 9%와 7% 이상 향상된 절대적인 개선을 보여 주었다.우리는 우리의 방법이 기능 부족 문제를 효과적으로 해결하고 관련 감지 유도 과정을 통해 기능의 구조화된 의미 표시와 공현을 고려하여 직위 채용에서 누락된 관련 기능을 회복하는 데 도움이 된다고 밝혔다.우리는 BERT-XMLC모델이 관련 감지 유도 과정을 통해 기능의 구조화된 의미 표시와 공현을 해석하고 기능 부족 문제를 효과적으로 해결하며 채용에서 누락된 관련 기능을 회복하는 데 도움이 되도록 하는 방법을 한층 더 보여 주었다.Dell의 미래 연구와 복제를 촉진하기 위해 데이터 세트와\n우리 모델의 실현은 공개적이다.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en dyb læringsmodel for at lære sættet af opregnede jobfærdigheder forbundet med en jobbeskrivelse. I vores analyse af en stor offentlig jobportal mycareerfremtid. Vi bemærker, at op til 65% af jobbeskrivelserne savner at beskrive et betydeligt antal relevante færdigheder. Vores model behandler denne opgave ud fra et ekstremt multi-label klassifikationsproblem (XMLC), hvor beskrivelser er bevis for den binære relevans af tusindvis af individuelle færdigheder. Med udgangspunkt i de nuværende state-of-the-art sprogmodelleringsmetoder som BERT viser vi, at vores XMLC-metode forbedrer en eksisterende basisløsning med over 9% og 7% absolutte forbedringer i form af tilbagekaldelse og normaliseret diskonteret kumulativ gevinst. Vi viser endvidere, at vores tilgang effektivt løser problemet med manglende færdigheder og hjælper med at genvinde relevante færdigheder, der blev savnet i jobopslag, ved at tage hensyn til den strukturerede semantiske repræsentation af færdigheder og deres samtidige forekomster gennem en korrelationsbevidst Bootstrapping proces. Vi viser endvidere, at vores tilgang, for at sikre, at BERT-XMLC-modellen tager højde for struktureret semantisk repræsentation af færdigheder og deres samtidige forekomster gennem en korrelationsbevidst opstartsproces, effektivt løser de manglende færdighedsproblem og hjælper med at gendanne relevante færdigheder, der blev savnet i jobopslagene. For at lette fremtidig forskning og replikering af vores arbejde har vi lavet datasættet og\ngennemførelse af vores model, der er offentligt tilgængelig.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een deep learning model om de set opgesomde functievaardigheden te leren die gekoppeld zijn aan een functiebeschrijving. In onze analyse van een grootschalig overheidsjobportal mycareerfuture. SG, we merken dat tot 65% van de functiebeschrijvingen een aanzienlijk aantal relevante vaardigheden mist. Ons model benadert deze taak vanuit het perspectief van een extreem multi-label classification (XMLC) probleem, waarbij beschrijvingen het bewijs zijn voor de binaire relevantie van duizenden individuele vaardigheden. Voortbouwend op de huidige state-of-the-art taalmodelleringsbenaderingen zoals BERT, laten we zien dat onze XMLC-methode verbetert ten opzichte van een bestaande baseline-oplossing met meer dan 9% en 7% absolute verbeteringen in termen van recall en genormaliseerde disconteerde cumulatieve winst. We tonen verder aan dat onze aanpak effectief het probleem van ontbrekende vaardigheden aanpakt en helpt bij het herstellen van relevante vaardigheden die werden gemist in de vacatures door rekening te houden met de gestructureerde semantische representatie van vaardigheden en hun co-voorkomen door middel van een Correlation Aware Bootstrapping proces. We tonen verder aan dat onze aanpak, om ervoor te zorgen dat het BERT-XMLC model rekening houdt met gestructureerde semantische representatie van vaardigheden en hun co-incidenten via een Correlation Aware Bootstrapping proces, effectief het probleem van ontbrekende vaardigheden aanpakt en helpt bij het herstellen van relevante vaardigheden die werden gemist in de vacatures. Om toekomstig onderzoek en replicatie van ons werk te vergemakkelijken, hebben we de dataset en de\nimplementatie van ons model openbaar beschikbaar.', 'id': 'We introduce a deep learning model to learn the set of enumerated job skills associated with a job description.  Dalam analisis kami dari portal pekerjaan pemerintah besar masa depan karirku. sg, kita memperhatikan bahwa sampai 65% dari deskripsi pekerjaan melewatkan deskripsi jumlah keterampilan yang signifikan. Model kami mengatasi tugas ini dari perspektif dari masalah klasifikasi ekstrim multi-label (XMLC), dimana deskripsi adalah bukti untuk relevansi binari ribuan keterampilan individu. Berdasarkan pendekatan modern-state-of-the-language model seperti BERT, kami menunjukkan metode XMLC kami meningkat pada solusi dasar yang ada dengan lebih dari 9% dan 7% peningkatan mutlak dalam terma recall dan normalisasi pendapatan kumulatif diskonten. Kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita secara efektif mengatasi masalah keterampilan yang hilang, dan membantu dalam mengembalikan keterampilan relevan yang hilang dalam posting pekerjaan dengan mempertimbangkan repræsentasi semantis struktur keterampilan dan korespondensi mereka melalui proses penyerangan Perawatan Korelasi. Kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita, untuk memastikan rekening model BERT-XMLC untuk representation semantis strukturasi dari keterampilan dan korespondensi mereka melalui proses penyimpanan sepatu Awas Korelasi, secara efektif mengatasi masalah keterampilan yang hilang, dan membantu dalam mengembalikan keterampilan relevan yang terlepas dalam posting pekerjaan. Untuk memudahkan penelitian dan replikasi masa depan dari pekerjaan kami, kami telah membuat dataset dan\nimplementasi model kita tersedia publik.', 'fa': 'ما مدل یادگیری عمیق را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا مجموعه مهارت\u200cهای شماره\u200cشده کار را با توصیف کاری یاد بگیریم. در تحلیل یک دروازه شغل دولتی بسیار بزرگ در مورد کارهای من است. sg، ما مشاهده می کنیم که به اندازه ۶۵ درصد توضیح شغلی که توضیح تعداد مهارت ارتباطی دارد دلتنگ شده است. مدل ما این وظیفه را از دیدگاه یک مشکل مختلف برچسب\u200cهای زیادی (XMLC) دریافت می\u200cکند، جایی توضیح\u200cها مدرک\u200cهای مربوط به دو مربوط به هزاران مهارت شخصی هستند. بر اساس موضوع مدل\u200cسازی زبان هنری فعلی مانند BERT نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش XMLC ما در راه حل پایین\u200cخط موجود با بیش از ۹ درصد و ۷ درصد بهبود\u200cهای کامل در مورد یادآوری و بهره\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای معمولی\u200cشده را بهبود می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که دسترسی ما به طور موثر مشکل مهارت گم شده را حل می\u200cکند، و به recovery of relevant skills that were missing in the job postings by taking into account the structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process. ما هم نشان می دهیم که روش ما، برای مطمئن کردن مدل BERT-XMLC حساب برای نمایش مهارت\u200cهای semantic ساخته شده و اتفاقات همکاری آنها را از طریق فرآینده\u200cی خرابکاری آگاهی آگاهی بوت\u200cگیری، به طور موثرت مشکل مهارت\u200cهای گمشده را حل می\u200cکند، و به recovery of relevant skills that were missing in the job postings کمک می\u200cکند. برای آسانی تحقیقات و تکرار آینده کار ما، مجموعه داده ها و\nعملیات مدل ما را به طور عمومی در دسترسی دارد.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n diep leer model om te leer die stel van getelde werk kunstenaars geassosieer met 'n werk beskrywing. In ons analisie van 'n groot-skaal regeringwerksportaal mykareersfuur. sg, ons bewaar dat so veel as 65% van werksbeskrywings mis om 'n betekende aantal relevante kunstenaars te beskryf. Ons model adreseer hierdie taak van die perspektief van 'n ekstrem multi-label klasifikasie (XMLC) probleem, waar beskrywings is die getuienis vir die binêre relevansie van duisende individuele kunstenaars. By gebou op die huidige staat-van-die-kunste taal modellering toekoms soos BERT, wys ons XMLC metode op 'n bestaande basisline oplossing verbeter deur meer 9% en 7% absoluele verbeteringe in terms van rekening en normaliseerde afgesluit kumulatiewe verkry. Ons wys verder dat ons toegang effektief die ontbrekende kunstensieprobleem adreseer en helper in die herstelling van relevante kunstensies wat in die werkspoestelings ontbreek is deur die structureerde semantiese voorstelling van kunstensies en hulle saamgeval deur 'n Korelasie Aware Bootstrapping proses te neem. Ons wys verder dat ons toegang, om die BERT-XMLC model rekeninge te verseker vir struktureerde semantiese voorstelling van kunstenaars en hul saamgebeurtenis deur 'n Korelasie Aware Bootstrapping proses, effektief die ontbrekende kunstenaars probleem te besluit, en hulp in die herstelling van relevante kunstenaars wat in die werkspos ontbreek is. Om toekomstige ondersoek en replikasie van ons werk te maak, het ons die datastel en die\nimplementering van ons model openlik beskikbaar.", 'tr': 'Biz çukur öwrenmek nusgasyny iş waspy bilen ýazylan hasaplanýan ukyplary öwrenmek üçin guruldyrýarys. Biziň uly ölçekli hökümetiň işi portulasynyň mykarýerasynyň çykmasynda. sg, biz 65% iş tassymlaryň wajyp ukyplarynyň wajyp ukyplaryny tassyklamak ýok. Bizim modelimiz bu görevi, üstün bir çoklu etiketli klasifikasyon (XMLC) sorununun perspektivinden çözdi. Bu şekilde tanımlarımız binlerce kişisel ukyplaryň bir kanıtıdır. BERT ýaly häzirki möhüm dili modellerinde esasy taýýarlanan ýagdaýynda, biz XMLC metodumyzyň bar baseline çözümünde 9% we 7% sany üstünde düzeldiler we normalde boýunça küçümsel gazanlygyny görkeýäris. Daha fazla yolumuz ýok ukyplaryň problemlerini etkinleştirir ve işe göndermeklerde ýok ukyplaryň geri almasına kömek edip, düzenli semantik ukyplaryň ve işbirliklerini düzenleme şeklinde çözerek ýok edilen yetenekleri geliştirir. Daha fazla şekilde, BERT-XMLC modeli hesaplarımızı yapılan semantik teknolojilerin ve işbirliğimizin düzenlenmesini sağlamak için, çözmeş teknolojimizin problemlerini çözmesini ve işe göndermesinde kaybolan yetenekleri elde etmek için yardımcı olacağını gösteriyoruz. Geljekki araştyrmalarymyzy we işimiziň kopyalamagyny bejermek üçin, biz veri setirini we şuny bejerdik\nnusganymyzyň täzelikleri publika meňzeşligi bar.', 'am': 'የሥራ መግለጫ የተጠቃሚ የስራ ብልሃት ለመማር ጥልቅ ትምህርት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በታላቅ የመንግሥት ሥራ የፖርቲካ የሀብት ትርጓሜ ፍለጋችን በማስተካከል፡፡ sg፣ የሥራ ጽሑፎች 65 በመቶ ያህል የሚያስፈልገውን የግንኙነት ብልሃት ማሳሳየትን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴል ይህ ስራችን ከብዙ-label ክፍል (XMLC) ጉዳይ ላይ ያሳያል፤ ጽሑፎች የሺሕዎች ብልሃቶች የልዩ ብሔራዊ ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልጉት ማስረጃ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን በመሥራት ላይ እንደBERT፣ የአሁኑን የXMLC ሥርዓት በ9 በመቶ እና 7 በመቶ ክስተት እና በተመሳሰለ ቁማት እና በተለወጠው ጥቅማት ላይ አካባቢ ማድረግ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የጠይቁትን የጥበብ መከራ በጥቅም እና በሥራው ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተሳሳቱትን ተሟጋቾች ለመመለስ እና የብልሃቶችን እና በተጨማሪው የኮርተርናዊ መዝገብ በኩል የተመሳሰለውን አስተያየት እና በተጨማሪነታቸውን በመጠቀም ይረዳናል፡፡ የBERT-XMLC ሞዴል አካባቢዎችን እና የክፍለ ሀብት እና ሁኔታውን በተጨማሪው የመጽናናት ማሳየት እና በተጨማሪው የቦክራሲ መዝገብ ፕሮጀክት እና በተጨማሪው የብሔራዊ እውቀት መቆጣጠር ማድረግ እና በሥራው ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተሳሳቱትን የግንኙነት እውቀት ማድረግ ይረዳናል፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት እና ሥራችንን ለማቀናቀል፣ ዳታሬስቴን እና\nimplementation of our model publicly available.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդել, որպեսզի սովորենք աշխատանքի նկարագրման հետ կապված համակարգված հմտությունները: Մեր ուսումնասիրության մեծ կառավարական աշխատանքի պորտալ իմ կարիերայի ապագայում: Սգ, մենք նկատում ենք, որ աշխատանքի նկարագրությունների 65 տոկոսը բացակայում է նշանակալի քանակի հմտություններ նկարագրելը: Մեր մոդելը դիտարկում է այս խնդիրը բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասակարգման (XMLC) խնդիր տեսանկյունից, որտեղ նկարագրությունները ապացույցներ են հազարավոր անհատական հմտությունների երկարային կարևորության համար: Հիմնվելով ներկայիս ամենաբարձր լեզվի մոդելների վրա, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր XMLC մեթոդը բարելավում է գոյություն ունեցող հիմնական լուծումների վրա ավելի քան 9 և 7 տոկոսով բացարձակ բարելավում հիշողության և նորմալիզացված հաշվարկված ընդլայնման տես Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը արդյունավետ լուծում է բացակայած հմտությունների խնդիրը և օգնում է վերականգնել այն հմտությունները, որոնք բացակայվել են աշխատանքի տեղադրման ժամանակ, հաշվի առնելով հմտությունների կառուցվածքային սեմանտիկ ներկայացումը և դրանց համապատահականները Կորելացիայի գիտ Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը, BER-XMLC մոդելի հաշվի առնելու համար հմտությունների կառուցվածքավորված սեմանտիկ ներկայացումը և դրանց համապատասխանատվությունները Կորելացիայի գիտակցության ոտքերի բեռնման գործընթացի միջոցով, արդյունավետ լուծելու համար բացակայած հմտությունների խնդիրը և օգնում է վերակ Մեր աշխատանքի ապագա հետազոտությունների և կրկնօրինակումների հեշտացնելու համար մենք ստեղծել ենք տվյալների համակարգը և\nմեր հասանելի մոդելի իրականացումը:', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha mtindo wa kujifunza kwa kina ili kujifunza mfumo wa ujuzi wa kazi unaohesabiwa na maelezo ya kazi. Katika uchambuzi wetu wa kazi za serikali kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya kufikiria. sg, tunaona kwamba kiasi cha asilimia 65 ya maelezo ya kazi hukosa kuelezea ujuzi wa muhimu. Mfano wetu unaonyesha juhudi hili kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa kutangazwa kwa aina mbalimbali (XMLC), ambapo maelezo hayo ni ushahidi wa mahusiano ya maelfu ya ujuzi binafsi. Building upon the current state-of-the-art language modeling approaches such as BERT, we show our XMLC method improves on an existing baseline solution by over 9% and 7% absolute improvements in terms of recall and normalized discounted cumulative gain.  Tunaonyesha zaidi kuwa hatua yetu inahusiana na tatizo la ujuzi ambalo hazipotea, na tunasaidia kutafuta ujuzi muhimu ambao ulikosa katika makala za kazi kwa kuzingatia muwakilishaji wa ujuzi wa kimapenzi na matukio yao ya pamoja kupitia mchakato wa Kutekeleza Vitabu vya Uhusiano. Tunaonyesha zaidi kwamba mbinu yetu, kuhakikisha anuani za modeli ya BERT-XMLC kwa ajili ya uwakilishi wa ujuzi wa sekunde na matukio yao ya pamoja kupitia mchakato wa kuchapisha vitabu vya kuhusiana na mahusiano, hujadili tatizo lililopotea ujuzi, na kusaidia kutafuta ujuzi muhimu ambao ulipoteza katika makala za kazi. Kusaidia utafiti wa baadaye na kubadilisha kazi zetu, tumetengeneza taarifa na\nkutekeleza mifano yetu kwa uwazi.', 'az': 'İş tanımlaması ilə birlikdə sayılmış iş yetkinlikləri öyrənmək üçün derin öyrənmə modelini təşkil edirik. Büyük ölçülü hökumət işləri portal ı mycareersforması analizimizdə. sg, biz işin 65%-inin müəyyən sayını müəyyən edirik. Bizim modellərimiz bu işi müxtəlif bir çoxlu etiketli klasifikasiya (XMLC) probleminin perspektivindən çəkir, hansı təfsirləri min nəsillərin indir yetkinliklərinin ikili əlaqəsi barəsindədir. BERT kimi hüzurumuzdakı sanat dilinin modelləşdirilməsi üçün, XLC metodumuzun mövcud sətir çətinliklərini 9%-dən art ıq və 7%-dən artıq yaxşılaşdırmağını göstəririk. Biz daha da göstəririk ki, bizim tərəfimiz qeyb yetkinlik problemlərinə müvafiq olaraq çəkilir, və işlər göndərmələrində qeyb edilən müvafiq yetkinlikləri təmizləməyə kömək edir, fikirlərin strukturlı semantik göstərilməsini və onların ortaqlarını bir İşləmə Aware Bootstrapping prosesi vasitəsilə çəkilir. Biz də göstəririk ki, BERT-XMLC modeli hesablarını müəyyən etmək üçün yapılmış semantik yeteneklərin və onların birlikləri ilə birlikdə təşkil etmək üçün, korlaması Aware Bootstrapping prosesi vasitəsilə, qeyb yetenekliklərin problemlərini təşkil etmək üçün, və işlər göndərmələrində qeyb edilmiş mümkün yeteneklikləri təmizləmək üçün yardım edirik. Geləcək təhsil araştırmalarını və işimizin yenilənməsini asanlaşdırmaq üçün, biz verilən qurğuları və\nmodellərimizin müəyyən edilməsi.', 'ca': "Introduïm un model d'aprenentatge profund per aprendre el conjunt d'habilitats de treball enumerades associades a una descripció de treball. En la nostra anàlisi d'un gran portal de treball governamental,el meu futur de carreres. sg, we observe that as much as 65% of job descriptions miss describing a significant number of relevant skills.  El nostre model aborda aquesta tasca des de la perspectiva d'un problema extrem de classificació multietiquetada (XMLC), on les descripcions són l'evidència de la pertinencia binaria de milers d'habilitats individuals. Construïnt-nos en els enfocaments actuals de modelació de llenguatges com BERT, demostram que el nostre mètode XMLC millora en una solució basal existent un 9% i un 7% millora absoluta en termes de recuperació i guanya acumulativa descontada normalitzada. Ens mostram que el nostre enfocament aborda eficaçment el problem a de les habilitats que falten, i ajuda a recuperar les habilitats pertinents que es van perdre a la feina tenint en compte la representació semàntica estructurada de les habilitats i les seves coincidències a través d'un procés de trampa de correlació de consciència. Ens demostram que el nostre enfocament, per assegurar que el model BERT-XMLC conté una representació semàntica estructurada de les habilitats i les seves coincidències a través d'un procés de correlació conscient Bootstrapping, aborda efectivament el problema de les habilitats que falten, i ajuda a recuperar les habilitats pertinents que es van perdre en la feina. Per facilitar la recerca futura i la replicació de la nostra feina, hem fet el conjunt de dades i\nla implementació del nostre model disponible al públic.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model dubokog učenja kako bi naučili setu brojnih vještina posla povezanih sa opisom posla. U našoj analizi velike vladinih poslovnih portal a mikarjere. Gledamo da 65% opisa posla nedostaje opisivanje značajnog broja relevantnih vještina. Naš model rješava ovaj zadatak iz perspektive ekstremne multietičke klasifikacije (XMLC) problema, gdje su opisi dokazi za binarnu relevantnost tisuća pojedinačnih vještina. Na temelju trenutnih pristupa modelima jezika kao što je BERT, pokazujemo da se naš metod XMLC poboljšava na postojećem početnom rješenju za preko 9% i 7% apsolutnog poboljšanja u smislu sjećanja i normaliziranog kumulativnog dobića. Dalje pokazujemo da je naš pristup efektivno rješavao problem nestalih vještina i pomaže u oporavci relevantnih vještina koje su nestale na poslovnim postupcima uzimajući u obzir strukturiranu semantičku predstavu vještina i njihovih saradnja kroz proces korilacije obavještajnih poduzeća. Dalje pokazujemo da je naš pristup, kako bi osigurali model BERT-XMLC račun za strukturiranu semantičku predstavljanje vještina i njihovih saradnjih događaja kroz proces korištenja obavještajnih poduzeća, učinkovito rješavao probleme sa nestalim vještinama i pomagao u oporavljanju relevantnih vještina koje su nestale na poslovima. Da bismo olakšali buduće istraživanje i replikaciju našeg rada, napravili smo podatke i\nprovedba našeg modela javno dostupno.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një model mësimi të thellë për të mësuar sërën e aftësive të numëruara të punës lidhur me një përshkrim të punës. Në analizën tonë të një portali të madh të punës qeveritare karierën time të ardhme. sg, ne vëzhgojmë se deri në 65% e përshkrimit të punës mungon përshkrimi i një numri të rëndësishëm të aftësive relevante. Modeli ynë trajton këtë detyrë nga perspektiva e një problemi ekstrem klasifikimi me shumë etiketa (XMLC), ku përshkrimet janë prova për rëndësinë binare të mijëra aftësive individuale. Duke u mbështetur në metodat aktuale të modelimit të gjuhës së moderne si BERT, ne tregojmë se metoda jonë XMLC përmirësohet në një zgjidhje bazë ekzistuese me mbi 9% dhe 7% përmirësime absolute në lidhje me tërheqjen dhe fitimin e normalizuar të diskontuar kumulativ. Ne tregojmë më tej se qasja jonë trajton efektivisht problem in e aftësive të munguara dhe ndihmon në rimëkëmbjen e aftësive të rëndësishme që u munguan në postimet e punës duke marrë parasysh përfaqësimin semantik të strukturuar të aftësive dhe bashkëndodhjet e tyre nëpërmjet një procesi të kapjes së çmimeve të njohura për korrelacionin. Ne tregojmë më tej se qasja jonë, për të siguruar model in BERT-XMLC llogaritet për përfaqësimin semantik të strukturuar të aftësive dhe bashkëndodhjet e tyre nëpërmjet një procesi të mbylljes së çmimeve të njohura për korrelacionin, trajton efektivisht problemet e aftësive të munguara dhe ndihmon në rimëkëmbjen e aftësive të rëndësishme që u munguan në postimet e punës. Për të lehtësuar kërkimin e ardhshëm dhe përsëritjen e punës sonë, ne kemi bërë të dhënat dhe\nzbatimi i modelit tonë publikisht në dispozicion.', 'cs': 'Představujeme model hlubokého učení, abychom se naučili sadu výčtu pracovních dovedností spojených s popisem práce. V naší analýze rozsáhlého vládního pracovního portálu mycareerfuture. sg, pozorujeme, že až 65% popisů pracovních míst chybí popis významného počtu relevantních dovedností. Náš model řeší tento úkol z pohledu extrémní multi-label klasifikace (XMLC), kde popisy jsou důkazem binární relevance tisíců individuálních dovedností. Na základě současných nejmodernějších jazykových modelovacích přístupů, jako je BERT, ukazujeme, že se naše XMLC metoda zlepšuje oproti stávajícímu základnímu řešení o více než 9% a 7% absolutní zlepšení z hlediska stažení a normalizovaného diskontovaného kumulativního zisku. Dále ukazujeme, že náš přístup efektivně řeší problém chybějících dovedností a pomáhá při obnově relevantních dovedností, které byly přehlédnuty v pracovních nabídkách tím, že zohlední strukturovanou sémantickou reprezentaci dovedností a jejich společné výskyty prostřednictvím procesu Correlation Aware Bootstrapping. Dále ukazujeme, že náš přístup, aby model BERT-XMLC zohlednil strukturovanou sémantickou reprezentaci dovedností a jejich společných výskytů prostřednictvím procesu Correlation Aware Bootstrapping, efektivně řeší problém chybějících dovedností a pomáhá obnovit relevantní dovednosti, které byly přehlédnuty v pracovních nabídkách. Pro usnadnění budoucího výzkumu a replikace naší práce jsme vytvořili datovou sadu a\nimplementace našeho modelu veřejně dostupného.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি কাজের বর্ণনার সাথে সম্পর্কিত কাজের দক্ষতা শিখার জন্য। আমাদের বিশ্লেষণে সরকারের পোর্টাল কাজের পোর্টাল মিয়ারিসের ভবিষ্যতে। জিজ, আমরা দেখি যে প্রায় 65% কাজের বর্ণনা মিস হয়েছে বিশেষ সংখ্যা যুক্ত দক্ষতা বর্ণনা করছে। আমাদের মডেল এক অত্যন্ত বহুল লেবেল বিভাগের (এক্সএমএলসি) সমস্যার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে এই কাজের কথা বলেছে, যেখানে বর্ণনা হচ্ছে হাজার হাজার হাজার প্রত বর্তমান পরিস্থিতি-শিল্পী ভাষার মডেলিং পদ্ধতি নির্মাণ করছে যেমন বিবের্ট, আমরা আমাদের এক্সএমএলিসি পদ্ধতি দেখাচ্ছি বিদ্যমান বেসালাইনের সমাধানে ৯% এবং ৭% এর বেশী সম্ আমরা আরো দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা কার্যকর ভাবে নিখোঁজ দক্ষতা সমস্যার সাথে নিয়ে যাচ্ছে এবং কাজের পোস্টে যে দক্ষতা হারিয়ে গেছে তা পুনরুদ্ধার করার সাহায্য করে যা আমরা আরো দেখাচ্ছি যে বের্ট-এক্সএমএলসি মডেল অ্যাকাউন্ট নিশ্চিত করার জন্যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া নিশ্চিত করা যায় যে তাদের দক্ষতা এবং তাদের সাথে সম্পর্কিত বুটস্ট্র্যাপ প প্রক্রিয়ার মাধ্ ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণা এবং আমাদের কাজের প্রতিস্থাপনের জন্য আমরা ডাটাসেট এবং ডাটাসেট তৈরি করেছি।\nআমাদের মডেল প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যায়।', 'et': 'Tutvustame sügavõppe mudelit, et õppida töökirjeldusega seotud loetletud tööoskusi. Meie analüüsis laiaulatuslikku valitsuse tööportaali minu valdkonnad tulevad. sg, täheldame, et kuni 65% töökirjeldustest ei kirjelda märkimisväärset arvu asjakohaseid oskusi. Meie mudel käsitleb seda ülesannet ekstreemse mitme märgisega klassifitseerimise (XMLC) probleemi vaatenurgast, kus kirjeldused on tõendiks tuhandete individuaalsete oskuste binaarse tähtsuse kohta. Tuginedes praegustele kaasaegsetele keele modelleerimise lähenemisviisidele, nagu BERT, näitame, et meie XMLC meetod parandab olemasolevat baaslahendust üle 9% ja 7% absoluutse paranemise tagasikutsumise ja normaliseeritud diskonteeritud kumulatiivse kasu osas. Lisaks näitame, et meie lähenemisviis lahendab tõhusalt puuduvate oskuste probleemi ja aitab taastada asjakohased oskused, mis jäid töökuulutustes ilma, võttes arvesse oskuste struktureeritud semantilist esindamist ja nende kaasesinemist korrelatsiooniteadliku bootstrapping protsessi kaudu. Lisaks näitame, et meie lähenemisviis tagamaks, et BERT-XMLC mudel võtab arvesse oskuste struktureeritud semantilist esindamist ja nende samaaegseid esinemisi korrelatsiooniteadliku bootstrapping protsessi kaudu, lahendab tõhusalt puuduvate oskuste probleemi ja aitab taastada asjakohased oskused, mis jäid töökuulutustes puudumata. Et hõlbustada tulevast uurimistööd ja oma töö replikatsiooni, oleme koostanud andmekogumi ja\nmeie mudeli rakendamine avalikult kättesaadavaks.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme syväoppimisen mallin, jonka avulla opimme tehtäväkuvaukseen liittyvät luetteloidut työtaidot. Analyysissämme suuren mittakaavan hallituksen työpaikkaportaalista minun alueeni tulevaisuus. sg, havaitsemme, että jopa 65% työnkuvauksista jättää kuvaamatta merkittävää määrää merkityksellisiä taitoja. Mallimme käsittelee tätä tehtävää äärimmäisen monileimaisen luokitteluongelman näkökulmasta, jossa kuvaukset ovat todiste tuhansien yksittäisten taitojen binaarisesta merkityksestä. Kehittämällä nykyisiä viimeisimpiä kielimallinnusmenetelmiä, kuten BERT, osoitamme XMLC-menetelmämme parantavan olemassa olevaa perusratkaisua yli 9% ja 7% absoluuttisesti palautuksen ja normalisoidun diskontatun kumulatiivisen voiton suhteen. Osoitamme lisäksi, että lähestymistapamme käsittelee tehokkaasti puuttuvia taitoja koskevaa ongelmaa ja auttaa palauttamaan olennaisia taitoja, jotka jäivät pois työpaikkailmoituksista, ottamalla huomioon taitojen strukturoidun semanttisen edustuksen ja niiden rinnakkaisesiintymisen korrelaatiotietoisen Bootstrapping-prosessin avulla. Osoitamme lisäksi, että lähestymistapamme varmistaa, että BERT-XMLC-malli huomioi taitojen ja niiden rinnakkaisesiintymisen strukturoidun semanttisen esittämisen korrelaatiotietoisen Bootstrapping-prosessin avulla, käsittelee tehokkaasti puuttuvia taitoja koskevaa ongelmaa ja auttaa palauttamaan asiaankuuluvat taidot, jotka jäivät pois työpaikkailmoituksissa. Tulevan tutkimuksen ja työn replikoinnin helpottamiseksi olemme tehneet aineiston ja\nmallimme toteuttaminen julkisesti saatavilla.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo model globokega učenja za učenje nabora naštetih delovnih spretnosti, povezanih z opisom delovnega mesta. V naši analizi obsežnega vladnega delovnega portala moje področje prihodnost. ugotavljamo, da kar 65% opisov delovnih mest ne opisuje znatnega števila ustreznih spretnosti. Naš model obravnava to nalogo z vidika ekstremnega problema razvrščanja več oznak (XMLC), kjer opisi dokazujejo binarno pomembnost tisoč posameznih veščin. Na podlagi sedanjih najsodobnejših pristopov jezikovnega modeliranja, kot je BERT, smo pokazali, da naša metoda XMLC izboljša obstoječo osnovno rešitev za več kot 9% in 7% absolutne izboljšave v smislu odpoklica in normaliziranega diskontiranega kumulativnega dobička. Poleg tega pokažemo, da naš pristop učinkovito obravnava problem manjkajočih spretnosti in pomaga pri povrnitvi ustreznih spretnosti, ki so bile zamujane pri objavah delovnih mest, tako da upoštevamo strukturirano semantično predstavitev spretnosti in njihovih sočasnih pojavov prek postopka korelacijskega zaznavanja. Poleg tega pokažemo, da naš pristop, ki zagotavlja, da model BERT-XMLC upošteva strukturirano semantično predstavitev spretnosti in njihovih soočasnih pojavov prek procesa korelacijskega začetka, učinkovito obravnava problem manjkajočih spretnosti in pomaga pri povrnitvi ustreznih spretnosti, ki so bile zamujane na objavah za delo. Da bi olajšali prihodnje raziskave in replikacijo našega dela, smo izdelali nabor podatkov in\nizvajanje našega modela, ki je javno dostopen.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל למידה עמוק ללמוד את קבוצת כישורי עבודה מוספרים שקשורים לתיאור עבודה. בניתוח שלנו של שער עבודה ממשלתית גדול בעתיד הקריירה שלי. sg, אנחנו רואים שכל 65% מהתיאורים של עבודה מתגעגעים לתאר מספר משמעותי של כישורים רלוונטיים. הדוגמנית שלנו מתייחסת למשימה הזו מבחינה של בעיה מסווג רב-תווים (XMLC) קיצונית, היכן התיאורים הם הראיות לרלוונציה בינרית של אלפי כישורים בודדים. בניין על גישות הדוגמניות של השפה המיוחדת הנוכחיות כמו BERT, אנחנו מראים שיטת XMLC שלנו משתפרת על פתרון בסיסי קיים בערך מעל 9% ו-7% שיפורים מוחלטים במונחים של זיכרון ונורמליזם הרווח הסקולטיבי הנורמלי. אנחנו גם מראים שהגישה שלנו מתייחסת באופן יעיל לבעית הכישורים הנעדרות, ומעזרת להשיב כישורים רלוונטיים שהפספסו בהודעות העבודה על ידי לקחת בחשבון את היציגה הסמנטית המבנית של כישורים וההתרחשות השותפות שלהם דרך תהליך של תקשורת מודעות על עגלים. אנחנו גם מראים שהגישה שלנו, כדי להבטיח שהמודל BERT-XMLC יחשבו על מייצג סמנטי מובנה של כישורים וההתרחשות השותפות שלהם דרך תהליך לכודת מגפיים מודע לקשר, מתייחס באופן יעיל לבעית הכישורים הנעדרות, ומעזר להשיב כישורים רלוונטיים שפספסו בהודעות העבודה. To facilitate future research and replication of our work, we have made the dataset and the\nההפעלה של המודל שלנו זמין לציבור.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem deep sampek kanggo ngerasai kapan kuwi nggawe gerakno. Anyone og Monday Ngawe Awak dhéwé mengko nganggep petani soko hal-hal dadi bener kang karo perbudhakan maneh sing mengko, lan bantuan njaluk kanggo ngilangno kalawartané perusahaan kelas kuwi nggawe nguasai sistem sematik sing bisa nguasai perusahaan winih hayo Awak dhéwé mungkin nganggo hal-hal dadi, ngêwis ngerasakno model BERT-XMLC kuwi kontoh semanti sing bisa nguasai perusahaan karo hal-hal nganggo perangkat sabanjuré sing berarti sabanjuré karo Resolution Awar kanggo ngejaraké perusahaan resmi lan mbukaké repaké awak dhéwé, awak dhéwé wis nggawe dataset lan kekaké\nwehke ngewehke model sing ditambah akeh populer', 'ha': "Tuna ƙara wani misali mai da aka sanar da shi kafin abincin da aka lissafa da wani rabon aiki. In a anayya a kanmu na wani aikin mai girma na gomlar mulki. G, Munã ganin cewa cewa 65% na rabon aikin suna faɗin yawan abinci mai muhimmi. Misalinmu yana tambayar wannan aikin daga fatan wani fitina mai yawa (XMLC), a inda misalin ayukan misalin sune ta zama bayani ga mutane na biyu. Buning kan halin-state-of-the-art-language motdalilin hanyoyin kamar BERT, za'a nũna metoden XMLC ya fi ƙaranci a kan zaman salon da ke ƙara 9% da 7% baƙata tsari cikin muhimmin amfani da aka raba shi da kuma an daidaita shi da amfani na cumulative. Tuna ƙara shekara cewa hanyoyinmu zai wajabta mataimako da ma'abũcin abincin da ba ta ɓace ba, kuma yana taimako in kõma masu da labanci da aka saka kare su a cikin makampuni na aikin da za'a yi hisãbi da aka samu'ar da ake samar da musamman masu da abincinsu a sami-aikin Corlink Ana sani. We further show that our approach, to ensure the BERT-XMLC model accounts for structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process, effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed out in the job postings.  Ga mu yi amfani da research na musanya aikinmu na gaba, mun sami danne da\nsamun misalinmu na da bayyani.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་གྲངས་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་བྱེད་ན། ང་ཚོའི་དབུལ་སྤྱིའི་དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྣང་ཚོགས་ལས་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་དེ་རེད། sg, ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུ་ནི། ལས་ཀ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་65% སྐོར་ཡིན་པ་གལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་མཐུན་སྣེ་མང་བྱུང་བའི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་གནད་དོན་ཡོད། Building on the current state-of-the-art language modeling approaches such as BERT, we show our XMLC method improves on an existing baseline solution by over 9% and 7% absolute improvements in terms of recall and normalized discounted cumulative gain. We further show that our approach effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed in the job postings by taking into account the structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process. We further show that our approach, to ensure the BERT-XMLC model accounts for structured semantic representation of skills and their co-occurrences through a Correlation Aware Bootstrapping process, effectively addresses the missing skills problem, and helps in recovering relevant skills that were missed out in the job postings. ང་ཚོའི་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ཚབ་ཏུ་བཅུག་དགོས་པ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་།\nང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་སྟོན་པར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'An Analysis of Dataset Overlap on Winograd-Style Tasks', 'ar': 'تحليل تداخل مجموعة البيانات في مهام فينوغراد', 'es': 'Un análisis de la superposición de conjuntos de datos en tareas de estilo Winograd', 'fr': 'Une analyse du chevauchement de jeux de données sur des tâches de style Winograd', 'pt': 'Uma análise da sobreposição do conjunto de dados em tarefas no estilo Winograd', 'ja': 'Winogradスタイルタスクのデータセットオーバーラップの分析', 'zh': 'Winograd 式数据集重析', 'ru': 'Анализ перекрытия наборов данных по задачам типа «Виноград»', 'hi': 'Winograd-शैली कार्यों पर डेटासेट ओवरलैप का विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís ar Fhorluí Tacar Sonraí ar Thascanna Stíl Winograd', 'hu': 'Az adatkészlet átfedésének elemzése Winograd stílusú feladatokban', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια ανάλυση της επικάλυψης συνόλου δεδομένων σε εργασίες ύφους Winograd', 'it': "Un'analisi di sovrapposizione di dati su attività in stile Winograd", 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Winograd- стилінің тапсырмаларының деректер қорларының үстінен талдау', 'lt': 'An Analysis of Dataset Overlap on Winograd-Style Tasks', 'ml': 'വിനോഗ്രാഡ്- ശൈലിയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ പരിശോധന', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Analiżi tal-Għolja tas-Sett ta’ Dejta dwar Kompiti bi Stil tal-Winograd', 'pl': 'Analiza nakładania zbiorów danych na zadaniach w stylu Winograd', 'mn': 'Winograd-Style Tasks дээр өгөгдлийн сангийн давхарлалтын шинжилгээ', 'ro': 'O analiză a suprapunerii setului de date asupra sarcinilor Winograd-Style', 'sr': 'Analiza preklapanja podataka o zadatkima vinograda stila', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'An Analysis of Dataset Overlap on Winograd-Style Tasks', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'En analys av datauppsĂ¤ttningsĂ¶verdrag pĂ¥ Winograd-stil uppgifter', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết quả phân tích của « Hồ sơ » trên các tác vụ kiểu Winn', 'bg': 'Анализ на съвкупността от данни за задачи в Winograd стил', 'da': 'En analyse af datasæt overlapning på Winograd-stil opgaver', 'hr': 'Analiza preklapanja podataka o zadatkima Winograd-stila', 'nl': 'Een analyse van dataset overlap op Winograd-stijl taken', 'de': 'Eine Analyse der Überlappung von Datensätzen bei Aufgaben im Winograd-Stil', 'ko': 'Winograd 스타일 작업의 데이터 집합 중첩 분석', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Jukwaa la Taarifa kwenye kazi za Winograd-Style', 'tr': 'Winograd-biçim Görevlerinde Maglumat Üstini Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një analizë e përmbysjes së dataset në detyrat e stilit Winograd', 'am': 'dialogs-style', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Winograd-Styli G칬nd톛ril톛ri bar톛sind톛 Datat 칖st칲nl칲y칲n칲n Analizi', 'bn': 'উইনোগ্রাড- স্টাইল কাজের উপর তথ্য সংক্রান্ত বিশ্লেষণ', 'id': 'Analisis Overlap Dataset pada Tugas Gaya-Winograd', 'ca': "Un anàlisi del conjunt de dades sobre tasques d'estil Winograd", 'cs': 'Analýza překrytí datových sad na úlohách ve stylu Winograd', 'et': 'Winogradi stiilis ülesannete andmekogumi ülekande analüüs', 'fi': 'Analyysi tietojoukon päällekkäisyydestä Winograd- tyylisissä tehtävissä', 'bs': 'Analiza preklapanja podataka o zadatkima Winograd-stila', 'jv': 'Alternate', 'he': 'Analysis of Dataset Overlap on Winograd- Style Tasks', 'ha': 'An Analysis of Dataset Overlap on Winograd-Style Tasks', 'sk': 'Analiza prekrivanja nabora podatkov na opravilih v slogu Winograd', 'bo': 'An Analysis of Dataset Overlap on Winograd-Style Tasks'}
{'en': 'The Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) and variants inspired by it have become important benchmarks for common-sense reasoning (CSR). Model performance on the WSC has quickly progressed from chance-level to near-human using neural language models trained on massive corpora. In this paper, we analyze the effects of varying degrees of overlaps that occur between these corpora and the test instances in WSC-style tasks. We find that a large number of test instances overlap considerably with the pretraining corpora on which state-of-the-art models are trained, and that a significant drop in classification accuracy occurs when models are evaluated on instances with minimal overlap. Based on these results, we provide the WSC-Web dataset, consisting of over 60k pronoun disambiguation problems scraped from web data, being both the largest corpus to date, and having a significantly lower proportion of overlaps with current pretraining corpora.', 'ar': 'أصبح تحدي Winograd Schema (WSC) والمتغيرات المستوحاة منه معايير مهمة للتفكير المنطقي (CSR). تقدم أداء النموذج في WSC بسرعة من مستوى الصدفة إلى مستوى قريب من الإنسان باستخدام نماذج اللغة العصبية المدربة على مجموعات ضخمة. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتحليل تأثيرات درجات متفاوتة من التداخلات التي تحدث بين هذه المجموعات وحالات الاختبار في مهام نمط WSC. وجدنا أن عددًا كبيرًا من حالات الاختبار تتداخل بشكل كبير مع مجموعة ما قبل التدريب التي يتم تدريب النماذج الحديثة عليها ، وأن انخفاضًا كبيرًا في دقة التصنيف يحدث عندما يتم تقييم النماذج في حالات مع الحد الأدنى من التداخل. بناءً على هذه النتائج ، نوفر مجموعة بيانات WSC-Web ، التي تتكون من أكثر من 60 ألفًا من مشاكل توضيح الضمائر المستخرجة من بيانات الويب ، كونها أكبر مجموعة حتى الآن ، ولديها نسبة أقل بكثير من التداخلات مع مجموعة ما قبل التدريب الحالية.', 'pt': 'O Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) e as variantes inspiradas nele tornaram-se referências importantes para o raciocínio de senso comum (CSR). O desempenho do modelo na WSC progrediu rapidamente do nível de chance para quase humano usando modelos de linguagem neural treinados em corpora massivos. Neste artigo, analisamos os efeitos de vários graus de sobreposições que ocorrem entre esses corpora e as instâncias de teste em tarefas no estilo WSC. Descobrimos que um grande número de instâncias de teste se sobrepõe consideravelmente aos corpora de pré-treinamento nos quais os modelos de última geração são treinados e que ocorre uma queda significativa na precisão da classificação quando os modelos são avaliados em instâncias com sobreposição mínima. Com base nesses resultados, fornecemos o conjunto de dados WSC-Web, que consiste em mais de 60 mil problemas de desambiguação de pronomes extraídos de dados da web, sendo o maior corpus até o momento e tendo uma proporção significativamente menor de sobreposições com os corpora de pré-treinamento atuais.', 'fr': "Le Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) et ses variantes inspirées sont devenus des points de référence importants pour le raisonnement de bon sens (RSE). La performance des modèles sur le WSC est rapidement passée du niveau du hasard au niveau quasi-humain à l'aide de modèles de langage neuronal formés sur des corpus massifs. Dans cet article, nous analysons les effets de divers degrés de chevauchement qui se produisent entre ces corpus et les instances de test dans les tâches de style WSC. Nous constatons qu'un grand nombre d'instances de test chevauchent considérablement les corpus de pré-entraînement sur lesquels les modèles de pointe sont formés, et qu'une baisse significative de la précision de la classification se produit lorsque les modèles sont évalués sur des instances avec un chevauchement minimal. Sur la base de ces résultats, nous fournissons l'ensemble de données WSC-Web, composé de plus de 60 000 problèmes de désambiguïsation des pronoms extraits des données Web, étant à la fois le plus grand corpus à ce jour et présentant une proportion significativement plus faible de chevauchements avec les corpus actuels de pré-formation.", 'es': 'El Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) y las variantes inspiradas en él se han convertido en puntos de referencia importantes para el razonamiento con sentido común (RSE). El rendimiento de los modelos en el WSC ha progresado rápidamente del nivel casual al casi humano utilizando modelos de lenguaje neuronal entrenados en cuerpos masivos. En este artículo, analizamos los efectos de los diversos grados de solapamiento que se producen entre estos cuerpos y las instancias de prueba en las tareas de estilo WSC. Encontramos que un gran número de casos de prueba se superponen considerablemente con los cuerpos de preentrenamiento en los que se entrenan los modelos más avanzados, y que se produce una disminución significativa en la precisión de la clasificación cuando los modelos se evalúan en instancias con una superposición mínima. Con base en estos resultados, proporcionamos el conjunto de datos WSC-Web, que consiste en más de 60.000 problemas de desambiguación de pronombres extraídos de datos web, siendo el corpus más grande hasta la fecha y teniendo una proporción significativamente menor de solapamientos con los cuerpos de preentrenamiento actuales.', 'ja': 'Winograd Schema Challenge （ WSC ）とそれに触発されたバリアントは、常識的推論（ CSR ）の重要なベンチマークとなっています。WSCでのモデルパフォーマンスは、大規模なコーラで訓練された神経言語モデルを使用して、チャンスレベルからほぼ人間レベルに急速に進歩しました。本稿では、これらのコーパとWSCスタイルのタスクのテストインスタンスとの間に生じるさまざまな程度の重複の影響を分析する。多くのテストインスタンスは、最先端モデルがトレーニングされる事前トレーニングのコーパスとかなり重複しており、最小限のオーバーラップを持つインスタンスでモデルを評価すると、分類精度が大幅に低下することがわかります。これらの結果に基づいて、WSC - Webデータセットを提供します。これは、ウェブデータから削られた60,000を超える代名詞の曖昧さ解消の問題から構成されており、これまでで最大のコーパスであり、現在の事前トレーニングコーパスとのオーバーラップの割合が著しく低いです。', 'zh': 'Winograd Schema Challenge(WSC)及其启发变体已为常识推理(CSR)要准。 WSC之性,疾于近人,大用语料库神经言语。 于本文,论此语料库与WSC式试例之间重叠不同。 臣等观之,大试实例与训练最先模型者语料库有大重叠,且于重叠最少者评之,类准确性显降。 此WSC-Web数集,当数集由从Web数中取者6万多个代词消歧义成,既迄今为止最大语料库,且与前预训练语料库重叠显降。', 'ru': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) и вдохновленные им варианты стали важными критериями здравого смысла (CSR). Производительность модели на WSC быстро перешла от случайного уровня к почти человеческому с использованием нейронных языковых моделей, обученных на массивных телах. В этой статье мы анализируем эффекты различной степени перекрытия, которые возникают между этими корпусами и тестовыми экземплярами в задачах типа WSC. Мы обнаружили, что большое количество тестовых экземпляров в значительной степени пересекаются с телами предварительного обучения, на которых обучаются современные модели, и что значительное снижение точности классификации происходит, когда модели оцениваются на экземплярах с минимальным перекрытием. Основываясь на этих результатах, мы предоставляем набор данных WSC-Web, состоящий из более чем 60 000 проблем дезинтеграции местоимений, отобранных из веб-данных, которые на сегодняшний день являются крупнейшим корпусом и имеют значительно меньшую долю накладок с текущими телами предварительной подготовки.', 'hi': 'विनोग्राद स्कीमा चैलेंज (डब्ल्यूएससी) और इससे प्रेरित वेरिएंट सामान्य ज्ञान तर्क (सीएसआर) के लिए महत्वपूर्ण बेंचमार्क बन गए हैं। डब्ल्यूएससी पर मॉडल प्रदर्शन ने बड़े पैमाने पर कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षित तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके मौके के स्तर से निकट-मानव तक जल्दी से प्रगति की है। इस पेपर में, हम इन कॉर्पोरेट और डब्ल्यूएससी-शैली के कार्यों में परीक्षण उदाहरणों के बीच होने वाले ओवरलैप की अलग-अलग डिग्री के प्रभावों का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि बड़ी संख्या में परीक्षण उदाहरण प्रीट्रेनिंग कॉर्पोरेट के साथ काफी हद तक ओवरलैप होते हैं, जिस पर अत्याधुनिक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, और वर्गीकरण सटीकता में एक महत्वपूर्ण गिरावट तब होती है जब न्यूनतम ओवरलैप वाले उदाहरणों पर मॉडल का मूल्यांकन किया जाता है। इन परिणामों के आधार पर, हम WSC-Web डेटासेट प्रदान करते हैं, जिसमें वेब डेटा से स्क्रैप की गई 60k सर्वनाम disambiguation समस्याएं शामिल हैं, जो आज तक का सबसे बड़ा कॉर्पस दोनों हैं, और वर्तमान प्रीट्रेनिंग कॉर्पोरेट के साथ ओवरलैप का काफी कम अनुपात है।', 'ga': 'Is tagarmharcanna tábhachtacha iad Dúshlán Scéimre Winograd (WSC) agus na leaganacha a spreag é le haghaidh réasúnaíocht chiallmhar (CSR). Tá feidhmíocht eiseamláireach ar an WSC tar éis dul chun cinn go tapa ó leibhéal seans go neasduine ag baint úsáide as samhlacha néartheanga atá oilte ar ollchorpóra. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar éifeachtaí céimeanna éagsúla forluí a tharlaíonn idir na corpora seo agus na cásanna tástála i dtascanna ar nós WSC. Faighimid amach go bhfuil forluí go mór ag líon mór cásanna tástála leis an gcorpas réamhoiliúna ar a gcuirtear oiliúint ar mhúnlaí úrscothacha, agus go dtarlaíonn titim shuntasach ar chruinneas an aicmithe nuair a dhéantar samhlacha a mheas ar chásanna nach bhfuil mórán forluí iontu. Bunaithe ar na torthaí seo, soláthraímid tacar sonraí WSC-Web, ina bhfuil níos mó ná 60k fadhbanna dí-athbhrí forainm scríobtha ó shonraí gréasáin, an corpas is mó go dtí seo, agus a bhfuil cion i bhfad níos ísle forluí leis an gcorpas réamhoiliúint reatha.', 'ka': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) და გარიანტები, რომლებიც მისი მიღებულია, იყო მნიშვნელოვანი ბანქმები, რომლებიც საერთო სიგრძნობის აზრისთვის (CSR). WSC-ის მოდელური მუშაობის მოდელური მოდელები შესაძლებლობადან ადამიანის მხოლოდ გავაკეთეთ შესაძლებლობადან, რომელიც გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ენის მოდელები მასტივი ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში განსხვავებული სტრიქონის განსხვავებული სტრიქონის ეფექტების ანალიზაცია, რომელიც ამ კოპორაში და სტრიქონის მოცემების განსხვავებული მოვლენების შორის და ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ დიდი რაოდენობა ტესტის ინსტენსები ძალიან გადარჩენებს კოპორაზე, რომელსაც კოპრენციური მოდელების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი კოლე ამ შედეგი შედეგიდან, ჩვენ დავხმარებთ WSC-ვების მონაცემების სექტი, რომელიც 60k-ზე უფრო მეტი განსხვავებული პრობლემების განსხვავება, რომელიც ვების მონაცემების განსხვავებულია, რომელიც ორივე უფრო დიდი კორპუს', 'hu': 'A Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) és az általa inspirált változatok fontos referenciaértékekké váltak a józan ész érvelés (CSR). A WSC modellteljesítménye gyorsan fejlődött a véletlen szintről a közel emberi szintre, a masszív testekre képzett neurális nyelvi modellek segítségével. Ebben a tanulmányban elemezzük az átfedések különböző fokú hatásait, amelyek ezek a testek és a tesztpéldányok között fordulnak elő WSC-stílusú feladatokban. Úgy találjuk, hogy számos tesztpélda jelentősen átfedi a képzést megelőző korpuszokat, amelyeken a legkorszerűbb modelleket képezik, és jelentős mértékben csökken az osztályozási pontosság, amikor a modelleket minimális átfedéssel rendelkező példányokon értékelik. Ezen eredmények alapján a WSC-Web adatkészletet biztosítjuk, amely több mint 60 ezer névmást egyértelműsítő problémából áll, amelyek eddigi legnagyobb korpusz, és jelentősen alacsonyabb az átfedések aránya a jelenlegi előkészítő korpuszokkal.', 'el': 'Η πρόκληση του Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) και οι παραλλαγές εμπνευσμένες από αυτήν έχουν γίνει σημαντικά σημεία αναφοράς για τη λογική της κοινής λογικής (CSR). Η απόδοση του μοντέλου στο WSC έχει προχωρήσει γρήγορα από τυχαίο επίπεδο σε σχεδόν ανθρώπινο χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα νευρωνικής γλώσσας εκπαιδευμένα σε μαζικά σώματα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναλύουμε τις επιπτώσεις των διαφόρων βαθμών επικάλυψης που εμφανίζονται μεταξύ αυτών των σωμάτων και των δοκιμαστικών περιπτώσεων σε εργασίες τύπου. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι ένας μεγάλος αριθμός δοκιμών επικαλύπτεται σημαντικά με τα σώματα προετοιμασίας στα οποία εκπαιδεύονται μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και ότι μια σημαντική μείωση της ακρίβειας ταξινόμησης συμβαίνει όταν τα μοντέλα αξιολογούνται σε περιπτώσεις με ελάχιστη επικάλυψη. Με βάση αυτά τα αποτελέσματα, παρέχουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από προβλήματα διασφάλισης αντωνυμίας πάνω από 60εκ που ξύνονται από δεδομένα ιστού, τόσο ως το μεγαλύτερο σώμα μέχρι σήμερα, όσο και με σημαντικά χαμηλότερο ποσοστό επικαλύψεων με τα τρέχοντα σώματα προετοιμασίας.', 'lt': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) ir jo įkvėpti variantai tapo svarbiais bendro proto pagrindimo (CSR) kriterijais. WSC pavyzdys greitai perėjo nuo atsitiktinio lygio iki beveik žmogaus, naudojant nervinės kalbos modelius, apmokytus masiniu korporu. Šiame dokumente analizuojame įvairių laipsnių sutapimų, kurie atsiranda tarp šių korprų ir bandymų atvejų atliekant WSC tipo užduotis, poveikį. Matome, kad daugelis bandymų atvejų labai sutampa su priešmokykliniu korpusu, kuriame mokomi pažangiausi modeliai, ir kad, vertinant modelius, kuriems minimalus sutampa, žymiai sumažėja klasifikacijos tikslumas. Based on these results, we provide the WSC-Web dataset, consisting of over 60k pronoun disambiguation problems scraped from web data, being both the largest corpus to date, and having a significantly lower proportion of overlaps with current pretraining corpora.', 'it': "Il Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) e le varianti da esso ispirate sono diventati importanti punti di riferimento per il ragionamento del buon senso (CSR). Le prestazioni dei modelli sul WSC sono rapidamente progredite da livello casuale a quasi umano utilizzando modelli di linguaggio neurale addestrati su corpi massicci. In questo articolo analizziamo gli effetti di vari gradi di sovrapposizioni che si verificano tra questi corpi e le istanze di test in attività in stile WSC. Troviamo che un gran numero di casi di test si sovrappongono notevolmente ai corpi pre-training su cui sono addestrati modelli all'avanguardia e che si verifica un calo significativo della precisione di classificazione quando i modelli sono valutati su istanze con sovrapposizione minima. Sulla base di questi risultati, forniamo il dataset WSC-Web, composto da oltre 60k problemi di disambiguazione dei pronomi raschiati dai dati web, essendo entrambi il corpus più grande fino ad oggi, e avendo una percentuale significativamente inferiore di sovrapposizioni con i corpora pre-formazione attuali.", 'ms': 'Challenge Skema Winograd (WSC) dan varian yang diinspirasikannya telah menjadi tanda referensi penting untuk alasan yang masuk akal (CSR). Performasi model pada WSC telah melanjutkan dengan cepat dari tahap peluang ke hampir-manusia menggunakan model bahasa saraf dilatih pada korpra besar. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis kesan dari darjah-darjah meliputi yang berlaku antara korpra ini dan kes-kes ujian dalam tugas gaya WSC. Kami mendapati bahawa sejumlah besar kes ujian bergabung dengan besar dengan korpra pretraining di mana model-state-of-the-art dilatih, dan bahawa turun yang signifikan dalam ketepatan klasifikasi berlaku apabila model diteliti pada kes-kes dengan minimal overlap. Berdasarkan hasil-hasil ini, kami menyediakan set data WSC-Web, yang terdiri daripada lebih dari 60k masalah penyelesaian nyata yang dicabut dari data web, menjadi kedua-dua korpus terbesar sehingga kini, dan mempunyai proporsi yang jauh lebih rendah penyelesaian dengan korpora pralatihan semasa.', 'kk': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) және оның түсіндірілген варианттары жалпы сезімдік (CSR) үшін маңызды бақылау белгілері болды. WSC үлгісіндегі үлгілер маңызды корпораға оқылған невралдық тіл үлгілерін қолдану үшін мәселелердің деңгейінен жақын адамға жылдам өтті. Бұл қағазда, бұл корпора мен WSC стиліндегі сынақтар тапсырмаларының арасында болатын әртүрлі градустардың эффекттерін анализ. Біз сынақтардың көп нәтижелері өзгертілген корпорасымен бірнеше тесті нәтижелерін таптамыз. Өзгертілген моделдердің күй- жайын оқыту үшін мәліметтерді бағалау үшін үлгілердің дұрыстығын түсіндіреді. Бұл нәтижелердің негізінде, біз WSC-Веб деректер жиынын қамтамасыз. Бұл веб деректерінен шестік көлемі деңгейіндегі 60 км деңгейіндегі белсендіру мәселелері бар. Бұл күнге дейін ең үлкен корпус болып, қазіргі', 'mn': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) болон түүний урам зориулсан өөрчлөлт нь ерөнхий ойлголт ойлголтын тухай чухал багц болсон. WSC-ын загварын үйл ажиллагаа маш олон корпора дээр сургалтын мэдрэлийн хэл загваруудыг ашиглан хүн төрөлхтний түвшинд хурдан хөгжүүлсэн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр корпора болон WSC хэлбэрийн шалгалтын үйл ажиллагааны хоорондох өөр өөр хэмжээний давхарын үр дүнг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид маш олон шалгалтын тохиолдолд бага зэрэг хуваалцах үед моделуудыг бага зэрэг тооцоолж байхад бага зэрэг тооцоолж байдаг. Эдгээр үр дүн дээр бид WSC-Веб өгөгдлийн санг хангаж байна. Веб өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс хамгийн том корпус хоёулаа хамгийн бага хэмжээний хувьд орчин үеийн корпора-тай илүү бага байдаг.', 'mk': 'Винографскиот предизвик (WSC) и варијантите инспирирани од него станаа важни референтни значки за размислување на здраво смисло (CSR). Моделот на ВСК брзо напредува од ниво на шанса до речиси човечки користејќи модели на нервен јазик тренирани на масовни тела. Во овој документ ги анализираме ефектите на различни степени на прекривање кои се случуваат меѓу овие тела и тестовите инциденти во задачите во стил ВСК. We find that a large number of test instances overlap considerably with the pretraining corpora on which state-of-the-art models are trained, and that a significant drop in classification accuracy occurs when models are evaluated on instances with minimal overlap.  На основа на овие резултати, го обезбедуваме сетот на податоци на ВСК-Веб, кој се состои од повеќе од 60 илјади проблеми со дијамбигуација кои се отстранети од веб-податоците, како и најголемиот корпус досега, како и значително помал процент на копилирања со сегашната претренирана корпора.', 'mt': 'L-Isfida tal-Iskema tal-Winograd (WSC) u l-varjanti ispirati minnha saru punti ta’ riferiment importanti għar-raġunament b’sens komuni (CSR). Il-prestazzjoni mudell fuq il-WSC avvanzat malajr minn livell ta’ ċans għal kważi uman bl-użu ta’ mudelli tal-lingwa newrali mħarrġa fuq korpra massiva. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu analiżi tal-effetti ta’ gradi varji ta’ sovrappożizzjonijiet li jseħħu bejn dawn il-korporazzjonijiet u l-istanzi tat-test f’kompiti bi stil WSC. Aħna nsibu li għadd kbir ta’ każijiet ta’ ttestjar jikkoinċidu b’mod konsiderevoli mal-korpra ta’ qabel it-taħriġ li fuqha jitħarrġu l-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati, u li waqgħa sinifikanti fil-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni sseħħ meta l-mudelli jiġu evalwati f’każijiet b’koinċidenza minima. Fuq il-bażi ta’ dawn ir-riżultati, a ħna nipprovdu s-sett tad-dejta WSC-Web, li jikkonsisti minn aktar minn 60 k problema ta’ diżambiguazzjoni evidenti skartata mid-dejta tal-web, li huma kemm l-akbar korpus sal-lum, u li għandhom proporzjon sinifikament aktar baxx ta’ sovrappożizzjonijiet mal-korpura attwali ta’ qabel it-taħriġ.', 'ml': 'The Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) and variants inspired by it have become important benchmarks for common-sense reasoning (CSR).  വിഎസ്സിയിലെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശനം വേഗത്തില്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിശാലമായ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡിഗ്രികളുടെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഈ കോര്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200dണയുടെയും വിഎസ്സി-ശൈല ഒരുപാട് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പെട്ടെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, കുറച്ചു സാഹചര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d മ ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d WSC-വെബ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നല്\u200dകുന്നു. വെബ്റ് ഡേറ്റായില്\u200d നിന്ന് 60k കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിഭാഗപ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) i inspirowane nim warianty stały się ważnymi punktami odniesienia dla zdrowego rozsądku rozumowania (CSR). Wydajność modelu na WSC szybko przekształciła się z poziomu przypadkowego do prawie człowieka przy użyciu neuronowych modeli językowych trenowanych na masywnych korpusach. W niniejszym artykule analizujemy efekty różnego stopnia nakładania się pomiędzy tymi korpusami a instancjami testowymi w zadaniach typu WSC. Stwierdzono, że duża liczba instancji testowych pokrywa się znacznie z korpusami wstępnego treningu, na których szkolone są najnowocześniejsze modele, a znaczny spadek dokładności klasyfikacji występuje, gdy modele są oceniane na instancjach o minimalnym nakładaniu się. Na podstawie tych wyników przedstawiamy zbiór danych WSC-Web, składający się z problemów dyscyplinacji zaimków ponad 60k skrobanych z danych sieciowych, będących zarówno największym do tej pory korpusem, jak i mającym znacznie mniejszy odsetek nakładań się z obecnymi korpusami wstępnymi.', 'no': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) og variantane inspirerte av det har blitt viktige benchmarker for vanleg forståelse (CSR). Modellpunksjonen på WSC har raskt framgått frå sjansnivå til nær menneske ved hjelp av neuralspråk-modeller trent på massivt korpora. I denne papiret analyserer vi effekten av ulike grader overlapping som skjer mellom desse korporane og testinstansene i WSC-stiloppgåva. Vi finn at mange testinstansar overlappar betydelig med korporen som skal trekke på kunstmodellar, og at ein signifikant nedfall i klassifikasjon skjer når modellar vert evaluert på instansar med minimal overlapp. Basert på desse resultatene, gir vi datasettet WSC-nett, som inneheld over 60 km av problemar med disambiguasjon som er avbrutt frå nettdata, både dei største korpusa til dato, og har ein betydelig mindre del av overlappene med gjeldande korpora.', 'sr': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) i varianti inspirisani od njega postali su važni kriteriji za razumanje zajedničkog smisla (CSR). Modelni nastup na WSC je brzo napredovao od nivoa šanse do bliskog ljudskog korištenja neuralnih jezičkih modela obučenih na masivnoj korpori. U ovom papiru analiziramo efekate različitih stupnjeva preklapanja koji se dešavaju između tih tela i testnih slučajeva u zadatkima iz stila WSC-a. Nalazimo da se veliki broj testiranih slučajeva značajno preklapa sa korporacijom koji se obučavaju modeli stanja umjetnosti, i da se pojavljuje značajan pad klasifikacije tačnosti kada se modeli procjenjuju u slučajevima sa minimalnim preklapanjem. Na temelju ovih rezultata, pružamo kompletu podataka WSC-Web, sastavljajući od preko 60k problema sa disambiguacijom koji su otkačeni iz web podataka, kao i najveći korpus do sada, i ima značajno manju proporciju prelapanja sa trenutnim korpusom pretkivanja.', 'ro': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) și variantele inspirate de ea au devenit repere importante pentru raționamentul de bun simț (CSR). Performanța modelului pe WSC a progresat rapid de la nivel de șansă la aproape uman folosind modele de limbaj neural instruite pe corpore masive. În această lucrare, analizăm efectele diferitelor grade de suprapuneri care apar între aceste corpore și instanțele de testare în sarcini în stil WSC. Observăm că un număr mare de instanțe de testare se suprapun considerabil cu corpurile de pre-formare pe care sunt instruite modele de ultimă generație și că o scădere semnificativă a preciziei clasificării apare atunci când modelele sunt evaluate pe instanțe cu suprapunere minimă. Pe baza acestor rezultate, furnizăm setul de date WSC-Web, constând în peste 60k de probleme de dezambiguizare a pronumelor răzuite din datele web, fiind atât cel mai mare corpus de până în prezent, cât și având o proporție semnificativ mai mică de suprapuneri cu corpurile actuale pre-formare.', 'sv': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) och varianter inspirerade av den har blivit viktiga riktmärken för sunt förnuft resonemang (CSR). Modellprestanda på WSC har snabbt utvecklats från slumpnivå till nära-mänsklig med hjälp av neurala språkmodeller som tränats på massiva kroppar. I denna uppsats analyserar vi effekterna av olika grader av överlappningar som uppstår mellan dessa kroppar och testinstanser i WSC-liknande uppgifter. Vi finner att ett stort antal testinstanser överlappar avsevärt med de pre-training corpora som state-of-the-art modeller utbildas på, och att en betydande minskning av klassificeringsnoggrannheten inträffar när modeller utvärderas på instanser med minimal överlappning. Baserat på dessa resultat tillhandahåller vi WSC-Web datauppsättningen, som består av över 60 000 pronomen brytningsproblem skrapade från webbdata, som både är den största korpusen hittills, och har en betydligt lägre andel överlappningar med nuvarande pre-training corpora.', 'si': 'වින්ග්\u200dරාඩ් ස්කීමා චාලින්ජ් (WSC) සහ ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන වෙනස් විශේෂ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වෙනවා සමාන්\u200dය WSC වලින් මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරමාණය ඉක්මනින් ඉක්මනින් අවස්ථාවයෙන් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ලඟ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශේෂ කරනවා මේ කොර්පෝරා සහ WSC විශේෂ වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණාවේ පරීක අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශාල පරීක්ෂණ ස්ථානයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිරීම් කොර්පෝරා එක්ක පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිරීම් ස්ථානයක් පුළුවන්  මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, අපි WSC-වෙබ් තොරතුරු සෙට් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා, වෙබ් තොරතුරු වලින් ප', 'so': 'Schema Challenge Winograd (WSC) iyo kala duwanaansheer uu u waxyooday waxay noqdeen kaalmooyin muhiim ah ee sababta caadiga ah (CSR). Muuqashada dhaqanka ee WSC wuxuu si dhaqso ah u hormaray heerka suurtagalka iyo dadka u dhow sida loo isticmaalo modelalka afka neurada ee lagu baray shirkad aad u badan. Warqadan ayaannu ku baaraynaa saamaynta shahaadada kala duduwan oo ku dhaca shirkadahan iyo dhacdooyinka imtixaanka ee shaqada WSC. Waxaynu aragnaa in tusaalooyin badan oo imtixaan ah ay ku daboolaan shirkadda ay ku tababarayso samooyinka farshaxanka, iyo in dhaqdhaqaaq aad u weyn oo fasaxa ay soo dhacaan marka lagu qiimeeyo tusaalooyin lagu qiimeeyo daboolka ugu yaraan. Sababtaas darteed waxan ka dhiganaynaa sawirada WSC-Web, kaas oo ka mid ah dhibaatooyin kala duduwan oo laga soo bandhigay macluumaadka internetka, taasoo ah kooxaha ugu weyn tan iyo waqtiga, waxaana haynaa qayb aad u yar oo ka hoosaysa korporada hore-ka-socda.', 'ta': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) மற்றும் மாறிகள் அதனால் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டது பொது புரிந்த காரணத்திற்கு முக்கியமான பெண் குறிப்புகளாக ஆக WSC மாதிரி செயல்பாடு வாய்ப்பு நிலையிலிருந்து அருகிலிருந்து மாதிரி முன்னேற்றப்பட்டுள்ளது பெரிய நெருக்கமான ம இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல்வேறு degree of overlaps விளைவுகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். இந்த கோப்புறையில் நடக்கும் மற்றும் WSC பாணியில் சோதன நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பெரிய சோதனை நிகழ்வுகள் குறைந்தபட்ச மாதிரியான மாதிரிகள் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று மூலம் மழையும் நிறுவனத்துடன் மேலே மூடுகிறது என் இந்த முடிவுகளை அடிப்படையில், நாம் WSC- இணைய தகவல் அமைப்பை வழங்குகிறோம், இணைய தரவுகளிலிருந்து 60k க்கு மேற்பட்ட பிரிவுப்பு பிரச்சனைகள் உள்ளன, இது பெரிய கூட்டத்திற்கும் வர', 'ur': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) اور اس کے ذریعہ سے الهام کی تغییرات مشترک سمجھنے کے لئے (CSR) اہم بنچم مارک ہوگئے ہیں۔ WSC پر موڈل کی فعالیت سریع آگئی ہے شانس سطح سے نزدیک انسان کی نسبت نئورل زبان کی موڈل کے استعمال سے بہت زیادہ کمپور پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم مختلف درجے اورلپ کے اثرات کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو ان کوپرا اور WSC طرح کے کاموں کے درمیان موجود ہوتے ہیں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ بہت سی آزمائش مثالیں بہت زیادہ دھوپ کر رہی ہیں جن پر آزمائش مثالیں تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں، اور یہ کہ کلاسیفوں کی دھوپ ہے جبکہ موڈلیاں ذلیل اورلپ کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق موجود ہیں. یہ نتائج پر بنیاد ہے، ہم WSC-ویب ڈیٹ سٹ کا سامان دیتے ہیں، جو 60 کیلوں سے زیادہ اضافہ نامبوغی مسئلہ ہے جو ویب ڈیٹ سے ٹکڑے ہوئے ہیں، ان دونوں کے سب سے بڑے کورپوس ہیں، اور ان میں ایک بہت کم مقدار ہے جو اورٹرینڈ کورپور سے ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Name Bu qogʻozda biz bu kompaniya va WSC uslub vazifalarining orasidagi har xil darajalarning effektlarini aniqlamiz. Biz ko'pchilik sinov misollarini o'rganish holatida ko'pchilik hodisa o'rganish holati bilan ko'pchirib chiqaradi, va muammolar minimal koʻpayishi bilan foydalanayotganda juda qisqarli foydalanadi. Bu natijalar asosida, biz WSC- Web maʼlumotlar tarkibini yaratib, va veb- maʼlumotdan 60kdan ortiq ajratilgan taʼminlovchi muammolar bo'ladi. Bu hozirga eng katta kopus bo'lgan va joriy ishlayotgan kompaniya bilan juda kichik qismi.", 'vi': 'The Winrogd Schema Challeng (SC) và các biến thể được truyền cảm hứng bởi nó đã trở thành những tiêu chuẩn quan trọng cho việc lý luận tỉnh táo (CSR). Hiệu suất mô hình trên WSC đã nhanh chóng phát triển từ trình rủi ro đến gần người dùng các mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh được đào tạo trên hạ sĩ khổng lồ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phân tích các hiệu ứng của độ khác nhau các sự ràng buộc xảy ra giữa các hạ sĩ này và các trường hợp thử nghiệm trong các nhiệm vụ kiểu WSC. Chúng tôi nhận thấy rằng một số trường hợp thử nghiệm đã chồng chéo rất nhiều với các hạ sĩ trước đã được đào tạo về các mô hình hiện đại nghệ thuật, và rằng sự giảm đáng kể trong độ chính xác phân hạng xảy ra khi các mô-đun được đánh giá qua các trường hợp với tỷ lệ gấp hở tối thiểu. Dựa trên kết quả này, chúng tôi cung cấp dữ liệu WSC-Web, bao gồm hơn 60k từ các vấn đề phân bổ từ dữ liệu trên mạng, là nhóm máu tụ lớn nhất đến nay, và có tỉ lệ doanh nhân sản thấp hơn nhiều so với thường dân hiện tại.', 'bg': 'Предизвикателството на Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) и вариантите, вдъхновени от него, се превърнаха във важни показатели за здравия разум (КСО). Представянето на модела на WSC бързо прогресира от случайно ниво до почти човешко, използвайки невронни езикови модели обучени върху масивни корпуси. В настоящата статия анализираме ефектите от различни степени на припокриване, които възникват между тези корпуси и тестовите инстанции в задачи в стил. Установяваме, че голям брой тестови инстанции се припокриват значително с предтренировъчните корпуси, върху които се обучават съвременни модели, и че значителен спад в точността на класификацията настъпва, когато моделите се оценяват на инстанции с минимално припокриване. Въз основа на тези резултати, ние предоставяме набор от данни, състоящ се от над 60к проблеми с разграничаване на местоименията, изстъргани от уеб данни, като едновременно е най-големият корпус до момента, и има значително по-малък дял на припокриване с текущите предтренировъчни корпуси.', 'nl': 'De Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) en de daarop geïnspireerde varianten zijn belangrijke benchmarks geworden voor gezond verstand redeneren (MVO). Model prestaties op de WSC zijn snel van toevalsniveau naar bijna-menselijk gegaan met behulp van neurale taalmodellen getraind op enorme corpora. In dit artikel analyseren we de effecten van verschillende mate van overlappingen die optreden tussen deze corpora en de testinstanties in WSC-stijl taken. We merken dat een groot aantal testinstanties aanzienlijk overlappen met de pretraining corpora waarop state-of-the-art modellen worden getraind, en dat een aanzienlijke daling in classificatienauwkeurigheid optreedt wanneer modellen worden geëvalueerd op instanties met minimale overlapping. Op basis van deze resultaten, bieden we de WSC-Web dataset, bestaande uit meer dan 60k voornaamwoorden disambiguatie problemen geschraapt uit webdata, zowel het grootste corpus tot nu toe, als een aanzienlijk lager percentage overlappingen met huidige pretraining corpora.', 'da': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) og varianter inspireret af den er blevet vigtige benchmarks for sund fornuft ræsonnement (CSR). Model performance på WSC er hurtigt udviklet fra tilfældighedsniveau til nær-menneskelig ved hjælp af neurale sprogmodeller trænet på massive korpora. I denne artikel analyserer vi virkningerne af forskellige grader af overlapninger, der opstår mellem disse korpora og testforekomsterne i WSC-stil opgaver. Vi konstaterer, at et stort antal testtilfælde overlapper betydeligt med de pre-training corpora, som state-of-the-art modeller trænes på, og at der opstår et betydeligt fald i klassificeringsnøjagtigheden, når modeller evalueres på tilfælde med minimal overlapning. Baseret på disse resultater leverer vi WSC-Web datasættet, der består af over 60k problemer med adskillelse af pronomen skrabet fra webdata, og som både er det største korpus til dato, og har en betydeligt lavere andel af overlapninger med nuværende forudgående korpus.', 'hr': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) i varianti inspirirani od njega postali su važni kriteriji za razumijevanje zajedničkog smisla (CSR). Modelni učinkoviti na WSC brzo su napredovali od razine šanse do blizu ljudskog korištenja neuralnih jezičkih modela obučenih na masovnom tijelu. U ovom papiru analiziramo učinke različitih stupnjeva preklapanja koji se događaju između tih tijela i testnih slučajeva u zadatkima iz stila WSC-a. Nalazimo da se veliki broj testiranih slučajeva značajno preklapa sa tijelom pretkišnog tijela na kojem se obučavaju modeli stanja umjetnosti, i da se pojavljuje značajan pad klasifikacijske preciznosti kada se modeli procjenjuju u slučajevima s minimalnim preklapanjem. Na temelju tih rezultata, pružamo kompletu podataka WSC-Web-a, sastavljajući od preko 60k problema sa disambiguacijom koji su otkačeni iz internetskih podataka, što su i najveći korpus do sada, i imali značajno manju proporciju preklapanja s trenutnim pretkišnim korpusom.', 'de': 'Die Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) und davon inspirierte Varianten sind zu wichtigen Benchmarks für gesundes Denken (CSR) geworden. Die Modellleistung auf dem WSC hat sich schnell von der Zufallsebene zu fast menschlich entwickelt, indem neuronale Sprachmodelle verwendet wurden, die auf massiven Korpora trainiert wurden. In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir die Auswirkungen unterschiedlicher Überlappungsgrade, die zwischen diesen Korpora und den Testinstanzen in WSC-artigen Aufgaben auftreten. Wir stellen fest, dass sich eine große Anzahl von Testinstanzen erheblich mit den Pretraining-Korpora überschneiden, auf denen State-of-the-Art-Modelle trainiert werden, und dass ein signifikanter Rückgang der Klassifizierungsgenauigkeit auftritt, wenn Modelle auf Instanzen mit minimaler Überlappung ausgewertet werden. Basierend auf diesen Ergebnissen stellen wir den WSC-Web-Datensatz zur Verfügung, der aus über 60k Pronomen-Disambiguationsproblemen besteht, die aus Webdaten herausgekratzt wurden und sowohl das bisher größte Korpus als auch einen deutlich geringeren Anteil an Überschneidungen mit aktuellen Pretraining-Korpora aufweist.', 'id': 'The Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) dan variant yang diinspirasikan oleh itu telah menjadi benchmark penting untuk alasan masuk akal (CSR). Model prestasi di WSC telah cepat maju dari tahap kesempatan ke dekat manusia menggunakan model bahasa saraf dilatih pada korpra besar. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis efek dari berbagai derajat overlaps yang terjadi antara korpra ini dan kasus tes dalam tugas gaya WSC. Kami menemukan bahwa sejumlah besar kasus tes berlipat-lipat dengan konsideratif dengan korpra pretraining di mana model-state-of-the-art dilatih, dan bahwa turun signifikan dalam akurasi klasifikasi terjadi ketika model diteliti pada kasus-kasus dengan minimal overlap. Berdasarkan hasil-hasil ini, kami menyediakan dataset WSC-Web, yang terdiri dari lebih dari 60.', 'fa': 'چالش نقشه وینوگرد (WSC) و تغییرات که توسط آن الهام داده می\u200cشوند، برای دلیل منطقی معمولی (CSR) تبدیل شدند. اجرای مدل روی WSC به سرعت از سطح شانس به نزدیک انسان با استفاده از مدل های زبان عصبی آموزش داده شده در شرکت بزرگی پیشرفت کرده است. در این کاغذ، ما اثرات درجه\u200cهای متفاوتی را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که بین این شرکت\u200cها و اتفاقات آزمایش\u200cها در وظیفه\u200cهای سبک WSC اتفاق می\u200cافتد. ما فهمیدیم که تعداد زیادی از نمونه\u200cهای آزمایش با شرکتی که در آن مدل\u200cهای هنری آموزش داده می\u200cشوند، به اندازه\u200cای که در دقیق برنامه\u200cگذاری می\u200cشود، در زمانی که مدل\u200cها در مورد نمونه\u200cها با دقیق کمترین برنامه\u200cگذاری ارزیابی می\u200cشوند، می\u200cافتد. Based on these results, we provide the WSC-Web dataset, consisting of over 60k pronoun disambiguation problems cut from web data, being both the largest corpus to date, and having a significantly lower proportion of overlaps with current pretraining corpora.', 'sw': 'Mgogoro wa Schema ya Winograd (WSC) na mabadiliko yanayohamasishwa na hilo zimekuwa kanuni muhimu kwa sababu za usawa (CSR). Utendaji wa Model kwenye mtandao wa WSC umeendelea haraka kutoka kiwango cha nafasi hadi karibu na binadamu kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha ya uraia yaliyofundishwa kwenye makampuni makubwa. Katika gazeti hili, tunachambua madhara ya vyeo tofauti vya juu yanayotokea kati ya makampuni haya na matukio ya jaribio katika kazi za aina ya WSC. Tunapata kwamba matukio mengi ya majaribio yanajumuisha kwa kiasi kikubwa na kampuni ya kutengeneza mvua ambayo mifano ya sanaa yanafundishwa, na kwamba kupungua kwa usahihi mkubwa wa usalama unatokea pale mifano inapovutiwa kwa matukio kidogo kwa kiasi kidogo. Kwa mujibu wa matokeo haya, tunatoa seti ya taarifa za WSC-Web, ikiwa ni pamoja na matatizo zaidi ya takwimu 600 yanayoonyesha tofauti yaliyochapishwa kutoka kwenye taarifa za mtandaoni, na kuwa na makampuni makubwa zaidi mpaka sasa, na kuwa na kiwango cha chini zaidi ya vipande vya juu na kampuni inayonyesha mvua ya sasa.', 'af': "Die Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) en variante wat deur dit inspireer is, het belangrik benchmarke geword vir gemeenskaplike-sens redering (CSR). Model prestasie op die WSC het vinnig gevorderd van kans-vlak tot naby-mense gebruik neurale taal modele wat op groot korpora opgelei is. In hierdie papier, ons analyseer die effekte van verskillende grade oorvloei wat tussen hierdie korpora en die toets voorbeelde in WSC-styl taak gebeur word. Ons vind dat 'n groot aantal toets voorbeelde oorvloei betydelik met die pretraining korpora waar staat-van-die-kuns-modele onderwerp word, en dat 'n betydelike afval in klasifikasie-presies voorkom wanneer modele op voorbeelde met minimale oorvloediging evalueer word. Basies op hierdie resultate, verskaf ons die WSC-Web datastel, wat bestaan van meer 60k voorskrifte ontsamming probleem wat van web data geskrap is, is beide die grootste korpus tot dag, en het 'n betekeurige minder proporsie van oorvloediging met huidige pretraining korpora.", 'tr': "Winograd 힇ekileme 횉a힊yrymy (WSC) we onu흫 tarapyndan esinlenen wariantlar umumy mantylyk g철rkezilmesi 체챌in m철h체m kritmalar boldy. WSC'deki hatlary m체mkin hatlary m체mkin bir 힊ekilde adama gola첵 챌ykan nural dili modellerini ulanyp 첵철redi. Bu kagyzda, biz bu korpora we WSC bi챌imindeki 챌철z체mler arasynda ge챌en 챌철z체mlerin etkisini 챌철zeriz. Bir n채챌e testi흫 eserleri 첵체ze 챌ykan corpora bilen 철r채n k철p 힊ekilde 챌yk첵ar we 챌yky힊 eserlerinde 철r채n m철h체m d체힊체k bolup ge챌iril첵채r. Bu netijelerde g철r채 biz WSC Web veri setirini temin edip g철r첵채ris. 60k 체st체nde web verilerinden 첵ok hasaplan첵an hasaplary흫 i챌inde hem i흫 uly korpus hem t채zeden hem bu h채zirki 철ns체mli korpora 첵akynla힊첵ar.", 'sq': 'Sfida e Skemas së Winograd it (WSC) dhe variantet e frymëzuar nga ai janë bërë pikë të rëndësishme për arsyetimin e kuptimit të përbashkët (CSR). Modeli i shfaqjes në WSC është përparuar shpejt nga niveli i shanseve në afër njerëzve duke përdorur modele gjuhësh nervore të trajnuar në korpra masive. Në këtë letër, ne analizojmë efektet e gradave të ndryshme të mbishtypjeve që ndodhin midis këtyre korprave dhe rasteve të testit në detyrat e stilit WSC. Ne zbulojmë se një numër i madh rastesh testimi kapërcehen konsiderueshëm me korprën e parastërvitjes në të cilën modelet më të lartë janë trajnuar dhe se një rënie e rëndësishme në saktësinë e klasifikimit ndodh kur modelet vlerësohen në raste me kapërcim minimal. Në bazë të këtyre rezultateve, ne ofrojmë grupin e të dhënave WSC-Web, që përbëhet nga mbi 60 mijë probleme të shprehura të çambiguacionit të zhveshur nga të dhënat web, duke qenë si korpusi më i madh deri tani, dhe duke pasur një proportë më të ulët të mbishtypjeve me korporatën e tanishme parastërvitëse.', 'am': 'የWinograd Schema Challenge (WSC) እና የተገኘው ለውጦች የውይይት አካባቢ ጉዳይ (CSR) አዋቂዎች ናቸው፡፡ በWSC ላይ የሞዴል ድምፅ ፈጥኖ በአካባቢ ኮርፖርት ላይ የተማረ የናውራዊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም ወደ አቅራቢያ ደረጃ ፈጥኖ አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በዚህ ኮርፖርት እና በWSC-style ስራ ውስጥ የሚደረገውን የልዩ ደረጃዎች የደረጃዎች ውጤቶች እናሳያልን፡፡ ብዙዎች ፈተናዎች በክፍለ ዘመቻ የዐርድ አካባቢ ሞላት ሲያስተማሩበት፣ እናም ምሳሌዎችን በተመሳሳይ ክፍል በተለየ ጊዜ ትልቅ የክፍል ውርደት እንዲደርስ እናገኛለን፡፡ እነዚህን ፍሬዎች በመሠረት፣ ከድረ ገጽ ዳርቻዎች የተለየ 60k በላይ የተለየ የውጤት ክፍተቶችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) və onun təşkil etdiyi dəyişikliklər ortaq fikirləşdirmək üçün mühüm benchmarklər oldular. WSC'nin modeli performansı çox qüvvətli corpora təhsil edilən nürol dil modelləri ilə yaxın insana tələb etdi. Bu kağızda, biz bu korpora və WSC stilində olan sınama məsələlərinin dəyişiklik dərəcələrinin etkisini analiz edirik. Biz çox sınaq örnəkləri görürük ki, modellərin minimal üstünlüyü ilə müəyyən edildiyi vaxt modellərin müəyyən edildiyi təqdirdə modellərin çox yüksək üstünlüyünü çəkir. Bu sonuçların üstündə WSC-Web verilənləri təmin edirik. İnternet verilənlərindən də çəkilmiş 60k-dən fazla pronoun disambiguation problemlərindən olub, hər ikisi də ən böyük korpus idi, həmin günlük pretraining korporası ilə çox düşük bir hissəsi var.", 'bn': 'উইনোগ্রাড স্কীমা চ্যালেঞ্জ (উইএসসি) এবং এর অনুপ্রাণিত ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্নেটরা সাধারণ মানুষের কারণের জন্য গুরুত্বপূ বিশাল কর্পোরায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা নিউরাল ভাষা মডেল ব্যবহার করে উইএসসির মোডেল প্রদর্শনের সুযোগ স্তর থেকে কাছাকাছি মানু এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন ডিগ্রি বিভিন্ন প্রভাব বিশ্লেষণ করি যা এই কোর্পোরা এবং উইএসসি-স্টাইল কাজের পরীক্ষার ঘটনা ঘটছে। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে বিশাল পরীক্ষার অনেক ঘটনাগুলো প্রাপ্ত কর্পোরার সাথে অত্যন্ত প্রাপ্ত হয়ে যায় যেখানে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়, আর যে পরীক্ষার স এই ফলাফলের ভিত্তিতে আমরা উইএসসি-ওয়েব ডাটাসেট প্রদান করি, যার মধ্যে ৬০০ কিছু প্রকাশিত বিভ্রান্ত সমস্যা রয়েছে, যা ওয়েব তথ্য থেকে সর্বোচ্চ কোর্পাস এবং বর্তমান বৃষ্টিপূর্ণ কর্পোর', 'ko': 'Winograd Schema Challenge(WSC)와 그 계발의 변체는 이미 상식추리(CSR)의 중요한 기준이 되었다.대규모 언어 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련된 신경 언어 모델을 사용하면 WSC에서의 모델 성능은 우연한 수준에서 인간에 가까운 수준으로 빠르게 발전했다.본고에서 우리는 WSC 스타일 임무에서 이러한 자료 라이브러리와 테스트 실례 사이의 어느 정도의 중첩이 발생하는 영향을 분석했다.우리는 대량의 테스트 실례와 훈련 전의 자료 라이브러리는 매우 큰 중첩이 있음을 발견했다. 가장 선진적인 모델은 이런 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련된 것이고 모델이 가장 작은 실례를 중첩하여 평가할 때 분류 정밀도가 현저히 떨어진다.이러한 결과를 토대로 우리는 WSC 네트워크 데이터 집합을 제공했다. 이 데이터 집합은 60k가 넘는 대명사 분리 문제로 구성되어 지금까지 가장 큰 자료 라이브러리이며 현재 훈련 전 자료 라이브러리와 중첩 비율이 현저히 낮아졌다.', 'ca': "El repte d'esquema Winograd (WSC) i les variants inspirades han esdevingut punts de referència importants per al raonament de sentit comú (CSR). El desempeny model de la WSC ha progressat ràpidament des de nivell d'atzar fins a prop humà utilitzant models de llenguatge neural entrenats en corpora massiva. En aquest paper analitzem els efectes de diversos graus de sobreposicions que ocorren entre aquests corpores i les instances de prova en tasques d'estil WSC. Trobem que un gran nombre d'exemples de prova es superponen considerablement amb el corpore de pré-formació en el qual s'entrenen els models d'última generació, i que hi ha una disminució significativa de la precisió de classificació quan els models s'evaluen en exemples amb mínima superposició. Sobre la base d'aquests resultats, proporcionem el conjunt de dades WSC-Web, que consisteix en més de 60.000 problemes de desambiguació pronunciats eliminats de les dades web, tant el corpus més gran fins ara, com tenir una proporció significativament més baixa de sobreposicions amb la corpora actual de pré-formació.", 'bs': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) i varianti inspirirani od njega postali su važni kriteriji za razumanje zajedničkog smisla (CSR). Modelni nastup na WSC brzo je napredovao od nivoa šanse do blizu ljudskog korištenja neuralnih jezičkih modela obučenih na masivnoj korpori. U ovom papiru analiziramo učinke različitih stupnjeva preklapanja koji se događaju između tih tijela i testnih slučajeva u zadatkima iz stila WSC-a. Nalazimo da se veliki broj testiranih slučajeva značajno preklapa sa tijelom pretkišnog tijela na kojem se obučavaju modeli stanja umjetnosti, i da se pojavljuje značajan pad klasifikacije tačnosti kada se modeli procjenjuju u slučajevima s minimalnim pretvaranjem. Na temelju tih rezultata, pružamo kompletu podataka WSC-Web a, sastavljajući od preko 60k problema sa disambiguacijom koji su izgubljeni iz internetskih podataka, kao i najveći korpus do sada, i ima značajno manju proporciju preklapanja s trenutnim pretraining corporom.', 'cs': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) a její inspirované varianty se staly důležitými měřítky pro zdravý rozum uvažování (CSR). Výkon modelu na WSC se rychle pokročil z úrovně náhody k téměř lidskému pomocí neuronových jazykových modelů trénovaných na masivních korpusech. V tomto článku analyzujeme vlivy různých stupňů překrývání, ke kterým dochází mezi těmito korpusy a testovacími instancemi v úlohách ve stylu WSC. Zjišťujeme, že velké množství testovacích instancí se značně překrývá s předtréninkovými korpusy, na nichž jsou trénovány nejmodernější modely, a že při hodnocení modelů na instancích s minimálním překrýváním dochází k výraznému poklesu přesnosti klasifikace. Na základě těchto výsledků poskytujeme WSC-Web datovou sadu, která se skládá z problémů s rozjasňováním zájmen více než 60k, které jsou dosud největším korpusem a mají výrazně nižší podíl překrývání se současnými předtréninkovými korpusy.', 'et': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) ja sellest inspireeritud variandid on muutunud terve mõistuse mõtlemise oluliseks võrdlusaluseks. Mudeli jõudlus WSC-l on kiiresti arenenud juhuslikult inimlikuks, kasutades neurokeele mudeleid, mis on treenitud massiivsetel korpustel. Käesolevas töös analüüsime WSC-stiilis ülesannetes nende korpuste ja testide vahel esinevate erineva astmega kattumiste mõju. Leiame, et suur hulk testijuhtumeid kattub märkimisväärselt koolituseelsete korpustega ning et klassifitseerimise täpsus langeb märkimisväärselt, kui mudeleid hinnatakse minimaalse kattumisega juhtumitel. Nende tulemuste põhjal pakume WSC-Web andmekogumit, mis koosneb rohkem kui 60k veebiandmetest kraapitud pronoonide eristamise probleemidest, olles nii suurim korpus seni, kui ka märkimisväärselt väiksem kattuvuste osakaal praeguste koolituseelsete korpustega.', 'fi': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) ja sen innoittamat variantit ovat tulleet tärkeiksi vertailukohteiksi tervejärkiselle päättelylle (CSR). Mallien suorituskyky WSC:ssä on nopeasti kehittynyt sattumanvaraisesta lähes inhimilliseksi käyttäen neurokielimalleja, jotka on koulutettu massiivisiin korpusiin. Tässä artikkelissa analysoimme näiden korpusten ja testiinstanssien välisten päällekkäisyyksien vaikutuksia WSC-tyylisissä tehtävissä. Havaitsemme, että suuri määrä testitapauksia on päällekkäisiä niiden esikoulutuskorpusten kanssa, joissa huippuluokan malleja koulutetaan, ja että luokitustarkkuus heikkenee merkittävästi, kun malleja arvioidaan tapauksissa, joissa päällekkäisyys on vähäistä. Näiden tulosten perusteella tarjoamme WSC-Web-aineiston, joka koostuu yli 60k pronomin erotteluongelmista, jotka on kaavittu web-datasta, ja on sekä tähän mennessä suurin korpus että huomattavasti pienempi osuus päällekkäisyyksistä nykyisten esikoulutuskorpusten kanssa.', 'hy': 'Վինոգրադի սխեմայի մարտահրավերը և դրա ոգեշնչված տարբերակները դարձան կարևոր համեմատական կետեր առողջ զգայական մտածելու համար (CSR). ՀԱԿ-ի մոդելը արագ զարգացել է պատահական մակարդակից մոտ մարդկային, օգտագործելով նյարդային լեզվի մոդելներ, որոնք պատրաստված են զանգվածային մարմնի վրա: In this paper, we analyze the effects of varying degrees of overlaps that occur between these corpora and the test instances in WSC-style tasks.  Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ շատ փորձարկումների դեպքերը մեծ մասամբ կապված են նախապատրաստվող մարմնի հետ, որի վրա վարժեցվում են ամենաբարձր մոդելները, և որ դասակարգման ճշգրտության մեծ նվազում է տեղի ունենում, երբ մոդելները գնահատվում են նվազագույն կապված դեպքերում: Հաշվի առնելով այս արդյունքներին, մենք տրամադրում ենք ՎԻՍՔ-Վեբ տվյալների համակարգը, որը կազմված է վեբ-տվյալներից վերացած մոտ 60 կմ բացահայտ բացահայտության խնդիրներից, որոնք մինչ օրս երկուսն են եղել ամենամեծ կորպուսը, և որոնք ունեն նշանակալի ավելի ցածր', 'sk': 'Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) in različice, ki jih navdihuje, so postale pomembna merila za razumevanje zdrave pameti (CSR). Uspešnost modela na WSC je hitro napredovala iz naključne ravni v skoraj človeško z uporabo nevronskih jezikovnih modelov, usposobljenih na masivnih korpusih. V tem prispevku analiziramo učinke različnih stopenj prekrivanja, ki se pojavljajo med temi korpusi in preskusnimi primeri v opravilih v slogu WSC. Ugotavljamo, da se veliko število preskusnih primerov znatno prekriva s korpusi predtreninga, na katerih se usposabljajo najsodobnejši modeli, in da se znatno zmanjša točnost klasifikacije, kadar se modeli ocenjujejo na primerih z minimalnim prekrivanjem. Na podlagi teh rezultatov zagotavljamo WSC-Web nabor podatkov, sestavljen iz več kot 60k težav z razločitvijo zaimkov iz spletnih podatkov, ki je obenem največji korpus do danes in ima bistveno manjši delež prekrivanja s trenutnimi predurjenimi korpusi.', 'ha': "The Winograda Schema (WSC) da variants da aka yi wahayi da shi sun kasance masu muhimu ga bongon masu hankali (CRR). Tafiyar da Model na WSC ya tsẽre farat ɗaya daga tsakanin-zuwa-mutum, mai amfani da misãlai na harshen neural wanda aka yi wa tsari a kan koma mai girma. Daga wannan takarda, Munã anayyar da fassarar darajõji mãsu sãɓãni ga sarrafa da jarrabãwa cikin aikin WSC. Muna gane cewa masu yawa na jarrabi masu yawa sun girmama shi da firma na daɗa ɗãwa, wanda aka sanar da misãlai-masu-sanawa, kuma da sauri mai girma cikin tsarin darafõfi ya sami idan an evaluce misãlai da dukkan rufe ƙarami. Basic kan waɗannan matsalar, Munã bãyar da tsarin WSC-Web da ke cikin ma'abũcin rabo-taraki 60k wanda aka yi cire daga data na web, yana da ƙaranci mafi girma zuwa yanzu, kuma yana da rabon ƙaranci mai ƙaranci na samu'in korana na farko.", 'jv': 'Winograd Visual Nang pepul iki, kita maneh ulih efek karo kalaayugan kelas-kalaayugan yen sak babagan karo perusahaan winih kanggo ngerasakno Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh akeh akeh sampeyan dipatensi sing beraksi ngono perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan-ingkang sampeyan kuwi tindakan Ngawe wis basa gambarang iki, awak dhéwé nggawe dataset WSC-web, ning awak dhéwé 60 milih sing perbudhakan kanggo mbengguna kuwi nggawe dataset web, sampeyan tanggal terus-tanggal gawe lan akeh dumadhi uwong', 'bo': 'The Winograd Schema Challenge (WSC) and variants inspired by it have become important benchmarks for common-sense reasoning (CSR). WSC ནང་གི་མིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་གྲུབ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ལས་ཉེ་བར་མཐའ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་འདིའི་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བ་དང་WSC བཟོ་རྣམ་གྱི་དཔེ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ལྟ་བུ་རྟོགས་ ང་ཚོས་བརྟག Based on these results, we provide the WSC-Web dataset, consisting of over 60k pronoun disambiguation problems scraped from web data, being both the largest corpus to date and having a significantly lower proportion of overlaps with current pretraining corporation.', 'he': 'האתגר בסגנון וינוגרד (WSC) והשינויים שנושאים בו הפכו למרכזים חשובים להסבירת הגיון הנפשי (CSR). מודל ביצועים על WSC התקדם מהר מרמה סיכוי ליד כמעט אנושי בשימוש מודלים שפה עצבית מאומנים על גופרה מסיבית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מנתחים את ההשפעות של מעלות שונות של התכפילות שמתרחשות בין הקופורה האלה למקרים הבדיקות במשימות בסגנון WSC. אנו מוצאים שמספר גדול של מקרים מבחנים מתקפלים באופן משמעותי עם הקופורה המתאימת בהם מודלים מוקדמים במיוחד, ושירידה משמעותית בדיקת מסווג מתרחשת כאשר מודלים מתערכים על מקרים עם התקפלות מינימלית. בהתבסס על התוצאות האלה, אנו מספקים את קבוצת הנתונים WSC-Web, שמכילה בעל יותר מ-60 אלף בעיות הפרעה של ביטוי ביטוי שרוטטו ממידע האינטרנט, להיות גם הקורפוס הגדול ביותר עד היום, ויש נתיב נמוך יותר משמעותי של התכפילות עם הקורפורה הנוכחית לפני אימון.'}
{'en': 'Do n’t Patronize Me ! An Annotated Dataset with Patronizing and Condescending Language towards Vulnerable Communities', 'fr': 'Ne me traite pas avec condescendance\xa0! Un ensemble de données annoté avec un langage condescendant et condescendant envers les communautés vulnérables', 'ar': 'لا ترعىني! مجموعة بيانات مشروحة مع لغة رعاية وتنازل تجاه المجتمعات الضعيفة', 'pt': 'Não me patrocine! Um conjunto de dados anotado com linguagem paternalista e condescendente em relação a comunidades vulneráveis', 'es': '¡No seas condescendiente conmigo! Un conjunto de datos anotado con un lenguaje condescendiente y condescendiente hacia las comunidades vulnerables', 'zh': '无顾我! 弱势群体用居高临下及临高临下语注数集', 'ja': '私を後援しないでください！脆弱なコミュニティへの敬意と優越的な言語を備えた注釈付きデータセット', 'hi': 'मुझे संरक्षण मत दो! कमजोर समुदायों की ओर संरक्षण और अपमानजनक भाषा के साथ एक एनोटेट डेटासेट', 'ru': 'Не покровительствуй мне! Аннотированный набор данных с покровительствующим и снисходительным языком для уязвимых сообществ', 'ga': 'Ná Patronize Me! Tacar Sonraí Anótáilte le Teanga Pátrúnachta agus Condescending i dtreo Pobail Leochaileacha', 'ka': 'ნვ მვ ოარპჲნთპაი! Name', 'hu': 'Ne támogass engem! Egy jegyzetelt adatkészlet a sérülékeny közösségek irányába védő és sűrítő nyelvvel', 'el': 'Μην με προστατεύεις! Ένα σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων με προστάτιδα και συμπυκνωτική γλώσσα προς ευάλωτες κοινότητες', 'lt': 'Nesaugok manęs! Įrašytas duomenų rinkinys, kuriame numatyta apsaugoti pažeidžiamų bendruomenių kalbą', 'it': 'Non mi patrocinare! Un dataset annotato con linguaggio patronizzante e condensatore verso comunità vulnerabili', 'kk': 'Мені патронизациялау! Патронизациялау және келесі тілді қолдануға арналған деректер бағдарламасы', 'mk': 'Не ме патронизирај! Name', 'ms': 'Jangan melindungi saya! Name', 'ml': 'എന്നെ നോക്കരുത്! Name', 'mt': "Don't Patronize Me!  Sett ta’ Dejta Annotat bil-Lingwa Patronizzanti u Kondixxenti lejn Komunitajiet Vulnerable", 'mn': 'Намайг батлах битгий! Амьдралын холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой сэтгэл өгөгдлийн санаа', 'no': 'Ikkje patronisere meg! Name', 'pl': 'Nie patronuj mnie! Annotowany zestaw danych z językiem patronizującym i skracającym wobec społeczności zagrożonych', 'sr': 'Nemoj me patronizirati! Anjutirani podaci sa patronizacijom i osvajanjem jezika prema vulnerabilnim zajednicama', 'ro': 'Nu mă patroniza! Un set de date adnotat cu limbaj patronizant și condescendent față de comunitățile vulnerabile', 'si': 'මාව පාට්රෝන් කරන්න එපා! Name', 'so': 'Ha i ilaalin! Rugta macluumaadka la soo bandhigay oo ku qoran qofka luqada lagu soo wareejiyo', 'sv': 'Patronisera mig inte! Ett kommenterat dataset med patroniserande och kondenserande språk mot sårbara samhällen', 'ta': 'என்னை பாதுகாப்பாக்க வேண்டாம்! Name', 'ur': 'مجھے نگہبان نہ کرو ایک ڈیٹائیسٹ جو زبان سناتی اور نازل کرنے والی جہالتوں کی طرف متوجہ ہوئی ہے', 'uz': 'Мени қўшилма! Name', 'vi': 'Đừng Thần hộ mệnh! Thông tin mật với ngôn ngữ mẹ trợ giúp và ngữ đáp các cộng đồng', 'bg': 'Не ме покровителствай! Анотиран набор от данни с патронизиращ и унижаващ език към уязвимите общности', 'hr': 'Nemoj me patronizirati! Notirani podaci sa patroniziranjem i potvrđivanjem jezika prema vulnerabilnim zajednicama', 'nl': 'Bescherm me niet! Een geannoteerde Dataset met Patroniserende en Condenserende Taal naar kwetsbare gemeenschappen', 'da': 'Du skal ikke beskytte mig! Et kommenteret datasæt med patroniserende og kondenserende sprog mod sårbare fællesskaber', 'de': 'Beschütze mich nicht! Ein kommentierter Datensatz mit patronisierender und verdichtender Sprache gegenüber gefährdeten Gemeinschaften', 'id': 'Jangan melindungiku! Sebuah Set Data Annotasi dengan Bahasa Patronasi dan Kondisin ke arah Komunitas Terluka', 'fa': 'مرا نگهبان نکن Name', 'ko': '나를 돌보지 마라!주석이 있는 데이터 집합', 'sw': 'Usinilinde! Taarifa zilizotangazwa kwa lugha ya Kufuatilia na Kutokea kwa ajili ya Jumuiya za Utangazaji', 'af': 'Moenie My Patroniseer nie! Name', 'sq': 'Mos më ruaj! An Annotated Dataset with Patronizing and Condescending Language towards Vulnerable Communities', 'tr': "Meni gözleme! Vulnerable Communities'e doğru şekillendirilen ve ilerleyen Diller ile notlandırılmış veri tabanları", 'am': 'አትግለጹኝ! ቋንቋ እና ማቀናቀል ቋንቋ ወደ Vulnerable Communities', 'hy': "Don't Patronize Me!  Անտորացված տվյալների համակարգ, որն ունի խոցելի համայնքների ուղղությամբ պատրոնացնող և համընդհանուր լեզուներ", 'bn': 'আমাকে প্রতিযোগিতা করবেন না! Name', 'bs': 'Nemoj me patronizirati! Annotiran datum sa patronizacijom i potvrđivanjem jezika prema vulnerabilnim zajednicama', 'az': 'M…ôni qorumayńĪn! Vulnerable Communities t…ôr…ôfind…ôn Patronizing v…ô ńįnŇüallah Dili olan', 'ca': 'No em patronizeu! Un conjunt de dades anotats amb un llenguatge patronizant i condescendant cap a comunitats vulnerables', 'cs': 'Neopatronuj mě! Anotovaná sada dat s patronizujícím a kompresujícím jazykem vůči zranitelným komunitám', 'et': 'Ära kaitse mind! Annoteeritud andmekogum kaitseva ja halvendava keelega haavatavate kogukondade suhtes', 'fi': 'Älä suojele minua! Annotoitu aineisto, jossa suojellaan ja lieventää kieltä haavoittuvia yhteisöjä kohtaan', 'sk': 'Ne pokrovite me! Anotiran nabor podatkov s pokroviteljskim in osvežujočim jezikom proti ranljivim skupnostim', 'jv': 'Aja negori aku ! Sampeyan Anaturasi paten nganggo pateronisasi lan kelangenan Langan Sampeyan Open', 'he': 'אל תשמור עליי! קבוצת נתונים מועטפת עם שפה מפטרוניזציה ומתוקפת לכיוון קהילות פגיעות', 'ha': 'Kada ka riƙe Ni masõya! KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ང་ལ་སོ་སྟོན་མ་བྱེད། Vulnerable Communities ལ་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we introduce a new annotated dataset which is aimed at supporting the development of NLP models to identify and categorize language that is patronizing or condescending towards vulnerable communities (e.g. refugees, homeless people, poor families). While the prevalence of such language in the general media has long been shown to have harmful effects, it differs from other types of harmful language, in that it is generally used unconsciously and with good intentions. We furthermore believe that the often subtle nature of patronizing and condescending language (PCL) presents an interesting technical challenge for the NLP community. Our analysis of the proposed dataset shows that identifying PCL is hard for standard NLP models, with language models such as BERT achieving the best results.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات مشروحة جديدة تهدف إلى دعم تطوير نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية لتحديد وتصنيف اللغة التي ترعى أو تتغاضى عن المجتمعات الضعيفة (مثل اللاجئين والمشردين والأسر الفقيرة). في حين أن انتشار مثل هذه اللغة في وسائل الإعلام العامة قد ثبت منذ فترة طويلة أن لها آثارًا ضارة ، فإنها تختلف عن الأنواع الأخرى من اللغة الضارة ، من حيث أنها تُستخدم عمومًا دون وعي وبنية حسنة. علاوة على ذلك ، نعتقد أن الطبيعة الخفية غالبًا للغة المتعالية والتنازل (PCL) تمثل تحديًا تقنيًا مثيرًا للاهتمام لمجتمع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. يُظهر تحليلنا لمجموعة البيانات المقترحة أن تحديد PCL صعب بالنسبة لنماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية القياسية ، حيث تحقق نماذج اللغة مثل BERT أفضل النتائج.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un nouveau jeu de données annoté qui vise à soutenir le développement de modèles de PNL afin d'identifier et de catégoriser le langage condescendant ou condescendant envers les communautés vulnérables (par exemple les réfugiés, les sans-abri, les familles pauvres). Bien que l'on ait démontré depuis longtemps que la prévalence de ce langage dans les médias généralistes avait des effets néfastes, il diffère des autres types de langage préjudiciable en ce qu'il est généralement utilisé inconsciemment et avec de bonnes intentions. Nous pensons en outre que la nature souvent subtile du langage condescendant et condescendant (PCL) représente un défi technique intéressant pour la communauté de la PNL. Notre analyse de l'ensemble de données proposé montre que l'identification de la PCL est difficile pour les modèles de PNL standard, les modèles de langage tels que BERT obtenant les meilleurs résultats.", 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un nuevo conjunto de datos anotado que tiene como objetivo apoyar el desarrollo de modelos de PNL para identificar y categorizar el lenguaje que es condescendiente o condescendiente hacia las comunidades vulnerables (por ejemplo, refugiados, personas sin hogar, familias pobres). Si bien se ha demostrado desde hace tiempo que la prevalencia de este tipo de lenguaje en los medios de comunicación generales tiene efectos nocivos, difiere de otros tipos de lenguaje dañino, en que generalmente se usa de manera inconsciente y con buenas intenciones. Además, creemos que la naturaleza a menudo sutil del lenguaje condescendiente y condescendiente (PCL) presenta un desafío técnico interesante para la comunidad de la PNL. Nuestro análisis del conjunto de datos propuesto muestra que la identificación de la PCL es difícil para los modelos de PNL estándar, ya que los modelos de lenguaje como BERT obtienen los mejores resultados.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados anotado que visa apoiar o desenvolvimento de modelos de PNL para identificar e categorizar a linguagem que é paternalista ou condescendente com comunidades vulneráveis (por exemplo, refugiados, moradores de rua, famílias pobres). Embora a prevalência de tal linguagem na mídia em geral tenha demonstrado efeitos nocivos há muito tempo, ela difere de outros tipos de linguagem nociva, pois geralmente é usada inconscientemente e com boas intenções. Além disso, acreditamos que a natureza muitas vezes sutil da linguagem paternalista e condescendente (PCL) apresenta um desafio técnico interessante para a comunidade de PNL. Nossa análise do conjunto de dados proposto mostra que identificar PCL é difícil para modelos padrão de NLP, com modelos de linguagem como o BERT alcançando os melhores resultados.', 'ja': 'この論文では、脆弱なコミュニティ（例えば、難民、ホームレス、貧困家庭）に対して寛容または優越的である言語を識別し、分類するためのNLPモデルの開発を支援することを目的とした新しい注釈付きデータセットを紹介する。一般メディアにおけるこのような言葉の普及は、有害な影響を与えることが長い間示されてきましたが、一般的に無意識のうちに善意で使用される点で、他の種類の有害な言葉とは異なります。さらに、言語（ PCL ）を保護し、優越させるというしばしば微妙な性質は、NLPコミュニティにとって興味深い技術的課題であると考えています。提案されたデータセットの分析では、PCLを特定することは標準的なNLPモデルにとって困難であり、BERTなどの言語モデルは最良の結果を達成することが示されています。', 'zh': '本文引新注数集,指赞NLP模,以识类对弱势群体(如难民,无家可归者,贫困家庭)居高临下之言。 虽流媒体已验,然与他形异者,以其常无意识善也。 又以为居高临下,与居高临下之言(PCL)微为NLP社区致一趣之术。 吾于所立数集之分析表明,于准NLP模形,知PCL为难,BERT言模形为上。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक नया एनोटेट डेटासेट पेश करते हैं जिसका उद्देश्य एनएलपी मॉडल के विकास का समर्थन करना है ताकि भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण किया जा सके जो कमजोर समुदायों (जैसे शरणार्थियों, बेघर लोगों, गरीब परिवारों) के प्रति संरक्षण या अपमानजनक है। जबकि सामान्य मीडिया में इस तरह की भाषा की व्यापकता को लंबे समय से हानिकारक प्रभाव दिखाया गया है, यह अन्य प्रकार की हानिकारक भाषा से अलग है, जिसमें यह आमतौर पर अनजाने में और अच्छे इरादों के साथ उपयोग किया जाता है। हम यह भी मानते हैं कि संरक्षण और अपमानजनक भाषा (पीसीएल) की अक्सर सूक्ष्म प्रकृति एनएलपी समुदाय के लिए एक दिलचस्प तकनीकी चुनौती प्रस्तुत करती है। प्रस्तावित डेटासेट के हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि मानक एनएलपी मॉडल के लिए पीसीएल की पहचान करना मुश्किल है, जिसमें BERT जैसे भाषा मॉडल सबसे अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этом документе мы вводим новый аннотированный набор данных, который направлен на поддержку разработки моделей NLP для выявления и категоризации формулировок, которые являются снисходительными или снисходительными по отношению к уязвимым сообществам (например, беженцам, бездомным, бедным семьям). Хотя уже давно доказано, что распространенность таких формулировок в средствах массовой информации имеет пагубные последствия, они отличаются от других видов пагубных формулировок тем, что они, как правило, используются неосознанно и с благими намерениями. Кроме того, мы считаем, что зачастую тонкий характер снисходительного и снисходительного языка (PCL) представляет собой интересную техническую проблему для сообщества NLP. Наш анализ предлагаемого набора данных показывает, что идентификация PCL трудна для стандартных моделей NLP, при этом языковые модели, такие как BERT, достигают наилучших результатов.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach tacar sonraí nua anótáilte atá dírithe ar thacú le forbairt samhlacha NLP chun teanga a aithint agus a chatagóiriú atá ag déanamh pátrúnachta nó ag géilleadh do phobail leochaileacha (m.sh. teifigh, daoine gan dídean, teaghlaigh bhochta). Cé go bhfuil sé léirithe le fada an lá go mbíonn éifeachtaí díobhálacha ag leitheadúlacht na teanga sin sna meáin ghinearálta, tá difríocht idir í agus cineálacha eile teanga dhochracha, sa mhéid is go n-úsáidtear í go hiondúil gan aithne agus le dea-intinn. Ina theannta sin creidimid go bhfuil dúshlán teicniúil suimiúil do phobal an NLP mar gheall ar nádúr caolchúiseach na teanga pátrúnachta agus condescending (PCL) go minic. Léiríonn ár n-anailís ar an tacar sonraí atá beartaithe go bhfuil sé deacair PCL a aithint do mhúnlaí caighdeánacha NLP, agus na torthaí is fearr á mbaint amach ag samhlacha teanga ar nós BERT.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα νέο σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων που στοχεύει στην υποστήριξη της ανάπτυξης μοντέλων για τον προσδιορισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση γλωσσών που είναι πατρονεκτική ή συγκαταβατική απέναντι σε ευάλωτες κοινότητες (π.χ. πρόσφυγες, άστεγοι, φτωχές οικογένειες). Ενώ η επικράτηση αυτής της γλώσσας στα γενικά μέσα ενημέρωσης έχει αποδειχθεί εδώ και καιρό ότι έχει επιβλαβείς επιπτώσεις, διαφέρει από άλλους τύπους βλαβερής γλώσσας στο ότι χρησιμοποιείται γενικά ασυνείδητα και με καλές προθέσεις. Επιπλέον, πιστεύουμε ότι η συχνά λεπτή φύση της πατρονωτικής και συγκαταβατικής γλώσσας (PCL) αποτελεί μια ενδιαφέρουσα τεχνική πρόκληση για την κοινότητα του NLP. Η ανάλυση του προτεινόμενου συνόλου δεδομένων δείχνει ότι ο εντοπισμός είναι δύσκολος για τα τυποποιημένα μοντέλα με γλωσσικά μοντέλα όπως το BERT να επιτυγχάνουν τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენში ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი ანოტატირებული მონაცემების კონტაქტის შესახებ, რომელიც მინდა NLP მოდელების განვითარება და კატეგორიზაციის განვითარება, რომელიც პოტატირებულია ან კონტატირებულია საზოგადოებში ( თუმცა ასეთი ენერგიის წარმოდგენება საერთო მედიაში ძალიან ბედნიერი ეფექტები იქნება, ის განსხვავებულია სხვა ტიპების საშინელი ენერგიდან, რომლებიც ის საერთოდ გამოყენება ბედნიერი და კარგი დამატებით ვფიქრობთ, რომ ჩვენ მხოლოდ პოტრონიზაციის და კონდექციური ენაზე (PCL) ინტერესური ტექნონიკური გამოცდილება NLP საზოგადოებაში. ჩვენი ანალიზია მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ PCL-ის განცემება სტანდარტული NLP მოდელებისთვის ძალიან ძალიან, როგორც ენის მოდელებისთვის, როგორც BERT-ს უკეთესი შესაძ', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új, jegyzetelt adatkészletet, amelynek célja, hogy támogassa az NLP modellek kidolgozását a kiszolgáltatott közösségekkel (például menekültekkel, hajléktalanokkal, szegény családokkal) szembeni pártfogó vagy leereszkedő nyelvek azonosítására és kategorizálására. Bár az ilyen nyelv elterjedtsége az általános médiában már régóta káros hatásokkal jár, különbözik a káros nyelvek más típusaitól, mivel általában tudatlanul és jó szándékkal használják. Úgy gondoljuk továbbá, hogy a leereszkedő és leereszkedő nyelv (PCL) gyakran finom természete érdekes technikai kihívást jelent az NLP közösség számára. A javasolt adatkészlet elemzése azt mutatja, hogy a PCL azonosítása nehéz a szabványos NLP modellek számára, a nyelvi modellek, mint például a BERT, elérik a legjobb eredményeket.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, introduciamo un nuovo dataset annotato che mira a sostenere lo sviluppo di modelli PNL per identificare e categorizzare un linguaggio che è patronante o condiscendente verso le comunità vulnerabili (ad esempio rifugiati, senzatetto, famiglie povere). Sebbene la prevalenza di tale linguaggio nei media generali abbia a lungo dimostrato di avere effetti dannosi, differisce da altri tipi di linguaggio dannoso, in quanto viene generalmente utilizzato inconsciamente e con buone intenzioni. Crediamo inoltre che la natura spesso sottile del linguaggio patronizzante e condiscendente (PCL) rappresenti una sfida tecnica interessante per la comunità NLP. La nostra analisi del set di dati proposto mostra che identificare PCL è difficile per i modelli standard di PNL, con modelli linguistici come BERT che ottengono i migliori risultati.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, NLP үлгілерін анықтау және бағалау тілдерін анықтау және бағалау үшін жаңа белгіленген деректер жинағын келтіреміз (мысалы, белгілер, үйсіз адамдар, кедейлі отбаслар) деген жаңа деректер жинағын анықтаймыз. Бұл тілді жалпы медиақтағы көпшілік эффекттерді көрсету үшін, ол басқа түрлерден қауіпсіздік тілден айырмайды, өйткені ол көпшілікті білмейді және жақсы мақсаттармен қолданылады. Қосымша, біз NLP қоғамдылығының көпшілікті және бақылау тілдерінің (PCL) қызықты техникалық шақыруын көрсетеді деп ойлаймыз. Келтірілген деректер жиының анализиясы, PCL анықтау стандартты NLP үлгілеріне қатты деп көрсетеді. БЕРТ секілді тіл үлгілері, ең жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізу үшін.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naują pažymėtą duomenų rinkinį, kurio tikslas – remti NLP modelių kūrimą siekiant nustatyti ir suskirstyti į kategorijas kalbą, kuri patronizuoja ar žemina pažeidžiamas bendruomenes (pvz., pabėg ėlius, benamius, vargšas šeimas). Nors jau seniai įrodyta, kad tokios kalbos paplitimas bendrojoje žiniasklaidoje daro žalingą poveikį, ji skiriasi nuo kitų žalingų kalbų tipų, nes ji paprastai naudojama sąmoningai ir gerais ketinimais. Be to, manome, kad dažnai subtilus patronizuojančios ir kondensuojančios kalbos (PCL) pobūdis kelia įdomų techninį iššūkį NLP bendruomenei. Mūsų siūlomo duomenų rinkinio analizė rodo, kad standartiniams NLP modeliams sunku nustatyti PCL, o kalbiniai modeliai, pavyzdžiui, BERT, siekia geriausių rezultatų.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, воведуваме нов национален податок кој има за цел поддршка на развојот на моделите на НЛП за идентификување и категоризирање на јазикот кој е патронизиран или кондескензиран кон ранливите заедници (на пример бегалците, бездомниците, сиромашните семејства Иако превенвенцијата на ваков јазик во генералните медиуми долго време се покажа дека има штетни ефекти, се разликува од други видови штетни јазици, бидејќи генерално се користи несвесно и со добри намери. Покрај тоа, веруваме дека честопати суптилната природа на патронизирачкиот и кондуцентниот јазик (ПКЛ) претставува интересен технички предизвик за заедницата на НЛП. Нашата анализа на предложениот компјутер податоци покажува дека идентификувањето на ПКЛ е тешко за стандардните НЛП модели, со јазички модели како што е БЕРТ постигнувајќи ги најдобрите резултати.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan set data baru yang dicatat yang bertujuan untuk menyokong pembangunan model NLP untuk mengenalpasti dan kategorisasi bahasa yang mempengaruhi atau mendesak kepada komuniti yang rentan (contohnya pelarian, orang tanpa rumah, keluarga miskin). Walaupun kebanyakan bahasa tersebut dalam media umum telah lama terbukti mempunyai kesan berbahaya, ia berbeza dari jenis bahasa berbahaya lain, kerana ia biasanya digunakan tanpa sedar dan dengan niat yang baik. Selain itu, kami percaya bahawa sifat yang sering lembut bahasa yang menyembah dan mengurangi (PCL) menghasilkan cabaran teknikal yang menarik bagi komuniti NLP. Analisis kami dari set data yang diusulkan menunjukkan bahawa pengenalpasti PCL sukar untuk model NLP piawai, dengan model bahasa seperti BERT mencapai keputusan terbaik.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിന് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി NLP മോഡലുകളുടെ വികസിപ്പിനെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിന സാധാരണ മീഡിയില്\u200d ഇത്തരം ഭാഷയുടെ മുന്നിലുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d കാലത്തേക്കുമുണ്ടായിരുന്നു, അത് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മറ്റു തരം ഭാഷയ നമ്മള്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d പിസിഎലിന്റെ സ്വഭാവം പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതും സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഭാഷ (പിസിഎല്\u200d) എന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി സമൂഹത പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നത് പിസിഎല്\u200d സാധാരണ NLP മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കായി ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയിലെ ഏറ്റവും', 'no': 'I denne papiret introduserer vi eit nytt oppmerkte dataset som er målet å støtte utviklinga av NLP-modeller for å identifisera og kategorisera språk som patroniserer eller konsekvenserer mot sårbare fellesskap (f.eks. flytningar, hjemløse folk, fattige familier). Mens utbredelsen av slike språk i den generelle media har langt vist å ha skadelige effektar, er det forskjellig frå andre typar skadelige språk, slik at det generelt blir brukt uavhengig og med gode viljonar. Vi tror også at den ofte subtelle naturen av patronisering og konsenserende språk (PCL) viser eit interessant teknisk utfordring for NLP-samfunnet. Analysen vårt av den foreslåde datasettet viser at identifisering av PCL er vanskeleg for standard NLP-modeller, med språk-modeller som BERT har oppnådd dei beste resultatene.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu sett ta’ dejta annotat ġdid li g ħandu l-għan li jappoġġja l-iżvilupp ta’ mudelli NLP biex jidentifikaw u jikkategorizzaw il-lingwa li hija patronizzanti jew kondensanti lejn komunitajiet vulnerabbli (pereżempju refuġjati, persuni mingħajr dar, familji fqar). While the prevalence of such language in the general media has long been shown to have harmful effects, it differs from other types of harmful language, in that it is generally used unconsciously and with good intentions.  Barra minn hekk aħna nemmnu li n-natura ta’ spiss subtili tal-lingwa patronizzanti u kondensanti (PCL) tippreżenta sfida teknika interessanti għall-komunità NLP. L-analiżi tagħna tas-sett tad-dejta propost turi li l-identifikazzjoni tal-PCL hija diffiċli għall-mudelli standard NLP, bil-mudelli lingwistiċi bħall-BERT jiksbu l-aħjar riżultati.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowy anotatowany zestaw danych, który ma na celu wspieranie rozwoju modeli NLP w celu identyfikacji i kategoryzacji języka protekcjonującego lub protekcjonującego wobec społeczności wrażliwych (np. uchodźców, bezdomnych, biednych rodzin). Chociaż rozpowszechnienie takiego języka w ogólnych mediach od dawna wykazano szkodliwe skutki, różni się on od innych rodzajów szkodliwego języka tym, że jest on ogólnie używany nieświadomie i z dobrymi intencjami. Ponadto uważamy, że często subtelny charakter języka protekcjonalnego i protekcjonalnego (PCL) stanowi interesujące wyzwanie techniczne dla społeczności NLP. Analiza proponowanego zbioru danych pokazuje, że identyfikacja PCL jest trudna dla standardowych modeli NLP, a modele językowe takie jak BERT osiągają najlepsze wyniki.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид NLP загварын хөгжлийг дэмжих зорилготой шинэ сэтгэл санагдсан өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж, зорилгодог хэл нь эмзэг нийгэмд хамааралтай эсвэл хамааралтай (жишээ нь дүрвэгч, гэр бүлийн хүн, ядуу гэр бүлийн) хэлний тухай Эдгээр хэл ерөнхий мэдээллийн мэдээллийн тухай ихэвчлэн хохиромжтой нөлөөтэй байгааг харуулсан ч бас өөр төрлийн хохиромжтой хэлээс ялгаатай, ихэвчлэн ухамсар, сайн зорилгоор хэрэглэгддэг. Мөн бид NLP нийгэмд сонирхолтой техник сорилт өгдөг. Бидний санал өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжилгээ нь PCL-г тодорхойлох нь стандарт NLP загваруудын хувьд хэл загваруудын хувьд хамгийн сайн үр дүн гаргах хэцүү гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, introducem un nou set de date adnotate care vizează sprijinirea dezvoltării modelelor PNL pentru identificarea și clasificarea limbajului care este patronizant sau condescendent față de comunitățile vulnerabile (de exemplu refugiați, persoane fără adăpost, familii sărace). Deși prevalența unui astfel de limbaj în mass-media generală s-a demonstrat mult timp că are efecte dăunătoare, acesta diferă de alte tipuri de limbaj dăunător, prin faptul că este folosit în general inconștient și cu bune intenții. În plus, credem că natura adesea subtilă a limbajului patronizant și condescendent (PCL) reprezintă o provocare tehnică interesantă pentru comunitatea PNL. Analiza setului de date propus arată că identificarea PCL este dificilă pentru modelele standard de PNL, modele lingvistice precum BERT obținând cele mai bune rezultate.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු දත්ත සූදානයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා, ඒක නිර්මාණය කරනවා NLP මෝඩල් විකාශය සඳහා පරීක්ෂා කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂා කරපු භාෂාව අන සාමාන්\u200dය මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ මේ භාෂාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොඳ වෙලාවට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වුණා, ඒක අනිත් වර්ගයක් අනතුරු භාෂාවට ව අපි තවත් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැති වෙලාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මකය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂාව (PCL) ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විද අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පෙන්වන්නේ PCL විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය NLP මොඩේල්ස් වලට අමාරුයි, භා', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது NLP மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு ஆதரிக்கும் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு ஆதரிக்கும பொது ஊடகத்தில் இந்த மொழியின் முன்னோக்கம் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டிருக்கும் போது, அது வேறு வகைகளில் தீங்கும் மொழியிலிருந்து மாறுபடுகிறது, அது  நாம் இன்னும் நம்புகிறோம் பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் கூட்டும் மொழி (PCL) ஒரு சுவாரஸ்யமான தொழில்நுட்ப சவால்களை NLP சமூகத்திற்க நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்தின் ஆராய்ச்சி பிசிஎல் நிலையான NLP மாதிரிகளுக்கு கடினமானது என்று காட்டுகிறது, பிரெட்ட் சிறந்த ம', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نو اظہار کی ڈیٹ سٹ کو معلوم کرلیا ہے جو NLP موڈلوں کی تولید کی مدد کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ زبان کی شناسایی اور کائٹریزی کریں جو زبان کی حفاظت کرتی ہے یا نہایت مضبوط جہانوں کی طرف متوجہ ہوتی ہے اگرچہ اس طرح کی زبان عمومی میڈیا میں بہت سی مدت تک برائی کا اثر دکھایا گیا ہے، اس میں دوسری زبانوں سے مختلف ہے، اس میں کہ اسے بغیر آگاہ اور اچھی خواہشات سے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہم اس کے علاوہ یہ سمجھتے ہیں کہ اچھی طرح حفاظت کرنے والی زبان (PCL) کی زیادہ مضبوط طبیعت NLP کمونٹی کے لئے ایک جالب تکنیکی چال ہے۔ ہماری پیشنهاد ڈیٹ سٹ کی تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ PCL شناسایی استاندارد NLP موڈل کے لئے سخت ہے، جیسے BERT بہترین نتیجے پہنچانے کے لئے زبان موڈل کے ساتھ۔', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu notiranu kompletu podataka koja je cilj podržavanja razvoja modela NLP-a da identifikuje i kategorizuje jezik koji patronizuje ili suzdržava prema ranjivim zajednicama (npr. izbjeglice, beskućnici, siromašne porodice). Dok se dugo pokazuje prevalencija takvog jezika u medijima da imaju štetne efekte, razlikuje se od drugih vrsta štetne jezika, jer se uopšte koristi nesvjesno i sa dobrim namjerama. Osim toga, mi vjerujemo da često suptilna priroda patronizacije i sposobnosti jezika (PCL) predstavlja zanimljiv tehnički izazov za zajednicu NLP. Naša analiza predloženog seta podataka pokazuje da je identifikacija PCL teško za standardne NLP modele, sa jezičkim modelima kao što je BERT ostvarila najbolje rezultate.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa sawir cusub oo la caawinayo horumarinta modellada NLP si ay u aqoonsadaan oo u kala qeybiso luqada ay u leedahay bulshada naafada ah (tusaale ahaan qaxootiga, dadka guryo la’aanta ah, qoysaska miskiinka ah). Intii waqti dheer waxaa la muujiyey in luqada caynkaas ah oo ku jira shahaado waxyeello leh, waxay ka duwan yihiin luuqado kale oo waxyeello ah, sababtoo ah waxaa inta badan loo isticmaalaa si aan ogayn iyo qasab wanaagsan. Sidoo kale waxaynu aaminsanahay in dabiicadda aad u fudud karto oo ku saabsan luqada PCL (PCL) uu u keenaa dhibaato xiiso ah dhaqaalaha teknolojiga ee bulshada NLP. Analyskayaga sawirada la soo jeeday waxay muuqataa in aqoonsashada PCL ay ku adag tahay noocyada caadiga ah ee NLP, waxayna ku jiraan modello afka sida BERT oo ay gaadhaan resultada ugu wanaagsan.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats introducerar vi en ny kommenterad datauppsättning som syftar till att stödja utvecklingen av NLP-modeller för att identifiera och kategorisera språk som är nedlåtande eller nedlåtande mot utsatta samhällen (t.ex. flyktingar, hemlösa, fattiga familjer). Även om förekomsten av sådant språk i de allmänna medierna länge har visat sig ha skadliga effekter, skiljer det sig från andra typer av skadliga språk, eftersom det vanligtvis används omedvetet och med goda avsikter. Vi anser dessutom att den ofta subtila karaktären av nedlåtande och nedlåtande språket (PCL) utgör en intressant teknisk utmaning för NLP-samhället. Vår analys av den föreslagna datauppsättningen visar att det är svårt att identifiera PCL för standard NLP-modeller, med språkmodeller som BERT som ger bästa resultat.', 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một bộ dữ liệu mới được ghi chú nhằm hỗ trợ phát triển các mô hình lập trình ngôn ngữ chọc quê hương để nhận dạng và phân loại những ngôn ngữ bảo vệ hay cúi đầu đối với các cộng đồng dễ bị tổn thương (v.v. người tị nạn, người vô gia cư, gia cư, gia đình nghèo). Trong khi việc phổ biến ngôn ngữ này trên truyền thông rộng đã được cho thấy có tác động xấu, nhưng nó khác với những ngôn ngữ khác, vì nó thường được dùng vô thức và có ý định tốt. Chúng tôi tin rằng bản chất bảo vệ và hạ mình của ngôn ngữ (PCL) thường là một thách thức kỹ thuật thú vị đối với cộng đồng NMB. Phân tích tập tin đã đề xuất cho thấy việc xác định khuếch đại gen (PCL) rất khó đối với các mẫu ngôn ngữ tiêu chuẩn, với những mẫu ngôn ngữ như BERT đạt được kết quả tốt nhất.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz yangi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlamiz. NLP modellarini aniqlash va kattalashtirish uchun yordam beramiz. Bu tilni qo'llash yoki qo'llash qo'llanmalar (масалан qabul qilish, guruhlar, yoqish qo'llar). Umumiy media'da bunday tilning oldini ko'rsatilgan foydalanishi ko'rinadi, bu boshqa turli tillardan o'zgarishdir, chunki u umuman aqllik va yaxshi qanday ishlatiladi. Biz ko'pincha ishonamiz, ko'pincha tadbirlik va tadbirlik tilning (PCL) asosiy soddalari NLP jamiyati uchun qiziqarli teknologiya qiziqarli qiziqarli qiziqni beradi. Taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlash mumkin, PCL standard NLP modellarini aniqlash juda qiyin, BERT kabi eng yaxshi natijalarni bajarish mumkin.", 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме нов анотиран набор от данни, който има за цел да подпомогне разработването на модели на НЛП за идентифициране и категоризиране на език, който е покровителстващ или снизходителен към уязвимите общности (например бежанци, бездомни хора, бедни семейства). Въпреки че разпространението на такъв език в общите медии отдавна е доказано, че има вредни ефекти, той се различава от другите видове вреден език, тъй като обикновено се използва несъзнателно и с добри намерения. Освен това вярваме, че често финият характер на покровителстващия и снизходителен език (ПКЛ) представлява интересно техническо предизвикателство за общността на НЛП. Анализът ни на предложените данни показва, че идентифицирането на ПКЛ е трудно за стандартните модели на НЛП, като езиковите модели като BERT постигат най-добри резултати.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel introduceren we een nieuwe geannoteerde dataset die gericht is op het ondersteunen van de ontwikkeling van NLP modellen om taal te identificeren en te categoriseren die betuttelend of neerbuigend is tegenover kwetsbare gemeenschappen (bijvoorbeeld vluchtelingen, daklozen, arme gezinnen). Hoewel de prevalentie van dergelijke taal in de algemene media al lang schadelijke effecten heeft, verschilt het van andere soorten schadelijke taal doordat het over het algemeen onbewust en met goede bedoelingen wordt gebruikt. Verder geloven we dat de vaak subtiele aard van betuttelende en neerbuigende taal (PCL) een interessante technische uitdaging vormt voor de NLP gemeenschap. Onze analyse van de voorgestelde dataset toont aan dat het identificeren van PCL moeilijk is voor standaard NLP modellen, waarbij taalmodellen zoals BERT de beste resultaten behalen.', 'da': 'I denne artikel introducerer vi et nyt kommenteret datasæt, der har til formål at støtte udviklingen af NLP modeller til at identificere og kategorisere sprog, der er nedladende eller nedladende over for sårbare samfund (f.eks. flygtninge, hjemløse, fattige familier). Selv om udbredelsen af et sådant sprog i de almindelige medier længe har vist sig at have skadelige virkninger, adskiller det sig fra andre typer skadelige sprog, idet det generelt anvendes ubevidst og med gode hensigter. Vi mener desuden, at den ofte subtile karakter af nedladende og nedladende sprog (PCL) udgør en interessant teknisk udfordring for NLP-samfundet. Vores analyse af det foreslåede datasæt viser, at det er svært at identificere PCL for standard NLP modeller, hvor sprogmodeller som BERT opnår de bedste resultater.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu notiranu skupinu podataka koja je cilj podržavanja razvoja modela NLP-a kako bi identifikovala i kategorizirala jezik koji patronizira ili suosjećala se prema ranjivim zajednicama (npr. izbjeglice, beskućnici, siromašne obitelji). Iako je dugo pokazala prevalencija takvog jezika u općim medijima štetne učinke, razlikuje se od drugih vrsta štetne jezika, jer se uobičajeno koristi bez svijesti i dobrim namjerama. Osim toga, vjerujemo da često suptilna priroda patronizacije i sposobnosti jezika (PCL) predstavlja zanimljiv tehnički izazov za zajednicu NLP-a. Naša analiza predloženog seta podataka pokazuje da je identifikacija PCL teško za standardne NLP modele, s jezičkim modelima poput BERT-a postizanjem najboljih rezultata.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen neuen annotierten Datensatz vor, der die Entwicklung von NLP-Modellen unterstützt, um Sprache zu identifizieren und zu kategorisieren, die schutzbedürftige Gemeinschaften (z.B. Flüchtlinge, Obdachlose, arme Familien) bevormundet oder herablassend ist. Während sich die Verbreitung solcher Sprache in den allgemeinen Medien seit langem als schädlich erwiesen hat, unterscheidet sie sich von anderen Arten schädlicher Sprache dadurch, dass sie im Allgemeinen unbewusst und mit guten Absichten verwendet wird. Darüber hinaus glauben wir, dass die oft subtile Natur der bevormundenden und herablassenden Sprache (PCL) eine interessante technische Herausforderung für die NLP-Community darstellt. Unsere Analyse des vorgeschlagenen Datensatzes zeigt, dass die Identifizierung von PCL für Standard-NLP-Modelle schwierig ist, wobei Sprachmodelle wie BERT die besten Ergebnisse erzielen.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 NLP모델의 개발을 지원하여 소외계층(예를 들어 난민, 노숙자, 빈곤가정)에 대한 은혜나 굴존의 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 데 목적을 둔 새로운 주석이 달린 데이터 집합을 도입했다.이런 언어는 일반 매체에서 오랫동안 유행해 왔지만 무의식적이고 선의적인 상황에서 사용되기 때문에 다른 종류의 유해 언어와는 다르다.그 밖에 우리는 협찬자와 굴존언어(PCL)의 미묘한 본질이 NLP 커뮤니티에 흥미로운 기술적 도전을 가져왔다고 생각한다.우리가 제안한 데이터 집합에 대한 분석에 따르면 표준 NLP 모델에 있어 PCL을 식별하는 것은 어렵다. BERT와 같은 언어 모델은 가장 좋은 결과를 얻을 수 있다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sebuah set data baru yang dicatat yang bertujuan untuk mendukung pembangunan model NLP untuk mengidentifikasi dan kategorisasi bahasa yang mempengaruhi atau mengurangi masyarakat yang rentan (contohnya pengungsi, orang-orang tunawisma, keluarga miskin). Sementara prevalensi bahasa tersebut di media umum sudah lama terbukti memiliki efek yang berbahaya, ia berbeda dari jenis bahasa berbahaya lain, karena umumnya digunakan tanpa sadar dan dengan niat baik. Selain itu, kami percaya bahwa alam yang sering halus dari bahasa patronizasi dan kondensasi (PCL) menunjukkan tantangan teknis yang menarik bagi komunitas NLP. Our analysis of the proposed dataset shows that identifying PCL is hard for standard NLP models, with language models such as BERT achieving the best results.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید مشخص شده را معرفی می کنیم که هدف دارد تا توسعه مدل NLP را پشتیبانی کند تا زبان شناسایی و تقسیم کنند که به جامعه های آسیب و آسیب دارند (مثلا پناهندگان، مردم بی خانه، خانواده های فقیر) یا همراه باشد. در حالی که گسترش این زبان در رسانه\u200cهای عمومی مدت طولانی نشان داده شده است که اثرات زیانی دارد، آن از نوع دیگر زبان زیانی تفاوت می\u200cکند، در حالی که معمولاً بی\u200cآگاهی و با هدف\u200cهای خوب استفاده می\u200cشود. ما باور می\u200cکنیم که طبیعت بسیار زیبایی از زبان حفاظت و هماهنگی (PCL) برای جامعه NLP یک چالش تکنیکی جالب را نشان می\u200cدهد. تحلیل داده\u200cهای پیشنهاد ما نشان می\u200cدهد که شناسایی PCL برای مدل\u200cهای NLP استاندارد سخت است، با مدل\u200cهای زبانی مانند BERT به بهترین نتیجه رسیدن.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha seti mpya ya taarifa zilizotajwa na lengo la kuunga mkono maendeleo ya modeli za NLP ili kutambua na kutenganisha lugha inayolinganisha au kutegemea kwa jamii zenye hatari (kwa mfano wakimbizi, watu wasio na makazi, familia masikini). Wakati upande wa lugha hiyo katika vyombo vya habari kwa muda mrefu umeonekana kuwa na madhara makubwa, inatofautiana na aina nyingine za lugha isiyo na madhara, kwa sababu kwa ujumla huo hutumiwa bila kujua na kwa nia nzuri. Zaidi ya hayo tunaamini kuwa hali ya kawaida ya uzalendo na lugha inayovutia (PCL) inaleta changamoto ya kiteknolojia kwa jamii ya NLP. Uchambuzi wetu wa seti ya data zilizopendekezwa unaonyesha kuwa kutambua PCL ni vigumu kwa mifano ya standard ya NLP, kwa mfano wa lugha kama vile BERT kupata matokeo bora.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n nuwe aanmerkte datastel wat die ontwikkeling van NLP-modele ondersteun is om taal te identifiseer en kategoriseer wat patroniseer of condescending teen vulnerable gemeenskappe (bv. vlugtelinge, homeless mense, arme families). Alhoewel die oorspronklikheid van sodanige taal in die algemene media lank gewys is om skandelike effekte te hê, is dit verskil van ander tipes skandelike taal, omdat dit algemeen onbekende en met goeie intensies gebruik word. Ons glo daarvan dat die dikwels subtil natuur van patroniseering en kondenserende taal (PCL) â\x80\x99n interessante tegniese uitdrukking voorsien vir die NLP gemeenskap. Ons analiseer van die voorgestelde datastel vertoon dat identifiseer PCL moeilik is vir standaard NLP modele, met taal modele soos BERT die beste resultate tot bereik.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një grup të ri të dhënash të shënuara që ka për qëllim mbështetjen e zhvillimit të modeleve NLP për të identifikuar dhe kategorizuar gjuhën që është patronizuese apo poshtëruese ndaj komuniteteve të dobëta (për shembull refugjatëve, të pastrehëve, familjeve të varfëra). Ndërsa përhapja e një gjuhe të tillë në mediat e përgjithshme është treguar për një kohë të gjatë se ka efekte dëmtuese, ajo ndryshon nga lloje të tjera gjuhësh dëmtuese, në atë që ajo përdoret përgjithësisht pa ndërgjegjësi dhe me qëllime të mira. Përveç kësaj besojmë se natyra shpesh e butë e gjuhës patronizuese dhe kondensative (PCL) paraqet një sfidë teknike interesante për komunitetin NLP. Analiza jonë e grupit të të dhënave të propozuara tregon se identifikimi i PCL është i vështirë për modelet standard NLP, me modele gjuhësh të tilla si BERT që arrijnë rezultatet më të mira.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ወደደካማዎች ወገኖች (ለምሳሌ ስደተኞች፣ የቤቶች ሰዎች፣ ድሆች ወገኖች፣ የሆኑትን ቋንቋ ለማግኘት እና መፍታትን ለመደገፍ የሚችሉትን አዲስ አዲስ አዲስ የዳታ ሰርተት ማግኘት እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በጠቅላላ ሚዲያ ላይ የዚህ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት ብዙ ዘመን የሚያስጨንቅ ጥቃት እንዲኖር ሲታይ፣ ከሌሎች ዓይነቶች ከክፋት ቋንቋ የተለየ ነው፡፡ We furthermore believe that the often subtle nature of patronizing and condescending language (PCL) presents an interesting technical challenge for the NLP community.  በተዘጋጀው የዳታ ሳጥን መተርጓሜያችን የPCL ማረጋገጥ ለstandard NLP ሞዴላዎችን ለማግኘት የጨካኝ ነው፤ እንደዚሁም የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች BERT የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን ለማግኘት ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, NLP nusgalarynyň döwletlerini tanyşdyrmak we klasifikasynda täze hasaplanýan dataýa düzümlerini tassyklandyrýarys (meselâ, g ültenler, öýsüz adamlar, erbet maşgalalar) döwletlere golaýlaýarlar. Umumy medýäde şeýle diller bolan ýagdaýda agyrly täsirler bolup görünýärdi, onuň başga hili agyrly dillerden üýtgeşir bolýar çünki olar umumy boýunça we gowy maksadla ulanýarlar. Mundan soňra biz NLP jemgyýetinde köplenç patronýa we yzarlayan dil (PCL) üçin gyzykly teknik kynçylyk görkezýäris diýip ynanýarys. NLP modelleri üçin PCL tanyş etmek kyn diýip teklip eden verilen çözümleriniň analizimizi görkezýär. BERT ýaly dil nusgalarynyň iň gowy netijelerini ýetirmek üçin kyn.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր գրված տվյալների համակարգ, որի նպատակով է աջակցել ՆԼՊ մոդելների զարգացումը, որպեսզի բացահայտենք և դասակարգենք լեզուներ, որոնք խոցելի համայնքների (օրինակ փախստականներ, անտուն մարդիկ, աղքատ ընտանիքներ) նկատ Մինչդեռ այս լեզուների տարածությունը ընդհանուր լրատվամիջոցներում երկար ժամանակ վնասավոր ազդեցություններ է ցույց տվել, այն տարբերվում է վնասավոր լեզուների այլ տեսակներից, քանի որ այն սովորաբար օգտագործվում է անգիտակցաբար և լավ մտադրություններով: Մենք նաև հավատում ենք, որ հաճախ նրբագեղ լեզվի (ՀԿԼ) բնույթը հանդիսանում է հետաքրքիր տեխնիկական մարտահրավեր ՆԼՊ համայնքի համար: Մեր նախագծված տվյալների համակարգի վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ ՀԿԿ-ի հայտնաբերումը բարդ է ստանդարտ ՆԼՊ մոդելների համար, երբ լեզվի մոդելները, ինչպիսիք են ԲԵՌթը, հասնում են լավագույն արդյու', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, NLP modellərinin inkişaf etməsini və dillərini təsdiqləməsini və kategoriyalarını təsdiqləməsini nəzarətləndirmək və ya zəif ümmətlərə kömək edən yeni məlumatlı verilən qurğunu təşkil edirik. Bu dilin genişliyinə qədər çox uzun müddət müxtəlif etkisi olmadığını göstərilmiş halda, bu da başqa yaramaz dillərdən fərqli idi, çünki bu dil genellikle bilinmədən və yaxşı niyyətlərlə istifadə edilir. Buna da inanırıq ki, NLP cəmiyyəti üçün sık-sık təhlükəsizlik və təhlükəsizlik dillərin (PCL) təhlükəsizliklərinin məhsullarını göstərir. Bizim təbliğ edilmiş verilən quruluğumuz analizi göstərir ki, PCL tanıması standart NLP modelləri üçün çətin, BERT kimi dil modelləri ən yaxşı sonuçlarını yetirmək üçün çətin.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি নতুন বিস্তারিত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের পরিচয় প্রদান করি, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে এনএলপি মডেলের উন্নয়নের জন্য সমর্থন করার জন্য যা ভাষা চিহ্নিত এবং বিভক্ত করার জন সাধারণ প্রচার মাধ্যমের এই ভাষার প্রাকৃতিত্ব অনেক দীর্ঘদিন ধরে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ক্ষতিকর প্রভাব রয়েছে, কিন্তু এটা অন্য ধরনের ক্ষতিকর ভাষা থেকে আলা এছাড়াও আমরা বিশ্বাস করি যে প্রায়শই পিসিএলপি সম্প্রদায়ের জন্য একটি মজার প্রযুক্তিগত চ্যালেঞ্জ প্রদান করে। প্রস্তাবিত ডাটাসেটের বিশ্লেষণ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পিসিএল স্ট্যান্ডার্ড এনএলপি মডেলের জন্য পিসিএল চিহ্নিত করা কঠিন, যেমন বিআরটি', 'ca': "En aquest article introduïm un nou conjunt de dades anotats que visen a sostenir el desenvolupament de models NLP per identificar i categoritzar un llenguatge que està patronizant o condescendant cap a comunitats vulnerables (per exemple refugiats, sense llars, famílies pobres). Mentre la prevalència d'aquesta llengua en els mitjans generals fa molt de temps que s'ha demostrat que té efectes nocius, diferèn d'altres tipus de llengua nociva, en que generalment es utilitza inconscientment i amb bones intencions. També creiem que la naturalesa sovint subtil del llenguatge patronizador i condescendant (PCL) representa un interessant repte tècnic per a la comunitat NLP. L'anàlisi del conjunt de dades proposat mostra que la identificació del PCL és difícil per als models normalitzats del NLP, amb models lingüístics com BERT que aconsegueixen els millors resultats.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu notiranu grupu podataka koja je cilj podržavanja razvoja modela NLP-a kako bi identifikovala i kategorizirala jezik koji patronizira ili suosjećala se prema ranjivim zajednicama (npr. izbjeglice, beskućnici, siromašne porodice). Iako je dugo pokazala prevalencija takvog jezika u medijima štetne učinke, razlikuje se od drugih vrsta štetne jezika, jer se uopšte koristi bez svijesti i dobrim namjerama. Nadalje vjerujemo da često suptilna priroda patronizacije i sposobnosti jezika (PCL) predstavlja zanimljiv tehnički izazov za zajednicu NLP. Naša analiza predloženog seta podataka pokazuje da je identifikacija PCL teško za standardne NLP modele, sa jezičkim modelima kao što je BERT postizanje najboljih rezultata.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nový anotovaný datový soubor, který je zaměřen na podporu vývoje NLP modelů pro identifikaci a kategorizaci jazyka, který je patronizující nebo povýšený vůči zranitelným komunitám (např. uprchlíkům, bezdomovcům, chudým rodinám). Zatímco prevalence takového jazyka v obecných médiích bylo dlouho prokázáno, že má škodlivé účinky, liší se od jiných typů škodlivého jazyka tím, že je obecně používán nevědomě a s dobrými úmysly. Dále věříme, že často jemná povaha patronizujícího a povýšeného jazyka (PCL) představuje zajímavou technickou výzvu pro NLP komunitu. Naše analýza navrženého datového souboru ukazuje, že identifikace PCL je pro standardní NLP modely těžké, přičemž jazykové modely jako BERT dosahují nejlepších výsledků.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame uut märgitud andmekogumit, mille eesmärk on toetada NLP mudelite väljatöötamist, et tuvastada ja kategoriseerida keelt, mis on kaitsetute kogukondade (nt pagulased, kodutud inimesed, vaesed pered) suhtes üleolevav või alandav. Kuigi sellise keele levimusel üldises meedias on juba ammu tõestatud kahjulikku mõju, erineb see teistest kahjulikest keeltest, kuna seda kasutatakse üldiselt teadlikult ja heade kavatsustega. Lisaks usume, et klienteeriva ja alandava keele (PCL) sageli peen olemus kujutab endast huvitavat tehnilist väljakutset NLP kogukonnale. Meie pakutud andmekogumi analüüs näitab, et PCL tuvastamine on standardsete NLP mudelite puhul raske, kusjuures keelemudelid nagu BERT saavutavad parimad tulemused.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uuden merkinnällä varustetun aineiston, jonka tarkoituksena on tukea NLP-mallien kehittämistä tunnistamaan ja luokittelemaan kieltä, joka on holhoava tai alentuva heikossa asemassa olevia yhteisöjä kohtaan (esim. pakolaisia, kodittomia, köyhiä perheitä). Vaikka tällaisen kielen levinneisyydellä tiedotusvälineissä on jo pitkään osoitettu olevan haitallisia vaikutuksia, se eroaa muista haitallisista kielimuodoista siinä mielessä, että sitä käytetään yleisesti tiedostamatta ja hyvillä aikomuksilla. Uskomme lisäksi, että holhoava ja alentuva kieli (PCL) on mielenkiintoinen tekninen haaste NLP-yhteisölle. Analyysimme ehdotetusta aineistosta osoittaa, että PCL:n tunnistaminen on vaikeaa standardimalleille NLP-malleille, ja BERT:n kaltaiset kielimallit saavuttavat parhaat tulokset.', 'jv': 'Nang mapun iki, awak dhéwé mulai akeh dataset anyar tentang nggawe nguasai model NLP nggawe tarjamahan lan ingkang kategori sing apik dhéwé iso nguasai perusahaan winih sing g a we nguasai nglanggar sampeyan akeh dhéwé (bisa diangluhaan, lan uwong sing gawe soalé, lan uwong sing isin soalé). Sing bener kanggo langga sing luwih dumadhi ning media wong liyane bisa diunting akeh efek, iki dadi apik sing kalah luwih apik, lan iki sak ngerasah akeh luwih apik sing apik tur angel. Awak dhéwé uga luwih sabané kabèh sabané kapan-sabané paten lan nganggep nglanga (PLL) sing ngewehku nggawe komunitas NLP iki. Ananali awak dhéwé éntuk dataset sing nggawe diutag-ingkang dianggap PNL kuwi susahe kanggo model NLP padha iki, karo model sing luwih dumadhi toa BERT iso dianggap akeh dhéwé.', 'ha': "In this paper, we introduce a new annotated dataset which is aimed at supporting the development of NLP models to identify and categorize language that is patronizing or condescending towards vulnerable communities (e.g. refugees, homeless people, poor families).  Alhãli kuwa, a lokacin da aka nuna furofarin wannan lugha a cikin jumla'a, ya sãɓã wa wasu irin harshe na zartar da shi, sabõda haka, ana yi amfani da shi gaba ɗaya da ba'a sani ba, kuma yana da hankali mai kyau. Ina ƙaranci, tuna yi ĩmãni cẽwa masu ƙaranci ne da bakwai masu bastarwa da lugha na danganta (PCL) na halatar da kimada mai zura wa jamii NLP. AnalyyinMu na fassarar da aka bukatar da shi na nuna cewa gane PCL mai nau'i ne ga misãlai na NLP na daidaita, da misãlai na harshe kamar BERT da ke sami fassaran mafiya kyau.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov z oznakami, katerega namen je podpirati razvoj modelov NLP za prepoznavanje in kategorizacijo jezika, ki je pokroviteljski ali ponižljiv do ranljivih skupnosti (npr. beguncev, brezdomcev, revnih družin). Čeprav je razširjenost takšnega jezika v splošnih medijih že dolgo dokazano, da ima škodljive učinke, se razlikuje od drugih vrst škodljivega jezika, saj se običajno uporablja nezavedno in z dobrimi nameni. Poleg tega verjamemo, da pogosto subtilna narava pokroviteljskega in vzvišenega jezika (PCL) predstavlja zanimiv tehnični izziv za skupnost NLP. Naša analiza predlaganega nabora podatkov kaže, da je identifikacija PCL težka za standardne modele NLP, pri čemer jezikovni modeli, kot je BERT, dosegajo najboljše rezultate.', 'he': 'In this paper, we introduce a new annotated dataset which is aimed at supporting the development of NLP models to identify and categorize language that is patronizing or condescending towards vulnerable communities (e.g. refugees, homeless people, poor families).  למרות שהשפה הזאת נמצאת בתקשורת הכללית כבר הרבה זמן הוכחה שיש לה תופעות מזיקות, היא שונה מסוגים אחרים של שפה מזיקה, שבכלל היא משתמשת בלתי מודעת ובכוונות טובות. בנוסף, אנו מאמינים שהטבע העדין לעתים קרובות של שפה מפטרניזציה ומקפיצה (PCL) מציג אתגר טכני מעניין לקהילת NLP. Our analysis of the proposed dataset shows that identifying PCL is hard for standard NLP models, with language models such as BERT achieving the best results.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསལ་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ནས་NLP མིག་ཆས་གཞི་རྩལ་དང་དབྱེ་སྟངས སྐད་རིགས་འདི་དག་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་འཇུག འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཕལ་ཆེན་བསམ་ན་རྒྱུན་ཡང་གནོད་རིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རང་བཞིན་ཡུལ། ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་PCL་ངོས་འཛིན་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་NLP མིག་དཔེར་ན། སྐད'}
{'en': 'WikiUMLS : Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'ar': 'WikiUMLS: محاذاة UMLS مع ويكيبيديا عبر الترتيب العصبي متعدد اللغات', 'es': 'WikiUMLS: Alineación de UMLS con Wikipedia a través de la clasificación neuronal multilingüe', 'pt': 'WikiUMLS: Alinhando UMLS à Wikipedia por meio de classificação neural multilíngue', 'fr': 'WikiUMLS\xa0: Aligner UML sur Wikipédia via un classement neuronal multilingue', 'ja': 'WikiUMLS ：クロスリンガル神経ランキングを介してUMLSをWikipediaに合わせる', 'zh': 'WikiUMLS:跨语神经名将UMLS与维基百科齐', 'ru': 'WikiUMLS: Согласование UMLS с Википедией через кросс-лингвистический нейронный рейтинг', 'hi': 'WikiUMLS: क्रॉस-भाषी तंत्रिका रैंकिंग के माध्यम से विकिपीडिया पर UMLS संरेखित करना', 'ga': 'WikiUMLS: UMLS a ailíniú le Vicipéid trí Rangú Neural Trastheangach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'WikiUMLS: Az UMLS összehangolása a Wikipédiához a többnyelvű idegi rangsorolással', 'el': 'Η ευθυγράμμιση του με τη Βικιπαίδεια μέσω της Διακυβλωσιακής Νευρικής Κατάταξης', 'kk': 'WikiUMLS: Кеңіл тілді нейрондық түрлендіру арқылы UMLS- ды Википедияда түрлендіру', 'it': 'WikiUMLS: Allineare UMLS a Wikipedia tramite Ranking Neurale Cross-lingual', 'lt': 'WikiUMLS: UMLS suderinimas su Wikipedia per tarpkalbinį nervų klasifikavimą', 'mk': 'WikiUMLS: Прилагодување на UMLS на Википедија преку крстојазичен неурален ранг', 'ml': 'വികിയുഎംഎല്\u200dസ്: ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്കില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d റാങ്ങിംഗ് മുഖേന വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയിലേക്ക് ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നു', 'ms': 'WikiUMLS: Menyesuai UMLS ke Wikipedia melalui Rangkaian Neural Sembahasa', 'mt': 'WikiUMLS: L-allinjament tal-UMLS mal-Wikipedia permezz tal-Klassifikazzjoni Newrali Translingwali', 'mn': 'WikiUMLS: УИМЛС-г Википедиа руу олон хэлний сэтгэл мэдрэлийн хэмжээгээр тэмдэглэх', 'no': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-language Neural Ranking', 'pl': 'WikiUMLS: Dopasowanie UMLS do Wikipedii poprzez Cross-lingual Neuroral Ranking', 'ro': 'WikiUMLS: Alinierea UMLS la Wikipedia prin Clasificarea Neurală Interlingvă', 'sr': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'so': 'WikiUMLS: Aqoonsiga UMLS ee Wikipedia', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'WikiUMLS: Justera UMLS till Wikipedia via korspråkig neural ranking', 'ta': 'விகியுஎம்எல்ஸ்: க்ராஸ்- மொழி நெயுரல் ராங்கிங் மூலம் UMLS விக்கிபிடியியாவுக்கு ஒப்புக்கொள்கிறது', 'ur': 'WikiUMLS: کلاس زبان نیورال رنگ کے ذریعے UMLS کو ویکیپیڈیا سے Aligning', 'uz': 'WikiUMLS: Name', 'vi': 'Chứng minh UMLS cho Wikipedia thông qua lớp thần kinh chéo ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Подравняване на УМЛС с Уикипедия чрез междуезично неврално класиране', 'nl': 'WikiUMLS: Uitlijnen van UMLS aan Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'da': 'WikiUMLS: Tilpasning af UMLS til Wikipedia via tværsproget neural rangering', 'hr': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'de': 'WikiUMLS: Anpassung von UMLS an Wikipedia durch Cross-lingual Neurol Ranking', 'id': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'fa': 'ویکیUMLS: مشخص UMLS به ویکیپیدیا از طریق نقطه عصبی متوسط زبان', 'sw': 'WikiUMLS: Kutambua UMLS kwenda Wikipedia kupitia Mpango wa Neural wa lugha ya Kusini', 'ko': 'WikiUMLS: 언어 간 신경 정렬을 통해 UMLS를 위키백과에 정렬', 'tr': 'WikiUMLS: Täze dilli Neural Ranking vasitəsiyla UMLS Wikipedia bilen bellenilýär', 'af': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross- language Neural Ranking', 'sq': 'WikiUMLS: Lidhja e UMLS me Wikipedian nëpërmjet renditjes neuronale ndërgjuhësore', 'am': 'WikiUMLS: UMLS ወደ Wikipedia በመስኮት-ቋንቋ ነural Ranking', 'az': 'WikiUMLS: √ústdil N√∂ral Ranking vasit…ôsil…ô UMLS Wikipediaya t…ôŇükil edilir', 'hy': 'Wikipedia', 'bs': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'bn': 'উইকিউএমএলএস: ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী নিউরাল র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং এর মাধ্যমে উইকিপিডিয়ায় উইকিপিডিয়াকে চিহ্নিত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'WikiUMLS: Aliniar UMLS a Wikipedia mitjançant la classificació neuronal translingüística', 'cs': 'WikiUMLS: Srovnání UMLS s Wikipedií prostřednictvím Cross-lingual Neural Ranking', 'et': 'WikiUMLS: UMLS-i vastavusse viimine Vikipeediaga keeleülese neuraalse järjestuse kaudu', 'fi': 'WikiUMLS: UMLS:n mukauttaminen Wikipediaan monikielisen hermoluokituksen avulla', 'jv': 'wakiki-kelangan', 'he': 'WikiUMLS: להסביר UMLS לוויקיפדיה באמצעות מעמד נוירולי צלב שפתיים', 'sk': 'WikiUMLS: Uskladitev UMLS z Wikipedijo prek medjezičnega živčnega razvrščanja', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'bo': 'WikiUMLS: Aligning UMLS to Wikipedia via Cross-lingual Neural Ranking'}
{'en': 'We present our work on aligning the Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) to Wikipedia, to facilitate manual alignment of the two resources. We propose a cross-lingual neural reranking model to match a UMLS concept with a Wikipedia page, which achieves a recall@1of 72 %, a substantial improvement of 20 % over word- and char-level BM25, enabling manual alignment with minimal effort. We release our resources, including ranked Wikipedia pages for 700k UMLSconcepts, and WikiUMLS, a dataset for training and evaluation of alignment models between UMLS and Wikipedia collected from Wikidata. This will provide easier access to Wikipedia for health professionals, patients, and NLP systems, including in multilingual settings.', 'ar': 'نقدم عملنا على مواءمة نظام اللغة الطبية الموحد (UMLS) مع ويكيبيديا ، لتسهيل المحاذاة اليدوية للمصدرين. نقترح نموذج إعادة تصنيف عصبي متعدد اللغات لمطابقة مفهوم UMLS مع صفحة ويكيبيديا ، والتي تحقق استرجاعًا بنسبة 1 من 72٪ ، وتحسنًا كبيرًا بنسبة 20٪ على مستوى الكلمات والحرف BM25 ، مما يتيح المحاذاة اليدوية بأقل جهد. أصدرنا مواردنا ، بما في ذلك صفحات Wikipedia المصنفة لـ 700k UMLSconcepts ، و WikiUMLS ، وهي مجموعة بيانات للتدريب وتقييم نماذج المحاذاة بين UMLS و Wikipedia التي تم جمعها من Wikidata. سيوفر هذا وصولاً أسهل إلى ويكيبيديا للمهنيين الصحيين والمرضى وأنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، بما في ذلك الإعدادات متعددة اللغات.', 'es': 'Presentamos nuestro trabajo para alinear el Sistema Único de Lenguaje Médico (UMLS) con Wikipedia, para facilitar la alineación manual de los dos recursos. Proponemos un modelo de reclasificación neuronal multilingüe para hacer coincidir un concepto de UMLS con una página de Wikipedia, que logra una recuperación @1of 72%, una mejora sustancial del 20% con respecto al BM25 a nivel de palabras y caracteres, lo que permite la alineación manual con el mínimo esfuerzo. Publicamos nuestros recursos, que incluyen páginas de Wikipedia clasificadas para 700.000 UMLSConcepts, y WikiUMLS, un conjunto de datos para el entrenamiento y la evaluación de modelos de alineación entre UMLS y Wikipedia recopilados de Wikidata. Esto facilitará el acceso a Wikipedia para los profesionales de la salud, los pacientes y los sistemas de PNL, incluso en entornos multilingües.', 'fr': "Nous présentons notre travail sur l'alignement du système de langage médical unifié (UMLS) sur Wikipédia, afin de faciliter l'alignement manuel des deux ressources. Nous proposons un modèle de reclassement neuronal multilingue pour faire correspondre un concept UMLS avec une page Wikipédia, qui atteint un rappel @1of de 72\xa0%, une amélioration substantielle de 20\xa0% par rapport au BM25 au niveau des mots et des caractères, permettant un alignement manuel avec un minimum d'effort. Nous publions nos ressources, y compris des pages Wikipédia classées pour 700 000 UMLSconcepts, et WikiUMLS, un ensemble de données pour la formation et l'évaluation des modèles d'alignement entre UMLS et Wikipédia collectés sur Wikidata. Cela facilitera l'accès à Wikipédia pour les professionnels de santé, les patients et les systèmes de PNL, y compris dans des environnements multilingues.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos nosso trabalho de alinhamento do Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) à Wikipedia, para facilitar o alinhamento manual dos dois recursos. Propomos um modelo de reclassificação neural multilíngue para combinar um conceito UMLS com uma página da Wikipedia, que atinge um recall@1 de 72%, uma melhoria substancial de 20% em relação ao BM25 em nível de palavra e caractere, permitindo alinhamento manual com esforço mínimo. Liberamos nossos recursos, incluindo páginas classificadas da Wikipedia para 700k UMLSconcepts e WikiUMLS, um conjunto de dados para treinamento e avaliação de modelos de alinhamento entre UMLS e Wikipedia coletados do Wikidata. Isso facilitará o acesso à Wikipedia para profissionais de saúde, pacientes e sistemas de PNL, inclusive em ambientes multilíngues.', 'ja': '当社は、統一医療言語システム（ UMLS ）をウィキペディアに整列させ、2つのリソースを手動で整列させる作業を発表しています。私たちは、UMLSの概念とWikipediaページを一致させるためのクロスリンガルニューラルリランキングモデルを提案しています。これは、ワードレベルおよびキャラクターレベルのBM 25よりも20%大幅に改善され、最小限の労力で手動アライメントを可能にします。@ 1 of 72%のリコールを達成します。70万のUMLSconceptsのランク付けされたWikipediaページ、およびWikidataから収集されたUMLSとWikipedia間のアライメントモデルのトレーニングと評価のためのデータセットであるWikiUMLSを含むリソースをリリースします。これにより、医療従事者、患者、および多言語環境を含むNLPシステムにWikipediaへのアクセスが容易になります。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем нашу работу по согласованию Единой системы медицинских языков (UMLS) с Википедией, чтобы облегчить ручное согласование двух ресурсов. Мы предлагаем модель кросс-лингвального нейронного реранжирования для соответствия концепции UMLS со страницей Википедии, которая обеспечивает вызов@1 из 72%, значительное улучшение на 20% по сравнению с BM25 на уровне слов и символов, позволяя ручное выравнивание с минимальными усилиями. Мы выпускаем наши ресурсы, в том числе ранжированные страницы Википедии для 700 тысяч UMLSconcepts, и WikiUMLS, набор данных для обучения и оценки моделей выравнивания между UMLS и Википедией, собранных из Викидата. Это облегчит доступ к Википедии для медицинских работников, пациентов и систем NLP, в том числе в многоязычных условиях.', 'zh': '言同医语(UMLS)与维基百科同功,以趋两资之手动。 立一跨语神经更列名模形,以将UMLS概配维基百科页面,当成recall@1of 72%,比单词、字符之BM25大幅提高20%,能以至小努力实现手动齐。 发吾资,70万个UMLS其名维基百科页面,及其WikiUMLS,一以训估UMLS维基百科之间,集于维基数。 此将为卫生业之人,患与NLP系统更易访维基百科,在多言境中。', 'hi': 'हम दो संसाधनों के मैनुअल संरेखण की सुविधा के लिए विकिपीडिया पर एकीकृत चिकित्सा भाषा प्रणाली (UMLS) को संरेखित करने पर अपना काम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम एक विकिपीडिया पृष्ठ के साथ एक UMLS अवधारणा से मेल खाने के लिए एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल तंत्रिका reranking मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो 72% recall@1of प्राप्त करता है, शब्द- और चार-स्तर BM25 पर 20% का पर्याप्त सुधार, न्यूनतम प्रयास के साथ मैनुअल संरेखण को सक्षम करता है। हम अपने संसाधनों को जारी करते हैं, जिसमें 700k UMLSconcepts के लिए रैंक किए गए विकिपीडिया पृष्ठ, और WikiUMLS, Wikidata से एकत्र किए गए UMLS और विकिपीडिया के बीच संरेखण मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन के लिए एक डेटासेट शामिल है। यह स्वास्थ्य पेशेवरों, रोगियों और NLP प्रणालियों के लिए विकिपीडिया तक आसान पहुंच प्रदान करेगा, जिसमें बहुभाषी सेटिंग्स भी शामिल हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid ár gcuid oibre i láthair ar ailíniú an Chórais Teanga Aontaithe Leighis (UMLS) le Vicipéid, chun ailíniú láimhe an dá acmhainn a éascú. Molaimid múnla athrangaithe tras-teangach néarúil chun coincheap UMLS a mheaitseáil le leathanach Vicipéid, a ghnóthaíonn aisghlaoch @ 1 de 72%, feabhas suntasach 20% thar leibhéal focal agus char-leibhéal BM25, a chumasaíonn ailíniú láimhe gan mórán iarrachta. Scaoilimid ár n-acmhainní, lena n-áirítear leathanaigh Vicipéid rangaithe do 700k UMLSconcepts, agus WikiUMLS, tacar sonraí le haghaidh oiliúna agus meastóireachta ar mhúnlaí ailínithe idir UMLS agus Vicipéid a bailíodh ó Wikidata. Soláthróidh sé seo rochtain níos éasca ar Vicipéid do ghairmithe sláinte, d’othair, agus do chórais NLP, lena n-áirítear i suíomhanna ilteangacha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო ვიკიპედიაში ერთადერთებული მედიცინური ენის სისტემა (UMLS) დაწყებაზე, რომ ორი რესურსის ხელსახური დაწყება. ჩვენ გვეძლევა საკუთარ ენგუალური ნეიროლური რერენქციის მოდელს, რომ UMLS კონცექტის შესაბამისათვის ვიკიპედია გვერდით, რომელიც მიიღება recall@1of 72%, 20% სიტყვების და სიტყვების დონე BM25-ზე მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება, რომელიც მანქანელი დამატება მინიმულ მძიმებით შეუძლებელია. ჩვენ ჩვენი რესურსების გახსნა, როგორც სუკიპედიაში სუკიპედიაში 700k UMLS კონცექტებისთვის, და WikiUMLS, სუკიმულისთვის მონაცემების შესაბამისათვის და განსაზღვრებისთვის UMLS და Wikipedia ეს უფრო მარტივი დახმარება ვიკიპედიაში ჯანმრთელობის პროფეციალებისთვის, პაციენტებისთვის და NLP სისტემებისთვის, რომლებიც მრავალენგური დანაწ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε την εργασία μας για την ευθυγράμμιση του Ενιαίου Συστήματος Ιατρικής Γλώσσας (UMLS) με τη Βικιπαίδεια, για να διευκολύνουμε τη χειρωνακτική ευθυγράμμιση των δύο πόρων. Προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο διασταυρούμενης νευρωνικής επανακατάταξης για να ταιριάξει μια έννοια UMLS με μια σελίδα της Βικιπαίδειας, η οποία επιτυγχάνει μια recall@1of 72%, σημαντική βελτίωση 20% σε σχέση με το επίπεδο λέξεων και χαρακτήρων Β25, επιτρέποντας χειροκίνητη ευθυγράμμιση με ελάχιστη προσπάθεια. Απελευθερώνουμε τους πόρους μας, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ταξινομημένων σελίδων της Βικιπαίδειας για 700και ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την εκπαίδευση και την αξιολόγηση των μοντέλων ευθυγράμμισης μεταξύ της και της Βικιπαίδειας που συλλέγονται από τα Βικιπαίδεια. Αυτό θα παρέχει ευκολότερη πρόσβαση στη Βικιπαίδεια για επαγγελματίες υγείας, ασθενείς και συστήματα, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των πολυγλωσσικών ρυθμίσεων.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az Egységes Orvosi Nyelvi Rendszer (UMLS) Wikipédiához való igazítására irányuló munkánkat, hogy megkönnyítsük a két erőforrás manuális összehangolását. Javasolunk egy többnyelvű neurális átrendezési modellt, amely egy UMLS koncepciót illeszt egy Wikipedia oldallal, amely eléri a recall@1of 72%, jelentős, 20%-os javulás a szó- és karakterszintű BM25-hez képest, lehetővé téve a manuális igazítást minimális erőfeszítéssel. Közzétesszük erőforrásainkat, beleértve a rangsorolt Wikipédia oldalakat 700k UMLSkoncepcióhoz, valamint a WikiUMLS adatkészletet, amely az UMLS és Wikipédia közötti összehangolási modellek képzésére és értékelésére szolgál, amelyeket a Wikiadatból gyűjtöttünk össze. Ez könnyebb hozzáférést biztosít az egészségügyi szakemberek, betegek és NLP-rendszerek számára, többnyelvű beállításokban is.', 'it': "Presentiamo il nostro lavoro sull'allineamento dell'Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) a Wikipedia, per facilitare l'allineamento manuale delle due risorse. Proponiamo un modello di ricanking neurale cross-lingual per abbinare un concetto UMLS con una pagina Wikipedia, che raggiunge un recall@1of 72%, un miglioramento sostanziale del 20% rispetto alla BM25 a livello di parole e caratteri, consentendo l'allineamento manuale con il minimo sforzo. Rilasciamo le nostre risorse, incluse le pagine classificate di Wikipedia per 700k UMLSconcepts, e WikiUMLS, un set di dati per la formazione e la valutazione dei modelli di allineamento tra UMLS e Wikipedia raccolti da Wikidata. Ciò fornirà un accesso più facile a Wikipedia per gli operatori sanitari, i pazienti e i sistemi PNL, anche in impostazioni multilingue.", 'kk': 'Біз біріктірілген медицински тіл жүйесін (UMLS) Википедияға түрлендіру үшін жұмыстарымызды, екі ресурстарды қолмен түрлендіру үшін келтіреміз. Біз тілдерді бірнеше невралдық қайта түрлендіру үлгісін келтіреміз. Уикипедия парағына сәйкес келетін UMLS концепциясына сәйкес келетін. recall@1of 72%, сөз және таңбалар деңгейінде BM25 деңгейінде 20% деңгейіндегі көп жақсарту үшін қолмен түзету мүмкіндігін мүмкіндік береді. Біз өзіміздің ресурстарымызды, 700k UMLS концепциялары үшін, және WikiUMLS, UMLS мен Wikipedia арасындағы теңдеу үлгілерін бақылау және оқу үлгілерінің деректер жинағы болып шығармыз. Бұл бірнеше тілдер параметрлерінде, пациенттер және NLP жүйелері үшін Википедияға оңай қатынау мүмкіндігін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome savo darbą suderinant vieningą medicininės kalbos sistemą (UMLS) su Vikipedija, siekiant palengvinti rankinį šių dviejų išteklių suderinimą. Mes siūlome tarpkalbinį neuralinio perskirstymo model į, kad UMLS koncepcija būtų suderinta su Wikipedia puslapiu, kuriame recall@1of 72%, gerokai pagerėjo 20% palyginti su žodžių ir simbolių BM25 lygiu, sudarant galimybę rankiniu būdu suderinti su minimalia pastanga. Mes išleidžiame savo išteklius, įskaitant rankingus Wikipedia puslapius 700k UMLSkoncepcijoms, ir WikiUMLS, duomenų rinkinį mokymui ir suderinimo modelių vertinimui tarp UMLS ir Wikipedia surinkti iš Wikidata. Tai padės sveikatos priežiūros specialistams, pacientams ir NLP sistemoms lengviau susipažinti su Vikipedija, taip pat ir daugiakalbėse aplinkybėse.', 'mk': 'Ние ја претставуваме нашата работа за усогласување на унифицираниот медицински јазик систем (УМЛС) со Википедија, за да го олесниме рачното усогласување на двата ресурси. Предложуваме крстојазичен модел за повторно врзување на нервите за да се совпаѓа концептот УМЛС со страница на Википедија, која постигнува recall@1of 72 отсто, значително подобрување од 20 отсто во однос на зборовите и симболите на БМ25, овозможувајќи рачно прилагодување со минимален напор. Ние ги ослободуваме нашите ресурси, вклучувајќи ги и рангираните страници на Википедија за 700 илјади УМЛСконцепти, и ВикиУМЛС, датотеки за обука и евалуација на моделите на уредување помеѓу УМЛС и Википедија собрани од Викидата. Ова ќе обезбеди полесен пристап до Википедија за здравствените професионалци, пациентите и системите на НЛП, вклучително и во мултијазични услови.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kerja kami untuk menyesuaikan Sistem Bahasa Perubatan Unified (UMLS) ke Wikipedia, untuk memudahkan penyesuaian manual dua sumber. Kami cadangkan model saraf salib bahasa untuk sepadan dengan konsep UMLS dengan halaman Wikipedia, yang mencapai recall@1of 72%, peningkatan yang besar 20% atas aras perkataan dan aksara BM25, membolehkan penyesuaian manual dengan usaha minimal. Kami membebaskan sumber kami, termasuk halaman Wikipedia berturut-turut untuk 700k konsep UMLS, dan WikiUMLS, set data untuk latihan dan penilaian model penyesuaian antara UMLS dan Wikipedia dikumpulkan dari Wikidata. This will provide easier access to Wikipedia for health professionals, patients, and NLP systems, including in multilingual settings.', 'ml': 'യൂണിഡെക്കല്\u200d ഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റം (UMLS) വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയിലേക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചുനിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ജോലി നിര നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ലൈന്\u200dഗ്വില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d റിയാങ്കിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. വിക്കിപിഡിയ ഒരു താള recall@1of 72%, വാക്കിനു മുകളില്\u200d 20% മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തി- ചാര്\u200d- നില ബിഎം25- നുള്ള ഒരു വലിയ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കൈയ്യി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വിട്ടുകളയുന്നു, 700k UMLസ്കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ പേജുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും വികിഡാ This will provide easier access to Wikipedia for health professionals, patients, and NLP systems, including in multilingual settings.', 'mn': 'Бид нэгдсэн эмнэлгийн хэл системийг (UMLS) Wikipedia руу шилжүүлэхэд ажиллаж, хоёр нөөц барилга зэрэгцүүлэх боломжтой. Бид хэлний дахин хэлний мэдрэлийн дахин эргүүлэх загварын загварыг Wikipedia хуудас холбогдохын тулд recall@1of 72%, үг болон жижиг хэмжээний BM25-ээс илүү 20% сайжруулагдсан бөгөөд хамгийн бага хүч чадлыг гар давхарлах боломжтой. Бид Wikipedia хуудас 700k UMLS ойлголтын хуудас болон WikiUMLS, UMLS болон Wikipedia хоорондын суралцах болон түгшилтийн загварын үнэлэх өгөгдлийн сан гаргадаг. Энэ нь эрүүл мэргэжилтнүүд, өвчтөн, NLP системүүд болон олон хэлний төвшинд Wikipedia-д илүү амархан хангалттай хангалттай болно.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw ix-xogħol tagħna dwar l-allinjament tas-Sistema Medika Unifikata (UMLS) mal-Wikipedia, biex jiġi ffaċilitat l-allinjament manwali taż-żewġ riżorsi. Aħna nipproponu mudell translingwi ta’ riflessjoni newrali biex jaqbel kunċett UMLS ma’ paġna tal-Wikipedia, li tikseb recall@1of 72%, titjib sostanzjali ta ’ 20% fuq il- livell tal- kliem u tal- karattru BM25, li jippermetti allinjament manwali ma ’ sforz minimu. Aħna nirrilaxxaw ir-riżorsi tagħna, inklużi paġni kklassifikati tal-Wikipedia għal 700k kunċett UMLS, u WikiUMLS, sett ta’ dejta għat-taħriġ u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ mudelli ta’ allinjament bejn UMLS u Wikipedia miġbura minn Wikidata. Dan se jipprovdi aċċess aktar faċli għall-Wikipedia għall-professjonisti tas-saħħa, il-pazjenti u s-sistemi NLP, inkluż f’ambjenti multilingwi.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nasze prace nad dostosowaniem Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) do Wikipedii, aby ułatwić ręczne dopasowanie tych dwóch zasobów. Proponujemy wielojęzyczny model ponownego rankingu neuronowego, aby dopasować koncepcję UMLS do strony Wikipedii, która osiąga recall@1of 72%, znaczna poprawa 20% w stosunku do BM25 na poziomie słowa i znaków, umożliwiająca ręczne ustawienie przy minimalnym wysiłku. Udostępniamy nasze zasoby, w tym rankingowe strony Wikipedii dla 700k UMLSconcepts oraz WikiUMLS, zestaw danych do szkolenia i oceny modeli równoważenia między UMLS a Wikipedią zebranych z Wikidanych. Zapewni to łatwiejszy dostęp do Wikipedii pracownikom służby zdrowia, pacjentom i systemom NLP, w tym w ustawieniach wielojęzycznych.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm lucrările noastre privind alinierea Sistemului Unificat de Limbă Medicală (UMLS) la Wikipedia, pentru a facilita alinierea manuală a celor două resurse. Propunem un model de relocare neurală interlingvă pentru a potrivi un concept UMLS cu o pagină Wikipedia, care realizează o recall@1of 72%, o îmbunătățire substanțială de 20% față de nivelul de cuvinte și caractere BM25, permițând alinierea manuală cu efort minim. Publicăm resursele noastre, inclusiv paginile Wikipedia clasate pentru 700k de concepte UMLSși WikiUMLS, un set de date pentru instruirea și evaluarea modelelor de aliniere între UMLS și Wikipedia colectate de la Wikidata. Acest lucru va oferi acces mai ușor la Wikipedia pentru profesioniștii din domeniul sănătății, pacienții și sistemele PNL, inclusiv în setări multilingve.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer arbeidet vårt om å justera Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) til Wikipedia, for å gjera rett justering av dei to ressursane. Vi foreslår eit krysspråk neuralregeringsmodul for å passa med ein UMLS-konsept med ei Wikipediaside, som oppnår ein recall@1of 72%, eit stort forbedring av 20% over ordet og teikn-nivå BM25, som gjer manuelt justering med minste forståking. Vi løyser ressursane våre, inkludert rankerte Wikipedia-sider for 700k UMLS-konseptar, og WikiUMLS, eit dataset for opplæring og evaluering av justeringsmodeller mellom UMLS og Wikipedia samla frå Wikidata. Dette vil gje enklare tilgang til Wikipedia for helseprofeil, pasienter og NLP-systemet, inkludert i fleirspråk innstillingar.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo svoj rad o usklađivanju jedinstvenog medicinskog jezika (UMLS) na Wikipedia, kako bi olakšali ruèno usklađivanje dva resursa. Predlažemo preko jezičkog neuralnog model a da se uklapa UMLS koncept sa Wikipedia stranicom, koja postigne recall@1of 72%, značajno poboljšanje od 20% preko reči i linije BM25, omogućavajući manualno poravnanje sa minimalnim naporima. Puštamo naše resurse, uključujući redovne stranice Wikipedije za 700k UMLSconcepta, i WikiUMLS, setu podataka za obuku i procjenu modela usklađenja između UMLS i Wikipedia okupljenih iz Wikidata. To će omogućiti lakši pristup Wikipediji zdravstvenim profesionalcima, pacijentima i NLP sistemima, uključujući i mnogim jezičkim nastavama.', 'so': 'Waxaynu sameynaa shaqadeenna ku saabsan sawirida nidaamka afka caafimaadka ee Midowga (UMLS) ee Wikipedia, si aan u fududayno isbedelka labada maalmood. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa model bedelka neurada oo luuqadaha kala duduwan si aan u dhigno dhanka UMLS oo ku qoran bogga Wikipedia recall@1of 72 boqolkiiba, qalabka ugu badnaanta 20 boqolkiiba oo ka sarreeya hadalka- iyo heerka xarafka BM25, wuxuu ku caawinayaa isbedelka dhaqaale. WikiUMLS, waxaynu bixinnaa macluumaadyadeena, kuwaas oo ku qoran bogga Wikipedia ee loo qoray 700k UMLSconcepts, iyo WikiUMLS, taas oo ah macluumaad loo qorayo waxbarasho iyo qiimeynayo samooyin isbedelka u dhexeeya UMLS iyo Wikipedia oo ka soo ururiyey Wikidata. Taas waxay si fudud u heli kartaa Wikipedia xirfadaha caafimaadka, bukaanka iyo nidaamka NLP, kuwaas oo ku jira xarumaha luuqadaha kala duduwan.', 'si': 'අපි විකිපිඩියාව සම්පූර්ණ වෛද්\u200dය භාෂා පද්ධතිය (UMLS) විකිපිඩියාව සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න අපේ වැඩේ පෙන්වන්න, ප්\u200d අපි විකිපිඩියා පැත්තෙක් එක්ක UMLS අදහසක් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් න්\u200dයූරාල් නි recall@1of 72%, වචනය සහ චාර්ට- ප්\u200dරමාණය BM25 වලින් 20% විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා, අඩුම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා මනුස්තලික ප්\u200dරමාණය අපි අපේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් පිටපත් විකිපිඩියා පිටපත් 700k UMLS සැකසුම් සහ විකියිම්ල්ස්, UMLS සහ විකිපිඩියා සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වි මේක විකිපිඩියාව ස්වාස්ථ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපකයෝ, රෝගිකයෝ, NLP පද්ධතියෝ, විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සැකසුම් වලට ස', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar vårt arbete med att anpassa Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) till Wikipedia, för att underlätta manuell anpassning av de två resurserna. Vi föreslår en korspråkig neural omlankningsmodell för att matcha ett UMLS-koncept med en Wikipedia-sida, som uppnår en recall@1of 72%, en betydande förbättring på 20% jämfört med ord- och teckenivå BM25, vilket möjliggör manuell justering med minimal ansträngning. Vi släpper våra resurser, inklusive rankade Wikipedia sidor för 700k UMLSkoncept, och WikiUMLS, ett dataset för utbildning och utvärdering av anpassningsmodeller mellan UMLS och Wikipedia insamlat från Wikidata. Detta kommer att ge enklare tillgång till Wikipedia för hälso- och sjukvårdspersonal, patienter och NLP-system, även i flerspråkiga inställningar.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட மருத்துவ மொழி அமைப்பு (UMLS) விக்கிபிடியாவுக்கு ஒதுக்கும் பொருட்டு எங்கள் வேலையை கைமுற ஒரு விகிபிடியா பக்கத்துடன் ஒரு UMLS கருத்தை பொருத்துவதற்கான முறைமை மாதிரியை நாம் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். recall@1of 72% UMLS மற்றும் விகிடிட்டாவிலிருந்து சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள விக்கிபிடியா பக்கங்கள் 700k UMLSconcepts மற்றும் விகியுஎம்எல்ஸ் க்கான தகவல் அமைப்பு, UMLS மற்றும் விக இது விகிபிடியாவிற்கு எளிதான அணுகல் அளிக்கும் உடல் நல்ல ஆரோக்க பொதுவானவர்கள், நோயாளிகள், மற்றும் NLP அமைப்புகள், பல மொ', 'ur': 'ہم نے اپنے کام کو ویکیپیڈیا کی طرف یونیافڈ میڈیک زبان سیستم (UMLS) کے متصل کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے، کہ دو منابع کے مطابق مہمانی تضامین کریں۔ ہم ایک مختلف زبان کی نئورل ریرنکینگ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک ویکیپیڈیا صفحہ کے ساتھ UMLS کا مطابق مطابق کرے، جو ایک کام پہنچتی ہے recall@1of 72%، کلمات اور چار-سطح BM25 سے 20% کی زیادہ اضافہ ہے، کم تلاش کے ساتھ دستی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی کرتی ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے سرمایہ کو آزاد کردیا ہے، 700k UMLSconcepts کے لئے ویکیپیڈیا پاؤں کے شامل، اور ویکییوملس کے لئے، UMLS اور ویکیپیڈیا کے درمیان آموزش اور ارزیابی موڈل کے لئے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ ہے جو ویکیڈاٹ سے جمع کئے گئے ہیں. یہ ویکیپیڈیا کے لئے بہت آسان دسترسی حاصل کرے گا، سلامتی مسئولوں، بیماروں اور NLP سیستموں کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Biz ikkita rasmlarni qoʻlbola tekislash uchun Wikipediya (UMLS) tizimini aniqlash uchun ishimizni hozir qilamiz. Biz Wikipedia sahifa bilan UMLS g'oyatiga mos keladigan bir necha neyrolik raqamli modelini tahlil qilamiz. recall@1of  72%, a substantial improvement of 20% over word- and char-level BM25, enabling manual alignment with minimal effort.  Biz rasmlarimizni chiqaramiz. Wikidata va Wikipedia orqali birlashtirilgan UMLS va WikiUMLS uchun 700k UMLSconceptning sahifalari va WikiUMLS (UMLS va Wikipedia) maʼlumotlarini o'rganish va qiymatish uchun maʼlumot seti. Bu huddi bir necha til moslamalarda bog'liq oddiy tizimlarga Wikipedia murojaat qiladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu công việc của chúng tôi về hệ thống ngôn ngữ y khoa bất hợp pháp (UMLS) với Wikipedia, nhằm hỗ trợ việc chỉnh sửa tay hai phương tiện. Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình thần kinh tái phát ngôn ngữ khác nhau để khớp một khái niệm về UMLS với một trang Wikipedia, bạn có thể tìm thấy... recall@1of 72=, một tiến bộ đáng kể trong 20=.=.=) trên (Từ) và char-level BM25) nhờ đó việc chỉnh hướng tay với mức độ tối thiểu. Chúng tôi công bố các nguồn tài nguyên, bao gồm trang Wikipedia hàng đầu cho các dự án 700k UMLS, và WikiLLS, một tập tin về sự huấn luyện và đánh giá các mô hình phối hợp giữa UMLS và Wikipedia được thu thập từ WikiLdata. Việc này sẽ dễ dàng truy cập Wikipedia cho những chuyên gia y tế, bệnh nhân, và hệ thống Njala, bao gồm cả trong các thiết lập đa dạng.', 'bg': 'Представяме нашата работа по привеждане на единната медицинска езикова система към Уикипедия, за да улесним ръчното привеждане на двата ресурса. Предлагаме междуезичен модел на невронно пренареждане, който да съчетае концепцията на UMLS с страница в Уикипедия, която постига recall@1of 72%, значително подобрение от 20% спрямо нивото на думи и въглехидрати, което позволява ръчно подравняване с минимални усилия. Освобождаваме ресурсите си, включително класираните страници на Уикипедия за 700 000 концепции и Уикипедия, набор от данни за обучение и оценка на моделите на подравняване между Уикипедия и Уикипедия, събрани от Уикиданни. Това ще осигури по-лесен достъп до Уикипедия за здравните специалисти, пациентите и системите за НЛП, включително в многоезични условия.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo svoj rad o usklađivanju jedinstvenog medicinskog jezičkog sustava (UMLS) na Wikipedia, kako bi olakšali rukovno usklađivanje dva resursa. Predlažemo preko jezičkog model a preobraćanja nerva kako bi odgovarali UMLS koncepciji sa stranicom Wikipedije, koja postigla recall@1of 72%, značajno poboljšanje od 20% preko riječi i linije BM25, omogućavajući ručnu prilagodbu minimalnim naporima. Puštamo naše resurse, uključujući rankirane Wikipedia stranice za 700k UMLSconcepta, i WikiUMLS, komplet podataka za obuku i procjenu modela usklađenja između UMLS i Wikipedia skupljenog iz Wikidata. To će omogućiti lakši pristup Wikipediji zdravstvenim profesionalcima, pacijentima i NLP-ovim sustavima, uključujući i u multijezičkim nastavima.', 'nl': "We presenteren ons werk over het afstemmen van het Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) op Wikipedia, om handmatige uitlijning van de twee bronnen te vergemakkelijken. We stellen een cross-lingual neural reranking model voor om een UMLS concept te matchen met een Wikipedia pagina, die een recall@1of 72%, een aanzienlijke verbetering van 20% ten opzichte van woord- en tekenniveau BM25, waardoor handmatige uitlijning met minimale inspanning mogelijk is. We geven onze bronnen vrij, waaronder gerangschikte Wikipedia-pagina's voor 700k UMLSconcepts, en WikiUMLS, een dataset voor training en evaluatie van uitlijningsmodellen tussen UMLS en Wikipedia verzameld op Wikidata. Dit zal zorgprofessionals, patiënten en NLP-systemen gemakkelijker toegang bieden tot Wikipedia, ook in meertalige omgevingen.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer vores arbejde med at tilpasse Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) til Wikipedia, for at lette manuel tilpasning af de to ressourcer. Vi foreslår en tværsproget neural re ranking model til at matche et UMLS koncept med en Wikipedia side, der opnår en recall@1of 72%, en betydelig forbedring på 20% i forhold til ord- og tegn-niveau BM25, muliggør manuel justering med minimal indsats. Vi frigiver vores ressourcer, herunder rangerede Wikipedia-sider for 700k UMLSkoncepter, og WikiUMLS, et datasæt til træning og evaluering af justeringsmodeller mellem UMLS og Wikipedia indsamlet fra Wikidata. Dette vil give nemmere adgang til Wikipedia for sundhedspersonale, patienter og NLP-systemer, herunder i flersprogede indstillinger.', 'de': 'Wir stellen unsere Arbeit zur Angleichung des Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) an Wikipedia vor, um die manuelle Ausrichtung der beiden Ressourcen zu erleichtern. Wir schlagen ein crosslinguales neuronales Reranking-Modell vor, um ein UMLS-Konzept mit einer Wikipedia-Seite zu verknüpfen. recall@1of 72%, eine deutliche Verbesserung von 20% gegenüber Wort- und Zeichenebene BM25, die manuelle Ausrichtung mit minimalem Aufwand ermöglicht. Wir veröffentlichen unsere Ressourcen, einschließlich gerankter Wikipedia-Seiten für 700k UMLSconcepts und WikiUMLS, einen Datensatz zum Training und Evaluieren von Ausrichtungsmodellen zwischen UMLS und Wikipedia, der aus Wikidata gesammelt wurde. Dies wird Gesundheitsfachleuten, Patienten und NLP-Systemen den Zugang zu Wikipedia erleichtern, auch in mehrsprachigen Umgebungen.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pekerjaan kami untuk menyesuaikan Sistem Bahasa Medis Unified (UMLS) ke Wikipedia, untuk memudahkan penyesuaian manual dari dua sumber daya. Kami mengusulkan model saraf saling bahasa untuk cocok konsep UMLS dengan halaman Wikipedia, yang mencapai recall@1of 72%, peningkatan substansial 20% lebih dari kata- dan char-level BM25, memungkinkan penyesuaian manual dengan usaha minimal. Kami melepaskan sumber daya kami, termasuk halaman tertinggi Wikipedia untuk 700k konsep UMLS, dan WikiUMLS, set data untuk latihan dan evaluasi model penyesuaian antara UMLS dan Wikipedia yang dikumpulkan dari Wikidata. This will provide easier access to Wikipedia for health professionals, patients, and NLP systems, including in multilingual settings.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka kazi zetu kuhusu kuunganisha Mfumo wa Lugha ya Kitiba (UMLS) kwa Wikipedia, ili kusaidia kuunganisha rasilimali hizi mbili. Tunazipendekeza muundo wa upepo wa neura wa lugha mbalimbali kupambana na dhana ya UMLS na ukurasa wa Wikipedia, ambao unafanikiwa recall@1of =72%, maendeleo makubwa ya asilimia 20 zaidi ya maneno- na kiwango cha char BM25, inawezesha kuunganisha mkono kwa juhudi za kidogo. Tunatoa rasilimali zetu, ikiwa ni pamoja na kurasa za Wikipedia zilizotengenezwa kwa ajili ya vifaa 700k UMLSconcepts, na WikiUMLS, seti ya taarifa kwa ajili ya mafunzo na kutathmini mifano ya kuunganisha kati ya UMLS na Wikipedia zilizokusanywa kutoka Wikidata. Hii itatoa upatikanaji rahisi wa Wikipedia kwa wataalamu wa afya, wagonjwa na mfumo wa NLP, ikiwa ni pamoja na mazingira ya lugha mbalimbali.', 'fa': 'ما کارمون را در مورد تنظیم سیستم زبان پزشکی متحد (UMLS) به ویکیپدیا پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا دستیابی دستی از دو منابع را آسان سازیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل بازسازی عصبی متوسط زبان تا با یک مفهوم UMLS با یک صفحه ویکیپدیا پیدا کند که به یک recall@1of ۲۲ درصد، بهترین عملی از ۲۰ درصد بر اساس کلمه- و سطح char-BM25، که می تواند تنظیم دستی با تلاش minimal. ما منابع\u200cهایمان را آزاد می\u200cکنیم، شامل صفحه\u200cهای ویکیپدیا درجه\u200cی 700ک مفهوم UMLS، و ویکیUMLS، یک مجموعه داده\u200cای برای آموزش و ارزیابی مدل\u200cهای تنظیم بین UMLS و ویکیپدیا از ویکیپدیا جمع شده است. این دسترسی آسانتر به ویکیپدییا برای حرفه\u200cای، بیماران و سیستم\u200cهای NLP، از جمله در تنظیمات زیادی زبان می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Biz 철z i힊imizi Birle힊ik Medikal Dili Sistemine (UMLS) Wikipedi첵a 챌ykarmak 체챌in 첵erle힊dirip, iki 챌e힊me 체챌in elimizden 챌ykarmak 체챌in 챌yk첵arys. Biz 챌arpaz dilli n채yral ta첵첵arlama modelini Wikipedia sahypa bilen u흫lap UMLS d체힊체nmesi 체챌in teklip edip, bu 첵erde bir 첵eterlik bar. recall@1of 72%, s철z we karakter derejesinde BM25'i gola첵la힊dyrmak 체챌in 20%-de gola첵la힊dyrylmak 체챌in elimden 챌ykmak m체mkin ed첵채r. Biz 철z 챌e힊melerimizi, UML we Wikipedia arasynda toplan첵an 700 sany UML konseptler 체챌in 첵erle힊첵채n Wikipedia sahypalaryny we WikiUMLS 체챌in, UMLS we Wikipedia aralygynda 챌yky힊 nusgalaryny흫 d체z체mlenmesi we 챌철zg체tlenmesi 체챌in bir dataset 챌ykar첵arys. Bu Wikipedi첵a saglyk k채fermanlary, hastalary we NLP sistemalary 체챌in 첵e흫il hereket eder.", 'af': "Ons stel ons werk voor die Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) aan Wikipedia te align, om die hand-alignment van die twee hulpbronne te vermoë. Ons voorstel 'n kruistale neurale herankering model om 'n UMLS konsepte te ooreenstem met 'n Wikipedia bladsy, wat aan 'n recall@1of 72%, 'n groot verbetering van 20% oor woord- en karaktervlak BM25, wat die handoplyn met minimale versoek aanwend. Ons verlos ons hulpbronne, insluitend rangeerde Wikipedia bladsye vir 700k UMLS-konsepte, en WikiUMLS, 'n datastel vir onderwerp en evaluering van aanpassingsmodele tussen UMLS en Wikipedia wat van Wikidata versamel is. Hierdie sal makliker toegang tot Wikipedia verskaf vir gesondige professionele, pasiënte en NLP-stelsels, insluitend in multitaalske instellings.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim punën tonë mbi lidhjen e Sistemit të Unifikuar të Gjuhave Mjekësore (UMLS) me Wikipedia, për të lehtësuar përshtatjen manuale të dy burimeve. We propose a cross-lingual neural reranking model to match a UMLS concept with a Wikipedia page, which achieves a  recall@1of 72%, një përmirësim thelbësor prej 20% mbi nivelin e fjalës dhe karakterit BM25, duke mundësuar rregullimin manual me përpjekje minimale. Ne lëshojmë burimet tona, duke përfshirë faqet e renditura të Wikipedias për 700k koncepte UMLS dhe WikiUMLS, një set të dhënash për trajnimin dhe vlerësimin e modeleve të përshtatjes midis UMLS dhe Wikipedia të mbledhur nga Wikidata. Kjo do të sigurojë akses më të lehtë në Wikipedia për profesionistët shëndetësorë, pacientët dhe sistemet NLP, duke përfshirë në ambiente shumëgjuhëse.', 'am': 'የሁለተኛውን የድምፅ ቋንቋ ሲስተም (UMLS) ወደWikipedia በመቀላቀል ሥራችንን እናደርጋለን፤ የሁለቱን ሀብት እጃቸውን ለመቀናቀል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ የኔሩአዊ አካባቢ ምሳሌ ከWikipedia ገጽ ጋር ለመተካከል እናስጀጋለን፡፡ recall@1of 72 በመቶ፣ በንግግር እና በክራርት ደረጃ BM25 ላይ 20 በመቶ ያበረታታል፡፡ ከWikipedia በተሰበሰቡ UMLSconcepts እና WikiUMLS እና WikiUMLS በሚያስተምር እና Wikipedia መካከል የደረጃ ምርጫዎችን ማስተምር እና ማስተምር የሚችሉትን የዳታተር ማድረጊያውን እናስወግዳለን፡፡ ይሄ በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ለጤና ባለሞክሮች፣ ደካማዎች እና የNLP ስርዓቶችን ለማግኘት ቀላል ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz birləşdirilmiş Təsdiq Dili Sistemini (UMLS) Wikipediya ilə birləşdirmək üçün işlərimizi iki kaynaqların əlində tərəfləndirmək üçün göstəririk. Biz çox dilli nöral yenilənmək modelini Wikipedia səhifəsi ilə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün təklif edirik ki, bu da recall@1of 72%, söz və char-seviyyəti BM25 ilə 20%-dən çox yaxşılaşdırılmış, minimal çabaları ilə əlli düzəltmə qabiliyyət edər. Bizim kaynaqlarımızı, 700k UMLS konseptlərini və WikiUMLS üçün, UMLS və Wikipedia arasında toplanmış müəyyən modellərin təhsil və değerlendirmək üçün verilən məlumatları yayındırırıq. Bu, çoxlu dil ayarlarında dahil olaraq, sağlamlıq təhsil sahibləri, xəstələr və NLP sistemləri üçün Wikipediaya daha asanlıq verir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր աշխատանքը Միացյալ Բժշկական լեզվի համակարգի (ՄՄԼՍ) կազմակերպման Wikipedia-ի հետ, որպեսզի հեշտացնենք երկու ռեսուրսների ձեռքի կազմակերպման: Մենք առաջարկում ենք փոխլեզվով նյարդային վերամշակման մոդել, որպեսզի համապատասխանենք ՕՄԼՍ-ի գաղափարին Վիքիփեդիայի էջի հետ, որը հասնում է recall@1of 72 տոկոսը, 20 տոկոսի նշանակալի բարելավում BM25 բառի և նշանակալի մակարդակի նկատմամբ, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս ձեռքի հարմարեցման մինիմալ ջանքի հետ: Մենք հրապարակում ենք մեր ռեսուրսները, ներառյալ Վիքիփեդիայի դասակարգված էջերը 700k ՕՄԼՍ-ի համար, և ՎիքիՕՄԼՍ-ը, Վիքիփեդիայից հավաքված տվյալների համակարգ, որը օգտագործվում է ՕՄԼՍ-ի և Վիքիփեդիայի միջև կազմա Սա կտրամադրի առողջապահության մասնագետներին, հիվանդներին և ՆԼՊ համակարգերին ավելի հեշտ հասանելիություն Վիքիփեդիային, ներառյալ բազլեզու միջավայրում:', 'bn': 'আমরা উইকিপিডিয়ায় ইউনিটেডিক্যাল ভাষা সিস্টেম (ইউএমএলএস) সাথে সাজানোর ব্যাপারে আমাদের কাজ উপস্থাপন করছি, যাতে এই দুটি সম্পদে আমরা একটি উইকিপিডিয়া পাতায় একটি ইউএমএলএস ধারণা মিলিয়ে যাওয়ার প্রস্তাব করছি যা একটি উইকিপিডিয়া পাতায় অর্জন করে। recall@1of ৭২ শতাংশ, শব্দ এবং চ্যার-স্তর বিএম২৫-এর বেশী বিশাল উন্নয়নের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নয়ন, যা কম প্রচেষ্টার সাথে মানুষের সাথে স আমরা আমাদের সম্পদ মুক্তি দিচ্ছি, যার মধ্যে ৭০০ কিলোক উইকিপিডিয়া পাতা এবং উইকিইউএমএলস, উইকিডিতা থেকে সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে উইকিডাতা থেকে সংগ্রহ করা এক প্রশিক্ষণ ও মূল্ এটি স্বাস্থ্য পেশাদার, রোগী এবং এনএলপি সিস্টেমের জন্য উইকিপিডিয়ার প্রবেশ সহজে প্রবেশ করতে পারবে, যার মধ্যে অন্যান্য ভ', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo svoj rad o usklađivanju jedinstvenog medicinskog jezičkog sustava (UMLS) na Wikipedia, kako bi olakšali ručno usklađivanje dva resursa. Predlažemo krstojezički neuralni model preobraćanja da odgovara UMLS koncept sa Wikipedia stranicom, koja postigne recall@1of 72%, značajno poboljšanje od 20% preko riječi i linije BM25, omogućavajući manualno poravnanje sa minimalnim naporima. Puštamo naše resurse, uključujući rankirane Wikipedia stranice za 700k UMLSconcepta, i WikiUMLS, set podataka za obuku i procjenu modela usklađenja između UMLS i Wikipedia okupljenih iz Wikidata. To će omogućiti lakši pristup Wikipediji zdravstvenim profesionalcima, pacijentima i NLP-ovim sustavima, uključujući i u multijezičkim nastavima.', 'ca': "Presentam la nostra feina d'allinjar el Sistema Unificat de Llingua Médica (UMLS) a Wikipedia, per facilitar l'allinjament manual dels dos recursos. Proposem un model de reenvolupament neural translingüe que coincidi un concepte UMLS amb una pàgina de Wikipedia, que aconsegueix recall@1of 72%, una millora substancial del 20% sobre el nivell de paraules i caracteres BM25, habilitant l'alliniament manual amb un esforç mínim. Vam publicar els nostres recursos, incloent pàgines classificades de Wikipedia per 700k conceptes UMLS, i WikiUMLS, un conjunt de dades per formar i evaluar models d'alliniament entre UMLS i Wikipedia recollits de Wikidata. Això proporcionarà un accés més fàcil a Wikipedia per a professionals de la salut, pacients i sistemes NLP, incloent-se en entorns multilingües.", 'cs': 'Představujeme naši práci na sladění Unified Medical Language System (UMLS) s Wikipedií, abychom usnadnili manuální sladění obou zdrojů. Navrhujeme model cross-jazyčného neuronového přeřazení, který odpovídá koncepci UMLS se stránkou Wikipedie, která dosahuje recall@1of 72%, podstatné zlepšení o 20% oproti BM25 slova a znaku, umožňuje ruční zarovnání s minimálním úsilím. Vydáváme naše zdroje, včetně hodnocených stránek Wikipedie pro 700k UMLSconcepts, a WikiUMLS, datový soubor pro školení a vyhodnocování modelů zarovnávání mezi UMLS a Wikipedií shromážděných z Wikidat. To poskytne snadnější přístup ke Wikipedii zdravotnickým pracovníkům, pacientům a systémům NLP, včetně vícejazyčného nastavení.', 'ko': '우리는 이 두 자원을 수동으로 조율하기 위해 통일의학언어시스템(Unified Medical Language System, UMLS)과 위키백과의 조율 작업을 소개했다.우리는 다중 언어 신경 정렬 모델을 제시하여UMLS 개념을 위키백과 페이지와 일치시켜 실현하였다recall@1of72%는 단어·문자급 BM25보다 20% 대폭 향상된 최소 노력으로 수동 정렬을 달성했다.700k UMLSconcepts의 랭킹 위키백과 페이지와 위키UMLS, UMLS와 위키백과 사이의 정렬 모델을 교육하고 평가하는 데 사용되는 데이터 집합을 포함하여 위키데이터에서 수집한 자원을 발표했습니다.이는 보건 전문가, 환자, NLP 시스템(다국어 환경 포함)에 더 편리한 위키백과 접근을 제공할 것이다.', 'et': 'Tutvustame oma tööd ühtse meditsiinilise keele süsteemi (UMLS) ühtlustamisel Vikipeediaga, et hõlbustada nende kahe ressursi käsitsi ühtlustamist. Pakume välja keeleülese neuraalse ümberjaotamise mudeli, et sobitada UMLS kontseptsioon Wikipedia lehega, mis saavutab recall@1of 72%, märkimisväärne paranemine 20% võrreldes sõna- ja sümbolitasemega BM25, mis võimaldab käsitsi joondamist minimaalse pingutusega. Avaldame oma ressursid, sealhulgas järjestatud Wikipedia leheküljed 700k UMLSconceptions jaoks ja WikiUMLS, andmekogum UMLS ja Wikipedia vaheliste joondusmudelite koolitamiseks ja hindamiseks, mis on kogutud Wikiandmetest. See tagab tervishoiutöötajatele, patsientidele ja uue õppekava süsteemidele lihtsama juurdepääsu Vikipeediale, sealhulgas mitmekeelsetes tingimustes.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme työtämme yhtenäistetyn lääketieteellisen kielijärjestelmän (UMLS) mukauttamiseksi Wikipediaan helpottaaksemme näiden kahden aineiston manuaalista mukauttamista. Ehdotamme monikielistä neuraalista uudelleenjärjestelymallia UMLS-konseptin ja Wikipedia-sivun yhdistämiseksi. recall@1of 72%, mikä on 20% parannus sana- ja char-tason BM25:een verrattuna, mikä mahdollistaa manuaalisen linjauksen mahdollisimman pienellä vaivalla. Julkaisemme resurssimme, mukaan lukien Wikipedian listatut sivut 700k UMLSconcepts:ille ja WikiUMLS:n, Wikidatasta kerättyjen UMLS:n ja Wikipedian linjausmallien koulutusta ja arviointia varten. Tämä helpottaa terveydenhuollon ammattilaisten, potilaiden ja NLP-järjestelmien pääsyä Wikipediaan myös monikielisissä asetuksissa.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo svoje delo pri uskladitvi enotnega medicinskega jezikovnega sistema (UMLS) z Wikipedijo, da bi olajšali ročno uskladitev obeh virov. Predlagamo model medjezičnega prerazporejanja nevronskih rezervacij, ki bi ujemal koncept UMLS s stranjo Wikipedije, ki doseže recall@1of 72%, znatno 20% izboljšanje v primerjavi z besedno in znakovno ravnjo BM25, kar omogoča ročno poravnavo z minimalnim naporom. Objavljamo naše vire, vključno z razvrščenimi Wikipedijskimi stranmi za 700k UMLSconceptions in WikiUMLS, nabor podatkov za usposabljanje in vrednotenje modelov usklajevanja med UMLS in Wikipedijo, zbranih iz Wikipodatkov. To bo omogočilo lažji dostop do Wikipedije za zdravstvene delavce, bolnike in sisteme NLP, tudi v večjezičnih okoljih.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את העבודה שלנו על התאמה של מערכת השפה הרפואית המאוחדת (UMLS) לוויקיפדיה, כדי להקל על התאמה ידנית של שני המשאבים. אנו מציעים מודל מחדש שינוי עצבי חוצה לשפה כדי להתאים מושג UMLS עם עמוד ויקיפדיה, אשר משיג recall@1of 72%, שיפור משמעותי של 20% על רמת המילים והסמלים BM25, מאפשר התאמה ידנית עם מאמץ מינימלי. אנחנו משחררים את המשאבים שלנו, כולל עמודי ויקיפדיה מסודרים עבור 700k מושג UMLS, ויקיUMLS, קבוצת נתונים לאימון והעריכה של מודלים התאמה בין UMLS ויקיפדיה שנאספו בוויקידאטה. This will provide easier access to Wikipedia for health professionals, patients, and NLP systems, including in multilingual settings.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da aikinmu na sami tsarin Sistemi na YUMLS (UMLS) zuwa Wikimedia, dõmin ya yi amfani da masu tsari da manual biyu. Kana goyyar da wata motel mai tarakin neural na fara-lingui don ka sami wani na'urar UMLS da wani saura na Wikimedia, da ta sami wani recall@1of KCharselect unicode block name We release our resources, including ranked Wikipedia pages for 700k UMLSconcepts, and WikiUMLS, a dataset for training and evaluation of alignment models between UMLS and Wikipedia collected from Wikidata.  Wannan zai iya sauƙi zuwa Wikimedia wa masu shawarar da aka sani, ma'abubuwa, da na'anar NLP, kamar da wasu na'ura masu yawa.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe arèhku kanggo nggawe Sistem Pangan Sak Hyang Unied (UTL) kanggo Wipediya, kanggo ngejarian manut kanggo nggawe pancen pangan iki. Awak dhéwé ngerbahi model kuwi nggawe tarjamahan kelangan anyar luwih nggawe gerakan kelangan iki nggo ngerasakno MTL karo pagjina Wipediya, sing bisa bantayan iki recall@1of % Awak dhéwé mbukak perusahaan anyar, gambar dhéwé éntuk kelas nang angka diputéné Universi (singular gambar) nggawe pangan Universi (singular gambar) lan Universi (singular gambar) Iki bakal ngewehi luwih akeh sabanjur kanggo awak dhéwé ning acara awak dhéwé, sakjane lan sistem NLP, tambah kanggo nggawe akeh luwih-luwih sabanjuré.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་ནི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ནི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་གྲལ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་འདྲ་བའི་དཔེ་གཞུང་ལེན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་Wikipedia་ཤོག་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་། recall@1of - 72%, ཚིག་དང་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉུང་བའི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཕྱོགས་སུ་མཐུད་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གླིང་ཆ་༧༠༠་ཙམ་ཅིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་ WikiUMLS(WikiUMLS)ཡིན་པས། UMLS དང་Wikipedia(Wikipedia)ནང འདིས་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཆེན་པོ་དང་། སྨན་ཚུལ་དང་NLP མ་ལག་ཚོར་སླ་གཏོང་ཐབས་མེད་པར་སླ་གཏོང་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'The Transference Architecture for Automatic Post-Editing', 'fr': "L'architecture de transfert pour la post-édition automatique", 'es': 'La arquitectura de transferencia para la postedición automática', 'ar': 'هندسة التحويل للتحرير التلقائي اللاحق', 'pt': 'A arquitetura de transferência para pós-edição automática', 'zh': '自译后辑者移架构', 'ja': '自動ポスト編集のための転送アーキテクチャ', 'hi': 'स्वत: पोस्ट-संपादन के लिए स्थानांतरण आर्किटेक्चर', 'ru': 'Архитектура переноса для автоматического пост-редактирования', 'ga': 'An Ailtireacht Aistrithe le haghaidh Iar-Eagarthóireachta Uathoibríoch', 'ka': 'ავტომატური დარედაქტირება', 'el': 'Η αρχιτεκτονική μεταφοράς για την αυτόματη μετα-επεξεργασία', 'it': "L'architettura di trasferimento per il post-editing automatico", 'kk': 'Автоматты өңдеу үшін аудару архитектурасы', 'lt': 'Automatinio pakartotinio redagavimo perdavimo architektūra', 'mk': 'Архитектурата за трансференција за автоматско постуредување', 'hu': 'Az automatikus utószerkesztés átviteli architektúrája', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'L-Arkitettura tat-Trasferiment għall-Edizzjoni Awtomatika Wara', 'no': 'Transferensarkitekturen for automatisk post- redigering', 'ml': 'സ്വയം എഡിറ്ററിങ്ങിനുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Автоматтын Пошт-Засварлах Архитектур', 'ro': 'Arhitectura transferului pentru editarea automată', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පොස් සංපාදනය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව සංවිධානය', 'sr': 'Архитура трансференције за автоматично постредиране', 'pl': 'Architektura transferu dla automatycznej edycji post-edycyjnej', 'so': 'Architecture for Automatic Editing', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி தொகுப்புக்கான மாற்று உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'اٹوٹوفورنس آرکیٹر', 'sv': 'Överföringsarkitektur för automatisk efterredigering', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Kiến trúc sự truyền tải cho Automatic Post-Editing', 'nl': 'De overdrachtsarchitectuur voor automatische nabewerking', 'bg': 'Архитектура за трансфер за автоматично пост-редактиране', 'id': 'Arkitektur Transfer untuk Pengeditan Otomatis', 'de': 'Die Transferarchitektur für die automatische Nachbearbeitung', 'da': 'Overførselsarkitekturen for automatisk efterredigering', 'fa': 'معماری انتقال برای ویرایش بعد از ویرایش خودکار', 'hr': 'Arhitektura prijenosnosti za automatsko posturedjenje', 'ko': '자동 사후 편집 마이그레이션 아키텍처', 'tr': 'Otomatik Po-Editlemek üçin Transferenci Arhitektura', 'sw': 'Hifadhi ya Uhamiaji kwa ajili ya Mhariri wa Ufaransa', 'af': 'Die Oordrag Arkitektuur vir Outomatiese Post- Redigering', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'The Transference Architecture for Automatic Post-Editing', 'hy': 'Automatic Post-editing', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় পোস্ট সম্পাদনের জন্য পরিবর্তন আর্কিটেক্ট', 'cs': 'Architektura přenosu pro automatické posteditování', 'az': 'Avtomatik Post Editing üçün Transference Architecture', 'et': 'Automaatse järelredigeerimise ülekande arhitektuur', 'ca': "L'arquitectura de transferència per a la postedició automàtica", 'bs': 'Arhitektura prijenosnosti za automatsko posturedjenje', 'fi': 'Automaattisen jälkimuokkauksen siirtoarkkitehtuuri', 'sk': 'Arhitektura prenosa za samodejno urejanje po urejanju', 'jv': 'Ngubah Akturatur kanggo Otomatik Puteran-Ngubah', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞུན་དག་པར་སྐྱེལ་སྡུད་བཟོ་བར་བཟོ་མཁན', 'he': 'The Transference Architecture for Automatic Post-Editing'}
{'en': 'In automatic post-editing (APE) it makes sense to condition post-editing (pe) decisions on both the source (src) and the machine translated text (mt) as input. This has led to multi-encoder based neural APE approaches. A research challenge now is the search for architectures that best support the capture, preparation and provision of src and mt information and its integration with pe decisions. In this paper we present an efficient multi-encoder based APE model, called transference. Unlike previous approaches, it (i) uses a transformer encoder block for src, (ii) followed by a decoder block, but without masking for self-attention on mt, which effectively acts as second encoder combining src   mt, and (iii) feeds this representation into a final decoder block generating pe. Our model outperforms the best performing systems by 1 BLEU point on the WMT 2016, 2017, and 2018 EnglishGerman APE shared tasks (PBSMT and NMT). Furthermore, the results of our model on the WMT 2019 APE task using NMT data shows a comparable performance to the state-of-the-art system. The inference time of our model is similar to the vanilla transformer-based NMT system although our model deals with two separate encoders. We further investigate the importance of our newly introduced second encoder and find that a too small amount of layers does hurt the performance, while reducing the number of layers of the decoder does not matter much.', 'ar': 'في التحرير اللاحق التلقائي (APE) ، من المنطقي تحديد قرارات التحرير اللاحق (pe) على كل من المصدر (src) والنص المترجم آليًا (mt) كمدخلات. وقد أدى ذلك إلى مناهج APE العصبية متعددة الترميز. يتمثل التحدي البحثي الآن في البحث عن البنى التي تدعم بشكل أفضل التقاط وإعداد وتوفير معلومات src و mt وتكاملها مع قرارات pe. في هذا البحث ، نقدم نموذج APE فعال قائم على التشفير المتعدد ، يسمى التحويل. على عكس الأساليب السابقة ، فإنه (1) يستخدم كتلة ترميز المحولات لـ src ، (2) متبوعًا بكتلة وحدة فك التشفير ، ولكن بدون إخفاء الانتباه الذاتي على mt ، والذي يعمل بشكل فعال كبرنامج ترميز ثانٍ يجمع بين src - mt ، و (iii) يغذي هذا التمثيل في كتلة وحدة فك ترميز نهائية تولد pe. يتفوق نموذجنا على أفضل الأنظمة أداءً من خلال نقطة BLEU واحدة في WMT 2016 و 2017 و 2018 الإنجليزية-الألمانية APE المشتركة المهام (PBSMT و NMT). علاوة على ذلك ، تُظهر نتائج نموذجنا في مهمة WMT 2019 APE باستخدام بيانات NMT أداءً مشابهًا للنظام الحديث. يشبه وقت الاستدلال في نموذجنا نظام NMT القائم على محول الفانيليا على الرغم من أن نموذجنا يتعامل مع اثنين من التشفير المنفصل. لقد بحثنا أيضًا في أهمية برنامج التشفير الثاني الذي قدمناه حديثًا ووجدنا أن كمية صغيرة جدًا من الطبقات تضر بالأداء ، بينما تقليل عدد طبقات وحدة فك التشفير لا يهم كثيرًا.', 'fr': "En post-édition automatique (APE), il est logique de conditionner les décisions de post-édition (pe) à la fois sur la source (src) et sur le texte traduit automatiquement (mt) en tant qu'entrée. Cela a conduit à des approches APE neuronales basées sur plusieurs codeurs. L'un des défis actuels de la recherche est la recherche d'architectures qui prennent le mieux en charge la capture, la préparation et la fourniture d'informations src et mt et leur intégration avec les décisions pe. Dans cet article, nous présentons un modèle APE efficace basé sur plusieurs encodeurs, appelé transfert. Contrairement aux approches précédentes, il (i) utilise un bloc codeur de transformateur pour src, (ii) suivi d'un bloc décodeur, mais sans masque pour l'auto-attention sur mt, qui agit effectivement comme un second codeur combinant src—mt, et (iii) alimente cette représentation dans un bloc décodeur final générant pe. Notre modèle surpasse les systèmes les plus performants d'un point BLEU sur les tâches partagées APE anglais-allemand WMT 2016, 2017 et 2018 (PBSMT et NMT). En outre, les résultats de notre modèle sur la tâche APE WMT 2019 utilisant les données NMT montrent des performances comparables à celles du système de pointe. Le temps d'inférence de notre modèle est similaire à celui du système NMT basé sur un transformateur standard, bien que notre modèle utilise deux codeurs distincts. Nous étudions plus en détail l'importance de notre deuxième encodeur nouvellement introduit et constatons qu'un trop petit nombre de couches nuit aux performances, tandis que la réduction du nombre de couches du décodeur importe peu.", 'es': 'En la postedición automática (APE) tiene sentido condicionar las decisiones de postedición (pe) tanto en la fuente (src) como en el texto traducido automáticamente (mt) como entrada. Esto ha llevado a enfoques APE neuronales basados en múltiples codificadores. Un desafío de investigación ahora es la búsqueda de arquitecturas que mejor respalden la captura, preparación y provisión de información src y mt y su integración con las decisiones de pe. En este artículo presentamos un modelo APE eficiente basado en múltiples codificadores, llamado transferencia. A diferencia de los enfoques anteriores, (i) usa un bloque codificador transformador para src, (ii) seguido de un bloque decodificador, pero sin enmascarar la autoatención en mt, que efectivamente actúa como segundo codificador que combina src — mt, y (iii) alimenta esta representación a un bloque decodificador final que genera pe. Nuestro modelo supera en 1 punto BLEU a los sistemas con mejor rendimiento en las tareas compartidas APE inglés-alemán de WMT 2016, 2017 y 2018 (PBSMT y NMT). Además, los resultados de nuestro modelo sobre la tarea APE del WMT 2019 utilizando datos de NMT muestran un rendimiento comparable al del sistema de última generación. El tiempo de inferencia de nuestro modelo es similar al del sistema NMT basado en transformadores convencionales, aunque nuestro modelo se ocupa de dos codificadores separados. Investigamos más a fondo la importancia de nuestro segundo codificador recientemente introducido y descubrimos que una cantidad demasiado pequeña de capas perjudica el rendimiento, mientras que reducir el número de capas del decodificador no importa mucho.', 'pt': 'Na pós-edição automática (APE), faz sentido condicionar as decisões de pós-edição (pe) tanto na fonte (src) quanto no texto traduzido por máquina (mt) como entrada. Isso levou a abordagens APE neurais baseadas em multi-codificador. Um desafio de pesquisa agora é a busca por arquiteturas que melhor suportem a captura, preparação e fornecimento de informações src e mt e sua integração com decisões pe. Neste artigo apresentamos um modelo eficiente de APE baseado em multi-codificadores, chamado de transferência. Ao contrário das abordagens anteriores, ele (i) usa um bloco codificador transformador para src, (ii) seguido por um bloco decodificador, mas sem mascaramento para autoatenção em mt, que efetivamente atua como segundo codificador combinando src – mt e (iii) alimenta esta representação em um bloco decodificador final gerando pe. Nosso modelo supera os sistemas de melhor desempenho em 1 ponto BLEU nas tarefas compartilhadas APE inglês-alemão WMT 2016, 2017 e 2018 (PBSMT e NMT). Além disso, os resultados do nosso modelo na tarefa WMT 2019 APE usando dados NMT mostram um desempenho comparável ao sistema de última geração. O tempo de inferência do nosso modelo é semelhante ao do sistema NMT baseado em transformador vanilla, embora nosso modelo lide com dois codificadores separados. Investigamos ainda mais a importância do nosso segundo codificador recém-lançado e descobrimos que uma quantidade muito pequena de camadas prejudica o desempenho, enquanto a redução do número de camadas do decodificador não importa muito.', 'zh': '自译后编辑 (APE) 中,以源 (src) 及机器翻译文本 (mt) 为输译后编辑 (pe) 决策有义。 此多编码器之神经APE术也。 今夫挑战者,求其最能支捕、备src、mt息之架构,而集其pe策焉。 于本文中,立一基于多编码器高效APE模形,谓之移徙。 与前法不同,(i)用变压器编码器块src之,(ii)后与解码器块,而无屏蔽mt自注,有效于组合src - mt之二编码器,且(iii)以达于生pe之终解码器块也。 吾形在WMT 2016,2017与2018年英德APE共其任(PBSMT与NMT)上比性之至者1 BLEU。 用NMT数WMT 2019 APE结果显示,与先进相当。 凡我推理,类于庶变压器之NMT统,虽我两独编码器。 论新入第二编码器之要,见少层数实损性,损解码器之层数非重也。', 'ja': '自動ポストエディット（ APE ）では、ソース（ src ）と機械翻訳テキスト（ mt ）の両方でポストエディット（ pe ）の決定を入力として条件付けることは理にかなっています。 これにより、マルチエンコーダベースのニューラル・エイプ・アプローチが生まれている。 現在の研究課題は、SRCおよびMT情報のキャプチャ、準備、提供、および同僚の意思決定との統合を最良にサポートするアーキテクチャの探索です。 本稿では、トランスフェクションと呼ばれる効率的なマルチエンコーダベースの類人猿モデルを提示する。 これまでのアプローチとは異なり、（ ｉ ） ＳＲＣに変圧器エンコーダブロックを使用し、（ ｉ ｉ ）続いてデコーダブロックを使用するが、ＳＲＣ － ＭＴを組み合わせた第２のエンコーダとして効果的に機能するｍｔ上の自己注意のためのマスキングは行わず、（ ｉｉｉ ）この表現を最終的なデコーダブロック生成ＰＥにフィードする。 当社のモデルは、WMT 2016、2017、および2018の英独シェアタスク（ PBSMTおよびNMT ）で最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムを1つ上回っています。 さらに、NMTデータを使用したWMT 2019 APEタスクのモデルの結果は、最先端のシステムと同等のパフォーマンスを示しています。 当社のモデルの推論時間は、バニラトランスベースのNMTシステムと似ていますが、当社のモデルは2つの別々のエンコーダを扱っています。 さらに、新たに導入された第2エンコーダの重要性を調査したところ、レイヤーの数が少なすぎるとパフォーマンスが損なわれる一方で、デコーダのレイヤー数を減らすことはあまり重要ではないことがわかりました。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित पोस्ट-एडिटिंग (एपीई) में यह स्रोत (एसआरसी) और मशीन अनुवादित पाठ (एमटी) दोनों पर इनपुट के रूप में पोस्ट-एडिटिंग (पीई) निर्णयों की स्थिति के लिए समझ में आता है। इसने मल्टी-एनकोडर आधारित तंत्रिका एपीई दृष्टिकोण का नेतृत्व किया है। अब एक शोध चुनौती आर्किटेक्चर की खोज है जो एसआरसी और एमटी जानकारी के कैप्चर, तैयारी और प्रावधान और पीई निर्णयों के साथ इसके एकीकरण का सबसे अच्छा समर्थन करती है। इस पेपर में हम एक कुशल मल्टी-एनकोडर आधारित एपीई मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसे स्थानांतरण कहा जाता है। पिछले दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत, यह (i) एसआरसी के लिए एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर एनकोडर ब्लॉक का उपयोग करता है, (ii) एक डिकोडर ब्लॉक के बाद, लेकिन एमटी पर आत्म-ध्यान के लिए मास्किंग के बिना, जो प्रभावी रूप से एसआरसी - एमटी के संयोजन वाले दूसरे एन्कोडर के रूप में कार्य करता है, और (iii) इस प्रतिनिधित्व को एक अंतिम डिकोडर ब्लॉक में खिलाता है जो पीई उत्पन्न करता है। हमारा मॉडल WMT 2016, 2017, और 2018 अंग्रेजी-जर्मन एपीई साझा कार्यों (PBSMT और NMT) पर 1 BLEU बिंदु द्वारा सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाली प्रणालियों को बेहतर बनाता है। इसके अलावा, एनएमटी डेटा का उपयोग करके डब्ल्यूएमटी 2019 एपीई कार्य पर हमारे मॉडल के परिणाम अत्याधुनिक प्रणाली के लिए एक तुलनीय प्रदर्शन दिखाते हैं। हमारे मॉडल का अनुमान समय वेनिला ट्रांसफार्मर-आधारित एनएमटी सिस्टम के समान है, हालांकि हमारा मॉडल दो अलग-अलग एन्कोडरों से संबंधित है। हम आगे हमारे नए पेश किए गए दूसरे एनकोडर के महत्व की जांच करते हैं और पाते हैं कि परतों की बहुत कम मात्रा प्रदर्शन को चोट पहुंचाती है, जबकि डिकोडर की परतों की संख्या को कम करने से कोई फर्क नहीं पड़ता है।', 'ru': 'В автоматическом постредактировании (APE) имеет смысл обусловливать постредактирование (pe) решений как на источнике (src), так и на машинопереведенном тексте (mt) в качестве входных данных. Это привело к подходам к нейронным обезьянам на основе нескольких кодеров. В настоящее время задача исследования заключается в поиске архитектур, которые наилучшим образом поддерживают сбор, подготовку и предоставление информации src и mt и ее интеграцию с решениями pe. В этой статье мы представляем эффективную модель APE, основанную на мультикодере, называемую переносом. В отличие от предыдущих подходов, он (i) использует блок кодировщика трансформатора для src, (ii) за которым следует блок декодера, но без маскировки для самовнимания на mt, который эффективно действует как второй кодировщик, объединяющий src – mt, и (iii) подает это представление в блок конечного декодера, генерирующий pe. Наша модель превосходит лучшие системы на 1 балл BLEU по английско-немецким общим задачам WMT 2016, 2017 и 2018 годов (PBSMT и NMT). Кроме того, результаты нашей модели по задаче WMT 2019 APE с использованием данных NMT показывают сопоставимую производительность с современной системой. Время вывода нашей модели аналогично системе NMT на основе ванильного трансформатора, хотя наша модель имеет дело с двумя отдельными кодерами. Мы далее исследуем важность нашего недавно введенного второго кодера и обнаруживаем, что слишком небольшое количество слоев действительно ухудшает производительность, в то время как уменьшение количества слоев декодера не имеет большого значения.', 'ga': 'San iar-eagarthóireacht uathoibríoch (APE) tá ciall le cinntí iar-eagarthóireachta (pe) ar an bhfoinse (src) agus ar an téacs meaisín-aistrithe (mt) a chur mar ionchur. Mar thoradh air seo tá cineálacha cur chuige néaracha APE bunaithe ar il-ionchódóirí. Dúshlán taighde anois is ea cuardach a dhéanamh ar ailtireachtaí is fearr a thacaíonn le gabháil, ullmhú agus soláthar faisnéise src agus mt agus lena comhtháthú le cinntí pe. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair samhail APE éifeachtach il-ionchódóra-bhunaithe, ar a dtugtar aistriú. Murab ionann agus cuir chuige roimhe seo, úsáideann sé (i) bloc ionchódóra claochladáin le haghaidh src, (ii) agus bloc díchódóra ina dhiaidh sin, ach gan é a chumhdach le haghaidh féin-aire ar mt, a fheidhmíonn go héifeachtach mar an dara ionchódóir a chomhcheanglaíonn src - mt, agus (iii) fothaíonn an léiriú seo isteach i mbloc díchódóra deiridh a ghineann pe. Sáraíonn ár múnla na córais feidhmíochta is fearr le 1 phointe BLEU ar thascanna roinnte APE WMT 2016, 2017, agus 2018 Béarla-Gearmáinis (PBSMT agus NMT). Ina theannta sin, léiríonn torthaí ár múnla ar thasc APE WMT 2019 ag baint úsáide as sonraí NMT feidhmíocht inchomparáide leis an gcóras úrscothach. Tá am tátal ár múnla cosúil leis an gcóras NMT atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán fanaile cé go ndéileálann ár múnla le dhá ionchódóir ar leith. Déanaimid imscrúdú breise ar an tábhacht a bhaineann lenár dara ionchódóir nua-thionscanta agus faighimid go ndéanann líon ró-bheag sraitheanna dochar don fheidhmíocht, agus níl mórán tábhachta ag baint le líon sraitheanna an díchódóra a laghdú.', 'el': 'Στην αυτόματη μετα-επεξεργασία (APE) έχει νόημα να προβλέπουν αποφάσεις μετα-επεξεργασίας (pe) τόσο για την πηγή (src) όσο και για το μηχανομεταφρασμένο κείμενο (mt) ως εισαγωγή. Αυτό έχει οδηγήσει σε πολλαπλούς κωδικοποιητές νευρικές προσεγγίσεις APE. Μια ερευνητική πρόκληση είναι τώρα η αναζήτηση αρχιτεκτονικών που υποστηρίζουν καλύτερα τη σύλληψη, προετοιμασία και παροχή πληροφοριών και την ενσωμάτωσή τους στις αποφάσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε ένα αποδοτικό μοντέλο που βασίζεται σε πολλαπλούς κωδικοποιητές, που ονομάζεται μεταφορά. Σε αντίθεση με τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις, χρησιμοποιεί ένα μπλοκ κωδικοποιητή μετασχηματιστή για το src, (ii) ακολουθούμενο από ένα μπλοκ αποκωδικοποιητή, αλλά χωρίς κάλυψη για αυτοπροσοχή στο mt, ο οποίος ενεργεί αποτελεσματικά ως δεύτερος κωδικοποιητής συνδυάζοντας το src mmt, και (iii) τροφοδοτεί αυτή την αναπαράσταση σε ένα τελικό μπλοκ αποκωδικοποιητή που παράγει pe. Το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα συστήματα με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις κατά ένα σημείο BLEU στις κοινές εργασίες WMT 2016, 2017 και 2018 Αγγλικά-Γερμανικά APE (PBSMT και NMT). Επιπλέον, τα αποτελέσματα του μοντέλου μας για την εργασία με τη χρήση δεδομένων δείχνουν συγκρίσιμη απόδοση με το σύστημα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Ο χρόνος συναγωγής του μοντέλου μας είναι παρόμοιος με το σύστημα με μετασχηματιστή βανίλιας αν και το μοντέλο μας ασχολείται με δύο διαφορετικούς κωδικοποιητές. Ερευνούμε περαιτέρω τη σημασία του νέου δεύτερου κωδικοποιητή μας και διαπιστώνουμε ότι μια πολύ μικρή ποσότητα στρώσεων βλάπτει την απόδοση, ενώ η μείωση του αριθμού των στρωμάτων του αποκωδικοποιητή δεν έχει μεγάλη σημασία.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus utószerkesztés (APE) esetében érdemes feltételezni az utószerkesztés (pe) döntéseit mind a forrásról (src), mind a gépi lefordított szövegről (mt) bemenetként. Ez vezetett több kódoló alapú neurális APE megközelítésekhez. Jelenleg kutatási kihívást jelent az olyan architektúrák keresése, amelyek a legjobban támogatják a src és mt információk rögzítését, előkészítését és szolgáltatását, valamint annak integrálását a pe döntésekkel. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy hatékony, többkódoló alapú APE modellt, az úgynevezett transzfert. A korábbi megközelítésekkel ellentétben (i) transzformátor kódoló blokkot használ az src számára, (ii) követ egy dekódoló blokkot, de anélkül, hogy elfedné az mt önfigyelmét, amely hatékonyan működik, mint második kódoló kombinációja az src - mt, és (iii) ezt a reprezentációt egy végső dekódoló blokk generálja pe. Modellünk 1 BLEU ponttal felülmúlja a legjobb teljesítményű rendszereket a WMT 2016, 2017 és 2018 angol-német APE megosztott feladatokon (PBSMT és NMT). Továbbá a WMT 2019 APE feladatra vonatkozó modellünk eredményei NMT adatok felhasználásával összehasonlítható teljesítményt mutatnak a korszerű rendszerrel. Modellünk következtetési ideje hasonló a vanília transzformátor alapú NMT rendszerhez, bár modellünk két különálló útmérővel foglalkozik. Tovább vizsgáljuk az újonnan bevezetett második kódolónk fontosságát, és megállapítjuk, hogy a túl kis mennyiségű réteg károsítja a teljesítményt, miközben a dekóder rétegeinek csökkentése nem sokat számít.', 'it': "Nel post-editing automatico (APE) ha senso condizionare le decisioni post-editing (pe) sia sulla fonte (src) che sul testo tradotto automaticamente (mt) come input. Questo ha portato ad approcci APE neurali basati su multi-encoder. Una sfida di ricerca è ora la ricerca di architetture che supportano al meglio l'acquisizione, la preparazione e la fornitura di informazioni src e mt e la sua integrazione con le decisioni pe. In questo articolo presentiamo un efficiente modello APE basato su multi-encoder, chiamato transfert. A differenza degli approcci precedenti, esso (i) utilizza un blocco encoder trasformatore per src, (ii) seguito da un blocco decoder, ma senza mascherarsi per auto-attenzione su mt, che agisce efficacemente come secondo encoder combinando src - mt, e (iii) alimenta questa rappresentazione in un blocco decoder finale generando pe. Il nostro modello supera i sistemi più performanti di 1 punto BLEU sui compiti condivisi APE inglese-tedesco WMT 2016, 2017 e 2018 (PBSMT e NMT). Inoltre, i risultati del nostro modello sull'attività APE WMT 2019 utilizzando i dati NMT mostrano prestazioni paragonabili al sistema all'avanguardia. Il tempo di inferenza del nostro modello è simile al sistema NMT basato su trasformatori di vaniglia, anche se il nostro modello si occupa di due encoder separati. Esaminiamo ulteriormente l'importanza del nostro secondo encoder appena introdotto e scopriamo che una quantità troppo piccola di strati danneggia le prestazioni, mentre ridurre il numero di strati del decoder non importa molto.", 'kk': 'Автоматты кейін өңдеу (APE) үшін көзі (src) және компьютердің аударылған мәтін (mt) кейін кейін өңдеу (pe) шешімдерінің жағдайын келтіруге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл көп кодерді негіздеген невралдық APE ойындарына келді. Қазір зерттеу мәселесі - серc және mt мәліметін жасау, жасау және оның архитектураларды жақсы шешімдермен біріктіру архитектураларды іздеу. Бұл қағазда біз көп кодтардың негіздеген APE үлгісін таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы жағдайларына сәйкес, бұл (i) src үшін түрлендіруші кодер блогын қолданады, ii) декодер блогынан келеді, бірақ mt- ге өзіңізді қарау үшін қалқасыз, бұл көмегімен, src - mt тіркелген екінші кодер ретінде жұмыс істейді, және iii) бұл ке Біздің үлгіміз WMT 2016, 2017 және 2018 ағылшын- неміс APE ортақ тапсырмалар (PBSMT және NMT) үшін 1 BLEU нүктесінен ең жақсы орындау жүйелерін жасайды. Қосымша, WMT 2019 APE тапсырмасының нәтижелері NMT деректерін қолдану үлгісінің нәтижелері жүйесіне салыстыруға болады. Өзіміздің моделіміздің бағыттау уақыты vanilla transformer-based NMT жүйесіне ұқсас. Біздің моделіміз екі бөлек кодерлерімен қатысты. Біз жаңа ендірілген екінші кодердің маңыздылығын зерттеп, декодердің қабаттарын азайту үшін бірнеше кішкентай қабаттар әсер етпейді.', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური დარედაქტირებაში (APE) იქნება სიმართლის შესახებ მორედაქტირების (pe) გადაწყვეტილების შემთხვევაში ორივე მსოფლიოს (src) და მაქსინის გადაწყვეტილი ტექსტის (mt) როგ ეს მრავალ ენერალური APE-ის მიღება. ახლა შესწავლობის განსაზღვრება არის აქტიქტურების ძებნა, რომელიც უკეთესი დაეხმარება, დაეწყვება და განსაზღვრება src და mt ინფორმაციის და მისი ინტერგურაცია პირველი ამ დოკუმენში ჩვენ მრავალ კოდირების მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელსაც ტრანსტრენცია. მაგრამ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ, ის (i) გამოყენებს ტრანფორმეტრის კოდერის ბლოკის src-ის განმავლობაში, ii) შემდეგ დეკოდერის ბლოკის განმავლობაში, მაგრამ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ, რომელიც ექსექტურად ექსექტურად მხოლოდ კოდერის კოდერი ჩვენი მოდელი ერთი BLEU წერტილი 2016, 2017 და 2018 ინგლისური-გერმანური APE-ის გაყოფილი საქმედები (PBSMT და NMT) გააკეთება. დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელის შედეგები WMT 2019 APE მონაცემების გამოყენებაში NMT მონაცემების გამოყენებაში გამოყენებული მონაცემები გამოყენებს შემდგომარებელი გამოყენება სი ჩვენი მოდელის ინფრენციის დრო იგივეა განილური ტრანფორმეტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტ ჩვენ ახალი ჩვენი კოდირების მნიშვნელობას შევხედავთ, რომ ძალიან პატარა ზომის სინამდვილეები უფრო მცირე გამოსახულება, როცა გამოსახულება კოდირების სინამდვილეების რაოდენობ', 'lt': 'Automatinio po redagavimo (APE) atveju prasminga sąlyguoti sprendimus po redagavimo (pe) tiek dėl šaltinio (src), tiek dėl mašinos vertimo teksto (mt) kaip įvedimą. Dėl to atsirado daugiakodifikatoriais pagrįstas neurologinis APE metodas. Dabar mokslinių tyrimų uždavinys – ieškoti architektūrų, kurios geriausiai paremtų src ir mt informacijos surinkimą, parengimą ir teikimą bei jos integraciją su sprendimais. Šiame dokumente pristatome veiksmingą daugiakodifikatoriumi pagrįstą APE model į, vadinamą perdavimu. Skirtingai nuo ankstesnių metodų, jis i) naudoja transformatoriaus kodavimo bloką src, ii) po jo nurodo dekoderio bloką, bet nenaudoja maskavimo, kad būtų galima susipažinti su mt, kuris veiksmingai veikia kaip antrasis kodavimo blokas, jungiantis src - mt, ir iii) šį atvaizdą įmaišo į galutinį dekoderio bloką, generuojantį pe. Our model outperforms the best performing systems by 1 BLEU point on the WMT 2016, 2017, and 2018 English-German APE shared tasks (PBSMT and NMT).  Be to, mūsų 2019 m. WMT APE užduoties modelio rezultatai naudojant NMT duomenis rodo, kad rezultatai yra panašūs į pažangiausią sistemą. Mūsų modelio pabaigos laikas panašus į vanilės transformatoriumi pagrįstą NMT sistemą, nors mūsų model is yra susijęs su dviem atskirais kodatoriais. Toliau tiriame naujai įdiegto antrojo koduotojo svarbą ir nustatome, kad per mažas sluoksnių kiekis kenkia veiklos rezultatams, tuo pat metu mažinant dekoderio sluoksnių skaičių nėra labai svarbu.', 'mk': 'Во автоматското постуредување (APE) има смисла да се условат одлуките по уредување (pe) за изворот (src) и машината преведен текст (mt) како влог. Ова доведе до пристапи на неврални APE базирани на мултикодери. A research challenge now is the search for architectures that best support the capture, preparation and provision of src and mt information and its integration with pe decisions.  Во овој документ претставуваме ефикасен мултикодер базиран модел APE, наречен трансференција. За разлика од претходните пристапи, истиот (i) користи блок за кодирање на трансформаторот за src, (ii) следен од блок за декодирање, но без маскирање за самото внимание на mt, кој ефикасно функционира како втор кодирач кој комбинира src - mt, и (iii) ја дава оваа претстава во финален блок за декодирање што генерира pe. Our model outperforms the best performing systems by 1 BLEU point on the WMT 2016, 2017, and 2018 English-German APE shared tasks (PBSMT and NMT).  Покрај тоа, резултатите од нашиот модел на задачата ВМТ 2019 АПЕ со користење на НМТ податоци покажуваат споредлива резултат со најсовремениот систем. Времето на инференцијата на нашиот модел е слично на НМТ системот базиран на ванилскиот трансформатор иако нашиот модел се однесува на два одделни кодери. Понатаму ја истражуваме важноста на нашиот ново воведен втор кодер и откриваме дека премногу мала количина слоеви ја повредуваат резултатот, додека намалувањето на бројот на слоеви на декодерот не е многу важно.', 'ms': 'In automatic post-editing (APE) it makes sense to condition post-editing (pe) decisions on both the source (src) and the machine translated text (mt) as input.  Ini telah membawa kepada pendekatan APE saraf berasaskan pelbagai pengekod. Satu cabaran penyelidikan sekarang ialah mencari arkitektur yang paling menyokong penangkapan, persiapan dan pemberian maklumat src dan mt dan integrasinya dengan keputusan pe. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan model APE berasaskan pelbagai pengekod yang efisien, dipanggil pemindahan. Tidak seperti pendekatan terdahulu, i a (i) menggunakan blok pengekod pengubah untuk src, (ii) diikuti blok pengekod, tetapi tanpa topeng untuk perhatian-diri pada mt, yang secara efektif bertindak sebagai pengekod kedua menggabungkan src - mt, dan (iii) memakan perwakilan ini ke blok pengekod terakhir yang menghasilkan pe. Model kami melebihi sistem prestasi terbaik dengan 1 titik BLEU pada WMT 2016, 2017, dan 2018 tugas kongsi APE Inggeris-Jerman (PBSMT dan NMT). Selain itu, keputusan model kita pada tugas APE WMT 2019 menggunakan data NMT menunjukkan prestasi yang sama dengan sistem state-of-the-art. Masa kesimpulan model kita sama dengan sistem NMT berasaskan pengubah vanila walaupun model kita berurusan dengan dua pengekod terpisah. Kami menyelidiki lebih lanjut penting pengekod kedua yang baru kami kenalkan dan mencari bahawa jumlah terlalu kecil lapisan yang menyakiti prestasi, sementara mengurangkan jumlah lapisan dekoder tidak penting banyak.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d (APE) സ്രോതസ്സ് സോര്\u200dസ് (src) എന്നിട്ടും മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് എന്നും അവസ് ഇത് പല-കോഡെര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d എപ്പി അടുത്തുവരുന്നതിലേക്കാണ്. ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു പരിശോധന വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാലം ഇപ്പോള്\u200d തന്നെയാണ് ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചറിയുന്നത്, പിടിക്കുന്നത്, തയ്യാറാക്കുന്നത്, സിസ്ക് വിവരങ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ മുള്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ എപ്പി മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള സമ്പ്രദായങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി അത് (i) ഒരു മാറ്റുന്ന കോഡെര്\u200d ബ്ലോക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, പിന്നീട് ഒരു ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d ബ്ലോക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, പക്ഷെ എംട്ടില്\u200d സ്വയം ശ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d WMT 2016, 2018 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d എപ്പി പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത പണികളില്\u200d 1 ബ്ലീയു പോയിന്റില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ കൂടാതെ, NMT ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എംഎംടി 2019 എപ്പിഎം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ അസുഖാനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സമയം വാനില്ലാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ NMT സിസ്റ്റം പോലെയാണ്. നമ്മു നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ രണ്ടാമത്തെ കോഡിറ്ററിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. കുറച്ച് ചെറിയ തട്ടുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തി', 'mt': 'In automatic post-editing (APE) it makes sense to condition post-editing (pe) decisions on both the source (src) and the machine translated text (mt) as input.  Dan wassal għal approċċi newrali APE bbażati fuq diversi kodifikaturi. Sfida ta’ riċerka issa hija t-tfittxija għal arkitetturi li jappoġġjaw l-aħjar il-qbid, it-tħejjija u l-forniment ta’ informazzjoni dwar is-src u mt u l-integrazzjoni tagħha mad-deċiżjonijiet. F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw mudell effiċjenti ta’ APE ibbażat fuq diversi kodifikaturi, imsejjaħ trasferiment. Għall-kuntrarju tal-approċċi preċedenti, huwa (i) juża blokk tal-kodifikatur tat-trasformatur għas-src, (ii) segwit minn blokk tad-dekoder, i żda mingħajr ma jaħbi għall-attenzjoni tiegħu stess fuq mt, li effettivament jaġixxi bħala t-tieni kodifikatur li jikkombina src - mt, u (iii) jgħaddi din ir-rappreżentazzjoni f’blokk tad-dekoder finali li jiġġenera pe. Il-mudell tagħna jaqbeż is-sistemi bl-aħjar prestazzjoni sa punt BLEU wieħed fuq il-WMT 2016, 2017, u 2018 kompiti kondiviżi bejn l-APE Ingliż u l-Ġermanja (PBSMT u NMT). Barra minn hekk, ir-riżultati tal-mudell tagħna dwar il-kompitu APE WMT 2019 bl-użu tad-dejta NMT juru prestazzjoni komparabbli mas-sistema l-aktar avvanzata. The inference time of our model is similar to the vanilla transformer-based NMT system although our model deals with two separate encoders.  Aħna ninvestigaw aktar l-importanza tat-tieni kodifikatur introdott reċentement tagħna u nsibu li ammont żgħir wisq ta’ saffi jagħmel ħsara lill-prestazzjoni, filwaqt li jnaqqas in-numru ta’ saffi tad-dekoder ma jagħmilx ħafna importanza.', 'no': 'I automatisk post- redigering (APE) har det mening til å betinge beslutningar etter redigering (pe) på både kjelden (src) og maskinen omsett tekst (mt) som inndata. Dette har førte til fleire koder baserte nærmingar av neirale APE. Eit forskningsutfordring no er søket etter arkitekturar som best støttar opptak, forberedning og tilbygging av src- og mt- informasjon og integrasjonen med pe- avgjøringar. I denne papiret presenterer vi eit effektivt multikoderabasert APE-modell, kalla overføring. I motsetjing til førre tilnærmingar bruker den i) ein transformeringskoderingsblokk for src, ii) etterfølgt av ein dekoderblok, men utan maskering for selvmerksomhet på mt, som fungerer effektivt som andre koder som kombinerer src - mt, og iii) køyrer denne representasjonen til ein siste dekoderblokk som genererar pe. Modellen vårt utfører dei beste utføringssystemene av 1 BLEU-punktet på WMT 2016, 2017 og 2018-engelsk-tysk APE-delte oppgåver (PBSMT og NMT). I tillegg viser resultatet av modellen vårt på WMT 2019 APE-oppgåva med NMT-data ein samanlikbar utvikling med kunstsystemet. Minsk tid på modellen vårt er liknande med vanyltransformeringssystemet NMT, men modellen vårt gjer med to separate kodar. Vi undersøker meir viktigheten for det nye koderen vår, og finn at for lite mengda lag skader utviklinga, mens det ikkje er viktig å redusera talet på laget i dekoderen.', 'pl': 'W automatycznej postedycji (APE) sensowne jest warunkowanie decyzji postedycyjnych (pe) zarówno w odniesieniu do źródła (src) jak i tekstu przetłumaczonego maszynowo (mt) jako wejścia. Doprowadziło to do wielokodorowych podejść neuronowych APE. Wyzwaniem badawczym jest obecnie poszukiwanie architektur, które najlepiej wspierają przechwytywanie, przygotowywanie i dostarczanie informacji src i mt oraz ich integrację z decyzjami PE. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy efektywny model APE oparty na wielokodorach, zwany transferem. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich podejść (i) używa bloku kodera transformatora dla src, (ii) po którym następuje blok dekodera, ale bez maskowania dla samej uwagi na mt, który skutecznie działa jako drugi koder łączący src% mt, i (iii) wprowadza tę reprezentację do końcowego bloku dekodera generującego pe. Nasz model przewyższa najlepiej wydajne systemy o jeden punkt BLEU na WMT 2016, 2017 i 2018 angielsko-niemieckich zadaniach APE wspólnych (PBSMT i NMT). Ponadto wyniki naszego modelu na zadaniu WMT 2019 APE z wykorzystaniem danych NMT pokazują porównywalną wydajność do najnowocześniejszego systemu. Czas wnioskowania naszego modelu jest podobny do systemu NMT opartego na transformatorze waniliowym, chociaż nasz model zajmuje się dwoma oddzielnymi koderami. Dalej badamy znaczenie naszego nowo wprowadzonego drugiego kodera i stwierdzimy, że zbyt mała ilość warstw szkodzi wydajności, podczas gdy zmniejszenie liczby warstw dekodera nie ma znaczenia.', 'ro': 'În post-editare automată (APE) este logic să condiționați deciziile post-editare (pe) atât asupra sursei (src), cât și textului tradus automat (mt) ca intrare. Acest lucru a dus la abordări APE neurale bazate pe multi-encoder. O provocare de cercetare este acum căutarea unor arhitecturi care să sprijine cel mai bine captarea, pregătirea și furnizarea de informații src și mt și integrarea acestora cu deciziile pe. În această lucrare prezentăm un model APE eficient bazat pe multi-encoder, numit transfer. Spre deosebire de abordările anterioare, acesta (i) folosește un bloc codificator transformator pentru src, (ii) urmat de un bloc decodor, dar fără mascare pentru auto-atenție pe mt, care acționează efectiv ca al doilea encoder combinând src - mt, și (iii) alimentează această reprezentare într-un bloc decodor final generând pe. Modelul nostru depășește cele mai performante sisteme cu 1 punct BLEU pe sarcinile partajate APE engleză-germană WMT 2016, 2017 și 2018 (PBSMT și NMT). În plus, rezultatele modelului nostru privind activitatea APE WMT 2019 utilizând date NMT arată o performanță comparabilă cu sistemul de ultimă generație. Timpul de inferență al modelului nostru este similar cu sistemul NMT bazat pe transformator de vanilie, deși modelul nostru se ocupă cu două encodere separate. Investigăm în continuare importanța celui de-al doilea encoder nou introdus și constatăm că o cantitate prea mică de straturi dăunează performanței, în timp ce reducerea numărului de straturi ale decodorului nu contează prea mult.', 'mn': 'Автоматик цахим хураагдах (APE) дээр эх үүсвэр (src) болон машин орчуулсан текст (mt) хоёуланг харуулах шаардлагатай байдал юм. Энэ нь олон коддоор суурилсан мэдрэлийн APE ойлголтыг хүргэсэн. Судалгааны сорилт бол сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээлэл болон mt шийдвэрлэлтэй хамтын архитектуруудыг хайж хамгийн сайн дэмждэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон кодлогчдын үндсэн APE загварыг тайлбарладаг. Өмнөх ойлголтын ялгаас (i) src-т шилжүүлэгч кодчуудын блокыг ашигладаг, (ii) декодчуудын блок, гэхдээ mt-д өөрийгөө анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлэхгүй бөгөөд энэ нь src-mt-г хоёр дахь кодчууд болгон ашигладаг бөгөөд (iii) энэ илэрхийллийг сүүлийн шилжүүлэгч блок үүсгэдэг б Бидний загвар нь 2016, 2017 оны WMT болон 2018 оны Англи-Германы APE-ын хамгийн сайн ажиллах системүүдийг ашигладаг. Мөн бидний WMT 2019 APE ажил дээрх загварын үр дүн нь NMT өгөгдлийн ашиглан харьцуулсан урлагийн системтэй харьцуулагдах үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг. Бидний загварын инференцийн цаг нь ваниллын шилжүүлэгчийн NMT системтэй төстэй. Гэхдээ бидний загварын загвар нь хоёр ялгаатай кодлогчтай холбоотой. Бид дахин шинэ нээлттэй хоёр дахь коддогчийн чухал зүйлийг судалж, хэтэрхий жижиг хэмжээний давхар нь ажиллагааг өвчиндөж байгааг олж мэднэ. Гэхдээ коддогчийн давхар хэмжээний тоо багасгах нь чу', 'sr': 'U automatskom posledišnjem redakciji (APE) ima smisla odluke nakon redakcije (pe) o izvoru (src) i mašini prevedeni tekst (mt) kao ulaz. To je dovelo do pristupa neurološkim APE-ima baziranih na multikoderu. Sada je istraživački izazov potražnja arhitektura koja najbolje podržava uhvaćenje, pripreme i pružanje informacija srca i mt i integraciju s odlukama o potpunosti. U ovom papiru predstavljamo efikasan multikoderski model APE koji se zove transferencija. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, i) koristi blok transformatora kodera za src, ii) slijedi blok dekodera, ali bez maskiranja samopouzdanja na mt, koji djeluje kao drugi koder kombinirajući src - mt, i iii) hrani ovu predstavu u konačni blok generirajući pe. Naš model iznosi najbolji izvršni sistem od 1 BLEU tačke na WMT 2016, 2017. i 2018. na engleskom-nemačkom APE-u zajedničkim zadatkima (PBSMT i NMT). Nadalje, rezultati našeg model a na zadatku WMT 2019 APE koristeći podatke NMT pokazuju usporedno izvršenje stanja umjetničkog sistema. Vrijeme infekcije našeg modela je sličan na sistemu NMT-a koji je baziran na vanili, iako se naš model odnosi na dva odvojena kodera. Nadalje istražujemo važnost našeg novog uvedenog drugog kodera i otkrijemo da previše mala količina slojeva povređuje učinkovitost, dok smanjenje broja slojeva dekodera nije mnogo bitno.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පස්ස සංපාදනය (APE) වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් පස්ස සංපාදනය (pe) තීර්ණාවක් තියෙන මේක ගොඩක් ඇන්කෝඩර් අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරාල් APE වලට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණ අභ්\u200dයාසයක් දැන් තමයි ස්ථාපනය සඳහා හොඳම අභ්\u200dයාසය, සූදානම් සහ සම්පූර්ණ තොරතුරු සහ සම්පූර්ණ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මාල්ටිකෝඩර් අධාරිත APE මොඩේල් එකක්, කියලා ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කි මුලින් අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක (i) src වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් ඇන්කෝඩර් බ්ලෝක් භාවිත කරනවා, (i) පස්සෙන් ඩිකෝඩර් බ්ලෝක් වෙනුවෙන් පස්සෙන් අවස්ථාවක් නැති වි අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්නේ WMT 2016, 2017 වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-ජර්මාන් APE වලින් හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය පද්ධතිය (PBSMT සහ NMT ඉතින්, WMT 2019 APE වැඩේ අපේ නිර්මාණයේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපේ මොඩල් එකේ පරීක්ෂණ කාලය වැනිල්ලා වෙනස් කරපු NMT පද්ධතියෙන් සමාන වෙනවා නමුත් අපේ මොඩල් වෙනස් කෝඩාර් දෙ අපි තවත් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අපේ අළුත් පරීක්ෂණයේ දෙවෙනි සංකේතකයාගේ වැදගත්ත වැදගත්තා හොයාගත්තා කියලා පොඩි සංකේතයක් ප්\u200dරශ', 'so': "Qoraalka dib-editidda (APE) waxey sabab u leedahay xaalad ku saabsan go'aanka ka dib-editidda (pe) ee asalka (src) iyo machine-ku turjuman text (mt) sida input. Tan waxay sababtay soo dhowaanshaha APE ee ku saleysan kooxo badan. Hadaba dhibaatada baaritaanku waa raadinta dhismaha ee ugu wanaagsan kaalmeeya qabsashada, diyaarinta iyo soo bixinta macluumaadka xarumaha iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo la qabsashada go'aanka khatarka ah. Warqadan waxaan ku qornaa model faa’iido leh oo ku saleysan APE, kaas oo la yidhaahdo wareejinta. Dhaqdooyinkii hore oo kala duwan (i) wuxuu isticmaalaa kooxa kooxaha bedelka ee src, (ii) kadibna waxaa loo soo jeedaa kooxaha dedeynta, laakiin aan goob u gaarin oo aan iskuul u jeedin mt, kaas oo si caqli ah u shaqeeyaa sida kooxerada labaad ee isugu qabta src - mt, iyo (iii) waxay u daabacdaa aqoonsigan si uu u noqdo qoraalka ugu dambeeya oo ka soo kordha eefaa. Tusaale ahaan ayaa sameynaya nidaamka ugu wanaagsan ee lagu sameeyo 1 BLEU barta WMT 2016, 2017, iyo 2018 Ingiriis-German APE (PBSMT iyo NMT). Furthermore, the results of our model on the WMT 2019 APE task using NMT data shows a comparable performance to the state-of-the-art system.  Waqtiga dhimiska modeleena waa mid u eg nidaamka beddelka ee bilowga ah ee NMT-ka hooseeya, habase yeeshee modellkayagu wuxuu ka shaqeeyaa laba kooxood oo kala duwan. Waxaynu sii baaraynaa muhiimka u ah kooxda labaad ee nooga soo bandhigay, waxaynu ogaannaa in qayb yar oo ka mid ah ayaa dhibaataysa sameynta, isla markaasna aan hoos u dhigno tirada saqafka deynta ma laha wax badan.", 'sv': 'I automatisk efterredigering (APE) är det meningsfullt att ange efterredigeringsbeslut (pe) på både källkod (src) och maskinöversatt text (mt) som indata. Detta har lett till multi-encoder baserade neurala APE metoder. En forskningsutmaning är nu sökandet efter arkitekturer som bäst stöder fångst, förberedelse och tillhandahållande av src och mt information och dess integration med de beslut som fattas. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en effektiv multi-encoder baserad APE-modell, kallad transfers. Till skillnad från tidigare tillvägagångssätt använder den (i) en transformator encoder block för src, (ii) följt av en dekoder block, men utan maskering för självuppmärksamhet på mt, som effektivt fungerar som andra encoder kombinerar src - mt, och (iii) matar denna representation i en slutlig dekoder block genererar pe. Vår modell överträffar de bästa systemen med 1 BLEU-punkt på WMT 2016, 2017 och 2018 engelsk-tyska APE delade uppgifter (PBSMT och NMT). Dessutom visar resultaten av vår modell på WMT 2019 APE-uppgiften med NMT-data en jämförbar prestanda med det senaste systemet. Slutsatstiden för vår modell liknar det vaniljtransformatorbaserade NMT-systemet, även om vår modell behandlar två separata kodare. Vi undersöker vidare vikten av vår nyintroducerade andra kodare och finner att en alltför liten mängd lager skadar prestandan, samtidigt som det inte spelar någon större roll att minska antalet lager i dekoden.', 'ta': '@ info இது பல- குறியீட்டு அடிப்படையிலான புதிய APE நெறிமுறைகளுக்கு வழிபட்டுள்ளது. ஆராய்ச்சி சவால் இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் மாற்றுதல் என்று பெயரிடப்பட்ட பல குறியீட்டு மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். முந்தைய செயல்பாடுகளை மாற்றும் குறியீட்டு தொகுதியை src, (i i) பின்னர் குறியீட்டாளர் தொகுதிக்கு பயன்படுத்தும், ஆனால் எம்ட் மீது தானே கவனத்திற்கு மூடாமல், அது இரண்டாவது குறியீட எங்கள் மாதிரி WMT 2016, 2017, மற்றும் 2018 ஆங்கிலம்- ஜெர்மன் APE பகிர்ந்த பணிகளில் 1 பிலியு புள்ளியில் சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டு அமைப்புகளை வெளியேற்று அதற்கும், WMT 2019 APE பணியின் மாதிரியின் முடிவு எங்கள் மாதிரியின் குறைந்த நேரம் பாய்நிலா மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலான NMT அமைப்பிற்கு சமமானது என்றாலும் எங்கள் மாதிரி இரண்டு  நாம் எங்கள் புதிய இரண்டாவது குறியீட்டின் முக்கியத்தை மேலும் ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் அதிகமாக சிறிய அடுக்குகள் செயல்படுத்தும் என்று', 'ur': 'آٹوٹ پیسٹ ویڈینگ (APE) میں اس کا منطقی ہے کہ سورج (src) اور ماشین کی ترجمہ ٹیکسٹ (mt) کے طور پر اینٹ کے طور پر موضوع پیسٹ ایڈینگ (pe) فیصلہ کریں۔ یہ multi-encoder based neural APE approaches کی وجہ سے ہے. آج ایک تحقیق چال ہے کہ معماری کے لئے تلاش کرنا ہے جو سب سے بہتر مضبوط ہے کہ src اور mt اطلاعات کے مطابق حاصل کریں، تیار کریں اور اطلاعات اور اس کی تفریق پر اچھے فیصلے کے ساتھ۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک مثبت multi-encoder بنیاد APE موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں، جن کا نام انتقال ہے. مختلف طریقے کے مطابق، یہ (i) src کے لئے تغییر دینے والا کوڈر بلوک استعمال کرتا ہے، ii) اس کے پیچھے ایک دکوڈر بلوک ہے، لیکن mt پر اپنی توجه کے بغیر ماسک کرتا ہے، جو اس کے مطابق دوسری کوڈر کے مطابق کرتا ہے کہ src - mt کو ترکیب دیتا ہے، اور iii) اس کی تصویر کو آخری دکوڈر بلوک میں کھ ہمارا موڈل ایک بلیوس پوینٹ 2016، 2017 اور 2018 انگلیسی-جرمن APE شریک کام (PBSMT اور NMT) کے ذریعہ سب سے بہترین کاربری سیستموں کو انجام دیتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، WMT 2019 APE کے کام پر ہمارے موڈل کا نتیجہ NMT ڈیٹا کے مطابق دکھاتا ہے کہ ان کی حالت-آرت سیسٹم کے ساتھ برابر عمل کرسکتا ہے. ہمارے موڈل کی نازل زمانہ وینلیا ٹرانسفور بنیادی NMT سیسٹم کے برابر ہے اگرچہ ہماری موڈل دو مختلف کوڈر سے معاملہ کرتی ہے۔ ہم اس سے بھی اچھا تحقیق کریں گے کہ ہمارے نئی دفعہ سے دوسرے کوڈر کو معلوم کیا گیا ہے اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ بہت ہی چھوٹی لائٹوں کی تعداد عملکرد کو نقصان پہنچاتی ہے اور دفعہ کوڈر کے لائٹوں کی تعداد کم کرنے کے لئے بہت اہم نہیں ہے', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name Taʼminlovchi muammolar bu arxivlar qidirishni juda yaxshi qo'llash, rac va m maʼlumot yordam berish va u o'zlarini pey xususiyatlari bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz APE asosidagi ko'plab kodlash modelini ko'proq ko'paytuvchimiz. @ info Bizning modelimiz WMT 2016, 2017 va 2018 Ingliz-Olmonchaga APE bilan bir yaxshi bajarish tizimini bajaradi (PBSMT va NMT). Ko'rsatilgan, WMT 2019 APE vazifaning modelimizning natijalari NMT maʼlumotlari bilan bir xil tizimga mos keladigan amalni ko'rsatadi. Modemizning cheksiz vaqti vanillar transformer asosiy NMT tizimga huddi, ammo modelmiz ikki alohida kodlash bilan boshlanadi. Biz yangi ikkinchi kodlash muhimligini boshqaramiz va qatlamning ko'p kichkina qatlam bajarishni qo'shiladi, lekin kodqotning sonlarini ko'p muhim emas.", 'vi': 'Theo lệnh tổng chỉnh tự động (APE) có nghĩa là điều chỉnh các quyết định sau khi sửa chữa (pe) cả nguồn (src) và đoạn sửa chữa máy đã dịch (mt) là nhập. Điều này đã dẫn đến các phương pháp theo yêu cầu đa mã hóa. Một thách thức nghiên cứu bây giờ là việc tìm kiếm các kiến trúc hỗ trợ tối đa để nắm bắt, chuẩn bị và cung cấp thông tin vớ vẩn, và kết hợp với những quyết định tuyệt vời. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình APA có nhiều mã hóa hiệu quả, gọi là chuyển giao. Không giống các phương pháp trước, nó (i) sử dụng một khối mã hóa chuyển hóa cho thư mục (src), tiếp theo là một khối giải mã, nhưng không bị che dạng để tự chú ý tới mt, thứ hai hoạt động như bộ mã hóa thứ hai kết hợp src- mt, và (III) cung cấp hình ảnh này thành một khối giải mã cuối cùng tạo ra pe. Cách của chúng tôi hoàn thành tốt nhất hệ thống biểu diễn bởi một liên minh liên quan tới WRT bây giờ, thẩm phán và thẩm phán APA (PBSMT và NMT). Hơn nữa, kết quả của mô hình của chúng ta về nhiệm vụ WRT A9, nhờ dữ liệu NMT đã cho thấy hiệu quả tương đương với hệ thống hiện đại. The infectionn time of our model is similar to the vani transformer-based NMT system though our model deals with two separate code. Chúng tôi còn điều tra tầm quan trọng của bộ mã hóa thứ hai mới được giới thiệu và thấy rằng một lượng quá nhỏ các lớp ảnh hưởng đến hiệu suất, trong khi giảm số lượng các lớp của bộ giải không quan trọng lắm.', 'da': 'I automatisk post-redigering (APE) giver det mening at betinge post-redigering (pe) beslutninger om både kilden (src) og den maskinoversatte tekst (mt) som input. Dette har ført til multi-encoder baseret neurale APE tilgange. En forskningsudfordring er nu søgningen efter arkitekturer, der bedst understøtter indsamling, udarbejdelse og levering af src og mt information og integration heraf med beslutninger. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en effektiv multi-encoder baseret APE model, kaldet transfernce. I modsætning til tidligere tilgange, det (i) bruger en transformer encoder blok for src, (ii) efterfulgt af en dekoder blok, men uden maskering for selvopmærksomhed på mt, som effektivt fungerer som anden encoder kombinerer src - mt, og (iii) fodrer denne repræsentation i en endelig dekoder blok genererer pe. Vores model overgår de bedst ydende systemer med 1 BLEU point på WMT 2016, 2017 og 2018 engelsk-tysk APE delte opgaver (PBSMT og NMT). Desuden viser resultaterne af vores model på WMT 2019 APE opgaven ved hjælp af NMT data en sammenlignelig ydeevne med det avancerede system. inferensetiden for vores model svarer til det vaniljetransformer-baserede NMT system, selvom vores model beskæftiger sig med to separate encodere. Vi undersøger yderligere vigtigheden af vores nyligt introducerede anden encoder og finder ud af, at en for lille mængde lag skader ydeevnen, mens reduktion af antallet af lag af dekoder ikke betyder meget.', 'hr': 'U automatskom posledištu redakcije (APE) ima smisla uvjetiti odluke nakon redakcije (pe) o izvoru (src) i uređaju prevedeni tekst (mt) kao ulaz. To je dovelo do višekodiranih neuroloških APE pristupa. Sada je istraživački izazov potražnja arhitektura koja najbolje podržava uhićenje, pripremu i pružanje src i mt informacija i integraciju njenih odluka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo efikasan multikoderski model APE-a, nazvan prebacivanje. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, i) koristi blok transformacije kodera za src, ii) slijedi blok dekodera, ali bez maskiranja samopozornosti na mt, koji djeluje kao drugi koder kombinirajući src - mt, i iii) hrani ovu zastupanje u konačni blok proizvođa ča dekodera. Naš model iznosi najbolji izvodnji sustav od 1 BLEU točke na WMT 2016, 2017. i 2018. na engleskom-njemačkom APE-u zajedničkim zadatkima (PBSMT i NMT). Nadalje, rezultati našeg model a na zadatku WMT 2019 APE koristeći podatke NMT-a pokazuju usporedbenu učinku s državnim umjetničkim sustavom. Vrijeme infekcije našeg modela je sličan na sustavu NMT-a koji se temelji na vanili transformera, iako se naš model odnosi na dva odvojena kodera. Dalje istražujemo važnost našeg novog uvođenog drugog kodera i otkrijemo da previše mala količina slojeva povrijeđuje učinkovitost, dok smanjenje broja slojeva dekodera nije mnogo važno.', 'bg': 'При автоматичното пост-редактиране (АПЕ) има смисъл да се определят пост-редактиране (пе) решения както за източника (src), така и за машинно преведения текст (mt) като вход. Това е довело до многокодиращи базирани невронни APE подходи. Предизвикателство за научните изследвания сега е търсенето на архитектури, които най-добре подкрепят улавянето, подготовката и предоставянето на информация и нейната интеграция с взимането на решения. В тази статия представяме ефективен мулти-кодер базиран модел, наречен трансфер. За разлика от предишните подходи, той (i) използва трансформаторен кодер блок за src, (ii) последван от декодерен блок, но без маскиране за самовнимание върху mt, който ефективно действа като втори кодер комбиниращ src - mt, и (iii) подава това представяне в окончателен декодерен блок генериращ пе. Нашият модел превъзхожда най-добре представящите се системи с 1 точка на споделените задачи на англо-германско-английски АПЕ 2016, 2017 и 2018 г. Освен това резултатите от модела ни по задачата АПЕ 2019, използвайки данни от НМТ, показват сравними резултати с най-съвременната система. Времето за заключение на нашия модел е подобно на ваниловата трансформаторна система, въпреки че нашият модел се занимава с два отделни кодера. Проучваме по-нататък значението на нововъведения втори кодер и откриваме, че твърде малко количество слоеве вреди на производителността, докато намаляването на броя на слоевете на декодера не е от голямо значение.', 'nl': 'Bij automatische post-editing (APE) is het zinvol om post-editing (pe) beslissingen te conditioneren op zowel de bron (src) als de machine vertaalde tekst (mt) als invoer. Dit heeft geleid tot multi-encoder gebaseerde neurale APE benaderingen. Een onderzoeksuitdaging is nu het zoeken naar architecturen die het beste ondersteunen bij het vastleggen, voorbereiden en verstrekken van src- en mt-informatie en de integratie ervan met pe-beslissingen. In dit artikel presenteren we een efficiënt multi-encoder gebaseerd APE model, genaamd transfer. In tegenstelling tot eerdere benaderingen gebruikt het (i) een transformatorencoderblok voor src, (ii) gevolgd door een decoderblok, maar zonder maskering voor zelfaandacht op mt, dat effectief fungeert als tweede encoder die src mmt combineert, en (iii) voedt deze representatie in een definitief decoderblok dat pe genereert. Ons model overtreft de best presterende systemen met 1 BLEU punt op de WMT 2016, 2017 en 2018 Engels-Duitse APE gedeelde taken (PBSMT en NMT). Verder tonen de resultaten van ons model op de WMT 2019 APE taak met NMT data een vergelijkbare prestatie als het state-of-the-art systeem. De inferentietijd van ons model is vergelijkbaar met het op vanille transformator gebaseerde NMT systeem hoewel ons model te maken heeft met twee afzonderlijke encoders. We onderzoeken verder het belang van onze nieuw geïntroduceerde tweede encoder en vinden dat een te kleine hoeveelheid lagen de prestaties schaadt, terwijl het verminderen van het aantal lagen van de decoder niet veel uitmaakt.', 'ko': '자동 후기 편집(APE)에서 원본 텍스트(src)와 기계 번역 텍스트(mt)를 입력 조건으로 후기 편집(pe) 결정을 하는 것은 의미가 있다.이것은 다중 인코더 기반의 신경 APE 방법을 초래했다.현재의 연구 도전은 src와 mt 정보의 포획, 준비와 제공, 그리고pe결정과 통합된 체계 구조를 찾는 것이다.본고에서 우리는 다중 인코더를 기반으로 하는 효율적인 APE 모델을 제시했는데 이를 이동이라고 한다.이전의 방법과 달리, 이것은 (i) src에 변압기 인코더 블록을 사용하고, (ii) 뒤에 디코더 블록을 사용하지만, mt의 자기주의를 차단하지 않으며, mt는 src-mt와 결합된 두 번째 인코더를 효과적으로 충당하고, (iii) 이것은pe를 생성하는 최종 디코더 블록을 입력하는 것을 의미한다.WMT 2016, 2017, 2018 영독 APE 공유 임무(PBSMT와 NMT)에서 우리 모델은 성능이 가장 좋은 시스템보다 1개의 BLEU 포인트가 높다.또한 NMT 데이터를 사용하여 WMT 2019 APE 임무에 대한 모델 결과에 따르면 최첨단 시스템과 비슷한 성능을 제공합니다.비록 우리의 모델은 두 개의 단독 인코더를 처리하지만, 우리의 모델의 추리 시간은 vanilla transformer 기반의 NMT 시스템과 비슷하다.우리는 새로 도입된 두 번째 인코더의 중요성을 한층 더 연구한 결과 너무 적은 층이 확실히 성능에 영향을 미칠 수 있지만 인코더의 층수를 줄이는 것은 중요하지 않다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Katika kuhariri mara baada ya kujitolea (APE) inaeleza kuwa na maana ya uamuzi wa baada ya kuhariri (pe) kwenye vyanzo vya habari (src) na mashine yanatafsiri maandishi (mt) kama input. Hii imepelekea mbinu za APE zilizoko kwa njia nyingi za uraia. Changamoto la utafiti kwa sasa ni kutafuta majengo ambayo inasaidia zaidi kukamatwa, kujiandaa na kutoa taarifa za simu za mkononi na ushirikiano wake kwa maamuzi ya uovu. Katika karatasi hii tunaweka modeli yenye ufanisi wa aina mbalimbali ya APE, inayoitwa uhamishaji. Tofauti na mbinu zilizopita (i) inatumia kizuizi cha mabadiliko kwa ajili ya src, (ii) kufuatia kizuizi cha decode, lakini bila kufungia nguo za kujitazama kwa mtazamo, ambacho kinafanya kazi kama kodi ya pili inayounganisha mrc - mt, na (iii) inatoa maoni haya kuwa bloko ya mwisho ya kupunguza kodi inayotengeneza pe pe. Mfano wetu unaonyesha mifumo bora ya kufanya kazi na pointi 1 BLEU kwenye WMT 2016, 2017, na mwaka 2018 Uingereza-Ujerumani APE ilishiriki kazi (PBSMT na NMT). Zaidi ya hayo, matokeo ya muundo wetu kwenye kazi ya WMT 2019 APE kwa kutumia data za NMT yanaonyesha ufanisi uliofanana na mfumo wa sanaa. Wakati wa upungufu wa mifano yetu unafanana na mfumo wa mabadiliko yasiyo na maana ya NMT ingawa mifano yetu inahusiana na kodi mbili tofauti. We further investigate the importance of our newly introduced second encoder and find that a too small amount of layers does hurt the performance, while reducing the number of layers of the decoder does not matter much.', 'de': 'In der automatischen Nachbearbeitung (APE) ist es sinnvoll, Nachbearbeitungsentscheidungen sowohl hinsichtlich der Quelle (src) als auch des maschinell übersetzten Textes (mt) als Eingabe zu konditionieren. Dies hat zu multi-encoderbasierten neuronalen APE-Ansätzen geführt. Eine Forschungsherausforderung besteht nun in der Suche nach Architekturen, die die Erfassung, Aufbereitung und Bereitstellung von src- und mt-Informationen und deren Integration mit PE-Entscheidungen am besten unterstützen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein effizientes Multi-Encoder basiertes APE-Modell vor, das Transference genannt wird. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Ansätzen verwendet es (i) einen Transformatorencoderblock für src, (ii) gefolgt von einem Decoderblock, jedoch ohne Maskierung zur Selbstachtung auf mt, der effektiv als zweiter Encoder fungiert, der src-mt kombiniert, und (iii) speist diese Darstellung in einen endgültigen Decoderblock, der pe erzeugt. Unser Modell übertrifft die leistungsstärksten Systeme um einen BLEU-Punkt auf den WMT 2016, 2017 und 2018 Englisch-German APE Shared Tasks (PBSMT und NMT). Darüber hinaus zeigen die Ergebnisse unseres Modells auf der WMT 2019 APE-Aufgabe unter Verwendung von NMT-Daten eine vergleichbare Performance mit dem State-of-the-Art-System. Die Inferenzzeit unseres Modells ist ähnlich wie beim Vanille-Transformator-basierten NMT-System, obwohl unser Modell mit zwei separaten Encodern arbeitet. Wir untersuchen weiter die Bedeutung unseres neu eingeführten zweiten Encoders und stellen fest, dass eine zu geringe Anzahl von Schichten die Leistung beeinträchtigt, während die Reduzierung der Anzahl der Schichten des Decoders keine große Rolle spielt.', 'id': 'Dalam post-edit otomatis (APE) itu masuk akal untuk kondisi post-edit (pe) keputusan pada kedua sumber (src) dan mesin terjemput teks (mt) sebagai input. Ini telah menyebabkan pendekatan APE saraf berbasis multi-encoder. Sebuah tantangan penelitian sekarang adalah pencarian arsitektur yang paling mendukung penangkapan, persiapan dan penyediaan informasi src dan mt dan integrasinya dengan keputusan pe. Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan model APE berbasis multikoder efisien, disebut transferensi. Unlike previous approaches, it (i) uses a transformer encoder block for src, (ii) followed by a decoder block, but without masking for self-attention on mt, which effectively acts as second encoder combining src - mt, and (iii) feeds this representation into a final decoder block generating pe.  Our model outperforms the best performing systems by 1 BLEU point on the WMT 2016, 2017, and 2018 English-German APE shared tasks (PBSMT and NMT).  Selain itu, hasil dari model kami pada tugas APE WMT 2019 menggunakan data NMT menunjukkan prestasi yang sama dengan sistem terbaik. Waktu kesimpulan dari model kita mirip dengan sistem NMT berbasis vanila walaupun model kita berurusan dengan dua pengekode terpisah. Kami menyelidiki lebih lanjut penting koder kedua yang baru kita kenalkan dan menemukan bahwa jumlah terlalu kecil lapisan yang menyakiti prestasi, sementara mengurangi jumlah lapisan dekoder tidak penting banyak.', 'tr': 'Otomatik gaýşartmak üçin (APE) senediň soňky editlemek üçin hem çeşmeler (src) we maşynyň terjime edilen metin (mt) gaýşartmaky mümkin edýär. Bu birnäçe ködleme taýýarlanan närem APE golaýarlaryna getirdi. Araşdyrma kynçysy şu wagt src we mt maglumatyny we özüniň üst kararlar bilen almak, taýýarlanmagy we çykarmagyny golaýlaýan arhitekturlyklar üçin göz önüne golaýarlar. Bu kagyzda etkinlik bir näçe ködleme taýýarlykly APE nusgasyny görkezip atýarys. Öňki golaýmalar ýaly, ol (i) src üçin bir ködleme kodçysyny ulanýar, (ii) yzarlanýar bir dekoder blok, ýöne mt üçin özüne üns bermez, ol ikinji ködleme bilen src - mt birleştirilýän ikinji ködleme hökmünde i şleýär, we (iii) bu representasyony son bir dekoder blok tarapyna süýtgeýär. Biziň modelimiz WMT 2016, 2017 we 2018-nji iňlisçe-nemesçe APE tarapynda iň gowy çeken sistemalary üstün edýär (PBSMT we NMT). Munuçta, WMT 2019 APE täbligimiziň netijesi NMT maglumatlaryny ulanan çykyşlarymyň üstüne çykyş-süzgeň sistemine ýakynlaşýar. Modelimiziň azalyş wagty vanilla transformer sistemine benzeýär. Modelimiz iki ayrı ködler bilen çykýar. Biz täze bir ködleşimiziň wajyplygyny maslahat edýäris we bu ýerde birnäçe kiçi gaty kalamlar etmäge yaratýar, dekoderiň gatynyň sanyny azaltyp wajyp ýok.', 'fa': 'در تغییر بعد از ویرایش (APE) خودکار، تصمیم\u200cهای بعد از ویرایش (pe) در مورد منبع (src) و ماشین متن (mt) به عنوان ورودی معنی دارد. این باعث شد به نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی APE بسیار زیادی از رمز\u200cدهندگان باشد. یک چالش تحقیق در حال حاضر، جستجوی معماری است که بهترین حمایت از دستگیر، آماده و تهیه اطلاعات src و mt و تهیه آن با تصمیم های pe است. در این کاغذ ما یک مدل APE بسیار قابل تغییر قابل فعالیت را نشان می دهیم. برخلاف دسترسی پیشینیان، آن (i) از یک بلوک تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده برای src (ii) استفاده می\u200cکند، بعد از یک بلوک\u200cدهنده، ولی بدون ماسک\u200cگذاری برای توجه خود به mt، که عملی به عنوان یک رمز دوم رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی src - mt، و (iii) این نمایش را به یک بلوک\u200cدهنده\u200cی نهایی تغییر می\u200c مدل ما بهترین سیستم\u200cهای اجرایی را با یک نقطه BLEU در WMT ۲۰۱۶، ۲۰۱۷ و ۲۰۱۸ مسئله\u200cهای مشترک انگلیسی-آلمانی APE (PBSMT و NMT) انجام می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، نتایج مدل ما روی کار WMT 2019 APE با استفاده از داده های NMT یک عملکرد قابل مقایسه با سیستم هنر نشان می دهد. زمان آلودگی مدل ما شبیه سیستم NMT بر اساس تغییر دهنده\u200cی وانیلا است، اگرچه مدل ما با دو کودهر جدا معامله می\u200cکند. ما بیشتر تحقیق مهمترین کودکار دوم تازه معرفی کرده\u200cایم و پیدا می\u200cکنیم که تعداد لایه\u200cهای کوچک زیادی به عملکرد آسیب می\u200cدهد، در حالی که تعداد لایه\u200cهای کودکان بسیار مهم نیست.', 'sq': 'Në posteditimin automatik (APE) ka kuptim të kushtojë vendimet pas editimit (pe) si për burimin (src) dhe tekstin e përkthyer nga makina (mt) si input. Kjo ka shpjerë në afrime nervore APE bazuar në shumë kodues. Një sfidë kërkimi tani është kërkimi për arkitektura që mbështesin më së miri kapjen, përgatitjen dhe furnizimin e informacionit src dhe mt dhe integrimin e tij me vendime pe. In this paper we present an efficient multi-encoder based APE model, called transference.  Ndryshe nga qasjet e mëparshme, ajo (i) përdor një bllok kodues transformues për src, (ii) pasuar nga një bllok dekoder, por pa maskuar për vetë-vëmendje në mt, i cili vepron efektivisht si kodues i dytë që kombinon src - mt dhe (iii) ushqen këtë përfaqësim në një bllok dekoder përfundimtar që gjeneron pe. Modeli ynë ekzekuton sistemet më të mirë me rezultate deri në 1 pikë BLEU në WMT 2016, 2017 dhe 2018 APE anglo-gjermane detyrat e përbashkëta (PBSMT dhe NMT). Përveç kësaj, rezultatet e modelit tonë në detyrën WMT 2019 APE duke përdorur të dhënat NMT tregojnë një performancë të krahasueshme me sistemin më të lartë. Koha e përfundimit e modelit tonë është e ngjashme me sistemin NMT të bazuar në transformuesit e vanilës megjithëse modeli ynë merret me dy koduesit e veçantë. Ne hetojmë më tej rëndësinë e koduesit tonë të ri të futur të dytë dhe zbulojmë se një sasi shumë e vogël shtresa e dëmton performancën, ndërsa reduktimi i numrit të shtresave të dekoderit nuk ka rëndësi shumë.', 'af': "In outomatiese post- redigeering (APE) maak dit sin na voorwaardes post- redigeering (pe) besluit op beide die bron (src) en die masjien vertaalde teks (mt) as invoer. Hierdie het gelei na multi- encoder gebaseerde neural APE toegang. 'n Ondersoektog uitdrukking is nou die soektog vir arkitektuure wat beste ondersteun die opvang, voorbereiding en verskaffing van src en mt inligting en sy integrasie met pe besluitings. In hierdie papier voorsien ons 'n effektief multi-enkoder gebaseerde APE-model, genoem oordrag. Ongelyks soos vorige toegang, gebruik dit (i)  'n transformer enkoderblok vir src, (ii) gevolg deur 'n dekoderblok, maar sonder maskering vir self-aandag op mt, wat effektief werk as tweede enkoder wat src - mt kombinieer, en (iii) voer hierdie voorstelling in 'n finale dekoderblok genereer pe. Ons model uitvoer die beste uitvoerde stelsels deur 1 BLEU punt op die WMT 2016, 2017 en 2018 Engels-Duits APE deel opdragte (PBSMT en NMT). Verder, die resultate van ons model op die WMT 2019 APE taak gebruik van NMT data vertoon 'n vergelykbare prestasie met die staat van die kuns stelsel. Die inferensie tyd van ons model is gelykbaar aan die vanilla transformer-gebaseerde NMT stelsel alhoewel ons model met twee aparte koders verwerk. Ons verder ondersoek die belangrikheid van ons nuwe ingevoerde tweede enkoder en vind dat 'n te klein hoeveelheid laag die prestasie skandeer, terwyl die aantal laag van die dekoder verduur het nie baie saak nie.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সম্পাদনার পর (APE) সিদ্ধান্ত উৎস (src) এবং মেশিন অনুবাদ করা টেক্সট (এমপি) ইনপুট হিসেবে সিদ্ধান্তের ব্যাপারে বুঝ This has led to multi-encoder based neural APE approaches.  এখন একটি গবেষণা চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে স্থাপনাগুলোর জন্য অনুসন্ধান যারা সিদ্ধান্ত গ্রেফতার, প্রস্তুতি এবং প্রস্তুতি এবং তথ্য প্রদা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি কার্যকর মাল্টি কোডারের ভিত্তিক এপিই মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি, যার নামে পরিবর্তন। পূর্ববর্তী ক্ষেত্রের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন উপায়ের জন্য এটি স্র আমাদের মডেল উইএমটি ২০১৬, ২০১৭ এবং ২০১৮ ইংরেজী জার্মান এপিই কাজ শেয়ার করেছে (পিবিএসএমটি এবং এনএমটি) দ্বারা ১ বিলিউ বিন্দুর মধ্যে সব এছাড়াও, এনএমটি ডাটা ব্যবহার করে আমাদের মডেলের ফলাফল এমটি ২০১৯ সালের ব্যাপারে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প ব্যবস্থার সা আমাদের মডেলের অসুস্থ সময় ভ্যানিলা পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক এনএমটি সিস্টেমের সাথে একই রকম, যদিও আমাদের মডেল দুটি বিভিন্ন এনকোড আমরা আরো তদন্ত করি আমাদের নতুন দ্বিতীয় এনকোডারের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয়টি এবং খুঁজে বের করি যে অনেক সামান্য পরিমাণ স্তর এই কার্যকল', 'am': 'በፖስታ ማቀናጃ ውስጥ (APE) የክፍለ ገጽ (p) ማስታወቂያውን በኩል (src) እና ማሻሻሻዊው የጽሑፉን ትርጉም (mt) እንደ input (input) የሚያስብ ነው፡፡ ይህ የብዙኮድ አካባቢ አካባቢ የውጤት አካባቢ አግኝቷል፡፡ ምርምር ግንኙነት አሁን የመዝገብ፣ ማዘጋጀት እና የኩነቶች መረጃዎችን እና ማሰናከል የመዝገብ ግንኙነትን ለመፈለግ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የፊደል አካባቢ አካባቢ የፊደል አካባቢ ምሳሌ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች በተለየ (i) ለRc (ii) የሚከተለውን የኮድ ኮድ አካባቢ ይጠቅማል፣ ነገር ግን ለራሱ ማስታወቂያ ሳይኖር፣ ይህንን የፊደል ኮድ ማቀናጃ ማቀናኘት የሁለተኛ የኮድ ኮድ ማቀናጃ እና (iii) ይህንን መልዕክት የፍጻሜ የድኮድ አካባቢ ማሳየት ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በ1 BLEU Point በWMT 2016፣ 2017 እና 2018 እንግሊዘኛ-ጀርመን APE የተካፈሉትን ስርዓቶች (PBSMT እና NMT) የተካፈሉትን ስርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የሞዴል ውጤቶች በWMT 2019 APE አድራሻ ላይ የNMT ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም ይተካከላል፡፡ የሞዴላያችን ዘመን የነካ ጊዜው የዋናሊ ለውጥ የNMT ሥርዓት ብጤ ነው፤ ሞዴላያችን ግን ሁለት የተለየ የኮድ ኮድ ተጨማሪ ቢሆን እንኳ ነው፡፡ አዲስ የሁለተኛውን የሆኑት የፊደል ኮድ ግንኙነታችንን ደግሞ እንመረምርዋለን፣ የደረጃዎቹም ቁጥር የሚያጎድለውን ነገር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ հետխմբագրման (APE) դեպքում իմաստավոր է պայմանավորել հետխմբագրման (pe) որոշումները նաև աղբյուրի (sc) և մեքենայի թարգմանված տեքստի (m) մասին որպես ներմուծք: Սա հանգեցրեց բազմակոդերի հիմնված նյարդային APE մոտեցումներին: Հիմա ուսումնասիրության մարտահրավերն է ճարտարապետությունների որոնումը, որոնք լավագույնը աջակցում են SSR և MT տեղեկատվության վերացմանը, պատրաստումը և տրամադրումը և դրանց ինտեգրացումը pe որոշումների հետ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի արդյունավետ բազմակոդերի հիմնված APE մոդել, որը կոչվում է փոխանցում: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ մոտեցումներին, այն (i) օգտագործում է ձևափոխողի կոդավորման բլոկ սրc-ի համար, (II) հետևում է կոդավորման բլոկ, բայց առանց դիմադրելու ինքնաուշադրության համար մթ-ի վրա, որը արդյունավետ գործում է որպես երկրորդ կոդավորում, որը համադրում է սրc-մթ, և (III) կերակրում է այս ներկայ Մեր մոդելը կատարում է ամենալավ արդյունքներ ունեցող համակարգերը 1 կետերով ավելի լավ արդյունքներ, քան 2016, 2017 թվականին և 2018 թվականին Անգլերեն-Գերմանական APE-ի ընդհանուր հանձնարարությունները (PBMT և NMT-ը): Furthermore, the results of our model on the WMT 2019 APE task using NMT data shows a comparable performance to the state-of-the-art system.  Մեր մոդելի եզրակացության ժամանակը նման է վանիլայի վերափոխման հիմնված NMT համակարգին, չնայած որ մեր մոդելը վերաբերում է երկու առանձին կոդավորների հետ: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք մեր նորից ներկայացված երկրորդ կոդերի կարևորությունը և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ չափազանց փոքր շերտեր վնասում են արդյունքը, մինչդեռ կոդերի շերտերի թիվը նվազեցնելը շատ կարևոր չէ:', 'az': 'Avtomatik post-editing (APE) i√ßind…ô, m…ônb…ônin (src) v…ô maŇ°inin √ßeviril…ôn metin (mt) il…ô daxil edilm…ôsi haqqńĪnda Ňü…ôkild…ô h√∂km verm…ôk anlamńĪna g…ôlir. Bu √ßoxlu kodlayńĪcńĪ n√∂ral APE t…ôsirl…ôrin…ô yol g√∂st…ôrdi. ńįndi araŇütńĪrma √ß…ôtinliyidir ki, src v…ô mt m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn tutulmasńĪ, t…ômizl…ônm…ôsi v…ô t…ômin etm…ôsini daha yaxŇüńĪ d…ôst…ôkl…ôndir…ôn arhitektarlarńĪn aramasńĪ v…ô h…ôddi q…ôrarlarla birlikl…ônm…ôsidir. Bu kańüńĪzda √ßoxlu kodlayńĪcńĪ APE modelini g√∂st…ôririk, bu t…ôkrarlama adlńĪ. ∆Źvv…ôlki yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪna b…ônz…ôr, o (i) src √ľ√ß√ľn transformer kodlayńĪcńĪ blońüunu istifad…ô edir, ii) bir dekoder blońüunun ardńĪnca g…ôlir, amma mt √ľst√ľnd…ô √∂z√ľn√ľn dikkatini gizl…ôtm…ôd…ôn, bu ikinci kodlayńĪcńĪ src - mt il…ô birl…ôŇüdirir, v…ô iii) bu representasyonu son dekoder blońüuna s√ľd edir. Bizim modelimiz WMT 2016, 2017 v…ô 2018 ńįngilizce-Alman APE paylaŇüdńĪńüńĪ iŇül…ôri (PBSMT v…ô NMT) il…ô 1 BLEU noktasńĪndan …ôn yaxŇüńĪ performans sisteml…ôrini aŇüńĪrńĪ √ßńĪxarńĪr. Daha sonra, WMT 2019 APE iŇül…ôrimizin sonu√ßlarńĪ NMT veril…ônl…ôrini istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk NMT veril…ônl…ôrinin Ňü…ôkli sistemi il…ô m√ľqayis…ôd…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn bir performans g√∂st…ôrir. Modelimizin infeksiya vaxtńĪ vanilla transformer-based NMT sistemin…ô b…ônz…ôyir. Modelimiz iki ayrńĪ kodlayńĪcńĪ il…ô g√∂r√ľn√ľr. Daha sonra yeni tanńĪdńĪqlarńĪmńĪz ikinci kodlayńĪcńĪmńĪzńĪn vacib…ôtini araŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq v…ô √ßox ki√ßik bir q…ôd…ôr s…ôviyy…ônin performansńĪna z…ôr…ôr verir, lakin dekoderin s…ôviyy…ôni azaltmaq √ßox √∂nemli deyildir.', 'et': 'Automaatse järeltöötluse (APE) puhul on mõistlik tingida järeltöötluse (pe) otsuseid nii lähte (src) kui ka masintõlgitud teksti (mt) sisendina. See on toonud kaasa mitme kodeerijaga põhinevad neuraalsed APE lähenemised. Teadusuuringute väljakutseks on nüüd otsida arhitektuure, mis kõige paremini toetaksid src- ja mt-teabe kogumist, ettevalmistamist ja edastamist ning selle integreerimist pe-otsustega. Käesolevas töös tutvustame efektiivset mitme kodeerijaga põhinevat APE mudelit, mida nimetatakse ülekandmiseks. Erinevalt varasematest lähenemisviisidest kasutab see i) trafokodeeriplokki src jaoks, (ii) millele järgneb dekoodriplokk, kuid ilma maskeerimata enesetähelepanu mt, mis toimib tõhusalt teise kodeerijana, kombineerides src-mt, ja iii) toidab selle esituse lõplikku dekoodriplokki, mis genereerib pe. Meie mudel ületab parimaid tulemusi süsteeme ühe BLEU punkti võrra WMT 2016, 2017 ja 2018 inglise-saksa APE jagatud ülesannetel (PBSMT ja NMT). Lisaks näitavad NMT andmeid kasutava WMT 2019 APE ülesande mudeli tulemused võrreldavat jõudlust kaasaegse süsteemiga. Meie mudeli järeldusaeg on sarnane vaniljetrafol põhineva NMT süsteemiga, kuigi meie mudel tegeleb kahe eraldi kodeerijaga. Uurime täiendavalt meie äsja kasutusele võetud teise kodeerija tähtsust ja leiame, et liiga väike hulk kihte kahjustab jõudlust, samas kui dekoodri kihtide arvu vähendamine ei ole eriti oluline.', 'cs': 'V automatickém posteditování (APE) má smysl podmínit posteditační rozhodnutí (pe) jak na zdrojovém (src) tak strojově přeloženém textu (mt) jako vstupu. To vedlo k multi-kodérovým neuronovým APE přístupům. Výzkumnou výzvou je nyní hledání architektur, které nejlépe podporují zachycování, přípravu a poskytování src a mt informací a jejich integraci s PE rozhodnutími. V tomto článku představujeme efektivní model APE založený na multi-encoderu nazývaný transfer. Na rozdíl od předchozích přístupů (i) používá transformátorový blok snímače pro src, (ii) následovaný dekodérovým blokem, ale bez maskování pro sebe-pozornost na mt, který efektivně funguje jako druhý snímač kombinující src%mt, a (iii) tuto reprezentaci vkládá do konečného bloku dekodéru generujícího pe. Náš model překonává nejlepší systémy o jeden BLEU bod na WMT 2016, 2017 a 2018 anglicko-německé APE sdílené úlohy (PBSMT a NMT). Dále výsledky našeho modelu na úlohu WMT 2019 APE s využitím NMT dat ukazují srovnatelný výkon s nejmodernějším systémem. Doba inference našeho modelu je podobná systému NMT založenému na vanilkovém transformátoru, i když náš model se zabývá dvěma samostatnými snímači. Dále zkoumáme důležitost našeho nově zavedeného druhého kodéru a zjišťujeme, že příliš malé množství vrstev poškozuje výkon, zatímco snížení počtu vrstev dekodéru příliš nezáleží.', 'fi': 'Automaattisessa jälkimuokkauksessa (APE) on järkevää asettaa jälkimuokkauspäätökset syötteenä sekä lähteeseen (src) että konekäännettyyn tekstiin (mt). Tämä on johtanut monikoodereihin perustuviin neuroAPE-lähestymistapoihin. Tutkimuksen haasteena on nyt etsiä arkkitehtuureja, jotka parhaiten tukevat src- ja mt-tietojen keräämistä, valmistelua ja toimittamista sekä niiden integroimista pe-päätöksiin. Tässä työssä esittelemme tehokkaan monikooderipohjaisen APE-mallin, siirtomallin. Toisin kuin aiemmissa lähestymistavoissa, se (i) käyttää muuntajakoooderilohkoa src:lle, (ii) jota seuraa dekooderilohko, mutta ilman, että se peittää itsehuomion mt:llä, joka toimii tehokkaasti toisena koodaajana yhdistäen src:n - mt:n, ja (iii) syöttää tämän esityksen lopulliseksi dekooderilohkoksi, joka tuottaa pe:tä. Mallimme suoriutuu parhaiten suoriutuvista järjestelmistä yhdellä BLEU-pisteellä WMT 2016, 2017 ja 2018 englannin-saksan APE:n yhteisissä tehtävissä (PBSMT ja NMT). Lisäksi NMT-dataa hyödyntävän WMT 2019 APE-tehtävämallimme tulokset osoittavat, että suorituskyky on verrattavissa uusimpaan järjestelmään. Mallimme päättelyaika on samanlainen kuin vaniljamuodottimeen perustuva NMT-järjestelmä, vaikka mallimme käsittelee kahta erillistä kooderia. Tutkimme edelleen uuden kooderin merkitystä ja huomaamme, että liian pieni määrä kerroksia vahingoittaa suorituskykyä, vaikka dekooderin kerrosten määrän vähentäminen ei ole tärkeää.', 'bs': 'U automatskom posledišnjem redakciji (APE) ima smisla uvjetiti odluke nakon redakcije (pe) o izvoru (src) i uređaju prevedeni tekst (mt) kao ulaz. To je dovelo do pristupa neurološkim APE-ima baziranih na multikoderu. Sada je istraživački izazov potražnja arhitektura koja najbolje podržava uhićenje, pripremu i pružanje src i mt informacija i integraciju s odlukama o potpunosti. U ovom papiru predstavljamo efikasni multikoderski model APE, koji se zove transferencija. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, i) koristi blok transformatora kodera za src, ii) slijedi blok dekodera, ali bez maskiranja samopouzdanja na mt, koji djeluje kao drugi koder kombinirajući src - mt, i iii) hrani ovu zastupanje u konačni blok proizvođa ča dekodera. Naš model iznosi najbolji izvršni sistem od 1 BLEU točke na WMT 2016, 2017. i 2018. na engleskom-nemačkom APE-u zajedničkim zadatkima (PBSMT i NMT). Nadalje, rezultati našeg model a na zadatku WMT 2019 APE korištenju podataka NMT pokazuju usporedbenu funkciju sa državnim umjetničkim sistemom. Vrijeme infekcije našeg modela je sličan na sistemu NMT-a koji je baziran na vanili, iako se naš model odnosi na dva odvojena kodera. Dalje istražujemo važnost našeg novog uvođenog drugog kodera i otkrijemo da previše mala količina slojeva povrijeđuje učinkovitost, dok smanjenje broja slojeva dekodera nije mnogo važno.', 'ca': "En la post-edició automàtica (APE) té sentit condicionar les decisions post-edicions (pe) tant en la font (src) com en el text traduit per la màquina (mt) com en entrada. Això ha portat a abords neurolàtics APE basats en múltiples codificadors. Un repte de recerca ara és la cerca d'arquitectures que suporten millor la captura, preparació i proporció d'informació src i mt i la seva integració amb les decisions pe. En aquest paper presentem un model eficient d'APE basat en múltiples codificadors, anomenat transferència. A diferència dels enfocaments anteriors, i) utilitza un bloc de codificador de transformador per src, ii) seguit d'un bloc de codificador, però sense mascarar per autoatenció en mt, que actua efectivament com a segon codificador combinant src - mt, i iii) alimenta aquesta representació en un bloc de codificador final generant pe. El nostre model supera els millors sistemes d'un punt BLEU en WMT 2016, 2017 i 2018 tasques compartides anglès-alemanya APE (PBSMT i NMT). A més, els resultats del nostre model de la tasca APE WMT 2019 utilitzant les dades NMT mostran un rendiment comparable al sistema més avançat. El temps de inferència del nostre model és similar al sistema NMT basat en transformadors de vanilla encara que el nostre model té en compte dos codificadors separats. Encara investigam la importància del nostre segon codificador nou introduït i descobrim que una quantitat massa petita de capes fa mal al rendiment, mentre redueixen el nombre de capes del codificador no importa gaire.", 'he': 'בעורך אוטומטי לאחר העורה (APE) הגיוני לתקן החלטות לאחר העורה (pe) על המקור (src) והמכונה תורגם טקסט (mt) כתוצאה. This has led to multi-encoder based neural APE approaches.  אתגר מחקר כעת הוא החיפוש אחר ארכיטקטורות שמתמיכות הכי טוב לתפוס, הכינוי וספקה של מידע SRC וממ בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים מודל APE מובסס ביותר קודד יעיל, שנקרא העברה. בניגוד לגישות קודמות, הוא (i) משתמש בלוק קודד משתנה עבור src, (ii) אחריו בלוק קודד, אבל בלי מסיכה עבור תשומת לב עצמית על mt, אשר פועל באופן יעיל כקודד שני שיkombin src - mt, ו (iii) מאכיל את הייצג הזה בלוק קודד סופי יוצר pe. המודל שלנו מוביל את מערכות ההופעה הטובה ביותר עד נקודה אחת של BLEU על WMT 2016, 2017, ו 2018 APE אנגלית-גרמנית משותפת משימות (PBSMT ו NMT). חוץ מזה, התוצאות של המודל שלנו על משימה APE WMT 2019 בשימוש נתונים NMT מראות ביצועים שווים למערכת המדינה. זמן ההנחה של המודל שלנו דומה למערכת NMT מבוססת על משנה ונילה למרות שהמודל שלנו מתמודד עם שני קודים נפרדים. אנו חוקרים יותר את חשיבותו של הקודן השני המוציא החדש שלנו ומצאים כי כמות קטנה מדי של שכבות פוגעות בהופעה, בזמן שהפחית מספר שכבות של הקודר לא משנה הרבה.', 'jv': 'Nang otomatik nakong-editing (ApE) iki dadi seneng wis ngerasakno nggawe pawaran mulasakno lagi nggawe kelompok (src) lan kelompok nggawe teks (mt) nganggo input. Iki lak wis rampungan karo akeh koder, sampeyan NGE multi. Awak perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar aturan kanggo nggawe architecture sing luwih nggawe Captain, ndheke lan ijol-ijolan src lan mt informasi lan entegaturasi dipoleh kanggo disimperasan pe. Nang pebuk iki, kita mulai akeh koder multi-teko model ApaE, dadi jenis terus akses Tanggal gambar kelas pawang rang, iso (i) nggunakake blok transformer koder kanggo src,i ii) siweh dilakope blok decoder Model sing iso nggawe sistem sing paling nggawe barang sampeyan 1B luwih dumateng ning WT (2011, 2011, karo ingles-German ApE) sing berarti dadi (PGSMT karo NMT). Label Tanggala gambaran ning model sing dumadhi kaya sistem NMT sing basa gambaran karo model sing dibutuhke karo koder uwong sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo nggawe barang nggawe koder segondi iki banget nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang nggawe gantiné, winih dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang langkung alah sing bakal terus nggawe kudu winih dhéwé.', 'ha': "@ action: button Wannan ya ƙara zuwa masu motsi na kwamfyuta masu baka multi-kode. Babu rabo a yanzu ni'anar kwamfyutan filinaiki masu ƙaranci matsayin da ke ƙaranci tsarin, kuma a sami da tsari da information na src da mutane da kuma ta haɗa shi da zaɓen miski. Ga wannan takardan da Muke gaurar da wata misãla mai amfani da multi-kode mai amfani da wanda ake kiran a transference. Di daidaita gaura da suka gabata, shi yana amfani da block-kode ta shige wa src, (i i) wanda aka ƙara wata block na kodi, kuma amma bã ya kiyaye kwamfyuta wa kansa-nau'i, wanda yana yin aiki kamar kode na biyu wanda ke haɗa src - mfm, kuma (i) yana ciyarwa wannan wakin zuwa wata block na ƙarshen kodkoder mai zata pe. MisalinMu na samar da mafi kyaun performing system by 1 BLEU point on the WMT 2016, 2017, and 2018-English-Jarman EMET share ayyuka (PBSMT and NMT). Furan haka, matsalan misalin mu kan aikin WMT 2019 na amfani da data na NMT yana nuna wani mai kama da halin-the-art. Lokacin da aka kasa na motalinmu kamar na'urar da aka shige na tsarin NMT da aka baka ta baka ƙarya, kuma kõ da kuma misalinmu yana shagala da kodi biyu guda. Tuna tambayar muhimmin kodi na guda na ƙara, kuma munã gane cewa, jama'a kaɗan na zartar da aikin, kuma amma ƙaranci ƙidãyar candango na kodi bai zama mai amfani ba.", 'sk': 'Pri avtomatičnem postnem urejanju (APE) je smiselno pogojevati odločitve o postnem urejanju (pe) na vir (src) in strojno prevedenem besedilu (mt) kot vhodu. To je pripeljalo do večkodirnih nevronskih APE pristopov. Raziskovalni izziv je zdaj iskanje arhitektur, ki najbolje podpirajo zajemanje, pripravo in zagotavljanje src in mt informacij ter njihovo integracijo z odločitvami o pe. V prispevku predstavljamo učinkovit model APE, ki temelji na več kodirnikih, imenovan prenos. Za razliko od prejšnjih pristopov (i) uporablja transformatorski kodirni blok za src, (ii) sledi dekodirni blok, vendar brez skrivanja samopozornosti na mt, ki učinkovito deluje kot drugi kodirnik, ki združuje src - mt, in (iii) podaja to predstavitev v končni dekodirni blok, ki generira pe. Naš model presega najboljše zmogljive sisteme za 1 točko BLEU na skupnih nalogah WMT 2016, 2017 in 2018 angleško-nemškega APE (PBSMT in NMT). Poleg tega rezultati našega modela za nalogo WMT 2019 APE z uporabo podatkov NMT kažejo primerljivo delovanje z najsodobnejšim sistemom. Sklepni čas našega modela je podoben NMT sistemu na osnovi vanilije transformatorjev, čeprav naš model obravnava dva ločena kodirnika. Nadalje raziskujemo pomen našega novega drugega kodirnika in ugotovimo, da premajhna količina plasti škodi zmogljivosti, zmanjšanje števila plasti dekodirnika pa ni veliko pomembno.', 'bo': 'In automatic post-editing (APE)it makes sense to condition post-editing (pe) decisions on both the source (src) and the machine translated text (mt) as input. འདིས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Research challenge now is the search for architectures that best support the capture, preparation and provision of src and mt information and its integration with pe decisions. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྣ་ཨིན་རྟགས་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་APE་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། Unlike previous approaches, it (i) uses a transformer encoder block for src, (ii) followed by a decoder block, but without masking for self-attention on mt, which effectively acts as second encoder combining src - mt, and (iii) feeds this representation into a final decoder block generating pe. Our model outperforms the best performing systems by 1 BLEU point on the WMT 2016, 2017, and 2018 English-German APE shared tasks (PBSMT and NMT). Furthermore, the results of our model on the WMT 2019 APE task using NMT data shows a comparable performance to the state-of-the-art system. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་རྐྱེན་དུས་འདྲ་ནི་vanilla་ལུས་འགྱུར་བའི་NMT་རིགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་པའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་བྱས་པའི་གསལ་རྟགས་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཉུང་བའི་བགོ་རིམ་པ་དེ་ཉུང་'}
{'en': 'A Simple and Effective Approach to Robust Unsupervised Bilingual Dictionary Induction', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem simples e eficaz para indução robusta de dicionário bilíngue não supervisionado', 'ar': 'طريقة بسيطة وفعالة لاستقراء قاموس ثنائي اللغة قوي وغير خاضع للإشراف', 'es': 'Un enfoque simple y eficaz para la inducción sólida de diccionarios bilingües sin supervisión', 'fr': 'Une approche simple et efficace pour une introduction robuste à un dictionnaire bilingue non supervisé', 'ja': '堅牢で監督されていないバイリンガル辞書紹介へのシンプルで効果的なアプローチ', 'ru': 'Простой и эффективный подход к эффективной индукции двуязычного словаря без контроля', 'zh': '一简效者鲁棒式无监督双语词典归法', 'hi': 'मजबूत असुरक्षित द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण के लिए एक सरल और प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Simplí Éifeachtach maidir le hIonduchtú Foclóra Dátheangach Láidir Gan Mhaoirseacht', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια απλή και αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για την εύρωστη μη εποπτευόμενη δίγλωσση επαγωγή λεξικού', 'hu': 'Egyszerű és hatékony megközelítés a robusztus, felügyeletlen kétnyelvű szótár indukciójához', 'it': 'Un approccio semplice ed efficace alla robusta induzione bilingue non sorvegliata del dizionario', 'kk': 'Қарапайым және эффективті Робустық шектелмеген екі сөздік индукциясы', 'lt': 'Paprastas ir veiksmingas požiūris į tvirtą, neprižiūrimą dvikalbį žodyną', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ബിലിങ്കുള്ള നിഘണ്ടിന്റെ നിരീക്ഷണം', 'mt': 'Approċċ Simpli u Effettiv għal Induzzjoni Bilingwali b’saħħitha u Mhux Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүнгүй хоёр давтагдсан үеийн зохиолын зохиолын энгийн, эффективны ойлголт', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'O abordare simplă și eficientă a inducției bilingve robuste nesupravegheate', 'sr': 'Jednostavni i efikasni pristup snažnom neodržavanom dvostrukom dizajneru', 'pl': 'Proste i skuteczne podejście do solidnego niekontrolowanego dwujęzycznego słownika indukcji', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Kaalmada Robust', 'sv': 'En enkel och effektiv metod för robust oövervakad tvåspråkig ordbok Induktion', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک ساده اور اثرات طریقے کے لئے بہت سی ناپاکیزہ دوسری لکھنے والی تکلیف', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp đơn giản và hiệu quả để thao túng ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Един прост и ефективен подход към стабилна неконтролирана двуезична индукция на речника', 'da': 'En enkel og effektiv tilgang til robust, ukontrolleret tosproget ordbogsinduktion', 'nl': 'Een eenvoudige en effectieve aanpak voor robuuste niet-begeleide tweetalige woordenboek inductie', 'hr': 'Jednostavni i učinkoviti pristup čvrstom neodržavanom dvostrukom dizajneru', 'de': 'Ein einfacher und effektiver Ansatz zur robusten, nicht überwachten zweisprachigen Wörterbuchinduktion', 'ko': '간단하고 효과적인 루팡 무감독 이중 언어 사전 귀납 방법', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Sebuah pendekatan sederhana dan Efektif untuk Induksi Kamus Bahasa Berbahasa yang Tak Tersupervisi Kekuatan', 'sw': 'Utafiti rahisi na wenye ufanisi wa Robust', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Robustyň gaýd edilmedik iki sany sözlük gaýşartmak üçin basit we etkinlik bir ýarym', 'sq': 'Një qasje e thjeshtë dhe efektive ndaj induksionit të fortë të fjalëkalimit të paaftë', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Պարզ և արդյունավետ մոտեցումը ուժեղ և անվերահսկված երկլեզու բառարանի արտադրման համար', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'Qüvvətli, müəyyən edilməmiş İkinci Sözlük Induksyonuna Basit və Efektiv Yaxınlıq', 'ca': 'Un enfocament senzill i efectiu a la robusta inducció del diccionari bilingüe sense supervisió', 'bs': 'Jednostavni i efikasni pristup snažnom neodržavanom dvostrukom dizajneru', 'cs': 'Jednoduchý a efektivní přístup k robustní nehlídané dvojjazyčné indukci slovníku', 'et': 'Lihtne ja tõhus lähenemisviis tugevale järelevalveta kahekeelsele sõnaraamatule induktsioonile', 'fi': 'Yksinkertainen ja tehokas lähestymistapa vankkaan valvomattoman kaksikielisen sanakirjan induktioon', 'he': 'A Simple and Effective Approach to Robust Unsupervised Bilingual Dictionary Induction', 'sk': 'Preprost in učinkovit pristop k robustni indukciji dvojezičnega slovarja brez nadzora', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Apa semplin lan effek dadi akèh sabên kanggo nguasai Rêbtur Bilingual Diyekunêm ngerasai', 'bo': 'སྙིང་རྡུད་དང་ནུས་པ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་མེད་པའི་ཟུར་ཐོག་ཅིག་གི་འགྲོ་སྤེལ་ན།'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Bilingual Dictionary Induction methods based on the initialization and the self-learning have achieved great success in similar language pairs, e.g., English-Spanish. But they still fail and have an accuracy of 0 % in many distant language pairs, e.g., English-Japanese. In this work, we show that this failure results from the gap between the actual initialization performance and the minimum initialization performance for the self-learning to succeed. We propose Iterative Dimension Reduction to bridge this gap. Our experiments show that this simple method does not hamper the performance of similar language pairs and achieves an accuracy of 13.64 55.53 % between English and four distant languages, i.e., Chinese, Japanese, Vietnamese and Thai.', 'fr': "Les méthodes d'initiation au dictionnaire bilingue non supervisé basées sur l'initialisation et l'auto-apprentissage ont connu un grand succès dans des paires de langues similaires, par exemple, anglais-espagnol. Mais ils échouent toujours et ont une précision de 0\xa0% dans de nombreuses paires de langues éloignées, par exemple, anglais-japonais. Dans ce travail, nous montrons que cet échec résulte de l'écart entre les performances d'initialisation réelles et les performances d'initialisation minimales pour que l'auto-apprentissage réussisse. Nous proposons une réduction itérative de la dimension pour combler cet écart. Nos expériences montrent que cette méthode simple n'entrave pas les performances de paires de langues similaires et atteint une précision de 13,64 55,53% entre l'anglais et quatre langues éloignées, à savoir le chinois, le japonais, le vietnamien et le thaï.", 'ar': 'حققت أساليب الاستقراء بالقاموس ثنائي اللغة غير الخاضعة للإشراف والمبنية على التهيئة والتعلم الذاتي نجاحًا كبيرًا في أزواج لغوية متشابهة ، على سبيل المثال ، الإنجليزية-الإسبانية. لكنهم ما زالوا يفشلون ولديهم دقة 0٪ في العديد من أزواج اللغات البعيدة ، على سبيل المثال ، الإنجليزية-اليابانية. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أن هذا الفشل ناتج عن الفجوة بين أداء التهيئة الفعلي وأداء التهيئة الأدنى لنجاح التعلم الذاتي. نقترح تقليص الأبعاد المتكررة لسد هذه الفجوة. تظهر تجاربنا أن هذه الطريقة البسيطة لا تعرقل أداء أزواج اللغات المتشابهة وتحقق دقة 13.64 55.53٪ بين الإنجليزية وأربع لغات بعيدة ، أي الصينية واليابانية والفيتنامية والتايلاندية.', 'es': 'Los métodos de inducción de diccionarios bilingües no supervisados basados en la inicialización y el autoaprendizaje han logrado un gran éxito en pares de idiomas similares, por ejemplo, inglés-español. Pero siguen fallando y tienen una precisión del 0% en muchos pares de idiomas distantes, por ejemplo, el inglés y el japonés. En este trabajo, mostramos que este error es el resultado de la brecha entre el rendimiento de inicialización real y el rendimiento de inicialización mínimo para que el autoaprendizaje tenga éxito. Proponemos la reducción iterativa de dimensiones para cerrar esta brecha. Nuestros experimentos muestran que este método simple no obstaculiza el rendimiento de pares de idiomas similares y logra una precisión del 13,64 55,53% entre el inglés y cuatro idiomas distantes, es decir, chino, japonés, vietnamita y tailandés.', 'pt': 'Métodos de indução de dicionário bilíngue não supervisionado baseados na inicialização e no auto-aprendizado obtiveram grande sucesso em pares de idiomas semelhantes, por exemplo, inglês-espanhol. Mas eles ainda falham e têm uma precisão de 0% em muitos pares de idiomas distantes, por exemplo, inglês-japonês. Neste trabalho, mostramos que essa falha resulta da lacuna entre o desempenho real de inicialização e o desempenho mínimo de inicialização para que o auto-aprendizado seja bem-sucedido. Propomos a Redução de Dimensão Iterativa para preencher essa lacuna. Nossos experimentos mostram que esse método simples não prejudica o desempenho de pares de idiomas semelhantes e atinge uma precisão de 13,64 55,53% entre inglês e quatro idiomas distantes, ou seja, chinês, japonês, vietnamita e tailandês.', 'ja': '初期化と自己学習に基づく、監督されていないバイリンガル辞書帰納法は、英語とスペイン語などの類似の言語ペアで大きな成功を収めている。しかし、それらは依然として失敗しており、英語と日本語など、多くの遠隔の言語ペアで0%の精度があります。この研究では、この失敗は、自己学習が成功するための実際の初期化パフォーマンスと最小初期化パフォーマンスとの間のギャップから生じることを示しています。このギャップを埋めるために反復寸法縮小を提案します。私たちの実験は、この単純な方法が同様の言語ペアのパフォーマンスを妨げず、英語と4つの遠隔言語、すなわち中国語、日本語、ベトナム語、タイ語の間で13.64 55.53 ％の精度を達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '盖初始化、自学之无监督双语词典归之于言(如英语 - 西班牙语)之大成也。 然犹败,且远言于(如英语 - 日语)中准确性为0%。 此败由实初始化性与学成之最小初始化性相去也。 议迭代降维来弥合。 吾实验言之,其法不妨相似语言之性,而英语与四远之言(即中文,日语越南语、泰语)、13.64 55.53%之准确率也。', 'hi': 'प्रारंभ और आत्म-सीखने के आधार पर असुरक्षित द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण विधियों ने समान भाषा जोड़े में बड़ी सफलता हासिल की है, उदाहरण के लिए, अंग्रेजी-स्पेनिश। लेकिन वे अभी भी विफल हो जाते हैं और कई दूर की भाषा जोड़े में 0% की सटीकता रखते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, अंग्रेजी-जापानी। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि यह विफलता वास्तविक प्रारंभिक प्रदर्शन और सफल होने के लिए आत्म-सीखने के लिए न्यूनतम प्रारंभिक प्रदर्शन के बीच के अंतर से होती है। हम इस अंतर को पाटने के लिए पुनरावर्ती आयाम न्यूनीकरण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि यह सरल विधि समान भाषा जोड़े के प्रदर्शन को बाधित नहीं करती है और अंग्रेजी और चार दूर की भाषाओं के बीच 13.64 55.53% की सटीकता प्राप्त करती है, यानी, चीनी, जापानी, वियतनामी और थाई।', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемые методы индукции двуязычного словаря, основанные на инициализации и самообучении, достигли больших успехов в аналогичных языковых парах, например, в английском и испанском языках. Но они все равно терпят неудачу и имеют точность 0% во многих отдаленных языковых парах, например, англо-японский. В этой работе мы показываем, что этот сбой является результатом разрыва между фактической производительностью инициализации и минимальной производительностью инициализации для успешного самообучения. Для преодоления этого разрыва мы предлагаем итерационное уменьшение размеров. Наши эксперименты показывают, что этот простой метод не препятствует работе похожих языковых пар и достигает точности 13,64 55,53% между английским и четырьмя удаленными языками, т.е. китайским, японским, вьетнамским и тайским.', 'ga': 'Foclóir Dátheangach Gan Mhaoirseacht Tá an-rath ar mhodhanna ionduchtaithe bunaithe ar an inisealú agus ar an bhféinfhoghlaim i bpéirí teanga comhchosúla, m.sh. Béarla-Spáinnis. Ach teipeann orthu fós agus tá cruinneas 0% acu i go leor péirí teanga i bhfad i gcéin, m.sh., Béarla-Seapáinis. San obair seo, léirímid go bhfuil an teip seo mar thoradh ar an mbearna idir an fheidhmíocht tosaigh iarbhír agus an fheidhmíocht tosaigh íosta chun go n-éireoidh leis an bhféinfhoghlaim. Molaimid Laghdú Toise Atrialach chun an bhearna seo a líonadh. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh nach gcuireann an modh simplí seo isteach ar fheidhmíocht péirí teangacha comhchosúla agus go mbaineann sé amach cruinneas 13.64 55.53% idir Béarla agus ceithre theanga i bhfad i gcéin, i.e., Sínis, Seapáinis, Vítneaimis agus Téalainnis.', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli kétnyelvű szótár Az inicializáláson és öntanuláson alapuló indukciós módszerek nagy sikert értek el hasonló nyelvpárokban, pl. angol-spanyol. De még mindig nem sikerül, és 0%-os pontossággal rendelkeznek számos távoli nyelvpárban, például angol-japán. Ebben a munkában megmutatjuk, hogy ez a hiba a tényleges inicializációs teljesítmény és a minimális inicializációs teljesítmény közötti különbség az öntanulás sikeréhez. Az Iteratív dimenziócsökkentést javasoljuk ennek a szakadéknak a áthidalása érdekében. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy ez az egyszerű módszer nem akadályozza a hasonló nyelvpárok teljesítményét, és 13,64 55,53%-os pontosságot ér el angol és négy távoli nyelv, azaz kínai, japán, vietnámi és thai között.', 'el': 'Οι μέθοδοι επαγωγής δίγλωσσου λεξικού που βασίζονται στην αρχικοποίηση και την αυτομάθηση έχουν επιτύχει μεγάλη επιτυχία σε παρόμοια γλωσσικά ζεύγη, π.χ. Αγγλικά-Ισπανικά. Αλλά εξακολουθούν να αποτυγχάνουν και έχουν ακρίβεια 0% σε πολλά μακρινά γλωσσικά ζεύγη, π.χ. Αγγλικά-Ιαπωνικά. Σε αυτή την εργασία, δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η αποτυχία προκύπτει από το χάσμα μεταξύ της πραγματικής απόδοσης αρχικοποίησης και της ελάχιστης απόδοσης αρχικοποίησης για την επιτυχία της αυτομάθησης. Προτείνουμε την Επαναστατική Μείωση Διάστασης για να γεφυρώσουμε αυτό το χάσμα. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι αυτή η απλή μέθοδος δεν εμποδίζει την απόδοση παρόμοιων γλωσσικών ζευγαριών και επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 13.64 55.53% μεταξύ των αγγλικών και τεσσάρων μακρινών γλωσσών, δηλαδή των κινεζικών, ιαπωνικών, βιετναμέζικων και ταϊλανδέζικων.', 'ka': 'ბილინგური სიტყვარის ინდექციის მეტი, რომელიც ინციალიზაციაზე და თავისწავლებისთვის უფრო ძალიან წარმატებულია სხვადასხვა ენის ზოგაში, მაგალითად, ინგლისური-სპანული. მაგრამ ისინი უკვე არ შეუძლებელია და 0% უფრო დამატებული ენის ზოგები, მაგალითად, ინგლისური-იაპონური. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს შეცდომა შემდეგ განსხვავება რეალური ინციალიზაციის განსხვავებაზე და მინიმალური ინციალიზაციის განსხვავებაზე თავისწავლების განსხვავ ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ გადავაკეთოთ ეს გარეშე. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ ეს მარტივი პროცემი არ შეუძლიათ იგივე სიტყვების მუშაობას და 13.64 55.53% ინგლისური და 4 განსხვავებული ენების შორის წარმოდგენა, მაგალითად, ჩინეთი, იაპონეთ', 'it': "I metodi di induzione basati sull'inizializzazione e l'auto-apprendimento hanno raggiunto un grande successo in coppie linguistiche simili, ad esempio inglese-spagnolo. Ma continuano a fallire e hanno una precisione dello 0% in molte coppie di lingue lontane, ad esempio inglese-giapponese. In questo lavoro, mostriamo che questo errore deriva dal divario tra le prestazioni effettive di inizializzazione e le prestazioni minime di inizializzazione per il successo dell'auto-apprendimento. Proponiamo la riduzione delle dimensioni iterative per colmare questo divario. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che questo semplice metodo non ostacola le prestazioni di coppie linguistiche simili e raggiunge una precisione del 13,64 55,53% tra inglese e quattro lingue lontane, vale a dire cinese, giapponese, vietnamita e tailandese.", 'lt': 'Neaprižiūrimi dvikalbių žodžių indukcijos metodai, pagrįsti inicializacija ir savarankiškumu, pasiekė didelę sėkmę panašiose kalbų porose, pvz., anglų ir ispanų kalbomis. Tačiau jie vis dar neveikia ir yra tikslūs 0 proc. daugelyje tolimų kalbų porų, pvz., anglų-japonų. Šiame darbe parodome, kad šis nesėkmė atsiranda dėl atotrūkio tarp faktinio inicijavimo rezultatų ir minimalaus inicijavimo rezultatų, kad savarankiškas mokymasis būtų sėkmingas. Siūlome sumažinti pakartotinį matmenį, kad būtų pašalinta ši spraga. Our experiments show that this simple method does not hamper the performance of similar language pairs and achieves an accuracy of 13.64 55.53% between English and four distant languages, i.e., Chinese, Japanese, Vietnamese and Thai.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуваните методи на индукција на двојниот речник базирани на иницијализацијата и самоучењето постигнаа голем успех во слични јазички парови, на пример, англиско-шпански. Но тие сé уште не успеваат и имаат точност од 0% во многу далечни јазички парови, на пример, англиско-јапонски. In this work, we show that this failure results from the gap between the actual initialization performance and the minimum initialization performance for the self-learning to succeed.  Предлагаме намалување на итеративната димензија за да ја преминеме оваа празнина. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека овој едноставен метод не го попречува изведувањето на слични јазички парови и постигнува точност од 13,64 55,53 отсто помеѓу англиски и четири далечни јазици, односно кинески, јапонски, виетнамски и тајландски.', 'kk': 'Инициализациялауға негізделген және өз оқытуға ұқсас тілдер екеуінде, мысалы, ағылшын- испан тілдерінің жұмыс істеу әдістері болды. Бірақ олар әлі жарамсыз болып, көп қашықтағы тіл екеуінде 0% дұрыс бар, мысалы, ағылшын- жапон. Бұл жұмыс істегенде, бұл жаңылыс істеу жұмыс істеу жұмыс істеу жұмыс істеу және өзіңіздің істеу жұмыс істеу үшін төменгі істеу жұмыс істеу жұмыс істеу ара Бұл бос орынды көшірмелеу үшін қайталау өлшемін азайту жұмыс істейміз. Біздің тәжірибеміздің бұл қарапайым тәсілі ұқсас тілдердің жұмысын көмектеспейді және 13,64 55,53% ағылшын тілдер мен төрт қашықтағы тілдер арасында дұрыс жеткізеді, япон, Вьетнам және Тайландық.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത ബില്\u200dലിങ്കുള്ള നിഘണ്ടികങ്ങളുടെ രീതികള്\u200d, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-സ്പാനിഷ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്  പക്ഷെ അവരിപ്പോഴും പരാജയപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. വളരെ ദൂരെയുള്ള ഭാഷ ജോട്ടുകാരില്\u200d 0% കൃത്യമുണ്ട്, ഉദാ. ഇംഗ്ലീ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഈ പരാജയപ്പെട്ടു, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ തുടക്കത്തിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും സ്വയം പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും കുറഞ് ഈ വ്യത്യാസത്തിന്റെ പ്രിഡ്ജ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇറ്റേറ്റര്\u200dട്ടീവ് ഡിമെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഇതുപോലുള്ള ഭാഷ ഇണകളുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തെ തടഞ്ഞിട്ടില്ല എന്നാണ്, ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും നാലു ദൂരെയുള്ള ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയില്\u200d', 'ms': 'Kaedah Induksi Kamus Bilingual tidak dikendalikan berdasarkan pemasangan dan pembelajaran diri telah mencapai sukses besar dalam pasangan bahasa yang sama, cth., bahasa Inggeris-Sepanyol. Tetapi mereka masih gagal dan mempunyai ketepatan 0% dalam banyak pasangan bahasa jauh, misalnya bahasa Inggeris-Jepun. Dalam kerja ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa kegagalan ini berasal dari jarak antara prestasi awal sebenar dan prestasi awal minimum untuk belajar diri berjaya. Kami cadangkan Kekurangan Dimensi Iteratif untuk menyelesaikan ruang ini. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah sederhana ini tidak menghalang prestasi pasangan bahasa yang sama dan mencapai ketepatan 13.64 55.53% antara bahasa Inggeris dan empat bahasa jauh, iaitu bahasa Cina, Jepun, Vietnam dan Thailand.', 'mt': 'Metodi ta’ Induzzjoni tad-Dikjarazzjoni Bilingwali mhux sorveljati bbażati fuq l-inizjalizzazzjoni u t-tagħlim awtonomu kisbu suċċess kbir f’par ta’ lingwi simili, e ż., Ingliż-Spanjol. Iżda g ħadhom ifallu u għandhom preċiżjoni ta’ 0% f’ħafna pari ta’ lingwi distanti, e ż., Ingliż-Ġappuniż. F’dan ix-xogħol, naraw li dan il-falliment jirriżulta mid-distakk bejn il-prestazzjoni attwali tal-inizjalizzazzjoni u l-prestazzjoni minima tal-inizjalizzazzjoni biex it-tagħlim awtonomu jirnexxi. Aħna nipproponu Tnaqqis tad-Dimensjoni Iterattiva biex nilqgħu din id-distakk. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li dan il-metodu sempliċi ma jfixkilx il-prestazzjoni ta’ pari ta’ lingwi simili u jikseb preċi żjoni ta’ 13.64 55.53% bejn l-Ingliż u erba’ lingwi distanti, jiġifieri ċ-Ċiniż, il-Ġappuniż, il-Vjetnamiż u t-Tajlandiż.', 'pl': 'Metody indukcji dwujęzycznego słownika oparte na inicjalizacji i samouczeniu się osiągnęły ogromny sukces w podobnych parach językowych, np. angielsko-hiszpańskim. Ale nadal nie udają się i mają dokładność 0% w wielu odległych parach językowych, np. angielsko-japońskich. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że awaria ta wynika z luki między rzeczywistą wydajnością inicjalizacji a minimalną wydajnością inicjalizacji, aby samouczenie się osiągnęło sukces. Proponujemy zmniejszenie wymiarów iteracyjnych, aby wypełnić tę lukę. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że ta prosta metoda nie utrudnia wydajności podobnych par językowych i osiąga dokładność 13.64 55.53% pomiędzy angielskim a czterema odległymi językami, tj. chińskim, japońskim, wietnamskim i tajskim.', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta bilenguelt ordbokinduksjonsmetoder basert på oppstarten og selvlæringa har oppnådd stor suksess i liknande språkopar, f.eks. engelsk-spansk. Men dei har fremdeles feil og nøyaktig 0% i mange lange språkopar, f.eks. engelsk-japansk. I denne arbeida viser vi at denne feilen resulterer frå avstanden mellom den aktuelle oppstartsfunksjonen og den minimale oppstartsfunksjonen for selvlæringa å velja. Vi foreslår å redusera gjentavne dimensjonar for å bryta dette mellomrommet. Eksperimentane våre viser at denne enkle metoden ikkje avbryter utviklinga av liknande språkparar og når det gjer noko nøyaktig mellom engelsk og fire lange språk, dvs. kinesisk, japansk, Vietnamsk og Thaisk.', 'mn': 'Эхлээд, өөртөө суралцах нь төстэй хэлний хоёр, жишээлбэл Англи-Испанийн хоёр хоёр дахь гайхалтай амжилт гарч ирсэн. Гэхдээ тэд бүтэлгүйтдэг, олон хоорондын хэл хоорондоо 0% тодорхой байдаг. Жишээ нь Англи-Япон. Энэ ажил дээр бид энэ бүтэлгүйтэл нь үнэндээ эхлүүлэх үйл ажиллагааны хоорондын ялгаа болон өөрийн суралцах үйл ажиллагааны хамгийн бага хэмжээний үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байна. Бид энэ ялгааг давхаруулахын тулд хэмжээний багасгалыг санал болгож байна. Бидний туршилтууд энэ энгийн арга нь төстэй хэл хоорондын үйлдвэрлэлийг зогсоож, Англи, дөрвөн хоорондын хоорондох 13.64 55.53% нь тодорхой байдаг.', 'ro': 'Metodele de inducție bazate pe inițializare și auto-învățare au obținut un mare succes în perechi de limbi similare, de exemplu, engleză-spaniolă. Dar ele încă eșuează și au o precizie de 0% în multe perechi de limbi îndepărtate, de exemplu, engleză-japoneză. În această lucrare, arătăm că acest eșec rezultă din decalajul dintre performanța efectivă de inițializare și performanța minimă de inițializare pentru a reuși auto-învățarea. Propunem Reducerea Iterativă a Dimensiunii pentru a elimina acest decalaj. Experimentele noastre arată că această metodă simplă nu împiedică performanța perechilor de limbi similare și atinge o precizie de 13,64 55,53% între engleză și patru limbi îndepărtate, adică chineză, japoneză, vietnameză și thailandeză.', 'sr': 'Neobezbeđene metode indukcije bilingualnog rečnika na osnovu inicijalizacije i samouučenja postigle su veliki uspeh u sličnim jezičkim parovima, na primjer engleski-španjolski. Ali još uvek nisu uspeli i imaju preciznost od 0% u mnogim udaljenim jezičkim parovima, npr. engleski-japanski. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da ovaj neuspjeh rezultira iz praznine između stvarne funkcije inicijalizacije i minimalne inicijalizacije za uspeh samouučenja. Predlažemo smanjenje iterativne dimenzije da prekršimo ovaj praznik. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da ova jednostavna metoda ne ometa izvedbu sličnih jezičkih parova i postiže tačnost od 13,64 55,53% između engleskog i četiri udaljenih jezika, tj. kineskog, japanskog, Vijetnamskog i Tajlandskog.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada afka luqada ah e e aan la ilaalinayn, waxay ku saleysay bilowga iyo iskuulka iskuulka ah liibaanshay guud weyn oo ku qoran labada luqadood oo isku mid ah, tusaale ahaan Ingiriis-Isbanish. Laakin weli way tabaryaraadaan, waxayna sax ku leeyihiin boqolkiiba oo ku yaala labo badan oo af fog, tusaale ahaan Ingiriis-jabanees. Shaqadan, waxan tusnaynaa in khaladdaas ay ka timaadaan kala duwan sameynta bilowga iyo sameynta bilowga ugu hooseeya ee u liibaanshaha iskuulka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in la koobo qeybinta qasabka ah Imtixaankayada waxay muujinayaan in qaababkan fudud aysan dhibaateyn aragtida labo oo isku mid ah, wuxuuna gaadhaa sax ah 13.64 55.53% oo ka dhexeeya ingiriisiga iyo afar luqadood oo fog, tusaale ahaan Shiino, Jabanees, Fietnaam iyo Tayland.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරාරම්භය සහ ස්වයංග්\u200dරීය විදියට අවස්ථාව නැති බිලින්ගුල් භාෂාවක් අවස්ථාව සඳහා ස්වයංග්\u200dරීය ස්පැනිස් වලින ඒත් ඔවුන් තවමත් අසාර්ථක වෙලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම දුරස්ථ භාෂා ජොපානිස් එක්ක 0% තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ අසමත් විදියට ඇත්තටම පටන් ගන්න ප්\u200dරභාව සහ ස්වයං ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් අඩුම අවස්ථ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ විශාලය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් වගේ භාෂාවක් ජාතිකයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්නේ නැහැ ඒ වගේම ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සහ දුරක් භාෂ', 'sv': 'Induktionsmetoder baserade på initialisering och självlärande har uppnått stor framgång i liknande språkpar, t.ex. engelska-spanska. Men de misslyckas fortfarande och har en noggrannhet på 0% i många avlägsna språkpar, t.ex. engelsk-japanska. I detta arbete visar vi att detta misslyckande beror på klyftan mellan den faktiska initialiseringsprestandan och minimiinitialiseringsprestandan för att självinlärningen ska lyckas. Vi föreslår Iterativ Dimension Reduction för att överbrygga denna klyfta. Våra experiment visar att denna enkla metod inte hindrar prestandan av liknande språkpar och uppnår en noggrannhet på 13,64 55,53% mellan engelska och fyra avlägsna språk, dvs kinesiska, japanska, vietnamesiska och thailändska.', 'ta': 'Unsupervised Bilingual Dictionary Induction methods based on the initialization and the self-learning have achieved great success in similar language pairs, e.g., English-Spanish.  ஆனால் அவர்கள் இன்னும் தோல்வி மற்றும் தூரத்தில் இருந்த மொழி ஜோடிகளில் 0% சரியான மதிப்பு இருக்கிறது, உதாரணமாக, ஆங இந்த வேலையில், இந்த தோல்வி வெற்றி வெற்றிகரமாக இருக்கும் உண்மையான துவக்க செயல்பாட்டிற்கும் இடையில் இருந்து காட்டுகிறது மற்ற நாம் இந்த இடைவெளியை பிரித்து செய்ய வேண்டும் தீர்வு குறைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறார்கள் என்றால் இந்த எளிய முறையான முறையில் அதே போன்ற மொழி ஜோடிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை தடுக்காது மற்றும் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் நான்கு', 'ur': 'بے حفاظت دوئلینگ ڈیکلینگ اینڈکتशन طریقے آغاز کرنا اور خود سکھانے کے ذریعے ایک جیسے زبان جوڑوں میں بہت بڑی کامیابی پہنچ گئی ہے، جیسے انگلیسی-اسپانیایی. لیکن وہ ابھی بھی ناکام ہیں اور بہت دور زبان جوڑوں میں 0% کی دقیق ہے، جیسے انگلیسی-جاپانی. ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ غلطی سفارش سفارش کے نتیجے ہیں حقیقی پیدائش کے کامیابی کے درمیان اور سفارش کے لئے کمترین پیدائش کے کامیابی کے نتیجے ہیں. ہم اس جگہ کو دھوپ کرنے کے لئے دوبارہ اندازہ کم کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ یہ ساده طریقہ برابر زبان جوڑوں کے عملکرد کو ہٹاتی نہیں ہے اور 13.64 55.53% انگلیسی اور چار دور زبانوں کے درمیان ایک دقیق پہنچتی ہے، یعنی چینی, جاپانی, ویتنام اور تائیل کے درمیان۔', 'vi': 'Cách thao túng ngôn ngữ không giám sát dựa trên sự khởi đầu và tự học đã đạt được nhiều thành công trong các cặp ngôn ngữ tương tự, ví dụ, tiếng Anh-Tây Ban Nha. Nhưng họ vẫn thất bại và có độ chính xác cao 0. Trong nhiều cặp ngôn ngữ xa xôi, ví dụ như, Anh-Nhật. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi cho thấy sự thất bại này là kết quả của khoảng cách giữa khả năng khởi tạo thực sự và mức độ khởi đầu tối thiểu cho việc tự học thành công. Chúng tôi đề nghị giảm giá ngang tác động để lấp chỗ trống. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng phương pháp đơn giản này không cản trở các cặp ngôn ngữ tương tự và đạt được độ chính xác của 13.645.thậm chí còn hơn cả tiếng Anh và bốn ngôn ngữ xa, tức là Trung Quốc, Nhật, Việt và Thái.', 'uz': "@ info: status Lekin ular doim muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi va ko'pchilik tilning ko'pchilik qo'lingizda 0% tizimi, masalan ingliz-Японcha. Bu ishda, bu muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatganimiz mumkin, bu xabarga ishga tushirish natijasi va o'z o'rganish uchun eng kichkina ishga tushirish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi. Biz bu gapni ajratish uchun juda muhim oʻlchamini kamaytirish talab qilamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz esa bu oddiy usul huddi tillar ikkita xitoblar natijasini ko'rsatadi va ingliz tilidagi 13.64 55.53% va to'rtta uzoq tildagi to'rt so'zlar orasidagi xitoycha, japoncha, Vietnam va Taycha tilida aniqlanishni oshirish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Методите за индукция на двуезични речници, базирани на инициализацията и самообучението, са постигнали голям успех в подобни езикови двойки, напр. английски-испански. Но те все още се провалят и имат точност от 0% в много далечни езикови двойки, например английски-японски. В тази работа показваме, че този неуспех е резултат от пропастта между действителното изпълнение на инициализацията и минималното изпълнение на инициализацията, за да успее самообучението. Предлагаме намаляване на итеративното измерение за преодоляване на тази пропаст. Нашите експерименти показват, че този прост метод не пречи на изпълнението на подобни езикови двойки и постига точност от 13.64 55.53% между английски и четири отдалечени езика, т.е. китайски, японски, виетнамски и тайландски.', 'da': 'Induktionsmetoder baseret på initialisering og selvlæring har opnået stor succes i lignende sprogpar, f.eks. engelsk-spansk. Men de fejler stadig og har en nøjagtighed på 0% i mange fjerntliggende sprogpar, f.eks. engelsk-japansk. I dette arbejde viser vi, at denne fejl skyldes kløften mellem den faktiske initialiseringsydeevne og minimum initialiseringsydeevne for selvlæringen at lykkes. Vi foreslår Iterative Dimension Reduction for at bygge bro over denne kløft. Vores eksperimenter viser, at denne enkle metode ikke hæmmer udførelsen af lignende sprogpar og opnår en nøjagtighed på 13,64 55,53% mellem engelsk og fire fjerntliggende sprog, dvs. kinesisk, japansk, vietnamesisk og thailandsk.', 'nl': 'Niet-begeleide Tweetalige Dictionary Inductie methoden gebaseerd op de initialisatie en het zelfleren hebben grote successen geboekt in vergelijkbare taalparen, bijvoorbeeld Engels-Spaans. Maar ze falen nog steeds en hebben een nauwkeurigheid van 0% in veel verre taalparen, bijvoorbeeld Engels-Japans. In dit werk laten we zien dat deze mislukking het gevolg is van de kloof tussen de werkelijke initialisatieprestaties en de minimale initialisatieprestaties voor de zelflerende om te slagen. We stellen Iterative Dimensie Reduction voor om deze kloof te overbruggen. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat deze eenvoudige methode de prestaties van vergelijkbare taalparen niet belemmert en een nauwkeurigheid van 13.64 55.53% bereikt tussen het Engels en vier verre talen, namelijk Chinees, Japans, Vietnamees en Thais.', 'hr': 'Nesuprotstavljene metode indukcije bilingualnog riječnika na temelju inicijalizacije i samouučenja postigle su veliki uspjeh u sličnim jezičkim parovima, na primjer engleski-španjolski. Ali još uvijek nisu uspjeli i imaju preciznost od 0% u mnogim udaljenim jezičkim parovima, npr. engleski-japanski. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da ovaj neuspjeh rezultira iz razdoblja između stvarnog izvođenja inicijalizacije i minimalnog izvođenja inicijalizacije za uspjeh samouučenja. Predlažemo smanjenje Iterativne dimenzije da prekršimo taj praznik. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da ova jednostavna metoda ne ometa učinkovitost sličnih jezičkih parova i postiže točnost od 13,64 55,53% između engleskog i četiri udaljenih jezika, tj. Kineskog, Japanskog, Vijetnamskog i Tajlandskog.', 'de': 'Unüberwachte zweisprachige Dictionary Induktionsmethoden, die auf der Initialisierung und dem Selbstlernen basieren, haben große Erfolge in ähnlichen Sprachpaaren erzielt, z.B. Englisch-Spanisch. Aber sie scheitern immer noch und haben eine Genauigkeit von 0% in vielen entfernten Sprachpaaren, z.B. Englisch-Japanisch. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass dieser Fehler auf die Lücke zwischen der tatsächlichen Initialisierungsleistung und der minimalen Initialisierungsleistung für das Selbstlernen zurückzuführen ist. Wir schlagen Iterative Dimensionsreduktion vor, um diese Lücke zu schließen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass diese einfache Methode die Leistung ähnlicher Sprachpaare nicht beeinträchtigt und eine Genauigkeit von 13.64 55.53% zwischen Englisch und vier entfernten Sprachen erreicht, d.h. Chinesisch, Japanisch, Vietnamesisch und Thai.', 'ko': '초기화와 자체 학습을 바탕으로 하는 무감독 이중 언어 사전 귀납 방법은 유사한 언어(예를 들어 영어-스페인어)에서 큰 성공을 거두었다.그러나 그것들은 여전히 실패했다. 많은 먼 언어의 정확도는 0%였다. 예를 들어 영어와 일본어 등이다.이 작업에서 우리는 이러한 실패가 실제 초기화 성능과 학습 성공의 최저 초기화 성능 간의 차이로 인한 것이라고 증명했다.우리는 이 격차를 메우기 위해 차원을 교체할 것을 건의한다.우리의 실험에 의하면 이런 간단한 방법은 비슷한 언어의 성능에 영향을 주지 않을 것이다. 영어와 네 가지 먼 언어, 즉 중국어, 일본어, 베트남어와 태국어 사이의 정확도는 13.64 55.53% 이다.', 'id': 'Unsupervised Bilingual Dictionary Induction methods based on the initialization and the self-learning have achieved great success in similar language pairs, e.g., English-Spanish.  Tapi mereka masih gagal dan memiliki akurasi 0% dalam banyak pasangan bahasa jauh, misalnya bahasa Inggris-Jepang. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa kegagalan ini berasal dari jarak antara prestasi inisialisasi sebenarnya dan prestasi inisialisasi minimal untuk belajar diri untuk berhasil. We propose Iterative Dimension Reduction to bridge this gap.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa metode sederhana ini tidak menghalangi prestasi pasangan bahasa yang sama dan mencapai akurasi 13,64 55,53% antara bahasa Inggris dan empat bahasa jauh, yaitu bahasa Cina, Jepang, Vietnam dan Thailand.', 'fa': 'روش آغاز و یادگیری خودشان در جفت زبان مشابهی، مثال انگلیسی-اسپانیایی، موفقیت بزرگی در جفت زبان مشابهی به دست آورده\u200cاند. اما هنوز شکست خوردند و دقیق 0% در جفت زبان دور، مثلاً انگلیسی-ژاپنی دارند. در این کار، نشان می دهیم که این شکست از فاصله بین عملکرد آغاز واقعی و عملکرد کمینه آغاز برای یادگیری خودش موفق می شود. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم کاهش اندازه\u200cهای تکرار تا این فاصله را برابر کند. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش ساده انجام دادن جفت\u200cهای زبان مشابه را متوقف نمی\u200cکند و دقیق ۱۳.۶۴ ۵۵.53 درصد بین انگلیسی و چهار زبان دور، یعنی چینی, ژاپنی, ویتنام و تایید می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'Miundo ya Ujengaji wa Lugha za Kiingereza isiyo na utaratibu wa lugha za Kiingereza na kujifunza zimefanika mafanikio makubwa katika viwili vinavyofanana na lugha, kwa mfano, Kiingereza na Kihispania. Lakini bado wanashindwa na wana uhakika wa asilimia 0 katika wanandoa wengi wa lugha mbalimbali, mfano, Kiingereza na Kijapani. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kwamba kushindwa hili linatokana na tofauti kati ya utendaji wa mwanzo wa halisi na utendaji wa kidogo wa kuanza kwa kujifunza kujifanikiwa. We propose Iterative Dimension Reduction to bridge this gap.  Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii rahisi haikuharibu utendaji wa wanandoa wa lugha kama hizo na hupata uhakika wa asilimia 13.64 55.53 kati ya lugha za Kiingereza na nne za mbali, yaani Kichina, Kijapani, Kivietnam na Thailand.', 'af': "Onondersteunde Bilinguele Woordeboek Induksie Metode gebaseer op die inisialisering en die selflêer het groot sukses in gelyke taal paar, bv. Engels-Spaanse. Maar hulle het nog 'n presisie van 0% in baie afgeleë taal paar, bv. Engels-Japanse. In hierdie werk, wys ons dat hierdie mislukking resultaat van die afstand tussen die werklike inisialisering prestasie en die minimale inisialisering prestasie vir die selfleer om suksesvol te maak. Ons voorstel iteratiewe Dimensie Reduksie om hierdie gap te brei. Ons eksperimente wys dat hierdie eenvoudige metode nie die presisie van gelyke taal paar hamper nie en 'n presisie van 13.64 55.53% tussen Engels en vier afgeleë taal, t.d., Sjinees, Japans, Vjetnamse en Taïese bereik nie.", 'tr': 'Inicializasy we özi öwrenmek üçin bilimsiz sözlük Induksiýa metodlary ýaly dil çiftlerde örän kän başarılygy başardy, meselâ, iňlisçe-ispanyola. Emma olar henizem başaryp bilmeýärler we 0% uzak dil çiftlerinde, meselâ, iňlisçe-japonça. Bu işde, biz bu hatalaryň aslynda başlançylygyň netijesinden we özi öwrenmek üçin iň kiçi başlançylygyň netijesinden netijesini görkeýäris. Biz bu gaplary köprüňlemek üçin täsirli ölçüden azaltmaky teklip edip görýäris. Biziň deneylerimiz bu basit yöntemiň ýaly dil çiftlerini etmäge çarpmaýandygyny görkezýär we 13.64 55.53% i ňlisçe we dört uzak dilleriň arasynda dogrylygyny ýetmeýär, diýmek bolýar, Çinçe, Japonça, Výetnamça we Taýça.', 'am': 'የመጀመሪያ እና የራሳቸውን ትምህርት በመሠረት ላይ ያልተገለጸው የቋንቋ መዝገብ ማቀናጃ ሥርዓት፣ ለምሳሌ እንግሊዘኛ-ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ ዓይነቶችን በመስጠት ትልቅ ድል አግኝቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን ገና ይደክማሉ በብዙ ሩቅ ቋንቋዎች የሚኖሩ የ0 በመቶ እርግጠኛ ይኖራሉ፤ ምሳሌ እንግሊዘኛ-ጃፓንኛ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ይህ ስህተት የመጀመሪያ ስርዓት እና የመጀመሪያው ስርዓት ለራሱ ማግኘት የመጀመሪያ ስርዓት ከሆነው ክፍተት መሆኑን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ይህንን ስፋት ለመቀላቀል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ይህ ቀላል ዓይነት የቋንቋ ዓይነቶችን መግለጫ እንዳይችል እና በንግግሊዝና በአራቱ ሩቅ ቋንቋዎች መካከል 13.64 55.53 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ինցիալիզացիայի և ինքնաուսումնասիրության վրա հիմնված անվերահսկված երկլեզու բառարանի ինդուկցիայի մեթոդները շատ հաջողություն են հասել նման լեզվի զույգերում, օրինակ անգլերեն-իսպաներեն: Բայց դրանք դեռևս ձախողվում են և ունեն 0 տոկոսի ճշգրտություն շատ հեռավոր լեզվի զույգերում, օրինակ անգլերեն-ճապոներեն: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս ձախողումը հանգեցնում է իրական ինիցիալիզացիայի արդյունքների և ինքնասովորելու հաջողության միմինիմալ ինիցիալիզացիայի արդյունքների միջև եղած տարբերության: Մենք առաջարկում ենք կրկնօրինակ չափի կրճատման այս տարբերությունը հաղթահարելու համար: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս պարզ մեթոդը չի խոչընդոտում նման լեզվի զույգերի արտադրությունը և հասնում է 13.64 55.53 տոկոսի ճշմարտությունը անգլերենի և չորս հեռավոր լեզուների միջև, այսինքն չինական, ճապոներեն, վիետնամերեն և թայլանդաց', 'az': 'İşyalama və özü öyrənməyə dayanan Bilingual Sözlük Induksyon metodları eyni dil çiftlərdə böyük başarılı oldular, məsələn, İngilizə-İspanyolca. Amma onlar hələ də başarısız oldular və çox uzaq dil çiftlərində 0%-in doğruluğu var, məsələn İngilizə-Japonca. Bu işdə, bu başarısızlıq həqiqi başlanğıcılıq performansından və özünün öyrənməsi üçün minimal başlanğıcılıq performansından sonuçlandığını göstəririk. Biz bu boşluğu köprəkləndirmək üçün Iterative Dimension Reduction təklif edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz bu basit metodların bənzər dil çiftlərinin performansını dəyişməyəcəyini göstərir və İngilizə ilə dörd uzaq dillərin arasında 13.64 55.53%-in doğruluğuna nail olmadığını göstərir.', 'bn': 'প্রাথমিকভাবে ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বিলিঙ্গুয়েল অভিভাবক নির্দেশনা পদ্ধতি এবং স্বেচ্ছাস্থ্য শিক্ষার মাধ্যমে একই ভাষায় জোড় কিন্তু তারা এখনও ব্যর্থ হয়েছে এবং অনেক দূরবর্তী ভাষার জোড়ার মধ্যে তাদের সুবিধা আছে যেমন ইংরেজী জাপানীয়। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ব্যর্থতা প্রকৃত প্রারম্ভিক প্রদর্শনের মধ্যে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় শিক্ষার জন্য নিম্নলিখিত শুরু করার জন্ আমরা এই বিভ্রান্তি ব্রিজ করার প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে এই সহজ পদ্ধতি একই ধরনের ভাষার জোড়া জোড়ার প্রদর্শনের ক্ষেত্রে বিরক্ত করে না এবং ইংরেজি এবং চারটি দূরবর্তী ভাষার মধ্যে ১৩.', 'sq': 'Unsupervised Bilingual Dictionary Induction methods based on the initialization and the self-learning have achieved great success in similar language pairs, e.g., English-Spanish.  Por ato ende dështojnë dhe kanë një saktësi 0% në shumë çifte gjuhësh të largëta, për shembull, anglisht-japonezë. Në këtë punë, ne tregojmë se ky dështim rezulton nga dalja midis paraqitjes së inicializimit aktual dhe paraqitjes minimale të inicializimit për të arritur vetëmësimin. Ne propozojmë Reduktimin e Dimensionit Iterativ për të mbuluar këtë boshllëk. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se ky metodë i thjeshtë nuk pengon paraqitjen e çifteve të ngjashme gjuhësh dhe arrin një saktësi prej 13.64 55.53% midis anglisht dhe katër gjuhëve të largëta, pra, kineze, japoneze, vietnameze dhe tajlandeze.', 'bs': 'Nesuprotstavljene metode indukcije bilingualnog rečnika na temelju inicijalizacije i samouučenja postigle su veliki uspjeh u sličnim jezičkim parovima, na primjer engleski-španjolski. Ali još uvijek nisu uspjeli i imaju preciznost od 0% u mnogim udaljenim jezičkim parovima, na primjer engleski-japanski. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da ovaj neuspjeh rezultira iz praznine između stvarnog izvođenja inicijalizacije i minimalnog izvođenja inicijalizacije za uspjeh samouučenja. Predlažemo smanjenje Iterativne dimenzije da prekršimo taj praznik. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da ova jednostavna metoda ne ometa učinku sličnih jezičkih parova i ostvarila preciznost od 13,64 55,53% između engleskog i četiri udaljenih jezika, tj. kineskog, japanskog, vijetnamskog i Tajlandskog.', 'ca': "Métodes d'inducció bilingüe sense supervisió basats en l'inicialització i l'autoaprenentatge han aconseguit un gran èxit en parells de llengües similars, per exemple anglès-espanyol. Però encara fracassen i tenen una precisió del 0% en molts parells de llenguatges distants, per exemple anglès-japonès. En aquesta feina, demostram que aquest fracàs resulta de la bretxa entre el rendiment real d'inicializació i el rendiment mínim d'inicializació per a que l'autoaprenentatge tingui èxit. Proposem Reducció de la Dimensió Iterativa per superar aquest buit. Els nostres experiments demostren que aquest mètode senzill no dificulta la performance de parelles de llenguatges similars i aconsegueix una precisió del 13,64 55,53% entre l'anglès i quatre llenguatges llunyanes, és a dir, xinès, japonès, vietnamita i tailandès.", 'cs': 'Metody indukce dvojjazyčného slovníku založené na inicializaci a samoučení dosáhly velkého úspěchu v podobných jazykových párech, např. anglicko-španělština. Ale stále selhávají a mají přesnost 0% v mnoha vzdálených jazykových párech, např. anglicko-japonsky. V této práci ukazujeme, že toto selhání vyplývá z mezery mezi skutečným inicializačním výkonem a minimálním inicializačním výkonem pro self-learning k úspěchu. Abychom tuto mezeru překonali, navrhujeme Iterativní redukci dimenzí. Naše experimenty ukazují, že tato jednoduchá metoda nenarušuje výkon podobných jazykových párů a dosahuje přesnosti 13.64 55.53% mezi angličtinou a čtyřmi vzdálenými jazyky, tj. čínštinou, japonštinou, vietnamštinou a thajštinou.', 'et': 'Initsialiseerimisel ja eneseõppel põhinevad kahekeelsed induktsioonimeetodid on saavutanud suurt edu sarnastes keelepaarides, nt inglise-hispaania keeles. Kuid need ebaõnnestuvad endiselt ja nende täpsus on 0% paljudes kaugetes keelepaarides, näiteks inglise-jaapani keeles. Käesolevas töös näitame, et see ebaõnnestumine tuleneb lõhest tegeliku initsialiseerimise jõudluse ja eneseõppe minimaalse initsialiseerimise jõudluse vahel. Selle lõhe ületamiseks teeme ettepaneku iteratiivse mõõtme vähendamiseks. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et see lihtne meetod ei takista sarnaste keelepaaride toimimist ja saavutab 13,64 55,53% täpsuse inglise ja nelja kauge keele, st hiina, jaapani, vietnami ja tai keele vahel.', 'fi': 'Alustamiseen ja itseoppimiseen perustuvat kaksikieliset induktiomenetelmät ovat saavuttaneet suurta menestystä samankaltaisissa kielipareissa, esim. englanti-espanja. Mutta ne epäonnistuvat edelleen ja niiden tarkkuus on 0% monissa kaukaisissa kielipareissa, esimerkiksi englanti-japani. Tässä työssä osoitetaan, että tämä epäonnistuminen johtuu todellisen initialisointitehokkuuden ja itseoppimisen vähimmäisinitialisointitehokkuuden välisestä kuilusta. Ehdotamme iteratiivisen ulottuvuuden vähentämistä tämän kuilun kuromiseksi umpeen. Kokeet osoittavat, että tämä yksinkertainen menetelmä ei vaikeuta samankaltaisten kieliparien suorituskykyä ja saavuttaa 13,64 55,53% tarkkuuden englannin ja neljän kaukaisen kielen, eli kiinan, japanin, vietnamin ja thain välillä.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Bilingual Diwisisar Manual sing bisa nguasai urip lan nganggo sampeyan sampeyan nguasai Lan dhéwé kuwi kapan pangan langkung sampeyan.bisa, Inggris-Spanish. Ning dhewe isih dolanan luwih-luwih lan sesuk sabanjuré 0% nang sampeyan luwih-luwih, sampek Inggris-Japang. Nang iki trabah, kita ngomong nik kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi tanggal diunting cara sing mungkin karo hasilikasi lan akeh tanggal sisarane kanggo ngilangno sampeyan nguasai. Awak dhéwé ngerasai tanggal apakno kanggo nggawe gap iki. Awakdhéwé éntukno akeh perusahaan iki ora nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno karo hal langkung sampeyan karo panebok 13.64', 'sk': 'Metode indukcije, ki temeljijo na inicializaciji in samoučenju, so dosegle velik uspeh pri podobnih jezikovnih parih, npr. angleško-španščini. Vendar še vedno ne uspejo in imajo natančnost 0% v številnih oddaljenih jezikovnih parih, npr. angleško-japonski. V tem delu pokažemo, da je ta neuspeh posledica vrzeli med dejansko inicializacijsko uspešnostjo in minimalno inicializacijsko uspešnostjo samoučenja. Predlagamo zmanjšanje iterativne dimenzije za premostitev te vrzeli. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da ta preprosta metoda ne ovira učinkovitosti podobnih jezikovnih parov in dosega natančnost 13,64 55,53% med angleščino in štirimi oddaljenimi jeziki, tj. kitajščino, japonščino, vietnamsko in tajščino.', 'ha': "@ item license (short name) Amma suna fizge kuma suna da taƙaita na 0% cikin wasu nau'i masu nĩsa cikin harshen, misali, Ingiriya-japane. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nũna musamman wannan haske ta ƙara daga gaɓa tsakanin mafarin farawa na farko da mafarin farawa ta ƙaranci wa masu cin nasara. Munã goyyar da Reduce Cincin Kizartar da Akwai ya sami wannan gaura. Kayan jarrabai ke nũna cewa, wannan metode na sauƙi bã ya zartar da aikin mutane da ke daidaita lugha kuma yana sãmu tsari na 13.64 55.53% tsakanin Ingiriya da huɗu harshe masu nĩsa, misali, China, japane, Kiviet'iya da Tailand.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛུགས་དང་རང་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་ཟུར་བརྗོད་གཞི་འགོ་འཛུགས་དང་རང་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ འོན་ཀྱང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་དུས་བརྒྱུད་རིང་གི་སྐད་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ངོ་འཕྲད་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། ཨིན་ཇིས་ཡིན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལས་ཀྱང་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་སྐྱོད་འདི་དང་ཐོག་ལས་འགོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་ཤིག ང་ཚོས་བར་སྟོང་འདི་ལ་བཏོན་གཏོང་མཁན་ལྡན་པའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དཀྱིས་བཏོན་གཏོང་བ་བསམ། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་བར་ཐག་ཅིག་དབར་གྱི་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་མི་བྱེད།', 'he': 'שיטות הוצאת מילון משולשת ללא השגחה מבוססות על ההתחלה והלימוד עצמי השיגו הצלחה גדולה בזוגות שפות דומות, למשל, אנגלית-ספרדית. אבל הם עדיין נכשלים ויש להם מדויקת של 0% בזוגות שפות רחוקות רבות, למשל אנגלית-יפנית. בעבודה הזאת, אנו מראים שהכישלון הזה מתוצא מהפער בין ביצועי ההתחלה האמיתית והביצועי ההתחלה המינימומי כדי שהלימוד עצמי יצליח. We propose Iterative Dimension Reduction to bridge this gap.  Our experiments show that this simple method does not hamper the performance of similar language pairs and achieves an accuracy of 13.64 55.53% between English and four distant languages, i.e., Chinese, Japanese, Vietnamese and Thai.'}
{'en': 'Data Selection for Bilingual Lexicon Induction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'ar': 'تحديد البيانات لاستقراء المعجم ثنائي اللغة من مجموعة متخصصة قابلة للمقارنة', 'es': 'Selección de datos para la inducción de léxico bilingüe de corpus especializados comparables', 'fr': "Sélection de données pour l'introduction d'un lexique bilingue à partir de corpus spécialisés comparables", 'pt': 'Seleção de dados para indução de léxico bilíngue de corpora comparável especializado', 'ja': '専門化された比較可能なコーポラからのバイリンガル辞書誘導のためのデータ選択', 'zh': '自专业比语料库者双语词典归数据选择', 'hi': 'विशेष तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट से द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण के लिए डेटा चयन', 'ru': 'Выбор данных для двуязычной лексической индукции из специализированных сопоставимых тел', 'ga': 'Roghnú Sonraí le haghaidh Ionduchtú Foclóir Dhátheangach ó Chorpóra Inchomparáide Speisialaithe', 'ka': 'სპეციალური შემდგომარებული კორპორადან მონაცემები', 'hu': 'Adatok kiválasztása a kétnyelvű lexikon indukcióhoz a speciális összehasonlítható Corporától', 'el': 'Επιλογή δεδομένων για δίγλωσση επαγωγή λεξικού από εξειδικευμένο συγκρίσιμο σώμα', 'kk': 'Қосымша салыстырмалы корпорасынан екі салыстырылған лексикалық индукциясының деректерін таңдау', 'it': 'Selezione dei dati per induzione bilingue Lexicon da Corpora comparabile specializzata', 'mk': 'Избор на податоци за двогласна индукција на лексикони од специјализирана споредлива корпора', 'lt': 'Duomenų parinkimas dvikalbei leksikono indukcijai iš specializuotos palyginamosios korporas', 'ml': 'ബിലിങ്കുള്ള ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയത്തിനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുക', 'no': 'Data-utval for bilete leksjonsinduksjon frå spesifisert kompatibelt korpora', 'mn': 'Хоёр давхар лексикийн индукцийн өгөгдлийн сонголт', 'pl': 'Wybór danych dla indukcji dwujęzycznego leksykonu ze specjalistycznego porównywalnego korpusu', 'ro': 'Selectarea datelor pentru inducția bilingvă a lexiconului de la Corpora Comparabilă Specializată', 'sr': 'Izabranje podataka za dvostruku leksičku indukciju iz specijalizovane komparabilne korpore', 'ms': 'Pemilihan Data untuk Induksi Lexikon Bilingual dari Korpora Dibandingkan Khas', 'si': 'බිලින්ගුල් ලෙක්සිකෝන් විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ කර්පෝරාවෙන් දත්ත තෝරණය', 'so': 'Dalbashada u baaraandegista luqada Bilaalka Lexicon Indication from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'sv': 'Dataval för tvåspråkig Lexikoninduktion från specialiserad jämförbar Corpora', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட ஒப்பீடு கோர்போராவில் இருந்து மொழி லெக்சிகோன் செயல்காட்டிற்கான தரவு தேர்வு', 'ur': 'دوئلینگل لکسیسون انڈاکٹ کے لئے ڈاٹا انتخاب کرنا ویسے مشترک کرپور سے', 'mt': 'L-Għażla tad-Dejta għall-Induzzjoni Bilinguali tal-Lexicon minn Korpora Speċjalizzata li Jitqabbel', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chọn dữ liệu cho sự truyền dẫn ngôn ngữ từ Corpus siêu đẳng', 'bg': 'Избор на данни за двуезична лексиконна индукция от специализиран сравним корпор', 'nl': 'Data Selectie voor tweetalige Lexicon Inductie van Gespecialiseerd Vergelijkbaar Corpora', 'da': 'Datavalg til tosproget Lexikoninduktion fra specialiseret sammenligneligt Corpora', 'hr': 'Izabranje podataka za dvostruku leksičku indukciju iz specijalizirane usporedne korpore', 'id': 'Pemilihan Data untuk Induksi Lexikon Bilingual dari Korpora Dibandingkan Spesialisasi', 'ko': '전문 비교 자료 라이브러리에서 이중 언어 어휘를 귀납할 수 있는 데이터 선택', 'de': 'Datenauswahl für zweisprachige Lexikon-Induktion aus spezialisiertem Comparable Corpora', 'fa': 'انتخاب داده\u200cها برای تأثیر درمانی دوگانی از شرکت مقایسه ویژه', 'tr': 'Çiri-täsirli leksiýan gaýd etmek üçin Maglumat Saýlaw', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa data kwa ajili ya Uoneshaji wa Lexico wa Kiasili kutoka Corpora inayofanana', 'af': 'Data Keuse vir Bilinguele Leksiese Induksie van Spesialiseerde Vergelykbare Korpora', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e të dhënave për induksionin e lexikonëve dygjuhës nga korpora e përshkruar e krahasueshme', 'am': 'የዳታ ምርጫ', 'hy': 'Տվյալների ընտրությունը երկլեզու լեքսիկոնի ինդուկցիայի համար մասնավորված համեմատական կորպորայից', 'az': 'İkinci Leksiksiyon Induksyonu üçün Məlumat Seçimi', 'bn': 'বিশেষ তুলনায়ী কোর্পোরা থেকে বালিভায়ুয়াল লেক্সিকোন ইন্দোনেশনের জন্য তথ্য নির্বাচন', 'bs': 'Izabranje podataka za dvostruku leksičku indukciju iz specijalizirane usporedne korpore', 'ca': 'Data Selection for Bilingual Lexicon Induction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'cs': 'Výběr dat pro indukci dvojjazyčného slovníku ze specializovaného srovnatelného korpusu', 'et': 'Kahekeelse leksikoni induktsiooni andmete valik spetsialiseeritud võrreldavast korpusest', 'fi': 'Tietojen valinta kaksikieliseen Lexicon-induktioon erikoistuneesta vertailukelpoisesta korpusesta', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izbira podatkov za dvojezično leksikonsko indukcijo iz specializiranih primerljivih korpusov', 'he': 'בוחר נתונים עבור תוכנית לקסיקון משולשת מחברת משוואה מיוחדת', 'bo': 'དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པའི་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྩིས་བ་ཕྱོགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནང་ཆ་འཕྲིན།'}
{'en': 'Narrow specialized comparable corpora are often small in size. This particularity makes it difficult to build efficient models to acquire translation equivalents, especially for less frequent and rare words. One way to overcome this issue is to enrich the specialized corpora with out-of-domain resources. Although some recent studies have shown improvements using data augmentation, the enrichment method was roughly conducted by adding out-of-domain data with no particular attention given to how to enrich words and how to do it optimally. In this paper, we contrast several data selection techniques to improve bilingual lexicon induction from specialized comparable corpora. We first apply two well-established data selection techniques often used in machine translation that is : Tf-Idf and cross entropy. Then, we propose to exploit BERT for data selection. Overall, all the proposed techniques improve the quality of the extracted bilingual lexicons by a large margin. The best performing model is the cross entropy, obtaining a gain of about 4 points in MAP while decreasing computation time by a factor of 10.', 'fr': "Les corpus comparables spécialisés étroits sont souvent de petite taille. Cette particularité rend difficile la création de modèles efficaces pour acquérir des équivalents de traduction, en particulier pour les mots moins fréquents et rares. Une façon de résoudre ce problème consiste à enrichir les corpus spécialisés avec des ressources hors domaine. Bien que certaines études récentes aient montré des améliorations grâce à l'augmentation des données, la méthode d'enrichissement a été grossièrement menée en ajoutant des données hors domaine sans accorder une attention particulière à la façon d'enrichir les mots et à la façon de le faire de manière optimale. Dans cet article, nous comparons plusieurs techniques de sélection de données afin d'améliorer l'intégration du lexique bilingue à partir de corpus spécialisés comparables. Nous appliquons d'abord deux techniques bien établies de sélection de données souvent utilisées en traduction automatique\xa0: Tf-Idf et l'entropie croisée. Ensuite, nous proposons d'exploiter le BERT pour la sélection des données. Globalement, toutes les techniques proposées améliorent considérablement la qualité des lexiques bilingues extraits. Le modèle le plus performant est l'entropie croisée, obtenant un gain d'environ 4 points en MAP tout en diminuant le temps de calcul d'un facteur 10.", 'es': 'Los cuerpos comparables especializados estrechos son a menudo de tamaño pequeño. Esta particularidad dificulta la creación de modelos eficientes para adquirir equivalentes de traducción, especialmente para palabras poco frecuentes y poco frecuentes. Una forma de superar este problema es enriquecer los corpus especializados con recursos fuera del dominio. Aunque algunos estudios recientes han demostrado mejoras con el aumento de datos, el método de enriquecimiento se llevó a cabo aproximadamente agregando datos fuera del dominio sin prestar especial atención a cómo enriquecer las palabras y cómo hacerlo de manera óptima. En este artículo, contrastamos varias técnicas de selección de datos para mejorar la inducción del léxico bilingüe a partir de cuerpos comparables especializados. Primero aplicamos dos técnicas de selección de datos bien establecidas que se utilizan a menudo en la traducción automática: Tf-Idf y entropía cruzada. Luego, proponemos aprovechar BERT para la selección de datos. En general, todas las técnicas propuestas mejoran la calidad de los léxicos bilingües extraídos por un amplio margen. El modelo de mejor rendimiento es la entropía cruzada, obteniendo una ganancia de unos 4 puntos en el MAP y reduciendo el tiempo de cálculo en un factor de 10.', 'ar': 'الشركات الضيقة المتخصصة والمقارنة غالبًا ما تكون صغيرة الحجم. تجعل هذه الخصوصية من الصعب بناء نماذج فعالة للحصول على معادلات الترجمة ، خاصة للكلمات الأقل تكرارًا والنادرة. تتمثل إحدى طرق التغلب على هذه المشكلة في إثراء الشركات المتخصصة بموارد خارج المجال. على الرغم من أن بعض الدراسات الحديثة أظهرت تحسينات باستخدام زيادة البيانات ، فقد تم إجراء طريقة التخصيب تقريبًا عن طريق إضافة بيانات خارج المجال مع عدم إيلاء اهتمام خاص لكيفية إثراء الكلمات وكيفية القيام بذلك على النحو الأمثل. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بمقارنة العديد من تقنيات اختيار البيانات لتحسين استقراء المعجم ثنائي اللغة من مجموعات متخصصة قابلة للمقارنة. نطبق أولاً طريقتين راسختين لاختيار البيانات غالبًا ما تستخدمان في الترجمة الآلية وهما: Tf-Idf والانتروبيا المتقاطعة. بعد ذلك ، نقترح استغلال BERT لاختيار البيانات. بشكل عام ، تعمل جميع التقنيات المقترحة على تحسين جودة المعاجم ثنائية اللغة المستخرجة بهامش كبير. أفضل نموذج أداء هو الانتروبيا المتقاطعة ، حيث تحصل على ربح يبلغ حوالي 4 نقاط في MAP مع تقليل وقت الحساب بعامل 10.', 'pt': 'Corpora comparáveis especializados estreitos geralmente são pequenos em tamanho. Essa particularidade dificulta a construção de modelos eficientes para aquisição de equivalentes de tradução, principalmente para palavras menos frequentes e raras. Uma forma de contornar esse problema é enriquecer os corpora especializados com recursos fora do domínio. Embora alguns estudos recentes tenham mostrado melhorias usando o aumento de dados, o método de enriquecimento foi conduzido aproximadamente pela adição de dados fora do domínio, sem atenção especial dada a como enriquecer palavras e como fazê-lo de maneira otimizada. Neste artigo, comparamos várias técnicas de seleção de dados para melhorar a indução do léxico bilíngue de corpora comparáveis especializados. Primeiro aplicamos duas técnicas de seleção de dados bem estabelecidas frequentemente usadas em tradução automática que são: Tf-Idf e entropia cruzada. Então, propomos explorar o BERT para seleção de dados. No geral, todas as técnicas propostas melhoram a qualidade dos léxicos bilíngues extraídos por uma grande margem. O modelo de melhor desempenho é o de entropia cruzada, obtendo um ganho de cerca de 4 pontos na PAM enquanto diminui o tempo de computação por um fator de 10.', 'zh': '狭业比语料库常规模较小。 此特殊性使难效以取译等效项,特于不数奇之单词。 克此一法,用域外资源富专语料库。 虽近者讲明用数可以改进,然广法大抵以加域外数为之,未有特意丰单词及所以最佳者也。 于本文中,比数术,以改善自业,比语料库双语词典归。 先用机器翻译中常用二熟数据选择术,曰:Tf-Idf与交熵。 然后请因BERT以数择之。 总体而言,凡诸技术,皆大大提高取双语词典之量。 至模交熵,4个点益于MAP,减10倍之。', 'ja': '狭義の特殊化した体節は、それに匹敵するほどの小さな体節であることが多い。 この特殊性は、特に頻度の低い希少な単語に対して、翻訳同等物を取得するための効率的なモデルを構築することを困難にする。 この問題を克服する1つの方法は、ドメイン外リソースで専門的なコーパを充実させることです。 最近のいくつかの研究では、データ拡張を使用した改善が示されていますが、エンリッチメント方法は、単語をどのようにエンリッチメントするか、最適に行う方法に特に注意を払わずに、ドメイン外のデータを追加することによっておおよそ行われました。 本論文では、専門的な類似体からのバイリンガル語彙誘導を改善するためのいくつかのデータ選択技術を対比している。 まず、機械翻訳でよく使用される2つの確立されたデータ選択テクニック、Tf - Idfとクロスエントロピーを適用します。 次に、データ選択のためにBERTを利用することを提案します。 全体的に、提案されたすべての技術は、抽出されたバイリンガル辞書の品質を大幅に向上させる。 最良のパフォーマンスモデルはクロスエントロピーであり、計算時間を１ ０倍短縮しながら、マップ内で約４ポイントの利得を得る。', 'hi': 'संकीर्ण विशेष तुलनीय निगम अक्सर आकार में छोटे होते हैं। यह विशिष्टता अनुवाद समकक्षों को प्राप्त करने के लिए कुशल मॉडल का निर्माण करना मुश्किल बनाती है, खासकर कम लगातार और दुर्लभ शब्दों के लिए। इस मुद्दे को दूर करने का एक तरीका आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन संसाधनों के साथ विशेष कॉर्पोरेट को समृद्ध करना है। हालांकि कुछ हालिया अध्ययनों ने डेटा वृद्धि का उपयोग करके सुधार दिखाया है, संवर्धन विधि मोटे तौर पर आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डेटा जोड़कर आयोजित की गई थी, जिसमें शब्दों को समृद्ध करने और इसे बेहतर तरीके से करने के तरीके पर कोई विशेष ध्यान नहीं दिया गया था। इस पेपर में, हम विशेष तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट से द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण में सुधार करने के लिए कई डेटा चयन तकनीकों के विपरीत हैं। हम पहले दो अच्छी तरह से स्थापित डेटा चयन तकनीकों को लागू करते हैं जो अक्सर मशीन अनुवाद में उपयोग की जाती हैं: Tf-Idf और क्रॉस एंट्रॉपी। फिर, हम डेटा चयन के लिए BERT का शोषण करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। कुल मिलाकर, सभी प्रस्तावित तकनीकें एक बड़े मार्जिन से निकाले गए द्विभाषी शब्दकोशों की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करती हैं। सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन मॉडल क्रॉस एन्ट्रॉपी है, जो एमएपी में लगभग 4 अंकों का लाभ प्राप्त करता है, जबकि 10 के कारक द्वारा गणना समय को कम करता है।', 'ru': 'Узкие специализированные сопоставимые тела часто невелики по размеру. Эта особенность затрудняет построение эффективных моделей для получения эквивалентов перевода, особенно для менее частых и редких слов. Один из способов преодоления этой проблемы заключается в том, чтобы обогатить специализированные корпорации внедоменными ресурсами. Хотя некоторые недавние исследования показали улучшения с использованием увеличения данных, метод обогащения был примерно проведен путем добавления внедоменных данных без особого внимания к тому, как обогатить слова и как сделать это оптимально. В этой статье мы сравниваем несколько методов отбора данных для улучшения двуязычной лексиконической индукции из специализированных сопоставимых корпусов. Сначала мы применяем две хорошо зарекомендовавшие себя методики отбора данных, часто используемые в машинном переводе, а именно: Tf-Idf и кросс-энтропия. Затем мы предлагаем использовать BERT для выбора данных. В целом, все предложенные методики значительно улучшают качество извлеченных двуязычных лексиконов. Наилучшей моделью является перекрестная энтропия, получающая усиление около 4 точек на КАРТЕ при уменьшении времени вычисления в 10 раз.', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhíonn sainchorpóra inchomparáide cúng beag i méid. De bharr na sainiúlachta seo bíonn sé deacair múnlaí éifeachtacha a thógáil chun coibhéisí aistriúcháin a fháil, go háirithe d’fhocail nach bhfuil chomh minic agus is annamh. Bealach amháin leis an tsaincheist seo a shárú ná an sainchorpóra a shaibhriú le hacmhainní lasmuigh den fhearann. Cé gur léirigh roinnt staidéar le déanaí feabhsuithe ag baint úsáide as méadú sonraí, rinneadh an modh saibhrithe go garbh trí shonraí lasmuigh den fhearann a chur leis gan aird ar leith á tabhairt ar conas focail a shaibhriú agus conas é a dhéanamh go barrmhaith. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid codarsnacht de roinnt teicníochtaí roghnaithe sonraí chun ionduchtú foclóireachta dátheangach ó shainchorparáidí inchomparáide a fheabhsú. Ar dtús cuirimid i bhfeidhm dhá theicníc dea-bhunaithe roghnúcháin sonraí a úsáidtear go minic san aistriúchán meaisín, is iad sin: Tf-Idf agus tras-eantrópachta. Ansin, tá sé beartaithe againn leas a bhaint as BERT le haghaidh roghnú sonraí. Tríd is tríd, cuireann na teicníochtaí go léir atá beartaithe feabhas mór ar cháilíocht na bhfoclóirí dátheangacha a bhaintear amach. Is é an tsamhail is fearr feidhmíochta ná an tras-eantrópacht, rud a ghnóthachan thart ar 4 phointe i MAP agus ag laghdú ama ríomha faoi 10 fachtóir.', 'el': 'Τα στενά εξειδικευμένα συγκρίσιμα σώματα είναι συχνά μικρά σε μέγεθος. Αυτή η ιδιαιτερότητα καθιστά δύσκολη την κατασκευή αποτελεσματικών μοντέλων για την απόκτηση ισοδύναμων μετάφρασης, ειδικά για λιγότερο συχνές και σπάνιες λέξεις. Ένας τρόπος για να ξεπεραστεί αυτό το ζήτημα είναι να εμπλουτιστούν τα εξειδικευμένα σώματα με πόρους εκτός τομέα. Παρόλο που ορισμένες πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν δείξει βελτιώσεις με τη χρήση της αύξησης δεδομένων, η μέθοδος εμπλουτισμού διεξήχθη κατά προσέγγιση προσθέτοντας δεδομένα εκτός πεδίου χωρίς ιδιαίτερη προσοχή στο πώς να εμπλουτιστούν οι λέξεις και πώς να γίνει βέλτιστα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συγκρίνουμε διάφορες τεχνικές επιλογής δεδομένων για τη βελτίωση της δίγλωσσης επαγωγής λεξικού από εξειδικευμένα συγκρίσιμα σώματα. Αρχικά εφαρμόζουμε δύο καθιερωμένες τεχνικές επιλογής δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιούνται συχνά στη μηχανική μετάφραση, δηλαδή: και διασταυρούμενη εντροπία. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε να εκμεταλλευτούμε το BERT για την επιλογή δεδομένων. Συνολικά, όλες οι προτεινόμενες τεχνικές βελτιώνουν κατά μεγάλο βαθμό την ποιότητα των εξαγόμενων δίγλωσσων λεξικών. Το μοντέλο με την καλύτερη απόδοση είναι η διασταυρούμενη εντροπία, αποκτώντας κέρδος περίπου τεσσάρων σημείων σε ΜΑΡ μειώνοντας παράλληλα το χρόνο υπολογισμού κατά έναν παράγοντα 10.', 'hu': 'A keskeny speciális hasonló corporák gyakran kis méretűek. Ez a sajátosság megnehezíti hatékony modellek kialakítását a fordítási egyenértékek beszerzésére, különösen a kevésbé gyakori és ritka szavak esetében. Az egyik módja annak, hogy leküzdjük ezt a problémát, ha gazdagítjuk a speciális vállalatokat domain kívüli erőforrásokkal. Bár néhány közelmúltbeli tanulmány javulást mutatott az adatbővítés alkalmazásával, a gazdagítási módszert nagyjából a domain kívüli adatok hozzáadásával végezték, különös figyelmet nem fordítva arra, hogy hogyan lehet gazdagítani a szavakat és hogyan lehet optimálisan csinálni. Ebben a tanulmányban számos adatválasztási technikát különböztetünk össze a kétnyelvű lexikon indukció javítására specializált hasonló corporákból. Először két jól bevált adatválasztási technikát alkalmazunk a gépi fordításban gyakran használt, azaz a Tf-Idf és a keresztentrópia. Ezután azt javasoljuk, hogy a BERT az adatok kiválasztására használjuk ki. Összességében az összes javasolt technika nagy mértékben javítja a kivont kétnyelvű lexikonok minőségét. A legjobb teljesítményű modell a kereszt entrópia, amely a MAP-ben körülbelül 4 pontos nyereséget ér el, miközben a számítási időt 10 tényezővel csökkenti.', 'ka': 'სპეციალური სპეციალური შემდგომარებელი კორპორა ზოგიერთად ცოტა. ეს განსაკუთრებულობა უფრო რთული იქნება, რომ ეფექტიური მოდელები შექმნა, განსაკუთრებით უფრო მეტი და უფრო მეტი სიტყვებისთვის. ერთი გზა ამ პრობლემას გადავიწყება არის სპეციალური კოპორაციას, რომელიც არაფერი დემომინის რესურსებით. მაგრამ რამდენიმე ბოლო კვლევების შესახებ მონაცემების აგგენტაციის გამოყენებას ჩვენ ჩვენებენ, მონაცემების გარეშე მონაცემების გარეშე დამატებით განსაკუთრებული მონაცემების გარეშე და როგორ ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ კონტრასტრესტურებთ რამდენიმე მონაცემები ტექნოგიები, რომელიც ორიენგური ლექსიკონის ინდექცია სპეციალურად დამყვერ ჩვენ პირველად გამოყენებთ ორი ძალიან დაწყენებული მონაცემების მონიშნული ტექნოგიები, რომელიც მაქინის გაგრძნობაში გამოყენებულია: Tf-Idf და cross entropy. შემდეგ ჩვენ მინდა BERT-ს გამოყენება მონაცემებისთვის. ყველაფერად, ყველა საზოგადოებული ტექნოგიები გაუქმედება ექსტრაქტირებული მელექსიკონის კაvaliტიას დიდ მარტინზე. ნაი-ეჲბპთწრ ოპაგთრვლვნ მჲევლ ვ კპყჟნარა ვნრპჲოთწ, ოჲლსფთრვლნჲ ჲრ 4 წუთ გ MAP-ში, ეჲკარჲ კჲმპძრთპაუთწრა გპვმვ ვ ჱა 10 ფაქრჲპ.', 'it': "Corpori simili specializzati stretti sono spesso di piccole dimensioni. Questa particolarità rende difficile costruire modelli efficienti per acquisire equivalenti di traduzione, soprattutto per parole meno frequenti e rare. Un modo per superare questo problema è quello di arricchire i corpora specializzati con risorse fuori dominio. Sebbene alcuni studi recenti abbiano mostrato miglioramenti utilizzando l'aumento dei dati, il metodo di arricchimento è stato condotto approssimativamente aggiungendo dati fuori dominio senza particolare attenzione a come arricchire le parole e come farlo in modo ottimale. In questo articolo, confrontiamo diverse tecniche di selezione dei dati per migliorare l'induzione bilingue del lessico da corpora comparabile specializzata. Per prima cosa applichiamo due tecniche di selezione dei dati consolidate spesso utilizzate nella traduzione automatica: Tf-Idf e entropia incrociata. Quindi, proponiamo di sfruttare BERT per la selezione dei dati. Nel complesso, tutte le tecniche proposte migliorano di gran lunga la qualità dei lessici bilingui estratti. Il modello più performante è l'entropia incrociata, ottenendo un guadagno di circa 4 punti in MAP riducendo il tempo di calcolo di un fattore di 10.", 'kk': 'Көпшілікті салыстырмалы корпора көпшілік өлшеміне кішірейді. Бұл бөлімділік аудармалардың тең үлгілерін құру үшін әсер етеді, өзгертілген және кейбір сөздер үшін. Бұл мәселеді көтеру үшін бір жол - доменге тыс ресурстар арнаулы корпораны бағалау. Бірақ кейбір жаңа зерттеулерде деректерді көбейту арқылы жақсарту көрсетілген болса да, домендық деректерді көбейту арқылы көбейту арқылы, сөздерді бағалау және оны қалай жасау арқылы өзгертілмейді. Бұл қағазда бірнеше деректерді таңдау технологияларын арнайы салыстыру үшін екі тілді лексикон индукциясын өзгерту үшін көптеген салыстыру керек. Біз біріншіден екі жақсы құрылған деректерді таңдау техникасын қолдануға болады, мысалы: Tf- Idf және cross entropy. Содан кейін, біз BERT- ті деректерді таңдау үшін қолдануға ұсынамыз. Жалпы, барлық таңдалған технологиялар көп жиегі бойынша тарқатылған екі тіл лексикондардың сапатын жақсарту. Ең жақсы істеу үлгісі - көлшек ентропия, MAP жұмысындағы 4 нүктелерді есептеу уақытын 10 факторынан азайту үшін көлшек ентропия.', 'lt': 'Labai specializuota panaši korpora dažnai yra maža. Dėl šios ypatybės sunku sukurti veiksmingus vertimo ekvivalentų modelius, ypač mažiau dažniems ir retams žodžiams. Vienas iš būdų išspręsti šį klausimą yra praturtinti specializuotą korporą ne srities ištekliais. Nors kai kurie neseniai atlikti tyrimai parodė patobulinimus naudojant duomenų didinimą, sodrinimo metodas buvo apytiksliai atliktas pridėjus ne srities duomenis, ypatingo dėmesio nebuvo skiriama tai, kaip praturtinti žodžius ir kaip tai padaryti optimaliai. Šiame dokumente prieštaraujame keliems duomenų atrankos metodams, siekiant pagerinti dvikalbį leksikono indukciją iš specializuotų panašių kūnų. We first apply two well-established data selection techniques often used in machine translation that is: Tf-Idf and cross entropy.  Tada siūlome panaudoti BERT duomenų atrankoje. Apskritai visi siūlomi metodai labai pagerina ekstrahuotų dvikalbių leksikonų kokybę. Geriausias rezultatas yra kryžminė entropija, gaunanti apie 4 taškus MAP, o skaičiavimo laiko sumažėjimas – 10.', 'mk': 'Тесните специјализирани споредливи корпора честопати се мали во големина. Оваа особност тешко е да се изградат ефикасни модели за добивање еквиваленти на превод, особено за помалку чести и ретки зборови. Еден начин да го надминеме ова прашање е да ја збогатиме специјализираната корпора со надворешни ресурси. Иако некои неодамнешни студии покажаа подобрувања со користење на зголемување на податоците, методот на збогатување беше приближно спроведен со додавање податоци надвор од доменот без посебно внимание на тоа како да се збогатат зборовите и како да се направи тоа оптимално. Во овој весник, контрастираме неколку техники за селекција на податоци за подобрување на двојјазичната индукција на лексикони од специјализирани споредливи тела. We first apply two well-established data selection techniques often used in machine translation that is: Tf-Idf and cross entropy.  Then, we propose to exploit BERT for data selection.  Вкупно, сите предложени техники го подобруваат квалитетот на извадените двојјазични лексикони со голема маргина. Најдобар модел е крстоентропијата, добивајќи добивка од околу 4 поени во МАП, додека се намалува времето на пресметка за фактор од 10.', 'ms': 'Korpora yang boleh dibandingkan yang sempit sering kecil dalam saiz. Keutamaan ini membuat ia sukar untuk membina model efisien untuk mendapatkan ekvivalen terjemahan, terutama untuk perkataan yang kurang sering dan jarang. Satu cara untuk mengatasi isu ini adalah untuk memperkaya korpra khusus dengan sumber luar domain. Walaupun beberapa kajian baru-baru ini menunjukkan peningkatan menggunakan peningkatan data, kaedah peningkatan secara sekitar dilakukan dengan menambah data luar domain tanpa perhatian tertentu diberikan kepada bagaimana untuk memperkaya perkataan dan bagaimana untuk melakukannya secara optimal. Dalam kertas ini, kita bertentangan beberapa teknik pemilihan data untuk meningkatkan induksi leksikon bilingual dari korpra yang boleh dibandingkan khusus. Kami pertama-tama melaksanakan dua teknik pemilihan data yang ditetapkan dengan baik sering digunakan dalam terjemahan mesin yang ialah: Tf-Idf dan cross entropy. Kemudian, kami melamar untuk mengeksploitasi BERT untuk pemilihan data. Secara keseluruhan, semua teknik yang diusulkan meningkatkan kualiti leksikon bilingual yang dikekstrak dengan margin besar. Model yang paling berkesan adalah entropi salib, mendapatkan keuntungan kira-kira 4 titik dalam MAP sementara mengurangi masa pengiraan dengan faktor 10.', 'no': 'Spesialisert sammenlignbar korpora er ofte lite i storleiken. Dette partikularitetet gjer det vanskeleg å bygge effektive modeller for å henta omsetjingskvalidant, spesielt for mindre ofte og sjeldre ord. Eit måte å overføra dette problemet er å rykke den spesialiserte korpora med uten domeneressursar. Selv om nokre nyleg studier har vist forbetringar ved hjelp av dataaugmentasjon, vart forstørringsmetoden gjennomgått ved å leggja ut- domenedata med ingen spesielt oppmerksomhet til korleis å rykka ord og korleis å gjera det optimalt. I denne papiret contrasterer vi fleire datautvalsteknikk for å forbedra bilingårlege leksikonsinduksjon frå spesialiserte sammenlignbare korpora. Vi bruker først to godt utvalte datateknikk som ofte brukar i maskinsomsetjinga, som er: Tf- Idf og kryss- entropi. Så foreslår vi å bruka BERT for datautval. Alle foreslåde teknikkene forbedrar kvaliteten til dei ekstraherte bilinguelleksikonene med ein stor margin. Den beste utføringsmodulen er kryss-entropien, som får opplevelsen av omtrent 4 punkt i MAP mens rekningstid reduserer med ein faktor av 10.', 'ml': 'പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന നര്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ എപ്പോഴും വലിപ്പം ചെറുതാണ്. പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ സമാനം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിന് ഈ പ്രത്യേക പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നത് പ്രയാസകരമാണ്. പ്രത്യേക ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ പരാജയപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള ഒരു വഴിയാണ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച കോര്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200dണയെ സമ്പന്നമാക്കാന്\u200d പോകുന്നത്,  അടുത്ത കുറച്ചു പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും വാക്കുകള്\u200d സമ്പാദിക്കുന്നതും എങ്ങനെ ചെയ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ് നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം സ്ഥാപിച്ച രണ്ടു ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എസ്റ്റോപ്പിയ പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d BERT ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ്. മൊത്തം, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളൊക്കെയും ഒരു വലിയ മാര്\u200dഗിന്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകയാണ് ക്രിസ്സ് എന്\u200dട്രോപ്പി, MAP ന്റെ 4 പോയിന്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് നേടുന്നത്. 10 കാരണം കുറഞ', 'pl': 'Wąskie wyspecjalizowane porównywalne korpusy są często małe. Ta szczególność utrudnia budowę efektywnych modeli pozyskiwania ekwiwalentów tłumaczeniowych, zwłaszcza dla mniej częstych i rzadkich słów. Jednym ze sposobów na przezwyciężenie tego problemu jest wzbogacenie wyspecjalizowanych korpusów o zasoby poza domeną. Chociaż niektóre ostatnie badania wykazały ulepszenia wykorzystujące rozszerzenie danych, metoda wzbogacania została z grubsza przeprowadzona poprzez dodanie danych poza domeną bez szczególnej uwagi na to, jak wzbogacić słowa i jak to zrobić optymalnie. W niniejszym artykule porównujemy kilka technik selekcji danych w celu poprawy indukcji dwujęzycznego leksykonu ze specjalistycznych porównywalnych korpusów. Najpierw stosujemy dwie ugruntowane techniki selekcji danych często stosowane w tłumaczeniu maszynowym, tj. Tf-Idf i entropię krzyżową. Następnie proponujemy wykorzystanie BERT do selekcji danych. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, wszystkie proponowane techniki znacznie poprawiają jakość ekstrahowanych dwujęzycznych leksykonów. Najlepiej wydajnym modelem jest entropia krzyżowa, uzyskująca zysk około 4-punktów w MAP przy jednoczesnym skracaniu czasu obliczeń o współczynnik 10.', 'ro': 'Corpurile comparabile specializate sunt adesea mici ca dimensiuni. Această particularitate face dificilă construirea unor modele eficiente pentru dobândirea echivalentelor traducerii, în special pentru cuvintele mai puțin frecvente și rare. O modalitate de a depăși această problemă este de a îmbogăți corporațiile specializate cu resurse din afara domeniului. Deși unele studii recente au arătat îmbunătățiri folosind augmentarea datelor, metoda de îmbogățire a fost efectuată aproximativ prin adăugarea de date din afara domeniului, fără să se acorde o atenție deosebită modului de îmbogățire a cuvintelor și modului de a o face în mod optim. În această lucrare, contrastăm mai multe tehnici de selecție a datelor pentru a îmbunătăți inducția lexiconului bilingv de la corpore comparabile specializate. Mai întâi aplicăm două tehnici bine stabilite de selecție a datelor utilizate adesea în traducerea automată și anume: Tf-Idf și entropie încrucișată. Apoi, propunem exploatarea BERT pentru selectarea datelor. În general, toate tehnicile propuse îmbunătățesc calitatea lexicoanelor bilingve extrase cu o marjă mare. Cel mai bun model este entropia încrucișată, obținând un câștig de aproximativ 4 puncte în MAP, reducând timpul de calcul cu un factor de 10.', 'mt': 'Korpora komparabbli speċjalizzata stretta ta’ spiss hija ta’ daqs żgħir. Din il-partikolarità tagħmilha diffiċli li jinbnew mudelli effiċjenti biex jinkisbu ekwivalenti tat-traduzzjoni, speċjalment għal kliem inqas frekwenti u rari. Mod wieħed biex tingħeleb din il-kwistjoni huwa li l-korpora speċjalizzata tiġi arrikkita b’riżorsi barra d-dominju. Għalkemm xi studji reċenti wrew titjib bl-użu ta’ żieda fid-dejta, il-metodu ta’ arrikkiment twettaq b’mod approssimattiv billi żdiedet dejta barra d-dominju mingħajr ma ngħatat l-ebda attenzjoni partikolari lejn kif għandhom jiġu arrikkiti l-kliem u kif għandu jsir bl-aħjar mod. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nikkuntrastaw diversi tekniki ta’ għażla tad-dejta biex itejbu l-induzzjoni tal-lexicon bilingwi minn korpra komparabbli speċjalizzata. L-ewwel nett napplikaw żewġ tekniki tal-għażla tad-dejta stabbiliti sew li spiss jintużaw fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni li huma: Tf-Idf u cross entropy. Imbagħad, nipproponu li l-BERT jiġi sfruttat għall-għażla tad-dejta. B’mod ġenerali, it-tekniki kollha proposti jtejbu l-kwalità tal-lexicons bilngwi estratti b’marġini kbir. Il-mudell bl-a ħjar prestazzjoni huwa l-entropija trasversali, li tikseb qligħ ta’ madwar 4 punti f’MAP filwaqt li tnaqqas il-ħin tal-komputazzjoni b’fattur ta’ 10.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдсэн харьцуулагдмал корпора ихэвчлэн жижиг. Энэ тодорхойлолт нь үнэмшилтэй загваруудыг бий болгох нь хэцүү болгодог. Ялангуяа ихэвчлэн, ховор үгсийн хувьд илүү ихэвчлэн хэцүү болгодог. Эдгээр асуудлыг даван алдах нэг арга бол мэргэжлийн корпоратын баялаг байгуулах юм. Зарим саяхан судалгаанууд өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг ашиглан сайжруулах боломжтой болсон ч, баялаг байгуулах арга нь тодорхой мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлж байлаа. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр хэл хэлний лексикон үйлдвэрлэлийн тулд олон өгөгдлийн сонголтын техникуудыг харьцуулдаг. Эхлээд бид хоёр сайн байгуулсан өгөгдлийн сонголтын технологийг машины орчуулалт хэрэглэдэг гэсэн үг: Tf-Idf, cross entropy. Тэгээд бид мэдээллийн сонголтын тулд BERT-г ашиглах гэж санал болно. Ихэнхдээ, бүх санал өгсөн техникууд хоёр хэлний лексиконуудын сайн сайн сайжруулдаг. Хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэлтийн загвар бол cross entropy, MAP-д ойролцоогоор 4 цэг ашиглаж, тооцоолох цаг нь 10-ын үржигдэж багасгаж байна.', 'so': 'Qoraxda khaas ah ee isku barbaran waa inta badan yar yihiin. This particularity makes it difficult to build efficient models to acquire translation equivalents, especially for less frequent and rare words.  Wadada laga adkaado arrintan waa in shirkadda khaaska ah lagu hodanayo oo aan hanti karin hanti aan aheyn. In kastoo waxbarashooyinkii ugu dambeeyey qaarkood waxay tuseen hagaajinta ku isticmaalka kordhinta data, qaabka hodantinimada waxaa lagu sameeyay si aad u hodanayo hadalka iyo siduu u sameeyo si gaar ah. Warqadan, waxaynu kala duwan nahay qalabka doorashada ee macluumaadka si loo hagaajiyo ganacsiga labo luqad ah ee ganacsiga ee gaarka ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaannu codsanaynaa laba tacliin doorashada macluumaadka oo aad u sahlan, sida badan waxaa lagu isticmaalaa tarjumaadda machine-Idf iyo koritaanka. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan BERT u isticmaalno doorasho data. Dhammaan teknikada la soo jeeday oo dhammu waxay kordhisaa qiimaha la soo saaray labo luqadood oo aad u weyn. Tusaale sameynta ugu wanaagsan waa qoraalka iskutallaabta lagu kordhiyo, marka lagu soo kordhiyo wakhtiga xisaabinta 10.', 'sv': 'Smala specialiserade jämförbara korpor är ofta små i storlek. Denna särart gör det svårt att bygga effektiva modeller för att förvärva översättningsekvivalenter, särskilt för mindre frekventa och sällsynta ord. Ett sätt att övervinna detta problem är att berika specialiserade corpora med resurser utanför domänen. Även om vissa nyligen genomförda studier har visat förbättringar med hjälp av dataförstärkning, genomfördes berikningsmetoden grovt genom att lägga till data utanför domänen utan särskild uppmärksamhet på hur man berikar ord och hur man gör det optimalt. I denna uppsats kontrasterar vi flera dataurvalstekniker för att förbättra tvåspråkig lexikoninduktion från specialiserade jämförbara korpora. Först tillämpar vi två väletablerade dataurvalstekniker som ofta används i maskinöversättning: Tf-Idf och korsentropi. Sedan föreslår vi att BERT utnyttjas för dataval. Sammantaget förbättrar alla föreslagna tekniker kvaliteten på de extraherade tvåspråkiga lexikonerna med stor marginal. Den bästa modellen är korsentropin, vilket ger en vinst på ca 4 poäng i MAP samtidigt som beräkningstiden minskar med en faktor 10.', 'si': 'විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ කොර්පෝරා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වි මේ විශේෂතාවය අමාරුයි, විශේෂයෙන්ම අමාරුයි වචන වචන වලින් විශේෂයෙන් පරිවර්තනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ විශේෂ කර්පෝරාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අලුත් අධ්\u200dයානය සමහර විදියට දත්ත වැඩි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට තියෙනවා නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි මේ පත්තරේ අපි දත්ත තෝරාගන්න තාක්ෂණාවක් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂය සම්බන්ධ කර්පෝරාවක් වලින්  අපි මුලින්ම හොඳ ස්ථාපනය කරපු දත්ත තෝරණ තාක්ෂණික දෙකක් භාවිත කරනවා මෙෂින් පරිවාදයෙන්: Tf-IdF ස ඊට පස්සේ, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා BERT එක දත්ත තෝරාගන්න. සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, සියළු ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ලෙක්සිකෝන්ස් වලට ලොකු මාර්ජින්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය තමයි ප්\u200dරමාණය ඇන්ට්\u200dරොපියා, MAP වලින් පින්තූර 4 වලින් පරීක්ෂණ කාලයක් අඩුවෙන්නේ', 'sr': 'Narudžba specijalizovana usporedno telo je često mala veličina. Ova posebnost čini teško izgraditi efikasne modele da dobijete ekvivalente prevoda, posebno za manje često i retko rečeno reči. Jedan način da prevaziđemo ovaj problem je da obogatimo specijalizovanu korporu sa izvorima iz domena. Iako su neke nedavne studije pokazale poboljšanje koristeći povećanje podataka, metoda bogatstva je skoro provedena dodajući podatke izvan domena bez posebne pažnje na objašnjenje riječi i kako to optimalno učiniti. U ovom papiru kontrastiramo nekoliko tehnika selekcije podataka kako bi poboljšali indukciju bilijezičkog leksiona iz specijalizovanog usporednog korpora. Prvo primjenjujemo dve dobro uspostavljene tehnike selekcije podataka koje se često koriste u prevodu mašine, to je: Tf-Idf i krstoj entropiji. Onda predlažemo da iskoristimo BERT za izbor podataka. Uglavnom, sve predložene tehnike poboljšavaju kvalitet izvlačenih dvojezičkih leksiona velikom marginom. Najbolji izvršni model je prekršna entropija, dobijući dobitak od oko 4 bodova u MAP-u dok smanjuje vrijeme računala faktorom od 10.', 'ta': 'மிகவும் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட ஒப்பிடும் கோர்போரா பெரிய அளவில் சிறியது. மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சமன்பாட்டை பெற, குறிப்பாக அதிகமாக மற்றும் குறைவான வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இந்த சிறப்பான மாதிரிகளை உரு இந்த பிரச்சனையை வெற்றி பெற ஒரு வழி உள்ளது புரிந்த நிறுவனத்திற்கு வெளியே இல்லாத வளர்ச்சிகளை வளர்ச்சி செய சமீபத்தில் சில ஆராய்ச்சிகள் தரவு அதிகரிப்பை பயன்படுத்தி முன்னேற்றங்களை காண்பித்துள்ளார்களானாலும், வார்த்தைகளை வளர்த்தும் மற்றும் எப்படி செய்ய வேண In this paper, we contrast several data selection techniques to improve bilingual lexicon induction from specialized comparable corpora.  நாம் முதலில் இரண்டு நன்றாக நிறுவப்பட்ட தரவு தேர்வு தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் ப பின்னர், நாம் தகவல் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பிற்கு BERT ஐ பயன்படுத்த பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். மொத்தமாக, அனைத்து பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பமும் பெரிய இரு மொழி லெக்சிக்ஸின் தரமை மேம்படுத்துகிறது. சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரி குறுக்கு நுழைவு, MAP-ல் 4 புள்ளிகள் பெறுகிறது, கணக்கீட்டு நேரத்தை 10 காரணியால் குறைக்கும் போ', 'ur': 'نارروں کی مختلف مقایسہ قابل قابل مقایسہ کرپورا اکثر اندازے میں چھوٹی ہیں۔ یہ غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر کلمات کے لئے فعالیت کی مدل بنانے کے لئے مشکل ہے. اس مسئلہ پر غالب ہونے کا ایک طریقہ یہ ہے کہ مخصوص شرکت کو بغیر دومین کے سرمایہ سے ثروت دے۔ اگرچہ بعض اگلے تحقیقات نے ڈیٹا افزایش کے مطابق بہترین تحقیقات کو دکھایا ہے، ثروت کا طریقہ تقریباً دومین خارج سے ڈیٹا اضافہ کیا گیا تھا، اور کسی طرح باتوں کو ثروت کے ساتھ اور کس طرح عمدہ کرنا دیا گیا تھا۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت سی ڈیٹا انتخاب ٹیکنیکوں کی مخالفت کرتے ہیں کہ دو زبان کی لکسیون انڈاکشن کو مخالفت کریں۔ ہم پہلی بار دو بہترین ساختہ ڈیٹا انتخاب ٹیکنیک استعمال کرتے ہیں جو ماشین ترجمہ میں کبھی استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں یعنی: Tf-Idf اور cross entropy. پھر ہم ڈیٹا انتخاب کے لئے BERT کو استعمال کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. بالکل، تمام پیشنهاد تکنیکوں نے ایک بڑی محدودیت کے ذریعہ اٹھائے ہوئے دو زبان لکسونز کی کیفیت کو بہتر کر دیا۔ سب سے بہترین نمونڈل کرس انٹروپی ہے جو MAP میں 4 پوینٹوں کا فائدہ حاصل کرتا ہے اور کم کم کرتا ہے', 'vi': 'Thu nhỏ kinh doanh có thể so sánh rất nhỏ. Tính đặc biệt này làm khó xây dựng các mô hình hiệu quả để có được các bằng dịch, đặc biệt là với từ ít thường xuyên và hiếm có. Một cách để vượt qua vấn đề này là làm giàu cho tay hạ sĩ chuyên nghiệp bằng tài nguyên ngoại chế. Mặc dù một số nghiên cứu gần đây đã cho thấy cải tiến nhờ việc gia tăng dữ liệu, nhưng phương pháp làm giàu được tiến hành đại khái bằng việc thêm dữ liệu ngoài lĩnh vực mà không hề quan tâm đến cách cải thiện lời nói và cách làm nó theo cách nào. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đối lập vài kỹ thuật chọn dữ liệu nhằm cải tiến ngôn ngữ dẫn truyền từ từ cấu trúc có chữ. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi áp dụng hai kỹ thuật chọn dữ liệu được thiết lập thường dùng trong phiên dịch máy: Tf-Idf và thập tự tồn tại. Sau đó, chúng tôi đề nghị khai thác BERT để chọn dữ liệu. Toàn bộ, tất cả các kỹ thuật đã đề nghị cải thiện chất lượng ngôn ngữ được chiết xuất với một mức ngoại lệ lớn. Cách biểu hiện tốt nhất là thập dữ, đạt được khoảng 4 điểm trong MAV trong khi giảm thời gian tính bằng một nhân tố 10.', 'uz': "Koʻp doim oʻlchami juda katta. Bu xususiyatlar bir necha ko'p so'zlar va qisqa so'zlar uchun tashqi modellarni yaratish qiyin qiladi. Bu muammolani oshirish uchun bir usul, ma'lum kompaniyalarni qo'shish natijadagi manbalar bilan o'ylash. Yaqinda ko'pchilik o'qituvchilari maʼlumotni qoʻshishni ko'rsatadi, hozir domen maʼlumotni qoʻshish uchun taxminan soʻzlarni qanday soʻzlashga qaramasdan foydalanishni anglatmaydi. Bu hujjatda biz bir necha ma'lumot tanlash metodlarini boshqaramiz, ikkita tillar leksikan induksiyasini o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Biz birinchi marta yaxshi tayyorlangan maʼlumot tanlash technikni qoʻllamiz. Mashining tarjimalarida ko'p ishlatiladigan: Tf- Idf va cross entropy. Keyin biz maʼlumot tanlash uchun BERT'ni ishlab chiqaramiz. Umumiy bo'lgan hamma talab qilingan teknologiyani katta harfga ko'paytirilgan ikki tillar leksikaning sifatini oshirish mumkin. Bu eng yaxshi bajarish modeli - cross entropy, MAP'da 4 nuqta yozib olish va 10 faktori bilan hisoblash vaqtini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'nl': "Smalle gespecialiseerde vergelijkbare corpora's zijn vaak klein van formaat. Deze bijzonderheid maakt het moeilijk om efficiënte modellen te bouwen om vertaalequivalenten te verwerven, vooral voor minder frequente en zeldzame woorden. Een manier om dit probleem op te lossen is door de gespecialiseerde corpora te verrijken met bronnen buiten het domein. Hoewel sommige recente studies verbeteringen hebben aangetoond met behulp van data augmentatie, werd de verrijkingsmethode grofweg uitgevoerd door out-of-domain data toe te voegen zonder bijzondere aandacht te besteden aan hoe woorden te verrijken en hoe dit optimaal te doen. In dit artikel contrasteren we verschillende data selectie technieken om tweetalige lexicon inductie te verbeteren van gespecialiseerde vergelijkbare corpora. We passen eerst twee gevestigde dataselectietechnieken toe die vaak worden gebruikt in machinevertaling: Tf-Idf en kruisentropie. Vervolgens stellen we voor om BERT te exploiteren voor gegevensselectie. Over het algemeen verbeteren alle voorgestelde technieken de kwaliteit van de geëxtraheerde tweetalige lexicons met een grote marge. Het best presterende model is de kruisentropie, waarbij een aanwinst van ongeveer vier punten in MAP wordt verkregen terwijl de rekentijd met een factor 10 wordt verminderd.", 'da': 'Smalle specialiserede sammenlignelige korpora er ofte små i størrelse. Denne særlighed gør det vanskeligt at opbygge effektive modeller til erhvervelse af oversættelsesækvivalenter, især for mindre hyppige og sjældne ord. En måde at overvinde dette problem på er at berige de specialiserede korpora med out-of-domæne ressourcer. Selvom nogle nylige undersøgelser har vist forbedringer ved hjælp af dataforøgelse, blev berigelsesmetoden groft gennemført ved at tilføje data uden for domænet uden særlig opmærksomhed på, hvordan man beriger ord og hvordan man gør det optimalt. I denne artikel kontrasterer vi flere dataudvælgelsesteknikker for at forbedre tosproget leksikon induktion fra specialiserede sammenlignelige corpora. Vi anvender først to veletablerede dataudvælgelsesteknikker, der ofte anvendes i maskinoversættelse, nemlig: Tf-Idf og krydsentropi. Derefter foreslår vi at udnytte BERT til dataudvælgelse. Samlet set forbedrer alle de foreslåede teknikker kvaliteten af de udvundne tosprogede leksikoner med stor margin. Den bedst ydende model er cross entropi, der opnår en gevinst på omkring 4 point i MAP, mens beregningstiden reduceres med en faktor på 10.', 'bg': 'Тесните специализирани сравними корпуси често са малки по размер. Тази особеност затруднява изграждането на ефективни модели за придобиване на еквиваленти на превод, особено за по-рядко срещани и редки думи. Един от начините да преодолеем този проблем е да обогатим специализираните корпорации с ресурси извън домейна. Въпреки че някои скорошни проучвания показват подобрения с помощта на увеличаване на данните, методът за обогатяване е грубо проведен чрез добавяне на данни извън домейна, без особено внимание да се обръща на това как да обогати думите и как да се направи оптимално. В тази статия контрастираме няколко техники за подбор на данни, за да подобрим двуезичната индукция на лексикона от специализирани сравними корпуси. Първо прилагаме две добре утвърдени техники за подбор на данни, често използвани в машинния превод, а именно: и кръстосана ентропия. След това предлагаме да се използва BERT за подбор на данни. Като цяло всички предложени техники подобряват качеството на извлечените двуезични лексикони с голям марж. Най-добре представящият модел е кръстосаната ентропия, получаваща печалба от около 4 точки в МАП, като същевременно намалява времето за изчисляване с коефициент 10.', 'de': 'Enge spezialisierte vergleichbare Korpora sind oft klein. Diese Besonderheit macht es schwierig, effiziente Modelle zu erstellen, um Übersetzungsäquivalente zu erwerben, insbesondere für seltenere und seltenere Wörter. Eine Möglichkeit, dieses Problem zu überwinden, besteht darin, die spezialisierten Korpora mit Ressourcen außerhalb der Domäne anzureichern. Obwohl einige neuere Studien Verbesserungen durch Datenaugementation gezeigt haben, wurde die Anreicherungsmethode grob durch Hinzufügen von Daten außerhalb der Domäne durchgeführt, ohne dass besonderes Augenmerk darauf gelegt wurde, wie Wörter angereichert und wie sie optimal gemacht werden können. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir verschiedene Datenauswahltechniken gegenüber, um die zweisprachige Lexikoninduktion von spezialisierten vergleichbaren Korpora zu verbessern. Zunächst wenden wir zwei etablierte Datenauswahltechniken an, die häufig in der maschinellen Übersetzung verwendet werden: Tf-Idf und Kreuzentropie. Dann schlagen wir vor, BERT für die Datenauswahl zu nutzen. Insgesamt verbessern alle vorgeschlagenen Techniken die Qualität der extrahierten zweisprachigen Lexika erheblich. Das leistungsstärkste Modell ist die Kreuzentropie, die einen Gewinn von etwa vier Punkten in MAP erhält, während die Rechenzeit um den Faktor 10 reduziert wird.', 'id': 'Kopora spesialisasi yang sempit yang bisa dibandingkan sering kecil dalam ukuran. Keutamaan ini membuat sulit untuk membangun model efisien untuk mendapatkan ekvivalen terjemahan, terutama untuk kata-kata yang kurang sering dan langka. Satu cara untuk mengatasi masalah ini adalah memperkaya korpra khusus dengan sumber daya luar domain. Meskipun beberapa studi baru-baru ini menunjukkan peningkatan menggunakan peningkatan data, metode peningkatan secara sekitar dilakukan dengan menambahkan data luar domain tanpa perhatian tertentu untuk bagaimana memperkaya kata-kata dan bagaimana melakukannya secara optimal. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengkonstrasi beberapa teknik pemilihan data untuk meningkatkan induksi lexikon bilingual dari korpora berbanding khusus. Kami pertama-tama menerapkan dua teknik pemilihan data yang ditentukan dengan baik sering digunakan dalam terjemahan mesin yang adalah: Tf-Idf dan cross entropy. Lalu, kami mengusulkan untuk mengeksploitasi BERT untuk pemilihan data. Secara umum, semua teknik yang diusulkan meningkatkan kualitas lexikon bilingual yang dikekstraksi dengan margin besar. Model yang paling berhasil adalah entropi salib, mendapatkan keuntungan sekitar 4 poin dalam MAP sementara mengurangi waktu komputasi dengan faktor 10.', 'hr': 'Narrow specializirana usporedbena tijela često su mala veličina. Ova osobnost čini teško izgraditi učinkovite modele kako bi dobili ekvivalente prevoda, posebno za manje česte i rijetke riječi. Jedan način za prevladanje ovog pitanja je obogatiti specijalizovanu korporaciju s izvan domena resursa. Iako su neke nedavne ispitivanja pokazale poboljšanje s povećanjem podataka, metoda bogatstva je skoro provedena dodajući podatke izvan domena bez posebne pažnje na objašnjenje riječi i kako to optimalno učiniti. U ovom papiru kontrastiramo nekoliko tehnika selekcije podataka kako bi poboljšali indukciju bilijezičkih leksiona iz specijaliziranog usporednog tijela. Prvo primjenjujemo dvije dobro uspostavljene tehnike selekcije podataka često se koriste u prevodu strojeva, to je: Tf-Idf i krstom entropiji. Onda predlažemo da iskoristimo BERT za izbor podataka. Općenito, sve predložene tehnike poboljšavaju kvalitet izvlačenih dvojezičkih leksiona velikom marginom. Najbolji izvršni model je krsno entropija, dobivajući dobit od oko 4 točka u MAP-u dok smanjuje vrijeme računala čimbenom od 10.', 'sw': 'Kampuni maalumu inayofanana na mabomu mara nyingi ni ndogo sana. Utangazaji huu unafanya vigumu kujenga mifano yenye ufanisi kupata sawa na tafsiri, hususani kwa maneno ya mara chache na nadra. Njia moja ya kushinda suala hili ni kutajirisha kampuni maalumu bila rasilimali za ndani. Ingawa baadhi ya utafiti wa hivi karibuni umeonyesha maendeleo kwa kutumia kuongeza taarifa, mbinu za utajiri zilifanyika kwa kuongeza takwimu za nje ya ndani ambazo hazina maana ya namna ya kutajiri maneno na jinsi ya kufanya hivyo kwa matumaini. Katika karatasi hii, tunatofautiana na mbinu kadhaa za uchaguzi wa data ili kuboresha sekta ya lexico ya lugha mbili kutoka kwa kampuni maalumu inayofanana. Kwanza tunatumia mbinu mbili za uchaguzi wa taarifa zilizowekwa vizuri mara nyingi zinazotumika katika tafsiri ya mashine ambayo ni: Tf-Idf na kupitia ujumbe. Kisha, tunapendekeza kutumia BERT kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa data. Overall, all the proposed techniques improve the quality of the extracted bilingual lexicons by a large margin.  Mfano bora wa kufanya kazi ni kuingia kwa kasi, kupata ongezeko la takriban pointi 4 katika MAP wakati akipungua muda wa hisabati kwa sababu ya 10.', 'fa': 'شرکت مخصوص متخصص قابل مقایسه اغلب اندازه کوچک هستند. این ویژگی برای ساختن مدل\u200cهای موثرت سخت می\u200cسازد که برابر ترجمه\u200cها باشد، مخصوصا برای کلمات کمتر و نادر باشد. یک راهی برای تغییر این مسئله این است که شرکت متخصص را با منابع خارج از دومین ثروت کنیم. اگرچه برخی مطالعات اخیر با استفاده از افزایش داده نشون داده\u200cاند، روش افزایش داده\u200cها با اضافه داده\u200cهای خارج از دامنه\u200cها با هیچ توجه ویژه\u200cای به چگونه به کلمات ثروتمندی و چگونه به optimal انجام آن داده\u200cاند. در این کاغذ، ما چند تکنیک انتخاب داده را تفاوت می\u200cکنیم تا سوداگرایی زبان\u200cهای دوزخ را از شرکت مقایسه\u200cکننده متخصص بهبود کنیم. ما اول دو تکنیک انتخاب داده\u200cهای خوب استفاده می\u200cکنیم که اغلب در ترجمه ماشین استفاده می\u200cشود: Tf-Idf و انتروپی cross entropy. پس ما پیشنهاد می کنیم که BERT را برای انتخاب داده استفاده کنیم. در general, all the proposed techniques improve the quality of the bilingual lexicons extracted by a large margin. بهترین مدل عملکرد اینتروپی است که در زمان کاهش زمان محاسبات با یک faktor از ۱۰ دریافت می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "Gizli ýagdaýlaşýan ýagdaýlaşýan korpora köplenç kiçi ulykda kiçi Bu kesişik terjime ekvivaleni almak üçin etkinlik nusgalary gurmak kyn edir, ýöne azajyk we nadir sözler üçin. Bu meseleyi başarmak için bir yol, etkileşimli korporasynı domuz kaynaklarıyla zenginleştirmek. Ýakyndaky birnäçe öwrenmeler maglumatlary ýüklemek üçin gelişmeleri görkezilýändir, baglanma yöntemi degişli domençä maglumatlary eklemek üçin hiç hili üns berilmeýän sözlere we nähili gowy etmelidir. Bu kagyzda, birnäçe maglumat saýlamak tekniklerini örän aýratyn edilen kiçiräk dilden geliştirmek üçin karşılaşýarys. Ilkinji gezek maşynyň terjimesinde ullanýan iki gowy möhkəm terjime edilen maglumat saýlamak tekniklerini uygulapdyrys. Bu: Tf-Idf we geçiş entropiýasy. Soňra BERT'i bergi saýlamak üçin ulanmagy teklip berýäris. Mundan hemme teknikler, gaýd edilen iki dil lingwisiň keyfiýetini uly gabdaly bilen geliştirirler. Iň gowy eden nusga - cross entropiýa, MAP'da 4 puç gazanýar we hesaplamak wagtyny 10 küçürende azaltýar.", 'am': 'የቆሮፓር ምርጫዎች ብዙ ጊዜ ትንሽ ናቸው፡፡ ይህም በተለየ ትርጉም ምሳሌዎችን ለማግኘት ባስቸጋጀ፣ ይልቁንም ለጥቂት ጊዜ እና ትንሽ ቃላት ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ One way to overcome this issue is to enrich the specialized corpora with out-of-domain resources.  ከቅርብ ዘመን አንዳንዶቹ የድምፅ አካባቢዎችን በመጠቀም የዳታ አካባቢ ማድረግ የሚያሳየው ቢሆንም፣ የሀብት ሥርዓት ከውጭ የውጤት ዳታዎችን በመጨመር በተለየ ቃላትን እንዴት ለማጠቀም እና እንዴት እንደሚፈቅድ ለማድረግ እንደተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ሁለት ቋንቋዎች ሊክሲኮን ከቆርፖርት ለማሻሻል ብዙ ዳታ ምርጫዎችን እናተካክላለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ ሁለት የተከታተሉ የዳታ ምርጫ techniques እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ BERT ለዳታ ምርጫ ለመፍጠር እንመክራለን:: በተጠቃሚ፣ በተዘጋጀው የሁለት ቋንቋዎች ሊክሲኮን ጥያቄን በቁጥር ያሳድጋል፡፡ የተሻለ የሥርዓት ሞዴል መቆጣጠር በ10 ጥያቄ ሲያሳዝን በመMAP 4 ነጥቦችን ለማግኘት ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Korporat e ngushta të përshtatshme janë shpesh të vogla në madhësi. Kjo veçanti e bën të vështirë të ndërtohet modele efikase për të fituar ekvivalentët e përkthimit, veçanërisht për fjalë më të shpeshta dhe të rralla. One way to overcome this issue is to enrich the specialized corpora with out-of-domain resources.  Megjithëse disa studime të fundit kanë treguar përmirësime duke përdorur rritjen e të dhënave, metoda e pasurimit u krye në mënyrë të afërt duke shtuar të dhëna jashtë domenisë pa vëmendje të veçantë për mënyrën e pasurimit të fjalëve dhe si ta bëjmë atë optimalisht. Në këtë letër, ne kontrastojmë disa teknika të zgjedhjes së të dhënave për të përmirësuar induksionin e lexikonëve dygjuhës nga korpra të përshtatshme të specializuar. Ne aplikojmë së pari dy teknika të zgjedhjes së të dhënave të përcaktuara shpesh të përdorura në përkthimin e makinave që është: Tf-Idf dhe cross entropy. Pastaj, ne propozojmë të shfrytëzojmë BERT për zgjedhjen e të dhënave. Në përgjithësi, të gjitha teknikat e propozuara përmirësojnë cilësinë e lexikonëve dygjuhës të nxjerrë me një margin të madh. Modeli më i mirë performues është entropia kryqësore, duke marrë një fitim prej rreth 4 pikësh në MAP ndërsa zvogëlon kohën e llogaritjes me një faktor prej 10.', 'af': "Gespesialiseerde vergelykbare korpora is dikwels klein in grootte. Hierdie eienskaplike maak dit moeilik om effektief modele te bou om vertalingsekvivalente te te kry, veral vir minder ofte en selfde woorde. Een manier om hierdie probleem te oorwin is om die spesialiseerde korpora te ryk met buite-domein hulpbronne. Alhoewel sommige onlangse studie het verbeteringe vertoon gebruik van data vergroot, was die vergroot metode gedoen deur uit-domein data byvoeg met geen spesifieke aandag gegee aan hoe om woorde te verryk en hoe dit optimal te doen nie. In hierdie papier, ons kontras verskeie data keuse teknike om twee tale leksikoon induksie te verbeter van spesialiseerde vergelykbare korpora. Ons toewend eerste twee goed geïnstalleerde data keuse teknike dikwels gebruik in masjien vertaling wat is: Tf- Idf en kruis entropie. Dan, ons voorstel om BERT te uitbrei vir data keuse. Alle voorgestelde teknike verbeter die kwaliteit van die uitgevoerde bilinguele leksikone deur 'n groot marge. Die beste uitvoerde model is die kruis entropie, wat 'n wins van omtrent 4 punte in MAP verkry terwyl die rekenaar tyd verklein deur 'n faktor van 10.", 'hy': 'Սուրբ համեմատական հատուկ մարմները հաճախ փոքր են: Այս առանձնահատկությունը դժվարանում է կառուցել արդյունավետ մոդելներ թարգմանման հավասար ձեռք բերելու համար, հատկապես ավելի հաճախ և հազվադեպ բառերի համար: Այս խնդիրը հաղթահարելու մեկ միջոցն է հարստացնել մասնագիտական կառուցվածքը օտար բնագավառների միջոցով: Չնայած որոշ վերջին ուսումնասիրություններ ցույց են տալիս զարգացումներ, օգտագործելով տվյալների աճը, հարստացման մեթոդը մոտավորապես կատարվել է արտաքին տվյալներ ավելացնելով առանձին ուշադրություն չդարձնելով բառերի հարստացման և լավագույնը: In this paper, we contrast several data selection techniques to improve bilingual lexicon induction from specialized comparable corpora.  Սկզբում մենք կիրառում ենք երկու լավ հաստատված տվյալների ընտրության մեթոդներ, որոնք հաճախ օգտագործվում են մեքենային թարգմանման մեթոդներում, այսինքն՝ Tf-IDf և խաչված էնտրոպիա: Հետո մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել BER-ը տվյալների ընտրության համար: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, բոլոր առաջարկված տեխնիկաները բարելավում են դուրս բերված երկլեզու լեքսիկոնների որակը մեծ արժեքով: Լավագույն արդյունքում ունեցող մոդելը խաչը էնտրոպիան է, որը ստանում է մոտ 4 միավոր շահույթ MAP-ում, մինչդեռ հաշվարկների ժամանակը նվազում է 10-ով:', 'az': "Özgürlü müxtəlif korpora çox kiçik idi. Bu xüsusiyyətlər təkrarlama ekvivalentlərini almaq üçün faydalı modellər inşa etmək çətin edir, özellikle daha az sıxıntılı və nadir sözlər üçün. Bu məsələnin üstünə gəlməsinin bir yolu, xüsusiyyətli korporanı domain resurslarından qurtarmaq. Bazı yeni təhsil məlumatları məlumatları artırmaq vasitəsilə yaxşılıqlarını göstərsə də, genişlənmə metodumu dəyişdirilmiş domena verilən məlumatları necə baxılacağına və necə yaxşılıqla edəcəyini gözləməyə baxmayaraq qeyri təhsil edilmişdir. Bu kağızda, biz birçox məlumat seçmə tekniklərini xüsusiyyətli kompatibil korporadan mükəmməlləndirmək üçün iki dil leksikon induksyonunu yaxşılaşdırırıq. Biz ilk dəfə mašin çevirində istifadə edilən iki yaxşı qurulmuş məlumat seçmə tekniklərini istifadə edirik: Tf-Idf və cross entropy. Sonra BERT'u məlumat seçmək üçün istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Bütün təklif edilmiş tekniklər, böyük bir margin ilə çıxarılan iki dil leksiklərinin keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırır. Ən yaxşı performans modeli, MAP'da 4 puç kazanmış, hesaplama zamanı 10 faktörü ilə azaltmış halda çox entropiyyətdir.", 'bn': 'নারো বিশেষ করে তুলনায় কোর্পোরা প্রায়শই আকারে ছোট। এই বিশেষ বিশেষ করে কার্যকর মডেল তৈরি করা কঠিন করে অনুবাদের সমতুল্য পাওয়ার জন্য, বিশেষ করে বিশেষ করে প্রায়শ এবং বিদায় কথা এই বিষয়টিকে জয়ী করার একটি উপায় হচ্ছে বিশেষ কর্পোরাকে সমৃদ্ধ করার জন্য যেটা দোমেইনের সম্পদ বাদ দিয়েছে। যদিও কিছু সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা ডাটা যোগাযোগ ব্যবহার করে উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করেছে, তবে সমৃদ্ধ পদ্ধতি প্রকাশ করা হয়েছে ডোমেইনের বাইরে তথ্য যোগ করার জন্য, কিভাবে শব্দ সমৃদ্ধ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বেশ কিছু তথ্য নির্বাচন প্রযুক্তি বিশেষ কর্পোরা থেকে দুই ভাষা লেক্সিকোর শিল্পের উন্নতি করার বিরোধী  আমরা প্রথমে দুটি ভালো স্থাপনিত তথ্য নির্বাচন প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করি মেশিন অনুবাদে প্রায়শই ব্যবহৃত হয় যা হচ্ছে: Tf-Idf এব তারপর আমরা তথ্য নির্বাচনের জন্য বেরেট ব্যবহার করতে প্রস্তাব করি। Overall, all the proposed techniques improve the quality of the extracted bilingual lexicons by a large margin.  সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনীর মডেল হলো ক্রস এন্ট্রোপি, ম্যাপিতে প্রায় ৪ পয়েন্ট লাভ করতে পারে, যখন গণনার সময় ১০ ফাক্টর দ্বারা কমে যায়।', 'ko': '좁은 의미의 전공은 어료 라이브러리보다 통상적으로 규모가 비교적 작다.이런 특수성 때문에 번역이 비교적 빈번하지 않고 보기 드문 단어에 대해 효과적인 모델을 구축하기 어렵다.이 문제를 해결하는 방법의 하나는 역외 자원이 풍부한 전문 어료 라이브러리를 사용하는 것이다.비록 최근의 일부 연구에 의하면 데이터 확충 기술을 사용하는 것이 개선되었지만 충실한 방법은 기본적으로 역외 데이터를 첨가함으로써 이루어진 것으로 단어를 어떻게 충실하게 하고 최선의 방식으로 충실하게 하는지에 특별히 주의하지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 몇 가지 데이터 선택 기술을 비교하여 전문적인 비교 가능한 자료 라이브러리에서 이중 언어 어휘를 귀납하는 능력을 향상시켰다.우리는 먼저 기계 번역에서 자주 사용하는 두 가지 성숙한 데이터 선택 기술인 Tf-Idf와 교차 엔트로피를 응용했다.그리고 BERT를 활용한 데이터 선택을 제안했습니다.전반적으로 말하면 모든 제시된 기술은 이중 언어 어휘 추출의 질을 크게 향상시켰다.성능이 가장 좋은 모델은 교차 엔트로피로 지도에서 약 4개의 점의 이익을 얻는 동시에 계산 시간을 10배로 줄였다.', 'ca': "Les corpores estretes especialitzats comparables sovint tenen petites dimensions. Aquesta particularitat dificulta la construcció de models eficients per adquirir equivalents de traducció, especialment per paraules menys freqüents i rares. Una manera de superar aquest problema és enriquecer el corpora especialitzat amb recursos fora de domini. Malgrat que alguns estudis recents han demostrat millores utilitzant augmentació de dades, el mètode d'enriqueciment es va fer aproximadament afegint dades fora de domini sense prestar atenció especial a com enriquecer paraules i com fer-ho optimalment. En aquest article, contrastem diverses tècniques de selecció de dades per millorar l'inducció bilingüe de lexicons a partir de corpores especialitzats comparables. Primer aplicam dues tècniques de selecció de dades ben estables que sovint es fan servir en traducció màquina: Tf-Idf i entropia cruzada. Llavors proposem explotar BERT per seleccionar dades. En general, totes les tècniques proposades milloren la qualitat dels lexicons bilingües extraïts en un gran marge. El model més eficaç és l'entropia cruzada, obtenint un guany d'uns 4 punts en MAP mentre disminueix el temps de calcul en un factor de 10.", 'cs': 'Úzké specializované srovnatelné korpusy jsou často malé velikosti. Tato zvláštnost ztěžuje sestavení efektivních modelů pro získání ekvivalentů překladu, zejména pro méně častá a vzácná slova. Jedním ze způsobů, jak tento problém překonat, je obohatit specializované korpusy o zdroje mimo doménu. Ačkoli některé nedávné studie ukázaly zlepšení pomocí rozšíření dat, metoda obohacování byla zhruba provedena přidáním dat mimo doménu bez zvláštní pozornosti na to, jak obohacovat slova a jak to optimálně udělat. V tomto článku kontrolujeme několik technik výběru dat pro zlepšení indukce dvojjazyčného lexikonu ze specializovaných srovnatelných korpusů. Nejprve aplikujeme dvě dobře zavedené techniky výběru dat často používané v strojovém překladu, tj. Tf-Idf a křížovou entropii. Následně navrhujeme využít BERT pro výběr dat. Celkově všechny navržené techniky zlepšují kvalitu extrahovaných dvojjazyčných lexikonů značně. Nejlépe výkonným modelem je křížová entropie, získávající zisk asi čtyř bodů v MAP při zkracování výpočetní doby o faktor 10.', 'et': 'Kitsad spetsialiseerunud võrreldavad korpused on sageli väikesed. Selline eripära raskendab tõlkekvivalendide omandamise tõhusate mudelite loomist, eriti harvem esinevate ja haruldaste sõnade puhul. Üks viis selle probleemi ületamiseks on rikastada spetsialiseeritud korpuseid domeeniväliste ressurssidega. Kuigi mõned hiljutised uuringud on näidanud edusamme andmete suurendamise abil, viidi rikastamismeetod ligikaudu läbi domeeniväliste andmete lisamisega, pööramata erilist tähelepanu sellele, kuidas rikastada sõnu ja kuidas seda optimaalselt teha. Selles töös võrdleme mitmeid andmete valimise meetodeid, et parandada kakskeelset leksikoni induktsiooni spetsialiseerunud võrreldavatest korpustest. Esiteks rakendame masintõlkes kahte väljakujunenud andmevaliku meetodit: Tf-Idf ja ristentroopia. Seejärel teeme ettepaneku kasutada BERTi andmete valimiseks. Üldiselt parandavad kõik kavandatud meetodid ekstraheeritud kakskeelsete leksikonide kvaliteeti suurel määral. Kõige paremini toimiv mudel on ristentroopia, millega saavutatakse ligikaudu 4 punkti võrra MAP, vähendades arvutusaega 10-kordselt.', 'bs': 'Specijalno usporedno korporacije bolesti često su male veličine. Ova osobnost čini teško izgraditi efikasne modele za dobivanje ekvivalenta prevoda, posebno za manje često i rijetko riječi. Jedan način da prevaziđemo ovaj problem je obogatiti specijalizovanu korporaciju sa neposrednim resursima. Iako su neke nedavne ispitivanja pokazale poboljšanje koristeći povećanje podataka, metoda bogatstva je skoro provedena dodavanjem podataka izvan domena bez posebne pažnje na objašnjenje riječi i kako to optimalno učiniti. U ovom papiru, kontrastiramo nekoliko tehnika selekcije podataka kako bi poboljšali indukciju dvojezičkog leksikona iz specijaliziranog usporednog korpora. Prvo primjenjujemo dve dobro uspostavljene tehnike selekcije podataka koje se često koriste u prevodu strojeva, to je: Tf-Idf i krstoj entropiji. Onda predlažemo da iskoristimo BERT za izbor podataka. Općenito, sve predložene tehnike poboljšavaju kvalitet izvlačenih dvojezičkih leksiona velikom marginom. Najbolji izvršni model je prekršna entropija, dobivajući dobit od oko 4 bodova u MAP-u dok smanjuje vrijeme računala faktorom od 10.', 'fi': 'Kapeat erikoistuneet vertailukelpoiset corporat ovat usein kooltaan pieniä. Tämän erityispiirteen vuoksi on vaikea rakentaa tehokkaita malleja käännöskvivalenttien hankkimiseksi, erityisesti harvempien ja harvinaisten sanojen osalta. Yksi tapa ratkaista tämä ongelma on rikastuttaa erikoistuneita korpusia toimialueen ulkopuolisilla resursseilla. Vaikka jotkin viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet parannuksia datan lisäämisen avulla, rikastusmenetelmä toteutettiin karkeasti lisäämällä verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolista dataa kiinnittämättä erityistä huomiota siihen, miten sanoja rikastetaan ja miten se tehdään optimaalisesti. Tässä artikkelissa vertailemme useita tiedonvalintatekniikoita parantaaksemme kaksikielisen sanaston induktiota erikoistuneista vastaavista korpusista. Sovellamme ensin kahta hyvin vakiintunutta konekäännöksessä usein käytettyä tiedonvalintatekniikkaa: Tf-Idf ja ristiintantropia. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme BERT:n hyödyntämistä tietojen valinnassa. Kaiken kaikkiaan kaikki ehdotetut tekniikat parantavat kaksikielisten sanastojen laatua suurella marginaalilla. Parhaiten suoriutuva malli on ristientropia, joka saa noin 4 pisteen voiton MAP:ssä samalla kun laskennan aika lyhenee kertoimella 10.', 'ha': "QFontDatabase Wannan tayari yana da sauƙi wa ka sami misãlai masu iya amfani da misãlin fassarar, kuma da mafiya sauri da sauri. One way to overcome this issue is to enrich the specialized corpora with out-of-domain resources.  Haƙĩƙa, kuma kõ da akwai wasu fasanni na ƙara, sun nũna improvements game da ƙaramako da data, an yi amfani da metoden rikitanci a ƙidãya da a ƙara bayan-bayan-Domen, kuma ba da wani sha'ani da za ka rikitar da magana kuma a kan ka yi shi faransa. Ina cikin wannan takardan, Munã tsohatar da wasu masu shirya takwai na zaɓata ko kuma za mu kyautata kunnuwan leksisini biyu na'ura daga maimakon da aka ƙayyade. @ info: tooltip Sa'an nan kuma za mu buɗa BERT kan zaɓata. A jumla, duk tufãfin da aka buƙata, zai ƙara sifar da aka samu wa leksisin biyu na lugha mai girma. Babban mai amfani da shi shine koronto, yana da amfani da taki 4 points a MAP kuma yana ƙaranci lokacin lissafi da aka kamata 10.", 'sk': 'Ozki specializirani primerljivi korpusi so pogosto majhni. Zaradi te posebnosti je težko oblikovati učinkovite modele za pridobivanje enakovrednih prevodov, zlasti za manj pogoste in redke besede. Eden od načinov za premagovanje tega problema je obogatiti specializirane korpuse z zunajdomenskimi viri. Čeprav so nekatere nedavne študije pokazale izboljšave z uporabo povečanja podatkov, je bila metoda obogatitve v grobem izvedena z dodajanjem zunajdomenskih podatkov brez posebne pozornosti namenjene obogatitvi besed in optimalnemu izvajanju. V tem prispevku smo primerjali več tehnik izbire podatkov za izboljšanje indukcije dvojezičnega leksikona iz specializiranih primerljivih korpusov. Najprej uporabljamo dve uveljavljeni tehniki izbire podatkov, ki se pogosto uporabljata v strojnem prevajanju: Tf-Idf in križno entropijo. Nato predlagamo, da se BERT izkoristi za izbiro podatkov. Na splošno vse predlagane tehnike za veliko izboljšajo kakovost izvlečenih dvojezičnih leksikonov. Najbolj učinkovit model je navzkrižna entropija, ki pridobi približno 4 točke pridobitve v MAP, medtem ko se čas izračuna skrajša za faktor 10.', 'jv': 'Narrow section One method to help this question is to wealth the Specializated Body with out-of-domain tools. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé, ngéwé ngerasakno hukum sing dadi nggambar cara-cara sing dibutuhke language Awak dhéwé isih ngubah sistem sing sampeyan kabèh akeh-sampeyan datayang dipunangé kanggo tarjamahan karo sistem sing: T f-Idf lan krus entriopy. Mungkin, kita supoyo nggunakake BERT kanggo nambah data. Lahke kabèh, akeh tékno sing dipuluhaan luwih apik, akeh iso nggawe luwih apik lan akeh bantuan sing apik. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'גופורה מיוחדת צמודה משוואה לעתים קרובות קטנה בגודל. המיוחד הזה מקשה לבנות דוגמנים יעילים כדי להשיג שווים תרגום, במיוחד למילים פחות תדירות ורדירות. דרך אחת להתגבר על הנושא הזה היא לעשיר את הקופורה המיוחדת עם משאבים מחוץ לתחום. למרות שחלק מחקרים לאחרונה הראו שיפורים באמצעות שיפור נתונים, שיטת העשירות הובילה בערך על ידי הוספת נתונים מחוץ לתחום ללא תשומת לב מיוחדת בעיתון הזה, אנו משתנים במספר טכניקות בחירת נתונים כדי לשפר את ההדליקה של הלקסיקון השולשי מהגופורה השוואה המיוחדת. ראשית אנו משתמשים בשני טכניקות לבחירת נתונים מאושרות לעתים קרובות משתמשות בתרגום מכונות, זה: Tf-Idf ואנטרופיה צליבה. ואז, אנחנו מציעים לנצל את BERT לבחירת נתונים. באופן כללי, כל הטכניקות המוצעות משתפרות את איכות הלקסיקונים השולשיים המווצאים על ידי שווה גדולה. המודל הכי מוצלח הוא האנטרופיה הצלבית, להשיג רווח של כ-4 נקודות ב MAP בזמן שנפחית זמן החישוב על ידי גורם של 10.', 'bo': 'Narrow specialized comparable corporation often are small in size. དམིགས་བསལ་བ་འདིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསྐྱེད་ཐབས་ཤིག་ནི་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་ནོར་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ། Although some recent studies have shown improvements using data augmentation, the enrichment method was roughly conducted by adding out-of-domain data with no particular attention given to how to enrich words and how to do it optimally. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་པར་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གཉིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་ ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས། Tf- འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་(BERT)འདེམས་སྟངས་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པར་བསམ་བྱེད། ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ན། དམིགས རྩིས་འཁོར་སྐྱོན་མོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་cross entropy ། MAP ནང་དུ་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་དུས་ཚོད་ཉུང་བའི་གྲངས་ཀ་འདི་(4)ནང་ལས་ཕར་ཐོབ'}
{'en': 'A Locally Linear Procedure for Word Translation', 'es': 'Un procedimiento localmente lineal para la traducción de palabras', 'ar': 'إجراء خطي محليًا لترجمة الكلمات', 'pt': 'Um procedimento localmente linear para tradução de palavras', 'fr': 'Une procédure localement linéaire pour la traduction de mots', 'zh': '单词译局线性', 'ja': '単語翻訳のための局所的なリニアプロシージャ', 'hi': 'Word अनुवाद के लिए स्थानीय रूप से रैखिक कार्यविधि', 'ru': 'Локально линейная процедура для перевода слов', 'ga': 'Nós Imeachta Líneach go hÁitiúil le haghaidh Aistriú Focal', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Helyi lineáris eljárás a szófordításhoz', 'el': 'Μια τοπική γραμμική διαδικασία για τη μετάφραση λέξεων', 'it': 'Una procedura lineare locale per la traduzione di parole', 'kk': 'Сөзді аудару үшін жергілікті линиялық процедура', 'lt': 'Vietinė linijinė žodžių vertimo procedūra', 'mk': 'Локална линијарна процедура за превод на зборови', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Proċedura Linjari Lokali għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Kliem', 'ms': 'Prosedur Linear Setempat untuk Terjemahan Kata', 'mn': 'Үг орчуулалтын шугам процесс', 'no': 'Eit lokalt linjerprosedyr for ordomsetjing', 'pl': 'Lokalnie liniowa procedura tłumaczenia słów', 'sr': 'Lokalna linijska procedura za prevod reèi', 'ro': 'O procedură liniară locală pentru traducerea cuvintelor', 'si': 'වචන භාවිතය සඳහා ස්ථානික ලිනියර් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරමය', 'so': 'Ku baaraandegista qoraalka', 'sv': 'Ett lokalt linjärt förfarande för ordöversättning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thủ tục tuyến trực tiếp cho việc dịch từ', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Локално линейна процедура за превод на думи', 'hr': 'Lokalna linijska procedura za prevod riječi', 'nl': 'Een lokaal lineaire procedure voor woordvertaling', 'da': 'En lokal lineær procedure for ordoversættelse', 'de': 'Ein lokal lineares Verfahren zur Wortübersetzung', 'ko': '단어 번역의 국부적 선형 과정', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Sebuah Prosedur Linear Lokal untuk Terjemahan Kata', 'sw': 'Utendaji wa Kilingo cha Ndani kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Hadithi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një procedurë lokale lineare për përkthimin e fjalëve', 'tr': 'Kelimiň terjime üçin ýerleşdirim Metini Dolamak', 'am': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'S칬z 칂톛rcl톛m톛si 칲칞칲n Lokal Linear Procedur', 'bs': 'Lokalna linijska procedura za prevod riječi', 'cs': 'Lokálně lineární postup pro překlad slov', 'ca': 'Un procediment linear local de traducció de paraules', 'et': 'Sõnatõlke kohalikult lineaarne protseduur', 'fi': 'Paikallisesti lineaarinen menettely sanakäännökselle', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Lokalno linearni postopek za prevajanje besed', 'he': 'A Locally Linear Procedure for Word Translation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཚིག་སྐད་ཡིག་ལ་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ལས་སྦྱོར།'}
{'en': 'Learning a mapping between word embeddings of two languages given a dictionary is an important problem with several applications. A common mapping approach is using an orthogonal matrix. The Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) algorithm can be applied to find the optimal orthogonal matrix. This solution restricts the expressiveness of the translation model which may result in sub-optimal translations. We propose a natural extension of the PA algorithm that uses multiple orthogonal translation matrices to model the mapping and derive an algorithm to learn these multiple matrices. We achieve better performance in a bilingual word translation task and a cross-lingual word similarity task compared to the single matrix baseline. We also show how multiple matrices can model multiple senses of a word.', 'pt': 'Aprender um mapeamento entre incorporações de palavras de dois idiomas em um dicionário é um problema importante em vários aplicativos. Uma abordagem de mapeamento comum é usar uma matriz ortogonal. O algoritmo Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) pode ser aplicado para encontrar a matriz ortogonal ótima. Esta solução restringe a expressividade do modelo de tradução que pode resultar em traduções sub-ótimas. Propomos uma extensão natural do algoritmo PA que usa múltiplas matrizes de tradução ortogonal para modelar o mapeamento e derivar um algoritmo para aprender essas múltiplas matrizes. Conseguimos um melhor desempenho em uma tarefa de tradução de palavras bilíngües e uma tarefa de similaridade de palavras em vários idiomas em comparação com a linha de base de matriz única. Também mostramos como múltiplas matrizes podem modelar múltiplos sentidos de uma palavra.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage d'un mappage entre les intégrations de mots de deux langues dans un dictionnaire est un problème important dans plusieurs applications. Une approche cartographique courante consiste à utiliser une matrice orthogonale. L'algorithme d'analyse orthogonale des procrustes (PA) peut être appliqué pour trouver la matrice orthogonale optimale. Cette solution limite l'expressivité du modèle de traduction, ce qui peut entraîner des traductions sous-optimales. Nous proposons une extension naturelle de l'algorithme PA qui utilise plusieurs matrices de translation orthogonales pour modéliser le mappage et dériver un algorithme pour apprendre ces multiples matrices. Nous obtenons de meilleures performances dans une tâche de traduction de mots bilingue et une tâche de similitude de mots multilingue par rapport à la base de matrice unique. Nous montrons également comment plusieurs matrices peuvent modéliser plusieurs sens d'un mot.", 'es': 'Aprender un mapeo entre incrustaciones de palabras de dos idiomas dado un diccionario es un problema importante con varias aplicaciones. Un enfoque de mapeo común es el uso de una matriz ortogonal. El algoritmo Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) se puede aplicar para encontrar la matriz ortogonal óptima. Esta solución restringe la expresividad del modelo de traducción, lo que puede dar lugar a traducciones no óptimas. Proponemos una extensión natural del algoritmo PA que utiliza múltiples matrices de traducción ortogonal para modelar el mapeo y derivar un algoritmo para aprender estas múltiples matrices. Logramos un mejor rendimiento en una tarea de traducción bilingüe de palabras y una tarea de similitud de palabras en varios idiomas en comparación con la base de matriz única. También mostramos cómo múltiples matrices pueden modelar múltiples sentidos de una palabra.', 'ar': 'يعد تعلم التعيين بين تضمين كلمات لغتين في القاموس مشكلة مهمة في العديد من التطبيقات. نهج رسم الخرائط الشائع هو استخدام مصفوفة متعامدة. يمكن تطبيق خوارزمية تحليل Procrustes المتعامدة (PA) للعثور على المصفوفة المتعامدة المثلى. يقيد هذا الحل التعبير عن نموذج الترجمة مما قد يؤدي إلى ترجمات دون المستوى الأمثل. نقترح امتدادًا طبيعيًا لخوارزمية PA تستخدم مصفوفات ترجمة متعامدة متعددة لنمذجة التعيين واشتقاق خوارزمية لتعلم هذه المصفوفات المتعددة. نحقق أداءً أفضل في مهمة ترجمة كلمات ثنائية اللغة ومهمة تشابه كلمات متعددة اللغات مقارنة بخط أساس المصفوفة الواحدة. نعرض أيضًا كيف يمكن لمصفوفات متعددة أن تصوغ حواسًا متعددة للكلمة.', 'hi': 'शब्दकोश दिए गए दो भाषाओं के शब्द एम्बेडिंग के बीच एक मानचित्रण सीखना कई अनुप्रयोगों के साथ एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या है। एक सामान्य मानचित्रण दृष्टिकोण एक ओर्थोगोनल मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग कर रहा है। ऑर्थोगोनल प्रोक्रस्टेस विश्लेषण (पीए) एल्गोरिथ्म को इष्टतम ऑर्थोगोनल मैट्रिक्स खोजने के लिए लागू किया जा सकता है। यह समाधान अनुवाद मॉडल की अभिव्यंजकता को प्रतिबंधित करता है जिसके परिणामस्वरूप उप-इष्टतम अनुवाद हो सकते हैं। हम पीए एल्गोरिथ्म के एक प्राकृतिक विस्तार का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो मानचित्रण को मॉडल करने के लिए कई ओर्थोगोनल अनुवाद आव्यूहों का उपयोग करता है और इन एकाधिक आव्यूहों को सीखने के लिए एक एल्गोरिथ्म प्राप्त करता है। हम एकल मैट्रिक्स बेसलाइन की तुलना में एक द्विभाषी शब्द अनुवाद कार्य और एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द समानता कार्य में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि कैसे कई आव्यूह एक शब्द के कई इंद्रियों को मॉडल कर सकते हैं।', 'ja': '辞書が与えられた2つの言語の埋め込みの間のマッピングを学ぶことは、いくつかのアプリケーションで重要な問題です。一般的な写像アプローチは、直交行列を使用している。直交プロクルス分析（ Ｐ Ａ ）アルゴリズムを適用して、最適な直交行列を求めることができる。このソリューションは、最適以下の翻訳をもたらす可能性のある翻訳モデルの表現性を制限します。複数の直交変換行列を使用してマッピングをモデル化し、これらの複数の行列を学習するためのアルゴリズムを導出する、PAアルゴリズムの自然な拡張を提案します。私たちは、単一のマトリックスベースラインと比較して、バイリンガルの単語翻訳タスクとクロスリンガルの単語類似性タスクでより良いパフォーマンスを達成します。また、複数のマトリックスが単語の複数の感覚をどのようにモデル化できるかも示します。', 'ru': 'Изучение сопоставления между вложениями слов двух языков, заданных в словаре, является важной проблемой для нескольких приложений. Общим подходом к отображению является использование ортогональной матрицы. Алгоритм ортогонального прокрустового анализа (PA) может быть применен для нахождения оптимальной ортогональной матрицы. Это решение ограничивает выразительность модели перевода, что может привести к неоптимальным переводам. Мы предлагаем естественное расширение алгоритма PA, который использует несколько ортогональных матриц трансляции для моделирования отображения и выводит алгоритм для изучения этих множественных матриц. Мы достигаем лучшей производительности в двуязычной задаче перевода слов и задаче межязычного сходства слов по сравнению с базовой линией одной матрицы. Мы также показываем, как несколько матриц могут моделировать несколько органов чувств слова.', 'zh': '于给定字典学两语之词,映射为数应用程序之要。 常见之法,用正交矩阵。 可以正交冠状构析 (PA) 算法以求至正交矩阵。 此解决方案限译模之表现力,或致译者不顾也。 PA算法自广,当算法用多正交平移矩阵映射建模,并遣生算法学此数矩阵。 比之单矩阵基线,双语单词译语言单词相似性得其能矣。 多所展示矩阵多所建模。', 'ga': 'Fadhb thábhachtach le go leor feidhmchlár is ea léarscáiliú a fhoghlaim idir leabú focal de dhá theanga nuair a thugtar foclóir. Tá cur chuige coiteann mapála ag baint úsáide as maitrís orthogonal. Is féidir an algartam Anailís Ortagonal Procrustes (PA) a chur i bhfeidhm chun an maitrís orthogonal is fearr a aimsiú. Cuireann an réiteach seo srian le sainléiriú na samhla aistriúcháin a bhféadfadh aistriúcháin fho-optamacha a bheith mar thoradh air. Molaimid síneadh nádúrtha ar an algartam PA a úsáideann maitrísí aistriúcháin orthogonal iolracha chun an léarscáiliú a shamhaltú agus chun algartam a dhíorthú chun na maitrísí iolracha seo a fhoghlaim. Bainimid feidhmíocht níos fearr amach maidir le tasc dátheangach aistriúcháin focal agus tasc tras-teangach cosúlachtaí focal i gcomparáid leis an mbunlíne maitrís aonair. Léirímid freisin conas is féidir le maitrísí iolracha a bheith ina n-ilchéadfaí focal.', 'ka': 'მეტი პროგრამების მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემები იყო. Name ორტოდონალური პროკრესტის ანალიზი (PA) ალგორიტიმი შეიძლება გამოყენება ოპტიმალური ორტოდონალური მარტირებისთვის. ეს პასუხი განსაზღვრული მოდელის გამოსახულებულობას, რომელიც შეიძლება შეიძლება გამოსახულება სპოტიმალური განსახულებაში. ჩვენ გვეძლევა PA ალგორიტიმს ნაირადი გაფართლება, რომელიც გამოყენებს მრავალ ორტოდონალური გაგრძელების მარტირების მოდელედ და დავიწყებთ ალგორიტიმს, რომ ამ მრავალური მარტირების ჩვენ უკეთესი გამოყენება ორიენგური სიტყვების გადაწყენება და მრავალენგური სიტყვების განსხვავება საქმე, რომელიც ერთი მარტიკის მხარეს შედგენა. ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ რამდენიმე მარტირები შეუძლია მოდელუროთ მრავალი სიტყვის სიტყვის.', 'hu': 'Két nyelv szóbeágyazása közötti leképezés megtanulása egy szótárban fontos probléma több alkalmazás esetében. Egy közös térképezési megközelítés egy ortogonális mátrix használata. Az optimális ortogonális mátrix megtalálására az Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) algoritmus alkalmazható. Ez a megoldás korlátozza a fordítási modell kifejezőképességét, ami nem optimális fordításokat eredményezhet. Javasoljuk a PA algoritmus természetes kiterjesztését, amely több ortogonális fordítási mátrixot használ a leképezés modellezéséhez és egy algoritmust származtatva ezeknek a több mátrixoknak a tanulásához. Jobb teljesítményt érünk el egy kétnyelvű szófordítási feladat és egy többnyelvű szóhasonlósági feladat során, mint az egyetlen mátrix alapképzés. Megmutatjuk azt is, hogy a több mátrix hogyan modellezheti egy szó több érzékét.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση μιας χαρτογράφησης μεταξύ ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων δύο γλωσσών με ένα λεξικό είναι ένα σημαντικό πρόβλημα με πολλές εφαρμογές. Μια κοινή προσέγγιση χαρτογράφησης είναι η χρήση ενός ορθογώνιου πίνακα. Ο αλγόριθμος ανάλυσης ορθογώνων μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί για να βρεθεί ο βέλτιστος ορθογώνιος πίνακας. Η λύση αυτή περιορίζει την εκφραστικότητα του μοντέλου μετάφρασης που μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε μη βέλτιστες μεταφράσεις. Προτείνουμε μια φυσική επέκταση του αλγόριθμου που χρησιμοποιεί πολλαπλούς ορθογώνιους πίνακες μετάφρασης για να μοντελοποιήσει τη χαρτογράφηση και να αντλήσει έναν αλγόριθμο για να μάθει αυτούς τους πολλαπλούς πίνακες. Επιτυγχάνουμε καλύτερες επιδόσεις σε μια δίγλωσση εργασία μετάφρασης λέξεων και μια εργασία ομοιότητας λέξεων σε σχέση με την ενιαία γραμμή βάσης πίνακα. Δείχνουμε επίσης πώς οι πολλαπλοί πίνακες μπορούν να μοντελοποιήσουν πολλαπλές αισθήσεις μιας λέξης.', 'it': "Imparare una mappatura tra incorporazioni di parole di due lingue dato un dizionario è un problema importante in diverse applicazioni. Un approccio di mappatura comune consiste nell'utilizzo di una matrice ortogonale. L'algoritmo Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) può essere applicato per trovare la matrice ortogonale ottimale. Questa soluzione limita l'espressività del modello di traduzione che può risultare in traduzioni non ottimali. Proponiamo un'estensione naturale dell'algoritmo PA che utilizza matrici di traduzione ortogonali multiple per modellare la mappatura e ricavare un algoritmo per imparare queste matrici multiple. Otteniamo migliori prestazioni in un compito bilingue di traduzione di parole e in un compito di somiglianza di parole cross-lingual rispetto alla linea di base a matrice singola. Mostriamo anche come matrici multiple possono modellare più sensi di una parola.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше қолданбалармен маңызды мәселе екі тілді ендіру арасындағы картасын үйрену. Ортогоналды матрицаны қолданатын жалпы карталау тәсілі. Оптикалық ортогоналдық матрицаны табу үшін ортогоналдық прокрустық анализ (PA) алгоритмі қолданылады. Бұл шешім аудару үлгісін шектеп, оның ішкі оптимал аудару үлгісін шектеп береді. Біз бірнеше ортогоналық аудармалы матрицаларды түрлендіру үшін PA алгоритмінің негізгі кеңейтуін таңдаймыз. Бұл бірнеше матрицаны үйрену үшін алгоритмін түрлендіру үшін. Екі тілі сөздерді аудару тапсырмасында және бір матрикстің негізгі жолына салыстыру үшін бір тілі сөздердің ұқсастық тапсырмасын жақсы жеткіземіз. Мұндай-ақ бірнеше матрицалар сөздің бірнеше сезім үлгісін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Mokyti dviejų kalbų žodžių įdėjimo žemėlapį yra svarbi kelių programų problem a. Bendras žemėlapių nustatymo metodas naudoja ortogoninę matricą. Ortogoninių prokreustų analizės (PA) algoritmas gali būti taikomas optimaliai ortogoninei matrikai surasti. Šis sprendimas apriboja vertimo modelio išraiškumą, dėl kurio gali atsirasti ne optimal ūs vertimai. Mes siūlome natūralų PA algoritmo išplėtimą, kuris naudoja daugelį ortogoninių vertimo matricų, kad modeliuotų žemėlapius ir gautų algoritmą, kad išmoktų šias daugelį matricų. Mes siekiame geresnių rezultatų dvikalbio žodžių vertimo užduotyje ir tarpkalbinio žodžių panašumo užduotyje, palyginti su vienos matricos pradiniu lygiu. Mes taip pat parodysime, kaip kelios matricos gali modeliuoti kelis žodžio jutimus.', 'mk': 'Научувањето на мапирање помеѓу вградувањата на зборови на два јазици дадени речник е важен проблем со неколку апликации. Заедничкиот пристап на мапирање користи ортогонална матрица. Алгоритмот за анализа на православните прокрусти (PA) може да се примени за да се најде оптималната ортогонална матрица. Ова решение ја ограничува експресивноста на моделот на превод кој може да резултира со субоптимални преводи. Предложуваме природно продолжување на алгоритмот на ПА кој користи повеќе ортогонски преведувачки матрици за да го моделира мапирањето и да изведе алгоритм за да ги научи овие множина матрици. Ние постигнуваме подобра резултат во двојазичната задача за превод на зборови и прекујазичната задача за сличност на зборови во споредба со основата на една матрица. We also show how multiple matrices can model multiple senses of a word.', 'ms': 'Mempelajari peta diantara pelengkapan perkataan dua bahasa yang diberi kamus adalah masalah penting dengan beberapa aplikasi. pendekatan pemetaan umum menggunakan matriks ortogonal. Algoritma Analisi Procrustes Orthogonal (PA) boleh dilaksanakan untuk mencari matriks ortogonal optimal. Solusi ini mengharamkan ekspresif model terjemahan yang mungkin menghasilkan terjemahan sub- optimal. Kami cadangkan sambungan alami bagi algoritma PA yang menggunakan matriks terjemahan ortogonal berbilang untuk model pemetaan dan mendatangkan algoritma untuk belajar matriks berbilang ini. We achieve better performance in a bilingual word translation task and a cross-lingual word similarity task compared to the single matrix baseline.  Kita juga menunjukkan bagaimana matriks berbilang boleh model sens berbilang perkataan.', 'mt': 'Learning a mapping between word embeddings of two languages given a dictionary is an important problem with several applications.  Approċċ komuni ta’ mmappjar qed juża matriċi ortogonali. L-algoritmu Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) jista’ jiġi applikat biex tinstab l-aħjar matriċi ortogonali. Din is-soluzzjoni tirrestrinġi l-espressività tal-mudell ta’ traduzzjoni li jista’ jirriżulta fi traduzzjonijiet subottimali. Aħna nipproponu estensjoni naturali tal-algoritmu PA li juża matriċi tat-traduzzjoni ortogonali multipli biex jimmudellaw l-immappjar u jidderivaw algoritmu biex jitgħallmu dawn il-matriċi multipli. Aħna niksbu prestazzjoni a ħjar f’kompitu ta’ traduzzjoni tal-kelma bilingwi u kompitu ta’ similarità tal-kelma bejn il-lingwi meta mqabbel mal-linja bażi tal-matriċi unika. Aħna nuru wkoll kif matriċi multipli jistgħu jimmudellaw sensi multipli ta’ kelma.', 'ml': 'ഒരു നിഘണ്ടി നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട രണ്ടു ഭാഷകളുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d ഒരു മാപ്പിങ്ങ് പഠിക്കുന്നത് പല പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെയ ഒരു സാധാരണമായ മാപ്പിങ്ങ് പ്രോഗ്രിക്സ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒറ്റോഗോണാല്\u200d പ്രക്രിസ്റ്റുകളുടെ അന്വേഷണം (PA) ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം പ്രയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഓട്ടോഗോഗോണാല്\u200d മാറ്റ ഈ പരിഭാഷത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷപ്രകാരം പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതിനുള്ള ഉപ- optimal അനുവാദങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഫലമാകുന്നു. പിഎ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ സ്വാഭാവിക വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് പല ഓര്\u200dടോഗോണാല്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മാപ്പിങ്ങ് മാതൃകയ ഒരു രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ പരിഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ജോലിയിലും ഒരു ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് വാക്കുകളുടെ വാക്കിന്റെ തുല്യമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും  ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ പല വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Дүгнэлт өгсөн хоёр хэл хоорондын зураг зураг сурах нь олон програмын тухай чухал асуудал юм. Ортогонал матриксыг ашиглаж байна. Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) алгоритм нь эерэг ортогонал матриксыг олох үед хэрэглэгдэж болно. Энэ шийдэл нь хөрөнгө оруулах загварын илэрхийллийг хязгаарладаг. Энэ нь суб-өөдрөг хөрөнгө оруулах боломжтой. Бид PA алгоритмын байгалийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг санал болгож байна. Энэ олон матрицийг сурах үед олон ортогонол орчуулах матрицийг ашигладаг. Бид хоёр хэл хэлний орчуулах үйл ажиллагаанд илүү сайн үйл ажиллагаа, мөн олон хэл хэлний нэг матрикс суурь шулуунтай харьцуулах үйл ажиллагаа гаргадаг. Бид мөн олон матриц хэдэн хэдэн мэдрэмжүүдийг хэрхэн загварчлах вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Læring av eit karting mellom ordinnbygging av to språk gjeven eit ordbok er eit viktig problem med fleire program. Eit vanleg kartmetode brukar eit orthogonal matrise. Den orthogonale prokrustanalysen (PA) kan brukast for å finna den optimale orthogonale matrisen. Denne løysinga avgrenser uttrykket av omsetjingsmodulen som kan føre til underoptimal oversettelsar. Vi foreslår eit naturleg utviding av PA-algoritmen som brukar fleire orthogonale omsetjingsmateringar for å modellere mapping a og lage ein algoritme for å lære desse fleire matrisene. Vi oppnår bedre utviklingar i eit bilingbokstav ordomsetjing- oppgåve og ei krysspråk ordsimilaritet- oppgåve sammenlignet med den enkelte matrisebaseline. Vi viser også korleis fleire matriser kan modellere fleire senter til eit ord.', 'pl': 'Nauka mapowania pomiędzy osadzeniami słów dwóch języków podanych słownikiem jest ważnym problemem wielu aplikacji. Wspólnym podejściem do mapowania jest użycie matrycy ortogonalnej. Aby znaleźć optymalną matrycę ortogonalną, można zastosować algorytm analizy procrustów ortogonalnych (PA). Rozwiązanie to ogranicza ekspresywność modelu tłumaczenia, co może skutkować nieoptymalnymi tłumaczeniami. Proponujemy naturalne rozszerzenie algorytmu PA, który wykorzystuje wiele ortogonalnych macierzy tłumaczenia do modelowania mapowania i wywodzi algorytm do nauki tych wielu macierzy. Osiągamy lepszą wydajność w dwujęzycznym zadaniu tłumaczenia słów i zadaniu podobieństwa słów wielojęzycznych w porównaniu z pojedynczą matrycą bazową. Pokazujemy również, jak wiele macierzy może modelować wiele zmysłów jednego słowa.', 'ro': 'Învățarea unei mapări între încorporările de cuvinte a două limbi dată de un dicționar este o problemă importantă pentru mai multe aplicații. O abordare comună de cartografiere este utilizarea unei matrice ortogonale. Algoritmul de analiză ortogonală (PA) poate fi aplicat pentru a găsi matricea ortogonală optimă. Această soluție limitează expresivitatea modelului de traducere, ceea ce poate duce la traduceri sub-optime. Propunem o extensie naturală a algoritmului PA care utilizează mai multe matrici ortogonale de traducere pentru a modela maparea și a derivat un algoritm pentru a învăța aceste matrici multiple. Obținem performanțe mai bune într-o sarcină bilingvă de traducere a cuvintelor și o sarcină de similitudine între cuvinte în comparație cu baza matricei unice. De asemenea, arătăm cum matricile multiple pot modela mai multe simțuri ale unui cuvânt.', 'sr': 'Naučenje mapiranja između uključenja reči dve jezika koje je dao rečnik je važan problem sa nekoliko aplikacija. Običan pristup mapiranja koristi ortogonalnu matricu. Ortogonalni prokrustski analiz (PA) može se primjenjivati za pronalaženje optimalne ortogonalne matrice. Ova rešenja ograničava izrazitost modela prevoda koji može rezultirati podoptimalnim prevodima. Predlažemo prirodnu produženost algoritma PA-a koji koristi višestruke orthogonalne matrice prevoda da modeliramo mapiranje i izvedemo algoritam da naučimo ove višestruke matrice. Postižemo bolji izvedbi u zadatku prevoda dvojezičkih reči i zadatku sličnosti međujezičkih reči u usporedbi sa početnom linijom jedine matrice. Takoðe pokazujemo koliko višestruke matrice mogu modelirati višestruke oseæaje reèi.', 'so': 'Barashada kartooyinka oo u dhexeeya hadalka ku qoran labo luqadood oo lagu siiyey luqada waa dhibaato muhiim ah oo la xiriira codsiga kala gedisan. Dhaqdhaqaaqa kartooyinka caadiga ah wuxuu isticmaalaa matrix ortoogonal. Analyska baaritaanka orgonal (PA) waxaa lagu codsan karaa algorithm si aad u hesho matrix habboon. Qiimeyntu waxay ka xadisaa muuqashada turjumista, taasoo ku sababan kara turjumaadda hoos-optimal. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa kalgoritka PA oo isticmaalaya qalabka tarjumaadda oo kala duduwan, si a an u sameyno kartada oo uu u helo algoritm si uu u barto qalabkan kala duduwan. Shaqo ka wanaagsan baaritaanka afka labada luqadood iyo hadal isku mid ah oo la barbardhiga hal baaritis. We also show how multiple matrices can model multiple senses of a word.', 'sv': 'Att lära sig en kartläggning mellan ordinbäddningar av två språk i en ordbok är ett viktigt problem med flera applikationer. En gemensam kartläggningsmetod är att använda en ortogonal matris. Algoritmen Ortogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) kan användas för att hitta den optimala ortogonala matrisen. Denna lösning begränsar översättningsmodellens uttrycksfullhet, vilket kan resultera i suboptimala översättningar. Vi föreslår en naturlig förlängning av PA-algoritmen som använder flera ortogonala översättningmatriser för att modellera kartläggningen och härleda en algoritm för att lära sig dessa flera matriser. Vi uppnår bättre prestanda i en tvåspråkig ordöversättningsuppgift och en flerspråkig ordlikhetsuppgift jämfört med baslinjen för en enda matris. Vi visar också hur flera matriser kan modellera flera sinnen av ett ord.', 'ta': 'ஒரு அகராதியில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட இரண்டு மொழிகளின் இடையே வார்த்தை பொருள் வரைபடம் கற்றுக் கொள்வது பல பயன்பாடுகளுடன் மு ஒரு பொதுவான வரைப்படத்தின் முறைமை ஒரு குறுக்கோடு மதிப்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. ஒற்றுகோண செயல்பாடுகள் ஆராய்வு (PA) ஆல்ஜிரித்மை பயன்படுத்தலாம் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் முக்கோணங்கள் மத்தியை கண்டுபிட இந்த தீர்வு நாம் PA ஆல்கோரிட்மையின் இயற்கை விரிவாக்கத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பல முக்கோணங்கள் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி வரைப்படத்தை மாற் இரண்டு மொழி மொழி மொழிமாற்றும் பணியில் நாம் சிறந்த செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு மொழி மொழியில் சொல்லும் சமமான ச ஒரு வார்த்தையின் பல உணர்வுகளை மாதிரியும் என்பதை நாம் எவ்வாறு காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'si': 'භාෂාවක් දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ භාෂාවක් සම්පූර්ණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් වැදගත්  සාමාන්\u200dය මැට්\u200dරික්ස් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. සාධාරණ ප්\u200dරොක්රුස්ටස් විශ්ලේෂණය (PA) ඇල්ගෝරිතම් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් හොයාගන්න හොයාගන්න. @ info අපි PA ඇල්ගෝරිතම්ගේ ස්වභාවික විස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම මැට්\u200dරිස් වලින් භාවිත විස්තරය ප්\u200dරයෝජ අපි දෙවිභාෂික වචන වාර්තාවක් වලින් වාර්තාවක් වලින් වචන වචන වර්තාවක් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් එක්ක මැට්\u200dරික අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වචනයක් ගොඩක් මැට්\u200dරිස්ටිස්ට කොච්චර අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'ur': 'دوسری زبانوں کے مہینڈنگ کے درمیان ایک مہینڈنگ کا سیکھنا بہت سی کاربریوں کے ساتھ اہم مشکل ہے۔ ایک مشترک مکاپینگ طریقہ ایک اورٹوگونال ماٹریکس کا استعمال کرتا ہے. Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) algorithm can be applied to find the optimal orthogonal matrix. This solution restricts the expressiveness of the translation model which may result in sub-optimal translations. ہم PA الگوریتم کی ایک طبیعی اضافی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی اورٹوگونال ترجمہ ماٹریس استعمال کرتا ہے کہ نقشه مڈالی کرے اور ان چند ماٹریس کو سیکھنے کے لئے الگوریتم پیدا کرے۔ ہم ایک دوزبانی کلمات کی ترجمہ کے کام میں بہتر عمل حاصل کرتے ہیں اور ایک متریکس بنیس لین کے مقابلہ میں ایک کرس زبانی کلمات کی برابری کا کام حاصل کرتے ہیں. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ کئی متریس ایک لفظ کے متعدد حس کا مدل کر سکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Name Name @ info: whatsthis Biz PA algoritning tabiiy kengaytmasini talab qilamiz. Bu bir nechta orthogonal tarjima matrikalarni ishlatish uchun bir nechta orthogonal tarjima matrikalarni tuzatish va bir nechta matrikalarni o'rganish uchun algoritni o'rganish uchun. We achieve better performance in a bilingual word translation task and a cross-lingual word similarity task compared to the single matrix baseline.  Biz bir necha matrikalar so'zning bir necha sensonlarini modellashni ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Học cách tạo bản đồ giữa sự nhúng vào từ hai ngôn ngữ được dùng từ điển là một vấn đề quan trọng với nhiều ứng dụng. Một cách tiếp cận sơ đồ phổ biến là sử dụng ma trận. Có thể áp dụng thuật to án phân tích lưỡng tính (PA) để tìm ra ma trận đứng thẳng tối ưu. Giải pháp này hạn chế khả năng diễn tả của mô hình dịch có thể dẫn tới dịch thuật không được tối ưu. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phần mở rộng tự nhiên của thuật to án được dán trên PA. Dùng các mẫu dịch thẳng để mô hình bản đồ và chiết xuất thuật toán để học các mục đa khoa. Chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tốt hơn trong một nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển hai từ hai thứ và một công việc khác biệt ngôn từ so với cơ sở mẫu ma trận đơn. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy các mục sư có thể mô tả các cảm giác khác nhau của một từ.', 'da': 'At lære en kortlægning mellem ordindlejringer af to sprog givet en ordbog er et vigtigt problem med flere applikationer. En fælles kortlægningsmetode er at bruge en ortogonal matrix. Den ortogonale procrustes analyse (PA) algoritme kan anvendes til at finde den optimale ortogonale matrix. Denne løsning begrænser oversættelsesmodellens udtryksevne, hvilket kan resultere i suboptimale oversættelser. Vi foreslår en naturlig udvidelse af PA algoritmen, der bruger flere ortogonale oversættelsesmaterialer til at modellere kortlægningen og udlede en algoritme til at lære disse flere matricer. Vi opnår bedre ydeevne i en tosproget ordoversættelsesopgave og en tværsproget ordlighedsopgave sammenlignet med den enkelte matrix basislinje. Vi viser også, hvordan flere matricer kan modellere flere sanser af et ord.', 'bg': 'Научаването на картографиране между вграждането на думи на два езика, даден речник, е важен проблем с няколко приложения. Общ подход за картографиране е използването на правоъгълна матрица. Алгоритъмът за анализ на ортогенните прокрусти може да бъде приложен за намиране на оптимална ортогонална матрица. Това решение ограничава изразителността на модела на превод, което може да доведе до недостатъчни преводи. Предлагаме естествено разширение на алгоритъма, който използва множество правоъгълни преводни матрици за моделиране на картографирането и извличане на алгоритъм за изучаване на тези множествени матрици. Ние постигаме по-добри резултати в двуезична задача за превод на думи и задача за междуезична сходство на думи в сравнение с базовата линия на единичната матрица. Също така показваме как множеството матрици могат да моделират множество сетива на една дума.', 'nl': 'Het leren van een mapping tussen woordinsluitingen van twee talen met een woordenboek is een belangrijk probleem met verschillende toepassingen. Een veel voorkomende mapping benadering is het gebruik van een orthogonale matrix. Het algoritme Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) kan worden toegepast om de optimale orthogonale matrix te vinden. Deze oplossing beperkt de expressiviteit van het vertaalmodel, wat kan leiden tot suboptimale vertalingen. We stellen een natuurlijke uitbreiding voor van het PA-algoritme dat meerdere orthogonale vertaalmatrices gebruikt om de mapping te modelleren en een algoritme af te leiden om deze meervoudige matrices te leren. We bereiken betere prestaties in een tweetalige woordvertaaltaak en een meertalige woordvergelijkingstaak vergeleken met de single matrix baseline. We laten ook zien hoe meerdere matrices meerdere zintuigen van een woord kunnen modelleren.', 'hr': 'Naučenje mapiranja između uključenja riječi dvije jezika podataka rečniku je važan problem s nekoliko aplikacija. Običan pristup mapiranja koristi ortogonalnu matricu. Ortogonalna analiza prokrusta (PA) se može primjenjivati za pronalaženje optimalne ortogonalne matrice. Ova otopina ograničava izrazitost modela prevoda koji može rezultirati podoptimalnim prevodima. Predlažemo prirodnu produženost algoritma PA-a koji koristi višestruke orthogonalne matrice prevoda kako bi modelili mapiranje i proizveli algoritam kako bi naučili te višestruke matrice. Osjećamo bolju učinku u zadatku prevoda dvojezičkih riječi i zadatku sličnosti međujezičkih riječi u usporedbi s početnom linijom jedinstvene matrice. Također pokazujemo kako višestruke matrice mogu modelirati višestruke osjećaje riječi.', 'de': 'Das Erlernen eines Mappings zwischen Worteinbettungen zweier Sprachen in einem Wörterbuch ist bei mehreren Anwendungen ein wichtiges Problem. Ein gängiger Mapping-Ansatz ist die Verwendung einer orthogonalen Matrix. Der Algorithmus Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) kann angewendet werden, um die optimale orthogonale Matrix zu finden. Diese Lösung schränkt die Ausdruckskraft des Übersetzungsmodells ein, was zu suboptimalen Übersetzungen führen kann. Wir schlagen eine natürliche Erweiterung des PA-Algorithmus vor, der mehrere orthogonale Translationsmatrizen verwendet, um das Mapping zu modellieren und einen Algorithmus abzuleiten, um diese multiplen Matrizen zu lernen. Wir erzielen eine bessere Leistung in einer zweisprachigen Wortübersetzungsaufgabe und einer sprachübergreifenden Wortähnlichkeitsaufgabe im Vergleich zur Single Matrix Baseline. Wir zeigen auch, wie mehrere Matrizen mehrere Sinne eines Wortes modellieren können.', 'id': 'Mempelajari peta antara pembangunan kata dari dua bahasa yang diberikan kamus adalah masalah penting dengan beberapa aplikasi. pendekatan peta umum menggunakan matriks ortogonal. The Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) algorithm can be applied to find the optimal orthogonal matrix.  Solusi ini membatasi ekspresivitas model terjemahan yang mungkin menyebabkan terjemahan sub-optimal. Kami mengusulkan estensi alami dari algoritma PA yang menggunakan matriks terjemahan ortogonal berbilang untuk model pemetaan dan mendirikan algoritma untuk belajar matriks berbilang ini. Kami mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dalam tugas terjemahan kata dua bahasa dan tugas persamaan kata saling bahasa dibandingkan dengan dasar matriks tunggal. Kita juga menunjukkan bagaimana matriks berbilang dapat model senses berbilang dari satu kata.', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن یک نقشه بین جمع کردن کلمات دو زبان داده شده است که یک لغوی مشکل مهم با چند کاربرد است. یک روش نقشه\u200cسازی مشترک استفاده از یک ماتریکس ارتگونال است. الگوریتم\u200cهای پراکروستی Orthogonal Procrustes (PA) می\u200cتواند برای پیدا کردن ماتریس orthogonal optimal استفاده شود. این راه حل نشانه\u200cهای مدل ترجمه را محدود می\u200cکند که ممکن است به ترجمه\u200cهای زیر optimal وجود داشته باشد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم اضافه طبیعی الگوریتم PA که از ماتریس\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای متعددی برای مدل نقشه\u200cبندی و الگوریتم برای یاد گرفتن این ماتریس\u200cهای متعددی استفاده می\u200cکند. ما عملکرد بهتر در یک کار ترجمه کردن کلمه دو زبان و یک کار شبیه کلمه\u200cهای مختلف زبان در مقایسه با یک خط پایین متریکس پیدا می\u200cکنیم. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که چگونه ماتریس\u200cهای چندتا می\u200cتوانند حس\u200cهای متعدد را از یک کلمه مدل دهند.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza ramani kati ya lugha mbili zilizotolewa kwa lugha ni tatizo muhimu na matumizi kadhaa. Mtakatifu wa ramani wa kawaida unatumia matrix ya orthogonal. Ualgorithi wa michakato ya Kiuchunguzi (PA) unaweza kutumika kutafuta matrix yenye matumaini. suluhisho hili linazuia muundo wa utafsiri ambao unaweza kusababisha tafsiri za kidini. Tunazipendekeza kuongezeka kwa utaratibu wa PA unaotumia matrici kadhaa ya tafsiri za orthogonal ili kutengeneza ramani na kutengeneza algorithi ili kujifunza vibonzo vingi. Tunapata utendaji mzuri katika jukumu la kutafsiri maneno ya lugha mbili na kazi inayofanana na neno la lugha tofauti ukilinganisha na msingi wa mfumo mmoja. Tunaonyesha jinsi vigezo vingi vinavyoweza kutengeneza hisia mbalimbali za neno.', 'tr': 'Bir sözlük berilen iki dil içindeki sözler arasynda mapalary öwrenmek birnäçe program bilen wajyp meselädir. Ortak bir haritalama metodu, çizgi bir matris kullanır. Ortogonal sorunlar analizi (PA) algoritmi optim ortognal matris bulmak için uygulanabilir. Bu çözüm terjime nusgasyny çykarýar. Bu terjime nusgasyny altynda terjime edip biler. Biz PA algoritminin doğal uzantısını teklif ediyoruz ki bu çoklu matrisleri öğrenmek için çoklu orthogonal tercüme matrislerini kullanır ve bu çoklu matrisleri modellemek için bir algoritm elde etmek için kullanır. Biz iki dilli tercüme görevinde daha iyi bir etkinlik elde ediyoruz ve tek matriks tabanlığa karşılaştırılmış bir kelime benzeri görevinde. Biz de çoklu matris bir kelime hassasını nasıl örnekleyebileceğini gösteriyoruz.', 'af': "Die leer van 'n kaart tussen woord inbêring van twee tale gegee 'n woordeboek is 'n belangrike probleem met verskeie programme. 'n Gewone kaart toegang gebruik 'n orthogonale matriks. Die Orthogonale Procrustes Analisie (PA) algoritme kan gebruik word om die optimale orthogonale matriks te vind. Hierdie oplossing beperk die uitdrukking van die vertaling model wat dalk kan resultaat in sub- optimal vertalings. Ons voorstel 'n natuurlike uitbreiding van die PA algoritme wat veelvuldige orthogonale vertaling matrikse gebruik om die kaart te model en 'n algoritme afgelei om hierdie veelvuldige matrikse te leer. Ons bereik beter prestasie in 'n tweedelinglike woord vertaling taak en 'n kruistale woord gelykbaarheid taak vergelyk met die enkele matriks basisline. Ons wys ook hoe veelvuldige matrikse veelvuldige senses van 'n woord kan model.", 'ko': '여러 응용 프로그램에서 사전에 주어진 두 언어의 단어 삽입 사이의 비주얼을 배우는 것은 중요한 문제이다.자주 사용하는 매핑 방법은 정교 행렬을 사용하는 것이다.직교 Procrustes 분석(PA) 알고리즘은 최상의 직교 행렬을 찾는 데 사용할 수 있다.이런 해결 방안은 번역 모델의 표현 능력을 제한하고 차등 번역을 초래할 수 있다.우리는 PA 알고리즘의 자연스러운 확장을 제시했다. 이 알고리즘은 여러 개의 정교 변환 행렬을 사용하여 모델링을 하고 이 여러 행렬을 학습하는 알고리즘을 도출했다.단일 매트릭스 기선에 비해 우리는 이중 언어 단어 번역 임무와 다중 언어 단어의 유사성 임무에서 더욱 좋은 성능을 얻었다.우리는 또 여러 행렬이 한 단어의 다양한 의미를 어떻게 모의하는지 보여 주었다.', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት በሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች መካከል መክፈቻን በመማር መግለጫ በብዙ ፕሮግራሞች ጋር የተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የመስመር ቀለም መግለጫ ትርጉም ዓይነት የፓ አሌጎርቲም አካባቢ ግንኙነት መተርጓሜዎችን ለመዘርጋት እና እነዚህን ብዙዎች ማተማር ማድረጉን ለመፍጠር እና አሌጎሪትምን ለማግኘት እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ቃላት ትርጉም ስራ እና አንዲት ማትሪክ መሳሳይ ይተያይናል፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ ብዙ ማተሚያዎች የቃልን ብዛት መስመር እንዴት እንደሚችሉ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Mësimi i një hartimi midis përfshirjeve të fjalëve të dy gjuhëve të dhëna një fjalor është një problem i rëndësishëm me disa aplikime. Një metodë e përbashkët hartimi është duke përdorur një matricë ortogonale. Algoritmi i Analizës Ortogonale të Procrustes (PA) mund të aplikohet për të gjetur matricën optimale ortogonale. Kjo zgjidhje kufizon shprehjen e modelit të përkthimit që mund të rezultojë në përkthime sub-optimale. We propose a natural extension of the PA algorithm that uses multiple orthogonal translation matrices to model the mapping and derive an algorithm to learn these multiple matrices.  Ne arrijmë performancë më të mirë në një detyrë të përkthimit të fjalëve dygjuhëse dhe një detyrë të ngjashmërisë së fjalëve ndërgjuhëse krahasuar me bazën e matricës së vetme. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se si matricat e shumta mund të modelojnë ndjenjat e shumta të një fjale.', 'hy': 'Learning a mapping between word embeddings of two languages given a dictionary is an important problem with several applications.  Հիմնական քարտեզագրման մոտեցումը օգտագործում է օրթոգոնալ մատրիքսը: Օրթոգոնալ պրոկրուստների վերլուծության (AP) ալգորիթմը կարող է օգտագործվել օպտիմալ օրթոգոնալ մատրիքսի գտնելու համար: Այս լուծումը սահմանափակում է թարգմանման մոդելի արտահայտությունը, որը կարող է հանգեցնել ենթաօպտիմալ թարգմանությունների: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ԱՊ ալգորիթմի բնական ընդլայնումը, որը օգտագործում է բազմաթիվ օրթոգոնալ թարգմանման մաթերիսներ քարտեզագրման մոդելավորման համար և ստեղծում է ալգորիթմ այս բազմաթիվ մաթերիսների սովորելու համար: We achieve better performance in a bilingual word translation task and a cross-lingual word similarity task compared to the single matrix baseline.  Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կարող են բազմաթիվ մատրիկները մոդելավորել բառի բազմաթիվ զգացմունքներ:', 'bn': 'কয়েকটি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের সাথে একটি অভিধান দুই ভাষার ভাষার মধ্যে শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভাষার মধ্যে একটি ম্যাপিং শিখার একটি  একটি সাধারণ ম্যাপিং পদ্ধতি একটি orthogonal matrix ব্যবহার করছে। অর্থগোনাল প্রক্রিয়াস বিশ্লেষণ (PA) অ্যালগরিদম প্রয়োগ করা যাবে optimal orthogonal matrix খুঁজে বের করতে। এই সমাধান অনুবাদ মোডেলের প্রকৃতির সীমাবদ্ধতা নিষিদ্ধ করে যা সাব- optimal অনুবাদের ফলে সাব- optimal অনুবাদের কারণে  আমরা পিএ অ্যালগরিদমের প্রাকৃতিক এক প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করছি যা বেশ কয়েকটি orthogonal অনুবাদ ম্যাট্রিক ব্যবহার করে মানচিত্র মডেল করে এবং এই বিভিন্ন ম্ আমরা দুই ভাষার ভাষার ভাষায় অনুবাদ কর্মসূচিতে ভালো কাজ অর্জন করি এবং একই ম্যাট্রিক্সের বেসাইনের তুলনায় একটি ক্রিশ ভাষাভাষা আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে বেশ কয়েকটি ম্যাট্রিক কিভাবে একটি শব্দের অনুভূতি তৈরি করতে পারে।', 'az': 'Sözlük verilən iki dil içərisində yazılmış kəlmələr arasında mapping öyrənmək çoxlu proqramlar ilə mühüm problemdir. Ortaq xərcləmə yaxınlığı orthogonal matriksini istifadə edir. Ortokonalı Prokrustu Analizi (PA) algoritmi optimal ortokonalı matriksini tapmaq üçün uygulanabilir. Bu çətinlik qurğulama model in in ifadə edilməsini müəyyən edir ki, altı-optimal tercümə olar. Biz PA algoritminin doğal uzantısını təklif edirik ki, bu çoxlu matrikləri öyrənmək üçün çoxlu orthogonal tercümə matriklərini modelləşdirmək və algoritmi təklif edir. Biz iki dil çevirilmiş sözlərdə daha yaxşı performansı və bir matriks səviyyəsi ilə qarşılaşdırılmış çox dilli sözlər similaritə görevi başarırıq. Biz də çoxlu matris bir sözün çoxlu hisslərini necə modelləşdirə biləcəyini göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Naučenje mapiranja između uključenja riječi dvije jezika podataka rečniku je važan problem sa nekoliko aplikacija. Običan pristup mapiranja koristi ortogonalnu matricu. Ortogonalna analiza prokrusta (PA) se može primjenjivati za pronalaženje optimalne ortogonalne matrice. Ova rješenje ograničava izrazitost modela prevoda koji može rezultirati podoptimalnim prevodima. Predlažemo prirodnu produženost algoritma PA-a koji koristi višestruke orthogonalne matrice prevoda kako bi modelili mapiranje i proizveli algoritam kako bi naučili te višestruke matrice. Dobićemo bolju izvršnost u zadatku prevođenja dvojezičkih riječi i zadatku sličnosti međujezičkih riječi u usporedbi sa početnom linijom jedine matrice. Također pokazujemo koliko višestruke matrice mogu modelirati višestruke osjećaje riječi.', 'ca': "Aprendre un mapatge entre les integracions de paraules de dues llengües donades un diccionari és un problem a important amb diverses aplicacions. Un enfocament comú de mapejament està utilitzant una matriu ortogonal. The Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) algorithm can be applied to find the optimal orthogonal matrix.  Aquesta solució limita l'expressivitat del model de traducció que pot resultar en traduccions suboptimals. Proposem una extensió natural del algoritme PA que utilitza múltiples matrius de traducció ortogonal per modelar el mapatge i derivar un algoritme per aprendre aquestes múltiples matrius. We achieve better performance in a bilingual word translation task and a cross-lingual word similarity task compared to the single matrix baseline.  També demostram com múltiples matrices poden modelar múltiples sentits d'una paraula.", 'cs': 'Naučit se mapování mezi slovními vloženími dvou jazyků podle slovníku je důležitým problémem několika aplikací. Běžným mapovacím přístupem je použití ortogonální matice. Pro nalezení optimální ortogonální matice lze použít algoritmus ortogonální procrustové analýzy (PA). Toto řešení omezuje expresivitu překladového modelu, což může vést k suboptimálním překladům. Navrhujeme přirozené rozšíření PA algoritmu, který používá více ortogonálních překladových matic k modelování mapování a odvození algoritmu pro naučení těchto více matic. Dosahujeme lepšího výkonu u dvojjazyčné úlohy překladu slov a úlohy vícejazyčné podobnosti slov ve srovnání s jednou maticí základní linií. Také ukazujeme, jak více matic může modelovat více smyslů slova.', 'et': 'Sõnastiku kahe keele sõnade manustamise kaardistamise õppimine on oluline probleem mitmete rakenduste puhul. Ühine kaardistamismeetod on ortogonaalse maatriksi kasutamine. Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) algoritmi saab rakendada optimaalse ortogonaalse maatriksi leidmiseks. See lahendus piirab tõlkemudeli väljendusvõimet, mis võib põhjustada ebaoptimaalseid tõlkeid. Me pakume välja PA algoritmi loomuliku laienduse, mis kasutab kaardistamise modelleerimiseks mitut ortogonaalset tõlkematrikki ja tuletab algoritmi nende mitme maatriksi õppimiseks. Me saavutame parema tulemuse kahekeelse sõnatõlke ülesande ja keeleülese sõnassarnasuse ülesande puhul võrreldes ühe maatriksi algväärtusega. Samuti näitame, kuidas mitmed maatriksid võivad modelleerida sõna mitut meelt.', 'fi': 'Kahden kielen sanakirjaupotusten välisen kartoituksen oppiminen on tärkeä ongelma useissa sovelluksissa. Yhteinen karttamenetelmä on ortogonaalinen matriisi. Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA) -algoritmia voidaan soveltaa optimaalisen ortogonaalisen matriisin löytämiseen. Tämä ratkaisu rajoittaa käännösmallin ekspressiivisyyttä, mikä saattaa johtaa epäoptimaalisiin käännöksiin. Ehdotamme PA-algoritmin luonnollista laajennusta, joka käyttää useita ortogonaalisia käännösmatriisejä kartoituksen mallintamiseen ja algoritmin johtamiseen näiden matriisien oppimiseen. Saavutamme paremman suorituskyvyn kaksikielisessä sanakäännöstyössä ja monikielisessä sanasamankaltaisuustehtävässä verrattuna yksimatriisiin. Näytämme myös, miten useat matriisit voivat mallintaa sanan useita aisteja.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Name ProgressBarUpdates Relative Algorithm Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh luwih apik kanggo nggambar tarjamahan karo pawaran langgar sampeyan langgar sampeyan langgar sampeyan karo nggawe tanggal sistem singular Monday, Monday', 'ha': "Idan an sanar da wani map a tsakanin maganar da aka shigar da cikin lugha biyu wanda aka bai wa dictionary, yana da wani matsayi mai muhimu game da wasu shiryoyin ayuka. Tsarin kartoni na ɗabi'a yana amfani da wani matrix na ortogi. Ana amfani da algoritm na Kirayenain Tsariya (PA) dõmin a nuna matrix na agogonal. This solution restricts the expressiveness of the translation model which may result in sub-optimal translations.  Tuna goyyar da wani fizgi mai natsuwa na PA algoritm wanda ke amfani da matriki masu yawa masu fassarar ortokogonal dõmin ya motsar yin ramani da kuma ke sami algoritm dõmin ya sanar da waɗannan matrikori masu yawa. Mu sami mafiya kyauta a cikin wani aikin fassarar maganar biyu da wani aiki mai fassarar-harshen na tsohon-lingui sami da kuma a sami gabanin matrix. Kayya, Muke nũna jinsi matricikin masu yawa za'a samo zafi masu sauri masu yawa.", 'sk': 'Učenje kartiranja med vgradnjo besed dveh jezikov v slovarju je pomemben problem pri več aplikacijah. Skupni pristop kartiranja je uporaba pravokotne matrike. Za iskanje optimalne pravokotne matrice je mogoče uporabiti algoritem ortogonalne procruste analize (PA). Ta rešitev omejuje izraznost prevajalskega modela, kar lahko povzroči neoptimalne prevode. Predlagamo naravno razširitev algoritma PA, ki uporablja več pravokotnih prevajalskih matric za modeliranje kartiranja in izpeljavo algoritma za učenje teh več matric. Pri dvojezičnem prevajanju besed in medjezičnem prevajanju besed dosegamo boljšo učinkovitost v primerjavi z osnovnim izhodiščem enomatrike. Pokazali smo tudi, kako lahko več matrik modelira več čutov besede.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་ས་ཁྲ་པར་གཟུགས་སྟངས་འདི་སྔོན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་རྟགས་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། Orthogonal Procrustes Analysis (PA)སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། This solution restricts the expressiveness of the translation model which may result in sub-optimal translations. We propose a natural extension of the PA algorithm that uses multiple orthogonal translation matrices to model the mapping and derive an algorithm to learn these multiple matrices. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་འཛིན་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་དོན་དག་ལ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'ללמוד מפה בין מילים של שתי שפות שנתנו מילון היא בעיה חשובה עם מספר שימושים. גישה מיפות משותפת משתמשת במטריקס אורטוגונלית. אפשר להשתמש באלגוריתם של ניתוח הפרוקרוסטים האופטימי (PA) כדי למצוא את המטריקס האופטימית האופטימית. הפתרון הזה מגביל את הביטוי של מודל התרגום שיכול להוביל לתרגומות לא אופטימיות. אנו מציעים התרחבות טבעית של האלגוריתם PA אשר משתמש במטריצות תרגום אורתוגונליות רבות כדי לדוגמא את המפה ולהשיג אלגוריתם כדי ללמוד את המטריצות הרבות האלה. אנו משיגים ביצועים טובים יותר במשימת התרגום של מילים שתיים שפתיים ומשימה של דומות מילים בין שפתיים בהשוואה לבסיס המטריקס היחיד. אנחנו גם מראים איך מרובות מטריצות יכולות לדוגמא חושים מרובים של מילה.'}
{'en': 'The SADID Evaluation Datasets for Low-Resource Spoken Language Machine Translation of Arabic Dialects', 'ar': 'مجموعات بيانات تقييم SADID للترجمة الآلية للغات العربية المنطوقة منخفضة الموارد', 'pt': 'Os conjuntos de dados de avaliação SADID para tradução automática de idioma falado com poucos recursos de dialetos árabes', 'fr': "Les ensembles de données d'évaluation SADID pour la traduction automatique de dialectes arabes dans des langues parlées à faibles ressources", 'es': 'Los conjuntos de datos de evaluación de SADID para la traducción automática de dialectos árabes en lenguaje hablado de bajos recursos', 'ja': 'アラビア語方言の低リソース口語機械翻訳のためのSADID評価データセット', 'zh': '阿拉伯语方言低资源口语机器翻译者SADID估数据集', 'hi': 'अरबी बोलियों के कम संसाधन बोली जाने वाली भाषा मशीन अनुवाद के लिए SADID मूल्यांकन डेटासेट', 'ru': 'Наборы данных оценки SADID для низкоресурсного машинного перевода диалектов арабского языка', 'ga': "Na Tacair Sonraí Meastóireachta SADID d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Teangacha Araibise Íseal-Acmhainne ar Chanúintí Araibise", 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'SADID értékelési adatkészletek alacsony erőforrású beszélt nyelvű gépi fordításhoz arab dialektusok', 'el': 'Τα σύνολα δεδομένων αξιολόγησης για τη μηχανική μετάφραση αραβικών διαλέκτων χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε ομιλούμενη γλώσσα', 'mk': 'Арапски дијалекти', 'it': 'I set di dati di valutazione SADID per la traduzione automatica delle lingue parlate a basso contenuto di risorse dei dialetti arabi', 'kk': 'SADID бағалау деректер қорлары Араб диалектерінің төменгі ресурстар тілдерді аудару үшін', 'lt': 'SADID mažų išteklių kalbos mašinų vertimo arabų dialektais duomenų rinkiniai', 'ml': 'അറബി ഡയലക്ട്സുകളുടെ ഭാഷ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള SADID വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Dataset Evaluasi SADID untuk Terjemahan Mesin Bahasa Bercakap Sumber Terrendah bagi Dialeks Arab', 'mt': 'The SADID Evaluation Datasets for Low-Resource Spoken Language Machine Translation of Arabic Dialects', 'mn': 'SADID үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн сангууд Араб диалектуудын бага-сан хэл хэлний машин хөгжүүлэх', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Zestawy danych oceny SADID dla tłumaczenia maszynowego dialektów arabskich o niskich zasobach języka mówionego', 'ro': 'Seturile de date de evaluare SADID pentru traducerea automată a dialectelor arabe cu resurse reduse', 'sr': 'SADID ocjene podataka za prevod jezičkih mašina za manje resurse arapskih dijaleta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'SADID Datasets for Low-Resource Spoken Language Machine Translation of Arabic Dialects', 'sv': 'SADID utvärderingsdata för maskinöversättning av arabiska dialekter med låg resurs', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கான SADID மதிப்பீடு தகவல் அமைப்புகள்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dữ liệu đánh giá SADID cho Máy phát ngôn ngữ thấp lời nói tiếng Ả Rập Dịch các hộp thoại Ả Rập', 'bg': 'Набори от данни за оценка на машинен превод на арабски диалекти с нисък ресурс', 'nl': 'De SADID Evaluatie Datasets voor Machine Translation van Arabische Dialecten met lage resources', 'hr': 'Dati za procjenu SADID-a za prevod jezičkih uređaja s niskim resursima', 'da': 'SADID evalueringsdatasæt til maskinoversættelse af arabiske dialekter med lav ressource', 'de': 'SADID Evaluation Datasets für ressourcenschonende maschinelle Übersetzung arabischer Dialekte', 'id': 'Dataset Evaluasi SADID untuk Perjemahan Bahasa Bahasa Berbicara dengan Sumber Terrendah dari Dialeks Arab', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': 'SADID 평가 데이터 세트', 'sw': 'The SADID Evaluation Datasets for Low-Resource Spoken Language Machine Translation of Arabic Dialects', 'tr': 'SADID Taýýarlama Maglumaty Az-Reson Dili Taýýarlama Mazmunlary Arapça Dialektlaryň terjime edilmesi üçin', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ßŗ©SADID ßŗČßł┤ ßłØßł©ßīĪ', 'hy': 'Արաբական դիալեկտների թարգմանման ցածր ռեսուրսներով խոսվող լեզվի մեքենայի Սադիդի գնահատման տվյալների համակարգերը', 'sq': 'The SADID Evaluation Datasets for Low-Resource Spoken Language Machine Translation of Arabic Dialects', 'az': 'Aşağı-Ressours Spoken Dil Makinesi Arapça Dialektların Tərcümə üçün SADID Qıymet Veriləri', 'bn': 'আরবী ডায়ালেক্সের ভাষা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য SADID তথ্য পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Dati za procjenu SADID-a za prevod jezičkih uređaja s niskim resursima', 'cs': 'Sady hodnotících dat SADID pro strojový překlad arabských dialektů s nízkými zdroji mluveného jazyka', 'et': 'SADID hindamisandmekogumid vähese ressursiga räägitava keele masintõlke araabia dialektide kohta', 'fi': 'SADID-arviointidatasetit vähävaraiseen puhuttuun kieleen Arabian dialektien konekääntämiseen', 'ca': "Les bases de dades d'evaluació SADID per a la traducció de diàlectes àrabs de màquines de llenguatge parlada amb baix recursos", 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zbirke podatkov o ocenjevanju SADID za strojni prevod arabskih dialektov z nizkimi viri govorjenega jezika', 'he': 'מסמכי מידע הערכה של SADID למכונת שפה מדברת במקורים נמוכים', 'bo': 'The SADID Evaluation Datasets for Low-Resource Spoken Language Machine Translation of Arabic Dialects'}
{'en': 'Low-resource Machine Translation recently gained a lot of popularity, and for certain languages, it has made great strides. However, it is still difficult to track progress in other languages for which there is no publicly available evaluation data. In this paper, we introduce benchmark datasets for Arabic and its dialects. We describe our design process and motivations and analyze the datasets to understand their resulting properties. Numerous successful attempts use large monolingual corpora to augment low-resource pairs. We try to approach augmentation differently and investigate whether it is possible to improve MT models without any external sources of data. We accomplish this by bootstrapping existing parallel sentences and complement this with multilingual training to achieve strong baselines.', 'ar': 'اكتسبت الترجمة الآلية منخفضة الموارد مؤخرًا شعبية كبيرة ، وقد قطعت أشواطا واسعة في لغات معينة. ومع ذلك ، لا يزال من الصعب تتبع التقدم المحرز في اللغات الأخرى التي لا توجد بيانات تقييم متاحة للجمهور. في هذا البحث ، نقدم مجموعات بيانات معيارية للغة العربية ولهجاتها. نصف عملية التصميم لدينا والدوافع ونحلل مجموعات البيانات لفهم خصائصها الناتجة. تستخدم العديد من المحاولات الناجحة مجموعات كبيرة أحادية اللغة لزيادة الأزواج منخفضة الموارد. نحاول التعامل مع الزيادة بشكل مختلف والتحقق مما إذا كان من الممكن تحسين نماذج الترجمة الآلية دون أي مصادر خارجية للبيانات. نحقق ذلك عن طريق تمهيد الجمل المتوازية الموجودة واستكمال ذلك بتدريب متعدد اللغات لتحقيق خطوط أساس قوية.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique à faibles ressources a récemment gagné en popularité et, pour certaines langues, elle a fait de grands progrès. Cependant, il est toujours difficile de suivre les progrès réalisés dans d'autres langues pour lesquelles il n'existe pas de données d'évaluation accessibles au public. Dans cet article, nous présentons des ensembles de données de référence pour l'arabe et ses dialectes. Nous décrivons notre processus de conception et nos motivations et analysons les ensembles de données pour comprendre les propriétés qui en résultent. De nombreuses tentatives réussies utilisent de grands corpus monolingues pour augmenter les paires de ressources faibles. Nous essayons d'aborder l'augmentation différemment et de déterminer s'il est possible d'améliorer les modèles de TA sans aucune source de données externe. Nous y parvenons en amorçant des phrases parallèles existantes et en complétant cela par une formation multilingue afin d'obtenir des bases de référence solides.", 'es': 'Recientemente, la traducción automática de pocos recursos ganó mucha popularidad y, para ciertos idiomas, ha logrado grandes avances. Sin embargo, sigue siendo difícil seguir el progreso en otros idiomas para los que no hay datos de evaluación disponibles públicamente. En este artículo, presentamos conjuntos de datos de referencia para el árabe y sus dialectos. Describimos nuestro proceso de diseño y nuestras motivaciones y analizamos los conjuntos de datos para comprender las propiedades resultantes. Numerosos intentos exitosos utilizan grandes cuerpos monolingües para aumentar los pares de bajos recursos. Intentamos abordar el aumento de manera diferente e investigamos si es posible mejorar los modelos de MT sin fuentes externas de datos. Logramos esto mediante el arranque de oraciones paralelas existentes y lo complementamos con capacitación multilingüe para lograr líneas de base sólidas.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática de poucos recursos ganhou recentemente muita popularidade e, para certos idiomas, fez grandes avanços. No entanto, ainda é difícil acompanhar o progresso em outras línguas para as quais não há dados de avaliação disponíveis publicamente. Neste artigo, apresentamos conjuntos de dados de referência para o árabe e seus dialetos. Descrevemos nosso processo de design e motivações e analisamos os conjuntos de dados para entender suas propriedades resultantes. Inúmeras tentativas bem-sucedidas usam grandes corpora monolíngues para aumentar os pares de poucos recursos. Tentamos abordar o aumento de maneira diferente e investigamos se é possível melhorar os modelos de MT sem nenhuma fonte externa de dados. Conseguimos isso inicializando frases paralelas existentes e complementamos isso com treinamento multilíngue para obter linhas de base fortes.', 'ja': '低リソースの機械翻訳は最近多くの人気を博し、特定の言語では大きな進歩を遂げました。しかしながら、公開されている評価データがない他の言語での進捗状況を追跡することは依然として困難である。本稿では、アラビア語とその方言のベンチマークデータセットを紹介する。私たちは、設計プロセスと動機を説明し、データセットを分析して、結果として生じる特性を理解します。多数の成功した試みは、低リソースのペアを増強するために大規模な単一言語のコーラを使用します。拡張を別の方法でアプローチし、外部のデータソースなしでMTモデルを改善できるかどうかを調査しています。これを達成するには、既存の並行文をブートストラップし、これを多言語トレーニングで補って強力なベースラインを達成します。', 'zh': '资源匮机器翻译近获大普,于某语言,已得长足之进。 然犹难与无显数之语文。 本文中,引阿拉伯语及方言基准数集。 述其机变,析其数集以知其性。 诸成功者试用大单语语料库以增低资源对。 尝试以异术处之,究其可否数据源改机器翻译模样。 导今并行句以成之,多言培训以补之,以成强大之基线。', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन मशीन अनुवाद ने हाल ही में बहुत लोकप्रियता हासिल की है, और कुछ भाषाओं के लिए, इसने बहुत प्रगति की है। हालांकि, अन्य भाषाओं में प्रगति को ट्रैक करना अभी भी मुश्किल है, जिसके लिए कोई सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध मूल्यांकन डेटा नहीं है। इस पेपर में, हम अरबी और इसकी बोलियों के लिए बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पेश करते हैं। हम अपनी डिजाइन प्रक्रिया और प्रेरणाओं का वर्णन करते हैं और उनके परिणामी गुणों को समझने के लिए डेटासेट का विश्लेषण करते हैं। कई सफल प्रयास कम संसाधन जोड़े को बढ़ाने के लिए बड़े मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट का उपयोग करते हैं। हम अलग-अलग वृद्धि से संपर्क करने की कोशिश करते हैं और जांच करते हैं कि क्या डेटा के किसी भी बाहरी स्रोतों के बिना एमटी मॉडल में सुधार करना संभव है। हम मौजूदा समानांतर वाक्यों को बूटस्ट्रैप करके इसे पूरा करते हैं और मजबूत बेसलाइन प्राप्त करने के लिए बहुभाषी प्रशिक्षण के साथ इसे पूरक करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Низкоресурсный машинный перевод в последнее время приобрел большую популярность, и для некоторых языков он достиг больших успехов. Однако по-прежнему трудно отслеживать прогресс на других языках, по которым нет общедоступных данных об оценке. В этой статье мы вводим эталонные наборы данных для арабского языка и его диалектов. Мы описываем наш процесс проектирования и мотивацию и анализируем наборы данных, чтобы понять их результирующие свойства. Многочисленные успешные попытки использовать большие одноязычные корпуса для увеличения пар с низким уровнем ресурсов. Мы пытаемся по-разному подходить к дополнению и исследовать, возможно ли улучшить модели MT без каких-либо внешних источников данных. Мы достигаем этого, перебирая существующие параллельные предложения и дополняя это многоязычным обучением для достижения сильных базовых линий.', 'ga': "Tháinig an-tóir ar Aistriúchán Meaisín ar acmhainní íseal le déanaí, agus i gcás teangacha áirithe, tá dul chun cinn mór déanta aige. Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair fós dul chun cinn a rianú i dteangacha eile nach bhfuil sonraí meastóireachta ar fáil go poiblí ina leith. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach tacair sonraí tagarmharcála don Araibis agus a canúintí. Déanaimid cur síos ar ár bpróiseas dearaidh agus ár n-spreagthaí agus déanaimid anailís ar na tacair sonraí chun na hairíonna a d'eascair as a thuiscint. Úsáideann iliomad iarrachtaí rathúla corpora móra aonteangacha chun cur le péirí acmhainní ísle. Déanaimid iarracht cur chuige an mhéadaithe ar bhealach difriúil agus fiosrú an féidir samhlacha MT a fheabhsú gan aon fhoinsí seachtracha sonraí. Bainimid é seo amach trí na habairtí comhthreomhara atá ann faoi láthair a bhrú chun cinn agus comhlánaimid é seo le hoiliúint ilteangach chun bonnlínte láidre a bhaint amach.", 'hu': 'Az alacsony erőforrású gépi fordítás a közelmúltban nagy népszerűségre tett szert, és bizonyos nyelvek esetében nagy lépéseket tett. Azonban még mindig nehéz nyomon követni az előrehaladást más nyelveken, amelyekre vonatkozóan nincsenek nyilvánosan hozzáférhető értékelési adatok. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az arab és dialektusainak benchmark adatkészleteit. Leírjuk tervezési folyamatunkat és motivációinkat, és elemezzük az adatkészleteket, hogy megértsük azok eredményeit. Számos sikeres kísérlet használja a nagy egynyelvű corporákat az alacsony erőforrás-párok növelésére. Megpróbáljuk másképp megközelíteni az augmentációt és megvizsgálni, hogy lehetséges-e az MT modellek fejlesztése külső adatforrás nélkül. Ezt a meglévő párhuzamos mondatok indításával érjük el, és ezt többnyelvű képzéssel egészítjük ki, hogy erős alapvonalakat érjünk el.', 'el': 'Η μηχανική μετάφραση χαμηλού πόρων απέκτησε πρόσφατα μεγάλη δημοτικότητα και για ορισμένες γλώσσες, έχει κάνει μεγάλα βήματα. Ωστόσο, εξακολουθεί να είναι δύσκολο να παρακολουθείται η πρόοδος σε άλλες γλώσσες για τις οποίες δεν υπάρχουν δημόσια διαθέσιμα δεδομένα αξιολόγησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς για τα αραβικά και τις διαλέκτές τους. Περιγράφουμε τη διαδικασία σχεδιασμού και τα κίνητρά μας και αναλύουμε τα σύνολα δεδομένων για να κατανοήσουμε τις ιδιότητες που προκύπτουν. Πολλές επιτυχημένες προσπάθειες χρησιμοποιούν μεγάλα μονογλωσσικά σώματα για να αυξήσουν τα ζεύγη χαμηλών πόρων. Προσπαθούμε να προσεγγίσουμε διαφορετικά την αύξηση και να διερευνήσουμε αν είναι δυνατόν να βελτιώσουμε μοντέλα ΜΤ χωρίς εξωτερικές πηγές δεδομένων. Αυτό το επιτυγχάνουμε συνδέοντας υπάρχουσες παράλληλες προτάσεις και το συμπληρώνουμε με πολύγλωσση εκπαίδευση για να επιτύχουμε ισχυρές βάσεις.', 'ka': 'მაქსინური მაქსინური თავსწორება ახლა უფრო მეტი პოლუბარიტება მიიღეთ, და განსაკუთრებული ენებისთვის მაქსინური თავსწორება გავაკეთება. მაგრამ სხვა ენების პროგრესი, რომლებიც არ აქვს ადამიანურად ხელსაწყობინებული მონაცემები. ჩვენ აპაბიური და მისი დიალეკტებისთვის ბენქმარკური მონაცემები ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ. ჩვენ ჩვენი დიზინის პროცესი და მოტივაციების განსაზღვრება და მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას ანალიზებას, რომ გავიგოთ მათი შემდეგ განსაზღვრებ რამდენიმე წარმატებული მონოლენგური კოპორა გამოიყენება, რომელიც მარტივი რესურსების ზოგილებაში. ჩვენ ვცდილობთ განსხვავებულად აგეგენტაციას და განსხვავებთ თუ არა შესაძლებელია MT მოდელების უფრო უფრო მეტირება. ჩვენ ამას გავაკეთებთ, როგორც მსგავსი პარალელური სიტყვებით გადავაკეთებთ და ამას მრავალენგური განსწავლებით, რომ გავაკეთებთ ძალიან ბაზილის ხაზები', 'it': "La traduzione automatica a basso contenuto di risorse ha recentemente guadagnato molta popolarità e per alcune lingue, ha fatto grandi passi avanti. Tuttavia, è ancora difficile tracciare i progressi in altre lingue per le quali non esistono dati di valutazione disponibili al pubblico. In questo articolo introduciamo set di dati di riferimento per l'arabo e i suoi dialetti. Descriviamo il nostro processo di progettazione e le motivazioni e analizziamo i set di dati per comprenderne le proprietà risultanti. Numerosi tentativi di successo utilizzano grandi corpora monolingue per aumentare le coppie a basso contenuto di risorse. Cerchiamo di affrontare l'aumento in modo diverso e di indagare se è possibile migliorare i modelli MT senza fonti esterne di dati. Realizziamo questo avviando frasi parallele esistenti e completandolo con una formazione multilingue per raggiungere linee di base solide.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы машинаның төмен ресурстар аудармасы бірнеше мәліметті жетті, бірнеше тілдер үшін ол үлкен жолдар жасады. Бірақ басқа тілдерде жағдайды бағалау үшін көпшілік мәліметтері жоқ. Бұл қағазда араб және диалекттердің бенкмарк деректерін таңдаймыз. Біз дизайн процесімізді, мотивациямызды түсіндіріп, деректер жиындарын түсіндіру үшін анықтаймыз. Бірнеше сәтті бір көп ресурстарды көбейту үшін үлкен монолингі корпора қолданады. Біз өзгертіп, MT моделдерін ешқандай сыртқы деректер көзі болмаса, жасау мүмкіндігін шешуге тырыстық. Біз бұны параллель сөздерді жүктеп, көптілікті оқыту үшін көпшілікті негізгі сызықтарды жеткізу үшін бірнеше тілдік оқыту арқылы жеткіземіз', 'lt': 'Mažų išteklių mašinų vertimas neseniai įgijo daug populiarumo, o tam tikrose kalbose jis padarė didelę pažangą. Tačiau vis dar sunku stebėti pažangą kitomis kalbomis, kurių vertinimo duomenys nėra viešai prieinami. Šiame dokumente pristatome arabų ir jo dialektų lyginamuosius duomenų rinkinius. We describe our design process and motivations and analyze the datasets to understand their resulting properties.  Daugelis sėkmingų bandymų naudoja didelę vienakalbę korprą, kad padidintų mažai išteklių turinčias poras. Bandome skirtingai atsižvelgti į padidėjimą ir ištirti, ar galima patobulinti MT modelius be jokių išorinių duomenų šaltinių. Mes tai darome nustačius esamus lygiagrečius sakinius ir jį papildant daugiakalbiu mokymu, kad būtų pasiektos tvirtos bazės.', 'mk': 'Машинска превод со ниски ресурси неодамна доби многу популарност, и за одредени јазици, направи големи чекори. Сепак, сé уште е тешко да се следи напредокот на другите јазици за кои нема јавно достапни податоци за проценка. Во овој весник, воведуваме бази на податоци за арапски и нејзините дијалекти. Го опишуваме нашиот процес на дизајн и мотивации и ги анализираме податоците за да ги разбереме нивните резултати. Многу успешни обиди користат големи монојазични тела за да ги зголемат паровите со ниски ресурси. Се обидуваме различно да се приближиме до зголемувањето и да истражиме дали е можно да се подобрат моделите на МТ без никакви надворешни извори на податоци. Ние го остваруваме ова со преземање на постоечките паралелни реченици и го комплиментираме ова со мултијазична обука за постигнување на силни основни линии.', 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ചു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന എങ്കിലും മറ്റു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്ലാത്തതിനാലും പ്രസ്താവികമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളെ അറബിക്കും അതിന്റെ ഡയലക്കേറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും പരിചയപ നമ്മുടെ ഡിസൈന്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയെയും പ്രക്രിയയെയും വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും, അവയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാ വിജയിച്ച ശ്രമങ്ങള്\u200d വലിയ മോനോളില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200dണയെ കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ജോട്ടികള്\u200dക് We try to approach augmentation differently and investigate whether it is possible to improve MT models without any external sources of data.  നിലവിലുള്ള അടയാള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ബൂട്ട്സ്ട്രാപ്പ് ചെയ്ത് ഇത് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുകയും ശക്തിയുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാ', 'mn': 'Машин бага асуудлын хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хувьд саяхан олон хүн төрөлхтөн олж авсан. Зарим хэл дээр энэ нь гайхалтай хичээл хий Гэвч олон нийтийн оюутнуудын өгөгдлийг олон хэл дээр хөгжлийг олох нь хэцүү. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Араб болон диалектуудын банк марк өгөгдлийн сангуудыг танилцуулдаг. Бид өөрсдийн дизайны процесс, урам зориг тайлбарлаж өгөгдлийн сангуудыг нь үр дүнд гарсан чадварыг ойлгохын тулд шинжилгээ хийдэг. Амжилттай олон хүмүүс нэг хэл хэлний корпора ашиглаж бага нөөцийн хоёрыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд ашигладаг. Бид өөр өөр өндөртэй хүрэхэд, MT загварыг ямар ч гадаад мэдээллийн эх үүсвэргүй сайжруулах боломжтой эсэхийг судалж байна. Бид үүнийг оршиж байгаа параллель өгүүлбэрийг засаж, олон хэлний сургалтын тулд хүчтэй суурь шугам хүрэхэд нэмэгдүүлнэ.', 'ms': 'Low-resource Machine Translation recently gained a lot of popularity, and for certain languages, it has made great strides.  Namun, masih sukar untuk mengesan kemajuan dalam bahasa lain yang tidak ada data penilaian yang tersedia secara awam. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan set data benchmark untuk bahasa Arab dan dialektnya. Kami menggambarkan proses desain dan motivasi kami dan menganalisis set data untuk memahami ciri-ciri hasilnya. Banyak percubaan berjaya menggunakan korpra monobahasa besar untuk menambah pasangan sumber rendah. Kami cuba mendekati peningkatan berbeza dan menyelidiki sama ada ia mungkin untuk meningkatkan model MT tanpa mana-mana sumber data luaran. Kita lakukannya dengan menggunakan bootstrapping kalimat selari yang wujud dan tambahkan ini dengan latihan berbilang bahasa untuk mencapai garis dasar yang kuat.', 'mt': 'It-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju b’riżorsi baxxi reċentement kisbet ħafna popolarità, u għal ċerti lingwi, għamlet passi kbar. Madankollu, għadu diffiċli li wieħed isegwi l-progress f’lingwi oħra li għalihom m’hemmx dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni pubblikament disponibbli. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nintroduċu settijiet ta’ dejta referenzjarji għall-Għarab u d-dijaletti tiegħu. We describe our design process and motivations and analyze the datasets to understand their resulting properties.  Numru ta’ tentattivi ta’ suċċess jużaw korpura monolingwi kbar biex iżidu l-pari b’riżorsi baxxi. Aħna nippruvaw nimxu lejn l-augmentazzjoni b’mod differenti u ninvestigaw jekk huwiex possibbli li jittejbu l-mudelli MT mingħajr sorsi esterni ta’ dejta. Aħna nilħqu dan billi nibdew is-sentenzi paralleli eżistenti u nikkumplimentawha b’taħriġ multilingwi biex niksbu linji bażi b’saħħithom.', 'pl': 'Niskie zasoby tłumaczenie maszynowe zyskało ostatnio dużą popularność, a w przypadku niektórych języków poczyniło wielkie postępy. Nadal jednak trudno jest śledzić postępy w innych językach, dla których nie ma publicznie dostępnych danych oceniających. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy zbiory danych referencyjnych dla arabskiego i jego dialektów. Opisujemy nasz proces projektowania i motywacje oraz analizujemy zbiory danych w celu zrozumienia ich powstałych właściwości. Liczne udane próby wykorzystują duże jednojęzyczne korpusy do powiększania par o niskich zasobach. Staramy się podejść do augmentacji inaczej i zbadać, czy możliwe jest ulepszenie modeli MT bez zewnętrznych źródeł danych. Osiągamy to poprzez bootstrapping istniejących równoległych zdań i uzupełniamy to wielojęzycznymi szkoleniami, aby osiągnąć silne podstawy.', 'no': 'Låg- ressursmaskineomsetjinga har nyleg fått mykje popularitet, og for enkelte språk har det lagt stor streng. Det er likevel vanskeleg å spora framgang i andre språk som ikkje finst offentlig tilgjengelege evalueringsdata. I denne papiret introduserer vi benchmarkdatasett for arabiske og dialektane. Vi beskriver utformingsprosessen og motivasjonar våre og analyserer datasettet for å forstå dei resulterte eigenskapane. Vellukka forsøk brukar stor monospråk korpora for å auka låg ressurspar. Vi prøver å nærme økninga ulike måtar og undersøke om det er mogleg å forbetra MT-modeller utan eksterne kilder av data. Vi fullfører dette ved å oppstarta eksisterande parallelle setningar og leggja til dette med fleirspråk opplæring for å oppnå sterke baselinjer.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată cu resurse reduse a câștigat recent o mulțime de popularitate, iar pentru anumite limbi, a făcut pași mari. Cu toate acestea, este încă dificil de urmărit progresul în alte limbi pentru care nu există date de evaluare disponibile publicului. În această lucrare, introducem seturi de date de referință pentru arabă și dialectele sale. Descriem procesul nostru de proiectare și motivațiile și analizăm seturile de date pentru a înțelege proprietățile rezultate. Numeroase încercări reușite folosesc corpore monolingve mari pentru a spori perechile cu resurse scăzute. Încercăm să abordăm diferit augmentarea și să investigăm dacă este posibilă îmbunătățirea modelelor MT fără surse externe de date. Realizăm acest lucru prin bootstraping propoziții paralele existente și completăm acest lucru cu instruire multilingvă pentru a obține linii de bază puternice.', 'si': 'අඩුම ප්\u200dරධානයක් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන වාර්තාව අවස්ථාවයේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුනා, සහ සමහර භාෂාවට නමුත්, අනිත් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරධානයක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න තවමත් අමාරුයි, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න මේ පැත්තේ අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් අරාබික් සහ එයාගේ ඩායාලක්ට් වලට පෙනුම් කරනවා. අපි අපේ විද්\u200dයාපනය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම දත්ත සෙට්ටුව තේරුම් ගන්න. ගොඩක් සාර්ථක උත්සාහ කරනවා ලොකු එක භාෂාවක් කෝපෝරාව භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපි පරීක්ෂණය වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂය කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා MT මොඩේල් වලට ප අපි මේක අවස්ථාවන් කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, මේක ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dර', 'sv': 'Maskinöversättning med låg resurs har nyligen vunnit mycket popularitet, och för vissa språk har den gjort stora framsteg. Det är dock fortfarande svårt att spåra framstegen på andra språk för vilka det inte finns några offentligt tillgängliga utvärderingsuppgifter. I denna uppsats introducerar vi benchmarkdatauppsättningar för arabiska och dess dialekter. Vi beskriver vår designprocess och motivationer och analyserar datauppsättningarna för att förstå deras resulterande egenskaper. Många framgångsrika försök använder stora enspråkiga korpora för att öka lågresurspar. Vi försöker förhålla oss till augmentation annorlunda och undersöka om det är möjligt att förbättra MT-modeller utan externa datakällor. Vi uppnår detta genom att bootstrap befintliga parallella meningar och komplettera detta med flerspråkig utbildning för att uppnå starka baslinjer.', 'so': "Turjumidda Masiinka ee hoose-resource waxey ugu dhowaad faa'iidadeen dad faro badan, luuqado qaarkoodna waxay sameeyeen dagaalooyin aad u weyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waa adag tahay inaad soo socoto horumarinta luuqadaha kale, taas oo aan macluumaadka qiimeynta oo hadhuudhka loo helin. Warqadan, waxan ku soo bandhignaa sawirada bangiga ee Carabiga iyo afkiisa. Waxaynu sawiraynaa baaritaankeenna iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo baaritaanka macluumaadka si aan u fahno hantidiisa soo baxa. Jahaado badan oo succeeded ah ayaa shirkado badan oo muuqaal ah u isticmaala si ay u kordhisaan labo noocyo hoos ah. Waxaan isku daynaa in aan u soo dhowaanno koritaanka si kala duwan, waxaana baarinaynaa inay u suurtowdo in lagu hagaajiyo tusaalaha MT oo aan lahayn noocyada dibadda ah ee macluumaadka. Waxan waxan ku dhammaynaa si aan ugu sameynno hadallada lambarka ah oo aan ugu dhammayno waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan si aan u gaadhno aasaasyo xoog leh.", 'sr': 'Prevedenje mašine niskih resursa nedavno je dobilo mnogo popularnosti, a za određene jezike, to je napravilo velike napore. Međutim, još uvek je teško pratiti napredak na drugim jezicima za koje nema javno dostupnih podataka o procjeni. U ovom papiru predstavljamo bazne podatke za arapske i njegove dijalekte. Opišemo naš proces dizajna i motivacije i analiziramo podatke kako bi razumeli njihove rezultate. Brojni uspešni pokušaji koriste veliku monojezičku korporaciju za povećanje par niskih resursa. Pokušavamo drugačije pristupiti povećanju i istražiti da li je moguće poboljšati modele MT bez bilo kakvih vanjskih izvora podataka. To postižemo putem prebacivanja postojećih paralelnih rečenica i dodavanja ovoga multijezičkim obukom kako bi postigli jake osnovne linije.', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலம் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சமீபத்தில் நிறைய மகிழ்ச்சியை பெற்றுவிட்டது, மற்றும் சில மொழிகளுக்கு, அது  ஆனாலும், இன்னும் மற்ற மொழிகளில் முன்னேற்றத்தை கண்டுபிடிப்பது கடினமாக இருக்கிறது அதனால் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களை அரபி மற்றும் அதன் விளக்கங்களுக்கு அறிவிக்க நாம் எங்கள் வடிவமைப்பு செயலையும் ஊக்குதலையும் விவரிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் முடிவு பண்புகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள தர பல வெற்றிகரமான முயற்சிகள் பெரிய மொன்மொழி நிறுவனத்தை பயன்படுத்தி குறைந்த மூலத்தின் ஜோடியை கூட்டு. நாம் முயற்சிக்கிறோம் வேறு வேறு மேம்படுத்தலை முயற்சி மற்றும் தகவல் மூலம் இல்லாமல் MT மாதிரிகளை மேம்படுத்த முடியுமா  இருக்கும் இணைய வாக்குகளை துவக்கி இதை நாம் நிறைவேற்றுகிறோம் மற்றும் அதை பல மொழிக்கு பயிற்சியுடன் முடிக்கும் ம', 'ur': 'کم-resource Machine Translation recently got a lot of popularity, and for certain languages, it has made great strides. لیکن اب بھی دوسری زبانوں میں پیشرفت کا پیدا کرنے کا مشکل ہے جس کے لئے عمومی ارزیابی دادہ نہیں ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ عربی اور اس کے دیالکت کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ہماری طراحی پروسس اور موثریت کو توصیح دیتے ہیں اور ان کے نتائج ویژگی کو سمجھنے کے لئے ڈاٹ سٹ کو تحقیق دیتے ہیں۔ بہت سی موفقیت کی کوشش تھی کہ بہت سی زبان کی کوروں کو کم منبع جوڑوں کی زیادتی کے لئے استعمال کریں. ہم ایک دوسرے طریقے سے اضافہ کرنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں اور تحقیق کرنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں کہ آیا MT موڈل کو بغیر کسی خارجی منبع کے دکھانے کے بہتر کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم یہ کام کر رہے ہیں کہ موجود موجود مشابہ جماعتوں کو ڈھانک دیں اور اس کو بہت سی زبان کی آموزش کے ساتھ مکمل کریں کہ قوت کی بنسٹ لینوں تک پہنچ سکیں۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda bir necha manba mashina tarjima qiladi va bir necha tillar uchun juda katta tarjima qildi. Lekin, huddi boshqa tillarda muvaffaqiyatlarni qidirish qidirish juda qiyin. In this paper, we introduce benchmark datasets for Arabic and its dialects.  Biz dizayn jarayonini va harakat qilamiz va natijalarining xossalarini tushunish uchun maʼlumotlar tuzuvlarini taʼlumot qilamiz. Koʻp muvaffaqiyatli foydalanuvchi katta munosabatlar kompaniyalaridan foydalanishni kamaytirish Biz tashqi maʼlumot manbasiga MT modellarini bajarish mumkin deb o'rganamiz. Biz bu narsalarni ishga tushirish uchun mavjud parallel so'zlarni ishga tushirish va bu bir necha tilni o'rganish uchun katta asboblarni bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Dịch Cơ khí thấp vừa đạt được nhiều sự phổ biến, và với một số ngôn ngữ, nó đã có bước tiến lớn. Tuy nhiên, vẫn khó khăn để theo dõi sự tiến bộ trong những ngôn ngữ khác mà không có dữ liệu đánh giá công khai. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu các dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho tiếng Ả Rập và phương ngữ. Chúng tôi mô tả tiến trình thiết kế và động cơ của chúng tôi và phân tích các bộ dữ liệu để hiểu được tính chất của chúng. Nhiều nỗ lực thành công dùng cơ thể ngôn ngữ lớn để tăng cường cặp tài nguyên thấp. Chúng tôi cố gắng tiếp cận bơm gia tăng khác nhau và tìm hiểu xem có thể cải thiện mô hình MTV mà không có nguồn dữ liệu bên ngoài. Chúng ta có thể thực hiện việc này bằng cách khởi động các câu song song song và hoàn thành nó bằng việc đào tạo đa dạng để đạt được nền tảng vững chắc.', 'nl': "Machine Translation met lage resources heeft onlangs veel populariteit gewonnen en voor bepaalde talen heeft het grote vooruitgang geboekt. Het is echter nog steeds moeilijk om de voortgang te volgen in andere talen waarvoor geen openbaar beschikbare evaluatiegegevens beschikbaar zijn. In dit artikel introduceren we benchmark datasets voor Arabisch en zijn dialecten. We beschrijven ons ontwerpproces en motivaties en analyseren de datasets om hun resulterende eigenschappen te begrijpen. Talrijke succesvolle pogingen gebruiken grote eentalige corpora's om paren met weinig resources te vergroten. We proberen augmentatie anders te benaderen en onderzoeken of het mogelijk is om MT-modellen te verbeteren zonder externe gegevensbronnen. Dit bereiken we door bestaande parallelle zinnen te bootstrappen en dit aan te vullen met meertalige training om sterke baselines te bereiken.", 'bg': 'Машинният превод с нисък ресурс наскоро придоби голяма популярност и за някои езици направи големи крачки. Все още е трудно да се проследи напредъка на други езици, за които няма публично достъпни данни за оценка. В тази статия представяме сравнителни набори от данни за арабски и неговите диалекти. Описваме нашия процес на проектиране и мотивации и анализираме наборите от данни, за да разберем получените им свойства. Многобройни успешни опити използват големи едноезични корпуси за увеличаване на двойките с ниски ресурси. Опитваме се да подходим към увеличението по различен начин и да проучим дали е възможно да подобрим моделите без външни източници на данни. Ние постигаме това чрез стартиране на съществуващите паралелни изречения и допълваме това с многоезично обучение, за да постигнем силни базови линии.', 'hr': 'Prijevod mašine s niskim resursima nedavno je dobio mnogo popularnosti, a za određene jezike, napravio je velike napore. Međutim, još uvijek je teško pratiti napredak na drugim jezicima za koje nema javno dostupnih podataka o procjenama. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezervne podatke za arapske i dijalekte. Opisujemo naš proces dizajna i motivacije i analiziramo podatke kako bi razumjeli njihove rezultate. Brojni uspješni pokušaji koriste veliku monojezičku korporaciju za povećanje par niskih resursa. Pokušavamo drugačije pristupiti povećanju i istražiti je li moguće poboljšati modele MT bez bilo kojih vanjskih izvora podataka. To ćemo postići čišćenjem postojećih paralelnih rečenica i dodatnim to multijezičkim obukom kako bi postigli jake osnovne linije.', 'da': 'Maskinoversættelse med lav ressource har for nylig vundet en masse popularitet, og for visse sprog har det gjort store fremskridt. Det er dog stadig vanskeligt at følge fremskridt på andre sprog, for hvilke der ikke foreligger offentligt tilgængelige evalueringsdata. I denne artikel introducerer vi benchmark datasæt for arabisk og dets dialekter. Vi beskriver vores designproces og motiver og analyserer datasættene for at forstå deres resulterende egenskaber. Mange vellykkede forsøg bruger store ensprogede korpora til at øge lav ressource par. Vi forsøger at tilpasse augmentation anderledes og undersøge, om det er muligt at forbedre MT-modeller uden eksterne datakilder. Vi opnår dette ved at bootstrappe eksisterende parallelle sætninger og supplere dette med flersproget træning for at opnå stærke basislinjer.', 'de': 'Ressourcenarme maschinelle Übersetzung hat in letzter Zeit viel Popularität gewonnen und für bestimmte Sprachen hat sie große Fortschritte gemacht. Es ist jedoch nach wie vor schwierig, Fortschritte in anderen Sprachen zu verfolgen, für die keine öffentlich zugänglichen Evaluierungsdaten vorliegen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Benchmark-Datensätze für Arabisch und seine Dialekte vor. Wir beschreiben unseren Designprozess und unsere Motivationen und analysieren die Datensätze, um ihre resultierenden Eigenschaften zu verstehen. Zahlreiche erfolgreiche Versuche nutzen große einsprachige Korpora, um ressourcenarme Paare zu erweitern. Wir versuchen, Augmentation anders anzugehen und untersuchen, ob es möglich ist, MT-Modelle ohne externe Datenquellen zu verbessern. Dies erreichen wir durch Bootstrapping vorhandener paralleler Sätze und ergänzen dies durch mehrsprachiges Training, um starke Baselines zu erreichen.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin sumber daya rendah baru-baru ini mendapatkan banyak popularitas, dan untuk bahasa tertentu, itu telah membuat langkah yang besar. However, it is still difficult to track progress in other languages for which there is no publicly available evaluation data.  Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan set data benchmark untuk bahasa Arab dan dialektnya. Kami menggambarkan proses desain dan motivasi kami dan menganalisis set data untuk memahami properti hasilnya. Banyak percobaan sukses menggunakan corpora monobahasa besar untuk meningkatkan pasangan sumber daya rendah. Kami mencoba mendekati peningkatan berbeda dan menyelidiki apakah mungkin untuk meningkatkan model MT tanpa sumber data luar. Kita menyelesaikan ini dengan menggunakan bootstrapping kalimat paralel yang ada dan menambahkan ini dengan latihan berbagai bahasa untuk mencapai garis dasar yang kuat.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین کم منبع اخیراً زیادی از شهرت را به دست آورد، و برای زبان\u200cهای خاص، تلاش بزرگی انجام داد. با این حال، هنوز پیشرفت در زبانهای دیگر را پیدا کردن سخت است که اطلاعات ارزیابی عمومی در آن وجود ندارد. در این کاغذ، ما مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای صندوق برای عربی و دیالکت\u200cهای آن را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. ما فرایند طراحی و انگیزه\u200cهایمان را توصیف می\u200cکنیم و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم تا ویژگی\u200cهای نتیجه\u200cشان را درک کنند. تلاش بسیاری موفقیت از شرکت بزرگ یک زبان برای افزایش جفت منابع کم استفاده می کند. ما سعی می کنیم به افزایش متفاوت نزدیک شویم و تحقیق کنیم که آیا ممکن است مدل MT را بدون هیچ منبع خارجی از داده ها بهتر کنیم. ما این را با جمله\u200cهای متفاوتی که موجود هستند انجام می\u200cدهیم و این را با آموزش های زیادی زبان برای رسیدن خطوط بنیادی قوی تعداد می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Rasilimali ya chini hivi karibuni ilipata umaarufu mkubwa, na kwa lugha fulani, imefanya makundi makubwa. Hata hivyo, bado ni vigumu kufuatilia maendeleo katika lugha nyingine ambazo hakuna taarifa zinazopatikana hadharani. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha taarifa za bendera kwa ajili ya Kiarabu na lugha zake. Tunaelezea mchakato wetu wa ubunifu na hamasa na uchambuzi wa seti za taarifa ili kuelewa utajiri wao wa matokeo. Jaribio nyingi zilizofanikiwa kutumia kampuni kubwa ya lugha za kiuchumi ili kuongeza wanandoa wa rasilimali chini. We try to approach augmentation differently and investigate whether it is possible to improve MT models without any external sources of data.  Tunaitimiza hili kwa kuzuia hukumu zilizopo sawa na kuitimiza hii kwa mafunzo ya lugha mbalimbali ili kufikia misingi yenye nguvu.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda Ululyk Maşynyň terjimesine köp popularlyk gazandy we beýleki diller üçin ol gaty düzgün düzgün boldy. Ýöne başga dillerde täzeden çykmak kyn. Ýöne halkara çykyş maglumatlary ýok. Bu kagyzda arap we dialektleri üçin benchmark sanatyny tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň tasarlama prosesimizi we motivasiýalarymyzy tassyýarys we veri setirlerini netijäki häsiýetlerini düşünmek üçin çözümlendiris. Aç sany üstünlikli bir monolingüň korporatyny iň az resurslar çiftini artmak üçin ulanýarlar. Biz daşary daşary çeşmedeniň MT modelleriniň ulaştyrmasynyň mümkinçiligini üýtgetmek üçin synanyşýarys. Biz bu işi bar parallel sözleri başlap, we muny güýçli baselini ýetmek üçin köp dilli okuw taýýarlapdyk.', 'af': 'Lae-hulpbron Masjien Vertaling het onlangs baie populariteit ontvang, en vir sekere tale het dit groot striede gemaak. Maar dit is nog moeilik om vordering in ander tale te soek waarvoor daar geen openlik beskikbaar evalueringsdata is nie. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons benchmark datastel vir Arabiese en sy dialekte. Ons beskryf ons ontwerp proses en motivasies en analyseer die datastelle om hul resulteerde eienskappe te verstaan. Nommer suksesvolle probeers gebruik groot monolinglike korpora om lae hulpbron paar te groei. Ons probeer om verskillende augmentasie te nader en om te ondersoek of dit moontlik is om MT-modelle te verbeter sonder enige eksterne bronne van data. Ons doen dit voldoen deur die opstart van bestaande parallele setnings en dit met multilingse onderwerp te voldoen om sterke basisline te bereik.', 'am': 'ከቅርብ ዘመን የዝቅተኛ የመኪን ትርጉም ብዙ ህዝብ አግኝቶአል፣ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎችም እጅግ ትልቅ ግጭት አድርጎአል፡፡ However, it is still difficult to track progress in other languages for which there is no publicly available evaluation data.  በዚህ ካላት የbenchmark ዳታዎችን ለአረብኛ እና ለቋንቋዎች እናስጠቃለን፡፡ የዲጅን ፕሮጀክታችንን እና ማስታወቂያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ብዙዎች የሞሎንቋል ኮርፖርት የጎደለኛ ጉዳዮችን ለማጨመር ይሞክራሉ፡፡ ከውጭ የዳታ ምንጮች ሳይኖር MT ዓይነቶችን ማሻሻል እንዲችል እናሞክራለን፡፡ ይሄንን በመጀመሪያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'ko': '저자원 기계 번역은 최근에 광범위하게 응용되었고, 일부 언어에 있어서는 이미 장족한 발전을 이루었다.그러나 평가 데이터가 공개되지 않은 다른 언어는 여전히 진행 상황을 추적하기 어렵다.본고는 아랍어와 그 방언의 기준 데이터 집합을 소개했다.우리는 우리의 설계 과정과 동기를 묘사하고 데이터 집합을 분석하여 그 결과의 속성을 이해했다.많은 성공적인 시도들이 저자원을 확충하기 위해 대형 단어 자료 라이브러리를 사용한다.우리는 증강을 서로 다른 방식으로 처리하고 외부 데이터 원본이 없는 상황에서 기계 번역 모델을 개선할 수 있는지를 연구하고자 한다.우리는 기존의 평행문장을 유도함으로써 이 점을 실현하고 다중 언어 교육을 통해 강력한 기선을 실현한다.', 'az': 'Yaxınlarda düşük ressurs Makinelərin Tərcüməsi çox məşhurlük aldı və bəzi dillər üçün böyük səbəb yaratdı. Halbuki, hal-salamat verilənləri olmayan başqa dillərdə tədbir etmək çox çətin. Bu kağızda, ərəb və dialektlərinin benchmark verilənlərini tanıdırıq. Bizim dizayn prosesimizi və motivasiyonlarımızı təsdiqləyirik və veri setlərini nəticə etdiklərini anlamaq üçün analiz edirik. Ən çox müvəffəqiyyətli cürbəcür çox monodilli korpora istifadə edir ki, çox zəif resursu çiftləri artırmaq üçün. Biz artırmağa başqa tərzdə yaxınlaşmağa çalışırıq və MT modellərinin heç bir dış mənbələri olmadan mümkün olub olmadığını araşdırmağa çalışırıq. Biz bunu müəyyən edirik ki, mövcuddur paralel sözləri başlayıb çoxlu dil təhsil etmək üçün çoxlu təhsil təhsil edərik.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক সম্প্রতি নিম্ন রিসোর্স মেশিন অনুবাদ অনুবাদ অনেক জনপ্রিয় হয়েছে এবং কিছু ভাষার জন্য এটি বিশাল সংঘর্ষের সৃ তবে অন্যান্য ভাষায় অগ্রগতি অনুসন্ধান করা এখনো কঠিন, যার জন্য প্রকাশ্য মূল্যায়নের তথ্য নেই। এই পত্রিকায়, আমরা আরবী এবং এর ডায়ালিকেটের জন্য বেঞ্চমার্ক ডাটাসেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। আমরা আমাদের ডিজাইন প্রক্রিয়া এবং উদ্দেশ্য বর্ণনা করি এবং তাদের ফলাফলের বৈশিষ্ট্য বুঝতে ডাটাসেট বিশ্লেষণ করি। বেশ কয়েকটি সফল প্রচেষ্টা ব্যবহার করে নীচের সম্পদ জোড়ায়। আমরা ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সংস্থার কাছে যাওয়ার চেষ্টা করছি এবং তথ্য ছাড়া এমটি মডেল উন্নত করা সম্ভব কিনা। বুটস্ট্র্যাপিং বিদ্যমান প্যারালেল বাক্যের মাধ্যমে আমরা এটা সম্পূর্ণ করি এবং এটা পূর্ণ করে প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে শক্তি', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i Makinës me burime të ulëta ka fituar kohët e fundit shumë popullaritet dhe për disa gjuhë, ka bërë përparime të mëdha. However, it is still difficult to track progress in other languages for which there is no publicly available evaluation data.  Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim baza të dhënash për arabisht dhe dialektet e tij. Ne përshkruajmë procesin tonë të dizajnit dhe motivimet tona dhe analizojmë të dhënat për të kuptuar pronësitë e tyre rezultuese. Përpjekjet e shumta të suksesshme përdorin korpra të mëdha monogjuhësore për të rritur çifte me burime të ulëta. Ne përpiqemi të afrohemi rritjes ndryshe dhe të hetojmë nëse është e mundur të përmirësohemi modelet MT pa ndonjë burim të jashtëm të të dhënave. Ne e arrijmë këtë duke shkatërruar fjalët ekzistuese paralele dhe e komplementojmë këtë me trajnim shumëgjuhës për të arritur linja bazë të forta.', 'ca': "Low-resource Machine Translation recently gained a lot of popularity, and for certain languages, it has made great strides.  Tot i així, encara és difícil seguir el progrés en altres llengües per les quals no hi ha dades d'evaluació disponibles al públic. En aquest article introduïm conjunts de dades de referència per a l'àrab i els seus dialectes. Descrivem el nostre procés de disseny i motivacions i analitzem els conjunts de dades per entendre les seves propietats resultants. Numerosos intents d'èxit utilitzen grans corpores monolingües per augmentar parelles de baixos recursos. Intentem abordar el augment de manera diferent i investigar si és possible millorar els models MT sense cap font externa de dades. Això ho aconsegueixem arrancant frases paralleles existents i complementant-ho amb entrenament multilingüe per aconseguir línies de base fortes.", 'bs': 'Prevedenje mašine niskih resursa nedavno je dobilo mnogo popularnosti, a za određene jezike, to je napravilo velike napore. Međutim, još uvijek je teško pratiti napredak na drugim jezicima za koje nema javno dostupnih podataka o procjeni. U ovom papiru predstavljamo bazne podatke za arapske i dijalekte. Opišemo naš proces dizajna i motivacije i analiziramo podatke kako bi razumjeli njihove rezultate. Brojni uspješni pokušaji koriste veliku monojezičku korporaciju za povećanje par niskih resursa. Pokušavamo drugačije pristupiti povećanju i istražiti je li moguće poboljšati modele MT bez bilo kojih vanjskih izvora podataka. To ćemo postići čišćenjem postojećih paralelnih rečenica i dodatnom ovom multijezičkom obuku kako bi postigli jake osnovne linije.', 'et': 'Madala ressursiga masintõlge sai hiljuti palju populaarsust ja teatud keelte puhul on see teinud suuri edusamme. Siiski on endiselt raske jälgida edusamme teistes keeltes, mille kohta puuduvad avalikult kättesaadavad hindamisandmed. Käesolevas töös tutvustame araabia ja selle dialektide võrdlusandmekogumeid. Kirjeldame oma projekteerimisprotsessi ja motivatsioone ning analüüsime andmekogumeid, et mõista nende omadusi. Paljud edukad katsed kasutavad suuri ühekeelseid korpuseid madala ressursiga paaride suurendamiseks. Püüame laiendamist erinevalt käsitleda ja uurida, kas MT mudeleid on võimalik täiustada ilma väliste andmeallikateta. Me saavutame selle olemasolevate paralleelsete lausete bootstrapping ja täiendame seda mitmekeelse koolitusega, et saavutada tugevad lähtejooned.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս ցածր ռեսուրսների մեքենայի թարգմանությունը շատ հայտնի դարձավ, և որոշ լեզուների համար դա մեծ առաջընթաց է արել: However, it is still difficult to track progress in other languages for which there is no publicly available evaluation data.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք արաբերենի և նրա դիալեկտների համեմատական տվյալների համակարգեր: Մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր դիզայնի գործընթացը և մոտիվացիաները և վերլուծում ենք տվյալների համակարգերը, որպեսզի հասկանանք դրանց արդյունքում գտնվող հատկությունները: Numerous successful attempts use large monolingual corpora to augment low-resource pairs.  Մենք փորձում ենք տարբեր կերպ մոտենալ աճը և ուսումնասիրել, արդյոք հնարավոր է բարելավել MT մոդելները առանց որևէ արտաքին տվյալների աղբյուր: Մենք դա իրականացնում ենք գոյություն ունեցող զուգահեռ նախադասությունների սահմանափակումների միջոցով և դրան բազմալեզու ուսուցման միջոցով, որպեսզի հասնենք ուժեղ հիմնական գծեր:', 'cs': 'Strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji nedávno získal velkou popularitu a v některých jazycích udělal velký pokrok. Je však stále obtížné sledovat pokrok v jiných jazycích, pro které nejsou veřejně dostupné hodnotící údaje. V tomto článku představujeme referenční datové sady pro arabštinu a její dialekty. Popisujeme náš proces návrhu a motivace a analyzujeme datové sady, abychom porozuměli jejich výsledným vlastnostem. Četné úspěšné pokusy používají velké jednojjazyčné korpusy k rozšíření párů s nízkými zdroji. Snažíme se přistupovat k augmentaci jinak a zkoumat, zda je možné zlepšit MT modely bez externích zdrojů dat. Toho dosahujeme bootstrapping existující paralelní věty a doplníme to vícejazyčným školením, abychom dosáhli silných základních linií.', 'fi': 'Vähävaraiset konekäännökset ovat viime aikoina saaneet paljon suosiota, ja tietyillä kielillä se on edistynyt huomattavasti. On kuitenkin edelleen vaikeaa seurata edistymistä muilla kielillä, joista ei ole julkisesti saatavilla arviointitietoja. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme vertailuaineistoja arabialle ja sen murteille. Kuvaamme suunnitteluprosessiamme ja motivaatioitamme sekä analysoimme aineistoja ymmärtääksemme niiden tuloksena syntyvät ominaisuudet. Lukuisat onnistuneet yritykset käyttävät suuria yksikielisiä korpusia lisäämään vähävaraisia pareja. Pyrimme lähestymään augmentaatiota eri tavalla ja selvittämään, onko MT-malleja mahdollista parantaa ilman ulkoisia tietolähteitä. Saamme tämän aikaan käynnistämällä olemassa olevat rinnakkaiset lauseet ja täydentämällä sitä monikielisellä koulutuksella saavuttaaksemme vahvat lähtökohdat.', 'jv': 'Global Nanging, njuk tenan sak susah kanggo tukang ing langkung liyane sing ora ono data nggawe Nanging papat iki, kita nganggep nggambar bench-dataset kanggo dialects-arab iki dadi. Awak dhéwé ngerwih perusahaan design lan ambekan sampek karo dadi sampek kanggo ngerasai perusahaan sing dikarepaké Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé ngejaraké sistem anyar-sistem lan pangusikno kaya ngono iso nggawe model MT lan sampeyan kuwi susahe data kedhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe lan saiki nggawe winih kanggo ngilanggar sapa-winih sing entuk perusahaan lan tambah kuwi nggawe lan tambah kuwi tindakan multilanggar kanggo ngerasah basa sing luwih apik.', 'sk': 'Strojni prevod z nizkimi viri je nedavno pridobil veliko priljubljenosti in za nekatere jezike je naredil velik korak. Vendar je še vedno težko spremljati napredek v drugih jezikih, za katere ni javno dostopnih ocenjevalnih podatkov. V prispevku predstavljamo referenčne nabore podatkov za arabščino in njegova narečja. Opisujemo naš proces oblikovanja in motivacije ter analiziramo nabore podatkov, da bi razumeli njihove nastale lastnosti. Številni uspešni poskusi uporabljajo velike enojezične korpuse za povečanje parov z nizkimi viri. Poskušamo pristopiti k povečanju drugače in raziskati, ali je mogoče izboljšati modele MT brez zunanjih virov podatkov. To dosežemo z zagonom obstoječih vzporednih stavkov in to dopolnjujemo z večjezičnim usposabljanjem za doseganje močnih osnovnih linij.', 'ha': "Tafsiri na Kifistan Maƙasanci na farkon ya ƙari domin umati mai yawa, kuma sabõda wasu harshe, it has made huge strides. However, it is still difficult to track progress in other languages for which there is no publicly available evaluation data.  Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara bayanin bangon littafa na Larabci da taƙaitorinsa. Munã bayyana aikin design da shirin da ke ƙayyade, kuma Muke anaƙayyade tsarin da za'a fahimta properties na fassararsu. Akwai jarrabo mãsu yawa sun yi amfani da makampuni mai girma na monoli zuwa ƙara nau'in-resource. Munã jarraba ka sami surõdin a rarraba daban, kuma munã ƙidãya, ko za'a iya amfani da misalin MT ko kuma babu wani kiluna na ƙari na data. Tuna cika wannan da ko da za'a samun da cire masu daidaita da shi kuma mu cika wannan da ke da wa'adin mulki-harshe dõmin su sami danne masu ƙarfi.", 'he': 'התרגום מכונת משאבים נמוכים קיבל לאחרונה הרבה פופולריות, ובשביל שפות מסוימות, הוא עשה צעדים גדולים. עם זאת, עדיין קשה לעקוב אחר התקדמות בשפות אחרות שאין להם נתונים עריכה זמינים לציבור. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים קופסאות נתונים רמזים עבור ערבית והדיאלקטים שלה. אנחנו מתארים את תהליך העיצוב שלנו ומוטיבציות ונבחן את קבוצת הנתונים כדי להבין את תכונותיהם הנוצאות. ניסיונות רבים מצליחים להשתמש בגופה מונושפתית גדולה כדי לגדל זוגות משאבים נמוכים. אנחנו מנסים להתקרב לגמילה בצורה שונה ולחקור אם אפשרי לשפר מודלים MT ללא מקורות חיצוניים של נתונים. אנחנו מצליחים להשיג את זה על ידי שינוי משפטים מקבילים קיימים ומלאים את זה באימונים רבות שפותיים כדי להשיג קווי בסיס חזקים.', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་དངོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་མིང་ལག་གི་སྐད་བསྒྱུར་མཁན་ཉེ་ཆར་ངོ་མ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཡོད། སྐད་རིགས་ཁྱད་པར་ན ཡིན་ནའང་སྐད་རིགས་གཞན་ནང་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་ལྟ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པར་труднི་ རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཨ་རབ་དང་འདིའི་dialects་ལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་རྒུལ་སྒྲིག་དང་གནད་ཆོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་བའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་མེད་པར་གཞན་དང་མི་མཐུན་བརྟན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་འདོད་པ་ལས་བརྟན་ཞིབ་དག་ཚད་ ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་གཞུང་དང་སྐད་ཆ་རྩིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་འདི་ལྟ་སྟངས་བསྒྲགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Understanding Translationese in Multi-view Embedding Spaces', 'ar': 'فهم Translationese في مساحات التضمين متعددة العرض', 'es': 'Comprensión de la traducción en espacios de incrustación multivista', 'pt': 'Entendendo a tradução em espaços de incorporação de várias visualizações', 'fr': "Comprendre le traducteur dans les espaces d'intégration multi-vues", 'ja': 'マルチビュー埋め込みスペースでの翻訳の理解', 'hi': 'बहु-दृश्य एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान में अनुवादी को समझना', 'zh': '知多视图嵌空译', 'ru': 'Понимание переводческого языка в многопроекционных пространствах встраивания', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán a thuiscint i Spásanna Leabaithe Ilamhairc', 'ka': 'მრავალური ხელსაწყოთა სივრცეების განსხვავება', 'el': 'Κατανόηση Μεταφράσεων σε χώρους ενσωμάτωσης πολλαπλών προβολών', 'hu': 'A fordítás megértése többnézetes beágyazási területekben', 'it': 'Comprendere la traduzione in spazi integrati multi-vista', 'kk': 'Көп- көрініс ендіру орындарында аудармасын түсіну', 'mk': 'Разбирање на преведувањеName', 'ms': 'Understanding Translationese in Multi-view Embedding Spaces', 'ml': 'Multi- view എംബെഡിങ്ങ് സ്പെയിനുകളില്\u200d പരിഭാഷകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Олон харагдах орон зайд орчуулах', 'no': 'Forståande omsetjing i innbygd mellomrom for fleire visingar', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie tłumaczenia w przestrzeniach osadzania wielu widoków', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea traducerii în spații de încorporare multivizualizare', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය සම්බන්ධ ස්ථානයේ භාවිතය තේරුම්ගන්න', 'sr': 'Razumevanje prevoda u višepoglednim prostorijama', 'lt': 'Supranti vertimus daugiapžiūrinėse įterptose erdvėse', 'sv': 'Förstå översättare i inbäddade områden med flera vyer', 'so': 'Waxgarashada turjumista', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tat-Traduzzjoniż fi Spazji Integrati Multiviżwali', 'ta': 'பல- காட்சி இடைவெளிகளில் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'Multi view Embedding Spaces میں ترجمہ کا سمجھنا', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Hiểu được độ dịch trong các hộp đa ảnh', 'bg': 'Разбиране на превода в вграждащи пространства с множество изгледи', 'nl': 'Inzicht in Translationese in Multi-view Embedding Spaces', 'id': 'Memahami Terjemahan dalam Ruang Embedding Multi-view', 'da': 'Forståelse af oversættelse i indlejring af rum i flere visninger', 'de': 'Verstehen von Übersetzungen in Multi-View Einbettungsräumen', 'fa': 'درک ترجمه در جایگاههای وارد کردن چندین نمایش', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje prevoda u višepoglednim prostorijama', 'ko': '다중 보기 삽입 공간에서의 평이 이해', 'sw': 'Kuelewa Tafsiri ya Tafsiri katika maeneo mengi yanayoendelea', 'tr': 'Çoklu-görnöş içine terjime alýan', 'am': 'translation in Multi view Embedding Space', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i Translacionit në hapësirat e përfshirjes me shumë pamje', 'hy': 'Understanding Translationese in Multi-view Embedding Spaces', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje prevoda u višepoglednim prostorijama', 'af': 'Verstaan Vertaling in veelvuldige- aansig Inbeter Spasies', 'ca': 'Entendre els traductors en espais incorporats multivistes', 'cs': 'Porozumění překladům v prostorách pro vkládání více pohledů', 'az': 'Ă‡oxlu GĂ¶rĂĽnĂĽĹź Ä°Ă§eri BoĹźluqlarÄ±nda TÉ™rcĂĽmÉ™ anlamaq', 'et': 'Tõlkimise mõistmine mitme vaate põimimisruumides', 'fi': 'Understanding Translationese in Multi-view Embedding Spaces', 'bn': 'Multi- view Embedding স্পেসে অনুবাদ বুঝতে পারে', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'sk': 'Razumevanje prevajanja v prostorih za vdelavo več pogledov', 'ha': '@ label', 'he': 'להבין תרגומות בחלל מעורבים מרובים', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་བོའི་ཀློག་སྟངས་ལ་མཚུངས་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་ནང་གི་ཡིག་སྐད་འདིའི་རྟོགས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Recent studies use a combination of lexical and syntactic features to show that footprints of the source language remain visible in translations, to the extent that it is possible to predict the original source language from the translation. In this paper, we focus on embedding-based semantic spaces, exploiting departures from isomorphism between spaces built from original target language and translations into this target language to predict relations between languages in an unsupervised way. We use different views of the data   words, parts of speech, semantic tags and synsets   to track translationese. Our analysis shows that (i) semantic distances between original target language and translations into this target language can be detected using the notion of isomorphism, (ii) language family ties with characteristics similar to linguistically motivated phylogenetic trees can be inferred from the distances and (iii) with delexicalised embeddings exhibiting source-language interference most significantly, other levels of abstraction display the same tendency, indicating the lexicalised results to be not just due to possible topic differences between original and translated texts. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time departures from isomorphism between embedding spaces are used to track translationese.', 'ar': 'تستخدم الدراسات الحديثة مجموعة من السمات المعجمية والنحوية لإظهار أن آثار أقدام اللغة المصدر تظل مرئية في الترجمات ، إلى الحد الذي يمكن فيه التنبؤ بلغة المصدر الأصلية من الترجمة. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على المساحات الدلالية القائمة على التضمين ، واستغلال الانحرافات عن التماثل بين المساحات المبنية من اللغة الهدف الأصلية والترجمات إلى هذه اللغة الهدف للتنبؤ بالعلاقات بين اللغات بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة. نحن نستخدم طرق عرض مختلفة للبيانات - الكلمات وأجزاء الكلام والعلامات الدلالية والمزامنة - لتتبع الترجمة. يُظهر تحليلنا أنه (1) يمكن اكتشاف المسافات الدلالية بين اللغة الهدف الأصلية والترجمات إلى هذه اللغة الهدف باستخدام مفهوم التماثل ، (2) يمكن الاستدلال على الروابط الأسرية اللغوية ذات الخصائص المشابهة لأشجار النشوء والتطور ذات الدوافع اللغوية من المسافات و ( ج) مع التضمينات غير المعزولة التي تظهر تداخلًا في لغة المصدر بشكل أكثر أهمية ، تظهر المستويات الأخرى من التجريد نفس الاتجاه ، مما يشير إلى أن النتائج المعجمية ليست "عادلة" بسبب اختلافات الموضوع المحتملة بين النصوص الأصلية والمترجمة. على حد علمنا ، هذه هي المرة الأولى التي تُستخدم فيها عمليات الخروج عن التماثل بين مسافات التضمين لتتبع translationese.', 'fr': "Des études récentes utilisent une combinaison de caractéristiques lexicales et syntaxiques pour montrer que les empreintes de la langue source restent visibles dans les traductions, dans la mesure où il est possible de prédire la langue source d'origine à partir de la traduction. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur les espaces sémantiques basés sur l'intégration, en exploitant les écarts par rapport à l'isomorphisme entre les espaces construits à partir de la langue cible originale et les traductions dans cette langue cible afin de prédire les relations entre les langues de manière non supervisée. Nous utilisons différentes vues des données — mots, parties du discours, balises sémantiques et synsets — pour suivre le traducteur. Notre analyse montre que (i) les distances sémantiques entre la langue cible originale et les traductions dans cette langue cible peuvent être détectées à l'aide de la notion d'isomorphisme, (ii) des liens familiaux linguistiques présentant des caractéristiques similaires aux arbres phylogénétiques motivés par la langue peuvent être déduits à partir des distances et ( iii) avec des intégrations délexicalisées présentant une interférence de la langue source la plus significative, les autres niveaux d'abstraction présentent la même tendance, indiquant que les résultats lexicalisés ne sont pas «\xa0justes\xa0» en raison des différences de sujet possibles entre les textes originaux et traduits. À notre connaissance, c'est la première fois que des écarts par rapport à l'isomorphisme entre les espaces d'intégration sont utilisés pour suivre la traduction.", 'es': 'Estudios recientes utilizan una combinación de características léxicas y sintácticas para demostrar que las huellas del idioma de origen permanecen visibles en las traducciones, en la medida en que es posible predecir el idioma de origen original a partir de la traducción. En este artículo, nos centramos en los espacios semánticos basados en la incrustación, aprovechando las desviaciones del isomorfismo entre los espacios construidos a partir del idioma de destino original y las traducciones a este idioma de destino para predecir las relaciones entre idiomas de forma no supervisada. Utilizamos diferentes vistas de los datos (palabras, partes del discurso, etiquetas semánticas y synsets) para realizar un seguimiento de las traducciones. Nuestro análisis muestra que (i) las distancias semánticas entre el idioma de destino original y las traducciones a este idioma de destino se pueden detectar utilizando la noción de isomorfismo, (ii) los lazos familiares lingüísticos con características similares a los árboles filogenéticos de motivación lingüística se pueden inferir de las distancias y ( iii) con incrustaciones delicadas que exhiben una interferencia del idioma fuente de manera más significativa, otros niveles de abstracción muestran la misma tendencia, lo que indica que los resultados lexicalizados no son «justos» debido a posibles diferencias de tema entre los textos originales y traducidos. Hasta donde sabemos, esta es la primera vez que se utilizan las desviaciones del isomorfismo entre los espacios de incrustación para rastrear las traducciones.', 'pt': 'Estudos recentes usam uma combinação de recursos lexicais e sintáticos para mostrar que as pegadas do idioma de origem permanecem visíveis nas traduções, na medida em que é possível prever o idioma de origem original a partir da tradução. Neste artigo, focamos em espaços semânticos baseados em incorporação, explorando desvios do isomorfismo entre espaços construídos a partir da língua-alvo original e traduções para esta língua-alvo para prever relações entre línguas de forma não supervisionada. Usamos diferentes visualizações dos dados – palavras, partes do discurso, tags semânticas e synsets – para rastrear traduções. Nossa análise mostra que (i) as distâncias semânticas entre a língua-alvo original e as traduções para esta língua-alvo podem ser detectadas usando a noção de isomorfismo, (ii) os laços da família da língua com características semelhantes às árvores filogenéticas lingüisticamente motivadas podem ser inferidas a partir das distâncias e ( iii) com os embeddings deslexicalizados exibindo mais significativamente a interferência do idioma de origem, outros níveis de abstração apresentam a mesma tendência, indicando que os resultados lexicalizados não são “apenas” devido a possíveis diferenças de tópicos entre textos originais e traduzidos. Até onde sabemos, esta é a primeira vez que desvios de isomorfismo entre espaços de incorporação são usados para rastrear translações.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、語彙的特徴と構文的特徴の組み合わせを使用して、翻訳から元のソース言語を予測できる範囲で、ソース言語のフットプリントが翻訳で表示されたままであることを示しています。 本稿では、埋め込みベースの意味空間に焦点を当て、元のターゲット言語から構築された空間とこのターゲット言語への翻訳との間のアイソモーフィズムからの逸脱を利用して、監視されていない方法で言語間の関係を予測する。 翻訳のトラッキングには、言葉、発話の一部、セマンティックタグ、シンセットなど、さまざまなビューを使用します。 私たちの分析は、（ ｉ ）元のターゲット言語とこのターゲット言語への翻訳との間の意味的距離が、アイソモーフィズムの概念を使用して検出され得ること、（ ｉ ｉ ）言語的に動機づけられた系統樹に類似した特徴を有する言語ファミリーの結びつきが、距離から推測され得ること、及び（ ｉｉｉ ）ソース言語干渉を最も顕著に示す脱複雑化された埋め込みで、他のレベルの抽象化が同じ傾向を示し、元のテキストと翻訳されたテキストとの間のトピックの差異の可能性に起因して、語彙化された結果が「単なる」ものではないことを示すことを示すことを示す。 私たちの知る限りでは、埋め込みスペース間のアイソモーフィズムからの逸脱が翻訳を追跡するために使用されるのはこれが初めてです。', 'zh': '近者研用词汇句法特征之组,以明其迹于译者犹可见,至可以占原始源语。 其在本文,专注嵌语义空间,因其原始语言构造之间,与翻译成相应之同构,以无监督之方占言语之际。 各用其数视图(单词、词性、语义标同义词集)以蹑译者。 吾之分析表明,(i)原始目标言语与翻译成此言之间语义可以检同构,(ii)言语之家,与类于言语动机者,远而推之,(iii)以椭圆化者最显其源,其他抽象层次同势。  明本与译异,词汇化非至公也。 以吾所知,此嵌空间同构偏离初用蹑译也。', 'hi': 'हाल के अध्ययनों में यह दिखाने के लिए लेक्सिकल और वाक्यात्मक विशेषताओं के संयोजन का उपयोग किया गया है कि स्रोत भाषा के पैरों के निशान अनुवाद में दिखाई देते हैं, इस हद तक कि अनुवाद से मूल स्रोत भाषा की भविष्यवाणी करना संभव है। इस पेपर में, हम एम्बेडिंग-आधारित शब्दार्थ रिक्त स्थान पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, मूल लक्ष्य भाषा से निर्मित रिक्त स्थान और इस लक्ष्य भाषा में अनुवाद के बीच आइसोमोर्फिज्म से प्रस्थान का शोषण करते हैं ताकि भाषाओं के बीच संबंधों की भविष्यवाणी की जा सके। हम डेटा के विभिन्न विचारों का उपयोग करते हैं - शब्द, भाषण के कुछ हिस्सों, शब्दार्थ टैग और सिंसेट - अनुवाद को ट्रैक करने के लिए। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि (i) इस लक्ष्य भाषा में मूल लक्ष्य भाषा और अनुवाद के बीच शब्दार्थ दूरी का पता लगाया जा सकता है आइसोमोर्फिज्म की धारणा का उपयोग करके, (ii) भाषाई रूप से प्रेरित फाइलोजेनेटिक पेड़ों के समान विशेषताओं के साथ भाषा परिवार के संबंधों को दूरियों से अनुमान लगाया जा सकता है और (iii) स्रोत-भाषा हस्तक्षेप को प्रदर्शित करने वाले delexicalized एम्बेडिंग के साथ सबसे महत्वपूर्ण रूप से, अमूर्तता के अन्य स्तर एक ही प्रवृत्ति को प्रदर्शित करते हैं,  मूल और अनुवादित ग्रंथों के बीच संभावित विषय अंतर के कारण "बस" नहीं होने के लिए शाब्दिक परिणामों को इंगित करता है। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह पहली बार है जब एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान के बीच आइसोमोर्फिज्म से प्रस्थान का उपयोग अनुवाद को ट्रैक करने के लिए किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования используют сочетание лексических и синтаксических особенностей, чтобы показать, что следы исходного языка остаются видимыми в переводах, в той степени, в которой можно предсказать исходный язык из перевода. В этой статье мы фокусируемся на встраивании семантических пространств, используя отступления от изоморфизма между пространствами, построенными из исходного целевого языка, и переводы на этот целевой язык для прогнозирования отношений между языками неконтролируемым образом. Мы используем разные представления данных — слова, части речи, семантические теги и синсеты - для отслеживания перевода. Наш анализ показывает, что (i) семантические расстояния между исходным целевым языком и переводами на этот целевой язык могут быть обнаружены с использованием понятия изоморфизма, (ii) языковые семейные связи с характеристиками, сходными с лингвистически мотивированными филогенетическими деревьями, могут быть выведены из расстояний и (iii) с делексикализованными вложениями, проявляющими наиболее существенное влияние на исходный язык, другие уровни абстракции демонстрируют ту же тенденцию, указывая на то, что лексикализованные результаты не являются «просто» из-за возможных тематических различий между оригинальными и переведенными текстами. Насколько нам известно, это первый раз, когда отклонения от изоморфизма между пространствами вложений используются для отслеживания перевода.', 'ga': 'Úsáideann staidéir le déanaí meascán de ghnéithe foclóireachta agus comhréire chun a thaispeáint go bhfanann lorg na teanga foinse le feiceáil sna haistriúcháin, chomh fada agus is féidir an bhunteanga ón aistriúchán a thuar. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar spásanna shéimeantacha bunaithe ar leabú, ag baint leasa as imeacht ón isemorphism idir spásanna a tógadh ón mbunsprioctheanga agus aistriúcháin go dtí an sprioctheanga seo chun caidreamh idir teangacha a thuar ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht. Bainimid úsáid as tuairimí éagsúla ar na sonraí — focail, codanna cainte, clibeanna shéimeantacha agus synsets — chun aistriúchán a rianú. Léiríonn ár n-anailís go (i) gur féidir achair shéimeantacha idir an bhun-sprioctheanga agus aistriúcháin go dtí an sprioctheanga seo a bhrath trí úsáid a bhaint as coincheap an isomorphism, (ii) gur féidir naisc teaghlaigh teanga le tréithe atá cosúil le crainn fhileigineacha atá spreagtha ó thaobh na teanga a thuiscint ó na hachair agus ( iii) nuair is suntasaí a léiríonn leabaithe díleicseála a léiríonn an trasnaíocht fhoinse-teanga, tá an claonadh céanna le sonrú i leibhéil eile astarraingthe, rud a thugann le fios nach bhfuil na torthaí foclóirithe “córach” mar gheall ar dhifríochtaí féideartha topaicí idir buntéacsanna agus téacsanna aistrithe. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é seo an chéad uair a n-úsáidtear imeacht ón isomorphism idir spásanna leabaithe chun aistriúchán a rianú.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες μελέτες χρησιμοποιούν συνδυασμό λεξικών και συντακτικών χαρακτηριστικών για να δείξουν ότι τα ίχνη της γλώσσας προέλευσης παραμένουν ορατά στις μεταφράσεις, στο βαθμό που είναι δυνατόν να προβλεφθεί η αρχική γλώσσα προέλευσης από τη μετάφραση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εστιάζουμε στην ενσωμάτωση σημασιολογικών χώρων, αξιοποιώντας τις αποκλίσεις από τον ισομορφισμό μεταξύ χώρων κατασκευασμένων από την αρχική γλώσσα-στόχο και μεταφράσεων σε αυτή τη γλώσσα-στόχο για να προβλέψουμε τις σχέσεις μεταξύ γλωσσών χωρίς επίβλεψη. Χρησιμοποιούμε διαφορετικές απόψεις των δεδομένων που αφορούν λέξεις, τμήματα ομιλίας, σημασιολογικές ετικέτες και σύνσετ για την παρακολούθηση μεταφρασμένων. Η ανάλυση μας δείχνει ότι (i) σημασιολογικές αποστάσεις μεταξύ της αρχικής γλώσσας-στόχου και των μεταφράσεων σε αυτή τη γλώσσα-στόχο μπορούν να ανιχνευθούν χρησιμοποιώντας την έννοια του ισομορφισμού, (ii) οι γλωσσικοί οικογενειακοί δεσμοί με χαρακτηριστικά παρόμοια με τα γλωσσικά παρακινούμενα φυλλογεννητικά δέντρα μπορούν να συναχθούν από τις αποστάσεις και (iii) με αποσπασματικές ενσωματώσεις που παρουσιάζουν κυρίως παρεμβολές στη γλώσσα προέλευσης, άλλα επίπεδα αφαίρεσης παρουσιάζουν την ίδια τάση, υποδεικνύοντας ότι τα λεξιλογικά αποτελέσματα δεν είναι "μόνο" λόγω πιθανών θεματικών διαφορών μεταξύ πρωτότυπων και μεταφρασμένων κειμένων. Από όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτή είναι η πρώτη φορά που χρησιμοποιούνται αποκλίσεις από τον ισομορφισμό μεταξύ των ενσωματωμένων χώρων για την παρακολούθηση των μεταφρασιακών.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi tanulmányok lexikai és szintaktikai jellemzők kombinációját használják annak bizonyítására, hogy a forrásnyelv lábnyoma a fordításokban is látható marad, amennyiben lehetséges az eredeti forrásnyelv előrejelzése a fordításból. Ebben a tanulmányban a szemantikai terek beágyazására összpontosítunk, kihasználva az izomorfizmustól való eltéréseket az eredeti célnyelvből épített terek és az erre a célnyelvre történő fordítások között, felügyelet nélküli módon előrejelzve a nyelvek közötti kapcsolatokat. Az adatok különböző nézeteit használjuk - szavakat, beszédrészeket, szemantikai címkéket és szinkronkészleteket - a fordítás nyomon követéséhez. Elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy (i) az eredeti célnyelv és az erre a célnyelvre történő fordítások közötti szemantikai távolság az izomorfizmus fogalmával kimutatható, (ii) a nyelvi motivációs filogenetikai fákhoz hasonló jellemzőkkel rendelkező nyelvcsaládi kapcsolatok a távolságokból következtethetők le, és (iii) a delegexalizált beágyazások esetében, amelyek a legjelentősebb forrásnyelv-interferenciát mutatják, az absztrakció más szintjei ugyanazt a tendenciát mutatják, az eredeti és lefordított szövegek közötti lehetséges témakülönbségek miatt a lexikalizált eredmények nem csak "csak". Legjobb tudásunk szerint ez az első alkalom, hogy a beágyazott terek közötti izomorfizmustól eltérő téréseket használjuk a translatione nyomon követésére.', 'ka': "შემდეგ კვლევები ლექსიკალური და სინტაქტიური ფუნქციების კომბიზაციას გამოყენება, რომ საფეხური ენათის ფუნქციები ჩვენებულია, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია გადაწყვეტა, რომ საფეხურ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ კონუქტირებით სემონტიკური სივმანტიკური სივმანტიკური სივმანტიკური სივმანტიკური სივმანტიკური გამოყენებას, იზომოპორტიკური სივმანტიკური სივმანტიკური სივმართ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული მონაცემების ხედვა - სიტყვები, სიტყვების ნაწილი, სიმენტიკური ჭდები და სინქესტები - ტრანქლაციონიზის მონაცემს. ჩვენი ანალიზია, რომ i) სიმენტიკური განსხვავება ორიგინალური მიზეზი ენაში და ამ მიზეზი ენაში განსხვავება შეიძლება განსხვავება იზომოპორფიზმის შესახებ, (ii) ენის ოჯახი, რომელიც სიტყვებით მოტივირული ფილოგენეტიკური ხელებისთვის განსხვავებულია და (iii) დელექქსიკურად დაკავშირებულია, რომელიც ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია სიტყვების ინტერფერენციას, სხვა აბსტრაკურად განს შესაძლებელი ტექსტის განსხვავებების გამოსახულებლად ლექქსიკალიზებული შედეგი არა 'მხოლოდ' იყოს. ნაი-ეჲბპვრჲ ჲრ ნაქთრვ ჱნანთწ, რჲგა ვ ოყპგთწრ ოყრ, კჲირჲ თჱჲმჲპტთჱმა ჲრლთჱა ჲრ თჱჲმჲპტთჱმა მვზეს გყპჳსგაღთრვ მვჟრა, კჲთრჲ ჟვ ოჲლჱგა", 'it': 'Studi recenti utilizzano una combinazione di caratteristiche lessicali e sintattiche per dimostrare che le impronte della lingua di origine rimangono visibili nelle traduzioni, nella misura in cui è possibile prevedere la lingua originale dalla traduzione. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo sull\'embedding di spazi semantici basati sull\'isomorfismo tra spazi costruiti dalla lingua di destinazione originale e traduzioni in questa lingua di destinazione per prevedere le relazioni tra le lingue in modo non supervisionato. Usiamo diversi punti di vista dei dati - parole, parti del discorso, tag semantici e sintassi - per tracciare la traduzione. La nostra analisi mostra che (i) le distanze semantiche tra la lingua di destinazione originale e le traduzioni in questa lingua di destinazione possono essere rilevate utilizzando la nozione di isomorfismo, (ii) i legami familiari linguistici con caratteristiche simili agli alberi filogenetici motivati linguisticamente possono essere dedotti dalle distanze e (iii) con incorporazioni delessicalizzate che mostrano in modo più significativo interferenze linguistiche-lingua, altri livelli di astrazione mostrano la stessa tendenza; indicare che i risultati lessicalizzati non siano "solo" a causa di possibili differenze di argomento tra testi originali e tradotti. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questa è la prima volta che le deviazioni dall\'isomorfismo tra gli spazi incorporati vengono utilizzate per tracciare la traduzione.', 'kk': "Жуырдағы зерттеулері көзінің тілінің төменгі басып шығаруларын аудармалардан алдында көрсету үшін лексикалық және синтактикалық мүмкіндіктерді қолданып, аудармалардан бастапқы көзінің тілін алдын ала ала Бұл қағазда, сентикалық бос орындарды ендіру үшін, бастапқы тілден құрылған бос орындар арасындағы izomorphism орындарын жұмыс істеу үшін, тілдер арасындағы қатынастарды бақылау үшін осы мақсатты тіліне аудару үшін кө Біз деректердің түрлі көріністерін - сөздер, сөздердің бөлігін, семантикалық тегтерді және қадамдастыру- аудармалығын қадамдастыру үшін қолданамыз. Анализациямыз бұл мақсатты тіл мен аудармалардың арасындағы (i) семантикалық қашықтарын айналдыруға болады. ii) тіл үйлері лингвистикалық мотивациялық филогенетикалық ағаштарға ұқсас қасиеттерімен қатынасыз болады. iii) делексикализациялық ендіруді көзі тілдерінің интерфейсін көрсетеді. Басқа абстракциялық деңгейлері бірдей тенденциясы көрсетеді. Түпнұсқа және аударылған мәтіндер арасындағы айырмашылығының себебі лексикализацияланған нәтижелерді 'ғана' деп белгілеу. Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы жағдайда, бұл бірінші рет аудармаларды қадағалау үшін қолданылатын izomorphism орындарынан шығу.", 'lt': 'Neseniai atliktuose tyrimuose naudojamas tekstinių ir sintaktinių savybių derinys, siekiant įrodyti, kad vertimuose išlieka matomi šaltinio kalbos pėdsakai tiek, kiek įmanoma iš vertimo numatyti originalią šaltinio kalbą. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame įterpiamai semantinei erdvei, naudojant izomorfizmo skirtumus tarp vietovių, pastatytų iš pradinės tikslinės kalbos ir vertimų į šią tikslinę kalbą, kad būtų galima nekontroliuojamai prognozuoti kalbų santykius. Naudojame skirtingas duomenų - žodžių, kalbos dalių, semantinių žymenų ir sintezių - peržiūras vertimui sekti. Our analysis shows that (i) semantic distances between original target language and translations into this target language can be detected using the notion of isomorphism, ii) kalbų šeimos ryšiai su savybėmis, panašiomis į lingvistiškai motyvuotus filogeninius medžius, gali būti daromi iš atstumų, ir iii) su deleksilizuotais įterpimais, kurie labiausiai trukdo šaltinio kalbai, kiti abstrakcijos lygiai rodo tą pačią tendenciją, • nurodant, kad tekstų tekstai yra ne tik „tik“ dėl galimų teminių skirtumų tarp originalių ir vertimų tekstų. Mūsų žiniomis, tai pirmas kartas, kai vertimui sekti naudojami izomorfizmas tarp įdėjimo erdvių.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните студии користат комбинација на лексикални и синтактички карактеристики за да покажат дека отпечатоците на изворниот јазик остануваат видливи во преводите, во степен што е можно да се предвиди оригиналниот изворен јазик од преводот. Во овој весник, се фокусираме на вградувањето на семантичните простори, искористувајќи ги отстапувањата од изоморфизмот помеѓу просторите изградени од оригиналниот јазик на целта и преводите во овој јазик на целта за да предвидеме односи помеѓу јазиците на ненадгледуван начин. Користиме различни погледи на податоците - зборови, делови од говорот, семантични ознаки и синсети - за да ги следиме преводите. Нашата анализа покажува дека (i) семантичните растојанија помеѓу оригиналниот јазик на целта и преводите на овој јазик на целта може да се детектираат со користење на идејата за изморфизам, (ii) јазичните семејни врски со карактеристики слични на јазички мотивираните филогенетски дрвја може да се заклучат од далечините и (iii) со делексикализирани вградувања кои покажуваат најзначително влијание на изворниот јазик, другите нивоа на апстракција покажуваат иста тенденција, Индикација дека лексикализираните резултати не се „само“ поради можните темски разлики помеѓу оригиналните и преведените тексти. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time departures from isomorphism between embedding spaces are used to track translationese.', 'mn': 'Саяхан судалгаанууд эх үүсвэрийн хэлний хөлөг хэлний хэвлэлийг орчуулахын тулд анхны эх эх үүсвэрийн хэлний тодорхойлж чадах боломжтой хэмжээг ашигладаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид суурилсан семантик зай дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулж, анхны зорилготой хэлээс бүтээгдэхүүний орон зайнаас, хэл хоорондын харилцааны талаар тодорхойлж чаддаг. Бид өгөгдлийн олон үзэл, үг, ярианы хэсгийг, semantic тегтэй, синзеттэй ашигладаг. Бидний шинжилгээнд анхны зорилготой хэл болон энэ зорилготой хэл руу хөрвөлжүүлэх хоорондын i) семантик зай нь инзоморфизмын ойлголтыг ашиглан олж болно. ii) хэлний гэр бүлийн хэл хэлний урам зориулсан филогенетик модын харьцаатай харьцаатай холбоотой байдаг. iii) хэлний эх хэл холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Өөр хэлбоотой ухамсартын түвшинд ижил төвшин харуулдаг. Үүнийг анхны болон орчуулагдсан текст хоорондын ялгаа болох сэдвээс "зөвхөн" биш гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь, энэ бол анхны удаа Изоморфизм гэдэг орон зай хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбогдол юм.', 'no': 'Nyleg brukar ein kombinasjon av leksiske og syntaktiske funksjonar for å visa at fottskrifter av kjeldespråket blir synleg i omsetjingar, til stor grad at det er mogleg å foregå originalspråket frå omsetjinga. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på innbyggingsbaserte semantiske mellomrom, og eksploderer avslutningar frå isomorphismen mellom mellomrom bygd frå originale målspråk og omsetjingar til denne målspråket for å foregå forholdet mellom språk på ulike måte. Vi brukar ulike visingar av data - ord, deler av tale, semantiske taggar og synkronisering - for å spora translationisk. Analysen vårt viser at i) semantiske avstandar mellom originale målspråk og omsetjingar i denne målspråket kan oppdagast ved hjelp av isomorphismen, ii) språksfamilie med karakteristikk som er liknande til språksmotiverte filogenetiske trær kan bli forhindra frå avstandane og iii) med deleksiserte innbygging som viser kjeldespråksinterferens som er mest signifikant, andre nivåar av abstraksjon viser same tendens, @ info Dette er første gong avsluttar frå isomorfisme mellom innbyggingsmellomrom for å spora translationisk.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania wykorzystują kombinację cech leksykalnych i składniowych, aby wykazać, że ślady języka źródłowego pozostają widoczne w tłumaczeniach, w zakresie, w jakim możliwe jest przewidzenie oryginalnego języka źródłowego z tłumaczenia. W artykule skupiamy się na osadzeniu opartych na przestrzeniach semantycznych, wykorzystując odstępstwa od izomorfizmu między przestrzeniami zbudowanymi z oryginalnego języka docelowego a tłumaczeniami do tego języka docelowego w celu przewidywania relacji między językami w sposób bez nadzoru. Używamy różnych widoków danych słów, części mowy, znaczników semantycznych i zestawów syntezy do śledzenia tłumaczenia. Nasza analiza pokazuje, że (i) odległości semantyczne między oryginalnym językiem docelowym a tłumaczeniami na ten język docelowy można wykryć za pomocą pojęcia izomorfizmu, (ii) z odległości można wywnioskować więzi rodzinne języków o charakterystyce podobnej do językowo motywowanych drzew filogenetycznych i (iii) z deleksykalizowanymi osadzeniami wykazującymi najważniejsze zakłócenia języka źródłowego, inne poziomy abstrakcji wykazują tę samą tendencję, wskazując, że leksykalizowane wyniki nie są "tylko" ze względu na ewentualne różnice tematyczne między tekstem oryginalnym a tłumaczonym. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy, jest to pierwszy raz, gdy odstępstwa od izomorfizmu pomiędzy przestrzeniami osadzonymi są wykorzystywane do śledzenia tłumaczenia.', 'ms': 'kajian baru-baru ini menggunakan kombinasi ciri-ciri leksikal dan sintaktik untuk menunjukkan jejak kaki bahasa sumber tetap terlihat dalam terjemahan, sehingga ia mungkin untuk meramalkan bahasa sumber asal dari terjemahan. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus pada ruang semantik berasaskan-penyembedding, mengeksploitasi perbezaan dari isomorfisme antara ruang yang dibina dari bahasa sasaran asal dan terjemahan ke dalam bahasa sasaran ini untuk meramalkan hubungan antara bahasa dengan cara yang tidak diawasi. Kami menggunakan pemandangan yang berbeza bagi data - perkataan, bahagian ucapan, tag semantik dan set sinkset - untuk mengesan terjemahan. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa (i) jarak semantik antara bahasa sasaran asal dan terjemahan ke bahasa sasaran ini boleh dikesan menggunakan idea isomorfisme, (ii) hubungan keluarga bahasa dengan ciri-ciri yang serupa dengan pokok filogenetik yang bermotifikasi bahasa boleh dicatat dari jarak dan (iii) dengan pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbagai pelbag @ info: whatsthis Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah pertama kalinya keluar dari isomorfisme antara ruang penyembedding digunakan untuk mengesan terjemahan.', 'mt': 'Recent studies use a combination of lexical and syntactic features to show that footprints of the source language remain visible in translations, to the extent that it is possible to predict the original source language from the translation.  F’dan id-dokument, aħna niffokaw fuq l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ spazji semantiċi bbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjoni, li jisfruttaw it-tluq mill-iżomorfiżmu bejn spazji mibnija mil-lingwa fil-mira oriġinali u t-traduzzjonijiet f’din il-lingwa fil-mira biex jipprevedu relazzjonijiet bejn il-lingwi b’mod mhux sorveljat. Aħna nużaw fehmiet differenti tad-dejta - kliem, partijiet tad-diskors, tikketti semantiċi u sinsetts - biex nirreġistraw it-traduzzjoni. L-analiżi tagħna turi li (i) id-distanzi semantiċi bejn il-lingwa fil-mira oriġinali u t-traduzzjonijiet f’din il-lingwa fil-mira jistgħu jiġu skoperti bl-użu tal-kunċett ta’ isomorfiżmu, (ii) ir-rabtiet tal-familja lingwistika b’karatteristiċi simili għal siġar filoġenetiku motivat lingwistikament jistgħu jiġu inferiti mid-distanzi u (iii) b’inkorporazzjonijiet delessikalizzati li juru l-aktar interferenza lingwistika tas-sors, livelli oħra ta’ astrazzjoni juru l-istess tendenza, • li jindikaw li r-riżultati lexikalizzati mhumiex “biss” minħabba differenzi tematiċi possibbli bejn it-testi oriġinali u tradotti. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, din hija l-ewwel darba li jitbiegħdu mill-iżomorfiżmu bejn l-ispazji ta’ inkorporazzjoni jintużaw biex jittraċċaw it-traduzzjonijiet.', 'ro': 'Studiile recente folosesc o combinație de caracteristici lexicale și sintactice pentru a arăta că urmele limbii sursă rămân vizibile în traduceri, în măsura în care este posibil să se prevadă limba sursă originală din traducere. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe încorporarea spațiilor semantice bazate pe încorporarea spațiilor, exploatând abaterile de la izomorfism între spațiile construite din limba țintă originală și traducerile în această limbă țintă pentru a prezice relațiile dintre limbi într-un mod nesupravegheat. Folosim diferite puncte de vedere ale datelor - cuvinte, părți ale vorbirii, etichete semantice și sintete - pentru a urmări traducerea. Analiza noastră arată că (i) distanțele semantice dintre limba țintă originală și traducerile în această limbă țintă pot fi detectate folosind noțiunea de izomorfism, (ii) legăturile familiale lingvistice cu caracteristici similare arborilor filogenetici motivați lingvistic pot fi deduse din distanțe și (iii) în cazul încorporărilor delexicalizate care prezintă cel mai semnificativ interferențe lingvistice, alte niveluri de abstracție prezintă aceeași tendință; indicând rezultatele lexicalizate să nu fie "doar" din cauza posibilelor diferențe de subiect între textele originale și traduse. Din câte știm, aceasta este prima dată când se utilizează abateri de la izomorfism între spațiile de încorporare pentru a urmări traducerea.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വിദ്യാഭാഷകള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്സിക്കലും സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്കും ഗുണഗണങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഉറവിട ഭാഷയുടെ കാല്\u200dപ്പിന്റുകള്\u200d ഭ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് സ്പെയിന്റിക് സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു, സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്പെയില്\u200d നിന്നും സ വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു- വാക്കുകള്\u200d, സംസാരം, സെമാന്റിക് ടാഗുകള്\u200d, സിനിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d, ട്രാന്\u200dഷന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു (i) യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷയും ഭാഷകളും ഈ ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയിലേക്കുള്ള ഭാഷകളും  (ii) ഭാഷ കുടുംബബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷക്കുടുംബത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷക്കുടുംബങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഭാഷക്കുടുംബങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഭാഷക്കുടുംബങ്ങള്\u200d @ info: whatsthis നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചത്തിലേക്ക്, ഇതാണ് ആദ്യത്തെ സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒക്കെമിസ്സില്\u200d നിന്നും പു', 'sr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje koristi kombinaciju leksičkih i sintaktičkih karakteristika kako bi pokazalo da otisci izvornog jezika ostaju vidljivi u prevodima, do te mjere da je moguće predvidjeti originalni jezik izvora iz prevoda. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na ugrađene semantičke prostore, iskorištavajući odlaze iz izomorfizma između prostora izgrađenih iz originalnog ciljnog jezika i prevoda na ovaj ciljni jezik kako bi predvidjeli odnose između jezika na neodređen način. Koristimo različite poglede podataka - reči, dijelovi govora, semantičke etikete i sinkronizacije - da pratimo translaciju. Naša analiza pokazuje da se i) semantičke udaljenosti između originalnog jezika i prevoda na ovaj ciljni jezik može otkriti koristeći pojam izomorfizma, ii) jezička porodica veza sa karakteristikama sličnim jezičkim motiviranim filogenetičkim drvećima može biti inficirana sa udaljenosti i iii) sa deleksikaliziranim ugrađenjima koji najznačajnije pokazuju interferenciju izvornog jezika, druge nivoe apstrakcije pokazuju istu tendenciju, ukazujući na leksikalizirane rezultate da ne budu "samo" zbog mogućih razlika teme između originalnih i prevedenih tekstova. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi put da se odlaze iz izomorfizma između uključenih prostora koriste za praćenje translacije.', 'so': "Waxbarashada ugu dambeeyay waxay isticmaalaan qalabka leksikal iyo syntactic si ay u muujiyaan in luqada asalka ah luqadoodu ay ku jiraan turjumaadda, si aad u suurtowdo in laga hor dhigo afka asalka ah ee turjumaadda. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa meelaha hoos u dhigta, goobaha isomorfiism ee kala duwan meelaha laga dhisay luqada asalka ah iyo tarjumaanka luqadan goalka ah si aan u sii sheegno xiriirka kala dhexeeya luuqadaha si aan la ilaalin. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa aragtida kala duwan ee macluumaadka - hadal, qeyb ka mid ah hadalka, alaabta semantika iyo sintada - si aan u trackno turjumista. Analyskayagu wuxuu muujin karaa in (i) meelaha kala duwan ee afka asalka ah iyo turjumaadda luqadan goalka ah lagu ogaan karo isticmaalka fikrada isomorfi, ㈡ xiriirka qoyska ee luqada ah oo isku mid ah geedaha afka leylogenetka ayaa laga dhibi karaa meelaha fog iyo (iii) meelaha lagu sameeyo oo ay si muhiim ah u muujiyaan iskudarka luuqada afka, heerarka kale oo ka tirsan ayaa ismuujiya isku qaab ah, marka lagu muujiyo resultiyada leksikaliska oo aan ahayn 'kaliya' sabab u ah kala duwanaanshaha warqadaha asalka ah iyo qoraalka la turjumay. Tani waa marka ugu horeysa oo ka soo baxa iskuulimada iyo goobaha ku dhex yaala waxaa loo isticmaalaa in lagu dabarayo turjubaan.", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂයේ පුද්ගලික පුද්ගලයක් පෙන්වන්න ලෙක්සිකල් සහ සංවේදනයේ සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂයේ ප මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ඉන්බින්ඩ් අධාරිත සෙමාන්තික ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා, ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා ඉදිරියට ඉලක්ක භාෂයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන ස්ථ අපි දත්තේ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරකාරය පාවිච්චි කරනවා - වචන, කතාවේ කොටස්, සෙමැන්ටික් ටැග් සහ සංවිධානය - වාර්ථාන අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මුලින් ලක්ෂණ භාෂාව සහ මේ ලක්ෂණ භාෂාවේ භාෂාවේ පරික්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් අයි (i) භාෂාව පවුලේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග භාෂාවික විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වගේ භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ දු @ info අපේ දන්න හොඳම දේවල්, මේක තමයි පළමුවෙනි පාරක් ඉන්නේ ඉන්න ස්ථානයක් අතර ඉන්නේ අයිසෝමාර්ගයෙන් පිටවෙන්න', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda studier använder en kombination av lexikala och syntaktiska funktioner för att visa att källspråkets fotspår förblir synliga i översättningar, i den utsträckning det är möjligt att förutsäga originalspråket från översättningen. I den här uppsatsen fokuserar vi på att bädda in semantiska rum, utnyttja avvikelser från isomorfism mellan rum byggda från originalspråk och översättningar till detta målspråk för att förutsäga relationer mellan språk på ett oövervakat sätt. Vi använder olika syn på data - ord, delar av tal, semantiska taggar och synuppsättningar - för att spåra translationeska. Vår analys visar att (i) semantiska avstånd mellan originalspråk och översättningar till detta målspråk kan detekteras med hjälp av begreppet isomorfism, ii) språkfamiljeband med egenskaper som liknar språkligt motiverade fylogenetiska träd kan härledas från avstånden och iii) med delexikaliserade inbäddningar som uppvisar störning av källspråket mest påtagligt visar andra abstraktionsnivåer samma tendens. ange att de lexikaliserade resultaten inte är "bara" på grund av eventuella ämnesskillnader mellan original- och översatta texter. Så vitt vi vet är detta första gången avvikelser från isomorfism mellan inbäddningsområden används för att spåra translationeska.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் மொழியின் அடிச்சுவடுகள் மொழியின் அடிச்சுவடுகள் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் தெரியும் என்பதை காட்டுவதற்கு, மூல மூலத்தின் மொழியை மொழிபெயர்ப் இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் உட்பொதிந்த அமைப்பு இடைவெளிகளை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம், மூலம் சேமிக்கப்படாத மொழியில் இருந்து உருவாக்கப்பட்ட இடைவெளிகளிலிருந்து  We use different views of the data - words, parts of speech, semantic tags and synsets - to track translationese.  நம்முடைய ஆய்வு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது, (i) உண்மையான இலக்கு மொழி மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளுக்கு இடையே இருக்கும் பாதிப்பு தூ (ii) மொழி குடும்பங்களுடன் மொழி குடும்பங்களுடன் மொழியின் குடும்பங்களுடன் மொழியின் குடும்பங்களுடன் மொழியின் குடும்பங்கள் தொலைவிலிருந்து போன்ற மொழிக்குறிப் @ info: whatsthis எங்கள் அறிவின் மிக சிறந்ததாக, இது முதல் முறையாக உள்ளிடப்பட்ட இடைவெளிகளிலிருந்து தனியோசியமாக வெளியேறும் போது மொழிப', 'ur': 'اچھے مطالعے لکسیکل اور سینٹکسیٹ ویٹیوں کی ترکیب کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ سورس زبان کی فوٹ پرینٹ ترجمہ میں دیکھ رہے ہیں، جس قدر ترجمہ سے اصلی سورس زبان کی پیش بینی کرنا ممکن ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اسمٹی سیمٹی جگہ پر تمرکز کیا ہے، اسمٹی جگہ کے درمیان ایزومورفیسم کے فائدہ اٹھانے والی جگہ کی جگہ سے بنائی گئی تھی اور اس موجود زبان کی ترجمہ کو اس موجود زبان کی طرف متوجہ کیا ہے کہ زبانوں کے درمیان را ہم ڈیٹا کے مختلف نظریں استعمال کرتے ہیں - کلمات، سخنرانی کے حصے، سیمانٹی ٹاگ اور سینسٹ - ٹرانسٹ ڈراس کرنے کے لئے۔ ہماری تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ (i) اصلی موجود زبان اور اس موجود زبان کی ترجمہ کے درمیان سیمنٹی فاصلہ آگاہ ہو سکتی ہے۔ (ii) زبان خاندان کے ساتھ زبان کے ذریعے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سید لکس کالیز نتیجے کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ "صرف" نہیں ہوں گے، صرف شائستہ ٹیسٹوں کے درمیان متفاوت کی وجہ سے۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے یہ پہلی بار ہے کہ انڈینگ جگہ کے درمیان انڈینگ جگہ کے درمیان انڈینگ جگہ سے جدا ہونے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'rganishlar to ʻgʻriladigan leksikal va syntactik xususiyatlarini birlashtirishdan foydalanadi. Manba tilning foydalanuvchilari tarjima tarjimalarida koʻrsatiladi. Bu qogʻozda, biz asosiy tildan quyidagi semantik boʻsh joylariga, asl tildan quyidagi boʻsh joylardan isomorfdagi joylardan foydalanamiz va tarjimalarning asl tildan quyidagi tarjima qiladigan tillarning o'zgarishlarini saqlab qolish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Analytikizni ko'rsatishimiz, asl tilning asl tili va tarjimalar orasidagi semantik uzoqlarimiz, bu shaxsiy tillarning fikrini ishlatish mumkin. ㈡ tillar oilasi qo'llanmalar, tillarda qo'llanmalar qo'shilgan phylogenetik daraxtlari orasidan foydalanishi mumkin va (iii) davomida deleksikatsiya bo'lgan chegaralarni juda muhimi ko'rsatish mumkin, boshqa darajalarni abstraction bir xil qo'l koʻrsatish mumkin, @ info: whatsthis Bizning eng eng yaxshi aniqligimizga, bu ajoyib boʻlgan joy orasidagi isomorfdan birinchi марта tarjima qilish uchun foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Các nghiên cứu gần đây sử dụng một hỗn hợp các tính năng ngôn ngữ văn bản và pháp thuật để cho thấy dấu chân của ngôn ngữ nguồn còn hiện hữu trong các bản dịch, trong mức có thể dự đoán ngôn ngữ gốc từ phiên bản. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc gắn kết các khoảng cách ngữ pháp dựa trên, khai thác các căn phòng biến đổi theo cách riêng từ ngôn ngữ đích gốc và dịch sang ngôn ngữ đích để dự đoán các mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ giữa các ngôn ngữ theo một cách không giám sát. Chúng tôi dùng các góc chữ, các chữ phát biểu, các thẻ ngữ pháp và các cấu trúc khác nhau để theo dõi phiên dịch. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy (i) khoảng cách ngữ pháp giữa ngôn ngữ đích gốc và bản dịch vào ngôn ngữ đích này có thể phát hiện bằng khái niệm "isomorphism", Sự kết hợp ngôn ngữ với các loài cây có tính năng tương tự với ngôn ngữ học có thể được sinh ra từ khoảng cách và (III) với sự tác nhân văn hóa có thể gây ảnh hưởng nhiều nhất đến ngôn ngữ nguyên bản, các mức khác của trừu tượng có xu hướng tương tự, ngụ ý rằng kết quả từ vựng không phải là\'chỉ\'do có thể khác nhau về chủ đề giữa các văn bản gốc và dịch. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất của chúng tôi, đây là lần đầu tiên những bước đi từ sự biến đổi nhân tạo giữa khoảng cách nội bộ được dùng để theo dõi dịch chuyển.', 'nl': "Recente studies maken gebruik van een combinatie van lexicale en syntactische kenmerken om aan te tonen dat voetafdrukken van de brontaal zichtbaar blijven in vertalingen, voor zover het mogelijk is om de oorspronkelijke brontaal uit de vertaling te voorspellen. In dit artikel richten we ons op het inbedden van op basis van semantische ruimten, waarbij afwijkingen van isomorfisme tussen ruimtes die zijn gebouwd uit originele doeltaal en vertalingen in deze doeltaal worden benut om relaties tussen talen op een onbeheerde manier te voorspellen. We gebruiken verschillende weergaven van de data met woorden, spraakdelen, semantische tags en synsets om translationees bij te houden. Onze analyse toont aan dat (i) semantische afstanden tussen oorspronkelijke doeltaal en vertalingen in deze doeltaal kunnen worden gedetecteerd met behulp van het begrip isomorfisme, (ii) uit de afstanden kunnen familiebanden met kenmerken worden afgeleid die vergelijkbaar zijn met linguïstisch gemotiveerde fylogenetische bomen en (iii) met gedeexicaliseerde inbeddingen die de brontaal interferentie het meest vertonen, vertonen andere abstractieniveaus dezelfde tendens; het aangeven van de lexicaliseerde resultaten niet 'alleen' vanwege mogelijke thematische verschillen tussen originele en vertaalde teksten. Voor zover wij weten, is dit de eerste keer dat afwijkingen van isomorfisme tussen insluitingsruimtes worden gebruikt om translationees te volgen.", 'bg': 'Последните проучвания използват комбинация от лексикални и синтактични характеристики, за да покажат, че отпечатъците на езика на изхода остават видими при преводите, доколкото е възможно да се предскаже оригиналният език на изхода от превода. В тази статия се фокусираме върху вграждането на базирани семантични пространства, използвайки отклоненията от изоморфизма между пространствата, изградени от оригиналния целев език и преводите на този целев език, за да предскажем отношенията между езиците по ненадзорен начин. Използваме различни възгледи на данните - думи, части от речта, семантични тагове и синсети - за проследяване на превода. Анализът ни показва, че (и) семантичните разстояния между оригиналния целев език и преводите на този целев език могат да бъдат открити, използвайки понятието за изоморфизъм, ii) езикови връзки със семейства с характеристики, подобни на лингвистично мотивираните филогенетични дървета, могат да се извлекат от разстоянията и iii) с делексикализирани вграждания, показващи най-значителна интерференция на изходния език, други нива на абстракция показват същата тенденция, посочва, че лексикализираните резултати не са "просто" поради възможни тематични различия между оригиналните и преведените текстове. Доколкото знаем, за първи път отклоненията от изоморфизма между вградените пространства се използват за проследяване на превода.', 'hr': 'U nedavnim ispitivanjima koriste kombinaciju leksičkih i sintaktičkih karakteristika kako bi pokazalo da otisci izvornog jezika ostaju vidljivi u prevodima, do te mjere moguće predvidjeti originalni jezik izvora iz prevoda. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na ugrađene semantičke prostore, iskorištavajući odlaze iz izomorfizma između prostora izgrađenih iz originalnog ciljnog jezika i prevoda na ovaj ciljni jezik kako bi predvidjeli odnose između jezika na neodređen način. Koristimo različite poglede podataka - riječi, dijelovi govora, semantičke etikete i sinkronizacije - kako bi pratili translationez. Naša analiza pokazuje da se i) semantičke udaljenosti između originalnog ciljnog jezika i prevoda na ovaj ciljni jezik može otkriti koristeći pojam izomorfizma, ii) jezičke obitelji veze s karakteristikama sličnim jezičkim motiviranim filogenetičkim drvećem mogu se uvaliti iz udaljenosti i iii) s deleksikaliziranim ugrađenjima koji najznačajnije pokazuju interferenciju izvornog jezika, druge razine apstrakcije pokazuju istu tendenciju, ukazujući na leksikalizirane rezultate da ne budu "samo" zbog mogućih razlika teme između originalnih i prevedenih tekstova. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi put odlazak iz izomorfizma između ugrađenih prostora korišteno za praćenje translacije.', 'da': 'Nylige undersøgelser bruger en kombination af leksikske og syntaktiske funktioner til at vise, at fodaftryk af kildesproget forbliver synlige i oversættelser, i det omfang det er muligt at forudsige det oprindelige kildesprog fra oversættelsen. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på indlejring af semantiske rum, hvor vi udnytter afvigelser fra isomorfisme mellem rum bygget ud fra originalt målsprog og oversættelser til dette målsprog til at forudsige relationer mellem sprog på en ukontrolleret måde. Vi bruger forskellige synspunkter på dataene - ord, dele af tale, semantiske tags og synsets - til at spore translationesk. Vores analyse viser, at (i) semantiske afstande mellem originalsproget og oversættelser til dette målsprog kan detekteres ved hjælp af begrebet isomorfisme, (ii) sprogfamiliebånd med karakteristika, der ligner sprogligt motiverede fylogenetiske træer, kan udledes af afstandene, og (iii) med deleksiske indlejringer, der udviser kildesprogets interferens mest betydeligt, viser andre abstraktionsniveauer samme tendens angivelse af, at de leksikaliserede resultater ikke skal være "kun" på grund af mulige emneforskelle mellem originale og oversatte tekster. Så vidt vi ved, er dette første gang afvigelser fra isomorfisme mellem indlejringsrum bruges til at spore translationesk.', 'de': 'Jüngste Studien verwenden eine Kombination von lexikalischen und syntaktischen Merkmalen, um zu zeigen, dass Fußabdrücke der Ausgangssprache in Übersetzungen sichtbar bleiben, soweit es möglich ist, die ursprüngliche Ausgangssprache aus der Übersetzung vorherzusagen. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf die Einbettung von semantischen Räumen, wobei Abweichungen vom Isomorphismus zwischen Räumen aus der ursprünglichen Zielsprache und Übersetzungen in diese Zielsprache ausgenutzt werden, um Beziehungen zwischen Sprachen auf unbeaufsichtigte Weise vorherzusagen. Wir verwenden verschiedene Ansichten der Daten mit Wörtern, Sprachteilen, semantischen Tags und Synsets um translationese zu verfolgen. Unsere Analyse zeigt, dass (i) semantische Abstände zwischen der ursprünglichen Zielsprache und Übersetzungen in diese Zielsprache mit dem Begriff Isomorphismus detektiert werden können, (ii) Aus den Entfernungen lassen sich Sprachfamilienbeziehungen mit Merkmalen ableiten, die sprachlich motivierten phylogenetischen Bäumen ähnlich sind, und (iii) bei delexikalisierten Einbettungen, die quellsprachliche Interferenz aufweisen, zeigen andere Abstraktionsebenen die gleiche Tendenz, Angabe, dass die lexikalisierten Ergebnisse nicht "nur" aufgrund möglicher thematischer Unterschiede zwischen Originaltexten und übersetzten Texten sind. Nach bestem Wissen werden zum ersten Mal Abweichungen vom Isomorphismus zwischen Einbettungsräumen verwendet, um Translationese zu verfolgen.', 'id': "Studi-studi baru-baru ini menggunakan kombinasi dari ciri-ciri leksik dan sintaksi untuk menunjukkan bahwa jejak kaki bahasa sumber tetap terlihat dalam terjemahan, sehingga mungkin untuk memprediksi bahasa sumber asli dari terjemahan. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada ruang semantis berdasarkan embedding, mengeksploitasi penjelasan dari isomorfisme antara ruang dibangun dari bahasa sasaran asli dan terjemahan ke bahasa sasaran ini untuk memprediksi hubungan antara bahasa dengan cara yang tidak diawasi. Kami menggunakan pandangan yang berbeda dari data - kata, bagian dari pidato, tag semantis dan sinset - untuk melacak terjemahan. Our analysis shows that (i) semantic distances between original target language and translations into this target language can be detected using the notion of isomorphism, (ii) hubungan keluarga bahasa dengan karakteristik yang serupa dengan pohon filogenetik yang bermotivasi secara bahasa dapat diperkirakan dari jarak dan (iii) dengan pembangunan deleksialisasi yang menunjukkan gangguan bahasa sumber yang paling signifikan, tingkat abstraksi lainnya menunjukkan tendensi yang sama, Menunjukkan hasil leksikalisasi bukan 'hanya' karena kemungkinan perbedaan topik antara teks asli dan terjemahan. Menurut yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah pertama kalinya keluar dari isomorfisme antara ruang penerbangan digunakan untuk melacak terjemahan.", 'ko': "최근의 연구는 어휘와 문법 특징을 결합시켜 원시 언어의 발자취가 번역에서 여전히 볼 수 있기 때문에 번역에서 원시 원시 원시 언어를 예측할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 삽입된 의미 공간을 바탕으로 원시 목표 언어에서 구축된 공간과 이 목표 언어로 번역된 공간 간의 동구 차이를 이용하여 무감독의 방식으로 언어 간의 관계를 예측한다.우리는 서로 다른 데이터 보기인 단어, 어성, 의미 표기, 문법 집합을 사용하여 번역을 추적한다.우리의 분석에 의하면 (i) 원시 목표 언어와 이 목표 언어로 번역된 의미 거리는 같은 구조의 개념으로 측정할 수 있다.(ii) 거리에서 언어 동기와 유사한 시스템 발육 트리 특징을 가진 어계 관계를 추정할 수 있고 (iii)는 원시 언어의 간섭을 가장 현저하게 나타내는 탈서구화 삽입에 대해 다른 추상적인 차원에서 같은 추세를 보인다.원문과 번역문 사이에 주제 차이가 존재할 수 있기 때문에 어휘화 결과가'공정'이 아니라는 것을 나타낸다.공간 사이에 끼워 넣은 동구를 사용해 번역을 추적하는 것은 이번이 처음인 것으로 알려졌다.", 'sw': "Tafiti za hivi karibuni zinatumia muunganiko wa vipengele vya lexico na syntactic ili kuonyesha kuwa nyaraka za lugha ya msingi bado zinaonekana katika tafsiri, kwa kiwango ambacho inawezekana kutabiri lugha ya asili kutoka tafsiri. Katika karatasi hii, tunalenga kwenye maeneo ya sekondari yanayotumika, kwa kutumia idara ya kujitenga kwa isomorphism kati ya maeneo yaliyojengwa kutoka lugha ya asili ya lengo na tafsiri katika lugha hii ya lengo ili kutabiri uhusiano kati ya lugha hizi kwa njia isiyohifadhiwa. Tunatumia maoni tofauti ya taarifa - maneno, sehemu ya hotuba, alama za sekunde na syneti - ili kufuatilia watafsiri. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa (i) umbali wa sekunde kati ya lugha ya asili ya lengo na tafsiri katika lugha hii ya lengo linaweza kutambuliwa kwa kutumia dhana ya kujitenga, ㈡ uhusiano wa familia za lugha wenye sifa zinazofanana na miti yenye msemo wa lugha zinazohamasishwa kwa lugha zinaweza kuathirika kutoka mbali na (iii) na zile zinazoonyesha udhalilishaji wa lugha za asili kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi, kiwango kingine cha kujitenga kinaonyesha tendo hilo, ili kuonyesha matokeo yaliyotokana na lexico hayakuwa 'tu' kwa sababu ya tofauti zilizowezekana kati ya maandishi ya asili na yanayotafsiriwa. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, hii ni mara ya kwanza kuondoka kwa utambulisho kati ya maeneo yanatumiwa kufuatia watafsiri.", 'fa': 'مطالعات اخیرا از ترکیب ویژه\u200cهای زبان و سنتاکتیک استفاده می\u200cکنند تا نشان دهند که چاپ پاهای زبان منبع در ترجمه\u200cها مشاهده می\u200cشوند، تا حدی که ممکن است زبان منبع اصلی از ترجمه پیش بینی کنید. در این کاغذ، ما تمرکز می کنیم روی فضای semantic based on embedding, exploiting departures from isomorphism between spaces built from original target language and translations in to this target language to predict relations between languages in an unsupervised way. ما از دیدگاه های مختلف اطلاعات استفاده می کنیم - کلمات، بخشی از سخنرانی، نقاشی\u200cهای semantic و synsets - برای پیدا کردن ترجمه\u200cها. تحلیل ما نشان می دهد که فاصله\u200cهای semantic بین زبان هدف اصلی و ترجمه\u200cهای اصلی در این زبان هدف می\u200cتوانند با توجه ایزومورفیسم شناسایی شوند، (ii) خانواده\u200cی زبان با ویژگی\u200cهای شبیه به درختان فیلوژنتیکی که به زبان انگیزه می\u200cکنند می\u200cتوانند از فاصله\u200cها و (iii) با انگیزه\u200cهای دلیکسیکیزی\u200cسازی که نشان می\u200cدهند اضطراب زبان منبع بیشتر، سطح دیگری از انگیزه\u200cها همان نقطه را نشان می\u200cدهند، نشان دادن نتیجه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی که به خاطر تفاوت\u200cهای موضوع ممکن بین متن\u200cهای اصلی و ترجمه\u200cشده نیستند. برای بهترین دانش ما، این اولین بار از ایزومورفیسم بین فضای پیدا کردن استفاده می\u200cشود تا ترجمه را ردیابی کند.', 'af': "Onlangse studie gebruik 'n kombinasie van leksiese en sintaksiese funksies om te wys dat voetskrifte van die bron taal sigbaar bly in vertalings, tot die uitbreiding dat dit moontlik is om die oorspronklike bron taal van die vertaling te voorskou. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op inbêer-gebaseerde semantiese spasies, wat uitbreiding van isomorfisme tussen spasies gebou van oorspronklike doel taal en vertalings in hierdie doel taal om verhouding tussen tale te voorskou in 'n onversoekte manier. Ons gebruik verskillende aansigte van die data - woorde, dele van spraak, semantiese etikette en sinkronisasie - om translationese te snit. Ons analisie wys dat (i) semantiese afstand tussen oorspronklike doel taal en vertalings in hierdie doel taal kan ontdek word deur die noesie van isomorfisme, (ii) taal familie verbindings met karakteristieke wat gelykbaar is aan lingwisieslik motiveerde phylogeneetiese bome kan van die afstande en (iii) met deleksialiseerde inbêdings wat bron-taal interferensie mees betekeurig verwys, ander vlakke van abstraksie dieselfde tendensie vertoon word, @ title: window Op die beste van ons kennis is dit die eerste keer afwyk van isomorfisme tussen inbêde spasies gebruik word om translationese te volg.", 'tr': 'Ýakynda öňki aramalar, çeşme diliniň futbol çaplarynyň terjime edilen a ýdylyşyny çaklamak üçin bir leşik we sintaktik karakterlerden ullanýarlar. Bu kagyzda, semantik seleňleri daşary taýýarlanan seleňleri we özüniň maksadyň dilinden guruldygy izomorfizmden çykmak üçin bu maksadyň diline terjime edip durýarys. Biz maglumatyň farklı görnüşlerini ullanýarys - sözler, sözleriň parçalary, semantik tägleri we sintaklaryny terjime etmek üçin ullanýarys. Biziň analyzamyz görkezýär ki (i) semantik dil we şu maksady dilinde terjimeler arasynda izomorfizm düşünjegini ulanyp tapylýar. (ii) dil maşgalasy dil dilinden filogenetik agaçlara ýaly karakterlere golaýlaýar we (iii) çeşme dilinden golaýlaýan guramlar bilen golaýlaýar, be ýleki göçürmek derejesi şol ýagdaýda görkezilýär. = Bilgimiziň iň gowy bolsa, bu ilkinji gezek izomorfizmden çykmak üçin terjime etmek üçin ullanýar.', 'sq': 'Recent studies use a combination of lexical and syntactic features to show that footprints of the source language remain visible in translations, to the extent that it is possible to predict the original source language from the translation.  Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi në ndërtimin e hapësirave semantike, duke shfrytëzuar dallimet nga izomorfismi midis hapësirave të ndërtuara nga gjuha origjinale objektive dhe përkthimeve në këtë gjuhë objektive për të parashikuar marrëdhëniet midis gjuhëve në një mënyrë të pa mbikqyrur. Ne përdorim pamje të ndryshme të të dhënave - fjalë, pjesë të fjalimit, etiketa semantike dhe sinset - për të ndjekur përkthimin. Analiza jonë tregon se (i) distancat semantike midis gjuhës origjinale objektive dhe përkthimeve në këtë gjuhë objektive mund të zbulohen duke përdorur konceptin e izomorfizmit, (ii) lidhjet e familjes gjuhësore me karakteristika të ngjashme me pemët filogenetike të motivuara gjuhësore mund të përfundojnë nga distancat dhe (iii) me përfshirje të deleksializuara që ekspozojnë ndërhyrje në gjuhën burimore më të rëndësishme, nivele të tjerë abstrakcioni tregojnë të njëjtin prirje, Duke treguar se rezultatet e lexikalizuara nuk janë "vetëm" për shkak të dallimeve të mundshme tematike midis teksteve origjinale dhe të përkthyera. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, kjo është hera e parë që daljet nga izomorfismi midis hapësirave të përfshira përdoren për të gjurmuar përkthimin.', 'am': "የአሁኑ ትምህርት የደረጃ ቋንቋዎች እግር በትርጓሜዎች ውስጥ እንዲኖር በመግለጽ እንዲያሳያል፣ የመጀመሪያውን የኩነቶች ቋንቋን ከመተርጓሜ ለመቀበል የሚችል መሆኑን በመግለጽ ይቻላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን በማስታወቅ እና በተጠበቀው ቋንቋ እና ትርጓሜዎችን ከመካከለኛው ስፍራዎች መካከል ከisomorphism እና ወደዚህ ተርጓሚዎች ቋንቋ እና ቋንቋዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዳታ ዓይነት - ቃላት፣ የንግግር ክፍሎች፣ የsemantic tags እና Synsets - ትርጓሜዎችን ለመtrack እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ Analysያችን (i) የመጀመሪያው ደረጃ ቋንቋ እና ትርጓሜ ወደዚህ ተቃውሞ ቋንቋ ይታወቃል፡፡ ㈡ የቋንቋ ቤተሰብ ግንኙነት ከቋንቋው በተመሳሳይ የፊሎogenetic ዛፎች ከሩቅ እና (iii) በተለየ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ግንኙነት በሚያሳየው ግንኙነት በጣም ትልቅ ነው፣ ሌሎችም ደረጃዎች አካባቢ ይታያል፡፡  indicating the lexicalised results to be not 'just' due to possible topic differences between original and translated texts.  To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time departures from isomorphism between embedding spaces are used to track translationese.", 'hy': "Recent studies use a combination of lexical and syntactic features to show that footprints of the source language remain visible in translations, to the extent that it is possible to predict the original source language from the translation.  In this paper, we focus on embedding-based semantic spaces, exploiting departures from isomorphism between spaces built from original target language and translations into this target language to predict relations between languages in an unsupervised way.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք տվյալների տարբեր տեսանկյուններ՝ բառեր, խոսքի մասեր, սեմանտիկ թեգներ և սինսետներ թարգմանելու համար: Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ i) սեմանտիկ հեռավորությունները սկզբնական նպատակային լեզվի և այս նպատակային լեզվի թարգմանությունների միջև կարող են հայտնաբերվել օգտագործելով իսոմորֆիզմի գաղափարը, (i) լեզվային ընտանիքի կապերը լեզվական մոտիվացված ֆիլոգենետիկ ծառերի նման առանձնահատկությունների հետ կարող են հետևել հեռավորություններից, իսկ (i) դելեքսիկալիզացված ներդրումների հետ, որոնք ամենակարևորը ներխուժում են աղբյուր-լեզվով, այլ մակարդակները ցույց են տալիս նույն հակվածություն  indicating the lexicalised results to be not 'just' due to possible topic differences between original and translated texts.  Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից, սա առաջին անգամ է, երբ տեղադրված տարածքների միջև հեռացումները օգտագործվում են թարգմանման հետևելու համար:", 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি গবেষণা লেক্সিক্সিল এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে দেখানোর জন্য যে সোর্স ভাষার ফুটপ্রিন্ট অনুবাদে দৃশ্যমান থাকে, অনুবাদ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভিত্তিক সেমেন্টিক জায়গায় মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি, মূল লক্ষ্য ভাষা থেকে নির্মাণিত স্থান থেকে বিভাগ বিভাগ বিস্ফোরণ এবং এই লক্ষ্য ভাষায় অনুবাদ করা হয় We use different views of the data - words, parts of speech, semantic tags and synsets - to track translationese.  আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে (I) মূল লক্ষ্যের ভাষা এবং অনুবাদের মধ্যে সেমান্টিক দূরত্ব এই লক্ষ্য ভাষায় এই লক্ষ্য ভাষায় অনুবাদ (ii) ভাষার পরিবারের সাথে ভাষার পরিবারের সংশ্লিষ্ট পরিবারের যারা ভাষায় উৎস-ভাষার বিরুদ্ধে প্রচারিত ফিলিজোনেটিক গাছের মতো অনুরূপ আক্রান্ত হতে পারে এবং (আই) প্রতিনিধ নির্দেশ করা হচ্ছে যে লেক্সিকালীন ফলাফল শুধুমাত্র সম্ভাব্য বিষয়ের মধ্যে পার্থক্যের কারণে নয়। আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোর জন্য, এটাই প্রথম বার বিচ্ছিন্ন হয়েছে বিভিন্ন স্থানের মধ্যে অনুবাদ করার জন্য।', 'az': 'Son təhsil edilənlər, mənbə dilinin ayaq izləri tercümələrində görünmək üçün leksik və sintaktik xüsusiyyətlərin birləşdirilməsi üçün istifadə edirlər, tercümədən başlanğıc mənbə dilini təhsil etmək mümkün olduğu qədər. Bu kağızda, semantik məsafələr in şa edilməsi üçün, ilk məqsəd dilindən inşa edilmiş məsafələr arasından izomorfizm arasından ayrılmaları və bu məqsəd dilinə çevirilmək üçün dillərin arasındakı ilişkiləri təmin etmək üçün odaqlanırıq. Biz məlumatların müxtəlif görünüşünü - sözlərin, sözlərin parçalarını, semantik etiketlərin və sinnətlərin istifadə edirik. Bizim analizimiz göstərir ki, ilk məqsəd dili və bu məqsəd dilinə çevirilənlər arasındakı semantik uzaqlaşmalar isomorfizm fikrindən istifadə edilə bilər, ii) dil ailəsi dillərində filogenetik ağaclarına bənzər tərzlərinə sahib olar. Bu tərzlərin uzaqlaşılmasından və iii ilə deleksiksikalizirləndirilənlər mənbə dillərin interferensiyasını daha çox göstərir, digər tərzlərin abstraktiyası da eyni tərzlərinə göstərir. Özgür və çevirilmiş mətnlər arasında mümkün məsələlər fərqlənməsi üzündən "yalnız" olmadığını göstərir. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına gəldikdə, bu ilk dəfə ilk dəfə ilk dəfə ilk dəfə izomorfizm arasından istifadə edilir.', 'ca': "Recent studies use a combination of lexical and syntactic features to show that footprints of the source language remain visible in translations, to the extent that it is possible to predict the original source language from the translation.  En aquest article ens centrem en l'incorporació d'espais semàntics, explotant les diferències de l'isomorfisme entre espais construïts de llenguatge alvo original i traduccions a aquest llenguatge alvo per predir les relacions entre llenguatges d'una manera no supervisada. Utilitzem diferents vistes de les dades - paraules, parts de la fala, etiquetes semàntiques i sincronitzacions - per seguir la traducció. La nostra anàlisi mostra que (i) les distàncies semàntiques entre la llengua alvo original i les traduccions a aquesta llengua alvo es poden detectar fent servir la noció d'isomorfisme, ii) els vincles de família lingüística amb característiques similars als arbres filogenètics motivats lingüísticament es poden deduir des de les distàncies i iii) amb incorporacions desxitalitzades que mostren la interferència més significativa en el llenguatge fontal, altres nivells d'abstracció mostren la mateixa tendència,  indicating the lexicalised results to be not 'just' due to possible topic differences between original and translated texts.  To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time departures from isomorphism between embedding spaces are used to track translationese.", 'cs': 'Nedávné studie využívají kombinaci lexikálních a syntaktických prvků, aby ukázaly, že stopy zdrojového jazyka zůstávají viditelné v překladech, do té míry, do jaké je možné předpovědět původní zdrojový jazyk z překladu. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na vkládání sémantických prostorů založených na vložení, využívání odchylek od izomorfismu mezi prostory vytvořenými z původního cílového jazyka a překlady do tohoto cílového jazyka k predikci vztahů mezi jazyky bez dohledu. Pro sledování překladu používáme různé pohledy na data slov, části řeči, sémantické značky a synsety. Naše analýza ukazuje, že (i) sémantické vzdálenosti mezi původním cílovým jazykem a překladami do tohoto cílového jazyka lze detekovat pomocí pojmu izomorfismu, (ii) jazykové rodinné vazby s charakteristikami podobnými lingvisticky motivovaným fylogenetickým stromům lze odvodit z vzdálenosti a (iii) s delexikalizovanými vloženími vykazujícími nejvýznamnější interferenci zdrojového jazyka, ostatní úrovně abstrakce vykazují stejnou tendenci, uvádět, že lexikalizované výsledky nejsou "jen" kvůli možným tématickým rozdílům mezi původním a přeloženým textem. Podle našeho nejlepšího vědomí je to poprvé, kdy se odchylky od izomorfismu mezi vloženými prostory používají k sledování translační sítě.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset osoittavat, että lähdekielen jalanjäljet ovat edelleen näkyvissä käännöksissä, sikäli kuin alkuperäinen lähdekieli on mahdollista ennustaa käännöksestä. Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään upottamaan semanttisia avaruuksia hyödyntäen poikkeamia isomorfismista alkuperäisestä kohdekielestä rakennettujen avaruuksien ja käännösten välillä ennakoidaksemme kielten välisiä suhteita valvomattomalla tavalla. Käytämme erilaisia näkemyksiä datasta - sanoja, puheen osia, semanttisia tunnisteita ja synzejä - kääntämisen seuraamiseen. Analyysimme osoittaa, että (i) semanttiset etäisyydet alkuperäisen kohdekielen ja käännösten välillä tähän kohdekieleen voidaan havaita käyttämällä käsitettä isomorfismi, ii) kielisukusiteet, joilla on samankaltaisia piirteitä kuin kielitieteellisesti motivoituneilla fylogeenisilla puilla, voidaan päätellä etäisyyksistä ja iii) deleksikalisoitujen upotusten yhteydessä, joissa esiintyy eniten lähdekielen häiriöitä, muilla abstraktiotasoilla on sama taipumus, osoittaa, että leksikalisoidut tulokset eivät ole "vain" alkuperäisten ja käännettyjen tekstien mahdollisten aiheerojen vuoksi. Tietojemme mukaan tämä on ensimmäinen kerta, kun upotustilojen välistä isomorfismia käytetään käännöksen seuraamiseen.', 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud kasutavad leksikaalsete ja süntaktiliste omaduste kombinatsiooni, mis näitavad, et lähtekeele jalajäljed jäävad tõlketes nähtavaks niivõrd, kuivõrd on võimalik algkeelt tõlkest prognoosida. Käesolevas töös keskendume põhinevate semantiliste ruumide manustamisele, kasutades ära erinevusi isomorfismist algsest sihtkeelest ehitatud ruumide ja tõlkete vahel sellesse sihtkeelde, et ennustada keeltevahelisi suhteid järelevalveta viisil. Tõlkimise jälgimiseks kasutame erinevaid andmete vaateid - sõnu, kõneosi, semantilisi silte ja sünteese. Meie analüüs näitab, et (i) semantilisi kauguseid algse sihtkeele ja selle sihtkeele tõlkete vahel saab tuvastada isomorfismi mõiste abil. ii) keeleperekonna sidemeid, mis sarnanevad keeleliselt motiveeritud fülogeneetilistele puudele, võib järeldada vahemaade põhjal ja iii) deleksikaliseeritud manustamiste puhul, millel esineb kõige olulisem lähtekeele häire, näitavad teistel abstraktsiooni tasanditel sama tendentsi; märkides, et leksikaliseeritud tulemused ei ole "lihtsalt" originaal- ja tõlgitud tekstide võimalike teemaerinevuste tõttu. Meie teadmiste kohaselt kasutatakse tõlkimise jälgimiseks esmakordselt isomorfismist kõrvalekaldeid manustamisruumide vahel.', 'bs': 'Nedavno ispitivanje koristi kombinaciju leksičkih i sintaktičkih karakteristika kako bi pokazalo da otisci izvornog jezika ostaju vidljivi u prevodima, do te mjere da je moguće predvidjeti originalni jezik izvora iz prevoda. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na ugrađene semantičke prostore, iskorištavajući odstupanje iz izomorfizma između prostora izgrađenih iz originalnog ciljnog jezika i prevoda na ovaj ciljni jezik kako bi predvidjeli odnose između jezika na neodređen način. Koristimo različite poglede podataka - riječi, dijelovi govora, semantičke etikete i sinkronizacije - kako bi pratili translaciju. Naša analiza pokazuje da se (i) semantičke udaljenosti između originalnog ciljnog jezika i prevoda na ovaj ciljni jezik može otkriti koristeći pojam izomorfizma, ii) jezičke porodice veze sa karakteristikama sličnim jezički motiviranim filogenetičkim drvećem mogu se uvući iz udaljenosti i iii) sa deleksikaliziranim ugrađenjima koji najznačajnije pokazuju interferenciju izvornog jezika, druge nivoe apstrakcije pokazuju istu tendenciju, ukazujući na leksikalizirane rezultate da ne budu "samo" zbog mogućih razlika teme između originalnih i prevedenih tekstova. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi put odlazak iz izomorfizma između ugrađenih prostora korišćen za praćenje translacije.', 'jv': "tab Nang pepul iki, kita punika dipun ancis semanti sing basa gambar, nggawe ngulinakake tarjamah karo iso nggoleki luwih cara sing nggawe ngulinakake tarjamahan karo perusahaan tarjamahan lan tarjamahan kanggo ingkang luwih akeh dumaten kanggo ngerasai perusahaan langkung sampeyan ingkang ora bisa pasar. section Ndolesi awak dhéwé ngerasakno ana (i) sampek langkung sampek tanggal uga banjuré terjamahan karo alêngé iki iso disenyakake nguasai perusahaan iso nggawe gerarané itolerané, (iii) kulay luwih akeh lan cara-akeh liyane karo akeh lan gambar kelas politenet podho nggawe lan punika ingkang diweh dumadhan lan (iii) nganggep sistem sing perusahaan Where's the source default:LTR Awak dhéwé, akeh sing paling awak dhéwé, iki tangan mbéh tanggal diolah Isomorpi iki luwih basa sing dirampakan kanggo tuwih tarjamahan.", 'sk': 'Nedavne študije uporabljajo kombinacijo leksikalnih in sintaktičnih značilnosti, da so odtisi izvornega jezika vidni v prevodih, kolikor je mogoče napovedati izvirni jezik iz prevoda. V prispevku se osredotočamo na vgradnjo semantičnih prostorov, ki temeljijo na izkoriščanju odstopanj od izomorfizma med prostori, zgrajenimi iz izvirnega ciljnega jezika, in prevodi v ta ciljni jezik, da bi napovedali odnose med jeziki na nenadzorovan način. Za sledenje prevajanja uporabljamo različne poglede na podatke - besede, deli govora, semantične oznake in sinzore. Naša analiza kaže, da (i) semantične razdalje med izvirnim ciljnim jezikom in prevodi v ta ciljni jezik lahko zaznamo z uporabo pojma izomorfizma, (ii) vezi jezikovne družine z značilnostmi, podobnimi jezikovno motiviranim filogenetskim drevesom, se lahko sklepajo iz razdalj in (iii) z deleksikaliziranimi vdelavami, ki kažejo najpomembnejše motnje izvornega jezika, druge stopnje abstrakcije kažejo enako težnjo, navedba, da leksikalizirani rezultati niso "zgolj" zaradi možnih tematskih razlik med izvirnim in prevedenim besedilom. Kolikor vemo, je to prvič, da se za sledenje prevajanja uporabljajo odstopi od izomorfizma med vgradnimi prostori.', 'ha': "@ action: button Daga wannan takardan, munã fokusar da filayen semantiki wanda aka samar da shi ana samar da shi, masu yin amfani da sunayen cilofi tsakanin filayen da aka gina daga lugha na farko da fassarori zuwa wannan harshe na aimakin, dõmin ka yi bayani ga haɗi tsakanin harshen da aka tsare. Tuna amfani da wasu kalmõmi masu yiwuwa - masu faɗi, rabo ga magana, tagogi na semantic da syntheta - dõmin tunkuɗe fassarori. AnayyayinMu na nũna (i) gaura na semantic tsakanin lugha na farko da fassarori zuwa wannan lugha wanda aka yi jiyya, za'a gane shi a yi amfani da fikon sigomifi, To (ii) Giganiya na family cikin harshen wanda ke da wani abu mai linguistic da aka gane na itãce na fylognet za'a iya shafe su daga wuri mai nĩsa kuma (i) da ake nuna maroyi masu motsi da harshen-na'ura mafi significant, da wasu daraja na kandamta, za'a nuna wa misãlani da shi, @ info: whatsthis Ga mafi kyaun saninmu, wannan ne na farkon da ke fita daga diplomasi ta farko a tsakanin filayen da za'a yi amfani da su tunkuɗe fassarar.", 'he': 'למחקרים האחרונים משתמשים בשילוב של תכונות לקסיות וסינטקטיקות כדי להראות שטביעות הרגליים של שפת המקור נשארות ראויות בתרגשות, במידה שאפשר לחזות את שפת המקור המקורית מהתרגום. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמקדים במרחבים סמנטיים מבוססים בתכנית, מנצלים את ההפרעות מאיזומורפיזם בין חללים בנויים משפה המקורית המטרה ותרגשות לשפה המטרה הזאת כדי לחזות מערכות יחסים בין שפות בדרך לא מושגת. We use different views of the data - words, parts of speech, semantic tags and synsets - to track translationese.  Our analysis shows that (i) semantic distances between original target language and translations into this target language can be detected using the notion of isomorphism, (ii) קשרי משפחת שפת עם אופיינים דומים לעצים פילוגנטיים מוטיבציה שפתית יכולים להוציא מרחקים ו (iii) עם תוספות דלקסיקוליזציות שמראות הפרעה בשפת מקור במיוחד, רמות אחרות של אסטראקציה מציגות אותה נטייה, זה מצביע על התוצאות הלקסיקליות לא רק בגלל הבדלים נושאיים בין טקסטים מקוריים ותרגמים. לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, זו הפעם הראשונה שהעזבות מאיזומורפיזם בין מקומות הכניסה משמשים לאתר התרגום.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་ཡིག་གི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རིམ་དང་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རིམ་ཅིག་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས་ན་source སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མངོན་འཆར In this paper, we focus on embedding-based semantic spaces, exploiting departures from isomorphism between spaces built from original target language and translations in to this target language to predict relations between languages in an unsupervised way. The first language is from the second language. ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྟངས་མི་འདྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས། སེམས་རྟགས་ཤོག་བྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ (ii) སྐད་ཡིག་ཚང་མས་དང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚང་མས། " ལག་རིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཐོག་ཅིག་མིན་\'ཁོ་ན\'་བྱེད་པ་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time departures from isomorphism between embedding spaces are used to track translationese.'}
{'en': 'Building The First English-Brazilian Portuguese Corpus for Automatic Post-Editing', 'ar': 'بناء أول مجموعة نصية برتغالية إنجليزية برازيلية للتحرير التلقائي اللاحق', 'pt': 'Construindo o primeiro corpus inglês-português brasileiro para pós-edição automática', 'fr': 'Création du premier corpus anglais-brésilien portugais pour la post-édition automatique', 'es': 'Construyendo el primer corpus inglés-portugués brasileño para la post-edición automática', 'ja': '自動ポストエディットのための最初の英語-ブラジルポルトガル語コーパスの構築', 'hi': 'स्वचालित पोस्ट-संपादन के लिए पहला अंग्रेजी-ब्राजील पुर्तगाली कॉर्पस का निर्माण', 'zh': '初构自译后编辑英语-巴西葡萄牙语语料库', 'ru': 'Построение первого англо-бразильско-португальского корпуса для автоматического пост-редактирования', 'ga': 'An Chéad Chorp Portaingéilis Béarla-na Brasaíle a Thógáil le haghaidh Iar-Eagarthóireachta Uathoibríoch', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Az első angol-brazil portugál korpusz megépítése az automatikus utószerkesztéshez', 'el': 'Κατασκευή του πρώτου αγγλο-βραζιλιάνικου πορτογαλικού σώματος για αυτόματη μετα-επεξεργασία', 'it': 'Costruire il primo corpo portoghese inglese-brasiliano per il post-editing automatico', 'ms': 'Bina Korpus Portugis Inggeris-Brazil Pertama untuk Penyunting Automatik', 'lt': '„The First English-Brazilian Portuguese Corpus for Automatic Post-Editing“', 'kk': 'Бірінші ағылшын- Бразилиялық португаль корпус автоматты түрде өңдеу үшін құру', 'mk': 'Градење на првиот англиско-бразилски португалски корпус за автоматско постуредување', 'ml': 'ആദ്യ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്- ബ്രസീലിയന്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീസ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പണിയുന്നു', 'mn': 'Эхний Англи-Бразилийн Португалийн корпус Автоматикийн Постэй-Editing-д байгуулах', 'mt': 'Il-Bini tal-Ewwel Korp Portugiż Ingliż-Brażiljan għall-Edizzjoni Awtomatika Wara', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Budowa pierwszego angielsko-brazylijskiego korpusu portugalskiego do automatycznej edycji post-edycyjnej', 'ro': 'Construirea primului corpus portughez englez-brazilian pentru editarea automată', 'sr': 'Izgradnja prvog engleskog-brazilskog portugalskog korpusa za automatski postured', 'si': 'The first English-Brazilian Portugees Corpus for Auto Post-edit', 'so': 'Building The First English-Brazilian Portuguese Corpus for Automatic Post-Editing', 'ur': 'اولین انگلیسی-برزیلی پورچل کورپوس بنانے کے لئے', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி பின்தொகுப்புக்கான முதல் ஆங்கிலம்- ப்ரேசிலியன் போர்த்துகீசு கார்புஸ் கட்டுகிறது', 'sv': 'Bygga den första engelsk-brasilianska portugisiska kåren för automatisk postredigering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Xây dựng Tập Đoàn Bồ Đào Nha Anh-Brazil thứ nhất cho Automatic Post-Editing.', 'bg': 'Изграждане на първия англо-бразилски португалски корпус за автоматична постредакция', 'da': 'Opbygning af det første engelsk-brasilianske portugisiske korpus til automatisk postredigering', 'nl': 'Het eerste Engels-Braziliaanse Portugese Corpus bouwen voor automatische post-editing', 'hr': 'Izgradnja prvog engleskog-brazilskog portugalskog korpusa za automatski postured', 'de': 'Aufbau des ersten englisch-brasilianischen portugiesischen Korpus für automatische Nachbearbeitung', 'fa': 'ساختن اولین کورپ انگلیسی-برزیلیایی پورتوژیکی برای ویرایش بعد از ویرایش خودکار', 'id': 'Membangun Korpus Portugis Inggris-Brazil Pertama untuk Pengeditan Otomatis', 'ko': '자동 후기 편집에 사용되는 최초의 영어 - 브라질 - 포르투갈어 자료 라이브러리 구축', 'sw': 'Kujenga Korpus ya Kiingereza ya kwanza ya Kiingereza na Brazili kwa ajili ya kuhariri tangu', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe-Braziliýa Portugalça korpusy Otomatik Po-Editlemek üçin Ilkinji Iňlisçe Bejer', 'af': 'Bou die Eerste Engels-Braziliese Portugeese Korpus vir Outomatiese Post-Redigering', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i Korpus të Parë Portugez-Anglisht për Posteditimin Automatik', 'am': 'የፊተኛይቱ እንግሊዘኛ-ባራዚላዊ ፖርቱጋሊኛ ኮፕስስ ለautomatic post-editing', 'hy': 'Building The First English-Brazilian Portuguese Corpus for Automatic Post-Editing', 'az': 'İlk İngilizə-Brazilya Portugalca Korpusu Avtomatik Post-Editing üçün İngilizə qurmaq', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় পোস্ট সম্পাদনের জন্য প্রথম ইংরেজী ব্রাজিলিয়ান পর্তুগীজ কোর্পাস নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Izgradnja prvog engleskog-brazilskog portugalskog korpusa za automatski postured', 'ca': 'Building The First English-Brazilian Portuguese Corpus for Automatic Post-Editing', 'cs': 'Budování prvního anglicko-brazilského portugalského korpusu pro automatické posteditování', 'et': 'Esimese inglise-brasiilia portugali korpuse ehitamine automaatseks järeltöötluseks', 'fi': 'Ensimmäinen englanti-brasilialainen portugalilainen korpus automaattiseen jälkieditointiin', 'jv': 'Ngawe nggawe Kerpus sing sampeyan Inggris-Bracilian Putuk kanggo Awak-Ngubah Otomatik', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'בניית הקורפורטוגזית האנגלית-ברזילית הראשונה לאחר העורך אוטומטי', 'sk': 'Gradnja prvega angleško-brazilskega portugalskega korpusa za avtomatsko postno urejanje', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ལས་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཨིན་ཇིའི་དང་བྷི་ར་ཛིལ་གྱི་པོར་ཤིག་གསར་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper introduces the first corpus for Automatic Post-Editing of English and a low-resource language, Brazilian Portuguese. The source English texts were extracted from the WebNLG corpus and automatically translated into Portuguese using a state-of-the-art industrial neural machine translator. Post-edits were then obtained in an experiment with native speakers of Brazilian Portuguese. To assess the quality of the corpus, we performed error analysis and computed complexity indicators measuring how difficult the APE task would be. We report preliminary results of Phrase-Based and Neural Machine Translation Models on this new corpus. Data and code publicly available in our repository.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة أول مجموعة من المواد الخاصة بالتحرير التلقائي اللاحق للغة الإنجليزية ولغة منخفضة الموارد ، وهي البرتغالية البرازيلية. تم استخراج النصوص الإنجليزية المصدر من مجموعة WebNLG وترجمت تلقائيًا إلى اللغة البرتغالية باستخدام أحدث مترجم آلة عصبية صناعية. ثم تم الحصول على التعديلات اللاحقة في تجربة مع متحدثين أصليين للبرتغالية البرازيلية. لتقييم جودة المجموعة ، أجرينا تحليل الأخطاء ومؤشرات التعقيد المحسوبة لقياس مدى صعوبة مهمة APE. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن النتائج الأولية لنماذج الترجمة الآلية القائمة على العبارات والعصبية في هذه المجموعة الجديدة. البيانات والرمز متاح للجمهور في مستودعنا.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta el primer corpus para la postedición automática de inglés y un idioma de pocos recursos, el portugués brasileño. Los textos originales en inglés se extrajeron del corpus de WebNLG y se tradujeron automáticamente al portugués utilizando un traductor de máquina neuronal industrial de última generación. Luego se obtuvieron post-ediciones en un experimento con hablantes nativos de portugués brasileño. Para evaluar la calidad del corpus, realizamos un análisis de errores y calculamos indicadores de complejidad que midieron la dificultad de la tarea APE. Presentamos los resultados preliminares de los modelos de traducción automática neuronal y basados en frases en este nuevo corpus. Datos y códigos disponibles públicamente en nuestro repositorio.', 'fr': "Cet article présente le premier corpus pour la post-édition automatique de l'anglais et d'une langue à faibles ressources, le portugais brésilien. Les textes source en anglais ont été extraits du corpus WebNLG et traduits automatiquement en portugais à l'aide d'un traducteur industriel de machine neuronale ultramoderne. Des post-éditions ont ensuite été obtenues dans le cadre d'une expérience avec des locuteurs natifs du portugais brésilien. Pour évaluer la qualité du corpus, nous avons effectué une analyse des erreurs et calculé des indicateurs de complexité mesurant la difficulté de la tâche APE. Nous présentons les résultats préliminaires des modèles de traduction automatique basés sur les phrases et les neurones sur ce nouveau corpus. Les données et le code sont accessibles au public dans notre référentiel.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta o primeiro corpus para Pós-Edição Automática de Inglês e uma língua de poucos recursos, o Português Brasileiro. Os textos de origem em inglês foram extraídos do corpus WebNLG e traduzidos automaticamente para o português usando um tradutor de máquina neural industrial de última geração. As pós-edições foram então obtidas em um experimento com falantes nativos do português brasileiro. Para avaliar a qualidade do corpus, realizamos análise de erros e computamos indicadores de complexidade medindo o quão difícil seria a tarefa de APE. Relatamos resultados preliminares de Modelos de Tradução Automática Neural e Baseado em Frases neste novo corpus. Dados e código disponíveis publicamente em nosso repositório.', 'ja': 'この論文では、英語と低資源言語であるブラジルポルトガル語の自動ポストエディットのための最初のコーパスを紹介します。ソースの英語テキストは、WebNLGコーパスから抽出され、最先端の産業用ニューラルマシン翻訳機を使用して自動的にポルトガル語に翻訳されました。その後、ブラジルポルトガル語の母語話者を用いた実験でポストエディットが得られた。コーパスの品質を評価するために、誤差分析を行い、APEタスクの難易度を測定する複雑性指標を計算しました。この新しいコーパスについて、フレーズベースおよびニューラルマシン翻訳モデルの予備的な結果を報告します。当社のリポジトリで公開されているデータとコード。', 'zh': '本文首用英语自译后编辑语料库及一资匮语,即巴西葡萄牙语也。 源英语文本取诸WebNLG语料库,并用先进工业神经机器翻译器自翻译成葡萄牙语。 然后于巴西葡萄牙语母语人士实验中得后期编辑。 为评语料库之量,参差计复杂性指标,以量APE难。 告于短语、神经机器翻译之初。 数代码显给于储库。', 'ru': 'В этом документе представлен первый корпус для автоматического пост-редактирования английского языка и бразильского португальского языка с ограниченными ресурсами. Исходные английские тексты были извлечены из корпуса WebNLG и автоматически переведены на португальский язык с помощью современного промышленного нейронного машинного переводчика. Затем в эксперименте с носителями бразильского португальского языка были получены постредактированные тексты. Чтобы оценить качество корпуса, мы провели анализ ошибок и рассчитали показатели сложности, оценивая, насколько сложной будет задача APE. Мы сообщаем предварительные результаты моделей перевода на основе фраз и нейронных машин на этом новом корпусе. Данные и код общедоступны в нашем репозитории.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अंग्रेजी के स्वचालित पोस्ट-एडिटिंग और एक कम-संसाधन भाषा, ब्राजील के पुर्तगाली के लिए पहला कॉर्पस पेश करता है। स्रोत अंग्रेजी ग्रंथों को WebNLG कॉर्पस से निकाला गया था और स्वचालित रूप से एक अत्याधुनिक औद्योगिक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवादक का उपयोग करके पुर्तगाली में अनुवाद ति किया गया था। पोस्ट-एडिट तब ब्राजील के पुर्तगाली के मूल वक्ताओं के साथ एक प्रयोग में प्राप्त किए गए थे। कॉर्पस की गुणवत्ता का आकलन करने के लिए, हमने त्रुटि विश्लेषण किया और गणना की गई जटिलता संकेतकों को मापने के लिए कि एपीई कार्य कितना मुश्किल होगा। हम इस नए कॉर्पस पर वाक्यांश-आधारित और तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल के प्रारंभिक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। डेटा और कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से हमारे भंडार में उपलब्ध है।', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo isteach an chéad chorpas d’Iar-Eagarthóireacht Uathoibríoch an Bhéarla agus teanga íseal-acmhainne, Portaingéilis na Brasaíle. Baineadh na buntéacsanna Béarla as corpas WebNLG agus aistríodh iad go huathoibríoch go Portaingéilis ag baint úsáide as aistritheoir meaisín néareolaíoch tionsclaíochta den scoth. Fuarthas iar-eagarthóirí ansin i dturgnamh le cainteoirí dúchais na Portaingéile Brasaíle. Chun cáilíocht an chorpais a mheas, rinneamar anailís earráide agus ríomhamar táscairí castachta a thomhais cé chomh deacair a bheadh tasc APE. Tuairiscímid réamhthorthaí na Samhlacha Frás-Bhunaithe agus Meaisín-Aistriúcháin Néaracha ar an gcorpas nua seo. Sonraí agus cód ar fáil go poiblí inár stór.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის პირველი კორპუსს ავტომატურად ინგლისური დარედაქტირება და ბრაზილური პორტიგური ენაში ჩვენებს. ინგლისური ტექსტები WebNLG კორპუსდან გამოყენებულია და ავტომატურად პორგუტებურში გამოყენებულია, რომელიც გამოყენებულია სამყარო ინდუსტური ნეიროლური მაქანის შემდეგ ბრაზილური პორტეგუტების მისამართლური მუშაობელი ექსპერიმენტში მიღებულია. ჩვენ კოპუსის კაalitეტის შესახებ შეცდომის ანალიზაციას და კომპლექტიური ინდექტორის შესახებ, რომლებიც APE დავამუშავებული იქნება. ჩვენ ახალი კორპუსზე გამოსახულებული ფრაზის და ნეიროლური მაქსინის გადაწყვეტილების პირველ შედეგების შეტყობინება. Data and code publicly available in our repository.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει το πρώτο σώμα για την αυτόματη μετα-επεξεργασία των αγγλικών και μια γλώσσα χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας, τα βραζιλιάνικα πορτογαλικά. Τα αγγλικά κείμενα προέκυψαν από το σώμα και μεταφράστηκαν αυτόματα στα πορτογαλικά χρησιμοποιώντας έναν υπερσύγχρονο βιομηχανικό μεταφραστή νευρωνικής μηχανής. Στη συνέχεια, πραγματοποιήθηκαν μεταγενέστερες εργασίες σε ένα πείραμα με φυσικούς ομιλητές Βραζιλιάνικων Πορτογαλικών. Για να αξιολογηθεί η ποιότητα του σώματος, πραγματοποιήσαμε ανάλυση σφαλμάτων και υπολογίσαμε δείκτες πολυπλοκότητας που μετρούσαν πόσο δύσκολη θα ήταν η εργασία της ΑΠΕ. Αναφέρουμε προκαταρκτικά αποτελέσματα των μοντέλων μηχανικής μετάφρασης βασισμένων σε φράσεις και νευρώνες σε αυτό το νέο σώμα. Δεδομένα και κώδικας διαθέσιμα δημόσια στο αποθετήριο μας.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az angol nyelv automatikus utószerkesztésének első korpuszát és egy alacsony erőforrású nyelvet, a brazil portugált nyelvet. Az angol forrásszövegeket kivontuk a WebNLG korpuszból, és automatikusan portugálra fordítottuk egy korszerű ipari neurális gép fordítóval. Az utószerkesztéseket ezután egy brazil portugál anyanyelvű kísérletben szereztük meg. A korpusz minőségének felmérése érdekében hibaelemzést végeztünk és komplex mutatókat számítottunk ki, amelyek mérték, milyen nehéz lenne az APE feladat. Az új korpuszon jelentjük a kifejezésalapú és neurális gépi fordítási modellek előzetes eredményeit. Adatok és kódok nyilvánosan hozzáférhetők az adattárunkban.', 'it': "Questo articolo introduce il primo corpus per il post-editing automatico dell'inglese e una lingua a basso contenuto di risorse, il portoghese brasiliano. I testi di origine in inglese sono stati estratti dal corpus WebNLG e tradotti automaticamente in portoghese utilizzando un traduttore industriale di macchine neurali all'avanguardia. Le post-modifiche sono state poi ottenute in un esperimento con madrelingua portoghese brasiliana. Per valutare la qualità del corpus, abbiamo eseguito l'analisi degli errori e calcolato indicatori di complessità misurando quanto sarebbe stato difficile il compito APE. Riportiamo i risultati preliminari dei modelli di traduzione automatica basati su frasi e neurali su questo nuovo corpus. Dati e codice disponibili pubblicamente nel nostro repository.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomas pirmasis korpusas, skirtas automatiškai po anglų ir mažai išteklių turinčios Brazilijos portugalų kalbos redakcijai. Ištekliai tekstai anglų kalba buvo ištraukti iš WebNLG corpus ir automatiškai išversti į portugalų kalbą naudojant pažangiausią pramonės nervų mašinų vertimą. Po to buvo atliktas eksperimentas su Brazilijos portugalų kalbėtojais. Kad įvertintume korpuso kokybę, atlikome klaidų analizę ir apskaičiuotus sudėtingumo rodiklius, matuojančius, kaip sudėtinga būtų atlikti APE užduotį. Pranešime apie išankstinius frazėmis pagrįstų ir nervinių mašinų vertimo modelių rezultatus apie šį naują korpusą. Duomenys ir kodai viešai prieinami mūsų saugykloje.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го претставува првиот корпус за автоматско постуредување на англиски и јазик со ниски ресурси, бразилски португалски. Изворните англиски тексти беа извадени од корпусот WebNLG и автоматски преведени на португалски користејќи најсовремен индустриски преведувач на неврални машини. После тоа беа пронајдени во експеримент со родни говорници на бразилски португалски. За да го процениме квалитетот на корпусот, спроведовме анализа на грешки и обчистени индикатори на комплексност кои мерат колку би била тешка задачата на APE. Ние известуваме прелиминарни резултати на фраза-базирани и неврални машински модели за превод на овој нов корпус. Податоците и кодот се јавно достапни во нашиот резервоар.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ағылшын тілінің автоматты түрде өзгерту үшін бірінші корпус, Бразилиялық португалық тілі мен төменгі ресурстар тілін көрсетеді. Ағылшын тілінің көзі WebNLG корпусынан алып, автоматты түрде португалға аударылды. Пошта редакторлар Бразилиялық португалшылармен тәжірибеде алды. Корпус сапасын бағалау үшін, біз қате анализ және комплекстік индикаторларды APE тапсырмасының қанша қиын болатынын анықтадық. Біз бұл жаңа корпус үшін фраз негізінде және нейралық машинаның аудару үлгілерін алдындағы нәтижелерін хабарлаймыз. Деректер мен код ресурстағы жалпы болады.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan korpus pertama untuk Automatik Posedit Bahasa Inggeris dan bahasa sumber rendah, Brazil Portugis. Teks sumber bahasa Inggeris telah dikekstrak dari korpus WebNLG dan diterjemahkan secara automatik ke bahasa Portugis menggunakan penerjemah mesin saraf industri state-of-the-art. Setelah-edit kemudian diterima dalam eksperimen dengan pembicara asli Brazil Portugis. Untuk menilai kualiti corpus, kami melakukan analisis ralat dan indikator kompleksiti pengukuran betapa sukarnya tugas APE. Kami laporkan hasil awal dari Model Perjemahan Mesin Berasas Frasa dan Neural pada korpus baru ini. Data dan kod tersedia secara awam dalam repositori kami.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ പിന്തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ആദ്യത്തെ കോര്\u200dപ്പാസിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ബ്രാസിലിയന സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d വെബ്ന്\u200dഎംഎല്\u200dജി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്ന് എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സ്വയം പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷില പിന്നീട് പോസ്റ്റെഡിറ്റുകള്\u200d ബ്രാസിലിയന്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീസിലെ സ്പീക്ടര്\u200dമാരുടെ അടിസ്ഥാന പരീക്ഷണത്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പസിന്റെ സ്വാധീനത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിച്ചു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചു. എപ്പിഇ ജോലി എത്ര ബുദ്ധി ഈ പുതിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d വാക്ക്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായും ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ ആദ്യ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ് നമ്മുടെ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടറിയില്\u200d ഡേറ്റായും കോഡും പ്രത്യേകം ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Бразилийн Португалийн Автоматикийн Пост-Editing болон бага баялаг хэл болон Автоматикийн Португалийн эхний корпус илэрхийлж байна. Англи хэлний эх үүсвэр texts нь WebNLG корпус-аас автоматаар португаль руу хураагдаж байлаа. Ингээд дараа нь Бразилийн Португалийн сурагчидтай туршилт хийгдсэн. Корпус дахь чанарыг үнэлэхээр бид алдаа шинжилгээ хийж, APE даалгаварын хэр хэцүү байх вэ гэдгийг тооцоолж байсан. Бид энэ шинэ корпус дээр фраз дээр суурилсан, мэдрэлийн машин орчуулах загварын эхний үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Data and code publicly available in our repository.', 'no': 'Denne papiret introduserer den første korpusen for automatisk post- redigering av engelsk og ein låg ressursspråk, Brasiliansk portugisisk. Tekstene for kjelde engelsk ble pakka ut frå WebNLG-korpusen og automatisk oversettet til portugisisk med ein omsetjing av kunsttilstanden til industriell neuralmaskin. Post-redigeringar vart derfor henta i eit eksperiment med opphavlege taler av Brasilianske portugisisk. For å vurdere kvaliteten på korpusen, utførte vi feilanalyser og rekna ut kompleksitetsindikatorer som måler kor vanskeleg APE-oppgåva ville vera. Vi rapporterer første resultat av frasbaserte og nøyrale maskinsomsetjingsmodular om denne nye korpusen. Data og kode tilgjengeleg offentlig i lageret vår.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia pierwszy korpus automatycznego post-edycji języka angielskiego oraz języka brazylijskiego o niskich zasobach. Źródłowe teksty angielskie zostały wydobyte z korpusu WebNLG i automatycznie przetłumaczone na język portugalski za pomocą najnowocześniejszego przemysłowego tłumacza maszyn neuronowych. Postedycje uzyskano następnie w eksperymencie z native speakerami brazylijskiego portugalskiego. Aby ocenić jakość korpusu, przeprowadziliśmy analizę błędów i obliczyliśmy wskaźniki złożoności mierzące trudność zadania APE. Przedstawiamy wstępne wyniki modeli tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na frazach i neuronalnych na nowym korpusie. Dane i kod dostępne publicznie w naszym repozytorium.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă primul corpus pentru editarea automată a limbii engleze și o limbă cu resurse reduse, portugheza braziliană. Textele sursă în limba engleză au fost extrase din corpul WebNLG și traduse automat în portugheză folosind un traducător de mașini neurale industriale de ultimă generație. Posteditările au fost apoi obținute într-un experiment cu vorbitori nativi de portugheză braziliană. Pentru a evalua calitatea corpului, am efectuat analiza erorilor și am calculat indicatori de complexitate măsurând cât de dificilă ar fi sarcina APE. Raportăm rezultatele preliminare ale modelelor de traducere automată bazate pe fraze și neurale pe acest nou corp. Date și coduri disponibile public în depozitul nostru.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prvi korpus za automatski postured engleskog jezika i niskog resursa, Brazilski portugalski jezik. Izvorni engleski teksti su izvedeni iz WebNLG korpusa i automatski prevedeni na portugalski korištenjem državnog industrijskog prevoditelja neuralne mašine. Postediti su tada dobili u eksperimentu sa rodnim govornicima Brazilskog portugalca. Da bismo procenili kvalitet korpusa, izvršili smo analizu greške i izračunali indikator kompleksnosti koji mjeraju koliko će biti teško zadatak APE-a. Prijavljujemo preliminarne rezultate modela prevoda na Frazi i Neuralne mašine o ovom novom korpusu. Podaci i kodovi javno dostupni u našem skladištu.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාගේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පොස්ටුජිලියාන් භාෂාවක් සහ බ්\u200dරාසිලියාන් පොර්තුතිකා මුළු ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පාළුවන් WebNLG කොර්පුස් වලින් අරගෙන පොර්ටුගුලිස් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් පොර්ටුගුල පස්සේ සංපාදනයක් පස්සේ බ්\u200dරාජිලියාන් පොර්තුතුජියාන් වල ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සමග ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්  කෝර්පුස් ගැන ස්වභාවිත විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි වැරදි විශ්ලේෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය සංඥා අපි මේ අළුත් කොර්පුස් ගැන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අපේ තොරතුරයේ දත්ත සහ කෝඩ් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයි.', 'so': 'Kanu waa qoraalkii ugu horeeyay oo u qoraya Automatic Post-Editing of Ingiriis iyo luqad hoos-resource ah, Brazilian Burtuqiis. Qoraalka afka ingiriisiga waxaa laga soo saaray WebNLG corpus, waxaana lagu isticmaalay qoraal-state-of-the-art machine neural neural translator. Markaas waxaa la helay imtixaan ku saabsan hadalka hooyo ee Burtuqiis ah ee Brazil. Si aan u qiimeyno qiimeynta aqoonta qoyska, waxaynu sameynay baaritaanka qaladka iyo waxaynu xisaabnay alaabta dhibaatada ah oo ku saabsan sida ay ugu adag tahay shaqada APE. Waxaynu soo sheegaynaa resultinta ugu horeysa ee Phrase-Based and Neural Machine Translation Models on this new corpus. Macluumaad iyo codsigu waxay si bayaan ah ugu heli karaan warqadeena.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats introducerar den första korpusen för automatisk postredigering av engelska och ett lågresursspråk, brasiliansk portugisiska. Källa engelska texter extraherades från WebNLG korpus och översattes automatiskt till portugisiska med hjälp av en toppmodern industriell neural maskinöversättare. Efterredigeringar erhölls sedan i ett experiment med infödda talare av brasiliansk portugisiska. För att bedöma kvaliteten på korpusen utförde vi felanalys och beräknade komplexitetsindikatorer som mäter hur svår APE-uppgiften skulle vara. Vi rapporterar preliminära resultat av frasbaserade och neurala maskinöversättningsmodeller på denna nya korpus. Data och kod är allmänt tillgängliga i vårt arkiv.', 'ta': '@ info @ info பிரேசிலியன் போர்த்துகீசிய பேச்சாளர்களுடன் ஒரு சோதனையில் பின்தொகுப்புகள் கிடைத்தது. கார்ப்ஸின் தரமை மதிப்பிட, நாங்கள் பிழை ஆய்வு செய்தோம் மற்றும் சிக்கல் குறிக்குறிகளை கணக்கிட்டோம் APE பணி எவ்வளவு கடினமா We report preliminary results of Phrase-Based and Neural Machine Translation Models on this new corpus.  தகவல் மற்றும் குறியீடு எங்கள் கிடங்கில் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'This paper introduces the first corpus for Automatic Post-Editing of English and a low-resource language, Brazilian Portuguese. سورس انگلیسی ٹیکسٹ ویب NLG کورپوس سے اٹھائے گئے اور پورٹوگل میں اپنے طور پر پورٹوگل کی ترجمہ کرے گئے ایک ایسی حالت-of-the-art industrial neural machine translator کے مطابق. پھر برازیل پورچوٹیز کے ملی زبان کرنے والوں کے ساتھ ایک آزمائش میں حاصل کیا گیا۔ ہم نے کورپوس کی کیفیت کا امتحان کرنے کے لئے گمراہی کا تحلیل اور کمپیوٹ کی پیچیدگی نشانیاں کیسی مشکل کار ہوگا۔ ہم اس نوی کورپوس پر فریس بنیاد اور نیورال ماشین ترجمہ موڈل کے پہلی نتائج گزارتے ہیں. ہمارے ریپوسٹر میں ڈاٹا اور کوڈ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jintroduċi l-ewwel korpus għall-Edizzjoni Awtomatika ta’ wara l-Ingliż u lingwa b’riżorsi baxxi, il-Portugiż Brażiljan. It-testi tas-sors Ingliż ġew estratti mill-WebNLG corpus u tradotti awtomatikament fil-Portugiż bl-użu ta’ traduttur industrijali tal-magna newrali l-aktar avvanzat. Imbagħad inkisbu post-edits f’esperiment b’kelliema nattivi tal-Portugiż Brażiljan. Biex tivvaluta l-kwalità tal-korpus, għamilna analiżi tal-iżbalji u indikaturi tal-kumplessità kkalkulati li kejlu kemm ikun diffiċli l-kompitu tal-APE. We report preliminary results of Phrase-Based and Neural Machine Translation Models on this new corpus.  Id-dejta u l-kodiċi huma disponibbli pubblikament fir-repożitorju tagħna.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz ingliz tilida avtomatik tahrirlash va kichkina resource tili Braziliya Portugalchaga birinchi kopus koʻrsatadi. @ info: whatsthis Keyin keyin keyin tahrirlar Braziliya Portugalcha o'xshash gapiruvchilar bilan bir imtiyozda topildi. Korpusning sifatini qiymatga, biz xato analyzerini bajardik va APE vazifasi qanchalik qiyin bo'lishi murakkab indikaslarini hisoblash mumkin. Biz bu yangi kompyuter bilan birinchi birinchi matnning imkoniyatlarini xabar qilamiz. Data and code publicly available in our repository.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu hình thể đầu tiên của Automatic Post-Editing of English and a low-resource language, Brazil Bồ Đào Nha. Nguồn văn bản tiếng Anh được lấy từ tập đoàn WebNLG và tự động dịch sang tiếng Bồ Đào Nha bằng phiên dịch thiết bị thần kinh công nghệ tiên tiến nhất. Sau đó có các bài viết sau đó được lấy làm thí nghiệm với người thổ dân Bồ Đào Nha Brazil. Để đánh giá chất lượng của tập đoàn, chúng tôi đã thực hiện phân tích lỗi và tính toán các chi tiết phức tạp cho thấy việc APE khó khăn thế nào. Chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả sơ bộ của Chế độ dịch cơ khí thần kinh trên cơ thể mới này. Dữ liệu và mã sẵn sàng công khai trong kho lưu trữ.', 'da': 'Denne artikel introducerer det første korpus for automatisk postredigering af engelsk og et lavt ressourcesprog, brasiliansk portugisisk. Kilde engelske tekster blev udvundet fra WebNLG korpus og automatisk oversat til portugisisk ved hjælp af en state-of-the-art industriel neural machine oversætter. Efterredigeringer blev derefter opnået i et eksperiment med indfødte talere af brasiliansk portugisisk. For at vurdere kvaliteten af korpuset udførte vi fejlanalyse og beregnede kompleksitetsindikatorer, der målte, hvor vanskelig APE-opgaven ville være. Vi rapporterer foreløbige resultater af sætningsbaserede og neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller på dette nye korpus. Data og kode er offentligt tilgængelige i vores lager.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prvi korpus za automatski postured engleskog jezika i niskog resursa, brazilski portugalski jezik. Izvorni engleski teksti su izvučeni iz WebNLG korpusa i automatski prevedeni na portugalski korištenjem državnog industrijskog prevodioca neuralnog stroja. Nakon redakta su tada dobiti u eksperimentu s rodnim govornicima Brazilskog portugalca. Da bismo procijenili kvalitet korpusa, izvršili smo analizu greške i izračunali indikatori kompleksnosti koji mjeraju koliko će biti teško zadatak APE-a. Prijavljujemo preliminarne rezultate modela prevoda na formulama i neurološkim strojevima o ovom novom korpusu. Podaci i kodovi javno dostupni u našem skladištu.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя първия корпус за автоматична постредакция на английски език и език с нисък ресурс, бразилски португалски. Източниците на английски текстове са извлечени от корпуса и автоматично преведени на португалски с помощта на най-модерен индустриален невронен машинен преводач. След това пост-редакциите са получени в експеримент с родни езици на бразилски португалски. За да оценим качеството на корпуса, извършихме анализ на грешките и изчислихме показатели за сложност, измерващи трудността на задачата. Докладваме предварителни резултати от моделите на фрази и неврални машинни преводи по този нов корпус. Данните и кодовете са публично достъпни в нашето хранилище.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel introduceert het eerste corpus voor automatische post-editing van Engels en een low-resource taal, Braziliaans Portugees. De Engelse bronteksten werden uit het WebNLG-corpus gehaald en automatisch vertaald in het Portugees met behulp van een state-of-the-art industriële neurale machinevertaler. Post-edits werden vervolgens verkregen in een experiment met native speakers van Braziliaans Portugees. Om de kwaliteit van het corpus te beoordelen hebben we een foutanalyse uitgevoerd en complexiteitsindicatoren berekend die meten hoe moeilijk de APE-taak zou zijn. We rapporteren voorlopige resultaten van Phrase-Based en Neural Machine Translation Modellen op dit nieuwe corpus. Gegevens en code openbaar beschikbaar in onze repository.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ اولین کورپوس را برای ویرایش بعد از ویرایش خودکار انگلیسی و زبان کم منابع، پورتوژیک برزیلی معرفی می کند. متن\u200cهای انگلیسی منبع از شرکت WebNLG اخراج شد و با استفاده از یک ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی ماشین\u200cهای عصبی صنعتی ایالت\u200cهنری به استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از موقعیت\u200cهای فعال بعد از اداره\u200cهای بعد در یک آزمایش با زبان\u200cگویی\u200cهای اصلی از پورتوژیک برزیلیایی دریافت شد. برای ارزیابی کیفیت کورپوس، ما تحلیل اشتباهی و نشان\u200cدهندگان پیچیدگی محاسبات را انجام دادیم که این کار APE چقدر سخت خواهد بود. ما نتیجه\u200cهای اولیه\u200cای از مدل\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین\u200cهای عصبی بر روی این کورپوس جدید گزارش می\u200cدهیم. اطلاعات و کد در ذخیره\u200cی ما به طور عمومی دسترسی دارند.', 'id': 'This paper introduces the first corpus for Automatic Post-Editing of English and a low-resource language, Brazilian Portuguese.  Sumber teks bahasa Inggris telah diekstraksi dari WebNLG corpus dan secara otomatis diterjemahkan ke bahasa Portugis menggunakan penerjemah mesin saraf industri terbaik. Setelah edit itu ditemukan dalam eksperimen dengan pembicara asli Portugis Brazil. To assess the quality of the corpus, we performed error analysis and computed complexity indicators measuring how difficult the APE task would be.  Kami melaporkan hasil awal dari Model Translation Mesin Berdasarkan Frasa dan Neural pada tubuh baru ini. Data dan kode tersedia publik di repositori kami.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt das erste Korpus für die automatische Nachbearbeitung von Englisch und eine ressourcenarme Sprache, Brasilianisches Portugiesisch, vor. Die englischen Quelltexte wurden aus dem WebNLG-Korpus extrahiert und mithilfe eines hochmodernen industriellen neuronalen Maschinenübersetzers automatisch ins Portugiesische übersetzt. Postedits wurden dann in einem Experiment mit Muttersprachlern Brasilianisches Portugiesisch erstellt. Um die Qualität des Korpus zu beurteilen, haben wir Fehleranalysen durchgeführt und Komplexitätsindikatoren berechnet, die messen, wie schwierig die APE-Aufgabe sein würde. Wir berichten vorläufige Ergebnisse von Phrase-Based und Neuronal Machine Translation Modellen auf diesem neuen Korpus. Daten und Code sind in unserem Repository öffentlich verfügbar.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha makala ya kwanza kwa ajili ya Mhariri Huru wa Uingereza na lugha ndogo ya rasilimali, Kireno ya Brazili. Taarifa za vyanzo vya Kiingereza zilitolewa kutoka kwenye makampuni ya WebNLG na kutafsiriwa kwa faragha na Kireno kwa kutumia utafsiri wa mashine ya kiserikali ya viwanda. Baada ya hapo walipatikana katika jaribio la wazungumzaji wa Kireno wa Brazil wa asili. Ili kutathmini ubora wa mashirika hayo, tulifanya uchambuzi wa makosa na tukahesabu alama tatizo kwa kiasi gani kazi ya APE itakuwa ngumu. Tunatoa taarifa za matokeo ya mwanzo ya Matokeo ya Msimu na Mashine ya Tafsiri ya Kijerumani kuhusu makampuni haya mpya. Data and code publicly available in our repository.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz iňlis dilini otomatik taýdan edip bilen ilkinji korpusy we iňlis dilini iňlisçe we iň az kaynakça dili brasilçe portugalça bilen tanyşdyrýar. Iňlisçe çeşme metinleri WebNLG korpusundan çekildi we olaryň otomatik bilen portugalça terjime edildi. Soňra editler Braziliýa portugalça tayly gürleşýänler bilen bir deneyde aldylar. corpus kalitesini değerlendirmek için hata analizi yaptık ve APE görevinin ne kadar zor olacağını ölçüp kompleksitet göstericileri yaptık. Biz Fraz tabanly we Nural Maşynyň terjime nusgalarynyň öňki netijelerini bu täze korpusa berip bilýäris. Maýylymyzda maglumatlar we ködlemeler publika mejbur.', 'af': "Hierdie papier introduseer die eerste korpus vir outomatiese post- redigeering van Engels en 'n lae- hulpbron taal, Braziliese Portugees. Die bron Engels teks is uitgevoer van die WebNLG korpus en automaties in Portugees vertaal deur 'n staat-van-die-kuns industriese neurale masjien vertaal te gebruik. Pos-redigeerders is dan opgeneem in 'n eksperiment met natuurlike sprekkers van Braziliaanse Portugees. Om die kwaliteit van die korpus te assesseer, het ons fout analiseer uitgevoer en bereken kompleksiteit indikators wat die APE taak moeilik sal wees. Ons rapporteer voorste resultate van Frase- Based en Neurale Masjien Vertaling Modelle op hierdie nuwe korpus. Data en kode openlik beskikbaar in ons stoorplek.", 'ko': '본고는 영어 자동 후기 편집에 사용되는 첫 번째 자료 라이브러리와 저자원 언어인 브라질 포르투갈어를 소개한다.원본 영어 텍스트는 웹NLG 어료고에서 추출하고 가장 선진적인 산업신경 기계 번역 도구를 사용해 포르투갈어로 자동으로 번역된다.그리고 브라질 포르투갈어를 모국어로 한 실험에서 게시물 편집을 받았다.우리는 어료 라이브러리의 질을 평가하기 위해 오류 분석을 하고 복잡도 지표를 계산하여 APE 작업의 난이도를 평가했다.우리는 이 신어 자료 라이브러리에서 단어와 신경 기계 번역 모델을 바탕으로 한 초보적인 결과를 보고했다.우리 저장소에서 사용할 수 있는 데이터와 코드를 공개합니다.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull paraqet korpusin e parë për Posteditimin Automatik të Anglishtit dhe një gjuhë me burime të ulëta, portugalisht brazilian. Tekstet e burimit anglez u nxorën nga korpusi WebNLG dhe u përkthyen automatikisht në portugal duke përdorur një përkthyes të makinave nervore industriale më të moderne. Pas këtyre modifikimeve u gjetën në një eksperiment me fjalëtarët vendas të portugalsë brasileze. Për të vlerësuar cilësinë e korpusit, ne kryem analizën e gabimeve dhe treguesit e kompleksitetit të llogaritur duke masuar sa e vështirë do të ishte detyra APE. Raportojmë rezultatet paraprake të modeleve të përkthimit të makinave nervore dhe të fryzave në këtë korpus të ri. Të dhënat dhe kodet janë në dispozicion publik në depozitorin tonë.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የፊተኛውን የፖርቱጋሊኛ ፖርቱጋሊስ ማቀናጃ እና የዝቅተኛ resource ቋንቋ የብራዚላዊ ፖርቱጋልኛ ቋንቋን ያስባል፡፡ ምንጭ እንግሊዝኛ ጽሑፎች ከዌንኤንLG ኮርፖስስ ወጥተዋል እና በፖርቱጋሊስ ገዥ-የ-art የነፃነት ነውራዊ መሣሪያን በመግለጫ ተዘርጓል፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የፖርቱጋሊኛ ጋዜጠኞች ጋር ባለ ግንኙነት ተፈተና ተገኘ፡፡ የኮርፓስ ጥያቄን ለማስተዋል፣ የስህተት ትምህርት እና የAPE ስራ ምን ያህል ትክክለኛ እንደሆነ አቆጠርን፡፡ ይህንን አዲስ ኮርፓስ ላይ የፊደል-Based እና የኔural Machine ትርጉም ሞዴል በመጀመሪያ ፍሬዎችን እናስታውሳለን፡፡ ዳታዎች', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է անգլերենի ավտոմատիկ հետխմբագրման առաջին կորպոսը և ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուն՝ Բրազիլիական պորտուգալերեն: Անգլերեն տեքստները վերցրել են ՎեբՆԼԳ կորպուսից և ավտոմատ թարգմանվել են պորտուգալերեն օգտագործելով նորագույն արդյունաբերական նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանիչ: Այնուհետև վերջնական խմբագրությունները ստացվեցին մի փորձի մեջ, որը անցկացրել էր Բրազիլիայի պորտուգալիացի բնիկ խոսնակների հետ: To assess the quality of the corpus, we performed error analysis and computed complexity indicators measuring how difficult the APE task would be.  Մենք զեկուցում ենք այս նոր մարմնի մասին արտացոլումների և նյարդային մեքենաների թարգմանման նախաձեռնական արդյունքները: Տվյալները և կոդները հանրային հասանելի են մեր պանակում:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt İngilizce Post-Editing üçün ilk korpusu və Braziliyalı Portugalca ilə düşük ressurs dilini təşkil edir. İngilizə mətnlərinin mənbəsi WebNLG korpusundan çıxarıldı və art ıq sanat industri nöral maşına çevirici ilə portugalca tərcümə edildi. Sonra dünya editləri Braziliyalı portugalca yerli danışanları ilə təcrübədə aldılar. Corpusun keyfiyyətini təsdiqləmək üçün xəta analizi və kompleksitə indikatoru etdik ki, APE işinin nə çətin olacağını ölçürlər. Biz bu yeni korpus barəsində Fraz-Based və Neural Machine Translation Modellərin əvvəlki sonuçlarını bildiririk. Məlumatlar və kodlar məlumatlarımızda açıq-aşkar faydalanır.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prvi korpus za automatski postured engleskog jezika i niskog resursa, Brazilski portugalski jezik. Izvorni engleski teksti su izvučeni iz WebNLG korpusa i automatski prevedeni na portugalski korištenjem državnog industrijskog prevoditelja neuralnih strojeva. Postediti su tada dobiti u eksperimentu sa rodnim govornicima Brazilskog portugalca. Da bismo procijenili kvalitet korpusa, izvršili smo analizu greške i izračunali indikator kompleksnosti koji mjeraju koliko će biti teško zadatak APE-a. Prijavljujemo preliminarne rezultate modela prevoda na Frazi i Neuralne mašine o ovom novom korpusu. Podaci i kodovi javno dostupni u našem skladištu.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ইংরেজি স্বয়ংক্রিয় পোস্ট সম্পাদকের প্রথম কোর্পাস এবং একটি কম সম্পদ ভাষা, ব্রাজিলীয় পোর্টুগীজ। উৎস ইংরেজি টেক্সট ওয়েব এনএলজি কোর্পাস থেকে বের করা হয়েছে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পর্তুগীজে অনুবাদ করা হয়েছে একটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প শিল তারপর পোস্ট সম্পাদনার পরীক্ষায় ব্রাজিলীয় পোর্টুগীজের স্থানীয় ভাষণীদের সাথে এক পরীক্ষায় পেয়েছে। কোর্পাসের মানের মূল্য মূল্যের জন্য আমরা ত্রুটি বিশ্লেষণ করেছি এবং কঠিন পরিমাণ নির্দেশক হিসেবে গণনা করেছি যে APE কাজ কত কঠি আমরা এই নতুন কোর্পাসে ফ্রেস-ভিত্তিক এবং নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেলের প্রাথমিক ফলাফল রিপোর্ট করছি। আমাদের রিপোর্টরিতে তথ্য এবং কোড প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যায়।', 'ca': "Aquest article introdueix el primer corpus per a la postedició automàtica d'anglès i un llenguatge de baix recursos, el portuguès brasiler. Els textos d'anglès font van ser extraïts del corpus WebNLG i van ser traduits automàticament en portuguès utilitzant un traductor de màquines neurals industrials més avançats. Després es van obtenir post-edicions en un experiment amb parlants natius de portuguès brasilers. Per avaluar la qualitat del cos, vam fer anàlisi d'errors i indicadors de complexitat computadorats mesurant el difícil que seria la tasca APE. Informem sobre aquest nou cos els resultats preliminars dels Models de Traducció de Màquines Neurals basats en Frases. Data and code publicly available in our repository.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje první korpus pro automatické post-editování angličtiny a nízko-zdrojový jazyk brazilské portugalštiny. Zdrojové anglické texty byly extrahovány z korpusu WebNLG a automaticky přeloženy do portugalštiny pomocí nejmodernějšího průmyslového neuronového strojového překladače. Postedity byly pak získány v experimentu s rodilými mluvčími brazilského portugalštiny. Pro posouzení kvality korpusu jsme provedli analýzu chyb a vypočítali indikátory složitosti, které měřily, jak obtížný by byl úkol APE. Na tomto novém korpusu uvádíme předběžné výsledky frázových a neuronových strojových překladů. Data a kód veřejně dostupné v našem repozitáři.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tutvustatakse esimest korpust inglise ja vähese ressursiga keele, Brasiilia portugali automaatseks järeltöötamiseks. Inglise keele lähtetekstid võeti WebNLG korpusest välja ja tõlgiti automaatselt portugali keelde, kasutades kaasaegset tööstuslikku neuromasinatõlkijat. Järeltöötlused said seejärel eksperimendis emakeelena brasiilia portugali keelt kõnelevatega. Korpuse kvaliteedi hindamiseks teostasime veaanalüüsi ja arvutasime keerukuse näitajaid, mis mõõtsid, kui keeruline oleks APE ülesanne. Selles uues korpuses esitame fraasipõhiste ja neuroalsete masintõlkemudelite esialgsed tulemused. Andmed ja kood on avalikult kättesaadavad meie hoidlas.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee ensimmäisen korpusen englannin automaattiseen jälkieditointiin ja vähävaraiseen kieleen, brasilian portugaliin. Englanninkieliset lähdetekstit poimittiin WebNLG-korpusesta ja käännettiin automaattisesti portugaliksi käyttäen huipputekniikkaa edustavaa teollista neurokonekääntäjää. Tämän jälkeen tehtiin jälkimuokkauksia kokeessa brasilialaisen portugalin äidinkielenään puhuvilla. Korpusen laadun arvioimiseksi suoritettiin virheanalyysi ja laskettiin monimutkaisuusindikaattoreita, jotka mittaavat APE-tehtävän vaikeutta. Raportoimme tässä uudessa korpusessa fraasipohjaisten ja neuraalisten konekäännösmallien alustavat tulokset. Tiedot ja koodit ovat julkisesti saatavilla arkistossamme.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את הקורפוס הראשון לאחר העורך אוטומטי של אנגלית ושפה עם משאבים נמוכים, פורטוגזית ברזילית. המקור הטקסטים האנגליים הווצאים מהקורפוס של WebNLG ומתורגמים באופן אוטומטי לפורטוגזית באמצעות מתרגם מכונת עצבים תעשיית מוקדמת. לאחר מכן ניסוי עם רמקולים מקומיים של פורטוגזית ברזילית. To assess the quality of the corpus, we performed error analysis and computed complexity indicators measuring how difficult the APE task would be.  We report preliminary results of Phrase-Based and Neural Machine Translation Models on this new corpus.  נתונים וקוד זמינים בפומבי במחסן שלנו.', 'ha': "This paper introduces the first corpus for Automatic Post-Editing of English and a low-resource language, Brazilian Portuguese.  @ info: whatsthis Sa'an nan aka sami bayan editori a cikin jarraba da wasu masu saurãre na bakwai-bakwai na Portugal. To, domin ka ƙaddara sifar nau'in nau'in, mun yi anayyar ɓata kuma mun lissafa indikatori masu adadi ko da za'a iya ƙayyade aikin EMET. @ action: button @ info: status", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja prvi korpus za avtomatsko post-urejanje angleščine in jezika z nizkimi viri, brazilske portugalščine. Izvorna angleška besedila so bila izvzeta iz korpusa WebNLG in avtomatsko prevedena v portugalščino z uporabo najsodobnejšega industrijskega nevronskega strojnega prevajalca. Post-urejanja so nato pridobili v eksperimentu z maternimi govorci brazilske portugalščine. Za oceno kakovosti korpusa smo izvedli analizo napak in izračunali kazalnike kompleksnosti za merjenje težavnosti naloge APE. Na tem novem korpusu poročamo o predhodnih rezultatih modelov strojnega prevajanja na podlagi fraz in nevralnih modelov. Podatki in koda so javno dostopni v našem repozitoriju.', 'bo': 'ཤོག The source English texts were extracted from the WebNLG corpus and automatically translated into Portuguese using a state-of-the-art industrial neural machine translator. ཞུན་དག་ཐུབ་པའི་རྗེས་སུ་བྷི་ར་ཛིལ་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ནང་དུ་གླེང་བ་རེད། དབུལ་གྱི་རིན་ཐང་ཚད་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ ང་ཚོས་རང་དབང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིག་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བསྡུར་ ང་ཚོའི་མཛུབ་ཁང་ནང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གསང་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ', 'jv': 'Gambar iki ngewehhita karo perusahaan sing sampeyan kanggo Bebas Automatik kanggo Kebebasan Inggris lan nganggo langkung akeh basa, portugis Bracilian. Perangkat kelas Inggris kuwi nggambar kelas nang sampek webNLG lan automatik terusahan kanggo portugis gambar tarjamahan-sampek manungsa neng-manungsa jinêr manungsa jinêr. Ngubah-ngubah sing wis diputasak ono neng ujaran karo perusahaan anyar karo ngangge spikere basa portugis Bracilian. To assess the quality of the bodus, we Kered error underlined and the number of komplicité parameters that measurement kung kamu isih apik task is divisor. Awak dhéwé ngertuk prelimin dadi mrasakno karo Model sing basa nang Fras-Basa karo Neral Masine Terjamahan karo nggawe barang iki. Dhasar karo kode kang publik gawe nang deputer dhéwé'}
{'en': 'Analysing cross-lingual transfer in lemmatisation for Indian languages', 'ar': 'تحليل التحويل عبر اللغات في lemmatisation للغات الهندية', 'fr': 'Analyse du transfert interlinguistique dans la lemmatisation pour les langues indiennes', 'pt': 'Analisando a transferência multilíngue na lematização para línguas indianas', 'es': 'Análisis de la transferencia multilingüe en la lematización de las lenguas indias', 'ja': 'インドの言語のレマティゼーションにおけるクロスリンガル転送の分析', 'zh': '析印度语言词形还中跨语移', 'hi': 'भारतीय भाषाओं के लिए लेमटाइजेशन में क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर का विश्लेषण करना', 'ru': 'Анализ межъязыковой передачи в лематизации для индийских языков', 'ga': 'Anailís a dhéanamh ar aistriú tras-teangach i leamatúchán do theangacha Indiacha', 'ka': 'ლიმომატიზაციაში ინდოეთის ენებისთვის გადაწყვეტილება', 'hu': 'A nyelvek közötti transzfer elemzése az indiai nyelvek lemmatizációjában', 'el': 'Ανάλυση της γλωσσικής μεταφοράς στη λεμματοποίηση για τις ινδικές γλώσσες', 'it': 'Analisi del trasferimento translinguale nella lemmatizzazione delle lingue indiane', 'lt': 'Indijos kalbų tarpkalbinio perdavimo limmatizacijoje analizė', 'mk': 'Анализирање на прекујазичкиот трансфер на лиматизација за индиски јазици', 'kk': 'Индиялық тілдер үшін лимматизациялау үшін тілдер аударуын анализиялау', 'ms': 'Analisis pemindahan saling bahasa dalam lemmatisasi untuk bahasa India', 'ml': 'ഇന്ത്യന്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കായി ലിമാറ്റേഷനില്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലാങ്ക് മാറ്റുന്നതിനെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Analysing cross-lingual transfer in lemmatisation for Indian languages', 'mn': 'Энэтхэгийн хэл дээр олон хэлний шилжүүлэлтийг шинжилгээ', 'ro': 'Analiza transferului translingv în lemmatizarea limbilor indiene', 'no': 'Analiserer krysspråk overføring i lemmatisering for indiske språk', 'pl': 'Analiza transferu wielojęzycznego w lemmatyzacji dla języków indyjskich', 'sr': 'Analiziranje preko jezika prebacivanja limmatizacije Indijskih jezika', 'so': 'Analysida wareejinta luuqadaha luuqadaha kala duwan ee la xiriira luqadaha Indian', 'sv': 'Analys av transspråkig överföring i lemmatisering för indiska språk', 'si': 'ඉන්දියානු භාෂාව සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා', 'ta': 'இந்திய மொழிகளுக்கான மின்னஞ்சல் மாற்றத்தை பார்க்கவும்', 'ur': 'انڈیان زبانوں کے لئے کرس زبان ترافرست کی تحقیق کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích lây qua ngôn ngữ học cho ngôn ngữ Ấn Độ', 'nl': 'Analyse van meertalige overdracht in lemmatisering voor Indiase talen', 'bg': 'Анализ на междуезичния трансфер в лематизацията за индийски езици', 'da': 'Analyse af tværsproget overførsel i lemmatisering af indiske sprog', 'hr': 'Analiziranje preko jezika prebacivanja limmatizacije Indijskih jezika', 'de': 'Analyse des sprachübergreifenden Transfers in der Lemmatisierung für indische Sprachen', 'fa': 'تحلیل تغییر زبانهای متفاوتی در لیماتیزی برای زبانهای هندی', 'id': 'Analisis transfer saling bahasa dalam lemmatisasi untuk bahasa India', 'ko': '인도어 인용화 중의 다중 언어 이동 분석', 'sw': 'Kuchambua uhamishaji wa lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya lugha za Kihindi', 'af': 'Analiseer kruistale oordrag in lemmatisasie vir Indiese tale', 'sq': 'Analiza e transferimit ndërgjuhësor në limmatizim për gjuhët indiane', 'tr': 'Hindi diller üçin uluslary diller transferini limatlandyrylýar', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ስንቀሳቅስ ለህንድ ቋንቋዎች በተመሳሳይ ላይ በማስተዋል', 'bn': 'ভারতীয় ভাষার জন্য লিম্যাটেশনে ক্রাস-ভাষা পরিবর্তন বিশ্লেষণ করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Լիմմատիզացիայի միջլեզվի փոխանցումը հնդկական լեզուների համար', 'az': 'Hindistan dillərinin limmatizasyonda çox dil transferini analiz edilir', 'bs': 'Analiziranje preko jezika prebacivanja limmatizacije Indijskih jezika', 'ca': 'Analitzar la transfer ència translingüística de la limmatització per a les llengües indies', 'cs': 'Analýza mezijazyčného transferu v lemmatizaci pro indické jazyky', 'et': 'India keelte vahelise siirde analüüs lemmatiseerimisel', 'fi': 'Analysoidaan kielienvälistä siirtoa intialaisten kielten lematisoinnissa', 'sk': 'Analiza medjezičnega prenosa v lematizaciji za indijske jezike', 'he': 'ניתוח העברה דרך שפות בלמטיזציה לשפות הודיות', 'jv': 'Ngubah banter-seneng langkung', 'ha': 'Ana Anarari transfer na-harshen farat-harshe cikin mai mutilation wa harshen Hindu', 'bo': 'འཕྲིན་ཡིག་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་འདྲེན་ནང་ལ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Lemmatization aims to reduce the sparse data problem by relating the inflected forms of a word to its dictionary form. However, most of the prior work on this topic has focused on high resource languages. In this paper, we evaluate cross-lingual approaches for low resource languages, especially in the context of morphologically rich Indian languages. We test our model on six languages from two different families and develop linguistic insights into each model’s performance.', 'ar': 'يهدف Lemmatization إلى تقليل مشكلة البيانات المتناثرة من خلال ربط الأشكال المنحرفة للكلمة بصيغة قاموسها. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم العمل السابق حول هذا الموضوع قد ركز على اللغات عالية الموارد. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتقييم المناهج متعددة اللغات للغات منخفضة الموارد ، خاصة في سياق اللغات الهندية الغنية شكليًا. نحن نختبر نموذجنا على ست لغات من عائلتين مختلفتين ونطور رؤى لغوية لأداء كل نموذج.', 'pt': 'A lematização visa reduzir o problema de dados esparsos relacionando as formas flexionadas de uma palavra com sua forma de dicionário. No entanto, a maior parte do trabalho anterior sobre este tópico concentrou-se em linguagens de alto recurso. Neste artigo, avaliamos abordagens multilíngues para línguas de baixo recurso, especialmente no contexto de línguas indianas morfologicamente ricas. Testamos nosso modelo em seis idiomas de duas famílias diferentes e desenvolvemos insights linguísticos sobre o desempenho de cada modelo.', 'es': 'La lematización tiene como objetivo reducir el problema de la escasez de datos al relacionar las formas flexionadas de una palabra con su forma de diccionario. Sin embargo, la mayor parte del trabajo anterior sobre este tema se ha centrado en los lenguajes de alto nivel de recursos. En este artículo, evaluamos los enfoques interlingüísticos para idiomas de bajos recursos, especialmente en el contexto de idiomas indios ricos morfológicamente. Probamos nuestro modelo en seis idiomas de dos familias diferentes y desarrollamos conocimientos lingüísticos sobre el rendimiento de cada modelo.', 'fr': "La lemmatisation vise à réduire le problème des données rares en reliant les formes fléchies d'un mot à sa forme de dictionnaire. Cependant, la plupart des travaux antérieurs sur ce sujet se sont concentrés sur les langues à ressources élevées. Dans cet article, nous évaluons les approches interlinguistiques pour les langues à faibles ressources, en particulier dans le contexte des langues indiennes riches en morphologie. Nous testons notre modèle sur six langues de deux familles différentes et développons des connaissances linguistiques sur les performances de chaque modèle.", 'ru': 'Лемматизация направлена на сокращение проблемы скудных данных путем увязки переливающихся форм слова с его словарной формой. Однако большая часть предыдущей работы по этой теме была сосредоточена на языках с большими ресурсами. В этой работе мы оцениваем кросслингвистические подходы для языков с низким уровнем ресурсов, особенно в контексте морфологически богатых индийских языков. Мы тестируем нашу модель на шести языках из двух разных семейств и развиваем лингвистическое понимание производительности каждой модели.', 'ja': 'レマティゼーションは、単語の屈折形態を辞書形態に関連付けることにより、まばらなデータの問題を軽減することを目的としている。しかし、このトピックに関する以前の作業のほとんどは、高いリソース言語に焦点を当てています。この論文では、特に形態学的に豊かなインドの言語の文脈において、低資源言語のためのクロスリンガルアプローチを評価する。私たちは、2つの異なるファミリーの6つの言語でモデルをテストし、各モデルのパフォーマンスに関する言語学的洞察を開発します。', 'zh': '词形还原旨单词屈折,与字典相关,减疏数。 然前此主题多集高资言语。 质低资源言语之法,特形丰印度语言之背景。 试我六语,各以其性为言。', 'hi': 'Lemmatization का उद्देश्य किसी शब्द के inflected रूपों को उसके शब्दकोश रूप से संबंधित करके विरल डेटा समस्या को कम करना है। हालांकि, इस विषय पर अधिकांश पूर्व कार्य ने उच्च संसाधन भाषाओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। इस पत्र में, हम कम संसाधन भाषाओं के लिए क्रॉस-भाषी दृष्टिकोणों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, विशेष रूप से रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भारतीय भाषाओं के संदर्भ में। हम दो अलग-अलग परिवारों से छह भाषाओं पर अपने मॉडल का परीक्षण करते हैं और प्रत्येक मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में भाषाई अंतर्दृष्टि विकसित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag leamatú fadhb na sonraí gann a laghdú trí fhoirmeacha infhillte an fhocail a cheangal lena fhoirm fhoclóra. Mar sin féin, dhírigh an chuid is mó den réamhobair ar an ábhar seo ar theangacha ard-acmhainne. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid measúnú ar chur chuige tras-teangacha do theangacha lagacmhainne, go háirithe i gcomhthéacs na dteangacha Indiacha atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár múnla ar shé theanga ó dhá theaghlach éagsúla agus forbraimid léargais teanga ar fheidhmíocht gach múnla.', 'ka': 'ლემიმატიზაცია მიზეზია, რომ გადასრულებული მონაცემების პრობლემა გადასრულებული სიტყვების ფორმების შესახებ მისი სიტყვების ფორმაზე გადასრულება. მაგრამ უფრო მეტი ამ თემაზე წინასწორი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო რესურსების ენაზე დაყენება. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ უფრო სიგრძნელი წარმოდგენების გადაუწყვებთ, განსაკუთრებით მორპოლოგიურად ბედნიერი ინდოეთის ენების კონტექსტში. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის ქვსი ენაზე ორი განსხვავებული ოჯახიდან შევცვალობთ და ყველა მოდელის გამოყენებაში ლენგურისტიკური ინფორმაციების შესახებ.', 'el': 'Η λεμματοποίηση στοχεύει στη μείωση του προβλήματος των αραίων δεδομένων συσχετίζοντας τις καμπυλωμένες μορφές μιας λέξης με τη μορφή λεξικού της. Ωστόσο, το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της προηγούμενης εργασίας σε αυτό το θέμα έχει επικεντρωθεί σε γλώσσες υψηλής περιεκτικότητας. Στην παρούσα εργασία αξιολογούμε τις γλωσσικές προσεγγίσεις για γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας, ειδικά στο πλαίσιο μορφολογικά πλούσιων ινδικών γλωσσών. Δοκιμάζουμε το μοντέλο μας σε έξι γλώσσες από δύο διαφορετικές οικογένειες και αναπτύσσουμε γλωσσικές γνώσεις για την απόδοση κάθε μοντέλου.', 'hu': 'A lemmatizáció célja, hogy csökkentse a ritka adatok problémáját azáltal, hogy egy szó inflexált formáit összekapcsolja a szótár formájához. Az e témával kapcsolatos korábbi munkák nagy része azonban a nagy erőforrású nyelvekre összpontosított. Ebben a tanulmányban értékeljük az alacsony erőforrású nyelveket érintő nyelvek többnyelvű megközelítését, különösen a morfológiailag gazdag indiai nyelvek kontextusában. Modellünket két különböző család hat nyelvén teszteljük, és nyelvi betekintést fejlesztünk ki minden modell teljesítményébe.', 'it': 'La lemmatizzazione mira a ridurre il problema dei dati scarsi collegando le forme flesse di una parola alla sua forma di dizionario. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei lavori precedenti su questo argomento si è concentrata sui linguaggi ad alta risorsa. In questo articolo, valutiamo approcci cross-lingual per le lingue a basso contenuto di risorse, soprattutto nel contesto di lingue indiane morfologicamente ricche. Testiamo il nostro modello su sei lingue di due famiglie diverse e sviluppiamo approfondimenti linguistici sulle prestazioni di ciascun modello.', 'lt': 'Lematizacijos tikslas – sumažinti nedidelę duomenų problem ą, susiejant atsiradusias žodžio formas su žodyno form a. Tačiau dauguma ankstesnių darbų šioje srityje daugiausia dėmesio skyrė didelių išteklių kalboms. Šiame dokumente vertiname tarpkalbinius požiūrius mažai išteklių turinčioms kalboms, ypač turint omenyje morfologiškai turtingas Indijos kalbas. Bandome savo model į šešiomis kalbomis iš dviejų skirtingų šeimų ir plėtojame kalbinį kiekvieno modelio rezultatų suvokimą.', 'mk': 'Лематизацијата има за цел намалување на малиот проблем со податоците со поврзување на привлечените форми на збор со неговиот речник. Сепак, поголемиот дел од претходната работа на оваа тема се фокусираше на јазиците со високи ресурси. Во овој весник, ние ги проценуваме меѓујазичните пристапи за јазиците со ниски ресурси, особено во контекст на морфолошки богатите индиски јазици. Ние го тестираме нашиот модел на шест јазици од две различни семејства и развиваме јазични погледи во изведувањето на секој модел.', 'kk': 'Лематизация мәселесін сөздік пішіміне сәйкес келтірілген пішімдерді сөздік пішіміне сәйкес келтіруге мақсат береді. Бірақ бұл нақыштың алдыңғы жұмысының көпшілігі ресурстар тілдеріне нақышты. Бұл қағазда, біз көптеген тілдердің көптеген түрлі көптеген көптеген түрлерді бағалаймыз, осылай-ақ морфологиялық бағатты Индия тілдерінің контексті. Біз үлгімізді екі әртүрлі отбасынан алты тілден тексеріп, әрбір үлгісінің істеу үшін лингвистикалық түсініктерді жасап, жасаймыз.', 'ms': 'Lemmatisasi bermaksud mengurangi masalah data ringan dengan menghubungkan bentuk perkataan yang disebabkan kepada bentuk kamus. Namun, kebanyakan kerja sebelumnya pada topik ini telah fokus pada bahasa sumber yang tinggi. Dalam kertas ini, kami menilai pendekatan saling bahasa untuk bahasa sumber rendah, terutama dalam konteks bahasa India yang kaya secara morfologik. Kami menguji model kami pada enam bahasa dari dua keluarga yang berbeza dan mengembangkan pandangan bahasa ke dalam prestasi setiap model.', 'ml': "വാക്കുകളുടെ നിഘണ്ട രീതി എന്നാലും ഈ വിഷയത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയുണ്ടായിരുന്നു ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വിഭവഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിച ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കുന്നു, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് മൊര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നര We test our model on six languages from two different families and develop linguistic insights into each model's performance.", 'mt': "Il-lemmatizzazzjoni għandha l-għan li tnaqqas il-problem a ta’ dejta żgħira billi tirrelata l-forom ta’ kelma kkawżati mal-forma tad-dikjaratur tagħha. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti fuq dan is-suġġett iffoka fuq lingwi b’riżorsi għoljin. F’dan id-dokument, aħna jevalwaw approċċi translingwi għal lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi, speċjalment fil-kuntest ta’ lingwi Indjani morfoloġikament rikki. We test our model on six languages from two different families and develop linguistic insights into each model's performance.", 'mn': 'Лематизацийн зорилго нь үгийн нөлөөлдөг хэлбэрүүдийг өгөгдлийн асуудлыг багасгах зорилго юм. Гэхдээ энэ сэдэв дээрх өмнөх ажил ихэнх нь ихэнх баялаг хэл дээр анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бага баялаг боловсролын хэлний олон хэлний арга барилгыг үнэлэх, ялангуяа Индийн хэлний морфологийн баян хэлний тухай. Бид зургаан хэл дээр хоёр өөр гэр бүлийн загварыг шалгаж, загварын үйл ажиллагаанд хэлний ойлголтыг хөгжүүлдэг.', 'pl': 'Lemmatyzacja ma na celu zmniejszenie problemu rzadkich danych poprzez powiązanie przekształconych form słowa z jego formą słownika. Jednak większość wcześniejszych prac na ten temat skupiała się na językach o wysokich zasobach. W niniejszym artykule dokonano oceny podejść wielojęzycznych dla języków niskich zasobów, zwłaszcza w kontekście bogatych morfologicznie języków indyjskich. Testujemy nasz model na sześciu językach z dwóch różnych rodzin i opracowujemy językowy wgląd w wydajność każdego modelu.', 'ro': 'Lemmatizarea își propune să reducă problema datelor rare prin raportarea formelor inflectate ale unui cuvânt la forma dicționarului său. Cu toate acestea, cea mai mare parte a lucrărilor anterioare pe acest subiect s-a concentrat pe limbi cu resurse ridicate. În această lucrare, evaluăm abordările translingvistice pentru limbile cu resurse reduse, în special în contextul limbilor indiene bogate din punct de vedere morfologic. Testăm modelul nostru pe șase limbi din două familii diferite și dezvoltăm perspective lingvistice asupra performanțelor fiecărui model.', 'no': 'Lemmatiseringsmål er å redusera sparse dataproblemet ved å relaterja dei influserte formane av eit ord til ordbokforma sin. Dei fleste førre arbeida på dette emnet har imidlertid fokusert på høg ressursspråk. I denne papiret evaluerer vi fleire språk for låge ressursspråk, spesielt i konteksten av morfologisk rike indiske språk. Vi tester modellen vårt på seks språk frå to forskjellige familier og utviklar språk innsyning i utviklinga av kvar modell.', 'sr': 'Lematizacija je cilj da smanji problem rezervnih podataka povezujući utjecajne oblike reči sa njegovim oblikom rečnika. Međutim, većina prethodnog rada na ovoj temi fokusirala se na jezike visokih resursa. U ovom papiru procjenjujemo prejezičke pristupe jezika niskih resursa, posebno u kontekstu morfološki bogatih Indijskih jezika. Testiramo naš model na šest jezika iz dve različite porodice i razvijamo jezičke uvide u izvedbu svakog modela.', 'so': 'Heerarka waxaa loola jeedaa in dhibaatada macluumaadka yar ee la xiriira noocyada saaxiibka ah ee erayga oo ku saabsan foomka luqadiisa. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, shaqada hore ee la xiriiray madan waxay ku kalsoonaatay luqadaha rasmiga ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu qiimeynaynaa hababka luqadaha kala duwan ee luuqadaha hoose ee noocyada badan, khusuusan marka lagu jiro luqadaha hodanka ah ee Hindiyan. Tusaalkayaga waxaan ku tijaabinaynaa lix luuqadood oo ka mid ah laba qoys oo kala duduwan, waxaana horumarinaynaa aragtida luuqada, tusaale walba sameynta.', 'si': 'ලෙම්මාටිසයිස් අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. නමුත්, මේ විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩේ ගොඩක් අධාරණ භාෂාවට අධාරණය කරලා තියෙනවා. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි විශේෂ භාෂාව අඩුම භාෂාව සඳහා විශේෂ භාෂාව, විශේෂයෙන්ම විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ අපි වෙනස් පවුල දෙකක් ඉඳන් අපේ මොඩල් හතරක් භාෂාවට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සහ භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක අදහස් කරනවා', 'sv': 'Lemmatisering syftar till att minska det sparsamma dataproblemet genom att relatera böjda former av ett ord till dess ordform. Det mesta av det tidigare arbetet med detta ämne har dock fokuserat på språk med hög resurs. I denna uppsats utvärderar vi tvärspråkliga ansatser för lågresursspråk, särskilt mot bakgrund av morfologiskt rika indiska språk. Vi testar vår modell på sex språk från två olika familjer och utvecklar språkliga insikter i varje modells prestanda.', 'ta': 'அகராதி வடிவத்திற்கு பாதிக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு வார்த்தையை தொடர்பு கொண்டு சிறிய தகவல் பிரச்சனையை குறைக்க வேண்டும். ஆனால், இந்த தலைப்பில் முன்னேற்ற வேலை பெரும்பாலான மூலங்களை உயர்ந்த மூலங்களில் கவனம் செலுத்தியுள இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கு முன்னேற்றங்களை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும், குறைந்த மூலங்களில், குறைந்த மொழி நாம் இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான குடும்பங்களில் இருந்து எங்கள் மாதிரியை ஆறு மொழிகளில் சோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் ஒவ்வொர', 'ur': 'Lemmatization aims to reduce the sparse data problem by relating to the influenced forms of a word with its dictionary form. لیکن اس موضوع پر بہت سے پہلے کے کام بالا سرمایہ زبانوں پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت سی زبان کے مطابق کم سراسر زبانوں کے لئے مطابق کرسی زبان کے مطابق مطابق کرتے ہیں، مخصوصاً مورپولوژیکی ثروت هند زبانوں کے مطابق۔ ہم اپنی مدل کو چھ زبانوں سے دو مختلف خاندان سے امتحان کرتے ہیں اور ہر مدل کے عملکرد میں زبان شناسی نظریں پیدا کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bo\xa0Ľyiga ta\xa0ľminlovchi so\xa0Ľzni lug\xa0Ľatga bog\xa0Ľ'liq bo\xa0Ľlgan so'zning shakllarini kamaytirish mumkin. Lekin, bu mavzudagi eng birinchi vazifa juda katta manba tillariga foydalanadi. Bu qog\xa0Ľozda, biz qo'shimcha tillar uchun qiymatimiz, hususan morfologik hozirgi Hindiston tillarida. Biz o'zimizni ikki xil oillardan 6 tillar bilan tizimiz qilamiz va har bir modelning bajarishiga qo'llanmalarni o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Sự chỉnh tề nhằm giảm thiểu các vấn đề dữ liệu sơ sài bằng cách liên kết các dạng từ ngữ trong từ điển của nó. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các nghiên cứu trước về chủ đề này đã tập trung vào ngôn ngữ có nguồn cao. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đánh giá cách tiếp cận ngôn ngữ khác nhau cho ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên, đặc biệt là trong trường hợp có nhiều ngôn ngữ Ấn Độ. Chúng tôi thử s áu ngôn ngữ từ hai gia đình khác nhau và phát triển hiểu biết về ngôn ngữ của mỗi mô hình.', 'hr': 'Lemmatizacija je cilj smanjiti problem rezervnih podataka povezanjem s utjecanim oblicima riječi u oblik rečnika. Međutim, većina prethodnog rada na ovoj temi usredotočila se na jezike visokih resursa. U ovom papiru procjenjujemo preko jezika za niske jezike resursa, posebno u kontekstu morfološki bogatih Indijskih jezika. Testiramo naš model na šest jezika iz dvije različite obitelji i razvijamo jezičke uvide u izvršnost svakog modela.', 'da': 'Lemmatisering har til formål at reducere det sparsomme dataproblem ved at relatere de bøjede former af et ord til dets ordbogform. Men det meste af det tidligere arbejde med dette emne har fokuseret på sprog med høj ressource. I denne artikel evaluerer vi tværsprogede tilgange til lav ressource sprog, især i forbindelse med morfologisk rige indiske sprog. Vi tester vores model på seks sprog fra to forskellige familier og udvikler sproglig indsigt i hver model præstation.', 'nl': 'Lemmatisatie heeft als doel het schaarse dataprobleem te verminderen door de geïnfecteerde vormen van een woord te koppelen aan zijn woordenboek vorm. Het merendeel van het eerdere werk over dit onderwerp heeft zich echter gericht op talen met hoge resources. In dit artikel evalueren we cross-lingual benaderingen voor low resource talen, vooral in de context van morfologisch rijke Indiase talen. We testen ons model op zes talen uit twee verschillende families en ontwikkelen taalkundige inzichten in de prestaties van elk model.', 'de': 'Lemmatisierung zielt darauf ab, das Problem der spärlichen Daten zu reduzieren, indem die gebeugten Formen eines Wortes mit seiner Wörterbuchform in Beziehung gesetzt werden. Die meisten früheren Arbeiten zu diesem Thema konzentrierten sich jedoch auf Sprachen mit hohem Ressourcenanteil. In diesem Beitrag evaluieren wir sprachübergreifende Ansätze für ressourcenarme Sprachen, insbesondere im Kontext morphologisch reicher indischer Sprachen. Wir testen unser Modell an sechs Sprachen aus zwei verschiedenen Familien und entwickeln sprachliche Einblicke in die Leistung jedes Modells.', 'ko': 'Lemmatization은 단어의 굴절 형식을 사전 형식과 연결시켜 희소한 데이터 문제를 줄이는 데 목적을 두고 있다.그러나 이전에 이 주제에 관한 대부분의 업무는 고자원 언어에 집중되었다.본고에서 우리는 저자원 언어의 크로스 언어 방법, 특히 형태가 풍부한 인도 언어의 배경에서 평가했다.우리는 두 가족에서 온 여섯 가지 언어로 우리의 모델을 테스트하고 각 모델의 표현에 대해 언어 통찰을 했다.', 'fa': 'تغییرات هدف دارد که مشکل داده های ذخیره را با ارتباط به فرم های تاثیر داده شده یک کلمه به فرم کلمه اش کاهش دهد. ولی بیشتر کارهای قبلی روی این موضوع روی زبانهای منابع بالا تمرکز شده است. در این کاغذ، ما روش های متوسط زبان برای زبانهای کم منابع ارزیابی می کنیم، مخصوصا در محیط زبانهای هند ثروتمندی مورفولوژی. ما مدل خود را با شش زبان از دو خانواده متفاوت آزمایش می کنیم و به اجرای هر مدل تغییر دهیم.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe unakusudia kupunguza tatizo la taarifa zilizopungua kwa kuunganisha aina zilizoathirika ya neno kwa mfumo wake wa lugha. Hata hivyo, kazi nzuri zaidi katika mada hii imejikita kwenye lugha kubwa za rasilimali. Katika gazeti hili, tunatathmini mbinu za lugha zinazotumika kwa lugha ndogo za rasilimali, hususani katika muktadha wa lugha za Kihindi zenye utajiri wa kimaadilojia. Tunajaribu mtindo wetu katika lugha sita kutoka familia mbili tofauti na kuendeleza mitazamo ya lugha katika utendaji wa kila muundo.', 'bg': 'Лематизацията цели да намали проблема с редките данни чрез свързване на наклонените форми на дума с речниковата форма. Въпреки това, по-голямата част от предишната работа по тази тема е фокусирана върху езици с висок ресурс. В настоящата статия ние оценяваме междуезичните подходи за езици с нисък ресурс, особено в контекста на морфологично богати индийски езици. Тестваме модела си на шест езика от две различни семейства и разработваме лингвистични прозрения за изпълнението на всеки модел.', 'af': "Lemmatiseering doel doen om die spanseerde data probleem te verminder deur die inflekke vorms van 'n woord na sy woordeboekvorm te verwyder. Maar die meeste van die voorheede werk op hierdie onderwerp het gefokus op hoë hulpbron tale. In hierdie papier, ons evalueer kruistale toegang vir lae hulpbron tale, veral in die konteks van morfologiese ryk Indiese tale. Ons probeer on s model op ses tale van twee verskillende families en ontwikkel lingwisiese insigs in elke model se prestasie.", 'sq': 'Lematizimi synon të reduktojë problemin e të dhënave të vogla duke lidhur format e një fjale me form ën e fjalorit të tij. Megjithatë, shumica e punës së mëparshme në këtë temë është përqëndruar në gjuhët e larta të burimeve. Në këtë letër, ne vlerësojmë qasjet ndërgjuhësore për gjuhët e ulëta të burimeve, veçanërisht në kontekstin e gjuhëve indiane morfologikisht të pasura. Ne testojmë modelin tonë në gjashtë gjuhë nga dy familje të ndryshme dhe zhvillojmë pamje gjuhësore në shfaqjen e çdo modeli.', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ወደ መዝገብ ፎርማት በሚያያያየው የዳታ መከራን ለማጎድል ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን አብዛኛዎቹ በዚህ ጉዳይ ላይ የመጀመሪያው ሥራ ከፍተኛ የድህረ ገጽ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ተማክሮአል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላትን እናስተውላለን፤ ይልቁንም በሞፎሎጂ ባለ ሀብታሞች የህንድ ቋንቋዎች በተደረገ ግንኙነት እናስተውላለን፡፡ የስድስት ቋንቋ ምሳሌችንን ከሁለት ልዩ ወገኖች እናፈትናለን የቋንቋውንም አስተያየት ወደ ሁሉም ሞዴል አድራሻ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեմմատիզացիան նպատակում է նվազեցնել թեթև տվյալների խնդիրը՝ կապելով բառի առաջացած ձևերը բառարանի ձևի հետ: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ աշխատանքի մեծ մասը այս թեմայի վրա կենտրոնացել է բարձր ռեսուրսների լեզուների վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք գնահատում ենք ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուների փոխլեզվով մոտեցումները, հատկապես մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ հնդկական լեզուների կոնտեքստում: Մենք փորձում ենք մեր մոդելը երկու տարբեր ընտանիքներից վեց լեզուների վրա և զարգանում ենք լեզվական ընկալումներ յուրաքանչյուր մոդելի ներկայացումների մեջ:', 'id': 'Lemmatisasi bermaksud untuk mengurangi masalah data ringan dengan menghubungkan bentuk-bentuk suatu kata ke bentuk kamus. Namun, kebanyakan pekerjaan sebelumnya pada topik ini telah fokus pada bahasa sumber daya tinggi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengevaluasi pendekatan saling bahasa untuk bahasa sumber daya rendah, terutama dalam konteks bahasa India yang kaya secara morfologis. Kami menguji model kami pada enam bahasa dari dua keluarga yang berbeda dan mengembangkan pandangan bahasa dalam pertunjukan setiap model.', 'tr': 'Lemmatization sözlük biçiminde täsirlenen şekilleri bilen ýakyn maglumatyň meselesini azaltmak maksady. Ýöne bu temada öňki işiň köpüsi ýokary ressurs dillerine üns berdi. Bu kagyzda, biz esasy dillerde düşük resurslar dili üçin, iň-görä morpholojik baý Hindistan dilleriniň kontekstinde düşünýäris. Biz nusgymyzy iki dürli maşgaladan alty dilde barýarys we her nusgynyň başarylygyna görä lingwistiki düşünjeleri gelişýäris.', 'az': 'Lemmatizat sözlük formasına bağlı olaraq küçük məlumat problemini azaltmaq məqsədilə məqsədildir. Lakin bu məsələnin əvvəlki işinin çoxu yüksək ressurs dillərinə odaqlandı. Bu kağızda, düşük ressurs dillərinin çoxlu dil tərzlərini değerləşdiririk, özlərinə də morfolojik zəngin Hindistan dillərinin məsələsində. Biz modelimizi iki müxtəlif ailədən altı dildə imtahana çəkirik və hər modelinin performansına dil baxımını təşkil edirik.', 'bn': 'লেম্যাটাইজেশনের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে স্পার ডাটা সমস্যা কমিয়ে দিতে পারে তার অভিভাবক ফর্মে একটি শব্দের সাথে যুক্ত করে। তবে এই বিষয়টির বেশীরভাগ পূর্ববর্তী কাজ উচ্চ সম্পদ ভাষায় মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নিম্ন রিসোর্স ভাষার জন্য ক্রস-ভাষার প্রতিক্রিয়া মূল্যায়ন করি, বিশেষ করে নৈতিক ভারতীয় ভাষার প্রেক্ষা আমরা আমাদের মডেল দুই ভিন্ন পরিবার থেকে ছয় ভাষায় পরীক্ষা করি এবং প্রত্যেক মডেলের প্রদর্শনের ভাষার ভাষায় ভাষার দৃষ্', 'bs': 'Lemmatizacija cilja je smanjiti problem rezervnih podataka povezanjem s utjecanim oblicima riječi u oblik rečnika. Međutim, većina prethodnog rada na ovoj temi fokusirala se na jezike visokih resursa. U ovom papiru procjenjujemo cross-lingual approaches za niske jezike resursa, posebno u kontekstu morfološki bogatih Indijskih jezika. Testiramo naš model na šest jezika iz dvije različite porodice i razvijamo jezičke uvide u izvedbu svakog modela.', 'ca': "La lemmatització té l'objectiu de reduir el problem a escas de les dades relacionant les formes influïdes d'una paraula amb la seva forma diccionaria. Tot i així, la majoria de la feina anterior en aquest tema s'ha centrat en llengües d'alt recurso. En aquest paper, evaluem els enfocaments translingües de llengües de baix recursos, especialment en el context de llengües indies morfològicament rics. Testem el nostre model en sis llengües de dues famílies diferents i desenvolupem una visió lingüística sobre l'actuació de cada model.", 'cs': 'Lemmatizace si klade za cíl snížit řídký datový problém tím, že propojuje deformované formy slova s jeho slovníkovou formou. Nicméně, většina předchozí práce na toto téma se zaměřila na jazyky s vysokými zdroji. V tomto článku hodnotíme mezijazyčné přístupy pro jazyky s nízkými zdroji, zejména v kontextu morfologicky bohatých indických jazyků. Testujeme náš model na šesti jazycích ze dvou různých rodin a rozvíjíme jazykové poznatky o výkonu každého modelu.', 'et': 'Lemmatiseerimise eesmärk on vähendada hõredat andmeprobleemi, sidudes sõna paindlikud vormid sõnastiku vormiga. Enamik varasemaid tööd sellel teemal on aga keskendunud suure ressursiga keeltele. Käesolevas töös hindame keeleüleseid lähenemisviise vähese ressursiga keeltele, eriti morfoloogiliselt rikkalike India keelte kontekstis. Testime oma mudelit kuuel keelel kahest erinevast perest ja arendame keelelisi ülevaadeid iga mudeli tulemuslikkusest.', 'fi': 'Lematisoinnin tavoitteena on vähentää niukkaa dataongelmaa liittämällä sanan taivutetut muodot sanastomuotoonsa. Suurin osa aiemmista tätä aihetta koskevista töistä on kuitenkin keskittynyt korkean resurssin kieliin. Tässä artikkelissa arvioidaan monikielisiä lähestymistapoja vähävaraisille kielille, erityisesti morfologisesti rikkaille intialaisille kielille. Testaamme malliamme kuudella kielellä kahdesta eri perheestä ja kehitämme kielellisiä näkemyksiä kunkin mallin suorituskyvystä.', 'sk': 'Lematizacija je namenjena zmanjšanju redkih podatkovnih problemov s povezovanjem upognjenih oblik besede z njeno slovarsko obliko. Vendar se je večina predhodnega dela na tej temi osredotočila na jezike z visokimi viri. V prispevku smo ocenili medjezične pristope za jezike z nizkimi viri, zlasti v kontekstu morfološko bogatih indijskih jezikov. Naš model testiramo na šestih jezikih iz dveh različnih družin in razvijamo jezikovne vpoglede v delovanje vsakega modela.', 'he': 'הלמטיזציה מתכוונת להפחית את בעיית הנתונים הנמוכות על ידי הקשר את צורות המילה שנגרמו לצורת המילון שלה. עם זאת, רוב העבודה הקודמת על הנושא הזה התמקדה בשפות משאבים גבוהות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מעריכים גישות בין שפות לשפות נמוכות לשפות משאבים, במיוחד בקשר לשפות הודיות עשירות מורפולוגית. אנחנו בודקים את המודל שלנו על שש שפות משני משפחות שונות ופתחים תובנות שפתיות לתוך ההופעה של כל מודל.', 'jv': 'Lematizer iku iku disimpen kelompok perkoro sing dadi sing berarti dadi bisa gambar kelompok tarjamahan kanggo kelompok tarjamahan kanggo kelompok Nanging, akeh sing sabanjuré piye cara-cara sing digawe karo tema iki, sing ngomong bantuan ing langa banjure. Nang mapun iki, kita deweke nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo langgar banter Awak dhéwé éntuk model nyeneng sampek ing pancen liyane ing sak luwih kaya bantuan ingkang sampek.', 'ha': "@ item: inmenu Text Completion Amma, mafi yawan aikin da ya gabãta a kan wannan madaidaici, yana da muhimmi zuwa harshen masu sarki. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙaddara hanyoyin lugha masu ƙaranci na fassarar-harshen, kuma hususanci, a cikin muhimman lugha masu matalauci na fassarar-harshen Kihindi. Tuna jarraba misalinmu a cikin lugha sita daga jama'a biyu dabam'a, kuma munã ƙarfafa fassarar harshe zuwa ga cikakken kõwace misalin.", 'bo': 'Lemmatization་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཅིག་གི་དབྱིབས་ཚུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཉར་ཆུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ ཡིན་ནའང་། གནད་དོན་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དོན་ཚན་ཧོས་མའི་ལས་ཀ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུ་ནོར་སྐད་རིགས་མཐོ་པོ་ལ་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རིགས་སྔའི་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་ནི་རི ང་ཚོའི་མིག'}
{'en': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'pt': 'Pontuação Neural Automatizada de Ensaios Incorporando Recursos Artesanais', 'ar': 'تقييم مقال عصبي آلي يشتمل على ميزات مصنوعة يدويًا', 'fr': "Notation d'essai automatisée neuronale intégrant des fonctionnalités artisanales", 'es': 'Puntuación de ensayos automatizada neuronal que incorpora características artesanales', 'ja': '手作りの特徴を取り入れたニューラルオートメーションのエッセイスコアリング', 'zh': '含手工夫神经自论文评分', 'ru': 'Нейронная автоматизированная оценка эссе, включающая функции ручной работы', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका स्वचालित निबंध स्कोरिंग Handcrafted सुविधाओं को शामिल करना', 'ga': 'Scóráil Aiste Uathoibrithe Néaracha a Ionchorpraíonn Gnéithe Lámhcheardaithe', 'ka': 'ნეირალური ავტომატიური Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'hu': 'Neural automatizált esszé pontozás, amely magában foglalja a kézműves funkciókat', 'el': 'Νευρική αυτοματοποιημένη βαθμολογία δοκιμίων που περιλαμβάνει χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά', 'it': 'Neural Automated Sagy Scoring Incorporando caratteristiche artigianali', 'lt': 'Neuraliniai automatizuoti bandymų rezultatai su rankiniu būdu', 'kk': 'Невралды автоматтық Essay Scoring қол құрылған мүмкіндіктері', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d സ്വയമാക്കിയ എസ്സി സ്കോരിങ്ങ് കൈക്രാപ്റ്റ് ചെയ്ത വിശേഷതകള്\u200d', 'mk': 'Неурално автоматизирано оценување на тестот вклучувајќи рачни објекти', 'ms': 'Nilai Ujian Otomatik Neural yang Mengangkut Ciri-ciri Kerja Tangan', 'mt': 'Punteġġ ta’ Eżami Newrali Awtomatizzat li jinkorpora Karatteristiċi Magħmula bl-idejn', 'no': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'mn': 'Сэтэй автоматжуулагдсан Эссэй сүлжээний Гараа бүтээгдэхүүн', 'pl': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Zawierający ręcznie wykonane cechy', 'ro': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring care încorporează caracteristici artizanale', 'so': 'Xafiisyada qofka gacanta lagu qabanayo', 'sr': 'Neuralno automatski Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය', 'sv': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'ta': 'புதிய தன்னியக்கமாக எஸ்சி வருடுதல் கைமுறையாக்கப்பட்ட பண்புகள்', 'ur': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống đánh bạc Ngạc nhiên tự động', 'bg': 'Неврологично автоматизирано есе оценяване, включващо ръчно изработени функции', 'da': 'Neural Automatiseret Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'hr': 'Neuralno automatski Essay Scoring Incorporating Handmade Features', 'nl': 'Neural Geautomatiseerde Essay Scoring met handgemaakte functies', 'de': 'Neuronale automatisierte Essay Scoring mit handgefertigten Funktionen', 'id': 'Puncakan Ujian Otomatis Neural yang Mengangkut Features Manual', 'ko': '인공 신경 자동 작문 평점', 'fa': 'ویژگی\u200cهای دستی\u200cساخته\u200cشده\u200cی اساسی\u200cهای عصبی خودکار', 'sw': 'Tamko za Kuchochea Essay', 'tr': 'Nöral Otomatik Essay Görkezilişi Ellerini Girişdirme Features', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e testit të automatizuar nervore që përfshin funksione të ndërtuara me dorë', 'af': 'Neural Automaties Essay Scoring Inkorporeer Handcrafted Features', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ավտոմացված փորձի գնահատականներ, որոնք ներառում են ձեռագործված հատկություններ', 'az': 'Nöral Avtomatik Essay Scoring Əl Yapılmış Özellikləri', 'bs': 'Neuralno automatski Essay Scoring Incorporating Handmade Features', 'bn': 'নিউরেল স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এসসি স্কোরিং ইনকোরপোর্টিং হ্যান্ডক্র্যাপ্ট করা বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'ca': 'Puntuació Neural Automated Essay Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'cs': 'Neurální automatizované bodování esejí obsahující ručně vyráběné funkce', 'et': 'Neuraalne automatiseeritud essee skoorimine, mis sisaldab käsitöö funktsioone', 'fi': 'Neuroiden automatisoitu esseen pisteytys, joka sisältää käsityönä tehtyjä ominaisuuksia', 'jv': 'Neral Automated essay', 'he': 'ניתוח ניתוח אוטומטי עצבי מכיל תכונות משומשות יד', 'ha': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'bo': 'Neural Automated Essay Scoring Incorporating Handcrafted Features', 'sk': 'Nevralno avtomatizirano ocenjevanje eseja, ki vključuje ročno izdelane funkcije'}
{'en': 'Automated essay scoring (AES) is the task of automatically assigning scores to essays as an alternative to grading by human raters. Conventional AES typically relies on handcrafted features, whereas recent studies have proposed AES models based on deep neural networks (DNNs) to obviate the need for feature engineering. Furthermore, hybrid methods that integrate handcrafted features in a DNN-AES model have been recently developed and have achieved state-of-the-art accuracy. One of the most popular hybrid methods is formulated as a DNN-AES model with an additional recurrent neural network (RNN) that processes a sequence of handcrafted sentence-level features. However, this method has the following problems : 1) It can not incorporate effective essay-level features developed in previous AES research. 2) It greatly increases the numbers of model parameters and tuning parameters, increasing the difficulty of model training. 3) It has an additional RNN to process sentence-level features, enabling extension to various DNN-AES models complex. To resolve these problems, we propose a new hybrid method that integrates handcrafted essay-level features into a DNN-AES model. Specifically, our method concatenates handcrafted essay-level features to a distributed essay representation vector, which is obtained from an intermediate layer of a DNN-AES model. Our method is a simple DNN-AES extension, but significantly improves scoring accuracy.', 'fr': "La notation automatique des dissertations (AES) consiste à attribuer automatiquement des notes aux dissertations au lieu de la notation par des évaluateurs humains. L'AES conventionnel repose généralement sur des caractéristiques fabriquées à la main, alors que des études récentes ont proposé des modèles AES basés sur des réseaux de neurones profonds (DNN) pour éviter le besoin d'ingénierie des caractéristiques. En outre, des méthodes hybrides intégrant des fonctionnalités artisanales dans un modèle DNN-AES ont récemment été développées et ont atteint une précision de pointe. L'une des méthodes hybrides les plus populaires est formulée sous la forme d'un modèle DNN-AES avec un réseau neuronal récurrent (RNN) supplémentaire qui traite une séquence de caractéristiques au niveau de la phrase fabriquées à la main. Cependant, cette méthode présente les problèmes suivants\xa0: 1) Elle ne peut pas intégrer des caractéristiques efficaces au niveau de l'essai développées lors de recherches antérieures sur l'AES. 2) Elle augmente considérablement le nombre de paramètres de modèle et de paramètres de réglage, ce qui augmente la difficulté de l'apprentissage du modèle. 3) Elle possède un RNN supplémentaire pour traiter les phrases fonctionnalités de niveau, permettant l'extension à divers modèles DNN-AES complexes. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode hybride qui intègre des fonctionnalités de niveau essai artisanales dans un modèle DNN-AES. Plus précisément, notre méthode concatène des caractéristiques de niveau essai fabriquées à la main à un vecteur de représentation d'essai distribué, qui est obtenu à partir d'une couche intermédiaire d'un modèle DNN-AES. Notre méthode est une simple extension DNN-AES, mais elle améliore considérablement la précision des scores.", 'ar': 'الدرجات الآلية للمقالات (AES) هي مهمة تعيين الدرجات تلقائيًا للمقالات كبديل لتصنيف مقيمين بشريين. تعتمد AES التقليدية عادةً على الميزات المصنوعة يدويًا ، في حين اقترحت الدراسات الحديثة نماذج AES بناءً على الشبكات العصبية العميقة (DNNs) لتجنب الحاجة إلى هندسة الميزات. علاوة على ذلك ، تم تطوير الأساليب الهجينة التي تدمج الميزات المصنوعة يدويًا في نموذج DNN-AES مؤخرًا وحققت دقة متطورة. تمت صياغة إحدى أكثر الطرق الهجينة شيوعًا كنموذج DNN-AES مع شبكة عصبية متكررة إضافية (RNN) تعالج سلسلة من الميزات اليدوية على مستوى الجملة. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه الطريقة بها المشكلات التالية: 1) لا يمكنها دمج ميزات فعالة على مستوى المقالة تم تطويرها في بحث AES السابق. 2) يزيد بشكل كبير من عدد معلمات النموذج ومعلمات الضبط ، مما يزيد من صعوبة تدريب النموذج. 3) يحتوي على RNN إضافي لمعالجة ميزات على مستوى الجملة ، مما يتيح الامتداد إلى مختلف نماذج DNN-AES المعقدة. لحل هذه المشكلات ، نقترح طريقة هجينة جديدة تدمج ميزات مستوى المقالة المصنوعة يدويًا في نموذج DNN-AES. على وجه التحديد ، تسلسل طريقتنا ميزات مستوى المقالة المصنوعة يدويًا إلى متجه تمثيل المقالة الموزعة ، والذي يتم الحصول عليه من طبقة وسيطة لنموذج DNN-AES. طريقتنا هي امتداد بسيط لـ DNN-AES ، لكنها تحسن دقة التسجيل بشكل كبير.', 'pt': 'A pontuação automatizada de redações (AES) é a tarefa de atribuir automaticamente pontuações a redações como uma alternativa à avaliação por avaliadores humanos. O AES convencional normalmente depende de recursos artesanais, enquanto estudos recentes propuseram modelos de AES baseados em redes neurais profundas (DNNs) para evitar a necessidade de engenharia de recursos. Além disso, métodos híbridos que integram recursos artesanais em um modelo DNN-AES foram desenvolvidos recentemente e alcançaram precisão de última geração. Um dos métodos híbridos mais populares é formulado como um modelo DNN-AES com uma rede neural recorrente (RNN) adicional que processa uma sequência de recursos artesanais em nível de sentença. No entanto, este método tem os seguintes problemas: 1) Não pode incorporar recursos de nível de ensaio eficazes desenvolvidos em pesquisas anteriores do AES. 2) Aumenta muito o número de parâmetros do modelo e parâmetros de ajuste, aumentando a dificuldade de treinamento do modelo. 3) Possui um RNN adicional para processar recursos em nível de sentença, possibilitando extensão a diversos modelos DNN-AES complexos. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos um novo método híbrido que integra recursos artesanais de nível de ensaio em um modelo DNN-AES. Especificamente, nosso método concatena recursos de nível de ensaio artesanais a um vetor de representação de ensaio distribuído, que é obtido a partir de uma camada intermediária de um modelo DNN-AES. Nosso método é uma extensão DNN-AES simples, mas melhora significativamente a precisão da pontuação.', 'es': 'La puntuación automática de ensayos (AES) es la tarea de asignar automáticamente puntuaciones a los ensayos como alternativa a la calificación por parte de evaluadores humanos. La AES convencional generalmente se basa en funciones hechas a mano, mientras que estudios recientes han propuesto modelos de AES basados en redes neuronales profundas (DNN) para evitar la necesidad de ingeniería de funciones. Además, recientemente se han desarrollado métodos híbridos que integran características artesanales en un modelo DNN-AES y han logrado una precisión de vanguardia. Uno de los métodos híbridos más populares se formula como un modelo DNN-AES con una red neuronal recurrente (RNN) adicional que procesa una secuencia de características hechas a mano a nivel de oración. Sin embargo, este método tiene los siguientes problemas: 1) No puede incorporar características efectivas a nivel de ensayo desarrolladas en investigaciones anteriores de AES. 2) Aumenta en gran medida el número de parámetros del modelo y los parámetros de ajuste, lo que aumenta la dificultad del entrenamiento del modelo. 3) Tiene un RNN adicional para procesar la sentencia características de nivel, lo que permite la extensión a varios modelos complejos de DNN-AES. Para resolver estos problemas, proponemos un nuevo método híbrido que integra funciones artesanales a nivel de ensayo en un modelo DNN-AES. Específicamente, nuestro método concatena características artesanales a nivel de ensayo en un vector de representación de ensayo distribuido, que se obtiene de una capa intermedia de un modelo DNN-AES. Nuestro método es una extensión simple de DNN-AES, pero mejora significativamente la precisión de la puntuación.', 'ja': '自動エッセイスコアリング（ AES ）は、人間の評価者による採点の代替として、自動的にエッセイにスコアを割り当てる作業です。 従来のAESは、典型的には手作りの特徴に依存しているが、最近の研究では、深層ニューラルネットワーク（ DNN ）に基づいたAESモデルを提案し、特徴工学の必要性を排除している。 さらに、DNN - AESモデルに手作り機能を統合したハイブリッド手法が最近開発され、最先端の精度を実現しています。 最も一般的なハイブリッド方法の１つは、一連の手作りの文章レベルの特徴を処理する追加の再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ ＲＮＮ ）を有するＤＮＮ － ＡＥＳモデルとして定式化される。 しかしながら、この方法には、1)これまでのAES研究で開発された有効なエッセイレベルの機能を組み込むことができないこと、2)モデルパラメータとチューニングパラメータの数を大幅に増やし、モデルトレーニングの難易度を高めること、3)文章レベルの機能を処理するための追加のRNNを持ち、さまざまなDNN - AESモデルの複雑な拡張を可能にすることが課題である。 これらの問題を解決するために、手作りのエッセイレベルの機能をDNN - AESモデルに統合する新しいハイブリッド方法を提案します。 具体的には、DNN - AESモデルの中間層から得られる分散エッセイ表現ベクトルに、手作りのエッセイレベルの特徴を連結する方法である。 本方法は単純なDNN - AES拡張であるが、スコアリング精度を著しく向上させる。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित निबंध स्कोरिंग (एईएस) मानव रेटर्स द्वारा ग्रेडिंग के विकल्प के रूप में निबंधों को स्वचालित रूप से स्कोर असाइन करने का कार्य है। पारंपरिक एईएस आमतौर पर हस्तनिर्मित सुविधाओं पर निर्भर करता है, जबकि हाल के अध्ययनों ने फीचर इंजीनियरिंग की आवश्यकता को दूर करने के लिए गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (डीएनएन) के आधार पर एईएस मॉडल का प्रस्ताव दिया है। इसके अलावा, हाइब्रिड तरीके जो डीएनएन-एईएस मॉडल में हस्तशिल्प सुविधाओं को एकीकृत करते हैं, उन्हें हाल ही में विकसित किया गया है और अत्याधुनिक सटीकता हासिल की है। सबसे लोकप्रिय हाइब्रिड विधियों में से एक को एक अतिरिक्त आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (आरएनएन) के साथ एक डीएनएन-एईएस मॉडल के रूप में तैयार किया गया है जो हस्तनिर्मित वाक्य-स्तर की विशेषताओं के अनुक्रम को संसाधित करता है। हालांकि, इस विधि में निम्नलिखित समस्याएं हैं: 1) यह पिछले एईएस अनुसंधान में विकसित प्रभावी निबंध-स्तर की विशेषताओं को शामिल नहीं कर सकता है। 2) यह मॉडल पैरामीटर और ट्यूनिंग पैरामीटर की संख्या को बहुत बढ़ाता है, जिससे मॉडल प्रशिक्षण की कठिनाई बढ़ जाती है। 3) इसमें वाक्य-स्तर की विशेषताओं को संसाधित करने के लिए एक अतिरिक्त आरएनएन है, जो विभिन्न डीएनएन-एईएस मॉडल परिसर में विस्तार को सक्षम करता है। इन समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए, हम एक नई हाइब्रिड विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक DNN-AES मॉडल में handcrafted निबंध-स्तर की सुविधाओं को एकीकृत करता है। विशेष रूप से, हमारी विधि एक वितरित निबंध प्रतिनिधित्व वेक्टर, जो एक DNN-AES मॉडल की एक मध्यवर्ती परत से प्राप्त किया जाता है करने के लिए handcrafted निबंध स्तर सुविधाओं concatenates. हमारी विधि एक सरल DNN-AES विस्तार है, लेकिन काफी स्कोरिंग सटीकता में सुधार करता है।', 'zh': '自论文者评分(AES)自为论分数之任,为人工评分员评分代方案也。 旧AES常赖工作之征,而近者讲求深神经网络(DNN)之AES,以消其求。 近发手工所制DNN-AES模形混合之法,以成先进之精。 其最流行混合者为DNN-AES模,其额外递归神经网络(RNN),一系手工之句。 然其法有以下:1)其不能含前AES论功有效。 2)大增模参数及调优参数之数,增模形之难。 3)其有额外之RNN以处句功,而可以广诸DNN-AES之形。 为此一法,当集手工论文于DNN-AES模形中。 具体来说,吾法以手工所制论文,特徵属分布式论文示向量,当向量于DNN-AES模形之中间层得之。 吾道一简 DNN-AES 广,而著为评分准确性。', 'ru': 'Автоматизированная оценка эссе (AES) - это задача автоматического присвоения баллов эссе в качестве альтернативы оценке экспертами-человеками. Обычные AES, как правило, полагаются на особенности ручной работы, в то время как недавние исследования предложили модели AES, основанные на глубоких нейронных сетях (DNN), чтобы устранить необходимость в разработке функций. Кроме того, недавно были разработаны гибридные методы, которые интегрируют функции ручной работы в модель DNN-AES и достигли самой современной точности. Один из самых популярных гибридных методов сформулирован в виде модели DNN-AES с дополнительной рекуррентной нейронной сетью (RNN), которая обрабатывает последовательность функций на уровне предложений ручной работы. Однако этот метод имеет следующие проблемы: 1) он не может включать эффективные функции уровня эссе, разработанные в предыдущем исследовании AES. 2) он значительно увеличивает количество параметров модели и параметров настройки, увеличивая сложность обучения модели. 3) он имеет дополнительный RNN для обработки функций уровня предложения, что позволяет расширить к различным моделям DNN-AES комплекс. Чтобы решить эти проблемы, мы предлагаем новый гибридный метод, который интегрирует функции ручной работы на уровне эссе в модель DNN-AES. В частности, наш метод объединяет ручные характеристики уровня эссе в распределенный вектор представления эссе, который получается из промежуточного слоя модели DNN-AES. Наш метод представляет собой простое расширение DNN-AES, но значительно повышает точность оценки.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le scóráil uathoibrithe aistí (AES) scóir a shannadh go huathoibríoch ar aistí mar mhalairt ar ghrádú ag rátaitheoirí daonna. Go hiondúil braitheann AES traidisiúnta ar ghnéithe lámhdhéanta, ach mhol staidéir le déanaí samhlacha AES bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha doimhne (DNNanna) chun an gá atá le hinnealtóireacht ghné a sheachaint. Ina theannta sin, forbraíodh modhanna hibrideacha a chomhtháthaíonn gnéithe lámhdhéanta i samhail DNN-AES le déanaí agus tá cruinneas den scoth bainte amach acu. Ceaptar ceann de na modhanna hibrideacha is coitianta mar mhúnla DNN-AES le líonra néaraíoch athfhillteach breise (RNN) a phróiseálann seicheamh gnéithe ar leibhéal na habairte lámhdhéanta. Mar sin féin, tá na fadhbanna seo a leanas ag baint leis an modh seo: 1) Ní féidir leis gnéithe éifeachtacha ag leibhéal aistí a forbraíodh i dtaighde AES roimhe seo a chuimsiú. 2) Méadaíonn sé go mór líon na bparaiméadar múnla agus na paraiméadair tiúnta, ag méadú deacracht oiliúna múnla. 3) Tá RNN breise aige chun gnéithe leibhéal na habairte a phróiseáil, rud a chumasaíonn síneadh le coimpléasc samhlacha DNN-AES éagsúla. Chun na fadhbanna seo a réiteach, molaimid modh hibrideach nua a chomhtháthaíonn gnéithe leibhéal aistí de dhéantús an duine i múnla DNN-AES. Go sonrach, comhcheanglaíonn ár modh gnéithe leibhéal aistí de dhéantús an duine le veicteoir dáilte ionadaíochta aistí, a fhaightear ó shraith idirmheánach de shamhail DNN-AES. Is síneadh simplí DNN-AES é ár modh, ach feabhsaíonn sé cruinneas scórála go suntasach.', 'hu': 'Az automatizált esszék pontszámozás (AES) az a feladat, hogy a pontszámokat automatikusan hozzárendelje esszékhez, mint az emberi osztályozók által végzett osztályozás alternatívája. A hagyományos AES jellemzően kézzel készített funkciókra támaszkodik, míg a legutóbbi tanulmányok a mély neurális hálózatokon (DNN) alapuló AES modelleket javasolták, hogy elkerüljék a funkciótervezés szükségességét. Ezenkívül a DNN-AES modellben kézzel készített funkciókat integráló hibrid módszereket nemrégiben fejlesztették ki, és a legkorszerűbb pontosságot érték el. Az egyik legnépszerűbb hibrid módszer DNN-AES modellként kerül kialakításra egy további visszatérő neurális hálózattal (RNN), amely kézzel készített mondatszintű funkciókat dolgoz fel. Ennek a módszernek azonban a következő problémái vannak: 1) A korábbi AES kutatásokban kifejlesztett hatékony esszé-szintű funkciókat nem tudja magába foglalni. 2) Jelentősen növeli a modellparaméterek és a hangolási paraméterek számát, növeli a modellképzés nehézségét. 3) Van egy további RNN a mondatszintű funkciók feldolgozására, lehetővé téve a különböző DNN-AES modellek komplex kiterjesztését. A problémák megoldása érdekében egy új hibrid módszert javasolunk, amely kézzel készített esszé szintű funkciókat integrál egy DNN-AES modellbe. Módszerünk konkrétan a kézzel készített esszé-szintű jellemzőket egy elosztott esszé reprezentációs vektorral összekapcsolja, amely egy DNN-AES modell köztes rétegéből nyert. Módszerünk egy egyszerű DNN-AES kiterjesztés, de jelentősen javítja a pontszámozás pontosságát.', 'el': 'Η αυτοματοποιημένη βαθμολογία δοκίμων (AES) είναι το καθήκον της αυτόματης αντιστοίχισης βαθμολογιών σε δοκίμια ως εναλλακτική λύση στη βαθμολόγηση από ανθρώπους αξιολογητές. Τα συμβατικά AES συνήθως βασίζονται σε χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά, ενώ πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν προτείνει μοντέλα AES βασισμένα σε βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα (DNN) για να αποφευχθεί η ανάγκη για μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών. Επιπλέον, υβριδικές μέθοδοι που ενσωματώνουν χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά σε ένα μοντέλο έχουν αναπτυχθεί πρόσφατα και έχουν επιτύχει ακρίβεια τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Μια από τις πιο δημοφιλείς υβριδικές μεθόδους διατυπώνεται ως μοντέλο με ένα πρόσθετο επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο (RNN) που επεξεργάζεται μια ακολουθία χειροποίητων χαρακτηριστικών σε επίπεδο πρότασης. Ωστόσο, αυτή η μέθοδος έχει τα ακόλουθα προβλήματα: 1) Δεν μπορεί να ενσωματώσει αποτελεσματικά χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο δοκίμου που αναπτύχθηκαν σε προηγούμενη έρευνα ΑΕS. 2) Αυξάνει σημαντικά τους αριθμούς των παραμέτρων μοντέλου και των παραμέτρων συντονισμού, αυξάνοντας τη δυσκολία της κατάρτισης προτύπων. 3) Έχει ένα πρόσθετο για την επεξεργασία χαρακτηριστικών σε επίπεδο πρότασης, επιτρέποντας την επέκταση σε διάφορα συγκροτήματα μοντέλων. Για την επίλυση αυτών των προβλημάτων, προτείνουμε μια νέα υβριδική μέθοδο που ενσωματώνει χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο δοκίμου σε ένα μοντέλο DNN-AES. Συγκεκριμένα, η μέθοδος μας συνδέει χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο δοκίμου σε ένα διανεμημένο διάνυσμα αναπαράστασης δοκίμου, το οποίο λαμβάνεται από ένα ενδιάμεσο στρώμα ενός μοντέλου. Η μέθοδος μας είναι μια απλή επέκταση αλλά βελτιώνει σημαντικά την ακρίβεια βαθμολογίας.', 'it': "Automated essay scoring (AES) è il compito di assegnare automaticamente punteggi ai saggi come alternativa alla valutazione da parte dei valutatori umani. L'AES convenzionale si basa tipicamente su caratteristiche artigianali, mentre studi recenti hanno proposto modelli AES basati su reti neurali profonde (DNN) per ovviare alla necessità di feature engineering. Inoltre, metodi ibridi che integrano caratteristiche artigianali in un modello DNN-AES sono stati recentemente sviluppati e hanno raggiunto una precisione all'avanguardia. Uno dei metodi ibridi più popolari è formulato come modello DNN-AES con una rete neurale ricorrente aggiuntiva (RNN) che elabora una sequenza di caratteristiche a livello di frase artigianali. Tuttavia, questo metodo presenta i seguenti problemi: 1) Non può incorporare funzionalità efficaci a livello di saggio sviluppate in precedenti ricerche AES. 2) Aumenta notevolmente il numero dei parametri del modello e dei parametri di sintonizzazione, aumentando la difficoltà della formazione del modello. 3) Ha un RNN aggiuntivo per elaborare funzioni a livello di frase, consentendo l'estensione a vari modelli DNN-AES complessi. Per risolvere questi problemi, proponiamo un nuovo metodo ibrido che integra funzionalità artigianali a livello di saggio in un modello DNN-AES. Nello specifico, il nostro metodo concatena caratteristiche artigianali a livello di saggio ad un vettore distribuito di rappresentazione del saggio, che è ottenuto da uno strato intermedio di un modello DNN-AES. Il nostro metodo è una semplice estensione DNN-AES, ma migliora significativamente la precisione del punteggio.", 'lt': 'Automatizuotas egzaminų taškas (AES) yra užduotis automatiškai priskirti egzaminus taškams kaip alternatyvą žmonių vertinimui. Įprastinė AES paprastai grindžiama rankiniu būdu, o neseniai atliktuose tyrimuose pasiūlyti giliuosiuose nerviniuose tinkluose (DNN) pagrįsti AES modeliai, kad būtų išvengta savybių inžinerijos poreikio. Be to, neseniai buvo sukurti hibridiniai metodai, kuriais į DNN-AES model į įtraukiamos rankinės įrangos savybės, ir pasiektas naujausias tikslumas. One of the most popular hybrid methods is formulated as a DNN-AES model with an additional recurrent neural network (RNN) that processes a sequence of handcrafted sentence-level features.  Tačiau šis metodas turi šias problemas: 1) jis negali įtraukti veiksmingų egzaminų lygio savybių, sukurtų ankstesniuose AES tyrimuose. 2) Ji gerokai padidina modelio parametrų ir koregavimo parametrų skaičių ir didina modelio mokymo sunkumus. 3) Ji turi papildomą RNR, skirtą apdoroti sakinių lygį, leidžiančią išplėsti įvairių DNN-AES modelių kompleksą. Siekiant išspręsti šias problemas, siūlome naują hibridinį metodą, kuris integruoja rankinius egzaminus atitinkančias savybes į DNN-AES model į. Konkrečiai, mūsų metodas sujungia rankinius egzaminų lygio savybes su paskirstytu egzaminų reprezentaciniu vektoriumi, gautu iš DNN-AES modelio tarpinio sluoksnio. Mūsų metodas yra paprastas DNN-AES išplėtimas, tačiau gerokai pagerina taškų tikslumą.', 'mk': 'Автоматизираното оценување на есејови (AES) е задачата автоматски да се додаваат оценки на есејови како алтернатива на оценување од страна на човечките оценувачи. Конвенционалната АЕС обично се потпира на рачни карактеристики, додека неодамнешните студии предложија модели на АЕС базирани на длабоките неурални мрежи (ДНН) за избегнување на потребата од инженерство на карактеристики. Покрај тоа, хибридните методи кои ги интегрираат рачните карактеристики во моделот ДНН-ЕЕС беа неодамна развиени и постигнаа најсовремена точност. Еден од најпопуларните хибридни методи е формулиран како модел на DNN-AES со дополнителна рецидентна нервна мрежа (RNN) која процесира секвенца на рачно направени карактеристики на ниво на реченици. Сепак, овој метод има следни проблеми: 1) Не може да вклучи ефикасни карактеристики на ниво на есеј развиени во претходното истражување на АЕС. 2) It greatly increases the numbers of model parameters and tuning parameters, increasing the difficulty of model training.  3) It has an additional RNN to process sentence-level features, enabling extension to various DNN-AES models complex.  За да ги решиме овие проблеми, предложуваме нов хибриден метод кој ќе ги интегрира карактеристиките на рачно направени есејови во модел на DNN-AES. Специфично, нашиот метод ги концентрира карактеристиките на рачното ниво на есејот на дистрибуиран вектор за претставување на есејот, кој се добива од меѓувремен слој на модел DNN-AES. Нашиот метод е едноставно продолжување на DNN-AES, но значително ја подобрува точноста на оценката.', 'ms': 'Skor essai automatik (AES) adalah tugas untuk mengarahkan skor secara automatik kepada essai sebagai alternatif kepada grading oleh pengukur manusia. AES konvensional biasanya bergantung pada ciri-ciri buatan tangan, sementara kajian baru-baru ini telah mengusulkan model AES berdasarkan rangkaian saraf dalam (DNN) untuk menghindari keperluan teknik ciri-ciri. Lagipun, kaedah hibrid yang mengintegrasikan ciri-ciri buatan tangan dalam model DNN-AES baru-baru ini telah dikembangkan dan telah mencapai ketepatan state-of-the-art. Salah satu kaedah hibrid paling populer dibentuk sebagai model DNN-AES dengan rangkaian saraf berkurang tambahan (RNN) yang memproses urutan ciri-ciri tahap kalimat yang dibuat tangan. Namun, kaedah ini mempunyai masalah berikut: 1) Ia tidak boleh memasukkan ciri-ciri aras-ensai yang berkesan dikembangkan dalam kajian AES sebelumnya. 2) Ia meningkatkan banyak bilangan parameter model dan parameter penyesuaian, meningkatkan kesukaran latihan model. 3) Ia mempunyai RNN tambahan untuk memproses ciri-ciri aras kalimat, membolehkan sambungan ke pelbagai kompleks model DNN-AES. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini, kami cadangkan kaedah hibrid baru yang mengintegrasikan ciri-ciri aras esai buatan tangan ke dalam model DNN-AES. Secara khusus, kaedah kami menyatukan ciri-ciri aras-esei buatan tangan ke vektor perwakilan esei yang disebarkan, yang diperoleh dari lapisan sementara model DNN-AES. Kaedah kami adalah sambungan DNN-AES sederhana, tetapi meningkatkan keperluan skor secara signifikan.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം എസ്സേ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് (AES) മനുഷ്യരുടെ റേറ്ററുകള്\u200d ഗ്രേഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള മറ്റൊരു മാറ്റം സ്വയം സ്കോര്\u200d അയയ് സാധാരണ AES കൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാല്\u200d ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ആഴത്തിലെ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുയല്\u200d നെറ്ററുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ അതിനുശേഷം, ഡിഎന്\u200d- എഎസ് മോഡലില്\u200d കൈകൈകാര്യം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഹൈബ്രിഡ് രീതികള്\u200d അടുത്തുതന്നെ വികസിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ആര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ സ്ഥി ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഹൈബ്രിഡ് രീതികളില്\u200d ഒരു DNN-AES മോഡലായി രൂപപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്ത വാക്ക്-നില വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതികള എന്നാലും ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d പിന്നിലുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുണ്ട്: 1) മുമ്പുള്ള AES പരിശോധന നടത്തിയില്\u200d അതിന് സാധ്യതയുള്ള എസ്വേയ് 2) അത് മോഡല്\u200d പരാമീറ്ററുകളുടെ എണ്ണം വളര്\u200dത്തുന്നു, മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പ്രയാസത്തിലേക്ക് കൂടുതലാക്കുന്നു. 3) It has an additional RNN to process sentence-level features, enabling extension to various DNN-AES models complex.  ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഹൈബ്രിഡ് രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. കൈകൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള എസ്സ്-നില പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന എസ്സ്-നില വ്യവസ്ഥകളെ വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്ന എസ്സ് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന വെക്ടറിലേക്ക് കൈക നമ്മുടെ രീതിയൊരു എളുപ്പമാണ് DNN-AES വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, പക്ഷെ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടിങ് കൃത്യമായ വിശദീകരണത്ത', 'mt': 'Il-punteġġ awtomatizzat tas-sessi (AES) huwa l-kompitu li l-punteġġi jiġu assenjati awtomatikament lis-sessi bħala alternattiva għall-klassifikazzjoni mill-klassifikaturi umani. L-AES konvenzjonali tipikament tiddependi fuq karatteristiċi maħduma bl-idejn, filwaqt li studji reċenti pproponew mudelli AES ibbażati fuq netwerks newrali profondi (DNNs) biex jevitaw il-ħtieġa għal inġinerija tal-karatteristiċi. Barra minn hekk, ġew żviluppati dan l-a ħħar metodi ibridi li jintegraw karatteristiċi maħduma bl-idejn f’mudell DNN-AES u kisbu l-aktar preċiżjoni avvanzata. Wieħed mill-metodi ibridi l-aktar popolari huwa fformulat bħala mudell DNN-AES b’netwerk newrali rikorrenti addizzjonali (RNN) li jipproċessa sekwenza ta’ karatteristiċi tal-livell tas-sentenza maħduma bl-idejn. Madankollu, dan il-metodu għandu l-problemi li ġejjin: 1) Ma jistax jinkorpora karatteristiċi effettivi fil-livell ta’ essay żviluppati fir-riċerka preċedenti tal-AES. 2) Dan iżid ħafna n-numru ta’ parametri mudell u parametri ta’ aġġustament, u jżid id-diffikultà tat-taħriġ mudell. 3) Għandu RNN addizzjonali biex jipproċessa karatteristiċi fil-livell tas-sentenza, li jippermetti estensjoni għal diversi mudelli tad-DNN-AES kumplessi. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-problemi, nipproponu metodu ibridu ġdid li jintegra l-karatteristiċi tal-livell tas-sess tal-idejn f’mudell DNN-AES. B’mod speċifiku, il-metodu tagħna jikkonċentra l-karatteristiċi tal-livell ta’ essay maħduma bl-idejn għal vettur ta’ rappreżentazzjoni ta’ essay distribwit, li jinkiseb minn saff intermedju ta’ mudell DNN-AES. Our method is a simple DNN-AES extension, but significantly improves scoring accuracy.', 'mn': 'Автоматтын эсси сүлжээн (AES) нь хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын хувьд оноо автоматаар эссийг өөрчлөх үйл ажиллагаа юм. АЕС нь ихэвчлэн гар бүтээгдэхүүн дээр хамаарч байна. Гэхдээ саяхан судалгааны ажиллах нь АЕС загваруудыг гүн мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд (DNN) суурилуулсан байдаг. Үүнээс гадна гар бүтээгдэхүүнийг DNN-AES загвар дээр нэгтгэдэг гибрид аргыг саяхан хөгжүүлж, урлагийн байдлын зөв байдлыг хүргэсэн. Хамгийн алдартай гибридын нэг арга нь DNN-AES загвар болгон дахин давтагдаж буй мэдрэлийн сүлжээ (RNN) болон гар бүтээгдэхүүний хэмжээний шинжлэх ухааны дарааллыг ажилладаг. Гэвч энэ арга нь дараагийн асуудалтай: 1) Өмнөх АES судалгаанд эффективны эсийн түвшинд хөгжүүлсэн боломжтой байдаг. 2) Энэ загварын параметрын тоо болон шийдвэрлэх параметрын тоо ихэвчлэн, загварын сургалтын хэцүү хэцүү байдлыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. 3) Энэ нь өгүүлбэр-түвшинд өөр өөр DNN-AES загварын комплекс болох нэмэлт RNN байдаг. Эдгээр асуудлуудыг шийдэхийн тулд бид шинэ гибрид арга загварыг DNN-AES загвар руу бүтээсэн эсийн түвшинд нэгтгэдэг. Ялангуяа бидний арга нь DNN-AES загварын дундаж давхар давхар загвараас гар бүтээсэн эсийн түвшинд хуваарилсан эсийн үзүүлэлтийн векторын хувьцааг холбогдож байна. Бидний арга бол энгийн DNN-AES нэмэгдүүлэлт, гэхдээ тодорхойлолт нь үнэхээр сайжруулдаг.', 'no': 'Automatisk essåskoring (AES) er oppgåva for automatisk tilordning av poeng til essåar som alternativ for gradering av menneskelige raterar. Konventionale AES er vanlegvis avhengig av handkomprimerte funksjonar, mens nyleg studier har foreslått AES-modeller basert på dype neuralnettverk (DNN) for å gjere nødvendighet for funksjonsengineering. I tillegg er hybridmetodar som integrerer handsamla funksjonar i eit DNN-AES-modell nyleg utvikla og har oppnådd nøyaktighet for kunsten. Ein av dei populærste hybridmetodane er formert som eit DNN-AES-modell med eit tilgjengeleg gjentakelig neuralnettverk (RNN) som handsamar ei rekkjefølgje av setningsnivå. Dette metoden har imidlertid desse problemene: 1) Det kan ikkje inkludere effektive essånivåfunksjonar utvikla i tidlegare forskning av AES. 2) Det aukar mykje talet på modeller og oppsettparametrar, og øker vanskeligheten for opplæring av modeller. 3) Det har ein ekstra RNN for å handsama setningsnivåeigenskapar, som kan bruka utviding til ulike DNN-AES-modeller kompleks. For å løse desse problemene, foreslår vi ein ny hybridmetode som integrerer handhaldne essånivåfunksjonar i ein DNN-AES-modell. Dette metoden sammenliknar eigenskapar for handkrevet essønivå til ein distribuert essørepresentasjonvektor, som vert henta frå eit middellag av eit DNN-AES-modell. Metoden vårt er ein enkel DNN-AES-utviding, men betydelig forbedrar skaring nøyaktighet.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne ocenianie esejów (AES) to zadanie automatycznego przypisywania wyników do esejów jako alternatywa dla oceniania przez ludzkich oceniaczy. Konwencjonalne AES zazwyczaj opiera się na ręcznie wykonanych funkcjach, podczas gdy ostatnie badania zaproponowały modele AES oparte na głębokich sieciach neuronowych (DNN), aby uniknąć potrzeby inżynierii funkcji. Ponadto niedawno opracowano metody hybrydowe integrujące ręczne funkcje w modelu DNN-AES i osiągnęły najnowocześniejszą dokładność. Jedną z najpopularniejszych metod hybrydowych jest model DNN-AES z dodatkową powtarzającą się siecią neuronową (RNN), która przetwarza sekwencję ręcznie tworzonych funkcji na poziomie zdań. Metoda ta ma jednak następujące problemy: 1) Nie może uwzględniać skutecznych funkcji na poziomie eseju opracowanych w poprzednich badaniach AES. 2) Znacznie zwiększa liczbę parametrów modelu i parametrów strojenia, zwiększając trudność treningu modelu. 3) Posiada dodatkowy RNN do przetwarzania funkcji na poziomie zdań, umożliwiający rozszerzenie o różne modele DNN-AES kompleksu. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy nową metodę hybrydową, która integruje ręcznie wykonane funkcje na poziomie eseju w modelu DNN-AES. W szczególności nasza metoda łączy ręcznie wykonane cechy na poziomie eseju z rozproszonym wektorem reprezentacji eseju, który jest uzyskiwany z warstwy pośredniej modelu DNN-AES. Nasza metoda to proste rozszerzenie DNN-AES, ale znacznie poprawia dokładność punktowania.', 'ro': 'Scorarea automată a eseurilor (AES) este sarcina atribuirii automate a scorurilor eseurilor ca alternativă la evaluarea de către evaluatorii umani. AES convențional se bazează de obicei pe caracteristici artizanale, în timp ce studiile recente au propus modele AES bazate pe rețele neuronale profunde (DNN) pentru a evita necesitatea ingineriei caracteristicilor. În plus, metodele hibride care integrează caracteristici artizanale într-un model DNN-AES au fost dezvoltate recent și au obținut o precizie de ultimă generație. Una dintre cele mai populare metode hibride este formulată ca un model DNN-AES cu o rețea neurală recurentă suplimentară (RNN) care procesează o secvență de caracteristici manual la nivel de propoziții. Cu toate acestea, această metodă are următoarele probleme: 1) Nu poate include caracteristici eficiente la nivel de eseu dezvoltate în cercetarea AES anterioară. 2) Crește foarte mult numărul parametrilor modelului și parametrii de reglare, crescând dificultatea pregătirii modelului. 3) Are un RNN suplimentar pentru a procesa caracteristici la nivel de propoziție, permițând extinderea la diferite modele DNN-AES complexe. Pentru a rezolva aceste probleme, propunem o nouă metodă hibridă care integrează caracteristici de nivel manual de eseu într-un model DNN-AES. Mai exact, metoda noastră concatenează caracteristicile lucrate manual la nivel de eseu la un vector distribuit de reprezentare a eseului, care este obținut dintr-un strat intermediar al unui model DNN-AES. Metoda noastră este o extensie simplă DNN-AES, dar îmbunătățește semnificativ precizia punctajului.', 'sr': 'Automatisano ispitivanje eseja (AES) je zadatak automatskog određivanja rezultata esejima kao alternativa za gradnju ljudskih ratera. Konvencionalna AES se obično oslanja na rukopisane funkcije, dok su nedavno ispitivanje predložile modele AES na temelju dubokih neuralnih mreža (DNN) kako bi obnovili potrebu za funkcionalnim inženjerstvom. Osim toga, nedavno su razvijene hibridne metode koje integriraju rukopisane funkcije u model DNN-AES i postigle su tačnost stanja umjetnosti. Jedna od najpopularnijih hibridnih metoda je formulisana kao model DNN-AES sa dodatnim rekonstruiranom neuralnoj mrežom (RNN), koja procesira sekvenciju karakteristika na nivou rečenice. Međutim, ovaj metod ima sljedeće probleme: 1) Ne može uključiti efikasne karakteristike nivoa eseja razvijene u prethodnim istraživanjima AES. 2) Veličanstveno povećava broj modelnih parametara i parametara prilagodbe, povećavajući teškoće obuke modela. 3) Ima dodatni RNN da procesira karakteristike na nivou rečenica, omogućavajući produžavanje različitih DNN-AES modela kompleksa. Da bi riješili te probleme, predlažemo novi hibridni metod koji integriše karakteristike na nivou eseja u DNN-AES model. Posebno, naša metoda potvrđuje karakteristike na razini eseja za raspodjeljeni vektor zastupanja eseja, koji je dobijen od prosječnog sloja modela DNN-AES. Naša metoda je jednostavna proširenja DNN-AES, ali značajno poboljšava tačnost izviđanja.', 'so': 'Automated essay scoring (AES) is the task of automatically assigning scores to essays as an alternative to grading by human raters.  AES sida caadiga ah waxay ku xiran tahay aqoonta gacanta lagu qabtay, laakiin waxbarashada ugu dambeeyay waxay soo jeedeen tusaalooyin AES oo ku saleysan shabakado hoos u dheer oo neurada ah (DNNs) si ay u baahan yihiin baahida qalabka aqoonta. Sidoo kale waxaa la horumariyey hababka hybrid oo ku habboon qalabka gacmaha lagu sameynayo DNN-AES sameynta, waxayna gaadheen saxda xaaladda farshaxanta. Mid ka mid ah qaababka aad u maarufan hybrid waxaa looga sameeyaa model DNN-AES oo leh shabakadda neurada oo kale oo soo socda (RNN) oo sameynaya xiliga xarunta qoriga-heerka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee methankanu waxay leedahay dhibaatooyin soo socda: 1) Ma geli karo heer farshaxan oo faa’iido ah oo horay loo hormariyey baaritaanka AES. 2) Inta badan waxay kordhisaa tirada parameter model iyo parameters, waxayna kordhisaa dhibaatada waxbarashada modellka. 3) waxay leedahay RNN oo dheeraad ah in lagu sameeyo heer-heer, oo lagu sii wado samooyin kala duduwan DNN-AES. Si aan u xallino dhibaatadan, waxaannu u soo jeedaynaa qaab cusub oo ah qalabka heerka farshaxanka oo gacanta lagu qabsan karo tusaale ahaan DNN-AES. Si gaar ah, qaabkanagu waxay leedahay xarumo farshaxan-sawir oo gacanta lagu qabanqaabiyay, waxaana laga helay sawir dhexdhexe ka mid ah DNN-AES. Midabkayagu waa sahlan DNN-AES kordhiya, laakiin si weyn ayuu u kordhiyaa saxda qiyaasta.', 'sv': 'Automatiserad uppsatspoäng (AES) är uppgiften att automatiskt tilldela poäng till uppsatser som ett alternativ till betygsättning av mänskliga bedömare. Konventionell AES bygger vanligtvis på handgjorda funktioner, medan nyligen genomförda studier har föreslagit AES-modeller baserade på djupa neurala nätverk (DNN) för att undanröja behovet av funktionsteknik. Dessutom har hybridmetoder som integrerar handgjorda funktioner i en DNN-AES-modell nyligen utvecklats och har uppnått toppmodern noggrannhet. En av de mest populära hybridmetoderna är formulerad som en DNN-AES modell med ett extra återkommande neuralt nätverk (RNN) som bearbetar en sekvens av handgjorda meningsnivåfunktioner. Denna metod har dock följande problem: 1) Den kan inte införliva effektiva essäfunktioner som utvecklats i tidigare AES-forskning. 2) Det ökar kraftigt antalet modellparametrar och inställningsparametrar, vilket ökar svårigheten med modellträning. 3) Den har ytterligare RNN för att bearbeta meningsnivåfunktioner, vilket möjliggör utvidgning till olika DNN-AES modeller komplex. För att lösa dessa problem föreslår vi en ny hybridmetod som integrerar handgjorda essäfunktioner i en DNN-AES-modell. Specifikt sammanfogar vår metod handgjorda essä-nivå funktioner till en distribuerad essä representation vektor, som erhålls från ett mellanlager av en DNN-AES modell. Vår metod är en enkel DNN-AES förlängning, men förbättrar signifikant poängnoggrannheten.', 'ta': 'தன்னியக்கமாக வாய்ப்பு மதிப்பெண் (AES) குறியீட்டிற்கு மதிப்பெண்களை தானாகவே ஒதுக்கும் மதிப்பெண்களை மனித விகிதத்தின் ம வழக்கமான AES பொதுவாக கையால் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட பண்புகளை நம்புகிறது, ஆனால் சமீபத்திய ஆய்வுகள் ஆழமான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை அடிப்படையில் AES மாதிரிகள மேலும், DNN-AES மாதிரியில் கையாளும் தன்மைகளை ஒன்றாக்கும் ஹைப்ரிட் முறைமைகள் சமீபத்தில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் கலை துல்லியமா அதிக பிரபலமான ஹைப்ரிட் முறைமைகளில் ஒரு DNN- AES மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மறுபடியும் திரும்பும் நெருகிய வலைப்பின்னல் (RNN) அது கைமுறை வாக்கு- மட்ட ஆனால், இந்த முறையில் பின்வரும் பிரச்சனைகள் உள்ளது: 1) முந்தைய AES ஆராய்ச்சியில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட விளையாட்டு மட்டத்த 2) இது மாதிரி அளபுருக்களின் எண்ணிக்கையை அதிகரிக்கும், மாதிரி பயிற்சியின் கடினம் அதிகரிக்கும். 3) வாக்கு- மட்டத்தின் பண்புகளை செயல்படுத்த ஒரு கூடுதல் RNN உள்ளது, பல DNN- AES மாதிரிகள் சிக்கல் செயல்படுத்தும். இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஹைப்ரிட் முறைமையை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். இது கையாள்பட்ட வேலை மட்டத்தை ஒரு DNN-AES குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் முறைமையில் கையாள்பட்ட எழுத்து நிலையின் குணங்களை ஒரு பங்கிடப்பட்ட வேசி குறிப்பிட்ட வெக்டருக்கு கூட்டுகிறது, அது DNN- A எங்கள் முறை ஒரு எளிமையான DNN-AES விரிவாகுதல், ஆனால் மதிப்பெண் சரியை மேம்படுத்துகிறது.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්කෝරින් ස්කෝරින් (AE) තමයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මකයෙන් ස්කෝරින් ස්ථාවිතයෙන් ස්කෝ සාමාන්\u200dය AES ට සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ වලට විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වගේම අවස්ථාවේ අලුත් පරීක්ෂණාවල් ඇයෙස් මොඩේල් අධ ඉතින්, හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විධානය, DNN-AES මෝඩල් එක්කරණය කරන්න හැකියුම් අවස්ථාවක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම අවස්ථාවක සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් එකක් DNN-AE මොඩේල් වලින් සූදානම් කරනවා අතර ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (RNN) වලින් අ නමුත්, මේ විදියට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: 1) ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න බෑ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පස 2) මොඩල් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධ කරුණු අංකය ගොඩක් වැඩි කරනවා, මොඩල් ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. 3) ඒකට තවත් RNN තියෙනවා වාර්තාවක් ස්ථානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, විවිධ DNN-AES මෝඩල් සංස්කල්පයක් සක්\u200dරීය කරන මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි අලුත් හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අත්සන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් DNN-AES මෝ විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ විධානය සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ අත්සන්ධ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය වෙක්ටර් වලට අත්සන්ධ කරනවා, ඒක DNN-AES මෝ අපේ පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය DNN-AEE විස්තරයක්, ඒත් ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් ස්කොර්න් හරියට වැඩ කරනවා.', 'ur': 'اٹوٹوٹ ایسئی اسکورینگ (AES) کا کام ہے کہ اسکور کو اٹوٹوٹ سے انسان راٹر کے ذریعہ تدریج کرنے کے لئے ایک الٹوٹ بنا دیں۔ عمومی AES ہندکریفوں پر اعتماد کرتا ہے، حالانکہ اچھے تحقیقات نے AES موڈلوں کی پیشنهاد کی ہے جو عمیق نیورال نیٹورک (DNN) پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں تاکہ فکرت انجینژی کے نیاز کو دفع کریں. اور اس کے علاوہ، ہیبراڈ طریقے جن کے ذریعہ ایک DNN-AES موڈل میں ہاتھ پیدا کئے گئے ہیں، اچھا طریقہ اٹھایا گیا ہے اور ان کے ذریعہ آهنت کی دقیق پہنچ چکا ہے. سب سے زیادہ محبوب ہیبراڈ طریقے میں سے ایک DNN-AES موڈل کے طور پر فرمول کیا گیا ہے جو ایک اضافہ نئورل نیٹورل نیٹورک (RNN) کے ساتھ ہے جس نے ہاندکرے ہوئے مجلس سطح کے فرمول کو پیدائش کرتا ہے. However, this method has the following problems: 1) It cannot include effective essay-level features developed in previous AES research. 2) یہ مدل پارامیٹروں اور ترینگ پارامیٹروں کی تعداد بڑھاتا ہے، اور مدل ترینگ کی مشکل بڑھاتا ہے۔ 3) اس کے پاس ایک اضافہ RNN ہے کہ sentence-level features پردازی کرے، جو مختلف DNN-AES موڈل پیچیدگی کے لئے اضافہ کرے۔ ہم نے ان مشکلوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے ایک نئی ہیبراڈ طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جس نے ہاندکرایٹ رسی-سطح کے متعلق DNN-AES موڈل میں شامل کیا ہے. خاص طور پر، ہمارا طریقہ ایک تقسیم رسی نمایشگر ویکتور کے ہاتھ کرے ہوئے رسی سطح کی ویکتوروں کو مشتبہ کرتا ہے، جسے DNN-AES نمایشگر کے ایک میانہ لائر سے حاصل کیا گیا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ ایک ساده DNN-AES اضافہ ہے، لیکن ضروری طور پر اسکور دقیق کو اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'kk': 'Автоматты ессей сұрауы (AES) деген нәтижелерді адамдардың бағалау үшін ессейдерге автоматты түрде тапсырмасын таңдау тапсырмасы. Әдеттегі AES қалта құрылған мүмкіндіктеріне тәуелді, бірақ соңғы зерттеулерде невралдық желілер (DNN) негізінде AES үлгілерін ұсынады. Сонымен қатар, DNN-AES үлгісінде қол құрылған мүмкіндіктерді біріктіретін гибрид әдістері жаңа жасалған және әртүрлі дұрыстығын жеткіздік. Ең жақсы гибридтік әдістердің бірі DNN- AES үлгісі ретінде, қайталанатын невралдық желі (RNN) қолданыстағы сөз деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктер ретінде өзгертіледі. Бұл әдісте келесі мәселелер бар: 1) Алдыңғы AES зерттеулерінде жасалған эффективті есеу деңгейінің мүмкіндіктерін қоса алмайды. 2) Бұл үлгі параметрлерін және баптау параметрлерін өзгертеді, үлгі бақылау қиындығын көтереді. 3) Бұл сөз деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктерін өзгерту үшін қосымша RNN бар, әртүрлі DNN-AES үлгілеріне қосымша кеңейтуді рұқсат ету үшін. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, Қалта құрылған ессей деңгейінің мүмкіндіктерін DNN-AES үлгісіне енгізу үшін жаңа гибрид әдісін ұсынамыз. Әдетте, біздің әдіміміз DNN- AES үлгісінің орташа қабаттан алу үшін үлестірілген ессей деңгейінің мүмкіндіктерін үлестіру векторына сәйкестіреді. Біздің әдіміміз қарапайым DNN-AES кеңейтуі, бірақ сұрау дұрыстығын өзгертеді.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის რეტერისტების განსაზღვრებისათვის ავტომატურად მოწყობილობა (AES) არის მოწყობილობა. კონგენციონალური AES ტიპულად დარწმუნდება ხელსაწყოფილი ფუნქციებიდან, მაგრამ ახალი კვლევების მოდელები AES მოდელების მიღება, რომლებიც ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელებიდან (DNN) დაბაზ დამატებით, ჰიბრიტური მეტოვები, რომლებიც DNN-AES მოდელში ხელსაწყოფილი ფუნქციების ინტერგურაციას ახლა განვითარებულია და მივიღეთ წარმოქმედების წარმოქმედება. ყველაზე პოლიპური ჰიბრიდის მეტიდან ერთი ფორმულია როგორც DNN-AES მოდელი, რომელიც დამატებული რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელი (RNN) პროცესის შემდეგება მანქანტი სიტყვას. მაგრამ ეს მეტი აქვს შემდეგი პრობლემები: 1) ის ვერ შეიძლება აფექტიური ესესი დონეზე განვითარებული ფუნქციები წინა AES-ს სწავლაში. 2) მას მოდელური პარამეტრების და კონფიგურაციის რაოდენობას გაზრუნდება, რომელიც მოდელური განაკლების რთული გაზრუნდება. 3) ეს აქვს დამატებული RNN, რომელიც განსხვავებული DNN-AES მოდელების კომპლექსიკურად გამოყენება. ეს პრობლემების გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ახალი ჰიბრიდის მეტი, რომელიც ხელსაწყოფილი ესეი-დონეზე მოქმედება DNN-AES მოდელში ინტერგურაცია. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი მედიოდი მანქანის შექმნილი ესეის დონეზე ფუნქციები გაყოფილი ესეის რესექტირების გვექტორისთვის, რომელიც DNN-AES მოდელის შუშაობით მიიღება. ჩვენი პროცემი არის ერთადერთი DNN-AES გაფართლება, მაგრამ მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო მუშაობს სკონტაციას.', 'uz': "Automated essay scoring (AES) is the task of automatically assigning scores to essays as an alternative to grading by human raters.  Oddiy AES qo'llangan xususiyatlarni ishlatadi. Yaqinda o'rganishlar AES modellarini eng yuqori neyrolik tarmoqlari (DNNs) asosida ishlatilgan imkoniyatlarni obʼekt qilishni istaydi. Ko'rsatilgan, DNN-AES modelida qo'llangan xususiyatlarni birlashtirish uchun hybrid usullarini yaqinda tuzib keldi va shaxsiyatlarning holatini tasdiqlash imkoniyatini bajardi. Name Lekin, bu usulda quyidagi muammolar bor: 1) U oldingi AES tafoviyotida yaratilgan tashqi essay- darajadagi xossalarni kiritib boʻlmaydi. 2) Ular model parametrlari va parametrlar soni ko'payadi, model trening qismini oshadi. 3) Maxfiy soʻz- darajadagi imkoniyatlarni bajarish uchun qoʻshimcha RNN mavjud. Diqqat DNN- AES modellariga kengaytirish mumkin. Bu muammolarni o'zgartirish uchun, biz qo'llab qo'llangan esay-darajadagi xususiyatlarni DNN-AES modeliga qo'yish. Ko'rsatilgan, bizning usuli DNN-AES modelining intermediate layeridan qo'llaniladi. Bizning usuli oddiy DNN-AES kengaytmasi, lekin qiymatni aniqlash imkoniyatini juda ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tự động ghi điểm bằng văn bản (AES) là nhiệm vụ phải tự động trao điểm cho các bài báo như một cách thay thế cho phân loại của người. Thông thường các kênh liên bang (AES) dựa trên các tính năng tự làm, trong khi các nghiên cứu gần đây đã đề xuất các mô hình AES dựa trên mạng thần kinh sâu (DNS) để tránh nhu cầu thiết kế đặc trưng. Hơn nữa, các phương pháp lai hợp các tính năng tự ráp trong mô hình DNS-AES đã được phát triển gần đây và đạt độ chính xác tuyệt vời nhất. Một trong những phương pháp hỗn hợp phổ biến nhất được thiết kế như mô hình DNS-AES với một mạng thần kinh liên tục (RNN) khác xử lý một chuỗi các tính năng cung cấp bản đồ. Tuy nhiên, phương pháp này có các vấn đề: 1) Nó không thể áp dụng các yếu tố văn học hiệu quả được phát triển trong nghiên cứu của AES trước. 2) Nó tăng cường số lượng các thông số mô hình và các thông số tinh chỉnh, làm tăng khó khăn trong việc huấn luyện mô hình. Ba) Nó có RNN thêm để xử lý các tính năng cấp bản án, đồng thời mở rộng cho hệ thống mô hình DNS-AES khác nhau. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp lai hợp thành một mô hình DNS-AES mới. Cụ thể, phương pháp của chúng tôi hợp tác bằng tay với trình độ văn học được tạo thành một véc- tơ văn bản phân phối được lấy từ một lớp trung cấp của mô hình DNS-AES. Cách của chúng tôi là một phần mở rộng DNS-AES đơn giản, nhưng cải thiện độ chính xác đánh điểm.', 'bg': 'Автоматизираното оценяване на есета е задачата автоматично да възлага оценки на есетата като алтернатива на оценяването от хора. Конвенционалните ЕЙ обикновено разчитат на ръчно изработени функции, докато последните проучвания предлагат модели на ЕЙ, базирани на дълбоки невронни мрежи (ДНН), за да се избегне необходимостта от инженеринг на функции. Освен това, хибридни методи, които интегрират ръчно изработени функции в модел са разработени наскоро и са постигнали най-съвременна точност. Един от най-популярните хибридни методи е формулиран като модел с допълнителна повтаряща се невронна мрежа (РНН), която обработва последователност от ръчно изработени функции на ниво изречение. Този метод обаче има следните проблеми: 1) Той не може да включва ефективни характеристики на ниво есе, разработени в предишни изследвания на ЕЙ И ЕС. 2) Тя значително увеличава броя на параметрите на модела и параметрите за настройка, увеличавайки трудността на обучението на модела. 3) Той има допълнителен РНН за обработка на функции на ниво изречение, което позволява разширяване на различни модели комплекси. За решаване на тези проблеми предлагаме нов хибриден метод, който интегрира ръчно изработени функции на ниво есе в модел. По-конкретно, нашият метод конкатенира ръчно изработени характеристики на ниво есе към разпределен вектор за представяне на есе, който се получава от междинен слой на модел. Нашият метод е просто разширение, но значително подобрява точността на оценката.', 'nl': "Geautomatiseerde essay scoring (AES) is de taak om automatisch scores toe te wijzen aan essays als alternatief voor het beoordelen door menselijke beoordelaars. Conventionele AES vertrouwt meestal op handgemaakte functies, terwijl recente studies AES-modellen hebben voorgesteld die zijn gebaseerd op diepe neurale netwerken (DNN's) om de behoefte aan feature engineering te vermijden. Bovendien zijn hybride methoden die handgemaakte functies integreren in een DNN-AES model onlangs ontwikkeld en hebben ze state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid bereikt. Een van de meest populaire hybride methoden is geformuleerd als een DNN-AES model met een bijkomend recidivierend neuraal netwerk (RNN) dat een reeks handgemaakte zinnenniveau functies verwerkt. Deze methode heeft echter de volgende problemen: 1) Het kan geen effectieve essay-level functies bevatten die zijn ontwikkeld in eerder AES-onderzoek. 2) Het verhoogt aanzienlijk het aantal modelparameters en tuningparameters, waardoor de moeilijkheid van modeltraining wordt verhoogd. 3) Het heeft een extra RNN om zinnenniveau functies te verwerken, waardoor uitbreiding naar verschillende DNN-AES modellen complex mogelijk is. Om deze problemen op te lossen, stellen we een nieuwe hybride methode voor die handgemaakte essay-level functies integreert in een DNN-AES model. Specifiek, onze methode koppelt handgemaakte essay-level kenmerken aan een gedistribueerde essay representatie vector, die wordt verkregen uit een tussenlaag van een DNN-AES model. Onze methode is een eenvoudige DNN-AES uitbreiding, maar verbetert aanzienlijk de scorenauwkeurigheid.", 'da': 'Automatiseret essay scoring (AES) er opgaven med automatisk at tildele partiturer til essays som et alternativ til vurdering af menneskelige bedømmelser. Konventionel AES afhænger typisk af håndlavede funktioner, mens nylige undersøgelser har foreslået AES modeller baseret på dybe neurale netværk (DNN) for at undgå behovet for feature engineering. Desuden er hybride metoder, der integrerer håndlavede funktioner i en DNN-AES model for nylig blevet udviklet og har opnået state-of-the-art nøjagtighed. En af de mest populære hybridmetoder er formuleret som en DNN-AES model med et ekstra tilbagevendende neuralt netværk (RNN), der behandler en sekvens af håndlavede sætningsniveau funktioner. Denne metode har dog følgende problemer: 1) Den kan ikke indarbejde effektive essay-niveau funktioner udviklet i tidligere AES forskning. 2) Det øger i høj grad antallet af modelparametre og tuning parametre, hvilket øger vanskeligheden ved model træning. 3) Det har en ekstra RNN til at behandle sætningsniveau funktioner, der muliggør udvidelse til forskellige DNN-AES modeller kompleks. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi en ny hybrid metode, der integrerer håndlavede essay-niveau funktioner i en DNN-AES model. Specielt sammenkæder vores metode håndlavede essay-niveau funktioner til en distribueret essay repræsentation vektor, som er opnået fra et mellemlag af en DNN-AES model. Vores metode er en simpel DNN-AES udvidelse, men forbedrer markant scoring nøjagtighed.', 'hr': 'Automatično osvajanje eseja (AES) je zadatak automatskog određivanja rezultata esejima kao alternativa za gradiranje ljudskih ocjena. Konvencionalna AES obično se oslanja na rukopisane funkcije, dok su nedavna ispitivanja predložile modele AES na temelju dubokih neuralnih mreža (DNN) kako bi obnovili potrebu za funkcionalnim inžinjerima. Osim toga, nedavno su razvijene hibridne metode koje integriraju rukopisane funkcije u model DNN-AES i postigle su točnost stanja umjetnosti. Jedna od najpopularnijih hibridnih metoda je formulirana kao model DNN-AES s dodatnom rekonstruiranom neuralnom mrežom (RNN) koja procesira sekvenciju karakteristika razine rečenica na rukama. Međutim, ovaj metod ima sljedeće probleme: 1) Ne može uključiti učinkovite karakteristike razine eseja razvijene u prethodnim istraživanjima AES-a. 2) Veličanstveno povećava broj modelnih parametara i parametara prilagodbe, povećavajući teškoće obuke modela. 3) Ima dodatni RNN za procesiranje karakteristika razine rečenica, omogućavajući produženje raznim DNN-AES modelima kompleksa. Da bi riješili te probleme, predlažemo novu hibridnu metodu koja uključuje karakteristike razine eseja u DNN-AES model. Posebno, naša metoda potvrđuje karakteristike razine eseja na rukama distribucijom vektoru zastupanja eseja, koji je dobijen od prosječnog sloja modela DNN-AES. Naša metoda je jednostavna proširenja DNN-AES, ali značajno poboljšava preciznost izvlačenja.', 'id': 'Puncakan essai otomatis (AES) adalah tugas untuk mengatur skor secara otomatis pada essai sebagai alternatif untuk menilai oleh penilai manusia. AES konvensional biasanya bergantung pada ciri-ciri karya tangan, sementara penelitian baru-baru ini telah mengusulkan model AES berdasarkan jaringan saraf dalam (DNN) untuk menghindari kebutuhan teknis ciri-ciri. Selain itu, metode hibrid yang mengintegrasi fitur buatan tangan dalam model DNN-AES baru-baru ini telah dikembangkan dan telah mencapai akurasi state-of-the-art. Salah satu metode hibrid paling populer ditentukan sebagai model DNN-AES dengan jaringan saraf rekuren tambahan (RNN) yang memproses urutan dari fitur tingkat kalimat yang dibuat tangan. Namun, metode ini memiliki masalah berikut: 1) Tidak dapat memasukkan fitur-fitur tahap essai yang efektif dikembangkan dalam penelitian AES sebelumnya. 2) Ini meningkatkan banyak jumlah parameter model dan parameter penyesuaian, meningkatkan kesulitan pelatihan model. 3) Ini memiliki RNN tambahan untuk memproses fitur tingkat kalimat, memungkinkan ekstensi ke berbagai kompleks model DNN-AES. To resolve these problems, we propose a new hybrid method that integrates handcrafted essay-level features into a DNN-AES model.  Secara spesifik, metode kami menyatukan karakteristik tahap essai yang dibuat dengan tangan ke vektor representation essai yang disebarkan, yang diperoleh dari lapisan intermedi dari model DNN-AES. Metode kami adalah estensi DNN-AES sederhana, tapi meningkatkan akurasi skor yang signifikan.', 'de': 'Automatisiertes Essay-Scoring (AES) ist die Aufgabe, Essays als Alternative zur Bewertung durch menschliche Bewerter automatisch Noten zuzuweisen. Herkömmliche AES basieren typischerweise auf handgefertigten Funktionen, während neuere Studien AES-Modelle vorgeschlagen haben, die auf tiefen neuronalen Netzwerken (DNNs) basieren, um die Notwendigkeit für Feature Engineering zu vermeiden. Darüber hinaus wurden vor kurzem hybride Methoden entwickelt, die handgefertigte Funktionen in ein DNN-AES-Modell integrieren und höchste Genauigkeit erzielen. Eine der beliebtesten Hybridmethoden ist als DNN-AES-Modell mit einem zusätzlichen wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerk (RNN) formuliert, das eine Sequenz handgefertigter Funktionen auf Satzebene verarbeitet. Diese Methode hat jedoch folgende Probleme: 1) Sie kann keine effektiven Essay-Funktionen enthalten, die in früheren AES-Forschungen entwickelt wurden. 2) Es erhöht stark die Anzahl der Modellparameter und Tuning-Parameter, erhöht die Schwierigkeit des Modelltrainings. 3) Es verfügt über einen zusätzlichen RNN, um Funktionen auf Satzebene zu verarbeiten, was die Erweiterung auf verschiedene DNN-AES Modelle Komplex ermöglicht. Um diese Probleme zu lösen, schlagen wir eine neue Hybridmethode vor, die handgefertigte Essay-Level-Features in ein DNN-AES-Modell integriert. Insbesondere verkettet unsere Methode handgefertigte Essay-Level-Features zu einem verteilten Essay-Repräsentationsvektor, der aus einer Zwischenschicht eines DNN-AES-Modells gewonnen wird. Unsere Methode ist eine einfache DNN-AES Erweiterung, verbessert aber deutlich die Scoring Genauigkeit.', 'ko': '자동논문채점(AES)의 임무는 인공채점을 대체하기 위해 논문에 자동으로 점수를 배분하는 것이다.전통적인 AES는 일반적으로 수동으로 제작된 특징에 의존하는데 최근의 연구는 특징 공학의 수요를 피하기 위해 심도 신경 네트워크(DNN)를 바탕으로 하는 AES 모델을 제시했다.또한 DNN-AES 모델에 수동 피쳐를 통합하는 블렌드 방법이 최근 개발돼 최첨단 정밀도에 도달했다.가장 유행하는 혼합 방법 중 하나는 DNN-AES 모델이다. 이 모델은 일련의 수동으로 만들어진 문장급 특징을 처리하는 데 사용되는 추가 귀속신경망(RNN)을 가지고 있다.그러나 이런 방법은 다음과 같은 문제점이 존재한다. 1) 이것은 이전 AES 연구에서 개발한 효과적인 문장급 특징과 결합할 수 없다.2) 모델 매개 변수와 매개 변수의 수량을 크게 증가시키고 모델 훈련의 난이도를 증가시켰다.3) 문장급 기능을 처리하기 위한 별도의 RNN이 있어 각종 DNN-AES 복잡한 모델로 확장할 수 있다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 수동으로 제작된 문장급 특징을 DNN-AES 모델에 통합하는 새로운 혼합 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리의 방법은 수동으로 제작된 문장급 특징을 분포식 문장 표시 벡터에 연결하는데, 이 벡터는 DNN-AES 모델의 중간층에서 얻는다.우리의 방법은 간단한 DNN-AES 확장이지만 평점의 정확성을 현저히 높였다.', 'sw': 'Mchoro wa masomo ya kujitegemea (AES) ni jukumu la kutengeneza vipimo vya kusoma kwa kujitegemea kama mbadala ya kuendesha viwango vya watu. Kila kawaida AES hutegemea vipengele vya mikono, wakati utafiti wa hivi karibuni umependekeza modeli za AES kwa kutumia mitandao ya ndani ya nevi (DNNs) ili kuthibiti mahitaji ya uhandikisho. Zaidi ya hayo, mbinu za hybrid ambazo zinaunganisha vipengele vya mikononi katika mtindo wa DNN-AES hivi karibuni zimeendelezwa na imefanikiwa kuwa na uhakika wa hali ya sanaa. Moja ya mbinu maarufu zaidi za hybrid inatengenezwa kama modeli ya DNN-AES yenye mtandao wa neura unaoendelea tena (RNN) inayoendesha mfululizo wa vipengele vya hukumu. Hata hivyo, mbinu hii ina matatizo yafuatayo: 2) Inaongeza kwa kiasi kikubwa idadi ya parameter za model na parameters, kuongeza changamoto ya mafunzo ya modeli. 3) Ina RNN ya ziada ya kuendeleza vipengele vya hukumu, na inawezesha kuongezeka kwa mifano mbalimbali ya DNN-AES. Ili kutatua matatizo haya, tunapendekeza njia mpya ya hybrid ambayo inaunganisha vipengele vya sayansi vilivyopangwa mikononi katika mtindo wa DNN-AES. Kwa ujumla, mbinu zetu zinatengeneza vipengele vya sayansi vilivyopangwa kwa mikononi kwenye vector a ya uwakilishi wa somo, ambayo imepatikana kutoka kwenye kiwango cha kati cha modeli ya DNN-AES. Utawala wetu ni urahisi wa DNN-AES, lakini unaongeza kwa kiasi kikubwa ukweli wa uvunjifu.', 'fa': 'امتحان خودکار (AES) وظیفه\u200cی تعیین امتحان\u200cها به عنوان جایگزینی برای برنامه\u200cگیری توسط امتحان\u200cکنندگان انسان است. AES معمولاً بر ویژه\u200cهای دستی\u200cساخته شده بستگی دارد، در حالی که تحقیقات اخیراً مدل\u200cهای AES را پیشنهاد داده\u200cاند که بر روی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق (DNN) نیازی برای مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cسازی تغییر دهند. علاوه بر این، روش های hybrid که ویژه های دستی ساخته شده را در یک مدل DNN-AES متصل می کنند اخیراً توسعه شده و دقیق موقعیت هنر را به دست آورده اند. یکی از بهترین روش\u200cهای هیبرید مشهور به عنوان یک مدل DNN-AES با شبکه عصبی اضافه\u200cای (RNN) فرمول می\u200cشود که یک رده از ویژه\u200cهای سطح\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cی دستی\u200cساخته شده است. با این حال، این روش مشکلات بعدی دارد: ۱) نمی\u200cتواند ویژگی\u200cهای سطح امتحان موثر را در تحقیقات قبلی AES توسعه کند. 2) تعداد پارامترهای مدل و پارامترهای تنظیم را بسیار افزایش می دهد، و مشکلات آموزش مدل را افزایش می دهد. 3) آن یک RNN اضافه دارد تا ویژگی\u200cهای سطح جمله\u200cها را فرایند کند، که به پیچیده مدل\u200cهای مختلف DNN-AES اجازه دهد. برای حل این مشکلات، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک روش هیبرید جدید که ویژگی\u200cهای سطح دستی ساخته شده را به مدل DNN-AES جمع می\u200cکند. دقیقاً روش ما ویژگی\u200cهای سطح دستی\u200cسازی را به یک ویکتور نمایش\u200cکننده\u200cی نسخه\u200cهای تقسیم می\u200cکند که از یک لایه بین\u200cوسیع مدل DNN-AES دریافت می\u200cشود. روش ما یک گسترش DNN-AES ساده است، ولی دقیقات جستجویی را بسیار بهتر می کند.', 'tr': 'Otomatik essay gaýşartmak (AES) adamlaryň raterleri tarapyndan ýokarylygy taýýarlamak işidir. AES düzgünler adatça el kesişmeleri üçin baglanýar, ýöne soňky aramalar AES modelleri derin näurul şebekelere (DNNs) guruldygy özellikler enjiniýasynyň gerekligini azaltmak üçin teklip etdiler. Munuň üçin, elimden gelen hatlary DNN-AES nusgasyna üýtgeden hybridler ýüzünde gelişmiş we sungatyň dogrylygyny ýetip barýarlar. Iň meşhur hybridler arasyndaky bir nusga DNN-AES nusga görä, bu nusga eklenen nusga a ňla (RNN) işleýän sözlem derejesi üçin bir terjime edildi. Ynha şu çözümde indiki meseleler bar: 1) Öňki AES araştyrmalarynda täsirli eser düzedileri girişemez. 2) Model parametrlerini we düzenleme parametrlerini kän artar, modellerin eğitim kynçylygyny artýar. 3) Sened derejesini işlemek üçin ýene bir RNN bar, dürli DNN-AES nusgalaryny karmaşıklyga mümkin edýär. Bu sorunları çözmek üçin, elimizde yapılan sız seviyelerini DNN-AES modelini birleştiren yeni bir hybrid yöntemi teklif ediyoruz. Özellikle, bizim yöntemimiz, DNN-AES modelinden alınan bir bölünen eser temsilcisi vektöre el düzeylerini birleştirer. Biziň ýüregimiz basit DNN-AES eklentidir, ýöne scoring dogrylygyny gowurar.', 'af': "Outomatiese essay skoring (AES) is die taak van outomatiese toewysing van telling na essays as 'n alternatief om te gradeer deur menslike raters. Konvensionele AES is tipies afgelyk op handkruipende funksies, terwyl onlangse studie het AES-modele voorgestel wat op diep neuralnetwerke (DNN) gebaseer word om die benodig vir funksie inženiering te herstel. Verder is Hybridmetodes wat die handkruipende funksies in 'n DNN-AES model integreer is onlangs ontwikkeld en het staat-van-kuns-presies bereik. Een van die mees populêre hibrid metodes is formeer as 'n DNN-AES model met' n addisionele herhaalde neuralnetwerk (RNN) wat prosesseer 'n reeks van handgebruikte setvlak funksies. Maar hierdie metode het die volgende probleme: 1) Dit kan nie effektief essay-vlak-funksies in vorige AES-resekings inkorporeer nie. 2) Dit vermeerder groot die nommers van model parameters en tuning parameters en vermeerder die moeilikheid van model onderwerking. 3) It has an additional RNN to process sentence-level features, enabling extension to various DNN-AES models complex. Om hierdie probleem te oplos, voorstel ons 'n nuwe hibridmetode wat die handgebreekte essay-vlak funksies integreer in 'n DNN-AES model. Spesifieke, ons metode beteenwoordig die handkryfte essay- vlak funksies na 'n verspreidige essay representasie vektor, wat word ontvang van' n middelste laag van' n DNN- AES model. Ons metode is 'n eenvoudige DNN-AES uitbreiding, maar betekenlik verbeter skaring-presies.", 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ የአሜሪካዊ አሜሪካ በተቃውሞ እጆቹ በተመሳሰሉ ላይ ይታያል፤ በተቃውሞ ተማሪዎቹ የጥልቅ የኔዌብ መረብ (DNNs) በመጠቀም የአሜሪካዊ የኢሜሪካ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ በDNN-AES ሞዴል ውስጥ እጆቻቸውን የተቀማጠሉ የሀብሪድ ሥርዓቶች አግኝተዋል፡፡ ከታዋቂው የኬብሪድ ዘዴዎች አንዱ DNN-AES model (RNN) በተጨማሪው የደብዳቤ መረብ (RNN) በተጨማሪም የሥርዓት ደረጃ ምርጫዎችን የሚያስፈልግ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ይህች ሥርዓት የሚከተሉትን ችግር አለ፤ 1) የቀድሞው የአሜሪካ ትምህርት ውስጥ የተደገመ የቋንቋ-ደረጃ ምርጫዎችን መጨመር አይችልም፡፡ 2) የሞዴል parameters ቁጥር እና ማቀናጃ parameters እጅግ ያበዛል፤ የሞዴል ትምህርት ግጭት ያበዛል። 3) የሥርዓት ደረጃ ምርጫዎችን ለማስቀመጥ ጨማሪ RNN አለበት፣ በተለያዩ DNN-AES ዓይነቶች አካባቢ እንዲያስቀምጥ ያስችላል። እነዚህን መከራዎች ለመፍታት አዲስ የኬብሪድ ልማድ እናስጀጋለን፤ እጆቹ የደረጃ ደረጃ ምርጫዎችን ለDNN-AES ሞዴል እንዲያስተካክል፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የድምፅ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ የኢሜይል አካባቢ አካባቢ መሆኑን እጆቻችን አካባቢ የደረጃ ምርጫዎችን ለጥፍጥረት አቀረበ፡፡ ልማዳችን ቀላል DNN-AES ስፋት ነው፤ ነገር ግን ማስታወቂያውን በትክክል ያሻራል፡፡', 'az': 'Avtomatik essay scoring (AES) insan qiymətçilərinin dəyişdirilməsi üçün dəyişdirilməsi üçün istifadə etmək məqsədilədir. Konventional AES genellikle əl yaratdığı fəaliyyətlərə təvəkkül edir, amma yeni təhsimlər AES modellərini dərin nöral ağları (DNN) üzərində təşkil etdilər ki, fəaliyyət mühendisliyinin ehtiyacını təmizləmək üçün. Daha sonra, DNN-AES modeli ilə əl yaratdığı özellikləri birləşdirən hibrid metodları yenidən təhsil edilmişdir və sanatın dəqiqliyinə yetişdirmişdir. Ən məşhur hibrid metodlarından biri DNN-AES modeli olaraq, əl-düzəltmiş cümlələr səviyyəsinin seçməsini işləyən çox yenidən nöral a ğ (RNN) ilə formüllənir. Ancaq bu metodların aşağıdaki problemləri vardır: 1) Bu, əvvəlki AES araştırmalarında təhsil səviyyəsini inkişaf edə bilmir. 2) Bu modellərin parametrulərin sayını və parametrulərin düzəltməsini çox artırar, modellərin təhsilinin çətinliklərini artırar. 3) Cümlələr səviyyəsi fərqli DNN-AES modellərinin kompleksiyasına uzaqlaşdırmasını qabilleştirmək üçün artıq RNN var. Bu problemləri çəkmək üçün yeni hibrid metodlarını təklif edirik ki, əlləri yaratdığı essay-səviyyəsini DNN-AES modeli ilə birləşdirir. Bizim metodumuz, DNN-AES modelinin orta səviyyəsindən alınan, dağıtılmış essay göstəricisi vektoru ilə əl düzəldilən essay səviyyəsini birləşdirir. Bizim metodumuz basit DNN-AES uzantısıdır, amma scoring doğruluğunu çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে লেখা স্কোর (এয়েস) হচ্ছে মানুষের রেটের গ্রেডিং এর বিকল্প হিসেবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্কোর বানানো হবে। সাধারণত AES হ্যান্ডক্রাইড বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে, যদিও সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের (ডিএনএন) ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক একেস মডেল প্ Furthermore, hybrid methods that integrate handcrafted features in a DNN-AES model have been recently developed and have achieved state-of-the-art accuracy.  সবচেয়ে জনপ্রিয় হাইব্রিড পদ্ধতির মধ্যে একটি DNN-AES মডেল হিসেবে তৈরি করা হয়েছে যার সাথে আরো বার্তারিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (RNN) নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে যা হাতে হাত তবে এই পদ্ধতিতে নিম্নলিখিত সমস্যা রয়েছে: ১) এটি পূর্ববর্তী এয়েস গবেষণায় উন্নয়ন করা কার্যকর প্রস্তাবের স্তরে কার্যকর প্ ২) এটি মডেলের প্যারামিটার এবং সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি করে, মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের কঠিন বৃদ্ধি করে। ৩) বিভিন্ন DNN-AES মডেল সম্পূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য এটি আরও আরএনএন আছে। এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন হাইব্রিড পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা হাতে হাতে কাজ করা প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে একটি ডিএনএন-এয়েস মডেলের মধ্যে। বিশেষ করে, আমাদের পদ্ধতি একটি বিতরণীয় প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভেক্টরের হাতে হ্যান্ডক্রান্ত পসি-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ব আমাদের পদ্ধতি একটা সাধারণ DNN-AES প্রসারিত, কিন্তু স্কোরের সঠিকভাবে উন্নতি করে।', 'bs': 'Automatično osvajanje eseja (AES) je zadatak automatskog određivanja rezultata esejima kao alternativa za gradnju ljudskih ratera. Konvencionalna AES obično se oslanja na rukopisane funkcije, dok su nedavno ispitivanje predložile modele AES na temelju dubokih neuronskih mreža (DNN) kako bi obnovili potrebu za funkcionalnim inženjerstvom. Osim toga, nedavno su razvijene hibridne metode koje integriraju rukopisane funkcije u model DNN-AES i postigle su tačnost stanja umjetnosti. Jedna od najpopularnijih hibridnih metoda je formulirana kao model DNN-AES sa dodatnim rekonstruiranom neuralnom mrežom (RNN), koja procesira sekvenciju karakteristika razine rečenica na rukama. Međutim, ovaj metod ima sljedeće probleme: 1) Ne može uključiti učinkovite karakteristike nivoa eseja razvijene u prethodnim istraživanjima AES. 2) Veličanstveno povećava broj modelnih parametara i parametara prilagodbe, povećavajući teškoće obuke modela. 3) Ima dodatnu RNN za procesiranje karakteristika nivoa rečenica, omogućavajući produžavanje različitih DNN-AES modela kompleksa. Da bi riješili te probleme, predlažemo novu hibridnu metodu koja integrira karakteristike na nivou eseja u DNN-AES model. Posebno, naša metoda potvrđuje karakteristike na razini eseja za raspodjeljeni vektor zastupanja eseja, koji je dobijen od prosječnog sloja modela DNN-AES. Naša metoda je jednostavna proširenja DNN-AES, ali značajno poboljšava preciznost izvlačenja.', 'cs': 'Automatizované skórování esejů (AES) je úkol automatického přiřazování skóre esejům jako alternativa k hodnocení lidskými hodnotícími. Konvenční AES se obvykle spoléhá na ručně vytvořené funkce, zatímco nedávné studie navrhly AES modely založené na hlubokých neuronových sítích (DNN), aby se zabránilo potřebě funkčního inženýrství. Kromě toho byly nedávno vyvinuty hybridní metody, které integrují ručně vyráběné prvky do modelu DNN-AES, a dosáhly nejmodernější přesnosti. Jedna z nejpopulárnějších hybridních metod je formulována jako DNN-AES model s další rekurentní neuronovou sítí (RNN), která zpracovává sekvenci ručně vytvořených funkcí na úrovni věty. Tato metoda však má následující problémy: 1) Nemůže zahrnovat efektivní prvky na úrovni eseje vyvinuté v předchozím AES výzkumu. 2) Výrazně zvyšuje počet parametrů modelu a ladění parametrů, zvyšuje obtížnost tréninku modelu. 3) Má další RNN pro zpracování funkcí na úrovni věty, což umožňuje rozšíření na různé DNN-AES modely komplexu. Pro vyřešení těchto problémů navrhujeme novou hybridní metodu, která integruje ručně vytvořené prvky na úrovni eseje do modelu DNN-AES. Konkrétně naše metoda řetězí ručně vytvořené prvky na úrovni eseje k distribuovanému reprezentačnímu vektoru eseje, který je získán ze střední vrstvy modelu DNN-AES. Naší metodou je jednoduché rozšíření DNN-AES, ale výrazně zlepšuje přesnost bodování.', 'ca': "La puntuació automàtica d'assaig (AES) és la tasca d'assenyar automàticament puntuacions als assaig com una alternativa a la classificació per puntuadors humans. Conventional AES typically relies on handcrafted features, whereas recent studies have proposed AES models based on deep neural networks (DNNs) to obviate the need for feature engineering.  A més, fa poc s'han desenvolupat mètodes híbrids que integren característiques manuals en un model DNN-AES i han aconseguit la precisió més avançada. Un dels mètodes híbrids més populars és formulat com un model DNN-AES amb una xarxa neural recurrent adicional (RNN) que processa una seqüència de característiques de nivell de frases a mà. Però aquest mètode té els següents problemes: 1) No pot incorporar característiques efectives de nivell d'assaig desenvolupats en recerca anterior sobre AES. 2) Això augmenta molt el nombre de paràmetres de model i paràmetres de ajustament, augmentant la dificultat d'entrenament del model. 3) Té un RNN adicional per processar característiques del nivell de frases, permetent extensió a diversos models de DNN-AES complexes. Per resoldre aquests problemes, proposem un nou mètode híbrid que integri característiques de nivell d'assaig manual en un model DNN-AES. Specifically, our method concatenates handcrafted essay-level features to a distributed essay representation vector, which is obtained from an intermediate layer of a DNN-AES model.  Our method is a simple DNN-AES extension, but significantly improves scoring accuracy.", 'et': 'Automatiseeritud essee skoorimine (AES) on ülesanne määrata esseele automaatselt skoorid alternatiivina inimhindajate hindamisele. Tavapärane AES tugineb tavaliselt käsitsi valmistatud funktsioonidele, samas kui hiljutised uuringud on pakkunud välja AES mudelid, mis põhinevad sügavatel närvivõrkudel (DNN), et vältida funktsioonide projekteerimise vajadust. Lisaks on hiljuti välja töötatud hübriidmeetodid, mis integreerivad käsitöö funktsioone DNN-AES mudelisse, mis on saavutanud tipptasemel täpsuse. Üks populaarsemaid hübriidmeetodeid on sõnastatud DNN-AES mudelina, millel on täiendav korduv närvivõrk (RNN), mis töötleb käsitsi valmistatud lausetaseme funktsioonide jada. Sellel meetodil on siiski järgmised probleemid: 1) See ei saa sisaldada tõhusaid essee taseme funktsioone, mis on välja töötatud varasemates AESi uuringutes. 2) See suurendab oluliselt mudeli parameetrite ja häälestusparameetrite arvu, suurendades mudeli koolituse raskust. 3) Sellel on täiendav RNN lausetaseme funktsioonide töötlemiseks, mis võimaldab laiendada erinevaid DNN-AES mudeleid. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja uue hübriidmeetodi, mis integreerib käsitööna valmistatud esseetaseme funktsioonid DNN-AES mudelisse. Täpsemalt ühendab meie meetod käsitööna valmistatud esseetaseme omadused hajutatud essee esitusvektoriga, mis saadakse DNN-AES mudeli vahekihilt. Meie meetod on lihtne DNN-AES laiendus, kuid parandab märkimisväärselt punktide täpsust.', 'fi': 'Automatisoitu essee scoring (AES) on tehtävä antaa esseille automaattisesti pisteitä vaihtoehtona ihmisarvioijien arvostelulle. Perinteinen AES nojaa tyypillisesti käsityönä tehtyihin ominaisuuksiin, kun taas viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat ehdottaneet syväneuroverkkoihin (DNN) perustuvia AES-malleja ominaisuuksien suunnittelun välttämiseksi. Lisäksi hiljattain on kehitetty hybridimenetelmiä, jotka yhdistävät käsin tehtyjä ominaisuuksia DNN-AES-malliin, ja ne ovat saavuttaneet huipputason tarkkuuden. Yksi suosituimmista hybridimenetelmistä muotoillaan DNN-AES-mallina, jossa on toistuva neuroverkko (RNN), joka käsittelee sarjaa käsin tehtyjä lausetason ominaisuuksia. Tällä menetelmällä on kuitenkin seuraavat ongelmat: 1) Se ei voi sisältää tehokkaita esseetason ominaisuuksia, jotka on kehitetty aiemmissa AES-tutkimuksissa. 2) Se lisää huomattavasti mallin parametrien ja viritysparametrien määrää, mikä lisää mallikoulutuksen vaikeutta. 3) Siinä on ylimääräinen RNN lausetason ominaisuuksien käsittelyyn, mikä mahdollistaa laajennuksen erilaisiin DNN-AES-malleihin monimutkaisiin. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta hybridimenetelmää, joka integroi käsityönä tehdyt esseetason ominaisuudet DNN-AES-malliin. Menetelmämme yhdistää käsityönä tehtyjä esseetason ominaisuuksia hajautettuun essee-esitysvektoriin, joka saadaan DNN-AES-mallin välikerroksesta. Menetelmämme on yksinkertainen DNN-AES-laajennus, mutta parantaa merkittävästi pisteytystarkkuutta.', 'hy': 'Ավտոմացված էսսերի գնահատման (AeS) առաջադրանքն է ինքնաբերաբար գնահատել էսսերը որպես մարդկային գնահատողների գնահատման այլընտրանք: Հավանդական ԱԵՍ-ը սովորաբար հիմնված է ձեռագործված հատկությունների վրա, մինչդեռ վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները առաջարկել են ԱԵՍ-ի մոդելներ, որոնք հիմնված են խորը նյարդային ցանցերի վրա (ԴՆՆ-ներ), որպեսզի խուսափ Furthermore, hybrid methods that integrate handcrafted features in a DNN-AES model have been recently developed and have achieved state-of-the-art accuracy.  Ամենահայտնի հիբրիդային մեթոդներից մեկը ձևավորվում է որպես ԴՆԹ-ԱԵՍ մոդել, որն ունի ավելին կրկնվող նյարդային ցանց (ՌՆԹ), որը վերամշակում է ձեռագործված նախադասությունների մակարդակի հատկություններ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մեթոդը ունի հետևյալ խնդիրներ: 1) Այն չի կարող ներառել արդյունավետ էսսիայի մակարդակի առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք զարգացել են նախորդ ԱԵՍ հետազոտություններում 2) Այն մեծապես բարձրացնում է մոդելների պարամետրերի թիվը և հարմարեցման պարամետրերը, աճելով մոդելների ուսումնասիրության դժվարությունը: 3) Այն ունի ավելացնող ՌՆԹ նախադասության մակարդակի հատկությունների վերաբերյալ, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս տարբեր ԴՆԹ-ԱԵՍ մոդելների ընդլայնմանը: Այս խնդիրները լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր հիբրիդ մեթոդ, որը ինտեգրում է ձեռագործված էսսի մակարդակի հատկությունները ԴՆԹ-ԱԵՍ մոդելի մեջ: Հատկապես, մեր մեթոդը համեմատում է ձեռագործված էսսերի մակարդակի հատկությունները բաշխված էսսերի ներկայացման վեկտորին, որը ստացվում է ԴՆԹ-ԱԵՍ մոդելի միջին շերտից: Մեր մեթոդը պարզ ԴՆԹ-ԱԵՍ ընդլայնումն է, բայց նշանակալիորեն բարելավում է գնահատման ճշմարտությունը:', 'sq': 'Automated essay scoring (AES) is the task of automatically assigning scores to essays as an alternative to grading by human raters.  AES konvencionale zakonisht mbështetet në karakteristikat e ndërtuar me dorë, ndërsa studimet e fundit kanë propozuar modele AES bazuar në rrjetet e thella neuronale (DNN) për të shmangur nevojën për inxhinierinë e karakteristikave. Përveç kësaj, metodat hibride që integrojnë karakteristikat e ndërtuar me dorë në një model DNN-AES janë zhvilluar kohët e fundit dhe kanë arritur saktësinë më të lartë. Një nga metodat më popullore hibride është formuluar si një model DNN-AES me një rrjet shtesë të përsëritur nervor (RNN) që proceson një sekuencë të karakteristikave të nivelit të fjalimit me dorë. Megjithatë, ky metodë ka problemet e ardhshme: 1) Nuk mund të përfshijë elemente efektive të nivelit të eseve të zhvilluar në kërkimet e mëparshme të AES. 2) Ajo rrit shumë numrat e parametrave të modelit dhe parametrave të rregullimit, duke rritur vështirësinë e trajnimit të modelit. 3) Ajo ka një RNN shtesë për të procesuar karakteristikat e nivelit të fjalëve, duke mundësuar zgjerimin e modeleve të ndryshëm DNN-AES kompleks. Për të zgjidhur këto probleme, ne propozojmë një metodë të re hibride që integron karakteristikat e nivelit të eseve me dorë në një model DNN-AES. Veç veçan ërisht, metoda jonë bashkon karakteristikat e nivelit të eseve me dorë me një vektor të paraqitjes së eseve të shpërndarë, i cili merret nga një shtresë e ndërmjetësuar e një modeli DNN-AES. Metoda jonë është një zgjatje e thjeshtë DNN-AES, por përmirëson në mënyrë të konsiderueshme saktësinë e shënimit.', 'jv': 'Automated essay AESS tipik ngomong memperbudhakan manungkapan manungkapan, tan sabên ono dokumen sing karbote model AESD sing basa supoyo deep netwark (DNNs) kanggo bisa butuhan kanggo nyatakakno operasi jenis. Label section Nanging, metu iki dadi akeh perbudhakan nêmên: 1) iso nggawe akeh iso nggawe Perintah Nêmên sing bisa nyebutke nggawe barang AESe sak bagian. 2) Text 3) Mungkin di nambah DNN dumadhi kanggo sambah kelas-perusahaan, iso nglanggar tteksi kanggo sampeyan DNN-AESmodel komplikasi. Jejaring CURRENTCURRENT Awak dhéwé sistem sing sampeyan DNN-AEStambah kuwi, njuk dianggo ngerasahan barang nggawe barang penggunan.', 'he': 'Automated essay scoring (AES) is the task of automatically assigning scores to essays as an alternative to grading by human raters.  AES konventional typically relies on handcrafted features, whereas recent studies have proposed AES models based on deep neural networks (DNNs) to avoid the need for feature engineering. חוץ מזה, שיטות היברידיות שמשלפות תכונות משומשות במודל DNN-AES התפתחו לאחרונה וישגשו מדויקה חדשה. אחת השיטות היברידיות הכי פופולריות מתייצבת כדוגמנית DNN-AES עם רשת עצבית חוזרת נוספת (RNN) שמעבדת רצף של תכונות משפטי משפטים מיוחדים. בכל אופן, לשיטה הזאת יש הבעיות הבאות: 1) היא לא יכולה להכיל תכונות יעילות ברמה המאמרים שפותחות במחקר קודם AES. 2) זה מגביר באופן גדול את מספר הפרמטרים של דוגמנים ופרמטרים התאמה, מגביר את הקשה של אימון דוגמנים. 3) יש לו RNN נוסף כדי לעבד תכונות רמת המשפט, מאפשר התרחבות למוסגר דוגמני DNN-AES שונים. כדי לפתור את הבעיות האלה, אנו מציעים שיטה היברידית חדשה שמשלכת תכונות רמת המחזור הימנית למודל DNN-AES. במיוחד, השיטה שלנו מתאימה את תכונות רמת המשפטים המפורסמות לבוקטור מייצג המשפטים המפורסם, שנקבל משכבת בינונית של דוגמא DNN-AES. Our method is a simple DNN-AES extension, but significantly improves scoring accuracy.', 'sk': 'Avtomatizirano ocenjevanje esejev (AES) je naloga samodejnega dodeljevanja ocen esejev kot alternativa ocenjevanju človeških ocenjevalcev. Konvencionalni AES se običajno opira na ročno izdelane funkcije, medtem ko so nedavne študije predlagale modele AES, ki temeljijo na globokih nevronskih omrežjih (DNN), da bi se izognile potrebi po inženiringu funkcij. Poleg tega so bile pred kratkim razvite hibridne metode, ki vključujejo ročno izdelane funkcije v model DNN-AES in so dosegle vrhunsko natančnost. Ena najbolj priljubljenih hibridnih metod je oblikovana kot DNN-AES model z dodatnim ponavljajočim se nevronskim omrežjem (RNN), ki obdeluje zaporedje ročno izdelanih stavkovnih funkcij. Vendar ima ta metoda naslednje težave: 1) Ne more vključevati učinkovitih značilnosti na ravni eseja, razvitih v prejšnjih raziskavah AES. 2) Močno poveča število parametrov modela in parametrov uglaševanja, kar povečuje težavo usposabljanja modela. 3) Ima dodaten RNN za obdelavo funkcij stavka, ki omogoča razširitev na različne kompleksne modele DNN-AES. Za rešitev teh težav predlagamo novo hibridno metodo, ki v model DNN-AES vključuje ročno izdelane esejske funkcije. Natančneje, naša metoda povezuje ročno izdelane esejske značilnosti z porazdeljenim esejskim predstavitvenim vektorjem, ki je pridobljen iz vmesne plasti modela DNN-AES. Naša metoda je preprosta razširitev DNN-AES, vendar bistveno izboljša natančnost ocenjevanja.', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion AES na dõgara a kan takardar da hannayen hannuwansu, kuma a lokacin da aka goyyade misãlai na AES a kan zane da zanen tsarin neural (DNNS) don ya ƙayyade hajas na muhimmin muhimmin muhimmin masu inganci. Furan haka, hanyoyin Hybir da ke haɗa feature masu hannayen da aka samu cikin wata DNN-AES na ƙara kuma an sami tsarin-state-of-the-art. Babu ɗayan shiryoyin Hybrid da aka ƙayyade shi kamar wata motel na DNN-AES mai ƙara jerin da aka sake saukarwa (RNN) wanda ke samun wata sequence na tsari-leveli da hannayen aka hannayen su. A lokacin da, wannan hanyor yana da masu jẽre: 1) Bã zai iya shigar da wasu fasaɗar-levels mai amfani ba wanda aka buɗe su a cikin fitina na na farkon AES. 2) It greatly increases the numbers of model parameters and tuning parameters, increasing the difficulty of model training.  3) Yana da wani ƙari na RNN ya yi aiki ga fassarar tsari-leveli, kuma yana amfani da faɗaɗawa wa misãlai masu motsi na DNN-AES. Yana buɗe wa masu yiwuwa, ko kuma muna buƙata wata hanyor hibiri, wanda ke haɗa wasu fasafar-daraja da hannayensu da hannayen su sami zuwa wani misali na DNN-AES. Aka ƙayyade, hanyoyinmu na concatenate wasu fassarar-leveli da aka yi hannayen su zuwa wani shiryarwa mai tsakanin littafin da aka raba shi, wanda aka motsa daga wata daraja ta tsakanin DNN-AES. Taimakonmu na zama shimfiɗar DNN-AES mai sauƙi, kuma amma yana ƙari mai girma ga korrekin lissafi.', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ནི་མིང་རྟགས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ལས་གྲངས་ཀ་འདི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་འཐབ་རྒྱུ་དང་། Conventional AES typically relies on handcrafted features, whereas recent studies have proposed AES models based on deep neural networks (DNNs) to obviate the need for feature engineering. ད་དུང་། hybrid methods that integrate handcrafted features in a DNN-AES model have been recently developed and have achieved a state-of-the-art accuracy. One of the most popular hybrid methods is formulated as a DNN-AES model with an additional recurrent neural network (RNN) that processes a sequence of handcrafted sentence-level features. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདིར་འདི་ལ་གཤམ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་ཡོད། ༡)ནང་དུ་ཉུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དཔྱད་རིམ་ལྟར 2) It greatly increases the numbers of model parameters and tuning parameters, increasing the difficulty of model training. 3) འདི་ལ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་གཞན་ཞིག་ཡོད། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ཚོར་མོས་མཐུན་བྱེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆིག་ཡིག་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གིས་གནད་སྡུད་པའི་ལྟ་བ་གི་ཆོག་ཉི དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཆོག་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་སྟོན་པའི་བརྙན་རིས ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་DNN-AES འཕགས་རིས་སླ་བོ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ལྟར་བདེ་འཇགས་རྒྱས་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'A Straightforward Approach to Narratologically Grounded Character Identification', 'ar': 'نهج مباشر لتحديد الأسس سردية', 'es': 'Un enfoque directo para la identificación de personajes con base narratológica', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem direta para a identificação de personagens fundamentada na narrativa', 'fr': "Une approche directe de l'identification des personnages fondée sur la narration", 'ja': 'ナラトロジーに基づいた文字識別へのストレートなアプローチ', 'zh': '一本叙字符之简法', 'hi': 'Narratologically आधारित चरित्र पहचान के लिए एक सीधा दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Простой подход к нарратологически обоснованной идентификации персонажей', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Simplí maidir le hAithint Carachtair atá Bunaithe ar Thástáil na Narrateolaíochta', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A narrátológiailag megalapozott karakterazonosítás egyszerű megközelítése', 'it': "Un approccio diretto all'identificazione dei caratteri a terra narrativa", 'kk': 'Наратологиялық түсті таңбалардың идентификациясына жақсы жағдай', 'lt': 'Tiesioginis požiūris į narratologiškai pagrįstą ženklų identifikavimą', 'mk': 'Едноставен пристап до идентификацијата на наратолошки основани знаци', 'ml': 'സ്ട്രെയിച്ച്മെന്\u200dറ് മുന്നിലേക്ക് നാരാട്ടോളജിക്കലിലേക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന അക്ഷരസഞ', 'mt': 'Approċċ Dirett għall-Identifikazzjoni tal-Karatteri Raġunati Narratoloġikament', 'el': 'Μια απλή προσέγγιση στον αφηγηματικά τεκμηριωμένο προσδιορισμό χαρακτήρων', 'ms': 'A Straightforward Approach to Narratologically Grounded Character Identification', 'pl': 'Proste podejście do narratologicznie uzasadnionej identyfikacji znaków', 'ro': 'O abordare simplă a identificării caracterelor întemeiate naratologic', 'si': 'සිද්ධ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳින්න', 'so': 'A Straightforward Approach to Narratologically Grounded Character Identification', 'mn': 'Нарратологикийн хөндлөн харин тодорхойлолтын шууд ойлголт', 'no': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک سیدھا تقرب ناراٹولوژیک سیدھا سیدھا', 'sr': 'Pravi pristup identifikaciji karaktera', 'sv': 'En enkel metod för Narratoriskt Grounded Character Identifiering', 'ta': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một cách tiếp cận thẳng tới mức nhận diện ký tự', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Един прост подход към разказологично обоснованата идентификация на знаците', 'hr': 'Pravi pristup identifikaciji znakova', 'de': 'Ein einfacher Ansatz zur narratologisch begründeten Charakteridentifikation', 'ko': '서사 논리에 기초한 역할 식별의 간단한 방법', 'id': 'Sebuah pendekatan langsung untuk Identifikasi Karakter Berdasarkan Narratologi', 'fa': 'یک نزدیک مستقیم به شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهای ناراحتی', 'nl': 'Een eenvoudige benadering van narratologisch gegronde karakteridentificatie', 'da': 'En ligetilgang til naratologisk begrundet tegngidentifikation', 'sq': 'Një qasje e thjeshtë ndaj identifikimit të karakterit të bazuar në mënyrë Narratologjike', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Mpango unaowapata utambulisho wa Sheria zilizovunjwa', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Narratolojik Kalamlar Kimligi', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'ন্যারাটোলজিকভাবে গ্রাউন্ট অক্ষর পরিচিতির জন্য একটি স্ট্রাইটফর্মের সামনে', 'hy': 'Պարզ մոտեցում է նառատոլոգիապես հիմնված հերոսների հայտնաբերման', 'cs': 'Jednoduchý přístup k narratologicky odůvodněné identifikaci znaků', 'az': 'Narratolojik Z√ºmr…ôli Karakter Kimlikl…ôri', 'fi': 'Selkeä lähestymistapa narratologisesti perusteltuun merkkien tunnistamiseen', 'et': 'Selge lähenemisviis narratoloogiliselt põhjendatud märkide identifitseerimisele', 'ca': 'Un enfocament senzill a la identificació de caràcters raonatges', 'bs': 'Pravi pristup identifikaciji karaktera', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Preprost pristop k pripovedovalni identifikaciji znakov', 'bo': 'Narratologically Grounded Character Identification', 'he': 'A Straightforward Approach to Narratologically Grounded Character Identification'}
{'en': 'One of the most fundamental elements of narrative is character : if we are to understand a narrative, we must be able to identify the characters of that narrative. Therefore, character identification is a critical task in narrative natural language understanding. Most prior work has lacked a narratologically grounded definition of character, instead relying on simplified or implicit definitions that do not capture essential distinctions between characters and other referents in narratives. In prior work we proposed a preliminary definition of character that was based in clear narratological principles : a character is an animate entity that is important to the plot. Here we flesh out this concept, demonstrate that it can be reliably annotated (0.78 Cohen’s), and provide annotations of 170 narrative texts, drawn from 3 different corpora, containing 1,347 character co-reference chains and 21,999 non-character chains that include 3,937 animate chains. Furthermore, we have shown that a supervised classifier using a simple set of easily computable features can effectively identify these characters (overall F1 of 0.90). A detailed error analysis shows that character identification is first and foremost affected by co-reference quality, and further, that the shorter a chain is the harder it is to effectively identify as a character. We release our code and data for the benefit of other researchers', 'ar': 'أحد العناصر الأساسية للسرد هو الشخصية: إذا أردنا فهم السرد ، يجب أن نكون قادرين على تحديد شخصيات تلك السرد. لذلك ، يعد تحديد الشخصية مهمة حاسمة في فهم اللغة الطبيعية السردية. افتقرت معظم الأعمال السابقة إلى التعريف السردي للشخصية ، وبدلاً من ذلك اعتمدت على التعريفات المبسطة أو الضمنية التي لا تلتقط الفروق الأساسية بين الشخصيات والمراجع الأخرى في السرد. في العمل السابق ، اقترحنا تعريفًا أوليًا للشخصية يستند إلى مبادئ سردية واضحة: الشخصية هي كيان حيوي مهم للحبكة. نقوم هنا بتجسيد هذا المفهوم ، وإثبات أنه يمكن التعليق عليه بشكل موثوق (0.78 كوهين κ) ، وتقديم تعليقات توضيحية لـ 170 نصًا سرديًا ، مستمدة من 3 مجموعات مختلفة ، تحتوي على 1،347 حرفًا من سلاسل الإسناد المشترك و 21999 سلسلة غير شخصية تتضمن 3937 سلاسل متحركة. علاوة على ذلك ، أظهرنا أن المصنف الخاضع للإشراف الذي يستخدم مجموعة بسيطة من الميزات القابلة للحساب بسهولة يمكنه تحديد هذه الأحرف بشكل فعال (إجمالي F1 يبلغ 0.90). يُظهر تحليل الخطأ التفصيلي أن تحديد الشخصية يتأثر أولاً وقبل كل شيء بجودة المرجع المشترك ، علاوة على ذلك ، كلما كانت السلسلة أقصر كلما كان من الصعب تحديدها كشخصية بشكل فعال. نقوم بإصدار الكود والبيانات الخاصة بنا لصالح الباحثين الآخرين', 'es': 'Uno de los elementos más fundamentales de la narrativa es el carácter: si queremos entender una narrativa, debemos ser capaces de identificar a los personajes de esa narrativa. Por lo tanto, la identificación de personajes es una tarea fundamental en la comprensión narrativa del lenguaje natural. La mayoría de los trabajos anteriores han carecido de una definición narratológicamente fundamentada del personaje, sino que se basa en definiciones simplificadas o implícitas que no capturan distinciones esenciales entre personajes y otros referentes en las narrativas. En trabajos anteriores propusimos una definición preliminar de personaje que se basaba en principios narratológicos claros: un personaje es una entidad animada que es importante para la trama. Aquí desarrollamos este concepto, demostramos que se puede anotar de manera confiable (0.78 de la q de Cohen) y proporcionamos anotaciones de 170 textos narrativos, extraídos de 3 cuerpos diferentes, que contienen 1.347 cadenas de correferencia de caracteres y 21.999 cadenas de no personajes que incluyen 3.937 cadenas animadas. Además, hemos demostrado que un clasificador supervisado que utiliza un conjunto simple de funciones fácilmente computables puede identificar eficazmente estos caracteres (F1 general de 0.90). Un análisis detallado de errores muestra que la identificación de los caracteres se ve afectada ante todo por la calidad de la correferencia y, además, que cuanto más corta es una cadena, más difícil es identificarla eficazmente como un personaje. Publicamos nuestro código y datos para beneficio de otros investigadores', 'fr': "L'un des éléments les plus fondamentaux du récit est le caractère\xa0: si nous voulons comprendre un récit, nous devons être capables d'identifier les personnages de ce récit. L'identification des personnages est donc une tâche essentielle dans la compréhension du langage naturel narratif. La plupart des œuvres antérieures manquaient d'une définition du caractère fondée sur la narration, s'appuyant plutôt sur des définitions simplifiées ou implicites qui ne saisissent pas les distinctions essentielles entre les personnages et les autres référents dans les récits. Dans des travaux antérieurs, nous avons proposé une définition préliminaire du personnage qui reposait sur des principes narratologiques clairs\xa0: un personnage est une entité animée importante pour l'intrigue. Nous développons ici ce concept, démontrons qu'il peut être annoté de manière fiable (0,78 coefficient de Cohen) et fournissons des annotations de 170 textes narratifs, tirés de 3 corpus différents, contenant 1 347 chaînes de coréférence de caractères et 21 999 chaînes autres que des caractères qui incluent 3 937 chaînes animées. En outre, nous avons montré qu'un classificateur supervisé utilisant un ensemble simple de caractéristiques facilement calculables peut identifier efficacement ces caractères (F1 global de 0,90). Une analyse détaillée des erreurs montre que l'identification des caractères est d'abord et avant tout affectée par la qualité de la coréférence, et que plus une chaîne est courte, plus il est difficile de l'identifier efficacement en tant que personnage. Nous publions notre code et nos données au profit d'autres chercheurs", 'pt': 'Um dos elementos mais fundamentais da narrativa é o personagem: se quisermos entender uma narrativa, devemos ser capazes de identificar os personagens dessa narrativa. Portanto, a identificação de personagens é uma tarefa crítica na compreensão da linguagem natural narrativa. A maioria dos trabalhos anteriores carecia de uma definição narratologicamente fundamentada de personagem, em vez disso, confiando em definições simplificadas ou implícitas que não capturam distinções essenciais entre personagens e outros referentes nas narrativas. Em trabalhos anteriores propusemos uma definição preliminar de personagem que se baseava em princípios narratológicos claros: um personagem é uma entidade animada que é importante para o enredo. Aqui nós detalhamos este conceito, demonstramos que ele pode ser anotado de forma confiável (0,78 κ de Cohen), e fornecemos anotações de 170 textos narrativos, extraídos de 3 corpora diferentes, contendo 1.347 cadeias de co-referência de caracteres e 21.999 cadeias de não caracteres que incluem 3.937 cadeias animadas. Além disso, mostramos que um classificador supervisionado usando um conjunto simples de recursos facilmente computáveis pode identificar efetivamente esses caracteres (F1 geral de 0,90). Uma análise detalhada de erros mostra que a identificação de caracteres é afetada principalmente pela qualidade de co-referência e, além disso, quanto mais curta for uma cadeia, mais difícil será identificar efetivamente como um caractere. Liberamos nosso código e dados para o benefício de outros pesquisadores', 'ja': '物語の最も基本的な要素の1つはキャラクターです。物語を理解するには、その物語のキャラクターを特定することができなければなりません。 したがって、文字識別は物語の自然言語理解において重要な課題である。 以前のほとんどの著作は、物語の中のキャラクターと他の参照との間の本質的な区別を捉えない簡略化されたまたは暗黙の定義に依存する代わりに、物語学的に根拠のあるキャラクターの定義を欠いていた。 以前の研究では、明確な物語的原理に基づいたキャラクターの予備的な定義を提案しました。キャラクターはプロットにとって重要なアニメーションの実体です。 ここでは、このコンセプトを具体化し、確実に注釈を付けることができることを実証し（ 0.78コーエンのκ ）、1,347文字の共参照鎖と、3,937アニメート鎖を含む21,999文字の非文字鎖を含む、3つの異なるコーラから引き出された170の物語テキストの注釈を提供します。 さらに、簡単に計算可能な特徴の単純なセットを使用した監視された分類子は、これらの文字を効果的に識別することができることが示されている（全体的なF 1は0.90 ）。 詳細なエラー分析は、文字の識別が共参照品質によって第一に影響を受け、さらに、チェーンが短いほど文字として効果的に識別することが困難であることを示しています。 私たちは、他の研究者のためにコードとデータをリリースします', 'zh': "叙事最要元素之一是性情:若我们要解一个故事,我们必须识出这个叙事的人物。 故字符识者自然语言叙事之一务也。 大抵前文阙于叙事,而依于约隐,不得人物与叙事之指涉者异也。 先事而后义,角色动画大体。 此其实,证其可凭注(0.78 Cohen's κ),并供170叙本之注,本自3异语料库,包含1,347符共引锁21,999非字符,包3,937动画锁。 此外已验,用一组易计者督分类器可知(总F1为0.90)。 详差分析表明,字符先受参量,而链越短,愈难为字符。 发吾代码数,为他论利也", 'hi': 'कथा के सबसे मौलिक तत्वों में से एक चरित्र है: यदि हमें एक कथा को समझना है, तो हमें उस कथा के पात्रों की पहचान करने में सक्षम होना चाहिए। इसलिए, चरित्र पहचान कथा प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। अधिकांश पूर्व कार्य में चरित्र की एक narratologically आधारित परिभाषा का अभाव है, इसके बजाय सरलीकृत या अंतर्निहित परिभाषाओं पर निर्भर करता है जो कथाओं में वर्णों और अन्य संदर्भों के बीच आवश्यक अंतर को कैप्चर नहीं करते हैं। पहले के काम में हमने चरित्र की एक प्रारंभिक परिभाषा का प्रस्ताव दिया जो स्पष्ट narratological सिद्धांतों पर आधारित था: एक चरित्र एक चेतन इकाई है जो साजिश के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। यहां हम इस अवधारणा को बाहर निकालते हैं, यह प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि इसे मज़बूती से एनोटेट किया जा सकता है (0.78 कोहेन का π), और 170 कथा ग्रंथों के एनोटेशन प्रदान कर सकते हैं, जो 3 अलग-अलग कॉर्पोरेट से तैयार किए गए हैं, जिसमें 1,347 चरित्र सह-संदर्भ श्रृंखलाएं और 21,999 गैर-चरित्र श्रृंखलाएं शामिल हैं जिनमें 3,937 एनिमेट श्रृंखलाएं शामिल हैं। इसके अलावा, हमने दिखाया है कि आसानी से गणना योग्य सुविधाओं के एक साधारण सेट का उपयोग करके एक पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर इन वर्णों (0.90 के समग्र एफ 1) को प्रभावी ढंग से पहचान सकता है। एक विस्तृत त्रुटि विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि चरित्र की पहचान सबसे पहले और सबसे महत्वपूर्ण सह-संदर्भ गुणवत्ता से प्रभावित होती है, और आगे, कि एक श्रृंखला जितनी छोटी होती है, उतनी ही कठिन होती है कि यह प्रभावी रूप से एक चरित्र के रूप में पहचानकरना है। हम अन्य शोधकर्ताओं के लाभ के लिए अपना कोड और डेटा जारी करते हैं', 'ru': 'Одним из самых фундаментальных элементов повествования является характер: если мы хотим понять повествование, мы должны уметь идентифицировать персонажей этого повествования. Таким образом, идентификация персонажа является критически важной задачей в понимании естественного языка повествования. В большинстве предыдущих работ отсутствовало нарратологически обоснованное определение персонажа, вместо этого полагаясь на упрощенные или неявные определения, которые не отражают существенных различий между персонажами и другими ссылками в нарративах. В предыдущей работе мы предложили предварительное определение персонажа, которое основывалось на четких нарратологических принципах: персонаж - это живая сущность, важная для сюжета. Здесь мы конкретизируем эту концепцию, демонстрируем, что она может быть надежно аннотирована (0,78 κ Коэна), и предоставляем аннотации 170 повествовательных текстов, нарисованных из 3 различных корпусов, содержащих 1347 кореференциальных цепочек символов и 21 999 несимвольных цепочек, которые включают 3937 живых цепочек. Кроме того, мы показали, что контролируемый классификатор, использующий простой набор легко вычисляемых признаков, может эффективно идентифицировать эти символы (в целом F1 0,90). Детальный анализ ошибок показывает, что на идентификацию символов в первую очередь влияет качество сопоставления, и, кроме того, чем короче цепь, тем труднее ее эффективно идентифицировать в качестве символа. Мы публикуем наш код и данные в интересах других исследователей', 'ga': "Ceann de na gnéithe is bunúsaí den insint ná carachtar: má táimid chun scéal a thuiscint, ní mór dúinn a bheith in ann carachtair an insint sin a aithint. Mar sin, is tasc ríthábhachtach é sainaithint carachtar i dtuiscint na teanga nádúrtha ar insint. Ní raibh sainmhíniú ar charachtar bunaithe ar scéalaíocht ag formhór na hoibre roimhe seo, ach ina ionad sin bhí sé ag brath ar shainmhínithe simplithe nó intuigthe nach ndéanann idirdhealú riachtanach idir carachtair agus tagairtí eile i insint. In réamhobair mholamar réamh-shainmhíniú ar charachtar a bhí bunaithe ar phrionsabail shoiléir narateolaíochta: is eintiteas beo é carachtar atá tábhachtach don phlota. Déanaimid an coincheap seo a fheabhsú anseo, léiriú gur féidir é a anótáil go hiontaofa (0.78 Cohen's κ), agus cuirimid nótaí ar fáil ar 170 téacs insinte, tarraingthe as 3 chorpora éagsúla, ina bhfuil 1,347 slabhra comhthagartha carachtar agus 21,999 slabhraí neamhcharachtair a chuimsíonn 3,937 slabhraí beochana. Ina theannta sin, tá sé léirithe againn gur féidir le haicmitheoir maoirsithe a úsáideann sraith shimplí de ghnéithe atá éasca le ríomh na carachtair seo a shainaithint go héifeachtach (F1 iomlán de 0.90). Léiríonn anailís mhionsonraithe earráide go mbíonn tionchar ag cáilíocht na comhthagartha ar an gcéad dul síos ar shainaithint carachtar, agus ina theannta sin, dá giorra slabhra is amhlaidh is deacra é a aithint go héifeachtach mar charachtar. Eisímid ár gcód agus ár sonraí ar mhaithe le taighdeoirí eile", 'ka': 'სიტყვების უფრო ფუნდამეტური ელემენტების ერთი არის სიტყვები: თუ გვინდა გავიგოთ სიტყვები, ჩვენ უნდა შეგვიძლია იდენტიფიკუროთ სიტყვების სიტყვები. ამიტომ, სიცოცხლეების ინდიდინტიფიკაცია კრიტიკური დავალება სიტყველური ენის განსხვავებაში. უფრო მხოლოდ წინ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო არსებობს სიტყვების პარატოლოგიური განსაზღვრება, მაგრამ განსაზღვრებული ან ინფლისიტური განსაზღვრების შესაძლებელად, რომელიც არსებობ პირველი სამუშაოში ჩვენ მივიღეთ პრელიმენტური განსაზღვრება, რომელიც წარმოადგილური პარატოლოგიური პრიცენტებში დაბაზეულია: პრიცენტი არის ანიმიტური ინტერტი, რომელიც პ აქ ჩვენ ამ კონცექტის გადავიწყებთ, რომ ეს შეიძლება დარწმუნელად აღწერა (0.78 კონის x) და დავიწყებთ 170 შესაბამისი ტექსტის აღწერები, რომელიც 3 განსხვავებული კოპორადან გამოყენებულია, რომელიც 1.347 სიმბოლობის კონცექტის კონტ დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენეთ, რომ მონაცემული კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც გამოყენებს მარტივი კომპიუტებულ ფუნქციების ნაწილი, შეუძლია ეფექტიურად იდენტიფიკაცია ამ განსაკუთრებული შეცდომის ანალიზაცია ჩვენებს, რომ სიმბოლოების განსაკუთრება პირველი და პირველი განსაკუთრებული კალეტაციის შესახებ და დამატებით, რომ კიდევ კიდევ კიდევ კიდევ კიდევ უფრო ჩვენ ჩვენი კოდის და მონაცემების გამოყენება სხვა მსწავლებელების გამოსახულებაში', 'el': "Ένα από τα πιο θεμελιώδη στοιχεία της αφήγησης είναι ο χαρακτήρας: αν θέλουμε να κατανοήσουμε μια αφήγηση, πρέπει να είμαστε σε θέση να αναγνωρίσουμε τους χαρακτήρες αυτής της αφήγησης. Ως εκ τούτου, η αναγνώριση χαρακτήρων είναι ένα κρίσιμο έργο στην αφηγηματική κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Τα περισσότερα προηγούμενα έργα δεν έχουν έναν αφηγηματικά θεμελιωμένο ορισμό του χαρακτήρα, αντ' αυτού βασίζονται σε απλοποιημένους ή έμμεσους ορισμούς που δεν συλλαμβάνουν ουσιώδεις διακρίσεις μεταξύ χαρακτήρων και άλλων αναφορών στις αφηγήσεις. Σε προηγούμενες εργασίες προτείναμε έναν προκαταρκτικό ορισμό του χαρακτήρα που βασίστηκε σε σαφείς αφηγηματικές αρχές: ένας χαρακτήρας είναι μια ζωηρή οντότητα που είναι σημαντική για την πλοκή. Εδώ ολοκληρώνουμε αυτή την έννοια, αποδεικνύουμε ότι μπορεί να σχολιαστεί αξιόπιστα (0.78 του Κόεν) και παρέχουμε σχολιασμούς 170 αφηγηματικών κειμένων, που προέρχονται από τρία διαφορετικά σώματα, που περιέχουν αλυσίδες συν-αναφοράς χαρακτήρων 1,347 και 21,999 αλυσίδες μη-χαρακτήρων που περιλαμβάνουν 3,937 κινούμενες αλυσίδες. Επιπλέον, έχουμε δείξει ότι ένας εποπτευόμενος ταξινομητής που χρησιμοποιεί ένα απλό σύνολο εύκολα υπολογιζόμενων χαρακτηριστικών μπορεί να αναγνωρίσει αποτελεσματικά αυτούς τους χαρακτήρες (συνολικά F1 του 0.90). Μια λεπτομερής ανάλυση σφαλμάτων δείχνει ότι ο προσδιορισμός χαρακτήρων επηρεάζεται πρωτίστως από την ποιότητα συν-αναφοράς, και επιπλέον, ότι όσο μικρότερη είναι μια αλυσίδα τόσο πιο δύσκολο είναι να αναγνωριστεί αποτελεσματικά ως χαρακτήρας. Απελευθερώνουμε τον κώδικα και τα δεδομένα μας προς όφελος άλλων ερευνητών", 'kk': 'Жазудың ең негізгі элементтерінің бірі - таңба: егер біз жазуды түсінеміз келсе, бұл жазудың таңбаларын анықтай аламыз. Сондықтан таңбаларды анықтау - түсінікті тілді түсініктерінің маңызды тапсырмасы. Алдыңғы жұмыс жұмысының көпшілігі таңбалар мен басқа сілтемелердің арасындағы қарапайым немесе қарапайым анықтамаларына көмектесуі керек. Алдыңғы жұмыстың алдында біз таңбаның алдындағы анықтамасын таңдадық: таңба - графика үшін маңызды анимациялық нысаны. Мұнда біз бұл концепцияны таңдап, оны сенімді түсіндіре аламыз (0,78 Кохен x) және 170 түсіндірілген мәтіндерді көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету үшін 3 түрлі корпорадан салып, 1,347 таңбалардың біріктіру тізімі Қосымша, біз бұл таңбаларды қарапайым есептеу мүмкіндіктері қолданатын бақылау классификаторын көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсеттік (барлық 0, 90 деген F1). Егжей- тегжейі қате анализ таңбалардың идентификациясы бірінші және алдыңғы сілтеменің сапасы бар екенін көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, сілтеменің қысқа қысқа дегені таңбалар ретінде анықтау әсер етілген Басқа зерттеушілер үшін код мен деректерімізді', 'hu': 'Az elbeszélés egyik legalapvetőbb eleme a karakter: ha meg akarunk érteni egy elbeszélést, képesnek kell lennünk azonosítani az elbeszélés karaktereit. Ezért a karakter azonosítása kritikus feladat a narratív természetes nyelv megértésében. A legtöbb korábbi munkában hiányzott a karakter narratológiailag megalapozott definíciója, ehelyett egyszerűsített vagy implicit definíciókra támaszkodva, amelyek nem rögzítik a karakterek és más referenciák közötti lényeges különbséget a narratívákban. Korábbi munkában a karakter előzetes definícióját javasoltuk, amely világos narratológiai elveken alapult: a karakter olyan animált entitás, amely fontos a cselekmény szempontjából. Itt kidolgozzuk ezt a koncepciót, bemutatjuk, hogy megbízhatóan megjegyezhető (0,78 Cohen x), és 170 narratív szöveget tartalmazunk, amelyek 3 különböző corporából készültek, 347 karakter társ-referencia láncot és 21 999 nem karakter láncot tartalmaznak, amelyek 3 937 animált láncot tartalmaznak. Továbbá megmutattuk, hogy egy felügyelt osztályozó, amely egy egyszerű, könnyen kiszámítható funkciókat használ, hatékonyan azonosítja ezeket a karaktereket (összességében F1 0,90). Egy részletes hibaelemzés azt mutatja, hogy a karakterek azonosítását elsősorban a társ-referencia minőség befolyásolja, továbbá, hogy minél rövidebb egy lánc, annál nehezebb hatékonyan azonosítani karakterként. Kódunkat és adatainkat más kutatók számára is kiadjuk', 'it': "Uno degli elementi più fondamentali della narrazione è il carattere: se vogliamo comprendere una narrazione, dobbiamo essere in grado di identificare i personaggi di quella narrazione. Pertanto, l'identificazione dei caratteri è un compito critico nella comprensione del linguaggio naturale narrativo. Nella maggior parte dei lavori precedenti mancava una definizione narrativamente fondata di carattere, basandosi invece su definizioni semplificate o implicite che non catturano distinzioni essenziali tra personaggi e altri referenti nelle narrazioni. Nel lavoro precedente abbiamo proposto una definizione preliminare del personaggio basata su chiari principi narrativi: un personaggio è un'entità animata che è importante per la trama. Qui approfondiamo questo concetto, dimostriamo che può essere annotato in modo affidabile (0,78 x di Cohen), e forniamo annotazioni di 170 testi narrativi, tratti da 3 corpi diversi, contenenti 1.347 catene di co-riferimento dei caratteri e 21.999 catene non-carattere che includono 3.937 catene animate. Inoltre, abbiamo dimostrato che un classificatore supervisionato che utilizza un semplice insieme di funzioni facilmente computabili può identificare efficacemente questi caratteri (F1 complessivo di 0,90). Un'analisi dettagliata degli errori mostra che l'identificazione dei caratteri è influenzata prima di tutto dalla qualità di co-riferimento e, inoltre, che più corta una catena è più difficile da identificare efficacemente come carattere. Rilasciamo il nostro codice e i nostri dati a beneficio di altri ricercatori", 'lt': 'Vienas iš pagrindinių narracijos elementų yra charakteris: jei norime suprasti narraciją, turime sugebėti nustatyti tos narracijos charakterius. Todėl simbolių identifikavimas yra itin svarbus uždavinys narraciniame natūralaus kalbos supratimo srityje. Daugumai ankstesnių darbų trūko narratologiniu požiūriu pagrįstos charakteristikos apibrėžimo, o vietoj to remtasi supaprastintomis arba netiesioginėmis apibrėžimais, kuriose nebūtų esminių ženklų ir kitų referentų skirtumų narratyvoje. Ankstesniame darbe pasiūlėme išankstinę charakterio apibrėžtį, pagrįstą aiškiais narratologiniais principais: charakteris yra animacinis subjektas, kuris yra svarbus paveikslui. Čia mes įtvirtiname šią koncepciją, įrodome, kad ją galima patikimai užrašyti (0,78 Koeno x), ir pateikiame 170 narracinių tekstų, nubrėžtų iš 3 skirtingų korprų, kuriuose yra 1,347 simbolių bendrosios nuorodos grandinės ir 21,999 ne simbolių grandinės, kuriose yra 3,937 animacinių grandinių. Be to, parodėme, kad prižiūrimas klasifikatorius, naudojantis paprastu lengvai apskaičiuojamų savybių rinkiniu, gali veiksmingai identifikuoti šiuos ženklus (bendras F1 – 0,90). Išsami klaidų analizė rodo, kad simbolių identifikavimui pirmiausia daro įtaka bendra etaloninė kokybė ir, be to, kad kuo trumpesnė grandinė, tuo sunkiau veiksmingai identifikuoti kaip simbolis. Mes skelbiame savo kodą ir duomenis kitų mokslininkų naudai', 'ms': "Salah satu unsur paling dasar cerita adalah aksara: jika kita mahu memahami cerita, kita mesti mampu mengenali aksara cerita itu. Oleh itu, pengenalan aksara adalah tugas kritik dalam pemahaman bahasa semulajadi naratif. Kebanyakan pekerjaan terdahulu telah kekurangan definisi aksara yang berdasarkan naratologi, selain daripada bergantung pada definisi yang mudah atau implicit yang tidak menangkap perbezaan penting antara aksara dan referens lain dalam cerita. Dalam kerja terdahulu kami melamar definisi awal aksara yang berdasarkan prinsip cerita yang jelas: aksara adalah entiti animasi yang penting untuk plot. Di sini kita memperlihatkan konsep ini, menunjukkan bahawa ia boleh dicatat dengan yakin (0.78 Cohen's x), dan menyediakan anotasi 170 teks cerita, dicat dari 3 korpra berbeza, mengandungi 1,347 rantai rujukan sama aksara dan 21,999 rantai bukan-aksara yang mengandungi 3,937 rantai animasi. Lagipun, kami telah menunjukkan bahawa pengklasifikasi yang diawasi menggunakan set sederhana ciri-ciri yang boleh dikira mudah dapat mengenalpasti aksara ini secara efektif (keseluruhan F1 0.90). Analisis ralat terperinci menunjukkan bahawa pengenalan aksara terlebih dahulu dan terpengaruh oleh kualiti rujukan-sama, dan lebih lanjut, bahawa rantai yang lebih pendek adalah lebih sukar untuk dikenalpasti secara efektif sebagai aksara. Kami melepaskan kod dan data kami untuk keuntungan peneliti lain", 'ml': 'ചരിത്രത്തിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും അടിസ്ഥാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മൂലങ്ങളിലൊരാള്\u200d അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിലാണ്: കഥാര്\u200dത്ഥം മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d നമുക്ക് അതിന്റ അതുകൊണ്ട്, അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ മനസ്സില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പ മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസകരമായ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടാത്ത അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മറ്റു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാ മുമ്പ് ജോലിയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി അടിസ്ഥാനമായിരുന്ന അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ ആദ്യ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ ഇവിടെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ആശയത്തിന്റെ മാംസം പുറത്തേക്ക് മാംസം കാണിക്കുന്നു, അത് വിശ്വസ്തതയോടെ വിഷമിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു (0. 78 കോഹെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ എക്സ്), വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് 170 വിവരങ്ങള അതിനുശേഷം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, എളുപ്പമായ ഒരു കൂട്ടുകൂടുതല്\u200d കണക്കാക്കുന്ന വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വിശദീകരിച്ച പിശക് അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നു അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ആദ്യം ആദ്യമാണെന്നും മുന്നില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക്കുന്നതും കൂ നമ്മുടെ കോഡും വിവരങ്ങളും മറ്റുള്ള പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയാണ് വിടുന്നത്.', 'mn': 'Хамгийн үндсэн элементүүдийн нэг нь харьцаа: хэрвээ бид түүхийг ойлгох хэрэгтэй бол бид тэр түүхийн дүрсийг тодорхойлж чадна. Тиймээс, харилцааны тодорхойлолт нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын чухал ажил юм. Эхний ажлын ихэнх нь харьцааны түвшинд баталгаатай тодорхойлолтой байдал байхгүй. Харин түүхийн оронд энгийн эсвэл хамааралтай тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтуудыг хамгийн чухал тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой байхгүй. Өмнөх ажлын тулд бид анхны тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтыг санал болгосон: харьцаа нь газрын тодорхойлолтын чухал амьтан бүтэц юм. Энд бид энэ ойлголтыг бий болгож, үүнийг итгэлтэй байж болно (0.78 Кохенын x) гэдгийг харуулж, 170 түүх бичиг бий болгож, 3 өөр корпоратаас зурсан, 1.347 харьцааны хамтдаа холбоотой хэлхээ, 21.999 харьцааны бус хэлхээ, 3.937 анимат хэлхээ гэдгийг харуулж болно. Мөн бид хялбар тооцоолж чадах боломжтой зүйлсийг ашиглаж буй хялбар хэлбэрийг удирдлагатай классификатор эдгээр хэлбэрүүдийг эффективно тодорхойлж чадна. Маш нарийвчлан алдааны шинжилгээ нь харьцааны идентификацийг эхлээд хамтран нийлүүлэх чадвартай нөлөөлдөг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Дараа нь, хэлхээ багасгах нь харьцааны хэмжээнд илүү хэцүү гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид өөр судлаачидын тулд код болон өгөгдлийг', 'mt': 'One of the most fundamental elements of narrative is character: if we are to understand a narrative, we must be able to identify the characters of that narrative.  Therefore, character identification is a critical task in narrative natural language understanding.  Il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti kien nieqes minn definizzjoni ta’ karattru bbażata fuq id-narratoloġija, minflok jiddependi fuq definizzjonijiet simplifikati jew impliċiti li ma jaqbdux distinzjonijiet essenzjali bejn karattri u referenti oħra fid-narrattivi. In prior work we proposed a preliminary definition of character that was based in clear narratological principles: a character is an animate entity that is important to the plot.  Hawnhekk aħna nistabbilizzaw dan il-kunċett, nippruvaw li jista’ jiġi annotat b’mod affidabbli (0.78 x ta’ Cohen), u nipprovdu annotazzjonijiet ta’ 170 test narrattiv, imfassal minn 3 korpi differenti, li fihom 1,347 katina ta’ ko-referenza ta’ karattru u 21,999 katina mhux ta’ karattru li jinkludu 3,937 katina animata. Barra minn hekk, urejna li klassifikatur superviż li juża sett sempliċi ta’ karatteristiċi li jistgħu jiġu kkalkulati faċilment jista’ effettivament jidentifika dawn il-karatteristiċi (F1 globali ta’ 0.90). Analiżi dettaljata tal-iżbalji turi li l-identifikazzjoni tal-karattru hija l-ewwel u qabel kollox affettwata mill-kwalità ta’ ko-referenza, u barra minn hekk, li l-qasir katina hija aktar diffiċli li tiġi identifikata b’mod effettiv bħala karattru. Aħna nħelsu l-kodiċi u d-dejta tagħna għall-benefiċċju ta’ riċerkaturi oħra', 'pl': 'Jednym z najbardziej podstawowych elementów narracji jest charakter: jeśli mamy zrozumieć narrację, musimy być w stanie zidentyfikować postacie tej narracji. Dlatego identyfikacja postaci jest kluczowym zadaniem w narracyjnym rozumieniu języka naturalnego. W większości wcześniejszych prac brakowało narratologicznie uzasadnionej definicji charakteru, zamiast tego opierając się na uproszczonych lub ukrytych definicjach, które nie uwzględniają istotnych rozróżnień między postaciami a innymi referentami w narracjach. W poprzednich pracach zaproponowaliśmy wstępną definicję postaci opartą na jasnych zasadach narratologicznych: postać jest istotną dla fabuły bytością animowaną. Tutaj dopełniamy tę koncepcję, pokazujemy, że można ją wiarygodnie adnotacjonować (x Cohena 0.78) i dostarczamy adnotacje 170 tekstów narracyjnych, wyciągniętych z trzech różnych korpusów, zawierających łańcuchy współreferencyjne 1,347 i 21,999 łańcuchy nieznaków, które zawierają łańcuchy animowane 3,937. Ponadto wykazaliśmy, że nadzorowany klasyfikator wykorzystujący prosty zestaw łatwo obliczalnych cech może skutecznie zidentyfikować te znaki (ogólnie F1 od 0,90). Szczegółowa analiza błędów pokazuje, że identyfikacja znaków ma wpływ przede wszystkim na jakość współreferencji, a ponadto, że im krótszy łańcuch, tym trudniej jest skutecznie zidentyfikować jako znak. Udostępniamy nasz kod i dane na rzecz innych naukowców', 'ro': 'Unul dintre elementele cele mai fundamentale ale narațiunii este caracterul: dacă vrem să înțelegem o narațiune, trebuie să putem identifica personajele narațiunii respective. Prin urmare, identificarea caracterului este o sarcină critică în înțelegerea limbajului natural narativ. Cele mai multe lucrări anterioare au lipsit o definiție narativă bazată pe caracter, bazându-se în schimb pe definiții simplificate sau implicite care nu capturează distincțiile esențiale dintre personaje și alți referenți în narațiuni. În lucrările anterioare am propus o definiție preliminară a caracterului bazată pe principii naratologice clare: un personaj este o entitate animată importantă pentru complot. Aici vom pune în practică acest concept, vom demonstra că poate fi adnotat în mod fiabil (0,78 x Cohen) și vom oferi adnotări de 170 de texte narative, extrase din 3 corpuri diferite, conținând 1.347 lanțuri de co-referință de caractere și 21.999 lanțuri non-caractere care includ 3.937 lanțuri animate. Mai mult, am arătat că un clasificator supravegheat care utilizează un set simplu de caracteristici ușor de calculat poate identifica eficient aceste caractere (F1 general de 0,90). O analiză detaliată a erorilor arată că identificarea caracterului este afectată în primul rând de calitatea corespondenței și, mai mult, că cu cât un lanț este mai scurt, cu atât este mai greu să se identifice eficient ca un caracter. Lansăm codul și datele noastre în beneficiul altor cercetători', 'no': 'Ein av dei mest grunnleggjande elementa av narrativ er teikn: viss vi skal forstå eit narrativ, må vi kunna identifisera teikna av den narrativen. Det er derfor eit kritisk oppgåve for teikn-identifikasjon i historiske naturspråk-forståking. Dei fleste førre arbeida har mangla ein historisk grunnleggjande definisjon av teikn, i staden for å trykke på enkelte eller implisitte definisjonar som ikkje hentar grunnleggjande forskjeller mellom teikn og andre referanser i narrativ. I førre arbeid foreslåde vi eit førre definisjon av teikn som er basert i klare narratologiske prinsipper: ein teikn er ein animativ entitet som er viktig for plottet. Her har vi kjøp ut denne konsepten, og demonstrer at det kan verta tiltrukkeleg oppmerkte (0,78 Cohen s x) og gjev notasjon av 170 narrativ tekstar, teikna frå 3 ulike korpora, som inneheld 1,347 teiknkomskjeder og 21,999 ikkje-teiknkoder som inneheld 3,937 animatetkjeder. I tillegg har vi vist at ein oversikt klassifiserer med ein enkel sett av enkle datamaskinære funksjonar kan faktisk identifisera desse teikna (overalt F1 av 0,90). Ein detaljert feilanalyse viser at teikn-identifikasjon er først og først påvirka av koreferanskvalitet, og framover at kortere ein kjede er det vanskelege å identifisera som teikn. Vi løyser koden og data våre for fordel av andre forskere', 'sr': 'Jedan od najosnovnijih elementa priče je karakter: ako želimo razumjeti priču, moramo biti u stanju da identifikujemo karaktere te priče. Stoga, identifikacija karaktera je kritičan zadatak u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Većin a prethodnog rada je nedostajala narratološki osnovana definicija karaktera, umjesto da se oslanja na jednostavne ili implicitne definicije koje ne uključuju ključne razlike između karaktera i drugih referenta u prièama. U prethodnom poslu smo predložili preliminarnu definiciju karaktera koja je bazirana na jasnim narratološkim principima: karakter je animativna entiteta koja je važna za plan. Ovdje se preplašimo koncept, pokazujemo da može biti pouzdano annotirano (0,78 Cohenov x), i pružamo annotacije 170 priče teksta, izvedenih iz 3 različitih korporacija, sadržajući 1.347 koreferentnih lanca karaktera i 21.999 nekarakternih lanca koji uključuju 3.937 animatnih lanca. Osim toga, pokazali smo da nadzorni klasifikator koristi jednostavan set lako računaljivih karaktera može efikasno identifikovati te karaktere (ukupno F1 od 0,90). Detaljna analiza greške pokazuje da je identifikacija karaktera prva i najviše uticala na kvalitet kooreferencije, i dalje, da je najkraći lanac teže da je efikasno identificirati kao karakter. Puštamo naš kod i podatke za korist drugih istraživača', 'si': 'සාක්ෂිකයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ වලින් එකක් තමයි සාක්ෂිකය: අපිට කතාවක් තේරෙන්න ඕන නම්, අපිට ඒ කතාවක්ගේ අක්ෂිකා ඉතින්, අක්ෂර පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න සැකසුම් වැඩක්. ගොඩක් කලින් කලින් වැඩට අවස්ථාවක් නැති විශ්වාසයක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසය නැති විශ්වාසය සහ අනිත මුලින් වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනව මෙන්න අපි මේ අදහසක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න (0.78 කෝහෙන්ගේ x), සහ 170 කතාවක් පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ සම්පූර්ණයක් දෙන්න, වෙනස් කෝපෝරා තුනක් වලින් පිළිබඳු ව ඉතින්, අපි පෙන්වන්න තියෙනවා මේ අක්ෂර වලින් පරික්ෂා කරපු සැකයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා කියලා විස්තර දෝෂ විශ්ලේෂනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අක්ෂර පරිශීලනය පළමුවෙන් හා පළමුවෙන් පරිශීලනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාර කර අපි අපේ කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත අනිත් පරීක්ෂකයන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න', 'so': "Mid ka mid ah waxyaabaha ugu muhiimsan ee taariikhda waa xaraf: haddii aynu fahanno sheeko, waa inaynu aqoonsan karno qalabka warqadaas. Sidaa darteed aqoonsiga qofku waa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku qoran waxyaabaha ku saabsan afka asalka ah. Inta badan shaqada hore waxaa ka baahan kara qoraal sawir ah, taas oo ka badal ah mid ku kalsoonayo qoraal sahlan ama sahlan oo aan qabsan kala duwanaansho muhiim ah oo ku saabsan sawirada iyo qof kale. Shaqo horay ayaannu horay u soo jeednay qoraal hore oo ku saleysan qoraal muuqasho ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka taariikhda: xaraf ah waa jidh anime ah oo muhiim u ah qorshaha. Here we flesh out this concept, demonstrate that it can be reliably annotated (0.78 Cohen's x), and provide annotations of 170 narrative texts, drawn from 3 different corpora, containing 1,347 character co-reference chains and 21,999 non-character chains that include 3,937 animate chains.  Sidoo kale waxaan tusnay in fasax maamul ah oo isticmaalaya noocyo fudud oo la xisaabinayo ay si caqli ah u aqoonsan karto lambarkaas (dhamaan F1 oo 0.90). Baaritaanka khaladda ah waxaa ka muuqda in aqoonsiga qofku uu yahay marka ugu horeysa iyo ugu horeysa uu saameyn ku leeyahay tayada wadajirka ah, sidoo kale in silsiladdu uu gaaban yahay waa ka adag tahay in lagu caddeeyo sida qof oo kale. Waxaynu u siinnaa sumadda iyo macluumaadyadeena si aan u helno baaritaan kale", 'sv': 'En av de mest grundläggande elementen i berättelsen är karaktär: om vi ska förstå en berättelse måste vi kunna identifiera karaktärerna i den berättelsen. Därför är karaktärsidentifiering en kritisk uppgift i berättande naturligt språkförståelse. De flesta tidigare arbeten har saknat en berättologiskt grundad definition av karaktär, istället förlitat sig på förenklade eller underförstådda definitioner som inte fångar väsentliga skillnader mellan karaktärer och andra referenter i berättelser. I tidigare arbete föreslog vi en preliminär definition av karaktär som baserades på tydliga berättande principer: en karaktär är en animerad enhet som är viktig för handlingen. Här fyller vi ut detta koncept, visar att det kan kommenteras på ett tillförlitligt sätt (0,78 Cohens x), och ger anteckningar på 170 berättande texter, hämtade från 3 olika korpora, innehållande 1 347 karaktärssamreferenskedjor och 21 999 icke-karaktärskedjor som inkluderar 3 937 animerade kedjor. Dessutom har vi visat att en övervakad klassificerare som använder en enkel uppsättning enkelt beräkningsbara funktioner effektivt kan identifiera dessa tecken (totalt F1 på 0,90). En detaljerad felanalys visar att karaktärsidentifiering först och främst påverkas av samreferenskvalitet, och dessutom att ju kortare en kedja är desto svårare är det att effektivt identifiera som ett tecken. Vi släpper ut vår kod och data till förmån för andra forskare', 'mk': 'Еден од најосновните елементи на приказната е карактерот: ако сакаме да разбереме приказна, мора да можеме да ги идентификуваме карактерите на таа приказна. Затоа идентификацијата на карактерите е критична задача во природното разбирање на јазикот. Повеќето претходни работи немаат распоредски основана дефиниција на карактерот, наместо да се потпираат на едноставени или имплицитни дефиниции кои не ги прифаќаат основните разлики помеѓу карактерите и другите референти во распоредувањата. In prior work we proposed a preliminary definition of character that was based in clear narratological principles: a character is an animate entity that is important to the plot.  Овде го истакнуваме овој концепт, демонстрираме дека може да биде доверливо анотиран (0,78 Х на Коен), и да обезбедиме анотации од 170 раскажувачки тексти, направени од 3 различни копори, кои содржат 1,347 кореференциски ланцеви на знаци и 21,999 некарактеристички ланцеви кои вклучуваат 3,937 анимирани ланцеви. Покрај тоа, покажавме дека надгледуваниот класификатор кој користи едноставен сет лесно обчистени карактеристики може ефикасно да ги идентификува овие знаци (вкупно F1 од 0,90). Деталната анализа на грешките покажува дека идентификацијата на карактерите е најпрво влијана на кореференцискиот квалитет, и понатаму, дека колку поскор ланец е потешко е ефикасно да се идентификува како карактер. Ние го објавуваме нашиот код и податоци за корист на другите истражувачи', 'ta': "வரலாற்றின் மிகவும் அடிப்படையான தனிமங்களில் ஒன்று எழுத்து உள்ளது: நாம் ஒரு கதையை புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டுமானால், நாம் அந்த கதைய ஆகையால், எழுத்து அடையாளம் சொல்லும் இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் முக்கியமான செயல். முன்னால் பெரும்பாலான வேலை ஒரு விவரமான அடிப்படையான எழுத்து வரையறை குறைந்தது, சுலபமாக அல்லது குறிப்பிட்ட வரையறைகளை நம்புவதில் அல்லது முக்கியமான வேற முன் வேலையில் நாம் ஒரு முன்னிருப்பு வரையறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது தெளிவான செய்தியான விவரங்களை அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையில் உள Here we flesh out this concept, demonstrate that it can be reliably annotated (0.78 Cohen's x), and provide annotations of 170 narrative texts, drawn from 3 different corpora, containing 1,347 character co-reference chains and 21,999 non-character chains that include 3,937 animate chains.  மேலும், நாம் ஒரு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பாளரை எளிதாக கணக்கிடும் குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்பதை காண்பித்துள்ளோம் ( 0.  ஒரு விவரமான பிழை அறிவிப்பு காட்டுகிறது எழுத்து அடையாளம் முதலில் பாதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது முதலில் குறிப்பிட்ட குறைந்தது, ஒரு சங்கிலியின் குற நாங்கள் மற்ற ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களுக்காக எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் தரவுகளை விடுவோம்", 'ur': 'کہانیاں کے زیادہ بنیادی عنصر میں سے ایک شخص ہے: اگر ہم کوئی کہانیاں سمجھ سکیں تو ہم اس کہانیاں کے شخصوں کو پہچان سکیں گے۔ لہٰذا، شخصیت شناسایی ایک ضروری کام ہے تاریخ طبیعی زبان سمجھنے میں۔ بیشک اگلوں سے پہلے کے کام کی تعریف کے ذریعہ ایک حکایت کے ذریعہ کی تعریف نہیں تھی، اس کے بدلے ساده یا مشکل تعریف پر بھروسہ کیا گیا ہے جو شخصات اور دوسرے سرگوشیوں کے درمیان ضروری اختلاف نہیں رکھتے۔ پہلے کے کام میں ہم نے ایک پہلی تعریف کی پیش فرض کی جو صریح داستان کی اصولوں میں بنیاد تھی: ایک شخصت ایک جانوری چیز ہے جو نقشه کے لئے اہم ہے۔ یہاں ہم اس نظریہ کو گوشت دیتے ہیں، دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ یقیناً آگاہ کر سکتے ہیں (0.78 کوئن کے x) اور 170 داستان متن کی آگاہ کرتی ہیں، جو 3 مختلف کوروں سے نکالا گیا ہے، جو 1.347 شخصت کی آرام زنجیروں میں ہے اور 21.999 غیر علامت زنجیروں میں ہے جو 3.937 آنیمیٹ زنجیروں میں شامل ہیں۔ اور ہم نے دکھایا ہے کہ آسان کامپیوتر قابل فکرتوں کی ایک ساده سٹ کے مطابق ایک سرپرست کلیسٹر ان شخصتوں کو اثبات سے پہچان سکتا ہے (0.90 کے سب F1)۔ ایک تفصیل تفصیل کی تفصیل دکھاتی ہے کہ شخصت شناسایی پہلی اور پہلی بار مشترک کیفیت کے ذریعہ اثر دیتی ہے، اور اس کے بعد، یہ کہ زیادہ کوتاہ زنجیر بہت مشکل ہے کہ اس کو اثرات کے طور پر پہچان دینا ہے. ہم دوسرے تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے فائدہ کے لئے ہمارا کوڈ اور ڈیٹا چھوڑ دیتے ہیں', 'uz': "Tarixning eng asosiy elementlaridan biri hususiyat: agar biz hikoyani tushunishni xohlasak, biz bu tarixining xususiyatlarini aniqlashimiz kerak. Hullas, ma'lumotni aniqlash asosiy tilni o'rganish muhim vazifasi. Koʻpchilik ishni taʼminlovchi bo'lgan belgilarni aniqlash uchun o'zgartirib boʻlmaydi, va tarixi va boshqa parametrlarning eng muhim ajratishga ishlatmaydi. Birinchi ishda, biz yaxshi narratologik qoidalari asosida yaratilgan birinchi darajaga animatlikni anglatdik. Hujjatning chegarasi muhim bo'lgan animatda maʼlumot. Here we flesh out this concept, demonstrate that it can be reliably annotated (0.78 Cohen's x), and provide annotations of 170 narrative texts, drawn from 3 different corpora, containing 1,347 character co-reference chains and 21,999 non-character chains that include 3,937 animate chains.  Ko'rsatganda, biz oddiy kompyuterning moslamalari yordamida boshqaruvchi darajasini ko'rsatdik, bu belgilarni ishlatish natijasida foydalanadi (umuman 0.90 sohasida F1. @ info Biz qoidamiz va maʼlumotni boshqa qidiruvlar uchun", 'vi': 'Một trong những nguyên tố cơ bản nhất của câu chuyện là tính cách: nếu chúng ta muốn hiểu được một câu chuyện, chúng ta phải có thể xác định các nhân vật của câu chuyện đó. Do đó, việc nhận diện ký tự là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc giải thích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Hầu hết các công việc trước đây thiếu một định nghĩa được thuật ngữ, thay vào đó dựa trên các định nghĩa đơn giản hoặc ngầm, mà không nắm bắt được sự khác biệt thiết yếu giữa các nhân vật và các trích dẫn khác trong các câu chuyện. Chúng tôi đã đề xuất một định nghĩa sơ bộ về nhân vật dựa trên các nguyên tắc dẫn truyện rõ ràng: một nhân vật là một thực thể thú hồn quan trọng với các biểu đồ. Ở đây chúng ta thể hiện khái niệm này, chứng minh rằng nó có thể được ghi chú đáng tin cậy (0.78 Cohen x) và cung cấp biên bản ghi chú của 170 văn bản mạch, được vẽ từ ba cơ thể khác nhau, có chứa chuỗi hợp lệ 1,347 và 21,99999999 vô hạn dây chuyền hoạt động gồm cả 3,937. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đã cho thấy một người phân loại được giám sát sử dụng một bộ đơn giản có tính năng dễ tính toán có thể xác định được các ký tự này (F1 toàn diện của 0.90). Một phân tích lỗi chi tiết cho thấy khả năng nhận dạng ký tự là ưu tiên hàng đầu với chất lượng tham khảo, và hơn nữa, rằng một chuỗi ngắn thì càng khó để xác định được tính cách hiệu quả. Chúng tôi phát hành mã và dữ liệu có lợi cho các nhà nghiên cứu khác', 'hr': 'Jedan od najosnovnijih elementa priče je karakter: ako želimo razumjeti priču, moramo biti u stanju identificirati znakove te priče. Stoga je identifikacija karaktera kritičan zadatak u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Većin a prethodnog rada nedostajala je narratologički temeljna definicija karaktera, umjesto da se oslanja na jednostavne ili implicitne definicije koje ne uključuju ključne razlike između znakova i drugih referenta u priče. Prije posla smo predložili preliminarnu definiciju karaktera koja je temeljena na jasnim narratološkim principima: karakter je animativna entiteta koja je važna za plan. Ovdje ćemo pokloniti taj koncept, pokazati da može biti pouzdano annotirano (0,78 Cohenov x) i pružiti annotacije 170 priče teksta, izvedenih iz 3 različitih tijela, sadržavajući 1.347 razmjerenih lanca karaktera i 21.999 lanca bez karaktera koji uključuju 3.937 animatnih lanca. Nadalje, pokazali smo da nadzorni klasifikator koristeći jednostavan set lako računaljivih funkcija može učinkovito identificirati te znakove (ukupno F1 od 0,90). Detaljna analiza greške pokazuje da je identifikacija karaktera prva i najprije utjecana na kvalitetu koreferencije, a dalje, da je kraći lanac teže učinkovito identificirati kao karakter. Puštamo naš kod i podatke za korist drugih istraživača', 'de': 'Eines der grundlegendsten Elemente der Erzählung ist der Charakter: Wenn wir eine Erzählung verstehen wollen, müssen wir in der Lage sein, die Charaktere dieser Erzählung zu identifizieren. Daher ist die Charakteridentifikation eine kritische Aufgabe im narrativen Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. In den meisten früheren Arbeiten fehlte eine narratologisch fundierte Definition von Charakter, sondern stützte sich auf vereinfachte oder implizite Definitionen, die wesentliche Unterschiede zwischen Charakteren und anderen Referenzen in Erzählungen nicht erfassen. In früheren Arbeiten haben wir eine vorläufige Definition von Charakter vorgeschlagen, die auf klaren narratologischen Prinzipien basierte: ein Charakter ist eine animierte Einheit, die für die Handlung wichtig ist. Hier werden wir dieses Konzept ausformulieren, demonstrieren, dass es zuverlässig annotiert werden kann (0.78 Cohens x), und liefern Annotationen von 170-Erzähltexten, die aus drei verschiedenen Korpora gezogen werden, die 1.347 Zeichen Co-Referenzketten und 21.999 Nicht-Zeichen Ketten enthalten, die 3.937 animierte Ketten enthalten. Darüber hinaus haben wir gezeigt, dass ein überwachter Klassifikator, der eine einfache Reihe von leicht berechenbaren Merkmalen verwendet, diese Zeichen effektiv identifizieren kann (insgesamt F1 von 0,90). Eine detaillierte Fehleranalyse zeigt, dass die Charakteridentifikation in erster Linie von der Co-Referenz-Qualität beeinflusst wird und dass je kürzer eine Kette ist, desto schwieriger ist es, sie effektiv als Zeichen zu identifizieren. Wir geben unseren Code und unsere Daten für andere Forscher frei', 'nl': "Een van de meest fundamentele elementen van het verhaal is karakter: als we een verhaal willen begrijpen, moeten we in staat zijn om de karakters van dat verhaal te identificeren. Daarom is karakteridentificatie een cruciale taak in het begrijpen van narratieve natuurlijke taal. Het meeste eerdere werk miste een narratologisch gefundeerde definitie van karakter, in plaats daarvan gebaseerd op vereenvoudigde of impliciete definities die geen essentiële onderscheid tussen personages en andere referenties in verhalen vastleggen. In eerdere werken hebben we een voorlopige definitie van karakter voorgesteld die gebaseerd was op duidelijke narratologische principes: een personage is een geanimeerde entiteit die belangrijk is voor het plot. Hier werken we dit concept uit, tonen aan dat het betrouwbaar geannoteerd kan worden (0.78 Cohen's x), en leveren we annotaties van 170 narratieve teksten, getrokken uit drie verschillende corpora, met 1.347 karakterco-referentieketens en 21.999 niet-karakterketens die 3.937 animate chains bevatten. Verder hebben we aangetoond dat een onder toezicht staande classificator met behulp van een eenvoudige set gemakkelijk berekenbare kenmerken deze karakters effectief kan identificeren (algehele F1 van 0.90). Een gedetailleerde foutanalyse toont aan dat karakteridentificatie in de eerste plaats wordt beïnvloed door co-referentiekwaliteit, en verder, dat hoe korter een keten is, hoe moeilijker het is om effectief als teken te identificeren. We geven onze code en data vrij ten behoeve van andere onderzoekers", 'ko': "서사의 가장 기본적인 요소 중 하나는 성격이다. 만약에 우리가 서사를 이해하려면 이 서사의 성격을 식별할 수 있어야 한다.따라서 인물 식별은 서사 자연 언어 이해의 관건적인 임무이다.이전의 대다수 작품은 서사학을 바탕으로 하는 역할 정의가 부족하고 간략하거나 은밀한 정의에 의존했다. 이런 정의는 역할과 서사에서 다른 지칭 대상 간의 본질적인 차이를 포착하지 못했다.이전의 작업에서 우리는 명확한 서사 논리 원칙을 바탕으로 하는 역할의 초보적인 정의를 제시했다. 역할은 줄거리에 매우 중요한 애니메이션 실체이다.여기서 우리는 이 개념을 충실하게 설명(0.78 Cohen's x)할 수 있음을 증명하고 170개의 서사 텍스트의 주석을 제공했다. 이 텍스트는 3개의 서로 다른 어료 라이브러리에서 왔고 1347개의 문자 공동 인용 체인과 21999개의 비 문자 체인을 포함한다. 그 중에서 3937개의 애니메이션 체인을 포함한다.그 밖에 우리는 간단하고 계산하기 쉬운 특징을 가진 감독 분류기를 사용하면 이 문자들을 효과적으로 식별할 수 있다(전체 F1은 0.90이다).상세한 오차 분석에 의하면 문자인식은 먼저 공동 참고 품질의 영향을 받고 체인이 짧을수록 문자로 효과적으로 식별하기 어렵다.우리가 코드와 데이터를 발표한 것은 다른 연구원들의 이익을 위해서이다", 'bg': 'Един от най-фундаменталните елементи на разказа е характерът: ако искаме да разберем един разказ, трябва да можем да идентифицираме героите на този разказ. Следователно идентификацията на героите е критична задача в повествителното разбиране на естествения език. Повечето предишни творби са липсвали нараторологично обоснована дефиниция на характера, вместо това разчитат на опростени или имплицитни дефиниции, които не улавят съществени разграничения между героите и другите референти в разказите. В предишна работа ние предложихме предварителна дефиниция на характера, която се основаваше на ясни разказологични принципи: героят е животинска същност, която е важна за сюжета. Тук ние оформяме тази концепция, демонстрираме, че тя може да бъде надеждно анотирана (0,78 х на Коен) и предоставяме анотации на 170 разказни текста, съставени от 3 различни корпора, съдържащи 1347 символни съпътстващи вериги и 21 999 вериги без символи, които включват 937 анимирани вериги. Освен това показахме, че контролиран класификатор, използващ прост набор от лесно изчислими функции, може ефективно да идентифицира тези знаци (общо F1 от 0,90). Подробен анализ на грешките показва, че идентификацията на знаците е повлияна преди всичко от качеството на съвместната референция и освен това, че колкото по-къса е веригата, толкова по-трудно се идентифицира ефективно като знак. Ние публикуваме нашия код и данни в полза на други изследователи', 'sw': 'Moja ya mambo ya msingi zaidi ya simulizi ni tabia: kama tunaweza kuelewa hadithi, lazima tutaweza kutambua tabia za simulizi hiyo. Therefore, character identification is a critical task in narrative natural language understanding.  Kazi nyingi za kabla imekosa ufafanuzi wa tabia, badala ya kutegemea maelezo rahisi au yenye ufafanuzi ambao hauwezi kupata tofauti muhimu kati ya tabia na watu wengine katika simulizi. Katika kazi ya awali tulipendekeza ufafanuzi wa awali wa tabia ambazo zilikuwa na msingi wa kanuni zilizo wazi za kusimulia: mhusika ni entity anime ambayo ni muhimu kwa mpango huo. Hapa tunatoa dhana hii, tunaonyesha kuwa inaweza kuchochezwa kwa imani (0.78 Cohen x), na kutoa matangazo ya maandishi 170 ya simulizi, iliyotolewa kutoka makampuni 3 tofauti, ikiwa na viungo 1,347 ambavyo vinavyohusiana na tabia 1,347 na silaha 21,999 zisizo na wahusika ambazo zinajumuisha silaha 3,937 za kimapenzi. Zaidi ya hayo, tumeonyesha kuwa mwangalizi aliyefuatiliwa kwa kutumia seti rahisi za utambulisho unaweza kutambua tabia hizi (jumla ya F1 ya 0.90). A detailed error analysis shows that character identification is first and foremost affected by co-reference quality, and further, that the shorter a chain is the harder it is to effectively identify as a character.  Tunaachia taarifa zetu kwa faida ya watafiti wengine', 'da': 'Et af de mest grundlæggende elementer i fortællingen er karakter: Hvis vi skal forstå en fortælling, skal vi være i stand til at identificere karaktererne i denne fortælling. Karakteridentifikation er derfor en kritisk opgave i fortællingens naturlige sprogforståelse. De fleste tidligere arbejder har manglet en fortællingsmæssigt begrundet definition af karakter, i stedet baseret på forenklede eller implicitte definitioner, der ikke fanger væsentlige skelner mellem karakterer og andre referenter i fortællinger. I tidligere arbejde foreslog vi en indledende definition af karakter, der var baseret på klare fortællingsprincipper: en karakter er en animeret enhed, der er vigtig for plottet. Her uddyber vi dette koncept, demonstrerer, at det pålideligt kan kommenteres (0,78 Cohens x), og giver noteringer på 170 fortællingstekster, tegnet fra 3 forskellige korpora, indeholdende 1.347 karakterkæder og 21.999 ikke-karakterkæder, der omfatter 3.937 animerede kæder. Desuden har vi vist, at en overvåget klassificering ved hjælp af et simpelt sæt af let beregnbare funktioner effektivt kan identificere disse tegn (samlet F1 på 0,90). En detaljeret fejlanalyse viser, at karakterindentifikation først og fremmest påvirkes af co-reference kvalitet, og endvidere, at jo kortere en kæde er desto sværere er det effektivt at identificere som karakter. Vi frigiver vores kode og data til gavn for andre forskere', 'af': "Een van die mees fundamentale elemente van narratiewe is karakter: as ons 'n narratiewe verstaan, moet ons in staat wees om die karakters van daardie narratiewe te identifiseer. Daarom is karakter-identifikasie 'n kritiese taak in narratiewe natuurlike taal verstanding. Die mees voorheede werk het 'n narratologies gegrónde definisie van karakter ontbreek, in plaas wat op eenvoudige of inplisite definisies vertrou word wat nie nodige verskilte tussen karakters en ander verwysings in narraties ontvang nie. In voorheede werk het ons 'n voorheede definisie van karakter voorgestel wat in duidelike narratologiese prinsipels gebaseer is: â\x80\x99n karakter is 'n animate entiteit wat belangrik is vir die plot. Hier is ons vlees uit hierdie konsepte, wys dat dit vertroulik kan wees (0.78 Cohen se x), en verskaf notasies van 170 narratiewe teks, geteken van 3 verskillende korpore, bevat 1.347 karakter kopersoeking kettings en 21.999 nie-karakterkettings wat 3.937 animatekettings insluit. Ons het ook vertoon dat 'n ondersoekte klassifiseerder gebruik 'n eenvoudige stel van maklik rekenaar funksies hierdie karakters kan effektief identifiseer (totaal F1 van 0. 90). 'n Gedetaileerde fout analisie vertoon dat karakter identifikasie eerste en voorste beïnvloor is deur saamverwysing kwaliteit, en verder, dat die korter 'n ketting is die harder wat dit is om effektief as 'n karakter te identifiseer. Ons verlos ons kode en data vir die voordeel van ander resekers", 'fa': 'یکی از پایه\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cترین عناصر داستان شخصیت است: اگر ما می\u200cخواهیم یک داستان را درک کنیم، باید بتوانیم شخصیت داستان را شناسایی کنیم. بنابراین، شناسایی شخصیت یک کار مهمی در درک زبان طبیعی داستان است. بیشتر کارهای پیشینیان تعریف شخصیت را به داستان\u200cشناسی لازم داشته است، به جای اینکه بر تعریف\u200cهای ساده یا غیرقابل اعتماد داشته باشند که تفاوت\u200cهای اصلی بین شخصیت\u200cها و دیگر گزارش\u200cهای داستان\u200cها را نمی\u200cگیرند. در کار پیش از این، ما پیشنهاد دادیم تعریف اولیه شخصیت که در اصل داستان\u200cشناسی روشن بود: یک شخصیت یک entity animate است که برای نقشه مهم است. در اینجا ما این مفهوم را می\u200cگیریم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن می\u200cتواند به طور قابل توضیح داده شود (x 0.78 کوئن) و توضیح 170 متن داستان را می\u200cدهیم، که از 3 شرکت متفاوت کشیده شده است، که شامل زنجیرهای متقابل توضیح ۱.347 شخصیت و زنجیرهای متقابل توضیح ۱.999 که شامل زنجیرهای متقا علاوه بر این، ما نشان دادیم که یک راهنمایی تحت نظر گرفته با استفاده از یک مجموعه ساده از ویژگی\u200cهای راحت کامپیوتر می\u200cتواند این شخصیت\u200cها را به طور تاثیر شناسایی کند (کل F1 از 0.90). یک تحلیل خطای جزئیات نشان می دهد که شناسایی شخصیت اول و پیش از این توسط کیفیت مشترک تأثیر داده شده و بیشتر، که کوتاه\u200cتر یک زنجیر سخت\u200cتر است که به طور موثرت به عنوان یک شخصیت شناسایی کند. ما کد و داده\u200cهایمان را برای سود دیگر محققان آزاد می\u200cکنیم', 'am': "ከታሪክ መሠረቶች አንዱ አካባቢ ነው፤ ታሪክ ለማስተዋል ብንችል የዚህን ታሪክ አካላትን ማረጋገጥ አለን፡፡ ስለዚህ የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል የሚያስታወቂው ስራ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ በብዛቱ የሚታወቀው የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም፣ በዜና እና በሌላ ተርታፊዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን በማይችሉ ቀላል ወይም በተለየ ግንኙነት በማይታመን የሚታመን ነው፡፡ ከቀድሞው ሥራ በፊት የጥያቄ ትርጉም አካላት የተደረገውን የፊደል ግንኙነት አቀረብን፡፡ Here we flesh out this concept, demonstrate that it can be reliably annotated (0.78 Cohen's x), and provide annotations of 170 narrative texts, drawn from 3 different corpora, containing 1,347 character co-reference chains and 21,999 non-character chains that include 3,937 animate chains.  Furthermore, we have shown that a supervised classifier using a simple set of easily computable features can effectively identify these characters (overall F1 of 0.90).  የተለየ የስህተት ትምህርት ማሳየት የፊደል ግንኙነቱ መጀመሪያ እና ቀድሞ በመጠቀም የሚታይ ነው፣ ከዚያም በኋላ ሰንሰለቱ አነስተኛ እንደሚሆን በጽሑፍ ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ ለሌሎች ተማሪዎች ጥቅም እናስቀራለን፡፡", 'sq': "Një nga elementet më thelbësore të tregimit është karakteri: nëse duam të kuptojmë një tregim, duhet të jemi në gjendje të identifikojmë karakteret e këtij tregimi. Prandaj, identifikimi i karakterit është një detyrë kritike në kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore narrative. Most prior work has lacked a narratologically grounded definition of character, instead relying on simplified or implicit definitions that do not capture essential distinctions between characters and other referents in narratives.  Në punën e mëparshme ne propozuam një përcaktim paraprak të karakterit që ishte bazuar në parime të qarta treguese: një karakter është një njësi animate që është e rëndësishme për komplotin. Këtu ne e nxjerrim këtë koncept, demonstrojmë se mund të shënohet në mënyrë të besueshme (0.78 Cohen's x), dhe të japim shënime të 170 teksteve treguese, të vizatuara nga 3 korpra të ndryshme, duke përmbajtur 1,347 zinxhirë bashkëreference karakterësh dhe 21,999 zinxhirë jo-karakterësh që përfshijnë 3,937 zinxhirë animate. Përveç kësaj, ne kemi treguar se një klasifikues i mbikqyrur duke përdorur një grup të thjeshtë karakteristike të lehtë të llogaritshme mund të identifikojë efektivisht këto karaktere (përgjithësisht F1 prej 0.90). Një analizë e detajuar e gabimeve tregon se identifikimi i karakterit është i prekur së pari dhe së pari nga cilësia e bashkëreferencës, dhe më tej, se sa më i shkurtër një zinxhir është më i vështirë është të identifikohet efektivisht si një karakter. Ne lëshojmë kodin dhe të dhënat tona për përfitim të kërkuesve të tjerë", 'id': "Salah satu elemen yang paling dasar dari cerita adalah karakter: jika kita ingin memahami cerita, kita harus dapat mengidentifikasi karakter dari cerita itu. Oleh karena itu, identifikasi karakter adalah tugas kritis dalam pengertian bahasa alam naratif. Kebanyakan pekerjaan sebelumnya telah kekurangan definisi karakter yang berdasarkan naratologi, sebaliknya bergantung pada definisi sederhana atau implicit yang tidak menangkap perbedaan penting antara karakter dan referen lainnya dalam cerita. In prior work we proposed a preliminary definition of character that was based in clear narratological principles: a character is an animate entity that is important to the plot.  Di sini kita memperlihatkan konsep ini, menunjukkan bahwa itu dapat dipercaya annotasi (0,78 Cohen's x), dan menyediakan annotasi dari 170 teks narratif, ditarik dari 3 corpora yang berbeda, mengandung 1,347 rantai koreferensi karakter dan 21,999 rantai non-karakter yang mengandung 3,937 rantai animasi. Selain itu, kami telah menunjukkan bahwa klasifikasi yang diawasi menggunakan set sederhana dari fitur yang mudah dihitung dapat secara efektif mengidentifikasi karakter-karakter ini (total F1 dari 0,90). Analisi kesalahan terperinci menunjukkan bahwa identifikasi karakter terlebih dahulu terpengaruh oleh kualitas koreferensi, dan lebih lanjut, bahwa rantai yang lebih pendek adalah semakin sulit untuk mengidentifikasi secara efektif sebagai karakter. Kami melepaskan kode dan data kami untuk keuntungan para peneliti lain", 'hy': 'Պատմվածքի ամենակարևոր տարրերից մեկը հերոսն է. եթե մենք ցանկանում ենք հասկանալ պատմվածքը, մենք պետք է կարողանանք ճանաչել այդ պատմվածքի հերոսները: Այսպիսով, բնավորության հայտնաբերումը կարևոր խնդիր է պատմության բնական լեզվի հասկացության մեջ: Անցյալ աշխատանքի մեծ մասը բացակայել է բնույթի պատմաբանորեն հիմնված սահմանումը, փոխարենը հիմնված է պարզ կամ ենթարկված սահմանումների վրա, որոնք չեն ներառում հիմնական տարբերություններ բնույթների և այլ վերաբերյալների միջև պատմություններում: Անցյալ աշխատանքի ժամանակ մենք առաջարկեցինք բնույթի նախագային սահմանումը, որը հիմնված էր պարզ պատմության սկզբունքներում. բնույթը անիմատիկ էակ է, որը կարևոր է գծագրի համար: Ահա մենք լուծում ենք այս գաղափարը, ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն կարող է վստահելի նշումներ անել (0.78 Կոհենի x-ը), և նշումներ տալ 170 պատմվածքային տեքստի մասին, նկարահանված 3 տարբեր կոպորատից, որոնք պարունակում են 1,347 բնորոշ համեմատական շղթաներ և 21,999 ոչ բնորոշ շղթաներ, որոնք պարունակում են 3,193 Ավելին, մենք ցույց տվեցինք, որ վերահսկված դասակարգիչը, որը օգտագործում է հեշտությամբ հաշվարկվող առանձնահատկությունների պարզ համակարգ, կարող է արդյունավետ հայտնաբերել այս առանձնահատկությունները (ընդհանուր F1-ը Մասնավոր սխալների վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ բնավորության հայտնաբերումը առաջին հերթին ազդում է կոնֆերանսային որակի վրա, և ավելին՝ որքան կարճ է շղթան, այնքան դժվար է արդյունավետ հայտնաբերել որպես բնավորություն: Մենք հրապարակում ենք մեր կոդը և տվյալները այլ հետազոտողների օգնությամբ,', 'tr': "Bir hekaýanyň iň esasy elementlerinden biri karakterdir: eger bir hekaýa düşünmek islesek, biz bu hekaýanyň karakterlerini tanap bilmeliyiz. Şol sebäpli, karakterleriň tanymasy tebigat dilleriniň düşünmesinde wajyp täsiridir. Iň köp eser, karakterleriň we a ýdymlaryň arasynda möhüm paýlawlary alyp bilmeýän bir karakterleriň düşünmesi ýok. Öňki işde biz öz taryha prinsipinde daýan ýan karakteriň öňki düşünmesini teklip etdik: bir karakter grafik üçin möhüm bir animattäk bar. Bu jümedi çözerip, güvenilir şekilde nöbet edilebilir (0.78 Köen'in x) we 170 sanat metinlerini 3 farklı korporadan çizilip getirip, 1.347 karakter ködleme zincirlerini ve 21.999 karakter çizgilerinde 3.937 animat zincirlerini dahil edip bileceğini gösterip bilýäris. Munuň üçin, biz bejerilen klassifikatçi olaryň a ňsatjag hasaplanjak üçin bu karakterleri täsirli tanap biler (0.90 iň bütin F1). Bir hata analizi görkezýär ki karakter identifikaýony ilkinji we öňki referens kalitesinden etjek bolandygyny görkezýär. Diňe-de, gysga bir zincir karakter diýmek kyn bir karakter diýipdir. Başga araştyranlaryň üçin ködlerimizi we maglumatlarymyzy çykarýarys", 'az': "Bu hekay…ônin …ôn fundamental elementl…ôrind…ôn biri karakterdir: …ôg…ôr bir hekay…ôni anlayńĪrsaq, biz bu hekay…ônin karakterl…ôrini tanńĪmayabilirik. Buna g√∂r…ô d…ô, karakter tanńĪmasńĪ t…ôbi…ôtli dil anlaŇüńĪlmasńĪnda kritik bir iŇüdir. ∆Źn √ßox …ôvv…ôlki iŇüin hekay…ôl…ôri v…ô baŇüqa referans arasńĪnda m√∂vcuddur f…ôrql…ônm…ôy…ôn t…ôrzl…ôrin…ô t…ôv…ôkk√ľl edilm…ôy…ôn v…ô sad…ôc…ô olaraq t…ôrzl…ôrin…ô t…ôv…ôkk√ľl edilm…ôy…ôn bir karakter t…ôrzini yoxdur. Biz …ôvv…ôlki iŇüd…ô a √ßńĪq hekay…ôl…ôrd…ô dayanan bir karakterin ilk t…ôrzini t…ôblińü etdik: bir karakter plot √ľ√ß√ľn vacib olan animat entit…ôdir. Bel…ôlikl…ô, biz bu m…ôs …ôl…ôni √ß…ôkirik, bu m…ôs…ôl…ônin g√ľvenilir olaraq (0.78 Cohen'in x-si) bildirilm…ôsini g√∂st…ôr…ôk v…ô 3 m√ľxt…ôlif korporadan √ßńĪxarńĪlmńĪŇü 170 hekay…ôtli m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr t…ôblińü edirik, 1.347 karakter birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü z…ôncirl…ôr v…ô 21.999 karakter olmayan z…ôncirl…ôr i√ß…ôrisind…ô 3.937 animat z…ôncirl…ôr vardńĪr. Daha sonra, biz g√∂st…ôrdik ki, √ßox asanlńĪqla hesablayabil…ôn f…ôrql…ôrl…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn bir n…ôzar…ôtli klasifikat√ßńĪ bu karakterl…ôri etkinlik olaraq tanńĪyabilir (b√ľt√ľn F1 0.90'dan). S…ôtraflńĪ x…ôta analizi g√∂st…ôrir ki, karakter kimlińüinin ilk v…ô ilk d…ôf…ô birl…ôŇüdirilm…ôk keyfiyy…ôtind…ôn t…ôsir edildiyini v…ô daha da, zincirin daha qńĪsa olduńüuna g√∂r…ô, …ôlam…ôt kimi tanńĪtmaq daha zordur. Biz kodumuz v…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪmńĪzńĪ dig…ôr araŇütńĪranlarńĪn faydasńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn yayńĪndńĪrńĪq", 'cs': 'Jedním z nejzákladnějších prvků vyprávění je charakter: máme-li porozumět příběhu, musíme být schopni identifikovat postavy tohoto příběhu. Identifikace znaků je proto kritickým úkolem v narativním porozumění přirozenému jazyce. Většina předchozích prací postrádala naratologicky zakotvenou definici charakteru, namísto toho se opírala o zjednodušené nebo implicitní definice, které nezachycují zásadní rozdíly mezi postavami a ostatními referenty v narativech. V předchozí práci jsme navrhli předběžnou definici postavy založenou na jasných naratologických principech: postava je animovaná entita, která je pro děj důležitá. Zde tento koncept doplníme, ukážeme, že může být spolehlivě anotován (0.78 Cohenovo x), a poskytneme anotace 170 vyprávěcích textů, čerpaných ze tří různých korpusů, obsahujících 1,347 znakové referenční řetězce a 21,999 řetězce bez znaků, které obsahují 3,937 animované řetězce. Dále jsme ukázali, že sledovaný klasifikátor využívající jednoduchou sadu snadno vypočítavých vlastností může tyto znaky efektivně identifikovat (celkově F1 0,90). Podrobná analýza chyb ukazuje, že identifikace znaků je v první řadě ovlivněna kvalitou korespondence a dále, že čím kratší řetězec je, tím těžší je efektivně identifikovat znak. Vydáváme kód a data ve prospěch ostatních výzkumných pracovníků', 'bn': 'One of the most fundamental elements of narrative is character: if we are to understand a narrative, we must be able to identify the characters of that narrative.  তাই, চরিত্র পরিচয় প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। বেশীরভাগ কাজের ক্ষেত্রে বিস্তারিত ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তির অভাব রয়েছে, বরং সুস্পষ্ট বা প্রাপ্ত সংখ্যার উপর নির্ পূর্বের কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম একটি প্রাথমিক বিবরণ যা পরিষ্কার বর্ণনা নীতির ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তি করেছিলাম: একটি চরিত্র হচ্ছে একটি আনি এখানে আমরা এই ধারণার মাংস বের করে দিচ্ছি যে এটি বিশ্বাসীভাবে বিরক্তিত হতে পারে (০. ৭৮ কোহেনের এক্স) এবং তিনি বিভিন্ন কোর্পোরা থেকে আঁকা ১,৩৪৭ চরিত্র এবং ২১,৯৯৯ অক্ষরের শেইন যার মধ এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখিয়েছি যে একটি সহজ সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে একটি পর্যবেক্ষক শ্রেণীবিভাগ কার্যক্রমে এই অক্ষরের চিহ্ন একটি বিস্তারিত ত্রুটি বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে চরিত্রের পরিচয় প্রথম এবং প্রথমে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত এবং এর পরে যে চেইনের সংক্রান্ত কমপক্ষে এটা কার্যকর কর কর আমরা অন্যান্য গবেষকের সুবিধার জন্য আমাদের কোড এবং তথ্য ছেড়ে দেই', 'ca': "One of the most fundamental elements of narrative is character: if we are to understand a narrative, we must be able to identify the characters of that narrative.  Therefore, character identification is a critical task in narrative natural language understanding.  Most prior work has lacked a narratologically grounded definition of character, instead relying on simplified or implicit definitions that do not capture essential distinctions between characters and other referents in narratives.  En treball anterior vam proposar una definició preliminar del caràcter basada en principis narratològics clars: un caràcter és una entitat animada que és important per a la trama. Aquí fem realitzar aquest concepte, demostram que es pot anotar de manera fiable (0,78 x de Cohen), i proporcionar anotacions de 170 textos narrativs, dibuixats de 3 corpores diferents, que contenen 1.347 cadenes de co-referència de caràcters i 21.999 cadenes no caràcters que inclouen 3.937 cadenes d'animació. A més, hem demostrat que un classificador supervisat utilitzant un conjunt simple de característiques fàcilment computable pot identificar efectivament aquests caracteres (F1 total de 0,90). A detailed error analysis shows that character identification is first and foremost affected by co-reference quality, and further, that the shorter a chain is the harder it is to effectively identify as a character.  Vam publicar el nostre codi i dades en benefici d'altres investigadors", 'et': 'Üks narratiivi kõige olulisemaid elemente on iseloom: kui tahame narratiivi mõista, peame suutma tuvastada selle narratiivi tegelased. Seetõttu on tegelaste identifitseerimine narratiivse looduskeele mõistmise kriitiline ülesanne. Enamik varasemaid tööd on puudunud narratoloogiliselt põhjendatud iseloomu definitsioonist, selle asemel tuginedes lihtsustatud või kaudsetele definitsioonidele, mis ei kajasta olulisi eristusi tegelaste ja teiste viitajate vahel narratiivides. Eelnevas töös pakkusime välja iseloomu esialgse definitsiooni, mis põhines selgetel narratoloogilistel põhimõtetel: tegelane on eluline olemus, mis on sündmusele oluline. Siin me täiendame seda kontseptsiooni, näitame, et seda saab usaldusväärselt märkida (0,78 Coheni x) ja anname märkmeid 170 narratiivsest tekstist, mis on koostatud kolmest erinevast korpusest, mis sisaldavad 1347 märgi kaasviiteahelat ja 21 999 mitte-märgi ahelat, mis sisaldavad 1937 animaat ahelat. Lisaks oleme näidanud, et lihtsat komplekti hõlpsasti arvutatavaid funktsioone kasutav järelevalve all olev klassifitseerija suudab neid märke tõhusalt tuvastada (kokku F1 0,90). Üksikasjalik veaanalüüs näitab, et märgi identifitseerimist mõjutab eelkõige kaasviidete kvaliteet ning et mida lühem on ahel, seda raskem on märgina tõhusalt identifitseerida. Avaldame oma koodi ja andmeid teiste teadlaste huvides', 'fi': 'Yksi kerronnan keskeisimmistä osatekijöistä on luonne: jos haluamme ymmärtää kertomusta, meidän on kyettävä tunnistamaan sen hahmot. Siksi hahmojen tunnistaminen on kriittinen tehtävä kerronnan luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisessä. Useimmilta aikaisemmilta töiltä on puuttunut narratologisesti perusteltu hahmon määritelmä, sen sijaan se on nojautunut yksinkertaistettuihin tai implisiittisiin määritelmiin, jotka eivät vangitse olennaisia eroja hahmojen ja muiden viittausten välillä kertomuksissa. Aiemmassa työssä ehdotimme hahmon alustavaa määritelmää, joka perustui selkeisiin narratologisiin periaatteisiin: hahmo on juonelle tärkeä elävä kokonaisuus. Tässä täydennämme tätä käsitettä, osoitamme, että se voidaan luotettavasti merkitä (0,78 Cohenin x) ja tarjoamme huomautuksia 170 narratiivisesta tekstistä, jotka on piirretty kolmesta eri korpusesta, jotka sisältävät 1 347 hahmon rinnakkaisviittausketjua ja 21 999 ei-hahmoketjua, jotka sisältävät 3 937 animaattiketjua. Lisäksi olemme osoittaneet, että valvottu luokittelija, joka käyttää yksinkertaisia helposti laskettavia ominaisuuksia, pystyy tehokkaasti tunnistamaan nämä merkit (kokonaisF1 0,90). Yksityiskohtainen virheanalyysi osoittaa, että rinnakkaisviitelaatu vaikuttaa ennen kaikkea merkin tunnistamiseen ja että mitä lyhyempi ketju on, sitä vaikeampi se on tunnistaa luonteeksi tehokkaasti. Julkaisemme koodimme ja tietomme muiden tutkijoiden hyväksi', 'bs': 'Jedan od najosnovnijih elementa priče je karakter: ako želimo razumjeti priču, moramo biti u stanju identificirati karaktere te priče. Stoga je identifikacija karaktera kritičan zadatak u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Većin a prethodnog rada je nedostajala narratologički osnovana definicija karaktera, umjesto da se oslanja na jednostavne ili implicitne definicije koje ne uključuju ključne razlike između znakova i drugih referenta u priče. U prethodnom poslu smo predložili preliminarnu definiciju karaktera koja je bazirana na jasnim narratološkim principima: karakter je animativna entiteta koja je važna za plan. Ovdje ćemo pokloniti taj koncept, pokazati da može biti pouzdano annotirano (0,78 Cohenov x), i pružiti annotacije 170 priče teksta, izvedenih iz 3 različitih korporacija, sadržavajući 1.347 koreferentnih lanca karaktera i 21.999 lanca bez karaktera koji uključuju 3.937 animatnih lanca. Nadalje, pokazali smo da nadzorni klasifikator koristeći jednostavan set lako računaljivih funkcija može učinkovito identificirati te znakove (ukupno F1 od 0,90). Detaljna analiza greške pokazuje da je identifikacija karaktera prva i najprije utjecana na kvalitetu koreferencije, i dalje, da je kraći lanac teže da je efikasno identificirati kao karakter. Puštamo naš kod i podatke za korist drugih istraživača', 'he': 'אחד מהאלמנטים הבסיסיים ביותר של הסיפור הוא האופי: אם אנחנו רוצים להבין סיפור, אנחנו חייבים להיות מסוגלים לזהות את הדמויות של הסיפור הזה. לכן, זיהוי דמות הוא משימה קריטית בהבנה טבעית של שפת סיפור. רוב העבודה הקודמת חסרה הגדרה של אופי מבחינה ספורטולוגית, במקום לסמוך על הגדרות פשוטות או מפורטות בעבודה הקודמת הצענו הגדרה קודמית של אופי שהייתה מבוססת בעקרונות ספורטולוגיים ברורים: אופי הוא ישות אנימטיבית שחשוב לתכנית. כאן אנו משקיעים את הרעיון הזה, מראים שהוא יכול להיות מצוין באופן אמין (0.78 x של כהן), ומספקים ציונים של 170 טקסטים סיפורים, מצוירים משלושה גופרות שונות, מכילים 1,347 שרשרות התייחסות אופיים ו-21,999 שרשרות לא אופיים שכוללות 3,937 שרשרות אנימטיות. חוץ מזה, הראינו כי מסווג משומר בשימוש קבוצה פשוטה של תכונות חשובים בקלות יכול לזהות באופן יעיל את הדמויות האלה (F1 של 0.90). ניתוח שגיאות מפורט מראה שזיהוי אופי מושפע קודם ובראשון על ידי איכות התייחסות משותפת, ובנוסף, שככל שקצר שרשרת זה קשה יותר לזהות באופן יעיל כאופי. אנחנו משחררים את הקוד והנתונים שלנו לטובת חוקרים אחרים', 'jv': 'Neri Anda-alas, sampeyan Karakter bukane mungkun nggawe nguasakno ngerasakno Awak dhéwé kudu irèh akeh sabanjuré akeh ngregani aturan-sabanjuré awak dhéwé, winih-sabanjuré awak dhéwé nggawe gerarané supaya perusahaan karo akeh lanjut sampeyan sing or a mbok dhéwé, akeh ngubah dhéwé Where\'s this reference Nejer Iki kita mengko nggawe barang-malang iki, iso nggambar kuwi nggawe barang-malang kotang (0.75 \'x\') lan nyimpen kelangan warni-warni warni-warni warni-warni 1.34 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ndeleksyon kesalahan langgar mungkin ngomong sampeyan karo urip nggambar tuang sampeyan karo apik sing apik dadi karo kaliteras, lan tambah njaluk, wong dhéwé nambah string kuwi susahe kanggo nambah layar Awak dhéwé mbukaké kode lan data kanggo kebebasané perusahaan mruput', 'ha': "Bayyan ƙanshi na ƙaranci na lãbãri yana karatun: ko da za mu iya fahimta wani lãbãri, sai za mu iya iya gane takardar wannan lãbãrin. Therefore, character identification is a critical task in narrative natural language understanding.  Babu mafi yawan aikin da ya riga ya ƙara wani defini na fassarar kwamfyuta, ko kuma yana dõgara a kan fassarar da masu sauki ko kuma da tabbatarwa, wanda bã ya sami rarrabai da muhimu a tsakanin karatun da wasu sunãye cikin bakwai. Daga wani aikin da ya gabata, ba mu buƙata wani fassarar halin da aka ƙaddara a kan kayan kanuni masu bayyani na ƙididatologi: wani character is an abõkan animati da yana da muhimu ga shirin. Hali, munã jiji daga wannan zato, ka nuna cewa za'a zartar da shi a yi aminci (0.78 Cohen x), kuma ka samar da takardar littattafai 170, an fizge shi daga makampuni 3 dabam-dabam, ana ƙunsa da sarƙõƙi 1,347 da sarƙoƙi 21,999 na rubutu waɗanda ke cikin sarƙõƙi 3,937. Furan haka, mun nuna cewa wani mai tsaron darafõfi mai amfani da wasu fasa masu sauƙi na lissafa, za'a iya gane waɗannan takardar (dukkan F1 na 0.90). Ana bayyana wani abu na ɓarna ya nuna cewa shaidar halin na farkon da ya yi musamman da tsarin kowace-Reference, kuma a ƙara, ƙaranci ɗin sarƙoƙi yana da ƙaranci don a gane shi kamar wata wahala. Tuna sakar da kodinmu da data dõmin amfani da wasu watani", 'sk': 'Eden od najpomembnejših elementov pripovedi je lik: če želimo razumeti pripovedi, moramo biti sposobni prepoznati like te pripovedi. Zato je identifikacija likov ključna naloga pri razumevanju naravnega jezika. Večina predhodnih del ni imela naratološko utemeljene definicije lika, namesto tega pa se je zanašala na poenostavljene ali implicitne definicije, ki ne zajemajo bistvenih razlik med liki in drugimi referencami v pripovedih. V predhodnem delu smo predlagali predhodno definicijo lika, ki je temeljila na jasnih naratoloških principih: lik je živa entiteta, ki je pomembna za ploskvo. Tukaj izpolnjujemo ta koncept, dokazujemo, da ga je mogoče zanesljivo označiti (0,78 Cohenov x) in zagotavljamo označbe 170 pripovednih besedil, sestavljenih iz treh različnih korpusov, ki vsebujejo 1.347 verig soverjanja znakov in 21.999 verig brez znakov, ki vključujejo 3.937 animiranih verig. Poleg tega smo pokazali, da lahko nadzorovani klasifikator, ki uporablja preprost nabor enostavno izračunanih funkcij, učinkovito prepozna te znake (skupno F1 0,90). Podrobna analiza napak kaže, da na identifikacijo znakov najprej in predvsem vpliva kakovost koplicevanja in da krajša kot je veriga, težje jo je učinkovito identificirati kot znak. Našo kodo in podatke objavljamo v korist drugih raziskovalcev', 'bo': "ས narrative ཡི་རྨང་གཞི་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་ནི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རེད། གལ་སྲིད་ང་ཚོས་narrative་ཤིག་རྟོགས་ན་འོང་། འུ་ཅག་གིས་narrative་ཚ དེར་བརྟེན། ཡིག་འབྲུ་ངོ་འཛིན་ནི་ཆེས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རྟོགས་ཤིག་ཡིན་པ། Most prior work has lacked a narratologically grounded definition of character, instead relying on simplified or implicit definitions that do not capture essential distinctions between characters and other referents in narratives. འོན་ཀྱང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟར་ངེད་ཚོའི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་ངོ་ཚོའི་ངོ་ཚོའི་སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ལ་བཤད་གཞི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། Here we flesh out this concept, demonstrate that it can be reliably annotated (0.78 Cohen's x), and provide annotations of 170 narrative texts, drawn from 3 different corpora, containing 1,347 character co-reference chains and 21,999 non-character chains that include 3,937 animate chains. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཞིག གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན་ཡིག་འབྲུལ་ངོ་འཛིན་འདི་དང་ཧྲིལ་བཀའ་བ་ནི་co-reference་གཙོ་ཅན་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ་མ་ཟད། འོན་ ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་པ་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་ལེགས་སྐྱོང་བ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་"}
{'en': 'Fine-grained Information Status Classification Using Discourse Context-Aware BERT', 'ar': 'تصنيف حالة المعلومات الدقيق باستخدام بروتوكول BERT المدرك لسياق الخطاب', 'es': 'Clasificación detallada del estado de la información mediante BERT sensible al contexto del discurso', 'pt': 'Classificação de status de informações refinadas usando o BERT sensível ao contexto do discurso', 'fr': "Classification précise de l'état de l'information à l'aide du BERT sensible au contexte Discourse", 'ja': 'Discourse Context - Aware BERTを使用した細かい情報ステータス分類', 'zh': '用语上下文感知 BERT 细粒度信息分类', 'hi': 'ठीक दानेदार सूचना स्थिति वर्गीकरण प्रवचन प्रसंग का उपयोग कर-जागरूक BERT', 'ru': 'Классификация состояния мелкозернистой информации с использованием контекстно-зависимого BERT дискурса', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Stádas Faisnéise Míndeartha ag Úsáid Comhthéacs Dioscúrsa-Aware BERT', 'hu': 'Finomszemcsés információk Állapotosztályozás beszédkörnyezettudatos BERT használatával', 'el': 'Βαθμολογημένη ταξινόμηση κατάστασης πληροφοριών με χρήση του BERT με γνώση του περιβάλλοντος του λόγου', 'ka': 'კლასიფიკაცია ინფორმაციის სტატუსის კონტექსტის გამოყენება', 'it': 'Classificazione dello stato delle informazioni a grana fine utilizzando BERT consapevole del contesto del discorso', 'kk': 'Ақпарат контексті белгісін қолданатын мәлімет күйі классификациясы', 'ml': 'ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് നല്ല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു', 'lt': 'Puikių grūdų informacinės būklės klasifikavimas naudojant diskurso kontekstą ir informuojant apie BERT', 'ms': 'Fine-grained Information Status Classification Using Discourse Context-Aware BERT', 'mk': 'Класификација на статусот на информации со фино растение користејќи контекст на дискурсот BERT', 'mn': 'Сайн давсан мэдээллийн статус хэлбэрээр ярианы контекст-Aware BERT хэрэглэх', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja stanu informacji drobnoziarnistej za pomocą kontekstowego BERT dyskursu', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni ta’ l-Istatus ta’ l-Informazzjoni bi ħbub fin bl-użu ta’ Diskussjoni Kuntest-Aware BERT', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija podataka informacija sa finom zrnom korištenjem konteksta-obaviještenja BERT', 'no': 'Klassifikasjon av fyn-korn informasjonstatus ved å bruka diskurskontekst-vekk BERT', 'ro': 'Clasificarea stării informațiilor cu granulație fină utilizând BERT conștient de contextul discursului', 'sv': 'Finkornig information Statusklassificering med hjälp av diskurskontextmedveten BERT', 'si': 'හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් තොරතුරු ස්ථිතිය සංවිධානය', 'so': 'Isticmaalka Discourse Context-aware BERT', 'ta': 'தகவல் நிலை வகைப்படுத்தலை பயன்படுத்தி பிரெட்', 'ur': 'پاکیزہ دانہ معلومات موقعیت کلاسیفٹ کی استعمال کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Финозърнеста класификация на статуса на информацията с помощта на дискурсния контекст', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija podataka za dobar zrak s upotrebom konteksta obavještavanja diskusija BERT', 'da': 'Finkornet information Statusklassificering ved hjælp af diskurskontekstbevidst BERT', 'de': 'Feingranulare Klassifizierung des Informationsstatus mithilfe von diskurskontextbezogenem BERT', 'id': 'Fine-grained Information Status Classification Using Discourse Context-Aware BERT', 'nl': 'Classificatie van de fijnkorrelige informatiestatus met behulp van discourse Context-Aware BERT', 'fa': 'کلاس\u200cسازی موقعیت اطلاعات نیکو با استفاده از آگاهی محیط صحبت', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa Utafiti Mkuu wa Habari BERT', 'tr': 'Gyzyk Maglumat Durumy Sözlemek Görkezilişinden BERT', 'af': 'Fine-graan inligting status klassifisering gebruik Speursie Konteks-Aware BERT', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i gjendjes së informacionit me rrënjë të mirë duke përdorur kontekstin e diskutimit BERT', 'ko': '문장 어경 감지에 기초한 세립도 정보 상태 분류', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'ԲԵԹ', 'az': 'S칬hb톛t Kontext-Aware', 'bn': 'Fine-grained Information Status Classification Using Discourse Context-Aware BERT', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija podataka informacija sa finom zrnom korištenjem konteksta obavještaja BERT', 'ca': "Classificació de l'estatus d'informació amb grans grans utilitzant el contexte del discurs BERT", 'cs': 'Klasifikace stavu jemných informací pomocí diskursního kontextu BERT', 'et': 'Teabe staatuse klassifitseerimine diskursuse konteksti teadliku BERTi abil', 'fi': 'Tarkka tietojen tilaluokitus diskurssikontekstitietoisen BERT:n avulla', 'jv': 'OptionsAfter', 'sk': 'Natančna razvrstitev stanja informacij z uporabo diskurznega konteksta ozaveščenega BERT', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שימוש במצב מידע מעולה באמצעות שימוש בקשר מודע לקונקסט BERT', 'bo': 'རྫོགས་པ་་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱ་རིམ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་ཁ་སྐོར་ཡུལ་སྟོན་པ BERT'}
{'en': 'Previous work on bridging anaphora recognition (Hou et al., 2013) casts the problem as a subtask of learning fine-grained information status (IS). However, these systems heavily depend on many hand-crafted linguistic features. In this paper, we propose a simple discourse context-aware BERT model for fine-grained IS classification. On the ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), our model achieves new state-of-the-art performances on fine-grained IS classification, obtaining a 4.8 absolute overall accuracy improvement compared to Hou et al. More importantly, we also show an improvement of 10.5 F1 points for bridging anaphora recognition without using any complex hand-crafted semantic features designed for capturing the bridging phenomenon. We further analyze the trained model and find that the most attended signals for each IS category correspond well to linguistic notions of information status.', 'ar': 'يلقي العمل السابق على سد التعرف على الجناس (Hou et al. ، 2013) المشكلة على أنها مهمة فرعية لتعلم حالة المعلومات الدقيقة (IS). ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه الأنظمة تعتمد بشكل كبير على العديد من الميزات اللغوية المصنوعة يدويًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج BERT بسيطًا يراعي سياق الخطاب لتصنيف IS ذو الحبيبات الدقيقة. في مجموعة ISNotes (Markert et al. ، 2012) ، يحقق نموذجنا أداءً جديدًا على أحدث طراز في تصنيف IS ذو الحبيبات الدقيقة ، ويحصل على 4.8 تحسين دقة شاملة مطلقة مقارنة بـ Hou وآخرون. (2013). والأهم من ذلك ، أننا نظهر أيضًا تحسنًا بمقدار 10.5 نقاط F1 لسد التعرف على الجاذبية دون استخدام أي ميزات دلالية معقدة مصنوعة يدويًا مصممة لالتقاط ظاهرة التجسير. نقوم بتحليل النموذج المدرب بشكل أكبر ونجد أن الإشارات الأكثر حضورًا لكل فئة من فئات أنظمة المعلومات تتوافق جيدًا مع المفاهيم اللغوية لحالة المعلومات.', 'fr': "Des travaux antérieurs sur la reconnaissance de l'anaphore pontée (Hou et al., 2013) présentent le problème comme une sous-tâche de l'apprentissage de l'état de l'information fine (IS). Cependant, ces systèmes dépendent fortement de nombreuses caractéristiques linguistiques élaborées à la main. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle BERT simple et sensible au contexte du discours pour une classification IS fine. Sur le corpus ISnotes (Markert et al., 2012), notre modèle atteint de nouvelles performances de pointe sur la classification IS fine, obtenant une amélioration de la précision globale absolue de 4,8 par rapport à Hou et al. (2013). Plus important encore, nous montrons également une amélioration de 10,5 points F1 pour la reconnaissance d'anaphore pontée sans utiliser de caractéristiques sémantiques complexes conçues à la main pour capturer le phénomène de pontage. Nous analysons plus en détail le modèle formé et constatons que les signaux les plus fréquentés pour chaque catégorie de SI correspondent bien aux notions linguistiques d'état de l'information.", 'es': 'El trabajo anterior sobre la reducción del reconocimiento de anáforas (Hou et al., 2013) presenta el problema como una subtarea de aprender el estado detallado de la información (SI). Sin embargo, estos sistemas dependen en gran medida de muchas características lingüísticas elaboradas a mano. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo BERT simple y sensible al contexto del discurso para la clasificación de SI de grano fino. En el corpus ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012), nuestro modelo logra nuevos rendimientos de vanguardia en la clasificación IS de grano fino, obteniendo una mejora absoluta de la precisión general de 4.8 en comparación con Hou et al. (2013). Y lo que es más importante, también mostramos una mejora de 10,5 puntos F1 para el reconocimiento de anáforas sin utilizar ninguna característica semántica compleja hecha a mano diseñada para capturar el fenómeno de los puentes. Analizamos más a fondo el modelo entrenado y encontramos que las señales más atendidas para cada categoría de SI se corresponden bien con las nociones lingüísticas del estado de la información.', 'pt': 'Trabalhos anteriores sobre o reconhecimento de anáfora de ponte (Hou et al., 2013) lançam o problema como uma subtarefa de aprender o status de informação refinada (IS). No entanto, esses sistemas dependem fortemente de muitos recursos linguísticos feitos à mão. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo BERT sensível ao contexto do discurso simples para classificação de SI de baixa granularidade. No corpus ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012), nosso modelo alcança novos desempenhos de última geração na classificação de SI de granulação fina, obtendo uma melhoria absoluta de 4,8 na precisão geral em comparação com Hou et al. (2013). Mais importante, também mostramos uma melhoria de 10,5 pontos F1 para o reconhecimento de anáfora de ponte sem usar nenhum recurso semântico complexo feito à mão projetado para capturar o fenômeno de ponte. Analisamos ainda mais o modelo treinado e descobrimos que os sinais mais atendidos para cada categoria de SI correspondem bem às noções linguísticas de status da informação.', 'ja': 'アナフォラ認識の橋渡しに関する以前の研究（ Hou et al., 2013 ）は、細かい情報ステータス（ IS ）を学習するサブタスクとして問題を投げかけている。しかし、これらのシステムは多くの手作り言語学的特徴に大きく依存している。この論文では、微粒子IS分類のための単純な文脈認識的言説BERTモデルを提案している。ISNotesコーパス（ Markert et al., 2012 ）では、当社のモデルは、細かいIS分類で最新の性能を達成し、Hou et al .（ 2013 ）と比較して4.8の絶対的な全体的な精度向上を得ています。さらに重要なことに、我々はまた、ブリッジ現象を捕捉するために設計された複雑な手作りの意味論的特徴を使用することなく、アナフォラ認識をブリッジするための10.5 F 1ポイントの改善を示す。私たちはさらに、訓練されたモデルを分析し、各ISカテゴリの最も参加したシグナルが、情報ステータスの言語学的概念によく対応していることを発見します。', 'hi': 'एनाफोरा मान्यता (Hou et al., 2013) ब्रिजिंग पर पिछला काम समस्या को ठीक-ठाक जानकारी स्थिति (आईएस) सीखने के एक उप-कार्य के रूप में डालता है। हालांकि, ये प्रणालियां कई हाथ से तैयार की गई भाषाई विशेषताओं पर बहुत अधिक निर्भर करती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम ठीक दानेदार आईएस वर्गीकरण के लिए एक सरल प्रवचन संदर्भ-जागरूक BERT मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। ISNotes कॉर्पस (Markert et al., 2012) पर, हमारा मॉडल ठीक-ठाक आईएस वर्गीकरण पर नए अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जो होउ एट अल की तुलना में 4.8 पूर्ण समग्र सटीकता सुधार प्राप्त करता है। इससे भी महत्वपूर्ण बात, हम ब्रिजिंग घटना को कैप्चर करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए किसी भी जटिल हाथ से तैयार की गई शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं का उपयोग किए बिना एनाफोरा मान्यता को पाटने के लिए 10.5 एफ 1 अंकों का सुधार भी दिखाते हैं। हम आगे प्रशिक्षित मॉडल का विश्लेषण करते हैं और पाते हैं कि प्रत्येक आईएस श्रेणी के लिए सबसे अधिक भाग लेने वाले संकेत सूचना की स्थिति की भाषाई धारणाओं के अनुरूप हैं।', 'zh': '昔桥接anaphora识(Hou等,2013)以为学细粒度息(IS)子职。 但是,这些系统很依赖于多手工制作的话特征。 本文之中,发一简语上下文感知BERT形,施于细粒度IS类。 于ISNotes语料库(Markert et al.,2012)之于细粒度IS,成于先进,比于Hou等(2013),获4.8之绝体。 更须展桥接无花果识10.5F1点,无用桥接工语义特征。 更论练模形,IS最关信信。', 'ru': 'Предыдущая работа по сближению распознавания анафор (Hou et al., 2013) ставит проблему как подзадачу изучения статуса мелкозернистой информации (IS). Однако эти системы в значительной степени зависят от многих лингвистических особенностей ручной работы. В этой статье мы предлагаем простую контекстно-зависимую модель BERT для мелкозернистой классификации IS. На корпусе ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012) наша модель достигает новых современных показателей по мелкозернистой классификации IS, получая 4,8 абсолютное общее улучшение точности по сравнению с Hou et al. (2013). Что более важно, мы также показываем улучшение на 10,5 пункта F1 для мостикового распознавания анафоры без использования каких-либо сложных семантических особенностей ручной работы, предназначенных для захвата мостикового явления. Далее мы анализируем обученную модель и обнаруживаем, что наиболее посещаемые сигналы для каждой категории ИС хорошо соответствуют лингвистическим понятиям информационного статуса.', 'ga': 'Leagann obair roimhe seo ar aithint anafóra idirlinne (Hou et al., 2013) an fhadhb amach mar fhothasc d’fhoghlaim stádais mhionsonraithe faisnéise (IS). Mar sin féin, braitheann na córais seo go mór ar go leor gnéithe teangeolaíochta lámhdhéanta. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid samhail dioscúrsa shimplí ar an eolas faoi chomhthéacs BERT le haghaidh aicmiú IS mínghlanta. Ar an gcorpas ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012), baineann ár múnla feidhmíochtaí nua den scoth amach ar aicmiú IS mínghlanta, ag fáil feabhsú cruinnis iomlán de 4.8 i gcomparáid le Hou et al. (2013). Níos tábhachtaí fós, léirímid freisin feabhas de 10.5 pointe F1 maidir le haithint anafóra idirlinne gan úsáid a bhaint as aon ghnéithe simplí de dhéantús an duine casta atá deartha chun an feiniméan idirlinne a ghabháil. Déanaimid anailís bhreise ar an múnla oilte agus feicimid go bhfreagraíonn na comharthaí is mó freastail do gach catagóir IS go maith do na coincheapa teanga maidir le stádas faisnéise.', 'ka': 'წინა სამუშაო ანაფორის განაცნობაზე (Hou et al., 2013) პრობლემა იყოს, როგორც საკუთარი საკუთარი ინფორმაციის სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატის მაგრამ, ეს სისტემები ძალიან დარწმუნდება მრავალური ლენგურისტიკური განსაზღვრებით. ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ გვეძლევთ ერთადერთი კონტექსური კონტექსური მოდელი BERT-ის კლასიფიკაციაში. ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012) ჩვენი მოდელი ახალი სურათების კლასიფიკაციაში ახალი სურათების კონფიკაციაში მიიღება, რომელიც სა et al. (2013). უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ 10.5 F1 წერტილების უფრო მეტადება ანაფორის განაცნობაზე, რომელიც არ გამოყენებული კომპლექსი ხელსაწყებული სიმენტიკური ფუნქციები, რომე ჩვენ უფრო მეტად განვითარებული მოდელის ანალიზაციას და აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ყველა IS კატეგორია ყველაზე საკუთარი სიგნალეებისთვის ინფორმაციის სტატისტიკური შესახე', 'hu': 'Az anafóra felismerésének áthidalásáról szóló korábbi munka (Hou et al., 2013) a finomszemű információs státusz (IS) tanulásának részfeladataként veti fel a problémát. Ezek a rendszerek azonban nagymértékben függnek számos kézzel készített nyelvi jellemzőtől. Ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszerű, kontextustudatos BERT modellt javasolunk a finomszemcsés IS osztályozáshoz. Az ISNotes korpuszon (Markert et al., 2012) modellünk új, korszerű teljesítményt ér el a finomszemcsés IS osztályozásban, 4,8 abszolút általános pontosság javulást érve el a Hou et al. (2013). Ami még fontosabb, 10,5 F1 pont javulást mutatunk az anafóra felismerés áthidalása érdekében anélkül, hogy összetett, kézzel készített szemantikai funkciókat használnánk, amelyek az áthidaló jelenség rögzítésére terveztek. Továbbá elemezzük a képzett modellt, és megállapítjuk, hogy az egyes IS kategóriákban a leglátogatottabb jelek jól megfelelnek az információs státusz nyelvi fogalmainak.', 'el': 'Προηγούμενες εργασίες σχετικά με την αναγνώριση γεφύρωσης της αναφοράς (Χου κ.λ., 2013) θέτουν το πρόβλημα ως δευτερεύουσα εργασία της εκμάθησης της λεπτόκοκκης κατάστασης πληροφοριών (IS). Ωστόσο, αυτά τα συστήματα εξαρτώνται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από πολλά χειροποίητα γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα απλό μοντέλο για τη λεπτόκοκκη ταξινόμηση της πληροφορικής. Στο σώμα του κ.λπ., το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει νέες επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στην ταξινόμηση λεπτόκοκκου IS, επιτυγχάνοντας απόλυτη βελτίωση της συνολικής ακρίβειας 4.8 σε σύγκριση με το Χου κ.λ. (2013). Το πιο σημαντικό είναι ότι δείχνουμε επίσης μια βελτίωση των σημείων 10.5 για τη γεφύρωση της αναγνώρισης αναφορών χωρίς τη χρήση σύνθετων χειροποίητων σημασιολογικών χαρακτηριστικών σχεδιασμένων για την καταγραφή του φαινομένου γεφύρωσης. Αναλύουμε περαιτέρω το εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο και διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα σήματα που παρακολουθούνται περισσότερο για κάθε κατηγορία ανταποκρίνονται καλά στις γλωσσικές έννοιες της κατάστασης της πληροφορίας.', 'it': "I lavori precedenti sul riconoscimento dell'anafora (Hou et al., 2013) pongono il problema come una sottomissione dell'apprendimento dello stato dell'informazione a grana fine (IS). Tuttavia, questi sistemi dipendono fortemente da molte caratteristiche linguistiche artigianali. In questo articolo, proponiamo un semplice modello BERT contestuale per la classificazione IS a grana fine. Sul corpus ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012), il nostro modello raggiunge nuove prestazioni all'avanguardia sulla classificazione IS a grana fine, ottenendo un miglioramento assoluto dell'accuratezza complessiva di 4,8 rispetto a Hou et al. (2013). Ancora più importante, mostriamo anche un miglioramento di 10,5 punti F1 per collegare il riconoscimento anafora senza utilizzare alcuna complessa funzionalità semantica artigianale progettata per catturare il fenomeno del bridge. Analizziamo ulteriormente il modello addestrato e scopriamo che i segnali più frequentati per ogni categoria IS corrispondono bene alle nozioni linguistiche dello stato dell'informazione.", 'kk': 'Анафора анықтамасының алдыңғы жұмыс (Hou et al., 2013) мәселесін бақылау мәліметтің күй- жайын (IS) суретінің алдыңғы сұрауы. Бірақ бұл жүйелер көп қол құрылған лингвистикалық қасиеттеріне тәуелді. Бұл қағазда, біз берттеу үлгісін бір қарапайым дискурстардың контексті берттеу үлгісін келтіреміз. ISNotes корпус (Markert et al., 2012) үлгіміздің үлгісіміз Hou et al. (2013 жылы). Ең маңызды, біз сондай-ақ 10,5 F1 нүктелерін анафорының түсініктемесін қолдану үшін құрылған комплекс қолмен құрылған семантикалық мүмкіндіктерді көрсету үшін көрсетедік. Біз оқылған моделді анализ және әрбір IS санатының ең көп сигналдарының мәлімет күйінің лингвистикалық жазбаларына сәйкес келеді деп ойлаймыз.', 'lt': 'Ankstesnis anaforos pripažinimo ryšio darbas (Hou et al., 2013 m.) kelia problem ą kaip mokymosi smulkių grūdų informacinio statuso (IS) paklausą. Tačiau šios sistemos labai priklauso nuo daugelio rankinių kalbinių savybių. Šiame dokumente siūlome paprastą diskursiniu kontekstu suprantamą BERT model į, skirtą smulkių grūdų IS klasifikacijai. ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012 m.), mūsų modelis pasiekia naujų pažangiausių rezultatų, susijusių su smulkių grūdų IS klasifikacija, siekiant 4,8 absoliutaus bendro tikslumo pagerėjimo, palyginti su Hou et al. (2013 m.). Svarbiausia, mes taip pat parodysime 10,5 F1 taško patobulinimą, siekiant sujungti anaforos pripažinimą nenaudojant jokių sudėtingų rankiniu būdu sukurtų semantinių savybių, skirtų susijungimo reiškiniui capturuoti. Toliau analizuojame parengtą model į ir nustatome, kad kiekvienos IS kategorijos signalai gerai atitinka kalbines informacijos statuso sąvokas.', 'mk': 'Претходната работа за преместување на признавањето на анафората (Ху и ал., 2013) го фрла проблемот како потпрашање за учење на статусот на фино обележани информации (ИС). Сепак, овие системи во голема мера зависат од многу рачни јазични карактеристики. Во овој весник, предложуваме едноставен дискурс-свесен BERT модел за фина класификација на IS. На ИСНотс корпус (Маркерт и ал., 2012), нашиот модел постигнува нови најсовремени изведувања на финозерната класификација на ИС, добивајќи 4,8 апсолутно целокупно подобрување на точноста во споредба со Ху и ал. (2013). Поважно е, исто така, покажуваме подобрување од 10,5 Ф1 поени за преместување на препознавањето на анафората без користење на комплексни рачно направени семантични карактеристики дизајнирани за зафатување на феноменот на преместување. Понатаму го анализираме обучениот модел и откриваме дека најприсуствените сигнали за секоја категорија на ИС добро се совпаѓаат со јазичните идеи за информативен статус.', 'ms': 'Kerja sebelumnya mengenai pengakuan anafora (Hou et al., 2013) melemparkan masalah sebagai subtanyaan tentang status maklumat berwarna ganda belajar (IS). Namun, sistem ini sangat bergantung pada banyak ciri-ciri bahasa buatan tangan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model BERT sederhana yang sedar-konteks untuk klasifikasi IS yang berwarna ganda. Pada ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), model kami mencapai penampilan baru-state-of-the-art pada klasifikasi IS berwarna gandum, mendapatkan 4.8 persamaan keseluruhan keseluruhan persamaan mutlak dibandingkan dengan Hou et al. (2013). Yang lebih penting lagi, kita juga menunjukkan peningkatan 10.5 titik F1 untuk menyambung pengenalan anafora tanpa menggunakan mana-mana ciri semantik kompleks yang direka untuk menangkap fenomena menyambung. We further analyze the trained model and find that the most attended signals for each IS category correspond well to linguistic notions of information status.', 'ml': 'ബ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങ് അനാഫ്രാ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി (ഹൂ et al., 2013) നല്ല വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഉപ എന്നാലും, ഈ സിസ്റ്റമുകളില്\u200d കൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ പ്രത്യേകങ്ങളെ വലിയ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു. നല്ല ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന ഐസ്\u200cനോട്ടുകളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d (മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റ് ല്\u200d , 2012) നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നല്ല ക്ലാസ്ഫികേഷനില്\u200d പുതിയ സ്ഥിതിയുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു. ഹൂ അലിനെക്കാള്\u200d തുല കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, ബ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങ് സംഭവം പിടിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d 10.5 എഫ്1 പോയിന്റുകള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന്നു. We further analyze the trained model and find that the most attended signals for each IS category correspond well to linguistic notions of information status.', 'mt': 'Previous work on bridging anaphora recognition (Hou et al., 2013) casts the problem as a subtask of learning fine-grained information status (IS).  Madankollu, dawn is-sistemi jiddependu ħafna fuq ħafna karatteristiċi lingwistiċi maħduma bl-idejn. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell sempliċi BERT li jkun konxju mill-kuntest tad-diskors għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-IS b’ħbub fin. Fuq l-ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), il-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjonijiet ġodda ta’ l-aktar avvanzati dwar il-klassifikazzjoni ta’ l-IS b’għamla fina, li jikseb titjib totali assolut ta’ 4.8 fil-preċiżjoni meta mqabbel ma’ Hou et al. (2013). Aktar importanti minn hekk, naraw ukoll titjib ta’ 10.5 punti F1 biex jingħaqad ir-rikonoxximent tal-anafora mingħajr l-użu ta’ karatteristiċi semantiċi kumplessi maħsuba bl-idejn maħsuba biex jinqabad il-fenomenu tal-pont. Aħna nianalizzaw aktar il-mudell imħarreġ u nsibu li s-sinjali l-aktar attenduti għal kull kategorija IS jikkorrispondu tajjeb għall-kunċetti lingwistiċi tal-istatus tal-informazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Анафора танихын тулд өмнөх ажил (Hou et al., 2013) асуудлыг сайхан мэдээллийн статус (IS) суралцахын тулд суралцдаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр системүүд маш их гар бүтээсэн хэлний чанараас хамааралтай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энгийн ярианы тухай BERT-ийн загварыг сайхан тарианы IS хуваалтын тухай илэрхийлэх загварыг санал болгож байна. ISNotes корпус (Маркерт et al., 2012) дээр бидний загвар нь Hou et al-тай харьцуулахад 4.8 тохиромжтой тохиромжтой сайн сайжруулалт гаргаж байна. Хамгийн чухал нь бид мөн 10.5 F1 цэгийн сайжруулалт харуулж байна. Анафора хүлээн зөвшөөрөхөд ямар ч комплекс гар бүтээгдэхүүний шинжлэх ухаан үйлдлийг ашиглахгүй. Бид дахин сургалтын загварыг шинжилгээд IS-н хэлбэрийн хамгийн ихэнх сонирхолтой сигналууд мэдээллийн статусын хэлний тухай сайн харьцуулдаг.', 'no': 'Førre arbeid på bruk av anaforerkjenning (Hou et al., 2013) kastar problemet som ein underspørsmål om læring av fyrste informasjonstatus (IS). Desse systema er likevel kraftig avhengig av mange håndkopla lingviske funksjonar. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein enkel diskurs-kontekst-merke BERT-modell for fin-korn IS-klassifikasjon. På ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012) er modellen vårt oppnådd nye tilstand i kunstklassifikasjonen av fin-grained IS-klassifikasjon, og får ein 4,8 absolutt overalt nøyaktighetsforbetring samanlikna med Hou et al. (2013). Med viktigere måte viser vi også en forbedring av 10,5 F1-punkt for å bryta anaforerkjenning utan å bruka nokon komplekse håndkrevne semantiske funksjonar som er lagt for å henta brytingsfenomenen. Vi analyserer den trengte modellen lenger og finn at dei mest delte signalene for kvar IS- kategori er godt tilsvarande språk om informasjonstatus.', 'sr': 'Prethodni rad o prepoznavanju anafore (Hou et al., 2013) predstavlja problem kao podpitanje status a informacija o učenju finog zrnca (IS). Međutim, ovi sistemi teško zavise od mnogih jezičkih karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavnu diskursku modelu BERT-a za klasifikaciju finog zrnca. Na ISNotes korpusu (Markert et al., 2012), naš model postiže nove predstave za umetnost na klasifikaciji fino zrnca IS, dobijući apsolutno poboljšanje ukupne tačnosti 4,8 u usporedbi s Hou et al. (2013). Još važnije, takođe pokazujemo poboljšanje 10,5 F1 bodova za prepoznavanje anafore, a da ne koristimo kompleksne semantičke karakteristike koje su napravljene za uhvatanje fenomena mostovanja. Dalje analiziramo obučeni model i otkrijemo da najprisustveniji signali za svaku kategoriju IS dobro odgovaraju jezičkim pojmima o statusu informacija.', 'si': 'මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනාෆෝරා අඳුරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, මේ පද්ධතිය බොහොම විශේෂ භාෂාවික විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂය කරනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය කතා කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ සංවේදනය සඳහා BERT නිර්මාණයක් සඳහා හොඳ ක්\u200dරීන්ඩ් IS විශේ ISNotes Corpus (Marcrt et al., 2012), අපේ මොඩල් හරිම අලුත් ස්ථානය සඳහා අලුත් ස්ථානය සඳහා අලුත් ස්ථානය සඳහා අලුත් ස්ථානය සඳහා අලුත් ස්ථානය සඳහා අලුත් ස්ථා වැදගත් වැදගත්, අපි 10.5 F1 පින්තුවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අනාෆෝරා අඳුරගන්න බැරි  අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා හැම IS වර්ගයක්ම සංඥාවක්ම හොඳටම තොරතුරු ස්ථානයේ භ', 'ro': 'Lucrările anterioare privind punerea în legătură cu recunoașterea anaforei (Hou et al., 2013) plasează problema ca o subactivitate a învățării statutului informației cu granulație fină (IS). Cu toate acestea, aceste sisteme depind în mare măsură de multe caracteristici lingvistice realizate manual. În această lucrare, propunem un model BERT conștient de contextul discursului simplu pentru clasificarea IS cu granulație fină. Pe corpul ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012), modelul nostru obține noi performanțe de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește clasificarea IS cu granulație fină, obținând o îmbunătățire absolută a acurateții globale de 4,8 comparativ cu Hou et al. (2013). Mai important, prezentăm, de asemenea, o îmbunătățire de 10,5 puncte F1 pentru identificarea anaforei fără a utiliza caracteristici semantice complexe realizate manual concepute pentru captarea fenomenului de punte. Analizăm în continuare modelul instruit și constatăm că semnalele cele mai frecvente pentru fiecare categorie IS corespund bine noțiunilor lingvistice de stare a informației.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie prace nad rozpoznawaniem anafory pomostowej (Hou et al., 2013) traktują problem jako podzadanie uczenia się drobnoziarnistego statusu informacji (IS). Jednak systemy te w dużej mierze zależą od wielu ręcznie wykonanych cech językowych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy prosty dyskursowy kontekstowy model BERT dla precyzyjnej klasyfikacji IS. W korpusie ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012) nasz model osiąga nowe, najnowocześniejsze wyniki klasyfikacji drobnoziarnistej IS, uzyskując 4,8 absolutną poprawę dokładności w porównaniu z Hou et al. (2013). Co ważniejsze, pokazujemy również poprawę punktów 10.5 F1 do rozpoznawania anafory bez użycia złożonych ręcznie wykonanych cech semantycznych przeznaczonych do uchwycenia zjawiska mostowania. Ponadto analizujemy przeszkolony model i stwierdzamy, że najczęściej odbierane sygnały dla każdej kategorii IS odpowiadają językowym pojęciom statusu informacji.', 'ur': 'اپنا انفورا معلوم کرنے کے بارے میں پہلے کام (Hou et al., 2013) مشکل کو پاکیزہ دانے کی معلومات (IS) کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ دکھاتا ہے. لیکن یہ سیسٹم بہت سے ہاتھ پیدا کئے ہوئے زبان تعریفیں پر اپنا اعتماد ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ساده صحبت متوجہ ہونے والی BERT موڈل کے لئے ایک سادہ صحبت کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012) پر، ہمارے مدل نے اچھے دانے کے ایس کلاسیفوں پر نئی سیٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ نمائش پہنچ لیا ہے، جو Hou et al (2013) کے مقابلہ میں 4.8 بالکل دقیقیقیت کے ساتھ بہترین صلاحیت حاصل کرتی ہے۔ اور زیادہ اہم نے 10.5 F1 پوینٹوں کی سوداگری دکھائی ہے کہ انافورا کی پہچانتی کے لئے بغیر کسی پیچیدہ ہاتھ کے پیدا کئے ہوئے سیمنٹی فوائل کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے طراحی کئے گئے ہیں۔ ہم تعلیم کی مدل کو اضافہ کر رہے ہیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ ہر ایس کاٹیوں کے سب سے زیادہ مشترک سیگنالیں اطلاعات کے لحاظ کی زبان شناسی نظریں کے ساتھ اچھے مطابق ہیں.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய வேலையில் பிரிட்டிக் ஒழுங்கு அறிவிப்பு (Hou et al., 2013) சிறப்பு கிடைக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் நிலையை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் துணை பண ஆனால், இந்த அமைப்புகள் மிகவும் கடுமையாக சார்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் பல கைகள் மொழி குணங்களை நம்புகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு சுலபமான பேச்சு பிரெட் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ISNotes குறிப்புகளில் (Market al., 2012) எங்கள் மாதிரி புதிய செயல்பாடுகளை பெறுகிறது, நன்றாக கிடைக்கப்பட்ட IS வகைப்படுத்தலில் புதிய செயல்படுத்துகிறது, Hou et al ஒப்பிடும் 4. 8 மு மிகவும் முக்கியமானது, நாம் பிரிட்டிக்காவின் புள்ளிகளில் 10.5 F1 புள்ளிகள் முன்னேற்றத்தைக் காட்டுகிறோம். பிரிட்டிங் பெண்களை பெறுவதற்கான ச நாம் மேலும் பயிற்சி மாதிரி ஆய்வு செய்து ஒவ்வொரு IS வகைக்கும் பெரும்பாலான குறிகைகள் தகவல் நிலையின் மொழிய நினைவுகளு', 'so': 'Shaqo hore oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada sawirada (Hou et al., 2013) wuxuu dhibaatada u saaraa qasabka waxbarashada sharafta macluumaadka (IS). Si kastaba ha ahaatee nidaamkan si adag waxay ku xiran yihiin noocyo badan oo luqada gacanta ku shaqeeya. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale ah hadal fudud oo ku saabsan BERT tusaale u ah fasaxa IS IS. Xafiiska ISNotes (Market al., 2012), qaababkayaga ayaa sameynaya tababarka sanadka oo ku saabsan fasaxa sharafta leh ee ISNotes (ISNotes al., 2012), wuxuuna heli karaa horumarinta rasmiga ah oo dhan oo la barbaranayo Hou et al (2013). Inta muhiim ah, waxaynu sidoo kale tusnaynaa hagaajinta 10.5 F1 goob aan la isticmaalin qalabka aqoonsashada sawirada oo aan la isticmaalin tayooyin qallafsan oo gacanta lagu qaban karo semanti oo loo qoray in la qabto xaalada isbedelka. Tusaalada tababarida ayaannu kaloo baaraynaa, waxaynu aragnaa in ugu badnaan calaamadaha ugu dhaw ee kooxo kasta oo IS ay si wanaagsan u leedahay fikrada luuqada ah ee xaalada macluumaadka.', 'sv': 'Tidigare arbete med att överbrygga anaforaigenkänning (Hou et al., 2013) kastar problemet som en underuppgift för att lära sig finslipad informationsstatus (IS). Dessa system är dock starkt beroende av många handgjorda språkliga egenskaper. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en enkel diskurskontextmedveten BERT-modell för finkornig IS-klassificering. På ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012) uppnår vår modell nya toppmoderna prestanda på finkornig IS-klassificering, vilket ger en absolut total förbättring av noggrannheten 4,8 jämfört med Hou et al. (2013). Ännu viktigare, vi visar också en förbättring av 10,5 F1 poäng för att överbrygga anaforaigenkänning utan att använda några komplexa handgjorda semantiska funktioner utformade för att fånga överbryggningsfenomen. Vi analyserar vidare den utbildade modellen och finner att de mest besökta signalerna för varje IS-kategori väl motsvarar språkliga föreställningar om informationsstatus.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu tizimlar ko'pchilik qo'llangan tillar xususiyatlariga ishlatadi. Bu qogʻozda biz juda sodda xabar bo'lgan BERT modelini o'ylaymiz. ISNotes Corpus (Market al, 2012) bilan modelmiz, AIS classification davomida yangi holatni amalga oshadi. Hou va al kabi 4.8 ta'minlovchi davomida juda muhimiy yaxshi darajaga ega bo'ladi. (2013). Ko'rib muhim, biz bir necha anafora tashkilotlarini tasdiqlash uchun 10.5 F1 nuqtning o'zgartirishni ko'rsamiz va bir murakkab qo'llab qo'llangan semantik xususiyatlarini tasdiqlash uchun qo'llanmagan murakkab qo'llangan semantik xususiyatlarini ishlatish uchun qo'lla Biz taʼminlovchi modelni bajaramiz va har bir IS turdagi ko'pchilik signallar haqida maʼlumot holatiga bog'liqdir.", 'vi': 'Việc làm trước về việc kết nối nhận dạng Anaphora (Hou et al., 203) trích vấn đề như một câu hỏi về việc học thông tin thấu hiểu (is). Tuy nhiên, những hệ thống này phụ thuộc rất nhiều đặc điểm ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình liên quan tới BERT cho phân loại I.S. Trên tập hợp ISNotes (Markert et al., 202), model của chúng tôi đạt được những trình độ mới tuyệt vời về loại I hoàn hảo, đạt được một độ chính xác tuyệt đối cao so với Hou et al (thậm chí là tê). Quan trọng hơn, chúng tôi cũng thấy một cải tiến của mười.5 điểm F1 để kết nối nhận dạng Anaphora mà không cần dùng các tính năng văn phòng theo thủ công phức tạp, được thiết kế để nắm giữ hiện tượng kết nối. Chúng tôi tiếp tục phân tích mẫu được đào tạo và thấy rằng những tín hiệu được phát triển nhiều nhất cho mỗi phân loại IS tương ứng tốt với các khái niệm ngôn ngữ về trạng thái thông tin.', 'bg': 'Предишна работа по мостовото разпознаване на анафора (Хю и др., 2013) поставя проблема като подзадача за учене на фино-зърнест информационен статус (ИС). Тези системи обаче силно зависят от много ръчно изработени езикови характеристики. В настоящата статия предлагаме прост дискурсен контекст-осъзнаващ модел за фина класификация на ИС. В корпуса на ИСNotes (Маркерт и др., 2012 г.) нашият модел постига нови най-съвременни постижения в класификацията на фините ИС, като получава 4,8 абсолютно цялостно подобрение на точността в сравнение с Ху и др. (2013 г.). По-важното е, че показваме подобрение от 10,5 точки за свързване на разпознаване на анафора без използване на сложни ръчно изработени семантични функции, предназначени за улавяне на явлението свързване. По-нататък анализираме обучения модел и установихме, че най-посещаваните сигнали за всяка категория отговарят добре на лингвистичните понятия за статус на информацията.', 'nl': 'Eerder werk over het overbruggen van anafora herkenning (Hou et al., 2013) beschouwt het probleem als een subtaak van het leren van fijngranige informatie status (IS). Deze systemen zijn echter sterk afhankelijk van vele handgemaakte taalkundige kenmerken. In dit artikel stellen we een eenvoudig discours contextbewust BERT model voor fijnkorrelige IS classificatie voor. Op het ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012) behaalt ons model nieuwe state-of-the-art prestaties op fijnkorrelige IS-classificatie, waardoor een 4,8 absolute algehele nauwkeurigheidsverbetering wordt verkregen ten opzichte van Hou et al. (2013). Nog belangrijker, we tonen ook een verbetering van 10.5 F1 punten voor het overbruggen van anafora herkenning zonder gebruik te maken van complexe handgemaakte semantische functies ontworpen voor het vastleggen van het overbruggingfenomeen. We analyseren verder het getrainde model en vinden dat de meest bezochte signalen voor elke IS-categorie goed overeenkomen met taalkundige noties van informatiestatus.', 'da': 'Tidligere arbejde med at bygge bro over anaphora anerkendelse (Hou et al., 2013) kaster problemet som en underopgave for at lære finkornet informationsstatus (IS). Disse systemer er imidlertid i høj grad afhængige af mange håndlavede sproglige træk. I denne artikel foreslår vi en simpel diskurs kontekstbevidst BERT model for finkornet IS klassificering. På ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012) opnår vores model nye state-of-the-art præstationer på finkornet IS klassificering, hvilket opnår en absolut samlet forbedring på 4,8 sammenlignet med Hou et al. (2013). Endnu vigtigere er, at vi også viser en forbedring på 10,5 F1 point til at bygge bro over anaphora anerkendelse uden at bruge nogen komplekse håndlavede semantiske funktioner designet til at fange bro fænomenet. Vi analyserer yderligere den uddannede model og finder ud af, at de mest besøgte signaler for hver IS kategori svarer godt til sproglige forestillinger om informationsstatus.', 'hr': 'Prethodni rad o preuzimanju priznanja anafore (Hou et al., 2013) čini problem kao podpitanje status a informacija o učenju zgodnog zrnca (IS). Međutim, ovi sustavi teško zavise od mnogih jezičkih karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavan model BERT-a za klasifikaciju finog zrnca. U ISNotes corpusu (Markert et al., 2012) naš model postiže nove izvedbe u stanju umjetnosti o klasifikaciji finog zrnca IS, dobivajući ukupno poboljšanje to čnosti 4,8 u usporedbi s Hou et al. (2013). Što je važnije, također pokazujemo poboljšanje od 10,5 F1 točka za prekidanje prepoznavanja anafore bez upotrebe bilo kakvih kompleksnih semantičkih karakteristika koje su napravljene za uhvaćenje fenomena mostovanja. Dalje analiziramo obučeni model i otkrijemo da najprisutniji signali za svaku kategoriju IS dobro odgovaraju jezičkim pojmima o statusu informacija.', 'id': 'Previous work on bridging anaphora recognition (Hou et al., 2013) casts the problem as a subtask of learning fine-grained information status (IS).  Namun, sistem ini sangat tergantung pada banyak karakteristik bahasa yang dibuat tangan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model BERT sederhana yang sadar dengan konteks untuk klasifikasi IS. Pada ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), model kami mencapai pertunjukan baru state-of-the-art pada klasifikasi IS berkulit gandum, mendapatkan 4,8 persamaan keseluruhan akurasi absolut dibandingkan Hou et al. (2013). Yang lebih penting, kita juga menunjukkan peningkatan 10,5 titik F1 untuk menyambung pengenalan anafora tanpa menggunakan fitur semantis komplikas yang dirancang untuk menangkap fenomena jembatan. Kami lebih lanjut menganalisis model terlatih dan menemukan bahwa sinyal yang paling hadir untuk setiap kategori IS cocok dengan gagasan bahasa tentang status informasi.', 'ko': '앞서 브리지 반지 인식에 관한 작업(Hou 등, 2013)은 이 문제를 세립도 정보 상태(IS)를 학습하는 하위 임무로 간주했다.그러나 이런 시스템은 많은 수작업으로 만들어진 언어 특징에 심각하게 의존한다.본고에서 우리는 세립도 IS 분류에 사용되는 간단한 문장 상하문 감지버트 모델을 제시했다.ISNotes 자료 라이브러리(Markert et al., 2012)에서 우리의 모델은 세립도 IS 분류에 있어서 새로운 최첨단 성능을 얻었고 Hou et al.(2013)에 비해 4.8의 절대적인 전체 정밀도 개선을 얻었다.더 중요한 것은 브리지 반지 식별의 개선 10.5F1점을 보여주었고 복잡한 수공으로 만든 의미 특징을 사용하지 않고 브리지 현상을 포착했다.우리는 훈련 후의 모델을 한층 더 분석한 결과 각 유형에서 가장 주목받는 신호와 정보 상태의 언어 개념이 잘 대응하는 것을 발견했다.', 'de': 'Frühere Arbeiten zur Überbrückung der Anaphorerkennung (Hou et al., 2013) betrachten das Problem als Teilaufgabe des Lernens des feinkörnigen Informationsstatus (IS). Diese Systeme hängen jedoch stark von vielen handgefertigten linguistischen Merkmalen ab. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein einfaches diskursbezogenes BERT-Modell für die feinkörnige IS-Klassifizierung vor. Auf dem ISNotes-Korpus (Markert et al., 2012) erzielt unser Modell neue State-of-the-Art-Leistungen bei der feinkörnigen IS-Klassifizierung und erzielt eine absolute 4,8-Verbesserung der Gesamtgenauigkeit im Vergleich zu Hou et al. (2013). Noch wichtiger ist, dass wir auch eine Verbesserung der 10.5 F1 Punkte für die Überbrückung der Anaphorerkennung zeigen, ohne dass komplexe, handgefertigte semantische Funktionen verwendet werden, die zur Erfassung des Überbrückungsphänomens entwickelt wurden. Wir analysieren das trainierte Modell weiter und stellen fest, dass die am meisten besuchten Signale für jede IS-Kategorie gut den sprachlichen Vorstellungen des Informationsstatus entsprechen.', 'sw': 'Kazi iliyopita kuhusu kutambuliwa kwa sifa za simu (Hou et al., 2013) inaleta tatizo kama jukumu la kujifunza hali ya taarifa inayofanikiwa vizuri (IS). Hata hivyo, mifumo haya yanategemea vifaa vingi vya lugha zilizo na mikono. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mazungumzo rahisi yanayohusiana na mazungumzo yanayofahamika na BERT kwa usambazaji wa ISI. Katika makampuni ya ISNotes (Market al., 2012), mwelekeo wetu hufanikiwa matukio mapya ya hali ya sanaa kwa sifa nzuri ya ISNotes, kupata maendeleo ya sahihi kabisa 4.8 ukilinganishwa na Hou na al. (2013). Kimuhimu zaidi, pia tunaonyesha maendeleo ya pointi 10.5 F1 kwa ajili ya kukutana na kutambua picha bila kutumia vipengele vigumu vilivyopangwa na mikononi kwa lengo la kutafuta hali ya bridge. Tunafahamu zaidi muundo wa mafunzo na kuona kuwa ishara zilizohudhuriwa zaidi kwa kila kundi la IS zinalinganisha vizuri na dhana za lugha za hali ya habari.', 'tr': "Anafora tanyşynyň öňki işi (Hou et al., 2013) iň üstüne gaty bilgi durumyny (IS) öwrenmek üçin soragy çykýar. Ýöne bu sistemler elimden gelen lingwistiki özelliklere gaty baglanýarlar. Bu kagyzda, güýçli depler IS klasifikasy üçin basit bir diskusiýa teklip edýäris. We're at the ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), our model achieves new state-of-the-art performances on fine-grained IS classification, obtaining a 4.8 absolute accuracy improvement compared to Hou et al. (2013). Daha möhüm bolsa, biz hem 10.5 F1 noktalary anafora tanyş etmek üçin gelişmegi görkezip görkezip geçirmek üçin düzenlenen karmaşık elimizden gelen semantik özellikleri ulanmasak. Biz öňünde eğlenen nusgany çözümleýäris we her IS kategoriýasynyň iň köp sahyplanyan sinyallarynyň malümatyň durumynda gowy ýaly meňzeýäris.", 'fa': 'کارهای قبلی در مورد شناسایی آنفورا (Hou et al., 2013) مشکل را به عنوان زیر خواست آموزش وضعیت اطلاعات خوب دانه (IS) قرار می دهد. ولی این سیستم ها به شدت بستگی به ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بستگی دارند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل BERT آگاهی از صحبت ساده برای گروهی دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه است پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. در شرکت ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012) مدل ما در مقایسه با Hou et al. (2013) اجرای جدید موجودات هنری در کلاسپین ISNotes رسیده است. مهمتر تر از این، ما همچنین بهترین نقطه ۱۰.۵ فی ۱ را برای پیدا کردن شناسایی آنفورا بدون استفاده از هیچ ویژه\u200cهای semantic پیچیده\u200cای که با دست ساخته شده\u200cاند طراحی شده برای گرفتن پدیده\u200cهای پیچیدگی را نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما مدل آموزش را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و می\u200cبینیم که بیشترین سیگنال\u200cهای مشترک برای هر kategoriه IS به نظر زبان\u200cشناسی وضعیت اطلاعات خوب تعلق دارند.', 'am': 'Previous work on bridging anaphora recognition (Hou et al., 2013) casts the problem as a subtask of learning fine-grained information status (IS).  ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ ስርዓቶች በብዙ እጆች በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ይታመካሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አዋቂ የBERT ምሳሌ ለመጠቀም ቀላል ንግግር እናስባለን፡፡ በISNotes ካርፓስ (ማMarket al., 2012) ሞዴላያችን ከሆu እና አል በሚያሳየው 4.8 ሙሉ ማስታወቂያውን አግኝቷል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የብሪክ አካባቢ መኖሪያ ለመቀበል የሚደረገውን የ10.5 F1 ነጥቦች አካባቢ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ደግሞም የተጠቃሚውን ሞዴል እናስተምረዋለን፣ ለሁሉም አካባቢው የኢሜএস ክፍል የቋንቋዊ አሳብ ለመደገፍ የተጠቃሚ ሲልክዎችን እናገኛለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Previous work on bridging anaphora recognition (Hou et al., 2013) casts the problem as a subtask of learning fine-grained information status (IS).  Megjithatë, këto sisteme varen shumë nga shumë karakteristika gjuhësore të ndërtuara me dorë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një model të thjeshtë të diskursit të ndërgjegjshëm në kontekst BERT për klasifikimin e hollësisë IS. Në ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), modeli ynë arrin shfaqje të reja më të larta në klasifikimin e mirë të IS, duke marrë një përmirësim absolut të saktësisë së përgjithshme 4.8 krahasuar me Hou et al. (2013). Më e rëndësishme, ne tregojmë gjithashtu një përmirësim prej 10.5 pikësh F1 për lidhjen e njohjes së anaforës pa përdorur ndonjë karakteristikë të ndërlikuara semantike të dizajnuara për kapjen e fenomenit të lidhjes. Ne analizojmë më tej modelin e trajnuar dhe gjejmë se sinjalet më të ndjekur për çdo kategori IS korrespondojnë mirë me konceptet gjuhësore të statusit të informacionit.', 'af': "Vorige werk op bruiding van anaphora herkening (Hou et al., 2013) gooi die probleem as 'n ondersoek van die leer van fyn-koring inligting status (IS). Maar hierdie stelsels het swaar afhang van baie hande-gebreekte lingwisiese funksies. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige diskursie konteks-bevestig BERT model vir fyn-graan is klasifikasie. Op die ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), ons model bereik nuwe state-of-the-art uitvoerings op fyn-grained IS klasifikasie, en kry 'n 4.8 absoluut heeltemal presies verbetering vergelyk met Hou et al. (2013). Nog belangrik, wys ons ook 'n verbetering van 10.5 F1 punte vir bruiding van anafore herkenning sonder om enige komplekse hand-gebreekte semantiese funksies te gebruik wat die bruidingsfenomen ontvang het. Ons verder die opgelei model analiseer en vind dat die mees aangevoerde seinale vir elke IS kategorie goed ooreenstemmende aan lingwisiese notisies van inligting status.", 'hy': 'Անախորդ աշխատանքը անաֆորայի ճանաչության կապերի վրա (Հուա և այլն., 2013) խնդիրը հանգեցնում է որպես սովորելու նրբագեղ ինֆորմացիայի կարգավիճակի (IS) ենթախնդիր: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս համակարգերը շատ են կախված ձեռքով ստեղծված լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկություններից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ խոսակցության կոնտեքստի գիտակցած BERT մոդել լավագույն IS դասակարգման համար: ISNotes Corpus-ում (Մարգերտ և այլն., 2012), մեր մոդելը հասնում է նոր ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքների լավագույն IS դասակարգում, ստանալով 4.8 ամբողջական ընդհանուր ճշգրտության բարելավումը համեմատած Հույի և այլների հետ (2013). Ավելի կարևոր է, որ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս նաև 10.5 F1 կետի բարելավումը անաֆորային ճանաչման կապելու համար առանց օգտագործելու որևէ բարդ ձեռքով ստեղծված սեմանտիկ առանձնահատկություն, որը ստեղծված է կապելու ֆենոմենի նկատմամբ: Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք վարժեցված մոդելը և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ամենամասնակից ազդանշանները յուրաքանչյուր IS կատեգորիայի համար լավ համապատասխանում են տեղեկատվական կարգավիճակի լեզվաբանական հասկացություններին:', 'ca': "La feina anterior sobre el pont del reconeixement de l'anàfora (Hou et al., 2013) planteja el problem a com una subterrània de l'aprenentatge de l'estatus d'informació fina. Però aquests sistemes depenen fortament de moltes característiques lingüístices artificials. En aquest article, proposem un simple model BERT conscient del contexte de discurs per la classificació d'IS fins grans. A l'ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), el nostre model aconsegueix noves actuacions d'última generació en la classificació de SI fins grains, obtenint una millora de precisió global absoluta de 4,8 en comparació amb Hou et al. (2013). Encara més important, també demostram una millora de 10,5 punts F1 per pontar el reconeixement de l'anafòra sense utilitzar cap característica semàntica artificial complexa dissenyada per capturar el fenomen de pont. Analitzem més el model entrenat i descobrim que els senyals més assistits per cada categoria de SI corresponen bé a les nocions lingüístices d'estatus d'informació.", 'az': 'Anafora tanınması (Hou et al., 2013) ilə əvvəlki işlər problemi sünbül bilgi statüsü (IS) öyrənməsi üçün çəkir. Ancaq bu sistemlər çox əl yaratdığı dil özelliklərinə çox bağlı. Bu kağızda, sünbül sünbüllənmiş IS klasifikasyonu üçün basit bir danışma modeli təklif edirik. ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), modellərimizin yeni istifadə edilmiş IS klasifikasyonunda yeni möcüzə göstərilməsini başa çatdırır, Hou et al. (2013). Daha çox önemlidir, biz də anafora tanınması üçün 10.5 F1 nöqtələrinin yaxşılıqlarını göstərdik, heç bir kompleks əl yaratdığı semantik fəaliyyətlərini götürmək üçün hazırlanmışdır. Biz təhsil edilmiş modeli daha çox analiz edirik və hər bir IS kategoriyasının ən çox iştirak edilən sinyallərin məlumat durumunun dilindəki fikirlərinə yaxşı uyğun olduğunu görürük.', 'bn': 'ব্রিজিং এনাফোরা স্বীকৃতির (হুউ et al., ২০১৩) পূর্ববর্তী কাজ সম্পর্কে সুন্দর তথ্যের স্ট্যাটাস (আইএস) শিক্ষা নিয়ে সমস্যার স তবে এই ব্যবস্থাগুলো অনেক হাতে ক্ষমতার ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর ভরসা করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সাধারণ কথোপকথন প্রস্তাব করি ভালোভাবে গ্রেফতার করা আইএস-এর বিভাগের জন্য। আইএসআইনোট কোর্পাসে (মার্কার্টের বাজার আল, ২০১২)। আমাদের মডেল হুউ এন্ট আলের তুলনায় ৪. ৮ সম্পূর্ণ সঠিকভাবে উন্নতি পেতে পারে। আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আমরা ১০.৫ এফ১ বিন্দুর উন্নতি দেখাচ্ছি ব্রিফরা স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করার জন্য ব্রিফরা স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করার জন্য, কোন জটিল হাতের ক আমরা আরো প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং খুঁজে পাই যে প্রত্যেক আইএস বিভাগের জন্য সবচেয়ে অংশগ্রহণকারী সিগন্যালের সাথে তথ্য', 'bs': 'Prethodni rad o prepoznavanju anafore (Hou et al., 2013) predstavlja problem kao podpitanje status a informacija o učenju zgodnog zrnca (IS). Međutim, ovi sistemi teško zavise od mnogih jezičkih karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama. U ovom papiru predlažemo jednostavan model BERT-a za klasifikaciju finog zrnca. U ISNotes corpusu (Markert et al., 2012), naš model postiže nove izvedbe o stanju umjetnosti u vezi sa klasifikacijom finog zrnca IS, dobivajući ukupno poboljšanje tačnosti 4,8 u usporedbi s Hou et al. (2013). Što je važnije, također pokazujemo poboljšanje 10,5 F1 bodova za prekidanje prepoznavanja anafore, a da ne koristimo kompleksne semantičke karakteristike koje su napravljene za uhvaćenje fenomena mostovanja. Dalje analiziramo obučeni model i saznamo da najprisustveniji signali za svaku kategoriju IS dobro odgovaraju jezičkim pojmima o statusu informacija.', 'fi': 'Aiemmat tutkimukset anaforan tunnistamisesta (Hou et al., 2013) asettavat ongelman hienojakoisen tiedon tilan oppimisen alitehtäväksi. Nämä järjestelmät riippuvat kuitenkin suuresti monista käsin tehdyistä kieliominaisuuksista. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yksinkertaista diskurssikontekstitietoista BERT-mallia hienorakeiselle IS-luokitukselle. ISNotes-korpusessa (Markert et al., 2012) mallimme saavuttaa uusia huipputason suorituksia hienorakeisen IS-luokituksen osalta, jolloin saavutetaan 4,8 absoluuttinen kokonaistarkkuus verrattuna Hou et al. (2013). Mikä tärkeintä, näytämme myös 10,5 F1-pisteen parannuksen anaforatunnistusta varten käyttämättä monimutkaisia käsityönä tehtyjä semanttisia ominaisuuksia, jotka on suunniteltu sillanmuutoksen kuvaamiseen. Lisäksi analysoimme koulutettua mallia ja havaitsemme, että kunkin IS-luokan eniten vastaanotetut signaalit vastaavat hyvin kielellisiä käsityksiä tiedon tilasta.', 'cs': 'Předchozí práce na rozpoznávání přemostění anafory (Hou et al., 2013) pokládá problém jako podúkol učení se jemně zranitelného informačního stavu (IS). Tyto systémy však silně závisí na mnoha ručně vytvořených jazykových rysech. V tomto článku navrhujeme jednoduchý diskurzní kontextový model BERT pro jemnou klasifikaci IS. Na korpusu ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012) dosahuje náš model nových nejmodernějších výkonů v oblasti jemnozrnné klasifikace IS, čímž dosahuje absolutního zlepšení celkové přesnosti 4,8 ve srovnání s Hou et al. (2013). Co je důležitější, ukazujeme také zlepšení 10,5 F1 bodů pro rozpoznávání anafory bez použití komplexních ručně vytvořených sémantických funkcí určených pro zachycení přemostění jevu. Dále analyzujeme trénovaný model a zjišťujeme, že nejvíce navštěvované signály pro každou kategorii IS dobře odpovídají jazykovým pojmům informačního stavu.', 'et': 'Varasemad tööd anafoori identifitseerimise sillamise kohta (Hou et al., 2013) käsitlevad probleemi kui peenete andmete staatuse (IS) õppimise alamülesannet. Kuid need süsteemid sõltuvad suuresti paljudest käsitsi valmistatud keelelistest omadustest. Käesolevas töös pakume välja lihtsa diskursuse kontekstiteadliku BERT mudeli peeneteralise IS klassifikatsiooni jaoks. ISNotes korpuses (Markert et al., 2012) saavutatakse meie mudel uued tipptasemel tulemused peeneteralise IS klassifikatsiooni osas, saavutades 4,8 absoluutse üldise täpsuse paranemise võrreldes Hou et al. (2013). Veelgi olulisem on see, et näitame ka 10,5 F1 punkti võrra paranemist anafoori tuvastamiseks, kasutamata keerukaid käsitsi valmistatud semantilisi funktsioone, mis on mõeldud sildade tuvastamiseks. Lisaks analüüsime koolitatud mudelit ja leiame, et kõige enam esinevad signaalid iga IS kategooria kohta vastavad hästi keelelistele arusaamadele informatsiooni staatusest.', 'sk': 'Predhodno delo o prepoznavanju anafore (Hou et al., 2013) obravnava problem kot podnalogo učenja drobnozrnatega stanja informacij (IS). Vendar so ti sistemi močno odvisni od številnih ročno izdelanih jezikovnih značilnosti. V prispevku predlagamo enostaven diskurzni kontekstni BERT model za drobnozrnato klasifikacijo IS. Na korpusu ISNotes (Markert et al., 2012) naš model dosega nove najsodobnejše uspešnosti pri klasifikaciji drobnozrnatih IS, pri čemer je v primerjavi s Hou et al. (2013) dosežen 4,8 absolutno izboljšanje natančnosti. Kar je še pomembneje, prikazujemo tudi izboljšanje 10,5 točk F1 za prepoznavanje anafore brez uporabe kompleksnih ročno izdelanih semantičnih funkcij, namenjenih zajemanju pojava premostitve. Nadalje analiziramo usposobljen model in ugotovimo, da najbolj obiskani signali za vsako kategorijo IS dobro ustrezajo jezikovnim pojmom informacijskega statusa.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé éntuk karo mulai nggawe anaphora-mlaku (hour et al, 2013) iso nggawe boten nganggo dolanan karo mulai informasi sing apik dhéwé (IR). Nanging, sistem iki dadi sakjang akeh lan akeh liyo sing paling maning. Nang pemilih iki, kita mudhun akeh sampeyan kontext-awak 'BERT model kanggo kelas-gris 'is' kalikser. Nang IsNotit corus (Markrt et al, 2013), model dhéwé iso nggawe perusahaan langgar tarjamah-perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo kelas-dibenalke is nagara basa, iso nggawe barang 4.8 perusahaan langgar sampek dewek kanggo nyeleh Uber et al (2013). Awak dhéwé nglanggar wigatining 10.5 F1 puntuan kanggo ngerasakno anaphora kuwi nggawe barang manut-ampungan seneng kabèh dumadhining semanti sing apik kebutuhan kanggo nggawe ujian winih. Awak dhéwé menyang beraksi model terus-cara ngono kuwi nggawe layang-bakal sing nyimpen karo segondarno sing gak bakal terus nggawe barang kelompok tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno informasi.", 'ha': "Yin aikin da ya gabata a kan sundin na anafora (Hou et al., 2013) ya jẽfa problema kamar wani aikin da aka sanar da halin marubuci mai kyau (IS). Kayya, waɗannan na'ura sun ƙayyade wasu misãlai na'ura da hannuwansu. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani misalin mazaɓa mai sauƙi da ke fahimta BERT wa fasalin IS mai kyau. On the IMNotes Corbas (market al., 2012), misalinmu yana sãmu new state-of-the-art game da fassarar IS mai kyau-graffed, ana sami wata 4.8 tabbatacin tsari mai girma sami da sami zuwa Hou et al. (2013). Ki muhimu, za mu nũna mafiya kyautar point 10.5 F1 ga biriki na anafora ko kuma ba mu yi amfani da wasu mistakardar da hannayen da aka samu da shi ba don ka sami filin mai kifi. Tuna ƙara anayyar misalin wanda aka tsare, kuma munã gane cewa masu ƙaranci saini ga kõwa nau'in IS sunã da daidai da idãnun linguistic da ma'anar lãbãri.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་བྱ་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བུ་བཏང་བ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཆུ་ཚོད་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་ལག་འདི་དག་གིས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་རྟེན་ཏེ། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་ནི་སྔོན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། On the ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), our model achieves new state-of-the-art performances on fine-grain IS classification, obtaining a 4.8 absolute accuracy improvement compared to Hou et al. (2013). ཧ་ཅང་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཆེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱས་ཁབ་༡༠.༥(F1)ནང་དུ་ཕར་རྒྱས་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་གང་ཡང་བེད་སྤྱ ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། IS དབྱེ་རིགས་རེ་རེ་རེའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག', 'he': 'העבודה הקודמת על הגשר זיהוי אנפורה (Hou et al., 2013) מכניסה את הבעיה כתחת שאלה של סטטוס לימוד מידע מעולה (IS). However, these systems heavily depend on many hand-crafted linguistic features.  In this paper, we propose a simple discourse context-aware BERT model for fine-grained IS classification.  על ISNotes corpus (Markert et al., 2012), המודל שלנו משיג הופעות חדשות במצב המיוחד על קליזציה של ISNotes fine-grained, להשיג שיפור מדויק כללי מוחלט 4.8 בהשוואה ל Hou et al. (2013). חשוב יותר, אנחנו גם מראים שיפור של 10.5 נקודות F1 לגשר זיהוי אנפורה בלי להשתמש בכלל תכונות סמנטיות מורכבות שעשויות ידיים כדי לתפוס את תופעת הגשר. אנו נוספים לנתח את המודל המאמן ומצאים שהאותים הכי מופיעים לכל קטגוריה IS מתאימים היטב לרעיונות שפתיים של סטטוס מידע.'}
{'en': 'Text Classification by Contrastive Learning and Cross-lingual Data Augmentation for Alzheimer’s Disease Detection', 'ar': 'تصنيف النص عن طريق التعلم المقارن ومضاعفة البيانات بلغات متعددة لاكتشاف مرض الزهايمر', 'pt': 'Classificação de texto por aprendizagem contrastiva e aumento de dados multilíngue para detecção da doença de Alzheimer', 'es': 'Clasificación de textos mediante aprendizaje contrastivo y aumento de datos multilingües para la detección de la enfermedad de Alzheimer', 'fr': "Classification de texte par apprentissage contrastif et augmentation des données multilingues pour la détection de la maladie d'Alzheimer", 'ja': 'アルツハイマー病検出のための対照的な学習とクロスリンガルデータによるテキスト分類', 'zh': '比学跨语数增文本分类于阿尔茨海默病检测', 'hi': 'अल्जाइमर रोग का पता लगाने के लिए Contrastive Learning और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल डेटा संवर्धन द्वारा पाठ वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Классификация текста по контрастному обучению и увеличение межязыковых данных для обнаружения болезни Альцгеймера', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Téacs de réir Foghlama Codarsnachta agus Méadú Sonraí Trasteangacha chun Galar Alzheimer a Bhrath', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია კონტრესტიგური სწავლების და მრავალენგური მონაცემების აგგენტიკაციაზე ალცჰეიმერის დაავადება', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση Κειμένου με Αντιστατική Μάθηση και Διεύρυνση Γλωσσικών Δεδομένων για την Ανίχνευση της νόσου Αλτσχάιμερ', 'hu': 'Szövegosztályozás kontrasztív tanulás és többnyelvű adatbővítés alapján Alzheimer-kór felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Classificazione del testo per apprendimento contrastante e aumento dei dati multilingue per la rilevazione della malattia di Alzheimer', 'kk': 'Альцхаймердің ауруларын анықтау үшін контрастивті оқу және көптеген тілдердің деректерін көптеген мәтін классификациясы', 'lt': 'Teksto klasifikacija pagal kontrastinį mokymąsi ir tarpkalbinius duomenis Alzheimerio ligos aptikimui padidinti', 'ms': 'Penaklasifikasi Teks mengikut Pembelajaran Kontrastif dan Pembesaran Data Selata-Bahasa untuk Pengesanan penyakit Alzheimer', 'mk': 'Класификација на текст по контрастивно учење и крстојазични податоци за детекција на Алцхајмерова болест', 'ml': 'ലെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്റ്റിവ് ലിന്\u200dഡും ക്രോസ്- ലാന്\u200dഗുള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ആഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d ആല്\u200dസ്ഹീമെരിന്\u200dറെ രോഗം കണ്ടുപിടിക', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test skont it-Tagħlim Kontrastiv u Żieda fid-Dejta Translingwi għad-Detezzjoni tal-Marda ta’ Alzheimer', 'mn': 'Альцхаймерийн өвчин олон хэлний суралцах болон олон хэлний өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт', 'no': 'Tekstklassifikasjon etter kontrastiv læring og krysspråk- data- augmentasjon for alzheimers s øknad', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja tekstu przez uczenie się kontrastywne i rozszerzenie danych wielojęzycznych dla wykrywania choroby Alzheimera', 'ro': 'Clasificarea textului după învățare contrastivă și augmentarea datelor interlingve pentru detectarea bolii Alzheimer', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija teksta kontrastivnim učenjem i povećanjem međujezičkih podataka za detekciju Alzheimerove bolesti', 'si': 'අල්ජායිමර්ගේ රෝග හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂණය සහ ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාත්මක දත්ත විශේෂණය', 'sv': 'Textklassificering genom kontrastivt lärande och tvärspråkig dataökning för Alzheimers sjukdom upptäckt', 'ta': 'ஆல்சைமரின் நோய் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான தொடர்பு கற்றுக்கொண்டும் கிராஸ்- மொழியில் தகவல் கூறுதல் மூலம் உரை வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'آلزحمیر کے بیماری اگلوٹ کے لئے متقابل تعلیم اور کروس-زبان ڈاٹ اگلوٹینٹ کے ذریعے متقابل کلاسیفٹ', 'so': 'Muujinta qoraalka oo ku qoran qoraalka waxbarashada iyo korriinka macluumaadka luuqada ee Alzheimer', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hạng văn bản theo học tương phản và gia tăng ngôn ngữ chéo cho việc phát hiện bệnh Alzheimer', 'bg': 'Текстова класификация по контрастивно учене и междуезично увеличаване на данните за откриване на болестта на Алцхаймер', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija teksta kontrastivnim učenjem i povećanjem međujezičkih podataka za detekciju Alzheimerove bolesti', 'da': 'Tekstklassifikation efter kontrastiv læring og tværsproget dataudvidelse til detektion af Alzheimers sygdom', 'nl': 'Tekst Classificatie door Contrastive Learning en Cross-lingual Data Augmentation voor de Detectie van de Ziekte van Alzheimer', 'de': 'Textklassifizierung durch kontrastives Lernen und sprachübergreifende Datenerweiterung zur Erkennung von Alzheimer', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Teks oleh Belajar Kontrastif dan Data Selata-bahasa Augmentasi untuk Deteksi penyakit Alzheimer', 'ko': '비교 학습과 다중 언어 데이터 강화를 바탕으로 한 텍스트 분류가 알츠하이머 검사에서의 응용', 'fa': 'کلاس متن توسط یادگیری متفاوت و افزایش داده های متفاوت زبان برای شناسایی بیماری آلزایمر', 'sw': 'Makala ya maandishi yaliyotolewa na Ufunzi na Kuongeza Taarifa za lugha za Kiarabu kwa Kugundua Ugonjwa wa Alzheimer', 'tr': 'Alzheimer hastalary tarapyndan kontrast öwrenme we çoklu dilli Maglumaty Aýagdaýlama', 'af': 'Teks Klassifikasie deur kontrastiewe leer en kruistale data-opgemaak vir Alzheimer se siekte-deteksie', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i tekstit nga Mësimi Kontrastiv dhe rritja e të dhënave ndërgjuhësore për zbulimin e s ëmundjes së Alzheimerit', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ መግለጫ በተቃውሞ ትምህርት እና መስቀል ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ዳታ ማጠቃለያ ለAlzheimer ድካም ማቀናጃ', 'hy': 'Տեքստի դասակարգում ըստ հակադրական սովորելու և լեզվի միջև տեղեկատվության աճում Ալցհեյմերի հիվանդության հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'Alzheimer hastalığı keşfetməsi üçün kontrastif öyrənmək və çox dil veri artırması ilə metin klasifikasyonu', 'bn': 'আলজেমারের রোগ সনাক্তির জন্য টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত শিক্ষা এবং ক্রস-ভাষার তথ্য অংশগ্রহণকারী', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija teksta kontrastivnim učenjem i povećanjem međujezičkih podataka za detekciju Alzheimerove bolesti', 'ca': "Classificació del text per aprenentatge contrastiu i augment de dades translingües per la detecció de malalties d'Alzheimer", 'cs': 'Klasifikace textu podle kontrastivního učení a rozšíření dat mezi jazyky pro detekci Alzheimerovy choroby', 'et': 'Teksti klassifitseerimine kontrastiivse õppe ja keeleülese andmete suurendamise järgi Alzheimeri tõve tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Tekstiluokitus kontrastiivisen oppimisen ja monikielisen tiedon lisäämisen mukaan Alzheimerin taudin havaitsemisessa', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'sk': 'Klasifikacija besedila po kontrastivnem učenju in medjezičnem dopolnjevanju podatkov za odkrivanje Alzheimerjeve bolezni', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྡེར་བརྙན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་དང་ཐེབས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་།', 'he': 'מסווג טקסט על ידי לימוד נגד ומידע בין שפות'}
{'en': 'Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer’s disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers. To deal with this issue, this paper first proposes a contrastive learning method to obtain effective representations for text classification based on monolingual embeddings of BERT. Furthermore, a cross-lingual data augmentation method is designed by building autoencoders to learn the text representations shared by both languages. Experiments on a Mandarin AD corpus show that the contrastive learning method can achieve better detection accuracy than conventional CNN-based and BERTbased methods. Our cross-lingual data augmentation method also outperforms other compared methods when using another English AD corpus for augmentation. Finally, a best detection accuracy of 81.6 % is obtained by our proposed methods on the Mandarin AD corpus.', 'ar': 'تعتبر ندرة البيانات دائمًا قيدًا على تحليل نسخ الكلام للكشف التلقائي عن مرض الزهايمر (AD) ، خاصةً عندما يكون الأشخاص من غير المتحدثين باللغة الإنجليزية. للتعامل مع هذه المشكلة ، تقترح هذه الورقة أولاً طريقة تعلم متباينة للحصول على تمثيلات فعالة لتصنيف النص بناءً على حفلات الزفاف أحادية اللغة لـ BERT. علاوة على ذلك ، تم تصميم طريقة زيادة البيانات عبر اللغات عن طريق إنشاء أجهزة تشفير تلقائية لتعلم تمثيلات النص المشتركة بين اللغتين. تظهر التجارب على مجموعة مواد لغة الماندرين AD أن طريقة التعلم التباين يمكن أن تحقق دقة كشف أفضل من الطرق التقليدية المستندة إلى CNN والمستندة إلى BERT. يتفوق أسلوبنا في زيادة البيانات عبر اللغات أيضًا على طرق المقارنة الأخرى عند استخدام مجموعة لغة AD أخرى للغة الإنجليزية من أجل الزيادة. أخيرًا ، يتم الحصول على أفضل دقة كشف تبلغ 81.6٪ من خلال طرقنا المقترحة على مجموعة Mandarin AD.', 'es': 'La escasez de datos siempre es una limitación para analizar las transcripciones del habla para la detección automática de la enfermedad de Alzheimer (EA), especialmente cuando los sujetos no hablan inglés. Para tratar este tema, este artículo propone primero un método de aprendizaje contrastivo para obtener representaciones efectivas para la clasificación de textos basada en incrustaciones monolingües de BERT. Además, se diseña un método de aumento de datos multilingüe mediante la creación de autocodificadores para aprender las representaciones de texto compartidas por ambos idiomas. Los experimentos en un corpus de AD en mandarín muestran que el método de aprendizaje contrastivo puede lograr una mejor precisión de detección que los métodos convencionales basados en CNN y Bert. Nuestro método de aumento de datos en varios idiomas también supera a otros métodos comparados cuando se utiliza otro corpus de AD en inglés para el aumento. Finalmente, se obtiene una mejor precisión de detección del 81,6% mediante nuestros métodos propuestos en el corpus de AD mandarín.', 'fr': "La rareté des données est toujours une contrainte pour l'analyse des transcriptions vocales pour la détection automatique de la maladie d'Alzheimer (MA), en particulier lorsque les sujets ne sont pas anglophones. Pour résoudre ce problème, cet article propose d'abord une méthode d'apprentissage contrastive pour obtenir des représentations efficaces pour la classification de texte basée sur des intégrations monolingues du BERT. En outre, une méthode d'augmentation des données multilingues est conçue en construisant des encodeurs automatiques pour apprendre les représentations textuelles partagées par les deux langues. Des expériences sur un corpus AD mandarin montrent que la méthode d'apprentissage par contraste peut atteindre une meilleure précision de détection que les méthodes classiques basées sur CNN et basées sur BERT. Notre méthode d'augmentation des données multilingues surpasse également les autres méthodes comparées lorsqu'on utilise un autre corpus AD anglais pour l'augmentation. Enfin, une meilleure précision de détection de 81,6\xa0% est obtenue par les méthodes que nous proposons sur le corpus Mandarin AD.", 'pt': 'A escassez de dados é sempre uma restrição na análise de transcrições de fala para detecção automática da doença de Alzheimer (DA), especialmente quando os sujeitos não falam inglês. Para lidar com essa questão, este artigo primeiro propõe um método de aprendizado contrastivo para obter representações efetivas para classificação de texto com base em embeddings monolíngues do BERT. Além disso, um método de aumento de dados multilíngue é projetado construindo autoencoders para aprender as representações de texto compartilhadas por ambos os idiomas. Experimentos em um corpus Mandarin AD mostram que o método de aprendizado contrastivo pode alcançar uma melhor precisão de detecção do que os métodos convencionais baseados em CNN e BERT. Nosso método de aumento de dados em vários idiomas também supera outros métodos comparados ao usar outro corpus AD em inglês para aumento. Finalmente, uma melhor precisão de detecção de 81,6% é obtida por nossos métodos propostos no corpus Mandarin AD.', 'ja': 'データ不足は、特に対象が非英語話者である場合、自動アルツハイマー病（ ＡＤ ）検出のための音声転写の分析における常に制約である。この問題に対処するために、本論文はまず、BERTの単語埋め込みに基づくテキスト分類の効果的な表現を得るための対照的な学習方法を提案する。さらに、両言語で共有されるテキスト表現を学習するためにオートエンコーダを構築することによって、クロスリンガルデータ拡張方法が設計される。国語ADコーパスの実験では、対照的な学習方法は、従来のCNNベースおよびBERTベースの方法よりも優れた検出精度を達成することができることが示されています。私たちのクロスリンガルデータ拡張法は、拡張に別の英語ADコーパスを使用する場合、他の方法よりも優れています。最後に、マンダリンADコーパスの提案された方法によって、最高の検出精度81.6 ％が得られます。', 'zh': '数稀缺终始析音转录以自阿尔茨海默病(AD)检,特当受试者是非英语用之时。 夫针此者,先立比学之法,以得BERT单语销之类。 又构自编码器以学二语共享之本,设一跨语数增强之法。 普通话AD语料库之实验明,比于CNNBERT之术,精于学也。 臣等言语数增之法,于用一英语AD语料库增强之时,亦优于他较法。 最后,因臣等普通话AD语料库法,得81.6%最检准确率。', 'hi': 'डेटा की कमी हमेशा स्वचालित अल्जाइमर रोग (एडी) का पता लगाने के लिए भाषण प्रतिलेखन का विश्लेषण करने पर एक बाधा होती है, खासकर जब विषय गैर-अंग्रेजी बोलने वाले होते हैं। इस मुद्दे से निपटने के लिए, यह पेपर पहले BERT के मोनोलिंगुअल एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रभावी प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए एक विरोधाभासी सीखने की विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है। इसके अलावा, एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल डेटा संवर्धन विधि को दोनों भाषाओं द्वारा साझा किए गए पाठ प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने के लिए ऑटोएनकोडर का निर्माण करके डिज़ाइन किया गया है। मंदारिन एडी कॉर्पस पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग विधि पारंपरिक सीएनएन-आधारित और बीईआरटी आधारित तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर पहचान सटीकता प्राप्त कर सकती है। हमारी क्रॉस-भाषी डेटा संवर्धन विधि भी वृद्धि के लिए एक और अंग्रेजी एडी कॉर्पस का उपयोग करते समय अन्य तुलनात्मक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करती है। अंत में, मंदारिन एडी कॉर्पस पर हमारे प्रस्तावित तरीकों से 81.6% की सबसे अच्छी पहचान सटीकता प्राप्त की जाती है।', 'ru': 'Дефицит данных всегда является препятствием при анализе транскрипции речи для автоматического обнаружения болезни Альцгеймера (AD), особенно когда испытуемые не говорят по-английски. Для решения этой проблемы в настоящем документе сначала предлагается метод контрастного обучения для получения эффективных представлений для классификации текста на основе одноязычных вложений БЕРТА. Кроме того, метод межъязыкового расширения данных разработан путем создания автокодеров для изучения текстовых представлений, общих для обоих языков. Эксперименты на корпусе Mandarin AD показывают, что метод контрастного обучения может достичь лучшей точности обнаружения, чем обычные методы на основе CNN и BERT. Наш метод межязыкового расширения данных также превосходит другие сравниваемые методы при использовании другого английского корпуса AD для расширения. Наконец, наилучшая точность обнаружения 81,6% достигается с помощью предложенных нами методов на корпусе Mandarin AD.', 'ga': 'Bíonn ganntanas sonraí ina shrian i gcónaí ar anailís a dhéanamh ar thras-scríbhinní cainte chun an galar Alzheimer (AD) a bhrath go huathoibríoch, go háirithe nuair nach cainteoirí Béarla iad na hábhair. Chun déileáil leis an tsaincheist seo, molann an páipéar seo ar dtús modh foghlama codarsnachta chun léiriúcháin éifeachtacha a fháil le haghaidh rangú téacsanna bunaithe ar leabú aonteangacha CRET. Ina theannta sin, déantar modh méadaithe sonraí tras-teanga a dhearadh trí uath-ionchódóirí a thógáil chun na hionadaíochtaí téacs a roinneann an dá theanga a fhoghlaim. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar chorpas AD Mandairínis gur féidir leis an modh foghlama codarsnachta cruinneas braite níos fearr a bhaint amach ná modhanna traidisiúnta bunaithe ar CNN agus bunaithe ar BERT. Tá feidhmíocht níos fearr ag ár modh méadaithe sonraí tras-teanga freisin ar mhodhanna comparáide eile agus corpas AD Béarla eile á úsáid againn le haghaidh breisithe. Ar deireadh, faightear cruinneas braite is fearr de 81.6% leis na modhanna atá beartaithe againn ar an gcorpas AD Mandairínis.', 'hu': 'Az adathiány mindig korlátozza a beszédátírások elemzését az Alzheimer-kór automatikus felismeréséhez, különösen akkor, ha az alanyok nem angolul beszélnek. E kérdés foglalkozásához ez a tanulmány először egy kontrasztos tanulási módszert javasol a BERT egynyelvű beágyazásán alapuló szövegosztályozás hatékony ábrázolására. Ezenkívül egy többnyelvű adatbővítési módszert terveztek, amely automatikus kódolókat épít, hogy megtanulják a két nyelv által megosztott szövegreprezentációkat. A mandarin AD korpuszon végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a kontrasztos tanulási módszer jobb detektálási pontosságot érhet el, mint a hagyományos CNN és BERT alapú módszerek. A többnyelvű adatbővítési módszerünk más összehasonlított módszereket is felülmúlja, ha egy másik angol AD korpuszt használ a nagyításhoz. Végezetül a legjobb kimutatási pontosságot 81,6%-kal érjük el a mandarin AD korpuszon javasolt módszereinkkel.', 'el': 'Η έλλειψη δεδομένων είναι πάντα ένας περιορισμός στην ανάλυση μεταγραφών ομιλίας για την αυτόματη ανίχνευση της νόσου Αλτσχάιμερ (AD), ειδικά όταν τα άτομα δεν μιλούν αγγλικά. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει πρώτα μια μέθοδο μάθησης με αντίθεση για την απόκτηση αποτελεσματικών αναπαραστάσεων για την ταξινόμηση κειμένων με βάση τις μονογλωσσικές ενσωματώσεις του BERT. Επιπλέον, μια μέθοδος διασταυρούμενης αύξησης δεδομένων σχεδιάζεται με την κατασκευή αυτόματων κωδικοποιητών για να μάθει τις αναπαραστάσεις κειμένου που μοιράζονται και οι δύο γλώσσες. Τα πειράματα σε σώμα μαθησιακής αντίθεσης δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος της αντίθεσης μπορεί να επιτύχει καλύτερη ακρίβεια ανίχνευσης από τις συμβατικές μεθόδους που βασίζονται στο CNN και το BERT. Η μέθοδος διασταυρούμενης αύξησης δεδομένων μας ξεπερνά επίσης άλλες συγκρίσιμες μεθόδους όταν χρησιμοποιείτε ένα άλλο αγγλικό σώμα για αύξηση. Τέλος, η καλύτερη ακρίβεια ανίχνευσης 81,6% επιτυγχάνεται με τις προτεινόμενες μεθόδους μας στο σώμα της Μανταρίνης.', 'ka': "Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers. ამ პრობლემაზე გასაკეთებლად, ამ წიგნის პირველი პროგრამის კონტრასტური სწავლების მიღება ტექსტური კლასიფიკაციის ეფექტიური რესპეცენტაციების მიღება BERT-ის მონ დამატებით, მრავალენგური მონაცემების აგგენტირება მეტი განაზღვრებულია, რომ ავტოკოდერების შექმნა ტექსტის გამოსახულება, რომელიც ორივე ენაზე იყოს. მანდარინის AD კორპუსის გამოცდილებები აჩვენებენ, რომ კონტრასტიგური სწავლების მეტი შეუძლია უფრო მსგავსი განახლების წარმოიდგინოთ, ვიდრე კონტრაციული CNN-ის და BE ჩვენი კრისი ენერგიკური მონაცემების აგგენტაციის მეტი უფრო გავაკეთება სხვა შემდგენებული მეტი, როდესაც სხვა ანგლისური AD კორპუსის გამოყენება ნაი-კპაწ, ნაი-ეჲბპარა ოპაგთრვლნჲჟრ ჲრ 81,6% ჟვ ოჲლსფგა ჲრ ნაქთრვ ოპველადანთ მვრჲეთ ნა მანდაპთნჟკთწ AD კჲპოსჟ.", 'it': "La scarsità di dati è sempre un vincolo nell'analisi delle trascrizioni vocali per il rilevamento automatico della malattia di Alzheimer (AD), specialmente quando i soggetti non sono anglofoni. Per affrontare questo problema, questo articolo propone innanzitutto un metodo di apprendimento contrastante per ottenere rappresentazioni efficaci per la classificazione del testo basate su incorporazioni monolingue del BERT. Inoltre, un metodo di aumento dei dati cross-lingual è progettato costruendo autocodificatori per imparare le rappresentazioni del testo condivise da entrambe le lingue. Esperimenti su un corpus AD mandarino mostrano che il metodo di apprendimento contrastante può ottenere una migliore precisione di rilevamento rispetto ai metodi convenzionali basati su CNN e BERT. Il nostro metodo di aumento dei dati cross-lingual supera anche altri metodi confrontati quando si utilizza un altro corpus AD inglese per l'aumento. Infine, una migliore precisione di rilevamento dell'81,6% è ottenuta dai nostri metodi proposti sul corpus AD mandarino.", 'lt': "Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers.  Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, šiame dokumente pirmiausia siūlomas kontrastinis mokymosi metodas, pagal kurį būtų galima veiksmingai pateikti teksto klasifikaciją, grindžiamą vienkalbiniais BERT įterpimais. Be to, daugiakalbių duomenų didinimo metodas yra sukurtas kuriant autokodus, kad būtų galima išmokti abiem kalbomis pasidalijamų tekstų atspindimų. Mandarino AD corpus eksperimentai rodo, kad kontrastinio mokymosi metodas gali pasiekti geresnį aptikimo tikslumą nei įprasti CNN ir BERTbased metodai. Mūsų tarpkalbinių duomenų padidinimo metodas taip pat yra didesnis už kitus palyginamuosius metodus, kai naudojamas kitas anglų AD korpus padidinimui. Galiausiai, geriausias 81,6 % nustatymo tikslumas gaunamas pasiūlytais metodais, taikomais Mandarino AD korpusui.", 'mk': "Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers.  За да се справи со ова прашање, овој весник прво предлага контрастивен метод на учење за да се добијат ефикасни претставувања за класификацијата на текст базирана на монојазични вложувања на БЕРТ. Покрај тоа, меѓујазичниот метод за зголемување на податоците е дизајниран со изградба на автокодери за да се научат текстовите претставувања споделени со двата јазици. Експериментите на мандаринскиот корпус АД покажуваат дека контрастивниот метод на учење може да постигне подобра прецизност на детекција од конвенционалните методи базирани на СНН и БЕРТ. Нашиот меѓујазички метод за зголемување на податоците исто така ги надминува и другите споредливи методи кога користиме друг англиски корпус АД за зголемување. Finally, a best detection accuracy of 81.6% is obtained by our proposed methods on the Mandarin AD corpus.", 'kk': 'Деректер жеткіліктері әрқашан Альцхаймер ауруы (AD) автоматты түрде анықтау үшін сөйлеу транскриптерін анализиялауға шектеп тұрады, осымен қатар ағылшын тіліктері емес болса. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, біріншіден бұл қағаз BERT монолингілік ендіру тәсіліне негізделген мәтін салыстырудың эффективті мәтінді салыстыру үшін контрастырлық Қосымша, бірнеше тіл деректерді көптеу әдісі автокодерді құру үшін екі тілден бөлінген мәтін түсініктерін үйрену үшін құрылады. Мандарин AD корпус тәжірибесінің тәжірибесі контрастық оқыту әдісінің CNN негізінде және BERTнегізінде тәжірибесінің дұрыстығын табуға болады дегенді көрсетеді. Біздің тілдерді көптеген деректерді көптегендіру әдісіміз басқа әдістерді көптегендіру үшін ағылшын AD корпус қолданғанда салыстыру әдістерін бас Соңында, 81,6% деген ең жақсы анықтау дұрыстығын мандарин AD корпус арқылы табылады.', 'ms': 'Kekurangan data sentiasa merupakan keterangan pada menganalisis transkripsi ucapan untuk pengesan penyakit Alzheimer secara automatik (AD), terutama apabila subjek adalah pembicara bukan bahasa Inggeris. To deal with this issue, this paper first proposes a contrastive learning method to obtain effective representations for text classification based on monolingual embeddings of BERT.  Lagipun, kaedah peningkatan data saling bahasa direka dengan membina pengekod sendiri untuk belajar perwakilan teks yang dikongsi oleh kedua-dua bahasa. Eksperimen pada Mandarin AD corpus menunjukkan bahawa kaedah pembelajaran bertentangan boleh mencapai ketepatan pengesan yang lebih baik daripada kaedah berasaskan CNN dan BERTbased konvensional. Kaedah peningkatan data saling bahasa kami juga melampaui kaedah lain dibandingkan bila menggunakan korpus AD bahasa Inggeris lain untuk peningkatan. Akhirnya, ketepatan pengesan terbaik 81.6% diperoleh dengan kaedah kami yang diusulkan pada Mandarin AD corpus.', 'mt': 'L-iskarsezza tad-dejta hija dejjem restrizzjoni fuq l-analiżi tat-traskrizzjonijiet tad-diskors għad-detezzjoni awtomatika tal-marda ta’ Alzheimer (AD), speċjalment meta s-suġġetti ma jitkellmux bl-Ingliż. Biex tittratta din il-kwistjoni, dan id-dokument l-ewwel jipproponi metodu ta’ tagħlim kuntrastiv biex jinkisbu rappreżentazzjonijiet effettivi għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test ibbażat fuq inkorporazzjonijiet monolingwi tal-BERT. Barra minn hekk, metodu ta’ żieda tad-dejta translingwi huwa mfassal billi jinbnew awtokodifikaturi biex jitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-test maqsuma miż-żewġ lingwi. L-esperimenti fuq il-Mandarin AD corpus juru li l-metodu ta’ tagħlim kuntrastiv jista’ jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ individwazzjoni a ħjar minn metodi konvenzjonali bbażati fuq CNN u BERTbased. Il-metodu tagħna ta’ żieda tad-dejta bejn il-lingwi jaqbeż ukoll metodi oħra ta’ tqabbil meta jintuża korpus ieħor Ingliż AD għal żieda. Fl-a ħħar nett, il-metodi proposti tagħna dwar il-Mandarin AD corpus jiksbu l-aħjar preċiżjoni ta’ identifikazzjoni ta’ 81,6 %.', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл хамаагүй нь алцхаймерийн өвчнөөс автоматжуулахын тулд ярианы хэлбэрүүдийг шинжилгээнд хязгаарлагддаг. Ялангуяа сурагчид Англи хэл биш байх үед. Энэ асуудлыг хамгийн эхлээд энэ цаас нь BERT-ын нэг хэлний нэгдэл дээр үндсэн текст хуваалцааны үр дүнтэй үзүүлэлтийг олох эсрэг суралцах аргыг санал болгож байна. Үүнээс гадна олон хэл өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийн арга нь хоёр хэл дээр хуваалцагдсан текст илтгэлийг сурахад автокодчуудыг бүтээхээр зориулагдсан. Мандарин АД корпус дээрх туршилтын туршилт нь эсрэг суралцах арга нь энгийн CNN болон BERTbased аргаас илүү зөв байдлыг олох боломжтой байна. Бидний олон хэл өгөгдлийн нэмэлт арга нь өөр Англи хэлний AD корпус ашиглах үед бусад харьцуулах арга замыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Эцэст нь, 81.6%-ын хамгийн сайн тодорхойлолт нь мандарины AD корпус дээр бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга замаар гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Lipsa datelor reprezintă întotdeauna o constrângere în analiza transcrierilor vorbirii pentru detectarea automată a bolii Alzheimer (AD), mai ales atunci când subiecții nu vorbesc limba engleză. Pentru a aborda această problemă, această lucrare propune mai întâi o metodă de învățare contrastantă pentru a obține reprezentări eficiente pentru clasificarea textelor bazate pe încorporarea monolingvă a BERT. Mai mult decât atât, o metodă de augmentare a datelor între limbi este proiectată prin construirea de codare automate pentru a învăța reprezentările textului împărtășite de ambele limbi. Experimentele pe un corpus AD mandarin arata ca metoda de invatare contrastanta poate obtine o mai buna precizie de detectie decat metodele conventionale bazate pe CNN si BERT. Metoda noastră de augmentare a datelor între limbi depășește, de asemenea, alte metode comparate atunci când utilizați un alt corpus AD în limba engleză pentru augmentare. În cele din urmă, cea mai bună precizie de detectare de 81,6% este obținută prin metodele propuse pe corpul AD mandarin.', 'no': 'Det er alltid ein begrensning på å analysera tale- transkriptingar for automatisk oppdaging av Alzheimer- sykdommen (AD), spesielt når subjektene er ikkje- engelske taler. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår denne papiret først ein kontrastlæringsmetode for å få effektiv representasjonar for tekstklassifikasjon basert på monospråk innbygging av BERT. I tillegg er eit krysspråk-oppgraderingsmetode designert ved å bygge autokodar for å lære tekstrepresentasjonane delt av begge språk. Eksperimentar på ein Mandarin AD-korpus viser at den kontrastende læringsmetoden kan oppnå bedre oppdaging av nøyaktighet enn konvensjonelle CNN-baserte og BERTbaserte metodar. Vårt krysspråkslagringsmetode utfører også andre sammenligningsmetoder når det brukar ein annan engelsk AD-korpus for augmentasjon. Ein beste oppdagingsnøyaktighet på 81,6 % blir henta av våre foreslått metoder på Mandarin AD corpus.', 'pl': 'Niedobór danych jest zawsze ograniczeniem w analizie transkrypcji mowy w celu automatycznego wykrywania choroby Alzheimera (AD), zwłaszcza gdy uczestnicy nie są językami angielskimi. Aby poradzić sobie z tym problemem, w artykule zaproponowano najpierw kontrastywną metodę uczenia się, aby uzyskać efektywne reprezentacje klasyfikacji tekstu oparte na jednojęzycznych osadzeniach BERT. Ponadto, wielojęzyczna metoda powiększania danych została zaprojektowana przez budowę autokoderów, aby uczyć się reprezentacji tekstu współdzielonych przez oba języki. Eksperymenty na korpusie mandaryńskim AD pokazują, że kontrastywna metoda uczenia się może osiągnąć lepszą dokładność wykrywania niż konwencjonalne metody oparte na CNN i BERT. Nasza wielojęzyczna metoda powiększania danych przewyższa również inne porównywane metody podczas stosowania innego angielskiego korpusu AD do powiększania. Wreszcie, najlepszą dokładność wykrywania 81,6% uzyskujemy za pomocą proponowanych metod na korpusie mandaryńskim AD.', 'sr': 'Nedostatak podataka je uvek ograničen analiziranje transkripta govora za automatsku detekciju Alzheimerove bolesti (AD), posebno kada su subjekti ne-engleski govornici. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, ovaj papir prvo predlaže kontrastivnu metodu učenja kako bi dobio efikasne predstave za klasifikaciju teksta na osnovu monojezičkih integracija BERT-a. Osim toga, metod povećanja međujezičkih podataka je dizajniran izgradnjem autokodera kako bi naučio tekstske predstave koje dijele oba jezika. Eksperimenti na Mandarinskom AD korpusu pokazuju da kontrastivni metod učenja može postići bolju tačnost otkrivanja nego konvencionalne metode na CNN-u i BERTbazirane metode. Naša metoda povećanja preko jezika podataka takođe iznosi druge uspoređene metode kada koristimo drugu englesku AD korpusu za povećanje. Konačno, najbolja tačnost otkrivanja od 81,6% dobija našim predloženim metodama o Mandarinskom AD korpusu.', 'si': 'දත්ත අවස්ථාවක් හැමවෙලේම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක අල්ජායිමර්ගේ රෝග (AD) පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා කතාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න අවස්ථාව මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න, මේ පත්තර පළවෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ BERT ගේ එක භාෂාවක ඉතින්, ක්\u200dරීස් භාෂාවක් තොරතුරු විශාල විධානයක් ස්වයංකේතකය නිර්මාණය කරනවා භාෂාවක් දෙන්නම් වෙන මැන්ඩාරින් AD කොර්පුස් එකේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය CNN-අධාරිත සහ අපේ විශාල භාෂාවික දත්ත විශාලනය විදිහට විශේෂ විදිහට අනිත් විදිහට වැඩ කරන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි AD කෝ අන්තිමේදී, 81.6% ගැන හොඳම හොයාගන්න හරියට අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මැන්ඩාරින් AD කොර්පුස් වලින් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'Xaaladaha macluumaadku mar walba waa xad ka mid ah baaritaanka qoraalka hadalka oo loo baaraandegayo cudurka maamaamaatooyinka Alzheimer (AD), khusuusan marka maadooyinka ay tahay kuwa aan Ingiriis ahayn. To deal with this issue, this paper first proposes a contrastive learning method to obtain effective representations for text classification based on monolingual embeddings of BERT.  Furthermore, qaabka kordhiska macluumaadka oo luuqadaha kala duduwan waxaa lagu sameeyaa dhismaha kordhiska qoraalka si ay u barto noocyada qoraalka oo labada luqadood lagu qeybeeyo. Imtixaanka ku saabsan AA-ka Mandarin wuxuu muujin karaa in qaababka iskuulka ka geesta ah ay ka heli karto saxda aqoonsiga iyo hababka caadiga ah oo ku saleysan CNN iyo BERT. Macluumaadka kordhiska ee macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duduwan wuxuu sidoo kale sameeyaa qaabab kale oo isbarbarbardhig ah marka uu isticmaalo kordhin karo af Ingiriis oo kale. Ugu dambaysta, saxda ugu wanaagsan ee lagu ogaado 81.6% waxaa laga helaa qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ee ku saabsan korpuska AD ee Mandarin.', 'ml': "Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers.  ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നോക്കാന്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പ് ആദ്യം ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ മോനോളില്\u200d ഭാഷയിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പ്രായോഗ അതിനുശേഷം, രണ്ടു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സ്വയം കോണ്\u200dകോഡേഴ്സുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200d മാന്\u200dഡാരിന്\u200d എഡി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു എതിര്\u200dപ്പുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണ സിഎന്\u200d  വേറൊരു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് എഡി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗം  അവസാനം, 81.6 ശതമാനം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മാന്\u200dഡാരിന്\u200d എഡി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീത", 'ta': "Data scarcity is always a restriction on analyzing speech transcripts for automatically Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when subjects are not English speakers. இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க இந்த தாள் முதலில் BERT பொருட்களை அடிப்படையில் விருப்பமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறையை பெறுவதற்கு பயனுள்ள அதற்கும் மேலும், மொழிமொழியில் உள்ள தகவல் மேம்படுத்தல் முறைமையை உருவாக்கி இரு மொழிகளாலும் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ள உரை குறியீட Experiments on a Mandarin AD corpus show that the contrastive learning method can achieve better detection accuracy than conventional CNN-based and BERTbased methods.  எங்கள் கிரும்ப மொழியின் தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறைமை இறுதியில், 81.6% சரியான கண்டறிதல் கிடைக்கும் மான்டாரின் AD கார்ப்ஸ் மீது எங்கள் பரிந்திருக்கப்பட்ட முறைகளால் ப", 'sv': 'Databrist är alltid ett hinder för att analysera taltranskriptioner för automatisk Alzheimers sjukdom (AD) upptäckt, särskilt när försökspersonerna inte talar engelska. För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår denna uppsats först en kontrastiv inlärningsmetod för att få effektiva representationer för textklassificering baserat på enspråkiga inbäddningar av BERT. Dessutom utformas en tvärspråkig dataförstärkningsmetod genom att bygga autokodare för att lära sig de textrepresentationer som delas av båda språken. Experiment på Mandarin AD-korpus visar att den kontrastiva inlärningsmetoden kan uppnå bättre detektionsnoggrannhet än konventionella CNN-baserade och BERT-baserade metoder. Vår tvärspråkiga dataförstärkningsmetod överträffar också andra jämförda metoder när en annan engelsk AD-korpus används för förstärkning. Slutligen, en bästa detektionsnoggrannhet på 81,6% erhålls genom våra föreslagna metoder på Mandarin AD corpus.', 'ur': "Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں، یہ کاغذ پہلے ایک مخالف سیکھنے کا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ BERT کے ایک زبان انڈینگ پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں متعلق تفسیر کے معاملہ کے لئے تفسیر کے معاملہ حاصل کریں. اور اس کے علاوہ، ایک کرس زبان ڈیٹا اگنٹ ڈیٹ منڈ طراحی کی جاتی ہے کہ دوسری زبانوں سے مشترک ٹیکسٹ منڈ کو سیکھنے کے لئے autoencoders بنانے کے ذریعہ طراحی کی جاتی ہے. Mandarin AD corpus کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ کنٹراسٹی سیکھنے کا طریقہ بہترین شناسایی دقیق پہنچ سکتا ہے اس سے زیادہ بہتر سین اور BERTbased طریقے سے۔ ہمارے کرس زبان ڈیٹا افزایش کا طریقہ بھی دوسرے مقایسہ طریقوں سے زیادہ کام کرتا ہے جب انگلیسی AD کورپوس کو افزایش کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ آخر میں، 81.6% کی ایک بہترین انتشار دقیق ہمارے منڈرین AD کورپوس کے ذریعہ سے حاصل کیا گیا ہے.", 'uz': "Maʼlumot haqida o'zgarishni avtomatik Alzheimer kasalligini (AD) aniqlash uchun gapiruvchilarni o'rganishda hech qachon cheksiz tartib beradi. Hullas, maktablar ingliz tilidan gapiruvchilar emas. Bu muammo bilan boshqarish uchun, birinchi qogʻoz BERT tashkilotlari asosida matn classifikasining effektiv representarini olish usulini rivojlanadi. Furtherin, ikkita tillar bilan bogʻliq boʻlgan matn representlarini o'rganish uchun avtomatik kodlash usuli yaratiladi. Mandarin AD corpusining imtiyozlarini ko'rsatish mumkin, oddiy o'rganish usuli oddiy CNN asosida va BERT asosida bajarish imkoniyatini bajarishi mumkin. Biz bir xil tildagi maʼlumot qoʻshish usuli boshqa bir ingliz tili AD corpusi ishlatilganda boshqa taʼminlovchi usullarni bajaradi. Oxiri, 81.6% eng eng yaxshi aniqlash muvaffaqiyatsiz Mandarin AD corpusning davomida topilgan usullarda olingan.", 'vi': 'Việc thiếu dữ liệu luôn là một giới hạn trong việc phân tích các ghi âm ngôn ngữ để phát hiện bệnh Alzheimer (AD) tự động, đặc biệt khi người nói tiếng không phải người Anh. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, bài viết này đề xuất trước tiên một phương pháp học tương đối để đạt được các biểu hiện hiệu quả cho việc phân loại văn bản dựa trên sự tác hợp độc ngôn ngữ của BERT. Thêm vào đó, một phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu xuyên ngôn ngữ được thiết kế bằng việc chế tạo tự mã hóa để học các biểu hiện văn bản chia sẻ hai ngôn ngữ. Các thí nghiệm trên một tập đoàn bưu phẩm Phổ Thông cho thấy phương pháp học tương phản có thể đạt độ chính xác phát hiện hơn các phương pháp dựa trên CNN và BERTA thông thường. Cách gia tăng dữ liệu xuyên rộng của chúng ta cũng vượt qua các phương pháp so sánh khác khi dùng một tập đoàn AD Tiếng Anh khác để tăng trưởng. Cuối cùng, độ chính xác phát hiện tốt nhất của 81', 'bg': 'Недостигът на данни винаги е ограничение при анализа на речните транскрипции за автоматично откриване на болестта на Алцхаймер (AD), особено когато субектите не говорят английски език. За да се справим с този проблем, настоящата статия първо предлага контрастивен метод на обучение за получаване на ефективни представяния за класификация на текста въз основа на едноезични вграждания на BERT. Освен това, междуезичен метод за увеличаване на данните е проектиран чрез изграждане на автокодери, за да научат текстовите представи, споделени от двата езика. Експериментите върху корпус на Мандарин АД показват, че контрастивният метод на обучение може да постигне по-добра точност на откриване в сравнение с конвенционалните методи, базирани на CNN и BERT. Нашият междуезичен метод за увеличаване на данни също надминава други сравними методи, когато използва друг английски корпус за увеличаване. И накрая, най-добрата точност на откриване от 81,6% се получава чрез предложените от нас методи върху корпуса на Мандарин АД.', 'nl': 'Dataschaarste is altijd een beperking bij het analyseren van spraaktranscripties voor automatische detectie van de ziekte van Alzheimer (AD), vooral wanneer de proefpersonen niet Engels spreken. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stelt dit artikel eerst een contrastieve leermethode voor om effectieve representaties voor tekstclassificatie te verkrijgen op basis van eentalige embeddingen van BERT. Bovendien wordt een meertalige data augmentatie methode ontworpen door het bouwen van autoencoders om de tekstrepresentaties die door beide talen worden gedeeld te leren. Experimenten op een Mandarijn AD corpus tonen aan dat de contrastieve leermethode een betere detectie nauwkeurigheid kan bereiken dan conventionele CNN-gebaseerde en BERTgebaseerde methoden. Onze cross-lingual data augmentation methode overtreft ook andere vergelijkende methoden bij het gebruik van een ander Engels AD corpus voor augmentatie. Tot slot wordt een beste detectie nauwkeurigheid van 81,6% verkregen door onze voorgestelde methoden op het Mandarijn AD corpus.', 'da': 'Dataknaphed er altid en begrænsning for at analysere taletranskriptioner til automatisk Alzheimers sygdom (AD) detektion, især når emnerne ikke taler engelsk. For at behandle dette spørgsmål foreslår denne artikel først en kontrastiv læringsmetode til at opnå effektive repræsentationer for tekstklassifikation baseret på ensprogede indlejringer af BERT. Desuden er en tværsproget dataaugmentationsmetode designet ved at bygge autoencodere til at lære de tekstrepræsentationer, der deles af begge sprog. Eksperimenter på et Mandarin AD korpus viser, at den kontrastive læringsmetode kan opnå bedre detektionsnøjagtighed end konventionelle CNN-baserede og BERT-baserede metoder. Vores tværsprogede dataaugmentationsmetode overgår også andre sammenlignede metoder, når du bruger et andet engelsk AD korpus til augmentation. Endelig opnås en bedste detektionsnøjagtighed på 81,6% ved hjælp af vores foreslåede metoder på Mandarin AD corpus.', 'hr': 'Nedostatak podataka je uvijek ograničen analiziranje prepisma govora za automatsku detekciju Alzheimerove bolesti (AD), posebno kada su subjekti ne-engleski govornici. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, ovaj papir prvo predlaže kontrastivnu metodu učenja kako bi dobio učinkovite predstave za klasifikaciju teksta na osnovu monojezičkih integracija BERT-a. Osim toga, metod povećanja međujezičkih podataka je dizajniran izgradnjem autokodera kako bi naučio predstave teksta podijeljene obje jezike. Iskusi na Mandarinskom AD korpusu pokazuju da kontrastivni metod učenja može postići bolju preciznost otkrivanja nego obične metode na CNN-u i BERTbazirane. Naša metoda povećanja preko jezika podataka također iznosi druge uspoređene metode kada koristimo drugu englesku AD korpusu za povećanje. Napokon, najbolja točnost otkrića od 81,6% dobije našim predloženim metodama o Mandarinskom AD korpusu.', 'de': 'Datenknappheit ist immer eine Einschränkung bei der Analyse von Sprachtranskriptionen für die automatische Erkennung der Alzheimer-Krankheit (AD), insbesondere wenn die Probanden nicht Englisch sprechen. Um dieses Problem zu behandeln, wird in diesem Beitrag zunächst eine kontrastive Lernmethode vorgeschlagen, um effektive Repräsentationen für die Textklassifikation basierend auf einsprachigen Einbettungen von BERT zu erhalten. Darüber hinaus wird eine mehrsprachige Datenerweiterungsmethode entwickelt, indem Autoencoder gebaut werden, um die Textrepräsentationen beider Sprachen zu lernen. Experimente an einem Mandarin AD Korpus zeigen, dass die kontrastive Lernmethode eine bessere Erkennungsgenauigkeit erreichen kann als herkömmliche CNN- und BERTbasierte Methoden. Unsere mehrsprachige Datenaugmentationsmethode übertrifft auch andere Vergleichsmethoden, wenn ein anderes englisches AD-Korpus zur Augmentation verwendet wird. Schließlich wird durch unsere vorgeschlagenen Methoden am Mandarin AD Korpus eine beste Nachweisgenauigkeit von 81,6% erreicht.', 'id': 'Kekurangan data selalu merupakan batas untuk menganalisis transkripsi pidato untuk deteksi Alzheimer penyakit otomatis (AD), terutama ketika subjek-subjek berbicara bukan bahasa Inggris. Untuk menangani masalah ini, kertas ini pertama-tama mengusulkan metode pembelajaran kontras untuk mendapatkan representation efektif untuk klasifikasi teks berdasarkan embedding monobahasa BERT. Selain itu, sebuah metode peningkatan data saling bahasa dirancang dengan membangun otokoder untuk belajar representation teks yang dibagi oleh kedua bahasa. Eksperimen pada Mandarin AD corpus menunjukkan bahwa metode belajar kontras dapat mencapai akurasi deteksi yang lebih baik dari metode konvensional berdasarkan CNN dan BERTbased. Metode peningkatan data saling bahasa kami juga melebihi metode perbandingan lain ketika menggunakan AD corpus Inggris lain untuk peningkatan. Akhirnya, akurasi deteksi terbaik 81,6% diperoleh dengan metode kami yang diusulkan pada Mandarin AD corpus.', 'ko': '데이터 부족은 알츠하이머병 (AD) 을 자동으로 검출하기 위해 음성 기록을 분석하는 데 제약이 되어 왔다. 특히 수험자가 영어를 하는 사람이 아닐 때 말이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 본고는 먼저 단어 삽입을 바탕으로 하는 비교 학습 방법을 제시하여 효과적인 텍스트 분류 표시를 얻었다.또한 자동 인코더를 구축하여 두 언어가 공유하는 텍스트 표시를 학습하고 크로스 언어 데이터 강화 방법을 설계했다.표준어 광고 자료 라이브러리에서의 실험은 비교 학습 방법이 전통적인 CNN 기반과 베트 기반 방법보다 더 좋은 검측 정확도를 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.다른 영어 광고 자료 라이브러리를 사용하여 확장할 때, 우리의 다중 언어 데이터 확장 방법도 다른 비교 방법보다 우수하다.마지막으로 우리가 제시한 방법은 중국어 광고 자료 라이브러리에서 81.6%의 가장 좋은 검측 정확도를 얻었다.', 'fa': 'کمبود داده\u200cها همیشه محدودیت بر تحلیل ترجمه\u200cهای سخنرانی برای شناسایی بیماری آلزایمر (AD) خودکار است، مخصوصا وقتی موضوع سخنرانی غیر انگلیسی هستند. برای حل این مسئله، این کاغذ اول یک روش یادگیری متفاوتی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند تا نمایش\u200cهای تاثیر برای گروه\u200cبندی متن بر اساس استفاده\u200cهای یک زبان BERT را دریافت کند. علاوه بر این، یک روش افزایش داده های مختلف زبان توسط ساختن کودرهای خودکار طراحی شده است تا نمایش\u200cهای متن را با هر دو زبان مشترک یاد بگیرد. تجربه\u200cهایی روی یک کورپوس ماندارین AD نشان می\u200cدهد که روش یادگیری متفاوتی می\u200cتواند دقیق شناسایی بهتر از روش\u200cهای سنتی بر اساس CNN و BERTbased به دست آورد. روش افزایش داده های مختلف زبان ما همچنین روش های مقایسه دیگری را در زمان استفاده از کورپوس دیگر انگلیسی AD برای افزایش انجام می دهد. بالاخره، دقیقات بهترین شناسایی 81.6 درصد توسط روش پیشنهاد ما در مورد کورپوس مدارین دریافت می شود.', 'sw': 'Uhofu wa taarifa mara zote ni vizuizi vya kuchambua maelezo ya hotuba kwa ajili ya kutambua ugonjwa wa Alzheimer (AD), hasa pale mada si wazungumzaji wa Kiingereza. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, gazeti hili la kwanza linapendekeza njia ya kujifunza yenye utata ili kupata uwakilishi wenye ufanisi wa kutangazwa kwa maandishi yanayotokana na matangazo ya lugha ya kiuchumi ya BERT. Zaidi ya hayo, mbinu ya kuongeza takwimu za lugha zinazotumiwa na kutengeneza kodi za kujifunza maonesho ya maandishi yaliyosambazwa na lugha zote. Majaribio kwenye makampuni ya Mandarin AD yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu tofauti za kujifunza inaweza kupata ukweli bora kuliko njia za kawaida za CNN na BERT. Utawala wetu wa kuongeza taarifa za lugha kwa lugha nyingine pia unafanya mbinu nyingine zinazolinganishwa wakati wa kutumia kampuni nyingine ya AD ya Kiingereza kwa ajili ya kuongeza. Mwisho, uhakika bora wa kutambua asilimia 81.6 unapatikana na njia zetu zilizopendekezwa kwenye makampuni ya Mandarin AD.', 'tr': "Maglumatlar ýeterlik bolup Alzheimer hastalıklarynyň otomatik terjimelerini (AD) tanyşdyrmak üçin çykyş terjimeleri hemişe çykyp bilmek mümkinçidir. Özellikle-de bu temalar iňlisçe danışanlar däldiklerinde. Bu meselede çözmek üçin bu kagyz ilkinji gezek BERT'yň monodil integralaryna daýanýan metin klasifikasynda täsirli suratlary almak üçin kontrast öwrenme yöntemini teklip berýär. Munuň üçin, her iki dilde paylaşyk metin täzeliklerini öwrenmek üçin awtomatik ködler inşa etmek üçin bir çarpaz dilli maglumat yöntemi tasarlanýar. Mandarin AD korpusynyň experimentalary CNN we BERTa tabanly yöntemlerden has dogrylygy tapyp biljekdigini görkez. Biziň çarpaz dillerimiz maglumatlandyrma yöntemimiz ýene bir Iňlisçe AD korpusyny ulananda ýagdaýda deňleşdirýän ýönlerimizi gowy edip bilýär. Soňunda, 81.6%-ň has dogry tapylmagy Mandarin AD corpusunda teklip eden yönlerimiz tarapyndan berildi.", 'af': "Data skande is altyd 'n beperking op die analyseer van spraak transkripte vir outomatiese Alzheimer se sykdom (AD) opdekking, veral wanneer die onderwerpe nie-Engelske sprekkers is. Om hierdie probleem te behandel, stel hierdie papier eerste 'n kontrastiewe leermeetode voor te kry effektief voorstellings vir teks klasifikasie gebaseer op monolinglike inbêdings van BERT. Daarom is 'n kruistale data vergroot metode ontwerp deur outoenkoders te bou om die teks voorstellings wat deur beide tale gedeel word te leer. Experiments on a Mandarin AD corpus show that the contrastive learning method can achieve better detection accuracy than conventional CNN-based and BERTbased methods. Ons kruistale data augmentasie metode uitvoer ook ander vergelykende metodes wanneer 'n ander Engelse AD corpus gebruik word vir augmentasie. Eindelik word 'n beste beskrywing presies van 81,6% ontvang deur ons voorgestelde metodes op die Mandarin AD corpus.", 'sq': 'Mungesa e të dhënave është gjithmonë një kufizim në analizën e transkriptimeve të fjalës për zbulimin automatik të s ëmundjes së Alzheimerit (AD), veçanërisht kur subjektet nuk flasin anglisht. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, kjo letër propozon së pari një metodë mësimi kontraste për të marrë përfaqësime efektive për klasifikimin e tekstit bazuar në përfshirjet monogjuhësore të BERT. Përveç kësaj, një metodë shtimi i të dhënave ndërgjuhësore është dizajnuar duke ndërtuar autokoduesit për të mësuar përfaqësimet e tekstit të ndara nga të dy gjuhët. Eksperimentet në një korpus Mandarin AD tregojnë se metoda e mësimit kontrastiv mund të arrijë saktësi më të mirë zbulimi se metodat konvencionale të bazuara në CNN dhe BERTbased. Metoda jonë e rritjes së të dhënave ndërgjuhësore ekziston gjithashtu metoda të tjera të krahasuara kur përdorim një korpus tjetër anglez AD për rritje. Më në fund, një zbulim më i mirë i saktësisë 81.6% arrihet nga metodat tona të propozuara për korpusin Mandarin AD.', 'am': 'ዳታ ድህነትን ሁልጊዜ የንግግር ጽሑፎችን ለመፍጠር የአልዝheimer ደዌ (AD) ማፍለስ ግድ ነው፤ በተለይም ጉዳዮቹ እንግሊዘኛ ንግግር ሳይሆኑ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ ይህ ገጽ በመጀመሪያ የBERT አካባቢዎች በተደረገው የጽሑፍ ክፍላቸውን በጽሑፍ ክፍል ለማግኘት የሚቃወም ትምህርት ሥርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር በሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች የጽሑፉን መልዕክቶች ለመማር በራሱ የኮድ ኮድዶችን በመሠረት ይሠራል፡፡ Experiments on a Mandarin AD corpus show that the contrastive learning method can achieve better detection accuracy than conventional CNN-based and BERTbased methods.  የቋንቋ-ቋንቋችን ዳታ ማጨመር ሥርዓት ደግሞ ሌላ እንግሊዝኛ አዲስ ኮፕስስ ለመጨመር በተደረገ ጊዜ የሚተካክል ሥርዓቶችን ያስተካክላል፡፡ በመጨረሻውም የ81.6 በመቶ የተሻለ ግንኙነት በማዳሪን አዲስ ኮርፓስ ላይ በተዘጋጀ ሥርዓታችን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Տվյալների բացակայությունը միշտ սահմանափակում է խոսքի հաղորդակցման վերլուծության համար Ալցհեյմերի հիվանդության ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման համար, հատկապես երբ առարկաները անգլերեն չեն խոսում: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար այս հոդվածը առաջին անգամ առաջարկում է հակադրական ուսումնասիրության մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստանանք տեքստի դասակարգման արդյունավետ ներկայացումներ, հիմնված BER-ի միալեզու ներդրումների վրա: Ավելին, երկլեզու տվյալների բարձրացման մեթոդը ստեղծվում է ավտոկոդերների կառուցման միջոցով, որպեսզի սովորեն երկու լեզուների կողմից կիսված տեքստի ներկայացումները: Experiments on a Mandarin AD corpus show that the contrastive learning method can achieve better detection accuracy than conventional CNN-based and BERTbased methods.  Մեր երկլեզվային տվյալների աճի մեթոդը նաև արտադրում է այլ համեմատական մեթոդներ, երբ օգտագործում է մեկ այլ անգլերեն ԱԴ կորպուս աճի համար: Վերջապես, 81.6 տոկոսի լավագույն հայտնաբերման ճշմարտությունը ստացվում է մեր առաջարկված մեթոդներով Մանդարին ԱԴ կորպոսի մասին:', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আলজেমারের রোগ (এডি) আবিষ্কারের জন্য ভাষণের লেখা বিশ্লেষণের ব্যাপারে তথ্যের দুর্দশা সবসময়ই বাধ্য। To deal with this issue, this paper first proposes a contrastive learning method to obtain effective representations for text classification based on monolingual embeddings of BERT.  এছাড়াও, একটি ক্রাস-ভাষাভাষী তথ্য যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে দুই ভাষায় ভ ম্যান্ডারিন এডি কোর্পাসের উপর এক পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে বিরোধী শিক্ষা পদ্ধতি সাধারণ সিএনএন ভিত্তিক এবং বেরেটিভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির চেয়ে ভ আমাদের ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী তথ্য যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমেও অন্যান্য তুলনায় প্রকাশ করেছে যখন অন্য ইংরেজি এডি কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে যোগায অবশেষে, ম্যান্ডারিন এডি কোর্পাসে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে ১৮.', 'az': "Data scarcity, həmişə Alzheimer hastalığı (AD) avtomatik təşkil etmək üçün s öz təşkillərini analizə etmək üçün müddətdir, özlərinə də məsələlər İngilizə deyil danışanları deyildikdə. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün bu kağıt ilk dəfə BERT'nin monodil inşallarına dayanan mətn klasifikasiyasının faydalanması üçün müxtəlif öyrənmə metodu təklif edir. Daha sonra, hər iki dil ilə paylaşılan metin göstərişlərini öyrənmək üçün otokodlayıcılar inşa etmək üçün çox dilli məlumat artırma metodu tasarlanmışdır. Mandarin AD korpusu təcrübələrinin müxtəlif öyrənmə metodlarının CNN-dən və BERTə-dayanan metodlardan daha yaxşı təcrübə edə biləcəyini göstərir. Bizim çox dilli verilər artırma metodumuz da başqa bir İngilizci AD korpusunu artırmaq üçün istifadə edərkən başqa karşılaşdırma metodlarını daha üstün edər. Sonunda, Mandarin AD korpusu ilə təklif edilmiş metodlarımızın 81,6%-inin ən yaxşı təşkil edilməsi ilə əldə edilir.", 'bs': 'Nedostatak podataka je uvijek ograničen analiziranje transkripta govora za automatsku detekciju Alzheimerove bolesti (AD), posebno kada su subjekti ne-engleski govornici. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, ovaj papir prvo predlaže kontrastivnu metodu učenja kako bi dobio efikasne predstave za klasifikaciju teksta na osnovu monojezičkih integracija BERT-a. Osim toga, metod povećanja međujezičkih podataka je dizajniran izgradnjem autokodera kako bi naučio tekstske predstave koje dijele obje jezike. Eksperimenti na Mandarinskom AD korpusu pokazuju da kontrastivni metod učenja može postići bolju tačnost otkrivanja nego konvencionalne metode na CNN-u i BERTbazirane metode. Naša metoda povećanja preko jezika podataka također iznosi druge uspoređene metode kada koristimo još jedan engleski AD korpus za povećanje. Konačno, najbolja preciznost otkrivanja 81,6% dobija od naših predloženih metoda o Mandarinskom AD korpusu.', 'cs': 'Nedostatek dat je vždy omezením analýzy přepisů řeči pro automatickou detekci Alzheimerovy choroby (AD), zejména pokud subjekty nejsou anglicky mluvící. K řešení této problematiky je v tomto příspěvku nejprve navržena metoda kontrastivního učení pro získání efektivních reprezentací pro klasifikaci textů založená na jednojjazyčných vloženích BERT. Kromě toho je navržena metoda rozšíření vícejazyčných dat vytvořením autokodérů pro naučení se textových reprezentací sdílených oběma jazyky. Experimenty na mandarínském AD korpusu ukazují, že metoda kontrastního učení může dosáhnout lepší detekční přesnosti než konvenční metody založené na CNN a BERT. Naše metoda cross-jazyčné datové augmentace také předčí ostatní porovnávané metody při použití jiného anglického AD korpusu pro augmentaci. V závěru je získána nejlepší detekční přesnost 81,6% našimi navrženými metodami na mandarínském AD korpusu.', 'et': 'Andmete nappus on alati piirang kõnetranskriptsioonide analüüsimisel automaatse Alzheimeri tõve tuvastamiseks, eriti kui uuritavad ei ole inglise keelt. Selle probleemi käsitlemiseks pakutakse käesolevas dokumendis esmalt välja kontrastiivne õppemeetod, et saada tõhusaid esitusi teksti klassifitseerimiseks BERTi ühekeelsete manustamiste põhjal. Lisaks on välja töötatud keeleülene andmete suurendamise meetod, luues automaatkodeerijad, et õppida õppima teksti esitusi, mida mõlemad keeled jagavad. Mandariini AD korpusega tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et kontrastiivne õppemeetod suudab saavutada parema tuvastamise täpsuse kui tavapärased CNN-põhised ja BERT-põhised meetodid. Meie keeleülene andmete suurendamise meetod ületab ka teisi võrreldavaid meetodeid, kui kasutame teise inglise AD korpuse suurendamiseks. Lõpuks saavutatakse parim tuvastustäpsus 81,6% meie pakutud meetoditega mandariini AD korpuse kohta.', 'fi': 'Tietojen niukkuus rajoittaa aina puhetranskriptioiden analysointia Alzheimerin taudin automaattista havaitsemista varten, erityisesti silloin, kun koehenkilöt eivät puhu englantia. Tämän kysymyksen käsittelemiseksi tässä työssä ehdotetaan ensin kontrastiivista oppimismenetelmää, jolla saadaan aikaan tehokkaat esitykset tekstin luokittelusta BERT:n yksikielisiin upotuksiin perustuen. Lisäksi monikielinen datan lisäämismenetelmä on suunniteltu rakentamalla automaattikoodereita oppimaan molempien kielten jakamia tekstiesityksiä. Mandariinin AD-korpusella tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että kontrastiivisella oppimismenetelmällä voidaan saavuttaa parempi tunnistustarkkuus kuin perinteisillä CNN- ja BERT-menetelmillä. Myös monikielinen datan lisäämismenetelmämme ylittää muut vertailumenetelmät käytettäessä toista englanninkielistä AD-korpusta. Lopuksi paras 81,6 prosentin tunnistustarkkuus saadaan ehdotetuilla menetelmillä Mandariinin AD-korpusella.', 'ca': "L'escassetat de dades sempre és una restricció en l'anàlisi de transcripcions fonamentals per a la detecció automàtica de la malaltia d'Alzheimer, especialment quan els sujets no parlen anglès. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, aquest paper proposa primer un mètode d'aprenentatge contrastiu per aconseguir representacions efectives per a la classificació de text basada en incorporacions monolingües del BERT. A més, un mètode d'augmentació de dades translingües està dissenyat construint autocodificadors per aprendre les representacions de text compartides per ambdues llengües. Els experiments d'un corpus de Mandarin AD mostren que el mètode d'aprenentatge contrastiu pot aconseguir una millor precisió de detecció que els mètodes convencionals basats en CNN i BERTbased. El nostre mètode de augmentació de dades translingües també supera altres mètodes comparats quan utilitzem un altre corpus anglès AD per augmentació. Finalment, la millor precisió de detecció del 81,6% es obté pels nostres mètodes proposats sobre el corpus Mandarin AD.", 'ha': "Hazarar data ta zama ana ƙunci a kan analyza rubutun da aka faɗi wa gane na alzheima farat ɗaya (AD), kuma hasa'a, idan madaidaita ba su zama mazaɓan Ingiriya ba. Ga ka yi haɗa da wannan masu al'amarin, kan karatun na farkon yana bukãta wata hanyor da za'a iya amfani da shiryuwar wa fasalin matsayin a kan bakin ayuka na BERT. Furan haka, an design wata shirin augutarwa na data na cikin lugha-ƙaranci don a sami kodkode farat ɗaya dõmin ya sanar da masu gaya matsayin da aka raba su biyu cikin harshen. Tajararin a kan mandarin AD-korbas na nuna cewa, metoden da ke motsi da zanen karantawa, za'a iya sãmu mafiya tsari daga hanyon a kawaici na CNN da BERT. @ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, mafiya kyakkyawan ganin tsari na 81.6 za'a sãmu na hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata a kan mandarin AD.", 'jv': 'data shortness Ngubah negoro iki, basa akeh nggambar tuabah sistem sing titimbang kelas contrast karo bentuan basa gambar nggawe layar seng lisasisa basa basa unggadi, bentuan langgar-sistem sing BERT. Label Perintah sing sabanjuré ning manung mandearin ASD kuwi nggawe Perintah kuwi nggawe Perintah sing bisa dianggawe barang pengguna kuwi nggawe layang apik dhéwé. Perintah sing sabanjuré supoyo akeh basa banget lan BERT kuwi. Awakdhéwé sistem anyar-sistem kanggo nggawe data sistem sing wis ngerasakno ngono nggawe barang nggawe cara-cara sing bisa basa Inggris-cadang batasan kanggo ngerasakno. Saiki ono, akeh panjenengan yakuwong sing paling-perusahaan karo bengko nggawe barang-barêng nggawe barang-barêng maning.', 'sk': 'Pomanjkanje podatkov je vedno omejitev pri analizi govornih transkripcij za avtomatsko zaznavanje Alzheimerjeve bolezni (AD), še posebej, če osebe niso angleško govoreče. Za obravnavo tega vprašanja v prispevku najprej predlagamo kontrastno metodo učenja za pridobitev učinkovitih predstavitev za klasifikacijo besedila na podlagi enojezičnih vdelav BERT. Poleg tega je metoda večjezičnega povečanja podatkov oblikovana z gradnjo samokodirnikov za učenje besedilnih predstavitev, ki jih delita oba jezika. Eksperimenti na korpusu mandarinščine AD kažejo, da lahko kontrastna metoda učenja doseže boljšo natančnost odkrivanja kot običajne metode CNN in BERT. Naša medjezična metoda povečanja podatkov presega tudi druge primerjavne metode pri uporabi drugega angleškega AD korpusa za povečanje. Nazadnje, najboljšo natančnost odkrivanja 81,6% dosežemo z našimi predlaganimi metodami na korpusu Mandarin AD.', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་རྟག་པར་ཨིན་ཇིའི་ནང་གི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ལས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཏོང་བའི་སྐད་བརྟན་གཏོང་། གནད་དོན་འདི་ལ་ཤོག་བྱང་དང་པོ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་BERT ཡི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་གཞུང་བའི་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་ལྡན་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ ད་དུང་། སྐད་ཡིག Mandarin AD corpus་ཐོག་གི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་སྟངས་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ལམ་ལྟར་གཞི་CNN དང་BERTར་གཞི་བྱས་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉེན་ ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་བསླབ་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་གཞན་ཡང་མཐུན་གྱིས། མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ། 81.6% ཡི་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཐོབ་པ་རེད།', 'he': "Data scarcity is always a constraint on analyzing speech transcriptions for automatic Alzheimer's disease (AD) detection, especially when the subjects are non-English speakers.  To deal with this issue, this paper first proposes a contrastive learning method to obtain effective representations for text classification based on monolingual embeddings of BERT.  חוץ מזה, שיטת גידול נתונים בין שפות מתוכננת על ידי בניית קודדים אוטומטיים כדי ללמוד את מייצגי הטקסט המשותפים על ידי שתי השפות. ניסויים על גופוס מנדרין AD מראים ששיטת הלימודים ההתנגדות יכולה להשיג מדויקת גילוי טובה יותר משיטות קונציונציונליות מבוססות על CNN ומבוססות על BERT. שיטת גידול נתונים בין השפתיים שלנו גם עולה על שיטות שוואות אחרות כשמשתמשים בקורפוס אנגלי אחר של AD כדי גידול. סוף סוף, בדיקת גילוי הטובה ביותר של 81.6% מושגת על ידי השיטות המוצעות שלנו על הקורפוס המנדרין AD."}
{'en': 'Hierarchical Text Segmentation for Medieval Manuscripts', 'ar': 'تجزئة النص الهرمي لمخطوطات العصور الوسطى', 'pt': 'Segmentação hierárquica de texto para manuscritos medievais', 'fr': 'Segmentation hiérarchique des textes pour les manuscrits médiévaux', 'es': 'Segmentación jerárquica de textos para manuscritos medi', 'ja': '中世写本の階層的なテキストセグメンテーション', 'zh': '中世纪手稿分文本', 'hi': 'मध्ययुगीन पांडुलिपियों के लिए पदानुक्रमित पाठ विभाजन', 'ru': 'Иерархическая сегментация текста для средневековых рукописей', 'ga': 'Deighilt Téacs Ordlathach do Lámhscríbhinní Meánaoise', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ιεραρχικός κλάδος κειμένου για μεσαιωνικά χειρόγραφα', 'hu': 'Hierarchikus szövegszegmentáció középkori kéziratokhoz', 'lt': 'Vidurio amžiaus rankraščių hierarchinė teksto segmentacija', 'it': 'Segmentazione gerarchica del testo per manoscritti medievali', 'mk': 'Хиерархиска текстова сегментација за средновековни ракописи', 'kk': 'Орташық қолмен скрипттердің иерарикалық мәтін сегментациясы', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Teks Hierarkik untuk Manuskrip Pertengahan', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tat-test ġerarkiku għall-Manskritti Medievali', 'ml': 'നടത്തിലുള്ള മാനുസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഹൈറരാക്കിക്കല്\u200d പദാവലി സജ്ജീകരണം', 'mn': 'Дунд зууны гарын зөвлөгүүдийн гиерархик текст хэлбэр', 'no': 'Hierarisk tekstsegmentering for middelhavleg manuskript', 'pl': 'Hierarchiczna segmentacja tekstu dla średniowiecznych rękopisów', 'ro': 'Segmentarea ierarhică a textului pentru manuscrise medievale', 'sr': 'Hierarična tekstska segmentacija za srednjovekovne rukopise', 'si': 'මධ්\u200dයමාත්\u200dරික පුද්ගලය සඳහා හියරාචික් පාළුව සෙග්මැන්ටම්', 'sv': 'Hierarkisk textsegmentering för medeltida manuskript', 'ta': 'Hierarchical Text Segmentation for Medieval Manuscripts', 'so': 'Heshiiska qoraalka ee qoraalka dhexe ee qoraalka', 'ur': 'مرکز وصول مہینسکرپٹوں کے لئے حیرارشیک ٹکس سپٹمنٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Йерархична текстова сегментация за средновековни ръкописи', 'da': 'Hierarkisk tekstsegmentering for middelalderlige manuskripter', 'hr': 'Hierarična segmentacija teksta za srednjovjekovne rukopise', 'nl': 'Hierarchische tekstsegmentatie voor middeleeuwse handschriften', 'de': 'Hierarchische Textsegmentierung für mittelalterliche Handschriften', 'id': 'Segmentasi Teks Hierarkis untuk Manuskrip Abad Tengah', 'fa': 'قطعه\u200cبندی متن تحریک برای راهنمایی\u200cنوشته\u200cهای قرن وسط', 'ko': '중세 원고의 층별 텍스트 분할', 'tr': 'Orta Gadyk Elipbi üçin Hiyerarşik Metin Segmentation', 'af': 'Hierariese Teks Segmentasie vir Medievale Handskripte', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni Hierarkik i Tekstit për Manuskriptet Mesjetare', 'hy': 'Միջնադարյան ձեռնարկագրերի հեերախիկ տեքստի սեգմեցիա', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Orta Yəni Əlavə Yazıları üçün Hiyerarşik Metin Segmentasyonu', 'bn': 'মেডিয়েল ম্যানুস্ক্রিপ্টের জন্য হিরেরার্কিকেল লেখা বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'bs': 'Hierarična segmentacija teksta za srednjovjekovne rukopise', 'ca': 'Segmentació Hierarquica de Text per Manuscrits Medievals', 'et': 'Keskaegsete käsikirjade hierarhiline teksti segmenteerimine', 'cs': 'Hierarchická segmentace textu pro středověké rukopisy', 'sw': 'Highlighting text for Medieval Manuscripts', 'fi': 'Hierarkkinen tekstisegmentointi keskiaikaisille käsikirjoituksille', 'sk': 'Hierarhična segmentacija besedila za srednjeveške rokopise', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'פרט טקסט הייררכי עבור כתבי יד מימי הביניים', 'bo': 'Hierarchical Text Segmentation for Medieval Manuscripts'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we address the segmentation of books of hours, Latin devotional manuscripts of the late Middle Ages, that exhibit challenging issues : a complex hierarchical entangled structure, variable content, noisy transcriptions with no sentence markers, and strong correlations between sections for which topical information is no longer sufficient to draw segmentation boundaries. We show that the main state-of-the-art segmentation methods are either inefficient or inapplicable for books of hours and propose a bottom-up greedy approach that considerably enhances the segmentation results. We stress the importance of such hierarchical segmentation of books of hours for historians to explore their overarching differences underlying conception about Church.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نتناول تجزئة كتب الساعات ، والمخطوطات التعبدية اللاتينية في أواخر العصور الوسطى ، والتي تعرض قضايا صعبة: هيكل متشابك هرمي معقد ، ومحتوى متغير ، ونصوص صاخبة بدون علامات جمل ، وارتباطات قوية بين الأقسام التي لم تعد المعلومات الموضعية كافية لرسم حدود التجزئة. نوضح أن طرق التجزئة الرئيسية الحديثة إما غير فعالة أو غير قابلة للتطبيق على كتب الساعات ونقترح نهجًا جشعًا من القاعدة إلى القمة يعزز نتائج التجزئة إلى حد كبير. نشدد على أهمية هذا التقسيم الهرمي لكتب الساعات بالنسبة للمؤرخين لاستكشاف اختلافاتهم الشاملة الكامنة وراء مفهوم الكنيسة.', 'es': 'En este artículo, abordamos la segmentación de libros de horas, manuscritos devocionales latinos de finales de la Edad Media, que exhiben cuestiones desafiantes: una compleja estructura jerárquica entrelazada, contenido variable, transcripciones ruidosas sin marcadores de oración y fuertes correlaciones entre secciones para las cuales la información temática ya no es suficiente para trazar los límites de la segmentación. Mostramos que los principales métodos de segmentación de última generación son ineficientes o inaplicables a los libros de horas y proponemos un enfoque ambicioso de abajo hacia arriba que mejora considerablemente los resultados de la segmentación. Hacemos hincapié en la importancia de tal segmentación jerárquica de los libros de horas para que los historiadores exploren las diferencias generales que subyacen a la concepción de la Iglesia.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous abordons la segmentation des livres d'heures, des manuscrits de dévotion latins de la fin du Moyen Âge, qui présentent des problèmes complexes\xa0: une structure hiérarchique complexe, un contenu variable, des transcriptions bruyantes sans marqueurs de phrases et de fortes corrélations entre les sections pour lesquelles les informations d'actualité ne suffisent plus pour établir des limites de segmentation. Nous montrons que les principales méthodes de segmentation de pointe sont soit inefficaces, soit inapplicables aux livres d'heures et proposons une approche gourmande ascendante qui améliore considérablement les résultats de la segmentation. Nous soulignons l'importance d'une telle segmentation hiérarchique des livres d'heures pour permettre aux historiens d'explorer les différences fondamentales qui sous-tendent la conception de l'Église.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, abordamos a segmentação de livros de horas, manuscritos devocionais latinos do final da Idade Média, que apresentam questões desafiadoras: uma estrutura hierárquica complexa emaranhada, conteúdo variável, transcrições ruidosas sem marcadores de frases e fortes correlações entre seções para as quais informações tópicas não são mais suficientes para traçar limites de segmentação. Mostramos que os principais métodos de segmentação do estado da arte são ineficientes ou inaplicáveis para livros de horas e propomos uma abordagem gananciosa de baixo para cima que melhora consideravelmente os resultados da segmentação. Ressaltamos a importância dessa segmentação hierárquica dos livros de horas para que os historiadores explorem suas diferenças abrangentes subjacentes à concepção sobre a Igreja.', 'ja': '本稿では，複雑な階層的な絡み合った構造，可変な内容，文章マーカーのない騒々しい転写，セグメンテーションの境界線を引くのに十分ではなくなった話題情報のセクション間の強い相関性などの課題を示す，中世後期のラテン語の献身的な原稿である時間の本のセグメンテーションについて述べる。主な最先端のセグメンテーション手法は、非効率であるか、時間の本には適用できないかのいずれかであることを示し、セグメンテーションの結果を大幅に強化するボトムアップの貪欲なアプローチを提案します。私たちは、歴史家が教会に関する概念の根底にある包括的な違いを探求するために、このような時間の本の階層的セグメンテーションの重要性を強調します。', 'zh': '于本文中,讨论中世纪晚拉丁语灵修手稿少时书籍之分,其稿有挑战性:杂分纠结,可变之义,无句记嘈杂转录,及主题信息不复足画界之强相关性。 臣等明大要先进之分,或效率下之书,或不宜小时数之书,并建自下而上之贪,可大大提高分割。 我們強調,這種分級分割之要,對于歷史學 家探其們對教會觀念所潛在總體差異。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम घंटों की पुस्तकों के विभाजन को संबोधित करते हैं, देर से मध्य युग की लैटिन भक्ति पांडुलिपियां, जो चुनौतीपूर्ण मुद्दों को प्रदर्शित करती हैं: एक जटिल पदानुक्रमित उलझी हुई संरचना, चर सामग्री, बिना किसी वाक्य मार्कर के शोर प्रतिलेखन, और वर्गों के बीच मजबूत सहसंबंध जिसके लिए सामयिक जानकारी अब विभाजन सीमाओं को आकर्षित करने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं है। हम दिखाते हैं कि मुख्य अत्याधुनिक विभाजन विधियां या तो घंटों की पुस्तकों के लिए अक्षम या लागू नहीं होती हैं और एक बॉटम-अप लालची दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करती हैं जो विभाजन परिणामों को काफी बढ़ाती है। हम इतिहासकारों के लिए चर्च के बारे में अवधारणा के अंतर्निहित अपने व्यापक मतभेदों का पता लगाने के लिए घंटों की पुस्तकों के इस तरह के पदानुक्रमित विभाजन के महत्व पर जोर देते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы рассмотрим сегментацию книг часов, латинских молитвенных рукописей позднего Средневековья, которые демонстрируют сложные вопросы: сложная иерархическая запутанная структура, переменное содержание, шумные транскрипции без маркеров предложений и сильные корреляции между разделами, для которых тематической информации больше не хватает, чтобы провести границы сегментации. Мы показываем, что основные современные методы сегментации либо неэффективны, либо неприменимы для книг часов, и предлагаем жадный подход снизу вверх, который значительно улучшает результаты сегментации. Мы подчеркиваем важность такой иерархической сегментации книг часов для историков, чтобы исследовать их всеобъемлющие различия, лежащие в основе концепции Церкви.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar dheighilt leabhair uaireanta, lámhscríbhinní diaga Laidine de chuid na Meánaoise déanacha, a léiríonn ceisteanna dúshlánacha: struchtúr casta ordlathach fite fuaite, ábhar inathraithe, tras-scríbhinní callánacha gan aon chomharthaí abairte, agus comhghaolta láidre idir ranna ina leith. ní leor faisnéis tráthúla a thuilleadh chun teorainneacha deighilte a tharraingt. Léirímid go bhfuil na príomh-mhodhanna deighilte úrscothacha mí-éifeachtach nó neamh-infheidhme maidir le leabhair uaireanta agus molaimid cur chuige sanntach ón mbun aníos a chuireann go mór leis na torthaí deighilte. Cuirimid béim ar a thábhachtaí atá deighilt ordlathach den sórt sin ar leabhair uaireanta le go bhféadfaidh staraithe a gcuid difríochtaí uileghabhálacha atá mar bhunús leis an gcoincheap faoin Eaglais a fhiosrú.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a késő középkori órakönyvek, latin odaadó kéziratok szegmentálásával foglalkozunk, amelyek kihívást jelentő kérdéseket mutatnak: komplex hierarchikus összefonódott struktúra, változó tartalom, zajos, mondatmérők nélküli átiratok és erős összefüggések olyan szakaszok között, amelyekhez a aktuális információ már nem elegendő a szegmentációs határok megrajzolásához. Megmutatjuk, hogy a legkorszerűbb szegmentációs módszerek vagy nem hatékonyak vagy alkalmazhatók órakönyvekre, és egy alulról felfelé irányuló kapzsi megközelítést javasolunk, amely jelentősen javítja a szegmentációs eredményeket. Hangsúlyozzuk az órakönyvek ilyen hierarchikus szegmentálásának fontosságát a történészek számára, hogy feltárják az egyházról szóló átfogó különbségeket.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ საათების წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის პრობლემები, რომლებიც კომპლექსიკური იერაქტიკური დაკავშირებული სტრუქტურა,  ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ საათების წიგნისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი წიგნისთვის, ან არაფექტიური, ან არაფექტიური წიგნისთვის და მინდომარებით წიგნის წიგნის წიგნისთვის, რო ჩვენ ასეთი იერაქტიკური წიგნის წიგნის გასანიშვნელობას ისტორიოსებისთვის, რომ ისტორიოსებისთვის განსხვავებული განსხვავებების განსხვავება, რომლებიც უფლებისთვის გა', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, εξετάζουμε την κατάτμηση βιβλίων ωρών, λατινικών λατρευτικών χειρογράφων του ύστερου Μεσαίωνα, που παρουσιάζουν προκλητικά ζητήματα: μια σύνθετη ιεραρχική μπερδεμένη δομή, μεταβλητό περιεχόμενο, θορυβώδεις μεταγραφές χωρίς δείκτες προτάσεων, και ισχυρούς συσχετισμούς μεταξύ τμημάτων για τις οποίες οι επίκαιρες πληροφορίες δεν επαρκούν πλέον για να χαράξουν όρια τμηματοποίησης. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι οι κυριότερες σύγχρονες μέθοδοι κατακερματισμού είναι είτε αναποτελεσματικές είτε μη εφαρμόσιμες για βιβλία ωρών και προτείνουμε μια άπληστη προσέγγιση από κάτω προς τα πάνω που ενισχύει σημαντικά τα αποτελέσματα κατακερματισμού. Τονίζουμε τη σημασία μιας τέτοιας ιεραρχικής κατάτμησης των βιβλίων ωρών για τους ιστορικούς να διερευνήσουν τις γενικές διαφορές τους που διέπουν την αντίληψη για την Εκκλησία.', 'it': "In questo articolo affrontiamo la segmentazione dei libri d'ore, manoscritti devozionali latini del tardo Medioevo, che presentano problematiche impegnative: una struttura gerarchica complessa, contenuto variabile, trascrizioni rumorose senza marcatori di frase, e forti correlazioni tra sezioni per le quali l'informazione topica non è più sufficiente a tracciare confini di segmentazione. Mostriamo che i principali metodi di segmentazione all'avanguardia sono inefficienti o inapplicabili per i libri di ore e proponiamo un approccio dal basso verso l'alto avido che migliora notevolmente i risultati della segmentazione. Sottolineiamo l'importanza di tale segmentazione gerarchica dei libri di ore per gli storici per esplorare le loro differenze generali alla base della concezione della Chiesa.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente kalbame apie valandų knygų segmentavimą, Lotynų šventuosius vidurinio amžiaus rankraščius, kurie kelia sunkius klausimus: sudėtingą hierarchinę sujungtą struktūrą, kintamą turinį, triukšmingas transkripcijas be sakinių žymenų ir tvirtas sąsajas tarp skyrių, kuriems dabartinės informacijos nebepakanka segmentacijos riboms nustatyti. Mes rodome, kad pagrindiniai moderniausi segmentacijos metodai yra arba neveiksmingi, arba netaikomi valandų knygoms, ir siūlome iš apačios į viršų elgtis požiūriu, kuris gerokai padidina segmentacijos rezultatus. Mes pabrėžiame tokios hierarchinės valandų knygų segmentacijos svarbą, kad istoriai ištirtų savo didžiulius skirtumus, kuriais grindžiama sąvoka apie bažnyčią.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз сағаттың бөлігін, Орташық жылдардың соңындағы латын көмектесу құжаттарын, бұл көмектесу мәселелерді көрсетеді: комплекс иерархиялық бөлігі, айнымалы мазмұны, сөз маркерлері жоқ дыбыс транскриптері және тақырыпты мәліметтер арасындағы күш Біз сағат кітаптарының негізгі сегментациялық әдістерін көрсету әдістерін көрсету мүмкін емес немесе сағат кітаптарына қолдануға мүмкін емес және төмендегі сәттік тәртібін ұсынып, сегментаци Біз түсіндірушілер үшін мұндай иерархиялық сағат бөлімінің маңыздылығын түсіндіреміз.', 'ms': 'In this paper, we address the segmentation of books of hours, Latin devotional manuscripts of the late Middle Ages, that exhibit challenging issues: a complex hierarchical entangled structure, variable content, noisy transcriptions with no sentence markers, and strong correlations between sections for which topical information is no longer sufficient to draw segmentation boundaries.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah segmen state-of-the-art utama sama ada tidak efisien atau tidak boleh dilaksanakan untuk buku jam dan melamar pendekatan serakah bawah-atas yang meningkatkan keputusan segmen. Kami menekankan kepentingan segmen hierarkis seperti buku jam untuk sejarah untuk mengeksplorasi perbezaan mereka yang mendasarkan konsepsi tentang Gereja.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ние се обраќаме на сегментацијата на книгите на часови, латинските посветени ракописи на доцните средни векови, кои покажуваат предизвикувачки прашања: комплексна хиерархична вмешана структура, променлива содржина, гласни транспиции без маркери на реченици, и силни корелации меѓу секциите за кои точните информации повеќе не се доволни за да се ц Ние покажуваме дека главните најнови методи на сегментација се или неефикасни или неприменливи за книги со часови и предложуваме алчен пристап од долу до горе кој значително ги подобрува резултатите на сегментацијата. Ние ја истакнуваме важноста на ваквата хиерархиска сегментација на часовни книги за историчарите да ги истражуваат нивните огромни разлики во основа на концепцијата за Црквата.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэдэн цаг хугацааны номын хэсэг, Дунд зууны сүүлийн үеийн Латин сонирхолтой гарын бичиг баримтуудыг харуулж байна. Энэ нь хэцүү асуудлуудыг харуулж байна: комплекс дүрслэгдсэн бүтэц, өөрчлөгдсөн тохиолдол, өгүүлбэргүй чимээгүй чимээгүй чимээгүй чимээгүй чимээгүй, мөн сэдвийн Бид урлагийн загварын гол түвшин арга загварын арга нь хэдэн цаг хугацааны ном дээр үр дүнгүй эсвэл хэрэгжүүлэхгүй гэдгийг харуулж, загварын үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлэх арга загварыг сануулж байна. Бид түүхчдийн тухай ойлголтын үндсэн өөрчлөлтийг судлах түүхдүүдэд хэдэн цаг хугацааны түүхийн төлөвлөгөөний чухал зүйлийг батладаг.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw is-segmentazzjoni tal-kotba tas-sigħat, il-manuskritti dedikattivi Latini ta’ tard fl-Ewwel Nofsani, li juru kwistjonijiet ta’ sfida: struttura ġerarkika kumplessa mħallta, kontenut varjabbli, traskrizzjonijiet storbjużi mingħajr markaturi tas-sentenzi, u korrelazzjonijiet qawwija bejn sezzjonijiet li għalihom l-informazzjoni topika m’għadhiex biżżejjed biex jitfasslu l-limiti tas-segmentazzjoni. Aħna nuru li l-metodi ewlenin ta’ segmentazzjoni l-aktar avvanzati huma jew ineffiċjenti jew inapplikabbli għal kotba ta’ sigħat u nipproponu approċċ minn isfel għal fuq li jtejjeb b’mod konsiderevoli r-riżultati tas-segmentazzjoni. Aħna tenfasizzaw l-importanza ta’ segmentazzjoni ġerarkika bħal din ta’ kotba ta’ sigħat għall-istoriċi biex jesploraw id-differenzi ġenerali tagħhom li huma l-bażi tal-kunċett dwar il-Knisja.', 'no': 'I denne papiret adresserer vi segmentasjonen av bøker i timer, latinske spesifikasjonske manuskript i dei siste midtre årene, som viser vanskelege problemar: ein kompleks hierarkisk innhald struktur, variabel innhald, støytraksjonar med ingen setningsmarker, og sterke korrelasjonar mellom deler som er ikkje lenger nok for å teikne segmentasjonsgrenser. Vi viser at dei viktige metodane for segmentasjonen av kunsten er anten ukjende eller ikkje tilgjengelege for bøkar i timer og foreslår ein grødig tilnærming som utviklar segmentasjonen. Vi strekar på viktigheten til slike hierarkiske segmentasjon av bøker i timer for historierane å utforske sine overarkiverte forskjeller som underligg konseptasjon om kirke.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മണിക്കൂറുകളുടെ പുസ്തകങ്ങളുടെ വിഭാഗങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു, ലാറ്റിന്\u200d മദ്ധ്യായുസ്സിന്റെ ആത്മാര്\u200dത്ഥ കൈകാര്യങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച്, വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങളെ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മണിക്കൂറുകളുടെ പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അസാധ്യതയോ ഇല്ല ചര്\u200dച്ചിനെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ചരിത്രത്തിലെ മണിക്കൂറുകളുടെ പുസ്തകങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാ', 'pl': 'W artykule omówiono segmentację książek godzin, łacińskich rękopisów oddanych późnego średniowiecza, które wykazują trudne zagadnienia: złożoną hierarchiczną strukturę splątaną, zmienną treść, hałaśliwe transkrypcje bez znaczników zdań oraz silne korelacje między sekcjami, dla których aktualne informacje nie są już wystarczające do wyrysowania granic segmentacji. Pokazujemy, że główne najnowocześniejsze metody segmentacji są albo nieefektywne, albo niestosowne dla książek godzin i proponujemy podejście oddolne, które znacznie poprawia wyniki segmentacji. Podkreślamy znaczenie takiej hierarchicznej segmentacji książek godzin dla historyków do zbadania ich nadrzędnych różnic leżących u podstaw koncepcji Kościoła.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare abordăm segmentarea cărților de ore, manuscrise devoționale latine din Evul Mediu târziu, care prezintă probleme provocatoare: o structură ierarhică complexă încurcată, conținut variabil, transcrieri zgomotoase fără markeri de propoziție și corelații puternice între secțiuni pentru care informațiile actuale nu mai sunt suficiente pentru a trage granițe de segmentare. Arătăm că principalele metode de segmentare de ultimă generație sunt fie ineficiente, fie inaplicabile pentru cărțile de ore și propunem o abordare lacomă de jos în sus, care îmbunătățește considerabil rezultatele segmentării. Subliniem importanța unei astfel de segmentări ierarhice a cărților de ore pentru istorici pentru a explora diferențele lor globale care stau la baza concepției despre Biserică.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru se obraćamo na segmentaciju knjiga sati, latinskih posvećenih rukopisa poslednjih srednjih veka, koji pokazuju izazovne probleme: kompleksna hijerarhička struktura, promjena sadržaja, bukovne transkripcije bez markera rečenica, i jake korelacije između sekcija za koje temeljna informacija više nije dovoljna za crtanje granica segmentacije. Pokazujemo da su glavne metode segmentacije umjetnosti ili neefektivne ili neprihvatljive za knjige sati i predlažemo pohlepni pristup koji značajno poboljšava rezultate segmentacije. Mi naglašavamo važnost takvih hijerarhijskih segmentacija knjiga sati istoričara da istražuju njihove široke razlike pod koncepcijom o crkvi.', 'so': "Qoraalkan ayaannu ku sheekaynaa buugaagta saacadaha, qoraalada caadooyinka Latin ee ugu dambeeyay da'da dhexe, taas oo muuqata dhibaatooyin adag: dhismo qallafsan, wax beddelan, warqado cod ah oo aan lahayn markhaaro, iyo xiriir xoog leh oo u dhexeeya qeybaha ay macluumaadka ku saabsan ee aan mar dambe ku filnayn xuduudaha qeybaha galmada. Waxaynu muujinnaa in habka ugu horeeya ee farshaxanku ay tahay mid aan ku filnayn ama aan filnayn buugaagta saacadaha, waxaana soo jeedinaya qaab faa'iido ah oo ku kordhiya dhamaadka qeybinta. Waxaynu ku streysanaynaa muhiimka u ah inay u baaraandegaan khilaafkooda bedelka ah oo ku saabsan fikrada kiniisadda.", 'si': 'In this page, we address the singing of book of clocks, Latin Devotive handcripts of the latter Middle Ages, that exhibit challenging challenges: a comprehensed hièrarArchic entongued form, varyable contignment, sound transcriptions with no word Markrs, and strength corelation Betwich Secions for where topal info is no more suffixes to paint regions. Note this is a KRunner keyword;% 1 is a KRunner keyword;% 2 is a KRunner keyword. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට පැය ගැන පොත්තුවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැහැ නැහැ නැහැ නැහැ නැහැ නැහැ කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජන අපි ඉතිහාසිකරුවන්ට පැයේ පොත්තුවක් ගැන අනුමාණ විශේෂ විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් වගේ වැදගත්ත විදියට අ', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats behandlar vi segmenteringen av timböcker, latinska hängivna manuskript från senmedeltiden, som uppvisar utmanande frågor: en komplex hierarkisk sammanflätad struktur, variabelt innehåll, bullriga transkriptioner utan meningsmarkeringar och starka korrelationer mellan sektioner där aktuell information inte längre räcker för att dra segmenteringsgränser. Vi visar att de viktigaste toppmoderna segmenteringsmetoderna antingen är ineffektiva eller olämpliga för timmar och föreslår ett bottom-up girigt tillvägagångssätt som avsevärt förbättrar segmenteringsresultaten. Vi betonar vikten av en sådan hierarkisk segmentering av timböcker för historiker att utforska deras övergripande skillnader bakom uppfattningen om kyrkan.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மணி நேரத்திற்கு பிரிவு புத்தகங்களை விளக்குகிறோம், லத்தீன் வயதிற்கு முடிந்த வயதிற்கு கட்டுப்பாடுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம். சிக்கலான கட்டம், மாறிய உள்ளடக்கங்கள், வாக்கு குறிய நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் முக்கிய கலை பிரிவு முறைகள் அல்லது புத்தகங்களின் புத்தகங்களுக்கு தேவையில்லா அல்லது புத்தகங்களுக்கு தேவையானது மற்றும் கீ நாம் இத்தகைய புத்தகங்களின் முக்கியமான பிரிவுகளை வரலாற்றாளர்களுக்கு மணி நேரம் புத்தகங்கள் தேர்ந்தெடுத்து அவர்களுடைய மேலான', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں گھنٹوں کی کتابوں کی جدائی کریں گے، لاتین کے اچھے مدینہ عصروں کی مہمانسکرپٹوں کے ذریعہ، جو مشکلات میں مشکل ہیں: ایک پیچیدہ تحریک ساختار، متغیر منصوبات، بغیر کلمات نشانیوں کے بغیر صوتی ترنسکرپٹوں اور مضبوط ترنسکرپٹوں کے درمیان مضبوط تعلق کریں گے جن کے لئے ٹوپائیل ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ اچھی موقعیت آرتی سیگنٹ طریقے ہیں یا گھنٹوں کی کتابوں کے لئے فائدہ اٹھانے والی یا ناکاری ہیں اور ایک نیچے آرام طریقے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو سیگنٹ کے نتیجے بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم اس طرح گھنٹوں کی کتابوں کی تعریف کی تعریف کررہے ہیں تاریخیوں کے لئے کہ ان کے کل تفریق کے ذریعہ سے کلیسا کے بارے میں بہترین تفریق کا تحقیق کریں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz soatlar soatlarining qismlarini qismlashga qaramamiz, Latin yoshlarining eng oxirgi sohalar davomida qanday qanday muammolarni ko'rsatadi: murakkab hierarchik muammolalarini ko'rsatadi: murakkab hierarchik muammolari, oʻzgaruvchi tarkibi, gapiradigan tarkiblar yoʻq, gapirish yozuvchilari yoʻq, va ma'lum maʼlumotning chegaralari orasidagi qismlar Biz shunday ko'rsatganimiz, sananing asosiy holati bo'lishi usullari soatlar uchun yetarli emas yoki kitoblar uchun yetarli emas va eng kichkina qiziqni ajratish natijalarini ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz bu yerdagi hierarchik qismlarini o'rganish tarixi davlatlari uchun eng muhimini o'zgartiraymiz, Churcha haqida o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun o'zgarishni o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta đề cập đến việc phân loại các cuốn sách hàng giờ, những bản thảo tôn giáo của thời Trung Cổ cuối cùng, mang đến những vấn đề khó khăn: một cấu trúc rối loạn, nội dung biến thể, các đoạn văn ồn ào không có dấu hiệu tử, và mối liên kết mạnh giữa các phần mà thông tin thời tiết không còn đủ để vẽ ranh giới phân biệt. Chúng tôi cho thấy các phương pháp phân chia hàng đầu tiên là không hiệu quả hoặc vô dụng cho các cuốn sách hàng giờ và đề xuất một phương pháp tham lam từ trên xuống, làm tăng đáng kể kết quả phân chia. Chúng tôi nhấn mạnh tầm quan trọng của sự phân biệt cấp bậc của các cuốn sách hàng giờ cho các sử gia khám phá sự khác biệt lớn đằng sau suy nghĩ về nhà thờ.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия разглеждаме сегментацията на часовете, латинските предани ръкописи от късното Средновековие, които проявяват предизвикателства: сложна йерархична заплетена структура, променливо съдържание, шумни транскрипции без маркери на изречения и силни корелации между секциите, за които актуалната информация вече не е достатъчна за очертаване на граници на сегментацията. Показваме, че основните съвременни методи за сегментация са или неефективни, или неприложими за учебници с часове и предлагаме алчен подход отдолу нагоре, който значително подобрява резултатите от сегментацията. Подчертаваме значението на такава йерархична сегментация на часовете за историците, за да изследват своите всеобхватни различия в основата на концепцията за Църквата.', 'da': 'I denne artikel behandler vi segmenteringen af timebøger, latinske hengivende manuskripter fra senmiddelalderen, der udviser udfordrende spørgsmål: en kompleks hierarkisk indviklet struktur, variabelt indhold, støjende transskriptioner uden sætningsmarkerer og stærke korrelationer mellem sektioner, hvor aktuel information ikke længere er tilstrækkelig til at trække segmenteringsgrænser. Vi viser, at de vigtigste state-of-the-art segmenteringsmetoder enten er ineffektive eller uanvendelige for timebøger og foreslår en bottom-up grådig tilgang, der betydeligt forbedrer segmenteringsresultaterne. Vi understreger vigtigheden af en sådan hierarkisk segmentering af timebøger for historikere at udforske deres overordnede forskelle bag opfattelsen om kirken.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru se obraćamo na segmentaciju knjiga sati, latinskih posvećenih rukopisa kasnih srednjih vijeka, koje pokazuju izazovne pitanja: kompleksna hijerarhička struktura, promjena sadržaja, bukovne transkripcije bez znakova kazne, i jake korelacije između odjela za koje temeljna informacija više nije dovoljna za nacrtanje granica segmentacije. Pokazujemo da su glavne metode segmentacije umjetnosti ili neispravne ili neprihvatljive za knjige sati i predlažemo pohlepni pristup koji značajno poboljšava rezultate segmentacije. Mi naglašavamo važnost takve hijerarhijske segmentacije knjiga sati povijesnika da istražuju njihove široke razlike u temelju koncepcije o crkvi.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel behandelen we de segmentatie van urenboeken, Latijnse devotiemanuscripten uit de late middeleeuwen, die uitdagende vraagstukken vertonen: een complexe hiërarchische verstrengelde structuur, variabele inhoud, luidruchtige transcripties zonder zinnenmarkers en sterke correlaties tussen secties waarvoor actuele informatie niet langer voldoende is om segmentatiegrenzen te trekken. We laten zien dat de belangrijkste state-of-the-art segmentatiemethoden inefficiënt of niet toepasbaar zijn voor urenboeken en stellen een bottom-up hebzuchtige aanpak voor die de segmentatieresultaten aanzienlijk verbetert. We benadrukken het belang van een dergelijke hiërarchische segmentatie van urenboeken voor historici om hun overkoepelende verschillen die ten grondslag liggen aan de opvatting over Kerk te onderzoeken.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengatasi segmen buku jam, manuskrip dedikasi Latin dari zaman tengah, yang menunjukkan masalah yang menantang: struktur terhubung hierarkis kompleks, konten variabel, transkripsi bising tanpa penanda kalimat, dan korelasi kuat antara bagian yang informasi topik tidak lagi cukup untuk menggambar batas segmen. Kami menunjukkan bahwa metode segmentasi utama yang terbaik baik tidak efisien atau tidak dapat dilaksanakan untuk buku-buku jam dan menyarankan pendekatan serakah bawah-atas yang konsideratif meningkatkan hasil segmentasi. Kami menekankan penting dari segmen hierarkis seperti buku-buku jam untuk para sejarah untuk mengeksplorasi perbedaan mereka yang mendasarkan konsepsi tentang Gereja.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschäftigen wir uns mit der Segmentierung von Stundenbüchern, lateinischen Andachtsmanuskripten des Spätmittelalters, die herausfordernde Fragestellungen aufwerfen: eine komplexe hierarchische Verschränkung, variable Inhalte, laute Transkriptionen ohne Satzmarker und starke Korrelationen zwischen Sektionen, für die aktuelle Informationen nicht mehr ausreichen, um Segmentierungsgrenzen zu ziehen. Wir zeigen, dass die wichtigsten modernen Segmentierungsmethoden entweder ineffizient oder für Stundenbücher nicht anwendbar sind und schlagen einen Bottom-up Giery Ansatz vor, der die Segmentierungsergebnisse erheblich verbessert. Wir betonen die Bedeutung einer solchen hierarchischen Segmentierung von Stundenbüchern für Historiker, um ihre übergreifenden Unterschiede zu erforschen, die der Konzeption der Kirche zugrunde liegen.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 중세 말기 라틴 종교 원고인 의 단락 문제를 토론했다. 이런 원고는 도전적인 문제를 나타냈다. 복잡한 층층이 얽혀 있는 구조, 변할 수 있는 내용, 문장이 표시되지 않은 시끄러운 사본, 그리고 장절 간의 강한 관련성이다. 이런 장절에 대해 주제 정보는 단락의 경계를 그리기에 충분하지 않다.우리는 기존의 주요 분할 방법이 효율이 낮거나 시간책에 적합하지 않다는 것을 증명하고 아래에서 위로 올라가는 탐욕스러운 방법을 제시하여 분할 결과를 크게 향상시켰다.우리는 역사학자들에게 시간책에 대한 등급 구분의 중요성을 강조하여 그들이 교회 개념에 대한 근본적인 차이를 탐색한다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia utofauti wa vitabu vya masaa kadhaa, manuscript za utulivu wa Kilatini za miaka ya mwisho ya Kati, ambazo vinaonyesha changamoto: muundo mkali unaoendelea, maudhui mabadiliko, vifaa vya sauti ambavyo havina alama za hukumu, na mahusiano makubwa kati ya sekta ambazo taarifa za mada haitoshi kuvuta mipaka ya jinsia. Tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu muhimu za kujitenga kwa sanaa zinazotokana na hali halisi au hazina nafasi kwa ajili ya vitabu vya masaa na tunapendekeza mbinu za uchumi wa chini ambazo zinaongezea matokeo ya mchanganyiko. Tunazisisitiza umuhimu wa kuandika kwa masaa kadhaa kwa ajili ya historia kutafuta tofauti zao za utafiti zinazohusu Kanisa.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما به بخش کتابهای ساعت، دستورالعمل ویژه لاتین از اخیر عصر متوسط صحبت می کنیم که مشکلات سختی را نشان می دهند: یک ساختار مختلف پیچیده شده، محتوای متغیر، ترجمه\u200cهای صوتی بدون نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cهای جمله، و ارتباطات قوی بین بخش\u200cهایی که اطلاعات موضوع برای کشیدن مرزهای بخش دیگر کافی نیست. ما نشان می دهیم که روش جدایی اصلی هنر یا برای کتاب های ساعت بی\u200cفایده یا قابل کاری نیستند و پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم یک روش آرامشی پایین بالا که نتیجه جدایی را بسیار بیشتر می\u200cدهد. ما مهم این قطعه\u200cای از کتاب\u200cهای ساعت\u200cها را برای تاریخیان تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که تفاوت\u200cهای زیادی آنها را درباره کلیسا تحقیق کنند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz sagatlaryň segmentasyny, Orta asyrlaryň soňky esaslaryň ilatynyň eserlerini çözýän meseleleri görkeýäris: bir karmaşık hiyerarşik bölegi, üýtgeşik mahalli, sözlem işaretleyicileri ýok bolan güýçli terjimeleri we meýilleşdirmek üçin meýilleşdirmek üçin meýilleşdirýän bölgeler arasynda güýçli terjimeleri görkeýäris. Biz sanat segmentasiýasynyň esasy ýagdaýynyň üýtgetmeli ýa sagatlaryň kitaplary üçin ýetersiz däldir we segmentasiýanyň netijelerini örän köpräk bolup ýok bir ýagdaýy teklip edýäris. Biz Taryhçylar üçin bu ýaly hijerarşik bölümleriniň wajyplygyny ybadathanyň düşünmesinde meňzeşliklerini gözlemek üçin guruldyk.', 'am': 'በዚህ ጽሑፍ፣ የቀድሞው መካከለኛው ዕድሜ የመካከለኛው ዕድሜ የመጀመሪያውን የታዘጋጅነት ጽሑፎች፣ የጥላቻ መሠረት፣ የተለየ ውጤት፣ የድምፅ ጽሑፎች፣ ለፍርድ ማረፊያ የሌለበት የድምፅ ጽሑፎች እና በተጨማሪ ግንኙነት፣ ለዚህም የውይይይት መረጃ ዳርቻን ለመቀላቀል አይበቃም፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የ-የ-አርላዊ ግንኙነት ልማድ ቢጠቅመው ወይም ለሰዓት ሰዓት መጻሕፍት አይጠቅሙም እናም የግንኙነቱን ፍጥረት ያበዛል፡፡ We stress the importance of such hierarchical segmentation of books of hours for historians to explore their overarching differences underlying conception about Church.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë segmentimin e librave të orëve, dorëshkrimet e përkushtimit latin të epokës së mesme të fundit, që ekspozojnë çështje sfiduese: një strukturë komplekse hierarkike të ngatërruar, përmbajtje të ndryshme, transkrime zhurmëshme pa shenja fjalësh dhe korrelacione të forta midis seksioneve për të cilat informacioni aktual nuk është më i mjaftueshëm për të vizatuar kufijtë e segmentimit. We show that the main state-of-the-art segmentation methods are either inefficient or inapplicable for books of hours and propose a bottom-up greedy approach that considerably enhances the segmentation results.  Ne theksojmë rëndësinë e një segmentimi të tillë hierarkik të librave të orëve për historianët për të eksploruar dallimet e tyre të përgjithshme në bazë të konceptimit rreth Kishës.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք քննարկում ենք ժամերի գրքերի սեգմետրացիաները, լատիներեն նվիրատվական ձեռագրերը վերջին միջին դարում, որոնք ցույց են տալիս դժվար խնդիրներ. բարդ հիերարխիկ խառնված կառուցվածք, փոփոխական պարունակություն, աղմկոտ հաղորդակցություններ առանց նախադասությունների նշանների և ուժեղ հաղորդակցություններ հատվածների միջև, որոնց թեմա Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ամենահետաքրքիր սեգմետրացիայի մեթոդները կամ անարդյունավետ են, կամ անկիրառելի ժամերի գրքերի համար, և առաջարկում են ներքև վեր գաղտնի մոտեցում, որը նշանակալի բարելավում է սեգմետրացիայի արդյունքները: Մենք շեշտում ենք ժամերի գրքերի այդպիսի հիերարխիկ սեգմետրացիայի կարևորությունը պատմաբանների համար, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրեն իրենց գլխավոր տարբերությունները, որոնք հիմնված են եկեղեցության մասին:', 'af': "In hierdie papier, adres ons die segmentasie van uur boeke, Latynse besonderhede manuskripte van die laat Middelste Ages, wat uitbied die vanskelige probleme: â\x80\x99n kompleks hierarkies aangehandel struktuur, veranderlike inhoud, geluide transkripte met geen setmerkers nie, en sterke korrelasies tussen seksies waarvan onderwerp inligting nie meer genoeg is om segmentasie grense te teken nie. Ons wys dat die hoofstate-of-the-art segmentasie metodes is of oneffisief of ontoepasbaar vir boeke van uur en voorstel 'n onderkant groet toegang wat aansienlik die segmentasie resultate verbeter. Ons strek die belangrikheid van sodanige hierarkies segmentasie van uur boeke vir historiërs om hul oorsaaklike verskille ondersteunde konseptasie oor die Kirk te ondersoek.", 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪtda, saatlar arasńĪndakńĪ kitablarńĪn segmentasiyasńĪnńĪ, Orta YńĪllarńĪn sonlarńĪndakńĪ Latinci m…ôrh…ôm…ôtli …ôlav…ôl…ôrini, √ß…ôtin m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri g√∂st…ôrir: kompleks hiyerarŇüik qurulmuŇü struktur, d…ôyiŇüiklik m…ôlumatńĪ, c√ľml…ôl…ôr iŇüaret√ßil…ôri olmayan s…ôsl transkriptl…ôrini v…ô m…ôlumat m…ôlumatńĪ arasńĪndakńĪ d…ôyiŇüiklik bańülantńĪlarńĪ artńĪq segmentasyon sńĪnńĪrlarńĪnńĪ √ßizm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn yet…ôr. Biz g√∂st…ôririk ki, sanat segmentasyonu t…ôrzl…ôrinin …ôn b√∂y√ľk t…ôrzl…ôrinin s…ôviyy…ôti s…ôviyy…ôtl…ôrini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq v…ô ya saatlar kitablarńĪna uyńüunlaŇüdńĪrmaq m√ľmk√ľn deyildir. Biz tarix√ßil…ôrin kilisesi bar…ôsind…ô anlaŇüńĪlan m√ľxt…ôlif f…ôrql…ôrini keŇüfetm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn bu hiyerarŇüik s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrinin vacib…ôtini t…ôsdiq edirik.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru se obraćamo na segmentaciju knjiga sati, latinskih posvećenih rukopisa poslednjih srednjih vijeka, koji pokazuju izazovne probleme: kompleksna hijerarhička struktura, varijačni sadržaj, bukovne transkripcije bez znakova kazne, i jake korelacije između sekcija za koje temeljna informacija više nije dovoljna za nacrtanje granica segmentacije. Pokazujemo da su glavne metode segmentacije umjetnosti ili neefektivne ili neprikladne za knjige sati i predlažemo pohlepni pristup koji značajno poboljšava rezultate segmentacije. Mi naglašavamo važnost takvih hijerarhijskih segmentacija knjiga sati istoričara da istražuju njihove široke razlike u temelju koncepcije o crkvi.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ঘন্টার বিভিন্ন ঘন্টার বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয়গুলোর বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয়গুলোর বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের কথা বলি, ল্যাটিনের প্রাকৃতিক প্রতিষ্ঠান, যা চ্যালেঞ্জের বিষয়গুলো প্রদর্শন করে:  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শিল্পের প্রধান রাষ্ট্রের প্রধান বিভাগের মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভাগের মাধ্যমে যথেষ্ট অথবা ঘন্টার সময়ের জন্য অনুপস্থিতি ন আমরা চার্চ সম্পর্কে তাদের প্রধান ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme segmentací hodinových knih, latinských oddaných rukopisů pozdního středověku, které vykazují náročné problémy: složitou hierarchickou zapletenou strukturu, variabilní obsah, hlučné přepisy bez značek vět a silnou korelaci mezi sekcemi, pro které aktuální informace již nestačí k vytvoření segmentačních hranic. Ukazujeme, že hlavní moderní metody segmentace jsou buď neefektivní nebo nepoužitelné pro hodinové knihy a navrhujeme zdola nahoru chamtivý přístup, který výrazně zlepšuje výsledky segmentace. Zdůrazňujeme důležitost takové hierarchické segmentace hodinových knih pro historiky k prozkoumání jejich zastřešujících rozdílů základních pojetí církve.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös käsitleme tundide raamatute segmenteerimist, hilise keskaja ladina pühendunud käsikirju, millel on keerulised küsimused: keeruline hierarhiline segunenud struktuur, muutuv sisu, mürakad transkriptsioonid ilma lausemärkideta ning tugevad korrelatsioonid sektsioonide vahel, mille kohta aktuaalne informatsioon ei ole enam segmenteerimispiiride joonistamiseks piisav. Näitame, et peamised kaasaegsed segmenteerimismeetodid on kas ebatõhusad või kohaldamatud tunniraamatute puhul ning pakume välja alt üles ahne lähenemisviis, mis oluliselt parandab segmenteerimistulemusi. Rõhutame, kui tähtis on selline hierarhiline tundide raamatute segmenteerimine ajaloolastele, et uurida nende üldisi erinevusi, mis põhinevad Kiriku kontseptsioonil.', 'ca': "In this paper, we address the segmentation of books of hours, Latin devotional manuscripts of the late Middle Ages, that exhibit challenging issues: a complex hierarchical entangled structure, variable content, noisy transcriptions with no sentence markers, and strong correlations between sections for which topical information is no longer sufficient to draw segmentation boundaries.  Mostrem que els mètodes de segmentació més avançats són ineficients o inapplicables per llibres d'hores i proposem un enfocament de baix a dalt que millora considerablement els resultats de segmentació. Destacem l'importància d'aquesta segmentació jeràrquica de llibres d'hores per als historiadors per explorar les seves diferències generals subjacents a la concepció sobre l'Iglesia.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään tuntikirjojen segmentointia, myöhäisen keskiajan latinankielisiä antaumuksellisia käsikirjoituksia, joissa on haastavia kysymyksiä: monimutkainen hierarkkinen kietoutunut rakenne, vaihteleva sisältö, meluisat transkriptiot ilman lausemerkkejä ja vahvat korrelaatiot osioiden välillä, joille ajankohtainen tieto ei enää riitä segmentointirajojen piirtämiseen. Osoitamme, että tärkeimmät nykyaikaiset segmentointimenetelmät ovat joko tehottomia tai käyttökelvottomia tuntikirjoihin ja ehdotamme alhaalta ylöspäin suuntautuvaa ahneutta lähestymistapaa, joka parantaa segmentointituloksia huomattavasti. Korostamme tällaisen tuntikirjojen hierarkkisen segmentoinnin tärkeyttä historioitsijoille tutkia niiden yleisiä eroja kirkon käsitteen taustalla.', 'sk': 'V prispevku obravnavamo segmentacijo urah, latinskih predanih rokopisov poznega srednjega veka, ki kažejo zahtevna vprašanja: kompleksno hierarhično zapleteno strukturo, spremenljivo vsebino, hrupne transkripcije brez označevalcev stavkov in močne korelacije med odseki, za katere aktualne informacije niso več zadostne za risanje segmentacijskih mej. Pokazali smo, da so glavne najsodobnejše metode segmentacije bodisi neučinkovite ali neuporabne za knjige ur, in predlagali pohlepen pristop od spodaj navzgor, ki bistveno povečuje rezultate segmentacije. Poudarjamo pomen takšne hierarhične segmentacije ur za zgodovinarje, da raziščejo njihove splošne razlike, ki temeljijo na konceptu Cerkve.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya rabannin littattafai masu tsari cikin masakiyar daidai, da manuscriptun masu tsari na ƙarƙashin Agreen da aka ƙara tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin da aka ƙara, wanda ke nuna masu walau: wata murakkali na haɗi da matsayin hierrchical, da mai musamman, da littafin sauri wanda bai da alama ba, da kuma mazauni mai ƙarfi a tsakanin ƙungiyõyi wanda ma'anar da za'a ba da isa isa isa isa ba ga kuɓutar Tuna nũna muhimmin halin-da-sanar ko kuma ma'abũcin marubuci ne ko kuma ba da buƙata ba ga littattafai na masakiyar sa'an nan kuma munã buƙata wata hanyoyi bakin-bakin-bakin-dama wanda ke ƙara fassaran rabo. Tuna ƙara wa muhimmin da za'a samun littattafan wannan hierkirki na littattafan daidai ga historiyan ko dõmin su nẽmi rabon gaura masu sarki a bakin kafin.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מתייחסים לחלק של ספרים של שעות, כתבי יד מסורים לטיניים של עידן התיכון המאוחר, שמוצגים בעיות מאתגרות: מבנה מורכב היררכי מעורב, תוכן משתנה, תוצאות רעשות ללא סימני משפטים, וקשר חזק בין חלקים שבהם מידע נושאי אינו מספיק יותר כדי לצייר גבולות סגמנות. אנחנו מראים ששיטות התחלוקת המדינה העיקרית הן או לא יעילות או בלתי אפשריות לספרים של שעות ולהציע גישה חמדנית מלמטה למעלה שמשפכת את תוצאות התחלוקת באופן משמעותי. אנחנו מתייחסים לחשוב של התחלוקת הייררכית כזו של ספרים של שעות עבור ההיסטוריקאים כדי לחקור את ההבדלים העיקריים שלהם בסיסית הרעיון על הכנסייה.', 'bo': 'In this paper, we address the segmentation of books of hours, Latin devotional manuscripts of the late Middle Ages, that exhibit challenging issues: a complex hierarchical entangled structure, variable content, noisy transcriptions with no sentence markers, and strong correlations between sections for which topical information is no longer sufficient to draw segmentation boundaries. We show that the main state-of-the-art segmentation methods are either inefficient or inapplicable for books of hours and propose a bottom-up greedy approach that considerably enhances the segmentation results. ང་ཚོས་ལོ་རྒྱུས་པོ་ཚོའི་དུས་བཀོད་ཆེན་གྱི་དབུས་རྩལ་ཆེན་དག་གི་ཡིག་རྩལ་ཆོས་སྐྱེན་དང་། ལོ་རྒྱུས་སྐོར་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང', 'jv': 'section bookmark Awak dhéwé éngari perkaraan sing dikarepaké hukum akeh pisan kanggo ngerasah basa dadi iki dadi kanggo ngelambah kuwi masalah sing paling apik dhéwé'}
{'en': 'Are We Ready for this Disaster? Towards Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'ar': 'هل نحن جاهزون لهذه الكارثة؟ نحو التعرف على الموقع من تغريدات الأزمة', 'fr': 'Sommes-nous prêts à faire face à cette catastrophe\xa0? Vers la reconnaissance des mentions géographiques dans les tweets de crise', 'pt': 'Estamos preparados para este desastre? Rumo ao reconhecimento de menção de localização de tweets de crise', 'es': '¿Estamos preparados para este desastre? Hacia el reconocimiento de menciones de ubicación en tuits', 'ja': 'この災害の準備はできていますか？危機ツイートからの位置情報認識に向けて', 'ru': 'Готовы ли мы к этой катастрофе? На пути к распознаванию местоположения упоминания из кризисных твитов', 'zh': '我们准备好迎接这场灾祸吗? 自危机推文位及识别', 'hi': 'क्या हम इस आपदा के लिए तैयार हैं? संकट Tweets से स्थान उल्लेख मान्यता की ओर', 'ga': 'An bhfuilimid Réidh don Tubaiste seo? I dTreo Aitheantas Suímh ó Crisis Tweets', 'ka': 'დჲრჲგთ ლთ ჟმვ ჱა ჲგჲ£ ევჟრვპ? კრისისის Tweets', 'hu': 'Készen állunk erre a katasztrófára? Towards Location Említés felismerése a válság tweetekből', 'el': 'Είμαστε έτοιμοι για αυτή την καταστροφή; Προς την αναγνώριση αναφορών τοποθεσίας από τα tweets κρίσης', 'it': 'Siamo pronti per questo disastro? Verso il riconoscimento della menzione della località dai tweets di crisi', 'mk': 'Дали сме подготвени за оваа катастрофа? Towards Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'kk': 'Бұл бейбір үшін дайын ма? Орналасу мәзірінің түсініктемесіне қарау', 'ms': 'Adakah Kami sedia untuk bencana ini? Towards Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'mn': 'Бид энэ аймшигт бэлэн үү? Орчин газрын санааны санааг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх', 'ml': 'ഈ വിപത്തിന് തയ്യാറാണോ? പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മുകളിലേക്കുള്ള സ്ഥാന മെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'lt': 'Ar esame pasirengę šiai nelaimei? Vietos paminėjimo pripažinimas iš krizės tweetų', 'no': 'Er vi klar for denne katastrofen? Til adressmenyen gjenkjenning frå Crisis Tweets', 'pl': 'Jesteśmy gotowi na tę katastrofę? W kierunku rozpoznawania lokalizacji z tweetów kryzysowych', 'sr': 'Jesmo li spremni za ovu katastrofu? Prema priznanju razmišljanja o lokaciji krize Tweets', 'ro': 'Suntem gata pentru acest dezastru? Recunoașterea mențiunii de locație din tweeturile de criză', 'si': 'අපි ලෑස්තිද මේ අනතුරට? Crisis Tweets', 'ta': 'Are We Ready for this Disaster?  சிக்கல் குறிப்புகளிலிருந்து மேலே இடத்தில் இருந்து குறிப்பிடுதல் அடையாளம்', 'sv': 'Är vi redo för katastrofen? Mot plats omnämning erkännande från kristweets', 'so': 'Ma Dhibaatadana ma diyaar baa? Aqoonsashada daryeelka degmada waxaad ka heleysaa Tweetka xasaradaha', 'ur': 'کیا ہم اس مصیبت کے لئے تیار ہیں؟ Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'mt': 'Aħna lesti għal din id-Diżastru? Towards Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'uz': 'Улар азобни тайёрлаб кўрувчиларми? Name', 'vi': 'Ta đã sẵn sàng cho thảm họa này chưa? Hướng tới địa điểm Nhận dạng khủng hoảng trong Tweet', 'bg': 'Готови ли сме за това бедствие? Към разпознаване на споменаването на местоположението от кризисни туитове', 'nl': 'Zijn we klaar voor deze ramp? Naar herkenning van locatiegegevens vanuit Crisis Tweets', 'da': 'Er vi klar til denne katastrofe? På vej mod placering Nævnelse Anerkendelse fra krisetweets', 'hr': 'Jesmo li spremni za ovu katastrofu? Prema priznanju sjećanja lokacije iz Crisis Tweets-a', 'de': 'Sind wir bereit für dieses Desaster? Auf dem Weg zur Anerkennung von Standorterwähnungen aus Krisen-Tweets', 'id': 'Apakah Kami siap untuk bencana ini? Towards Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'fa': 'آماده ايم براي اين آسيب؟ به سمت شناسایی یادآوری موقعیت از ترتیب کریسیس', 'sw': 'Are We Ready for this Disaster?  Tambulisho la Kumbukumbu Zinazoelekea kwenye Twita za Mgogoro', 'af': 'Is ons gereed vir hierdie Disaster? Gaan na Ligging Besigtiging Herkenning van Crisis Tweets', 'tr': 'Biz bu kynçylyk üçin taýýarmy? Ýery Aňlap Taýýarlama', 'sq': 'Are We Ready for this Disaster?  Në drejtim të njohjes së përmendimit të vendit nga Twitter krizës', 'am': 'ለዚህ ጉዳት ተዘጋጅተናልን? ቦታ', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք մենք պատրաստ ենք այս աղետին: Գնալով դեպի տեղափոխությունը, ճգնաժամի թվիթերից հայտնաբերելը', 'az': 'Biz bu fəsad üçün hazır mıyıq? Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'bn': 'আমরা কি এই বিপর্যয়ের জন্য প্রস্তুত? সমস্যার টুইট থেকে স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করা অবস্থানের মেনু সংক্রান্ত টুইট থেকে', 'bs': 'Jesmo li spremni za ovu katastrofu? Prema priznanju sjećanja lokacije iz krize Tweets', 'ca': 'Estem preparats per aquest desastre? Vers el reconeixement de la menció de la localització a partir de Tweets de Crisis', 'ko': '우리는 이 재난에 직면할 준비가 되었습니까?위기 추문에서 위치 언급 인정 받기', 'cs': 'Jsme připraveni na tuhle katastrofu? K uznání zmínek o místě z krizových tweetů', 'et': 'Kas me oleme selleks katastroofiks valmis? Asukohamääramise tunnustamise suunas kriisitweetides', 'fi': 'Olemmeko valmiita tähän katastrofiin? Kohti sijaintimainintojen tunnistamista kriisitwiitteistä', 'sk': 'Smo pripravljeni na to katastrofo? Za prepoznavanje lokacijskih omejitev iz kriznih tweetov', 'ha': 'Shin, Mũ ne ke iya sauƙaƙewa ga wannan? Towards Location Mention Recognition from Crisis Tweets', 'he': 'אנחנו מוכנים לאסון הזה? לכיוון המיקום זיהוי הזכרות מתוך טוויטס משבר', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé wis arep kanggo dikoleh iki? ProgressBarsLocation, $date', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཟུར་བ་འདི་ལ་གྲ་སྒྲིག་ཡིན་ནམ། Crisis Tweets ་ལས་གནས་ཡུལ་འདེམས་རྟགས་དང་ཤེས་མཁན'}
{'en': 'The widespread usage of Twitter during emergencies has provided a new opportunity and timely resource to crisis responders for various disaster management tasks. Geolocation information of pertinent tweets is crucial for gaining situational awareness and delivering aid. However, the majority of tweets do not come with geoinformation. In this work, we focus on the task of location mention recognition from crisis-related tweets. Specifically, we investigate the influence of different types of labeled training data on the performance of a BERT-based classification model. We explore several training settings such as combing in- and out-domain data from news articles and general-purpose and crisis-related tweets. Furthermore, we investigate the effect of geospatial proximity while training on near or far-away events from the target event. Using five different datasets, our extensive experiments provide answers to several critical research questions that are useful for the research community to foster research in this important direction. For example, results show that, for training a location mention recognition model, Twitter-based data is preferred over general-purpose data ; and crisis-related data is preferred over general-purpose Twitter data. Furthermore, training on data from geographically-nearby disaster events to the target event boosts the performance compared to training on distant events.', 'ar': 'لقد أتاح الاستخدام الواسع النطاق لتويتر أثناء حالات الطوارئ فرصة جديدة وموردًا في الوقت المناسب للمستجيبين للأزمات لمختلف مهام إدارة الكوارث. معلومات تحديد الموقع الجغرافي للتغريدات ذات الصلة أمر بالغ الأهمية لاكتساب الوعي بالموقف وتقديم المساعدة. ومع ذلك ، فإن غالبية التغريدات لا تأتي مع معلومات جغرافية. في هذا العمل ، نركز على مهمة تحديد الموقع بذكر التعرف على التغريدات المتعلقة بالأزمة. على وجه التحديد ، نحن نحقق في تأثير أنواع مختلفة من بيانات التدريب المسمى على أداء نموذج التصنيف القائم على BERT. نستكشف العديد من إعدادات التدريب مثل دمج بيانات المجال الداخلي والخارجي من المقالات الإخبارية والتغريدات ذات الأغراض العامة والتغريدات المتعلقة بالأزمات. علاوة على ذلك ، نحن نحقق في تأثير القرب الجغرافي المكاني أثناء التدريب على الأحداث القريبة أو البعيدة عن الحدث المستهدف. باستخدام خمس مجموعات بيانات مختلفة ، توفر تجاربنا المكثفة إجابات للعديد من أسئلة البحث الهامة التي تفيد مجتمع البحث لتعزيز البحث في هذا الاتجاه المهم. على سبيل المثال ، تُظهر النتائج أنه ، لتدريب نموذج التعرف على ذكر الموقع ، تُفضل البيانات المستندة إلى Twitter على البيانات ذات الأغراض العامة ؛ والبيانات المتعلقة بالأزمات مفضلة على بيانات Twitter العامة. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن التدريب على البيانات من أحداث الكوارث القريبة جغرافيًا إلى الحدث المستهدف يعزز الأداء مقارنة بالتدريب على الأحداث البعيدة.', 'es': 'El uso generalizado de Twitter durante las emergencias ha brindado una nueva oportunidad y un recurso oportuno a los socorristas para diversas tareas de gestión de desastres. La información de geolocalización de los tuits pertinentes es crucial para obtener conciencia situacional y brindar ayuda. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los tuits no incluyen geoinformación. En este trabajo, nos centramos en la tarea de reconocimiento de menciones de ubicación de tuits relacionados con crisis. Específicamente, investigamos la influencia de diferentes tipos de datos de entrenamiento etiquetados en el rendimiento de un modelo de clasificación basado en BERT. Exploramos varios entornos de capacitación, como la combinación de datos dentro y fuera del dominio de artículos de noticias y tuits de propósito general y relacionados con la crisis. Además, investigamos el efecto de la proximidad geoespacial mientras entrenamos en eventos cercanos o lejanos del evento objetivo. Utilizando cinco conjuntos de datos diferentes, nuestros extensos experimentos proporcionan respuestas a varias preguntas críticas de investigación que son útiles para que la comunidad investigadora fomente la investigación en esta importante dirección. Por ejemplo, los resultados muestran que, para entrenar un modelo de reconocimiento de menciones de ubicación, se prefieren los datos basados en Twitter a los datos de uso general; y los datos relacionados con crisis se prefieren a los datos de Twitter de uso general. Además, la capacitación en datos de eventos de desastres geográficamente cercanos al evento objetivo aumenta el rendimiento en comparación con la capacitación en eventos distantes.', 'pt': 'O uso generalizado do Twitter durante emergências forneceu uma nova oportunidade e um recurso oportuno para as equipes de resposta a crises para várias tarefas de gerenciamento de desastres. As informações de geolocalização de tweets pertinentes são cruciais para obter consciência situacional e fornecer ajuda. No entanto, a maioria dos tweets não vem com geoinformação. Neste trabalho, focamos na tarefa de reconhecimento de menção de localização a partir de tweets relacionados a crises. Especificamente, investigamos a influência de diferentes tipos de dados de treinamento rotulados no desempenho de um modelo de classificação baseado em BERT. Exploramos várias configurações de treinamento, como combinar dados dentro e fora do domínio de artigos de notícias e tweets de propósito geral e relacionados a crises. Além disso, investigamos o efeito da proximidade geoespacial durante o treinamento em eventos próximos ou distantes do evento alvo. Usando cinco conjuntos de dados diferentes, nossos extensos experimentos fornecem respostas a várias questões críticas de pesquisa que são úteis para a comunidade de pesquisa promover pesquisas nessa importante direção. Por exemplo, os resultados mostram que, para treinar um modelo de reconhecimento de menção de localização, os dados baseados no Twitter são preferidos aos dados de uso geral; e os dados relacionados a crises são preferidos aos dados de propósito geral do Twitter. Além disso, o treinamento em dados de eventos de desastre geograficamente próximos ao evento alvo aumenta o desempenho em comparação com o treinamento em eventos distantes.', 'fr': "L'utilisation généralisée de Twitter pendant les situations d'urgence a fourni une nouvelle opportunité et une ressource opportune aux intervenants en cas de crise pour diverses tâches de gestion des catastrophes. Les informations de géolocalisation des tweets pertinents sont essentielles pour acquérir une conscience situationnelle et fournir de l'aide. Cependant, la majorité des tweets ne contiennent pas de géo-information. Dans ce travail, nous nous concentrons sur la tâche de reconnaissance des mentions de localisation dans les tweets liés à la crise. Plus précisément, nous étudions l'influence de différents types de données d'entraînement étiquetées sur les performances d'un modèle de classification basé sur BERT. Nous explorons plusieurs paramètres de formation tels que la combinaison des données internes et externes provenant d'articles de presse et de tweets généraux et liés à la crise. En outre, nous étudions l'effet de la proximité géospatiale lors de l'entraînement sur des événements proches ou éloignés de l'événement cible. À l'aide de cinq ensembles de données différents, nos expériences approfondies fournissent des réponses à plusieurs questions de recherche critiques qui sont utiles à la communauté des chercheurs pour favoriser la recherche dans cette direction importante. Par exemple, les résultats montrent que, pour la formation d'un modèle de reconnaissance des mentions géographiques, les données basées sur Twitter sont préférées aux données générales\xa0; et les données liées à la crise sont préférées aux données Twitter générales. En outre, la formation sur les données provenant d'événements de catastrophe géographiquement proches jusqu'à l'événement cible améliore les performances par rapport à la formation sur des événements distants.", 'ja': '緊急時にTwitterが広く使用されることで、さまざまな災害管理タスクのための新しい機会とタイムリーなリソースが危機対応者に提供されました。 関連するツイートの地理的位置情報は、状況認識を獲得し、支援を提供するために重要です。 しかし、ツイートの大半には地理情報が付属していません。 本作では、危機関連のツイートから位置認識に言及する作業に焦点を当てています。 具体的には、BERTベースの分類モデルのパフォーマンスに対する異なるタイプのラベル付けされたトレーニングデータの影響を調査します。 私たちは、ニュース記事や汎用および危機関連のツイートからドメイン内およびドメイン外のデータをまとめるなど、いくつかのトレーニング設定を探ります。 さらに、対象事象からの近距離または遠距離の事象について訓練しながら、地理空間的近接性の影響を調査する。 5つの異なるデータセットを使用して、当社の広範な実験は、この重要な方向への研究を促進するために研究コミュニティに役立ついくつかの重要な研究質問への回答を提供します。 例えば、位置言及認識モデルのトレーニングでは、汎用データよりもTwitterベースのデータが優先され、汎用データよりも危機関連のデータが優先されることが示されている。 さらに、地理的に近い災害事象から対象事象までのデータに関するトレーニングは、遠隔事象に関するトレーニングと比較してパフォーマンスを向上させる。', 'zh': 'Twitter急者广用为危机,供灾害之新。 相关推文地位信息,于得势感知提供援助至重。 然多推文无地理信息。 于此之事,专注于危机之推文。 论其标数,BERT其类也。 探数培训设,如从新闻文章及通用危机相关推理域内、域外数事。 地理空近近距远。 用五异之数,博实验为数要之研究问题,其于治界甚有用也。 如结果表明,训练之位,先Twitter通用之数; 危机之数,优先通用Twitter数。 此外,比于远事之教,近地之难,教之以性也。', 'ru': 'Широкое использование "Твиттера" в чрезвычайных ситуациях открыло новые возможности и обеспечило своевременный ресурс для тех, кто занимается реагированием на кризисные ситуации, для решения различных задач, связанных с предупреждением и ликвидацией чрезвычайных ситуаций. Информация о геолокации соответствующих твитов имеет решающее значение для получения информации об обстановке и оказания помощи. Однако большинство твитов не приходят с геоинформацией. В этой работе мы фокусируемся на задаче распознавания местоположения упоминания из связанных с кризисом твитов. В частности, мы исследуем влияние различных типов маркированных обучающих данных на эффективность модели классификации на основе BERT. Мы изучаем несколько условий обучения, таких как просмотр внутри и внедоменных данных из новостных статей и сообщений общего назначения и связанных с кризисом твитов. Кроме того, мы изучаем влияние геопространственной близости при обучении близким или отдаленным событиям от целевого события. Используя пять различных наборов данных, наши обширные эксперименты дают ответы на несколько критических исследовательских вопросов, которые полезны для исследовательского сообщества, чтобы стимулировать исследования в этом важном направлении. Например, результаты показывают, что для обучения модели распознавания местоположения данные на базе Twitter предпочтительнее данных общего назначения; и данные, связанные с кризисом, предпочтительнее данных общего назначения на базе Twitter. Кроме того, профессиональная подготовка по вопросам, касающимся данных о бедствиях, происходящих в географически близлежащих районах, до целевого события, позволяет повысить эффективность по сравнению с профессиональной подготовкой по вопросам, касающимся событий, происходящих в отдаленных районах.', 'hi': 'आपात स्थिति के दौरान ट्विटर के व्यापक उपयोग ने विभिन्न आपदा प्रबंधन कार्यों के लिए संकट उत्तरदाताओं को एक नया अवसर और समय पर संसाधन प्रदान किया है। प्रासंगिक tweets की Geolocation जानकारी स्थितिजन्य जागरूकता प्राप्त करने और सहायता प्रदान करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। हालांकि, अधिकांश ट्वीट्स जियोइनफॉर्मेशन के साथ नहीं आते हैं। इस काम में, हम संकट से संबंधित ट्वीट्स से स्थान का उल्लेख मान्यता के कार्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम BERT-आधारित वर्गीकरण मॉडल के प्रदर्शन पर विभिन्न प्रकार के लेबल प्रशिक्षण डेटा के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। हम कई प्रशिक्षण सेटिंग्स का पता लगाते हैं जैसे कि समाचार लेखों और सामान्य उद्देश्य और संकट से संबंधित ट्वीट्स से इन-और-आउट-डोमेन डेटा को कॉम्बिंग करना। इसके अलावा, हम लक्ष्य घटना से निकट या दूर की घटनाओं पर प्रशिक्षण देते समय भू-स्थानिक निकटता के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। पांच अलग-अलग डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हुए, हमारे व्यापक प्रयोग कई महत्वपूर्ण शोध प्रश्नों के उत्तर प्रदान करते हैं जो इस महत्वपूर्ण दिशा में अनुसंधान को बढ़ावा देने के लिए अनुसंधान समुदाय के लिए उपयोगी हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, परिणाम बताते हैं कि, एक स्थान उल्लेख मान्यता मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए, ट्विटर-आधारित डेटा को सामान्य-उद्देश्य डेटा पर पसंद किया जाता है; और संकट से संबंधित डेटा को सामान्य उद्देश्य वाले ट्विटर डेटा पर पसंद किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, लक्ष्य घटना के लिए भौगोलिक रूप से आस-पास की आपदा की घटनाओं से डेटा पर प्रशिक्षण दूर की घटनाओं पर प्रशिक्षण की तुलना में प्रदर्शन को बढ़ाता है।', 'ga': 'Chuir úsáid fhorleathan Twitter le linn éigeandálaí deis nua agus acmhainn thráthúil ar fáil do fhreagróirí géarchéime le haghaidh tascanna éagsúla bainistithe tubaiste. Tá faisnéis gheo-shuíomh na dtvuíteanna ábhartha ríthábhachtach chun feasacht staide a fháil agus chun cúnamh a sheachadadh. Mar sin féin, ní thagann formhór na tweets le geoinformation. Sa obair seo, dírímid ar an tasc a bhaineann le haitheantas lua suímh ó thíteanna a bhaineann le géarchéimeanna. Go sonrach, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an tionchar atá ag cineálacha éagsúla sonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe ar fheidhmíocht samhail aicmithe bunaithe ar BERT. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar roinnt suíomhanna oiliúna ar nós sonraí isteach agus amach as ailt nuachta agus tvuíteanna ginearálta agus géarchéime a chomhcheangal. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an éifeacht a bhíonn ag gaireacht gheospásúil agus sinn ag traenáil ar imeachtaí gar nó i bhfad ar shiúl ón sprioc-imeacht. Trí úsáid a bhaint as cúig thacar sonraí difriúla, soláthraíonn ár dturgnaimh fhairsing freagraí ar roinnt ceisteanna ríthábhachtacha taighde atá úsáideach don phobal taighde chun taighde a chothú sa treo tábhachtach seo. Mar shampla, taispeánann na torthaí gur fearr sonraí bunaithe ar Twitter seachas sonraí ilfhóinteach le haghaidh oiliúint a chur ar mhúnla aitheantais lua suímh; agus is fearr sonraí a bhaineann le géarchéimeanna ná sonraí ginearálta Twitter. Ina theannta sin, treisíonn oiliúint ar shonraí ó thubaiste atá in aice láimhe go geografach go dtí an sprioc-imeacht an fheidhmíocht i gcomparáid le hoiliúint ar imeachtaí i bhfad i gcéin.', 'ka': 'Twittersის გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე ახალი შესაძლებლობა და დრო რესურსი კრიზის რესპორცირებისთვის განსხვავებული კარგალის მართლებისთვის. მნიშვნელოვანი რვიტების გეოლოკაციის ინფორმაცია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სიტაციალური ცნობიერება და დამხმარება. მაგრამ უფრო მეტი ტივიტები ჯეოინფორმაციის შესახებ არ მოდის. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავყენებთ კრიზის შესახებ კონფიკაციის მიღებაზე. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებულ ტიპის განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ BERT-ის კლასიფიკაციის მოდელის შესახებ. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ რამდენიმე განსხვავება, როგორც ახალგაზრულ ანტიკულების და კრიზების შესახებ გარეშე მონაცემების შესახებ. დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ გეოსპაციალური პირობის ეფექტის ეფექტი, როდესაც განსწავლება მიზეზი მოვლენისგან გარეშე ან გარეშე მოვლენისგან. 5 განსხვავებული მონაცემების გამოყენება, ჩვენი განსხვავებული ექსპერიმენტები უფრო კრიტიკური კითხვებისთვის პასუხი, რომლებიც გამოიყენება სწავლობის საზოგადო მაგალითად, შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ სამყარო მონაცემების მოდელის განახლებისთვის, ტვირუტერის დაბათი მონაცემები უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად უფრო მე და კრიზის შესახებ მონაცემები საერთო მიზეზი Twitter-ის მონაცემებზე უფრო მეტია. დამატებით, განსწავლება მონაცემებისთვის გეგოგოლოგიურად დაბრუნებული ბედოტური მოვლენებისთვის მიზემი მოვლენებისთვის გაზრუნება მონაცემებისთვის,', 'hu': 'A Twitter széles körű használata vészhelyzetekben új lehetőséget és időszerű erőforrást biztosított a válságkezelők számára különböző katasztrófakezelési feladatokhoz. A releváns tweetek geolokációs információi kulcsfontosságú a helyzetudatosság megszerzéséhez és a segítségnyújtáshoz. A tweetek többsége azonban nem tartalmaz földrajzi információt. Ebben a munkában a helyszínemlítések felismerésének feladatára összpontosítunk a válsághelyzethez kapcsolódó tweetekből. Konkrétan azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a különböző típusú címkézett edzési adatok milyen hatással vannak a BERT alapú osztályozási modell teljesítményére. Számos képzési beállítást vizsgálunk fel, mint például a hírekből és az általános célú és válsággal kapcsolatos tweetekből származó domain belüli és kívüli adatok fésülése. Továbbá vizsgáljuk a geotérbeli közelség hatását a céleseménytől származó közeli vagy távoli eseményeken végzett edzés során. Öt különböző adatkészlet felhasználásával kiterjedt kísérleteink számos kritikus kutatási kérdésre adnak választ, amelyek hasznosak a kutatóközösség számára abban a fontos irányban történő kutatáshoz. Az eredmények például azt mutatják, hogy egy helymeghatározó felismerési modell képzéséhez a Twitter-alapú adatokat előnyben részesítik az általános célú adatokkal szemben; Az általános célú Twitter-adatokkal szemben előnyben részesítik a válsággal kapcsolatos adatokat. Továbbá a földrajzilag közeli katasztrófaeseményekről a céleseményekre vonatkozó adatokra vonatkozó képzés növeli a teljesítményt a távoli eseményekre vonatkozó képzéshez képest.', 'kk': 'Твиттердің көпшілікті жұмыс істеу кезінде жаңа мүмкіндік мен уақытты ресурс жасады. Твиттердің көпшілікті басқару тапсырмалары үшін көпшілікті бас Твиттердің географиялық мәліметі мәліметі мәліметті жағдайдағы мәліметті түсінуге және көмек беру үшін маңызды. Бірақ tweets көпшілігі геометриялық мәліметтермен келмейді. Бұл жұмыстың көмегімен қатынау тапсырмасына көмектеседі. Біз BERT негіздеген классификациялық үлгісінің істеу үлгісінің әртүрлі түрлерінің әсерін зерттейміз. Біз жаңалық мақалалардан және жалпы мақсаттардан және қиындыққа қатысты tweets тізімінен бірнеше оқыту параметрлерін зерттейміз. Қосымша, мақсатты оқиғадан жақын немесе қашықтағы оқиғаларды оқиға жақын және қашықтағы географиялық жақын қатынасының эффектін зерттейміз. Бес түрлі деректер қорларын қолдану үшін, біздің кеңейтілген тәжірибеміз бұл маңызды бағыттағы зерттеулер үшін зерттеулердің бірнеше нақты зерттеулер сұрақтарына жауаптарын Мысалы, нәтижелер орналасуын анықтау үшін Твиттердің негіздеген деректері жалпы мақсатты деректерден артық болады. жалпы мәліметтер Твиттер деректерінен артық. Қосымша, географиялық жақын бейбіттер оқиғаларының деректерінің оқытуы мақсатты оқиғаларының арасындағы оқиғаларының оқиғаларының қалыпты оқиғаларының са', 'it': "L'uso diffuso di Twitter durante le emergenze ha fornito una nuova opportunità e una risorsa tempestiva per i soccorritori alle crisi per vari compiti di gestione delle catastrofi. Le informazioni sulla geolocalizzazione dei tweet pertinenti sono cruciali per acquisire consapevolezza della situazione e fornire aiuti. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei tweet non viene fornita con geoinformazione. In questo lavoro, ci concentriamo sul compito di riconoscimento delle menzioni location da tweet legati alla crisi. Nello specifico, esaminiamo l'influenza di diversi tipi di dati di allenamento etichettati sulle prestazioni di un modello di classificazione basato su BERT. Esploriamo diverse impostazioni di formazione come la combinazione di dati interni e esterni da articoli di notizie e tweet generali e correlati alle crisi. Inoltre, studiamo l'effetto della prossimità geospaziale durante l'allenamento su eventi vicini o lontani dall'evento target. Utilizzando cinque diversi set di dati, i nostri estesi esperimenti forniscono risposte a diverse domande critiche di ricerca che sono utili per la comunità di ricerca per promuovere la ricerca in questa importante direzione. Ad esempio, i risultati mostrano che, per la formazione di un modello di riconoscimento delle menzioni di località, i dati basati su Twitter sono preferiti rispetto ai dati di uso generale; I dati relativi alle crisi sono preferiti rispetto ai dati Twitter di uso generale. Inoltre, la formazione sui dati provenienti da eventi catastrofici geograficamente vicini all'evento target aumenta le prestazioni rispetto all'allenamento su eventi lontani.", 'mk': 'Широкото искористување на Твитер за време на итни случаи обезбеди нова можност и навремен ресурс за реагентите на кризата за различни задачи за управување со катастрофи. Geolocation information of pertinent tweets is crucial for gaining situational awareness and delivering aid.  Сепак, повеќето твитови не доаѓаат со геоинформации. Во оваа работа, се фокусираме на задачата на локацијата споменува признавање од твитови поврзани со кризата. Специфично, го истражуваме влијанието на различните типови на означени податоци за обука врз успехот на модел на класификација базиран на БЕРТ. Истражуваме неколку услови за обука, како што се комбинацијата на податоци во и надвор од домените од вестите и Твитерите со општи цели и поврзани со кризата. Покрај тоа, го истражуваме ефектот на геоспространската близина додека тренираме за блиски или далеку настани од целниот настан. Користејќи пет различни податоци, нашите експерименти обезбедуваат одговори на неколку критични истражувачки прашања кои се корисни за истражувачката заедница за поттикнување на истражувањето во оваа важна насока. For example, results show that, for training a location mention recognition model, Twitter-based data is preferred over general-purpose data;  и податоците поврзани со кризата се преферирани над податоците на Твитер со општи цели. Покрај тоа, обуката за податоците од географски блиските катастрофални настани до целниот настан ги зголемува резултатите во споредба со обуката за далечните настани.', 'ms': 'Penggunaan Twitter yang luas semasa keadaan kecemasan telah menyediakan peluang baru dan sumber tepat waktu untuk penyelesaian krisis untuk berbagai tugas pengurusan bencana. Geolocation information of pertinent tweets is crucial for gaining situational awareness and delivering aid.  Namun, kebanyakan tweet tidak datang dengan maklumat geo. Dalam kerja ini, kami fokus pada tugas lokasi menyebut pengenalan dari tweet berkaitan dengan krisis. Secara khusus, kami menyelidiki pengaruh jenis yang berbeza data latihan yang ditabel tentang prestasi model klasifikasi berasaskan BERT. Kami mengeksplorasi beberapa tetapan latihan seperti menggabungkan data masuk dan keluar-domain dari artikel berita dan tweet tujuan umum dan berkaitan dengan krisis. Selain itu, kami menyelidiki kesan dekat georuang semasa berlatih pada peristiwa dekat atau jauh dari peristiwa sasaran. Using five different datasets, our extensive experiments provide answers to several critical research questions that are useful for the research community to foster research in this important direction.  For example, results show that, for training a location mention recognition model, Twitter-based data is preferred over general-purpose data;  dan data berkaitan dengan krisis lebih suka daripada data Twitter untuk tujuan umum. Lagipun, latihan pada data dari peristiwa bencana yang terdekat geografik ke peristiwa sasaran meningkatkan prestasi dibandingkan latihan pada peristiwa yang jauh.', 'el': 'Η ευρέως διαδεδομένη χρήση του Twitter κατά τη διάρκεια έκτακτης ανάγκης έχει παράσχει μια νέα ευκαιρία και έγκαιρο πόρο στους υπεύθυνους αντιμετώπισης κρίσεων για διάφορα καθήκοντα διαχείρισης καταστροφών. Οι πληροφορίες γεωεντοπισμού των σχετικών tweets είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για την απόκτηση επίγνωσης της κατάστασης και την παροχή βοήθειας. Ωστόσο, η πλειοψηφία των tweets δεν περιλαμβάνει γεωπληροφορίες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στο έργο της αναγνώρισης αναφορών τοποθεσίας από τα σχετικά με κρίση tweets. Συγκεκριμένα, διερευνούμε την επίδραση διαφορετικών τύπων δεδομένων κατάρτισης με ετικέτα στην απόδοση ενός μοντέλου ταξινόμησης βασισμένου στο BERT. Ερευνούμε διάφορες ρυθμίσεις εκπαίδευσης, όπως η διεύρυνση δεδομένων εντός και εκτός πεδίου από άρθρα ειδήσεων και tweets γενικού σκοπού και κρίσεων. Επιπλέον, διερευνούμε την επίδραση της γεωχωρικής εγγύτητας κατά την εκπαίδευση σε κοντινά ή μακρινά γεγονότα από το στοχευμένο γεγονός. Χρησιμοποιώντας πέντε διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων, τα εκτεταμένα πειράματα μας παρέχουν απαντήσεις σε διάφορα κρίσιμα ερευνητικά ερωτήματα που είναι χρήσιμα για την ερευνητική κοινότητα για να προωθήσει την έρευνα προς αυτή τη σημαντική κατεύθυνση. Για παράδειγμα, τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι, για την εκπαίδευση ενός μοντέλου αναγνώρισης αναφοράς τοποθεσίας, τα δεδομένα που βασίζονται στο Twitter προτιμούνται έναντι των δεδομένων γενικού σκοπού. Τα δεδομένα που σχετίζονται με κρίσεις προτιμούνται έναντι των γενικών δεδομένων του Twitter. Επιπλέον, η εκπαίδευση σε δεδομένα από γεωγραφικά κοντινά συμβάντα καταστροφών στο στόχο αυξάνει την απόδοση σε σύγκριση με την εκπαίδευση σε απομακρυσμένα γεγονότα.', 'mn': 'Твиттерийн шинэ өргөн хэрэглээ гэнэтийн үед шинэ боломж, хугацааны үр дүнд олон гамшгийн удирдлагын ажлын тулд хямралын үр дүнтэй хүмүүст шинэ боломж болох боломжто Харин сонирхолтой tweets-ийн географийн мэдээлэл нөхцөл байдлыг мэдрэх болон тусламжтай хүргэхэд чухал. Гэвч ихэнх tweets нь геоинформацийг авч ирдэггүй. Энэ ажил дээр бид хямрал холбогдолтой tweets-ээс илэрхийлж байгаа газрын ажил дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид БЕРТ-д бий болгон дүрслэлийн загварын үйлдвэрлэлийн тухай өөр төрлийн шинжлэх ухаан өгөгдлийн нөлөөг судалж байна. Бид мэдээллийн баримтууд, ерөнхий зорилго, хямралын холбогдолтой tweets-ээс холбогдох хэдэн дасгал хөтөлбөрийн байгууллагуудыг судалж байна. Дараа нь бид географийн ойролцооны нөлөөг судалж, зорилготой үйл явдлын ойролцоо эсвэл хол зайтай үйл явдлын талаар суралцах юм. Таван өөр өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан бидний олон шинжлэх ухааны туршилтууд судалгааны нийгэмд хэрэгтэй олон чухал судалгааны асуултуудад хариулт өгдөг. Жишээлбэл, үр дүнүүд нь тусламжтайгаар танилцуулах загварыг суралцах үед Твиттерийн үндсэн өгөгдлийн санаа ерөнхий зорилготой өгөгдлийн дээр илүү сонгогдож байна. хямралын холбогдолтой мэдээллийг Твиттерийн ерөнхий зорилготой мэдээллээс илүү сонгогддог. Дараа нь газраас ойрхон гамшгийн үйл явцуудын тухай мэдээллийн сургалт нь зорилготой үйл явцуудын тухай хол үйл явцуудын тухай багш сургалтын тухай ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'lt': 'The widespread usage of Twitter during emergencies has provided a new opportunity and timely resource to crisis responders for various disaster management tasks.  Geolocation information of pertinent tweets is crucial for gaining situational awareness and delivering aid.  Tačiau dauguma tweetų neturi geoinformacijos. In this work, we focus on the task of location mention recognition from crisis-related tweets.  Specifically, we investigate the influence of different types of labeled training data on the performance of a BERT-based classification model.  We explore several training settings such as combing in- and out-domain data from news articles and general-purpose and crisis-related tweets.  Be to, mes tiriame geoerdvinio artumo poveikį mokydami apie artimus ar tolimus įvykius nuo tikslinio įvykio. Naudodami penkis skirtingus duomenų rinkinius, mūsų išsamūs eksperimentai teikia atsakymus į keletą svarbių mokslinių tyrimų klausimų, kurie yra naudingi mokslinių tyrimų bendruomenei skatinant mokslinius tyrimus šioje svarbioje kryptimi. Pavyzdžiui, rezultatai rodo, kad rengiant vietos pripažinimo model į pirmenybė teikiama Twitter duomenims, o ne bendrųjų tikslų duomenims; ir su krize susiję duomenys yra geriausi nei bendrųjų tikslų Twitter duomenys. Be to, rengiant duomenis, gautus iš geografiškai artimų nelaimių įvykių iki tikslinio įvykio, rezultatai didinami, palyginti su mokymu nuotolinių įvykių metu.', 'pl': 'Szerokie korzystanie z Twittera w sytuacjach kryzysowych zapewniło osobom reagującym na kryzysy nową możliwość i terminowe zasoby do realizacji różnych zadań związanych z zarządzaniem klęskami żywiołowymi. Informacje geolokalizacyjne odpowiednich tweetów mają kluczowe znaczenie dla zdobycia świadomości sytuacyjnej i dostarczania pomocy. Jednak większość tweetów nie zawiera geoinformacji. W niniejszej pracy skupiamy się na zadaniu rozpoznawania lokalizacji z tweetów związanych z kryzysem. W szczególności badamy wpływ różnych rodzajów oznakowanych danych treningowych na wydajność modelu klasyfikacyjnego opartego na BERT. Badamy kilka ustawień szkoleniowych, takich jak czesanie danych wewnątrz i poza domeną z artykułów wiadomościowych oraz tweetów ogólnego przeznaczenia i związanych z kryzysem. Ponadto badamy wpływ bliskości geoprzestrzennej podczas treningu na zdarzenia bliskie lub dalekie od zdarzenia docelowego. Korzystając z pięciu różnych zbiorów danych, nasze szerokie eksperymenty dostarczają odpowiedzi na kilka krytycznych pytań badawczych, które są przydatne dla środowiska badawczego, aby wspierać badania w tym ważnym kierunku. Na przykład wyniki pokazują, że w przypadku szkolenia modelu rozpoznawania lokalizacji preferowane są dane oparte na Twitterze niż dane ogólnego przeznaczenia; Dane związane z kryzysem są preferowane niż ogólnodostępne dane Twittera. Ponadto szkolenia na podstawie danych z pobliskich zdarzeń katastrof do zdarzenia docelowego zwiększają wydajność w porównaniu z treningami na zdarzeniach odległych.', 'ro': 'Utilizarea pe scară largă a Twitter în timpul situațiilor de urgență a oferit o nouă oportunitate și resursă oportună pentru responsabilii de criză pentru diverse sarcini de gestionare a dezastrelor. Informațiile privind geolocalizarea tweeturilor pertinente sunt esențiale pentru obținerea conștientizării situației și furnizarea de ajutor. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea tweeturilor nu vin cu geoinformații. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe sarcina recunoașterii mențiunilor de locație din tweet-uri legate de criză. În mod specific, investigăm influența diferitelor tipuri de date de antrenament etichetate asupra performanței unui model de clasificare bazat pe BERT. Explorăm mai multe setări de instruire, cum ar fi combinarea datelor din domeniu și din afara domeniului din articole de știri și tweet-uri de scop general și legate de criză. În plus, investigăm efectul proximității geospațiale în timpul antrenamentului asupra evenimentelor apropiate sau îndepărtate de evenimentul țintă. Folosind cinci seturi de date diferite, experimentele noastre extinse oferă răspunsuri la mai multe întrebări critice de cercetare care sunt utile comunității de cercetare pentru a promova cercetarea în această direcție importantă. De exemplu, rezultatele arată că, pentru formarea unui model de recunoaștere a mențiunilor de locație, datele bazate pe Twitter sunt preferate în detrimentul datelor cu scop general; Datele legate de criză și de criză sunt preferate în detrimentul datelor Twitter cu scop general. Mai mult decât atât, instruirea privind datele de la evenimentele dezastre din apropiere geografică până la evenimentul țintă sporește performanța în comparație cu instruirea privind evenimentele la distanță.', 'sr': 'Širom korištenjem Twitter tokom hitnih slučajeva pružio je novu priliku i vremenski resurs reagovačama krize za različite zadatke za upravljanje katastrofama. Geolokacija informacija o odgovarajućim tweetima je ključna za dobivanje situacijskog svijesti i dostavljanje pomoći. Međutim, većina tweeta ne dolazi sa geoinformacijom. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na zadatak lokacije spomenuti priznanje iz tweta povezanih sa krizom. Posebno, istražujemo uticaj različitih vrsta označenih podataka o obuci na provedbi model a klasifikacije na BERT-u. Istražujemo nekoliko nastava obuke poput borbe podataka iz novinskih članaka i generalne svrhe i tweets povezanih sa krizom. Osim toga, istražujemo učinak geoprostorne bliskosti dok treniramo na blizini ili dalekim događajima od ciljnog događaja. Koristeći pet različitih seta podataka, naši široki eksperimenti pružaju odgovore na nekoliko kritičnih istraživačkih pitanja koje su korisne za istraživačku zajednicu da podrži istraživanje u ovom važnom smjeru. Na primer, rezultati pokazuju da, za obuku model a priznanja lokacije, podaci na tviteru predlažu se iznad općeg cilja podataka; i podaci povezani sa krizom preferiraju se iznad podataka o Twitter-u sa generalnim ciljem. Osim toga, obuka podataka iz geografskih događaja u blizini katastrofa do ciljnog događaja povećava učinkovitost u usporedbi s obukom o dalekim događajima.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙලාවට ට්විටර්ගේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය අවස්ථාවක් සහ වෙලාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය සම්බන්ධ ට්විට්ස් ගැන භූතික තොරතුරු තොරතුරු විශේෂයෙන් ස්ථානය අවධානය සහ උදව් ගන්න. නමුත්, බොහෝ ට්විට් වලින් බොහෝ ජියෝතික තොරතුරු එක්ක එන්නේ නෑ. මේ වැඩේ අපි අවධානය කරන්නේ ස්ථානයේ අවධානය සම්බන්ධයි ටුයිට් වලින් අඳුරගන්න ක්\u200dරියාවට. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා BERT-අධාරිත පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේලයේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් ලේබල් කරප අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විදිහට ප්\u200dරධාන සැකසුම් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බ ඉතින්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ජෝයාස්පේසියල් සම්බන්ධතාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ ඉලක්ෂණයෙන් ඉඳ වෙනස් දත්ත සැට් පහක් භාවිතා කරනවා, අපේ විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙනවා මේ වැදගත් ප්\u200dර උදාහරණයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, ස්ථානයක් කියන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තියෙන්න, ට්විටර් අධ සමහරවිට සම්බන්ධ දත්ත තියෙන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය අරමුණු ට්විටර් දත්ත වලට. ඉතින්, භූතික විද්\u200dයාවික විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා දත්ත ගැන ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ඉලක්ක අවස්ථානය සඳහා අතර', 'so': "isticmaalka Twitterka oo ballaadhan marka ay xaaladaha degdega ah jirto waxay heli kartaa fursad cusub iyo rasmi waqti dheer ah oo ay u fidiyaan jawaabayaasha xasaradda shaqaalaha maamulka dhibaatada kala duduwan. Macluumaadka la xiriira Twitteetyada ee la xiriira waa muhiim in la helo cawinaada xaaladaha iyo helitaanka caawimaadda. However, the majority of tweets do not come with geoinformation.  Markaas waxan waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa shaqada ku saabsan aqoonsashada meesha lagu yaqaano tweetka arimaha dhibaatada. Si gaar ah, waxaynu baaraynaa saameyn ku yeelashada noocyo kala duduwan oo waxbarashada la xiriiray sameynta qaababka fasalka ee BERT-based ah. Waxaynu baaraanaynaa heero badan oo waxbarasho ah, tusaale ahaan macluumaadka internetka ee warqadaha iyo warqadaha caadiga ah iyo tweetiyada la xiriira xasaradaha. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu baaraynaa saamaynta geospatial ee ku dhow xilliga waxbarashada dhacdooyinka jiilaalka. Isku isticmaalaya shan sawirro oo kala duduwan, imtixaankayada ballaadhan ayaa jawaabo ka jawaabaya su'aalo badan oo baaritaanka muhiimka ah, kuwaas oo u faa’iido leh bulshada waxbarashada si ay u koriso waxbarashada wadankan muhiimka ah. Tusaale ahaan arimaha waxaa tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tababarida qaababka aqoonsashada, macluumaadka aasaasiga ah ee Twitterka waxaa laga doortaa macluumaadka caadiga ah; iyo macluumaadyada dhibaatada la xiriira waxaa laga doortaa macluumaadka Twitterka oo dhan. Sidoo kale waxbarashada ku saabsan dhacdooyinka xaaladaha Geografikada ee u dhow waxay sii kordhisaa dhacdooyinka dhacdooyinka goalka si la barbarto waxbarashada dhacdooyinka fog.", 'ml': 'അപകടത്തില്\u200d വിവിധ വിപത്തുമാനിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് പുതിയ അവസരം കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയിലുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയും സഹായം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനും പ എങ്കിലും മിക്കവാറും ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d വിവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വന്നിട്ടില്ല. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തിയിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ക്ല വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പേരില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തുള്ള ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും പൊതുവായ ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഗോസ്പാസ്റ്റിയാല്\u200d സമീപത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തോ ദൂരെയോ സം അഞ്ചു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നേരിട്ടത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്ക ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ട്ര and crisis-related data is preferred over general-purpose Twitter data.  അതിനുശേഷം, വിദൂരസംഭങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചാണ് ഭൂഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള വിപത്തുകള്\u200d സംഭവിച', 'ta': 'சுக்கியமான நேரத்திற்கு புதிய வாய்ப்பு மற்றும் நேரத்திற்கான மூலம் பிரச்சனை மேலாண்மை பணிகளுக்கு பிரச்சனை பதிலளிக் நிலையான உணர்வு மற்றும் உதவியை வழங்குவதற்கு தேவையான தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டு தகவல்கள் முக்கியமானது. ஆயினும், பெரும்பாலான tweeting geoinformation கொண்டு வரவில்லை. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் நிலையில் குறிப்பிடும் அறிவிப்பு இடத்தின் செயலை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் கஷ்டத்தி குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் வேறு வகைகளில் குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி தரவுகளின் விளைவுகளை தேடுகிறோம் BERT-அடிப்படையான வகுப்பு வகுப் நாங்கள் செய்தி கட்டுரைகள் மற்றும் வெளியேற்ற தகவல்களை இணைத்து மற்றும் செய்தி கட்டுரைகளில் இருந்து பொது இலக்கு மற்றும அதற்கும், நாம் சேர்க்கும் நிகழ்வில் இருந்து நெருங்கிய பூவிய அண்மையின் விளைவுகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். ஐந்து வேறு வித்தியாசமான தரவுத்தளங்களை பயன்படுத்தி, எங்கள் விரிவான சோதனைகள் பல சுக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில்  உதாரணத்திற்கு, முடிவு நிகழ்ச்சியுடன் தொடர்புடைய தகவல்கள் பொதுவான தொடர்பு தொடர்பு கொண்டிருக்கிறது. மேலும், தொலைதூர நிகழ்வுகளில் பயிற்சியை ஒப்பிடும் செயல்பாட்டின் செயல்பாட்டை தூரத்திலிருந்து பயிற்சியிலிரு', 'ur': "توئیٹر کی وسیع استعمال اضطراری کے موقع میں ایک نئی فرصت اور زمانی موقع کے لئے مختلف مصیبت مدیریت کے کاموں کے لئے ہے. موجود ٹویٹوں کی جگئو موقعیت کی اطلاعات موجود خبردار اور مدد حاصل کرنے کے لئے ضروری ہے. However, most tweets don't come with geoinformation. اس کام میں ہم اس جگہ کے ذریعہ تہمت کے ٹویٹوں سے پہچان کر رہے ہیں۔ ہم مختلف طریقوں کی تحقیق کررہے ہیں جو ایک BERT بنیادی کلاسپیٹ موڈل کے کامیابی پر لابلیٹ کی آموزش دیٹے کے متعلق مختلف طریقوں کی تاثیر. ہم بہت سی تدریس سیٹیوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جیسے اخباری مجموعے اور عمومی هدف اور مصیبت کے متعلق ٹویٹ سے داخل کرنے کے لئے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم جغرافی تقرب کے اثر کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جب کہ موقع حادثہ سے قریب یا دور کی آموزش کریں. پانچ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہمارے بڑے آزمائش مختلف ضروری تحقیق سوالات کے جواب دیتے ہیں جو تحقیق کمونٹی کے لئے اس اہم طریقے میں تحقیق کی تسبیح کرنے کے لئے مفید ہیں. مثال، نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ، ایک موقعیت کی تعلیم کے لئے، ٹویٹر کی بنیاد دار ڈیٹا عمومی هدف ڈیٹا پر ترجیح دی جاتی ہے، اور مصیبت کے معاملہ میں ڈیٹا ترجیح دی جاتی ہے جرانیل مصیبت توئیٹر ڈیٹا پر۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، جغرافیاً نزدیک مصیبت حادثوں سے ڈیٹوں پر آموزش کی تدبیر، موقع حادثہ کے مقابلہ میں دور کی حادثوں کے مقابلہ میں فعالیت اضافہ کرتا ہے.", 'mt': 'L-użu mifrux ta’ Twitter matul l-emerġenzi pprovda opportunità ġdida u riżorsi f’waqthom lil dawk li wieġbu għall-kriżijiet għal diversi kompiti ta’ ġestjoni tad-diżastri. Informazzjoni dwar il-ġeolokazzjoni ta’ tweets pertinenti hija kruċjali biex tinkiseb kuxjenza tas-sitwazzjoni u tingħata għajnuna. Madanakollu, il-maġġoranza tat-tweets ma joħorġux b’informazzjoni ġeografika. F’din il-ħidma, niffokaw fuq il-kompitu li ssir referenza għar-rikonoxximent tal-post minn tweets relatati mal-kriżi. Speċifikament, ninvestigaw l-influwenza ta’ tipi differenti ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ ittikkettata dwar il-prestazzjoni ta’ mudell ta’ klassifikazzjoni bbażat fuq BERT. We explore several training settings such as combing in- and out-domain data from news articles and general-purpose and crisis-related tweets.  Barra minn hekk, ninvestigaw l-effett tal-prossimità ġeospazjali waqt it-taħriġ fuq avvenimenti qrib jew ’il bogħod mill-avveniment fil-mira. Bl-użu ta’ ħames settijiet ta’ dejta differenti, l-esperimenti estensivi tagħna jipprovdu tweġibiet għal diversi mistoqsijiet ta’ riċerka kritiċi li huma utli għall-komunità tar-riċerka biex trawwem ir-riċerka f’din id-direzzjoni importanti. Pereżempju, ir-riżultati juru li, għat-taħriġ ta’ lokazzjoni ssemmi mudell ta’ rikonoxximent, id-dejta bbażata fuq Twitter hija ppreferuta fuq dejta għal skopijiet ġenerali; u d-dejta relatata mal-kriżi hija ppreferuta fuq dejta Twitter bi skop ġenerali. Furthermore, training on data from geographically-nearby disaster events to the target event boosts the performance compared to training on distant events.', 'no': 'Det breidde bruken av Twitter under utviklingane har tilgjengeleg ein ny mulighet og tidlegare ressurs til krisiske svararar for ulike oppgåver med katastrofisk handtering. Name Dei fleste tweeter kommer imidlertid ikkje med geoinformasjon. I denne arbeida fokuserer vi på oppgåva for å gjera oppkjenninga frå krissrelaterte tweeter. Vi undersøker effekten av ulike typar merkelige opplæringsdata om utviklinga av ein BERT-basert klassifikasjonsmodul. Vi undersøker fleire opplæringsinnstillingar som kombinasjon av i- og ut- domenedata frå nyhetseiningar og generell- mål og krissrelaterte tweets. I tillegg undersøker vi effekten av geospasielle tilnærminga mens opplæring på nær eller langt vekk hendingar frå målet-hendinga. Bruk fem ulike datasett, våre utvidende eksperimenter gjev svar på fleire kritiske forskningsspørsmål som er nyttig for forskningssamfunnet for å forstørra forskning i denne viktige retninga. For eksempel viser resultatet at for å lære eit mønsterelement for gjenkjenning av plasseringa, er databasert på Twitter førehandsvis over generelle målsettingar. og krissrelaterte data er foretrukket over generelle Twitter-data. I tillegg vil opplæring av data frå geografisk nærare katastrofendingar til målet-hendinga styrke opplæringa i sammenligninga med opplæring av lange hendingar.', 'sv': 'Den utbredda användningen av Twitter under nödsituationer har gett krisansvariga en ny möjlighet och en resurs i rätt tid för olika katastrofhanteringsuppgifter. Geolokaliseringsinformation av relevanta tweets är avgörande för att få situationsmedvetenhet och ge hjälp. De flesta tweets kommer dock inte med geoinformation. I detta arbete fokuserar vi på uppgiften att lokalisera omnämnandet från krisrelaterade tweets. Specifikt undersöker vi hur olika typer av märkta träningsdata påverkar prestandan hos en BERT-baserad klassificeringsmodell. Vi undersöker flera utbildningsinställningar som att kamma in- och out-domain data från nyhetsartiklar och allmänna och krisrelaterade tweets. Vidare undersöker vi effekten av geospatial närhet vid träning på nära eller fjärran händelser från målhändelsen. Med hjälp av fem olika datauppsättningar ger våra omfattande experiment svar på flera kritiska forskningsfrågor som är användbara för forskarsamhället att främja forskning i denna viktiga riktning. Resultaten visar till exempel att Twitter-baserade data föredras framför allmänna uppgifter för utbildning i en modell för igenkänning av platsomnämningar. och krisrelaterade data föredras framför allmänna Twitter-data. Dessutom ökar utbildningen av data från geografiskt närbelägna katastrofhändelser till målhändelsen prestandan jämfört med utbildning på avlägsna händelser.', 'uz': "Xavfsizlik paytida Twitter foydalanuvchisi yangi imkoniyat va muammoga boshqaruv vazifalari uchun muammo javoblari imkoniyatini beradi. Taʼminlovchi Twitterlar haqida taʼminlovchi holatni taqlash va yordam olish uchun muhim. Lekin, ko'pchilik twitlar geo-info bilan kelmaydi. Bu vazifanda, biz muammolar bilan xabarlardan tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz. Ko'rsatganda, biz BERT-asosida klassifik modelini bajarish haqida turli taʼminlov maʼlumotning effekti haqida o'rganamiz. We explore several training settings such as combing in- and out-domain data from news articles and general-purpose and crisis-related tweets.  Ko'rsatganda, Jospatian eng yaqinligiga yoki eng uzoq hodisalar haqida o'rganish natijasining natijasini o'rganamiz. 5 boshqa maʼlumotlar tarkibi bilan ishlatilgan, bizning kengaytirilgan imtiyozlarimiz bir necha muhim taʼminot soʻzlariga javob beradi. Bu muhim usulda o'rganishni foydalanish uchun foydalanadi. Масалан, натижалар манзилни аниқлаш модели ўрнатиш учун Twitter asosida maʼlumot умумий маълумотлардан афзал бўлади; va muammolar haqida maʼlumotni bir necha xabar Twitter maʼlumotidan tanlangan. Koʻrsatilgan, geographically- quyidagi shifoy hodisalar haqida maʼlumotni bajarish natijasida maʼlumotni tasdiqlashni istaysiz. Masofadagi hodisalar bilan taʼminlovchi soʻzda ishlatishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc sử dụng Twitter trong những tình huống khẩn cấp đã mang lại một cơ hội mới và nguồn lực kịp thời cho người chống khủng hoảng trong các nhiệm vụ quản lý thảm họa. Thông tin địa phương về những tweet quan trọng là rất quan trọng cho việc nhận biết tình hình và trợ giúp. Tuy nhiên, đa số các tweet không có địa thông tin. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi tập trung vào nhiệm vụ địa điểm đề cập đến sự công nhận từ các tweet liên quan đến khủng hoảng. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi nghiên cứu tầm ảnh hưởng của các loại thông tin được đánh dấu về hiệu quả của mô hình phân hạng BERT. Chúng tôi khám phá vài thiết lập huấn luyện như kết hợp dữ liệu nội địa từ các bài báo và các tweet liên quan đến các mục tiêu và khủng hoảng. Chúng tôi cũng nghiên cứu các tác động của cận cảnh địa phương trong khi tập luyện về các sự kiện gần hay cách xa khỏi mục tiêu. Sử dụng năm bộ dữ liệu khác nhau, các thí nghiệm đầy đủ của chúng tôi cung cấp đáp ứng cho nhiều câu hỏi quan trọng về nghiên cứu hữu ích cho cộng đồng nghiên cứu để thúc đẩy nghiên cứu theo hướng quan trọng này. Ví dụ, kết quả cho thấy, để đào tạo mô hình nhận dạng địa điểm, dữ liệu dựa trên Twitter được ưu tiên hơn các dữ liệu dùng chung. và dữ liệu có liên quan đến khủng hoảng thì thích hơn là Twitter. Hơn nữa, huấn luyện về dữ liệu từ các vụ thảm họa gần địa phương đến sự kiện đạt mục tiêu sẽ tăng hiệu quả hơn so với huấn luyện về các sự kiện xa xôi.', 'hr': 'Širom korištenju Twitter tijekom hitnih slučajeva pružilo je novu priliku i vremenski resurs odgovornicima krize za različite zadatke upravljanja katastrofama. Geolokacija informacija o odgovarajućim tweetima je ključna za dobivanje situacijskog svijesti i pružanje pomoći. Međutim, većina tweeta ne dolazi s geoinformacijom. U ovom poslu, usredotočili smo se na zadatak lokacije spomenuti priznanje iz tweta povezanih s krizom. Posebno istražujemo utjecaj različitih vrsta označenih podataka o obuci na učinkovitosti model a klasifikacije na BERT-u. Istražujemo nekoliko podataka za obuku poput borbe podataka iz novinskih članaka i generalne svrhe i tweets povezanih s krizom. Osim toga, istražujemo učinak geoprostorne bliskosti dok se obučavamo u blizini ili dalekim događajima od ciljnog događaja. Koristeći pet različitih seta podataka, naši široki eksperimenti pružaju odgovore na nekoliko kritičnih istraživačkih pitanja koje su korisne za istraživačku zajednicu kako bi podržali istraživanje u ovom važnom smjeru. Na primjer, rezultati pokazuju da, za obuku model a priznanja spominjanih lokacija, podaci na Twitteru predlaže se iznad općeg cilja podataka; a podaci povezani s krizom preferiraju se iznad podataka o Twitter-u za opće svrhe. Osim toga, obuka podataka iz geografskih događaja u blizini katastrofa do ciljnog događaja povećava učinkovitost u usporedbi s obukom o udaljenim događajima.', 'bg': 'Широкото използване на Туитър по време на извънредни ситуации предостави нова възможност и навременен ресурс за реагиращите на кризи лица за различни задачи по управление на бедствия. Информацията за геолокация на съответните туитове е от решаващо значение за придобиване на информираност за ситуацията и предоставяне на помощ. Въпреки това, по-голямата част от туитовете не идват с геоинформация. В тази работа се фокусираме върху задачата за разпознаване на местоположението от свързани с криза туитове. По-конкретно, изследваме влиянието на различни типове обозначени данни за обучение върху ефективността на базиран на BERT класификационен модел. Разглеждаме няколко настройки за обучение, като например претърсване на данни в и извън домейна от новинарски статии и туитове с общо предназначение и свързани с кризи. Освен това изследваме ефекта от геопространствената близост при обучение върху близки или далечни събития от целевото събитие. Използвайки пет различни набора от данни, нашите обширни експерименти дават отговори на няколко критични изследователски въпроса, които са полезни за изследователската общност за насърчаване на научните изследвания в тази важна посока. Например резултатите показват, че при обучението на модел за разпознаване на споменаване на местоположение данните се предпочитат пред данните с общо предназначение; Данните, свързани с кризи, се предпочитат пред данните с общо предназначение в Туитър. Освен това обучението по данни от географски близки събития на бедствия до целевото събитие повишава ефективността в сравнение с обучението по далечни събития.', 'nl': 'Het wijdverbreide gebruik van Twitter tijdens noodsituaties heeft crisishulpverleners een nieuwe kans en tijdige bron geboden voor verschillende rampenbeheersingstaken. Geolocatie-informatie van relevante tweets is cruciaal voor het verkrijgen van situationeel bewustzijn en het leveren van hulp. Het merendeel van de tweets bevat echter geen geoinformatie. In dit werk richten we ons op de taak van location mention herkenning uit crisisgerelateerde tweets. Specifiek onderzoeken we de invloed van verschillende soorten gelabelde trainingsgegevens op de prestaties van een BERT-gebaseerd classificatiemodel. We onderzoeken verschillende trainingssettings, zoals het combineren van in- en out-domain data uit nieuwsberichten en algemene en crisisgerelateerde tweets. Verder onderzoeken we het effect van geospatiale nabijheid tijdens training op nabije of verre gebeurtenissen van de doelgebeurtenis. Met behulp van vijf verschillende datasets geven onze uitgebreide experimenten antwoorden op verschillende kritische onderzoeksvragen die nuttig zijn voor de onderzoeksgemeenschap om onderzoek in deze belangrijke richting te bevorderen. Uit de resultaten blijkt bijvoorbeeld dat bij het trainen van een herkenningsmodel voor locatiegegevens de voorkeur wordt gegeven aan op Twitter gebaseerde gegevens boven algemene gegevens; Gegevens over crisis en crisis hebben de voorkeur boven algemene Twitter-gegevens. Bovendien verhoogt training op gegevens van rampen in de buurt naar het doelevenement de prestaties in vergelijking met training op afstand.', 'da': 'Den udbredte brug af Twitter i nødsituationer har givet kriseberederne en ny mulighed og rettidig ressource til forskellige katastrofehåndteringsopgaver. Geolokaliseringsoplysninger om relevante tweets er afgørende for at opnå situationsbevidsthed og levere hjælp. Men de fleste tweets kommer ikke med geoinformation. I dette arbejde fokuserer vi på opgaven med placering omtale anerkendelse fra kriserelaterede tweets. Specielt undersøger vi indflydelsen af forskellige typer mærkede træningsdata på resultaterne af en BERT-baseret klassifikationsmodel. Vi undersøger flere træningsindstillinger som f.eks. kæmning af data fra nyhedsartikler og generelle og kriserelaterede tweets. Desuden undersøger vi effekten af geospatial nærhed under træning på nær- eller fjerntliggende begivenheder fra målbegivenheden. Ved hjælp af fem forskellige datasæt giver vores omfattende eksperimenter svar på flere kritiske forskningsspørgsmål, der er nyttige for forskningssamfundet til at fremme forskning i denne vigtige retning. For eksempel viser resultaterne, at Twitter-baserede data foretrækkes frem for almindelige data til træning af en genkendelsesmodel for placering. og kriserelaterede data foretrækkes frem for almindelige Twitter-data. Desuden øger træning i data fra geografisk nærliggende katastrofehændelser til målhændelsen ydeevnen sammenlignet med træning i fjernhændelser.', 'de': 'Die weitverbreitete Nutzung von Twitter in Notfällen hat Krisenhelfern neue Möglichkeiten und zeitnahe Ressourcen für verschiedene Katastrophenmanagementaufgaben geboten. Geolokalisierungsinformationen relevanter Tweets sind entscheidend für die Gewinnung von Situationsbewusstsein und die Bereitstellung von Hilfe. Die meisten Tweets enthalten jedoch keine Geoinformationen. In dieser Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf die Aufgabe der Standorterwähnung aus krisenbezogenen Tweets. Konkret untersuchen wir den Einfluss verschiedener Arten von markierten Trainingsdaten auf die Leistung eines BERT-basierten Klassifikationsmodells. Wir untersuchen verschiedene Trainings-Settings, wie das Kombinieren von In- und Out-Domain-Daten aus Nachrichtenartikeln und allgemeinen und krisenbezogenen Tweets. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir den Effekt der räumlichen Nähe während des Trainings auf nahe oder ferne Ereignisse des Zielereignisses. Anhand von fünf verschiedenen Datensätzen liefern unsere umfangreichen Experimente Antworten auf einige kritische Forschungsfragen, die für die Forschungsgemeinschaft nützlich sind, um die Forschung in diese wichtige Richtung zu fördern. Beispielsweise zeigen die Ergebnisse, dass für das Training eines Standorterwähnungsmodells Twitter-basierte Daten gegenüber allgemeinen Daten bevorzugt werden; Daten aus Krisen- und Krisenbeziehungen werden gegenüber allgemeinen Twitter-Daten bevorzugt. Darüber hinaus steigert das Training auf Daten von geografisch nahegelegenen Katastrophenereignissen zum Zielereignis die Leistung im Vergleich zum Training auf entfernten Ereignissen.', 'id': 'Penggunaan Twitter yang luas selama keadaan darurat telah menyediakan kesempatan baru dan sumber daya tepat waktu untuk responden krisis untuk berbagai tugas manajemen bencana. Informasi geolokasi dari tweet pertinent adalah penting untuk mendapatkan kesadaran situasi dan memberikan bantuan. Namun, kebanyakan tweet tidak datang dengan geoinformasi. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami fokus pada tugas lokasi menyebutkan pengakuan dari tweet berkaitan dengan krisis. Secara spesifik, kami menyelidiki pengaruh dari jenis yang berbeda data pelatihan yang ditabel tentang prestasi model klasifikasi berdasarkan BERT. Kami mengeksplorasi beberapa pengaturan pelatihan seperti menggabungkan data masuk dan keluar domain dari artikel berita dan tweet tujuan umum dan berkaitan dengan krisis. Selain itu, kami menyelidiki efek dekat geospasial sementara latihan pada peristiwa dekat atau jauh dari peristiwa sasaran. Menggunakan lima set data yang berbeda, eksperimen ekstensif kami memberikan jawaban untuk beberapa pertanyaan penelitian kritis yang berguna untuk komunitas penelitian untuk mendorong penelitian dalam arah penting ini. Contohnya, hasil menunjukkan bahwa, untuk latihan lokasi menyebutkan model pengenalan, data berdasarkan Twitter lebih memilih daripada data tujuan umum; dan data berkaitan dengan krisis lebih memilih daripada data Twitter untuk tujuan umum. Selain itu, latihan pada data dari peristiwa bencana yang terdekat geografi ke peristiwa target meningkatkan prestasi dibandingkan latihan pada peristiwa yang jauh.', 'fa': 'استفاده وسیع توئیتر در طول حادثه اضطراری یک فرصت جدید و منابع زمانی برای پاسخ\u200cدهندگان بحران برای وظیفه\u200cهای مدیریت فاجعه\u200cهای مختلف ارائه داده است. اطلاعات جغرافی از توئیت های مربوط به عنوان دریافت آگاهی و تحویل کمک موقعیت مهم است. ولی بیشتر تویتها با اطلاعات ژوئی نیامدند. در این کار، ما روی کار موقعیت اشاره می کنیم که از توئیت های مربوط به بحران تشخیص داده شود. به طور خاص، ما تحقیق تاثیر نوع\u200cهای متفاوتی از داده\u200cهای آموزشی برچسب\u200cشده در مورد انجام یک مدل برچسب\u200cسازی بر بنیاد BERT را می\u200cبریم. ما چندین تنظیمات آموزشی مثل مبارزه داده های دامین و خارج از مقاله های خبری و هدف عمومی و توئیت های مربوط به بحران تحقیق می کنیم. علاوه بر این، ما تاثیر نزدیکترین جغرافی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم در حالی که آموزش در رویدادهای نزدیک یا دور از رویداد هدف است. با استفاده از پنج مجموعه داده های مختلف، آزمایش های وسیع ما به چند سوال تحقیقات ضروری جواب می دهند که برای جامعه تحقیقات مفید برای تحقیقات در این مسیر مهم است. برای مثال، نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که برای آموزش یک مدل شناسایی مکان، داده\u200cهای بر توئیتر بر داده\u200cهای عمومی هدف ترجیح می\u200cدهند. و داده های مربوط به بحران بر روی داده های توئیتر عمومی ترجیح می دهند. علاوه بر این، آموزش داده\u200cهای جغرافی و نزدیک اتفاقات فاجعه\u200cای به اتفاقات هدف، عملکرد را در مقایسه با آموزش رویداده\u200cهای دور افزایش می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Utumiaji mkubwa wa Twita wakati wa dharura umetoa fursa mpya na rasilimali za muda kwa ajili ya majibu ya mgogoro kwa kazi mbalimbali za utawala wa janga. Taarifa za utekelezaji wa twiti zinazohusiana ni muhimu kwa kupata uelewa wa hali ya mambo na kutoa misaada. Hata hivyo, jumbe nyingi za twita hazikuja na taarifa za kijiji. Katika kazi hii, tunajikita kwenye jukumu la maeneo kutambuliwa kutoka kwenye twiti zinazohusiana na janga. Kwa hakika, tunachunguza ushawishi wa aina mbalimbali za mafunzo takwimu za mafunzo kuhusu utendaji wa mifano yenye msingi wa BERT. Tunafanya maeneo kadhaa ya mafunzo kama vile kuunganisha taarifa za ndani na nje ya makala za habari na twiti zinazohusiana na mgogoro. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachunguza madhara ya ukaribisho wa eneo hilo wakati mafunzo ya matukio ya karibu au mbali kutoka tukio hilo. Kwa kutumia seti tano tofauti za taarifa, majaribio yetu makubwa yanatoa majibu ya maswali kadhaa ya utafiti muhimu ambayo yanafaa kwa jamii ya utafiti ili kukuza utafiti katika mwelekeo huu muhimu. Kwa mfano, matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa, kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya maeneo yanayotaja muundo wa kutambua, taarifa za mtandao wa Twita zinapendelewa zaidi ya takwimu za jumla; na taarifa zinazohusiana na mgogoro ni bora zaidi ya taarifa za Twita kwa ujumla. Furthermore, training on data from geographically-nearby disaster events to the target event boosts the performance compared to training on distant events.', 'ko': '긴급한 상황에서 트위터의 광범위한 사용은 위기 응답자에게 각종 재해 관리 임무를 수행할 수 있는 새로운 기회와 자원을 제공했다.관련 트윗의 지리적 위치 정보는 태세 감지와 원조를 얻는 데 매우 중요하다.그러나 대다수 추문은 지리적 정보가 없다.이 작업에서 우리는 위기 관련 추문에서 위치를 식별하고 언급하는 임무에 중점을 둘 것이다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 서로 다른 유형의 표기 훈련 데이터가 버트 분류 모델을 바탕으로 하는 성능에 대한 영향을 연구했다.우리는 뉴스 기사, 유니버설과 위기 관련 추문에서 역내와 역외 데이터를 정리하는 등 몇 가지 교육 설정을 탐색했다.그 밖에 우리는 목표 사건과 가깝거나 먼 사건에서 훈련을 할 때 지리 공간의 인접성에 대한 영향을 연구했다.다섯 가지 서로 다른 데이터 집합을 사용하여 우리의 대량 실험은 몇 가지 관건적인 연구 문제에 답을 제공했는데 이런 문제들은 연구계에서 이 중요한 방향의 연구를 추진하는 데 매우 유용하다.예를 들어 훈련 위치에서 식별 모델을 언급할 때 트위터 기반 데이터가 일반 데이터보다 더 인기가 많다는 결과가 나왔다.공통 트위터 데이터보다 위기 관련 데이터가 더 인기다.또한 원격 이벤트 교육에 비해 지리적 위치와 가까운 재난 사건에서 목표 사건까지의 데이터 교육을 통해 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.', 'tr': "Acil wagtlar wagtynda Twitter'yň döwletleri täze bir mümkinçilik we wagtynda krizis mümkinçileriniň näçe döwletlere mejbur täzelikleri üçin rugsat berildi. Mümkin tweetler barada ýerleşdirim maglumaty möhüm bolup durum düşündirişi we kömek tespit etmek üçin möhüm. Ýöne tweets köpüsi geoinformasiýa bilen gelmez. Bu işde krizis ýaly tweetlerden tanyş ukyplaryň görevini üns berýäris. Aýratyn görä, BERT tabanly klasifikasyon nusgasynda etitlenýän eğitim maglumatynyň täsirini barlaýarys. We explore several training settings such as combing in- and out-domain data from news articles and general-purpose and crisis-related tweets. Mundan hem, biz geospasiýaly ýakynlaşyklaryň etkisini maslahat berýäris we maksadyň ýa-da uzak bolup geçýän hadysalarynda bilim bereýäris. Beş farklı veri setirlerini ulanarak, biziň golaý deneylerimiz araştyrmalary üçin bu wajyp ýoly çykmak üçin ýüzerli bir näçe wajyp barlag soraglaryna jogaplary berer. mysal ýaly, netijeler şol ýeri ýazylan tanyş nusgasyny eğitirmek üçin, Twitter daýanýan maglumatlar umumy maksadyň üstünde tercih edilýär; krizis bilen baglanýan maglumatlar Twitter maglumatyndan üstün tercih edilýär. Mundan soňra, geografik ýakyn felaketler geçirmelerinden ýakyn maglumatlar barada maksadyň çykyş bolup geçýän hadysalary golaý çykyş öwrülmesi bilen gurnalaşýar.", 'af': "Die verspreidige gebruik van Twitter tydens uitbreidings het 'n nuwe geleentheid en tydelik hulpbron verskaf vir krisis reageerders vir verskillende katastrofsbestuurder opdragte. Name Maar die meeste tweets kom nie met geoinformasie nie. In hierdie werk, ons fokus op die taak van ligging bepaal herkening van krisieverwante tweets. Spesifieke, ons ondersoek die influens van verskillende tipes van etiketeerde onderwerp data op die prestasie van 'n BERT-gebaseerde klasifikasie model. Ons ondersoek verskeie opvoeringsinstellings soos gemeenskap in- en uit- domein data van nuusartikels en algemene- doel en krissverwante tweets. Ons verder ondersoek die effek van geospasiele proksie terwyl onderwerp op naby of ver-weg gebeurtenis van die doel gebeurtenis. By gebruik van vyf verskillende datastelle, ons uitbreidige eksperimente verskaf antwoordes na verskeie kritiese forskingspraak wat gebruik is vir die forskingsamelewing om forskings in hierdie belangrike rigting te verskaf. Byvoorbeeld, resultate wys dat, vir die onderwerp van 'n ligging bepaal herken model, Twitter-gebaseerde data is voorkeur oor algemene-doel data; en krisieverwante data is voorkeur oor algemene doel Twitter data. Ook, onderwerp op data van geografiese-naby katastrofsgebeurtenis tot die doel-gebeurtenis verhoog die prestasie in vergelyking met onderwerp op afgeleë gebeurtenis.", 'sq': 'Përdorimi i përhapur i Twitter gjatë emergjencës ka ofruar një mundësi të re dhe burim të kohës për përgjigjurit e krizave për detyra të ndryshme të menaxhimit të fatkeqësive. Informacioni gjeologjik i tweeteve të duhura është vendimtar për të fituar ndërgjegjësimin e situatës dhe për të dhënë ndihmë. Megjithatë, shumica e tweeteve nuk vijnë me gjeoinformacion. Në këtë punë, ne përqëndrohemi në detyrën e vendndodhjes duke përmendur njohjen nga tweetet lidhur me krizën. Veçanërisht, ne hetojmë ndikimin e llojeve të ndryshme të të dhënave të trajnimit të etiketuar mbi performancën e një modeli klasifikimi me bazë në BERT. Ne eksplorojmë disa rregullime trajnimi të tilla si kombinimi i të dhënave në dhe jashtë domenie nga artikujt e lajmeve dhe tweetet me qëllim të përgjithshëm dhe lidhur me krizën. Përveç kësaj, ne hetojmë efektin e afërsisë gjeospaziale ndërsa trajnojmë ngjarje të afërta apo të largëta nga ngjarja objektive. Using five different datasets, our extensive experiments provide answers to several critical research questions that are useful for the research community to foster research in this important direction.  Për shembull, rezultatet tregojnë se, për trainimin e një vendi përmend modelin e njohjes, të dhënat me bazë në Twitter janë të preferuara ndaj të dhënave me qëllim të përgjithshëm; dhe të dhënat lidhur me krizën preferohen mbi të dhënat e Twitter-it me qëllim të përgjithshëm. Përveç kësaj, stërvitja mbi të dhënat nga ngjarjet gjeografikisht afër fatkeqësive deri në ngjarjen objektive rrit performancën krahasuar me stërvitjen mbi ngjarjet e largëta.', 'am': 'በተጨማሪው ጉዳይ ጊዜ የTwitter ዊው ስፋት አዲስ ስርዓት እና በጊዜው የችግር ጉዳይ አድራጊዎችን ለመስጠት ሰጥቷል፡፡ የሀገር አዋቂነት እና እርዳታን ለማግኘት የሀብት ትዊተሮች መረጃ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ However, the majority of tweets do not come with geoinformation.  በዚህ ስራ፣ የጭንቀት ጉዳይ ከተጠቃሚ ትዊተሮች የሚታወቀውን ቦታ ማድረግ ላይ እናቆማለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ BERT-based የክፍለ ሥርዓት ሞዴል ላይ የሚደረገውን የልዩ ዓይነቶች የጽሑፍ ማህበረሰብ ጥያቄን እናመርምራለን፡፡ ከዜና አርእስቶች እና የግጭት ጉዳይ እና የጉዳዩ ትዊተቶች ላይ የሚቆጠሩ ብዙ የድምፅ ምርጫዎች እና ውጪ ዳታዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የምንመረምር የgeospatial ቅርብ ግንኙነት ከግለጹ ወይም ሩቅ ጉዳይ ላይ ግንኙነት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በአምስት ልዩ ዳታተሮች በተጠቀም፣ የስፋት ፈተናዎቻችን ወደዚህ አስቸጋሪ ግንኙነት ትምህርት ማኅበረሰብ ለመጠቀም የሚጠቅሙትን ብዙዎች ትምህርት ጥያቄዎችን ይሰጣቸዋል፡፡ ለምሳሌ ምሳሌ፣ ፍሬዎች ማሳየት ቦታ የሚያስታውቀውን ሞዴል ለመግጠም፣ በትዊተር ላይ የተመሳሳይ ዳታዎች በጠቅላላ አካል ዳታዎች የሚሻል ነው፡፡ የጭንቀት ዳታዎችን ከሀብት ትዊተር ዳታዎች በላይ ይሻላል:: በተጨማሪም፣ የgeographically-ቅርብ የአቅራቢያ ጉዳይ ሁኔታ ላይ ዳታዎችን ለመግጠም የሩቅ ሁኔታዎችን ከማስተካከል የሚያሳድገውን ትክክል ያደርጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Թվիթերի տարածված օգտագործումը անհրաժեշտ դեպքերում նոր հնարավորություն և ժամանակական ռեսուրսներ է տրամադրել ճգնաժամի արձագանքներին բազմաթիվ աղետների ղեկավարման խնդիրների համար: Անհրաժեշտ թվիթերի երկրագծի տեղեկատվությունը կարևոր է իրավիճակի գիտակցության և օգնության տալու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, թվիթերի մեծամասնությունը չունի երկրատեղեկատվություն: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կենտրոնանում ենք տեղադրության խնդրի վրա, որը նշում է ճգնաժամի հետ կապված թվիթերի ճանաչելը: Specifically, we investigate the influence of different types of labeled training data on the performance of a BERT-based classification model.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մի քանի ուսումնասիրության միջոցներ, ինչպիսիք են, օրինակ, նորությունների հոդվածների և ընդհանուր նպատակի և ճգնաժամի հետ կապված թվիթերի ինտերնետ և արտաքին տվյալներ համադրելը: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկրատարածական մոտիկության ազդեցությունը, երբ ուսումնասիրում ենք նպատակային իրադարձություններից մոտ կամ հեռու: Օգտագործելով հինգ տարբեր տվյալներ, մեր էքսպենսիվ փորձարկումները պատասխաններ են տալիս մի քանի կարևոր հետազոտությունների հարցերին, որոնք օգտակար են հետազոտության համայնքի համար հետազոտությունների աջակցության համար այս կարևոր Օրինակ, արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ տեղադրության ուսուցանման համար նշել են ճանաչման մոդելը, որ Թվիթերի հիմնված տվյալները նախընտրում են ընդհանուր նպատակի տվյալների փոխարեն: և ճգնաժամի հետ կապված տվյալները նախընտրում են ընդհանուր նպատակով Թվիթերի տվյալների փոխարեն: Ավելին, երկրագրաֆիկապես մոտ գտնվող աղետի իրադարձություններից մինչև նպատակային իրադարձությունները տվյալների վերաբերյալ վարժեցման արդյունքները բարձրացնում են, համեմատած հեռավոր իրադարձությունների վերաբերյալ', 'bn': 'জরুরি হওয়ার সময় টুইটারের ব্যবহারের ব্যাপকভাবে বিভিন্ন দুর্যোগ ব্যবস্থাপনার কাজের জন্য সংকটের প্রতিক্রিয়াদের একটি নতুন সুয পরিস্থিতির সচেতনতা এবং সাহায্য প্রদানের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ টুইটের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য। তবে বেশীরভাগ টুইটার ভৌগলিক তথ্য নিয়ে আসে না। এই কাজে আমরা সংকটের সংক্রান্ত টুইট থেকে স্বীকৃতি উল্লেখ করা অবস্থানের কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা বিবেরেট-ভিত্তিক ক্লাসাফিকেশন মডেলের প্রভাব নিয়ে বিভিন্ন ধরনের প্রশিক্ষণের প্রভাব তদন্ত করি। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি প্রশিক্ষণ বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুসন্ধান করি যেমন সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ এবং সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্য এবং সঙ্কটের টুইট থেকে সংযুক্ত তথ্য এছাড়াও, আমরা গোষ্ঠীর কাছ থেকে কাছাকাছি অথবা দূরবর্তী অনুষ্ঠানের প্রশিক্ষণের প্রভাব তদন্ত করছি। পাঁচ বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে, আমাদের বিস্তৃত পরীক্ষার ফলে বেশ কয়েকটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গবেষণা প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়েছে, যা গবে উদাহরণস্বরূপ, ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে স্থানে স্বীকৃতি উল্লেখ করা মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য টুইটার ভিত্তিক তথ্য সাধা এবং সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যে টুইটারের তথ্যের চেয়ে সমস্যা সম্পর্কিত তথ্য পছন্দ করা হয়। এছাড়াও, ভৌগোগ্রাফিক-কাছাকাছি বিপর্যয়ের ঘটনার তথ্য প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণ দূরবর্তী ঘটনার প্রশিক্ষণের তুলনায় গুরুত্বপ', 'ca': "L'ús generalitzat de Twitter durant emergencies ha proporcionat una nova oportunitat i recurso oportun als responsables de crisis per diverses tasques de gestió de desastres. La informació sobre la geolocalització dels tweets pertinents és crucial per aconseguir consciència de la situació i proporcionar ajuda. Però la majoria dels tweets no té geoinformació. En aquesta feina, ens centrem en la tasca de la localització que menciona el reconeixement dels tweets relacionats amb la crisi. Concretament, investigam l'influència de diferents tipus de dades d'entrenament etiquetades sobre el rendiment d'un model de classificació basat en BERT. Explorem diversos entorns d'entrenament, com combinar dades d'entrada i fora de domini a partir d'articles de notícies i tweets de propòsit general i relacionats amb crisi. A més, investigam l'efecte de la proximitat geoespacial mentre entrenem en esdeveniments propers o llunyà de l'esdeveniment alvo. Utilitzant cinc conjunts de dades diferents, els nostres extensos experiments proporcionen respostes a diverses preguntes crítiques de recerca que són útils per a la comunitat de recerca per promoure la recerca en aquesta direcció important. Per exemple, els resultats mostren que, per a formar un model de reconeixement de lloc, les dades basades en Twitter són preferides en comparació amb dades d'objectiu general; i les dades relacionades amb la crisi es prefereixen a Twitter amb propòsit general. Furthermore, training on data from geographically-nearby disaster events to the target event boosts the performance compared to training on distant events.", 'bs': 'Širom korištenjem Twitter tijekom hitnih slučajeva pružio je novu priliku i vremenski resurs reagovačama krize za različite zadatke upravljanja katastrofama. Geolokacija informacija o odgovarajućim tweetima je ključna za dobivanje situacijskog svijesti i pružanje pomoći. Međutim, većina tweeta ne dolazi sa geoinformacijom. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na zadatak lokacije spominje priznanje iz tweta povezanih sa krizom. Posebno, istražujemo utjecaj različitih vrsta označenih podataka o obuci na učinkovitosti model a klasifikacije na BERT-u. Istražujemo nekoliko podataka obuke poput borbe podataka iz novinskih članaka i generalne svrhe i tweets povezanih sa krizom. Osim toga, istražujemo učinak geoprostorne bliskosti dok treniramo na blizini ili dalekim događajima od ciljnog događaja. Koristeći pet različitih seta podataka, naši široki eksperimenti pružaju odgovore na nekoliko kritičnih istraživačkih pitanja koje su korisne za istraživačku zajednicu da podrži istraživanje u ovom važnom smjeru. Na primjer, rezultati pokazuju da, za obuku model a priznanja lokacija spominje, podaci na Twitter-u su preferirani iznad općeg cilja podataka; i podaci povezani s krizom preferiraju se iznad podataka o Twitter-u sa općem cilju. Osim toga, obuka podataka iz geografskih događaja u blizini katastrofa do ciljnog događaja povećava učinkovitost u usporedbi s obukom o dalekim događajima.', 'az': 'Tövratın çox geniş istifadə edilməsi müxtəlif fərqli və vaxtlı müxtəlif fərqli müdafiə edənlərə müxtəlif fərqli və müxtəlif müdafiə işləri üçün istifadə etdi. Yaxşı twetlərin geolokasyon məlumatı şəkildə xəbərdarlıq və yardım almaq üçün çox mövcuddur. Lakin twetlərin əksəriyyəti geoinformasiyala gəlməz. Bu işdə, krizisi ilə bağlı twetlərdən tanınmaq məqsədilə odaklanırıq. Beləliklə, BERT tabanlı klasifikasiya modelinin performansı barəsində müxtəlif etiketli təhsil məlumatının təsirini incidirik. Biz bir neçə təhsil qurğularını, xəbər məktullarından, genel məqsədilə və krizislə bağlı twetlərdən birlikdə döyüşdürmək kimi bir-birinə təhsil edirik. Daha sonra, məqsəd olaraq yaxın və uzaq olaraq təhsil etmək üçün geospasi yaxınlığının etkisini incidirik. Beş fərqli veri setlərini istifadə edərək, geniş eksperimentlərimiz bu möhüm tərəfində araştırma təhsil etmək üçün faydalı olan çoxlu kritik araştırma suallarına cavab verir. Misal olaraq, sonuçlar təhsil edir ki, yerlərin yada salmaq modeli təhsil etmək üçün Twitter tabanlı məlumatların genel məlumat məlumatlarından üstün seçildir; və krizin əlaqəsində olan məlumatların genel məqsədilə Twitter məlumatlarından üstün tutulmuşdur. Daha sonra, geografik-yaxın fəsada olaraq məlumatlarının məlumatlarını təhsil etmək məqsədilə, uzaq olaraq təhsil etmək ilə müqayisədə performansları artırar.', 'cs': 'Rozšířené využívání Twitteru během mimořádných situací poskytlo krizovým reaktorům novou příležitost a včasný zdroj pro různé úkoly řízení katastrof. Geolokační informace relevantních tweetů jsou klíčové pro získání situačního povědomí a poskytování pomoci. Většina tweetů však neobsahuje geoinformace. V této práci se zaměřujeme na úkol rozpoznávání lokalizační zmínky z krizových tweetů. Konkrétně zkoumáme vliv různých typů označených tréninkových dat na výkonnost klasifikačního modelu založeného na BERT. Prozkoumáme několik školicích nastavení, jako je pročesávání doménových dat ze zpravodajských článků a všeobecných a krizových tweetů. Dále zkoumáme vliv geoprostorové blízkosti při tréninku na blízké nebo vzdálené události od cílové události. Pomocí pěti různých datových sad poskytují naše rozsáhlé experimenty odpovědi na několik kritických výzkumných otázek, které jsou užitečné pro výzkumnou komunitu k podpoře výzkumu v tomto důležitém směru. Výsledky například ukazují, že při výcviku modelu rozpoznávání zmínek o místě jsou údaje založené na Twitteru upřednostňovány před údaji o obecném účelu; Údaje související s krizí jsou upřednostňovány před obecnými účelovými daty Twitteru. Kromě toho trénink na datech z geograficky blízkých katastrof k cílové události zvyšuje výkon ve srovnání s tréninkem na vzdálených událostech.', 'et': 'Twitteri laialdane kasutamine hädaolukordade ajal on andnud kriisile reageerijatele uue võimaluse ja õigeaegse ressursi erinevate katastroofiohjamise ülesannete täitmiseks. Asjakohaste säutsude geolokatsiooniteave on olukorrast teadlikkuse saavutamiseks ja abi andmiseks ülioluline. Enamik säutsudest ei sisalda siiski geoinformatsiooni. Käesolevas töös keskendume asukoha mainimise ülesandele kriisiga seotud säutsidest. Konkreetselt uurime erinevat tüüpi märgistatud koolitusandmete mõju BERT-põhise klassifikatsioonimudeli tulemuslikkusele. Uurime mitmeid koolitusseadeid, näiteks uudisteartiklitest ja üldisest ja kriisiga seotud säutsudest saadud domeenisiseste ja väliste andmete kammimist. Lisaks uurime georuumilise läheduse mõju treeningu ajal sihtsündmusest lähedal või kaugel asuvatele sündmustele. Viis erinevat andmekogumit kasutades annavad meie ulatuslikud eksperimendid vastuseid mitmetele kriitilistele uurimisküsimustele, mis on teadusringkonnale kasulikud selles olulises suunas teadusuuringute edendamiseks. Näiteks näitavad tulemused, et asukoha märkimise tuvastamise mudeli koolitamisel eelistatakse Twitteril põhinevaid andmeid üldistele andmetele; Üldotstarbeliste Twitteri andmete asemel eelistatakse kriisiga seotud andmeid. Lisaks suurendab geograafiliselt lähedal asuvate katastroofisündmuste andmete koolitamine sihtsündmuseni tulemuslikkust võrreldes kaugsündmuste koolitamisega.', 'fi': 'Twitterin laajamittainen käyttö hätätilanteissa on tarjonnut kriisitoimijoille uuden mahdollisuuden ja oikea-aikaisen resurssin erilaisiin katastrofinhallintatehtäviin. Asiaankuuluvien twiittien geolokaatiotieto on ratkaisevan tärkeää tilannetietoisuuden lisäämiseksi ja avun toimittamiseksi. Suurimmassa osassa twiitteistä ei kuitenkaan ole geoinformaatiota. Tässä työssä keskitymme sijaintimaininnan tunnistamiseen kriisiin liittyvistä tweeteistä. Erityisesti tutkimme erityyppisten merkittyjen harjoitustietojen vaikutusta BERT-pohjaisen luokitusmallin suorituskykyyn. Tutkimme useita koulutusasetuksia, kuten uutisartikkeleiden ja yleiskäyttöisten ja kriisiin liittyvien twiittien verkkotunnusten tietojen kampaamista. Lisäksi tutkimme geospatiaalisen läheisyyden vaikutusta harjoittelun aikana lähellä- tai kaukana tapahtumiin kohdetapahtumasta. Laajat kokeilumme tarjoavat viiden eri aineiston avulla vastauksia useisiin kriittisiin tutkimuskysymyksiin, joista tutkimusyhteisölle on hyötyä tutkimuksen edistämisessä tähän tärkeään suuntaan. Tulokset osoittavat esimerkiksi, että sijaintimaininnan tunnistusmallin koulutuksessa Twitter-pohjainen tieto on yleistietojen sijaan etusijalla. Kriiseihin ja kriisiin liittyvää dataa suositaan yleiseen Twitter-dataan verrattuna. Lisäksi maantieteellisesti lähellä sijaitsevien katastrofitapahtumien tietojen koulutus kohdetapahtumaan parantaa suorituskykyä verrattuna etätapahtumien koulutukseen.', 'sk': 'Razširjena uporaba Twitterja v izrednih razmerah je ponudila novo priložnost in pravočasno sredstvo za reševalce krize za različne naloge obvladovanja nesreč. Geolokacijske informacije ustreznih tweetov so ključnega pomena za pridobivanje ozaveščenosti o razmerah in zagotavljanje pomoči. Vendar pa večina tweetov ne prihaja z geoinformacijami. V tem delu se osredotočamo na nalogo prepoznavanja lokacijskih omemb iz kriznih tweetov. Natančneje raziskujemo vpliv različnih vrst označenih podatkov o usposabljanju na uspešnost BERT-ovega klasifikacijskega modela. Raziskujemo številne nastavitve usposabljanja, kot so čiščenje podatkov v in zunaj domene iz novic ter splošnih in kriznih tweetov. Poleg tega raziskujemo vpliv geoprostorske bližine med treningom na dogodke blizu ali daleč od ciljnega dogodka. Z uporabo petih različnih naborov podatkov naši obsežni eksperimenti zagotavljajo odgovore na več kritičnih raziskovalnih vprašanj, ki so koristna za raziskovalno skupnost pri spodbujanju raziskav v tej pomembni smeri. Rezultati na primer kažejo, da so pri usposabljanju modela prepoznavanja omembe lokacije podatki, ki temeljijo na Twitterju, prednostni pred splošnimi podatki; podatki, povezani s krizo, so prednostni pred splošnimi podatki Twitterja. Poleg tega usposabljanje o podatkih iz geografsko bližnjih nesreč do ciljnega dogodka povečuje uspešnost v primerjavi z usposabljanjem na oddaljenih dogodkih.', 'ha': "Yin amfani da Twitter a lokacin da za'a ƙayyade shawara, sun gaura fursa yanzu da rasmi wa zaman shawara zuwa masu crisis wa aikin manajan da aka ƙayyade su. Geolocation information of pertinent tweets is crucial for gaining situational awareness and delivering aid.  Hata da haka, mafi yawansu na Twitter ba su zo da mazaɓa ba. Daga wannan aikin, munã fahimta zuwa aikin inda ake faɗa sunana daga Twitter masu husũma na-crisis. A kan ƙayyade, Munã tambayi muhimmin tsari na daban-nau'i masu tsari da aka rubũta a kan aikin wani misalin sigar BERT-based. Tuna ƙidãya masu tsari masu amfani da kamar kombinta data masu cikin-da-guda daga makala da na lãbãri da jumla'a da jumla'in-jumla da Twitter masu husũma da crisis. Furan haka, Munã tambaya ma'anar aikin geospati ta kusanta a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu kusa ko masu nĩsa daga tukin nan na goani. Yin amfani da misãlai 5 dabam-daban, jarrabadenmu masu faɗi yana da majibu zuwa wasu maswali masu muhimu na tambayar research waɗanda ke da amfani ga jamii za'a ƙara research cikin wannan shirin muhimu. Misali, fassara za'a nuna cewa, don a ƙidãya wa shirin bayani na wani wurin, za'a fi fi son data a kan zane-zane-ɗabi'a Twitter; kuma ana fĩfĩta data masu husũma da crisis ko da data na jumla'a na Twitter. Furan haka, shirin wa data daga mitin geographically-nearby zuwa shirin nan na goan yana boost performance da sami da kuma ya yi wa aikin da ke cikin shirin nan mai nĩsa.", 'he': 'השימוש הרחב של טוויטר במהלך מקרים חירום סיפק הזדמנות חדשה ומאבן בזמן למגויבים במשברים למשימות ניהול אסון שונות. מידע גיאומיקוציה של טוויטים רלוונטיים הוא קריטי כדי להשיג מודעות למצב ולהספק עזרה. עם זאת, רוב הטוויטים לא מגיעים עם גיאומידע. בעבודה הזו, אנו מתמקדים במשימה של המיקום מזכירים זיהוי מטוויטים קשורים למשברים. במיוחד, אנו חוקרים את השפעה של סוגים שונים של נתוני אימון מותגים על ההופעה של מודל מסווג מבוסס על BERT. אנו חוקרים מספר סדרות אימונים כמו שילוב נתונים בתחום ומחוץ ממאמרים חדשות וטוויטים עם מטרה כללית וקשורים למשברים. חוץ מזה, אנחנו חוקרים את השפעה של קרובות גיאוספציאלית בזמן שאימון על אירועים קרובים או רחוקים מאירוע המטרה. בשימוש בחמש קבוצות נתונים שונות, הניסויים המרחבים שלנו מספקים תשובות לכמה שאלות מחקר קריטיים שימושיות לקהילת המחקר כדי לעודד מחקר בכיוון חשוב זה. לדוגמה, התוצאות מראות כי, לאימון מקום מזכיר מודל זיהוי, נתונים מבוססים בטוויטר מועדפים על נתונים למטרה כללית; and crisis-related data is preferred over general-purpose Twitter data.  Furthermore, training on data from geographically-nearby disaster events to the target event boosts the performance compared to training on distant events.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk Internet yang dipun kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno pangan iki ngono perusahaan anyar nggawe barang nggawe gerakan dengan kejahatan kanggo nggawe operasi pengguna-pengguna sing lihok Awak dhèwèké informasi sing perthi-perthi kuwi dianggap kanggo awak dhèwèké awak dhèwèké lan nganggep bantuan. Nanging, kabèh akèh sing tuwitik ora ono karo jeogras-informasi. Nang gunggo iki, kita kang dipun nggawe barang kelas kuwi alamat pisan mritik iki banget. Enter We istrage Multiple Learning settings like combing in- and out-domain data from new Artiles and General-goal and kriz-Relative politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngawe ngubah siwit dataset sing menyang, awak dhéwé éntuk akeh operasi sing ngomong gampang kanggo bantuan winih sing ngejaraké perusahaan kanggo kebebasan komunitas kanggo ngubah perusahaan winih sing dikarepaké iki. sample dadi sing perusahaan pamirno karo perusahaan kuwi data yang dipunangke Rusak-perusahaan Tulung, kudurunggu nggawe data mengko ajeng-jeogras kanggo langgar events sing dikarepaké perkaran kanggo langgar nggawe geranggap kanggo nggawe geranggap tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar events sing mengko yo.', 'bo': 'གོ་སྐབས་འགའ་བྱུང་བའི་དུས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཌིས་ཌིར་སྤྱོད་པ་དེ་ལ་གོ་སྐབས་གསར་པ་དང་དུས རྒྱུན་ཆད་པའི་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་གནས་སྟངས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་yanaབ་སྤྲོད་པར་གལ་ཆེན་ཡོད། However, most tweets do not come with geoinformation. ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་འཛམ་གླིང་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་དྲ་བ་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐུན་སྣ Specifically, we investigate the influence of different types of labeled training data on the performance of a BERT-based classification model. We explore several training settings such as combing in- and out-domain data from news articles and general-purpose and crisis-related tweets. Furthermore, we investigate the effect of geospatial proximity while training on near or far-away events from the target event. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ནས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཕན་ཚུལ་ལས། དཔེར་ན། གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་སྐབས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་སྐོར་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འཛམ་གླིང་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་པས། འོན་ཀྱང་། དབུལ་ཁྱིམ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་ལས་ཆོས་ཉིད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག་ཏུ་གྲུབ་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Regularized Attentive Capsule Network for Overlapped Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'شبكة كبسولة اليقظة المنتظمة لاستخراج العلاقة المتداخلة', 'es': 'Red de cápsulas atentas regularizadas para la extracción de relaciones superpuestas', 'fr': "Réseau de capsules attentives régularisées pour l'extraction de relations superposées", 'pt': 'Rede de Cápsula Atenciosa Regularizada para Extração de Relação Sobreposta', 'ja': '重複関係抽出のための規則化された注意深いカプセルネットワーク', 'zh': '以重取之正则化细心胶囊网络', 'hi': 'ओवरलैप्ड संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए नियमित चौकस कैप्सूल नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Регулярная сеть внимательных капсул для экстракции перекрывающихся связей', 'ga': 'Líonra Capsúil Aireach Rialta le haghaidh Eastóscadh Gaol Forluite', 'el': 'Ρυθμισμένο προσεγμένο δίκτυο καψών για την επικάλυψη εξαγωγής σχέσεων', 'it': 'Rete di capsule attentive regolarizzata per estrazione di relazioni sovrapposte', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Reguliuojamas aktyviųjų kapsulių tinklas, skirtas perteklinių santykių ekstrakcijai', 'hu': 'Szabályozott figyelmeztető kapszula hálózat a felfedett kapcsolat kivonásához', 'mk': 'Регулизирана мрежа на активни капсули за екстракција на прекриени врски', 'ml': 'വിലാസപുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വിലാസപുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള നിയമമായ ആത്മെന്റിവ് ക്', 'kk': 'Үлкен қатынастарды тарқату үшін үлгі қатынасыз капсул желі', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Regularizowana uważna sieć kapsułek dla ekstrakcji relacji nakładanych', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Kapsuli Attentivi Regolarizzati għall-Estrazzjoni ta’ Relazzjoni Sopra', 'sr': 'Regularizirana pozorna kapsulna mreža za preklapanje odnosa', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдсэн харилцааны гадагшлуулалтын хөгжлийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн капсул сүлжээ', 'ro': 'Rețeaua regularizată de capsule atentive pentru extracția relației suprapuse', 'sv': 'Regelbundet uppmärksamt kapselnätverk för överlappad relationsextraktion', 'so': 'Limited Attentive Capsule Network for Overlapped Relation Extraction', 'ta': 'மேல்லாண்டிய இணைப்பு வெளியீட்டுக்கான வழக்கமாக்கப்பட்ட காப்சுல் வலைப்பின்னல்', 'ur': 'اوپر لپ کے ارتباط اٹھانے کے لئے ریگالیٹ کاپسول نیٹورک', 'si': 'නියෝජිත සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය කප්සුල් ජාලය', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trung Úy mồ côi, khoa học, khoa học, khoa học, khoa học.', 'bg': 'Регуларирана мрежа от внимателни капсули за извличане на припокривани отношения', 'hr': 'Regularizirana pozorna mreža kapsule za preklapanje odnosa', 'nl': 'Geregulariseerd Attentief Capsulenetwerk voor Overlappende Relatie Extractie', 'da': 'Reguleret opmærksom kapselnetværk til overlappet relation ekstraktion', 'de': 'Regularisiertes aufmerksames Kapselnetzwerk für überlappende Beziehungsextraktion', 'ko': '중첩 관계 추출에 사용되는 정규화 주의 캡슐 네트워크', 'id': 'Jaringan Kapsel Atensif Regularised untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Terlapit', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Harplary Ýüklemek üçin Regularized Taýyn Kapşeli Aýry', 'sq': 'Rrjeti i Regularizuar i Kapsulave të Përqëndrueshme për Ekstraksionin e lidhjes së Mbështetur', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Tamko wa Kapseli uliothibitiwa kwa ajili ya kuondolewa kwa Kuhusiana', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Regularized Attentive Capsule Network for Overlapped Relation Extraction', 'az': 'Tərəfləndirilmiş İlişkilər Çıqarması üçün düzenli Attentive Capsule Network', 'bn': 'অতিরিক্ত রিলেশন এক্সট্র্যাকশনের জন্য নিয়মিত অ্যাটেন্টিভ ক্যাপ্সুল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'ca': 'Rede de càpsuls atentius regularitzatsper extrair relacions sobrepostes', 'bs': 'Regularizirana pozorna kapsulna mreža za preklapanje odnosa', 'cs': 'Regularizovaná pozorná kapsle síť pro extrakci překrytých vztahů', 'et': 'Regulariseeritud tähelepanuvõrgustik kattunud suhete ekstraheerimiseks', 'fi': 'Säännelty tarkkaavainen kapseliverkosto päällekkäisten suhteiden poistoon', 'jv': 'Attentive capsule Network', 'sk': 'Regularizirana mreža pozornih kapsul za ekstrakcijo prekritih odnosov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསུབ་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ', 'he': 'Name'}
{'en': 'Distantly supervised relation extraction has been widely applied in knowledge base construction due to its less requirement of human efforts. However, the automatically established training datasets in distant supervision contain low-quality instances with noisy words and overlapped relations, introducing great challenges to the accurate extraction of relations. To address this problem, we propose a novel Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) to better identify highly overlapped relations in each informal sentence. To discover multiple relation features in an instance, we embed multi-head attention into the capsule network as the low-level capsules, where the subtraction of two entities acts as a new form of relation query to select salient features regardless of their positions. To further discriminate overlapped relation features, we devise disagreement regularization to explicitly encourage the diversity among both multiple attention heads and low-level capsules. Extensive experiments conducted on widely used datasets show that our model achieves significant improvements in relation extraction.', 'ar': 'تم تطبيق استخراج العلاقة الذي يتم الإشراف عليه عن بُعد على نطاق واسع في بناء قاعدة المعرفة نظرًا لقلة متطلبات الجهود البشرية. ومع ذلك ، فإن مجموعات البيانات التدريبية المنشأة تلقائيًا في الإشراف البعيد تحتوي على حالات منخفضة الجودة مع كلمات صاخبة وعلاقات متداخلة ، مما يمثل تحديات كبيرة لاستخراج العلاقات بدقة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح شبكة كبسولة منتظمة اليقظة جديدة (RA-CapNet) لتحديد العلاقات المتداخلة بشكل أفضل في كل جملة غير رسمية. لاكتشاف ميزات علاقة متعددة في حالة ما ، قمنا بتضمين الانتباه متعدد الرؤوس في شبكة الكبسولة مثل الكبسولات منخفضة المستوى ، حيث يعمل طرح كيانين كشكل جديد من استعلام العلاقة لتحديد الميزات البارزة بغض النظر عن مواقعهم. لمزيد من التمييز بين ميزات العلاقة المتداخلة ، فإننا نبتكر تسوية الخلاف لتشجيع التنوع بشكل صريح بين كل من رؤوس الانتباه المتعددة والكبسولات منخفضة المستوى. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة التي أجريت على مجموعات البيانات المستخدمة على نطاق واسع أن نموذجنا يحقق تحسينات كبيرة في استخراج العلاقة.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations supervisées à distance a été largement appliquée dans la construction de bases de connaissances en raison de sa moindre nécessité d'efforts humains. Cependant, les ensembles de données d'entraînement automatiquement établis dans la supervision à distance contiennent des instances de faible qualité avec des mots bruités et des relations qui se chevauchent, ce qui pose de grands défis pour l'extraction précise des relations. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un nouveau réseau de capsules attentives régularisées (RA-CAPnet) afin de mieux identifier les relations fortement chevauchantes dans chaque phrase informelle. Pour découvrir plusieurs caractéristiques de relation dans une instance, nous intégrons l'attention multi-têtes dans le réseau de capsules sous forme de capsules de bas niveau, où la soustraction de deux entités agit comme une nouvelle forme de requête de relation pour sélectionner des entités saillantes indépendamment de leur position. Pour discriminer davantage les caractéristiques des relations qui se chevauchent, nous concevons une régularisation des désaccords pour encourager explicitement la diversité entre les têtes d'attention multiples et les capsules de bas niveau. Des expériences approfondies menées sur des ensembles de données largement utilisés montrent que notre modèle apporte des améliorations significatives en matière d'extraction de relations.", 'pt': 'A extração de relações supervisionada à distância tem sido amplamente aplicada na construção de bases de conhecimento devido à sua menor exigência de esforços humanos. No entanto, os conjuntos de dados de treinamento estabelecidos automaticamente em supervisão à distância contêm instâncias de baixa qualidade com palavras ruidosas e relações sobrepostas, apresentando grandes desafios para a extração precisa das relações. Para resolver esse problema, propomos uma nova Rede Cápsula Atentiva Regularizada (RA-CapNet) para identificar melhor as relações altamente sobrepostas em cada frase informal. Para descobrir vários recursos de relação em uma instância, incorporamos a atenção de várias cabeças na rede de cápsulas como as cápsulas de baixo nível, onde a subtração de duas entidades atua como uma nova forma de consulta de relação para selecionar recursos salientes, independentemente de suas posições. Para discriminar ainda mais as características de relação sobrepostas, desenvolvemos a regularização de desacordo para encorajar explicitamente a diversidade entre as múltiplas cabeças de atenção e cápsulas de baixo nível. Extensos experimentos conduzidos em conjuntos de dados amplamente utilizados mostram que nosso modelo alcança melhorias significativas na extração de relações.', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia se ha aplicado ampliamente en la construcción de bases de conocimiento debido a que requiere menos esfuerzos humanos. Sin embargo, los conjuntos de datos de capacitación establecidos automáticamente en la supervisión a distancia contienen instancias de baja calidad con palabras ruidosas y relaciones superpuestas, lo que presenta grandes desafíos para la extracción precisa de las relaciones. Para abordar este problema, proponemos una novedosa Red de Cápsulas Atentas Regularizadas (RA-CapNet) para identificar mejor las relaciones altamente superpuestas en cada oración informal. Para descubrir características de relación múltiple en una instancia, incorporamos la atención de múltiples cabezales en la red de cápsulas como las cápsulas de bajo nivel, donde la resta de dos entidades actúa como una nueva forma de consulta de relación para seleccionar las características sobresalientes independientemente de sus posiciones. Para discriminar aún más las características de las relaciones superpuestas, diseñamos la regularización de desacuerdos para fomentar explícitamente la diversidad entre los cabezales de atención múltiples y las cápsulas de bajo nivel. Los extensos experimentos realizados en conjuntos de datos ampliamente utilizados muestran que nuestro modelo logra mejoras significativas en la extracción de relaciones.', 'ja': '遠隔監督の関係抽出は、人間の努力の要件が少ないため、ナレッジベース構築に広く適用されています。 しかし、遠隔監督で自動的に確立されたトレーニングデータセットには、ノイズの多い単語と関係が重なった低品質のインスタンスが含まれており、関係の正確な抽出に大きな課題をもたらします。 この問題に対処するために、私たちは、各非公式の文章で非常に重複した関係をよりよく識別するための新規のRegularized Attentive Capsule Network （ RA - CapNet ）を提案します。 インスタンス内の複数のリレーション機能を検出するために、低レベルカプセルとしてカプセルネットワークに複数のヘッドの注意を埋め込みます。ここでは、2つのエンティティの減算がリレーションクエリの新しい形式として機能し、位置に関係なく顕著な機能を選択します。 重複した関係の特徴をさらに区別するために、複数の注意ヘッドと低レベルのカプセルの間の多様性を明示的に奨励するために、意見の相違の規則化を考案します。 広く使用されているデータセットで実施された広範な実験は、当社のモデルが関連抽出で大幅な改善を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '远程督取由于人力,故已广泛应用于知识库构。 然远程监自建立训练数据集包低质量之实,有嘈杂单词重,为取巨挑战。 为此一新正则化胶囊网络(RA-CapNet),以善识非正句之高重。 以例见数事,以多头意为下胶囊嵌胶囊网络中,其二实减法充询新文,以择其尤,不问其位。 为更区别重叠,设分歧正则化,以明劝励多端、下胶囊之多样性。 博用之数集上博实验明,吾道之显进也。', 'hi': 'मानव प्रयासों की कम आवश्यकता के कारण ज्ञान आधार निर्माण में दूरस्थ रूप से पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण को व्यापक रूप से लागू किया गया है। हालांकि, दूर के पर्यवेक्षण में स्वचालित रूप से स्थापित प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट में शोर भरे शब्दों और ओवरलैप किए गए संबंधों के साथ कम गुणवत्ता वाले उदाहरण होते हैं, जो संबंधों के सटीक निष्कर्षण के लिए बड़ी चुनौतियों का परिचय देते हैं। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम प्रत्येक अनौपचारिक वाक्य में अत्यधिक ओवरलैप किए गए संबंधों की बेहतर पहचान करने के लिए एक उपन्यास रेगुलराइज्ड एटेक्टिव कैप्सूल नेटवर्क (आरए-कैपनेट) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक उदाहरण में कई संबंध सुविधाओं की खोज करने के लिए, हम कैप्सूल नेटवर्क में निम्न-स्तरीय कैप्सूल के रूप में बहु-सिर ध्यान एम्बेड करते हैं, जहां दो संस्थाओं का घटाव उनके पदों की परवाह किए बिना मुख्य विशेषताओं का चयन करने के लिए संबंध क्वेरी के एक नए रूप के रूप में कार्य करता है। ओवरलैप किए गए संबंध सुविधाओं को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए, हम स्पष्ट रूप से कई ध्यान प्रमुखों और निम्न-स्तरीय कैप्सूल दोनों के बीच विविधता को प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए असहमति नियमितीकरण तैयार करते हैं। व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले डेटासेट पर किए गए व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल संबंध निष्कर्षण में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Дистанционно контролируемое извлечение отношений широко применяется в построении базы знаний из-за меньших потребностей в человеческих усилиях. Однако автоматически созданные наборы данных для обучения дистанционному надзору содержат некачественные экземпляры со шумными словами и перекрывающимися связями, что создает большие проблемы для точного извлечения связей. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем новую Регуляризованную Внимательную Капсульную Сеть (RA-CapNet) для лучшего определения сильно перекрывающихся отношений в каждом неофициальном предложении. Чтобы обнаружить несколько признаков отношения в экземпляре, мы встраиваем многоголовое внимание в капсульную сеть как капсулы низкого уровня, где вычитание двух сущностей действует как новая форма запроса отношения для выбора основных признаков независимо от их положения. Чтобы дополнительно различать перекрывающиеся признаки отношений, мы разрабатываем регуляризацию разногласий, чтобы явно поощрять разнообразие как между множественными головками внимания, так и капсулами низкого уровня. Широкие эксперименты, проведенные на широко используемых наборах данных, показывают, что наша модель достигает значительных улучшений в извлечении отношений.', 'ga': 'Tá eastóscadh gaol atá faoi chian-mhaoirseacht curtha i bhfeidhm go forleathan i dtógáil bonn eolais mar gheall ar an riachtanas is lú a bhaineann le hiarrachtaí daonna. Mar sin féin, cuimsíonn na tacair sonraí oiliúna a bhunaítear go huathoibríoch i gcian-mhaoirseacht cásanna ar cháilíocht íseal le focail fhuaimiúla agus caidreamh forluiteach, rud a thugann dúshláin mhóra maidir le caidreamh a bhaint amach go cruinn. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo, molaimid Gréasán Aireach Rialta Capsúil (RA-CapNet) nua chun caidreamh an-forluiteach a aithint i ngach abairt neamhfhoirmiúil. Chun gnéithe caidrimh iolracha a fháil amach i gcás, rinneamar aird ilcheann a neadú isteach sa ghréasán capsúil mar na capsúil íseal-leibhéil, áit a bhfeidhmíonn dealú dhá eintiteas mar fhoirm nua fiosrúcháin caidrimh chun gnéithe suntasacha a roghnú beag beann ar a seasaimh. Chun idirdhealú breise a dhéanamh ar ghnéithe caidrimh fhorluiteacha, ceapaimid rialtacht easaontais chun an éagsúlacht a spreagadh go sainráite i measc ceannairí aird iolracha agus capsúil íseal-leibhéil. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing a rinneadh ar thacair sonraí a úsáidtear go forleathan go mbaineann ár samhail feabhsuithe suntasacha amach maidir le heastóscadh.', 'hu': 'A távolról felügyelt kapcsolatok kitermelését széles körben alkalmazzák a tudásbázis építésében, mivel kevésbé igényli az emberi erőfeszítéseket. Az automatikusan létrehozott távoli felügyeleti képzési adatok azonban rossz minőségű, zajos szavakkal és átfedő kapcsolatokkal rendelkező eseteket tartalmaznak, ami nagy kihívásokat jelent a kapcsolatok pontos kinyerésére. Ennek a problémának a megoldására egy új Regularised Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) javaslatot teszünk, amely jobban azonosítja a nagymértékben átfedő kapcsolatokat minden informális mondatban. Ahhoz, hogy egy példányban több kapcsolat funkciót fedezzünk fel, többfejű figyelmet ágyazunk a kapszula hálózatba, mint alacsony szintű kapszulák, ahol két entitás kivonása új kapcsolat lekérdezésként működik, hogy kiválaszthassuk a kiemelkedő funkciókat, függetlenül azok pozíciójától. Az átfedő kapcsolatok jellemzőinek további megkülönböztetése érdekében nézeteltérések szabályozását dolgozzuk ki, hogy kifejezetten ösztönözzük a sokféle figyelemfej és az alacsony szintű kapszula közötti sokszínűséget. A széles körben használt adatkészleteken végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentős javulást ér el a kapcsolatkivonás terén.', 'ka': 'ექსტრაქტურად დამართებული პრობლექციის ექსტრაქციაში უფრო დიდი გამოყენებული იყო ცნობიერების ბაზის კონტაციაში, რადგან ადამიანის უფრო მე მაგრამ, ავტომატურად განვითარებული მონაცემების შესახებ ძალიან დამატებული მონაცემების შესახებ უფრო კანგალიტიური მონაცემები აქვს სიტყვებით და ძალიან დამატებული შესახებით,  ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ პრობლემას პრობლემა რეგილურაციული ატენტიგური კაპსულის ქსელი (RA-CapNet) რომ უფრო უფრო დიდი განსაზღვრებული შესახებ ყოველ ინფ მაგალითად მრავალური შესახებ შესახებ შესახებ, ჩვენ უმრავალური შესახებ კაპსულის ქსელში კაპსულის შესახებ, როცა ორი ინტერტის გამოყენება ახალი შესახებ კითხვის ფორმა გადაიყენება სლიენტის ფუნქციების შესა უფრო მეტი დისკრიმინაციის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განსხვავება, ჩვენ განსხვავებული რეგილარიზაციის განსხვავებას დავიწყებთ, რომ განსხვავებას მრავალ გონიშვნელობის თავისთან და მარტი გამოყენებული ექსპერიმენტები, რომლებიც ძალიან გამოყენებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გამოყენებული მონაცემენტების კონფიგურაციაში მოდის,', 'kk': 'Адам жұмысының қажеттілігі төменгі сияқты болғанда, білім негізінде қатынау қатынасын қарастыру көбірек қолданылды. Бірақ, қашықтағы қашықтағы оқыту деректер бағдарламасында автоматты түрде орнатылған оқыту деректер бағдарламасында дыбыс сөздер мен қатынастар арқылы төмен сапалар бар, қатынастарды дұрыс тарқатуға көп Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, біз әрбір мәліметтік сөйлемелерде көп жақсы қатынастарды анықтау үшін жаңа түрлі қатынастарды қалаймыз. Мысалы, бірнеше қатынастық мүмкіндіктерді табу үшін, біз көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілік желіне төменгі деңгейіндегі көпшіліктер ретінде, екі нысандарды алып тастау үшін, олардың орындарына қарай, салиенттік мүм Көбірек қатынастың қасиеттерін таңдау үшін, біз қатынастығын түсініктіру үшін бірнеше қатынастың басы мен төмен деңгейіндегі капсулдардың қасиеттерін түсініктіру үшін құрамыз. Жалпы қолданылатын деректер жиындарында жасалған кеңейтілген тәжірибелер үлгіміздің қатынасы тарқату үшін маңызды жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Atskirai prižiūrima santykių gavyba buvo plačiai taikoma žinių bazės kūrimui dėl to, kad ji mažiau reikalauja žmogaus pastangų. Tačiau automatiškai parengtuose mokymo duomenų rinkiniuose, kuriuose vykdoma nuotolinė priežiūra, yra žemos kokybės atvejų su triukšmingais žodžiais ir sutampančiais santykiais, dėl kurių kyla didelių iššūkių tiksliam santykių išgavimui. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, siūlome naują reguliuojamų aktyviųjų kapsulių tinklą (RA-CapNet), kad kiekviename neoficialiame sakinyje būtų geriau nustatyti labai sutampantys santykiai. To discover multiple relation features in an instance, we embed multi-head attention into the capsule network as the low-level capsules, where the subtraction of two entities acts as a new form of relation query to select salient features regardless of their positions.  Siekdami toliau diskriminuoti tarpusavio ryšio ypatumus, mes parengiame nesutarimų reguliavimą, kad aiškiai skatintume įvairių dėmesio galvų ir mažo lygio kapsulių įvairovę. Išsamūs eksperimentai, atlikti plačiai naudojamuose duomenų rinkiniuose, rodo, kad mūsų modelis labai pagerina gavybos santykius.', 'mk': 'Оддалечено надгледуваното извлекување на односите е широко применето во изградбата на базата на знаење поради нејзиниот помалку баран човек. However, the automatically established training datasets in distant supervision contain low-quality instances with noisy words and overlapped relations, introducing great challenges to the accurate extraction of relations.  За решавање на овој проблем, предлагаме нова Регулизирана мрежа на активни капсули (RA-CapNet) за подобро да се идентификуваат високо прекриени односи во секоја неформална реченица. За да откриеме неколку карактеристики на односи во една инстанција, вградивме внимание со повеќе глави во мрежата на капсули како капсули на ниско ниво, каде што отстранувањето на двата ентитети функционира како нова форма на прашање за односи за да избереме основни карактеристики без оглед на нивните позиции. За понатамошна дискриминација на карактеристиките на прекриени односи, ние создаваме регуларизација на несогласувањата за експлицитно да ја охрабриме различноста помеѓу повеќето глави на внимание и капсулите на ниско ниво. Експериментите спроведени на широко употребени податоци покажуваат дека нашиот модел постигнува значителни подобрувања во односот на екстракцијата.', 'it': "L'estrazione di relazioni supervisionate a distanza è stata ampiamente applicata nella costruzione della base di conoscenza a causa del suo minore requisito di sforzi umani. Tuttavia, i set di dati di formazione stabiliti automaticamente nella supervisione a distanza contengono istanze di bassa qualità con parole rumorose e relazioni sovrapposte, introducendo grandi sfide per l'estrazione accurata delle relazioni. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo una nuova Rete Regolarizzata di Capsule Attentive (RA-CapNet) per identificare meglio le relazioni altamente sovrapposte in ogni frase informale. Per scoprire più caratteristiche di relazione in un'istanza, integriamo l'attenzione multi-testa nella rete delle capsule come capsule di basso livello, dove la sottrazione di due entità agisce come una nuova forma di query di relazione per selezionare caratteristiche salienti indipendentemente dalla loro posizione. Per discriminare ulteriormente le caratteristiche di relazione sovrapposte, elaboriamo la regolarizzazione del disaccordo per incoraggiare esplicitamente la diversità tra le teste di attenzione multiple e le capsule di basso livello. Esperimenti approfonditi condotti su set di dati ampiamente utilizzati dimostrano che il nostro modello raggiunge miglioramenti significativi nell'estrazione delle relazioni.", 'el': 'Η εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή σχέσεων έχει εφαρμοστεί ευρέως στην κατασκευή βάσεων γνώσης λόγω της λιγότερης απαίτησής της για ανθρώπινες προσπάθειες. Ωστόσο, τα αυτόματα καθιερωμένα σύνολα δεδομένων κατάρτισης σε απομακρυσμένη εποπτεία περιέχουν περιπτώσεις χαμηλής ποιότητας με θορυβώδεις λέξεις και επικαλυπτόμενες σχέσεις, θέτοντας μεγάλες προκλήσεις στην ακριβή εξαγωγή των σχέσεων. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε ένα νέο Ρυθμισμένο Δίκτυο Προσεκτικής Κάψου (RA-CapNet) για τον καλύτερο προσδιορισμό των ιδιαίτερα επικαλυπτόμενων σχέσεων σε κάθε άτυπη πρόταση. Για να ανακαλύψουμε πολλαπλά χαρακτηριστικά σχέσης σε μια περίπτωση, ενσωματώνουμε την προσοχή πολλών κεφαλών στο δίκτυο κάψουλας ως κάψουλες χαμηλού επιπέδου, όπου η αφαίρεση δύο οντοτήτων λειτουργεί ως μια νέα μορφή ερωτήματος σχέσης για να επιλέξετε σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά ανεξάρτητα από τις θέσεις τους. Για να διακρίνουμε περαιτέρω τα επικαλυπτόμενα χαρακτηριστικά σχέσεων, σχεδιάζουμε την κανονιστική ρύθμιση διαφωνίας για να ενθαρρύνουμε ρητά την ποικιλομορφία τόσο μεταξύ των πολλαπλών κεφαλιών προσοχής όσο και των κάψουλων χαμηλού επιπέδου. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα που διεξήχθησαν σε ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενα σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ ആവശ്യമില്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d വിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധം  എന്നാലും ദൂരത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്വയം സ്ഥാപിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുകളില്\u200d ശബ്ദവാക്ക ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നിയമപരമായ ആറ്റെന്റിവ് ക്യാപ്സുള്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് (RA-CapNet) പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ  ഒരു ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്യാപ്സുല്\u200d നെറ്റിലേക്ക് പല തലയില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തെത്ത To further discriminate overlapped relation features, we devise disagreement regularization to explicitly encourage the diversity among both multiple attention heads and low-level capsules.  വിശാലമായ ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നടത്തിയ വിശേഷ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний шаардлагатай бага шаардлагатай учраас, мэдлэг суурь бүтээлд хол холбоотой харилцаа хадгалах нь маш их хэрэглэгдсэн. Гэвч холын харилцаанд автоматжуулсан сургалтын өгөгдлийн сангууд нь дуу дуу үг болон дундуур харилцаанд бага чадвартай байдаг. Харин харилцааны шууд гаргах нь маш олон сорилтуудыг бий болгодог. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид шинэ шинэ санал болгож, заримдаа өгүүлбэр бүрийн хамааралтай байдлыг илүү тодорхойлж чадна. Жишээлбэл олон харилцааны чадварыг олохын тулд бид олон толгой анхаарлыг капсулын сүлжээнд бага хэмжээний капсулын хэлбэрээр оруулдаг. Хоёр бүтээгдэхүүний хасах нь өөр харилцааны шинэ хэлбэрээр ажилладаг. Харин харилцааны харилцааны талаар илүү хуваалцахын тулд бид зөвшөөрөл байдлыг зөвшөөрөхөд олон анхаарлын толгой болон бага түвшингийн капсулын хоорондын ялгааг тодорхойлж чаддаг. Өнгөрсөн хэрэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн санд хийгдсэн олон туршилтууд бидний загвар нь хамааралтай хамааралтай сайжруулалт гаргаж чадна.', 'ms': 'Pengekstraksi hubungan yang diawasi jauh telah dilaksanakan secara luas dalam pembangunan pangkalan pengetahuan disebabkan keperluan kurang daripada usaha manusia. Namun, set data latihan yang ditetapkan secara automatik dalam pengawasan jauh mengandungi kejadian kualiti rendah dengan perkataan bunyi dan hubungan yang meliputi, memperkenalkan cabaran besar untuk ekstraksi yang tepat hubungan. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian Capsule Attentive Regularized (RA-CapNet) yang baru untuk mengenalpasti hubungan yang berlipat ganda dalam setiap kalimat tidak rasmi. Untuk menemukan ciri hubungan berbilang dalam satu contoh, kami memasukkan perhatian berbilang-kepala ke dalam rangkaian kapsul sebagai kapsul tahap rendah, di mana tolak dua entiti bertindak sebagai bentuk baru pertanyaan hubungan untuk memilih ciri-ciri penting tidak kira-kira kedudukan mereka. Untuk mendiskriminasi lebih lanjut ciri-ciri hubungan yang meliputi, kita merancang pengaturan ketidaksetujuan untuk secara jelas mendorong kebanyakan antara kedua-dua kepala perhatian berbilang dan kapsul tahap rendah. Extensive experiments conducted on widely used datasets show that our model achieves significant improvements in relation extraction.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji nadzorowanych na odległość jest szeroko stosowana w budowie bazy wiedzy ze względu na mniejsze wymaganie ludzkich wysiłków. Jednak automatycznie tworzone zbiory danych szkoleniowych pod odległym nadzorem zawierają instancje niskiej jakości z hałaśliwymi słowami i nakładającymi się relacjami, stwarzając duże wyzwania dla dokładnego ekstrakcji relacji. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy nową Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet), aby lepiej zidentyfikować wysoce nakładające się relacje w każdym zdaniu nieformalnym. Aby odkryć wiele cech relacji w jednym przypadku, osadzamy uwagę wielogłowicową w sieci kapsuł jako kapsułki niskiego poziomu, gdzie odejmowanie dwóch podmiotów działa jako nowa forma zapytania relacji, aby wybrać istotne cechy niezależnie od ich położenia. Aby dalej rozróżnić pokrywające się cechy relacji, opracowujemy regularyzację niezgodności, aby wyraźnie zachęcić do różnorodności zarówno między wieloma głowami uwagi, jak i kapsułkami niskiego poziomu. Obszerne eksperymenty przeprowadzone na szeroko stosowanych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasz model osiąga znaczące ulepszenia w ekstrakcji relacji.', 'sr': 'U izgradnji baze znanja široko se primjenjuje izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa zbog manje zahteva ljudskih napora. Međutim, automatski uspostavljeni podaci o obuci u daljinskom nadzoru sadrže niske kvalitetne slučajeve sa bukovim riječima i prekopunjenim odnosima, uvođujući velike izazove tačnoj izvlačenju odnosa. Da bi se riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo novu regulisanu pozornu mrežu kapsule (RA-CapNet) da bi bolje identifikovali veoma preklapne odnose u svakoj neformalnoj rečenici. Da bi otkrili višestruke funkcije veze, na primer, uključili bismo više glavnih pažnje u mrežu kapsule kao kapsule niske nivoe, gde oduzimanje dva entiteta djeluje kao novi oblik zahteva veze da bi odabrali salijente funkcije bez obzira na njihove pozicije. Da bismo dalje diskriminirali prekopunjene karakteristike odnosa, regularizirali smo neslaganje kako bismo objašnjavali raznolikost između višestrukih glava pažnje i kapsula niskog nivoa. Eksperimenti provedeni na širokom korištenom setu podataka pokazuju da naš model postiže značajne poboljšanje u odnosu na ekstrakciju podataka.', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni sorveljata mill-bogħod ġiet applikata b’mod wiesa’ fil-kostruzzjoni tal-bażi tal-għarfien minħabba l-inqas rekwiżit tagħha ta’ sforzi umani. Madankollu, is-settijiet tad-dejta tat-taħriġ stabbiliti awtomatikament f’superviżjoni remota fihom każijiet ta’ kwalità baxxa bi kliem storbjuż u relazzjonijiet sovrapposti, li jintroduċu sfidi kbar għall-estrazzjoni preċiża tar-relazzjonijiet. Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a, qed nipproponu Netwerk ġdid ta’ Kapsuli Attenzivi Regolarizzati (RA-CapNet) biex jidentifikaw a ħjar relazzjonijiet maqsuma ħafna f’kull sentenza informali. Biex niskopru karatteristiċi ta’ relazzjoni multipla f’każ, a ħna inkorporajna attenzjoni b’ħafna ras fin-netwerk tal-kapsuli bħala kapsuli ta’ livell baxx, fejn it-tnaqqis ta’ żewġ entitajiet jaġixxi bħala form a ġdida ta’ mistoqsija ta’ relazzjoni biex nagħżlu karatteristiċi salienti irrispettivament mill-pożizzjonijiet tagħhom. Biex niddiskriminaw aktar karatteristiċi ta’ relazzjoni doppja, aħna nħejju regolarizzazzjoni ta’ nuqqas ta’ qbil biex inħeġġu espliċitament id-diversità kemm fost ir-ras multipli ta’ attenzjoni kif ukoll bejn il-kapsuli ta’ livell baxx. Esperimenti estensivi mwettqa fuq settijiet ta’ dejta użati ħafna juru li l-mudell tagħna jikseb titjib sinifikanti fir-rigward tal-estrazzjoni.', 'no': 'Avstanden oversikt av utpakking av relasjonar har blitt brukt i kunnskapsbasekonstruksjonen i grunn av mindre krev for menneske forsøk. Den automatisk oppretta opplæringsdatasetta i distant oversikt inneheld låg kvalitetsinnstillingar med støy ord og overlappene relasjonar, som introduserer stor utfordringar til den nøyaktige utpakkinga av relasjonar. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi eit nytt regulert attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) for å bestemme å identifisera stort overlappt forhold i kvar informalt setning. For å oppdaga fleire relasjonsfunksjonar i eit eksempel, innebyr vi fleire hovudmerksomhet i kapsulnettverket som dei låge nivåkapsulane, der subtraksjonen av to einingar fungerer som ein ny form av relasjonsspørjing for å velja salientfunksjonar uavhengig av posisjonane sine. For å meir diskriminere overlappene relasjonsfunksjonar, finn vi regularisasjon av forskjellighet for å uttrykke ulikheten blant både fleire oppmerksomhetskoff og låg nivåkapsular. Ekstra eksperimenter gjennomført på breidde brukte datasett viser at modellen vårt gjennomfører signifikante forbetringar i utpakking av relasjonar.', 'ro': 'Extracția relațiilor supravegheate la distanță a fost aplicată pe scară largă în construcția bazei de cunoștințe datorită cerinței sale mai mici de eforturi umane. Cu toate acestea, seturile de date instruite automat în supravegherea la distanță conțin instanțe de calitate scăzută cu cuvinte zgomotoase și relații suprapuse, introducând mari provocări pentru extragerea corectă a relațiilor. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem o nouă Rețea de Capsule Atenționale Regularizate (RA-CapNet) pentru a identifica mai bine relațiile foarte suprapuse în fiecare propoziție informală. Pentru a descoperi mai multe caracteristici de relație într-o instanță, încorporăm atenția multi-cap în rețeaua de capsule ca capsule de nivel scăzut, unde scăderea a două entități acționează ca o nouă formă de interogare de relație pentru a selecta caracteristici principale indiferent de poziția lor. Pentru a discrimina în continuare caracteristicile relației suprapuse, concepem regularizarea dezacordului pentru a încuraja în mod explicit diversitatea atât între capete multiple de atenție, cât și între capsule de nivel scăzut. Experimentele extinse efectuate pe seturi de date utilizate pe scară largă arată că modelul nostru obține îmbunătățiri semnificative în extragerea relațiilor.', 'so': 'Magaalada laga ilaaliyo soo bixinta xiriirka waxaa lagu codsaday dhismaha aasaaska aqoonta sababtoo ah ugu yaraan baahida dadaalka dadka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee kooxaha waxbarashada ee meel fog lagu ilaaliyo waxay ku jiraan meelo hoos u ah oo ay ku jiraan hadal qaylo ah iyo xiriir aad u kala duduwan, waxaana soo saaraya dhibaatooyin badan oo si saxda ah u soo bixinta xiriirka. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa warqad Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) si aad ugu fiican u caddeyno xiriir aad u overlooked si kasta oo rasmi ah. Tusaale ahaan si a an u ogaano shuruudaha xiriirka kala duduwan, waxaan kaloo booqanay shabakadda madaxa badan sida shabakadda qasabka hoose, meesha lagu soo jiidana labada entiti waxay u shaqeeyaan sida foom cusub oo xiriir ah si aan u dooranno goobaha shaqaalaha, haba kastoo ay tahay meelahooda. Si aan u takooriso sharciga xiriirka kala duduwan, waxaynu u sameynaa qaynuunno kala duduwan si bayaan ugu dhiirrigeliyo kala duduwanta madaxa kaleba iyo kapsulaha hoose. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo lagu sameeyay sawirada macluumaadka oo ballaadhan lagu isticmaalayo waxay muuqataa in modellkayagu uu helo hagaajinta aad u weyn ee la soo bixiyo.', 'sv': 'Distansövervakad relationsextraktion har tillämpats i stor utsträckning i kunskapsbaskonstruktion på grund av dess mindre krav på mänskliga ansträngningar. De automatiskt etablerade utbildningsdatauppsättningarna inom fjärrövervakning innehåller dock fall av låg kvalitet med bullriga ord och överlappande relationer, vilket innebär stora utmaningar för en korrekt utvinning av relationer. För att lösa detta problem föreslår vi ett nytt Regularised Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) för att bättre identifiera mycket överlappade relationer i varje informell mening. För att upptäcka flera relationsfunktioner i en instans bäddar vi in multi-head uppmärksamhet i kapselnätverket som lågnivåkapslar, där subtraktionen av två entiteter fungerar som en ny form av relationsfrågor för att välja framträdande funktioner oavsett deras position. För att ytterligare diskriminera överlappade relationsfunktioner utformar vi en reglering av meningsskiljaktigheter för att uttryckligen uppmuntra mångfald bland både flera uppmärksamhetshuvuden och lågnivåkapslar. Omfattande experiment utförda på allmänt använda datauppsättningar visar att vår modell uppnår betydande förbättringar i relationsextraktion.', 'si': 'දුරටත් බලන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙනවා මිනිස්සු උත්සාහ කරපු අවශ්\u200dය නිර නමුත්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවෙන් ස්ථාපනයෙන් ස්ථාපනය කරපු ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සැටුම් දුරස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස වචන වචන මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට, අපි නියෝජිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, හැම නිර්මාණික වාර්තාවයක් තියෙන්න හොඳටම සං සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් හොයාගන්න, අපි කැප්සුල් ජාලයේ අඩු ස්ථාන කැප්සුල් වගේ විශේෂතාවක් හොයාගන්න, කැප්සුල් ජාලයේ අඩු ස්ථාන කැප්සුල් වග තවත් විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක්, අපි අවිශ්වාස නියෝජිත විශේෂතාවක් සැකසුම් කරනවා කිය විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තොරතුරු සේට් වල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජන', 'ta': 'மனித முயற்சிகளின் குறைவாக தேவைப்பட்ட காரணத்தால் தாங்கள் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பு பிரிவுகள் பெற்றுக் கொண்டு  ஆனால், தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பில் தானாகவே நிறுவப்பட்ட பயிற்சி தகவல் அமைப்புகள் சப்தமான வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் மேல்படுத்தப்பட்ட உறவுகள் உடன் குற இந்த பிரச்சினையை முகவரிக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதைய வழக்கமாக்கப்பட்ட காப்சுல் வலைப்பின்னலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு தொடர்பிலும் மிகவு எடுத்துக்காட்டில் பல தொடர்பு குணங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க, நாம் பல தலைப்பு கவனத்தை குறைந்த மட்டத்தின் காப்புலங்களாக முழுமைப்படுத்தினோம், அங்கு இரு பொருளின் கழித்தல் பு மேலும் மேலும் பிரித்த தொடர்பு குணங்களை வேறுபடுத்த வேண்டுமானால், நாம் வேறுபாடு வித்தியாசம் கட்டுப்பாட்டை உருவாக்குகிறோம். பல விரிவான பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளங்களில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சோதனைகள் தெரியும் நம் மாதிரி தொடர்பு பிரித்தலில் முக', 'ur': 'انسان کی کوشش کم کی لازم کے باعث دور کی نظارت کی تعلق اٹھانے کے لئے علم بنیاد میں پھیلا گیا ہے۔ However, the automatic training datasets in remote supervision contain low-quality instances with noisy words and overlapped relations, introducing great challenges to the accurate extraction of relations. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک نئی روزنامہ سنانے والی کاپسول نیٹورک (RA-CapNet) کو اچھی طرح پہچان دینے کے لئے ہر غیر غیر معلوم جماعت میں بہت زیادہ مکمل رابطہ کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ایک مثال میں بہت سی تعلقات کی تعلقات کا اظہار کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے کپسول نیٹ ورک میں بہت سی سروں کی توجه کو کم سطح کے کپسول کے طور پر رکھا ہے، جہاں دو واحدوں کی تعلقات کو نئی طرح تعلقات کے طور پر کام کرتی ہے کہ ان کی موقعیت کے بغیر کسی طرح سیلینسٹ کی اور اس سے زیادہ مختلف تعلقات کی تعلقات کا اختلاف کرنے کے لئے، ہم مختلف تعلقات کی تدبیر کررہے ہیں تاکہ مختلف مشورات کے سروں اور نیچے سطح کے کاپسولوں کے درمیان مختلف تعلقات کی تدبیر کریں. اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش جو گھیرے سے استعمال کیے گئے ڈیٹ سٹ پر چلتے ہیں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل اٹھانے کے معاملہ میں بہت اضافہ ہوتی ہے', 'uz': "Inson jarayonlarining qisqa kerakligi sababchi boʻyicha ilmiy asosiy ijodkori bilan boshqaruvchi aloqalarni boshqarish qoʻllaniladi. Lekin tashqari taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini avtomatik aniqlash mumkin holatdagi holatlarda qizil so'zlar va qo'llangan munosabatlar bilan qo'llangan holatlar mavjud. Ularni tashkilotni saqlash uchun juda katta muammolar qiladi. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz har bir haqiqida qoʻllangan kompyuterning tarmoqni aniqlash uchun qoʻllanmagan novel tarmoqda. Masalan, bir necha aloqalar xossalarini aniqlash uchun, biz qanchalik darajadagi qismi tarmoqga ko'p boshqaruvchiga qaramadik. Bu yerda ikkita obʼektlarni ajratish boshqa shaxsiyatlarni boshqarish imkoniyatlarini boshqa shaklga oshirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik munosabatlarni ajratish uchun biz bir necha ta'minlovchi boshqaruvni va kichkina darajadagi kapslerning tarqatishni ko'paytirish uchun bir necha ta'minlovchi qoidalarni tasavvur qilamiz. Koʻproq foydalanilgan maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kengaytmalar modelmiz murakkab chiqarish uchun juda muhim yaxshi o'tibor beradi.", 'vi': 'Cách hấp thụ mối quan hệ giám sát xa xôi đã được áp dụng rộng rãi trong việc xây dựng căn cứ kiến thức nhờ ít yêu cầu của con người. Tuy nhiên, hệ thống dữ liệu huấn luyện tự động được thiết lập trong sự giám sát xa xôi chứa các trường hợp chất lượng thấp với những từ ồn ào và quan hệ với nhau, tạo ra những thử thách lớn cho việc khai thác chính xác mối quan hệ. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng lưới dự luật mới (R-Caplse) mới được chỉnh sửa để xác định mối quan hệ vượt trội hơn nhiều trong mỗi câu chữ không chính thức. Để tìm ra các tính năng liên quan nhiều lần trong một trường hợp, chúng tôi nhúng sự chú ý đa đầu vào mạng tàu như những con nhộng lớp thấp, nơi việc trừ từ của hai thực thể hoạt động như một dạng liên quan mới để chọn các tính năng nổi bật bất kể vị trí của họ. Để phân biệt các tính chất liên quan khác nhau, chúng tôi lập ra các sự liên quan liên quan liên quan nhằm khuyến khích rõ sự khác biệt giữa các đầu tập trung và những con chim nhỏ. Những thí nghiệm dồi dào được thực hiện trên các tập tin phổ biến cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta đạt được những cải tiến quan trọng trong việc khai thác mối quan hệ.', 'bg': 'Извличането на отдалечено наблюдение на взаимоотношения е широко приложено в изграждането на база от знания поради по-малкото изискване от човешки усилия. Автоматично установените набори от данни за обучение при дистанционен надзор обаче съдържат некачествени случаи с шумни думи и припокриващи се взаимоотношения, което поставя големи предизвикателства пред точното извличане на взаимоотношения. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме нова регуляризирана мрежа за внимателни капсули (за по-добро идентифициране на силно припокривани отношения във всяко неформално изречение. За да открием множество функции на връзката в даден случай, ние вграждаме вниманието на няколко глави в мрежата на капсулите като капсулите на ниско ниво, където изваждането на две единици действа като нова форма на заявка за връзка, за да изберете видни характеристики независимо от позициите им. За да дискриминираме допълнително характеристиките на припокриваните взаимоотношения, ние разработваме регламентиране на несъгласията, за да насърчим изрично разнообразието между многобройните глави на вниманието и капсулите с ниско ниво. Обширни експерименти, проведени върху широко използвани набори от данни, показват, че нашият модел постига значителни подобрения в извличането на релации.', 'nl': 'Op afstand begeleide relatieontwikkeling is op grote schaal toegepast in kennisbasebouw vanwege de minder vereiste menselijke inspanningen. De automatisch opgerichte trainingsdatasets in toezicht op afstand bevatten echter instanties van lage kwaliteit met luidruchtige woorden en overlappende relaties, wat grote uitdagingen oplevert voor het nauwkeurig extraheren van relaties. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) voor om sterk overlappende relaties in elke informele zin beter te identificeren. Om meerdere relatiemerken in een instantie te ontdekken, integreren we multi-head aandacht in het capsulenetwerk als de low-level capsules, waar de aftreking van twee entiteiten fungeert als een nieuwe vorm van relatieverzoek om opvallende kenmerken te selecteren ongeacht hun posities. Om overlappende relatiemerken verder te discrimineren, ontwikkelen we een regularisatie van meningsverschillen om expliciet de diversiteit tussen zowel meerdere aandachtskoppen als low-level capsules aan te moedigen. Uitgebreide experimenten uitgevoerd op veel gebruikte datasets tonen aan dat ons model significante verbeteringen in relatie extractie bereikt.', 'da': 'Fjernbetjent overvåget relation ekstraktion er blevet anvendt i vid udstrækning i videnbase konstruktion på grund af dets mindre krav om menneskelig indsats. De automatisk etablerede uddannelsesdatasæt inden for fjerntilsyn indeholder imidlertid eksempler af lav kvalitet med støjende ord og overlappende relationer, hvilket medfører store udfordringer for den nøjagtige udvinding af relationer. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi et nyt Regularised Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) for bedre at identificere stærkt overlappende relationer i hver uformel sætning. For at opdage flere relationsfunktioner i et tilfælde integrerer vi opmærksomhed med flere hoveder i kapselnetværket som kapsler på lavt niveau, hvor subtraktionen af to entiteter fungerer som en ny form for relationsforspørgsel for at vælge fremtrædende funktioner uanset deres position. For yderligere at skelne mellem overlappede relationer træk, udtænker vi uenighedsregulering for eksplicit at fremme mangfoldigheden blandt både flere opmærksomhedshoveder og lavt niveau kapsler. Omfattende eksperimenter udført på bredt anvendte datasæt viser, at vores model opnår betydelige forbedringer i relation udvinding.', 'hr': 'U izgradnji baze znanja široko se primjenjuje udaljeno nadzirano izvlačenje odnosa zbog manje zahtjeva ljudskih napora. Međutim, automatski uspostavljene podatke o obuci u daljnjem nadzoru sadrže niske kvalitetne slučajeve s bukovim riječima i prekopćenim odnosima, uvođujući velike izazove to čnoj izvlačenju odnosa. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo novu regulariziranu pozornu mrežu kapsule (RA-CapNet) kako bi bolje identificirali visoko preklapane odnose u svakoj neformalnoj kazni. Da bi otkrili višestruke funkcije veze, na primjer, uključili smo multiglavnu pažnju u mrežu kapsule kao kapsule niske nivoe, gdje oduzimanje dva entiteta djeluje kao novi oblik zahtjeva veze kako bi odabrali salijantne funkcije bez obzira na njihove pozicije. Da bismo dalje diskriminirali prekopćene karakteristike odnosa, određujemo regularizaciju neslaganja kako bismo pojasno poticali raznolikost između višestrukih glava pažnje i kapsula niske razine. Prošireni eksperimenti provedeni na široko korištenim podacima pokazuju da naš model postigne značajne poboljšanje u odnosu na ekstrakciju podataka.', 'de': 'Fernüberwachte Beziehungsextraktion wurde aufgrund des geringeren Bedarfs an menschlichen Anstrengungen im Aufbau von Wissensgrundlagen weit verbreitet. Die automatisch erstellten Trainingsdatensätze in Fernüberwachung enthalten jedoch Instanzen von geringer Qualität mit lauten Wörtern und überlappenden Beziehungen, was eine große Herausforderung für die genaue Extraktion von Relationen darstellt. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neues Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) vor, um stark überlappende Beziehungen in jedem informellen Satz besser zu identifizieren. Um mehrere Beziehungsmerkmale in einer Instanz zu entdecken, betten wir Multi-Kopf-Aufmerksamkeit in das Kapselnetzwerk als Low-Level-Kapseln ein, wo die Subtraktion zweier Entitäten als neue Form der Beziehungsabfrage fungiert, um markante Merkmale unabhängig von ihrer Position auszuwählen. Um überlappende Beziehungsmerkmale weiter zu unterscheiden, entwickeln wir eine Unstimmigkeitsregularisierung, um explizit die Vielfalt zwischen mehreren Aufmerksamkeitsköpfen und Low-Level-Kapseln zu fördern. Umfangreiche Experimente an weit verbreiteten Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Modell signifikante Verbesserungen bei der Beziehungsextraktion erzielt.', 'id': 'Ekstrasi hubungan yang diawasi jauh telah diterapkan secara luas dalam konstruksi dasar pengetahuan karena kebutuhan manusia kurang diperlukan. Namun, dataset pelatihan yang dibuat secara otomatis dalam pengawasan jauh mengandung kejadian kualitas rendah dengan kata-kata bising dan hubungan yang meliputi, memperkenalkan tantangan besar untuk ekstraksi akurat hubungan. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah Novel Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) untuk lebih baik mengidentifikasi hubungan yang sangat meliputi dalam setiap kalimat informal. Untuk menemukan beberapa fitur hubungan dalam contoh, kami memasukkan perhatian multi-kepala ke dalam jaringan kapsul sebagai kapsul tingkat rendah, di mana pengurangan dua entitas bertindak sebagai bentuk baru pertanyaan hubungan untuk memilih fitur yang penting tidak peduli posisi mereka. Untuk mendiskriminasi lebih lanjut karakteristik hubungan yang saling meliputi, kami membuat regularisasi ketidaksetujuan untuk secara eksplisit mendorong kebanyakan antara kedua kepala perhatian berbilang dan kapsul tingkat rendah. Eksperimen luas yang dilakukan pada set data yang sangat digunakan menunjukkan bahwa model kita mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dalam ekstraksi hubungan.', 'ko': '원격 감독 관계 추출은 인공 조작이 필요하지 않기 때문에 지식 라이브러리 건설에서 광범위하게 응용되었다.그러나 원격 모니터링에서 자동으로 구축된 훈련 데이터 집합은 저질의 실례를 포함하고 이런 실례에는 시끄러운 단어와 중첩된 관계가 포함되어 있어 관계의 정확한 추출에 커다란 도전을 가져왔다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 비공식 문장마다 고도로 중첩된 관계를 더욱 잘 식별할 수 있도록 새로운 정규화 주의 캡슐 네트워크(RA CapNet)를 제시했다.하나의 실례에서 여러 개의 관계 특징을 발견하기 위해 우리는 여러 개의 주의를 저급 캡슐로 캡슐 네트워크에 삽입할 것이다. 그 중에서 두 실체의 감법은 새로운 관계 조회 형식으로 현저한 특징을 선택하고 그 위치가 어떻든 상관없다.중첩 관계 특징을 한층 더 구분하기 위해 우리는 의견 차이를 정규화하여 여러 개의 주의 머리와 저수준 캡슐 간의 다양성을 명확하게 격려했다.광범위하게 사용되는 데이터 집합에서 진행된 대량의 실험은 우리의 모델이 관계 추출에 있어 현저한 개선을 얻었다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'به دلیل نیازهای کمتر از تلاش انسان، ارتباط\u200cهای دور و دور تحت نظر قرار گرفته شده در ساختن بنیادی دانش عملی شده است. با این حال، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای آموزشی در نظارت دور به طور خودکار ساخته شده\u200cاند، حاوی instances\u200cهای کیفیت پایین با کلمات صوتی و رابطه\u200cهای زیادی است، که چالش\u200cهای بزرگی را با استخراج دقیق رابطه معرفی می\u200cکنند برای حل این مشکل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک شبکه کاپسول\u200cهای مواظب (RA-CapNet) روزنامه\u200cای که در هر جمله\u200cی معمولی ارتباط\u200cهای بسیار تغییر قابل تغییر داده شده را بهتر شناسایی کنیم. برای کشف ویژگی های تعدادی از ارتباطات در یک مثال، توجه چندین سر را به شبکه کاپسول به عنوان کاپسول های سطح پایین وارد می\u200cکنیم، جایی که برداشتن دو واژه به عنوان شکل جدید ارتباطی برای انتخاب ویژگی\u200cهای استراحتی بی\u200cنظیر از موقعیت\u200cهایشان عمل می\u200cکند. برای ویژه های ارتباطی بیشتر جدا کردن بیشتر، ما تغییر تغییر قانونی را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا بطور واضح تغییر بین کله\u200cهای متعدد توجه و کاپسول\u200cهای سطح پایین را تشویق دهیم. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای که روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای وسیع استفاده شده انجام می\u200cدهند نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما بهترین ارتباطات بزرگی را در انتقال ارتباط می\u200cرساند.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na utoaji wa mahusiano yasiyo ya moja kwa moja imetumiwa sana katika ujenzi wa msingi wa maarifa kutokana na hitaji dogo la jitihada za binadamu. Hata hivyo, seti za taarifa za mafunzo zilizotengenezwa automatically katika ufuatiliaji wa mbali zina matukio duni ya kiwango cha ubora na maneno ya kelele na mahusiano yanayozungumzwa, na kutangaza changamoto kubwa kwa utoaji wa mahusiano sahihi. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, tunapendekeza riwaya yenye utaratibu wa Mtandao wa Kapseli (RA-CapNet) kutambua mahusiano bora zaidi katika kila hukumu isiyo rasmi. Ili kugundua vipengele vingi vya mahusiano kwa mfano, tuliweka hisia za watu wengi katika mtandao wa kapseli kama kapseli za chini, ambapo uvunjifu wa vitu viwili vinafanya kazi kama namna mpya ya utafiti wa mahusiano kuchagua vipengele vya mauzaji bila kujali nafasi zao. Ili kuelezea vipengele vya mahusiano vinavyovuka zaidi, tunapanga utekelezaji wa udhibiti wa tofauti ili kwa uwazi kuhamasisha tofauti kati ya vichwa vingi vya habari na vifaa vya chini. Majaribio mengi yaliyofanywa katika seti za taarifa zilizotumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa zinaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unapata maboresho makubwa katika utoaji wa mahusiano.', 'af': "Afgeleë ondersoekte verhouding van uittrekking is baie aangepas in kennis basis konstruksie vanweë sy minder benodiging van menslike versoeke. Maar die outomaties geïnstalleerde onderwerp datastelle in afgeleë onderwerp bevat lae-kwaliteit voorbeelde met geluidige woorde en oorvloedige verhoudinge, introduseer groot uitdagings aan die presies uitvoer van verhoudinge. Om hierdie probleem te adres, voorstel ons 'n roman Regulariseerde Aansig Kapsulnetwerk (RA-CapNet) om beter te identifiseer baie oorvloedige relasies in elke onformele seting. Om veelvuldige verwanting funksies in 'n voorbeeld te ontdek, binne ons veelvuldige kop aandag in die kapsulnetwerk as die lae vlak kapsule in, waar die aftrekking van twee entiteite werk as 'n nuwe vorm van verwanting navraag om salient funksies te kies ongeag van hulle posisies. Om verdere diskriminasie oorvloedige verwantighede eienskappe te verskaf, het ons die verskillighede regularisasie voorstel om die verskilligheid onder veelvuldige aandagkoppe en lae vlak kapsule te verskaf. Ekstensiewe eksperimente wat op vaste gebruikte datastelle gedoen is, vertoon dat ons model betaling verbeteringe in verhouding van uitpakking bereik word.", 'tr': 'Adamlar çabalarynyň azajyk şartyna sebäbi, uzakdan gözleýän baglaşyklary tapylýan bilim esasy gurluşynda. Ýöne, uzaklarda gözetleýän maglumat sanatynyň otomatik bilen gurnalýan maglumat sanatynda gaty kynçylyk sözler bilen ýok ýagdaýlar bar we daşyk derejesi bilen gaty kynçylyklar çykýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, her resmi sözlemde örän iýtgeden Taýdaly Kapsul Aýry (RA-CapNet) täze bir romany toldurýarys. Örneğinde birnäçe baglaýyş özelliklerini tapmak üçin, köp kellämizi kapsul şebekesine a şak dereje kapsullar ýaly üns berýäris. Bu ýerde iki zatyň çykyşynyň täze bir baglaýyş şekli bolup salient özelliklerini saýlamak üçin işleýäris. Daha uzak düzümlenmiş baglaýyşyň özelliklerini çykarmak üçin, biz düzümlenmäge düzümlenmäge düzümlenmäge düşünýäris. Birnäçe üns kelli we düşük dereje kelläň arasynda näsazlygyny azaltmak üçin. Döwletlere ulanylan veri setirlerinde proverilen örän çykyş bilen baglanyşyklarymyzyň esasy gelişmelerini çykarýar.', 'sq': 'Distantly supervised relation extraction has been widely applied in knowledge base construction due to its less requirement of human efforts.  Megjithatë, të dhënat e trajnimit të vendosur automatikisht në mbikqyrjen e largët përmbajnë raste të cilësisë së ulët me fjalë zhurmëshme dhe marrëdhënie të mbishtypura, duke paraqitur sfida të mëdha për nxjerrjen e saktë të marrëdhënieve. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne propozojmë një rrjet të ri të Kapsulave të Përqëndrueshme të Reguliuara (RA-CapNet) për të identifikuar më mirë marrëdhëniet shumë të mbishtypura në çdo fjalim jozyrtar. Për të zbuluar karakteristika të lidhjes së shumëfishtë në një rast, ne përfshijmë vëmendjen e shumëkokës në rrjetin e kapsulave si kapsula të nivelit të ulët, ku heqja e dy njësive vepron si një form ë e re të pyetjes së lidhjes për të zgjedhur karakteristika të rëndësishme pavarësisht nga pozicionet e tyre. Për të diskriminuar më tej karakteristikat e lidhjes së kapërcyer, ne krijojmë rregullimin e mosmarrëveshjes për të inkurajuar shprehësisht diversitetin midis kokave të shumta vëmendjeje dhe kapsulave të nivelit të ulët. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara të kryera në grupet e të dhënave të përdorura gjerësisht tregojnë se modeli ynë arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme në lidhje me nxjerrjen.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነት በአውቀት መሠረት ላይ በተለየ ሰብዓዊ ድጋፍ የሚያስፈልገው ጥቅም ሆኖአል፡፡ ነገር ግን የራቀ ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን በጥሩ ቃላት እና ግንኙነት በተጨማሪው እና ግንኙነት እና በጥልቅ ግንኙነት ላይ የተመሳሰለውን ትልቅ ጥልቅ ጥቃት የሚያስፈልጋቸው ናቸው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ በየክፍሉ ክፍል ላይ የተዘጋጀ የአስቴትዊ ኮፕዩተር መረብ (RA-CapNet) የተሻለ ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ ብዙ የግንኙነት ምርጫዎችን ለማግኘት፣ የሁለት አካላትን ማነሳት ከስፍራቸው ምንም እንኳ ቢሆን አዲስ የግንኙነት ምርጫዎችን ለመምረጥ አዲስ መልክ የግንኙነት መጠቀም እንዲያስተካክሉ በብዙ ራስ-ራስ ተጠቃሚዎችን ወደ ካፕሊል መረብ አግኝተናል፡፡ በተጨማሪው የግንኙነት ምርጫዎች ለመለይ፣ የልዩ ልዩነት ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተስፋት በተጠቃሚ ዳታተሮች ላይ የተፈተና ተፈተናዎች እና ሞዴላያችን በአካባቢው ውጤት የሚያደርገውን ትልቅ ማድረግ እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'İnsan çabalarının daha az ehtiyacı olmasına görə uzaq təhlükəsizlik əlaqəsi çıxarılması elm üssü in şallarında genişləndirildi. Lakin, uzaq gözləmə təhsil qurulmuş təhsil verilənlərin istifadə edilməsi üçün səs sözləri və aşağılıq əlaqələri olan düşük kaliteli instalların içindədir, əlaqələrin doğru çıxarılmasına böyük çətinlikləri göstərir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, hər neformal sözlərdə çox çəkilmiş ilişkileri daha yaxşı tanıtmaq üçün yeni düzgün təşkil edilmiş Capsul Network (RA-CapNet) təklif edirik. Bir nümunədə çoxlu bağlantı özelliklərini keşf etmək üçün, çoxlu başlıq üzünü kapsul a ğına aşağı səviyyə kapsulları kimi yerləşdiririk. İki entitlərin əlaqəsini yeni bir bağlantı soruşması olaraq onların məqamlarına baxmayaraq seçirlər. Daha çox çətinlikli ilişkiləri təsdiqləmək üçün, müxtəlif fikirləşmək düzgünlüyünü təsdiqləmək üçün çoxlu təsirlərin başı və aşağı seviyyət kapsulların arasındakı müxtəlif fərqliyi təsdiqləmək üçün yaratdıq. Üstünlük istifadə edilən verilənlər qurularında işlədilən çox müxtəlif eksperimentlər modellərimizin əlaqələr qovuşduğu yaxşılıqların başına gələcəyini göstərər.', 'bn': 'মানুষের প্রচেষ্টার কম প্রয়োজনের কারণে জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক নির্মাণে ব্যাপক প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। তবে দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্থাপনিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের মধ্যে কণ্ঠ শব্দ এবং অতিরিক্ত সম্পর্কের এই সমস্যাটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি প্রত্যেক অবৈধ বাক্যের মধ্যে অত্যন্ত অতিরিক্ত সম্পর্ক সনাক্ত করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাস নিয়মিত অ্যাটেন্টি উদাহরণস্বরূপে বেশ কিছু সম্পর্কের বৈশিষ্ট্য আবিষ্কার করার জন্য আমরা ক্যাপসুলের নেটওয়ার্কে অনেক মাধ্যমের মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছি নিম্ন-স্তরের ক্যাপ্সুল হিসেবে, যেখানে  অতিরিক্ত সম্পর্কের বৈচিত্র্য বৈষম্য করার জন্য আমরা বৈষম্য নিয়ন্ত্রণ নির্ধারণ করেছি যাতে স্পষ্টভাবে বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে মাথা এবং  ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করা ডাটাসেটে বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে আমাদের মডেল সম্পর্কের বিনিময়ে বিশাল উন্নতি পায়।', 'hy': 'Հեռու վերահսկվող հարաբերությունների վերացումը լայնորեն կիրառվել է գիտելիքի հիմքի կառուցվածքի մեջ՝ մարդկային ջանքերի պակաս պահանջության պատճառով: Այնուամենայնիվ, հեռավոր վերահսկման մեջ ավտոմատ կազմակերպված ուսումնասիրության տվյալների համակարգերը պարունակում են ցածր որակային օրինակներ աղմկոտ բառերով և կապված հարաբերություններով, որոնք ներկայացնում են մեծ մարտահրավեր հարաբերությունների Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ՌԱ-Կապուլլային Կապուլլային ցանց (ՌԱ-Կապուլնեթ), որպեսզի ավելի լավ բացահայտենք ամեն անտեղյակ նախադասության մեջ բավականին կապված հարաբերությունները: Օրինակ բազմաթիվ հարաբերությունների առանձնահատկություններ բացահայտելու համար մենք բազմաթիվ գլխավոր ուշադրություն ենք ներառում կառուցվածքի ցանցում որպես ցածր մակարդակի կառուցվածքներ, որտեղ երկու անհատների հանումը գործում է որպես հարաբերությունների նոր ձև, որպեսզի ընտրենք կար Որպեսզի ավելի շատ խտրականում ենք հակադրված հարաբերությունների հատկությունները, մենք ստեղծում ենք անհամաձայնությունների իրականացումը, որպեսզի բացահայտորեն խրախուսենք բազմաթիվ ուշադրության գլխավորների և ցածր մակարդակի կապուլ Շատ օգտագործված տվյալների համակարգերի վրա կատարված մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակալի բարելավումներ է հասնում վերացման հարաբերության մեջ:', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions remotament supervisada s'ha aplicat ampliament a la construcció de la base de coneixements a causa del seu menys requisit d'esforços humans. No obstant això, els conjunts de dades d'entrenament establerts automàticament en supervisió remota contén casos de baixa qualitat amb paraules sorolloses i relacions sovrapposades, introduint grans reptes a l'extracció exacta de les relacions. Per abordar aquest problem a, proposem una nova xarxa de càpsuls actius regularitzats (RA-CapNet) per identificar millor les relacions altament sovrapposades en cada frase informal. Per descobrir múltiples característiques de relació en una instancia, vam incorporar atenció multicapsula a la xarxa de càpsules com a càpsules de baix nivell, on la subtracció de dues entitats actua com una nova forma de consulta de relació per seleccionar característiques salients independentment de les seves posicions. Per a discriminar més les característiques de relació sovrapposides, dissenyem regularizació del desacord per animar explícitament la diversitat entre els cabells múltiples d'atenció i les càpsules de baix nivell. Els extensos experiments fets en conjunts de dades amplament utilitzats demostren que el nostre model aconsegueix millores significatives en relació amb l'extracció.", 'cs': 'Extrakce vztahů s dálkou dohledem byla široce uplatněna v konstrukci znalostní báze kvůli menšímu požadavku lidského úsilí. Automaticky vytvořené výcvikové datové sady ve vzdáleném dohledu však obsahují instance nízké kvality s hlučnými slovy a překrývajícími se vztahy, což představuje velké výzvy pro přesnou extrakci vztahů. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme novou Regularizovanou Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet), která lépe identifikuje vysoce překrývající se vztahy v každé neformální větě. Chceme-li objevit více vztahových rysů v jedné instanci, vložíme vícehlavovou pozornost do kapsle sítě jako nízké úrovně kapsle, kde odečtení dvou entit funguje jako nová forma vztahového dotazu pro výběr významných rysů bez ohledu na jejich polohu. Abychom dále rozlišovali překrývající se vztahy, navrhli jsme regularizaci neshod, abychom explicitně podpořili rozmanitost mezi více hlavami pozornosti a kapslemi nízké úrovně. Rozsáhlé experimenty provedené na široce používaných datových sadách ukazují, že náš model dosahuje významných zlepšení v extrakci vztahů.', 'bs': 'U izgradnji baze znanja široko se primjenjuje udaljeno nadzirana izvlačenja odnosa zbog manje zahtjeva ljudskih napora. Međutim, automatski uspostavljene podatke o obuci u dalekom nadzoru sadrže niske kvalitetne slučajeve s bukovim riječima i prekopćenim odnosima, uvođujući velike izazove to čnoj izvlačenju odnosa. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo novu regulatornu pažnju mrežu kapsule (RA-CapNet) da bi bolje identificirali veoma preklapne odnose u svakoj neformalnoj kazni. Da bi otkrili višestruke funkcije veze, na primjer, uključili smo multiglavnu pažnju u mrežu kapsula kao kapsule niske nivoe, gdje oduzimanje dva entiteta djeluje kao novi oblik zahtjeva veze da bi odabrali salijante funkcije bez obzira na njihove pozicije. Da bismo dalje diskriminirali prekopćene karakteristike odnosa, regularizirali smo neslaganje kako bismo objašnjavali raznolikost između višestrukih glava pažnje i kapsula niskog nivoa. Eksperimenti provedeni na široko korištenim podacima pokazuju da naš model postigne značajne poboljšanje u odnosu na ekstrakciju podataka.', 'et': 'Kaugjärelevalve all olevate suhete kaevandamist on laialdaselt rakendatud teadmistebaasi ehitamisel, kuna see nõuab vähem inimjõupingutusi. Kuid automaatselt loodud kaugjärelevalve koolitusandmekogumid sisaldavad madala kvaliteediga juhtumeid, millel on mürakad sõnad ja kattuvad suhted, mis toovad kaasa suured väljakutsed seoste täpsele väljavõtmisele. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks teeme ettepaneku luua uus Regularised Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet), et paremini tuvastada väga kattuvad suhted igas mitteametlikus lauses. Mitme seose funktsiooni avastamiseks ühes eksemplaris lisame mitme pea tähelepanu kapslite võrgustikku madala taseme kapslitena, kus kahe olemi lahutamine toimib uue seose päringu vormina, et valida silmapaistvaid funktsioone olenemata nende asukohast. Et veelgi diskrimineerida kattuvaid suhteomadusi, kavandame lahkarvamuste reguleerimise, et selgesõnaliselt soodustada mitmekesisust nii mitme tähelepanu pea kui ka madala taseme kapslite vahel. Laialdaselt kasutatavate andmekogumitega läbi viidud ulatuslikud katsed näitavad, et meie mudel saavutab olulisi parandusi seoste ekstraheerimisel.', 'fi': 'Kaukana valvottua suhdetta on sovellettu laajalti tietopohjan rakentamisessa, koska se vaatii vähemmän inhimillisiä ponnisteluja. Etävalvonnan automaattisesti perustetut koulutusaineistot sisältävät kuitenkin huonolaatuisia tapauksia, joissa on meluisia sanoja ja päällekkäisiä suhteita, mikä asettaa suuria haasteita suhteiden täsmälliselle poimimiselle. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) -verkostoa, joka tunnistaa paremmin päällekkäiset suhteet jokaisessa epävirallisessa lauseessa. Löytääksemme useita suhdeominaisuuksia instanssissa upotamme monipäisen huomion kapseliverkostoon matalatasoisina kapseleina, joissa kahden entiteetin vähennys toimii uutena suhdekyselynä valittaessa merkittäviä ominaisuuksia niiden sijainnista riippumatta. Jotta päällekkäisiä suhdepiirteitä voitaisiin edelleen erottaa toisistaan, kehitämme erimielisyyksien säännöstelyä, joka nimenomaisesti kannustaa moninaisten huomiopäiden ja matalan tason kapseleiden monimuotoisuuteen. Laajat kokeet laajalti käytetyillä aineistoilla osoittavat, että mallillamme saavutetaan merkittäviä parannuksia suhteessa uuttamiseen.', 'jv': 'Dijejer-jejer diunting langkung wigatining punika dipunangé ning acara tindang punika dipunangé awak dhéwé nganggep kuwi tindakan uwong. Kampéné, akeh gunakake sistem dadi nggawe barang dumadhi kapan-kapan sing apik dadi, lan akeh dumadhi sing beraksi kuwi tindakan keamanan karo perkaraan sing gak dhéwé, iso nguasai perbudhakan sing apik dhéwé, mengko perbudhakan langkung dhéwé Rasané pergunakake boten iki, kita ngubah gunakake batir Regularibed Attentive capsule Network (R-capnet) kanggo dianggap bijine kapsul luwih dumadhi kanggo saben juara informal. Ombudhakan langkung dibutuhke perusahaan ing sampeyan example, kita embed multi-head ateng in the capsule network Genjer-genjer perusahaan langgar wigat ingkang dipun-ingkang dipun AllProgressBar', 'sk': 'Pri gradnji baze znanja se zaradi manjše potrebe po človeških prizadevanjih široko uporablja ekstrakcija odnosov na daljavo. Vendar pa samodejno vzpostavljeni nabori podatkov o usposabljanju v daljnem nadzoru vsebujejo nizko kakovostne primere s hrupnimi besedami in prekrivanjem odnosov, kar predstavlja velike izzive za natančno ekstrakcijo odnosov. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo novo Regularized Attentive Capsule Network (RA-CapNet) za boljše prepoznavanje zelo prekrivanih odnosov v vsakem neformalnem stavku. Da bi odkrili več funkcij relacij v primeru, vključimo večglavno pozornost v mrežo kapsul kot kapsule nizke ravni, kjer odštevanje dveh entitet deluje kot nova oblika relacijske poizvedbe za izbiro pomembnih značilnosti ne glede na njihov položaj. Za nadaljnjo diskriminacijo značilnosti prekrivanja odnosov smo oblikovali ureditev nesoglasja, da bi izrecno spodbudili raznolikost med več glavami pozornosti in kapsulami nizke stopnje. Obsežni poskusi na široko uporabljenih naborih podatkov kažejo, da naš model dosega znatne izboljšave pri ekstrakciji relacij.', 'ha': "An applied widely to an gina bincike na ilmi sabõda ƙaranci hajji na aikin mutum. A lokacin da aka daidaita data masu yin amfani da farat ɗaya a cikin oversyn mai nĩsa yana da wuri-nau'i da wasu misãlai masu sauri da mazaɓa da haɗuwa da rufe-faɗi, kuma yana ƙara masu kansalar masu girma zuwa masu fitarwa na tsari. To, in bayyana wa wannan muammãni, sai mu buƙata wani noveli wanda aka Regular AttAttent Data Net (Rad-capNet) dõmin ya fi canza gane mafi alhẽri ga haɗuwa da kuma mafi rufe cikin duk hukuman da ba'a sani ba. To, dõmin ka gane wasu masu husũma masu yawa, mun shiga masu ƙaranci masu ƙaranci zuwa jerin capsule kamar ƙarƙashin-daraja, a inda ƙarshen abubuwa biyu ke aikata kamar wata tsarin mazaɓa na tsarin da za'a zãɓi misãlai masu salawa, ingawa na wurin. To, dõmin Mu rarrabe wasu masu husũma da suka samu-samu, Munã ƙayyade taratibu-dabam dõmin Mu bayana wa'amar rarrabẽwa a tsakanin zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Cire masu shimfiɗa da aka yi samun a kan tsarin da aka yi amfani da shi mai yawa, yana nuna cewa misalinmu yana sãmun mafaniki mai girma a sami'anar sami.", 'he': 'החילוץ מערכת יחסים ששולטת מרחוק הופעלה באופן רחב בבניית בסיס הידע בגלל דרישתו פחות של מאמץ אנושי. However, the automatically established training datasets in distant supervision contain low-quality instances with noisy words and overlapped relations, introducing great challenges to the accurate extraction of relations.  כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזו, אנו מציעים רשת קפסולות משיכה רפובלית (RA-CapNet) חדשה כדי לזהות יותר טוב מערכות יחסים מוצפות מאוד בכל משפט לא רשמי. כדי לגלות תכונות יחסים מרובות במקרה, נכניס תשומת לב רבות ראשים לרשת הקפסולות כקפסולות ברמה נמוכה, שבו החסירה של שתי יחידות פועלת כצורה חדשה של חקירת יחסים כדי לבחור תכונות מפורסמים ללא קשר לעמדותיהם. על מנת להפריע יותר על תכונות יחסים מוצפות, אנחנו מתכננים ניתוח חוקי אי הסכם כדי לעודד באופן ברור את המגווון בין ראשי תשומת לב רבים וקפסולות רמה נמוכה. ניסויים רחבים ביצעו על קבוצות נתונים משתמשים רחוקות מראים שהמודל שלנו משיג שיפורים משמעותיים בהוצאה מערכת יחסים.', 'bo': 'ཐག་རིང་གི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ནས་དབྱངས་བསྡད་ནས་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཤེས་གཞི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་གཞི་ནང་སྤྱོད་བ འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐག་རིང་གི་ལྟ་རྟོག དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསླབ་ན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་གནང་། To discover multiple relation features in an example, we embed multi-head attention in to the capsule network as the low-level capsules, where the subtraction of two entities acts as a new form of relation query to select salient features regardless of their positions. གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཕན་མེད་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆ་བཤད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་ཆ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་གནད་དོན་དབྱིབས་དང་བཤད ལག་ལེན་པའི་ཆེ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་གིས་'}
{'en': 'Graph Convolution over Multiple Dependency Sub-graphs for Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'تحويل الرسم البياني على الرسوم البيانية الفرعية متعددة التبعية لاستخراج العلاقة', 'es': 'Convolución de gráficos sobre subgráficos de dependencia múltiple para extracción de relaciones', 'pt': 'Convolução de gráfico sobre subgráficos de dependência múltipla para extração de relação', 'fr': "Convolution de graphe sur plusieurs sous-graphes de dépendance pour l'extraction de relations", 'ja': '関係抽出のための複数の依存関係サブグラフ上のグラフ畳み込み', 'zh': '所取多赖子图图卷积', 'ru': 'Свертка графиков по подграфам множественных зависимостей для извлечения связей', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए एकाधिक निर्भरता उप-रेखांकन पर ग्राफ कनवल्शन', 'ga': 'Comhbhrón Graf thar Foghraif Ilspleáchais le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh', 'hu': 'Grafkonvoluláció többszörös függőségi algrafikonok között a relatív kivonáshoz', 'ka': 'გრაფიკური კონტულუცია მრავალური განსაკუთრებულობის სპეგრაფიების შესახებ', 'el': 'Σύγκλιση γραφήματος πάνω από πολλαπλά υπογραφήματα εξάρτησης για εξαγωγή σχέσεων', 'it': "Convoluzione del grafico su sottografi di dipendenza multipla per l'estrazione delle relazioni", 'kk': 'Қатынасын тарқату үшін бірнеше тәуелдік субграфиктерінің графикалық қисығы', 'mk': 'Графска конволуција над подграфите за екстракција на врски со повеќе зависности', 'ms': 'Penukaran Graf atas Subgraf Kebergantungan Berberbilang untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി പലതും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനുമേല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോള്\u200dഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Konverżjoni tal-Graff fuq Sottografi ta’ Dipendenza Multipla għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet', 'lt': 'Grafo konvoliucija dėl santykių ekstrahavimo kelių priklausomybių pografų', 'mn': 'График хамааралтай хамааралтын олон хамааралтай субграфик', 'sr': 'Konvolucija grafika preko višestrukih podgrafa zavisnosti za izvlačenje odnosa', 'ro': 'Convoluție grafică peste subgrafice de dependență multiplă pentru extragerea relațiilor', 'no': 'Grafikkonvolusjon over fleire avhengighetsundergraf for utpakking av relasjon', 'pl': 'Konwencja wykresu na podwykresach wielu zależności dla ekstrakcji relacji', 'sv': 'Grafkonvulution över flera beroende undergrafer för relationsextraktion', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්බන්ධ විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල', 'so': 'Qoraalka ku saabsan iskuulaadka u soo saarista', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு பெறுவதற்கான பல சார்ந்த துணை வரைபடங்களுக்கு மேல் வரைபடத்தின் தொகுப்பு', 'ur': 'رابطہ اخراج کے لئے چند اعتمادی زیر-گراف پر گراف کانولوٹ', 'uz': 'BogĘ»lamani ajratish uchun bir nechta qoĘ»llanish', 'vi': 'Thuyết trình kết nối với nhiều chữ phụ thuộc cho Lôi Đình', 'bg': 'Графика Конволюция над множество зависимости Подграфики за извличане на отношения', 'nl': 'Grafiek Convolutie over Meerdere Afhankelijkheidssubgrafieken voor Relatie Extractie', 'da': 'Grafkonvulution over flere afhængighedsundergrafer for relationsextraktion', 'hr': 'Konvolucija grafika preko višestrukih podgrafa zavisnosti za izvlačenje odnosa', 'de': 'Graphenfaltung Ă¼ber mehrere AbhĂ¤ngigkeitsuntergraphen zur Beziehungsextraktion', 'id': 'Graf Convolution over Multiple Dependency Sub graphs for Relation Extraction', 'sw': 'Graph Convolution over Multiple Dependency Sub-graphs for Relation Extraction', 'fa': 'تغییرات گراف بر زیر گرافهای بستگی برای اخراج ارتباط', 'tr': 'Görniş Açmak üçin bir näçe bağlylik Subgrafikleri üstünde', 'sq': 'Konvertimi i grafikut mbi nëngrafitë e varësive të shumta për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve', 'ko': '다상이자도에 기초한 도권적 관계 추출', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'সংযোগ বিনিময়ের জন্য বহুগুণ নির্ভর সাবগ্রাফের উপর গ্রাফ কনভোলেশন', 'bs': 'Konvolucija grafika preko višestrukih podgrafa zavisnosti za izvlačenje odnosa', 'af': 'Grafiese Konvolusie oor veelvuldige afhanklikheid Subgrafieke vir Verhouding Uitpak', 'cs': 'Konvoluce grafu nad více podgrafy závislosti pro extrakci vztahů', 'az': 'İlişkil Açırmaq üçün çoxlu bağımlılıq apa-grafikləri üzərində Grafik Konvolusyonu', 'hy': 'Գրաֆայի հակամարտությունը հարաբերության արտադրման բազմաթիվ կախվածությունների ենթագրաֆիկների վրա', 'et': 'Graafiku konvolutsioon seose ekstraheerimiseks mitme sõltuvuse alamgraafiku üle', 'fi': 'Kaavion konvoluutio useiden riippuvuuksien alikaavioiden yli relation poimintaa varten', 'ca': 'Convolució de gràfics sobre subgràfics de múltiples dependencies per extracció de relacions', 'he': 'שינוי גרפים על תו-גרפים של תלויות רבות לחיצת יחסים', 'sk': 'Konvolucija grafikona prek več podgrafov odvisnosti za ekstrakcijo relacij', 'jv': 'Graph Konvolution super Multiple dependance Sub-graphs for Relative extract', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Graph Convolution over Multiple Dependency Sub-graphs for Relation Extraction'}
{'en': 'We propose a contextualised graph convolution network over multiple dependency-based sub-graphs for relation extraction. A novel method to construct multiple sub-graphs using words in shortest dependency path and words linked to entities in the dependency parse is proposed. Graph convolution operation is performed over the resulting multiple sub-graphs to obtain more informative features useful for relation extraction. Our experimental results show that the proposed method achieves superior performance over the existing GCN-based models achieving state-of-the-art performance on cross-sentence n-ary relation extraction dataset and SemEval 2010 Task 8 sentence-level relation extraction dataset. Our model also achieves a comparable performance to the SoTA on the TACRED dataset.', 'ar': 'نقترح شبكة التفاف الرسم البياني السياقية عبر رسوم بيانية فرعية متعددة تعتمد على التبعية لاستخراج العلاقة. تم اقتراح طريقة جديدة لإنشاء رسوم بيانية فرعية متعددة باستخدام كلمات في أقصر مسار تبعية وكلمات مرتبطة بالكيانات في تحليل التبعية. يتم تنفيذ عملية التفاف الرسم البياني على الرسوم البيانية الفرعية المتعددة الناتجة للحصول على ميزات إعلامية أكثر مفيدة لاستخراج العلاقة. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة تحقق أداءً فائقًا على النماذج القائمة على GCN والتي تحقق أداءً متطورًا على مجموعة بيانات استخراج علاقة n-ary ذات الجملة المتقاطعة ومجموعة بيانات استخلاص العلاقة على مستوى الجملة مهمة 8 من SemEval 2010. يحقق نموذجنا أيضًا أداءً مشابهًا لأداء SoTA في مجموعة بيانات TACRED.', 'es': 'Proponemos una red de convolución de gráficos contextualizados sobre múltiples sub-gráficos basados en dependencias para la extracción de relaciones. Se propone un método novedoso para construir múltiples sub-gráficos utilizando palabras en la ruta de dependencia más corta y palabras vinculadas a entidades en el análisis de dependencias. La operación de convolución de gráficos se realiza sobre los múltiples subgráficos resultantes para obtener características más informativas útiles para la extracción de relaciones. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que el método propuesto logra un rendimiento superior sobre los modelos existentes basados en GCN, logrando un rendimiento de vanguardia en el conjunto de datos de extracción de relaciones n-arias entre frases y el conjunto de datos de extracción de relaciones a nivel de oración de la Tarea 8 de SemEval 2010. Nuestro modelo también logra un rendimiento comparable al SoTA en el conjunto de datos de TACRED.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma rede de convolução de grafos contextualizada sobre múltiplos subgrafos baseados em dependências para extração de relações. Um novo método para construir múltiplos subgrafos usando palavras no caminho de dependência mais curto e palavras ligadas a entidades na análise de dependência é proposto. A operação de convolução do gráfico é realizada sobre os múltiplos subgrafos resultantes para obter recursos mais informativos úteis para a extração de relações. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram que o método proposto alcança desempenho superior em relação aos modelos baseados em GCN existentes, alcançando desempenho de última geração no conjunto de dados de extração de relação n-ária de sentença cruzada e conjunto de dados de extração de relação em nível de sentença do SemEval 2010 Tarefa 8. Nosso modelo também alcança um desempenho comparável ao SoTA no conjunto de dados TACRED.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un réseau de convolution de graphe contextualisé sur plusieurs sous-graphes basés sur la dépendance pour l'extraction de relations. L'invention concerne un nouveau procédé pour construire de multiples sous-graphes en utilisant des mots dans le chemin de dépendance le plus court et des mots liés à des entités dans l'analyse de dépendance. L'opération de convolution de graphe est effectuée sur les multiples sous-graphes résultants afin d'obtenir des caractéristiques plus informatives utiles pour l'extraction de relations. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent que la méthode proposée atteint des performances supérieures aux modèles existants basés sur GCN, obtenant des performances de pointe sur l'ensemble de données d'extraction de relations n-aires entre phrases et l'ensemble de données d'extraction de relations au niveau de la phrase SeMeval 2010 Task 8. Notre modèle atteint également des performances comparables à celles du SOTA sur le jeu de données TACRED.", 'zh': '建一基于数赖子图上下文化图卷积网络,以取于关系。 立一用最短赖径中单词及恃解析中链接至单词以构数子图新法。 凡生成子图行图卷积算,以取有用者益多。 实验结果表明交叉句n取数集、SemEval 2010 Task 8句取数集上,优于见GCN,有强能。 吾形犹得与 TACRED 数集上之 SoTA 相当也。', 'ja': '関係抽出のために、複数の依存関係に基づくサブグラフにわたるコンテキスト化されたグラフ畳み込みネットワークを提案します。最短依存経路の単語と依存解析のエンティティにリンクされた単語を使用して複数のサブグラフを構築するための新たな方法が提案された。グラフ畳み込み演算は、結果として得られる複数のサブグラフにわたって実行され、関係抽出に有用なより詳細な機能を取得します。我々の実験結果は、提案された方法が、クロス文章n -アリー関係抽出データセットおよびSemEval 2010タスク8文レベルの関係抽出データセットで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成する既存のGCNベースのモデルよりも優れたパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。当社のモデルはまた、TACREDデータセットのSoTAと同等のパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'hi': 'हम संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए एकाधिक निर्भरता-आधारित उप-ग्राफ़ पर एक प्रासंगिक ग्राफ कनवल्शन नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। सबसे कम निर्भरता पथ में शब्दों का उपयोग करके एकाधिक उप-ग्राफ़ बनाने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि और निर्भरता पार्स में संस्थाओं से जुड़े शब्दों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है। ग्राफ कनवल्शन ऑपरेशन संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए उपयोगी अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण सुविधाओं को प्राप्त करने के लिए परिणामी एकाधिक उप-ग्राफपर किया जाता है। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि मौजूदा जीसीएन-आधारित मॉडल पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है जो क्रॉस-वाक्य एन-एरी संबंध निष्कर्षण डेटासेट और सेमएवल 2010 टास्क 8 वाक्य-स्तर संबंध निष्कर्षण डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है। हमारा मॉडल भी TACRED डेटासेट पर SoTA के लिए एक तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Предложена контекстуализированная сеть сверток графов по нескольким зависимым подграфам для извлечения отношений. Предложен новый метод построения нескольких подграфов с использованием слов в кратчайшем пути зависимости и слов, связанных с сущностями в анализе зависимости. Операция свертки графа выполняется над полученным множеством подграфов для получения более информативных признаков, полезных для извлечения отношения. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод достигает превосходной производительности по сравнению с существующими моделями на основе GCN, достигая самой современной производительности на наборе данных для извлечения перекрестного предложения n-ar и наборе данных для извлечения отношения SemEval 2010 Task 8 на уровне предложения. Наша модель также достигает показателей, сопоставимых с SoTA в наборе данных TACRED.', 'ga': 'Molaimid líonra comhthéacsaithe grafa comhthéacsaithe thar foghraif iolracha bunaithe ar spleáchas le haghaidh eastóscadh caidrimh. Moltar modh nua chun foghraif iolracha a dhéanamh ag baint úsáide as focail sa chonair spleáchais is giorra agus focail atá nasctha le haonáin sa pharsáil spleáchais. Déantar oibríocht comhrimh ghraif thar na foghraif iolracha a eascraíonn as seo chun gnéithe níos faisnéiseach a fháil a bheidh úsáideach le haghaidh eastóscadh gaol. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann an modh molta feidhmíocht níos fearr amach thar na samhlacha atá bunaithe ar GCN atá ann faoi láthair ag baint amach an fheidhmíocht úrscothach ar thacar sonraí eastósctha caidrimh nary tras-abairt agus tacar sonraí eastósctha gaol leibhéal abairte SemEval 2010 Tasc 8. Baineann ár múnla feidhmíocht amach inchomparáide leis an SoTA ar thacar sonraí TACRED freisin.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ კონტექსტუალურად გრაფიკური კონტულუციის ქსელის მრავალურად განსახულებული სპეგრაფიკების გარეშე. პრომენტის მეტი, რამდენიმე სპეგრაფიკების შექმნა, რომელიც სიტყვების გამოყენებათ ყველაზე კიდევ კონფიგურაციის გეზით და სიტყვების სიტყვები, რომელიც დასა გრაფიკური კონტულუციაციის მოქმედება შემდეგ მრავალ სპეგრაფიკური გამოსახულებელი ინფორმაციური ფუნქციების მიღება, რომელიც გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ პროგენტირებული პროგენტი უფრო მეტად გავაკეთებს GCN-დაბათი მოდელების შესახებ, რომლებიც გავაკეთებთ n-არი შესახებ ექსპრექციის მონაცემების შესახებ და semiEva ჩვენი მოდელი კიდევ შემდგომარებელი მონაცემების შესაბამისი მონაცემების შესაბამისი მონაცემებისთვის.', 'hu': 'Egy kontextuális gráf konzoluációs hálózatot javasolunk több függőségi alapú algrafikonon keresztül a kapcsolat kivonásához. Egy új módszert javasolunk arra, hogy több alábrát építsünk fel a legrövidebb függőségi útvonalon lévő szavakkal és a függőségi elemzésben lévő entitásokhoz kapcsolódó szavakkal. A grafikonkonzoluációs műveletet a kapott több algrafikonon végezzük, hogy a kapcsolat kitermeléséhez hasznosabb információs funkciókat kapjunk. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer kiváló teljesítményt ér el a meglévő GCN-alapú modellekhez képest, amelyek korszerű teljesítményt érnek el a keresztmondat n-áris kapcsolat extrakciós adatkészleten és a SemEval 2010 Task 8 mondatszintű kapcsolat extrakciós adatkészleten. Modellünk a TACRED adatkészleten található SotA teljesítményével is hasonló teljesítményt ér el.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα δίκτυο σύνθετων γραφημάτων πάνω από πολλαπλά εξαρτώμενα υπογραφήματα για εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Προτείνεται μια νέα μέθοδος για την κατασκευή πολλαπλών υπογραφημάτων χρησιμοποιώντας λέξεις στην συντομότερη διαδρομή εξάρτησης και λέξεις που συνδέονται με οντότητες στην ανάλυση εξάρτησης. Η λειτουργία σύγχυσης γραφήματος εκτελείται πάνω από τα προκύπτουσα πολλαπλά υπογραφήματα για να αποκτήσετε πιο ενημερωτικά χαρακτηριστικά χρήσιμα για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος επιτυγχάνει ανώτερες επιδόσεις σε σχέση με τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα που βασίζονται στο GCN επιτυγχάνοντας υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις στο σύνολο δεδομένων εξαγωγής διασταυρούμενων σχέσεων και στο σύνολο δεδομένων εξαγωγής σχέσεων σε επίπεδο προτάσεων. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει επίσης συγκρίσιμη απόδοση με το SOTA στο σύνολο δεδομένων TACRED.', 'it': "Proponiamo una rete contestualizzata di convoluzione dei grafici su più sottografi basati sulla dipendenza per l'estrazione delle relazioni. Viene proposto un nuovo metodo per costruire più sottografi utilizzando parole nel percorso di dipendenza più breve e parole collegate alle entità nel parse di dipendenza. L'operazione di convoluzione del grafico viene eseguita sui sottografi multipli risultanti per ottenere caratteristiche più informative utili per l'estrazione delle relazioni. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano che il metodo proposto raggiunge prestazioni superiori rispetto ai modelli esistenti basati su GCN ottenendo prestazioni all'avanguardia sul set di dati di estrazione delle relazioni n-arie cross-sentence e sul set di dati di estrazione delle relazioni SemEval 2010 Task 8 frase-level. Il nostro modello raggiunge anche prestazioni paragonabili al SotA sul set di dati TACRED.", 'kk': 'Біз бірнеше тәуелсіздік субграфиктерді қатынау үшін контекстуалды графикалық қисықтық желіне ұсынамыз. Тәуелсіздік талдауындағы мәтіндерге сілтейтін сөздер мен сөздердің ең қысқа тәуелсіздік жолында бірнеше субграфиктерді құру әдісі қолданылады. Графикалық қисықтық операциясы бірнеше ішкі графикалық ішкі графикалық түрлендіру үшін қатынау үшін пайдалы мәлімет мүмкіндіктерін алу үшін істейді. Біздің тәжірибелікті нәтижеміз, келтірілген тәжірибе, барлық GCN негіздеген үлгілердің n- артық сәйкестіктер тарқату деректер жиынының күй- жайындағы n- артық сәйкестіктер жиынына жұмыс істейтін нәтижесін көр Біздің моделіміз сондай-ақ TACRED деректер жиынындағы SoTA- мен салыстырылатын әрекеттерді жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome sukurti kontekstinį grafinių konvoliucijų tinklą, apimantį kelis priklausomybės pagrindu grindžiamus pografus santykiams ištraukti. Siūlomas naujas metodas, kaip sukurti kelis pografus naudojant žodžius trumpiausiu priklausomybės keliu ir žodžius, susijusius su priklausomybės analizės subjektais. Grafinio konvoliucijos operacija atliekama per gautus kelis pografus, siekiant gauti daugiau informacinių savybių, naudingų santykiams ekstrahuoti. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomu metodu pasiekti geresni rezultatai, palyginti su esamais GCN pagrįstais modeliais, kuriais pasiekti pažangiausi rezultatai įvairių sakinių n-ary santykių ekstrahavimo duomenų rinkinyje ir 8-ojo sakinio santykių ekstrahavimo duomenų rinkinyje. Our model also achieves a comparable performance to the SoTA on the TACRED dataset.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan rangkaian konvolusi graf terkontekstualisasi atas subgraf berasaskan dependensi berbilang untuk ekstraksi hubungan. Kaedah baru untuk membina subgraf berbilang menggunakan perkataan dalam laluan dependensi yang paling pendek dan perkataan yang berkaitan dengan entiti dalam huraian dependensi dicadangkan. Operasi konvolusi graf dilakukan melalui subgraf berbilang yang berasal untuk mendapatkan ciri-ciri maklumat lebih berguna untuk ekstraksi hubungan. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik daripada model berdasarkan GCN yang sedia ada mencapai prestasi-state-of-the-art pada set data ekstraksi hubungan n-ary kalimat salib dan set data ekstraksi hubungan SemEval 2010 Task 8 kalimat-tahap kalimat. Model kami juga mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan SoTA pada set data TACRED.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме контекстуална графска конволуциска мрежа над многуте подграфи базирани на зависност за екстракција на врски. Предложен е нов метод за изградба на повеќе подграфи користејќи зборови во најкраткиот пат на зависност и зборови поврзани со ентитетите во анализата на зависност. Операцијата за конволуција на графот се извршува преку резултатите на многуте подграфици за да се добијат поинформативни карактеристики корисни за извлекување на врските. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека предложениот метод постигнува супериорна резултат во однос на постојните модели базирани на ГНК кои постигнуваат најнова резултат на наборот на податоци за екстракција на крсторечени n-ари односи и наборот на податоци за екстракција на речениц Нашиот модел, исто така, постигнува споредлива изведба со СоTA на такредскиот податок.', 'mn': 'Бид олон хамааралтай субграфик дээр харилцааны хамааралтай график холбоотой сүлжээг санал болгож байна. Хамгийн богино хамааралтай хамааралтай зам болон хамгийн бага хамааралтай үгнүүдтэй холбогдсон олон субграфиктуудыг бүтээх шинэ арга зам санал болдог. График холбоотой үйл ажиллагаа олон субграфик дээр хийгддэг. Харин хамааралтай холбоотой илүү мэдээллийн боломжтой боломжтой боломжтой. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь өндөр үйл ажиллагааг GCN-д суурилсан загвар дээр нөлөөлөх үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байна. Н-р хэлбэрийн хамаарал өгөгдлийн сан болон SemEval 2010 Task 8 өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн хамаарал өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээс гаргах Бидний загвар мөн TACRED өгөгдлийн сангийн SoTA-тай харьцуулагдах үйл ажиллагааг олж чадна.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit kontekstualisert grafikkkonvolusjonsnettverk over fleire avhengighetsbaserte undergraf for utpakking av relasjonar. Eit roman metode for å konstruera fleire undergraf ved hjelp av ord i korte avhengighetsstig og ord som er lenke til einingar i tillesing av avhengighet er foreslått. Grafikkonvolusjonsoperasjonen vert utført over fleire undergraf for å få meir informativ funksjonar nyttig for utpakking av relasjonar. Eksperimentale resultat våre viser at den foreslåde metoden gjer høgre utvikling over den eksisterande GCN-baserte modelane som gjer tilstanden til kunstendige utviklinga på kryssetningsdata n-ary-relasjon for utpakkingsdata og semiEval 2010 Oppgåve 8-setningsnivå for utpakkingsdata. Modellen vårt finn også ein samanlikbar utvikling med SoTA på TACRED-datasettet.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കാര്യത്തിലുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് ക്യൂണല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിന് വേ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിലെ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പാര്\u200dസില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കളുമായി വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d സുബ്ഗ്രാഫ് നിര കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരമറിയിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനായി കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നിലവിലുള്ള GCN-അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള ജിസിനിലുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മെച്ചപ്രകൃതി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ Our model also achieves a comparable performance to the SoTA on the TACRED dataset.', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu netwerk ta' konvoluzzjoni tal-graffi kuntestwalizzat fuq sottografi multipli bbażati fuq id-dipendenza għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Huwa propost metodu ġdid għall-bini ta’ sottografi multipli bl-użu ta’ kliem fl-iqsar triq ta’ dipendenza u kliem marbut ma’ entitajiet fl-analiżi tad-dipendenza. Graph convolution operation is performed over the resulting multiple sub-graphs to obtain more informative features useful for relation extraction.  Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li l-metodu propost jikseb prestazzjoni superjuri fuq il-mudelli eżistenti bbażati fuq il-GCN li jiksbu prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fuq sett ta’ dejta dwar l-estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet n-ari b’sentenza trasversali u sett ta’ dejta dwar l-estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet f’livell ta’ sentenza SemEval 2010 Task 8. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb ukoll prestazzjoni komparabbli mas-SoTA fuq is-sett tad-dejta TACRED.", 'sr': 'Predlažemo kontekstualizovanu mrežu konvolucije grafika preko višestrukih podgrafa na osnovu zavisnosti za izvlačenje odnosa. Predlaže se nov metod za konstrukciju višestrukih podgrafa koristeći reči na najkraćem putu zavisnosti i reči povezanih sa entitetima u analizu zavisnosti. Operacija konvolucije grafika provedena je u rezultativnim višestrukim podgrafovima kako bi dobila informativne funkcije korisne za izvlačenje odnosa. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi metod postiže nadmoćnu funkciju nad postojećim modelima na temelju GCN-a koji postižu state-of-the-art performanci na komplektu n-ary odnosa o ekstrakciji podataka o prekršnoj rečenici i komplektu 8 rečenica o ekstrakciji. Naš model takođe postiže usporedbenu izvedbu sa SoTA-om na TACRED podacima.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy kontekstualizowaną sieć złączeń wykresów na wielu podwykresach opartych na zależnościach do ekstrakcji relacji. Proponuje się nową metodę konstruowania wielu podwykresów z wykorzystaniem słów w najkrótszej ścieżce zależności oraz słów powiązanych z podmiotami w parsie zależności. Operacja zwojenia wykresu jest wykonywana na wynikowych wielu podwykresach, aby uzyskać bardziej informacyjne funkcje przydatne do ekstrakcji relacji. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda osiąga wyższą wydajność w porównaniu z istniejącymi modelami opartymi na GCN, osiągając najnowocześniejszą wydajność na zbiorze danych ekstrakcji relacji krzyżowych i zbiorze danych ekstrakcji relacji na poziomie zdań SemEval 2010 Task 8. Nasz model osiąga również porównywalną wydajność do Sota na zbiorze danych TACRED.', 'ro': 'Propunem o rețea contextualizată de convoluție grafică pe mai multe subgrafii bazate pe dependență pentru extragerea relațiilor. Este propusă o metodă nouă de a construi mai multe subgrafii folosind cuvinte în cea mai scurtă cale de dependență și cuvinte legate de entități în analiza dependenței. Operația de convoluție grafică este efectuată peste mai multe sub-grafice rezultate pentru a obține caracteristici mai informative utile pentru extragerea relațiilor. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda propusă atinge performanțe superioare față de modelele existente bazate pe GCN obținând performanțe de ultimă oră în ceea ce privește setul de date de extracție a relațiilor n-are încrucișate și setul de date de extracție a relațiilor SemEval 2010 Task 8 la nivel de frază. Modelul nostru atinge, de asemenea, o performanță comparabilă cu SotA pe setul de date TACRED.', 'si': 'අපි සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ ජාලය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අධාරිත විදිහට ප විශාල විශාල විශාල විදිහට සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා වචනය සඳහා වචනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ස ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා වැඩි තොරතුරු  අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධා අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක තියෙන්නේ TACRED දත්ත සූද්ධානයේ SoTA එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් තියෙනවා.', 'ta': 'நாம் பல சார்ந்த சார்ந்த துணை வரைப்படத்தின் வலைப்பின்னலை தொடர்பு வெளியீட்டிற்கான துணை வரைபடத்தை பரிந்துரைக் சார்பு பகுதியில் உள்ள பொருள்களுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்ட சொற்களை பயன்படுத்தி பல துணை வரைபடங்களை உருவாக்க ஒரு புதிய முறைமை தொடர்பு பெறுவதற்கு பயனுள்ள பல துணை வரைபடங்களின் மேல் வரைபடம் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தற்போதைய GCN-அடிப்படையில் இருக்கும் GCN-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள கலை மாதிரியை மேலான செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது என்பது தெரியும்  எங்கள் மாதிரி TACRED தரவுத்தளத்தில் சோடாவிற்கு ஒப்பிட்ட செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakad ku saabsan xarunta ee ku saabsan meelo kala duduwan oo lagu xiriirayo. Waxaa la goynayaa qaab saxda ah oo aan ku dhisno sub-graf kala duduwan oo lagu isticmaalo hadal ku saabsan waddada ugu gaaban ku xiran iyo erayada ku xiran bogga baarlamaanka ku xiran. Waxqabadka qabsashada waxaa lagu sameeyaa sub-tallaabo badan, si aad u hesho faa’iido faa’iido badan oo la xiriira. Fashihiisa jirrabka ah waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay sameynayso wax ka sarreeya sameynta samooyinka ay jiraan GCN-based oo ku saabsan dhamaadka farshaxanka oo ku saabsan xafiiska ka soo bixinta xafiiska n-ary xiriirka iyo xafiiska xafiiska 8 xafiiska ka soo bixinta xafiiska xafiiska. Tusaaleheenna wuxuu sidoo kale ku helaa sameynta u eg SoTA oo ku qoran taariikhda TACRED.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett kontextualiserat grafkonvulutionsnätverk över flera beroendebaserade undergrafer för relationsextraktion. En ny metod för att konstruera flera undergrafer med ord i kortaste beroendesökväg och ord kopplade till entiteter i beroendetolkningen föreslås. Grafkonvulutionsoperationen utförs över de resulterande flera undergraferna för att erhålla mer informativa funktioner som är användbara för relationsextraktion. Våra experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna metoden uppnår överlägsen prestanda jämfört med de befintliga GCN-baserade modellerna och uppnår state-of-the-art prestanda på n-ary relationsextraktion dataset och SemEval 2010 Task 8 meningsnivå relationsextraktion dataset. Vår modell uppnår också en jämförbar prestanda med Sota på TACRED datauppsättningen.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک متوسط گراف کانولوٹ نیٹ ورک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں متوسط اعتمادی زیب-گراف کے ذریعے تعلق کے لئے. ایک نئی طریقہ بنانے کے لئے بہت سی زیب-گراف کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کلمات کو چھوٹے مسیر کے مطابق اور کلمات کے مطابق وابستگی پارس میں متصل ہوتے ہیں. Graph convolution operation is performed over the resulting multiple sub-graphs to obtain more informative features useful for relation extraction. ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ موجود GCN-بنیاد مدلکوں پر زیادہ عملکرد حاصل کرتا ہے جو کرس-sentence n-ary رابطہ استخراج ڈیٹ سٹ اور SemEval 2010 ٹاکس 8 sentence-level رابطہ استخراج ڈیٹ سٹ پر حاصل کرتی ہیں. ہمارا مدل بھی TACRED ڈاٹ سٹ کے ساتھ سوٹا کے ساتھ برابری کا کام پہنچا رہا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz murakkab chiqarish uchun bir nechta qo'llangan bir nechta qo'llangan sub-grafik tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz. Name Name Bizning tajribalar natijalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, taʼminlovchi usuli mavjud GCN-asosidagi sanalar holatini bajarish holatida bajarish imkoniyatini bajarishi mumkin va SemEval 2010 vazifa 8 ta'minlovchi bogʻ'liq maʼlumot bazasini bajarishi mumkin. Bizning modelimiz TACRED maʼlumotlar soTA haqida o'xshash bajarishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới bọc đồ thị có hình ảnh chụp nhiều chữ phụ thuộc về nhau. Một phương pháp mới để xây dựng nhiều tiểu sử bằng chữ trong đường dẫn độ phụ thuộc ngắn nhất và những từ liên quan đến các thực thể trong phân tích phụ thuộc được đề xuất. Hoạt động rối loạn đồ họa được thực hiện qua các tiểu sử rải rác Kết quả để có thêm các tính năng thông tin hữu ích cho việc tách ra quan hệ. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp n ày đạt được hiệu suất cao hơn so với các mô hình trên trên cấu trúc GCN đạt được hiệu suất tối tân về dữ liệu trích xuất liên quan n thập tự tử và tập tin dữ liệu phân tích về kết quả của Semkhai thác Semkhai thác A2. Mô hình của chúng tôi cũng đạt được hiệu suất tương đương với Soho trên bộ dữ liệu TARED.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме контекстуализирана графична конволюционна мрежа върху множество подграфики, базирани на зависимост, за извличане на релации. Предлага се нов метод за изграждане на множество подграфики, използвайки думи в най-кратък път на зависимост и думи, свързани с обекти в анализа на зависимост. Операцията за конволюция на графиката се извършва върху получените множество подграфики, за да се получат по-информативни функции, полезни за извличане на релации. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че предложеният метод постига превъзходни резултати в сравнение със съществуващите модели, базирани на GCN, постигащи най-съвременни резултати при набора от данни за извличане на напречно изречение n-арни релации и набор от данни за извличане на релации на ниво изречение Задача 8. Нашият модел също така постига сравнима производителност с тази на набора от данни.', 'nl': 'We stellen een contextualiseerd grafiekconvolutienetwerk voor over meerdere afhankelijkheidsgebaseerde subgrafieken voor relatieontwikkeling. Een nieuwe methode om meerdere subgrafieken te construeren met behulp van woorden in het kortste afhankelijkheidspad en woorden gekoppeld aan entiteiten in de afhankelijkheidsparse wordt voorgesteld. Grafiek convolutie operatie wordt uitgevoerd over de resulterende meerdere subgrafieken om meer informatieve functies te verkrijgen die nuttig zijn voor relatieontwikkeling. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode superieure prestaties behaalt ten opzichte van de bestaande GCN-gebaseerde modellen die state-of-the-art prestaties behalen op n-aire relatie extractie dataset kruiszinnig en SemEval 2010 Taak 8 zin-level relatie extractie dataset. Ons model behaalt ook een vergelijkbare prestatie als de Sota op de TACRED dataset.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår et kontekstualiseret grafkonvulutionsnetværk over flere afhængighedsbaserede undergrafer til relationsudvinding. En ny metode til at konstruere flere undergrafer ved hjælp af ord i den korteste afhængighedssti og ord knyttet til entiteter i afhængighedsparsen foreslås. Graf konvulution operation udføres over de resulterende flere undergrafer for at opnå mere informative funktioner nyttige til relation ekstraktion. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede metode opnår overlegen ydeevne i forhold til de eksisterende GCN-baserede modeller, der opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne på tværs af sætninger n-ary relation ekstraktion datasæt og SemEval 2010 Task 8 sætning-niveau relation ekstraktion datasæt. Vores model opnår også en sammenlignelig ydeevne med SotA på TACRED datasættet.', 'de': 'Zur Beziehungsextraktion schlagen wir ein kontextualisiertes Graphenfaltungsnetzwerk über mehrere abhängigkeitsbasierte Subgraphen vor. Es wird eine neuartige Methode vorgeschlagen, um mehrere Untergraphen zu konstruieren, die Wörter im kürzesten Abhängigkeitspfad und Wörter verwenden, die mit Entitäten in der Abhängigkeitsparse verknüpft sind. Der Graph Faltungsvorgang wird über die resultierenden multiplen Untergraphen durchgeführt, um informativere Funktionen zu erhalten, die für die Beziehungsextraktion nützlich sind. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode eine überlegene Leistung gegenüber den bestehenden GCN-basierten Modellen erreicht, die State-of-the-Art Leistung auf satzübergreifenden n-ären Beziehungsextraktionsdatensätzen und SemEval 2010 Task 8 Satz-Ebene Beziehungsextraktionsdatensätzen erzielen. Unser Modell erreicht auch eine vergleichbare Performance wie die SoTA auf dem TACRED Datensatz.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo kontekstualiziranu mrežu konvolucije grafa na višestrukim podgrafovima na temelju zavisnosti za izvlačenje odnosa. Predlaže se nov metod za konstrukciju višestrukih podgrafa koristeći riječi na najkraćem putu zavisnosti i riječi povezanih s entitetima u analizu zavisnosti. Operacija konvolucije grafa provedena se u rezultativnim višestrukim podgrafovima kako bi dobila informativne funkcije korisne za izvlačenje odnosa. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi metod postigne nadmoćne funkcije nad postojećim modelima na temelju GCN-a koji postignu postupak stanja umjetnosti na komplektu n-arhijskih odnosa o izvlačenju podataka o izvlačenju kroz rečenicu n-arhijskih odnosa i komplektu 8 rečenica o izvlačenju. Naš model također postiže usporedbenu izvedbu s SoTA-om na TACRED podacima.', 'ko': '우리는 여러 개의 의존 관계를 바탕으로 하는 하위 도면의 상하 문화 도면 볼륨 네트워크를 제시하여 관계 추출에 사용한다.가장 짧은 의존 경로의 단어와 의존 해석에서의 실체 링크를 이용한 단어를 이용하여 여러 개의 서브맵을 구성하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.생성된 여러 개의 서브맵에 대해 볼륨 연산을 실행하여 관계 추출에 유용한 더 많은 정보 특징을 얻을 수 있습니다.이 방법은 기존 GCN 기반 모델에 비해 문장 간 n메타 관계 추출 데이터 세트와 SemEval 2010 Task 8 문장 단위 관계 추출 데이터 세트에서 우수한 성능을 거둔 것으로 나타났습니다.TACRED 데이터 세트에서 우리 모델도 SoTA와 비슷한 성능을 실현했다.', 'fa': 'ما یک شبکه تغییرات گراف متوسط بر زیر گراف بستگی بستگی بستگی بستگی برای اخراج ارتباط پیشنهاد می کنیم. روش نویسی برای ساختن زیر گرافیک\u200cهای چندین را با استفاده از کلمات در مسیر کمترین بستگی و کلمات ارتباط به عنوان وابستگی در بررسی بستگی پیشنهاد می\u200cشود. عملیات تغییرات گراف بر روی زیر گراف\u200cهای متعدد انجام می\u200cشود تا ویژگی\u200cهای اطلاعات بیشتری برای استخراج ارتباط مفید باشد. نتیجه آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که این روش پیشنهاد بر روی مدل های زیادی که بر اساس GCN موجود است به رسیدن عملکرد هنری در ارتباط داده های خارج کردن مرتبط جمله n ارتباط مرتبط جمله n ارتباط مرتبط به جملهٔ n ارتباط مرتبط به جملهٔ n ارتباط مرتبط به جملهٔ ۱۸ مدل ما هم یک عملکرد قابل مقایسه با SoTA در مجموعه داده\u200cهای TACRED رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mtandao wa vuguvugu la picha kwa ajili ya picha mbalimbali zinazotegemea kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa mahusiano. Utawala wa riwaya wa kujenga picha mbalimbali kwa kutumia maneno katika njia fupi ya kutegemea na maneno yanayohusiana na vitu katika bunge la kutegemea. Operesheni ya mapinduzi ya Graph imeendeshwa kwa sababu ya picha mbalimbali za viungo vingi ili kupata sifa zaidi za taarifa zinazofaa kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa mahusiano. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hiyo inayopendekezwa inafanikiwa ufanisi wa ubora zaidi juu ya mifano iliyopo kwa msingi wa GCN inayofanana na kutekelezwa kwa hali ya sanaa kwenye seti ya utekelezaji wa taarifa za mahusiano na msingi na SemEval 2010 Mfano wetu pia unafanikiwa utendaji uliofanana na SoTA kwenye seti ya takwimu za TACRED.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një rrjet kontekstualizuar të konvolucionit të grafikut mbi nëngrafikë të shumta të bazuara në varësi për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve. Propozohet një metodë e re për të ndërtuar disa nëngrafikë duke përdorur fjalë në rrugën më të shkurtër të varësisë dhe fjalë të lidhura me njësitë në analizimin e varësisë. Operacioni i konvolucionit grafik kryehet gjatë nëngrafive të shumëfishtë që rezultojnë për të marrë karakteristika më informative të dobishme për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar arrin performancë më të lartë mbi modelet ekzistuese bazuar n ë GCN që arrijnë performancë më të lartë në grupin e të dhënave të ekstraksionit të lidhjes ndër-frazët n-ary dhe të dhënave të ekstraksionit të lidhjes me nivelin e gjykimit SemEval 2010 Task 8 sentence-level. Modeli ynë arrin gjithashtu një shfaqje të krahasueshme me SoTA në grupin e të dhënave TACRED.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n kontekstualiseerde graaf konvolusie netwerk oor veelvuldige afhanklikheidgebaseerde subgraaf vir verwanting uittrekking. 'n Nuwe metode om veelvuldige subgraaf te konstrukteer deur woorde te gebruik in kortste afhanklikheid pad en woorde gekoppel met entiteite in die afhanklikheid verwerking is voorgestel. Graaf konvolusie operasie word uitgevoer oor die resulteerde veelvuldige subgraaf om meer informatiewe funksies te kry wat gebruik is vir verwanting uitpakking. Ons eksperimentele resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metode superior effektuur verkry oor die bestaande GCN-gebaseerde modele wat die state-of-the-art effektuur aanvaar op kruisseting n-ary verhouding van uitvoerdatasset en SemEval 2010 Opdrag 8 setvlak verhouding van uitvoerdatasset. Ons model het ook 'n vergelykbare prestasie met die SoTA op die TACRED datastel bereik.", 'tr': "Bir näçe baglanyşyk çekmek üçin, näçe baglanyşyk-graflaryň üstünde, synplanlaşdyrylýan grafik konvolösiýasyny teklip edip bileris. Birden soňky baglanyşyk ýoldan soňra sözleri we baglanyşyk analyzisinde baglanýan sözleriň ullanarak gaty grafikler in şa etmek üçin roman yöntemi teklip edip görkezilýär. Grafik ködleme operasiýasy çykarmak üçin ullanylşy netijesinde birnäçe sub-grafikler üçin bir näçe informasiýa çykarmak üçin ullanýar Biziň experimental netijelerimiz görkezilýän çykyşlarymyz GCN tabanly nusgalarynda üst ýokary etkinlik gazanýandygyny görkez. Bizim modelimiz TACRED veri setindeki SoTA'yla daşyklaştırılabilir bir etkinlik başarıyor.", 'az': 'Biz müxtəlif grafik konvolusyon a ğını çoxlu bağımlılıq-tabanlı sub-grafələrindən uzaqlaşdırmaq üçün təklif edirik. Ən qısa bağlılıq yolunda sözləri və bağlılıq analizi ilə bağlı sözləri istifadə etmək üçün çoxlu sub-grafələri in şa etmək üçün yeni bir yol təklif edilir. Grafik konvolusyon işləri müxtəlif apagraflar üzərində işlədilir ki, əlaqələr çıxarmaq üçün faydalı çox informativ xüsusiyyətlər almaq üçün daha çox informativ xüsusiyyətlər alır. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş metodların mevcut GCN tabanlı modellərin n-arya bağlantı verilən verilənlər qurğusunda mövcuddur və yarı Eval 2010 Task 8 sözlər-seviyyəti verilən verilənlər qurğusunda mövcuddur. Bizim modelimiz də TACRED veri quruluğunda SoTA ilə qarşılaşdırılabilir.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի կոնտեքստիալ գծագրաֆիայի կոնֆուլցիոն ցանց կախվածության հիմնված բազմաթիվ ենթագծագրերի վերաբերյալ հարաբերությունների վերացման համար: A novel method to construct multiple sub-graphs using words in shortest dependency path and words linked to entities in the dependency parse is proposed.  Գրաֆի կոնվոլյուցիոն գործողությունը կատարվում է արդյունքում ստացված բազմաթիվ ենթագրաֆների միջոցով, որպեսզի ստանան ավելի տեղեկատվական առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք օգտակար են հարաբերությունների դուրս բեր Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նախագծված մեթոդը հասնում է գերազանցության գոյություն ունեցող GNC-ի հիմնված մոդելների, որոնք հասնում են ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին n-ar հարաբերության հանելու տվյալների համակարգի և SEM-ի 2010-ի 8-ի նախագծի հարաբերության հանելու Մեր մոդելը նաև համեմատական արտադրություն է ստանում ԹԱՔԵԴ տվյալների համակարգի հետ:', 'am': 'የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለመውጣት በብዙ በተደገመ ጥያቄ ላይ የግንኙነት አካባቢ-ገጽ ጥያቄን እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የአሁኑን መንገድ እና ቃላት በመጠቀም በተጠቃሚ ፓርላማ ውስጥ አካባቢዎች በሚያያያዙ አካላት እና በሚያያያዙ ቃል ለመግለጽ የአሁኑን መንገድ ለመግለጽ ተፈጻሚ ነው፡፡ ምርጫዎች ፈተና ውጤታችን የGCN-አካል የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ከ-አካል ውጤት ማሳየት እና የስምEval 2010 ስራ 8 የፍርድ-ደረጃ ግንኙነት ማውጣት ዳታዎችን እንዲያገኝ የGCN-መሠረት ሥርዓት ላይ የተሻለ አካል እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡ Our model also achieves a comparable performance to the SoTA on the TACRED dataset.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan jaringan konvolusi grafik kontekstualisasi melalui subgrafik berbasis dependensi untuk ekstraksi hubungan. A novel method to construct multiple sub-graphs using words in shortest dependency path and words linked to entities in the dependency parse is proposed.  Operasi konvolusi grafik dilakukan melalui beberapa sub-graf hasilnya untuk mendapatkan fitur informatif lebih berguna untuk ekstraksi hubungan. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dari model yang ada berdasarkan GCN yang mencapai prestasi terbaik pada set data ekstraksi hubungan n-ary kalimat salib dan set data ekstraksi hubungan SemEval 2010 Task 8 kalimat-tahap kalimat. Model kita juga mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan SoTA di dataset TACRED.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme kontextualizovanou síť grafových konvolucí přes více závislostních podgrafů pro extrakci vztahů. Je navržena nová metoda konstrukce více podgrafů pomocí slov v nejkratší cestě závislosti a slov propojených s entitami v parse závislostí. Operace konvoluce grafu se provádí nad výslednými více podgrafy, aby bylo získáno informačnější funkce užitečné pro extrakci vztahů. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržená metoda dosahuje vynikajícího výkonu oproti existujícím modelům založeným na GCN a dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů na datové sadě extrakce n-árních vztahů na křížové větě a datové sadě extrakce vztahů SemEval 2010 Task 8. Náš model také dosahuje srovnatelného výkonu jako SOTA na datové sadě TACRED.', 'et': 'Me pakume välja kontekstualiseeritud graafilise konvolutsioonivõrgu mitme sõltuvuspõhise alamgraafi kaudu seoste ekstraheerimiseks. Pakutakse välja uus meetod mitme alamgraafi koostamiseks, kasutades sõnu lühimas sõltuvustehas ja sõltuvuse parsimises olevate olemitega seotud sõnu. Graafiku konvolutsiooni operatsioon viiakse läbi saadud mitme allgraafiku, et saada informatiivsemad funktsioonid, mis on kasulikud seoste ekstraheerimiseks. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod saavutab olemasolevate GCN-põhiste mudelitega võrreldes parima jõudlusega, mis saavutab nüüdisaegse jõudluse lausevahelise n-aarse ekstraheerimise andmekogumi ja SemEval 2010 Task 8 lausetaseme seose ekstraheerimise andmekogumi puhul. Meie mudel saavutab ka TACRED andmekogumi Sotaga võrreldava jõudluse.', 'bn': 'আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি নির্ভরশীল সাব-গ্রাফ কনফুল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করছি যে সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য সাব-গ্রাফ। সংক্ষিপ্ত নির্ভরশীল পাথ এবং নির্ভরশীল পার্সের সাথে যুক্ত বস্তুর সাথে যুক্ত শব্দ ব্যবহার করে বেশ কয়েকটি সাব- গ্রাফ তৈরি করার একট সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য অনেক তথ্য বৈশিষ্ট্য পাওয়ার জন্য গ্রাফ কনফুলেশন কার্যকর করা হয়েছে। আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি বিদ্যমান জিসিনিভিত্তিক মডেলের উপর বেশী ভালো প্রদর্শনের কাজ অর্জন করা হয়েছে এবং সেমভাল ২০১০ সালের কারাদণ্ডের বিভিন্ আমাদের মডেল টাক্রিড ডাটাসেটে সোটার সাথে তুলনামূলক কার্যক্রম অর্জন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Predlažemo kontekstualiziranu mrežu konvolucije grafa preko višestrukih podgrafa na osnovu zavisnosti za izvlačenje odnosa. Predlaže se nov metod za konstrukciju višestrukih podgrafa koristeći riječi na najkraćem putu ovisnosti i riječi povezane s entitetima u analizu ovisnosti. Operacija konvolucije grafa provedena se u rezultativnim višestrukim podgrafovima kako bi dobila informativne funkcije korisne za ekstrakciju odnosa. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi metod postigne superiornu funkciju nad postojećim modelima na temelju GCN-a koji postignu postupak state-of-the-art-performance o kompletu n-ary odnosa o ekstrakciji podataka o prekršnoj rečenici i kompletu 8 rečenica na razini rečenica o ekstrakciji. Naš model također postiže usporedbenu izvedbu sa SoTA-om na TACRED dataset.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme kontekstualisoitua graafikonvoluatioverkostoa useiden riippuvuuspohjaisten alakaavioiden päälle relaatioiden purkamista varten. Ehdotetaan uutta menetelmää useiden alakaavioiden rakentamiseen käyttäen lyhyimmän riippuvuusreitin sanoja ja riippuvuusreitin entiteetteihin linkitettyjä sanoja. Graafin konvoluutio suoritetaan tuloksena olevien useiden alakaavioiden yli saadakseen informatiivisempia ominaisuuksia, jotka ovat hyödyllisiä relaatioiden purkamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetulla menetelmällä saavutetaan parempi suorituskyky kuin olemassa olevilla GCN-pohjaisilla malleilla, joilla saavutetaan uusinta suorituskykyä ristilauseiden n-ary-suhdeuuttotiedostossa ja SemEval 2010 Task 8 lausetason suhdeuuttotiedostossa. Mallimme saavuttaa myös TACRED-aineiston SOTA:n suorituskyvyn.', 'ca': "Proposem una xarxa de convolució de gràfics contextualitzada sobre múltiples subgràfics basats en la dependencia per l'extracció de relacions. Es propone un mètode nou per construir múltiples subgràfics utilitzant paraules en el camí de dependencia més curt i paraules vinculades a entitats en l'analisi de dependencies. L'operació de convolució gráfica es fa a través de múltiples subgràfics resultants per obtenir característiques més informatives útils per l'extracció de relacions. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que el mètode proposat aconsegueix un rendiment superior sobre els models existents basats en GCN que aconsegueixen un rendiment més avançat en el conjunt de dades d'extracció de relacions n-ary en frases cruzades i el conjunt de dades d'extracció de relacions de nivell de frases SemEval 2010 Task 8. El nostre model també aconsegueix un rendiment comparable amb el SoTA del conjunt de dades TACRED.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo kontekstualizirano mrežo konvolucij grafov prek več podgrafov, ki temeljijo na odvisnosti, za ekstrakcijo relacij. Predlagana je nova metoda za gradnjo več podgrafov z besedami v najkrajši poti odvisnosti in besedami, povezanimi s entitetami v razčlenitvi odvisnosti. Operacija konvolucije grafikona se izvaja preko nastalih več podgrafov, da se pridobijo bolj informativne funkcije, ki so koristne za ekstrakcijo relacij. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da predlagana metoda dosega vrhunsko učinkovitost v primerjavi z obstoječimi modeli na osnovi GCN, ki dosegajo najsodobnejšo učinkovitost pri naboru podatkov o ekstrakciji n-arnih relacij v križnem stavku in naboru podatkov o ekstrakciji relacij SemEval 2010 Task 8 stavek. Naš model dosega tudi primerljivo zmogljivost kot SotA na naboru podatkov TACRED.', 'jv': 'We proposal a contextual graph convolution network Awak dhéwé nggawe akeh podgraphur nggawe gambar kelompok lan gambar kelompok nggawe Entire Kernel Rejection modellu iki banget nggo ngerasakno karo SoT dumateng TatED.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים רשת שיתוף גרפים מקונטוקטואליזציה מעל תת-גרפים ממבוססים על תלויות רבות לחלץ יחסים. מוצעת שיטה חדשה לבנות תו- גרפים מרובים באמצעות מילים בדרך התלויה הקצרה ביותר ומילים שקשורות לאישויות במבחן התלויות. מבצע התפרצות גרפים מתבצע במהלך הת-גרפים הרבים הנוצאים כדי להשיג תכונות מידעיים יותר שימושיים לחיצוב יחסים. התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו מראות שהשיטה המוצעת משיגה ביצועים טובים יותר על הדוגמנים המבוססים על GCN הנוכחים להשיג ביצועים מצוינים במשפט הצלב n-ary קבוצת מידע חיסוך מערכת יחסים המודל שלנו גם משיג ביצוע שווה לסוטה על קבוצת המידע TACRED.', 'ha': 'Tuna goyyar da wani jerin kwamfyuta na grafyuta wanda aka ƙididdige a kansa kan sauran masu bin-grafyuta masu baka-baka masu inganci. A novel method to construct multiple sub-graphs using words in shortest dependency path and words linked to entities in the dependency parse is proposed.  An tafiyar da shirin suruya na grafyuta don a ƙara wasu sub-grafyuta don ka sami wasu masu da amfani ga zartar da masu hushi. MatariyinMu na nuna cewa, hanyoyinMu da aka buƙata yana da mafiya babban rabo a kan misãlai da ke jira a GUN-wanda ke iya samar da halin-mai-kunna kan zartar da tsarin masu cire-cire-hukuncin na-zartar da tsari na-zartar da kuma na SemEal 2010 Misalinmu na sami wani mai kama da SoTA kan tsarin TACRED.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་འབྲེལ་ས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་དྲ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཚིག་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་དང་འབྲེལ གཟུགས་རིས་སྐུད་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་བ་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུར་ཐོག་ལས་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་འཕྲུལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་གིས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་ཡོད་པ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་གཞི་བཞག ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་གིས་TACRED གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་ལ་མཉམ་སྦྲགས་བཏུབ་པའི་སྐྱེས་སྟངས་གཅིག་རྟོགས'}
{'en': 'NYTWIT : A Dataset of Novel Words in the New York Times', 'ar': 'NYTWIT: مجموعة بيانات من الكلمات الرواية في نيويورك تايمز', 'es': 'NYTWIT: Un conjunto de datos de palabras novedosas en el New York Times', 'fr': 'NYTWIT\xa0: un ensemble de nouveaux mots dans le New York Times', 'pt': 'NYTWIT: Um conjunto de dados de palavras novas no New York Times', 'ja': 'NYTWIT:ニューヨーク・タイムズに掲載された新語のデータセット', 'zh': 'NYTWIT:《纽约时报》新奇词汇数集', 'hi': 'NYTWIT: न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स में उपन्यास शब्दों का एक डेटासेट', 'ru': 'NYTWIT: набор данных о новых словах в New York Times', 'ga': 'NYTWIT: Tacar Sonraí Focal Úrscéalta sa New York Times', 'hu': 'NYTWIT: Új szavak adatkészlet a New York Times-ban', 'ka': 'NYTWIT: ნუ იჲპკ რაიმსში ნჲგვლური სიტყვების მონაცემები', 'el': 'Νέα Υόρκη Τάιμς: Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με μυθιστορήματα στους Τάιμς της Νέας Υόρκης', 'it': 'NYTWIT: Un dataset di parole novelle nel New York Times', 'lt': 'Naujų žodžių rinkinys Niujorko laikraščiuose', 'mk': 'НИТВИТ: Податоци за нови зборови во Њујорк Тајмс', 'kk': 'НYTWIT: New York Times- дегі Novel Words деректер бағдарламасы', 'ms': 'New York Times', 'mt': 'NYTWIT: Sett ta’ Dejta ta’ Kliem Ġdid fil-New York Times', 'ml': 'ന്യൂയോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈമിലെ നോവല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ്', 'no': 'NYTWIT: Ein databasert av Novel Words i New York Times', 'mn': 'Нью Йорк Таймс дахь Нью Йорк Таймс', 'pl': 'NYTWIT: Zestaw danych powieści w New York Times', 'ro': 'NYTWIT: Un set de date de cuvinte noi în New York Times', 'so': 'NYTWIT: A Dataset of Novel Words in the New York Times', 'si': 'New York Times', 'sv': 'NYTWIT: En dataset av nya ord i New York Times', 'sr': 'Podaci Novelih reèi u New York Timesu', 'ur': 'نیویورک تایمز میں نوئل کلمات کا ایک ڈیٹس', 'ta': 'NYTWIT: நியூயார்க் டைமைஸில் உள்ள நூல் வார்த்தைகளின் தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'uz': "NYTWIT: New York Times' da Novel Orollarining maʼlumot seti", 'vi': 'New York Times: Một tập ảnh đầy tiểu thuyết tiểu thuyết', 'bg': 'Набор от данни от нови думи в Ню Йорк Таймс', 'nl': 'NYTWIT: Een dataset van nieuwe woorden in de New York Times', 'da': 'NYTWIT: Et datasæt af nye ord i New York Times', 'hr': 'NYTWIT: Datacija novčanih riječi u New York Times-u', 'id': 'Sebuah set data dari kata-kata baru di New York Times', 'de': 'NYTWIT: Ein Datensatz von Novel Words in der New York Times', 'ko': 'NYTWIT: 뉴욕타임스의 소설 어휘 데이터 세트', 'fa': 'نوئول کلمات در نیویورک تایمز', 'sw': 'NYTWITI: Taarifa ya maneno ya Sayansi ya New York Times', 'tr': "NYTWIT: New York Times'da Novel Sözleriň maglumaty", 'sq': 'NYTWIT: Një bazë të dhënash për fjalë të reja në New York Times', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'hy': 'Նյու Յորք Թայմսի նոր բառերի տվյալներ', 'am': 'አዲስ ዮርክ ታሪክ ውስጥ የኖvel ቃላት ዳታ', 'az': "NYTWIT: New York Times'da Novel Kelimlərin Dataseti", 'bn': 'নিউ ইয়র্ক টাইমসের নোভেল ওয়ার্ডের ডাটাসেট', 'ca': 'NYTWIT: A Dataset of Novel Words in the New York Times', 'bs': 'NYTWIT: Datacija Novelih riječi u New York Times-u', 'et': 'NYTWIT: Uudsete sõnade andmekogum New York Timesis', 'cs': 'NYTWIT: Dataset nových slov v New York Times', 'fi': 'NYTWIT: Uusien sanojen tietokanta New York Timesissa', 'jv': 'NYT: Ngucap data-soko Kemerdekaan Winter', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'NYTWIT: Zbirka novih besed v New York Timesu', 'bo': 'NYTWIT: New York Times ནང་གི་Novel Words ་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་པ', 'he': 'ערכת נתונים של מילים חדשות בניו יורק טיימס'}
{'en': 'We present the New York Times Word Innovation Types dataset, or NYTWIT, a collection of over 2,500 novel English words published in the New York Times between November 2017 and March 2019, manually annotated for their class of novelty (such as lexical derivation, dialectal variation, blending, or compounding). We present baseline results for both uncontextual and contextual prediction of novelty class, showing that there is room for improvement even for state-of-the-art NLP systems. We hope this resource will prove useful for linguists and NLP practitioners by providing a real-world environment of novel word appearance.', 'ar': 'نقدم مجموعة بيانات New York Times Word Innovation Types ، أو NYTWIT ، وهي مجموعة من أكثر من 2500 كلمة إنجليزية جديدة نُشرت في New York Times بين نوفمبر 2017 ومارس 2019 ، مع شرح يدوي لفئة حداثة هذه الكلمات (مثل الاشتقاق المعجمي ، والاختلاف اللهجي أو المزج أو المركب). نقدم نتائج أساسية لكل من التنبؤ غير السياقي والسياقي لفئة الجدة ، مما يوضح أن هناك مجالًا للتحسين حتى بالنسبة لأنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الحديثة. نأمل أن يكون هذا المورد مفيدًا للغويين وممارسي البرمجة اللغوية العصبية من خلال توفير بيئة واقعية لظهور الكلمات الجديدة.', 'es': 'Presentamos el conjunto de datos Tipos de innovación de palabras del New York Times, o NYTWIT, una colección de más de 2500 palabras novedosas en inglés publicadas en el New York Times entre noviembre de 2017 y marzo de 2019, anotadas manualmente para su clase de novedad (como derivación léxica, variación dialectal, combinación o composición). Presentamos los resultados de referencia para la predicción no contextual y contextual de la clase de novedad, lo que demuestra que hay margen de mejora incluso para los sistemas de PNL de última generación. Esperamos que este recurso sea útil para los lingüistas y profesionales de la PNL al proporcionar un entorno real de aparición de palabras novedosas.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o conjunto de dados New York Times Word Innovation Types, ou NYTWIT, uma coleção de mais de 2.500 novas palavras em inglês publicadas no New York Times entre novembro de 2017 e março de 2019, anotadas manualmente para sua classe de novidade (como derivação lexical, variação dialetal , mistura ou composição). Apresentamos resultados de linha de base para a previsão contextual e descontextual da classe novidade, mostrando que há espaço para melhorias mesmo para sistemas de PNL de última geração. Esperamos que este recurso seja útil para linguistas e praticantes de PNL, fornecendo um ambiente real de aparecimento de novas palavras.', 'fr': "Nous présentons le jeu de données New York Times Word Innovation Types, ou NYTWIT, une collection de plus de 2 500 nouveaux mots anglais publiés dans le New York Times entre novembre 2017 et mars 2019, annotés manuellement pour leur classe de nouveauté (comme la dérivation lexicale, la variation dialectale, le mélange ou la composition). Nous présentons des résultats de base pour la prédiction contextuelle et non contextuelle de la classe de nouveauté, montrant qu'il y a place à amélioration même pour les systèmes de PNL de pointe. Nous espérons que cette ressource s'avérera utile pour les linguistes et les praticiens de la PNL en fournissant un environnement réel d'apparition de nouveaux mots.", 'zh': '余言《纽约时报》单词创新类数(NYTWIT),当数集收 2017 年 11 月至 2019 年 3 月中于《纽约时报》发表之 2,500 余新英语小说单词,并针其新颖性类(如词汇派生、方言变体、混合、复合)手动注。 臣等建新颖性类之非上下文上下文之占基线,明虽先进NLP统有改进之余也。 愿资资以资新奇单词外观之真境,有用于语言学家NLP从业者。', 'ja': '2017年11月から2019年3月にかけてニューヨーク・タイムズに掲載された2,500を超える斬新な英単語のコレクションである、ニューヨーク・タイムズのWord Innovation Typesデータセット（ NYTWIT ）を提示し、その新規性（語彙派生、方言バリエーション、ブレンド、または配合など）について手動で注釈を付けています。我々は、新規性クラスの非文脈的および文脈的予測の両方のベースライン結果を提示し、最先端のNLPシステムでも改善の余地があることを示している。このリソースが、言語学者とNLPの実践者にとって、新規の単語の外観の現実の環境を提供することによって有用であることを願っています。', 'hi': 'हम न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स वर्ड इनोवेशन टाइप्स डेटासेट, या NYTWIT, नवंबर 2017 और मार्च 2019 के बीच न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स में प्रकाशित 2,500 से अधिक उपन्यास अंग्रेजी शब्दों का एक संग्रह प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो मैन्युअल रूप से नवीनता के अपने वर्ग के लिए एनोटेट किया गया है (जैसे कि लेक्सिकल व्युत्पत्ति, बोलचाल की भिन्नता, सम्मिश्रण, या कंपाउंडिंग)। हम नवीनता वर्ग के असंगत और प्रासंगिक भविष्यवाणी दोनों के लिए आधारभूत परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि अत्याधुनिक एनएलपी प्रणालियों के लिए भी सुधार के लिए जगह है। हमें उम्मीद है कि यह संसाधन उपन्यास शब्द उपस्थिति का एक वास्तविक दुनिया का वातावरण प्रदान करके भाषाविदों और एनएलपी चिकित्सकों के लिए उपयोगी साबित होगा।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем набор данных New York Times Word Innovation Types, или NYTWIT, собрание из более чем 2500 новых английских слов, опубликованных в New York Times в период с ноября 2017 года по март 2019 года, вручную аннотированных для их класса новизны (таких как лексическая деривация, диалектные вариации, смешивание или компаундирование). Мы представляем базовые результаты как для неконтекстного, так и для контекстного прогнозирования класса новизны, показывая, что есть возможности для улучшения даже для современных систем NLP. Мы надеемся, что этот ресурс окажется полезным для лингвистов и практиков NLP, обеспечивая реальную среду появления новых слов.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair tacar sonraí Cineálacha Nuálaíochta Focal an New York Times, nó NYTWIT, cnuasach de bhreis is 2,500 focal núíosach Béarla a foilsíodh sa New York Times idir Samhain 2017 agus Márta 2019, agus iad anótáilte de láimh dá n-aicme úrnuachta (cosúil le díorthú foclóireachta, éagsúlacht chanúinteach. , cumasc, nó cumaisc). Cuirimid torthaí bonnlíne i láthair maidir le tuar neamhchomhthéacsúil agus comhthéacsúil ar aicme úrnuachta, rud a thaispeánann gur féidir feabhas a chur ar na córais NLP is nua-aimseartha fiú. Tá súil againn go mbeidh an acmhainn seo úsáideach do theangeolaithe agus do chleachtóirí NLP trí thimpeallacht fhíordhomhanda a chur ar fáil ina bhfuil cuma na bhfocal úrnua.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ New York Times Words Innovation Types dataset, ან NYTWIT, უფრო მეტი 500 novel English words published in the New York Times between November 2017 and March 2019, manually annotated for their class of novelty (such as lexical derivation, dialectal variation, blending, or compounding). ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ფექსტური წარმოდგენების განსაკუთრებელი და კონტექსტური წარმოდგენების განსაკუთრებელი წარმოდგენებისთვის, რომელიც აჩვენებთ, რომ არსებობს კონტექსტური კლასი ნაეწგამვ ჟვ, ფვ რჲჱთ პვჟსპჟ ღვ ეჲკაზვ ოჲლჲზვნ ჱა ლთნდსთჟრთ თ ნა NLP ოპვკრვკრთპანუთრვ, ოპვეჟრაგწღთ ნათჟრთნჟკთ ჟგწრ ჲკპჲმვნრ ნა ნ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων τύπου καινοτομίας λέξεων του New York Times, ή μια συλλογή από πάνω από 2.500 μυθιστορήματα Αγγλικών λέξεων που δημοσιεύονται στους New York Times μεταξύ Νοεμβρίου 2017 και Μαρτίου 2019, με χειροκίνητα σχόλια για την κατηγορία της καινοτομίας τους (όπως λεξική παράγωγη, διαλεκτική διακύμανση, ανάμειξη ή σύνθεση). Παρουσιάζουμε τα βασικά αποτελέσματα τόσο για την μη-αντισυμβατική όσο και για την περιεκτική πρόβλεψη της κατηγορίας καινοτομίας, δείχνοντας ότι υπάρχει περιθώριο βελτίωσης ακόμη και για τα υπερσύγχρονα συστήματα ΝΛΠ. Ελπίζουμε ότι αυτός ο πόρος θα αποδειχθεί χρήσιμος για τους γλωσσολόγους και τους επαγγελματίες παρέχοντας ένα πραγματικό περιβάλλον εμφάνισης νέων λέξεων.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a New York Times Word Innovation Types adatkészletét (NYTWIT), amely több mint 2500 regény angol szóból álló gyűjtemény, amely 2017 novembere és 2019 márciusa között jelent meg a New York Times-ban, manuálisan megjegyzett újdonsági osztályuk szerint (például lexikai származék, dialektuális variáció, keverés vagy összetétel). Bemutatjuk a kiindulási eredményeket az újdonsági osztály nem szexuális és kontextuális előrejelzésére, ami azt mutatja, hogy még a korszerű NLP rendszerek esetében is van lehetőség javításra. Reméljük, hogy ez az erőforrás hasznosnak bizonyul a nyelvészek és az NLP szakemberek számára azáltal, hogy valós környezetet biztosít az új szók megjelenésének.', 'kk': 'Біз Нью-Йорк Таймс сөздерінің инновациялық түрлерін, немесе Нью-Йорк Таймс 2017 жылдың қараша мен 2019 жылдың марта арасында жарияланған 2 500 романдық ағылшын сөздер жинағын, олардың романдық классына қолмен белгіленген (лексикалық түрлері, диалекталық түрлері, түрлері,  Біз жаңалық классының негізгі нәтижелерін келтіреміз, сондай-ақ тексті және контексті таңдау үшін, NLP жүйелерінің күй- жайын жақсарту үшін де орын бар дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл ресурс лингвисттер мен NLP профессионарларына пайдалы болады деп үміттенеміз. Бұл ресурс жаңа сөз көрінісінің шын әлемдік ортасына қолдану үшін.', 'it': "Presentiamo il dataset New York Times Word Innovation Types, o NYTWIT, una raccolta di oltre 2.500 parole inglesi novelle pubblicate sul New York Times tra novembre 2017 e marzo 2019, annotate manualmente per la loro classe di novità (come derivazione lessicale, variazione dialettale, blending o compounding). Presentiamo i risultati di base sia per la previsione non esatta che contestuale della classe di novità, dimostrando che c'è spazio per il miglioramento anche per i sistemi NLP all'avanguardia. Speriamo che questa risorsa si riveli utile per linguisti e professionisti del PNL fornendo un ambiente reale di nuove parole.", 'lt': 'Nuo 2017 m. lapkričio mėn. iki 2019 m. kovo mėn. New York Times žodžių inovacijų tipų duomenų rinkinys arba NYTWIT – daugiau kaip 2 500 naujų anglų žodžių rinkinys, paskelbtas New York Times, rankiniu būdu anotuotas jų naujoviškumo klasei (pvz., leksinės išvedinės, dialektinės variacijos, maišymas arba junginys). Pateikiame pradinius rezultatus tiek nekontekstinėms, tiek kontekstinėms naujovių klasės prognozėms, rodančius, kad yra galimybių patobulinti net naujausias NLP sistemas. Tikimės, kad šis išteklius bus naudingas kalbininkams ir NLP specialistams, nes bus sukurta reali naujo žodžio pasirodymo aplinka.', 'mk': 'Ние ја претставуваме датотеката на Њујорк тајмс Word Innovation Types, или NYTWIT, колекција од над 2.500 романски англиски зборови објавени во Њујорк тајмс помеѓу ноември 2017 и март 2019 година, рачно анотирани за нивната класа на новост (како лексикална деринација, дијалектална варијација, мешање или спојување). Презентираме основни резултати за неконтекстни и контекстни предвидувања на класата за новости, покажувајќи дека постои место за подобрување дури и за најсовремените НЛП системи. Се надеваме дека овој ресурс ќе биде корисен за јазичарите и практичарите на НЛП со обезбедување на реална средина со нов изглед на зборови.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan set data New York Times Word Innovation Types, atau NYTWIT, koleksi lebih dari 2,500 perkataan bahasa Inggeris yang diterbitkan di New York Times antara November 2017 dan Maret 2019, ditandakan secara manual untuk kelas novelti mereka (seperti derivasi leksikal, variasi dialektal, campuran, atau penggabungan). Kami memperkenalkan hasil dasar untuk kedua-dua ramalan tidak konteks dan konteks kelas baru, menunjukkan bahawa terdapat ruang untuk peningkatan walaupun untuk sistem NLP yang terbaik. Kami berharap sumber ini akan menjadi berguna bagi ahli bahasa dan praktik NLP dengan menyediakan persekitaran dunia nyata dengan penampilan perkataan baru.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂ യോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈസ് വാര്\u200dഡ് ഡാറ്റാവേഷന്\u200d ടൈപ്പുകള്\u200d, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ന്യൂ യോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈസില്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ച 2,500 നേറ്റല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ന്യൂയോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈസില്\u200d നിന്നും മാര്\u200d നോവലിറ്റി ക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള ബെസ്റ്റ്ലൈന്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി നമ്മുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. We hope this resource will prove useful for linguists and NLP practitioners by providing a real-world environment of novel word appearance.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw is-sett tad-dejta dwar it-Tipi ta’ Innovazzjoni tal-kliem New York Times, jew NYTWIT, ġabra ta’ aktar minn 2,500 kelma Ingliża ġdida ppubblikata fil-New York Times bejn Novembru 2017 u Marzu 2019, annotata manwalment għall-klassi tagħhom ta’ novità (bħal derivazzjoni lexika, varjazzjoni dijalettika, taħlit, jew kompożizzjoni). Aħna nippreżentaw ir-riżultati tal-linja bażi kemm għat-tbassir mhux kuntestwali kif ukoll kuntestwali tal-klassi ta’ innovazzjoni, li juri li hemm lok għal titjib anke għas-sistemi NLP l-aktar avvanzati. Nittamaw li din ir-riżorsa tkun utli għall-lingwisti u l-prattikanti tal-NLP billi tipprovdi ambjent dinji reali ta' dehra ġdida ta' kelma.", 'mn': 'Бид Нью Йорк Таймс үгийн инновационы хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн санг, эсвэл Нью Йорк Таймс 2017-н сарын 12-р сарын турш 2019 оны 12-р сарын хоорондын Нью Йорк Таймс-д хэвлэгдсэн 2,500 шинэ англи үг цуглуулагдсан бөгөөд тэдний шинэ нээлтийн хэлбэрээс гар өргөдөг. Бид шинэ хичээл дээр хоёулангуяа дунджаас болон нөхцөл байдлын төгсгөлийн үр дүнг бий болгодог. НLP системийн хувьд ч сайжруулах зай байгааг харуулж байна. Бид энэ баялаг нь хэлний судлаачид болон НЛП мэргэжилтнүүдэд шинэ үг харагдаж жинхэнэ дэлхийн орчинд ашигтай байх гэж найдаж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer datasettet for New York Times Word Innovation Types, eller NYTWIT, eit samling med over 2,500 novel engelsk ord som er publisert i New York Times mellom november 2017 og mart 2019, manuelt oppmerket for sine klasse av nyttighet (slik som leksiske derivasjon, dialektiske variasjon, blending eller samansering). Vi presenterer baseline-resultater for både uncontextual og contextual forensing av nyttiklasse, viser at det finst rom for forbetringa sjølv for kunstsystemet NLP. Vi håper at denne ressursen vil vera nyttig for linguistar og NLP-praktiserar ved å tilbyra eit verkeleg miljø av novel ordutsjånad.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo rezultat podataka iz New York Times Word Innovation Types, ili NYTWIT, kolekciju preko 2500 novelnih engleskih reči objavljenih u New York Times između novembra 2017. i marta 2019. godine, rukno annotiranu za njihovu klasu novosti (kao što su leksička derivacija, dijalektna varijacija, kombinacija ili komponencija). Predstavljamo početne rezultate za bezkontekstualne i kontekstualne predviđanje klase novosti, pokazujući da postoji mjesta za poboljšanje čak i za sisteme NLP-a iz države umjetnosti. Nadamo se da će ovaj resurs dokazati korisno za lingviste i praktičnike NLP-a pružajući realno svetsko okruženje novog pojavljivanja riječi.', 'si': 'අපි නිව්යෝර්ක් ටායිම්ස් වචන අනුවාන්තික වචන සැකසුම, නැවත NYTWIT, නිව්යෝර්ක් ටායිම්ස් වලට නිව්යෝර්ක් ටායිම්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිව්යෝක් ටායි අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ නැවත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරති අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා මේ සම්බන්ධය භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාඥයෝ සහ NLP ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන්', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar New York Times Word Innovation Types dataset, eller NYTWIT, en samling av över 2 500 nya engelska ord publicerade i New York Times mellan november 2017 och mars 2019, manuellt kommenterade för deras klass av nyhet (såsom lexikal härledning, dialektisk variation, blandning eller sammansättning). Vi presenterar basresultat för både okoextuell och kontextuell förutsägelse av nyhetsklass, vilket visar att det finns utrymme för förbättring även för state-of-the-art NLP-system. Vi hoppas att denna resurs kommer att visa sig användbar för lingvister och NLP-utövare genom att tillhandahålla en verklig miljö med nya ord utseende.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy zestaw danych typów innowacji słowa New York Times, czyli NYTWIT, zbiór ponad 2.500 powieści angielskich słów opublikowanych w New York Times od listopada 2017 do marca 2019, ręcznie adnotacjonowanych ze względu na ich klasę nowości (taką jak pochodzenie leksykalne, zmienność dialektu, mieszanie lub składanie). Przedstawiamy wyniki podstawowe zarówno dla niekontekstowych, jak i kontekstowych przewidywań klasy nowości, pokazując, że istnieje możliwość poprawy nawet w przypadku najnowocześniejszych systemów NLP. Mamy nadzieję, że zasób ten okaże się przydatny dla językoznawców i praktyków NLP, zapewniając rzeczywiste środowisko wyglądu nowych słów.', 'ta': 'நாம் நியூயார்க் டைம்ஸ் வார்த்தை புதுப்பித்தல் வகைகள் தரவுத்தளத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம், அல்லது NYTWIT, நியூயார்க் டைமார்ஸ் இடையில் நியூயார்க் டைமார்ச் 2019க்கு இடையில் வெளியிடப நாம் முன்னேற்ற முடிவுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் நிலையான புதிய வகுப்புகளின் தற்காலிக முடிவுகளுக்கு, NLP முறைமைகளின் மேம்படுத நாம் நம்புகிறோம் இந்த மூலம் மொழிகள் மற்றும் NLP பயிற்சிகளுக்கு பயனுள்ளதாக இருக்கும் என்று நம்புகிறோம் புதிய வார்த்தை', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm setul de date New York Times Word Innovation Types sau NYTWIT, o colecție de peste 2.500 de cuvinte românești publicate în New York Times între noiembrie 2017 și martie 2019, adnotate manual pentru clasa lor de noutate (cum ar fi derivarea lexicală, variația dialectală, amestecarea sau compoziția). Prezentăm rezultatele de bază atât pentru predicția necontextuală, cât și contextuală a clasei de noutate, arătând că există loc de îmbunătățire chiar și pentru sistemele de state-of-the-art PNL. Sperăm că această resursă se va dovedi utilă lingviștilor și practicienilor PNL, oferind un mediu real de apariție a cuvintelor noi.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa macluumaadka New York Times Word Innovation Types, ama NYTWIT, kaas oo ah urur ka badan 2,500 erayo novel oo Ingiriis ah oo laga soo daabacay sanadkii New York Times ka dhexaysay November 2017 iyo March 2019, si manual ah ayaa loo caddeeyey fasalkooda warqada ah (e.g. lexical derivation, dialectal variation, blending or composing). Waxaynu keennaa fasalka qoraalka hoose ee dhamaan iyo sii-socda oo aan la sii sheegno fasalka hore, waxaynu caddaynaynaa inay jiraan qolo u beddelo xitaa nidaamka farshaxanka ah ee dowladda NLP. Waxaan rajaynaynaa in asalkan ay faa’iido u yeelan karto afka luuqadaha iyo dadka NLP-ka ah si ay u fidiso deegaan nololeed oo dhab ah oo ka muuqata hadalka saxda ah.', 'ur': 'ہم نیویورک تایمز ویرڈ اینوسی ٹائیسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ یا نیویورک تایمز میں نومبر 2017 اور مارچ 2019 کے درمیان نیویورک تایمز میں ظاہر ہوئے 2,500 نومین انگلیسی کلمات کی ایک مجموعہ پیش کرتے ہیں، جو ان کے نومین کلاس کے ذریعہ مضبوط ہوئی تھی (جیسے لکسیکل ڈیلوٹ، ڈیلکتل تغ ہم نیوی کلاس کے بیس لین نتیجے کے لئے ناکنٹکسٹ اور کنٹکسٹ کی پیش بینی کے لئے پیش بینی کرتے ہیں، دکھاتے ہیں کہ نیوی لپ سیسٹم کے لئے بھی بہترین طرح ہے۔ ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ یہ منابع زبان شناسوں اور NLP روشنوں کے لئے فائدہ دکھائے گی، تازه نو لفظ کی آنکھ کے ذریعہ ایک حقیقی دنیا کی محیط پر۔', 'uz': "Biz New York Times so'zlari Innovation Types maʼlumotlar tarkibini yoki NYTWIT, November 2017 va Machi 2019 орасидаги New York Times bilan published 2,500 yoʻl so'zlaridan ko'proq Ingliz tilidagi so'zlar tarkibini qo'lbola aytganmiz (masalan leksikal derivatori, dialektikal variation, blending yoki birlashtirish) darajasi uchun qoʻlbola aytganmiz. Biz novelik sinfning davomida muvaffaqiyatli va davomiy kutilgan natijalar uchun bazal natijalarini hozir qilamiz, yani NLP tizimning davlat sohasini bajarish uchun o'zim bor. Bu manbalar tillar va NLP ishchilari uchun foydalanishi kerak deb umid qilamiz, yangi dunyo so'zning haqiqiqiy dunyo muhimligini koʻrsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một bộ dữ liệu kiểu phát triển từ ngữ New York Times, hay NYTWI, một bộ sưu tập đầy hơn 2,500 tiểu thuyết Anh phát hành trong tờ New York Times giữa tháng Mười Một và tháng Mười Một, được biên bản bằng tay ghi chú cho lớp mới của họ (như chế nhạo văn bản, biến đổi ngôn ngữ, hòa hợp, hay nhân bản). Chúng tôi giới thiệu kết quả cho cả dự đoán không có kết cấu và ngữ cảnh về hạng mới, cho thấy có chỗ cải thiện ngay cả cho hệ thống NIchọc hoàn hảo. Chúng tôi hy vọng nguồn tài nguyên này sẽ hữu dụng cho các nhà ngôn ngữ và người ngôn ngữ chọc dò tại Nha nên tạo ra môi trường thực tế về diện tích mới.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de New York Times Word Innovation Types dataset, of NYTWIT, een verzameling van meer dan 2.500 nieuwe Engelse woorden gepubliceerd in de New York Times tussen november 2017 en maart 2019, handmatig geannoteerd voor hun klasse van nieuwigheid (zoals lexicale afleiding, dialectische variatie, blending of compounding). We presenteren baseline resultaten voor zowel contextuele als contextuele voorspelling van nieuwigheidsklasse, waaruit blijkt dat er ruimte is voor verbetering, zelfs voor state-of-the-art NLP systemen. We hopen dat deze bron nuttig zal blijken voor taalkundigen en NLP-beoefenaars door een real-world omgeving te bieden van nieuwe woorden verschijnen.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer New York Times Word Innovation Types datasæt, eller NYTWIT, en samling af over 2.500 nye engelske ord udgivet i New York Times mellem november 2017 og marts 2019, manuelt annoteret for deres klasse af nyhed (såsom leksikisk afledning, dialektisk variation, blanding eller sammensætning). Vi præsenterer baseline resultater for både ukoktuelle og kontekstuelle forudsigelser af nyhedsklasse, der viser, at der er plads til forbedring selv for state-of-the-art NLP systemer. Vi håber, at denne ressource vil vise sig nyttig for lingvister og NLP-udøvere ved at give et virkeligt miljø med nye ord udseende.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo rezultat podataka za New York Times Word Innovation Types, ili NYTWIT, kolekciju preko 2500 novelnih engleskih riječi objavljenih u New York Times između studenog 2017. i ožujka 2019. godine, manuelno annotiranu za njihovu klasu novosti (poput leksičke derivacije, dijalektne varijacije, mješanje ili kompaniranje). Predstavljamo početne rezultate za bezkontekstualne i contextualne predviđanje klase novosti, pokazujući da postoji mjesta za poboljšanje čak i za sustave stanja umjetnosti NLP-a. Nadamo se da će ovaj resurs dokazati korisno za lingviste i vježbenike NLP-a pružajući realno svetsko okruženje novog pojavljivanja riječi.', 'bg': 'Представяме съвкупността от над 2500 нови английски думи, публикувани в Ню Йорк Таймс между ноември 2017 г. и март 2019 г., ръчно анотирани за техния клас на новост (като лексикална дериватация, диалектална вариация, смесване или комбиниране). Представяме базови резултати както за нетекстуално, така и за контекстуално прогнозиране на класа новост, което показва, че има място за подобрение дори и за най-съвременните системи за НЛО. Надяваме се, че този ресурс ще се окаже полезен за лингвистите и практикуващите НЛП, като осигури реална среда на появата на нови думи.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren den New York Times Word Innovation Types Datensatz oder NYTWIT, eine Sammlung von über 2.500 neuen englischen Wörtern, die zwischen November 2017 und März 2019 in der New York Times veröffentlicht wurden und manuell für ihre Klasse der Neuheit kommentiert wurden (wie lexikalische Ableitung, dialektale Variation, Blending oder Compounding). Wir präsentieren Grundlagenergebnisse sowohl für die unkontextuelle als auch kontextuelle Vorhersage der Neuheitsklasse, die zeigen, dass auch für hochmoderne NLP-Systeme Verbesserungspotenzial besteht. Wir hoffen, dass sich diese Ressource für Linguisten und NLP-Praktiker als nützlich erweisen wird, indem sie eine reale Umgebung mit neuartigen Wörtern bietet.', 'id': 'We present the New York Times Word Innovation Types dataset, or NYTWIT, a collection of over 2,500 novel English words published in the New York Times between November 2017 and March 2019, manually annotated for their class of novelty (such as lexical derivation, dialectal variation, blending, or compounding).  Kami mempersembahkan hasil dasar untuk prediksi tidak konteks dan kontekstual kelas baru, menunjukkan bahwa ada ruang untuk peningkatan bahkan untuk sistem NLP yang terbaik. Kami berharap sumber daya ini akan terbukti berguna bagi para bahasa dan praktek NLP dengan menyediakan lingkungan dunia nyata dari penampilan kata baru.', 'fa': 'ما مجموعه داده\u200cهای نوآوری کلمه نیویورک تایمز یا نیویورک تایمز را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، جمله\u200cای از کلمه\u200cهای بیش از ۲۵۰۰ رمان انگلیسی که در نوامبر ۲۰۰۷ تا مارچ ۲۰۰۹ منتشر شده\u200cاند، به دستی برای کلاس نوآوری آنها (مثل تولید الکتریکی، تغییر دیالکتریکی، ترکیب یا ترکیب ما نتیجه\u200cهای پایه\u200cخط برای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای غیر قانونی و غیر قانونی از کلاس جدید را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنیم، که نشان می\u200cدهیم که حتی برای سیستم\u200cهای NLP\u200cهای ایالت هنر جایی برای بهبود وجود دارد. امیدواریم این منابع برای زبانشناسان و تمرین\u200cکنندگان NLP مفید شود با توجه به یک محیط جهانی واقعی از ظاهر کلمات نو.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha taarifa za a in a ya Ubunifu wa Habari ya New York Times, au NYTWIT, mkusanyiko wa maneno zaidi ya riwaya 2,500 yaliyochapishwa katika mtandao wa New York Times kati ya Novemba 2017 na Machi 2019, yalichapishwa kwa manufaa kwa ajili ya aina yao ya riwaya (kama vile utoaji wa kiwango cha lexico, mabadiliko ya kidijitali, kuvurugwa, au kuunganisha). We present baseline results for both uncontextual and contextual prediction of novelty class, showing that there is room for improvement even for state-of-the-art NLP systems.  Tunatumaini rasilimali hii itathibitisha kuwa na manufaa kwa wataalamu wa lugha na wataalamu wa NLP kwa kutoa mazingira halisi ya maneno ya kisasa yanayoonekana.', 'tr': 'Biz New York Times Word Innovation Taýplary Maglumatlaryny, ýa-da NYTWIT, 2017-nji ýylyň noýabr we 2019-nji ýylyň noýabr a ýynyň arasynda ýazylýan 2,500 sany iňlisçe sözleriň jemgyýetini görkeýäris. Biz täze synpyň hem daşary bolmadyk, hem daşary bolmadyk täzelikleri üçin esasy netijeleri görkeýäris. NLP sistemalarynda hem gelişmeler üçin ýer bar. Biz bu resurs lingwistiklere we NLP praktikantlaryna täze dünýäde bir söz görünşini saýlamak üçin faydaly bolar diýip umyt edýäris.', 'af': "Ons stel die New York Times Woord Innovation Types datastel, of NYTWIT, 'n versameling van meer 2,500 novele Engelske woorde wat in die New York Times uitgepubliseer is tussen November 2017 en March 2019, hand aangeteken vir hul klas nuwerheid (soos leksiese afgeleiding, dialekte verandering, verbranding of saamgevinding). Ons stel basisline resultate voor beide ongentekstuele en contextuele voorskou van nuusklas, wys dat daar is kamer vir verbetering selfs vir staat van die kunste NLP stelsels. Ons hoop dat hierdie hulpbron gebruiklik sal bevestig vir lingviste en NLP-praktiseerders deur 'n regte wêreld omgewing van nuwe woord voorkom te verskaf.", 'ko': 'NYTWIT(NYT) 어휘혁신타입 데이터세트(NYTWIT)를 선보였는데, 이 데이터세트는 NYT가 2017년 11월부터 2019년 3월까지 발표한 영어 신조어 2천500여개로 구성됐으며, 어휘파생, 사투리 변이, 혼합 또는 복합과 같은 참신성 카테고리에 따라 수동으로 주석을 달았다.우리는 비텍스트와 상하문 예측 신기류의 기선 결과를 제시하여 가장 선진적인 NLP 시스템이라도 개선할 수 있는 공간이 있음을 나타냈다.우리는 이 자원이 언어학자와 NLP 실천자에게 새로운 단어가 등장하는 실제 환경을 제공할 수 있기를 바란다.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim të dhënat e New York Times Word Innovation Types, ose NYTWIT, një koleksion prej mbi 2,500 fjalësh të reja angleze të botuara në New York Times midis nëntorit 2017 dhe marsit 2019, të shënuara manualisht për klasën e tyre të novitetit (të tilla si derivimi leksikal, variacioni dialektal, përzierje apo përzjerje). We present baseline results for both uncontextual and contextual prediction of novelty class, showing that there is room for improvement even for state-of-the-art NLP systems.  Ne shpresojmë se ky burim do të jetë i dobishëm për gjuhëtarët dhe praktikantët e NLP duke ofruar një mjedis botërore të pamjes së fjalëve të reja.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Նյու Յորք Թայմսի բառերի նորարարության տիպերի տվյալների համակարգը, կամ Նյու Յորք Թայմսի (NYTWET) համակարգը, որը ստեղծվել է Նյու Յորք Թայմսում 2017 թվականի նոյեմբերի և 2019 թվականի մարտի ընթացքում, ձեռքով գրված է նորարարության դասի համար (ինչպիսիք են լեքսիկական վերացումը,  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք հիմնական արդյունքները նորարարության դասի անտեսակալ և կոնտեքստալ կանխատեսումների համար, ցույց տալով, որ կա տարածք զարգացման համար նույնիսկ ամենաբարձր ՆԼՊ համակարգերի համար: Մենք հույս ունենք, որ այս ռեսուրսը կդառնա օգտակար լեզվաբանների և ՆԼՊ-ի մասնագետների համար, տրամադրելով նոր բառերի տեսքի իրական միջավայր:', 'am': 'አዲስ ዮርክ Times ቃላት አዲስ አዲስ ተቃውሞዎች ወይም NYTWIT በኒዮርክ ትምህርት 2017 እና ማክበር 2019 መካከል በኒው ዮርክ ተርሚስ ውስጥ በ2,500 የበለጠ የኢንጂል ቃላት የተዘጋጀ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የጠቅላይ ቋንቋ እና የጠቅላላ ቋንቋ ውይይቶችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ይህ ክፍተት ለቋንቋዎች እና ለNLP ተማሪዎችን እውነተኛ የዓለም አካባቢ አካባቢ ለመስጠት ተስፋ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Biz New York Times Word Innovation Types veri qutusunu, ya da NYTWIT, New York Times 2017 ilə Mart 2019 arasında yayınlanan 2.500 novel İngiliz sözlərinin koleksiyonunu göstərdik. Bu, onların yenilik sınıfı ilə əlində bildirildi. Biz yeni sınıfların, hətta NLP sistemlərinin daha yaxşılıqlarına baxmayaraq, özünüzə və müxtəlif tədbirlərin başlanğıc sonuçlarını göstəririk. Biz ümid edirik ki, bu ressamın dilçilər və NLP təhsil edənlər üçün faydalı olacaq, yeni söz görünüşünü gerçek dünya çevresini sağlayaraq.', 'bn': 'আমরা নিউ ইয়র্ক টাইমসের ওয়ার্ড ইনভেন্ট ২০১৭ থেকে মার্চ ২০১১-এ নিউ ইয়র্ক টাইমসের মধ্যে প্রকাশিত ২,৫০০ জনের বেশী ইংরেজি শব্দের সংগ্রহের একটি সংগ্রহ উপস্থাপন করেছি (যেমন লেক্সিক্সিক ভি আমরা বেসেলাইনের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছি নোভেলিটি ক্লাসের বিদ্যমান ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর জন্য এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এনএলপি সিস্টেমের রাষ্ট্রের কোন উন্নতি আমরা আশা করি এই সম্পদ ভাষাবাদী এবং এনএলপি প্রশিক্ষকদের জন্য উপকার প্রমাণ করবে নানা শব্দের প্রকাশিত একটি আসল বিশ্বের পরিবেশ দিয়ে।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo rezultat podataka iz New York Times Word Innovation Types, ili NYTWIT, kolekciju preko 2500 novelnih engleskih riječi objavljenih u New York Times između novembra 2017. i marta 2019. godine, manuelno annotiranu za njihovu klasu novosti (poput leksičke derivacije, dijalektne varijacije, mješanje ili kompaniranje). Predstavljamo početne rezultate za bezkontekstualno i kontekstno predviđanje klase novosti, pokazujući da postoji mjesta za poboljšanje čak i za državne umjetne NLP sisteme. Nadamo se da će ovaj resurs dokazati korisno za lingviste i praktičare NLP-a pružajući realno svetsko okruženje novog pojavljivanja riječi.', 'ca': "Presentam el conjunt de dades de New York Times Word Innovation Types, o NYTWIT, una col·lecció de més de 2.500 noves paraules angleses publicades al New York Times entre novembre 2017 i març 2019, anotats manualment per la seva classe de novetat (com la derivació lèxica, variació dialectal, mistura o composició). We present baseline results for both uncontextual and contextual prediction of novelty class, showing that there is room for improvement even for state-of-the-art NLP systems.  Esperem que aquest recurso resulti útil per als lingüistes i als practicants de la NLP proporcionant un entorn real d'aparença nova de paraules.", 'et': 'Esitleme New York Timesi sõnade innovatsioonitüüpide andmekogumit ehk NYTWIT, mis koosneb üle 2500 uudsest inglise keele sõnast, mis avaldati New York Timesis 2017. aasta novembrist kuni 2019. aasta märtsini ning mis on käsitsi märgitud nende uudsuse klassi (nt leksikaalne tuletamine, dialektiline variatsioon, segamine või segamine). Esitame nii uudsusklassi mittekstuaalsete kui kontekstuaalsete prognooside lähtetulemused, mis näitavad, et arenguruumi on ka kaasaegsete NLP süsteemide puhul. Loodame, et see ressurss osutub keeleteadlastele ja NLP praktikutele kasulikuks, pakkudes reaalset keskkonda uudsete sõnade ilmumiseks.', 'cs': 'Představujeme datovou sadu New York Times Word Innovation Types, neboli NYTWIT, sbírku více než 2.500 románových anglických slov publikovaných v New York Times od listopadu 2017 do března 2019, ručně anotovaných pro jejich třídu novosti (jako je lexikální odvození, dialektální variace, míchání nebo složení). Prezentujeme základní výsledky nekontextuální i kontextuální predikce třídy novosti, což ukazuje, že existuje prostor pro zlepšení i u nejmodernějších NLP systémů. Doufáme, že tento zdroj bude užitečný pro lingvisty a NLP praktiky tím, že poskytne reálné prostředí vzhledu nových slov.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme New York Timesin Word Innovation Types -tietokannan eli NYTWIT-kokoelman, joka sisältää yli 2 500 uutta englanninkielistä sanaa, jotka julkaistiin New York Timesissa marraskuun 2017 ja maaliskuun 2019 välisenä aikana ja jotka on merkitty manuaalisesti niiden uutuusluokkaan (kuten sanastojohdanto, murteellinen variaatio, sekoitus tai yhdistäminen). Esitämme lähtötilanteen tulokset sekä asiayhteydettömästä että kontekstuaalisesta uutuusluokan ennustamisesta, mikä osoittaa, että parantamisen varaa on myös nykyaikaisissa NLP-järjestelmissä. Toivomme, että tämä resurssi osoittautuu hyödylliseksi kielitieteilijöille ja NLP-ammattilaisille tarjoamalla todellisen ympäristön, jossa uusia sanoja esiintyy.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam nabor podatkov New York Times Word Innovation Tips (NYTWIT), zbirko več kot 2500 novih angleških besed, objavljenih v New York Timesu med novembrom 2017 in marcem 2019, z ročnimi opombami za njihov razred novosti (kot so leksikalna izpeljava, narečna variacija, mešanje ali sestavljanje). Predstavljamo osnovne rezultate tako za nekekstualno kot kontekstualno napovedovanje razreda novosti, ki kažejo, da je prostora za izboljšave tudi za najsodobnejše sisteme NLP. Upamo, da se bo ta vir izkazal za koristnega za jezikoslovce in strokovnjake NLP, saj bo zagotovil resnično okolje novih besed.', 'ha': "We present the New York Times Word Innovation Types dataset, or NYTWIT, a collection of over 2,500 novel English words published in the New York Times between November 2017 and March 2019, manually annotated for their class of novelty (such as lexical derivation, dialectal variation, blending, or compounding).  Tuna halatar da matsalar bakwai na fara-gabanin da ba'a taƙaita ba, kuma masu nuna cewa, akwai wani wuri wa improve ko kuma don tsarin-state-of-the-art-NLP. Tuna tsammãni, wannan resource zai iya amfani da masu cikin harshen-harshen da mãsu aiki na NLP game da su gajiya wata mazaɓa mai gaskata-duniya ga kalmar nan mai nuna.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe New Yok Time Word Inolation Types dataset, atawa NYT, kawula sing katêpakan karo 2,500 dolar kanggo nyumbang Inggris sing dipuasik nêmên neng Nowêr, lan martêr 2011, sing isiné dhéwé ngetik gawe nguasah kelas kanggo nyumbang kelas (kaya tanggal déric-déric, dialectal, blending, atawa nggawe). Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing paling-sistem kanggo nggawe barang nggo ngerasahan seneng nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang seneng nggawe sistem sing ora oleh nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang seneng nggawe sistem sing nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang seneng nggawe bara Awak dhéwé bakal ngéwangé iki bakal ngéwangé luwih nggawe barang kelas karo pratike NLP iki bakal ngewehku arep bantuan kanggo nguasara barang dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את קבוצת נתונים של טיפוסי ניו יורק טיימס מידע, או ניו יורק טיימס (NYTWIT), אוסף של יותר מ-2,500 מילים אנגליות רומניות שפורסמו בניו יורק טיימס בין נובמבר 2017 למרץ 2019, שנמצאים באופן ידני לכיתה שלהם של חדשות (כמו נגזרת לקסיקה, שוורציה דיאלקטלית, שילוב או ריכוב). אנחנו מציגים תוצאות בסיסית גם לחזוי בלתי-קונטקסטי וגם קונטקסטי של שיעור חדשות, מראים שיש מקום לשיפור אפילו למערכות NLP מצוינות. אנו מקווים שהמשאב הזה יהיה שימושי לשונגים ומאמנים NLP על ידי לספק סביבת עולם אמיתי של מילה חדשה מופיעה.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་New York Times Word Innovation Types གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་གསར་འབྱུང་རིམ་གྱི་རྩལ་གཞི་རྗེས་སུ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་འདི་སྐད་རིགས་སྨྲ་བ་དང་། NLP ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཅིག་འཛམ་གླིང'}
{'en': 'XED : A Multilingual Dataset for Sentiment Analysis and Emotion Detection', 'ar': 'XED: مجموعة بيانات متعددة اللغات لتحليل المشاعر واكتشاف المشاعر', 'fr': "XED\xa0: un ensemble de données multilingue pour l'analyse des sentiments et la détection des émotions", 'es': 'XED: un conjunto de datos multilingüe para análisis de sentimientos y detección de emociones', 'pt': 'XED: um conjunto de dados multilíngue para análise de sentimentos e detecção de emoções', 'ja': 'XED ：感情分析と感情検出のための多言語データセット', 'zh': 'XED曰:以情检者,多言数集', 'hi': 'XED: भावना विश्लेषण और भावना का पता लगाने के लिए एक बहुभाषी डेटासेट', 'ru': 'XED: Многоязычный набор данных для анализа настроений и обнаружения эмоций', 'ga': 'XED: Tacar Sonraí Ilteangach le haghaidh Anailíse Mothúcháin agus Brath Mothúcháin', 'ka': 'XED: მრავალენგური მონაცემები Sentiment Analysis and Emotion Detection', 'hu': 'XED: Többnyelvű adatkészlet az érzelmek elemzéséhez és az érzelmek felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Ένα πολύγλωσσο σύνολο δεδομένων για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων', 'kk': 'XED: Sentiment анализ және көңіл көңіл анықтау үшін көптілік деректер бағдарламасы', 'it': "XED: un dataset multilingue per l'analisi dei sentimenti e la rilevazione delle emozioni", 'lt': 'XED: Daugiakalbis jutimo analizės ir emocijos nustatymo duomenų rinkinys', 'ml': 'എക്സ്എഡി: സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനും ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനും ഒരു പല ഭാഷ ഡാറ്റാ', 'mk': 'XED: Мултијазичен датотек за анализа на чувствата и детекција на емоции', 'ms': 'XED: Satu Set Data Berbahasa untuk Analisi Sentiment dan Pengesanan Emosi', 'mt': 'XED: Sett ta’ Dejta Multilingwi għall-Analiżi tas-Sentimenti u l-Iskejjel tal-Emożizzjonijiet', 'mn': 'XED: Sentiment Analysis and Emotion Detection дэх олон хэл өгөгдлийн санг', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'XED: Wielojęzyczny zestaw danych do analizy sentymentów i wykrywania emocji', 'ro': 'XED: Un set de date multilingv pentru analiza sentimentelor și detectarea emoțiilor', 'sr': 'XED: Multijezički podaci za analizu sentimenta i detekciju emocija', 'si': 'XED: Sentiment විශේෂණය සහ Emotion හොයාගන්න ගොඩක් භාෂාවික දත්ත සැකසුම්', 'ta': 'XED: உணர்வு ஆராய்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான பல்மொழி தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'so': 'XED: Xafiiska sawirada luuqadaha badan', 'ur': 'XED: Sentiment Analysis and Emotion Detection کے لئے ایک Multilingual Dataset', 'sv': 'XED: Ett flerspråkigt dataset för känsloanalys och känslodetektering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tu viện đa ngôn ngữ cho bộ phận phân tích cảm xúc và cảm xúc.', 'bg': 'Многоезичен набор от данни за анализ на чувствата и откриване на емоции', 'hr': 'XED: Multijezički podaci za analizu i detekciju emocija', 'da': 'XED: Et flersproget datasæt til følelsesanalyse og følelsesdetektion', 'nl': 'XED: Een meertalige dataset voor sentimentanalyse en emotionele detectie', 'de': 'XED: Ein mehrsprachiger Datensatz zur Sentimentanalyse und Emotionserkennung', 'ko': 'XD: 정서 분석 및 정서 측정을 위한 다국어 데이터 세트', 'id': 'XED: Satu Set Data Berbahasa untuk Analisi Sentimen dan Deteksi Emosi', 'fa': 'XED: یک داده\u200cهای زیادی زبان برای شناسایی تحلیل و احساسات احساسات', 'sw': 'XED: Taarifa za lugha nyingi kwa ajili ya uchambuzi na Uchunguzi', 'af': "XED: ' n Veelvuldige DatabaseComment", 'tr': 'XED: Sentiment Analizi ve Duygulama Tanımlamak için Çoklu dilli Veri', 'sq': 'XED: Një bazë të dhënash shumëgjuhëse për analizën e ndjenjave dhe zbulimin e emocioneve', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'XED: Sentiment Analizi və Emotiyon Gedişatları üçün çoxlu Dil Verici', 'hy': 'XED: Զգացմունքների վերլուծության և զգացմունքների բազմալեզու տվյալների համակարգ', 'bn': 'XED: সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ এবং ইমোটেশন সনাক্তের জন্য একটি বহুভাষী ডাটাসেট', 'bs': 'XED: Multijezički podaci za analizu i detekciju emocija', 'cs': 'XED: Vícejazyčná sada dat pro analýzu sentimentů a detekci emocí', 'ca': "XED: Un conjunt de dades multilingües per a l'anàlisi del sentiment i la detecció d'emocions", 'et': 'XED: Mitmekeelne andmekogum tunnete analüüsimiseks ja emotsioonide tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'XED: Monikielinen tietosarja tunteiden analysointiin ja tunteiden havaitsemiseen', 'jv': 'XED: A Multilanguage Datease for Sentiment Test and emutation detection', 'he': 'XED: קבוצת נתונים רבות שפות עבור ניתוח רגשות וגילוי רגשות', 'ha': "XED: An daidaita data na ɗayan harshe na ɗabi'a wa Ana yi Ana Bayani da Ƙarafi", 'sk': 'XED: Večjezični nabor podatkov za analizo čustev in zaznavanje čustev', 'bo': 'XED: A Multilingual Dataset for Sentiment Analysis and Emotion Detection'}
{'en': 'We introduce XED, a multilingual fine-grained emotion dataset. The dataset consists of human-annotated Finnish (25k) and English sentences (30k), as well as projected annotations for 30 additional languages, providing new resources for many low-resource languages. We use Plutchik’s core emotions to annotate the dataset with the addition of neutral to create a multilabel multiclass dataset. The dataset is carefully evaluated using language-specific BERT models and SVMs to show that XED performs on par with other similar datasets and is therefore a useful tool for sentiment analysis and emotion detection.', 'ar': 'نقدم XED ، وهي مجموعة بيانات متعددة اللغات دقيقة الحبيبات. تتكون مجموعة البيانات من جمل الفنلندية المشروحة بشريًا (25 كيلو بايت) والإنجليزية (30 كيلو بايت) ، بالإضافة إلى التعليقات التوضيحية المتوقعة لـ 30 لغة إضافية ، مما يوفر موارد جديدة للعديد من اللغات منخفضة الموارد. نستخدم عواطف بلوتشيك الأساسية للتعليق على مجموعة البيانات مع إضافة المحايدة لإنشاء مجموعة بيانات متعددة الفئات متعددة الفئات. يتم تقييم مجموعة البيانات بعناية باستخدام نماذج BERT الخاصة باللغة و SVMs لإظهار أن XED يعمل على قدم المساواة مع مجموعات البيانات المماثلة الأخرى ، وبالتالي فهو أداة مفيدة لتحليل المشاعر واكتشاف المشاعر.', 'fr': "Nous présentons XED, un ensemble de données multilingue sur les émotions à grain fin. Le jeu de données comprend des phrases en finnois (25 000) et en anglais annotées par des humains (30 ko), ainsi que des annotations projetées pour 30 langues supplémentaires, fournissant de nouvelles ressources pour de nombreuses langues à faibles ressources. Nous utilisons les émotions de base de Plutchik pour annoter le jeu de données avec l'ajout de neutre afin de créer un jeu de données multiclasses multi-étiquettes. L'ensemble de données est soigneusement évalué à l'aide de modèles BERT et de SVM spécifiques à la langue pour montrer que XED fonctionne comme d'autres ensembles de données similaires et constitue donc un outil utile pour l'analyse des sentiments et la détection des émotions.", 'es': 'Presentamos XED, un conjunto de datos de emociones detallado y multilingüe. El conjunto de datos consiste en frases en finés (25k) e inglés (30k) anotadas por humanos, así como anotaciones proyectadas para 30 idiomas adicionales, lo que proporciona nuevos recursos para muchos idiomas de bajos recursos. Utilizamos las emociones principales de Plutchik para anotar el conjunto de datos con la adición de neutral para crear un conjunto de datos multiclase de etiquetas múltiples. El conjunto de datos se evalúa cuidadosamente mediante modelos BERT y SVM específicos del idioma para mostrar que XED funciona a la par con otros conjuntos de datos similares y, por lo tanto, es una herramienta útil para el análisis de sentimientos y la detección de emociones.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o XED, um conjunto de dados multilíngue de granulação fina de emoções. O conjunto de dados consiste em frases em finlandês (25k) e inglês (30k) com anotações humanas, bem como anotações projetadas para 30 idiomas adicionais, fornecendo novos recursos para muitos idiomas de poucos recursos. Usamos as emoções centrais de Plutchik para anotar o conjunto de dados com a adição de neutro para criar um conjunto de dados multiclasse multilabel. O conjunto de dados é cuidadosamente avaliado usando modelos BERT e SVMs específicos da linguagem para mostrar que o XED funciona no mesmo nível de outros conjuntos de dados semelhantes e, portanto, é uma ferramenta útil para análise de sentimentos e detecção de emoções.', 'ja': '多言語の細かい感情データセットであるXEDをご紹介します。このデータセットは、人間が注釈を付けたフィンランド語（ 25,000 ）と英語（ 30,000 ）の文章、および30の追加言語の予測された注釈で構成されており、多くの低リソース言語に新しいリソースを提供します。Plutchikのコア感情を使用して、ニュートラルを追加してデータセットに注釈を付け、マルチラベルマルチクラスデータセットを作成します。データセットは、言語固有のBERTモデルおよびSVMを使用して慎重に評価され、XEDが他の同様のデータセットと同等に実行されることを示し、したがって、感情分析および感情検出のための有用なツールである。', 'zh': '引入XED,多言细粒度情数集。 其数集由人工所注芬兰语(25k)及英语句(30k)及30种他语影注成,为诸低资源语供新资。 用Plutchik核心情注释数据集,并添中性创多标签多类数集。 用特定于言者BERT与SVM孰料数集,以明XED之性与他类相当,故情析情检之有用也。', 'hi': 'हम XED, एक बहुभाषी ठीक दानेदार भावना डेटासेट पेश करते हैं। डेटासेट में मानव-एनोटेटेड फिनिश (25k) और अंग्रेजी वाक्य (30k) शामिल हैं, साथ ही साथ 30 अतिरिक्त भाषाओं के लिए अनुमानित एनोटेशन भी शामिल हैं, जो कई कम संसाधन भाषाओं के लिए नए संसाधन प्रदान करते हैं। हम एक मल्टीलेबल मल्टीक्लास डेटासेट बनाने के लिए तटस्थ के अलावा डेटासेट को एनोटेट करने के लिए प्लूचिक की मुख्य भावनाओं का उपयोग करते हैं। डेटासेट का मूल्यांकन भाषा-विशिष्ट BERT मॉडल और SVM का उपयोग करके सावधानीपूर्वक किया जाता है ताकि यह दिखाया जा सके कि XED अन्य समान डेटासेट के बराबर प्रदर्शन करता है और इसलिए भावना विश्लेषण और भावना का पता लगाने के लिए एक उपयोगी उपकरण है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем XED, многоязычный мелкозернистый набор данных об эмоциях. Набор данных состоит из аннотированных человеком предложений на финском (25 тыс.) и английском (30 тыс.) языках, а также прогнозируемых аннотаций для 30 дополнительных языков, что обеспечивает новые ресурсы для многих языков с низким уровнем ресурсов. Мы используем основные эмоции Плутчика для аннотирования набора данных с добавлением нейтрального для создания многоуровневого многоклассового набора данных. Набор данных тщательно оценивается с использованием языковых моделей BERT и виртуальных машин защиты, чтобы показать, что xed работает наравне с другими аналогичными наборами данных и поэтому является полезным инструментом для анализа настроений и обнаружения эмоций.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach XED, tacar sonraí mothúchánach ilteangach mionghnéitheach. Is éard atá sa tacar sonraí ná abairtí Fionlainnise (25k) agus Béarla (30k) le nótaí daonna, chomh maith le nótaí réamh-mheasta do 30 teanga breise, ag soláthar acmhainní nua do go leor teangacha íseal-acmhainne. Bainimid úsáid as mothúcháin lárnacha Plutchik chun an tacar sonraí a anótáil le neodrach a chur leis chun tacar sonraí illipéid il-aicme a chruthú. Déantar an tacar sonraí a mheas go cúramach agus úsáid á baint as samhlacha BERT agus SVManna a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga chun a thaispeáint go bhfeidhmíonn XED ar chomhchéim le tacair sonraí cosúla eile agus mar sin gur uirlis úsáideach é le haghaidh anailíse meon agus mothúcháin a bhrath.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πολύγλωσσο, λεπτόκοκκο σύνολο δεδομένων συναισθημάτων. Το σύνολο δεδομένων αποτελείται από σχολιασμένες από ανθρώπους φινλανδικές (25κ) και αγγλικές προτάσεις (30κ), καθώς και προγραμματισμένες σχολιάσεις για 30 επιπλέον γλώσσες, παρέχοντας νέους πόρους για πολλές γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου. Χρησιμοποιούμε τα βασικά συναισθήματα του για να σχολιάσουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων με την προσθήκη ουδέτερου για να δημιουργήσουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων πολλαπλών ετικετών. Το σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολογείται προσεκτικά χρησιμοποιώντας ειδικά για τη γλώσσα μοντέλα BERT και SVMs για να δείξει ότι το XED λειτουργεί εξίσου με άλλα παρόμοια σύνολα δεδομένων και ως εκ τούτου είναι ένα χρήσιμο εργαλείο για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ XED-ს გაჩვენებთ, მრავალენგური მონაცემების მონაცემები. მონაცემების კონფინური (25k) და ინგლისური სიტყვების (30k) შეფარდება, და პროგექტირებული ანოტაციები 30 დამატებული ენათებისთვის, ახალი რესურსები მნიშვნელოვანებისთვის. ჩვენ Plutchik-ის მნიშვნელოვანი ემოციები გამოყენებთ მონაცემების კონტაქტის დამატებით ნეირრალური დამატებით მრავალური მონაცემების შექმნა. მონაცემების კონფიგური BERT მოდელები და SVMs გამოყენება, რომ XED სხვა განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციაში გავაკეთება და ამიტომ სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის და ემოციონებ', 'it': "Vi presentiamo XED, un dataset multilingue di emozioni a grana fine. Il set di dati è costituito da frasi in finlandese (25k) e inglese (30k) con annotazioni umane, nonché annotazioni previste per 30 lingue aggiuntive, fornendo nuove risorse per molte lingue a basso contenuto di risorse. Usiamo le emozioni fondamentali di Plutchik per annotare il dataset con l'aggiunta di neutri per creare un dataset multiclass multilabel. Il set di dati viene attentamente valutato utilizzando modelli BERT specifici per il linguaggio e SVM per dimostrare che XED funziona alla pari con altri set di dati simili ed è quindi uno strumento utile per l'analisi dei sentimenti e il rilevamento delle emozioni.", 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az XED-t, egy többnyelvű finomszemcsés érzelmi adatkészletet. Az adatkészlet emberi megjegyzésekkel ellátott finn (25k) és angol (30k) mondatokból áll, valamint 30 további nyelvre tervezett megjegyzésekből áll, ami új forrásokat biztosít számos alacsony erőforrású nyelv számára. A Plutchik alapvető érzelmeit használjuk az adatkészletnek a semleges hozzáadásával történő jegyzetelésére, hogy létrehozzunk egy többcímkés többosztályú adatkészletet. Az adatkészletet gondosan értékelik nyelvspecifikus BERT modellek és SVM-k segítségével annak megmutatására, hogy az XED más hasonló adatkészletekkel egyenlő teljesítményt nyújt, ezért hasznos eszköz az érzelmek elemzéséhez és érzelmek felismeréséhez.', 'lt': 'We introduce XED, a multilingual fine-grained emotion dataset.  The dataset consists of human-annotated Finnish (25k) and English sentences (30k), as well as projected annotations for 30 additional languages, providing new resources for many low-resource languages.  Mes naudojame Plutchik pagrindines emocijas, kad anotuotume duomenų rinkinį pridėdami neutral ų, kad sukurtume daugiakalassinį duomenų rinkinį. Duomenų rinkinys kruopščiai vertinamas naudojant kalbos specifinius BERT modelius ir SVM, kad būtų galima įrodyti, jog XED veikia lygiai su kitais panašiais duomenų rinkiniais, todėl jis yra naudinga sentiment ų analizės ir emocijų aptikimo priemonė.', 'kk': 'Біз XED-ді көптеген тілді емоциялық деректер жиынын таңдаймыз. Деректер жиында адамдардың белгіленген финск (25k) және ағылшын сөйлемелері (30k), 30 қосымша тілдер үшін жаңа ресурстарды береді. Біз Плутчиктің негізгі емоцияларын қолданып, көп- белгілер көп- класс деректер жинағын құру үшін деректер жинағын қосу үшін белгілерді қолданамыз. Деректер жинағы тілдерді беRT үлгілерімен және SVMs қолдану үшін XED басқа ұқсас деректер жинақтарымен жұмыс істейтінін көрсету үшін тәжірибелі бағалады, сондықтан сезімдерді анализ және эмоцияларды анықтау', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan XED, set data emosi berbilang bahasa. The dataset consists of human-annotated Finnish (25k) and English sentences (30k), as well as projected annotations for 30 additional languages, providing new resources for many low-resource languages.  Kami menggunakan emosi utama Plutchik untuk anotasi set data dengan tambahan neutral untuk mencipta set data berkelas berbilang label. Set data dilihat dengan hati-hati menggunakan model BERT khusus bahasa dan SVM untuk menunjukkan bahawa XED berfungsi sama dengan set data yang sama lain dan oleh itu adalah alat berguna untuk analisis perasaan dan pengesan emosi.', 'mk': 'Ние го претставуваме XED, мултијазичен компјутер на емоционални податоци. The dataset consists of human-annotated Finnish (25k) and English sentences (30k), as well as projected annotations for 30 additional languages, providing new resources for many low-resource languages.  Ги користиме основните емоции на Plutchik за да го анотираме датотеката со додавање на неутрален датотек за да создадеме мултиетикет мултикласичен датотек. Податоците се внимателно проценуваат користејќи јазички специфични модели BERT и SVM за да се покаже дека XED функционира во споредба со други слични податоци и затоа е корисна алатка за анализа на чувствата и детекција на емоциите.', 'mt': "Aħna nintroduċu XED, sett ta’ dejta multilingwi ta’ emozzjonijiet imqabbda fin. Is-sett tad-dejta jikkonsisti f’sentenzi Finlandiżi annotati mill-bniedem (25k) u Ingliż (30k), kif ukoll annotazzjonijiet proġettati għal 30 lingwa addizzjonali, li jipprovdu riżorsi ġodda għal ħafna lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi. We use Plutchik's core emotions to annotate the dataset with the addition of neutral to create a multilabel multiclass dataset.  Is-sett tad-dejta huwa evalwat bir-reqqa bl-użu ta’ mudelli BERT speċifiċi għall-lingwa u SVMs biex juru li XED iwettaq l-istess prestazzjoni ma’ settijiet tad-dejta simili oħra u għalhekk huwa għodda utli għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti u l-individwazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet.", 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d എക്സിഡിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരു പല ഭാഷക്കാരന്\u200d നല്ല വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ്. ഈ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200d വിചാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫിനിഷ്യനും (25k) ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാക്കുകളും (30k), 30 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി പ്രോജക്ട് ചെയ്തിരിക് പ്ലാറ്റ്ചിക്കിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനെ പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നത് നെയ്റ്റല്\u200d കൂ ഭാഷ- പ്രത്യേക ബെര്\u200dടി മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് ഭാഷ- പ്രത്യേകിച്ച BERT മോഡലുകളും SVMs ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മറ്റു പോലുള്ള ഡാറ്റ', 'mn': 'Бид XED-г олон хэлний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн өгөгдлийг танилцуулдаг. Мэдээллийн санд хүн төрөлхтний (25k) болон Англи хэлний өгүүлбэр (30k) байдаг. Мөн 30 нэмэлт хэл дээр шинэ нөөц боловсруулдаг. Бид Плутчикийн үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн санг олон ангид өгөгдлийн санг бий болгохын тулд нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой. Өгөгдлийн санг хэл дээр тодорхой BERT загвар болон SVMs ашиглаж, XED өөр төстэй өгөгдлийн сангуудтай харьцуулж байгааг харуулахын тулд анхаарлаа үнэлгээгддэг. Тиймээс сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжил', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy XED, wielojęzyczny zestaw danych dotyczących emocji. Zestaw danych składa się z adnotacji fińskiej (25k) i angielskiej (30k), a także prognozowanych adnotacji dla 30 dodatkowych języków, dostarczając nowych zasobów dla wielu języków o niskich zasobach. Używamy głównych emocji Plutchika do adnotacji zbioru danych z dodaniem neutralnego, aby stworzyć wieloznakowy wieloznakowy zestaw danych. Zestaw danych jest starannie oceniany przy użyciu specyficznych dla języka modeli BERT i SVM, aby wykazać, że XED działa na równi z innymi podobnymi zbiorami danych i dlatego jest przydatnym narzędziem do analizy sentymentów i wykrywania emocji.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer XED, ein fleirspråk fyrst følelsesettet. Datasettet inneheld av menneskelige (25k) og engelske setningar (30k), og forebygde notasjonar for 30 tilleggspråk, og tilbyr nye ressursar for mange låg ressursspråk. Vi bruker Plutchikos kjerneemosjonar for å oppmerka datasettet med tillegg til nøytralt for å oppretta eit multiklassisk dataset. Datasettet er forsiktig evaluert ved hjelp av språkkspesifikke BERT-modeller og SVMs for å visa at XED utfører på par med andre liknande datasett og derfor er eit nyttig verktøy for sentimentanalyse og emosjonsoppdaging.', 'ro': 'Introducem XED, un set de date multilingv de emoții cu granule fine. Setul de date constă din fraze finlandeze (25k) și engleză (30k) adnotate de om, precum și adnotații proiectate pentru 30 de limbi suplimentare, oferind noi resurse pentru multe limbi cu resurse reduse. Folosim emoțiile de bază ale Plutchik pentru a adnota setul de date cu adăugarea de neutru pentru a crea un set de date multiclass multilabel. Setul de date este evaluat cu atenție folosind modele BERT specifice limbajului și SVM-uri pentru a demonstra că XED performează la egalitate cu alte seturi de date similare și, prin urmare, este un instrument util pentru analiza sentimentelor și detectarea emoțiilor.', 'si': 'අපි XED වෙනුවෙන්, ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විශේෂ දත්ත සැකයක්. දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය (25k) සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වචන (30k), සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය 30 භාෂාවට අපි Plutchikoගේ මුළු හැඟීම භාවිතා කරනවා ගොඩක් ලේබල් ගොඩක් ලේබල් තොරතුරු සෙට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. දත්ත සැට් භාෂාව විශේෂ BERT මොඩේල් සහ SVMs වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්න XED විශේෂ දත්ත සැට් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියල', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo XED, višejezički kompleks emocija. Podaci se sastavljaju od finskih (25k) i engleskih rečenica (30k), kao i predviđenih annotacija za 30 dodatnih jezika, pružajući nove resurse za mnoge jezike niskih resursa. Koristimo Plutchikove jezgre emocije kako bi annotirali setu podataka s a dodavanjem neutralnog za stvaranje multiklasnog seta podataka. Podaci se pažljivo procjenjuju koristeći specijalne jezičke modele BERT i SVMs kako bi pokazali da XED izvodi na par sa drugim sličnim podacima i stoga je korisni alat za analizu sentiment a i otkrivanje emocija.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa XED, taas oo ah macluumaad xafiiska ah oo kala duduwan. Taariikhda macluumaadku waxay ka mid yihiin luqadaha Finnishka (25k) iyo Ingiriiska (30k), sidoo kale waxay ku qoran yihiin dhibaatooyin 30 luuqadood oo kale, kuwaas oo u fidiya resources cusub oo ay leeyihiin luuqado aad u hooseeya. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa xisaabta kooxa ah ee Plutchik si aan u caddeyno sawirada kooxda kooxaha kala duduwan. Sawirada macluumaadka waxaa si taxadar ah loogu qiimeynayaa isticmaalka modelalka BERT ee luuqada gaar ah iyo SVMs si uu u muujiyo in XED uu ku sameeyo qoraalka kale oo lamid ah, sababtaas darteed waa qalabka faa’iidada u leh baaritaanka fikirka iyo xisaabta fikrada.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar XED, en flerspråkig finkornig känslodataset. Datauppsättningen består av mänskliga kommentarer på finska (25k) och engelska (30k) samt planerade kommentarer för ytterligare 30 språk, vilket ger nya resurser för många lågresursspråk. Vi använder Plutchiks kärnkänslor för att kommentera datauppsättningen med tillägg av neutral för att skapa en multilabel multiclass datauppsättning. Datauppsättningen utvärderas noggrant med hjälp av språkspecifika BERT-modeller och SVM för att visa att XED presterar i nivå med andra liknande datauppsättningar och är därför ett användbart verktyg för sentimentalanalys och känslodetektering.', 'ur': 'ہم XED کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک بہت سی زبان کے مطابق احساسات ڈیٹ سٹ۔ ڈاٹ سٹ میں انسان کے ذریعہ مضبوط فنلاندی (25k) اور انگلیسی جماعت (30k) سے ہے، اور 30 زیادہ زبانوں کے لئے مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط مضبوط ہم پلٹچیک کی کور احساسات استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ڈاٹ سٹ کو نٹرال کے اضافہ کے ساتھ ایک multilabel multiclass ڈاٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے اضافہ کریں. ڈاٹ سٹ کو زبان کے مطابق BERT موڈل اور SVMs کے استعمال سے دکھائے جاتے ہیں کہ XED دوسرے جیسا ڈاٹ سٹ کے ساتھ پار کرتا ہے اور اس لئے احساسات تحلیل اور احساسات شناسایی کے لئے ایک فائدہ وسیلہ ہے.', 'ta': 'நாம் XED, ஒரு பல மொழியில் அழகான உணர்வு தகவல் அமைப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம். இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தில் மனித குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட பின்சி (25k) மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தின் வாக்கியங்கள் (30k), மற்றும் 30 கூடுதல் மொழிகளுக்கு திட்டப்பட்டுள நாம் ப்ளாட்சிக்கின் மூல உணர்வுகளை பயன்படுத்தி தரவுத்தளத்தை அறிவிக்க முடியும் பிளாட்சிக் பல வகுப்பு தரவுத்தளத்தை உருவா தகவல் அமைப்பு மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட BERT மாதிரிகள் பயன்படுத்தி முகவராக மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது மற்றும் மற்றும் போன்ற தகவல் அமைப்புகளுடன் XED செயல்படுகிறது என்பதை க', 'uz': "Biz bir necha tilda juda yaxshi hissiyot maʼlumotlarini XED'ni ko'rib chiqaramiz. Maʼlumotlar tarkibi 25 km (25k) va ingliz tili (30k) so'zlaridan iborat va 30 qoʻshimcha tillar uchun taʼminlov qilingan narsalar bor. Koʻproq Resource tillari uchun yangi rasmlar yaratadi. @ info: whatsthis Name", 'vi': "Chúng tôi giới thiệu hộp thư, một bộ dữ liệu cảm xúc đa dạng. Bộ dữ liệu gồm ngôn ngữ Phần Lan được ghi chú con người (25k) và câu Anh (30k) cũng như ghi chú dự kiến cho 30'bổ sung ngôn ngữ, cung cấp nguồn tài nguyên mới cho nhiều ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Chúng tôi dùng cảm xúc cốt lõi của Plutarch để ghi chú bộ dữ liệu với s ự thêm trung lập để tạo một tập tin chứa nhiều mẫu. Bộ dữ liệu được đánh giá cẩn thận bằng các mô hình SAVITZ của ngôn ngữ. và kĩ thuật tương ứng phát hiện biểu biểu biểu biểu biểu biểu biểu biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu hiện biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng.", 'bg': 'Представяме многоезичен набор от данни за емоциите. Наборът от данни се състои от човешки анотирани финландски (25к) и английски изречения (30к), както и прогнозирани анотации за 30 допълнителни езика, осигуряващи нови ресурси за много езици с ниски ресурси. Използваме основните емоции на Плучик, за да анотираме набора от данни с добавяне на неутрален, за да създадем многоетикетен многокласен набор от данни. Наборът от данни е внимателно оценен, като се използват специфични за езика модели BERT и SVM, за да се покаже, че XED работи равностойно с други подобни набори от данни и следователно е полезен инструмент за анализ на чувствата и откриване на емоции.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo XED, višejezički kompletni komplet emocija. Podaci se sastavljaju od finskih (25k) i engleskih rečenica (30k), kao i predviđenih annotacija za 30 dodatnih jezika, pružajući nove resurse za mnoge jezike niskih resursa. Koristimo Plutchikove temeljne emocije kako bismo annotirali komplet podataka s dodavanjem neutralnog za stvaranje multiklasnog kompeta podataka. Podaci se pažljivo procjenjuju koristeći specijalne jezičke modele BERT-a i SVM-a kako bi pokazali da XED djeluje na par s drugim sličnim podacima i stoga je korisni alat za analizu osjećaja i otkrivanje emocija.', 'nl': "We introduceren XED, een meertalige fijngranige emotionele dataset. De dataset bestaat uit door mensen geannoteerde Finse (25k) en Engelse zinnen (30k), evenals geprojecteerde annotaties voor 30 extra talen, die nieuwe bronnen bieden voor vele low-resource talen. We gebruiken Plutchik's kernemoties om de dataset te annoteren met de toevoeging van neutraal om een multilabel multiclass dataset te creëren. De dataset wordt zorgvuldig geëvalueerd met behulp van taalspecifieke BERT modellen en SVM's om aan te tonen dat XED op gelijke voet presteert met andere vergelijkbare datasets en daarom een nuttig hulpmiddel is voor sentimentanalyse en emotie detectie.", 'da': "Vi introducerer XED, et flersproget finkornet følelsesdatasyt. Datasættet består af menneskelige annoterede finske (25k) og engelske sætninger (30k) samt forventede annoteringer til yderligere 30 sprog, der giver nye ressourcer til mange lav ressource sprog. Vi bruger Plutchiks kernefølelser til at annotere datasættet med tilføjelse af neutral til at skabe et multilabel multiclass datasæt. Datasættet evalueres omhyggeligt ved hjælp af sprogspecifikke BERT modeller og SVM'er for at vise, at XED fungerer på niveau med andre lignende datasæt og derfor er et nyttigt redskab til sentimentalanalyse og følelsesdetektion.", 'de': 'Wir stellen XED vor, einen mehrsprachigen, feinkörnigen Emotionsdatensatz. Der Datensatz besteht aus human-annotierten finnischen (25k) und englischen Sätzen (30k) sowie projizierten Anmerkungen für 30 weitere Sprachen, die neue Ressourcen für viele ressourcenarme Sprachen bereitstellen. Wir verwenden Plutchiks Kernemotionen, um den Datensatz mit dem Zusatz von neutral zu kommentieren, um einen Multilabel-Multiclass-Datensatz zu erstellen. Der Datensatz wird sorgfältig anhand sprachspezifischer BERT-Modelle und SVMs ausgewertet, um zu zeigen, dass XED mit anderen ähnlichen Datensätzen vergleichbar ist und daher ein nützliches Werkzeug für Stimmungsanalyse und Emotionserkennung ist.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan XED, dataset emosi berbeda bahasa. Set data terdiri dari kalimat bahasa Finlandia (25k) dan bahasa Inggris (30k) yang dicatat oleh manusia, serta annotasi proyeksi untuk 30 bahasa tambahan, menyediakan sumber daya baru untuk banyak bahasa sumber daya rendah. Kami menggunakan emosi inti Plutchik untuk anotasi dataset dengan tambahan dari neutral untuk menciptakan dataset multilabel kelas. Set data dilihat dengan hati-hati menggunakan model BERT spesifik bahasa dan SVM untuk menunjukkan bahwa XED berfungsi sama dengan set data yang sama lainnya dan karena itu adalah alat berguna untuk analisis sentimen dan deteksi emosi.', 'ko': '우리는 다중 언어의 세립도 감정 데이터 집합인 XED를 소개했다.이 데이터 집합은 인공적으로 주석된 핀란드어(25k)와 영어 문장(30k), 그리고 다른 30개 언어의 투영 주석으로 구성되어 많은 저자원 언어에 새로운 자원을 제공했다.Plutchik의 핵심 감정을 사용하여 데이터 세트에 주석을 달고 중립 요소를 추가하여 다중 태그 클래스 데이터 세트를 만듭니다.언어별 BERT 모델과 지원 벡터 머신을 사용하여 XD의 성능이 다른 유사한 데이터 세트와 비슷하므로 정서 분석 및 정서 측정에 유용한 도구임을 나타냅니다.', 'fa': 'ما XED را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک مجموعه اطلاعات احساسات زیبا با زبان. مجموعه داده\u200cها از جمله\u200cهای فنلاندی (۲۵ کیلومتر) و انگلیسی (۳۰ کیلومتر) و نوشته\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی برای ۳۰ زبان اضافه\u200cای وجود دارند که منابع جدید برای زبانهای کم منبع است. ما از احساسات اصلی پلتچیک استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مجموعه داده\u200cها را با اضافه\u200cی غیرمساوی برای ایجاد مجموعه داده\u200cهای چند کلاس بیشتری نشان دهیم. مجموعه داده\u200cها با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای BERT ویژه\u200cهای زبان و SVMs به طور کامل ارزیابی می\u200cشوند تا نشان دهند که XED با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مشابه انجام می\u200cدهد و بنابراین یک ابزار مفید برای تحلیل احساسات و شناسایی احساسات است.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha XED, seti ya taarifa za hisia zenye vizuri kwa lugha mbalimbali. Taarifa hizo zinajumuisha hukumu za Kiingereza (25k) za kibinadamu na lugha za Kiingereza (30k), pamoja na matatizo yanayopendekezwa kwa lugha 30 za ziada, na kutoa rasilimali mpya kwa lugha nyingi za rasilimali zisizo za chini. Tunatumia hisia za msingi za Plutchik kutangaza seti za taarifa kwa kuongezea kiteknolojia ili kutengeneza seti ya takwimu za watu wengi. Taarifa hizo zinavutiwa kwa makini kwa kutumia mifano maalum ya lugha ya BERT na SVMs ili kuonyesha kwamba XED inafanya katika pari na seti nyingine kama hizo na kwa hiyo ni zana muhimu kwa uchambuzi wa hisia na kutambua hisia.', 'tr': "Biz XED'i, birnäçe dilli ajaýyp duýgym maglumatyny tanyşdyrýarys. Maglumatlar (30k) diňe adamlaryň (25k) we iňlisçe sözleriň içinde, 30 ekli diller üçin täze çeşmeler saýlayarlar. Plutçikiniň core duýgularyny multi-label multi-klas veri setirini bejermek üçin duýgulamak üçin ullanýarys Maglumat setirini dilleriň beýleki BERT modellerini we SVMsleriň XED beýleki ýaly veri setirleri bilen paýlandygyny görkezmek üçin ünsli deňlendirilýär we şonuň üçin duýgular analýşisi we duýgular tanamak üçin peýdaly bir araçdyr.", 'af': "Ons introduiseer XED, 'n multitaalske fyn-graan emosie-datastel. Die datastel bestaan van mense-annotateerde Finniese (25k) en Engelse teikens (30k), en ook projekteerde notasies vir 30 addisionele tale, verskaf nuwe hulpbron vir baie lae-hulpbron tale. Ons gebruik Plutchik se korrekemosies om die datastel te annoteer met die byvoeg van neutrale om 'n multietiket multiklas datastel te skep. Die datastel is versigtig evalueer deur te gebruik taal-spesifieke BERT modele en SVMs om te wys dat XED uitvoer op par met ander gelyke datastelle en is daarom 'n nuttige hulpmiddel vir sentimentanalisie en emosie beskrywing.", 'sq': "Ne prezantojmë XED, një grup shumë gjuhësh të dhënash emocionale. Të dhënat përbëhen nga fjalët finlandeze (25k) dhe angleze (30k) të anotuara nga njerëzit si dhe nga anotacionet e parashikuara për 30 gjuhë shtesë, duke siguruar burime të reja për shumë gjuhë me burime të ulëta. We use Plutchik's core emotions to annotate the dataset with the addition of neutral to create a multilabel multiclass dataset.  Grupi i të dhënave vlerësohet me kujdes duke përdorur modelet BERT specifike gjuhës dhe SVMs për të treguar se XED funksionon në mënyrë të barabartë me grupet e të dhënave të tjera të ngjashme dhe është kështu një mjet i dobishëm për analizën e ndjenjave dhe zbulimin e emocioneve.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք XED-ը, բազմալեզու, գեղեցիկ զգացմունքների տվյալներ: Տեղեկատվական համակարգը կազմված է մարդկային նշումներով հայտնաբերված ֆինլական (25k) և անգլերեն (30k) նախադասություններից, ինչպես նաև նախագծված նշումներով 30 ավելին լեզուների համար, որոնք նոր ռեսուրսներ են տրամադրում շատ ցածր ռեսուրս Մենք օգտագործում ենք Պլատչիկի հիմնական զգացմունքները, որպեսզի նշում ենք տվյալների համակարգը, ավելացնելով չեզոք տվյալներ բազմադասական տվյալների համակարգ ստեղծելու համար: Տեղեկատվական համակարգը ուշադիր գնահատվում է օգտագործելով լեզվի մասնավոր BER մոդելներ և SVM-ներ, որպեսզի ցույց տաք, որ XED-ը գործում է համաչափ այլ նման տվյալների համակարգով, և հետևաբար օգտակար գործիք է զգացմունքների վերլու', 'az': "Biz XED'i, çoxlu dil müxtəlif hisslər verilənləri tanıdırıq. Verilər qurulusu insan şəkillənmiş Finlandiyalı (25k) və İngilizce cümlələridir (30k), həmçinin 30 addım dillər üçün təmin edilmiş şəkillər, çoxlu düşük ressurs dillərinə yeni mənbələr verir. Biz Plutchiklərin core emosiyalarını çoxlu etiketli çoxlu s ınıf verilən qurğunu yaratmaq üçün verilən qurğunu nötrəliklə bildirmək üçün istifadə edirik. Verici qurğuları dil müəyyən BERT modelləri və SVMs istifadəsində xəbərdar edilir ki, XED başqa bənzər veri qurğuları ilə par çalanır və buna görə də sentiment analizi və emosyon tanıması üçün faydalı bir vasitədir.", 'am': 'XED፣ በብዙ ቋንቋ የተመሳሳይ የስብሰባ ዳታ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን የሰው (25k) እና የኢንግሊዝኛ ቃላት (30k) እና ለ30 ጨዋታ ቋንቋዎች አቅራቢ እና አዲስ ሀብት ለብዙዎች የክፍለ ዕቃ ቋንቋዎች አቅራቢ ነው፡፡ የፕላንክኪን አካባቢ እውቀት ለመግለጥ የደህዳቤውን አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዳታ setet በቋንቋ-BERT models እና SVMs የተጠቃሚ ሆኖ XED ከሌሎች በሚመስለው ዳታተሮች ጋር እንዲያሳየው እና ስለዚህም ማሰናከል እና እውቀት ማግኘት የሚጠቅመው ጥያቄ ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo XED, višejezički komplet emocija. Podaci se sastavljaju od finskih (25k) i engleskih rečenica (30k), kao i predviđenih annotacija za 30 dodatnih jezika, pružajući nove resurse za mnoge jezike niskih resursa. Koristimo Plutchikove jezgresne emocije da annotiramo kompletu podataka s a dodavanjem neutralnog za stvaranje multiklasnog kompleta podataka. Podaci se pažljivo procjenjuju koristeći specijalne jezičke modele BERT i SVMs kako bi pokazali da XED izvodi na par sa drugim sličnim podacima i stoga je korisni alat za analizu osjećaja i otkrivanje emocija.', 'ca': "Introduïm XED, un conjunt de dades emocionals multillengües. The dataset consists of human-annotated Finnish (25k) and English sentences (30k), as well as projected annotations for 30 additional languages, providing new resources for many low-resource languages.  Utilitzem les emocions fonamentals de Plutchik per anotar el conjunt de dades amb l'afecció de neutres per crear un conjunt de dades multiclasse. El conjunt de dades s'evalua atentament utilitzant models BERT específics per llenguatge i SVM per demostrar que XED funciona igualment a altres conjunts de dades similars i, per tant, és una eina útil per a l'anàlisi de sentiments i la detecció emocional.", 'cs': 'Představujeme XED, mnohojazyčný jemnozrnný datový soubor emocí. Datová sada se skládá z lidských anotovaných finských (25k) a anglických vět (30k), stejně jako promítaných anotací pro 30 další jazyky, které poskytují nové zdroje pro mnoho jazyků s nízkými zdroji. Používáme Plutchikovy jádrové emoce k anotaci datové sady s přidáním neutrální pro vytvoření multilabel multiclass datové sady. Datová sada je pečlivě vyhodnocována pomocí jazykově specifických BERT modelů a SVM, aby bylo prokázáno, že XED funguje stejně jako ostatní podobné datové sady, a proto je užitečným nástrojem pro analýzu sentimentů a detekci emocí.', 'et': 'Tutvustame XED-i, mitmekeelset peenrahalist emotsioonide andmekogumit. Andmekogum koosneb inimmärgistatud soome (25k) ja inglise lausetest (30k) ning prognoositud märgistustest 30 täiendava keele jaoks, pakkudes uusi ressursse paljudele vähese ressursiga keeltele. Me kasutame Plutchiku põhilisi emotsioone andmekogumi anoteerimiseks neutraalse lisamisega, et luua mitmeklassiline andmekogum. Andmekogumit hinnatakse hoolikalt keelespetsiifiliste BERT-mudelite ja SVM-ide abil, et näidata, et XED toimib samaväärselt teiste sarnaste andmekogumitega ning on seetõttu kasulik vahend tunnete analüüsimiseks ja emotsioonide tuvastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme XED:n, monikielisen hienorakeisen tunnetiedoston. Aineisto koostuu ihmisen muistiinpanoista suomen (25k) ja englannin lauseista (30k) sekä ennustetuista huomautuksista 30 kielelle, jotka tarjoavat uusia resursseja monille vähävaraisille kielille. Hyödynnämme Plutchikin ydintunteita, jotta tietoaineisto voidaan merkitä neutraalilla tavalla ja luoda moniosainen moniluokkainen tietoaineisto. Aineisto arvioidaan huolellisesti kielispesifisten BERT-mallien ja SVM-mallien avulla, jotta voidaan osoittaa, että XED toimii samalla tavalla kuin muut vastaavat aineistot ja on siksi hyödyllinen työkalu tunteiden analysointiin ja tunteiden havaitsemiseen.', 'bn': 'আমরা এক্সিডিকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, একটি মাল্টিভাষায় ভাষায় ভালো আচরণের ডাটাসেট। এই তথ্যসেটের মধ্যে মানুষের বিরক্তিকর ফিনিশ (২৫কে) এবং ইংরেজী বাক্য (৩০ হাজার) এবং ৩০ ভাষার জন্য প্রস্তাবিত বিষয়বস্তু রয়েছে, যা অনেক কম সম্পদ ভ আমরা প্লাটচিকের ভূমিক অনুভূতি ব্যবহার করি যাতে ডাটাসেটের সংযুক্ত করে মাল্টিলাবেলের মাল্টিক্লাসের ডাটাসেট তৈরি করার ভাষার নির্দিষ্ট বিবেরিটি মডেল এবং SVMs ব্যবহার করে ডাটাসেট পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হচ্ছে যাতে দেখা যায় যে অন্যান্য ধরনের ডাটাসেটের সাথে XED পারে কাজ করে এবং তা', 'he': "אנחנו מכירים את XED, קבוצת מידע רגשות רבות שפויות, מוצגת. קבוצת המידע מורכבת משפטים פיננים (25k) ואנגליים (30k) עם ציונים אנושיים, כמו גם ציונים מתוכננים עבור 30 שפות נוספות, המספקים משאבים חדשים לשפות נמוכות רבות. אנו משתמשים ברגשות הליבה של פלאצ'יק כדי להציין את קבוצת המידע עם ההוספת של ניטרלי כדי ליצור קבוצת מידע רבות מעמדות. קבוצת המידע נערכת בזהירות באמצעות דוגמנים BERT ספציפיים לשפה ו SVMs כדי להראות כי XED מבצע באופן שווה עם קבוצות מידע דומות אחרות ולכן הוא כלי שימושי לניתוח רגשות וגילוי רגשות.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo XED, večjezični drobnozrnati nabor podatkov o čustvih. Zbirka podatkov je sestavljena iz finskega (25k) in angleškega stavka (30k) s človeškimi oznakami ter predvidenih opomb za 30 dodatnih jezikov, kar zagotavlja nove vire za številne jezike z nizkimi viri. Plutchikova ključna čustva uporabljamo za označevanje nabora podatkov z dodatkom nevtralnega, da ustvarimo več oznak večrazrednih podatkov. Zbirka podatkov je skrbno ocenjena z uporabo jezikovno specifičnih BERT modelov in SVM-jev, da se pokaže, da XED deluje enako kot drugi podobni zbirki podatkov in je zato uporabno orodje za analizo čustev in zaznavanje čustev.', 'ha': "Munã ƙara wa XED, da danne-danne mai kyau na'ura cikin mulki. Ana haɗi da tsarin mutane da aka sanar da shi na Finnish (25 k) da maganar Ingiriya (30,000), da kuma aka yi wa shirin taƙaitãwa ga harshen 30 ɗin ƙaranci, da kuma sunã samun matalauta masu gauraya zuwa harshen missouri masu yawa. Munã yi amfani da Lotshik'in hisoyi masu ƙaranci zuwa an sanar da tsarin da za'a ƙara neutral zuwa ka ƙiƙiro wani danna-danne masu multilabel. An ƙaddara tsarin bayani game da misoden BERT-da aka ƙayyade harshen-ƙayyade BERT da SvM don ya nuna cewa XED yana tafiyar da par da wasu tsari masu kama da shi, kuma don haka yana da wani zane mai amfani ga Ana yi anarwa da gane na hisãbi.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་XED ལྟ་བུའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས། སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ཚོ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་ཡིག་ཅིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་Plutchik ལ་ཡི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མདུན་རིམ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག སྐད་ཡིག', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nglanggar XED, dadi sing dirangkapan langgar sami. Sampeyan dataset dumadhi sing dibutungan barang-barêng ngêngêngêng cara-barêng Finnes (2k) lan bebas Inggris (30 k), lan tambah mbukakipun ciptaaken kanggo 30 langa tambah, ngewehku ngêngêngêng langa sing nyenyane dhéwé. package type dataset iku diuntingi podho nggambar nggambar sistem BERT nggambar luwih-ingkang SVM nganggep kuwi XED tau ngomong kapan karo dataset sing wis sane sampeyan nganggep kuwi, kaya ngono nggambar alam kuwi wis noder kanggo anawisi cap sampeyan karo panjenengan langgar.'}
{'en': 'Human or Neural Translation?', 'ar': 'ترجمة بشرية أم عصبية؟', 'es': '¿Traducción humana o neuronal?', 'pt': 'Tradução Humana ou Neural?', 'fr': 'Traduction humaine ou neuronale\xa0?', 'ja': '人間か神経翻訳か？', 'zh': '人或神经译?', 'hi': 'मानव या तंत्रिका अनुवाद?', 'ru': 'Человеческий или нейронный перевод?', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Daonna nó Néarúil?', 'ka': 'ფჲგვკ თლთ ნძპალნთ ოპვგყპჱგანვ?', 'el': 'Ανθρώπινη ή Νευρική Μετάφραση;', 'hu': 'Emberi vagy idegi fordítás?', 'it': 'Traduzione umana o neurale?', 'kk': 'Адам не нейрондық аудармасы?', 'lt': 'Žmogaus ar neurologinis vertimas?', 'mk': 'Човечки или неврални преведувања?', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Manusia atau Neural?', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യനോ ന്യൂറല്\u200d പരിഭാഷ?', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni Umana jew Newrali?', 'mn': 'Хүн эсвэл сэтгэл зүй хөрөнгө оруулах уу?', 'no': 'Menneske eller neuraloversettelse?', 'ro': 'Traducere umană sau neurală?', 'pl': 'Ludzkie czy neuronowe tłumaczenie?', 'sr': 'Ljudski ili neurološki prevod?', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු නැත්තම් නිර්මාණ වාර්තාව?', 'so': 'Turjumista dadka ama naafada?', 'sv': 'Mänsklig eller neural översättning?', 'ta': 'மனிதன் அல்லது நியூரல் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு?', 'ur': 'انسان یا نیورال ترجمہ؟', 'uz': 'Human or Neural Translation?', 'vi': 'Dịch người hay thần kinh?', 'nl': 'Menselijke of neurale vertaling?', 'de': 'Menschliche oder neuronale Übersetzung?', 'bg': 'Човешки или неврален превод?', 'da': 'Menneskelig eller neural oversættelse?', 'hr': 'Ljudski ili neurološki prevod?', 'sw': 'Human or Neural Translation?', 'ko': '인간 번역이야, 신경 번역이야?', 'fa': 'ترجمه انسان يا عصبي؟', 'id': 'Terjemahan Manusia atau Neural?', 'sq': 'Përkthimi njerëzor apo neuronal?', 'am': 'ሰው ወይም ኔural ትርጓሜ?', 'hy': 'Human or Neural Translation?', 'tr': 'Adamlar ýa-da närazy terjime edip bilýärmi?', 'af': 'Mense of neurale vertaling?', 'bn': 'মানুষ অথবা নিউরাল অনুবাদ?', 'bs': 'Ljudski ili neurološki prevod?', 'az': 'İnsan ya da nöral tercümə?', 'ca': 'Human or Neural Translation?', 'et': 'Inimlik või neurotõlge?', 'fi': 'Ihmis- vai hermokĂ¤Ă¤nnĂ¶s?', 'cs': 'Lidský nebo nervový překlad?', 'jv': 'Terjamahan umuh apat ?', 'ha': 'Mawallafin mutum ko Neural?', 'he': 'Human or Neural Translation?', 'sk': 'Človeški ali nevronski prevod?', 'bo': 'གང་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནམ། སྐྱེས་བ་ཡིན་ནམ།'}
{'en': 'Deep neural models tremendously improved machine translation. In this context, we investigate whether distinguishing machine from human translations is still feasible. We trained and applied 18 classifiers under two settings : a monolingual task, in which the classifier only looks at the translation ; and a bilingual task, in which the source text is also taken into consideration. We report on extensive experiments involving 4 neural MT systems (Google Translate, DeepL, as well as two systems we trained) and varying the domain of texts. We show that the bilingual task is the easiest one and that transfer-based deep-learning classifiers perform best, with mean accuracies around 85 % in-domain and 75 % out-of-domain.', 'ar': 'النماذج العصبية العميقة حسنت الترجمة الآلية بشكل كبير. في هذا السياق ، نتحرى ما إذا كان تمييز الآلة عن الترجمات البشرية لا يزال ممكنًا. لقد دربنا وطبقنا 18 مصنفًا في إعدادين: مهمة أحادية اللغة ، حيث ينظر المصنف إلى الترجمة فقط ؛ ومهمة ثنائية اللغة ، حيث يتم أيضًا أخذ النص المصدر في الاعتبار. قدمنا تقريرًا عن تجارب مكثفة تتضمن 4 أنظمة MT عصبية (Google Translate و DeepL بالإضافة إلى نظامين قمنا بتدريبهما) وتنويع نطاق النصوص. نوضح أن المهمة ثنائية اللغة هي الأسهل وأن مصنفات التعلم العميق القائمة على التحويل تحقق أفضل أداء ، مع دقة متوسطة تبلغ حوالي 85٪ داخل المجال و 75٪ خارج النطاق.', 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales profundos mejoraron enormemente la traducción automática. En este contexto, investigamos si sigue siendo factible distinguir las traducciones automáticas de las humanas. Entrenamos y aplicamos 18 clasificadores en dos entornos: una tarea monolingüe, en la que el clasificador solo mira la traducción; y una tarea bilingüe, en la que también se tiene en cuenta el texto fuente. Reportamos extensos experimentos que involucran 4 sistemas de MT neuronales (Google Translate, DeepL, así como dos sistemas que entrenamos) y que varían el dominio de los textos. Demostramos que la tarea bilingüe es la más fácil y que los clasificadores de aprendizaje profundo basados en transferencias funcionan mejor, con precisiones medias de alrededor del 85% dentro del dominio y el 75% fuera del dominio.', 'pt': 'Os modelos neurais profundos melhoraram tremendamente a tradução automática. Nesse contexto, investigamos se ainda é viável distinguir traduções automáticas de traduções humanas. Treinamos e aplicamos 18 classificadores em duas configurações: uma tarefa monolíngue, na qual o classificador apenas analisa a tradução; e uma tarefa bilíngue, na qual o texto fonte também é levado em consideração. Relatamos extensos experimentos envolvendo 4 sistemas neurais de MT (Google Translate, DeepL, bem como dois sistemas que treinamos) e variando o domínio dos textos. Mostramos que a tarefa bilíngue é a mais fácil e que classificadores de aprendizado profundo baseados em transferência têm o melhor desempenho, com precisões médias em torno de 85% no domínio e 75% fora do domínio.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux profonds ont considérablement amélioré la traduction automatique. Dans ce contexte, nous cherchons à savoir s'il est toujours possible de distinguer les traductions automatiques des traductions humaines. Nous avons formé et appliqué 18 classificateurs dans deux contextes\xa0: une tâche monolingue, dans laquelle le classificateur ne regarde que la traduction\xa0; et une tâche bilingue, dans laquelle le texte source est également pris en compte. Nous rendons compte d'expériences approfondies impliquant 4 systèmes de TA neuronale (Google Translate, DeepL, ainsi que deux systèmes que nous avons formés) et variant le domaine des textes. Nous montrons que la tâche bilingue est la plus facile et que les classificateurs d'apprentissage profond basés sur le transfert sont les meilleurs, avec une précision moyenne d'environ 85\xa0% dans le domaine et 75\xa0% hors domaine.", 'zh': '深度神经模极改机器翻译。 于是论将机器与人工译分别可否。 二者设而用之18器:单语事,其器阅译。 和双语之任,犹思文本。 告及4神经MT系统(Google Translate,DeepL及所习二统)与异文本域之广实验。 臣等明双语务至简之务,基于移徙之深学分类器最佳,均精约为域内85%,域外精度为75%。', 'ru': 'Глубокие нейронные модели значительно улучшили машинный перевод. В этом контексте мы исследуем, возможно ли все еще отличить машину от человеческих переводов. Мы обучили и применили 18 классификаторов в двух настройках: одноязычная задача, в которой классификатор рассматривает только перевод; и двуязычная задача, в которой также учитывается исходный текст. Мы сообщаем об обширных экспериментах с участием 4 нейронных систем MT (Google Translate, DeepL, а также двух систем, которые мы обучали) и варьирующихся по области текстов. Мы показываем, что двуязычная задача является самой простой и что основанные на передаче классификаторы глубокого обучения работают лучше, со средней точностью около 85% в домене и 75% вне домена .', 'ja': '深層神経モデルは機械翻訳を大幅に改善した。この文脈では、機械翻訳と人間翻訳を区別することがまだ実行可能かどうかを調査します。18の分類子を2つの設定で訓練し適用しました。分類子が翻訳のみを見る単一言語のタスクと、ソーステキストも考慮されるバイリンガルのタスクです。私たちは、4つのニューラルMTシステム（ Google翻訳、DeepL、および私たちがトレーニングした2つのシステム）と、テキストの領域を変化させる広範な実験について報告しています。私たちは、バイリンガルタスクが最も簡単であり、転送ベースのディープラーニング分類子が最も優れたパフォーマンスを発揮し、平均的な精度はドメイン内で約85 ％、ドメイン外で約75 ％であることを示しています。', 'hi': 'गहरे तंत्रिका मॉडल ने मशीन अनुवाद में काफी सुधार किया। इस संदर्भ में, हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या मानव अनुवादों से मशीन को अलग करना अभी भी संभव है। हमने दो सेटिंग्स के तहत 18 क्लासिफायरों को प्रशिक्षित और लागू किया: एक मोनोलिंगुअल कार्य, जिसमें क्लासिफायर केवल अनुवाद को देखता है; और एक द्विभाषी कार्य, जिसमें स्रोत पाठ को भी ध्यान में रखा जाता है। हम 4 तंत्रिका एमटी सिस्टम (Google Translate, DeepL, साथ ही साथ दो प्रणालियों को हमने प्रशिक्षित किया है) और ग्रंथों के डोमेन को अलग-अलग करने वाले व्यापक प्रयोगों पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि द्विभाषी कार्य सबसे आसान है और यह कि स्थानांतरण-आधारित डीप-लर्निंग क्लासिफायर्स सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जिसमें लगभग 85% इन-डोमेन और 75% आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन के आसपास औसत सटीकता होती है।', 'ga': 'Feabhsaíodh an t-aistriúchán meaisín go mór ar shamhlacha néaracha doimhne. Sa chomhthéacs seo, déanaimid imscrúdú an bhfuil sé indéanta fós meaisín a idirdhealú ó aistriúcháin daonna. Chuireamar oiliúint agus cuireadh i bhfeidhm 18 aicmitheora faoi dhá shuíomh: tasc aonteangach, ina mbreathnaíonn an t-aicmitheoir ar an aistriúchán amháin; agus tasc dátheangach, ina gcuirtear an buntéacs san áireamh freisin. Tuairiscímid ar thurgnaimh fhairsing a bhaineann le 4 chóras MT néaracha (Google Translate, DeepL, chomh maith le dhá chóras a ndearna muid oiliúint orthu) agus a athraíonn réimse na dtéacsanna. Léirímid gurb é an tasc dátheangach an ceann is éasca agus gurb iad aicmitheoirí domhainfhoghlama atá bunaithe ar aistriú is fearr a fheidhmíonn, le meánchruinneas timpeall 85% laistigh den fhearann agus 75% lasmuigh den fhearann.', 'ka': 'ძალიან ნეიროლური მოდელები ძალიან უკეთესი მაქინის გადაწყვეტილება. ამ კონტექსტში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ თუ ადამიანის გადაწყვეტილების მანქანის განსხვავება უფრო შესაძლებელია. ჩვენ განვიყავით და გამოყენებდით 18 კლასიფიკაციები ორი პარამეტრებში: მონოლენგური რაოდენობა, რომელიც კლასიფიკაცია მხოლოდ დავხედავთ განვიყენებას; და ორიენგური დავალება, რომელიც მსოფლიო ტექსტის შესახებ იქნება. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტებზე, რომელიც 4 ნეიროლური MT სისტემი (Google Translate, DeepL, და ორი სისტემი, რომელიც ჩვენ განვიყავეთ) და ტექსტის დემომინი ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ორიენგური დავალება უფრო მარტივია და რომ ტრანსპერტის დაბათებული დიბოლო სწავლების კლასიფიკაციები უფრო მკეთესია გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც უფრო მარტივია 85% დო', 'el': 'Τα βαθιά νευρωνικά μοντέλα βελτίωσαν σημαντικά τη μηχανική μετάφραση. Σε αυτό το πλαίσιο, διερευνούμε αν η διάκριση μηχανών από ανθρώπινες μεταφράσεις είναι ακόμα εφικτή. Εκπαιδευτήκαμε και εφαρμόσαμε 18-ταξινομητές σε δύο ρυθμίσεις: μια μονογλωσσική εργασία, στην οποία ο ταξινομητής κοιτάζει μόνο τη μετάφραση. και δίγλωσσο έργο, στο οποίο λαμβάνεται επίσης υπόψη το αρχικό κείμενο. Αναφερόμαστε σε εκτεταμένα πειράματα που περιλαμβάνουν τέσσερα νευρωνικά συστήματα ΜΤ (καθώς και δύο συστήματα που εκπαιδεύσαμε) και ποικίλουν τον τομέα των κειμένων. Δείχνουμε ότι η δίγλωσση εργασία είναι η ευκολότερη και ότι οι ταξινομητές βαθιάς μάθησης με βάση τη μεταφορά αποδίδουν καλύτερα, με μέσες ακρίβειες γύρω από 85% εντός τομέα και 75% εκτός τομέα.', 'hu': 'A mélyidegi modellek rendkívül javították a gépi fordítást. Ebben az összefüggésben azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a gép és az emberi fordítások megkülönböztetése még mindig megvalósítható-e. 18 osztályozót képzettünk és alkalmaztunk két beállításban: egynyelvű feladat, amelyben az osztályozó csak a fordítást nézi; és egy kétnyelvű feladat, amelyben a forrásszöveget is figyelembe veszik. Széleskörű kísérletekről beszámolunk 4 neurális MT rendszer (Google Translate, DeepL, valamint két általunk képzett rendszer) bevonásával és a szövegek tartományának változásával. Megmutatjuk, hogy a kétnyelvű feladat a legegyszerűbb, és hogy a transzfer alapú mélytanulási osztályozók teljesítenek a legjobban, átlagos pontossággal körülbelül 85% domain és 75% out domain .', 'it': "I modelli neurali profondi hanno notevolmente migliorato la traduzione automatica. In questo contesto, esaminiamo se distinguere la macchina dalle traduzioni umane sia ancora fattibile. Abbiamo formato e applicato 18 classificatori in due impostazioni: un compito monolingue, in cui il classificatore guarda solo la traduzione; e un compito bilingue, in cui viene preso in considerazione anche il testo sorgente. Riportiamo su estesi esperimenti che coinvolgono 4 sistemi MT neurali (Google Translate, DeepL, così come due sistemi che abbiamo addestrato) e variando il dominio dei testi. Dimostriamo che il compito bilingue è il più semplice e che i classificatori di deep learning basati su trasferimento funzionano meglio, con precisione media intorno all'85% in-domain e al 75% out-of-domain.", 'kk': 'Үлкен невралдық моделдері машинаны аудару үшін көп жақсартылды. Бұл контексті біз адамдардың аудармаларынан машинаны түрлендіру мүмкіндігін зерттейміз. Біз 18 классификаторын екі параметрлердің астында оқыту және қолдануға боладық: бірнеше тілді тапсырма. Бұл классификатор тек аудармасына қарады. және екі тілді тапсырма, көзінің мәтіні де қарастырылады. Біз 4 невралдық MT жүйелері (Google Translate, DeepL, сондай-ақ екі жүйелерді біз оқыдық) және мәтіндердің доменін түрлендіріп жатқан эксперименттерді туралы хабарлаймыз. Екі тілді тапсырма - ең оңай және тапсырманың түрлі оқыту классификациялары ең жақсы жұмыс істейді, доменде 85% деген және 75% деген доменге тыс.', 'lt': 'Gilūs neurologiniai modeliai labai pagerėjo mašinų vertimas. Šiomis aplinkybėmis mes tiriame, ar vis dar įmanoma atskirti mašiną nuo žmogiškųjų vertimų. Mes apmokėme ir pritaikėme 18 klasifikatorių pagal dvi aplinkybes: vienkalbinę užduotį, kurioje klasifikatorius žiūri tik į vertimą; and a bilingual task, in which the source text is also taken into consideration.  Mes pranešame apie išsamius eksperimentus, susijusius su keturiomis neurologinėmis MT sistemomis (Google Translate, DeepL, taip pat dviem sistemomis, kurias apmokėme) ir įvairiomis tekstų sritimis. Mes rodome, kad dvikalbis uždavinys yra lengviausias ir kad perkėlimo pagrindu grindžiami giliojo mokymosi klasifikatoriai geriausiai veikia, vidutiniškai tiksliai maždaug 85 proc. domeno ir 75 proc. ne domeno.', 'mk': 'Длабоките нервни модели огромно подобрени машински преводи. Во овој контекст, истражуваме дали разликувањето на машината од човечките преводи е сé уште остварливо. Ние трениравме и применивме 18 класификатори под две поставувања: монојазична задача, во која класификаторот гледа само на преводот; and a bilingual task, in which the source text is also taken into consideration.  Ние известуваме за експерименти кои вклучуваат 4 нервни мет системи (Google Translate, DeepL, како и два системи кои ги обучувавме) и различни дела од текстовите. Ние покажуваме дека двојјазичната задача е најлесна и дека класификаторите за длабоко учење базирани на трансфер се најдобри, со просечна точност околу 85 отсто во домен и 75 отсто надвор од домен.', 'ms': 'Model saraf dalam meningkatkan penerjemah mesin. Dalam konteks ini, kita menyelidiki sama ada mesin yang membezakan daripada terjemahan manusia masih boleh dilakukan. Kami melatih dan melaksanakan 18 pengendali di bawah dua tetapan: tugas monobahasa, di mana pengendali hanya melihat terjemahan; dan tugas dua bahasa, di mana teks sumber juga dipertimbangkan. Kami melaporkan eksperimen luas yang melibatkan 4 sistem MT saraf (Google Translate, DeepL, serta dua sistem yang kami latih) dan mengubah bidang teks. Kami menunjukkan bahawa tugas dua bahasa adalah tugas yang paling mudah dan bahawa pemindahan-berdasarkan pemindahan-pelajaran dalam melakukan yang terbaik, dengan ketepatan rata-rata sekitar 85% dalam domain dan 75% luar domain.', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн загварууд маш сайжруулагдсан. Энэ нөхцөлд бид хүн төрөлхтний орчуудаас машиныг ялгах нь боломжтой эсэхийг судалж байна. Бид хоёр төлөвлөгөөний доор 18 ангид суралцаж, хэрэглэсэн: нэг хэлний даалгавар, хэлний даалгавар нь зөвхөн хөрөнгө оруулалтыг хардаг. хоёр хэлний даалгавар, эх үүсвэрийн текст ч гэсэн бодож үздэг. Бид 4 мэдрэлийн MT систем (Google Translate, DeepL, мөн бидний сургалтын 2 систем) болон текстүүдийн хувьд өөрчлөгдсөн өргөн туршилтуудын тухай мэдээлэл өгдөг. Бид хоёр хэлний даалгавар бол хамгийн амархан ажил, шилжүүлэх сургалтын үндсэн гүн сургалтын хэлбэрүүд нь хамгийн сайн ажилладаг. Үүний дундаж тохиромжтой тохиромжтой 85% нь дотор, 75% нь дотор байдаг.', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തി. ഈ സംഭവത്തില്\u200d, മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും യന്ത്രം വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്നത് സാധ്യമല്ലോ എന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d അന് രണ്ടു സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കീഴില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 18 ക്ലാസ്ഫിളുകളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിച്ചു പ്രയോഗിച്ചു. ഒരു മോണോളില്\u200dഭാഷ ജോലി; അതില്\u200d  ഒരു രണ്ടു ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും അതില്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചിന്തിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. നാലു ന്യൂറല്\u200d എംടി സിസ്റ്റമുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ള വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ ജോലി ഏറ്റവും എളുപ്പമാണെന്നും, അതില്\u200d നിന്ന് മാറ്റുന്ന ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ക്ലാസ്ഫിളുകള്\u200d നല്ലത', 'mt': 'Deep neural models tremendously improved machine translation.  F’dan il-kuntest, ninvestigaw jekk il-magna li tiddistingwi mit-traduzzjonijiet umani għadhiex fattibbli. Taħriġna u applikajna 18-il klassifikatur taħt żewġ ambjenti: kompitu monolingwistiku, li fih il-klassifikatur iħares biss lejn it-traduzzjoni; u kompitu bilingwi, li fih jitqies ukoll it-test tas-sors. Aħna nirrappurtaw dwar esperimenti estensivi li jinvolvu 4 sistemi ta’ MT newrali (Google Translate, DeepL, kif ukoll żewġ sistemi li nħarrġu) u li jvarjaw id-dominju tat-testi. Aħna nuru li l-kompitu bilingwi huwa l-aktar faċli u li l-klassifikaturi tat-tagħlim profond ibbażati fuq it-trasferiment iwettqu l-aħjar, b’preċiżjonijiet medji ta’ madwar 85% fid-dominju u 75% barra mid-dominju.', 'no': 'Djupne neuralmodeller er veldig forbetra maskineoversettelse. I denne konteksten undersøker vi om forskjellingsmaskina frå menneske oversettelsar er fortsatt feilig. Vi treng og bruka 18 klassifikatorar under to innstillingar: ein monospråk oppgåve, der klassifikatoren berre ser på omsetjinga; og og eit bilinguelt oppgåve, der kjeldeteksten også vert henta til å gjere betre. Vi rapporterer om utvida eksperimenter med 4 neurale MT- systemer (Google Translate, DeepL, og to systemer vi treng) og varierer tekstdomenet. Vi viser at den bilingåande oppgåva er den enkleste og at overføringsbaserte dypslæringsklassifikatorane utfører best, med gjennomsnittlige akkurasjon rundt 85% i domene og 75% ut-av-domene.', 'pl': 'Głębokie modele neuronowe ogromnie poprawiły tłumaczenie maszynowe. W tym kontekście badamy, czy odróżnienie tłumaczeń maszynowych od ludzkich jest nadal możliwe. Szkoliliśmy i zastosowaliśmy 18-klasyfikatory w dwóch ustawieniach: zadaniu jednojęzycznym, w którym klasyfikator patrzy tylko na tłumaczenie; oraz zadanie dwujęzyczne, w którym uwzględnia się również tekst źródłowy. Raportujemy o obszernych eksperymentach z udziałem czterech neuronowych systemów MT (Google Translate, DeepL, a także dwóch przeszkolonych przez nas systemów) i różnicą domeny tekstów. Pokazujemy, że zadanie dwujęzyczne jest najłatwiejsze i że klasyfikatory głębokiego uczenia oparte na transferach działają najlepiej, ze średnią dokładnością około 85% w domenie i 75% poza domeną.', 'sr': 'Duboki neuralni modeli su izuzetno poboljšani prevod mašine. U ovom kontekstu istražujemo da li je i dalje moguće razlikovati mašinu od ljudskih prevoda. Obučavali smo i primjenjivali 18 klasifikatora pod dva postavka: monojezički zadatak, u kojem klasifikator samo gleda prevod; i dvojezički zadatak, u kojem se takođe uzima u obzir i izvorni tekst. Prijavljujemo o većim eksperimentima uključujući 4 neuralne MT sisteme (Google Translate, DeepL, kao i dva sustava koje smo trenirali) i razlikuju domenu teksta. Mi pokazujemo da je dvojezički zadatak najlakši i da se klasifikatori dubokog učenja najbolje izvršavaju, sa srednjim preciznostima oko 85% u domenu i 75% izvan domena.', 'ro': 'Modelele neuronale profunde au îmbunătăţit enorm traducerea automată. În acest context, investigăm dacă distingerea mașinii de traduceri umane este încă fezabilă. Am instruit și aplicat 18 clasificatori în două setări: o sarcină monolingvă, în care clasificatorul se uită doar la traducere; și o sarcină bilingvă, în care textul sursă este, de asemenea, luat în considerare. Raportăm experimente extinse care implică 4 sisteme MT neurale (Google Translate, DeepL, precum și două sisteme pe care le-am instruit) și variază domeniul textelor. Noi arătăm că sarcina bilingvă este cea mai ușoară și că clasificatorii de învățare profundă pe bază de transfer performează cel mai bine, cu precizii medii de aproximativ 85% în domeniu și 75% în afara domeniului.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේල්ස් ගොඩක් වැඩියි යන්ත්\u200dර වාර්තාව. මේ සංවේදනයේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මිනිස්සුන්ගේ පරිවර්තනයෙන් වෙනස් කරන්නේ නැද්ද කියලා. අපි සැකසුම් දෙකක් අතර පරීක්ෂණා කරලා 18 විශේෂකය අතර පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා: එක භාෂාවක් වැඩක්, මෙතන ඒ වගේම දෙවන් භාෂාවක් වැඩක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මූල පාළ පාළ තියෙනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ පරීක්ෂණාවල් 4 න්යූරාල් MT පද්ධතිය (Google translation, DeepL, සහ පද්ධතිය දෙකක් වගේම අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ) සහ පාළ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ දුවන් භාෂාවක් වැඩක් තමයි ලේසිම වැඩක්, ඒ ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොඳම වැඩක් කරනවා කියලා.', 'sv': 'Djupa neurala modeller förbättrade maskinöversättning. I detta sammanhang undersöker vi om det fortfarande är möjligt att skilja maskin från mänskliga översättningar. Vi utbildade och tillämpade 18 klassificerare under två inställningar: en enspråkig uppgift, där klassificeraren bara tittar på översättningen; och en tvåspråkig uppgift, där källtexten också beaktas. Vi rapporterar om omfattande experiment som involverar 4 neurala MT-system (Google Translate, DeepL, samt två system vi tränat) och varierande textdomän. Vi visar att den tvåspråkiga uppgiften är den enklaste och att överföringsbaserade deep learning klassificerare presterar bäst, med medelnoggrannhet runt 85% inom domänen och 75% utanför domänen.', 'so': 'Tusaalada neurada ee hoos u dheer oo aad u bedelay tarjumaadka machine-ka. Halkaas, waxaynu baaraynaa in mashiinka ka soocno turjumaadda dadka weli waa suurtagal. Waxaannu tababarinnay 18 fasalka oo ka hoosaysay laba hab; shaqada afka nooca ah, taasoo fasaxu turjumaanka oo keliya fiirinayo; iyo shaqada laba luqadood oo ay ku qoran yihiin qoraalka asalka. Waxaan wargelinaynaa imtixaamo dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan 4 nidaamka MT ee neurada ah (Google Translate, DeepL, sidoo kale labada nidaam oo aan tababarnay) iyo qoraalka kala duwan. Waxan tusnaynaa in shaqada labada luqadood ay tahay mid ugu fudud iyo in fasalka iskuulka hoose lagu wareejiyo ay si wanaagsan u sameeyaan, si saxda ah qiyaastii qiyaastii 85 boqolkiiba gudaha iyo 75 boqolkiiba gudaha ka baxsan.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான புதிர மாதிரிகள் மிகவும் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு. இந்த சூழ்நிலையில், நாம் மனித மொழிபெயர்ப்பிலிருந்து இயந்திரத்தை பிரித்து மாற்றுவது இன்னும் சாத நாங்கள் இரண்டு அமைப்புகளுக்கு கீழ் 18 வகுப்புகளை பயிற்சி செய்து பயன்படுத்தினோம்: ஒரு மொழிமொழியான செயல், அதில் வகுப்பா இரண்டு மொழிகள் செய்யும் பணியில் மூலம் உரையையும் சிந்திக்கப்படும். நாம் 4 புதிய MT அமைப்புகள் (கூகுல் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, ஆழமாற்றி, மற்றும் நாம் பயிற்சி செய்த இரண்டு அமைப்புகள்) மற்றும் உரைகளின் களத்தை வேற இரண்டு மொழி செயல் எளிதானது என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் மாற்றும் ஆழ்ந்த கற்றல் வகுப்பாளர்கள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்துகிறார்கள், அதாவது டொமை', 'ur': 'عمیق نیورال موڈل بہت زیادہ سیدھا مشین ترجمہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم اس متعلق میں تحقیق کریں کہ انسان کی ترجمہ سے ماشین جدا کرنا یہاں تک بھی ممکن ہے. ہم نے دو تنظیمات کے نیچے 18 کلاسیفوں کو تعلیم دی اور کاروبار کیا: ایک ایک زبان کا کام، جس میں کلاسیفوں نے صرف ترجمہ کی طرف دیکھا ہے، اور ایک دوسری زبان کا کام ہے جس میں سورج لکھا گیا ہے۔ ہم نے 4 نئورل مٹی سیسٹم (Google Translate, DeepL, as well as two systems we trained) اور ٹیکسٹ ڈومین کو تغییر دیتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ دو زبان کا کام سب سے آسان ہے اور اس کے ذریعہ سے سیکھنے والی سیکھنے والی کلیسائر بہتر عمل کرتے ہیں، اس کے مطابق مطابق 85% دومین میں اور 75% دومین خارج ہوتے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Các mô hình thần kinh sâu sắc cải tiến đáng kể. Chúng tôi tìm hiểu xem có khả thi phân biệt máy móc với dịch thuật người không. Chúng tôi đào tạo và áp dụng 18 phân loại dưới hai thiết lập: một nhiệm vụ ngôn ngữ, trong đó người phân loại chỉ xem dịch; và một nhiệm vụ hai thứ, trong đó cũng được ghi vào từ nguồn. Chúng tôi báo cáo các thí nghiệm đầy đủ liên quan đến bốn hệ thần kinh MTV (Google Dịch, Deepwater, cũng như hai hệ thống chúng tôi huấn luyện) và thay đổi lĩnh vực văn bản. Chúng tôi cho thấy nhiệm vụ hai thứ là dễ nhất và người phân loại sâu học chuyển nhượng thực hiện tốt nhất, với các vụ chính xác có ý nghĩa quanh 85.', 'uz': "Name Bu paytda, biz inson tarjimalarni o'zgartirish mashinasini o'zgartirib o'rganamiz. Biz ikki moslamadan 18 sinfni o'rgangan va ikkita moslamalarga qo'llab berdik: bir monolingual vazifa, bu muammoni faqat tarjima qilishga qaraydi; va ikki tillar vazifa, bu yerda manba matnni o'ylab turadi. Biz 4 neural MT tizimlari (Google Translate, DeepL, va biz o'rganilgan ikkita tizim) bilan katta tajribalarni haqida xabar qilamiz va matnlarning domen taʼminlovchisi. Biz ikkita tillar vazifasi eng sodda, va o'zgartirish qo'l o'rganish darajalarini yaxshi bajarishini ko'rsatdik, maktabda 85% davlatda va 75% davlatdan boshlaydi.", 'hr': 'Duboki neuronski modeli su izuzetno poboljšali prevod strojeva. U ovom kontekstu istražujemo da li je još uvijek moguće različiti stroj od ljudskih prevoda. Obučavali smo i primjenjivali 18 klasifikatora pod dvije postavke: monojezički zadatak, u kojem klasifikator samo gleda prevod; i dvojezički zadatak u kojem se također uzima u obzir i izvorni tekst. Izvještavamo o širokim eksperimentima uključujući 4 neuralne MT sustave (Google Translate, DeepL, kao i dva sustava koje smo trenirali) i različitim domenom teksta. Mi pokazujemo da je dvojezički zadatak najlakši i da se klasifikatori dubokog učenja na prijenosu najbolje izvršavaju s srednjim preciznostima oko 85% u domenu i 75% izvan domena .', 'da': 'Dybe neurale modeller forbedrede maskinoversættelsen. I denne sammenhæng undersøger vi, om det stadig er muligt at skelne mellem maskine og menneskelige oversættelser. Vi har uddannet og anvendt 18 klassificerere under to indstillinger: en ensproget opgave, hvor klassificereren kun ser på oversættelsen; og en tosproget opgave, hvor kildeteksten også tages i betragtning. Vi rapporterer om omfattende eksperimenter, der involverer 4 neurale MT systemer (Google Translate, DeepL, samt to systemer vi trænede) og varierer domænet af tekster. Vi viser, at den tosprogede opgave er den nemmeste, og at overførselsbaserede deep learning klassificerere klarer sig bedst, med gennemsnitlige nøjagtigheder omkring 85% in-domain og 75% out-of-domain .', 'de': 'Tiefe neuronale Modelle verbesserten die maschinelle Übersetzung enorm. In diesem Zusammenhang untersuchen wir, ob eine Unterscheidung zwischen maschinellen und menschlichen Übersetzungen noch möglich ist. Wir haben 18-Klassifikatoren unter zwei Bedingungen trainiert und angewendet: eine einsprachige Aufgabe, bei der der Klassifikator nur auf die Übersetzung schaut; und eine zweisprachige Aufgabe, bei der auch der Quelltext berücksichtigt wird. Wir berichten über umfangreiche Experimente mit 4-neuronalen MT-Systemen (Google Translate, DeepL, sowie zwei von uns trainierten Systemen) und Variation der Domäne von Texten. Wir zeigen, dass die zweisprachige Aufgabe die einfachste ist und dass transferbasierte Deep-Learning-Klassifikatoren am besten funktionieren, mit mittleren Genauigkeiten rund 85% in-domain und 75% out-of-domain.', 'bg': 'Дълбоките невронни модели значително подобряват машинния превод. В този контекст изследваме дали разграничаването на машинни преводи от човешки преводи все още е осъществимо. Обучихме и приложихме 18 класификатора в две настройки: едноезична задача, при която класификаторът разглежда само превода; и двуезична задача, при която се взема предвид и изходният текст. Докладваме за обширни експерименти, включващи 4 невронни МТ системи (както и две системи, които обучихме) и променящи домейна на текстовете. Показваме, че двуезичната задача е най-лесната и че базираните на трансфер класификатори за дълбоко обучение се представят най-добре, със средна точност около 85% в домейна и 75% извън домейна.', 'id': 'Model saraf dalam sangat meningkat terjemahan mesin. Dalam konteks ini, kita menyelidiki apakah mesin yang membedakan dari terjemahan manusia masih bisa dilakukan. Kami melatih dan menerapkan 18 klasifikasi di bawah dua pengaturan: tugas monobahasa, di mana klasifikasi hanya melihat terjemahan; dan tugas dua bahasa, di mana teks sumber juga dipertimbangkan. Kami melaporkan eksperimen ekstensif yang melibatkan 4 sistem MT saraf (Google Translate, DeepL, serta dua sistem yang kami pelatih) dan mengubah bidang teks. Kami menunjukkan bahwa tugas dua bahasa adalah tugas yang paling mudah dan bahwa klasifikasi belajar dalam berdasarkan transfer melakukan yang terbaik, dengan akurasi rata-rata sekitar 85% dalam domain dan 75% luar domain.', 'nl': 'Diepe neurale modellen verbeterde de machinevertaling enorm. In deze context onderzoeken we of het onderscheid tussen machine en menselijke vertalingen nog haalbaar is. We hebben 18-classificatoren getraind en toegepast onder twee instellingen: een eentalige taak, waarbij de classificator alleen naar de vertaling kijkt; en een tweetalige taak, waarbij ook rekening wordt gehouden met de brontekst. We rapporteren over uitgebreide experimenten met 4-neurale MT systemen (Google Translate, DeepL, en twee systemen die we getraind hebben) en variërend het domein van teksten. We laten zien dat de tweetalige taak de makkelijkste is en dat transfer-based deep learning classificatoren het beste presteren, met gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid rond 85% in-domein en 75% out-of-domein.', 'ko': '심층 신경 모형은 기계 번역을 크게 개선시켰다.이런 배경에서 우리는 기계 번역과 인공 번역이 여전히 가능한지 여부를 구분하는 것을 연구한다.우리는 두 가지 환경에서 18개의 분류기를 훈련하고 응용했다. 그것이 바로 단어 임무이고 분류기는 번역문만 본다.그리고 이중 언어 임무, 그 중에서 원본 텍스트도 고려했다.우리는 4개의 신경 기계 번역 시스템 (Google Translate, DeepL, 그리고 우리가 훈련한 두 시스템) 과 서로 다른 텍스트 분야에 관한 광범위한 실험을 보고했다.우리는 이중 언어 임무가 가장 간단한 임무라는 것을 발견했다. 이동을 바탕으로 하는 깊이 있는 학습 분류기가 가장 잘 나타난다. 영역 내 평균 정확도는 85%, 영역 외 평균 정확도는 75%에 달한다.', 'fa': 'مدل های عصبی عمیق ترجمه ماشین بسیار بهتر شده است. در این موضوع، ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که آیا ماشین جدایی از ترجمه\u200cهای انسان هنوز قابل است. ما ۱۸ کلانترین را تحت دو تنظیمات آموزش دادیم و کاربرد کردیم: یک کار تنها زبان است که کلانترین تنها به ترجمه نگاه می\u200cکند. و وظیفه دوزبانی که متن منبع همچنین به نظر گرفته می شود. ما در مورد آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای که شامل سیستم\u200cهای ۴ MT عصبی است گزارش می\u200cدهیم (Google Translate, DeepL, همچنین دو سیستم\u200cهای آموزش دادیم) و درمیان متفاوت\u200cهای متن تغییر می\u200cدهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که کار دو زبان آسانترین یکی است و آن گروهی که در مورد تحلیل عمیق تحلیل دارند بهترین عمل می کنند، با معنی دقیق حدود ۸۵ درصد در دامنه و ۷۵ درصد خارج از دامنه.', 'sw': 'Mifano ya ndani ya ubongo ulioboreshwa sana tafsiri ya mashine. Katika muktadha huu, tunachunguza kama kutofautisha mashine kutoka tafsiri za binadamu bado haiwezekani. Tulifunza na kuwatumia wataalamu 18 chini ya mazingira mawili: kazi ya lugha ya kiutaifa, ambapo mwandishi anaangalia tafsiri tu; na kazi ya lugha mbili, ambapo maandishi ya vyanzo pia yanachukuliwa. Tunatoa taarifa kuhusu majaribio mengi yanayohusu mifumo minne ya MT (Tafsiri, DeepL, pamoja na mifumo miwili tuliyojifunza) na kubadilisha maeneo ya maandishi. Tunaonyesha kuwa kazi hii ya lugha mbili ni rahisi zaidi na kwamba wataalamu wa elimu yenye msingi wa ndani wanafanya vizuri zaidi, na ukweli wa maana ni takribani asilimia 85 ndani na asilimia 75 nje ya maeneo.', 'sq': 'Modele të thella nervore përmirësuan mjaft përkthimin e makinave. In this context, we investigate whether distinguishing machine from human translations is still feasible.  Kemi trajnuar dhe aplikuar 18 klasifikues nën dy rregullime: një detyrë monogjuhësore, në të cilën klasifikuesi shikon vetëm përkthimin; dhe një detyrë dy-gjuhëse, në të cilën gjithashtu merret parasysh teksti i burimit. Ne raportojmë mbi eksperimente të gjera që përfshijnë 4 sisteme MT neuronale (Google Translate, DeepL, si dhe dy sisteme që kemi trajnuar) dhe ndryshojnë fushën e teksteve. We show that the bilingual task is the easiest one and that transfer-based deep-learning classifiers perform best, with mean accuracies around 85% in-domain and 75% out-of-domain .', 'hy': 'Ջուր նյարդային մոդելները մեծ բարելավում են մեքենային թարգմանությունը: Այս կոնտեքստում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե արդյոք սարքը մարդկային թարգմանություններից տարբերակելը դեռևս հնարավոր է: Մենք պատրաստեցինք և կիրառեցինք 18 դասակարգիչներ երկու միջոցների ընթացքում. մեկլեզու առաջադրանք, որտեղ դասակարգիչը նայում է միայն թարգմանությունը: և երկլեզու խնդիր, որտեղ նաև վերաբերվում է աղբյուր տեքստին: Մենք զեկուցում ենք էքսպենսիվ փորձարկումների մասին, որոնք ներառում են 4 նյարդային MT համակարգեր (Google Translate, DeepL, ինչպես նաև երկու համակարգեր, որոնք մենք վարժեցրել ենք) և տարբերվում են տեքստների ոլորտները: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ երկլեզու խնդիրը ամենահեշտն է, և որ փոխանցման հիմնված խորը ուսումնասիրության դասակարգիչները լավագույնն են աշխատում, միջին ճշգրտությունը մոտ 85 տոկոսի է տիեզերքում և 75 տոկոսի է տիեզերքում:', 'af': "Deep neurale modelles het baie verbeter masjien vertaling. In hierdie konteks, ons ondersoek of die afdeling van masjien van menslike vertalings nog moontlik is. Ons het 18 klassifiseerders onder twee instellings opgelei en toegewend:  'n monolinguele taak, waarin die klassifiseerder slegs kyk na die vertaling; en 'n twee tale taak waarin die bron teks ook in aandag aangeneem word. Ons rapporteer oor uitbreidige eksperimente wat 4 neurale MT stelsels invoer (Google Vertaling, DeepL, en ook twee stelsels wat ons opgelei het) en verander die domein van teks. Ons wys dat die twee tale taak die maklikeste een is en dat oordrag-gebaseerde diep-leer klassifiseerders beste uitvoer, met gemiddelde presies omtrent 85% in-domein en 75% uit-domein .", 'tr': 'Gurhan näyral modelleri maşynyň terjimesini örän gowylaşdyrdy. Bu kontekstde biz masynyň adamlaryň terjimelerinden tapawutlandygyny barlaýarys. Biz iki düzümler altynda 18 sany sany taýýarlapdyk we uygulapdyk: bir monodil täblisasy, bu ýerde klasifikatçy diňe terjime edene seredýär; we iki dil täblisasynda çeşme metini hem düşünirlenýän. 4 neural MT sistemalarda (Google Translate, DeepL, we öwrenmedik iki sistem) we tekst domenyny çalyşýan çöplü deneyler barada rapor ediyoruz. Biz iki dilli zadyň iň aňsat täbligini görkeýäris we transfer edilen derin öwrenme klasifikalarynyň gowydygyny görkeýäris, domanda 85% we 75% daşaryk derejesi bar.', 'bn': 'গভীর নিউরেল মডেল অনেক উন্নত মেশিন অনুবাদ। এই প্রসঙ্গে আমরা তদন্ত করি মানুষের অনুবাদ থেকে মেশিন বিচ্ছিন্ন করা কিনা। আমরা দুই সেটিংসের নীচে ১৮ শ্রেণীকে প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি এবং প্রয়োগ করেছি: একটি মোনোলিভাষার কাজ, যেখানে শ্রেণীবিষয়কে  এবং একটি দুই ভাষার কাজ, যেখানে উৎসের লেখা বিবেচনা করা হয়। আমরা ৪টি নিউরেল এমটি সিস্টেম (গুগল ট্রান্সলেন্স, ডিপেল, এবং দুটি সিস্টেমের প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি) এবং টেক্সটের ডোমেইন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে দুই ভাষার কাজ হচ্ছে সবচেয়ে সহজ এবং যে পরিবহনের ভিত্তিক গভীর শিক্ষা শিক্ষার্থীরা সেরা কাজ করে, যার মানে ৮৫% ডোমেইনে এবং ৭৫% ড', 'am': 'ጥልቅ የናቡር ዓይነቶች እጅግ የበለጠ የመኪን ትርጓሜ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ክፍል፣ ማሻሻዎችን ከሰው ትርጉም መለየት እንችላለን፡፡ ከሁለቱ ማዕበል በታች 18 ተማሪዎችን አስተማርተናል፡፡ ትርጉም ብቻ ይታያል፡፡ የሁለተኛ ቋንቋ ስራ፣ የኩነቱ ጽሑፍ ደግሞ ተወሰነበት፡፡ 4 የናቡር MT ስርዓቶች (Google Translate, DeepL, እና ሁለት ስርዓቶች) በተለየን የጽሑፎችን ድምፅ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች ስራ በጣም ቀላል ነው እና የመለስ ጥልቅ ትምህርት መተማር ክፍተቶችን በመልካም ማድረግ እናስታውቃለን፤ ምናልባት የ85 በመቶ ውጤት በዶሜን እና 75 በመቶ ውጭ ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Hluboké neuronové modely výrazně zlepšily strojový překlad. V této souvislosti zkoumáme, zda je stále možné odlišit stroj od lidských překladů. Školili jsme a aplikovali 18klasifikátory ve dvou nastaveních: jednojjazyčném úkolu, při kterém se klasifikátor dívá pouze na překlad; a dvojjazyčný úkol, při kterém je zohledněn i zdrojový text. Podáváme zprávy o rozsáhlých experimentech zahrnujících čtyři neuronové MT systémy (Google Translate, DeepL, stejně jako dva systémy, které jsme trénovali) a různou doménu textů. Ukazujeme, že dvojjazyčný úkol je nejjednodušší a že klasifikátory hlubokého učení založené na transferu fungují nejlépe, s průměrnou přesností kolem 85% v doméně a 75% mimo doménu.', 'bs': 'Duboki neuronski modeli su izuzetno poboljšani prevod strojeva. U ovom kontekstu istražujemo da li je još uvek moguće različiti stroj od ljudskih prevoda. Obučavali smo i primjenjivali 18 klasifikatora pod dva postavka: monojezički zadatak, u kojem klasifikator samo gleda prevod; i dvojezički zadatak u kojem se i izvorni tekst uzima u obzir. Prijavljujemo o širokim eksperimentima uključujući 4 neuralne MT sustave (Google Translate, DeepL, kao i dva sustava koje smo trenirali) i različitim domenom teksta. Mi pokazujemo da je dvojezički zadatak najlakši i da se klasifikatori dubokog učenja najbolje izvršavaju, sa srednjim preciznostima oko 85% u domenu i 75% izvan domena.', 'et': 'Sügavad närvimudelid parandasid masintõlget tohutult. Selles kontekstis uurime, kas masinate ja inimtõlkete eristamine on endiselt teostatav. Koolitasime ja rakendasime 18 klassifitseerijat kahes seadistuses: ühekeelses ülesandes, kus klassifitseerija vaatab ainult tõlket; ja kakskeelne ülesanne, milles arvestatakse ka lähteteksti. Raporteerime ulatuslikest eksperimentidest, mis hõlmavad nelja neuraalset MT süsteemi (Google Translate, DeepL, samuti kahte süsteemi, mida me koolitasime) ja tekstide valdkonna muutmist. Näitame, et kakskeelne ülesanne on kõige lihtsam ja et siirdepõhised sügavõppe klassifitseerijad on parimad, keskmise täpsusega umbes 85% domeenisisesed ja 75% väljaspool domeeni .', 'ca': "Models neuronals profunds van millorar enormement la traducció màquina. En aquest context, investigam si la distinció entre la màquina i les traduccions humanes encara és viable. Vam treinar i aplicar 18 classificadors sota dues configuracions: una tasca monolingüística, en la qual el classificador només mira la traducció; i una tasca bilingüe, en la qual també s'ha de tenir en compte el text original. Informem sobre experiments extensos que impliquen quatre sistemes MT neurals (Google Translate, DeepL, com també dos sistemes que vam formar) i que varien el domini dels textos. Mostrem que la tasca bilingüe és la més fàcil i que els classificadors d'aprenentatge profund basats en transfer ències actuen millor, amb una mitjana de precisiós d'un 85% en domini i un 75% fora de domini.", 'fi': 'Syvät hermomallit paransivat konekäännöstä. Tässä yhteydessä tutkimme, onko koneen ja ihmisen käännösten erottaminen edelleen mahdollista. Koulutimme ja sovelsimme 18 luokittelijaa kahdella tavalla: yksikielisessä tehtävässä, jossa luokittelija tarkastelee vain käännöstä; ja kaksikielinen tehtävä, jossa myös lähdeteksti otetaan huomioon. Raportoimme laajoista kokeista, joissa on mukana neljä neurojärjestelmää (Google Translate, DeepL, sekä kaksi kouluttamaamme järjestelmää) ja joissa on muunneltu tekstialaa. Osoitamme, että kaksikielinen tehtävä on helpoin ja että siirtopohjaiset syväoppimisen luokittelijat suoriutuvat parhaiten, keskimääräisillä tarkkuuksilla noin 85% toimialueen sisällä ja 75% toimialueen ulkopuolella.', 'az': 'Ən derin nöral modelləri maşın çevirimi çox yaxşılaşdı. Bu məlumatlarda, insan tercümələrindən ayrılmaq makinesinin hələ də mümkün olduğunu araşdırırıq. İki ayarlar altında 18 klasifikatçı təhsil etdik: monolingual işi, içində sadəcə çeviri baxdı; və iki dil işləri, bununla mənbə metini də düşünürlər. Biz 4 nöral MT sistemi (Google Translate, DeepL, həmçinin təhsil etdiyimiz iki sistemi) və məktub domeini dəyişdiririk. İki dil işləri ən asandır və transfer-based derin öyrənmək klasifikatorların ən yaxşı işlər etdiyini göstəririk. Öyrənmək məqsədilə 85% dəyişiklik və 75% dəyişiklikdir.', 'ha': "@ info: tooltip Daga wannan, Munã tambayi ko za'a rarrabe kafin daga fassarar mutane ne ko kuma ba za'a iya ba. Mun sanar da kuma muka applied 18 fasallar a ƙarƙashin su biyu: wani aikin mutane na monoli, wanda mai fassarwa ke dũbi kawai zuwa fassarar; da wani aikin aiki biyu wanda ke karɓi matsayin Munã bãyar da shirin jarrabai masu ƙaranci da tsarin MT na'urar neura 4 (Google Translate, DeDeDeptL, da sami biyu na'urar da muka tsare) kuma masu rarraba matsayin. Muna nũna wa aikin da ke sauri biyu ne mafi sauki, kuma fassaran da aka shige masu karatun da bakin karatun bakwai, da gaskiyar gaskiyar kashi 85% da asilimin wanda ba ya fita daga kashi ba.", 'jv': 'Open...Open...Open...Open...Open...Open...System Nang kontèks iki, kéné ujaran sak kabèh gambaran ing pangin sak terjamahan ning wong liyane. Awak dhéwé ikelelungkap lan aplikasi 18 sak telas telas nang aturan durung: task single language, supoyo sekondirno nyelarane ning tarjamahan; Sampeyan ngilanggar sampeyan, sing paling kelas kotak nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk barêng-barêng sing nggambar éntuk 4 Neral MT sistem (Google translation, deep pL, lan uga sistem durung awak dhéwé téraning) lan sak ujaran gambar textin. We show that the Bilngual task is the reader one and that transfer-supported deep-Learning', 'he': 'Deep neural models tremendously improved machine translation.  בתוך הקשר הזה, אנו חוקרים אם מכונת ההבדל מתרגמות אנושיות עדיין אפשרית. אימנו והפעלנו 18 מסמכים תחת שתי סדרות: משימה מונושפתית, שבה הסמכה מסתכלת רק על התרגום; ומשימה שתילנגית, שבה גם נקבל בחשבון את הטקסט המקורי. אנו מדווחים על ניסויים רחבים שכוללים 4 מערכות MT עצביות (Google Translate, DeepL, כמו גם שתי מערכות שאימינו) ומשונות את תחום הטקסטים. We show that the bilingual task is the easiest one and that transfer-based deep-learning classifiers perform best, with mean accuracies around 85% in-domain and 75% out-of-domain .', 'sk': 'Globoki nevronski modeli so izboljšali strojni prevod. V tem kontekstu raziskujemo, ali je razlikovanje strojnih prevodov od človeških prevodov še vedno izvedljivo. Usposabljali smo in uporabili 18 klasifikatorjev pod dvema nastavitvama: enojezično nalogo, pri kateri klasifikator gleda samo prevod; in dvojezično nalogo, pri kateri se upošteva tudi izvorno besedilo. Poročamo o obsežnih eksperimentih, ki so vključevali 4 nevronske MT sisteme (Google Translate, DeepL, kot tudi dva sistema, ki smo jih usposobili) in spreminjali domeno besedil. Pokazali smo, da je dvojezična naloga najlažja in da so klasifikatorji globokega učenja, ki temeljijo na prenosu, najboljši, s povprečno natančnostjo okoli 85% v domeni in 75% zunaj domene.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་པའི་དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་རྣམ་པ་གནད་དོན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཆས་ཡོད་པ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་ཁྱད་པར་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མི་ཡིག་ཆའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་མིན། ང་ཚོས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འོག་གི་ དབྱེ་སྡུད་༡༨་ལས་ལག་སྟར་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་པོའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཡང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། We report on extensive experiments involving neural MT systems (Google Translate, DeepL, as well as two systems we trained) and varying the domain of texts. We show that the bilingual task is the easiest one and that transfer-based deep-learning classifiers perform best, with mean accuracies around 85% in-domain and 75% out-of-domain.'}
{'en': 'Constructing A Multi-hop QA Dataset for Comprehensive Evaluation of Reasoning Steps', 'ar': 'إنشاء مجموعة بيانات QA متعددة القفزات للتقييم الشامل لخطوات التفكير', 'es': 'Creación de un conjunto de datos de control de calidad de múltiples saltos para una evaluación integral de los pasos de', 'fr': "Création d'un jeu de données d'assurance qualité multi-bonds pour une évaluation complète des étapes de raisonnement", 'pt': 'Construindo um conjunto de dados de controle de qualidade de vários saltos para avaliação abrangente das etapas de raciocínio', 'ja': '推論ステップの包括的な評価のためのマルチホップQAデータセットの構築', 'hi': 'तर्क चरणों के व्यापक मूल्यांकन के लिए एक मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए डेटासेट का निर्माण', 'zh': '构多跳QA数据集,综评估推理步驿', 'ru': 'Построение многохопового набора данных QA для комплексной оценки этапов мышления', 'ga': 'Tacar Sonraí QA Il-hop a Thógáil le haghaidh Meastóireacht Chuimsitheach ar Chéimeanna Réasúnúcháin', 'hu': 'Multi-hop minőségi adatkészlet létrehozása az indokolási lépések átfogó értékeléséhez', 'kk': 'Көп- хоп QA деректер қорын түзету қадамдарын толық оқу үшін құру', 'it': 'Costruzione di un set di dati QA multi-hop per una valutazione completa delle fasi di ragionamento', 'lt': 'Daugiakampio QA duomenų rinkinio, skirto išsamiam pagrįstų žingsnių vertinimui, kūrimas', 'ms': 'Membina Dataset QA berbilang-lompat untuk penilaian Comprehensive of Reasoning Steps', 'mk': 'Конструирање на базата на податоци за QA со повеќе чекори за сеопфатна евалуација на разумните чекори', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേപ്പുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്ക', 'mt': 'Constructing A Multi-hop QA Dataset for Comprehensive Evaluation of Reasoning Steps', 'mn': 'Олон-холбоотой QA өгөгдлийн санг бүтээх шалтгаан шалтгааныг бүтээх', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Stworzenie zestawu danych wieloosobowego QA do kompleksowej oceny kroków uzasadnienia', 'ro': 'Construirea unui set de date QA multi-hop pentru evaluarea cuprinzătoare a etapelor de raționare', 'sr': 'Izgradavanje multihopskog QA podataka za kompleksno procjenu koraka razloga', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Konstruera ett multi-hop QA dataset för omfattande utvärdering av resonanssteg', 'so': 'Building a QA-data set for Comprehensive assessment of Steps Reading', 'ta': 'Reading Steps', 'ur': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Κατασκευή ενός συνόλου δεδομένων για την ολοκληρωμένη αξιολόγηση των βημάτων λογικής', 'uz': 'Oò£qilmagan qadamlarni tasdiqlash uchun Multi hop QA maò¥lumot set yaratish', 'vi': 'Xây dựng một nhà dữ liệu cá nhân đa hop về trân trọng giải pháp', 'bg': 'Изграждане на набор от данни за оценка на качеството за цялостна оценка на стъпките за разсъждаване', 'da': 'Opbygning af et multi-hop QA datasæt til omfattende evaluering af begrundelse trin', 'hr': 'Izgradavanje multihopskog QA podataka za kompleksno procjenu različitih koraka', 'nl': 'Het bouwen van een multi-hop QA Dataset voor uitgebreide evaluatie van redeneringsstappen', 'de': 'Erstellung eines Multi-Hop QA Datasets zur umfassenden Bewertung von Reasoning Steps', 'ko': '추리 단계의 종합 평가를 위한 다중 점프 QA 데이터 세트 구축', 'id': 'Membina Satu Dataset QA Multi-hop untuk Evaluasi Komprensif Langkah Rasional', 'fa': 'ساختن یک پایگاه اطلاعات چند هوپ QA برای ارزیابی عمومی از قدم\u200cهای واکنش', 'sw': 'Kujenga seti ya data ya QA kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Hatua za Kusoma', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i një baze të dhënash QA me shumë hapa për vlerësimin e plotë të hapave të arsyetimit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Բազմահուսական QA տվյալների համակարգչային գնահատման համար', 'az': '√áoxlu-Hop QA veril…ônl…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlif deńüerlendirm…ôk adńĪmlarńĪnńĪ inŇüa edir', 'bn': 'প্রাপ্ত পদক্ষেপের সম্পূর্ণ পরিমাণের জন্য একাধিক কিউএ ডাটাসেট আঁকা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Izgradnja multihopskog QA podataka za komplektivnu procjenu koraka razloga', 'ca': 'Construïr un conjunt de dades QA multi-hop per a una evaluació completa dels passos de raonament', 'cs': 'Vytvoření multi-hop QA datové sady pro komplexní vyhodnocení odůvodnění kroků', 'et': 'Mitme hüppega kvaliteedi tagamise andmekogumi loomine mõistmise etappide põhjalikuks hindamiseks', 'fi': 'Multi-hop laadunvarmistustietosarjan rakentaminen järkeilyvaiheiden kattavaa arviointia varten', 'tr': 'Bir näçe-hop QA Maglumaty Reasoning Steps üçin Haýyştyrylmak üçin', 'sk': 'Izdelava nabora podatkov o zagotavljanju kakovosti z več koraki za celovito ocenjevanje razlogov', 'jv': 'Konstiturasi A Multi-Hap', 'bo': 'Constructing A Multi-hop QA Dataset for Comprehensive Evaluation of Reasoning Steps', 'he': 'בניית קבוצת נתונים QA במספר תקופות עבור עריכה כללית של צעדים הגיוניים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'A multi-hop question answering (QA) dataset aims to test reasoning and inference skills by requiring a model to read multiple paragraphs to answer a given question. However, current datasets do not provide a complete explanation for the reasoning process from the question to the answer. Further, previous studies revealed that many examples in existing multi-hop datasets do not require multi-hop reasoning to answer a question. In this study, we present a new multi-hop QA dataset, called 2WikiMultiHopQA, which uses structured and unstructured data. In our dataset, we introduce the evidence information containing a reasoning path for multi-hop questions. The evidence information has two benefits : (i) providing a comprehensive explanation for predictions and (ii) evaluating the reasoning skills of a model. We carefully design a pipeline and a set of templates when generating a question-answer pair that guarantees the multi-hop steps and the quality of the questions. We also exploit the structured format in Wikidata and use logical rules to create questions that are natural but still require multi-hop reasoning. Through experiments, we demonstrate that our dataset is challenging for multi-hop models and it ensures that multi-hop reasoning is required.', 'ar': 'تهدف مجموعة بيانات الإجابة على السؤال متعدد المراحل (QA) إلى اختبار مهارات التفكير والاستدلال من خلال طلب نموذج لقراءة فقرات متعددة للإجابة على سؤال معين. ومع ذلك ، لا تقدم مجموعات البيانات الحالية شرحًا كاملاً لعملية التفكير من السؤال إلى الإجابة. علاوة على ذلك ، كشفت الدراسات السابقة أن العديد من الأمثلة في مجموعات البيانات متعددة القفزات الحالية لا تتطلب المنطق متعدد القفزات للإجابة على سؤال. في هذه الدراسة ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات QA جديدة متعددة المراحل ، تسمى 2WikiMultiHopQA ، والتي تستخدم بيانات منظمة وغير منظمة. في مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا ، نقدم معلومات الأدلة التي تحتوي على مسار التفكير للأسئلة متعددة القفزات. معلومات الأدلة لها فائدتان: (1) تقديم تفسير شامل للتنبؤات و (2) تقييم مهارات التفكير لنموذج ما. نصمم بعناية خط أنابيب ومجموعة من القوالب عند إنشاء زوج من الأسئلة والأجوبة يضمن خطوات القفزات المتعددة وجودة الأسئلة. نستغل أيضًا التنسيق المهيكل في ويكي بيانات ونستخدم القواعد المنطقية لإنشاء أسئلة طبيعية ولكنها لا تزال تتطلب تفكيرًا متعدد القفزات. من خلال التجارب ، نثبت أن مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا تمثل تحديًا لنماذج القفزات المتعددة وتضمن أن التفكير المنطقي متعدد القفزات مطلوب.', 'pt': 'Um conjunto de dados de resposta a perguntas (QA) com vários saltos visa testar habilidades de raciocínio e inferência, exigindo que um modelo leia vários parágrafos para responder a uma determinada pergunta. No entanto, os conjuntos de dados atuais não fornecem uma explicação completa para o processo de raciocínio da pergunta à resposta. Além disso, estudos anteriores revelaram que muitos exemplos em conjuntos de dados multi-hop existentes não requerem raciocínio multi-hop para responder a uma pergunta. Neste estudo, apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados QA multi-hop, chamado 2WikiMultiHopQA, que usa dados estruturados e não estruturados. Em nosso conjunto de dados, apresentamos as informações de evidência contendo um caminho de raciocínio para perguntas de vários saltos. As informações de evidência têm dois benefícios: (i) fornecer uma explicação abrangente para previsões e (ii) avaliar as habilidades de raciocínio de um modelo. Projetamos cuidadosamente um pipeline e um conjunto de modelos ao gerar um par pergunta-resposta que garante as etapas de vários saltos e a qualidade das perguntas. Também exploramos o formato estruturado no Wikidata e usamos regras lógicas para criar perguntas que são naturais, mas ainda exigem raciocínio multi-hop. Por meio de experimentos, demonstramos que nosso conjunto de dados é desafiador para modelos de vários saltos e garante que o raciocínio de vários saltos seja necessário.', 'fr': "Un ensemble de données de réponse aux questions (AQ) à sauts multiples vise à tester les compétences de raisonnement et d'inférence en exigeant qu'un modèle lise plusieurs paragraphes pour répondre à une question donnée. Cependant, les ensembles de données actuels ne fournissent pas une explication complète du processus de raisonnement depuis la question jusqu'à la réponse. De plus, des études antérieures ont révélé que de nombreux exemples dans des ensembles de données multi-sauts existants ne nécessitent pas de raisonnement multi-saut pour répondre à une question. Dans cette étude, nous présentons un nouveau jeu de données d'assurance qualité multi-bonds, appelé 2WikimultihopQA, qui utilise des données structurées et non structurées. Dans notre ensemble de données, nous introduisons les informations de preuve contenant un chemin de raisonnement pour les questions à sauts multiples. Les informations probantes présentent deux avantages\xa0: (i) fournir une explication complète des prévisions et (ii) évaluer les capacités de raisonnement d'un modèle. Nous concevons soigneusement un pipeline et un ensemble de modèles lors de la génération d'une paire question-réponse qui garantit les étapes à sauts multiples et la qualité des questions. Nous exploitons également le format structuré de Wikidata et utilisons des règles logiques pour créer des questions qui sont naturelles mais qui nécessitent toujours un raisonnement multi-sauts. Grâce à des expériences, nous démontrons que notre jeu de données est difficile pour les modèles multi-sauts et qu'il garantit que le raisonnement multi-sauts est nécessaire.", 'es': 'Un conjunto de datos de respuesta a preguntas (QA) de múltiples saltos tiene como objetivo poner a prueba las habilidades de razonamiento e inferencia al requerir que un modelo lea varios párrafos para responder a una pregunta determinada. Sin embargo, los conjuntos de datos actuales no proporcionan una explicación completa del proceso de razonamiento desde la pregunta hasta la respuesta. Además, estudios anteriores revelaron que muchos ejemplos en los conjuntos de datos de múltiples saltos existentes no requieren un razonamiento de múltiples saltos para responder a una pregunta. En este estudio, presentamos un nuevo conjunto de datos de control de calidad multisalto, llamado 2WikiMultiHopQA, que utiliza datos estructurados y no estructurados. En nuestro conjunto de datos, presentamos la información de evidencia que contiene una ruta de razonamiento para las preguntas de múltiples saltos. La información de la evidencia tiene dos beneficios: (i) proporcionar una explicación exhaustiva de las predicciones y (ii) evaluar las habilidades de razonamiento de un modelo. Diseñamos cuidadosamente una canalización y un conjunto de plantillas al generar un par de preguntas y respuestas que garanticen los pasos de salto múltiple y la calidad de las preguntas. También aprovechamos el formato estructurado de Wikidata y utilizamos reglas lógicas para crear preguntas que son naturales pero que requieren un razonamiento multisalto. A través de experimentos, demostramos que nuestro conjunto de datos es un desafío para los modelos de múltiples saltos y garantiza que se requiera un razonamiento de múltiples saltos.', 'ja': 'マルチホップクエスチョンアンサー（ QA ）データセットは、モデルが特定の質問に答えるために複数の段落を読むことを要求することによって、推論と推論スキルをテストすることを目的としています。 ただし、現在のデータセットは、質問から回答までの推論プロセスの完全な説明を提供していません。 さらに、以前の研究では、既存のマルチホップデータセットの多くの例では、質問に答えるためにマルチホップ推論を必要としないことが明らかになった。 この研究では、構造化されたデータと非構造化データを使用する2 WikiMultiHopQAと呼ばれる新しいマルチホップQAデータセットを提示します。 データセットでは、マルチホップの質問の推論パスを含む証拠情報を紹介します。 エビデンス情報には、(i)予測の包括的な説明と(ii)モデルの推論スキルの評価という2つの利点があります。 私たちは、マルチホップステップと質問の質を保証する質問回答ペアを生成するときに、パイプラインと一連のテンプレートを慎重に設計します。 また、ウィキデータの構造化フォーマットを活用し、論理ルールを使用して、自然でありながらマルチホップ推論が必要な質問を作成します。 実験を通じて、当社のデータセットがマルチホップモデルにとって困難であり、マルチホップ推論が必要であることを実証します。', 'zh': '多跳问答(QA)据集旨在求模读取余段落以对给定以试理能。 然今数据集不能为从事至对案之理,供其全解。 此外,前此研明,今多跳数集者众示例不须多推理以对。 于此论之,新多跳QA数集,谓之2WikiMultiHopQA,用结构化非结构化数也。 在我们的数据集集,我们引入了包含多跳的推理路径的证据信息。 证信有二善:(i)为占候备解、(ii)评模理。 生成问对,细设管模板,以保跳骤之量。 又因维基数之结构化式,并用逻辑之法以创自然,然犹须多跳推理。 因实验,证吾数集于多跳模有挑战性,且保其须多跳推理。', 'hi': 'एक मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) डेटासेट का उद्देश्य किसी दिए गए प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए कई पैराग्राफ पढ़ने के लिए एक मॉडल की आवश्यकता के द्वारा तर्क और अनुमान कौशल का परीक्षण करना है। हालांकि, वर्तमान डेटासेट प्रश्न से उत्तर तक तर्क प्रक्रिया के लिए एक पूर्ण स्पष्टीकरण प्रदान नहीं करते हैं। इसके अलावा, पिछले अध्ययनों से पता चला है कि मौजूदा मल्टी-हॉप डेटासेट में कई उदाहरणों को किसी प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए बहु-हॉप तर्क की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। इस अध्ययन में, हम एक नया मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसे 2WikiMultiHopQA कहा जाता है, जो संरचित और असंरचित डेटा का उपयोग करता है। हमारे डेटासेट में, हम बहु-हॉप प्रश्नों के लिए एक तर्क पथ युक्त साक्ष्य जानकारी पेश करते हैं। साक्ष्य की जानकारी के दो लाभ हैं: (i) भविष्यवाणियों के लिए एक व्यापक स्पष्टीकरण प्रदान करना और (ii) एक मॉडल के तर्क कौशल का मूल्यांकन करना। हम सावधानीपूर्वक एक पाइपलाइन और टेम्पलेट्स का एक सेट डिज़ाइन करते हैं जब एक प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़ी उत्पन्न होती है जो मल्टी-हॉप चरणों और प्रश्नों की गुणवत्ता की गारंटी देती है। हम विकिडेटा में संरचित प्रारूप का भी शोषण करते हैं और ऐसे प्रश्न बनाने के लिए तार्किक नियमों का उपयोग करते हैं जो प्राकृतिक हैं लेकिन फिर भी बहु-हॉप तर्क की आवश्यकता होती है। प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा डेटासेट मल्टी-हॉप मॉडल के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण है और यह सुनिश्चित करता है कि मल्टी-हॉप तर्क की आवश्यकता है।', 'ru': 'Набор данных для ответа на многохоповые вопросы (QA) предназначен для проверки умений рассуждать и делать выводы, требуя, чтобы модель прочитала несколько абзацев, чтобы ответить на заданный вопрос. Тем не менее, текущие наборы данных не дают полного объяснения процесса рассуждений от вопроса до ответа. Кроме того, предыдущие исследования показали, что многие примеры в существующих многохоповых наборах данных не требуют многохоповых рассуждений для ответа на вопрос. В этом исследовании мы представляем новый многохоповый набор данных QA, называемый 2WikiMultiHopQA, который использует структурированные и неструктурированные данные. В нашем наборе данных мы вводим информацию о доказательствах, содержащую путь рассуждения для многозадачных вопросов. Доказательная информация имеет два преимущества: (i) предоставление всестороннего объяснения прогнозов и (ii) оценка умений моделировать. Мы тщательно проектируем конвейер и набор шаблонов при создании пары вопрос-ответ, которая гарантирует мультихоп шаги и качество вопросов. Мы также используем структурированный формат в Wikidata и используем логические правила для создания вопросов, которые являются естественными, но все еще требуют многохоповых рассуждений. С помощью экспериментов мы демонстрируем, что наш набор данных является сложным для мультихоп-моделей, и он гарантирует, что требуется мультихоп рассуждения.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag tacar sonraí freagartha ceisteanna il-hop (QA) scileanna réasúnaíochta agus tátail a thástáil trí shamhail a éileamh chun ailt iolracha a léamh chun ceist ar leith a fhreagairt. Mar sin féin, ní thugann tacair shonraí reatha míniú iomlán ar an bpróiseas réasúnaíochta ón gceist go dtí an freagra. Ina theannta sin, léirigh staidéir a rinneadh roimhe seo nach bhfuil réasúnaíocht il-hop ag teastáil le go leor samplaí i dtacar sonraí il-hop atá ann cheana féin chun ceist a fhreagairt. Sa staidéar seo, cuirimid i láthair tacar sonraí il-hop QA nua, ar a dtugtar 2WikiMultiHopQA, a úsáideann sonraí struchtúrtha agus neamhstruchtúrtha. Inár dtacar sonraí, tugaimid isteach an fhaisnéis fianaise ina bhfuil conair réasúnaíochta do cheisteanna il-hop. Tá dhá bhuntáiste ag baint leis an bhfaisnéis fianaise: (i) míniú cuimsitheach a thabhairt ar thuartha agus (ii) scileanna réasúnaíochta samhla a mheas. Déanaimid píblíne agus sraith teimpléid a dhearadh go cúramach nuair a ghinimid péire freagra ceiste a ráthaíonn céimeanna il-hop agus cáilíocht na gceisteanna. Bainimid leas freisin as an bhformáid struchtúrtha i Wikidata agus úsáidimid rialacha loighciúla chun ceisteanna a chruthú atá nádúrtha ach a bhfuil réasúnaíocht il-hop ag teastáil uathu fós. Trí thurgnaimh, léirímid go bhfuil ár tacar sonraí dúshlánach do mhúnlaí il-hop agus cinntíonn sé go bhfuil gá le réasúnaíocht il-hop.', 'ka': 'მრავალ-ჰოპური კითხვის შესახებ (QA) მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის საზოგადოება იქნება აპასუნციის და ინფრენციის კონფიგურაციის ტესტის შესახებ მოდელის შესახებ მრა მაგრამ, მიმდინარე მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის პროცესი კითხვის განსახულებისთვის არ დაახსენებს. დამატებით, წინა კვლევები აღმოჩნდა, რომ მრავალ-ჰოპ მონაცემების მაგალითი მაგალითები არ უნდა მრავალ-ჰოპ პარამენტის გასაგება. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ ახალი მრავალ-ჰოპ QA მონაცემები, სახელი 2WikiMultiHopQA, რომელიც გამოყენებს სტრუქტურული და არსტრუქტურული მონაცემები. ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ წარმოდგენების ინფორმაციას, რომელიც მრავალ-ჰოპის კითხვებისთვის პარამენტის გზ საკუთარი ინფორმაცია აქვს ორი გამოსახულება: i) წარმოდგენების უკეთესი განახულება და ii) მოდელის პარამენტის მეცნიერება. ჩვენ ყურადღელად დავყენებთ ფეხლინის და შაბლონის ნაწილი, როდესაც კითხვა-პასუხის ზოგის შექმნა, რომელიც გადარჩენებს მრავალ-ჰოფების ნაწილს და კითხვების კაvali ჩვენ ასევე ვიკეთეტში სტრუქტურურული ფორმატის გამოყენება და ლოგიკური წესების გამოყენება, რომლებიც ნათეულია, მაგრამ უკვე მრავალ-ჰოპური პარამენ ექსპერიმენტებით ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები მრავალ-ჰოპის მოდელეებისთვის შესაძლებელია და ის დავუწყება, რომ მრავალ-ჰოპის პარამენტი უნდა იყო', 'hu': 'A multi-hop kérdésre adott adatkészlet célja, hogy tesztelje az érvelési és következtetési készségeket azáltal, hogy egy modell több bekezdést olvasson el egy adott kérdés megválaszolásához. A jelenlegi adatkészletek azonban nem adnak teljes körű magyarázatot az érvelési folyamatra a kérdéstől a válaszig. Továbbá korábbi tanulmányok azt mutatták, hogy a meglévő multi-hop adatkészletek számos példája nem igényel multi-hop indokolást egy kérdés megválaszolásához. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új multi-hop QA adatkészletet, a 2WikiMultiHopQA néven, amely strukturált és strukturálatlan adatokat használ. Adatkészletünkben bemutatjuk a multi-hop kérdések érvelési útját tartalmazó bizonyítékok információit. A bizonyítékokkal kapcsolatos információknak két előnye van: (i) átfogó magyarázata az előrejelzésekre és (ii) a modell érvelési készségeinek értékelése. Gondosan tervezünk egy csővezetéket és sablonokat, amikor kérdés-válasz párt hozunk létre, amely garantálja a multi-hop lépéseket és a kérdések minőségét. Kihasználjuk a Wikidata strukturált formátumát és logikai szabályokat használunk olyan kérdések létrehozására, amelyek természetesek, de még mindig multi-hop érvelést igényelnek. Kísérletekkel bizonyítjuk, hogy adatkészletünk kihívást jelent a multi-hop modellek számára, és biztosítja, hogy multi-hop érvelés szükséges.', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την απάντηση πολλών ερωτήσεων (QA) στοχεύει στη δοκιμή δεξιοτήτων συλλογισμού και συμπερασμάτων απαιτώντας από ένα μοντέλο να διαβάζει πολλές παραγράφους για να απαντήσει σε μια δεδομένη ερώτηση. Ωστόσο, τα τρέχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων δεν παρέχουν πλήρη εξήγηση για τη διαδικασία συλλογισμού από την ερώτηση έως την απάντηση. Επιπλέον, προηγούμενες μελέτες αποκάλυψαν ότι πολλά παραδείγματα σε υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων πολλαπλών λυκίδων δεν απαιτούν συλλογισμό πολλαπλών λυκίδων για να απαντήσουν σε μια ερώτηση. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων QA πολλαπλών Hops, που ονομάζεται 2WikiMultiHopQA, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί δομημένα και μη δομημένα δεδομένα. Στο σύνολο δεδομένων μας, εισάγουμε τις πληροφορίες αποδεικτικών στοιχείων που περιέχουν μια διαδρομή συλλογισμού για ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών χορού. Οι πληροφορίες αποδεικτικών στοιχείων έχουν δύο οφέλη: (i) παροχή περιεκτικής επεξήγησης για τις προβλέψεις και (ii) αξιολόγηση των δεξιοτήτων λογικής ενός μοντέλου. Σχεδιάζουμε προσεκτικά έναν αγωγό και ένα σύνολο προτύπων κατά τη δημιουργία ενός ζευγαριού ερώτησης-απάντησης που εγγυάται τα βήματα πολλαπλών βημάτων και την ποιότητα των ερωτήσεων. Επίσης εκμεταλλευόμαστε τη δομημένη μορφή στα Βικιντεδομένα και χρησιμοποιούμε λογικούς κανόνες για να δημιουργήσουμε ερωτήματα που είναι φυσικά αλλά εξακολουθούν να απαιτούν συλλογισμό πολλαπλών χορού. Μέσα από πειράματα, καταδεικνύουμε ότι το σύνολο δεδομένων μας αποτελεί πρόκληση για μοντέλα πολλαπλών λυκίδων και εξασφαλίζει ότι απαιτείται συλλογισμός πολλαπλών λυκίδων.', 'lt': 'Daugiakampiu klausimų rinkiniu (QA) siekiama išbandyti pagrįstumo ir išvados įgūdžius, reikalaujant, kad modelis perskaitytų kelis punktus atsakydamas į konkretų klausimą. Tačiau dabartiniai duomenų rinkiniai visiškai nepaaiškina pagrįstumo proceso nuo klausimo iki atsakymo. Further, previous studies revealed that many examples in existing multi-hop datasets do not require multi-hop reasoning to answer a question.  Šiame tyrime pristatome naują daugiapakopį QA duomenų rinkinį, vadinamą 2WikiMultiHopQA, kuriame naudojami struktūrizuoti ir nesustruktūrizuoti duomenys. Mūsų duomenų rinkinyje pateikiame įrodymų informaciją, kurioje pateikiamas kelių hop ų klausimų pagrindimo kelias. Įrodymų informacija turi dvi naudas: i) i šsamiai paaiškinti prognozes ir ii) įvertinti modelio pagrįstus įgūdžius. Atidžiai suprojektuojame vamzdyną ir šablonus kuriant klausimų ir atsakymų porą, kuri garantuoja daugialypius žingsnius ir klausimų kokybę. Mes taip pat naudojame Wikidata struktūrizuotą format ą ir naudojame logiškas taisykles, kad sukurtume klausimus, kurie yra natūralūs, bet vis dar reikalingi daugialypių argumentų. Eksperimentais įrodome, kad mūsų duomenų rinkinys kelia sunkumų daugelio apynių modeliams ir užtikrina, kad būtų reikalingas daugelio apynių pagrindimas.', 'it': "Un set di dati multi-hop question answer (QA) mira a testare le capacità di ragionamento e inferenza richiedendo a un modello di leggere più paragrafi per rispondere a una data domanda. Tuttavia, gli attuali set di dati non forniscono una spiegazione completa del processo di ragionamento dalla domanda alla risposta. Inoltre, studi precedenti hanno rivelato che molti esempi di set di dati multi-hop esistenti non richiedono ragionamenti multi-hop per rispondere a una domanda. In questo studio, presentiamo un nuovo dataset QA multi-hop, chiamato 2WikiMultiHopQA, che utilizza dati strutturati e non strutturati. Nel nostro dataset, introduciamo le informazioni di prova contenenti un percorso di ragionamento per domande multi-hop. Le informazioni sull'evidenza hanno due vantaggi: (i) fornire una spiegazione completa delle previsioni e (ii) valutare le capacità di ragionamento di un modello. Progettiamo attentamente una pipeline e un set di modelli quando generiamo una coppia domanda-risposta che garantisce i passaggi multi-hop e la qualità delle domande. Sfruttamo anche il formato strutturato in Wikidata e usiamo regole logiche per creare domande che sono naturali ma richiedono comunque ragionamenti multi-hop. Attraverso esperimenti, dimostriamo che il nostro set di dati è impegnativo per i modelli multi-hop e garantisce che il ragionamento multi-hop sia richiesto.", 'mk': 'Соsettот на податоци за одговор на повеќе прашања (QA) има за цел тестирање на размислувањето и инференциските вештини со барање на модел за читање на повеќе параграфи за одговор на одредено прашање. Сепак, сегашните податоци не обезбедуваат целосно објаснување за процесот на размислување од прашањето до одговорот. Further, previous studies revealed that many examples in existing multi-hop datasets do not require multi-hop reasoning to answer a question.  Во оваа студија, претставуваме нов мнозински компјутер на податоци за QA, наречен 2WikiMultiHopQA, кој користи структурирани и неструктурирани податоци. Во нашиот компјутер на податоци, ги воведуваме доказите кои содржат размислувачки пат за мултихоп прашања. Информациите за доказите имаат две бенефиции: (i) обезбедување сеопфатно објаснување за предвидувањата и (ii) оценување на размислувачките вештини на моделот. Ние внимателно дизајнираме гасовод и сет шаблони кога генерираме пар прашања-одговори кои ги гарантираат чекорите со повеќе скоци и квалитетот на прашањата. We also exploit the structured format in Wikidata and use logical rules to create questions that are natural but still require multi-hop reasoning.  Со експерименти, ние демонстрираме дека нашиот податок е предизвик за мултихоп модели и тоа осигурува дека е потребно мултихоп размислување.', 'kk': 'Көп- хоп сұрақ жауап беру (QA) деректер қорлары келтірілген сұрақ жауап беру үшін бірнеше параграфияларды оқу үшін үлгісін тексеру және бақылау мүмкіндіктерін тексеру үшін мақсатты Бірақ назардағы деректер жиындары сұрақтан жауап беру процесіне толық түсініктемейді. Алдыңғы зерттеулері бірнеше мәселелерде көп мәселелерді бірнеше хоп деректер қорларында сұраққа жауап беру үшін көп-хоп сезімі керек болмайды. Бұл зерттеулерде 2WikiMultiHopQA деген жаңа көп-хоп QA деректер жинағын таңдаймыз. Бұл құрылған және құрылмаған деректерді қолданады. Деректер жиынында біз көптеген сұрақтар үшін көптеген мәліметті келтіреміз. Бұл мәліметтің екі нәтижесі бар: i) таңдау үшін толық түсініктеме және ii) үлгісінің түсініктемесін оқу үшін. Біз көп-хоп қадамдарын және сұрақтардың сапатын қамтамасыз ететін сұрақ-жауаптарды құрып жатқан үлгілерді құрамыз. Біз сондай-ақ Викидеректе құрылған пішімді жұмыс істеп, тәуелсіз сұрақтарды құру үшін логикалық ережелерді қолданамыз, бірақ бірнеше хоп тәуелсіз. Тәжірибелер арқылы, біз деректер жиынымыз көп-хоп моделдеріне көпшілік болып, көп-хоп тәжірибелерін қажет етеді деп көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Set data menjawab soalan berbilang-lompat (QA) bermaksud menguji kemampuan alasan dan kesimpulan dengan memerlukan model untuk membaca paragraf berbilang untuk menjawab soalan tertentu. Namun, set data semasa tidak menyediakan penjelasan lengkap untuk proses alasan dari soalan ke jawapan. Lagipun, kajian terdahulu menunjukkan bahawa banyak contoh dalam set data multi-hop yang wujud tidak memerlukan alasan multi-hop untuk menjawab soalan. Dalam kajian ini, kami memperkenalkan set data QA berbilang-hop yang baru, dipanggil 2WikiMultiHopQA, yang menggunakan data struktur dan tidak struktur. Dalam set data kami, kami memperkenalkan maklumat bukti yang mengandungi jalan alasan untuk soalan multi-hop. Maklumat bukti mempunyai dua keuntungan: (i) menyediakan penjelasan yang meliputi untuk ramalan dan (ii) menilai kemahiran alasan model. Kami merancang paip dengan hati-hati dan set templat apabila menghasilkan pasangan soalan-jawapan yang menjamin langkah-langkah berbilang-lompat dan kualiti soalan. Kami juga mengeksploitasi format struktur di Wikidata dan menggunakan peraturan logik untuk mencipta soalan yang semulajadi tetapi masih memerlukan alasan multi-hop. Melalui eksperimen, kami menunjukkan bahawa set data kami adalah menantang untuk model multi-hop dan ia memastikan bahawa alasan multi-hop diperlukan.', 'mt': 'Sett ta’ dejta li jwieġeb għal mistoqsijiet multipli (QA) għandu l-għan li jittestja l-ħiliet tar-raġunament u tal-inferenza billi jeħtieġ mudell biex jaqra diversi paragrafi biex iwieġeb għal mistoqsija partikolari. Madankollu, is-settijiet ta’ dejta attwali ma jipprovdux spjegazzjoni sħiħa għall-proċess ta’ raġunament mill-mistoqsija sat-tweġiba. Barra minn hekk, studji preċedenti żvelaw li ħafna eżempji f’settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti b’ħafna ħops ma jeħtieġux raġunament b’ħafna ħops biex iwieġbu għal mistoqsija. F’dan l-istudju, qed nippreżentaw sett ġdid ta’ dejta QA b’ħafna ħops, imsejjaħ 2WikiMultiHopQA, li juża dejta strutturata u mhux strutturata. Fis-sett tad-dejta tagħna, a ħna nintroduċu l-informazzjoni dwar l-evidenza li fiha triq ta’ raġunament għal mistoqsijiet multihops. L-informazzjoni dwar l-evidenza għandha żewġ benefiċċji: (i) tipprovdi spjegazzjoni komprensiva għat-tbassir u (ii) tevalwa l-ħiliet ta’ raġunament ta’ mudell. Aħna niddisinjaw b’attenzjoni pipeline u sett ta’ mudelli meta niġġeneraw par ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet li jiggarantixxu l-passi multi-hop u l-kwalità tal-mistoqsijiet. Aħna nistrutturaw ukoll il-format strutturat f’Wikidata u nużaw regoli loġiċi biex in ħolqu mistoqsijiet li huma naturali iżda li għadhom jeħtieġu raġunament multi hop. Permezz ta’ esperimenti, nagħmlu xhieda li s-sett tad-dejta tagħna huwa ta’ sfida għall-mudelli multi-hop u jiżgura li jkun meħtieġ raġunament multi-hop.', 'mn': 'Олон холбоотой асуулт (QA) өгөгдлийн сангуудын хариулт нь ойлголт болон халдварын чадварыг шалгахын тулд олон хэсгийг унших загвар өгөгдсөн. Гэхдээ одоогийн өгөгдлийн сангууд асуултаас хариулт руу шилжүүлэх үйл явцын тухай бүрэн тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Дараа нь, өмнөх судалгаанууд олон олон холбоотой өгөгдлийн сангийн жишээг асуултыг хариулах олон холбоотой шаардлагагүйг харуулсан. Энэ судалгаанд бид 2WikiMultiHopQA гэдэг олон холбоотой QA өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь бүтээгдэхүүний болон бүтээгдэхүүнгүй өгөгдлийг ашигладаг. Бидний өгөгдлийн санд олон холбоотой асуултуудын шалтгааныг харуулж байгаа баримт мэдээллийг танилцуулж байна. Баталгааны мэдээлэл нь хоёр ашигтай: i) таамаглалтын тухай бүрэн тодорхойлолт өгч, ii) загварын ойлголтын чадварыг үнэлэх. Бид олон хоолойн алхам болон асуултын сайн чанарыг гаргадаг асуулт хариулт хоёрыг бий болгоход хоолойн шугам болон хэдэн шат загвар бүтээж байдаг. Бид мөн Wikidata-д бүтээгдэхүүний форматыг ашиглаж, байгалийн асуултууд бий болгох логик дүрмийг ашиглаж байна. Гэхдээ олон холбооны шалтгаан хэрэгтэй. Бид туршилтаар өгөгдлийн сангууд олон холбоотой загваруудын тулд хэцүү болохыг харуулж байна. Энэ нь олон холбоотой ойлголтын шаардлагатай байдаг.', 'ml': 'കൊടുത്ത ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം പറയാന്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉത്തരം വരെ ചോദ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പിന്നീട്, മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു, നിലവിലുള്ള പല ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള പല ഡാറ്റാസറ്റു ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ multi-hop QA ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. 2WikiMultiHopQA എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് കൊണ ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തെളിവുകള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരു കാര്യമായ പാതയുണ്ട്. പല-ഹോപ്പ്  തെളിവുകള്\u200dക്ക് രണ്ടു ഉപകാരമുണ്ട്: (i) പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു പ്രഖ്യാപന വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനും (ii) മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ വിവേകതയുടെ കഴിവ ഒരു പൈപ്പെലിനും ഒരു കൂട്ടം മാന്റുകളും സൃഷ്ടിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായി ഡിസൈന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ജോടി ഉണ വിക്കിഡാറ്റായിലെ സ്ഥാപിതമായ ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും, സ്വാഭാവികമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും, പക്ഷെ ഇപ്പ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലൂടെ നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പല-ഹോപ്പ് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വ്യാല്\u200dച്ചല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d പ്', 'no': 'Eit fleire hopp- spørsmål for svaring (QA) mål å test a grunnlag og infeksjonsverdiar ved å kreva eit modell for å lesa fleire avsnitt for å svara på eit oppgjeven spørsmål. Det gjeldande datasettet gjev ikkje noko fullstendig forklaring for den rasjonsprosessen frå spørsmålet til svaret. Førre studiar viste at mange eksemplar i eksisterande multihopdataset treng ikkje fleirhopp-grunnlag for å svara på eit spørsmål. I denne studien presenterer vi ei ny multihopp QA-dataset, kalla 2WikiMultiHopQA, som brukar strukturerte og ikkje strukturerte data. I datasettet vårt introduserer vi beviseringsinformasjonen som inneheld ein grunnleggjande bane for fleirhopp spørsmål. Informasjonen om beviser har to fordel: i) tilbyr ein komplett forklaring for forhåndsvising og ii) evaluering av grunnleggingsferdighetane for eit modell. Vi designerer ein røyrline og eit sett maler når du lagar eit spørsmål- svarpar som garantierer fleire hopsteg og kvaliteten på spørsmålene. Vi bruker også strukturerte formatet i Wikidata og bruker logiske reglar for å laga spørsmål som er naturleg, men fremdeles krev fleire-hopp-rasjonar. Gjennom eksperimenter demonstrerer vi at datasettet vårt er vanskeleg for fleirhopp-modeller, og det sikrer at det er nødvendig å forstå fleirhopp.', 'pl': 'Zestaw danych dotyczących odpowiedzi na pytania wielokrotnego (QA) ma na celu sprawdzenie umiejętności rozumowania i wnioskowania poprzez wymaganie, aby model odczytał kilka akapitów w celu odpowiedzi na dane pytanie. Jednak obecne zbiory danych nie zapewniają pełnego wyjaśnienia procesu rozumowania od pytania do odpowiedzi. Ponadto poprzednie badania wykazały, że wiele przykładów w istniejących zbiorach danych multi-hop nie wymaga rozumowania multi-hop do odpowiedzi na pytanie. W niniejszym opracowaniu prezentujemy nowy zestaw danych multi-hop QA o nazwie 2WikiMultiHopQA, który wykorzystuje dane ustrukturyzowane i nieustrukturyzowane. W naszym zbiorze danych wprowadzamy informacje dowodowe zawierające ścieżkę rozumowania dla pytań multi-hop. Informacje dowodowe mają dwie korzyści: (i) zapewnienie kompleksowego wyjaśnienia przewidywań i (ii) ocenę umiejętności rozumowania modelu. Starannie projektujemy pipeline i zestaw szablonów generując parę pytań-odpowiedzi, która gwarantuje wielokrotne kroki i jakość pytań. Wykorzystujemy również ustrukturyzowany format w Wikidanych i wykorzystujemy logiczne reguły do tworzenia pytań, które są naturalne, ale nadal wymagają rozumowania multi-hop. Poprzez eksperymenty pokazujemy, że nasz zestaw danych stanowi wyzwanie dla modeli multi-hop i gwarantuje, że rozumowanie multi-hop jest wymagane.', 'ro': 'Un set de date multi-hop răspuns la întrebări (QA) are ca scop testarea abilităților de raționament și inferență, solicitând unui model să citească mai multe paragrafe pentru a răspunde la o anumită întrebare. Cu toate acestea, seturile de date actuale nu oferă o explicație completă pentru procesul de raționament de la întrebare la răspuns. Mai mult, studiile anterioare au arătat că multe exemple din seturile de date multi-hop existente nu necesită raționament multi-hop pentru a răspunde la o întrebare. În acest studiu, prezentăm un nou set de date QA multi-hop, numit 2WikiMultiHopQA, care utilizează date structurate și nestructurate. În setul nostru de date, introducem informațiile privind dovezile care conțin o cale de raționament pentru întrebările multi-hop. Informațiile privind dovezile prezintă două beneficii: (i) furnizarea unei explicații cuprinzătoare pentru previziuni și (ii) evaluarea abilităților de raționament ale unui model. Proiectăm cu atenție o conductă și un set de șabloane atunci când generăm o pereche întrebare-răspuns care garantează etapele multi-hop și calitatea întrebărilor. De asemenea, exploatăm formatul structurat din Wikidata și folosim reguli logice pentru a crea întrebări care sunt naturale, dar necesită încă raționament multi-hop. Prin experimente, demonstrăm că setul nostru de date reprezintă o provocare pentru modelele multi-hop și asigură necesitatea raționamentului multi-hop.', 'sr': 'Višehopski odgovor na pitanje (QA) podataka je cilj da testira veštine razuma i infekcije zahtevajući model da pročita višestruke paragrafe da odgovori na određeno pitanje. Međutim, trenutne sete podataka ne pružaju potpuno objašnjenje procesa razvoda od pitanja do odgovora. Nadalje, prethodna studija pokazala je da mnogi primjeri u postojećim multihopskim podacima ne zahtevaju multihopski razlog za odgovor na pitanje. U ovoj studiji predstavljamo novu multihopsku QA podatku po imenu 2WikiMultiHopQA, koja koristi strukturirane i neostrukturirane podatke. U našem setu podataka predstavljamo dokaze koji sadrže razumljiv put za multihopske pitanja. Informacije o dokazima imaju dve koristi: i) pružanje sveobuhvatljivog objašnjenja predviđanja i ii) procjenjivanje razumnih vještina model a. Pažljivo dizajniramo cijevi i skup hramena kada stvaramo par odgovora na pitanje koji garantuje multihopske korake i kvalitetu pitanja. Takođe iskoristimo strukturirani format u Wikidata i koristimo logičke pravila da bi stvorili pitanja koje su prirodne ali još uvek zahtijevali multihopski razum. Kroz eksperimente, pokazujemo da je naš set podataka izazovan za multihopske modele i osigurava se da je potrebno multihopski razum.', 'so': "QA waa in lagu imtixaamo aqoonta sababta ah iyo cilmiga la'aanta, sida loo baahan yahay tusaale in loo akhriyo marxalado badan si ay ugu jawaabo su'aal la siiyo. However, current datasets do not provide a complete explanation for the reasoning process from the question to the answer.  Waxbarashada hore waxaa sidoo kale loo muujiyey in tusaalooyin badan oo ku jira labada koonfureed looma baahna sabab badan oo ay su'aalo ka jawaabaan. Waxbarashadan waxaynu soo bandhignaa macluumaad cusub oo QA ah oo la yidhaahdo 2WikiMultiHopQA, kaas oo isticmaalaya macluumaad dhisan oo aan la dhisay. Taariikhdeena ayaannu ku soo bandhignaa macluumaadka caddeynta, kaas oo ku jira wado sabab ah ee su'aalo badan. Macluumaadka caddeyntu waxay leedahay laba faa'iido: (i) kaas oo bixiya caddeyn hoos u ah horumarinta iyo (ii) qiimeynaya aqoonta waxyaabaha ku saabsan tusaale ahaan. Si taxadar ah ayaannu u qornaa baabuur iyo qoraal kamid ah, marka aan dhaleyno laba nooc oo jawaabta ka jawaabta, kaas oo garansiinaya tallaabooyin badan iyo qiimaha su'aalaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu Wikidata ku isticmaalnaa qaababka la dhisay, waxaana isticmaalnaa sharciyada caadiga ah si aan u abuurno su'aalo dabiicadda ah laakiin weli waxay u baahan tahay sababo badan. Imtixaanka ayaannu ku muujinnaa in sawirkayada macluumaadkayagu ay dhibaatooyin u leedahay tusaalooyin badan oo kala duduwan, waxayna hubsadaa in loo baahan yahay sababo badan.", 'si': 'ගොඩක් හොප් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (QA) දත්ත සෙට් අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියලා මදුල්යයක් කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරකාර ඊට පස්සේ, කලින් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් උත්තර දෙන්න බොහොම උදාහරණයක් තියෙනවා කියලා. මේ අධ්\u200dයානයේ අපි අළුත් බොහොප් QA දත්ත සෙට් එකක් පෙන්වනවා, 2WikiMultiHopQA කියලා, ඒකෙන් සංස්ථානය සහ නිර්මාණය කරලා නැත අපේ දත්ත සෙට් එකේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන සාක්ෂි තොරතුරු සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. සාක්ෂි තොරතුරුවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: i) ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සම්පූර්ණ විස්තරයක් සඳහා සම්පූ අපි පායිප්ලයින් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න සුභාවක්  අපි විකිඩේටා වල සංවිධානය විස්තර කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සහ ල අපි පරීක්ෂණාවන් විසින් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ දත්ත සෙට් එක ගොඩක් හොප් මොඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා කියලා, ඒක තහවුරු කර', 'sv': 'En multi-hop frågesvarsdata (QA) syftar till att testa resonemang och inferens färdigheter genom att kräva att en modell läser flera stycken för att svara på en given fråga. Nuvarande datamängder ger dock inte en fullständig förklaring till resonemanget från frågan till svaret. Vidare visade tidigare studier att många exempel i befintliga multi-hop datauppsättningar inte kräver multi-hop resonemang för att besvara en fråga. I denna studie presenterar vi ett nytt multi-hop QA dataset, kallat 2WikiMultiHopQA, som använder strukturerad och ostrukturerad data. I vårt dataset introducerar vi evidensinformation som innehåller en resonemang väg för multi-hop frågor. Bevisinformationen har två fördelar: (i) ger en heltäckande förklaring av förutsägelser och (ii) utvärderar en modells resonemang. Vi utformar noggrant en pipeline och en uppsättning mallar när vi skapar ett fråge-svar par som garanterar multi-hop steg och kvaliteten på frågorna. Vi utnyttjar också det strukturerade formatet i Wikidata och använder logiska regler för att skapa frågor som är naturliga men ändå kräver multi-hop resonemang. Genom experiment visar vi att vårt dataset är utmanande för multi-hop modeller och säkerställer att multi-hop resonemang krävs.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விக்கு பதில் பல- hop கேள்வி தகவல் அமைப்புகள் குறிப்பிட்ட கேள்விக்கு பதில் ஒரு மாதிரியை படிக்க வேண்டும் ஆயினும், தற்போதைய தரவுத்தளங்கள் கேள்வியிலிருந்து விடைக்கு ஒரு முழு விளக்கம் அளிக்கவில்லை. மேலும், முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் காண்பித்தது பல- ஹாப் தரவுத்தளங்களில் இருக்கும் பல உதாரணங்கள் கேள்விக்கு பதில் காரணம் பல- ஹ இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், 2WikiMultiHopQA என்ற ஒரு புதிய பல- hop QA தகவல் அமைப்பை கொண்டுள்ளோம். அது உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தக எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பில், நாங்கள் பல-hop கேள்விகளுக்கு ஒரு காரணமான பாதையை கொண்ட தகவல்களை அறிவிக்கிறோம். தெளிவான தகவல்களிடம் இரண்டு நன்மைகள் உள்ளன: (i) முன்னோட்டத்திற்கு ஒரு முழுமையான விளக்கம் வழங்குகிறது (ii) மாதிரியின் காரணங கேள்வி விடை ஜோடி உருவாக்கும்போது நாம் ஒரு பைப்லைன் மற்றும் ஒரு வார்ப்புருவை வடிவமை நாம் விகிட்டாவில் அமைப்பு வடிவத்தை பயன்படுத்தி தொழில்நுட்ப விதிகளை பயன்படுத்தி இயற்கையான கேள்விகளை உருவாக்குவதற்க பரிசோதனைகள் மூலம், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பு பல- ஹாப் மாதிரிகளுக்கு சவால் இருக்கிறது மற்றும் அது பல- ஹாப் காரணங', 'ur': 'ایک multi-hop سؤال جواب دینے والی (QA) ڈیٹ سٹ کا مطالبہ ہے کہ ایک سؤال کی جواب دینے کے لئے ایک مدل کو پڑھنا چاہے اس کے ذریعہ سے منطقی اور منطقی فعالیت کا امتحان کرنا چاہے۔ However, current data sets do not provide a complete explanation for the reasoning process from the question to the answer. اس کے بعد، پہلے مطالعہ نے ظاہر کیا کہ بہت سی مثالیں موجود multi-hop ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہیں جو ایک سوال کے جواب دینے کے لئے multi-hop منطقی کی ضرورت نہیں ہے. اس مطالعہ میں ہم نے ایک نوی multi-hop QA ڈاٹ سٹ کو پیش کیا ہے، جسے 2WikiMultiHopQA نامیدہ ہے، جو ساختہ اور غیرساختہ ڈاٹ استعمال کرتا ہے. ہمارے ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہم مدارک معلومات کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو ملی-هوپ سوال کے لئے ایک منطقی مسیر ہے۔ مدرک کی اطلاعات دو فائدے ہیں: (i) پیش بینی کے لئے ایک گھیری توضیح دے رہی ہے اور (ii) ایک مدرک کی منظور کی طاقتوں کا امتحان کررہی ہے۔ ہم ایک پائپ لین اور ایک جمع ٹیپلٹوں کی طراحی کرتے ہیں جب سوال-جواب جوڑے پیدا کرتے ہیں جو multi-hop سپے اور سوال کی کیفیت کو امانت دیتا ہے۔ ہم ویکیڈاٹا میں ساختہ فرموٹ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں اور منطقی قوانین کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ سوال پیدا کریں جو طبیعی ہیں لیکن اب بھی multi-hop منطقی کی ضرورت ہے آزمائش کے ذریعے ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا ڈاٹ سٹ multi-hop موڈل کے لئے مشکل ہے اور یہ مطمئن ہوتا ہے کہ multi-hop منطقی کی ضرورت ہے.', 'uz': "Koʻproq savol (QA) maʼlumotlar to ʻplami berilgan soʻrov haqida ma'lumotni tekshirish mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan savol javob berish uchun bir nechta qoʻllanmani oʻqish mumkin. Lekin, joriy maʼlumotlar tugmalari savol javob berishga sabab boʻlgan vazifasi to ʻliq forklarini koʻrsatilmaydi. Koʻrib o'rganishlar esa, ko'pchilik mavjud mulo-hop maʼlumot satrlarida ko'p misollar savol javob berish uchun multi-hop sabablar kerak emas. Bu taʼminotda, biz 2WikiMultiHopQA (2WikiMultiHopQA) nomli yangi multi hop maʼlumotlar tarkibini hosil qilamiz, bu tuzilgan va yaratilgan maʼlumot yordamida ishlatiladi. Maʼlumotlar sahifasida biz bir necha-hop savollari uchun ma'lumot yoʻli maʼlumotni anglatamiz. Maʼlumotlar ikki foydalanuvchiga ega: (i) پێشبینی qilish uchun juda muhimi forklari va (ii) modelning ma'lumotlarini qidirish mumkin. Biz tasavvur qilamiz va bir namunalarni yaratishda, bu savol javob qo'lingiz yaratishda, bir necha qatlamni va savollarning sifatini ishlab chiqaradi. Biz Wikidata tashkilotli formatidan foydalanamiz va logical qoidalardan foydalanamiz asosiy savollarni yaratish uchun, lekin hamda ko'plab-hop sabablar kerak. Biz tajribalar orqali biz bir necha-hop modellari uchun maʼlumot setimizni ko'rsatamiz va bu ko'plab-hop sabablar kerak deb ishlatadi.", 'vi': 'Một tập tin trả lời câu hỏi đa hop (QA) nhằm kiểm tra khả năng suy luận và suy luận bằng cách yêu cầu một người mẫu đọc nhiều đoạn để trả lời một câu hỏi. Tuy nhiên, các tập tin hiện tại không cung cấp một giải thích đầy đủ cho quá trình lập luận từ câu hỏi đến câu trả lời. Hơn nữa, các nghiên cứu trước cho thấy nhiều ví dụ trong các nhà dữ liệu đa hop hiện tại không cần phải lập trình đa hop để trả lời câu hỏi. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin đa hop QA mới, tên là 2WikiLmultiHopQA, mà sử dụng dữ liệu cấu trúc và không xây dựng. Trong dữ liệu của chúng tôi, chúng tôi giới thiệu thông tin bằng chứng có một đường dẫn đến các câu hỏi đa hop. Thông tin bằng chứng có hai lợi thế: i) cung cấp một giải thích đầy đủ cho dự đoán và, II) đánh giá kỹ năng lập luận của mô hình. Chúng tôi thiết kế cẩn thận một đường ống và một tập mẫu khi tạo ra một cặp trả lời câu hỏi đảm bảo các bước đa hop và chất lượng các câu hỏi. Chúng tôi cũng tận dụng nội dung của WikiLdata và dùng các quy tắc logic để tạo ra những câu hỏi tự nhiên nhưng vẫn cần lập trình đa hop. Bằng các thí nghiệm, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng bộ dữ liệu đầy thử thách cho các mẫu đa hop và đảm bảo rằng phải lập trình đa hop.', 'bg': 'Набор от данни за отговор на въпроси с множество хопове има за цел да тества уменията за разсъждение и изводи, като изисква модел да чете няколко абзаца, за да отговори на даден въпрос. Настоящите набори от данни обаче не предоставят пълно обяснение за процеса на мотивиране от въпроса до отговора. Освен това предишни проучвания показаха, че много примери в съществуващите мулти-хоп набори от данни не изискват мулти-хоп разсъждения, за да отговорят на даден въпрос. В това проучване представяме нов набор от данни за оценка на качеството, наречен 2който използва структурирани и неструктурирани данни. В нашия набор от данни въвеждаме информацията за доказателства, съдържаща мотивационен път за въпроси с мулти-хоп. Информацията за доказателствата има две предимства: (i) предоставяне на изчерпателно обяснение за прогнозите и ii) оценка на уменията за разсъждаване на даден модел. Ние внимателно проектираме тръбопровод и набор от шаблони при генериране на двойка въпроси-отговори, която гарантира стъпките на мулти-хоп и качеството на въпросите. Също така използваме структурирания формат в Уикиданни и използваме логически правила, за да създадем въпроси, които са естествени, но все пак изискват мулти-хоп разсъждения. Чрез експерименти демонстрираме, че нашият набор от данни е предизвикателство за мулти-хоп модели и гарантира, че е необходимо мулти-хоп разсъждение.', 'nl': "Een multi-hop question responsing (QA) dataset is bedoeld om redenering en inferentie vaardigheden te testen door een model te verplichten om meerdere alinea's te lezen om een bepaalde vraag te beantwoorden. De huidige datasets bieden echter geen volledige uitleg voor het redeneringsproces van de vraag tot het antwoord. Verder hebben eerdere studies aangetoond dat veel voorbeelden in bestaande multi-hop datasets geen multi-hop redenering vereisen om een vraag te beantwoorden. In dit onderzoek presenteren we een nieuwe multi-hop QA dataset, genaamd 2WikiMultiHopQA, die gebruik maakt van gestructureerde en ongestructureerde data. In onze dataset introduceren we de bewijsinformatie met daarin een redeneeringspad voor multi-hop vragen. De bewijsinformatie heeft twee voordelen: (i) het verstrekken van een uitgebreide uitleg voor voorspellingen en (ii) het evalueren van de redeneringsvaardigheden van een model. We ontwerpen zorgvuldig een pijplijn en een set sjablonen bij het genereren van een vraag-antwoord paar dat de multi-hop stappen en de kwaliteit van de vragen garandeert. We gebruiken ook het gestructureerde formaat in Wikidata en gebruiken logische regels om vragen te creëren die natuurlijk zijn maar toch multi-hop redeneren vereisen. Door experimenten laten we zien dat onze dataset uitdagend is voor multi-hop modellen en het zorgt ervoor dat multi-hop redenering vereist is.", 'da': 'Et multi-hop spørgsmål besvarelse datasæt (QA) sigter mod at teste ræsonnement og inference færdigheder ved at kræve, at en model læser flere afsnit for at besvare et givet spørgsmål. De nuværende datasæt giver imidlertid ikke en fuldstændig forklaring på ræsonnementsprocessen fra spørgsmålet til svaret. Desuden viste tidligere undersøgelser, at mange eksempler i eksisterende multi-hop datasæt ikke kræver multi-hop ræsonnement for at besvare et spørgsmål. I denne undersøgelse præsenterer vi et nyt multi-hop QA datasæt, kaldet 2WikiMultiHopQA, som bruger strukturerede og ustrukturerede data. I vores datasæt introducerer vi evidensoplysninger, der indeholder en ræsonneringsvej til multi-hop spørgsmål. Bevisoplysningerne har to fordele: i) giver en omfattende forklaring på forudsigelser og ii) evaluerer en models ræsonnement. Vi designer omhyggeligt en pipeline og et sæt skabeloner, når vi genererer et spørgsmål-svar par, der garanterer multi-hop trin og kvaliteten af spørgsmålene. Vi udnytter også det strukturerede format i Wikidata og bruger logiske regler til at skabe spørgsmål, der er naturlige, men stadig kræver multi-hop ræsonnement. Gennem eksperimenter demonstrerer vi, at vores datasæt er udfordrende for multi-hop modeller, og det sikrer, at multi-hop ræsonnement er påkrævet.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na multihopski pitanje (QA) podataka je cilj testiranja vještina razuma i infekcije zahtijevajući modelu čitanja višestrukih paragrafa da odgovori na određeno pitanje. Međutim, trenutne sete podataka ne pružaju potpuno objašnjenje procesa razvoda od pitanja do odgovora. Dalje, prethodna ispitivanja pokazala su da mnogi primjeri u postojećim multihopskim podacima ne zahtijevaju multihopski razlog za odgovor na pitanje. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo novu multihopsku QA podatku po imenu 2WikiMultiHopQA, koja koristi strukturirane i neostrukturirane podatke. U našoj podaci predstavljamo informacije o dokazima koji sadrže razumni put za multihopske pitanja. Informacije o dokazima imaju dvije koristi: i) pružanje sveobuhvatnog objašnjenja predviđanja i ii) procjenjivanje razumnih vještina model a. Pažljivo dizajniramo cijevi i skup hramena kada stvaramo par odgovora na pitanje koji garantuje multihopske korake i kvalitetu pitanja. Također iskoristimo strukturirani format u Wikidata i koristimo logičke pravila kako bi stvorili prirodne pitanja, ali još uvijek zahtijevali multihopski razum. Kroz eksperimente, pokazujemo da je naš set podataka izazovan za multihopske modele i osigurava se da je potrebno multihopski razum.', 'de': 'Ein QA-Datensatz (Multi-Hop Question Responsing) zielt darauf ab, Argumentations- und Inferenzfähigkeiten zu testen, indem ein Modell mehrere Absätze lesen muss, um eine bestimmte Frage zu beantworten. Aktuelle Datensätze liefern jedoch keine vollständige Erklärung für den Argumentationsprozess von der Frage bis zur Antwort. Darüber hinaus haben frühere Studien gezeigt, dass viele Beispiele in bestehenden Multi-Hop-Datensätzen kein Multi-Hop-Argumentieren erfordern, um eine Frage zu beantworten. In dieser Studie präsentieren wir einen neuen Multi-Hop QA Datensatz namens 2WikiMultiHopQA, der strukturierte und unstrukturierte Daten verwendet. In unserem Datensatz stellen wir die Evidenzinformationen vor, die einen Argumentationspfad für Multi-Hop-Fragen enthalten. Die Evidenzinformationen haben zwei Vorteile: (i) Bereitstellung einer umfassenden Erklärung für Vorhersagen und (ii) Bewertung der Argumentationsfähigkeiten eines Modells. Wir entwerfen sorgfältig eine Pipeline und eine Reihe von Vorlagen, wenn wir ein Frage-Antwort-Paar generieren, das die Multi-Hop-Schritte und die Qualität der Fragen garantiert. Wir nutzen auch das strukturierte Format in Wikidata und verwenden logische Regeln, um Fragen zu erstellen, die natürlich sind, aber dennoch Multi-Hop-Argumentation erfordern. Durch Experimente zeigen wir, dass unser Datensatz eine Herausforderung für Multi-Hop-Modelle darstellt und stellt sicher, dass Multi-Hop-Argumentation erforderlich ist.', 'id': 'Satu set data multi-hop menjawab pertanyaan (QA) bertujuan untuk menguji alasan dan keterampilan kesimpulan dengan memerlukan model untuk membaca beberapa paragraf untuk menjawab pertanyaan tertentu. Namun, set data saat ini tidak memberikan penjelasan lengkap untuk proses alasan dari pertanyaan ke jawaban. Lagipula, penelitian sebelumnya menunjukkan bahwa banyak contoh dalam set data multi-hop yang ada tidak memerlukan alasan multi-hop untuk menjawab pertanyaan. Dalam studi ini, kami mempersembahkan set data QA multi-hop baru, bernama 2WikiMultiHopQA, yang menggunakan data struktur dan tidak struktur. Dalam dataset kami, kami memperkenalkan informasi bukti yang mengandung jalan alasan untuk pertanyaan multi-hop. Informasi bukti memiliki dua keuntungan: (i) menyediakan penjelasan komprensif untuk prediksi dan (ii) mengevaluasi kemampuan reasoning sebuah model. Kami dengan hati-hati merancang saluran pipa dan set templat ketika menghasilkan pasangan pertanyaan-jawaban yang menjamin langkah-langkah multi-hop dan kualitas pertanyaan. Kami juga mengeksploitasi format struktur di Wikidata dan menggunakan aturan logis untuk menciptakan pertanyaan yang alami tapi masih membutuhkan alasan multi-hop. Melalui eksperimen, kami menunjukkan bahwa dataset kami menantang untuk model multi-hop dan memastikan bahwa multi-hop reasoning diperlukan.', 'ko': '다중 점프 퀴즈(QA) 데이터 세트는 모델이 여러 단락을 읽도록 요구함으로써 주어진 문제에 대답함으로써 추리와 추리력을 시험하기 위한 것이다.그러나 현재의 데이터 집합은 문제에서 답안까지의 추리 과정을 완전하게 해석할 수 없다.그 밖에 이전의 연구에 의하면 기존의 다중 점프 데이터가 집중된 많은 예들은 다중 점프 추리로 문제를 대답할 필요가 없다고 한다.이 연구에서 우리는 새로운 다중 점프 QA 데이터 집합을 제시했는데 2WikiMultiHopQA라고 하는데 구조화와 비구조화된 데이터를 사용한다.우리의 데이터 집중에서 우리는 다중 점프 문제의 추리 경로를 포함하는 증거 정보를 도입했다.증거 정보는 두 가지 장점이 있다. (i)는 예측에 전면적인 해석을 제공하고 (ii) 평가 모델의 추리 능력을 제공한다.문제-답이 맞을 때 우리는 하나의 파이프와 하나의 템플릿을 꼼꼼히 설계하여 다중 단계와 문제의 질을 확보했다.또한 Wikidata의 구조화된 형식을 이용하여 논리적 규칙을 사용하여 자연스럽지만 추리를 많이 해야 하는 문제를 만들었습니다.우리는 실험을 통해 다중 점프 모형이 도전적이라는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Swali la maswali ya watu wengi (QA) linakusudia kujaribu ujuzi wa kufikiri na kutokuwepo kwa kutaka mfano wa kusoma vipengele kadhaa ili kujibu swali lililopewa. Hata hivyo, seti za taarifa za sasa hazina maelezo kamili kwa mchakato wa sababu kutoka kwenye swali hadi jibu. Zaidi ya hayo, tafiti zilizopita zilionyesha kuwa mifano mingi katika seti za takwimu za watu wengi zinazopo kwenye mtandao wa intaneti hauhitaji sababu za kujibu swali. Katika utafiti huu, tunaweka seti mpya ya takwimu za QA, inayoitwa 2WikiMultiHopQA, ambazo hutumia taarifa zilizoundwa na zilizojengwa. Katika seti ya taarifa zetu, tunaonyesha taarifa zinazohusu njia yenye maana ya maswali mengi ya watu wengi. Taarifa hizo zina faida mbili: (i) kutoa maelezo ya kina kwa utabiri na (ii) kutathmini ujuzi wa maana wa mifano. Tunaweza kutengeneza pipeline kwa makini na seti ya misitu pale tunaposengeneza wawili wa kujibu swali ambalo linahakikisha hatua za watu wengi na kiwango cha maswali. We also exploit the structured format in Wikidata and use logical rules to create questions that are natural but still require multi-hop reasoning.  Kwa kupitia majaribio, tunaonyesha kuwa seti yetu ya takwimu inachangamoto kwa mifano mingi ya jumbe na inahakikisha kuwa sababu za watu wengi zinahitajika.', 'af': "'n Multi-Hop vraag antwoord (QA) datastel doel doen om redensie en inferensies te toets deur 'n model te nodig om veelvuldige paragraaf te lees om 'n gegewe vraag te antwoord. Maar, huidige datastelle verskaf nie 'n volledige uitduidelik vir die redering proses van die vraag tot die antwoord nie. Verder het vorige studie geopenbaar dat baie voorbeelde in bestaande multi-hop datastelle nie multi-hop redening nodig om 'n vraag te antwoord nie. In hierdie studie vertoon ons 'n nuwe multi-hop QA dataset, genoem 2WikiMultiHopQA, wat gebruik struktureerde en onstruktureerde data. In ons datastel, introduseer ons die bevestigingsinformasie wat bevat 'n redekende pad vir multihopvrae. Die bevestigingsinformasie het twee voordeel: i) â\x80\x99n kompleksitele uitduideling vir voorskoue verskaf en ii) die redekeningskunstenaars van â\x80\x99n model evalueer. Ons ontwerp 'n pyplyn en 'n stel van sjabloane wanneer 'n vraag-antwoord paar genereer wat garantieer die multihopstappe en die kwaliteit van die vraag. Ons gebruik ook die struktureerde formaat in Wikidata en gebruik logiese reëls om vrae te skep wat natuurlik is, maar nog nog nodig multi-hop redensie. Deur eksperimente, wys ons dat ons datastel is aanvaardig vir multihopmodelle en dit verseker dat multihops redening nodig is.", 'fa': 'یک مجموعه اطلاعات چندین هوپ (QA) هدف است که با نیاز به یک مدل برای خواندن چندین نقطه برای پاسخ دادن به یک سؤال داده شود، مهارت منطقی و آلودگی را امتحان کند. ولی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای فعلی برای فرایند منطقی از سوال تا پاسخ کامل توضیح نمی\u200cدهد. Furthermore, studies prior revealed that many examples in existing multi-hop datasets do not require multi-hop reasoning to answer a question. در این مطالعه، ما یک مجموعه داده های چند هوپ QA جدید را پیشنهاد می کنیم، به نام 2WikiMultiHopQA، که از داده های ساخته و ساخته نشده استفاده می کند. در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما، اطلاعات مدارک را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که شامل یک مسیر منطقی برای سوالات چند هپ است. اطلاعات مدرک دو سودی دارد: i) توضیح کامل برای پیش بینی و ii) ارزیابی مهارت منطقی یک مدل را ارزیابی می کند. ما با دقت یک خط لوله و یک مجموعه از معبدها را طراحی می کنیم وقتی یک جفت جواب سوال و جواب را ایجاد می کنیم که قدم های چند هپ و کیفیت سوال را تضمین می دهد. ما همچنین شکل ساخته شده را در ویکیدادا استفاده می\u200cکنیم و از قانون منطقی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا سوالات طبیعی باشند ولی هنوز به دلیل\u200cهای چندین هوپ نیاز دارند. از طریق آزمایشات، ما نشان می دهیم که مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما برای مدل\u200cهای متعدد هوپ سخت\u200cگیری است و این مطمئن می\u200cشود که دلیل\u200cهای متعدد هوپ لازم است.', 'tr': "Birnäçe-hop soragy jogaplamaga (QA) maglumat setigi berilen soraga jogap bermek üçin bir nusga görkezme we çykarmak ukyplaryny barlamaga maksady berilýär. Ýöne häzirki veri setirleri soragdan jogapa komplette düşündirişi berenok Daha soňra öňki öňki araştyrmalar birnäçe örnekler bolan bir multi-Hop sanatynda birnäçe eserler soragy jogaplamak üçin gerek däldir. Bu okuwda, 2WikiMultiHopQA adlanan täze bir köp-hop QA veri setirini görkezip bileris. Berüvlerimizde, köp-hop soraglary üçin düşünýän ýola maglumatlary taýýarlapdyr. Şol maslahatlar maglumatynyň iki faydasy bar: (i) bir nusganyň razylyk ukyplaryny çykaryp barlag we (ii) bir nusganyň düzümlenmesini üýtgedýär. Biz sorag-jogabat çiftini oluşturyp durmuşda pipeline we örän çapda örän düzenleyip, multi-Hop adımlaryny we soraglaryň kalitesini garantýarys. Biz hem Wikidata'da strukturlyk formatyny ulanýarys we logiki kurallary tebigat bolan soraglary bejermek üçin ullanýarys ýöne birnäçe Hop sebäbi gerek. Deneyler bilen, veri sahypamyzyň köp-hop modelleri üçin kynçylyk diýip görünýärdik we ol köp-hop sebäpden gerek bolmagyny ynandyrýar.", 'sq': 'Një sërë të dhënash që përgjigjet pyetjeve të shumta (QA) synon të testojë arsyetimin dhe aftësitë e përfundimit duke kërkuar që një model të lexojë paragrafe të shumta për të përgjigjur një pyetje të caktuar. Megjithatë, të dhënat aktuale nuk ofrojnë një shpjegim të plotë për procesin e arsyetimit nga pyetja në përgjigje. Për më tepër, studimet e mëparshme zbuluan se shumë shembuj në grupet e të dhënave ekzistuese me shumëhop a nuk kërkojnë arsyetim shumëhop ësh për të përgjigjur një pyetje. Në këtë studim, ne paraqesim një grup të ri të të dhënash QA të shumëhopit, të quajtur 2WikiMultiHopQA, i cili përdor të dhëna të strukturuara dhe të papërstrukturuara. Në grupin tonë të dhënash, ne paraqesim informacionin e provave që përmban një rrugë arsyetimi për pyetje shumë-hop. Informacioni i provave ka dy përfitime: (i) furnizimi i një shpjegimi të përgjithshëm për parashikimet dhe (ii) vlerësimi i aftësive arsyetimi të një modeli. Ne me kujdes dizajnojmë një tubacion dhe një sërë modelesh kur krijojmë një çift pyetje-përgjigje që garanton hapat e shumëkërcimeve dhe cilësinë e pyetjeve. Ne gjithashtu shfrytëzojmë format in e strukturuar në Wikidata dhe përdorim rregulla logjike për të krijuar pyetje që janë natyrore por ende kërkojnë arsyetim shumëhop ësh. Nëpërmjet eksperimenteve, ne demonstrojmë se grupi ynë i të dhënave është sfidues për modele shumëhop ësh dhe siguron që arsyetimi shumëhopësh është i nevojshëm.', 'am': 'የብዙ-ጃፍ ጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ዳርዕት ማሰናከል አእምሮ እና ማነስ እውቀትን ለመፈተኛ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የአሁኑ ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ከጠያቂው ፕሮጀክት ወደ መልስ ፍጹም የሚጠይቁትን ትርጉም አያደርጉም፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ፣ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ብዙ ምሳሌዎች በአሁኑ ብዙዎች ዳታዎችን በመቀበል የመጠየቅ ጥያቄን ለመመልስ አያስፈልጋቸውም፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ 2WikiMultiHopQA የሚባልን አዲስ የQA ዳታ ማተሚያ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በአዳራዊ ሰርቨሮች ውስጥ የመረጃ ማስረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአስረጅ መረጃ ሁለት ጥቅሞች አላቸው:(i) ለትንቢት እና (ii) የሞዴል ልግስና አስተዋልቷን የሚያስተምር ትልቅ ማብራራት ነው፡፡ የጥያቄ መልስ ሁለት ሁለትን እና የጥያቄውን ጥያቄ እና የጥያቄውን ጥያቄ እና የጥያቄውን ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በWikidata የተመሠረተውን ፎርማት እና የሎጂካዊ ሥርዓቶችን እናጠይቃለን፣ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር ነገር ግን ደግሞ ብዙዎችን ጉዳይ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በተፈተና፣ የዳውሬታችን ሰርዓት ለብዙዎች አካባቢ ሞዴላዎችን እንደሚከራከር እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բազմահատված հարցերին պատասխանող (QA) տվյալների համակարգը նպատակն է ստուգել մտածողության և եզրակացության հմտությունները՝ պահանջելով մոդելի կարդալ բազմահատված պարբերակներ, որպեսզի պատասխանի տվյալ հարցին: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս տվյալների համակարգերը լիովին բացատրություն չեն տալիս հարցի և պատասխանի բանավեճի համար: Ավելին, նախորդ ուսումնասիրությունները բացահայտեցին, որ գոյություն ունեցող բազմահատված տվյալների համակարգերում շատ օրինակներ չեն պահանջում բազմահատված մտածողություններ հարցի պատասխանելու համար: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր բազմահուսային QA տվյալների համակարգ, որը կոչվում է 2WiKimultiհուպQA, որը օգտագործում է կառուցվածված և անկառուցվածքային տվյալներ: Մեր տվյալների համակարգում մենք ներկայացնում ենք ապացույցների տեղեկատվությունը, որը պարունակում է բազմաթիվ հուսանքների հարցերի բանավեճ ճանապարհ: Ավկայությունների ինֆորմացիան ունի երկու առավելություն. i) պարունակում է ամբողջական բացատրություն կանխատեսումների համար և i) գնահատում մոդելի մտածողական հմտությունները: Մենք ուշադիր նախագծում ենք խողովակաշար և մի շարք մոդելներ, երբ ստեղծում ենք հարցերի և պատասխանների զույգ, որը երաշխավորում է բազմաթիվ քայլերը և հարցերի որակը: Մենք նաև օգտագործում ենք Վիքիդատայի կառուցվածքավորված ձևը և օգտագործում ենք տրամաբանական կանոններ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք բնական հարցեր, որոնք դեռևս պահանջում են բազմահուսական մտածողություն: Through experiments, we demonstrate that our dataset is challenging for multi-hop models and it ensures that multi-hop reasoning is required.', 'az': "Bir çoxlu-Hop sual cavab vermək (QA) verilən qutusu, bir suala cavab vermək üçün çoxlu paragraflar oxumaq üçün modeli tələb etmək üçün razılıq və a şağılıq yeteneklərini sınamaq məqsədilə məqsədildir. Lakin, şu anda verilən qurğular suallardan cavab vermək üçün tamamilə a çıq-aydınlıq verməz. Daha sonra, əvvəlki öyrənmələr belə göstərdilər ki, mevcut çoxlu-Hop verilənlərin çoxlu nümunələri bir suala cavab vermək üçün çoxlu-Hop razılığı istəmirlər. Bu təhsil içində, 2WikiMultiHopQA adlı yeni bir çox-hop QA verilən quruluşu göstəririk. Bu quruluş və struktursuz verilən verilənləri istifadə edir. Bizim verilənlərimizdə, çoxlu-Hop sualları üçün dəlilik məlumatlarını daxil edirik. Şübhəsiz ki, dəlillər məlumatının iki faydası var: i) tədbirlərin müfəssəl a çıqlaması və ii) modelinin razılıq yetkinliklərini değerləşdirmək üçün müfəssəl açıqlaması. Biz çoxlu-Hop adımlarını və sualların keyfiyyətini təsdiqləyən bir sual-cavab çift yaratdığı zaman bir pipeline və bir quruluş düzəldirik. Biz həmçin in Wikidata'da strukturlı formanı istifadə edirik və təbiətli suallar yaratmaq üçün logik kuralları istifadə edirik, amma hala çox-Hop dəyişiklik istəyirik. Biz təcrübələrlə verilən quruluğumuz çoxlu-Hop modellərə çətin olduğunu göstərdik və bu çoxlu-Hop təcrübələrinin ehtiyacı olmasını əmin edir.", 'bn': 'একটি মাল্টিহোপ প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউ এ) ডাটাসেটের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে যে কারণ এবং অসংক্রান্ত দক্ষতা পরীক্ষা করার জন্য একটি মডেল পাঠ করার প্রয়োজনীয় একট তবে বর্তমান ডাটাসেট প্রশ্নের কারণের প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য সম্পূর্ণ ব্যাখ্যা প্রদান করে না। এছাড়াও, পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা প্রকাশ করেছে যে বিদ্যমান বহুহাপ ডাটাসেটের অনেক উদাহরণের প্রয়োজন নেই একটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি নতুন মাল্টিহোপ কিউএ ডাটাসেট উপস্থাপন করছি, যার নাম ২উইকিমাল্টিহোপিকিউ, যা কাঠামো এবং নির্মাণ করা তথ্য ব্ আমাদের ডাটাসেটে আমরা প্রমাণের তথ্য উপস্থাপন করে দিচ্ছি যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বহুহাপ প্রশ্নের জন্য একটি যুক্তিমান পথ প্রমাণের তথ্য দুটি সুবিধা আছে: (i) ভবিষ্যতের জন্য একটি সম্পূর্ণ ব্যাখ্যা দিয়েছে এবং (ii) একটি মডেলের যুক্তিগত দক্ষতা মূল্য আমরা সাবধানে একটি পাইপেলাইন এবং একটি কিছু মন্দিরগুলো ডিজাইন করি যখন প্রশ্নের উত্তর জোড়া তৈরি করা হয়, যা মাল্টিহোপ পদক্ষেপ এবং প্রশ্নের মান নি আমরা উইকিদাতার কাঠামো বিন্যাস ব্যবহার করি এবং প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্ন তৈরি করার জন্য লজিক নিয়ম ব্যবহার করি কিন্তু এখনও বহুল-হ পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে আমাদের ডাটাসেট বহুহোপ মডেলের জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে এবং এটি নিশ্চিত করে যে বহুহোপের কারণ দরকার।', 'ca': "Un conjunt de dades que respon a preguntes múltiples mira a provar habilitats de raonament i inferència exigint que un model llegi múltiples paràgrafs per respondre a una pregunta dada. Però els conjunts de dades actuals no proporcionen una explicació completa del procés de raonament des de la pregunta a la resposta. També, estudis anteriors van revelar que molts exemples de conjunts de dades multi hop existents no requereixen raonament multihop per respondre a una pregunta. En aquest estudi, presentem un nou conjunt de dades QA multi-hop, anomenat 2WikiMultiHopQA, que utilitza dades estructuradas i no estructuradas. In our dataset, we introduce the evidence information containing a reasoning path for multi-hop questions.  La informació d'evidència té dos beneficis: i) proporcionar una explicació completa de les prediccions i ii) evaluar les habilitats de raonament d'un model. Disenyem cuidadosament un tub i un conjunt de models quan generem un parell de preguntes-respostes que garanteix les etapes de múltiples salts i la qualitat de les preguntes. També explotam el format estructurat de Wikidata i utilitzem regles lògiques per crear preguntes naturals però encara necessiten raonament multi hop. A través d'experiments, demostrem que el nostre conjunt de dades és un repte per a models multi-hop i assegura que es requereix raonament multi-hop.", 'cs': 'Datová sada odpovědí na více hopových otázek (QA) má za cíl testovat dovednosti uvažování a inference tím, že vyžaduje, aby model četl více odstavců, aby odpověděl na danou otázku. Současné datové sady však neposkytují úplné vysvětlení procesu uvažování od otázky až po odpověď. Dále předchozí studie ukázaly, že mnoho příkladů ve stávajících multi-hop datových sadách nevyžaduje multi-hop uvažování k odpovědi na otázku. V této studii představujeme novou multi-hop QA datovou sadu nazvanou 2WikiMultiHopQA, která využívá strukturovaná a nestrukturovaná data. V našem datovém souboru představujeme informace o důkazech obsahující cestu uvažování pro multi-hop otázky. Informace o důkazech mají dvě výhody: (i) poskytnutí komplexního vysvětlení předpovědí a (ii) hodnocení uvažovacích schopností modelu. Pečlivě navrhujeme potrubí a sadu šablon při generování dvojice otázek-odpověď, která zaručuje více-hop kroků a kvalitu otázek. Také využíváme strukturovaný formát Wikidat a používáme logická pravidla k vytváření otázek, které jsou přirozené, ale stále vyžadují multi-hop uvažování. Prostřednictvím experimentů demonstrujeme, že náš datový soubor je pro multi-hop modely náročný a zajišťuje, že multi-hop uvažování je vyžadováno.', 'bs': 'Višehopski odgovor na pitanje (QA) podataka je cilj testiranja vještina razuma i infekcije zahtijevajući model da čita višestruke paragrafe da odgovori na određeno pitanje. Međutim, trenutne sete podataka ne pružaju potpuno objašnjenje procesa razvoda od pitanja do odgovora. Nadalje, prethodna ispitivanja pokazala je da mnogi primjeri u postojećim multihopskim podacima ne zahtijevaju multihopski razlog za odgovor na pitanje. U ovoj studiji predstavljamo novu multihopsku QA podatku, zvanu 2WikiMultiHopQA, koja koristi strukturirane i neostrukturirane podatke. U našem setu podataka predstavljamo informacije o dokazima koji sadrže razumni put za multihopske pitanja. Informacije o dokazima imaju dvije koristi: i) pružanje sveobuhvatljivog objašnjenja predviđanja i ii) procjenjivanje razumnih vještina model a. Pažljivo dizajniramo cijev i skup hramena kada stvaramo par odgovora na pitanje koji garantuje multihopske korake i kvalitetu pitanja. Također koristimo strukturirani format u Wikidata i koristimo logičke pravila da bi stvorili pitanja koje su prirodne ali još uvijek zahtijevali multihopski razum. Kroz eksperimente, mi pokazujemo da je naš set podataka izazovan za multihopske modele i osigurava se da je potrebno multihopski razum.', 'et': 'Mitme hüppega küsimustele vastamise andmekogumi eesmärk on testida mõtlemise ja järelduste oskusi, nõudes mudelilt teatud küsimusele vastamiseks mitme lõigu lugemist. Praegused andmekogumid ei anna siiski täielikku selgitust põhjendusprotsessi kohta alates küsimusest kuni vastuseni. Lisaks selgus varasematest uuringutest, et paljud olemasolevate mitme hüppega andmekogumite näited ei nõua küsimusele vastamiseks mitme hüppega põhjendust. Käesolevas uuringus tutvustame uut multi-hop QA andmekogumit nimega 2WikiMultiHopQA, mis kasutab struktureeritud ja struktureerimata andmeid. Meie andmekogumis tutvustame tõendusmaterjali, mis sisaldab põhjendusteed multi-hop küsimustele. Tõendusmaterjalil on kaks eelist: i) prognooside põhjaliku selgituse andmine ja ii) mudeli mõtlemisoskuste hindamine. Küsimuste ja vastuste paari loomisel kujundame hoolikalt torujuhtme ja mallide komplekti, mis tagab multihüppesammude ja küsimuste kvaliteedi. Samuti kasutame Wikidata struktureeritud vormingut ja kasutame loogilisi reegleid, et luua küsimusi, mis on loomulikud, kuid nõuavad siiski multi-hop arutlust. Eksperimentide kaudu näitame, et meie andmekogum on multihüppemudelite jaoks keeruline ja tagab multihüppe mõtlemise vajaduse.', 'fi': 'Multi-hop kysymys vastaus (QA) -aineisto pyrkii testaamaan päättely- ja päättelytaitoja vaatimalla mallia lukemaan useita kappaleita tiettyyn kysymykseen vastaamiseksi. Nykyiset aineistot eivät kuitenkaan anna täydellistä selitystä perusteluprosessille kysymyksestä vastaukseen. Lisäksi aikaisemmat tutkimukset osoittivat, että monet olemassa olevista monihop-aineistoista eivät edellytä monihop-päättelyä vastatakseen kysymykseen. Tässä tutkimuksessa esitellään uusi monihypyn laadunvarmistustiedosto, nimeltään 2WikiMultiHopQA, joka käyttää strukturoitua ja strukturoimatonta dataa. Aineistossa esittelemme näyttöaineiston, joka sisältää monihyppykysymysten perustelupolun. Todistetiedolla on kaksi etua: (i) kattavan selityksen antaminen ennusteille ja (ii) mallin päättelytaitojen arviointi. Suunnittelemme huolellisesti putkiston ja mallijoukon, kun luomme kysymys-vastausparin, joka takaa monihypyn vaiheet ja kysymysten laadun. Hyödynnämme myös Wikidatan jäsenneltyä muotoa ja käytämme loogisia sääntöjä luodaksemme kysymyksiä, jotka ovat luonnollisia, mutta vaativat silti multi-hop-päättelyä. Kokeiden avulla osoitamme, että tietokokonaisuus on haastava multi-hop-malleille ja varmistaa, että multi-hop-päättelyä tarvitaan.', 'ha': "Suna tambayi masu multi-juma (QA) tsarin da aka ƙayyade wajen jarraba masu inganci da masu kasa-nau'i, da kuma ya ƙayyade wata motel dõmin a karɓi fassaran-biyu ga ya jibi wani tambayi wanda aka bai wa. Amma, tsarin danne da ake kai yanzu ba ya gaura rabo cikakken wa jarida ɗin da aka saka zuwa jibar. Furan, fitinõni na farko suka bayyana cewa misãlai mãsu yawa cikin tsari masu jira na multi-jump ba su buƙata wani saba'in da za'a karɓa wa tambayi. Daga wannan lõkaci, muna halatar da wani danne na multi-jum QA, sunan 2WikimulHopQA, wanda ke amfani da tsarin da aka saje da shi. Daga danganmu, Munã ƙara bayan bayani wanda ke da wata hanya mai inganci wa masu tambayar multi-jum. Agaji ɗin ayõyinsu yana da amfani biyu: (i) wanda ke bãyar da fassarar lãbãri gabã ɗaya da (ii) ya ƙaddara fassarar zance na misãlai. We carefully design a pipeline and a set of templates when generating a question-answer pair that guarantees the multi-hop steps and the quality of the questions.  Yana amfani da tsarin da aka samar da shi a Wikidata kuma munã yi amfani da sharciyar lojiyya dõmin ya halitta masu tambayar da ke cikin asa, kuma amma yana da buƙata kashfa masu yawa. Ko bayan jarrabai, za mu nuna cewa tsarin danganyinmu yana tsõratar wa misãlai masu motsi masu yawa kuma yana tabbatar da cewa an buƙata saba'in multi-jum.", 'sk': 'Zbirka podatkov za odgovor na vprašanja z več koraki (QA) je namenjena preizkušanju spretnosti razmišljanja in sklepanja, tako da od modela zahteva branje več odstavkov za odgovor na dano vprašanje. Vendar sedanji nabori podatkov ne zagotavljajo popolne razlage za postopek obrazložitve od vprašanja do odgovora. Poleg tega so prejšnje študije pokazale, da mnogi primeri v obstoječih zbirkah podatkov z več postopki ne zahtevajo razlogov z več postopki za odgovor na vprašanje. V tej študiji predstavljamo nov multi-hop podatkovni nabor QA, imenovan 2WikiMultiHopQA, ki uporablja strukturirane in nestrukturirane podatke. V našem naboru podatkov predstavljamo dokazne informacije, ki vsebujejo utemeljitveno pot za vprašanja multi-hop. Informacije o dokazih imajo dve koristi: (i) zagotavljanje celovite razlage za napovedi in (ii) ocenjevanje sposobnosti razmišljanja modela. Pri ustvarjanju par vprašanj-odgovorov skrbno oblikujemo cevovod in niz predlog, ki zagotavlja korake multi-hop in kakovost vprašanj. Prav tako izkoriščamo strukturirano obliko v Wikipodatkih in uporabljamo logična pravila za ustvarjanje vprašanj, ki so naravna, vendar še vedno zahtevajo multi-hop razmišljanje. Z eksperimenti dokazujemo, da je naš nabor podatkov izziv za modele multi-hop in zagotavlja, da je potrebno razmišljanje multi-hop.', 'jv': 'Multi Nanging, dataset saiki ora ono akeh perusahaan kanggo sabanjuré nggawe perusahaan logi nang panggayong ingkang respon. Laptop" and "Desktop Nang ujaran iki, awake nambah data sing nyebute multi-hol Nang dataset-awak dhéwé, kita nggawe informasi awak dhéwé kudu nyeanyar tentang karo perusahaan kanggo seketehan multi-top Sugeng informasi sing dibutungane gambar duruh: i) nggawe akeh luwih panelusuran kanggo dianggawe lan (i i) nggawe kapan kuwi tindakan sing apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan karo sistem sing dumateng lan nganggo sampeyan winih sing nganggo perusahaan langgar-mbukan sing alih bantuan karo perusahaan multi-top lan kealité sing bisa gejane Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem structural maneh nang waki data lan gambar sistem logik kanggo nggawe kesempatan sing pribadi, sane bisa diandelak multi-top maneh. Ato ngono sing paling-perbudhakan, kita ngomongke tindakan data set kuwi nggawe barang nggawe multi-hol model lan ujian kuwi multi-hol sing bisa nyelangan', 'he': 'A multi-hop question answering (QA) dataset aims to test reasoning and inference skills by requiring a model to read multiple paragraphs to answer a given question.  עם זאת, קבוצות נתונים הנוכחיות לא מספקות הסבר מושלם לתהליך ההיגיון מהשאלה לתשובה. חוץ מזה, מחקרים קודמים חשפו כי דוגמאות רבות במערכות נתונים multi-hop קיימות לא דורשות סיבה multi-hop כדי לענות על שאלה. במחקר הזה, אנחנו מציגים קבוצת מידע QA חדשה, שנקראת 2WikiMultiHopQA, אשר משתמשת במידע מבושל ולא מבושל. במערכת הנתונים שלנו, אנחנו מציגים את מידע הראיות שמכיל דרך הגיוני לשאלות רבות-הופ. למידע הראיות יש שתי יתרונות: (i) לספק הסבר מורכב לחזויות ולעריך את כישורי ההיגיון של מודל. אנו מעצבים בזהירות צינור וקבוצה של דוגמנים כשיוצרים זוג תשובות-שאלות שמבטיחים את צעדים המולט-הופ ואיכות השאלות. אנחנו גם מנצלים את הצורט המבנה בוויקידאטה ולהשתמש בחוקים הגיוניים ליצור שאלות טבעיות באמצעות ניסויים, אנו מראים שמערכת הנתונים שלנו מאתגרת לדוגמאות multi-hop והיא מאבטחת שההגיון multi-hop נדרש.', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་འདྲི་ཚིག་གནད་སྤྲོ་བ(QA)ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་རྟོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་མི་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་རྩལ ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ཀྱིས་རྟོགས་བཤེར་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལས་དྲི་ཞིག་གི་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྤྲོད་མི་ཐུབ། འདི་ལས་ཀྱང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུ་ཚོའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཡིག་སྣོད་ནང་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྣ་མང་ཆོག་གི་QA གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། འདིས་2WikiMultiHopQA(Builded ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ། སྔོན་ཚོད་དང་(i i) མིག་གཟུགས་པའི་རྟོགས་བཤད་གཅིག་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་གཉིས་ཡོད། We carefully design a pipeline and a set of templates when generating a question-answer pair that guarantees the multi-hop steps and the quality of the questions. ང་ཚོས་Wikidata་ནང་བྲིས་གཞི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་བྱས་པ་ལས་ལུགས་སྟངས་གཏོང་དགོས་མིན་འདུག ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྐོར་ལས། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Exploring the Language of Data', 'ar': 'استكشاف لغة البيانات', 'fr': 'Exploration du langage des données', 'pt': 'Explorando a linguagem dos dados', 'es': 'Exploración del lenguaje de los datos', 'ja': 'データの言語の探求', 'zh': '探数语', 'hi': 'डेटा की भाषा की खोज', 'ru': 'Изучение языка данных', 'ga': 'Ag Iniúchadh Teanga na Sonraí', 'ka': 'მონაცემების ენათის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Az adatok nyelvének feltárása', 'el': 'Εξερεύνηση της γλώσσας των δεδομένων', 'it': 'Esplorare il linguaggio dei dati', 'kk': 'Деректер тілін зерттеу', 'mk': 'Истражување на јазикот на податоците', 'lt': 'Duomenų kalbos tyrimas', 'ms': 'Menjelaskan Bahasa Data', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാ ഭാഷ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-esplorazzjoni tal-Lingwa tad-Dejta', 'mn': 'Өгөгдлийн хэл шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Utforskar språket for data', 'pl': 'Badanie języka danych', 'si': 'දත්තේ භාෂය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න', 'ro': 'Explorarea limbii datelor', 'sr': 'Ispitivanje jezika podataka', 'sv': 'Undersökning av dataspråket', 'ur': 'ڈاٹا کی زبان پھیر رہی ہے', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha luqada macluumaadka', 'ta': 'தரவு மொழியை ஏற்றுகிறது', 'uz': 'Maò¥lumotlar tilini eksport qilish', 'vi': 'Thăm dò ngôn ngữ của dữ liệu', 'bg': 'Изследване на езика на данните', 'nl': 'De taal van gegevens verkennen', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af datasproget', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje jezika podataka', 'de': 'Die Sprache der Daten erforschen', 'id': 'Exploring the Language of Data', 'fa': 'توسعه زبان داده', 'ko': '탐색 데이터 언어', 'sw': 'Kuchunguza lugha ya Data', 'tr': 'Maglumatyň dilini barlaýa', 'af': 'Verskyn die Taal van Data', 'sq': 'Shqyrtimi i gjuhës së të dhënave', 'am': 'Exploring the Language of Data', 'hy': 'Տվյալների լեզու ուսումնասիրելը', 'bn': 'তথ্যের ভাষা অনুসন্ধান করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'Veril…ôrin dilini keŇüif edir', 'cs': 'Průzkum jazyka dat', 'ca': 'Explorar el llenguatge de les dades', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje jezika podataka', 'et': 'Andmekeele uurimine', 'fi': 'Tietojen kielen tutkiminen', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje jezika podatkov', 'he': 'חקירת שפת הנתונים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'We set out to uncover the unique grammatical properties of an important yet so far under-researched type of natural language text : that of short labels typically found within structured datasets. We show that such labels obey a specific type of abbreviated grammar that we call the Language of Data, with properties significantly different from the kinds of text typically addressed in computational linguistics and NLP, such as ‘standard’ written language or social media messages. We analyse orthography, parts of speech, and syntax over a large, bilingual, hand-annotated corpus of data labels collected from a variety of domains. We perform experiments on tokenisation, part-of-speech tagging, and named entity recognition over real-world structured data, demonstrating that models adapted to the Language of Data outperform those trained on standard text. These observations point in a new direction to be explored as future research, in order to develop new NLP tools and models dedicated to the Language of Data.', 'ar': 'لقد شرعنا في الكشف عن الخصائص النحوية الفريدة لنوع مهم حتى الآن لم يتم بحثه جيدًا حتى الآن من نصوص اللغة الطبيعية: تلك الخاصة بالتسميات القصيرة التي توجد عادةً في مجموعات البيانات المهيكلة. نوضح أن مثل هذه التسميات تخضع لنوع معين من القواعد المختصرة التي نسميها لغة البيانات ، مع خصائص تختلف اختلافًا كبيرًا عن أنواع النص التي يتم تناولها عادةً في اللغويات الحاسوبية ومعالجة اللغات الطبيعية ، مثل اللغة المكتوبة "القياسية" أو رسائل الوسائط الاجتماعية. نحن نحلل قواعد الإملاء ، وأجزاء الكلام ، وبناء الجملة على مجموعة كبيرة ثنائية اللغة ومزودة بتعليقات توضيحية يدوية من تسميات البيانات التي تم جمعها من مجموعة متنوعة من المجالات. نجري تجارب على الترميز ، وعلامات جزء من الكلام ، والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة على البيانات المهيكلة في العالم الحقيقي ، مما يدل على أن النماذج التي تم تكييفها مع لغة البيانات تتفوق في الأداء على تلك التي تم تدريبها على النص القياسي. تشير هذه الملاحظات في اتجاه جديد سيتم استكشافه كبحث مستقبلي ، من أجل تطوير أدوات ونماذج معالجة لغوية جديدة مخصصة للغة البيانات.', 'pt': "Nós nos propusemos a descobrir as propriedades gramaticais únicas de um tipo de texto em linguagem natural importante, mas até agora pouco pesquisado: o de rótulos curtos normalmente encontrados em conjuntos de dados estruturados. Mostramos que tais rótulos obedecem a um tipo específico de gramática abreviada que chamamos de Linguagem de Dados, com propriedades significativamente diferentes dos tipos de texto tipicamente abordados em linguística computacional e PNL, como linguagem escrita 'padrão' ou mensagens de mídia social. Analisamos ortografia, partes do discurso e sintaxe em um corpus grande, bilíngue e anotado à mão de rótulos de dados coletados de uma variedade de domínios. Realizamos experimentos sobre tokenização, marcação de parte da fala e reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em dados estruturados do mundo real, demonstrando que os modelos adaptados à linguagem de dados superam aqueles treinados em texto padrão. Essas observações apontam para uma nova direção a ser explorada como pesquisa futura, a fim de desenvolver novas ferramentas e modelos de PNL dedicados à Linguagem de Dados.", 'es': 'Nos propusimos descubrir las propiedades gramaticales únicas de un tipo de texto de lenguaje natural importante pero hasta ahora poco investigado: el de las etiquetas cortas que normalmente se encuentran en conjuntos de datos estructurados. Mostramos que estas etiquetas obedecen a un tipo específico de gramática abreviada que llamamos el lenguaje de los datos, con propiedades significativamente diferentes de los tipos de texto que normalmente se abordan en la lingüística computacional y la PNL, como el lenguaje escrito «estándar» o los mensajes de las redes sociales. Analizamos la ortografía, las partes del habla y la sintaxis en un gran corpus bilingüe anotado a mano de etiquetas de datos recopiladas de una variedad de dominios. Llevamos a cabo experimentos sobre tokenización, etiquetado de partes del habla y reconocimiento de entidades nombradas sobre datos estructurados del mundo real, lo que demuestra que los modelos adaptados al lenguaje de los datos superan a aquellos capacitados en texto estándar. Estas observaciones apuntan a una nueva dirección que se explorará como investigación futura, con el fin de desarrollar nuevas herramientas y modelos de PNL dedicados al lenguaje de los datos.', 'fr': "Nous avons entrepris de découvrir les propriétés grammaticales uniques d'un type de texte en langage naturel important mais encore sous-étudié\xa0: les étiquettes courtes que l'on trouve généralement dans les ensembles de données structurés. Nous montrons que ces étiquettes obéissent à un type spécifique de grammaire abrégée que nous appelons le langage des données, avec des propriétés très différentes des types de texte généralement abordés en linguistique informatique et en PNL, tels que le langage écrit «\xa0standard\xa0» ou les messages sur les réseaux sociaux. Nous analysons l'orthographe, les parties du discours et la syntaxe sur un vaste corpus bilingue annoté à la main d'étiquettes de données collectées dans divers domaines. Nous réalisons des expériences sur la tokenisation, le balisage de parties du discours et la reconnaissance d'entités nommées sur des données structurées du monde réel, démontrant que les modèles adaptés au langage des données surpassent ceux formés sur du texte standard. Ces observations indiquent une nouvelle direction à explorer dans le cadre de recherches futures, afin de développer de nouveaux outils et modèles de PNL dédiés au langage des données.", 'ja': '私たちは、重要でありながら今のところ研究不足の自然言語テキストの種類の独自の文法的特性を明らかにすることに着手しました。それは、構造化されたデータセット内に典型的に見られる短いラベルの特性です。 このようなラベルは、データの言語と呼ばれる特定の種類の短縮文法に従うことを示しており、「標準的な」書かれた言語やソーシャルメディアメッセージなど、計算言語学やNLPで典型的に扱われるテキストの種類とは著しく異なる特性を持っています。 私たちは、さまざまなドメインから収集された大規模なバイリンガル、手書きのデータラベルのコーパス上で、正書法、音声の一部、および構文を分析します。 私たちは、トークン化、音声タグ付け、および現実世界の構造化データに対する名前付きエンティティ認識の実験を行い、データの言語に適応したモデルが標準テキストでトレーニングされたモデルよりも優れていることを実証します。 これらの観察は、データの言語に特化した新しいNLPツールとモデルを開発するために、将来の研究として探求されるべき新しい方向性を示している。', 'zh': '始揭一要迄今为止究不足自然语言文本独语法:常于结构化数集短标。 此等标循一特定之缩写语法,谓之数语,与计语言学与NLP中文本不同,如准书面语言社交媒体消息。 析诸域之大双语手动注数标语料库正字法、词性、语法。 吾于真实世界结构化数之标化、词性之标记、名实之实验,验其应数之言形也。 观其所以为未来者,明其所向,以发新NLP之数。', 'ru': 'Мы поставили перед собой цель раскрыть уникальные грамматические свойства важного, но еще недостаточно изученного типа текста на естественном языке: коротких меток, обычно встречающихся в структурированных наборах данных. Мы показываем, что такие метки подчиняются определенному типу сокращенной грамматики, которую мы называем языком данных, со свойствами, значительно отличающимися от типов текста, обычно рассматриваемых в вычислительной лингвистике и NLP, таких как «стандартный» письменный язык или сообщения в социальных сетях. Мы анализируем орфографию, части речи и синтаксис по большому, двуязычному, аннотированному вручную корпусу меток данных, собранных из различных областей. Мы проводим эксперименты по токенизации, частичной тегированию речи и распознаванию именованных сущностей по реальным структурированным данным, демонстрируя, что модели, адаптированные к языку данных, превосходят модели, обученные стандартному тексту. Эти наблюдения указывают на новое направление, которое будет изучено в качестве будущих исследований, с целью разработки новых инструментов и моделей NLP, посвященных языку данных.', 'hi': "हमने एक महत्वपूर्ण अभी तक शोध किए गए प्रकार के प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ के अद्वितीय व्याकरणिक गुणों को उजागर करने के लिए निर्धारित किया है: आमतौर पर संरचित डेटासेट के भीतर पाए जाने वाले छोटे लेबल। हम दिखाते हैं कि इस तरह के लेबल एक विशिष्ट प्रकार के संक्षिप्त व्याकरण का पालन करते हैं जिसे हम डेटा की भाषा कहते हैं, जिसमें आमतौर पर कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान और एनएलपी में संबोधित पाठ के प्रकारों से काफी अलग गुण होते हैं, जैसे कि 'मानक' लिखित भाषा या सोशल मीडिया संदेश। हम ऑर्थोग्राफी, भाषण के कुछ हिस्सों, और विभिन्न प्रकार के डोमेन से एकत्र किए गए डेटा लेबल के एक बड़े, द्विभाषी, हाथ-एनोटेटेड कॉर्पस पर वाक्यविन्यास का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम टोकनाइजेशन, पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग, और वास्तविक दुनिया के संरचित डेटा पर नामित इकाई मान्यता पर प्रयोग करते हैं, यह प्रदर्शित करते हुए कि डेटा की भाषा के अनुकूल मॉडल मानक पाठ पर प्रशिक्षित लोगों को पछाड़ते हैं। ये अवलोकन भविष्य के अनुसंधान के रूप में खोजे जाने के लिए एक नई दिशा में इंगित करते हैं, ताकि नए एनएलपी उपकरण और डेटा की भाषा को समर्पित मॉडल विकसित किए जा सकें।", 'ga': 'Rinneamar iarracht na hairíonna uathúla gramadaí a bhaineann le cineál téacs teanga nádúrtha nach bhfuil mórán taighde déanta air a nochtadh: lipéad gearr a fhaightear go hiondúil laistigh de thacair sonraí struchtúracha. Léirímid go gcloíonn lipéid den sórt sin le cineál sonrach gramadaí giorraithe ar a dtugaimid Teanga na Sonraí, a bhfuil airíonna atá an-difriúil ó na cineálacha téacs a dtugtar aghaidh orthu go hiondúil sa teangeolaíocht ríomhaireachtúil agus sa NLP, amhail teanga scríofa ‘caighdeánach’ nó teachtaireachtaí meán sóisialta. Déanaimid anailís ar ortagrafaíocht, ar chodanna cainte, agus ar chomhréir thar chorpas mór dátheangach, lámh-anótáilte de lipéid sonraí a bhailítear ó réimsí éagsúla. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar chomharthaíocht, ar chlibeáil pháirteach cainte, agus ar aithint aonáin ainmnithe ar shonraí struchtúrtha an fhíorshaola, ag taispeáint go sáraíonn na samhlacha atá curtha in oiriúint do Theanga na Sonraí iad siúd atá oilte ar théacs caighdeánach. Léiríonn na breathnuithe seo treo nua atá le hiniúchadh mar thaighde amach anseo, chun uirlisí agus samhlacha nua NLP a fhorbairt atá tiomnaithe do Theanga na Sonraí.', 'hu': 'Célunk volt feltárni egy fontos, mégis eddig alulkutatott természetes nyelvű szöveg egyedi nyelvtani tulajdonságait: a strukturált adathalmazokban jellemzően megtalálható rövid címkéket. Megmutatjuk, hogy az ilyen címkék egy bizonyos rövidített nyelvtani típusnak megfelelnek, amelyet adatnyelvnek nevezünk, jelentősen eltérnek a számítástechnikai nyelvészetben és az NLP-ben jellemzően foglalkozó szövegtípusoktól, mint például a "standard" írott nyelv vagy a közösségi média üzenetektől. Az ortográfia, a beszédrészek és a szintaxis elemzését a különböző tartományokból gyűjtött adatcímkék nagy, kétnyelvű, kézzel megjegyzett korpusza segítségével elemezzük. Kísérleteket végzünk tokenizálással, beszédrészes címkézéssel és nevezett entitások felismerésével kapcsolatban a valós világban strukturált adatokon, bizonyítva, hogy az adatok nyelvéhez igazított modellek felülmúlják a standard szövegeket. Ezek a megfigyelések egy új irányba mutatnak, amelyet jövőbeli kutatásként fel kell tárni annak érdekében, hogy új NLP eszközöket és modelleket fejlesszenek ki az adatnyelvre vonatkozóan.', 'el': 'Ξεκινήσαμε να αποκαλύψουμε τις μοναδικές γραμματικές ιδιότητες ενός σημαντικού αλλά μέχρι στιγμής υποερευνημένου τύπου κειμένου φυσικής γλώσσας: εκείνου των μικρών ετικετών που συνήθως βρίσκονται μέσα σε δομημένα σύνολα δεδομένων. Δείχνουμε ότι τέτοιες ετικέτες υπακούουν σε έναν συγκεκριμένο τύπο συντομευμένης γραμματικής που ονομάζουμε Γλώσσα δεδομένων, με ιδιότητες σημαντικά διαφορετικές από τα είδη κειμένου που συνήθως απευθύνονται στην υπολογιστική γλωσσολογία και το ΝΛΠ, όπως η "τυπική" γραπτή γλώσσα ή τα μηνύματα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Αναλύουμε ορθογραφία, τμήματα ομιλίας και σύνταξη σε ένα μεγάλο, δίγλωσσο, χειρόγραφο σώμα ετικετών δεδομένων που συλλέγονται από διάφορους τομείς. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα σχετικά με την επισήμανση, την επισήμανση μέρους ομιλίας και την αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων πάνω από δομημένα δεδομένα πραγματικού κόσμου, αποδεικνύοντας ότι τα μοντέλα προσαρμοσμένα στη γλώσσα δεδομένων ξεπερνούν αυτά που εκπαιδεύονται σε τυπικό κείμενο. Αυτές οι παρατηρήσεις δείχνουν μια νέα κατεύθυνση που πρέπει να διερευνηθεί ως μελλοντική έρευνα, προκειμένου να αναπτυχθούν νέα εργαλεία και μοντέλα αφιερωμένα στη Γλώσσα των Δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ დავიწყეთ, რომ გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი განსაკუთრებული გრამიკალური განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრება, მაგრამ ახლა განსაკუთრებული ნაირადი ენის ტექსტის ტიპი: რომელიც კიდევ კიდევ ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი ლაბეჭები განსაკუთრებული გრამიკის ტიპის გაგრძნობა, რომელიც ჩვენ მონაცემების ენაზე, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულად განსხვავებულია ტექსტის ტიპონტიკური ტიპონტიკური ენაფუქტური და N ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ორტოგრაფია, საუბრის ნაწილი და სინტაქსია დიდი, ორიენგური, ხელსახური ანალიზებული მონაცემების ლექტურების კოპუსი, რომელიც განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული დიომე ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ტოკენიზაციაში, სიტყვების ნაწილად, და სახელი ინტერტიკური სტრუქტურებული მონაცემებზე გამოცნობა, რომ მოდელები მონაცემების ენაზე აეპტირებულია სტანდარტულ ტექს ეს მონაცემებები ახალი მიზეზით, რომელიც მომავალდება განსხვავებული იყოს მომავალური განსხვავებაში, რომ ახალი NLP ხელსაწყოები და მოდელები განსაზღვრებული მონაცემებში.', 'it': "Abbiamo cercato di scoprire le proprietà grammaticali uniche di un tipo importante ma finora poco ricercato di testo in linguaggio naturale: quello delle etichette corte tipicamente presenti all'interno di dataset strutturati. Mostriamo che tali etichette obbediscono a uno specifico tipo di grammatica abbreviata che chiamiamo Lingua dei Dati, con proprietà significativamente diverse dai tipi di testo tipicamente affrontati nella linguistica computazionale e NLP, come il linguaggio scritto `standard' o i messaggi sui social media. Analizziamo ortografia, parti del discorso e sintassi su un ampio corpus bilingue di etichette di dati annotate a mano raccolte da una varietà di domini. Eseguiamo esperimenti su tokenizzazione, tag part-of-speech e riconoscimento di entità denominate su dati strutturati del mondo reale, dimostrando che i modelli adattati al linguaggio dei dati superano quelli formati sul testo standard. Queste osservazioni indicano una nuova direzione da esplorare come ricerca futura, al fine di sviluppare nuovi strumenti e modelli di PNL dedicati al linguaggio dei dati.", 'lt': 'Mes ketiname atskleisti unikalias gramatines savybes, susijusias su svarbiu, tačiau iki šiol nepakankamai ištirtu natūralaus kalbos tekstu: trumpų etiketų, paprastai rastų struktūriniuose duomenų rinkiniuose, savybes. Mes rodome, kad tokios etiketės atitinka tam tikrą sutrumpintą gramatiką, kurią vadiname Duomenų kalba, su savybėmis, gerokai skiriamomis nuo teksto, paprastai aptariamo skaičiavimo kalboje ir NLP, pavyzdžiui, standartinės rašytinės kalbos arba social in ės žiniasklaidos pranešimuose. We analyse orthography, parts of speech, and syntax over a large, bilingual, hand-annotated corpus of data labels collected from a variety of domains.  Atliekame tokenizacijos, kalbos dalies žymėjimo ir vardinio subjekto pripažinimo eksperimentus tikrojo pasaulio struktūriniais duomenimis, įrodančius, kad modeliai, pritaikyti prie duomenų kalbos, viršija standartiniu tekstu parengtus modelius. Šios pastabos rodo naują kryptį, kuri turi būti išnagrinėta kaip būsimi moksliniai tyrimai, siekiant sukurti naujas NLP priemones ir modelius, skirtus duomenų kalbai.', 'ms': "Kami bertujuan untuk mengungkap ciri-ciri grammatik unik bagi jenis teks bahasa semulajadi yang penting namun jauh-jauh dibawah penyelidikan: yang bagi label pendek biasanya ditemui dalam set data struktur. We show that such labels obey a specific type of abbreviated grammar that we call the Language of Data, with properties significantly different from the kinds of text typically addressed in computational linguistics and NLP, such as `standard' written language or social media messages.  Kami menganalisis ortografi, bahagian ucapan, dan sintaks melalui korpus besar, bilingual, ditandai tangan label data yang dikumpulkan dari pelbagai domain. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada tokenisation, tag-bahagian-ucapan, dan pengenalan entiti bernama atas data struktur dunia nyata, menunjukkan bahawa model yang disesuaikan dengan Bahasa Data melebihi yang dilatih pada teks piawai. Perhatian ini menunjukkan arah baru untuk dieksplorasi sebagai kajian masa depan, untuk mengembangkan alat dan model NLP baru yang didedikasikan kepada Bahasa Data.", 'kk': "Біз қазіргі уақытта тәуелді тіл мәтінінің негізгі грамматикалық қасиеттерін түсіндіру үшін таңдадық: құрылған деректер жиындарында әдетте табылған қысқа жарлықтар. Бұл жарлықтар біз деректердің тіліне аталатын қысқартылған грамматикалық түрлеріне әсер етеді. Бұл жарлықтар компьютерлік лингвистикалық және NLP тілінде әдеттегі мәтіндердің түрлеріне әсер етеді, мысалы 'стандартты' жазылған ті Біз ортографияны, сөйлеу бөлігін және синтаксисін бірнеше доменден жинақталған үлкен, екі тілді, қолмен жазылған деректер жарлықтарының корпусын анализирақ. Біз токенизациялау, сөйлеу тегтерінің бөлігі және шын әлемдегі құрылған деректерінің атауын анықтау үшін тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. Деректер тіліне қолданылған үлгілер стандартты мәтінде оқылған мәтіндерін Бұл наблюдения келесі зерттеулер ретінде зерттеу үшін жаңа бағыттағы NLP құралдары мен мәліметтерді деректер тіліне қатынау үшін жаңа бағыттағы бағыттарды көрсетеді.", 'mk': 'Ние сакавме да ги откриеме единствените граматични сопствености на важен, но досега недостаточно истражен тип на природен јазик текст: оние на кратки етикети кои обично се наоѓаат во структурирани податоци. Ние покажуваме дека ваквите етикети послушаат специфичен тип на кратена граматика што ја нарекуваме јазикот на податоците, со сопствености значително различни од видовите на текст кои обично се обраќаат во компјутативната јазика и НЛП, како што се „ стандардниот “ пишан јазик или пораките Ние анализираме ортографија, делови од говорот и синтаксија преку голем, двојјазичен, рачно анотиран корпус на податочни етикети собрани од различни домени. Ние спроведуваме експерименти за токенизација, регистрирање на дел од говорот и препознавање на ентитетите врз структурираните податоци на реалниот свет, демонстрирајќи дека моделите адаптирани на јазикот на податоците ги надминуваат оние кои се обучуваат на стандарден текст. Овие набљудувања покажуваат нова насока која треба да се истражува како идно истражување, со цел да се развијат нови алатки и модели на НЛП посветени на јазикот на податоците.', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഗ്രാമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണയിച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഇതുപോലുള്ള ലേബ്ലുകള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രത്യേക തരത്തില്\u200d അബ്രാബ്രേവിറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഗ്രാമാറ്ററിനെ അനുസരിക്കുന്നു. ഡേറ്റാവിന്റെ ഭാഷ വിളിക്കുന്നു. അതിന നമ്മള്\u200d വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d, സിന്റാക്സിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. We perform experiments on tokenisation, part-of-speech tagging, and named entity recognition over real-world structured data, demonstrating that models adapted to the Language of Data outperform those trained on standard text.  ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിനായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഈ നോക്കേഷനുകള്\u200d പുതിയ വഴിയില്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. ഡാറ്റാ ഭാഷയിലേക്', 'pl': 'Postanowiliśmy odkryć unikalne właściwości gramatyczne ważnego, ale dotychczas niezbadanego typu tekstu języka naturalnego: krótkich etykiet typowych znajdujących się zwykle w strukturyzowanych zbiorach danych. Pokazujemy, że takie etykiety są zgodne z określonym rodzajem skróconej gramatyki, którą nazywamy językiem danych, o właściwościach znacznie różniących się od rodzajów tekstu zwykle adresowanych w językoznawstwie obliczeniowym i NLP, takich jak standardowy język pisany lub komunikaty mediów społecznościowych. Analizujemy ortografię, części mowy i składnię w dużym, dwujęzycznym, ręcznie adnotatowanym korpusie etykiet danych zebranych z różnych domen. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty dotyczące tokenizacji, tagowania części mowy i rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek na rzeczywistych danych strukturyzowanych, wykazując, że modele dostosowane do języka danych przewyższają te przeszkolone na standardowym tekście. Obserwacje te wskazują na nowy kierunek, który należy zbadać jako przyszłe badania, w celu opracowania nowych narzędzi i modeli NLP dedykowanych językowi danych.', 'mt': 'Bħsiebna niżvelaw il-karatteristiċi grammatiċi uniċi ta’ tip importanti iżda s’issa sottoriċerkat ta’ test lingwistiku naturali: dak ta’ tikketti qosra li tipikament jinsabu f’settijiet ta’ dejta strutturati. Aħna nuru li tikketti bħal dawn isegwu tip speċifiku ta’ gramma mqassra li jissejħu l-Lingwa tad-Dejta, b’karatteristiċi differenti b’mod sinifikanti mit-tipi ta’ test tipikament indirizzat fil-lingwistika komputattiva u l-NLP, bħall-lingwa miktuba “standard” jew il-messaġġi tal-midja soċjali. Aħna tanalizzaw l-ortografija, il-partijiet tad-diskors, u s-sintaks fuq korpus kbir, bilingwi, annotat bl-idejn ta’ tikketti tad-dejta miġbura minn varjetà ta’ dominji. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti dwar it-tokenizzazzjoni, it-tikkettar ta’ parti mid-diskors, u r-rikonoxximent tal-entità msemmi fuq dejta strutturata fid-dinja reali, li juru li mudelli adattati għall-Lingwa tad-Dejta jaqbżu dawk imħarrġa fuq test standard. Dawn l-osservazzjonijiet jindikaw direzzjoni ġdida li għandha tiġi esplorata bħala riċerka futura, sabiex jiġu żviluppati għodod u mudelli ġodda tal-NLP iddedikati għall-Lingwa tad-Dejta.', 'mn': 'Бид одоо хойш судалгаагүй байгалийн хэл хэлний хэлбэрээс хамгийн чухал грамматикийн шинж чанарыг олж мэдэхийг хичээсэн. Энэ богино тэмдэглэл нь бүтээсэн өгөгдлийн санд байдаг. Бид ийм жагсаалтууд тодорхой хэлбэртэй грамматик гэж нэрлэдэг. Мэдээллийн хэл болон нийгмийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн захирагдалд тооцооллын хэлбэрээс хамааралтай өөр өөр өөр өөр хэлбэртэй. Бид ортографик, ярианы хэсгүүд болон синтаксисийг олон хэсгүүдээс цуглуулсан өгөгдлийн загвар дээр шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид тодорхойлолт, ярианы нэг хэсэг, жинхэнэ ертөнцийн бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээлэл дээр нэрлэгдсэн бүтээгдэхүүний тухай туршилт хийдэг. Мэдээллийн хэл дээр зөвхөн стандарт текст дээр сургалтын загваруудыг илүү да Эдгээр ажиглалтууд ирээдүйн судалгаа шинээр судалж, NLP хэрэгсэл болон өгөгдлийн хэл дээр зориулагдсан шинэ загварууд боловсруулахын тулд шинэ загварууд юм.', 'no': 'Vi har sett opp for å opna dei unike grammatiske eigenskapane til ein viktig enno langt under forsøk av typen naturspråkstekst: den korte etiketten som vanlegvis finst i strukturerte datasett. Vi viser at slike merkelappar gjev ei spesifikk type korta grammar som vi kallar språket av data, med eigenskapar som er betydelig ulike enn typen tekst som er normalt adressert i computational linguistics and NLP, som «standard» skriven språk eller sosiale mediemeldingar. Vi analyserer ortografikk, deler av tale og syntaks over ein stor, bilinguelt, handmerket korpus av datamerkelapper samla frå mange domene. Vi utfører eksperimenter på tokenisasjon, ein del av talemerking, og namnet entitetskjenning over strukturerte data over verdensverden, som demonstrarer at modeller tilpassa til språket av data utfører dei som trengte på standardteksten. Desse observasjonane påvirkar i ein ny retning som skal utforske som framtidige forskning for å utvikla nye NLP- verktøy og modeller som er spesifisert til språket for data.', 'ro': "Ne-am propus să descoperim proprietățile gramaticale unice ale unui tip important, dar până în prezent subcercetat de text în limbaj natural: cel al etichetelor scurte găsite de obicei în seturi de date structurate. Arătăm că astfel de etichete respectă un anumit tip de gramatică abreviată pe care noi îl numim Limba datelor, cu proprietăți semnificativ diferite de tipurile de text abordate în mod obișnuit în lingvistica computațională și PNL, cum ar fi limbajul scris `standard' sau mesajele social media. Analizăm ortografia, părțile vorbirii și sintaxa pe un corp mare, bilingv, adnotat manual de etichete de date colectate dintr-o varietate de domenii. Efectuăm experimente privind tokenizarea, etichetarea parțială de vorbire și recunoașterea entităților denumite peste datele structurate din lumea reală, demonstrând că modelele adaptate limbajului datelor depășesc cele instruite pe text standard. Aceste observații indică o nouă direcție care urmează să fie explorată ca cercetare viitoare, pentru a dezvolta noi instrumente și modele PNL dedicate Limbii Datelor.", 'sr': 'Odlučili smo da otkrijemo jedinstvene gramatičke vlasništvo važne, ali do sada pod istragom vrste prirodnog jezika teksta: one kratke etikete koje se obično nalaze unutar strukturovanih seta podataka. Pokazujemo da takve etikete ispoštuju određenu vrstu kratkog gramatike koju zovemo jezik podataka, sa svojstvima koje se značajno razlikuju od vrsta teksta obično adresiranog na računalnom jeziku i NLP-u, kao što su "standardni" pisani jezik ili socijalne medijske poruke. Analiziramo ortografiju, dijelove govora i sintaks preko velikog, dvojezičkog, rukopisanog tela etiketa podataka koji su skupljeni iz raznih domena. Izvodimo eksperimente o tokenizaciji, označavanju govora, i priznanju entiteta iznad strukturiranih podataka stvarnog svijeta, pokazujući da modeli prilagođeni jeziku podataka iznose one koji su obučeni na standardnom tekstu. Ove promatranja ukazuju na novo pravo istraživanja budućih istraživanja, kako bi razvili nove NLP alate i modele posvećene jeziku podataka.', 'so': "Waxaynu u qornay in aan soo ban dhigno hantidii gaarka ah oo ay muhiim u tahay ilaa hada oo aan ka hoos baarayno nooca afka dabiicadda ah: taas oo ah calaamado gaaban oo lagu soo qoray sawirada. Waxaynu muujinnaa in alaabta caynkaas ah ay addeecaan nooc cayiman oo la cayiman karo, oo aan ugu yeedhno luqada Data, waxayna leedahay hanti aad u kala duwan yihiin noocyada warqada xisaabta ah oo lagu qoray luuqadaha xisaabta iyo noocyada afka xisaabta ah ee NLP, tusaale ahaan luqada `standard' ee qoran ama warqadaha macluumaadka bulshada. Anagaa baaraynaa ortoografi, qeyb ka mid ah hadal, iyo canshuur aad u badan, labo luuqadood oo gacanta lagu calaamadeeyey calaamado lagu soo ururiyey meelo kala duduwan. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan calaamad, qeyb ka mid ah hadalka, waxaana la magacaabaa aqoonsiga macluumaadka aasaaska ah ee dunida, waxaana tusinayaa modellada ku habboon luqada Data inay soo bandhigaan waxyaabaha lagu tababariyey qoraalka caadiga ah. Waxyaabahaas waxay ku hagaan qaab cusub in loo baarayo baaritaanka mustaqbalka, si loo horumariyo qalabka cusub ee NLP iyo modellada oo luqada Data ee gaarka ah.", 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වැදගත් විශේෂ භාෂාව පාළුවේ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ ව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ලෙබෙල්ස් වගේ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විදියට අනුමාන කරනවා කියලා අපි දත්තේ භාෂාව කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා දත්තේ භාෂාව, සමා අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, කතාවේ කොටසක් සහ විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, ලොකු බිල්ලි භාෂාවක් සහ දත්ත ලේබල් වල් වර්ගයක් වලි අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, කොටස් කොටස් කිරීම් ටැග් කරනවා, සහ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ සංවිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප මේ බලන්න අලුත් පැත්තේ අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අලුත් NLP උපකරණය සහ මන්ද්\u200dරණය සඳහා දත්ත භාෂා', 'ur': "ہم نے ایک اہم گراماتیکی خصوصیات کو اچانک کرنا چاہا تھا مگر یہاں تک تحقیق کی طبیعی زبان کی پیغام کی طرح: یہ چھوٹی لابلوں کی معمولی طور پر ساختہ ڈیٹ سٹ میں پائی جاتی ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ لئبل ایک مخصوص قسم کی پیروی کرتی ہیں جو ہم ڈاٹا کی زبان کا نام رکھتے ہیں، اور اس کے خصوصیات کے مطابق کامپیوتر زبان شناسی اور NLP میں لکھی جاتی ہیں، جیسے 'استاندارڈ' لکھی زبان یا سوسیال میڈیا پیغام میں لکھی جاتی ہیں. ہم الٹوگرافی، کلام کے حصے اور سینٹکس کو ایک بڑی، دو زبان، ہاتھ کے مطابق دکھانے والی لابل کے درمیان تحقیق کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ٹوکنیزی، سخنرانی ٹاگ کے حصہ میں تجربے کرتے ہیں، اور واقعی دنیا کی ساختہ ڈاٹے پر ایک ایستی کی پہچان کرتی ہیں، جو دکھاتے ہیں کہ نمونڈے ڈاٹے کی زبان سے اچھی طرح کی جاتی ہیں ان کی استاندارڈ ٹیکسٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہیں. یہ اظہارات ایک نئی سمت میں تفسیر کی جاتی ہیں جو آینده تحقیقات کے طور پر اظہار کی جاتی ہے، اس لئے کہ نئی NLP ابزار اور نمونڈل ڈیٹا کی زبان کے لئے اظہار کی جاتی ہیں.", 'sv': 'Vi bestämde oss för att upptäcka de unika grammatiska egenskaperna hos en viktig men hittills underforskad typ av naturligt språk text: kortetiketter som vanligtvis finns i strukturerade datauppsättningar. Vi visar att sådana etiketter lyder en viss typ av förkortad grammatik som vi kallar Language of Data, med egenskaper som skiljer sig avsevärt från de typer av text som vanligtvis adresseras inom datorlingvistik och NLP, såsom standardspråk eller sociala medier meddelanden. Vi analyserar ortografi, delar av tal och syntax över en stor, tvåspråkig, handkommenterad korpus av dataetiketter insamlade från en mängd olika domäner. Vi utför experiment med tokenisering, delmärkning och namngiven entitetsigenkänning över verkliga strukturerade data, vilket visar att modeller anpassade till Språket av Data överträffar dem som utbildats på standardtext. Dessa observationer pekar på en ny riktning som ska utforskas som framtida forskning, för att utveckla nya NLP-verktyg och modeller dedikerade till dataspråket.', 'ta': 'ஆய்வு செய்யப்பட்ட இயல்பான மொழி உரையின் தனிப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் காணப்பட்டுள்ளது. நாம் இத்தகைய சிட்டைகள் தகவல் மொழியை அழைக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட வகையான குறிப்பிட்ட மொழியை பின்பற்றுகிறோம் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம். கணக்கீட்டு மொழிகளில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட உரையி நாம் பெரிய, இரு மொழி, கையில் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தகவல் சிட்டைகள் வெவ்வேறு தளங்களிலிருந்து சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள தகவல் சிட்டைகளின் பொர நாம் அறிவிப்பு, பேச்சு குறிப்பிட்ட சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் பெயர் பொருள் அறிவிப்பு உண்மையான உலக அமைப்பு தகவல் மீது, தரவு மொழியில் ஒப்பிட் இந்த பார்வைகள் புதிய திசையில் எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சியாக தேடுவதற்காக புதிய திசையில் குறிப்பிடுகிறது, தரவு மொழிக்கு புத', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã phát hiện ra tính chất đặc trưng của một loại ngôn ngữ tự nhiên quan trọng nhưng vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng: loại nhãn ngắn thường được tìm thấy trong bộ dữ liệu cấu trúc. Chúng tôi cho thấy các loại nhãn này tuân theo một loại ngữ pháp cụ thể mà chúng tôi gọi là Ngôn ngữ của Dữ liệu, với các tính chất khác biệt với các loại văn bản thường được ghi rõ trong ngữ pháp tính và ngôn ngữ âm tính, như ngôn ngữ chữ chuẩn hay thông điệp xã hội. Chúng tôi phân tích máy tính, chi tiết ngôn ngữ, và cú pháp trên một tập thể dữ liệu, hai chữ, được ghi chú, được thu thập từ nhiều miền. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm về tín hiệu phát biểu, định dạng ngôn ngữ, và nhận diện thực thể với các dữ liệu cấu trúc trên thế giới thực, cho thấy các mô hình thích hợp với ngôn ngữ của dữ liệu vượt trội những người được đào tạo trên văn bản chuẩn. Những quan sát này dẫn đến một hướng mới cần được khám phá như nghiên cứu tương lai, để phát triển các công cụ và mô hình độc lập lập lập lập của ngôn ngữ Tài liệu.', 'uz': "Biz juda muhim grammatik xossalarini ko'rsatish uchun boshqa tugmalar birikmasini ko'rsatdik. Bu tugmalar tarkibidagi qisqarli maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi qisqa tugmalar. Biz shunday yorlarni ko'rsatishmiz mumkin, biz Data tilini oʻrnatib boʻladigan foydalanuvchi turga xabar beramiz, bu xizmatlik tillarining turlaridan foydalanuvchi boʻlgan xossalaridan ham ham juda ajratilgan, va NLP, masalan `standard' yozilgan tillar yoki social media xabarlari. Biz ortografiya, gapiring qismlarini, va bir necha tillar, ko'plab qo'llangan maʼlumot yorlarining qo'llangan qo'llanmalarning bir nechta qo'llangan qo'llab-qo'llangan. Biz tashkilotlarni tasdiqlash, gapirish qismlarining qismlarini bajaramiz va tashkilotni tasdiqlash dunyodagi tashkilotni tasdiqlash deb nomlanamiz. Maʼlumotlar tillariga mos keladigan modellarni standard matnni bajarish mumkin. Bu obʼektlar kelajakdagi qidirish sifatida qidiriladi, yangi NLP asboblar va maʼlumotlar tilga qoʻllanilgan modellarni yaratish uchun.", 'bg': 'Опитахме се да разкрием уникалните граматически свойства на важен, но засега недостатъчно изследван тип текст на естествен език: този на кратките етикети, които обикновено се намират в структурирани набори от данни. Показваме, че такива етикети се подчиняват на определен тип съкратена граматика, която наричаме Език на данните, със свойства значително различни от типовете текст, които обикновено се разглеждат в компютърната лингвистика и НЛП, като например "стандартен" писмен език или съобщения в социалните медии. Анализираме ортография, части от речта и синтаксиса върху голям, двуезичен, ръчно анотиран корпус от етикети на данни, събрани от различни области. Извършваме експерименти с токенизация, маркиране на част от речта и разпознаване на имена на обекти върху структурирани данни от реалния свят, демонстрирайки, че моделите, адаптирани към Езика на данните, превъзхождат обучаваните за стандартен текст. Тези наблюдения сочат в нова посока, която трябва да бъде проучена като бъдещи изследвания, за да се разработят нови инструменти и модели за НЛП, посветени на езика на данните.', 'hr': 'Našli smo da otkrijemo jedinstvene gramatičke vlasništvo važne, ali do sada pod istragom vrste prirodnog jezika teksta: koje kratke etikete obično nalaze unutar strukturiranih podataka. Pokazujemo da takve etikete ispoštuju određenu vrstu kratkog gramatike koje zovemo jezik podataka, sa svojstvima značajno različitim od vrsta teksta obično adresiranog u računalnim jezicima i NLP-u, poput "standardnog" pisanog jezika ili socijalnih medijskih poruka. Analiziramo ortografiju, dijelove govora i sintaks preko velikog, dvojezičkog, rukopisanog tijela oznake podataka koji su skupljeni iz raznih domena. Izvodimo eksperimente o tokenizaciji, označavanju dijela govora i priznanju entiteta nad strukturovanim podacima stvarnog svijeta, pokazujući da se modeli prilagođeni jeziku podataka iznose one koji su obučeni na standardnom tekstu. Te promatranja upućuju na novi način koji će se istražiti kao buduće istraživanje, kako bi razvili nove NLP alate i modele posvećene jeziku podataka.', 'nl': "We wilden de unieke grammaticale eigenschappen ontdekken van een belangrijk maar tot dusver onderzocht type tekst in de natuurlijke taal: die van korte labels die typisch voorkomen in gestructureerde datasets. We tonen aan dat dergelijke labels gehoorzamen aan een specifiek type verkorte grammatica dat we de Taal van Gegevens noemen, met eigenschappen die aanzienlijk verschillen van de soorten tekst die typisch worden aangepakt in computerlinguïstiek en NLP, zoals 'standaard' geschreven taal of social media berichten. We analyseren orthografie, spraakdelen en syntaxis over een groot, tweetalig, met de hand geannoteerd corpus van gegevenslabels verzameld uit verschillende domeinen. We voeren experimenten uit met tokenisering, part-of-speech tagging en naamloze entiteitsherkenning met gestructureerde gegevens in de echte wereld, waaruit blijkt dat modellen aangepast aan de Taal van gegevens beter presteren dan modellen die getraind zijn op standaardtekst. Deze observaties wijzen in een nieuwe richting die als toekomstig onderzoek moet worden onderzocht, om nieuwe NLP-tools en -modellen te ontwikkelen die gewijd zijn aan de Taal van Data.", 'da': 'Vi satte os for at afdække de unikke grammatiske egenskaber af en vigtig, men hidtil underundersøgt type natursprogtekst: korte etiketter, der typisk findes i strukturerede datasæt. Vi viser, at sådanne etiketter overholder en bestemt type forkortet grammatik, som vi kalder Sprog of Data, med egenskaber, der adskiller sig væsentligt fra de typer tekst, der typisk behandles i beregningslingvistik og NLP, såsom standardsprog eller sociale medier meddelelser. Vi analyserer ortografi, dele af tale og syntaks over et stort tosproget, håndkommenteret korpus af dataetiketter indsamlet fra en række forskellige domæner. Vi udfører eksperimenter med tokenisering, delt-af-tale-mærkning og navngivet entitetsgenkendelse over strukturerede data i den virkelige verden, hvilket viser, at modeller, der er tilpasset sproget for data, overgår dem, der er trænet i standardtekst. Disse observationer peger i en ny retning, der skal undersøges som fremtidig forskning, for at udvikle nye NLP-værktøjer og modeller dedikeret til sproget for data.', 'de': 'Wir wollten die einzigartigen grammatikalischen Eigenschaften einer wichtigen, aber bisher wenig erforschten Art von natürlichem Sprachtext aufdecken: die von kurzen Labels, die typischerweise in strukturierten Datensätzen zu finden sind. Wir zeigen, dass solche Beschriftungen einer bestimmten Art abgekürzter Grammatik gehorchen, die wir die Sprache der Daten nennen, mit Eigenschaften, die sich erheblich von den Arten von Texten unterscheiden, die typischerweise in der Computerlinguistik und NLP angesprochen werden, wie z.B. Standardsprache oder Social-Media-Nachrichten. Wir analysieren Orthographie, Sprachteile und Syntax über einen großen, zweisprachigen, handkommentierten Korpus von Datenlabels, die aus einer Vielzahl von Domänen gesammelt wurden. Wir führen Experimente zu Tokenisierung, Sprachteiltagging und Named Entity Recognition über strukturierte Daten aus der realen Welt durch und zeigen, dass Modelle, die an die Sprache der Daten angepasst sind, diejenigen übertreffen, die auf Standardtext trainiert wurden. Diese Beobachtungen weisen in eine neue Richtung, die als zukünftige Forschung erforscht werden soll, um neue NLP-Tools und -Modelle für die Sprache der Daten zu entwickeln.', 'ko': "우리는 중요하지만 아직 충분히 연구되지 않은 자연 언어 텍스트의 독특한 문법적 특성을 밝히기 시작했다. 보통 구조화된 데이터에서 집중적으로 발견되는 짧은 라벨이다.우리는 이러한 라벨들이 특정한 유형의 줄임말 문법을 따르고 데이터 언어라고 하는데 그 속성은 계산언어학과 NLP에서 일반적으로 처리하는 텍스트 유형(예를 들어'표준'서면 언어나 소셜 미디어 메시지)과 현저히 다르다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 서로 다른 분야에서 수집된 대량의 이중 언어, 수동으로 표시된 데이터 라벨 자료 라이브러리의 정자법, 어성과 문법을 분석했다.우리는 실제 세계의 구조화된 데이터에 대해 표기화, 어성 표기와 명명 실체 식별 실험을 실시하여 데이터 언어에 적응하는 모델이 표준 텍스트에서 훈련하는 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.이러한 관찰 결과는 데이터 언어에 전용된 새로운 NLP 도구와 모델을 개발하기 위한 미래 연구에 새로운 방향을 제시했다.", 'fa': 'ما تصمیم گرفتیم که ویژگی\u200cهای گراماتیکی ویژه\u200cای از یک متن زبان طبیعی را در حال حاضر تحقیق کنیم: که از نقاشی\u200cهای کوتاه معمولا در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ساخته شده پیدا می\u200cشود. ما نشان می دهیم که این نقاشی از نوع برنامه\u200cهای مخصوص پیروی می\u200cکنند که ما زبان داده\u200cها را می\u200cنامیم، با ویژگی\u200cهای معمولی متفاوت از نوع متن که معمولاً در زبان\u200cهای محاسباتی و NLP مشخص می\u200cشود، مثل زبان\u200cهای نوشته\u200cشده یا رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی. ما آرتوگرافی، بخشی از سخنرانی و سنتاکسی را بر روی یک جسد بزرگ، دو زبان، نشان داده شده\u200cای از نقاط داده\u200cهای مختلف دامنه\u200cها تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. ما آزمایش\u200cهایی را در مورد توکین کردن، پاره\u200cای از نقاشی سخنرانی انجام می\u200cدهیم، و شناسایی عنوان بر روی داده\u200cهای ساخته شده جهان واقعی، نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل\u200cها به زبان داده\u200cها adapted to the Language of Data outperform those trained on standard text. این مشاهده\u200cها در یک مسیر جدید که به عنوان تحقیقات آینده تحقیق می\u200cشود، برای توسعه ابزار NLP جدید و مدل\u200cهای مخصوص به زبان داده\u200cها است.', 'id': "Kami bertujuan untuk mengungkap properti grammatik unik dari tipe teks bahasa alam yang penting namun sejauh ini tidak diteliti dengan baik: yang dari label pendek biasanya ditemukan dalam set data struktur. We show that such labels obey a specific type of abbreviated grammar that we call the Language of Data, with properties significantly different from the kinds of text typically addressed in computational linguistics and NLP, such as `standard' written language or social media messages.  Kami menganalisis ortografi, bagian dari pidato, dan sintaks melalui tubuh besar, bilingual, ditandai tangan label data yang dikumpulkan dari berbagai domain. Kami melakukan eksperimen tentang tokenisasi, bagian dari pembicaraan tagging, dan pengakuan entitas bernama atas data strukturasi dunia nyata, menunjukkan bahwa model yang disesuaikan dengan Bahasa Data melebihi yang dilatih pada teks standar. These observations point in a new direction to be explored as future research, in order to develop new NLP tools and models dedicated to the Language of Data.", 'sw': "Tumejitokeza kugundua utaalam wa kipekee wa kipekee cha muhimu lakini mpaka sasa chini ya aina ya maandishi ya lugha ya asili: ambayo ni ya alama fupi kwa kawaida imepatikana ndani ya seti za taarifa zilizotengenezwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba alama kama hizi zinafuatilia a in a fulani ya gramma inayochapishwa na kinachoitwa lugha ya Data, na utamaduni tofauti sana na aina ya maandishi ya kawaida iliyoandikwa katika lugha za kompyuta na NLP, kama vile lugha ya 'standard' au jumbe za mitandao ya kijamii. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa orodha, sehemu za hotuba, na pamoja na viungo vingi vya lugha, lugha mbili, vifaa vya takwimu vilivyokusanywa kutoka katika maeneo mbalimbali. Tunafanya majaribio kuhusu alama ya kuonyesha, sehemu ya alama za hotuba, na jina la kutambuliwa kwa ajili ya taarifa zilizotengenezwa duniani halisi, kuonyesha kuwa mifano ilichanganyika na lugha ya Data hufanya wale waliofundishwa kwa kutumia ujumbe wa kawaida. These observations point in a new direction to be explored as future research, in order to develop new NLP tools and models dedicated to the Language of Data.", 'tr': 'Biz 힊u wagt dowam dili metini흫 i챌inde 철r채n m철h체m bir gramatik hasaplany힊yny a챌mak 체챌in d체힊d체k: muny d체첵b체rlik d체z체mler i챌inde tapyl첵ar. Biz bu etiketleri흫 birn채챌e kesi힊ik gramatika di첵ip atlandyr첵andygyny g철rke첵채n g철rke첵채n, we bu etiketleri흫 "data dili" di첵ip atlandyryl첵an hasaplary흫 has g철rn체힊i kalkular lingwistikleri we NLP dilinde g철rkezil첵채n metinlerden has g철rn체힊 체첵tgediklerini g철rke첵채n g철rke첵채n Biz ortografi첵any, s철zlerin par챌alaryny we sintaksi첵asyny birn채챌e d체rli domadan toplanm캇힊 veri etiketlerinin 체st체nde 챌철z체l첵채ris Biz tokeniza흫, 챌yky힊 etiketlerini흫 bir b철l체mi we d체n첵채de strukturlyk maglumaty흫 체st체nde bir nusga tany힊 edip, Data diline uygulanan nusgalary흫 standart metin흫 체st체nde t채sir ed첵채ndigini g철rkez. Bu g철zlemler gelejekki ara힊tyrma h철km체nde ke힊fedilmeli t채ze bir y철nde, NLP guramlary we Maglumat Diline wezip eden nusgalary d철retmek 체챌in.', 'af': "Ons het uitgestel om die unieke grammatiese eienskappe van 'n belangrik maar so ver onder- ondersoekte tipe natuurlike taal teks te ontdek: wat van kort etikette tipies binne struktureerde datastelle gevind het. Ons wys dat sulke etikette gehoorsaam na 'n spesifieke tipe kruipende grammatiek wat ons die Taal van Data noem, met eienskappe betekenlik verskillend van die soorte teks wat tipies in rekenasielike lingvistike en NLP aangestel is, soos 'standaard' skryfde taal of sosiale media boodskappe. Ons analiseer ortografie, dele van spraak en sintaks oor 'n groot, twee tale, hand- annotateerde korpus van data etikette wat van 'n verskeie domeine versamel is. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op tokenisasie, deel van spraak merking, en genaamde entiteit herken oor reël- wêreld struktureerde data, wat wys dat modele aan die Taal van Data aanpas is, uitvoer die onderwerp op standaard teks. Hierdie opmerking wys in 'n nuwe rigting om as toekomstige verloring te ontwikkel, om nuwe NLP nutsprogramme en modele te ontwikkel wat aan die Taal van Data gespesifiseer is.", 'am': 'የተለየውን የግራማቲካዊ ምርጫዎችን ለማግኘት አቆየን፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ምልክቶች የዳታ ቋንቋ የሚጠራውን በተለየ ዓይነት እንዲታወቁ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ የጽሑፎች ቋንቋ እና የNLP መልዕክቶች እንደ ‘standard’ የተጻፈ ቋንቋ ወይም ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ መልዕክቶች የሚባል የጽሑፎች መልዕክቶች በተለየ፡፡ የኦሮግራፊ፣ የንግግር ክፍል እና በሁለት ቋንቋ፣ በተለየ ሁለት ቋንቋ፣ የዳታ ምልክቶች በተሰበሰቡ የዳታ ምልክቶች ቁጥር እናስተምር፡፡ የዳታ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች የዳታ ቋንቋ የተጠቃሚ ጽሑፎችን ለማሳየት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህም አካባቢዎች ለዳታ ቋንቋ የተለየውን አዲስ የNLP መሣሪያና ሞዴላዎችን ለመፍጠር በአዲስ መንገድ ለማፍረስ ነው፡፡', 'sq': "Ne synuam të zbulojmë pronësitë grammatike unike të një lloji të rëndësishëm, por deri tani nën-kërkim të tekstit të gjuhës natyrore: atë të etiketave të shkurtra që zakonisht gjenden brenda të dhënave të strukturuara. Ne tregojmë se etiketa të tilla respektojnë një lloj specifik gramatike të shkurtër që ne e quajmë Gjuha e të dhënave, me pronësi të ndryshme ndjeshëm nga llojet e tekstit tipikisht të adresuar në gjuhën llogaritare dhe NLP, të tilla si gjuhë e shkruar 'standard' apo mesazhe të medias sociale. Analizojmë ortografin, pjesët e fjalimit, dhe sintaksin mbi një trup të madh, dygjuhës, të anotuar me dorë të etiketave të të dhënave të mbledhura nga një shumëllojshmëri domenesh. Ne kryejmë eksperimente mbi tokenizimin, shënimin e pjesës së fjalimit dhe njohjen e emëruar të njësisë mbi të dhënat e strukturuara të botës reale, duke demonstruar se modelet e përshtatshme ndaj gjuhës së të dhënave janë më të larta se ato të stërvitura në tekstin standard. Këto vëzhgime tregojnë në një drejtim të ri që do të eksplorohet si kërkim i ardhshëm, me qëllim që të zhvillohen mjete dhe modele të reja NLP të përkushtuar gjuhës së të dhënave.", 'hy': 'Մենք սկսեցինք բացահայտել բնական լեզվի տեքստի կարևոր, սակայն մինչ այժմ անհետազոտություններ ունեցող, գրամաբանական առանձնահատկությունները՝ կարճ պիտակների, որոնք սովորաբար գտնվում են կառուցված տվյալների համակարգերում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նման պիտակները լսում են որոշակի տեսակի կարճ գրաֆիկա, որը մենք անվանում ենք Տվյալների լեզու, որի հատկությունները շատ տարբեր են հաշվարկների լեզուներում և ՆԼՊ-ում, ինչպիսիք են «ստանդարտ» գրված լեզուն կամ սոցիալական լրատվական հաղորդագրությունները: Մենք վերլուծում ենք օրթոգրաֆիան, խոսքի մասերը և սինտաքսը տարբեր բնագավառներից հավաքված տվյալների մի մեծ, երկլեզու, ձեռքով գրված կորպուսի վրա: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկումներ, որոնք վերաբերում են նշաններին, խոսքի մասի նշաններին, և անվանների ճանաչելուն իրական աշխարհի կառուցվածքավորված տվյալների վերաբերյալ, ցույց տալով, որ տվյալների լեզվին հարմարեցված մոդելները գերազանցում Այս հետազոտությունները ցույց են տալիս նոր ուղղություն, որը պետք է ուսումնասիրել որպես ապագա հետազոտություն, որպեսզի զարգացնեն նոր ՆԼՊ գործիքներ և մոդելներ, որոնք նվիրված են տվյալների լեզվին:', 'az': 'Biz təbiətli dil mətnlərin müxtəlif qrammatik xüsusiyyətlərini öyrənmək üçün təbiətli mətnlərin mətnlərinin bəzi qrammatik xüsusiyyətlərini çəkdik: bu qısa etiketlərin nümunə qurulmuş verilən quruluşlarda görülür. Biz bu etiketlərin müəyyən bir cür grammatika uyduğunu göstəririk ki, Data dilini deyirik, hesap dillərində və NLP dillərində müəyyən edilən mətnlərdən çox fərqli olaraq, müəyyən edilən mətnlərdən çox fərqli olaraq. Biz ortografiya, sözlərin parçalarını analiz edirik, və sintaksi çox böyük, iki dil, əl-annotated məlumatların etiketlərindən toplanmışdır. Biz tokenizasyon, sözlərin bir parçası etiketi və həqiqət dünyanın strukturlı məlumatların üstündə ünsiyyət tanıması üçün təşviyyələr etdik, məlumatların dilinə uyğun modellərin standart məlumatların üstündə təhsil edilənləri göstərdik. Bu məlumatlar gələcək araştırma kimi keşfedilmək üçün yeni bir tərəfdə məlumatlar göstərir, NLP vasitələri və modelləri məlumatların dilinə bağlı olmaq üçün.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য আবিষ্কার করার জন্য নির্ধারণ করেছি এখনো পর্যন্ত গবেষণা করা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ধরনের লেবেলের একটি নির্দিষ্ট ধরনের বিশেষ গ্রাম মেনে নিচ্ছি যা আমরা ডাটা ভাষাকে ডাকি, যার বৈশিষ্ট্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষা এবং এনএলপি যেমন ‘স্ট্যান্ডার We analyse orthography, parts of speech, and syntax over a large, bilingual, hand-annotated corpus of data labels collected from a variety of domains.  আমরা প্রকৃত বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের কাঠামো তথ্যের উপর প্রতিষ্ঠানের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি, ভাষণের অংশের ট্যাগিং এবং প্রতিষ্ঠানের নামে স্বীকৃতি প্রদান কর এই পর্যবেক্ষনগুলো ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণা হিসেবে সন্ধান করার একটি নতুন দিকে নির্দেশ করে, যাতে নতুন এনএলপি টুল এবং ডাটার ভাষায় বিশেষ মড', 'ca': 'Vam començar a descobrir les propietats gramàtiques únices d\'un tipus important però fins ara poc investigat de text de llenguatge natural: la de les petites etiquetes que normalment es troben dins conjunts de dades estructurats. Mostrem que aquestes etiquetes obeïn a un tipus específic de gramàtica abreviada que anomenem Llingua de Dats, amb propietats significativament diferents del tipus de text que normalment es tracta en la lingüística computacional i en NLP, com el llenguatge escrit "normal" o els missatges dels mitjans socials. We analyse orthography, parts of speech, and syntax over a large, bilingual, hand-annotated corpus of data labels collected from a variety of domains.  Fem experiments sobre la fitogenització, la etiqueta part-of-speech, i el reconeixement de l\'entitat anomenat sobre les dades estructuradas del món real, demostrant que els models adaptats al llenguatge de les dades superen aquells entrenats en text normal. Aquestes observacions apunten en una nova direcció a explorar com a recerca futura, per desenvolupar noves eines i models NLP dedicats al llenguatge de dades.', 'cs': 'Zaměřili jsme se na odhalení jedinečných gramatických vlastností důležitého, avšak dosud nedostatečně zkoumaného typu textu přirozeného jazyka: krátkých popisků, které se obvykle nacházejí ve strukturovaných datových sadách. Ukazujeme, že tyto štítky dodržují specifický typ zkrácené gramatiky, které nazýváme Jazyk dat, s vlastnostmi výrazně odlišnými od typů textu, které se obvykle řeší ve výpočetní lingvistice a NLP, jako jsou například standardní psaný jazyk nebo zprávy sociálních médií. Analyzujeme pravopis, části řeči a syntaxi na velkém, dvojjazyčném, ručně anotovaném korpusu datových štítků shromážděných z různých domén. Provádíme experimenty na tokenizaci, značení části řeči a rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit na strukturovaných datech v reálném světě, což prokáže, že modely přizpůsobené jazyce dat překonávají ty trénované na standardním textu. Tato pozorování ukazují nový směr, který je třeba prozkoumat jako budoucí výzkum s cílem vyvinout nové NLP nástroje a modely věnované jazyce dat.', 'bs': 'Našli smo da otkrijemo jedinstvene gramatičke vlasništvo važne, ali do sada pod istragom vrste prirodnog jezika teksta: one kratke etikete koje su obično pronađene unutar strukturiranih podataka. Pokazujemo da takve etikete ispoštuju određenu vrstu kratkog gramatike koju zovemo jezik podataka, sa svojstvima koje su značajno različite od vrsta teksta obično adresiranog na računalnom jeziku i NLP-u, poput "standardnog" pisanog jezika ili socijalnog medija poruke. Analiziramo ortografiju, dijelove govora i sintaks preko velikog, dvojezičkog, ručnog annotiranog korpusa etiketa podataka koji su skupljeni iz raznih domena. Izvodimo eksperimente o tokenizaciji, označavanju dijela govora i priznanju entiteta iznad strukturiranih podataka stvarnog svijeta, pokazujući da se modeli prilagođeni jeziku podataka iznose one koji su obučeni na standardnom tekstu. Te promatranja ukazuju na novi način da se istražuju kao buduće istraživanje, kako bi razvili nove NLP alate i modele posvećene jeziku podataka.', 'et': 'Me püüdsime avastada ühe olulise, kuid siiani vähe uuritud looduskeelse teksti tüübi unikaalsed grammatilised omadused: struktureeritud andmekogumites tavaliselt leiduvate lühikeste siltide omadused. Näitame, et sellised sildid järgivad konkreetset tüüpi lühendatud grammatikat, mida me nimetame andmekeeleks, mille omadused erinevad oluliselt arvutuslingvistikas ja NLP-s tavaliselt käsitletavatest tekstiliikidest, nagu näiteks standardne kirjakeel või sotsiaalmeedia sõnumid. Analüüsime ortograafiat, kõneosi ja süntaksit mitmesugustest valdkondadest kogutud suure, kakskeelse käsitsi märgitud andmesiltide korpuse kaudu. Me teeme eksperimente tokeniseerimise, kõneosa sildistamise ja nimetatud olemi tuvastamisega reaalmaailma struktureeritud andmetel, näidates, et andmekeelele kohandatud mudelid ületavad standardtekstiga koolitatud mudeleid. Need tähelepanekud osutavad uuele suunale, mida tuleb uurida tulevaste uuringutena, et töötada välja uued andmekeelele pühendatud uued uue õppekava vahendid ja mudelid.', 'fi': 'Pyrimme selvittämään erään tärkeän mutta toistaiseksi vähän tutkittun luonnollisen kielen tekstin ainutlaatuisia kieliopillisia ominaisuuksia: strukturoiduissa tietoaineistoissa tyypillisesti esiintyvien lyhyiden tunnisteiden. Osoitamme, että tällaiset etiketit noudattavat tietyntyyppistä lyhennettyä kielioppia, jota kutsumme datakieleksi, ja niiden ominaisuudet poikkeavat merkittävästi laskennallisessa lingvistiikassa ja NLP:ssä tyypillisesti käytetyistä tekstilajeista, kuten "standardikielisestä" kirjoitetusta kielestä tai sosiaalisen median viesteistä. Analysoimme ortografiaa, puheen osia ja syntaksia suurella kaksikielisellä käsin merkityllä tietokorpusella, joka on kerätty eri toimialueilta. Teemme kokeita tokenisaatiosta, puheen osamerkintästä ja nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamisesta reaalimaailman strukturoidulla datalla, osoittaen, että datakieleen sovitetut mallit ovat parempia kuin standarditekstillä koulutetut mallit. Nämä havainnot viittaavat uuteen suuntaan, jota on tutkittava tulevana tutkimuksena uusien datakielelle omistettujen NLP-työkalujen ja mallien kehittämiseksi.', 'ha': "Mun tsai dõmin Mu buɗe masu tsari na grammati masu muhimu kuma amma har a yanzu a bayan an sanar da nau'i na harshen asimi: that of short tags typically, an gane su cikin tsarin database. Tuna nũna wa waɗannan alama suna ɗã'a ga wata nau'in grammar wanda za'a yi rubutu da shi, da wasu properties mai girma daga nau'in matsayin da aka yi masa a cikin linguistic da na ƙidãya da NLP, kamar maganar ` na'urar' da aka rubũta, ko manzanni na ƙarami. Ana yi anadi ga ortofogi, rabo na magana, kuma masu samun taƙaita a kan jama'a biyu, harshen biyu, da hannayen da aka sanar da shi daga wasu jama'a guda. Kana tafiyar jarrabãwa a kan shirin ayuka, rabon tagogi na magana, kuma ana sunan shaidar masu sani a kan data masu tsari cikin duniya masu gaske, kuma Muke nuna misãlai da aka kamata zuwa harshen Dane-Data, su sami waɗanda aka yi wa takarda kan matsayin da aka daidaita. Wannan kayan gani na pointe cikin wata hanyar da za'a samar da shi kamar research na gaba, dõmin a buɗe zanen na NLP da misãlai da aka ƙayyade zuwa harshen Dane.", 'sk': "Odkrili smo edinstvene slovnične lastnosti pomembnega, vendar doslej premalo raziskanega besedila v naravnem jeziku: kratkih oznak, ki jih običajno najdemo v strukturiranih naborih podatkov. Pokazali smo, da takšne oznake upoštevajo določeno vrsto skrajšane slovnice, ki jo imenujemo Jezik podatkov, z lastnostmi, ki se bistveno razlikujejo od vrst besedila, ki se običajno obravnavajo v računalniškem jezikoslovju in NLP, kot so `standardni' pisni jezik ali sporočila družbenih medijev. Analiziramo ortografijo, dele govora in sintakso v velikem, dvojezičnem, ročno označenem korpusu oznak podatkov, zbranih iz različnih domen. Izvajamo poskuse na področju žetonizacije, označevanja delov govora in prepoznavanja imenovanih entitet prek strukturiranih podatkov v realnem svetu, s čimer dokazujemo, da modeli, prilagojeni jeziku podatkov, presegajo tiste, ki so usposobljeni za standardno besedilo. Ta opažanja kažejo v novo smer, ki jo je treba raziskati kot prihodnje raziskave, da bi razvili nova orodja in modele NLP, namenjene jeziku podatkov.", 'jv': "Text Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh etiket sing ngomong nik akeh akeh perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo awak dhéwé éntukno Daftar, karo nggawe Perusahaan langkung sampeyan karo kalih-sampeyan texti sing dikenalke karo akeh kelengatan karo Linguistik lan NLP, kaya terus 'default' kalih basa okan media soale. Awak dhéwé énalasi ortoggraphy, pating kanggo langgar, lan seneng sakjane neng akeh banter, itolakno, durung-andong sing manut karo pergambar dadi sing gawe ngubah sampeyan gérané Anyone Awaraning iki dhéwé éntuk kanggo kelas nang sampek bentuan kanggo sampek jutir kanggo nggawe alat NLP sing bagian lan model sing ngewehku kanggo Language of data.", 'he': "התכוונו לחשוף את התכונות הגרמטיות הייחודיות של סוג חשוב, אך עד כה מתחת למחקר טבעי של טקסט שפה טבעית: של תוויות קצרות שנמצאו בדרך כלל בתוך קבוצות נתונים מבושרות. אנחנו מראים שלתוויות כאלה מציינות לסוג מסוים של גרמטיקה קצרה שאנחנו קוראים לשפת הנתונים, עם תכונות שונות באופן משמעותי מהסוגים של טקסט שטיפוסית מתייחסת בלשון מחשבי ו-NLP, כמו שפה כתובה 'סטנדרטית' או הודעות מדיה חברתית. אנו מנתחים אורטוגרפיה, חלקים של דיבור, וסינטקסיס על גוף גדול, שתילנגי, מוכתב ביד של תוויות נתונים שנאספו מגוון של תחומות. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על סימניזציה, סימני חלק מהנאום, והזיהוי של ישות בשם על נתונים מבוססים בעולם האמיתי, שמוכיחים שמודלים מתאימים לשפת הנתונים יוצאים מעל אלה שאומנים על טקסט סטנדרטי. התבוננות האלה מצביעות בכיוון חדש שנוכל לחקור בתור מחקר עתיד, כדי לפתח כלי NLP חדשים ומודלים מוקדשים לשפה הנתונים.", 'bo': "We set out to uncover the unique grammatical properties of an important yet so far under-researched type of natural language text: that of short labels typically found within structured datasets. We show that such labels obey a specific type of abbreviated grammar that we call the Language of Data, with properties significantly different from the kinds of text typically addressed in computational linguistics and NLP, such as `standard' written language or social media messages. We analyse orthography, parts of speech, and syntax over a large, bilingual, hand-annotated corpus of data labels collected from a variety of domains. We perform experiments on tokenisation, part-of-speech tagging, and named entity recognition over real-world structured data, demonstrating that models adapted to the Language of Data outperform those trained on standard text. མཐོང་སྣང་འདི་དག་གི་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཕྲིན་དོན་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ལ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་སྐྱེལ་བ་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Creation of Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data for Emotion Prediction', 'ar': 'إنشاء مجموعة النصوص والتحليل في بيانات تويتر Code-Mixed Kannada-English للتنبؤ بالعاطفة', 'fr': 'Création de Corpus et analyse de données Twitter mixtes kannada-anglais pour la prédiction des émotions', 'zh': '于代码混合卡纳达语 - 英语Twitter数创语料库析以测情', 'pt': 'Criação de Corpus e análise em dados do Twitter Code-Mixed Kannada-Inglês para Previsão de Emoções', 'es': 'Creación de Corpus y análisis en código mixto de datos de Twitter en kannada e inglés para la predicción de emociones', 'ja': 'コーパスの作成と感情予測のためのコードミックスされたカンナダ語-英語のTwitterデータの分析', 'hi': 'भावना भविष्यवाणी के लिए कोड-मिश्रित कन्नड़-अंग्रेजी ट्विटर डेटा में कॉर्पस और विश्लेषण का निर्माण', 'ru': 'Создание корпуса и анализ в кодово-смешанных данных Kannada-English Twitter для прогнозирования эмоций', 'ga': 'Corpas a chruthú agus anailís i sonraí Twitter Cód-Measctha Cannadais-Bhéarla le haghaidh Tuar Mothúcháin', 'el': 'Δημιουργία Σώματος και ανάλυση σε Καννάδα-Αγγλικά δεδομένα για την πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων', 'it': 'Creazione di Corpus e analisi in dati Twitter Code-Mixed Kannada-English per la Predizione Emozionale', 'hu': 'Corpus létrehozása és elemzés kódkevert kannada-angol Twitter adatokban az Emotion Prediction számára', 'lt': 'Creation of Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data for Emotion Prediction', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Кодталық Kannada- ағылшын Твиттер деректерінде Корпус және анализ құрылу', 'mk': 'Создавање на Корпус и анализа во код-мешани канадско-англиски Твитер податоци за предвидување на емоции', 'mn': 'Код-холбогдсон Каннада-Англи хэлний Твиттерийн мэдээллийн хувьсгал болон шинжилгээ үүсгэх', 'no': 'Oppretting av korpus og analyse i kodefelt Kannada-engelsk Twitter-data for førehandsvising av førehandsvising', 'ms': 'Cipta Corpus dan analisis dalam data Twitter Kannada-Inggeris campuran Kod untuk Prediksi Emosi', 'ml': 'കോഡ്- മിക്സെഡ് കാന്നാദ- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ട്രെയിന്\u200dറ് ഡേറ്റായി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെയും അന്യായം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത', 'sr': 'Stvorenje korpusa i analize u podacima Kannada-engleskog Twitter za predviđanje emocija', 'mt': 'Il-ħolqien ta’ Corpus u l-analiżi fid-dejta tat-Twitter Kannada-Ingliż imħallta bil-Kodiċi għat-Tbassir tal-Emożjonijiet', 'pl': 'Tworzenie korpusu i analiza w kodowo-mieszanych danych na Twitterze dla prognozowania emocji', 'so': 'Create Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-Ingiriis data for Digtoonka', 'sv': 'Skapande av korpus och analys i kodblandad kannada-engelska Twitter data för känsloförutsägelse', 'ta': 'Name', 'ro': 'Crearea corpului și analiza în date Twitter Code-Mixed Kannada-Engleză pentru predicția emoțională', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'کورپوس کی پیدائش اور تحلیل کی کوڈ-میکس کانڈا-انگلیسی ٹویٹر ڈیٹ کے لئے ایموٹیون پیش ڈیٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo ra Tập đoàn và phân tích theo mã trộn Kannada-English Twitter, dữ liệu về tính toán cảm xúc.', 'bg': 'Създаване на Корпус и анализ в кодово смесени канада-английски данни за предсказване на емоциите', 'da': 'Oprettelse af Corpus og analyse i Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data til Emotion Prediction', 'hr': 'Stvorenje korpusa i analize u podacima iz Kannada-engleskog Twitter-a za predviđanje emocija', 'nl': 'Creatie van Corpus en analyse in Code-Mixed Kannada-Engels Twitter data voor Emotie Prediction', 'de': 'Erstellung von Korpus und Analyse in Code-Mixed Kannada-Englisch Twitter Daten für Emotion Prediction', 'id': 'Creation of Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data for Emotion Prediction', 'ko': '정서 예측에 사용되는 Kannada-English 트위터 혼합 데이터 자료 라이브러리 생성 및 분석', 'fa': 'ایجاد کورپوس و تحلیل در داده\u200cهای کوندا-انگلیسی توئیتر برای پیشنهاد احساسات', 'sw': 'Creation of Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data for Emotion Prediction', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Creation of Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data for Emotion Prediction', 'tr': 'K철p체s Be첵ik Duramak 체챌in Kannada-I흫lis챌e Twitter Maglumatynda Be첵ik Ga첵힊artma Maglumaty', 'am': 'የቆርፓስ እና አስተያየት በCode-Mixed Kannada-Ingirical-Twitter data for Emotion Preference', 'hy': 'Կորպուսի ստեղծումը և վերլուծությունը Կանդադայի և անգլերենի կոդի խառնված Թվիթերի տվյալներում զգացմունքների կանխատեսման համար', 'az': 'Körpüs yaradılış və analizi Kod-Karışmış Kannada-İngilizci Twitter məlumatı Emotion Prediction üçün', 'bn': 'কোড-মিক্সেড কান্নাডা- ইংরেজী টুইটারের তথ্য তৈরি কর্পুস এবং বিশ্লেষণ', 'ca': "Creació de Corpus i anàlisi en dades de Twitter mixtes de codi Kannada-anglès per a predicció d'emocions", 'bs': 'Stvorenje korpusa i analize u podacima o Kannada-engleskom Twitter-u za predviđanje emocija', 'cs': 'Vytvoření korpusu a analýza v kódově smíšených kanádách-anglických Twitterových dat pro emoční predikci', 'et': 'Corpuse loomine ja analüüs koodisegatud kanada-inglise Twitteri andmetes emotsioonide ennustamiseks', 'fi': 'Corpuksen luominen ja analysointi Code-Mixed Kannada-Englanti Twitter data Emotion Ennustion', 'jv': 'Krolaha Kerpus karo edas kanggo kode-Mixed Kannate-Inggris Google data kanggo empation prediksion', 'he': 'יצירת קורפוס וניתוח במידע טוויטר קנדה-אנגלי מעורב', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje korpusa in analiza v kodno mešanih kanada-angleških Twitter podatkih za napoved čustev', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Creation of Corpus and analysis in Code-Mixed Kannada-English Twitter data for Emotion Prediction'}
{'en': 'Emotion prediction is a critical task in the field of Natural Language Processing (NLP). There has been a significant amount of work done in emotion prediction for resource-rich languages. There has been work done on code-mixed social media corpus but not on emotion prediction of Kannada-English code-mixed Twitter data. In this paper, we analyze the problem of emotion prediction on corpus obtained from code-mixed Kannada-English extracted from Twitter annotated with their respective ‘Emotion’ for each tweet. We experimented with machine learning prediction models using features like Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive characters, and others on SVM and LSTM on our corpus, which resulted in an accuracy of 30 % and 32 % respectively.', 'ar': 'التنبؤ العاطفي هو مهمة حاسمة في مجال معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). كان هناك قدر كبير من العمل الذي تم إنجازه في التنبؤ بالعواطف للغات الغنية بالموارد. كان هناك عمل تم إنجازه على مجموعة الوسائط الاجتماعية المختلطة بالشفرات ولكن ليس على التنبؤ العاطفي لبيانات تويتر المختلطة بالكانادا والإنجليزية. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتحليل مشكلة التنبؤ بالعاطفة على المجموعة التي تم الحصول عليها من لغة الكانادا-الإنجليزية المختلطة بالشفرة والمستخرجة من Twitter مع شرح "العاطفة" لكل تغريدة. لقد جربنا نماذج التنبؤ بالتعلم الآلي باستخدام ميزات مثل الأحرف N-Grams و Word N-Grams والأحرف المتكررة وغيرها على SVM و LSTM في مجموعتنا ، مما أدى إلى دقة 30٪ و 32٪ على التوالي.', 'es': 'La predicción de emociones es una tarea fundamental en el campo del procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Se ha realizado una cantidad significativa de trabajo en la predicción de emociones para lenguajes ricos en recursos. Se ha trabajado en el corpus de redes sociales con código mixto, pero no en la predicción de emociones de los datos de Twitter con código mixto de kannada e inglés. En este artículo, analizamos el problema de la predicción de emociones en el corpus obtenido de una mezcla de códigos kannada e inglés extraídos de Twitter anotados con sus respectivas «emociones» para cada tuit. Experimentamos con modelos de predicción de aprendizaje automático utilizando funciones como N-Gramas de caracteres, N-Gramas de palabras, Caracteres repetitivos y otras en SVM y LSTM en nuestro corpus, lo que dio como resultado una precisión del 30% y 32% respectivamente.', 'pt': "A previsão de emoções é uma tarefa crítica no campo do Processamento de Linguagem Natural (PNL). Tem havido uma quantidade significativa de trabalho feito na previsão de emoções para linguagens ricas em recursos. Tem havido trabalho feito no corpus de mídia social de código misto, mas não na previsão de emoção de dados do Twitter de código misto canará-inglês. Neste artigo, analisamos o problema de previsão de emoções em corpus obtidos a partir de código misto Kannada-Inglês extraído do Twitter anotado com sua respectiva 'Emoção' para cada tweet. Experimentamos modelos de previsão de aprendizado de máquina usando recursos como N-Grams de caracteres, N-Grams de palavras, caracteres repetitivos e outros em SVM e LSTM em nosso corpus, o que resultou em uma precisão de 30% e 32%, respectivamente.", 'fr': "La prédiction des émotions est une tâche essentielle dans le domaine du traitement du langage naturel (NLP). Un travail important a été réalisé en matière de prédiction des émotions pour les langues riches en ressources. Des travaux ont été réalisés sur le corpus de médias sociaux à code mixte, mais pas sur la prédiction des émotions des données Twitter mixtes kannada-anglais. Dans cet article, nous analysons le problème de la prédiction des émotions sur un corpus obtenu à partir de kannada-anglais de code extrait de Twitter annoté avec leur «\xa0Emotion\xa0» respective pour chaque tweet. Nous avons expérimenté des modèles de prédiction d'apprentissage automatique utilisant des fonctionnalités telles que les N-grammes de caractères, les N-grammes de mots, les caractères répétitifs et d'autres sur SVM et LSTM sur notre corpus, ce qui a donné une précision de 30\xa0% et 32\xa0% respectivement.", 'ja': '感情予測は、自然言語処理（ NLP ）の分野における重要なタスクです。リソースの豊富な言語の感情予測では、かなりの量の作業が行われてきました。コードミックスされたソーシャルメディアコーパスに関する研究は行われているが、カンナダ語と英語のコードミックスされたTwitterデータの感情予測に関する研究は行われていない。本論文では、Twitterから抽出したカンナダ語と英語の混合コードから得られたコーパス上の感情予測の問題を分析し、それぞれのツイートに対してそれぞれの「感情」を注釈付けた。私たちは、SVMとLSTM上のCharacter N - Grams、Word N - Grams、Repetitive charactersなどの機能を使用して機械学習予測モデルを実験し、それぞれ30%と32%の精度をもたらしました。', 'zh': '情者,自然语言理(NLP)域之要务也。 富于资,多于情。 已于代码合之社交媒体语料库,而未有卡纳达语 - 英语代码合之Twitter数之情也。 于本文中,析Twitter中取代码混合卡纳达语 - 英语得语料库情测之,各为推文注情。 尝试机器学占模,用SVM符N-Grams,Word N-Grams,重符与功能,于我语料库上生30%32%之准确率。', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование эмоций является критической задачей в области обработки естественного языка (NLP). Был проделан значительный объем работы по прогнозированию эмоций для языков, богатых ресурсами. Была проделана работа по созданию смешанного кода в социальных сетях, но не по прогнозированию эмоций в отношении данных Kannada-English, смешанных с кодом Twitter. В этой статье мы анализируем проблему предсказания эмоций на корпусе, полученном из смешанного кода Kannada-English, извлеченного из Twitter, аннотированного с их соответствующей «Эмоцией» для каждого твита. Мы экспериментировали с моделями предсказания машинного обучения, используя такие функции, как Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive characters и другие на SVM и LSTM на нашем корпусе, что привело к точности 30% и 32% соответственно.', 'hi': "भावना भविष्यवाणी प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) के क्षेत्र में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। संसाधन-समृद्ध भाषाओं के लिए भावनाओं की भविष्यवाणी में महत्वपूर्ण मात्रा में काम किया गया है। कोड-मिश्रित सोशल मीडिया कॉर्पस पर काम किया गया है, लेकिन कन्नड़-अंग्रेजी कोड-मिश्रित ट्विटर डेटा की भावनाओं की भविष्यवाणी पर नहीं। इस पेपर में, हम प्रत्येक ट्वीट के लिए अपने संबंधित 'भावना' के साथ एनोटेट किए गए ट्विटर से निकाले गए कोड-मिश्रित कन्नड़-अंग्रेजी से प्राप्त कॉर्पस पर भावना भविष्यवाणी की समस्या का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हमने अपने कॉर्पस पर एसवीएम और एलएसटीएम पर चरित्र एन-ग्राम, वर्ड एन-ग्राम, दोहराए जाने वाले वर्णों और अन्य जैसी सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके मशीन लर्निंग भविष्यवाणी मॉडल के साथ प्रयोग किया, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप क्रमशः 30% और 32% की सटीकता हुई।", 'ga': "Is tasc ríthábhachtach i réimse na Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP) é mothúcháin a thuar. Tá méid suntasach oibre déanta maidir le mothúcháin a thuar do theangacha saibhir acmhainní. Tá obair déanta ar chorpas cód-mheasctha meán sóisialta ach ní ar thuar mothúcháin ar shonraí Twitter códmheasctha Cannadais-Bhéarla. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le mothúcháin a thuar ar chorpas a fhaightear ó Chódmheasctha Cannadais-Bhéarla a bhaintear as Twitter agus an `Emotion' faoi seach acu le haghaidh gach tweet. Rinneamar trialacha ar mhúnlaí tuar foghlama meaisín ag baint úsáide as gnéithe cosúil le Carachtair N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Carachtair Athchleachtach, agus cinn eile ar SVM agus LSTM ar ár gcorpas, rud a raibh cruinneas 30% agus 32% faoi seach mar thoradh air.", 'ka': 'ემოციონის წინასწარმოდგენება არის კრიტიკური რაოდენობა Natural Language Processing (NLP) პანელში. მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო რაოდენობა, რომელიც ემოციონის წარმოდგენისთვის რესურსების ბეჭდვი ენებისთვის. სამუშაო სოციალური მედია კოპპუსში დავაკეთებულია, მაგრამ არა კანნნადი-ანგლისური კოდის შესაბამისი ტვირუტერის მონაცემებზე. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ემოციონის წარმოდგენის პრობლემა, რომელსაც კოპუსს მიიღებული კონნადი-ანგლისური კონნადიდან გამოყენებულია, რომელიც Twitter-დან გამოყენებული, რომელიც ყო ჩვენ გამოვიყენეთ მანქანის სწავლების მოდელებით, რომელიც გამოიყენეთ ფუნქციები როგორც სიმბოლობი N-გრამი, სიტყვა N-გრამი, რეპოვტიური სიმბოლობი და სხვები SVM და LSTM-ზე ჩვენი კორპუსში, რომელიც 30% და', 'el': 'Η πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων είναι ένα κρίσιμο έργο στον τομέα της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Έχει γίνει σημαντική εργασία για την πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων για γλώσσες πλούσιες σε πόρους. Έχει γίνει εργασία σχετικά με το σώμα των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης με μικτό κώδικα αλλά όχι για την πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων των δεδομένων του Καννάδα-Αγγλικού κώδικα-μικτού Twitter. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναλύουμε το πρόβλημα της πρόβλεψης συναισθημάτων στο σώμα που λαμβάνεται από κώδικα-μικτό Καννάδα-Αγγλικά που εξάγεται από το Twitter σχολιασμένο με το αντίστοιχο "Συναίσθημα" για κάθε tweet. Πειραματιστήκαμε με μοντέλα πρόβλεψης μηχανικής μάθησης χρησιμοποιώντας χαρακτηριστικά όπως Χαρακτήρας Ν-Γράμματος, λέξης Ν-Γράμματος, Επαναληπτικούς χαρακτήρες και άλλα στο σώμα μας, με αποτέλεσμα ακρίβεια 30% και 32% αντίστοιχα.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek előrejelzése kritikus feladat a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás (NLP) területén. Jelentős mennyiségű munka történt az érzelmek előrejelzésében az erőforrásokban gazdag nyelveken. Munkát végeztek a kódkevert közösségi média korpuszon, de nem a kannada-angol kódkevert Twitter adatok érzelmek előrejelzésén. Ebben a tanulmányban elemezzük az érzelmek előrejelzésének problémáját a Twitterről kivont kódkeverékből származó kannada-angol korpuszból, és minden tweethez megjegyzéssel ellátott "Érzelem". Gépi tanulási előrejelzési modellekkel kísérleteztünk olyan funkciókkal, mint a Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Ismétlődő karakterek és mások SVM és LSTM a korpuszon, ami 30%, illetve 32% pontosságot eredményezett.', 'kk': 'Көңіл көңіл алдын- ала көрсету - Түзіндік тіл процессорының (NLP) өрісінде маңызды тапсырмасы. Ресурс баяны тілдер үшін емоциялық таңдау үшін маңызды жұмыс болды. Код араластырылған социалдық медиа корпус жұмыс істеді, бірақ Каннада-ағылшын код араластырылған Twitter деректерінің емоциялық түсініктерінде емес. Бұл қағазында, біз корпус-ағылшынша көмектесілген күннада-ағылшынша Твиттерден таратылған эмоциялық таңдау мәселесін анализиру үшін әрбір tweet үшін "Эмоциялық" деп жазылады. Біз компьютерді оқыту үлгілерімен, N- грамм, N- грамм сөз, қайталанатын таңбалар және корпус бойынша SVM және LSTM бағдарламаларында тәжірибеледік. Бұл 30% мен 32% деген дұрыс болды.', 'ms': "Ramalan emosi adalah tugas kritik dalam medan Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP). Terdapat banyak kerja yang dilakukan dalam ramalan emosi untuk bahasa kaya sumber. Terdapat kerja dilakukan pada kod-campuran media sosial corpus tetapi tidak pada ramalan emosi dari data Twitter kod-campuran Kannada-Inggeris. In this paper, we analyze the problem of emotion prediction on corpus obtained from code-mixed Kannada-English extracted from Twitter annotated with their respective `Emotion' for each tweet.  Kami eksperimen dengan model ramalan pembelajaran mesin menggunakan ciri-ciri seperti Aksara N-Gram, Word N-Gram, Aksara Repetitif, dan yang lain pada SVM dan LSTM pada korpus kami, yang mengakibatkan keperluan 30% dan 32% respectively.", 'lt': "Emocijų prognozė yra labai svarbi gamtos kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) sritis. There has been a significant amount of work done in emotion prediction for resource-rich languages.  Buvo atliktas darbas kodų mišraus socialinės žiniasklaidos korpuso, bet ne kanados ir anglų kodų mišraus Twitter duomenų emocijų prognozės srityje. In this paper, we analyze the problem of emotion prediction on corpus obtained from code-mixed Kannada-English extracted from Twitter annotated with their respective `Emotion' for each tweet.  Eksperimentavome su mašin ų mokymosi prognozavimo modeliais, naudojant tokius požymius kaip Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive characters ir kiti SVM ir LSTM ant mūsų korpuso, dėl kurių tikslumas buvo atitinkamai 30 % ir 32 %.", 'it': "La previsione delle emozioni è un compito critico nel campo dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL). C'è stata una quantità significativa di lavoro fatto nella previsione delle emozioni per le lingue ricche di risorse. C'è stato un lavoro fatto sul corpus di social media misti in codice, ma non sulla previsione emotiva di dati Twitter misti in codice Kannada-inglese. In questo articolo, analizziamo il problema della predizione emotiva su corpus ottenuto da Kannada-Inglese codificato estratto da Twitter annotato con la rispettiva Emozione per ogni tweet. Abbiamo sperimentato modelli di previsione del machine learning utilizzando funzionalità come Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive character e altri su SVM e LSTM sul nostro corpus, che hanno portato ad una precisione rispettivamente del 30% e del 32%.", 'mk': "Предвидувањето на емоциите е критична задача во областа на природното обработување јазик (NLP). Има значителна количина работа направена во емоционалните предвидувања за јазици богати со ресурси. Работата е направена на код-мешаниот корпус на социјалните медиуми, но не на емоционалните предвидувања на канадско-англиските код-мешани Твитер податоци. In this paper, we analyze the problem of emotion prediction on corpus obtained from code-mixed Kannada-English extracted from Twitter annotated with their respective `Emotion' for each tweet.  We experimented with machine learning prediction models using features like Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive characters, and others on SVM and LSTM on our corpus, which resulted in an accuracy of 30% and 32% respectively.", 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ (NLP) പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രദേശത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ് വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d സമ്പത്തുള്ള ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന വികാരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ജോലി ചെയ്ത കോഡ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ജോലി നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ കാന്\u200dനാദ-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോഡ് മിഷ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ വികാരത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. കണക്കിലുള്ള കോഡ്\u200cമിക്ക് ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്ന് കൊണ്ടു We experimented with machine learning prediction models using features like Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive characters, and others on SVM and LSTM on our corpus, which resulted in an accuracy of 30% and 32% respectively.', 'mt': 'It-tbassir tal-emozzjonijiet huwa kompitu kritiku fil-qasam tal-Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLP). Kien hemm ammont sinifikanti ta’ xogħol li sar fit-tbassir emozzjonali għal lingwi rikki fir-riżorsi. Sar xogħol fuq code-mixed social media corpus iżda mhux fuq tbassir emozzjonali tad-dejta tat-Twitter code-mixed Kannada-English. F’dan id-dokument, aħna tanalizzaw il-problema tat-tbassir emozzjonali fuq il-korpus miksub minn kodiċi mħallat Kannada-Ingliż estratt minn Twitter annotat bl-‘Emozzjoni’ rispettiva tagħhom għal kull tweet. Esperimentajna b’mudelli ta’ tbassir tat-tagħlim bil-magna bl-użu ta’ karatteristiċi bħal Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, karatteristiċi ripetittivi, u oħrajn fuq SVM u LSTM fuq il-korpus tagħna, li rriżultaw f’preċiżjoni ta’ 30% u 32% rispettivament.', 'no': 'Førehandsvising er ein kritisk oppgåve i feltet for naturspråk- handsaming (NLP). Det har vært ein betydelig mengd arbeid gjort i følelsesforhåndsvising for ressursrykk språk. Det er gjort arbeid på kodeflikte sosialmedia-korpus, men ikkje på følelsesforhåndsvising av Kannada-engelsk kodeflikte Twitter-data. I denne papiret analyserer vi problemet med følelsesforhåndsvisinga om korpus som er henta frå kodefleksa Kannada-engelsk, utpakka frå Twitter som er merket med dei tilhøyrande «Emotion» for kvar tweet. Vi eksperimenterte med maskinelæringsprøvemodeller med funksjonar som teikn N- Gram, ord N- Gram, Repetitiv teikn og andre på SVM og LSTM på korpusen vårt, som resulterte i eit nøyaktig 30% og 32%.', 'mn': "Тархины таамаглал бол Байгалийн хэл Процессорын (NLP) талбарын чухал ажил юм. Нийтийн баян хэл дээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийн таамаглалд маш их ажил хийгдсэн. Код холбогдсон нийгмийн мэдээллийн корпус дээр ажил хийгдсэн. Гэхдээ Kannada-Англи хэлний код холбогдсон Twitter өгөгдлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн таамаглал дээр биш. Энэ цаасан дээр бид корпус дээрх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн таамаглалын асуудлыг шинжилгээ хийж байлаа. Каннадад-Англи хэлний хувьд Twitter-ээс хамтдаа хамтдаа авсан хүмүүсийн тухай тууйт бүрт 'Эмгэцэл' гэдэг нь Бид машины суралцах таамаглалтын загвартай туршилт хийсэн. Харин бидний корпус дээрх SVM болон LSTM-ийн өөр өөр хэлбэрүүдийг 30% болон 32% зөв болгосон.", 'ro': "Predicția emoțiilor este o sarcină critică în domeniul procesării limbajului natural (PNL). S-a făcut o cantitate semnificativă de muncă în predicția emoțiilor pentru limbile bogate în resurse. S-a făcut lucrări cu privire la corpul social media mixt de coduri, dar nu cu privire la predicția emoțională a datelor Twitter mixte de coduri kannada-engleze. În această lucrare, analizăm problema predicției emoțiilor pe corpul obținut din cod-mixt Kannada-Engleză extras din Twitter adnotat cu respectivul lor `Emoție' pentru fiecare tweet. Am experimentat modele de predicție a învățării automate folosind caracteristici precum Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, caractere repetitive și altele pe SVM și LSTM pe corpul nostru, ceea ce a dus la o acuratețe de 30% și respectiv 32%.", 'pl': 'Przewidywanie emocji jest kluczowym zadaniem w dziedzinie przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP). Wykonano znaczną ilość pracy w zakresie przewidywania emocji dla języków bogatych w zasoby. Przeprowadzono prace nad korpusem mediów społecznościowych z kodem mieszanym, ale nie nad przewidywaniem emocji danych na Twitterze Kannada-angielskim z kodem mieszanym. W niniejszym artykule analizujemy problem przewidywania emocji na korpusie uzyskanym z kodowo-mieszanego Kannada-angielskiego wydobytego z Twittera adnotacją odpowiednich emocji dla każdego tweeta. Eksperymentowaliśmy z modelami predykcyjnymi uczenia maszynowego wykorzystując funkcje takie jak znak N-Grams, Word N-Grams, powtarzające się znaki i inne na SVM i LSTM w naszym korpusie, co zaowocowało dokładnością 30% i 32% odpowiednio.', 'so': "Baxgelinta guurista waa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku yaala beerta baaritaanka afka asalka ah (NLP). Shaqo aad u badan ayaa lagu sameeyay wax la sii sheegayo luuqadaha rasmiga ah ee taajirka ah. Shaqo lagu sameeyay kooxda mitandada bulshada ee isku xiran, laakiin laguma arag wax ku saabsan sii sheegidda xisaabta ah ee kaanada-Ingiriiska oo ku xiran macluumaadka Twitterka. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku baaraynaa dhibaatada la sii sheegayo aragtida qofka laga soo helay kaanada-Ingiriiska oo laga soo saaray Twitterka, kaas oo lagu sharaxiyay qofka ka mid ah `Emotion'' Tweet kasta. Waxaynu ku jirrabnay muusikada wax ku barashada qaababka wax sii sheegidda, sida xaraf N-Grams, eray N-Grams, qof kale oo ku qoran SVM iyo LSTM korpus, taasoo ku sababtay qiyaastii 30% iyo 32% .", 'sv': "Emotion prediction är en viktig uppgift inom Natural Language Processing (NLP). Det har gjorts en betydande mängd arbete med känsloförutsägelse för resursrika språk. Det har gjorts arbete med kodblandad social media korpus men inte på känsloförutsägelse av Kannada-engelska kodblandad Twitter-data. I denna uppsats analyserar vi problemet med känsloförutsägelse på korpus erhållen från kodblandad kannada-engelska extraherad från Twitter kommenterad med respektive `Emotion' för varje tweet. Vi experimenterade med förutsägelsemodeller för maskininlärning med funktioner som Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive character och andra på SVM och LSTM på vår korpus, vilket resulterade i en noggrannhet på 30% respektive 32%.", 'ta': "இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் (NLP) புலத்தில் உணர்வு முக்கியமான பணியாகும். மூலம்- rich மொழிகளுக்கு உணர்வுகள் முன்னேற்றத்தில் செய்யப்பட்ட செயல்களின் மிக முக்கியமான அளவு உள்ளது. குறியீடு கலக்கப்பட்ட சமூக ஊடக குறியீட்டில் வேலை செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது ஆனால் கான்நாடா- ஆங்கிலத்தின் குறியீடு கலந்த த இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் பிரச்சனையை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு தொடர்புக்கும் 'உணர்வு' குறியீட்டு கலந்த கான்நாடா-ஆங்கிலம் இருந்து க நாங்கள் கணினி மாதிரிகளை முன்வாக்கி கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத்தி சோதனைப்பட்டோம் என்- கிராம்கள், வார்த்தை N- கிராம்கள், திரும்ப எழுத்துகள், மற்றும் மற்று", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය (NLP) ක්ෂේත්\u200dරයේ භාවිතාව ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාෂාවක් සඳහා හැඟිලි වැඩක් ගොඩක් වැඩ කරලා තියෙනවා. කන්නාඩ්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි කෝඩ් මිශ්\u200dරේෂික මාධ්\u200dයම කොර්පුස් වල වැඩ කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් කන්නාඩ්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි  මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරන්නේ කොර්පුස් ගැන හැඟීමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරන්නේ කැන්නාඩ්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි  අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අක්ෂර N-Grams, Word N-Grams, ආපහු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය අක්ෂර, සහ අනික් අපේ කොර්පුස් වල SVM සහ LSTM වලින්, ඒ වගේම අක්ෂ', 'ur': 'احساسات کی پیش بینی (NLP) طبیعی زبان پرسس کے کھیلے میں ایک ضروری کام ہے۔ احساسات کی پیش بینی میں بہت اہم کام کیا گیا ہے جو سرمایہ دار زبانوں کے لئے ہے۔ کینڈا-انگلیسی کوڈ-مmixed Twitter ڈاٹیور کے احساسات پیش بینی پر کام کیا گیا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے کورپوس پر احساس پیش بینی کا مسئلہ تحقیق کرلیا ہے جو کانڈا-انگلیسی سے ملی گئی تھی جو ٹویٹر سے اٹھائی گئی تھی ہر ٹویٹ کے لئے ان کے احساس کے ساتھ اٹھائی گئی تھی۔ ہم نے ماشین کی آزمائش کے ذریعہ پیش بینی موڈل کے مطابق آزمائش کی ہے کہ ہم نے کارٹر N-گرم، ویڈ N-گرم، دوبارہ تکرار کرنے والی علائم، اور ہمارے کورپوس پر SVM اور LSTM کے دوسرے لوگوں کے مطابق 30% اور 32%.', 'sr': "Predviđanje emocija je kritičan zadatak u oblasti procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP). Došlo je do značajne količine posla u predviđanju emocija za bogate jezike resursa. Napravljen je posao o kompleksu socijalnih medija, ali ne o emocijskom predviđanju podataka o Kannada-engleskom kodu miješanom Twitter-u. U ovom papiru analiziramo problem predviđanja emocija o korpusu koji je dobio od kodiranog Kannada-engleskog izvlačenog iz Twittera koji je navodio svoj odgovarajući 'Emotion' za svaki tweet. Eksperimentirali smo sa modelima predviđanja mašine koristeći karaktere kao što su karakter N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitivni znakovi i drugi na SVM i LSTM na našem korpusu, što je rezultiralo tačnost od 30% i 32%.", 'uz': "Name Mavzu tillar uchun hissiyotni tahrirlash uchun juda katta ishni bajardi. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz Twitterdan qanday qanada-ingliz tildan tashkilgan hisob-hisoblash muvaffaqiyatlarini aniqlamiz va har bir Twitterdan 'Emotion' bilan bir xil Twitterdan tashkilotga ega bo'lgan. Biz kompyuterning SVM va LSTM kabi boshqalarni o'rganish modellari bilan o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish imkoniyatini ko'rsatdik. Bu bir xil 30% va 32% foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Việc dự đoán cảm xúc là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong lĩnh vực xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP). Đã có rất nhiều việc làm trong dự đoán cảm xúc về ngôn ngữ giàu tài nguyên. Đã có công việc về hệ thống truyền thông xã hội hỗn hợp mã nhưng không phải về dự đoán cảm xúc của Kannada-English mã trộn các dữ liệu Twitter. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi phân tích vấn đề của dự đoán cảm xúc trên tập thể hình lấy từ Kannada-English được mã trộn từ Twitter được ghi chú với chính thức "Emotion" của họ cho mỗi tweet. Chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm với các mô hình dự đoán về máy móc, sử dụng các tính năng như Ký tự N-Grams, Từ N-Grams, Repetitive ký tự, và những nhân vật khác trên SVM và LSTM trên cơ thể chúng tôi, kết quả là độ chính xác của 30. và 32.', 'bg': 'Прогнозирането на емоциите е критична задача в областта на обработката на естествения език (НЛП). Има значително количество работа, извършена в прогнозирането на емоциите за богати на ресурси езици. Работа е направена върху кодово смесен корпус на социалните медии, но не и върху емоционалното прогнозиране на данни от Туитър с кодово смесен език. В настоящата статия анализираме проблема с предсказването на емоциите върху корпус, получен от кодово смесено канада-английски извлечен от Туитър, анотиран със съответната им "емоция" за всеки туит. Експериментирахме с модели за прогнозиране на машинно обучение, използвайки функции като символ Н-грами, дума Н-грами, повтарящи се знаци и други на нашия корпус, което доведе до точност съответно 30% и 32%.', 'hr': "Predviđanje emocija je kritičan zadatak u području procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP). Došlo je do značajne količine posla u predviđanju emocija za bogate jezike resursa. Napravljen je posao o korpusu socijalnih medija, ali ne o emocijskim predviđanjima podataka o Kannada-engleskom kodu pomiješanim Twitter-om. U ovom papiru analiziramo problem predviđanja emocija o korpusu koji je dobio iz koda pomiješanog Kannada-engleskog izvlačenog iz Twitter-a navedenog svojim odgovarajućim 'emocijama' za svaki tweet. Eksperimentirali smo s modelima predviđanja strojeva koji koriste funkcije poput karaktera N-Grama, Riječ N-Grama, Repetitivnih znakova i drugih na SVM i LSTM na našem korpusu, što je rezultiralo točnost od 30% i 32%.", 'nl': "Emotievoorspelling is een cruciale taak op het gebied van Natural Language Processing (NLP). Er is een aanzienlijke hoeveelheid werk gedaan in emotie voorspelling voor hulpbronnen rijke talen. Er is gewerkt aan code-mixed social media corpus, maar niet aan emotie voorspelling van Kannada-Engelse code-mixed Twitter data. In dit artikel analyseren we het probleem van emotie voorspelling op corpus verkregen uit code-gemengd Kannada-Engels geëxtraheerd uit Twitter met hun respectievelijke `Emotie' voor elke tweet. We experimenteerden met voorspellingsmodellen voor machine learning met functies zoals Teken N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitieve tekens, en andere op SVM en LSTM op ons corpus, wat resulteerde in een nauwkeurigheid van respectievelijk 30% en 32% .", 'da': "Følelsesforudsigelse er en kritisk opgave inden for Natural Language Processing (NLP). Der har været udført en betydelig mængde arbejde med følelsesforudsigelse for ressourcerige sprog. Der har været arbejde udført på kode-blandet sociale medier korpus, men ikke på følelsesforudsigelse af Kannada-engelsk kode-blandet Twitter data. I denne artikel analyserer vi problemet med følelsesforudsigelse på korpus opnået fra kode-blandet Kannada-engelsk udvundet fra Twitter kommenteret med deres respektive `Emotion' for hver tweet. Vi eksperimenterede med maskinlæringsforudsigelsesmodeller ved hjælp af funktioner som Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive tegn og andre på SVM og LSTM på vores korpus, hvilket resulterede i en nøjagtighed på henholdsvis 30% og 32%.", 'de': 'Emotionsvorhersage ist eine kritische Aufgabe im Bereich der Natural Language Processing (NLP). Es wurde viel Arbeit an der Emotionsvorhersage für ressourcenreiche Sprachen geleistet. Es wurde an Code-Mixed Social Media Corpus gearbeitet, aber nicht an Emotion Vorhersage von Kannada-Englisch Code-Mixed Twitter Daten. In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir das Problem der Emotionsvorhersage auf Korpus aus kodemischtem Kannada-Englisch, das aus Twitter extrahiert wurde und mit ihrer jeweiligen Emotion für jeden Tweet kommentiert wurde. Wir experimentierten mit Vorhersagemodellen für maschinelles Lernen mit Funktionen wie Zeichen N-Grams, Wort N-Grams, Wiederholende Zeichen und andere auf SVM und LSTM auf unserem Korpus, was zu einer Genauigkeit von 30% bzw. 32% führte.', 'id': "Prediksi emosi adalah tugas kritis dalam bidang Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP). Ada banyak pekerjaan yang dilakukan dalam prediksi emosi untuk bahasa kaya sumber daya. Ada pekerjaan yang dilakukan pada kode-campuran media sosial corpus tapi bukan pada prediksi emosi dari data Twitter kode-campuran Kannada-Inggris. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis masalah prediksi emosi pada corpus yang diperoleh dari kode-campuran Kannada-Inggris ekstrakt dari Twitter yang dicatat dengan sesuai 'Emosi' mereka untuk setiap tweet. Kami eksperimen dengan model prediksi pembelajaran mesin menggunakan ciri-ciri seperti Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, karakter Repetitive, dan lainnya pada SVM dan LSTM pada tubuh kami, yang mengakibatkan akurasi 30% dan 32% respectively.", 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی احساسات یک کار مهمی در زمینه\u200cی پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) است. در پیش بینی احساسات برای زبانهای ثروتمند منبع کار بسیار بزرگی انجام شده است. کاری روی کورپوس رسانه های اجتماعی با کد مختلف شده انجام شده است ولی نه روی پیش بینی احساسات از داده های کد انگلیسی با کد مختلف شده توئیتر. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل پیش بینی احساسات در مورد کورپوس را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که از کاننادا-انگلیسی که از توئیتر استخراج شده\u200cاند، با احساسات احساساتشان برای هر توئیت آشکار شده است. ما با مدل پیش بینی یادگیری ماشین آزمایش کردیم با استفاده از ویژگی\u200cهایی مثل karakter N-Grams, Word N-Grams، شخصیت\u200cهای تکرار و دیگران روی SVM و LSTM روی کورپوس ما، که به طور مستقیم ۳۰ درصد و ۳۲ درصد به نتیجه رسید.', 'sw': 'Utabiri wa hisia ni kazi muhimu katika eneo la utaratibu wa lugha ya asili (NLP). Kumekuwa na kiasi kikubwa cha kazi kilichofanywa katika utabiri wa hisia kwa lugha zenye utajiri wa rasilimali. Kumekuwa na kazi iliyofanyika kwenye mashirika ya mitandao ya kijamii yanayochanganyika lakini sio kwa kutabiri hisia za taarifa zilizochanganyika kwa kannada-Kiingereza za za twita. Katika gazeti hili, tunachambua tatizo la utabiri wa hisia kwenye makampuni yaliyopatikana kutoka kwa makampuni yaliyochanganyika na Kannada-Kiingereza yaliyotolewa kwenye mtandao wa Twita na kutangazwa kwa heshima yao kwa kila twiti. Tulijaribu kwa mifano ya mashine ya kujifunza utabiri kwa kutumia vipengele kama Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, wahusika wa Repetitive, na wengine kwenye SVM na LSTM kwenye makampuni yetu, ambayo ilisababisha uhakika wa asilimia 30 na 32% kwa asilimia.', 'ko': "정서 예측은 자연 언어 처리 분야의 중요한 임무이다.자원이 풍부한 언어에 대해 사람들은 감정 예측 방면에서 많은 일을 했다.코드가 혼합된 소셜미디어 자료 라이브러리에 대한 연구는 있었지만 카나다 영어 코드가 트위터 데이터를 혼합한 감정 예측에 대해서는 연구가 없었다.본고에서 트위터에서 추출한 코드가 혼합된 카나다 영어 자료 라이브러리의 감정 예측 문제를 분석한 결과, 이 자료 라이브러리는 트위터마다 각각'감정'주석을 달았다.우리의 어료 라이브러리에서 우리는 SVM과 LSTM의 문자 N-gram, 단어 N-gram, 중복 문자 등 특징을 이용하여 기계 학습 예측 모델을 실험했는데 그 정확도는 각각 30%와 32% 였다.", 'tr': "Taýdaly dil işleýän sahypada (NLP) duýdury önlemek wajyp täblikdir. Ressourt baý diller üçin duýgulanma öngörünmelerinde örän köp iş bar. Kannada-Iňlisçe karışyk Twitter maglumatynyň duýgynda işlenýän işi bar. Bu kagyzda, biz korpusyň cödleşdirilen kannada-iňlisçe kelläp alan duýgyş öngörümleriniň meselelerini Twitter-dan aýrylyşýarys we her tweet üçin 'Emotion' diýip kabul edildi. Biz maşynyň öwrenmek nusgalary bilen Karakter N-Gram, Word N-Gram ýaly karakterler we corpusyň üstünde SVM we LSTM döwletleri ulanyp synanyşdyrdyk. Bu sebäpli 30% we 32% degişlidi.", 'af': "Emosie voorskou is 'n kritiese taak in die veld van Natuurlike Taal Prosessering (NLP). Daar is 'n betekende hoeveelheid werk gedoen in emosie voorskou vir hulpbron ryk tale. Daar is werk gedoen op kode gemengde sosiale media korpus, maar nie op emosie voorskou van Kannada-Engels kode gemengde Twitter data nie. In hierdie papier, ons analyseer die probleem van emosie voorskou op korpus wat van kode gemengde Kannada-Engels uit Twitter uitgevoer het wat met hulle respektief 'Emotie' vir elke tweet uitgevoer het. Ons het eksperimenteer met masjien leer voorskou modele wat gebruik funksies soos Karakter N- Grams, Woord N- Grams, Herhaal karakters en ander op SVM en LSTM op ons korpus, wat resulteer in 'n presies van 30% en 32%.", 'sq': "Parashikimi i emocioneve është një detyrë kritike në fushën e procesimit të gjuhës natyrore (NLP). Ka patur një sasi të rëndësishme punë të bërë në parashikimin e emocioneve për gjuhët e pasura me burime. Ka bërë punë në kodin e përzier të korpusit të medias shoqërore por jo në parashikimin emocional të të dhënave të përziera të Twitter-it Kannada-Anglisht. Në këtë letër, ne analizojmë problemin e parashikimit të emocioneve në korpus të fituar nga kodi i përzier Kanada-Anglisht të nxjerrë nga Twitter të anotuar me 'Emocion' e tyre respektive për çdo tweet. Eksperimentuam me modelet e parashikimit të mësimit të makinave duke përdorur karaktere si Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, karaktere repetitive, dhe të tjerë në SVM dhe LSTM në trupin tonë, që rezultuan në një saktësi prej 30% dhe 32% respektivisht.", 'am': 'የኢትዮጵያ ምርጫዎች የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት መሬት ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ ስራ ነው፡፡ ለሀብት-ሀብታሞች ቋንቋዎች ለመፍጠር ብዙ ሥራ ተደረገ፡፡ የኮድ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ካርፓስ ላይ የሚቀላቀል ሥራ ተደረገ፤ ነገር ግን የካናዳ-እንግሊዘኛ የTwita ዳታዎችን የተቀላቀለ የኢንጂል ቃላት ለመፍጠር አይደለም፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች፣ የቆርፓስ ድምፅ ከኮንዶ ካናዳ-እንግሊዘኛ የተለየውን የኢንተርኔት “Emotion” ለሁሉም በትዊተር ላይ በሚያስታውቀው የኢትዮጵያውን ትንቢት እናስተምር፡፡ የፊደል ምርጫዎች የN-Grams፣ ቃላት N-Grams፣ የሥፋት ፊደል እና ሌሎችን SVM እና LSTM በኮርፓስ ላይ በተመሳሳይ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች ፈተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Էմոցիաների կանխատեսումը շատ կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերլուծության ոլորտում: Շատ կարևոր աշխատանք է կատարվել ռեսուրսներով հարուստ լեզուների զգացմունքների կանխատեսման մեջ: Աշխատանք կատարվել է կոդի խառնված սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների կորպոսի վրա, բայց ոչ Կանադայի-Անգլերենի կոդի խառնված Թվիթերի տվյալների էմոցիոնալ կանխատեսման վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերլուծում ենք մարմնի զգացմունքների կանխատեսման խնդիրը, որը ստացվում է Թվիթերից ստացված Կանադայի-Անգլերենի խառնված կոդից, որոնք գրված են յուրաքանչյուր թվիթերի համար իրենց "զգացմունքներով": Մենք փորձեցինք մեքենային ուսումնասիրության կանխատեսման մոդելների հետ, օգտագործելով նմանատիպ առանձնահատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են Ն-Գրամսը, Բառը N-Գրամսը, կրկնվող առանձնահատկությունները, և այլ առանձնահատկություններ մեր մարմնի վրա, որոնք արդյունքում են 30 և 32', 'az': 'Emotiyon tədbir tədbir təhsil dil işləməsi (NLP) sahəsində kritik bir işdir. Çox möhkəm bir iş var ki, çox çox qüvvətli dillər üçün emosiyal tədbir edilmişdir. Kannada-İngilizə kodu karıştırılmış Twitter məlumatlarının emosiyalı tədbir edilməsində işlər yarandı. Bu kağıtda, hər tweet üçün "Emotion" olaraq Twitter-dən çıxarılmış Kannada-İngilizdən alınan korpus haqqında duygusal tədbirlərinin problemini analiz edirik. Biz maşına öyrənmək modelləri ilə təcrübə göstərdik. Karakter N-Gram, N-Gram sözləri, Tövratlı Karakterlər və korpus üstündə SVM və LSTM kimi başqaları ilə təcrübə etdik. Bu da 30%-dən və 32%-dən tamamlandı.', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার (এনএলপি) ক্ষেত্রে (এনএলপি) একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। অনুভূতির ভবিষ্যৎবাণীতে অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ করা হয়েছে সম্পদ-সমৃদ্ধ ভাষায়। কোড মিশ্রিত সামাজিক মিডিয়া কোর্পাসে কাজ করা হয়েছে কিন্তু কান্নাদা-ইংরেজী কোড মিশ্রিত টুইটার তথ্যের আবেগের ভব এই পত্রিকায় আমরা কোড মিশ্রিত কান্নাদা-ইংরেজি থেকে টুইটার থেকে বেরিয়ে নেওয়া অনুভূতির ভবিষ্যতের সমস্যা বিশ্লেষণ করি যা তাদের প্রতিটি টুইটের জন্য ‘ আমরা মেশিনের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী মডেল শিক্ষা নিয়ে পরীক্ষা করেছি যেমন চার্টার N-গ্রাম, ওয়ার্ড এন-গ্রাম, প্রতিনিধি চরিত্র, আর অন্যরা আমাদের কোর্পাসে এস্ভিএম এবং এলস্টিএ', 'ca': "La predicció emocional és una tasca crítica en el camp del processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP). Hi ha hagut una quantitat significativa de treball fet en la predicció emocional de llengües rics en recursos. S'ha fet treball en un cos de mitjans socials mixts de codi però no en la predicció emocional de dades de Twitter mixtes Kannada-anglès. En aquest article analitzem el problema de la predicció emocional del corpus obtingut a partir de codi mixte Kannada-anglès extraït de Twitter anotat amb la seva respectiva 'Emoció' per cada tweet. Hem experimentat amb models de predicció d'aprenentatge màquinari utilitzant característiques com Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Caracters Repetitius i altres en SVM i LSTM al nostre cos, que van resultar en una precisió del 30% i 32%, respectivament.", 'cs': 'Emoční predikce je kritickým úkolem v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). Bylo vykonáno značné množství práce v predikci emocí pro jazyky bohaté na zdroje. Byla provedena práce na korpusu sociálních médií s kódem smíšeným, ale nikoli na předpovědi emocí kannadsko-anglických kódem smíšených dat Twitteru. V tomto článku analyzujeme problém predikce emocí na korpusu získaném z kódově smíšeného kannada-angličtiny extrahovaného z Twitteru s anotovanými příslušnými emocemi pro každý tweet. Experimentovali jsme s predikčními modely strojového učení pomocí funkcí, jako jsou znak N-Grams, slovo N-Grams, opakující se znaky a další na SVM a LSTM na našem korpusu, což vedlo k přesnosti 30% a 32% respektive.', 'bs': 'Predviđanje emocija je kritičan zadatak u oblasti procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP). Došlo je do značajne količine posla u predviđanju emocija za bogate jezike resursa. Radilo se o korpusu socijalnih medija, ali ne o emocijskim predviđanjima podataka o Kannada-engleskom kodu u kombinaciji Twitter-a. U ovom papiru analiziramo problem predviđanja emocija o korpusu koji je dobio od kodiranog Kannada-engleskog izvlačenog iz Twittera koji je naveden svojim odgovarajućim "Emotijom" za svaki tweet. Eksperimentirali smo sa modelima predviđanja mašine koristeći karaktere kao što su karakter N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitivni znakovi i drugi na SVM i LSTM na našem korpusu, što je rezultiralo tačnost od 30% i 32%.', 'et': 'Emotsioonide ennustamine on loodusliku keele töötlemise (NLP) valdkonnas kriitiline ülesanne. Ressurssirikkate keelte emotsioonide ennustamisel on tehtud märkimisväärselt tööd. Tööd on tehtud koodisegatud sotsiaalmeedia korpusega, kuid mitte Kannada-Inglise koodisegatud Twitteri andmete emotsioonide ennustamisega. Käesolevas töös analüüsime emotsioonide ennustamise probleemi korpusel, mis on saadud Twitterist koostatud koodiseguga Kannada-Inglise keeles ja mis on iga säutsu kohta märgitud vastava emotsiooniga. Me eksperimenteerisime masinõppe ennustusmudelitega, kasutades selliseid funktsioone nagu märk N-grammid, sõna N-grammid, korduvad märgid ja teised meie korpuses SVM ja LSTM, mille tulemuseks oli täpsus vastavalt 30% ja 32%.', 'fi': "Tunteiden ennustaminen on kriittinen tehtävä luonnollisen kielen prosessoinnissa (NLP). Resurssirikkaiden kielten tunteiden ennustamisessa on tehty paljon työtä. Koodi-sekoitetun sosiaalisen median korpusta on tehty työtä, mutta ei Kannada-Englanti-koodisekoitetun Twitter-datan tunteiden ennustamisesta. Tässä artikkelissa analysoimme tunteiden ennustamisen ongelmaa, joka on saatu Twitteristä saadusta koodisekoitetusta kannada-englannista, johon on merkitty kunkin twiitin 'Emotion'. Kokeilimme koneoppimisen ennustusmalleja käyttäen ominaisuuksia kuten Character N-Grams, Word N-Grams, Repetitive characters ja muut SVM ja LSTM korpussamme, mikä johti 30% tarkkuuteen ja 32% tarkkuuteen.", 'jv': "Monday Ana akeh akeh sing nggawé ning langgar sampeyan ingkang éntuk. Ora ono mulai nggawe barang karo kode-karo media sotiki dadi, pero ora ono mulasakno karo perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno sing diranggunaké Kanadan-ingles kode-karo Google Nang pepulan iki, awake dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan karo kuwi tindakan karo perusahaan sing nyimpen karo kode melungisan Kannate-Inggris sing ngerasakno nang Google nganggo perusahaan 'EMOtion' kanggo saben siwit. Awak dhéwé énong beraksi karo sistem cilbengan karo model sing nyimpen karo karo caratar N-Gram, Word N-Gram, Refetive, karo kene nambah karo SVM lan LTT nang sak bodha, dadi nambah 30% lan 32%.", 'ha': "Yi gabanin Farawa yana da wani aikin muhimmi a cikin field da aikin Farawa na Asuraci (NLP). An sami gwargwadon aiki mai girma cikin kunyar hisabi wa lugha masu riki. An sami wani aikin da aka yi kodi-da-haɗe mitandaki na jamii, kuma ba a yi bayani ga hisani da aka yi bayani ga kannada-Ingiriya kodi-Mixed data na Twitter. Daga wannan takardan, Munã anayya masu matsari da ake yi wa hisãbi a kannada-Ingirinsa da aka samar da shi daga Twitter na haɗi da muhimmin `Tafiya' wa kõwane Twitter. Mun jarraba misãlai masu karatun bayani na kafin da za'a yi amfani da su kamar Character N-Gram, Kalmar N-Gram, da wasu masu karatun SvM da LSSM kan karatunmu, da kuma ta ƙara taƙaitaccen shekara 30% da 320.", 'he': 'חיזוי רגשות הוא משימה קריטית בשטח תהליך שפות טבעית (NLP). יש כמות משמעותית של עבודה שנעשתה בחזוי רגשות לשפות עשירות במשאבים. There has been work done on code-mixed social media corpus but not on emotion prediction of Kannada-English code-mixed Twitter data.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מנתחים את הבעיה של חיזוי רגשות על קורפוס שנקבל מהקוד מעורבב קננדה-אנגלית שנוציא מטוויטר ניסינו עם דוגמנים של חיזוי ללמוד מכונות באמצעות תכונות כמו האופיינים N-Grams, Word N-Grams, אופיינים חוזרים, ואחרים על SVM ו LSTM על הקורפוס שלנו, מה שהוביל בדיקת של 30% ו-32% בהתאם.', 'sk': 'Napovedovanje čustev je ključna naloga na področju obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP). Pri napovedovanju čustev za jezike, bogate z viri, je bilo opravljenega veliko dela. Delo je bilo opravljeno na korpusu družbenih omrežij z mešanimi kodami, vendar ne na področju napovedovanja čustev kanade-angleških kod mešanih Twitter podatkov. V prispevku analiziramo problem napovedovanja čustev na korpusu, pridobljenem iz kodno mešanega kanada-angleščine, pridobljenega iz Twitterja z oznakami "Emotion" za vsak tweet. V našem korpusu smo eksperimentirali z modeli napovedovanja strojnega učenja z uporabo funkcij, kot so znak N-gram, beseda N-gram, ponavljajoči se znaki in drugi na SVM in LSTM, kar je povzročilo natančnost 30% oziroma 32%.', 'bo': 'སྣང་བརྙན་རིས་མཐུན་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལྟ་བ་ཅིག་རེད། སེམས་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ཅན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་རྩིས་མང་པོ་ཡོད་པ་རེད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལས་ཀ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་མཁན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་མཐོང་ཚར་བ་ཅིན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། རྒྱུ་ན་ཌི་-ཨིན་ཇིའི་རྩ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ལག་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་སྟོན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་བཏུབ་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད།'}
{'en': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization : a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'ar': 'التقييم العادل في تطبيع المفهوم: تحليل مقارن واسع النطاق للنماذج القائمة على BERT', 'es': 'Evaluación justa en la normalización de conceptos: un análisis comparativo a gran escala para modelos basados en BERT', 'pt': 'Avaliação justa na normalização de conceitos: uma análise comparativa em larga escala para modelos baseados em BERT', 'fr': 'Évaluation équitable dans la normalisation des concepts\xa0: une analyse comparative à grande échelle pour les modèles basés sur BERT', 'ja': '概念正規化における公正な評価： BERTベースのモデルの大規模比較分析', 'hi': 'अवधारणा सामान्यीकरण में उचित मूल्यांकन: BERT-आधारित मॉडल के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण', 'zh': '大概归一化平评:基于BERT之大较', 'ru': 'Справедливая оценка при нормализации концепции: крупномасштабный сравнительный анализ для моделей на основе BERT', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht Chóir i Normalú Coincheapa: Anailís Chomparáideach ar Mhórscála le haghaidh Múnlaí bunaithe ar BERT', 'it': "Valutazione equa nella normalizzazione dei concetti: un'analisi comparativa su larga scala per modelli basati su BERT", 'el': 'Δίκαιη Αξιολόγηση στην Κανονικοποίηση Έννοιας: Μια Συγκριτική Ανάλυση μεγάλης κλίμακας για μοντέλα βασισμένα στο BERT', 'lt': 'Sąžiningas sąvokų normalizavimo vertinimas: didelio masto lyginamoji analizė pagal BERT grindžiamus modelius', 'mk': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'hu': 'Tisztess챕ges 챕rt챕kel챕s a koncepci처normaliz찼ci처ban: nagyszab찼s첬 철sszehasonl챠t처 elemz챕s BERT-alap첬 modellekhez', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ് നോര്\u200dമിലേഷനില്\u200d സഹജമായ പരിശോധന: BERT-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡിളുകള്\u200d', 'kk': 'Концепция нормализациясындағы дұрыс оқу: BERT- негіздеген үлкен масштабтағы салыстыру талдауы', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni Ġusta fin-Normalizzazzjoni tal-Kunċett: Analiżi komparattiva fuq skala kbira għal Mudelli bbażati fuq BERT', 'ka': 'კონცექტის ნორმალიზაციაში მარტივი განსაზღვრება: BERT- დაბათი მოდელებისთვის დიდი მარტივი განსაზღვრებული ანალიზაცია', 'mn': 'БЕРТ-ын үндсэн загваруудын том хэмжээний харьцуулалт', 'ro': 'Evaluarea echitabilă în normalizarea conceptului: o analiză comparativă la scară largă pentru modele bazate pe BERT', 'pl': 'Uczciwa ocena w normalizacji koncepcji: duża analiza porównawcza modeli opartych na BERT', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය: BERT- අධාරිත මොඩල් විශේෂණය විශේෂණය', 'no': 'Feil evaluering i konseptnormalisering: ein stor skala sammenligning analyse for BERT-basert modeller', 'sr': 'Poštena procjena u Normalizaciji koncepta: velika skala usporedna analiza modela na BERT-u', 'sv': 'Rättvis utvärdering i konceptnormalisering: en storskalig jämförande analys för BERT-baserade modeller', 'ms': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'so': 'Qiimeynta saxda ee ku qoran Normalization: a Large scale Comparative Analyse for BERT-based Models', 'ta': 'கான்செப்ட் இயல்பாக்குதலில் சரியான மதிப்பீடு: BERT- அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மாதிரிகளுக்கான பெரிய அளவு ஒப்பிடும் ஒப்பி', 'ur': 'BERT-based Models کے لئے بہت بڑی مقدار مقدار تحقیقات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá hợp lý trong quy định hóa: A Large-scale Comprative Analysis for BERT based Models', 'bg': 'Справедлива оценка на концептуалната нормализация: мащабен сравнителен анализ на базираните модели', 'nl': 'Eerlijke evaluatie in conceptnormalisatie: een grootschalige vergelijkende analyse voor BERT-gebaseerde modellen', 'da': 'Retfærdig evaluering i konceptnormalisering: en sammenlignende analyse i stor skala for BERT-baserede modeller', 'hr': 'Poštena procjena u normalizaciji koncepta: Velika razmjena usporedna analiza modela na BERT-u', 'de': 'Faire Evaluation in der Konzeptnormalisierung: eine großflächige Vergleichsanalyse für BERT-basierte Modelle', 'id': 'Evaluasi Fair in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'ko': '개념 규범화에서의 공평한 평가: 버트 모델을 바탕으로 대규모 비교 분석', 'fa': 'ارزیابی عادلانه در مفهوم عادلانه: یک تحلیل مقایسه بزرگ برای مدل\u200cهای بنیاد BERT', 'sw': 'Tathmini sahihi katika Uhalilishaji wa Koncept: Uchambuzi Mkubwa wa Kigaidi kwa ajili ya Modeli zilizoko BERT', 'af': "Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalisation: ' n Groot- scale Relatiewe Analisie vir BERT- gebaseerde Modelle", 'sq': 'Vlerësim i ndershëm në Normalizimin e Koncepteve: një Analizë krahasuese në shkallë të madhe për modelet me bazë në BERT', 'tr': 'Ma첵yp Ta첵첵arlama Mazmunlygynda 횦체klen첵채r: BERT tabanly Modeller 체챌in Ullakan Resmi Ta첵첵arlama', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'ԲԵՌՏ-ի հիմնված մոդելների մեծ համեմատական վերլուծություն', 'az': 'Gözəl Normalizasyonda ədalətli değerlendirmə: BERT tabanlı Modellər üçün böyük ölçülü saldırıcı Analizi', 'bn': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'bs': 'Poštena procjena u normalizaciji koncepta: velika skala usporedna analiza modela baziranih na BERT-u', 'ca': 'Evaluació justa en la normalització del concepte: un anàlisi comparatiu a gran escala de models basats en BERT', 'cs': 'Správné hodnocení v koncepční normalizaci: rozsáhlá srovnávací analýza modelů založených na BERT', 'et': 'Õiglane hindamine kontseptsioonide normaliseerimises: BERT-põhiste mudelite laiaulatuslik võrdlev analüüs', 'fi': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'jv': 'Password hint', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion', 'sk': 'Pošteno ocenjevanje konceptne normalizacije: obsežna primerjalna analiza za modele, ki temeljijo na BERT', 'he': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models', 'bo': 'Fair Evaluation in Concept Normalization: a Large-scale Comparative Analysis for BERT-based Models'}
{'en': 'Linking of biomedical entity mentions to various terminologies of chemicals, diseases, genes, adverse drug reactions is a challenging task, often requiring non-syntactic interpretation. A large number of biomedical corpora and state-of-the-art models have been introduced in the past five years. However, there are no general guidelines regarding the evaluation of models on these corpora in single- and cross-terminology settings. In this work, we perform a comparative evaluation of various benchmarks and study the efficiency of state-of-the-art neural architectures based on Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) for linking of three entity types across three domains : research abstracts, drug labels, and user-generated texts on drug therapy in English. We have made the source code and results available at https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ar': 'يعتبر ربط الكيانات الطبية الحيوية بمصطلحات مختلفة من المواد الكيميائية والأمراض والجينات والتفاعلات الدوائية الضارة مهمة صعبة ، وغالبًا ما تتطلب تفسيرًا غير نحوي. تم تقديم عدد كبير من الهيئات الطبية الحيوية وأحدث النماذج في السنوات الخمس الماضية. ومع ذلك ، لا توجد إرشادات عامة فيما يتعلق بتقييم النماذج على هذه المجموعات في إعدادات المصطلحات الفردية وعبر المصطلحات. في هذا العمل ، نجري تقييمًا مقارنًا لمعايير مختلفة ودراسة كفاءة أحدث البنى العصبية بناءً على تمثيلات التشفير ثنائية الاتجاه من المحولات (BERT) لربط ثلاثة أنواع من الكيانات عبر ثلاثة مجالات: ملخصات البحث ، المخدرات التسميات والنصوص التي أنشأها المستخدمون حول العلاج بالعقاقير باللغة الإنجليزية. لقد جعلنا شفرة المصدر والنتائج متاحة على https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'es': 'La vinculación de las menciones de entidades biomédicas con diversas terminologías de sustancias químicas, enfermedades, genes y reacciones adversas a medicamentos es una tarea desafiante, que a menudo requiere una interpretación no sintáctica. En los últimos cinco años se ha introducido una gran cantidad de cuerpos biomédicos y modelos de vanguardia. Sin embargo, no hay pautas generales con respecto a la evaluación de modelos en estos cuerpos en entornos de terminología única y cruzada. En este trabajo, realizamos una evaluación comparativa de varios puntos de referencia y estudiamos la eficiencia de arquitecturas neuronales de vanguardia basadas en representaciones de codificadores bidireccionales de transformadores (BERT) para vincular tres tipos de entidades en tres dominios: resúmenes de investigación, etiquetas de medicamentos y generó textos sobre farmacoterapia en inglés. Hemos publicado el código fuente y los resultados en https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'pt': 'A vinculação de menções de entidades biomédicas a várias terminologias de produtos químicos, doenças, genes, reações adversas a medicamentos é uma tarefa desafiadora, muitas vezes exigindo interpretação não sintática. Um grande número de corpora biomédicos e modelos de última geração foram introduzidos nos últimos cinco anos. No entanto, não há diretrizes gerais sobre a avaliação de modelos nesses corpora em configurações de terminologia única e cruzada. Neste trabalho, realizamos uma avaliação comparativa de vários benchmarks e estudamos a eficiência de arquiteturas neurais de última geração baseadas em Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) para vincular três tipos de entidade em três domínios: resumos de pesquisa, drogas rótulos e textos gerados pelo usuário sobre terapia medicamentosa em inglês. Disponibilizamos o código-fonte e os resultados em https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'fr': "L'établissement de liens entre les mentions d'entités biomédicales et diverses terminologies de produits chimiques, de maladies, de gènes et d'effets indésirables de médicaments est une tâche difficile, nécessitant souvent une interprétation non syntaxique. Un grand nombre de corpus biomédicaux et de modèles de pointe ont été introduits au cours des cinq dernières années. Cependant, il n'existe aucune directive générale concernant l'évaluation de modèles sur ces corpus dans des contextes de terminologie unique et croisée. Dans ce travail, nous effectuons une évaluation comparative de divers points de référence et étudions l'efficacité d'architectures neuronales de pointe basées sur des représentations de codeurs bidirectionnels à partir de transformateurs (BERT) pour relier trois types d'entités dans trois domaines\xa0: résumés de recherche, étiquettes de médicaments et textes générés sur la pharmacothérapie en anglais. Nous avons mis le code source et les résultats à disposition à l'adresse https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'ja': '生物医学的実体が化学物質、疾患、遺伝子、薬物有害反応の様々な用語に言及することは、しばしば非構文解釈を必要とする困難な課題である。過去5年間に多数の生物医学的なコーラと最先端のモデルが導入されました。ただし、単一およびクロス用語の設定におけるこれらのコーラに関するモデルの評価に関する一般的なガイドラインはありません。この研究では、様々なベンチマークの比較評価を行い、3つの領域にわたる3つのエンティティタイプを結びつけるためのトランスフォーマーからの双方向エンコーダ表現（ BERT ）に基づく最先端のニューラルアーキテクチャの効率性を研究します：研究の要約、薬物ラベル、および英語の薬物療法に関するユーザー生成テキスト。ソースコードと結果はhttps://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERTで入手できます。', 'zh': '生物医学实体提化学品,疾病基因,药物不良反应诸术语,一事挑战性,常须非句法解释。 五年之中,大入生物医学语料库最先进。 然于单跨术语设中语料库上质,无常准也。 考之于Transformers(BERT)双向编码器先进之神经架构效率,跨三域之链接:治摘要,标用户之英语药治文本。 既资源代码于 https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT 矣。', 'ru': 'Связывание упоминаний биомедицинской сущности с различными терминологиями химических веществ, заболеваний, генов, нежелательных лекарственных реакций является сложной задачей, часто требующей несинтаксической интерпретации. За последние пять лет было внедрено большое число биомедицинских корпусов и современных моделей. Тем не менее, не существует общих руководящих принципов в отношении оценки моделей на этих телах в однотерминологических и кросс-терминологических условиях. В этой работе мы проводим сравнительную оценку различных эталонов и изучаем эффективность современных нейронных архитектур на основе двунаправленных представлений кодировщика от трансформаторов (BERT) для связывания трех типов сущностей в трех областях: тезисы исследований, этикетки лекарственных средств и созданные пользователем тексты по лекарственной терапии на английском языке. Исходный код и результаты доступны по адресу https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'hi': 'जैव चिकित्सा इकाई को जोड़ने का उल्लेख रसायनों, बीमारियों, जीन, प्रतिकूल दवा प्रतिक्रियाओं की विभिन्न शब्दावली के लिए किया गया है, एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है, जिसे अक्सर गैर-वाक्यात्मक व्याख्या की आवश्यकता होती है। पिछले पांच वर्षों में बड़ी संख्या में बायोमेडिकल कॉर्पोरेट और अत्याधुनिक मॉडल पेश किए गए हैं। हालांकि, एकल और क्रॉस-टर्मिनोलॉजी सेटिंग्स में इन कॉर्पोरेट पर मॉडल के मूल्यांकन के बारे में कोई सामान्य दिशानिर्देश नहीं हैं। इस काम में, हम विभिन्न बेंचमार्क का तुलनात्मक मूल्यांकन करते हैं और तीन डोमेन में तीन इकाई प्रकारों को जोड़ने के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर (BERT) से द्विदिश एन्कोडर प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर की दक्षता का अध्ययन करते हैं: अंग्रेजी में दवा चिकित्सा पर अनुसंधान सार, दवा लेबल और उपयोगकर्ता-जनित ग्रंथ। हमने स्रोत कोड और परिणाम https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT पर उपलब्ध कराए हैं।', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é nasc a dhéanamh ar aonán bithleighis le téarmaíochtaí éagsúla ceimiceán, galair, géinte, frithghníomhartha díobhálacha drugaí, is minic a éilíonn léirmhíniú neamhshintéiseach. Tá líon mór corpora bithleighis agus samhlacha úrscothacha tugtha isteach le cúig bliana anuas. Mar sin féin, níl aon treoirlínte ginearálta ann maidir le meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar shamhlacha ar na corparáidí sin i suíomhanna aonteangacha agus tras-téarmaíochta. San obair seo, déanaimid meastóireacht chomparáideach ar thagarmharcanna éagsúla agus déanaimid staidéar ar éifeachtúlacht na n-ailtireacht néareolaíoch úrscothach atá bunaithe ar Léiriúcháin Ionchódóra Déthreo ó Chlaochladáin (BERT) chun trí chineál eintiteas a nascadh thar thrí réimse: achoimrí taighde, drugaí. lipéid, agus téacsanna úsáideoir-ghinte ar theiripe drugaí i mBéarla. Tá an cód foinse agus na torthaí curtha ar fáil againn ag https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'el': 'Η σύνδεση των αναφορών βιοϊατρικής οντότητας με διάφορες ορολογίες χημικών ουσιών, ασθενειών, γονιδίων, ανεπιθύμητων ενεργειών φαρμάκων είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο, που συχνά απαιτεί μη συντακτική ερμηνεία. Ένα μεγάλο αριθμό βιοϊατρικών σωμάτων και μοντέλων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας έχουν εισαχθεί τα τελευταία πέντε χρόνια. Ωστόσο, δεν υπάρχουν γενικές κατευθυντήριες γραμμές σχετικά με την αξιολόγηση των μοντέλων σε αυτά τα σώματα σε ρυθμίσεις ενιαίας και διασταυρούμενης ορολογίας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια συγκριτική αξιολόγηση διαφόρων κριτηρίων αναφοράς και μελετάμε την αποτελεσματικότητα των σύγχρονων νευρωνικών αρχιτεκτονικών με βάση τις αμφίδρομες αναπαραστάσεις κωδικοποιητών από μετασχηματιστές (για τη σύνδεση τριών τύπων οντοτήτων σε τρεις τομείς: ερευνητικές περιλήψεις, ετικέτες φαρμάκων και κείμενα που παράγονται από χρήστες για τη θεραπεία φαρμάκων στα αγγλικά. Έχουμε καταστήσει τον πηγαίο κώδικα και τα αποτελέσματα διαθέσιμα στο https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'it': "Collegare l'entità biomedica menzioni a varie terminologie di sostanze chimiche, malattie, geni, reazioni avverse ai farmaci è un compito impegnativo, spesso che richiede un'interpretazione non sintattica. Negli ultimi cinque anni sono stati introdotti numerosi corpi biomedici e modelli all'avanguardia. Tuttavia, non ci sono linee guida generali per quanto riguarda la valutazione dei modelli su questi corpora in impostazioni singole e cross-terminologiche. In questo lavoro, eseguiamo una valutazione comparativa di vari benchmark e studiamo l'efficienza di architetture neurali all'avanguardia basate su Rappresentazioni bidirezionali di Encoder da Transformers (BERT) per il collegamento di tre tipi di entità in tre domini: abstract di ricerca, etichette di farmaci e testi generati dagli utenti sulla terapia farmacologica in inglese. Abbiamo reso disponibile il codice sorgente e i risultati all'indirizzo https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'hu': 'Az orvosbiológiai szervezet különböző vegyi anyagokra, betegségekre, génekre, mellékhatásokra vonatkozó különböző terminológiákkal való összekapcsolása kihívást jelent, gyakran nem szintaktikus értelmezést igényel. Az elmúlt öt évben számos orvosbiológiai corpora és korszerű modell került bevezetésre. Azonban nincsenek általános iránymutatások ezekre a korpuszokra vonatkozó modellek értékelésére vonatkozóan egy- és keresztterminológiai beállításokban. Ebben a munkában különböző referenciaértékek összehasonlító értékelését végezzük, és tanulmányozzuk a legkorszerűbb neurális architektúrák hatékonyságát a transzformátorok kétirányú kódoló reprezentációi (BERT) alapján három entitástípus összekapcsolására három területen: kutatási absztraktok, drogcímkék és felhasználók által generált angol nyelvű gyógyszerterápiáról. Elérhetővé tettük a forráskódot és az eredményeket a következő oldalon: https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'mk': 'Врската на биомедицинскиот ентитет споменува на различни терминологии на хемикалии, болести, гени, негативни реакции на лековите е предизвикувачка задача, честопати барајќи несинтактичка интерпретација. Во изминатите пет години се воведени голем број биомедицински корпора и најнови модели. Сепак, нема општи насоки во врска со проценката на моделите на овие тела во едно- и крстотерминолошки услови. Во оваа работа, спроведуваме споредлива евалуација на различни референтни значки и ја проучуваме ефикасноста на најсовремените нервни архитектури базирани на Бидирекционалните кодерски претставувања од Трансформери (БЕРТ) за поврзување на три типови на ентитети во три домени: истражувачки апстракти, лекови етикети и тексти генерирани од We have made the source code and results available at  https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'lt': 'Biomedicinos subjekto sąsajos su įvairiomis cheminių medžiagų, ligų, genų, nepageidaujamų vaistų reakcijų terminologijomis yra sudėtinga užduotis, dažnai reikalaujanti ne sintaktinio aiškinimo. Per pastaruosius penkerius metus įdiegta daug biomedicinos korpuso ir moderniausių modelių. Vis dėlto nėra bendrųjų gairių dėl šių korprų modelių vertinimo vienos ir tarpterminologinėse aplinkybėse. Šiame darbe atliekame lyginamąjį įvairių lyginamųjų rodiklių vertinimą ir tiriame pažangiausių nervų architektūrų veiksmingumą, grindžiamą dvikryptiniais transformuotojų kodavimo atstovais (BERT), siekiant sujungti tris subjektų tipus į tris sritis: mokslinių tyrimų abstraktus, narkotikų etiketes ir vartotojų sukurtus tekstus apie narkotikų terapiją anglų kalba. Mes paskelbėme šaltinio kodą ir rezultatus https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'kk': 'Биологиялық медициниялық құрылғының сілтемесі химикалық, аурулар, гендер, негізгі наркотикалық реакцияларының түрлі терминологияларына айтылады. Көбінде синтактикалық түсініктемесін талап етеді. Соңғы бес жылда биомедицина корпорасы және әртүрлі моделдері көптеген. Бірақ, бұл корпорадағы үлгілерді бір- бір терминологиялық параметрлерде оқу үшін жалпы бағыттаулар жоқ. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз әртүрлі бағдарламаларды салыстырып, әртүрлі бағдарламалардың күйінің невралдық архитектураларының эффективнігін зерттеп, екі бағытталған Трансферлерден (BERT) үш бағдарламалардың түрлерін үш доменге сілтемелеу үшін бағыттау үшін түрлерді зерттеу абстра Біз көзінің коды мен нәтижелерін https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ms': 'Pempautan entiti biomedis menyebutkan kepada berbagai terminologi bahan kimia, penyakit, gen, reaksi dadah tidak baik adalah tugas yang mencabar, sering memerlukan interpretasi bukan sintaktik. A large number of biomedical corpora and state-of-the-art models have been introduced in the past five years.  Namun, tiada panduan umum mengenai penilaian model pada korpra ini dalam tetapan terminologi tunggal dan salib. Dalam kerja ini, kami melakukan penilaian perbandingan berbagai tanda referensi dan mempelajari efisiensi arkitektur saraf state-of-the-art berdasarkan Perwakilan Pengekod Biarah dari Transformers (BERT) untuk menghubungkan tiga jenis entiti melalui tiga domain: penelitian abstrakt, label dadah, dan teks yang dihasilkan oleh pengguna pada terapi dadah dalam bahasa Inggeris. Kami telah membuat kod sumber dan hasil tersedia di https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ml': 'ജീവിയ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കെമിക്കല്\u200d, രോഗങ്ങള്\u200d, ജീന്\u200d, വിരോധമായ മയക്കുമരുന്നുള്ള പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത കഴിഞ്ഞ അഞ്ചു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ജീവിയ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയും സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മോഡലുകളും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തി. എങ്കിലും ഈ കോർപ്പോറിയിലെ മോഡലുകളുടെ evaluation നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഒരു പൊതുവായ വഴികാട്ടുകളില്ല. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെ പരിഗണന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും, ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dഫര്\u200dമാരില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ബൈഡഡഡിയല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200dഡര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി രാജ്യത്തിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200d We have made the source code and results available at  https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'no': 'Tilkopling av biomedisinsk entitet mener på ulike terminologiar av kjemikalier, sykdommar, gener, negativreaksjonar av narkotika er ein vanskeleg oppgåve, som ofte krev ikkje-syntaktisk tolking. Det er introdusert mange biomedisinske korporar og kunstmodeller i dei siste fem år. Det finst imidlertid ingen generelle retningslinjer om evalueringa av modeller på desse korporane i enkelte og kryss-terminologiske innstillingane. I denne arbeiden utfører vi eit sammenlignbare evaluering av ulike benchmarker og studerer effektiviteten av kunstnett- neuralarkitekturar basert på Bidirektionale koderingsrepresentasjonar frå Transformerer (BERT) for å kopla til tre einingstypar på tre domene: forskningsabstraktar, narkotikalar og brukargrende tekstar på narkotikabehandling i engelsk. Vi har lagt kjeldekoden og resultatet tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'mt': 'Linking of biomedical entity mentions to various terminologies of chemicals, diseases, genes, adverse drug reactions is a challenging task, often requiring non-syntactic interpretation.  F’dawn l-aħħar ħames snin ġew introdotti għadd kbir ta’ korpi bijomediċi u mudelli moderni. Madankollu, m’hemm l-ebda linji gwida ġenerali dwar l-evalwazzjoni ta’ mudelli fuq dawn il-korpi f’ambjenti ta’ terminoloġija waħda u trasversali. F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu evalwazzjoni komparattiva ta’ diversi punti ta’ riferiment u nagħmlu studju dwar l-effiċjenza tal-arkitetturi newrali l-aktar avvanzati bbażati fuq ir-Rappreżentazzjonijiet Bidirezzjonali tal-Kodifikaturi mit-Trasformaturi (BERT) biex jintrabtu tliet tipi ta’ entitajiet fi tliet oqsma: l-astratti tar-riċerka, it-tikketti tad-droga, u t-testi ġġenerati mill-utenti dwar it-terapija tad-droga bl-Ingli Aħna għamlu l-kodiċi tas-sors u r-riżultati disponibbli fuq https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ro': 'Legătura dintre entitățile biomedicale menționează diferite terminologii ale substanțelor chimice, bolilor, genelor, reacțiilor adverse la medicamente este o sarcină dificilă, adesea necesitând o interpretare non-sintactică. În ultimii cinci ani au fost introduse un număr mare de corporații biomedicale și modele de ultimă generație. Cu toate acestea, nu există orientări generale privind evaluarea modelelor pe aceste corpore în setări unice și cross-terminologice. În cadrul acestei lucrări, realizăm o evaluare comparativă a diferitelor criterii de referință și studiem eficiența arhitecturilor neurale de ultimă generație bazate pe reprezentări bidirecționale de la transformatori (BERT) pentru conectarea a trei tipuri de entități în trei domenii: rezumate de cercetare, etichete de medicamente și texte generate de utilizatori despre terapia medicamentoasă în limba engleză. Am făcut codul sursă și rezultatele disponibile la https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'pl': 'Powiązanie wspomnień podmiotu biomedycznego z różnymi terminologiami chemikaliów, chorób, genów, działań niepożądanych jest wyzwaniem, często wymagającym interpretacji nieskładniowej. W ciągu ostatnich pięciu lat wprowadzono dużą liczbę korpusów biomedycznych i najnowocześniejszych modeli. Nie ma jednak ogólnych wytycznych dotyczących oceny modeli na tych korporach w ustawieniach pojedynczej i między terminologią. W niniejszej pracy przeprowadzamy ocenę porównawczą różnych wskaźników referencyjnych i badamy efektywność najnowocześniejszych architektur neuronowych opartych na reprezentacjach koderów dwukierunkowych z transformatorów (BERT) do łączenia trzech typów podmiotów w trzech dziedzinach: abstrakty badawcze, etykiety leków oraz teksty generowane przez użytkowników na temat terapii lekowej w języku angielskim. Udostępniliśmy kod źródłowy i wyniki pod adresem: https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ka': 'ბიომედიციო ინტერნეტის დაკავშირება განსხვავებული ქიმიკალური ტერმინოლოგიები, დაავადებები, გენები, განსაკუთრებული ნაპირეტიკური რეაქციები არის შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა, რომელიც უნდა უნ ბიომედიციო კოპორა და ხელსაწყოთა მოდელების დიდი რაოდენობა შემდეგ ხუთ წლის შემდეგ იყენება. მაგრამ არ არსებობს საერთო-ერთი ტერმინოლოგიის პარამეტრებში მოდელების გაუმუშავება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული ბენქმარკების კომპორატიური განსაზღვრება და შევსწავლობთ განსხვავებული ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტიქტიკების ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ბენერტიკოდერის კომპორაციების განსაზღვრებით (BERT) სამი სამუშაო ჩვენ მივიღეთ წიგნის კოდის და შედეგი https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka dhakhaatiirta dhakhaatiirtu waxay leedahay isticmaalka kala duduwan, cudurada, jinsiyada, dib u celinta dawooyinka, waa shaqa dhibaataysan, inta badan waxay u baahan yihiin fasirka aan isku-syntactika ahayn. Shankii sano ee la soo dhaafay waxaa la soo bandhigay shirkado badan oo dhakhaatiirta iyo sameynta farshaxanka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, ma jirto hogaamiyayaal caadiga ah oo ku saabsan qiimeynta modelladan ee shirkaddaas oo ku qoran xarumaha hal-iyo-gaarka-terminology. In this work, we perform a comparative evaluation of various benchmarks and study the efficiency of state-of-the-art neural architectures based on Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) for linking of three entity types across three domains: research abstracts, drug labels, and user-generated texts on drug therapy in English.  Waxaannu helnay sumadda asalka iyo resultiyada https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'mn': 'Биологийн эмчилгээний биологийн сургуулийн холбоотой нь химийн, өвчин, ген, эсрэг эмчилгээний урвалууд нь хэцүү ажил, ихэвчлэн синтактик биш гэдгийг ойлгох шаардлагатай. Биологийн эмнэлгийн корпора болон урлагийн загварууд өнгөрсөн таван жилийн дотор маш олон загварууд тавьсан. Гэхдээ эдгээр корпора дээрх загварын үнэлэх тухай ерөнхий загвар байхгүй. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид өөр төрлийн багц багш нарыг харьцуулж, урлагийн мэдрэлийн байр суурь барилгуудын үр дүнтэй байдлыг судалж, Трансформ (BERT) холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой гурван төрлийн бүтээгдэхүүний холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Бид эх үүсвэрийн код болон үр дүнг https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'sr': 'Povezanje biomedicinskih subjekta spominje razne terminologije hemikalija, bolesti, gena, nuspojave lijeka je izazovan zadatak, često zahtijevajući ne-sintaktičnu interpretaciju. Većina biomedicinskih korporacija i umjetničkih modela su uvedena u proteklih pet godina. Međutim, nema općih uputstva u vezi procjene modela na ovoj korpori u jednoj i prekovršenoj terminologiji. U ovom poslu radimo usporedbnu procjenu različitih kriterija i proučavamo efikasnost države umjetne neuralne arhitekture na temelju dvosmjernih predstavljanja kodera od transformera (BERT) za povezanje tri tipa entiteta u tri domena: istraživanja abstrakta, etikete droge i teksta od korisnika o terapiji droge na engleskom jeziku. Postavili smo izvorni kod i rezultati na raspolaganju https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'sv': 'Koppling av biomedicinsk enhet nämner olika terminologier för kemikalier, sjukdomar, gener, biverkningar är en utmanande uppgift, ofta kräver icke-syntaktisk tolkning. Ett stort antal biomedicinska corpora och toppmoderna modeller har införts under de senaste fem åren. Det finns dock inga allmänna riktlinjer för utvärdering av modeller på dessa korpora i enkel- och tvärterminologiinställningar. I detta arbete utför vi en jämförande utvärdering av olika riktmärken och studerar effektiviteten hos state-of-the-art neurala arkitekturer baserade på tvåriktade kodningsrepresentationer från transformatorer (BERT) för att länka tre entitetstyper över tre domäner: forskningsabstrakt, läkemedelsetiketter och användargenererade texter om läkemedelsterapi på engelska. Vi har gjort källkoden och resultaten tillgängliga på https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ta': 'உயிரியல் மருத்துவப் பொருளின் இணைப்பு வித்தியாசமான நிறுவனங்களுக்கு இணைக்கப்படுகிறது, நோய், மரபணுகள், எதிர்மறை மருந்துவ வ விளைவுகள் ஒரு சவாலி கடந்த ஐந்து ஆண்டுகளில் பல உயிரியல் மருத்துவ நிறுவனம் மற்றும் கலை நிலைமை மாதிரிகள் முதலிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன. ஆனால், இந்த நிறுவனத்தில் மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிடுவது பற்றி பொதுவான குறிப்புகள் எதுவும் இல்லை ஒற்றையில் மற்றும் முறை மு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் மூன்று பொருள் வகைகளை இணைக்க வேண்டும் மூன்று கூட்டத்திற்கும் மூன்று பொருள் வகைகளை மூலம் இணைக்க வேண்டும் மூன்று பொருள்கள் மற்றும் மருந்து சிகிச்சைக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மாநிலை நெய் மூல குறியீடு மற்றும் முடிவுகள் கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'si': 'Links of biodoctor units are references to vary Terminal ologies of Chemicals, Health, Genes, adverse Drug Reason is a challeng job, often Requirering non-synact translation. ගිහින් අවුරුදු පහුගින් ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය කාර්පෝරා සහ කාර්යාත්මක විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා. නමුත්, මේ කොර්පෝරාවේ මොඩල් ගැන විශ්ලේෂණය ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය මාර්ගය නැහැ මේ කොර්පෝරාවේ සැකසුම් සඳහා  In this job, we do a comparive evalution of varyong bench Marks and study the Effectivity of state-of-the-art neural Archives based on Bicurrical Encoder reprepositions from Transferers (BERT) for linching of three units types over three domain: Research instracts, Drug Labels, and user-generous texts on Drug terapathy in English. අපි මුළු කෝඩ හා ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ur': 'بیولوڈیکسی انٹیٹیسی کی تعبیر کی مختلف ریاضیوں، بیماریوں، جینوں، مخالف مخالف مخالف مخالف طریقوں کے متعلق ایک مشکل کام ہے، بہت سے وقت غیر سینٹیکسی تعبیر کی ضرورت ہے. اگلے پانچ سال میں بہت سی زیادہ زیادہ بیوڈیسی کورپور اور ایٹیٹ کی مدل پیش کیے گئے ہیں. لیکن ان کورپور پر موڈل کا ارزش کے بارے میں کوئی عمومی راہ دکھانے والا نہیں ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم مختلف بنچم مارک کے مقایسات کا ارزش کریں گے اور ان کی عمدگی کی تحقیق کریں گے جو ٹرانسفور (BERT) سے دو دئیرسیٹنی انڈیکور کی تصاویرات کی بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، تین ڈومین میں تین ایٹیٹیٹی ٹیپاؤں کے متصل کرنے کے لئے تین ایٹیٹیٹی ٹیپاؤں کے متصل کریں گے: تحقیق آپٹراکت، داروغ لیبل اور ہم نے سورج کوڈ اور نتیجے کو موجود بنایا ہے https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'uz': "Bir necha kemikali, kasalliklar, genlar, biqqat narsalar, narsa raqamli narsalarning bir qiymati vazifasi, ko'p doim qo'llanmalar kerak emas. Oxirgi besh yil ichida ko'pchilik biomedical kompaniya va shaxsiy modellar ishga tushirilgan. Lekin, bu kompaniyadagi modellarni qiymatlashda hech qanday qoidalar mavjud emas. Bu ishda biz har xil balbalarning qiymatini bajaramiz va o'zgarishlar uchun Bidirectional Encoder Representativlari (BERT) asosida yaratilgan har xil neyron maktablarning natijasi tizimini o'rganamiz va uchta domani uchta tizimga bog'lash uchun uchta narsalarning qiymatlarini bajaramiz, narkotika teglarini va ingliz tilidagi narsa tibbiyotidagi textlarni ishlatamiz. Biz manba kodi va natijalar https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'vi': 'Liên kết với sinh vật sinh học đề cập đến các giai đoạn cuối của hóa chất, bệnh tật, gen, phản ứng gây hại của thuốc phiện là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn, thường cần phải diễn tả khác. Một số lượng lớn các mẫu sinh học và nghệ thuật đã được giới thiệu trong năm qua. Tuy nhiên, không có hướng dẫn chung về việc đánh giá các mô hình trên mỗi nhóm trong các thiết lập độc thuật và chữ thập. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi thực hiện một đánh giá tương đối nhau về các tiêu chuẩn khác nhau và nghiên cứu hiệu quả của các kiến trúc thần kinh học hiện đại trên nền tảng, dựa trên các Nét vẽ sừng sững hai hướng tại các biến hình transformer (BERT) để kết nối ba quy thể loại khác nhau trong ba lĩnh vực: trừu tượng nghiên cứu, nhãn ma túy, và văn bản chế tạo người dùng về liệu pháp ma túy bằng tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi đã cung cấp mã nguồn và kết quả https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'bg': 'Свързването на биомедицинските споменавания с различни терминологии на химикали, заболявания, гени, нежелани лекарствени реакции е предизвикателна задача, често изискваща несинтактична интерпретация. През последните пет години бяха въведени голям брой биомедицински корпуси и най-съвременни модели. Въпреки това, няма общи насоки относно оценката на моделите на тези корпуси в единични и кръстосани терминологични настройки. В тази работа извършваме сравнителна оценка на различни референтни показатели и изучаваме ефективността на най-съвременните невронни архитектури, базирани на двупосочни кодери от трансформатори (БРТ), за свързване на три типа субекти в три области: резюмета на научни изследвания, етикети на лекарства и текстове, генерирани от потребителите за лекарствената терапия на английски език. Направихме изходния код и резултатите достъпни на https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'da': 'Sammenkædning af biomedicinske enheder nævner til forskellige terminologier af kemikalier, sygdomme, gener, bivirkninger er en udfordrende opgave, der ofte kræver ikke-syntaktisk fortolkning. Et stort antal biomedicinske corpora og state-of-the-art modeller er blevet introduceret i de sidste fem år. Der er imidlertid ingen generelle retningslinjer for evaluering af modeller på disse corpora i enkelt- og tværtromologiske indstillinger. I dette arbejde foretager vi en sammenlignende evaluering af forskellige benchmarks og undersøger effektiviteten af state-of-the-art neurale arkitekturer baseret på Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) til sammenkædning af tre entitetstyper på tværs af tre domæner: forskningsabstracts, stofetiketter og brugergenererede tekster om lægemidleterapi på engelsk. Vi har gjort kildekoden og resultaterne tilgængelige på https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'nl': 'Het koppelen van biomedische entiteitsvermeldingen aan verschillende terminologieën van chemicaliën, ziekten, genen, bijwerkingen van geneesmiddelen is een uitdagende taak, die vaak niet-syntactische interpretatie vereist. In de afgelopen vijf jaar is een groot aantal biomedische corpora en state-of-the-art modellen geïntroduceerd. Er zijn echter geen algemene richtlijnen met betrekking tot de evaluatie van modellen op deze corpora in single- en cross-terminologie instellingen. In dit werk voeren we een vergelijkende evaluatie uit van verschillende benchmarks en bestuderen we de efficiëntie van state-of-the-art neurale architecturen op basis van Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) voor het koppelen van drie entiteitentypes over drie domeinen: onderzoeksabstracts, geneesmiddellabels en door gebruikers gegenereerde teksten over geneesmiddeltherapie in het Engels. We hebben de broncode en resultaten beschikbaar gesteld op: https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'hr': 'Povezanje biomedicinskih subjekta spominje različite terminologije hemikalija, bolesti, gena, nuspojave lijeka je izazovan zadatak, često zahtijevajući ne-sintaktičnu interpretaciju. U posljednjih pet godina su predstavljeni veliki broj biomedicinskih korporacija i modela umjetnosti. Međutim, nema općih uputstva u pogledu procjene modela na tim tijelima u jednokratnim i prekovršenim terminologijama. U ovom poslu radimo usporedbnu procjenu različitih kriterija i proučavamo učinkovitost stanja umjetničkih neuralnih arhitektura na temelju dvosmjernih predstavljanja kodera iz transformera (BERT) za povezanje tri tipa entiteta u tri domena: apstrakta istraživanja, etikete droge i teksta od korisnika o terapiji lijeka na engleskom jeziku. Postavili smo izvorni kod i rezultati na raspolaganju https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'de': 'Die Verknüpfung von Erwähnungen biomedizinischer Entitäten mit verschiedenen Terminologien von Chemikalien, Krankheiten, Genen, Nebenwirkungen von Arzneimitteln ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe, die oft eine nicht-syntaktische Interpretation erfordert. In den letzten fünf Jahren wurden zahlreiche biomedizinische Korpora und modernste Modelle eingeführt. Es gibt jedoch keine allgemeinen Richtlinien zur Bewertung von Modellen auf diesen Korpora in ein- und terminologieübergreifenden Einstellungen. In dieser Arbeit führen wir eine vergleichende Bewertung verschiedener Benchmarks durch und untersuchen die Effizienz modernster neuronaler Architekturen basierend auf bidirektionalen Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) für die Verknüpfung von drei Entitätstypen über drei Domänen: Forschungsabstracts, Arzneimitteletiketten und nutzergenerierte Texte zur Arzneimitteltherapie in englischer Sprache. Wir haben den Quellcode und die Ergebnisse zur Verfügung gestellt unter https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'id': 'Hubungan dari entitas biomedis menyebutkan kepada berbagai terminologi bahan kimia, penyakit, gen, reaksi obat tidak baik adalah tugas yang menantang, sering membutuhkan interpretasi tidak sintaksi. A large number of biomedical corpora and state-of-the-art models have been introduced in the past five years.  Namun, tidak ada petunjuk umum mengenai evaluasi model pada korpra ini dalam seting terminologi tunggal dan salib. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami melakukan evaluasi perbandingan dari berbagai benchmark dan mempelajari efisiensi arsitektur saraf terbaik berdasarkan Representasi Encoder Bidirectional dari Transformers (BERT) untuk menghubungkan tiga jenis entitas melalui tiga domain: abstrak penelitian, label obat, dan teks yang dibuat oleh pengguna tentang terapi obat dalam bahasa Inggris. Kami telah membuat kode sumber dan hasil tersedia di https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ko': '생물의학 실체를 화학품, 질병, 유전자와 약물의 불량반응에 대한 각종 용어와 언급하는 것은 도전적인 임무로 보통 비문법적 해석이 필요하다.지난 5년 동안 대량의 생물의학 어료 라이브러리와 가장 선진적인 모델이 도입되었다.그러나 단일 용어와 다중 용어 환경에서 이러한 어료 라이브러리의 모델을 평가하는 데 일반적인 지침이 없다.이 작업에서 우리는 각종 기준에 대해 비교 평가를 하고 Transformers(BERT) 양방향 인코더를 바탕으로 하는 가장 선진적인 신경 구조가 세 가지 분야에서 세 가지 실체 유형을 연결하는 효율을 연구했다. 연구 요약, 약물 라벨과 사용자가 생성한 영문 약물 치료 텍스트이다.우리는 이미 사이트에 원본 코드와 결과를 발표했다https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'fa': 'ارتباط شرکت زیست پزشکی به ترمینالوژی های مختلف شیمیایی، بیماری، ژن، واکنش های مختلف مواد مختلف یک کار مشکل است که اغلب به تعبیر غیر سنتاکتیک نیاز دارد. تعداد زیادی از شرکتهای بیولوژیکی و مدل های هنری در پنج سال گذشته معرفی شده اند. ولی هیچ راهنمایی عمومی در مورد ارزیابی مدل در این شرکت در تنظیمات متفاوت و متفاوت ترمینالوژی وجود ندارد. در این کار، ما یک ارزیابی مقایسه\u200cای از طریق برچسب\u200cهای مختلف انجام می\u200cدهیم و مطالعه اقتصادی معماری عصبی\u200cهای ایالت هنری را بر اساس نمایش\u200cهای دو طریق انفجار\u200cکننده\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cها (BERT) برای ارتباط از سه نوع برچسب\u200cها در سه دامنه تحقیق می\u200cکنیم: تحقیق\u200cکننده\u200cها، برچسب\u200cهای مواد مخدر و متن\u200cهای ما کد منبع و نتیجه\u200cها را در https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'sw': 'Kuunganishwa na vifaa vya kitabibu vinavyotajwa kwa maadili mbalimbali ya kemikali, magonjwa, jeni, miitikio mbadala ya madawa ni kazi yenye changamoto, mara nyingi inahitaji tafsiri isiyo na ushirikiano. Idadi kubwa ya makampuni ya kitabibu na mifano ya sanaa ya aina hii imeanzishwa katika miaka mitano iliyopita. Hata hivyo, hakuna maelekezo ya jumla kuhusu tathmini za mifano kwenye makampuni haya katika mazingira ya utambulisho wa kimoja na upande wa rangi. Katika kazi hii, tunafanya utafiti wa misingi mbalimbali na kutafiti ufanisi wa majengo ya kisasa yanayotokana na serikali ya sanaa kwa kutumia Representative wa Uandishi wa Bidirectional Encoding (BERT) kwa kuunganisha a in a tatu za vitu katika maeneo mbalimbali mitatu: tafiti abstract, labda za madawa, na maandishi yaliyotengenezwa kwa watumiaji kuhusu matibabu ya dawa kwa Kiingereza. Tumefanya kodi na matokeo https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'tr': 'Biwomedikal zatlaryň birleşmesi hemikaliýa, hasaplar, jenler, täsirli narkotik täsirleri kynçylyk bir buýrukdyr, köplenç sintaktik terjime etmek gerek bolýar. Geçen beş ýylda birnäçe biomedical korpora we sungatçylyk nusgalary tanyşdyryldy. Ýöne bu korporada, birleşik we çarp-terminologiýada modellerin değerlendirmesi barada umumiy düzgün hatlar ýok. Bu işde, biz dürli çeşitli pratik taýýarlamalaryň howsalaşyklygyny we suwerlik etiketleriniň durumynyň, Iňlis dilinde narkotik terapiýasynda ýazylýan metinlerini çykarýarys. Biz çeşme kody we netijeleri bar https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'hy': "Linking of biomedical entity mentions to various terminologies of chemicals, diseases, genes, adverse drug reactions is a challenging task, often requiring non-syntactic interpretation.  Վերջին հինգ տարիների ընթացքում մեծ քանակությամբ կենսաբժշկական մարմներ և նորագույն մոդելներ են ներկայացվել: However, there are no general guidelines regarding the evaluation of models on these corpora in single- and cross-terminology settings.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կատարում ենք տարբեր համեմատական գնահատականներ և ուսումնասիրում ենք նորագույն նյարդային ճարտարապետությունների արդյունավետությունը, հիմնված Երկու ուղղությամբ կոդավորվող թարֆորմերների (BER) ներկայացումների վրա երեք անհատականության տեսակների կապելու համար երեք բնագավառներում' հետազոտությունների վերացածները, թմրանյութերի Մենք հասանելի ենք դարձրել աղբյուր կոդին և արդյունքները https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'az': 'Biyomedicini təhsil etmək kimikalar, xəstəlik, genlər, təsirli uyuşturucu reaksiyonların müxtəlif terminoloqlarına danışır, çox zaman sintaktik təfsil edilməsi lazımdır. Son beş il içində bir çox biomedical corpora və sanat modelləri təşkil edilmişdir. Ancaq bu korporada modellərin değerlendirməsi barəsində tək-təkrar terminoloji ayarlarında genel doğruluqlar yoxdur. Bu işdə, biz müxtəlif benchmarklərin qarşılaşdırılmasını və İngilizce dilində üç növ növ növ məktəbələrinin birlikdə üç növ növ növ məktəbələrinin faydalanmasını təhsil edirik. Biz mənbə kodu və sonuçlarını https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'bn': 'বায়োমেডিকেল প্রতিষ্ঠানের সংযোগ বিভিন্ন সাইকেমিকেল, রোগ, জেন, বিভিন্ন মাদক প্রতিক্রিয়ার কথা উল্লেখ করা হচ্ছে চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ, প গত পাঁচ বছরে বেশ কয়েকটি বায়োমেডিকেল কোর্পোরা এবং রাষ্ট্রীয় শিল্পের মডেল চালু করা হয়েছে। তবে এই কোর্পোরায় মডেল মূল্যের ব্যাপারে কোন সাধারণ নির্দেশ নেই যে কোন নির্দেশ পাওয়া যাচ্ছে না এক- আর ক্রস-টার্মিনি এই কাজে আমরা বিভিন্ন বেনমার্কের তুলনামূল্য পরিচালনা করি এবং ট্রান্সফার্সার থেকে বাইডেডিয়েল এনকোডার প্রতিনিধিত্বের উপর ভিত্তি করে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের নিউরেল কাঠামোর কার্যক্রমের কার্যক্রম গবেষণা করি এবং ই আমরা সোর্স কোড এবং ফলাফল পাওয়া যাচ্ছি https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'bs': 'Povezanje biomedicinskih subjekta spominje razne terminologije hemikalija, bolesti, gena, nuspojave lijeka je izazovan zadatak, često zahtijevajući ne-sintaktičnu interpretaciju. U posljednjih pet godina su predstavljeni veliki broj biomedicinskih korporacija i modela umjetnosti. Međutim, nema općih uputstva u vezi procjene modela na toj korpori u jednokratnim i cross-terminologijskim nastavama. U ovom poslu radimo usporedbnu procjenu različitih kriterija i proučavamo učinkovitost države umjetne neuralne arhitekture na temelju dvosmjernih predstavljanja kodera iz transformera (BERT) za povezanje tri tipa entiteta u tri domena: apstrakta istraživanja, etikete droge i teksta od korisnika o terapiji droge na engleskom jeziku. Postavili smo izvorni kod i rezultati na raspolaganju https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'sq': 'Lidhja e njësisë biomedike përmend terminologjitë e ndryshme të kimikave, sëmundjeve, gjeneve, reagimeve të dëmshme të drogës është një detyrë sfiduese, që shpesh kërkon interpretim jo sintaktik. Në pesë vitet e fundit janë futur një numër të madh korpora biomedike dhe modele më të larta. However, there are no general guidelines regarding the evaluation of models on these corpora in single- and cross-terminology settings.  Në këtë punë, ne kryejmë një vlerësim krahasues të standarteve të ndryshme dhe studiojmë efektshmërinë e arkitekturave nervore të moderne bazuar në përfaqësimet dy-drejtore të koduesve nga Transformuesit (BERT) për lidhjen e tre llojeve të njësive nëpër tre fusha: abstraktët e kërkimit, etiketat e drogës dhe tekstet e gjeneruara nga përdoruesit mbi terapinë e drogës në anglisht. Ne kemi bërë kodin burimor dhe rezultatet në dispozicion në https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'af': "Verbinding van biomediese entiteit bepaal na verskillende terminologies van kemikale, siektes, gene, noodsaaklike mediese reaksies is 'n pragtige taak, dikwels nodig nie-sintaktieke uitlegging. 'n groot aantal biomediese korpora en staat-van-kunstenmodele is ingestel in die verlede vyf jaar. Maar daar is geen algemene reglyne aangaande die evaluering van modele op hierdie korpora in enkele en kruisterminologies instellings nie. In hierdie werk doen ons 'n vergelykbare evaluering van verskillende benchmarke en ondersoek die effektiviteit van staat-van-die-kunstens neurale arkitektuure gebaseer op Bidireksionale enkoder-voorstellings van Transformers (BERT) vir die konneksie van drie entiteite tipes oor drie domene: ondersoek abstrakte, drogsetikette en gebruikergenereerde teks op drogsterapie in Engels. Ons het die bronkode en resultate beskikbaar gemaak https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'am': 'የbiomedical አካላትን በመግኘት የኪሜሎጂዎች፣ ደዌዎች፣ የgene፣ ተቃዋሚ የረኀብ ጥያቄዎች፣ ብዙ ጊዜ ሳይስታታታዊ ትርጓሜ እንዲያስፈልጋቸው የሚችል ሥራ ነው፡፡ ባለፉት አምስት ዓመታት ውስጥ ብዙ የbiomedical ኮርፖራ እና የሀገር አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች ተገልጠዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በዚህ ኮርፖራ ላይ የሞዴሎጂ ማስታወቂያ የጠቅላላ መሪ ምንም የለበትም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ላይ የልዩ አካባቢዎችን አስተያየት እና በይንግሊዝኛ ውስጥ በሦስት አካባቢ ዓይነቶች ላይ ለመጠቀም የሀገር የየየራቀ አካባቢ ሀብት አካባቢ መልዕክቶች (BERT) በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የብሔራዊ አካባቢዎችን እናስተምር፡፡ ምንጭ https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ca': "L'enllaç de l'entitat biomèdica menciona diverses terminologies de productes químics, malalties, gens, reaccions adversas a medicaments és una tasca desafiadora, sovint requereix interpretació no sinàctica. En els últims cinc anys s'han introduït molts models biomèdics i moderns. No obstant això, no hi ha directrices generals sobre l'evaluació de models en aquests corpores en entorns de terminologia única i transversal. En aquesta feina, fem una evaluació comparativa de diversos punts de referència i estudiem l'eficiència de les arquitectures neuronals d'última edat basades en Representacions Bidirectional Encoder from Transformers (BERT) per vincular tres tipus d'entitats a tres dominis: abstracts de recerca, etiquetes de medicaments i textos generats per l'usuari sobre la drogoterapia en anglès. Hem fet disponible el codi fonti els resultats https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'cs': 'Propojení zmínek biomedicínské entity s různými terminologiemi chemických látek, onemocnění, genů, nežádoucích účinků léčiv je náročným úkolem, často vyžadujícím nesyntaktickou interpretaci. V posledních pěti letech bylo zavedeno velké množství biomedicínských korpusů a nejmodernějších modelů. Neexistují však žádné obecné pokyny pro hodnocení modelů na těchto korpusech v jednotlivých a křížových terminologických nastaveních. V této práci provádíme srovnávací hodnocení různých benchmarků a studujeme efektivitu nejmodernějších neuronových architektur založených na obousměrných kódovacích reprezentacích z transformátorů (BERT) pro propojení tří typů entit napříč třemi doménami: výzkumné abstrakty, lékové značky a uživatelsky generované texty o lékové terapii v angličtině. Zdrojový kód a výsledky jsme zpřístupnili na adrese: https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'et': 'Biomeditsiiniliste üksuste nimetuste seostamine erinevate kemikaalide, haiguste, geenide, kõrvaltoimete terminoloogiatega on keeruline ülesanne, mis nõuab sageli mittesüntaktilist tõlgendamist. Viimase viie aasta jooksul on kasutusele võetud suur hulk biomeditsiinilisi korpuseid ja kaasaegseid mudeleid. Siiski puuduvad üldised suunised nende korpuste mudelite hindamiseks ühe- ja terminoloogilistes sätetes. Käesolevas töös teostame erinevate võrdlusnäitajate võrdleva hindamise ja uurime Transformerite kahesuunalistel kodeerijate esindustel (BERT) põhinevate kaasaegsete neuroarhitektuuride efektiivsust kolme üksuse tüübi linkimisel kolmes valdkonnas: uuringute kokkuvõtted, ravimite märgistused ja kasutajate loodud tekstid ravimite ravimist käsitlevad ingliskeelsed tekstid. Oleme teinud lähtekoodi ja tulemused kättesaadavaks aadressil https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'fi': 'Biolääketieteellisten kokonaisuuksien mainintojen linkittäminen erilaisiin kemikaalien, sairauksien, geenien ja haittavaikutusten terminologiaan on haastava tehtävä, joka vaatii usein ei-synteettistä tulkintaa. Viiden viime vuoden aikana on otettu käyttöön suuri määrä biolääketieteellisiä korporaatioita ja uusimpia malleja. Yleisiä ohjeita näiden korpusten mallien arvioinnista yhden ja useamman terminologian asetuksissa ei kuitenkaan ole. Tässä työssä suoritamme vertailevan arvioinnin erilaisista vertailuarvoista ja tutkimme BERT:n (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) perustuvien huipputason neuroarkkitehtuurien tehokkuutta kolmen entiteettityypin linkittämisessä kolmella alalla: tutkimustiivistelmät, lääkemerkinnät ja käyttäjien luomat tekstit lääketerapiasta englanniksi. Olemme asettaneet lähdekoodin ja tulokset saataville osoitteessa https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'ha': "Linkin abun da aka ambaci wasu taƙaitori na dabam-dabam na chemicals, jiran, jene, abubuwa da ake yi wa aikin madawara a kanana, ko da yawa suna da fassarar-bayan-syntactic. An introduce ƙidãya masu yawa na firma na samaki da halin-sanar cikin shekara shan shekara. Babu wata shiryarwa mai jumla game da evaluation of misãlai kan wannan firma cikin daidaita tsakanin-tarminogi guda da guda. Daga wannan aikin, Munã tafiyar da kafarin littafan mistakarda ko kuma munã karatun fassarar-state-of-the-art-neural matsayi a kan Bidiridal Encoder Repositions daga Transformers (BERT) dõmin yin linki da nau'i uku dukkan guda uku: research sepracts, labels in madawara, da matsayin mai amfani da wanda aka haife littattafai a cikin Ingiriya. Mun sami kodi da matsala https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.", 'sk': 'Povezovanje biomedicinskih omemb z različnimi terminologijami kemikalij, bolezni, genov, neželenih učinkov zdravil je zahtevna naloga, ki pogosto zahteva nesintaktično interpretacijo. V zadnjih petih letih je bilo uvedeno veliko število biomedicinskih korpusov in najsodobnejših modelov. Vendar splošnih smernic glede ocenjevanja modelov teh korpusov v enotnih in medterminoloških nastavitvah ni. V tem delu izvajamo primerjalno vrednotenje različnih referenčnih vrednosti in preučujemo učinkovitost najsodobnejših nevralnih arhitektur, ki temeljijo na dvosmernih predstavitvah kodirnikov iz transformatorjev (BERT), za povezovanje treh tipov entitet na treh področjih: povzetkih raziskav, oznakah zdravil in besedila, ki jih ustvarijo uporabniki o terapiji z zdravili v angleščini. Izvorno kodo in rezultate smo dali na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'jv': 'Ngubah Jagad Pangan Biyutan Ana akeh sing sampeyan anyar banjur lan ngawehi model sing sampeyan mruput. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang gunggo iki, kita komparasi nglanggar sampeyan luwih dumateng menyang karo perusahaan karo hal-hal hukum sing ngewehke nggawe gerapakan karo architecture state-of-the-arts Neral sing bisa basa Bidirectial decoder representations from Transformer Awak dhéwé wis nggawe kelompok lan ditambah https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'he': 'הקשר של היחידה ביורפואית מזכיר לטרמולוגיות שונות של כימיקלים, מחלות, גנים, תגובות תרופות בלתי נעימות הוא משימה מאתגרת, לעתים קרובות דורשת פרשנות לא סינטקטית. מספר גדול של גופורה ביורפואית ומודלים מצויינים הוציאו בחמש השנים האחרונות. עם זאת, אין שום כיוון כללי בנוגע להערכה של דוגמנים על הקופורה הזאת בסגנונות יחיד וחצות טרמינולוגיה. בעבודה הזו, אנו מבצעים עריכה משוואה של שונים נקודות רמזים ולחקור את היעילות של ארכיטקטורות עצביות מוקדמות על ידי מייצגים של קודד שתי כיוונים מהמערכות (BERT) לקשר של שלושה סוגי יחידות על שלושה תחומות: מחקרים אסטרקטים, תוויות סמים, וטקסטים שנוצרים מהמשתמשים על טיפול סמים באנגלית. עשינו את קוד המקור והתוצאות זמינים ב https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་དབུགས་སྨན་ཞབས་མི་དང་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལས་སྣ་ཚོགས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདས་བའི་ལོ་བསྒྱུར་གྱི་སྨན་གཞུང་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རིགས་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་འདས་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་ལྔའི་ནང་དུ་སྟོན་ཚར་བ། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྡུད་མིའི་ནང་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་འདི་དག་གི་མིག་དཔྱད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་གཞན་ཞིག་མིན་འདུག In this work, we perform a comparative evaluation of various benchmarks and study the efficiency of state-of-the-art neural architectures based on Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) for linking of three entity types across three domains: research abstracts, drug labels, and user-generated texts on drug therapy in English. ང་ཚོས་ཐོག་མའི་ཨང་རྩིས་དང་འབྲས་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཚར་ཡོད་པ https://github.com/insilicomedicine/Fair-Evaluation-BERT.'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Neural RST Discourse Parsing', 'ar': 'تحليل الخطاب العصبي RST متعدد اللغات', 'pt': 'Análise de Discurso RST Neural Multilíngue', 'es': 'Análisis del discurso RST neuronal multilingüe', 'fr': 'Analyse du discours RST neuronal multilingue', 'ja': '多言語ニューラルRSTディスカッション解析', 'zh': '多语言神经 RST 语解析', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी तंत्रिका आरएसटी प्रवचन पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Многоязычный нейронный RST-анализ дискурса', 'ga': 'Parsáil Dioscúrsa RST Néaránach Ilteangach', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσική ανάλυση νεύρων RST', 'ka': 'Multilingual Neural RST Discourse Parsing', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű neurális RST Discourse Parsing', 'it': 'Analisi del discorso della RST neurale multilingue', 'kk': 'Көп тілді нейралық RST дискурстарын талдау', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbis RST diskurso analizavimas', 'mk': 'Name', 'mt': 'Multilingual Neural RST Discourse Parsing', 'ms': 'Comment', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ നെയുറല്\u200d RST ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna analiza dyskusji neuronowej RST', 'mn': 'Олон хэл мэдрэлийн RST ярианы талаар', 'no': 'Analysering av fleirspråk nøyrale RST- diskursar', 'ro': 'Analizarea discursului cu RST neural multilingv', 'sr': 'Razmatranje višejezičkih neuralnih RST diskursa', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණික RST සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Heshiiska qashinka ee naafada ah ee RST', 'sv': 'Flerspråkig neural RST diskurstolkning', 'ta': 'பல மொழி நெயுரு RST வட்டு பாடல்', 'ur': 'Multilingual Neural RST Discourse Parsing', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'đa ngôn ngữ thần kinh RST Khám nghiệm:', 'bg': 'Многоезичен неврален RST дискурс анализ', 'da': 'Flersproget neural RST diskursfortolkning', 'hr': 'Razmatranje višejezičkih neuralnih RST diskusija', 'nl': 'Meertalige neurale RST discourse parsing', 'de': 'Mehrsprachiges neuronales RST Diskursparsing', 'ko': '다언어 신경 네트워크 문장 분석', 'fa': 'گفتگوهای عصبی', 'id': 'Penganalisan Sekursus RST Neural Multilingual', 'sw': 'Kuchochea Udhibiti wa RST kwa lugha nyingi', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli näyral RST Gürüş Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Veelvuldige neurale RST Ontvaring', 'sq': 'Analizimi i diskutimit të RST-së neurologjike', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Çox dilli nöral RST diskursu analizi', 'bn': 'বহুভাষায় নিউরেল RST ডিসার্স পার্সিং', 'bs': 'Razmatranje višejezičkih neuralnih RST diskursa', 'ca': 'Analització multilingüe del discurs neuronal RST', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčná analýza nervového RST diskursu', 'et': 'Mitmekeelne neuroraalne RST diskursuse parsimine', 'fi': 'Monikielinen neurologinen RST-diskurssin jäsentäminen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ניתוח דיסקורס RST נוירולי רבות שפתיים', 'jv': 'Piring', 'sk': 'Večjezično razpravljanje o živčnih RST', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་བསམ་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'Text discourse parsing plays an important role in understanding information flow and argumentative structure in natural language. Previous research under the Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) has mostly focused on inducing and evaluating models from the English treebank. However, the parsing tasks for other languages such as German, Dutch, and Portuguese are still challenging due to the shortage of annotated data. In this work, we investigate two approaches to establish a neural, cross-lingual discourse parser via : (1) utilizing multilingual vector representations ; and (2) adopting segment-level translation of the source content. Experiment results show that both methods are effective even with limited training data, and achieve state-of-the-art performance on cross-lingual, document-level discourse parsing on all sub-tasks.', 'ar': 'يلعب تحليل الخطاب النصي دورًا مهمًا في فهم تدفق المعلومات والبنية الجدلية في اللغة الطبيعية. ركزت الأبحاث السابقة في إطار نظرية البنية البلاغية (RST) في الغالب على تحفيز وتقييم النماذج من بنك الشجرة الإنجليزي. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال مهام التحليل للغات أخرى مثل الألمانية والهولندية والبرتغالية صعبة بسبب نقص البيانات المشروحة. في هذا العمل ، نحقق في طريقتين لإنشاء محلل للخطاب العصبي متعدد اللغات من خلال: (1) استخدام تمثيلات المتجهات متعددة اللغات ؛ و (2) اعتماد الترجمة الجزئية لمحتوى المصدر. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن كلتا الطريقتين فعالتان حتى مع وجود بيانات تدريب محدودة ، وتحققان أداءً متطورًا في تحليل الخطاب متعدد اللغات على مستوى المستندات في جميع المهام الفرعية.', 'pt': 'A análise do discurso do texto desempenha um papel importante na compreensão do fluxo de informações e da estrutura argumentativa em linguagem natural. Pesquisas anteriores sob a Teoria da Estrutura Retórica (RST) se concentraram principalmente na indução e avaliação de modelos do banco de árvores inglês. No entanto, as tarefas de análise para outros idiomas, como alemão, holandês e português, ainda são desafiadoras devido à escassez de dados anotados. Neste trabalho, investigamos duas abordagens para estabelecer um analisador de discurso neural e multilíngue por meio de: (1) utilizando representações vetoriais multilíngues; e (2) adotar a tradução em nível de segmento do conteúdo de origem. Os resultados do experimento mostram que ambos os métodos são eficazes mesmo com dados de treinamento limitados e alcançam desempenho de última geração na análise de discurso em nível de documento e em vários idiomas em todas as subtarefas.', 'fr': "L'analyse du discours de texte joue un rôle important dans la compréhension du flux d'informations et de la structure argumentative en langage naturel. Les recherches précédentes dans le cadre de la théorie de la structure rhétorique (RST) se sont principalement concentrées sur l'induction et l'évaluation de modèles provenant de la banque d'arbres anglais. Cependant, les tâches d'analyse pour d'autres langues telles que l'allemand, le néerlandais et le portugais restent difficiles en raison du manque de données annotées. Dans ce travail, nous étudions deux approches pour établir un analyseur de discours interlinguistique neuronal via\xa0: (1) l'utilisation de représentations vectorielles multilingues\xa0; et (2) l'adoption d'une traduction au niveau du segment du contenu source. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que les deux méthodes sont efficaces même avec des données d'entraînement limitées, et permettent d'obtenir des performances de pointe en matière d'analyse du discours multilingue au niveau du document pour toutes les sous-tâches.", 'es': 'El análisis del discurso de texto desempeña un papel importante en la comprensión del flujo de información y la estructura argumentativa en el lenguaje natural. La investigación previa en el marco de la Teoría de la Estructura Retórica (RST) se ha centrado principalmente en inducir y evaluar modelos del banco de árboles inglés. Sin embargo, las tareas de análisis para otros idiomas, como el alemán, el holandés y el portugués, siguen siendo difíciles debido a la escasez de datos anotados. En este trabajo, investigamos dos enfoques para establecer un analizador del discurso neuronal y multilingüe mediante: (1) la utilización de representaciones vectoriales multilingües; y (2) la adopción de la traducción a nivel de segmento del contenido fuente. Los resultados de los experimentos muestran que ambos métodos son efectivos incluso con datos de entrenamiento limitados, y logran un rendimiento de vanguardia en el análisis del discurso multilingüe a nivel de documento en todas las subtareas.', 'ja': 'テキスト論証構文解析は、自然言語における情報の流れと議論構造を理解する上で重要な役割を果たす。修辞構造理論（ RST ）の下でのこれまでの研究は、主にイギリスのツリーバンクからのモデルの誘導と評価に焦点を当てている。しかし、注釈付きデータが不足しているため、ドイツ語、オランダ語、ポルトガル語などの他の言語の解析タスクは依然として困難です。この研究では、（ 1 ）多言語ベクトル表現を利用すること、および（ 2 ）ソースコンテンツのセグメントレベルの翻訳を採用することを介して、ニューラルでクロスリンガルなディスカッションパーサーを確立するための2つのアプローチを調査します。実験結果は、トレーニングデータが限られていても両方の方法が効果的であり、すべてのサブタスクでクロスリンガル、文書レベルの話し方解析で最先端のパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。', 'hi': 'पाठ प्रवचन पार्सिंग प्राकृतिक भाषा में सूचना प्रवाह और तर्कसंगत संरचना को समझने में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। बयानबाजी संरचना सिद्धांत (आरएसटी) के तहत पिछले शोध ने ज्यादातर अंग्रेजी ट्रीबैंक से मॉडल को प्रेरित करने और मूल्यांकन करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। हालांकि, जर्मन, डच और पुर्तगाली जैसी अन्य भाषाओं के लिए पार्सिंग कार्य अभी भी एनोटेटेड डेटा की कमी के कारण चुनौतीपूर्ण हैं। इस काम में, हम एक तंत्रिका, क्रॉस-लिंगुअल प्रवचन पार्सर के माध्यम से स्थापित करने के लिए दो दृष्टिकोणों की जांच करते हैं: (1) बहुभाषी वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करना; और (2) स्रोत सामग्री के खंड-स्तरीय अनुवाद को अपनाना। प्रयोग के परिणामों से पता चलता है कि दोनों विधियां सीमित प्रशिक्षण डेटा के साथ भी प्रभावी हैं, और सभी उप-कार्यों पर क्रॉस-भाषी, दस्तावेज़-स्तरीय प्रवचन पार्सिंग पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती हैं।', 'zh': '文本语解析解自然语言中信息流与论证结中起重用。 昔在修辞构理(RST)下究要在诱评英国树库模。 然注数不足,他语(如德语、荷兰语、葡萄牙语)解析犹有挑战性。 于此二术以立神经,跨语解析器:(1)以多言向量。 (2)用源片段级译。 实验结果表明虽练数有限,二者有效,且跨语言,文档级语解析最先进之性。', 'ru': 'Разбор текстового дискурса играет важную роль в понимании информационного потока и аргументативной структуры в естественном языке. Предыдущие исследования в рамках теории риторической структуры (RST) были в основном сосредоточены на индукции и оценке моделей из английского банка деревьев. Тем не менее, задачи синтаксического анализа для других языков, таких как немецкий, голландский и португальский, по-прежнему являются сложными из-за нехватки аннотированных данных. В этой работе мы исследуем два подхода к созданию нейронного, межязыкового парсера дискурса посредством: (1) использования многоязычных векторных представлений; и (2) принятия перевода исходного контента на уровне сегментов. Результаты экспериментов показывают, что оба метода эффективны даже при ограниченных данных обучения и достигают самой современной производительности при кросс-лингвистическом разборе дискурса на уровне документов по всем подзадачам.', 'ga': 'Tá ról tábhachtach ag parsáil dioscúrsa téacs chun sreabhadh faisnéise agus struchtúr argóinteach i dteanga nádúrtha a thuiscint. Dhírigh taighde a rinneadh roimhe seo faoin Teoiric Struchtúr Reitriciúil (RST) go príomha ar shamhlacha as crannchur Shasana a aslú agus a mheasúnú. Mar sin féin, tá na tascanna parsála do theangacha eile mar an Ghearmáinis, an Ollainnis agus an Phortaingéilis fós dúshlánach mar gheall ar ghanntanas sonraí anótáilte. San obair seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar dhá chur chuige chun parsálaí dioscúrsa néaránach tras-teangach a bhunú trí: (1) úsáid a bhaint as léirithe veicteora ilteangacha; agus (2) aistriúchán ar an mbunábhar a ghlacadh ar leibhéal na míre. Léiríonn torthaí na dturgnaimh go bhfuil an dá mhodh éifeachtach fiú le sonraí teoranta oiliúna, agus go mbaineann siad amach feidhmíocht úrscothach ar pharsáil dioscúrsa trasteangach ar leibhéal doiciméad ar gach fothasc.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση λόγου κειμένου παίζει σημαντικό ρόλο στην κατανόηση της ροής πληροφοριών και της επιχειρηματολογικής δομής στη φυσική γλώσσα. Προηγούμενη έρευνα στο πλαίσιο της Θεωρίας Ρετορικής Δομής (RST) έχει ως επί το πλείστον επικεντρωθεί στην εισαγωγή και αξιολόγηση μοντέλων από την αγγλική όχθη δέντρων. Ωστόσο, οι εργασίες ανάλυσης για άλλες γλώσσες, όπως τα γερμανικά, τα ολλανδικά και τα πορτογαλικά εξακολουθούν να είναι προκλήσεις λόγω της έλλειψης σχολιασμένων δεδομένων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε δύο προσεγγίσεις για την καθιέρωση ενός νευρωνικού, διγλωσσικού αναλυτή λόγου μέσω: (1) χρησιμοποιώντας πολυγλωσσικές διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις. και (2) έγκριση της μετάφρασης σε επίπεδο τμήματος του αρχικού περιεχομένου. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι και οι δύο μέθοδοι είναι αποτελεσματικές ακόμη και με περιορισμένα δεδομένα κατάρτισης, και επιτυγχάνουν υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις σε γλωσσικό διάλογο σε επίπεδο εγγράφων σε όλες τις επιμέρους εργασίες.', 'hu': 'A szövegdiskurzus elemzése fontos szerepet játszik az információáramlás és az érvelési struktúra megértésében a természetes nyelven. Korábbi kutatások a Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) keretében leginkább az angol fabank modelleinek indukálására és értékelésére összpontosítottak. Más nyelvek, mint például a német, holland és portugál nyelvek elemzési feladatai azonban továbbra is kihívást jelentenek a jegyzetelt adatok hiánya miatt. Ebben a munkában két megközelítést vizsgálunk egy neurális, többnyelvű diskurzus elemző létrehozására: (1) többnyelvű vektor reprezentációk használatával; és (2) a forrástartalom szegmensszintű fordításának elfogadása. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy mindkét módszer hatékony még korlátozott képzési adatok esetén is, és a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el a többnyelvű, dokumentum szintű diskurzus elemzésében minden alcsoport esetében.', 'it': "L'analisi del discorso testuale svolge un ruolo importante nella comprensione del flusso di informazioni e della struttura argomentativa nel linguaggio naturale. Le ricerche precedenti nell'ambito della Teoria della Struttura Retorica (RST) si sono concentrate principalmente sull'induzione e sulla valutazione di modelli dall'albero inglese. Tuttavia, i compiti di analisi per altre lingue come tedesco, olandese e portoghese sono ancora difficili a causa della mancanza di dati annotati. In questo lavoro, esaminiamo due approcci per stabilire un parser neurale, cross-lingual del discorso attraverso: (1) utilizzando rappresentazioni vettoriali multilingue; e (2) adottare la traduzione a livello di segmento del contenuto di origine. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che entrambi i metodi sono efficaci anche con dati di formazione limitati e raggiungono prestazioni all'avanguardia sull'analisi dei discorsi cross-lingual a livello documentale su tutte le sottoattività.", 'ka': 'ტექსტის დისკურსების პარასირება იყო მნიშვნელოვანი პროლის ინფორმაციის სიგრძნობის და არგუმენტიური სტრუქტურაციის ნახვაში. პირტორიკალური სტრუქტურის ტეორიის (RST) სწორედ წინა შესწავლობა უფრო კონუქტურებულია ანგლისური სტრუქტურის მოდელების ინდისტურაციას და გაუმუ მაგრამ სხვა ენებისთვის, როგორც გერმანეთი, ჰონდენური და პორგუტებური, უკვე უფრო შესაძლებელია, რადგან არაფერი მონაცემებების შემდეგ. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ორი მიღება ნეირალური, მრავალური განსხვავების განსხვავებაზე: და (2) წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენა. ექსპერიმენტის შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ორივე მეტოვები ეფექტიურია, მარტივი განათლების მონაცემებით და გავაკეთებთ მრავალური, დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის დისკუმენტის განათლებ', 'kk': 'Мәтін дискурстарын талдау маңызды мәлімет жұмысын түсініп, тәуелді тілде аргументациялық құрылымын түсініп жатыр. Риторикалық структура теориясы (RST) астындағы алдыңғы зерттеу көпшілігі ағылшын тілінен үлгілерді индукциялауға және оқу үлгілеріне көпшілік береді. Бірақ неміс, Нидерландша және Португалия тілдерінің басқа тілдер үшін талдау тапсырмалары әлі жазылған деректердің жеткіліксіздігіне көмектеседі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз невралық, көптілік дискурстарды талдау үшін екі арқылы зерттеуді: (1) көптілік вектордың түсініктемелерін қолдану арқылы. және (2) көзі мазмұнының сегмент деңгейінің аударуын қолдану. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері екі әдістері шектелген оқыту деректеріне да әсер етеді, және бірнеше тілікті, құжат деңгейіндегі дискурстары барлық ішкі тапсырмаларды талдау үшін әртүрлі әрт', 'lt': 'Teksto diskurso analizavimas atlieka svarbų vaidmenį suprantant informacijos srautą ir argumentacinę struktūrą natūralioje kalboje. Ankstesniuose Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) moksliniuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama anglų medžio pagrindo modelių skatinimui ir vertinimui. Tačiau kitų kalbų, pavyzdžiui, vokiečių, olandų ir portugalų, analizavimo užduotys vis dar kelia sunkumų dėl anotacinių duomenų trūkumo. Šiame darbe tiriame du metodus, kaip sukurti nervinį, tarpkalbinį diskurso analizatorių: 1) naudojant daugiakalbį vektorių rodmenį; ir (2) priimti šaltinio turinio vertimą segmento lygiu. Experiment results show that both methods are effective even with limited training data, and achieve state-of-the-art performance on cross-lingual, document-level discourse parsing on all sub-tasks.', 'mk': 'Анализирањето на текстот игра важна улога во разбирањето на текстот на информации и аргументативната структура на природниот јазик. Претходното истражување во рамките на Теоријата на реторичката структура (РСТ) се фокусираше претежно на индукција и оценка на моделите од англиската дрвена база. Сепак, задачите за анализирање на други јазици како што се германски, холандски и португалски се сé уште предизвикувачки поради недостатокот на анотирани податоци. Во оваа работа, истражуваме два пристапи за воспоставување на нервен, крстојазичен анализатор на дискурс преку: (1) користење мултијазични векторни претставувања; and (2) adopting segment-level translation of the source content.  Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека двата методи се ефикасни дури и со ограничени податоци за обука, и постигнуваат најсовремени резултати во разгледувањето на дискурсот на меѓујазично ниво на документите за сите подзадачи.', 'ms': 'Penghuraian teks bermain peran penting dalam memahami aliran maklumat dan struktur argumensif dalam bahasa semulajadi. Penelitian terdahulu di bawah Teori Struktur Rhetorical (RST) kebanyakan fokus pada induksi dan penilaian model dari pangkalan pokok Inggeris. Namun, tugas penghuraian untuk bahasa lain seperti Jerman, Belanda, dan Portugis masih mencabar kerana kekurangan data yang dicatat. Dalam kerja ini, kami menyelidiki dua pendekatan untuk menetapkan penghurai percakapan saraf, saling bahasa melalui: (1) menggunakan perwakilan vektor berbilang bahasa; dan (2) menerima terjemahan aras segmen bagi kandungan sumber. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua kaedah berkesan walaupun dengan data latihan terbatas, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada penghuraian diskors aras dokumen-saling bahasa pada semua sub-tugas.', 'ml': 'പദാവലി സംസാരം പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രകൃതിഭാഷയിലും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്വാഭാഷയിലുമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രകാരം  Previous research under the Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) has mostly focused on inducing and evaluating models from the English treebank.  എന്നാലും ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d, ഡച്ച്, പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഗീഷ് പോലുള്ള മറ്റു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ജോലികളുടെ ജോലികള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും വിലപിക്ക ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് വഴികളെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d, ക്രിസ്റ്റര്\u200d ഭാഷ സംസാരം സ്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d: (1) പല ഭാഷ വെക്റ (2) സൂര്യസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്ത പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു രണ്ട് രീതികളും പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റായ്കങ്ങള്\u200d പോലും പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാകുന', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tad-diskors tat-test għandha rwol importanti fil-fehim tal-fluss tal-informazzjoni u l-istruttura argumentattiva fil-lingwa naturali. Previous research under the Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) has mostly focused on inducing and evaluating models from the English treebank.  Madankollu, il-kompiti ta’ analiżi għal lingwi oħra bħall-Ġermaniż, l-Olandiż u l-Portugiż għadhom ta’ sfida minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ dejta annotata. F’dan ix-xogħol, ninvestigaw żewġ approċċi biex nistabbilixxu analizzatur ta’ diskors newrali, translingwi permezz ta’: (1) l-użu ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ vetturi multilingwi; and (2) adopting segment-level translation of the source content.  Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li ż-żewġ metodi huma effettivi anke b’dejta limitata dwar it-taħriġ, u jiksbu prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata dwar l-analiżijiet ta’ diskors fil-livell tad-dokumenti fuq is-sottokompiti kollha.', 'no': 'Tolking av tekstdiskursar spelar ein viktig rolle i å forstå informasjonsflyt og argumentativ struktur i naturspråk. Førre forskning under retorisk strukturteorie (RST) har hovudsakelig fokusert på indusering og evaluering av modeller frå engelsk treebank. Tolkingsoppgåver for andre språk, som tysk, nederlandsk og portugisisk, er imidlertid vanskeleg på grunn av korta data som er markert. I denne arbeida undersøker vi to tilnærmingar for å setja opp ein neiralt, krysspråk diskursanalyser via: (1) som brukar fleirspråk vektorrepresentasjonar. og (2) å godta omsetjinga på segmentnivået av kjeldeinnhaldet. Eksperimentresultat viser at begge metodar er effektiv sjølv med begrensede opplæringsdata, og oppnår kunstendige utføringar på krysspråk, dokumentnivådiskursar om tolking av alle underoppgåver.', 'pl': 'Parsowanie dyskursu tekstowego odgrywa ważną rolę w zrozumieniu przepływu informacji i struktury argumentatywnej w języku naturalnym. Poprzednie badania w ramach teorii struktury retorycznej (RST) koncentrowały się głównie na indukowaniu i ocenie modeli z angielskiego brzegu drzewa. Jednak zadania parsowania dla innych języków, takich jak niemiecki, holenderski i portugalski, nadal są trudne ze względu na brak adnotacji danych. W niniejszej pracy badamy dwa podejścia do ustanowienia neuronowego, wielojęzycznego parsera dyskursu poprzez: (1) wykorzystanie wielojęzycznych reprezentacji wektorów; oraz (2) przyjęcie tłumaczenia na poziomie segmentowym treści źródłowych. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że obie metody są skuteczne nawet przy ograniczonej liczbie danych treningowych i osiągają najnowocześniejsze wyniki w analizie dyskursu między językami i dokumentami na poziomie wszystkich podzadań.', 'sr': 'Razmatranje tekstskih diskursa igra važnu ulogu u razumijevanju toka informacija i argumentativne strukture prirodnog jezika. Prije istraživanja teorije retoričke strukture (RST) uglavnom se fokusirala na induciranje i procjenu modela iz engleskog trebenka. Međutim, analiziranje zadataka drugih jezika poput Njemačkog, Holandskog i Portugalskog još uvijek su izazovni zbog nedostatka annotiranih podataka. U ovom poslu istražujemo dva pristupa za uspostavljanje neuralnog, prekrštenog razgovora preko: (1) korištenja višejezičkih vektorskih predstavljanja; i (2) prihvaćanje prevoda na nivou segmenta izvora. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da su oba metoda efikasna čak i sa ograničenim podacima o obuci, i ostvarili postupak umjetnosti na međujezičkim, diskusijama na nivou dokumenta analiziranje svih podzadataka.', 'mn': 'Текст ярианы талаар ажиллах нь мэдээллийн урсгал болон байгалийн хэл дээр аргументын бүтэц ойлгоход чухал үүрэг юм. Риторикийн Структур Теории (RST) дахь өмнөх судалгаа Англи хэлний загварын загварын загварын үйлдвэрлэх, үнэлэх загваруудыг ихэнхдээ анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Гэхдээ Герман, Датланд, Португалийн бусад хэлнүүдийн хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаанууд нь тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдээллийн бага байдлаас ч хэцүү байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид мэдрэлийн, олон хэл векторын үзүүлэлтийг ашиглах хоёр арга зам шалгаж байна. (2) эх үүсвэрийн агуулагчдын хэмжээний түвшинд орчуулагддаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд хоёр арга нь хязгаарлагдсан сургалтын мэдээллээр ч үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн олон хэлний, баримт түвшин ярианы талаар бүх суб-даалгаварын талаар хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж', 'ro': 'Analizarea discursului text joacă un rol important în înțelegerea fluxului de informații și a structurii argumentative în limbajul natural. Cercetările anterioare din cadrul Teoriei Structurii Retorice (RST) s-au concentrat în principal pe inducerea și evaluarea modelelor din brațul englez. Cu toate acestea, sarcinile de analizare pentru alte limbi, cum ar fi germana, olandeza și portugheza sunt încă dificile din cauza lipsei de date adnotate. În această lucrare, investigăm două abordări pentru stabilirea unui parser neural, interlingv de discurs prin: (1) utilizarea reprezentărilor vectoriale multilingve; și (2) adoptarea traducerii la nivel de segment a conținutului sursă. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că ambele metode sunt eficiente chiar și cu date limitate de formare și obțin performanțe de ultimă generație în analizarea discursului translingvistic, la nivel de document, pe toate subsarcinile.', 'so': 'Luqada dabiicadda ah waxaa ku jira qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan waxgarashada macluumaadka la socda iyo dhismaha hadalka ka dooda ah. Waxbarashada hore ee ku qoran qoraalka dhismaha Rhetorical (RST) waxaa ugu badan ku kalsoonaaday koritaanka iyo qiimeynta modelalka afka Ingiriiska. Si kastaba ha ahaatee goobaha baarlamaanka ee luuqadaha kale, sida Jarmal, Dutch iyo Burtuqiis ayaa weli dhibaataysan, sababtoo ah baahida macluumaadka la dhibaataysay darteed. Markaas waxan, waxaynu baaritaynaa laba qaab ah si aan u sameyno hadal neural ah oo kala duwan luqadaha kala duduwan, (1) isticmaalaya noocyo wado kala duduwan; iyo (2) soo qaadashada tarjumaadda heerka kooxa Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in labada qaab ay tayo u leeyihiin xittaa ay ku leeyihiin macluumaad waxbarasho oo xad ah, oo ay gaadhaan sameynta farshaxanka oo ku saabsan luqada kala duduwan, heerka sheekeysiga ee dukumentiga ku qoran dhammaan shaqada hoose-hoose.', 'ta': 'உரை பேச்சு பாடல் தகவல் flow மற்றும் வார்த்தையான மொழியில் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாட Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) கீழ் முந்தைய ஆராய்ச்சி பெரும்பாலாக ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து மாதிரிகளை செயல்படுத்தி மதிப்பிடும் முறை ஆனால், ஜெர்மன், டச்சு மற்றும் போர்த்துகீசிஷ் போன்ற மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கான பாடல் பணிகள் இன்னும் சவால் செய்கிறார்கள் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இரண்டு வழிகளைத் தேடுகிறோம் ஒரு நரம்பு, கிரும்ப மொழியின் பேச்சு பிரிவு: (1) பல மொழி நெறியின் குறிப்புகளை  (2) மூலத்தின் உள்ளடக்கத்தின் பகுதி மட்டத்தை மொழிபெயர்ப்பை எடுத்துக் கொள்ளும். முயற்சியின் முடிவு', 'sv': 'Textdiskurstolkning spelar en viktig roll för att förstå informationsflöde och argumentationsstruktur i naturligt språk. Tidigare forskning inom Retorical Structure Theory (RST) har främst fokuserat på att inducera och utvärdera modeller från den engelska trädbanken. Men tolkningsuppgifterna för andra språk som tyska, nederländska och portugisiska är fortfarande utmanande på grund av bristen på kommenterade data. I detta arbete undersöker vi två tillvägagångssätt för att etablera en neural, korspråkig diskursparser via: (1) användning av flerspråkiga vektorrepresentationer; och (2) Anta översättning på segmentnivå av källinnehållet. Experimentsresultat visar att båda metoderna är effektiva även med begränsade träningsdata, och uppnår toppmoderna prestanda på tvärspråklig diskurstolkning på alla deluppgifter.', 'si': 'පාළුවන් කතාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාවේ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තේරුම් ගන්න වැදගත් ප්\u200d රෙටෝරිකාල් සංවිධානය (RST) පසුගින් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්\u200dරෙබැන්ක් වලින් මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරධ නමුත්, ජර්මාන්, ඩච්චාන්, පුර්තුතුජියා වගේ අනිත් භාෂාවට විශ්ලේෂණ වැඩක් තාමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනව මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් භාෂාවක් විශේෂකයක් ස්ථාපනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න: (1) භාෂ සහ (2) ප්\u200dරධාන සාමාන්ත්\u200dරිය සම්බන්ධතාවයේ කොටස් ක්\u200dරමයක් භාවිත කරන්න. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත තියෙන්නත් සම්පූර්ණයි, සම්පූර්ණ භාෂාවක් වල සි', 'ur': 'پیغام کی گفتگو پارسینگ کا ایک اہم رول ہے جسے معلومات کی جریان اور دلیل کی ساختاری طبیعی زبان میں سمجھ سکتی ہے. ریٹروریک ساختار تئوریس (RST) کے نیچے پہلے تحقیق اکثر انگلیسی ٹریب بنک سے نمڈلوں کی تحقیق اور ارزیابی پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ لیکن دوسری زبانوں کے لئے پارسینگ کا کام، جیسے جرمن، ڈنچ، اور پورتوګیز، اب بھی اپنا ذکر دکھانے کی کمزوری کے باعث مشکل ہے. ہم اس کام میں دو طریقے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ ایک نئورل، کروس زبان کی گفتگو پارچر بنانے کے لئے: (1) multilingual vector representations کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ اور (2) سورج منصفات کا سقم سطح کا ترجمہ قبول کرتا ہے۔ آزمائش نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ دونوں طریقے محدود ترینس ڈیٹے کے ساتھ بھی مفید ہیں، اور کروس زبان کی، دفتر-سطح کی صحبت کے ذریعہ تمام sub-tasks کے بارے میں پارس کرنے کے ذریعہ موجود ہیں.', 'uz': "Text discourse parsing plays an important role in understanding information flow and argumentative structure in natural language.  Name Lekin, Olmon, Dutch va Portugisi kabi boshqa tillar uchun parking ish vazifalari taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yoʻq sababi davom etilmoqda. Bu vazida biz bir necha tilda muloqon vektorning representlaridan foydalanish uchun neyrol, har xil tildagi gapiruvchini aniqlash uchun ikkita usulni boshqaramiz: va manba tarjima tarjimasini o'rganish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Việc phân tích văn bản có vai trò quan trọng trong việc thấu hiểu dòng thông tin và cấu trúc tranh luận trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Những nghiên cứu trước trong lí thuyết cấu trúc cơ cấu trúc Rhetoric (RST) đã chủ yếu tập trung vào sản xuất và đánh giá các mô hình từ cây Ba Lan Anh. Tuy nhiên, việc phân tích các ngôn ngữ khác như Đức, Hòa Lan và Bồ Đào Nha vẫn còn khó khăn vì thiếu dữ liệu ghi chú. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu hai phương pháp để thiết lập một phân tích tâm lý, ngôn ngữ khác nhau qua: 1) sử dụng các biểu tượng vector đa dạng. và (2) chấp nhận dịch chuyên nghành của nội dung nguồn. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy cả hai phương pháp có hiệu quả ngay cả khi có ít dữ liệu về huấn luyện, và đạt được những thành tựu hiện đại về ngôn ngữ khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Анализирането на текстови дискурси играе важна роля за разбирането на информационния поток и аргументативната структура в естествения език. Предишни изследвания по теория на реторичната структура (РСТ) са се фокусирали предимно върху индукция и оценка на модели от английската трибанка. Въпреки това, задачите за анализиране на други езици като немски, холандски и португалски все още са трудни поради недостига на анотирани данни. В тази работа изследваме два подхода за установяване на неврален, междуезичен дискурсен анализатор чрез: (1) използване на многоезични векторни представи; и (2) приемане на превод на ниво сегмент на изходното съдържание. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че и двата метода са ефективни дори с ограничени данни за обучение и постигат най-съвременни резултати при интерезичен анализ на дискурса на ниво документи по всички подзадачи.', 'nl': 'Tekstdiscoursparsing speelt een belangrijke rol bij het begrijpen van informatiestroom en argumentatieve structuur in natuurlijke taal. Eerder onderzoek onder de Rhetorical Structural Theory (RST) heeft zich voornamelijk gericht op het induceren en evalueren van modellen uit de Engelse boombank. De parsing taken voor andere talen zoals Duits, Nederlands en Portugees zijn echter nog steeds uitdagend vanwege het tekort aan geannoteerde gegevens. In dit werk onderzoeken we twee benaderingen om een neurale, cross-lingual discours parser te ontwikkelen via: (1) gebruik makend van meertalige vectorrepresentaties; en (2) goedkeuring van een vertaling op segmentniveau van de broninhoud. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat beide methoden effectief zijn, zelfs met beperkte trainingsgegevens, en state-of-the-art prestaties behalen bij cross-lingual, document-level discoursparsing op alle subtaken.', 'da': 'Tekstdiskursanalyse spiller en vigtig rolle i forståelsen af informationsstrømmen og argumentationsstrukturen i naturligt sprog. Tidligere forskning under Retorical Structure Theory (RST) har primært fokuseret på at inducere og evaluere modeller fra den engelske træbank. Men tolkningsopgaverne for andre sprog som tysk, hollandsk og portugisisk er stadig udfordrende på grund af manglen på noterede data. I dette arbejde undersøger vi to tilgange til at etablere en neural, tværsproget diskursfortolker via: (1) brug af flersprogede vektorrepræsentationer; og (2) vedtagelse af segmentoversættelse af kildeindholdet. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at begge metoder er effektive selv med begrænsede træningsdata, og opnår state-of-the-art performance på tværsproget, dokumentniveau diskurs parsing på alle underopgaver.', 'hr': 'Razmatranje tekstskih diskursa igra važnu ulogu u razumijevanju toka informacija i argumentativne strukture prirodnog jezika. Prije istraživanja teorije retoričke strukture (RST) uglavnom se fokusirala na induciranje i procjenu modela iz engleskog treebanda. Međutim, analiziranje zadataka drugih jezika poput Njemačkog, Nizozemskog i Portugalskog još uvijek su izazovni zbog nedostatka navedenih podataka. U ovom poslu istražujemo dva pristupa za uspostavljanje neuralnog, prekograničnog razmatrača diskusija putem: (1) korištenja višejezičkih predstavljanja vektora; i (2) prihvaćanje prevoda na nivou segmenta izvora. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da su obje metode učinkovite čak i s ograničenim podacima o obuci i ostvarili postupak umjetnosti na međujezičkim, razinskim diskusijama na razini dokumenta analiziranje svih podzadataka.', 'de': 'Textdiskursparsing spielt eine wichtige Rolle beim Verständnis von Informationsfluss und argumentativer Struktur in natürlicher Sprache. Bisherige Forschungen unter der Rhetorical Structural Theory (RST) konzentrierten sich hauptsächlich auf die Induktion und Bewertung von Modellen aus der englischen Baumbank. Allerdings sind die Parsing-Aufgaben für andere Sprachen wie Deutsch, Niederländisch und Portugiesisch aufgrund des Mangels an annotierten Daten immer noch schwierig. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir zwei Ansätze zur Etablierung eines neuronalen, crosslingualen Diskursparsers mittels: (1) Verwendung mehrsprachiger Vektorrepräsentationen; und (2) Übernahme der Segmentübersetzung des Quellinhalts. Die Ergebnisse der Experimente zeigen, dass beide Methoden auch bei begrenzten Trainingsdaten effektiv sind und eine State-of-the-Art-Performance beim sprachübergreifenden Diskursparsen auf Dokumentenebene bei allen Teilaufgaben erzielen.', 'id': 'Analisasi diskors teks bermain peran penting dalam memahami aliran informasi dan struktur argumensif dalam bahasa alam. Penelitian sebelumnya di bawah Teori Struktur Rhetorical (RST) kebanyakan fokus pada induksi dan evaluasi model dari pangkalan pohon Inggris. Namun, tugas penghuraian untuk bahasa lain seperti Jerman, Belanda, dan Portugis masih menantang karena kekurangan data yang dicatat. In this work, we investigate two approaches to establish a neural, cross-lingual discourse parser via: (1) utilizing multilingual vector representations;  dan (2) menerima terjemahan tingkat segmen dari konten sumber. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa kedua metode efektif bahkan dengan data pelatihan terbatas, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada interbahasa, pembicaraan tingkat dokumen pada semua sub-tugas.', 'fa': 'گفتگوهای متن بررسی کردن نقش مهم را در درک جریان اطلاعات و ساختار ارائه\u200cدهنده در زبان طبیعی بازی می\u200cکند. تحقیقات قبلی زیر تئوری ساختار ریتوریک (RST) بیشتر روی تولید و ارزیابی مدلها از درخت انگلیسی تمرکز کرده است. با این حال، وظیفه\u200cهای تحلیل برای زبانهای دیگر مثل آلمان، هلندی و پورتوژیک هنوز به دلیل کوتاهی داده\u200cهای نوشته\u200cشده مشکل دارند. در این کار، ما دو دستور تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا یک پاره\u200cدهنده\u200cی گفتگوهای عصبی و متوسط زبان را از طریق: (1) با استفاده از نمایش\u200cدهندگان ویکتورهای متوسط زبان استفاده کنیم. و (۲) ترجمه سطح بخش\u200cهای محتوای منبع را قبول می\u200cکند. نتایج تجربه ها نشان می دهند که هر دو روش حتی با داده های آموزش محدودیت موثر هستند، و به انجام وضعیت هنری در مورد گفتگوهای متوسط زبان، سطح سند پارش کردن در همه عملیات زیر کار رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Text discourse parsing plays an important role in understanding information flow and argumentative structure in natural language.  Utafiti uliopita chini ya Tamko la Miundombinu ya RST (RST) umejikita zaidi kwenye kutengeneza na kutathmini mifano kutoka kwenye mitandao ya Kiingereza. Hata hivyo, kazi za wimbo huo kwa lugha nyingine kama vile Ujerumani, Dutch na Kireno bado zinachangamoto kutokana na upungufu wa taarifa zilizotajwa. Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza hatua mbili za kuanzisha mazungumzo ya lugha yenye ubongo, yenye lugha mbalimbali kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa lugha mbalimbali; na kuchukua tafsiri ya kiwango cha ngazi ya maudhui ya chanzo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hizo zina ufanisi hata kwa takwimu zilizo na mafunzo yenye ukomo, na kupata ufanisi wa hali ya sanaa katika lugha mbalimbali, mazungumzo ya kiwango cha nyaraka yanayocheza katika kazi zote za subira.', 'ko': '어편 분석은 자연 언어 중의 정보 흐름과 논문 구조를 이해하는 데 중요한 역할을 한다.기존의 수사구조이론(RST) 연구는 주로 영어 트리 라이브러리에서 모델을 귀납하고 평가하는 데 집중되었다.그러나 주석 데이터가 부족하기 때문에 독일어, 네덜란드어, 포르투갈어 등 다른 언어의 해석 임무는 여전히 도전적이다.이 작업에서 우리는 두 가지 다중 언어 신경 문장 분석기를 구축하는 방법을 연구했다. (1) 다중 언어 벡터를 이용하여 표시한다.(2) 단락급 번역 원본 내용을 채택한다.실험 결과에 따르면 유한한 훈련 데이터에서도 이 두 가지 방법은 모두 효과적이며 모든 하위 임무의 크로스 언어, 문서급 문장 분석에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다.', 'tr': 'Metin sözlerini ahtarmak tebigy dilinde maglumat akyny we taryş strukturyny düşünmek üçin wajyp roli oýnaýar. Rhetorikal Structure Theory (RST) altyndaky öňki barlag iňlisçe bagly çykyşyň nusgalaryny indukýa we çykyş etmäge üns berdi. Ýöne nemesçe, hollança we portugalça ýaly başga diller üçin işlerini tanyşdyrmak hem tanyş berilmegi üçin kynçylyk ýok. Bu işte, bir nöral, karşı dilli konuşma çözümlerini oluşturmak için iki yaklaştırma soruşuyoruz: (1) çoklu dilli vektör temsillerini kullanarak; (2) çeşme malümatynyň segment-derejesini terjime edip görkezilýär. Testler netijesi hem çykyş bilim maglumaty bilen täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär, we cross-lingual we desktap derejesi çykyş hemme alt-zady üçin çykyş edip bilýär.', 'af': "Teks diskursie verwerking speel 'n belangrike rol in verstaan inligting vloei en argumentatiewe struktuur in natuurlike taal. Vorige ondersoek onder die Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) het meeste fokus gefokus op induseer en evalueer modele van die Engelske treebank. Maar die verwerking opdragte vir ander tale soos Duitsk, Nederlands en Portugees is nog aangelyk vanweë die kortpad van aanmerkte data. In hierdie werk, ondersoek ons twee toegang om 'n neurale, kruistale diskursie ontwikkelaar te stel deur: (1) deur multitaalske vektorvoorstellings te gebruik; en (2) om segmentvlak vertaling van die bron inhoud te aanvaar. Eksperimentresultate wys dat beide metodes effektief is selfs met beperkte onderwerp data, en bereik staat-van-kunsten-prestasie op kruistale, dokumentvlak-diskursie onderwerp op alle subtaakte.", 'hy': 'Տեքստի խոսքի վերլուծումը կարևոր դեր է խաղում տեղեկատվության հոսքի և բանավեճի կառուցվածքի հասկանալու համար բնական լեզուներում: Ռետորական կառուցվածքի թեորիայի (ՌՍԹ) նախորդ հետազոտությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնացել են անգլերենի ծառի մոդելների ինդուկցիայի և գնահատման վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, այլ լեզուների, ինչպիսիք են գերմանացիները, հոլանդացիները և պորտուգալերենը, վերլուծությունը դեռևս դժվար է, քանի որ գրված տվյալների պակաս է: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու մոտեցում, որպեսզի ստեղծենք նյարդային, փոխլեզվով խոսակցության վերլուծում՝ 1) օգտագործելով բազլեզու վեկտորների ներկայացումներ, և և (2) աղբյուրի պարունակության սեգմենտային մակարդակի թարգմանման ընդունելը: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ երկու մեթոդները արդյունավետ են, նույնիսկ սահմանափակ ուսումնասիրության տվյալների հետ, և հասնում են ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին լեզվով առկա, փաստաթղթի մակարդակի խոսակցության վերլուծության բոլոր են', 'az': 'Mətn diskusiyası ayırılması məlumat akışını və təbiətli dildə argumentativ strukturlarını anlamaq üçün vacib bir rol oynayır. Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) altındakı əvvəlki araştırma İngilizə tərəfindən modelləri inşa etmək və değerlendirmək üçün çox odaqlandı. Lakin, Alman, Holanda və Portugalca kimi başqa dillər üçün ayrılma işləri hələ də məlumatların yoxduğu üçün çətin edirlər. Bu işdə, bir nöral, çox dilli söhbət parçacısı yaratmaq üçün iki yol araşdırırıq: (2) mənbə məlumatının segment-seviyyətinin dəyişikliyini qəbul edir. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçları hər ikisi təcrübə məlumatları ilə etkin olduğunu göstərir və hər iki təcrübə təcrübə məlumatları ilə müxtəlif dillərlə, belə səviyyədə dəyişiklik diskusiyasını çəkmək üçün mümkün olduğunu göstərir.', 'sq': 'Analizimi i diskursit të tekstit luan një rol të rëndësishëm në kuptimin e rrjedhjes së informacionit dhe strukturës argumentuese në gjuhën natyrore. Kërkimi i mëparshëm sipas Teorisë së Strukturës Retorike (RST) është përqëndruar kryesisht në nxitjen dhe vlerësimin e modeleve nga baza e pemës angleze. Megjithatë, detyrat e analizimit për gjuhë të tjera si gjermane, hollandeze dhe portugale janë ende sfiduese për shkak të mungesës së të dhënave të shënuara. In this work, we investigate two approaches to establish a neural, cross-lingual discourse parser via: (1) utilizing multilingual vector representations;  dhe (2) miratimin e përkthimit në nivelin segmentor të përmbajtjes së burimit. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë se të dy metodat janë efektive edhe me të dhëna të kufizuara të trainimit dhe arrijnë shfaqjen më të lartë në analizimin e diskursit në nivelin e dokumentit në të gjitha nëndetyrat.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ንግግር ማኅበረሰብ መረጃዎችን በመግለጥ እና በተፈጥሮ ቋንቋ የሚታወቀውን የመግለጫ ሥርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ የቀድሞው Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) በተለየው ምርጫዎች ከኢንጂልዩአዊ ትርጓሜክት ላይ መግለጫ እና ማረጋገጫ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የጋርማዊ፣ ድውንክ እና ፖርቱጋሊስ ያሉ ሌሎች ቋንቋዎች የፓርቲው ማድረጊያውን ግን በአጭንቀት የተቃወመ ዳራዎችን በማድረግ የሚቃወሙ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የናውሬል፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላት መግለጫ ለመፍጠር ሁለት ደረጃዎችን እንፈልጋለን:( 1) በብዙ ቋንቋዎች የዌብ መቆጣጠርን በመጠቀም ነው፤ (2) የክፍል ደረጃን ትርጓሜ ለመውሰድ ፈተና ውጤቶች ሁለቱ ሥርዓቶች በተወሰነ ትምህርት ዳታዎችን እንኳ እንዲያካክሉ እና በቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ላይ የልዩ ልዩ-አርእስትን እንዲያገኙ፣ የሰነድ-ደረጃ ንግግር በሁሉም ደብዳቤ-ስራ ላይ ማነጋገርን እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় তথ্য প্রবাহ এবং যুক্তিগত কাঠামোর মধ্যে টেক্সট বক্তৃতা পার্সিং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূম রেটোরিক্যাল কাঠামো থিওরির (আরস্টি) নিচে পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা বেশীরভাগ ইংরেজি ট্রিব্যাংক থেকে মডেল উৎপাদন এবং মূল্যায়নের উপর তবে জার্মান, ডাচ এবং পর্তুগীজের মতো অন্যান্য ভাষার জন্য পার্গিং কর্মসূচীর কাজ এখনো চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে বিরক্তিকর তথ্যের সংক্র এই কাজের মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি নিউরেল, ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী কথোপকথন প্রসারিত করার জন্য দুটি উপায় তদন্ত করি: (১) বহুভাষায় ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্ এবং (২) উৎসের বিষয়বস্তুর বিভাগ-স্তর অনুবাদ গ্রহণ করে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এমনকি সীমিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যেও দুটি পদ্ধতি কার্যকর এবং সীমিত ভাষায় শিল্পের প্রতিক্রিয়া পাওয়া যায়, সকল সাবট-কা', 'ca': "L'analització del discurs de text té un paper important en entendre el flux d'informació i l'estructura argumentativa en el llenguatge natural. La recerca anterior de la Teoria de l'Estructura Retòrica (RST) s'ha centrat principalment en l'inducció i l'evaluació de models a partir de l'arbre anglès. Però les tasques d'analització d'altres llengües com alemany, holandès i portuguès encara són difícils a causa de la manca de dades anotates. En aquesta feina investigam dos enfocaments per a establir un analitzador neuronal de discurs translingüístic a través: (1) utilitzant representacions multilingües de vectors; i (2) adoptar la traducció del contingut de fonts a nivell de segments. Els resultats dels experiments demostren que ambdós mètodes són efectius fins i tot amb dades limitades de capacitació, i aconsegueixen un rendiment més avançat en l'analització de discurs a nivell translingüístic i documental sobre totes les subtasques.", 'cs': 'Textová analýza diskurzu hraje důležitou roli při pochopení toku informací a argumentativní struktury v přirozeném jazyce. Předchozí výzkum v rámci teorie rétorické struktury (RST) se zaměřil především na indukci a hodnocení modelů z anglického stromového břehu. Nicméně, parsování úkolů pro jiné jazyky, jako je němčina, nizozemština a portugalština, jsou stále náročné kvůli nedostatku anotovaných dat. V této práci zkoumáme dva přístupy k vytvoření neuronového, cross-jazyčného diskurzního parseru prostřednictvím: (1) využití vícejazyčných vektorových reprezentací; a (2) přijetí segmentového překladu zdrojového obsahu. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že obě metody jsou efektivní i s omezenými tréninkovými daty a dosahují nejmodernějších výkonů při analýze diskurzu na úrovni všech dílčích úkolů.', 'bs': 'Pregled tekstskih diskursa igra važnu ulogu u razumijevanju toka informacija i argumentativne strukture na prirodnom jeziku. Prije istraživanja teorije retoričke strukture (RST) uglavnom se fokusirala na induciranje i procjenu modela iz engleskog trbuha. Međutim, analiziranje zadataka drugih jezika kao što su Njemački, Holandski i Portugalski još uvijek su izazovni zbog nedostatka annotiranih podataka. U ovom poslu istražujemo dva pristupa za uspostavljanje neuralnog, prekograničnog razgovora preko: (1) korištenja višejezičkih predstavljanja vektora; i (2) prihvaćanje prevoda na nivou segmenta izvora. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da su obje metode učinkovite čak i sa ograničenim podacima o obuci, i ostvarili postupak umjetnosti na međujezičkim, razinskim diskusijama o razini dokumenta analiziranju svih podzadataka.', 'et': 'Teksti diskursuse parsimisel on oluline roll infovoogude ja argumentatiivse struktuuri mõistmisel looduskeeles. Varasemad uuringud retoorilise struktuuri teooria (RST) raames on keskendunud peamiselt Inglise puupanga mudelite indutseerimisele ja hindamisele. Siiski on teiste keelte, näiteks saksa, hollandi ja portugali parsimise ülesanded märgitud andmete puudumise tõttu endiselt keerulised. Käesolevas töös uurime kahte lähenemisviisi neuraalse, keeleülese diskursuse parser loomiseks: (1) kasutades mitmekeelseid vektorirepresentatsioone; ja (2) lähtesisu segmenditasandil tõlkimise vastuvõtmine. Eksperimentide tulemused näitavad, et mõlemad meetodid on efektiivsed isegi piiratud koolitusandmete korral ja saavutavad kaasaegse tulemuse kõigi alamülesannete keeleülesel dokumenditasemel diskursuse parsimisel.', 'fi': 'Tekstin diskurssin jäsentämisellä on tärkeä rooli luonnollisen kielen tiedonkulun ja argumentoivan rakenteen ymmärtämisessä. Aikaisempi tutkimus retorisen rakenneteorian (RST) puitteissa on keskittynyt pääasiassa englantilaisen puupenkin mallien indusoimiseen ja arviointiin. Muiden kielten, kuten saksan, hollannin ja portugalin, jäsentelytehtävät ovat kuitenkin edelleen haastavia, koska merkintöjä ei ole riittävästi. Tässä työssä tutkitaan kahta tapaa luoda monikielinen diskurssin jäsentäjä: (1) käyttämällä monikielisiä vektoriesityksiä; ja (2) lähdesisällön segmenttitason kääntäminen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että molemmat menetelmät ovat tehokkaita, vaikka koulutustieto on rajallinen, ja saavuttavat huipputason suorituskykyä monikielisessä, dokumenttitason diskurssin jäsentämisessä kaikissa osatehtävissä.', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev besedilnega diskurza igra pomembno vlogo pri razumevanju informacijskega toka in argumentativne strukture v naravnem jeziku. Prejšnje raziskave v okviru retorične strukturne teorije (RST) so se večinoma osredotočile na indukcijo in vrednotenje modelov iz angleške treebanke. Vendar pa so naloge razčlenjevanja drugih jezikov, kot so nemščina, nizozemščina in portugalščina, še vedno zahtevne zaradi pomanjkanja označenih podatkov. V tem delu raziskujemo dva pristopa za vzpostavitev nevronskega, medjezičnega razčlenjevalnika diskurza prek: (1) uporabe večjezičnih vektorskih reprezentacij; in (2) prevajanje izvorne vsebine na ravni segmentov. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da sta obe metodi učinkoviti tudi z omejenimi podatki o usposabljanju in dosegata najsodobnejšo uspešnost pri medjezičnem razčlenjevanju diskurza na ravni dokumentov pri vseh podnalogah.', 'jv': 'Speaking Awakdhéwé sing beraksi karo etorikal structural theory (rsT) sing ngomong nik angkang dipoleh lan ijol-ijolan model sing suku arep nggambar inggiles. Nanging, nggawe tarjamahan kanggo langgambar sing sampeyan German, Danish, lan portugis sedhaya iso nggawe barang nggawe dadi sing apik. Nang gunggo iki, kita yatêngguna perusahaan langgar sampeyan nggawe tresno-pakan langgar lewat cara nggawe wih: string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': 'QXml Tafiti na farko a ƙarƙashin kayan bakin Réorical Bayani (RTR) ya fokus ana ƙara masu da amfani da motsi daga Treebank na Ingiriya. Haƙĩƙa, taskõkin pargari na waɗansu harshen daban kamar Jarman, Dutsun da Portugaziya yana ƙaranci kwanan ƙaranci da aka yi wa data. Daga wannan aikin, Munã yin ƙidãya da hanyoyin biyu dõmin a sami wani mai magana na neura, mai fassara cikin linguin da aka yi amfani da shi:(1) ya yi amfani da masu motsi na multi-linguin; kuma suna ɗauki fassarar-daraja na ƙanshi. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa, hanyoyin su masu yin amfani, kõ da data na tsari da ƙohon, kuma su sami muhimmin-sanawa kan yin fassarar-harshen, da mazaɓa-mazaɓa na takardar-daraja kan duk aikin-sub-aikin.', 'he': 'בדיקת דיבור טקסט משחקת תפקיד חשוב בהבנה של זרם מידע ומבנה טועני בשפה טבעית. מחקר קודם תחת תיאוריית המבנה הרטורית (Rhetoric Structure Theory, RST) התמקד בעיקר בכניסה ולהערכה דוגמנים מבנק העץ האנגלית. עם זאת, משימות המחקר לשפות אחרות כמו גרמנית, הולנדית ופורטוגזית עדיין מאתגרות בגלל חסר נתונים מוצבעים. בעבודה הזאת, אנו חוקרים שני גישות כדי להקים מעבד דיבורים עצבי, בין שפתיים דרך: (1) להשתמש באמצעות ויקטורים רבות שפתיים; (2) לאמץ תרגום ברמה של חלקים של התוכן המקורי. תוצאות הניסויים מראות ששתי השיטות הן יעילות אפילו עם נתוני אימון מוגבל, ולהשיג ביצועים חדשים על דיבורים ברמה מסמכים על כל התפקידים.', 'bo': 'མ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་བསྟུན་ནས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་གལ་ཅན་ཅིག་ཆགས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་སྒྲུབ་རྩོམ་པ་སྒྲིག་འགོད Previous research under the Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) has mostly focused on inducing and evaluating models from the English treebank. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་ཡིག In this work, we investigate two approaches to establish a neural, cross-lingual discourse parser via: (1) utilizing multilingual vector representations; and (2) འདིས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སུ་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་བཞིན་ཡོད། Experiment results show that both methods are effective even with limited training data, and achieve state-of-the-art performance on cross-lingual, document-level discourse parsing on all sub-tasks.'}
{'en': 'Tree Representations in Transition System for RST Parsing', 'ar': 'تمثيلات الشجرة في نظام الانتقال لتحليل RST', 'es': 'Representaciones de árboles en el sistema de transición para el análisis de RST', 'pt': 'Representações de árvore no sistema de transição para análise RST', 'fr': "Représentations arborescentes dans le système de transition pour l'analyse RST", 'ja': 'RST解析のためのトランジションシステムにおけるツリー表現', 'zh': '以 RST 解析转易统中树', 'ru': 'Древовидные представления в системе перехода для анализа RST', 'hi': 'RST पार्सिंग के लिए संक्रमण प्रणाली में ट्री अभ्यावेदन', 'ga': 'Léiriúcháin Crann san Idirbhliain le haghaidh Parsáil RST', 'hu': 'Fák átmeneti rendszere az RST-értelmezéshez', 'el': 'Αντιπροσωπείες δέντρου σε μεταβατικό σύστημα για ανάλυση RST', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Tree representations in Transition System for RST Parsing', 'kk': 'RST талдау жүйесінде бұтақ таңбалары', 'it': "Rappresentazioni degli alberi nel sistema di transizione per l'analisi RST", 'mk': 'Претставувања на дрвјата во транзицискиот систем за анализирање RST', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Pohon dalam Sistem Peralihan untuk penghuraian RST', 'mn': 'RST шинжилгээний шинжилгээний системийн мод төлөөлөлт', 'ml': 'RST പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-Siġar fis-Sistema ta’ Tranżizzjoni għall-Analiżi RST', 'no': 'Tre- representasjonar i overgangssystemet for RST- tolking', 'pl': 'Reprezentacje drzewa w systemie przejściowym dla analizy RST', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea arborilor în sistemul de tranziție pentru analizarea RST', 'sr': 'Представљање древа у трансионном систему за разгледање RST', 'so': 'Midhaha ka soo jeedista nidaamka baaritaanka RST', 'sv': 'Trädpresentationer i övergångssystem för RST-tolkning', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình ảnh trong hệ thống chuyển đổi chế độ đọc trang RST', 'bg': 'Представления на дърветата в преходната система за анализ на RST', 'nl': 'Boomvertegenwoordigingen in overgangssysteem voor RST Parsing', 'da': 'Trærepræsentationer i overgangssystemet for RST-fortolkning', 'hr': 'Predstavnici drveta u prelaznom sustavu za analizu RST-a', 'de': 'Tree Representations in Transition System for RST Parsing', 'id': 'Perwakilan Pohon dalam Sistem Transisi untuk Analisasi RST', 'fa': 'نمایش درخت در سیستم تغییر برای تحلیل RST', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo ya mti katika mfumo wa mpito kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa RST', 'tr': 'RST Taýýarlama üçin Wagtal Wasp Görkezilmeleri', 'af': 'Boom voorstellings in Transitional Stelsel vir RST verwerking', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesit e pemës në sistemin e tranzicionit për analizimin RST', 'az': 'RST ayƒ±rma sistemind…ô Aƒüac T…ô≈ükil…ôri', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'RST পার্সিং এর জন্য ট্রি প্রতিনিধি', 'ca': "Representacions d'arbres en el sistema de transició per l'analització RST", 'cs': 'Stromové reprezentace v přechodovém systému pro analýzu RST', 'ko': 'RST 확인 변환 시스템의 트리 표시', 'bs': 'Predstavnici drveta u prelaznom sustavu za analizu RST-a', 'et': 'Puude esindused üleminekusüsteemis RST parsimiseks', 'fi': 'Puut liikkuvan kaluston lajittelun siirtymäjärjestelmässä', 'jv': 'Ngubah Perusahaan Nang Tarjamahan Sistem kanggo rsT Parasing', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מייצגים עצים במערכת העברה עבור בדיקת RST', 'sk': 'Drevesni predstavniki v prehodnem sistemu za razčlenitev tirnih vozil', 'bo': 'RST འཚོལ་ཞིབ་པ་ལ་གནས་སྐབས་མ་ལག་གི་སྡོང་ཚན་མཚོན་པ'}
{'en': 'The transition-based systems in the past studies propose a series of actions, to build a right-heavy binarized tree for the RST parsing. However, the nodes of the binary-nuclear relations (e.g., Contrast) have the same nuclear type with those of the multi-nuclear relations (e.g., Joint) in the binary tree structure. In addition, the reduce action only construct binary trees instead of multi-branch trees, which is the original RST tree structure. In our paper, we design a new nuclear type for the multi-nuclear relations, and a new action to construct a multi-branch tree. We enrich the feature set by extracting additional refined dependency feature of texts from the Bi-Affine model. We also compare the performance of two approaches for RST parsing in the transition-based system : a joint action of reduce-shift and nuclear type (i.e., Reduce-SN) vs a separate one that applies Reduce action first and then assigns nuclear type. We find that the new devised nuclear type and action are more capable of capturing the multi-nuclear relation and the joint action is more suitable than the separate one. Our multi-branch tree structure obtains the state-of-the-art performance for all the 18 coarse relations.', 'ar': 'تقترح الأنظمة القائمة على الانتقال في الدراسات السابقة سلسلة من الإجراءات لبناء شجرة ثنائية ثقيلة لليمين لتحليل RST. ومع ذلك ، فإن عقد العلاقات الثنائية النووية (على سبيل المثال ، التباين) لها نفس النوع النووي مع تلك الموجودة في العلاقات متعددة النواة (على سبيل المثال ، المفصل) في هيكل الشجرة الثنائية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن تقليل الإجراء يقوم فقط ببناء الأشجار الثنائية بدلاً من الأشجار متعددة الفروع ، وهو الهيكل الأصلي لشجرة RST. في ورقتنا ، نصمم نوعًا نوويًا جديدًا للعلاقات متعددة النواة ، وإجراء جديد لبناء شجرة متعددة الفروع. نقوم بإثراء مجموعة الميزات من خلال استخراج ميزة التبعية الإضافية المكررة للنصوص من نموذج Bi-Affine. نقارن أيضًا أداء طريقتين لتحليل RST في النظام القائم على الانتقال: إجراء مشترك لخفض التحول والنوع النووي (أي Reduce-SN) مقابل إجراء منفصل يطبق تقليل الإجراء أولاً ثم يعين النوع النووي. نجد أن النوع الجديد والفعل النووي المبتكران أكثر قدرة على الاستيلاء على العلاقة متعددة النواة وأن العمل المشترك أكثر ملاءمة من الآخر. يتمتع هيكل الشجرة متعدد الفروع لدينا بأحدث أداء لجميع العلاقات الخشنة البالغ عددها 18.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas baseados em transição nos estudos anteriores propõem uma série de ações, para construir uma árvore binarizada pesada à direita para a análise do RST. No entanto, os nós das relações binário-nucleares (por exemplo, Contraste) têm o mesmo tipo nuclear que os das relações multinucleares (por exemplo, Joint) na estrutura de árvore binária. Além disso, a ação de redução apenas constrói árvores binárias em vez de árvores multi-ramificações, que é a estrutura original da árvore RST. Em nosso artigo, projetamos um novo tipo nuclear para as relações multinucleares e uma nova ação para construir uma árvore multi-ramificação. Enriquecemos o conjunto de recursos extraindo recursos de dependência refinados adicionais de textos do modelo Bi-Affine. Também comparamos o desempenho de duas abordagens para análise RST no sistema baseado em transição: uma ação conjunta de redução de deslocamento e tipo nuclear (ou seja, Reduce-SN) versus uma ação separada que aplica a ação Reduce primeiro e depois atribui o tipo nuclear. Achamos que o novo tipo e ação nuclear concebidos são mais capazes de capturar a relação multinuclear e a ação conjunta é mais adequada do que a separada. Nossa estrutura de árvore multi-ramificação obtém o desempenho de última geração para todas as 18 relações grosseiras.', 'es': 'Los sistemas basados en transiciones de los estudios anteriores proponen una serie de acciones para construir un árbol binarizado pesado a la derecha para el análisis de RST. Sin embargo, los nodos de las relaciones binario-nucleares (por ejemplo, Contrast) tienen el mismo tipo nuclear que los de las relaciones multinucleares (por ejemplo, Joint) en la estructura de árbol binario. Además, la acción reducir solo construye árboles binarios en lugar de árboles de múltiples ramas, que es la estructura de árbol RST original. En nuestro artículo, diseñamos un nuevo tipo nuclear para las relaciones multinucleares y una nueva acción para construir un árbol de múltiples ramas. Enriquecemos el conjunto de funciones extrayendo funciones de dependencia refinadas adicionales de los textos del modelo Bi-Affine. También comparamos el rendimiento de dos enfoques para el análisis de RST en el sistema basado en la transición: una acción conjunta de tipo reduce-shift y nuclear (es decir, Reduce-SN) frente a una acción separada que aplica primero la acción Reducir y luego asigna el tipo nuclear. Nos parece que el nuevo tipo y acción nuclear ideados son más capaces de captar la relación multinuclear y que la acción conjunta es más adecuada que la acción separada. Nuestra estructura de árbol de múltiples ramas obtiene el rendimiento de vanguardia para las 18 relaciones gruesas.', 'fr': "Les systèmes basés sur la transition dans les études précédentes proposent une série d'actions, pour construire un arbre binarisé lourd à droite pour l'analyse RST. Cependant, les nœuds des relations binaire-nucléaire (par exemple, Contraste) ont le même type nucléaire que ceux des relations multi-nucléaires (par exemple, Joint) dans la structure arborescente binaire. De plus, l'action de réduction ne construit que des arbres binaires au lieu d'arbres multibranches, qui constituent la structure arborescente RST d'origine. Dans notre article, nous concevons un nouveau type nucléaire pour les relations multi-nucléaires, et une nouvelle action pour construire un arbre multibranche. Nous enrichissons l'ensemble de fonctionnalités en extrayant une fonction de dépendance affinée supplémentaire des textes à partir du modèle Bi-Affine. Nous comparons également les performances de deux approches pour l'analyse RST dans le système basé sur la transition\xa0: une action conjointe de type Reduce-shift et nucléaire (c'est-à-dire Reduce-SN) par rapport à une action séparée qui applique d'abord l'action Reduce, puis attribue le type nucléaire. Nous constatons que le nouveau type et l'action nucléaires conçus sont plus à même de saisir la relation multi-nucléaire et que l'action commune est plus appropriée que l'action séparée. Notre structure arborescente à branches multiples permet d'obtenir des performances de pointe pour les 18 relations grossières.", 'ja': '過去の研究における遷移ベースのシステムは、RST構文解析のための右重量の二値化ツリーを構築するための一連のアクションを提案しています。 しかしながら、バイナリ核関係（例えば、コントラスト）のノードは、バイナリツリー構造における多核関係（例えば、ジョイント）のノードと同じ核タイプを有する。 さらに、リダクションアクションは、元のRST木構造であるマルチブランチツリーの代わりにバイナリツリーを構築するだけである。 この論文では、多核関係のための新しい核タイプと、多分岐木を構築するための新しい行動を設計しています。 Bi - Affineモデルからテキストの追加のリファインされた依存関係機能を抽出することで、機能セットを充実させます。 また、遷移ベースのシステムにおけるRST構文解析のための2つのアプローチのパフォーマンスを比較します。つまり、まずリダクションアクションを適用し、次に核タイプを割り当てる、リダクションシフトと核タイプの共同アクション（すなわち、リダクション- SN ） vs. 新たに考案された核型と作用は、多核関係を捉える能力が高く、共同作用は別個のものよりも適していることがわかる。 当社のマルチブランチツリー構造は、18の粗い関係すべての最先端のパフォーマンスを取得します。', 'hi': 'पिछले अध्ययनों में संक्रमण-आधारित सिस्टम आरएसटी पार्सिंग के लिए एक सही-भारी बिनाराइज्ड पेड़ बनाने के लिए कार्यों की एक श्रृंखला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हालांकि, बाइनरी-परमाणु संबंधों के नोड्स (जैसे, कंट्रास्ट) में बाइनरी ट्री संरचना में बहु-परमाणु संबंधों (जैसे, संयुक्त) के साथ एक ही परमाणु प्रकार है। इसके अलावा, कम कार्रवाई केवल बहु-शाखा पेड़ों के बजाय बाइनरी पेड़ों का निर्माण करती है, जो मूल आरएसटी पेड़ संरचना है। हमारे पेपर में, हम बहु-परमाणु संबंधों के लिए एक नया परमाणु प्रकार डिजाइन करते हैं, और एक बहु-शाखा पेड़ के निर्माण के लिए एक नई कार्रवाई करते हैं। हम द्वि-Affine मॉडल से ग्रंथों की अतिरिक्त परिष्कृत निर्भरता सुविधा निकालने के द्वारा सेट सुविधा को समृद्ध. हम संक्रमण-आधारित प्रणाली में आरएसटी पार्सिंग के लिए दो दृष्टिकोणों के प्रदर्शन की भी तुलना करते हैं: कम-शिफ्ट और परमाणु प्रकार (यानी, Reduce-SN) बनाम एक अलग की संयुक्त कार्रवाई जो पहले कम कार्रवाई लागू करती है और फिर परमाणु प्रकार को असाइन करती है। हम पाते हैं कि नए तैयार किए गए परमाणु प्रकार और कार्रवाई बहु-परमाणु संबंधों पर कब्जा करने में अधिक सक्षम हैं और संयुक्त कार्रवाई अलग-अलग की तुलना में अधिक उपयुक्त है। हमारी बहु-शाखा पेड़ संरचना सभी 18 मोटे संबंधों के लिए अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'zh': '旧治中基于转换之统,列为RST解析构一右重之二值化树。 然二元之节点(,比于)与二叉树多核关系(,关节)者节点同核。 又reduce 操惟构二叉树,非多分树,此 RST 构也。 于我论文,为多核关系设新核,设一新行以构多支。 取文本于双仿射者优化赖以丰集。 比之RST解析二法:损偏移与核类型合者(Reduce-SN)与先损而后分核类型之独用也。 吾见新计之核,与动更得多核关系,联合行动宜于独行。 多支为所有 18 粗供最先进。', 'ru': 'Системы, основанные на переходе, в прошлых исследованиях предлагают ряд действий, чтобы построить право-тяжелое бинаризованное дерево для RST-синтаксического анализа. Однако узлы бинарно-ядерных отношений (например, Контраст) имеют тот же ядерный тип, что и узлы многоядерных отношений (например, Объединение) в структуре бинарного дерева. Кроме того, действие reduce позволяет строить только двоичные деревья вместо деревьев с несколькими ветвями, что является оригинальной структурой дерева RST. В нашей работе мы проектируем новый ядерный тип для многоядерных отношений, и новое действие для того чтобы построить многоотраслевое дерево. Мы обогащаем набор признаков, извлекая дополнительные уточненные признаки зависимости текстов из модели Bi-Affine. Мы также сравниваем эффективность двух подходов для RST-анализа в системе на основе перехода: совместное действие типа уменьшения сдвига и ядерного (т.е. Reduce-SN) по сравнению с отдельным, которое сначала применяет действие уменьшения, а затем назначает ядерный тип. Мы считаем, что новый разработанный тип ядерного оружия и действия в большей степени способны охватить многоядерные отношения, а совместные действия более уместны, чем отдельные. Наша многоотраслевая древовидная структура обеспечивает самые современные характеристики для всех 18 грубых отношений.', 'ga': 'Molann na córais atá bunaithe ar an trasdul sna staidéir a rinneadh san am atá thart sraith gníomhaíochtaí, chun crann binarized ceart-trom a thógáil don pharsáil RST. Mar sin féin, tá an cineál núicléach céanna ag nóid an chaidrimh dhénártha-núicléach (m.sh., Codarsnacht) le nóid an chaidrimh ilnúicléigh (m.sh., Comhpháirteach) i struchtúr an chrainn dhénártha. Ina theannta sin, ní dhéanann an gníomh laghdaithe ach crainn dhénártha a thógáil in ionad crainn ilbhrainse, arb é an struchtúr crann RST bunaidh é. Inár bpáipéar, déanaimid cineál núicléach nua a dhearadh don chaidreamh il-núicléach, agus gníomh nua chun crann ilbhrainse a thógáil. Saibhrímid an ghné atá leagtha síos trí ghné spleáchais scagtha bhreise de théacsanna a bhaint as an tsamhail Bi-Affine. Déanaimid comparáid freisin ar fheidhmíocht dhá chur chuige do pharsáil RST sa chóras tras-bhunaithe: comhghníomhaíocht de chineál laghdaithe-aistrithe agus cineál núicléach (i.e., Laghdaigh-SN) vs ceann ar leith a bhfuil feidhm aige Laghdaigh gníomh ar dtús agus ansin sanntar cineál núicléach. Faighimid amach go bhfuil an cineál agus an gníomh núicléach nua-chruthaithe níos cumasaí chun an gaol il-núicléach a ghabháil agus go bhfuil an chomhghníomhaíocht níos oiriúnaí ná an gníomh ar leithligh. Faigheann ár struchtúr crann ilbhrainse an fheidhmíocht úrscothach do na 18 gcaidreamh garbh.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα που βασίζονται στη μετάβαση στις προηγούμενες μελέτες προτείνουν μια σειρά ενεργειών, για την κατασκευή ενός δεξιού βαρύ δυαδικού δέντρου για την ανάλυση RST. Ωστόσο, οι κόμβοι των δυαδικών-πυρηνικών σχέσεων (π.χ. Αντίθεση) έχουν τον ίδιο πυρηνικό τύπο με εκείνους των πολυπυρηνικών σχέσεων (π.χ., Κοινή) στη δυαδική δομή δέντρου. Επιπλέον, η δράση μείωσης κατασκευάζει μόνο δυαδικά δέντρα αντί για πολλά κλαδιά δέντρα, που είναι η αρχική δομή δέντρου RST. Στην εργασία μας, σχεδιάζουμε έναν νέο πυρηνικό τύπο για τις πολυπυρηνικές σχέσεις, και μια νέα δράση για την κατασκευή ενός πολυκλαδικού δέντρου. Εμπλουτίζουμε το σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών εξάγοντας επιπλέον εκλεπτυσμένο χαρακτηριστικό εξάρτησης κειμένων από το μοντέλο Bi-Affine. Συγκρίνουμε επίσης τις επιδόσεις δύο προσεγγίσεων για την ανάλυση στο σύστημα που βασίζεται στη μετάβαση: μια κοινή δράση μείωσης-μετατόπισης και πυρηνικού τύπου (δηλ. Μείωση-SN) έναντι μιας ξεχωριστής που εφαρμόζει πρώτα τη δράση Μείωση και στη συνέχεια εκχωρεί πυρηνικό τύπο. Θεωρούμε ότι ο νέος πυρηνικός τύπος και η νέα πυρηνική δράση είναι πιο ικανές να συλλάβουν την πολυπυρηνική σχέση και ότι η κοινή δράση είναι καταλληλότερη από τη χωριστή. Η πολυκλαδική δομή δέντρων μας αποκτά την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση για όλες τις 18ες χονδροειδείς σχέσεις.', 'hu': 'Az átmeneti alapú rendszerek a korábbi tanulmányokban egy sor intézkedést javasolnak, amelyek egy jobb-nehéz binárizált fa építését teszik lehetővé az RST elemzéshez. Azonban a bináris-nukleáris kapcsolatok (pl. Contrast) csomópontjai ugyanolyan nukleáris típusúak, mint a bináris fa szerkezetében lévő többnukleáris kapcsolatok (pl. Joint) csomópontjai. Ezenkívül a reduce művelet csak bináris fákat épít a többágú fák helyett, ami az eredeti RST fa struktúra. Dolgozatunkban egy új nukleáris típust tervezünk a többnukleáris kapcsolatokhoz, és egy új akciót egy többágú fa építésére. A funkciókészletet úgy gazdagítjuk, hogy további finomított függőségi funkciókat nyerünk ki a Bi-Affine modellből. Összehasonlítjuk továbbá az RST elemzésére vonatkozó két megközelítés teljesítményét az átmeneti alapú rendszerben: a reduce-shift és a nukleáris típusú (azaz Reduce-SN) közös cselekvést és egy külön cselekvést, amely először Reduce műveletet alkalmaz, majd nukleáris típust rendel. Úgy találjuk, hogy az új tervezett nukleáris típus és intézkedés képesebb a többnukleáris kapcsolat megragadására, és az együttes fellépés megfelelőbb, mint a különálló. Többágú faszerkezetünk mind a 18 durva kapcsolat legkorszerűbb teljesítményét biztosítja.', 'lt': 'The transition-based systems in the past studies propose a series of actions, to build a right-heavy binarized tree for the RST parsing.  Tačiau dviejų branduolinių santykių mazgai (pvz., kontrastas) turi tokį patį branduolinį tipą kaip ir dviejų branduolinių santykių mazgai (pvz., jungtiniai) dviejų medžių struktūroje. Be to, mažinant veiklą statomi tik dviejų rūšių medžiai, o ne daugiapakopiai medžiai, kurie yra pradinė RST medžio struktūra. Mūsų dokumente sukuriame naują branduolinį tipą daugiamečiams branduoliniams santykiams ir naujus veiksmus, kuriais siekiama sukurti daugialypį medį. Mes praturtiname nustatytą savybę ištraukdami papildomą rafinuotą tekstų priklausomybės savybę iš Bi-Affine modelio. Taip pat palyginame dviejų RST analizės metodų, taikomų pereinamojo laikotarpio sistemoje, rezultatus: bendrus veiksmus mažinti perėjimą prie elektros energijos ir branduolinio tipo (t. y. sumažinti SN), palyginti su atskiru metodu, kuris pirmiausia taikomas mažinti veiksmus ir paskui priskirti branduolinį tipą. Mes manome, kad naujas sukurtas branduolinis tipas ir veiksmai yra labiau pajėgūs užmegzti daugiamečius branduolinius ryšius, o bendri veiksmai yra tinkamesni nei atskiri. Mūsų daugialypė medžių struktūra įgyja pažangiausius rezultatus visoms 18 sunkių santykių atžvilgiu.', 'it': "I sistemi basati sulla transizione negli studi passati propongono una serie di azioni, per costruire un albero binario giusto-pesante per l'analisi RST. Tuttavia, i nodi delle relazioni binarie-nucleari (ad esempio Contrast) hanno lo stesso tipo nucleare con quelli delle relazioni multi-nucleari (ad esempio Joint) nella struttura ad albero binario. Inoltre, l'azione di riduzione costruisce solo alberi binari invece di alberi multi-ramo, che è la struttura originale dell'albero RST. Nel nostro articolo, progettiamo un nuovo tipo nucleare per le relazioni multi-nucleari, e una nuova azione per costruire un albero multi-ramo. Arricchiamo il set di funzionalità estraendo ulteriori funzionalità di dipendenza raffinate dei testi dal modello Bi-Affine. Confrontiamo anche le prestazioni di due approcci per l'analisi RST nel sistema basato sulla transizione: un'azione congiunta di tipo reduce-shift e nucleare (cioè Reduce-SN) contro uno separato che applica prima l'azione Reduce e poi assegna il tipo nucleare. Riteniamo che il nuovo tipo e le nuove azioni nucleari siano più capaci di cogliere la relazione multi-nucleare e che l'azione comune sia più adatta di quella separata. La nostra struttura ad albero multi-ramo ottiene le prestazioni all'avanguardia per tutte le 18 relazioni grossolane.", 'kk': 'Соңғы зерттеулерде ауысу негіздеген жүйелер RST талдау үшін оң қатты бинаризацияланған ағаш құру үшін бірнеше әрекеттерді ұсынады. Бірақ, бинарлық ядерлық қатынастарының (мысалы, контрастық) түрлерінің бірнеше ядерлық қатынастары (мысалы, бірнеше ядерлық қатынастары) екінші ағаш құрылымында бірдей түрлері бар. Қосымша, әрекетті бірнеше бөлшек ағаштардың орнына тек бинарлық ағаш құру, бұл бастапқы RST ағаш құрылымы. Біздің қағазымызда көп ядролық қатынастар үшін жаңа ядролық түрін құрамыз, көп бөлік ағашын құру үшін жаңа әрекет құрамыз. Біз бір бапталған мәтіндердің қосымша қысқартылған тәуелсіздік мүмкіндігін бір- бір үлгіден шығару арқылы бағаладық. Сонымен қатар, RST талдау жүйесіне негізделген екі жағдайды салыстырып тұрамыз: жылжыту және ядерлық түрін (мысалы, СН түрін азайту) жағдайды бірінші жағдайда әрекетті азайту және содан кейін ядерлық түрін таңдайды. Біз жаңа құрылған ядерлық түрі мен әрекеті бірнеше ядерлық қатынасын түсіруге болады және біріктірілген әрекеттер бөлекден артық болады. Біздің көп бөлік ағаш құрылымыз 18 қатынастық қатынастар үшін өзіміздің күй-жайы әрекетін алады.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ სწავლებში გადაწყვეტილი სისტემები განსაზღვრებულია სერიო მოქმედების შესაძლებლობა, რომ RST პარასისთვის მარჯვნივ ბინარიზებული ხე შექმნა. მაგრამ, ბინარი-ნუკური შესახებ (მაგალითად, კონტრესტი) მსგავსი ნუკური ტიპი აქვს მხოლოდ ნუკური შესახებ (მაგალითად, ერთადერთი) ბინარი ხე სტრუქტურაში. დამატებით, შემცირება მოქმედება მხოლოდ ბინარი ხე შექმნა მხოლოდ მრავალური ხე, რომელიც არის პირველური RST ხე სტრუქტურა. ჩვენი წიგნაში, ჩვენ ახალი წიგნალური ტიპი დავყენებთ მრავალ წიგნალური შესახებისთვის და ახალი მოქმედება მრავალ წიგნალური ხელის შექმნა. ჩვენ ბიAffin მოდელიდან ტექსტის დამატებული დამატებული დამატებულობის ფუნქციის გამოყენებით შეგვიყენებთ. ჩვენ ასევე შემწყვებით ორი პროგრამის გამოყენება RST პარასუზაციისთვის გადავამწყვებით სისტემაში: დავამცირება-შეცვლა და ядерული ტიპის ერთადერთი მოქმედება (მაგალითად შემცირება-SN) განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებით, რომელი ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ახალი მოწყობინებული ნუკური ტიპი და მოქმედები უფრო შესაძლებელია მრავალური ნუკური დაკავშირება და ერთადერთი მოქმედება უფრო საჭირო ვიდრე განსახვავ ჩვენი მრავალეთ სახელის სტრუქტურაცია მიიღება სახელის სტრუქტურაციას ყველა 18 სახელის შესახებ.', 'mk': 'Системите базирани на транзиција во минатите студии предложуваат серија акции, за изградба на десно-тешко бинаризирано дрво за анализирање на RST. Сепак, јазолите на бинарно-нуклеарните односи (на пример контраст) имаат истиот нуклеарен тип со оние на мултинуклеарните односи (на пример заедничките) во бинарната структура на дрвото. Покрај тоа, дејствата за намалување се конструираат само бинарни дрва наместо мултигранични дрва, што е оригиналната структура на РСТ дрво. Во нашиот весник дизајнираме нов нуклеарен тип за мултинуклеарните односи, и нова акција за изградба на мултигационално дрво. Ја богатуваме фигурата со извлекување на дополнителна финансиска финансиска финансиска финансиска зависност на текстовите од моделот Би-Affine. Исто така, ја споредуваме резултатот на двата пристапи за анализирање на РСТ во системот базиран на транзиција: заедничка акција на намалување на промените и нуклеарниот тип (т.е., намалување на СН) во однос на одделен тип кој се применува Намалување на акцијата прво и потоа додава нуклеарн We find that the new devised nuclear type and action are more capable of capturing the multi-nuclear relation and the joint action is more suitable than the separate one.  Нашата мултигационална структура на дрво ја добива најновата изведба за сите 18 груби односи.', 'ms': 'Sistem berdasarkan transisi dalam kajian yang lalu melaporkan serangkaian tindakan, untuk membina pokok binarizasi berat kanan untuk huraian RST. Namun, nod hubungan binari-nuklear (contoh) mempunyai jenis nuklear yang sama dengan jenis hubungan berbilang-nuklear (contoh, Joint) dalam struktur pokok binari. Lagipun, tindakan mengurangi hanya membina pokok binari selain daripada pokok berbilang-cabang, yang merupakan struktur pokok RST asal. Dalam kertas kami, kami merancang jenis nuklear baru untuk hubungan berbilang nuklear, dan tindakan baru untuk membina pokok berbilang cabang. Kami memperkaya fitur ditetapkan dengan mengekstrak fitur dependensi tambahan terrafin teks dari model Bi-Affine. Kami juga membandingkan prestasi dua pendekatan untuk penghuraian RST dalam sistem berasaskan-transisi: tindakan kongsi jenis mengurangi-shift dan nuklear (iaitu mengurangi-SN) vs satu yang terpisah yang berlaku mengurangi tindakan dahulu dan kemudian menyerahkan jenis nuklear. We find that the new devised nuclear type and action are more capable of capturing the multi-nuclear relation and the joint action is more suitable than the separate one.  Struktur pokok berbilang cabang kami mendapatkan prestasi terbaik untuk semua 18 hubungan kasar.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni fl-istudji tal-imgħoddi jipproponu sensiela ta’ azzjonijiet, biex jinbena siġar binarizzat b’qawwa tal-lemin għall-analiżi tal-RST. Madankollu, in-nodi tar-relazzjonijiet binarji-nukleari (e ż., Kontrast) g ħandhom l-istess tip nukleari ma’ dawk tar-relazzjonijiet multinukleari (eż., Konġunti) fl-istruttura tas-siġar binarju. Barra minn hekk, l-azzjoni ta’ tnaqqis tibni biss siġar binarji minflok siġar b’diversi fergħat, li hija l-istruttura oriġinali tas-siġar RST. Fid-dokument tagħna, a ħna niddisinjaw tip nukleari ġdid għar-relazzjonijiet multinukleari, u azzjoni ġdida biex nibnu siġar b’diversi fergħat. Aħna nilħqu l-karatteristika stabbilita billi neħħew karatteristika addizzjonali ta’ dipendenza raffinata tat-testi mill-mudell Bi-Affinat. Aħna nqabblu wkoll il-prestazzjoni ta’ żewġ approċċi għall-analiżi tal-RST fis-sistema bbażata fuq it-tranżizzjoni: azzjoni konġunta ta’ tnaqqis-shift u tip nukleari (jiġifieri, Tnaqqis-SN) kontra waħda separata li tapplika Tnaqqas l-azzjoni l-ewwel u mbagħad tassenja tip nukleari. Aħna nsibu li t-tip u l-azzjoni nukleari l-ġodda mfassla huma aktar kapaċi jaqbdu r-relazzjoni multinukleari u l-azzjoni konġunta hija aktar adattata minn dik separata. L-istruttura tas-siġar tagħna b’diversi fergħat tikseb il-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata għat-18-il relazzjoni grossa kollha.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ പഠനത്തിലെ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. RST പാര്\u200d However, the nodes of the binary-nuclear relations (e.g., Contrast) have the same nuclear type with those of the multi-nuclear relations (e.g., Joint) in the binary tree structure.  കൂടാതെ, പല ശാഖ മരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം ബൈനറി വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രം ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞു വരുത്തുക, അതാണ് യഥാര്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ അണുക്കോമിയുടെ തരത്തിനായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പല-അണുവിക ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ബി- ആഫ്ഫിന്\u200d മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിശേഷതകളുടെ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിശേഷിപ്പുകള്\u200d സമ്പന്നരാക്കു ട്രാന്\u200dസിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d RST പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ രണ്ട് വഴികളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തെയും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സഹജമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും- ഷിഫ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കുവാനും പാര്\u200d നമുക്ക് കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് പുതിയ പുതിയ അണുവിയുടെ തരത്തിലും പ്രവൃത്തികള്\u200dക്ക് അധികം അണുവിക ബന്ധങ്ങളെ പിടികൂടാന്\u200d കഴിവുള്ളതാണ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മരത്തിന്റെ മരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനം 18 തെരുക്കുകളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയാണ്.', 'no': 'Overgangsbaserte systema i dei siste studiane foreslår ei rekkje handlingar, for å bygge eit høgre-tung binarisert tre for RST-tolking. Nodene i binære-kjerneforhold (f.eks. kontrast) har imidlertid same kjerneforhold med dei fleire kjerneforhold (f.eks. Joint) i binære tre-strukturen. I tillegg kan det redusere handlinga berre konstruere binærtrær i staden for fleire grensetrær, som er den opprinnelige RST-trestrukturen. I papiret vår designerer vi ein ny kjernetyp for fleire kjerneforhold, og ein ny handling for å konstruere eit fleire grensetre. Vi rykkar funksjonen som er sett ved å pakka ut ekstra refinerte avhengighetsfunksjon for tekstar frå Bi- Affin- modellen. Vi sammenliknar også utviklinga av to tilnærmingar for RST-tolking i overgangsbaserte systemet: e in samanlig handling av reduksjonsforskyving og kjernetypen (t.d. Reduksjon-SN) mot ei eige tilnærming som brukar Reduksjon-handlinga først og så tilbyr kjernetypen. Vi finn at den nye avgjevne kjernetypen og handlinga er meir i stand til å henta fleire kjerneforhold og den samsvarande handlinga er meir passande enn den separerte handlinga. Vårt fleire grensetrestruktur får tilstanden til kunsten for alle 18 område forhold.', 'pl': 'Systemy oparte na przejściu w poprzednich badaniach proponują serię działań, mających na celu zbudowanie prawo ciężkiego binaryzowanego drzewa do parsowania RST. Jednak węzły relacji binarno-jądrowych (np. Contrast) mają ten sam typ jądrowy z relacjami wielojądrowymi (np. Joint) w strukturze drzewa binarnego. Ponadto działanie redukcyjne konstruuje tylko drzewa binarne zamiast drzew wielogałęźniowych, które są oryginalną strukturą drzewa RST. W naszym artykule projektujemy nowy typ jądrowy dla relacji wielojądrowych oraz nowe działanie mające na celu budowę drzewa wielojądrowego. Wzbogacamy zestaw funkcji wyodrębniając dodatkową dopracowaną funkcję zależności tekstów z modelu Bi-Affine. Porównujemy również wydajność dwóch podejść do parsowania RST w systemie opartym na przejściu: wspólnego działania redukcyjnego i jądrowego (tj. Reduce-SN) w porównaniu z oddzielnym, które najpierw stosuje działanie Reduce, a następnie przypisuje typ jądrowy. Uważamy, że nowy rodzaj i działanie jądrowe są bardziej zdolne do uchwycenia relacji wielojądrowych, a wspólne działanie jest bardziej odpowiednie niż oddzielne. Nasza wielogałęziowa struktura drzewa uzyskuje najnowocześniejszą wydajność dla wszystkich 18-grubych relacji.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх судалгааны шилжилт суурилсан систем нь RST хуваалцах үед баруун хүнд хоёр давхар мод бүтээх хэдэн үйл ажиллагааг сануулдаг. Гэхдээ хоёр давхар цөмийн холбоотой (жишээ нь эсрэг) цөмийн холбоотой холбоотой (жишээ нь хоёр давхар) цөмийн холбоотой ижил төрлийн цөмийн холбоотой байдаг. Үүнээс багасгах үйл ажиллагаа нь зөвхөн олон зай модны оронд хоёр модны модны бүтэц юм. Бидний цаасан дээр олон цөмийн харилцааны шинэ цөмийн төрлийг бүтээж, олон тал мод бүтээх шинэ үйл явц бүтээж байна. Бид Би-Афин загвараас нэмэлт цэвэрлэгдсэн хамааралтай байдлыг татаж баяндаж байна. Мөн бид шилжилт суурилсан системд RST хуваалцах хоёр арга баримтыг харьцуулж байна: хасах, цөмийн төрлийн хасах, цөмийн төрлийн холбоотой үйл ажиллагаа (т.е. Reduce-SN) эсвэл хасах нь анхны үйл ажиллагааг хасах, дараа нь цөмийн төрлийн төрлийн хол Бид шинэ төлөвлөгдсөн цөмийн төрлийн болон үйл ажиллагаа олон цөмийн холбоотой холбоотой болон холбоотой үйл ажиллагаа холбоотой холбоотой гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Бидний олон загварын модны бүтэц нь 18 загварын харилцааны хувьд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг авдаг.', 'sr': 'U prošlim studijama sistemi na prelazu predlažu niz akcija, da izgradi desno-teško binarizirano drvo za razmatranje RST-a. Međutim, čvorovi binarnih-nuklearnih odnosa (npr. kontrast) imaju istu nuklearnu vrstu sa mnogim nuklearnim odnosima (npr. zajedničkim) u binarnoj strukturi drveta. Osim toga, smanjenje akcije samo konstruiraju binarne drveæe umjesto višegranskih drveæa, što je originalna struktura drveæa RST-a. U našim novinama, dizajniramo novi nuklearni tip za višenuklearne odnose i novi akcije za izgradnju višestrukog drveta. Obogaæavamo karakteristiku postavljenog izvlaèenjem dodatne optereæene karakteristike zavisnosti teksta iz model Bi-Affina. Takođe uspoređujemo i provedbu dva pristupa za analizu RST-a u sustavu na kojem se temelji na prelazu: zajednička akcija smanjenja smjene i nuklearnog tipa (tj. smanjenja-SN) protiv odvojene osobe koja primjenjuje prvo smanjenje akcije i onda određuje nuklearnu tipu. Nalazimo da su novi izrađeni nuklearni tip i akcija sposobniji da uhvatimo multinuklearnu vezu i zajedničku akciju prikladnija od odvojene. Naša multigranska struktura drveta dobija predstavu umjetnosti za sve 18 bezobraznih odnosa.', 'ro': 'Sistemele bazate pe tranziție din studiile anterioare propun o serie de acțiuni, pentru a construi un arbore binarizat drept-greu pentru parsarea RST. Cu toate acestea, nodurile relațiilor binar-nucleare (de exemplu, Contrast) au același tip nuclear cu cele ale relațiilor multi-nucleare (de exemplu, Joint) în structura arborelui binar. În plus, acțiunea de reducere construiește doar copaci binari în loc de copaci multi-ramuri, care este structura originală a copacilor RST. În lucrarea noastră, proiectăm un nou tip nuclear pentru relațiile multi-nucleare, și o nouă acțiune pentru a construi un copac multi-ramură. Îmbogățim setul de caracteristici prin extragerea caracteristicii de dependență suplimentare rafinate a textelor din modelul Bi-Affine. Comparăm, de asemenea, performanța a două abordări pentru analizarea RST în sistemul bazat pe tranziție: o acțiune comună de tip reduce-shift și nuclear (adică Reduce-SN) comparativ cu una separată care aplică mai întâi acțiunea Reduce și apoi atribuie tipul nuclear. Considerăm că noul tip și acțiunea nucleară concepută sunt mai capabile să capteze relația multinucleară, iar acțiunea comună este mai potrivită decât cea separată. Structura noastră de copaci multi-ramură obține performanța de ultimă oră pentru toate cele 18 relații grosiere.', 'si': 'අතින් අභ්\u200dයාසයේ ප්\u200dරමාණ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ සිරිස් ක්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, RST විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා දකුණු  නමුත්, බායිනාරි-න්යූක්\u200dරියාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාවන්ගේ නෝඩ්ස් (උදාහරණය, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමාණය) එකම නියූක්\u200dරියාන්\u200dය වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා ව ඒ වගේම, ක්\u200dරියාව විතරයි, බායිනාරි ගස් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ විතරයි, මුලින් RST ගස් නිර්මාණය විතරයි. අපේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් නිර්මාණය වර්ගයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා වර්ගයක් විශේෂ කරනවා වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. අපි බී- අෆින් මෝඩල් වලින් පාළුවන්ගේ අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂ අපි සමහරවිට RST පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය පද්ධතියේ සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය (ඉතින්, පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් අළුත් උපකරණය සහ ක්\u200dරියාව විශේෂය සම්බන්ධයක් වඩා විශේෂයි. සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාව පෙනෙක්වත අපේ ගොඩක් බ්\u200dරෑම් ගස් සංවිධානයක් හොයාගන්නවා සියලුම 18 කෝර්ස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන්.', 'so': 'nidaamka soo wareegashada ee waxbarashada hore waxay soo jeedaa shuqullo badan, si uu u dhiso geed baaritaanka RST oo midig cusub. Si kastaba ha ahaatee noocyada xiriirka labaad e e nunuurka (tusaale ahaan Contrast) waxay leeyihiin isku mid nooc nuclear ah oo ay leeyihiin xiriirka badan (tusaale ahaan Joint) ku yaalaan qoriga labaad. Intaas waxaa dheer oo ay ka hooseeyaan waxyaabaha ay dhisaan geedo labaad oo labaad, taas oo ah dhismaha asalka ah geedka RST. Qoraalkayaga waxaynu ku qornaa nooc cusub oo nuug ah oo kala duduwan xiriirka nunuugga, iyo waxqabad cusub oo aan dhisno geed badan oo laamo badan. Waxaannu hodanaynaa xarafta loo qoray, marka aan soo saarno xarumaha qoraalka ku saabsan ee qoraalka Bi-Affin. Sidoo kale waxaynu isbarbardhignaa tababarka labo qaab ah oo lagu sameeyo baaritaanka RST e e ku qoran nidaamka soo wareegista: qayb wadajir ah oo hoos-shift iyo nuurka (yaani Reduce-SN) vs. qayb gaar ah oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha soo kordhiya marka hore kadibna u qaybinaya nooca nuugga. Waxaynu ognahay in nooca cusub ee nuurka la qoray ay ay awoodi karaan in la qabsado xiriirka nuurka badan iyo in shuqulka wadajirku ay ka haboon yihiin mid gooni ah. Dhirta noocyada badan waxay leedahay xaaladda farshaxanta ee 18 koox oo dhan.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய ஆய்வுகளில் மாற்றும் அடிப்படையான அமைப்புகள் ஒரு சில செயல்பாடுகளை நிர்ணயிக்கிறது, RST பாசிங்குக்கான வலது கனம இருந்த- அணுகல் தொடர்புகளின் குறிப்புகள் இருந்திருக்கும் அணுகல் வகையில் இருந்த மரத்தின் கட்டுப்பாட்டில் உள்ள பல அணுகல் தொடர்புகளுடன் உள்ளன. மேலும், பல கிளைகள் மரங்களுக்கு பதிலாக இருநிலை மரங்களை மட்டும் குறைக்கும் செயல்பாடு மட்டும் உருவாக்கும், அது முதலில் R எங்கள் தாளில், நாம் பல அணு உறவுகளுக்கு புதிய அணு வகையை வடிவமைக்கிறோம், மற்றும் பல கிளை மரத்தை உருவாக்க ஒரு புதிய செயல். பிஆப்பின் மாதிரியிலிருந்து கூடுதல் சார்ந்த சார்பு உரைகளை வெளியேற்றினால் இந்த பண்புகளை நாம் செலுத்துகிறோ மாற்றும் முறைமையில் RST பாடலுக்கான இரண்டு வழிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம்: செயல்பாட்டை முதலில் குறைத்து மற்றும் அணு வகையின் இணைய செயல்பாடு மற்றும் தனியாக புதிய வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட அணுகல் வகை மற்றும் செயல் பல அணுகல் உறவை பிடிக்க முடியும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் இணைய செயல் தன எங்கள் பல கிளை மரத்தின் கட்டமைப்பு அனைத்து 18 தெற்கை தொடர்புகளுக்கும் நிலையில் கலை செயல்பாட்டை கிடைக்கும்.', 'sv': 'De övergångsbaserade systemen i tidigare studier föreslår en rad åtgärder, för att bygga ett rätt tungt binariserat träd för RST-tolkningen. Men noderna i de binära-nukleära relationerna (t.ex. Contrast) har samma kärntyp med de multinukleära relationerna (t.ex. Joint) i den binära trädstrukturen. Dessutom konstruerar reduktionsåtgärden bara binära träd istället för flergrenade träd, vilket är den ursprungliga RST-trädstrukturen. I vår uppsats utformar vi en ny kärnkraftstyp för de flerkärniga relationerna, och en ny åtgärd för att bygga ett flergrenat träd. Vi berikar funktionsuppsättningen genom att extrahera ytterligare raffinerad beroendefunktion för texter från Bi-Affine-modellen. Vi jämför också prestandan hos två metoder för RST-tolkning i det övergångsbaserade systemet: en gemensam åtgärd av reduce-shift och kärnkraftstyp (dvs Reduce-SN) jämfört med en separat som tillämpar Reduce action först och sedan tilldelar kärnkraftstyp. Vi anser att den nya kärnkraftstypen och åtgärden är mer kapabel att fånga upp det flerkärniga förhållandet och att den gemensamma åtgärden är lämpligare än den separata. Vår trädstruktur med flera grenar uppnår toppmodern prestanda för alla de 18 grova relationerna.', 'ur': 'گزشتہ تحقیقات میں تغییر کی بنیادی سیستموں نے ایک سری عمل کی پیشنهاد کی ہے، RST پارسینگ کے لئے دائیں بوجھ بوجھ کے درخت بنانے کے لئے۔ However, the nodes of the binary-nuclear relations (e.g., Contrast) have the same nuclear type with the multi-nuclear relations (e.g., joint) in the binary tree structure. اس کے علاوہ، کم کرنا صرف بہت سی شاخ درختوں کے بدلے دوئناری درخت بنا رہا ہے، جو اصلی RST درخت کی ساخت ہے. ہمارے کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی نائکوئل کی نوع طرح طرح کر رہے ہیں multi-nuclear relations کے لئے، اور ایک نئی طرح کی طرح multi-branch درخت بنانے کے لئے۔ ہم ایک دوسری مطابق موڈل سے پیغام کے اضافہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی تغییر کے بنیاد سیسٹم میں RST پارسینگ کے لئے دو طریقے کے عملکرد کے مطابق مقایسہ کر دیے ہیں: کم-shift اور nuclear type (یعنی کم-SN) کے ساتھ ایک مختلف طریقے کے مطابق ایک مختلف طریقے کے مطابق ایک مختلف طریقے کے مطابق جو پہلی بار کم کرتا ہے اور پھر nuclear type کا مقایسہ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ نو پیدا کیا گیا nuclear type اور action بہت زیادہ قابل ہے multi-nuclear relation capture اور joint action is more suitable than the separate one. ہماری بہت سی شاخہ درخت کی ساخت تمام 18 کرس رابطہ کے لئے اخلاقی عمل حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Oldingi o'rganishlar asosiy tizimi RST parsing uchun bir necha amallar tilini anglatadi. Lekin, ikkita nuklik aloqalarining noylari (m.g. Kontrat) bir nuklik turlari bilan bir necha nukl munosabatlar (m.g. ikkita daraxt tuzuvda bir necha nuklik turli. Koʻrib chiqish uchun shunday amalni faqat ko'pgina boshqa daraxt uchun ikkita daraxtni yaratish mumkin. Bu asl RST daraxt tuzuvchisi. In our paper, we design a new nuclear type for the multi-nuclear relations, and a new action to construct a multi-branch tree.  Bi-Affin modeldan qoʻshimcha qoʻshimcha qoʻshimcha qoʻshimcha ishlatilgan matnlarning xususiyatlarini olib tashlashimiz mumkin. Biz boshqa tizimda RST bo'lgan ikkita usullarning bajarishini kamaytamiz: shift va nuklik turini birga birlashtirish va birinchi amalni kamaytirish va keyin nuklik turini ishlatadi. Biz o'ylaymiz, yangi nuklik turi va amalni ko'plab nuklik aloqalarini olishga qo'shishga ega bo'ladi va birlashtirish amalni alohida o'xshash. Bizning ko'pchilik daraxt tuzuvlarimiz 18 ta ta-bir darajadagi hamma munosabatlar holatining holati jarayonligiga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống truyền thông trong quá khứ đề xuất một loạt hành động, để xây dựng một cây nhị phân nặng phải để phân tích RST. Tuy nhiên, các nút của các quan hệ nhị phân hạt nhân (v.d. Contrast) có cùng một loại hạt nhân với lõi hạt nhân của các mối quan hệ đa hạt nhân (v.d. kết hợp) trong cấu trúc nhị phân cây. Vả lại, hành động giảm bớt chỉ xây dựng các cây nhị phân thay vì các nhánh cây, vốn là cấu trúc gốc của cây RST. Trong báo cáo của chúng tôi, chúng tôi thiết kế một loại hạt nhân mới cho các mối quan hệ đa hạt nhân, và một hành động mới để xây dựng một cây đa nhánh. Chúng tôi làm giàu tính năng bằng cách lấy ra các nét phụ thuộc khác của các văn bản từ mô hình Bi-Affine. Chúng tôi cũng so sánh kết quả của hai phương pháp phân tích RST trong hệ thống chuyển tiếp: một hành động chung giữa các loại giảm dịch và hạt nhân (tức là Giảm tải-SN) với một phương trình khác nhau áp dụng Giảm hành động trước và phân bổ kiểu hạt nhân. Chúng tôi thấy loại hạt nhân và hành động mới được sáng chế có khả năng nắm giữ mối quan hệ đa hạt nhân, và hành động chung phù hợp hơn một hành động khác biệt. Phần cấu trúc cây đa nhánh của chúng tôi đạt được hiệu suất cao nhất cho mọi mối quan hệ rộng rãi.', 'bg': 'Системите, базирани на преход в миналите проучвания, предлагат серия от действия, за изграждане на дясно-тежко бинаризирано дърво за анализ на RST. Въпреки това, възлите на двоично-ядрените отношения (напр. Контраст) имат същия ядрен тип с тези на многоядрените отношения (напр. съединение) в двоичната дървесна структура. Освен това действието за намаляване конструира само двоични дървета вместо многоклонни дървета, което е оригиналната структура на дърветата. В нашата статия проектираме нов ядрен тип за многоядрените отношения и ново действие за изграждане на многоклонно дърво. Ние обогатяваме набор от функции, като извличаме допълнителна изискана функция за зависимост на текстовете от модела Биафин. Сравняваме и ефективността на два подхода за анализ на РТ в системата, базирана на преход: съвместно действие на редуциране-изместване и ядрен тип (т.е. редуциране-SN) спрямо отделно действие, което прилага първо редуциране на действието и след това определя ядрен тип. Намираме, че новият разработен ядрен тип и действие са по-способни да уловят многоядрената връзка и съвместното действие е по-подходящо от отделното. Нашата многоклонна дървесна структура постига най-съвременните постижения за всички 18 груби отношения.', 'da': 'De overgangsbaserede systemer i tidligere undersøgelser foreslår en række handlinger, for at bygge et højre tungt binariseret træ til RST parsing. Men knuderne i de binære-nukleare relationer (f.eks. Kontrast) har samme nukleare type som knuderne i de multi-nukleare relationer (f.eks. Joint) i den binære træstruktur. Desuden konstruerer reduktionshandlingen kun binære træer i stedet for multi-grene træer, som er den oprindelige RST træstruktur. I vores papir designer vi en ny atomtype til de multinukleare relationer, og en ny aktion til at konstruere et multi-gren træ. Vi beriger funktionssættet ved at udtrække yderligere raffineret afhængighedsfunktion af tekster fra Bi-Affine modellen. Vi sammenligner også ydeevnen af to tilgange til RST-analyse i det overgangsbaserede system: en fælles aktion af reducere-skift og nuklear type (dvs Reducere-SN) vs en separat, der anvender Reducere-aktion først og derefter tildeler nuklear type. Vi finder, at den nye nukleare type og aktion er mere i stand til at indfange den multinukleare forbindelse, og den fælles aktion er mere egnet end den særskilte. Vores multi-grene træstruktur opnår den state-of-the-art performance for alle de 18 grove relationer.', 'nl': 'De transitie-gebaseerde systemen in eerdere studies stellen een reeks acties voor, om een rechts-zware binariseerde boom te bouwen voor de RST parsing. De knooppunten van de binaire-nucleaire relaties (bijvoorbeeld Contrast) hebben echter hetzelfde nucleaire type als die van de multinucleaire relaties (bijvoorbeeld Joint) in de binaire boomstructuur. Bovendien construeert de reductie-actie alleen binaire bomen in plaats van multi-takken bomen, wat de oorspronkelijke RST boomstructuur is. In ons artikel ontwerpen we een nieuw nucleair type voor de multi-nucleaire relaties, en een nieuwe actie om een multi-tak boom te bouwen. We verrijken de feature set door extra verfijnde afhankelijkheidskenmerken van teksten uit het Bi-Affine model te extraheren. We vergelijken ook de prestaties van twee benaderingen voor RST parsing in het transitiegebaseerde systeem: een gezamenlijke actie van reductie-shift en nucleair type (d.w.z. Reduce-SN) versus een afzonderlijke actie die eerst Reduce actie toepast en vervolgens nucleair type toekent. Wij zijn van mening dat het nieuwe nucleaire type en de nieuwe actie beter in staat zijn om de multinucleaire relatie vast te leggen en dat de gezamenlijke actie geschikter is dan de afzonderlijke. Onze multi-tak boomstructuur verkrijgt de state-of-the-art prestaties voor alle 18-grove relaties.', 'hr': 'U prošlim ispitivanjima sustavi temeljeni na prijelazu predlažu niz akcija kako bi izgradili desno-teško binarizirano drvo za razmatranje RST-a. Međutim, čvorovi binarnih-nuklearnih odnosa (npr. kontrast) imaju istu nuklearnu vrstu s višenuklearnim odnosima (npr. zajedničkim) u binarnoj strukturi drveta. Osim toga, smanjenje akcije samo konstruira binarne drveće umjesto višegranskih drveća, što je originalna struktura drveća RST-a. U našim novinama, dizajniramo novi nuklearni tip za višenuklearne odnose i novu akciju za izgradnju višestrukog drveta. Obogaćavamo karakteristiku postavljenog izvlačenjem dodatnih opterećenih karakteristika ovisnosti tekstova iz modela bi-Affina. Također uspoređujemo i učinkovitost dva pristupa za analizu RST-a u sustavu na temelju prijenosa: zajednička akcija smanjenja smjene i nuklearnog tipa (tj. smanjenja-SN) protiv odvojene osobe koja primjenjuje prvo smanjenje akcije i onda određuje nuklearnu vrstu. Nalazimo da su novi izrađeni nuklearni tip i akcija sposobniji da uhvatimo multinuklearnu vezu i zajedničku akciju odgovaraju od odvojene. Naša multigranična struktura drveta dobiva stanje umjetnosti za sve 18 bezobraznih odnosa.', 'de': 'Die transitionsbasierten Systeme in den vergangenen Studien schlagen eine Reihe von Aktionen vor, um einen rechtsschweren binarisierten Baum für das RST-Parsing zu bauen. Allerdings haben die Knoten der binär-nuklearen Beziehungen (z.B. Kontrast) den gleichen Kerntyp mit denen der multinuklearen Beziehungen (z.B. Joint) in der binären Baumstruktur. Darüber hinaus konstruiert die Reduce-Aktion nur Binärbäume anstelle von Mehrzweigbäumen, was die ursprüngliche RST-Baumstruktur ist. In unserem Papier entwerfen wir einen neuen Atomtyp für die multinuklearen Beziehungen und eine neue Aktion, um einen mehrverzweigten Baum zu konstruieren. Wir bereichern den Funktionsumfang, indem wir zusätzliche verfeinerte Abhängigkeitsfunktionen von Texten aus dem Bi-Affine-Modell extrahieren. Wir vergleichen auch die Leistung zweier Ansätze für RST-Parsing im Übergangs-basierten System: eine gemeinsame Aktion von Reduce-Shift und Nuclear Type (d.h. Reduce-SN) gegenüber einer separaten, die zuerst Reduce-Action anwendet und dann Nuclear Type zuweist. Wir sind der Auffassung, dass der neue nukleare Typ und die neue nukleare Aktion besser geeignet sind, die multinukleare Beziehung zu erfassen, und dass die gemeinsame Aktion besser geeignet ist als die separate. Unsere mehrverzweigte Baumstruktur erhält die State-of-the-Art Leistung für alle 18-Grob-Beziehungen.', 'id': 'Sistem berdasarkan transisi dalam studi-studi yang lalu mengusulkan serangkaian tindakan, untuk membangun pohon binarizasi berat kanan untuk penghuraian RST. However, the nodes of the binary-nuclear relations (e.g., Contrast) have the same nuclear type with those of the multi-nuclear relations (e.g., Joint) in the binary tree structure.  Selain itu, tindakan mengurangi hanya membangun pohon binari daripada pohon multi-cabang, yang merupakan struktur pohon RST asli. Dalam kertas kami, kami merancang jenis nuklir baru untuk hubungan multinuklir, dan tindakan baru untuk membangun pohon multicabang. Kami memperkaya fitur set dengan mengekstrak fitur tergantung tambahan terrafin dari teks dari model Bi-Affine. Kami juga membandingkan prestasi dua pendekatan untuk analisis RST dalam sistem berdasarkan transisi: aksi kongsi dari mengurangi-shift dan tipe nuklir (i.e., mengurangi-SN) vs satu yang terpisah yang berlaku mengurangi aksi pertama dan kemudian menyerahkan tipe nuklir. Kami menemukan bahwa tipe dan tindakan nuklir yang baru disediakan lebih mampu menangkap hubungan multinuklir dan tindakan kongsi lebih cocok dari yang terpisah. Struktur pohon berbilang cabang kami mendapatkan pertunjukan terbaik untuk semua 18 hubungan kasar.', 'fa': 'سیستم بر اساس تغییرات در تحقیقات گذشته یک سری عمل پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، تا یک درخت سنگین دو بار برای تجزیه RST بسازد. با این حال، گره\u200cهای رابطه\u200cهای بیناوری و هسته\u200cای (مثلاً کنترل) همان نوع هسته\u200cای دارند که با رابطه\u200cهای بیناوری هسته\u200cای (مثلاً همدیگر) در ساختار درخت دوگانه دارند. علاوه بر این، اقدام کاهش فقط درختان دو گانه را به جای درختان چند شاخه ساخت می\u200cکند، که ساختار درخت اصلی RST است. در کاغذ ما، ما یک نوع نوع هسته\u200cای جدید برای رابطه\u200cهای زیادی هسته\u200cای طراحی می\u200cکنیم، و یک عمل جدید برای ساختن یک درخت چند شاخه. ما ویژه\u200cای که با استخراج ویژه\u200cهای بستگی بیشتری از متن\u200cها از مدل بینافین، ثروت می\u200cکنیم. ما همچنین عملکرد دو دستور برای تجزیه RST در سیستم بر اساس تغییر مقایسه می کنیم: یک اقدام مشترک از تغییر تغییر و نوع هسته\u200cای (یعنی کاهش-SN) با یک دستور جدا که اول اقدام کاهش می\u200cکند و سپس نوع هسته\u200cای را تغییر می\u200cدهد. ما فهمیدیم که نوع هسته\u200cای جدید طراحی شده و اقدام\u200cهای هسته\u200cای بیشتر قابل گرفتن ارتباط\u200cهای زیادی هسته\u200cای هسته\u200cای هسته\u200cای هسته\u200cای هسته\u200cای است و اقدام مشترک از یک جدا مناسب\u200cتر است. ساختار درخت چند شاخه\u200cهامون عملکرد هنری را برای تمام 18 رابطه\u200cهای مرغ می\u200cگیرد.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mpito katika utafiti uliopita unapendekeza mfululizo wa shughuli, kutengeneza mti mzito wa kulia kwa ajili ya uchimbaji wa RST. Hata hivyo, vipande vya mahusiano ya nuklia binafsi (kwa mfano Contrast) vina aina moja ya nuklia na zile za mahusiano ya nuklia (kwa mfano, Joint) katika muundo wa mti wa binary. In addition, the reduce action only construct binary trees instead of multi-branch trees, which is the original RST tree structure.  Katika karatasi yetu, tunaunda aina mpya ya nuklia kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya nuklia, na hatua mpya ya kujenga mti wa miti mbalimbali. Tunatajirisha utaratibu wa kutengeneza kitendo cha ziada cha kutegemea matumaini ya maandishi kutoka kwa mtindo wa Bi-Affin. Pia tunalinganisha utendaji wa mbili wa mbinu za uchimbaji wa RST katika mfumo wa mpito: hatua ya pamoja ya mabadiliko na a in a ya nuklia (yaani, Reduce-SN) dhidi ya aina tofauti inayotumia hatua ya Reduce kwanza na kisha kutengeneza aina ya nuklia. Tunapata kwamba aina mpya ya nuklia na hatua hii inaweza kushinikiza uhusiano wa nuklia na hatua ya pamoja ni sahihi zaidi ya tofauti. Miundombinu yetu ya miti mbalimbali inamiliki hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya mahusiano yote ya bara 18.', 'tr': 'Geçen öňki araştyrmalarda geçişik sistemler birnäçe hereket edip, RST analyzasy üçin sag-agyr binarized agaç in şa etmek üçin teklip edýärler. Ýöne, ikinji-nukleer ilişkilerin (meselâ, kontrast) bir nukleer tipi bilen bir nukleer ilişkileriniň (meselâ, birleşik) binary agaç strukturunda bir nukleer tipi bar. Munuň üçin, eylemi diňe köp-dam agaçlaryň ýerine binary agaçlary inşa etmek üçin azaltýar. Biziň kagyzymyzda, köp-nükleer baglaşyklar üçin täze bir nukleer hili tasarladyk we köp-daly agaç gurmak üçin täze bir hereket. Biz bi-Affin modelinden ekstra rafinýan bağlanylyk hasaplanjak üçin düzümlenme häsiýetini baglaşdyrys. Biz hem RST üýtgetmegine dayanan sistemde iki golüm çykyşyny karşılaştyrýarys: bir kop hereket edip küýtgetmek we nükleer hili (myseläm, küýtgetmek üçin) we bir üýtgetmek üçin birinji gezek emeli azaltmak we soňra nükleer hilini takyklaýarys. Biz täze bir nukleer hili we eylemiň köp-nükleer baglaýyşyny çekip bilmegi mümkin edip bilýäris we bölegimiz aýratyndan has gowydyr. Biziň köp-aýal agaç strukturymyz 18 gök ilişkiler üçin sanat eserlerini gazanýar.', 'sq': 'Sistemet bazuar në tranzicion në studimet e kaluara propozojnë një seri veprimesh, për të ndërtuar një pemë të rëndë të djathtë të binarizuar për analizimin RST. Megjithatë, nyjet e marrëdhënieve binare-bërthamore (për shembull Kontrasti) kanë të njëjtin tip bërthamor me ato të marrëdhënieve shumëbërthamore (për shembull, të përbashkëta) në strukturën binare të pemëve. Përveç kësaj, veprimi i reduktimit ndërton vetëm pemë binare në vend të pemëve me shumë degë, e cila është struktura origjinale e pemës RST. In our paper, we design a new nuclear type for the multi-nuclear relations, and a new action to construct a multi-branch tree.  Ne e pasurojmë karakteristikën e vendosur duke nxjerrë karakteristikën shtesë të varësisë së rafinuar të teksteve nga modeli Bi-Affine. Ne krahasojmë gjithashtu performancën e dy qasjeve për analizimin e RST në sistemin e bazuar në tranzicion: një veprim të përbashkët i reduktimit të lëvizjes dhe tipit bërthamor (pra, Reduce-SN) kundër një të veçantë që aplikon Shkatërrojë veprimin së pari dhe pastaj cakton tipin bërthamor. We find that the new devised nuclear type and action are more capable of capturing the multi-nuclear relation and the joint action is more suitable than the separate one.  Struktura jonë e pemëve me shumë degë merr shfaqjen më të lartë për të gjitha 18 marrëdhëniet e ashpra.', 'am': 'The transition-based systems in the past studies propose a series of actions, to build a right-heavy binarized tree for the RST parsing.  ነገር ግን የብያዊ-አካባቢ ግንኙነት (ምሳሌ Contrast) ነጥቦች በብዙ-nuclear ግንኙነት (ለምሳሌ) በbinary ዛፍ አካባቢ ውስጥ ናቸው፡፡ በተጨማሪም የRST ዛፍ መሠረት በሁለት ቅርንጫፎች ፋንታ የብረት ዛፎችን ብቻ መሥራት ነው፡፡ በብዙ አካባቢ ግንኙነት እና ብዙ ቅርንጫፍ ዛፍ ለመሥራት አዲስ ሥርዓት አዲስ አካክሎጂ ዓይነት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በቢ-አፍሪን ዓይነት የጽሑፎችን ማውጣት የጨማሪ ጥናት ማውጣት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በፕሮግራም-ተመሳሳይ ስርዓት ውስጥ ለRST ማዘጋጀት ሁለት ደረጃዎችን እናሳያታለን፡፡ የአካባቢ ክፍል እና የነዌብ ዓይነት (አዲስ-SN) በተለየ ተግባር አስቀድመን እና የnuclear ዓይነት እንዲያሳየው የተለየ ነው፡፡ አዲስ የተዘጋጀው አካብሎጂ ዓይነት እና ተግባር ብዙዎችን አካባቢ ግንኙነት ለመያዝ የሚችሉትን እና የተለያዩ ተግባር የተሻለ ነው ብለን እናገኛለን፡፡ በብዙ ቅርንጫፎቻችን የዛፍ ሥርዓት 18 የኮርኖቹ ግንኙነት ሁሉ የየዓላማ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Geçmiş təcrübələrdə keçmiş təcrübələr sistemlərində bir çox eylemi təklif edir, RST ayırması üçün sağ a ğır binarizi ağac in şa etmək üçün. Lakin, ikili-nükleer ilişkilerin düyünü (məsələn, kontrast) ikili ağac strukturlarında çoxlu nükleer ilişkilerin (məsələn, birləşməsi) ilə eyni nükleer türü var. Əvvəlcə, düşürmək ancaq çoxlu dəli ağacların yerinə ikili ağacları inşa edir, bu da orijinal RST ağac qurulmasıdır. Kağıdımızda, çoxlu nükleer ilişkiler üçün yeni nükleer türü tasarlayırıq, çoxlu dəli a ğacını inşa etmək üçün yeni bir eyni. Bi-Affin modelindən mətnlərin əlavə edilmiş bağımlılıq özelliğini əlavə edərək qurulduğumuz xüsusiyyətini artırdıq. Biz həmçin in RST analizi sistemində olan iki yol göstərməsini daşıyırıq: düşür-düşür-düşür-düşür və nükleer türünün (i.e. Reduce-SN) ilə ilk dəfə istifadə edir və sonra nükleer türünün birləşdirilməsini təmin edir. Biz yeni təyin edilmiş nükleer türü və eylemi çoxlu nükleer ilişkisini yakalamaq üçün daha münasibdir və joint eylemi ayrı olandan daha münasibdir. Bizim çoxlu dalın ağacımızın quruluşu bütün 18 cürbəcür ilişkiler üçün sanat göstəricisi var.', 'hy': "Անցյալ ուսումնասիրությունների ընթացքում տեղափոխման հիմնված համակարգերը առաջարկում են մի շարք գործողություններ, որպեսզի կառուցեն աջ-ծանր երկու ծառ ՌՍԹ-ի վերլուծության համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, երկու միջուկային հարաբերությունների կետերը (օրինակ՝ հակադրությունը) ունեն նույն միջուկային տեսակը երկու ծառերի կառուցվածքում բազմամիջուկային հարաբերությունների կետերի հետ (օրինակ՝ միասին): Ավելին, նվազեցնելու գործողությունը միայն երկու ծառեր է կառուցում բազմաճիշտ ծառերի փոխարեն, որը սկզբնական ՌՍԹ ծառի կառուցվածքն է: Մեր թղթի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր միջուկային տեսակ բազմամիջուկային հարաբերությունների համար և նոր գործողություն բազմաճիշտ ծառի կառուցման համար: Մենք հարստացնում ենք հատկանիշները' ստանալով ավելին բարելավված կախվածության հատկանիշներ երկաֆինանսային մոդելի միջոցով: Մենք նաև համեմատում ենք երկու մոտեցումների արտադրողականությունը, որոնք օգտագործվում են վերանայման հիմնված համակարգում' նվազեցնել տեղաշարժման և միջուկային տեսակի միասին գործողությունը (այսինքն՝ նվազեցնել-ՍՆ) համեմատությամբ առանձին գործողությունը, որը օգտագործում է նախ ն Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ նոր նախագծված միջուկային տեսակը և գործողությունը ավելի կարողանում են բռնել բազմամիջուկային հարաբերությունները, և միասին գործողությունը ավելի հարմար է, քան առանձին գործողությունը: Մեր բազմաճիշտ ծառերի կառուցվածքը ստանում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքները բոլոր 18 խիստ հարաբերությունների համար:", 'bn': 'অতীত গবেষণার ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম বিভিন্ন কিছু কাজের প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করেছে, যাতে রাস্ট্র পার্জিং এর জন্য ডান ভারী বাইনা তবে বাইনারি-পারমাণবিক সম্পর্কের নোড (উদাহরণস্বরূপ কন্ট্র্যাট) পারমাণবিক সম্পর্কের সাথে বাইনারি গাছের কাঠামোর মাধ্যমে যোগ দিয়েছে। এছাড়াও, মাল্টিশ শাখ গাছের পরিবর্তে বাইনারি গাছ নির্মাণ করা শুধুমাত্র কাজ কমিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে, যা প্রকৃত আরস্টি গাছের আমাদের পত্রিকায়, আমরা বহুপারমাণবিক সম্পর্কের জন্য একটি নতুন পারমাণবিক ধরনের ডিজাইন করি, আর একটি নতুন কাজ তৈরি করতে পারি বহুশাখার গাছ। বি-আফিন মডেল থেকে আরো সংস্কারিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের নির্ভরিত বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য এছাড়াও আমরা পার্সিস্ট-ভিত্তিক সিস্টেমে রিস্টি পার্সিং এর দুটি পদক্ষেপের তুলনায় তুলনা করি: পারমাণবিক পরিবর্তন এবং পারমাণবিক ধরনের একটি যৌথ কর্মকাণ্ড (যেমন, কমানো-এসএন)  আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে নতুন পরিকল্পিত পারমাণবিক ধরন এবং কার্যক্রম বহুপারমাণবিক সম্পর্ক ধরার ক্ষমতা আর যৌথ কর্মকাণ্ড বিভিন্ন একের চেয়ে বে আমাদের মাল্টি-শ্রান্ত গাছের কাঠামো ১৮টি উপকূল সম্পর্কের রাষ্ট্রের-শিল্পের প্রতিষ্ঠান।', 'ko': '과거 연구에서 전환된 시스템을 바탕으로 일련의 조작을 제기하여 RST 해석에 정확한 중이치화 트리를 구축했다.그러나 이원핵 관계(예를 들어 대비)의 노드와 이차수 구조 중의 다핵 관계(예를 들어 연합)의 노드는 같은 핵 유형을 가지고 있다.또한 Reduce 작업은 원래의 RST 트리 구조의 다분지 트리가 아닌 두 갈래 트리만 구성합니다.본고에서 우리는 다핵 관계를 위해 새로운 핵 유형을 설계했고 다분자 나무를 구성하는 새로운 동작을 설계했다.우리는 이중 모방 모델에서 텍스트의 추가 세분화 의존 특징을 추출하여 특징 집합을 풍부하게 한다.우리는 또한 변환된 시스템에서 두 가지 RST 해석 방법의 성능을 비교했다. 그것이 바로 Reduce-shift와nuclear-type(즉reduce-sN)의 연합 동작과 먼저 Reduce-action을 응용한 다음nuclear-type의 단독 동작을 분배하는 것이다.우리는 새로 설계된 핵 유형과 핵 행동이 다핵 관계를 포착할 수 있고, 단독 행동보다 연합 행동이 더 적합하다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 다분지 나무 구조는 모든 18개의 거친 관계에 가장 선진적인 성능을 제공했다.', 'ca': "Els sistemes basats en la transició en els estudis passats proponen una sèrie d'accions, per construir un arbre binarit de pes dret per l'analització RST. Tanmateix, els nodos de les relacions binaries-nuclears (per exemple, el Contrast) tenen el mateix tipus nuclear que els de les relacions multinuclears (per exemple, Joint) de l'estructura binaria d'arbres. A més, l'acció de reducció només construeix arbres binaris en lloc d'arbres multibranques, que és l'estructura original d'arbres RST. En el nostre article, dissenyem un nou tipus nuclear per les relacions multinuclears, i una nova acció per construir un arbre multiramal. We enrich the feature set by extracting additional refined dependency feature of texts from the Bi-Affine model.  També comparem el desempeny de dos enfocaments per l'analització RST en el sistema basat en la transició: una acció conjunta de reducció de canvi i tipus nuclear (i.e., Reduce-SN) vs una que s'aplica Reduce action primer i després assenya tipus nuclear. Trobem que el nou tipus i acció nuclear dissenyats són més capaços de capturar la relació multinuclear i l'acció conjunta és més adequada que la separada. La nostra estructura multibranquesa d'arbres obté l'actuació més avançada per tots els 18 relacionaments grossos.", 'cs': 'Systémy založené na přechodu v minulých studiích navrhují řadu akcí pro vytvoření pravě těžkého binarizovaného stromu pro analýzu RST. Nicméně uzly binárně-jaderných vztahů (např. Kontrast) mají stejný jaderný typ s uzly multijaderných vztahů (např. Joint) ve struktuře binárního stromu. Kromě toho redukční akce buduje pouze binární stromy namísto vícevětvových stromů, což je původní RST stromová struktura. V našem článku navrhujeme nový jaderný typ pro multijaderné vztahy a novou akci na vytvoření vícevětvového stromu. Sadu funkcí obohacujeme extrakcí dalších rafinovaných funkcí závislosti textů z Bi-Affine modelu. Dále porovnáváme výkonnost dvou přístupů pro analýzu RST v systému založeném na přechodu: společná akce redukčního posunu a jaderného typu (tj. Reduce-SN) versus samostatná akce, která nejprve aplikuje Reduce akce a poté přiřazuje jaderný typ. Zjišťujeme, že nově navržený jaderný typ a akce jsou schopnější zachytit multijaderný vztah a společná akce je vhodnější než samostatná. Naše vícevětvová struktura stromů získává nejmodernější výkon pro všechny 18hrubé vztahy.', 'et': 'Varasemate uuringute üleminekupõhised süsteemid pakuvad välja rea toiminguid, et ehitada parema-raske binariseeritud puu RST parsimiseks. Kuid binaarsete ja tuumaliste suhete sõlmedel (nt Kontrast) on sama tuumatüüp kui mitmete tuumaliste suhete sõlmedel (nt Joint) binaarses puustruktuuris. Lisaks konstrueerib vähendustoiming mitmeharuliste puude asemel ainult binaarseid puid, mis on esialgne RST puustruktuur. Meie töös kavandame uut tuumatüüpi mitme tuuma suhete jaoks ja uut tegevust mitme haruga puu ehitamiseks. Me rikastame funktsioonide komplekti, ekstraheerides täiendava rafineeritud sõltuvusfunktsiooni tekstidest Bi-Affine mudelist. Samuti võrdleme kahe lähenemisviisi tulemuslikkust RST parsimiseks üleminekupõhises süsteemis: reduce-shift ja tuuma tüüpi ühine tegevus (st reduce-SN) ja eraldi tegevus, mis rakendab esmalt Reduce action ja seejärel määrab tuumatüübi. Leiame, et uus väljatöötatud tuumatüüp ja -tegevus suudavad rohkem haarata mitme tuumaga seotud suhet ning ühine tegevus on sobivam kui eraldi tegevus. Meie mitmeharuline puustruktuur saavutab kõigi 18 jämeda suhte puhul kaasaegse jõudluse.', 'fi': 'Aikaisemmissa tutkimuksissa siirtymäpohjaiset järjestelmät ehdottavat useita toimia, joilla rakennetaan oikea-raskas binarisoitu puu RST-jäsennystä varten. Binääri-ydinsuhteiden solmut (esim. Kontrasti) ovat kuitenkin samantyyppisiä kuin moniydinsuhteiden solmut (esim. Joint) binääripuurakenteessa. Lisäksi vähennystoiminta rakentaa vain binaaripuita monihaaraisten puiden sijaan, joka on alkuperäinen RST-puurakenne. Työssämme suunnittelemme uuden ydintyypin moniydinsuhteille ja uuden toiminnan monihaaraisen puun rakentamiseksi. Rikastamme ominaisuutta poimimalla tekstien hienostuneen riippuvuusominaisuuden Bi-Affine-mallista. Vertaamme myös kahden RST-jäsennysmenetelmän suorituskykyä siirtymäpohjaisessa järjestelmässä: reduce-shift- ja ydintyyppisen (eli reduce-SN) yhteisen toiminnan ja erillisen, jossa ensin käytetään Reduce action -toimintoa ja sitten määritetään ydintyyppi. Mielestämme uusi ydintyyppi ja -toiminta kykenevät paremmin vangitsemaan moniydinsuhteen ja yhteinen toiminta sopii paremmin kuin erillinen. Monihaarainen puurakenteemme saa huipputason suorituskyvyn kaikkiin 18 karkeaan suhteeseen.', 'bs': 'U prošlim studijama sustavi na prelazu predlažu niz akcija, da izgradi desno-teško binarizirano drvo za razmatranje RST-a. Međutim, čvorovi binarnih-nuklearnih odnosa (npr. kontrast) imaju isti nuklearni tip sa mnogih nuklearnih odnosa (npr. zajedničkih) u binarnoj strukturi drveta. Osim toga, smanjenje akcije samo konstruiraju binarne drveće umjesto višegranskih drveća, što je originalna struktura drveća RST-a. U našim novinama, dizajniramo novi nuklearni tip za višenuklearne odnose i novi akcije za izgradnju višestrukog drveta. Obogaćavamo karakteristiku postavljenog izvlačenjem dodatnih opterećenih karakteristika ovisnosti teksta iz modela Bi-Affina. Također uspoređujemo i učinkovitost dva pristupa za analizu RST-a u sustavu temeljnom na prelazu: zajednička akcija smanjenja smjene i nuklearnog tipa (tj. smanjenja-SN) protiv odvojene osobe koja primjenjuje prvo smanjenje akcije i onda određuje nuklearnu vrstu. Nalazimo da su novi izrađeni nuklearni tip i akcija sposobniji da uhvatimo multinuklearnu vezu i zajedničku akciju prikladnije od odvojene. Naša multigranična struktura drveta dobija predstavu umjetnosti za sve 18 bezobraznih odnosa.', 'af': "Die oorgang-gebaseerde stelsels in die verlede studie voorstel 'n reeks van aksies om 'n regterswaar binariseerde boom te bou vir die RST verwerking. Maar die nodes van die binêre-nukleer relasies (bv. kontras) het dieselfde nukleer tipe met dieselfde van die multinukleer relasies (bv. Joint) in die binêre boom struktuur. In addition, the reduce action only construct binary trees instead of multi-branch trees, which is the original RST tree structure. In ons papier, ontwerp ons 'n nuwe nuwe nuwe tipe vir die meer-nuwerkale relasies, en 'n nuwe aksie om 'n multi-branch boom te konstrukteer. Ons ryk die funksie wat gestel word deur ekstra opgewerp afhanklikheidfunksie van teks uit die Bi- Affine model te uittrek. Ons vergelyk ook die prestasie van twee toepassings vir RST verwerking in die oorgang-gebaseerde stelsel: â\x80\x99n saamstige aksie van verduur-skuif en nuwerkleur tipe (i.e., Reduce-SN) teen â\x80\x99n aparte een wat toepassing verduur aksie eerste en dan toewys nuwerkleur tipe. Ons vind dat die nuwe gedefinieerde nuwertipe en aksie meer moontlik is om die multinuwerkale verhouding te vang en die saamstige aksie meer geskikbaar as die aparte een. Ons multi-branch boom struktuur verkry die staat-van-kunsten-prestasie vir al die 18 koste verhouding.", 'jv': 'Sistem sing nggawe nang arah sing dumateng, gunakake sistem sing beraksi aksi, kanggo nggawe barang kaya sistem sing bisa-bisa nggolo nggo Ketokan Nanging, the nodes of the Binary-Nukleer Relative (e.g. contrastst) have the same type of Nukleer with the multi-Nukleer Relative (e.g. Joint) in the binary structural. textattr politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang paper namung, awak dhéwé ngewehi sistem anyar kanggo kebuturan parang multi-Nukleer, lan aksi sing uwis kanggo nggawe punga rambarang multi-rambarang. We wealth the character set by extraextract additional refining diphenditor option of texts from the bi-Affinite model. We are again komparaging the success of Two Methods for R.SST Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo pergambar sing dibutuhke anyar karo aksi sing wis dipunakno karo pergambar multi-Nukleer Awak dhéwé multi-rampun sing rumangsa gedhake perusahaan kanggo wong liya-wong liya sing rumangsa 18 akeh barang.', 'ha': "Tiziman da aka danne shi a cikin littafan da aka shige ta farko, yana ƙayyade wasu aikin aiki, dõmin ya gina wani itãce mai nauyi wa dama-nau'in da aka yi wa parse ga RSA. Hata da haka, node of the labar-atomic link (misali, Contrast) yana da nau'i mai daidaita na nau'i game da waɗanda ke cikin matsayin multi-nufi (misali, Joke) cikin itãce na biyu. Ina ƙaranci aikin ƙwarai kawai ke samun itãcen biyu na biyu, musamman itãcen multi-nau'i, wanda ke asalin rubutun RTR. Ga karatunmu, za'a designe wata nau'i na nukliya wa danganta multi-nukli, kuma wata aiki na dabam'a wa kuɓutar da wata itãce ta multi-rubutu. Mu rikitar da shirin ayuka da za'a sami wasu tsari na rubutun da aka saɓa daga misalin Bi-Affin. Kayya, Munã samfani game da mafarin sauri biyu wa parse na RTR a cikin tsarin mai shige: wata aikin haɗiya na shift da nau'in nufi (misali, Redo-SN) versa wata daban da ke amfani da aikin Kayyade aiki na farko, sa'an nan Mu ƙayyade nau'in nukli. Tuna gane cewa yanda aka ƙayyade nau'in nukliya kuma aikin ƙwarai yana iya iya awon su kãma dangancin multi-nukli kuma aikin haɗi na daidai ne mafi daidai daga guda. Masanin itãciyar mulki na mulki yana da halin-sanar zuwa dukkan danganki na 18.", 'sk': 'Sistemi, ki temeljijo na prehodu v preteklih študijah, predlagajo vrsto ukrepov za izgradnjo desno-težkega binariziranega drevesa za razčlenitev RST. Vendar pa imajo vozlišča binarno-jedrskih relacij (npr. Kontrast) enako jedrsko vrsto kot vozlišča večjedrskih relacij (npr. Sklop) v binarni drevesni strukturi. Poleg tega dejanje zmanjšanja gradi samo binarna drevesa namesto večvejnih dreves, kar je prvotna struktura drevesa RST. V našem članku oblikujemo nov jedrski tip za večjedrske odnose in nov ukrep za gradnjo večvejnega drevesa. Zbirko funkcij obogatimo tako, da iz modela Bi-Affine izvlečemo dodatno prefinjeno funkcijo odvisnosti besedil. Primerjamo tudi učinkovitost dveh pristopov za razčlenitev RST v sistemu, ki temelji na prehodu: skupnega ukrepa reduce-shift in jedrskega tipa (tj. reduce-SN) v primerjavi z ločenim, ki najprej uporablja reduce-shift in nato dodeli jedrski tip. Ugotavljamo, da sta nova načrtovana jedrska vrsta in delovanje bolj sposobna zajeti večjedrski odnos in da je skupno delovanje primernejše od ločenega. Naša večpanožna drevesna struktura zagotavlja najsodobnejšo izvedbo za vseh 18 grobih odnosov.', 'he': 'המערכות המבוססות על המעבר במחקרים הקודמים מציעות סדרה של פעולות, לבנות עץ בינריז כבד ימין עבור בדיקת RST. בכל אופן, אצבעות יחסים בינריים-גרעיניים (למשל קונסטרסט) יש את אותו סוג גרעיני עם אלה של יחסים בינריים-גרעיניים (למשל משותפים) במבנה העץ בינרי. בנוסף, פעולה הקטנה בונה עצים בינריים בלבד במקום עצים רבים ענפים, שהוא מבנה עץ RST המקורי. בעיתון שלנו, אנחנו מעצבים סוג גרעיני חדש למערכות יחסים רבות גרעיניים, ופעולה חדשה לבנות עץ רבות ענפים. אנחנו מעשירים את התוכנית על ידי חולץ תוכות תלויה משופרת נוספת של טקסטים מהמודל Bi-Affine. We also compare the performance of two approaches for RST parsing in the transition-based system: a joint action of reduce-shift and nuclear type (i.e., Reduce-SN) vs a separate one that applies Reduce action first and then assigns nuclear type.  אנו מוצאים שהסוג הגרעיני החדש והפעולה הגרעינית הם מסוגלים יותר לתפוס את היחסים הגרעיניים המולטלים והפעולה המשותפת יותר מתאימה מהפעולה הנפרדה. מבנה העץ המורבי-ענפי שלנו מקבל את ההופעה המוקדמת לכל 18 מערכות יחסים עצומות.', 'bo': 'The transition-based systems in the past studies propose a series of actions, to build a right-heavy binarized tree for the RST parsing. ཡིན་ནའང་། གཉིས་བྲིས་nuclear་ཆ་འབྲེལ་བའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ནུས་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡོད། འདྲ་བྱས་ན། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་དག་རྨང་གཞུང་གི་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་པོ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ལས་དབང་ཆ་མང་པོ་ཡིན་པ། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྐྱེས་ཨང་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་ We enrich the feature set by extracting additional refined dependency feature of texts from the Bi-Affine model. We also compare the performance of two approaches for RST parsing in the transition-based system: a joint action of reduce-shift and nuclear type (i.e., Reduce-SN) vs a separate one that applies Reduce action first and then assigns nuclear type. ང་ཚོས་བྱུང་བའི་སྒྲིག་ཆས་གསར་བ་ཡིན་པས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱིས་མང་ཆེ་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་བྱ་བ་ཚེ་སོ་ས ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྣ་མང་པོ་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་ལས་ཕལ་ཆས་18 ཡི་མཉམ་དུ་ཉར་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Resource Constrained Dialog Policy Learning Via Differentiable Inductive Logic Programming', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de políticas de diálogo con recursos limitados mediante programación lógica inductiva diferenciable', 'ar': 'تعلم سياسة الحوار المقيدة بالمصادر من خلال برمجة المنطق الاستقرائي التفاضلي', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de política de diálogo com restrição de recursos por meio de programação de lógica indutiva diferenciável', 'fr': 'Apprentissage de la politique de dialogue avec ressources limitées via la programmation logique inductive différenciable', 'ja': 'リソース制約されたダイアログポリシー学習微分可能帰納的論理プログラミング', 'zh': '因可微分归逻辑编程资源约束者对话框策学', 'ru': 'Политика ограниченного доступа к ресурсам обучения через дифференцированное программирование индуктивной логики', 'hi': 'संसाधन विवश संवाद नीति सीखने के माध्यम से Differentiable आगमनात्मक तर्क प्रोग्रामिंग', 'ga': 'Beartas Dialóige Srianta Acmhainní Ag Foghlaim Trí Chlárú Loighic Ionduchtach Difreálach', 'ka': 'რესურსის დარწყებული დიალოგის პოლიტიკის სწავლება განსხვავებული ინდექტიური ლოგიკური პროგრამებით', 'el': 'Μάθηση πολιτικής διαλόγου με περιορισμένους πόρους μέσω διαφοροποιημένου επαγωγικού προγραμματισμού λογικής', 'hu': 'Erőforrás korlátozott párbeszéd politikai tanulás differenciálható induktív logikai programozással', 'it': 'Apprendimento delle politiche di dialogo vincolato attraverso la programmazione induttiva differenziata', 'lt': 'Išteklių ribojimo dialogo politika Mokymasis naudojant skirtingą indukcinę logikos programavimą', 'kk': 'Ресурстың шектелген диалогтың ережесін түрлі индуктивті логикалық бағдарламасы арқылы оқыту', 'mk': 'Политика на дијалог со ограничени ресурси за учење преку различно индуктивно логично програмирање', 'ms': 'Polisi Dialog Terbatas Sumber Mempelajari Melalui Program Logik Induktif Boleh Berbeza', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത ഇന്\u200dഡിവിക് ലോഗിക് പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d', 'no': 'Læring av ressursbegrensede dialogpolitikk via forskjellige indikativ logisk program', 'mt': 'Il-Politika ta’ Djalogu ristrett dwar ir-Riżorsi Tagħlim permezz ta’ Programmazzjoni Loġika Induttiva Differenzjabbli', 'ro': 'Învățarea politicilor de dialog constrânse prin programarea logică inductivă diferențiabilă', 'mn': 'Байгаль хязгаарлагдсан диалогын бодлого суралцах нь олон төрлийн логик программын аргаар', 'so': 'Source Constrained Dialog Policy Learning Via Different Inductive Logic Programming', 'sv': 'Resursbegränsad dialog Policy Learning Via differentierad induktiv logikprogrammering', 'pl': 'Zasoby ograniczone dialog Polityka uczenia się poprzez zróżnicowane programowanie indukcyjne logiki', 'ur': 'سراسر محدودیت دیالوگ پولیسی سیکھنے کے ذریعہ مختلف اندازی لوجیک پروگرامینگ کے ذریعہ', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සීමාව සංවාදය පොලිසික් ඉගෙනගන්න වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක තාක්ෂක ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dති', 'sr': 'Учање политики диалога ограничених ресурсова путем различног индуктивного логичног програма', 'ta': 'வேறுபாடு மாறுபடுத்தக்கூடிய துறை நிரல்', 'uz': 'Resource Constrained Dialog Policy Learning Via Differentiable Inductive Logic Programming', 'vi': 'Trình học chính sách hộp thoại do khả năng tạo ra thuận lợi', 'hr': 'Naučenje politike za ograničen dijalog resursa s različitom indikativnom logičkom programiranjem', 'da': 'Ressourcebegrænset dialog politisk læring via differentieret induktiv logikprogrammering', 'de': 'Ressourcenbeschränkter Dialog Politisches Lernen durch differenzierbare induktive Logikprogrammierung', 'ko': '마이크로 귀납 논리 프로그래밍 기반 자원 제한 대화 전략 학습', 'nl': 'Beleid leren door middel van differentieerbare inductieve logica programmeren', 'bg': 'Обучение на политиката чрез диференцирано индуктивно логическо програмиране', 'fa': 'برنامه\u200cریزی منطقی متفاوت\u200c', 'tr': 'Ressurat Açmak Dialog Politiki Öwrenmek Däpli Induktärli Logik Programlamasy bilen', 'sw': 'Askari zilizofundishwa kwa sera ya Dialog Kufundisha kwa programu tofauti inayoonyesha', 'af': "Hulpbron Beheinde Dialoog Beleid Leer deur 'n Verskillende Indukteerbare Logika Programming", 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Politika e dialogut të kufizuar me burime mësimi nëpërmjet programimit të ndryshëm induktiv logjik', 'bn': 'পার্থক্য ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন পরিচালিত লোগিক প্রোগ্রামিং থেকে প্রশিক্ষিত উৎস', 'bs': 'Naučenje politike za ograničeni dijalog resursa iz različitih induktivnih logičkih programa', 'ca': "Política d'aprenentatge de diàleg amb recursos limitats a través de programació lògica inductiva diferenciable", 'cs': 'Učení se prostřednictvím diferenciálního induktivního logického programování', 'et': 'Ressurssipiiratud dialoogi poliitika õppimine diferentseeritava induktiivse loogika programmeerimise kaudu', 'hy': 'Ռեսուրսների սահմանափակ դասախոսության քաղաքականությունը սովորելու միջոցով տարբերակելի ինդուկտիվ տրամաբանական ծրագրավորում', 'az': 'Resurs Q캼sqan Dialog Siyas캼 칐yr톛nm톛k M칲xt톛lif Induktiv Lojik Programlamas캼 vasit톛sil톛', 'id': 'Polisi Dialog Terbatas Sumber Belajar Melalui Programasi Logik Induktif yang Berbeda', 'fi': 'Resurssien rajoitettu dialogi Politiikan oppiminen erilaisen induktiivisen logiikan avulla', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'Resource Constrained Dialog Policy Learning Via Differentiable Inductive Logic Programming', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་ཆས་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་ནུས་མཐུན་པ', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učenje politike z omejenim dialogom z viri prek različnega induktivnega logičnega programiranja'}
{'en': 'Motivated by the needs of resource constrained dialog policy learning, we introduce dialog policy via differentiable inductive logic (DILOG). We explore the tasks of one-shot learning and zero-shot domain transfer with DILOG on SimDial and MultiWoZ. Using a single representative dialog from the restaurant domain, we train DILOG on the SimDial dataset and obtain 99+% in-domain test accuracy. We also show that the trained DILOG zero-shot transfers to all other domains with 99+% accuracy, proving the suitability of DILOG to slot-filling dialogs. We further extend our study to the MultiWoZ dataset achieving 90+% inform and success metrics. We also observe that these metrics are not capturing some of the shortcomings of DILOG in terms of false positives, prompting us to measure an auxiliary Action F1 score. We show that DILOG is 100x more data efficient than state-of-the-art neural approaches on MultiWoZ while achieving similar performance metrics. We conclude with a discussion on the strengths and weaknesses of DILOG.', 'pt': 'Motivados pelas necessidades de aprendizagem de políticas de diálogo com restrição de recursos, introduzimos a política de diálogo por meio de lógica indutiva diferenciável (DILOG). Exploramos as tarefas de aprendizado one-shot e transferência de domínio zero-shot com DILOG no SimDial e MultiWoZ. Usando um único diálogo representativo do domínio do restaurante, treinamos o DILOG no conjunto de dados SimDial e obtemos 99+% de precisão de teste no domínio. Também mostramos que as transferências de tiro zero do DILOG treinado para todos os outros domínios com 99+% de precisão, comprovando a adequação do DILOG para diálogos de preenchimento de slots. Estendemos ainda mais nosso estudo para o conjunto de dados MultiWoZ, alcançando mais de 90% de informações e métricas de sucesso. Observamos também que essas métricas não estão capturando algumas das deficiências do DILOG em termos de falsos positivos, o que nos leva a mensurar um escore de Ação F1 auxiliar. Mostramos que o DILOG é 100x mais eficiente em dados do que as abordagens neurais de última geração no MultiWoZ, ao mesmo tempo em que alcança métricas de desempenho semelhantes. Concluímos com uma discussão sobre os pontos fortes e fracos do DILOG.', 'fr': "Motivés par les besoins de l'apprentissage des politiques de dialogue limitées par les ressources, nous introduisons la politique de dialogue via la logique inductive différenciable (DILOG). Nous explorons les tâches de l'apprentissage unique et du transfert de domaine zéro avec DILOG sur SimDial et MultiWOZ. À l'aide d'une seule boîte de dialogue représentative du domaine du restaurant, nous formons DILOG sur l'ensemble de données SimDial et obtenons une précision de test dans le domaine de plus de 99 Nous montrons également que les transferts zero-shot DILOG entraînés vers tous les autres domaines avec une précision de plus de 99\xa0%, prouvant ainsi l'adéquation de DILOG aux boîtes de dialogue de remplissage d'emplacements. Nous étendons notre étude au jeu de données MultiWOZ en obtenant plus de 90\xa0% d'informations et de mesures de succès. Nous observons également que ces métriques ne saisissent pas certaines des lacunes de DILOG en termes de faux positifs, ce qui nous incite à mesurer un score auxiliaire Action F1. Nous montrons que DILOG est 100 fois plus efficace en termes de données que les approches neuronales de pointe sur MultiWOZ tout en obtenant des métriques de performance similaires. Nous terminerons par une discussion sur les forces et les faiblesses de DILOG.", 'ar': 'بدافع من احتياجات تعلم سياسة الحوار المقيدة بالموارد ، نقدم سياسة الحوار عبر المنطق الاستقرائي التفاضلي (DILOG). نستكشف مهام التعلم بلقطة واحدة ونقل المجال بدون طلقة باستخدام DILOG على SimDial و MultiWoZ. باستخدام مربع حوار تمثيلي واحد من مجال المطعم ، نقوم بتدريب DILOG على مجموعة بيانات SimDial والحصول على 99 +٪ دقة اختبار في المجال. نوضح أيضًا أن DILOG Zero-shot المدربة تنتقل إلى جميع المجالات الأخرى بدقة 99 +٪ ، مما يثبت ملاءمة DILOG لمربعات حوار ملء الفتحات. كما نوسع دراستنا لتشمل مجموعة بيانات MultiWoZ التي تحقق 90 +٪ من مقاييس المعلومات والنجاح. نلاحظ أيضًا أن هذه المقاييس لا تلتقط بعض أوجه القصور في DILOG من حيث الإيجابيات الخاطئة ، مما يدفعنا إلى قياس درجة الإجراء الإضافي F1. نظهر أن DILOG أكثر كفاءة في استخدام البيانات بمقدار 100 مرة مقارنة بأحدث الأساليب العصبية في MultiWoZ مع تحقيق مقاييس أداء مماثلة. نختتم بمناقشة حول نقاط القوة والضعف في DILOG.', 'es': 'Motivados por las necesidades del aprendizaje de políticas de diálogo con recursos limitados, introducimos la política de diálogo a través de la lógica inductiva diferenciable (DILOG). Exploramos las tareas de aprendizaje único y transferencia de dominio cero con DILOG en SimDial y MultiWoz. Utilizando un solo diálogo representativo del dominio del restaurante, capacitamos a DILOG en el conjunto de datos de SimDial y obtenemos una precisión de prueba en el dominio superior al 99%. También mostramos que el DILOG entrenado se transfiere a todos los demás dominios con una precisión superior al 99%, lo que demuestra la idoneidad de DILOG para los diálogos de relleno de ranuras. Ampliamos aún más nuestro estudio al conjunto de datos MultiWoz logrando métricas de información y éxito de más del 90%. También observamos que estas métricas no captan algunas de las deficiencias de DILOG en términos de falsos positivos, lo que nos lleva a medir una puntuación auxiliar de Action F1. Demostramos que DILOG es 100 veces más eficiente en cuanto a datos que los enfoques neuronales más avanzados en MultiWoz, al tiempo que logra métricas de rendimiento similares. Concluimos con una discusión sobre los puntos fuertes y débiles de DILOG.', 'ja': 'リソース制約のあるダイアログポリシー学習のニーズに基づいて、差別化帰納論理（ DILOG ）を介してダイアログポリシーを導入します。 SimDialとMultiWoZのDILOGで、ワンショット学習とゼロショットドメイン転送のタスクを探ります。 レストランドメインからの1つの代表的なダイアログを使用して、SimDialデータセット上のDILOGをトレーニングし、99 +%のドメイン内テスト精度を取得します。 また、訓練されたDILOGゼロショットは、99 +%の精度で他のすべてのドメインに転送され、DILOGがスロット充填ダイアログに適していることを証明しています。 私たちはさらに、研究をMultiWoZデータセットに拡張し、90 ％以上の情報と成功指標を達成しました。 また、これらの指標は、偽陽性の観点からDILOGの欠点のいくつかを捉えていないことが観察され、アクションF 1の補助スコアを測定するよう促されます。 DILOGは、同様のパフォーマンスメトリックを達成しながら、MultiWoZの最先端のニューラルアプローチよりも100倍のデータ効率があることを示しています。 DILOGの長所と短所についてのディスカッションで締めくくります。', 'zh': '资源受限语学须求,可微归逻辑 (DILOG) 引入对方略。 吾于SimDial、MultiWoZ用DILOG索一次性学、零次域名移之务也。 以餐厅域中之单代表性对,吾于 SimDial 数集上练 DILOG,而得 99% 以上试准确率。 又明DILOG零镜头以99%以上准确率传输及诸域,证DILOG填插槽对话框之适用性。 益广 MultiWoZ 数集, 90% 以上信成指标。 吾观其指标之未得DILOG于误报之短,是使量助F1分也。 明DILOG之数效率倍于MultiWoZ上之先进神经方法倍于100,兼成类性能指标。 最后论DILOG优劣。', 'hi': 'संसाधन विवश संवाद नीति सीखने की जरूरतों से प्रेरित होकर, हम अलग-अलग आगमनात्मक तर्क (DILOG) के माध्यम से संवाद नीति पेश करते हैं। हम SimDial और MultiWoZ पर DILOG के साथ एक शॉट सीखने और शून्य-शॉट डोमेन स्थानांतरण के कार्यों का पता लगाते हैं। रेस्तरां डोमेन से एक एकल प्रतिनिधि संवाद का उपयोग करते हुए, हम SimDial डेटासेट पर DILOG को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और 99 + % इन-डोमेन परीक्षण सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि प्रशिक्षित DILOG शून्य-शॉट 99 + % सटीकता के साथ अन्य सभी डोमेन में स्थानांतरित होता है, जो स्लॉट-फिलिंग संवादों के लिए DILOG की उपयुक्तता साबित करता है। हम आगे MultiWoZ डेटासेट के लिए अपने अध्ययन का विस्तार 90 + % सूचित और सफलता मीट्रिक प्राप्त करते हैं। हम यह भी देखते हैं कि ये मीट्रिक झूठे सकारात्मक के संदर्भ में DILOG की कुछ कमियों पर कब्जा नहीं कर रहे हैं, जिससे हमें एक सहायक एक्शन F1 स्कोर को मापने के लिए प्रेरित किया जा सकता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि DILOG 100x अधिक डेटा MultiWoZ पर अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण की तुलना में कुशल है, जबकि समान प्रदर्शन मीट्रिक प्राप्त कर रहा है। हम DILOG की ताकत और कमजोरियों पर चर्चा के साथ समाप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Основываясь на потребностях в обучении политике диалога с ограниченными ресурсами, мы вводим политику диалога с помощью дифференцируемой индуктивной логики (DILOG). Мы исследуем задачи однократного обучения и переноса домена с нулевым выстрелом с помощью DILOG на SimDial и MultiWoZ. Используя один репрезентативный диалог из домена ресторана, мы обучаем DILOG на наборе данных SimDial и получаем 99+% внутридоменной точности теста. Мы также показываем, что обученный DILOG нулевой выстрел переносится во все другие домены с точностью 99+%, что доказывает пригодность DILOG для диалогов заполнения слотов. Мы также расширяем наше исследование, распространяясь на набор данных MultiWoZ, достигая 90+% показателей информирования и успеха. Мы также отмечаем, что эти показатели не отражают некоторые недостатки DILOG с точки зрения ложноположительных результатов, что побуждает нас измерить вспомогательный балл действия F1. Мы показываем, что DILOG в 100 раз эффективнее данных, чем современные нейронные подходы на MultiWoZ, при этом достигаются аналогичные показатели производительности. В заключение мы хотели бы обсудить сильные и слабые стороны DILOG.', 'ga': 'Arna spreagadh ag riachtanais na foghlama maidir le beartas dialóige atá srianta ó thaobh acmhainní de, tugaimid isteach beartas dialóige trí loighic ionduchtach dhifreálach (DILOG). Déanaimid iniúchadh ar thascanna na foghlama aon-lámhaigh agus aistriú fearainn náid le DILOG ar SimDial agus MultiWoZ. Ag baint úsáide as dialóg ionadaíoch aonair ó fhearann na mbialann, cuirimid oiliúint ar DILOG ar thacar sonraí SimDial agus faighimid cruinneas tástála 99+% san fhearann. Léirímid freisin go n-aistríonn na lámhaigh nialais DILOG oilte chuig gach réimse eile le cruinneas 99+%, rud a chruthaíonn oiriúnacht DILOG do dialóga líonadh sliotán. Déanaimid ár staidéar a leathnú tuilleadh go dtí an tacar sonraí MultiWoZ ag baint amach 90+% de mhéadracht faisnéise agus ratha. Tugaimid faoi deara freisin nach bhfuil na méadrachtaí seo ag teacht ar chuid de na heasnaimh atá ag DILOG i dtéarmaí dearfacha bréagacha, rud a spreagann dúinn scór Gníomhaíochta F1 cúnta a thomhas. Léirímid go bhfuil DILOG 100x níos éifeachtaí ó thaobh sonraí ná cineálacha cur chuige néarúla den scoth ar MultiWoZ agus ag an am céanna méadracht feidhmíochta comhchosúla a bhaint amach. Mar chríoch le plé ar láidreachtaí agus laigí DILOG.', 'hu': 'Az erőforrás-korlátozott párbeszédpolitikai tanulás igényei alapján párbeszédpolitikát vezetünk be differenciálható induktív logika (DILOG) segítségével. A DILOG SimDial és MultiWoZ segítségével feltárjuk az egyszeri tanulás és a zero-shot domain átvitel feladatait. Az éttermi domain egyetlen reprezentatív párbeszédablakát használva kiképezzük a DILOG-ot a SimDial adatkészletre, és 99%-os tartományon belüli tesztpontosságot érünk el. Megmutatjuk továbbá, hogy a képzett DILOG nulla-shot 99%-os pontossággal továbbítja az összes többi domainbe, bizonyítva a DILOG alkalmasságát a slot-töltő párbeszédpanelekre. Tanulmányunkat tovább kiterjesztjük a MultiWoZ adatkészletre, amely 90%-os információs és sikeres mutatókat ér el. Azt is megfigyeljük, hogy ezek a mutatók nem rögzítik a DILOG hiányosságait a hamis pozitívumok tekintetében, ami arra késztet, hogy mérjünk egy kiegészítő Action F1 pontszámot. Megmutatjuk, hogy a DILOG 100-szor nagyobb adathatékonysággal rendelkezik, mint a MultiWoZ legkorszerűbb neurális megközelítései, miközben hasonló teljesítménymérőket ér el. A DILOG erősségeiről és gyengeségeiről szóló vitával zárjuk.', 'ka': 'რესურსების მორჩენებით, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებული დიალოგის პოლიტიკის სწავლებას, ჩვენ დიალოგის პოლიტიკის გამოყენება განსხვავებული ინდიქტური ლოგიკის გამოყენება ( ჩვენ ერთი სტრიქტის სწავლების და ნულ სტრიქტის დიომინის გადატანსტის დავაკვირდებით DILOG-ს SimDial და MultiWoZ-ზე. რესტორანტის დიალოგის გამოყენება, ჩვენ DILOG-ს SimDial მონაცემების სეტატის შესახებ და 99+% დემომინის ტესტის მართლა მივიღეთ. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ DILOG 0-სტრიქტის გადატანსები ყველა სხვა დიომენში, 99+% სიმართლეობით, რომ DILOG-ს შესაძლებლობა სისტრიქტის შესაძლებლობად დააჩვენება სისტრიქტი ჩვენ უფრო უფრო გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ 90+% ინფორმაციის და წარმატების მეტრიკაში. ჩვენ ასევე დავხედავთ, რომ ეს მეტრიკები DILOG-ის კონტაქტიების განმავლობაში არ აღებენ, რომლებიც ჩვენ დავიწყებთ დახმარებელი მოქმედების F1 წერტილი. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ DILOG არის 100x მეტი მონაცემები ეფექტიურია, ვიდრე მრავალური ნეიროლური დახმარება MultiWoZ-ზე, როცა მსგავსი პროცექტის მეტრიკის მიღება ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ განსხვავებას შესახებ DILOG-ის ძალიან და სილაბების შესახებ.', 'it': "Motivati dalle esigenze di apprendimento della politica di dialogo vincolata dalle risorse, introduciamo la politica di dialogo tramite logica induttiva differenziabile (DILOG). Esploriamo i compiti dell'apprendimento one-shot e del trasferimento di domini zero-shot con DILOG su SimDial e MultiWoZ. Utilizzando un'unica finestra di dialogo rappresentativa del dominio del ristorante, addestriamo DILOG sul set di dati SimDial e otteniamo un'accuratezza dei test in-domain del 99+%. Mostriamo anche che il DILOG zero-shot addestrato si trasferisce a tutti gli altri domini con precisione del 99 +%, dimostrando l'idoneità di DILOG ai dialoghi di riempimento slot. Estendiamo ulteriormente il nostro studio al set di dati MultiWoZ raggiungendo il 90% delle metriche di informazione e successo. Osserviamo anche che queste metriche non stanno catturando alcune delle carenze di DILOG in termini di falsi positivi, spingendoci a misurare un punteggio ausiliario Action F1. Dimostriamo che DILOG è 100 volte più efficiente dei dati rispetto agli approcci neurali all'avanguardia su MultiWoZ, pur raggiungendo parametri di performance simili. Concludiamo con una discussione sui punti di forza e di debolezza di DILOG.", 'el': 'Με κίνητρο τις ανάγκες της εκμάθησης πολιτικής διαλόγου περιορισμένων πόρων, εισάγουμε πολιτική διαλόγου μέσω διαφοροποιημένης επαγωγικής λογικής (ΔΙΛΟΓΟΣ). Εξερευνούμε τα καθήκοντα της εκμάθησης μιας και της μεταφοράς μηδενικής εμβέλειας με το στο SimDial και το MultiWoZ. Χρησιμοποιώντας έναν μόνο αντιπροσωπευτικό διάλογο από τον τομέα του εστιατορίου, εκπαιδεύουμε στο σύνολο δεδομένων και αποκτούμε ακρίβεια δοκιμής 99+% εντός του τομέα. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι το εκπαιδευμένο μηδενικό σουτ μεταφέρεται σε όλους τους άλλους τομείς με ακρίβεια 99+% αποδεικνύοντας την καταλληλότητα του σε διαλόγους πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων. Επεκτείνουμε περαιτέρω τη μελέτη μας στο σύνολο δεδομένων επιτυγχάνοντας 90+% μετρήσεις ενημέρωσης και επιτυχίας. Παρατηρούμε επίσης ότι αυτές οι μετρήσεις δεν καταγράφουν ορισμένες από τις ελλείψεις του όσον αφορά τις ψευδείς θετικές ενδείξεις, οδηγώντας μας να μετρήσουμε μια βοηθητική βαθμολογία Δράσης F1. Δείχνουμε ότι η τεχνολογία είναι 100x πιο αποτελεσματική από τις σύγχρονες νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις στο MultiWoZ επιτυγχάνοντας παράλληλα παρόμοιες μετρήσεις απόδοσης. Κλείνουμε με μια συζήτηση για τα δυνατά και αδύνατα σημεία του.', 'lt': 'Dėl išteklių riboto dialogo politikos mokymosi poreikių diegiame dialogo politiką taikant diferencijuotą indukcinę logiką (DILOG). Mes tiriame vienkartinio mokymosi ir nulinio domeno perdavimo užduotis naudojant DILOG SimDial ir MultiWoZ. Naudodami vieną reprezentatyvų dialog ą iš restorano domeno, mes mokome DILOG SimDial duomenų rinkinyje ir gauname 99+% domeno bandymų tikslumą. Taip pat rodome, kad apmokyti DILOG nulinės nuotraukos perkėlimai į visas kitas sritis 99+% tikslumu, įrodant DILOG tinkamumą laiko tarpsnių užpildymo dialogams. Toliau išplėsime tyrimą iki MultiWoZ duomenų rinkinio, kuriame pasiekta 90 proc. informavimo ir sėkmės rodiklių. Taip pat pastebime, kad šie rodikliai neišsivaizduoja kai kurių DILOG trūkumų klaidingai teigiamų teiginių atžvilgiu, todėl raginame išmatuoti pagalbinį F1 veiksmą. Mes parodome, kad DILOG yra 100x veiksmingesnis už pažangiausius nervinius MultiWoZ metodus, tuo pat metu pasiekiant panašius veiksmingumo rodiklius. We conclude with a discussion on the strengths and weaknesses of DILOG.', 'kk': 'Ресурстың шектелген диалогтың ережелерін үйрену қажеттілігін қолданып, диалогтың ережелерін айырмашылық индуктивті логика (DILOG) арқылы енгізіп береміз. Біз бір түрлі оқыту және нөл түрлі доменге DILOG бағдарламасының тапсырмаларын зерттеп көрдік. Ресторантың доменінен бір reprezentative диалогын қолдану үшін, SimDial деректер жиынында DILOG құрылып, доменде 99+% сынақтар дұрыстығын аламыз. Біз сондай-ақ DILOG нөл- шоттарының 99+% деген барлық доменге ауыстыруларын көрсетедік. ДИLOG- ты слот толтыру диалогына қолдануға болады. Біз зерттеулерімізді 90+% мәлімет және сәтті метрикалық жеткізетін MultiWoZ деректер жиынына көтеріп келеміз. Біз сонымен қатар, бұл метрикалар DILOG деген кейбір нәтижелерді дұрыс емес болып, F1 деген көмектесу нәтижелерін өлшеп алмайды. Біз DILOG ұқсас жылдамдылық метрикалық жеткізу кезінде күй- жайындағы невралдық күй- жайындағы күй- жайындағы күй- жайындағы күй- жайынан 100x дегенді көрсетедік. Біз DILOG күштіліктерін және заттарды талқылап жатырмыз.', 'mk': 'Мотивирани од потребите на научување на политиката на дијалогот со ограничени ресурси, ние воведуваме политика на дијалогот преку различна индуктивна логика (DILOG). Ги истражуваме задачите на едноснимко учење и нула снимка трансфер на домен со DILOG на SimDial и MultiWoZ. Користејќи еден претставник дијалог од доменот на ресторанот, го обучуваме ДИЛОГ на системот на податоци SimDial и добиваме 99+% точност на тестот во доменот. Исто така покажуваме дека обучените DILOG нула-снимки трансферираат на сите други домени со 99+% точност, докажувајќи ја способноста на DILOG за дијалози за полнување на слотови. Понатаму ја прошируваме нашата студија на компјутерот на податоци МултиВуз, достигнувајќи 90+% информативна и успешна метрика. Исто така, забележуваме дека овие метрики не ги фатат некои од недостатоците на ДИЛОГ во поглед на лажни позитиви, што не поттикнува да мериме резултат на помошната акција Ф1. Ние покажуваме дека ДИЛОГ е 100 пати поефикасен од најсовремените нервни пристапи на МултиВОЗ, додека постигнува слични метрики на перформансата. Завршиме со дискусија за силностите и слабостите на ДИЛОГ.', 'ml': 'വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമാക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡയലോഗ് പോളിസി പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ആവശ്യമാണ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്നത്, വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യവസ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഷോട്ട് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും പൂജ്യ വെടിവെക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും ജോലികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു റെസ്റ്റോറന്റ് ഡോമെനെയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ ഡയലോഗ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡിലോഗ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കു നമ്മളും കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, പരിശീലനം ഡിലോഗ് പൂജ്യത്തിലേക്ക് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d 99+ ശക്തിയുള്ള എല്ലാ ഡൊമെയിലേക്കും കൊണ്ടുവരുന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പഠനത്തിലേക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. 90+ വിവരങ്ങളും വിജയിക്കുന്ന മെറ്റിക്കുകളും  ഈ മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d കള്ളസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഡിലോഗിന്റെ ചില കുറച്ച് കുറച്ച് കുറവുകള്\u200d പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നില്ല എന്നും നമ്മ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഡിലോഗ് 100 x കൂടുതല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാവുകള്\u200dക്ക് സാധ്യതയുള്ളതാണെന്നാണ്. മില്\u200dവോസ്സിലെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d സാധ ഡിലോഗിന്റെ ശക്തികളെയും ദുര്\u200dബലങ്ങളെയും കുറിച്ച് ഒരു സംസാരം നാം അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Motivat mill-ħtiġijiet tat-tagħlim tal-politika tad-djalogu ristrett fir-riżorsi, aħna nintroduċu politika tad-djalogu permezz ta’ loġika induttiva differenzjabbli (DILOG). Aħna nesploraw il-kompiti ta’ tagħlim b’darba u trasferiment ta’ dominju b’żero-shot b’DILOG fuq SimDial u MultiWoZ. Bl-użu ta’ djalogu rappreżentattiv wieħed mid-dominju tar-ristorant, a ħna nħarrġu DILOG fuq is-sett tad-dejta SimDial u niksbu 99+% preċiżjoni tat-test fid-dominju. Aħna nuru wkoll li t-trasferimenti mħarrġa tad-DILOG b’żero-shot lejn id-dominji l-oħra kollha b’preċiżjoni ta’ 99+%, li jagħtu prova tal-idoneità tad-DILOG għad-djalogi tal-mili tas-slots. Aħna jestendu wkoll l-istudju tagħna għas-sett tad-dejta MultiWoZ li jikseb il-metriċi ta’ informazzjoni u suċċess ta’ 90+%. Aħna nnotaw ukoll li dawn il-metriċi mhumiex qed jinqabdu xi wħud min-nuqqasijiet tad-DILOG f’termini ta’ pożittivi foloz, u dan iwassalna biex inkejlu punteġġ tal-Azzjoni awżiljarja F1. Aħna nuru li DILOG huwa 100x aktar effiċjenti fid-dejta minn approċċi newrali avvanzati fuq MultiWoZ filwaqt li jinkisbu metriċi ta’ prestazzjoni simili. Aħna nikkonkludu b’diskussjoni dwar is-saħħa u d-dgħufijiet tad-DILOG.', 'mn': 'Байгаль хязгаарлагдсан диалог бодлогын суралцах хэрэгцээс хөдөлгөөнтэй, бид диалог бодлогыг өөр өөрчлөлтийн үйлдвэрлэлтийн логик (DILOG) аргаар танилцуулдаг. Бид нэг ширхэг суралцах, тэр ширхэг зохиолын шилжүүлэлтийг судалж, DILOG-г SimDial болон MultiWoZ дээр судалж байна. Рестораны холбооны ганц загварын диалог ашиглан бид DILOG-г SimDial өгөгдлийн санд сургуульд 99+% шалгалтын тодорхойлолтыг авч чадна. Мөн бид сургалтын DILOG 0-шүтлэг нь 99+% тодорхойлолтой бусад бүх сүтлэгт дамжуулалтыг харуулж байна. DILOG нь слот дүүргэх диалогт зөв байдлыг баталж байна. Бид өөрсдийн судалгааг олон Воз өгөгдлийн санд 90+% мэдээлэл болон амжилтын метрик хүртэл нэмэгдүүлсэн. Бид мөн эдгээр метриктикүүд DILOG-ын буруу эерэг байдлыг тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг анзаарлаа. Энэ нь бидэнд тусламжтай Action F1 тоо хэмжээнд хүргэж чадна. Бид ДИЛОГ нь ижил үйл ажиллагааны метрик хүртэл олон ВОЗ дээр урлагийн мэдрэлийн ойлголттоос 100x илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид ДИЛОГ-ын хүчтэй, хүчтэй байдлын талаар ярилцсан.', 'ms': 'Dimotifkan oleh keperluan pembelajaran polisi dialog yang dikuasai sumber, kami memperkenalkan polisi dialog melalui logik induktif yang boleh berbeza (DILOG). We explore the tasks of one-shot learning and zero-shot domain transfer with DILOG on SimDial and MultiWoZ.  Dengan menggunakan dialog perwakilan tunggal dari domain restoran, kami melatih DILOG pada set data SimDial dan mendapatkan 99+% ketepatan ujian dalam domain. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pemindahan ditembak-sifar DILOG dilatih ke semua domain lain dengan akurasi 99+%, membuktikan kemampuan DILOG untuk dialog penuhian slot. Kami lebih lanjutkan kajian kami ke set data MultiWoZ yang mencapai 90+% maklumat dan metrik kejayaan. Kami juga memperhatikan bahawa metrik ini tidak menangkap beberapa kekurangan DILOG dalam terma positif palsu, meminta kita untuk mengukur skor Tindakan Bantuan F1. Kami menunjukkan bahawa DILOG adalah 100 x lebih efisien data daripada pendekatan saraf state-of-the-art pada MultiWoZ sementara mencapai metrik prestasi yang sama. Kita berakhir dengan perbincangan tentang kekuatan dan kelemahan DILOG.', 'no': 'Dersom det er motivert av behov for å lære dialogpolitikk med ressursbeheiningar, introduserer vi dialogpolitikk med forskjellige induktive logikk (DILOG). Vi undersøker oppgåvene for læring av ein shot og overføring av null-shot domenet med DILOG på SimDial og MultiWoZ. Bruk eit enkelt reprezentativt dialogvindauge frå restaurantdomenet, treng vi DILOG på SimDial-datasettet og får 99+% testnøyaktighet i domenet. Vi viser også at den trengte DILOG-nullstilta overføringane til alle andre domene med 99+% nøyaktighet, som viser at DILOG er tilpassande til plastfiltingsdialogar. Vi utvidar studien vårt lenger til datasettet «MultiWoZ», som fikk 90+% informasjon og suksesmetrikk. Vi observerer også at desse metrikane ikkje hentar nokre av kortbehandlingane av DILOG med vilkårleg positiv, og fører oss til å måle eit F1- poeng for hjelpehandlinga. Vi viser at DILOG er 100x meir data effektiv enn kunsttilnærmingar på multiWoZ mens det gjer liknande funksjonsmetrikar. Vi avsluttar med ein diskusjon om styrkene og tyrkene av DILOG.', 'pl': 'Motywowani potrzebami uczenia się polityki dialogowej ograniczonych zasobami, wprowadzamy politykę dialogową poprzez zróżnicowalną logikę indukcyjną (DILOG). Badamy zadania jednorazowego uczenia się i transferu domen zero-shot z DILOG na SimDial i MultiWoZ. Korzystając z jednego reprezentatywnego dialogu dialogowego z domeny restauracji, trenujemy DILOG na zbiorze danych SimDial i uzyskujemy dokładność testu 99+% w domenie. Pokazujemy również, że przeszkolony DILOG zero-shot przenosi się do wszystkich innych domen z dokładnością 99+% , co potwierdza przydatność DILOG do dialogów wypełniających gniazda. Ponadto rozszerzamy nasze badania o zbiór danych MultiWoZ osiągający 90+% wskaźniki informacji i sukcesu. Obserwujemy również, że wskaźniki te nie uwzględniają niektórych niedociągnięć DILOG pod względem fałszywych pozytywów, skłaniając nas do mierzenia pomocniczego wyniku Action F1. Pokazujemy, że DILOG jest 100x bardziej wydajny danych niż najnowocześniejsze podejścia neuronowe na MultiWoZ, przy jednoczesnym osiąganiu podobnych wskaźników wydajności. Zakończymy dyskusją na temat mocnych i słabych stron DILOG.', 'sr': 'Pokrenuti potrebama ograničenog učenja politike dijaloga resursa, predstavljamo politiku dijaloga putem diferencijalne induktivne logike (DILOG). Istražujemo zadatke jednopucnog učenja i prenošenja domena bez pucnjave sa DILOG na SimDial i MultiWoZ. Koristeći jednog predstavnog dijaloga iz domena restorana, treniramo DILOG na setu podataka SimDial i dobijemo tačnost ispitivanja u domenu 99+%. Također pokazujemo da obučeni DILOG-ni prebaci nula-pucanja na sve ostale domene sa preciznošću 99+%, dokazujući odgovarajuću DILOG-u na dijaloge ispunjavanja slota. Dalje proširimo našu studiju na multiWoZ dataset, ostvarivši 90+% informativne i uspešne metrike. Takođe primećujemo da ove metrike ne uhvate neke nedostatke DILOG u smislu lažnih pozitivnih pozitiva, što nas natera da izmerimo pomoæni rezultat akcije F1. Pokazujemo da je DILOG 100x efikasniji od state-of-the-art neural pristupa na MultiWoZ dok postignemo slične performanske metrike. Završili smo raspravu o snazi i slabostima DILOG-a.', 'ro': 'Motivați de nevoile de învățare a politicilor de dialog restricționate de resurse, introducem politica de dialog prin intermediul logicii inductive diferențiabile (DILOG). Explorăm sarcinile învățării one-shot și transferului de domenii zero-shot cu DILOG pe SimDial și MultiWoZ. Folosind un singur dialog reprezentativ din domeniul restaurantului, instruim DILOG pe setul de date SimDial și obținem o precizie de 99+% a testului în domeniu. De asemenea, arătăm că DILOG zero-shot transferă la toate celelalte domenii cu o precizie de 99 +%, dovedind adecvarea DILOG pentru dialogurile de umplere a sloturilor. Extindem în continuare studiul nostru la setul de date MultiWoZ obținând valori de informare și succes de peste 90%. Observăm, de asemenea, că aceste măsurători nu surprind unele dintre deficiențele DILOG în termeni de fals pozitive, ceea ce ne determină să măsurăm un scor auxiliar Action F1. Noi arătăm că DILOG este de 100 de ori mai eficient de date decât abordările neurale de ultimă generație pe MultiWoZ, obținând în același timp măsurători similare de performanță. Încheiem cu o discuție despre punctele forte și punctele slabe ale DILOG.', 'so': 'Motivated by the needs of resource constrained dialog policy learning, we introduce dialog policy via differentiable inductive logic (DILOG).  Waxaynu baaraannaa shaqada waxbarashada hal ganacsiga ah iyo wareejinta domain aan zero looga dhuftay oo ku qoran DILOG xagga SimDial iyo MultiWoZ. Isku isticmaalaya dialog kaliya oo gudaha kafeenada ah, waxaynu ku tababarinnaa DILOG-ka saxda macluumaadka SimDial kadibna u helnaa 99+% tijaabinta gudaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in lagu baaraandegay DILOG zero-ganacsi looga wareejiyo meelaha kale oo dhan oo lagu saxday 99+% si saxda ah, taasoo caddaynaya habboon u leh DILOG in lagu buuxiyo dialog-boosas. Waxbarashadayada waxaan u sii wadaynaa macluumaadka badan ee MultiWoZ oo gaadhaya 90+ ogeysiiska iyo liibaanshaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu aragnaa inaanay soo qabsan qaar ka mid ah DILOG oo ku saabsan waxyaabo been ah, taasoo inaga dhigaya inaannu qiyaasto kooxda waxqabadka F1 ee ku saabsan. Waxan tusaynaa in DILOG uu yahay 100x oo ka faa’iido badan taarifka ku saabsan xaaladda farshaxanka ah ee mulWoZ marka uu soo gaadho qaab u eg sameynta sameynta. Waxaynu dhamaystirnaa hadal ku saabsan xoogga iyo itaaldarrada DILOG.', 'ta': 'மூலம் தடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் கொள்கையின் தேவை நாம் ஒரு சுட்டு கற்றல் மற்றும் பூஜ்ஜி சுட்டு டோமைன் மாற்றுதல் பணிகளை தேடுகிறோம் சிம்டியால் மற்றும் பல்வூஜ் மீது. ஒரே பிரதிநிர்வாகி களத்திலிருந்து ஒரு உரையாடலை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் சாதாரண தகவல் அமைப்பில் DILOG பயிற்சி மற்றும் உள்ளமைப்பு சோதனையில் 99 மேலும் பயிற்சி DILOG பூஜ்ஜி சுட்டு மாற்றங்களை 99+ சரியாக உள்ள அனைத்து களங்களுக்கும் காட்டுகிறோம் என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். DI நாம் மேலும் நமது படிப்பாட்டை பலவுஜ் தரவுத்தளத்திற்கு விரிவாக்குகிறோம் 90+ அறிவிப்பு மற்றும் வெற்ற நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் இந்த மெட்ரிக்குகள் பொய் நேர்ந்த நேர்மைகளில் DILOG சில குறைவுகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்வதில்லை என்பதை பார்க்கிறோம இதே போன்ற செயல் முறைகளை அடையும் போது, DILOG என்பது 100 x மேலும் தரவு வெளிப்படையானது. நாங்கள் ஒரு விவாதத்தை முடிவு செய்கிறோம் DILOG சக்திகள் மற்றும் பலஹீனம்.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සංවාද පාලනය ඉගෙනගන්න අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් හැකියාව, අපි වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් සංවාද පාලනය (DILOG) විදිහට ප අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ එක ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න සහ ශූර්ණ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ඩිලොග් එක්ක සිම්ඩායිල රෙස්ටෝරෑන්ට් ඩෝමින් වලින් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන සංවාදයක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි DILOG සිම්ඩායිල් දත්ත සෙට් වලින් ප්\u200dරධ අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් DILOG ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් අනිත් ඩෝමේන්වට 99+% සිද්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ස්ලෝට් පුරවන්න සංවාදය අපි අපේ අධ්\u200dයානය ගොඩක් විස්තර කරන්නේ MultiWoZ දත්ත සැට 90+% අධ්\u200dයානය සහ වැසිල්ලක් ලබාගන්න. අපි පරික්ෂා කරනවා මේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් DILOG ගේ වැරදි අවශ්\u200dයයක් අල්ලගන්නේ නැහැ කියලා, අපිට උදව් කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් F1 ස්කෝර් වල අපි පෙන්වන්නේ DILOG 100x විශේෂයෙන් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වඩා වැඩි තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වෙන්නේ MultiWoZ වලින් වගේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය මී අපි DILOG ගේ ශක්තිමත් වලින් දුර්වලත් වලින් කතා කරනවා.', 'sv': 'Motiverad av behoven av resursbegränsad dialog policy lärande introducerar vi dialog policy via differentierbar induktiv logik (DILOG). Vi utforskar uppgifterna med one-shot lärande och noll-shot domänöverföring med DILOG på SimDial och MultiWoZ. Med hjälp av en enda representativ dialogruta från restaurangdomen tränar vi DILOG på SimDial-datauppsättningen och uppnår 99+% testnoggrannhet inom domänen. Vi visar också att den utbildade DILOG zero-shot överför till alla andra domäner med 99+% noggrannhet, vilket bevisar att DILOG lämpar sig för kortfyllningsdialoger. Vi utökar vår studie vidare till att omfatta MultiWoZ-datauppsättningen och uppnår 90+% information och framgång. Vi observerar också att dessa mätvärden inte fångar några av bristerna i DILOG när det gäller falska positiva, vilket får oss att mäta en extra Action F1 poäng. Vi visar att DILOG är 100 gånger mer dataeffektiv än toppmoderna neurala metoder på MultiWoZ samtidigt som vi uppnår liknande prestandamått. Vi avslutar med en diskussion om DILOGs styrkor och svagheter.', 'ur': 'رسورس کی ضرورت کے ذریعہ سے محدود ہوئی ڈالیلوگ پولیس سیکھنے کے ذریعہ، ہم مختلف طریقے سے ڈالیلوگ پولیس کی معلوم کریں گے۔ ہم ایک شٹ کی تعلیم اور صفر-شٹ ڈومین ٹرانسٹر کے کاموں کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں سیم دیال اور MultiWoZ پر DILOG کے ساتھ. رستورانٹ ڈومین سے ایک نمایشگر ڈالیزانگ کا استعمال کرتا ہے، ہم سیمائل ڈاٹ سٹ پر DILOG کو ترینس دیتے ہیں اور 99+% ڈومین کی امتحان دقیق حاصل کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی دکھایا کہ تعلیم دیلوگ صفر-شٹ تمام دومین میں 99+% دقیقات کے ساتھ دکھائی جاتی ہے، جو DILOG کے مطابق اسلوٹ پر پول کرنے کے ڈالیوں کے لئے دکھائی جاتی ہے. ہم اپنا مطالعہ مطالعہ مطالعہ مطالعہ 90+% تک پہنچ رہے ہیں اور موفقیت مطالعہ تک پہنچ رہے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی دیکھا ہے کہ یہ متریک DILOG کے کئی ناکاموں کو غلط مثبت کے مطابق پکڑ رہے ہیں اور ہمیں ایک مددگار Action F1 score کا اندازہ دینے کے لئے پکڑ رہے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ DILOG ایک جیسی عملکرد متریک تک پہنچ رہے ہیں اس سے 100x زیادہ دکھانے والا ہے ہم نے DILOG کی قوت اور کمزوری کے بارے میں ایک بحث کا فیصلہ کیا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz bir tashkilotni o'rganish va hech narsa bo'lgan domen uzatish vazifalarini o'rganamiz, SimDial va MultiWoZ bilan ko'paytirish. Name Biz shunday ko'rsatganimiz, 99+ foydalanuvchi boshqa domeya hamma narsalarga o'zgarishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, DILOG to ʻgʻri oynalarni toʻldirish imkoniyatini imkoniyat beradi. Biz o'qituvchimizni ko'proq mulWoZ maʼlumotlariga 90+ haqida xabari va muvaffaqiyatli metriklarga ko'paymiz. Biz shunday ko'rib turamiz, bu metriklarning ko'pchilik holatlarini qo'llamaydi. Bu bizga qo'shilgan amalni F1 qiymatga o'tib tashlash mumkin. Biz ko'rayapmiz, DILOG 100 x huddi bir xil vazifani bajarayotganda muloWZning davlatdan foydalanuvchi neyron usullaridan foydalanishi mumkin. Biz DILOG tashkilotlari va suhbatlari bilan muloqat bilan tugatamiz.", 'vi': 'Động đến nhu cầu của việc học chính sách hạn chế tài nguyên, chúng tôi giới thiệu chính sách hộp thoại bằng cách khác biệt dẫn dắt (DIGI). Chúng tôi khám phá các công việc của việc học một phát và truyền miền không quay với DIGI trên SimDial và đa WoZ. Sử dụng một hộp thoại đại diện duy nhất từ miền nhà hàng, chúng tôi đào tạo DIGI trên bộ dữ liệu SimDial và đạt độ chính xác thử 99+ trong miền. Chúng tôi cũng cho biết là địa bảo khaị không bắn tới tất cả những khu vực khác với sự chúng táng tác biết mục địa số của khác, chứng kiểm biến được địc Chúng tôi còn mở rộng nghiên cứu của chúng tôi đến bộ dữ liệu đa WoZ đạt được đa số thông tin và hệ thống đo thành công. Chúng tôi cũng nhận thấy rằng những thước đo này không bắt được một số thiếu sót của DIGI về mặt tích cực sai lầm, khiến chúng tôi đo một số lượng phụ của Hành động F1. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng DIGI có ích hơn 100x dữ liệu hiệu quả hơn các tiếp cận thần kinh hiện đại trên đa WoZ trong khi đạt được thước đo năng lượng tương tự. Chúng ta kết thúc với cuộc thảo luận về những điểm mạnh và yếu của DIGI.', 'bg': 'Мотивирани от нуждите на ресурсно ограничено учене на диалогова политика, ние въвеждаме диалогова политика чрез диференцируема индуктивна логика (ДИЛОГ). Ние изследваме задачите на еднократно обучение и нулев трансфер на домейни с ДИЛОГ на СимДиал и МултиУЗ. Използвайки един представителен диалогов прозорец от домейна на ресторанта, ние тренираме върху набора от данни и получаваме 99+% точност на теста в домейна. Показваме също, че обученият нулев изстрел прехвърля към всички останали домейни с 99+% точност, доказвайки пригодността на ДИЛОГ към диалоговите прозорци за запълване на слотове. Ние допълнително разширяваме нашето проучване до набора от данни, като постигаме 90+ % показатели за информиране и успех. Също така наблюдаваме, че тези показатели не улавят някои от недостатъците на ДИЛОГ по отношение на фалшиви положителни, което ни подтиква да измерим допълнителен резултат от Действие Ф1. Показваме, че е 100 пъти по-ефективен от най-съвременните невронни подходи в същевременно постига подобни показатели за ефективност. Завършваме с дискусия за силните и слабите страни на ДИЛОГ.', 'nl': 'Gemotiveerd door de behoeften van het leren van resourcebeperkt dialoogbeleid introduceren we dialoogbeleid via differentieerbare inductieve logica (DILOG). We verkennen de taken van one-shot learning en zero-shot domeinoverdracht met DILOG op SimDial en MultiWoZ. Met behulp van één representatief dialoogvenster vanuit het restaurant domein trainen we DILOG op de SimDial dataset en verkrijgen we 99+% in-domein testnauwkeurigheid. We laten ook zien dat de getrainde DILOG zero-shot overdraagt naar alle andere domeinen met 99+% nauwkeurigheid, wat de geschiktheid van DILOG bewijst voor slotvullende dialogen. We breiden onze studie verder uit naar de MultiWoZ dataset met 90+% informatie en successtatistieken. We constateren ook dat deze statistieken sommige tekortkomingen van DILOG in termen van false positives niet vastleggen, waardoor we een hulpscore van Action F1 moeten meten. We laten zien dat DILOG 100x efficiënter data is dan state-of-the-art neurale benaderingen op MultiWoZ, terwijl gelijkaardige prestatiestatistieken worden bereikt. We sluiten af met een discussie over de sterke en zwakke punten van DILOG.', 'da': 'Motiveret af behovet for ressourcebegrænset dialog politik læring, introducerer vi dialog politik via differentierelig induktiv logik (DILOG). Vi udforsker opgaverne med one-shot læring og nul-shot domæneoverførsel med DILOG på SimDial og MultiWoZ. Ved hjælp af en enkelt repræsentativ dialog fra restaurant domænet træner vi DILOG på SimDial datasættet og opnår 99+% testnøjagtighed i domænet. Vi viser også, at den uddannede DILOG zero-shot overfører til alle andre domæner med 99+% nøjagtighed, hvilket beviser DILOGs egnethed til slot-fyldning dialoger. Vi udvider yderligere vores undersøgelse til MultiWoZ datasættet og opnår 90+% information og succes målinger. Vi bemærker også, at disse målinger ikke indfanger nogle af DILOGs mangler med hensyn til falske positive elementer, hvilket får os til at måle en hjælpeaktion F1 score. Vi viser, at DILOG er 100 gange mere dataeffektiv end state-of-the-art neurale tilgange på MultiWoZ, samtidig med at vi opnår lignende præstationsmålinger. Vi afslutter med en diskussion om DILOGs styrker og svagheder.', 'hr': 'Pokrenuti potrebama ograničenog učenja politike dijaloga resursa, predstavljamo politiku dijaloga putem diferencijalne induktivne logike (DILOG). Istražujemo zadatke jednopucnog učenja i prenošenja domena bez pucnjave s DILOG na SimDial i MultiWoZ. Koristeći jednog predstavnog dijaloga iz domena restorana, treniramo DILOG na setu podataka SimDial i dobijemo preciznost ispitivanja u domenu 99+%. Također pokazujemo da obučeni prijenos DILOG 0-pucnjave na sve ostale domene s preciznošću 99+%, dokazujući odgovarajuću DILOG-u dijalogima ispunjavanja slota. Dalje proširimo našu studiju na multiWoZ dataset koji postigne 90+% informativne i uspješne metrike. Također primjećujemo da ove metrike ne uhvate neke nedostatke DILOG u smislu lažnih pozitivnosti, što nas dovodi do mjerenja rezultata pomoćne akcije F1. Pokazujemo da je DILOG 100x učinkovitiji od stanja umjetnosti neuroloških pristupa na MultiWoZ dok postignemo slične mjere učinkovitosti. Završili smo s raspravom o snazi i slabostima DILOG-a.', 'de': 'Motiviert von den Bedürfnissen des ressourcenbeschränkten Dialogpolitik-Lernens, führen wir Dialogpolitik mittels differenzierbarer induktiver Logik (DILOG) ein. Wir erforschen die Aufgaben des One-Shot-Lernens und des Zero-Shot-Domaintransfers mit DILOG auf SimDial und MultiWoZ. Mit einem einzigen repräsentativen Dialog aus der Restaurantdomäne trainieren wir DILOG auf dem SimDial-Datensatz und erhalten 99+% In-Domain-Testgenauigkeit. Wir zeigen auch, dass der trainierte DILOG Zero-Shot 99+% genau auf alle anderen Domänen überträgt, was die Eignung von DILOG für slotfüllende Dialoge belegt. Wir erweitern unsere Studie weiter auf den MultiWoZ Datensatz mit 90+% Informations- und Erfolgskennzahlen. Wir beobachten auch, dass diese Metriken einige der Mängel von DILOG in Bezug auf False Positives nicht erfassen, was uns veranlasst, einen zusätzlichen Action F1 Score zu messen. Wir zeigen, dass DILOG 100x dateneffizienter ist als moderne neuronale Ansätze auf MultiWoZ bei gleichzeitiger Erreichung ähnlicher Leistungskennzahlen. Wir schließen mit einer Diskussion über die Stärken und Schwächen von DILOG.', 'fa': 'توسط نیازهای سیاست\u200cهای محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت، سیاست\u200cهای محاودیت را با طریق منطقی متفاوت (DILOG) معرفی می\u200cکنیم. ما وظیفه\u200cهای یادگیری یک شلیک و انتقال دامنی صفر با DILOG در SimDial و MultiWoZ تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از یک محاورۀ نماینده\u200cای از دامنه رستوران، DILOG را روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای SimDial آموزش می\u200cدهیم و دقیقات امتحان در دامنه 99+% را دریافت می\u200cکنیم. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که تغییرات صفر صفر DILOG آموزش داده شده به تمام دومین\u200cهای دیگر با دقیق ۹۹+%، ثابت می\u200cکند که مناسب DILOG به صفحه\u200cهای پر کردن slot است. ما مطالعه\u200cمان را به مجموعه داده\u200cهای MultiWoZ به 90 +% اطلاعات و متریک موفقیت افزایش می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین مشاهده می کنیم که این متریک بعضی از shortcomings DILOG را به عنوان مثبت غلط نمی\u200cگیرند، که ما را به اندازه اندازه\u200cگیری یک نمونه\u200cی ف1 کمک می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که DILOG ۱۰۰xداده\u200cهای مفید تر از نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی\u200cهای موجود هنری در موقع رسیدن به متریک\u200cهای فعالیت مشابه است. ما با یک بحث در مورد قوت و ضعیفیت DILOG به پایان رسیدیم.', 'id': 'Dimotifkan oleh kebutuhan pembelajaran kebijakan dialog yang dikurangi sumber daya, kami memperkenalkan kebijakan dialog melalui logika induktif yang berbeda (DILOG). We explore the tasks of one-shot learning and zero-shot domain transfer with DILOG on SimDial and MultiWoZ.  Using a single representative dialog from the restaurant domain, we train DILOG on the SimDial dataset and obtain 99+% in-domain test accuracy.  Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa transfer DILOG terlatih nol tembakan ke semua domain lain dengan akurasi 99+%, membuktikan kemampuan DILOG untuk dialog penuh slot. Kami lebih lanjut memperluas studi kami ke dataset MultiWoZ mencapai 90+% informasi dan metrik sukses. We also observe that these metrics are not capturing some of the shortcomings of DILOG in terms of false positives, prompting us to measure an auxiliary Action F1 score.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa DILOG adalah 100 x lebih efisien data daripada pendekatan saraf state-of-the-art pada MultiWoZ sementara mencapai metrik prestasi yang sama. We conclude with a discussion on the strengths and weaknesses of DILOG.', 'sw': 'Kuhamasishwa na mahitaji ya rasilimali ya sera ya mazungumzo yaliyolazimika kujifunza, tunaonyesha sera ya mazungumzo kwa njia ya mantiki inayotofautiana na viwanda (DILOG). Tunagundua kazi za kujifunza moja kwa moja na uhamishaji wa huduma zisizo za risasi na DILOG kwenye SimDial na MultiWoZ. Kwa kutumia mjadala mmoja kutoka ndani ya mgahawa, tunafundisha DILOG kwenye seti ya data za SimDial na kupata asilimia 99 kwa usahihi wa majaribio ya ndani. Tunaonyesha pia kuwa mabadiliko ya DILOG yenye mafunzo yasiyo na sifa kwenye maeneo mengine yenye uhakika wa asilimia 99+, yanaonyesha uwezekano wa DILOG katika mazungumzo yanayojaza mazungumzo. Tunaendelea utafiti wetu kwenye takwimu za MultiWoZ zinazopata taarifa 90+ na njia za mafanikio. Tunaona pia kuwa mbinu hizi hazina mafunguzo ya DILOG kwa sababu ya vituo vya uongo, na kusaidia kutupiza vipimo vya kampeni ya ushirikiano F1. We show that DILOG is 100x more data efficient than state-of-the-art neural approaches on MultiWoZ while achieving similar performance metrics.  Tunaihitimisha na mjadala kuhusu nguvu na udhaifu wa DILOG.', 'ko': '자원 제한 대화 전략 학습의 수요를 바탕으로 우리는 마이크로 귀납 논리(DILOG)를 통해 대화 전략을 도입한다.SimDial과MultiWoZ에서 DILOG를 사용하여 일회성 학습과 제로 영역 이동을 하는 임무를 탐색했습니다.식당 분야의 단일 대표 대화상자를 사용하여 우리는 심다이얼 데이터 세트에서 DILOG를 훈련하고 99퍼센트 이상의 역내 테스트 정확도를 얻었다.또한 훈련된 DILOG 제로 포는 99% 이상의 정확도로 다른 모든 도메인으로 전송되므로 슬롯 채우기 대화 상자에 대한 DILOG의 적합성이 입증되었습니다.더 나아가 MultiWoZ 데이터 세트로 확장하여 90% 이상의 정보와 성공 지표를 실현하고자 합니다.우리는 또한 이러한 지표들이 DILOG의 오보 방면의 일부 단점을 포착하지 못했기 때문에 보조동작 F1의 점수를 측정하도록 했다.MultiWoZ에서 DILOG의 데이터 효율은 가장 선진적인 신경 방법의 100배에 달하며 비슷한 성능 지표를 실현했다.마지막으로 DILOG의 장점과 단점을 논의했습니다.', 'am': 'የመድረጊያውን ዋና ማስተማር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የአንዲት ፎቶ ትምህርት እና በዝምዲያና በMultiWoZ ላይ የዶሜን ስንቀሳቅስ ስራዎችን እንመርምራለን፡፡ የአንድ ብሔራዊ ጥያቄ ጥያቄን በመጠቀም፣ የስሜት ጥያቄ ዳታተር ዲሎጂን እናስተምረዋለን እና በዶሜን ፈተና እርግጠኛ 99+% እናገኛለን፡፡ እንደዚህም እናሳያቸዋለን፤ የተጠቃሚ DILOG-0-shot ወደ ሌሎች ዳሜዎች ሁሉ እርግጠኛ ነው፡፡ ትምህርታችንን ወደ ብዙ WoZ ዳታ ማድረጊያውን እየጨመረን 90+ ማውቀትን እና የስኬት ማተርሚቶችን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ እናም እነዚህ ተሟጋቾች የዲሎG አካባቢዎች በሐሰት ስህተት እንዳይያዙ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ We show that DILOG is 100x more data efficient than state-of-the-art neural approaches on MultiWoZ while achieving similar performance metrics.  የDILOG ኃይልና ድካማዎች በሚሆነው ውይይት እናቆማለን፡፡', 'af': "Gebeweger deur die behoefte van hulpbron beheinde dialoog beleid leer, ons introduseer dialoog beleid deur verskillende induktiewe logiek (DILOG). Ons ondersoek die opdragte van een-skoot leer en zero-skoot domein oordrag met DILOG op SimDial en MultiWoZ. By gebruik van 'n enkele reprezentasie dialoog van die restaurant domein, tref ons DILOG op die SimDial datastel en kry 99+% in- domein toets presisiteit. Ons wys ook dat die opgelei DILOG nul- skoot oordragte na alle ander domeine met 99+% presies, bevestig die geskikheid van DILOG na slot- opvulling dialoog. Ons verder uitbrei ons studie na die MultiWoZ-datastel wat 90+% inligting en sukses metriek bereik het. Ons het ook aanmerk dat hierdie metrike nie sommige van die kortpaaklikhede van DILOG in terms van valse positiewe optrek nie, wat ons bevestig om 'n hulpboorlike aksie F1 telling te maak nie. Ons wys dat DILOG 100x meer data effektief is as state-of-the-art neurale toegang op MultiWoZ terwyl gelyke prestasie metries bereik word. Ons sluit met 'n diskusie oor die sterkte en swakhede van DILOG.", 'sq': 'Motivuar nga nevojat e mësimit të politikës së dialog të kufizuar të burimeve, ne futim politikën e dialogut nëpërmjet logjikës induktive të ndryshme (DILOG). Ne eksplorojmë detyrat e një-shot mësimi dhe transferimi zero-shot domain me DILOG në SimDial dhe MultiWoZ. Using a single representative dialog from the restaurant domain, we train DILOG on the SimDial dataset and obtain 99+% in-domain test accuracy.  Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se transferimet e trajnuara DILOG zero-shot në të gjitha fushat e tjera me 99+% saktësi, duke provuar përshtatjen e DILOG për dialogun e mbushjes së slots. Ne zgjerojmë më tej studimin tonë në grupin e të dhënave MultiWoZ duke arritur 90+% informacion dhe metrikë suksesi. Ne gjithashtu vëzhgojmë se këto metrika nuk janë duke kapur disa nga mungesat e DILOG në lidhje me pozitiva të rreme, duke na nxitur të matnim një rezultat ndihmës Veprimi F1. We show that DILOG is 100x more data efficient than state-of-the-art neural approaches on MultiWoZ while achieving similar performance metrics.  Ne përfundojmë me një diskutim mbi fuqitë dhe dobësitë e DILOG.', 'hy': 'Պատրաստված ռեսուրսների սահմանափակ խմբի քաղաքականության ուսումնասիրության կարիքներով, մենք ներկայացնում ենք խմբի քաղաքականությունը տարբերակելի ինդուկտիվ տրամաբանության (DiLOG) միջոցով: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մեկ անգամ ուսումնասիրելու և զրո անգամ տիեզերքի փոխանցման խնդիրները SILOG-ի միջոցով Սիմդիալ և Միթի Վոզի միջոցով: Օգտագործելով ռեստորանի տիեզերքից մեկ ներկայացուցիչ հաղորդագրություն, մենք վարժեցնում ենք SILOG-ը Սիմդիալ տվյալների համակարգում և ստանում ենք 99+տոկոսըտիեզերքին թեստերի ճշգրտությունը: We also show that the trained DILOG zero-shot transfers to all other domains with 99+% accuracy, proving the suitability of DILOG to slot-filling dialogs.  Մենք նաև ընդլայնում ենք մեր ուսումնասիրությունը մինչև multiwoz տվյալների համակարգը, որն ունի 90+տոկոստեղեկատվության և հաջողության չափումներ: Մենք նաև նկատում ենք, որ այս մետրիկները չեն վերցնում ԴիԼՕԳ-ի որոշ թերությունները սխալ դրական տեսանկյունից, ինչը ստիպում է մեզ չափել օգնական գործողության F1 գնահատականը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ԴիԼՕԳ-ը 100x ավելի արդյունավետ տվյալներ է, քան ամենաբարձր նյարդային մոտեցումները Միջյու-Վոզի վրա, միաժամանակ հասնում է նմանատիպ արդյունավետության չափսեր: Մենք ավարտեցինք քննարկությամբ դիլոգի ուժեղությունների և թույլությունների մասին:', 'tr': "Resur menzilleýän dialog suçysynyň öwrenmegi tarapyndan süýtgedilen, biz diýalog suçysyny beýlenen täsir logyk (DILOG) bilen girdirdiris. DILOG'u SimDial ve MultiWoZ üzerinde bir atış öğrenmesinin ve sıfır atış alanı işlerini keşfettik. Restoran domenyndan ýeke temsilci bir dialog ullanýarys, biz DILOG SimDial veri setinde tren edýäris we domain testinden 99+% dogry tapylýarys. Biz hem eğitilmiş DILOG 0-resim aktarımlarını 99+% tam olarak diğer alanlara gösterip, DILOG'nun slot doldurulma dialoglarına uyumluluğunu kanıtlaýarlar. Öğrendiğimizi daha fazla MultiWoZ veri ayarlarına 90+% bilgi ve başarılı metriklere uzatıyoruz. Biz hem bu metrikler DILOG'nun yanlış pozitifler şeklinde boşalmaýandygyny gözetledik. Bize yardımcı bir aksiyon F1 noktasını ölçüp getirdik. DILOG'nun MultiWoZ'da benzeri etkinlik metriklerine ulaşarken, sanat sisteminden 100x daha etkinlik verildiğini gösteriyoruz. Biz DILOG'yň güýçli we zayıflatlyklary barada çykyp çykýarys.", 'az': "Yaxınlıq müəyyən dəyişiklik öyrənməsinin ehtiyaçları ilə hərəkət edilmişdir. Biz dəyişiklik dəyişiklik logik (DILOG) vasitəsilə dəyişdiririk. Biz bir fotoğraf öyrənməsini və sıfır-fotoğraf domeini, SimDial və MultiWoZ'da DILOG ilə istifadə edirik. Restoran domenindən tək bir dəlil dialogu istifadə edirək, SimDial verilər qutusunda DILOG öyrənirik və domenin sınaması doğruluğunu 99+% alırıq. Biz də göstərdik ki, təhsil edilmiş DILOG sıfır-fırlatı 99+% ədaləti olan bütün başqa domenalara daşıyırlar, DILOG'nun uyğunluğunu slot-filling dialoglarına təsdiqləyir. Biz öyrəndiyimizi çoxlu WoZ veri qutusuna 90+% bilgi və başarılı metriklərə çatdırırıq. Biz həmçin in bu metriklərin DILOG'nin bəzisini yalan pozitiflər haqqında yakalamadığını və bizə yardımçı Action F1 dəqiqəsini ölçürmək üçün təşkil edirik. Biz DILOG kimi performans metriklərinə yetişərkən, MultiWoZ'da müxtəlif nöral yaxınlıqlarından 100x daha faydalıdır. Biz DILOG qüvvətləri və zəiflikləri barəsində mübahisə edirik.", 'cs': 'Motivováni potřebami učení dialogových politik omezených zdroji, zavádíme dialogovou politiku prostřednictvím diferencovatelné indukční logiky (DILOG). Prozkoumáme úkoly jednorázového učení a nulového přenosu domén s DILOG na SimDial a MultiWoZ. Pomocí jediného reprezentativního dialogu z domény restaurace trénujeme DILOG na datové sadě SimDial a získáme 99+% přesnost testu v doméně. Dále ukazujeme, že trénovaný DILOG nulový výstřel se přenáší do všech ostatních domén s přesností 99+% a dokazuje vhodnost DILOGu pro dialogy s vyplněním slotů. Naši studii dále rozšiřujeme na datovou sadu MultiWoZ, která dosahuje 90+% informačních a úspěšných metrik. Dále pozorujeme, že tyto metriky nezachycují některé nedostatky DILOGu z hlediska falešných pozitivních hodnot, což nás nutí měřit pomocné skóre Action F1. Ukazujeme, že DILOG je 100x efektivnější data než moderní neuronové přístupy na MultiWoZ a přitom dosahuje podobných výkonnostních metrik. Na závěr diskuse o silných a slabých stránkách DILOGu.', 'et': 'Motiveerituna ressursipiiranud dialoogipoliitika õppimise vajadustest tutvustame dialoogipoliitikat diferentseeritava induktiivse loogika (DILOG) kaudu. Uurime ühekordse õppimise ja null-shot domeeni ülekande ülesandeid DILOGiga SimDialis ja MultiWoZ. Restorani domeeni ühe esindusdialoogi abil treenime DILOGi SimDiali andmekogumil ja saavutame 99+ % domeenisisese testi täpsuse. Samuti näitame, et koolitatud DILOG null-shot ülekandub kõikidesse teistesse valdkondadesse 99+% täpsusega, tõestades DILOGi sobivust pesade täitmise dialoogidele. Laiendame oma uuringut veelgi MultiWoZ andmekogumile, saavutades 90% teabe- ja edunäitajaid. Samuti täheldame, et need mõõdikud ei kajasta mõningaid DILOGi puudusi valepositiivsete näitajate osas, mistõttu mõõdame täiendavat Action F1 skoori. Näitame, et DILOG on 100 korda rohkem andmete tõhusam kui kaasaegsed närvilähenemised MultiWoZ-is, saavutades samal ajal sarnaseid jõudlusnäitajaid. Lõpetame arutelu DILOGi tugevate ja nõrkade külgede üle.', 'bs': 'Pokrenuti potrebama ograničenog učenja politike dijaloga resursa, predstavljamo politiku dijaloga putem diferencijalne induktivne logike (DILOG). Istražujemo zadatke jednopucnog učenja i prenošenja domena bez pucnjave sa DILOG na SimDial i MultiWoZ. Koristeći jedini predstavnik dijaloga iz domena restorana, treniramo DILOG na setu podataka SimDial i dobijemo preciznost ispitivanja u domenu 99+%. Također pokazujemo da obučeni prebaci DILOG 0-shot na sve ostale domene s preciznošću 99+%, dokazujući odgovarajuću DILOG-u dialogima za ispunjavanje slota. Dalje proširimo svoju studiju na multiWoZ dataset, ostvarivši 90+% informativne i uspješne metrike. Također posmatramo da ove metrike ne uhvate neke nedostatke DILOG u smislu lažnih pozitivnosti, što nas dovodi do mjerenja rezultata pomoćne akcije F1. Pokazujemo da je DILOG 100x učinkovitiji od stanja umjetnosti neuroloških pristupa na MultiWoZ dok postignemo slične mjere učinkovitosti. Završili smo s diskusijom o snazi i slabostima DILOG-a.', 'fi': 'Resurssirajoitteisen dialogipolitiikan oppimisen tarpeiden motivoituneena esittelemme dialogipolitiikkaa differentiable inductive logic (DILOG) kautta. Tutkimme yhden laukauksen oppimista ja nollalaukauksen verkkotunnuksen siirtoa DILOGin avulla SimDialissa ja MultiWoZ. Ravintolan toimialueen yhden edustavan dialogin avulla koulutamme DILOGia SimDial-datajoukon avulla ja saavutamme 99+% verkkotunnuksen sisäisen testitarkkuuden. Osoitamme myös, että koulutettu DILOG nollashot siirtää kaikille muille toimialoille 99+% tarkkuudella, mikä todistaa DILOGin soveltuvuuden slot-täyttödialogeihin. Laajennamme tutkimuksemme edelleen MultiWoZ-aineistoon, jossa saavutamme yli 90% informaatio- ja menestysmittareita. Havaitsemme myös, että nämä mittarit eivät tallenna joitakin DILOGin puutteita väärien positiivisten tulosten suhteen, mikä saa meidät mittaamaan Action F1 -lisäpisteitä. Osoitamme, että DILOG on 100 kertaa tehokkaampi data kuin uusimmat neuromenetelmät MultiWoZ:ssa, samalla kun se saavuttaa samanlaiset suorituskykymittarit. Lopuksi keskustelemme DILOGin vahvuuksista ja heikkouksista.', 'bn': 'সম্পদ নির্ধারিত ডায়ালগ নীতি শিক্ষার প্রয়োজনের মাধ্যমে আমরা ডায়ালগের নীতি পরিচালনা করি, বৈচিত্র্যশীল লোগিকের মাধ্যমে ডায়ালগে আমরা এক গুলি শিক্ষা এবং শূন্য-গুলি ডোমেইন পরিবর্তনের কাজ খুঁজে বের করি সিম্ডায়াল এবং মাল্টিউজে ডিলোগের মাধ্যমে। রেস্টুরেন্ট ডোমেইন থেকে একটি প্রতিনিধি ডায়ালগ ব্যবহার করে আমরা সিম্ডায়াল ডাটাসেটে ডিলোগ প্রশিক্ষণ দেই এবং ডোমেইন পরীক্ষার সঠিক পরী আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রশিক্ষিত DILOG শূন্য-গুলি পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে অন্যান্য ডোমেইনের কাছে ৯+ সঠিকভাবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে, যা আমরা আমাদের গবেষণা মাল্টিউজ ডাটাসেটের কাছে আরো বাড়িয়ে দিচ্ছি যা ৯০+ তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে এবং সফল মেট্রিক। আমরা একই সাথে দেখছি যে এই মেট্রিকেরা মিথ্যা পটিভিস্টের মাধ্যমে ডিলোজের কিছু কমানোর কিছু গ্রহণ করে না, যার ফলে আমাদের একাধিক ক কার্যক্রম F1 স আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে DILOG রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের চেয়ে ১০০x বেশী তথ্যের কার্যকর। মাল্টিউজের মাধ্যমে একই ধরনের প্রদর্শনীর মাধ আমরা ডিলোগের শক্তি এবং দুর্বলতা নিয়ে আলোচনার সাথে শেষ করি।', 'ca': "Motivada per les necessitats d'aprenentatge de polítiques de diàleg limitada amb recursos, introduim polítiques de diàleg a través de lògica inductiva diferenciable (DILOG). Explorem les tasques d'aprenentatge en un cop i transfer ència de dominis en zero amb DILOG a SimDial i MultiWoZ. Utilitzant un únic diàleg representatiu del domini del restaurant, entrenem DILOG en el conjunt de dades SimDial i obtenim la precisió del 99+% de la prova en domini. També demostram que les transferències entrenades DILOG de fotografies zero a tots els altres dominys amb una precisió del 99+%, demostrant l'adequació de DILOG a diàlegs de llençament de slots. També estem el nostre estudi fins al conjunt de dades MultiWoZ aconseguint un 90+% d'indicació i èxit. També observem que aquestes mètriques no estan capturant algunes de les deficiències del DILOG en termes de falss positius, provocant-nos a mesurar una puntuació auxiliar de l'acció F1. Mostrem que el DILOG és 100x més eficient en dades que els enfocaments neuronals més avançats en MultiWoZ aconseguint mètriques de rendiment similars. We conclude with a discussion on the strengths and weaknesses of DILOG.", 'jv': 'Ngatur ngilangno sistem sing dibutuhke buturan kanggo sampek dialog We find the tasks of one-shot Learning and 0-shot domain transfer with DELOG on Simdial and MultiWoZ. Using a single represent dialog from the restrestoran domain, we vlan DELOG on the Simdial dataset and Get 9+% in-domain test exact. Awak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan diLOG 0-nggawe barang gak bener Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih nggawe arêng-luwih kanggo Kemerdekaan MultiWoZ dataset kuwi nggawe Ning +% Keamanan ngono pengguna-pengguna kuwi nggawe barang pengguna. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno karo mbeteré iki ora nggawe barang nggawe barang diLOG dolanan sing beraksi sing dirangkat liyane, ngjutayakno awak dhéwé ngerasakno aksi F1 We mungkin ngerti, DELOG iku, akeh barêng-barêng langkung saé diolah meta-barêng langkung urip kuwi MultiWoZ seneng pisan akeh operasi nggawe meta-barêng. Awak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan-perusahaan kanggo nggawé luwih karo perusahaan kanggo diLOG', 'he': 'מוטיבציה על ידי הצורכים של לימוד מדיניות דיאלוג מוגבלת משאבים, אנו מכירים מדיניות דיאלוג באמצעות הגיון דפירסיבי (DILOG). אנו חוקרים את המשימות של לימוד חד-ירי ועברת שטח אפס-ירי עם DILOG על SimDial ומולטיווז. באמצעות דיאלוג מייצג אחד מהתחום המסעדה, אנו מאמן DILOG על קבוצת נתונים SimDial ולהשיג 99+% בדיקת בדיקת בתחום. We also show that the trained DILOG zero-shot transfers to all other domains with 99+% accuracy, proving the suitability of DILOG to slot-filling dialogs.  אנחנו ממשיכים למחקר שלנו למערכת נתונים MultiWoZ להשיג 90+% מידע ומטריות הצלחה. אנחנו גם רואים שהמטריות האלה לא משיגות חלק מהחסרות של DILOG במונחים חיוביים שווא, גורמים לנו למדוד נקודת פעולה עזרית F1. אנחנו מראים כי DILOG הוא 100x יותר מידע יעיל מאשר גישות עצביות מצוינות ביותר על MultiWoz בזמן להשיג מטריות ביצועים דומות. אנחנו מסתיימים עם דיון על החזקים וחלשות של DILOG.', 'ha': "Aka motsa da amfani da ana ƙayyade lõkaci na zauren akwatin bayanin akwatin bayani da aka tsare shi, za'a ƙãga shirin zauren akwatin bayanin akwatin bayani na daban-daban da ba'a fasahan da aka shigar (DALEG). Yana karatun aikin da aka sanar da shi guda da aka saka komai da wanda aka sifa-shekara da dilloG kan SimDial da multi-WoZ. Yi amfani da wani mai nuna zauren akwatin bayani guda daga shekaran restaurant, muna ƙidãya wa DA'a kan danne na SimDial kuma munã sami tsarin jarrabãwa na guda 99+% Tuna nuna cewa wanda aka sanar da DALEG sifire-shekara zuwa duk jama'a guda da 99+% na taƙaitacce, yana kasa da inganci ga dilloG da za'a cika zauren akwatin bayani. Mu ƙara kasi karatunmu zuwa ma'anar mulWoZ da ke sami zane 90+% da ma'anar lãbãri da mafaniki. Tuna ganin cewa waɗannan metrics bã su kãma wani abu daga kashfiyar DALEG cikin mazaɓa na ƙarya, kuma yana yiwuwa da mu cika wani nau'in Action F1. Tuna nũna cewa, DING yana da 100 x mafiya amfani ga ma'anar-halin-na-kungiyar neural zuwa multi-WoZ a lokacin da za'a sami metric mai kama da shi. Munã ƙarfafa da magana a kan ƙarfin da rauni na DALEG.", 'sk': 'Motivirani s potrebami učenja politike dialoga z omejenimi viri, uvajamo politiko dialoga preko diferencibilne induktivne logike (DILOG). Z DILOG na SimDialu in MultiWoZ raziskujemo naloge učenja z enim poskusom in prenosom domene brez poskusa. Z enim reprezentativnim dialogom iz domene restavracije usposabljamo DILOG na naboru podatkov SimDial in pridobimo 99+% natančnost testiranja. Pokazali smo tudi, da se usposobljeni DILOG ničelni strel prenaša na vse druge domene z 99+% natančnostjo, kar dokazuje primernost DILOG za pogovorna okna za polnjenje rež. Našo študijo nadalje razširimo na nabor podatkov MultiWoZ, ki dosega več kot 90% meritev informiranja in uspeha. Prav tako opažamo, da te meritve ne zajemajo nekaterih pomanjkljivosti DILOG v smislu lažnih pozitivnih rezultatov, kar nas spodbuja k merjenju pomožnega rezultata Action F1. Pokazali smo, da je DILOG 100-krat učinkovitejši od najsodobnejših nevronskih pristopov na MultiWoZ, hkrati pa dosega podobne meritve zmogljivosti. Zaključimo z razpravo o prednostih in slabostih podjetja DILOG.', 'bo': 'Motivated by the needs of the resources constrained dialog policy learning, we introduce dialog policy via differentiable inductive logic (DILOG). We explore the tasks of one-shot learning and zero-shot domain transfer with DILOG on SimDial and MultiWoZ. Using a single representative dialog from the restaurant domain, we train DILOG on the SimDial dataset and obtain 99+% in-domain test accuracy. We also show that the trained DILOG zero-shot transfers to all other domains with 99+% accuracy, proving the suitability of DILOG to slot-filling dialogs. We further extend our study to the MultiWoZ dataset achieving 90+% inform and success metrics. We also observe that these metrics are not capturing some of the shortcomings of DILOG in terms of false positives, prompting us to measure an auxiliary Action F1 score. We show that DILOG is 100x more data efficient than state-of-the-art neural approaches on MultiWoZ while achieving similar performance metrics. ང་ཚོས་DILOG ཡི་ནུས་པ་དང་ཞན་ཆ།'}
{'en': 'German’s Next Language Model', 'ar': 'نموذج اللغة الألمانية التالية', 'fr': "Le prochain modèle linguistique de l'allemand", 'es': 'El próximo modelo lingüístico del alemán', 'pt': 'O próximo modelo de idioma do alemão', 'ja': 'ドイツの次の言語モデル', 'zh': '德语下一语模样', 'hi': 'जर्मन की अगली भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'Следующая языковая модель немецкого языка', 'ga': 'Múnla Chéad Teanga eile na Gearmáinise', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A német következő nyelvi modell', 'el': 'Το μοντέλο επόμενης γλώσσας στα γερμανικά', 'it': 'Il modello linguistico successivo del tedesco', 'kk': 'Неміс келесі тіл үлгісі', 'lt': 'Vokietijos kitas kalbos modelis', 'mk': 'Германски следен јазички модел', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Seterusnya Jerman', 'ml': 'ജര്\u200dമ്മനിന്റെ അടുത്ത ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudell tal-lingwa li jmiss tal-Ġermaniż', 'mn': 'Германы дараагийн хэл загвар', 'no': 'Tysk neste språk- modell', 'pl': 'Następny model języka niemieckiego', 'ro': 'Modelul limbii germane următor', 'sr': 'Njemaèki sledeæi jezik model', 'si': 'ජර්මන්ගේ ඊළඟ භාෂා මොඩල්', 'sv': 'Tyskans nästa språkmodell', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha afka dambe ee Jarmalka', 'ur': 'جرمن کی آگے زبان مدل', 'ta': 'ஜெர்மனின் அடுத்த மொழி மாதிரி', 'uz': 'Olmoncha Keyingi Til Modeli', 'vi': 'Bản ngôn ngữ tiếp theo của Đức', 'bg': 'Следващият езиков модел на немски език', 'da': 'Tysks næste sprogmodel', 'nl': 'Het volgende taalmodel van het Duits', 'hr': 'Njemački sljedeći jezički model', 'de': "Deutsch's Next Language Model", 'id': 'Model Bahasa Berikutnya Jerman', 'ko': '독일어의 다음 언어 모드', 'sw': 'Utawala wa lugha inayofuata Ujerumani', 'fa': 'مدل زبان بعدی آلمانی', 'af': 'Duitse se Volgende Taal Model', 'tr': 'Almança', 'sq': 'Modeli tjetër i gjuhës gjermane', 'am': 'የጀርመን ቋንቋ ሞዴል', 'az': 'Almanca N칬vb톛ti Dil Modeli', 'hy': 'Գերմանիայի հաջորդ լեզվի մոդելը', 'ca': "El model de llenguatge següent d'alemanya", 'bn': "German's Next Language Model", 'bs': 'Njemački sljedeći jezik model', 'cs': 'Německý model dalšího jazyka', 'et': 'Saksa järgmise keele mudel', 'fi': 'Saksan seuraava kielimalli', 'he': 'מודל השפה הבאה לגרמנית', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Nemški naslednji jezikovni model', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གི་རྗེས་མའི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས'}
{'en': 'In this work we present the experiments which lead to the creation of our BERT and ELECTRA based German language models, GBERT and GELECTRA. By varying the input training data, model size, and the presence of Whole Word Masking (WWM) we were able to attain SoTA performance across a set of document classification and named entity recognition (NER) tasks for both models of base and large size. We adopt an evaluation driven approach in training these models and our results indicate that both adding more data and utilizing WWM improve model performance. By benchmarking against existing German models, we show that these models are the best German models to date. All trained models will be made publicly available to the research community.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل نقدم التجارب التي أدت إلى إنشاء نماذج اللغة الألمانية المعتمدة على BERT و ELECTRA ، GBERT و GELECTRA. من خلال تغيير بيانات تدريب الإدخال ، وحجم النموذج ، ووجود إخفاء الكلمة بالكامل (WWM) ، تمكنا من تحقيق أداء SoTA عبر مجموعة من تصنيف المستندات ومهام التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) لكلا الطرازين الأساسي والحجم الكبير. نعتمد نهجًا مدفوعًا بالتقييم في تدريب هذه النماذج وتشير نتائجنا إلى أن إضافة المزيد من البيانات واستخدام WWM يحسن أداء النموذج. من خلال المقارنة مع النماذج الألمانية الحالية ، نظهر أن هذه النماذج هي أفضل النماذج الألمانية حتى الآن. سيتم توفير جميع النماذج المدربة للجمهور لمجتمع البحث.', 'es': 'En este trabajo presentamos los experimentos que llevaron a la creación de nuestros modelos lingüísticos alemanes basados en BERT y ELECTRA, GBERT y GELECTRA. Al variar los datos de entrenamiento de entrada, el tamaño del modelo y la presencia de Whole Word Masking (WWM), pudimos lograr el rendimiento de SoTA en un conjunto de tareas de clasificación de documentos y reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) tanto para modelos de base como de gran tamaño. Adoptamos un enfoque basado en la evaluación al entrenar estos modelos y nuestros resultados indican que añadir más datos y utilizar WWM mejoran el rendimiento del modelo. Al comparar con los modelos alemanes existentes, demostramos que estos modelos son los mejores modelos alemanes hasta la fecha. Todos los modelos entrenados se pondrán a disposición del público para la comunidad investigadora.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho apresentamos os experimentos que levaram à criação de nossos modelos de língua alemã baseados em BERT e ELECTRA, GBERT e GELECTRA. Variando os dados de treinamento de entrada, o tamanho do modelo e a presença de Whole Word Masking (WWM), conseguimos obter desempenho SoTA em um conjunto de tarefas de classificação de documentos e reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) para modelos de tamanho básico e grande. Adotamos uma abordagem orientada por avaliação no treinamento desses modelos e nossos resultados indicam que adicionar mais dados e utilizar o WWM melhoram o desempenho do modelo. Ao comparar com os modelos alemães existentes, mostramos que esses modelos são os melhores modelos alemães até hoje. Todos os modelos treinados serão disponibilizados publicamente para a comunidade de pesquisa.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous présentons les expériences qui ont conduit à la création de nos modèles de langue allemande basés sur BERT et ELECTRA, GBERT et GELECTRA. En variant les données d'entraînement d'entrée, la taille du modèle et la présence du masquage de mots entiers (WWM), nous avons pu atteindre des performances SOTA pour un ensemble de tâches de classification de documents et de reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) pour les modèles de base et de grande taille. Nous adoptons une approche axée sur l'évaluation dans la formation de ces modèles et nos résultats indiquent que l'ajout de données supplémentaires et l'utilisation de WWM améliorent les performances des modèles. En comparant les modèles allemands existants, nous montrons que ces modèles sont les meilleurs modèles allemands à ce jour. Tous les modèles formés seront mis à la disposition de la communauté des chercheurs.", 'ja': 'この研究では、BERTとELECTRAベースのドイツ語モデルGBERTとGELECTRAの作成につながる実験を紹介します。入力トレーニングデータ、モデルサイズ、および全単語マスキング（ WWM ）の存在を変化させることにより、ベースと大サイズの両方のモデルの一連の文書分類と名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）タスクでSoTAパフォーマンスを達成することができました。これらのモデルのトレーニングでは、評価主導のアプローチを採用しており、結果は、より多くのデータを追加し、WWMを活用することでモデルのパフォーマンスが向上することを示しています。既存のドイツモデルと比較してベンチマークすることで、これらのモデルが現在までの最高のドイツモデルであることを示しています。すべての訓練されたモデルは、研究コミュニティに公開されます。', 'zh': '于是开创基于BERTELECTRA之德语,GBERTGELECTRA之实验。 变输练数、模大小及全字掩码 (WWM) 之存者,吾能于一朋文档分类名实 (NER) 成 SoTA 性,用于大体。 吾于训练之时,用评估驱动之法,吾之的结果表明,益多数用WWM皆可以益其性。 与今德国车型准试,车型是迄今为止上德国车型。 凡经教模,皆将宣示究界。', 'hi': 'इस काम में हम उन प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो हमारे BERT और ELECTRA आधारित जर्मन भाषा मॉडल, GBERT और GELECTRA के निर्माण की ओर ले जाते हैं। इनपुट प्रशिक्षण डेटा, मॉडल आकार, और पूरे वर्ड मास्किंग (WWM) की उपस्थिति को अलग-अलग करके हम आधार और बड़े आकार के दोनों मॉडलों के लिए दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण और नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) कार्यों के एक सेट में SoTA प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में सक्षम थे। हम इन मॉडलों को प्रशिक्षित करने में एक मूल्यांकन संचालित दृष्टिकोण अपनाते हैं और हमारे परिणाम इंगित करते हैं कि दोनों अधिक डेटा जोड़ते हैं और डब्ल्यूडब्ल्यूएम का उपयोग मॉडल प्रदर्शन में सुधार करते हैं। मौजूदा जर्मन मॉडल के खिलाफ बेंचमार्किंग करके, हम दिखाते हैं कि ये मॉडल आज तक के सबसे अच्छे जर्मन मॉडल हैं। सभी प्रशिक्षित मॉडल अनुसंधान समुदाय के लिए सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराए जाएंगे।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы представляем эксперименты, которые привели к созданию наших моделей немецкого языка на основе BERT и ELECTRA, GBERT и GELECTRA. Изменяя исходные данные обучения, размер модели и наличие целой маскировки слов (WWM), мы смогли достичь производительности SoTA по набору задач классификации документов и распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) для моделей как базового, так и большого размера. Мы применяем подход, основанный на оценке, при обучении этих моделей, и наши результаты показывают, что как добавление большего количества данных, так и использование WWM улучшают эффективность модели. Сравнивая с существующими немецкими моделями, мы показываем, что эти модели являются лучшими немецкими моделями на сегодняшний день. Все подготовленные модели будут преданы гласности для исследовательского сообщества.', 'ga': 'Sa saothar seo cuirimid i láthair na turgnaimh a chruthaigh ár múnlaí Gearmáinise bunaithe ar BERT agus ELECTRA, GBERT agus GELECTRA. Trí na sonraí oiliúna ionchuir, méid na samhla, agus láithreacht Mascadh Focal Iomláin (WWM) a athrú, bhíomar in ann feidhmíocht SoTA a bhaint amach thar thacar de thascanna aicmithe doiciméad agus aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe (NER) do mhúnlaí bonn agus mórmhéide araon. Glacaimid cur chuige bunaithe ar mheastóireacht maidir leis na samhlacha seo a oiliúint agus léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht na samhla trí bhreis sonraí a chur leis agus trí úsáid a bhaint as WWM. Trí thagarmharcáil i gcoinne samhlacha Gearmánacha atá ann cheana féin, léirímid gurb iad na samhlacha seo na samhlacha Gearmánacha is fearr go dtí seo. Cuirfear gach múnla oilte ar fáil go poiblí don phobal taighde.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც გვექნება ჩვენი BERT და ELECTRA ბაზეულ გერმანული ენის მოდელების შექმნა, GBERT და GELECTRA. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია SoTA კლასიფიკაციის და სახელ სიტყვების მონაცემების მონაცემები, მოდელური ზომა და სახელ სიტყვების მაქსინტის მისაღების შესაძლებლობად გავაკეთებთ საკუთარი დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციაციის და სახელ ინ ჩვენ მივიღეთ მოდელების განაკეთებაში გავამუშავებთ გავამუშავებთ, რომელიც ჩვენი მოდელების განაკეთებაში და გავამუშავებთ, რომ უფრო მეტი მონაცემები დამატება და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ, რომ ეს მოდელები უკეთესი გერმანური მოდელები. გჟთფკთ რპვნთპანთ მჲევლთ \x8dვ ბთეარ ეჲჟრარყფნთ ჱა ოჲჟლვენარა პაჱსფთრვლნა კჲმსნთუა.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε τα πειράματα που οδήγησαν στη δημιουργία των μοντέλων γερμανικής γλώσσας που βασίζονται σε BERT και ELECTRA. Διαφορώντας τα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης εισόδου, το μέγεθος του μοντέλου και την παρουσία της μάσκας ολόκληρης λέξης (καταφέραμε να επιτύχουμε απόδοση σε ένα σύνολο εργασιών ταξινόμησης εγγράφων και αναγνώρισης ονομασίας οντότητας (τόσο για μοντέλα βάσης όσο και για μεγάλα μεγέθη. Υιοθετούμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη στην αξιολόγηση στην εκπαίδευση αυτών των μοντέλων και τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι τόσο η προσθήκη περισσότερων δεδομένων όσο και η χρήση βελτιώνουν την απόδοση του μοντέλου. Με συγκριτική αξιολόγηση με υπάρχοντα γερμανικά μοντέλα, αποδεικνύουμε ότι αυτά τα μοντέλα είναι τα καλύτερα γερμανικά μοντέλα μέχρι σήμερα. Όλα τα εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα θα δημοσιοποιηθούν στην ερευνητική κοινότητα.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk azokat a kísérleteket, amelyek a BERT és ELECTRA alapú német nyelvi modelleink, a GBERT és a GELECTRA kialakításához vezettek. A bemeneti képzési adatok, a modellméret és a teljes szó maszkolás (WWM) jelenlétének változtatásával sikerült elérnünk a SotA teljesítményt a dokumentumok osztályozásával és a nevezett entitás felismerésével (NER) mind az alap, mind a nagy méretű modellek esetében. Ezeknek a modelleknek a képzése során értékelésre irányuló megközelítést alkalmazunk, és eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy mind a több adat hozzáadása, mind a WWM használata javítja a modell teljesítményét. A meglévő német modellek összehasonlításával megmutatjuk, hogy ezek a modellek a legjobb német modellek. Az összes képzett modellt nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé teszik a kutatóközösség számára.', 'it': "In questo lavoro presentiamo gli esperimenti che hanno portato alla creazione dei nostri modelli di lingua tedesca basati su BERT ed ELECTRA, GBERT e GELECTRA. Variando i dati di formazione in input, le dimensioni del modello e la presenza di Whole Word Masking (WWM) siamo stati in grado di ottenere prestazioni SotA attraverso un insieme di attività di classificazione dei documenti e riconoscimento delle entità denominate (NER) per entrambi i modelli di base e di grandi dimensioni. Adottiamo un approccio basato sulla valutazione nella formazione di questi modelli e i nostri risultati indicano che sia l'aggiunta di più dati che l'utilizzo di WWM migliorano le prestazioni del modello. Confrontando i modelli tedeschi esistenti, dimostriamo che questi modelli sono i migliori modelli tedeschi finora. Tutti i modelli formati saranno resi pubblici alla comunità di ricerca.", 'lt': 'Šiame darbe pristatome eksperimentus, kurie paskatino kurti BERT ir ELECTRA grindžiamus vokiečių kalbų modelius, GBERT ir GELECTRA. Skiriant įvesties mokymo duomenis, modelio dydį ir viso žodžio maskavimo (WWM) buvimą, sugebėjome pasiekti SoTA veiklos rezultatus įvairiuose dokumentų klasifikavimo ir vardinio subjekto pripažinimo (NER) uždaviniuose tiek bazinio, tiek didelio dydžio modeliuose. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad ir papildomi duomenys, ir WWM naudojimas gerina modelio veiksmingumą. Palygindami esamus Vokietijos modelius, rodome, kad šie modeliai iki šiol yra geriausi Vokietijos modeliai. Visi parengti modeliai bus viešai prieinami mokslinių tyrimų bendruomenei.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെയും എലെക്ട്രാ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d, ജിബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200dറെയും ജെലിക്ട്രായ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണവാക്ക് മാസ്കിംഗിന്റെ (WWM) നിലവിലുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d, മാതൃകയുടെ വലിപ് ഈ മോഡലുകളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിലാസപ്രകാരം നടത്തുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുകയും വിവി നിലവിലുള്ള ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി ബെന്\u200dമെങ്കിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ജെര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d മോഡല പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ മോഡലുകളും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പരിശോധന സമൂഹത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രസ്താവി', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа ги претставуваме експериментите кои водат до создавање на нашите германски јазички модели на БЕРТ и ЕЛЕКТРА, ГБЕРТ и ГЕЛЕКТРА. Со разлика на податоците за влезот на обуката, големината на моделот и присуството на целосно маскирање на зборови (WWM) успеавме да ја постигнеме резултатот на SoTA преку сет на класификација на документи и задачи за препознавање на ентитетите (NER) за моделите на база и голема големина. Ние го усвоивме пристапот на проценка во обуката на овие модели и нашите резултати покажуваат дека додавањето повеќе податоци и искористувањето на WWM ја подобруваат резултатот на моделот. Со споредба со постојните германски модели, покажуваме дека овие модели се најдобрите германски модели досега. Сите обучени модели ќе бидат јавно достапни за истражувачката заедница.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз BERT және ELECTRA негіздеген неміс тіл үлгілерін, GBERT және GELECTRA құруға көмектесетін тәжірибелерді таңдаймыз. Кіріс оқыту деректерін, үлгі өлшемін және толық сөз қалқалауын (WWM) түрлендіру арқылы біз SoTA жылдамдығын құжаттардың классификациясын және аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) тапсырмаларын негізгі мен үлкен өлшемінің үлгіле Біз бұл үлгілерді оқыту үшін бағалау арқылы қолданып, нәтижелеріміздің көбірек деректерді қосу және WWM үлгілерін жасау арқылы қолданатынын көрсетеді. Бар неміс үлгілеріне қарсы белгілеу арқылы, бұл үлгілер қазіргі неміс үлгілерінің ең жақсы үлгілері деп көрсетеді. Барлық оқыту үлгілері зерттеу коммуникасына көпшілік қолданылады.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажил дээр бид BERT болон ELECTRA-ын Германы хэл загвар, GBERT болон GELECTRA үүсгэх туршилтуудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Ингээд сургалтын дасгал өгөгдлийн, загварын хэмжээг өөрчлөхөд бид SoTA-ын үйл ажиллагааг баримтуудын хэлбэрээр, суурь болон том хэмжээний загваруудын нэг хэмжээнд нэрлэгдсэн entity recognition (NER) ажиллагааг олж чадсан. Бид эдгээр загваруудыг суралцахын тулд шалгалтын удирдлагатай арга замыг ашиглаж, үр дүнг нь илүү өгөгдлийг нэмж, WWM-ийн загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг ашиглах боломжтой байна. Харин одоогийн Германы загваруудын эсрэг банкварчлал хийж байгаагаар бид эдгээр загварууд нь өнөөдрийн хамгийн сайн Германы загваруудыг харуулж байна. Бүх сургалтын загварууд судалгааны нийгмийн хувьд олон нийтэд хангалттай болно.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini kami memperkenalkan eksperimen yang membawa kepada penciptaan model bahasa Jerman berdasarkan BERT dan ELECTRA, GBERT dan GELECTRA. Dengan mengubah data latihan input, saiz model, dan kehadiran Penutup Seluruh Kata (WWM) kami mampu mencapai prestasi SoTA melalui set kelasukan dokumen dan tugas pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) untuk kedua-dua model asas dan saiz besar. Kami mengadopsi pendekatan dipandu penilaian dalam latihan model ini dan hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua menambah lebih data dan menggunakan WWM meningkatkan prestasi model. Dengan benchmarking terhadap model Jerman yang ada, kami menunjukkan bahawa model ini adalah model Jerman yang terbaik sehari-hari. Semua model yang dilatih akan diberikan kepada masyarakat penyelidikan.', 'no': 'I dette arbeidet viser vi eksperimentene som fører til å opprette våre BERT og ELECTRA-baserte tysk språk-modeller, GBERT og GELECTRA. Ved å variera inntrekkingsdata, modellstorleik og tilgjengeligheten av heile ordmaskering (WWM), vart vi i stand til å få SoTA-utviklinga over eit sett av dokumentklassifikasjonar og oppgåver med namn på entitetskjenning (NER) for både modeller av basen og storstorleik. Vi adopterer ein evalueringstilnærming i utdanning av desse modelane, og resultatene våre viser at både legg til fleire data og bruk av WWM forbetra modellen. Ved benchmarking mot eksisterande tyske modeller viser vi at desse modelane er dei beste tyske modelane til dag. Alle trengte modeller blir tilgjengeleg for forskningssamfunnet offentlig.', 'mt': 'F’din il-ħidma nippreżentaw l-esperimenti li jwasslu għall-ħolqien tal-mudelli tal-lingwa Ġermaniża bbażati fuq il-BERT u l-ELECTRA tagħna, il-GBERT u l-GELECTRA. By varying the input training data, model size, and the presence of Whole Word Masking (WWM) we were able to attain SoTA performance across a set of document classification and named entity recognition (NER) tasks for both models of base and large size.  We adopt an evaluation driven approach in training these models and our results indicate that both adding more data and utilizing WWM improve model performance.  Permezz ta’ benchmarking kontra mudelli Ġermaniżi eżistenti, nuru li dawn il-mudelli huma l-aħjar mudelli Ġermaniżi s’issa. Il-mudelli kollha mħarrġa se jkunu disponibbli għall-pubbliku għall-komunità tar-riċerka.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy eksperymenty, które doprowadziły do stworzenia naszych modeli języka niemieckiego opartych na BERT i ELECTRA, GBERT i GELECTRA. Poprzez zmianę wejściowych danych treningowych, wielkości modelu oraz obecności maskowania całego słowa (WWM) udało nam się osiągnąć wydajność SoTA w zestawie zadań klasyfikacji dokumentów i rozpoznawania nazw (NER) zarówno dla modeli bazowych, jak i dużych rozmiarów. Przyjmujemy podejście oparte na ocenie w szkoleniu tych modeli, a nasze wyniki wskazują, że zarówno dodawanie większej ilości danych, jak i wykorzystanie WWM poprawia wydajność modelu. Poprzez porównanie z istniejącymi niemieckimi modelami pokazujemy, że te modele są najlepszymi niemieckimi modelami do tej pory. Wszystkie przeszkolone modele będą udostępniane publicznie środowisku badawczemu.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo eksperimente koji vode do stvaranja našeg BERT i ELECTRA-bazenog nemačkog jezika modela, GBERT i GELECTRA. Razmišljajući o podacima obuke, veličini model a i prisustvu celog maskiranja riječi (WWM), mogli smo da postignemo SoTA izvršnost preko seta klasifikacije dokumenta i priznanja entiteta (NER) zadataka za oba modela baze i velike veličine. Usvojimo vodeni pristup procjene u obuci ovih modela i naši rezultati ukazuju na to da dodamo i više podataka i iskorištavamo WWM-u poboljšavanje modela. Skrenjavajući se protiv postojećih nemačkih modela, pokazujemo da su ovi modeli najbolji nemački modeli do sada. Svi obučeni modeli biće javno dostupni istraživačkoj zajednici.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm experimentele care au condus la crearea modelelor noastre de limbă germană bazate pe BERT și ELECTRA, GBERT și GELECTRA. Prin variarea datelor de instruire de intrare, a dimensiunii modelului și a prezenței Mascării întregului cuvânt (WWM) am reușit să obținem performanța SotA într-un set de activități de clasificare a documentelor și recunoaștere a entităților denumite (NER) atât pentru modele de bază, cât și pentru dimensiuni mari. Adoptăm o abordare bazată pe evaluare în instruirea acestor modele, iar rezultatele noastre indică faptul că atât adăugarea mai multor date, cât și utilizarea WWM îmbunătățesc performanța modelului. Prin compararea modelelor germane existente, demonstrăm că aceste modele sunt cele mai bune modele germane de până în prezent. Toate modelele instruite vor fi puse la dispoziția publicului comunității de cercetare.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා අපේ BERT සහ ELECTRA අධාරිත ජර්මාන් භාෂා මොඩේල්, GBERT සහ GELECTRA නිර්මාණය කරනවා. ඇතුළත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත්ත, මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරමාණය, සහ හුළු වචන මාස්කින්ග (WWM) තියෙන්නේ අපිට SoTA ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා නම් කළ අපි මේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ඉතින් ජර්මාන් මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කරලා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල්ස් අදින් හොඳම ජර්මාන් ම හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණ සමාජයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න.', 'so': 'In this work we present the experiments which lead to the creation of our BERT and ELECTRA based German language models, GBERT and GELECTRA.  Si aan u kala duduwanno macluumaadka waxbarashada, tusaale ahaan, iyo joogista qoraalka dhamaanka (WWM) ayaannu awoodnay in SoTA lagu sameyn karo fasax qoraal ah oo loo magacaabay aqoonsashada qofka loo yaqaan (NER) samooyin asal ah iyo mid weyn. Waxaynu qaadannaa qaab lagu qiimeeyo oo lagu tababariyo tusaalahan, resultiyadana waxaynu caddaynayaa in lagu daro macluumaad dheeraad ah iyo isticmaalka sameynta sameynta modellka. Sida aan bangiyo ka gees ahaanshaha modellada Jarmalka, waxaynu muujinnaa in modelladan ay yihiin noocyada ugu wanaagsan Jarmalka ilaa maantadan. Dhammaan samooyin tababar lagu tababaray waxaa lagu heli karaa bulshada waxbarashada.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில் நாம் எங்கள் பெர்ட் மற்றும் ELECTRA அடிப்படையிலான ஜெர்மன் மொழி மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கும் சோதனைகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம்,  உள்ளீட்டு பயிற்சி தரவு, மாதிரி அளவு மற்றும் முழு வார்த்தை மாறுதல் (WWM) இருப்பது மூலம் நாம் சோடா செயல்பாட்டை முழுவதும் அடிப்படை மற்றும் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடிப இந்த மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சியில் செலுத்துவதற்கான ஒரு மதிப்பீடு இயக்கப்பட்ட முறையை நாம் எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் மு இருக்கும் ஜெர்மன் மாதிரிகளுக்கு எதிரான பெங்குத்தல் மூலம், இந்த மாதிரிகள் சிறந்த ஜெர்மன் மாதிரிகள். அனைத்து பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளும் ஆராய்ச்சி சமூகத்திற்கு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கப்படும்.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete presenterar vi de experiment som ledde till skapandet av våra BERT- och ELECTRA-baserade tyska språkmodeller, GBERT och GELECTRA. Genom att variera inmatningsutbildningsdata, modellstorlek och närvaro av Whole Word Masking (WWM) kunde vi uppnå SotA-prestanda genom en uppsättning dokumentklassificering och namngivna entitetsigenkänningsuppgifter (NER) för både modeller av bas och stor storlek. Vi använder ett utvärderingsdrivet tillvägagångssätt i utbildningen av dessa modeller och våra resultat indikerar att både lägga till mer data och använda WWM förbättrar modellens prestanda. Genom att jämföra befintliga tyska modeller visar vi att dessa modeller är de bästa tyska modellerna hittills. Alla utbildade modeller kommer att göras tillgängliga för forskarsamhället.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں جو ہمارے BERT اور ELECTRA بنیاد جرمن زبان مدل، GBERT اور GELECTRA کی پیدائش کی وجہ سے لاتے ہیں. اس کے ذریعہ سے ہم نے سائل ویرڈ ماسکینگ (WWM) کی موجودگی کے لئے سوٹا کی پرورش کو ایک مجموعہ سے پہنچا سکتا تھا کہ ایک مجموعہ کے درمیان سند کلاسیفوں اور نام دار واحد شناسایی (NER) کے کام پہنچا سکتے تھے۔ ہم نے ان نمڈلوں کی تعلیم میں ایک ارزیابی طریقہ کی تصویر کی ہے اور ہمارے نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ان دونوں سے زیادہ ڈیٹا اضافہ کریں اور WWM نمڈلوں کی عمدگی کا استعمال کریں۔ موجود جرمن مدل کے مقابلہ میں بنچم مارک کرنے کے ذریعہ، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مدل اچھے جرمن مدل ہیں۔ تمام تعلیم کی مدلکوں کو تحقیق کمونٹی کے لئے ظاہر طور پر موجود کر دیا جائے گا.', 'uz': "Bu ishda biz BERT va ELECTRA asosida Olmon tilning modellari, GBERT va GELECTRA yaratishga ega tajribalarni ko'rsamiz. Name Biz bu modellarni o'rganish uchun qiymatni bajaramiz va natijalarimizni ko'proq maʼlumotni qoʻshish va WWM modelini ishlatish imkoniyatini bajarish mumkin. By benchmarking against existing German models, we show that these models are the best German models to date.  Hamma taʼminlovchi modellar taʼminlovchi jamiyatlarni ochiq olib tashlanadi.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này chúng tôi giới thiệu các thí nghiệm dẫn đến việc tạo ra các mô hình ngôn ngữ Đức dựa trên BERT và LESTER. Bằng cách thay đổi dữ liệu huấn luyện nhập, kích thước mô hình, và sự hiện diện của cả hai mô hình mang chữ Masking (WWM) chúng tôi đã có thể đạt được thành công trong một tập đoàn phân loại tài liệu và các công việc nhận dạng thực thể tên (NER) cho cả các mô hình căn cứ và kích thước lớn. Chúng tôi sử dụng một phương pháp dựa trên đánh giá để đào tạo các mô hình này và kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy cả việc thêm dữ liệu và sử dụng WWM cải thiện hình thức. Bằng cách so sánh với các mô hình Đức hiện tại, chúng tôi cho thấy những mô hình này là những mẫu Đức tốt nhất. Tất cả các mô hình được huấn luyện sẽ được công bố công khai trước cộng đồng nghiên cứu.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo eksperimente koji vode do stvaranja našeg BERT i ELECTRA-based njemačkih jezičkih modela, GBERT i GELECTRA. Razmišljajući o podacima o obuci, veličini model a i prisustvu cijelog maskiranja riječi (WWM), uspjeli smo postići provedbu SoTA preko skupa klasifikacije dokumenta i priznavanja imena entiteta (NER) zadataka kako modela baze i velike veličine. Usvojimo vodeni pristup procjene u obuci ovih modela i naši rezultati ukazuju na to kako dodanje više podataka i upotrebu WWM-a poboljšavanje učinka modela. Skrenjavajući se protiv postojećih njemačkih modela, pokazujemo da su ovi modeli najbolji njemački modeli do sada. Svi obučeni modeli će biti javno dostupni istraživačkoj zajednici.', 'nl': 'In dit werk presenteren we de experimenten die hebben geleid tot de creatie van onze BERT en ELECTRA gebaseerde Duitse taalmodellen, GBERT en GELECTRA. Door de invoertrainingsgegevens, de modelgrootte en de aanwezigheid van Whole Word Masking (WWM) te variëren, konden we SoTA-prestaties behalen voor een reeks documentclassificatietaken en NER-taken voor zowel basismodellen als grote modellen. We hanteren een evaluatiegedreven aanpak bij het trainen van deze modellen en onze resultaten geven aan dat zowel het toevoegen van meer data als het gebruik van WWM de modelprestaties verbeteren. Door te vergelijken met bestaande Duitse modellen laten we zien dat deze modellen de beste Duitse modellen tot nu toe zijn. Alle getrainde modellen zullen publiekelijk beschikbaar worden gesteld voor de onderzoeksgemeenschap.', 'bg': 'В тази работа представяме експериментите, които доведоха до създаването на нашите базирани немски езикови модели, ГЕРТ и ГЕЛЕКТРА. Променяйки входните данни за обучение, размера на модела и наличието на маскиране на цели думи (WWM), успяхме да постигнем представяне чрез набор от задачи за класификация на документи и разпознаване на наименовани обекти (NER) както за моделите базови, така и за големи размери. Ние възприемаме подход, ориентиран към оценката при обучението на тези модели и нашите резултати показват, че както добавянето на повече данни, така и използването на УСВ подобряват производителността на модела. Чрез сравняване със съществуващите немски модели, ние показваме, че тези модели са най-добрите немски модели до момента. Всички обучени модели ще бъдат публично достъпни за изследователската общност.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde præsenterer vi de eksperimenter, der førte til skabelsen af vores BERT- og ELECTRA-baserede tysksprogmodeller, GBERT og GELECTRA. Ved at variere input træningsdata, modelstørrelse og tilstedeværelsen af Whole Word Masking (WWM) var vi i stand til at opnå SotA ydeevne på tværs af et sæt dokumentklassificering og navngivet entity recognition (NER) opgaver for både modeller af base og stor størrelse. Vi anvender en evalueringsdrevet tilgang i træningen af disse modeller, og vores resultater indikerer, at både tilføjelse af flere data og brug af WWM forbedrer modellens ydeevne. Ved benchmarking i forhold til eksisterende tyske modeller viser vi, at disse modeller er de bedste tyske modeller til dato. Alle uddannede modeller vil blive gjort offentligt tilgængelige for forskningssamfundet.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mempersembahkan eksperimen yang mengarah kepada penciptaan model bahasa Jerman berdasarkan BERT dan ELECTRA kami, GBERT dan GELECTRA. Dengan mengubah data pelatihan input, ukuran model, dan kehadiran Whole Word Masking (WWM) kami mampu mencapai prestasi SoTA melalui set klasifikasi dokumen dan tugas pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) untuk kedua-dua model dasar dan ukuran besar. Kami mengadopsi pendekatan yang didorong oleh evaluasi dalam melatih model ini dan hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa kedua menambah lebih banyak data dan menggunakan WWM meningkatkan prestasi model. Dengan benchmarking melawan model Jerman yang ada, kami menunjukkan bahwa model ini adalah model Jerman terbaik sehari-hari. All trained models will be made publicly available to the research community.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit stellen wir die Experimente vor, die zur Erstellung unserer BERT- und ELECTRA-basierten deutschen Sprachmodelle GBERT und GELECTRA führten. Durch Variation der eingegebenen Trainingsdaten, der Modellgröße und des Vorhandenseins von Whole Word Masking (WWM) konnten wir die SoTA-Leistung über eine Reihe von Dokumentenklassifikations- und Named Entity Recognition (NER)-Aufgaben sowohl für Basismodelle als auch für große Modelle erreichen. Wir verfolgen einen evaluationsorientierten Ansatz beim Training dieser Modelle und unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass sowohl das Hinzufügen von mehr Daten als auch der Einsatz von WWM die Modellleistung verbessern. Durch Benchmarking mit bestehenden deutschen Modellen zeigen wir, dass diese Modelle die bisher besten deutschen Modelle sind. Alle trainierten Modelle werden der Forschungsgemeinschaft öffentlich zugänglich gemacht.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 버트와 일렉트라를 바탕으로 한 독일어 모델인 GBERT와 GELECTRA를 만드는 실험을 소개했다.입력 트레이닝 데이터, 모델 크기 및 전체 단어 마스크(WWM)의 존재를 변경함으로써 우리는 하나의 기본 모델과 대형 모델의 문서 분류와 명명 실체 식별(NER) 작업에서 SoTA 성능을 실현할 수 있다.Dell은 이러한 모델에 대해 평가 구동 방법을 적용하여 훈련하고 있으며, 결과적으로 더 많은 데이터를 추가하고 WWM을 활용하면 모델 성능을 향상시킬 수 있습니다.기존 독일 모델에 대한 기준 테스트를 통해 지금까지 가장 좋은 독일 모델임을 알 수 있다.훈련을 거친 모든 모델은 연구계에 공개될 것이다.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii tunaonyesha majaribio yanayopelekea kutengeneza mifano ya lugha yetu ya BERT na ELECTRA yenye asili ya Ujerumani, GBERT na GELECTRA. Kwa tofauti na takwimu za mafunzo ya kujiandikisha, ukubwa wa mifano, na uwepo wa Mashindano ya SoTA (WWM) tuliweza kufikia utendaji wa SoTA katika mfululizo wa usambazaji wa nyaraka na jina la kutambua vyenye habari (NER) kwa mifano ya msingi na ukubwa mkubwa. Tunachukua mbinu za tathmini zinazoendeshwa katika mafunzo haya mifano na matokeo yetu zinaonyesha kwamba kuongeza takwimu zaidi na kutumia WWM kuboresha utendaji wa mifano. Kwa kutumia bendera dhidi ya mifano ya Ujerumani iliyopo, tunaonyesha kuwa mifano hii ni mifano bora ya Ujerumani mpaka sasa. Mifano yote ya mafunzo yatafanywa hadharani kwa jamii ya utafiti.', 'fa': 'ما در این کار آزمایشات را نشان می دهیم که به آفرینش مدل زبان آلمانی، GBERT و GELECTRA بنیاد BERT و ELECTRA را هدایت می کنند. با تغییر داده های آموزش ورودی، اندازه مدل و حضور کامل ماسک کردن کلمات (WWM) توانستیم به اجرای SoTA در مجموعه کلمات شناسایی سند و کارهای شناسایی entity (NER) برای هر دو مدل پایه و اندازه بزرگ رسیدیم. ما روش ارزیابی را در آموزش این مدلها پذیرفتیم و نتیجه\u200cهایمان نشان می\u200cدهند که هر دو اطلاعات بیشتری را اضافه می\u200cکنیم و استفاده از عملکرد مدل WWM بهتر می\u200cکنیم. با بررسی از مدلهای آلمانی موجود است، نشان می دهیم که این مدلها بهترین مدلهای آلمانی هستند. همه مدل آموزش داده شده به طور عمومی برای جامعه تحقیقات در دسترسی خواهند شد.', 'tr': 'Bu işde BERT we ELECTRA daýanýan Alman dil nusgalarymyzy, GBERT we GELECTRAlarymyzy döretmäge gelen deneyleri çykýarys. Girdi okuwçysy maglumatlary, modeller ululykyny we doly söz maskeriniň (WWM) bolmagyny üýtgedip, biz SoTA sahypatyny bir sened klasifikasyonuň we ady barlamasynyň (NER) hem beýik we uly nusgalaryň üçin ýetip bilerdik. Biz bu nusgalary okuwçylamak üçin çykyş önünde çykyş ýagdaýyny kabul edip görýäris we netijelerimiz hem daty eklemeli bolsa we WWWM nusgalarynyň üstünliklerini ýok etmelidigini belirtýäris. Öň bar nemesçe nusgalaryna garşy çekerek bu nusgalaryň häzirki nemesçe nusgalarynyň iň gowy nusgalaryny görkezýäris. Hemme bilinmeli nusgalar ylmy jemgyýetinde publikat halkara berilecek.', 'sq': 'Në këtë punë ne paraqesim eksperimentet që çojnë në krijimin e modeleve tona gjermane të gjuhës BERT dhe ELECTRA, GBERT dhe GELECTRA. Duke ndryshuar të dhënat e trajnimit të hyrjes, madhësinë e modelit dhe praninë e Maskërimit të Fjalës së Përgjithshme (WWM) ne ishim në gjendje të arrinim performancën e SoTA nëpërmjet një sëre klasifikimi të dokumenteve dhe detyrave të emëruara njohje e njësisë (NER) për të dy modelet e bazës dhe të madhësisë. Ne miratojmë një qasje të drejtuar nga vlerësimi në trajnimin e këtyre modeleve dhe rezultatet tona tregojnë se si shtimi i më shumë të dhënave dhe përdorimi i WWM përmirëson performancën e modelit. Duke përballur modelet gjermanë ekzistuese, ne tregojmë se këto modele janë modelet më të mira gjermanë deri tani. Të gjitha modelet e trajnuara do të bëhen publikisht të disponueshme për komunitetin e kërkimit.', 'af': "In hierdie werk vertoon ons die eksperimente wat lei na die skepping van ons BERT en ELECTRA gebaseerde Duitse taal modele, GBERT en GELECTRA. Deur te verander die inligting onderwerking data, model grootte en die voorsiening van die hele woord maskering (WWM) kon ons Sota-prestasie ontvang deur 'n stel van dokumentklassifikasie en genoem entiteiterkening (NER) opdragte vir beide modele van basis en groot grootte. Ons aanvaar 'n evaluasie gedruk toegang in die onderwerp van hierdie modele en ons resultate aandui dat beide meer data byvoeg en WWM-gebruik van model funksie verbeter word. Deur benchmarking teen bestaande Duitse modelles, wys ons dat hierdie modelles die beste Duitse modelles tot dag is. Alle opgelei modele sal openlik beskikbaar word vir die ondersoek gemeenskap.", 'am': 'በዚህ ሥራ የብሬት እና የኤሌክትራ የጀርመን ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች፣ GBERT እና GELECTRA በመፍጠር የሚያሳየውን ፈተናዎች እናቀርባለን፡፡ የድምፅ ቃላት ማሳየት (WWM) በተለየ የውስጥ ትምህርት ዳታዎች፣ ሞዴል መጠን እና የአሁኑን ቃላት ማሳየት (WWM) መጠቀሚያ እና የሰነድ ክፍል እና አካባቢ ማውቀትን በተለየን (NER) ስራዎችን ለመቀመጫው እና ትልቅ መጠን እና ለመጠቀም አቅራቢያ መጠን እና ለመጠቀም እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች ለማስተማር እና ፍሬዎቻችን አብዛኛዎቹ ዳታዎችን ማጨመር እና WWM ሞዴል አድራጊውን በመጠቀም እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የጀርመን ዓይነቶች ላይ በመጫን፣ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች እስከ ዛሬ የተሻሉ የጀርመን ምሳሌዎች ናቸው ብለን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የተማሩት ሞዴላዎች ሁሉ ለትምህርት ማኅበረሰብ ግልፅ ይደረጋሉ፡፡', 'az': 'Bu işdə BERT və ELECTRA-nın Alman dil modelləri, GBERT və GELECTRA yaratmasına yol göstərən təcrübələri göstəririk. Girdi təhsil məlumatlarını, modellərin böyüklüyünü və bütün söz maskinçisinin (WWM) varlığını dəyişdirərək SoTA performansını bir dəstə belə təhsil klasifikasyonu və adı ilə təhsil tanıması və böyük böyüklüyün modellərinə görə başa çatdıq. Biz bu modelləri təhsil etmək üçün təşkil edilən tərzdə təşkil etdik və sonuçlarımız hər ikisinin daha çox verilən və WWM modellərini daha yaxşılaşdırdığını göstərir. Mevcut Alman modellərinə qarşı benchmarking edərək, bu modellərin günümüzdə ən yaxşı Alman modellərinin olduğunu göstəririk. Bütün təhsil edilmiş modellər araştırma toplumuna açıq-aşkar faydalanacaqlar.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা এই পরীক্ষাগুলো উপস্থাপন করি যা আমাদের বের্ট এবং এলেক্ট্রার ভিত্তিক জার্মান ভাষার মডেল, জিবেরেট এবং জেলেক্ট্রা ইনপুট ট ট্রেনিং ডাটা, মডেল আকার এবং পুরো শব্দ ম্যাসিং এর উপস্থিতি বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিক এবং বড় আকারের উভয় মডেলের জন্য আমরা সোটার কাজ পৌঁছাতে পারিনি। আমরা এই মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য একটি মূল্য চালিয়ে যাওয়া পদ্ধতি নিয়ে যাই এবং ফলাফল নির্দেশ করছি যে উভয়েই আরো তথ্য যোগ করে এবং উইডবিউএম মডেল বিদ্যমান জার্মান মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে বেনমেন্ট করার মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই মডেলগুলো এখন পর্যন্ত সবচেয়ে ভালো জ সব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল গবেষণা সম্প্রদায়ের কাছে প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাবে।', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք փորձարկումները, որոնք հանգեցրել են մեր BER-ի և ELElectra-ի հիմնված գերմանացի լեզվի մոդելների ստեղծմանը, գլիբերտի և գելեկտրայի մոդելների ստեղծմանը: Տարբերելով ներմուծի ուսուցման տվյալները, մոդելի չափերը և Ամբողջ բառի մաշկի գոյությունը, մենք կարողացանք հասնել ՍոԹԱ-ի արտադրողության մի շարք փաստաթղթերի դասակարգման և անվանելի անհատականության ճանաչելու (ՆԵՌ) առաջադրանքների համար, բազմաթիվ և մեծ Մենք ընդունում ենք գնահատման հիմնված մոտեցում այս մոդելների ուսումնասիրության մեջ, և մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ինչպես ավելին տվյալներ ավելացնելը, ինչպես նաև օգտագործելը ՀԱՀ-ն բարելավում է մոդելի արդյունք Համեմատելով գոյություն ունեցող գերմանացի մոդելների հետ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոդելները մինչ հիմա գերմանացի լավագույն մոդելներն են: Բոլոր վարժեցված մոդելները հանրային հասանելիություն կդարձնեն հետազոտական համայնքի համար:', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo eksperimente koji vode do stvaranja našeg BERT-a i ELECTRA-bazenog nemačkog jezika modela, GBERT-a i GELECTRA. Razmišljajući o podacima o obuci, veličini model a i prisustvu cijelog maskiranja riječi (WWM), uspjeli smo da postignemo provedbu SoTA preko seta klasifikacije dokumenta i priznanja entiteta (NER) zadataka za oba modela baze i velike veličine. Prihvaćamo vodeni pristup procjene u obuci ovih modela i naši rezultati ukazuju na to da dodajemo više podataka i iskoristavamo WWM-u poboljšavajući uspješnost modela. Skrenjavajući se protiv postojećih njemačkih modela, pokazujemo da su ovi modeli najbolji njemački modeli do sada. Svi obučeni modeli će biti javno dostupni istraživačkoj zajednici.', 'ca': "En aquesta feina presentem els experiments que van conduir a la creació dels nostres models de llenguatge alemany basats en BERT i ELECTRA, GBERT i GELECTRA. Al canviar les dades d'entrenament d'entrada, la mida del model i la presença de Masking Whole Word (WWM), vam poder aconseguir el desempeny de SoTA a través d'un conjunt de classificacions de documents i tasques de reconeixement d'entitats anomenades (NER) tant per models de base com per grans. Adopem un enfocament basat en l'evaluació en la formació d'aquests models i els nostres resultats indican que tant agregar més dades com utilitzar WWM millora el rendiment del model. Comparant els models alemans existents, demostrem que aquests són els millors models alemans fins ara. All trained models will be made publicly available to the research community.", 'cs': 'V této práci představujeme experimenty, které vedly k vytvoření našich německých jazykových modelů založených na BERT a ELECTRA, GBERT a GELECTRA. Změnou vstupních tréninkových dat, velikosti modelu a přítomnosti maskování celého slova (WWM) jsme byli schopni dosáhnout výkonu SOTA napříč sadou úloh klasifikace dokumentů a rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER) pro modely základní i velké velikosti. Při výcviku těchto modelů přijímáme hodnocení a naše výsledky ukazují, že jak přidávání dalších dat, tak využití WWM zlepšuje výkon modelu. Porovnáním se stávajícími německými modely ukazujeme, že tyto modely jsou dosud nejlepšími německými modely. Všechny školené modely budou veřejně zpřístupněny výzkumné komunitě.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään kokeet, jotka johtivat BERT- ja ELECTRA-pohjaisten saksankielisten mallien, GBERT- ja GELECTRA-mallien luomiseen. Muuttamalla syöttötietoja, mallin kokoa ja WWM:n läsnäoloa pystyimme saavuttamaan SOTA-suorituskyvyn dokumenttieluokitus- ja nimettyjen entiteettitunnistustehtävien (NER) avulla sekä perus- että suurikokoisissa malleissa. Käytämme arviointilähtöistä lähestymistapaa näiden mallien kouluttamisessa ja tulokset osoittavat, että sekä tiedon lisääminen että WWM:n hyödyntäminen parantavat mallin suorituskykyä. Vertailemalla nykyisiä saksalaisia malleja osoitamme, että nämä mallit ovat tähän mennessä parhaita saksalaisia malleja. Kaikki koulutetut mallit asetetaan julkisesti tutkimusyhteisön saataville.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame eksperimente, mis viisid meie BERT- ja ELECTRA-põhiste saksa keele mudelite, GBERT ja GELECTRA loomiseni. Muutes sisendkoolitusandmeid, mudeli suurust ja kogu sõna maskeerimist (WWM) suutsime saavutada SOTA jõudluse nii baas- kui ka suurte mudelite puhul dokumentide klassifitseerimise ja nimega olemi tuvastamise (NER) ülesannete kogumi kaudu. Me kasutame nende mudelite koolitamisel hindamispõhist lähenemisviisi ja tulemused näitavad, et nii andmete lisamine kui ka WWM kasutamine parandavad mudeli jõudlust. Võrreldes olemasolevate Saksa mudelitega näitame, et need mudelid on seni parimad Saksa mudelid. Kõik koolitatud mudelid tehakse teadusringkondadele avalikult kättesaadavaks.', 'he': 'בעבודה הזו אנו מציגים את הניסויים שמובילים ליצירת הדוגמנים של השפה הגרמנית מבוססים על BERT ואלקטרה, GBERT וגלקטרה. על ידי שינוי נתוני האימונים הכניסה, גודל המודל, והנוכחות של מסכת המילים שלמות (WWM) הצלחנו להשיג את ההופעה של SoTA על ידי קבוצה של מסמכים מסווגים ומשימות זיהוי היחידות בשם (NER) שני מודלים של בסיס וגודל גדול. אנו מאמצים גישה מונעת על הערכה באימון הדוגמנים האלה והתוצאות שלנו מצביעות על כך שגם להוסיף יותר נתונים ושימוש WWM משפר את ההופעה של הדוגמנים. על ידי השוואה נגד דוגמנים גרמניים קיימים, אנחנו מראים שהדוגמנים האלה הם הדוגמנים הגרמניים הטובים ביותר עד היום. כל הדוגמנים המוכשרים יהיו פנויים לציבור לקהילת המחקר.', 'sk': 'V tem delu predstavljamo eksperimente, ki so privedli do ustvarjanja naših BERT in ELECTRA osnovanih nemških jezikovnih modelov, GBERT in GELECTRA. S spreminjanjem vhodnih podatkov o usposabljanju, velikosti modela in prisotnosti celotnega maskiranja besed (WWM) smo lahko dosegli SOTA učinkovitost v sklopu opravil klasifikacije dokumentov in prepoznavanja imenovanih entitet (NER) za modele osnovne in velike velikosti. Pri usposabljanju teh modelov uporabljamo ocenjevalno usmerjen pristop in naši rezultati kažejo, da tako dodajanje več podatkov kot uporaba WWM izboljšujeta zmogljivost modela. S primerjavo z obstoječimi nemškimi modeli dokazujemo, da so ti modeli najboljši nemški modeli doslej. Vsi usposobljeni modeli bodo javno dostopni raziskovalni skupnosti.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki kita nggawe perintah sing bisa ngelaké nggawe BERT karo el-electTRA sing basa model kuwi tindan aleman, GBERT karo GELeTTra. Daerah sing dipujol data, model size, lan kenal nesaturan Whole Word Masking Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi perusahaan nggawe model iki dadi, dadi sing ngomong nik nambah data sing beraksi lan ijol-ijolan WWWW kuwi nggawe bisa model sing beraksi. Ngawe bench-bench kuwi model alaman sing ana, kita ngomong model iki dadi model alaman sing apik dadi. Bilih model sing ditambah akeh biasane mebudhakan kanggo kebebasan resmi.', 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin da Muke halatar da jarrabai waɗanda ke ƙara halittar misalin harshen Jamanci, GBERT da GELEctra. Ga mu iya sãɓã wa tsarin tsarin ayuka da aka shigar cikin cikin shirin ayuka, girmar motsi da shirin ayuka Duke (WWM) za'a iya iya iya iya kai cikakken tsarin SoTA a kowace tsarin takardar da aka suna sunan shaidar abun (NER) wa misalin basin da girma. Tuna zãɓi wata hanyaro wanda aka haramta a cikin kõre waɗannan misãlai, kuma matsalatan mu na nuna cewa, suna ƙara wasu data da za'a yi amfani da WWM don ya sami tsarin misãlai. Makarin yin bangon a kanzu masu motsi na Jarman wanda ke da, muna nuna, waɗannan misalin ne mafi kyaun misãlai na Jarman a yanzu. Dukan misãlai wanda aka tsare, za'a samu zuwa jamii za'aɓa.", 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་BERT དང་ ELECTRA་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་, GBERT དང་ GELECTRA གསར་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་ཐུབ By varying the input training data, model size, and the presence of Whole Word Masking (WWM) we were able to attain SoTA performance across a set of document classification and named entity recognition (NER) tasks for both models of base and large size. We adopt an evaluation driven approach in training these models and our results indicate that both adding more data and utilizing WWM improve model performance. འཇིག་རྟེན་འདི་ལྟར་མཁན་དབུས་མཁན་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡོངས་བསྡད་མི་རྣམས་པས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Do n’t Invite BERT to Drink a Bottle : Modeling the Interpretation of Metonymies Using BERT and Distributional Representations', 'ar': 'لا تدعو بيرت لشرب زجاجة: نمذجة تفسير مجازيات باستخدام بيرت والتمثيلات التوزيعية', 'pt': 'Não Convide BERT para Beber uma Garrafa: Modelando a Interpretação de Metonímias Usando BERT e Representações Distribucionais', 'es': 'No invite a BERT a beber una botella: modelar la interpretación de las metonimias utilizando BERT y representaciones distribucionales', 'fr': "N'invitez pas BERT à boire une bouteille\xa0: modélisation de l'interprétation des métonymies à l'aide du BERT et des représentations distributionnelles", 'ja': 'BERTを招待してボトルを飲まない： BERTと流通表現を使用した隠語の解釈のモデル化', 'zh': '勿邀BERT饮一瓶:用BERT布同义词解建模', 'hi': 'एक बोतल पीने के लिए BERT को आमंत्रित न करें: BERT और वितरण प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके Metonymies की व्याख्या मॉडलिंग', 'ru': 'Не приглашайте БЕРТА выпить бутылку: моделирование интерпретации метонимий с использованием представлений БЕРТА и дистрибуции', 'ga': 'Ná Tabhair cuireadh do CRET buidéal a ól: Léirmhíniú Metonymies a Shamhaltú ag Úsáid BERT agus Léirithe Dáilte', 'ka': 'BERT არ მოთხოვნეთ ბოტლის წიოთ: მოდელირება მეტონიმების ინტერპექტირება BERT და განსაზღვრებული გამოყენებების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Μην καλείτε τον BERT να πιει ένα μπουκάλι: μοντελοποίηση της ερμηνείας των μετωνυμιών χρησιμοποιώντας τον BERT και τις διανομικές αναπαραστάσεις', 'it': "Non invitare BERT a bere una bottiglia: modellare l'interpretazione delle metonimie usando BERT e rappresentazioni distributive", 'lt': "Don't Invite BERT to Drink a Bottle: Modeling the Interpretation of Metonymies Using BERT and Distributional Representations", 'mk': 'Не го поканувајте БЕРТ да пие шише: Моделирање на интерпретацијата на метонимиите користејќи БЕРТ и дистрибуционални претставувања', 'hu': 'Ne hívd meg a BERT-et palackra: A metóniák értelmezésének modellezése BERT és elosztási ábrázolások segítségével', 'kk': 'BERT- ті бұлттың ішінде шақыруды шақыру: BERT және үлестірілген таңбалардың интерпретациясын үлгілеу', 'mt': 'Tistiednx lill-BERT biex tixrob Flixkun: Immodellar l-Interpretazzjoni tal-Metonimiji bl-użu tal-BERT u r-Rappreżentanzi Distribuzzjonali', 'mn': 'BERT-г Bottle уухыг уриалдаг битгий: BERT болон хуваарлалтын төлөөлөлт ашиглаж байгаа метонимийн шинжлэх загварыг загварчлах', 'ms': "Don't Invite BERT to Drink a Bottle: Modeling the Interpretation of Metonymies Using BERT and Distributional Representations", 'no': 'Ikkje inviter BERT til å drikke ein bottel: Modelerer interpretasjonen av metoniar som brukar BERT og distribusjonale representasjonar', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെ കുടിക്കാന്\u200d ക്ഷണിക്കരുത്: ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മെറ്റോണിമിയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മോഡ', 'ro': 'Nu invitați BERT să bea o sticlă: modelarea interpretării metonimiilor folosind BERT și reprezentări distribuționale', 'si': 'BERT එක බෝට්ලයක් බොන්න අමතක කරන්න එපා: බෝට්ලයක් බොන්න පුළුවන් BERT සහ විදුලි පිළුවන් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය', 'so': 'Ha u yeedhin BERT in cabo a Bottle: Modeling Interpretation of Metonimies using BERT and Distribution Representations', 'pl': 'Nie zapraszaj BERT do picia butelki: Modelowanie interpretacji metonimii przy użyciu BERT i reprezentacji dystrybucyjnych', 'sr': 'Nemojte pozvati BERT da pijete bocu: Modeliranje interpretacije metonika korištenja BERT i distribucijskih predstavljanja', 'ur': 'BERT کو ایک بوٹل پینے کے لئے دعوت نہ کرو: BERT اور تقسیم نمائندوں کے استعمال کے مطابق مٹونمیز کی تعلیم مدل کرنے', 'sv': 'Bjud inte in BERT att dricka en flaska: Modellera tolkningen av metonymier med hjälp av BERT och distributionsrepresentationer', 'ta': 'பெர்ட் குடிக்க பாட்டினை அழைக்காதே: BERT மற்றும் பங்கீட்டு பிரதிநிதிகளை பயன்படுத்தி மெடோனிமியின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை மா', 'uz': 'Boʻsh qatlam drashga BERT tahrirlanmasin: BERT va Distribution representations yordamida Metonimini tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Không được mời BERT uống chai này: Diễn giả cho giải thích tiếng cười bằng nhạc vang trắng và các đài phát thanh viên giải trí.', 'bg': 'Не канете Берт да пие бутилка: моделиране на интерпретацията на метонимиите с помощта на BERT и дистрибуторски представителства', 'nl': 'Nodig BERT niet uit om een fles te drinken: modelleren van de interpretatie van metonymieën met behulp van BERT en distributievertegenwoordigingen', 'da': 'Inviter ikke BERT til at drikke en flaske: Modellering af fortolkningen af metonymier ved hjælp af BERT og fordelingsrepræsentationer', 'hr': 'Nemojte pozvati BERT da pijete bocu: Modeliranje pretvaranja metonima korištenja BERT i distribucijskih predstavljanja', 'de': 'Laden Sie BERT nicht ein, eine Flasche zu trinken: Modellierung der Interpretation von Metonymien mithilfe von BERT und Distributionsrepr瓣sentationen', 'id': 'Jangan mengundang BERT untuk minum Botol: Modeling Interpretasi Metonymia Menggunakan BERT dan Representasi Distribusional', 'ko': '베르토를 술 마시게 하지 마라: 베르토와 분포 표징을 사용하여 전유에 대한 해석 모형을 만들다', 'fa': 'BERT را دعوت نکنید که یک bottle بخورد: مدل تفسیر متنومیها از استفاده از BERT و نماینده های تقسیم', 'sw': 'Usiiitie BERT kunywa Vifaa: Kujenga Tafsiri ya Wametonia kwa kutumia BERT na Maandamano ya Kugawanya', 'sq': 'Mos e fto BERT për t ë pirë një shishe: Modelimi i interpretimit të metonimive duke përdorur BERT dhe përfaqësimet shpërndarëse', 'tr': "BERT'u şişe içmeye ça ğırma: BERT ve dağıt ım temsillerini kullanarak Metonymies Çözümlerini Model etme", 'af': "Moenie BERT aannoem om 'n bottel te drink nie: Modeleer die Interpretasie van Metonimies gebruik BERT en Verspreidingsvoorstellings", 'am': 'BERT-ን በቦታ ለመጠጣ አትጠራ: BERT እና Distribution Representations', 'bn': 'বেরেট পান করার জন্য আমন্ত্রণ জানানো না: বেরেট এবং বিতরণ প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার করে মেটোনিমির ব্যাখ্যা মডেল করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Մի հրավիրեք ԲԵՌԹ-ին մի շիշ խմելու: Մոդելավորել մեթոնիմիաների մեկնաբանությունը BER-ի և տարածական ներկայացումների միջոցով', 'ca': "No convidi a BERT a beure una botella: Modelar l'interpretació de la metònimia utilitzant BERT i representacions distribucionals", 'az': "BERT'u Bottle içməyə ça ğırma: BERT və Distributional Representations istifadə edərək Metonymies Interpretation Modeling", 'cs': 'Nevyzývejte BERT k pití lahve: Modelování interpretace metonymie pomocí BERT a distribučních reprezentací', 'et': 'Ära kutsu BERTi pudelit jooma: metonüümiate tõlgendamise modelleerimine BERTi ja levitamise esinduste abil', 'fi': 'Älä kutsu BERTin juomaan pulloa: Metonymioiden tulkinnan mallintaminen BERTin ja jakelurepresentaatioiden avulla', 'bs': 'Nemoj pozvati BERT da pije bocu: Modeliranje pretvaranja metonima korištenja BERT i distribucijskih predstavljanja', 'sk': 'BERT-a ne povabite k pitju steklenice: modeliranje interpretacije metonimij z uporabo BERT-a in distribucijskih predstavitev', 'ha': 'Kada ka kirãyi BERT dõmin ka sha wani Bottom: Modelling the Translate of Metonimies by Use BERT and Disloyal Repositions', 'he': "Don't Invite BERT to Drink a Bottle: Modeling the Interpretation of Metonymies Using BERT and Distributional Representations", 'bo': 'BERT སྒོ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འདྲི་དགོས་པ་ལ་གནང་མ་བྱེད་པ། Metonymies་གི་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་པ་ BERT སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྩོམ་སྒྲིག', 'jv': '#OBERT Inga Perintah BERT kanggo Ngombe bottel: Perintah pengguna Ketokenang Metunymys Using BERT and Distribution representations'}
{'en': 'In this work, we carry out two experiments in order to assess the ability of BERT to capture the meaning shift associated with metonymic expressions. We test the model on a new dataset that is representative of the most common types of metonymy. We compare BERT with the Structured Distributional Model (SDM), a model for the representation of words in context which is based on the notion of Generalized Event Knowledge. The results reveal that, while BERT ability to deal with metonymy is quite limited, SDM is good at predicting the meaning of metonymic expressions, providing support for an account of metonymy based on event knowledge.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نجري تجربتين من أجل تقييم قدرة BERT على التقاط تحول المعنى المرتبط بالتعبيرات الكناية. نقوم باختبار النموذج على مجموعة بيانات جديدة تمثل أكثر أنواع الكناية شيوعًا. نحن نقارن BERT مع نموذج التوزيع المهيكل (SDM) ، وهو نموذج لتمثيل الكلمات في السياق الذي يعتمد على مفهوم المعرفة العامة للأحداث. تكشف النتائج أنه في حين أن قدرة BERT على التعامل مع الكناية محدودة للغاية ، فإن SDM جيد في التنبؤ بمعنى التعبيرات الكناية ، مما يوفر الدعم لحساب الكناية بناءً على معرفة الحدث.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, realizamos dois experimentos para avaliar a capacidade do BERT em capturar a mudança de significado associada a expressões metonímicas. Testamos o modelo em um novo conjunto de dados que representa os tipos mais comuns de metonímia. Comparamos o BERT com o Modelo Distribucional Estruturado (SDM), um modelo de representação de palavras em contexto que se baseia na noção de Conhecimento Generalizado de Eventos. Os resultados revelam que, embora a capacidade do BERT para lidar com a metonímia seja bastante limitada, o SDM é bom em prever o significado das expressões metonímicas, fornecendo suporte para uma explicação da metonímia baseada no conhecimento do evento.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous menons deux expériences afin d'évaluer la capacité du BERT à saisir le changement de sens associé aux expressions métonymiques. Nous testons le modèle sur un nouveau jeu de données représentatif des types de métonymie les plus courants. Nous comparons BERT au modèle de distribution structurée (SDM), un modèle de représentation des mots en contexte basé sur la notion de connaissance généralisée des événements. Les résultats révèlent que, bien que la capacité du BERT à traiter la métonymie soit assez limitée, le SDM est efficace pour prédire la signification des expressions métonymiques, fournissant ainsi un support pour un compte rendu de la métonymie basé sur la connaissance des événements.", 'es': 'En este trabajo, llevamos a cabo dos experimentos para evaluar la capacidad de BERT para captar el cambio de significado asociado a las expresiones metonímicas. Probamos el modelo en un nuevo conjunto de datos que es representativo de los tipos más comunes de metonimia. Comparamos BERT con el Modelo Distribucional Estructurado (SDM), un modelo para la representación de palabras en contexto que se basa en la noción de Conocimiento Generalizado de Eventos. Los resultados revelan que, si bien la capacidad del BERT para tratar con la metonimia es bastante limitada, SDM es bueno para predecir el significado de las expresiones metonímicas, proporcionando apoyo para un relato de la metonimia basado en el conocimiento del evento.', 'ja': '本研究では、BERTがメトニミック表現に関連する意味変化を捉える能力を評価するために、2つの実験を実施する。私たちは、最も一般的な種類のメトニミーを表す新しいデータセットでモデルをテストします。BERTを、一般化された事象知識の概念に基づいた文脈における単語の表現のためのモデルである構造化分布モデル（ SDM ）と比較している。その結果、BERTのメトニミー対処能力はかなり限られているが、SDMはメトニミック表現の意味を予測し、イベント知識に基づいたメトニミーの説明をサポートすることが得意であることが明らかになった。', 'zh': '于此二实验,以质BERT获同义词表达式之义。 试同义词新数集上。 以BERT比结构化(SDM),SDM广义之上下文单词也。 结果表明虽BERT处同义词力有限,然SDM善占同义词之义,为事识之同义词解。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम BERT की क्षमता का आकलन करने के लिए दो प्रयोग करते हैं ताकि मेटोनिक अभिव्यक्तियों से जुड़े अर्थ शिफ्ट को कैप्चर किया जा सके। हम एक नए डेटासेट पर मॉडल का परीक्षण करते हैं जो सबसे आम प्रकार के मेटोनीमी का प्रतिनिधि है। हम संरचित वितरण मॉडल (एसडीएम) के साथ BERT की तुलना करते हैं, जो संदर्भ में शब्दों के प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए एक मॉडल है जो सामान्यीकृत घटना ज्ञान की धारणा पर आधारित है। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि, जबकि BERT metonymy से निपटने की क्षमता काफी सीमित है, एसडीएम metonymic अभिव्यक्तियों के अर्थ की भविष्यवाणी करने में अच्छा है, घटना ज्ञान के आधार पर metonymy के खाते के लिए समर्थन प्रदान करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы проводим два эксперимента для того, чтобы оценить способность БЕРТА захватить смену смысла, связанную с метонимическими выражениями. Мы тестируем модель на новом наборе данных, который является репрезентативным для наиболее распространенных типов метонимии. Мы сравниваем BERT со структурированной моделью распределения (SDM), моделью представления слов в контексте, которая основана на понятии обобщенного знания о событиях. Результаты показывают, что, в то время как способность БЕРТА иметь дело с метонимией довольно ограничена, SDM хорошо предсказывает значение метонимических выражений, обеспечивая поддержку для отчета о метонимии на основе знаний о событиях.', 'ga': 'San obair seo, déanaimid dhá thurgnamh chun measúnú a dhéanamh ar chumas BERT an t-athrú brí a bhaineann le habairtí meitiolamacha a ghabháil. Déanaimid tástáil ar an tsamhail ar thacar sonraí nua atá ionadaíoch do na cineálacha meitiolaíochta is coitianta. Déanaimid comparáid idir CRET agus an tSamhail Struchtúrtha Dáilte (SDM), samhail chun focail a léiriú i gcomhthéacs atá bunaithe ar choincheap an Eolais Ghinearálta ar Imeachtaí. Nochtann na torthaí, cé go bhfuil cumas BET chun déileáil le meitíníocht teoranta go leor, go bhfuil SDM go maith ag réamh-mheas a dhéanamh ar bhrí nathanna meitiolamacha, ag tabhairt tacaíochta do chuntas meitiainmneacha atá bunaithe ar eolas imeachtaí.', 'el': 'Στην εργασία αυτή, διεξάγουμε δύο πειράματα προκειμένου να αξιολογηθεί η ικανότητα του να συλλάβει τη μετατόπιση της έννοιας που σχετίζεται με τις μετωνυμικές εκφράσεις. Δοκιμάζουμε το μοντέλο σε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που είναι αντιπροσωπευτικό των πιο κοινών τύπων μετωνυμίας. Συγκρίνουμε το με το Δομημένο Μοντέλο Διανομής (ένα μοντέλο αναπαράστασης λέξεων στο πλαίσιο που βασίζεται στην έννοια της Γενικευμένης Γνώσης Γεγονάτων. Τα αποτελέσματα αποκαλύπτουν ότι, ενώ η ικανότητα του BERT να ασχοληθεί με τη μετωνυμία είναι αρκετά περιορισμένη, η SDM είναι καλή στην πρόβλεψη της έννοιας των μετωνυμικών εκφράσεων, παρέχοντας υποστήριξη για έναν απολογισμό της μετωνυμίας με βάση τη γνώση γεγονότων.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában két kísérletet végzünk annak érdekében, hogy felmérjük a BERT képességét a metonimikus kifejezésekhez kapcsolódó jelentéstelváltás megörökítésére. A modellt egy új adatkészleten teszteljük, amely a metonimia leggyakoribb típusait reprezentálja. A BERT-t összehasonlítjuk a Structured Distributional Model (SDM) modellel, amely a szavak kontextusban történő ábrázolására szolgál, amely az általános eseménytudás fogalmán alapul. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy bár a BERT képessége meglehetősen korlátozott a metonimiával való kezelésre, az SDM jól megjósolja a metonimiás kifejezések jelentését, támogatja az eseményismereteken alapuló metonimiát.', 'it': 'In questo lavoro, eseguiamo due esperimenti per valutare la capacità di BERT di catturare il cambiamento di significato associato alle espressioni metonimiche. Testiamo il modello su un nuovo dataset rappresentativo dei più comuni tipi di metonimia. Confrontiamo BERT con il Modello Distributivo Strutturato (SDM), un modello per la rappresentazione delle parole nel contesto che si basa sulla nozione di Conoscenza degli Eventi Generalizzati. I risultati rivelano che, mentre la capacità di BERT di affrontare la metonimia è piuttosto limitata, SDM è bravo a prevedere il significato delle espressioni metonimiche, fornendo supporto per un resoconto della metonimia basato sulla conoscenza degli eventi.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ორი ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, რომ BERT-ის შესაძლებლობა გადავიწეროთ მნიშვნელობის ცვლილება, რომელიც მეტონიმიკური გამოსახულებებით დაკავშირ ჩვენ მოდელს ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც მეტონიმის უფრო საერთო ტიპის გამოსახულებელია. ჩვენ BERT-ს სტრუქტურაციული დისტრიბუციალური მოდელთან (SDM) შემდგენებთ, რომელიც სიტყვების გამოსაყენება კონტექსტში, რომელიც გენერალურად მოვლენების მეცნიერების შესახებ წარმოდგენები გააჩვენებენ, რომ, როცა BERT შესაძლებლობა მეტონიმის გასაკეთება უფრო დასაკეთებელია, SDM უფრო დიდება მეტონიმიკური გამოსახულებების სანიშვნელობა, რომელიც მეტონიმის შესაძლებლობა მო', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe atliekame du eksperimentus, kad įvertintume BERT gebėjimą sugalvoti reikšmės pokytį, susijusį su metoniminėmis išraiškomis. Bandome model į nauju duomenų rinkiniu, kuris atspindi dažniausias metonimijos rūšis. Palyginame BERT su struktūriniu paskirstymo modeliu (SDM), pavyzdžiu žodžių pateikimui kontekste, kuris grindžiamas bendrųjų įvykių žinių sąvoka. Rezultatai rodo, kad nors BERT gebėjimas spręsti metonimiją yra gana ribotas, SDM gerai prognozuoja metoniminių išraiškų reikšmę ir remia metonimiją, pagrįstą renginių žiniomis.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз берттеу мүмкіндігін метонимикалық өрнектермен қатынау үшін екі тәжірибе істейміз. Біз метонимияның ең жалпы түрлерін таңдайтын жаңа деректер жиынының үлгісін тексереміз. Біз BERT құрылған үлестірім үлгісімен (SDM) салыстырып тұрамыз. Бұл үлгісі жалпы оқиға білім мәліметіне негізделген сөздерді көрсету үлгісі. Нәтижелер, бірақ BERT метонимияны шектеу мүмкіндігін шектелгенде, SDM метонимикалық өрнектердің мазмұнын таңдау үшін жақсы, оқиғалардың біліміне негізделген метониялық тіркелгіні қолдау үшін.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami melakukan dua eksperimen untuk menilai kemampuan BERT untuk menangkap perubahan makna yang berkaitan dengan ungkapan metonymik. Kami menguji model pada set data baru yang mewakili jenis metonymi yang paling umum. Kami membandingkan BERT dengan Model Distribusi Terstruktur (SDM), model untuk mewakili perkataan dalam konteks yang berdasarkan konsep pengetahuan peristiwa Umum. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa, walaupun kemampuan BERT untuk menangani metonymy cukup terbatas, SDM baik dalam meramalkan makna ungkapan metonymic, menyediakan sokongan untuk akaun metonymy berdasarkan pengetahuan peristiwa.', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu żewġ esperimenti sabiex jivvalutaw il-kapaċità tal-BERT li jinqabad il-bidla tat-tifsira assoċjata mal-espressjonijiet metonimiċi. Nittestjaw il-mudell fuq sett ġdid ta’ dejta li huwa rappreżentattiv tat-tipi l-aktar komuni ta’ metonimja. Aħna nqabblu BERT mal-Mudell Distribuzzjonali Strutturat (SDM), mudell għar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-kliem fil-kuntest li huwa bbażat fuq il-kunċett ta’ Għarfien Ġeneralizzat tal-Avvenimenti. Ir-riżultati juru li, filwaqt li l-abbiltà tal-BERT li jittratta l-metonimja hija pjuttost limitata, l-SDM huwa tajjeb fit-tbassir tat-tifsira tal-espressjonijiet metonimiċi, li jipprovdi appoġġ għal kont tal-metonimja bbażat fuq l-għarfien tal-avvenimenti.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа, спроведуваме два експерименти со цел да ја процениме способноста на БЕРТ да ја фати значењето промена поврзана со метонимичките изрази. Го тестираме моделот на нов податок кој е претставник на најобичните видови на метонимија. Ние го споредуваме БЕРТ со Структурираниот дистрибуционален модел (СДМ), модел за претставување на зборови во контекст кој се базира на концептот на генерализирано знаење на настаните. Резултатите откриваат дека, иако способноста на БЕРТ да се справи со метонимијата е прилично ограничена, СДМ е добар во предвидувањето на значењето на метонимичките изрази, обезбедувајќи поддршка за приказната на метонимијата базирана на знаење на настаните.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын хувьд бид метонимик илэрхийллээр холбогдсон өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлдохын тулд хоёр туршилт хийдэг. Бид шинэ өгөгдлийн сангийн загварыг шалгана. Энэ нь хамгийн ихэвчлэн метонимийн төрлийн загвар юм. Бид BERT-г бүтээгдэхүүний хуваарилалтын загвартай харьцуулж байна. Энэ бол ерөнхийлөгч үйл явдал мэдлэгийн ойлголтын загвар юм. Үүний үр дүн нь метонимийн тухай бодох боломжтой байхдаа, SDM нь метонимийн илэрхийллийн утгыг тодорхойлох боломжтой, миний үйл явдлын мэдлэг дээр үндсэн арга баримтыг дэмжих боломжтой болгодог.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ കഴിവ് പരിശോധന ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം മെടോമിക് മെറ്റോണിയുടെ ഏറ്റവും സാധാരണ തരത്തില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയായ ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ മോഡലിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷ നമ്മള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെ സ്ട്രാക്ടിക്കേറ്റ് ഡിസ്ട്രിപ്ഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പൊതുവായ അവസ്ഥ അറിവിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ വാക്കുകളുട അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മെട്ടോണിമിയുടെ കൈകാര്യം ഏറ്റവും പരിധിയാണെങ്കില്\u200d SDM മെറ്റോമിക്ക് പ്രസ്താവിക', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu, provodimo dva eksperimenta kako bi procenili sposobnost BERT da uhvati smjenu povezanu sa metonimskim izrazom. Testiramo model na novom setu podataka koji predstavlja najzajedničke vrste metonimije. Uspoređujemo BERT sa strukturiranim distribucijskim modelom (SDM), model za predstavljanje reèi u kontekstu koji je baziran na pojmu generaliziranog znanja dogaðaja. Rezultati otkrivaju da, dok je BERT sposobnost rješavanja metonima prilično ograničena, SDM je dobar u predviđanju smisla metonimskih izraza, pružajući podršku računu metonima na temelju znanja događaja.', 'no': 'I dette arbeidet gjer vi to eksperimenter for å vurdere evnen på BERT for å ta inn forskyving som er tilknytt med metoniske uttrykk. Vi testar modellen på eit ny datasett som er representant av dei mest vanlege typane metonami. Vi sammenliknar BERT med den strukturerte distribusjonsmodellen (SDM), eit modell for representasjonen av ord i konteksten som er basert på noen av kjennende gjennomføringar. Resultatet viser at, mens BERT-kapasiteten for å handtera metonamin er ganske begrenset, er SDM godt i å foregå betydninga av metoniske uttrykk, og tilbyr støtte for ein konto på metonamin basert på hendingskvitning.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy przeprowadzamy dwa eksperymenty mające na celu ocenę zdolności BERT do uchwycenia zmiany znaczenia związanej z wyrażeniami metonymicznymi. Testujemy model na nowym zbiorze danych reprezentatywnym dla najczęstszych typów metonimii. Porównujemy BERT ze strukturalnym modelem dystrybucyjnym (SDM), modelem reprezentacji słów w kontekście opartym na pojęciu uogólnionej wiedzy zdarzeń. Wyniki pokazują, że choć zdolność BERT do radzenia sobie z metonymią jest dość ograniczona, SDM jest dobry w przewidywaniu znaczenia wyrażeń metonymicznych, zapewniając wsparcie dla rachunku metonymii opartego na wiedzy zdarzeń.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, efectuăm două experimente pentru a evalua capacitatea BERT de a capta schimbarea semnificației asociate expresiilor metonimice. Testăm modelul pe un nou set de date reprezentativ pentru cele mai frecvente tipuri de metonimie. Comparăm BERT cu Modelul Distribuțional Structurat (SDM), un model de reprezentare a cuvintelor în context care se bazează pe noțiunea de Cunoaștere a Evenimentelor Generalizate. Rezultatele arată că, în timp ce capacitatea BERT de a face față metonimiei este destul de limitată, SDM este bună la predicția semnificației expresiilor metonimice, oferind sprijin pentru o relatare a metonimiei bazată pe cunoștințele evenimentelor.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete genomför vi två experiment för att bedöma BERT:s förmåga att fånga meningsskiftet förknippat med metonymiska uttryck. Vi testar modellen på en ny datauppsättning som är representativ för de vanligaste typerna av metonymi. Vi jämför BERT med Structured Distributional Model (SDM), en modell för representation av ord i sammanhang som bygger på begreppet Generalised Event Knowledge. Resultaten visar att även om BERT:s förmåga att hantera metonymi är ganska begränsad är SDM bra på att förutsäga betydelsen av metonymiska uttryck, vilket ger stöd för en redogörelse för metonymi baserad på händelsekunskap.', 'ta': 'In this work, we carry out two experiments in order to assess the ability of BERT to capture the meaning shift associated with metonymic expressions.  நாம் ஒரு புதிய தரவுத்தளத்தில் மாதிரியை சோதிக்கிறோம். அது மெடோனியின் பொதுவான வகைகளின் பிரதிநிதியா நாம் BERT வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட பங்கீட்டு மாதிரியை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். இது பொதுவான நிகழ்வு அறிவை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள வார்த்தைகளின் குறிப்பிடும முடிவுகள் வெளிப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, BERT மெடோனியை பொருட்டு செய்ய முடியும் மிகவும் வரையறையாக இருக்கும் போது, SDM மெடோனிக் கூற்றின் அர்த்தத்தை', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් කරන්න බෙර්ට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. අපි අළුත් දත්ත සැට් එකේ මොඩේලය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඒක තමයි මනුස්සයේ සාමාන්\u200dය වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන අපි BERT එක්ක සංස්ථාපනය විදුලි මොඩල් එක්ක (SDM) සඳහා සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය විදුලි දැනගන්න අවස්ථාවයේ වචන වචන ප්\u200dරතින ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා, BERT ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙලා තියෙනවා නමුත් SDM හොඳයි මේටෝනිමික ප්\u200dරකාශන', 'ur': 'اس کام میں ہم دو آزمائش کریں گے کہ BERT کے قابل قدرت کو پکڑنے کے لئے متنانیمیک اثرات کے ساتھ ارتباط کی تغییر حاصل کریں۔ ہم نے ایک نوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر موڈل کو امتحان کر لیا ہے جو metonymy کے سب سے زیادہ مشترک طریقوں کی نمونی ہے۔ We compare BERT with the Structured Distributional Model (SDM), a model for the representation of words in context that is based on the notion of Generalized Event Knowledge. نتیجے ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ، حالانکہ BERT میرے ساتھ معاملہ کرنے کی قابلیت بہت محدودہ ہے، SDM متنومیک تعبیروں کا معنی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے بہتر ہے، میری حادثہ علم پر بنیاد رکھی ہوئی میری حساب کے لئے مدد دینے کے لئے۔', 'so': 'Markaas waxan waxaynu sameynaa laba imtixaan si aan u qiimeyno awoodda BERT si aan u qabno bedelka micneheeda la xiriira hadalka metonika. Tusaalada waxaynu ku tijaabinaynaa sawir cusub oo ka mid ah noocyada ugu caadiga ah metonimo. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa BERT iyo Model Structured Distribution (SDM), model for representation of words in context which is based on the notion of Generalized Event Knowledge. Abaalkeedu waxay muuqataa in, inta BERT awooddiisa la macaamiloodo metonimy ay tahay mid aad u xadan, SDM waa wanaagsan yahay inuu hormariyo micneheeda metonika, kaasoo taageeraya xisaabta metonimy ku saleysan aqoonta dhacdooyinka.', 'uz': "Bu ishda biz BERT ta'siri bilan bog'liq imkoniyatlarni o'rganish uchun ikkita imtiyozni bajaramiz. Biz metoniya turlarining eng umumiy turlariga represent yangi maʼlumot set modelini sinash. @ info: whatsthis Natijalar shunday ko'rsatadi, BERT metonyi bilan boshqarish imkoniyati juda chegara, SDM metonyik ifodalarning ma'nosini predikt qilishiga juda yaxshi, va hodisa foydalanish uchun metonim haqida qoʻllanmaydi.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi thực hiện hai thí nghiệm để đánh giá khả năng của BERT nắm bắt được sự thay đổi ý nghĩa của biểu tượng này. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm mô hình trên một tập tin mới, nó đại diện cho các kiểu metonyy phổ biến nhất. Chúng tôi so sánh BERT với Mô hình phân chia cấu trúc (SDM), một mô hình để đại diện từ ngữ cảnh dựa trên khái niệm về Tri thức đại sự gia truyền. Kết quả cho thấy, mặc dù khả năng xử lý nghê-mi của BERT khá hạn, SDM rất giỏi dự đoán ý nghĩa của biểu thức theo biểu thức metonym, hỗ trợ cho mô tả về metonymy dựa trên kiến thức sự kiện.', 'da': "I dette arbejde udfører vi to eksperimenter for at vurdere BERT's evne til at fange betydningsforskydningen forbundet med metonymiske udtryk. Vi tester modellen på et nyt datasæt, der er repræsentativt for de mest almindelige typer metonymi. Vi sammenligner BERT med Structured Distributional Model (SDM), en model for repræsentation af ord i kontekst, der er baseret på begrebet Generalised Event Knowledge. Resultaterne viser, at selvom BERT's evne til at håndtere metonymi er temmelig begrænset, er SDM god til at forudsige betydningen af metonymiske udtryk og understøtter en redegørelse for metonymi baseret på hændelsesviden.", 'nl': 'In dit werk voeren we twee experimenten uit om het vermogen van BERT te beoordelen om de betekenisverschuiving van metonymische expressies vast te leggen. We testen het model op een nieuwe dataset die representatief is voor de meest voorkomende soorten metonymie. We vergelijken BERT met het Structured Distributional Model (SDM), een model voor de representatie van woorden in context dat is gebaseerd op het begrip Generalized Event Knowledge. De resultaten tonen aan dat, hoewel BERT het vermogen om met metonymie om te gaan vrij beperkt is, SDM goed is in het voorspellen van de betekenis van metonymische uitdrukkingen en ondersteuning biedt voor een account van metonymie op basis van gebeurteniskennis.', 'bg': 'В тази работа извършваме два експеримента, за да оценим способността на BERT да улавя изместването на смисъла, свързано с метонимичните изрази. Тестваме модела върху нов набор от данни, който е представителен за най-често срещаните видове метонимия. Сравняваме БРТ със структурирания разпределителен модел (СДМ), модел за представяне на думи в контекст, който се основава на понятието "Общо знание за събитията". Резултатите показват, че макар способността на BERT да се справя с метонимията да е доста ограничена, СДМ е добър в предсказването на значението на метонимичните изрази, като предоставя подкрепа за описание на метонимията въз основа на знанията за събитията.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu provodimo dva eksperimenta kako bi procijenili sposobnost BERT-a da uhvati smjenu povezanu s metonimskim izrazom. Testiramo model na novoj seti podataka koji je predstavnik najobičnijih vrsta metonima. Uspoređujemo BERT sa strukturovanim distribucijskim modelom (SDM), model za predstavljanje riječi u kontekstu koja je temeljena na pojmu o znanju općeg događaja. Rezultati otkrivaju da, iako je BERT sposobnost rješavanja metonima prilično ograničena, SDM je dobar u predviđanju smisla metonimskih izraza, pružajući podršku računu metonima na temelju znanja događaja.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit führen wir zwei Experimente durch, um die Fähigkeit von BERT zu beurteilen, die Bedeutungsverschiebung von metonymischen Ausdrücken zu erfassen. Wir testen das Modell an einem neuen Datensatz, der repräsentativ für die häufigsten Arten von Metonymie ist. Wir vergleichen BERT mit dem Structured Distributional Model (SDM), einem Modell zur Darstellung von Wörtern im Kontext, das auf dem Begriff Generalized Event Knowledge basiert. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die BERT-Fähigkeit, mit Metonymie umzugehen, sehr begrenzt ist, SDM aber gut darin ist, die Bedeutung von metonymischen Ausdrücken vorherzusagen und auf Ereigniskenntnissen basierende Darstellung von Metonymie zu unterstützen.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami melakukan dua eksperimen untuk menilai kemampuan BERT untuk menangkap perubahan arti yang berhubungan dengan ekspresi metonymik. Kami menguji model pada set data baru yang mewakili jenis metonimi yang paling umum. Kami membandingkan BERT dengan Model Distribusi Struktur (SDM), model untuk perwakilan kata dalam konteks yang berdasarkan gagasan pengetahuan peristiwa Umum. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa, sementara kemampuan BERT untuk menangani metonimi cukup terbatas, SDM baik dalam memprediksi arti ekspresi metonymi, menyediakan dukungan untuk akaun metonimi berdasarkan pengetahuan peristiwa.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما دو آزمایش را انجام می دهیم تا بتوانیم توانایی BERT را بررسی کنیم که معنی تغییرات مربوط به عبارت متنومیک را بگیریم. ما مدل را روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید امتحان می\u200cکنیم که نماینده\u200cترین نوع متنویمی است. ما BERT را با مدل جدائی ساخته شده (SDM) مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، یک مدل برای نمایش کلمات در محیط که بر روی نظر علم اتفاق عمومی است. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که، در حالی که توانایی BERT با metonymy بسیار محدود است، SDM در پیش\u200cبینی معنای تعریف\u200cهای متنومیک خوبی است، که به حساب من بر اساس علم رویداد رویداد حمایت می\u200cکند.', 'tr': "Bu işde, BERT'yň metonymik ifadeler bilen alaýan ifadeleri çykarmak üçin iki deney çykýarys. Biz täze bir datasetede nusgasyny çykarýarys. Bu nusgasy metonymy ň iň orta nusgasyna görýär. BERT'i Structured Distributional Model (SDM) bilen çykyşyrýarys, Umumy Oýun Bilýänligi barada daýanýan sözlerin suratynyň nusgasyna görýäris. netijeler şol mekdebe çykyp biljek bolanynda, BERT metonymy çykyp biljek başaryşlaryna seretseňiz, SDM metonymik ifadeleriň nähili maksadyny täze etmekde gowy bolýar.", 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunafanya majaribio mawili ili ili kutathmini uwezo wa BERT kupata mabadiliko yanayohusiana na hisia za utamaduni. Tunajaribu mfano katika seti mpya ya taarifa ambazo ni mwakilishi wa aina nyingi za utamaduni. Tunawalinganisha BERT na Mradi wa Usambazaji wa Mjengo (SDM), mfano wa uwakilishi wa maneno katika muktadha ambao una msingi wa dhana ya Ujuzi wa Matukio. Matokeo hayo yanaonyesha kuwa, wakati uwezo wa BERT wa kukabiliana na utamaduni umekuwa mdogo sana, SDM ni mzuri katika kutabiri maana ya maoni ya utamaduni, na kutoa msaada kwa akaunti ya metonyoni inayotokana na maarifa ya tukio.', 'af': "In hierdie werk, ons uitvoer twee eksperimente om die moontlikheid van BERT te besluit om die betekenis verskuif geassosieer met metonymiske uitdrukkings te vang. Ons probeer die model op 'n nuwe datastel wat verteenwoordig is van die mees gemeenskare tipes van metonamie. Ons vergelyk BERT met die Struktuurde VerspreidingsModel (SDM),  'n model vir die voorstelling van woorde in konteks wat is gebaseer op die noesie van Generaliseerde Event kennis. Die resultate verduidelik dat, terwyl BERT moontlik om met metonamie te behandel is heeltemal beperk, is SDM goed om die betekening van metonamiese uitdrukkings te voorskou, ondersteun vir 'n rekening van metonamie gebaseer op gebeurtenis kennis.", 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne kryejmë dy eksperimente me qëllim që të vlerësojmë aftësinë e BERT për të kapur ndryshimin e kuptimit të lidhur me shprehjet metonimike. Ne testojmë modelin në një set të ri të dhënash që është përfaqësues i llojeve më të zakonshme të metonimisë. We compare BERT with the Structured Distributional Model (SDM), a model for the representation of words in context which is based on the notion of Generalized Event Knowledge.  Rezultatet tregojnë se ndërsa aftësia e BERT për të trajtuar metoniminë është mjaft e kufizuar, SDM është i mirë në parashikimin e kuptimit të shprehjeve metonimike, duke ofruar mbështetje për një llogari të metonimisë bazuar në njohurinë e ngjarjeve.', 'am': 'በዚህ ሥራ ሁለት ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፤ BERT የሜትዮናዊ ንግግር ማነሳትን ለመያዝ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ምሳሌውን በመጠቀም የሜቶኒ ዓይነት መልዕክት የሚቆጠሩ አዲስ ዳታተር setን እንሞክራለን፡፡ BERT በተመሳሳይ አዋቂው የሁኔታ እውቀት በተደገመ ቃላትን ለማስተያየት እናስመስላታለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቹም ቢሬት ቢትሜኒ ጋር ለመቀበል የሚችል ግልፅ ሲሆን SDM የሜቶኒካዊ መልዕክቶችን ለመቀበል ጥሩ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կատարում ենք երկու փորձարկումներ, որպեսզի գնահատենք BER-ի կարողությունը վերցնել մեթոնիմիկ արտահայտությունների հետ կապված իմաստափոխությունը: Մենք փորձում ենք մոդելը նոր տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որը ներկայացնում է մեթոնիմիայի ամենատարածված տեսակները: We compare BERT with the Structured Distributional Model (SDM), a model for the representation of words in context which is based on the notion of Generalized Event Knowledge.  Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մինչդեռ ԲԵԹ-ի կարողությունը վերաբերվել մեթոնիմիայի հետ բավականին սահմանափակ է, ՍԴՄ-ը լավ է կանխատեսում մեթոնիմիայի արտահայտումների իմաստը, ապահովում է աջակցություն մեթոնիմիայի հաշվարկումների համար', 'az': "Bu işdə, metonimik ifadələri ilə bağlı dəyişiklik dəyişikliyini almaq üçün BERT yetkinliğini təmin etmək üçün iki təcrübə etdik. Biz bu modeli metonimin ən müxtəlif türlərinin nümayəçisi olan yeni verilənlər qutusunda sınağa çəkirik. Biz BERT'i Dövlətli Dövlətli Model (SDM) ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bu, Dövlətli Vaqiyat Bilimlərinin nəfsinə dayanan sözlərin göstərilməsi üçün modeli. Sonuçlar belə göstərir ki, BERT metonimlə çəkinmə mümkün olmasına rağmen, SDM metonimik ifadələrin anlamını təmin etməkdə yaxşı idi, mənim olaraq biliyimə dayanan metonimin hesabına dəstək verməkdə.", 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 버트가 전유 표현과 관련된 의미 이동을 포착하는 능력을 평가하기 위해 두 가지 실험을 진행했다.우리는 가장 흔히 볼 수 있는 전유 유형을 대표하는 새로운 데이터 집합에서 이 모델을 테스트했다.우리는 BERT와 구조화분포모델(SDM)을 비교했는데 SDM은 광범위한 이벤트 지식 개념을 바탕으로 하는 상하문에서 단어 표현 모델이다.그 결과 버트가 전유를 처리하는 능력은 상당히 제한적이지만 SDM은 전유 표현의 의미를 잘 예측할 수 있어 사건 지식을 바탕으로 하는 전유 해석에 지원을 제공했다.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা দুটি পরীক্ষা চালাই যাতে বিবের্টের ক্ষমতার মানে মেটোনিমিক প্রকাশের সাথে যুক্ত পরিবর্তনের মানে পরিবর্তন গ্রহণ করা আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেটে মডেল পরীক্ষা করি যা সবচেয়ে সাধারণ ধরনের মেটোনিমির প্রতিনিধিত্ব। আমরা বেরেটের সাথে তুলনা করি ক্ষেত্রে বিতরণ মডেল (এসডিএম), যা প্রেক্ষাপটে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের একটি মডেল, যা সাধারণ ইভেন্টের জ্ঞানে ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে যে যখন বের্টি মেটোনিমির সাথে মুক্তি প্রদান করার ক্ষমতা খুব সীমিত, তখন এসডিএম ম মেটোনিমিক প্রকাশের মানে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার ভিত্তিতে', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu, provodimo dva eksperimenta kako bi procijenili sposobnost BERT-a da uhvati smjenu povezanu sa metonimskim izrazom. Testiramo model na novom setu podataka koji je predstavnik najzajedničkih vrsta metomije. Uspoređujemo BERT sa strukturiranim distribucijskim modelom (SDM), model za predstavljanje riječi u kontekstu koja se temelji na pojmu znanja generaliziranog događaja. Rezultati otkrivaju da, dok je BERT sposobnost rješavanja metonima prilično ograničena, SDM je dobar u predviđanju smisla metonimskih izraza, pružajući podršku računu metonima na temelju znanja događaja.', 'ca': "In this work, we carry out two experiments in order to assess the ability of BERT to capture the meaning shift associated with metonymic expressions.  Testem el model en un nou conjunt de dades que representa els tipus més comuns de metonimia. Comparem BERT amb el Modell Distribucional Estructurat (SDM), un model per la representació de paraules en contexte basat en la noció de Conexus Generalitzat d'Events. Els resultats revelen que, tot i que la capacitat de BERT a tractar la metonimia és bastant limitada, l'SDM és bo en predir el significat de les expressions metonimiques, proporcionant suport a una explicació de la metonimia basada en el coneixement d'eventos.", 'cs': 'V této práci provádíme dva experimenty s cílem posoudit schopnost BERT zachytit posun významu spojený s metonymickými výrazy. Model testujeme na nové datové sadě, která je reprezentativní pro nejběžnější typy metonymie. Porovnáváme BERT se strukturovaným distribučním modelem (SDM), modelem pro reprezentaci slov v kontextu, který je založen na pojmu obecné znalosti událostí. Výsledky ukazují, že zatímco schopnost BERT řešit metonymii je poměrně omezená, SDM je dobrý v predikci významu metonymických výrazů a poskytuje podporu pro účet metonymie založený na znalostech událostí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös teostame kaks eksperimenti, et hinnata BERT-i võimet jäädvustada metonüümiliste väljenditega seotud tähendusmuutust. Testime mudelit uue andmekogumiga, mis esindab kõige levinumaid metonüümiatüüpe. Võrdleme BERTi struktureeritud jaotusmudeliga (SDM), mis on mudel sõnade esitamiseks kontekstis, mis põhineb üldiste sündmuste teadmiste mõistel. Tulemused näitavad, et kuigi BERT-i võime metonüümiaga toime tulla on üsna piiratud, on SDM hea metonüümiliste väljendite tähenduse ennustamisel, toetades metonüümiat sündmuste teadmiste põhjal.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä teemme kaksi koetta, joiden tarkoituksena on arvioida BERT:n kykyä kuvata metonymisiin ilmaisuihin liittyvä merkityksenvaihto. Testaamme mallia uudella aineistolla, joka edustaa yleisimpiä metonymiatyyppejä. Vertaamme BERT:tä Structured Distributional Model (SDM) -malliin, joka perustuu yleistyneen tapahtumatiedon käsitteeseen. Tulokset osoittavat, että vaikka BERT:n kyky käsitellä metonymiaa on melko rajallinen, SDM on hyvä ennustamaan metonymian ilmaisujen merkitystä ja tukee metonymian kertomusta tapahtumatietoon perustuen.', 'he': 'בעבודה הזאת, אנו מבצעים שני ניסויים כדי להעריך את היכולת של BERT לתפוס את המשמעות המשמעותית הקשורה לבטאות מטונימיות. אנו בודקים את המודל על קבוצת נתונים חדשה שהיא מייצגת לסוגים המפורטים ביותר של מטונימיה. אנחנו משוותים את BERT עם מודל ההפצה המבנה (SDM), מודל לייצג מילים בקשר שמבוסס על הרעיון של ידע אירועים כללי. התוצאות מראות שלמרות שיכולת BERT להתמודד עם מטונימיה די מוגבלת, SDM טובה בחזוי את המשמעות של הביטויים מטונימיים, מספקת תמיכה לחשבון של מטונימיה מבוסס על ידע אירועים.', 'sk': 'V tem delu smo izvedli dva eksperimenta, da bi ocenili sposobnost BERT, da zajame premik pomena, povezan z metonimičnimi izrazi. Model testiramo na novem naboru podatkov, ki je reprezentativen za najpogostejše vrste metonimije. BERT primerjamo s strukturiranim distribucijskim modelom (SDM), modelom za reprezentacijo besed v kontekstu, ki temelji na pojmu Splošnega znanja dogodkov. Rezultati kažejo, da je BERT zmožnost obravnavanja metonimije precej omejena, SDM pa dobro napoveduje pomen metonimičnih izrazov in zagotavlja podporo za uporabo metonimije na podlagi znanja o dogodkih.', 'jv': 'Nang trabah iki, kita gawan mruput sampeyan iki dadi bisa nggawe nggawe kapan BERT kanggo nggawe mungkin nggawe barang nggawe ngupakan seneng pisan karo iso nggambar cara-pisan metanymik. Awak dhéwé ngewat model nang data set anyar dhéwé We komparasi BERT karo the structural Distribution model (sdM), model kanggo gambar kelangan kelangan winih Rejali nambarang ngomong, sampek BERT iso nggawe mênêmi nggawe gerarané; rsam iki dadi kanggo ngerasakno pangan sing dikarepaké metonêmik, nggawe ndhukung ngéwangi akhun mênêmi sing ngesaboh akéwé.', 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin, Munã tafiyar da jarrabo biyu dõmin ka ƙaddara abincin BERT dõmin su sami musanya da ma'anar maganar metoniki da aka yi danganta. Za jarraba misalin a kan wani tsari na daban-daban, wanda yana mai tsaron nau'in metonima mafi zaman jama'a. @ item: inmenu Matamatan ta bayyana cewa, a lokacin da BERT ya iya yi amfani da metonimi ya zama mai ƙunci, SDM yana da amfani ga gabanin fassarar magana na metoniki, kuma yana bãyar da taimako ga wani hisani na metonimi a kan kunnuwa.", 'bo': 'བྱ་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་BERT(BERT)གི་ལྕོག་རིམ་གྱི་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་རིམ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་རྟོགས་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We compare BERT with the Structured Distributional Model (SDM), a model for the representation of words in context which is based on the notion of Generalized Event Knowledge. རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་དག་པས། BERT་ངའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་གདོང་ལེན་ནུས་པ་སྤྲོད་པའི་ལྕོགས་ཅན་ཅིག་མཐུན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། SDM་ནི་ཕྱིར་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཚུལ་གྱི་'}
{'en': 'Interpretable Multi-headed Attention for Abstractive Summarization at Controllable Lengths', 'ar': 'الاهتمام متعدد الرؤوس والمفسر للتلخيص التجريدي بأطوال يمكن التحكم فيها', 'es': 'Atención multicabezal interpretable para la sumarización abstractiva en longitudes controlables', 'pt': 'Atenção multidirecionada interpretável para sumarização abstrativa em comprimentos controláveis', 'fr': 'Attention multi-têtes interprétable pour une synthèse abstraite à des longueurs contrôlables', 'ja': 'コントロール可能な長さでの抽象的な要約のための解釈可能な複数ヘッドの注意', 'hi': 'नियंत्रणीय लंबाई पर अमूर्त Summarization के लिए व्याख्यात्मक बहु-सिर वाला ध्यान', 'zh': '说多头注意,以可控长象', 'ru': 'Интерпретируемое многозаголовокное внимание к абстрактному обобщению на контролируемых длинах', 'ga': 'Aire Ilcheannteideal Inléirithe ar Achoimriú Teibí ar Fhaid Inrialaithe', 'hu': 'Értelmezhető többfejű figyelem az absztraktív összefoglalásra szabályozható hosszúságoknál', 'el': 'Διερμηνέα Πολυκεφαλική Προσοχή για την αφηρημένη Σύνοψη σε Ελεγχόμενα μήκη', 'it': 'Attenzione a più teste interpretabile per la sintesi astratta a lunghezze controllabili', 'kk': 'Басқару керек ұзындығындағы абстрактивті тұжырымдамасының бірнеше айдарлы түсініктемесі', 'ka': 'Name', 'ml': 'നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന നീളം', 'lt': 'Interpretuojamas daugiakalbis dėmesys abstrakčiai apibendrinti kontroliuojamu ilgiu', 'mt': 'Attenzjoni Multiintestatura Interpretabbli għas-Sommarju Abstrattiv fit-Tulijiet Kontrollabbli', 'mk': 'Интерпретабилно повеќето глави внимание за апстрактивна резултатација со контролирани должини', 'ms': 'Perhatian berbilang-kepala yang boleh diterjemahkan untuk Penapisan Abstraktif pada Panjang yang boleh Dikawal', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн урт дээрх Abstractive Summary-ын олон толгой анхаарал', 'no': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Atenție cu mai multe capete interpretabilă pentru rezumarea abstractivă la lungimi controlate', 'pl': 'Interpretowalna wielogłowa uwaga na abstrakcyjne podsumowanie w kontrolowanych długościach', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்பாட்டு நீளம்', 'sv': 'Tolkbar flerskalig uppmärksamhet för abstraktiv sammanfattning vid kontrollerbara längder', 'sr': 'Изменимо многоглавно внимание за абстрактивну кратку на контролирајемо длину', 'so': 'Interpretable Multi-headed Attention for Abstractive Summarization at Controllable Lengths', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Dịch gián điệp Ý chú ý tham khảo Tóm tắt theo chiều dài dễ điều khiển', 'bg': 'Тълкуваемо многоглаво внимание за абстрактивно обобщаване на контролируеми дължини', 'nl': 'Interpreteerbare meerkoppige aandacht voor abstracte samenvatting bij beheersbare lengtes', 'hr': 'Razumljivo višeglavno pažnje za abstraktivnu sažetku na kontrolnom dužini', 'da': 'Fortolkningsbar flerhovedet opmærksomhed på abstrakt opsummering ved kontrollerbare længder', 'de': 'Interpretierbare mehrköpfige Aufmerksamkeit für abstrakte Zusammenfassung bei kontrollierbaren Längen', 'fa': 'توجه چند سره\u200cهای متفصل برای جمع\u200cآوری بی\u200cتردید در طول\u200cهای کنترل قابل کنترل', 'id': 'Perhatian Multi-kepala Terinterpretasi untuk Penapisan Abstraktif pada Panjang Terkontrol', 'ko': '해석 가능한 다중 헤드 주의가 길이 조절 가능한 추상적 요약에서의 응용', 'sw': 'Utangazaji wa Kikundi cha Kutafsiri kwa ajili ya Ujumbe wa Uzungumzo katika Kiongezeko cha Controllable', 'tr': 'Kontrollable Uzunlarda Abstraktiv Iňleşen üçin Köp-başlyg Dyggat', 'sq': 'Vëmendje të përkthyeshme me shumë koka për përmbledhjen abstraktive në gjatësi të kontrollueshme', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Kontrollaşdırılabilir Uzunlarında Abstraktiv Toplaşdırma üçün çoxlu Başlıq Dikkati', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'কন্ট্রোলেবেল লম্বা', 'ca': 'Atenció multicabellosa interpretable per a una resumida abstracta a llargues controlables', 'bs': 'Razumljivo višeglavno pažnje za abstraktivnu sažetku na kontrolnom dužinu', 'cs': 'Interpretovatelná vícehlavá pozornost pro abstraktní shrnutí v kontrolovatelných délkách', 'et': 'Tõlgendatav mitmepealine tähelepanu abstraktsele kokkuvõttele kontrollitavatel pikkustel', 'fi': 'Tulkittava monipäinen huomio abstraktiiviseen yhteenvetoon kontrolloitavilla pituuksilla', 'af': 'Interpretable Multi- headed Aansig vir Abstractive Opsomming by Kontrolerbare Lengte', 'jv': 'Attribute', 'he': 'תשומת לב מרובה-ראשית מתפרקת לסיוריזציה משפחתית באורכים שולטים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razlagljiva večglavna pozornost za abstraktivno povzemanje pri nadzorovanih dolžinah', 'bo': 'Interpretable Multi-headed Attention for Abstractive Summarization at Controllable Lengths'}
{'en': 'Abstractive summarization at controllable lengths is a challenging task in natural language processing. It is even more challenging for domains where limited training data is available or scenarios in which the length of the summary is not known beforehand. At the same time, when it comes to trusting machine-generated summaries, explaining how a summary was constructed in human-understandable terms may be critical. We propose Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), a supervised method to construct abstractive summaries of a text document at controllable lengths. The key enabler of our method is an interpretable multi-headed attention mechanism that computes attention distribution over an input document using an array of timestep independent semantic kernels. Each kernel optimizes a human-interpretable syntactic or semantic property. Exhaustive experiments on two low-resource datasets in English show that MLS outperforms strong baselines by up to 14.70 % in the METEOR score. Human evaluation of the summaries also suggests that they capture the key concepts of the document at various length-budgets.', 'ar': 'يعد التلخيص التجريدي بأطوال يمكن التحكم فيها مهمة صعبة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. بل إنه يمثل تحديًا أكبر للمجالات التي تتوفر فيها بيانات تدريب محدودة أو سيناريوهات لا يكون فيها طول الملخص معروفًا مسبقًا. في الوقت نفسه ، عندما يتعلق الأمر بالثقة في الملخصات التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة الآلة ، فقد يكون شرح كيفية إنشاء الملخص بمصطلحات مفهومة من قبل الإنسان أمرًا بالغ الأهمية. نقترح الملخص متعدد المستويات (MLS) ، وهي طريقة خاضعة للإشراف لإنشاء ملخصات تجريدية لمستند نصي بأطوال يمكن التحكم فيها. عامل التمكين الرئيسي لطريقتنا هو آلية انتباه متعددة الرؤوس قابلة للتفسير تحسب توزيع الانتباه على مستند إدخال باستخدام مجموعة من النوى الدلالية المستقلة للخطوات الزمنية. تعمل كل نواة على تحسين خاصية نحوية أو دلالية يمكن تفسيرها بواسطة الإنسان. تُظهر التجارب الشاملة على مجموعتي بيانات منخفضتي الموارد باللغة الإنجليزية أن MLS يتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس القوية بنسبة تصل إلى 14.70٪ في درجة METEOR. يشير التقييم البشري للملخصات أيضًا إلى أنها تلتقط المفاهيم الأساسية للوثيقة بميزانيات طويلة مختلفة.', 'fr': "La synthèse abstraite à des longueurs contrôlables est une tâche difficile dans le traitement du langage naturel. C'est encore plus difficile pour les domaines où les données de formation sont limitées ou pour les scénarios dans lesquels la longueur du résumé n'est pas connue à l'avance. Dans le même temps, lorsqu'il s'agit de faire confiance à des résumés générés par des machines, il peut être essentiel d'expliquer comment un résumé a été construit en termes compréhensibles par l'homme. Nous proposons Multilevel Summarizer (MLS), une méthode supervisée pour construire des résumés abstraits d'un document texte à des longueurs contrôlables. Le principal facilitateur de notre méthode est un mécanisme d'attention multi-têtes interprétable qui calcule la distribution de l'attention sur un document d'entrée à l'aide d'un tableau de noyaux sémantiques indépendants des pas de temps. Chaque noyau optimise une propriété syntaxique ou sémantique interprétable par l'homme. Des expériences exhaustives sur deux ensembles de données à faibles ressources en anglais montrent que MLS surpasse les bases solides de 14,70\xa0% dans le score METEOR. L'évaluation humaine des résumés suggère également qu'ils saisissent les concepts clés du document à différents budgets de longueur.", 'es': 'La sumarización abstractiva en longitudes controlables es una tarea desafiante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Es aún más difícil para los dominios en los que se dispone de datos de entrenamiento limitados o en escenarios en los que no se conoce de antemano la longitud del resumen. Al mismo tiempo, cuando se trata de confiar en los resúmenes generados por máquinas, puede ser fundamental explicar cómo se construyó un resumen en términos comprensibles para el ser humano. Proponemos el Summarizer multinivel (MLS), un método supervisado para construir resúmenes abstractivos de un documento de texto con longitudes controlables. El facilitador clave de nuestro método es un mecanismo de atención interpretable de múltiples cabezas que calcula la distribución de la atención en un documento de entrada utilizando una matriz de núcleos semánticos independientes de pasos temporales. Cada núcleo optimiza una propiedad sintáctica o semántica interpretable por humanos. Experimentos exhaustivos en dos conjuntos de datos de bajos recursos en inglés muestran que MLS supera a las líneas de base sólidas en hasta un 14,70% en la puntuación METEOR. La evaluación humana de los resúmenes también sugiere que capturan los conceptos clave del documento en varios presupuestos largos.', 'pt': 'A sumarização abstrativa em comprimentos controláveis é uma tarefa desafiadora no processamento de linguagem natural. É ainda mais desafiador para domínios em que dados de treinamento limitados estão disponíveis ou cenários em que o tamanho do resumo não é conhecido de antemão. Ao mesmo tempo, quando se trata de confiar em resumos gerados por máquina, explicar como um resumo foi construído em termos compreensíveis para humanos pode ser crítico. Propomos o Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), um método supervisionado para construir resumos abstrativos de um documento de texto em comprimentos controláveis. O facilitador chave do nosso método é um mecanismo de atenção multicabeças interpretável que calcula a distribuição de atenção sobre um documento de entrada usando uma matriz de kernels semânticos independentes de timestep. Cada kernel otimiza uma propriedade sintática ou semântica interpretável por humanos. Experimentos exaustivos em dois conjuntos de dados de poucos recursos em inglês mostram que o MLS supera as linhas de base fortes em até 14,70% na pontuação METEOR. A avaliação humana dos resumos também sugere que eles capturam os conceitos-chave do documento em vários orçamentos de extensão.', 'ja': '制御可能な長さでの抽象的な要約は、自然言語処理における困難な課題である。 トレーニングデータが限られているドメインや、要約の長さが事前にわからないシナリオでは、さらに困難です。 同時に、機械で生成された要約を信頼することに関しては、人間が理解できる用語で要約がどのように構築されたかを説明することが重要かもしれません。 マルチレベルサマリザー（ MLS ）を提案します。これは、文書文書の抽象的な要約を制御可能な長さで構築するための監視された方法です。 私たちの方法の鍵となるイネーブラーは、タイムステップ独立したセマンティックカーネルの配列を使用して、入力ドキュメント上の注意分布を計算する、解釈可能な多頭注意メカニズムです。 各カーネルは、人間が解釈可能な構文またはセマンティックプロパティを最適化します。 英語の2つの低リソースデータセットに関する徹底的な実験は、MLSが流星スコアで最大14.70%の強力なベースラインを上回ることを示しています。 要約の人間による評価は、様々な長さの予算で文書の主要な概念を取り込むことも示唆しています。', 'zh': '自然语言之中,可控长抽象摘要一挑战性之任也。 其可教数有限之域,或先不知摘要长之场,此更具挑战性也。 当及信机器生成之摘要,说摘要以人伦可解之术语,或至重也。 臣等建数摘要生成器(MLS),此受督之法,以可控长构文档抽象摘要。 吾道之要,推素为解多头注意机制,以一系时步语义内核计输文档上意力分布。 内核皆优化人之语法性语义。 两英文低资源数集之详实验,MLS于METEOR分之优于强基线达14.70%。 摘要工料犹明,以长短为名。', 'hi': 'नियंत्रणीय लंबाई पर अमूर्त सारांशन प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। यह डोमेन के लिए और भी अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण है जहां सीमित प्रशिक्षण डेटा उपलब्ध है या परिदृश्य जिसमें सारांश की लंबाई पहले से ज्ञात नहीं है। उसी समय, जब मशीन-जनित सारांशों पर भरोसा करने की बात आती है, तो यह समझाते हुए कि मानव-समझने योग्य शब्दों में सारांश का निर्माण कैसे किया गया था, महत्वपूर्ण हो सकता है। हम बहु-स्तरीय सारांशक (एमएलएस) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो नियंत्रणीय लंबाई पर एक पाठ दस्तावेज़ के अमूर्त सारांश का निर्माण करने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित विधि है। हमारी विधि का प्रमुख enabler एक interpretable बहु-सिर वाले ध्यान तंत्र है जो टाइमस्टेप स्वतंत्र शब्दार्थ कर्नेल की एक सरणी का उपयोग करके इनपुट दस्तावेज़ पर ध्यान वितरण की गणना करता है। प्रत्येक कर्नेल एक मानव-व्याख्यायोग्य वाक्यात्मक या शब्दार्थ संपत्ति का अनुकूलन करता है। अंग्रेजी में दो कम संसाधन डेटासेट पर संपूर्ण प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एमएलएस उल्का स्कोर में 14.70% तक मजबूत बेसलाइन को मात देता है। सारांशों के मानव मूल्यांकन से यह भी पता चलता है कि वे विभिन्न लंबाई-बजट में दस्तावेज़ की प्रमुख अवधारणाओं को कैप्चर करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Абстрактное обобщение на контролируемой длине является сложной задачей в обработке естественного языка. Еще более сложной она является для областей, в которых имеются ограниченные данные о профессиональной подготовке, или для сценариев, в которых объем резюме заранее неизвестен. В то же время, когда дело доходит до доверчивых машинных резюме, объяснение того, как резюме было построено в понятных человеку терминах, может иметь решающее значение. Мы предлагаем многоуровневый суммирующий анализатор (MLS), контролируемый метод для построения абстрактных резюме текстового документа с контролируемой длиной. Ключевым средством реализации нашего метода является интерпретируемый многозаголовный механизм внимания, который вычисляет распределение внимания по входному документу с использованием массива независимых от временного шага семантических ядер. Каждое ядро оптимизирует интерпретируемое человеком синтаксическое или семантическое свойство. Исчерпывающие эксперименты на двух малоресурсных наборах данных на английском языке показывают, что MLS превосходит сильные базовые линии до 14,70% по МЕТЕОРИТНОЙ шкале. Проведенная человеком оценка резюме также свидетельствует о том, что они отражают ключевые концепции документа при различных объемах бюджетных ассигнований.', 'ga': "Is tasc dúshlánach i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha é achoimriú teibí ar fhad inrialaithe. Tá sé níos dúshlánaí fós d’fhearainn ina bhfuil sonraí teoranta oiliúna ar fáil nó do chásanna nach bhfuil fad an achoimre ar eolas roimh ré. Ag an am céanna, maidir le hachoimrí iontaoibhe a ghintear trí mheaisíní, d'fhéadfadh sé a bheith ríthábhachtach conas achoimre a dhéanamh ar théarmaí sothuigthe daonna. Molaimid Achoimritheoir Il-leibhéil (MLS), modh maoirsithe chun achoimrí teibí a dhéanamh ar dhoiciméad téacs ar faid inrialaithe. Is é príomh- chumasóir ár modha meicníocht aird il-cheann inléirmhínithe a ríomhtar dáileadh aird thar dhoiciméad ionchuir ag baint úsáide as raon d'eithneanna shéimeantacha neamhspleácha céim ama. Optamaíonn gach eithne airí comhréire nó shéimeantach daonna-léirmhínithe. Léiríonn turgnaimh uileghabhálacha ar dhá thacar sonraí íseal-acmhainní i mBéarla go sáraíonn MLS bonnlínte láidre suas le 14.70% sa scór METEOR. Tugann meastóireacht dhaonna ar na hachoimrí le fios freisin go gclúdaíonn siad príomhchoincheapa an doiciméid ag fadbhuiséid éagsúla.", 'hu': 'A szabályozható hosszúságú absztrakt összefoglalás kihívást jelent a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában. Ez még nagyobb kihívást jelent azon területek számára, ahol korlátozott képzési adatok állnak rendelkezésre, vagy ahol az összefoglaló hossza előzetesen nem ismert. Ugyanakkor, amikor a gép által generált összefoglalók megbízhatóságáról van szó, kritikus lehet, hogy az összefoglaló hogyan készült emberi értelemben. Javasoljuk a Multi-Level Summarizer (MLS), amely egy felügyelt módszer egy szövegdokumentum absztrakt összefoglalóinak készítésére irányítható hosszúságban. Módszerünk kulcsfontosságú támogatója egy értelmezhető, többfejű figyelemfelkeltő mechanizmus, amely időlépéstől független szemantikai mag segítségével kiszámítja a figyelem eloszlását egy beviteli dokumentumon keresztül. Minden kernel optimalizál egy emberi értelmezhető szintaktikai vagy szemantikai tulajdonságot. Két alacsony erőforrású adatkészleten végzett kimerítő kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az MLS akár 14,70%-kal is felülmúlja az erős alapvető értékeket a METEOR pontszámban. Az összefoglalók emberi értékelése azt is sugallja, hogy a dokumentum kulcsfontosságú koncepcióit különböző hosszúságú költségvetésekben rögzítik.', 'el': 'Η αφηρημένη σύνοψη σε ελεγχόμενα μήκη είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Είναι ακόμη πιο δύσκολο για τομείς όπου είναι διαθέσιμα περιορισμένα δεδομένα κατάρτισης ή σενάρια στα οποία δεν είναι γνωστό εκ των προτέρων το μήκος της σύνοψης. Ταυτόχρονα, όταν πρόκειται για την εμπιστοσύνη στις περιλήψεις που δημιουργούνται από μηχανές, η εξήγηση του τρόπου με τον οποίο κατασκευάστηκε μια περίληψη με κατανοητούς από τον άνθρωπο όρους μπορεί να είναι κρίσιμη. Προτείνουμε μια εποπτευόμενη μέθοδο για την κατασκευή αφηρημένων περιλήψεων ενός εγγράφου κειμένου σε ελεγχόμενα μήκη. Ο βασικός παράγοντας της μεθόδου μας είναι ένας ερμηνευτικός πολυκεφαλικός μηχανισμός προσοχής που υπολογίζει την κατανομή προσοχής σε ένα έγγραφο εισόδου χρησιμοποιώντας μια σειρά από ανεξάρτητους σημασιολογικούς πυρήνες χρονοβημάτων. Κάθε πυρήνας βελτιστοποιεί μια συντακτική ή σημασιολογική ιδιότητα που ερμηνεύεται από τον άνθρωπο. Τα εξαντλητικά πειράματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων χαμηλών πόρων στα αγγλικά δείχνουν ότι το MLS ξεπερνά τις ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης μέχρι 14,70% στη βαθμολογία METEOR. Η ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση των περιλήψεων υποδηλώνει επίσης ότι αποτυπώνουν τις βασικές έννοιες του εγγράφου σε διάφορους προϋπολογισμούς διάρκειας.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური კონტროლური სიგრძნობაში აბსტრაქტიური კონტროლური სიგრძნობაში არის საშუალებელი რაოდენობა სახელის პროცესი. ეს უფრო უფრო დარწმუნებელია დომენეებისთვის, სადაც უფრო დარწმუნებული მონაცემები აქვს ან სინარიოები, რომლებიც რეზიუმენტის სიგრძე არ უცნობიან წინ იგივე დროში, როდესაც მანქანის შექმნილი რეზიუმენტების დარწმუნება, როგორ საზიგადოება ადამიანის უცნობიერი სიტყვებში შეიძლება იყოს კრიტიკური. ჩვენ მრავალური დოკუმენტის კონტროლური სიგრძე (MLS) სტრაქტიური კონტროლური დოკუმენტის აბსტრაქტიური კონტროლური სიგრძე კონტროლურად გადა ჩვენი მეტის გასაკუთრებელი გასაკუთრებელი არის მრავალთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთა Each kernel optimizes a human-interpretable syntactic or semantic property. ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტებში ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს, რომ MLS ძალიან ფესპერიმენტები გავაკეთება METEOR წერტილებში 14,70%-ზე. ადამიანის განსაზღვრებას შესაძლებელია, რომ ისინი განსაზღვრებული ბიჯეტებში დოკუმენტის კლავის კონფიგურაციების გადატანა.', 'lt': 'Abstraktyvi suvestinė kontroliuojamų ilgių at žvilgiu yra sudėtinga gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotis. Dar sunkiau spręsti sritis, kuriose turima ribotų mokymo duomenų, arba scenarijus, kuriuose santraukos trukmė iš anksto nežinoma. Kartu kalbant apie mašin ų sukauptas santraukas, kuriose paaiškinama, kaip santrauka buvo parengta žmogaus suprantamais terminais, gali būti labai svarbi. Mes siūlome daugiapakopį santrauką (MLS), prižiūrimą metodą, kuriuo siekiama sudaryti abstraktines teksto dokumento santraukas kontroliuojamu ilgiu. Mūsų metodo pagrindinis veiksnys yra aiškinamas daugiakalbis dėmesio mechanizmas, kuris apskaičiuoja dėmesio paskirstymą per įvesties dokumentą naudojant laikotarpį nepriklausomus semantinius branduolius. Each kernel optimizes a human-interpretable syntactic or semantic property.  Išsamūs eksperimentai su dviem mažų išteklių duomenų rinkiniais anglų kalba rodo, kad MLS viršija tvirtas bazines vertes iki 14,70 % METEOR rezultato. Žmogiškasis santraukų vertinimas taip pat rodo, kad jos apima pagrindines dokumento sąvokas įvairiuose ilgesniuose biudžetuose.', 'it': "La sintesi astratta a lunghezze controllabili è un compito impegnativo nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. È ancora più difficile per i settori in cui sono disponibili dati di formazione limitati o scenari in cui la lunghezza del riassunto non è nota in anticipo. Allo stesso tempo, quando si tratta di fidarsi di riassunti generati dalla macchina, spiegare come un riassunto è stato costruito in termini umani-comprensibili può essere critico. Proponiamo Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), un metodo supervisionato per costruire riassunti astratti di un documento di testo a lunghezze controllabili. L'abilitante chiave del nostro metodo è un meccanismo di attenzione multi-testa interpretabile che calcola la distribuzione dell'attenzione su un documento di input utilizzando una serie di kernel semantici indipendenti dal tempo. Ogni kernel ottimizza una proprietà sintattica o semantica interpretabile dall'uomo. Esperimenti esaurienti su due set di dati a basso consumo in inglese mostrano che MLS supera le linee di base forti fino al 14,70% nel punteggio METEOR. La valutazione umana dei riassunti suggerisce inoltre che essi riprendano i concetti chiave del documento in vari bilanci di lunghezza.", 'mk': 'Апстрактивна резултатација на контролирани должини е предизвикувачка задача во природното обработување јазик. Уште е поважно за домените каде се достапни ограничени податоци за обука или сценарија во кои должината на резултатот не е позната претходно. Истовремено, кога станува збор за довербата на резултатите генерирани од машина, објаснувајќи како резултатот беше изграден во човек-разбирливи термини може да биде критичен. Предложуваме Мулти- нивен резултат (MLS), надгледуван метод за конструкција апстрактивни резултати на текст документ со контролирани должини. Клучниот овозможувач на нашиот метод е интерпретабилен механизам со повеќе глави на внимание кој ја обчистува дистрибуцијата на вниманието преку внесен документ користејќи масија независни семантични јадри. Секој јадр оптимизира синтактичка или семантична сопственост што може да се интерпретира од човек. Изгушни експерименти на две ниски ресурси на англиски јазик покажуваат дека MLS ги надминува силните основни линии за 14,70 отсто од оценката METEOR. Човечката проценка на резултатите, исто така, покажува дека тие ги заземаат клучните концепти на документот во различни должини буџети.', 'kk': 'Басқарулық ұзындығындағы абстрактивті тұжырымдамасы - табиғлық тілдерді өңдеу үшін әсер ететін тапсырма. Бұл домендер үшін шектелген оқыту деректері бар немесе сценариялардың ұзындығы алдында білмейді. Осы уақытта, машинаның құрылған тұжырымдарына сенімді, адамдардың түсінікті тұжырымдарына қалай құрылғанын түсініп береді. Мәтін құжаттың абстрактивті тұжырымдамаларын бақылау үшін көптеген деңгейі тұжырымдамаларын (MLS) бақылау әдісін таңдаймыз. Біздің әдіміміздің кілті қолдануға болатын көп айдарлық түсініктеме механизмі. Бұл келтірілген құжаттың үстінде тәуелсіз семантикалық тегіздерді қолданатын уақытты қадамдастыру кезе Әрбір өзек адамның түсініктемесі синтактикалық немесе семантикалық қасиетін оптимизациялайды. Ағылшын тіліндегі екі төмен ресурс деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелер мәліметтер METEOR нәтижесінде күшті негізгі сызықтарды 14,70% деп жатқан көрсетеді. Құжаттың кітапшасының мәліметтерін басқа ұзындық бюджеттерінің түсініктерін түсініп алу үшін мәліметті мәлімет береді.', 'ms': 'Penapisan abstraktif pada panjang yang boleh dikawal adalah tugas mencabar dalam proses bahasa semulajadi. Ia lebih mencabar bagi domain di mana data latihan terbatas tersedia atau skenario di mana panjang ringkasan tidak diketahui sebelumnya. At the same time, when it comes to trusting machine-generated summaries, explaining how a summary was constructed in human-understandable terms may be critical.  Kami cadangkan Penapis Berberapa Aras (MLS), kaedah yang diawasi untuk membina ringkasan abstraktif dokumen teks pada panjang yang boleh dikawal. Pembolehkan kunci kaedah kami adalah mekanisme perhatian berbilang-kepala yang boleh diterjemahkan yang menghitung distribusi perhatian melalui dokumen input menggunakan tata kernel semantik bebas langkah masa. Setiap kernel optimumkan sifat sintaktik atau semantik yang boleh diterjemahkan oleh manusia. Eksperimen ekshaustive pada dua set data sumber rendah dalam bahasa Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa MLS melampaui garis dasar yang kuat sehingga 14.70% dalam skor METEOR. Evaluasi manusia ringkasan juga menunjukkan bahawa mereka menangkap konsep-konsep kunci dokumen pada berbeza-berbeza panjang-anggaran.', 'ml': 'നിയന്ത്രിക്കാവുന്ന നീളങ്ങളില്\u200d അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്ര കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നുവെങ്കിലും സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലെങ്കിലും കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യാല്\u200dക്ലാന്\u200dസ് ചെയ് അതേ സമയത്ത് മെഷീന്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d എത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d, മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ചുരുക്ക നിയന്ത്രിക്കാവുന്ന നീളം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് രേഖ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു മിടുത്ത് നില സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ താക്കോല്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്രതയുള്ള സെമാന്\u200dറിക് കെര്\u200dണലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു സമയപടി സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം കെര്\u200dണലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഓരോ കെര്\u200dണലും മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്കും വ്യാഖ്യാനിക്കാവുന്ന സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക്കോ സെമാന്റിക്ക് സ്വത്തുക ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d രണ്ട് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മെടെയോര്\u200d സ്കോരില്\u200d മുതല്\u200d 14. 70%  വിവിധ ദീര്\u200dഘബട്ടറില്\u200d രേഖയുടെ താക്കോല്\u200d ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതാണ് മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിശ്വാസം.', 'mt': 'Is-sommarju abstrattiv fit-tul kontrollabbli huwa kompitu ta’ sfida fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. It is even more challenging for domains where limited training data is available or scenarios in which the length of the summary is not known beforehand.  Fl-istess ħin, fir-rigward tal-fiduċja fis-sommarji ġġenerati mill-magni, li jispjegaw kif ġie mibni sommarju f’termini li jinftiehem mill-bniedem jista’ jkun kritiku. Aħna nipproponu Sommarjatur Multi-Livelli (MLS), metodu sorveljat biex jinbnew sommarji astratti ta’ dokument tat-test b’tul kontrollabbli. Il-mutur ewlieni tal-metodu tagħna huwa mekkaniżmu interpretabbli ta’ attenzjoni b’diversi intestaturi li jikkalkula d-distribuzzjoni tal-attenzjoni fuq dokument ta’ input bl-użu ta’ firxa ta’ qalba semantika indipendenti minn pass ta’ żmien. Kull kernel ottimizza proprjetà sintetika jew semantika interpretabbli mill-bniedem. Esperimenti eżawrjenti fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta b’riżorsi baxxi bl-Ingliż juru li MLS jaqbeż linji bażi b’saħħithom sa 14.70% fil-punteġġ METEOR. L-evalwazzjoni umana tas-sommarji tissuġġerixxi wkoll li dawn jaqbdu l-kunċetti ewlenin tad-dokument f’diversi baġits fit-tul.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэхэд хэцүү задалга юм. Хязгаарлагдсан суралцах өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг ашиглах эсвэл хувилбаруудын урт нь аль хэдийн мэдэгдэхгүй хэсэгт илүү хэцүү. Гэвч машины бий болсон хэмжээсүүдийг итгэх үед хүн төрөлхтний ойлголттой хэлбэрээр хэмжээсүүдийг хэрхэн бүтээсэн талаар тайлбарлах нь чухал. Бид олон түвшин дээд хэмжээний уулзалтын загвар (MLS), удирдлагатай урттай текст баримтын абстрактив хэмжээсүүдийг бүтээх хэрэгтэй арга загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний арга замын ач холбогдолтой нь олон толгой анхаарлын механизм юм. Энэ нь анхаарлын төвлөрүүлэлт өгөгдлийн баримтын дээр цаг хугацааны хамааралтай семантик гэрэл ашигладаг. Кернель бүр хүн төрөлхтний тухай илэрхийлж чадах синтактик эсвэл semantic property-г нэмэгдүүлдэг. Англи хэлний хоёр бага нөөцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд MLS нь METEOR оноо дээр хүчтэй суурь шулуунуудыг 14.70% хүртэл гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлт нь мөн бичиг баримтын түлхүүр ойлголтыг олон урт бюджетүүд дээр авах боломжтой байдаг.', 'no': 'Abstraktiv samansering ved kontrollerbare lengde er ein vanskeleg oppgåve i naturspråkshandtering. Det er til og med meir vanskeleg for domene der begrenset øvingsdata er tilgjengeleg eller scenarioar der lengden på sammendragen ikkje er kjent før. Samtidig, når det kommer til å tiltru maskinegenererte samandrag, forklarer korleis ein samandrag ble konstruert i menneskelig forstårbare vilkår kan vera kritisk. Vi foreslår fleire nivåsamandrag (MLS), eit overvakt metode for å konstruere abstraktive samandrag av eit tekstdokument med kontrollerbare lengd. Nøkkelen som er slått på metoden vår er ein tolkbar fleire hovudmekanisme for å rekna oppmerksomhet over eit inndatadokument med eit rekkjefølgje av tidsstyrke uavhengige semantiske kjerner. Kvar kjerne optimaliserer ein menneskelig syntaktisk eller semantisk eigenskap. Eksplosiv eksperimenter på to låg ressursdataset i engelsk viser at MLS utfører sterke baselinjer til 14,70% i METEOR- poeng. Den menneske evalueringa av sammendraga foreslår også at dei hentar nøkkelkonseptane for dokumentet på ulike lengdbbudsjettar.', 'pl': 'Abstrakcyjne podsumowanie na kontrolowanych długościach jest trudnym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Jeszcze trudniejsze jest to dla dziedzin, w których dostępne są ograniczone dane szkoleniowe lub scenariuszy, w których długość podsumowania nie jest wcześniej znana. Jednocześnie, jeśli chodzi o zaufanie maszynowym streszczeniom, wyjaśnienie, w jaki sposób podsumowanie zostało skonstruowane w zrozumiałych dla człowieka terminach, może mieć kluczowe znaczenie. Proponujemy Multi-Level Summarizer (MLS), nadzorowaną metodę konstruowania abstrakcyjnych streszczeń dokumentu tekstowego o kontrolowanej długości. Kluczowym elementem naszej metody jest interpretowalny wielogłowiowy mechanizm uwagi, który oblicza rozkład uwagi w dokumencie wejściowym przy użyciu tablicy niezależnych jąder semantycznych. Każde jądro optymalizuje interpretowalną przez człowieka właściwość składni lub semantyczną. Wyczerpujące eksperymenty na dwóch niskich zbiorach danych w języku angielskim pokazują, że MLS przewyższa silne linie bazowe o nawet 14,70% w wyniku METEOR. Ludzka ocena streszczeń sugeruje również, że uwzględniają one kluczowe pojęcia dokumentu w różnych budżetach długości.', 'sr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka na kontrolnom dužinu je izazovan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Još je izazovnije za domene gdje su dostupni ograničeni podaci o obuci ili scenariji u kojima dužina sažetka nije poznata ranije. U isto vreme, kad se radi o poverenju sažetaka iz mašine, objašnjavajući kako je sažetak izgrađen u ljudskim razumljivim uslovima, može biti kritičan. Predlažemo samarizeru višenivoa (MLS), nadzornu metodu da izgradimo abstraktivne sažetke teksta dokumenta na kontrolnom dužinu. Ključni omogućavajući našu metodu je interpretabilan multiglavni pažnji mehanizam koji računa distribuciju pažnje preko ulaznog dokumenta koristeći seriju nezavisnih semantičkih kernela. Svaki kernel optimizuje ljudski sintaktički ili semantički vlasnik. Eksplozivni eksperimenti na dva niza resursa podataka na engleskom jeziku pokazuju da MLS iznosi jake osnovne linije do 14,70% u rezultatu METEORa. Ljudska procjena sažetaka takođe ukazuje na to da uključuju ključne koncepte dokumenta u raznim budžetima dužine.', 'ro': 'Rezumatul abstract la lungimi controlabile este o sarcină dificilă în procesarea limbajului natural. Este și mai dificil pentru domeniile în care sunt disponibile date limitate de formare sau scenarii în care durata rezumatului nu este cunoscută în prealabil. În același timp, atunci când vine vorba de rezumatele generate de mașini, explicarea modului în care a fost construit un rezumat în termeni de înțeles uman poate fi critică. Propunem Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), o metodă supravegheată pentru a construi rezumate abstractive ale unui document text la lungimi controlabile. Activatorul cheie al metodei noastre este un mecanism de atenție interpretabil cu mai multe capete care calculează distribuția atenției pe un document de intrare folosind o serie de nuclee semantice independente de timp. Fiecare nucleu optimizează o proprietate sintactică sau semantică interpretabilă de om. Experimentele exhaustive pe două seturi de date cu resurse reduse în limba engleză arată că MLS depășește liniile de bază puternice cu până la 14,70% în scorul METEOR. Evaluarea umană a rezumatelor sugerează, de asemenea, că acestea captează conceptele cheie ale documentului la diferite lungimi bugete.', 'si': 'පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වේලාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය වැඩක ඒක තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ඩෝමේන් වලට තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මුද්ද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ නැහැ නැහැ  එකම වෙලාවෙන්, ඒක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, මිනිස්සු පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විස අපි ගොඩක් ලේවල් සංශ්\u200dයාපකය (MLS), පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ලේවල් වලට පාළුවක් විසින් පැත්තක් සංශ්\u200dයාපකය නිර්මාණ අපේ විධානයේ යතුර සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ අවධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් අවධානය සඳහා අවධානයක් පරි හැම කාර්නල්ම මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අනුවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් සංවේදනය නැත්නම් සැමැන්තික විශේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ අඩුම සම්පූර්ණ දත්ත සැට් දෙකට පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට MLS ශක්තිමත් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්ණ මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසයේ සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඔවුන් විවිධ විශේෂ බුද්ජේට්ස් වල ලොකු වි', 'so': 'Qiimeynta jimicsiga ah oo ku saabsan dhegta la ilaaliyo waa shaqo dhibaato leh oo ku baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah. It is even more challenging for domains where limited training data is available or scenarios in which the length of the summary is not known beforehand.  isla waqtigaas, marka ay u timaado kalsoonaanshaha machine-generay, wuxuu caddaynayaa siduu u dhisay dhawaaq dadka garashada leh oo ay muhiim u tahay. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa Summarizer heer badan (MLS), taas oo ah qaab ilaaliya ah oo aan dhisno abstractive summaris of a qoraal text document at controlled length. Qofka furaha ah ee awooddayadu waa mekaniisa aan turjumi karno oo kala duduwan, kaas oo xisaabta qaybinta daryeelka warqada input ku qoran, isticmaalaya tallaabo waqti ah oo aan aheyn semantic kernels. Qalab walba wuxuu u bedelaa hanti qofka lagu turjumi karo oo lagu turjumi karo dadka ama hanti semanti ah. Imtixaanka aad u baahan labada hoose-resource databases afka Ingiriis waxay muuqataa in MLS ka soo baxaa koox xoog badan oo ku qoran 14.70% ee METEOR score. Qiimeynta dadku wuxuu sidoo kale ka muuqanayaa in ay ku qabsadaan fikrada furan ee dukumentiga oo ay ku qoran yihiin qasnadaha kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தக்கூடிய நீளத்தில் Abstractive சுருக்கம் என்பது இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் சவாலியமான செயல். இது முன்னால் சுருக்க நீளம் தெரியவில்லை அதே நேரத்தில், இது இயந்திரம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்கம் நம்பிக்கை கொள்ளும் போது, மனித புரிந்து கொள்ளும் முக்கியமான வார்த்தைகளி நாம் பல- மட்டத்தில் சுருக்கம் (MLS) பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட நீளத்தில் உள்ள உரை ஆவணத்தை செயல்படுத்த ஒரு பராமரிக்கப்பட்ட முற எங்கள் முறைமையின் விசை செயல்பாட்டாளர் ஒரு பல தலைப்புகளின் கவனத்தை கணிப்பாக்கும் கருவி ஒவ்வொரு கருவியையும் மனிதன் மொழிபெயர்க்கக்கூடிய ஒத்திசைவு அல்லது அரைப்பு பண்பை மாற்றுகிறது. இரண்டு குறைந்த மூலத்தின் தரவுத்தளங்கள் மொழியில் உள்ள சோதனைகளில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது MLS மேல் 14. 70% மேல் METEOR புள்ளியில் மி குறிப்புகளின் மனிதன் மதிப்பிடுதல் மற்றும் அவர்கள் ஆவணத்தின் விசையான கருத்துக்களை பிடித்துக் கொள்ள விருப்பமான', 'sv': 'Abstraktiv sammanfattning vid kontrollerbara längder är en utmanande uppgift i naturlig språkbehandling. Det är ännu svårare för områden där det finns begränsade träningsdata eller scenarier där sammanfattningens längd inte är känd i förväg. Samtidigt, när det gäller att lita på maskingenererade sammanfattningar kan det vara avgörande att förklara hur en sammanfattning konstruerades i mänskligt begripliga termer. Vi föreslår Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), en övervakad metod för att konstruera abstrakta sammanfattningar av ett textdokument på kontrollerbara längder. Nyckeln till vår metod är en tolkningsbar flerskalig uppmärksamhetsmekanism som beräknar uppmärksamhetsfördelning över ett inmatningsdokument med hjälp av en rad tidsstegs oberoende semantiska kärnor. Varje kärna optimerar en syntaktisk eller semantisk egenskap som kan tolkas av människan. Utmattande experiment på två lågresursdatauppsättningar på engelska visar att MLS presterar bättre än starka baslinjer med upp till 14,70% i METEOR-poängen. Mänsklig utvärdering av sammanfattningarna tyder också på att de fångar de viktigaste begreppen i dokumentet i olika budgetar.', 'ur': 'کنٹرول کرنے کے قابل طول کے ذریعہ آب تراکٹیوں کی تعریف طبیعی زبان پرسس میں ایک مشکل کام ہے. یہ ڈومین کے لئے زیادہ مشکل ہے جہاں محدود ترکین ڈیٹے موجود ہیں یا سناریوں میں جن میں سامنے کی طول پہلے معلوم نہیں ہوتی۔ یہی موقع، جب یہ ماشین کے پیدا ہونے کے لئے اعتماد کرنے کے لئے آتا ہے، اس کی تعریف بتاتی ہے کہ انسان کے سمجھنے والے شرایطوں میں کیسے ساری بنائی گئی ہے، بہت اہم ہو سکتی ہے۔ ہم Multi-Level Summarizer (MLS) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک نظارت کی طریقہ ہے کہ ایک ٹیکسٹ ڈیکومٹ کی آب تراکٹیوں کو کنٹرول قابل طول پر بنا سکے۔ ہمارے طریقے کا کلید قابل کرنے والا ایک تعبیر قابل multi-headed attention mechanism ہے جو ایک اینپیٹ دکمیٹ پر توجه کا تقسیم کرتا ہے تایمٹ سٹیمٹی کرنل کے استعمال سے۔ Each kernel optimizes a human-interpretable syntactic or semantic property. انگلیسی میں دو کم سروسیز ڈیٹ سٹ پر مضبوط آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ MLS مضبوط بنسٹ لین پر 14.70% تک زیادہ مضبوط ہے۔ انسان کی ارزیابی بھی یہ بات ہے کہ وہ مختلف طول بوجٹوں میں دفتر کی کلیدی نظریں پکڑتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Shunday paytda, mashina yaratilgan qismlarga ishonch kelayotganda, inson tushunadigan xizmatlar qanday muhim bo'lishi mumkin deb o'rganadi. Biz bir necha darajada hisoblash usulini boshqarish mumkin bo'lgan muddatda to ʻgʻrilgan matn hujjatning avtomatik qismlarini yaratish usulini talab qilamiz. Ustunning qiymati yozuvchisi - bir necha sarlavha paydo bo'lgan muloqat taʼminlovchi mechanisdir. Hujjatni kiritish hujjatidan foydalanish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini hisoblash mumkin. Har bir kernel odamning tarjima qilinadigan syntactika yoki semantik xossasini moslash. Exhaustive experiments on two low-resource datasets in English show that MLS outperforms strong baselines by up to 14.70% in the METEOR score.  Qisqatlarni qiymatlash va hujjatning qiymatlarini boshqa uzun jadvalda qabul qilishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự tổng hợp ngẫu nhiên ở độ dài điều khiển là một thử thách trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Nó thậm chí còn khó khăn hơn đối với những khu vực có hạn chế dữ liệu đào tạo hoặc những viễn cảnh mà không biết trước về độ dài của bản tóm tắt. Tuy nhiên, về phần sự tin cậy của các bản tổng hợp máy, giải thích cách mà một bản tóm tắt được tạo ra theo cách con người hiểu được có thể là rất quan trọng. Chúng tôi đề xuất tóm tắt đa cấp (MLS), một phương pháp giám sát để xây dựng các bản tóm tắt trừu tượng của một tài liệu văn bản ở độ dài điều khiển. Chủ yếu của phương pháp này là một cơ chế tập trung đa đầu hiểu được sự chú ý chuyên phân phối sự chú ý qua một tài liệu nhập, sử dụng một loạt các hạt giống chữ thời gian độc lập. Mỗi hạt nhân dùng tối đa cú pháp thuật hay ngữ pháp. Các thí nghiệm kiệt sức trên hai nhà dữ liệu với nguồn ít tài nguyên bằng tiếng Anh cho thấy MLS hoàn thành hệ thống nền vững chắc từ tới 14.707bộ tộc trong điểm METEOR. Bản đánh giá nhân loại cũng cho thấy nó thu thập các khái niệm chủ chốt của tài liệu ở các ngân sách dài khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Абстрактивното обобщаване на контролируеми дължини е предизвикателна задача в обработката на естествения език. Това е още по-трудно за области, в които има ограничени данни за обучение или сценарии, в които продължителността на резюмето не е известна предварително. В същото време, когато става въпрос за доверие на машинно генерирани резюмета, обяснението как е направено резюме в разбираеми за човека термини може да бъде критично. Предлагаме многостепенен обобщаващ метод за изграждане на абстрактни резюмета на текстов документ с контролирани дължини. Ключовият позволител на нашия метод е интерпретируем многоглавен механизъм за внимание, който изчислява разпределението на вниманието върху входен документ, използвайки масив от семантични ядра, независими от времето. Всяко ядро оптимизира синтактично или семантично свойство. Изчерпателни експерименти с два набора от данни с нисък ресурс на английски показват, че MLS надминава силните базови линии с до 14,70% в резултат на METEOR. Оценката от човека на резюметата също показва, че те обхващат ключовите концепции на документа в различни бюджети.', 'da': 'Abstraktiv opsummering ved kontrollerbare længder er en udfordrende opgave i naturlig sprogbehandling. Det er endnu mere udfordrende for områder, hvor der foreligger begrænsede træningsdata, eller scenarier, hvor længden af resuméet ikke er kendt på forhånd. Samtidig kan det, når det kommer til at stole på maskingenererede resuméer, være kritisk at forklare, hvordan et resumé blev konstrueret i menneskelige forståelige termer. Vi foreslår Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), en overvåget metode til at konstruere abstrakte resuméer af et tekstdokument med kontrollerbare længder. Nøgleaktiveren i vores metode er en fortolkningsmekanisme med flere hoveder, der beregner opmærksomhedsfordeling over et inputdokument ved hjælp af en række tidstrinuafhængige semantiske kerner. Hver kerne optimerer en syntaktisk eller semantisk egenskab, der kan fortolkes af mennesker. Udmattende eksperimenter på to datasæt med lav ressource på engelsk viser, at MLS overgår stærke basislinjer med op til 14,70% i METEOR scoren. Menneskelige evalueringer af resuméerne tyder også på, at de indfanger de centrale begreber i dokumentet på forskellige budgetter.', 'nl': "Abstractieve samenvatting op controleerbare lengtes is een uitdagende taak in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Het is nog uitdagender voor domeinen waar beperkte trainingsgegevens beschikbaar zijn of scenario's waarin de lengte van de samenvatting vooraf niet bekend is. Tegelijkertijd, als het gaat om vertrouwen in machine-gegenereerde samenvattingen, kan het van cruciaal belang zijn om uit te leggen hoe een samenvatting is opgebouwd in menselijk begrijpelijke termen. We stellen Multi-level Summarizer (MLS) voor, een begeleide methode om abstracte samenvattingen van een tekstdocument op controleerbare lengtes te maken. De belangrijkste enabler van onze methode is een interpreteerbaar meerkoppig aandachtsmechanisme dat de aandachtsverdeling over een invoerdocument berekent met behulp van een array van timestep onafhankelijke semantische kernels. Elke kernel optimaliseert een syntactische of semantische eigenschap die door mensen kan worden geïnterpreteerd. Uitputtende experimenten op twee low-resource datasets in het Engels tonen aan dat MLS sterke baselines met maximaal 14,70% overtreft in de METEOR score. De menselijke evaluatie van de samenvattingen suggereert ook dat ze de belangrijkste concepten van het document in verschillende lengtebudgetten vastleggen.", 'hr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka na kontroliranoj dužini je izazovni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Još je izazovnije za domene u kojima su dostupni ograničeni podaci o obuci ili scenariji u kojima dužina sažetka prije nije poznata. U isto vrijeme, kad se radi o povjerenju sažetaka iz stroja, objašnjavanje kako je sažetak izgrađen u ljudskim razumljivim uvjetima može biti kritičan. Predlažemo samarizeru višerazine (MLS), nadziranom metodom za konstrukciju apstraktivnih sažetaka tekstnog dokumenta na kontrolnom dužinu. Ključni omogućavajući našu metodu je interpretabilan multiglavni pažnjski mehanizam koji računa distribuciju pažnje na ulaznom dokumentu koristeći seriju neovisnih semantičkih kernela. Svaka zrnca optimizira sintaktičku ili semantičku imovinu za ljudske interpretacije. Eksplozivni eksperimenti na dva niza resursa podataka na engleskom jeziku pokazuju da MLS iznosi jake osnovne linije do 14,70% u rezultatu METEORa. Ljudska procjena sažetaka također ukazuje na to da uključuju ključne koncepte dokumenta u raznim proračunima dužine.', 'de': 'Abstraktive Zusammenfassung in kontrollierbaren Längen ist eine anspruchsvolle Aufgabe in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Noch schwieriger ist es für Bereiche, in denen nur begrenzte Trainingsdaten verfügbar sind oder Szenarien, in denen die Länge der Zusammenfassung vorher nicht bekannt ist. Gleichzeitig kann es entscheidend sein, wenn es darum geht, maschinell generierten Zusammenfassungen zu vertrauen, zu erklären, wie eine Zusammenfassung in menschenverständlichen Begriffen konstruiert wurde. Wir schlagen Multi-Level Summarizer (MLS) vor, eine überwachte Methode zur Erstellung abstrakter Zusammenfassungen eines Textdokuments in kontrollierbaren Längen. Der Schlüssel-Enabler unserer Methode ist ein interpretierbarer mehrköpfiger Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der die Aufmerksamkeitsverteilung über ein Eingabedokument mithilfe eines Arrays von Zeitschrittunabhängigen semantischen Kernels berechnet. Jeder Kernel optimiert eine vom Menschen interpretierbare syntaktische oder semantische Eigenschaft. Umfangreiche Experimente an zwei ressourcenarmen Datensätzen in englischer Sprache zeigen, dass MLS starke Baselines um bis zu 14,70% im METEOR-Score übertrifft. Die menschliche Bewertung der Zusammenfassungen deutet auch darauf hin, dass sie die Schlüsselkonzepte des Dokuments in verschiedenen Längsbudgets erfassen.', 'id': 'Penapisan abstraktif pada panjang yang dapat dikendalikan adalah tugas yang menantang dalam proses bahasa alami. It is even more challenging for domains where limited training data is available or scenarios in which the length of the summary is not known beforehand.  Pada saat yang sama, ketika itu berkaitan dengan mempercayai ringkasan yang dibuat oleh mesin, menjelaskan bagaimana ringkasan dibangun dalam istilah yang dapat dimengerti manusia mungkin kritis. Kami mengusulkan Penapis Multi-Level (MLS), metode yang diawasi untuk membangun ringkasan abstraktif dari dokumen teks pada panjang yang dapat dikendalikan. Pembolehkan kunci dari metode kita adalah mekanisme perhatian multi-kepala yang dapat diterjemahkan yang menghitung distribusi perhatian melalui dokumen masukan menggunakan array dari kernel semantis independen langkah waktu. Setiap kernel optimisasi sifat sintaktik atau semantis yang dapat diterjemahkan oleh manusia. Eksperimen eksuasif pada dua set data sumber daya rendah dalam bahasa Inggris menunjukkan bahwa MLS melampaui garis dasar yang kuat sehingga 14,70% dalam skor METEOR. Evaluasi manusia dari ringkasan juga menunjukkan bahwa mereka menangkap konsep kunci dokumen di berbagai anggaran panjang.', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری مطلق در طول\u200cهای کنترل قابل کنترل یک کار مشکل در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. این برای دامنه\u200cهایی که اطلاعات آموزش محدودیت دارند، یا سیناریو\u200cهایی که طول عمومی پیش از این شناخته نمی\u200cشوند، بیشتر مشکل\u200cتر است. در همین زمان، زمانی که به اطمینان جمعیت\u200cهای ساخته شده از ماشین اعتماد می\u200cکند، توضیح می\u200cدهد که چگونه جمعیت در شرایط متوجه بشر ساخته شده است، ممکن است مهم باشد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم Summarizer MultiLevel (MLS) یک روش تحت نظر برای ساختن جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای abstractive از یک سند متن در طول قابل کنترل. کلید فعال کننده\u200cی روش ما یک مکانیسم توجه بسیاری از سر\u200cهای متنوع است که توجه توجه را بر روی یک سند وارد می\u200cکند با استفاده از یک مجموعه از مرحله\u200cهای مرحله\u200cهای سیمانتیک مستقل است. هر کرن یک ویژه\u200cای که قابل تعبیر انسان باشد یا سیمانتیک را بهترین می\u200cکند. آزمایشات تحقیق در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای کم منبع در انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد که MLS از خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای قوی تا ۱۴.۷۰ درصد در امتیاز METEOR برتری می\u200cکند. ارزیابی انسانی از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها همچنین پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که آنها نظریه\u200cهای کلید سند را در طولانی\u200cهای مختلف بگیرند.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa kutolewa kwa muda wa kudhibitiwa ni kazi ya changamoto katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Ni changamoto zaidi kwa maeneo ambayo taarifa za mafunzo mipaka zinapatikana au matukio ambayo muda wa muhimu haujajua kabla. Wakati huohuo, inapotokea kwenye muhtasari wa kuamini mashine iliyotengenezwa, akieleza jinsi muhtasari ulivyojengwa kwa maneno ya kibinadamu yanaweza kuwa muhimu. Tunapendekeza Mkutano Mkuu wa ngazi nyingi (MLS), njia inayofuatiliwa ili kujenga muhtasari wa maandishi yasiyo na maandishi yanayodhibiti. Mtengenezaji muhimu wa mbinu yetu ni mfumo wa kutafsiri vifaa vingi vinavyofahamika ambavyo unahesabu usambazaji wa hisia juu ya nyaraka ya input kwa kutumia mfululizo wa hatua huru za kimapenzi. Kila vifaa vinaweza kutengeneza utaratibu wa kibinadamu au utaratibu wa sekunde. Exhaustive experiments on two low-resource datasets in English show that MLS outperforms strong baselines by up to 14.70% in the METEOR score.  Utafiti wa kiangazi cha binadamu pia unapendekeza kuwa wanatumia dhana muhimu ya nyaraka katika bajeti mbalimbali za urefu.', 'ko': '요약 길이 제어는 자연 언어 처리에서 도전적인 임무이다.교육 데이터가 유한한 분야나 총결산의 길이가 사전에 알 수 없는 장면은 더욱 도전적이다.또한 기계가 생성한 요약을 신뢰할 때 요약이 인류가 이해할 수 있는 용어로 어떻게 구축되었는지 설명하는 것이 중요하다.우리는 다중 요약기 (MLS) 를 제시했는데, 이것은 제어할 수 있는 길이로 텍스트 문서를 구성하는 데 사용되는 감독적인 방법이다.우리의 방법의 관건은 해석할 수 있는 다중 주의 메커니즘이다. 이 메커니즘은 시간보와 무관한 일련의 의미 핵계산을 사용하여 문서의 주의 분포를 입력한다.모든 내핵은 인류가 해석할 수 있는 문법이나 의미 속성을 최적화시켰다.두 개의 영어 저자원 데이터 집합에서 진행된 상세한 실험에 의하면 MLS는 METEOR 득점 방면에서 강기선보다 14.70% 높았다.요약에 대한 인류의 평가는 문서의 관건적인 개념을 서로 다른 길이로 포착했다는 것을 보여준다.', 'tr': 'Kontrol edilebilir uzalyklarda Abstraktiv terjime edil tebigy dil işleýişinde a ňsat täsirli zadyr. Bu sahypalar üçin esasy okuwçylyk maglumaty bar ýa-da synariolar ýerleşýän sahypalar üçin has gaty kynçylyk. Şol wagtda, maşynyň üretilen toparlaryna ynanmasy üçin, adama düşünýän terjime nähili guralýandygyny düşündirip bilýär. Biz Multi-level Toplaýyşçy Biziň metodamyzyň açy örneklendirilýan bir multi-başlyk üns mekanizmadyr. Bu sistemi garaşsyz semantik kerneler üçin bir girdi senediň üstünde üns paýlaşmasyny hasaplaýar. Her kernel bir insan-terjime edilebilir sintaktik ya da semantik hassasını optimize edir. Iňlisçe iki iň aşak ressurs veri setirinde möhüm depler MLS METEOR netijesinde 14.70% ýola getirilýär diýip görkezilýär. Toparjyklaryň ynsan çykyşyny hem bu senediň açyk düşünjelerini düşürmegini maslahat berýär.', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi abstraktiv në gjatësi të kontrollueshme është një detyrë sfiduese në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Është edhe më e vështirë për fushat ku të dhënat e kufizuara të trajnimit janë në dispozicion apo skenarë ku gjatësia e përmbledhjes nuk është e njohur më parë. Në të njëjtën kohë, kur vjen puna për të besuar përmbledhjet e prodhuara nga makina, duke shpjeguar se si një përmbledhje u ndërtua në terma njerëzore-kuptueshme mund të jetë kritike. Ne propozojmë një përmbledhës shumë niveli (MLS), një metodë të mbikqyrur për të ndërtuar përmbledhje abstraktive të një dokumenti teksti me gjatësi të kontrollueshme. Aktivizuesi kyç i metodës sonë është një mekanizëm i interpretueshëm i vëmendjes me shumë koka që llogarit shpërndarjen e vëmendjes mbi një dokument të hyrjes duke përdorur një sërë bërthamesh semantike të pavarura në hapin e kohës. Çdo kernel optimizon një pronësi sintaktike apo semantike të interpretueshme nga njeriu. Eksperimentet ekshaustive në dy grupe të dhënash me burime të ulëta në anglisht tregojnë se MLS kalon linjat bazë të forta me deri në 14.70% në rezultatin METEOR. Vlerësimi njerëzor i përmbledhjeve sugjeron gjithashtu se ato kapin konceptet kyçe të dokumentit në buxhete të ndryshme gjatësie.', 'am': 'በአካባቢው ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል የሚደረግ ግንኙነት አዋጅ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ዘመን ሳይታወቅ የተደረገው የግንኙነት መረጃዎች ወይም የመጠቅለያው ርዝመት በተገኘበት ወይም በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት ለመቀናቀል የሚደረገው ግንኙነት ይጨመርበታል፡፡ በዚያው ሰዓት የሰው-አዋቂው ቋንቋ እንዴት እንደተደረገ ተቃውሞ እንዲታወቅ በመታመን የመሳሳይ አቃውሞ በተደረገ ጊዜ፡፡ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ ማጠቃለያ (MLS) የተጠበቀው የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ በተቆጣጠረ ርዝመት ላይ ነው፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ቁልፍ አካባቢ የክፍለ አካላት የተመረጠው ብዙአናት የጥያቄ አካላትን በተለየ ሰነድ ማሰናከል በተለየ የስሜናዊ አርእስት አክሊል ነው፡፡ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች በንግልዝኛ ውስጥ በሁለት የዋይ resource ዳታተሮች ላይ የውጭ ፈተናዎች MLS በሜቴOR ክፍል ላይ 14.70 በመቶ የበረታች መደገፊያዎችን ያሳያል፡፡ የሰው ጉዳዩ ማስታወቂያው ደግሞ የሰነዱን የቁልፍ ጉዳይ እየረጅም አዋጅ እንዲያዙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ապլակտիվ համառոտագրությունը վերահսկելի երկարությամբ մարտահրավեր է բնական լեզվի վերամշակում: Դա նույնիսկ ավելի դժվար է այնպիսի ոլորտներում, որտեղ հասանելի են սահմանափակ ուսուցման տվյալներ կամ սցենարներ, որտեղ համառոտագրության երկարությունը նախկինում չգիտի: Միևնույն ժամանակ, երբ խոսքը վերաբերում է մեքենայի կողմից ստեղծված համառոտագրություններին վստահելուն, բացատրելով, թե ինչպես է համառոտագրությունը կառուցվել մարդկային-հասկանալի տեսանկյունից, կարող է կարևոր լինել: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմամամամակարդակի համառոտագրություն (MLS), որը վերահսկված մեթոդ է տեքստի փաստաթղթի վերացական համառոտագրությունների կառուցման համար վերահսկելի երկարությամբ: Մեր մեթոդի հիմնական հնարավորությունը բազմագլխավոր ուշադրության մեխանիզմն է, որը հաշվարկում է ուշադրության տարածումը ներմուծի փաստաթղթի մեջ օգտագործելով անկախ ժամանակաքայլերի սեմանտիկ միջուկներ: Յուրաքանչյուր միջուկը օպտիմացնում է մարդկային մեկնաբանելի սինտակտիկ կամ սեմանտիկ հատկություն: Անգլերենում երկու ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ MLS-ը գերազանցում է ուժեղ հիմնական գծերը մինչև 14.70 տոկոսի մեջ: Մարդկային համառոտագրությունների գնահատումը նաև ցույց է տալիս, որ դրանք ներառում են փաստաթղթի հիմնական գաղափարները տարբեր երկար բյուջեսում:', 'af': "Abstraktiewe opsomming by beheerbare lengte is 'n pragtige taak in natuurlike taal verwerking. It is even more challenging for domeins where limited training data is available or scenarios in which the length of the summary is not known beforehand. Op dieselfde tyd, wanneer dit kom om te vertrou masjien genereerde opsommings, te verduidelik hoe 'n opsomming in mens-verstaanbaarde terme gekonstrukteer is, dalk kan krities wees. Ons voorstel veelvuldige vlak opsommariseerder (MLS),  'n ondersoekte metode om abstraktiewe opsommings van' n teksdokument te konstrukteer by beheerbare lengte. Die sleutel geaktiveer van ons metode is 'n uittelbare multi- headed aandag mekanisme wat bereken aandag verspreiding oor' n invoer dokument met gebruik van' n skikking van tydstap onafhanklike semantiese kernels. Elke kernel optimaliseer 'n mens- interpreteer sintakteel of semantiese eienskap. Exhaustiewe eksperimente op twee lae- hulpbron datastel in Engels vertoon dat MLS sterke basisline uitvoer by tot 14. 70% in die METEOR telling. Die menslike evaluering van die opsommings beveel ook dat hulle die sleutel konsepte van die dokument op verskillende lengte-budgete opneem.", 'az': 'Kontrol edil…ô bil…ôc…ôk uzunluńüunda abstraktiv t…ôbii dil iŇül…ôm…ôsind…ô √ß…ôtin bir iŇüdir. Bu, qńĪsńĪr t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn faydalanmasńĪ v…ô ya t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn uzunluńüunu …ôvv…ôl bilm…ôdiyi sah…ôl…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn daha √ßox √ß…ôtindir. AynńĪ zamanda maŇüńĪn yaratdńĪńüńĪ toplantńĪlara g√ľvenilir, insanlarńĪn anlaŇüńĪlabilir Ňü…ôkild…ô toplantńĪ nec…ô in Ňüa edildiyini a √ßńĪqlayńĪr. Biz √ßoxlu s…ôviyy…ô ToplaŇüdńĪrńĪcńĪ (MLS) t…ôklif edirik, kontrol edil…ô uzunluńüunda metin bel…ôdinin abstraktiv toplamlarńĪnńĪ inŇüa etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn g√∂zl…ôyir bir metodu. Bizim metodumuzun anahtar f…ôallaŇüdńĪrńĪcńĪ bir √ßoxlu baŇülńĪq t…ôsiri mehanizmidir ki, bir girdi d√∂k√ľm√ľn√ľn √ľz…ôrind…ô t…ôsiri dańüńĪtńĪlńĪŇüńĪnńĪ m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edir, zaman adńĪmńĪ bańüńĪmsńĪz semantik kernel…ôrini istifad…ô edir. H…ôr kernel insan yorumlayńĪcńĪ sintaktik ya da semantik malńĪnńĪ optimizl…ôyir. ńįngilizce dilind…ô iki d√ľŇü√ľk ressurs veril…ônl…ôrin istifad…ô edil…ôn t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrin MLS METEOR n√∂qt…ôsind…ô 14,70%-…ô q…ôd…ôr q√ľvv…ôtli baz √ß…ôtinl…ôrini g√∂st…ôrir. H…ôm√ßinin insanlarńĪn qiym…ôti bel…ô g√∂st…ôrir ki, bel…ôdinin d√ľzg√ľn fikirl…ôrini m√ľxt…ôlif uzunluńüu budŇĺetlarńĪnda tutarlar.', 'bn': 'নিয়ন্ত্রণের দীর্ঘ দীর্ঘে আবশ্যক সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় একটি চ্যালেঞ্জিক কাজ এমনকি ডোমেইনের জন্য এটি আরো চ্যালেঞ্জ যেখানে সীমিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে অথবা সংক্ষেপের দীর্ঘকাল আগে না জানা  একই সাথে যখন এটা মেশিনের বিশ্বাসের সারসংক্ষেপে আসে, তখন ব্যাখ্যা করে যে মানুষ-বুঝতে পারে কিভাবে একটি সারাম্প্রসার তৈরি করা হয়েছে। আমরা মাল্টি স্তর সামার্মারিজার (এমএলএস) প্রস্তাব করছি নিয়ন্ত্রিত দীর্ঘদিনে একটি টেক্সট নথি নির্মাণ করার জন্য একটি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা পদ্ধতি। আমাদের পদ্ধতির মুক্তি সক্রিয় হচ্ছে একটি অনেক মাধ্যমের মনোযোগের মাধ্যম যা একটি ইনপুট নথির উপর মনোযোগ বিতরণ হিসেবে গণনা করে যাচ্ছে সময়ের স্বাধীন স প্রত্যেক কের্নেল মানব-ব্যাখ্যাত সিন্ট্যাকটিক বা সেম্যান্টিক সম্পত্তি অপ্রিয় করে। ইংরেজি ভাষায় দুটি কম-রিসোর্স ডাটাসেটে বেশ কঠিন পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করছে যে এমএলএস মেটেওর স্কোরে প্রায় ১৪. Human evaluation of the summaries also suggests that they capture the key concepts of the document at various length-budgets.', 'bs': 'Abstraktivna sažetka na kontrolnom dužinu je izazovan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Još je izazovnije za domene gdje su dostupni ograničeni podaci o obuci ili scenariji u kojima dužina sažetka prije nije poznata. U isto vrijeme, kad se radi o povjerenju sažetaka iz mašine, objašnjavajući kako je sažetak izgrađen u ljudskim razumljivim uvjetima, može biti kritičan. Predlažemo samarizeru višerazina (MLS), nadziranom metodom za konstrukciju abstraktivnih sažetaka tekstnog dokumenta na kontrolnom dužinu. Ključni omogućavajući našu metodu je interpretabilan multiglavni pažnji mehanizam koji računa distribuciju pažnje preko ulaznog dokumenta koristeći seriju nezavisnih semantičkih kernela. Svaki kernel optimizira ljudski sintaktički ili semantički vlasnik. Eksplozivni eksperimenti na dva niza resursa podataka na engleskom jeziku pokazuju da MLS iznosi jake osnovne linije do 14,70% u rezultatu METEORa. Ljudska procjena sažetaka također ukazuje na to da su uhvatili ključne koncepte dokumenta na raznim budžetima dužine.', 'ca': "La sumarització abstracta a llargues controlables és una tasca difícil en el processament natural del llenguatge. It is even more challenging for domains where limited training data is available or scenarios in which the length of the summary is not known beforehand.  Al mateix temps, quan es tracta de confiar en resumes generats per màquina, explicant com es va construir un resum en termes comprensibles poden ser crítics. Proposem un Resumerador Multinivell (MLS), un mètode supervisat per construir resumes abstractius d'un document de text a llargues controlables. L'activador clau del nostre mètode és un mecanisme d'atenció multicabeça interpretable que calcula la distribució d'atenció sobre un document d'entrada utilitzant una sèmica de núcles semàntics independents en un pas de temps. Cada nucli optimitza una propietat sinàctica o semàntica interpretable per humans. Experiments exhaustius en dos conjunts de dades de baix recursos en anglès mostran que MLS supera línies de base fortes fins al 14,70% en la puntuació METEOR. L'evaluació humana dels resums també suggereix que captin els conceptes clau del document a diversos pressupostos de llargada.", 'cs': 'Abstrakční shrnutí v kontrolovatelných délkách je náročným úkolem při zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Je to ještě náročnější pro domény, kde jsou k dispozici omezené údaje o tréninku nebo scénáře, ve kterých délka shrnutí není předem známa. Zároveň, pokud jde o důvěru strojově generovaných shrnutí, může být kritické vysvětlení, jak bylo shrnutí sestaveno v člověku srozumitelných termínech. Navrhujeme Multi-Level Summarizer (MLS), kontrolovanou metodu pro konstrukci abstraktivních souhrnů textového dokumentu v kontrolovatelných délkách. Klíčovým způsobem naší metody je interpretovatelný vícehlavý mechanismus pozornosti, který vypočítá distribuci pozornosti nad vstupním dokumentem pomocí pole časově nezávislých sémantických jáder. Každé jádro optimalizuje člověkem interpretovatelnou syntaktickou nebo sémantickou vlastnost. Úplné experimenty na dvou datových sadách s nízkými zdroji v angličtině ukazují, že MLS překonává silné základní linie až o 14,70% ve skóre METEOR. Lidské hodnocení shrnutí také naznačuje, že zachycují klíčové koncepty dokumentu v různých délkách rozpočtu.', 'et': 'Abstraktne kokkuvõte kontrollitavates pikkustes on looduskeele töötlemisel keeruline ülesanne. See on veelgi keerulisem valdkondades, kus koolitusandmed on piiratud, või stsenaariumides, kus kokkuvõtte pikkus ei ole eelnevalt teada. Samal ajal võib masinapõhiste kokkuvõtete usaldamisel olla kriitiline selgitada, kuidas kokkuvõte koostati inimesele arusaadavas mõistes. Pakume välja mitmetasandilise kokkuvõtte (Multi-Level Summarizer, MLS), järelevalvemeetodi tekstidokumendi abstraktsete kokkuvõtete koostamiseks kontrollitavates pikkustes. Meie meetodi peamine võimaldaja on tõlgendatav mitmepealine tähelepanumehhanism, mis arvutab tähelepanu jaotuse sisenddokumendi üle, kasutades ajasammul sõltumatuid semantilisi tuumasid. Iga kernel optimeerib inimese tõlgendatavat süntaktilist või semantilist omadust. Kahe ingliskeelse vähese ressursiga andmekogumiga tehtud ammendavad eksperimendid näitavad, et MLS on METEOR skoori järgi tugevatest lähtejoontest kuni 14,70%. Kokkuvõtete inimlik hindamine näitab ka, et need hõlmavad dokumendi põhikontseptsioone erinevates eelarvetes.', 'fi': 'Abstrakti yhteenveto hallittavissa olevilla pituuksilla on haastava tehtävä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Se on vieläkin haastavampaa aloilla, joilla on rajallista koulutustietoa tai skenaarioissa, joissa tiivistelmän pituutta ei tiedetä etukäteen. Samalla konepohjaisten tiivistelmien luotettavuuden kannalta kriittistä voi olla selittää, miten tiivistelmä on rakennettu ihmisen ymmärrettävästi. Ehdotamme Multi-level Summarizer (MLS) -menetelmää, jonka avulla voidaan rakentaa abstraktiivisia yhteenvetoja tekstidokumentista säädettävissä olevilla pituuksilla. Menetelmämme tärkein mahdollistaja on tulkittava monipäinen huomiomekanismi, joka laskee huomiojakauman syöttödokumentin päälle käyttämällä useita aikavaiheista riippumattomia semanttisia ytimiä. Jokainen ydin optimoi ihmisen tulkittavan syntaktisen tai semanttisen ominaisuuden. Kahdella englanninkielisellä vähävaraisella aineistolla tehdyt perusteelliset kokeet osoittavat, että MLS suoriutuu METEOR-pisteissä jopa 14,70% vahvoista perusviivoista. Tiivistelmien inhimillinen arviointi viittaa myös siihen, että niissä käsitellään asiakirjan keskeisiä käsitteitä eri pituisina budjeteina.', 'sk': 'Abstraktivno povzemanje v nadzorovanih dolžinah je zahtevna naloga pri obdelavi naravnega jezika. To je še bolj zahtevno za področja, kjer so na voljo omejeni podatki o usposabljanju ali scenarije, v katerih dolžina povzetka ni znana vnaprej. Hkrati pa je ključnega pomena, ko gre za zaupanje strojno ustvarjenim povzetkom, pojasnitev, kako je bil povzetek sestavljen v človeško razumljivih izrazih. Predlagamo Multi-level Summarizer (MLS), nadzorovano metodo za izdelavo abstraktivnih povzetkov besedilnega dokumenta v nadzorovanih dolžinah. Ključni omogočitelj naše metode je razložljiv večglavni mehanizem pozornosti, ki izračuna porazdelitev pozornosti prek vhodnega dokumenta z uporabo niza semantičnih jedrc neodvisnih časovnih korakov. Vsako jedro optimizira človeško razložljivo sintaktično ali semantično lastnost. Izčrpni eksperimenti na dveh nizkih podatkovnih nizkih virov v angleščini kažejo, da MLS presega močne osnovne črte za do 14,70% v rezultatu METEOR. Človeška ocena povzetkov prav tako kaže, da ključne koncepte dokumenta zajemajo v različnih dolžinskih proračunih.', 'jv': 'Subtraction Ora iso nggawe barang nggawe dolanan sing ditambah nggawe Perintah dhéwé, iso nggawe Perintah dhéwé durung ono wektu nggawe Perintah dhéwé. Sampeyan nganggo sampeyan, pas kuwi nggawe Perintah perusahaan-ngregani ora bisa digawso barang nggawe barang-perusahaan Manual We proposal Multi-evel Cumarzer (MLS), a super Vised method to rebute absolute sums of a text document at control length. Where am I All Kernel Defs Wanggalih wong liyane ng resmi dadi nggawe sapa ngono iki dadi tanggal luwih sabên nggawe barang-buddy.', 'ha': "Sura'ura na fastractive a cikin kunyar da za'a iya lissafa, shi ne wani mai gaura a cikin jarraba harshen na'ura. Yana kasa ƙaranci wa daidai wanda za'a iya sãmun data masu amfani da wanda aka ƙayyade wa zaman shawara ko tsorama wanda ba'a san tsawo ba a gabãni. A lokacin da za ta gaskata zuwa masu amintar da mashine da aka ƙãga, yana bayyana bayani yadda an gina ƙarshen cikin tsarin mutum masu fahimta ya kasance muhimmi. Tuna goyyar da Jami'ar Kwamfyuta mai yawa (MLS), wata hanyoyi mai tsaro da za'a ƙiƙiro tsaro na takardar littafin da ke cikin tsawo mai lissafa. Mai amfani da maɓallin hanyarmu shi ne an fassara zane-zane masu fassarawa na multi-header, wanda yana ƙidãya raba zane masu nau'i kan takardar inputi da wani tsari na daban-dabam wanda ba'a daidaita kernel na semantic. Kowace kernel na ƙayyade wani abu mai fassarawa da mutum mai fassarawa na sami'a ko na semantic. Exhaustic jarrabãwa na biyu masu daidaita ma'anar-resource cikin English show that MLS performs strong base lines by up to 14.70% in the MEMEMEOR score. Bayani na mutum cikin ƙari, yana son cẽwa su ɗauki maɓallin takardar cikin bajekin-bajeti dabam-dabam.", 'he': 'סדרה אסטרקטיבית בארוכות ניתן לשלוט היא משימה מאתגרת בעבודת שפת טבעית. זה אפילו יותר מאתגר לתחומים שבו נתוני אימון מוגבל זמינים או תרחישים שבו אורך הסכם לא ידוע מראש. At the same time, when it comes to trusting machine-generated summaries, explaining how a summary was constructed in human-understandable terms may be critical.  אנו מציעים סאמריזר ברמה רבה (MLS), שיטה מבוקשת לבנות סאמרים אסטרקטיביים של מסמך טקסט בארוכות ניתן לשלוט. המפתח המאפשר של השיטה שלנו הוא מנגנון תשומת לב רב-ראשי אפשרי לפרש שמחשב פיצוץ תשומת לב מעל מסמך הכניסה באמצעות מגוון של גרעיני סמנטיים עצמאיים שלב זמן. כל גרעין אופטימיזם רכוש סינטקטי או סמנטי אפשרי לפרשנות אנושית. ניסויים מיותקים על שני קבוצות מידע משאבים נמוכים באנגלית מראים ש MLS מעלים קווי בסיס חזקים עד 14.70% בתוצאה METEOR. הערכה האנושית של הסרטים מציעה גם שהם מכילים את הרעיונות המרכזים של המסמך בתקציבים ארוכים שונים.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོས་རུང་བའི་རིང་ཚད་ལ་བརྩོན་དགོས་བའི་ལས་འགན་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་natural སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལས་འགུལ་དག་ མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་དོན་ཚན་དག་སྔོན་མ་ཤེས་པའི་བསྒུལ་སློང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག དུས་ཚང་གཅིག་མཚུངས། འདི་ནི་ལག་ལེན་ཡིད་རྟོན་པའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་རྣམས་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་སྐབས་སུ། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་བཅུད་སྡུད་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ། The key enabler of our method is an interpretable multi-headed attention mechanism that computes attention distribution over an input document using an array of timestep independent semantic kernels. Each kernel optimizes a human-interpretable syntactic or semantic property. དབྱིན་ཡིག་ནང་གི་མི་རྫུན་འབྱུང་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་ནས་དབྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་ནས་MLS་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རིམ་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་བྱེ མཛུབ་འབྲས་ཐོག་གི་མིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་རྩོམ་འབྲས་འདི་ལ་འཛིན་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུ་རྟོགས་འདོད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'CharacterBERT : Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'fr': 'CharacterBert\xa0: Réconcilier ElMo et BERT pour les représentations de vocabulaire ouvert au niveau du mot à partir de personnages', 'ar': 'CharacterBERT: التوفيق بين ELMo و BERT لتمثيلات المفردات المفتوحة على مستوى الكلمات من الشخصيات', 'pt': 'CharacterBERT: reconciliando ELMo e BERT para representações de vocabulário aberto de caracteres de nível de palavra', 'es': 'CharacterBert: Conciliación de ELmo y BERT para representaciones de vocabulario abierto a nivel de palabras de personajes', 'zh': 'CharacterBERT:和 ELMo BERT,以符单词级开词汇', 'ja': 'CharacterBERT:文字からのWordレベルのオープンボキャブラリ表現のためのELMoとBERTの調整', 'ru': 'CharacterBERT: Согласование ELMo и BERT для текстовых представлений открытого словаря от персонажей', 'hi': 'CharacterBERT: शब्दों के लिए ELMo और BERT Reconciling-स्तर ओपन-शब्दावली प्रतिनिधित्व वर्णों से', 'ga': 'CharacterBERT: ELMo agus BERT a thabhairt le chéile le haghaidh Léirithe Focal Oscailte ó Charachtair', 'hu': 'CharacterBERT: ELMo és BERT összeegyeztetése szószintű nyílt szókincsképviseletekhez karakterekből', 'el': 'Συμφιλίωση ELMo και BERT για αναπαραστάσεις ανοιχτού λεξιλογίου σε επίπεδο λέξεων από χαρακτήρες', 'ka': 'სიტყვარBERT: ELMo და BERT სიტყვართა დონეზე გახსნა სიტყვარულის გამოსახულებებისთვის', 'it': 'CharacterBERT: Riconciliazione di ELMo e BERT per rappresentazioni di vocabolario aperto a livello Word', 'kk': 'Таңба', 'lt': 'BERT simbolis: ELMo ir BERT suderinimas žodžių lygio atviro žodyno atstovavimams iš simbolių', 'mk': 'Знак', 'ml': 'അക്ഷരര്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ട്: വാക്ക്- നില വാക്കുകള്\u200d തുറന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Aksara', 'mt': 'CharacterBERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'no': 'TeiknbertBERT: Gjenoppretting ELMo og BERT for ordnivå opna ordbokstavar frå teikn', 'pl': 'CharacterBERT: Pogodzenie ELMo i BERT dla otwartych słowników na poziomie słowa z znaków', 'ro': 'CharacterBERT: Reconcilierea ELMo și BERT pentru reprezentarea vocabularului deschis la nivel Word din caractere', 'mn': 'Хүсэг БЕРТ: ЕЛМО болон БЕРТ үг-түвшинд нээлттэй үг хэлний үзүүлэлт', 'so': 'QUnicodeControlCharacter', 'sr': 'KarakterBERT: Uspoređenje ELMo i BERT za otvorene rečne predstave na nivou riječi iz karaktera', 'si': 'අක්ෂර', 'sv': 'CharacterBERT: Att förena ELMo och BERT för Word-nivå öppna ordförråd representationer från tecken', 'ur': 'CharacterBERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'ta': 'எழுத்துரு பெர்ட்: எழுத்துக்களிலிருந்து ELMo மற்றும் BERT சொல்- மட்டத்திற்கான திறந்த சொல்வளக் குறிப்பிடுதல்', 'uz': 'KChart', 'vi': 'Kí tự Mở từ ký tự', 'hr': 'KarakterBERT: Uspoređenje ELMo i BERT za otvorene riječične predstave iz znakova', 'nl': 'CharacterBERT: het combineren van ELMo en BERT voor woordelijke open woordenschat representaties uit tekens', 'bg': 'Съвместяване на ЕЛМО и БЕРТ за представяне на отворен речник на ниво думи от знаци', 'da': 'CharacterBERT: Forening af ELMo og BERT for Word-niveau åbent ordforråd repræsentationer fra tegn', 'id': 'Karakter', 'de': 'CharacterBERT: Abstimmung von ELMo und BERT für offene Vokabeldarstellungen auf Word-Ebene aus Zeichen', 'fa': 'CharacterBERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'ko': 'Character BERT: ELMo와 BERT를 조화시켜 문자의 단어급 개방어휘 표시를 실현한다', 'sw': 'BERT: Kupendekeza ELMo na BERT kwa ajili ya Representations from Characters', 'tr': 'Karakter', 'af': 'KarakterBERT: Herstelling ELMo en BERT vir Woord- Vlak Open- Voorwoordeboek Voorstellings Van Karakters', 'sq': 'CharacterBERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'az': 'Karakter', 'bn': 'অক্ষর বেরেট: অক্ষর থেকে অক্ষরের প্রতিনিধির জন্য ELMo এবং BERT ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'BELT: Համակերպում է ELMo և BELT բաց-բաց բառարանի ներկայացումների համար', 'bs': 'KarakterBERT: Uspoređenje ELMo i BERT za otvorene riječne predstave iz znakova', 'am': 'BERT: ELMo እና BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations from Characters', 'cs': 'CharacterBERT: Sladění ELMo a BERT pro zastoupení otevřené slovní zásoby na úrovni slov z znaků', 'fi': 'CharacterBERT: ELMo:n ja BERT:n yhteensovittaminen sanatason avoimen sanaston esittämiseen merkeistä', 'ca': 'CharacterBERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'et': 'CharacterBERT: ELMo ja BERT ühitamine sõnatasemel avatud sõnavara esitamiseks märkidest', 'sk': 'CharacterBERT: uskladitev ELMo in BERT za predstavitve besednega besedišča iz znakov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'caret', 'he': 'CharacterBERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters', 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ།BERT: Reconciling ELMo and BERT for Word-Level Open-Vocabulary Representations From Characters'}
{'en': 'Due to the compelling improvements brought by BERT, many recent representation models adopted the Transformer architecture as their main building block, consequently inheriting the wordpiece tokenization system despite it not being intrinsically linked to the notion of Transformers. While this system is thought to achieve a good balance between the flexibility of characters and the efficiency of full words, using predefined wordpiece vocabularies from the general domain is not always suitable, especially when building models for specialized domains (e.g., the medical domain). Moreover, adopting a wordpiece tokenization shifts the focus from the word level to the subword level, making the models conceptually more complex and arguably less convenient in practice. For these reasons, we propose CharacterBERT, a new variant of BERT that drops the wordpiece system altogether and uses a Character-CNN module instead to represent entire words by consulting their characters. We show that this new model improves the performance of BERT on a variety of medical domain tasks while at the same time producing robust, word-level, and open-vocabulary representations.', 'ar': 'نظرًا للتحسينات الجذابة التي أدخلتها BERT ، اعتمدت العديد من نماذج التمثيل الحديثة بنية Transformer باعتبارها لبنة البناء الرئيسية ، وبالتالي ورثت نظام الرمز المميز للورد على الرغم من عدم ارتباطه جوهريًا بمفهوم المحولات. بينما يُعتقد أن هذا النظام يحقق توازنًا جيدًا بين مرونة الأحرف وكفاءة الكلمات الكاملة ، فإن استخدام مفردات الكلمات المحددة مسبقًا من المجال العام ليس مناسبًا دائمًا ، خاصة عند بناء نماذج للمجالات المتخصصة (على سبيل المثال ، المجال الطبي). علاوة على ذلك ، فإن اعتماد الرمز المميز لقطعة الكلمات يحول التركيز من مستوى الكلمة إلى مستوى الكلمات الفرعية ، مما يجعل النماذج أكثر تعقيدًا من الناحية المفاهيمية ويمكن القول إنها أقل ملاءمة من الناحية العملية. لهذه الأسباب ، نقترح CharacterBERT ، وهو متغير جديد من BERT يسقط نظام wordpiece تمامًا ويستخدم وحدة Character-CNN بدلاً من ذلك لتمثيل الكلمات بأكملها من خلال استشارة شخصياتها. نظهر أن هذا النموذج الجديد يحسن أداء BERT في مجموعة متنوعة من مهام المجال الطبي بينما ينتج في نفس الوقت تمثيلات قوية على مستوى الكلمات ومفردات مفتوحة.', 'fr': "En raison des améliorations convaincantes apportées par BERT, de nombreux modèles de représentation récents ont adopté l'architecture Transformer comme bloc de construction principal, héritant ainsi du système de tokenisation des mots même s'il n'est pas intrinsèquement lié à la notion de Transformers. Bien que ce système soit censé atteindre un bon équilibre entre la flexibilité des caractères et l'efficacité des mots complets, l'utilisation de vocabulaires de mots prédéfinis du domaine général n'est pas toujours adaptée, en particulier lors de la création de modèles pour des domaines spécialisés (par exemple, le domaine médical). De plus, l'adoption d'une tokenisation d'un élément de mot déplace l'accent du niveau du mot vers le niveau du sous-mot, ce qui rend les modèles conceptuellement plus complexes et sans doute moins pratiques en pratique. Pour ces raisons, nous proposons CharacterBert, une nouvelle variante de BERT qui abandonne complètement le système de mots et utilise un module Character-CNN à la place pour représenter des mots entiers en consultant leurs caractères. Nous montrons que ce nouveau modèle améliore les performances du BERT sur une variété de tâches du domaine médical tout en produisant des représentations robustes, au niveau des mots et à vocabulaire ouvert.", 'pt': 'Devido às melhorias convincentes trazidas pelo BERT, muitos modelos de representação recentes adotaram a arquitetura Transformer como seu principal bloco de construção, consequentemente herdando o sistema de tokenização wordpiece apesar de não estar intrinsecamente ligado à noção de Transformers. Embora este sistema seja pensado para alcançar um bom equilíbrio entre a flexibilidade dos caracteres e a eficiência das palavras completas, o uso de vocabulários pré-definidos do domínio geral nem sempre é adequado, especialmente ao construir modelos para domínios especializados (por exemplo, o domínio médico). Além disso, adotar uma tokenização de palavra muda o foco do nível da palavra para o nível da subpalavra, tornando os modelos conceitualmente mais complexos e possivelmente menos convenientes na prática. Por essas razões, propomos CharacterBERT, uma nova variante do BERT que abandona completamente o sistema de peças de palavras e usa um módulo Character-CNN para representar palavras inteiras consultando seus caracteres. Mostramos que esse novo modelo melhora o desempenho do BERT em uma variedade de tarefas de domínio médico e, ao mesmo tempo, produz representações robustas, em nível de palavra e de vocabulário aberto.', 'es': 'Debido a las convincentes mejoras aportadas por BERT, muchos modelos de representación recientes adoptaron la arquitectura Transformer como su principal bloque de construcción, heredando en consecuencia el sistema de tokenización de piezas de palabras a pesar de no estar intrínsecamente vinculado a la noción de Transformers. Si bien se cree que este sistema logra un buen equilibrio entre la flexibilidad de los caracteres y la eficiencia de las palabras completas, el uso de vocabularios predefinidos de palabras del dominio general no siempre es adecuado, especialmente cuando se construyen modelos para dominios especializados (por ejemplo, el dominio médico). Además, la adopción de una tokenización de palabras cambia el enfoque del nivel de palabra al nivel de subpalabra, haciendo que los modelos sean conceptualmente más complejos y posiblemente menos convenientes en la práctica. Por estas razones, proponemos CharacterBert, una nueva variante de BERT que elimina el sistema de palabras por completo y utiliza un módulo de CNN de caracteres para representar palabras enteras consultando sus caracteres. Demostramos que este nuevo modelo mejora el rendimiento de BERT en una variedad de tareas del dominio médico y, al mismo tiempo, produce representaciones sólidas, a nivel de palabras y de vocabulario abierto.', 'ja': 'BERTがもたらした魅力的な改善により、多くの最近の表現モデルは、トランスフォーマーのアーキテクチャをメインビルドブロックとして採用し、トランスフォーマーの概念に本質的にリンクしていないにもかかわらず、ワードピーストークン化システムを継承しました。 このシステムは、文字の柔軟性と完全な単語の効率性との間の良好なバランスを達成すると考えられるが、一般的なドメインからの事前定義されたワードピース語彙を使用することは、特に専門領域（例えば、医療領域）のモデルを構築する場合には、必ずしも適切ではない。 さらに、ワードピースのトークン化を採用すると、フォーカスが単語レベルからサブワードレベルに移行し、モデルは概念的に複雑になり、実際には利便性が低下します。 これらの理由から、ワードピース・システムを完全にドロップし、文字を参照して単語全体を表すためにCharacter - CNNモジュールを使用する、BERTの新しいバリアントであるCharacterBERTを提案します。 この新しいモデルは、さまざまな医療領域のタスクでBERTのパフォーマンスを向上させ、同時に堅牢な、単語レベルの、オープンボキャブラリー表現を生成することを示しています。', 'zh': 'BERT引人注目改进,诸近者皆用Transformer架构为大体,故继wordpiece表统,虽无Transformers名。 虽当统以为可以符灵活性全单词效率之间,而用之于常领词汇表非常宜也,特为专业领域(如,医学领域)造模形之时。 单词标化将重移于子单词单词,形于其名,在实践中可谓不便矣。 由此言之,吾所以发 CharacterBERT者, BERT 之新变体也,尽弃单词统,而用 Character-CNN 模块以咨字符以表单词也。 新形增BERT,百医治域,兼生健壮,单词级开词汇。', 'hi': 'BERT द्वारा लाए गए सम्मोहक सुधारों के कारण, कई हालिया प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडलों ने ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर को अपने मुख्य बिल्डिंग ब्लॉक के रूप में अपनाया, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप यह ट्रांसफॉर्मर की धारणा से आंतरिक रूप से जुड़ा नहीं होने के बावजूद वर्डपीस टोकनाइजेशन सिस्टम को विरासत में मिला। हालांकि इस प्रणाली को वर्णों के लचीलेपन और पूर्ण शब्दों की दक्षता के बीच एक अच्छा संतुलन प्राप्त करने के लिए सोचा जाता है, सामान्य डोमेन से पूर्वनिर्धारित वर्डपीस शब्दावली का उपयोग करना हमेशा उपयुक्त नहीं होता है, खासकर जब विशेष डोमेन (जैसे, चिकित्सा डोमेन) के लिए मॉडल का निर्माण होता है। इसके अलावा, एक वर्डपीस टोकनाइजेशन को अपनाने से फोकस को शब्द स्तर से सबवर्ड स्तर पर स्थानांतरित कर दिया जाता है, जिससे मॉडल वैचारिक रूप से अधिक जटिल हो जाते हैं और व्यवहार में यकीनन कम सुविधाजनक होते हैं। इन कारणों से, हम CharacterBERT का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो BERT का एक नया संस्करण है जो वर्डपीस सिस्टम को पूरी तरह से छोड़ देता है और अपने पात्रों से परामर्श करके पूरे शब्दों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के बजाय एक चरित्र-सीएनएन मॉड्यूल का उपयोग करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह नया मॉडल विभिन्न प्रकार के चिकित्सा डोमेन कार्यों पर BERT के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है, जबकि एक ही समय में मजबूत, शब्द-स्तर और खुली-शब्दावली प्रतिनिधित्व का उत्पादन करता है।', 'ru': 'Благодаря убедительным улучшениям, внесенным BERT, многие недавние модели представления приняли архитектуру Трансформатора в качестве своего основного строительного блока, следовательно, унаследовав систему токенизации текстового произведения, несмотря на то, что она не была неразрывно связана с понятием Трансформаторов. Хотя считается, что эта система достигает хорошего баланса между гибкостью символов и эффективностью полных слов, использование предопределенных словарных словарей из общей области не всегда подходит, особенно при построении моделей для специализированных областей (например, медицинской области). Кроме того, принятие токенизации слов переводит фокус с уровня слова на уровень подслова, что делает модели концептуально более сложными и, возможно, менее удобными на практике. По этим причинам мы предлагаем CharacterBERT, новый вариант BERT, который полностью удаляет текстовую систему и использует модуль Character-CNN вместо этого, чтобы представлять целые слова, обращаясь к их символам. Мы показываем, что эта новая модель улучшает производительность BERT по различным задачам в области медицины, в то же время создавая надежные, словесные представления на уровне слов и открытый словарь.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar na feabhsuithe láidre a rinne CRET, ghlac go leor samhlacha ionadaíochta le déanaí le hailtireacht an Transformer mar phríomhbhloc tógála, agus mar sin fuair siad an córas comharthaithe focal le hoidhreacht ainneoin nach raibh sé nasctha go bunúsach le coincheap na gClaochladáin. Cé go gceaptar go mbaineann an córas seo cothromaíocht mhaith amach idir solúbthacht na gcarachtar agus éifeachtúlacht na bhfocal iomlána, ní bhíonn úsáid a bhaint as stór focal réamhshainithe ón réimse ginearálta oiriúnach i gcónaí, go háirithe nuair a bhíonn samhlacha á dtógáil le haghaidh sainréimsí (m.sh., an fearann leighis). Ina theannta sin, aistrítear an fócas ó leibhéal na bhfocal go dtí an leibhéal fofhocail nuair a ghlactar le tokenization focalphíosa, rud a fhágann go bhfuil na samhlacha níos casta ó thaobh coincheapa de agus d’fhéadfaí a áitiú nach bhfuil siad chomh háisiúil go praiticiúil. Ar na cúiseanna seo, molaimid CharacterBERT, leagan nua de CRET a thiteann an córas píosa focal ar fad agus a úsáideann modúl Carachtair-CNN ina ionad sin chun focail iomlána a léiriú trí dhul i gcomhairle lena gcarachtar. Léirímid go bhfeabhsaítear leis an tsamhail nua seo feidhmíocht BERT ar thascanna fearainn leighis éagsúla agus ag an am céanna go gcruthaítear uiríll láidir, ar leibhéal na bhfocal, agus ar fhoclóir oscailte.', 'hu': 'A BERT által hozott lenyűgöző fejlesztéseknek köszönhetően számos újabb reprezentációs modell a Transformer architektúrát alkalmazta fő építőelemként, így örökölte a szódarab tokenizációs rendszert annak ellenére, hogy nem kapcsolódik lényegében a Transformers fogalmához. Bár ez a rendszer jó egyensúlyt teremt a karakterek rugalmassága és a teljes szavak hatékonysága között, az általános tartományból származó előre meghatározott szótárak használata nem mindig alkalmas, különösen a speciális tartományok (pl. orvosi terület) modelljeinek készítésekor. Ezenkívül a szótárgyak tokenizációjának elfogadása a fókuszt a szó szintjéről az alszó szintre helyezi, így a modellek koncepcionálisan összetettebbek és vitathatóan kevésbé kényelmesek a gyakorlatban. Ezért javasoljuk a CharacterBERT-et, a BERT egy új változatát, amely teljesen leállítja a szótár rendszert, és ehelyett egy Character-CNN modult használ arra, hogy teljes szavakat ábrázoljon karaktereikkel. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez az új modell javítja a BERT teljesítményét különböző orvosi feladatokban, miközben robusztus, szószintű és nyílt szókincsű ábrázolásokat készít.', 'el': 'Λόγω των επιτακτικών βελτιώσεων που έφερε ο BERT, πολλά πρόσφατα μοντέλα αναπαράστασης υιοθέτησαν την αρχιτεκτονική του μετασχηματιστή ως κύριο δομικό στοιχείο τους, κληρονομώντας κατά συνέπεια το σύστημα επισήμανσης λέξεων παρά το γεγονός ότι δεν συνδέεται εγγενώς με την έννοια των μετασχηματιστών. Ενώ αυτό το σύστημα θεωρείται ότι επιτυγχάνει μια καλή ισορροπία μεταξύ της ευελιξίας των χαρακτήρων και της αποδοτικότητας των πλήρεις λέξεων, η χρήση προκαθορισμένων λεξιλογίων από τον γενικό τομέα δεν είναι πάντα κατάλληλη, ειδικά όταν δημιουργείται μοντέλα για εξειδικευμένους τομείς (π.χ. τον ιατρικό τομέα). Επιπλέον, η υιοθέτηση μιας επισήμανσης κειμένου μετατοπίζει την εστίαση από το επίπεδο λέξεων στο επίπεδο υπολέξεων, καθιστώντας τα μοντέλα εννοιολογικά πιο περίπλοκα και πιθανώς λιγότερο βολικά στην πράξη. Για τους λόγους αυτούς, προτείνουμε μια νέα παραλλαγή του που αφήνει εντελώς το σύστημα λέξεων και χρησιμοποιεί μια ενότητα χαρακτήρων-για να αντιπροσωπεύει ολόκληρες λέξεις συμβουλεύοντας τους χαρακτήρες τους. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτό το νέο μοντέλο βελτιώνει την απόδοση του σε ποικίλες ιατρικές εργασίες ενώ ταυτόχρονα παράγει ισχυρές αναπαραστάσεις σε επίπεδο λέξεων και ανοιχτού λεξιλογίου.', 'ka': 'BERT-ის გამოიყენებული უფრო ძალიან უფრო ძალიან უფრო ძალიან განვითარებული მოდელების გამოიყენება ტრანფორმეტრის არქტიქტიქტიკატის როგორც მათი მნიშვნელოვანი ბლოკის, შემდეგ სიტყვების ტოკენიზაციის სისტემის მიღ თუმცა ეს სისტემა იფიქრებულია, რომ საერთო დიომინიდან წარმოადგენა, განსაკუთრებით როდესაც პოვციალურად განსაზღვრებული სიტყვანის სიტყვანის ეფექტიფიკაცია და სულ სიტყვანის ეფექტიფიკაცია და გამოყენება საერთო დიომინიდა დამატებით, სიტყვების ტოკენიზაციას გავაკეთება სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების გადატანა, მოდელების კონც ამ მიზეზებისთვის, ჩვენ გვეძლევთ CharacterBERT-ის ახალი გარიანტი, რომელიც სიტყვების სისტემას ყველაფერად გადატანა და გამოყენება სიტყვების მოდულის სიტყვების შემდეგ სიტყვების ყველაფერი გარემო ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს ახალი მოდელეში BERT-ის გამოსახულება განსხვავებული მედიცინური დიომინური დავალებებით, როცა ერთ-ერთი დროში წარმოიქმნა, სიტყვების დონე და გახსნა სიტყვებული', 'it': "A causa degli impellenti miglioramenti apportati da BERT, molti modelli di rappresentazione recenti hanno adottato l'architettura Transformer come elemento principale, ereditando di conseguenza il sistema di tokenizzazione dei wordpiece nonostante non fosse intrinsecamente legato alla nozione di Transformers. Mentre questo sistema è pensato per ottenere un buon equilibrio tra la flessibilità dei caratteri e l'efficienza delle parole complete, l'uso di vocaboli predefiniti dal dominio generale non è sempre adatto, soprattutto quando si costruiscono modelli per domini specializzati (ad esempio, il dominio medico). Inoltre, l'adozione di una tokenizzazione del wordpiece sposta l'attenzione dal livello della parola al livello della subparola, rendendo i modelli concettualmente più complessi e probabilmente meno convenienti nella pratica. Per questi motivi, proponiamo CharacterBERT, una nuova variante di BERT che abbandona completamente il sistema wordpiece e utilizza un modulo Character-CNN invece per rappresentare intere parole consultandone i caratteri. Dimostriamo che questo nuovo modello migliora le prestazioni di BERT in una varietà di attività mediche, producendo allo stesso tempo rappresentazioni robuste a livello di parole e di vocabolario aperto.", 'kk': 'BERT жасалған жақсы жақсартулардың себебі, жаңа түрлендіру үлгілері түрлендіруші архитектурасын негізгі құрылғы блокына қабылдады, сондықтан сөз жолының токенизациялау жүйесін орындайды. Түрлендірушердің ойымен байланысты емес қарай Бұл жүйе таңбалардың гибкілігі мен толық сөздердің эффективнігі арасындағы жақсы балансы жеткізетін деп ойлайды. Алдын- ала анықталған сөздердің сөздерін жалпы доменден қолдану әрқашан жақсы емес, өзгертілген домендердің моделдерін құру Сонымен қатар, сөздердің токенизациясын қолдану сөздердің деңгейінен ішкі сөздердің деңгейіне ауыстырып, үлгілерді тәжірибесінен артық және тәжірибесінде тәжірибесінде артық бол Бұл себептердің себебі, BERT деген жаңа параметрін келтіріп, сөз жолын толық тастап, CNN таңбаларының толық сөздерін келтіру үшін таңбаларының орнына таңбаларын көрсетуге болады. Бұл жаңа үлгі бірнеше медицински домендің тапсырмаларында BERT жұмысын жақсарту дегенді көрсетеді. Бірақ бір уақытта құпты, сөздер деңгейі және ашық сөздердің тапсырмаларын жасайды.', 'lt': 'Dėl įtikinamų BERT patobulinimų daugelis neseniai atliktų atstovavimo modelių priėmė „Transformer“ architektūrą kaip pagrindinę jų sudedamąją dalį, todėl paveldėjo žodžių kūrinių ženklinimo sistemą, nors ji nėra iš esmės susijusi su „Transformers“ sąvoka. Nors manoma, kad ši sistema užtikrina gerą pusiausvyrą tarp ženklų lankstumo ir visiškų žodžių veiksmingumo, iš anksto apibrėžtų žodžių kūrinių žodynų iš bendrosios srities naudojimas ne visada tinka, ypač kuriant specializuotų sričių modelius (pvz., medicinos sritį). Be to, priimant žodžių kūrinį, dėmesys nukreipiamas nuo žodžių lygio iki žodžių lygio, todėl modeliai koncepciniu požiūriu yra sudėtingesni ir tikriausiai mažiau patogūs praktikoje. Dėl šių priežasčių mes siūlome CharacterBERT, naują BERT variant ą, kuris visiškai nutraukia žodžių kūrinio sistemą ir vietoj to naudoja Character-CNN modulį, kuris atstovauja visiems žodžiams, pasikonsultavus su jų ženklais. Mes parodome, kad šis naujas modelis pagerina BERT veiklos rezultatus įvairiose medicinos srityse, tuo pat metu užtikrinant patikimus žodžių ir atviro žodyno atstovavimus.', 'mk': 'Поради мотивните подобрувања што ги донесе БЕРТ, многу неодамнешни претставувачки модели ја усвоија Трансформената архитектура како нивен главен градежен блок, како последица на тоа што го наследи системот за токенизација на зборовите, и покрај тоа што не е внатрешно поврзан со концепцијата Тран Иако се смета дека овој систем постигнува добра рамнотежа помеѓу флексибилноста на карактерите и ефикасноста на целосните зборови, користењето на преддефинирани зборови од генералниот домен не е секогаш соодветно, особено кога се градат модели за специјализирани домени (на пример, медицинскиот домен). Покрај тоа, усвојувањето на локалниот дел од токенизацијата го преместува фокусот од нивото на зборот на нивото на подзборот, што ги прави моделите концептуално покомплексни и веројатно помалку удобни во практиката. Од овие причини, предложуваме ЛикерБЕРТ, нов варијант на БЕРТ кој целосно го отпушта системот на зборови и користи модул ЛикерБЕРТ наместо да ги претставува целите зборови преку консултација со нивните ликови. We show that this new model improves the performance of BERT on a variety of medical domain tasks while at the same time producing robust, word-level, and open-vocabulary representations.', 'ms': 'Sebab peningkatan yang menarik yang dibawa oleh BERT, banyak model perwakilan baru-baru ini mengadopsi arkitektur Transformer sebagai blok bangunan utama mereka, sebab itu mewarisi sistem tokenisasi pecahan kata walaupun ia tidak terhubung secara intrinsik dengan konsep Transformers. Sementara sistem ini dianggap untuk mencapai keseimbangan yang baik diantara fleksibiliti aksara dan efisiensi kata-kata penuh, menggunakan vokbulari pecahan kata terdefinisi dari domain umum tidak sentiasa sesuai, terutama bila membina model untuk domain khusus (cth., domain perubatan). Selain itu, mengadopsi tokenisasi pekan kata mengubah fokus dari aras perkataan ke aras subkata, menjadikan model secara konsep lebih kompleks dan mungkin kurang selesa dalam praktek. Untuk sebab-sebab ini, kami cadangkan AksaraBERT, varian baru BERT yang menjatuhkan sistem pekerja kata secara keseluruhan dan menggunakan modul Aksara-CNN selain itu untuk mewakili seluruh perkataan dengan konsultasi aksara mereka. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model baru ini meningkatkan prestasi BERT pada pelbagai tugas domain perubatan sementara pada masa yang sama menghasilkan perwakilan perkataan yang kuat, tahap perkataan, dan vocabulari terbuka.', 'mt': 'Minħabba t-titjib konvinċenti li ġab il-BERT, ħafna mudelli ta’ rappreżentanza riċenti adottaw l-arkitettura tat-Transformer bħala l-bini ewlieni tagħhom, u konsegwentement ereditaw is-sistema ta’ tokenizzazzjoni tal-kliem minkejja li ma kinitx marbuta intrinsikament mal-kunċett ta’ Transformers. Filwaqt li din is-sistema hija maħsuba li tikseb bilanċ tajjeb bejn il-flessibbiltà tal-karattri u l-effiċjenza tal-kliem sħiħ, l-użu ta’ vokabulari tal-kliem imfassla minn qabel mid-dominju ġenerali mhux dejjem xieraq, speċjalment meta jinbnew mudelli g ħal dominji speċjalizzati (pereżempju, id-dominju mediku). Barra minn hekk, l-adozzjoni tat-tokenizzazzjoni tal-kliem tgħaddi l-attenzjoni mil-livell tal-kliem għal-livell tas-subkliem, u b’hekk il-mudelli jkunu kunċettwalment aktar kumplessi u possibbilment inqas konvenjenti fil-prattika. Għal dawn ir-raġunijiet, nipproponu CharacterBERT, varjant ġdid ta’ BERT li jnaqqas is-sistema tal-biċċa l-kliem kompletament u juża modulu Character-CNN minflok biex jirrappreżenta kliem sħiħ billi jikkonsulta l-karattri tagħhom. Aħna nuru li dan il-mudell il-ġdid itejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-BERT fuq varjetà ta’ kompiti fil-qasam mediku filwaqt li fl-istess ħin jipproduċi rappreżentazzjonijiet robusti, fil-livell tal-kliem, u f’vokabulari miftuħa.', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കൊണ്ടുവന്ന മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന കാരണം, ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാന കെട് ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച വാക്കുകളുടെ ഫ്ലാക്സിക്സിറ്റിയും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ സാധ്യതയും തമ്മില്\u200d നല്ല താല്\u200dക്കൂലിയുണ്ടാക്കുമെന്ന് കരുതുന്നില്ല അതുകൊണ്ടും, വാര്\u200dഡ് പേരിലെ ടോക്കോണിഷഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള നിലയിലേക്ക് ഫോക്സോക്സ് മാറ്റുന്നു. മോഡലുകള്\u200d പര ഈ കാരണം മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്കുകളെയും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് പകരം ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു ഈ പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ പ്രകടനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, വാക്ക് നിലവിലും തുറന്ന വാക്കുപയോഗിക', 'mn': 'БЕРТ-ын хийсэн гайхалтай сайхан сайхан үзүүлэлтийн шалтгаан нь олон саяхан үзүүлэлтийн загварууд Трансфер архитектурыг түүний гол барилгын блок болгосон юм. Иймээс үг үг загварын тодорхойлолтын системийг орлох боломжтой. Трансферлерийн ойлголты Энэ систем нь хүмүүсийн гишүүн, бүрэн үгийн үр дүнтэй байдал хоорондоо сайн баланс гаргах гэж боддог ч, ерөнхий хэлбэрээс илүү тодорхойлсон үг үг үгийг ашиглах нь үргэлж зөв биш, ялангуяа мэргэжлийн хэлбэрийн загвар бүтээхэд (жишээ нь эмнэлгийн Дараа нь үгийн тодорхойлолт хийх нь үгийн түвшинд анхаарлыг төвшинээс суурь үгийн түвшинд шилжүүлнэ. Загваруудыг ойлголттой илүү төвөгтэй болгож, дасгал дасгал нь бага зэрэгцээтэй болгож байна. Эдгээр шалтгаануудын тулд бид CharacterBERT-ын шинэ хувилбар BERT-ын санал болгож, тэдгээр үгний системийг нийлүүлж, тэдний дүрсийг зөвшөөрөхөд бүх үгнүүдийг илэрхийлэхийн оронд CharacterBERT-CNN модуль ашигладаг. Бид энэ шинэ загвар нь BERT-ын үйл ажиллагааг олон эрүүл мэндийн ажиллагаанд сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэвч одоогийн хугацаанд хүчтэй, үгийн түвшин, нээлттэй үгийн үзүүлэлт гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Ze względu na przekonujące ulepszenia przyniesione przez BERT, wiele najnowszych modeli reprezentacji przyjęło architekturę Transformera jako główny element budowlany, w konsekwencji dziedzicząc system tokenizacji tekstów, mimo że nie jest ono istotnie powiązane z pojęciem Transformerów. Chociaż uważa się, że system ten osiąga dobrą równowagę między elastycznością znaków a efektywnością pełnych słów, stosowanie predefiniowanych słowników słowniczych z domeny ogólnej nie zawsze jest odpowiednie, zwłaszcza przy budowaniu modeli dla specjalistycznych domen (np. domeny medycznej). Co więcej, przyjęcie tokenizacji tekstu słowa przesuwa uwagę z poziomu słowa na poziom podsłowa, czyniąc modele koncepcyjnie bardziej złożone i prawdopodobnie mniej wygodne w praktyce. Z tego względu proponujemy CharacterBERT, nowy wariant BERT, który całkowicie opuszcza system tekstów i używa modułu Character-CNN do reprezentowania całych słów poprzez konsultację z ich znakami. Pokazujemy, że ten nowy model poprawia wydajność BERT w różnych zadaniach w dziedzinie medycznej, jednocześnie tworząc solidne reprezentacje na poziomie słów i otwartym słownictwie.', 'ro': 'Datorită îmbunătățirilor convingătoare aduse de BERT, multe modele recente de reprezentare au adoptat arhitectura Transformer ca element principal, moștenind în consecință sistemul de tokenizare a piesei cu cuvinte, în ciuda faptului că nu este legat intrinsec de noțiunea de Transformers. În timp ce acest sistem este considerat pentru a obține un echilibru bun între flexibilitatea caracterelor și eficiența cuvintelor complete, utilizarea vocabulare predefinite din domeniul general nu este întotdeauna potrivită, mai ales atunci când se construiește modele pentru domenii specializate (de exemplu, domeniul medical). Mai mult decât atât, adoptarea unei tokenizări a piesei de cuvinte schimbă accentul de la nivelul cuvântului la nivelul subcuvântului, făcând modelele conceptual mai complexe și, probabil, mai puțin convenabile în practică. Din aceste motive, propunem CharacterBERT, o nouă variantă a BERT care renunță la sistemul de cuvinte cu totul și folosește un modul Character-CNN în schimb pentru a reprezenta cuvinte întregi prin consultarea caracterelor lor. Noi arătăm că acest nou model îmbunătățește performanța BERT într-o varietate de sarcini medicale, producând în același timp reprezentări robuste, la nivel de cuvinte și cu vocabular deschis.', 'no': 'På grunn av kompliserte forbetringane som BERT førte, har mange nyleg representasjonsmodular godtatt Transformeringsarkitekturen som hovudbygningsblokken, slik at det følgjande innhaldet er ikkje tilknytta noen transformeringssystemet. Mens denne systemet er trukket å oppnå ein god balanse mellom fleksibilitet av teikn og effektivitet av full e ord, er det ikkje alltid passande med føredefinerte ordliste frå den generelle domenet, særleg når det bygger modeller for spesialiserte domenet (f.eks. medisinske domenet). I tillegg til å bruka eit tokenisering av ordtekst flytter fokusen frå ordnivået til underordnivået, og gjer modelane konseptelt meir komplekse og argumentelt mindre vanleg i praksis. For desse grunnene, foreslår vi teikn BERT, eit ny variant av BERT som slår av ordskriftsystemet heilt og brukar ein teikn-CNN- modul i staden for å representera heile ord ved å konsultera teikna sine. Vi viser at denne nye modellen forbedrar utviklinga av BERT på ein del medisinske domeneoppgåver mens samtidig produserer robust, ordnivå og opne ordliste.', 'so': 'Sababtaas darteed horumarinta lagu beddelay BERT, modello badan oo u dhow u dhigtay dhismaha wareejiya oo ah dhismaha madaxda ee dhismaha, sababtoo darteed waxay dhaxalleen nidaamka qoraalka tokenization haba yeeshee in kastoo uusan si hoos ah ugu xiriirin fikrada Transformers. While this system is thought to achieve a good balance between the flexibility of characters and the efficiency of full words, using predefined wordpiece vocabularies from the general domain is not always suitable, especially when building models for specialized domains (e.g., the medical domain).  Markaas waxaa kale oo uu soo qaadanayaa calaamad-muuqashada hadalka ayaa dib looga beddelaa heerka hadalka hoose, wuxuuna sameynayaa tusaalooyinka si adag oo si qiimo ah ugu habboon. Sababtaas darteed waxaan soo jeedaynaa xaraf BERT oo ah bedelan cusub ee BERT oo wada rida nidaamka qoraalka ah oo isticmaalaya module xaraf-CNN si aan ugu representno erayo oo dhan si aan ula talino xarafkooda. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in tusaalahan cusub uu kordhiyo tababarka BERT oo ku saabsan shaqaalaha gudaha caafimaadka oo kala duduwan isla waqtigaas la soo bixiyo qodob, heerka hadal iyo qayb furan.', 'sv': 'På grund av BERT:s övertygande förbättringar antog många nya representationsmodeller Transformer-arkitekturen som sin huvudsakliga byggsten, vilket följaktligen ärvde ordstyckets tokeniseringssystem trots att det inte var bundet till begreppet Transformers. Även om detta system anses uppnå en bra balans mellan tecknens flexibilitet och effektiviteten i fullständiga ord, är det inte alltid lämpligt att använda fördefinierade ordämnesordlistor från den allmänna domänen, särskilt när man bygger modeller för specialiserade domäner (t.ex. den medicinska domänen). Dessutom flyttas fokus från ordnivå till underordsnivå, vilket gör modellerna konceptuellt mer komplexa och förmodligen mindre praktiska i praktiken. Av dessa skäl föreslår vi CharacterBERT, en ny variant av BERT som släpper ordstycket helt och hållet och använder en Character-CNN modul istället för att representera hela ord genom att konsultera deras tecken. Vi visar att denna nya modell förbättrar BERT:s prestanda på en mängd olika medicinska domänuppgifter samtidigt som den producerar robusta, ordnivå och öppna ordförråd representationer.', 'sr': 'Zbog prisiljnih poboljšanja koje je doneo BERT, mnogi nedavni modeli predstavljanja usvojili su arhitekturu transformera kao glavni blok zgrade, što je posledice naslijedio sistem tokenizacije reèi, uprkos što nije unutrašnjost povezan sa pojmom transformera. Iako se smatra da ovaj sistem postigne dobru ravnotežu između fleksibilnosti karaktera i efikasnosti punih reči, koristeći predodređene rečne rečenice iz opće g domena nije uvek odgovarajuće, posebno kada izgradimo modele za specijalizovane domene (npr. medicinske domene). Osim toga, usvajanje tokenizacije reèi mijenja fokus sa nivoa reèi na nivo podreèi, čineći modele konceptualno kompleksnijim i najmanje prikladnijim u praksi. Zbog ovih razloga predlažemo CharacterBERT, novi variant BERT koji potpuno ispušta sistem reèi i koristi modul Character-CNN umjesto da predstavlja cijele reèi konsultujući njihove likove. Pokazujemo da ovaj novi model poboljšava funkciju BERT-a na raznim zadacima u medicinskoj domenu, dok u isto vreme proizvodi robne, rečne nivoe i otvorene rečnice.', 'si': 'BERT වලින් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණිත වැඩි වැඩි නිසා ගොඩක් අලුත් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණිත වින්යාපිත වින්යාපිත වින්යාපිත වින්යාපිත වින්යාපිත වින්යාපිත වින්යාපිත ව මේ පද්ධතිය හිතන්නේ හොඳ සාමාන්ත්\u200dරය සහ පූර්ණ වචන වර්තනය සඳහා හොඳ සාමාන්ත්\u200dරය සඳහා හොඳ සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක් ලැබෙන්න, සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික වචන වචන වචන වචන වර් ඒවගේම, වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා වචන ස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය වෙනස් කරනවා වචන ස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය වෙනස් කරනවා, මොඩේ මේ හේතුවෙන්, අපි CharacterBERT ගේ අලුත් වෙනස් කිරීමක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වචන පද්ධතිය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වචන පද්ධතිය බිම කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ග අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ අලුත් මොඩේලය BERT ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විවිධ වෛද්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව', 'ta': 'BERT கொண்டு வந்த முன்னேற்றங்கள் காரணமாக, அநேகர் சமீபத்தில் பாதிப்பு மாதிரிப்பு மாதிரிகள் மாற்றியமைப்பு கட்டுப்பாட்டை அவர்கள் முக்கிய கட்டுப்பொறி ஆக எடுத்து,  இந்த அமைப்பு எழுத்துக்களின் flexibility மற்றும் முழு வார்த்தைகளின் விளைவுகளுக்கும் இடையே ஒரு நல்ல ஒழுங்கு பெற நினைக்கப்படும் போது, முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைப் பொது களமில மேலும், ஒரு வார்த்தைத் துணை குறிப்புக்குறிப்புகளை எடுத்துக் கொண்டு வார்த்தை மட்டத்திலிருந்து துணை சொல்லு மட்டத்திற்கு focus இந்த காரணங்களுக்காக, நாம் எழுத்து பெர்ட், ஒரு புதிய மாறியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது wordபகுதி அமைப்பை முழுவதும் விட்டு எழுத்து- CNN கூற்றை பயன்படுத் We show that this new model improves the performance of BERT on a variety of medical domain tasks while at the same time producing robust, word-level, and open-vocabulary representations.', 'ur': 'BERT کے ذریعہ بہت اگلے نمائندہ نمائندوں نے ترنسفور معماری کو ان کی اصلی بنیاد بلوک کے طور پر قبول کیا، اس کے بعد wordpiece tokenization سیسٹم کے وارث ہوا، اگرچہ اس کے اندر ترنسفور کے منظور سے متصل نہ ہوا۔ حالانکہ یہ سیسٹم کو پسندیدہ تعادل پہنچانا سمجھا جاتا ہے کہ شخص کے مطابق اور تمام کلمات کے مطابق اچھی تعادل حاصل کرے، اس سے پہلے معلوم کیے گئے کلمات کے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھنے والے ل اور اس کے بعد، ایک کلمز کی توکینیزی کا قبول کرنا کلمز سطح سے سوبرویڈ سطح تک تغییر دیتا ہے، اور مدلز کو اچھی طرح پیچیدہ بناتا ہے اور بحث سے کم اچھی طرح تغییر دیتا ہے. یہ دلیلوں کے باعث ہم CharacterBERT کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، BERT کی نئی ویرائٹ جو کلمات پائیس سیسٹم کو جمع کرتا ہے اور اس کے عوض ایک Character-CNN موڈل کو استعمال کرتا ہے کہ تمام کلمات کو ان کے شخصیتوں سے مشورہ کریں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ نئی مدل BERT کے عملکرد کو مختلف دارومین کاموں پر بہتر کر رہا ہے اور اس کے ساتھ استثناء، کلمات سطح، اور کھلے کلمات کی نمایش پیدا کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "BERT orqali ajratilgan muvaffaqiyatlarni sabab, ko'pchilik taʼminlovchilar modellari Transformer architektur asosiy building blocks deb ishlatilgan. Bu sababda, u Transformerlar g'oyalari bilan bogʻ'liq bo'lmasa bo'lgan so'zlar soʻzni to ʻgʻri toʻgʻri tekshirish tizimini aytadi. Bu tizim belgilangan belgilarning flexibility va butun so'zlarning imkoniyati orasidagi yaxshi balandni topish mumkin, bir necha soʻzni umumiy domen tomonidan foydalanishga tayyorlangan soʻzlar soʻzni ishlatish uchun hech qachon doim yetarli emas, hususan tayyorlangan domen modellarini yaratishda (m. g. tizim domen). Keyin, so'zlar soʻzni tasdiqlash tugmasini so'zning tugmasini tub soʻzdan o'zgartiradi, modellarni tashkilotga murakkab va ishlatish imkoniyatini juda qisqarli bo'ladi. Bu sabablar uchun biz bir necha so'zlarni tashqi qilish uchun BERT (BERT) harf qilamiz. Bu so'zlarni tashqi qilish uchun so'zlarni hamma so'zlar bilan tashqarish uchun yangi variant. Biz bu yangi modelni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bu bir necha tibbiy domen vazifalarining bajarishini bajarishini bajaradi va shu paytida robot, so'zlar va ochiq vositalar tashkilotlarini yaratadi.", 'vi': 'Do sự cải tiến đầy thuyết phục của BERT, rất nhiều mô hình đại diện gần đây đã sử dụng kiến trúc biến hình thành khối xây dựng chính của họ, do đó thừa kế hệ thống phát tín hiệu chữ mặc dù nó không được gắn liền với khái niệm về biến hình. Trong khi hệ thống này được cho là đạt được sự cân bằng tốt giữa sự linh hoạt của các nhân vật và hiệu quả của các từ đầy đủ, thì dùng các từ văn hoá chữ được xác định trước từ lĩnh vực chung không phải lúc nào cũng phù hợp, đặc biệt khi xây dựng các mô hình cho lĩnh vực đặc biệt (ví dụ, lĩnh vực y tế). Thêm vào đó, việc xác định mức độ phát âm từ sẽ thay đổi tiêu điểm từ cấp độ chữ thành mức chữ con, làm cho các mô hình có thể phức tạp hơn và dễ dàng trở nên kém hơn trong thực tế. Vì những lý do đó, chúng tôi đề nghị Ký tự, một biến thể mới của BERT, đã làm rơi cả hệ thống chữ và sử dụng mô- đun Kí tự-CNN thay vào đó để đại diện cho to àn bộ từ ngữ bằng cách cố vấn các ký tự của họ. Chúng tôi cho rằng cách mới này đã giải quyết giao thoại cho BERT trong các nhiều công việc y vũ trụ y, và cũng đã thiết một bức biểu lời thống.', 'bg': 'Поради завладяващите подобрения, внесени от BERT, много скорошни модели на представяне възприемат архитектурата на трансформатора като основен градивен елемент, следователно наследяват системата за токенизация на текстовете, въпреки че тя не е вътрешно свързана с понятието трансформатори. Въпреки че се смята, че тази система постига добър баланс между гъвкавостта на символите и ефективността на пълните думи, използването на предварително дефинирани речници от общия домейн не винаги е подходящо, особено когато се изграждат модели за специализирани домейни (напр. медицинския домейн). Нещо повече, приемането на токенизация измества фокуса от нивото на думата към нивото на поддумата, което прави моделите концептуално по-сложни и може би по-малко удобни на практика. Поради тези причини предлагаме нов вариант на който напълно отпада системата на думи и използва модул вместо да представя цели думи чрез консултация с техните знаци. Показваме, че този нов модел подобрява ефективността на BERT при различни задачи в областта на медицината, като същевременно произвежда стабилни, на ниво дума и на отворен речник представяне.', 'hr': 'Zbog prisiljnih poboljšanja koje je donijela BERT, mnogi nedavni modeli predstavljanja usvojili su arhitekturu transformera kao glavni blok zgrade, što je zbog toga nasljeđivanje sustava tokenizacije riječi, uprkos što nije unutarnje povezano s pojmom transformera. Iako se smatra da ovaj sustav postigne dobru ravnotežu između fleksibilnosti znakova i učinkovitosti punih riječi, koristeći predodređene riječične riječice iz opće g domena nije uvijek odgovarajuće, posebno kada se izgradi modela za specijalizirane domene (npr. medicinske domene). Osim toga, usvajanje tokenizacije riječi mijenja fokus od razine riječi na razinu podriječi, čineći modele konceptualno kompleksnijim i navodno manje prikladnim u praksi. Zbog tih razloga predlažemo CharacterBERT, novu variantu BERT-a koja potpuno ispušta sistem riječi i koristi modul Character-CNN umjesto da predstavlja cijele riječi savjetujući njihove znakove. Pokazujemo da ovaj novi model poboljšava učinkovitost BERT-a na raznim zadacima u medicinskoj domenu, dok istovremeno proizvodi robne, razine riječi i otvorene riječi.', 'da': "På grund af de overbevisende forbedringer bragt af BERT, brugte mange nyere repræsentationsmodeller Transformer-arkitekturen som deres vigtigste byggesten og arvede derfor ordstykkets tokeniseringssystem, selvom det ikke var i sig selv forbundet med begrebet Transformers. Selvom dette system menes at opnå en god balance mellem fleksibiliteten af tegn og effektiviteten af fulde ord, er det ikke altid egnet at bruge foruddefinerede ordstykker ordbøger fra det generelle domæne, især når der opbygges modeller til specialiserede domæner (f.eks. det medicinske domæne). Desuden flytter vedtagelsen af en ordstykketokenisering fokus fra ordniveau til underordsniveau, hvilket gør modellerne konceptuelt mere komplekse og formodentlig mindre bekvemme i praksis. Af disse årsager foreslår vi CharacterBERT, en ny variant af BERT, der dropper ordstykkesystemet helt og bruger et Character-CNN modul i stedet til at repræsentere hele ord ved at konsultere deres tegn. Vi viser, at denne nye model forbedrer BERT's ydeevne på en række forskellige medicinske domæneopgaver, samtidig med at den producerer robuste repræsentationer på ordniveau og åbent ordforråd.", 'nl': 'Vanwege de overtuigende verbeteringen die BERT bracht, hebben veel recente representatiemodellen de Transformer architectuur als hun belangrijkste bouwsteen overgenomen, waardoor het wordpiece tokenization systeem werd geërfd ondanks dat het niet intrinsiek verbonden was met het begrip Transformers. Hoewel men denkt dat dit systeem een goede balans bereikt tussen de flexibiliteit van karakters en de efficiëntie van volledige woorden, is het gebruik van vooraf gedefinieerde woordenschaten uit het algemene domein niet altijd geschikt, vooral bij het bouwen van modellen voor gespecialiseerde domeinen (bijv. het medische domein). Bovendien verschuift het aannemen van een woordstuk tokenizatie de focus van het woordniveau naar het subwoordniveau, waardoor de modellen conceptueel complexer en in de praktijk wellicht minder handig zijn. Om deze redenen stellen we CharacterBERT voor, een nieuwe variant van BERT die het woordpuzzelsysteem volledig laat vallen en in plaats daarvan een Character-CNN module gebruikt om hele woorden te vertegenwoordigen door hun karakters te raadplegen. We laten zien dat dit nieuwe model de prestaties van BERT verbetert op een verscheidenheid van medische domeintaken terwijl tegelijkertijd robuuste, woordniveau en open woordenschat representaties produceert.', 'de': 'Aufgrund der überzeugenden Verbesserungen, die BERT mit sich brachte, haben viele neuere Darstellungsmodelle die Transformer-Architektur als ihren Hauptbaustein übernommen und folglich das Wordpiece-Tokenisierungssystem geerbt, obwohl es nicht untrennbar mit dem Begriff Transformers verbunden war. Während dieses System ein gutes Gleichgewicht zwischen der Flexibilität von Zeichen und der Effizienz von vollständigen Wörtern erreicht, ist die Verwendung von vordefinierten Wortstückvokabularen aus dem allgemeinen Bereich nicht immer geeignet, insbesondere wenn Modelle für spezialisierte Domänen (z.B. die medizinische Domäne) erstellt werden. Darüber hinaus verlagert die Annahme einer Wortteiltokenisierung den Fokus von der Wortebene auf die Unterwortebene, wodurch die Modelle konzeptionell komplexer und in der Praxis wohl weniger praktisch sind. Aus diesen Gründen schlagen wir CharacterBERT vor, eine neue Variante von BERT, die das Wordpiece-System komplett weglässt und stattdessen ein Character-CNN-Modul verwendet, um ganze Wörter durch Abfrage ihrer Zeichen darzustellen. Wir zeigen, dass dieses neue Modell die Leistung von BERT bei einer Vielzahl medizinischer Domänenaufgaben verbessert und gleichzeitig robuste, wortbasierte und offene Vokabeldarstellungen erzeugt.', 'id': 'Karena perbaikan yang menarik dibawa oleh BERT, banyak model representation baru-baru ini mengadopsi arsitektur Transformer sebagai blok bangunan utama mereka, konsekuensinya mewarisi sistem tokenisasi wordpiece meskipun tidak secara intrinsik terhubung dengan gagasan Transformers. While this system is thought to achieve a good balance between the flexibility of characters and the efficiency of full words, using predefined wordpiece vocabularies from the general domain is not always suitable, especially when building models for specialized domains (e.g., the medical domain).  Moreover, adopting a wordpiece tokenization shifts the focus from the word level to the subword level, making the models conceptually more complex and arguably less convenient in practice.  Untuk alasan-alasan ini, kami mengusulkan CharacterBERT, varian baru BERT yang menjatuhkan sistem wordpiece sepenuhnya dan menggunakan modul Character-CNN selain untuk mewakili seluruh kata dengan konsultasi karakter mereka. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model baru ini meningkatkan prestasi BERT pada berbagai tugas domain medis sementara pada saat yang sama menghasilkan representation kuat, tingkat kata, dan vocabulari terbuka.', 'ko': 'BERT가 주목할 만한 개선을 가져왔기 때문에 많은 최근의 표현 모델들이Transformer 구조를 주요 구축 블록으로 채택했기 때문에 단어 표기화 시스템을 계승했다. 비록Transformers의 개념과 본질적인 관계가 없지만.이 시스템은 문자의 유연성과 완전한 단어의 효율 사이에서 좋은 균형을 이룰 수 있다고 여겨지지만 일반 분야에서 나온 미리 정의된 단어와 단어를 사용하는 것이 항상 적합하지 않다. 특히 전문 분야(예를 들어 의학 분야)를 위한 모델을 구축할 때 말이다.그 밖에 단어 표기화로 초점을 단어 단계에서 하위 단어 단계로 옮기면 모델이 개념적으로 더욱 복잡해지고 실천에서 더욱 불편할 수 있다.이러한 이유로 우리는 Character BERT를 제기했다. 이것은 BERT의 새로운 변체이다. 이것은 단어 시스템을 완전히 포기하고 문자 CNN 모듈을 사용하여 단어의 문자를 조회하여 전체 단어를 표시한다.우리는 이러한 새로운 모델이 BERT의 각종 의학 분야 임무에서의 성능을 향상시켰고 건장하고 단어급이며 개방적인 어휘 표시를 동시에 만들어 냈다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'به دلیل بهترین توسط BERT پیشرفته شده، بسیاری از مدلهای نمایش اخیر معماری تغییر\u200cدهنده را به عنوان بلوک اصلی ساختمان آنها پذیرفته است، بنابراین به ارث سیستم توکین کردن نقشه\u200cهای کلمه، با وجود اینکه در داخلی به نظر تغییر\u200cدهندگان ارتباط ندارد. در حالی که این سیستم فکر می\u200cشود که با استفاده از واژه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای پیش\u200cفرض از دامنه عمومی، همیشه مناسب نیست، مخصوصا وقتی که مدل ساختن برای دامنه\u200cهای مخصوص (مثال دامنه پزشکی) باشد. علاوه بر این، با توجه به توکین کردن یک نقطه کلمه تمرکز از سطح کلمه به سطح زیر کلمه تغییر می\u200cدهد، که مدل\u200cها به نظر مفهوم پیچیده\u200cتر و به نظر آسانتر در تمرین می\u200cکند. به خاطر این دلایل، ما کارت\u200cبرت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک تغییر جدید از BERT که سیستم\u200cبندی کلمه\u200cای را فرو می\u200cگذارد و از یک مدول Character-CNN استفاده می\u200cکند تا کلمه کلمه\u200cها را با مشورت شخصیت\u200cهایشان نشان دهد. ما نشان می دهیم که این مدل جدید عملکرد BERT را بر روی کارهای مختلف حوزه پزشکی بهتر می کند در حالی که در آن زمان تولید نمایش\u200cهای قوی، سطح کلمات و کلمات باز است.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na maendeleo yanayotokana na BERT, mifano mingi ya uwakilishi wa hivi karibuni ilichukua ujenzi wa Transfer kama kizuizi kikuu cha jengo lao, na hivyo kulirithi mfumo wa kuandika maneno pamoja na kuwa haijaunganishwa na dhana ya WaTransformers. Wakati mfumo huu unafikiriwa kupata usawa mzuri kati ya ubunifu wa wahusika na ufanisi wa maneno kamili, kwa kutumia maneno yaliyochapishwa kutoka eneo la kawaida si sahihi, hasa pale ambapo kujenga miundo ya ndani maalumu (kwa mfano, ndani ya matibabu). Zaidi ya hayo, kupitia alama ishara ya neno hubadilisha fokus kutoka ngazi ya neno hadi kiwango cha chini cha maneno, na kufanya mifano yenye utata zaidi na yenye hoja kuwa ni rahisi zaidi katika mazoea. Kwa sababu hizi, tunapendekeza CharacterBERT, tofauti mpya ya BERT inayotupa mfumo wa maneno kwa ujumla na kutumia kifaa cha Character-CNN badala ya kuwakilisha maneno yote kwa kuwasiliana na wahusika wao. Tunaonyesha kuwa mtindo huu mpya unaboresha ufanisi wa BERT katika kazi mbalimbali za ndani za matibabu wakati huo huo huo unaotengeneza mauaji, kiwango cha maneno, na uwakilishi wa lugha ya wazi.', 'tr': "BERT tarapyndan getirilen örän täsirli gelişmeler üçin köp nusgasy üçin Transformer arhitekturuny özleriniň esasy bina blok hökmünde götürdi. Bu sebäpli, söz baglanmasy sistemini terjime edip bilmeseydi. Bu sistemiň karakterleriň fleksibilitäsi we doly sözlerin etkinliýeti arasynda gowy çykyş bolmagy pikir edilýär. Umumy domenyň ön bellenen sözler sözlerini ulanmak hemişe gowy däl, ýöne-da spesializ alanlar üçin örän nusgalar inşa etýände (meselm, tıbbi domeny). Şu ýerde, söz bellenenleri ulanmak söz derejesinden fokusyny subsöz derejesine üýtgeder, nusgalary düşünüp biraz karmaşık we praktikada azaltýar. Bu sebäplerden üçin, BERT'iň täze bir wariant teklif edip, sözläni tamamlamak üçin bir Karakter-CNN modini ulanýarys. Biz bu yeni modelde BERT'in farklı tıbbi domeny işlerini geliştirir ve aynı zamanda güçlü, kelime seviyesi ve a ç sözlük temsillerini üretir.", 'sq': 'Për shkak të përmirësimeve shtypëse të sjelluara nga BERT, shumë modele përfaqësimi të fundit miratuan arkitekturën e Transformer si bllokun kryesor të ndërtimit të tyre, duke trashëguar në pasojë sistemin e tokenizimit të fjalëveprave megjithëse nuk ishte i lidhur në mënyrë intrinsike me konceptin e Transformers. Ndërsa ky sistem mendohet të arrijë një balancë të mirë midis fleksibilitetit të karakterëve dhe efektivitetit të fjalëve të plota, përdorimi i fjalorëve të paracaktuar nga domenia e përgjithshme nuk është gjithmonë i përshtatshëm, veçanërisht kur ndërton modele për domeni të specializuar (për shembull domenia mjekësore). Përveç kësaj, miratimi i një teksti tokenizimi lëviz fokusin nga niveli i fjalës në nivelin e nënfjalës, duke i bërë modelet konceptualisht më komplekse dhe ndoshta më pak të përshtatshëm në praktikë. Për këto arsye, propozojmë CharacterBERT, një variant të ri të BERT që heq komplet sistemin e teksteve dhe përdor një modul Character-CNN në vend të kësaj për të përfaqësuar fjalë të tëra duke konsultuar karakteret e tyre. Ne tregojmë se ky model i ri përmirëson performancën e BERT në një shumëllojshmëri detyrash mjekësore ndërsa në të njëjtën kohë prodhon përfaqësime të forta, të nivelit të fjalëve dhe të fjalëve të hapura.', 'af': "Dus die verdrukking verbeteringe wat deur BERT gebring is, het baie onlangse verteenwoordingsmodele die Transformer-arkitektuur as hul hoofboublok aangeneem, volgens die verdrukking van die woordpak-tokenisasie stelsel erfdeel, selfs dit nie intrinsiese verbind is met die noesie van Transformers nie. Terwyl hierdie stelsel gedink word om 'n goeie balans te bereik tussen die fleksibiliteit van karakters en die effektiviteit van volle woorde, gebruik vooraf gedefinieerde woordspasieboeke van die algemene domein is nie altyd geskikbaar nie, veral wanneer modele vir spesialiseerde domeine gebou word (bv. die mediese domein). Ook, die aanneem van 'n woordplak-tokenisasie verwyder die fokus van die woord vlak na die subwoord vlak, maak die modele konseptieëls meer kompleks en argumentieëls minder toepaslik in praksie. Vir hierdie rede stel ons karakterBERT voorstel, 'n nuwe variant van BERT wat die woordpak stelsel heeltemal laat val en gebruik 'n Karakter-CNN module in plaas om hele woorde te verteenwoord deur hulle karakters te raadpleeg. Ons wys dat hierdie nuwe model die prestasie van BERT op 'n verskillende mediese domein opdragte verbeter terwyl op dieselfde tyd kragtige, woord-vlak en oop-woordeboek voorstellings produseer.", 'am': 'BERT ካደረገው ግንኙነት ምክንያት ብዙዎች የቅርብ ብሔራዊ ተሟጋቾች የፊርማዊ መሠረተ ሠርት እንደ ዋነኛው ግንኙነት አካባቢ ሆኖ በይነመረብ ካልተገኘ እንኳ የቃላት ጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያውን ሲወርሱ ተፈትተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ይህ ስርዓት በጽሑፎች እና በሙሉ ቃላት እና በአካባቢነት መካከል መልካም ሚዛን እንዲያገኝ ያስባል፣ ከጠቅላላ ድምፅ የተደረገውን የቃላት ብጤቶች ከጠቅላላ ዶሜን በመጠቀም ሁልጊዜ አይገባውም፣ በተለይም ለspecialized domain ምሳሌዎችን መሠረት (ምሳሌ መድኃኒት ዲሜን) ደግሞም የቃላትን ማስታወቂያ በመስጠት ቃላትን ከቃላት ደረጃን ወደ ታች ቃላት ይለውጣል፤ ምሳሌዎቹንም በአስቸኳይ ትክክለኛ እና በአስቸጋሪው ማሰናከል አይቻልም፡፡ ስለዚህም ምክንያት አዲስ የፊደል ቅርጽ ፊደል ብሬት፣ የፊደል ክፍተቱን በሙሉ የሚጥል እና የፊደል-CNN ሞዴል በመጠቀም በአዲስ የፊደል ቃላትን በመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ይህ አዲስ ምሳሌ BERT በተለያዩ መድኃኒት ዶሜን ስራዎችን እንዲያሳድግ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በዚያውም ሰዓት ነጥብ፣ ቃላት-ደረጃ እና የተከፈተ የንግግር መልዕክቶች እና ክፍለ መልዕክቶችን በመፍጠር ነው፡፡', 'az': "BERT tarafından gələn təkəbbürlük düzəltmələrin səbəbi, yeni bir çox göstərici modellərin Transformer arhitektarını özlərinin ana bina bloğu kimi qəbul etdi, buna görə də sözlərin tokenizasyon sistemini varis etdi, Transformers fikirlərinə bağlı olmadığı halda. Bu sistem, qüdrətlərin fleksibiliyyəti və bütün sözlərin faydallığı arasında yaxşı bir çəkinmə müvəffəqiyyəti ola biləcəyini düşünürlər ki, dünya domeindən əvvəl belə edilmiş sözlər sözlərini istifadə etmək həmişə uyğun deyildir, özlərinə də xüsusiyyətli domenin modellərini inşa etdikdə (məsələ Əksinə, sözlərin tokenizasyonu qəbul etmək sözlərin seviyyətindən baxımını apar sözlərin seviyyətinə dəyişdirir, modelləri düşüncə daha kompleks və müzakirə olaraq praksiyada daha düzgün edər. Bu səbəblərə görə, CharacterBERT'un yeni variasiyonu təbliğ edirik ki, sözlərin sistemini bütün yerə düşür və öz karakterlərinə məsləhət edərək bütün sözləri göstərmək üçün CharacterBERT modulu istifadə edir. Biz bu yeni modellərin BERT'nin müxtəlif təhsil işləri ilə müxtəlif təhsil etdiyini göstəririk, eyni zamanda möhkəm, söz səviyyəsini və a çıq sözləri təhsil edir.", 'hy': 'Due to the compelling improvements brought by BERT, many recent representation models adopted the Transformer architecture as their main building block, consequently inheriting the wordpiece tokenization system despite it not being intrinsically linked to the notion of Transformers.  While this system is thought to achieve a good balance between the flexibility of characters and the efficiency of full words, using predefined wordpiece vocabularies from the general domain is not always suitable, especially when building models for specialized domains (e.g., the medical domain).  Ավելին, բառերի տեխնիզացիայի ընդունելը փոխում է կենտրոնացումը բառի մակարդակից դեպի ենթաբառի մակարդակ, դարձնելով մոդելները գաղափարի առումով ավելի բարդ և հավանաբար ավելի քիչ հարմարավետ իրականության մեջ: Այս պատճառներից մենք առաջարկում ենք ԲԵՌՏ-ի սիրտը, BEՌՏ-ի նոր տարբերակը, որը ամբողջությամբ անջատում է բառերի համակարգը և օգտագործում է Սիրտը-CNN-ի մոդուլը, որպեսզի ներկայացնի ամբողջ բառերը՝ խորհուրդով իրենց սիրտ Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս նոր մոդելը բարելավում է BER-ի արտադրողականությունը բժշկական ոլորտների բազմաթիվ խնդիրներում, միաժամանակ ստեղծում է ուժեղ, բառերի և բաց բառերի ներկայացումներ:', 'bn': 'বেরেটির দ্বারা প্রয়োজনীয় উন্নয়নের কারণে সাম্প্রতিক প্রতিনিধি মডেল তাদের প্রধান ভবনের ব্লক হিসেবে ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফার্মের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মূল প্রতি যদিও এই সিস্টেম বিশেষ করে ডোমেইন থেকে নির্ধারিত শব্দভাণ্ডার ব্যবহার করে বিশেষ করে যখন বিশেষ ডোমেইনের মডেল তৈরি করা হয় (যেমন চিকিৎসার ডোমেইন)। এছাড়াও, একটি শব্দপাত্রের টোকানিজেশন গ্রহণ করা শব্দের স্তর থেকে সাবওয়ার্ডের স্তর পর্যন্ত মনোযোগ পাল্টে যায়, যা মডেলটিকে অনেক জটিল এবং য এই কারণের জন্য আমরা চ্যারাক্টার বেরেট, একটি নতুন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, যা ওয়ার্ডপাস্ট সিস্টেম সম্পূর্ণভাবে ফেলে দেয় এবং তাদের অক্ষর-সিএনএন মডিউল ব্যবহ We show that this new model improves the performance of BERT on a variety of medical domain tasks while at the same time producing robust, word-level, and open-vocabulary representations.', 'et': 'BERT-i poolt toodud kaalukate täiustuste tõttu võtsid paljud hiljutised esitusmudelid oma peamise ehitusplokina kasutusele Transformeri arhitektuuri, seega pärisid sõnastiku tokeniseerimise süsteemi, vaatamata sellele, et see ei ole lahutamatult seotud Transformerite mõistega. Arvatakse, et see süsteem saavutab hea tasakaalu tähemärkide paindlikkuse ja täissõnade efektiivsuse vahel, kuid eelnevalt määratletud sõnastiku sõnavara kasutamine üldvaldkonnas ei ole alati sobiv, eriti spetsialiseeritud valdkondade mudelite (nt meditsiinivaldkonna) ehitamisel. Lisaks nihutab sõnade tokeniseerimine fookuse sõna tasemelt alamsõna tasemele, muutes mudelid kontseptuaalselt keerulisemaks ja väidetavalt praktikas vähem mugavaks. Neil põhjustel pakume välja CharacterBERT, BERT uue variandi, mis loobub sõnade süsteemist täielikult ja kasutab Character-CNN moodulit, et esitada terveid sõnu nende tähemärkidega konsulteerides. Näitame, et see uus mudel parandab BERT-i jõudlust mitmesugustel meditsiinivaldkonna ülesannetel, luues samal ajal tugevaid, sõnatasemel ja avatud sõnavara esitlusi.', 'bs': 'Zbog prisiljnih poboljšanja koje je donio BERT, mnogi nedavni modeli predstavljanja usvojili su arhitekturu transformera kao glavni blok zgrade, što je posljedice nasljeđivanje sustava tokenizacije riječi, uprkos što nije unutrašnji povezan s pojmom transformera. Iako se smatra da ovaj sistem postigne dobru ravnotežu između fleksibilnosti karaktera i učinkovitosti punih riječi, koristeći predodređene riječične rečenice iz opće g domena nije uvijek odgovarajuće, posebno kada izgradimo modele za specijalizovane domene (npr. medicinske domene). Osim toga, usvajanje tokenizacije riječi mijenja fokus sa nivoa riječi na nivo podriječi, čineći modele konceptualno kompleksnijim i navodno manje prikladnim u praksi. Zbog ovih razloga predlažemo CharacterBERT, novi variant BERT koji potpuno ispušta sistem rečenica i koristi modul Character-CNN umjesto da predstavlja cijele riječi savjetujući njihove likove. Pokazujemo da ovaj novi model poboljšava funkciju BERT-a na raznim zadacima u medicinskoj domenu, dok u isto vrijeme proizvodi robne, razine riječi i otvorene riječne predstave.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k přesvědčivým zlepšením, která BERT přinesl, mnoho nedávných reprezentačních modelů přijalo architekturu Transformeru jako hlavní stavební blok, což následně zdědilo systém tokenizace slovních dílů, i když nebyl vnitřně spojen s pojmem Transformerů. Zatímco tento systém je považován za dosažení dobré rovnováhy mezi flexibilitou znaků a efektivitou plných slov, použití předdefinovaných slovníků slovníků z obecné domény není vždy vhodné, zejména při budování modelů pro specializované domény (např. medicínskou doménu). Navíc přijetí tokenizace slovních dílů přesune zaměření z úrovně slova na úroveň podslov, čímž jsou modely koncepčně složitější a pravděpodobně méně pohodlné v praxi. Z těchto důvodů navrhujeme CharacterBERT, novou variantu BERT, která úplně upustí systém slov a místo toho používá modul Character-CNN k reprezentaci celých slov konzultací jejich znaků. Ukazujeme, že tento nový model zlepšuje výkon BERT při různých úkolech lékařské oblasti a zároveň produkuje robustní reprezentace slovní úrovně a otevřené slovní zásoby.', 'fi': 'BERT:n tuomien pakottavien parannusten vuoksi monet viimeaikaiset esitysmallit omaksuivat Transformer-arkkitehtuurin päärakennuksekseen, joten ne perivät sanakappaleen tokenizaatiojärjestelmän, vaikka se ei ole olennaisesti sidoksissa Transformers-käsitteeseen. Vaikka tämän järjestelmän uskotaan saavuttavan hyvän tasapainon merkkien joustavuuden ja täydellisten sanojen tehokkuuden välillä, ennalta määriteltyjen sanakappaleiden sanastojen käyttäminen yleisestä toimialueesta ei aina sovellu, etenkään kun rakennetaan malleja erikoistuneille toimialoille (esim. lääketieteelle). Lisäksi sanakappaleen tokenisaation käyttöönotto siirtää painopisteen sanatasolta alasanatasolle, jolloin mallit ovat käsitteellisesti monimutkaisempia ja todennäköisesti vähemmän käytännöllisiä käytännössä. Näistä syistä ehdotamme CharacterBERT-versiota, joka poistaa sanakappaleet kokonaan ja käyttää Character-CNN-moduulia edustamaan kokonaisia sanoja kysymällä niiden merkkejä. Osoitamme, että tämä uusi malli parantaa BERT:n suorituskykyä erilaisissa lääketieteellisissä tehtävissä ja tuottaa samalla vankkoja, sanatason ja avoimen sanaston esityksiä.', 'ca': "Gràcies a les millores convincents que va portar BERT, molts models de representació recents van adoptar la arquitectura Transformer com el seu principal bloc de construcció, heretant conseqüentment el sistema de fitxes de mots malgrat que no està intrínsecament vinculat a la noció de Transformers. Mentre es creu que aquest sistema aconsegueix un bon equilibri entre la flexibilitat dels caràcters i l'eficiència de les paraules completas, l'ús de vocabularis predefinits del domini general no sempre és adequat, especialment quan construeix models per dominis especialitzats (per exemple, el domini mèdic). Moreover, adopting a wordpiece tokenization shifts the focus from the word level to the subword level, making the models conceptually more complex and arguably less convenient in practice.  Per aquestes raons, proposem CharacterBERT, una nova variant de BERT que deixa caure el sistema de textos totalment i utilitza un módul Character-CNN en comptes de representar paraules senceres consultant els seus caràcters. Mostrem que aquest nou model millora el rendiment de BERT en una varietat de tasques de domini mèdic mentre produeix representacions robustes, de nivell de paraules i de vocabulari obert.", 'jv': 'BERT nganggep nggawe gerambut sing dumadhi, akeh model sing gak bakal terus nggawe architecture Transformer dumadhi nggawe blok sing dadi nggawe, dadi iso heretas sistem tokenisaan paragraphik gak nggawe ora iso terus nggawe kaya nggawe Transformer. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngubah kok, nggunakake tokenisaan anyari kuwi, suku tanggal kuwi suku kelas kuwi gambar, gawe model kuwi sampeyan wisasar kelas komplikasi lan sakjane iso dianggap ngelarang kuwi praksi. Erorohan iki, kita mudhun KarakterBERT, variant sing dibutuhi BERT kang sampeyan nganggo sistem sing dadi kotak trus lan Ngawe ngubah Karakter-MTR We mungu ngomong nik akeh model sing nyebuti nggawe BERT ngono cage sistem sing paling, nik nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe sistem strength, word-evel lan Open-Vocationé', 'ha': "Dukan improvements da aka ƙara BERT, masu yawa masu motel masu tsari a yanzu suka karɓi tsarin Transformer kamar block'in babban gini, kuma saboda haka yana gãdar tsarin maganar ayuka, kuma amma ba ya zama ana haɗa shi guda da notion na Transformers. A lokacin da aka yi zaton wannan na'urar ta sãmu wani balanci mai kyau tsakanin fleksibinci na fassarar magana cikakken, kuma ya yi amfani da tsarin takardar magana wanda aka ƙayyade a gaba ɗaya daga duk ɗamfyuta bai daidai ba, kuma haske idan an gina misãlai wa masu husika (misali, madaidaici). Fura, ana ɗauki wani alama na wuri, yana musanya fokus daga zane-zane zuwa zane-zane-zane, kuma yana sami misalin ya fi zama masu adadi da kuma bã ya da daidai a cikin aikin. Saboda wannan, Munã bukãta KCharselect unicode block name Tuna nũna cewa wannan misalin yanzu ya improve aikin BERT a kan wasu aikin madaidaici da kuma a sami lokacin da za'a samar da maɓalli, maganar-daraja, da uwar magana.", 'sk': 'Zaradi prepričljivih izboljšav, ki jih je prinesel BERT, so številni nedavni modeli reprezentacije sprejeli arhitekturo transformatorjev kot svoj glavni gradnik in posledično podedovali sistem žetonizacije besedila, čeprav ni bil neločljivo povezan s pojmom transformatorjev. Čeprav naj bi ta sistem dosegel dobro ravnovesje med fleksibilnostjo znakov in učinkovitostjo polnih besed, uporaba vnaprej določenih besednih besedniških besedil iz splošne domene ni vedno primerna, zlasti pri gradnji modelov za specializirane domene (npr. medicinsko domeno). Poleg tega sprejetje žetonizacije besedila premakne fokus z besedne ravni na podbesedno raven, zaradi česar so modeli konceptualno bolj kompleksni in verjetno manj priročni v praksi. Iz teh razlogov predlagamo CharacterBERT, novo različico BERT, ki popolnoma opusti sistem besedila in namesto tega uporablja modul Character-CNN, da predstavi celotne besede s posvetovanjem z njihovimi znaki. Pokazali smo, da ta novi model izboljšuje učinkovitost BERT pri različnih nalogah medicinske domene, hkrati pa ustvarja robustne, besedne in odprte predstavitve besedišča.', 'bo': 'Due to the compelling improvements brought by BERT, many recent representation models adopted the Transformer architecture as their main building block, consequently inheriting the wordpiece tokenization system despite it not being intrinsically linked to the notion of Transformers. While this system is thought to achieve a good balance between the flexibility of characters and the efficiency of full words, using predefined wordpiece vocabularies from the general domain is not always suitable, especially when building models for specialized domains (e.g., the medical domain). ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགོད་པའི་ཚིག རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་དག་ལ་ངེད་ཚོའི་ཆོག་ཡིག་སྣོད་BERT་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གསར་པ་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་མིག', 'he': 'Due to the compelling improvements brought by BERT, many recent representation models adopted the Transformer architecture as their main building block, consequently inheriting the wordpiece tokenization system despite it not being intrinsically linked to the notion of Transformers.  בעוד המערכת הזאת חשובה להשיג איזון טוב בין הגמישות של הדמויות לבין היעילות של מילים מלאות, השימוש במילים מילים מיוחדים מוגדרים מראש מהשטח הכללי לא תמיד מתאים, במיוחד כשבניית דוגמנים לתחומות מיוחדים (למשל שטח הרפואי). חוץ מזה, האימוץ של יצירת מילים טקניזציה מעביר את המרכז מרמה המילים לרמה המילים התחתונה, הופך את הדוגמנים לקונפטיולית יותר מורכבים ובטח פחות נוח במעשה. מסיבות אלה, אנו מציעים סמל BERT, שינוי חדש של BERT שמוריד את מערכת יצירת המילים לחלוטין ושתמש במודול סמל-CNN במקום לייצג מילים שלמות על ידי ייעוץ באופים שלהם. אנחנו מראים שהמודל החדש הזה משפר את ההופעה של BERT על מגוון של משימות תחום רפואי בעוד באותו הזמן לייצר מייצגים חזקים, רמת מילים, ופתוחים מילים פתוחים.'}
{'en': 'Autoregressive Reasoning over Chains of Facts with Transformers', 'pt': 'Raciocínio Autoregressivo sobre Cadeias de Fatos com Transformadores', 'ar': 'التفكير الانحدار الذاتي على سلاسل الحقائق مع المحولات', 'es': 'Razonamiento autorregresivo sobre cadenas de hechos con Transformers', 'fr': 'Raisonnement autorégressif sur des chaînes de faits avec des transformateurs', 'ja': '変圧器による事実の連鎖に対する自己回帰的推論', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर के साथ तथ्यों की श्रृंखलाओं पर Autoregressive तर्क', 'ru': 'Авторегрессивное рассуждение о цепочках фактов с трансформаторами', 'zh': '用变压器事实者自归推理', 'ga': 'Réasúnaíocht Uathchéimnitheach thar Slabhraí Fíoras le Claochladáin', 'ka': 'ავტორეგრესიური მიზეზი ფაქტის ფექტის ფექტის შესახებ', 'el': 'Αυτοανακριτική λογική πάνω από αλυσίδες γεγονότων με μετασχηματιστές', 'hu': 'Autoregresszív érvelés a tényláncok felett transzformátorokkal', 'it': 'Ragionamento autoregressivo su catene di fatti con i trasformatori', 'kk': 'Түрлендірушілердің фактикалық таңбаларының авторегрессивні себептері', 'mk': 'Авторегресивно размислување за ланецот на факти со трансформирачи', 'lt': 'Autoregresinis faktų grandinių su transformatoriais pagrindimas', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Autoregresif atas Rangkaian Fakta dengan Penukar', 'mt': 'Raġunar Awtoregressiv fuq Katini ta’ Fatti bi Trasformaturi', 'ml': 'ഫാക്റ്റുകളുടെ ചേനുകള്\u200dക്കുമേല്\u200d സ്വയമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Автоматик сэтгэл хөдлөл шалтгаан Төрвөлдөгчдийн Солонгос', 'no': 'Autoregressiv grunn over faktiske kjer med transformerer', 'ro': 'Reacționarea autoregresivă asupra lanțurilor de fapte cu transformatori', 'pl': 'Autoregresywne rozumowanie nad łańcuchami faktów za pomocą transformatorów', 'sr': 'Autoregresivni razlog za žice činjenica sa transformatorima', 'so': 'Autoregressive Reading over Chains of Facts with Transformers', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සඳහා වාර්ථාව සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කාරණය', 'sv': 'Autoregressiv resonemang över kedjor av fakta med Transformers', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'تبدیل کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ حقیقتوں کے چہروں پر اٹوگریسٹی دلیل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tự tụt lại lẽ phải trên xích các điểm có biến hình', 'bg': 'Авторегресивно разсъждаване над вериги от факти с трансформатори', 'hr': 'Autoregresivni razlog za žice činjenica s transformatorima', 'da': 'Autoregressiv begrundelse over kæder af fakta med transformatorer', 'nl': 'Autoregressieve redenering over ketens van feiten met transformatoren', 'de': 'Autoregressives Denken über Faktenketten mit Transformatoren', 'id': 'Reasoning Autoregressive over Chain of Facts with Transformers', 'fa': 'دلایل خودگریزی بر روی زنجیرهای حقیقت با تغییردهندگان', 'sw': 'Matokeo ya kujikandamiza juu ya Mazungumzo ya Ukweli na Wasafiri', 'tr': 'Transformatçylar bilen Faýllaryň Zincirleri Awtomatik Gaýregressiv Sebäpleri', 'af': 'Outomatiese regressiewe rede oor Keisene van Fakte met Transformeerders', 'sq': 'Autoregresive Reasoning over Chains of Facts with Transformers', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Փաստադրողների շղթաների մեջ ինքնառեգրեսիվ պատճառը', 'az': 'Transformers il…ô f…ôaliyyat Zinciri √ºz…ôrind…ô Autoregressive Reasoning over Facts Chains', 'bs': 'Autoregresivni razlog preko žica činjenica sa transformatorima', 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফর্মার দ্বারা ফ্যাক্টের চেয়েনের উপর স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পুনরায় পড়া হচ্ছে', 'ko': '변압기를 띤 사실 체인의 자귀환 추리', 'ca': 'Reasoning Autoregressive Over Chains of Facts with Transformers', 'cs': 'Autoregresivní uvažování o řetězcích faktů s transformátory', 'et': 'Autoregressiivne mõistmine faktide ahelate üle transformaatoritega', 'fi': 'Itseregressiivinen päättely faktojen ketjuista muuntajien kanssa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Ngucap', 'he': 'הגיון אוטורגרסיבי על שרשרות העובדות עם מעצבים', 'sk': 'Avtoregresivno razmišljanje o verigah dejstev s transformatorji', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes an iterative inference algorithm for multi-hop explanation regeneration, that retrieves relevant factual evidence in the form of text snippets, given a natural language question and its answer. Combining multiple sources of evidence or facts for multi-hop reasoning becomes increasingly hard when the number of sources needed to make an inference grows. Our algorithm copes with this by decomposing the selection of facts from a corpus autoregressively, conditioning the next iteration on previously selected facts. This allows us to use a pairwise learning-to-rank loss. We validate our method on datasets of the TextGraphs 2019 and 2020 Shared Tasks for explanation regeneration. Existing work on this task either evaluates facts in isolation or artificially limits the possible chains of facts, thus limiting multi-hop inference. We demonstrate that our algorithm, when used with a pre-trained transformer model, outperforms the previous state-of-the-art in terms of precision, training time and inference efficiency.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة خوارزمية الاستدلال التكراري لتجديد التفسير متعدد القفزات ، والتي تسترجع الأدلة الواقعية ذات الصلة في شكل مقتطفات نصية ، بالنظر إلى سؤال اللغة الطبيعية وإجابته. يصبح الجمع بين مصادر الأدلة أو الحقائق المتعددة للاستدلال متعدد القفزات أمرًا صعبًا بشكل متزايد عندما يزداد عدد المصادر اللازمة لعمل استنتاج. تتواءم الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا مع هذا من خلال تحليل مجموعة الحقائق المختارة من مجموعة بشكل تلقائي ، وتكييف التكرار التالي على حقائق محددة مسبقًا. هذا يسمح لنا باستخدام التعلم الزوجي لخسارة الترتيب. نحن نتحقق من صحة طريقتنا في مجموعات بيانات TextGraphs 2019 و 2020 Shared Tasks لتفسير التجديد. يعمل العمل الحالي في هذه المهمة إما على تقييم الحقائق بمعزل عن غيرها أو يحد بشكل مصطنع من السلاسل المحتملة للحقائق ، وبالتالي يحد من الاستدلال متعدد القفزات. نبرهن على أن الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا ، عند استخدامها مع نموذج محول مدرب مسبقًا ، تتفوق على أحدث التقنيات السابقة من حيث الدقة ووقت التدريب وكفاءة الاستدلال.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe um algoritmo de inferência iterativo para regeneração de explicação multi-hop, que recupera evidências factuais relevantes na forma de trechos de texto, dada uma questão de linguagem natural e sua resposta. Combinar várias fontes de evidências ou fatos para o raciocínio multi-hop torna-se cada vez mais difícil quando o número de fontes necessárias para fazer uma inferência cresce. Nosso algoritmo lida com isso decompondo a seleção de fatos de um corpus de forma autorregressiva, condicionando a próxima iteração a fatos previamente selecionados. Isso nos permite usar uma perda de aprendizado para classificação aos pares. Validamos nosso método em conjuntos de dados das Tarefas Compartilhadas TextGraphs 2019 e 2020 para regeneração de explicação. O trabalho existente nesta tarefa avalia os fatos isoladamente ou limita artificialmente as possíveis cadeias de fatos, limitando assim a inferência multi-hop. Demonstramos que nosso algoritmo, quando usado com um modelo de transformador pré-treinado, supera o estado da arte anterior em termos de precisão, tempo de treinamento e eficiência de inferência.', 'es': 'Este artículo propone un algoritmo de inferencia iterativa para la regeneración de explicaciones de múltiples saltos, que recupera evidencia fáctica relevante en forma de fragmentos de texto, dada una pregunta de lenguaje natural y su respuesta. Combinar múltiples fuentes de evidencia o hechos para el razonamiento de saltos múltiples se vuelve cada vez más difícil cuando aumenta el número de fuentes necesarias para hacer una inferencia. Nuestro algoritmo hace frente a esto al descomponer la selección de hechos de un corpus de forma autorregresiva, condicionando la siguiente iteración a hechos previamente seleccionados. Esto nos permite usar una pérdida de aprendizaje de rango por pares. Validamos nuestro método en los conjuntos de datos de las tareas compartidas de TextGraphs 2019 y 2020 para la regeneración de explicaciones. El trabajo existente en esta tarea evalúa los hechos de forma aislada o limita artificialmente las posibles cadenas de hechos, lo que limita la inferencia de múltiples saltos. Demostramos que nuestro algoritmo, cuando se usa con un modelo de transformador previamente entrenado, supera al estado de la técnica anterior en términos de precisión, tiempo de entrenamiento y eficiencia de inferencia.', 'fr': "Cet article propose un algorithme d'inférence itérative pour la régénération d'explications multi-sauts, qui récupère des preuves factuelles pertinentes sous forme d'extraits de texte, à partir d'une question en langage naturel et de sa réponse. La combinaison de plusieurs sources de preuves ou de faits pour un raisonnement à sauts multiples devient de plus en plus difficile lorsque le nombre de sources nécessaires pour faire une inférence augmente. Notre algorithme gère cela en décomposant la sélection de faits d'un corpus de manière autorégressive, conditionnant l'itération suivante sur des faits précédemment sélectionnés. Cela nous permet d'utiliser une perte d'apprentissage au classement par paires. Nous validons notre méthode sur les ensembles de données des TextGraphs 2019 et 2020 Shared Tasks pour la régénération des explications. Les travaux existants sur cette tâche évaluent les faits isolément ou limitent artificiellement les chaînes de faits possibles, limitant ainsi l'inférence à sauts multiples. Nous démontrons que notre algorithme, lorsqu'il est utilisé avec un modèle de transformateur préentraîné, surpasse les performances de pointe précédentes en termes de précision, de temps d'entraînement et d'efficacité d'inférence.", 'ja': '本論文では、自然言語の問題とその答えを考慮して、テキストスニペットの形で関連する事実の証拠を取得する、マルチホップの説明再生のための反復推論アルゴリズムを提案した。 推論に必要なソースの数が増えるにつれて、マルチホップ推論のための複数の証拠または事実のソースを組み合わせることはますます困難になります。 我々のアルゴリズムは、コーパスからの事実の選択を自己回帰的に分解し、以前に選択された事実に次の反復を条件付けることでこれに対処します。 これにより、ペアワイズ学習によるランクロスを利用することができます。 説明の再生成のために、TextGraphs 2019および2020 Shared Tasksのデータセットでメソッドを検証します。 このタスクに関する既存の作業は、事実を孤立して評価するか、または人為的に可能な事実の連鎖を制限し、したがってマルチホップ推論を制限する。 当社のアルゴリズムは、事前にトレーニングされた変圧器モデルと共に使用すると、精度、トレーニング時間、推論効率の面で従来の最先端のものよりも優れていることを実証します。', 'zh': '本文设一种用多跳解释再生的迭代推理算法,该算法以文本片段检索相关事实,给定一个自然语言问及答案。 及为推论所从来数增,以多证事实组合成多跳转益难。 余算法因自归地分解语料库中所择事实以应之,并以前所择事调下一迭代。 此许用成对学排名损失。 吾于 TextGraphs 2019 与 2020 共事之数集上验吾法,以复生解。 有此事有孤立评事,有人为地限事实,以限多推理。 臣等证当与预练变压器模同用时,算法在精度、练时、推理效率优于前最先进之算法。', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается итеративный алгоритм вывода для регенерации многохоповых объяснений, который извлекает соответствующие фактические доказательства в виде фрагментов текста, задавая вопрос на естественном языке и его ответ. Сочетание нескольких источников доказательств или фактов для многохоповых рассуждений становится все более трудным, когда растет количество источников, необходимых для вывода. Наш алгоритм справляется с этим, декомпозируя выборку фактов из корпуса автоматически регрессивно, обусловливая следующую итерацию ранее выбранными фактами. Это позволяет нам использовать попарную потерю «обучение - ранжирование». Мы проверяем наш метод на наборах данных общих задач TextGraphs 2019 и 2020 для регенерации объяснений. Нынешняя работа над этой задачей либо оценивает факты изолированно, либо искусственно ограничивает возможные цепочки фактов, тем самым ограничивая многохоповые выводы. Мы демонстрируем, что наш алгоритм, при использовании с предварительно обученной моделью трансформатора, превосходит предыдущий по точности, времени обучения и эффективности вывода.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर मल्टी-हॉप स्पष्टीकरण पुनर्जनन के लिए एक पुनरावर्ती अनुमान एल्गोरिथ्म का प्रस्ताव करता है, जो पाठ स्निपेट के रूप में प्रासंगिक तथ्यात्मक साक्ष्य को पुनर्प्राप्त करता है, एक प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रश्न और इसके उत्तर को देखते हुए। मल्टी-हॉप तर्क के लिए साक्ष्य या तथ्यों के कई स्रोतों का संयोजन तेजी से कठिन हो जाता है जब अनुमान लगाने के लिए आवश्यक स्रोतों की संख्या बढ़ जाती है। हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म एक कॉर्पस से तथ्यों के चयन को स्वत: प्रतिगामी रूप से विघटित करके, पहले से चुने गए तथ्यों पर अगले पुनरावृत्ति को कंडीशनिंग करके इसका सामना करता है। यह हमें एक pairwise सीखने-से-रैंक नुकसान का उपयोग करने की अनुमति देता है। हम स्पष्टीकरण पुनर्जनन के लिए TextGraphs 2019 और 2020 साझा कार्यों के डेटासेट पर हमारी विधि को मान्य करते हैं। इस कार्य पर मौजूदा काम या तो अलगाव में तथ्यों का मूल्यांकन करता है या कृत्रिम रूप से तथ्यों की संभावित श्रृंखलाओं को सीमित करता है, इस प्रकार बहु-हॉप अनुमान को सीमित करता है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म, जब एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफार्मर मॉडल के साथ उपयोग किया जाता है, तो परिशुद्धता, प्रशिक्षण समय और अनुमान दक्षता के मामले में पिछले राज्य-कला को मात देता है।', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo algartam tátal atriallach le haghaidh athghiniúint míniú il-hop, a aisghabhann fianaise fhíorasach ábhartha i bhfoirm sleachta téacs, nuair a chuirtear ceist teanga nádúrtha agus a freagra san áireamh. Éiríonn níos deacra foinsí iolracha fianaise nó fíricí a chomhcheangal le haghaidh réasúnaíocht ilhop nuair a thagann méadú ar líon na bhfoinsí a theastaíonn chun tátal a dhéanamh. Téann ár n-algartam i ngleic leis seo trí roghnú na bhfíoras ó chorpas a dhianscaoileadh go huathoibríoch, agus an chéad atriall eile á riochtú ar fhíorais a roghnaíodh roimhe seo. Ligeann sé seo dúinn caillteanas foghlama-go-rangú péirewise a úsáid. Déanaimid ár modh a bhailíochtú ar thacair thacair Thascanna Comhroinnte TextGraphs 2019 agus 2020 le haghaidh athghiniúint mínithe. Déanann obair reatha ar an tasc seo measúnú ar fhíricí ina n-aonar nó cuireann teorainn shaorga teorainn leis na slabhraí féideartha fíricí, rud a chuireann srian ar thátal il-hop. Léirímid go sáraíonn ár n-algartam, nuair a úsáidtear é le múnla claochladán réamhoilte, ná an ceann is déanaí atá ann roimhe seo i dtéarmaí beachtas, am oiliúna agus éifeachtúlacht tátail.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει έναν επαναλαμβανόμενο αλγόριθμο συμπερασμάτων για την αναγέννηση επεξήγησης πολλαπλών λυκίδων, ο οποίος ανακτά σχετικές πραγματικές αποδείξεις με τη μορφή αποσπασμάτων κειμένου, με δεδομένη μια ερώτηση φυσικής γλώσσας και την απάντησή της. Ο συνδυασμός πολλαπλών πηγών αποδεικτικών στοιχείων ή γεγονότων για τη συλλογιστική πολλαπλών χορού γίνεται όλο και πιο δύσκολος όταν αυξάνεται ο αριθμός των πηγών που απαιτούνται για να συναχθεί ένα συμπέρασμα. Ο αλγόριθμος μας το αντιμετωπίζει αυτό αποσυντίθεται αυτόματα την επιλογή των γεγονότων από ένα σώμα, θέτοντας την επόμενη επανάληψη σε προηγούμενα επιλεγμένα γεγονότα. Αυτό μας επιτρέπει να χρησιμοποιήσουμε μια απώλεια μάθησης-κατάταξης ζευγαριών. Επιβεβαιώνουμε τη μέθοδο μας σε σύνολα δεδομένων των Κοινών Εργασιών Κειμένων 2019 και 2020 για αναγέννηση εξήγησης. Η υπάρχουσα εργασία σε αυτό το έργο είτε αξιολογεί τα γεγονότα μεμονωμένα είτε περιορίζει τεχνητά τις πιθανές αλυσίδες γεγονότων, περιορίζοντας έτσι το συμπέρασμα πολλαπλών λυκίδων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι ο αλγόριθμος μας, όταν χρησιμοποιείται με ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή, ξεπερνά την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας όσον αφορά την ακρίβεια, το χρόνο εκπαίδευσης και την αποδοτικότητα συμπερασμάτων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy iteratív következtetési algoritmust javasol a multi-hop magyarázat regenerálására, amely szövegrészletek formájában releváns ténybeli bizonyítékokat szerez, adott természetes nyelvű kérdés és annak válasza alapján. A több bizonyítékforrás vagy tényforrás kombinálása a multi-hop érveléshez egyre nehezebbé válik, amikor a következtetéshez szükséges források száma növekszik. Algoritmusunk úgy kezeli ezt, hogy a tények kiválasztását egy korpuszból önregresszív módon bontja fel, és a következő iterációt korábban kiválasztott tényekre kondicionálja. Ez lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy páros tanulás-rang veszteséget használjunk. Módszerünket a TextGraphs 2019 és 2020 Shared Tasks adatkészletein validáljuk a magyarázat regenerálása érdekében. Az e feladaton végzett meglévő munka vagy önállóan értékeli a tényeket, vagy mesterségesen korlátozza a lehetséges tényláncokat, korlátozva ezzel a multi-hop következtetést. Bemutatjuk, hogy algoritmusunk egy előre kiképzett transzformátormodellel történő használata esetén a precizitás, az edzési idő és a következtetési hatékonyság tekintetében felülmúlja a korábbi korszerűséget.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un algoritmo iterativo di inferenza per la rigenerazione della spiegazione multi-hop, che recupera prove fattuali rilevanti sotto forma di frammenti di testo, data una domanda di linguaggio naturale e la sua risposta. Combinare più fonti di prove o fatti per ragionamenti multi-hop diventa sempre più difficile quando il numero di fonti necessarie per fare un'inferenza cresce. Il nostro algoritmo fa fronte a questo scomponendo la selezione dei fatti da un corpus auto regressivamente, condizionando la prossima iterazione su fatti precedentemente selezionati. Questo ci permette di utilizzare una perdita di apprendimento a livello di coppia. Validiamo il nostro metodo sui set di dati delle attività condivise TextGraphs 2019 e 2020 per la rigenerazione delle spiegazioni. Il lavoro esistente su questo compito valuta i fatti in modo isolato o limita artificialmente le possibili catene di fatti, limitando così l'inferenza multi-hop. Dimostriamo che il nostro algoritmo, se utilizzato con un modello di trasformatore pre-addestrato, supera lo stato dell'arte precedente in termini di precisione, tempo di allenamento e efficienza di inferenza.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი განახლების რეგენერაციისთვის, რომელიც ტექსტის სნთპეტების ფორმაში მიიღებს შესაძლებელი ფაქტიური წარმოდგენების ალგორიტიმი, რომელიც მიიღება მოსაწყებელი ტექსტის სნთპეტების მრავალ-ჰოპის პარამენტისთვის მრავალ გამოსახულების ან ფაქტის გამოსახულება უფრო რთული იქნება, როდესაც ინფრენციის გაზრდილობისთვის უნდა იქნება მრავალ ჩვენი ალგორიტიმა ამით გადაწყება, რომელიც კორპუსის ავტორეგრესიურად მონიშნული ფაქტების გადაწყებით, რომელიც წინ მონიშნული ფაქტების შემდეგი განახლების შემდეგი განახლების შემ ეს ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გამოიყენოთ ორივე სწავლების დასრულება. ჩვენ ჩვენი მეტი 2019 და 2020 ტექსტგრაფიების განსაზღვრების რეგენერაციისთვის გავაკეთებთ. ამ დავალების მუშაობაში არსებობს ფაქტები იზოლაციაში, ან ხელოვნურად ფაქტების შესაძლებელი კონფექტების კონფექტების შესაძლებელი კონფექტები, რადგან მრავალ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი ალგორიტიმ, როდესაც გამოყენებულია პრეტრანსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინციის მოდელზე,', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomas pakartotinis daugelio apynių paaiškinimų regeneravimo išvadų algoritmas, kuriame gaunami atitinkami faktiniai įrodymai teksto fragmentų pavidalu, atsižvelgiant į natūralų kalbų klausimą ir jo atsakymą. Daugiausių įrodymų ar faktų derinimas daugiapyniniam pagrindimui tampa vis sunkesnis, kai didėja šaltinių, reikalingų padaryti išvadą, skaičius. Mūsų algoritmas sprendžia šį klausimą atskirdamas faktų pasirinkimą iš korpuso autoregresiškai, sąlyguodamas kitą kartojimą anksčiau pasirinktais faktais. Tai leidžia mums panaudoti dviejų rūšių mokymosi nuostolius. Patvirtiname savo metodą dėl 2019 m. ir 2020 m. teksto grafikų duomenų rinkinių, skirtų bendram paaiškinimų atnaujinimui. Dabartinis darbas atliekant šią užduotį vertina faktus atskirai arba dirbtinai riboja galimas faktų grandines, taip apribojant daugiapynių išvadas. Mes įrodome, kad mūsų algoritmas, kai naudojamas su iš anksto parengtu transformatoriaus modeliu, viršija ankstesnę pažangą tikslumo, mokymo laiko ir išvadų efektyvumo požiūriu.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз көптеген түсініктерді қайта жасау үшін қайталану алгоритмін ұсынады. Бұл мәтін снипеттерінің түрінде, табиғи тілде сұрақ және жауап берілген жағдайларды қайталап береді. Көп-хоп сезімі үшін бірнеше құпия немесе факттердің көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген көздерді біріктіру керек болады. Алгоритміз бұл параметрді корпус авторегрессиялық түрде таңдау үшін, алдыңғы таңдалған факттардың келесі қайталауын шартқа арналады. Бұл бізге қос оқыту үшін жоғалуға мүмкіндік береді. Біз 2019 және 2020 TextGraphs деректер қорларының ортақ тапсырмаларын түсініктіру үшін әдімізді тексереміз. Бұл тапсырманың барлық жұмысында немесе осылақтағы факттерді, немесе өзгертілген факттердің тізбегін шектеп, көптеген хоптардың шектеуді шектеп береді. Біз алгоритміздің алгоритміміз, өзгертілген түрлендіруші үлгісімен қолданылған кезде, алдыңғы әртүрлі күйінің дұрыс, оқыту уақыты және көмектесу эффективнілігін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan algoritma kesimpulan ulang untuk penjelasan berbilang-hop regenerasi, yang mengambil bukti fakta berkaitan dalam bentuk snippets teks, diberikan soalan bahasa biasa dan jawapannya. Menggabungkan sumber bukti berbilang atau fakta untuk alasan berbilang-hop menjadi semakin sukar apabila bilangan sumber yang diperlukan untuk membuat kesimpulan tumbuh. Algoritma kita menghadapi ini dengan menghancurkan pemilihan fakta dari korpus secara automatik, menguatkan ulangan berikutnya pada fakta yang telah dipilih sebelumnya. Ini membolehkan kita menggunakan kehilangan belajar-ke-peringkat sepasang. Kami sahkan kaedah kami pada set data Teks 2019 dan 2020 Tugas Berkongsi untuk penjelasan semula. Kerja yang wujud pada tugas ini sama ada menilai fakta dalam pengasingan atau secara buatan membatasi rantai fakta yang mungkin, sehingga membatasi kesimpulan multi-hop. Kami menunjukkan bahawa algoritma kita, apabila digunakan dengan model pengubah yang dilatih-dilatih, melebihi keadaan-keadaan terdahulu dalam terma ketepatan, masa latihan dan kesudahan kesimpulan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പല-ഹോപ്പിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു സാധാരണമായ അപരിഹാരം ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് പദാവലിയുടെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d പ്ര പല തെളിവുകളുടെയും സത്യങ്ങളുടെയും സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് ഒരുപാട് തെളിവുകളുടെയും കാരണങ്ങളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d അപകടത നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഇതുമായി സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വയമായി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d വെട്ടിപ്പോ ഇത് നമുക്ക് ജോലിയുടെ ജോലി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള ടെക്സ്റ്റ്ഗ്രാഫ്സിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും 2020 പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത ജോല ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലിയുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d ഒറ്റയ്ക്കുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളെ വില്\u200dക്കുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കൃത്രിമികമായി വാക് നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള രീതിയിലെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ സമയവും അപര', 'mt': 'This paper proposes an iterative inference algorithm for multi-hop explanation regeneration, that retrieves relevant factual evidence in the form of text snippets, given a natural language question and its answer.  Il-kombinazzjoni ta’ diversi sorsi ta’ evidenza jew fatti għar-raġunament b’ħafna ħops issir dejjem aktar diffiċli meta n-numru ta’ sorsi meħtieġa biex isir inferenza jikber. L-algoritmu tagħna jiffaċċja dan billi jiddekomponi l-għa żla tal-fatti minn korpus awtoregressivament, u jikkundizzjona l-iterazzjoni li jmiss fuq fatti magħżula minn qabel. Dan jippermettilna nużaw telf ta’ tagħlim bejn il-pari. Aħna jivvalidaw il-metodu tagħna dwar settijiet ta’ dejta tal-Grafiki Tekstiċi 2019 u 2020 Kompiti Konġunti għar-riġenerazzjoni ta’ spjegazzjonijiet. Il-ħidma eżistenti fuq dan il-kompitu jew tevalwa fatti iżolati jew tillimita artifiċjalment il-katini possibbli ta’ fatti, u b’hekk tillimita l-inferenza ta’ ħafna ħops. Aħna nippruvaw li l-algoritmu tagħna, meta użat ma’ mudell ta’ trasformatur imħarreġ minn qabel, huwa aktar avvanzat minn dak pre ċedenti f’termini ta’ preċiżjoni, ħin ta’ taħriġ u effiċjenza ta’ inferenza.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас олон холбоотой тайлбарлалтын дахин сэргээхэд дахин дахин халдварын алгоритмыг дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин нэмэгдүүлэх алгоритмыг санал болгодог. Энэ нь текст хэлний хэлний асуулт болон хариултыг олгодог. Ихэнх холбоотой ойлголтын олон баталгаа эсвэл үнэний олон баталгааны эх үүсвэрүүдийг холбох нь халдвар өсөхийн тулд хэрэгтэй эх үүсвэрүүдийн тоо илүү хэцүү болдог. Бидний алгоритм үүнийг холбоотой. Корпус-ын сонголтыг автоматаар сэргээж, өмнө нь сонгогдсон жинхэнээс дараагийн дахин дахин дахин сэргээж байна. Энэ нь бидэнд хоёр талаар суралцах боломжтой. Бид 2019 болон 2020 оны TextGraphs-ын өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд тайлбарлах үйл ажиллагааг шалгаж байна. Энэ үйл ажилд байгаа зүйл нь ганцаардаг эсвэл уран бүтээлийн жинхэнэ хэлхээ хязгаарладаг. Иймээс олон холбоотой халдварыг хязгаарладаг. Бид алгоритмыг урьд сургалтын шилжүүлэгч загвартай ашиглах үед өмнөх урлагийн байр сургалтыг тодорхойлох, сургалтын цаг, халдварын үр дүнтэй тодорхойлдог гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'mk': 'Овој весник предложува итеративен алгоритм на инференција за регенерација на објаснувањата на мултихоп, кој добива релевантни фактични докази во форма на текстови, со оглед на природното прашање на јазикот и неговиот одговор. Комбинацијата на повеќето извори на докази или факти за размислување на мултихоп станува сé тешка кога бројот на извори потребни за да се направи конференција се зголемува. Нашиот алгоритм се справува со ова со разделување на изборот на факти од корпус авторегресивно, условувајќи ја следната итерација на претходно избрани факти. Ова ни овозможува да употребиме двојна загуба од учење до ранг. Го валидираме нашиот метод за податоците на Текстграфите 2019 и 2020 за заеднички задачи за регенерација на објаснување. Постојаната работа на оваа задача или ги проценува фактите во изолација или вештачки ги ограничува можните ланципи на факти, со што се ограничува мултихоп-конференцијата. Демонстрираме дека нашиот алгоритм, кога се користи со предобучен трансформаторски модел, ја надминува претходната најнова технологија во поглед на прецизноста, времето на обука и ефикасноста на конференцијата.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår ein iterativ infeksjonsgoritme for regenerasjon av fleirhopp- forklaringar, som hentar relevante faktiske beviser i form av tekstsnippets, gitt eit naturleg språk- spørsmål og svaret. Kombinering av fleire kjelder av beviser eller faktar for fleire hopp-rasjonar blir større vanskeleg når talet på kjelder som treng for å gjera ein infeksjon aukar. Algoritmen vårt koplar med dette ved å dekomprimera utvalet av fakta frå ein korpus automatisk regressivt, og forandrar neste gjentakinga på førre valde fakta. Dette lèt oss bruka ein par læringstap. Vi validerer metoden vårt på datasett av tekstgrafen 2019 og 2020 Delte oppgåver for utklaring av regenerasjon. Det eksisterande arbeidet på denne oppgåva evaluerer anten faktar i isolation eller kunstig grenser dei moglege kjedene av faktar, derfor grenser fleirhoppene. Vi demonstrerer at algoritmen vårt, når brukt med eit føretrainert transformeringsmodell, utfører det førre kunsttilstanden som er nøyaktig, treningstid og inferens effektivitet.', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano iteracyjny algorytm wnioskowania dla regeneracji wyjaśnień multi-hop, który pobiera istotne dowody faktyczne w postaci fragmentów tekstowych, z podaniem pytania językowego naturalnego i jego odpowiedzi. Łączenie wielu źródeł dowodów lub faktów dla rozumowania multi-hop staje się coraz trudniejsze, gdy liczba źródeł potrzebnych do wyciągnięcia wniosków rośnie. Nasz algorytm radzi sobie z tym, rozkładając selekcję faktów z korpusu autoregresywnie, warunkując kolejną iterację na wcześniej wybranych faktach. Dzięki temu możemy wykorzystać stratę parową uczenia się do rankingu. Weryfikujemy naszą metodę na zbiorach danych TextGraphs 2019 i 2020 Shared Tasks w celu regeneracji wyjaśnień. Istniejące prace nad tym zadaniem albo oceniają fakty w izolacji, albo sztucznie ograniczają możliwe łańcuchy faktów, ograniczając tym samym wnioskowanie wielu chmielów. Pokazujemy, że nasz algorytm, stosowany w przypadku wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu transformatora, przewyższa dotychczasowy state-of-the-art pod względem precyzji, czasu treningu i efektywności wnioskowania.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune un algoritm iterativ de inferență pentru regenerarea explicațiilor multi-hop, care recuperează dovezi concrete relevante sub formă de fragmente de text, având în vedere o întrebare de limbaj natural și răspunsul acestuia. Combinarea mai multor surse de dovezi sau fapte pentru raționamentul multi-hop devine din ce în ce mai dificilă atunci când numărul de surse necesare pentru a face o deducție crește. Algoritmul nostru face față acestui lucru prin descompunerea automată a selecției faptelor dintr-un corpus, condiționând următoarea iterație pe fapte selectate anterior. Acest lucru ne permite să folosim o pierdere pereche de învățare-la-rang. Validăm metoda noastră pe seturile de date ale TextGraphs 2019 și 2020 Shared Tasks pentru regenerarea explicațiilor. Lucrările existente la această sarcină fie evaluează faptele în mod izolat, fie limitează artificial lanțurile posibile de fapte, limitând astfel deducția multi-hop. Demonstrăm că algoritmul nostru, atunci când este utilizat cu un model de transformator pre-instruit, depășește starea de ultimă generație anterioară în ceea ce privește precizia, timpul de instruire și eficiența inferenței.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන ගොඩක් හෝප් සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික හෝ ඇත්ත සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් මුළු සංඛ්යාවක් වැඩියා අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක මේකෙන් පොලිස් කරනවා මුලින්ම තෝරාගත්ත ඇත්ත තැන් තෝරාගත්ත ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා, පස මේකෙන් අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපි 2019 සහ 2020ට පැහැදිලි විස්තරය සඳහා පැහැදිලි සැකසුම් ගැන දත්ත සේට් ගැන අපේ විධානය විශ්වාස කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ තියෙන්නේ වැඩේ විතරයි විතරයි විතරයෙන් විතරයි, නැත්නම් විතරයෙන් විතරයි, නැත්නම් විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙ අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම්, ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරපු මෝඩල් එක්ක පාවිච්චි කරපු විදියට, ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා වෙලාවක් සහ පරීක්ෂණ වි', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže iterativni algoritam infekcije za regeneraciju multihopskih objašnjenja, koji dobija relevantne činjenične dokaze u obliku tekstskih snippeta, s obzirom na prirodno jezičko pitanje i odgovor. Kombiniranje višestrukih izvora dokaza ili činjenica za multihopski razum postaje sve teže kada se broj izvora potrebnih za povećanje infekcije. Naš algoritam se suoèi sa ovim rasporeðenjem izbora činjenica iz autoregresivnog korpusa, kondicionirajuæi sledeæu iteraciju na prethodno izabrane činjenice. To nam omogućava da iskoristimo gubitak učenja na čas. Potvrđujemo svoju metodu o setima podataka tekstGrafa 2019 i 2020. zajedničkim zadacima za regeneraciju objašnjenja. Postojeći rad na ovom zadatku ili procjenjuje činjenice u izolaciji ili umjetnički ograničava moguće lance činjenica, tako da ograničava višehopsku infekciju. Pokazujemo da naš algoritam, kada se koristi sa predobučenim transformatorskim modelom, iznosi prethodno stanje umjetnosti u smislu preciznosti, treninga vremena i infekcije efikasnosti.', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu soo jeedaa algorithm baahida ah oo loo qoray dib u soo celinta badan, kaas oo soo celinaya caddeynta runta ah oo ku saabsan qaabka qoraalka, iyadoo lagu siiyo su'aal afkiisa asalka ah iyo jawaabtiisa. Isku soo ururiyo noocyo badan oo muuqashada ama xaqiiqyada sababta badan ayaa aad u adag marka ay tirada sourceed u baahan tahay inay jiraan. Algoritkaankayada ayaa ku habboonaya marka uu hoos u dhigo doorashada waxyaabaha uu ka soo doortay korpus, iyadoo ku sameynaya waxyaabaha soo socda ee hore la doortay. Taasi waxay inagu fasaxaa in aan isticmaalno lumbarka labada xil leh ee barbaarinta darajada. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa qaababkayaga ku saabsan sawirada taariikhda TextGraphs 2019 iyo 2020 Shaqooyinka loo sharciyey dib u soo celinta. Shaqo ku jira shaqadaas wuxuu qiimeeyaa waxyaabaha gooni ah ama si qarsoodi ah ayuu u xadiyaa silsilaha suurtagalka ah, sidaa darteed waxay ka xadgudbaan cayimanta badan. Waxaynu muujinnaa in algoritkeenna, marka lagu isticmaalay model bedelka horay ah, wuxuu ka muuqanayaa xaaladdii hore ee farshaxanta si saxda ah, waqtiga waxbarashada iyo faa'iidada la'aanta.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en iterativ inferensalgoritm för multi-hop förklaring regenerering, som hämtar relevanta fakta i form av textutdrag, givet en naturligt språkfråga och dess svar. Att kombinera flera källor till bevis eller fakta för multi-hop resonemang blir allt svårare när antalet källor som behövs för att göra en slutsats växer. Vår algoritm hanterar detta genom att sönderdela urvalet av fakta från en korpus självregressivt, konditionerar nästa iteration på tidigare utvalda fakta. Detta gör att vi kan använda en parvis inlärning-to-rank förlust. Vi validerar vår metod på datauppsättningar i TextGraphs 2019 och 2020 Shared Tasks för förklaringsregenerering. Befintligt arbete med denna uppgift utvärderar antingen fakta isolerat eller begränsar artificiellt de möjliga kedjorna av fakta, vilket begränsar multihop-slutsatser. Vi visar att vår algoritm, när den används med en färdigutbildad transformatormodell, överträffar den tidigare toppmodern när det gäller precision, träningstid och inferenseffektivitet.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் பல- hop விளக்கத்தை மீண்டும் விளக்கும் பொருள் தெரிவிக்கும் பொருத்தமான தெளிவுகளை உரை குறிப்புகளின் வடிவத்தில் பெறுகிறத பல- ஹாப் காரணத்திற்கு பல தெளிவான அல்லது உண்மைகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் மூலங்களின் எண்ணிக்கையில் நோய் அதிகரிக்கிறது. எங்கள் ஆல்goritm இதை நகலெடு இது நமக்கு ஜோடி விளக்கமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் வரிசையில் இழப்பை பயன்படுத்த அனுமதிக்கிறது. நாங்கள் திரும்பப்படுத்துவதற்கான திரும்பச் செய்திகளின் தகவல் அமைப்புகளை செலுத்துகிறோம். இந்த பணியில் இருக்கும் வேலை தனியாக இருக்கும் அல்லது சாத்தியமாக காரணிகளின் சாத்தியமான சங்கிலை வரையறுக்கிறது, அதனால் பல- hop பிரிவ முன்பயிற்சி மாற்றம் மாதிரி முறைமையால் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட போது, முந்தைய நிலைமை- கலை தெளிவாக, பயிற்சி நேரத்தை மற்றும் குறைவான விளைவுகளை வெ', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ مختلف ہپ کی توضیح کے لئے ایک دوبارہ ایٹرایٹ یونفانس الگوریٹم کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ایک طبیعی زبان کا سوال اور اس کا جواب دیتا ہے۔ بہت سی نشانیوں یا حقیقتوں کی تعداد کی تعداد زیادہ مشکل ہوتی ہے جبکہ اتنی سفارش کے لئے ضرورت کی سفارش کی تعداد بڑھتی ہے۔ ہمارا الگوریٹم اس کے ساتھ پورا کرتا ہے کہ ایک کورپوس کی تصدیق کو اٹوٹ کر دھوٹ دیتا ہے، اس سے پہلے گزرے ہوئے حقیقت پر آگے کی تکرار کرتی ہے. یہ ہمیں ایک جوڑا سیکھنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے ہم نے اپنا طریقہ توضیح دوبارہ پیدا کرنے کے لئے تفصیل گرافس 2019 اور 2020 کے ڈیٹ سٹوں پر ثابت قدم رکھا ہے. اس کام پر موجود عمل ہے یا ایک دوسرے سے حقیقت کا ارزش کرتا ہے یا فکرت کے ممکن زنجیروں کو محدود کرتا ہے، اسی طرح multi-hop inference کو محدود کرتا ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا الگوریتم، جب ایک پیش آموزش کی تغییر مدل کے ساتھ استعمال کیا گیا ہے، اگلوں کی موقعیت دقیق، تربیت زمان اور کمزوری کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ اثبات کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz bir necha-hop tizimni qaytarish uchun tasavvur qilinadi. Bu matn snippetlarining shaklida, tabiiy so'z savol va javob beradi. Ko'pchilik sabablar uchun ko'pchilik hujjatlar yoki haqiqatlarni bir necha manbalar qo'shish uchun ko'pchilik sabablar qo'shiladi Algoritmiz bu narsa bilan boshqarish qo'llaniladi, korpusdan avtomatik boshqarish, keyingi narsalarni oldin tanlangan fakta haqida qo'llash mumkin. Bu bizga ikkita xil o'rganishni o'rganishga qo'llashga ruxsat beradi. @ info Bu vazifaning mavjud vazifani alohida yoki faqatlarni qo'yish mumkin shaxsiyatlarni ko'rsatadi, shunday qilib ko'pchilik bir necha vaqt chegarasini qiymaydi. Bizning algoritimizni oldin o'zgartirish modeli bilan foydalanayotganda, oldingi holatda, taʼminlovchi vaqt va taʼminlovchi vaqt va cheksizlik effektini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất một thuật toán kết luận lặp lại để giải thích đa hop, để lấy lại bằng chứng cụ thể liên quan dưới dạng đoạn trích văn bản, với câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và câu trả lời của nó. Kết hợp nhiều nguồn chứng cứ hoặc dữ kiện cho việc lập luận đa hop nên ngày càng khó khăn hơn khi số lượng nguồn tin cần thiết để ngụ ý tăng dần. Thuật toán của chúng ta xử lý việc này bằng cách phân hủy sự lựa chọn dữ liệu từ một tập thể một cách tự vệ, điều chỉnh bước lặp lại tiếp theo trên thực tế đã chọn trước đây. Việc này cho phép chúng ta sử dụng việc làm đôi để giảm giá. Chúng tôi xác nhận phương pháp của chúng tôi về các tập tin (lỗi thời Văn bản K99 và 2020 cho giải thích phục hồi. Việc đang thực hiện trong nhiệm vụ này có thể đánh giá các sự kiện một cách đơn giản hoặc hạn chế các chuỗi sự kiện có thể, hạn chế ngụ ý đa hop. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng thuật toán của chúng tôi, được sử dụng với một mô hình máy biến thế được huấn luyện trước, hoàn thiện hơn trạng thái hiện đại về độ chính xác, thời gian huấn luyện và hiệu quả nhận biết.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага алгоритъм за итеративно заключение за регенериране на обяснения с мулти-хоп, който извлича релевантни фактически доказателства под формата на текстови фрагменти, като се има предвид въпросът на естествения език и отговорът му. Комбинирането на множество източници на доказателства или факти за мулти-хоп разсъждения става все по-трудно, когато броят на източниците, необходими за извършване на заключение нараства. Нашият алгоритъм се справя с това, като разлага селекцията на факти от корпус авторегресивно, обуславяйки следващата итерация на предварително избрани факти. Това ни позволява да използваме загубата по двойки. Валидираме метода си върху набори от данни на Текстовите графики 2019 и 2020 г. за регенериране на обяснения. Съществуващата работа по тази задача или оценява фактите изолирано, или изкуствено ограничава възможните вериги от факти, като по този начин ограничава мулти-хоп изводите. Ние демонстрираме, че нашият алгоритъм, когато се използва с предварително обучен трансформаторен модел, превъзхожда предишните най-съвременни по отношение на прецизност, време на обучение и ефективност на заключенията.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår en iterativ inference algoritme til multi-hop forklaring regenerering, der henter relevante faktuelle beviser i form af tekststykker, givet et naturligt sprogspørgsmål og dets svar. Kombinationen af flere kilder til beviser eller fakta til multi-hop ræsonnement bliver stadig sværere, når antallet af kilder, der er nødvendige for at gøre en konklusion, vokser. Vores algoritme håndterer dette ved at nedbryde udvælgelsen af fakta fra et korpus autoregressivt og betinge den næste iteration på tidligere udvalgte fakta. Dette giver os mulighed for at bruge et par lærings-to-rang tab. Vi validerer vores metode på datasæt i TextGraphs 2019 og 2020 delte opgaver til regenerering af forklaringer. Det eksisterende arbejde med denne opgave evaluerer enten kendsgerninger isoleret eller begrænser kunstigt de mulige kendsgerningskæder og begrænser dermed multihop-konklusioner. Vi demonstrerer, at vores algoritme, når den anvendes sammen med en forududdannet transformermodel, overgår den tidligere state-of-the-art med hensyn til præcision, træningstid og inferenceeffektivitet.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel stelt een iteratief inferentiealgoritme voor multi-hop uitleg regeneratie voor, dat relevant feitelijk bewijs in de vorm van tekstfragmenten haalt, gegeven een natuurlijke taalvraag en het antwoord ervan. Het combineren van meerdere bewijsbronnen of feiten voor multi-hop redeneren wordt steeds moeilijker wanneer het aantal bronnen dat nodig is om een conclusie te maken groeit. Ons algoritme gaat hiermee om door de selectie van feiten uit een corpus autoregressief te ontbinden, waarbij de volgende iteratie wordt geconditioneerd op eerder geselecteerde feiten. Dit stelt ons in staat om een pairwise learning-to-rank verlies te gebruiken. We valideren onze methode op datasets van de TextGraphs 2019 en 2020 Shared Tasks voor uitleg regeneratie. Bestaande werkzaamheden aan deze taak evalueren feiten afzonderlijk of beperken kunstmatig de mogelijke ketens van feiten, waardoor multi-hop inferentie wordt beperkt. We tonen aan dat ons algoritme, in combinatie met een vooraf getraind transformatormodel, beter presteert dan de vorige state-of-the-art op het gebied van precisie, trainingstijd en inferentieefficiëntie.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže iterativni algoritam infekcije za regeneraciju multihopskih objašnjenja, koji prima relevantne činjenične dokaze u obliku tekstskih snippeta, s obzirom na prirodno jezičko pitanje i odgovor. Kombiniranje višestrukih izvora dokaza ili činjenica za multihopski razgovor postaje sve teže kada se broj izvora potrebnih za povećanje infekcije. Naš algoritam se suoči s tim raspoređivanjem izbora činjenica iz autoregresivnog korpusa, kondicirajući sljedeću iteraciju na prethodno izabrane činjenice. To nam omogućava da koristimo gubitak učenja na čas. Potvrđujemo svoju metodu o setima podataka tekstGrafa 2019. i 2020. zajedničkih zadataka za regeneraciju objašnjenja. Postojeći rad na ovom zadatku ili procjenjuje činjenice u izolaciji ili umjetno ograničava moguće lance činjenica, tako ograničavajući višehopsku infekciju. Pokazujemo da naš algoritam, kada se koristi s predobučenim transformacijskim modelom, nadmašuje prethodno stanje umjetnosti u smislu preciznosti, treninga vremena i učinkovitosti infekcije.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan algoritma kesimpulan iteratif untuk regenerasi penjelasan multi-hop, yang mengambil bukti faktual relevan dalam bentuk snippets teks, memberikan pertanyaan bahasa alami dan jawabannya. Kombinasi berbagai sumber bukti atau fakta untuk pemikiran multi-hop menjadi semakin sulit ketika jumlah sumber yang diperlukan untuk membuat kesimpulan tumbuh. Algoritma kita mengatasi ini dengan memecahkan seleksi fakta dari korpus secara otograf, menguasai iterasi berikutnya pada fakta yang sebelumnya dipilih. Ini memungkinkan kita untuk menggunakan kehilangan belajar sepasang. Kami mengkvalifikasi metode kami pada set data dari TextGraphs 2019 dan 2020 Shared Tasks untuk penjelasan regenerasi. Pekerjaan yang ada pada tugas ini baik mengevaluasi fakta dalam isolasi atau secara seniman membatasi rantai fakta yang mungkin, sehingga membatasi kesimpulan multi-hop. We demonstrate that our algorithm, when used with a pre-trained transformer model, outperforms the previous state-of-the-art in terms of precision, training time and inference efficiency.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird ein iterativer Inferenzalgorithmus für die Regeneration von Multi-Hop-Erklärungen vorgeschlagen, der relevante faktische Beweise in Form von Textschnipseln abruft, die eine natürliche Sprachfrage und deren Antwort erhalten. Die Kombination mehrerer Beweisquellen oder Fakten für Multi-Hop-Argumentation wird immer schwieriger, wenn die Anzahl der Quellen wächst, die für eine Schlussfolgerung benötigt werden. Unser Algorithmus bewältigt dies, indem er die Auswahl von Fakten aus einem Korpus autoregressiv zerlegt und die nächste Iteration auf zuvor ausgewählte Fakten konditioniert. Dies ermöglicht es uns, einen pairwise Learning-to-Rank Verlust zu verwenden. Wir validieren unsere Methode auf Datensätzen der TextGraphs 2019 und 2020 Shared Tasks zur Erklärung Regeneration. Bestehende Arbeiten zu dieser Aufgabe werten Fakten entweder isoliert aus oder schränken die möglichen Faktenketten künstlich ein und schränken so die Multi-Hop-Inferenz ein. Wir zeigen, dass unser Algorithmus, wenn er mit einem vortrainierten Transformatormodell verwendet wird, den bisherigen Stand der Technik in Bezug auf Präzision, Trainingszeit und Inferenzeffizienz übertrifft.', 'ko': '본고는 다중 해석 재생에 사용되는 교체 추리 알고리즘을 제시하여 자연 언어 문제와 그 답안을 정한 상황에서 텍스트 단편의 형식으로 관련 사실 증거를 검색한다.추리에 필요한 출처 수량이 증가할 때 여러 증거나 사실의 출처를 결합시켜 다중 추리를 하는 것은 점점 어려워진다.우리의 알고리즘은 자귀환 분해 자료 라이브러리의 사실 선택을 통해 이 문제를 해결하고 이전에 선택한 사실에 따라 다음 교체를 조정한다.이것은 우리가 쌍으로 학습을 해서 손실을 정렬하는 것을 허용한다.우리는 2019년과 2020년 임무를 공유한 텍스트맵 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법을 검증했다.이 임무에 관한 기존 작업은 사실을 고립적으로 평가하거나 가능한 사실 체인을 인위적으로 제한함으로써 다중 추리를 제한한다.우리는 우리의 알고리즘이 사전에 훈련된 변압기 모델과 함께 사용할 때 정밀도, 훈련 시간과 추리 효율이 이전의 최신 기술보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک الگوریتم تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر برای توضیح چند هپ را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند، که مدرک حقیقی را در شکل snippets متن می\u200cگیرد، به عنوان یک سوال زبان طبیعی و جواب آن می\u200cدهد. ترکیب منبع چندین مدرک یا حقیقت برای دلیل تعداد چندین هپ، وقتی تعداد منبع نیاز به تغییر افزایش برای افزایش شدن، سخت\u200cتر می\u200cشود. الگوریتم ما با این کار کنار می\u200cگیرد با شکاف انتخاب حقیقت\u200cها از یک کورپوس به طور خودگریزی، با توجه به تکرار بعدی بر حقیقت\u200cهای قبل انتخاب شده\u200cاند. این به ما اجازه می دهد که از دست دادن یادگیری به درجه جفت استفاده کنیم. ما روش خود را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متن\u200cگراف ۲۰۱۹ و ۲۰۰۲ برای توضیح بازسازی تأکید می\u200cکنیم. کار موجود در این وظیفه یا واقعیت\u200cها را در تنهایی یا هنری محدود می\u200cکند که زنجیرهای موجود حقیقت را محدود می\u200cکند، بنابراین بیماری\u200cهاپ را محدود می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که الگوریتم ما، زمانی که با یک مدل تغییر دهنده پیش آموزش داده شده استفاده می شود، وضعیت پیشین هنر را به عنوان دقیق، زمان آموزش و موثیت تغییر دهنده انجام می دهد.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inapendekeza algorithi yenye ugonjwa mkubwa wa ufafanuzi wa upya wa jumbe nyingi, ambazo hupata ushahidi wa kweli katika namna ya vifaa vya maandishi, kwa kuzingatia swali la lugha halisi na jibu lake. Kuunganisha vyanzo vingi vingi vya ushahidi au ukweli kwa sababu za matukio mengi yanazidi kuwa vigumu wakati idadi ya vyanzo vinavyohitajika kuongezeka kwa ugonjwa. Ualgorithi wetu unakabiliwa na hili kwa kupunguza uchaguzi wa ukweli kutoka kwenye mashindano ya kisasa kwa kujitegemea, kwa kuweka vifaa vinavyofuata kuhusu ukweli ulioachaguliwa kabla. Hii inaturuhusu kutumia hasara ya kujifunza kwa vyeo viwili. Tunaweza kuthibitisha mbinu yetu kwenye seti za taarifa za TextGraphs 2019 na 2020 za kazi zilizoshirikishwa kwa ajili ya kuelezea upya. Kazi inayoendelea katika kazi hii ama kutathmini ukweli katika kutengana au kwa kificho linazuia viungo vinavyowezekana vya ukweli, kwa hiyo inazuia uchunguzi wa watu wengi. Tunaonyesha kwamba utaratibu wetu, wakati uliotumika na modeli ya mabadiliko ya zamani, unaonyesha hali iliyopita ya sanaa kwa ajili ya uhakika, mafunzo na ufanisi wa kutokuwepo kwa usawa.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz birnäçe-Hop düşündirişi ýene-täzeden bejermek üçin ýene-täzeden a şyk algorizmi teklip edip, tebigy dil soragy we jogaby berilýär. Birnäçe hadysa ýa-da birnäçe hadysa ýa-da birnäçe hadysa çeşmeleri bilen birleşdirmek üçin bir azalmak üçin gerekli çeşmeleriň sany kynlaşýar. Bizim algoritmimiz bu şekilde, korpus otoregressiv bir şekilde, öňki saýlanan gerçeklerde geleni iterjek üçin kömekleýär. Bu biziň çift öwrenmegimizi ýitirmegimize mümkin edýär. Biz öz metodumuzu 2019 we 2020 TextGraphs 2019 we 2020 Paýlaşılan Görevlerimizi tekrar döretmek üçin barlanýarys. Bu zadyň bar işi ya bölek hasaplanýar ya da bölek hasaplanýar, ya da birnäçe-hop hasaplamasyny mümkin hasaplanýar. Biz öz algoritmymyzy, öňki bilim üýtgetmeli nusga bilen ulanylýand a, öňki sanat durumynyň dogrylygyny, okuwçylyk wagtyny we ýakynlaşyk etkinliýetini ýok edip bilýäris.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n iteratiewe inferensie algoritme vir multi-hop-uitduidelings regenerasie, wat relevante faktuurlike getuienis in die vorm van teks snippets ontvang, gegee 'n natuurlike taal vraag en sy antwoord. Kombineer veelvuldige bronne van getuienis of fakte vir meerder-hoop redening word vermeerder moeilik wanneer die aantal bronne nodig is om 'n inferensie groei te maak. Ons algoritme kopeer met hierdie deur die keuse van fakte van 'n korpus outomatiese regressief te dekomprimeer, wat die volgende iterasie op voorheen gekose fakte beteken. Hierdie laat ons 'n paar wyse leer-na-rank verloor gebruik. Ons geldigheid ons metode op datastelle van die TextGraphs 2019 en 2020 Gedeelde Opdragte vir verklaring regenerasie. Bestaande werk op hierdie taak evalueer of fakte in isolatie of kunstenaar beperk die moontlike kettings van fakte, sodat multihopinferensie beperk. Ons wys dat ons algoritme, wanneer gebruik word met 'n vooraf-onderwerpende transformeermodel, uitvoer die vorige staat van die kuns in terms van presisie, onderwerp tyd en onderwerp effektiviteit.", 'sq': 'Ky artikull propozon një algoritëm përsëritës inference për rigjenerimin e shpjegimit të shumëhopit, që merr prova të rëndësishme faktike në form ën e copave teksti, duke dhënë një pyetje gjuhësh natyrore dhe përgjigjen e saj. Kombinimi i burimeve të shumta të provave apo fakteve për arsyetimin multi-hop bëhet gjithnjë e më i vështirë kur numri i burimeve të nevojshme për të bërë një përfundim rritet. Algoritmi ynë përballet me këtë duke shkëputur zgjedhjen e fakteve nga një korpus në mënyrë automatike, duke kushtëzuar përsëritjen e ardhshme me fakte të zgjedhur më parë. Kjo na lejon të përdorim një humbje nga mësimi në radhë. Ne e vlerësojmë metodën tonë për grupet e të dhënave të TextGraphs 2019 dhe 2020 Detyrat e Përbashkëta për rigjenerimin e shpjegimeve. Puna ekzistuese në këtë detyrë ose vlerëson faktet në izolim ose kufizon artificialisht zinxhirët e mundshëm të fakteve, duke kufizuar kështu inferencën e shumëhopeve. We demonstrate that our algorithm, when used with a pre-trained transformer model, outperforms the previous state-of-the-art in terms of precision, training time and inference efficiency.', 'am': 'ይህም ሕገጽ በብዙ-hop አካባቢ ማብራራትን የሚያስፈልጋል፣ የውነተኛውን ማስረጃ በጽሑፍ መንቀሳቅስ፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ጥያቄ እና መልስ እንዲሰጥ ያቀርባል፡፡ የመረጃ ወይም የእውነትን መልዕክቶች በመቀበል የብዙ አካባቢ አነስተኛ ቁጥር ማድረግ የሚያስፈልገውን ምንጮች ሲያድጋል፡፡ አሌጎርቲም ይህንን በመስመር ከኮርፓስ ውሸትን በራሱ አቀማመጥ እና የቀድሞው የተመረጠውን ውሸት ላይ በመግለጽ አቀናጠል፡፡ This allows us to use a pairwise learning-to-rank loss.  የጽሑፍ መጻሕፍት 2019 እና 2020 ስራዎችን ለማስታወቂያ የተሰራጨውን ስራዎችን እናስተካክላለን፡፡ የዚህ ስራ ላይ የሚኖር ሥራ ቢሆን የውነቶችን በተለየ ወይም የውነቱን ሰንሰር በሐሳብ ግለጥ የሚያደርግ ቢሆን፣ ስለዚህም የብዙ-hop ን ጉዳይ ግንኙነትን አግኝቷል፡፡ አሌጎርቲም በተቀድሞ በተለወጠው የልማት ዓይነት በተጠቀም ጊዜ፣ የቀድሞውን የልማት ሥርዓት፣ ትምህርት ሰዓት እና ውጤታዊ ጥያቄን እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Այս թղթին առաջարկում է բազմահոսական բացատրությունների վերականգնման կրկնվող ալգորիթմ, որը վերցնում է նշանակալի փաստական ապացույցներ տեքստի կտորների տեսքով, հաշվի առնելով բնական լեզվի հարցը և դրա պատասխանը: Բազմաթիվ հույսերի մտածելակերպման բազմաթիվ ապացույցների կամ փաստերի միավորումը դառնում է ավելի դժվար, երբ անհրաժեշտ աղբյուրների թիվը աճում է, որպեսզի հանգեցնենք եզրակացության: Մեր ալգորիթմը հաղթահարում է սա' բաժանելով փաստերի ընտրությունը մարմնից ինքնագրեսիվ, պայմանավորելով հաջորդ կրկնությունը նախկինում ընտրված փաստերի վրա: Սա թույլ է տալիս մեզ օգտագործել զույգչափ սովորելու և դասավորելու կորստ: Մենք ստուգում ենք 2019-ի և 2020-ի տեքստգրաֆների տվյալների համակարգերի մեթոդը բացատրության վերականգնման համար: Այս խնդրի վրա գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքը կամ առանձնացնում է փաստերը, կամ արհեստականորեն սահմանափակում է փաստերի հնարավոր շղթաները, ինչը սահմանափակում է բազմաթիվ հույսերի եզրակացությունը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր ալգորիթմը, երբ օգտագործվում է նախապատրաստված վերափոխողի մոդելի հետ, գերազանցում է նախորդ տեխնոլոգիայի արդյունավետությունը ճշգրտության, ուսումնասիրության ժամանակի և եզրակացության արդյունավետության առումով:", 'az': 'Bu kağıt çoxlu-Hop təfsilatı yenidən yaratmaq üçün iterativ infeksiya algoritmi təbliğ edir ki, məktub snippets formasında, təbiətli dil sualı və cavabı verir. Çoxlu-Hop razılığı üçün çoxlu kanıt və həqiqətlərin birləşdirilməsi çoxlu mənbələrin sayısı artırmaq üçün çox çətin olur. Algoritimiz bu işi korpus seçimlərini avtomatik olaraq parçalayıb, əvvəlcə seçilmiş gerçəklərdə sonraki bir dəyişiklik təyin edir. Bu bizə iki dərəcə öyrənmək üçün istifadə edər. Biz 2019 və 2020 TextGraphs tərzini yenidən yaratmaq üçün paylaşılmış işlər üçün tərzimizi təsdiqləyirik. Bu işdə mövcud olan işlər ya isolata, ya da sanatlı olaraq faktların zəncirlərini müəyyən edir, buna görə də çoxlu-Hop infeksiyonu limitləyir. Biz göstəririk ki, algoritimiz, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş transformer modeli ilə istifadə edildiyi zaman, əvvəlki sanatın durumunu dəqiqliyyat, təhsil vaxtı və a şağılıq efektivitəti ilə dəyişdirir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বহুহাপের ব্যাখ্যা পুনরায় ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য একটি প্রাকৃতিক আক্রান্ত অ্যালগরিদম প্রস্তাব করে, যা টেক্সট স্নিপেটের রূপে প্রমাণ প মাল্টিহোপের কারণে প্রমাণ বা তথ্যের বেশ কয়েকটি সূত্র যোগাযোগ করা হচ্ছে যখন সংখ্যার সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি প্রয়োজনীয় সংখ্যা বাড়তে থাকে। আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম এই ব্যাপারে করপাস থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নির্বাচিত তথ্য নির্বাচিত করার মাধ্যমে এই বিষয়টি কপি করেছে, যা আগের ব এটা আমাদের জোড়া জোড়া শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করতে পারে। আমরা টেক্সট গ্রাফ ২০১৯ এবং ২০২০ টি টেক্সট গ্রাফের ডাটাসেটের মাধ্যমে আমাদের পদ্ধতি ব্যাক্তি পুনরায় ব্যাখ্যা করার Existing work on this task either evaluates facts in isolation or artificially limits the possible chains of facts, thus limiting multi-hop inference.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম, যখন প্রথম প্রশিক্ষিত পরিবর্তনের মডেলে ব্যবহার করা হয়, তখন পূর্ববর্তী শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি সমালোচনা, প্রশিক্ষণের সময় এবং অন', 'ca': "This paper proposes an iterative inference algorithm for multi-hop explanation regeneration, that retrieves relevant factual evidence in the form of text snippets, given a natural language question and its answer.  Combining multiple sources of evidence or facts for multi-hop reasoning becomes increasingly hard when the number of sources needed to make an inference grows.  El nostre algoritme s'enfronta amb això descomposant la selecció de fets d'un cos de manera autoregressiva, condicionant la següent iteració amb fets anteriorment seleccionats. Això ens permet utilitzar una pèrdua entre parelles d'aprenentatge i classe. Validim el nostre mètode en conjunts de dades dels TextGraphs 2019 i 2020 Tasks Shared per la regeneració d'explicacions. La feina existent en aquesta tasca o val·la de fets a l'aïllament o limita artificialment les cadenes possibles de fets, limitant així la inferència multi hop. Demostram que el nostre algoritme, quan s'utilitza amb un model de transformador pré-entrenat, supera l'última en termes de precisió, temps d'entrenament i eficiència de inferència.", 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje iterativní inferenční algoritmus pro regeneraci multi-hop vysvětlení, který získává relevantní faktické důkazy ve formě textových úryvků, s ohledem na otázku přirozeného jazyka a její odpověď. Kombinace více zdrojů důkazů nebo faktů pro multi-hop uvažování se stává stále těžší, když počet zdrojů potřebných k vytvoření závěru roste. Náš algoritmus se s tím vyrovnává tím, že rozloží výběr faktů z korpusu autoregresivně a podmíní další iteraci na dříve vybraných faktech. To nám umožňuje použít párovou ztrátu učení-hodnocení. Naši metodu validujeme na datových sadách TextGraphs 2019 a 2020 Shared Tasks pro regeneraci vysvětlení. Stávající práce na tomto úkolu buď hodnotí fakta izolovaně, nebo uměle omezuje možné řetězce faktů, čímž omezuje multi-hop inference. Dokazujeme, že náš algoritmus při použití s předtrénovaným modelem transformátoru překonává předchozí nejmodernější stav techniky, pokud jde o přesnost, dobu tréninku a efektivitu inference.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže iterativni algoritam infekcije za regeneraciju multihopskih objašnjenja, koji prima relevantne činjenične dokaze u obliku tekstskih snippeta, s obzirom na prirodno jezičko pitanje i odgovor. Kombiniranje višestrukih izvora dokaza ili činjenica za multihopski razgovor postaje sve teže kada se broj izvora potrebnih za povećanje infekcije. Naš algoritam se suočava s ovim raskidom odabranja činjenica iz autoregresivnog korpusa, kondicionirajući sljedeću iteraciju na prethodno izabrane činjenice. To nam omogućava da koristimo gubitak učenja na čas. Potvrđujemo svoju metodu o setima podataka tekstGrafa 2019. i 2020. zajedničkih zadataka za regeneraciju objašnjenja. Postojeći rad na ovom zadatku ili procjenjuje činjenice u izolaciji ili umjetnički ograničava moguće lance činjenica, tako da ograničava višehopsku infekciju. Pokazujemo da naš algoritam, kada se koristi sa predobučenim transformacijskim modelom, nadmašuje prethodno stanje umjetnosti u smislu preciznosti, treninga vremena i učinkovitosti infekcije.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö pakub välja iteratiivse järelduse algoritmi multihüppe seletuse regenereerimiseks, mis toob asjakohaseid faktilisi tõendeid tekstilõikude kujul, arvestades looduskeele küsimust ja selle vastust. Mitme tõendusmaterjali allika või faktide kombineerimine mitme hüppelise arutluse jaoks muutub üha raskemaks, kui järelduse tegemiseks vajalike allikate arv kasvab. Meie algoritm tegeleb sellega, lagundades faktide valiku korpusest autoregressiivselt, tingides järgmise iteratsiooni eelnevalt valitud faktidel. See võimaldab meil kasutada paarwise õppimine-to-rank kaotust. Valideerime oma meetodi 2019. ja 2020. aasta Tekstgraafikute ühiste ülesannete andmekogumite põhjal selgituste taastamiseks. Olemasolevas töös selle ülesandega hinnatakse fakte eraldi või piiratakse kunstlikult võimalikke faktide ahelaid, piirates seega mitme hüppe järeldust. Näitame, et meie algoritm, mida kasutatakse eelnevalt koolitatud trafo mudeliga, ületab eelmise tehnika taseme täpsuse, koolitusaja ja järelduste efektiivsuse osas.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotetaan iteratiivista päättelyalgoritmia monihypyn selityksen regenerointiin, joka hakee relevantteja faktatietoja tekstikatkelmien muodossa luonnollisen kielen kysymyksen ja sen vastauksen perusteella. Useiden todisteiden tai faktojen yhdistäminen monihypyn päättelyyn vaikeutuu entisestään, kun johtopäätösten tekemiseen tarvittavien lähteiden määrä kasvaa. Algoritmimme selviää tästä hajottamalla faktojen valinnan korpusesta itseregressiivisesti, ehdollistamalla seuraavan iteraation aiemmin valittuihin faktoihin. Tämän avulla voimme käyttää parikohtaisesti oppimis-rank tappiota. Validoimme menetelmämme TextGraphs 2019 ja 2020 Shared Tasks -tekstikaavioiden aineistoista selityksen uudistamiseksi. Nykyisessä työssä faktoja arvioidaan joko erikseen tai keinotekoisesti rajoitetaan mahdollisia faktoketjuja, mikä rajoittaa monihypyn päättelyä. Osoitamme, että algoritmimme, kun sitä käytetään esikoulutetun muuntajamallin kanssa, ylittää aiemman huipputason tarkkuuden, harjoitusajan ja päättelytehokkuuden suhteen.', 'jv': 'Awak iki supoyo nggawe Algorithm pakan kelas perusahaan kanggo mbatalurakno multi-top, iki dadi nggawe peringatan perusahaan kowe ngupakan anyar tentang kanggo kelas perusahaan seneng pisan, kawit perusahaan langkung sampeyan ngonang mbubatuhé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), there is a change ("assertive Algorithmus kotak nggo masalah iki dadi iki dadi bagian nggawe barang diolah autoréaksi iki dadi, batasané perusahaan tanggal nggawe barang wis dipoleh hayo. Digarep kuwi, awak dhéwé iso nggambar kelas kuwi bisa nguasah dumateng. We Valid the method we have on dataset of the textGraph s 2011 and 2020 shared tasks for the information about the Regregation Awak dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang-barêng kuwi nggawe barang manut karo iso nggawe winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan ketahan karo perusahaan karo sapa nyimpen multi-top Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno karo Algorithmu iki, iso disebarke ngono model sing beranduh banter transformer', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predlagan iterativni sklepni algoritem za regeneracijo razlage multi-hop, ki pridobi relevantne dejanske dokaze v obliki delčkov besedila, glede na vprašanje naravnega jezika in njegov odgovor. Združevanje več virov dokazov ali dejstev za razmišljanje o več postopkih postane vedno težje, ko se poveča število virov, potrebnih za sklepanje. Naš algoritem se s tem spopada tako, da izbor dejstev iz korpusa samoregresivno razgradi in naslednjo ponovitev pogojuje na predhodno izbrana dejstva. To nam omogoča, da uporabimo par-wise izgubo učenja-to-rank. Našo metodo potrjujemo na podatkovnih naborih besedilnih grafikov 2019 in 2020 skupnih nalog za regeneracijo pojasnil. Obstoječe delo na tej nalogi bodisi ocenjuje dejstva ločeno bodisi umetno omejuje možne verige dejstev, s čimer omejuje sklepanje več-hop. Dokazujemo, da je naš algoritem, kadar se uporablja z vnaprej usposobljenim transformatorskim modelom, presegel prejšnje najsodobnejše v smislu natančnosti, časa usposabljanja in učinkovitosti sklepanja.', 'ha': "This paper proposes an iterative inference algorithm for multi-hop explanation regeneration, that retrieves relevant factual evidence in the form of text snippets, given a natural language question and its answer.  Combining manyan sources of evidence or facts for multi-jum kunna za'a ƙara yin tsanani idan yawan sources da aka ƙayyade ya ƙara wata kasa. Algoritmu na kofi da wannan da ke kanana zaɓa zaɓen fakta daga korbas farat ɗaya, kuma yana da halin da ke gaba a zaɓe fakta. Wannan yana yarda da mu yi amfani da hasara guda biyu na lõkaci ko taƙaita. @ info: tooltip Kayyar wannan aikin da ke kai yanzu ko yana ƙaddara masu gaskiyar a cikin wuri ko kuma ana kange wasu sarƙoƙi masu yiwuwa na gaskiyar, don haka yana tsare surar multi-jum. Tuna nũna cewa algorityinmu, a lokacin da aka yi amfani da wata misãli mai shida ta gabã ɗaya, yana ƙarfafa na halin-sanar ta gaba, da fassarar, da zaman shawarar da kuma yana da fassara.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཡང་བསྐྱར་གསོ་སྐབས་ལྡན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྐྱེས་རིམ་སྟོན་པའི་སྐྱེས་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ས Algorithm ས་རྟོགས་དང་། སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ལ་ཚན་བཤད་དང་དང་རྐྱེན་བློ་གཏོང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བསྡུར་ན་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འདི་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཀག འདིས་ང་ཚོར་བྱ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྐྱུར་བརྗོད་པའི་གྲངས་ཤིག་ཅིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡིག་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་2019 དང་། སྤྱད་དོན་པའི་བྱ Existing work on this task either evaluates facts in isolation or artificially limits the possible chains of facts, thus limiting multi-hop inference. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རྩལ་བ་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་དུས་ཚོད་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་ཡག', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה אלגוריתם סיפור איטריטיבי לשחזור ההסבר multi-hop, אשר משיג ראיות עובדות רלוונטיות בצורה של חתיכות טקסט, בהתחשב בשאלה טבעית שפה והתשובה שלה. שילוב מקורות מרובים של ראיות או עובדות להסבירה רבה-הופ נהיה קשה יותר ויותר כאשר מספר מקורות הנדרשים כדי לגרום למסקנה גדל. Our algorithm copes with this by decomposing the selection of facts from a corpus autoregressively, conditioning the next iteration on previously selected facts.  זה מאפשר לנו להשתמש באובדן של לימוד לצוות זוג. We validate our method on datasets of the TextGraphs 2019 and 2020 Shared Tasks for explanation regeneration.  העבודה הנוכחית על המשימה הזו או מעריכה עובדות בבידוד או מגבילה באופן מלאכותי את שרשרות העובדות האפשרות, כך מגבילה את ההנחה המולט-הופ. אנחנו מראים שהאלגוריתם שלנו, כשמשמש עם מודל משתנה מאומן מראש, מוביל את המצב האמנותי הקודם במונחים של מדויק, זמן האימון ויעילות המסקנה.'}
{'en': 'Augmenting NLP models using Latent Feature Interpolations', 'ar': 'زيادة نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية باستخدام ميزة الإقحام الكامن', 'es': 'Aumentar los modelos de PNL mediante interpolaciones de características latentes', 'pt': 'Aumentando modelos de PNL usando interpolações de recursos latentes', 'fr': "Augmenter les modèles de PNL à l'aide d'interpolations de caractéristiques latentes", 'ja': '潜在機能補間を使用したNLPモデルの拡張', 'zh': '用潜在特徵插值广 NLP 模形', 'hi': 'अव्यक्त सुविधा इंटरपोलेशन का उपयोग कर एनएलपी मॉडल को बढ़ाना', 'ru': 'Дополнение моделей NLP с помощью интерполяций скрытых функций', 'ga': 'Méadú ar mhúnlaí NLP ag baint úsáide as Idirshuímh Gné fholaigh', 'hu': 'NLP modellek bővítése Latent Feature Interpolációkkal', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση μοντέλων με χρήση λανθάνουσας παρεμβολής χαρακτηριστικών', 'lt': 'NLP modelių didinimas naudojant vėlesnių savybių interpoliacijas', 'it': 'Aumento dei modelli NLP utilizzando Interpolazioni Latent Feature', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Meningkatkan model NLP menggunakan Interpolasi Feature Latent', 'ml': 'Augmenting NLP models using Latent Feature Interpolations', 'mt': 'Żieda fil-mudelli NLP bl-użu ta’ Interpolazzjonijiet Latenti tal-Karatteristiċi', 'mn': 'Latent Feature Interpolation ашиглаж NLP загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлж', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie modeli NLP za pomocą interpolacji Latent Feature Interpolation', 'ro': 'Amplificarea modelelor PNL utilizând interpolații de caracteristici latente', 'sr': 'Povećavaju modele NLP koristeći Latent Feature Interpolations', 'kk': 'Кейінгі қасиеттер интерполяциясын қолданып NLP үлгілерін шектеу', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha Aqoonsiga NLP ee isticmaalaya Interpolations Latent Feature', 'ta': 'NLP மாதிரி', 'sv': 'Utöka NLP-modeller med Latent Feature Interpolations', 'ur': 'Latent Feature Interpolations', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на модели НЛП, използващи интерполации със латентни характеристики', 'da': 'Udvidelse af NLP-modeller ved hjælp af Latent Feature Interpolations', 'nl': 'NLP-modellen uitbreiden met behulp van latente feature interpolaties', 'hr': 'Povećavajući modele NLP koristeći Latent Feature Interpolations', 'de': 'Erweiterung von NLP-Modellen mit Latent Feature Interpolations', 'id': 'Meningkatkan model NLP menggunakan Interpolasi Feature Latent', 'fa': 'Ш§ЩҒШІШ§ЫҢШҙ Щ…ШҜЩ„ NLP ШЁШ§ Ш§ШіШӘЩҒШ§ШҜЩҮ Ш§ШІ Ш§ЩҶШӘЩӮШ§Щ„ ЩҲЫҢЪҳЩҮвҖҢЩҮШ§ЫҢ Latent', 'sw': 'Mradi wa NLP kwa kutumia Uchaguzi wa Kiarabu', 'ko': '잠재 피쳐 보간으로 NLP 모델 강화', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Duke rritur modelet NLP duke përdorur interpolacionet e funksioneve të vonuara', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'ՆԼՊ մոդելների աճը, օգտագործելով վերջին հատկությունների ինտերպոլացիաներ', 'az': 'Latent Feature Interpolations', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Povećavajući modele NLP koristeći Latent Feature Interpolations', 'ca': 'Augmenting NLP models using Latent Feature Interpolations', 'cs': 'Rozšíření modelů NLP pomocí interpolací latentních funkcí', 'et': 'NLP mudelite täiendamine latentfunktsioonide interpolatsiooni abil', 'fi': 'NLP-mallien lisääminen latentti-ominaisuuksien interpolointia käyttäen', 'tr': 'Latent Feature Interpolations', 'jv': 'Aspect ratio', 'he': 'מגדל דוגמנים NLP בשימוש באינטרפוליציות אופייניות מאוחרות', 'sk': 'Povečanje modelov NLP z uporabo latentnih interpolacij', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Augmenting NLP models using Latent Feature Interpolations'}
{'en': 'Models with a large number of parameters are prone to over-fitting and often fail to capture the underlying input distribution. We introduce Emix, a data augmentation method that uses interpolations of word embeddings and hidden layer representations to construct virtual examples. We show that Emix shows significant improvements over previously used interpolation based regularizers and data augmentation techniques. We also demonstrate how our proposed method is more robust to sparsification. We highlight the merits of our proposed methodology by performing thorough quantitative and qualitative assessments.', 'ar': 'النماذج التي تحتوي على عدد كبير من المعلمات عرضة للإفراط في التركيب وغالبًا ما تفشل في التقاط توزيع المدخلات الأساسي. نقدم Emix ، وهي طريقة لزيادة البيانات تستخدم عمليات الإقحام لتضمينات الكلمات وتمثيلات الطبقة المخفية لإنشاء أمثلة افتراضية. نظهر أن Emix يُظهر تحسينات كبيرة على المُنظِّمات القائمة على الاستيفاء وتقنيات زيادة البيانات المستخدمة سابقًا. نوضح أيضًا كيف أن طريقتنا المقترحة أكثر قوة في التوزيع. نسلط الضوء على مزايا منهجيتنا المقترحة من خلال إجراء تقييمات كمية ونوعية شاملة.', 'es': 'Los modelos con un gran número de parámetros son propensos a un ajuste excesivo y, a menudo, no capturan la distribución de entrada subyacente. Presentamos Emix, un método de aumento de datos que utiliza interpolaciones de incrustaciones de palabras y representaciones de capas ocultas para construir ejemplos virtuales. Mostramos que Emix muestra mejoras significativas con respecto a los regularizadores basados en interpolación y las técnicas de aumento de datos utilizados anteriormente. También demostramos cómo nuestro método propuesto es más sólido para la dispersión. Resaltamos los méritos de nuestra metodología propuesta mediante la realización de evaluaciones cuantitativas y cualitativas exhaustivas.', 'fr': "Les modèles comportant un grand nombre de paramètres sont sujets à un sur-ajustement et ne parviennent souvent pas à saisir la distribution d'entrée sous-jacente. Nous présentons Emix, une méthode d'augmentation de données qui utilise des interpolations d'incorporations de mots et des représentations de couches cachées pour créer des exemples virtuels. Nous montrons qu'Emix présente des améliorations significatives par rapport aux régularisateurs basés sur l'interpolation et aux techniques d'augmentation de données précédemment utilisés. Nous démontrons également comment la méthode que nous proposons est plus résistante à la dispersion. Nous soulignons les mérites de la méthodologie que nous proposons en effectuant des évaluations quantitatives et qualitatives approfondies.", 'pt': 'Modelos com um grande número de parâmetros são propensos a overfitting e muitas vezes não conseguem capturar a distribuição de entrada subjacente. Apresentamos o Emix, um método de aumento de dados que usa interpolações de embeddings de palavras e representações de camadas ocultas para construir exemplos virtuais. Mostramos que o Emix apresenta melhorias significativas em relação aos regularizadores baseados em interpolação e técnicas de aumento de dados usados anteriormente. Também demonstramos como nosso método proposto é mais robusto à esparsificação. Destacamos os méritos de nossa metodologia proposta por meio de avaliações quantitativas e qualitativas completas.', 'ja': '多数のパラメータを持つモデルは、過度にフィットしやすく、基礎となる入力分布をキャプチャできないことがよくあります。Emixは、ワード埋め込みと隠れたレイヤー表現の補間を使用して仮想例を構築するデータ拡張方法です。私たちは、Emixが以前に使用された補間ベースの正規化およびデータ拡張技術よりも大幅な改善を示していることを示しています。また、提案された方法がスパース化により堅牢であることも実証しています。私たちは、徹底的な定量的および定性的評価を行うことによって、提案された方法論の利点を強調します。', 'hi': 'बड़ी संख्या में पैरामीटर वाले मॉडल ओवर-फिटिंग के लिए प्रवण होते हैं और अक्सर अंतर्निहित इनपुट वितरण को कैप्चर करने में विफल रहते हैं। हम एमिक्स, एक डेटा संवर्धन विधि का परिचय देते हैं जो आभासी उदाहरणों के निर्माण के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग और छिपी हुई परत प्रतिनिधित्व के इंटरपोलेशन का उपयोग करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि Emix पहले से उपयोग किए गए इंटरपोलेशन आधारित रेगुलराइज़र और डेटा संवर्धन तकनीकों पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार दिखाता है। हम यह भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि स्पार्सिफिकेशन के लिए अधिक मजबूत कैसे है। हम पूरी तरह से मात्रात्मक और गुणात्मक मूल्यांकन करके अपनी प्रस्तावित पद्धति के गुणों को उजागर करते हैं।', 'zh': '多参数易拟合,常无所得。 余言 Emix,此数术也,其用词嵌插值隐以示虚拟示例。 臣等明与前插值之正则化器,比数增术,Emix见显改。 示以疏疏化更健。 穷定量定性评以显其美。', 'ru': 'Модели с большим количеством параметров склонны к чрезмерной подгонке и часто не могут охватить основное распределение входных данных. Мы представляем Emix, метод дополнения данных, который использует интерполяции вложений слов и представления скрытого слоя для построения виртуальных примеров. Мы показываем, что Emix демонстрирует значительные улучшения по сравнению с ранее использовавшимися регуляторами на основе интерполяции и методами дополнения данных. Мы также демонстрируем, насколько предложенный нами метод является более надежным с точки зрения разрежения. Мы подчеркиваем достоинства предлагаемой нами методологии путем проведения тщательных количественных и качественных оценок.', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhíonn múnlaí le líon mór paraiméadair ró-fheistithe agus is minic nach dteipeann orthu an dáileadh ionchuir bhunúsach a ghabháil. Tugaimid isteach Emix, modh méadaithe sonraí a úsáideann idirshuíomhanna leabaithe focal agus léirithe sraitheanna ceilte chun samplaí fíorúla a chruthú. Léirímid go léiríonn Emix feabhsuithe suntasacha ar rialtóirí bunaithe ar idirshuíomh agus teicnící méadaithe sonraí a úsáideadh roimhe seo. Léirímid freisin an chaoi a bhfuil an modh atá beartaithe againn níos láidre ó thaobh tearcfhásta. Cuirimid béim ar bhuanna ár modheolaíochta molta trí mheasúnuithe críochnúla cainníochtúla agus cáilíochtúla a dhéanamh.', 'ka': 'მოდელები, რომელიც დიდი რაოდენობით პარამეტრები უფრო დამატებულია და ზოგიერთად შეუძლებელია დამატებული მონაცემების გაყოფილი. ჩვენ ემიქსის ჩვენება, მონაცემების აგგენტირება მეტი, რომელიც სიტყვების ინტერპოლაციების გამოყენება და დახურების რესპენტირებების გამოყენება ვირტუალური მა ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ემიქსი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი გაუკეთება წინ გამოიყენებული ინტეპოლაციის რეგილარიზერების და მონაცემების აგგენტირების ტექნ ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, როგორ ჩვენი პროგრამის მეტი უფრო ძალიან სპერციფიკაციაში. ჩვენ აღწერეთ ჩვენი მინდა მეტოლოგიის უფლებები, რომლებიც გავაკეთებთ ძალიან კოლუტატიური და კოლუტატიური განსაზღვრება.', 'hu': 'A nagy számú paraméterrel rendelkező modellek hajlamosak a túlzott illeszkedésre, és gyakran nem sikerül rögzíteni a mögöttes bemeneti eloszlást. Bemutatjuk az Emix-et, egy adatbővítési módszert, amely szóbeágyazások interpolációját és rejtett rétegek reprezentációit használja virtuális példák létrehozásához. Megmutatjuk, hogy az Emix jelentős javulást mutat a korábban használt interpolációs alapú regularizátorokkal és adatok nagyobbítási technikákkal szemben. Azt is bemutatjuk, hogy a javasolt módszerünk milyen erőteljesebb a megosztáshoz. Alapos mennyiségi és minőségi értékelésekkel kiemeljük javasolt módszertanunk érdemeit.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα με μεγάλο αριθμό παραμέτρων είναι επιρρεπείς στην υπερπροσαρμογή και συχνά αποτυγχάνουν να συλλάβουν την υποκείμενη κατανομή εισόδου. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο αύξησης δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιεί παρεμβολές ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων και αναπαραστάσεις κρυφών στρωμάτων για την κατασκευή εικονικών παραδειγμάτων. Δείχνουμε ότι το Emix παρουσιάζει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις έναντι των προηγουμένως χρησιμοποιούμενων ρυθμιστών με βάση την παρεμβολή και των τεχνικών αύξησης δεδομένων. Επίσης, καταδεικνύουμε πώς η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος είναι πιο ανθεκτική στη διάσπαση. Επισημαίνουμε τα πλεονεκτήματα της προτεινόμενης μεθοδολογίας με την πραγματοποίηση εμπεριστατωμένων ποσοτικών και ποιοτικών αξιολογήσεων.', 'it': "I modelli con un gran numero di parametri sono soggetti a sovrafitting e spesso non riescono a catturare la distribuzione di input sottostante. Introducemo Emix, un metodo di aumento dei dati che utilizza interpolazioni di embedding di parole e rappresentazioni di layer nascosti per costruire esempi virtuali. Mostriamo che Emix mostra miglioramenti significativi rispetto ai regolarizzatori basati sull'interpolazione precedentemente utilizzati e alle tecniche di aumento dei dati. Dimostriamo anche come il nostro metodo proposto sia più robusto alla sparsificazione. Evidenziamo i meriti della nostra metodologia proposta effettuando valutazioni quantitative e qualitative approfondite.", 'lt': 'Pavyzdžiai, turintys daug parametrų, yra linkę pernelyg dideliam montavimui ir dažnai nesugeba nustatyti pagrindinio įvedimo pasiskirstymo. Įdiegiame Emix, duomenų didinimo metodą, kuris naudoja žodžių įterpimo interpoliacijas ir paslėptų sluoksnių atstovavimus virtualiems pavyzdžiams kurti. We show that Emix shows significant improvements over previously used interpolation based regularizers and data augmentation techniques.  Mes taip pat parodysime, kaip mūsų siūlomas metodas yra patikimesnis spartizacijai. Mes pabrėžiame siūlomos metodikos privalumus atlikdami išsamius kiekybinius ir kokybinius vertinimus.', 'mk': 'Моделите со голем број параметри се навикнати на премногу поставување и честопати не ја зафатуваат подеднаквата дистрибуција на внесување. Ние го воведуваме Емикс, метод за зголемување на податоците кој користи интерполации на зборови вградени и скриени репрезентации на слоеви за да изгради виртуелни примери. Ние покажуваме дека Емикс покажува значителни подобрувања во однос на претходно искористените интерполациски регулаторизачи и техники за зголемување на податоците. Ние, исто така, демонстрираме како нашиот предложен метод е посилен за раздвојувањето. Ги истакнуваме заслугите на нашата предложена методологија со преземање темелни квантитивни и квалитетни проценки.', 'kk': 'Көп параметрлердің үлкен саны өзгертілген үлгілері өзгертілген және көбінде негізгі келтірілген үлестірімін алу мүмкін емес. Біз Emix- ті виртуалды мысалдар құру үшін сөздерді ендіру мен жасырын қабаттарды интерполяциялау әдісін қолданатын деректерді көтеру әдісін келтіреміз. Біз Эмикс алдында қолданылған интерполяция негіздеген регуляризаторларды және деректерді жақсарту технологияларына көп жақсартуларды көрсетеді. Мұндай-ақ біз таңдаған тәсіліміздің қалай күшейтін әдісін көрсетейміз. Біз келтірілген методологиямыздың көпшілікті, көпшілікті және квалификациялық оқиғаларды орындап таңдаймыз.', 'ms': 'Model dengan bilangan besar parameter cenderung untuk melebihi dan sering gagal menangkap distribusi input yang didasarkan. Kami perkenalkan Emix, kaedah peningkatan data yang menggunakan interpolasi penyampaian perkataan dan perwakilan lapisan tersembunyi untuk membina contoh maya. Kami menunjukkan bahawa Emix menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan berbanding pengaturan berdasarkan interpolasi yang digunakan sebelumnya dan teknik peningkatan data. Kami juga menunjukkan bagaimana kaedah yang kami cadangkan lebih kuat untuk penerangan. Kami menyatakan keuntungan metodologi yang kami cadangkan dengan melakukan penilaian kuantitatif dan kualitatif yang teliti.', 'ml': 'വലിയ അളവുകളുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് അധികമായി തെളിയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതിനായി തെളിയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. അളവിലുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട് നമ്മള്\u200d എമിക്സിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തുനിന്നും ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന തട്ടിന്റെയും പ്രതിനിധികളുടെയും വ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് എമിക്സിന് മുമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്ന ഇന്റര്\u200dപോളേഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഡേറ നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മെഡിറ്റോളജിയുടെ മൂല്യം നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശേഷവും വ', 'mt': 'Mudelli b’għadd kbir ta’ parametri huma suxxettibbli għal twaħħil żejjed u ta’ spiss jonqsu milli jaqbdu d-distribuzzjoni ta’ input sottostanti. Aħna nintroduċu Emix, metodu ta’ żieda tad-dejta li juża interpolazzjonijiet ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem u rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ saffi moħbija biex jinbnew eżempji virtwali. Aħna nuru li Emix juri titjib sinifikanti fuq ir-regolarizzaturi bbażati fuq l-interpolazzjoni użati qabel u t-tekniki ta’ żieda tad-dejta. Jiġu murija wkoll kif il-metodu propost tagħna huwa aktar robust għall-isparsifikazzjoni. Aħna tenfasizzaw il-merti tal-metodoloġija proposta tagħna billi nagħmlu valutazzjonijiet kwantitattivi u kwalitattivi bir-reqqa.', 'no': 'Modellar med eit stor tal parametra er nøyaktig til overpassende og ofte klarer ikkje henta den underliggende inndatafordelinga. Vi introduserer Emix, ein metode for data-augmentasjon som brukar interpolasjon av ord-innebygging og skjulte lagrepresentasjonar for å konstruere virtuelle eksemplar. Vi viser at Emix viser signifikante forbedringar over tidlegare brukte interpoleringsmetodar og dataaugeringsteknikk. Vi viser også korleis vår foreslått metode er mer sterkt til sparsifikasjon. Vi markerer måten vår foreslått metodologi ved å utføra rørre kvantitative og kvalitative vurdering.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх тоо параметрлийн загварууд илүү тохиромжтой бөгөөд ихэвчлэн доорх орны хуваарилалтыг барьж чадахгүй. Бид Emix-г виртуал жишээлүүдийг бүтээхэд өгөгдлийн нэмэлт арга болгодог. Эмикс өмнө нь хэрэглэгдсэн интерполяцийн загвар, өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийн техник дээр маш чухал сайжруулалт харуулж байна. Мөн бид өөрсдийн санал өгсөн арга хэрхэн илүү хүчтэй вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид санал болгосон методологийн үнэ цэнийг үнэлгээд үнэ цэнэтэй хэмжээст, чадвартай оюутнуудыг хийснээр тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'Modele o dużej liczbie parametrów są podatne na nadmierne dopasowanie i często nie są w stanie uchwycić podstawowego rozkładu wejściowego. Przedstawiamy Emix, metodę powiększania danych, która wykorzystuje interpolacje osadzeń słów i ukrytych warstw do konstruowania wirtualnych przykładów. Pokazujemy, że Emix wykazuje znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do wcześniej stosowanych regulatorów interpolacyjnych i technik powiększania danych. Pokazujemy również, jak nasza proponowana metoda jest bardziej odporna na sparsyfikację. Podkreślamy zalety proponowanej metodologii poprzez dokładne oceny ilościowe i jakościowe.', 'ro': 'Modelele cu un număr mare de parametri sunt predispuse la suprapotrivire și adesea nu reușesc să capteze distribuția de intrare subiacentă. Introducem Emix, o metodă de augmentare a datelor care utilizează interpolații de încorporări de cuvinte și reprezentări de straturi ascunse pentru a construi exemple virtuale. Am arătat că Emix prezintă îmbunătățiri semnificative față de regularizatoarele bazate pe interpolație utilizate anterior și tehnicile de augmentare a datelor. De asemenea, demonstrăm modul în care metoda propusă este mai robustă la sparsificare. Evidențiem meritele metodologiei propuse prin efectuarea unor evaluări cantitative și calitative amănunțite.', 'sr': 'Modeli sa velikim brojem parametara su prikladni prema preuklapanju i često ne mogu uhvatiti temeljnu distribuciju ulaza. Predstavljamo Emix, metodu povećanja podataka koja koristi interpolacije reèi ugraðenja i skrivenih zastupanja slojeva kako bi izgradili virtualne primjere. Pokazujemo da Emix pokazuje značajne poboljšanje u odnosu na prethodno korištene interpolacijske regularizatore i tehnike povećanja podataka. Takoðe pokazujemo kako je naš predloženi metod jaèi za sparsifikaciju. Mi naglašavamo zasluge naše predložene metodologije obavljajući temeljne kvantitativne i kvalitativne procjene.', 'si': 'විශාල සංඛ්\u200dයාවක් තියෙන මොඩේල්ස් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය විශ අපි එමික්ස් වෙනුවෙන්, දත්ත විශාලනය විධානයක් භාවිත කරනවා වචනය සහ හ හැංගුණු ස්ථානයක් ඇතුළත් උදාහරණ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ එමික්ස් පෙන්වන්නේ මුලින්ම භාවිත කරලා තියෙන විශේෂතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විසි අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරදේශ විධානය කොහොමද කියලා ප්\u200dරදේශ කරන්නේ. අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා මුළු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද්\u200dයාපන', 'so': 'Modelooyinka ay leeyihiin parameters aad u badan waa inay ku habboon yihiin, marar badanna waa inay qabsadaan qaybinta hoose. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa Emix, qaab kordhinta macluumaadka ah oo isticmaalaya iskujeedka hadalka ka mid ah iyo xarunta qarsoon si aan u dhisno tusaalayaal virus ah. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in Emix uu muujiyo hagaajinta aad u weyn ee horay loo isticmaalay dhaqdhaqaale iyo qalabka kordhiska danbiyada. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa sida qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay u badan tahay in la kordhiyo. Waxaynu muujinnaa qiimeynta aad u sahlan iyo qiimeynta.', 'sv': 'Modeller med ett stort antal parametrar är benägna att överpassa och ofta misslyckas med att fånga den underliggande indatafördelningen. Vi introducerar Emix, en dataförstärkningsmetod som använder interpolationer av ordinbäddningar och dolda lagerrepresentationer för att skapa virtuella exempel. Vi visar att Emix uppvisar betydande förbättringar jämfört med tidigare använda interpolationsbaserade regularisers och dataaugmentationstekniker. Vi visar också hur vår föreslagna metod är mer robust för sparsifiering. Vi lyfter fram fördelarna med vår föreslagna metodik genom noggranna kvantitativa och kvalitativa bedömningar.', 'ta': 'பெரிய அளபுருக்களுடன் மாதிரிகள் மேல் பொருத்தமுடியும் மற்றும் பெரும்பாலாக உள்ளீட்டு பங்கீட்டை பிடிக்க இய எமிக்ஸ், மெய்நிகர் உதாரணங்களை உருவாக்க ஒரு தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறையை நாம் அறிவிக்கிறோம். எமிக்ஸ் முன்பு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட இடைவெளியில் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை காட்டுகிறது என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோ நாம் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை எப்படி செய்யும் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம். நாம் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையின் விருப்பங்களை முன்னிலைப்படுத்துகிறோம் முழுமையான அளவு மற்றும் குறிப்ப', 'ur': 'بہت سی پارامیٹروں کے مطابق موڈل زیادہ فائدہ کے ساتھ مقرر ہیں اور اکثر زیادہ غلطی کے ساتھ نیچے اینپیٹ تقسیم کو پکڑنے کے لئے ناکام ہیں. ہم ایمیکس کو معلوم کرتے ہیں، ایک ڈیٹا اگنٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایمیکس پہلے سے استعمال کیے گئے انٹرپولٹ کے معاملہ میں بہترین سوداگری دکھاتے ہیں ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کس طرح سفارش کرنے کے لئے زیادہ طاقتور ہے۔ ہم نے اپنی پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کی حقیقت کو تحقیق کے ذریعہ دکھایا ہے کہ اسے کامل مقدار اور کفایت کے ارزش کریں۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Emix, bir maʼlumotni tasdiqlash usulini ko'rib chiqaramiz va virtual misollarni yaratish uchun so'z ichki qatlamning interpollaridan foydalanadi. Emix oldin ishlatilgan interpolatning asosida boshqaruvchilar va maʼlumot qo'shish tugmalarini ko'rsatadi. Biz shunday ko'rsatdik, bizning talab qilingan usuli qanday o'zgarishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Biz talab qilingan metodimizning qiymatlarimizni juda qiymati va kvalifik qiymatlarimiz bilan ko'rsatumiz.", 'vi': 'Những mẫu có một số lượng lớn các tham số có xu hướng thích ứng quá mức và thường không nắm bắt được phân phối cơ bản. Chúng tôi giới thiệu Emix, một phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu sử dụng nội dung của sự nhúng vào từ và các biểu hiện lớp ẩn để xây dựng ví dụ ảo. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng Emix đã có những cải tiến quan trọng hơn các hiệu ứng nội thất đã sử dụng và kỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh phương pháp của chúng tôi mạnh mẽ hơn với phân tán. Chúng tôi nhấn mạnh khả năng của phương pháp được đề xuất bằng cách tiến hành tỉ mỉ các đánh giá về dương tính.', 'bg': 'Моделите с голям брой параметри са склонни към свръхмонтаж и често не успяват да уловят основното разпределение на входа. Представяме метода за увеличаване на данните, който използва интерполации на вградени думи и скрити слоеве за изграждане на виртуални примери. Показваме, че показва значителни подобрения в сравнение с използваните преди това интерполационни регуляризатори и техники за увеличаване на данните. Също така демонстрираме как нашият предложен метод е по-устойчив на спарсификация. Ние подчертаваме предимствата на предложената от нас методология чрез извършване на задълбочени количествени и качествени оценки.', 'da': 'Modeller med et stort antal parametre er tilbøjelige til overfitting og ofte undlader at fange den underliggende input fordeling. Vi introducerer Emix, en dataaugmentationsmetode, der bruger interpolationer af ord indlejringer og skjulte lag repræsentationer til at konstruere virtuelle eksempler. Vi viser, at Emix viser betydelige forbedringer i forhold til tidligere anvendte interpolationsbaserede regularisere og dataaugmentationsteknikker. Vi viser også, hvordan vores foreslåede metode er mere robust til sparsifiering. Vi fremhæver fordelene ved vores foreslåede metode ved at foretage grundige kvantitative og kvalitative vurderinger.', 'nl': 'Modellen met een groot aantal parameters zijn gevoelig voor overfitting en kunnen vaak de onderliggende invoerverdeling niet vastleggen. We introduceren Emix, een data augmentation methode die gebruik maakt van interpolaties van woord embeddings en verborgen lagen representaties om virtuele voorbeelden te maken. We laten zien dat Emix significante verbeteringen vertoont ten opzichte van eerder gebruikte interpolatie gebaseerde regularizers en data augmentatie technieken. We laten ook zien hoe onze voorgestelde methode robuuster is tegen sparsificatie. We benadrukken de voordelen van onze voorgestelde methodologie door grondige kwantitatieve en kwalitatieve beoordelingen uit te voeren.', 'hr': 'Modeli s velikim brojem parametara su prikladni prema prekovršenju i često ne mogu uhvatiti temeljnu distribuciju ulaza. Predstavljamo Emix, metodu povećanja podataka koja koristi interpolaciju riječi ugrađenja i skrivenih zastupanja slojeva kako bi izgradili virtualne primjere. Pokazujemo da Emix pokazuje značajne poboljšanje nad ranije korištenim interpolacijskim regularizatorima i tehnikama povećanja podataka. Također pokazujemo kako je naša predložena metoda jača za sparsificiranje. Mi naglašavamo zasluge naše predložene metodologije provedenjem temeljnih kvantitativnih i kvalitativnih procjena.', 'de': 'Modelle mit einer großen Anzahl von Parametern sind anfällig für Überpassungen und erfassen oft nicht die zugrunde liegende Eingangsverteilung. Wir stellen Emix vor, eine Datenerweiterungsmethode, die Interpolationen von Wort-Einbettungen und versteckten Layer-Darstellungen verwendet, um virtuelle Beispiele zu erstellen. Wir zeigen, dass Emix signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber bisher verwendeten interpolationsbasierten Regularizern und Datenauswertungstechniken aufweist. Wir zeigen auch, wie unsere vorgeschlagene Methode robuster gegen Sparsifizierung ist. Wir heben die Vorzüge unserer vorgeschlagenen Methodik durch gründliche quantitative und qualitative Bewertungen hervor.', 'ko': '대량의 매개 변수를 가진 모델은 과도한 의합이 나타나기 쉬우며 잠재적인 입력 분포를 포착하지 못한다.Emix는 단어 포함 및 숨김 레이어 표현에 대한 보간값을 사용하여 가상 예제를 구성하는 데이터 향상 방법에 대해 설명합니다.Emix는 이전에 사용한 보간 기반 정규화기 및 데이터 향상 기술보다 크게 개선되었음을 보여줍니다.우리는 또 우리가 제시한 방법이 어떻게 희소화에 대해 더욱 노봉성을 가지는지 보여 주었다.우리는 전면적인 정량과 정성 평가를 통해 우리가 제시한 방법의 장점을 강조한다.', 'id': 'Model dengan jumlah besar parameter cenderung untuk over fitting dan sering gagal menangkap distribusi input yang didasarkan. Kami memperkenalkan Emix, metode peningkatan data yang menggunakan interpolasi dari penerbangan kata dan representation lapisan tersembunyi untuk membangun contoh virtual. Kami menunjukkan bahwa Emix menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dibanding peraturan interpolasi yang sebelumnya digunakan dan teknik peningkatan data. Kami juga menunjukkan bagaimana metode kami yang diusulkan lebih kuat untuk sparsifikasi. Kami memperhatikan keuntungan metodologi kami yang diusulkan dengan melakukan penilaian kuantitatif dan kualitatif yang mendalam.', 'af': "Models met 'n groot aantal parameters is voorspoedig na oorspoediging en dikwels misluk om die onderstelling invoer verspreiding te vang. Ons introduiseer Emix, 'n data augmentation metode wat gebruik interpolasies van woord inbêring en verborge laag voorstellings om virtuele voorbeelde te konstrukteer. Ons wys dat Emix betekeurige verbeteringe vertoon oor voorheen gebruikte interpolasie gebaseerde regulariseerders en data augmentasie teknike. Ons wys ook hoe ons voorgestelde metode meer kragtiger is om te sparsifiseer. Ons verlig die merite van ons voorgestelde metodologie deur gedruk kvantitatiewe en kvalitatiewe evaluering te doen.", 'tr': "Köp sany parametrer bilen nusgalar a şa daşyrlybdyr we köplenç daşyrlybdyr. Biz Emix'i, sanal örnekler inşa etmek için söz yatmalarının interpolasyonlarını ve gizli katlar örneklerini kullanan veri yükseltme yöntemi tanıtıyoruz. Biz Emix'in önceki kullanılan interpolasyon tabanlı düzenleyici ve veri yükselme tekniklerinden önemli gelişmeleri gösterir. Biz hem teklip eden yöntemimiziň azaltmak üçin nähili kynçylyklygyny görkezýäris. Biz teklip etýän metodologiýanyň barlygyny düzgün kvantitat we howpsyzlyk çykyşlaryny edip ýagtylaýarys.", 'fa': 'Models with a large number of parameters are prone to over-fitting and often fail to capture the underlying input distribution. ما امیکس را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، روش افزایش داده\u200cای که استفاده می\u200cکند از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از ما نشان می دهیم که امیکس بهترین های بزرگی را بر روی تکنیک افزایش داده\u200cها که پیش از این استفاده کرده\u200cاند بر اساس استفاده شده\u200cاند نشان می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که چگونه روش پیشنهاد ما برای اسپارتیفر قوی تر است. ما ارزشهای روش پیشنهاد ما را با انجام ارزشهای اندازه و کیفیت کامل روشن می کنیم.', 'sq': 'Modelet me një numër të madh parametrash janë të aftë për të mbipërshtatur dhe shpesh dështojnë të kapin shpërndarjen bazë të hyrjes. Ne prezantojmë Emix, një metodë rritjeje të të dhënave që përdor interpolacione të përfshirjeve të fjalëve dhe përfaqësime të fshehta shtresa për të ndërtuar shembuj virtual. Ne tregojmë se Emix tregon përmirësime të rëndësishme ndaj rregullatorëve të përdorur më parë të ndërpolacionit dhe teknikave të rritjes së të dhënave. We also demonstrate how our proposed method is more robust to sparsification.  Ne theksojmë meritat e metodologjisë tonë të propozuar duke kryer vlerësime të thella kuantitative dhe kualitative.', 'am': 'ሰነዱ ኤሜክስን፣ የዳታ አካባቢ ማድረግ ማድረግ እና የተሰወረውን ደረጃ ምሳሌዎችን ለመሥራት የሚጠቅመውን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ አሜሪክስ አስቀድሞ በተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ እና የዳታ አካባቢ ስልጣናዎችን የሚያሳየው ትልቅ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እንደገና የተዘጋጀውን ልናሳየው ማድረግ እንዴት እንደሚበዛ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀውን የሞክራችንን ጥቃት እና የቁጥጥርን አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Շատ պարամետրերով բազմաթիվ մոդելներ հակված են չափազանց լավ համապատասխանելու և հաճախ չեն կարողանում ընկալել հիմնական մուտքագրման տարածումը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Էմիքսը, տվյալների աճման մեթոդը, որը օգտագործում է բառերի ներգրավման ինտերպոլացիաներ և թաքնված շերտի ներկայացումներ վիրտուալ օրինակների կառուցելու համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ Էմիքսը ցույց է տալիս նշանակալի բարելավումներ նախկինում օգտագործված ինտերպոլացիայի հիմքում հիմնված կարգավորողների և տվյալների բարձրացման տեխնիկաների հարցում: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես է մեր առաջարկած մեթոդը ավելի ուժեղ բազմապատկության համար: We highlight the merits of our proposed methodology by performing thorough quantitative and qualitative assessments.', 'az': "Daha çox parametru olan modellər çox uyğunlaşdırılmağa məcburidir və çox çox sıxıntılı girdi dağıtını almağa başa düşmür. Biz Emix'i, sanal nümunələr inşa etmək üçün yazılmış sözlərin interpolasyonlarını və gizli sütun göstəricilərini istifadə edən verilən yükselmə metodlarını tanıdırıq. Biz Emix əvvəlcə istifadə edilmiş interpolasyon sistemində olanlar və məlumat artırmaq tekniklərindən çox böyük uzlaşmaları göstərir. Biz də təklif etdiyimiz metodların daha qüvvətli olduğunu göstəririk. Biz təklif etdiyimiz metodologiyanın qiymətlərini tamamilə kvantitatlı və qiymətli değerlendirmələri təşkil edirik.", 'bn': 'বিশাল পরামিতির মোডেল অতিরিক্ত প্রমাণিত হয়েছে এবং প্রায়শই ভূমিকা ইনপুট বিতরণের ব্যর্থ হয়েছে। আমরা এমিক্সের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি একটি ডাটা বাড়ানোর পদ্ধতি, যা শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভার্চুয়াল উদাহরণ নির্মাণ করার জন্য ব্যবহার করে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এমিক্স পূর্বে ব্যবহৃত ইন্টারপোলেশনের ভিত্তিক নিয়মিতদের এবং তথ্য যোগাযোগের প্রযুক্তির উপর গুর আমরা প্রকাশ করি আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি কিভাবে স্পারিফিকেশনের জন্য আরো বেশী চুরি করা হয়েছে। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির মূল্যের উল্লেখ করে গঠিন পরিমাণ এবং পরিমাণ মূল্যবোধ করার মাধ্যমে।', 'bs': 'Modeli sa velikim brojem parametara su prikladni prema preusmjerenju i često ne mogu uhvatiti temeljnu distribuciju ulaza. Predstavljamo Emix, metodu povećanja podataka koja koristi interpolaciju riječi ugrađenja i skrivenih zastupanja slojeva kako bi izgradili virtualne primjere. Pokazujemo da Emix pokazuje značajne poboljšanje u odnosu na prethodno korištene interpolacije regularizatore i tehnike povećanja podataka. Također pokazujemo kako je naša predložena metoda jača za sparsificiranje. Mi naglašavamo zasluge naše predložene metodologije izvršavajući temeljne kvantitativne i kvalitativne procjene.', 'ca': "Els models amb un gran nombre de paràmetres són propensos a sobreafitar-se i sovint no capturen la distribució d'entrada subjacente. We introduce Emix, a data augmentation method that uses interpolations of word embeddings and hidden layer representations to construct virtual examples.  Mostrem que Emix mostra millores significatives en comparació amb regularitzats basats en interpolació abans i tècniques d'augment de dades. També demostram com el nostre mètode proposat és més robust a la sparsificació. Ressaltem els mérits de la nostra metodologia proposada fent evaluacions quantitatives i qualitatives detallades.", 'cs': 'Modely s velkým počtem parametrů jsou náchylné k nadměrnému přizpůsobení a často nedokážou zachytit základní vstupní distribuci. Představujeme Emix, metodu rozšíření dat, která využívá interpolace vložení slov a skrytých reprezentací vrstev k tvorbě virtuálních příkladů. Ukazujeme, že Emix vykazuje významná zlepšení oproti dříve používaným regularizátorům založeným na interpolaci a technikám rozšíření dat. Také demonstrujeme, jak je naše navrhovaná metoda odolnější vůči sparsifikaci. Zdůrazňujeme výhody naší navrhované metodiky prováděním důkladných kvantitativních a kvalitativních hodnocení.', 'et': 'Suure hulga parameetritega mudelid võivad liigselt sobitada ja sageli ei suuda sisendijaotust tabada. Tutvustame Emixi, andmete suurendamise meetodit, mis kasutab virtuaalsete näidete loomiseks sõnade manustamise interpolatsioone ja peidetud kihtide esitusi. Näitame, et Emix on märkimisväärselt paranenud võrreldes varem kasutatud interpolatsioonipõhiste regulaatorite ja andmete suurendamise tehnikatega. Samuti näitame, kuidas meie kavandatud meetod on vastupidavam hajutamisele. Rõhutame oma kavandatud metoodika väärtusi, teostades põhjalikke kvantitatiivseid ja kvalitatiivseid hinnanguid.', 'sw': 'Modeli zenye vipimo vingi vinaonekana kuwa na matumizi mengi na mara nyingi hushindwa kushindwa kupata usambazaji wa kituo cha chini. Tunawasilisha Emix, njia ya kuongeza takwimu inayotumia utaratibu wa mabadiliko ya maneno yanayotumika na uwakilishi wa vipande vilivyofichikana ili kujenga mifano halisi. Tunaonyesha kwamba Emix inaonyesha maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya waliokuwa wakitumiwa kwa njia za udhibiti na teknolojia za kuongeza taarifa. Tunaonyesha jinsi mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa inavyovurugwa zaidi kwa ajili ya kuongezeka. Tunaonyesha maendeleo ya mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa kwa kutekeleza tathmini za kina na viwango.', 'fi': 'Mallit, joissa on suuri määrä parametreja, ovat alttiita liiallisille sovituksille, eivätkä usein pysty kuvaamaan taustalla olevaa syöttöjakaumaa. Esittelemme Emixin, datan lisäysmenetelmän, joka käyttää sanaupotusten interpolointia ja piilotettujen kerrosten representaatioita virtuaalisten esimerkkien rakentamiseen. Osoitamme Emixin parantavan merkittävästi aiemmin käytettyjä interpolointipohjaisia regularisaattoreita ja datan lisäystekniikoita. Osoitamme myös, miten ehdotettu menetelmä on kestävämpi sparsifiointiin. Korostamme ehdotetun menetelmän etuja tekemällä perusteellisia määrällisiä ja laadullisia arviointeja.', 'sk': 'Modeli z velikim številom parametrov so nagnjeni k prekomernemu prilagajanju in pogosto ne zajemajo osnovne vhodne porazdelitve. Predstavljamo Emix, metodo povečanja podatkov, ki uporablja interpolacije besednih vdelav in skritih slojev za gradnjo virtualnih primerov. Pokazali smo, da Emix kaže znatne izboljšave v primerjavi s predhodno uporabljenimi regulatorji na podlagi interpolacije in tehnikami povečanja podatkov. Pokazali smo tudi, kako je naša predlagana metoda bolj robustna na sparzifikacijo. Prednosti naše predlagane metodologije poudarjamo z izvedbo temeljitih kvantitativnih in kvalitativnih ocen.', 'ha': "Modellun da ke da yawan parameteri mai girma za'a iya daidai, kuma ana kasa kãma rabon da aka baka cikin shirin ayuka. Kana ƙunsa da Emx, wata hanyon addition da data, wadda ke yi amfani da interlokaci na maganar da aka shigar da shi da kuma aka ɓõye layin zane-danne dõmin ya sami misãlai na fara. Tuna nũna cewa Emx yana nũna mafiya kyau wa zaman da aka yi amfani da taraji da kuma masu ƙarai da data. Kayya, tuna nuna jinin hanyoyinmu da aka buɗe shi ne mafi kyauta zuwa sauri. Tune nuna mafiya kyauta na hanyoyinmu da aka yi niyyar mu da kafin ƙaddara da gwargwadon.", 'he': 'Models with a large number of parameters are prone to over-fitting and often fail to capture the underlying input distribution.  אנחנו מציגים את אמיקס, שיטת גידול נתונים שמשתמשת באינטרפוליציה של מילים מעורבות ומצגות שכבות חבויות כדי לבנות דוגמאות וירטואליות. אנו מראים שאמיקס מראה שיפורים משמעותיים במיוחד משתמשים בעבר באינטרפוליציה מבוססת רגילים וטכניקות גידול נתונים. אנחנו גם מראים כיצד השיטה המוצעת שלנו יותר חזקה להתפרצות. אנו מזכירים את העובדות של המתודלית המוצעת שלנו על ידי ביצוע ערכות איכותיות וכמותיות יסודיות.', 'bo': 'Models with a large number of parameters are prone to over-fitting and often fail to capture the underlying input distribution. ང་ཚོས་Emix་ལ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་དེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་ཡིབ་ཡོད་པའི་བང་རིམ ང་ཚོས་Emix་ལ་སྔོན་གྱི་འཕགས་རིས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་མཐུན་རིམ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་གཏོང་བ་ས ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཉམས་སྤྱོད་པ་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་འབོར་དང་སྤྲོད་རྩིས་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་དམིགས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'modells We first present emux, a data agement method that use interpolations of word embedding and hidden layer representations to rebuke individual example. Awak dhéwé éntuk Emax seneng pisan akeh luwih dumadhi kanggo sabanjuré interpolasi sistem batir lan teknik data ageraning. Awakdhéwé éntuk pisan piye pawartèraké awak dhéwé nggawe nguasal urip nggawe. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan macem nggawe aksi perusahaan lan ijol-ijolan winih dhéwé.'}
{'en': 'Fast Word Predictor for On-Device Application', 'ar': 'توقع الكلمات السريع للتطبيق على الجهاز', 'es': 'Predictor de palabras rápido para aplicaciones en el dispositivo', 'pt': 'Previsor de palavras rápido para aplicativo no dispositivo', 'fr': "Prédicteur de mots rapide pour les applications sur l'appareil", 'ja': 'デバイス上のアプリケーションのための高速な単語予測', 'ru': 'Быстрое предсказание слов для приложения на устройстве', 'zh': '以备速字预测器', 'hi': 'ऑन-डिवाइस अनुप्रयोग के लिए तेज़ Word Predictor', 'ga': 'Réamhaithriseoir Focal Tapa le haghaidh Feidhmchlár Ar-Gléas', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Γρήγορη πρόβλεψη λέξεων για εφαρμογή σε συσκευή', 'hu': 'Gyors szóelőrejelző eszközön lévő alkalmazásokhoz', 'it': 'Fast Word Predictor per applicazioni on-device', 'lt': 'Greitas žodžių nuspėjamasis įrenginio programai', 'ms': 'Prediktor Perkataan Cepat untuk Aplikasi Pada Peranti', 'mk': 'Предиктор на брзи зборови за апликација на уредот', 'mt': 'Predikatur tal-kliem mgħaġġel għall-Applikazzjoni fuq l-Apparat', 'kk': 'Құрылғының қолданбаларының тез сөздерді алдындаушысы', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч дээр хэрэглэгчийн хурдан үгнэлт', 'ml': 'ഉപകരണപ്രയോഗത്തിനുള്ള വേഗം വാക്ക് മുന്\u200dഗണന്\u200d', 'no': 'Snøggordforhåndsvising for program på einingar', 'pl': 'Szybki predyktor słowa dla aplikacji na urządzeniu', 'sr': 'Brzi predsjednik reči za aplikaciju na uređaju', 'ro': 'Rapid Word Predictor pentru aplicații pe dispozitiv', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qoraalka codsiga qalabka', 'sv': 'Fast Word Predictor för program på enheten', 'ta': 'சாதனம் பயன்பாட்டிற்கான வேகமான வார்த்தை முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tính trước từ nhanh cho ứng dụng On-Device', 'bg': 'Бърз предсказвач на думи за приложение на устройството', 'hr': 'Brzi predsjednik riječi za aplikaciju na uređaju', 'da': 'Fast Word Predictor for On-Device Application', 'nl': 'Snelle Word Predictor voor toepassing op het apparaat', 'ko': '장치 응용에 사용되는 스피드 워드 예측기', 'id': 'Prediktor Perkataan Cepat untuk Aplikasi On-Device', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mtengenezaji wa Hadithi wa haraka kwa ajili ya Shirika la Kipango', 'af': 'Vinnige Woord Voorskouer vir Op- Toestel ToepassingName', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Program üçin çalt söz Prediktöri', 'de': 'Schneller Word-Predictor für Anwendungen auf dem Gerät', 'az': 'Avadanlıq Uygulaması üçün Hızlı Söz Prediktoru', 'bn': 'Fast Word Predictor for On-Device Application', 'bs': 'Brzi predsjednik riječi za aplikaciju na uređaju', 'ca': "Predictor de paraules ràpids per a l'aplicació en dispositiu", 'sq': 'Parashikues i shpejtë i fjalëve për aplikimin në dispozitë', 'cs': 'Rychlý prediktor slov pro aplikaci na zařízení', 'fi': 'Fast Word Predictor for On-Device Application', 'et': 'Kiire sõnade ennustaja seadme rakendusele', 'hy': 'Comment', 'jv': "Tatanan Wurung Ngawe 'on-Device Application'", 'he': 'מתקן מילים מהיר לתוכנית מתקן', 'sk': 'Hitri napovednik besed za aplikacijo na napravi', 'ha': 'Predictor ga Shirin Ayuka na Shirin Ayuka', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་ཆས་གཞུང་གི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་མགྱོག་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པ'}
{'en': 'Learning on large text corpora, deep neural networks achieve promising results in the next word prediction task. However, deploying these huge models on devices has to deal with constraints of low latency and a small binary size. To address these challenges, we propose a fast word predictor performing efficiently on mobile devices. Compared with a standard neural network which has a similar word prediction rate, the proposed model obtains 60 % reduction in memory size and 100X faster inference time on a middle-end mobile device. The method is developed as a feature for a chat application which serves more than 100 million users.', 'ar': 'التعلم على مجموعات نصية كبيرة ، تحقق الشبكات العصبية العميقة نتائج واعدة في مهمة التنبؤ بالكلمة التالية. ومع ذلك ، فإن نشر هذه النماذج الضخمة على الأجهزة يجب أن يتعامل مع قيود زمن الوصول المنخفض والحجم الثنائي الصغير. لمواجهة هذه التحديات ، نقترح متنبئًا سريعًا للكلمات يعمل بكفاءة على الأجهزة المحمولة. مقارنةً بالشبكة العصبية القياسية التي لها معدل تنبؤ مماثل للكلمات ، يحصل النموذج المقترح على 60٪ تقليل في حجم الذاكرة و 100 مرة أسرع في الاستدلال على جهاز محمول متوسط النهاية. تم تطوير الطريقة كميزة لتطبيق دردشة يخدم أكثر من 100 مليون مستخدم.', 'pt': 'Aprendendo em grandes corpora de texto, as redes neurais profundas alcançam resultados promissores na próxima tarefa de previsão de palavras. No entanto, a implantação desses modelos enormes em dispositivos precisa lidar com restrições de baixa latência e um tamanho binário pequeno. Para enfrentar esses desafios, propomos um preditor de palavras rápido com desempenho eficiente em dispositivos móveis. Comparado com uma rede neural padrão que possui uma taxa de previsão de palavras semelhante, o modelo proposto obtém 60% de redução no tamanho da memória e tempo de inferência 100 vezes mais rápido em um dispositivo móvel de médio porte. O método é desenvolvido como um recurso para um aplicativo de chat que atende mais de 100 milhões de usuários.', 'es': 'Aprendiendo en cuerpos de texto grandes, las redes neuronales profundas logran resultados prometedores en la próxima tarea de predicción de palabras. Sin embargo, la implementación de estos enormes modelos en dispositivos tiene que lidiar con las restricciones de baja latencia y un tamaño binario pequeño. Para abordar estos desafíos, proponemos un predictor de palabras rápido que funcione de manera eficiente en los dispositivos móviles. En comparación con una red neuronal estándar que tiene una tasa de predicción de palabras similar, el modelo propuesto obtiene una reducción del 60% en el tamaño de la memoria y un tiempo de inferencia 100 veces más rápido en un dispositivo móvil de gama media. El método se desarrolla como una función para una aplicación de chat que atiende a más de 100 millones de usuarios.', 'fr': "En apprenant sur de grands corpus textuels, les réseaux de neurones profonds obtiennent des résultats prometteurs dans la prochaine tâche de prédiction de mots. Cependant, le déploiement de ces énormes modèles sur des appareils doit faire face à des contraintes de faible latence et de petite taille binaire. Pour relever ces défis, nous proposons un prédicteur de mots rapide performant sur les appareils mobiles. Comparé à un réseau neuronal standard ayant un taux de prédiction de mots similaire, le modèle proposé obtient une réduction de 60\xa0% de la taille de la mémoire et un temps d'inférence 100 fois plus rapide sur un dispositif mobile central. La méthode est développée en tant que fonctionnalité pour une application de chat qui dessert plus de 100 millions d'utilisateurs.", 'zh': '学于大文本语料库,深神经网络于下单词占事有期矣。 然设备必低延迟小二进制大小之限。 为此挑战,设一高效速词预测器。 比之疑似字测率之率神经网络,所立模形于中端移设备者内存大小减60%,推理缩短倍100。 其法聊天应用程序一功开发,应用程序过1亿用户供事。', 'hi': 'बड़े पाठ निगम, गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पर सीखना अगले शब्द भविष्यवाणी कार्य में आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है। हालांकि, उपकरणों पर इन विशाल मॉडलों को तैनात करने के लिए कम विलंबता और एक छोटे बाइनरी आकार की बाधाओं से निपटना पड़ता है। इन चुनौतियों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम मोबाइल उपकरणों पर कुशलतापूर्वक प्रदर्शन करने वाले एक तेज शब्द भविष्यवक्ता का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक मानक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की तुलना में जिसमें एक समान शब्द भविष्यवाणी दर है, प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक मध्य-अंत मोबाइल डिवाइस पर स्मृति आकार और 100X तेज अनुमान समय में 60% की कमी प्राप्त करता है। विधि को एक चैट एप्लिकेशन के लिए एक सुविधा के रूप में विकसित किया गया है जो 100 मिलियन से अधिक उपयोगकर्ताओं की सेवा करता है।', 'ja': '大規模なテキストコーパスで学習すると、ディープニューラルネットワークは次の単語予測タスクで有望な結果を達成します。しかし、これらの巨大なモデルをデバイスに展開するには、低レイテンシと小さなバイナリサイズの制約に対処する必要があります。これらの課題に対処するために、私たちはモバイルデバイス上で効率的に実行する高速な単語予測器を提案します。同様の単語予測レートを有する標準的なニューラルネットワークと比較して、提案されたモデルは、ミドルエンドのモバイルデバイス上でメモリサイズを60 ％削減し、推論時間を100倍速くします。この方法は、1億人以上のユーザーにサービスを提供するチャットアプリケーションの機能として開発されています。', 'ru': 'Обучаясь на больших текстовых корпусах, глубокие нейронные сети достигают многообещающих результатов в задаче предсказания следующего слова. Однако, развертывание этих огромных моделей на устройствах должно иметь дело с ограничениями низкой задержки и небольшого двоичного размера. Для решения этих проблем мы предлагаем быстрый предиктор слов, эффективно работающий на мобильных устройствах. По сравнению со стандартной нейронной сетью, которая имеет аналогичную скорость предсказания слов, предлагаемая модель получает 60% уменьшение объема памяти и в 100 раз быстрее время вывода на среднем мобильном устройстве. Метод разработан как функция для приложения чата, которое обслуживает более 100 миллионов пользователей.', 'ga': "Ag foghlaim ar théacs mór corpora, éiríonn líonraí néaracha doimhne a bhaint amach torthaí a bhfuil gealladh fúthu sa chéad tasc eile a thuar focal. Mar sin féin, caithfidh imscaradh na samhlacha ollmhóra seo ar fheistí déileáil le srianta íseal-latency agus méid dénártha beag. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na dúshláin seo, molaimid réamhaisnéiseoir focal tapa a fheidhmeoidh go héifeachtach ar ghléasanna soghluaiste. I gcomparáid le líonra néaraíoch caighdeánach a bhfuil an ráta tuar focal comhchosúil aige, faigheann an tsamhail atá beartaithe laghdú 60% ar mhéid cuimhne agus 100X am tátal níos tapúla ar ghléas soghluaiste lár-deireadh. Forbraítear an modh mar ghné d'fheidhmchlár comhrá a fhreastalaíonn ar níos mó ná 100 milliún úsáideoir.", 'ka': 'დიდი ტექსტის კოპორაზე მესწავლობა, დიდი ნეიროლური ქსელები მიიღებს გვეუბნებული შედეგი სიტყვების წარმოდგენა. მაგრამ ამ დიდი მოდელების გამოყენება მოწყობილობისთვის უნდა გამოყენება ცოტა ბუნური ზომაზე და პატარა ბუნური ზომაზე. ამ გამოცდილებების შესახებ, ჩვენ მობილური მოწყობილობისთვის ძალიან სწრაფი სიტყვების ოპვეგთექტორის გამოყენება. სტანდარტული ნეიროლური ქსელის შემდგომარებით, რომელიც სხვადასხვა სიტყვების პროგრამების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების შემდგომარება,  მეტი განვითარებულია როგორც ფარატის პროგრამისთვის, რომელიც უფრო მეტი 100 მილიონის გამოყენებელი.', 'el': 'Μαθαίνοντας σε μεγάλα σώματα κειμένου, βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα επιτυγχάνουν πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα στην εργασία πρόβλεψης της επόμενης λέξης. Ωστόσο, η ανάπτυξη αυτών των τεράστιων μοντέλων σε συσκευές πρέπει να αντιμετωπίσει περιορισμούς χαμηλής καθυστέρησης και μικρού δυαδικού μεγέθους. Για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προκλήσεων, προτείνουμε έναν γρήγορο προγνωστή λέξεων που αποδίδει αποτελεσματικά σε κινητές συσκευές. Σε σύγκριση με ένα τυποποιημένο νευρωνικό δίκτυο που έχει ένα παρόμοιο ποσοστό πρόβλεψης λέξεων, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο λαμβάνει 60% μείωση στο μέγεθος μνήμης και 100Χ γρηγορότερο χρόνο συμπερασμάτων σε μια κινητή συσκευή μεσαίου τύπου. Η μέθοδος αναπτύσσεται ως δυνατότητα για μια εφαρμογή συνομιλίας που εξυπηρετεί περισσότερους από εκατό εκατομμύρια χρήστες.', 'hu': 'A nagy szövegkorpusokon való tanulás a mély neurális hálózatok ígéretes eredményeket érnek el a következő szó előrejelzési feladatban. Azonban ezeknek a hatalmas modelleknek az eszközökre történő telepítésének az alacsony késleltetési és kis bináris méretű korlátozásokkal kell foglalkoznia. E kihívások kezelése érdekében egy gyors szóelőrejelzőt javasolunk, amely hatékonyan működik mobil eszközökön. Egy szabványos neurális hálózathoz képest, amely hasonló szó-előrejelzési aránnyal rendelkezik, a javasolt modell 60%-kal csökkenti a memória méretét és 100-szor gyorsabb következtetési időt ér el egy középvonalú mobil eszközön. A módszert egy chat alkalmazás funkciójaként fejlesztették ki, amely több mint 100 millió felhasználót szolgál ki.', 'it': "Imparando su grandi corpi di testo, le reti neurali profonde raggiungono risultati promettenti nel prossimo compito di previsione delle parole. Tuttavia, la distribuzione di questi enormi modelli sui dispositivi deve affrontare vincoli di bassa latenza e di piccole dimensioni binarie. Per affrontare queste sfide, proponiamo un predittore di parole rapido che funziona in modo efficiente sui dispositivi mobili. Rispetto ad una rete neurale standard che ha un tasso di predizione delle parole simile, il modello proposto ottiene una riduzione del 60% nelle dimensioni della memoria e un tempo di inferenza 100X più veloce su un dispositivo mobile di fascia media. Il metodo è sviluppato come funzionalità per un'applicazione di chat che serve più di 100 milioni di utenti.", 'lt': 'Mokymasis didelio teksto korpra, gilieji nervų tinklai pasiekia pažadus rezultatus kitame žodžio prognozavimo uždavinyje. Tačiau šių didžiulių modelių diegimas prietaisuose turi spręsti mažo latencijos ir mažo dviejų dydžio apribojimus. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos uždavinius, siūlome greitą žodžių nuspėjamąjį, veiksmingai veikiantį judriojo ryšio prietaisuose. Palyginti su standartiniu nerviniu tinklu, kuris turi panašų žodžių prognozavimo greitį, siūlomas modelis gauna 60 % atminties dydžio sumažėjimą ir 100X greitesnį nuorodos laiką vidurio galo judriojo prietaise. Metodas parengtas kaip pokalbio programos, kuri tarnauja daugiau kaip 100 mln. naudotojų, savybė.', 'mk': 'Научувајќи се на голем текст корпора, длабоките нервни мрежи постигнуваат ветувачки резултати во следната задача за предвидување на зборот. Сепак, распоредувањето на овие огромни модели на уредите мора да се справи со ограничувања на ниска лантенција и мала бинарна големина. За да ги решиме овие предизвици, предлагаме брз предвидувач на зборови кој ефикасно функционира на мобилните уреди. Во споредба со стандардната неврална мрежа која има слична стапка на предвидување на зборови, предложениот модел добива намалување од 60 отсто на паметната големина и побрзо времето на инференција на мобилен уред на средниот крај. Методот е развиен како карактеристика за апликација за разговор која служи повеќе од 100 милиони корисници.', 'kk': 'Үлкен мәтін корпорасында оқыту үлкен невралдық желілер келесі сөздердің бақылау тапсырмасының нәтижесін жеткізеді. Бірақ бұл үлкен үлгілерді құрылғыларға орналастыру керек кездердің шектеулері мен кішкентай бинарлық өлшемдерін шектеу керек. Бұл мәселелерді өзгерту үшін, мобильді құрылғылар үшін тез сөздерді таңдау бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Сөздерді ұқсас көрсету жиілігі бар стандартты невралдық желімен салыстырылған, келтірілген модель жады өлшеміне 60% деген және ортаңғы соңындағы мобилік құрылғысының 100X жылдам жиілігін ше Бұл әдіс 100 миллионнан артық пайдаланушыларды қызмет қолданбаның мүмкіндігі ретінде құрылады.', 'ml': 'വലിയ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് ആഴത്തെ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുകളുടെ ശേഖരങ്ങള്\u200d അടുത്ത വാക്ക് പ്രവച എന്നാലും, ഈ വലിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപകരണങ്ങളിലേക്ക് വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നത് കുറഞ്ഞ ലേറ്റെന്റിയുടെ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങളും ചെറിയ ബൈന ഈ വിലാസങ്ങളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, മൊബൈല്\u200d ഉപകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു വേഗം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നവന്\u200d പ്ര ഒരു പോലുള്ള വാക്ക് പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വേഗത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു സാധാരണ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുമായി തുല്യമാക്കിയാ 100 മില്യണ്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d സേവിക്കുന്ന ചാറ്റ് പ്രയോഗത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു വിശേഷത്തിനായി ഈ രീത', 'ms': 'Belajar pada korpra teks besar, rangkaian saraf dalam mencapai keputusan yang berjanji dalam tugas ramalan perkataan berikutnya. Bagaimanapun, menggunakan model besar ini pada peranti perlu berurusan dengan keterangan ketinggalan rendah dan saiz binari kecil. Untuk mengatasi cabaran ini, kami cadangkan pengimbas perkataan cepat yang berfungsi dengan efisien pada peranti bimbit. Berbanding dengan rangkaian saraf piawai yang mempunyai kadar prediksi perkataan yang sama, model yang direncanakan mendapatkan 60% pengurangan saiz memori dan 100X masa kesimpulan yang lebih pantas pada peranti bimbit hujung tengah. Kaedah ini dikembangkan sebagai ciri untuk aplikasi sembang yang melayani lebih dari 100 juta pengguna.', 'mn': 'Томоохон текст корпора дээр суралцаж, гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд дараагийн үг таамаглах үйл ажилд амлалтай үр дүнг гаргадаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр том загваруудыг төхөөрөмж дээр хуваалцах нь бага тал, жижиг хоёр хэмжээтэй холбогдох шаардлагатай. Эдгээр сорилтуудыг олохын тулд бид хурдан үг таамаглаач гарч ирсэн төхөөрөмж дээр үр дүнтэй ажиллаж байгааг санал болно. Үүний төстэй хэлбэртэй стандарт мэдрэлийн сүлжээтэй харьцуулсан. Загварын загвар нь дундаж дундаж хөдөлгөөн төхөөрөмж дээр 60% багасгаж, 100X хурдан халдварын хугацаа авдаг. Энэ арга нь 100 сая гаруй хэрэглэгчдийн хувьд ашигладаг ярианы хэрэглэгчдийн хувьд хувьд боловсруулагдсан.', 'mt': 'Learning on large text corpora, deep neural networks achieve promising results in the next word prediction task.  Madankollu, l-użu ta’ dawn il-mudelli enormi fuq l-apparati għandu jittratta restrizzjonijiet ta’ latenza baxxa u daqs binarju żgħir. Biex nindirizzaw dawn l-isfidi, nipproponu preveditur rapidu tal-kelmiet li jwettaq prestazzjoni effiċjenti fuq l-apparati mobbli. Meta mqabbel ma’ netwerk newrali standard li għandu rata simili ta’ tbassir tal-kliem, il-mudell propost jikseb tnaqqis ta’ 60% fid-daqs tal-memorja u ħin ta’ inferenza 100X aktar mgħa ġġel fuq apparat mobbli ta’ tarf medju. Il-metodu huwa żviluppat bħala karatteristika għal applikazzjoni ta’ chat li sservi aktar minn 100 miljun utent.', 'no': 'Læring på stor tekstkorpora, er dype neuralnettverk nådd forståande resultat i neste ordforhåndsvising. Men å utføra desse store modelane på einingar må handsama med begrensningar på låg latens og ein liten binærstorleik. For å handtera desse utfordringane, foreslår vi ein rask ordforventar som utfører effektivt på mobileiningar. Sammenlignet med eit standard neuralnettverk som har ein liknande ordforhåndsvising, vil den foreslåde modellen få 60% reduksjon i minnestorleiken og 100X raskare infeksjonstid på ein mobil eining i middelslutten. Metoden er utvikla som ein funksjon for eit prateprogram som tjener fleire enn 100 millioner brukarar.', 'pl': 'Uczenie się na dużych korpusach tekstowych, głębokie sieci neuronowe osiągają obiecujące rezultaty w zadaniu przewidywania następnego słowa. Jednak wdrażanie tych ogromnych modeli na urządzeniach musi radzić sobie z ograniczeniami niskiego opóźnienia i małego rozmiaru binarnego. Aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom, proponujemy szybki predyktor słów sprawnie działający na urządzeniach mobilnych. W porównaniu ze standardową siecią neuronową, która ma podobny współczynnik przewidywania słów, proponowany model uzyskuje 60% zmniejszenie wielkości pamięci i 100x szybszy czas wnioskowania na urządzeniu mobilnym średniej klasy. Metoda ta została opracowana jako funkcja dla aplikacji czatu, która obsługuje ponad 100 milionów użytkowników.', 'ro': 'Învățând pe corpuri mari de text, rețelele neuronale profunde obțin rezultate promițătoare în următoarea sarcină de predicție a cuvântului. Cu toate acestea, implementarea acestor modele uriașe pe dispozitive trebuie să se confrunte cu constrângeri de latență scăzută și o dimensiune binară mică. Pentru a face față acestor provocări, propunem un predictor rapid de cuvinte care funcționează eficient pe dispozitivele mobile. În comparație cu o rețea neurală standard care are o rată similară de predicție a cuvintelor, modelul propus obține o reducere de 60% a dimensiunii memoriei și un timp de deducție 100X mai rapid pe un dispozitiv mobil de fascia medie. Metoda este dezvoltată ca o caracteristică pentru o aplicație de chat care deservește mai mult de 100 de milioane de utilizatori.', 'so': "Waxbarashada shirkadda aad u weyn ee qoraalka, shabakada neurada aad u dheer waxay heli karaan faa'iido ballan ah oo ka soo socda shaqo la sii sheegayo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka lagu soo diro qaababkan aad u weyn ee qalabka waa in ay ka baaraandegaan qasab ka yar dhaqdhaqaaq iyo mid yar oo labaad ah. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatooyinkaas, waxaynu horumarinaynaa hadal sii socda oo si faa’iido ah u sameynaya qalabka telefoonka. Isbarbardhig shabakadda neurada ah oo haysta qiimaha la mid ah hadal prediction, modelka la soo jeeday wuxuu heli karaa qiyaastii xasuusta iyo waqtiga ugu dhaqsaha dhimirka ee qalabka telefoonka ee dhexe. Waxaa loo horumariyaa qaababka codsiga chat oo u adeega 100 milyan oo isticmaalayaal.", 'sr': 'Učenje o velikoj tekstskoj korpori, duboke neurone mreže postiže obećavajuće rezultate u zadatku predviđanja sledeće reči. Međutim, raspoređivanje tih ogromnih modela na uređajima mora da se suoči sa ograničenjima niske latencije i malim binarnom veličinom. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo brzog predviđa ča reči koji učinkovito izvodi na mobilnim uređajima. U usporedbi sa standardnom neuralnom mrežom koja ima sličnu stopu predviđanja riječi, predloženi model dobija smanjenje veličine pamćenja od 60% i brže infekcije od 100X na srednjem kraju mobilnog uređaja. Metod se razvija kao karakteristika za aplikaciju za razgovor koji služi više od 100 miliona korisnika.', 'sv': 'Genom att lära sig på stora textkorpor uppnår djupa neurala nätverk lovande resultat i nästa ordförutsägelseuppgift. Men att distribuera dessa enorma modeller på enheter måste hantera begränsningar av låg latens och en liten binär storlek. För att möta dessa utmaningar föreslår vi en snabb ordprediktor som fungerar effektivt på mobila enheter. Jämfört med ett vanligt neuralt nätverk som har en liknande ordprediktionsfrekvens, erhåller den föreslagna modellen 60% minskning i minnesstorlek och 100X snabbare inferenstid på en mellanliggande mobil enhet. Metoden är utvecklad som en funktion för en chattapplikation som betjänar mer än 100 miljoner användare.', 'si': 'ලොකු පාට්ස් කොර්පෝරා ගැන ඉගෙන ගන්න, ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලයේ පොරොන්දු ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප නමුත්, උපකරණයේ මේ විශාල මොඩේල් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්  මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, අපි ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මෝබායිල් උපකරණයේ වැඩ ප්\u200dරමාණය න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙක් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වචන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරමා විධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජකය 100 මිලියන් වඩා ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විදිහට විකාශ', 'ta': 'பெரிய உரை நிறுவனத்தில் கற்றுக் கொண்டு, ஆழமான புதிய பிணையமான வலைப்பின்னல் ஆனால், இந்த பெரிய மாதிரிகளை சாதனங்களில் வைத்து செல்ல வேண்டும் குறைந்த தாமதம் மற்றும் சிறிய இருநிலை அளவை கட்டாயம இந்த சவால்களை நிர்ணயிக்க, நாம் ஒரு வேகமான வார்த்தை முன்வாக்கி அல்லது தொலைபேசி சாதனங்களில் வெறும் செயல ஒரு நிலையான புதிய பிணையத்துடன் ஒப்பிடும் ஒரு போன்ற வார்த்தை முன்வாக்கி விகிதம் உள்ளது, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி நினைவகத்தின் அளவில் 60% குறை 100 மில்லியனுக்கு மேற்பட்ட பயனர்களை சேவைக்கும் அரட்டை பயன்பாட்டிற்கான ஒரு குணங்களாக முன்னேற்றப்பட்டு', 'ur': 'بڑے ٹیکسٹ کورپورا کے بارے میں سیکھنا، عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کے بارے میں وعدہ دینے والے نتیجے پہنچ جاتے ہیں آگے کے کلمات کی پیش بینی کے کام میں. However, deploying these huge models on devices has to deal with low latency constraints and a small binary size. یہ چالوں کے بارے میں ہم ایک سریع لفظ پیش بینی کرنے والے کو موبائل دستگاه پر فعال کر رہے ہیں۔ ایک استاندارڈ نیورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ مقایسہ ہے جس کے ساتھ ایک جیسا لفظ پیش بینی رض ہے، پیش بینی موڈل کی مہمانی کی سازی میں 60% کم ہوتی ہے اور 100X زیادہ سریع نازل زمانہ موبایل دستگاه پر۔ یہ طریقہ ایک چاٹ اپنا کاروبار کے لئے ایک فرصت کے طور پر تقویت کی جاتی ہے جو 100 میلیون کاروبار سے زیادہ خدمت کرتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Học về cơ bản lớn, mạng thần kinh sâu đạt được kết quả hứa hẹn trong nhiệm vụ dự đoán từ tiếp theo. Tuy nhiên, việc sử dụng những mô hình khổng lồ này trên thiết bị phải xử lý các giới hạn hạn của việc chậm trễ và một kích cỡ nhị phân nhỏ. Để giải quyết những thử thách này, chúng tôi đề xuất một từ dự đoán nhanh chóng hiệu quả trên thiết bị di động. So với một mạng thần kinh tiêu chuẩn có tỷ lệ dự đoán từ tương tự, mô hình đã đề nghị có một sự giảm bớt 100X kích thước bộ nhớ và giờ nhận biết nhanh hơn 100X trên thiết bị di động trung tâm. Phương pháp được phát triển như một tính năng cho một chương trình chat phục vụ hơn hàng triệu người dùng.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu katta modellarni ishlatish uskunalarni kichkina chegara va kichkina binar oʻlchamini boshqarish kerak. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun, biz mobil uskunalarda tez so'zni predictor ishlab chiqarishni tasavvur qilamiz. Name Name", 'bg': 'Учене на големи текстови корпуси, дълбоки невронни мрежи постигат обещаващи резултати в следващата задача за предсказване на думи. Въпреки това, внедряването на тези огромни модели на устройства трябва да се справи с ограничения на ниска латентност и малък двоичен размер. За да се справим с тези предизвикателства, предлагаме бърз предсказвач на думи, работещ ефективно на мобилни устройства. В сравнение със стандартна невронна мрежа, която има подобна скорост на предсказване на думи, предложеният модел получава 60% намаление на размера на паметта и 100 пъти по-бързо време за заключение на мобилно устройство от средния клас. Методът е разработен като функция за чат приложение, което обслужва повече от 100 милиона потребители.', 'nl': "Leren op grote tekstcorpora's, diepe neurale netwerken bereiken veelbelovende resultaten in de volgende woordvoorspelling taak. Het implementeren van deze enorme modellen op apparaten heeft echter te maken met beperkingen van lage latentie en een kleine binaire grootte. Om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken, stellen we een snelle woordvoorspeller voor die efficiënt presteert op mobiele apparaten. Vergeleken met een standaard neuraal netwerk dat een vergelijkbare woordvoorspellingsrate heeft, verkrijgt het voorgestelde model 60% vermindering in geheugengrootte en 100x snellere inferentietijd op een middle-end mobiel apparaat. De methode is ontwikkeld als een functie voor een chatapplicatie die meer dan 100 miljoen gebruikers bedient.", 'hr': 'Učenje o velikoj tekstskoj korporaciji, duboke neurone mreže postiže obećavajući rezultati u zadatku predviđanja sljedećih riječi. Međutim, raspoređivanje tih ogromnih modela na uređajima mora se suočiti s ograničenjima niske latencije i mala binarna veličina. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo brzu predviđa č riječi koji učinkovito izvodi na mobilnim uređajima. U usporedbi s standardnom neuralnom mrežom koja ima sličnu stopu predviđanja riječi, predloženi model dobija smanjenje veličine pamćenja 60% i brže infekcije vrijeme 100X na srednjem kraju mobilnog uređaja. Metod se razvija kao karakteristika za aplikaciju za razgovor koji služi više od 100 milijuna korisnika.', 'id': 'Belajar pada teks besar corpora, jaringan saraf dalam mencapai hasil yang berjanji dalam tugas prediksi kata berikutnya. However, deploying these huge models on devices has to deal with constraints of low latency and a small binary size.  Untuk mengatasi tantangan-tantangan ini, kami mengusulkan prediksor kata cepat yang berfungsi efisien pada perangkat bergerak. Berbanding dengan jaringan saraf standar yang memiliki kadar prediksi kata yang sama, model yang diusulkan mendapatkan 60% reduksi dalam ukuran memori dan 100X waktu inferensi lebih cepat pada perangkat ponsel ujung tengah. Metode ini dikembangkan sebagai fitur untuk aplikasi chat yang melayani lebih dari 100 juta pengguna.', 'de': 'Beim Lernen auf großen Textkorpora erzielen tiefe neuronale Netze vielversprechende Ergebnisse in der nächsten Wortvorhersageaufgabe. Die Bereitstellung dieser riesigen Modelle auf Geräten muss jedoch mit Einschränkungen der niedrigen Latenz und einer geringen Binärgröße umgehen. Um diesen Herausforderungen gerecht zu werden, schlagen wir einen schnellen Wortprädiktor vor, der effizient auf mobilen Geräten funktioniert. Im Vergleich zu einem Standard-neuronalen Netzwerk, das eine ähnliche Wortvorhersagerate hat, erzielt das vorgeschlagene Modell 60% Verringerung der Speichergröße und 100x schnellere Inferenzzeit auf einem mobilen Middle-End-Gerät. Die Methode wurde als Feature für eine Chat-Anwendung entwickelt, die mehr als 100-Millionen Nutzer bedient.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwenye makampuni makubwa ya simu za mkononi, mitandao ya ndani ya ubongo hupata matumaini makubwa yanayofanya kazi ya kutabiri maneno ijayo. Hata hivyo, kutumia mifano haya makubwa kwenye vifaa vinapaswa kukabiliana na vikwazo vya hivi karibuni vya chini na kiwango kidogo cha binari. Ili kukabiliana na changamoto hizi, tunapendekeza neno la haraka la kutabiri kwa ufanisi katika vifaa vya mkononi. Kulinganishwa na mtandao wa kawaida wa neurali ambao una kiwango cha utabiri wa neno kama hilo, kipindi hicho kilipendekezwa kinapata kupunguza asilimia 60 kwa ukubwa wa kumbukumbu na muda wa kupunguzwa kwa haraka kwa kutumia vifaa vya simu za kati. Utawala huu unaundwa kama utaratibu wa matumizi ya mazungumzo ambayo hutumia zaidi ya watumiaji milioni 100.', 'ko': '대형 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에 대한 학습을 통해 심도 신경 네트워크는 다음 단어 예측 임무에서 좋은 효과를 거두었다.그러나 설비에 이런 대형 모델을 배치하려면 낮은 지연과 작은 이진 크기의 제한을 처리해야 한다.이러한 도전에 대응하기 위해 우리는 모바일 기기에서 효율적으로 실행되는 빠른 단어 예측기를 제시했다.비슷한 단어 예측률을 가진 표준신경망에 비해 이 모델은 미드레인지 모바일에서 저장 용량이 60% 감소하고 추리 시간이 100배 단축됐다.이 방법은 채팅 앱의 한 기능으로 개발된 것으로 1억여 명의 사용자에게 서비스를 제공한다.', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن در شرکت متن بزرگ، شبکه های عصبی عمیق به نتیجه\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده در کار پیش\u200cبینی کلمه بعدی رسیده است. با این حال، این مدل های بزرگ را بر روی دستگاه\u200cها باید با محدودیت\u200cهای کوچک latency و اندازه\u200cهای کوچک کنار بیاورد. برای حل این چالش\u200cها، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک پیش\u200cبینی سریع کلمه\u200cای که در دستگاه\u200cهای موبایل موثرت انجام می\u200cدهد. در مقایسه با شبکه عصبی استاندارد که یک سرعت پیش\u200cبینی کلمه مشابه دارد، مدل پیشنهاد 60% کاهش اندازه حافظه و 100X سریع\u200cتر از آلودگی در یک دستگاه موبایل متوسط می\u200cگیرد. این روش به عنوان ویژگی برای یک کاربرد صحبت که بیش از ۱۰۰ میلیون کاربر خدمت می\u200cکند، توسعه می\u200cشود.', 'da': 'Læring på store tekstkorpora, dybe neurale netværk opnår lovende resultater i den næste ordforudsigelsesopgave. Men implementering af disse enorme modeller på enheder er nødt til at beskæftige sig med begrænsninger af lav ventetid og en lille binær størrelse. For at løse disse udfordringer foreslår vi en hurtig ordforudsiger, der fungerer effektivt på mobile enheder. Sammenlignet med et standard neuralt netværk, der har en lignende ordforudsigelseshastighed, opnår den foreslåede model 60% reduktion i hukommelsesstørrelse og 100X hurtigere inference tid på en middelend mobil enhed. Metoden er udviklet som en funktion til en chat applikation, der tjener mere end 100 millioner brugere.', 'tr': 'Ullakan metin korporatynda öwrenmek, derin nöral şebekeleri soňky sözlerin öngörüm görevinde söz veren netijeleri başarar. Ýöne bu uly nusgalary janlaşdyrmak üçin düşük gabdalyk we kiçi binary ululyk bilen çözmeli. Bu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin, cep telefonlaryň üstünde täsirli bir söz döwzicisini teklip edýäris. Birnäçe söz önlemek derejesi bar bir nuýral a ýunla karşılaştırılýar, teklif edilen modeli hatyň ululykynda 60% iň azaltylyk we 100X iň çalt azaltylyk zamany orta soňky cepeýjde bir ýüklenir. Bu yöntem 100 milliýden köp Ullançy üçin bir suhbet programi üçin bejerilip döredildi.', 'af': "Leer op groot teks korpora, diep neuralnetwerke bereik beloftende resultate in die volgende woord voorskou taak. Maar om hierdie groot modele op toestelle te verwyder, moet met beheinings van lae latensie en 'n klein binêre grootte behandel. Om hierdie uitdagings te adres, voorstel ons 'n vinnige woord voorskouer wat effektief op mobile toestelle uitvoer. Vergelyk met 'n standaard neuralnetwerk wat 'n gelyke woord voorskou tempo het, die voorgestelde model kry 60% reduksie in geheue grootte en 100X vinniger inferensie tyd op 'n middelste einde mobile toestel. Die metode is ontwikkel as 'n funksie vir 'n geselstoepassing wat meer as 100 miljoen gebruikers dien.", 'am': 'Learning on large text corpora, deep neural networks achieve promising results in the next word prediction task.  ነገር ግን እነዚህን ትልቁ ዓይነቶች በዕቃዎች ላይ በመጥቀም የቅርብ ቅድሚያ እና ትንሽ የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ መጠን ማቀናቀል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ እነዚህን ጥላቻዎች ለመጠየቅ፣ በሞልክ መሣሪያዎች ላይ በጥቅም የሚሠራውን የፍጥረት ቃላት ትንቢት የሚያሳውቅ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የተለመደው ቃላት ትንቢት ቁጥር በሚያሳየው የነበረው የደካማዊ ኔትሩር መረብ ይተካክላል፤ የተለመደው ሞዴል የማስታሰቢያ መጠን 60 በመቶ ያጎድላል፥ በመካከለኛውም መጨረሻ የሞልክል መክፈቻ ሰዓት በሀብት ላይ የሚነካውን ጊዜ ይቻላል፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Büyük mətn korporasında öyrənmək, derin nöral ağları sonraki sözlərin tədbir törətməsində və ’ d verən sonuçları başa düşər. Ancaq bu böyük modelləri avadanlıqların istifadəsinə salmaq üçün düşük latensiya və kiçik bina ölçülərlə çəkilməsi lazımdır. Bu çətinliklərdən çəkinmək üçün, mobil avadanlıqların üstündə müvəffəqiyyəti olaraq hızlı bir söz öndəyici təklif edirik. Önüllü söz tədbir hüquqları olan standart nöral a ğı ilə qarşılaşdırılmış, tədbir modeli hafıza böyüklüyünün 60%-ini azaltır və orta-sonun mobil cihazında 100X daha hızlı infeksiya vaxtı alır. Bu metod 100 milyon istifadəçilərindən çox istifadə edən sohbet uyğulaması üçün fərqli olaraq təmizlənir.', 'bn': 'বিশাল টেক্সট কর্পোরায় শিখা, গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল পরবর্তী শব্দের ভবিষ্যতের কাজে প্রতিশ তবে এই বিশাল মডেলগুলো ডিভাইসের উপর প্রস্তুত করার ক্ষেত্রে কম লেটেন্সি এবং ছোট বাইনারি আকারের সীমাবদ্ধতা নিয়ে মু এই চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি দ্রুত শব্দ প্রার্থী প্রস্তাব করি মোবাইল ডিভাইসগুলোতে কার্যকর করা। একটি স্ট্যান্ডার্ড নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে তুলনায় যার মধ্যশেষ মোবাইল ডিভাইসের মধ্যে ৬০% কমানোর প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের মোমের আকার এবং ১০০ এক্স দ্রুত চ্যাট অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে এই পদ্ধতি উন্নয়ন করা হয় যা ১০০ মিলিয়ন ব্যবহারকারী সার্ভিস করে।', 'bs': 'Učenje o velikoj tekstskoj korpori, duboke neurone mreže postiže obećavajući rezultati u zadatku predviđanja sljedećih riječi. Međutim, raspoređivanje tih ogromnih modela na uređajima mora se suočiti sa ograničenjem niske latencije i mala binarna veličina. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo brzu predviđa č riječi koji učinkovito izvodi na mobilnim uređajima. U usporedbi sa standardnom neuralnom mrežom koja ima sličnu stopu predviđanja riječi, predloženi model dobija smanjenje veličine pamćenja 60% i brže infekcije vrijeme 100X na srednjem kraju mobilnog uređaja. Metod se razvija kao karakteristika za aplikaciju za razgovor koji služi više od 100 miliona korisnika.', 'cs': 'Učení na velkých textových korpusech, hluboké neuronové sítě dosahují slibných výsledků v dalším úkolu predikce slova. Nasazení těchto obrovských modelů na zařízeních se však musí vypořádat s omezeními nízké latence a malé binární velikosti. Pro řešení těchto výzev navrhujeme rychlý prediktor slov efektivně fungující na mobilních zařízeních. Ve srovnání se standardní neuronovou sítí, která má podobnou rychlost predikce slov, navržený model získává 60% snížení velikosti paměti a 100x rychlejší dobu inference na středním mobilním zařízení. Metoda je vyvinuta jako funkce pro chatovací aplikaci, která slouží více než sto milionů uživatelů.', 'hy': 'Սովորելով մեծ տեքստի կառուցվածքի վրա, խորը նյարդային ցանցերը հաջորդ բառի կանխատեսման խնդրի խոստացնող արդյունքներ են ստանում: However, deploying these huge models on devices has to deal with constraints of low latency and a small binary size.  Այս մարտահրավերներին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք արագ բառերի կանխատեսողի, որը արդյունավետ գործում է բջջային սարքերի վրա: Համեմատելով ստանդարտ նյարդային ցանցի հետ, որն ունի նման բառերի կանխատեսման արագություն, առաջարկած մոդելը ստանում է հիշողության չափի 60 տոկոսով նվազեցման և 100X արագ հետևողության ժամանակ միջին մասի բջջային սարքի վրա: Մեթոդը զարգացվում է որպես զրուցային ծրագիր, որը ծառայում է ավելի քան 100 միլիոն օգտագործողներ:', 'et': 'Õppides suurtes tekstikorpustes, sügavad närvivõrgud saavutavad järgmise sõna ennustamise ülesandes paljutõotavaid tulemusi. Kuid nende tohutute mudelite kasutuselevõtt seadmetes peab tegelema madala latentsuse ja väikese binaarsuurusega piirangutega. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja kiire sõna ennustaja, mis toimib tõhusalt mobiilseadmetes. Võrreldes standardse närvivõrguga, millel on sarnane sõna prognoosimise kiirus, saavutab kavandatud mudel 60% mälu suuruse vähenemise ja 100 korda kiirema järeldusaja keskmise otsa mobiilseadmel. Meetod on välja töötatud funktsioonina vestlusrakendusele, mis teenindab rohkem kui 100 miljonit kasutajat.', 'fi': 'Suurilla tekstikorpusilla oppiminen, syvät hermoverkot saavuttavat lupaavia tuloksia seuraavassa sanaennustustehtävässä. Kuitenkin näiden valtavien mallien käyttöönotto laitteissa on käsiteltävä rajoituksia, jotka ovat alhainen viive ja pieni binäärikoko. Näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme nopeaa sanaennustetta, joka toimii tehokkaasti mobiililaitteilla. Verrattuna tavalliseen neuroverkkoon, jolla on samanlainen sanojen ennustusnopeus, ehdotettu malli vähentää muistikokoa 60% ja johtaa 100 kertaa nopeampaan päättelyaikaan keskipään mobiililaitteella. Menetelmä on kehitetty ominaisuus chat-sovellukselle, joka palvelee yli 100 miljoonaa käyttäjää.', 'sq': 'Duke mësuar në tekst të madh korpra, rrjetet e thella nervore arrijnë rezultate premtuese në detyrën e ardhshme të parashikimit të fjalës. Megjithatë, vendosja e këtyre modeleve të mëdha në pajisje duhet të trajtojë kufizimet e vonesës së ulët dhe një madhësi të vogël binare. Për të trajtuar këto sfida, ne propozojmë një parashikues të shpejtë fjalësh që funksionon efektivisht në pajisjet celulare. Në krahasim me një rrjet nervor standard që ka një normë të ngjashme parashikimi të fjalëve, modeli i propozuar merr 60% reduktim në madhësinë e kujtesës dhe 100X kohë inference më të shpejtë në një pajisje lëvizëse në fund të mesëm. Metoda është zhvilluar si një funksion për një aplikacion bisedë që shërben më shumë se 100 milion përdorues.', 'ca': "Aprendre en grans corpores de text, les xarxes neuronales profundes aconsegueixen resultats prometedors en la pròxima tasca de predicció de paraules. Tanmateix, l'implantació d'aquests grans models en dispositius ha de tractar amb restriccions de baixa latencia i una petita mida binaria. Per abordar aquests reptes, proposem un predictor de paraules ràpid que funcioni eficientment en dispositius mòbils. Comparat amb una xarxa neural normal que té una velocitat de predicció de paraules similar, el model proposat obté una reducció del 60% de la mida de la memòria i un temps de inferència 100X més ràpid en un dispositiu mòbil de punta mitjana. El mètode es desenvolupa com una característica d'una aplicació de conversa que serveix més de 100 milions d'usuaris.", 'jv': 'text-decorationtextattr No, depicting this big model on device has to do with limits of lowness and a small binary size. Nyong ngomong alam iki dadi, kita supoyo akeh bantuan kelas supoyo kang angkang sampeyan Jaringan Simulated Metopo sing ditambah nganggo akeh pengguna kanggo aplikasi kanggo nggawe aturan tapi narik akeh liyane', 'sk': 'Učenje velikih besedilnih korpusov, globoka nevronska omrežja dosegajo obetavne rezultate v naslednji nalogi napovedovanja besed. Vendar pa se mora uvedba teh ogromnih modelov na napravah spopasti z omejitvami nizke latence in majhne binarne velikosti. Za reševanje teh izzivov predlagamo hiter napovedovalec besed, ki učinkovito deluje na mobilnih napravah. V primerjavi s standardnim nevronskim omrežjem, ki ima podobno stopnjo napovedovanja besed, predlagani model doseže 60-odstotno zmanjšanje velikosti pomnilnika in 100krat hitrejši čas sklepanja na mobilni napravi srednjega konca. Metoda je razvita kot funkcija za klepetalno aplikacijo, ki služi več kot 100 milijonom uporabnikov.', 'ha': "Ana karanta kan makampuni mai girma na matsayi, zane-zane masu ƙaranci na neura sun sãmu masu yi wa'adi da ake yi wa'adi su ƙara cikin aikin babo na kalmar. Amma, a lokacin da za'a deploy wannan misãlai masu girma a kan kayan aiki, sai ya ƙaddara masu ƙayyade masu ƙaranci da girma kaɗan. To address these challenges, we propose a fast word predictor performing efficiently on mobile devices.  An sami da shirin neural na ɗabi'a mai daidai, yana da rabon kalmar mai bashiri kamar shi, shirin da aka buƙata, yana da ƙarantar lokaci cikin girmar memory da lokaci ɗin kafin kasa 100X ta kafin a cikin shirin ayuka mai tsakanin-tsakanin. An buɗe shirin ayuka kamar wata tayari wa shiryoyin ayuka na yi amfani da masu ƙaranci millions.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་གི་སྐུད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སློབ་སྦྱོར་བཞིན་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་རྗེས་སྔོན་སྟོན་ ཡིན་ནའང་། སྒྲིག་ཆའི་ནང་གི་མིག གདོང་ལེན་འདི་དག་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ན་ང་ཚོས་མགྱོགས་མྱུར་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་རིམ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྐུད་ Compared with a standard neural network which has a similar word prediction rate, the proposed model obtains 60% reduction in memory size and 100X faster inference time on a middle-end mobile device. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གླེང་མོལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ས་ཡ་༡༠༠་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཤིག་ལ་རང་བཟོས་བྱེད་པ', 'he': 'ללמוד על טקסט גופרה גדולה, רשתות עצביות עמוקות משיגות תוצאות מבטיחות במשימת החזוי המילה הבאה. However, deploying these huge models on devices has to deal with constraints of low latency and a small binary size.  כדי להתמודד עם האתגרים האלה, אנו מציעים מחזוי מילים מהיר שיופיע באופן יעיל על מכשירים ניידים. בהשוואה לרשת עצבית סטנדרטית שיש לה קצב צפייה של מילים דומה, המודל המוצע מקבל 60% פחית בגודל הזיכרון ו-100X זמן ההנחה מהיר יותר על מכשיר נייד בסוף האמצעי. השיטה מתפתחת בתור תכונה לתוכנית שיחה ששורת יותר מ-100 מיליון משתמשים.'}
{'en': 'Discussion Tracker : Supporting Teacher Learning about Students’ Collaborative Argumentation in High School Classrooms', 'ar': 'متتبع المناقشة: دعم تعلم المعلم حول الجدل التعاوني للطلاب في الفصول الدراسية بالمدرسة الثانوية', 'pt': 'Rastreador de Discussão: Apoiando o Aprendizado do Professor sobre a Argumentação Colaborativa dos Alunos em Salas de Aula do Ensino Médio', 'es': 'Discussion Tracker: Apoyo al aprendizaje de los maestros sobre la argumentación colaborativa de los estudiantes en las aulas', 'fr': "Discussion Tracker\xa0: aider les enseignants à mieux comprendre l'argumentation collaborative des élèves dans les classes du secondaire", 'ja': 'ディスカッショントラッカー：高校の教室での生徒の協働弁論についての教師の学習を支援する', 'zh': '议跟踪器:赞师高中课堂上学生协论', 'ru': 'Дискуссионный трекер: поддержка обучения учителей о совместной аргументации учащихся в классах средней школы', 'hi': 'चर्चा ट्रैकर: हाई स्कूल कक्षाओं में छात्रों के सहयोगी तर्क के बारे में शिक्षक सीखने का समर्थन करना', 'ga': 'Rianaire Plé: Ag Tacú le Foghlaim an Mhúinteora faoi Argóint Chomhoibríoch na Mac Léinn i Seomraí Ranga Ardscoile', 'ka': "Discussion Tracker: Supporting Teacher Learning about Students' Collaborative Argumentation in High School Classrooms", 'hu': 'Beszélgetéskövető: A tanárok tanulásának támogatása a diákok együttműködési érveléséről a középiskolai osztálytermekben', 'el': 'Παρακολούθηση συζήτησης: Υποστήριξη της εκμάθησης δασκάλων για τη συνεργατική επιχειρηματολογία των μαθητών στις τάξεις Λυκείου', 'it': "Tracker di discussione: sostenere l'apprendimento degli insegnanti sull'argomento collaborativo degli studenti nelle aule delle scuole superiori", 'mk': 'Следувач на дискусии: Поддршка за учениците да учат за колаборативната аргументација на студентите во класните соби на средно училиште', 'kk': 'Дискуссия қадамдастырғышы: Студенттердің біріктіру аргументациясы жоғары мектеп классында', 'ml': 'സംസാരം നടത്തുന്നവന്\u200d: വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളുടെ സഹകരിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റേഷന്\u200d ഹൈസ്കൂള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്സുറുകളില്\u200d പഠിക്കു', 'mt': "Discussion Tracker: Supporting Teacher Learning about Students' Collaborative Argumentation in High School Classrooms", 'mn': 'Дэлхийн захирагч: Багш нарын суралцах багш нарын хамтрагч аргументын талаар', 'no': 'Discussion Tracker: Støttar læringa av lærarar om samarbeidsfargmentasjon av studentar i høgskoleklasserom', 'pl': 'Śledzenie dyskusji: Wspieranie nauczycieli uczenia się o wspólnej argumentacji uczniów w klasach liceum', 'ro': 'Discuții Tracker: Sprijinirea învățării profesorilor despre argumentarea colaborativă a elevilor în clasele de liceu', 'sr': 'Preglednik diskusije: Podrška učiteljima učenja o saradnjoj argumentaciji studenata u školskim sobama', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාස පරීක්ෂකය: විද්\u200dයාලිකාරියෝ ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපාරකය ගැන උදව් කරනවා', 'lt': 'Diskusijų sekėjas: parama mokytojams mokytis apie studentų bendradarbiavimo argumentus vidurinėse mokyklose', 'so': 'Talobixiyaha: Kaalmada waxbarashada ee iskuulka iskuulka', 'sv': 'Diskussionsspårare: Stödja lärarnas lärande om elevers samarbetsargumentation i gymnasieklassrum', 'ta': 'விவாதம் பின்பற்றி', 'ms': "Discussion Tracker: Supporting Teacher Learning about Students' Collaborative Argumentation in High School Classrooms", 'ur': "Discussion Tracker: Supporting Teacher Learning about Students' Collaborative Argumentation in High School Classrooms", 'uz': "Talab qiluvchi: Maktab xossalarida o'quvchilarning kollaboratiy Argumentlarni qoʻllashni qoʻllash", 'vi': 'Phim chia sẻ: Hỗ trợ giáo sư học về các chương trình tranh luận về học sinh ở trường cao cấp', 'hr': 'Praćenik diskusije: Podrška učiteljima učenja o suradnoj argumentaciji studenata u školskim sobama', 'da': 'Diskussionssporer: Støtte lærerlæring om elevernes samarbejdsargumentation i gymnasieklasseværelser', 'bg': 'Проследяване на дискусии: Подпомагане на обучението на учителите за съвместната аргументация на учениците в класните стаи в гимназията', 'nl': 'Discussie Tracker: Ondersteuning van Leraren Leren over Samenwerkend Argumenteren van Studenten in Schoolklaslokalen', 'id': 'Penjejakan Diskusi: Membantu Guru Belajar tentang Argumentasi Kolaboratif para mahasiswa di ruang kelas SMA', 'de': 'Discussion Tracker: Unterstützung von Lehrern beim Lernen über kollaborative Argumentation von Schülern in High School Classrooms', 'fa': 'تراکور گفتگو: پشتیبانی معلم یادگیری در مورد ارتباط همکاری دانش آموزان در کلاس دبیرستان', 'ko': '토론 추적기: 교사가 고등학교 교실에서 학생의 합작 변론을 학습하는 것을 지원한다', 'sw': 'Mjadala: Msaidizi Mwalimu Kufundisha Kujifunza kuhusu Mjadala wa Ushirikiano wa Wanafunzi katika vyumba vya Sekondari', 'af': 'Ondersoektog: Ondersteuning onderwerp onderwerp onderwerp van Studente se Kolaboratiewe Argumentasie in Hoogskool klaskamers', 'sq': 'Ndiqësi diskutimi: Mbështetja e Mësuesit që të mësojnë rreth argumenteve të bashkëpunimit të studentëve në dhomat e klasave të shkollës së mesme', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ: ተማሪዎችን ስለተማሪዎቹ ስህተት አርጉማት በሁለተኛ ትምህርት ደረጃዎች ውስጥ', 'hy': 'Խոսելու հետևողը. աջակցել ուսուցիչների ուսումնասիրությունը ուսանողների համագործակցության բանավեճերի մասին ավագ դպրոցի դասարաններում', 'az': 'M칲톛lliml톛rin 칬yr톛nm톛sini d톛st톛kl톛yir', 'bn': 'আলোচনা ট্র্যাকার: হাই স্কুলের শ্রেণীর সহযোগিতা আর্গুমেন্টেশন সম্পর্কে শিক্ষকদের সমর্থন করুন', 'bs': 'Praćenik diskusije: Podrška učiteljima učenja o saradnjoj argumentaciji studenata u školskim prostorijama', 'ca': "Seguidor de discusió: Suportar l'aprenentatge del professor sobre l'argumentació col·laborativa dels estudiants a classes d'institut", 'cs': 'Sledování diskuze: Podpora učitelů učení o spolupráci studentů ve středních školách', 'et': 'Arutelu jälgija: õpetajate õppimise toetamine õpilaste koostöö argumenteerimise kohta keskkooli klassiruumides', 'fi': 'Discussion Tracker: Opettajan oppimisen tukeminen oppilaiden yhteistoiminnallisesta argumentoinnista lukion luokkahuoneissa', 'tr': 'Diskusiýa çykyşçy: Mekdepde okuwçylaryň jemgyýetiş arzumlary barada Mugallymlaryň öwrenmesini destekleýär', 'jv': 'Diskusisi tracer', 'sk': 'Sledilnik pogovorov: Podpora učiteljem učenja o sodelovanju dijakov v srednješolskih učilnicah', 'he': 'מעקב דיון: תמיכה למורה ללמוד על טיעון שיתוף פעולה של סטודנטים בחדרי כיתה בתיכון', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'bo': 'བསྟུན་གྲྭའི་རྗེས་སྤྱོད་མི་: སློབ་ཆེན་པོའི་ནང་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུན་གྱི་དཔེ་རིགས་སྟོང་ཁང་ནང་གི་སློབ་ཆེན་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཆ'}
{'en': 'Teaching collaborative argumentation is an advanced skill that many K-12 teachers struggle to develop. To address this, we have developed Discussion Tracker, a classroom discussion analytics system based on novel algorithms for classifying argument moves, specificity, and collaboration. Results from a classroom deployment indicate that teachers found the analytics useful, and that the underlying classifiers perform with moderate to substantial agreement with humans.', 'ar': 'يعد تدريس الجدل التعاوني مهارة متقدمة يكافح العديد من معلمي رياض الأطفال حتى الصف الثاني عشر من أجل تطويرها. لمعالجة هذا الأمر ، قمنا بتطوير "متعقب المناقشة" ، وهو نظام لتحليلات المناقشة في الفصل الدراسي يعتمد على خوارزميات جديدة لتصنيف حركات الحجة والخصوصية والتعاون. تشير النتائج من نشر الفصل الدراسي إلى أن المعلمين وجدوا التحليلات مفيدة ، وأن المصنفات الأساسية تعمل باتفاق متوسط إلى جوهري مع البشر.', 'es': 'Enseñar la argumentación colaborativa es una habilidad avanzada que muchos maestros de K-12 luchan por desarrollar. Para hacer frente a esto, hemos desarrollado Discussion Tracker, un sistema de análisis de debates en el aula basado en algoritmos novedosos para clasificar los movimientos argumentativos, la especificidad y la colaboración. Los resultados de una implementación en el aula indican que los maestros encontraron útil el análisis y que los clasificadores subyacentes funcionan con un acuerdo de moderado a sustancial con los humanos.', 'pt': 'Ensinar argumentação colaborativa é uma habilidade avançada que muitos professores K-12 lutam para desenvolver. Para resolver isso, desenvolvemos o Discussion Tracker, um sistema de análise de discussão em sala de aula baseado em novos algoritmos para classificar movimentos de argumentos, especificidade e colaboração. Os resultados de uma implantação em sala de aula indicam que os professores acharam a análise útil e que os classificadores subjacentes funcionam com concordância moderada a substancial com os humanos.', 'fr': "L'enseignement de l'argumentation collaborative est une compétence avancée que de nombreux enseignants de la maternelle au secondaire ont du mal à développer. Pour y remédier, nous avons développé Discussion Tracker, un système d'analyse des discussions en classe basé sur de nouveaux algorithmes pour classer les mouvements d'argumentation, la spécificité et la collaboration. Les résultats d'un déploiement en classe indiquent que les enseignants ont trouvé les analyses utiles et que les classificateurs sous-jacents fonctionnent avec un accord modéré à substantiel avec les humains.", 'ja': '協働弁論術を教えることは、多くのK -12教師が開発するために苦労している高度なスキルです。これに対処するために、議論の動き、特異性、コラボレーションを分類するための新しいアルゴリズムに基づいた教室での議論分析システムであるDiscussion Trackerを開発しました。教室での展開の結果は、教師が分析が有用であると判断し、基礎となる分類子が人間と中程度から実質的に一致していることを示している。', 'zh': '教授协作论证多K-12师难成之高技。 为此论跟踪器,此乃新算法课堂论析系统,施于移动,特异性协为类。 课堂部分之果表明,师见析而有用,而底器与人有中实质性者同。', 'hi': 'सहयोगी तर्क-वितर्क शिक्षण एक उन्नत कौशल है जिसे विकसित करने के लिए कई के -12 शिक्षक संघर्ष करते हैं। इसे संबोधित करने के लिए, हमने चर्चा ट्रैकर विकसित किया है, जो तर्क चाल, विशिष्टता और सहयोग को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए उपन्यास एल्गोरिदम पर आधारित एक कक्षा चर्चा विश्लेषिकी प्रणाली है। कक्षा परिनियोजन के परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि शिक्षकों ने विश्लेषिकी को उपयोगी पाया, और यह कि अंतर्निहित क्लासिफायर मनुष्यों के साथ मध्यम से पर्याप्त समझौते के साथ प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Преподавание совместной аргументации - это продвинутый навык, который изо всех сил пытаются развить многие учителя K-12. Для решения этой проблемы мы разработали Discussion Tracker, систему аналитики обсуждений в классе, основанную на новых алгоритмах классификации движений аргументов, специфичности и совместной работы. Результаты развертывания в классе показывают, что учителя нашли аналитику полезной, и что лежащие в ее основе классификаторы работают с умеренным или существенным согласием с людьми.', 'ga': 'Ardscil is ea argóinteacht chomhoibríoch a theagasc a mbíonn deacrachtaí ag go leor múinteoirí K-12 í a fhorbairt. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt air seo, tá Discussion Tracker forbartha againn, córas anailíse díospóireachta sa seomra ranga atá bunaithe ar halgartaim nua chun gluaiseachtaí argóinte, sainiúlacht agus comhoibriú a rangú. Léiríonn torthaí ó imscaradh seomra ranga go raibh an anailísíocht úsáideach do mhúinteoirí, agus go n-oibríonn na haicmitheoirí bunúsacha le comhaontú measartha go substaintiúil le daoine.', 'el': 'Η διδασκαλία συνεργατικής επιχειρηματολογίας είναι μια προηγμένη ικανότητα που πολλοί καθηγητές Κ-12 αγωνίζονται να αναπτύξουν. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό, έχουμε αναπτύξει ένα σύστημα ανάλυσης συζητήσεων στην τάξη βασισμένο σε νέους αλγόριθμους για την ταξινόμηση των κινήσεων επιχειρημάτων, της ειδικότητας και της συνεργασίας. Τα αποτελέσματα από την ανάπτυξη μιας τάξης δείχνουν ότι οι εκπαιδευτικοί βρήκαν χρήσιμες τις αναλύσεις και ότι οι υποκείμενες ταξινομητές αποδίδουν με μέτρια έως ουσιαστική συμφωνία με τους ανθρώπους.', 'hu': 'Az együttműködő érvelés tanítása olyan fejlett készség, amelyet sok K-12 tanár küzd fejleszteni. Ennek megoldására kifejlesztettük a Discussion Tracker-t, egy osztálytermi vitaelemző rendszert, amely új algoritmusokon alapul az argumentummozgások, a specificitás és az együttműködés osztályozására. Az osztálytermi telepítés eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a tanárok hasznosnak találták az elemzést, és hogy az alapul szolgáló osztályozók mérsékelt vagy lényeges egyetértéssel teljesítenek az emberekkel.', 'it': "Insegnare l'argomentazione collaborativa è un'abilità avanzata che molti insegnanti di K-12 faticano a sviluppare. Per affrontare questo problema, abbiamo sviluppato Discussion Tracker, un sistema di analisi delle discussioni in classe basato su algoritmi innovativi per classificare movimenti di argomenti, specificità e collaborazione. I risultati di una distribuzione in classe indicano che gli insegnanti hanno trovato utili le analisi e che i classificatori sottostanti funzionano con un accordo moderato o sostanziale con gli esseri umani.", 'kk': 'Көпшілік аргументациялық оқыту - K-12 ұстаздардың көпшілігі жасау үшін көпшілікті жұмыс істеу. Бұл жағдайда біз дискуссия қадамдастырғышы, сыныпты дискуссия аналитикалық жүйесі, аргументтің жылдамдығын, тәсілдігін және білімізді классификациялау алгоритмдеріне негізделген. Сурет орындалуының нәтижелері мұғалімдердің аналитикасы пайдалы болды деп белгілейді, және негізгі классификациялары адамдармен көп келім тұрады.', 'ka': 'შესწავლება კომპორაციური არგუმენტია უფრო მეტი კი-12 სწავლებელი განვითარებას. ამის შესახებ, ჩვენ განვითარეთ დისკუსციის ტრაკერი, კლასის დისკუსციის ანალიტიკის სისტემა, რომელიც ახალგაზრულ ალგორიტემის დაბაზეული ახალგაზრულების მოძრაობის, განსაკუთრებულობის კლასის გამოყენების შედეგები იცის, რომ მასწავლებელი ანალიტიკის გამოყენება საჭირო და რომ ქვემოთ კლასიფიკაციები მომდერებული ადამიანებთან მნიშვნელოვანია.', 'ml': 'സഹകരിക്കുന്ന വാദ്യാഭ്യാസം ഒരു മുന്\u200dഗണന കഴിവാണ്. ഒരുപാട് കെ-12 ടീച്ചര്\u200d വളര്\u200dന്നെടുക്കാന്\u200d പോരാടുന്നു. ഇതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരം, നോവല്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഒരു ക്ലാസ്റ്റ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സിസ് ക്ലാസ്റ്റുമില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു, ടീച്ചര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അന്യായം പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നത് കണ്ടെത്തിയെന്നും, അകത്', 'lt': 'Bendradarbiavimo argumentų mokymas yra pažangi įgūdžiai, kurių daugelis K-12 mokytojų stengiasi plėtoti. Siekdami spręsti šį klausimą, sukūrėme diskusijų sekiklį, klasės diskusijų analizės sistemą, grindžiamą naujais algoritmais argument ų judėjimams, specifiškumui ir bendradarbiavimui klasifikuoti. Iš klasės įdiegimo rezultatų matyti, kad mokytojai laikėsi naudingos analizės ir kad pagrindiniai klasifikatoriai su žmonėmis dirba vidutiniškai arba iš esmės sutardami.', 'mk': 'Учителството на соработка е напредна вештина за која многу наставници од К-12 се борат да ја развијат. За да го решиме ова, развивме Дискусиски тракер, систем за аналитичка дискусија во училницата базиран на нови алгоритми за класификација на движења на аргументите, специфичност и соработка. Резултатите од распоредувањето на училиштата покажуваат дека професорите сметаат дека аналитиката е корисна и дека основните класификатори функционираат со умерен до значителен договор со луѓето.', 'mn': 'Хамтран ажиллах талаар багш сурах нь K-12 багш нарын хөгжүүлэхэд зориулсан хөгжлийн чадвар юм. Энэ талаар ярилцахын тулд бид Дискуссийн Транкер, ангийнхээ ярилцлагын шинжилгээ судалгааны системийг аргументын хөдөлгөөн, тодорхойлолт, хамтын ажиллагааг хичээлдэг шинэ алгоритм дээр бий болгосон. Ангийнхээ хуваалцааны үр дүнд багш нар аналитикийг хэрэглэгддэг болон суурь ангид хүмүүстэй нийтлэг болон их зөвшөөрөлтэй байдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Mengajar argumen kerjasama adalah keterampilan maju yang banyak guru K-12 berjuang untuk mengembangkan. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami telah mengembangkan Penjejak Diskusi, sistem analitik diskusi kelas berdasarkan algoritma baru untuk mengklasifikasikan pergerakan argumen, spesifik, dan kerjasama. Keputusan dari penerbangan kelas menunjukkan bahawa guru mendapati analitik berguna, dan bahawa klasifikasi yang didasarkan melaksanakan dengan persetujuan yang sederhana hingga besar dengan manusia.', 'no': 'Læring av samarbeidsfargmentasjon er ein avansert ferdighet som mange lærarar kjem til å utvikle. For å handtera dette, har vi utvikla diskusjonsstrekker, eit klassaromdiskusjonssystem basert på novel algoritme for å klassifisera argument-trekk, spesifikasjon og samarbeid. Resultater frå utviklinga av klasserom tyder på at lærarar fann analytikken nyttig, og at underliggande klassifikatorane utfører med moderat til stort samtale med menneske.', 'pl': 'Nauczanie argumentacji współpracy jest zaawansowaną umiejętnością, z którą wielu nauczycieli K-12 zmaga się rozwijać. W tym celu opracowaliśmy Discussion Tracker, system analizy dyskusji w klasie oparty na nowych algorytmach klasyfikacji ruchów argumentów, specyfiki i współpracy. Wyniki wdrożenia w klasie wskazują, że nauczyciele uznali analitykę za użyteczną, a podstawowe klasyfikatory działają z umiarkowaną lub istotną zgodą z ludźmi.', 'sr': 'Naučenje saradnje argumentacije je napredna vještina koju mnogi nastavnici K-12 bore za razvoj. Da bi se ovo riješili, razvili smo praćenik diskusije, analitički sistem razreda učionika baziran na novim algoritmima za klasifikaciju pokreta argument a, specifičnosti i saradnje. Rezultati iz razvoja učionice ukazuju na to da su nastavnici pronašli analitiku korisnu, i da su temeljni klasifikatori izvršili s umjerenim do značajnim sporazumom sa ljudima.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tal-argumentazzjoni kollaborattiva huwa ħila avvanzata li ħafna mill-għalliema tal-K-12 għandhom diffikultà biex jiżviluppaw. Biex nindirizzaw dan, żviluppajna Diskussjoni Tracker, sistema analitika tad-diskussjoni tal-klassi bbażata fuq algoritmi ġodda għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-movimenti tal-argument, l-ispeċifiċità, u l-kollaborazzjoni. Ir-riżultati minn skjerament tal-klassi jindikaw li l-għalliema sabu l-analitika utli, u li l-klassifikaturi sottostanti jwettqu bi qbil moderat sa sostanzjali mal-bnedmin.', 'ro': 'Predarea argumentării colaborative este o abilitate avansată pe care mulți profesori K-12 se luptă să o dezvolte. Pentru a aborda acest lucru, am dezvoltat Discuții Tracker, un sistem de analiză a discuțiilor în clasă bazat pe algoritmi noi pentru clasificarea mișcărilor argumentelor, specificității și colaborării. Rezultatele unei desfășurări în clasă indică faptul că profesorii au considerat analizele utile și că clasificatorii subiacenți funcționează cu un acord moderat până la substanțial cu oamenii.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසයක් කියලා, K-12 ගුරුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා. මේක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි විශ්වාස පරීක්ෂක පරීක්ෂක පද්ධතියක් විශ්ලේෂක පද්ධතියක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ලොකු ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට ප්\u200dර විශ්වාස කාමරයට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් හොයාගත්තා කියලා, ඒ වගේම මිනිස්සුන්ගේ', 'ta': 'கே12 ஆசிரியர்கள் முன்னேற்றுவதற்கான போராடுகிறார்கள். இதை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாங்கள் விவாதாரண பின்பற்றி உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம், ஒரு வகுப்பு விவாதிப்பு, குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் இணைப்புகளை வகுப்பிடுவதற Results from a classroom deployment indicate that teachers found the analytics useful, and that the underlying classifiers perform with moderate to substantial agreement with humans.', 'so': 'Talobixinta wadajirka ah waa aqoon horumarinta ah oo ay macallimiin badan K-12 u dagaalamayaan inay horumariyaan. To address this, we have developed Discussion Tracker, a classroom discussion analytics system based on novel algorithms for classifying argument moves, specificity, and collaboration.  Dhacdooyinka fasalka laga soo diro waxay ka muuqataa in macallimiinta ay helaan wax faa’iido leh, iyo in fasalka hoose ay u sameeyaan heshiiska hoose oo u dhexeeya dadka.', 'sv': 'Undervisning av samarbetsargumentation är en avancerad färdighet som många K-12 lärare kämpar för att utveckla. För att ta itu med detta har vi utvecklat Diskussionsspårare, ett klassrumsanalyssystem baserat på nya algoritmer för klassificering av argumentrörelser, specificitet och samarbete. Resultat från en klassrumsinstallation indikerar att lärare tyckte att analysen var användbar, och att de underliggande klassificerarna presterade med måttlig till väsentlig överenskommelse med människor.', 'ur': 'تعلق کی تعلق کی تعلیم ایک آگے بڑھنے کی طاقت ہے جو بہت سے K-12 استاد تکلیف کے لئے کوشش کرتے ہیں. اس کے بارے میں ہم نے بحث تریکر، ایک کلاس روم کی بحث تحقیقات سیستم کو روانی الگوریتم پر بنیاد رکھا ہے جو بحث حرکت، مشخصت اور مشارکت کے لئے کلاس کریں۔ ایک کلاس روم کے منتقل ہونے کے نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ استاد نے تحلیل کے مطابق فائدہ پایا ہے، اور یہ کہ نیچے کلاسفوں نے انسانوں کے معاملہ میں متوسط معاملہ کے ساتھ عمل کیا ہے.', 'uz': "Ko'p K-12 o'qituvchilar tajriba qilishga qaramadi. Buni boshqarish uchun biz disk qidirish trafikini yaratdik, sinfning taʼminlovchi tizimi, novel algoritlarini tasdiqlash uchun darajadagi taʼminlovchi tizimni yaratdik. Klassizni tashqarish natijalarida o'qituvchilar analytiklarga foydalanishini anglatadi va asosiy klassiplarning asosiy muammolari odamlar bilan muhim heshima bilan bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Dạy các chương trình nghiên cứu hợp tác là một kỹ năng cao mà nhiều giáo viên K-12 rất khó khăn để phát triển. Để giải quyết chuyện này, chúng tôi đã phát triển Máy phát triển Bàn Tay, hệ thống phân tích thảo luận lớp học dựa trên các thuật toán mới phân loại các bước tranh luận, đặc tính và phối hợp. Kết quả từ việc triển khai lớp học cho thấy giáo viên tìm thấy các giải pháp có ích, và các phân loại bên dưới thực hiện với sự đồng ý từ phải đến giảm đáng kể với con người.', 'bg': 'Преподаването на съвместна аргументация е напреднало умение, което много учители се борят да развият. За да се справим с това, разработихме система за анализ на дискусиите в класната стая, базирана на нови алгоритми за класифициране на ходовете на аргументите, спецификата и сътрудничеството. Резултатите от внедряването на класната стая показват, че учителите намират анализа за полезна и че основните класификатори работят с умерено до съществено съгласие с хората.', 'hr': 'Naučenje saradnje argumentacije je napredna vještina koju se mnogi nastavnici K-12 bore za razvoj. Za rješavanje ovoga, razvili smo praćenik diskusije, analitički sustav razgovora u učionici temeljen na novom algoritmu za klasifikaciju pokreta argument a, specifičnosti i suradnje. Rezultati iz razvoja učionice ukazuju na to da su učitelji pronašli korisnu analitiku i da temeljni klasifikatori izvode s umjerenim do značajnim sporazumom s ljudima.', 'da': 'Undervisning af kollaborativ argumentation er en avanceret færdighed, som mange K-12 lærere kæmper for at udvikle. For at løse dette har vi udviklet Diskussionstracker, et klasseværelsesanalysesystem baseret på nye algoritmer til klassificering af argumentbevægelser, specificitet og samarbejde. Resultater fra en klasseværelsesimplementering indikerer, at lærerne fandt analyserne nyttige, og at de underliggende klassificeringer fungerer med moderat til væsentlig enighed med mennesker.', 'nl': 'Het onderwijzen van collaboratieve argumentatie is een geavanceerde vaardigheid die veel K-12 leraren moeite hebben om te ontwikkelen. Om dit aan te pakken, hebben we Discussion Tracker ontwikkeld, een classroom discussie analytics systeem gebaseerd op nieuwe algoritmes voor het classificeren van argumentbewegingen, specificiteit en samenwerking. Resultaten van een klaslokaal implementatie geven aan dat docenten de analytics nuttig vonden en dat de onderliggende classificatoren met matige tot substantiële overeenstemming presteren met mensen.', 'de': 'Das Unterrichten von kollaborativer Argumentation ist eine fortgeschrittene Fähigkeit, die viele K-12 Lehrer schwer zu entwickeln haben. Um dies anzugehen, haben wir Discussion Tracker entwickelt, ein Klassenzimmer-Diskussionsanalysesystem, das auf neuartigen Algorithmen zur Klassifizierung von Argumentbewegungen, Spezifität und Kollaboration basiert. Die Ergebnisse einer Bereitstellung im Klassenzimmer zeigen, dass Lehrer die Analysen für nützlich hielten und dass die zugrunde liegenden Klassifikatoren mit moderater bis substanzieller Übereinstimmung mit Menschen arbeiten.', 'ko': '협동적 토론을 가르치는 것은 많은 K-12 교사들이 열심히 배양한 고급 기능이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 토론 추적기를 개발했다. 이것은 새로운 알고리즘을 바탕으로 하는 교실 토론 분석 시스템으로 논점 이동, 특정성과 협업을 분류하는 데 사용된다.교실 배치 결과 교사들은 이러한 분석이 매우 유용하고 기본 분류기의 표현과 인류의 일치성이 그 중에서 매우 크다는 것을 발견했다.', 'id': 'Mengajarkan argumen kollaboratif adalah keterampilan maju yang banyak guru K-12 berjuang untuk mengembangkan. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami telah mengembangkan Discussion Tracker, sistem analitik diskusi kelas berdasarkan algoritma baru untuk mengklasifikasi gerakan argumen, spesifik, dan kollaborasi. Hasil dari penerbangan ruang kelas menunjukkan bahwa guru menemukan analitik berguna, dan bahwa klasifikasi dasar melakukan dengan kesepakatan yang sederhana hingga substansial dengan manusia.', 'fa': 'آموزش بحث همکاری یک مهارت پیشرفته است که بسیاری از معلم های K-12 برای توسعه تلاش می کنند. برای حل این کار، ما سیستم تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cی بحث کلاس را توسعه کرده\u200cایم، که بر اساس الگوریتم\u200cهای رمانی برای تحلیل حرکت\u200cها، مشخصت و همکاری\u200cها را کلاس\u200cگذاری می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تغییرات یک کلاس نشان می\u200cدهد که معلم\u200cها تحلیل\u200cشناسی را مفید پیدا کردند و که کلاس\u200cشناسی\u200cهای پایه\u200cای با موافقت متوسط و بزرگی با انسان انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': 'K 12-nji mugallymlaryň öwrenmesiniň öňünden çykyp biljek ukypdyr. Bunu çözmek üçin, Diskusiýa Tracker çisini, sınıf boýunçysy analytik sistemi roman algoritmalarına görnüşdürildik. Sınıftalaryň ýerleşdirilip netijeleri mugallymlaryň analytiklerini ulandygyny we ilat klasifikalaryň adamlary bilen örän ylalaşyk bilen dowam edýändigini görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Kufundisha mjadala wa ushirikiano ni ujuzi mkubwa ambao walimu wengi wa K-12 wanajitahidi kuendeleza. Kupambana na hili, tumeunda Mfumo wa Ujadala, mjadala wa uchambuzi wa darasa uliotengenezwa na mifululimo ya kitaifa kwa ajili ya kutangaza harakati za mazungumzo, hususani na ushirikiano. Matokeo ya kuahirishwa kwa darasani yanaonyesha kuwa walimu waligundua uchambuzi huo una manufaa, na kwamba wataalamu wa msingi wanafanya makubaliano ya kisasa kwa kiasi kikubwa na binadamu.', 'sq': 'Mësimi i argumenteve bashkëpunimore është një aftësi e avancuar që shumë mësues K-12 luftojnë për të zhvilluar. Për të trajtuar këtë, kemi zhvilluar Discussion Tracker, një sistem analitik diskutimi në klasë bazuar në algoritme të reja për klasifikimin e lëvizjeve të argumenteve, specificitetin dhe bashkëpunimin. Rezultatet nga një vendosje në klasë tregojnë se mësuesit e gjetën analitikën të dobishme dhe se klasifikuesit themelorë kryejnë marrëveshje të moderuar deri në thelbësore me njerëzit.', 'af': "Onderleer van samekoperatiewe argumentasie is 'n gevorderde kunstigheid wat baie K-12 onderwysers struikel om te ontwikkel. Om hierdie adres te stel, het ons 'n klaskamer diskusie analitiese stelsel ontwikkel wat op nuwe algoritme gebaseer is om argument bewegings, spesifiekheid en samarbeid te klassifiseer. Resultate van 'n klaskamer uitbreiding aandui dat onderwysers die analytike gebruiklik gevind het, en dat die onderstelde klassifiseerders met moderate na substantiele ooreenkoms met mense uitvoer.", 'am': 'የጥያቄ ግንኙነት ማስተማር ብዙዎች የK-12 አስተማሪዎች ለመደጋገፍ የሚጋልሙት ባለውቀት ነው፡፡ To address this, we have developed Discussion Tracker, a classroom discussion analytics system based on novel algorithms for classifying argument moves, specificity, and collaboration.  ከክፍለ ክፍል ውጤቶች መምህርት የሚያስተማሪዎቹ የሚያስጠቃቸው እንዲሆኑ እና ውስጥኞቹም ከሰው ጋር በመካከለኛ ለመስማት ማግኘት እንዲያስታውቃሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Կամագործական բանավեճերի ուսուցանումը առաջատար հմտություն է, որի համար շատ K-12 ուսուցիչներ պայքարում են զարգացնել: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք զարգացրեցինք Դիսկսիայի հետևողը, դասարանի քննարկումների վերլուծության համակարգը, որը հիմնված է նոր ալգորիթմների վրա, որպեսզի դասարանի տարածման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ուսուցիչները կարծում էին, որ վերլուծությունը օգտակար է, և որ հիմնական դասակարգումները կատարում են մարդկանց հետ կապված միջին կամ նշանակալի համաձայնություն:', 'bn': 'সহযোগিতা যুক্তি শিক্ষা দেয়া হচ্ছে উন্নত দক্ষতা যে অনেক কে-১২ শিক্ষক উন্নয়নের জন্য সংগ্রাম করছে। এই বিষয়টি ঠিকানা করার জন্য আমরা আলোচনা ট্র্যাকার উন্নয়ন করেছি, একটি ক্লাসেরুম আলোচনা বিশ্লেষণ সিস্টেম, যা নোডেল অ্যালগোরিদমের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে  ক্লাসের শ্রেণীর অবরোধের ফলাফল নির্দেশ করেছে যে শিক্ষকদের বিশ্লেষণের ব্যবস্থা পেয়েছে এবং মানুষের সাথে মানুষের সাথে মানুষের সাথ', 'bs': 'Naučenje saradnje argumentacije je napredna vještina koju se mnogi nastavnici K-12 bore za razvoj. Da bi se ovo riješili, razvili smo praćenik diskusije, analitički sistem razreda učionika baziran na novom algoritmu za klasifikaciju pokreta argument a, specifičnosti i saradnje. Rezultati iz razvoja učionice ukazuju na to da su učitelji pronašli korisnu analitiku i da se temeljni klasifikatori izvršavaju s umjerenim do značajnim sporazumom sa ljudima.', 'ca': "Ensenyar argumentacions col·laboratives és una habilitat avançada que molts professors de K-12 lluiten per desenvolupar. To address this, we have developed Discussion Tracker, a classroom discussion analytics system based on novel algorithms for classifying argument moves, specificity, and collaboration.  Els resultats d'una sala de classe indican que els professors van trobar l'anàlisi útil, i que els classificadors subjacents actuen d'acord moderat a substancial amb els humans.", 'az': 'İşbirlikçi tartışmaları öyrənmək, K-12 müəllimlərin keçirmək üçün cürbəcür olan avans bir yetenekdir. Bunu çəkmək üçün diskusiya Tracker, dəstə diskusiyası analitik sistemi, argumentin hərəkətlərini, məqsədili və işbirliğini təsdiqləmək üçün yeni algoritmlərə dayanan bir dəstə analitik sistemini təhsil etdik. Sınıf tərəfindən istifadə edilən müəllimlərin analitik faydalı olduğunu göstərir və a şağıdaki klasifikatçıların insanla çox böyük anlaşma ilə müəyyən etdiklərini göstərir.', 'cs': 'Výuka spolupráce argumentace je pokročilá dovednost, kterou mnoho učitelů K-12 bojuje rozvíjet. Abychom to řešili, vyvinuli jsme Diskusní Tracker, systém analýzy diskusí ve třídě založený na nových algoritmech pro klasifikaci argumentních pohybů, specificity a spolupráce. Výsledky nasazení ve třídě ukazují, že učitelé shledali analytiku užitečnou a že základní klasifikátory fungují se střední až podstatnou shodou s lidmi.', 'et': 'Koostöö argumenteerimise õpetamine on arenenud oskus, mida paljud K-12 õpetajad vaevavad arendada. Selle lahendamiseks oleme välja töötanud Discussion Tracker, klassiruumi aruteluanalüüsisüsteemi, mis põhineb uudsetel algoritmidel argumentide liigutuste, spetsiifilisuse ja koostöö klassifitseerimiseks. Klassiruumis kasutuselevõtu tulemused näitavad, et õpetajad leidsid analüüsi kasulikuks ja et aluseks olevad klassifitseerijad toimivad inimestega mõõdukalt kuni oluliselt kokkuleppel.', 'fi': 'Yhteistyöargumentoinnin opettaminen on kehittynyt taito, jota monet K-12-opettajat kamppailevat kehittääkseen. Tämän ratkaisemiseksi olemme kehittäneet Discussion Trackerin, luokkahuoneen keskusteluanalytiikkajärjestelmän, joka perustuu uusiin algoritmeihin argumenttiliikkeiden, spesifisyyden ja yhteistyön luokitteluun. Luokan käyttöönoton tulokset osoittavat, että opettajat pitivät analytiikkaa hyödyllisenä ja että taustalla olevat luokittelijat toimivat kohtalaisella tai merkittävällä tavalla ihmisten kanssa.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé éntuk karo hal-hal kesalahan sing luwih bantuan ngono sak umur K-12 kudu ngguhku kuwi mau. Ngawe nambah iki, kita wis dituluwih Diskusion tracer, sistem panjenengan diluangkamu sistem dadi kajamahan karo segala Algorithm kanggo kelas mruangkamu diluangkamu diluangkamu, ingkang, lan tambahan. Pametuné sak depurasi kelas sing ngomong nik alih akeh guru kelas nang pancen dumadhi pancen dumadhi iki, lan kelas nang kelas telas telas nang cukup kelas', 'he': 'ללמד ויכוח משותף הוא כישור מתקדם שרבים מורים K-12 נאבקים לפתח. כדי להתמודד עם זה, פיתחנו מעקב דיון, מערכת אנליטיקת דיון בכיתה המבוססת על אלגוריתמים חדשים להקליס תנועות טיעונים, ספציפיות, ושיתוף פעולה. Results from a classroom deployment indicate that teachers found the analytics useful, and that the underlying classifiers perform with moderate to substantial agreement with humans.', 'ha': "Akwai sanar da shawarar samaki, shi ne mafaniki mai gabatar da kunnuwa masu yawa na K-12 sunã ƙari zuwa mafarin kwamfyuta. To, za mu bayyana bayani ga wannan, mun developer Mai Cikakken Haka, wata na'urar wa muhalli na danganta na fasalka, a kan salon da algoritori na yanzu don a rarraba sauyen argument, masu hushi da kuma shirin haɗi. Mataimakin da aka saka fasafa yana bayana cẽwa macallin sun sãmu mai amfani da Ana yi amfani da shi, kuma a kan fasalarar masu ƙaranci, suna aiki da tsakanin zuwa wata yarda mai girma na mutane.", 'sk': 'Poučevanje sodelovalne argumentacije je napredna spretnost, ki jo mnogi učitelji K-12 težko razvijajo. Za reševanje tega smo razvili sistem za analizo razprav v učilnici, ki temelji na novih algoritmih za razvrščanje premikov argumentov, specifičnosti in sodelovanja. Rezultati uvajanja razreda kažejo, da so učitelji menili, da je analitika koristna in da osnovni klasifikatorji delujejo z zmernim do precejšnjim soglasjem z ljudmi.', 'bo': 'མཉམ་ལས་ཀྱི་སྒྲུབ་རྩོམ་མཁན་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་རྩོམ་པ་ནི་K-12ཡིས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་མཁན་ཚོའི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་། To address this, we have developed Discussion Tracker, a classroom discussion analytics system based on novel algorithms for classifying argument moves, specificity, and collaboration. གྲྭན་ཁང་ཞིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཁང་ནས་གཙོ་རིམ་པ་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་པ་ནི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྒྱུ་བྱུང་།'}
{'en': 'An Online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus', 'ar': '- قاموس المرادفات العربية على الإنترنت', 'es': 'Un diccionario de sinónimos de árabe con niveles de legibilidad en línea', 'fr': 'Un thésaurus arabe de niveau de lisibilité en ligne', 'pt': 'Um dicionário de sinônimos em árabe com nível de legibilidade on-line', 'ja': 'オンライン可読性レベルのアラビア語シソーラス', 'zh': '在线可读性分级阿拉伯语词典', 'hi': 'एक ऑनलाइन पठनीयता समतल अरबी थिसॉरस', 'ru': 'Выровненный по уровню арабский тезаурус для чтения в Интернете', 'ga': 'Teasáras Araibis Leibhéalta Inléiteacht Ar Líne', 'hu': 'Online olvashatósági szintű arab szótár', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένας αραβικός θεσaurus σε επίπεδο αναγνωσιμότητας στο διαδίκτυο', 'kk': 'Онлайн оқу мүмкіндігі араб тесаурыName', 'it': 'Un thesaurus arabo a livello di leggibilità online', 'lt': 'An Online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Teżoru Għarab Livellat ta’ Readability Online', 'ml': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Онлайн унших чадварын түвшинд Араб тесаур', 'pl': 'Tezaur arabski na poziomie czytelności online', 'ro': 'Un tezaur arab cu nivel de citire online', 'sr': 'Online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus', 'so': 'Sawirar afka Carabiga ah ee internetka ah', 'sv': 'En arabisk synonym med läsbarhet på nätet', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một thao tác vững chắc trên mạng', 'bg': 'Арабски речник с нива на четене онлайн', 'da': 'En online læsbarhedsniveau arabisk tesaurus', 'nl': 'Een online leesbaarheidsniveau Arabische thesaurus', 'hr': 'Online Readability Leveled Arabic ThesaurusName', 'de': 'Ein online lesbarer arabischer Thesaurus', 'id': 'Sebuah Thesaurus Arab Bertahap Pembacaan Online', 'ko': '온라인 가독성 등급별 아랍어 동의어표', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Oturylyk Arapça Thesaurusy', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Utazamo wa Kiarabu wa Uwezekanaji wa Mtandaoni', 'am': 'አረቢኛ', 'sq': 'Një thesaur arab i nivelit të lexueshmërisë në internet', 'hy': 'Օնլայն կարդալիության մակարդակ արաբական թեզավրուսը', 'az': 'ƒ∞nternett…ô oxuyabil…ôn …ôr…ôbc…ô tezorusu', 'bs': 'Online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Un tesaure àrab amb nivell de llegibilitat en línia', 'cs': 'Arabský tezaur na úrovni online čitelnosti', 'et': 'Online loetavustasemega araabia tesaurus', 'fi': 'Online luettavuuden tason arabiankielinen sanakirja', 'jv': 'online Readable', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Arabski slovar na ravni spletne berljivosti', 'he': 'תיזאורוס ערבי ברמה של היכולת לקרוא באינטרנט', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་ཀློག་འཇུག་སྟངས་ཀྱང་ཨར་བིའི་སྨྲ་བརྗོད་པ།'}
{'en': 'This demo paper introduces the online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus interface. For a given user input word, this interface provides the word’s possible lemmas, roots, English glosses, related Arabic words and phrases, and readability on a five-level readability scale. This interface builds on and connects multiple existing Arabic resources and processing tools. This one-of-a-kind system enables Arabic speakers and learners to benefit from advances in Arabic computational linguistics technologies. Feedback from users of the system will help the developers to identify lexical coverage gaps and errors. A live link to the demo is available at : http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة التوضيحية واجهة قاموس المرادفات العربية على الإنترنت. بالنسبة لكلمة إدخال مستخدم معينة ، توفر هذه الواجهة الكلمات والجذور واللمسات الإنجليزية والعبارات والكلمات العربية ذات الصلة وإمكانية القراءة على مقياس قراءة من خمسة مستويات. تعتمد هذه الواجهة على العديد من الموارد العربية وأدوات المعالجة الحالية وتربطها. يمكّن هذا النظام الفريد المتحدثين باللغة العربية والمتعلمين من الاستفادة من التطورات في تقنيات اللغويات الحاسوبية العربية. ستساعد التعليقات الواردة من مستخدمي النظام المطورين على تحديد فجوات وأخطاء التغطية المعجمية. رابط مباشر للعرض التوضيحي متاح على: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'es': 'Este documento de demostración presenta la interfaz en línea del tesauro árabe con niveles de legibilidad. Para una palabra introducida por el usuario, esta interfaz proporciona los posibles lemas, raíces, glosas en inglés, palabras y frases en árabe relacionadas y legibilidad de la palabra en una escala de legibilidad de cinco niveles. Esta interfaz se basa en varios recursos y herramientas de procesamiento árabes existentes y los conecta. Este sistema único en su tipo permite a los hablantes y estudiantes de árabe beneficiarse de los avances en las tecnologías lingüísticas computacionales árabes. Los comentarios de los usuarios del sistema ayudarán a los desarrolladores a identificar brechas y errores en la cobertura léxica. Hay un enlace en directo a la demostración disponible en: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'fr': "Ce document de démonstration présente l'interface en ligne du thésaurus arabe à niveaux de lisibilité. Pour un mot d'entrée utilisateur donné, cette interface fournit les lemmes, les racines, les gloses anglaises, les mots et phrases arabes associés, ainsi que la lisibilité sur une échelle de lisibilité à cinq niveaux. Cette interface s'appuie sur plusieurs ressources et outils de traitement arabes existants et les connecte. Ce système unique en son genre permet aux locuteurs et aux apprenants arabes de bénéficier des avancées des technologies de linguistique informatique arabe. Les commentaires des utilisateurs du système aideront les développeurs à identifier les lacunes et les erreurs de couverture lexicale. Un lien direct vers la démo est disponible à l'adresse suivante\xa0: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'pt': 'Este documento de demonstração apresenta a interface de dicionário de sinônimos árabe com nível de legibilidade on-line. Para uma determinada palavra de entrada do usuário, essa interface fornece os possíveis lemas, raízes, glosas em inglês da palavra, palavras e frases em árabe relacionadas e legibilidade em uma escala de legibilidade de cinco níveis. Essa interface se baseia e conecta vários recursos e ferramentas de processamento em árabe existentes. Este sistema único permite que falantes e alunos de árabe se beneficiem dos avanços nas tecnologias de linguística computacional árabe. O feedback dos usuários do sistema ajudará os desenvolvedores a identificar falhas e erros na cobertura lexical. Um link ao vivo para a demonstração está disponível em: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ja': 'このデモペーパーでは、オンラインのReadability Leveled Arabic Thesaurusインターフェイスを紹介します。特定のユーザー入力ワードに対して、このインターフェースは、ワードの可能性のあるレマンス、ルーツ、英語のグロス、関連するアラビア語の単語とフレーズ、および5段階の可読性スケールでの可読性を提供します。このインターフェースは、複数の既存のアラビア語リソースと処理ツールを構築し、接続します。このユニークなシステムにより、アラビア語話者と学習者は、アラビア語の計算言語学技術の進歩の恩恵を受けることができます。システムのユーザーからのフィードバックは、開発者が語彙カバレッジのギャップとエラーを特定するのに役立ちます。デモへのライブリンクは、http://samer.camel-lab.com/から入手できます。', 'zh': '本演文在线可读性分级阿拉伯语同义词库界面。 给定之用户输单词,此界面供单词或引理、词根、英语修饰语、相关阿拉伯语单词短语,及五级可读性之可读性。 界面立于数见阿拉伯语资源治具之基,而连属焉。 此独一之统使阿拉伯语使用者与学者得从阿拉伯语计语言学术之进退也。 统用户者反馈将有助于开发人员识词汇盖差谬也。 其实时链接下位得 http://samer.camel-lab.com/。', 'hi': 'इस डेमो पेपर ऑनलाइन पठनीयता समतल अरबी थिसॉरस इंटरफ़ेस का परिचय देता है। किसी दिए गए उपयोगकर्ता इनपुट शब्द के लिए, यह इंटरफ़ेस शब्द के संभावित लेमा, जड़ों, अंग्रेजी ग्लॉस, संबंधित अरबी शब्दों और वाक्यांशों, और पांच-स्तरीय पठनीयता पैमाने पर पठनीयता प्रदान करता है। यह इंटरफ़ेस एकाधिक मौजूदा अरबी संसाधनों और प्रसंस्करण उपकरणों को बनाता है और जोड़ता है. यह एक तरह की प्रणाली अरबी बोलने वालों और शिक्षार्थियों को अरबी कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान प्रौद्योगिकियों में प्रगति से लाभ उठाने में सक्षम बनाती है। सिस्टम के उपयोगकर्ताओं से प्रतिक्रिया डेवलपर्स को लेक्सिकल कवरेज अंतराल और त्रुटियों की पहचान करने में मदद करेगी। डेमो के लिए एक लाइव लिंक पर उपलब्ध है: http://samer.camel-lab.com/।', 'ru': 'Этот демонстрационный документ знакомит с онлайн-интерфейсом тезауруса для чтения на арабском языке. Для данного пользовательского входного слова этот интерфейс предоставляет возможные леммы слова, корни, английские глоссы, соответствующие арабские слова и фразы и читаемость по пятиуровневой шкале читаемости. Этот интерфейс опирается на многочисленные существующие арабские ресурсы и средства обработки данных и объединяет их. Эта единственная в своем роде система позволяет носителям арабского языка и учащимся извлекать пользу из достижений в области технологий арабской вычислительной лингвистики. Отзывы пользователей системы помогут разработчикам выявить лексические пробелы и ошибки в охвате. Прямая ссылка на демо доступна по адресу: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar taispeána seo comhéadan Teasáras Araibis Leibhéalta Inléiteachta ar líne isteach. Maidir le focal ionchuir úsáideora ar leith, soláthraíonn an comhéadan seo leamaí féideartha, fréamhacha, gluaiseanna Béarla, focail agus frásaí Araibis gaolmhara, agus inléiteacht an fhocail ar scála inléiteachta cúig leibhéal. Tógann an comhéadan seo ar acmhainní iolracha agus uirlisí próiseála Araibis atá ann cheana féin agus nascann sé iad. Cuireann an córas aon-de-a-chineál seo ar chumas cainteoirí agus foghlaimeoirí Araibis leas a bhaint as dul chun cinn i dteicneolaíochtaí ríomhaireachtúla na hAraibise. Cabhróidh aiseolas ó úsáideoirí an chórais leis na forbróirí bearnaí agus earráidí clúdach foclóireachta a aithint. Tá nasc beo chuig an taispeántas ar fáil ag: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'el': 'Αυτή η δοκιμαστική εργασία εισάγει τη διεπαφή Αραβικού Θησαυρού σε επίπεδο αναγνωσιμότητας. Για μια δεδομένη λέξη εισαγωγής χρήστη, αυτή η διεπαφή παρέχει τα πιθανά λεμώματα της λέξης, τις ρίζες, τα αγγλικά γλωσσάρια, τις σχετικές αραβικές λέξεις και φράσεις, και την αναγνωσιμότητα σε μια κλίμακα αναγνωσιμότητας πέντε επιπέδων. Αυτή η διεπαφή βασίζεται και συνδέει πολλούς υπάρχοντες αραβικούς πόρους και εργαλεία επεξεργασίας. Αυτό το μοναδικό σύστημα επιτρέπει στους ομιλητές αραβικών και στους μαθητές να επωφεληθούν από τις εξελίξεις στις τεχνολογίες της αραβικής υπολογιστικής γλωσσολογίας. Η ανατροφοδότηση από τους χρήστες του συστήματος θα βοηθήσει τους προγραμματιστές να εντοπίσουν κενά και σφάλματα λεξικής κάλυψης. Ένας ζωντανός σύνδεσμος για την επίδειξη είναι διαθέσιμος στη διεύθυνση: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'hu': 'Ez a demó tanulmány bemutatja az online olvashatósági szintű arab szótár interfészt. Egy adott felhasználói beviteli szó esetében ez a felület biztosítja a szó lehetséges lemmáit, gyökereket, angol fényeket, kapcsolódó arab szavakat és kifejezéseket, valamint olvashatóságot öt szintű olvashatósági skálán. Ez a felület több meglévő arab erőforrásra és feldolgozó eszközre épül és összekapcsolja. Ez az egyedülálló rendszer lehetővé teszi az arab beszélők és a tanulók számára, hogy profitáljanak az arab számítástechnikai technológiák fejlődéséből. A rendszer felhasználóinak visszajelzései segítenek a fejlesztőknek abban, hogy azonosítsák a lexikai lefedettségi hiányosságokat és hibákat. A demó élő linkje a következő címen érhető el: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ka': 'Name მომხმარებელი შეტყობინებული სიტყვის, ეს ინტერფექტის შესაძლებელი ლემები, ფორმები, ანგლისური სიტყვის, შესახებ აპაბიური სიტყვის და ფრამები, და ხუთი დონეში კითხვა შესა Name ეს ერთი ტიპის სისტემა აპაბური სიტყვები და სწავლებელი შესაძლებელია აპაბური კომპუტაციალური ენგონისტიკური ტექნოლოგიების წინასწორებიდან გამოიყენება. Name Name http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'kk': 'Бұл демократия қағазы онлайн оқу мүмкіндігін араб тесаурус интерфейсінің деңгейінде көрсетеді. Келтірілген пайдаланушының келтірілген сөз үшін, бұл интерфейс сөздің лиммасы, түбір, ағылшын сөздері, араб сөздері мен сөздері және бес деңгейіндегі оқуға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл интерфейс бірнеше араб ресурстарын және өңдеу құралдарын қосу және қосылу. Бұл бір түрлі жүйе араб сөйлейушілері мен оқытушылары араб компьютерлік лингвистикалық технологиялардың жағдайдан ашықтарын мүмкіндік береді. Жүйелік пайдаланушылардан қайталану жасаушыларға лексикалық мәліметтің қатесін анықтау үшін көмектеседі. Демократияның өмір сілтемесі бар: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'it': "Questo documento demo introduce l'interfaccia online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus. Per una data parola di input utente, questa interfaccia fornisce i possibili lemmi, radici, glosse inglesi, parole e frasi arabe correlate e leggibilità su una scala di leggibilità a cinque livelli. Questa interfaccia si basa su e collega più risorse arabe esistenti e strumenti di elaborazione. Questo sistema unico nel suo genere consente a parlanti e studenti arabi di beneficiare dei progressi nelle tecnologie linguistiche computazionali arabe. Il feedback degli utenti del sistema aiuterà gli sviluppatori a identificare lacune ed errori di copertura lessicale. Un link dal vivo alla demo è disponibile all'indirizzo: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'ms': 'Kertas demo ini memperkenalkan antaramuka Thesaurus Arab Bertahap Readability dalam talian. Untuk perkataan input pengguna yang diberi, antaramuka ini menyediakan lemma yang mungkin perkataan, akar, cahaya Inggeris, perkataan dan frasa Arab berkaitan, dan pembacaan pada skala pembacaan lima aras. Antaramuka ini membina dan menyambung sumber Arab yang ada berbilang dan alat pemprosesan. Sistem satu-jenis ini membolehkan pembicara Arab dan pelajar untuk mengambil keuntungan dari kemajuan dalam teknologi bahasa komputasi Arab. Comment Pautan langsung ke demo tersedia di: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'lt': 'Šiame demonstraciniame dokumente pateikiama internetinė skaitomumo lygio arabų tezauro sąsaja. Tam tikram naudotojo įėjimo žodžiui ši s ąsaja suteikia galimas žodžio lemmas, šaknis, anglų šviesos, susijusius arabiškus žodžius ir frazes ir skaitomumą penkių lygių skaitomumo skalėje. Ši sąsaja grindžiama įvairiais esamais arabų ištekliais ir perdirbimo priemonėmis ir sujungia juos. Ši vienos rūšies sistema leidžia arabų kalbėtojams ir mokiniams pasinaudoti arabų skaičiavimo kalbų technologijų pažanga. Feedback from users of the system will help the developers to identify lexical coverage gaps and errors.  Tiesioginė nuoroda į demonstraciją pateikiama adresu: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'mk': 'Оваа демонстрација го претставува онлајн интерфејсот на арапски тезаурус со ниво на читливост. За даден збор за внесување на корисникот, овој интерфејс ги обезбедува можните лимаси, корени, англиски светла, поврзани арапски зборови и фрази на зборот, и читливост на скала на читливост на пет нивоа. Овој интерфејс се гради и поврзува со повеќе постоечки арапски ресурси и алатки за обработување. Овој едновиден систем им овозможува на арапските говорници и учениците да користат од напредокот во арапските компјутативни лингвистички технологии. Одговорот од корисниците на системот ќе им помогне на развивачите да ги идентификуваат празнините и грешките на лексичното покривање. Жива врска со демонстрацијата е достапна на: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'no': 'Denne demopapiret introduserer internett lesabilitet breidde arabisk temarusgrensesnitt. Dette grensesnittet gjev det moglege limma, rot, engelsk glosser, relaterte arabiske ord og frasar og lesabilitet på ein femnivå lesabilitet. Denne grensesnittet bygger på og koplar til fleire eksisterande arabiske ressursar og handsamingsverktøy. Denne systemet kan bruka arabiske talerar og lærarar til å bruka avansert i arabiske computational linguistic technologies. Tilbakemelding frå brukarar av systemet vil hjelpa utviklarane til å identifisera mellomrom og feil på leksisk dekkefølgje. Name http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജനാധിപത്രം ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d റിക്കാബിളിറ്റി ലെവെഡ് അറബി തീസൌറസ് ഇന്റര്\u200dമെന്\u200dറ് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. കൊടുത്ത ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക്, വേരുകള്\u200d, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഗ്ലോസ്, ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട അറബി വാക്കുകളും വാക്കുകളും അഞ്ച് നിലയില്\u200d വ ഈ ഇന്റര്\u200dമെസ്സ് പണിയുകയും നിലവിലുള്ള അറബി വിഭവങ്ങളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങളും ബന്ധിക്ക അറബി സംസാരികളും പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കും അറബിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. Feedback from users of the system will help the developers to identify lexical coverage gaps and errors.  ഡീമോയുടെ നേരിട്ടുള്ള ലിങ്ക് ലഭ്യമല്ല: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'mn': 'Энэ демократийн цаас онлайн унших чадварыг Араб тесаурусын интерфейсийг танилцуулдаг. Хэрэглэгчдийн орлуулсан үг дээр энэ интерфейс нь магадгүй лимм, язгуур, англи хэлний гүлдээг, харилцааны араб үг, өгүүлбэр, таван түвшинд унших боломжтой байдаг. Энэ интерфейс нь олон Араб эх үүсвэрүүдийг ашиглаж, боловсруулах хэрэгсэл холбогддог. Энэ нэг төрлийн систем Араб хэлний хэлний технологиудаас хөгжлийг ашиглах боломжтой болгодог. Системийн хэрэглэгчдийн хариу нь хөгжимчдийн хөгжүүлэгчдэд лексикийн мэдээллийн ялгааг, алдаа гаргахын тулд туслах болно. Демократийн амьдралын холбоотой холбоотой: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy dokument demonstracyjny przedstawia interfejs tezaura arabskiego na poziomie czytelności online. Dla danego słowa wejściowego użytkownika interfejs ten zapewnia możliwe lemmy, korzenie, angielskie błyszczyki, powiązane słowa arabskie i zwroty oraz czytelność na pięciopoziomowej skali czytelności. Interfejs ten opiera się na wielu istniejących zasobach arabskich i narzędziach przetwarzania. Ten jedyny w swoim rodzaju system pozwala mówiącym i uczącym się języka arabskiego korzystać z postępów w arabskich technologiach językoznawstwa obliczeniowego. Informacje zwrotne od użytkowników systemu pomogą deweloperom zidentyfikować luki i błędy w zasięgu leksykalnym. Link na żywo do demo jest dostępny na stronie: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'si': 'Name දෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ඇතුළුම් වචනයක් වෙනුවෙන්, මේ අන්තර්ජාව පුළුවන් ලිම්මා, මූල, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ග්\u200dලොස්, සම්බන්ධ අරා Name මේ එක වර්ගයක් වගේ පද්ධතිය අරාබික් සිපිකරුවන් සහ ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් අරාබික් පණිවිද්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවික ත @ info: status Name http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'so': 'Warqadan demo wuxuu ku soo bandhigaa Interfacka Internetka ee Readeynta Carabiga ee la sawiray. Hadalka wargelinta ee isticmaalaha la siiyay, Interfackaas wuxuu ka helaa macluumaad suurtagal ah, xidida, gloss ingiriisiga, hadal af Carabi ah iyo hadal la xiriira, waxyaabaha la akhrisana heerka shan heer. Interfackaas wuxuu dhisaa oo ku xiriiraa rasilimo badan oo Carabi ah iyo qalabka baaraandegista. Tiradan mid ka mid ah ayaa dadka afka Carabida ku hadla iyo kuwa barta waxey faa’iido ka heli karaan horumarinta teknolojiyada luuqadaha xisaabta ah. Feedback from isticmaalayaasha nidaamka ayaa caawinaya kuwa horumarinta si ay u aqoonsadaan gafafka qarsoodiga lexicka iyo qaladyada. Xiriir toos ah ee demo waxaad ka heleysaa: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare demo prezintă interfața online de Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus. Pentru un anumit cuvânt introdus de utilizator, această interfață oferă posibilele lemme, rădăcini, glose în limba engleză, cuvinte și fraze arabe asociate și lizibilitate pe o scară de citire pe cinci niveluri. Această interfață se bazează pe și conectează mai multe resurse arabe existente și instrumente de procesare. Acest sistem unic permite vorbitorilor de arabă și cursanților să beneficieze de progresele în tehnologiile lingvistice computaționale arabe. Feedback-ul utilizatorilor sistemului va ajuta dezvoltatorii să identifice lacunele și erorile de acoperire lexicală. Un link live către demo este disponibil la: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'sr': 'Ovaj demo papir predstavlja internetsku preglednicu na razini arapskog teosauruskog interfejsa. Za određenu reč za ulazak korisnika, ovaj interfejs pruža moguće limme, korijene, engleske glose, povezane arapske riječi i fraze, i čitljivost na pet nivoa skale čitljivosti. Ova interfejsa se uključuje i povezuje više postojećih arapskih resursa i alata za obradu. Ovaj jedan sistem omogućava arapskim govornicima i učenicima da koriste napredak na arapskim kompjuterskim jezičkim tehnologijama. Vraćanje od korisnika sistema će pomoći razvojnicima da identifikuju praznine leksičkog pokrivanja i greške. Živna veza sa demo je dostupna na: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'sv': 'Denna demo-uppsats introducerar online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus gränssnitt. För ett givet användarinmatningsord ger detta gränssnitt ordets möjliga lemma, rötter, engelska gloss, relaterade arabiska ord och fraser, och läsbarhet på en läsbarhetsskala på fem nivåer. Det här gränssnittet bygger på och ansluter flera befintliga arabiska resurser och bearbetningsverktyg. Detta unika system gör det möjligt för arabisktalande och elever att dra nytta av framsteg inom arabisk datorlingvistik teknik. Feedback från användare av systemet kommer att hjälpa utvecklarna att identifiera lexikala täckningsluckor och fel. En live länk till demo finns tillgänglig på: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ta': 'இந்த குறிப்பு தாள் ஆன்லைன் சாத்தியமுள்ள மட்டும் அரபி தொடர் இடைமுகப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பயனர் உள்ளீட்டு வார்த்தைக்கு, இந்த இடைமுகம் வார்த்தையின் சாத்தியமான லிம்மாஸ், வேர்கள், ஆங்கிலத்தின் கிளாஸ், தொடர்பு அரே இந்த இடைமுகத்தில் உள்ள பல இருக்கும் அரபி வளங்களை மற்றும் செயல்படுத்தும் கருவிகளை இணைக்கிறது. இந்த ஒரு வகையான அமைப்பு அரபி பேச்சாளர்கள் மற்றும் கற்றுக்கொள்பவர்கள் முன்னேற்றத்திலிருந்து உபயோகிக்க முடியும். Feedback from users of the system will help the developers to identify lexical coverage gaps and errors.  டெமாவுக்கு ஒரு நேரடி இணைப்பு கிடைக்கும்: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument ta’ demo jintroduċi l-interfaċċja tat-Tesauru Għarbi Livell ta’ Readability onlajn. Għal kelma ta’ input tal-utent partikolari, din l-interfaċċja tipprovdi l-limmi possibbli tal-kelma, l-għeruq, il-gloss Ingliż, il-kliem u l-frażijiet arabi relatati, u l-leġibbiltà fuq skala ta’ leġibbiltà ta’ ħames livelli. Dan l-interface jibni fuq u jgħaqqad diversi riżorsi Għarab eżistenti u għodod ta’ pproċessar. Din is-sistema waħda tat-tip tippermetti lill-kelliema Għarab u lill-istudenti jibbenefikaw minn avvanzi fit-teknoloġiji tal-lingwistika komputattiva Għaraba. Ir-rispons mill-utenti tas-sistema se jgħin lill-iżviluppaturi jidentifikaw nuqqasijiet u żbalji fil-kopertura lexika. Link dirett għad-demostrazzjoni huwa disponibbli fuq: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ur': 'یہ دیمو کاغذ آنلاین ریڈیبلیٹ لیٹ سطح عربی تساروس انٹرنفس کو پیش آتا ہے۔ ایک استعمال ورود کے لئے یہ انٹرنیفس لکھ سکتا ہے کہ لکھ، ریٹ، انگلیسی گلوس، ارتباط کے عربی کلمات اور کلمات، اور پانچ سطح پڑھنے کے قابل استعمال پر پڑھنے کی طاقت رکھتا ہے. یہ انٹرنیفس بہت سے موجود عربی سروسیلوں اور پرسس کے ابزار پر بناتا ہے اور اس سے اتصال کرتا ہے. یہ ایک قسم کی سیستم عربی زبان بیان کرنے والوں اور علم کرنے والوں کو عربی کامپیوتریسی زبان تکنولوژی تکنولوژی میں فائدہ دے سکتی ہے سیسٹم کے کارساز سے فیڈ پک ڈولوپٹوں کی مدد کرے گا کہ لکسیکل کاوپٹر کی فاصلہ اور خطائیں پہچان سکیں۔ دیمو کے لئے ایک زندہ لینک موجود ہے: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'uz': "Ushbu demo gazeti tarmoqni olib tashlab Arab darajasi interfeys beradi. Koʻrsatilgan foydalanuvchi soʻz uchun, bu interfeys so'zning imkoniyatli lemmas, root, ingliz tili glossalari, bogʻlanadigan arab so'zlar va bir so'zlar va 5 daraja oʻqib boʻladigan darajada o'qish imkoniyatini beradi. Name Bu bir turdagi tizim arab tillar va o'rganishlarni arab tildagi kompyuterlik teknologiya taʼminlovchidan foydalanadi. Name Name http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'vi': "Tờ tuyên bố này giới thiệu giao diện đo bào thai trên mạng. Đối với một từ nhập người dùng cụ thể, giao diện này cung cấp các lemmut, rễ cây, the Anh's glosses, related Arab words and cụm từ, và readable in a five-level. Giao diện này xây dựng và kết nối nhiều nguồn gốc Á Rập và công cụ xử lý. Hệ thống độc nhất cho phép người nói tiếng Ả Rập và học viên được hưởng lợi từ những tiến bộ trong công nghệ ngôn ngữ học tổng tính Ả Rập. Phản hồi từ người dùng của hệ thống sẽ giúp đỡ các nhà phát triển xác định khe hở che đậy và lỗi. Có một liên kết trực tiếp với mẫu thử ở: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'bg': 'Тази демо статия представя онлайн интерфейса на арабски речник с нива на четливост. За дадена потребителска въведена дума, този интерфейс предоставя възможните леми на думата, корени, английски гланцове, сродни арабски думи и фрази и четливост на пет нива скала за четливост. Този интерфейс се основава и свързва множество съществуващи арабски ресурси и инструменти за обработка. Тази единствена по рода си система позволява на арабските говорители и обучаеми да се възползват от напредъка в арабските компютърни лингвистични технологии. Обратната връзка от потребителите на системата ще помогне на разработчиците да идентифицират пропуски и грешки в лексикалното покритие. Връзка на живо към демото е достъпна на: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'da': 'Dette demo papir introducerer online Readability Leveled Arabic Thesaurus interface. For et givet brugerinput ord giver denne grænseflade ordets mulige lemmer, rødder, engelske glosser, relaterede arabiske ord og sætninger, og læsbarhed på en læsbarhedsskala på fem niveauer. Denne grænseflade bygger på og forbinder flere eksisterende arabiske ressourcer og behandlingsværktøjer. Dette unikke system gør det muligt for arabisktalende og elever at drage fordel af fremskridt inden for arabisk beregningslingvistik teknologier. Feedback fra brugere af systemet vil hjælpe udviklerne med at identificere leksikalske dækningshuller og fejl. Et live link til demoen er tilgængeligt på: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'nl': "Deze demo paper introduceert de online leesbaarheid leveled Arabische thesaurus interface. Voor een gegeven invoerwoord van de gebruiker biedt deze interface de mogelijke lemma's, wortels, Engelse glossen, verwante Arabische woorden en zinnen van het woord, en leesbaarheid op een schaal van vijf niveaus. Deze interface bouwt voort op en verbindt meerdere bestaande Arabische bronnen en verwerkingstools. Dit unieke systeem stelt Arabischsprekers en studenten in staat om te profiteren van de vooruitgang in Arabische computerlinguïstische technologieën. Feedback van gebruikers van het systeem zal de ontwikkelaars helpen om lexicale dekking gaten en fouten te identificeren. Een live link naar de demo is beschikbaar op: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'hr': 'Ovaj demo papir predstavlja internetski interfejs na razini arapskog teosaurusa. Za dati ulaznu riječ korisnika, ovaj interfejs pruža moguće limme, korijene, engleske glose, povezane arapske riječi i fraze i čitljivost na pet nivoa skale čitljivosti. Ova interfejsa se uključuje i povezuje više postojećih arapskih resursa i alata za obradu. Ovaj jedan od vrsta sustava omogućava arapskim govornicima i učenicima koristiti od napreda na arapskim računalnim jezičkim tehnologijama. Vratit će se od korisnika sustava pomoći razvojnicima da identifikuju praznine leksičkog pokrivanja i greške. Života veza na demo je dostupna na: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'de': 'Dieses Demopapier stellt die online Lesbarkeit Leveled Arabic Thesaurus Schnittstelle vor. Für ein bestimmtes Eingabewort bietet diese Schnittstelle die möglichen Lemmas, Wurzeln, englischen Glosses, verwandten arabischen Wörtern und Phrasen sowie die Lesbarkeit auf einer fünfstufigen Lesbarkeitsskala. Diese Schnittstelle baut auf und verbindet mehrere bestehende arabische Ressourcen und Verarbeitungswerkzeuge. Dieses einzigartige System ermöglicht es Arabischsprechern und Lernenden, von Fortschritten in der arabischen Computerlinguistik zu profitieren. Feedback von Benutzern des Systems hilft den Entwicklern, lexikalische Deckungslücken und Fehler zu identifizieren. Ein Live-Link zur Demo ist verfügbar unter: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'id': 'Kertas demo ini memperkenalkan antaramuka Thesaurus Arab Tingkat Readability online. Untuk kata input pengguna yang diberikan, antaramuka ini menyediakan kemungkinan lemma, akar, cahaya Inggris, kata dan frasa Arab yang berhubungan, dan pembacaan pada skala pembacaan lima tingkat. Antaramuka ini membangun dan menghubungkan berbagai sumber daya Arab dan alat memproses yang ada. Sistem semacam ini memungkinkan para pembicara Arab dan para pelajar untuk mengambil keuntungan dari kemajuan dalam teknologi bahasa komputasi Arab. Balas balas dari pengguna sistem akan membantu para pengembang untuk mengidentifikasi cacat dan kesalahan penyamaran lexik. Link langsung ke demo tersedia di: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ko': '이 연설문은 온라인에서 읽을 수 있는 수준의 아랍어 서사표 인터페이스를 소개했다.주어진 사용자 입력어에 대해 이 인터페이스는 이 단어의 가능한 인용, 어근, 영어 광택, 관련 아랍어 단어와 단어, 그리고 5급 가독성 등급의 가독성을 제공한다.이 인터페이스는 기존의 아랍어 자원과 처리 도구를 기반으로 하고 연결합니다.이런 유일무이한 시스템은 아랍어 사용자와 학습자에게 아랍어 계산 언어학 기술의 진보를 가져다 줄 수 있다.시스템 사용자의 피드백은 개발자가 어휘 범위의 차이와 오류를 식별하는 데 도움을 줄 것이다.데모의 라이브 링크는 다음과 같습니다.http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ دموکراسی رابطه تساوروس عربی را در حال خواندن در آنلاین معرفی می کند. برای یک کلمه ورودی به کاربر داده شده، این ارتباط با کلمه\u200cهای ممکن لیمز، ریشه\u200cها، گلوس\u200cهای انگلیسی، کلمه\u200cهای عربی و کلمه\u200cهای ارتباط، و خواندنی در یک مقیاس خواندنی پنج سطح پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. این interfaceName این سیستم یک نوع به زبان عربی و دانش\u200cآموزان اجازه می\u200cدهد که از پیشرفت در تکنولوژی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی عربی سود دهند. بازگشت از کاربران سیستم به توسعه\u200cکنندگان کمک می\u200cکند تا فاصله\u200cهای پوشش\u200cهای زبانی و اشتباه\u200cها را شناسایی کنند. Name http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'sw': "Gazeti hili la demo linaonyesha aina ya lugha ya Kiarabu yenye uhakika katika mtandao wa intaneti. For a given user input word, this interface provides the word's possible lemmas, roots, English glosses, related Arabic words and phrases, and readability on a five-level readability scale.  Mpango huu unajenga na kuunganisha rasilimali nyingi zilizopo katika Kiarabu na zana za kuchukua hatua. Mfumo huu wa a in a hii unaweza kuwawezesha wazungumzaji wa Kiarabu na wanafunzi kufaidika na maendeleo ya teknolojia ya lugha za Kiarabu. Matukio kutoka kwa watumiaji wa mfumo utawasaidia waendelezaji kutambua gaidi na makosa ya habari za kiukosefu. Kiungo cha moja kwa moja na demo kinapatikana katika: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'sq': "Ky dokument demo prezanton interfaqen e thesaurit arab të nivelit të lexueshmërisë në internet. Për një fjalë të dhënë të hyrjes s ë përdoruesit, ky ndërfaqe ofron limmat e mundshme të fjalës, rrënjët, shkëlqimet angleze, fjalët dhe frazat e lidhura arabe dhe lexueshmërinë në një shkallë të lexueshmërisë pesë niveli. This interface builds on and connects multiple existing Arabic resources and processing tools.  Ky sistem i një lloji lejon që folësit arabë dhe mësuesit të përfitojnë nga përparimet në teknologjitë arabe të gjuhës llogaritare. Përkthimi nga përdoruesit e sistemit do t'u ndihmojë zhvilluesve të identifikojnë boshllëqet dhe gabimet e mbulimit lexik. Një lidhje direkte me demo është në dispozicion në: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'af': "Hierdie demo papier introduseer die online leesbaard vlak Arabiese Thesaurus koppelvlak. Name Vir 'n gegewe gebruiker invoer woord, hierdie koppelvlak verskaf die woord se moontlike lemmas, wortels, Engelske glosse, verwante Arabske woorde en frase en leesbaarheid op 'n vyf vlak leesbaardige skaal. Hierdie koppelvlak bou op en verbind veelvuldige bestaande Arabiese hulpbronne en verwerking hulpbronne. Hierdie een van 'n tipe stelsel laat Arabiese sprekkers en leerders toe om voorspoedige in Arabiese rekenaarse lingwisiese teknologies te voorspoedig. Terugkeer van gebruikers van die stelsel sal die ontwikkelaars hulp om leksiese dekkenspasies en foute te te identifiseer. 'n Lewe skakel na die demo is beskikbaar op: Name http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'tr': 'Bu demo kagyzy internede okaýanlygy görkezýär Berilen ulanylaryň girdi s özi üçin bu interface sözleriniň mümkin limmalary, kökleri, iňlisçe sözlerini, sereden arap sözlerini we beş derejede okaylýan derejesini s a ýlaýar. Bu interface birnäçe bar arapça çeşmeleri we işleýän aletleri ýaşaýa we baglaýa. Bu bir görnüş sistemi arabça dilinde gürleşýänler we öwredýänler arabça kalýumsal dil teknolojilerinden öňünden faydalandyrýarlar. Ullançylaryň gaýd etmek üçin janlaşdyrylşylaryň sözleşmeleri we hatalaryny tanamak üçin kömek edip biler. Demo bilen ýaşamly baglaýyş bar: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'am': "ይህ አዲስ ፕሮግራም የኢንተርኔት አዳማዊ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ይታያል፡፡ በተሰጠው የኢንተርኔት ድምፅ፣ ይህ ፊደል የቃላትን መዝገብ፣ ሥር፣ እንግሊዘኛ ጉልበቶች፣ የተለየ አረብኛ ቃላትና ንግግር እና የአምስት ደረጃ መዝገብ የሚችሉትን ቃላት እና መቃውሚያን ይሰጣል፡፡ ይህ የኢንተርኔክስ አረቢ ሀብት እና የመቀናቀል ዕቃዎች ብዙዎችን ይሠራል፡፡ This one-of-a-kind system enables Arabic speakers and learners to benefit from advances in Arabic computational linguistics technologies.  Feedback from the system users will help developers to identify their lexical coverage gaps and errors. ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'az': 'Bu demo kağıdı online oxuyabiləcəyi səviyyədə Arapça tezorus interfejsini təşkil edir. Verilən istifadəçinin giriş s özü üçün bu interfes sözün mümkün limmas, kökü, İngilizce gloss, əlaqəsiz ərəb sözləri və sözləri və beş səviyyə oxuya biləcəyi ölçüdə oxuya bilər. Bu interfejs çoxlu mövcud ərəbcə kaynaqlarını və işləmə vasitələrini açar və bağlayır. Bu bir türlü sistem ərəbcə danışanlara və öyrənənənlərə ərəbcə hesablama dil teknolojilərindən fayda verə bilər. Sistemin istifadəçilərindən geri dönüş təhsil edilənlərə leksik örtük boşluqlarını və xətaları tanıtmağa kömək edəcək. Demo ilə canlı bağlantı faydalanır: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'hy': 'Այս դեմո հոդվածը ներկայացնում է առցանց կարդալիության մակարդակի արաբական թեզավրուսի ինտերֆեյսը: Որոշ օգտագործողի ներմուծի բառի համար այս ինտերֆեյսը տալիս է բառի հնարավոր լիմմաներ, արմատներ, անգլերեն լուսավորումներ, կապված արաբերական բառեր և արտահայտություններ, և կարդալիությունը հինգ մակարդակի կարդալիության սանդղակու Այս ինտերֆեյսը հիմնվում է և կապում է բազմաթիվ գոյություն ունեցող արաբական ռեսուրսներ և գործիքներ: Այս մեկ տեսակի համակարգը թույլ է տալիս արաբական խոսնակներին և ուսանողներին շահույթ ունենալ արաբական հաշվարկների լեզվաբանական տեխնոլոգիաների զարգացումներից: Համակարգը համակարգի օգտագործողներից կօգնի զարգացողներին բացահայտել լեքսիկական ծածկության բացառությունները և սխալները: Դեմո հետ կապված կենդանի կապ հասանելի է http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'bn': 'এই গণপত্র অনলাইনের প্রত্যাবর্তনশীল লেভেল আরবী থিউজুরের ইন্টারফেস তুলে ধরেছে। প্রদত্ত ব্যবহারকারীর ইনপুট শব্দের জন্য এই ইন্টারফেস এই শব্দের সম্ভাব্য লেম্মাস, মূল, ইংরেজী গ্লাস, সংশ্লিষ্ট আরবী শব্দ এবং ভাষার কথা প এই ইন্টারফেস বিভিন্ন আরবী সম্পদ এবং প্রক্রিয়ার টুলস তৈরি করে সংযোগ করে। এই একটি ধরনের ব্যবস্থা আরবী ভাষাকে এবং শিক্ষার্থীদের আরবী ভাষায় হিসেবে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষাগত প্রযুক্তির উন্নয়ন থেকে সুবি সিস্টেমের ব্যবহারকারীদের থেকে ফিডব্যাক ডেভেলপারদের সাহায্য করবে লেক্সিক্সিয়াল কাভারেজের বিভাগ এবং ত ডেমোর সাথে সরাসরি লিঙ্ক পাওয়া যাচ্ছে: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'bs': 'Ovaj demografski papir predstavlja internetsku preglednicu na razini arapskog teosauruskog interfejsa. Za dodatnu reč za ulazak korisnika, ovaj interfejs pruža moguće limme, korijene, engleske glose, povezane arapske riječi i fraze i čitljivost na pet nivoa skale čitljivosti. Ova interfejsa se uključuje i povezuje više postojećih arapskih resursa i alata za obradu. Ovaj sistem od jedne vrste omogućava arapskim govornicima i učenicima koristiti od napreda na arapskim računalnim jezičkim tehnologijama. Vratit će se od korisnika sustava pomoći razvojnicima da identifikuju praznine leksičkog pokrivanja i greške. Živna veza sa demo je dostupna na: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'cs': 'Tento demo článek představuje online rozhraní arabského tezaura s úrovní čitelnosti. Pro dané uživatelské vstupní slovo toto rozhraní poskytuje možná lemma slova, kořeny, anglické lesky, související arabská slova a fráze a čitelnost na pětiúrovňové stupnici čitelnosti. Toto rozhraní navazuje na několik existujících arabských zdrojů a nástrojů pro zpracování. Tento jedinečný systém umožňuje arabským mluvčím a studentům těžit z pokroku v arabských výpočetních lingvistických technologiích. Zpětná vazba od uživatelů systému pomůže vývojářům identifikovat lexikální mezery a chyby v pokrytí. Živý odkaz na demo je k dispozici na adrese: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'et': 'See demotöö tutvustab online loetavuse tasemel araabia tesaurus liidest. Konkreetse kasutaja sisendsõna puhul annab see liides sõna võimalikud lemmad, juured, inglise läiked, seotud araabia sõnad ja fraasid ning loetavus viietasandilisel loetavusskaalal. See liides põhineb mitmel olemasoleval Araabia ressursil ja töötlusvahenditel ning ühendab need. See ainulaadne süsteem võimaldab araabia keele kõnelejatel ja õppijatel saada kasu araabia arvutuskeeletehnoloogiate arengust. Süsteemi kasutajate tagasiside aitab arendajatel tuvastada leksikaalse katvuse lünki ja vigu. Otselink demole on saadaval aadressil: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'fi': 'Tämä demopaperi esittelee online Readability Level Arabic Thesaurus käyttöliittymän. Tietylle käyttäjälle syötettävälle sanalle tämä käyttöliittymä tarjoaa sanan mahdolliset lemmat, juuret, englanninkieliset kiillot, niihin liittyvät arabiankieliset sanat ja lauseet sekä luettavuuden viisitasollisella luettavuusaskaalalla. Tämä käyttöliittymä perustuu ja yhdistää useita olemassa olevia arabialaisia resursseja ja käsittelytyökaluja. Tämä ainutlaatuinen järjestelmä antaa arabian puhujille ja oppijoille mahdollisuuden hyötyä arabian laskennallisen kielitieteen teknologioiden kehityksestä. Palaute järjestelmän käyttäjiltä auttaa kehittäjiä tunnistamaan sanaston kattavuuden puutteet ja virheet. Live-linkki demoon on saatavilla osoitteessa: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ca': "Aquest paper de demostració introdueix l'interfície de Tesaurus àrab a nivell de llegibilitat en línia. Per a una paraula d'entrada d'un usuari, aquesta interfície proporciona les llegibilitats possible s de la paraula: llegibilitat a cinc nivells. Aquesta interfície es basa en i connecta múltiples recursos àrabs existents i eines de processament. Aquest sistema d'una mena permet als parlants àrabs i als alumnes beneficiar-se dels avanços en les tecnologies de la llengüística computacional àrab. El feedback dels usuaris del sistema ajudarà als desenvolupadors a identificar les diferències i errors de cobertura lèxica. A live link to the demo is available at:  http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'jv': 'Name Anggona kelas input yang gambar, gambar nggambar, akeh limun, gambar, nggambar Inggris, gambar obah lan kelas barang arap lan basa sing nggawe barang sampeyan. FindOK Iki sistem sing wis sistem sing perbudhakan kanggo masara arap lan uga-njaluk kuwi nguasah karo Jejaring, nik awak dhéwé kuwi dituluk bantuan liyane karo teknôlogi basa ning arap. Balik nang sampeyan sistem iki bakal bantuan piyambak kanggo nggolakno luwih dumateng gap karo eror Ungroup http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'sk': 'Ta demo članek predstavlja spletni vmesnik arabskega slovarja z ravnjo berljivosti. Za določeno uporabniško vhodno besedo ta vmesnik zagotavlja možne lemme besede, korenine, angleške sijaje, sorodne arabske besede in fraze ter berljivost na petstopenjski lestvici berljivosti. Ta vmesnik temelji na več obstoječih arabskih virih in orodjih za obdelavo ter jih povezuje. Ta edinstven sistem omogoča arabskim govorcem in učencem, da izkoristijo napredek v arabskih računalniških jezikoslovnih tehnologijah. Povratne informacije uporabnikov sistema bodo razvijalcem pomagale prepoznati leksikalne vrzeli in napake. Povezava v živo do demo je na voljo na: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'he': 'נייר הדמו הזה מציג את ממשק התזאורוס הערבי ברמה של קריאות באינטרנט. למילה כניסה של משתמש מסוימת, הממשך הזה מספק את הלימות האפשריות של המילה, שורשים, זכוכים אנגליים, מילים ועברים ערביים קשורים, וקריאות בקנה בקנה בקנה של חמש רמות. ממשק זה בונה על ומקשר משאבים ערביים רבים קיימים וכלי מעבדה. מערכת אחת מסוג זו מאפשרת לדבר ערבית וללמידים להתקדם בטכנולוגיות השפתיים החישוביות הערביות. חזרה משתמשים במערכת תעזור לפיתוחים לזהות פערים ושגיאות כיסוי לקסי. קישור חי לדמו זמין ב: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan Demo na ƙunsa da interfekt na Tesaurus na Kiarabu na Lebbata da Akwaici na Online. @ info: whatsthis Wannan interface yana samar da kuma yana haɗa wasu resource na Larabci masu jira da tools masu aiki. Wannan na-na'urar-a, yana yarda da wasu masu harshe na Larabci da masu barci su da amfani da mafarinta daga technical masu cikin littafan Larabci na lissafi. @ info An iya samar da wata link zuwa Demo zuwa: http://samer.camel-lab.com/.", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཁོང་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལྟ་ཀློག བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་འཇུག ངོས་འདིའི་མཐུད་སྣེ་འདིས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཨ་རབ་དང་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལག་ཆ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། This one-of-a-kind system enables Arabic speakers and learners to benefit from advanced in Arabic computational linguistics technologies. མ་ལག་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལས་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྐབས་ནོར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གཏན་ཁེལ་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་དང་ནོར་འཁྲུལ སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་འཚོལ་བའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཞིག་འདུག http://samer.camel-lab.com/.'}
{'en': 'TrainX   Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'ar': 'TrainX - ارتباط كيان مسمى بأخذ العينات النشط والتشفير الثنائي', 'pt': 'TrainX – Ligação de Entidade Nomeada com Amostragem Ativa e Bi-Encoders', 'es': 'TrainX: vinculación de entidades nombradas con muestreo activo y bi-codificadores', 'fr': "TrainX — Liaison d'entités nommées avec échantillonnage actif et bi-encodeurs", 'ja': 'TrainX –アクティブサンプリングとバイエンコーダーとの名前付きエンティティリンク', 'hi': 'TrainX - नामित इकाई सक्रिय नमूना और द्वि-एनकोडर के साथ जोड़ने', 'zh': 'TrainX – 用采样、双编码器名实体链接', 'ru': 'TrainX – именованная сущность, связанная с активными дискретизаторами и би-энкодерами', 'ga': 'TrainX – Aonán Ainmnithe a Nascann le Sampláil Ghníomhach agus le Dé-ionchódóirí', 'ka': 'TrainX - სახელი ინტერტის დაკავშირება აკრძალური გამოყენება და ბი- კოდერებით', 'hu': 'TrainX - Nevezett entitás kapcsolódás aktív mintavétellel és kétkódolókkal', 'el': 'Σύνδεση Οντότητας TrainX με Ενεργή Δειγματοληψία και Δίκωδικοποιητές', 'it': 'TrainX - Collegamento di entità con campionamento attivo e bi-encoder', 'kk': 'TrainX - Белсенді нобайлау мен екі кодерлерден аталған нысандар сілтемесі', 'lt': 'TrainX – Pavadintas subjektas, susietas su aktyviu mėginių ėmimu ir dvikodais', 'mk': 'TrainX - Поврзување на именуван ентитет со активно примерување и двокодери', 'ms': 'TrainX - Name Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi- Encoders', 'ml': 'ട്രെയിന്\u200dഎക്സ്- പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ് സജ്ജീവമായ Sampling and Bi- Encoders', 'mt': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'no': 'TrainX – Tilkopling med aktiv sampling og bi- kodar', 'pl': 'Połączenie nazwanych podmiotów TrainX z Active Sampling i Bi-Encoderami', 'ro': 'TrainX - Legătura entității denumite cu eșantioanele active și Bi-Encodere', 'sr': 'TrainX - Povezivanje imenovanih entiteta sa aktivnim uzorcima i bi-koderima', 'so': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'sv': 'TrainX - Namngivn enhetskoppling med aktiv provtagning och tvåkodare', 'ta': 'Train X - பெயரிடப்பட்ட Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi- Encoders', 'mn': 'TrainX - нэрлэгдсэн Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'ur': 'ترینکس - فعال نمپلینگ اور Bi- Encoders کے ساتھ نام دار اینتیٹ لینک', 'si': 'TrainX - සක්\u200dරිය සැම්ප්ලින් සහ Bi- කෝඩර් සඳහා නම් කරපු අන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධය', 'uz': 'Qidirish', 'vi': 'Huấn luyện X tên thực thể liên kết với mẫu đang dùng và mã hóa.', 'bg': 'Връзка на наименувано лице с активно вземане на проби и двукодери', 'hr': 'TrainX - Povezivanje imenovanih podataka s aktivnim uzorcima i bi- koderima', 'da': 'TrainX - Navngivet Entity Linking med aktiv prøveudtagning og bi-kodere', 'nl': 'TrainX-naamloze entiteit koppelen met actieve sampling en bi-encoders', 'de': 'TrainX-benannte Entity-Verknüpfung mit Active Sampling und Bi-Encoder', 'fa': 'TrainX - متن نامیده با نمونه\u200cبندی فعال و دوEncoder\u200cها', 'id': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'ko': 'TrainX-활성 샘플링 및 Bi 인코더 링크에 대한 명명된 엔티티', 'tr': 'TrainX - Jaýyş Sampling we Bi Ködlemeler bilen Adlanmış Entity Linking', 'af': 'TrainX - Genaamde Eenheid Skakel met Aktiewe Sampling en Bi- Encoders', 'sq': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'sw': 'X - Inaitwa Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'az': 'TrainX - Etkinli n칲mun톛 칞톛km톛k v톛 bi-Kodlay캼c캼 il톛 캻smim Entit', 'hy': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'am': 'X - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'bs': 'TrainX - Povezivanje imenovanih entiteta sa aktivnim uzoracima i bi-koderima', 'bn': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'cs': 'TrainX s názvem entity propojení s aktivním vzorkováním a Bi-Encodery', 'ca': 'TrainX - Entitat anomenada enllaçada amb mostratges actives i bicodificadors', 'et': 'TrainX - nimelise üksuse seostamine aktiivse proovivõtmise ja kahekodeerijatega', 'fi': 'TrainX - Nimettyjen yksiköiden linkittäminen aktiiviseen näytteenottoon ja kaksikooderiin', 'ha': 'X - sunan Entity Link with Active Samfaning and Bi- Encoders', 'jv': 'LearnX - Ngawe Entty Linking karo Active Sampling lan bi-koder', 'sk': 'TrainX - Povezovanje imenovanih subjektov z aktivnim vzorčenjem in dvokokodirniki', 'bo': 'TrainX - Named Entity Linking with Active Sampling and Bi-Encoders', 'he': 'TrainX - קישור יחידה בשם עם דגימה פעילה וקודים שניים'}
{'en': 'We demonstrate TrainX, a system for Named Entity Linking for medical experts. It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures, such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals. We support medical experts in annotating training data by using active sampling strategies to forward informative samples to the annotator. We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before. Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'ar': 'نعرض برنامج TrainX ، وهو نظام لربط الكيان المحدد للخبراء الطبيين. فهو يجمع بين التعرف على الكيانات على أحدث طراز وربط البنى ، مثل Flair و Bi-Encoders المصمم بدقة على أساس BERT ، مع واجهة سهلة الاستخدام لمتخصصي الرعاية الصحية. نحن ندعم الخبراء الطبيين في شرح بيانات التدريب باستخدام استراتيجيات أخذ العينات النشطة لإعادة توجيه عينات إعلامية إلى المعلق. نبرهن على أن نموذجنا قادر على الارتباط بقواعد معرفية كبيرة ، مثل UMLS (3.6 مليون كيان) ، ودعم حالات إطلاق النار الصفري ، حيث لم يسبق للرابط رؤية الكيان من قبل. تساعد قدرات إطلاق النار هذه على التخفيف من مشكلة بيانات التدريب النادرة والمكلفة التي تعد مشكلة شائعة في المجال الطبي.', 'pt': 'Demonstramos o TrainX, um sistema para vinculação de entidades nomeadas para especialistas médicos. Ele combina arquiteturas de reconhecimento e vinculação de entidades de última geração, como Flair e Bi-Encoders ajustados com base em BERT, com uma interface fácil de usar para profissionais de saúde. Apoiamos especialistas médicos na anotação de dados de treinamento usando estratégias de amostragem ativas para encaminhar amostras informativas ao anotador. Demonstramos que nosso modelo é capaz de vincular grandes bases de conhecimento, como UMLS (3,6 milhões de entidades), e suportar casos de tiro zero, onde o vinculador nunca viu a entidade antes. Esses recursos de tiro zero ajudam a mitigar o problema de dados de treinamento raros e caros, que é um problema comum no domínio médico.', 'es': 'Demostramos TrainX, un sistema de vinculación de entidades designadas para expertos médicos. Combina arquitecturas de enlace y reconocimiento de entidades de vanguardia, como Flair y Bi-Encoders ajustados basados en BERT, con una interfaz fácil de usar para los profesionales de la salud. Apoyamos a los expertos médicos en la anotación de datos de entrenamiento mediante el uso de estrategias de muestreo activas para enviar muestras informativas al anotador. Demostramos que nuestro modelo es capaz de vincularse con grandes bases de conocimiento, como UMLS (3,6 millones de entidades), y admitir casos cero, en los que el vinculador nunca ha visto la entidad antes. Esas capacidades de tiro cero ayudan a mitigar el problema de los datos de entrenamiento poco frecuentes y costosos que son un problema común en el dominio médico.', 'fr': "Nous présentons TrainX, un système de Named Entity Linking pour les experts médicaux. Il combine des architectures de reconnaissance et de liaison d'entités de pointe, telles que Flair et des bi-encodeurs optimisés basés sur BERT, avec une interface facile à utiliser pour les professionnels de santé. Nous aidons les experts médicaux à annoter les données de formation en utilisant des stratégies d'échantillonnage actif pour transmettre des échantillons informatifs à l'annotateur. Nous démontrons que notre modèle est capable de créer des liens avec de grandes bases de connaissances, telles que UMLS (3,6 millions d'entités), et de prendre en charge les cas zero-shot, où l'éditeur de liens n'a jamais vu l'entité auparavant. Ces capacités zero-shot aident à atténuer le problème des données d'entraînement rares et coûteuses, un problème courant dans le domaine médical.", 'ja': '医療専門家向けの名前付きエンティティリンクのシステムであるTrainXをデモンストレーションしています。最先端のエンティティ認識と、FlairやBERTをベースに微調整されたバイエンコーダーなどのリンクアーキテクチャと、医療従事者にとって使いやすいインターフェースを組み合わせています。弊社は、情報サンプルをアノテーターに転送するためのアクティブサンプリング戦略を使用して、トレーニングデータのアノテーションを行う医療専門家をサポートしています。当社のモデルは、UMLS （ 360万のエンティティ）などの大規模なナレッジベースとリンクし、リンカーがこれまでエンティティを見たことのないゼロショットケースをサポートすることができることを実証しています。これらのゼロショット機能は、医療領域で一般的な問題である希少で高価なトレーニングデータの問題を軽減するのに役立ちます。', 'zh': '示TrainX,医学专家名链接统也。 其合最先进之实体识链接架构,如 Flair 与 BERT 之微调双编码器,及医疗保健面之易用者界面。 臣等赞医学专家用采样策将信息样本转发给注器来注训练数据。 吾法能针大知识库(如 UMLS(360 万个实体))链接,并支零触(链接器前未尝见其)。 此零射之功有助于缓奇而贵练数者,医之常见问题也。', 'hi': 'हम TrainX, चिकित्सा विशेषज्ञों के लिए नामित इकाई लिंकिंग के लिए एक प्रणाली का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। यह अत्याधुनिक इकाई मान्यता और आर्किटेक्चर को जोड़ने को जोड़ती है, जैसे कि फ्लेयर और BERT पर आधारित ठीक-ट्यून किए गए द्वि-एनकोडर्स, स्वास्थ्य देखभाल पेशेवरों के लिए एक आसान-से-उपयोग इंटरफ़ेस के साथ। हम एनोटेटर को जानकारीपूर्ण नमूनों को अग्रेषित करने के लिए सक्रिय नमूना रणनीतियों का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षण डेटा को एनोटेट करने में चिकित्सा विशेषज्ञों का समर्थन करते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल बड़े ज्ञान ठिकानों के खिलाफ जोड़ने में सक्षम है, जैसे कि यूएमएलएस (3.6 मिलियन संस्थाएं), और शून्य-शॉट मामलों का समर्थन करना, जहां लिंकर ने पहले कभी इकाई को नहीं देखा है। वे शून्य-शॉट क्षमताएं दुर्लभ और महंगे प्रशिक्षण डेटा की समस्या को कम करने में मदद करती हैं जो चिकित्सा डोमेन में एक आम मुद्दा है।', 'ru': 'Мы демонстрируем TrainX, систему для именованной связи организаций для медицинских экспертов. Он сочетает в себе самые современные архитектуры распознавания и связи сущностей, такие как Flair и тонко настроенные Bi-Encoders на основе BERT, с простым в использовании интерфейсом для медицинских работников. Мы поддерживаем медицинских экспертов в аннотировании данных обучения, используя активные стратегии отбора проб для отправки информативных образцов в аннотатор. Мы демонстрируем, что наша модель способна связываться с большими базами знаний, такими как UMLS (3,6 миллиона сущностей), и поддерживать случаи с нулевым выстрелом, когда линкер никогда раньше не видел сущность. Такие возможности помогают смягчить проблему редких и дорогостоящих данных о профессиональной подготовке, которая является распространенной проблемой в области медицины.', 'ga': 'Léirímid TrainX, córas um Nascadh Aonán Ainmnithe do shaineolaithe leighis. Nascann sé aitheantas aonáin úrscothach agus ailtireachtaí nasctha, mar Flair agus Dé-ionchódóirí mionchoigeartaithe bunaithe ar BERT, le comhéadan atá éasca le húsáid do ghairmithe cúram sláinte. Tacaímid le saineolaithe leighis sonraí oiliúna a anótáil trí úsáid a bhaint as straitéisí samplála gníomhacha chun samplaí faisnéiseacha a chur ar aghaidh chuig an anótaire. Léirímid go bhfuil ár múnla in ann nascadh le bunachair mhóra eolais, mar shampla UMLS (3.6 milliún eintiteas), agus tacú le cásanna náid, nuair nach bhfaca an nascóir an t-eintiteas riamh roimhe seo. Cuidíonn na cumais nialas lámhaigh sin le fadhb na sonraí oiliúna neamhchoitianta agus costasacha atá ina saincheist choitianta sa réimse leighis a mhaolú.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მედიცინური ექსპერტებისთვის სახელსახულებული ინტერტიკის სისტემა TrainX-ს გამოჩვენებთ. ის კომბიზებს სახელსაწყისი ინტერტიქტურების განაცნობა და აქტიქტურების დაკავშირება, როგორც ტლაიერი და უკეთესი ბიკოდერები BERT-ზე დაბათებული, სახელსაწყისი გამოყენებელი ინტერფექტურ ჩვენ მედიცინური ექსპერტისთვის დახმარებით მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის, რომელიც აქტიური მონაცემების სტრატიგიების გამოყენებით ინფორმაციური მონაცე ჩვენ მოდენსურებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლებელია დიდი მეცნიერების ბაზების დაკავშირება, როგორც UMLS (3.6 მილიონი ელექტიტები) და ნულ სტატის შესახებ, სადაც პირველი ელექტიტები არ იხე ეს ნულის შესაძლებლობა დახმარება, რომელიც საერთო პრობლემა მედიცინური დემონიაში იყო პრობლემა, რომელიც ცოტა და ძალიან საკუთარი საკუთარი განათლების', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε το ένα σύστημα σύνδεσης ονομάτων οντοτήτων για ιατρικούς εμπειρογνώμονες. Συνδυάζει την υπερσύγχρονη αναγνώριση οντοτήτων και αρχιτεκτονικές σύνδεσης, όπως και τους εκλεπτυσμένους δικωδικοποιητές με βάση το με μια εύχρηστη διεπαφή για επαγγελματίες υγείας. Υποστηρίζουμε τους ιατρικούς εμπειρογνώμονες στην σχολιασμό δεδομένων κατάρτισης χρησιμοποιώντας ενεργές στρατηγικές δειγματοληψίας για να προωθήσουμε ενημερωτικά δείγματα στον σχολιαστή. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι ικανό να συνδεθεί με μεγάλες βάσεις γνώσης, όπως το UMLS (3,6 εκατομμύρια οντότητες), και να υποστηρίξει περιπτώσεις μηδενικής βολής, όπου ο συνδετήρας δεν έχει ξαναδεί την οντότητα. Αυτές οι δυνατότητες μηδενικού πυροβολισμού βοηθούν στον μετριασμό του προβλήματος των σπάνιων και δαπανηρών δεδομένων κατάρτισης που είναι ένα κοινό ζήτημα στον ιατρικό τομέα.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az orvosi szakértők számára a TrainX-et, a Nevezett Entity Linking rendszert. Ez ötvözi a legkorszerűbb entitások felismerését és összekapcsolását olyan architektúrákat, mint a Flair és a finomhangolt BERT alapú Bi-Encoderek, egy könnyen használható felülettel az egészségügyi szakemberek számára. Támogatjuk az orvosi szakembereket a képzési adatok jegyzetelésében aktív mintavételi stratégiákkal, hogy információs mintákat továbbítsunk a jegyzetelőhöz. Bemutatjuk, hogy modellünk képes összekapcsolódni nagy tudásbázisokkal, mint például az UMLS (3,6 millió entitás), és támogatni a nulla-shot eseteket, ahol a linker még soha nem látta az entitást. Ezek a nulla lövéses képességek segítenek enyhíteni a ritka és drága képzési adatok problémáját, amely gyakori probléma az orvosi területen.', 'it': "Mostriamo TrainX, un sistema per il collegamento di entità denominate per esperti medici. Combina il riconoscimento di entità all'avanguardia e il collegamento di architetture, come Flair e Bi-Encoder ottimizzati basati su BERT, con un'interfaccia facile da usare per gli operatori sanitari. Supportiamo esperti medici nell'annotazione dei dati formativi utilizzando strategie di campionamento attivo per inoltrare campioni informativi all'annotatore. Dimostriamo che il nostro modello è in grado di collegarsi a grandi basi di conoscenza, come UMLS (3,6 milioni di entità), e supportare casi zero-shot, in cui il linker non ha mai visto l'entità prima. Queste capacità zero-shot aiutano a mitigare il problema dei dati di allenamento rari e costosi che è un problema comune nel campo medico.", 'kk': 'Біз медицина эксперттеріне аталған нысандарды сілтемелеу жүйесін TrainX дегенді көрсетедік. Бұл, BERT негізіндегі Flair және бикодерлерді қолданатын архитектураларды анықтау және сілтемелерді біріктіреді, саулық кәсіпшіліктер үшін оңай қолданатын интерфейсі. Мәлімет үлгілерін жаңартушыға жіберу үшін белсенді мәлімет баптау стратегиясын қолданатын медицина эксперттерін қолдаймыз. Біз моделіміздің үлкен білім негізіне сілтемелеу мүмкіндігін көрсетедік, мысалы UMLS (3,6 миллион бөліктерді) және нөл шарттарды қолдау мүмкіндігін көрсетедік. Бұл жерде сілтемелер бұр Бұл нөл жұмыс істеу мүмкіндіктері медицина доменіндегі жалпы мәселелердің мәселесін көшірмелеу үшін көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'We demonstrate TrainX, a system for Named Entity Linking for medical experts.  Ji derina pažangiausių subjektų pripažinimą ir sąsajas su tokiomis architektūromis, kaip Flair ir patikslinti dvikodai, pagrįsti BERT, ir lengva naudotis sveikatos priežiūros specialistams. Mes remiame medicinos ekspertus anotuojant mokymo duomenis naudojant aktyvias mėginių ėmimo strategijas informaciniams mėginiams perduoti anotatoriui. Mes įrodome, kad mūsų model is gali susieti su didelėmis žinių bazėmis, pavyzdžiui, UMLS (3,6 mln. subjektų), ir remti nulinius atvejus, kai susiejėjas niekada anksčiau nematė subjekto. Šie nuliniai gebėjimai padeda sušvelninti retų ir brangių mokymo duomenų, kurie yra bendras medicinos srities klausimas, problem ą.', 'mk': 'Демонстрираме TrainX, систем за врзување на именувани ентитети за медицински експерти. Истиот ги комбинира најсовремените препознавања на ентитетите и поврзување на архитектурите, како што се Flair и подобрени биенкодери базирани на BERT, со лесно употребен интерфејс за здравствените професионалци. Ние ги поддржуваме медицинските експерти во анотирањето на податоците за обука со користење активни стратегии за примерок за пренесување информативни примероци на анотаторот. We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before.  Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'ms': 'Kami menunjukkan TrainX, sistem untuk Pempautan Entiti bernama untuk ahli perubatan. Ia menggabungkan pengenalan entiti-state-of-the-art dan menghubungkan arkitektur, seperti Flair dan Bi-Encoder terjemput berdasarkan BERT, dengan antaramuka mudah digunakan untuk profesional rawatan kesehatan. We support medical experts in annotating training data by using active sampling strategies to forward informative samples to the annotator.  We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before.  Kemampuan tembakan sifar itu membantu untuk mengurangi masalah data latihan langka dan mahal yang merupakan isu umum dalam bidang perubatan.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippruvaw TrainX, sistema għal Entità Ismija Linking għal esperti mediċi. Hija tgħaqqad ir-rikonoxximent tal-entitajiet l-aktar avvanzati u tgħaqqad arkitetturi, bħall-Flair u Bi-Encoders irfinati bbażati fuq il-BERT, ma’ interface faċli għall-użu għall-professjonisti fil-qasam tal-kura tas-saħħa. Aħna nappoġġjaw esperti mediċi fl-annotazzjoni tad-dejta tat-taħriġ billi nużaw strateġiji attivi tat-teħid ta’ kampjuni biex jgħaddu kampjuni informativi lill-annotatur. Aħna nuru li l-mudell tagħna huwa kapaċi li jorbot ma’ bażijiet kbar ta’ għarfien, bħall-UMLS (3.6 miljun entità), u jappoġġja każijiet mingħajr skop, fejn il-konnettur qatt ma ראa l-entità qabel. Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200dക്സിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, മെഡിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷികള്\u200dക്ക് പേര് എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങിന്  ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഫ്ലായിരും നല്ല ബി കോഡോര്\u200dഡുകളും ബെര്\u200dടിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200dമെസ്റ നമ്മള്\u200d മെഡിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷിപ്പുകാരെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു, പരിശീല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, സജ്ജീവമായ മ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വലിയ അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിവുള്ളതെന്നും, UMLS (3. 6 മില്ല്യണ്\u200d വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d)  Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'no': 'Vi demonstrerer TrainX, eit system for namnet entitetslinking for medisinske ekspertar. Den kombinerer tilstanden til kunstendige entitetskjenning og lenkjer arkitektur, som Flair og finnstillingsbi-kodar basert på BERT, med ein enkel grensesnitt å bruka for helsefarge. Vi støttar medisinske ekspertar i å merke opplæringsdata ved å bruka aktive prøvestrategiar for å senda informativ prøver til annotatoren. Vi demonstrerer at modellen vår er i stand til å kopla til store kunnskapsbaser, slik som UMLS (3,6 millioner einingar) og støtte nullsatt tilfeller, der lenkjeren aldri har sett eininga før. Desse funksjonane for nullsatt hjelper til å redusera problemet med sjeldre og dyppa opplæringsdata som er eit vanleg problem i medisinske domenet.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm TrainX, un sistem pentru conectarea entităților denumite pentru experții medicali. Acesta combină recunoașterea entităților de ultimă generație și conectarea arhitecturilor, cum ar fi Flair și Bi-Encodere reglate fin bazate pe BERT, cu o interfață ușor de utilizat pentru profesioniștii din domeniul sănătății. Sprijinim experții medicali în adnotarea datelor de instruire prin utilizarea unor strategii active de eșantionare pentru a transmite probe informative adnotatorului. Demonstrăm că modelul nostru este capabil să se conecteze cu baze de cunoștințe mari, cum ar fi UMLS (3,6 milioane de entități), și să susțină cazuri zero-shot, în care linker-ul nu a mai văzut entitatea înainte. Aceste capacități zero-shot ajută la atenuarea problemei datelor rare și costisitoare de formare, care este o problemă comună în domeniul medical.', 'pl': 'Pokazujemy TrainX, system do linkowania nazwanych podmiotów dla ekspertów medycznych. Łączy w sobie najnowocześniejsze rozpoznawanie podmiotów i architektury łączące, takie jak Flair i dostrojone Bi-Encodery oparte na BERT, z łatwym w użyciu interfejsem dla pracowników służby zdrowia. Wspieramy ekspertów medycznych w adnotacji danych szkoleniowych, wykorzystując aktywne strategie pobierania próbek do przesyłania próbek informacyjnych do adnotatora. Pokazujemy, że nasz model jest w stanie łączyć się z dużymi bazami wiedzy, takimi jak UMLS (3,6 milion jednostek), oraz wspierać zero-shot przypadki, w których linker nigdy wcześniej nie widział jednostki. Te funkcje zero-shot pomagają złagodzić problem rzadkich i kosztownych danych treningowych, które są częstym problemem w dziedzinie medycznej.', 'mn': 'Бид эмнэлгийн мэргэжилтнүүддээ нэрлэгдсэн нэгж холбоотой TrainX-г харуулж байна. Энэ нь эрүүл мэндийн мэргэжилтнүүддээ амархан хэрэглэх интерфейстэй холбогдолтой байдаг. Бид эрүүл мэндийн мэргэжилтнүүдэд сургалтын өгөгдлийг анзаарах боломжтой болгон мэдээллийн жишээлүүдийг анзаарагч руу илгээхийн тулд эмчилгээний хэрэглэгчдийг ашиглаж байна. Бид загварын загвар нь UMLS (3.6 сая хүн) гэх мэт том мэдлэгийн суурь дээр холбогдох боломжтой болох боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Харин холбоотой нь өмнө нь хэзээ ч харагдаагүй тэгшитгэл тохиолдлыг дэмжиж байна. Эдгээр тэгш боломжууд нь эмнэлгийн хэмжээнд ерөнхий асуудал юм.', 'so': 'Waxaynu muujinnaa TrainX, nidaam magaceeda Entity Linking oo ah xarunta dhakhtarka caafimaadka. Waxay isku biiriyaa aqoonsiga iyo isku xirida dhismaha farshaxanka, tusaale ahaan Flair iyo qoraal-kooxeed Bi-Encoders oo ku saleysan BERT, oo u dhexeeya Interfac fudud oo isticmaalaya xirfadaha caafimaadka. Waxaannu ka caawinnaa khabiir dhakhtarka ah si aan u caddeyno macluumaadka waxbarashada, si aan u isticmaalno qalabka sameynta fircoon si ay u soo bandhigaan samooyinka macluumaadka. Waxaynu muujinnaa in modellkayagu uu awoodo in uu ku xiriiro aasaasada aqoonta waaweyn, tusaale ahaan UMLS (3,6 milyan 实体ood), iyo in uu kaalmeeyo xaaladaha aan wax lagu dhufto, kaas oo uu xiriirku weligiis arag dhamaanka hore. Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'sv': 'Vi demonstrerar TrainX, ett system för Named Entity Linking för medicinska experter. Den kombinerar toppmodern enhetsigenkänning och länkande arkitekturer, som Flair och finjusterade Bi-kodare baserade på BERT, med ett lättanvänt gränssnitt för vårdpersonal. Vi stöder medicinska experter i att kommentera utbildningsdata genom att använda aktiva provtagningsstrategier för att vidarebefordra informativa prover till kommentatorn. Vi visar att vår modell är kapabel att länka mot stora kunskapsbaser, såsom UMLS (3,6 miljoner entiteter), och stödja nollskott fall, där länkaren aldrig har sett entiteten tidigare. Dessa nollskottsfunktioner hjälper till att mildra problemet med sällsynta och dyra träningsdata som är ett vanligt problem inom den medicinska domänen.', 'ta': 'மருத்துவ வ விஷயங்களுக்கான பெயரிடப்பட்ட Entity Linking ஒரு அமைப்பை பார்க்கிறோம். இது பெர்டியை அடிப்படையில் சேர்ந்து கொண்ட பிலா குறியீட்டாளர்களை போன்ற ஒளிய பயன்படுத்தும் இடைமுகம் உடனே சேர்க்கிறது. நாங்கள் மருத்துவமன் அறிவிப்பாளர்களுக்கு ஆதரவு செய்கிறோம் பயிற்சி தகவல்களை அறிவிப்பதற்கு செயலில் செய்தி மாதிரி து நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரி பெரிய அறிவு அடிப்படைகளுக்கு எதிராக இணைக்க முடியும் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம். UMLS (3. 6 மில்லியன் பொருள் Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා TrainX, නම් අන්තිත්වය ලින්ක් කරනවා වෛද්\u200dය විශේෂකයන්ට. It combinates state-of-the-art unit atzout and links Archives, e.g. Flair and Fine-tuned Bi-Coders, based on BERT, with an Easy-to-use interface for Health Care Professions. අපි වෛද්\u200dය විශ්වාසිකයන්ට ප්\u200dරේක්ෂණා දත්ත කිරීමට සක්\u200dරිය සැම්පල් ස්ට්\u200dරේටිකාව භාවිත කරන්න සම්පූර්ණය අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ලොකු දැනගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, UMLS (මිලියන 3.6 මිලියන් වලින්), සහ සුන්ධ විදියට තියාගන්න, ඒ වගේම ලි ඒ සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියාගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න උදව් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ගොඩක් විශ්වාසිය', 'ur': 'ہم ترینکس کو دکھاتے ہیں، ایک سیسٹم جن کا نام رکھا گیا انٹیٹی لینک ہے پزشکوں کے لئے۔ اس نے ایٹنی ایٹنی کی معلومات اور معماری کی تعلیم کی جگہ، جیسے فلیر اور نیک ٹونڈ بین کوڈر BERT پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، سلامتی پرسفال کے لئے آسان استعمال کرنے والی ایٹرنفس کے ساتھ ملائق کرتا ہے. ہم پزشکوں کی تعلیم دیٹے کو اظہار کرنے کے لئے مطابق سمپل استراتژی استراتژی کے مطابق مدد کریں گے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا مدل بڑے علم بنسس کے مقابلہ میں متصل کرنے کا قادر ہے جیسے UMLS (3.6 میلیون متصل) اور صفر شٹ کیسس کی مدد کرتا ہے جہاں لینکر نے پہلے کسی چیز کو نہیں دیکھا ہے. یہ صفر-شٹ کے قابلیت کمزور کرنے کے لئے کمزور اور گران ترینسی ڈیٹے کے مسئلہ کی مدد کرتی ہیں جو پزشکی ڈیمین میں ایک مشکل ہے.', 'sr': 'Pokazujemo TrainX, sistem za povezanje imenovanih entiteta za medicinske stručnjake. Kombinacija priznanja i povezivanja arhitektura stanja umjetničkih entiteta, kao što su Flair i dobar bi-koderi osnovani na BERT-u, sa lakšim interfejsom za upotrebu zdravstvenih profesionalaca. Podržavamo medicinske stručnike u annotaciji podataka o obuci koristeći aktivne strategije za uzorak uzorka kako bi predali informativne uzorke annotatoru. Pokazujemo da je naš model sposoban povezati se sa velikim znanstvenim bazama, poput UMLS (3,6 miliona entitata), i podržavajući slučajeve nule pucnjave, gde je povezanik nikada ranije nije vidio entitet. Te mogućnosti za nulu pucnjavu pomažu da smanji problem rijetkih i skupih podataka o obuci koji je zajednički problem u medicinskoj domenu.', 'uz': "Biz tibbiy ekspertlar uchun nomli Entity Linking tizimini ko'rsatumiz. Bu huddi BERT asosida yaratilgan Flar va yaxshi Bi-Encoders, sog'lom foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi interfeys bilan birlashadi. @ info Biz modelimiz UMLS (3.6 millionlab tizimlar) bilan bogʻ'lash mumkin va nuqta shakllarni qoʻllash mumkin. Bu yerda bogʻlanuvchi hech qachon maʼlumot topilmagan. Bu nuqta shaklga qobiliyatlar tibbiy domenning umumiy muammolari uchun qisqa va qisqa taʼminlovchi maʼlumot muammolarini kamaytirish uchun yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã chứng minh Huấn luyện viên, một hệ thống được gọi là Entity Liên kết cho chuyên gia y học. Nó kết hợp các kiến trúc kiểu hiện đại, như Flair và tinh chỉnh Bi-Encoder-Encoder-nét dựa trên BERT, với một giao diện dễ sử dụng cho những người chuyên nghiệp chăm sóc sức khỏe. Chúng tôi hỗ trợ các chuyên gia y khoa trong việc ghi chú dữ liệu đào tạo bằng cách sử dụng chiến lược lấy mẫu tích để gửi mẫu thông tin cho chú thích. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng mô hình của chúng tôi có khả năng kết nối với những căn cứ kiến thức lớn, như UMLS (3.6 triệu thực thể), và hỗ trợ các trường hợp bắn không, nơi mà nhà môi trường chưa từng thấy thực thể này. Những khả năng bắn không chuẩn đó giúp giảm thiểu vấn đề về dữ liệu đào tạo hiếm và mắc tiền, một vấn đề phổ biến trong lĩnh vực y học.', 'bg': 'Ние демонстрираме система за свързване на имена на субекти за медицински експерти. Той съчетава най-съвременните архитектури за разпознаване на обекти и свързване, като и фино настроени двукодери, базирани на БЕРТ, с лесен за използване интерфейс за здравни специалисти. Ние подпомагаме медицинските експерти при анотирането на данни за обучение чрез използване на активни стратегии за вземане на проби за изпращане на информативни проби до анотатора. Ние демонстрираме, че нашият модел е способен да се свързва с големи бази от знания, като например УМЛС (3.6 милиона субекти), и да поддържа случаи с нулев изстрел, при които линкерът никога не е виждал субекта преди. Тези възможности за нулев изстрел помагат за смекчаване на проблема с редките и скъпи данни за обучение, което е често срещан проблем в областта на медицината.', 'da': 'Vi demonstrerer TrainX, et system til Named Entity Linking for medicinske eksperter. Den kombinerer state-of-the-art enhedsgenkendelse og sammenkædning af arkitekturer, såsom Flair og finjusterede bi-kodere baseret på BERT, med en brugervenlig grænseflade for sundhedspersonale. Vi støtter medicinske eksperter i at kommentere træningsdata ved at bruge aktive prøveudtagningsstrategier til at videresende informative prøver til kommentatoren. Vi demonstrerer, at vores model er i stand til at linke sammen med store vidensbaser, såsom UMLS (3,6 millioner enheder), og understøtte nulskudssager, hvor linkeren aldrig har set enheden før. Disse nulskudsfunktioner hjælper med at afbøde problemet med sjældne og dyre træningsdata, der er et almindeligt problem på det medicinske område.', 'nl': 'We demonstreren TrainX, een systeem voor Named Entity Linking voor medische experts. Het combineert state-of-the-art entiteitsherkenning en verbindingsarchitecturen, zoals Flair en verfijnde Bi-Encoders op basis van BERT, met een gebruiksvriendelijke interface voor zorgprofessionals. We ondersteunen medische experts bij het annoteren van trainingsgegevens door middel van actieve bemonsteringsstrategieën informatieve monsters door te sturen naar de annotator. We tonen aan dat ons model in staat is om te linken tegen grote kennisbases, zoals UMLS (3,6 miljoen entiteiten), en zero-shot cases te ondersteunen, waarbij de linker de entiteit nog nooit eerder heeft gezien. Deze zero-shot mogelijkheden helpen om het probleem van zeldzame en dure trainingsgegevens te verminderen, dat een veelvoorkomend probleem is in het medische domein.', 'hr': 'Pokazujemo TrainX, sistem za povezivanje imenovanih entiteta za medicinske stručnjake. Kombinacija priznanja i povezivanja arhitekture stanja umjetnosti, poput Flaira i dobrodošlih bi-kodera na temelju BERT-a, s lakom korištenjem interfejsa za zdravstvene profesionalce. Podržavamo medicinske stručnjake u annotaciji podataka o obuci koristeći aktivne strategije za uzorak uzorka kako bi predali informativne uzorke annotatoru. Pokazujemo da je naš model sposoban povezati se s velikim znanstvenim bazama, poput UMLS (3,6 milijuna entitata), i podržavati slučajeve nule pucnjave, gdje je veznik nikada prije nije vidio entitet. Te mogućnosti za nulu pucanja pomažu smanjiti problem rijetkih i skupih podataka o obuci koji je zajednički problem u medicinskoj dometu.', 'de': 'Wir demonstrieren TrainX, ein System für Named Entity Linking für medizinische Experten. Es kombiniert modernste Entitätenerkennung und Verknüpfungsarchitekturen wie Flair und fein abgestimmte Bi-Encoder auf BERT-Basis mit einer benutzerfreundlichen Schnittstelle für medizinisches Fachpersonal. Wir unterstützen medizinische Experten bei der Annotation von Trainingsdaten, indem wir mithilfe aktiver Probenahmestrategien aussagekräftige Proben an den Annotator weiterleiten. Wir zeigen, dass unser Modell in der Lage ist, mit großen Wissensbasen wie UMLS (3,6 Millionen Entitäten) zu verknüpfen und Zero-Shot Fälle zu unterstützen, in denen der Linker die Entität noch nie zuvor gesehen hat. Diese Zero-Shot-Funktionen helfen, das Problem seltener und teurer Trainingsdaten zu verringern, das im medizinischen Bereich häufig vorkommt.', 'id': 'We demonstrate TrainX, a system for Named Entity Linking for medical experts.  It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures, such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals.  Kami mendukung ahli medis dalam anotasi data pelatihan dengan menggunakan strategi pengambilan sampel aktif untuk mengirim sampel informatif ke anotator. We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before.  Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'fa': 'ما تدریس X را نشان می دهیم، یک سیستم برای متخصص پزشکی متخصص شرکت نامیده شده است. این مجموعهٔ شناسایی و ارتباط معماری\u200cهای موجود هنری را ترکیب می\u200cکند، مثل فلیر و دوی-کودر\u200cهای آراسته\u200cشده بر اساس BERT، با یک ارتباط آسان برای استفاده برای حرفه\u200cای از مراقبت سلامتی. ما به دانشمندان پزشکی حمایت می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات آموزش را با استفاده از استراتژی\u200cهای نمونه\u200cگیری فعال برای پیش فرستادن نمونه\u200cهای اطلاعاتی به نویسندگان نشان دهند. ما نشان می دهیم که مدل ما قادر است در ارتباط با پایگاه های دانش بزرگ، مانند UMLS (۳.۶ میلیون واحد) و پشتیبانی پرونده های صفر شلیک کننده باشد، جایی که ارتباط هرگز این واحد را ندیده است. این توانایی\u200cهای صفر شلیک کمک می\u200cکنند تا مشکل داده\u200cهای آموزش نادر و گران را کمک کند که یک مسئله مشترک در دامنۀ پزشکی است.', 'ko': '우리는 의학 전문가를 위해 실체 링크를 명명하는 TrainX를 보여 주었다.그것은 가장 선진적인 실체 식별과 링크 체계 구조(예를 들어 Flair와 BERT 기반의 마이크로스피커 Bi 인코더)와 의료 전문가들이 쉽게 사용할 수 있는 인터페이스를 결합시킨다.우리는 의학 전문가들이 주동적인 표본 추출 전략을 사용하여 정보 샘플을 주석자에게 전달하고 훈련 데이터에 대해 주석을 하는 것을 지지한다.우리는 우리의 모델이 대형 지식 라이브러리, 예를 들어UMLS(360만 개의 실체)에 대한 링크를 할 수 있고 제로 사격 사례를 지원할 수 있음을 증명했다. 링크기는 이전에 실체를 본 적이 없다.이런 제로포 능력은 희귀하고 비싼 훈련 데이터 문제를 완화시키는 데 도움이 되는 의학 분야에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 문제다.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha TrainX, mfumo wa Kuunganishwa kwa ajili ya wataalam wa matibabu. It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures, such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals.  Tunawaunga mkono wataalam wa kitabibu katika kutangaza taarifa za mafunzo kwa kutumia mbinu za haraka za sampuli ili kutengeneza sampuli za taarifa kwa mtangazaji. Tunaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu una uwezo wa kuunganisha na misingi makubwa ya maarifa kama vile UMLS (vitu milioni 3.6), na kusaidia kesi zisizo za risasi, ambapo muunganiko huyo hajawahi kuona kitendo hiki kabla. Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'af': "Ons wys TrainX, 'n stelsel vir genoem Entity Linking vir mediese eksperte. Dit kombinieer status-of-the-art entities herken en verbind architectures, soos Flair en fyn-tuned Bi-Encoders gebaseer op BERT, met 'n maklik-gebruik koppelvlak vir gesondsorgsprofessionele. Ons ondersteun mediese eksperte in die annotering van onderwerp data deur aktiewe versameling strategies te gebruik om informatiewe voorbeelde na die annotator te voer. Ons wys dat ons model kan verbind teen groot kennisbasis, soos UMLS (3.6 miljoen entiteite), en ondersteun nul-skoot gevalle, waar die skakelaar nooit die entiteit voor gesien het nie. Hierdie nulskoot-kapasiteite help om die probleem van selfde en koste onderwerp data te verminder wat 'n algemene probleem in die mediese domein is.", 'sq': 'We demonstrate TrainX, a system for Named Entity Linking for medical experts.  It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures, such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals.  Ne mbështesim ekspertët mjekësorë në anotacionin e të dhënave të trajnimit duke përdorur strategji aktive të mbikqyrjes për të dërguar mostra informative tek anotatori. We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before.  Ato aftësi zero-shot ndihmojnë për të lehtësuar problem in e të dhënave të rralla dhe të shtrenjta të trainimit që është një çështje e zakonshme në fushën mjekësore.', 'tr': 'Biz Täzelikler üçin bir sistemi diýip atlandyrýarys. Bu ýerler sanat taýýarlanmasy we arhitektarlaryny birleşdirýär, çünki Flair we BERT tabanly döredilen Bi-Encoderler, sağlık apresençileriniň üçin ýeňil bir arayüzi bilen ullanýar. Biz öz nämli örneklerini janlaşdyrmak üçin hasaplanjak maglumatlaryny janlaşdyrmak üçin lukmanlaryň ekspertlerini destekleýäris. Biziň modelimiz uly bilim üssünlere (UMLS, 3.6 milliýon taýýarlar) we 0-atly durumlara golaýlaşyp başarýandygyny görkezip otyrýarys, nirede hiç haçan bir zat görmedi. Şol nul çykyş ukyplary tıbbi domaýynda orta meselätdir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս "Թրեյնքս"-ը, բժշկական մասնագետների կոչված անհատականության կապերի համակարգը: It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures, such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals.  We support medical experts in annotating training data by using active sampling strategies to forward informative samples to the annotator.  We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before.  Those zero-shot capabilities help to mitigate the problem of rare and expensive training data that is a common issue in the medical domain.', 'am': 'የጤና አዋቂዎች ስርዓት ማቀናቀል ስርዓት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የ-አካል አካባቢ ግንኙነት ማወቅ እና የመዝገብ ግንኙነት አካባቢዎች፣ እንደብኤርቴን በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የBi-Encoders እና ለጤናዊ ጤና ባለሞያ ባለሞያ ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል እና ማቀናቀል፡፡ አካባቢ ምሳሌ ምሳሌዎችን ለማስታወቂያ በመጠቀም እናስረዳለን፡፡ ምሳሌያችን እንደዚህ UMLS (3.6 ሚሊዮን አካላት) እንዲያጋራና በ0.shot ጉዳዮች ላይ መደጋገሚያ እንደሚችል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህም የzero-shot ችሎታቸው በጥቅሙ እና የከበረውን የድህነት ማኅበረሰብ ዳታዎችን ለማቅረብ ይረዳሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'We demonstrate TrainX, a system for Named Entity Linking for medical experts.  এটি স্বাস্থ্য সেবাস্থ্য পেশাদারদের জন্য সহজে ব্যবহার করা ইন্টারফেসের সাথে স্বাস্থ্য পেশাদারদের জন্য স্বাস্থ্যসেবা ব্যবহার করার একটি সহজেই ব্যবহার করা ইন্ আমরা চিকিৎসা বিশেষজ্ঞদের সমর্থন করি প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য বিস্তারিত করার মাধ্যমে সক্রিয় নমুনা কৌশল ব্যবহার করে প্রশিক্ষণে আমরা প্রমাণ করছি যে আমাদের মডেল বিশাল জ্ঞানের বেসের বিরুদ্ধে যুক্ত করতে সক্ষম, যেমন UMLS (৩. এই শুটের ক্ষমতা দুর্লভ এবং দামী প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য কমানোর জন্য সাহায্য করে, যা চিকিৎসা ডোমেইনের একটি সাধারণ বিষয়।', 'az': 'Biz təhsil müsəlmanları üçün İsmim Entity Linking sistemini göstəririk. Bu, BERT-a dayanan Flair və düzgün bi-Encoderlər kimi, sağlam təhsil sahibləri üçün asanlıqla istifadə etmək üçün asanlıqla istifadə edilən bir interfejlə birləşdirir. Biz təhsil məlumatlarını məlumatlarına göndərmək üçün fəaliyyətli nümunələri istifadə edərək təhsil məlumatlarını məlumatlarına bildirməkdə təhsil edirik. Biz modellərimizin UMLS (3.6 milyon entity) kimi böyük bilim üssələrinə bağlanmağa qadir olduğunu göstərdik və sıfır-vuruş məsələlərinə kömək edirik, ki bu məsələnin daha öncə heç bir şey görmədi. Bu sıfır-vuruş qabiliyyətlərin sərt və mal təhsil məlumatının problemini azaltmağa kömək edir.', 'cs': 'Představujeme TrainX, systém pro linkování jmenovaných entit pro lékařské odborníky. Kombinuje nejmodernější rozpoznávání entit a propojení architektur, jako jsou Flair a vyladěné Bi-Encodery založené na BERT, se snadno použitelným rozhraním pro zdravotnické pracovníky. Podporujeme lékařské odborníky při anotování tréninkových dat pomocí aktivních strategií vzorkování k předávání informačních vzorků anotátoru. Ukazujeme, že náš model je schopen propojit s velkými znalostními bázemi, jako je UMLS (3,6 milionů entit), a podporovat nulové případy, kdy linker entitu nikdy předtím neviděl. Tyto funkce nulového výstřelu pomáhají zmírnit problém vzácných a drahých tréninkových dat, které jsou běžným problémem v lékařské oblasti.', 'ca': "Demonstrem TrainX, un sistema de connexió de noms per experts mèdics. Combina el reconeixement de l'entitat més moderna i enllaça arquitectures, com Flair i bicodificadors fins basats en BERT, amb una interfície fàcil d'utilitzar per als professionals de la salut. Apoiem experts mèdics en anotar dades d'entrenament utilitzant estratègies actives de recolliment de mostres per enviar mostres informatives a l'anotador. Demonstrem que el nostre model és capaç d'enllaçar-se amb grans bases de coneixement, com UMLS (3,6 milions d'entitats), i de sostenir casos de zero-shot, on el enllaçador mai ha vist l'entitat abans. Aquestes capacitats de dispar zero ajudan a mitigar el problema de dades d'entrenament rares i costoses que és un problema comú en el domini mèdic.", 'et': 'Näitame TrainX-i, meditsiiniekspertidele mõeldud nimeliste üksuste linkimise süsteemi. See ühendab kaasaegse üksuste tuvastamise ja ühendavad arhitektuurid, nagu Flair ja BERT-il põhinevad peenhäälestatud Bi-Encoderid, hõlpsasti kasutatava liidesega tervishoiutöötajatele. Toetame meditsiinieksperte koolitusandmete märgistamisel, kasutades aktiivseid proovivõtu strateegiaid, et edastada märgistajale informatiivseid proove. Näitame, et meie mudel on võimeline ühendama suurte teadmistebaaside, näiteks UMLS (3,6 miljonit üksust), ja toetama null-shot juhtumeid, kus linkija pole seda üksust varem näinud. Need null-shot võimalused aitavad leevendada haruldaste ja kallite koolitusandmete probleemi, mis on meditsiinivaldkonnas levinud probleem.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme TrainX-järjestelmän, joka on lääketieteen asiantuntijoille tarkoitettu nimettyjen entiteettien linkittäminen. Se yhdistää huippuluokan kokonaisuuksien tunnistus- ja linkitysarkkiteektuurit, kuten Flair ja hienoviritetyt BERT-kooderit, helppokäyttöiseen käyttöliittymään terveydenhuollon ammattilaisille. Tuemme lääketieteellisiä asiantuntijoita koulutustietojen merkitsemisessä aktiivisten näytteenottostrategioiden avulla, jotta ne välittävät informaationäytteet muistiinpanolaitteelle. Osoitamme, että mallimme pystyy linkittämään suuria tietokantoja, kuten UMLS (3,6 miljoonaa yksikköä), ja tukemaan nollashot-tapauksia, joissa linkittäjä ei ole koskaan ennen nähnyt kokonaisuutta. Nämä nollashot-ominaisuudet auttavat lieventämään harvinaisten ja kalliiden koulutustietojen ongelmaa, joka on lääketieteen alalla yleinen ongelma.', 'bs': 'Pokazujemo TrainX, sistem za povezivanje imenovanih entiteta za medicinske stručnjake. Kombinacija priznanja i povezivanja arhitekture stanja umjetnosti, poput Flaira i dobar bi-kodera koji su osnovani na BERT-u, sa lakom interfejsom za upotrebu zdravstvenih profesionalaca. Podržavamo medicinske stručnike u annotaciji podataka o obuci koristeći aktivne strategije za uzorak uzorka kako bi predali informativne uzorke annotatoru. Pokazujemo da je naš model sposoban povezati se sa velikim znanstvenim bazama, poput UMLS (3,6 miliona entitata), i podržavati slučajeve nule pucnjave, gdje je povezanik nikada prije nije vidio entitet. Te mogućnosti za nulu pucnjavu pomažu da smanji problem rijetkih i skupih podataka o obuci koji je zajednički problem u medicinskoj domenu.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo TrainX, sistem za povezovanje imenovanih entitet za medicinske strokovnjake. Združuje najsodobnejše prepoznavanje entitet in povezovanje arhitektur, kot sta Flair in natančno nastavljeni Bi-Encoders, ki temeljijo na BERT, z enostavnim vmesnikom za zdravstvene delavce. Medicinske strokovnjake podpiramo pri označevanju podatkov o usposabljanju z uporabo aktivnih strategij vzorčenja za posredovanje informativnih vzorcev označevalcu. Dokazujemo, da je naš model sposoben povezovati z velikimi bazami znanja, kot je UMLS (3,6 milijona subjektov), in podpirati primere brez strela, kjer povezovalec tega subjekta še nikoli ni videl. Te zmogljivosti brez strela pomagajo ublažiti problem redkih in dragih podatkov o usposabljanju, ki je pogost problem na medicinskem področju.', 'ha': "Tuna nuna TrainX, wata na'urar da aka sunan Entity Linkin wa masu fitarwa. Yana haɗa halin-sanar da aka gane da kuma yana haɗa matsayin, kamar flair da kode mai kyau a kan BERT, da wani interfece mai sauƙi da mai amfani da wa masu shawarar da ke amfani da shi. Tuna ƙarfafa masu amfani da masu amfani da misãlai masu haraka zuwa misãlai masu labanci zuwa mai taƙaita. Tuna nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya iya haɗi zuwa basasa masu ilmi, kamar misãlai UMLS (masu cikin 3.6 millions), kuma yana ƙarfafa masu sakan da ba'a gane shi ba a gabãni. Ga waɗannan awoda za'a yi sifiri ba yana taimakon ya sauƙa ƙara ma'anar data na zaman wahalar da masu nau'a da gharama wanda ya zama rabo a cikin madaidaici.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk Kemerdekaan Iyo iso ngubah aksi perusahaan-perusahaan lan nganggo architecture, koyo Floir karo iso nambah bi-koder sing basa saben BERT, lan akeh langasakno usaha kanggo langasakno operasi layarané Awak dhéwé nglanggar oleh perbudhakan kanggo ngwalikno dadi nggawe ngulinakake Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing iso nggawe barang-sistem sing gak nggawe liyane karo sistem punika dipunangé awak dhéwé, ngono SML (3.6 miliyon dolan), lan nggunaké perusahaan liyane 0, segala saiki link ora iso nggawe sak durung. 0-uput sing paling nggawe perbudhakan kanggo mbenggu perbudhakan yakuwis sak data yang dadi sing larang, sing paling nggawe kesempatan ning sakit sakjane sakjane', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པ་ཚོར་ལྟ་སྟངས་དང་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་ཨིན་ཊི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals. ང་ཚོས་སྨན་གྱི་ནུས་པ་ཚོར་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཚོར་གྱི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞུང་གིས་མཐུད་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཆོག་ཡིན། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་གྲུང་ཆེན་དག་གིས་དབུལ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བ་དག་སྐྱེན་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེ', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את TrainX, מערכת ליישור של איכות בשם למומחים רפואיים. It combines state-of-the-art entity recognition and linking architectures, such as Flair and fine-tuned Bi-Encoders based on BERT, with an easy-to-use interface for healthcare professionals.  We support medical experts in annotating training data by using active sampling strategies to forward informative samples to the annotator.  We demonstrate that our model is capable of linking against large knowledge bases, such as UMLS (3.6 million entities), and supporting zero-shot cases, where the linker has never seen the entity before.  היכולות האלה של ירי אפס עוזרות להקל את הבעיה של נתוני אימון נדירים ויקרים שהיא בעיה משותפת בתחום הרפואי.'}
{'en': 'Epistolary Education in 21st Century : A System to Support Composition of E-mails by Students to Superiors in Japanese', 'ar': 'التعليم المرسل في القرن الحادي والعشرين: نظام لدعم تكوين رسائل البريد الإلكتروني من قبل الطلاب إلى رؤسائهم باللغة اليابانية', 'fr': "L'enseignement épistolaire au 21e siècle\xa0: un système de prise en charge de la composition des e-mails envoyés par les étudiants aux supérieurs en japonais", 'pt': 'Educação Epistolar no Século XXI: Um Sistema de Apoio à Composição de E-mails de Estudantes para Superiores em Japonês', 'es': 'Educación epistolar en el siglo XXI: un sistema para apoyar la composición de correos electrónicos de los estudiantes a los superiores en japonés', 'ja': '21世紀のエピストリアリズム教育：日本語による学生から上級者への電子メールの構成をサポートするシステム', 'hi': '21 वीं सदी में Epistolary शिक्षा: जापानी में सुपीरियर के लिए छात्रों द्वारा ई-मेल की संरचना का समर्थन करने के लिए एक प्रणाली', 'zh': '21世纪书教:赞学生上日语电子邮件之统', 'ru': 'Epistolary Education in 21st Century: A System to Support Composition of E-mails by Students to Superiors in Japanese', 'ga': 'Oideachas Epistolach san 21ú hAois: Córas chun Tacú le Comhdhéanamh Ríomhphoist ó Dhaltaí chuig Sárshaothar sa tSeapáinis', 'hu': 'Episztoláris oktatás a 21. században: A diákok felsőfokú japán nyelvű e-mailjeinek összetételét támogató rendszer', 'el': 'Επισκοπική Εκπαίδευση στον 21ο αιώνα: Ένα σύστημα υποστήριξης της σύνθεσης των μηνυμάτων ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου από μαθητές προς ανώτερους στα ιαπωνικά', 'ka': '21 წლის ეპისტალური განსწავლება: სტუდენტების კომპოზიციაციის შესაძლებლობის სისტემა წაპონეთში სტუდენტების შესაძლებლობისთვის', 'lt': '21-ojo amžiaus epistolinis švietimas: Japonijos moksleivių e. pašto kompozicijai remti skirta sistema', 'kk': '21ші ғасырда эпистолдық білім: Студенттердің эл. поштасын жапондықтардың композициясына қолдау жүйесі', 'it': "L'educazione epistolare nel XXI secolo: un sistema per sostenere la composizione delle e-mail da parte degli studenti ai superiori in giapponese", 'ml': '21 നൂറ്റാണ്ടിലെ എപ്പിസ്റ്റോളിറി വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം: ജാപ്പാനിലെ വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളിലേക്ക് സൂപ്പരിയറുകള്\u200dക്ക് പിന്ത', 'mk': 'Епистоларно образование во 21-виот век: Систем за поддршка на композицијата на електронските пошта од студентите до супериорите на јапонски', 'no': 'Epistolær utdanning i 21. århundre: Eit system for å støtte samansetting av e-post av studenter til superiorar i japansk', 'mt': 'Edukazzjoni Epistolari fis-Seklu 21: Sistema ta’ Appoġġ għall-Kompożizzjoni ta’ E-Mails minn Studenti lil Superjuri bil-Ġappuniż', 'ms': 'Pendidikan Epistolary pada abad ke-21: Sistem untuk menyokong komposisi e-mel oleh Pelajar ke Superiors dalam bahasa Jepun', 'mn': '21-р зуунд сурагчдын эпистолет боловсрол: Оюутнуудын эл. почтын нэгтгэлийг дэмжих систем', 'pl': 'Edukacja epistolarna XXI wieku: System wspierania składu e-maili studentów do przełożonych w języku japońskim', 'ro': 'Educația epistolară în secolul XXI: Un sistem de sprijinire a compoziției e-mailurilor de către elevi către superiori în limba japoneză', 'sr': 'Epistolarno obrazovanje 21. veka: Sistem za podršku kompozicije e-mailova studenata nadređenima na japanskom jeziku', 'so': 'Waxbarashada afka-horaadka sanadkii 21aad: A System to Support Composition of e-mails by Students to Superiors in Japanese', 'si': '21වෙනි ශාතයේ ඉපිස්ටෝලාරි ශික්ෂණය: ජාපාන් වල ඉන්න ශික්ෂාන්තියෝ වල ඉන්න විද්\u200dයාපකයෝ සම්පූර', 'sv': 'Epistolär utbildning i 2000-talet: Ett system för att stödja sammansättningen av e-postmeddelanden från studenter till högre på japanska', 'ta': '21ஆம் நூற்றாண்டில் துணை கல்விச்சி', 'ur': '21st century میں اپیسٹوری تحصیل: ایک سیسٹم جاپانیایی میں استادوں کے ایمیل کی پیدائش کی مدد کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': '21 asrdamdagi eng yuqori taʼlim: Japoniya muammolari uchun elektron pochta kompyuterni qoʻllash tizimi', 'vi': 'Chương trình học nổi tiếng vào thế kỉ XXI: Hệ thống hỗ trợ sự kết hợp e-mail của Sinh viên cho Giám Đốc Nhật Bản', 'hr': 'Epistolarno obrazovanje 21. stoljeća: sustav za podršku kompozicije e-maila studentima nadređenima na japanskom jeziku', 'da': 'Epistolær uddannelse i det 21. århundrede: Et system til støtte sammensætning af e-mails fra studerende til overordnede på japansk', 'bg': 'Епистоларното образование през 21 век: система за подкрепа на съставянето на имейли от ученици до висшисти на японски език', 'nl': 'Epistolair onderwijs in de 21e eeuw: Een systeem ter ondersteuning van de samenstelling van e-mails door studenten aan superieuren in het Japans', 'de': 'Epistoläre Bildung im 21sten Jahrhundert: Ein System zur Unterstützung der Zusammensetzung von E-Mails von Schülern an Vorgesetzte auf Japanisch', 'id': 'Pendidikan Epistolary pada abad 21: Sistem untuk mendukung komposisi e-mail oleh mahasiswa ke Superiors dalam bahasa Jepang', 'ko': '21세기 서신체 교육: 학생들이 일본어로 상부에 이메일을 보내는 시스템을 지원한다', 'sw': 'Elimu ya Makosa katika karne ya 21: Mfumo wa kuunga mkono barua pepe zilizotolewa na wanafunzi kwa Waziri nchini Japani', 'tr': 'Epistolar bilim 21-nji asyrda: Okuwçylar tarapyndan Ýaponiýanyň üstünlere', 'af': "Epistolêre Uitvoering in 21ste Jordaan: 'n Stelsel om te ondersteun Komposisie van e-pos deur Studente na Superiors in Japanse", 'sq': 'Edukacioni epistolar në shekullin e 21-të: Një sistem për të mbështetur përbërjen e e e-maileve nga Studentët tek Superiorët në japonezë', 'am': 'በ21ኛ ክፍል የEpistolary ትምህርት: የጃፓንኛ ተማሪዎች ወደ ተሟጋቾች የኢሜይል ድምፅ ለመደገፍ ስርዓት', 'az': '21. yüzyılda Epistolary Education: A System to Support Composition of e-mails by Students to Superiors in Japanese', 'bn': '২১শে শতকের পিস্তুলারি শিক্ষা: জাপানি শিক্ষার্থীদের দ্বারা ই-মেইল কম্পোজিশনের সমর্থনের একটি সিস্টেম', 'hy': '21-րդ դարում էպիստոլարիայի կրթություն. Ճապոնացի լեզվով աշակերտների էլեկտրոնային նամակների կառուցվածքը աջակցելու համակարգ', 'bs': 'Epistolarno obrazovanje u 21. veku: Sistem za podršku kompozicije e-mailova studenata nadređenima na japanskom jeziku', 'fa': 'تحصیل epistolary in 21st century: A System to Support Composition of E-mails by Students to Superiors in Japanese', 'cs': 'Epistolární vzdělávání v 21.století: Systém podpory složení e-mailů studentům nadřízeným v japonštině', 'et': 'Epistolaarne haridus 21. sajandil: süsteem üliõpilaste poolt kõrgematele jaapani keeles e-kirjade koostamiseks', 'fi': 'Epistolaarinen koulutus 2000-luvulla: järjestelmä, jolla tuetaan oppilaiden ja ylempien oppilaiden sähköpostien säveltämistä japaniksi', 'ca': "Educació epistolària del segle XXI: Un sistema de suport a la composició de correus electrònics d'estudiants a superiors en japonès", 'ha': 'Egun education in the 21st Century: A system to Support Composition of e-mails by Boards to SuSuperors in japane', 'jv': 'Epistolare Piwulang nang Ing 2st Seneng: A System to Ketokipun Kompatisi E-mail karo Ngucap Jejaring', 'sk': 'Epistolarno izobraževanje v 21. stoletju: sistem za podporo sestavljanju e-pošte študentov višjim študentom v japonščini', 'he': 'חינוך פיסטולרי במאה ה-21: מערכת לתמוך במערכת דואר אלקטרוני', 'bo': 'Epistolary Education in 21st century: A System to Support Composition of E-mail by Students to Superiors in Japanese'}
{'en': 'E-mail is a communication tool widely used by people of all ages on the Internet today, often in business and formal situations, especially in Japan. Moreover, Japanese E-mail communication has a set of specific rules taught using specialized guidebooks. E-mail literacy education for many Japanese students is typically provided in a traditional, yet inefficient lecture-based way. We propose a system to support Japanese students in writing E-mails to superiors (teachers, job hunting representatives, etc.). We firstly make an investigation into the importance of formal E-mails in Japan, and what is needed to successfully write a formal E-mail. Next, we develop the system with accordance to those rules. Finally, we evaluated the system twofold. The results, although performed on a small number of samples, were generally positive, and clearly indicated additional ways to improve the system.', 'ar': 'البريد الإلكتروني هو أداة اتصال تستخدم على نطاق واسع من قبل الأشخاص من جميع الأعمار على الإنترنت اليوم ، غالبًا في المواقف التجارية والرسمية ، خاصة في اليابان. علاوة على ذلك ، تحتوي اتصالات البريد الإلكتروني اليابانية على مجموعة من القواعد المحددة التي يتم تدريسها باستخدام كتيبات إرشادية متخصصة. عادةً ما يتم توفير تعليم محو الأمية عبر البريد الإلكتروني للعديد من الطلاب اليابانيين بطريقة تقليدية قائمة على المحاضرات ، ولكنها غير فعالة. نقترح نظامًا لدعم الطلاب اليابانيين في كتابة رسائل البريد الإلكتروني إلى رؤسائهم (المعلمين وممثلي البحث عن عمل ، إلخ). نقوم أولاً بإجراء تحقيق في أهمية رسائل البريد الإلكتروني الرسمية في اليابان ، وما هو مطلوب لكتابة بريد إلكتروني رسمي بنجاح. بعد ذلك ، نقوم بتطوير النظام وفقًا لتلك القواعد. أخيرًا ، قمنا بتقييم النظام ذي الشقين. النتائج ، على الرغم من إجرائها على عدد صغير من العينات ، كانت إيجابية بشكل عام ، وتشير بوضوح إلى طرق إضافية لتحسين النظام.', 'pt': 'O e-mail é uma ferramenta de comunicação amplamente utilizada por pessoas de todas as idades na Internet hoje, muitas vezes em situações de negócios e formais, especialmente no Japão. Além disso, a comunicação por e-mail japonesa tem um conjunto de regras específicas ensinadas usando guias especializados. A alfabetização por e-mail para muitos estudantes japoneses é normalmente fornecida de maneira tradicional, mas ineficiente, baseada em palestras. Propomos um sistema para apoiar estudantes japoneses na escrita de e-mails para superiores (professores, representantes de procura de emprego, etc.). Primeiramente fazemos uma investigação sobre a importância dos e-mails formais no Japão, e o que é necessário para escrever um e-mail formal com sucesso. Em seguida, desenvolvemos o sistema de acordo com essas regras. Por fim, avaliamos o sistema duas vezes. Os resultados, embora realizados em um pequeno número de amostras, foram geralmente positivos e indicaram claramente formas adicionais de melhorar o sistema.', 'fr': "Le courrier électronique est un outil de communication largement utilisé par les personnes de tous âges sur Internet aujourd'hui, souvent dans des situations professionnelles et formelles, en particulier au Japon. En outre, la communication par courrier électronique en japonais comporte un ensemble de règles spécifiques enseignées à l'aide de guides spécialisés. Pour de nombreux étudiants japonais, l'enseignement de la maîtrise du courrier électronique est généralement dispensé de manière traditionnelle, mais inefficace, basée sur des cours magistraux. Nous proposons un système pour aider les étudiants japonais à écrire des e-mails à leurs supérieurs (professeurs, représentants de recherche d'emploi, etc.). Nous faisons d'abord une enquête sur l'importance des e-mails formels au Japon et sur ce qui est nécessaire pour rédiger un e-mail formel avec succès. Ensuite, nous développons le système conformément à ces règles. Enfin, nous avons évalué le système en deux volets. Les résultats, bien que réalisés sur un petit nombre d'échantillons, étaient généralement positifs et indiquaient clairement d'autres moyens d'améliorer le système.", 'es': 'El correo electrónico es una herramienta de comunicación muy utilizada por personas de todas las edades en Internet hoy en día, a menudo en situaciones empresariales y formales, especialmente en Japón. Además, la comunicación por correo electrónico en japonés tiene un conjunto de reglas específicas que se enseñan mediante guías especializadas. La alfabetización por correo electrónico para muchos estudiantes japoneses generalmente se imparte de una manera tradicional, pero ineficiente, basada en conferencias. Proponemos un sistema para ayudar a los estudiantes japoneses a escribir correos electrónicos a sus superiores (profesores, representantes de búsqueda de empleo, etc.). En primer lugar, investigamos la importancia de los correos electrónicos formales en Japón y lo que se necesita para escribir con éxito un correo electrónico formal. A continuación, desarrollamos el sistema de acuerdo con esas normas. Por último, evaluamos el sistema dos veces. Los resultados, aunque se realizaron en un pequeño número de muestras, fueron generalmente positivos e indicaron claramente formas adicionales de mejorar el sistema.', 'ja': '電子メールは、現在のインターネット上のあらゆる年齢の人々に広く使用されているコミュニケーションツールであり、特に日本のビジネスやフォーマルな状況で多く使用されています。さらに、日本の電子メールコミュニケーションには、専門のガイドブックを使用して教える特定のルールがあります。多くの日本人学生の電子メールリテラシー教育は、通常、伝統的でありながら非効率的な講義ベースの方法で提供されます。上司（教員、求人担当者など）宛ての電子メールで日本人学生を応援する制度を提案します。まず、日本における正式な電子メールの重要性と、正式な電子メールを書くために必要なことについて調査を行います。次に、それらのルールに従ってシステムを開発します。最後に、システムを2つに分けて評価しました。結果は、少数の試料で行われたものの、概して陽性であり、システムを改善するための追加の方法を明確に示した。', 'zh': '电子邮件当今互联网上所有年龄段人广用通信之具,常用于商务正场,特在日本。 又日语电子邮件通书有专业指南教授之特定。 诸生之于日本者,电子邮件扫盲教常以旧法而低效者,讲座法也。 建一系统,赞日本学生(教师,求代等)书电子邮件。 首访正电子邮件日本重要,及成功撰正电子邮件所需。 接下来,我们据此开发系统。 最后对系统重评。 虽于少样品之上,总体阳性,明改统之方。', 'hi': 'ई-मेल एक संचार उपकरण है जिसका उपयोग आज इंटरनेट पर सभी उम्र के लोगों द्वारा व्यापक रूप से किया जाता है, अक्सर व्यापार और औपचारिक स्थितियों में, विशेष रूप से जापान में। इसके अलावा, जापानी ई-मेल संचार में विशिष्ट गाइडबुक का उपयोग करके सिखाए जाने वाले विशिष्ट नियमों का एक सेट है। कई जापानी छात्रों के लिए ई-मेल साक्षरता शिक्षा आमतौर पर एक पारंपरिक, अभी तक अक्षम व्याख्यान-आधारित तरीके से प्रदान की जाती है। हम वरिष्ठ ों (शिक्षकों, नौकरी शिकार प्रतिनिधियों, आदि) को ई-मेल लिखने में जापानी छात्रों का समर्थन करने के लिए एक प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम सबसे पहले जापान में औपचारिक ई-मेल के महत्व की जांच करते हैं, और एक औपचारिक ई-मेल को सफलतापूर्वक लिखने के लिए क्या आवश्यक है। इसके बाद, हम उन नियमों के अनुसार प्रणाली विकसित करते हैं। अंत में, हमने सिस्टम का दो गुना मूल्यांकन किया। परिणाम, हालांकि नमूनों की एक छोटी संख्या पर प्रदर्शन किया गया था, आम तौर पर सकारात्मक थे, और स्पष्ट रूप से सिस्टम को बेहतर बनाने के लिए अतिरिक्त तरीकों का संकेत दिया।', 'ru': 'Электронная почта - это коммуникационный инструмент, широко используемый сегодня людьми всех возрастов в Интернете, часто в деловых и формальных ситуациях, особенно в Японии. Кроме того, японская электронная почта имеет набор конкретных правил, преподаваемых с использованием специализированных путеводителей. Обучение грамоте по электронной почте для многих японских студентов, как правило, осуществляется традиционным, но неэффективным способом на основе лекций. Мы предлагаем систему поддержки японских студентов в написании электронных писем начальству (учителя, представители по поиску работы и т.д.). Во-первых, мы изучаем важность официальных электронных писем в Японии и то, что необходимо для успешного написания официального электронного письма. Далее мы разрабатываем систему в соответствии с этими правилами. Наконец, мы оценили систему в два раза. Результаты, хотя и были получены на небольшом количестве образцов, в целом были положительными и четко указывали на дополнительные способы улучшения системы.', 'ga': 'Uirlis chumarsáide is ea ríomhphost a úsáideann daoine de gach aois ar an Idirlíon sa lá atá inniu ann, go minic i gcúrsaí gnó agus foirmeálta, go háirithe sa tSeapáin. Ina theannta sin, tá sraith rialacha sonracha ag cumarsáid ríomhphoist na Seapáine a mhúintear trí úsáid a bhaint as treoirleabhair speisialaithe. Is gnách go gcuirtear oideachas litearthachta ríomhphoist ar fáil do go leor mac léinn Seapánach ar bhealach traidisiúnta, ach neamhéifeachtúil, bunaithe ar léachtaí. Molaimid córas chun tacú le mic léinn Seapánacha agus iad ag scríobh ríomhphoist chuig ceannairí (múinteoirí, ionadaithe tóraíochta poist, etc.). Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an gcéad dul síos ar an tábhacht a bhaineann le ríomhphoist fhoirmiúla sa tSeapáin, agus ar a bhfuil ag teastáil chun R-phost foirmiúil a scríobh go rathúil. Ansin, déanaimid forbairt ar an gcóras de réir na rialacha sin. Ar deireadh, rinneamar measúnú ar an gcóras faoi dhó. Bhí na torthaí, cé go ndearnadh iad ar líon beag samplaí, dearfach go ginearálta, agus léirigh siad go soiléir bealaí breise chun an córas a fheabhsú.', 'el': 'Το ηλεκτρονικό ταχυδρομείο είναι ένα εργαλείο επικοινωνίας που χρησιμοποιείται ευρέως από ανθρώπους όλων των ηλικιών στο Διαδίκτυο σήμερα, συχνά σε επιχειρηματικές και επίσημες καταστάσεις, ειδικά στην Ιαπωνία. Επιπλέον, η ιαπωνική επικοινωνία ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου έχει ένα σύνολο ειδικών κανόνων που διδάσκονται χρησιμοποιώντας εξειδικευμένους οδηγούς. Η εκπαίδευση γραμματισμού ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου για πολλούς Ιάπωνες φοιτητές παρέχεται συνήθως με έναν παραδοσιακό, αλλά αναποτελεσματικό τρόπο βασισμένο σε διαλέξεις. Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα υποστήριξης των Γιαπωνέζων μαθητών στη συγγραφή ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου σε ανώτερους (καθηγητές, εκπρόσωποι αναζήτησης εργασίας κ.λπ.). Αρχικά κάνουμε μια έρευνα σχετικά με τη σημασία των επίσημων μηνυμάτων ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου στην Ιαπωνία, και τι χρειάζεται για να γράψουμε με επιτυχία ένα επίσημο μήνυμα ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου. Στη συνέχεια, αναπτύσσουμε το σύστημα σύμφωνα με αυτούς τους κανόνες. Τέλος, αξιολογήσαμε το σύστημα δύο φορές. Τα αποτελέσματα, αν και επιτεύχθηκαν σε μικρό αριθμό δειγμάτων, ήταν γενικά θετικά και έδειξαν σαφώς πρόσθετους τρόπους βελτίωσης του συστήματος.', 'hu': 'Az e-mail egy kommunikációs eszköz, amelyet ma minden korosztály széles körben használ az interneten, gyakran üzleti és formális helyzetekben, különösen Japánban. Továbbá a japán e-mail kommunikáció speciális szabályokat tartalmaz speciális útikönyvek segítségével. Az e-mail írástudás oktatása sok japán diák számára jellemzően hagyományos, mégis nem hatékony előadáson alapuló módon történik. Javasolunk egy olyan rendszert, amely támogatja a japán diákokat abban, hogy e-maileket írjanak a feletteseknek (tanárok, álláskereső képviselők stb.). Először is vizsgáljuk meg a hivatalos e-mailek Japánban történő fontosságát, és hogy mire van szükség a hivatalos e-mailek sikeres írásához. Ezután ezeknek a szabályoknak megfelelően fejlesztjük ki a rendszert. Végül kétszeresen értékeltük a rendszert. Az eredmények, bár kis számú mintán végeztek, általában pozitívak voltak, és egyértelműen jelezték a rendszer további javításának módját.', 'ka': 'ელფოსტა არის კომუნიკაციის ხელსაწყო, რომელიც დღეს ყველა წლის ადამიანები ინტერნეტში გამოყენებულია, ბიზნეზი და ფორმალური სიტაციაში, განსაკუთრებით დამატებით, იაპონიური ელფოსტური კომუნიკაცია აქვს სპეციფიკალური კომუნიკაცია, რომელიც გამოყენებული სპეციალური კომუნიკაცი ელფოსტური სიტყვარული განათლება წონონიური სტუდენტებისთვის ტიპულად განახლება ტრადიციონალური, მაგრამ არაფექტიური ლექსტურის გარეშე. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ სისტემა, რომელიც წაპონული სტუდენტებს წერით ელფოსტაციების შესახებ (სტუდენტები, პროცენტაციების შესახებ და განმავლებელი და გან ჩვენ პირველი ადგილური ელემენტების მნიშვნელობაზე გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც საჭიროა სფორმალური ელემენტის წერტილის შესახებ. შემდეგ, ჩვენ სისტემის განვითარებით ამ წესების შესახებ. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ორჯერ სისტემის გავაკეთებდით. წარმოდგენები, თუმცა რამდენიმე პატარა წარმოდგენების შესახებ, იყო საერთოდ პოტიფიკაციური, და წარმოდგენია დამატებული გზები სისტემის გაუფლებელებ', 'it': "L'e-mail è uno strumento di comunicazione ampiamente utilizzato da persone di tutte le età su Internet oggi, spesso in situazioni commerciali e formali, soprattutto in Giappone. Inoltre, la comunicazione e-mail giapponese ha una serie di regole specifiche insegnate utilizzando guide specializzate. L'educazione all'alfabetizzazione via e-mail per molti studenti giapponesi è tipicamente fornita in un modo tradizionale, ma inefficiente basato sulle lezioni. Proponiamo un sistema per supportare gli studenti giapponesi nella scrittura di e-mail ai superiori (insegnanti, rappresentanti di ricerca di lavoro, ecc.). In primo luogo facciamo un'indagine sull'importanza delle e-mail formali in Giappone e su ciò che è necessario per scrivere con successo una e-mail formale. Successivamente, sviluppiamo il sistema in conformità a tali regole. Infine, abbiamo valutato il sistema in due modi. I risultati, sebbene eseguiti su un piccolo numero di campioni, sono stati generalmente positivi e indicano chiaramente ulteriori modi per migliorare il sistema.", 'lt': 'E. paštas yra ryšių priemonė, kurią šiandien plačiai naudoja visų amžiaus žmonės internete, dažnai verslo ir oficialiose situacijose, ypač Japonijoje. Be to, Japonijos e. pašto komunikate pateikiamos specialios taisyklės, mokomos naudojant specialias vadovas. Daugelio Japonijos studentų e. pašto raštingumo mokymas paprastai teikiamas tradiciniu, tačiau neveiksmingu būdu. Siūlome sistemą, pagal kurią Japonijos studentai galėtų rašyti e. paštus vyresniesiems (mokytojams, darbo medžioklės atstovams ir t. t.). Pirmiausia atliekame oficialių e. paštų svarbos Japonijoje tyrimą ir tai, kas būtina, kad būtų sėkmingai rašomas oficialus e. paštas. Kita vertus, plėtojame sistemą pagal tas taisykles. Galiausiai įvertinome sistemą du kartus. Nors rezultatai buvo gauti iš nedidelio mėginių skaičiaus, jie buvo iš esmės teigiami ir aiškiai parodė, kaip pagerinti sistemą.', 'kk': 'Эл. пошта - Бүгін Интернеттегі барлық жастардың адамдары көп қолданылатын коммуникациялық құралы, көптеген бизнес және официалдық жағдайда, осылай қатар Японияд Сонымен қатар, жапон эл. пошта коммуникациясы арнаулы бағыттамасын қолдану үшін бірнеше ережелер бар. Жапон студенттерінің көпшілігі үшін эл. пошта әріптері әдетте әдеттегі, бірақ әріптерді негіздеген әріптердің көмегімен береді. Біз жапон студенттерін бағалаушыларға эл. пошта жазуына қолдау жүйесін ұсынамыз (мұғалім, жұмыс ақылаушылар және т. б.). Біз біріншіден Жапониядағы официальны эл. пошта маңыздығын және официальны эл. пошта жазуға қажет болатынын зерттеуді жасадық. Келесіден бұл ережелерге сәйкес жүйені жасаймыз. Соңында, жүйені екі рет бағаладық. Жүйені жасау үшін қосымша жолдары көрсетілген нәтижелер көп нәтижелері болды.', 'mk': 'Електронската пошта е комуникациска алатка широко употребена од луѓе од сите возрасти на интернет денес, често во бизнис и формални ситуации, особено во Јапонија. Покрај тоа, јапонската комуникација со електронска пошта има набор специфични правила кои се научуваат користејќи специјализирани водички книги. Електронско литературно образование за многу јапонски студенти обично се обезбедува на традиционален, но неефикасен начин базиран на предавања. Предложуваме систем за поддршка на јапонските студенти во пишувањето на електронски пошта на надлежниците (професори, претставници за лов на работа итн.). Прво правиме истрага за важноста на официјалните електронски пошта во Јапонија и она што е потребно за успешно да се напише официјален електронски пошта. Следно, го развиваме системот во согласност со тие правила. Конечно, го проценивме системот двапати. Резултатите, иако извршени на мал број примероци, беа генерално позитивни и јасно покажаа дополнителни начини за подобрување на системот.', 'ms': 'E-mel adalah alat komunikasi yang banyak digunakan oleh orang dari semua usia di Internet hari ini, sering dalam situasi perniagaan dan rasmi, terutama di Jepun. Selain itu, komunikasi E-mel Jepun mempunyai set peraturan khusus yang diajarkan menggunakan buku panduan khusus. Pendidikan kebijaksanaan e-mel untuk ramai pelajar Jepun biasanya disediakan dengan cara tradisional, tetapi tidak efektif berdasarkan pelajaran. We propose a system to support Japanese students in writing E-mails to superiors (teachers, job hunting representatives, etc.).  Pertama-tama, kami melakukan penyelidikan tentang penting e-mel rasmi di Jepun, dan apa yang diperlukan untuk menulis e-mel rasmi dengan sukses. Kemudian, kita mengembangkan sistem sesuai dengan peraturan itu. Akhirnya, kita menilai sistem dua kali. Hasilnya, walaupun dilakukan pada sejumlah kecil sampel, secara umum positif, dan jelas menunjukkan cara tambahan untuk meningkatkan sistem.', 'mt': "Il-posta elettronika hija għodda ta’ komunikazzjoni użata b’mod wiesa’ minn nies ta’ kull età fuq l-Internet illum, spiss f’sitwazzjonijiet kummerċjali u formali, speċjalment fil-Ġappun. Barra minn hekk, il-komunikazzjoni bil-posta elettronika Ġappuniża għandha sett ta’ regoli speċifiċi mgħallma bl-użu ta’ gwidi speċjalizzati. L-edukazzjoni tal-litteriżmu bil-posta elettronika għal ħafna studenti Ġappuniżi hija tipikament ipprovduta b’mod tradizzjonali iżda ineffiċjenti bbażat fuq lezzjonijiet. Aħna nipproponu sistema li tappoġġja lill-istudenti Ġappuniżi bil-miktub ta' e-mails lil superjuri (għalliema, rappreżentanti tal-kaċċa tax-xogħol, eċċ.). We firstly make an investigation into the importance of formal E-mails in Japan, and what is needed to successfully write a formal E-mail.  Imbagħad, niżviluppaw is-sistema skont dawk ir-regoli. Fl-aħħar nett, evalwajna s-sistema darbtejn. Ir-riżultati, għalkemm imwettqa fuq numru żgħir ta’ kampjuni, kienu ġeneralment pożittivi, u indikaw b’mod ċar modi addizzjonali biex titjieb is-sistema.", 'ml': 'എല്ലാ വയസ്സുകാരും ഇന്ന് ഇന്നത്തെ ഇന്റെര്\u200dനെറ്റില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെയില്\u200d മെയില്\u200d ആണ്, പ്രാവശ്യം ബിസിനസും ഫോളില്\u200d സ് അതുകൊണ്ടും, ജപ്പാനീസ് ഈമെയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വിശിഷ്ടമായ ഗൈഡിബുക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച് പല ജാപ്പാനീസ് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും ഈമെയില്\u200d സാധാരണ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം സാധാ ജാപ്പനീസ് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മുന്\u200dഗണന്\u200dമാര ആദ്യം ജാപ്പാനിലെ ഫോര്\u200dമില്\u200d ഈമെയിലുകളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു അന്വേഷണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d വി അടുത്തത്, ആ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തെ വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ രണ്ടിരട്ടി വിലയിച്ചു. ചെറിയ മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിരുന്നെങ്കിലും അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ പ്രാദേശികമായിരുന്നു. സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് മു', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр Интернет дээрх бүх настай хүмүүсийн ашиглаж байгаа электрон-шуудан бол бизнес, официальны нөхцөлд, ялангуяа Японд хэрэглэгддэг харилцааны хэрэгсэл юм. Мөн Японы эл.поштын холбоотой холбоотой нь мэргэжлийн удирдлага номоор ашиглаж сургалтын хэдэн тодорхой дүрэм байдаг. Ихэнх Японы оюутнуудад эл.поштын бичил үсэг зохиолын боловсрол нь уламжлалтай, гэхдээ эффективнэй лекцийн суурь замаар хангадаг. Бид япон оюутнуудыг эмэгтэйчүүдэд (багш нар, ажлын эмчилгээний захирагчид, т.б.), эл. поштааг бичиж чадахын тулд туслах системийг санал өгдөг. Эхлээд бид Япон дахь официальн эл.почтын чухал чухал зүйлийг судалж, официальн эл.почтыг амжилттай бичих хэрэгтэй зүйлийг хийсэн. Дараа нь бид системийг тэдгээр дүрмийн харьцуулалтай хөгжүүлнэ. Эцэст нь бид системийг хоёр дахин үнэлгээ үзсэн. Үүний үр дүнд жижиг хэмжээний жинхэнэ жинхэнэ хэмжээнд хийгдсэн ч, ихэвчлэн эерэг байсан ба системийг сайжруулахын тулд нэмэлт арга замыг тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'E-mail to narzędzie komunikacyjne szeroko stosowane przez ludzi w każdym wieku w Internecie, często w sytuacjach biznesowych i formalnych, zwłaszcza w Japonii. Ponadto japońska komunikacja e-mail ma zestaw specyficznych zasad nauczanych za pomocą specjalistycznych przewodników. Edukacja czytania e-mail dla wielu japońskich studentów jest zazwyczaj zapewniana w tradycyjny, ale nieefektywny sposób oparty na wykładach. Proponujemy system wspierania japońskich studentów w pisaniu e-maili do przełożonych (nauczycieli, przedstawicieli poszukiwań pracy itp.). Najpierw przeprowadzamy dochodzenie w sprawie znaczenia formalnych e-maili w Japonii i tego, co jest potrzebne do skutecznego napisania formalnego e-maila. Następnie opracowujemy system zgodnie z tymi zasadami. W końcu oceniliśmy system podwójnie. Wyniki, choć przeprowadzone na niewielkiej liczbie próbek, były ogólnie pozytywne i wyraźnie wskazywały dodatkowe sposoby poprawy systemu.', 'ro': 'E-mailul este un instrument de comunicare utilizat pe scară largă de oameni de toate vârstele pe Internet astăzi, adesea în situații de afaceri și formale, în special în Japonia. Mai mult decât atât, comunicarea japoneză prin e-mail are un set de reguli specifice predate folosind ghiduri specializate. Educația de alfabetizare prin e-mail pentru mulți studenți japonezi este de obicei oferită într-un mod tradițional, dar ineficient bazat pe lecții. Propunem un sistem de sprijinire a studenților japonezi în scrierea de e-mail-uri superiorilor (profesori, reprezentanți de căutare de locuri de muncă, etc.). În primul rând facem o investigație asupra importanței e-mailurilor formale în Japonia și a ceea ce este necesar pentru a scrie cu succes un e-mail oficial. Apoi, dezvoltăm sistemul în conformitate cu aceste reguli. În cele din urmă, am evaluat sistemul dublu. Rezultatele, deși efectuate pe un număr mic de probe, au fost în general pozitive și au indicat în mod clar modalități suplimentare de îmbunătățire a sistemului.', 'no': 'E-post er eit kommunikasjonsverktøy som breidde brukar folk av alle alder på Internett i dag, ofte i forretningar og formelte situasjonar, spesielt i Japan. I tillegg har Japansk e-post-kommunikasjon eit sett spesifikke reglar lært med spesialiserte hjelpelinjer. Utdanning av e-postbokstavar for mange japanske studenter er vanlegvis tilgjengeleg i ein tradisjonell, men uavhengig øvingsbasert måte. Vi foreslår eit system for å støtte japanske studenter i skriving av e-post til høgare (lærarar, jobbjagsrepresentanter osv.). Vi gjer først eit forsøk om viktigheten for formelte e-post i Japan, og det som treng for å skriva ein formelt e-post. Neste utviklar vi systemet etter dei reglane. I slutt, vi evaluerte systemet to gamle. Resultatet, selv om utførte på eit lite tal prøver, var vanlegvis positivt, og tydelig viste fleire måtar å forbetra systemet.', 'si': 'අද ඉංටර්නේට් එකේ සියලුම වයස් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ උපකරණයක්, සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාප තවත්, ජාපානියේ ඊ-මේල් සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා විශේෂ මාර්ගපුත් භාවිත කරන්න සිද්ධ විශේ ජාපාන් විද්\u200dයාපියෝ ගොඩක් විද්\u200dයාපියෝ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත වි අපි ජාපාන් විද්\u200dයාපියෝ ඉංචිකාරියෝ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dය අපි මුලින්ම පරීක්ෂණයක් ජාපාන් වල සාමාන්තික e-mail ගැන විශ්වාස කරනවා, සමහරවිට සාමාන්තික e-mail එකක් ලියන්න ඕනේ  ඊළඟට, අපි පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා ඒ නීතියට අනුවෙන්. අන්තිමේදී, අපි පද්ධතිය දෙකක් විශ්වාස කළා. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'sr': 'E-mail je komunikacijski alat koji danas koristi ljudi od svih godina na internetu, često u poslovnim i formalnim situacijama, posebno u Japanu. Osim toga, japanska komunikacija e-mail a ima gomilu specifičnih pravila koje se uče koristeći specijalizovane vodiče. Obièno se obrazovanje književnosti e-mail a mnogim japanskim studentima pruža tradicionalni, ali neefektivan način na osnovu predavanja. Predlažemo sistem za podršku japanskim studentima pisanjem e-maila nadređenima (nastavnicima, predstavnicima lova na posao, itd.). Prvo napravimo istragu o važnosti formalnih e-mailova u Japanu i ono što je potrebno da uspešno napišemo formalnu e-mail. Sledeće, razvijamo sistem u skladu sa tim pravilima. Konačno smo procenili sistem dva puta. Rezultati, iako su provedeni na malom broju uzorka, uglavnom su bili pozitivni i jasno su ukazali na dodatni način da poboljšamo sistem.', 'so': "E-mailka waa qalabka xiriirka ee dadka da'da ah ee internetka maanta lagu isticmaalo, inta badan xaaladaha ganacsiga iyo waxqabadka rasmiga ah, khusuusan Japan. Wargelinta e-mailka Japanese waxay leeyihiin qaynuun gaar ah oo lagu baray isticmaalka hagitaanka gaarka ah. Waxbarashada aqoonta e-mailka ee ardayda badan ee Jabanees waxaa sida caadiga ah loo bixiyaa qaab caadi ah, laakiin waxbarasho ku sahlan. Waxaan horumarinaynaa nidaam in ay u kaalmeeyaan ardayda Jabaneeska oo ku qoraya e-mailka dadka madaxda ah (macallimiin, shaqo raadinta, etc.) Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu baaritaan muhiimka ah e-mailka rasmiga ah ee Japan, waxana loo baahan yahay inay ku qoraan e-mailka rasmi ah. Dabadeedna waxaan horumarinnaa nidaamka si waafaqsan sharciyadaas. ugu danbaysay, waxaynu qiimeynay nidaamka laba jibbaar. Midhihii, in kastoo ay samooyin yar ku sameeyeen, waxay ahaayeen kuwo si dhab ah, waxaana si cad looga caddeeyey wadooyin dheeraad ah si ay u hagaajiyaan nidaamka.", 'sv': 'E-post är ett kommunikationsverktyg som används ofta av människor i alla åldrar på Internet idag, ofta i affärer och formella situationer, särskilt i Japan. Dessutom har japansk e-postkommunikation en uppsättning specifika regler som lärs ut med hjälp av specialiserade guideböcker. E-postläskunnighet utbildning för många japanska studenter ges vanligtvis på ett traditionellt men ineffektivt föreläsningssätt. Vi föreslår ett system för att stödja japanska studenter i att skriva e-post till överordnade (lärare, jobbsökare, etc.). Vi undersöker först vikten av formella e-postmeddelanden i Japan och vad som behövs för att framgångsrikt kunna skriva ett formellt e-postmeddelande. Därefter utvecklar vi systemet enligt dessa regler. Slutligen utvärderade vi systemet dubbelt. Resultaten, även om de utfördes på ett litet antal prover, var generellt positiva och visade tydligt på ytterligare sätt att förbättra systemet.', 'ta': 'மின்னஞ்சல் இன்று இணையத்தில் உள்ள அனைத்து வயதானவர்களாலும் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் ஒரு தொடர்பு கருவியாகும், பெரும்பாலும் வியாப மேலும், ஜப்பானிய மின்னஞ்சல் தொடர்பு சில குறிப்பிட்ட விதிகள் கொண்டுள்ளது சிறப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட குற பலர் ஜப்பானிய மாணவர்களுக்கு மின்னஞ்சல் எழுத்துரு கல்வி வழங்கப்படுகிறது வழக்கமாக ஒரு மரபார்ந்த, ஆனால் தொடர்ந்து பா நாம் ஜப்பானிய மாணவர்களுக்கு மிக மேலாளர்களுக்கு மின்னஞ்சல்களை எழுதும் முறைமையை ஆதரிக்க ஒரு அமைப்பு பரிந்துரைக் முதலில் நாம் ஜப்பானில் வடிவமைப்பு மின்னஞ்சல் முக்கியத்தில் ஒரு விசாரணையை செய்ய வேண்டும், வெற்றிகரமாக ஒரு மின்னஞ்சல அடுத்து, நாம் அந்த விதிகளை பொறுத்து அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம். Finally, we evaluated the system twofold.  முடிவுகள், சிறிய மாதிரிகளில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டாலும், பொதுவாக நேர்மையானது, முறைமையை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் கூடுதல', 'ur': 'ایمیل آج کے تمام عمر انٹرنیٹ میں لوگوں کے ذریعہ وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، اکثر تجارت اور رسمی موقعیت میں، مخصوصا ژاپن میں. اور زیادہ، جاپانی ایمیل ارتباط کا ایک مجموعہ مخصوص ہدایت کتابوں کے استعمال سے سکھایا گیا ہے۔ بہت سی جاپانی دانشجوں کے لئے ایمیل لکھائی تعلیم معمولاً ایک سنتی، لیکن ناتاثیر لکھائی کی بنیادی طریقہ سے پیش کیا جاتا ہے. ہم ایک سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ جاپانی دانش آموزوں کو اپنا ایمیل لکھنے کے لئے مدد کریں (استاد، شہادت کی نمائندوں، غیر اضافہ)۔ ہم پہلی بار جاپان میں سائل ایمیل کی اہم بات کے بارے میں ایک تحقیق کر رہے ہیں، اور جو کامل طور پر ایک سائل ایمیل لکھنے کی ضرورت ہے۔ پھر ہم اس سیستم کو ان قوانین کے مطابق تولید کرتے ہیں۔ آخر میں ہم نے سیسٹم کو دوگنا ارزش کیا۔ نتائج، اگرچہ ایک چھوٹی نمونوں پر عمل کیا گیا تھا، ان کے ساتھ عموماً مثبت تھے، اور صریح طور پر سیسٹم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اضافہ طریقے دکھائے گئے۔', 'uz': "E-mail bugun Internetdagi hamma odamlar juda katta ishlatilgan aloqa asbobi, oddiy vazifalar va shaxsiy holatda, hususiyat Japanda. Koʻrsatilgan, Yaponcha elektron pochta aloqalarida foydalanuvchi hodisa qoidalar mavjud. Ko'pchilik o'quvchilar uchun elektron pochta ta ta'lim o'qituvchisi oddiy tabiiy, lekin lekin o'qituvga emas. Biz Japoni o'quvchilarini e-mail yordamida o'qituvchilarga (o'qituvchilar, ishni suhbat representlari, etc.) yordamida qoʻllashga tayyorlash uchun tizimni rivojlanamiz. Birinchi marta, Yaponiyadagi formal e-mail muhimligiga qidirib, va muvaffaqiyatli elektron pochta yozish kerak. Keyingi, biz tizimni shu qoidalar bilan tugatamiz. Finally, we evaluated the system twofold.  @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'E-mail là một công cụ thông tin được phổ biến bởi mọi người ở mọi lứa trên Internet ngày nay, thường trong tình huống kinh doanh và trang trọng, đặc biệt ở Nhật Bản. Bên cạnh đó, Nhật Bản thông tin e-mail có những quy định cụ thể được dạy sử dụng sách hướng dẫn đặc biệt. Giáo dục văn học e-mail cho nhiều sinh viên Nhật Bản thường được cung cấp theo một cách truyền thống, nhưng không hiệu quả. Chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống hỗ trợ học sinh Nhật viết thư điện tử cho cấp trên (giáo viên, người đại diện săn việc làm việc, v.v). Trước hết, chúng ta sẽ tiến hành điều tra xem tầm quan trọng của e-mail chính thức ở Nhật, và những gì cần thiết để viết một e-mail chính thức thành công. Tiếp theo, chúng tôi phát triển hệ thống theo những quy định đó. Cuối cùng, chúng ta đã đánh giá kép. Kết quả, mặc dù đã được thực hiện trên một số lượng nhỏ, đều là tích cực, và rõ ràng là những cách khác để cải thiện hệ thống.', 'bg': 'Електронната поща е комуникационен инструмент, широко използван от хора от всички възрасти в интернет днес, често в бизнес и официални ситуации, особено в Япония. Освен това, японската електронна комуникация има набор от специфични правила, преподавани чрез специализирани наръчници. Образованието по електронна грамотност за много японски студенти обикновено се предоставя по традиционен, но неефективен, базиран на лекции начин. Предлагаме система за подпомагане на японските ученици при писането на имейли до началници (учители, представители за търсене на работа и др.). Първо правим разследване на значението на официалните имейли в Япония и какво е необходимо за успешно написване на официални имейли. След това разработваме системата в съответствие с тези правила. Накрая, оценявахме системата двойно. Резултатите, въпреки че са извършени върху малък брой проби, като цяло са положителни и ясно посочват допълнителни начини за подобряване на системата.', 'nl': 'E-mail is een communicatiemiddel dat tegenwoordig veel wordt gebruikt door mensen van alle leeftijden op het internet, vaak in zakelijke en formele situaties, vooral in Japan. Bovendien kent Japanse e-mailcommunicatie een reeks specifieke regels die worden onderwezen met behulp van gespecialiseerde gidsen. E-mail geletterdheid onderwijs voor veel Japanse studenten wordt meestal aangeboden op een traditionele, maar inefficiënte manier gebaseerd op lezingen. Wij stellen een systeem voor om Japanse studenten te ondersteunen bij het schrijven van e-mails naar leidinggevenden (leraren, vertegenwoordigers voor het zoeken naar werk, enz.). We doen eerst een onderzoek naar het belang van formele e-mails in Japan, en wat er nodig is om succesvol een formele e-mail te schrijven. Vervolgens ontwikkelen we het systeem volgens die regels. Ten slotte hebben we het systeem tweeledig geëvalueerd. De resultaten, hoewel uitgevoerd op een klein aantal monsters, waren over het algemeen positief en gaven duidelijk aanvullende manieren aan om het systeem te verbeteren.', 'da': 'E-mail er et kommunikationsværktøj, der i vid udstrækning anvendes af mennesker i alle aldre på internettet i dag, ofte i erhvervsmæssige og formelle situationer, især i Japan. Desuden har japansk e-mail kommunikation et sæt specifikke regler undervist ved hjælp af specialiserede guidebøger. E-mail literacy undervisning for mange japanske studerende leveres typisk på en traditionel, men ineffektiv forelæsningsbaseret måde. Vi foreslår et system til at støtte japanske studerende i at skrive e-mails til overordnede (lærere, jobjagt repræsentanter osv.). Vi undersøger først vigtigheden af formelle e-mails i Japan, og hvad der er nødvendigt for at kunne skrive en formel e-mail. Dernæst udvikler vi systemet i overensstemmelse med disse regler. Endelig evaluerede vi systemet dobbelt. Selv om resultaterne blev udført på et lille antal prøver, var resultaterne generelt positive og tydeligt indikerede yderligere måder at forbedre systemet.', 'hr': 'E-mail je komunikacijski alat koji se danas široko koristi ljudi svih godina na internetu, često u poslovnim i formalnim situacijama, posebno u Japanu. Osim toga, japanska komunikacija e-mail a ima skup određenih pravila podučavanih koristeći specijalizirane vodiče. Obično se obrazovanje književnosti e-mail a mnogim japanskim studentima predstavlja na tradicionalni, ali neefektivan način na temelju predavanja. Predlažemo sistem za podršku japanskim studentima pisanjem e-maila nadređenima (nastavnicima, predstavnicima lova na posao itd.). Prvo napravimo istragu o važnosti formalnih e-mailova u Japanu i ono što je potrebno za uspješno napisati formalnu e-mail. Sledeće, razvijamo sustav u skladu s tim pravilima. Konačno smo procijenili sistem dva puta. Rezultati, iako su provedeni na malom broju uzorka, obično su pozitivni i jasno su pokazali dodatni način za poboljšanje sustava.', 'de': 'E-Mail ist ein Kommunikationsinstrument, das heute von Menschen jeden Alters im Internet häufig verwendet wird, häufig in geschäftlichen und formalen Situationen, insbesondere in Japan. Darüber hinaus hat die japanische E-Mail-Kommunikation eine Reihe von spezifischen Regeln, die mit Hilfe von spezialisierten Leitfäden gelehrt werden. E-Mail Alphabetisierung Ausbildung für viele japanische Studenten wird in der Regel auf traditionelle, aber ineffiziente Vorlesungsbasierte Weise angeboten. Wir schlagen ein System vor, das japanische Studenten beim Schreiben von E-Mails an Vorgesetzte (Lehrer, Jobsucher usw.) unterstützt. Zunächst untersuchen wir die Bedeutung formaler E-Mails in Japan und was notwendig ist, um eine formelle E-Mail erfolgreich zu schreiben. Als nächstes entwickeln wir das System nach diesen Regeln. Schließlich haben wir das System zweifach bewertet. Die Ergebnisse, obwohl sie an einer kleinen Anzahl von Proben durchgeführt wurden, waren im Allgemeinen positiv und deuteten eindeutig auf zusätzliche Möglichkeiten zur Verbesserung des Systems hin.', 'id': 'E-mail adalah alat komunikasi yang sering digunakan oleh orang dari semua usia di Internet hari ini, sering dalam bisnis dan situasi formal, terutama di Jepang. Selain itu, komunikasi E-mail Jepang memiliki set aturan khusus yang diajarkan menggunakan buku panduan khusus. Pendidikan kebijaksanaan e-mail untuk banyak siswa Jepang biasanya disediakan dengan cara tradisional, namun tidak efektif berdasarkan kuliah. Kami mengusulkan sebuah sistem untuk mendukung siswa Jepang dalam menulis e-mail kepada atasan (guru, wakil berburu pekerjaan, dll.). Pertama-tama kami melakukan penyelidikan tentang penting email formal di Jepang, dan apa yang diperlukan untuk sukses menulis email formal. Selanjutnya, kita mengembangkan sistem sesuai dengan aturan-aturan tersebut. Akhirnya, kami mengevaluasi sistem dua kali. Hasilnya, meskipun dilakukan pada sejumlah kecil sampel, umumnya positif, dan jelas menunjukkan cara tambahan untuk memperbaiki sistem.', 'fa': 'ایمیل یک ابزار ارتباطی است که امروز توسط مردم از تمام سن\u200cها در اینترنت استفاده می\u200cشود، اغلب در وضعیت\u200cهای تجارت و رسمی، مخصوصا در ژاپن. علاوه بر این، ارتباط ایمیل ژاپنی یک مجموعه از قوانین خاص با استفاده از راهنمایی متخصص آموزش داده شده است. آموزش نامه\u200cای برای بسیاری از دانش\u200cآموزان ژاپنی معمولاً در یک روش سنتی و هنوز بر پایه\u200cی سخنرانی بی\u200cتاثیر تحصیل می\u200cشود. ما یک سیستم برای پشتیبانی دانش آموزان ژاپنی در نوشتن ایمیل به بالاترین (معلم\u200cها، نماینده\u200cهای شکار شغل و غیر از آن) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. اول ما یک تحقیق در مورد اهمیت ایمیل رسمی در ژاپن انجام می دهیم، و چیزی که لازمه است برای موفقیت یک ایمیل رسمی بنویسیم. بعدش، سیستم را با توجه به قوانین توسعه می\u200cکنیم. بالاخره، ما سیستم دو بار را ارزیابی کردیم. نتیجه\u200cها، اگرچه در تعداد نمونه\u200cهای کوچک انجام می\u200cشود، عموماً مثبت بودند و روش\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای برای بهبود کردن سیستم را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'ko': '전자메일은 현재 인터넷에서 각 연령대의 사람들이 광범위하게 사용하는 의사소통 수단으로 통상적으로 비즈니스와 공식적인 장소, 특히 일본에서 사용된다.또 일본의 전자메일 통신에는 전문 지침 교수를 사용하는 특정한 규칙이 있다.많은 일본 학생들을 대상으로 하는 전자메일 읽기와 쓰기 교육은 통상적으로 전통적이지만 효율이 낮은 수업 방식으로 제공된다.우리는 일본 학생들이 상급자(교사, 구직대표 등)에게 이메일을 보내는 것을 지원하는 시스템을 구축할 것을 건의합니다.우리는 먼저 정식 전자메일의 일본에서의 중요성과 정식 전자메일을 성공적으로 작성하는 데 필요한 것들을 조사했다.다음에 우리는 이러한 규칙에 따라 시스템을 개발한다.마지막으로 우리는 시스템에 대해 이중 평가를 진행했다.소량의 샘플을 검측했지만 결과는 전체적으로 양성이었고 시스템을 개선하는 다른 방법을 명확히 지적했다.', 'tr': 'E-poçta şu gün internedeki ähli ýa şlar tarapyndan ulanylan komunikaciýa aracı. Köplenç iş we formal ýagdaýlarda, iýdip Ýaponiýada. Ynsakda, Ýaponiýanyň e-mailleriň habarlaşmasynyň spesializ gurlap kitaplaryny ulanyp görkezilýän düzümleri bar. Ýaponiýa okuwçylary üçin e-mailleriň edebiýatlyk bilimi adatça däpli, ýöne lukmanyň daýanýan däldir. Biz japonça okuwçylary üstünlere e-mailler ýazmak üçin sistemasyny teklip edip görýäris (mugallymlar, işi avlamak temsilcileri, we.b.). Biz ilkinji gezek Japonydaky resmi e-mailleriň wajyplygyny soruşyp etdik we formal e-mailleriň üstüne gaty ýazmak üçin gerekli. Indiki bu kurallara görä sistemi geliştirdik. Soňunda sistemi ikinji gezek deňledik. Netijeler, kiçi bir sany örneklerde işlenýän bolsa hem olar pozitif we sistemi geliştirmek üçin golaýlaşdyrylýar.', 'af': "E-pos is 'n kommunikasie hulpmiddel wat vandag gebruik word deur mense van alle ouderlinge op die Internet, dikwels in besigheid en formele situasies, spesiaal in Japan. Ook het Japaanse e-poskommunikasie 'n stel spesifieke reëls geleer met spesialiseerde gidsbokke. E-pos literasieopvoeding vir baie japanse studente is tipies verskaf in 'n tradisionele, tog oneffektief onderwerp gebaseerde manier. Ons voorstel 'n stelsel om japanse studente te ondersteun in e-pos te skryf aan hoofde (onderwysers, werk jag voorstellings, ensfh.). Ons maak eerste 'n ondersoek binne die belangrikheid van formele e-pos in Japan, en wat nodig is om suksesvol 'n formele e-pos te skryf. Volgende, ons ontwikkel die stelsel met ooreenkomstig daardie reëls. Eindelik het ons die stelsel twee ou evalueer. Die resultate, alhoewel op 'n klein aantal voorbeelde uitgevoer is, was algemeen positief, en duidelik aanduidelik addisionele maniere om die stelsel te verbeter.", 'sw': 'Barua pepe ni zana ya mawasiliano inayotumiwa sana na watu wote wa umri wa mtandao wa intaneti leo, mara nyingi katika mazingira ya biashara na hali rasmi, hasa nchini Japan. Zaidi ya hayo, mawasiliano ya barua pepe ya Japani ina kanuni maalumu zilizofundishwa kwa kutumia vitabu maalumu. Elimu ya ufahamu wa barua pepe kwa wanafunzi wengi wa Japan kwa kawaida inatolewa kwa utamaduni, lakini haina ufanisi wa lugha. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa kuwaunga mkono wanafunzi wa Japan kwa kuandika barua pepe kwa wakuu (walimu, wawakilishi wa ajira, etc.). Kwanza tunafanya uchunguzi wa umuhimu wa barua pepe rasmi nchini Japan, na kile kinachohitajika kufanikiwa kuandika barua pepe rasmi. Baadae, tunaendelea mfumo kwa mujibu wa sheria hizo. Mwisho, tulitathmini mfumo huo mara mbili. Matokeo yake, ingawa yalifanyika kwa baadhi ya mifano michache, yalikuwa chanya sana, na yalionyesha wazi njia nyingine za kuboresha mfumo huo.', 'am': 'ኢሜይል ዛሬ በኢንተርኔት ላይ ያሉት ዓመታት ሁሉ የተጠቃሚ የግንኙነት ሀብት ነው፤ ብዙ ጊዜም በንግድ እና በተለይም ጉዳይ፣ ይልቁንም በጃፓን ነው፡፡ ደግሞም የጃፓን ኢሜይል ግንኙነት የባሕላዊ ቅድሚያ ገጽ በመጠቀም ያስተምራል፡፡ ብዙዎች የጃፓን ተማሪዎችን የኢሜይል የሐሳብቀት ትምህርት በተባሕላዊ፣ ነገር ግን በቋንቋ ቋንቋ አይችልም፡፡ የጃፓን ተማሪዎችን በኢሜይል ለመጻፍ የሻለቃዎች (አስተማሪዎች፣ የስራ ጉዳይ የፖለቲካዎች፣ etc) በመጻፍ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የኢሜይል መልዕክት የኢሜይል ግንኙነት እና የኢሜይል መልዕክት መጻፍ የሚያስፈልገውን ምርመራ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚያም፣ ስብስቡን እንደነዚህ ሕግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም ስብስቡን ሁለት እጥፍ አስተዋልነው ። ፍሬዎቹም በጥቂት ምሳሌዎች ላይ ቢፈጸሙ እንኳን አካባቢ አካባቢ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'E-mail është një mjet komunikimi i përdorur gjerësisht nga njerëzit e të gjitha moshëve në internet sot, shpesh në situata zyrtare dhe të biznesit, veçanërisht në Japoni. Përveç kësaj, komunikimi japonez e-mail ka një sërë rregullash specifike të mësuara duke përdorur udhëzues të specializuar. Arsimi i shkrimit në e-mail për shumë studentë japonezë zakonisht ofrohet në një mënyrë tradicionale, megjithatë jo efektive bazuar në leksione. Ne propozojmë një sistem për të mbështetur studentët japonezë në shkrimin e-mails për superiorët (mësuesit, përfaqësuesit e gjuetit të punës, etj.). Së pari bëjmë një hetim mbi rëndësinë e e e-maileve zyrtare në Japoni dhe atë që është e nevojshme për të shkruar me sukses një e-mail zyrtar. Pastaj, ne zhvillojmë sistemin sipas këtyre rregullave. Më në fund, ne vlerësuam sistemin dy herë. Rezultatet, megjithëse kryer në një numër të vogël mostrash, ishin përgjithësisht pozitive dhe treguan qartë mënyra shtesë për të përmirësuar sistemin.', 'az': "Bu gün internetteki bütün yaşların istifadə edilən e-poçt, çox iş və formal şəkildə, özellikle Japonya'da istifadə edilən komunikaciya vasitəsidir. Daha sonra, Japon e-poçt iletişimi müəyyən edilmiş rəhbər kitablarını istifadə etmək üçün öyrətilmiş müəyyən bir qutun vardır. Bir çox Japon öğrencilərinin e-poçt yazılımlığı təhsil olaraq sadəcə olaraq təhsil edilir, amma təhsil edilməz təhsil. Biz yaxşılıqlara e-maillər yazmaq üçün Japon öğrencilərinə kömək etmək üçün sistemi təklif edirik. Biz ilk dəfə Japonyada formal e-maillərin vacibətini və formal e-posta yazmaq üçün ehtiyacı olan məlumatları barəsində xəbərdar edirik. Sonra sistemi bu qanunlarla uyğunlaşdırırıq. Sonunda sistemi iki dəfə değerlendirdik. Növbətlər, küçük nümunələr üzərində işlədiyimiz halda, genellikle pozitif idi və sistemi yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün artıq yollar a çıq-aydın göstərildi.", 'bn': 'ই-মেইল হচ্ছে যোগাযোগ টুল ইন্টারনেটে ব্যবসা এবং আনুষ্ঠানিক পরিস্থিতিতে, বিশেষ করে জাপানে। এছাড়াও জাপানী ই-মেইল যোগাযোগের কিছু নির্দিষ্ট নিয়ম রয়েছে বিশেষ গাইডবুক ব্যবহার করে শিক্ষা দিয়েছে। অনেক জাপানী শিক্ষার্থীর জন্য ই-মেইল সাহিত্য শিক্ষা সাধারণত ঐতিহ্যবাহী ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাবে প্রদান করা হয়েছে। আমরা একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করছি জাপানী ছাত্রদের সমর্থন করার জন্য ইমেইল লেখায় (শিক্ষক, চাকরি শিকার প্রতিনিধি ইত্যাদি)। আমরা প্রথমত জাপানের আনুষ্ঠানিক ই-মেইলের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয়ে তদন্ত করেছি এবং যা সফলভাবে ইমেইল লিখতে হবে। পরবর্তীতে, আমরা এই নিয়ম অনুযায়ী সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন করি। অবশেষে, আমরা সিস্টেম দুইবার মূল্য করেছি। ফলাফল, যদিও সামান্য কয়েকটি নমুনা প্রদর্শন করা হয়, সাধারণত ইতিবাচক ছিল এবং পরিষ্কারভাবে সিস্টেম উন্নত করার জন্য আরো উপায় নির্দে', 'hy': 'Էլեկտրոնային նամակն այսօր համացանցում բոլոր տարիքների մարդկանց կողմից լայն օգտագործվող հաղորդակցման գործիք է, հաճախ բիզնես և պաշտոնական իրավիճակներում, հատկապես Ճապոնիայում: Ավելին, ճապոնական էլեկտրոնային հաղորդակցությունը ունի որոշ հատուկ կանոններ, որոնք սովորեցվում են հատուկ ուղեկցություններ օգտագործելով: Շատ ճապոնացի ուսանողների համար էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնային գրականության կրթությունը սովորաբար տրամադրվում է ավանդական, սակայն ոչ արդյունավետ լեկտրային հիմքով: We propose a system to support Japanese students in writing E-mails to superiors (teachers, job hunting representatives, etc.).  Առաջին հերթին մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք պաշտոնական էլեկտրոնային նամակների կարևորությունը Ճապոնիայում, և այն, ինչ անհրաժեշտ է պաշտոնական էլեկտրոնային նամակների հաջողությամբ գրելու համար: Հաջորդ, մենք զարգանում ենք համակարգը համաձայն այդ կանոններին: Վերջապես, մենք երկու անգամ գնահատեցինք համակարգը: Արդյունքները, չնայած դրանք կատարվել են մի փոքր քանակի նմուշների վրա, ընդհանուր առմամբ դրական էին, և ակնհայտորեն ցույց տվեցին համակարգի բարելավման ավելին ձևեր:', 'bs': 'E-mail je komunikacijski alat koji se široko koristi ljudi svih godina na internetu danas, često u poslovnim i formalnim situacijama, posebno u Japanu. Osim toga, japanska komunikacija e-mail a ima gomilu specifičnih pravila koje se uče koristeći specijalizovane vodiče. Obrazavanje književnosti e-mail a mnogim japanskim studentima obično se pruža na tradicionalnom, ali neefektivnom načinu na temelju predavanja. Predlažemo sistem za podršku japanskim studentima pisanjem e-maila nadređenima (nastavnicima, predstavnicima lova na posao, itd.). Prvo napravimo istragu o važnosti formalnih e-mailova u Japanu i ono što je potrebno za uspješno napisati formalnu e-mail. Sledeće, razvijamo sistem u skladu s tim pravilima. Konačno smo procijenili sistem dva puta. Rezultati, iako su provedeni na malom broju uzorka, uglavnom su bili pozitivni i jasno su ukazali na dodatni način da poboljšamo sistem.', 'ca': "El correu electrònic és una eina de comunicació amplament utilitzada per gent de totes les edats a Internet avui en dia, sovint en situacions comercials i oficials, especialment al Japó. A més, la comunicació japonesa per correu electrònic té un conjunt de normes específices ensenyades usant guies especialitzats. L'educació d'alfabetització per correu electrònic per a molts estudiants japonesos està normalment proporcionada d'una manera tradicional però ineficient basada en conferències. Proposem un sistema de suport a estudiants japonesos en escriure correus electrònics a superiors (professors, representants de la caça de treball, etc.). Primer fem una investigació sobre l'importància dels correus electrònics oficials al Japó, i el que es necessita per escriure amb èxit un correu electrònic formal. Després, desenvolupem el sistema segons aquestes regles. Finalment, vam evaluar el sistema doblement. Els resultats, encara que es van fer en un petit nombre de mostres, eren generalment positius i indiquen clarament maneres adicionals de millorar el sistema.", 'cs': 'E-mail je komunikační nástroj široce používaný lidmi všech věkových kategorií na internetu dnes, často v obchodních a formálních situacích, zejména v Japonsku. Kromě toho japonská e-mailová komunikace má soubor specifických pravidel vyučovaných pomocí specializovaných průvodců. E-mailová gramotnost pro mnoho japonských studentů je obvykle poskytována tradičním, ale neefektivním způsobem založeným na přednášce. Navrhujeme systém podpory japonských studentů při psaní e-mailů nadřízeným (učitelům, zástupcům hledání práce apod.). Nejprve provádíme vyšetřování významu formálních e-mailů v Japonsku a toho, co je potřeba k úspěšnému napsání formálního e-mailu. Dále vyvíjíme systém v souladu s těmito pravidly. Nakonec jsme systém zhodnotili dvojnásobně. Výsledky, i když byly provedeny na malém počtu vzorků, byly obecně pozitivní a jasně ukazovaly další způsoby zlepšení systému.', 'et': 'E-post on kommunikatsioonivahend, mida igas vanuses inimesed internetis laialdaselt kasutavad, sageli äri- ja ametlikes olukordades, eriti Jaapanis. Lisaks on Jaapani e-posti suhtluses spetsiaalseid reegleid, mida õpetatakse spetsiaalsete juhendite abil. Paljude Jaapani üliõpilaste e-kirjaoskuse haridust pakutakse tavaliselt traditsioonilisel, kuid ebatõhusal loengupõhisel viisil. Pakume välja süsteemi, mis toetab Jaapani õpilasi e-kirjade kirjutamisel ülemustele (õpetajatele, tööotsijatele jne). Esiteks uurime ametlike e-kirjade tähtsust Jaapanis ja seda, mida on vaja ametliku e-kirja edukaks kirjutamiseks. Järgmisena arendame süsteemi kooskõlas nende reeglitega. Lõpuks hindasime süsteemi kahekordselt. Kuigi tulemused on tehtud väikese arvu proovidega, olid need üldiselt positiivsed ja näitasid selgelt lisavõimalusi süsteemi parandamiseks.', 'fi': 'Sähköposti on viestintäväline, jota kaikenikäiset ihmiset käyttävät Internetissä nykyään, usein liike- ja virallisissa tilanteissa, erityisesti Japanissa. Lisäksi japanilaisessa sähköpostiviestinnässä on joukko erityisiä sääntöjä, joita opetetaan käyttämällä erikoistuneita oppaita. Monille japanilaisille opiskelijoille sähköpostilukutaidon opetusta tarjotaan tyypillisesti perinteisellä, mutta tehottomalla luentopohjaisella tavalla. Ehdotamme järjestelmää japanilaisten opiskelijoiden tukemiseksi sähköpostiviestien kirjoittamisessa esimiehille (opettajille, työnhakuedustajille jne.). Ensin tutkimme virallisen sähköpostin merkitystä Japanissa ja sitä, mitä tarvitaan virallisen sähköpostin kirjoittamiseen. Seuraavaksi kehitämme järjestelmää näiden sääntöjen mukaisesti. Lopuksi arvioimme järjestelmää kaksitahoisesti. Vaikka tulokset tehtiin pienellä määrällä näytteitä, ne olivat yleensä positiivisia, ja ne osoittivat selvästi muita tapoja parantaa järjestelmää.', 'he': 'דואר אלקטרוני הוא כלי תקשורת שמשתמש באופן רחב על ידי אנשים בכל גיל באינטרנט היום, לעתים קרובות במצבים עסקיים ורשמיים, במיוחד ביפן. חוץ מזה, לתקשורת הדואר אלקטרוני היפנית יש קבוצה של חוקים ספציפיים ללמד באמצעות ספרים מדריכים מיוחדים. חינוך ספרות דואר אלקטרוני עבור תלמידים יפנים רבים מספק בדרך מסורתית, אך לא יעילה מבוססת על הרצאות. אנו מציעים מערכת לתמוך בתלמידים יפנים בכתיבת דואר אלקטרוני למפקדים (מורים, נציגי ציד עבודה וכו.). ראשית, אנחנו עושים חקירה על חשיבות הדואר אלקטרוני רשמי ביפן, ומה שנדרש כדי לכתוב דואר אלקטרוני רשמי בהצלחה. לאחר מכן, אנחנו מפתחים את המערכת לפי החוקים האלה. סוף סוף הערכנו את המערכת פעמיים. התוצאות, למרות שהופעו על מספר קטן של דגימות, היו בדרך כלל חיוביות, וברור מצביעות דרכים נוספות לשפר את המערכת.', 'sk': 'E-pošta je komunikacijsko orodje, ki ga ljudje vseh starosti pogosto uporabljajo na internetu, pogosto v poslovnih in formalnih situacijah, zlasti na Japonskem. Poleg tega ima japonska e-poštna komunikacija niz posebnih pravil, ki se učijo s specializiranimi vodniki. Izobraževanje o elektronski pismenosti za številne japonske študente se običajno izvaja na tradicionalen, vendar neučinkovit način, ki temelji na predavanjih. Predlagamo sistem za podporo japonskim študentom pri pisanju e-pošte nadrejenim (učiteljem, predstavnikom za iskanje zaposlitve itd.). Najprej preučimo pomen uradnih e-poštnih sporočil na Japonskem in kaj je potrebno za uspešno pisanje uradnega e-poštnega sporočila. Nato razvijamo sistem v skladu s temi pravili. Nazadnje smo sistem ocenili dvojno. Rezultati, čeprav so bili opravljeni na majhnem številu vzorcev, so bili na splošno pozitivni in jasno kažejo dodatne načine za izboljšanje sistema.', 'ha': "E mail yana wani zance da ake yi amfani da shi widespre'in jama'a duk tsohon Intanet a yau, ko da yawa yana a cikin shawarar da masu shawara da masu rasmi, hasa'a cikin Japane. Furan haka, wa'azi na e-mail na japane yana da wasu sharciyar masu ƙayyade wanda aka sanar da su da amfani da shiryoyin shiryoyin da aka ƙayyade. Kilimin littãfi na e-e-mail na'anar mafiya yawa na karatun japane, a bayan haka, ana ba da fasalin littafan. Munã buɗa'ar da wata na'ura da za'a ƙarfafa karãtun japane da su rubũta e-mails zuwa masu sarki (macallin, masu sakan huntar da mazaɓa, etc.) Ko da na farkon yin ƙidãya a kan muhimmin e-mailer na dama a Japane, kuma abin da aka buƙata wajen rubutu wata e-mail na rasmi. Na ƙarshe, za'a buɗa'arin na'ura da daidai. Gani, mun ƙaddara na'ura sau biyu. Mataimakin, kuma kõ da aka samar da shi kan wasu misãlai kaɗan, sai suka yi ɗabi'a, kuma aka nuna wasu hanyõyi da za'a kyautata na'ura.", 'bo': 'E mail is a communication tool that is widely used by people of all ages on the Internet today, often in business and formal situations, especially in Japan. ད་དུང་། ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་གློག སྐད་རིགས་སྨན་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་གློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གློག་འཕྲིན་ནས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཤེས་ཡོན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སློབ་ཆེན་པ་ཚོར་ལྟར་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། དང་པོ་ནས་འཛམ་གླིང་ནང་གི་རྩ་བའི་གློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གལ་ཆེན་ཤིག་ཏུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། འོག་གི་རྗེས་སུ། འུ་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྲིམས་སྲོལ་འདུག་ལ་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན་པས། མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་རིགས་གཉིས་པ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། རྩིས་འབྲས་བ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཆུང་ལ་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ལག་ལེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཁ་ཤས་གཞན', 'jv': 'E-mail adalah komunikasi sing paling dhéwé ning awak dhéwé ning Internet iki dadi, sadéwé ing sakjane negori lan format dhéwé, ngomong nik neng Japon. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Pesene Awak dhéwé ngertuk sistem kanggo nggunaké istudhakan japoni kanggo nyelaran e-mail kanggo supoyo (guru-guru, mestani uwong-uwong, lan cetcetcetek). Awak dhéwé ngewehke perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno resmi e-mail formil nang japoni, lan neng sampeyan sing musik kanggo ngirusaké e-mail formil. Tulung, awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe sistem kanggo sabanjuré kuwi. Tulung, awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem iki-iki. Rejali, nganggep dinong menyang sampulan, ditawak dhéwé, ngono kesempatan kanggo ngerasah sistem sing apik.'}
{'en': 'Query Distillation : BERT-based Distillation for Ensemble Ranking', 'ar': 'تقطير الاستعلام: التقطير القائم على BERT لترتيب المجموعة', 'es': 'Destilación de consultas: Destilación basada en Bert para clasificación', 'pt': 'Destilação de consulta: destilação baseada em BERT para classificação de conjunto', 'fr': "Query Distillation\xa0: distillation basée sur Bert pour le classement d'ensemble", 'zh': '询蒸馏:基于 BERT 融排名蒸馏', 'ja': 'クエリ蒸留：アンサンブルランキングのためのBERTベースの蒸留', 'ru': 'Дистилляция запросов: дистилляция на основе BERT для ранжирования ансамблей', 'hi': 'क्वेरी आसवन: BERT-आधारित आसवन Ensemble रैंकिंग के लिए', 'ga': 'Ceist Driogadh: Driogadh bunaithe ar BERT le haghaidh Rangú Ensemble', 'ka': 'Query Distillation: BERT- based Distillation for Ensemble Ranking', 'hu': 'Query Desztilláció: BERT alapú desztilláció az együttes rangsorolásához', 'el': 'Αποστάγωση ερωτήματος: Αποστάγωση βασισμένη στον BERT για ταξινόμηση συνόλων', 'it': 'Query Distillazione: Distillazione basata su BERT per Ensemble Ranking', 'kk': 'Сұраныс шектеуі: BERT- негіздеген шектеуі Ensemble Ranking', 'lt': 'Klausimo distiliacija: BERT grindžiama distiliacija, skirta vienodai klasifikuoti', 'mk': 'Distillation of Query: BERT- based Distillation for Ensemble Ranking', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം ഡിസ്റ്റിലേഷന്\u200d: ബെര്\u200dട്ടി- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡിസ്ട്രിലേഷന്\u200d എണ്ണിമെല്\u200d റാങ്ങിങ്ങിനുള', 'ms': 'Distillasi Pertanyaan: Distillasi berasaskan BERT untuk Rangkaian Ensemble', 'mt': 'Distillazzjoni tat-Talba: Distillazzjoni bbażata fuq BERT għall-Klassifikazzjoni Ensemble', 'mn': 'БЕРТ-д суурилсан хаягдал', 'ro': 'Interogare Distilare: Distilare bazată pe BERT pentru clasarea ansamblului', 'pl': 'Destylacja zapytań: Destylacja oparta na BERT dla rankingu zespołów', 'no': 'Spørjingsgrensing: BERT-basert destillasjon for Ensemble Ranking', 'sr': 'Растилација питања: Растилација базирана на BERT за покривање проблема', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විශාලනය: BERT- ආධාරිත විශාලනය Ensemble Raning', 'so': 'Soo weydiinta: Qashinka ku saleysan BERT', 'sv': 'Frågestillation: BERT-baserad destillation för Ensemble Ranking', 'ta': 'கேள்வி விதிமுறை: BERT- அடிப்படையில் உள்ள விளிம்புகள்', 'ur': 'سؤرٹ ڈیسٹلیشن: BERT-based Distillation for Ensemble Ranking', 'uz': 'Soò£rov', 'vi': 'Món đặc biệt với cây chuối:', 'nl': 'Query Distillatie: BERT-gebaseerde Distillatie voor Ensemble Ranking', 'da': 'Forespørgsel Destillation: BERT-baseret Destillation for Ensemble Ranking', 'bg': 'Дестилация на заявка: Дестилация на базата на BERT за класиране на ансамбъл', 'hr': 'Distilacija ispitivanja: Distilacija bazirana na BERT za snimanje Ensemble Ranking', 'de': 'Query Destillation: BERT-basierte Destillation für Ensemble Ranking', 'id': 'Distillasi Pertanyaan: Distillasi berdasarkan BERT untuk Ranking Ensemble', 'ko': '조회 증류: 집합 정렬에 사용되는 BERT 기반 증류', 'fa': 'حذف سؤال: حذف بنیاد BERT برای حذف انفجار', 'sw': 'Swali Distribution based BERT', 'tr': 'Soragy Namaýyşygy: BERT tabanly Ensemble Ranking üçin', 'sq': 'Distillimi i kërkimit: Distillimi bazuar në BERT për renditjen Ensemble', 'af': 'Navraag Verspreiding: BERT- gebaseerde Verspreiding vir Ensemble Ranking', 'hy': 'Սովորման դիստիլացիա: BER-ի հիմքով դիստիլացիա հավաքական դասակարգման համար', 'am': 'ጥያቄ', 'az': 'S톛qli S톛fl톛t: BERT tabanl캼 Ensemble Ranking 칲칞칲n S톛fl톛t', 'bs': 'Distilacija ispitivanja: Distilacija bazirana na BERT za snimanje Ensemble Ranking', 'ca': 'Query Distillation: BERT-based Distillation for Ensemble Ranking', 'bn': 'অনুসন্ধান: বিবেরেট ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ডিস্টিলেশন', 'cs': 'Destilace dotazů: Destilace založená na BERT pro hodnocení souborů', 'et': 'Päringu destillatsioon: BERT-põhine destillatsioon Ensemble Ranking jaoks', 'fi': 'Query Distillation: BERT-pohjainen tislaus Ensemble Ranking -listalle', 'jv': 'Distilation', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Destilacija poizvedbe: Destilacija na osnovi BERT za uvrstitev ansamblov', 'he': 'דיסטילציה של שאלות: דיסטילציה מבוססת על BERT עבור ריגוד סמל', 'bo': 'Query Distillation: BERT-based Distillation for Ensemble Ranking'}
{'en': 'Recent years have witnessed substantial progress in the development of neural ranking networks, but also an increasingly heavy computational burden due to growing numbers of parameters and the adoption of model ensembles. Knowledge Distillation (KD) is a common solution to balance the effectiveness and efficiency. However, it is not straightforward to apply KD to ranking problems. Ranking Distillation (RD) has been proposed to address this issue, but only shows effectiveness on recommendation tasks. We present a novel two-stage distillation method for ranking problems that allows a smaller student model to be trained while benefitting from the better performance of the teacher model, providing better control of the inference latency and computational burden. We design a novel BERT-based ranking model structure for list-wise ranking to serve as our student model. All ranking candidates are fed to the BERT model simultaneously, such that the self-attention mechanism can enable joint inference to rank the document list. Our experiments confirm the advantages of our method, not just with regard to the inference latency but also in terms of higher-quality rankings compared to the original teacher model.', 'ar': 'شهدت السنوات الأخيرة تقدمًا كبيرًا في تطوير شبكات الترتيب العصبي ، ولكن أيضًا عبئًا حسابيًا ثقيلًا بشكل متزايد بسبب الأعداد المتزايدة من المعلمات واعتماد مجموعات النماذج. تقطير المعرفة (KD) هو حل شائع لتحقيق التوازن بين الفعالية والكفاءة. ومع ذلك ، فليس من السهل تطبيق دينار كويتي على مشاكل الترتيب. تم اقتراح تصنيف التقطير (RD) لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، ولكنه يظهر فقط الفعالية في مهام التوصية. نقدم طريقة تقطير جديدة من مرحلتين لمشاكل الترتيب التي تسمح بتدريب نموذج طالب أصغر مع الاستفادة من الأداء الأفضل لنموذج المعلم ، مما يوفر تحكمًا أفضل في زمن انتقال الاستدلال والعبء الحسابي. نقوم بتصميم هيكل نموذج تصنيف جديد قائم على BERT لترتيب القائمة ليكون بمثابة نموذج طلابنا. يتم تغذية جميع المرشحين التصنيفيين إلى نموذج BERT في وقت واحد ، بحيث يمكن لآلية الانتباه الذاتي أن تمكن الاستدلال المشترك لترتيب قائمة المستندات. تؤكد تجاربنا مزايا طريقتنا ، ليس فقط فيما يتعلق بوقت استجابة الاستدلال ولكن أيضًا من حيث التصنيفات عالية الجودة مقارنة بنموذج المعلم الأصلي.', 'es': 'Los últimos años han sido testigos de un progreso sustancial en el desarrollo de redes neuronales de clasificación, pero también de una carga computacional cada vez más pesada debido al creciente número de parámetros y la adopción de conjuntos de modelos. La destilación del conocimiento (KD) es una solución común para equilibrar la eficacia y la eficiencia. Sin embargo, no es sencillo aplicar KD a los problemas de clasificación. Se ha propuesto la Clasificación de Destilación (RD) para abordar este problema, pero solo muestra la eficacia en las tareas de recomendación. Presentamos un novedoso método de destilación en dos etapas para clasificar problemas que permite entrenar a un modelo de estudiante más pequeño mientras se beneficia del mejor rendimiento del modelo docente, proporcionando un mejor control de la latencia de inferencia y la carga computacional. Diseñamos una novedosa estructura de modelo de clasificación basada en Bert para la clasificación por listas para que sirva como nuestro modelo de estudiante. Todos los candidatos a la clasificación se alimentan al modelo BERT simultáneamente, de modo que el mecanismo de autoatención puede permitir la inferencia conjunta para clasificar la lista de documentos. Nuestros experimentos confirman las ventajas de nuestro método, no solo con respecto a la latencia de inferencia, sino también en términos de clasificaciones de mayor calidad en comparación con el modelo de profesor original.', 'pt': 'Os últimos anos testemunharam um progresso substancial no desenvolvimento de redes de classificação neural, mas também uma carga computacional cada vez mais pesada devido ao crescente número de parâmetros e à adoção de conjuntos de modelos. A Destilação de Conhecimento (KD) é uma solução comum para equilibrar a eficácia e a eficiência. No entanto, não é simples aplicar KD a problemas de classificação. A destilação de classificação (RD) foi proposta para resolver esse problema, mas só mostra eficácia em tarefas de recomendação. Apresentamos um novo método de destilação em dois estágios para classificar problemas que permite que um modelo de aluno menor seja treinado enquanto se beneficia do melhor desempenho do modelo de professor, proporcionando melhor controle da latência de inferência e carga computacional. Projetamos uma nova estrutura de modelo de classificação baseada em BERT para classificação em lista para servir como nosso modelo de aluno. Todos os candidatos de classificação são alimentados ao modelo BERT simultaneamente, de modo que o mecanismo de autoatenção pode permitir a inferência conjunta para classificar a lista de documentos. Nossos experimentos confirmam as vantagens do nosso método, não apenas em relação à latência de inferência, mas também em termos de classificações de maior qualidade em relação ao modelo original do professor.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, nous avons assisté à des progrès substantiels dans le développement de réseaux de classement de neurones, mais également à une charge informatique de plus en plus lourde en raison du nombre croissant de paramètres et de l'adoption d'ensembles de modèles. La distillation des connaissances (KD) est une solution courante pour équilibrer l'efficacité et l'efficience. Cependant, il n'est pas simple d'appliquer KD à des problèmes de classement. La distillation de classement (RD) a été proposée pour résoudre ce problème, mais ne montre que l'efficacité des tâches de recommandation. Nous présentons une nouvelle méthode de distillation en deux étapes pour classer les problèmes qui permet de former un modèle d'étudiant plus petit tout en bénéficiant des meilleures performances du modèle enseignant, offrant un meilleur contrôle de la latence d'inférence et de la charge de calcul. Nous concevons une nouvelle structure de modèle de classement basée sur BERT pour le classement par liste afin de servir de modèle étudiant. Tous les candidats de classement sont introduits simultanément dans le modèle BERT, de telle sorte que le mécanisme d'auto-attention peut permettre l'inférence conjointe pour classer la liste de documents. Nos expériences confirment les avantages de notre méthode, non seulement en ce qui concerne la latence d'inférence, mais également en termes de classement de meilleure qualité par rapport au modèle original de l'enseignant.", 'ja': '近年、ニューラルランキングネットワークの開発は実質的に進歩しているが、パラメータの数の増加とモデルアンサンブルの採用により、計算負担はますます重くなっている。 ナレッジ蒸留（ KD ）は、効果と効率のバランスを取るための一般的なソリューションです。 ただし、順位問題にKDを当てはめるのは簡単ではない。 この問題に対処するために、ランキング蒸留（ RD ）が提案されていますが、推奨タスクの有効性のみを示しています。 私たちは、問題をランク付けするための新規の2段階蒸留法を提示し、より小さな学習者モデルを訓練しながら、教師モデルのより良いパフォーマンスの恩恵を受けることができ、推論待ち時間と計算負担のより良い制御を提供します。 私たちは、私たちの学生モデルとしての役割を果たすために、リストごとのランキングのための新しいBERTベースのランキングモデル構造を設計します。 すべてのランキング候補は、自己注目メカニズムが文書リストをランク付けするための共同推論を可能にすることができるように、BERTモデルに同時に供給される。 私たちの実験は、推論のレイテンシだけでなく、元の教師モデルと比較してより質の高いランキングという点でも、私たちの方法の利点を確認しています。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में तंत्रिका रैंकिंग नेटवर्क के विकास में काफी प्रगति देखी गई है, लेकिन मापदंडों की बढ़ती संख्या और मॉडल ensembles को अपनाने के कारण एक तेजी से भारी कम्प्यूटेशनल बोझ भी है। ज्ञान आसवन (केडी) प्रभावशीलता और दक्षता को संतुलित करने के लिए एक सामान्य समाधान है। हालांकि, रैंकिंग समस्याओं के लिए केडी लागू करना सीधा नहीं है। रैंकिंग आसवन (आरडी) इस समस्या को संबोधित करने के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है, लेकिन केवल सिफारिश कार्यों पर प्रभावशीलता दिखाता है। हम रैंकिंग समस्याओं के लिए एक उपन्यास दो-चरण आसवन विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो शिक्षक मॉडल के बेहतर प्रदर्शन से लाभान्वित होने के दौरान एक छोटे छात्र मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने की अनुमति देता है, जो अनुमान विलंबता और कम्प्यूटेशनल बोझ का बेहतर नियंत्रण प्रदान करता है। हम अपने छात्र मॉडल के रूप में सेवा करने के लिए सूची-वार रैंकिंग के लिए एक उपन्यास BERT-आधारित रैंकिंग मॉडल संरचना डिज़ाइन करते हैं। सभी रैंकिंग उम्मीदवारों को एक साथ BERT मॉडल को खिलाया जाता है, जैसे कि आत्म-ध्यान तंत्र दस्तावेज़ सूची को रैंक करने के लिए संयुक्त अनुमान को सक्षम कर सकता है। हमारे प्रयोग हमारी विधि के फायदों की पुष्टि करते हैं, न केवल अनुमान विलंबता के संबंध में, बल्कि मूल शिक्षक मॉडल की तुलना में उच्च गुणवत्ता वाली रैंकिंग के संदर्भ में भी।', 'zh': '近年以来,取实质性于神经网络,而参数数增融之用,计累益重。 知蒸馏(KD)者,平有效性效率之常见解决方案。 然将 KD 用于排名非简也。 已列名蒸馏(RD)以决之,但见荐举之有效性。 新颖两提炼之法,以排名于问,宜听小弟子模形,兼受益于师模之善,而愈控制推理迟计累。 设新基于BERT,列于表,以为弟子。 凡名候选者并致BERT形,则自关机制,则合理而文档列矣。 吾实验证吾道之胜势,不惟推理延迟,又方诸本师模样,于更高质量之排名亦然。', 'ru': 'В последние годы наблюдается значительный прогресс в развитии сетей нейронного ранжирования, а также возрастающая вычислительная нагрузка в связи с ростом количества параметров и принятием модельных ансамблей. Дистилляция знаний (KD) является распространенным решением для обеспечения баланса между эффективностью и результативностью. Однако применение KD к проблемам ранжирования не является простым. Для решения этой проблемы было предложено ранжирование дистилляции (РД), но она показывает эффективность только при выполнении рекомендательных задач. Мы представляем новый двухступенчатый метод дистилляции для ранжирования задач, который позволяет обучать меньшую модель ученика, получая при этом выгоду от лучшей производительности модели учителя, обеспечивая лучший контроль за задержкой вывода и вычислительной нагрузкой. Мы разрабатываем новую структуру рейтинговой модели на основе BERT для рейтинга по спискам, чтобы служить нашей студенческой моделью. Все ранжирующие кандидаты подаются в модель BERT одновременно, так что механизм самовнимания может позволить совместному выводу ранжировать список документов. Наши эксперименты подтверждают преимущества нашего метода не только с точки зрения латентности вывода, но и с точки зрения более качественных рейтингов по сравнению с оригинальной моделью преподавателя.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá dul chun cinn suntasach déanta i bhforbairt líonraí néar-rangaithe, ach freisin tá ualach ríomhaireachtúil atá ag éirí níos trom de bharr méadú ar líon na bparaiméadar agus glacadh le samhlacha ensemble. Is réiteach coiteann é an Driogadh Eolais (KD) chun éifeachtúlacht agus éifeachtúlacht a chothromú. Mar sin féin, níl sé simplí KD a chur i bhfeidhm ar fhadhbanna rangú. Tá Driogadh Rangaithe (RD) molta chun dul i ngleic leis an gceist seo, ach ní léiríonn sé ach éifeachtacht ar thascanna molta. Cuirimid modh driogtha dhá chéim nua i láthair chun fadhbanna a rangú a cheadaíonn oiliúint a chur ar mhúnla mac léinn níos lú agus leas á bhaint as feidhmíocht níos fearr an mhúnla múinteora, ag soláthar rialú níos fearr ar an latency tátail agus ar an ualach ríomhaireachtúil. Dearaímid struchtúr samhail rangú nua bunaithe ar BERT le haghaidh rangú ar bhonn liosta chun fónamh mar mhúnla ár mac léinn. Cuirtear gach iarrthóir rangú ar an tsamhail BERT ag an am céanna, ionas gur féidir leis an meicníocht féin-aird a chumasú tátail chomhpháirteacha chun liosta na ndoiciméad a rangú. Deimhníonn ár dturgnaimh na buntáistí a bhaineann lenár modh, ní hamháin maidir leis an latency tátal ach freisin i dtéarmaí rátálacha ardcháilíochta i gcomparáid leis an múnla bunaidh múinteora.', 'ka': 'ბოლო წლის შემდეგ მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი ნეიროლის რენექტინგის ქსელის განვითარებაში, მაგრამ ასევე უფრო ძალიან კომპუტაციალური ბოლოს, რადგან პარამეტრების რაოდენობა და მო Name მაგრამ, KD- ს პრობლემებისთვის პრობლემებისთვის გამოყენება არ არის მხოლოდ. პროგრამის გარეშე (RD) იყო პროგრამის გარეშე, მაგრამ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ გამოსახულებელობა მომხმარების დავალების შესახებ. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის ორ ფაეჯის განსხვავება პრობლემებისთვის, რომელიც უკეთესი სტუდენტის მოდელის განსხვავება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სტუდენტის მოდელის გამოსახულება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ჩვენ პრომენტის პრომენტის ბერტის დაბათებული რენექტირების მოდელის სტრუქტურაციას, რომელიც ჩვენი სტუდენტის მოდელისთვის იყენებთ. ყველა რენგენტირებული კანდიდეტები ბერტის მოდელზე ერთადერთად იყოს, როგორც თავიდარჩენის მექანსი შესაძლებელია ერთადერთი ინფერენციის შესაძლებლობა დოკუმენტების სია. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები დარწმუნდება ჩვენი მეტის გამოსახულებას, არა მხოლოდ შესახებ ინფრენციის დასახულებლად, მაგრამ უფრო მეტი კარგალიტიური რენექციების შესახებ', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια έχουν σημειώσει σημαντική πρόοδο στην ανάπτυξη δικτύων νευρωνικής κατάταξης, αλλά και μια ολοένα και μεγαλύτερη υπολογιστική επιβάρυνση λόγω του αυξανόμενου αριθμού παραμέτρων και της υιοθέτησης συνόλων μοντέλων. Η απόσταξη γνώσης (ΚΔ) είναι μια κοινή λύση για την ισορροπία της αποτελεσματικότητας και της αποδοτικότητας. Ωστόσο, δεν είναι απλό να εφαρμόσετε το KD σε προβλήματα κατάταξης. Προτάθηκε η ταξινόμηση απόσταξης (RD) για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, αλλά δείχνει μόνο αποτελεσματικότητα σε εργασίες συστάσεων. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο απόσταξης δύο σταδίων για την κατάταξη προβλημάτων που επιτρέπει την εκπαίδευση ενός μικρότερου μαθητικού μοντέλου ενώ επωφελείται από την καλύτερη απόδοση του εκπαιδευτικού μοντέλου, παρέχοντας καλύτερο έλεγχο της καθυστέρησης συμπερασμάτων και του υπολογιστικού φόρτου. Σχεδιάζουμε μια νέα δομή μοντέλων κατάταξης βασισμένη στον BERT για κατάταξη λίστας για να χρησιμεύσει ως μοντέλο φοιτητών μας. Όλοι οι υποψήφιοι κατάταξης τροφοδοτούνται ταυτόχρονα στο μοντέλο BERT, έτσι ώστε ο μηχανισμός αυτοπροσοχής να επιτρέπει από κοινού την ταξινόμηση του καταλόγου εγγράφων. Τα πειράματά μας επιβεβαιώνουν τα πλεονεκτήματα της μεθόδου μας, όχι μόνο όσον αφορά την καθυστέρηση συμπερασμάτων αλλά και όσον αφορά την κατάταξη υψηλότερης ποιότητας σε σύγκριση με το αρχικό μοντέλο δασκάλων.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években jelentős előrelépés történt a neurális rangsorolási hálózatok fejlesztésében, de egyre nagyobb számítási terhet is jelentett a paraméterek növekvő számának és a modellegyüttesek bevezetésének köszönhetően. A Knowledge Destillation (KD) egy közös megoldás a hatékonyság és a hatékonyság kiegyensúlyozására. Azonban nem egyszerű a KD alkalmazása rangsorolási problémákra. A kérdés kezelésére javasolták a rangsorolási desztillációt (RD), de csak az ajánlási feladatok tekintetében mutatják hatékonyságot. Bemutatunk egy új, kétlépcsős desztillációs módszert a problémák rangsorolására, amely lehetővé teszi egy kisebb diákmodell képzését, miközben kihasználja a tanári modell jobb teljesítményét, jobb ellenőrzést biztosítva a következtetés késleltetésének és a számítási terheknek. Új BERT-alapú rangsorolási modellstruktúrát tervezünk a listákon alapuló rangsoroláshoz, hogy diákmodellként szolgáljon. Minden rangsoroló jelöltet egyidejűleg táplálnak a BERT modellhez, így az önfigyelem mechanizmusa lehetővé teszi a dokumentumlista rangsorolását. Kísérleteink megerősítik módszerünk előnyeit, nem csak a következtetési késleltetés tekintetében, hanem az eredeti tanári modellhez képest magasabb minőségű rangsorolás tekintetében is.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni sono stati registrati notevoli progressi nello sviluppo delle reti di posizionamento neurale, ma anche un onere computazionale sempre più pesante dovuto al crescente numero di parametri e all'adozione di gruppi di modelli. La distillazione della conoscenza (KD) è una soluzione comune per bilanciare l'efficacia e l'efficienza. Tuttavia, non è semplice applicare KD ai problemi di classificazione. La classificazione della distillazione (RD) è stata proposta per affrontare questo problema, ma mostra solo efficacia nei compiti di raccomandazione. Presentiamo un nuovo metodo di distillazione in due fasi per la classificazione dei problemi che consente di formare un modello studentesco più piccolo beneficiando al contempo delle migliori prestazioni del modello insegnante, fornendo un migliore controllo della latenza di inferenza e del carico computazionale. Progettiamo una nuova struttura del modello di classifica basata su BERT per la classifica in modo da servire come modello per studenti. Tutti i candidati in classifica vengono alimentati simultaneamente al modello BERT, in modo che il meccanismo di auto-attenzione possa consentire l'inferenza congiunta per classificare la lista dei documenti. I nostri esperimenti confermano i vantaggi del nostro metodo, non solo per quanto riguarda la latenza di inferenza, ma anche in termini di classifiche di qualità superiore rispetto al modello originale di insegnante.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais buvo pastebima pažanga kuriant nervų klasifikavimo tinklus, tačiau dėl didėjančio parametrų skaičiavimo ir modelių rinkinių priėmimo vis didesnė skaičiavimo našta. Žinių distiliacija (KD) yra bendras veiksmingumo ir veiksmingumo pusiausvyros sprendimas. Tačiau KD taikymas klasifikavimo problemoms nėra paprastas. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, buvo pasiūlytas klasifikacinis distiliavimas, tačiau tai rodo tik rekomendacinių užduočių veiksmingumą. Pateikiame naują dviejų etapų distiliavimo metodą, skirtą klasifikuoti problemas, leidžiančias mokytis mažesnio student ų modelio ir tuo pačiu pasinaudoti geresniais mokytojo modelio rezultatais, užtikrinančiais geresnę išvadų latencijos ir skaičiavimo naštos kontrolę. Mes sukūrėme naują BERT grindžiamą reitingų modelio struktūrą, skirtą sąrašu pagrįstam reitingui, kad būtų naudojamas mūsų student ų modelis. Visi kvalifikuoti kandidatai kartu įtraukiami į BERT model į, kad savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmas galėtų sudaryti sąlygas bendrai daryti išvadą, kad dokumentų sąrašas būtų priskiriamas. Mūsų eksperimentai patvirtina mūsų metodo privalumus ne tik dėl išvadų latencijos, bet ir aukštesnės kokybės rangų, palyginti su pradiniu mokytojo modeliu.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните години се сведоци на значителен напредок во развојот на мрежите на нервни рангирања, но исто така и сé поголемо обврзуваое поради растечкиот број параметри и усвојуваоето на моделните ансембли. Knowledge Distillation (KD) is a common solution to balance the effectiveness and efficiency.  Сепак, не е едноставно да се примени KD на проблемите со рангирањето. Рејтинг дистилација (РД) е предложена за решавање на ова прашање, но покажува ефикасност само на препорачувачките задачи. Презентираме нов двофазивен метод за дестилација за рангирање на проблемите, кој овозможува обука на помал студентски модел, привремено користејќи од подобрите резултати на моделот на учителот, обезбедувајќи подобра контрола на тајноста на инференцијата и компјутативното товарство. Ние дизајнираме нова структура на рангирање на моделот базиран на БЕРТ за рангирање на листата за да служи како наш студентски модел. Сите рангирани кандидати се префрлаат во моделот БЕРТ истовремено, така што механизмот за самовнимание може да овозможи заедничка инференција да ја рангира листата на документи. Нашите експерименти ги потврдуваат предностите на нашиот метод, не само во однос на лантенцијата на инференцијата, туку и во однос на високи квалитетни рангирања во споредба со оригиналниот учителски модел.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдар невралдық реттеу желілерді жасау үшін көп жағдайды, сондай-ақ параметрлердің саны мен үлгілерді қолдану үшін есептеу жүктелігін көбірек көбірек көбірек жүктелген жү Мәліметтердің шектеу (KD) деген ефективдік және эффективдік балансы үшін жалпы шешім. Бірақ, KD- ді жоғарлау мәселелеріне қолдану жақсы емес. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін түрлендіру (RD) ұсынылды, бірақ тек рекомендациялау тапсырмаларында әсер етілігін көрсетеді. Мұғалім үлгісінің жақсы істеу үшін кішкентай студенттер үлгісін оқытуға мүмкіндік береді. Мұғалім үлгісінің жақсы істеу үлгісін жақсы басқару әдісін көрсетеді. Біз біздің студенттеріміздің үлгісі ретінде жұмыс істеу үшін BERT негізделген рейтинг үлгісін құрамыз. Барлық реттеу кандидаттары бір рет BERT үлгісіне жетілдіріледі, сондықтан өзіңіздің қатынау механизмі құжаттар тізімін реттеу үшін біріктірілген қатынау мүмкін болады. Біздің тәжірибеміздің әдіміміздің артықшылығын тек қайталап тәжірибесіне қарай емес, сондай-ақ бастапқы мұғалім үлгісіне салыстырып тәжірибесінің салыстырыл', 'ms': 'Tahun-tahun terakhir telah menyaksikan kemajuan yang besar dalam pembangunan rangkaian saraf rangkaian, tetapi juga beban pengiraan yang semakin berat disebabkan jumlah parameter yang meningkat dan adopsi kumpulan model. Distillasi pengetahuan (KD) adalah penyelesaian umum untuk seimbang keefektivitas dan efisiensi. Namun, ia tidak mudah untuk melaksanakan KD pada masalah rangkaian. Ranking Distillation (RD) has been proposed to address this issue, but only shows effectiveness on recommendation tasks.  Kami mempersembahkan kaedah penyuaian dua tahap baru untuk menandakan masalah yang membolehkan model pelajar yang lebih kecil dilatih sambil mengambil keuntungan dari prestasi yang lebih baik dari model guru, menyediakan kawalan yang lebih baik terhadap keterlaluan kesimpulan dan beban pengiraan. Kami merancang struktur model peringkat berasaskan BERT untuk peringkat senarai-bijak untuk berkhidmat sebagai model pelajar kami. Semua calon peringkat diberi makan ke model BERT secara bersamaan, sehingga mekanisme perhatian-diri boleh memungkinkan kesimpulan kongsi untuk peringkat senarai dokumen. Eksperimen kami mengesahkan keuntungan kaedah kami, bukan hanya mengenai keterlaluan kesimpulan tetapi juga mengenai peringkat kualiti yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan model guru asal.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d റാങ്ങ് നെറ്റിങ് നെറ്റിങ് നെറ്റിങ്ങ് നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെ വികസിപ്പില്\u200d വളര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വലിയ പ്രവർത അറിവ് ഡിസ്റ്റിലേഷന്\u200d (കെഡി) പ്രഭാവം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിഹാരം ആകുന്നു. എങ്കിലും കെഡിയെ റാങ്ങിങ് പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d നേരെയല്ല. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d റെങ്ങിങ് ഡിസ്ട്രിലേഷന്\u200d (RD) പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ശുദ്ധ We present a novel two-stage distillation method for ranking problems that allows a smaller student model to be trained while benefitting from the better performance of the teacher model, providing better control of the inference latency and computational burden.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള റെങ്കിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d സ്റ്റോര്\u200dട്ടാര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങിന് ലിസ്റ്റ് ബിസ്റ്റ എല്ലാ റാങ്കിങ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികളും ഒരേ സമയത്ത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലിലേക്ക് ഭക്ഷണം നല്\u200dകപ്പെടുന്നു. അതുപോലെ സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെക്കി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തുന്നുണ്ട്, അപകടത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് മാത്രമല്ല, മൂല്യ ടീച്ചര്\u200d മോഡലിനോ', 'mt': "Is-snin reċenti wrew progress sostanzjali fl-iżvilupp ta’ netwerks ta’ klassifikazzjoni newrali, iżda wkoll piż komputattiv dejjem akbar minħabba n-numru dejjem jikber ta’ parametri u l-adozzjoni ta’ ensembles ta’ mudelli. Id-Distillazzjoni tal-Għarfien (KD) hija soluzzjoni komuni biex tiġi bbilanċjata l-effettività u l-effiċjenza. Madankollu, mhuwiex sempliċi li KD jiġi applikat għal problemi ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Id-Distillazzjoni tal-Klassifikazzjoni (RD) ġiet proposta biex tiġi indirizzata din il-kwistjoni, iżda turi biss l-effettività fuq il-kompiti ta’ rakkomandazzjoni. Aħna nippreżentaw metodu ġdid ta’ distillazzjoni f’żewġ stadji għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-problemi li jippermetti li mudell ta’ studenti iżgħar jiġi mħarreġ filwaqt li jibbenefika mill-prestazzjoni a ħjar tal-mudell tal-għalliema, li jipprovdi kontroll aħjar tat-latenza tal-inferenza u tal-piż komputattiv. Aħna niddisinjaw struttura ġdida ta' mudell ta' klassifikazzjoni bbażata fuq BERT għall-klassifikazzjoni mil-lat tal-list a biex iservu bħala mudell tal-istudenti tagħna. Il-kandidati kollha li jikklassifikaw jiġu mgħoddija lill-mudell BERT fl-istess ħin, b’tali mod li l-mekkaniżmu ta’ awtonomija jista’ jippermetti inferenza konġunta biex jikklassifika l-lista tad-dokumenti. L-esperimenti tagħna jikkonfermaw il-vantaġġi tal-metodu tagħna, mhux biss fir-rigward tat-latenza tal-inferenza iżda wkoll f’termini ta’ klassifikazzjonijiet ta’ kwalità ogħla meta mqabbla mal-mudell oriġinali tal-għalliema.", 'no': 'I løpet av siste år har vitne stor framgang i utviklinga av neuralrangeringsnettverk, men også ein større kraftig computeringslasting på grunn av økende antall parametra og innsamlinga av modellen. Kjenesteforstyring (KD) er ein felles løysing for å balanse effektiviteten og effektiviteten. Det er imidlertid ikkje enkelt å bruka KD til rankeringsproblemer. Dette er foreslått å handtera denne problemet, men berre viser effektivitet på anbefalingsoppgåver. Vi presenterer ein roman to-stadsdistillasjonsmetode for å rekna opplysningar som tillater at ein mindre studentmodell skal trenjast medan du brukar av den bedre utviklinga av læringsmodellen, og tilbyr bedre kontroll over inferens latens og datamaskina. Vi design ein roman BERT-basert rekningsmodulstruktur for listevist rekningar som studentmodellen vår. Alle rankeringskandidatane vert fede til BERT-modellen samtidig, slik at selvmerkingsmekanismekanismenyen kan slå på kopla infeksjon for å rankera dokumentlista. Eksperimentane våre bekrefter fordelene av metoden vårt, ikkje berre med hensyn til inferensningslatensien, men også med høgare kvalitetranger sammenlignet med den opprinnelige læringsmodellen.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach odnotowano znaczny postęp w rozwoju sieci rankingowych neuronowych, ale także coraz większe obciążenie obliczeniowe ze względu na rosnącą liczbę parametrów i przyjęcie zespołów modelowych. Destylacja wiedzy (KD) jest wspólnym rozwiązaniem w celu zrównoważenia skuteczności i wydajności. Nie jest jednak proste stosowanie KD do problemów rankingowych. W celu rozwiązania tego problemu zaproponowano klasyfikację destylacji (RD), ale wykazuje skuteczność tylko w zakresie zadań rekomendacyjnych. Przedstawiamy nowatorską dwustopniową metodę destylacji problemów rankingowych, która umożliwia trenowanie mniejszego modelu ucznia, jednocześnie korzystając z lepszej wydajności modelu nauczyciela, zapewniając lepszą kontrolę opóźnień wnioskowania i obciążenia obliczeniowego. Projektujemy nową strukturę modelu rankingu opartą na BERT dla rankingu listowego, aby służyć jako nasz model studencki. Wszyscy kandydaci rankingu są jednocześnie przekazywani do modelu BERT, dzięki czemu mechanizm samoobserwacji może umożliwić wspólne wnioskowanie rankingu listy dokumentów. Nasze eksperymenty potwierdzają zalety naszej metody nie tylko pod względem opóźnienia wniosków, ale także pod względem wyższej jakości rankingów w porównaniu do oryginalnego modelu nauczyciela.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani s-au constatat progrese substanțiale în dezvoltarea rețelelor de clasificare neurală, dar și o povară de calcul din ce în ce mai grea datorită numărului tot mai mare de parametri și adoptării ansamblurilor de modele. Distilarea cunoștințelor (KD) este o soluție comună pentru a echilibra eficiența și eficiența. Cu toate acestea, nu este simplu să aplicați KD problemelor de clasare. Distilarea clasificată (RD) a fost propusă pentru a aborda această problemă, dar arată doar eficacitatea sarcinilor de recomandare. Prezentăm o nouă metodă de distilare în două etape pentru clasificarea problemelor care permite instruirea unui model elev mai mic, beneficiind în același timp de performanța mai bună a modelului profesorului, oferind un control mai bun asupra latenței inferenței și sarcinii computaționale. Proiectăm o nouă structură a modelului de clasificare bazată pe BERT pentru clasificarea pe listă pentru a servi drept model al studenților noștri. Toți candidații în clasament sunt hrăniți simultan cu modelul BERT, astfel încât mecanismul de auto-atenție să permită deducția comună pentru a clasa lista documentelor. Experimentele noastre confirmă avantajele metodei noastre, nu doar în ceea ce privește latența inferenței, ci și în ceea ce privește clasamentele de calitate superioară comparativ cu modelul original de profesor.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүд мэдрэлийн цөмийн сүлжээний хөгжлийн маш их хөгжлийг олж харсан. Мөн хэдэн параметр өссөн болон загварын хүлээн зөвшөөрөх шаардлагатай тооцоолон хүнд хүчтэй тооцоолон үүрэг. Мэдлэг халдвар (KD) нь үр дүнтэй болон үр дүнтэй байдлыг баланслахын тулд нийтлэг шийдэл юм. Гэвч KD-г цуврал асуудлуудад ашиглах нь энгийн биш. Энэхүү асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд түвшингийн зохицуулалт (RD) санал болсон, гэхдээ зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхө Бид багш нарын загварын сайхан ажиллах боломжтой багш нарын загвараас илүү сайхан ажиллах боломжтой багш нарын загвараас бага зэрэг суралцах асуудлуудын хувьд хоёр дахь шаардлагатай шинэ арга загварыг илтгэнэ. Бид БЕРТ-д сурагчдын загвар болгох зохиолын загвар бүтээсэн. Бүх анхаарлын удирдагчид БЕРТ загварын загвард нэг удаа хандуулж, өөртөө анхаарлын механизм баримт жагсаалтыг нийлүүлж чадна. Бидний туршилтууд багш нарын загвартай харьцуулахад зөвхөн халдвар буюу халдвар буюу халдвар буюу халдвар буюу халдвар буюу халдвар буюу халдвар буюу илүү өндөр чанартай хэмжээний талаа', 'sr': 'Poslednjih godina su svjedočili značajan napredak u razvoju neuroloških mreža, ali i veći računalni teret zbog rastućeg broja parametara i usvajanja modela. Distilacija znanja (KD) je zajedničko rješenje za ravnotežu učinkovitosti i efikasnosti. Međutim, nije jednostavno primjenjivati KD na probleme u redovima. Predloženo je da se riješi ovaj problem, ali samo pokazuje učinkovitost na zadatke preporuke. Predstavljamo novu metodu destilacije dve faze za redoviranje problema koji omogućava da se trenira manji student model dok koristi od boljih učitelja model a, pružajući bolju kontrolu infekcije latencije i računalnog tereta. Mi dizajniramo roman model koji se osnova na BERT-u za redovanje na listi da služi kao naš studentski model. Svi kandidati su istovremeno nahranjeni BERT modelu, tako da mehanizam samopouzdanja može omogućiti zajedničku infekciju da rankira listu dokumenta. Naši eksperimenti potvrđuju prednost naše metode, ne samo u vezi infekcije latencije, nego i u odnosu na višeg kvalitetnog reda u usporedbi sa originalnim nastavnim modelom.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුද්දේවල් සාක්ෂික විදියට සාක්ෂි කරලා තියෙනවා න්\u200dයූරාල රැජින් ජාලයේ විකාශයේ විකාශය, නමුත් විශාල විදිය Name නමුත්, KD වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න සුදුසු නෑ. රේන්ග් විශාලනය (RD) මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන්  අපි පණිවිඩයක් විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200d සියළු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් BERT මොඩල් එක්කෙනෙක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, එතකොට ස්වයං අවධානය පරීක්ෂණය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න පුළුවන් විසි අපේ පරීක්ෂණය අපේ විධානයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ස්ථාපිත කරනවා, පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරක් නෙවෙයි නමුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dර', 'so': "Sanooyinkii la soo dhowaaday waxay arkeen horumar aad u weyn oo horumarinta shabakada dabiicadda ee neurada, laakiin sidoo kale culaab aad u daran xisaab xisaabta sababtoo ah koritaanka tirada lambarka iyo koritaanka dabeecada. Ogaanshada (KD) waa xal caadi ah oo ku saabsan awoodda iyo waxyaabaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee si toos ah uma codsato KD dhibaatooyinka baahida. Waxaa lagu talo galay in la sheekeysto arrintan (RD), laakiin waxaa keliya muujiyaa shaqo ku saabsan shaqada talo-bixinta. Waxaannu soo bandhignaa qaab kala sooc ah oo dhibaatooyin kala duduwan, kaas oo u ogolaa in qaab la baro tusaale yar oo waxbarasho ah marka lagu faa’iido ka wanaagsan sameynta qaababka macallimiinta, kaas oo sameynaya maamulka ugu wanaagsan la xiriira dhamaadka iyo culaabta xisaabta. Waxaynu sameynaa qoraal qaab ah oo ku saleysan BERT, si loo sameynayo qoraalka qoraalka oo xigmad leh, si aan u adeegno qaababka ardayda. Midowga BERT oo dhan waxaa lagu quudiyaa sameynta, taas oo ah in mekaniisada iskuul-qabsashada uu awoodo in la joojiyo si uu u sareeyo liiska dukumentiga. Imtixaankayadu waxay xaqiijiyaan faa'iidada qaababkayaga, mana aha mid ku saabsan dhamaanka ugu dambeysashada, laakiin sidoo kale waxay ku qoran yihiin imtixaanka heerka sare oo la barbarbaran tusaale ahaan macallimiinta hore.", 'sv': 'De senaste åren har bevittnat betydande framsteg i utvecklingen av neurala rankningsnätverk, men också en allt större beräkningsbörda på grund av ökande antal parametrar och antagandet av modellensembler. Kunskapsdestillation (KD) är en gemensam lösning för att balansera effektivitet och effektivitet. Det är dock inte enkelt att tillämpa KD på rankningsproblem. Ranking Destillation (RD) har föreslagits för att ta itu med denna fråga, men visar bara effektivitet när det gäller rekommendationsuppgifter. Vi presenterar en ny tvåstegs destillationsmetod för rangordningsproblem som gör det möjligt för en mindre elevmodell att utbildas samtidigt som man drar nytta av lärarmodellens bättre prestanda, vilket ger bättre kontroll över inferens latens och beräkningsbörda. Vi utformar en ny BERT-baserad rankningsmodellstruktur för listmässig rankning för att fungera som vår studentmodell. Alla rankade kandidater matas till BERT-modellen samtidigt, så att självuppmärksamhetsmekanismen kan möjliggöra gemensamma slutsatser för att rangordna dokumentlistan. Våra experiment bekräftar fördelarna med vår metod, inte bara när det gäller inferens latens utan även när det gäller högre rankning jämfört med den ursprungliga lärarmodellen.', 'ta': 'அளபுருக்களின் எண்ணிக்கையை அதிகரித்து மாதிரியான முன்னேற்றத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்காக அளபுருக்களின் எண்ணிக்கையினாலும் மாதிரி ஒளிப்புகளின அறிவு விளிம்பு (KD) விளைவுகளையும் விளைவுகளையும் ஒப்பிட பொதுவான தீர்வு. ஆயினும், கேடியை நேரடியாக பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்துவது அல்ல. இந்த பிரச்சனையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க ஆரம்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனால் பரிந்துரைப்பு பணிகளில் மட்டும் தான் விளைவுகள We present a novel two-stage distillation method for ranking problems that allows a smaller student model to be trained while benefitting from the better performance of the teacher model, providing better control of the inference latency and computational burden.  நாங்கள் பிரெட் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள நிறம் மாதிரி உருவமைப்பை பட்டியல் புள்ளிவிளங்கும் மாதிரி மாதிரியாக சேவை செ அனைத்து வரிசைப்படுத்தப்படும் தேர்வாளர்களும் BERT மாதிரிக்கு செலுத்தப்படும், அதாவது, ஆவண பட்டியலை வரிசைப்படுத்த முடியும் தன்னை கவனம்  எங்கள் சோதனைகள் எங்கள் முறைமையை உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறார்கள், குறைந்தது மட்டும் மட்டும் இல்லை ஆனால் முதல் ஆசிரியர் மாதிரியை ஒப்பிடும', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں نے نیورل رینگ نیٹورک کی توسعہ میں بہت زیادہ پیشرفت کی ہے، لیکن اس سے بھی زیادہ بوجھ کی کمپیوٹریشن بوجھ ہے جو پارامتروں کی تعداد بڑھتی ہے اور مدل کے مطابق مطابق ہونے کی وجہ سے ہے. علم Distillation However, it is not easy to apply KD to ranking problems. Ranking Distillation (RD) کو اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں حل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کیا گیا ہے، لیکن صرف سفارش کے کاموں پر اثرات دکھاتا ہے. ہم رانڈ مسائل کے لئے ایک نوم دو سٹیج متفاوت طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک چھوٹے طالب موڈل کو تعلیم دینے کی اجازت دیتا ہے جب تک استاد موڈل کے بہترین عملکرد سے فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے، اس طریقہ سے بہترین کنٹرول کرتا ہے، اور کمپیوٹر بوجھ کا بہت ہم نے ایک نوم BERT بنیادی رینگ موڈل ساختار کی طراحی کی کہ ہمارے طالب موڈل کے طور پر خدمت کریں. تمام رئنڈینگ کاندینٹ ایک دفعہ BERT موڈل کے لئے کھلائے جاتے ہیں، اس طرح کہ خود توجه کے مکانیسم کے ساتھ دفعہ لکھنے کے لئے joint inference کو قادر کر سکتے ہیں. ہماری آزمائش ہمارے طریقے کے فائدے کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں، نہیں صرف نازل کی لاٹینس کے بارے میں، بلکہ اس کے بارے میں بھی بہت زیادہ کیفیت رانڈنگ کے بارے میں، اصلی استاد مدل کے مقابلہ میں.', 'uz': "Yaqinda yillar neyrolik tarmoqni taʼminlovchi darajada katta muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatadi, ammo, parametrlarning soni ko'payishi va modelni foydalanish sababda hisoblash yuqori. Maʼlumot Disketlik (KD) tashkilotni va effektiyatlarni balandlash uchun umumiy solution. Lekin, KD dasturini qidirish muammolariga qoʻllash uchun oddiy emas. Ranking Distillation (RD) has been proposed to address this issue, but only shows effectiveness on recommendation tasks.  Biz o'qituvchi modelning yaxshi taʼminlovchidan foydalanishga ega bo'lgan ikki darajada ajratish usulini hozir qilamiz. Bu bir kichkina o'quvchi modelni o'rganish imkoniyatini beradi, va o'qituvchi modelning yaxshi ishlab chiqarish imkoniyatini bajarish mumkin. Biz o'qituvchi modelimizni ishlab chiqarish uchun BERT asosida yaratish modeli tuzilamiz. Hech qachon chegara qiladigan kandidalar BERT modeliga bir xil paydo bo'ladi, shunday qilib, quyidagi hujjatning roʻyxatini ajratish imkoniyatini foydalanadi. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz usulidagi foydalanishni tasdiqlaydi, faqat yaqinligimiz haqida emas, balki aslida o'qituvchi modelga o'xshash darajada ham yuqori darajada.", 'vi': 'Những năm gần đây đã chứng kiến một tiến bộ đáng kể trong việc phát triển các mạng lưới thần kinh, nhưng cũng là một gánh nặng tính to án ngày càng nặng do số lượng tham gia tăng dần và các kết hợp mô hình. Sự phân tách tri thức (KD) là một giải pháp phổ biến để cân bằng hiệu quả và hiệu quả. Tuy nhiên, không dễ dàng áp dụng KDM trong việc xếp hạng các vấn đề. Có đề xuất phân tách hàng lớp (RD) để giải quyết vấn đề này, nhưng chỉ cho thấy hiệu quả với các nhiệm vụ huấn luyện. Chúng tôi có một phương pháp chưng cất hai giai đoạn mới để xếp hạng các vấn đề cho phép một mô hình sinh viên nhỏ hơn được huấn luyện trong khi được hưởng lợi từ hiệu quả tốt hơn của mô hình giáo viên, cung cấp một kiểm soát tốt hơn về tính chậm và tính to án. Chúng tôi thiết kế một mô hình cây bậc cao cấp mới cho hạng bậc cao danh sách phục vụ cho người mẫu sinh viên. Tất cả các ứng cử viên xếp hạng đều được sử dụng cùng một thời gian cho mô hình BERT, khiến cơ chế tự chú ý có thể cho phép kết luận chung cấp bậc danh sách tài liệu. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi xác nhận lợi ích của phương pháp này, không chỉ với việc có xu hướng gây án, mà còn với hạng cao hơn so với kiểu giáo viên ban đầu.', 'da': 'De seneste år har været vidne til betydelige fremskridt i udviklingen af neurale ranking netværk, men også en stadig større beregningsbyrde på grund af stigende antal parametre og indførelsen af model ensembler. Knowledge Destillation (KD) er en fælles løsning til at balancere effektivitet og effektivitet. Det er dog ikke ligetil at anvende KD til rangeringsproblemer. Ranking Destillation (RD) er blevet foreslået for at løse dette problem, men viser kun effektivitet i forbindelse med anbefalingsopgaver. Vi præsenterer en ny todrins destillationsmetode til rangering af problemer, der gør det muligt at træne en mindre elevmodel samtidig med at den drager fordel af den bedre ydeevne af lærermodellen, der giver bedre kontrol over inference latens og beregningsbyrde. Vi designer en ny BERT-baseret ranking model struktur til listevis ranking, der fungerer som vores studerende model. Alle kandidater til rangering føres samtidig til BERT-modellen, således at selvopmærksomhedsmekanismen kan gøre det muligt at fælles konklusioner kan rangere dokumentlisten. Vores eksperimenter bekræfter fordelene ved vores metode, ikke kun med hensyn til inference latens, men også med hensyn til højere kvalitet rangeringer i forhold til den oprindelige lærermodel.', 'nl': 'De laatste jaren is er sprake van aanzienlijke vooruitgang in de ontwikkeling van neurale rankingnetwerken, maar ook van een steeds grotere rekenlast als gevolg van het groeiende aantal parameters en de adoptie van modelsembles. Knowledge Distillation (KD) is een gemeenschappelijke oplossing om effectiviteit en efficiëntie in evenwicht te brengen. Het is echter niet eenvoudig om KD toe te passen op rankingproblemen. Ranking Distillatie (RD) is voorgesteld om dit probleem aan te pakken, maar toont alleen effectiviteit aan bij aanbevelingstaken. We presenteren een nieuwe tweetraps distillatiemethode voor rangschikking van problemen die het mogelijk maakt een kleiner studentenmodel te trainen terwijl het profiteert van de betere prestaties van het lerarenmodel, waardoor de inferentielatentie en de rekenlast beter onder controle worden gehouden. We ontwerpen een nieuwe BERT-based ranking model structuur voor lijst-wise ranking om te dienen als ons studentenmodel. Alle rankingkandidaten worden gelijktijdig naar het BERT-model gevoerd, zodat het zelfattentiemechanisme gezamenlijke conclusie kan maken om de documentenlijst te rangschikken. Onze experimenten bevestigen de voordelen van onze methode, niet alleen met betrekking tot de inferentielatentie, maar ook in termen van hogere kwaliteit rankings ten opzichte van het oorspronkelijke lerarenmodel.', 'bg': 'Последните години станаха свидетели на значителен напредък в развитието на невронните класиращи мрежи, но и на все по-тежка изчислителна тежест поради нарастващия брой параметри и приемането на моделни ансамбли. Дестилацията на знанието (КД) е често срещано решение за балансиране на ефективността и ефективността. Въпреки това, не е лесно да приложите KD към задачите за класиране. За решаване на този проблем е предложено класиране на дестилацията (РД), но показва ефективност само при задачите по препоръки. Представяме нов двуетапен метод за дестилация за класиране на задачи, който позволява да се обучи по-малък студентски модел, като същевременно се възползва от по-доброто представяне на учителския модел, осигурявайки по-добър контрол на латентността на заключенията и изчислителната тежест. Ние проектираме нова структура на модела за класиране въз основа на списък за класиране, за да служи като наш студентски модел. Всички кандидати за класиране се подават по модела едновременно, така че механизмът за самовнимание може да позволи съвместно заключение за класиране на списъка с документи. Нашите експерименти потвърждават предимствата на нашия метод, не само по отношение на латентността на заключенията, но и по отношение на по-качествено класиране в сравнение с първоначалния модел на учителите.', 'hr': 'Posljednje godine su svjedočili značajan napredak u razvoju mreža neuralnog reda, ali i veći računalni teret zbog rastućeg broja parametara i usvajanja modela. Distilacija znanja (KD) je zajednička rješenje za ravnotežu učinkovitosti i učinkovitosti. Međutim, nije jednostavno primjenjivati KD na računalne probleme. Predloženo je da se riješi ovaj problem, ali samo pokazuje učinkovitost na zadatke preporuke. Predstavljamo novu metodu destilacije dvije faze za redoviranje problema koji omogućava obuku manjeg učeničkog model a dok koristi od boljih učinkovitih modela, pružajući bolju kontrolu infekcije latencije i računalnog tereta. Mi dizajniramo novu strukturu redovnog model a na osnovu BERT-a za redovnu listu kako bi služili kao naš studentski model. Svi kandidati iz reda su istovremeno nahranjeni model BERT-a, tako da mehanizam samopouzdanja može omogućiti zajedničku infekciju da rankira listu dokumenta. Naši eksperimenti potvrđuju prednost naše metode, ne samo u pogledu infekcije latencije, nego i u pogledu višeg kvalitetnog reda u usporedbi s originalnim učiteljskim modelom.', 'id': 'Tahun-tahun terakhir telah menyaksikan kemajuan yang besar dalam pengembangan jaringan peringkat saraf, tetapi juga beban komputasi yang semakin berat karena jumlah parameter yang meningkat dan adopsi ensembles model. Distillasi Pengetahuan (KD) adalah solusi umum untuk menyeimbangkan efisiensi dan efisiensi. Namun, tidak mudah untuk menerapkan KD pada masalah rangkaian. Distillasi Ranking (RD) telah diusulkan untuk mengatasi isu ini, tetapi hanya menunjukkan efektivitas pada tugas rekomendasi. We present a novel two-stage distillation method for ranking problems that allows a smaller student model to be trained while benefitting from the better performance of the teacher model, providing better control of the inference latency and computational burden.  Kami merancang sebuah struktur model ranging berbasis BERT untuk ranging daftar bijaksana untuk melayani sebagai model siswa kami. Semua kandidat peringkat diberi makan ke model BERT secara bersamaan, sehingga mekanisme perhatian diri dapat memungkinkan kesimpulan bersama untuk peringkat daftar dokumen. Eksperimen kami mengkonfirmasi keuntungan dari metode kami, bukan hanya dalam hal latensi inferensi tetapi juga dalam hal rangkaian kualitas yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan model guru asli.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 신경 정렬 네트워크의 발전은 실질적인 진전을 거두었지만 파라미터 수량의 증가와 모델 통합의 채택으로 인해 계산 부담도 갈수록 무거워지고 있다.지식 추출(KD)은 효율과 효율을 균형 있게 맞추는 데 자주 사용되는 해결 방안이다.그러나 순위 문제에 KD를 적용하는 것은 쉽지 않다.랭킹 증류(RD)는 이미 이 문제를 해결하기 위해 제기되었지만, 추천 퀘스트의 유효성만 나타냈다.우리는 새로운 2단계 증류 정렬 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 더욱 작은 학생 모델을 훈련할 수 있고 교사 모델의 더 좋은 성능을 얻을 수 있으며 추리 지연과 계산 부담을 더욱 잘 제어할 수 있다.우리는 리스트식 랭킹을 위한 새로운 버트 기반 랭킹 모델 구조를 설계하여 우리의 학생 모델로 삼았다.모든 정렬 후보자가 버트 모델에 동시에 입력됩니다. 그러면 자기주의 메커니즘이 문서 목록을 연합 추리해서 정렬할 수 있습니다.우리의 실험은 우리의 방법의 장점을 증명했다. 추리 지연뿐만 아니라 원시 교사 모델에 비해 더욱 높은 품질 순위에 있다.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren gab es erhebliche Fortschritte bei der Entwicklung neuronaler Rankingnetze, aber auch eine zunehmende Rechenlast aufgrund der wachsenden Anzahl von Parametern und der Annahme von Modellensembles. Wissensdestillation (KD) ist eine gemeinsame Lösung, um Effektivität und Effizienz auszugleichen. Es ist jedoch nicht einfach, KD auf Rankingprobleme anzuwenden. Die Rangdestillation (RD) wurde vorgeschlagen, um dieses Problem anzugehen, zeigt jedoch nur Wirksamkeit bei Empfehlungsaufgaben. Wir stellen eine neuartige zweistufige Destillationsmethode für Ranking-Probleme vor, die es ermöglicht, ein kleineres Schülermodell zu trainieren und gleichzeitig von der besseren Leistung des Lehrermodells zu profitieren, was eine bessere Kontrolle der Inferenz-Latenz und der Rechenlast ermöglicht. Wir entwerfen eine neuartige BERT-basierte Ranking-Modellstruktur für listenweise Rankings als unser Studentenmodell. Alle Rankingkandidaten werden gleichzeitig dem BERT-Modell zugeführt, so dass der Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus eine gemeinsame Schlussfolgerung zur Rangfolge der Dokumentenliste ermöglichen kann. Unsere Experimente bestätigen die Vorteile unserer Methode, nicht nur in Bezug auf die Inferenz-Latenz, sondern auch in Bezug auf qualitativ hochwertigere Rankings im Vergleich zum ursprünglichen Lehrermodell.', 'sw': 'Miaka ya hivi karibuni imeshuhudia maendeleo makubwa katika maendeleo ya mitandao ya rangi ya neura, lakini pia mzigo mkubwa wa kompyuta unaoongezeka kwa sababu ya kuongezeka kwa vipimo vya parameter na kutekelezwa kwa mifano. Kuondolewa kwa maarifa (KD) ni suluhisho la kawaida la kulingana ufanisi na ufanisi. Hata hivyo, si moja kwa moja kutumia KD kwa matatizo yanayoendelea. Uchaguzi wa rangi (RD) umependekezwa kukabiliana na suala hili, lakini inaonyesha ufanisi tu kwenye kazi za mapendekezo. Tunaweza kutenganisha njia ya daraja mbili kwa matatizo ya rangi ambayo inaruhusu mtindo mdogo wa wanafunzi kufundishwa wakati unasaidia kwa ufanisi bora wa muundo wa mwalimu, na kutoa udhibiti mzuri wa kudhibiti upungufu wa dharura na mzigo wa kompyuta. Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa miundombinu yenye rangi ya BERT kwa ajili ya rangi yenye akili ya orodha kutumikia kama mfano wa wanafunzi wetu. Mgombea wote wa rangi wanaruzukiwa kwa mtindo wa BERT kwa wakati mmoja, kama vile mfumo wa kujitegemea unaweza kuwezesha mgonjwa wa pamoja kuweka rangi ya orodha ya nyaraka. Majaribio yetu yanathibitisha faida ya njia yetu, sio tu kwa ajili ya hali ya kutokuwepo kwa kasi ya hivi karibuni bali pia kwa ajili ya rangi za juu zilizolinganishwa na mtindo wa mwalimu wa awali.', 'fa': 'سالهای اخیر، پیشرفت زیادی در توسعه شبکه\u200cهای رقابت عصبی را دیده\u200cاند، و همچنین بار محاسبه\u200cهای سنگین\u200cتر به دلیل افزایش تعداد پارامترها و فرزند\u200cگیری مدل\u200cها، بار محاسبه\u200cکننده\u200cای است. تقسیم دانش (KD) یک راه حل مشترک برای تعادل فعالیت و موثرت است. با این حال، برای کاربرد KD به مشکلات صف ساده نیست. مقدار تحریک (RD) پیشنهاد داده شده تا این مسئله را حل کند، ولی تنها فعالیت بر وظیفه\u200cهای پیشنهاد را نشان می\u200cدهد. ما روش جدایی دو مرحله را برای مشکلات درجه\u200cبندی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که اجازه می\u200cدهد یک مدل دانش آموزشی کوچکتر آموزشی کند در حالی که از عملکرد بهتر مدل معلم استفاده می\u200cکند، و کنترل بهتر از کنترل latency و بار محاسبه\u200cکننده\u200cای است. ما یک نوم مدل مرتبط بر بنیاد BERT را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا به عنوان مدل دانشجوی ما خدمت کند. تمامی کاندیداتی\u200cهای مرتبه به مدل BERT همزمان تغذیه می\u200cشوند، که مکانیسم توجه خود می\u200cتواند آلودگی\u200cهای مشترک را برای مرتبط لیست سند فعال کند. آزمايشات ما سودهايي روش ما رو تاييد مي کنن نه تنها در مورد پيچيده\u200cي آلودگي بلکه در مورد درجه\u200cهايي که با مدل معلم اصلي بهتر هستند.', 'af': "Onlangse jaar het 'n groot vordering getuig in die ontwikkeling van neurale rangende netwerke, maar ook 'n grootste rekenaarsie laai vanweë grootgemaakte nommers van parameters en die aangeneem van model ensembles. Kde is 'n gemeenskaplike oplossing om die effektiviteit en effektiviteit te balanse. Maar, dit is nie eenvoudig na toewend Kde na ranking probleme. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Ranking Distillation (RD) is voorgestel om hierdie probleem te adres, maar net die effektiviteit op aanbeveling opdragte vertoon. Ons stel 'n roman twee-stadige destilasie metode voor die rangering van probleme wat toelaat 'n kleiner student model opgelei word terwyl voordeel word van die beter prestasie van die onderwyser model, wat beter beheer van die inferensie latensie en rekenasiele laai. Ons ontwerp 'n roman BERT-gebaseerde ranking model struktuur vir lys-wyse ranking om as ons studentmodel te dien. Alle rangende kandidate word saam gevoer na die BERT model, sodat die selfaanmerking mekanisme kan aktiveer joint inferensie om die dokumentlys te rank. Ons eksperimente bevestig die voordeel van ons metode nie net met betrekking tot die inferensie latensie nie, maar ook in terms van hoër-kwaliteit rangings vergelyk met die oorspronklike onderwyser model.", 'tr': "Soňky ýyllar näyral derejesi aňlaryň gelişmesinde örän agyr täsirini görýärler, ýöne köp baýramçylyk we modelleriň üýtgetmesi üçin ýokary uly taýýarlar. Bilgi Zaranjak (KD) efektlykyny we efektlykyny çözmek üçin orta çözüldir. Ýöne, KD'i ranklamak kynçylyklara ýeňil däl. Ýygymy çekmek (RD) bu meselede çözmek üçin teklip edildi, ýöne diňe täsirli täsirleýän işlerde etkinlik görkezýär. Biz iki stadiji taýýarlama metodasyny çykarýan problemalary üçin kiçi bir okuwçy nusgasyna mugallymyň gowurak taýýarlamagyny üçin üýtget edýäris we olaryň iň gowurak taýýarlamagyny we kalkular taýýarlamagyny gowurak kontrol etýäris. Biz BERT-de bir roman taýýarlanan düzümler sistemasyny listaky derejesi üçin okuwçymyz nusgasy hökmünde hizmet etmek üçin tasarlýarys. Hemme sahyp kandidatlar BERT nusgasyna bir gezek berilýär, şonuň üçin özi üns mehanizmi senediň listini soňra çykmak üçin birleşik gabdalyklary mümkin edip biler. Biziň deneylerimiz metodamyzyň üstünliklerini tassyklaýar, diňe ýakynlaşyk döwletlere görä däl, ýokary kalitede derejesi başga mugallymyň modeli bilen daşyrylýar.", 'am': 'የቀን ዓመታት የነዌብ አካባቢ መረብ ማውጣትን በመግኘት የውጤት ግንኙነት ታየዋለች፤ ነገር ግን በቁጥር ብዛት እና በሞዴል አካባቢ በመስጠት ምክንያት የሚጨምረው የቁጥጥር ሸክም ነው፡፡ የእውቀት መግለጫ (KD) ጥያቄውን እና ጥያቄውን ለማስተካከል የተለየ ትግባር ነው። ምንም እንኳን KD ለመጠየቅ ችግር አይቻልም፡፡ ይህን ጉዳይ ለመቀላቀል (RD) የተመሠረተ ጉዳይ ብቻ ነው ግን በተመሳሳይ አድራጊዎች ላይ ጥቅም ማሳየት ነው፡፡ We present a novel two-stage distillation method for ranking problems that allows a smaller student model to be trained while benefitting from the better performance of the teacher model, providing better control of the inference latency and computational burden.  የBERT ዳርቻ የተመሠረተውን የፊደል ሥርዓት የዝርዝር አዋቂ ዘርፍ ለማገልገል ተማሪ ሞዴል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች ሁሉ BERT ሞዴል በተሰራበት ጊዜ ይበላሉ፤ የራሳቸውን ምርጫዎች ማሰናከል ሰነዱን ዝርዝር ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የመጀመሪያው አስተማሪው ሞዴል በተያይነ ከፍተኛ ደረጃዎች ላይ ብቻ አይደለም፡፡', 'sq': 'Vitet e fundit kanë dëshmuar përparim thelbësor në zhvillimin e rrjeteve të renditjes nervore, por gjithashtu një barrë kompjuterike gjithnjë e më të rëndë për shkak të numrit në rritje të parametrave dhe miratimit të grupeve modelesh. Distillimi i njohurive (KD) është një zgjidhje e përbashkët për të balancuar efektshmërinë dhe efektshmërinë. Megjithatë, nuk është e thjeshtë të aplikohet KD në problemet e renditjes. Distillimi i renditjes (RD) është propozuar për të trajtuar këtë çështje, por tregon vetëm efektshmëri në detyrat e rekomandimit. Ne paraqesim një metodë të re dy-fazore distillacioni për renditjen e problemeve që lejon një model më të vogël student ësh të trajnohet duke përfituar nga performanca më e mirë e modelit mësues, duke siguruar kontrollin më të mirë të vonesës së përfundimit dhe ngarkesës llogaritare. Ne dizajnojmë një strukturë të re të modelit të renditjes me bazë në BERT për renditjen e list ës për të shërbyer si modeli ynë student ësh. All ranking candidates are fed to the BERT model simultaneously, such that the self-attention mechanism can enable joint inference to rank the document list.  Eksperimentet tona konfirmojnë avantazhet e metodës sonë, jo vetëm lidhur me latencën e inferencës, por gjithashtu lidhur me renditjet e cilësisë më të lartë krahasuar me model in origjinal të mësuesve.', 'az': "Son illərdə nöral səviyyələrinin inkişafında böyük tədbir göstərilməsi və modeli inkişaf etməsi üçün daha ağır bir hesaplama yükü görünür. Bilim Bölüşü (KD) efektivitəti və etkinlik müqabiliyyətini çəkmək üçün ortaq bir çətindir. Ancaq, KD'i səf problemlərinə uygulamaq asanlıdır. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün Ranking Distillation (RD) təbliğ edildi, amma yalnız təbliğ etmə vəsiyyətlərində etkinlik göstərir. Biz iki fərzi distillasyon metodumu göstəririk ki, kiçik öğrenci modeli müəllimin modelinin daha xeyirli performansından istifadə edərkən təhsil edilməsinə müvəffəqiyyət etmək üçün daha yaxşısını və hesablama yükünü daha yaxşı kontrol edər. Bizim öğrencimiz modeli olaraq istifadə etmək üçün yeni BERT tabanlı səviyyə modeli quruluruq. Bütün səviyyətli kandidatlar BERT modelini bir-birinə təmin edirlər, böyük ki, öz-dikkati mehanizmi belə, belələrin listesini dəyişdirmək üçün birləşdirilmək fərqli olar. Bizim təcrübələrimiz metodumuzun faydalarını təsdiqləyir, yalnızca təcrübə dövründə deyil, yalnızca təcrübə dövründə yüksək kaliteli dərəcələrini təsdiqləyir.", 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիները ականատես են եղել նյարդային դասավորման ցանցերի զարգացման մեծ առաջընթացը, սակայն նաև ավելի ու ավելի ծանր հաշվարկների ծանր ծանր ծանր ծանր ծանրություն, որը պատճառ է պարամետրերի աճի և մոդելների համակարգերի Գիտության դիստիլացիան (KD) ընդհանուր լուծում է արդյունավետության և արդյունավետության հավասարակշռության համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, պարզ չէ կիրառել ՔԴ-ը դասակարգման խնդիրների համար: Ranking Distillation (RD) has been proposed to address this issue, but only shows effectiveness on recommendation tasks.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր երկու փուլում դիսլիլացիայի մեթոդ, որն օգտագործում է խնդիրների դասավորման համար, որը թույլ է տալիս փոքր ուսանողական մոդելը կրթություն ստանալ, միաժամանակ օգտագործելով ուսուցիչների մոդելի լավ արտադրողությունները, ապահովում է ավելի լավ վերահսկ Մենք ստեղծում ենք BER-ի հիմնված նոր դասակարգման մոդելի կառուցվածք ցուցակի առումով դասակարգման համար, որպեսզի ծառայենք որպես ուսանողական մոդել: Բոլոր դասակարգված թեկնածուները միաժամանակ ընդունվում են BER մոդելի վրա, այնպես որ ինքնաուշադրության մեխանիզմը կարող է հնարավորություն տալ միասին եզրակացությունը դասակարգել փաստաթղթի ցանկը: Մեր փորձարկումները հաստատում են մեր մեթոդի առավելությունները ոչ միայն վերաբերյալ եզրակացության ուշացության, այլ նաև ավելի բարձր որակի դասակարգումների առումով, համեմատած սկզբնական ուսուցիչ մոդելի հետ:', 'bs': 'Posljednje godine su svjedocili značajan napredak u razvoju neuroloških mreža, ali i veći računalni teret zbog rastućeg broja parametara i usvajanja modela. Distilacija znanja (KD) je zajedničko rješenje za ravnotežu učinkovitosti i učinkovitosti. Međutim, nije jednostavno primjenjivati KD na probleme u redovima. Predloženo je da se riješi ovaj problem, ali samo pokazuje učinkovitost na zadatke preporuke. Predstavljamo novu metodu destilacije dvije faze za redoviranje problema koji omogućava da se obučava manji student model dok koristi od boljih izvođenja nastavnog model a, pružajući bolju kontrolu infekcije latencije i računalnog tereta. Mi dizajniramo novu modelsku strukturu na osnovu BERT-a za listovne redove kako bi služili kao naš student model. Svi kandidati su istovremeno hranjeni BERT modelu, tako da mehanizam samopouzdanja može omogućiti zajedničku infekciju da rankira listu dokumenta. Naši eksperimenti potvrđuju prednost naše metode, ne samo u vezi infekcije latencije, već i u odnosu na višeg kvalitetnog reda u usporedbi s originalnim nastavnim modelom.', 'ca': 'Els últims anys han vist progrés substancials en el desenvolupament de xarxes de classificació neuronal, però també una càrrega computacional cada cop més pesada a causa del creixent nombre de paràmetres i l\'adopció de conjunts de models. Knowledge Distillation (KD) is a common solution to balance the effectiveness and efficiency.  No obstant això, no és senzill aplicar KD als problemes de classificació. S\'ha proposat "Ranking Distillation" (RD) per abordar aquesta qüestió, però només mostra eficacia en les tasques de recomanació. Presentam un nou mètode de destilació en dos etapes per classificar problemes que permet formar un model d\'estudiants més petit, beneficiant-se del millor rendiment del model professor, proporcionant un millor control de la latencia de la inferència i la càrrega computacional. dissenyem una nova estructura de models de classificació basada en BERT per a classificació list àtica per servir com a model d\'estudiants. Tots els candidats en classe s\'alimentan al model BERT simultàniament, de manera que el mecanisme d\'autoatenció pugui permetre a la inferència conjunta classer la llista de documents. Els nostres experiments confirman les avantatges del nostre mètode, no només en relació amb la latencia de la inferència, sinó també en termes de classificacions d\'alta qualitat comparades amb el model original del professor.', 'cs': 'V posledních letech došlo k výraznému pokroku ve vývoji neuronových rankingových sítí, ale také k stále větší výpočetní zátěži v důsledku rostoucího počtu parametrů a přijetí modelových souborů. Destilace znalostí (KD) je běžným řešením pro vyvážení efektivity a efektivity. Nicméně není jednoduché aplikovat KD na problémy s hodnocením. Pro řešení tohoto problému bylo navrženo hodnocení destilace (RD), ale ukazuje pouze účinnost při doporučovacích úkolech. Představujeme novou dvoustupňovou destilační metodu pro hodnocení problémů, která umožňuje trénovat menší studentský model a zároveň těžit z lepšího výkonu učitelského modelu, poskytuje lepší kontrolu latence inference a výpočetní zátěže. Navrhujeme novou strukturu žebříčku založenou na BERT pro seznamové hodnocení, které slouží jako náš studentský model. Všichni kandidáti v hodnocení jsou současně přidáváni do modelu BERT, takže mechanismus sebe-pozornosti může umožnit společné odvození k hodnocení seznamu dokumentů. Naše experimenty potvrzují výhody naší metody nejen s ohledem na latenci inference, ale také z hlediska kvalitnějšího hodnocení oproti původnímu učitelskému modelu.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছর নিউরাল রেঙ্কিং নেটওয়ার্ক উন্নয়নে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অগ্রগতি প্রত্যক্ষ করেছে, কিন্তু সংখ্যার সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি এবং মডেলের সংখ্যা বাড়ত জ্ঞানের বিভ্রান্ত (কে. ডি) হচ্ছে কার্যকরী এবং কার্যকর্ষতা সমানের জন্য একটি সাধারণ সমাধান। তবে কেডিকে র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং সমস্যার প্রয়োগ করার জন্য সোজা নয়। রেঙ্কিং ডিস্টিলেশন (আরডি) এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু শুধুমাত্র পরামর্শের কাজের উপর কার্ আমরা রেঙ্কিং সমস্যার জন্য একটি দুই পর্যায়ে বিচ্ছিন্ন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছি যা ছোট ছাত্র মডেল শিক্ষক মডেলের সুবিধা থেকে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করার সুযোগ দিয়েছে, যার আমরা বেরেট ভিত্তিক রেঙ্কিং মডেল কাঠামোর ডিজাইন করি তালিকা বিজ্ঞানী রেঙ্কিং এর জন্য আমাদের ছাত্র মডেল হিসেবে স সব র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং প্রার্থীরা একই সাথে বিবের্ট মডেলে খাওয়ানো হয়, যেমন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মনোযোগ প্রদান করতে পারে এই নথিটি তালিকায় যোগা আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো আমাদের পদ্ধতির সুবিধা নিশ্চিত করে, শুধুমাত্র সংক্রান্ত সাম্প্রতিক সম্পর্কে নয়, কিন্তু প্রথম শিক্ষক মডেল', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on näha märkimisväärseid edusamme neuraalsete järjestuste võrkude arendamisel, kuid ka üha suuremat arvutuskoormust parameetrite arvu suurenemise ja mudelite ansamblite kasutuselevõtu tõttu. Teadmiste destillatsioon (KD) on levinud lahendus efektiivsuse ja efektiivsuse tasakaalustamiseks. Kuid see ei ole lihtne rakendada KD järjekorras probleeme. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks on tehtud ettepanek järjestuse destillatsioon (RD), kuid see näitab tõhusust ainult soovitustega seotud ülesannete puhul. Esitleme uudset kaheastmelist destilleerimismeetodit probleemide järjestamiseks, mis võimaldab koolitada väiksemat õpilase mudelit, kasutades samal ajal õpetaja mudeli paremat jõudlust, pakkudes paremat kontrolli järelduste latentsuse ja arvutuskoormuse üle. Me kujundame uudse BERT-põhise järjestusmudeli struktuuri nimekirjapõhiseks järjestamiseks, et teenida meie õpilaste mudelina. Kõik järjestuses olevad kandidaadid toidetakse BERTi mudelile samaaegselt, nii et enesetähelepanu mehhanism võimaldab ühiselt järeldada dokumentide nimekirja järjestamist. Meie eksperimendid kinnitavad meie meetodi eeliseid mitte ainult järelduste latentsuse osas, vaid ka kvaliteetsemate järjestuste osas võrreldes algse õpetaja mudeliga.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina on tapahtunut merkittävää edistystä neuropisteytysverkkojen kehittämisessä, mutta myös laskennallinen rasite on lisääntynyt parametrien määrän ja mallikokonaisuuksien käyttöönoton myötä. Knowledge Distillation (KD) on yleinen ratkaisu tehokkuuden ja tehokkuuden tasapainottamiseen. KD:n käyttäminen ranking-ongelmiin ei kuitenkaan ole yksinkertaista. Ranking Distillation (RD) on ehdotettu tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi, mutta se osoittaa tehokkuutta vain suositustehtävissä. Esittelemme uuden kaksivaiheisen tislausmenetelmän ongelmien luokitteluun, joka mahdollistaa pienemmän opiskelijamallin kouluttamisen hyötyen opettajamallin paremmasta suorituskyvystä ja mahdollistaa paremman hallinnan päättelyviiveestä ja laskennallisesta rasituksesta. Suunnittelemme uuden BERT-pohjaisen ranking-mallirakenteen listaviisaaseen sijoitukseen opiskelijamalliksi. Kaikki ranking-ehdokkaat syötetään BERT-malliin samanaikaisesti, jotta itsehuomiomekanismi voi mahdollistaa yhteisen päättelyn dokumenttieluettelon sijoittumiseksi. Kokeemme vahvistavat menetelmämme edut, ei vain päätelmäviiveen osalta, vaan myös laadukkaampien rankingien osalta verrattuna alkuperäiseen opettajamalliin.', 'he': 'השנים האחרונות היו עדים להתקדמות משמעותית בפיתוח של רשתות הדרגה העצבית, אך גם נטל מחשבי כבד יותר ויותר בגלל מספר גדול של פרמטרים ואימוץ של סמלים מודלים. שינוי ידע (KD) הוא פתרון משותף כדי לאזן את היעילות והיעילות. עם זאת, זה לא פשוט להפעיל KD לבעיות הדרגה. הוצעה שינוי מעמד (RD) כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אך מראה יעילות רק על משימות המלצות. אנו מציגים שיטה חדשה בשתי שלבים למצב בעיות שמאפשר למודל תלמיד קטן יותר להתאמן בזמן שירוויח מהביצועים הטובים ביותר של מודל המורה אנחנו מעצבים מבנה מודל ריגוד מבוסס על BERT לרשימה ברשימה כדי לשרת כמודל הסטודנטים שלנו. כל המועמדים המדרגות מקבלים מודל BERT באותו הזמן, כך שהמנגנון תשומת לב עצמית יכול לאפשר למסקנה משותפת להדרגות את רשימת המסמכים. Our experiments confirm the advantages of our method, not just with regard to the inference latency but also in terms of higher-quality rankings compared to the original teacher model.', 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih je priča velikemu napredku pri razvoju nevronskih razvrščevalnih mrež, pa tudi vedno večji računalniški obremenitvi zaradi naraščajočega števila parametrov in sprejetja modelnih ansamblov. Destilacija znanja (KD) je skupna rešitev za uravnotežitev učinkovitosti in učinkovitosti. Vendar pa ni enostavno uporabiti KD za težave z razvrščanjem. Za reševanje tega vprašanja je bilo predlagano razvrščanje destilacije (RD), vendar kaže učinkovitost le pri nalogah priporočil. Predstavljamo novo dvostopenjsko destilacijsko metodo za razvrščanje problemov, ki omogoča usposabljanje manjšega študentskega modela, hkrati pa izkorišča boljšo učinkovitost modela učiteljev, kar zagotavlja boljši nadzor sklepne latence in računalniške obremenitve. Zasnovamo novo strukturo modela razvrščanja na podlagi BERT-a za razvrščanje po seznamu, ki služi kot naš model študentov. Vsi kandidati za razvrstitev se hkrati nahajajo na model BERT, tako da lahko mehanizem samopozornosti omogoči skupno sklepanje razvrstitve seznama dokumentov. Naši eksperimenti potrjujejo prednosti naše metode, ne le glede sklepne latence, temveč tudi glede kakovostnejše lestvice v primerjavi z originalnim modelom učiteljev.', 'ha': "Yẽkaru na farko sun ga mafariko mai girma a developer zangaren danganta na neurar, kuma amma yana da wani nauyi mai ɗauki mai nauyi wa hisãbi, saboda an ƙara ƙidãyar parameteri da kuma ana ƙara zaɓallin fanel. @ info: whatsthis A lokacin da za'a amfani da KD zuwa matabbata mai raɗawa ba. An buƙata da shirin ayuka da aka Range (RD) dõmin ya yi addu'a ga wannan masu zartar da, amma yana nuna mai amfani kawai kan aikin da aka shauri. Tuna gabatar da wata hanyor rarrabẽwa ta biyu ga matabbata masu cikin ranki, wanda ke yarda a sanar da wani misãlani ƙarami da ya yi amfani da shi daga mafi kyaun aikin misalin misalin, da kuma ya sami ƙaranci da nau'in lissafi. Kana ƙayyade wani salon mai salo na BERT-da aka ƙayyade matsayin mai daraja wa mai jerin-jerin, dõmin su yi amfani da misalinmu. Ana nuna duk waɗanan da aka ranar da su zuwa misalin BERT sami, kamar haka, an kanana kansa masu tsari da nau'in haɗi kan ya yarda da tsarin jerin takardar. Kayan jarrabõyinmu, suna gaskata amfani na hanyoyinmu, ba ta zama kawai game da mataimaki na ƙarami, kuma amma a cikin masu daraja da sifanci mafi kyauta sammeni da misalin na farko.", 'jv': 'Rasane sing dumadhi, nyong malah dumadhi kagunian ingkang dianggap banjure tindakan netahan, ingkang sampeyan luwih dumadhi komputasi layanan sakjane mau Distiltion (KDE) iku sampeyan pangutung kanggo kowé nggambar efek karo akeh pisan neng efek. politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness RD Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk sistem sing wis kelas telu nggawe geraksi perbudhakan winih sing apik dhéwé, kuwi supoyo perbudhakan kuwi model sing nyenyane nggawe nguasai sing luwih apik dhéwé, iso nggawe nguasai perbudhakan karo pasar dumadhi sak, ngono nggawe barang dumadhi sak Awak dhéwé nggawe barang BERT-aké basa Ndolet kuwi nggawe sistem dadi, ingkang basa sing nyimpen kuwi nggawe model kuwi maur. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe bener kanggo awakdhéwé, ora nggawe nyimpen karo kaluwargane kuwi tindakan, ngono kuwi nggawe kalitas dhéwé luwih apik terus nyimpen karo model sing paling guru kudu.', 'bo': 'Recent years have witnessed substantial progress in the development of neural ranking networks, but also an increasingly heavy computational burden due to growing numbers of parameters and the adoption of model ensembles. ཤེས་པའི་དབྱིབས་གནས་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་འདིས་ປະສ ན་བྱེད་མཁན་གཙང་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཅིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ཀློག་སྟངས་དཀའ་ངལ་རིམ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་ན། Ranking Distillation ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བའི་ཚོགས་ཁག་ཅིག་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་གློག་རྩོམ་པ་ཆུང་ཆུང་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་སྦྱོར We design a novel BERT-based ranking model structure for list-wise ranking to serve as our student model. ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདི་ཡོངས་སྒྲིག་BERT མིག་དཔེ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ནས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་experiments་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་པའི་སྐྱོན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ངེས་པར་མེད་པར། རྐྱེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར་མཐོང་བ་དང་མཐོང་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར'}
{'en': 'Interactive Question Clarification in Dialogue via Reinforcement Learning', 'ar': 'توضيح سؤال تفاعلي في الحوار عبر التعلم المعزز', 'es': 'Aclaración interactiva de preguntas en diálogo mediante aprendizaje por refuerzo', 'pt': 'Esclarecimento Interativo de Perguntas no Diálogo via Aprendizagem por Reforço', 'fr': "Clarification interactive des questions dans le dialogue grâce à l'apprentissage", 'ja': '強化学習による対話における対話型質問の明確化', 'zh': '以化学澄互动', 'ru': 'Интерактивное разъяснение вопросов в диалоге через обучение подкреплению', 'hi': 'सुदृढीकरण सीखने के माध्यम से संवाद में इंटरैक्टिव प्रश्न स्पष्टीकरण', 'ga': 'Soiléiriú Ceist Idirghníomhach san Idirphlé trí Fhoghlaim Treisithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Interaktív kérdések tisztázása a párbeszédben a tanulás megerősítésével', 'el': 'Διαδραστική διευκρίνιση ερωτήσεων στον διάλογο μέσω της μάθησης ενίσχυσης', 'it': "Chiarimento interattivo delle domande nel dialogo tramite l'apprendimento rafforzato", 'lt': 'Interactive Question Clarification in Dialogue via Reinforcement Learning', 'mk': 'Интерактивно расчистување на прашањата во дијалогот преку зајакнување на учењето', 'kk': 'Тегістеу оқыту арқылы диалогында интерактивті сұрақтарды анықтау', 'ms': 'Penjelasan soalan interaktif dalam Dialog melalui Pembelajaran Pengesahan', 'mt': 'Klarifikazzjoni Interattiva tal-Mistoqsijiet fid-Djalogu permezz tat-Tagħlim tat-Tisħiħ', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുമുഖാനുപയോഗിച്ച് ഇന്റര്\u200dവെക്റ്റെവിക ചോദ്യം വ്യക്തമാക്കുക', 'mn': 'Хамгаалах суралцах аргаар диалогт дээр интерактив асуулт тодорхойлолт', 'no': 'Interaktiv spørsmålsklaring i dialogvindauget ved hjelp av forstørring', 'ro': 'Clarificarea interactivă a întrebărilor în dialog prin consolidarea învățării', 'pl': 'Interaktywne wyjaśnianie pytań w dialogu poprzez uczenie się wzmacniające', 'sr': 'Interaktivno objašnjenje pitanja u dijalogu putem učenja pojačanja', 'sv': 'Interaktiv frågeklaring i dialog via förstärkt lärande', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවාදයේ සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'so': 'Tafsirinta arimaha Interactive Questions in dialogue via Reinforcement Learning', 'ta': 'மீண்டும் அறிவிப்பு மூலம் உள்ளிருக்கும் கேள்வி விவரம்', 'ur': 'سیکھنے کے ذریعہ اینٹرفٹ سؤال کی سؤال کی تفصیل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giải thích cuộc đối thoại qua tăng cường học vấn', 'bg': 'Интерактивно изясняване на въпросите в диалога чрез засилване на обучението', 'hr': 'Interaktivno objašnjenje pitanja u dijalogu putem pojačanja učenja', 'nl': 'Interactieve vragenverduidelijking in dialoog via Reinforcement Learning', 'da': 'Interaktiv spørgsmålstilkendegivelse i dialog via styrkelse af læring', 'de': 'Interaktive Frageklärung im Dialog durch Reinforcement Learning', 'id': 'Penjelasan Pertanyaan Interaktif dalam Dialog melalui Pembelajaran Pengesahan', 'fa': 'توضیح سؤال متفاوتی در محاوره با وسیله یادگیری استوار', 'ko': '학습 강화를 통해 대화에서 상호작용적인 문제를 해명하다', 'sw': 'Swali linalohusiana na Tafsiri katika Dialog kupitia Elimu ya Maendeleo', 'tr': 'Devamlaýyn öwrenmek üçin Dialogda janlaşdyrma soragy', 'sq': 'Klarizimi i pyetjeve interaktive në dialog nëpërmjet mësimit të forcimit', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'az': 'Yükselmə Öyrənməsi vasitəsilə Dialooqda Etkileşimli sual açıqlaması', 'hy': 'Ինտերակտիվ հարցի պարզաբանությունը դասախոսության մեջ ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրության միջոցով', 'bn': 'বিস্তারিত শিক্ষা মাধ্যমে ডায়ালগে ইন্টারেক্টিভ প্রশ্নের ব্যাখ্যা করুন', 'bs': 'Interaktivno objašnjenje pitanja u dijalogu putem učenja pojačanja', 'ca': 'Interactive Question Clarification in Dialogue via Reinforcement Learning', 'cs': 'Interaktivní objasnění otázek v dialogu prostřednictvím posilovacího učení', 'et': 'Interaktiivne küsimuste selgitamine dialoogis tugevdava õppe kaudu', 'fi': 'Vuorovaikutteinen kysymysten selkeyttäminen vuoropuhelussa tehostetun oppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'ProgressBar', 'he': 'ההבהרה של שאלות אינטראקטיבית בדיאלוג באמצעות לימוד חיבורי', 'sk': 'Interaktivno pojasnjevanje vprašanj v dialogu z okrepitvijo učenja', 'ha': 'Description', 'bo': 'reinforcement Learning through Interactive Question Clarification in Dialogue'}
{'en': 'Coping with ambiguous questions has been a perennial problem in real-world dialogue systems. Although clarification by asking questions is a common form of human interaction, it is hard to define appropriate questions to elicit more specific intents from a user. In this work, we propose a reinforcement model to clarify ambiguous questions by suggesting refinements of the original query. We first formulate a collection partitioning problem to select a set of labels enabling us to distinguish potential unambiguous intents. We list the chosen labels as intent phrases to the user for further confirmation. The selected label along with the original user query then serves as a refined query, for which a suitable response can more easily be identified. The model is trained using reinforcement learning with a deep policy network. We evaluate our model based on real-world user clicks and demonstrate significant improvements across several different experiments.', 'ar': 'كان التعامل مع الأسئلة الغامضة مشكلة مزمنة في أنظمة الحوار في العالم الحقيقي. على الرغم من أن التوضيح من خلال طرح الأسئلة هو شكل شائع من أشكال التفاعل البشري ، إلا أنه من الصعب تحديد الأسئلة المناسبة لاستنباط نوايا أكثر تحديدًا من المستخدم. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا معززًا لتوضيح الأسئلة الغامضة من خلال اقتراح تحسينات على الاستعلام الأصلي. نقوم أولاً بصياغة مشكلة تقسيم المجموعة لتحديد مجموعة من الملصقات التي تمكننا من التمييز بين النوايا المحتملة التي لا لبس فيها. نقوم بإدراج التسميات المختارة كعبارات نية للمستخدم لمزيد من التأكيد. عندئذٍ تعمل التسمية المحددة جنبًا إلى جنب مع استعلام المستخدم الأصلي كاستعلام مُحسَّن ، يمكن من أجله تحديد استجابة مناسبة بسهولة أكبر. يتم تدريب النموذج باستخدام التعلم المعزز مع شبكة سياسة عميقة. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا بناءً على نقرات المستخدمين في العالم الحقيقي وإظهار التحسينات المهمة عبر العديد من التجارب المختلفة.', 'pt': 'Lidar com questões ambíguas tem sido um problema perene nos sistemas de diálogo do mundo real. Embora o esclarecimento por meio de perguntas seja uma forma comum de interação humana, é difícil definir perguntas apropriadas para obter intenções mais específicas de um usuário. Neste trabalho, propomos um modelo de reforço para esclarecer questões ambíguas, sugerindo refinamentos da consulta original. Primeiro formulamos um problema de particionamento de coleção para selecionar um conjunto de rótulos que nos permite distinguir possíveis intenções não ambíguas. Listamos os rótulos escolhidos como frases de intenção para o usuário para confirmação adicional. O rótulo selecionado junto com a consulta original do usuário serve como uma consulta refinada, para a qual uma resposta adequada pode ser identificada mais facilmente. O modelo é treinado usando aprendizado de reforço com uma rede de políticas profunda. Avaliamos nosso modelo com base em cliques de usuários do mundo real e demonstramos melhorias significativas em vários experimentos diferentes.', 'es': 'Hacer frente a preguntas ambiguas ha sido un problema perenne en los sistemas de diálogo del mundo real. Si bien la aclaración mediante la formulación de preguntas es una forma común de interacción humana, es difícil definir las preguntas adecuadas para obtener intenciones más específicas de un usuario. En este trabajo, proponemos un modelo de refuerzo para aclarar cuestiones ambiguas al sugerir refinamientos de la consulta original. Primero formulamos un problema de partición de colecciones para seleccionar un conjunto de etiquetas que nos permita distinguir posibles intenciones inequívocas. Enumeramos las etiquetas elegidas como frases de intención para que el usuario las confirme. La etiqueta seleccionada junto con la consulta original del usuario sirve como una consulta refinada, para la que se puede identificar más fácilmente una respuesta adecuada. El modelo se entrena mediante el aprendizaje por refuerzo con una red de políticas profunda. Evaluamos nuestro modelo en función de los clics de los usuarios del mundo real y demostramos mejoras significativas en varios experimentos diferentes.', 'fr': "Faire face à des questions ambiguës est un problème permanent dans les systèmes de dialogue du monde réel. Bien que la clarification en posant des questions soit une forme courante d'interaction humaine, il est difficile de définir des questions appropriées pour susciter des intentions plus spécifiques de la part d'un utilisateur. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un modèle de renforcement pour clarifier les questions ambiguës en suggérant des améliorations de la requête d'origine. Nous formulons d'abord un problème de partitionnement de collection pour sélectionner un ensemble d'étiquettes nous permettant de distinguer les intentions non ambiguës potentielles. Nous listons les étiquettes choisies en tant que phrases d'intention à l'utilisateur pour confirmation ultérieure. L'étiquette sélectionnée ainsi que la requête initiale de l'utilisateur servent alors de requête affinée, pour laquelle une réponse appropriée peut être identifiée plus facilement. Le modèle est formé à l'aide de l'apprentissage par renforcement avec un réseau de politiques approfondi. Nous évaluons notre modèle en fonction des clics réels des utilisateurs et nous démontrons des améliorations significatives dans le cadre de plusieurs expériences différentes.", 'ja': 'あいまいな疑問に対処することは、現実の対話システムにおける長年の問題であった。質問による明確化は人間の相互作用の一般的な形式であるが、ユーザーからより具体的な意図を引き出すために適切な質問を定義することは困難である。この作業では、元のクエリの絞り込みを提案することで、曖昧な質問を明確にするための強化モデルを提案します。私たちはまず、潜在的な明確な意図を識別することができるラベルのセットを選択するためのコレクションパーティショニングの問題を策定します。選択したラベルをインテントフレーズとしてユーザーに一覧表示し、さらなる確認を行います。選択されたラベルは、元のユーザクエリとともに、絞り込まれたクエリとして機能し、そのための適切な応答をより容易に識別することができる。モデルは、深いポリシーネットワークを持つ強化学習を使用してトレーニングされます。私たちは、実際のユーザーのクリックに基づいてモデルを評価し、いくつかの異なる実験にわたって大幅な改善を実証します。', 'zh': '世界之语,处之以久。 虽以问澄为人互动之常文,而难于定义适用户之意。 于此等事,立一强化模样,因议询访细化以澄模棱。 吾先定一合区以择一朋,使吾能分别潜明之意。 列所选标签为意向短语,供用户更确。 然后所选标签及原始用户询将为优化,可更轻识其应。 用深度之策网络强学训练。 据真实世界用户点击量估,并展实验数异。', 'hi': 'अस्पष्ट प्रश्नों के साथ मुकाबला करना वास्तविक दुनिया के संवाद प्रणालियों में एक बारहमासी समस्या रही है। यद्यपि प्रश्न पूछकर स्पष्टीकरण मानव बातचीत का एक सामान्य रूप है, लेकिन उपयोगकर्ता से अधिक विशिष्ट इरादों को प्राप्त करने के लिए उचित प्रश्नों को परिभाषित करना मुश्किल है। इस काम में, हम मूल क्वेरी के शोधन का सुझाव देकर अस्पष्ट प्रश्नों को स्पष्ट करने के लिए एक सुदृढीकरण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम पहले लेबल के एक सेट का चयन करने के लिए एक संग्रह विभाजन समस्या तैयार करते हैं जो हमें संभावित स्पष्ट इरादों को अलग करने में सक्षम बनाता है। हम आगे की पुष्टि के लिए उपयोगकर्ता को इरादा वाक्यांशों के रूप में चुने गए लेबल सूचीबद्ध करते हैं। मूल उपयोगकर्ता क्वेरी के साथ चयनित लेबल तब एक परिष्कृत क्वेरी के रूप में कार्य करता है, जिसके लिए एक उपयुक्त प्रतिक्रिया को अधिक आसानी से पहचाना जा सकता है। मॉडल को एक गहरी नीति नेटवर्क के साथ सुदृढीकरण सीखने का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। हम वास्तविक दुनिया के उपयोगकर्ता क्लिकों के आधार पर अपने मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और कई अलग-अलग प्रयोगों में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Решение двусмысленных вопросов является постоянной проблемой в системах диалога в реальном мире. Хотя разъяснение путем постановки вопросов является распространенной формой взаимодействия человека, трудно определить соответствующие вопросы, чтобы вызвать более конкретные намерения от пользователя. В этой работе мы предлагаем модель усиления для уточнения неоднозначных вопросов, предлагая уточнения первоначального запроса. Сначала мы формулируем задачу разделения коллекции, чтобы выбрать набор меток, позволяющий различать потенциальные однозначные намерения. Выбранные метки перечисляются пользователю как целевые фразы для дальнейшего подтверждения. Выбранная метка вместе с исходным пользовательским запросом затем служит уточненным запросом, для которого можно легче определить подходящий ответ. Модель обучается с использованием обучения подкреплению с глубокой политической сетью. Мы оцениваем нашу модель на основе реальных кликов пользователей и демонстрируем значительные улучшения в нескольких различных экспериментах.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb ilbhliantúil é déileáil le ceisteanna débhríoch i gcórais idirphlé sa saol fíor. Cé gur foirm choiteann idirghníomhaíocht dhaonna é soiléiriú trí cheisteanna a chur, tá sé deacair ceisteanna cuí a shainiú chun rúin níos sainiúla a fháil ón úsáideoir. San obair seo, molaimid múnla athneartaithe chun ceisteanna débhríocha a shoiléiriú trí mhionchoigeartuithe a mholadh ar an gceist bhunaidh. Déanaimid fadhb deighilte bailiúcháin a fhoirmliú ar dtús chun sraith lipéad a roghnú a chuirfidh ar ár gcumas cuspóirí féideartha gan athbhrí a idirdhealú. Déanaimid na lipéid roghnaithe a liostú mar fhrásaí intinne don úsáideoir le deimhniú breise. Feidhmíonn an lipéad roghnaithe mar aon le buncheist an úsáideora mar cheist scagtha, ar féidir freagra oiriúnach a aithint níos éasca dó. Cuirtear oiliúint ar an tsamhail trí úsáid a bhaint as foghlaim athneartaithe le líonra beartais dhomhain. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár múnla bunaithe ar chliceáil úsáideoirí ón bhfíorshaol agus léirímid feabhsuithe suntasacha thar roinnt turgnamh éagsúil.', 'ka': 'არაფერი კითხვებით გადაწყენება რეალური მსოფლიო დიალოგის სისტემებში იყო მსოფლიო პრობლემა. თუმცა კითხვების განსაზღვრება ადამიანის ინტერფექციის საერთო ფორმა იყო, მაგრამ ძალიან რთულია განსაზღვრება სწორი კითხვების განსაზღვრება სპექტიფიკური მიზეზ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით სხვადასხვადასხვა კითხვების განსახულება, რომლებიც მინდომებით ორიგინალური კითხვების განსახულება. ჩვენ პირველად კოლექციის პრობლემა გადავიყენოთ, რომელიც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გადავიყენოთ პრობლემა, რომელიც შეგვიძლია გადავიყენოთ პრობლემენტის უც ჩვენ გამოიყენებული ნიშანების სიტყვების შენახვა მომხმარებელისთვის მომხმარებელისთვის. მონიშნული ნიშანი იგივე ადგილური მომხმარებლის კითხვა და შემდეგ იმუშაობს როგორც განაკეთებული კითხვა, რომლის შესაძლებელი პასუხი უფრო ადგილედ იცნობ მოდელის გამოყენება სწავლების სწავლების გამოყენება ძალიან დიდი პოლიტიკური ქსელით. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელს რეალური მსოფლიოს მომხმარებელი კლიკებით დავიწყებთ და გამოჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებულ ექსპერიმენტებში.', 'el': 'Η αντιμετώπιση διφορούμενων ζητημάτων υπήρξε ένα διαρκές πρόβλημα στα συστήματα πραγματικού διαλόγου. Αν και η διευκρίνιση με την υποβολή ερωτήσεων είναι μια κοινή μορφή ανθρώπινης αλληλεπίδρασης, είναι δύσκολο να καθοριστούν κατάλληλες ερωτήσεις για να αποσπάσουν πιο συγκεκριμένες προθέσεις από έναν χρήστη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο ενίσχυσης για να αποσαφηνίσουμε αμφίβολα ερωτήματα προτείνοντας βελτιώσεις του αρχικού ερωτήματος. Αρχικά διατυπώνουμε ένα πρόβλημα χωρισμού συλλογής για να επιλέξουμε ένα σύνολο ετικετών που μας επιτρέπουν να διακρίνουμε πιθανές σαφείς προθέσεις. Καταγράφουμε τις επιλεγμένες ετικέτες ως φράσεις προθέσεων προς το χρήστη για περαιτέρω επιβεβαίωση. Η επιλεγμένη ετικέτα μαζί με το αρχικό ερώτημα χρήστη χρησιμεύει στη συνέχεια ως ένα εξευγενισμένο ερώτημα, για το οποίο μπορεί να αναγνωριστεί πιο εύκολα μια κατάλληλη απάντηση. Το μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται χρησιμοποιώντας ενισχυτική μάθηση με ένα βαθύ δίκτυο πολιτικής. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας με βάση τα κλικ των χρηστών σε πραγματικό κόσμο και επιδεικνύουμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε διάφορα διαφορετικά πειράματα.', 'hu': 'A kétértelmű kérdések kezelése a valós párbeszédrendszerekben örök probléma volt. Bár a kérdésekkel történő tisztázás az emberi interakció gyakori formája, nehéz meghatározni a megfelelő kérdéseket, hogy konkrétabb szándékokat keltsen egy felhasználótól. Ebben a munkában egy megerősítési modellt javasolunk, amely tisztázza a kétértelmű kérdéseket az eredeti lekérdezés finomításával. Először megfogalmazunk egy gyűjtemény partíciós problémát, hogy kiválasszuk a címkéket, amelyek lehetővé teszik számunkra, hogy megkülönböztessük a potenciális egyértelmű szándékokat. A kiválasztott címkéket szándék kifejezésként soroljuk fel a felhasználónak további megerősítés céljából. A kijelölt címke az eredeti felhasználói lekérdezéssel együtt finomított lekérdezésként szolgál, amelyre a megfelelő válasz könnyebben azonosítható. A modell képzése mélyreható politikai hálózattal történő erősítési tanulás segítségével történik. Modellünket valós felhasználói kattintások alapján értékeljük, és számos különböző kísérlet során jelentős fejlődést mutatunk be.', 'it': "Affrontare questioni ambigue è stato un problema perenne nei sistemi di dialogo del mondo reale. Sebbene il chiarimento facendo domande sia una forma comune di interazione umana, è difficile definire domande appropriate per suscitare intenti più specifici da un utente. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un modello di rinforzo per chiarire domande ambigue suggerendo miglioramenti della query originale. Formuliamo prima un problema di partizionamento della collezione per selezionare un insieme di etichette che ci consentono di distinguere potenziali intenti inequivocabili. Elenchiamo le etichette scelte come frasi di intenti all'utente per ulteriore conferma. L'etichetta selezionata insieme alla query utente originale funge quindi da query raffinate, per la quale è più facile identificare una risposta adeguata. Il modello è formato utilizzando l'apprendimento di rinforzo con una rete di politiche profonde. Valutiamo il nostro modello in base ai clic degli utenti reali e dimostriamo miglioramenti significativi in diversi esperimenti.", 'lt': 'Tikrojo pasaulio dialogo sistemų nuolatinė problem a buvo spręsti dviprasmiškus klausimus. Nors paaiškinimas užduodant klausimus yra bendra žmogaus sąveikos form a, sunku apibrėžti tinkamus klausimus, kad vartotojas galėtų iškelti konkrečius ketinimus. Šiame darbe siūlome tvirtinimo model į, kuriuo būtų paaiškinti dviprasmiški klausimai, siūlydami patikslinti pradinį klausimą. Pirmiausia sukuriame kolekcijos padalijimo problem ą, kad pasirinktume etikečių rinkinį, leidžiantį mums atskirti galimus nedviprasmiškus ketinimus. Naudotojui nurodome pasirinktas etiketes kaip sąmoningas frazes dar kartą patvirtinti. Pažymėta etiketė kartu su pradiniu vartotojo paklausimu naudojama kaip patobulintas paklausimas, dėl kurio galima lengviau nustatyti tinkamą atsakymą. Modelis mokomas naudojant stiprinamąjį mokymąsi su giliu politikos tinklu. We evaluate our model based on real-world user clicks and demonstrate significant improvements across several different experiments.', 'kk': 'Шынымен әлемді диалог жүйелерінде көшірмесіз сұрақтарды көшірмелеу үлкен мәселе болды. Сұрақтар сұрақтарымен түсініктеме - адамдардың қатынасы жалпы түрі, бірақ пайдаланушыдан арнаулы мақсаттарды таңдау үшін қолданылатын сұрақтарды анықтау қиын. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз бастапқы сұранысты түзетуге көмектесу үлгісін таңдау үшін көмектесу үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біз біріншіден жинақтау бөлімінің мәселесін таңдау үшін бірнеше жарлық жинақтарын таңдаймыз, бұл мүмкіндікті таңдауға мүмкіндік болмайды. Біз таңдалған жарлықтарды қосымша құптау үшін пайдаланушыға мақсатты сөздер ретінде тізіміз. Таңдалған жарлығы бастапқы пайдаланушының сұранысымен бірге кейін түзетілген сұраныс ретінде қызмет, ол үшін жауап оңай анықтауға болады. Бұл үлгі тұтас саясаттар желімен оқытуды күшейту арқылы оқылған. Біз өзіміздің үлгімізді шын әлемдегі пайдаланушыларды түртіп, бірнеше түрлі тәжірибелердің бірнеше түрлі тәжірибелерінде көп жақсартуларын', 'mk': 'Соочувањето со двогледни прашања беше постојан проблем во системите на дијалог во реалниот свет. Иако објаснувањето со поставување прашања е заедничка форма на човечка интеракција, тешко е да се дефинираат соодветни прашања за да се предизвикаат посебни намери од корисникот. Во оваа работа, предложуваме модел за зајакнување за јаснување на двогледните прашања со предложување на рефинансирање на оригиналното прашање. Прво формулираме проблем со поделбата на колекцијата за да избереме сет етикети кои ни овозможуваат да разликуваме потенцијални нејасни намери. Ги листираме избраните етикети како намерни фрази на корисникот за понатамошна потврда. Избраната етикета заедно со оригиналното запрашување на корисникот потоа служи како рафинирано запрашување, за кое може лесно да се идентификува соодветен одговор. Моделот е обучен користејќи зајакнување на учењето со длабока политичка мрежа. Го проценуваме нашиот модел врз основа на кликовите на корисниците во реалниот свет и покажуваме значителни подобрувања во неколку различни експерименти.', 'ml': 'പ്രശ്നമില്ലാത്ത ചോദ്യങ്ങളുമായി കൂട്ടുന്നത് ശരിക്കും ലോകത്തിലെ ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d ഒരു കാലാവധി പ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു പൊതുവായ രീതിയാണെങ്കിലും, ഉപയോക്താവില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഉദ്ദേശ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, ആദ്യമായ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രശ We first formulate a collection partitioning problem to select a set of labels enabling us to distinguish potential unambiguous intents.  കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉറപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ലേബുകളുടെ വാക്കുകളായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ലിസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ ചോദ്യം കൊണ്ട് തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ലേബില്\u200d പിന്നീട് വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യം പുനരുത്തമാക ഒരു ആഴമുള്ള പോലീസ് നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുമായി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലനം ലഭ് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ ക്ലിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലയിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്ത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില', 'no': 'Kopiering med avgjengelege spørsmål er eit anna problem i verkeleg dialogsystemet. Selv om det er vanskeleg å definera passande spørsmål ved å spørja spørsmål, er det vanskeleg å bestemme meir spesifikke mål frå ein brukar. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit reinforcementmodell for å klargjera avgjengelege spørsmål ved å foreslå refinering av den opprinnelige spørsmålet. Vi formerer først eit samlingsplitteringsproblem for å velja eit sett merkelappar som gjer oss å distisera potensielle uavhengige mål. Vi lister dei valde merkelappene som målsettingar til brukaren for meir stadfesting. Den valde merkelappen saman med den opprinnelige brukarspørjinga, er derfor ein refinert spørjing, som kan enklare identifiserast ein passande svar. Modellen er utlært ved hjelp av forstørringar med ein dyp politisk nettverk. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt basert på verkeleg klikk og demonstrarer signifikante forbedringar i fleire forskjellige eksperimenter.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн диалог системд олон жилийн асуудалтай хуваалцах нь маш олон асуудал юм. Гэхдээ асуултуудыг асуухад тодорхойлох нь хүн төрөлхтний харилцааны ерөнхий хэлбэр, хэрэглэгчийн илүү тодорхой зорилгоонуудыг сонгохын тулд асуултуудыг тодорхойлох нь хэцүү. Энэ ажлын тулд бид үндсэн асуултуудыг тодорхойлохын тулд нэмэгдүүлэх загварыг санал болгож байна. Эхлээд бид цуглуулалтын хуваагдах асуудлыг тодорхойлох боломжгүй зорилгоонуудыг тодорхойлж чадна. Бид сонгогдсон загваруудыг хэрэглэгчдэд илүү тодорхойлох зорилго гэсэн үг гэж нэрлэж байна. Шинэ сонгогдсон загвар эхний хэрэглэгчийн квадраттай хамтдаа, дараа нь шинэчлэгдсэн квадрат болгож ажилладаг. Хариулт нь илүү амархан тодорхойлж чадна. Энэ загвар нь гүн гүнзгий бодлогын сүлжээ суралцах сургалтыг ашиглан суралцагдсан. Бид бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглэгчийн клик дээр багтаж, олон өөр туршилтууд дээр маш чухал сайжруулалт үзүүлдэг.', 'pl': 'Radzenie sobie z niejednoznacznymi pytaniami jest wieloletnim problemem w realnych systemach dialogu. Chociaż wyjaśnienie poprzez zadawanie pytań jest powszechną formą interakcji człowieka, trudno jest zdefiniować odpowiednie pytania, aby wywołać bardziej konkretne intencje od użytkownika. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy model wzmocnienia, aby wyjaśnić niejednoznaczne pytania poprzez sugerowanie udoskonaleń oryginalnego zapytania. Najpierw formułujemy problem partycjonowania kolekcji w celu wyboru zestawu etykiet pozwalających na rozróżnienie potencjalnych jednoznacznych intencji. Wybrane etykiety wymieniamy jako frazy intencyjne do użytkownika w celu dalszego potwierdzenia. Wybrana etykieta wraz z oryginalnym zapytaniem użytkownika służy następnie jako dopracowane zapytanie, dla którego można łatwiej zidentyfikować odpowiednią odpowiedź. Model jest szkolony przy użyciu uczenia się wzmacniającego z głęboką siecią polityki. Oceniamy nasz model w oparciu o rzeczywiste kliknięcia użytkowników i demonstrujemy znaczące ulepszenia w kilku różnych eksperymentach.', 'ro': 'Rezolvarea întrebărilor ambigue a constituit o problemă permanentă în sistemele de dialog din lumea reală. Deși clarificarea prin punerea întrebărilor este o formă comună de interacțiune umană, este greu de definit întrebări adecvate pentru a provoca intenții mai specifice de la un utilizator. În această lucrare, propunem un model de consolidare pentru a clarifica întrebări ambigue, sugerând rafinări ale interogării originale. Formulăm mai întâi o problemă de partiționare a colecției pentru a selecta un set de etichete care ne permit să distingem intențiile potențiale lipsite de ambiguitate. Listăm etichetele alese ca fraze de intenție utilizatorului pentru confirmare suplimentară. Eticheta selectată împreună cu interogarea inițială a utilizatorului servește apoi ca o interogare rafinată, pentru care un răspuns adecvat poate fi identificat mai ușor. Modelul este instruit folosind învățarea de consolidare cu o rețea profundă de politici. Evaluăm modelul nostru pe baza clicurilor utilizatorilor din lumea reală și demonstrăm îmbunătățiri semnificative în mai multe experimente diferite.', 'ms': 'Menghadapi soalan yang ambiguh telah menjadi masalah selama-lamanya dalam sistem dialog dunia nyata. Walaupun penjelasan dengan menanyakan soalan adalah bentuk umum interaksi manusia, sukar untuk menentukan soalan yang sesuai untuk menghasilkan niat yang lebih spesifik dari pengguna. In this work, we propose a reinforcement model to clarify ambiguous questions by suggesting refinements of the original query.  Kami pertama-tama membentuk masalah pemisahan koleksi untuk memilih set label yang membolehkan kita membezakan potensi niat yang tidak jelas. Kami senaraikan label yang dipilih sebagai frasa niat kepada pengguna untuk pengesahan lanjut. Label yang dipilih bersama permintaan pengguna asal kemudian berkhidmat sebagai permintaan terjemput, yang mana jawapan yang sesuai boleh dikenalpasti dengan mudah. Model dilatih menggunakan pembelajaran penyokong dengan rangkaian kebijaksanaan dalam. Kami menilai model kami berdasarkan klik pengguna dunia nyata dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam beberapa eksperimen yang berbeza.', 'sr': 'Odgovor sa dvosmislenim pitanjima je bio večni problem u realnim dijalogskim sistemima. Iako je objašnjenje postavljajući pitanja zajednički oblik ljudskog interakcije, teško je definisati odgovarajuća pitanja kako bi izazvala više specifičnih namera od korisnika. U ovom poslu predlažemo model pojačanja da objašnjava dvosmislene pitanja predlažeći ispravak originalnog pitanja. Prvo formuliramo problem sa particijama kolekcije kako bi izabrali set etiketa koje nam omogućavaju da razlikujemo potencijalne neizbežne namere. Prepisujemo odabrane etikete kao namjerne rečenice korisniku za daljnju potvrdu. Izabrana etiketa zajedno sa originalnim zahtevom korisnika poslužava kao refinansiranom zahtevom, za koju se može lako identifikovati odgovarajući odgovor. Model je obučen koristeći učenje pojačanja sa dubokom političkom mrežom. Procjenjujemo naš model baziran na klikovima realnog svijeta i pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje u raznim eksperimentima.', 'si': 'ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ සංවාදය පද්ධතියේදී ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අහන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් වඩා විශේෂ අභිවාදකයෙ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පැහැදිලි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පැහැදිලි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැ අපි මුලින්ම සංගේතනය වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සූදානම් කරනවා ලේබෙල් සූදානයක් තෝරාගන්න, අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ අපි තෝරාගෙන තියෙන්න තියෙන ලෙබෙල්ස්ව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න තෝරාගත ලේබෙල් මුලින් භාවිතා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සමඟ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට සේවා කරනවා මොඩේල් එක ගොඩක් පොලිසි ජාලයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. අපි ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා ක්ලික් වලින් අපේ මොඩල් අගමාණය කරනවා වගේම වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණ වලින් විශේෂ', 'mt': 'L-indirizzar ta’ mistoqsijiet ambigwi kien problem a permanenti fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu fid-dinja reali. Għalkemm il-kjarifika permezz ta’ mistoqsijiet hija form a komuni ta’ interazzjoni umana, huwa diffiċli li jiġu definiti mistoqsijiet xierqa biex jinħolqu intenzjonijiet aktar speċifiċi minn utent. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ rinfurzar biex niċċaraw mistoqsijiet ambigwi billi nissuġġerixxu rinfurzar tal-mistoqsija oriġinali. L-ewwel nagħmlu problem a ta’ qsim tal-ġbir biex nagħżlu sett ta’ tikketti li jippermettulna niddistingwu l-intenzjonijiet potenzjali mhux ambigwi. Nielenkaw it-tikketti magħżula bħala frażijiet intenzjonati lill-utent għal aktar konferma. The selected label along with the original user query then serves as a refined query, for which a suitable response can more easily be identified.  Il-mudell huwa mħarreġ bl-użu ta’ tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar b’netwerk ta’ politika profond. We evaluate our model based on real-world user clicks and demonstrate significant improvements across several different experiments.', 'so': "Codsashada su'aalo qallafsan waa dhibaato nolol-cimri ah oo ku jirta nidaamka dialogka ee caalamka ah. In kastoo ay caddeyso in ay su’aalo weydiisto waa nooc caadi ah oo la xiriira dadka, waxaa ku adag in la caddeeyo su’aalo ku haboon in la soo bandhiyo waxyaabo gaar ah oo la xiriiro isticmaalaha. In this work, we propose a reinforcement model to clarify ambiguous questions by suggesting refinements of the original query.  Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu sameynaa dhibaato qeybinta shaqada si aan u dooranno saf labo ah, taasoo inagu caawinaya si aan u kala soobixino qasabka ay awoodi u baahnaan. Waxaan isticmaalaha ugu liineynaa alaabta la doortay si aad u xaqiijiso. Labelka la doortay oo la xiriira qoraalka asalka ah ee isticmaalaha kadibna waxaa loo adeegaa su'aal la sawiray, kaas oo jawaab ku haboon lagu aqoonsan karo si fudud. Tusaale ahaan waxaa lagu baran karaa barashada horumarinta iyo shabakadda siyaasada ee mool dheer. Tusaalkayaga waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa dhaqdhaqaaqa isticmaalaha caalamiga ah ee runta ah iyo waxaynu muujinnaa horumarinta badan ee jirrabo kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Att hantera tvetydiga frågor har varit ett ständigt problem i de verkliga dialogsystemen. Även om klargörande genom att ställa frågor är en vanlig form av mänsklig interaktion, är det svårt att definiera lämpliga frågor för att framkalla mer specifika avsikter från en användare. I detta arbete föreslår vi en förstärkningsmodell för att klargöra tvetydiga frågor genom att föreslå förbättringar av den ursprungliga frågan. Först formulerar vi ett partitioneringsproblem för att välja en uppsättning etiketter som gör att vi kan urskilja potentiella entydiga avsikter. Vi listar de valda etiketterna som avsiktsfraser till användaren för ytterligare bekräftelse. Den markerade etiketten tillsammans med den ursprungliga användarfrågan fungerar sedan som en förfinad fråga, för vilken ett lämpligt svar lättare kan identifieras. Modellen utbildas med hjälp av förstärkt lärande med ett djupt policynätverk. Vi utvärderar vår modell baserat på verkliga användarklick och visar betydande förbättringar genom flera olika experiment.', 'ta': 'விருப்பமான கேள்விகளுடன் ஒப்பிடுதல் உண்மையான உலக உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளில் ஒரு வருடமான பிரச்சினை Although clarification by asking questions is a common form of human interaction, it is hard to define appropriate questions to elicit more specific intents from a user.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு முன்னேற்ற முறைமையை தெளிவாக்குவதற்கு முன்னிருப்பு கேள்விகளின் மூல கேள்வியின் முன்ன நாம் முதலில் ஒரு தொகுப்பு பிரிவு பிரிவு பிரச்சனையை உருவாக்குகிறோம் சில குறிகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க செயல்படுத்தும்  நாம் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட சிட்டிகளை மேலும் உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்கு பயனருக்கு செயல்படுத்தும் சொற் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட விளக்கச்சீட்டு முதல் பயனர் கேள்வியுடன் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட கேள்வி Name நாம் உண்மையான உலக பயனர் க்ளிக் அடிப்படையில் எங்கள் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் பல்வேறு சோதனைகளில் முக்க', 'ur': 'مشکل سوالات کے ساتھ کپی کرنا حقیقی دنیا کی دیالوگ سیستموں میں ایک ہمیشہ مسئلہ ہے۔ اگرچہ سؤال پوچھنے کے ذریعہ مفصل انسان کی تعامل کا ایک مشترک شکل ہے، اس سے بہت مشترک سؤال کا تعریف کرنے کا مشکل ہے کہ ایک کارساز سے زیادہ مشترک مفصل پیدا کریں. اس کام میں ہم ایک مدل کی قوت دینے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ مشکل سوالوں کو واضح کر دیں اور اصلی سؤال کی پابندی کی پیشنهاد کریں۔ ہم پہلی بار ایک مجموعہ پارتیشن مسئلہ کا فرمول کرتے ہیں کہ ایک مجموعہ لیبل کو انتخاب کریں جو ہمیں امکانات غیر مشکل کا اختلاف کرے۔ ہم انتخاب کئے ہوئے لیبلوں کو اضافہ کی تصدیق کے لئے کارساز کے لئے مطلوب عبارت کے طور پر لکھتے ہیں. انتخاب کیے گئے لیبل اوریل کارس کوریہ کے ساتھ پھر پابند کیے گئے کیونکہ اس کے لئے بہترین جواب آسانی سے پہچان سکتا ہے. مدل ایک عمیق پولیس نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے کے مطابق استعمال کی جاتی ہے. ہم نے ہماری موڈل کو حقیقی دنیاوی کارساز کلیک پر بنیاد رکھا ہے اور بہت سے مختلف آزمائش میں بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Agar savollarni soʻrash soʻrov soʻrovi odamning umumiy interfeys turi, foydalanuvchidan qoʻshimcha foydalanuvchidan foydalanuvchi qanday foydalanuvchini aniqlash juda qiyin. In this work, we propose a reinforcement model to clarify ambiguous questions by suggesting refinements of the original query.  Biz birinchi birinchi qismni ajratish muammolarini yaratishimiz va bizga hech qanday bo'lmagan qatlamni ajratish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis @ info Name Biz haqiqiqiy dunyo foydalanuvchisi bosilgan modelimizni qiymatimiz va bir necha tajribalar bilan juda muhim yaxshi o'tibor beramiz.", 'vi': 'Kết thúc bằng những câu hỏi mơ hồ luôn là một vấn đề liên tục trong hệ thống đối thoại. Tuy rằng đặt câu hỏi là một hình thức phổ biến của giao tiếp con người, nhưng khó có thể xác định những câu hỏi thích hợp để khiến người dùng có ý định cụ thể hơn. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình củng cố để làm rõ những câu hỏi mơ hồ bằng cách gợi ý cải thiện câu hỏi gốc. Trước tiên, chúng ta đặt ra một vấn đề phân chia bộ sưu tập để chọn một loạt nhãn để phân biệt tiềm năng rõ ràng. Chúng tôi liệt kê các nhãn đã chọn như đoạn chú ý cho người dùng để xác nhận thêm. Sau đó, nhãn được chọn cùng với câu hỏi người dùng gốc phục vụ như một câu hỏi phức tạp, để có thể xác định một đáp ứng thích hợp dễ dàng hơn. Mô hình được huấn luyện bằng việc củng cố học tập với một mạng lưới chính sách sâu. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu dựa trên nhắp người dùng trên thế giới thực và hiển thị những cải tiến đáng kể trong nhiều thí nghiệm khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Справянето с неясни въпроси е многогодишен проблем в системите за диалог в реалния свят. Въпреки че изясняването чрез задаване на въпроси е често срещана форма на човешко взаимодействие, е трудно да се определят подходящи въпроси, за да се предизвикат по-конкретни намерения от потребителя. В тази работа предлагаме модел за подсилване с цел изясняване на двусмислени въпроси, като предлагаме усъвършенстване на оригиналната заявка. Първо формулираме проблем с разделянето на колекциите, за да изберем набор от етикети, които ни позволяват да разграничим потенциалните недвусмислени намерения. Избраните етикети са изброени като изрази за намерение на потребителя за допълнително потвърждение. Избраният етикет заедно с оригиналната потребителска заявка после служи като усъвършенствана заявка, за която подходящ отговор може по-лесно да бъде идентифициран. Моделът се обучава чрез усвояване на обучението с дълбока политическа мрежа. Ние оценяваме нашия модел въз основа на кликванията на потребителите в реалния свят и демонстрираме значителни подобрения в няколко различни експеримента.', 'da': 'Håndteringen af tvetydige spørgsmål har været et evigt problem i dialogsystemerne i den virkelige verden. Selvom afklaring ved at stille spørgsmål er en almindelig form for menneskelig interaktion, er det svært at definere passende spørgsmål for at fremkalde mere specifikke hensigter fra en bruger. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en forstærkningsmodel for at afklare tvetydige spørgsmål ved at foreslå forbedringer af den oprindelige forespørgsel. Vi formulerer først et problem med opdeling af samlinger for at vælge et sæt etiketter, der gør det muligt at skelne mellem potentielle entydige hensigter. Vi angiver de valgte etiketter som hensigtssætninger til brugeren for yderligere bekræftelse. Den valgte etiket sammen med den oprindelige brugerforespørgsel fungerer derefter som en raffineret forespørgsel, hvor et passende svar lettere kan identificeres. Modellen trænes ved hjælp af forstærkningslæring med et dybt politisk netværk. Vi evaluerer vores model baseret på virkelige brugerklik og demonstrerer betydelige forbedringer på tværs af flere forskellige eksperimenter.', 'hr': 'Odgovor s dvosmislenim pitanjima bio je večni problem u realnim dijalogskim sustavima. Iako je objašnjenje postavljajući pitanja zajednički oblik ljudske interakcije, teško je definirati odgovarajuća pitanja kako bi izbrisali specifičnije namjere korisnika. U ovom poslu predlažemo model pojačanja da objašnjava dvosmislene pitanja predlažeći ispravak originalnog pitanja. Prvo formuliramo problem sa particijama kolekcije kako bi izabrali niz etiketa koje nam omogućavaju da razlikujemo potencijalne neizbježne namjere. Prepisujemo odabrane etikete kao namjerne rečenice korisniku za daljnje potvrđenje. Izabrana etiketa zajedno s originalnim zahtevom korisnika onda služi kao refinanirani zahtev, za kojeg se može lako identificirati odgovarajući odgovor. Model je obučen koristeći učenje pojačanja s dubokom političkom mrežom. Procjenjujemo naš model na temelju klikova korisnika na stvarnom svijetu i pokazujemo značajne poboljšanja u raznim eksperimentima.', 'de': 'Die Bewältigung zweideutiger Fragen ist in realen Dialogsystemen seit jeher ein Problem. Obwohl Klärung durch Fragen eine gängige Form der menschlichen Interaktion ist, ist es schwierig, geeignete Fragen zu definieren, um spezifischere Absichten von einem Benutzer hervorzurufen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein Verstärkungsmodell vor, um mehrdeutige Fragen zu klären, indem wir Verfeinerungen der ursprünglichen Abfrage vorschlagen. Zunächst formulieren wir ein Problem der Sammlungspartitionierung, um eine Reihe von Labels auszuwählen, die es uns ermöglichen, mögliche eindeutige Absichten zu unterscheiden. Wir listen die ausgewählten Labels als Intent Phrasen an den Benutzer zur weiteren Bestätigung auf. Das ausgewählte Label dient dann zusammen mit der ursprünglichen Benutzerabfrage als verfeinerte Abfrage, für die eine passende Antwort leichter identifiziert werden kann. Das Modell wird durch Verstärkungslernen mit einem tiefen Policy-Netzwerk trainiert. Wir evaluieren unser Modell anhand realer Nutzerklicks und zeigen signifikante Verbesserungen in verschiedenen Experimenten auf.', 'nl': 'Omgaan met dubbelzinnige vragen is een eeuwig probleem in de echte dialoogsystemen. Hoewel verduidelijking door vragen te stellen een veelvoorkomende vorm van menselijke interactie is, is het moeilijk om geschikte vragen te definiëren om meer specifieke intenties van een gebruiker op te wekken. In dit werk stellen we een versterkingsmodel voor om dubbelzinnige vragen te verduidelijken door verfijningen van de oorspronkelijke vraag te suggereren. We formuleren eerst een collectiepartitioneringsprobleem om een set labels te selecteren waarmee we mogelijke eenduidige intenties kunnen onderscheiden. We vermelden de gekozen labels als intentiezinnen aan de gebruiker voor verdere bevestiging. Het geselecteerde label dient dan samen met de oorspronkelijke gebruikersquery als een verfijnde query, waarvoor gemakkelijker een passend antwoord kan worden geïdentificeerd. Het model wordt getraind met behulp van versterking learning met een diep beleidsnetwerk. We evalueren ons model op basis van real-world gebruikersklikken en demonstreren significante verbeteringen in verschillende experimenten.', 'ko': '현실 세계의 대화 시스템에서 애매모호한 문제를 처리하는 것은 장기적으로 존재하는 문제이다.질문을 통해 밝히는 것은 인류 상호작용의 흔한 형식이지만 적당한 문제를 정의하여 사용자로부터 더욱 구체적인 의도를 이끌어내기 어렵다.이 모호한 문제를 분명히 하기 위해서 우리는 개선된 원시 모델을 제시했다.우리는 잠재적인 명확한 의도를 구분할 수 있도록 집합 구분 문제를 먼저 제기했다.선택한 탭을 의향구로 열거하여 사용자가 더욱 확인할 수 있도록 합니다.그리고 선택한 탭은 원시 사용자 조회와 함께 최적화된 조회로서 적당한 응답을 식별하기 쉽다.이 모델은 학습 강화와 깊이 있는 전략 네트워크를 활용해 훈련한다.우리는 실제 세계의 사용자 클릭을 바탕으로 우리의 모델을 평가하고 몇 가지 다른 실험에서 현저한 개선을 보여 주었다.', 'id': 'Menghadapi pertanyaan yang ambiguh telah menjadi masalah selama-lamanya dalam sistem dialog dunia nyata. Meskipun penjelasan dengan menanyakan pertanyaan adalah bentuk umum interaksi manusia, sulit untuk mendefinisikan pertanyaan yang sesuai untuk mengakibatkan tujuan yang lebih spesifik dari pengguna. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan model pemerintahan untuk menjelaskan pertanyaan yang ambiguh dengan menyarankan penentuan pertanyaan asli. We first formulate a collection partitioning problem to select a set of labels enabling us to distinguish potential unambiguous intents.  Kami daftar label yang dipilih sebagai frasa niat bagi pengguna untuk konfirmasi lanjut. Label yang dipilih bersama dengan pertanyaan pengguna asli kemudian melayani sebagai pertanyaan terinfeksi, yang mana respon yang sesuai dapat lebih mudah dikenal. Modelnya dilatih menggunakan pemerintahan belajar dengan jaringan kebijakan dalam. Kami mengevaluasi model kami berdasarkan klik pengguna dunia nyata dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam beberapa eksperimen yang berbeda.', 'tr': 'Ýa şsyz soraglary bilen çykmak dünýä dünýä dijalog sistemalarynda öňüräk mesele bolup geçdi. Soraglary sorap bilen düşündirilmek adam etkileşiniň orta şekli, ýöne usuçylaryň has maksadyny taýýarlamak kyn. Bu işde, biz özüniň soragynyň taýýarlanmagyny maslahat etmek üçin köpräk nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Biz ilkinji gezek bir ýygnak bölümlemesi meselesini saýlamak üçin bir etiket setini fomula edýäris Biz saýlanan etiketleriň üst bir taslaýyş üçin ullanyşylary niýetleşdirýän sözleri görkez. Saýlanan metini original Ullançy soragy bilen birlikde saýlanan metini soňra taýýarlanýan soragy hökmünde, bu üçin uygun jogaby bejermek a ňsatlyk bilen tanyşdyrylýar. Bu nusga çulyk politika şebekesi bilen dynç öwrenmegi ulanyp bilinýär. Biziň modelimizi hakyky dünýäde ulanylaryň kliklerine daýanýar we birnäçe dürli deneyleriň arasynda möhüm gelişmeleri görkez.', 'sw': 'Kupambana na maswali yasiyo na matatizo yamekuwa tatizo la kila siku katika mfumo wa mazungumzo ya dunia halisi. Ingawa ufafanuzi kwa kuuliza maswali ni aina ya kawaida ya mahusiano ya binadamu, ni vigumu kuelezea maswali yanayoweza kupata nia maalum kutoka kwa mtumiaji. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mtindo wa kuimarisha kuelezea maswali yasiyo na maana kwa kupendekeza mabadiliko ya utafiti wa awali. Kwanza tunatengeneza tatizo la kushirikiana kwa mkusanyiko ili kutuchagua seti ya maabara inayotuwezesha kutofautisha nia isiyo na maana. Tunorodhesha alama zilizochaguliwa kama maneno ya lengo kwa mtumiaji ili kuthibitishwa zaidi. Alama zilizochaguliwa pamoja na utafiti wa asili wa mtumiaji, kisha huhudumia kama swali lililotengenezwa, ambalo majibu yanaweza kutambuliwa kirahisi zaidi. Mfano huu umefundishwa kwa kutumia kujifunza kwa kutumia mtandao wa ndani wa sera. We evaluate our model based on real-world user clicks and demonstrate significant improvements across several different experiments.', 'af': "Kopeer met ongelukkige vrae is 'n perjaarlike probleem in regte wêreld dialoog stelsels. Alhoewel klarifikasie deur vrae te vra is 'n gemeenskaplike vorm van menslike interaksie, is dit moeilik om geskikte vrae te definieer om meer spesifieke doels van 'n gebruiker te verlos. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n versterking model om ongelukkige vraagte te duidelik deur die opfriggings van die oorspronklike navraag te stel. Ons formeer eerste 'n versameling partisiering probleem om 'n stel etikette te kies wat ons toelaat om potensiele onbepaalde doels te distingueer. Ons lys die gekose etikette as doel frase vir die gebruiker vir verdere bevestiging. Die gekose etiket saam met die oorspronklike gebruiker navraag dan dien as 'n verfris navraag, waarvoor 'n geskikte antwoord maklik kan wees identifiseer. Die model is opgelei deur te gebruik versterking leer met 'n diep beleidnetwerk. Ons evalueer ons model gebaseer op reël wêreld-gebruiker klikke en wys betekende verbeteringe oor verskeie verskillende eksperimente.", 'fa': 'در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگوی جهان واقعی یک مشکل طولانی بود. اگرچه توضیح با سؤال پرسیدن یک شکل معمولی از تعامل انسان است، سؤال مناسب را برای تعیین هدف خاص بیشتری از یک کاربر سخت است. در این کار، ما یک مدل پشتیبانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا سوال\u200cهای مختلف را توضیح دهیم با پیشنهاد بازسازی از پرسش اصلی. اولین بار مشکل جدایی مجموعه را برای انتخاب مجموعه از نقاشی\u200cها فرمول می\u200cکنیم که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد که هدف\u200cهای غیرقابل تفاوت کنیم. ما برچسب\u200cهای انتخاب را به عنوان عبارت هدف برای تایید بیشتری برای کاربر فهرست می\u200cکنیم. برچسب برگزیده همراه با سؤال کاربر اصلی سپس به عنوان سؤال تازه\u200cشده خدمت می\u200cکند که پاسخ مناسب برای آن آسانتر می\u200cتواند شناسایی شود. این مدل با استفاده از یادگیری افزایش با شبکه سیاست عمیق آموزش داده می شود. ما مدل خود را بر اساس کلیک\u200cهای کاربر واقعی دنیا ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و توسط چند آزمایش مختلف بهترین نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sq': 'Përballja me pyetje të qarta ka qenë një problem i përjetshëm në sistemet e dialogut në botën reale. Megjithëse sqarimi duke bërë pyetje është një form ë e përbashkët e ndërveprimit njerëzor, është e vështirë të përcaktohen pyetje të përshtatshme për të krijuar qëllime më specifike nga një përdorues. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një model përforcimi për të sqaruar pyetjet e qarta duke sugjeruar përmirësime të pyetjes origjinale. We first formulate a collection partitioning problem to select a set of labels enabling us to distinguish potential unambiguous intents.  Ne listojmë etiketat e zgjedhura si fraza me qëllim për përdoruesin për konfirmim të mëtejshëm. Etiketa e zgjedhur së bashku me pyetjen origjinale të përdoruesit më pas shërben si një pyetje e rafinuar, për të cilën një përgjigje e përshtatshme mund të identifikohet më lehtë. The model is trained using reinforcement learning with a deep policy network.  Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë bazuar në kliqet e përdoruesve të botës reale dhe demonstrojmë përmirësime të rëndësishme gjatë disa eksperimenteve të ndryshme.', 'hy': 'Անշուշտ հարցերի լուծման իրական աշխարհի խոսակցության համակարգերում անընդհատ խնդիր է եղել: Although clarification by asking questions is a common form of human interaction, it is hard to define appropriate questions to elicit more specific intents from a user.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք ուժեղացման մոդել, որպեսզի բացատրենք բացահայտ հարցեր առաջարկելով սկզբնական հարցի բարելավումներ: Սկզբում մենք ստեղծում ենք հավաքածու բաժանման խնդիր, որպեսզի ընտրենք մի շարք պիտակներ, որոնք մեզ հնարավորություն են տալիս բացահայտել պոտենցիալ աներկար նպատակներ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ընտրված պիտակները որպես նպատակային արտահայտություններ օգտագործողին, որպեսզի ավելի լավ հաստատենք: Ընտրված պիտակը, միասին նախնական օգտագործողի հարցում, հետո ծառայում է որպես բարելավված հարցում, որի համար հարմար պատասխան ավելի հեշտ կարող է հայտնաբերվել: Մոդելը պատրաստվում է օգտագործելով ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրությունը խորը քաղաքականության ցանցի միջոցով: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը, հիմնված իրական աշխարհի օգտագործողների կոճակների վրա և ցույց ենք տալիս նշանակալի բարելավումներ մի քանի տարբեր փորձարկումների ընթացքում:', 'am': 'ጥያቄን በመቀላቀል የዓመታት መከራ በሀይማዊ አዲስ አካባቢ ስርዓት ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ጥያቄዎችን በመጠየቅ የተጠቃሚ የሰው ግንኙነት አካባቢ ነው፣ በተጠቃሚው ላይ የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን ማረጋገጥ በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የመጀመሪያውን ጠይቅ ጥያቄን ለመግለጥ የሚችል የጥያቄ ሞዴል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ መጀመሪያ የክፍለ ጉዳይ መፍጠርን ለመምረጥ የሚችሉትን የቻይሎችን ጉዳይ ለማንለይ የሚችሉትን ምልክቶች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተመረጠውን ምልክቶች ለጨዋታው እንዲያረጋግጥ በአጠቃሚ ቃል እናሳርጋለን፡፡ ምርጫ ሞዴል በጥልቅ ፖሊሲ መረብ ለመማር የተማረ ነው፡፡ የዓለም ተጠቃሚዎች ኪኪስ በመሠረት እናሳውቃለን በተለያዩ ፈተናዎች ላይ የበለጠ ክፍተቶችን እናሳያልን፡፡', 'az': 'Müxtəlif suallarla kömək etmək həqiqət dünya dialoglarında uzun sürəkli bir problemdir. Hətta suallar soruşduqları üçün a çıq-aydınlıq insan tərəfindən ortaq bir şəkildir, istifadəçidən daha müəyyən niyyətləri seçmək üçün uyğun sualları təyin etmək çətindir. Bu işdə, başlangıç soruşmayı təsdiqləyici sualları a çıqlamaq üçün yeniləmə modeli təklif edirik. Biz ilk dəfə bir koleksiyon parçacılığı problemini seçmək üçün bir növ etiketi formüləyirik ki, potensial müəyyən niyyətlərini ayırmaq üçün bizə imkan verir. Biz seçilmiş etiketləri daha çox təsdiqlənmək üçün istifadəçi üçün niyyətli sözlər olaraq yazırıq. Seçili etiketi özündən istifadəçi soruşması ilə birlikdə, sonra təmizlənmiş soruşma kimi istifadə edir, bu üçün uyğun cavab daha asanlaşdırıla bilər. Model derin siyasi a ğı ilə çoxlu öyrənməyi istifadə edir. Bizim modelimizi həqiqət dünya istifadəçilərinin tıklamasına dayanan və bəzi müxtəlif təcrübələrdə möhkəm düzəltmələri göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Odgovor sa dvosmislenim pitanjima je bio večni problem u realnim dijalogskim sistemima. Iako je objašnjenje postavljajući pitanja zajednički oblik ljudskog interakcije, teško je definisati odgovarajuća pitanja kako bi izbrisali specifičnije namjere korisnika. U ovom poslu predlažemo model pojačanja da objašnjava dvosmislene pitanja predlažeći ispravak originalnog pitanja. Prvo formuliramo problem sa particijama kolekcije kako bi izabrali niz etiketa koje nam omogućavaju da razlikujemo potencijalne neizbježne namjere. Prepisujemo odabrane etikete kao namjerne rečenice korisniku za daljnju potvrdu. Izabrana etiketa zajedno s originalnim zahtevom korisnika poslužava kao refinansiranom zahtevom, za koju se može lako identificirati odgovarajući odgovor. Model je obučen koristeći učenje pojačanja sa dubokom političkom mrežom. Procjenjujemo naš model na temelju klikova korisnika na stvarnom svijetu i pokazujemo značajne poboljšanja u raznim eksperimentima.', 'bn': 'বাস্তবতা বিশ্বের ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে প্রায় বার্ষিক সমস্যা হয়েছে। যদিও প্রশ্ন জিজ্ঞাসা করার মাধ্যমে ব্যাখ্যা হচ্ছে মানুষের একটি সাধারণ মানুষের মধ্যে যোগাযোগ, তবে ব্যবহারকারীর কাছ থেকে আরো বি এই কাজে আমরা একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে প্রাথমিক অনুসন্ধানের সংস্কার প্রস্তাব করা যায়। আমরা প্রথমে একটি সংগ্রহ বিভক্ত সমস্যা তৈরি করি যাতে কিছু লেবেল নির্বাচন করতে পারি যাতে আমাদের সম্ভাবনা অযৌক্তিক উদ্দেশ্য বিচ আরো নিশ্চিত করার জন্য আমরা ব্যবহারকারীর কাছে নির্বাচিত লেবেল তালিকা করি। প্রকৃত ব্যবহারকারীর অনুসন্ধানের সাথে নির্বাচিত লেবেলের সাথে পরিবর্তিত তদন্ত হিসেবে সার্ভিস করে, যার জন্য একটি যথাযথ প গভীর নীতি নেটওয়ার্ক দিয়ে শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। আমরা বাস্তব বিশ্ব ব্যবহারকারী ক্লিকের ভিত্তিতে আমাদের মডেলের মূল্য পরিচালনা করি এবং বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষার বিভিন্ন পর', 'ca': "Encontrar preguntes ambigues ha estat un problem a perenni en els sistemes de diàleg del món real. Encara que la clarificació fent preguntes és una form a comú d'interacció humana, és difícil definir preguntes apropiades per aixecar intencions més específiques d'un usuari. En aquest treball, proposem un model de reforç per aclarar preguntes ambigues suggerent refinements de la pregunta original. Primer formulam un problem a de divisió de la col·lecció per seleccionar un conjunt d'etiquetes que ens permeten distingir intencions potencials sense ambigüències. Llestem les etiquetes escollides com frases d'intenció a l'usuari per confirmar més. L'etiqueta seleccionada juntament amb la consulta original serveix llavors com una consulta refinada, per la qual una resposta adequada pot ser identificada més fàcilment. El model està entrenat fent servir l'aprenentatge de reforç amb una xarxa de polítiques profundas. Evaluam el nostre model basat en clics d'usuaris del món real i demostrem millors significatives en diversos experiments.", 'cs': 'Řešení nejednoznačných otázek je v reálném světě trvalým problémem. Ačkoli objasnění kladením otázek je běžnou formou lidské interakce, je těžké definovat vhodné otázky, které vyvolávají konkrétnější záměry uživatele. V této práci navrhujeme výztužný model pro objasnění nejednoznačných otázek navržením upřesnění původního dotazu. Nejprve formulujeme problém rozdělení sbírek, který nám umožňuje rozlišit potenciální jednoznačné záměry. Vybrané štítky uvádíme uživateli jako záměrné fráze pro další potvrzení. Vybraný štítek spolu s původním uživatelským dotazem pak slouží jako rafinovaný dotaz, pro který lze snadněji identifikovat vhodnou odpověď. Model je trénován pomocí posilovacího učení s hlubokou politickou sítí. Vyhodnocujeme náš model na základě kliknutí uživatelů v reálném světě a demonstrujeme významná zlepšení v rámci několika různých experimentů.', 'et': 'Ebamäärasete küsimustega toimetulek on olnud reaalmaailma dialoogisüsteemides pidev probleem. Kuigi selgitamine küsimuste esitamise teel on inimsuhtluse tavaline vorm, on raske määratleda asjakohaseid küsimusi, et saada kasutajalt konkreetsemaid kavatsusi. Käesolevas töös pakume välja tugevdusmudeli, et selgitada ebamääraseid küsimusi, pakkudes välja algse päringu täpsustusi. Esmalt sõnastame kollektsioonide jagamise probleemi, et valida märgiste komplekt, mis võimaldab meil eristada võimalikke ühemõttelisi kavatsusi. Me loetleme valitud sildid kavatsuslausetena kasutajale edasiseks kinnitamiseks. Valitud silt koos algse kasutajapäringuga toimib seejärel täiustatud päringuna, mille jaoks on sobiva vastuse lihtsam tuvastada. Mudelit koolitatakse tugevdava õppe abil sügava poliitilise võrgustiku abil. Hindame oma mudelit reaalsete kasutajate klikkide põhjal ja demonstreerime olulisi parandusi mitmes erinevas katses.', 'fi': 'Moniselitteisten kysymysten kﾃ､sittely on ollut monivuotinen ongelma todellisissa vuoropuhelujﾃ､rjestelmissﾃ､. Vaikka kysymysten esittﾃ､minen on yleinen ihmisten vuorovaikutuksen muoto, on vaikea mﾃ､ﾃ､ritellﾃ､ sopivia kysymyksiﾃ､ saadakseen kﾃ､yttﾃ､jﾃ､ltﾃ､ tarkempia aikomuksia. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ ehdotamme vahvistusmallia epﾃ､selvien kysymysten selventﾃ､miseksi ehdottamalla alkuperﾃ､isen kyselyn tarkentamista. Laadimme ensin kokoelman jakoongelman valitaksemme joukon etikettejﾃ､, joiden avulla voimme erottaa mahdolliset yksiselitteiset tarkoitukset. Listaamme valitut etiketit intent lauseiksi kﾃ､yttﾃ､jﾃ､lle vahvistusta varten. Valittu tunniste ja alkuperﾃ､inen kﾃ､yttﾃ､jﾃ､kysely toimivat sitten hienostuneena kyselynﾃ､, johon sopiva vastaus voidaan helpommin tunnistaa. Malli on koulutettu vahvistamalla oppimista syvﾃ､llisen poliittisen verkoston avulla. Arvioimme malliamme reaaliaikaisten kﾃ､yttﾃ､jien napsautusten perusteella ja osoitamme merkittﾃ､viﾃ､ parannuksia useissa eri kokeiluissa.', 'jv': 'Jejaring Mangkane kapan-kapan nganggo persilangan sing nguasai angan anyar tentang karo interaksi uwong, kuwi susah nyimpen nggawe persilangan alih sing nggawe nguasai perusahaan. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo tindakan model nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasai winih sing beraksi lan nganggep nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno sistêm dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan kelompok nggawe kesalahan kanggo nambah winih Awak dhéwé éntuk structural navigation string" in "context_BAR_stringNew model Awak dhéwé éntukno model sing diangkat saben nggambar aturan banter-uwong lan nambah munculo sing gak nggawe barang seneng pisan banter seng apik dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Spopadanje z dvoumnimi vprašanji je trajna težava v realnih dialognih sistemih. Čeprav je pojasnitev z postavljanjem vprašanj običajna oblika človeške interakcije, je težko opredeliti ustrezna vprašanja, da bi od uporabnika pridobili bolj specifične namene. V tem delu predlagamo model ojačitve za pojasnitev dvoumnih vprašanj s predlaganjem izboljšav izvirne poizvedbe. Najprej oblikujemo problem razdeljevanja zbirk, da izberemo nabor etiket, ki nam omogočajo razlikovanje potencialnih nedvoumnih namenov. Izbrane oznake naštejemo kot namenske stavke uporabniku za nadaljnjo potrditev. Izbrana nalepka skupaj z izvirno poizvedbo uporabnika nato služi kot prefinjena poizvedba, za katero je mogoče lažje prepoznati ustrezen odgovor. Model se usposablja z uporabo krepitvenega učenja z globoko mrežo politik. Naš model ocenjujemo na podlagi resničnih klikov uporabnikov in prikazujemo pomembne izboljšave v več različnih eksperimentih.', 'he': 'להתמודד עם שאלות ספורות הייתה בעיה קבועה במערכות דיאלוג בעולם האמיתי. למרות שהבהרה על ידי לשאול שאלות היא צורה משותפת של אינטראקציה אנושית, קשה להגדיר שאלות מתאימות כדי לגרום לכוונות ספציפיות יותר משתמש. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים דוגמנית גיבוי כדי להבהיר שאלות סביבות על ידי הצעה שיפורים של השאלה המקורית. אנחנו קודם נוצרים בעיה של מחלקת אוסף כדי לבחור קבוצה של תוויות שמאפשר לנו להבחין כוונות פוטנציאליות בלתי ספורות. אנחנו מרשימים את התוויות הנבחרות בתור ביטויים בכוונה למשתמש לאישור נוסף. The selected label along with the original user query then serves as a refined query, for which a suitable response can more easily be identified.  The model is trained using reinforcement learning with a deep policy network.  אנו מעריכים את המודל שלנו מבוסס על לחיצות משתמשים בעולם האמיתי ולהראות שיפורים משמעותיים במהלך מספר ניסויים שונים.', 'ha': "Coping with ambiguous questions has been a perennial problem in real-world dialogue systems.  Babu bayyana bayani da tambayi su zama wata irin jumla na haɗi ga mutum, kuma yana da nau'in ka bayyana masu inganci daga mai amfani da shi. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata misali mai ƙaranci dõmin mu bayyana masu tambayar da ba'a saurãre ba, kuma Mu ƙaddara masu gyãra na tambayar farkon. Kayyar da farkon, za'a danna wata masĩfa ga raba cikin jujjuya dõmin mu zãɓi wasu alama masu amfani da mu ga rarraba masu yiwuwa da bã za'a karɓi ba. Tuna jerin tagogi waɗanda aka zãɓe su kamar magana masu nufi zuwa mai amfani da shi don a gaskata ƙari. @ action: button An sanar da shirin ayuka a yi amfani da ƙarani da zane-zane na ƙarani da zane-zane-zane. Kana ƙaddara misalinmu a kan misãlan danna-danne-duniya masu amfani da gaskiyar, kuma munã nuna mafiya kyau a cikin jarrabo dabam-dabam.", 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་མཁན་མ་ཅིག་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད་ན་འཛམ་གླིང་མ་ལག་གི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་ཐོག་གནད་དོན་འདྲི་ཞིག་ནི་མི་ཚུལ་འབྲེལ་བ་མེད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མ་ཟད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་གསལ་བཤད་རྒྱུ་དང་། We first formulate a collection partitioning problem to select a set of labels enabling us to distinguish potential unambiguous intents. ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མིང་རྟགས་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་འགོད་བྱས་པ བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་དང་ཐོག་མའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་འཚོལ་བྲི་ཞིབ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱས་ན་ངོས་འཛིན་ཡོད། Model is trained using reinforcement learning with a deep policy network. ང་ཚོས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་གཅིག་གནོན་རྡེབ་བྱས་མིན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རྟོགས་བྱས་ནས་'}
{'en': 'Towards building a Robust Industry-scale Question Answering System', 'es': 'Hacia la creación de un sólido sistema de respuesta a preguntas a escala industrial', 'fr': "Vers la création d'un système de réponse aux questions robuste à l'échelle du secteur", 'ar': 'نحو بناء نظام قوي للإجابة على الأسئلة على نطاق الصناعة', 'pt': 'Para construir um sistema robusto de resposta a perguntas em escala industrial', 'ja': '堅牢な業界規模の質疑応答システムの構築に向けて', 'zh': '构强业规模问答系统', 'hi': 'एक मजबूत उद्योग-पैमाने पर प्रश्न उत्तर प्रणाली के निर्माण की दिशा में', 'ru': 'На пути к созданию надежной отраслевой системы ответов на вопросы', 'ga': 'I dtreo Córas Láidir Freagartha Ceisteanna ar scála Tionscail a thógáil', 'hu': 'Egy robusztus ipari léptékű kérdésválaszadó rendszer kiépítése felé', 'el': 'Προς την οικοδόμηση ενός εύρωστου συστήματος απάντησης ερωτήσεων σε βιομηχανική κλίμακα', 'lt': 'Siekiant sukurti patikimą pramonės masto klausimų atsakymo sistemą', 'ka': 'პრობსტური ინდოსტრიის განსახულების სისტემა', 'mk': 'За изградба на robust индустриски систем за одговори на прашања', 'it': 'Verso la costruzione di un solido sistema di risposta alle domande su scala industriale', 'ms': 'Ke arah membina Sistem Jawapan Pertanyaan Secara Industry-robust', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്ക് ഒരു റോബസ്റ്റ് ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റ്രി- സ്കേല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റം', 'mt': "Lejn il-bini ta' Sistema robusta ta' Tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet fuq skala industrijali", 'pl': 'W kierunku stworzenia solidnego systemu odpowiedzi na pytania na skalę przemysłową', 'ro': 'Către construirea unui sistem robust de răspuns la întrebări la scară industrială', 'kk': 'Робуст индустриялық масштабын сұрақ жауап жүйесін құру үшін', 'no': 'Gå til å bygge eit robust industrisk spørsmålsystem', 'mn': 'Робст индустрийн хэмжээний асуулт хариултын системийг бүтээхэд', 'sr': 'Krenuti ka izgradnji robotnog industrijskog sustava odgovora na pitanja', 'so': 'Building a Robust-scale Industry-Question System answering', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා', 'sv': 'På väg mot att bygga upp ett robust frågesvarssystem i industriskala', 'ta': 'கேள்வி பதில் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'ایک مضبوط صنعت کی سؤال جواب دینے کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Để xây dựng một Hệ thống Trả lời câu hỏi đầy đặn', 'bg': 'Към изграждане на стабилна система за отговор на въпроси в промишлен мащаб', 'da': 'På vej mod opbygning af et robust spørgsmål i industriskala', 'id': 'Ke arah membangun sistem jawaban pertanyaan skala industri yang kuat', 'hr': 'Napred izgradnje robnog sustava odgovora na pitanja na industrijsku skalu', 'ko': '강력한 업계급 퀴즈 시스템 구축', 'fa': 'به سمت ساختن یک سیستم پاسخ\u200cجواب سوال\u200cهای صنعتی استوار', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zum Aufbau eines robusten Fragebeantwortersystems im industriellen Maßstab', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kujibu maswali', 'nl': 'Naar het bouwen van een robuust vragenbeantwoordingssysteem op industrieschaal', 'af': "Na die bou van 'n robust industries-skaal vraag antwoord stelsel", 'sq': 'Për ndërtimin e një sistemi të fortë përgjigjesh të pyetjeve në shkallën e industrisë', 'am': 'የነጥብ ጥያቄ ስርዓት', 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանատվությունների համակարգի ստեղծման ուղղությամբ', 'bs': 'Na pravo izgradnje robnog sustava odgovora na pitanja na industrijsku skalu', 'tr': 'Robust Senediýa derejesi soragy jogap sistemasyny bejermek üçin', 'ca': 'Towards building a Robust Industry-scale Question Answering System', 'cs': 'Směrem k vytvoření robustního systému pro odpovědi na otázky v průmyslovém měřítku', 'et': 'Tööstusliku küsimustele vastamise süsteemi loomine', 'az': 'Q√ľvv…ôtli Industry-scale sual cavab sistemi inŇüa etm…ôy…ô t…ôr…ôf', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর সিস্টেম', 'fi': 'Kestävän teollisen mittakaavan kysymysten vastausjärjestelmän rakentaminen', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Vzpostavitev robustnega sistema za odgovarjanje na vprašanja v industriji', 'he': 'לכיוון בניית מערכת תשובות לשאלות חזקה בסולם התעשייה', 'jv': 'Tanggal nggawe sistem sing wis nggawe ning manung-manung ning bot', 'bo': 'Towards building a Robust Industry-scale Question Answering System'}
{'en': 'Industry-scale NLP systems necessitate two features. Robustness : zero-shot transfer learning (ZSTL) performance has to be commendable and 2. Efficiency : systems have to train efficiently and respond instantaneously. In this paper, we introduce the development of a production model called GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) which possess the above two characteristics. For robustness, it trains on the recently introduced Natural Questions (NQ) dataset. NQ poses additional challenges over older datasets like SQuAD : (a) QA systems need to read and comprehend an entire Wikipedia article rather than a small passage, and (b) NQ does not suffer from observation bias during construction, resulting in less lexical overlap between the question and the article. GAAMA consists of Attention-over-Attention, diversity among attention heads, hierarchical transfer learning, and synthetic data augmentation while being computationally inexpensive. Building on top of the powerful BERTQA model, GAAMA provides a 2.0 % absolute boost in F1 over the industry-scale state-of-the-art (SOTA) system on NQ. Further, we show that GAAMA transfers zero-shot to unseen real life and important domains as it yields respectable performance on two benchmarks : the BioASQ and the newly introduced CovidQA datasets.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de PNL à l'échelle de l'industrie nécessitent deux caractéristiques\xa0: 1. Robustesse\xa0: les performances de «\xa0zero-shot transfer learning\xa0» (ZSTL) doivent être louables et 2. Efficacité\xa0: les systèmes doivent s'entraîner efficacement et réagir instantanément. Dans cet article, nous présentons le développement d'un modèle de production appelé GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) qui possède les deux caractéristiques ci-dessus. Pour plus de robustesse, il s'entraîne sur le jeu de données Natural Questions (NQ) récemment introduit. NQ pose des défis supplémentaires par rapport aux ensembles de données plus anciens tels que SQuAD\xa0: (a) les systèmes d'assurance qualité doivent lire et comprendre un article Wikipédia entier plutôt qu'un petit passage, et (b) NQ ne souffre pas de biais d'observation pendant la construction, ce qui réduit le chevauchement lexical entre la question et l'article. GAAMA comprend l'attention sur l'attention, la diversité entre les têtes d'attention, l'apprentissage par transfert hiérarchique et l'augmentation des données synthétiques tout en étant peu coûteux sur le plan informatique. S'appuyant sur le puissant modèle BERTQA, GAAMA fournit un boost absolu de ~2,0\xa0% en F1 par rapport au système de pointe de l'industrie (SOTA) sur NQ. En outre, nous montrons que GAAMA transfère le zero shot vers des domaines importants et réels inédits car il produit des performances respectables sur deux critères de référence\xa0: le BioASQ et les ensembles de données CovidQA nouvellement introduits.", 'ar': 'تتطلب أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية على نطاق الصناعة ميزتين. 1. المتانة: يجب أن يكون أداء "التعلم بنقل الطلقة الصفرية" (ZSTL) جديرًا بالثناء 2. الكفاءة: يجب أن تتدرب الأنظمة بكفاءة وأن تستجيب على الفور. في هذا البحث ، نقدم تطوير نموذج إنتاج يسمى GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) والذي يمتلك الخاصيتين المذكورتين أعلاه. من أجل المتانة ، يتدرب على مجموعة بيانات الأسئلة الطبيعية (NQ) التي تم تقديمها مؤخرًا. يطرح NQ تحديات إضافية على مجموعات البيانات القديمة مثل SQuAD: (أ) تحتاج أنظمة ضمان الجودة إلى قراءة وفهم مقالة ويكيبيديا بأكملها بدلاً من مقطع صغير ، و (ب) لا يعاني NQ من تحيز الملاحظة أثناء البناء ، مما يؤدي إلى تداخل معجمي أقل بين السؤال والمقال. تتكون GAAMA من الانتباه الزائد ، والتنوع بين رؤساء الانتباه ، ونقل التعلم الهرمي ، وزيادة البيانات التركيبية مع كونها غير مكلفة من الناحية الحسابية. بناءً على نموذج BERTQA القوي ، يوفر GAAMA دفعة مطلقة ∼2.0٪ في F1 على نظام (SOTA) المتطور على مستوى الصناعة على NQ. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن GAAMA تنقل اللقطة الصفرية إلى الحياة الواقعية غير المرئية والمجالات المهمة لأنها تحقق أداءً محترمًا على معيارين: BioASQ ومجموعات بيانات CovidQA التي تم طرحها حديثًا.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de PNL a escala industrial requieren dos funciones: 1. Robustez: el rendimiento del «aprendizaje de transferencia cero» (ZSTL) tiene que ser encomiable y 2. Eficiencia: los sistemas tienen que capacitarse de manera eficiente y responder de forma instantánea. En este artículo, presentamos el desarrollo de un modelo de producción llamado GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) que posee las dos características anteriores. Para mayor robustez, se entrena en el conjunto de datos de Preguntas Naturales (NQ) recientemente introducido. NQ plantea desafíos adicionales sobre los conjuntos de datos más antiguos como sQuad: (a) los sistemas de control de calidad necesitan leer y comprender un artículo completo de Wikipedia en lugar de un pequeño pasaje, y (b) NQ no sufre sesgo de observación durante la construcción, lo que resulta en una menor superposición léxica entre la pregunta y el artículo. GAAMA consiste en atención sobre atención, diversidad entre cabezas de atención, aprendizaje de transferencia jerárquica y aumento de datos sintéticos, a la vez que es computacionalmente económico. Basado en el potente modelo BERTQA, GAAMA proporciona un impulso absoluto de ~ 2,0% en F1 en comparación con el sistema de vanguardia a escala industrial (SOTA) en NQ. Además, demostramos que GAAMA transfiere un tiro cero a dominios importantes y de la vida real que no se ven, ya que produce un rendimiento respetable en dos puntos de referencia: BioAsq y los conjuntos de datos de COVIDQA recientemente introducidos.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de PNL em escala industrial precisam de dois recursos. 1. Robustez: o desempenho “zero-shot transfer learning” (ZSTL) deve ser louvável e 2. Eficiência: os sistemas devem treinar de forma eficiente e responder instantaneamente. Neste artigo, apresentamos o desenvolvimento de um modelo de produção chamado GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) que possui as duas características acima. Para robustez, ele treina no conjunto de dados Natural Questions (NQ) recentemente introduzido. NQ apresenta desafios adicionais sobre conjuntos de dados mais antigos como SQuAD: (a) sistemas de controle de qualidade precisam ler e compreender um artigo inteiro da Wikipedia em vez de uma pequena passagem, e (b) NQ não sofre viés de observação durante a construção, resultando em menos sobreposição lexical entre a pergunta e o artigo. O GAAMA consiste em atenção sobre atenção, diversidade entre chefes de atenção, aprendizado de transferência hierárquica e aumento de dados sintéticos, sendo computacionalmente barato. Com base no poderoso modelo BERTQA, o GAAMA fornece um aumento absoluto de ∼2,0% na F1 em relação ao sistema de última geração (SOTA) em escala industrial no NQ. Além disso, mostramos que o GAAMA transfere o tiro zero para a vida real e domínios importantes invisíveis, pois produz um desempenho respeitável em dois benchmarks: o BioASQ e os conjuntos de dados CovidQA recém-introduzidos.', 'ja': '業界規模のNLPシステムには、2つの特徴が必要です。1. 堅牢性：「ゼロショット転送学習」（ ZSTL ）のパフォーマンスは称賛に値するものでなければならず、2. 効率性：システムは効率的にトレーニングし、瞬時に対応しなければなりません。 本稿では、上記2つの特徴を備えたGAAMA （ Go Ahead Ask Me Anything ）と呼ばれる生産モデルの開発を紹介する。 堅牢性のために、最近導入された自然問題（ NQ ）データセットをトレーニングします。 NQは、SQuADのような古いデータセットに対してさらなる課題をもたらします。(a) QAシステムは、小さな一節ではなく、ウィキペディアの記事全体を読んで理解する必要があります。(b) NQは、構築中に観察バイアスに悩まされず、質問と記事の間の語彙的な重複が少なくなります。 GAAMAは、アテンションオーバーアテンション、アテンションヘッド間の多様性、階層的転送学習、および計算的に安価な合成データ拡張で構成されています。 強力なBERTQAモデルに加えて、GAAMAはNQの業界規模の最先端（ SOTA ）システムよりもF 1で2.0 ％の絶対ブーストを提供します。 さらに、私たちは、GAAMAがゼロショットを見えない実生活と重要なドメインに転送し、BioASQと新たに導入されたCovidQAデータセットという2つのベンチマークで優れたパフォーマンスをもたらすことを示しています。', 'ru': 'Системы NLP промышленного масштаба требуют двух особенностей. 1. Устойчивость: эффективность «обучения с нулевым выстрелом» (ZSTL) должна быть похвальной и 2. Эффективность: системы должны эффективно тренироваться и реагировать мгновенно. В этой статье мы представляем разработку производственной модели под названием GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), которая обладает двумя вышеуказанными характеристиками. Для надежности он тренируется на недавно введенном наборе данных «Естественные вопросы» (NQ). NQ создает дополнительные проблемы по сравнению со старыми наборами данных, такими как SQuAD: (a) системы QA должны читать и понимать всю статью Википедии, а не небольшой отрывок, и (b) NQ не страдает от искажения наблюдений во время построения, что приводит к меньшему лексическому перекрытию между вопросом и статьей. GAAMA состоит из Attention-over-Attention, разнообразия между головками внимания, иерархического обучения переносу и синтетического расширения данных, при этом будучи вычислительно недорогим. Опираясь на мощную модель BERTQA, GAAMA обеспечивает абсолютный прирост F1 на 2,0% по сравнению с современной отраслевой системой (SOTA) на NQ. Кроме того, мы показываем, что GAAMA переносит нулевой снимок в невидимую реальную жизнь и важные домены, поскольку он дает респектабельную производительность по двум критериям: BioASQ и недавно введенные наборы данных CovidQA.', 'zh': '工业规模NLP统须二功。 1. 稳健性曰:"零次迁学"(ZSTL)性必可称也2. 效率曰:统必高效教而应之。 本文,我们介了一种名GAAMA(Go Ahead Ask Me Anything)的生产模样,他有这两个特征。 所以持稳健性者,近推自然(NQ)数集而教之。 比之SQuAD等旧数集,NQ致额外挑战:(a)QA统须读解维基百科文非一小段,(b)NQ于构中不见观察偏差,以致问文之间词汇重减。 GAAMA注意高于注意,注意于多样性,重徙学合成数,兼计算成本低廉。 夫强BERTQA之上,GAAMA资∼2.0%于F1,非NQ上之先进(SOTA)统也。 又明GAAMA移零镜头于不见之现实生活、要领之域,盖两基生可观之性:BioASQ、新引入CovidQA数集也。', 'hi': 'उद्योग-पैमाने पर एनएलपी प्रणालियों को दो विशेषताओं की आवश्यकता होती है। 1. मजबूती: "शून्य शॉट स्थानांतरण सीखने" (ZSTL) प्रदर्शन सराहनीय और 2 होना चाहिए. दक्षता: सिस्टम को कुशलतासे प्रशिक्षित करना होगा और तुरंत प्रतिक्रिया देनी होगी। इस पेपर में, हम GAAMA नामक एक उत्पादन मॉडल के विकास का परिचय देते हैं (आगे मुझे कुछ भी पूछें) जो उपरोक्त दो विशेषताओं के अधिकारी हैं। मजबूती के लिए, यह हाल ही में पेश किए गए प्राकृतिक प्रश्नों (एनक्यू) डेटासेट पर ट्रेन करता है। NQ SQuAD जैसे पुराने डेटासेट पर अतिरिक्त चुनौतियां पैदा करता है: (ए) क्यूए सिस्टम को एक छोटे से मार्ग के बजाय पूरे विकिपीडिया लेख को पढ़ने और समझने की आवश्यकता होती है, और (बी) एनक्यू निर्माण के दौरान अवलोकन पूर्वाग्रह से पीड़ित नहीं होता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप प्रश्न और लेख के बीच कम लेक्सिकल ओवरलैप होता है। GAAMA में ध्यान-अधिक-ध्यान, ध्यान प्रमुखों के बीच विविधता, पदानुक्रमित स्थानांतरण सीखने, और कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से सस्ती होने के दौरान सिंथेटिक डेटा वृद्धि शामिल है। शक्तिशाली BERTQA मॉडल के शीर्ष पर निर्माण, GAAMA NQ पर उद्योग-पैमाने पर अत्याधुनिक (SOTA) प्रणाली पर F1 में एक ~2.0% पूर्ण बढ़ावा प्रदान करता है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि GAAMA अनदेखी वास्तविक जीवन और महत्वपूर्ण डोमेन के लिए शून्य-शॉट स्थानांतरित करता है क्योंकि यह दो बेंचमार्क पर सम्मानजनक प्रदर्शन देता है: BioASQ और नए पेश किए गए CovidQA डेटासेट।', 'ga': 'Tá dhá ghné de dhíth ar chórais NLP ar scála tionscail. 1. Neart: ní mór feidhmíocht “foghlaim aistrithe náid” (ZSTL) a bheith inmholta agus 2. Éifeachtúlacht: caithfidh córais oiliúint éifeachtach a dhéanamh agus freagairt láithreach. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach forbairt múnla táirgeachta ar a dtugtar GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) a bhfuil an dá shaintréith thuas aige. Ar mhaithe le stóinseacht, cuireann sé oiliúint ar an tacar sonraí Ceisteanna Nádúrtha (NQ) a tugadh isteach le déanaí. Cruthaíonn NQ dúshláin bhreise i dtaca le tacair shonraí níos sine cosúil le SQuAD: (a) Ní mór do chórais QA alt Vicipéid iomlán a léamh agus a thuiscint seachas sliocht beag, agus (b) ní bhíonn an claonadh breathnóireachta ag NQ le linn na tógála, rud a fhágann gur lú an forluí foclóireachta idir an cheist agus an t-alt. Is éard atá i GAAMA ná Aird-Ró-Aird, éagsúlacht i measc ceannairí aird, foghlaim aistrithe ordlathach, agus méadú ar shonraí sintéiseacha agus iad neamhchostasach ó thaobh ríomhaireacht de. Ag tógáil ar shamhail chumhachtach BERTQA, soláthraíonn GAAMA borradh iomlán de ∼2.0% in F1 thar an gcóras nua-aimseartha ar scála tionsclaíochta (SOTA) ar NQ. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go n-aistríonn GAAMA urchar nialasach go dtí an saol fíor agus fearainn thábhachtacha nach bhfacthas riamh cheana mar go n-eascraíonn sé feidhmíocht urramach ar dhá thagarmharc: an BioASQ agus na tacair sonraí CovidQA a tugadh isteach le déanaí.', 'hu': 'Az iparági szintű NLP-rendszerek két funkciót igényelnek. 1. Robusztusság: a "zero-shot transzfer tanulás" (ZSTL) teljesítményének dicséretesnek kell lennie, és 2. Hatékonyság: a rendszereknek hatékonyan kell képezniük és azonnal reagálniuk kell. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) nevű gyártási modell fejlesztését, amely a fenti két tulajdonsággal rendelkezik. A robusztusság érdekében a nemrégiben bevezetett Természetes Kérdések (NQ) adatkészletre vonatkozik. Az NQ további kihívásokat jelent a régebbi adatkészletekkel szemben, mint például az SQAD: (a) a minőségi rendszereknek egy egész Wikipédia cikket kell olvasniuk és megérteniük, és (b) az NQ nem szenved a megfigyelési elfogultságoktól az építés során, ami kevesebb lexikális átfedést eredményez a kérdés és a cikk között. A GAAMA a figyelem feletti figyelem, a figyelem fejei közötti sokszínűség, a hierarchikus transzfer tanulás és a szintetikus adatok bővítése, miközben számítástechnikailag olcsó. A nagy teljesítményű BERTQA modell tetejére építve a GAAMA 2,0%-os abszolút növekedést nyújt az F1-ben az iparági szintű, korszerű (SOTA) rendszerrel szemben az NQ-n. Továbbá megmutatjuk, hogy a GAAMA a nulla lövést átadja a láthatatlan valós életbe és fontos területekre, mivel tiszteletreméltó teljesítményt nyújt két referenciaértéken: a BioASQ és az újonnan bevezetett CovidQA adatkészleteken.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα NLP βιομηχανικής κλίμακας απαιτούν δύο χαρακτηριστικά. 1. Ανθεκτικότητα: "Η απόδοση της μάθησης μηδενικής εμβέλειας" (πρέπει να είναι αξιέπαινη και 2. Αποδοτικότητα: τα συστήματα πρέπει να εκπαιδεύονται αποτελεσματικά και να ανταποκρίνονται άμεσα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την ανάπτυξη ενός μοντέλου παραγωγής που ονομάζεται το οποίο διαθέτει τα δύο παραπάνω χαρακτηριστικά. Για ανθεκτικότητα, εκπαιδεύεται στο πρόσφατα εισαγόμενο σύνολο δεδομένων Φυσικών Ερωτήσεων (ΝQ). Το NQ θέτει πρόσθετες προκλήσεις σε σχέση με παλαιότερα σύνολα δεδομένων όπως το SQuAD: (α) Τα συστήματα QA πρέπει να διαβάζουν και να κατανοούν ένα ολόκληρο άρθρο της Βικιπαίδειας αντί για ένα μικρό απόσπασμα, και (β) το NQ δεν πάσχει από προκατάληψη παρατήρησης κατά τη διάρκεια της κατασκευής, με αποτέλεσμα λιγότερη λεξική επικάλυψη μεταξύ της ερώτησης και του άρθρου. Το αποτελείται από προσοχή-πάνω-προσοχή, ποικιλομορφία μεταξύ των κεφαλών προσοχής, ιεραρχική μάθηση μεταφοράς, και συνθετική αύξηση δεδομένων ενώ είναι υπολογιστικά φθηνή. Χτίζοντας πάνω από το ισχυρό μοντέλο παρέχει 2,0% απόλυτη ώθηση σε F1 έναντι του υπερσύγχρονου συστήματος (SOTA) σε βιομηχανική κλίμακα στο NQ. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι το GAAMA μεταφέρει μηδενικές βολές σε αόρατη πραγματική ζωή και σημαντικούς τομείς καθώς αποδίδει αξιοσέβαστη απόδοση σε δύο σημεία αναφοράς: το BioASQ και τα πρόσφατα εισαγόμενα σύνολα δεδομένων CovidQA.', 'it': 'I sistemi NLP su scala industriale richiedono due caratteristiche. 1. Robustezza: "zero-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) performance deve essere encomiabile e 2. Efficienza: i sistemi devono allenarsi in modo efficiente e rispondere istantaneamente. In questo articolo presentiamo lo sviluppo di un modello di produzione chiamato GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) che possiede le due caratteristiche di cui sopra. Per la robustezza, si allena sul set di dati Natural Questions (NQ) recentemente introdotto. NQ pone ulteriori sfide rispetto a set di dati più vecchi come SQAD: (a) i sistemi QA devono leggere e comprendere un intero articolo di Wikipedia piuttosto che un piccolo passaggio, e (b) NQ non soffre di distorsioni di osservazione durante la costruzione, con conseguente minore sovrapposizione lessicale tra la domanda e l\'articolo. GAAMA consiste in Attention-over-Attention, diversità tra le teste di attenzione, apprendimento gerarchico di trasferimento e aumento dei dati sintetici pur essendo computazionale poco costoso. Basandosi sul potente modello BERTQA, GAAMA offre un incremento assoluto del 2,0% in F1 rispetto al sistema SOTA (all\'avanguardia) su scala industriale su NQ. Inoltre, mostriamo che GAAMA trasferisce zero-shot alla vita reale invisibile e a domini importanti in quanto fornisce prestazioni rispettabili su due benchmark: il BioASQ e i nuovi dataset CovidQA introdotti.', 'lt': 'Pramonės mastu veikiančioms NLP sistemoms reikia dviejų savybių. 1) patikimumas: "nulinio nuotraukos perkėlimo mokymasis" (ZSTL) turi būti pagirtinas ir 2. Veiksmingumas: sistemos turi veiksmingai mokytis ir nedelsiant reaguoti. Šiame dokumente pristatome gamybos modelio, vadinamo GAAMA (Go Go Ask Me Anything), kūrimą, kuris turi pirmiau minėtas dvi savybes. Siekiant patikimumo ji rengia neseniai įvestą gamtinių klausimų (NQ) duomenų rinkinį. NQ kelia papildomų iššūkių, susijusių su senesniais duomenų rinkiniais, pavyzdžiui, SQuAD: a) QA sistemos turi skaityti ir suprasti visą Wikipedia straipsnį, o ne mažą perėjimą, ir b) NQ nenutraukia stebėjimo pusiausvyros statybos metu, dėl to klausimas ir straipsnis mažiau persidengia. GAAMA consists of Attention-over-Attention, diversity among attention heads, hierarchical transfer learning, and synthetic data augmentation while being computationally inexpensive.  Be galingo BERTQA modelio GAAMA suteikia absoliučią F1 spartą ≤ 2,0 proc., palyginti su naujausia NQ pramonės sistema (SOTA). Be to, mes rodome, kad GAAMA perkelia nulinę nuotrauką į nematomą real ų gyvenimą ir svarbias sritis, nes ji duoda gerbiamų rezultatų pagal du lyginamuosius rodiklius: BioASQ ir naujai įdiegtus CovidQA duomenų rinkinius.', 'mk': 'Индустриски системи на НЛП потребни се две карактеристики. 1. Робилноста: „нула-стрелка префрлање учење“ (ZSTL) мора да биде пофалена и 2. Ефикасност: системите мора да се тренираат ефикасно и да одговараат веднаш. Во овој весник, го претставуваме развојот на производствениот модел наречен GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) кој ги поседува двете наведени карактеристики. For robustness, it trains on the recently introduced Natural Questions (NQ) dataset.  NQ предизвикува дополнителни предизвици во врска со постарите податоци како SQuAD: (a) системите на QA мора да читаат и разберат цела статија од Википедија наместо мал премин, и (b) NQ не страда од набљудувачки предрасуди за време на изградбата, што резултира со помалку лексична прекривање помеѓу прашањето и статијата ГААМА се состои од внимание преку внимание, различност меѓу главите на внимание, хиерархиско преносно учење и зголемување на синтетичките податоци, додека се компјутационално нескапи. Building on top of the powerful BERTQA model, GAAMA provides a  2.0% absolute boost in F1 over the industry-scale state-of-the-art (SOTA) system on NQ.  Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека ГААМА трансферира нула пукање во невидливи реални животи и важни домени бидејќи дава почитувана резултат на две референтни значки: БиоАСК и новите воведени податоци на CovidQA.', 'ms': "Sistem NLP skala industri memerlukan dua ciri-ciri. 1. Kekuatan: 'pembelajaran pemindahan 0-shot' (ZSTL) prestasi perlu dihormati dan 2. Efisiensi: sistem perlu berlatih dengan efisien dan bertindak segera. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pembangunan model produksi bernama GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) yang mempunyai dua ciri-ciri di atas. Untuk kepekatan, ia berlatih pada set data soalan alam (NQ) yang baru-baru ini diperkenalkan. NQ mengakibatkan cabaran tambahan terhadap set data lama seperti SQuAD: (a) sistem QA perlu membaca dan memahami seluruh artikel Wikipedia daripada laluan kecil, dan (b) NQ tidak menderita dari bias pengawasan semasa pembangunan, yang menyebabkan lebih kurang meliputi leksikal antara soalan dan artikel. GAAMA terdiri daripada Perhatian-lebih-Perhatian, pelbagai diantara kepala perhatian, pembelajaran pemindahan hierarkis, dan peningkatan data sintetik sementara secara kira-kira tidak mahal. Bangun di atas model BERTQA yang kuat, GAAMA menyediakan pukulan mutlak  2.0% dalam F1 atas sistem state-of-the-art (SOTA) skala industri di NQ. Lagipun, kami menunjukkan bahawa GAAMA memindahkan 0-shot ke kehidupan nyata yang tidak terlihat dan domain penting kerana ia memberikan prestasi yang dihormati pada dua tanda referensi: BioASQ dan set data CovidQA yang baru diperkenalkan.", 'ml': "Industry-scale NLP systems necessitate two features.  1. റോബസ്റ്റെന്\u200dസ്: പൂജ്യം വെടിയുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു' (ZSTL) പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കേണ്ടത പ്രഭാവം: സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് സാധാരണ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കണമെന്നും ഉടനെ പ്രതികരിക്കണം. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, മുകളിലുള്ള രണ്ടു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d നാം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവിക ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ (NQ) ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിനെ പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. സ്കുവാഡിനെപ്പോലുള്ള പഴയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d NQ കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു: (a) ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ പാസേജിനെക്കാള്\u200d വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയുടെ പ് GAAMA ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക, ശ്രദ്ധ തലവന്മാര്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസം ഉണ്ട്, ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും, കണക്കില്\u200d കൂ ശക്തിയുള്ള ബെര്\u200dട്ടിക്വാ മോഡലിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d GAAMA NQ-ല്\u200d industrial-scale-the-art-of-the-art സിസ്റ്റം 2. 0% പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഉച്ചരിപ്പിക അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ജീവിതത്തിലേക്ക് പൂജ്യത്തിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നത് പൂജ്യത്തിലേക്കും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡോമെന്\u200dമെന്\u200dറ", 'mt': 'Is-sistemi NLP fuq skala industrijali jeħtieġu żewġ karatteristiċi. 1. Ir-robustezza: it-tagħlim tat-trasferiment mingħajr skop (ZSTL) għandu jkun ta’ min ifaħħar u 2. Effiċjenza: is-sistemi jridu jitħarrġu b’mod effiċjenti u jirrispondu minnufih. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu l-iżvilupp ta’ mudell ta’ produzzjoni msejjaħ GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) li għandu ż-żewġ karatteristiċi ta’ hawn fuq. Għal robustezza, iħarreġ fuq is-sett tad-dejta tal-Mistoqsijiet Naturali (NQ) introdott reċentement. L-NQ to ħloq sfidi addizzjonali fuq settijiet ta’ dejta aktar antiki b ħall-SQuAD: (a) is-sistemi tal-QA jeħtieġu jaqraw u jifhmu artikolu sħiħ tal-Wikipedia minflok passaġġ żgħir, u (b) l-NQ ma tbatix minn preġudizzju għall-osservazzjoni matul il-kostruzzjoni, li jirriżulta f’inqas sovrappożizzjoni lexikali bejn il-mistoqsija u l-artikolu. Il-GAAMA tikkonsisti f’Attenzjoni eċċessiva, diversità fost il-kapijiet tal-attenzjoni, tagħlim ġerarkiku tat-trasferiment, u żieda fid-dejta sintetika filwaqt li ma tkunx għalja b’mod komputattiv. Filwaqt li tibni fuq il-mudell BERTQA b’saħħtu, GAAMA tipprovdi spinta assoluta ta’ = 2.0% f’F1 fuq is-sistema tal-aktar avvanzata fuq skala industrijali (SOTA) fuq in-NQ. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu evidenza li GAAMA tittrasferixxi l-ħajja reali żero-shot għal dawk li ma jidhrux u oqsma importanti peress li tagħti prestazzjoni rispettabbli fuq żewġ punti ta’ riferiment: il-BioASQ u s-settijiet tad-dejta CovidQA introdotti ġodda.', 'ka': 'NLP სისტემები ინდონსტრიის განმავლობაში ორი ფუნქციები უჭირდება. 1. ძალიან ძალიან: 0-სტრიქტის გასწავლება (ZSTL) სტრიქტირება უნდა იყოს შესაძლებელი და 2. ეფექტიფიკაცია: სისტემები უნდა ეფექტიურად გაგრძნოთ და გარეგენოთ. ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ გავაკეთებთ პროექტირების მოდელის განვითარება GAAMA (გადასვლა ყველაფერი მომეხსოვთ) რომელიც უფრო მეტი მეტი პროექტირების გასა ძალიან ძალიან, მას ახლა შემდეგ ჩვენებული ნეიროლური კითხვების (NQ) მონაცემების კონფიგურაციების შესახებ. NQ იყენებს უკეთესი მონაცემები SQuAD- ს უკეთესი მონაცემები: a) QA- ს სისტემები უნდა უკეთესი ვიკიპედიის უფრო ცოტა მონაცემები და უკეთესი მონაცემების გარეშე და b) NQ- ს არ მონაცემების გარეშე მონაცემების გა GAAMA იქნება ატრუნციის გარეშე, ატრუნციის მნიშვნელობის განსხვავებას, ჰიერაქტიკური გარეშე და სინტეტიკური მონაცემების გარეშე, როცა კომპუტაციულად განსხვავებული ი BERTQA მოდელის უფრო ძალიან მარტივი მოდელზე, GAAMA იქნება F1-ში 2.0% აბსოლუტური დამატება NQ-ის ინდუქტურის განმავლობაზე (SOTA) სისტემაზე. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ GAAMA-ს ნულ სტრიქტის გადატანა რეალური სიცოცხლის და მნიშვნელოვანი დემონის შესახებ, როგორც იქნება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მ', 'pl': 'Systemy NLP na skalę przemysłową wymagają dwóch funkcji. Wytrzymałość: "zero-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) musi być godna pochwały i 2. Wydajność: systemy muszą szkolić się efektywnie i reagować natychmiast. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy opracowanie modelu produkcyjnego o nazwie GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), który posiada dwie powyższe cechy. Aby uzyskać solidność, trenuje on na niedawno wprowadzonym zbiorze danych Natural Questions (NQ). NQ stanowi dodatkowe wyzwania w stosunku do starszych zbiorów danych, takich jak SQuAD: (a) systemy jakości muszą czytać i zrozumieć cały artykuł Wikipedii, a nie mały fragment, a (b) NQ nie cierpi na tendencje obserwacyjne podczas budowy, co powoduje mniejsze nakładanie się leksykaliczne między pytaniem a artykułem. GAAMA składa się z Attention-over-Attention, różnorodności wśród głów uwagi, hierarchicznego transferu uczenia się i syntetycznego powiększania danych przy jednoczesnym kosztach obliczeniowych. Opierając się na potężnym modelu BERTQA, GAAMA zapewnia 2,0% absolutny wzrost F1 nad najnowocześniejszym systemem (SOTA) na skalę branżową NQ. Ponadto pokazujemy, że GAAMA przenosi zero-shot do niewidocznych rzeczywistych i ważnych domen, ponieważ daje szanowaną wydajność w dwóch punktach odniesienia: BioASQ i nowo wprowadzone zbiory danych CovidQA.', 'ro': 'Sistemele NLP la scară industrială necesită două caracteristici. 1. Rezistența: "învățarea prin transfer zero-shot" (ZSTL) trebuie să fie lăudabilă și 2. Eficiență: sistemele trebuie să se antreneze eficient și să răspundă instantaneu. În această lucrare, prezentăm dezvoltarea unui model de producție numit GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), care posedă cele două caracteristici de mai sus. Pentru robustețe, se antrenează pe setul de date Natural Questions (NQ) recent introdus. NQ prezintă provocări suplimentare față de seturile de date mai vechi, cum ar fi SQAD: (a) sistemele QA trebuie să citească și să înțeleagă un întreg articol Wikipedia, mai degrabă decât un pasaj mic, și (b) NQ nu suferă de observații în timpul construcției, rezultând mai puțin suprapunere lexicală între întrebare și articol. GAAMA constă în atenție-peste-atenție, diversitate între capetele de atenție, învățare ierarhică de transfer și mărirea datelor sintetice, în timp ce este computațional ieftin. Bazându-se pe modelul BERTQA puternic, GAAMA oferă un impuls absolut de 2,0% în F1 față de sistemul de ultimă generație (SOTA) de pe NQ. Mai mult, arătăm că GAAMA transferă zero-shot în viața reală nevăzută și domenii importante deoarece oferă performanțe respectabile pe două criterii de referință: BioASQ și seturile de date CovidQA nou introduse.', 'kk': 'NLP жүйелерінің индустриялық масштабы екі мүмкіндіктері керек. 1. Қатысылық: "zero-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) әрекеті оқыту керек және 2. Жүйелік: жүйелер әрекетті оқыту және бірден жауап беру керек. Бұл қағазда, біз GAAMA деп аталатын құрылғы үлгісін таңдап береміз (Алдыңғы алдында Сұраңыз Меніңізге бар) екі қасиеттері бар. Қатысылық үшін, бұл жаңа келтірілген Түзіндік Сұрақтар (NQ) деректер жиынына көмектеседі. NQ SQuAD секілді ескі деректер қорларына қосымша мәселелер береді: a) QA жүйелері кішкентай пассажасынан орнына Википедия мақаласын оқу және түсіну керек, және b) NQ құрылғанда бақылау кезінде қарапайды, сондықтан сұрақ мен мақалалар арасында лексика GAAMA компьютерлік үшін қарапайым болып тұрғанда, тәртіпсіздік басында, иерархиялық аудару оқыту және синтетикалық деректерді өзгерту үшін болады. BERTQA үлгісінің үстінен құрылғанда GAAMA NQ индустриялық масштабының (SOTA) жүйесінен F1- ге 2, 0% абсолютті көтерілік береді. Қосымша, GAAMA шын өмір мен маңызды домендерді көрсету үшін нөл түрін нөл түрін көрсетеді. Бұл екі бағдарламаларда тәртіпсіздік береді: BioASQ және жаңа келтірілген CovidQA деректер қорлары.', 'no': 'NLP-systemet for industriskalering treng to funksjonar. 1. Gjennomsiktighet: læring av nullsatt overføring (ZSTL) må vera begynneleg og 2. Effektivitet: systemet må trenja effektivt og svara på øyeblikk. I denne papiret introduserer vi utviklinga av eit produksjonsmodell kalla GAAMA (Gå foran spør meg alt) som har dei to karakteristika over. For kraftighet treng det på datasettet som nyleg innførte naturspørsmål (NQ). NQ legg til ekstra utfordringar over eldre datasett som SQuAD: a) QA- systemet må lesa og forstå heile Wikipedia- artikkel i staden for eit lite passasjon, og b) NQ går ikkje frå observasjonsfordringar under konstruksjonen, som fører til mindre leksisk overlapping mellom spørsmålet og artikkelen. GAAMA består av Attention-over-Attention, mangfold mellom oppmerkshoder, hierarkisk overføring, og syntetiske data-augmentasjon mens det er rekna ut ikkje ekspensivt. Bygd på toppen av den kraftige BERTQA-modellen, gir GAAMA ein absolutt størring av 2,0 % i F1 over industriske størrelsesystemet for kunsten (SOTA) på NQ. I tillegg viser vi at GAAMA overfører nullsatt til å forskyve virkelige liv og viktige domene, sidan han gjer respektabel utvikling på to benchmarker: BioASQ og dei nye innførte CovidQA-datasetta.', 'si': "සිද්ධාන්ති පද්ධතිය NLP පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dය දෙකක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා. 1. ස්ථිර විශ්වාසය: '0-shot Transfer Training' (ZSTL) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් 2. ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය: පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න වෙනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි GAAMA කියලා ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරනවා කියලා (Go forward ask me Anything) කියලා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (NQ) දත්ත NQ සම්පූර්ණය SQuAD වගේ පරණ දත්ත සේට් වලින් අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා: a) QA පද්ධතියක් පුරුදු විකිපිඩියා ලේඛනයක් කියවන්න සහ තේරුම් ගන්න ඕන, පුරුදු ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ලේ GAAMA සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ Attension-over-Attension, අවධානය ඔළුවන්ගේ විවිධානය, අභ්\u200dයාගතික සංවිධානය, සහ සංවිධානය දත්ත විශා බලාපොරොත්තු BERTQA මොඩේල් එකේ ඉහළට ගොඩනිර්මාණය කරනවා, GAAMA නිර්මාණය සඳහා F1 වලින් ∙ 2.0% නිර්මාණය සම්පූර්ණ විශාල විද්\u200dයාවක තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ GAAMA එක ඇත්ත ජීවිතය සහ වැදගත් ඩෝමේන්ස් වලට සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙනවා කියලා: BioASQ සහ අළුත් ආරම්භ කරලා CoVIQA දත්ත සේට් ව", 'mn': 'НLP-ын индустрийн хэмжээний системүүд хоёр өөрчлөлт хэрэгтэй. 1. Гэвч тодорхой байдал: 0-шүдний шилжүүлэлт суралцах (ZSTL) үйл ажиллагаа илэрхийлэх ёстой ба 2-г илэрхийлэх ёстой. Үзэмшил: системүүд бүтээмжтэй суралцаж, одоогоор хариулах хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид GAAMA гэдэг үйлдвэрлэлийн загварын хөгжлийг танилцуулж байна. Байгалийн асуултууд (NQ) өгөгдлийн сангуудыг саяхан тайлбарласан. NQ нь SQuAD шиг хуучин өгөгдлийн сангийн тухай нэмэлт сорилтуудыг бий болгодог: a) QA системүүд жижиг хугацааны оронд Википедийн бүх өгөгдлийг уншиж, ойлгох шаардлагатай бөгөөд b) NQ нь барилгын үед ажиглах зайлсхийлгүй байдлаар зовлон байхгүй, асуулт болон өгөгдлийн ГААМА нь анхаарлын толгойд анхаарлын төвлөрөмж, шинжлэх ухаан суралцах болон тооцоололтоор тооцоолж чадахгүй байх үед санааны өгөгдлийн нэмэлт байдаг. BERTQA загварын дээд барилцаж, GAAMA нь F1-д байгуулах үйлдвэрлэлийн урлагийн (SOTA) системийн хувьд 2.0% нэмэгдүүлж байна. Дараа нь, ГААМА нь жинхэнэ амьдрал болон чухал орон нутгийг хоёр давхар дээр хүндрэлтэй үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чаддаг гэдгийг харуулж байна: BioASQ болон шинэ CovidQA өгөгдлийн сангууд.', 'so': "Isticmaalka NLP ee ganacsaduhu waxay u baahan yihiin laba tayar. 1. Robustness: 'zero-shot transfer learning' (ZSTL) performance has to be commendable and 2.  Saamayn: nidaamka waa in ay si fiican wax u tababaridaan oo si dhaqso ah u jawaabaan. Qoraalkan waxaan ku qoraynaa horumarinta model wax soo saarta oo la yidhaahdo GAAAMA (Go Ahead i weydii wax kasta) oo haysta labada takhasus. Qashinka darteed waxey ku tababaridaa soo dhowaaday su'aalaha asalka ah (NQ). NQ waxay leedahay dhibaatooyin dheeraad ah oo ka badan qoraal-gaar ah sida SQuAD: (a) QA nidaamka waa in ay u baahan yihiin inay akhriyaan oo garato qoraalka oo dhan ee Wikipedia ka badala baasabka yar, iyo (b) NQ kama daaqdo aragtida baaskiisa marka la dhiso, taasoo sababto ah wax ka yar la daboolo suurtagalka iyo qoraalka. GAAMA waxaa ka mid ah daryeel-kor-attention, kala duduwan madaxa attention, barashada hierarchical beddelinta, iyo kordhinta data synthetic, iyadoo aan xisaab la'aan lahayn. Building on top of the powerful BERTQA model, GAAAMA provides a `2.0% absolute boost in F1 over the system-of-the-art (SOTA) of the industrial-scale-state-of-the-art (SOTA) on NQ. Sidoo kale waxaan tusaynaa in GAAMA uu zero-shot ugu wareejiyaa nolosha runta ah iyo meelaha muhiimka ah, sababtoo ah waxay ka bixisaa shaqooyin la heshiiyo labada qiimaha: BioASQ iyo kooxda macluumaadka ee cusub ee CovidQA.", 'sr': 'NLP-sistemi industrijske skale zahtevaju dve karakteristike. 1. Robotnost: "učenje za prebacivanje nule snimke" (ZSTL) mora biti pohvalno i 2. Efikasnost: sistemi moraju da treniraju efikasno i odmah odgovore. U ovom papiru predstavljamo razvoj model a proizvodnje koje se zove GAAMA (Go Forward Ask Me Anything) koji poseduje iznad dva karakteristika. Zbog pljačke, on trenira na nedavno uvedenoj prirodnoj pitanju (NQ) dataset. NQ postavlja dodatne izazove preko starijih podataka poput SQuAD: a) QA sistemi moraju čitati i shvatiti čitav članak Wikipedije umjesto malog prolaza, a b) NQ ne pati od pristrasnosti posmatranja tokom konstrukcije, što je rezultiralo manje leksičkog preklapanja između pitanja i članaka. GAAMA se sastoji od pažnje preko pažnje, raznolikosti među glavama pažnje, učenjem hijerarhijskog prijenosa i povećanjem sintetičkih podataka dok je računalno neispenzivno. Građeći na vrhu moćnog model a BERTQA, GAAMA pruža apsolutno povećanje u F1 od 2,0% na industrijskom stanju umjetnosti (SOTA) na NQ-u. Dalje, pokazujemo da GAAMA prebacuje nulu šansu na nevidljive stvarne živote i važne domene jer daje poštovane izvedbe na dva kritika: BioASQ i nove uvođene podatke CovidQA.', 'sv': 'Industriskaliga NLP-system kräver två funktioner. 1. Robusthet: "zero-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) prestanda måste vara lovvärd och 2. Effektivitet: Systemen måste utbildas effektivt och reagera omedelbart. I denna uppsats presenterar vi utvecklingen av en produktionsmodell kallad GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) som har ovanstående två egenskaper. För robusthet tränar den på den nyligen introducerade datauppsättningen Natural Questions (NQ). NQ innebär ytterligare utmaningar jämfört med äldre datauppsättningar som SQAD: (a) QA-system behöver läsa och förstå en hel Wikipedia-artikel snarare än en liten passage, och (b) NQ lider inte av observationsbias under konstruktion, vilket resulterar i mindre lexikal överlappning mellan frågan och artikeln. GAAMA består av Attention-over-Attention, mångfald bland uppmärksamhet huvuden, hierarkiskt överföringslärande och syntetisk dataökning samtidigt som det är beräkningsmässigt billigt. GAAMA bygger på den kraftfulla BERTQA-modellen och ger en absolut ökning på 2,0% i F1 jämfört med branschens toppmoderna (SOTA) system på NQ. Vidare visar vi att GAAMA överför nollskott till osedda verkliga miljöer och viktiga domäner eftersom det ger respektabel prestanda på två riktmärken: BioASQ och de nyligen introducerade CovidQA datauppsättningarna.', 'ta': "தொழில்நுட்பம்- அளவு NLP அமைப்புகள் இரண்டு குணங்கள் தேவைப்படுகிறது. 1. சுழற்சியில்லை: பூஜ்ஜியமான மாற்றி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும்' (ZSTL) செயல்பாடு புகழ் மற்றும் 2 ஆக இருக்க வேண்டும். விளைவு: கணினிகளுக்கு விரைவாக பயிற்சி உடனடியாக பதில் கொடுக்க வேண்டும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், மேல் இரண்டு குணங்களுக்கும் மேல் உள்ள உருவாக்கும் மாதிரியை நாம் அறிவிக்கிறோம். அண்மையில் சமீபத்தில் உள்ள இயற்கையான கேள்விகள் (NQ) தகவல் அமைப்பில் இது பயிற்சி செய்கிறது. NQ வயதான தரவுத்தளங்களில் கூடுதல் சவால்கள் இருக்கிறது SQuAD போன்ற: (a) QA அமைப்புகள் சிறிய கடவுச்செல்லும் அல்லது முழு விக்கிபிடியா கட்டுரையை படித்து புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டு GAAMA கொண்டுள்ளது கவனத்தை மேல்- கவனத்தில் உள்ளது, கவனத்தின் தலைவர்களில் பல்வேறு வித்தியாசம், ஹையரியல் மாற்றுதல் கற்றல் மற்றும் கணிப்பாட்டில் இல்லா பெர்டிக்யா மாதிரியின் மேல் கட்டுதல், GAAMA கொடுக்கிறது '2. 0% முழுமையான அதிகரிப்பு F1- ல் தொழில்நுட்பம்- அளவு கலை- முறைமையின் மேல் 'SOTA' அமைப்பை  மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் GAAMA பூஜ்ஜியத்தை மறைக்கப்படாத உண்மையான வாழ்க்கையும் முக்கியமான களங்களுக்கும் மாற்றுகிறது என்பதை காண்பிக்கிற", 'ur': 'انڈینسٹریس-اسکیل NLP سیسٹم دو فرصت کی ضرورت ہے۔ 1. مضبوطی: zero-shot transfer learning (ZSTL) performance must be commendable and 2. فعالیت: سیستموں کو اثرات کے ساتھ تطارین کرنا چاہیے اور فوراً جواب دینا چاہیے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک پیدائش موڈل کی تولید کرتے ہیں جو GAAMA کا نام ہے (جاؤ مجھ سے کچھ پوچھو) جس کے پاس دو علامتیں ہیں۔ مضبوطی کے لئے، یہ اچھے سے پہلے تحقیقات کے سوال (NQ) ڈاٹ سٹ پر ٹرین کرتا ہے۔ NQ ایک چھوٹے پاسٹ کے بغیر ایک کلی ویکیپیڈیا لکھ کے پڑھنے اور سمجھنے کی ضرورت ہے اور (b) NQ بنیاد میں نظر اندازے سے زیادہ مشکل نہیں پہنچتا، اس کے نتیجہ میں سوال اور لکھ کے درمیان کم لکھ پڑنے کی وجہ سے ہے. GAAMA کی توجه سے بہت زیادہ توجه ہے، توجه کے سروں میں مختلف مختلف، حیراتیک ترنسیٹ سیکھنا، اور سینٹیٹیک ڈاٹ اضافہ کی حالت میں کمپیوٹر سے زیادہ غیر اضافہ ہے. BERTQA موڈل کے اوپر بنیاد کرنا، GAAMA نے NQ کے صنعت-اسکیل (SOTA) سیسٹم پر F1 میں 2.0% مطلق اضافہ کی۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ GAAMA صفر-شٹ کو حقیقی زندگی اور اہم ڈومین کے لئے دکھاتا ہے جبکہ وہ دو بنچم مارک پر احترام کے کام دیتا ہے: BioASQ اور نئی پہنچائی CovidQA ڈاٹ سٹ.', 'uz': "Name 1. Vaqtincha: zero- shotish o'rganish o'rganishni o'rganish kerak (ZSTL) bajarishi shart va 2. Effektlik: tizimlar foydalanishi kerak va hozir javob berishi kerak. Bu qogʻozda, biz GAAMA (GAAMA) deb nomli tuzuvchi modelni aniqlashimizni anglatamiz va eng ikki xizmatga ega narsa so'rashingiz mumkin. Ko'pchilik uchun, u yaqinda ishlatilgan tabiiy savollar (NQ) haqida o'rganadi. Name GAAMA'dan taqdimot, taqdimot boshqaruvchilar, hierarchik transfer o'rganishlar orasidagi tarqatish, va kompyutlarni hech qanday yetarli maʼlumot qoʻshish mumkin. Name Ko'rsatganimiz, GAAMA haqiqiqiy hayot va muhim domain bilan hech narsa o'zgarishni ko'rsatdik, chunki u ikki qo'llangan qo'llanmalar bilan hech qanday ishlaydi. BioASQ va yangi kodQA maʼlumot setlarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống không khai thác nổi cần có hai tính năng. 1. Sự bền vững,\'học chuyển nhượng trường quay không (ZSTL) phải được khen ngợi và 2. Hiệu quả: hệ thống phải rèn luyện hiệu quả và đáp ứng ngay lập tức. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu sự phát triển của một mô hình sản xuất tên là GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me anybody) sở hữu hai đặc điểm trên đây. Để đảm bảo vững chắc, nó được luyện tập trên tập tin "Câu hỏi tự nhiên" mới được giới thiệu. NQ tạo ra những thử thách khác với các dữ liệu cũ như SQurad(a) Hệ thống QA cần phải đọc và hiểu được nguyên một b ài của Wikipedia hơn là một đoạn nhỏ, và (b) không bị thiên kiến quan sát trong quá trình xây dựng, dẫn tới sự gấp bội hóa thấp từ giữa câu hỏi và bài báo. GAAMA bao gồm chú ý vượt qua chú ý, đa dạng giữa các đầu tập trung, học luân chuyển phân cấp, và tăng trưởng dữ liệu tổng hợp trong khi tính thấp. Trên đỉnh của mô hình BERTQA hùng mạnh, GAAMA tạo ra một tăng vọt tuyệt đối trong F1 trên hệ thống công nghệ đang phát triển trên kênh NQ. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng GAAMA chuyển phát bắn không vào đời sống không nhìn thấy và những khu vực quan trọng bởi vì nó cung cấp một hiệu quả đáng kính trên hai tiêu chuẩn: the BioASQ và the recent introduced CovidQA dataset.', 'bg': 'Индустриалните системи за НЛО изискват две характеристики. 1. Здравина: представянето на "трансферно обучение с нулев изстрел" трябва да бъде похвално и 2. Ефективност: системите трябва да се обучават ефективно и да реагират мигновено. В тази статия представяме разработването на производствен модел, който притежава горепосочените две характеристики. За здравина, той тренира върху наскоро въведения набор от данни за естествени въпроси (НQ). НQ поставя допълнителни предизвикателства пред по-старите набори от данни като: а) системите за оценка на качеството трябва да прочетат и разберат цяла статия в Уикипедия, а не малък пасаж, и б) НQ не страда от отклонение на наблюдението по време на строителството, което води до по-малко лексикално припокриване между въпроса и статията. ГААМА се състои от внимание над внимание, разнообразие между главите на вниманието, йерархично трансферно обучение и синтетично увеличаване на данни, като същевременно е изчислително евтино. Въз основа на мощния модел осигурява 2,0% абсолютен тласък във Формула 1 спрямо най-съвременната система в индустрията (СОТА) на НК. Освен това, ние показваме, че пренася нулев изстрел към невидими реални и важни области, тъй като дава достойно представяне на две показатели: и нововъведените набори от данни.', 'hr': 'NLP sustavi industrijske skale zahtijevaju dvije karakteristike. 1. Robotnost: "učenje za prebacivanje nule snimke" (ZSTL) mora biti pohvalno i 2. Efikasnost: sustavi moraju učinkovito trenirati i odmah reagirati. U ovom papiru predstavljamo razvoj proizvodnjeg model a po imenu GAAMA (Go Forward Ask Me Anything) koji posjeduje iznad dvije karakteristike. Zbog pljačke, on trenira na nedavno uvedenoj prirodnoj pitanju (NQ) dataset. NQ predstavlja dodatne izazove nad starijim podacima poput SQuAD: a) QA sustavi moraju čitati i shvatiti cijeli članak Wikipedia umjesto malog prolaza, a b) NQ ne pati od pristrasnosti promatranja tijekom konstrukcije, što je rezultiralo manje leksičkog preklapanja između pitanja i članaka. GAAMA se sastoji od pažnje preko pažnje, raznolikosti među glavama pažnje, učenjem hijerarhijskog prijenosa i povećanjem sintetičkih podataka dok je računalno nepošteno. Građeći na vrhu moćnog model a BERTQA, GAAMA pruža apsolutno povećanje u F1 od 2,0% na industrijskom stanju umjetnosti (SOTA) na NQ-u. Nadalje, pokazujemo da GAAMA prebacuje nulu snimku na nevidljive stvarne živote i važne domene jer pruža poštovane učinke na dvije kriterije: BioASQ i nove uvođene podatke CovidQA.', 'id': "Sistem NLP skala industri membutuhkan dua fitur. 1. Kekuatan: 'zero-shot transfer learning' (ZSTL) prestasi harus dihormati dan 2. Efisiensi: sistem harus berlatih secara efisien dan merespon secara segera. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan perkembangan model produksi bernama GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) yang memiliki dua karakteristik di atas. For robustness, it trains on the recently introduced Natural Questions (NQ) dataset.  NQ mengakibatkan tantangan tambahan atas dataset lama seperti SQuAD: (a) sistem QA perlu membaca dan memahami seluruh artikel Wikipedia daripada sebuah kalimat kecil, dan (b) NQ tidak menderita dari bias pengamatan selama konstruksi, yang menyebabkan lebih sedikit meliputi lexik antara pertanyaan dan artikel. GAAMA terdiri dari perhatian-lebih Perhatian, kebanyakan diantara kepala perhatian, belajar transfer hierarkis, dan peningkatan data sintetis sementara secara komputasi tidak mahal. Berbangun di atas model BERTQA yang kuat, GAAMA menyediakan pendorong mutlak 2,0% di F1 atas sistem industri-skala state-of-the-art (SOTA) di NQ. Lagipula, kami menunjukkan bahwa GAAMA memindahkan zero-shot ke kehidupan nyata yang tidak terlihat dan domain penting karena itu memberikan prestasi terhormat pada dua tanda referensi: BioASQ dan set data CovidQA yang baru diperkenalkan.", 'ko': "업계 규모의 NLP 시스템에는 두 가지 기능이 필요합니다.1. 안정성:'제로포 전이 학습'(ZSTL)의 성능은 칭찬할 만해야 한다. 2.효율: 시스템은 반드시 효율적으로 훈련하고 즉시 응답해야 한다.본고에서 우리는 GAAMA(계속 나에게 어떤 것을 묻는다)라는 생산 모델의 개발을 소개했는데 이 모델은 상술한 두 가지 특징을 가지고 있다.건장성을 담보하기 위해 최근 도입된 자연문제(NQ) 데이터세트에서 훈련한다.NQ는 비교적 오래된 데이터 집합(예를 들어 SQuad)에 대해 추가적인 도전을 제기했다. (a)QA시스템은 작은 문장이 아닌 전체 위키백과 문장을 읽고 이해해야 한다. (b)NQ는 구축 과정에서 관찰 편차가 나타나지 않아 문제와 문장 사이의 어휘 중첩을 줄인다.GAAMA는 주의력이 집중력보다 높고 주의 헤드 사이의 다양성, 층별 이동 학습과 합성 데이터 강화로 구성되어 있지만 계산 원가가 비교적 낮다.강력한 BERTQA 모델을 토대로 NQ의 업계급 최첨단(SOTA) 시스템에 비해 GAAMA는 F1에 2.0%의 절대적인 향상을 제공했다.또한 GAAMA는 제로 사격을 보이지 않는 현실 생활과 중요한 분야로 옮겼다. 두 가지 기준에서 굉장한 성능을 얻었기 때문이다. 그것이 바로 바이오ASQ와 새로 도입된CovidQA 데이터 집합이다.", 'nl': "NLP-systemen op industrieschaal vereisen twee kenmerken. 1. Robustheid: 'zero-shot transfer learning' (ZSTL) prestaties moeten lovenswaardig zijn en 2. Efficiëntie: systemen moeten efficiënt trainen en onmiddellijk reageren. In dit artikel introduceren we de ontwikkeling van een productiemodel genaamd GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) dat de bovenstaande twee kenmerken bezit. Voor robuustheid traint het op de recent geïntroduceerde Natural Questions (NQ) dataset. NQ vormt extra uitdagingen ten opzichte van oudere datasets zoals SQuAD: (a) QA-systemen moeten een heel Wikipedia-artikel lezen en begrijpen in plaats van een kleine passage, en (b) NQ lijdt niet aan observatie bias tijdens het bouwen, wat resulteert in minder lexicale overlapping tussen de vraag en het artikel. GAAMA bestaat uit Attention-over-Attention, diversiteit onder attentie heads, hiërarchische overdracht leren en synthetische data augmentatie terwijl het rekenkundig goedkoop is. Voortbouwend op het krachtige BERTQA model, biedt GAAMA een 2,0% absolute boost in F1 boven het industrieschaal state-of-the-art (SOTA) systeem op NQ. Verder laten we zien dat GAAMA zero-shot overdraagt naar ongeziene real life en belangrijke domeinen omdat het respectabele prestaties levert op twee benchmarks: de BioASQ en de nieuw geïntroduceerde CovidQA datasets.", 'da': 'NLP-systemer i industriskala kræver to funktioner. 1. Robusthed: "zero-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) ydeevne skal være prisværdig og 2. Effektivitet: Systemerne skal træne effektivt og reagere øjeblikkeligt. I denne artikel introducerer vi udviklingen af en produktionsmodel kaldet GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), som besidder de to ovennævnte egenskaber. For robusthed træner den på det nyligt introducerede Natural Questions (NQ) datasæt. NQ udgør yderligere udfordringer i forhold til ældre datasæt som SQAD: (a) QA-systemer skal læse og forstå en hel Wikipedia-artikel frem for en lille passage, og (b) NQ lider ikke af observationsskævhed under opførelsen, hvilket resulterer i mindre leksiksk overlapning mellem spørgsmålet og artiklen. GAAMA består af opmærksomhed over opmærksomhed, mangfoldighed blandt opmærksomhedshoveder, hierarkisk overførsel læring og syntetisk dataforøgelse, samtidig med at det er beregningsmæssigt billigt. Med udgangspunkt i den kraftfulde BERTQA-model giver GAAMA et absolut løft på 2,0% i F1 i forhold til det brancheskala state-of-the-art (SOTA) system på NQ. Desuden viser vi, at GAAMA overfører zero-shot til usete virkelige liv og vigtige domæner, da det giver respektabel ydeevne på to benchmarks: BioASQ og de nyligt introducerede CovidQA datasæt.', 'de': 'Industrielle NLP-Systeme erfordern zwei Funktionen. 1. Robustheit: "Zero-Shot Transfer Learning" (ZSTL) muss lobenswert sein und 2. Effizienz: Systeme müssen effizient trainieren und sofort reagieren. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die Entwicklung eines Produktionsmodells namens GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) vor, das die beiden oben genannten Eigenschaften aufweist. Aus Gründen der Robustheit trainiert es auf dem kürzlich eingeführten Natural Questions (NQ)-Datensatz. NQ stellt gegenüber älteren Datensätzen wie SQuAD zusätzliche Herausforderungen dar: (a) QA-Systeme müssen einen ganzen Wikipedia-Artikel lesen und verstehen anstatt eine kleine Passage, und (b) NQ leidet während der Konstruktion nicht unter Observation Bias, was zu einer geringeren lexikalischen Überlappung zwischen der Frage und dem Artikel führt. GAAMA besteht aus Attention-over-Attention, Diversität unter Aufmerksamkeitsköpfen, hierarchischem Transferlernen und synthetischer Datenauswertung bei gleichzeitiger Kosteneinsparung. Aufbauend auf dem leistungsstarken BERTQA-Modell bietet GAAMA einen 2,0% absoluten Boost in F1 gegenüber dem branchenüblichen State-of-the-Art (SOTA)-System auf NQ. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass GAAMA Zero-Shot in unsichtbare reale und wichtige Domänen überträgt, da es auf zwei Benchmarks eine respektable Performance erbringt: dem BioASQ und den neu eingeführten CovidQA-Datensätzen.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای NLP صنعتی دو ویژه نیاز دارند. ۱. استعداد: تعلیم انتقال صفر (ZSTL) باید قابل توجهی باشد و ۲. فعالیت: سیستم ها باید به طور موثرتی آموزش دهند و فوراً پاسخ دهند. در این کاغذ، ما توسعه یک مدل تولید را معرفی می کنیم به نام GAAMA (برو پیش از من از هر چیزی بپرس) که دو ویژگی بالا دارد. برای دقت، آن در مجموعه داده\u200cهای طبیعی (NQ) اخیراً آموزش می\u200cدهد. NQ چالش\u200cهای اضافه بر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای قدیمی مانند SQuAD قرار می\u200cدهد: a) سیستم\u200cهای QA باید کل مقاله ویکیپدیا را بخوانند و دریافت کنند به جای یک مسیر کوچک، و b) NQ در زمان ساختمون از چهره\u200cای مشاهده نمی\u200cشود، و به نتیجه پایان\u200cافزایش زبانی کمتر بین سوال و GAAMA consists of attention-over-attention, diversity among attention heads, hierarchical transfer learning, and synthetic data increase while computationally inexpensive. ساختن بر بالای مدل BERTQA قدرتمند GAAMA یک افزایش کامل ۲.۰ درصد در F1 بر روی سیستم صنعت-مقیاس هنر (SOTA) NQ را می\u200cدهد. بعلاوه، ما نشان می دهیم که GAAMA صفر را به زندگی واقعی و دامنهای مهم ناشناخته می کند، در حالی که آن اجرای قابل احترام بر دو برچسب می دهد: BioASQ و مجموعه داده های تازه CovidQA را معرفی می کند.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa NLP wenye kiwango cha viwanda unahitaji vipengele viwili. 1. Utafiti: Uhamiaji wa kujifunza sifuri (ZSTL) unapaswa kuwa na sifa na 2. Madhara: mifumo inabidi kufundisha ufanisi na kujibu mara moja. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha maendeleo ya muundo wa uzalishaji unaoitwa GAAAMA (Nenda Ahead Niulize chochote) kinachomiliki takwimu mbili za juu. Kwa ajili ya uvumi, inafundisha maswali ya asili ya hivi karibuni (NQ). NQ in a changamoto zaidi ya seti za data za zamani kama SQuAD: (a) mifumo ya QA inahitaji kusoma na kuelewa makala yote ya Wikipedia badala ya upatikanaji mdogo wa Wikipedia, na (b) NQ hazipatiki kutokana na upendeleo wa kutazama wakati wa ujenzi, na yanasababisha kupunguza vifaa vya lexico kidogo kati ya swali na makala hiyo. GAAMA inajumuisha uangalizi wa juu, tofauti kati ya vichwa vya habari, elimu ya uhamishaji wa kiuchumi, na kuongezeka kwa takwimu za pamoja wakati wakiwa na ukosefu wa kutosha. Building on top of the powerful BERTQA model, GAAMA provides a  2.0% absolute boost in F1 over the industry-scale state-of-the-art (SOTA) system on NQ.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kwamba GAAMA huhamishia picha sifuri kwa ajili ya maisha halisi na maeneo muhimu kwa sababu inaleta ufanisi wa heshima katika misingi mawili: BioASQ na seti mpya za taarifa za CovidQA.', 'tr': "NLP sistemleri sanat kalamynda iki hatlary gerek. 1. Gymmatly: 0-at harplary öwrenmek üçin (ZSTL) eserleşmek üçin täsirli bolmaly we 2-at harplary. Gymmatçylyk: sistemalar buýrukly öwrenmeli we derrew jogap bermeli. Bu kagyzda, GAAMA (Go Forward Ask Me Anything) adly önümçilik nusgynyň gelişmesini tanyşdyrýarys. Gymmatly bolsa, iň soňky wagtlarda tebigat soraglary (NQ) sany guruldygynda otlaýar. NQ SQuAD ýaly uly veri setirlerinden öňki kynçylyklaryň üstünde esasy kynçylyklary bar: a) QA sistemleri kiçi pasajyň ýerine b ütin Wikipediýanyň makalasyny okamak we düşünmesi gerek we (b) NQ bina durmuşynda gözlemek tertibinden ýok bolmaz we bu sebäpden soragyň we maksadyň arasynda ýeterlik tertibine gelmeli. GAAMA dikkati aşa dikkati, üns kellelerinden, hiyerarşik aktarma öwrenmelerinden oluşan, hesap edilen bozgunçylyklaryndan oluşan sintetik veri eklenmesidir. GAAMA güýçli BERTQA nusgasynyň üstünde gurulýar, F1'de 2.0% süýşikli ýükselişi NQ sanat derejesinde gelen senagat derejesi (SOTA) sistemini saýlaýar. Mundan soňra, GAAMA hakyky durmuşy görmäge zero atjyny göçürýär we wajyp alanlary iki pratik daşarynda täsirli etjek bolup görünýär: BioASQ we täze CovidQA veri setirleri.", 'af': "Industrie-skaal NLP stelsels benodig twee funksies. 1. Robustheid: 'zero-shot oordrag leer' (ZSTL) prestasie moet ontvangbaar wees en 2. Effektiviteit: stelsels moet effektief trein en onmiddellik reageer. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons die ontwikkeling van 'n produksie model genoem GAAMA (Go Ahead Vra My enigiets) wat besit die bo twee karakteristieke. Vir kragtigheid, trein dit op die onlangs ingevoerde Natuurlike Vragate (NQ) datastel. Name GAAMA bestaan van Attention-over-Attention, verskildenis onder aandagkoppe, hierarkies oordrag leer, en sintetiese data vergroot terwyl rekenaarsies onekspensief is. Bou op die boonste van die kragtige BERTQA model, GAAMA verskaf 'n 2. 0% absoluut booster in F1 oor die industries- skaal staat- of- the- art (SOTA) stelsel op NQ. Verder, ons wys dat GAAMA nul-skoot oordrag om regte lewe en belangrike domeine te ontsien as dit gee respektabele prestasie op twee benchmarke: die BioASQ en die nuwe ingevoerde CovidQA datastelle.", 'hy': "Ինստիտուրական մակարդակի ՆԼՊ համակարգերը պահանջում են երկու հատկություն: 1. Կարևոր է, որ զրո-կրակի փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը (ZSTAL) գովելի լինի և 2: Էֆեկտիվություն. համակարգերը պետք է արդյունավետ վարժեցնեն և միանգամից արձագանքվեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք արտադրողական մոդելի զարգացումը, որը կոչվում է ԳԱԱՄԱ, որը ունի վերևի երկու հատկությունները: Անվստահության համար այն վարժում է վերջերս ներկայացված բնական հարցերի (NQ) տվյալների համակարգի վրա: NQ-ն ավելին մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում ավելի հին տվյալների համակարգերի, ինչպիսիք են SQUADը: a) QA համակարգերը պետք է կարդան և հասկանան Վիքիփեդիայի ամբողջ հոդվածը, ոչ թե փոքր հատվածը, և b) NQ-ը չի տառապում դիտարկության կողմնականությունից կառուցվածքի ընթացքում, ինչը հանգեց ԳԱԱՄԱ-ը կազմված է ուշադրության չափազանց մեծ մասից, ուշադրության գլխավորների բազմազանությունից, հիերարխիկ փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունից և սինթետիկ տվյալների աճից, մինչդեռ հաշվարկների առումով անթանկ է: Հիմնվելով ԲԵՌԹՔԱ-ի հզոր մոդելի վրա, ԳԱԱՄԱ-ն առաջարկում է F1-ի բացարձակ աճ՝ 2.0 տոկոսով ՆԿ-ի ինդուստրիայի մեջ կատարվող ամենակարևոր համակարգի (ՍՈՏԱ) համեմատ: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ԳԱԱՄԱ-ը փոխանցում է զրոյական նկարներ անտեսանելի իրական կյանքի և կարևոր ոլորտների վրա, քանի որ այն արտադրում է հարգալից արդյունք երկու հարգային նպատակների վրա' ԲիոԱՍՔ-ը և նորից ներկայացված CovidiQA տվյալների համակարգե", 'sq': "Sistemet NLP në shkallë industriale kërkojnë dy karakteristika. 1. Përaftësia: 'mësimi i transferit zero-shot' (ZSTL) duhet të jetë e lavdishme dhe 2. Efficiency: systems have to train efficiently and respond instantaneously.  In this paper, we introduce the development of a production model called GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) which possess the above two characteristics.  Për të qëndrueshmërinë, ajo stërvit në të dhënat e paraqitura kohët e fundit për pyetjet natyrore (NQ). NQ paraqet sfida shtesë lidhur me grupet e të dhënave të vjetra si SQuAD: (a) sistemet QA duhet të lexojnë dhe të kuptojnë një artikull të tërë të Wikipedias në vend të një kalimi të vogël dhe (b) NQ nuk vuan nga paragjykimet e vëzhgimit gjatë ndërtimit, që rezultojnë në më pak mbishtypje lexike midis pyetjes dhe artikullit. GAAMA përbëhet nga vëmendja mbi vëmendje, shumëllojshmëria midis kokave të vëmendjes, mësimi hierarkik i transferit dhe rritja e të dhënave sintetike ndërsa është e papërkushtueshme në llogari. Duke ndërtuar mbi model in e fuqishëm BERTQA, GAAMA ofron një nxitje absolutike prej 2.0% në F1 mbi sistemin më të lartë në shkallën e industrisë (SOTA) në NQ. Further, we show that GAAMA transfers zero-shot to unseen real life and important domains as it yields respectable performance on two benchmarks: the BioASQ and the newly introduced CovidQA datasets.", 'az': "NLP sistemləri industriya ölçüsü iki fərqli tələb edir. 1. Səfqətlilik: 0-shot transfer öyrənməsi (ZSTL) performansı təşəkkür edilməlidir və 2. Uğurluq: sistemlərin müvəffəqiyyətlə təhsil etməsi və dərhal cavab verməsi lazımdır. Bu kağızda, üstündə iki özellik sahibi olan GAAMA adlı ürək modelini təşkil edirik. Qüvvətli olaraq, o, son günlərdə təbiətli suallar (NQ) verilənlərin quruğuna tələb edir. NQ SQuAD kimi yaşlı verilən qurğular üzərində əlavə izah edir: a) QA sistemləri küçük bir keçiş yerinə b ütün Wikipedia məktubumunu oxumaq və anlamaq lazımdır, və b) NQ in şaat sırasında gözləmə bias ından üz çevirməz, bu da sual və məktubumun arasında daha az leşiklik çəkilməsi olar. GAAMA paylaşılıq aşağı dikkati, dikkati başlarından, hiyerarşik transfer öyrənməsindən və hesap edilməyən sintetik məlumatların artırmasındadır. Güclü BERTQA model in in üstündə in şa edilən, GAAMA NQ'deki industri ölçü-ölçü sanat sisteminin üstündə F1'də 2,0% absolut art ırma sağlar. Daha sonra, GAAMA həqiqət həyatı görməyə sıfır atışını və möhüm domenaları göstərir, çünki bu iki benchmarkta saygı göstərilən performansı verir: BioASQ və yeni CovidQA verilən qurğular.", 'am': "የግንኙነት-ሚዛን NLP ስርዓቶች ሁለት ምርጫዎች ያስፈልጋሉ። 1. ስህተት:'zero-shot transfer learning' (ZSTL) ስርዓት ምስጋና እና 2. ጥያቄ: ስርዓቶች በጥያቄ ማስተማርና ወዲያው ለመመልስ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የGAMA (GAAMA) የተባለውን የፍጥረት ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለልብስ፣ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን የአፍሪካዊ ጥያቄዎችን (NQ) ዳታ ማጠቃለያቸውን ያስተምራል፡፡ NQ እንደ SQuAD ያለ ሽማግሌ ዳታዎችን አቀናቅሎአል:(a) የQA ስርዓቶች በሙሉ Wikipedia ጽሑፍ ማነብ እና ማስተካከል ትልቅ ጉዳይ ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፤ እናም (b) NQ በመሠረቱ ጊዜ ከክፍለ ጉዳይ ክፍተት አይፈቀድላቸውም፡፡ GAAMA በቁጥጥር በተቃውሞ ተጨማሪነት፣ በአየር ራሶች መካከል የልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት፣ ተማሪ ትምህርት እና ተጨማሪ የዳታ አካባቢ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ በኃይለኛው BERTQA ሞዴል ላይ በመሠረት GAAMA በNQ ላይ የindustrial-scale-የ-art-ስርዓት (SOTA) ስርዓት ውስጥ የ. Further, we show that GAAMA transfers zero-shot to unseen real life and important domains as it yields respectable performance on two benchmarks: the BioASQ and the newly introduced CovidQA datasets.", 'bn': 'শিল্প-স্কেল এনএলপি সিস্টেম দুটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রয়োজন। ১. রোবাস্টনেস্ট: শুধু শিক্ষা শিক্ষা (জিস্টিএল) প্রদর্শনের প্রশংসা এবং ২। Efficiency: systems have to train efficiently and respond instantaneously.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি উৎপাদন মডেলের উন্নয়নের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যার নাম GAAMA (যাও আহেদ আমাকে যা জিজ্ঞেস করুন) যা উপরের দুটি চরিত্ সাম্প্রতিক প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্ন (এনকিউ) ডাটাসেটে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করে। এনকিউ পুরোনো ডাটাসেটের বিরুদ্ধে আরো চ্যালেঞ্জ প্রদান করেছে এসকুয়াডের মতো: (a) কিউএ সিস্টেম পুরো উইকিপিডিয়ার প্রবন্ধ পড়তে হবে এবং বুঝতে হবে একটি ছোট প্রবন্ধ, আর (b) নির্মাণের গ্যামামার অন্তর্ভুক্ত, মনোযোগ, হিয়েরাক্কিল পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা এবং সিন্টেটিক ডাটা যোগাযোগ করার সময় মনোযোগের বৈচিত্র্য। ক্ষমতাশালী বের্টিকিয়া মডেলের উপর নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে, জিএামা এনকিউ-এ শিল্প-পরিমাপ-শিল্প-শিল্প-শিল্প-শিল্প-শিল্পের অবস্থা (SOTA) সিস্টেমে ২. এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে গ্যাএমার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ জীবন এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ডোমেনের কাছে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুলি পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে যেহেতু এটি দুই বেনমার্ক', 'bs': 'NLP sustavi industrijske skale zahtijevaju dvije karakteristike. 1. Krasnost: "učenje prijenosa nule pucnjave" (ZSTL) mora biti pohvalno i 2. Efikasnost: sistemi moraju učinkovito trenirati i odmah odgovoriti. U ovom papiru predstavljamo razvoj model a proizvodnje koje se zove GAAMA (Go Forward Ask Me Anything) koji posjeduje dvije iznad karakteristike. Za pljačku, ona trenira na nedavno uvedenoj prirodnoj pitanju (NQ) dataset. NQ predstavlja dodatne izazove nad starijim podacima poput SQuAD: a) QA sistemi moraju čitati i shvatiti čitav članak Wikipedije umjesto malog prolaza, a b) NQ ne pati od pristrasnosti posmatranja tijekom konstrukcije, što rezultira manje leksičkog preklapanja između pitanja i članaka. GAAMA se sastoji od pažnje preko pažnje, raznolikosti među glavama pažnje, učenjem hijerarhijskog prijenosa i povećanja sintetičkih podataka dok je računalno nepošteno. Građeći na vrhu moćnog model a BERTQA, GAAMA pruža apsolutno povećanje u F1 od 2,0% na industrijskom stanju umjetnosti (SOTA) na NQ-u. Nadalje, pokazujemo da GAAMA prebacuje nulu šansu na nevidljive stvarne živote i važne domene jer pruža poštovane predstave na dva kritika: BioASQ i nove uvođene podatke CovidQA.', 'et': 'Tööstustasemel uue turuplaani süsteemid vajavad kahte omadust. 1. Vastupidavus: "null-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) tulemuslikkus peab olema kiiduväärt ja 2. Tõhusus: süsteemid peavad tõhusalt koolitama ja reageerima koheselt. Käesolevas töös tutvustame tootmismudeli arendamist nimega GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), millel on eespool nimetatud kaks omadust. Vastupidavuse tagamiseks treenib see hiljuti kasutusele võetud Natural Questions (NQ) andmekogumi. NQ tekitab täiendavaid probleeme vanemate andmekogumite, nagu SQuAD, suhtes: a) kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemid peavad lugema ja mõistma tervet Wikipedia artiklit, mitte väikest lõiku, ja b) NQ ei kannata konstruktsiooni ajal vaatluspärasuste tõttu, mis põhjustab vähem leksikaalset kattumist küsimuse ja artikli vahel. GAAMA koosneb tähelepanu üle tähelepanu, tähelepanu juhtide mitmekesisusest, hierarhilisest ülekandeõppest ja sünteetiliste andmete suurendamisest, olles arvutuslikult odav. Tuginedes võimsale BERTQA mudelile, pakub GAAMA 2,0% absoluutset tõusu F1 võrreldes tööstusharu tipptasemel (SOTA) süsteemiga NQ. Lisaks näitame, et GAAMA kannab null-shot nähtamatusse reaalsesse elusse ja olulistesse valdkondadesse, kuna see annab auväärse tulemuse kahel võrdlusnäitajal: BioASQ ja äsja kasutusele võetud CovidQA andmekogumidel.', 'fi': 'Teollisuuden laajuiset NLP-järjestelmät edellyttävät kahta ominaisuutta. 1. Kestävyys: "nollashotin siirtooppimisen" (ZSTL) suorituskyvyn on oltava kiitettävää ja 2. Tehokkuus: järjestelmien on harjoitettava tehokkaasti ja reagoitava välittömästi. Tässä työssä esittelemme tuotantomallin nimeltä GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), jolla on edellä mainitut kaksi ominaisuutta. Kestävyyttä ajatellen se harjoittelee hiljattain julkaistun Natural Questions (NQ) -datajoukon avulla. NQ asettaa lisähaasteita vanhemmille aineistoille, kuten SQuAD: lle: (a) laadunvarmistusjärjestelmien on luettava ja ymmärrettävä koko Wikipedia-artikkeli pienen kohdan sijaan, ja (b) NQ ei kärsi havainnointivääristymästä rakentamisen aikana, mikä vähentää kysymyksen ja artikkelin sanastollista päällekkäisyyttä. GAAMA koostuu huomiosta yli huomiosta, huomiopäiden erilaisuudesta, hierarkkisesta siirtooppimisesta ja synteettisen datan lisäämisestä laskennallisesti edullisesti. Tehokkaan BERTQA-mallin lisäksi GAAMA tarjoaa 2,0 prosentin absoluuttisen nousun F1:ssä verrattuna alan huipputekniikkaan (SOTA) -järjestelmään NQ:ssa. Lisäksi osoitamme, että GAAMA siirtää nollakuvan näkymättömille tosielämän ja tärkeille toimialoille, koska se tuottaa kunnioitettavaa suorituskykyä kahdella vertailuarvolla: BioASQ ja äskettäin käyttöön otetut CovidQA-aineistot.', 'cs': 'NLP systémy v průmyslovém měřítku vyžadují dvě funkce. 1. Robustnost: výkon "zero-shot transfer learning" (ZSTL) musí být chvályhodný a 2. Efektivita: systémy musí trénovat efektivně a okamžitě reagovat. V tomto článku představujeme vývoj výrobního modelu GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), který má výše uvedené dvě charakteristiky. Z důvodu robustnosti trénuje na nedávno zavedené datové sadě Natural Questions (NQ). NQ představuje další výzvy oproti starším datovým sadám, jako je SQuAD: (a) QA systémy potřebují číst a porozumět celému článku Wikipedie spíše než malé pasáži, a (b) NQ netrpí pozorovacím zaujatostí během konstrukce, což vede k menšímu lexikálnímu překrývání otázky a článku. GAAMA se skládá z pozornosti nad pozorností, rozmanitosti mezi hlavami pozornosti, hierarchického přenosu učení a syntetického rozšíření dat, přičemž je výpočetně levná. GAAMA, navazující na výkonný model BERTQA, poskytuje 2,0% absolutní zvýšení F1 ve srovnání s průmyslovým nejmodernějším systémem (SOTA) na NQ. Dále ukazujeme, že GAAMA přenáší nulový výstřel do neviditelného reálného života a důležitých domén, protože přináší respektovaný výkon na dvou benchmarkech: BioASQ a nově zavedených datových sadách CovidQA.', 'ca': "Industry-scale NLP systems necessitate two features.  1. Robustness: 'zero-shot transfer learning' (ZSTL) performance has to be commendable and 2.  Eficiència: els sistemes han de formar-se eficientment i respondre instantàniament. En aquest article, introduim el desenvolupament d'un model de producció anomenat GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) que posseeix les dues característiques anteriors. Per a la robustet, treina en el conjunt de dades de preguntes naturals (NQ) introduït recentment. NQ pose reptes adicionals sobre conjunts de dades antigues com SQuAD: a) els sistemes QA han de llegir i entendre un article complet de Wikipedia en comptes d'un petit passatge, i b) NQ no pateix bias d'observació durant la construcció, resultant en menys sovrapposició lèxica entre la pregunta i l'article. GAAMA consists of Attention-over-Attention, diversity among attention heads, hierarchical transfer learning, and synthetic data augmentation while being computationally inexpensive.  Building on top of the powerful BERTQA model, GAAMA provides a  2.0% absolute boost in F1 over the industry-scale state-of-the-art (SOTA) system on NQ.  També demostram que GAAMA transfereix fotografies zero a vides reals i dominys importants mentre produeix rendiment respectable en dos punts de referència: el BioASQ i els nou conjunts de dades CovidQA introduïts.", 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis 1. Ana ƙayyade in gyare-gyare da 2. Effekt: ana kamata in ƙidãya na'ura masu aiki da amfani mai kyau, kuma su karɓa guda. Ga wannan takardan, za mu ƙara ƙararin wata salon da ake kiran GAAAMA (Ka tafi kuma ka tambaye Ni duk abu) wanda ke da duk biyu na rubutu. @ info: whatsthis @ info GAAMA consists of Attention-over-Attention, diversity among attention heads, hierarchical transfer learning, and synthetic data augmentation while being computationally inexpensive.  Buning kan saman mai ƙarfin motsi na BERTQA, GAAMA yana da % 2.0% mai cikakken boost cikin F1 over the state-scale-of-the-art system on NQ. Furan, Munã nuna GAAMA ana shige sifo-shot zuwa gafake rãyuwa halinsa da masu muhimu domin ta zo da gyãra mai kyau a kan manyan bangon biyu: BioAQ da na yanzu wanda ya fara na tsarin coveridQA.", 'jv': 'NLP sistem Sampeyan kang dipunanggé perintah sing dibutuhke 1. AllProgressBar Saiki: sistem kudu luwih diolah ngono cah-cah dumadhi. Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé nggawe ngubah akeh lanjut model sing nganggo gambar gambar gawe (Go Ahinstead "question Me Anything" sing apik dhéwé) iki dadi apik dhéwé karcisa sing apik dhéwé. Punika awak dhéwé, laku luwih-luwih dumaten ning dataset Pribadhakan (NK). Nq mituhke perbudhakan dumadhi kanggo dataset sing gak kalendar, kaya: a) sistem XA kudu ngebasa lan soko akeh podho akeh winipediya sing sembarang kelas, lan b) Nq kuwi dianggapiye kanggo ngilanggar bias penting nggawe , iso nggawe akeh langgar ngesiku langgar sampek winih lan artiklo iso nggawe GamA sing sembaran Attentive-Along-Attentive, ngregani dipatensi mulalah menehi, akeh-arhiki kuwi nggambar kelangan, lan akeh-akeh sistem data ampungan sampeyan pasar tentang gak ingkang sampeyan. Iyo nggawe barang akeh sistem sing luwih nggawe BERT qA, gamANA ngewehke sistem 2.0% kang dipunangé kapan tanggal F1 banjur sistem sing perusahaan-kalih lan diangkat-perusahaan (soko iso diangkat sabanjur) na Nq. Nambah, kita ngomongke bakal kelas gawe barang kelas telu nggawe barang bakal dumadhi iki dadi sing nyimpen winih lan barang dumadhi iki: The BiASq lan dataset CoVideo', 'sk': 'Industrijski sistemi NLP zahtevajo dve značilnosti. 1. Robustnost: zmogljivost "brezposelnega prenosnega učenja" (ZSTL) mora biti hvaležna in 2. Učinkovitost: sistemi morajo učinkovito usposabljati in se takoj odzvati. V prispevku predstavljamo razvoj proizvodnega modela GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything), ki ima zgoraj navedeni dve značilnosti. Za robustnost se trenira na nedavno uvedenem naboru podatkov naravnih vprašanj (NQ). NQ predstavlja dodatne izzive glede starejših naborov podatkov, kot je SQuAD: (a) sistemi za zagotavljanje kakovosti morajo brati in razumeti celoten Wikipedijski članek namesto majhnega odlomka, in (b) NQ med gradnjo ne trpi zaradi pristranskosti opazovanja, kar povzroča manj leksikalnega prekrivanja med vprašanjem in člankom. GAAMA je sestavljen iz pozornosti nad pozornostjo, raznolikosti med glavami pozornosti, hierarhičnega učenja prenosa in povečanja sintetičnih podatkov, medtem ko je računalniško poceni. GAAMA, ki temelji na zmogljivem modelu BERTQA, zagotavlja 2,0-odstotno absolutno povečanje F1 v primerjavi z najsodobnejšim sistemom (SOTA) na NQ. Poleg tega pokažemo, da GAAMA prenaša ničelni posnetek na nevidna realna in pomembna področja, saj zagotavlja ugledno učinkovitost na dveh referenčnih merilih: BioASQ in na novo uvedenih naborih podatkov CovidQA.', 'he': 'Industry-scale NLP systems necessitate two features.  1. חזקות: "לימוד העברה אפס-יריות" (ZSTL) ביצועים חייבים להיות מכובדים ושניים. יעילות: מערכות צריכות להתאמן בצורה יעילה ולהגיב מיידית. In this paper, we introduce the development of a production model called GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything) which possess the above two characteristics.  למען החזקה, הוא מתאמן על קבוצת נתונים של שאלות טבעיות (NQ) שהציגה לאחרונה. NQ מציב אתגרים נוספים על קבוצות נתונים ישנות כמו SQuAD: (a) מערכות QA צריכות לקרוא ולהבין מאמר שלם בוויקיפדיה במקום מעבר קטן, ו (b) NQ לא סובלת ממחיות צפייה במהלך הבנייה, מה שהוביל להכפילה פחות לקסית בין השאלה והמאמר. GAAMA כולל תשומת לב מעל תשומת לב, מגוון בין ראשי תשומת לב, לימוד העברה היררכית, וגדלת נתונים סינטטיים בזמן שהיא לא יקרה מחשב. בניין על מודל BERTQA החזק, GAAMA מספק דחיפה מוחלטת ב-2.0% ב-F1 על מערכת התעשייה המיוחדת (SOTA) במערכת NQ. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מראים שGAAMA מעביר אפס-ירי לחיים אמיתיים בלתי נראים ומשטחים חשובים כפי שהוא נותן ביצועים מכובדים בשני רמזים: BioASQ והקבוצות הנתונים החדשות המוציאות CovidQA.', 'bo': "ས Industry-scale NLP system requires two features. 1. Robustness: 'zero-shot transfer learning' (ZSTL) performance must be commendable and 2. ནུས་པ་ཡིན། མ་ལག་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇགས་ཅན་ལ་གཙོ་ཅན་དུ་འགྲོ་དགོས་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་GAAMA (Go Ahead Ask Me Anything)ཟིན་བྲིས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་རྩལ་སྒྲིག་ཅིག་སྟོན་འདུག སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྔོན་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་གནད་སྡུད་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་གི་ཡོད། NQ poses additional challenges over older datasets like SQuAD: (a) QA systems need to read and comprehend an entire Wikipedia article rather than a small passage, and (b) NQ does not suffer from observation bias during construction, resulting in less lexical overlap between the question and the article. GAAMA consists of Attention-over-Attention, diversity among attention heads, hierarchical transfer learning, and synthetic data augmentation while being computationally inexpensive. Building on top of the powerful BERTQA model, GAAMA provides a “ 2.0% absolute boost in F1 over the industry-scale state-of-the-art (SOTA) system on NQ. འོན་ཀྱང་། GAAMA གིས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་འཚོ་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་མངོན་གསལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གཉིས་ཀ"}
{'en': 'Learning Domain Terms-Empirical Methods to Enhance Enterprise Text Analytics Performance', 'ar': 'مصطلحات مجال التعلم - الطرق التجريبية لتحسين أداء تحليلات نصوص المؤسسة', 'pt': 'Termos do Domínio de Aprendizagem - Métodos Empíricos para Melhorar o Desempenho da Análise de Texto Corporativo', 'es': 'Términos de dominio de aprendizaje: métodos empíricos para mejorar el rendimiento del análisis de textos empresariales', 'fr': "Learning Domain Terms - Méthodes empiriques pour améliorer les performances de l'analyse de texte d'entreprise", 'ja': '学習ドメイン用語-エンタープライズテキストアナリティクスのパフォーマンスを向上させるための実証的な方法', 'zh': '学域术语 - 增强企业文本析性之术', 'hi': 'डोमेन शर्तें सीखना - एंटरप्राइज़ टेक्स्ट Analytics प्रदर्शन को बढ़ाने के लिए अनुभवजन्य तरीके', 'ru': 'Термины области обучения - эмпирические методы повышения производительности корпоративной текстовой аналитики', 'ga': 'Téarmaí Fearainn Foghlama - Modhanna Eimpíreacha chun Feidhmíocht Anailísíochta Téacs Fiontraíochta a Fheabhsú', 'ka': 'დიომენის ტერმისტის სწავლება - ემპერიკალური მეტისტი ტექსტის ანალიტიკის პერფორმაციაName', 'el': 'Εμπειρικές μέθοδοι για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης ανάλυσης κειμένου σε επιχειρήσεις', 'hu': 'Tartományi kifejezések tanulása - Empirikus módszerek a vállalati szövegelemzés teljesítményének javítására', 'it': 'Imparare i termini del dominio - Metodi empirici per migliorare le prestazioni di analisi del testo aziendale', 'kk': 'Домен терминлерін үйрену - Enterprise мәтін аналитикалық істеу үшін империялық әдістер', 'lt': 'Mokymosi srities sąlygos – empiriniai metodai, kaip gerinti įmonių teksto analizės rezultatus', 'mk': 'Учење на термини на домен - империски методи за подобрување на текставната аналитичка перформанса на претпријатието', 'ms': 'Terma Domain Belajar - Kaedah Empirikal untuk meningkatkan Performance Analytics Teks Perusahaan', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു- എമിരിക്കല്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d എന്റര്\u200dപ്രൈസ് പദാവലിയുടെ പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രകൃതിയെ വളര', 'mt': "Termini ta' Domain Tagħlim - Metodi Empiriċi għat-Titjib tal-Prestazzjoni Analitika tat-Test tal-Intrapriża", 'mn': 'Домены томъёог сурах - Энтерпрайз Текст анализ үйлдвэрлэлийг нэмэгдүүлэх эзэмшигтэй арга', 'pl': 'Nauka terminów domenowych – metody empiryczne zwiększające wydajność analizy tekstu w przedsiębiorstwie', 'sr': 'Naučenje termina domena - Empirički metodi za poboljšanje proizvodnje analitike teksta poduzeća', 'ro': 'Învățarea termenilor domeniului - Metode empirice pentru îmbunătățirea performanței analizei textului întreprinderii', 'no': 'Læring av domeneterminar – Empirical Methods to Enhance Enterprise Text Analytics Performance', 'si': 'ඩොමේන් අවධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න - ඉන්ධානය පාළුව විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය විශාලනය කරන්න අධ්\u200dයාත්මක වි', 'so': 'Waxbarashada jardiinada Domain - Methods Empirical to enhancement text analytics', 'sv': 'Lär dig domäntermer - Empiriska metoder för att förbättra företagets textanalysprestanda', 'ta': 'டொமைன் முறைகளை கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது - விளையாட்டு உரை ஆராய்வு செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரிக்க முறைகள்', 'ur': 'ڈومین ٹریموں کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے - انٹرپرائز ٹیکس ٹیکس ٹیکس آنلیٹیکس پرورفورمنس کو زیادہ زیادہ کرنے کے لئے امپریکل طریقے', 'vi': 'Học về miền ký tên - Những phương pháp Empirical to improve Văn bản Enterprise Analytic performance', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Условия за обучение на домейн - емпирични методи за подобряване на ефективността на корпоративния текстов анализ', 'hr': 'Naučenje termina domena - Empirički metodi za poboljšanje proizvodnje analitike teksta poduzeća', 'nl': 'Leren van domeintermen: empirische methoden om de prestaties van zakelijke tekstanalyse te verbeteren', 'id': 'Mempelajari Terma Domain - Metode Kekaisaran untuk meningkatkan Performasi Analisis Teks Perusahaan', 'da': 'Læring af domænenavne - Empiriske metoder til at forbedre virksomhedens tekstanalysesydelse', 'de': 'Lernen von Domänenbegriffen – empirische Methoden zur Verbesserung der Leistung von Enterprise Text Analytics', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Tamko za Domain - njia za Uwezeshaji Kuboresha Utafiti wa Uchambuzi', 'ko': '학습 분야 용어 - 기업 텍스트 분석 성능 향상의 실증 방법', 'tr': 'Saýlaw Sözleri öwrenmek - Wagtlaýyn Metin Analytika Görkezilişini Arttmak üçin Wagtlaýyn Metini', 'af': 'Leer Domeintermine - Empirical Methods to enhance Enterprise Text Analytics Performance', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن Terms Domain - Methods Empirical to enhance Enterprise Text Analytics Performance', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Terminave të Domenit - Metoda Imperiale për të përmirësuar Performancën e Analizës Tekstike të Ndërmarrjeve', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Սովորեցնել դաշտային տերմիններ - Իմպրիկական մեթոդներ, որոնք օգնում են բարելավել ընկերության տեքստի վերլուծության արդյունքը', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন টার্ম শিক্ষা দেওয়া হচ্ছে - ইমারিক্যাল পদ্ধতি এন্টারপ্রাইজ টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য', 'az': 'Domain Terml…ôrini √∂yr…ônm…ôk - Enterprise Metin Analytics Performance Enhanced Methods', 'bs': 'Naučenje termina domena - Empirički metodi za poboljšanje provedbe analitike teksta poduzeća', 'cs': 'Výuka doménových termínů – empirické metody pro zlepšení výkonu podnikové textové analýzy', 'et': 'Õppedomeeni terminid - empiirilised meetodid ettevõtte tekstianalüüsi jõudluse parandamiseks', 'fi': 'Oppimisverkkotunnuksen termit - Empiiriset menetelmät yrityksen tekstianalyysin suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi', 'ca': "Termes d'aprenentatge de domini - Métodes empírics per millorar el rendiment analític del text de l'empresa", 'jv': 'Learning domain terms - empircal Methods to ENhancement', 'ha': 'Learning Domain Terms - Empirical Methods to Enhance Enterprise Text Analytics Performance', 'sk': 'Izrazi domene učenja – empirične metode za izboljšanje učinkovitosti besedilne analize podjetja', 'he': 'מונחי השטח ללמוד', 'bo': 'Learning Domain Terms - Empirical Methods to Enhance Enterprise Text Analytics Performance'}
{'en': 'Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy. These algorithms also do not work well on enterprise data which has a very different nature from News repositories, storybooks or Wikipedia data. Text cleaning is a mandatory step which aims at noise removal and correction to improve performance. However, enterprise data need special cleaning methods since it contains many domain terms which appear to be noise against a standard dictionary, but in reality are not so. In this work we present detailed analysis of characteristics of enterprise data and suggest unsupervised methods for cleaning these repositories after domain terms have been automatically segregated from true noise terms. Noise terms are thereafter corrected in a contextual fashion. The effectiveness of the method is established through careful manual evaluation of error corrections over several standard data sets, including those available for hate speech detection, where there is deliberate distortion to avoid detection. We also share results to show enhancement in classification accuracy after noise correction.', 'ar': 'من المعروف أن أداء خوارزميات تحليلات النص القياسية يتدهور إلى حد كبير على البيانات التي ينشئها المستهلك ، والتي غالبًا ما تكون صاخبة جدًا. لا تعمل هذه الخوارزميات أيضًا بشكل جيد على بيانات المؤسسة التي لها طبيعة مختلفة تمامًا عن مستودعات الأخبار أو كتب القصص أو بيانات ويكيبيديا. يعد تنظيف النص خطوة إلزامية تهدف إلى إزالة الضوضاء وتصحيحها لتحسين الأداء. ومع ذلك ، تحتاج بيانات المؤسسة إلى طرق تنظيف خاصة لأنها تحتوي على العديد من مصطلحات المجال التي يبدو أنها تشويش ضد القاموس القياسي ، ولكنها في الواقع ليست كذلك. في هذا العمل ، نقدم تحليلًا تفصيليًا لخصائص بيانات المؤسسة ونقترح طرقًا غير خاضعة للإشراف لتنظيف هذه المستودعات بعد فصل شروط المجال تلقائيًا عن شروط الضوضاء الحقيقية. يتم بعد ذلك تصحيح شروط الضوضاء بطريقة سياقية. يتم تحديد فعالية الطريقة من خلال التقييم اليدوي الدقيق لتصحيحات الأخطاء عبر العديد من مجموعات البيانات القياسية ، بما في ذلك تلك المتوفرة للكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية ، حيث يوجد تشويه متعمد لتجنب اكتشافه. نشارك أيضًا النتائج لإظهار التحسين في دقة التصنيف بعد تصحيح الضوضاء.', 'es': 'Se sabe que el rendimiento de los algoritmos de análisis de texto estándar se degrada sustancialmente en los datos generados por los consumidores, que a menudo son muy ruidosos. Estos algoritmos tampoco funcionan bien en datos empresariales que tienen una naturaleza muy diferente a la de los repositorios de noticias, los libros de cuentos o los datos de Wikipedia. La limpieza de textos es un paso obligatorio que tiene como objetivo eliminar y corregir el ruido para mejorar el rendimiento. Sin embargo, los datos empresariales necesitan métodos de limpieza especiales, ya que contienen muchos términos de dominio que parecen ser molestos en comparación con un diccionario estándar, pero en realidad no lo son. En este trabajo presentamos un análisis detallado de las características de los datos empresariales y sugerimos métodos no supervisados para limpiar estos repositorios después de que los términos de dominio se hayan segregado automáticamente de los términos de ruido real. Los términos de ruido se corrigen posteriormente de forma contextual. La eficacia del método se establece mediante una cuidadosa evaluación manual de las correcciones de errores en varios conjuntos de datos estándar, incluidos los disponibles para la detección del discurso de odio, donde hay una distorsión deliberada para evitar la detección. También compartimos los resultados para mostrar una mejora en la precisión de la clasificación después de la corrección del ruido.', 'pt': 'O desempenho dos algoritmos de análise de texto padrão é conhecido por ser substancialmente degradado nos dados gerados pelo consumidor, que geralmente são muito barulhentos. Esses algoritmos também não funcionam bem em dados corporativos que têm uma natureza muito diferente dos repositórios de notícias, livros de histórias ou dados da Wikipedia. A limpeza de texto é uma etapa obrigatória que visa a remoção e correção de ruído para melhorar o desempenho. No entanto, os dados corporativos precisam de métodos de limpeza especiais, pois contêm muitos termos de domínio que parecem ser ruídos em relação a um dicionário padrão, mas na realidade não são. Neste trabalho apresentamos uma análise detalhada das características dos dados corporativos e sugerimos métodos não supervisionados para limpeza desses repositórios após termos de domínio serem automaticamente segregados de termos de ruído verdadeiro. Os termos de ruído são posteriormente corrigidos de forma contextual. A eficácia do método é estabelecida por meio de uma cuidadosa avaliação manual de correções de erros em vários conjuntos de dados padrão, incluindo aqueles disponíveis para detecção de discurso de ódio, onde há distorção deliberada para evitar a detecção. Também compartilhamos resultados para mostrar o aprimoramento na precisão da classificação após a correção do ruído.', 'fr': "Les performances des algorithmes d'analyse de texte standard sont connues pour être considérablement dégradées sur les données générées par les consommateurs, qui sont souvent très bruyantes. Ces algorithmes ne fonctionnent pas non plus bien sur les données d'entreprise qui sont de nature très différente des référentiels d'actualités, des livres de contes ou des données Wikipédia. Le nettoyage du texte est une étape obligatoire qui vise à éliminer et à corriger le bruit afin d'améliorer les performances. Cependant, les données d'entreprise nécessitent des méthodes de nettoyage spéciales car elles contiennent de nombreux termes de domaine qui semblent être du bruit par rapport à un dictionnaire standard, mais qui ne le sont pas en réalité. Dans ce travail, nous présentons une analyse détaillée des caractéristiques des données d'entreprise et suggérons des méthodes non supervisées pour nettoyer ces référentiels après que les termes de domaine ont été automatiquement séparés des termes de bruit réel. Les termes de bruit sont ensuite corrigés de manière contextuelle. L'efficacité de la méthode est établie par une évaluation manuelle minutieuse des corrections d'erreurs sur plusieurs ensembles de données standard, y compris ceux disponibles pour la détection des discours haineux, lorsqu'il existe une distorsion délibérée pour éviter la détection. Nous partageons également les résultats pour montrer l'amélioration de la précision de la classification après la correction du bruit.", 'ja': '標準的なテキスト分析アルゴリズムのパフォーマンスは、多くの場合、非常にノイズの多い消費者生成データ上で実質的に低下することが知られている。 これらのアルゴリズムは、ニュースレポジトリ、ストーリーブック、またはウィキペディアデータとは全く異なる性質を持つエンタープライズデータでもうまく機能しません。 テキストクリーニングは、パフォーマンスを向上させるためのノイズ除去と補正を目的とした必須ステップです。 しかし、エンタープライズデータには、標準の辞書に対してノイズがあるように見える多くのドメイン用語が含まれているため、特別なクリーニング方法が必要ですが、実際にはそうではありません。 この作業では、エンタープライズデータの特性の詳細な分析を提示し、ドメイン用語が真のノイズ用語から自動的に分離された後に、これらのリポジトリをクリーニングするための監督されていない方法を提案します。 ノイズ用語はその後、文脈的に修正される。 この方法の有効性は、検出を回避するために意図的な歪みがあるヘイトスピーチ検出に利用可能なものを含む、いくつかの標準データセットにわたるエラー修正の慎重な手動評価によって確立される。 また、ノイズ補正後の分類精度の向上を示す結果も共有しています。', 'zh': '凡所周知,准文析算法性能于消费者生之数大大降低,其数常嘈杂。 此算法亦不能善处企业数,此企业数与新闻存储库,故事书或维基百科数性殊异。 文本清强制性步骤,旨在消正噪音以崇性能。 然企业数须清法,以其多包域术语,术语似干于准字典,而实不然也。 于是供企业数之详细分析,而言于域术语与真噪声术语自离而清其存储库者无监督之法。 其后噪声术语将以上下文校正之。 其有效性以数集(包于仇言检测之数集)纠错审手动评定之,其有故失真以免检测。 分而分之,以见噪声校之精也。', 'hi': 'मानक पाठ विश्लेषिकी एल्गोरिदम के प्रदर्शन को उपभोक्ता उत्पन्न डेटा पर काफी हद तक नीचा दिखाया जाता है, जो अक्सर बहुत शोर करते हैं। ये एल्गोरिदम एंटरप्राइज़ डेटा पर भी अच्छी तरह से काम नहीं करते हैं, जिसकी प्रकृति समाचार भंडार, स्टोरीबुक या विकिपीडिया डेटा से बहुत अलग है। पाठ सफाई एक अनिवार्य कदम है जिसका उद्देश्य प्रदर्शन में सुधार के लिए शोर हटाने और सुधार करना है। हालांकि, एंटरप्राइज़ डेटा को विशेष सफाई विधियों की आवश्यकता होती है क्योंकि इसमें कई डोमेन शब्द होते हैं जो मानक शब्दकोश के खिलाफ शोर प्रतीत होते हैं, लेकिन वास्तव में ऐसा नहीं है। इस काम में हम एंटरप्राइज़ डेटा की विशेषताओं का विस्तृत विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं और डोमेन शर्तों को स्वचालित रूप से सही शोर शब्दों से अलग करने के बाद इन रिपॉजिटरीज़ को साफ करने के लिए असुरक्षित तरीकों का सुझाव देते हैं। शोर शब्दों को इसके बाद एक प्रासंगिक फैशन में सही किया जाता है। विधि की प्रभावशीलता कई मानक डेटा सेटों पर त्रुटि सुधारों के सावधानीपूर्वक मैनुअल मूल्यांकन के माध्यम से स्थापित की जाती है, जिसमें हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए उपलब्ध हैं, जहां पता लगाने से बचने के लिए जानबूझकर विरूपण होता है। हम शोर सुधार के बाद वर्गीकरण सटीकता में वृद्धि दिखाने के लिए परिणाम भी साझा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Производительность стандартных алгоритмов текстовой аналитики, как известно, существенно ухудшается на данных, генерируемых потребителями, которые часто очень шумны. Эти алгоритмы также плохо работают с корпоративными данными, которые имеют очень отличный характер от репозиториев новостей, книг рассказов или данных Википедии. Очистка текста является обязательным этапом, направленным на устранение и коррекцию шума для повышения производительности. Однако корпоративные данные нуждаются в специальных методах очистки, поскольку они содержат много доменных терминов, которые, как представляется, являются помехами для стандартного словаря, но на самом деле не являются таковыми. В данной работе мы представляем подробный анализ характеристик корпоративных данных и предлагаем неконтролируемые методы очистки этих репозиториев после автоматического отделения доменных терминов от истинных шумовых терминов. После этого термины шума корректируются в контекстной манере. Эффективность метода устанавливается путем тщательной ручной оценки исправлений ошибок по нескольким стандартным наборам данных, включая те, которые доступны для обнаружения ненавистнических высказываний, где есть преднамеренное искажение, чтобы избежать обнаружения. Мы также делимся результатами, чтобы показать повышение точности классификации после коррекции шума.', 'ga': "Is eol go ndéantar feidhmíocht na n-algartam caighdeánach anailíse téacs a dhíghrádú go mór ar shonraí arna nginiúint ag tomhaltóirí, sonraí a bhíonn an-fhuaimneach go minic. Ní oibríonn na halgartaim seo go maith freisin ar shonraí fiontair a bhfuil nádúr an-difriúil acu ó stórtha Nuachta, leabhair scéalta nó sonraí Vicipéid. Is céim éigeantach é glanadh téacs a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige torann a bhaint agus a cheartú chun feidhmíocht a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, tá gá le modhanna glantacháin speisialta ó shonraí fiontair ós rud é go bhfuil go leor téarmaí fearainn ann ar dealraitheach gur torann iad in aghaidh foclóir caighdeánach, ach ní hamhlaidh atá i ndáiríre. San obair seo cuirimid i láthair anailís mhionsonraithe ar shaintréithe sonraí an fhiontair agus molaimid modhanna neamh-mhaoirsithe chun na stórtha sin a ghlanadh tar éis téarmaí fearainn a bheith deighilte go huathoibríoch ó théarmaí fíor torainn. Ceartaítear téarmaí torainn ina dhiaidh sin ar bhealach comhthéacsúil. Socraítear éifeachtacht an mhodha trí mheastóireacht chúramach láimhe a dhéanamh ar cheartuithe earráide thar roinnt tacair sonraí caighdeánacha, lena n-áirítear iad siúd atá ar fáil chun fuathchaint a bhrath, nuair a dhéantar saobhadh d'aon ghnó chun brath a sheachaint. Roinnimid torthaí freisin chun feabhas a chur ar chruinneas aicmithe tar éis ceartú torainn a thaispeáint.", 'el': 'Η απόδοση των τυποποιημένων αλγόριθμων ανάλυσης κειμένου είναι γνωστό ότι υποβαθμίζεται σημαντικά στα δεδομένα που παράγονται από τους καταναλωτές, τα οποία συχνά είναι πολύ θορυβώδη. Αυτοί οι αλγόριθμοι επίσης δεν λειτουργούν καλά σε εταιρικά δεδομένα που έχουν πολύ διαφορετική φύση από τα αποθετήρια ειδήσεων, τα παραμύθια ή τα δεδομένα της Βικιπαίδειας. Ο καθαρισμός κειμένου είναι ένα υποχρεωτικό βήμα που στοχεύει στην απομάκρυνση και διόρθωση θορύβου για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης. Ωστόσο, τα εταιρικά δεδομένα χρειάζονται ειδικές μεθόδους καθαρισμού δεδομένου ότι περιέχουν πολλούς όρους τομέα οι οποίοι φαίνεται να είναι θόρυβος έναντι ενός τυποποιημένου λεξικού, αλλά στην πραγματικότητα δεν είναι έτσι. Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε λεπτομερή ανάλυση των χαρακτηριστικών των εταιρικών δεδομένων και προτείνουμε μεθόδους χωρίς επίβλεψη για τον καθαρισμό αυτών των αποθετηρίων αφού οι όροι τομέα έχουν χωριστεί αυτόματα από τους πραγματικούς όρους θορύβου. Στη συνέχεια, οι όροι θορύβου διορθώνονται με τρόπο περιβάλλοντος. Η αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου αποδεικνύεται μέσω προσεκτικής χειροκίνητης αξιολόγησης διορθώσεων σφαλμάτων σε διάφορα τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων εκείνων που διατίθενται για την ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους, όπου υπάρχει σκόπιμη παραμόρφωση για την αποφυγή ανίχνευσης. Μοιραζόμαστε επίσης τα αποτελέσματα για να δείξουμε βελτίωση στην ακρίβεια ταξινόμησης μετά τη διόρθωση θορύβου.', 'hu': 'A szabványos szövegelemzési algoritmusok teljesítménye ismert, hogy jelentősen romlik a fogyasztók által generált adatok, amelyek gyakran nagyon zajosak. Ezek az algoritmusok nem működnek jól a vállalati adatokon, amelyek nagyon eltérnek a Hírek adattáraitól, történetkönyvektől vagy a Wikipédia adataitól. A szövegtisztítás kötelező lépés, amely a zaj eltávolítására és a teljesítmény javítására irányul. A vállalati adatoknak azonban speciális tisztítási módszerekre van szükségük, mivel számos olyan domain kifejezést tartalmaznak, amelyek zajnak tűnnek egy szabványos szótárhoz képest, de valójában nem így van. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk a vállalati adatok jellemzőinek részletes elemzését és felügyelet nélküli módszereket javasolunk ezeknek az adattáraknak a tisztítására, miután a domain kifejezéseket automatikusan elkülönítették a valódi zaj kifejezésektől. A zaj kifejezéseit ezt követően kontextuális módon korrigálják. A módszer hatékonyságát a hibajavítások gondos manuális értékelésével állapítják meg több szabványos adatkészleten, beleértve a gyűlöletbeszéd észlelésére rendelkezésre álló adatkészleteket is, ahol az észlelés elkerülése érdekében szándékos torzítás történik. Olyan eredményeket is megosztunk, amelyek a zajkorrekció utáni osztályozási pontosság javítását mutatják.', 'ka': 'სტანდარტური ტექსტის ანალიტიკის ალგორიტიმების პროფორმაცია იცის, რომ მომხმარებელი განვითარებული მონაცემებზე მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ბუნ ეს ალგორიტიმები ასევე არ მუშაობს სამუშაო მონაცემებისთვის, რომელიც ახალგაზომის რეპოზიტორიებიდან ძალიან განსხვავებული ნათვის, ისტორიების ბუკებიდან ან ვიკ ტექსტის წაშლა არის საჭირო მონაცემები, რომელიც მიზეზიან სიტყვების წაშლა და დაწყვება, რომელიც გამოსახულება. მაგრამ, სამუშაო მონაცემები უნდა სპეციალური წაშლა მეტისთვის, რადგან სამუშაო დემომინის სიტყვებისთვის, რომლებიც გამოიყურება სტანდარტული სიტ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ სამუშაო მონაცემების განსაზღვრებული ანალიზაციის განსაზღვრებულებები და მოგვეყვანეთ არ განსაზღვრებული მეტოვები ამ რეპოზიტორიების წაშლად, როდესაც დემომინი შემდეგ კონტექსტური სიტყვების შემდეგ კონტექსტური მოდით. მეტის ეფექტიკურობა მოქმედება მხოლოდ შეცდომის კონფიგურაციების მანძილური შესახებით, რამდენიმე სტანდარტული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შესახებით, შესახებით მომხმარებელი ჩვენ ასევე გავამყოფთ შედეგი, რომ კლასიფიკაციის წესიერებაში უფრო მეტივად გავიჩვენოთ კონფიკაციის წესიერებაში, როდესაც კონფიკაციის წე', 'it': "Le prestazioni degli algoritmi standard di analisi del testo sono note per essere sostanzialmente degradate sui dati generati dai consumatori, che sono spesso molto rumorosi. Questi algoritmi inoltre non funzionano bene su dati aziendali che hanno una natura molto diversa da repository di notizie, storybook o dati Wikipedia. La pulizia del testo è una fase obbligatoria che mira alla rimozione e alla correzione del rumore per migliorare le prestazioni. Tuttavia, i dati aziendali richiedono metodi di pulizia speciali poiché contengono molti termini di dominio che sembrano essere rumore rispetto a un dizionario standard, ma in realtà non lo sono. In questo lavoro presentiamo un'analisi dettagliata delle caratteristiche dei dati aziendali e proponiamo metodi non supervisionati per pulire questi repository dopo che i termini di dominio sono stati automaticamente separati dai termini di rumore vero. I termini di rumore vengono successivamente corretti contestualmente. L'efficacia del metodo è stabilita attraverso un'attenta valutazione manuale delle correzioni di errore su diversi set di dati standard, compresi quelli disponibili per il rilevamento del discorso d'odio, dove vi è una distorsione deliberata per evitare il rilevamento. Condividiamo anche i risultati per mostrare il miglioramento della precisione di classificazione dopo la correzione del rumore.", 'kk': 'Стандартты мәтін аналитикалық алгоритмдері пайдаланушылардың құрылған деректеріне көп деградицияланған деп белгілейді, бұл көп дыбыс болады. Бұл алгоритмдер сондай-ақ жаңалық репозиториялар, журналдар кітапшалары немесе Википедия деректерінен бірнеше табиғатты жұмыс істемейді. Мәтінді тазалау - жұмыс істеу үшін дыбыс өшіруге және түзетуге мақсат етілген қадам. Бірақ, бизнес деректері стандартты сөздік сөздігіне қарсы дыбыс болып тұрған, бірақ шындығында бұл жоқ. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бизнес деректерінің қасиеттерін егжей- тегжейлі анализ таңдап, доменнің терминдері автоматты түрде дыбыс терминдерден бөлінгеннен кейін, бұл репозиторилерді тазалау әдістерін таңдап Содан кейін дыбыс шарттары контексті модейде түзетіледі. Әдісінің эффектілігі бірнеше стандартты деректер жиында қателерді түзету бағдарламасын қолмен оқу арқылы құрылады, сондай-ақ мұндай сөйлемелерді анықтау үшін қолданылады, оларды анықтау үшін мәселе Біз сондай-ақ дыбыс түзетуден кейін классификациясының дұрыстығын көрсету үшін нәтижелерін бөліп тұрамыз.', 'lt': 'Žinoma, kad standartinių teksto analizės algoritmų rezultatai vartotojų gautais duomenimis labai blogėja, o dažnai labai triukšmingi. Šie algoritmai taip pat neveikia įmonių duomenų, kurie yra labai skirtingi nuo naujienų saugyklų, istorijų knygų ar Wikipedia duomenų, pobūdžio. Tekstų valymas yra privalomas žingsnis, kurio tikslas – pašalinti ir koreguoti triukšmą siekiant pagerinti veiksmingumą. Tačiau verslo duomenims reikia specialių valymo metodų, nes jame yra daug srities terminų, kurie, atrodo, yra triukšmas standartiniame žodyne, tačiau iš tikrųjų nėra. Šiame darbe pristatome išsamią įmonių duomenų charakteristikų analizę ir siūlome nepastebimus šių duomenų saugyklų valymo metodus, kai domeno terminai automatiškai atskiriami nuo tikrų triukšmo terminų. Po to triukšmo terminai koreguojami kontekstiniu būdu. Metodo veiksmingumas nustatomas kruopščiai rankiniu kelių standartinių duomenų rinkinių klaidų koregavimo vertinimu, įskaitant tuos, kurie yra prieinami neapykantos kalbos aptikimui, kai yra sąmoningas iškraipymas siekiant išvengti aptikimo. Mes taip pat dalijamės rezultatais, kad po triukšmo koregavimo būtų įrodytas klasifikacijos tikslumo didinimas.', 'mk': 'Извршувањето на алгоритмите за стандардна текстова анализа се познати дека значително се деградирани на податоците генерирани од потрошувачите, кои честопати се многу шумни. Овие алгоритми, исто така, не функционираат добро на податоците на претпријатијата кои имаат многу различна природа од резервоарите за вести, книгите за приказни или податоците на Википедија. Исчистувањето на текстот е обврзан чекор кој има за цел отстранување и корекција на бучава за подобрување на резултатите. However, enterprise data need special cleaning methods since it contains many domain terms which appear to be noise against a standard dictionary, but in reality are not so.  Во оваа работа претставуваме детална анализа на карактеристиките на податоците на претпријатието и предлагаме ненадгледувани методи за чистење на овие резервоари откако термините на доменот се автоматски одделени од вистинските временски термини. Потоа времето за шума се коригира на контекстен начин. Ефикасноста на методот се утврдува преку внимателна рачна проценка на корекциите на грешките во врска со неколку стандардни податоци, вклучително и оние достапни за детекција на говорот на омраза, каде што постои намерно искоренување за да се избегне детекција. Исто така, споделуваме резултати за да покажеме подобрување на прецизноста на класификацијата по корекцијата на бучавата.', 'ms': 'Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy. Algoritma ini juga tidak berfungsi dengan baik pada data syarikat yang mempunyai sifat yang sangat berbeza dari repositori berita, buku cerita atau data Wikipedia. Pembersihan teks adalah langkah wajib yang bertujuan pada pembuangan bunyi dan penyesuaian untuk meningkatkan prestasi. Namun, data perusahaan memerlukan kaedah pembersihan istimewa kerana ia mengandungi banyak terma domain yang kelihatan sebagai bunyi terhadap kamus piawai, tetapi sebenarnya tidak. Dalam kerja ini kami perkenalkan analisis terperinci ciri-ciri data syarikat dan cadangkan kaedah tidak diawasi untuk membersihkan repositori ini selepas terma domain telah dipisahkan secara automatik dari terma bunyi sebenar. Terma bunyi selepas itu diperbaiki dengan cara kontekstual. Efektivitas kaedah ditetapkan melalui penilaian manual yang berhati-hati perbaikan ralat melalui beberapa set data piawai, termasuk yang tersedia untuk pengesan ucapan kebencian, di mana terdapat distorsi sengaja untuk mengelakkan pengesan. Kami juga berkongsi keputusan untuk menunjukkan peningkatan dalam ketepatan klasifikasi selepas penyesuaian bunyi.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് അലഗോരിറ്റിക്ക് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ പ്രകൃതിയാണ് ഉപകാരം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വളരെ കുഴപ്പമുള്ളത്. അത്  ഈ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളും പ്രൊപ്പറേഷന്\u200d ഡേറ്റായിട്ട് നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നില്ല. വിസ്പിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത പദാവലി വൃത്തിയാക്കുന്നത് ശബ്ദം നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനും ലക്ഷ്യമാണ്. എന്നാലും, പ്രൊപ്പറേഷന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ വിശേഷം വൃത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d അതില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാകുന്നു. അത് ഒരു സാധാരണ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിശദീകരണവിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ശബ്ദം വാക്ക പിന്നീട് അസാധാരണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ചു സാധാരണ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കൈകാര്യം സൂക്ഷ്മമായി രീതിയിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപി ശബ്ദം സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനിലേക്ക് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫലങ്ങളും ഞങ്ങള', 'mt': 'Il-prestazzjoni tal-algoritmi standard tal-analitika tat-test hija magħrufa li hija sostanzjalment degradata fuq dejta ġġenerata mill-konsumatur, li spiss hija storbjuża ħafna. These algorithms also do not work well on enterprise data which has a very different nature from News repositories, storybooks or Wikipedia data.  It-tindif tat-test huwa pass obbligatorju li għandu l-għan li jneħħi u jikkoreġi l-istorbju biex itejjeb il-prestazzjoni. Madankollu, id-dejta tal-intrapriżi teħtieġ metodi speċjali ta’ tindif peress li fiha ħafna termini ta’ dominju li jidhru li huma storbju kontra dikjararju standard, iżda fir-realtà mhumiex hekk. F’dan ix-xogħol nippreżentaw analiżi dettaljata tal-karatteristiċi tad-dejta tal-intrapriżi u nissuġġerixxu metodi mhux sorveljati għat-tindif ta’ dawn ir-repożitorji wara li t-termini tad-dominju jkunu ġew segregati awtomatikament mit-termini reali tal-istorbju. Wara dan it-termini tal-istorbju jiġu kkoreġuti b’mod kuntestwali. L-effikaċja tal-metodu hija stabbilita permezz ta’ evalwazzjoni manwali bir-reqqa tal-korrezzjonijiet tal-iżbalji fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta standard, inklużi dawk disponibbli għall-individwazzjoni tad-diskors tal-mibegħda, fejn hemm distorsjoni intenzjonata biex tiġi evitata l-individwazzjoni. Qsim ukoll ir-riżultati biex nuru titjib fil-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni wara korrezzjoni tal-istorbju.', 'pl': 'Wydajność standardowych algorytmów analizy tekstu jest znacznie ograniczona na danych generowanych przez konsumentów, które często są bardzo hałaśliwe. Algorytmy te nie działają również dobrze na danych korporacyjnych, które mają bardzo różny charakter od repozytoriów wiadomości, opowieści czy danych Wikipedii. Czyszczenie tekstu jest obowiązkowym krokiem, który ma na celu usuwanie i korekcję hałasu w celu poprawy wydajności. Jednak dane korporacyjne wymagają specjalnych metod czyszczenia, ponieważ zawierają wiele terminów domenowych, które wydają się być szumem w stosunku do standardowego słownika, ale w rzeczywistości tak nie jest. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy szczegółową analizę charakterystyki danych korporacyjnych i proponujemy metody czyszczenia tych repozytoriów po automatycznym oddzieleniu terminów domeny od terminów prawdziwych szumów. Pojęcia hałasu są następnie korygowane w sposób kontekstowy. Skuteczność metody ustala się poprzez staranną ręczną ocenę korekt błędów w kilku standardowych zestawach danych, w tym dostępnych do wykrywania mowy nienawiści, gdzie dochodzi do celowych zniekształceń w celu uniknięcia wykrycia. Udostępniamy również wyniki, aby pokazać poprawę dokładności klasyfikacji po korekcji hałasu.', 'ro': 'Performanța algoritmilor standard de analiză a textului este cunoscută a fi degradată substanțial pe datele generate de consumatori, care sunt adesea foarte zgomotoase. Acești algoritmi, de asemenea, nu funcționează bine pe datele de întreprindere care au o natură foarte diferită de depozitele de știri, poveștile sau datele Wikipedia. Curățarea textului este o etapă obligatorie care vizează eliminarea zgomotului și corectarea pentru a îmbunătăți performanța. Cu toate acestea, datele de întreprindere necesită metode speciale de curățare, deoarece conțin mulți termeni de domeniu care par a fi zgomot împotriva unui dicționar standard, dar în realitate nu sunt așa. În această lucrare prezentăm o analiză detaliată a caracteristicilor datelor de întreprindere și sugerăm metode nesupravegheate pentru curățarea acestor depozite după ce termenii de domeniu au fost separați automat de termenii de zgomot adevărat. Termenii de zgomot sunt corectați ulterior într-un mod contextual. Eficacitatea metodei este stabilită prin evaluarea manuală atentă a corecțiilor erorilor în mai multe seturi de date standard, inclusiv cele disponibile pentru detectarea discursului la ură, în cazul în care există distorsiuni deliberate pentru a evita detectarea. De asemenea, împărtășim rezultatele pentru a arăta îmbunătățirea preciziei clasificării după corecția zgomotului.', 'mn': 'Стандарттай текст анализ судалгааны алгоритмын үйлдэл хэрэглэгчийн үүсгэсэн өгөгдлийн хувьд ихэвчлэн үнэхээр чимээгүй байдаг. Эдгээр алгоритм мөн enterprise data дээр сайн ажиллахгүй. Харин News repositories, storybooks or Wikipedia data дээр маш өөр байгаль бий. Текст цэвэрлэх нь үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд чимээ устгах, зөв засах шаардлагатай алхам юм. Гэхдээ бизнесийн өгөгдлийн санаанууд стандарт үлгэрийн эсрэг чимээгүй арга хэрэгтэй боловч бодит байдал нь тийм биш. Энэ ажлын тухай бид бизнесийн өгөгдлийн шинжлэх ухааны талаар нарийвчлалтай шинжлэх ухаан явуулж, холбоотой томъёог автоматаар үнэн чимээгүй томъёогоор хуваагдсан дараа эдгээр салбаруудыг цэвэрл Дараа нь дуу дуу хэлбэрүүд нөхцөл загвараар зөвшөөрөгдсөн. Энэ аргын үр дүнтэй байдал нь олон стандарт өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр алдааны зөвшөөрүүлэлтийг гүйцэтгэхэд зөвхөн гар аргаар байгуулагддаг. Харин үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийн оношлох боломжтой хүмүүс мөн хаана олох Мөн бид шууд зөвшөөрүүлсний дараа хичээлийн зөв байдалд нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой үр дүнг хуваалцдаг.', 'no': 'Utføring av standardtekstanalitiske algoritme er kjent til å vera vanleg degradert på brukaraldatane, som ofte er svært støy. Desse algoritmenene arbeider også ikkje godt på virksomhetsdata som har ein svært annan natur frå nyhetsaklarar, historikkbokar eller Wikipedia data. Tekstrenning er ei obligativ steg som måtar å fjerna lyd og retta korrigering for å forbetra utviklinga. Dette treng imidlertid virksomhetsdata spesielle reinningsmetoder sidan det inneheld mange domenevilkår som ser ut til å vera støy mot eit standard ordbok, men faktisk er ikkje så. I denne arbeida presenterer vi detaljerte analyser av karakteristika for virksomhetsdata og foreslår ikkje oppretta metodar for å tømme desse lagerene etter at domenevilkåra er automatisk separert frå sann støy. Støyvilkår vert deretter korrigerte i ein kontekstmodus. Effektiviteten av metoden er oppretta gjennom forsiktig manuelt evaluering av feilrettingar over fleire standard datasett, inkludert dei tilgjengelege for å oppdaga hatespråk, der det finst forstørringar for å unngå oppdaging. Vi deler også resultat for å visa forbetringa i klassifikasjon etter støykorreksjon.', 'so': 'Shaqoyinka algorithmka qoraalka ah ee caadiga ah waxaa loo yaqaan in lagu hoosaysiiyo macluumaad isticmaalayaasha, kuwaas oo marar badan qaylo. Sidoo kale jardiinadu si wanaagsan uma shaqeeyaan macluumaadka ganacsiga, kuwaas oo ku jira dabiicado aad u kala duduwan oo ay ka yimaadaan macluumaadka wargeysyada, buugaagta ama Wikipedia. Soo daahirinta qoraalku waa tallaabo qasab ah oo ku talo gala guuridda codka iyo hagaajinta si uu u hagaajiyo tababarka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaadka shirkaddu waxay u baahan yihiin qaabab gaar ah oo nadiifsan, sababtoo ah waxay ku jirtaa noocyo badan oo ay u muuqataa inay cod ka gees tahay luqada caadiga ah, laakiin runta ah ma aha. Shaqadan ayaannu sameynaa baaritaanka takhasuska macluumaadka ganacsiga, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qaababka aan la ilaalinayn in lagu nadiifiyo bakaaradahaas kadib markii sharciga degenaanshaha laga kala soocay qaybaha codka runta ah. Noise terms are thereafter corrected in a contextual fashion.  Effektada qaababka waxaa lagu dhisaa qiimeynta hagitaanka qaladka si taxadar ah oo ka sarreeya saxda cadaaladaha qaarkood oo kamid ah, kuwaas oo ah kuwa loo heli karo aqoonsiga hadalka nebcaalka, meesha ay ku jirto qalloocsi si si qasab ah si aan laga ogaan. Sidoo kale waxaynu kala qaybnaynaa resultiyada si loo kordhiyo saxda fasaxda kadib hagaajinta codka.', 'sr': 'Poznato je da su provedba standardnih analitičkih algoritma za tekst značajno degraderana na podacima koji su proizvedeni potrošačima, koji su često veoma bukni. Ovi algoritmi takođe ne rade dobro na podacima poduzeća koja ima drugačiju prirodu od novinskih repozitorija, knjiga priče ili podataka o Wikipediji. Očišćenje teksta je obavezan korak koji cilja na uklanjanje buke i korištenje kako bi poboljšao izvođenje. Međutim, podaci poduzeća trebaju specijalne metode čišćenja jer sadrži mnoge termine domena koje izgleda buka protiv standardnog rečnika, ali u stvarnosti nisu tako. U ovom poslu predstavljamo detaljnu analizu karakteristika podataka poduzeća i predlažemo neodređene metode za čišćenje tih skladišta nakon što su uslovi domena automatski odvajani iz pravih uslova buke. Nakon toga se uslovi glasa ispravljaju u kontekstualnom smislu. Efikasnost metode je utvrđena pažljivom ručnom procjenom korekcije greška preko nekoliko standardnih seta podataka, uključujući one koje su dostupne za otkrivanje govora mržnje, gde postoje namjerno iskrivljanje da izbjegne otkrivanje. Takoðe delimo rezultate da pokažemo poboljšanje klasifikacije taènosti nakon isprave buke.', 'sv': 'Prestandan hos standardtextanalysalgoritmer är känd för att försämras avsevärt på konsumentgenererade data, som ofta är mycket bullriga. Dessa algoritmer fungerar inte heller bra på företagsdata som har en mycket annan karaktär än nyhetsarkiv, sagoböcker eller Wikipedia-data. Textrengöring är ett obligatoriskt steg som syftar till att avlägsna och korrigera buller för att förbättra prestanda. Företagsdata behöver dock särskilda rengöringsmetoder eftersom de innehåller många domäntermer som verkar vara buller mot en vanlig ordlista, men i verkligheten inte är det. I detta arbete presenterar vi detaljerad analys av egenskaper hos företagsdata och föreslår oövervakade metoder för rengöring av dessa arkiv efter att domäntermer automatiskt har avskilts från verkliga bullertermer. Bullertermer korrigeras därefter på ett kontextuellt sätt. Metodens effektivitet fastställs genom noggrann manuell utvärdering av felkorrigeringar över flera standarddatauppsättningar, inklusive de som finns tillgängliga för detektering av hattal, där avsiktlig förvrängning sker för att undvika detektering. Vi delar också resultat för att visa förbättring av klassificeringsnoggrannhet efter bullerkorrektion.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණ පාළුවේ විශ්ලේෂණ අල්ගෝරිත්ම්ස් විශ්ලේෂණයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය හැකියා  මේ ඇල්ගෝරිඩම්ස් වලින් හොඳට වැඩ කරන්නේ නෑ විකිපිඩියා දත්ත වලින් වෙනස් ස්වභාවයක් තියෙනවා. පාළුව පිරික්ෂණය අවශ්\u200dය පැත්තක් තමයි වැඩ කරන්න සහ වැඩ කරන්න අදහස් කරනවා. නමුත්, විශේෂ තොරතුරු විශේෂ පිරිසිදුම් විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා මොකද ඒක තමයි ප්\u200dරමාණ විදිහට මේ වැඩේ අපි විස්තර විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දත්තේ ගැන හැකි විශේෂණයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැති විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් පස්සේ සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. විධානයේ පරීක්ෂණය ස්ථාපනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණික දත්ත සෙට් වලින් වැරදි විධානයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂ අපි ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පස්', 'ta': 'நிலையான உரை ஆராய்வு முறைமைகளின் செயல்பாடு பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவின் மீது மிகவும் குறைந்து இருக்கும். அது பெரும்பாலும இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் தகவல்கள் மிகவும் வேறு வித்தியாசமான செய்தி கிடங்குகள், கதை புத்தகங்கள் அல்லது விகிபிடியா தகவல்களில் இருந்த உரை சுத்தம் என்பது சப்தம் நீக்குதல் மற்றும் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு திருத்தம் செய்யும் பொருள் ஒரு  ஆயினும், தொழில்நுட்பம் தகவல்களுக்கு சிறப்பு சுத்தம் முறைமைகள் தேவைப்படுகிறது ஏனெனில் அதில் பல களம் வாக்குகள் உள்ளன, அது ஒரு நிலை இந்த வேலையில் நாம் தொழில்நுட்பம் தரவுகளின் தன்மைகளை விவரமான ஆய்வு கொடுக்கிறோம் மற்றும் தங்களது வார்த்தைகளிலிருந்து உண்மையான ஒலி மொழிகளி பின்னர் விளக்கங்கள் தற்போதைய வடிவத்தில் சரிசெய்யப்பட்டுள்ளன. இந்த முறையின் விளைவு கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருளை கண்டுபிடிக்க நிலையில் பிழை திருத்தத்தை பரிசோதிக்கும் மூலம் எச்சரிக்கையாக முறையா சப்தம் திருத்தத்திற்குப் பிறகு, மேம்படுத்தல் விளைவுகளை காட்ட வேண்டும்.', 'ur': 'استاندارڈ ٹیکسٹ تحلیل الگوریٹم کی عملکرد معلوم ہوتی ہے کہ سودمندوں کے پیدا کئے ہوئے ڈیٹے پر زیادہ کمزور ہوتے ہیں، جو اکثر بہت آواز ہیں. یہ الگوریتم بھی اچھے طریقے سے کام نہیں کرتے جن کے پاس نیویس ریپوسیٹریس، کہانی بوک یا ویکیپیڈیا ڈاٹ سے بہت مختلف طبیعت ہے. پاکیزہ پاکیزگی ایک ضرورت قدم ہے جس کی مطلب ہے کہ صوت کو ہٹانے اور اصلاح کے لئے کامیابی اچھی طرح کرے۔ However, enterprise data need special cleaning methods since it contains many domain terms which appear to be noise against a standard dictionary, but in reality not so. اس کام میں ہم نے انٹرنپرائز ڈیٹا کے خصوصیات کا تفصیل پیش کیا ہے اور یہ روپیسٹریوں کو پاک کرنے کے لئے غیر محفوظ طریقے پیش کرتا ہے بعد اس کے کہ ڈیمین شرمگاہوں کو حقیقی صوت شرمگاہوں سے اپنے ساتھ جدا کیا گیا ہے۔ اس کے بعد زور کی حالت ٹھیک کر دی جاتی ہے اس طریقہ کی فعالیت تعداد کے مطابق چند استاندارڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ خطا کی اصلاح کے ذریعہ مضبوطی کے ذریعہ مضبوطی کی گئی ہے، اس میں سے وہ جنہیں نفرت بات شناسی کے لئے موجود ہیں، جہاں پہچان جانے کے لئے مطل ہم اس کے بعد بھی نتیجے شریک کرتے ہیں کہ صوت اصلاح کے بعد کلاسپیٹ دقیق کے ساتھ بہترین طریقہ دکھانے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Ushbu algoritlar faqat ma'lumotlarda juda yaxshi ishlamaydi, yangi xabarlar, storybooks yoki Wikipedia maʼlumotidan juda boshqa tarkibi bor. Матнни поклаш, овозни ўчириш ва performance яхшироқда ўзгартиришни тўғрилаш учун мажбур бир қадам бўлиб қолади. Lekin, tashkilotlar maʼlumotiga maxsus tozalash usullari kerak, chunki bu yerda andoza lugʻatga bog'liq bo'lgan ko'p domen so ʻzlari mavjud. Ammo, haqiqatgina shunday emas. Bu vazifani biz tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz, shaxsiy tovush soʻzlaridan avtomatik o'zgartirilmagan xabarlarni tozalash uchun xavfsiz usullarni anglatamiz. (Ушбу ояти кариманинг нозил бўлиш сабаби ҳақида Имом Аҳмад ибн Xанбал ҳазрати Абдуллоҳ ибн Аббосдан (р. а.) ривоят қилинган ҳадисда қуйидагилар айтилади: «Бану Салим қабиласидан Name Biz tovush to ʻgʻriligidan keyin darajalashtirishni tasdiqlash imkoniyatini ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Thông tin về thuật to án giải tích tiêu chuẩn của văn bản được biết là đã bị phân hủy đáng kể trên dữ liệu máy phát ra của người dùng, thường rất ồn ào. Những thuật toán này cũng không có tác dụng tốt với dữ liệu doanh nghiệp có một tính chất rất khác với các kho lưu trữ Tin tức, truyện hay dữ liệu Wikipedia. Việc lau chữ là bước bắt buộc nhằm hướng đến việc gỡ nhiễu và sửa chữa để tăng hiệu suất. Tuy nhiên, dữ liệu doanh nghiệp cần một phương pháp lau dọn đặc biệt vì nó chứa nhiều dạng miền mà có vẻ như là tiếng ồn chống lại từ điển tiêu chuẩn, nhưng thực tế thì không. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đưa ra phân tích chi tiết về các chi tiết của dữ liệu doanh nghiệp và đề xuất phương pháp không giám sát để lau dọn các kho lưu trữ này sau khi các điều khoản miền tự động được phân biệt khỏi các điều khoản ồn ào thực sự. Sau đó, sự chỉnh sửa theo ngữ cảnh. Sự hiệu quả của phương pháp được xác định bằng cách cẩn thận đánh giá bằng tay các sửa lỗi trên nhiều bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, bao gồm những bộ liệu có sẵn để phát hiện ngôn ngữ ghét bỏ, nơi có sự bóp méo cố ý để tránh bị phát hiện. Chúng tôi cũng chia sẻ kết quả để tăng cường độ chính xác phân loại sau khi sửa nhiễu.', 'bg': 'Известно е, че ефективността на стандартните алгоритми за анализ на текста значително се влошава върху генерираните от потребителите данни, които често са много шумни. Тези алгоритми също не работят добре върху корпоративни данни, които имат много различен характер от хранилищата за новини, историите или данните от Уикипедия. Текстовото почистване е задължителна стъпка, която има за цел отстраняване и корекция на шума за подобряване на производителността. Въпреки това, корпоративните данни се нуждаят от специални методи за почистване, тъй като съдържат много домейн термини, които изглеждат като шум срещу стандартен речник, но в действителност не са такива. В тази работа представяме подробен анализ на характеристиките на фирмените данни и предлагаме ненадзорни методи за почистване на тези хранилища, след като термините на домейна са автоматично разделени от термините за истински шум. След това термините за шум се коригират по контекстен начин. Ефективността на метода се установява чрез внимателно ръчно оценяване на корекциите на грешки в рамките на няколко стандартни набора данни, включително наличните за откриване на речта на омразата, където има умишлено изкривяване, за да се избегне откриването. Споделяме и резултати, за да покажем подобрение на точността на класификацията след корекция на шума.', 'nl': 'Het is bekend dat de prestaties van standaard tekstanalysealgoritmes aanzienlijk worden verminderd op consumentengegenereerde gegevens, die vaak erg luidruchtig zijn. Deze algoritmes werken ook niet goed op bedrijfsgegevens die een heel andere aard hebben dan Nieuwsresitories, verhaalboeken of Wikipedia-gegevens. Tekst schoonmaken is een verplichte stap die gericht is op geluidsverwijdering en correctie om de prestaties te verbeteren. Ondernemingsgegevens hebben echter speciale reinigingsmethoden nodig, omdat het veel domeintermen bevat die ruis lijken te zijn ten opzichte van een standaard woordenboek, maar in werkelijkheid niet zo zijn. In dit werk presenteren we een gedetailleerde analyse van de kenmerken van bedrijfsdata en stellen we onbeheerde methoden voor het opschonen van deze repositories voor nadat domeintermen automatisch zijn gescheiden van echte noise termen. Ruistermen worden vervolgens contextueel gecorrigeerd. De effectiviteit van de methode wordt vastgesteld door zorgvuldige handmatige evaluatie van foutcorrecties over verschillende standaardgegevenssets, waaronder die welke beschikbaar zijn voor haatspraakdetectie, waar opzettelijke vervorming is om detectie te voorkomen. We delen ook resultaten om verbeteringen in classificatienauwkeurigheid na ruiscorrectie aan te tonen.', 'hr': 'Učinnost standardnih analitičkih algoritma teksta značajno se smanjuje na podacima koji su proizvedeni potrošačima, što su često vrlo bučno. Ovi algoritmi također ne rade dobro na podacima poduzeća koje imaju vrlo drugačiju prirodu od novinskih repozitorija, knjiga priče ili podataka o Wikipediji. Očišćenje teksta je obavezan korak koji cilja na uklanjanje buke i ispravku kako bi se poboljšala učinkovitost. Međutim, podaci poduzeća trebaju posebne metode čišćenja jer sadrži mnoge uvjete domena koje čini se da su buke protiv standardnog rečnika, ali u stvari nije tako. U ovom poslu predstavljamo detaljnu analizu karakteristika poduzetničkih podataka i predlažemo neodređene metode za čišćenje tih skladišta nakon što su uslovi domena automatski odvojeni iz pravih uvjeta buke. Nakon toga se uslovi glasa ispravljaju na contextualnom načinu. Efikasnost metode se utvrđuje putem pažljive ručne procjene korekcija grešaka na nekoliko standardnih seta podataka, uključujući one koje su dostupne za otkrivanje govora mržnje, gdje postoje namjerno iskrivljanje kako bi se izbjegao otkrivanje. Također dijelimo rezultate kako bi pokazali poboljšanje to čnosti klasifikacije nakon isprave buke.', 'de': 'Es ist bekannt, dass die Leistung von Standard-Textanalysealgorithmen bei Verbraucherdaten, die oft sehr laut sind, erheblich beeinträchtigt ist. Diese Algorithmen funktionieren auch nicht gut auf Unternehmensdaten, die einen sehr anderen Charakter haben als Nachrichtenrepositorien, Storybooks oder Wikipedia-Daten. Die Textreinigung ist ein obligatorischer Schritt, der auf die Beseitigung und Korrektur von Geräuschen abzielt, um die Leistung zu verbessern. Unternehmensdaten benötigen jedoch spezielle Bereinigungsmethoden, da sie viele Domänenbegriffe enthalten, die im Vergleich zu einem Standardwörterbuch als Rauschen erscheinen, in Wirklichkeit aber nicht so sind. In dieser Arbeit präsentieren wir eine detaillierte Analyse der Merkmale von Unternehmensdaten und schlagen Methoden vor, um diese Repositories zu bereinigen, nachdem Domänenbegriffe automatisch von echten Rauschbegriffen getrennt wurden. Rauschbegriffe werden anschließend kontextbezogen korrigiert. Die Wirksamkeit der Methode wird durch sorgfältige manuelle Auswertung von Fehlerkorrekturen über mehrere Standarddatensätze, einschließlich derjenigen, die zur Erkennung von Hassreden zur Verfügung stehen, bei denen absichtliche Verzerrungen vorliegen, festgestellt. Wir teilen auch Ergebnisse, um eine Verbesserung der Klassifizierungsgenauigkeit nach Rauschkorrektur zu zeigen.', 'da': 'Ydelsen af standard tekstanalysalgoritmer er kendt for at være væsentligt forringet på forbrugergenererede data, som ofte er meget støjende. Disse algoritmer fungerer heller ikke godt på virksomhedsdata, som har en meget anden karakter end Nyheder repositories, historiebøger eller Wikipedia data. Tekstrensning er et obligatorisk skridt, der sigter mod støjfjernelse og korrektion for at forbedre ydeevnen. Virksomhedsdata har imidlertid brug for særlige rengøringsmetoder, da de indeholder mange domænenavn, der synes at være støj mod en standard ordbog, men i virkeligheden er det ikke. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi detaljeret analyse af karakteristika ved virksomhedsdata og foreslår uautoriserede metoder til rengøring af disse lagre efter at domænenavne automatisk er blevet adskilt fra sande støjtermer. Støjbegreber rettes derefter på en kontekstuel måde. Metodens effektivitet fastslås gennem omhyggelig manuel evaluering af fejlrettelser over flere standarddatasæt, herunder dem, der er tilgængelige til detektering af hadefuldtale, hvor der er bevidst forvrængning for at undgå detektering. Vi deler også resultater for at vise en forbedring af klassificeringsnøjagtigheden efter støjkorrektion.', 'id': 'Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy.  Algoritma ini juga tidak bekerja dengan baik pada data perusahaan yang memiliki sifat yang sangat berbeda dari repositori berita, buku cerita atau data Wikipedia. Pembersihan teks adalah langkah mandator yang bertujuan untuk menghapus suara dan memperbaiki prestasi. Namun, data perusahaan membutuhkan metode pembersihan khusus karena mengandung banyak istilah domain yang tampaknya suara melawan kamus standar, tetapi sebenarnya tidak. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mempersembahkan analisis rincian karakteristik data perusahaan dan menyarankan metode tidak diawasi untuk membersihkan repositori ini setelah istilah domain secara otomatis terpisah dari istilah bunyi yang sebenarnya. Suara suara kemudian diperbaiki dalam cara kontekstual. Efektivitas metode ditetapkan melalui evaluasi manual yang berhati-hati dari koreksi kesalahan di beberapa set data standar, termasuk yang tersedia untuk deteksi pidato kebencian, di mana ada distorsi sengaja untuk menghindari deteksi. Kami juga berbagi hasil untuk menunjukkan peningkatan akurasi klasifikasi setelah koreksi suara.', 'fa': 'عملکرد الگوریتم\u200cهای تحلیل متن استاندارد را شناخته می\u200cشود که بر اطلاعات تولید شده\u200cاند، که اغلب بسیار صدا می\u200cکنند، زیاد نابود می\u200cشوند. این الگوریتم\u200cها در اطلاعات شرکتی نیز خوب کار نمی\u200cکنند که طبیعت بسیار متفاوتی از ذخیره\u200cهای خبری، کتاب\u200cهای داستان یا داده\u200cهای ویکیپدیا دارد. پاک کردن متن یک قدم لازم است که هدف به پاک کردن و اصلاح صدا است تا عملکرد را بهتر کند. ولی داده\u200cهای شرکت به روش\u200cهای تمیز ویژه نیاز دارند، زیرا در آن شرکت\u200cهای زیادی دامنی است که به نظر می\u200cرسد صدا در مقابل یک دامنۀ استاندارد باشد، ولی در واقعیت چنین نیست. در این کار ما تحلیل جزئیات از ویژگی\u200cهای داده\u200cهای شرکت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش\u200cهای غیرقابل پاک کردن این ذخیره\u200cها بعد از اینکه شرایط دامنه\u200cها به طور خودکار از شرایط صوتی واقعی جدا شدند. بعد از آن، شرایط صوتی در صورت موقعیت درست می شوند. فعالیت این روش با ارزیابی دستیابی دقیق از اصلاح خطا بر روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد ثابت می\u200cشود، شامل آن\u200cها که برای شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر موجود می\u200cشوند، در حالی که اختلاف\u200cهای مشخص برای جلوگیری از شناسایی وجود دار ما همچنین نتیجه\u200cهایی را برای نشان دادن بالاترین دقیقات مختصات بعد از اصلاح صدا شریک می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Standart metin analitik algoritmalaryň eserini tüketýän maglumatlarda örän ýok edip bilýär. Bu käwagt gaty sesli. Bu algoritmalar hatda Haýsy depositelerinden, hekaýatlardan ýa-da Wikipediýanyň maglumatyndan tapawutlyk birnäçe guram maglumatynda gowy işlemeýärler. Metin temizlemek çykarmak we çykarmak üçin ses çykarmak we düzeltmek amalydyr. Şeýle-de, orins maglumaty örän wajyp temizleme yöntemleri gerek bolýar, sebäbi bu ýerde standart sözlük bilen galmagal bolup görünýär, ýöne aslynda şol ýaly däl. Bu işde biz şirket maglumatyň hatlarynyň detayly analyzasyny görkeýäris we bu depeleri dogry ses terimlerinden boşandygdan soň bu depeleri temizlemek üçin saglanmaýan yöntemleri maslahat berýäris. Soňra ses şertleri teksirli bir şekilde düzeldiler. Metiniň etkinliýeti birnäçe standart maglumat düzümlerinde hata düzümlerniň dykkanlygyny görkezilip otyrylýar, ýok sözlerini tanyşdyrmak üçin ejazaňda nähili ýüregi bar. Biz hem ses düzeltmeginden soň klasifikasiýanyň dogrylygyny görkezmek üçin netijeleri paylaşýarys.', 'ko': '모두가 알다시피 표준 텍스트 분석 알고리즘은 소비자가 생성한 데이터의 성능이 대폭 떨어지는데 이런 데이터는 통상적으로 매우 시끄럽다.이런 알고리즘도 뉴스 라이브러리, 이야기책이나 위키백과 데이터와는 성격이 전혀 다른 기업 데이터를 잘 처리하지 못한다.텍스트 정리는 성능을 향상시키기 위해 소음을 없애고 바로잡는 데 필수적인 절차이다.그러나 기업 데이터는 많은 분야의 용어를 포함하고 있기 때문에 표준 사전의 소음처럼 보이지만 실제로는 그렇지 않다.이 작업에서 우리는 기업 데이터의 특징을 상세하게 분석했고 역 용어와 실제 소음 용어가 자동으로 분리된 후에 이 저장소를 정리하는 무감독 방법을 제시했다.잡음 항목은 뒤이어 상기 아래의 방식으로 바로잡을 것이다.이 방법의 유효성은 여러 개의 표준 데이터 집합의 오류 수정에 대한 꼼꼼한 수동 평가를 통해 확정된 것이다. 이는 음성 검측에 사용할 수 있는 데이터 집합을 포함하는데 그 중 고의적인 오류가 있어 검측을 피할 수 있다.우리는 소음 교정 후 분류 정밀도를 높인 결과도 공유했다.', 'af': "Voorwerp van standaard teks analitiese algoritme is bekend om substantieel te degradeer op gebruiker genereerde data, wat dikwels baie geluid is. Hierdie algoritme werk ook nie goed op bedryfsdata wat 'n baie ander natuur het van Nuus stoorplekke, storybooks of Wikipedia data nie. Teks skoonmaak is 'n obligatiewe stap wat doel om ruis verwyder en korrekting te verbeter prestasie. Maar voorspoediging data benodig spesiale skoonmaak metodes omdat dit bevat baie domein terme wat verskyn as geluid teen 'n standaard woordeboek, maar in werklikheid is nie so nie. In hierdie werk voorsien ons gedetale analiseer van karakteristieke van bedragdatums en voorstel ons ononderwerpende metodes vir die skoonmaak van hierdie stoorplekke na die domein terme is outomaties geskep van waar geluid terme. Noets terme word daarna korrigeer in 'n kontekslike modus. Die effektiviteit van die metode is vasgestel deur versigtige manuele evaluering van fout korreksies oor verskeie standaard data stelle, insluitend die beskikbaar vir haat spraak beskrywing, waar daar is deliberaarde verdrukking om te veroorskou. Ons deel ook resultate om verbetering te vertoon in klasifikasie-presies na geluidkorreksie.", 'sw': 'Uwezeshaji wa algorithi za uchambuzi wa maandishi za kawaida unajulikana kuwa umepunguzwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa watumiaji wa taarifa zilizotengenezwa, ambazo mara nyingi ni kelele kubwa. Zaidi hizi pia hazifanyi kazi vizuri kwenye taarifa za kibiashara ambazo zina asili tofauti tofauti sana kutoka kwenye vituo vya habari, maduka au data za Wikipedia. Usafirishaji wa maandishi ni hatua ya lazima inayolenga kuondolewa kelele na kurekebisha upya performance. Hata hivyo, taarifa za kibiashara zinahitaji njia maalum za usafi kwa sababu in a vipengele vingi vya ndani ambavyo vinaonekana kuwa sauti dhidi ya lugha ya kawaida, lakini kwa kweli sio hivyo. Katika kazi hii tunaweka uchambuzi wa utaalamu wa takwimu za makampuni na tunapendekeza njia zisizo sahihi za kutafuta vituo hivi baada ya matumizi ya ndani imetengwa na sauti halisi. Vitendo vya kutosha vizuri vilibadilishwa kwa namna ya kawaida. Utufanisi wa njia hiyo umewekwa kwa kupitia tathmini kwa vifaa vya vifaa vya kutathmini mabadiliko ya makosa zaidi ya seti za data za viwango vya kawaida, ikiwa ni pamoja na zile zinazopatikana kwa ajili ya kutambua hotuba ya chuki, ambapo kuna changamoto kubwa ili kuepuka kutambuliwa. Pia tunashirikisha matokeo ya kuongezeka kwa uhakika wa usalama baada ya kurekebisha sauti.', 'az': 'Standardlı metin analitik algoritminin işləməsi müştəqilərdən ürəklənmiş məlumatlarda çox səslənir. Bu algoritmi həmçinin Haber depositələrindən, hekayələrindən və Wikipedia məlumatlarından çox farklı təbiəti olan enterprise məlumatlarında yaxşı işləməz. Metin təmizlənməsi səsləri çəkmək və düzəltmək üçün vacib bir adımdır. Lakin şirkətli məlumatlar standart sözləğə qarşı səslə görünən bir çox domain şartları içində təmizləmə metodlarına ehtiyacı vardır, amma əslində belə deyildir. Bu işdə biz şirket verilənlərin xüsusiyyətlərini detaylı analizi göstərdik və bu depositorları təmizləmək üçün dəyişdirilmiş metodların dəyişdiririk domain şartları öz-özündən doğru səs şartlarından ayrıldıqdan sonra. Sonra səs sözləri müxtəlif şəkildə düzəldiləcəkdir. Bu metodun faydalanılığı bir neçə standart verilən məlumatlar arasında xəta düzəltmələrinin dəqiqli tərzindən təşkil edilir, həmçinin nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək üçün faydalanırlar. Biz də sonuçlarını səs düzəltdikdən sonra klasifikasiya doğruluğu göstərmək üçün artırmaq üçün paylaşırıq.', 'hy': 'Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy.  Այս ալգորիթմները նույնպես լավ չեն աշխատում ընկերության տվյալների վրա, որոնք շատ տարբեր բնույթ ունեն նորությունների պահերից, պատմությունների գրքերից կամ Վիքիփեդիայի տվյալներից: Տեքստի մաքրումը պարտադիր քայլ է, որը նպատակում է աղմուկի վերացմանը և ուղղությունը բարելավելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, ընկերությունների տվյալները հատուկ մաքրման մեթոդներ են անհրաժեշտ, քանի որ դրանք պարունակում են շատ բնագավառներ, որոնք թվում են աղմուկ են ստանդարտ բառարանի հետ, բայց իրականում այդպես չէ: In this work we present detailed analysis of characteristics of enterprise data and suggest unsupervised methods for cleaning these repositories after domain terms have been automatically segregated from true noise terms.  Հետո աղմուկի տերմինները վերաբերվում են կոնտեքստալ ձևով: The effectiveness of the method is established through careful manual evaluation of error corrections over several standard data sets, including those available for hate speech detection, where there is deliberate distortion to avoid detection.  Մենք նաև կիսում ենք արդյունքները, որպեսզի ցույց տանք աղմուկի ուղղումից հետո դասակարգման ճշգրտության բարելավումը:', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማተሚያ አልgorithም ማድረግ በተፈጠረ ተጠቃሚዎች ዳታዎችን በመስመር አሰራጅቷል፡፡ እነዚህ አሌጎርጂዎች ደግሞ የዜና ሰብሰባዎች፣ የድምፅ መጻሕፍት ወይም የWikipedia ዳታዎች በጣም የተለየ የፍሬት ዳታዎችን በመልካም አያደርጉም፡፡ የጽሑፍ ማነጻት ድምፅን ለማስወገድ እና ማስታወቂያውን ለማሻል የሚያስፈልገው ግድ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የክፍለ ጉዳዩ ዳታዎች በአዳራዊ መዝገብ ላይ ድምፅ እንደሚመስል ብዙዎች የዶሜን ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልጋቸው የግዛት ማነጻ ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል ነገር ግን አይሆንም፡፡ በዚህ ስራ የክፍለ ዳታዎችን አስተያየት እናሳየዋለን እና ከድምፅ ቋንቋ በኋላ እነዚህን ሰብስሪቶች ማጥራት ያልተደረጉትን ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በኋላም የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት በሁኔታ አስተካክሎአል፡፡ የሥርዓት ጥቅም በማግኘት በአሳማሚ ስህተት ማሳየት በተጨማሪው የጥል ንግግር ማግኘት የሚችሉትን እና የስህተት ትክክለቶችን በመስመር በጥንቃቄ አካባቢ ማረጋገጥ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በድምፅ ማስታወቂያ በኋላ የክፍለ ግንኙነትን ለማሳየት ፍሬዎችን እናሳርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy. Këto algoritme gjithashtu nuk funksionojnë mirë në të dhënat e ndërmarrjeve që kanë një natyrë shumë të ndryshme nga depozitat e lajmeve, librat e tregimeve apo të dhënat e Wikipedias. Pastrimi i tekstit është një hap i detyrueshëm që synon heqjen e zhurmës dhe korrigjimin për të përmirësuar performancën. However, enterprise data need special cleaning methods since it contains many domain terms which appear to be noise against a standard dictionary, but in reality are not so.  Në këtë punë ne paraqesim analizën e detajuar të karakteristikave të të dhënave të ndërmarrjeve dhe sugjerojmë metoda të pazgjidhura për pastrimin e këtyre depozitave pasi termat e domenit janë ndarë automatikisht nga termat e vërtetë të zhurmës. Termet e zhurmës po korrigjohen në mënyrë kontekstuale. Efektiviteti i metodës përcaktohet nëpërmjet vlerësimit të kujdesshëm manual të korreksioneve të gabimeve në lidhje me disa grupe standarde të të dhënave, duke përfshirë ato që janë në dispozicion për zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes, ku ekziston distorsion me qëllim për të shmangur zbulimin. We also share results to show enhancement in classification accuracy after noise correction.', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্ডার্ড টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণের অ্যালগরিদমের কার্যক্রম বিশ্লেষণের সংস্করণ ব্যবহারকারীদের তৈরি তথ্যের প্রতি বেশীরভা এছাড়াও এই অ্যালগরিদমগুলো বিন্যাসের তথ্যে ভালো কাজ করে না, যারা সংবাদ প্রতিবেদন, গল্প বই অথবা উইকিপিডিয়া তথ্য থেকে খুব ভি টেক্সট পরিষ্কার হচ্ছে একটি বাধ্যতামূলক পদক্ষেপ যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে শব্দ সরিয়ে নেওয়া এবং প্রদর্শনের উন্নতি করার জন্য স তবে কোম্পানিক তথ্য বিশেষ পরিষ্কার উপায় প্রয়োজন যেহেতু তার মধ্যে অনেক ডোমেইন শর্ত রয়েছে যা মনে হচ্ছে স্ট্যান্ডারের অভিধানের বির এই কাজে আমরা প্রযুক্তিগত তথ্যের ব্যাপারে বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ উপস্থাপন করি এবং ডোমেইন শর্তের সত্যিকারের শব্দ থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিভক্ত করা হয়ে পরবর্তীতে বাজে শর্ত সংশোধন করা হয়েছে। বেশ কয়েকটি স্ট্যান্ডার ডাটা সেটের উপর ত্রুটি সংশোধনের মাধ্যমে এই পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম সাবধানে প্রতিষ্ঠিত করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে যারা ঘৃণা বাক্ শব্দ সংস্কারের পর শ্রেণীকরণের সুবিধা বৃদ্ধি প্রদর্শনের ফলাফল আমরা শেয়ার করি।', 'ca': "Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy.  Aquests algoritmes també no funcionen bé en dades d'empreses que tenen una naturalesa molt diferent dels repositoris de not ícies, llibres d'històries o dades de Wikipedia. La netejació de textos és un pas obligatori que mira a eliminar i corregir el soroll per millorar el rendiment. No obstant això, les dades emprenedores necessiten mètodes especials de netejar, ja que conté molts termes de domini que semblen ser soroll en contra d'un diccionari normal, però en realitat no ho són. En aquest treball presentem una anàlisi detallada de les característiques de les dades d'empresa i suggerem mètodes no supervisats per netejar aquests repositoris després que els termes de domini s'han separat automàticament dels termes de ruit veritables. Després d'això, els termes ruidoses corregeixen de manera contextual. L'eficacia del mètode s'estableix a través d'una evaluació manual atenta de les correccions d'errors a través de diversos conjunts de dades estandards, incloent aquells disponibles per la detecció del discurs d'odi, on hi ha distorsió deliberada per evitar la detecció. També compartim resultats per mostrar millor la precisió de classificació després de la correcció del soroll.", 'cs': 'Je známo, že výkon standardních algoritmů textové analýzy je výrazně zhoršen na data generovaných spotřebiteli, která jsou často velmi hlučná. Tyto algoritmy také nefungují dobře na podnikových datech, které mají velmi odlišnou povahu od repozitářů zpráv, příběhů nebo dat Wikipedie. Čištění textu je povinným krokem, jehož cílem je odstranění hluku a korekce pro zlepšení výkonu. Podniková data však vyžadují speciální metody čištění, protože obsahují mnoho doménových termínů, které se zdají být šumem oproti standardnímu slovníku, ale ve skutečnosti tomu tak nejsou. V této práci představujeme detailní analýzu charakteristik podnikových dat a navrhujeme metody čištění těchto repozitářů bez dohledu po automatickém oddělení doménových termínů od skutečného šumu. Pojmy hluku jsou následně kontextově opraveny. Účinnost metody je stanovena pečlivým ručním vyhodnocením oprav chyb na několika standardních datových sadách, včetně těch, které jsou k dispozici pro detekci nenávistné řeči, kde dochází k úmyslnému zkreslení, aby se zabránilo detekci. Sdílíme také výsledky, které ukazují zlepšení přesnosti klasifikace po korekci šumu.', 'bs': 'Učinnost standardnih analitičkih algoritma za tekst značajno se smanjuje na podacima koji su proizvedeni potrošačima, koji su često veoma bukni. Ovi algoritmi također ne rade dobro na podacima poduzeća koja ima vrlo drugačiju prirodu od novinskih repozitorija, knjiga priče ili podataka o Wikipediji. Očišćenje teksta je obavezan korak koji cilja na uklanjanje buke i ispravku kako bi poboljšao izvođenje. Međutim, podaci poduzeća trebaju specijalne metode čišćenja jer sadrži mnoge termine domena koje izgleda buka protiv standardnog rečnika, ali u stvarnosti nisu tako. U ovom poslu predstavljamo detaljnu analizu karakteristika poduzetničkih podataka i predlažemo neodređene metode za čišćenje tih skladišta nakon što su uslovi domena automatski odvajani iz pravih uslova buke. Nakon toga se uslovi glasa ispravljaju na contextualnom načinu. Efikasnost metode se utvrđuje putem pažljive ručne procjene korekcija grešaka preko nekoliko standardnih seta podataka, uključujući one koje su dostupne za otkrivanje govora mržnje, gdje postoje namjerno iskrivljanje kako bi se izbjegao otkrivanje. Također dijelimo rezultate kako bi pokazali poboljšanje tajne preciznosti nakon isprave buke.', 'et': 'Standardsete tekstianalüüsi algoritmide jõudlus on teadaolevalt oluliselt halvenenud tarbijate loodud andmete puhul, mis on sageli väga mürakad. Need algoritmid ei tööta hästi ka ettevõtte andmetega, mis on väga erinev laad Uudiste hoidlatest, juturaamatutest või Wikipedia andmetest. Teksti puhastamine on kohustuslik samm, mille eesmärk on müra eemaldamine ja parandamine jõudluse parandamiseks. Ettevõtte andmed vajavad siiski spetsiaalseid puhastusmeetodeid, sest need sisaldavad palju domeenitermineid, mis näivad olevat müra standardsõnastiku vastu, kuid tegelikult ei ole nii. Käesolevas töös esitame ettevõtte andmete omaduste üksikasjalikku analüüsi ja soovitame järelevalveta meetodeid nende hoidlate puhastamiseks pärast domeeni terminite automaatset eraldamist tegelikust mürast. Seejärel parandatakse müra mõisteid kontekstipõhiselt. Meetodi tõhusus määratakse kindlaks veaparanduste hoolika käsitsi hindamise kaudu mitme standardse andmekogumi, sealhulgas vihakõne tuvastamiseks kättesaadavate andmekogumite põhjal, kus avastamise vältimiseks esineb tahtlikke moonutusi. Jagame ka tulemusi, mis näitavad klassifitseerimise täpsuse paranemist pärast mürakorrektsiooni.', 'fi': 'Tavallisten tekstianalytiikkaalgoritmien suorituskyvyn tiedetään heikentyvän merkittävästi kuluttajien tuottamassa datassa, joka on usein hyvin meluisa. Nämä algoritmit eivät myöskään toimi hyvin yritystiedossa, joka on hyvin erilainen kuin uutisarkistot, tarinakirjat tai Wikipedia data. Tekstinpuhdistus on pakollinen vaihe, jonka tavoitteena on melun poistaminen ja korjaaminen suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Yritystiedot tarvitsevat kuitenkin erityisiä puhdistusmenetelmiä, koska ne sisältävät monia verkkotunnuksen termejä, jotka näyttävät olevan melua standardisanakirjan suhteen, mutta todellisuudessa eivät ole. Tässä työssä esittelemme yksityiskohtaisen analyysin yritystietojen ominaisuuksista ja ehdotamme valvomattomia menetelmiä näiden arkistojen puhdistamiseen sen jälkeen, kun verkkotunnuksen termit on automaattisesti erotettu todellisesta melusta. Melun termit korjataan sen jälkeen kontekstuaalisesti. Menetelmän tehokkuus määritetään arvioimalla virheenkorjaukset huolellisesti manuaalisesti useiden vakiotietokokonaisuuksien avulla, mukaan lukien vihapuheen havaitsemiseen käytettävissä olevat tiedot, joissa esiintyy tahallista vääristymistä havaitsemisen välttämiseksi. Jaamme myös tulokset osoittaaksemme luokituksen tarkkuuden paranemisen melun korjauksen jälkeen.', 'jv': 'ayo Algorithm iki lak gak bener podho akeh basa nang daftar manungsa sing dumateng sak batar neng Pak Pak Kasama, dadi-pakan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Perintah sing dipun Tema kang dipunangé punika diangkat sing dibutuhke nggawe aturan tambah lan ijol-ijolan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive In this job we present details details of parameters of podcast data and suggered unupperisated method for Cleaning this reparations after domain terms have been automatically segregated from true sound terms. Perintah sing dibutuhke dipunangé ora oleh nggo modèr contextual. Attribute Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno nung akeh nggawe gerakan kanggo nguasakno dadi, winih.', 'he': 'ביצוע של אלגוריתמים של אנליטיקת טקסט סטנדרטית ידועים שהם משפילים באופן משמעותי על נתונים שנוצרים ע"י הצרתים, אשר לעתים קרובות מאוד רעשים. אלגוריתמים אלה גם לא עובדים היטב על נתוני עסקים שיש לו טבע שונה מאוד ממאגרי חדשות, ספרי סיפורים או נתוני ויקיפדיה. ניקוי טקסט הוא צעד חובה שמתכוון למסירת רעש ותיקון כדי לשפר את ההופעה. בכל אופן, נתונים ביצועים זקוקים לשיטות ניקוי מיוחדות מכיוון שהם מכילים המון תנאים שדומה להיות רעש נגד מילון סטנדרטי, אבל במציאות הם לא כך. בעבודה הזו אנו מציגים ניתוח פרטי של אופיינים של נתוני עסקים ומציעים שיטות לא מעוקבות לניקוי המחסנים האלה לאחר שהתנאים בתחום הופרדו באופן אוטומטי ממונחי רעש אמיתיים. נתוני רעש מתקנים לאחר מכן באופן קונטוקטואלי. היעילות של השיטה מוקמת באמצעות הערכה ידנית זהירה של תיקונים שגיאות על מספר קבוצות נתונים סטנדרטיים, כולל אלה זמינים לזיהוי נאום שנאה, שבו יש התעצבות בכוונה כדי להימנע מהגילוי. We also share results to show enhancement in classification accuracy after noise correction.', 'sk': 'Znano je, da je učinkovitost standardnih algoritmov za analizo besedila bistveno zmanjšana pri podatkih, ki jih ustvarijo potrošniki, ki so pogosto zelo hrupni. Ti algoritmi prav tako ne delujejo dobro na podjetniških podatkih, ki imajo zelo drugačno naravo od repozitorijev novic, zgodb ali podatkov Wikipedije. Čiščenje besedila je obvezen korak, katerega cilj je odstranjevanje hrupa in popravljanje za izboljšanje učinkovitosti. Vendar pa podatki o podjetjih potrebujejo posebne metode čiščenja, saj vsebujejo številne domenske izraze, ki se zdijo hrup v primerjavi s standardnim slovarjem, vendar v resnici niso takšni. V tem delu predstavljamo podrobno analizo značilnosti podatkov o podjetjih in predlagamo nenadzorovane metode za čiščenje teh skladišč po tem, ko so domenski izrazi samodejno ločeni od resničnih izrazov hrupa. Izrazi hrupa se nato popravijo kontekstualno. Učinkovitost metode se ugotavlja s skrbnim ročnim ocenjevanjem popravkov napak v več standardnih naborih podatkov, vključno s tistimi, ki so na voljo za zaznavanje sovražnega govora, kjer je namerno popačenje, da se prepreči odkrivanje. Delimo tudi rezultate, ki kažejo izboljšanje točnosti klasifikacije po popravku hrupa.', 'ha': "Performance of standard text analytics algorithms are known to be substantially degraded on consumer generated data, which are often very noisy.  Waɗannan algoritori ba su yi aiki mai kyau a kan data na ma'anar firma wanda yana da wani abu mai sãɓãni mai yawa daga danne-danne na News, takardar littafai ko Wikimedia. Tsarin matsayi yana da wata ƙõfa mai lazimta, don ya yi amfani da tafiyar sauti da gyare zuwa gyare-gyare. A lokacin da ake amfani da data na wajen zama masu tsari masu amfani da shi, don haka kuma ana ƙunsa da wasu kayan guda masu yawa da za'a saurãre zuwa wata takarda ɗabi'a, kuma amma, gaskiya ba su so ba. Daga wannan aikin, Munã bãyar da anaƙatan bayani na fassarar data na firma kuma muna shauri metoden da ba'a tsare su ba, kan tsarkaka waɗannan bakarin bakin da aka raba shi farat ɗaya daga maganar sauni na gaske. To, daga bãyansu akwai wasu mãsu sãlihai zuwa ga sãshe. An daidaita aikin metoden a kafin ƙayyade ƙidãya masu shiryarwa na manual game da tsari masu yiwuwa na daidaita ko da waɗanda ke iya amfani da wa gane wa hoton hatsi, inda there za'a sami ƙẽtare su don a gane. Za sami tuna sami matsala za'a nũna ƙari cikin tsari mai daraja a bayan gyãra na sauri.", 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚད སྒྲ་བརྙན་ནང་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འདི་དག་ཀྱང་སྒོངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གནས་ཚུལ་ཆས་དང་storybooks སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཆས་དང་Wikipedia་ཆ ཡི་གེའི་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་ནི་དགོས་མཁན་གྱི་གྲལ་རིམ་ཞིག་བདེ་སྐྱིད་གཏོང་དང་། ལས་སྒྲུང་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྒེར་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དགོས་པས་དེ་ནང་དུ་ཌུམ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན In this work we present detailed analysis of characteristics of enterprise data and suggest unsupervised methods for cleaning these repositories after domain terms have been automatically segregated from true noise terms. སྐད་ཡུལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སུ་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་བཟོ་ཚུལ་འདི་དམིགས་ཟབ་སྟངས་གཏོང་གི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲངས་རྩིས་འགྱུར་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'ScopeIt : Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'ar': 'ScopeIt: تحديد نطاق الجمل ذات الصلة بالمهمة في المستندات', 'fr': 'ScopeIt\xa0: cadrage des phrases pertinentes pour les tâches dans les documents', 'es': 'ScopeIt: determinar el alcance de las oraciones relevantes en los documentos', 'pt': 'ScopeIt: Escopo de tarefas relevantes sentenças em documentos', 'ja': 'ScopeIt:ドキュメント内の関連する文章のスコーピングタスク', 'zh': '限:定在文档中句', 'hi': 'ScopeIt: दस्तावेज़ों में कार्य प्रासंगिक वाक्यों को स्कोप करना', 'ru': 'ScopeIt: Задача определения объема соответствующих предложений в документах', 'ga': 'ScopeIt: Tasc Scópála Pianbhreitheanna Ábhartha i nDoiciméid', 'ka': 'ScopeIt: დავალების შესაბამისი სიტყვები დოკუმენტებში', 'el': 'Πεδίο εφαρμογής: Σχετικές προτάσεις σε έγγραφα', 'hu': 'ScopeIt: Hatóköri feladat releváns mondatok a dokumentumokban', 'it': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Sentenze rilevanti nei documenti', 'ms': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'kk': 'ScopeIt: Құжаттардың тапсырмалардың жалпы сөздерін көрсету', 'mk': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'lt': 'Taikymo sritisIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'mn': 'ScopeIt: Дасгал дээрх хамааралтай үг', 'no': 'ScopeIt: Poeng for oppgåvetilsvarande teikn i dokument', 'pl': 'ScopeIt: Zakres zadań istotnych zdań w dokumentach', 'ml': 'It: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'sr': 'ScopeIt: Rezerviranje odgovarajućih rečenica zadataka u dokumentima', 'mt': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'so': 'Shirkad', 'ta': 'அது: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'ro': 'ScopeIt: Domeniul de aplicare al activității Sentințe relevante în documente', 'si': 'ScopeIt: වැඩේ සම්බන්ධ වාර්තා', 'sv': 'ScopeIt: Omfattningsuppgift Relevanta meningar i dokument', 'ur': 'اسکاپیٹ: دکھانے میں ٹاکس مرتبہ سنٹنس', 'uz': 'It: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'vi': 'Phạm vi Nó: Xem xét các câu liên quan nhiệm vụ trong tài liệu', 'bg': 'Обхват: Обхват на задачата Съответни изречения в документи', 'nl': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Taakrelevante zinnen in documenten', 'da': 'ScopeIt: Anvendelsesområde Relevante sætninger i dokumenter', 'hr': 'ScopeIt: Pogledni odgovarajući izrazi zadataka u dokumentima', 'de': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevante Sätze in Dokumenten', 'id': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'fa': 'ScopeIt: نمایش کلمات مربوط به کار در سند', 'sw': 'It: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'tr': 'Senedler', 'af': 'Telling: Telling Opdrag Relevant Utdrukkings in Dokumente', 'sq': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'am': 'it: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'ko': 'ScopeIt: 문서에서 작업과 관련된 문장의 범위를 결정합니다.', 'hy': 'It: Գործողական դասություններ ներկայացնելը փաստաթղթերում', 'az': 'ScopeIt: ńįsmarńĪŇülarda iŇül…ôri m√ľqayis…ôd…ô ifad…ô edir', 'bn': 'স্কোপ', 'bs': 'ScopeIt: Rezerviranje odgovarajućih kazna zadataka u dokumentima', 'ca': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'cs': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevantní věty v dokumentech', 'et': 'ScopeIt: Dokumentides sisalduvate asjakohaste lausete ulatus', 'fi': 'ScopeIt: Tehtävän merkityksellisten lauseiden soveltamisala asiakirjoissa', 'he': 'ScopeIt: Scoping Task Relevant Sentences in Documents', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'It: scoring job Relevant Curons in Documents', 'sk': 'Področje uporabe: Obseg opravila ustreznih stavkov v dokumentih', 'bo': 'ཚད་འཛིན：ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསུབ་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས'}
{'en': 'A prominent problem faced by conversational agents working with large documents (Eg : email-based assistants) is the frequent presence of information in the document that is irrelevant to the assistant. This in turn makes it harder for the agent to accurately detect intents, extract entities relevant to those intents and perform the desired action. To address this issue we present a neural model for scoping relevant information for the agent from a large document. We show that when used as the first step in a popularly used email-based assistant for helping users schedule meetings, our proposed model helps improve the performance of the intent detection and entity extraction tasks required by the agent for correctly scheduling meetings : across a suite of 6 downstream tasks, by using our proposed method, we observe an average gain of 35 % in precision without any drop in recall. Additionally, we demonstrate that the same approach can be used for component level analysis in large documents, such as signature block identification.', 'ar': 'إحدى المشكلات البارزة التي يواجهها وكلاء المحادثة الذين يعملون مع المستندات الكبيرة (على سبيل المثال: المساعدون القائمون على البريد الإلكتروني) هي التواجد المتكرر للمعلومات في المستند التي لا تمت بصلة إلى المساعد. وهذا بدوره يجعل من الصعب على الوكيل اكتشاف النوايا بدقة واستخراج الكيانات ذات الصلة بتلك المقاصد وتنفيذ الإجراء المطلوب. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا لتحديد نطاق المعلومات ذات الصلة للعامل من مستند كبير. نوضح أنه عند استخدامه كخطوة أولى في مساعد مستند إلى البريد الإلكتروني شائع الاستخدام لمساعدة المستخدمين على جدولة الاجتماعات ، فإن نموذجنا المقترح يساعد على تحسين أداء مهام الكشف عن النية واستخراج الكيانات المطلوبة من قبل الوكيل لجدولة الاجتماعات بشكل صحيح: عبر مجموعة من 6 مهام متتالية ، باستخدام طريقتنا المقترحة ، نلاحظ ربحًا متوسطًا بنسبة 35 ٪ في الدقة دون أي انخفاض في الاسترجاع. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نوضح أنه يمكن استخدام نفس الأسلوب لتحليل مستوى المكون في المستندات الكبيرة ، مثل تحديد كتلة التوقيع.', 'pt': 'Um problema proeminente enfrentado por agentes conversacionais que trabalham com documentos grandes (por exemplo: assistentes baseados em e-mail) é a presença frequente de informações no documento que são irrelevantes para o assistente. Isso, por sua vez, torna mais difícil para o agente detectar intenções com precisão, extrair entidades relevantes para essas intenções e executar a ação desejada. Para resolver esse problema, apresentamos um modelo neural para definir o escopo de informações relevantes para o agente de um documento grande. Mostramos que, quando usado como a primeira etapa em um assistente baseado em e-mail popularmente usado para ajudar os usuários a agendar reuniões, nosso modelo proposto ajuda a melhorar o desempenho das tarefas de detecção de intenção e extração de entidade exigidas pelo agente para agendar reuniões corretamente: em um conjunto de 6 tarefas a jusante, usando nosso método proposto, observamos um ganho médio de 35% na precisão sem nenhuma queda no recall. Além disso, demonstramos que a mesma abordagem pode ser usada para análise em nível de componente em documentos grandes, como identificação de bloco de assinatura.', 'fr': "Un problème majeur rencontré par les agents conversationnels travaillant avec des documents volumineux (par exemple\xa0: assistants par e-mail) est la présence fréquente d'informations dans le document qui ne sont pas pertinentes pour l'assistant. Cela rend plus difficile pour l'agent la détection précise des intentions, l'extraction des entités pertinentes par rapport à ces intentions et l'exécution de l'action souhaitée. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous présentons un modèle neuronal permettant de définir les informations pertinentes pour l'agent à partir d'un document volumineux. Nous montrons que lorsqu'il est utilisé comme première étape dans un assistant de messagerie électronique couramment utilisé pour aider les utilisateurs à planifier des réunions, notre modèle proposé contribue à améliorer les performances des tâches de détection d'intention et d'extraction d'entités requises par l'agent pour planifier correctement les réunions\xa0: à travers une suite de 6 tâches en aval , en utilisant la méthode que nous proposons, nous observons un gain moyen de 35\xa0% en précision sans aucune baisse du rappel. En outre, nous démontrons que la même approche peut être utilisée pour l'analyse au niveau des composants dans des documents volumineux, tels que l'identification de blocs de signature.", 'es': 'Un problema importante al que se enfrentan los agentes conversacionales que trabajan con documentos grandes (por ejemplo, asistentes basados en correo electrónico) es la presencia frecuente de información en el documento que es irrelevante para el asistente. Esto, a su vez, hace que sea más difícil para el agente detectar con precisión las intenciones, extraer entidades relevantes para esas intenciones y realizar la acción deseada. Para abordar este problema, presentamos un modelo neuronal para analizar la información relevante para el agente de un documento grande. Demostramos que cuando se utiliza como primer paso en un asistente de correo electrónico de uso popular para ayudar a los usuarios a programar reuniones, nuestro modelo propuesto ayuda a mejorar el rendimiento de las tareas de detección de intenciones y extracción de entidades que requiere el agente para programar correctamente las reuniones: en un conjunto de 6 tareas posteriores , mediante el uso de nuestro método propuesto, observamos una ganancia media del 35% en precisión sin ninguna disminución en la memoria. Además, demostramos que se puede utilizar el mismo enfoque para el análisis a nivel de componente en documentos grandes, como la identificación de bloques de firmas.', 'ja': '大きな文書を扱う会話エージェント（例：電子メールベースのアシスタント）が直面している目立った問題は、アシスタントに関係のない文書内の情報が頻繁に存在することです。 これにより、エージェントはインテントを正確に検出し、それらのインテントに関連するエンティティを抽出し、所望のアクションを実行することが困難になります。 この問題に対処するために、大規模な文書からエージェントの関連情報をスコープ化するためのニューラルモデルを提示します。 一般的に使用されているメールベースのアシスタントを使用して会議をスケジュールする際の最初のステップとして、提案されているモデルは、エージェントが会議を正しくスケジュールするために必要なインテント検出とエンティティ抽出タスクのパフォーマンスを向上させるのに役立ちます。6つのダウンストリームタスクのスイートでは、提案されている方法を使用することで、リコールを減らすことなく、平均35%の精度の向上を観察できます。 さらに、署名ブロックの識別など、大規模な文書のコンポーネントレベルの分析にも同じアプローチが使用できることを実証します。', 'zh': '治大文档之谓摄(:电子邮件之佐)临之者,文档之常存也。 此又使代更难准测,取与此意相关而操之。 为此一神经,以定消息之文档。 吾当以电子邮件之助助用户先定会议,吾言模样有助于摄会议之意,检测实体取任之性:用吾所言,在一6下流,观平均精度增35%,而召率无降。 又验同法于大文档中组件级,如署名标识。', 'hi': 'बड़े दस्तावेजों (जैसे: ईमेल-आधारित सहायकों) के साथ काम करने वाले संवादी एजेंटों द्वारा सामना की जाने वाली एक प्रमुख समस्या दस्तावेज़ में जानकारी की लगातार उपस्थिति है जो सहायक के लिए अप्रासंगिक है। बदले में यह एजेंट के लिए इरादों का सटीक रूप से पता लगाने, उन इरादों के लिए प्रासंगिक संस्थाओं को निकालने और वांछित कार्रवाई करने के लिए कठिन बनाता है। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए हम एक बड़े दस्तावेज़ से एजेंट के लिए प्रासंगिक जानकारी को स्कोप करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि जब उपयोगकर्ताओं को मीटिंग शेड्यूल करने में मदद करने के लिए एक लोकप्रिय रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले ईमेल-आधारित सहायक में पहले चरण के रूप में उपयोग किया जाता है, तो हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल सही ढंग से शेड्यूलिंग मीटिंग के लिए एजेंट द्वारा आवश्यक इरादे का पता लगाने और इकाई निष्कर्षण कार्यों के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने में मदद करता है: 6 डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के एक सूट में, हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि का उपयोग करके, हम याद में किसी भी बूंद के बिना परिशुद्धता में 35% का औसत लाभ देखते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि एक ही दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग बड़े दस्तावेज़ों में घटक स्तर के विश्लेषण के लिए किया जा सकता है, जैसे हस्ताक्षर ब्लॉक पहचान।', 'ru': 'Серьезной проблемой, с которой сталкиваются агенты, работающие с большими документами (например, ассистенты на основе электронной почты), является частое наличие в документе информации, которая не имеет отношения к ассистенту. Это, в свою очередь, затрудняет агенту точное обнаружение намерений, извлечение сущностей, имеющих отношение к этим намерениям, и выполнение требуемого действия. Для решения этой проблемы мы представляем нейронную модель для определения объема соответствующей информации для агента из большого документа. Мы показываем, что при использовании в качестве первого шага в популярном помощнике на основе электронной почты для помощи пользователям в планировании встреч, наша предлагаемая модель помогает улучшить выполнение задач обнаружения намерений и извлечения сущностей, требуемых агентом для правильного планирования встреч: в наборе из 6 задач ниже по потоку, используя наш предлагаемый метод, мы наблюдаем среднее увеличение на 35% с точностью без какого-либо снижения отзыва. Кроме того, мы демонстрируем, что один и тот же подход может быть использован для анализа уровня компонентов в больших документах, таких как идентификация блока подписи.', 'ga': 'Fadhb shuntasach a bhíonn le sárú ag gníomhairí comhrá a bhíonn ag obair le doiciméid mhóra (M.sh.: cúntóirí bunaithe ar ríomhphost) is ea faisnéis nach mbaineann le hábhar don chúntóir a bheith sa doiciméad go minic. Dá bharr sin bíonn sé níos deacra don oibreán intinní a bhrath go cruinn, aonáin a bhaineann leis na hintinní sin a bhaint amach agus an gníomh atá ag teastáil a dhéanamh. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo cuirimid múnla néarúil i láthair chun faisnéis ábhartha don ghníomhaire a scóipeáil ó dhoiciméad mór. Léirímid nuair a úsáidtear é mar an chéad chéim i gcúntóir ríomhphoist a úsáidtear go coitianta chun cabhrú le húsáideoirí cruinnithe a sceidealú, cabhraíonn ár múnla atá beartaithe le feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht na dtascanna braite hintinn agus eastóscadh eintitis a theastaíonn ón ngníomhaire le haghaidh cruinnithe a sceidealú i gceart: thar shraith as 6 thasc iartheachtacha, trí úsáid a bhaint as an modh atá molta againn, feicimid meánghnóthachan cruinnis 35% gan aon laghdú ar aisghairm. Ina theannta sin, léirímid gur féidir an cur chuige céanna a úsáid le haghaidh anailíse ar leibhéal na gcomhpháirteanna i ndoiciméid mhóra, mar shainaithint bloc sínithe.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა, რომლებიც დიდი დოკუმენტებით მუშაობენ კონტრაციო ადვნენტებით, რომლებიც მუშაობენ დიდი დოკუმენტებით (ვუ: ელფოსტური დაფართებული ამის შესახებ ადვნენტის უფრო რთული იქნება, რომ მართლად განახსნა მისამართები, განახსნა ინტერტიები, რომლებიც ამ მისამართებისთვის მნიშვნელოვანია და მოთხოვნილი მო ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნეიროლური მოდელის შესაბამისი ინფორმაცია ადვნენტისთვის დიდი დოკუმენტიდან. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ, რომ როდესაც მოიყენებულია პირველი კონფიგურაციაში მომხმარებელი სექსტურაციისთვის, როდესაც მომხმარებელი სექსტურაციის დახმარებისთვის მომხმარებელი სექსტურაციისთვის პირველი კონფიგურაცია და ინტერტიკური ექს ჩვენ დავხედავთ საშუალოდ 35%-ის განმავლობას წარმოდგენით. დამატებით, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ იგივე პროგრამა შეიძლება გამოყენება კომპონტენტის დოკუმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის დიდი დოკუმენტებში, როგორ', 'hu': 'A nagyméretű dokumentumokkal dolgozó beszélgető ügynökök (pl. e-mail alapú asszisztensek) kiemelkedő problémája a dokumentumban található olyan információk gyakori jelenléte, amelyek az asszisztens számára irrelevánsak. Ez viszont megnehezíti az ügynök számára, hogy pontosan felismerje a szándékokat, kivonja az e szándékok szempontjából releváns entitásokat és végrehajtsa a kívánt műveletet. A probléma megoldásához bemutatunk egy neurális modellt, amelynek segítségével az ügynök számára releváns információkat határozzuk meg egy nagy dokumentumból. Megmutatjuk, hogy amikor egy népszerűen használt e-mail alapú asszisztens első lépéseként használjuk a felhasználók értekezleteinek ütemezésére, javasolt modellünk segít javítani az ügynök által az értekezletek helyes ütemezéséhez szükséges szándék észlelési és entitáskivonási feladatok teljesítményét: 6 downstream feladatból álló csomagban, javasolt módszerünkkel, 35%-os átlagos pontosságnövekedést figyelünk meg anélkül, hogy visszahívnánk. Ezenkívül bebizonyítjuk, hogy ugyanez a megközelítés alkalmazható alkatrészszintű elemzéshez nagy dokumentumokban, mint például az aláírási blokk azonosítása.', 'it': "Un problema importante affrontato dagli agenti conversazionali che lavorano con documenti di grandi dimensioni (ad esempio: assistenti basati su email) è la frequente presenza di informazioni nel documento che sono irrilevanti per l'assistente. Questo a sua volta rende più difficile per l'agente rilevare con precisione gli intenti, estrarre entità pertinenti a tali intenti ed eseguire l'azione desiderata. Per affrontare questo problema presentiamo un modello neurale per l'acquisizione di informazioni rilevanti per l'agente da un documento di grandi dimensioni. Dimostriamo che quando viene utilizzato come primo passo in un assistente basato su e-mail comunemente utilizzato per aiutare gli utenti a pianificare le riunioni, il nostro modello proposto aiuta a migliorare le prestazioni delle attività di rilevamento degli intenti e estrazione delle entità richieste dall'agente per pianificare correttamente le riunioni: attraverso una suite di 6 attività a valle, utilizzando il nostro metodo proposto, Osserviamo un guadagno medio del 35% in precisione senza alcun calo nel richiamo. Inoltre, dimostriamo che lo stesso approccio può essere utilizzato per l'analisi a livello di componenti in documenti di grandi dimensioni, come l'identificazione dei blocchi di firma.", 'lt': 'Svarbi problema, su kuria susiduria dideliais dokumentais dirbantys pokalbių agentai (pvz.: elektroniniu paštu pagrįsti asistentai), yra dažnas informacijos pateikimas dokumente, kuris nėra svarbus asistentui. Dėl to agentui sunkiau tiksliai nustatyti ketinimus, išimti subjektus, susijusius su tais ketinimais, ir imtis pageidaujamų veiksmų. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, pristatome nervinį model į, pagal kurį gaunama svarbi agento informacija iš didelio dokumento. Mes parodome, kad, kaip pirmasis žingsnis populiariai naudojamame el. pašto pagalbininke, padedančiame naudotojams susitikti tvarkaraščiu, mūsų siūlomas modelis padeda pagerinti tikslų nustatymo ir subjektų gavimo užduočių, kurias agent as reikalauja tinkamai tvarkaraščiuojant susitikimus, vykdymą: per šešias tolesnes užduotis, taikant mūsų siūlomą metodą, Tiksliai stebime vidutinį 35 % padidėjimą, tačiau nepamažėja atmetimo. Be to, mes įrodome, kad tas pats metodas gali būti taikomas atliekant sudedamųjų dalių lygio analizę dideliuose dokumentuose, pvz., pasirašymo bloko identifikavime.', 'el': 'Ένα εμφανές πρόβλημα που αντιμετωπίζουν οι συνομιλητές που εργάζονται με μεγάλα έγγραφα (π.χ. βοηθοί με ηλεκτρονικό ταχυδρομείο) είναι η συχνή παρουσία πληροφοριών στο έγγραφο που δεν έχουν σχέση με τον βοηθό. Αυτό με τη σειρά του καθιστά δυσκολότερο για τον πράκτορα να ανιχνεύσει με ακρίβεια τις προθέσεις, να εξαγάγει οντότητες σχετικές με αυτές τις προθέσεις και να εκτελέσει την επιθυμητή ενέργεια. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα παρουσιάζουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο για την εύρεση σχετικών πληροφοριών για τον παράγοντα από ένα μεγάλο έγγραφο. Δείχνουμε ότι όταν χρησιμοποιείται ως το πρώτο βήμα σε έναν ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενο βοηθό ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου για να βοηθήσει τους χρήστες να προγραμματίσουν συναντήσεις, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μας βοηθά στη βελτίωση της απόδοσης των εργασιών ανίχνευσης προθέσεων και εξαγωγής οντότητας που απαιτούνται από τον πράκτορα για τον σωστό προγραμματισμό συσκέψεων: σε μια σειρά από έξι μεταγενέστερες εργασίες, χρησιμοποιώντας την προτεινόμενη μέθοδο μας, παρατηρούμε ένα μέσο κέρδος 35% στην ακρίβεια χωρίς καμία πτώση στην ανάκληση. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η ίδια προσέγγιση μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για ανάλυση σε επίπεδο συστατικού σε μεγάλα έγγραφα, όπως η αναγνώριση μπλοκ υπογραφής.', 'mk': 'A prominent problem faced by conversational agents working with large documents (Eg: email-based assistants) is the frequent presence of information in the document that is irrelevant to the assistant.  Ова потешко го прави агентот прецизно да ги детектира намерите, да ги извади ентитетите релевантни за тие намери и да ја изврши желбата. За да го решиме ова прашање претставуваме нервен модел за проверка на релевантни информации за агентот од голем документ. Ние покажуваме дека кога се користи како прв чекор во популарно употребен помошник базиран на електронска пошта за помош на корисниците во распоредувањето на состаноците, нашиот предложен модел помага да се подобри извршувањето на задачите за детекција на намерите и извлекување ентитети потребни од агентот за правилно распоредување на состаноците:  Набљудуваме просечен зголемување од 35% во прецизност без никаков пад на сеќавање. Покрај тоа, демонстрираме дека истиот пристап може да се користи за анализа на нивото на компонентите во големите документи, како што е идентификацијата на блокот на потпис.', 'kk': 'Көмекшіге маңызды мәлімет бар құжаттың көмегімен жұмыс істеген сұрақ агенттерінің көмекшілеріне қатысты мәліметі. Бұл, агенттің мақсаттарын дұрыс анықтау, оның мақсаттарына сәйкесті нысандарды тарқату және қалаған әрекетті орындау үшін қиын болады. Бұл мәселені шешу үшін, агенттің маңызды мәліметті үлкен құжаттан сұрау үшін невралдық моделін келтіреміз. Біз пайдаланушыларды жоспарлау кезінде көмектесетін эл. пошта негізінде бірінші қадам ретінде қолданылсын дегенді көрсету үшін, біздің таңдалған моделіміз, агенттің дұрыс жоспарлау кезінде талап етілген тұрақты тапсырмаларды табу және бөліктерді тарқату тапсырмалары Біз еске салуға болмай орташа 35% дегенді қараймыз. Сонымен қатар, біз бұл жағдай үлкен құжаттардың компоненттің деңгейін анализ үшін қолтаңбалау блок идентификациясы секілді қолданылатын деңгейі қолданылады.', 'mn': 'Том баримтуудтай ажилладаг ярианы агентуудын тухай маш чухал асуудал (Эг: эл. поштаар суурилсан тусламжтайгаар) бол тусламжтайгаа хамаагүй баримтуудын ихэвчлэн мэдээлэл байдаг. Үүний хувьд агент зорилго тодорхойлох, тэдгээр зорилгоор холбоотой зүйлсийг нээж, хүсэлтэй үйл явдлыг хийх нь хэцүү болгодог. Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид том баримтын агентын хамааралтай мэдээллийг олохын тулд мэдрэлийн загвар өгдөг. Бид хэрэглэгчдийн хувилбаруудыг туслахын тулд анхны алхам болгон хэрэглэгдсэн эл. поштаар суурилсан тусламжтайгаар хэрэглэгддэг үед бидний санал загварын загвар нь ажиллах зорилго олох, ажиллах үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахад тусалдаг. Бид дунджаар дунджаар 35% өндөртэй байдаг. Мөн бид ижил арга баримтуудын шинжилгээнд ижил арга баримтуудыг томоохон баримтуудын шинжилгээнд ашиглаж болно.', 'mt': 'Problema prominenti ffaċċjata minn aġenti ta’ konverżjoni li jaħdmu b’dokumenti kbar (eż: assistenti bbażati fuq l-email) hija l-preżenza frekwenti ta’ informazzjoni fid-dokument li mhijiex rilevanti għall-assistent. This in turn makes it harder for the agent to accurately detect intents, extract entities relevant to those intents and perform the desired action.  Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni nippreżentaw mudell newrali għall-iskop ta’ informazzjoni rilevanti għall-a ġent minn dokument kbir. Aħna nuru li meta ntużaw bħala l-ewwel pass f’assistent ibbażat fuq l-email użat b’mod popolari biex jgħin lill-utenti jispeċifikaw laqgħat, il-mudell propost tagħna jgħin itejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-kompiti ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-intenzjoni u estrazzjoni tal-entitajiet meħtieġa mill-a ġent għal laqgħat ta’ skedar korrett: f’sensiela ta’ sitt kompiti downstream, billi juża l-metodu propost tagħna, - josservaw żieda medja ta’ 35% fil-preċiżjoni mingħajr ebda tnaqqis fil-ġbir lura. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu xhieda li l-istess approċċ jista’ jintuża għall-analiżi tal-livell tal-komponenti f’dokumenti kbar, bħall-identifikazzjoni tal-blokk tal-firma.', 'pl': 'Widocznym problemem, z którym borykają się agenci konwersacyjni pracujący z dużymi dokumentami (np. asystenci poczty elektronicznej) jest częsta obecność w dokumencie informacji nieistotnych dla asystenta. To z kolei utrudnia agentowi dokładne wykrycie intencji, wyodrębnienie istotnych dla nich podmiotów i wykonanie pożądanego działania. Aby rozwiązać tę kwestię, przedstawiamy model neuronowy do zakresu istotnych informacji dla agenta z dużego dokumentu. Pokazujemy, że gdy jest to pierwszy krok w popularnie używanym asystencie poczty e-mail, który pomaga użytkownikom planować spotkania, nasz proponowany model pomaga poprawić wydajność zadań wykrywania intencji i ekstrakcji podmiotów wymaganych przez agenta do prawidłowego planowania spotkań: w zestawie sześciu dalszych zadań, przy użyciu naszej proponowanej metody, Zaobserwujemy średni wzrost dokładności 35% bez spadku wycofania. Dodatkowo pokazujemy, że to samo podejście może być stosowane do analizy na poziomie komponentów w dużych dokumentach, takich jak identyfikacja bloków podpisu.', 'ms': 'Masalah terkenal yang dihadapi oleh ejen perbualan yang bekerja dengan dokumen besar (Eg: pembantu berasaskan emel) adalah kehadiran sering maklumat dalam dokumen yang tidak berkaitan dengan pembantu. Ini menjadikan ia lebih sukar bagi ejen untuk mengesan dengan tepat niat, mengekstrak entiti yang berkaitan dengan niat tersebut dan melakukan tindakan yang diinginkan. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami memperkenalkan model saraf untuk menggunakan maklumat berkaitan untuk ejen dari dokumen besar. Kami menunjukkan bahawa apabila digunakan sebagai langkah pertama dalam pembantu berdasarkan e-mel yang digunakan secara populer untuk membantu pengguna jadual mesyuarat, model kami diusulkan membantu memperbaiki prestasi pengesan niat dan tugas ekstraksi entiti yang diperlukan oleh ejen untuk jadual mesyuarat dengan betul: melalui suite 6 tugas turun, dengan menggunakan kaedah kami diusulkan, Kami mengamati pendapatan rata-rata 35% dalam ketepatan tanpa sebarang titik ingatan. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang sama boleh digunakan untuk analisis aras komponen dalam dokumen besar, seperti pengenalisan blok tandatangan.', 'ro': 'O problemă proeminentă cu care se confruntă agenții conversaționali care lucrează cu documente mari (ex: asistenți bazați pe e-mail) este prezența frecventă a informațiilor în document care sunt irelevante pentru asistent. Acest lucru, la rândul său, face mai greu pentru agent să detecteze cu precizie intențiile, să extragă entități relevante pentru aceste intenții și să efectueze acțiunea dorită. Pentru a aborda această problemă vă prezentăm un model neural pentru scopul de aplicare a informațiilor relevante pentru agent dintr-un document mare. Vă arătăm că atunci când este folosit ca prim pas într-un asistent bazat pe e-mail utilizat popular pentru a ajuta utilizatorii să planifice întâlniri, modelul nostru propus ajută la îmbunătățirea performanței activităților de detectare a intențiilor și extragere a entităților necesare de agent pentru programarea corectă a întâlnirilor: într-o suită de 6 sarcini în aval, utilizând metoda propusă, Observăm un câştig mediu de 35% în precizie fără nici o scădere a rechemarii. În plus, demonstrăm că aceeași abordare poate fi utilizată pentru analiza nivelului componentelor în documente mari, cum ar fi identificarea blocurilor de semnătură.', 'ml': 'വലിയ രേഖകളുമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഏജന്\u200dറുകളുടെ മുന്നില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നമായ പ്രശ്നമാണു് (എം: ഇമെയില്\u200d അടിസ ഇതിനുള്ളില്\u200d ഏജന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൃത്യമായി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുവാനും, അതിന്\u200dറെ ഉദ്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ബന്ധമുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പു To address this issue we present a neural model for scoping relevant information for the agent from a large document.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ഈമെയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d മെയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആദ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥിരതയില്\u200d 35% വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഓര്\u200dമ്മയില്ലാതെ ഒരു സാധാരണ വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതലായി നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരേ പ്രായോഗ്യം പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വലിയ രേഖകളില്\u200d ഘടനയുടെ നില വിശ', 'so': "Dhibaato weyn oo ay ka hor jeedaan dhaqaalaha kala hadlayaal oo ka shaqeeya dukumentiyada waaweyn (tusaale: caawiyayaasha emailka) waa joogitaanka macluumaadka ku jira dukumentiga aan u baahnayn qofka caawiyaha ah. Tani waxay u adag tahay in uu dhaqaalaha si saxda ah u ogaado qastiga, in uu soo bixiyo alaabta ay ku xiran yihiin qastiyadaas oo uu sameeyo waxqabadka la doonayo. Si aan u baaraandegiso arimahan waxaan keenaynaa model neurada ah oo u baaraandegista macluumaadka la xiriira dhaqaalaha warqad weyn. Waxaynu muujinnaa in marka lagu isticmaalay koob ugu horeysa ee caawiye u ah boostada emailka ee loo isticmaalay in uu caawiyo shirkadaha isticmaalayaasha, modellkayaga la soo jeeday ayaa caawinaya inuu hagaajiyo joojinta qasabka la'aanta iyo waxyaabaha la soo saaro ee uu dhaqaalaha u baahan yahay shirarka si saxda ah u schedulayo: marxa 6 shaqooyin hoosstream ah, si uu u isticmaalo qaababka la soo jeeday, Waxaynu fiirinaynaa faa'iidada ugu dhexeeya 35% si saxda ah oo aan wax lagu xusuusanayn. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in isku habboon looga isticmaali karo baaritaanka heerka kooxaha ee warqadaha waaweyn, tusaale ahaan aqoonsiga kooxaha saxiibka.", 'sv': 'Ett framträdande problem för samtalspersoner som arbetar med stora dokument (t.ex. e-postbaserade assistenter) är den frekventa förekomsten av information i dokumentet som är irrelevant för assistenten. Detta gör det i sin tur svårare för agenten att exakt upptäcka intentioner, extrahera enheter som är relevanta för dessa intentioner och utföra önskad åtgärd. För att lösa detta problem presenterar vi en neural modell för att undersöka relevant information för agenten från ett stort dokument. Vi visar att när vår föreslagna modell används som första steget i en allmänt använd e-postbaserad assistent för att hjälpa användare att schemalägga möten, hjälper den till att förbättra prestandan för avsiktsdetektering och entitetsextraktion som krävs av agenten för korrekt schemaläggning av möten: över en svit med 6 nedströmsuppgifter, genom att använda vår föreslagna metod, Vi observerar en genomsnittlig ökning på 35% i precision utan någon minskning av återkallandet. Dessutom visar vi att samma metod kan användas för komponentnivåanalys i stora dokument, till exempel identifiering av signaturblock.', 'no': 'Eit viktig problem med samtaleagentar som arbeider med store dokument (eg: e- postbaserte assistentar) er den ofte tilgjengelege informasjonen i dokumentet som ikkje er relevant til assistenten. Dette gjer at agenten er vanskeleg å oppdaga nøyaktig vilkår, pakka ut einingar som er relevante for desse vilkåra og utføra den ønskte handlinga. For å handtera dette problemet, presenterer vi eit neuralmodell for å finna relevant informasjon for agent frå eit stor dokument. Vi viser at når det er brukt som første steg i ein populært brukt e-post-assistent for å hjelpa brukarar for å planlegge møtar, vil vår foreslått modell hjelpa til å forbedra utviklinga av målsettinga for å finna oppgåva som agenten krev for rett planlegging av møtar: gjennom eit suite av 6 nedstremde oppgåver, ved å bruka vår foreslått metode, Vi observerer eit gjennomsnittlig fjøring av 35 % i nøyaktig utan noko nedgang i rekninga. I tillegg viser vi at samme tilnærming kan brukast for komponentnenivåanalyse i store dokument, som signaturblokkeidentifisering.', 'ur': 'ایک بڑے دکھانے کے ساتھ کام کرنے والے مکالمانی اگنٹوں کے سامنے ایک بڑا مشکل ہے (اگ: ایمیل بنیاد رسالٹ) اس دکھانے میں بہت زیادہ معلومات کی موجودگی ہے جو مددگار کے لئے غیر اہم ہے. اس طرح اہینٹ کے لئے مطمئن ہونے کے لئے اس سے زیادہ مشکل ہوتا ہے، ان کے لئے موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں اور خواہش کے کام کرنا۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک نئورل موڈل کو ایک بڑے دکھانے سے اگنٹ کے لئے معاملہ کی اسکوپ کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب ایک جماعت میں پہلی سٹح کے طور پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے کہ اسے کارساز سٹِڈِل ملاقات کی مدد کرنے کے لئے ایمیل بنیادی مددگار بنا رہا ہے، ہماری پیشنهاد مدل نے اگنٹ کے مطابق سیدھی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طریقے سے 6 ڈونسٹریم ٹاکس کے سٹے میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے، ہم مضبوط 35% کے متوسط فائدہ کو یاد کے بغیر دیکھتے ہیں۔ اور اضافہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایک ہی طریقہ بڑے دفتروں میں رقم سطح تحلیل کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، جیسے اضافہ بلوک شناسایی.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු ලිපින්තුවක් සමග වැඩ කරනවා වාර්තාවක් නියෝජිතයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම් මේක අවස්ථාවෙන් නියෝජිතයාට අවස්ථාවක් හොයාගන්න, ඒ අවස්ථාවට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න සහ අවශ්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාවක් කරන් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න අපි ලොකු ලිපින්තුවෙන් නියෝරාල් මොඩේල් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ නියෝරාල් මොඩ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ජාතිකයෙන් පළමු පැත්තක් විදියට භාවිතා කරලා ඉමෙල් අධාරිත සහායකයෙන් පාවිච්චි විදියට උදව් කරන්න, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සහ ජාතිකයෙන් අවශ අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ 35% විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙන්නේ කිසිම දෙයක්  තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා එකම ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ලොකු', 'sr': 'Veliki problem sa kojim se suočavaju razgovorni agenti koji rade sa velikim dokumentima (Eg: pomoćnici na e-mailu) je često prisustvo informacija u dokumentu koji nije važna asistentu. To je u turn teže da agent precizno otkrije namjere, izvadi entitate koje su relevantne za te namjere i izvrši željenu akciju. Da riješimo ovaj problem, predstavljamo neuralni model za izvlačenje važnih informacija za agent a iz velikog dokumenta. Pokazujemo da kada se koristi kao prvi korak u popularnom korištenom asistentu na e-mailu za pomoæ korisnicima u rasporedu sastanaka, naš predloženi model pomaže da poboljšava izvršnost namjernih zadataka za otkrivanje i izvlačenje objekata koje je agent zahtevao za ispravno raspoređenje sastanaka: preko apartmana od 6 zadataka u skladu sa našim predloženim metodom, Primijetimo prosječni dobitak od 35% u preciznosti bez ikakvog pad na pamćenje. Osim toga, pokazujemo da se isti pristup može koristiti za analizu nivoa komponenta u velikim dokumentima, poput identifikacije bloka potpisivanja.', 'ta': 'Name இது மாற்றுவது சரியாக கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் முகவரிக்கு அது கடினமாக செய்கிறது, அந்த இலக்குகளுடன் தொடர்புடைய பொருள்களை வெ இந்த பிரச்சினையை முகவரிக்க நாம் ஒரு பெரிய ஆவணத்தில் இருந்து முகவரிக்கு தொடர்புடைய தகவல்களை வரையறு நாம் காண்பிக்கும் பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மின்னஞ்சல் அடிப்படையாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முதல் படி மின்னஞ்சல் உதவி பயனர் திட்டத்தை உதவும் போது, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி முறையில் சரியாக திட்டமிடு நாங்கள் சராசரி சரியான 35% வெற்றி பார்க்கிறோம் நினைவில் எந்த துளை இல்லாமல். கூடுதலாக, நாம் அதே வழியை காட்டுகிறோம் பெரிய ஆவணங்களில் கையொப்பு தொகுதி அடையாளம் போன்ற பொருள் நிலை ஆய்வுக்கு அதே', 'uz': "Name Bu aytish uchun ajratilga tashkilotni tasdiqlash mumkin, bu qanday bog'liq narsalarni ajratish va talab qilingan amalni bajarish mumkin. Bu muammani boshqarish uchun biz katta hujjatdagi muhim maʼlumotni ajratish uchun neyrol modelini koʻrsatimiz. Biz birinchi qadam ishlatilgan foydalanuvchilarga tayyorlash uchun foydalanuvchilarga foydalanadigan foydalanuvchi asosiy sifatida foydalanayotganda, yaxshi modelmiz o'zgarishni saqlash uchun tayyorlash kerak bo'lgan vazifalarni bajarishiga yordam beradi: Biz tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz, taxminan hech qanday qo'shilmagan 35% yordamga qaramamiz. Koʻrsatgich, biz bir xil usulni ko'rsatib beramiz, katta hujjatdagi qiymat bogʻ'liqni aniqlash uchun bir xizmat ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Một vấn đề nổi bật đối mặt với các nhân viên đối thoại làm việc với các tài liệu lớn (Eg: Trợ lý có căn cứ email) là sự có mặt thường xuyên của thông tin trong tài liệu không liên quan đến trợ lý. Việc này khiến đặc vụ khó phát hiện chính xác các thực thể có liên quan đến các mục đích và thực hiện các hành động được yêu cầu. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi có một mô hình thần kinh để tìm kiếm thông tin liên quan tới mật vụ từ một tài liệu lớn. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng khi được sử dụng như bước đầu tiên trong một trợ lý dựa trên email phổ biến để giúp người dùng sắp xếp các cuộc gặp, mẫu đề nghị của chúng tôi giúp cải thiện khả năng thực hiện các nhiệm vụ định vị và thực thể được yêu cầu bởi người đại diện để sắp xếp các cuộc gặp đúng quy trình: qua một loạt các công việc xuôi dòng sáu, bằng cách dùng phương pháp đã đề nghị, chúng tôi quan sát một khả năng cao trung bình của 35. với độ chính xác mà không bị giảm thu hồi. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng phương pháp tương tự có thể dùng cho việc phân tích cấp thành phần trong các tài liệu lớn, như việc xác định khối ký.', 'bg': 'Известен проблем, пред който са изправени разговорните агенти, работещи с големи документи (напр.: помощници, базирани на имейл), е честото присъствие на информация в документа, която е без значение за асистента. Това от своя страна затруднява агента да открива точно намерения, да извлича субекти, свързани с тези намерения, и да извършва желаното действие. За решаване на този проблем представяме невронен модел за определяне на съответната информация за агента от голям документ. Показваме, че когато се използва като първа стъпка в популярно използван имейл базиран асистент за подпомагане на потребителите да планират срещи, нашият предложен модел помага да се подобри изпълнението на задачите за откриване на намерения и извличане на обекти, изисквани от агента за правилно планиране на срещи: в пакет от 6 задачи надолу по веригата, като се използва нашия предложен метод, наблюдаваме средно увеличение на точността от 35%, без никакъв спад в припомнянето. Освен това демонстрираме, че същият подход може да се използва за анализ на ниво компоненти в големи документи, като например идентификация на блок подпис.', 'da': 'Et fremtrædende problem for samtaleagenter, der arbejder med store dokumenter (f.eks. e-mail-baserede assistenter), er den hyppige tilstedeværelse af oplysninger i dokumentet, der er irrelevante for assistenten. Dette gør det igen sværere for agenten at opdage hensigter nøjagtigt, udtrække enheder, der er relevante for disse hensigter og udføre den ønskede handling. For at løse dette problem præsenterer vi en neural model til måling af relevante oplysninger for agenten fra et stort dokument. Vi viser, at når vores foreslåede model bruges som første skridt i en populært anvendt e-mail-baseret assistent til at hjælpe brugerne med at planlægge møder, hjælper vores foreslåede model med at forbedre ydeevnen af de hensigtsedetekterings- og enhedsudtrækningsopgaver, som agenten kræver for korrekt planlægning af møder: på tværs af en suite af 6 downstream-opgaver ved hjælp af vores foreslåede metode, Vi observerer en gennemsnitlig gevinst på 35% i præcision uden nogen fald i tilbagekaldelse. Derudover viser vi, at samme fremgangsmåde kan anvendes til komponentanalyse i store dokumenter, såsom identifikation af signaturblok.', 'nl': 'Een prominent probleem voor gespreksagenten die met grote documenten werken (bijv. e-mailassistenten) is de frequente aanwezigheid van informatie in het document die irrelevant is voor de assistent. Dit maakt het op zijn beurt moeilijker voor de agent om intenties nauwkeurig te detecteren, entiteiten die relevant zijn voor die intenties te extraheren en de gewenste actie uit te voeren. Om dit probleem aan te pakken presenteren we een neuraal model voor het scopen van relevante informatie voor de agent uit een groot document. We laten zien dat wanneer ons voorgestelde model wordt gebruikt als de eerste stap in een veelgebruikte e-mailassistent om gebruikers te helpen vergaderingen te plannen, de prestaties van de taken voor intentiedetectie en entiteitsextractie die de agent nodig heeft om vergaderingen correct te plannen, verbetert: voor een reeks van zes downstreamtaken, met behulp van onze voorgestelde methode, We zien een gemiddelde toename van 35% in precisie zonder enige daling van terugroeping. Daarnaast tonen we aan dat dezelfde aanpak kan worden gebruikt voor analyse op componentniveau in grote documenten, zoals identificatie van handtekeningblokken.', 'hr': 'Veliki problem s kojim se suočavaju razgovorni agenti koji rade s velikim dokumentima (Eg: pomoćnici na e-mailu) je često prisustvo informacija u dokumentu koji nije bitan asistentu. To je u turn teže za agenta precizno otkriti namjere, izvući subjekte koje su relevantne za te namjere i izvršiti željenu akciju. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predstavljamo neuralni model za skupljanje važnih informacija za agent a iz velikog dokumenta. Pokazujemo da kad se koristi kao prvi korak u popularnom korištenom pomoćniku na e-mailu za pomoć sastanku rasporeda korisnika, naš predloženi model pomaže poboljšati učinkovitost namjere otkrivanja i izvlačenja objekata koje je agent zahtijevao za ispravno raspoređivanje sastanka: kroz apartman od 6 zadataka, koristeći našu predloženu metodu, Primjeđujemo prosječni dobitak od 35% u preciznosti bez ikakvog pad sjećanja. Osim toga, pokazujemo da se isti pristup može koristiti za analizu razine komponenta u velikim dokumentima, poput identifikacije bloka potpisa.', 'id': 'Sebuah masalah terkenal yang dihadapi oleh agen percakapan yang bekerja dengan dokumen besar (Eg: asisten berdasarkan email) adalah kehadiran sering informasi dalam dokumen yang tidak relevan untuk asisten. Ini membuatnya lebih sulit bagi agen untuk mendeteksi dengan akurat niat, mengekstrak entitas yang relevan untuk niat tersebut dan melakukan tindakan yang diinginkan. To address this issue we present a neural model for scoping relevant information for the agent from a large document.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa ketika digunakan sebagai langkah pertama dalam asisten berdasarkan email yang digunakan secara populer untuk membantu pengguna jadwal pertemuan, model kami diusulkan membantu memperbaiki prestasi penemuan niat dan tugas ekstraksi entitas yang diperlukan oleh agen untuk jadwal pertemuan dengan benar: melalui suite dari 6 tugas turun, dengan menggunakan metode kami diusulkan, Kita memperhatikan keuntungan rata-rata 35% dengan presisi tanpa jatuh ingatan. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang sama dapat digunakan untuk analisis tingkat komponen dalam dokumen besar, seperti identifikasi blok tanda tangan.', 'de': 'Ein prominentes Problem von Gesprächspartnern, die mit großen Dokumenten arbeiten (z. B. E-Mail-basierte Assistenten), ist das häufige Vorhandensein von Informationen im Dokument, die für den Assistenten irrelevant sind. Dies wiederum erschwert es dem Agenten, Absichten genau zu erkennen, für diese Absichten relevante Entitäten zu extrahieren und die gewünschte Aktion auszuführen. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, stellen wir ein neuronales Modell vor, um relevante Informationen für den Agenten aus einem großen Dokument zu erfassen. Wir zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell, wenn es als erster Schritt in einem häufig verwendeten E-Mail-basierten Assistenten verwendet wird, um Benutzern bei der Planung von Meetings zu helfen, die Leistung der Aufgaben zur Absichtserkennung und Entitätenextraktion zu verbessern, die der Agent für die korrekte Planung von Meetings benötigt: für eine Reihe von sechs nachgelagerten Aufgaben mithilfe unserer vorgeschlagenen Methode. Wir beobachten einen durchschnittlichen Genauigkeitsgewinn von 35% ohne Rückruf. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass der gleiche Ansatz auch für die Analyse auf Komponentenebene in großen Dokumenten verwendet werden kann, wie z.B. die Identifikation von Signaturblöcken.', 'ko': '예를 들어 전자 우편 기반의 조수 같은 대형 문서를 처리하는 세션 에이전트가 직면한 두드러진 문제는 문서에 조수와 무관한 정보가 자주 나타나는 것이다.반대로 에이전트는 의도를 정확하게 검측하고 이러한 의도와 관련된 실체를 추출하며 필요한 조작을 수행하기 어렵다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 대형 문서에서 관련 정보의 범위를 대리하는 데 사용되는 신경 모델을 제시했다.Dell의 연구에 따르면 이 모델을 이메일 기반의 일반적인 사용자 배정을 돕는 첫 번째 단계로 사용할 때 Dell이 제시하는 모델은 회의를 올바르게 예약하는 데 필요한 의도 탐지와 솔리드 추출 작업의 성능을 향상시키는 데 도움이 됩니다. Dell이 제시한 방법을 사용하여 6개의 다운스트림 작업 그룹을 뛰어넘어우리는 리콜율이 아무런 하락도 없는 상황에서 정확도가 평균 35퍼센트 높아진 것을 관찰했다.그 밖에 우리는 같은 방법이 대형 문서의 구성 요소급 분석, 예를 들어 서명 블록 식별에 사용할 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'یک مشکل بزرگی که توسط ماموران مکالمات با سند بزرگ کار می کنند، با وجود مشترک اطلاعات اغلب در سند است که به مربی اهمیت ندارد. این واسطه برای مامور سخت تر است که دقیقاً هدف\u200cها را شناسایی کند، entities relevant to those intentions extract and perform the desired action. برای حل این مسئله یک مدل عصبی برای جستجوی اطلاعات مربوط به مامور از یک سند بزرگ پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که وقتی اولین مرحله در یک دستیاری بر اساس ایمیل عمومی برای کمک به جلسه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cبندی کاربران استفاده می\u200cشود، مدل پیشنهاد ما کمک می\u200cکند که عملکرد کشف\u200cبندی\u200cهای هدف و اخراج\u200cکننده\u200cای که مامور نیاز دارد برای جلسه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cبندی درست انجام دهند: در یک سوئت از شش کار پایین، با استفاده از روش ما یک سود متوسط از 35 درصد دقیق را بدون یادآوری مشاهده می کنیم. به اضافه، ما نشان می دهیم که همان روش می تواند برای تحلیل سطح بخش در سند بزرگ، مثل شناسایی بلوک امضا استفاده شود.', 'sw': 'A prominent problem faced by conversational agents working with large documents (Eg: email-based assistants) is the frequent presence of information in the document that is irrelevant to the assistant.  Hii inafanya kazi ngumu kwa mtumiaji kutambua nia sahihi, kutengeneza vifaa vinavyohusiana na malengo hayo na kutekeleza hatua inayohitajika. Kupambana na suala hili tunaweka mfano wa neura kwa ajili ya kutangaza taarifa zinazohusiana kwa mtumiaji kutoka kwenye nyaraka kubwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba wakati huo ulitumiwa kama hatua ya kwanza katika msaidizi wa kutumia barua pepe kwa kuwasaidia watumiaji katika mikutano ya mtandaoni, modeli yetu iliypendekezwa inasaidia kuboresha ufanisi wa uchunguzi wa lengo na kazi za kutengeneza vifaa vinavyohitajika na ajenda huyu kwa ajili ya kupanga mikutano sahihi: • tunaangalia ongezeko la wastani kwa asilimia 35 kwa sahihi bila kupungua kwa kumbukumbu yoyote. Kwa nyongeza, tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu hizo zinaweza kutumika kwa uchambuzi wa kiwango cha komponent katika nyaraka kubwa, kama vile utambulisho wa saini.', 'tr': 'Ýük sened bilen işlenýän sohbet ajamlary tarapyndan çykan mesele (Eg: e-mailden tabanly asystenler) senede gaty wagt maglumaty bar. Munuň üçin ajaýyr niýetlerini dogry tanamak üçin kynçylyk edip, amaçlaryň üstüne eşleşen zatlary açmak üçin has kynçylygy oňa çalaýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, täze bir senediň ajaýyp maglumaty bejermek üçin näral nusgasyny görkezýäris. Biz insanlara görkezilýän mekdeplerimizi planlaşdyrmak üçin ilkinji adım olarak ulanylýandygyny görkeýäris. Biziň teklip eden nusgadymyz bilen görkezilýän toplantlary dogry planlaşdyrmak üçin ajaýyr tarapyndan isleýän maksadyň tapylmagyny we taýýarlanmagyny täzeden bejermek üçin kömekleýäris Hatırlamadan ortalama %35 oranı vardır. Üstelik, biz hem bir ýagdaýyň uly sened içinde komponent sevije analýşisi üçin ullanylabilir diýip görkezilýän ýagdaýyny görkez.', 'af': "'n prominente probleem met gesprekslykagente wat met groot dokumente werk (Eg: e-pos-gebaseerde assistente) is die dikwels aangesig van inligting in die dokument wat onbehoorlik is aan die assistent. Hierdie skakel maak dit harder vir die agent om die doels te beskry, uitpak entiteite wat betrokke aan dié doels en uitvoer die gebruikte aksie. Om hierdie probleem te adres, laat ons 'n neurale model voorsien om relevant inligting vir die agent van 'n groot dokument te skep. Ons wys dat wanneer gebruik word as die eerste stap in 'n populêre gebruikte e-posgebaseerde assistent vir hulp van gebruikers skeduleerde meetings, ons voorgestelde model hulp die prestasie van die doel opdekking en entiteite uitpakking opdrag wat deur die agent benodig is vir korrek skeduleerde meetings: deur 'n suite van 6 onderstreem taak, deur ons voorgestelde metode te verbeter, Ons hou op 'n gemiddelde verkry van 35% in presies sonder enige val in rekening. Ons wys ook dat dieselfde toegang kan gebruik word vir komponent vlak analisie in groot dokumente, soos handtekening blok identifikasie.", 'sq': 'Një problem i shquar me të cilin ndeshen agjentët bisedimorë që punojnë me dokumente të mëdha (Eg: asistentë me bazë email) është prania e shpeshtë e informacionit në dokument që nuk është e rëndësishme për asistenten. Kjo nga ana tjetër e bën më të vështirë për agjentin të zbulojë saktësisht qëllimet, të nxjerrë njësitë e rëndësishme për këto qëllime dhe të kryejë veprimin e dëshiruar. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje ne paraqesim një model neuronal për zbulimin e informacionit të rëndësishëm për agjentin nga një dokument i madh. Ne tregojmë se kur përdoret si hapi i parë në një asistent me bazë email të përdorur publikisht për të ndihmuar përdoruesit në planifikimin e takimeve, modeli ynë i propozuar ndihmon përmirësimin e paraqitjes së detyrave të zbulimit të qëllimeve dhe nxjerrjes së njësive të kërkuara nga agjenti për takimet e planifikuara korrekt: në një grup prej 6 detyrave poshtë, duke përdorur metodën tonë të Ne vëzhgojmë një fitim mesatar prej 35% në saktësi pa ndonjë rënie në kujtim. Përveç kësaj, ne demonstrojmë se e njëjta qasje mund të përdoret për analizën e nivelit të komponenteve në dokumente të mëdha, të tilla si identifikimi i bllokut të nënshkrimit.', 'am': 'በታላቅ ሰነዶች (Eg: ኢሜይል-based ረዳቶች) የሚሠራ የአሁኑ የኢሜይል መረጃዎች ሲሆን በአካባቢው ሰነድ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ የመረጃ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ ይህም በተለየ ጊዜ ተቃውሞ አካሄዱን ለመግለጥ እና በተፈለገው ተግባር ለመፈለግ አካባቢዎችን ማውጣት ይችላል፡፡ ወደዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀላቀል አካባቢ ሰነድ የተጠቃሚ መረጃዎችን ለመስጠት የኔural ሞዴል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በተጠቃሚ የኢሜይል ስብሰባዎችን ለመረዳት የኢሜይል ተቃውሞ መጀመሪያ እርምጃን በተጠቀም ጊዜ፣ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴሌያችን በተዘጋጀ ስብሰባዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚያስፈልገውን አካባቢ እና አካባቢ ስራዎችን በመጠቀም ይረዳል፡፡ ነገር ግን ማንኛውም ነገር ሳይታስብ የ35 በመቶ ጥቅም ትርፍን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አንድ ሥርዓት አካባቢ አካላቢ ሰነዶች፣ እንደ ሲንጋፖር አቅጣጫ እንዲሆን ይቻላል ብለን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Հետևյալ խնդիրը, որին հանդիպում են մեծ փաստաթղթերի հետ աշխատող խոսակցության գործիչները (Օրինակ՝ էլեկտրոնային նամակների օգնականները) այն է, որ փաստաթղթի մեջ հաճախ տեղեկատվություն է գտնվում, որը անկարևոր է օգնականին: Սա իր հերթին դժվարանում է գործիչներին ճշգրիտ հայտնաբերել մտքերը, հանել այդ մտքերի հետ կապված միավորները և կատարել ցանկացած գործողությունը: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային մոդել, որպեսզի կարողանանք գտնել գործակալի համար կարևոր տեղեկատվություն մեծ փաստաթղթից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ երբ օգտագործվում ենք որպես առաջին քայլը սովորաբար օգտագործված էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնային համակարգով օգտագործվող օգտագործողների դասավորման հանդիպումների օգնությամբ, մեր առաջարկած մոդելը օգնում է բարելավել նպատակների հայտնաբերման և էլեկտրոնային առանձնահատկությունների վերաբերյալ, որոն Մենք հետևում ենք 35 տոկոսի միջին շահույթը ճշգրտության մեջ, առանց որևէ նվազում հիշողության: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նույն մոտեցումը կարող է օգտագործվել բաղադրիչների մակարդակի վերլուծության համար մեծ փաստաթղթերում, ինչպիսիք են ստորագրությունների բաղադրիչները:', 'bn': 'বিশাল ডকুমেন্টের সাথে কাজ করার (ইমেইল-ভিত্তিক সহকারীদের) আলোচনাকারী এজেন্টের মুখোমুখি হয়েছে একটি বিশাল সমস্যা হচ্ছে এই নথিতে প্রায়শ ত এর পরিবর্তে এজেন্টের উদ্দেশ্য সঠিকভাবে খুঁজে বের করার জন্য এটি কঠিন করে দেয়, যারা এই উদ্দেশ্যের সাথে যুক্ত বস্তুগুলো বে এই বিষয়টি ঠিকানা করার জন্য আমরা একটি নিউরেল মডেল উপস্থাপন করি একটি বড় নথিপত্র থেকে এজেন্টের জন্য প্রযুক্ত তথ্য স্ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে যখন জনপ্রিয় ইমেইল-ভিত্তিক সহকারী হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছিল ব্যবহারকারীদের পরিকল্পনা মিটিং সাহায্য করার জন্য, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল সঠিক পরিকল্পনা করার জন্য এজেন্টের প্রয়োজনীয় গন্তব্য আমাদের দেখা যাচ্ছে যে স্পষ্টভাবে ৩৫% লাভের গড় লাভ, স্মরণে কোন ফ্ল্যাপ ছাড়াই। এছাড়াও আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে একই পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা যাবে বড় নথিপত্রের বিশ্লেষণের জন্য, যেমন স্বাক্ষর ব্লক পরিচয়ের মত।', 'bs': 'Veliki problem s kojim se suočavaju razgovorni agenti koji rade sa velikim dokumentima (Eg: pomoćnici na e-mail) je često prisustvo informacija u dokumentu koji nije bitan asistentu. To je u turn teže da agent precizno otkrije namjere, izvadi entitate koje su relevantne za te namjere i izvrši željenu akciju. Da riješimo ovaj problem, predstavljamo neuralni model za izvlačenje važnih informacija za agent a iz velikog dokumenta. Pokazujemo da, kada se koristi kao prvi korak u popularnom korištenom asistentu na e-mailu za pomoć sastanaka na rasporedu korisnika, naš predloženi model pomaže da poboljšava učinkovitost namjere otkrivanja i izvlačenja objekata koji je agent zahtijevao za ispravno raspoređenje sastanaka: preko apartmana od 6 zadataka u skladištu, koristeći našu predloženu metodu, Primjeđujemo prosječni dobitak od 35% u preciznosti bez ikakvog pad sjećanja. Osim toga, pokazujemo da se isti pristup može koristiti za analizu nivoa komponenta u velikim dokumentima, poput identifikacije bloka potpisivanja.', 'az': 'Böyük belgeler ilə çalışan müzakirçi aģentlər ilə qarşılaşan müzakirçi problemi (Eg: e- poçt tabanlı asistanlar) müəyyən edilən məlumatın çox sıxıntısıdır. Bu, ağantın niyyətlərini doğrudan keçməsini, niyyətlərini bu niyyətlərə qovuşdurmağı və istədiyi hərəkəti yerinə yetirməsini daha zorlaşdırar. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün böyük bir dökümdən agent üçün məlumatı almaq üçün nöral modeli göstəririk. Biz göstəririk ki, insanların ilk adı kimi istifadəçilərin schedule toplantılarına kömək etmək üçün e-maildən istifadə edilən asistanın ilk adı kimi istifadə edildikdə, bizim qurduğumuz modelimiz, agent üçün doğru planlaşdırma məqsədilə ehtiyacımız olan niyyəti keşfetməsini və entitə çıxartmasını yaxşılaşdırmağa kömək edir: 6 a şağı işlərin bir suitində, bizim Biz həmin qədər müəyyən edilmədən ortalama 35%-dən artıqlığı gözləyirik. Daha çox, biz də belə göstəririk ki, imza blok kimliğini, böyük belələrdə komponent seviyyəti analizi üçün istifadə edilə bilər.', 'ca': "Un problema prominent que enfronten els agents de conversació que treballen amb grans documents (Eg: assistents basats en correus electrònics) és la freqüent presença d'informació en el document que és irrelevant per l'assistent. Això dificulta per a l'agent detectar amb precisió les intencions, extrair les entitats pertinents a aquestes intencions i fer la acció desitjada. Per abordar aquesta qüestió presentem un model neural per a descobrir informació pertinentper a l'agent d'un gran document. Mostrem que quan s'utilitza com el primer pas d'un assistent electrònic popularment utilitzat per ajudar els usuaris a planificar reunions, el nostre model proposat ajuda a millorar el rendiment de les tasques de detecció d'intencions i extracció d'entitats requerides per l'agent per planificar les reunions correctament: a través d'una sèrie de 6 tasques avall, utilitzant el nostre mètode proposat,  we observe an average gain of 35% in precision without any drop in recall.  A més, demostram que el mateix enfocament pot ser utilitzat per a l'anàlisi del nivell de components en grans documents, com la identificació de blocs de signatura.", 'cs': 'Významným problémem, kterým čelí komunikační agenti pracující s velkými dokumenty (např. asistenti na bázi e-mailu), je častá přítomnost informací v dokumentu, které jsou pro asistenta irelevantní. To zase ztěžuje agentovi přesně detekovat záměry, extrahovat entity relevantní pro tyto záměry a provést požadovanou akci. Pro řešení tohoto problému představujeme neuronový model pro získání relevantních informací pro agenta z velkého dokumentu. Ukazujeme, že pokud je náš navrhovaný model používán jako první krok v oblíbeně používaném e-mailovém asistentu pro pomoc uživatelům plánovat schůzky, pomáhá zlepšit výkon úkolů detekce záměrů a extrakce entit, které agent požaduje pro správné plánování schůzek: napříč sadou šesti následných úkolů pomocí naší navrhované metody, pozorujeme průměrný zisk přesnosti 35% bez jakéhokoliv poklesu stažení. Dále ukazujeme, že stejný přístup lze použít pro analýzu na úrovni komponent ve velkých dokumentech, jako je identifikace bloků podpisu.', 'et': 'Suurte dokumentidega töötavate vestlusagentide (nt e-postipõhised assistendid) silmapaistev probleem on sagedane teabe olemasolu dokumendis, mis ei ole assistendile oluline. See omakorda muudab agendil raskemaks kavatsuste täpset tuvastamist, nende kavatsustega seotud üksuste väljavõtmist ja soovitud toimingu sooritamist. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks esitame neuromudeli, mille abil uurida aine kohta olulist teavet suurest dokumendist. Näitame, et kui seda kasutatakse populaarselt kasutatava e-postipõhise assistendi esimese sammuna, et aidata kasutajatel koosolekuid planeerida, aitab meie pakutud mudel parandada kavatsuste tuvastamise ja olemi ekstraheerimise ülesannete täitmist, mida agent nõuab koosolekute õigeks planeerimiseks: 6 järgmise etapi ülesande komplekti puhul, kasutades meie pakutud meetodit, Me täheldame keskmist täpsuse suurenemist 35% ilma tagasikutsumiseta. Lisaks näitame, et sama lähenemisviisi saab kasutada komponentide taseme analüüsimiseks suurtes dokumentides, näiteks allkirjaploki identifitseerimisel.', 'fi': 'Suurten asiakirjojen parissa työskentelevien keskusteluagenttien (esim. sähköpostipohjaiset avustajat) ilmeinen ongelma on se, että asiakirjassa on usein tietoja, jotka eivät ole avustajan kannalta olennaisia. Tämä puolestaan vaikeuttaa agentin tarkkaa aikomusten havaitsemista, niiden kannalta merkityksellisten entiteettien poimimista ja halutun toiminnan suorittamista. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi esittelemme neuromallin, jolla voidaan kartoittaa tärkeät tiedot agentille suuresta asiakirjasta. Osoitamme, että kun ehdotettu mallimme on ensimmäinen askel yleisesti käytetyssä sähköpostipohjaisessa avustajassa, joka auttaa käyttäjiä suunnittelemaan kokouksia, se auttaa parantamaan agenttin edellyttämien aikomusten tunnistus- ja entiteettien purkamistehtävien suorituskykyä kokousten oikeaan ajoitukseen: kuuden jatkovaiheen tehtävän sarjassa käyttäen ehdotettua menetelmää, Tarkkuus paranee keskimäärin 35% ilman, että palautus laskee. Lisäksi osoitamme, että samaa lähestymistapaa voidaan käyttää komponenttitason analyysiin suurissa asiakirjoissa, kuten allekirjoituslohkojen tunnistuksessa.', 'ha': "A prominent problem faced by conversational agents working with large documents (Eg: email-based assistants) is the frequent presence of information in the document that is irrelevant to the assistant.  Wannan yana kasa ƙaranci ga mai zartar da shirin ayuka dõmin a gane masu tsari, kuma ka fitar da abubuwa masu da inganci da ke da wannan aikin da aka yi nufin su. Za mu nuna wani motsi na neural wa kwamfyuta da yanzu masu husika wa mai amfani da shi daga takardar wani babba. Tuna nũna cẽwa, idan an yi amfani da ta farkon hancewa a cikin wani mataimaki wanda aka yi amfani da wajen taimakon mai amfani da email-based ga shirin mai amfani da zaman haɗuwa, misalinmu wanda aka buƙata yana ƙara wa gyaranta ga jarraba masu gane da abubuwa da mai amfani da shi na adadin a ƙayyade sigogi: kokan wani ruɓa na aikin 6 na downriver, da ya yi amfani da shiryarwa na buƙata, Kanã ganin rabon tsakanin kashi na 35% da aka lissafa kuma ba da wani rabo da aka tuna ba. Da ƙaranci, za mu nuna cewa za'a yi amfani da wannan hanyarwa don a yi amfani da wa analyi ga daraja na compound cikin takardun duk biyu, kamar misãlin zane-zane-bangon ayuka.", 'sk': 'Viden problem, s katerim se soočajo pogovorni agenti, ki delajo z velikimi dokumenti (npr. pomočniki na podlagi e-pošte), je pogosta prisotnost informacij v dokumentu, ki niso pomembne za pomočnika. Zaradi tega agent težje natančno zazna namere, izvleče subjekte, pomembne za te namene, in izvede želeno dejanje. Za reševanje tega problema predstavljamo nevronski model za določanje pomembnih informacij za agent iz velikega dokumenta. Pokazali smo, da ko se naš predlagani model uporablja kot prvi korak pri popularno uporabljenem e-poštnem pomočniku za pomoč uporabnikom pri načrtovanju srečanj, pomaga izboljšati učinkovitost opravil zaznavanja namena in ekstrakcije entitet, ki jih zahteva agent za pravilno načrtovanje srečanj: v naboru 6 nadaljnjih opravil z uporabo naše predlagane metode, Opazujemo povprečno povečanje natančnosti za 35%, brez zmanjšanja odpoklica. Poleg tega dokazujemo, da je enak pristop mogoče uporabiti za analizo na ravni komponent v velikih dokumentih, kot je identifikacija blokov podpisov.', 'he': 'בעיה ברורה שעומדת בפני סוכני שיחה שעובדים עם מסמכים גדולים (עזרים מבוססים באימייל) היא נוכחות תדירות של מידע במסמך שלא רלוונטית לעוזר. This in turn makes it harder for the agent to accurately detect intents, extract entities relevant to those intents and perform the desired action.  כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה אנחנו מציגים מודל עצבי לחקור מידע רלוונטי לסוכן ממסמך גדול. אנו מראים שכאשר השתמשו בתור הצעד הראשון בעוזר דואר אלקטרוני מבוסס פופולרי כדי לעזור למשתמשים לקבוע פגישות לוח הזמנים, המודל המוצע שלנו עוזר לשפר את ביצועים של גילוי הכוונה והמשימות של היחידות הנדרשות על ידי הסוכן לקבוע פגישות לוח הזמנים נכונים: על ידי סוויטה של 6 משימות לא אנו רואים רווח ממוצע של 35% בדיוק בלי שום ירידה של זיכרון. בנוסף, אנו מוכיחים שאותה גישה יכולה להשתמש לניתוח רמה המרכיבים במסמכים גדולים, כמו זיהוי בלוק חתימה.', 'jv': 'Mungkin kesalahan sing mengko nggawe ajan negoro karo dokumen sing luwih Digawe Jejaring Awak dhéwé éntuk sing perusahaan kelompok ing nggawe ngubah popular nggawe email-basa juter nggawe nggawe ngêngé ngêngé nggawe modèl dhéwé iso nglanggar nggawe geranggap tarjamahan karo akeh penting nggawe aksi winih dhéwé, akeh cara nggawe barang nggawe cara nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe rerungan winih: Rasane Nambah, kita ngomongke aplikasi ngono dianggap sampeyan kang dipileh basa sing komponèn karo dokumen sing luwih dumadhi, ngangge nambah layar kanggo nambah blok', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེན་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་གནད་དོན་ཁག་ཅིག་གིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་བའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟར་རྟོགས་པ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་འདོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་རྒྱུན་བཅོས་པ གནད་དོན་འདི་ལ་བཤད་ན་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཞིག་གིས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་མིག་ལམ་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་དགོས་པ ང་ཚོའི་མིག འུ་ཚོས་ཀླད་པ་གང་རུང་མེད་པའི་ཚད་ལྡན་35%དཔལ་འབྲས་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྒྱ་ཚད་ལྟར་བལྟས་བྱེད། Additionally, we demonstrate that the same approach can be used for component level analysis in large documents such as signature block identification.'}
